{'en': 'Monolingual Phrase Alignment on Parse Forests', 'ar': 'محاذاة العبارة أحادية اللغة في الغابات التحليلية', 'pt': 'Alinhamento de frase monolíngue em florestas de parse', 'es': 'Alineación monolingüe de frases en bosques analizados', 'fr': "Alignement de phrase monolingue sur les forêts d'analyse", 'ja': '構文解析フォレストの単語整列', 'zh': '解析林单语短语齐', 'hi': 'पार्स वनों पर मोनोलिंगुअल वाक्यांश संरेखण', 'ru': 'Выравнивание одноязычных фраз в лесах синтаксического анализа', 'ga': 'Ailíniú Frása Aonteangach ar Fhoraoisí Parse', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egynyelvű kifejezések összehangolása az értelmezett erdőkön', 'el': 'Μονογλωσσική ευθυγράμμιση φράσεων στα δάση Parse', 'mk': 'Монолингуална израмка на фразите на шумите за разгледување', 'it': 'Allineamento delle frasi monolingue sulle foreste di parse', 'lt': 'Monolingų frazių suderinimas su apdorotaisiais miškais', 'ms': 'Jajaran Frasa Monolingual pada Hutan Parse', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസ് കാടുകളില്\u200d മോണോളില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരുപാടാക്കുക', 'kk': 'Тапсырма ормандарындағы бір тілі фраз туралауы', 'mt': 'Allinjament Monolingwali tal-Frażi dwar il-Foresti tal-Analiżi', 'mn': 'Тайлбарлах ой дээрх нэг хэлний хэлний тодорхойлолт', 'no': 'Monolinguelt fråjustering på tolkingskommer', 'pl': 'Wyrównanie jednojęzycznych fraz na lasach parszywych', 'ro': 'Alinierea frazelor monolingve pe pădurile de parcurs', 'sr': 'Monolingualno ispravljanje fraze o razmatranju šuma', 'si': 'මොනෝලින්ගු ප්\u200dරකාරය සම්බන්ධතාවය', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka afka Finnishka ee Darajada', 'sv': 'Enspråkig frasjustering på Parse Forests', 'ta': 'பார்ஸ் காடுகளில் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு', 'ur': 'پارس جنگلوں پر ایک دوسری زبان عبارت الیزانگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Едноезично подравняване на фразите върху горите', 'hr': 'Monolijačka isprava fraze o razmatranju šuma', 'nl': 'Eentalige uitdrukkingen op parsebossen', 'da': 'Ensproget sætningstilpasning på fortolkningsskove', 'de': 'Einsprachige Phrasenausrichtung auf Parsewäldern', 'fa': 'تنظیم عبارت یک زبان روی جنگل پارچ', 'id': 'Penyesuaian Frasa Monolingual pada Hutan Parse', 'ko': 'Parse-Forests 기반 단어 정렬', 'tr': 'Parse Tuzlar', 'sw': 'Utawala wa lugha ya Kimonolinguli kwenye misitu ya Parse', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Rregullimi monolingual i frazave mbi pyjet e analizimit', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Մոնոլինգուալ արտահայտությունների հավասարակշռությունը', 'az': 'Parse Forests Üstündə Monoling Fraze Alignment', 'bn': 'প্যারেস বনের মোনোলোলিভাল বাক্যের একত্রিত', 'bs': 'Monolingualno ispunjavanje fraze na šumi za razmatranje', 'ca': "Aliniament de frases monolíngues en boscos d'analització", 'cs': 'Jednojazyčné zarovnání fráze na parsálních lesích', 'et': 'Ühekeelne fraaside ühtlustamine metsades', 'fi': 'Yksikielinen lauseiden tasaaminen metsämetsissä', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'התאמה מונולינגולית ביערות הפרסים', 'sk': 'Enojezična poravnava fraz na razčlenjenih gozdovih', 'bo': 'Parse Forests'}
{'en': 'We propose an efficient method to conduct phrase alignment on parse forests for paraphrase detection. Unlike previous studies, our method identifies syntactic paraphrases under linguistically motivated grammar. In addition, it allows phrases to non-compositionally align to handle paraphrases with non-homographic phrase correspondences. A dataset that provides gold parse trees and their phrase alignments is created. The experimental results confirm that the proposed method conducts highly accurate phrase alignment compared to human performance.', 'ar': 'نقترح طريقة فعالة لإجراء محاذاة العبارة في غابات التحليل لاكتشاف إعادة الصياغة. على عكس الدراسات السابقة ، تحدد طريقتنا إعادة الصياغة النحوية تحت قواعد اللغة ذات الدوافع اللغوية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإنه يسمح للعبارات بمحاذاة غير تركيبية للتعامل مع إعادة الصياغة مع مطابقة العبارات غير المتجانسة. يتم إنشاء مجموعة بيانات توفر أشجار تحليل الذهب ومحاذاة العبارات الخاصة بهم. تؤكد النتائج التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة تجري محاذاة عبارات عالية الدقة مقارنة بالأداء البشري.', 'es': 'Proponemos un método eficiente para llevar a cabo la alineación de frases en bosques de análisis para la detección de paráfrasis. A diferencia de estudios anteriores, nuestro método identifica paráfrasis sintácticas bajo gramática de motivación lingüística. Además, permite que las frases se alineen de manera no compositiva para manejar paráfrasis con correspondencias de frases no homográficas. Se crea un conjunto de datos que proporciona árboles de análisis de oro y sus alineaciones de frases. Los resultados experimentales confirman que el método propuesto lleva a cabo una alineación de frases altamente precisa en comparación con el rendimiento humano.', 'pt': 'Propomos um método eficiente para conduzir o alinhamento de frases em florestas sintáticas para detecção de paráfrases. Ao contrário de estudos anteriores, nosso método identifica paráfrases sintáticas sob gramática com motivação linguística. Além disso, permite que as frases se alinhem de forma não composicional para lidar com paráfrases com correspondências de frases não-homográficas. Um conjunto de dados que fornece árvores de análise de ouro e seus alinhamentos de frase é criado. Os resultados experimentais confirmam que o método proposto conduz um alinhamento de frases altamente preciso em comparação com o desempenho humano.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une méthode efficace pour effectuer l'alignement des phrases sur les forêts d'analyse pour la détection de paraphrase. Contrairement aux études précédentes, notre méthode identifie les paraphrases syntaxiques dans une grammaire motivée par la langue. En outre, il permet aux phrases de s'aligner de manière non compositionnelle pour gérer les paraphrases avec des correspondances de phrases non homographiques. Un jeu de données qui fournit des arbres d'analyse Gold et leurs alignements de phrases est créé. Les résultats expérimentaux confirment que la méthode proposée permet un alignement de phrase très précis par rapport à la performance humaine.", 'ja': 'パラフレーズ検出のための構文解析森林でのフレーズアライメントを行うための効率的な方法を提案します。これまでの研究とは異なり、私たちの方法は、言語学的に動機づけられた文法の下で構文パラフレーズを識別します。さらに、それは、フレーズが非構成的に整列して、非ホモロジーフレーズ対応のパラフレーズを扱うことを可能にする。金色の解析ツリーとそのフレーズの配置を提供するデータセットが作成されます。実験結果は、提案された方法が人間のパフォーマンスと比較して非常に正確なフレーズアライメントを行うことを確認している。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем эффективный метод для проведения выравнивания фраз по парцевым лесам для обнаружения перефразов. В отличие от предыдущих исследований, наш метод идентифицирует синтаксические парафразы в лингвистически мотивированной грамматике. Кроме того, он позволяет фразам некомпозиционно выравниваться для обработки парафраз с негомографическими соответствиями фраз. Создается датасет, который предоставляет золотые синтаксические деревья и выравнивание их фраз. Экспериментальные результаты подтверждают, что предлагаемый метод обеспечивает высокоточное выравнивание фраз по сравнению с характеристиками человека.', 'zh': '有效之法,施于解析林短语齐,以行释义检。 与前论不同,语法下识句法释义。 许短语以非齐,以处非同调短语之释义。 将创一数集,该数集给黄金解析树及短语对齐。 实验实比于人,其道有高正短语齐力。', 'hi': 'हम एक कुशल विधि का प्रस्ताव करने के लिए पार्स वनों पर वाक्यांश संरेखण का संचालन करने के लिए व्याख्या का पता लगाने के लिए. पिछले अध्ययनों के विपरीत, हमारी विधि भाषाई रूप से प्रेरित व्याकरण के तहत वाक्यात्मक व्याख्याओं की पहचान करती है। इसके अलावा, यह वाक्यांशों को गैर-होमोग्राफिक वाक्यांश पत्राचार के साथ पैराफ्रेज़ को संभालने के लिए गैर-रचनात्मक रूप से संरेखित करने की अनुमति देता है। एक डेटासेट जो सोने के पार्स के पेड़ और उनके वाक्यांश संरेखण प्रदान करता है, बनाया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम पुष्टि करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि मानव प्रदर्शन की तुलना में अत्यधिक सटीक वाक्यांश संरेखण का संचालन करती है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid modh éifeachtach chun ailíniú frásaí a dhéanamh ar fhoraoisí parsála chun athinsint a bhrath. Murab ionann agus staidéir roimhe seo, aithníonn ár modh paraphrasaí comhréire faoi ghramadach spreagtha teanga. Ina theannta sin, ceadaíonn sé frásaí a ailíniú go neamh-chomhdhéanamh chun paraphrases a láimhseáil le comhfhreagras frásaí neamh-homagrafacha. Cruthaítear tacar sonraí a sholáthraíonn crainn pharsála óir agus a n-ailínithe frása. Deimhníonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go ndéanann an modh atá beartaithe ailíniú frása an-chruinn i gcomparáid le feidhmíocht an duine.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για τη διεξαγωγή ευθυγράμμισης φράσεων σε δάση ανάλυσης για την ανίχνευση παραφράσεων. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες μελέτες, η μέθοδος μας εντοπίζει συντακτικές παραφράσεις κάτω από γλωσσικά υποκινούμενη γραμματική. Επιπλέον, επιτρέπει στις φράσεις να ευθυγραμμιστούν μη σύνθετα για να χειριστούν παραφράσεις με μη ομοιογενείς αντιστοιχίες φράσεων. Δημιουργείται ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που παρέχει χρυσά δέντρα ανάλυσης και τις ευθυγραμμίσεις φράσεων τους. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα επιβεβαιώνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος διεξάγει εξαιρετικά ακριβή ευθυγράμμιση φράσεων σε σύγκριση με την ανθρώπινη απόδοση.', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy hatékony módszert a kifejezések összehangolására az elemzőerdőkben parafrázis detektálására. A korábbi tanulmányokkal ellentétben módszerünk nyelvtanilag motivált nyelvtani nyelvtani szintaktikus parafrázisokat azonosít. Ezenkívül lehetővé teszi a kifejezések kompozíciós módon történő igazítását a parafrázisok nem homográfiai kifejezések megfelelőségének kezeléséhez. Létrejön egy olyan adathalmaz, amely aranyfákat és kifejezési igazításokat biztosít. A kísérleti eredmények megerősítik, hogy a javasolt módszer rendkívül pontos kifejezési igazítást végez az emberi teljesítményhez képest.', 'it': "Proponiamo un metodo efficiente per condurre l'allineamento delle frasi sulle foreste parse per il rilevamento delle parafrasi. A differenza di studi precedenti, il nostro metodo identifica parafrasi sintattici sotto grammatica motivata linguisticamente. Inoltre, consente alle frasi di allinearsi non compositivamente per gestire parafrasi con corrispondenze di frasi non omogenee. Viene creato un set di dati che fornisce gli alberi di analisi oro e i loro allineamenti di frase. I risultati sperimentali confermano che il metodo proposto conduce un allineamento delle frasi altamente accurato rispetto alle prestazioni umane.", 'lt': 'Siūlome veiksmingą parafrazės nustatymui skirtų miškų frazių suderinimo metodą. Priešingai nei ankstesniuose tyrimuose, mūsų metodas nustato sintaksines parafrazes pagal kalbos motyvuotą gramatiką. Be to, jis leidžia frazėms nesuderinti su sudėtimi, kad būtų galima tvarkyti parafrazes ne homografinėmis frazėmis. Sukurtas duomenų rinkinys, kuriame pateikiami aukso analizavimo medžiai ir jų frazių sureguliavimai. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai patvirtina, kad siūlomas metodas atlieka labai tikslų frazių suderinimą, palyginti su žmogaus veiklos rezultatais.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме ефикасен метод за спроведување на поправка на фразите на разгледувачките шуми за детекција на парафрази. За разлика од претходните студии, нашиот метод идентификува синтактички парафрази под јазички мотивирана граматика. Покрај тоа, овозможува фразите да се некомпозиционализираат за да се справат со парафрази со нехомографски кореспонденции. A dataset that provides gold parse trees and their phrase alignments is created.  Експерименталните резултати потврдуваат дека предложениот метод спроведува високо прецизно прилагодување на фразите во споредба со човечката перформанса.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვფიქტირებთ ეფექტიური მეტი, რომელიც ფრაზების სწორებაზე პარაფეზების განახლებისთვის პარაფეზების განახლებისთვის. წინა კვლევების განმავლობაში, ჩვენი მეტი სინტაქტიური პარაფრაზების განსაზღვრება ენგურისტიკურად მოტივირებული გრამიმაში. დამატებით, სტრაზები არ კომპოზიციურად გადასრულება პარაფრაზების გადასრულებას, რომელიც არ ჰომოგრაფიკური ფრაზების კომპორციენტებით. მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც დააყენებს მონაცემების პარასტის ხელები და მათი ფრაზების კონფიგურაცია შექმნა. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები დარწმუნდება, რომ პროგენტირებული პროგენტი ძალიან მარტივი ფრაზების დასწორება ადამიანის წარმოდგენებით', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസ് കാടുകളില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണമായ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. പാര്\u200dഫ്രേസ് കണ മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് പാരാഫ്രാഫ്രസ്സുകളെ ഭാഷക്ക് മ കൂടാതെ അതിനു വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. ഹോമോഗ്രാഫിക്ക്  സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ പാര്\u200dസ് മരങ്ങളും വാക്കുകളുടെ മാതൃകങ്ങളും സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി', 'kk': 'Біз парафразды анықтау үшін ормандарды талдау үшін сөздерді түзету әдісін таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы зерттеулерге қарамастан, біздің әдіміміз лингвистикалық мотивациялық грамматикалық синтактикалық парафраттарды анықтайды. Қосымша, бұл сөздерді геомографиялық сөздердің сәйкестіктері емес парафразтарды түзетуге мүмкіндік береді. Алтын талдау ағаштарын және олардың сөздерінің түзетуі құрылады. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер таңдалған әдістер адамдардың істеміне салыстырып тәжірибелі сөздерді өте дұрыс түзетуді тексереді.', 'mn': 'Бид хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлдохын тулд өргөн хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлдохын тулд бүтээмжтэй арга зам зааж өгдөг. Өмнөх судалгаанаас ялгаатай, бидний арга нь хэл хэлний урам зориулсан грамматикийн доор синтактикийн парафразуудыг тодорхойлдог. Үүнээс гадна тэр үг нь хомографик үг биш харилцааны харилцаатай параграфуудыг зохицуулахад зохицуулах боломжтой болгодог. Алтын хуваалцах мод болон өгөгдлийн хэлбэрүүдийг бүтээж чадна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд хүний үйлдвэрлэлтэй харьцуулахад илэрхийллийн арга нь маш тодорхой хэлбэрийг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy skuteczną metodę przeprowadzania wyrównywania fraz na lasach parse dla wykrywania parafraz. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich badań, nasza metoda identyfikuje parafrazy składni w ramach gramatyki motywowanej językowo. Ponadto umożliwia wyrównanie zwrotów niekompozycyjnych w celu obsługi parafraz z niehomograficznymi korespondencjami fraz. Tworzony jest zbiór danych, który zapewnia złote drzewa parsowania i ich wyrównania fraz. Wyniki eksperymentalne potwierdzają, że proponowana metoda przeprowadza bardzo dokładne ustawienie fraz w porównaniu z wydajnością człowieka.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein effektiv metode for å utføra tekstjustering på tolking av skog for oppdaging av parafraser. I motsetning til førre studier identifiserer vår metode syntaktiske parafraser under språkstisk motivert grammar. I tillegg kan det tillata frasar ikkje-komposisjonell justera for å handtera parafrasar med ikkje-homografiske fråkoresponseringar. Name Den eksperimentelle resultatene stadfestar at den foreslåde metoden gjer svært nøyaktig utforming av frasen sammenlignet med menneskelige utviklingar.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan kaedah efisien untuk menjalankan aliran frasa pada hurai hutan untuk pengesan parafrasa. Unlike previous studies, our method identifies syntactic paraphrases under linguistically motivated grammar.  Selain itu, ia membenarkan frasa untuk mengajar secara tidak komposisi untuk mengendalikan parafrasa dengan persamaan frasa bukan homografik. Set data yang menyediakan pepohon hurai emas dan penyesuaian frasa mereka dicipta. Hasil percubaan mengesahkan bahawa kaedah yang direncanakan melakukan penyesuaian frasa yang tepat dibandingkan dengan prestasi manusia.', 'ro': 'Propunem o metodă eficientă de a efectua alinierea frazelor pe pădurile de parsare pentru detectarea parafrazei. Spre deosebire de studiile anterioare, metoda noastră identifică parafraze sintactice sub gramatică motivată lingvistic. În plus, permite frazelor să se alinieze non-compozițional pentru a gestiona parafraze cu corespondențe non-omografice ale frazelor. Se creează un set de date care furnizează arbori de analizare aurie și alinierea frazelor lor. Rezultatele experimentale confirmă faptul că metoda propusă efectuează o aliniere foarte precisă a frazelor comparativ cu performanța umană.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo efikasnu metodu da obavimo prilagodbu fraza za analizu šuma za detekciju parafraza. Za razliku od prethodnih studija, naša metoda identifikuje sintaktične parafraze pod lingvistički motiviranom gramatikom. Osim toga, dozvoljava se rečenicama da se ne-kompozicionalno poravnaju da se nose parafraze sa nehomografskim frazom. Zemlja podataka koja pruža zlatnu analizu drveća i njihova formula je stvorena. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju da predložena metoda vodi veoma taènu prilagodbu fraza u usporedbi sa ljudskim izvodima.', 'so': 'Waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab faa’iido ah oo ku sameynaya hadalka la isbedelay kaynta baarkana si loo garto baaritaanka baaritaanka. Waxbarashada hore oo kala duwan, qaababkayagu wuxuu ku qoran yahay heerarka isku-dhaqdhaqaaqa ee luuqadda lagu hagaajiyey. Intaas waxaa dheer oo ay u oggolaan karaan erayo aan la mid aheyn in lagu sameeyo marxaladaha oo aan isku mid aheyn. Taariikhda waxaa la abuuray geedo beroosh ah oo dahab ah iyo hadalkooda la mid dhigay. resultinta imtixaanka waxay xaqiijiyaan in qaabka la soo jeeday ay ay sameeyaan si aad u saxda oo u sahlan hadalka, iyadoo la barbardhiga tababarka dadka.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ් මුලින් අධ්\u200dයානය වගේම, අපේ විධානය සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් භාෂාවික වාර්තාවක් සඳහා සංකේතික පැ ඒ වගේම, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක Name පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en effektiv metod för att genomföra frasjustering på parseskogar för parafrasdetektering. Till skillnad från tidigare studier identifierar vår metod syntaktiska parafraser under språkligt motiverad grammatik. Dessutom tillåter det fraser att icke-kompositionellt anpassa för att hantera parafraser med icke-homografiska fraskorrespondenser. Ett dataset som ger guldparsträd och deras frasjusteringar skapas. De experimentella resultaten bekräftar att den föreslagna metoden utför mycket noggrann frasjustering jämfört med mänsklig prestanda.', 'ta': 'நாம் சொற்றொடரை ஒழுங்குபடுத்த வேண்டும் பார்ச் காடுகளில் செயல்படுத்த வேண்டும் சொற்றொடரை பரிந்துரைக்கி முந்தைய ஆய்வுகளை வித்தியாசமாக, எங்கள் முறைமையில் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் சொற்றொடர்களை மொழிமொழியில் ஊக்க கூடுதலாக, இது சொற்றொடர்களை ஒத்திசைக்கு அனுமதிக்கிறது பொருத்தமில்லாத சொற்றொடர்களை கையாள செய்ய அனுமதிக்கிறது. Name முயற்சி முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہم ایک مفید طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ پارفریز شناسایی کے لئے پارس جنگل کے بارے میں فریز الیزام کریں۔ اگلے مطالعہ کے بغیر، ہماری طریقہ سینٹکتیک پارافریز کو زبان کے ذریعہ منصوب کرتا ہے. اس کے علاوہ، یہ فریزوں کو بغیر محبوب طریقے سے پارافریزوں کے ساتھ سمجھنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ایک ڈاٹ سٹ جو سونے کے درختوں کو پارس کرتا ہے اور ان کے فرشتوں کی تعمیر پیدا کی جاتی ہے. آزمائش کے نتائج کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ انسان کے کامیابی کے مقابلہ میں بہت سیدھی فرشتوں کی تعمیر کرتی ہے.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu metodu effiċjenti għat-twettiq tal-allinjament tal-frażi dwar il-foresti tal-ipproċessar għall-identifikazzjoni tal-parafrażi. Unlike previous studies, our method identifies syntactic paraphrases under linguistically motivated grammar.  Barra minn hekk, tippermetti li l-frażijiet jiġu allinjati b’mod mhux kompożittiv biex jimmaniġġjaw il-parafrażijiet b’korrispondenzi ta’ frażijiet mhux omografiċi. Ġie maħluq sett ta’ dejta li jipprovdi siġar tal-analizzazzjoni tad-deheb u l-allinjamenti tal-frażi tagħhom. Ir-riżultati sperimentali jikkonfermaw li l-metodu propost iwettaq allinjament preċiż ħafna tal-frażi meta mqabbel mal-prestazzjoni umana.', 'uz': "We propose an efficient method to conduct phrase alignment on parse forests for paraphrase detection.  Oldingi o'rganishlardan ham o'xshash, bizning usuli tillarda koʻpaytirilgan grammatik parametrlarini aniqlaydi. Qoʻshimcha, bu so'zlarni kompyuterda qoʻyish imkoniyatlarni qoʻllash imkoniyatlariga ruxsat beradi. Name Taʼminlovchi natijalari qo'llanilgan usul inson amalga oshirilgan imkoniyatlarni juda to ʻgʻri toʻgʻri soʻzni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp hiệu quả để chỉnh các cụm từ trên rừng phân tích để biết được hình ảnh. Không như các nghiên cứu trước, phương pháp này xác định các liệt thuật ngữ pháp. Thêm vào đó, nó cho phép đoạn văn thẳng thẳng định để giải quyết các đoạn thơ bằng những từ ngữ không đồng tính. Một bộ dữ liệu cung cấp cây cha vàng và cây câu của chúng được tạo ra. Các kết quả thử nghiệm xác nhận phương pháp này thực hiện việc chỉnh các cụm từ rất chính xác so với kết quả của con người.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en effektiv metode til at udføre sætningsjustering på parseskove til parafrasedetektion. I modsætning til tidligere studier identificerer vores metode syntaktiske parafraser under sprogligt motiveret grammatik. Derudover giver det sætninger mulighed for ikke-kompositionelt at justere for at håndtere parafraser med ikke-homografiske sætningskomponenter. Et datasæt, der giver guld parse træer og deres sætning justeringer oprettes. De eksperimentelle resultater bekræfter, at den foreslåede metode udfører meget nøjagtig sætning justering sammenlignet med menneskelig ydeevne.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме ефективен метод за провеждане на подравняване на фразите върху анализиращи гори за откриване на парафрази. За разлика от предишни изследвания, методът ни идентифицира синтактични парафрази под лингвистично мотивираната граматика. В допълнение, тя позволява фразите да не се съгласуват композиционно, за да се обработват парафрази с нехомографски фразови кореспонденции. Създава се набор от данни, който предоставя златни анализи дървета и техните фрази подравнявания. Експерименталните резултати потвърждават, че предложеният метод провежда високо точно изравняване на фразите в сравнение с човешките показатели.', 'nl': 'We stellen een efficiënte methode voor om frase alignment uit te voeren op parse forests voor parafrase detectie. In tegenstelling tot eerdere studies identificeert onze methode syntactische parafrases onder linguïstisch gemotiveerde grammatica. Bovendien kunnen zinnen niet-compositioneel uitlijnen om parafrases met niet-homografische frasecorrespondenties te behandelen. Er wordt een dataset gemaakt die gouden parse bomen en hun uitdrukkingen bevat. De experimentele resultaten bevestigen dat de voorgestelde methode zeer nauwkeurige zinsuitlijning uitvoert in vergelijking met menselijke prestaties.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo učinkovitu metodu provođenja rješenja fraza za analizu šuma za otkrivanje parafraza. Za razliku od prethodnih ispitivanja, naša metoda identificira sintaktične parafraze pod lingvistički motiviranom gramatikom. Osim toga, to omogućava rečenicama da se ne-kompozicionalno poravnaju kako bi rješavali parafraze sa neografskim dopisnicama fraze. Postavka podataka koja pruža zlatnu analizu drveća i njihova izraza poravnana je. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju da predložena metoda provodi vrlo preciznu prilagodbu fraza u usporedbi s ljudskim učinkovitostom.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine effiziente Methode vor, um Phrasen Alignment in Parse Forests für die Paraphrasenerkennung durchzuführen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Studien identifiziert unsere Methode syntaktische Paraphrasen unter linguistisch motivierter Grammatik. Darüber hinaus erlaubt es Phrasen, sich nicht kompositorisch auszurichten, um Paraphrasen mit nicht homographischen Phrasenkorrespondenzen zu behandeln. Es wird ein Datensatz erstellt, der Gold Parse-Bäume und deren Phrasen-Ausrichtungen bereitstellt. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse bestätigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode im Vergleich zur menschlichen Leistung eine hochgenaue Phrasenausrichtung durchführt.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan metode efisien untuk menjalankan alignment frasa pada parse hutan untuk deteksi parafrasa. Unlike previous studies, our method identifies syntactic paraphrases under linguistically motivated grammar.  Selain itu, ia memungkinkan frasa untuk tidak-komposisi menyesuaikan untuk menangani parafrasa dengan korespondensi frasa non-homografi. Sebuah set data yang menyediakan pohon penghuraian emas dan penyesuaian frasa mereka diciptakan. Hasil percobaan mengkonfirmasi bahwa metode yang diusulkan melakukan penyesuaian frasa yang sangat akurat dibandingkan dengan prestasi manusia.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش موثرت برای تحلیل کردن عبارت بر جنگل\u200cها برای شناسایی پارافریز. برخلاف تحقیقات قبلی، روش ما پارافراژ\u200cهای سنتاکتیک را تحت گرامی زبانی انگیزه می\u200cکند. در addition, it allows phrases to non-compositionally align to handle paraphrases with non-homographic phrases. یک مجموعه داده\u200cای که درخت\u200cهای تجزیه طلا را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد و تعداد\u200cهای عبارت آنها ایجاد می\u200cشود. نتیجه آزمایشی تایید می\u200cکند که این روش پیشنهاد به مقایسه\u200cی عملکرد انسان تعیین کردن عبارت بسیار دقیق را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza njia yenye ufanisi ya kutekeleza maneno ya upatikanaji katika misitu ya parge kwa ajili ya kutambua misingi. Tofauti na utafiti uliopita, mbinu yetu inaonyesha misingi ya ushirikiano chini ya gramma inayohamasishwa kwa lugha. Zaidi ya hayo, inaruhusu maneno ya kuunganisha kwa njia isiyo na ushirikiano ili kukabiliana na maneno yasiyo ya kishoga. Seti ya taarifa inayotoa miti ya chuo cha dhahabu na maneno yao yanatengenezwa. Matokeo ya majaribio yanathibitisha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa inafanya maneno yenye sahihi ukilinganisha na utendaji wa binadamu.', 'ko': '우리는 해석림에 짧은 단어를 맞추어 해석 검측을 하는 효과적인 방법을 제시했다.이전의 연구와 달리 우리의 방법은 언어 동기 문법에 따라 문법의 해석을 식별하는 것이다.그 밖에 단어의 비조합 정렬을 허용하여 비동형단어에 대응하는 해석을 처리한다.황금 해석 트리와 짧은 단어를 맞추는 데이터 집합을 만듭니다.실험 결과 이 방법은 인류 행위에 비해 짧은 말의 정합 정밀도가 비교적 높은 것으로 나타났다.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n effektief metode om frase belyning op verwerking bos te doen vir parafrase beskrywing. Ongelik soos vorige studie, identifiseer ons metode sintaktieke parafrase onder lingwisiese motiveerde grammatiek. In addition, it allows phrases to non- compositionally align to handle paraphrases with non- homographic phrase correspondences. Name Die eksperimentale resultate bevestig dat die voorgestelde metode baie presies uitgelyking van frase vergelyk met menslike prestasie.", 'tr': 'Biz fraz a첵lamak 체챌in toka첵lary barlamak 체챌in etkinlik bir y철ntemi teklip edip g철r첵채ris 횜흫ki ders 첵aly, bizi흫 metodamyz lingwistiki n채hili gural첵an parafrazleri tany힊dyr첵ar. 횥m채pli, s철zleri흫 homografik s철zleri흫 terjimeleri gollanmasyny m체mkin ed첵채r. Altyn parslamak aga챌laryny we olary흫 s철zle힊melerini bejeren veri setir. Deneysel netijeler teklip eden y철ntemi흫 adamlary흫 netijesi bilen g철r채 edil s철zleri흫 dogry 챌yky힊lygyny tassykla첵ar.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë të efektshme për të kryer rregullimin e frazëve në pyjet e analizimit për zbulimin e parafrazëve. Ndryshe nga studimet e mëparshme, metoda jonë identifikon parafrazat sintaktike nën gramatikën e motivuar gjuhësisht. Përveç kësaj, ajo lejon që frazat të vijnë në mënyrë jo-kompozitive për të trajtuar parafrazat me korrespondenca jo-homografike. Një set të dhënash që ofron pemë të analizuara të artë dhe krijohet rregullimi i frazëve të tyre. Rezultatet eksperimentale konfirmojnë se metoda e propozuar kryen përputhje shumë të saktë të frazëve krahasuar me performancën njerëzore.', 'am': 'በፓርስ ዱር ላይ ቃላትን ለመግለጥ የሚቻልል ሥርዓት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት በተለየ፣ method በቋንቋው በተንቀሳቀሱ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በተመሳሳይ ግንኙነቶችን ያስታውቃል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ቃላትን በአካባቢነት ለመቀላቀል በተጨማሪው የግንኙነት አካላት በተለየ የኮሞግራፊ ቃላት ለመቀላቀል ይፈቅዳል፡፡ የወርቅ መክፈቻ ዛፎችና የቃላቸውን መስፈሪያ የሚያደርግ የመድረክ setን ይፈጥራል። The experimental results confirm that the proposed method conducts highly accurate phrase alignment compared to human performance.', 'az': 'Biz parafraz tanıması üçün quşların parçalanması barəsində fərz çəkilməsi üçün faydalı bir yolu təklif edirik. Əvvəlki təhsil kimi, bizim metodumuz dilində motivatlı gramatika altında sintaktik parafrazləri tanıyır. Üstəlik, frazləri homografik deyil frazlərlə birlikdə parafrazləri idarə etmək üçün müəyyən edir. Altın ayırma ağaclarını və frazi tərəflərini sağlayan verilən verilən quruluş yaradılmışdır. Müxtəlif sonuçlar təbliğ edilmiş metodun insan performansı ilə qarşılaşdığı çox doğru fraz tərəzisini təsdiqlədiyini təsdiqləyir.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի արդյունավետ մեթոդ, որպեսզի կատարենք արտահայտված անտառների վերլուծությունը պարաարտահայտության համար: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ ուսումնասիրություններին, մեր մեթոդը ճանաչում է սինտակտիկ պարաֆրեզներ լեզվաբանական մոտիվացված գրամագրության տակ: Ավելին, այն թույլ է տալիս արտահայտություններին ոչ կոմպոզիցիոն համապատասխանել, որպեսզի հաղորդակցվեն առաարտահայտությունների հետ ոչ համագրական արտահայտություններով: Տեղեկատվական համակարգ է, որը պարունակում է ոսկու վերլուծություն կատարող ծառեր և դրանց արտահայտությունների հավասարումներ: The experimental results confirm that the proposed method conducts highly accurate phrase alignment compared to human performance.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্যারাফ্রেস আবিষ্কারের জন্য পার্স বনের উপর বাক্যের সাজানোর জন্য একটি কার্যকর পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি। পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণার অনুরূপ, আমাদের পদ্ধতি ভাষায় উৎসাহিত গ্রামারের অধীনে সিন্ট্যাকটিক প্যারাফারেস চিহ্ন এছাড়াও, এটি শব্দগুলো অসমকামিক বাক্যের সংশ্লিষ্ট প্যারাফ্রেক্স ব্যবহার করার সুযোগ প্রদান করার অনুমতি দেয়। একটি ডাটাসেট যা সোনার পার্স গাছ এবং তাদের বাক্যের প্রতিনিধি তৈরি করা হয়েছে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল নিশ্চিত করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি মানুষের প্রদর্শনের তুলনায় খুব সঠিকভাবে বাক্য প্রকাশ করে।', 'bs': 'Predlažemo efikasnu metodu da provedemo poravnanje fraza za analizu šume za detektivu parafraza. Za razliku od prethodnih ispitivanja, naša metoda identificira sintaktične parafraze pod lingvistički motiviranom gramatikom. Osim toga, to omogućava rečenicama da se ne-kompozicionalno poravnaju kako bi rješavali parafraze sa neografskim frazom. Zemlja podataka koja pruža zlatnu analizu drveća i njihova formula je stvorena. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju da predložena metoda vodi vrlo preciznu prilagodbu fraza u usporedbi s ljudskim učinkovitostom.', 'ca': "Proposem un mètode eficient per a realitzar l'allinjament de frases en boscos d'analització per detectar parafrases. A diferència dels estudis anteriors, el nostre mètode identifica parafrases sinàctiques sota una gramàtica motivada lingüísticament. A més, permet que les frases s'alinyin de manera no compositiva per manejar parafrases amb corresponències de frases no homogràfiques. Es crea un conjunt de dades que proporciona arbres d'analyse d'or i alliniaments de frases. Els resultats experimentals confirmen que el mètode proposat condueix un alliniament de frases molt precis comparat amb el rendiment humà.", 'et': 'Pakume välja tõhusa meetodi fraaside ühtlustamiseks parsimismetsades parafraaside tuvastamiseks. Erinevalt varasematest uuringutest tuvastab meie meetod süntaktilisi parafraase keeleliselt motiveeritud grammatika alusel. Lisaks võimaldab see lauseid mittekompositsiooniliselt joondada, et käsitleda parafraase mitteomograafiliste fraaside vastavustega. Lootakse andmekogum, mis pakub kullaparsimispuid ja nende fraasijoondusi. Katsetulemused kinnitavad, et kavandatud meetod viib läbi väga täpse fraaside joondamise võrreldes inimese jõudlusega.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme tehokasta menetelmää fraasien tasaamiseen parsimetsässä parafraasien havaitsemista varten. Toisin kuin aiemmissa tutkimuksissa, menetelmämme tunnistaa syntaktiset parafraasit kielellisesti motivoituneen kieliopin alla. Lisäksi se sallii lauseiden ei-kompositionaalisen linjauksen käsitellä parafraaseja, joilla ei-homografinen lauseiden vastaavuus. Luodaan datajoukko, joka tarjoaa kultaisia jäsennyspuita ja niiden lauseiden tasauksia. Kokeelliset tulokset vahvistavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä suorittaa erittäin tarkan lauseiden linjauksen verrattuna ihmisen suorituskykyyn.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme efektivní metodu provádění zarovnávání frází na parse forests pro detekci parafrází. Na rozdíl od předchozích studií naše metoda identifikuje syntaktické parafráze pod jazykově motivovanou gramatikou. Kromě toho umožňuje frázím kompozičně zarovnat a zpracovat parafráze s neohomografickými frázovými korespondencemi. Vytvoří se datová sada, která poskytuje zlaté parsovací stromy a jejich zarovnání frází. Experimentální výsledky potvrzují, že navrhovaná metoda provádí vysoce přesné zarovnání frází ve srovnání s lidským výkonem.', 'jv': 'We proposal an effectt method to kondo a text alignment on PASS fora for paraffrase detection. Tulung wih-wih akeh pisan kelas nang saben, akeh-wih dadine sinaksi paraFraksi sing mungkar nggambar barang kelas basan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Laptop" and "Desktop', 'sk': 'Predlagamo učinkovito metodo za izvajanje poravnave fraz na razčlenjenih gozdovih za detekcijo parafraz. Za razliko od prejšnjih študij naša metoda identificira sintaktične parafraze pod jezikovno motivirano slovnico. Poleg tega omogoča, da stavki niso kompozicijsko usklajeni, da obravnavajo parafraze z nehomogografskimi stavnimi korespondencami. Ustvari se nabor podatkov, ki zagotavlja zlato razčlenitev dreves in njihove poravnave fraz. Rezultati poskusov potrjujejo, da predlagana metoda izvaja zelo natančno usklajevanje fraz v primerjavi s človeško zmogljivostjo.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים שיטה יעילה לבצע התאמה של ביטויים על יערות מעבדה לזהות ביטויים. בניגוד למחקרים הקודמים, השיטה שלנו מזהה פראפרסמות סינטקטיות תחת גרמטיקה מוטיבציה לשונית. חוץ מזה, זה מאפשר ביטויים להתאים באופן לא מורכב כדי להתמודד עם ביטויים לא הומוגרפיים תואמות. קבוצת נתונים שמספקת עצי בדיקת זהב והמשפטים שלהם יוצרים. תוצאות הניסויים מאשרות שהשיטה המוצעת מבצעת התאמה מדויקת ביותר בהשוואה לביצוע אנושי.', 'ha': "Tuna goyya da wata hanyoyi mai amfani da za'a sami magana a kan misitun parse dõmin ka gane fassarar. Di motsi da akan da aka riga, metoden mu na gane fassarar syntactic a cikin linguin da aka haramta grammar. Da wannan, yana yarda da maganar zuwa masu daidaita na-composition don ya yi amfani da fassarar da bã-gayografi. An halittar data da ke samar da itãce na zĩnãriya da matsayinsu mai daidaita. Matarin da aka jarraba yana gaskata cewa metoden da aka buƙata, yana tafiyar da sauri mai ƙayyade da gaskiyar a sami da fassarar mutum.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཕན་ཐོག་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བཤད་པ་ལས་ནགས་ཚལ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ། སྔོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་མིན་པར། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་ཚིག་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཆར འདི་ལ་བསྡུར་ན། ཚིག་རྟགས་མིན་པར་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མིན་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པ ཆང་གི་ཟུར་བ་དང་ཁོ་ཚོའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཕྲ་རིང་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་བྱུང་ཡོད། experimental results confirm that the proposed method conducts highly accurate phrase alignment compared to human performance.'}
{'en': 'Heterogeneous Supervision for Relation Extraction : A Representation Learning Approach', 'ar': 'الإشراف غير المتجانس لاستخراج العلاقة: نهج تعلم التمثيل', 'fr': "Supervision hétérogène pour l'extraction de relations\xa0: une approche d'apprentissage par représentation", 'es': 'Supervisión heterogénea para la extracción de relaciones: un enfoque de aprendizaje de representación', 'pt': 'Supervisão Heterogênea para Extração de Relações: Uma Abordagem de Aprendizagem de Representação', 'ja': '関係抽出の異種監督：表象学習アプローチ', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए विषम पर्यवेक्षण: एक प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने का दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Гетерогенный надзор за извлечением связей: подход к обучению репрезентации', 'zh': '所取异构监:一曰学法', 'ga': 'Maoirseacht Ilchineálach le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh: Cur Chuige Foghlama Léiriúcháin', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Heterogén felügyelet a kapcsolatok kivonására: a reprezentációs tanulási megközelítés', 'el': 'Η ετερογενή εποπτεία για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων: Μια προσέγγιση μάθησης αναπαράστασης', 'it': "Supervisione eterogena per l'estrazione della relazione: un approccio di apprendimento della rappresentazione", 'kk': 'Қатыстарды тарқату үшін тегероген наблюдение: Көрсету оқыту жағдайы', 'ms': 'Supervision Heterogeneous for Relation Extraction: A Representation Learning Approach', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഹെറോജെന്നിയുടെ സൂപ്പര്\u200dവ്വതത്തിനു്: ഒരു പ്രതിനിധി പഠിക്കുന്ന പഠനം', 'mt': 'Heterogeneous Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Representation Learning Approach', 'mn': 'Хувь хамааралтай хайлтын хяналтын төлөвлөгөө: Зөвлөгөө суралцах ойлголт', 'no': 'Heterogen oversikt for utpakking av relasjonar: ein læringstilgang til representasjonen', 'pl': 'Heterogenny nadzór nad ekstrakcją relacji: podejście do uczenia się reprezentacji', 'ro': 'Supravegherea heterogenă a extracției relațiilor: o abordare de învățare a reprezentării', 'lt': 'Heterogeninė santykių ekstrakcijos priežiūra: reprezentacinio mokymosi metodas', 'mk': 'Хетерогенска надзора за екстракција на врските: пристап на учење на претставништво', 'sr': 'Heterogeni nadzor za izvlačenje odnosa: pristup učenja predstavnika', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන් හෙට්\u200dරෝජිනියෝ සුභාවිතය: ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ඉගෙනීම් අවස්ථා', 'sv': 'Heterogen √∂vervakning av relationsextraktion: En representationsinl√§rningsmetod', 'so': 'Heterogeneous Suurtagal for Extraction: A Reference Learning Approach', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு வெளியேற்றத்திற்கான உயரம்', 'ur': 'رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے ہتروژن تحقیق: ایک نمایش تعلیم تقرب', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình giám sát dị sắc cho tương lai chiết xuất: Hướng dẫn giáo dục', 'bg': 'Хетерогенен надзор за извличане на взаимоотношения: подход за обучение на представителство', 'da': 'Heterogen overvågning af relationsudvinding: En repræsentationslæringstilgang', 'nl': 'Heterogeen toezicht op relatienextractie: een representationele leerbenadering', 'de': 'Heterogene Überwachung der Beziehungsextraktion: Ein Ansatz des Repräsentationslernens', 'id': 'Supervision Heterogeneous for Relation Extraction: A Representation Learning Approach', 'ko': '관계 추출의 이구 모니터링: 학습 방법을 나타내는 표현', 'fa': 'تحت نظر سنگینی برای اخراج رابطه: یک پیشنهاد نزدیک یادگیری', 'sw': 'Mtangazaji wa Umoja wa Kujitolewa kwa Kuhusiana na Kujitolewa: Kufundisha Kujifunza kwa Mwanachama', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler:', 'af': 'Heterogene Supervisie vir Relasie Uitpakking: √¢¬Ä¬ôn Voorstelling Leer Toegang', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Kontrolli heterogjen për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve: një metodë përfaqësimi për mësimin', 'hr': 'Heterogeniji nadzor za izvlačenje odnosa: pristup učenja predstavnika', 'hy': 'Հետրոգեն վերահսկողությունը հարաբերությունների արտահանման համար. ներկայացուցիչ սովորելու մոտեցում', 'az': 'İlişkilərin çıxarılması üçün Heterogen Supervision: A Representation Learning Approach', 'bn': 'সম্পর্ক বিদেশের জন্য হিটারোজেনিয়ান সুপারিশন: একটি প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Heterogeniji nadzor za izvlačenje odnosa: pristup učenja predstavnika', 'ca': "Supervisió heterogène per l'extracció de relacions: Un enfocament d'aprenentatge de representació", 'cs': 'Heterogenní dohled na extrakci vztahů: přístup reprezentačního učení', 'et': 'Heterogeene järelevalve suhete ekstraheerimiseks: esinduse õppimise lähenemisviis', 'fi': 'Suhteen purkamisen heterogeeninen valvonta: Representation Learning Approach', 'jv': 'Heterogène super-seneng kanggo kelas barang nggambar rapak: ngupakan seneng pisan kanggo kelas nggambar', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Heterogenen nadzor za ekstrakcijo odnosov: pristop učenja predstavništva', 'he': 'הפיקוח היטרוגני לחלץ יחסים: גישה לימוד מייצגת', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ལྟ་རྟོག་བྱེད་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཐད་ཀར་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ། ར representation a Learning Approach'}
{'en': 'Relation extraction is a fundamental task in information extraction. Most existing methods have heavy reliance on annotations labeled by human experts, which are costly and time-consuming. To overcome this drawback, we propose a novel framework, REHession, to conduct relation extractor learning using annotations from heterogeneous information source, e.g., knowledge base and domain heuristics. These annotations, referred as heterogeneous supervision, often conflict with each other, which brings a new challenge to the original relation extraction task : how to infer the true label from noisy labels for a given instance. Identifying context information as the backbone of both relation extraction and true label discovery, we adopt embedding techniques to learn the distributed representations of context, which bridges all components with mutual enhancement in an iterative fashion. Extensive experimental results demonstrate the superiority of REHession over the state-of-the-art.', 'ar': 'استخراج العلاقات مهمة أساسية في استخراج المعلومات. تعتمد معظم الأساليب الحالية بشدة على التعليقات التوضيحية التي تم تصنيفها بواسطة خبراء بشريين ، وهي مكلفة وتستغرق وقتًا طويلاً. للتغلب على هذا العيب ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا ، REHession ، لإجراء تعلم مستخرج العلاقة باستخدام التعليقات التوضيحية من مصدر معلومات غير متجانس ، على سبيل المثال ، قاعدة المعرفة واستدلال المجال. غالبًا ما تتعارض هذه التعليقات التوضيحية ، التي يشار إليها بالإشراف غير المتجانس ، مع بعضها البعض ، مما يمثل تحديًا جديدًا لمهمة استخراج العلاقة الأصلية: كيفية استنتاج التسمية الحقيقية من التسميات المزعجة لمثيل معين. تحديد معلومات السياق باعتبارها العمود الفقري لكل من استخراج العلاقة واكتشاف الملصق الحقيقي ، نعتمد تقنيات التضمين لمعرفة التمثيلات الموزعة للسياق ، والتي تربط جميع المكونات بالتعزيز المتبادل بطريقة تكرارية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية الواسعة تفوق REHession على أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations est une tâche fondamentale dans l'extraction d'informations. La plupart des méthodes existantes reposent largement sur les annotations étiquetées par des experts humains, qui sont coûteuses et chronophages. Pour pallier cet inconvénient, nous proposons un nouveau cadre, ReHession, pour effectuer un apprentissage par extracteur de relations à l'aide d'annotations provenant de sources d'informations hétérogènes, par exemple une base de connaissances et des heuristiques de domaine. Ces annotations, appelées supervision hétérogène, entrent souvent en conflit les unes avec les autres, ce qui pose un nouveau défi à la tâche d'extraction de relation d'origine\xa0: comment déduire la véritable étiquette à partir d'étiquettes bruyantes pour une instance donnée. En identifiant les informations contextuelles comme l'épine dorsale de l'extraction de relations et de la découverte de véritables étiquettes, nous adoptons des techniques d'intégration pour apprendre les représentations distribuées du contexte, qui relient tous les composants avec une amélioration mutuelle de manière itérative. Des résultats expérimentaux approfondis démontrent la supériorité de ReHession par rapport aux technologies de pointe.", 'pt': 'A extração de relações é uma tarefa fundamental na extração de informações. A maioria dos métodos existentes depende fortemente de anotações rotuladas por especialistas humanos, que são caras e demoradas. Para superar essa desvantagem, propomos uma nova estrutura, REHession, para conduzir o aprendizado do extrator de relações usando anotações de fontes de informações heterogêneas, por exemplo, base de conhecimento e heurística de domínio. Essas anotações, referidas como supervisão heterogênea, muitas vezes entram em conflito umas com as outras, o que traz um novo desafio para a tarefa de extração da relação original: como inferir o rótulo verdadeiro a partir de rótulos ruidosos para uma determinada instância. Identificando as informações de contexto como a espinha dorsal da extração de relações e da descoberta de rótulos verdadeiros, adotamos técnicas de incorporação para aprender as representações distribuídas de contexto, que conecta todos os componentes com aprimoramento mútuo de maneira iterativa. Amplos resultados experimentais demonstram a superioridade do REHession sobre o estado da arte.', 'ja': '関係抽出は、情報抽出における基本的なタスクです。ほとんどの既存の方法は、人間の専門家によってラベル付けされた注釈に大きく依存しており、費用がかかり、時間がかかります。この欠点を克服するために、私たちは、知識ベースやドメインヒューリスティックなどの異種情報源からの注釈を使用して関係抽出器学習を行うための新しいフレームワーク、REHessionを提案します。これらの注釈は異種監督と呼ばれ、しばしば互いに矛盾します。これは、元の関係抽出タスクに新しい課題をもたらします。特定のインスタンスのノイズの多いラベルから真のラベルを推測する方法です。リレーション抽出と真のラベル発見の両方のバックボーンとしてコンテキスト情報を識別するために、私たちはコンテキストの分散表現を学習するために埋め込みテクニックを採用し、反復的な方法で相互に強化されたすべてのコンポーネントを橋渡しします。広範囲にわたる実験結果は、最先端技術に対するREHessionの優位性を示している。', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones es una tarea fundamental en la extracción de información. La mayoría de los métodos existentes dependen en gran medida de las anotaciones etiquetadas por expertos humanos, que son costosas y requieren mucho tiempo. Para superar este inconveniente, proponemos un marco novedoso, ReHession, para llevar a cabo el aprendizaje de extractores de relaciones utilizando anotaciones de fuentes de información heterogéneas, por ejemplo, heurística de dominio y base de conocimientos. Estas anotaciones, denominadas supervisión heterogénea, a menudo entran en conflicto entre sí, lo que supone un nuevo desafío para la tarea de extracción de la relación original: cómo inferir la verdadera etiqueta de las etiquetas ruidosas para una instancia determinada. Al identificar la información de contexto como la columna vertebral de la extracción de relaciones y el verdadero descubrimiento de etiquetas, adoptamos técnicas de incrustación para aprender las representaciones distribuidas del contexto, que unen todos los componentes con la mejora mutua de manera iterativa. Los amplios resultados experimentales demuestran la superioridad de ReHession sobre el estado de la técnica.', 'zh': '提取者,信息提取之本也。 大抵有法皆重赖人伦表注,贵且耗时。 为克此病,发一新框架REHession,用自异构信息源注(如,知识库与域启发式)关提取器学。 此注名为异构监督,常相冲突,此取新挑战:如何从给定例噪声标中推断出真标? 上下文以取实为柱,嵌以学上下文之分布式,示以迭代益组件也。 博之实验结果表明,REHession优于先进之术。', 'ru': 'Извлечение отношений является фундаментальной задачей в извлечении информации. Большинство существующих методов в значительной степени опираются на аннотации, помеченные экспертами-людьми, которые являются дорогостоящими и требуют много времени. Чтобы преодолеть этот недостаток, мы предлагаем новую структуру, REHession, для проведения изучения экстрактора отношений с использованием аннотаций из гетерогенного источника информации, например, базы знаний и эвристики домена. Эти аннотации, называемые гетерогенным надзором, часто конфликтуют друг с другом, что создает новую проблему для первоначальной задачи извлечения отношений: как вывести истинную метку из шумных меток для данного экземпляра. Определяя контекстную информацию как основу как извлечения отношений, так и обнаружения истинных меток, мы принимаем методы встраивания для изучения распределенных представлений контекста, которые связывают все компоненты с взаимным улучшением итеративным образом. Обширные экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют превосходство REHession над современными.', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण सूचना निष्कर्षण में एक मौलिक कार्य है। अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीकों में मानव विशेषज्ञों द्वारा लेबल किए गए एनोटेशन पर भारी निर्भरता है, जो महंगे और समय लेने वाले हैं। इस खामी को दूर करने के लिए, हम विषम सूचना स्रोत से एनोटेशन का उपयोग करके संबंध निकालने वाले सीखने का संचालन करने के लिए एक उपन्यास ढांचे, REHession का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, नॉलेज बेस और डोमेन ह्यूरिस्टिक्स। ये एनोटेशन, विषम पर्यवेक्षण के रूप में संदर्भित, अक्सर एक-दूसरे के साथ संघर्ष करते हैं, जो मूल संबंध निष्कर्षण कार्य के लिए एक नई चुनौती लाता है: किसी दिए गए उदाहरण के लिए शोर लेबल से सच्चे लेबल का अनुमान कैसे लगाया जाए। संबंध निष्कर्षण और सच्चे लेबल खोज दोनों की रीढ़ के रूप में संदर्भ जानकारी की पहचान करते हुए, हम संदर्भ के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने के लिए एम्बेडिंग तकनीकों को अपनाते हैं, जो एक पुनरावर्ती फैशन में पारस्परिक वृद्धि के साथ सभी घटकों को पुल करता है। व्यापक प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम अत्याधुनिक पर REHession की श्रेष्ठता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is tasc bunúsach é eastóscadh caidrimh in eastóscadh faisnéise. Braitheann an chuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann faoi láthair go mór ar nótaí arna lipéadú ag saineolaithe daonna, atá costasach agus am-íditheach. Chun an míbhuntáiste seo a shárú, molaimid creat úrnua, REHession, chun foghlaim na n-astarraingthe caidrimh a dhéanamh agus nótaí á n-úsáid ó fhoinse faisnéise ilchineálach, m.sh., bonn eolais agus heorastaíocht fearainn. Is minic a thagann na nótaí seo, dá ngairtear maoirseacht ilchineálach, salach ar a chéile, rud a thugann dúshlán nua don bhunchúram asbhainte caidrimh: conas an lipéad fíor a bhaint as lipéid fhuaimiúla i gcás ar leith. Agus eolas comhthéacs á aithint mar chnámh droma eastóscadh caidrimh agus fíorfhionnachtain lipéad, glacaimid teicnící leabú chun léirithe dáilte comhthéacs a fhoghlaim, a nascann gach comhpháirt le feabhsú frithpháirteach ar bhealach atriallach. Léiríonn torthaí trialacha fairsinge barr feabhais REHession thar an úrscothacht.', 'ka': 'Relative extraction is a fundamental task in information extraction. უფრო მეტი არსებობენ მეტი აქვს ძალიან დარწმუნება ადამიანის ექსპერტებით, რომლებიც უფრო ძალიან და დროს გამოიყენება. რომ გადავიწყვიოთ ეს შეცდომა, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრომენტური ფრამეტრი, REHession, რომ გავაკეთოთ კექტრექტორის შესწავლებას გამოყენებული ანოტაციების გამოყენება ჰენეროგენური ინფორმაციის ფორმა ეს ამოცანები, რომლებიც ჰეტერეგენეროგენური მონაცემებით, ზოგიერთად კონფლიქცია ერთმანეთისთვის, რომლებიც ახალი გამოცემები იქნება ორიგინალური პრობლექციის ექსტრექციის დავალებისთვი კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის იდენტიფიკაცია როგორც კონტექსტური ექსტრაქციის და მართლა ლექსტურის აღმოჩენების ძირითადი კონტექსტური განსაზღვრებების შესახებ, რომელიც ყველა კონტექსტური კონტე უფრო დიდი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ REHession-ის უფრო დიდი წარმოდგენების განმავლობაზე.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή σχέσεων είναι ένα θεμελιώδες έργο στην εξαγωγή πληροφοριών. Οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι βασίζονται σε σχολιασμούς που επισημαίνονται από ανθρώπους εμπειρογνώμονες, οι οποίες είναι δαπανηρές και χρονοβόρες. Για να ξεπεραστεί αυτό το μειονέκτημα, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο, για τη διεξαγωγή μάθησης εξαγωγής σχέσεων χρησιμοποιώντας σχόλια από ετερογενή πηγή πληροφοριών, π.χ. βάση γνώσης και heuristics τομέων. Αυτές οι παρατηρήσεις, που αναφέρονται ως ετερογενής εποπτεία, συχνά συγκρούονται μεταξύ τους, γεγονός που φέρνει μια νέα πρόκληση στο αρχικό έργο εξαγωγής σχέσεων: πώς να συναχθεί η πραγματική ετικέτα από θορυβώδεις ετικέτες για μια δεδομένη περίπτωση. Αναγνωρίζοντας τις πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος ως τη ραχοκοκαλιά τόσο της εξαγωγής σχέσεων όσο και της πραγματικής ανακάλυψης ετικετών, υιοθετούμε τεχνικές ενσωμάτωσης για να μάθουμε τις κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις του περιβάλλοντος, το οποίο γεφυρώνει όλα τα συστατικά με αμοιβαία ενίσχυση με επαναλαμβανόμενο τρόπο. Εκτεταμένα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν την υπεροχή της REHession έναντι της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatok kitermelése alapvető feladat az információkitermelésben. A legtöbb meglévő módszer nagymértékben támaszkodik az emberi szakértők által címkézett megjegyzésekre, amelyek költségesek és időigényesek. Ennek a hátránynak a leküzdése érdekében egy új keretrendszert javasolunk, a REHession-t, amely heterogén információforrásból származó megjegyzések, például tudásbázis és domain heurisztika segítségével végezhető kapcsolatkivonó tanulás. Ezek a megjegyzések, amelyeket heterogén felügyeletnek neveznek, gyakran ütköznek egymással, ami új kihívást jelent az eredeti kapcsolatkivonási feladatnak: hogyan következtessük le a valódi címkét zajos címkékből egy adott példányban. A kontextus információk azonosítása, mint a kapcsolat extrakció és a valódi címke felfedezés gerincét, beágyazási technikákat alkalmazunk a kontextus elosztott reprezentációinak megismerésére, amelyek iteratív módon összekötik az összes komponenst a kölcsönös fejlesztéssel. Széles körű kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják, hogy a REHession felsőbbrendű a korszerűséggel szemben.', 'it': "L'estrazione delle relazioni è un compito fondamentale nell'estrazione delle informazioni. La maggior parte dei metodi esistenti dipendono fortemente da annotazioni etichettate da esperti umani, che sono costose e richiedono tempo. Per superare questo inconveniente, proponiamo un nuovo framework, REHession, per condurre l'apprendimento degli estrattori di relazione utilizzando annotazioni provenienti da fonti di informazione eterogenee, ad esempio la base di conoscenza e l'euristica del dominio. Queste annotazioni, definite come supervisione eterogenea, sono spesso in conflitto tra loro, il che porta una nuova sfida al compito originale di estrazione delle relazioni: come dedurre l'etichetta vera da etichette rumorose per una data istanza. Identificando le informazioni di contesto come spina dorsale sia dell'estrazione delle relazioni che della vera scoperta delle etichette, adottiamo tecniche di embedding per imparare le rappresentazioni distribuite del contesto, che collegano tutte le componenti con il miglioramento reciproco in modo iterativo. Ampi risultati sperimentali dimostrano la superiorità di REHession rispetto allo stato dell'arte.", 'kk': 'Қатысты тарқату - мәліметті тарқатуда негізгі тапсырма. Бұл әдістердің көпшілігі адамдар эксперттерінің жазылған жазбаларға қатты сенімділігі бар. Бұл көпшілікті және уақытты пайдалануға арналған. Бұл кездерді көтеру үшін, біз романдық қоршау, REHession, гетероген мәлімет көзінен жазбаларды, мысалы, білім негізінде және доменнің геуристикасынан жазбаларды көтеру үшін қатынасын үйрену үшін қолданамыз. Бұл белгілер, гетероген қарау деп аталатын, көпшілік бір-бірімен қайшылық, бұл бастапқы сәйкес тарту тапсырмасына жаңа мәселе береді: келтірілген мәселе үшін шын белгілерді қалай жазып Контексті мәліметті тарқату мен шын жарлықтың қатынасын анықтау үшін ендіру техникаларын қолдануға болады. Бұл параметрлерді қатынасыз көмегімен бірге көмектеседі. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер нәтижелері REHession күйінің жоғарығын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Ryšių gavimas yra pagrindinė informacijos gavimo užduotis. Dauguma esamų metodų labai priklauso nuo žmonių ekspertų pažymėtų pastabų, kurios yra brangios ir ilgai reikalingos. Siekiant įveikti šį trūkumą, siūlome naują sistemą, REHession, vykdyti santykių ekstraktoriaus mokymąsi naudojant įvairiapusių informacijos šaltinių anotacijas, pvz., žinių bazę ir srities heuristiką. Šios pastabos, vadinamos heterogeniška priežiūra, dažnai prieštarauja viena kitai, todėl kyla naujas iššūkis pradiniam santykių išgavimo uždaviniui: kaip, pavyzdžiui, iš triukšmingų etikečių padaryti tikrą etiketę. Nustatydami kontekstinę informaciją kaip santykių išgavimo ir tikro etiketės atradimo pagrindą, mes priimame įterpimo metodus, kad išsiaiškintume paskirstytus konteksto aprašymus, kurie sujungia visus komponentus su tarpusavio stiprinimu pakartotinai. Išsamūs eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad REHession yra didesnis už naujausią.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ജോലിയാണ്. നിലവിലുള്ള മികച്ച രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിശേഷിപ്പുകളുടെ മേല്\u200d കഠിനമായ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതാണ്. അത് വില വിലയും സമയ ഈ വരയിലേക്ക് വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ്, റെഹെഷന്\u200d, ഹെറിജനറിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള ബന്ധുക ഈ പ്രഖ്യാപനങ്ങള്\u200d പരസ്പരം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതായി പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു, പലപ്പോഴും തമ്മില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പുണ്ടാകുന്നു. അത് ആദ്യബന്ധത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തെടു ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെയും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലേബല്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും പിന്നിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളെയും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെയും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ് Extensive experimental results demonstrate the superiority of REHession over the state-of-the-art.', 'mt': "L-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet hija kompitu fundamentali fl-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni. Most existing methods have heavy reliance on annotations labeled by human experts, which are costly and time-consuming.  Biex jingħeleb dan l-iżvantaġġ, qed nipproponu qafas ġdid, REHession, biex jitwettaq tagħlim ta' estratturi ta' relazzjonijiet bl-użu ta' annotazzjonijiet minn sors ta' informazzjoni eteroġenu, pereżempju bażi ta' g ħarfien u ġeristika tad-dominju. Dawn l-annotazzjonijiet, imsejħa superviżjoni eteroġenea, spiss jikkonflittu ma’ xulxin, li jġibu sfida ġdida għall-kompitu oriġinali ta’ estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni: kif tiġi inferita t-tikketta vera minn tikketti storbjużi għal eżempju partikolari. L-identifikazzjoni tal-informazzjoni tal-kuntest bħala s-sinsla kemm tal-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni kif ukoll tal-iskoperta vera tat-tikketta, aħna niddottaw tekniki ta’ inkorporazzjoni biex nitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti tal-kuntest, li jgħaqqdu l-komponenti kollha b’titjib reċiproku b’mod iterattiv. Riżultati esperimentali estensivi juru s-superjorità tar-REHession fuq l-aktar avvanzati.", 'mn': 'Хариулт татах нь мэдээлэл татах үндсэн ажил юм. Ихэнх сургалтын арга нь хүний мэргэжилтнүүдийн тэмдэглэгддэг илтгэлийг маш хүндрэлтэй байдаг. Энэ нь үнэтэй, цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэдэг. Үүнийг давхарлахын тулд бид шинэ хэлбэр, REHession, гетерогийн мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрээс харилцаа суралцагчдын холбоотой байдлыг ашиглах гэсэн санал өгдөг. Эдгээр мэдээллүүд нь ерөнхий дасгал гэж нэрлэгддэг, ихэвчлэн хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо шинэ сорилт бий болгодог. Одоо харьцааны мэдээллийг хоёр харьцааны хамаарал болон жинхэнэ тэмдэглэл нээлттэй холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой, бид түүний хуваарилагдсан үзүүлэлтийг сурах боломжтой техник ашиглаж байна. Энэ нь бүх компонентүүдийг хо Илүү олон туршилтын үр дүн нь урлагийн төвшин дээр REHession-ын өндөр өндөр байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi hubungan adalah tugas dasar dalam ekstraksi maklumat. Kebanyakan kaedah yang wujud mempunyai bergantung berat pada anotasi yang ditandai oleh ahli manusia, yang mahal dan memakan masa. Untuk mengatasi kelemahan ini, kami melamar kerangka baru, REHession, untuk melaksanakan pelajaran ekstraktor hubungan menggunakan anotasi dari sumber maklumat heterogen, contohnya, dasar pengetahuan dan heuristik domain. These annotations, referred as heterogeneous supervision, often conflict with each other, which brings a new challenge to the original relation extraction task: how to infer the true label from noisy labels for a given instance.  Mengenalpasti maklumat konteks sebagai tulang belakang kedua-dua ekstraksi hubungan dan penemuan label sebenar, kami menerima teknik penyembedding untuk mempelajari perwakilan terhapus konteks, yang menyambung semua komponen dengan peningkatan bersama dalam cara berulang. Keputusan percubaan yang luas menunjukkan ketinggian REHession daripada keadaan terbaik.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji jest podstawowym zadaniem w ekstrakcji informacji. Większość istniejących metod w dużym stopniu polega na adnotacjach oznaczonych przez ekspertów ludzkich, które są kosztowne i czasochłonne. Aby przezwyciężyć tę wadę, proponujemy nowy framework, REHession, do prowadzenia nauki ekstraktorów relacji z wykorzystaniem adnotacji z heterogenicznego źródła informacji, np. bazy wiedzy i heurystyki domeny. Te adnotacje, zwane heterogenicznym nadzorem, często ze sobą konfliktują, co stawia nowe wyzwanie dla oryginalnego zadania ekstrakcji relacji: jak wywnioskować prawdziwą etykietę z szumownych etykiet dla danej instancji. Identyfikując informacje kontekstowe jako kręgosłup zarówno ekstrakcji relacji, jak i prawdziwego odkrywania etykiet, stosujemy techniki osadzania, aby nauczyć się rozproszonych reprezentacji kontekstu, który łączy wszystkie komponenty ze wzajemnym ulepszaniem w sposób iteracyjny. Obszerne wyniki eksperymentalne wskazują na wyższość REHession nad najnowocześniejszymi.', 'no': 'Utpakking av relasjon er ein grunnleggjande oppgåve i utpakking av informasjon. Dei fleste eksisterande metodane har kraftig tilbakekalling på annotasjonar merket av menneske ekspertar, som er kostnad og tidspunkt. For å overføra denne trekkinga, foreslår vi eit nytt rammeverk, REHession, for å gjera relasjon til ekstraktorlæring med merknader frå heterogeneske informasjonskjelde, f.eks. kunnskapsbasen og domeneheuristikk. Desse notasjonane, kalla som heterogenesk oversikt, ofte konflikt med kvarandre, som fører til eit nytt utfordring til den opprinnelige forandringsoppgåva: korleis å innføre sanne merkelappen frå støyetiketta for eit gitt instans. Å identifisere kontekstinformasjon som bakgrunnsbanen av både relasjonsutpakking og sann merkelappeoppdaging, bruker vi innbyggingsteknikkar for å lære dei distribuerte representasjonane av kontekst, som brytar alle komponentane med mutual forbedring i ein iterativ måte. Ekstra eksperimentelle resultat viser overhøgda av REHession over kunsttilstanden.', 'mk': 'Relation extraction is a fundamental task in information extraction.  Повеќето постоечки методи имаат голема зависност од анотациите означени од човечки експерти, кои се скапи и потрошуваат време. За да го надминеме овој недостаток, предложуваме нова рамка, РЕХЕСИЈА, за спроведување на учењето на екстракторите на односи користејќи анотации од хетероген извор на информации, на пример, базата на знаење и хористика на доменот. These annotations, referred as heterogeneous supervision, often conflict with each other, which brings a new challenge to the original relation extraction task: how to infer the true label from noisy labels for a given instance.  Идентификувајќи ги контекстните информации како грб на екстракцијата на односите и вистинското откривање на етикетите, усвоивме техники за вградување за да ги научиме дистрибуираните претставувања на контекст, кои ги поврзуваат сите компоненти со взаемно подобрување на повторен начин. Широки експериментални резултати ја покажуваат супериорноста на РЕХЕСИЈАТА над најсовремената.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පිළිගන්නේ තොරතුරු පිළිගන්නේ මූලික වැඩක්. ගොඩක් විදියට තියෙන විදියට මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසිකයෝ ලේබල් කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම විශ්වාසය සහ වෙලාව මේ පිටිපස්සෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක්, REHession, සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරධ මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය, හෙටෙරෝජනිය නිරීක්ෂණය කියලා කියලා, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්ක එක්කෙනෙක් එක්ක එක්ක එක්ක එක්ක අව සම්බන්ධතාව තොරතුරු අඳුන්නේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ඇත්ත ලේබුල් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වගේ බැක්කෝන් වලින්, අපි සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200d පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නවා REHession ගැන විශේෂතාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්.', 'sr': 'Izvukanje odnosa je osnovni zadatak u izvlačenju informacija. Većina postojećih metoda imaju tešku pouzdanost na annotacije označene ljudskim ekspertima, koje su skupe i potrošnje vremena. Da bi preuzeli ovu povlačenje, predlažemo novi okvir, REHesiju, da vodimo vezu sa učenjem ekstraktora koristeći annotacije iz heterogeneznog izvora informacija, na primer, znanstvenu bazu i heuristiku domena. Ove annotacije, navedene kao heterogenetski nadzor, često se sukobe međusobno, što donosi novi izazov na originalni izvlačeni zadatak odnosa: kako zaraditi pravu etiketu iz zvukovih etiketa na određeni primer. Identificirajući kontekstske informacije kao podršku izvlačenja odnosa i otkrivanja prave etikete, usvojimo ugrađene tehnike da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave konteksta, koje moste svim komponentima sa zajedničkim poboljšanjem na iterativni način. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju nadvišenost REHesije nad državom umjetnosti.', 'ro': 'Extragerea relațiilor este o sarcină fundamentală în extragerea informațiilor. Majoritatea metodelor existente se bazează foarte mult pe adnotări etichetate de experți umani, care sunt costisitoare și consumatoare de timp. Pentru a depăși acest dezavantaj, propunem un cadru nou, REHession, pentru a efectua învățarea extractorilor de relații utilizând adnotări din surse de informații eterogene, de exemplu, baza de cunoștințe și euristica domeniului. Aceste adnotări, denumite supraveghere eterogenă, sunt adesea în conflict între ele, ceea ce aduce o nouă provocare sarcinii inițiale de extragere a relațiilor: cum să deducem eticheta adevărată din etichetele zgomotoase pentru o anumită instanță. Identificând informațiile de context ca coloană vertebrală atât pentru extragerea relațiilor, cât și pentru descoperirea adevăratei etichete, adoptăm tehnici de încorporare pentru a învăța reprezentările distribuite ale contextului, care leagă toate componentele cu îmbunătățirea reciprocă într-un mod iterativ. Rezultatele experimentale extinse demonstreaza superioritatea REHession fata de cele mai moderne tehnologii.', 'sv': 'Relationsutvinning är en grundläggande uppgift i informationsutvinning. De flesta befintliga metoder är starkt beroende av anteckningar märkta av mänskliga experter, vilket är kostsamma och tidskrävande. För att övervinna denna nackdel föreslår vi ett nytt ramverk, REHession, för att genomföra relationsextraktor lärande med hjälp av anteckningar från heterogen informationskälla, t.ex. kunskapsbas och domänheuristik. Dessa anteckningar, som kallas heterogen övervakning, står ofta i konflikt med varandra, vilket innebär en ny utmaning för den ursprungliga relationsutdragningsuppgiften: hur man härleder den sanna etiketten från bullriga etiketter för en given instans. Genom att identifiera sammanhangsinformation som ryggraden i både relationsextraktion och sann etikettupptäckt använder vi inbäddningstekniker för att lära oss distribuerade representationer av sammanhang, vilket överbryggar alla komponenter med ömsesidig förbättring på ett iterativt sätt. Omfattande experimentella resultat visar REHessions överlägsenhet jämfört med den senaste tekniken.', 'ta': 'Relation extraction is a fundamental task in information extraction.  பெரும்பாலும் இருக்கும் முறைகளில் மனித அறிவிப்பார்கள் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட அறிவிப்புகள் மீது கடுமையான நம்பிக்க இந்த வரைவை வெற்றி திரும்புவதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய சட்டம், REHession, தொடர்பு வெளியீட்டு கற்றுக்கொள்ள உபயோகிப்பதற்கு, உதாரணமாக அறிவு தளத்தை மற்றும் களம இந்த அறிவிப்புகள், பெரிய அடர்த்தி பார்ப்பு என்று குறிப்பிடப்படுகிறது, பெரும்பாலும் ஒருவர் மற்றொருவருடன் போராடுகிறது, அது முதல் தொடர்பு பிரிப்பு  தொடர்பு பின்னணி மற்றும் உண்மையான விளக்கச் சீட்டு கண்டுபிடிப்பாக இருந்தும் தொடர்பு பின்னணி தகவலை அடையாளம் குறிப்பிடும் பொருளின் பங்கிடப்பட்ட பிரத விரிவான சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'Relative extraction is a fundamental task in information extraction. بیشک اکثر موجود طریقے پر سخت اعتماد رکھتے ہیں انسان کے متخصص کے ذریعے لکھے ہوئے نشانیوں پر جو قیمت اور زمانہ مصرف کرتے ہیں. اس طرح ہم نے ایک نئی فرمود، REHession کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہیں کہ اٹھانے والی تعلیم کے مطابق اٹھانے والی معلومات سورج سے اٹانٹاتیوں کے مطابق اٹھانے والی تعلیم کریں، یہ علائم، ایک دوسرے سے ایک دوسرے سے مخالفت کرتے ہیں، جو اصلی نسبت اٹھانے کے کام میں ایک نئی چال لاتے ہیں: صوتی لابلوں سے حقیقی لابل کو کس طرح آزاد کرنا ہے۔ کائنٹ معلومات کو اٹھانے اور حقیقی لابل آشکاری کے پشت ہڈی کے طور پر پہچان کر رہے ہیں، ہم نے اٹھانے کی تکنیک بنا رکھی ہے کہ کائنٹ کی تقسیم کی تعلیمات کو سکھائیں، جو ہر قسم کے قسموں کو ایک دوسرے سے اضافہ کرنے کے ساتھ دوسرے سے اضافہ کرتی ہے. اضافہ آزمائش کا نتیجہ آزمائش کے موقع پر REHession کی زیادتی دکھاتا ہے.', 'so': 'Ka bixinta xiriirka waa shaqada aasaasiga ah ee ka soo bixinta macluumaadka. Inta badan qaababka joogta ah waxay ku xiran yihiin mid ku saabsan dhibaatooyin adag oo ay ku qoran kharashka iyo isticmaalka wakhtiga. Si aan uga adkaado dib-u-celinta, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal warqad ah, REHession, si aan u sameyno barashada xiriirka ah oo aad isticmaaleyso macluumaadka guud e e macluumaadka, tusaale ahaan aasaaska aqoonta iyo deegaanka. Xanuunkan waxaa loola jeedaa ilaalinta jimicsiga ah, marar badan isla khilaafaya, kaas oo sababta dhibaato cusub u keenaya qasabka asalka ah ka soo bixinta xiriirka: sidee looga fekero alaabta runta ah tusaale ahaan calaamada qaylada. Identifying context information as the backbone of both relation extraction and true label discovery, we adopt embedding techniques to learn the distributed representations of context, which bridges all components with mutual enhancement in an iterative fashion.  Imtixaanka badan waxaa ka muuqda mid ka sareeya xafiiska shaqada.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik mavjud usullar inson ekspertlar bilan tajribalarning qiymati va vaqt foydalanishi mumkin. Bu orqali uzish uchun biz novel freymini REHession, tashkilotni o'rganish uchun o'rganish tuzuvchilarini boshqarishimiz mumkin, masalan ma'lumot manbasi va domen heuristika yordamida aniqlash uchun. Bu taʼminlovlar bir necha xil taʼminlovchi deb hisoblangan, odatda bir-бирларига murakkab qiladi, bu asl aloqalarni ajratish vazifasiga yangi qanday qismi beradi: xususiyatli holat yorliqlaridan tashkilotni qanday qo'yish mumkin. Name Extensive experimental results demonstrate the superiority of REHession over the state-of-the-art.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác tương quan là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc trích thông tin. Hầu hết các phương pháp tồn tại đều dựa vào các chú thích được ghi tên bởi các chuyên gia, tốn kém và tốn thời gian. Để vượt qua trở ngại này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới, REHess, để thực hiện các kết quả học về giá trị bằng các ghi chú từ nguồn thông tin khác nhau, ví dụ, kiến thức và thần kinh miền. Những ghi chú này, được gọi là sự giám sát khác nhau, thường xung đột với nhau, mang đến một thử thách mới cho nhiệm vụ khai thác mối quan hệ gốc: làm thế nào để phân tích nhãn thật từ các nhãn ồn ào cho một trường hợp cụ thể. Nhận dạng thông tin ngữ cảnh là xương cốt của việc khai thác mối quan hệ và phát hiện nhãn thật, chúng tôi chọn kỹ thuật ghép nối để học các biểu hiện bối cảnh được phân phối, mà kết nối tất cả các thành phần với sự tăng cường lẫn nhau theo cách lặp đi lặp. Có nhiều kết quả thử nghiệm chứng minh REO vượt trội so với công nghệ hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Извличането на връзка е основна задача в извличането на информация. Повечето съществуващи методи разчитат на анотации, етикетирани от човешки експерти, които са скъпи и отнемат време. За да преодолеем този недостатък, предлагаме нова рамка, която да провежда обучение с помощта на анотации от хетерогенен информационен източник, например базата на знания и евристиката на домейна. Тези анотации, наричани хетерогенен надзор, често противоречат помежду си, което поставя ново предизвикателство на първоначалната задача за извличане на релации: как да се направи извод на истинския етикет от шумните етикети за даден случай. Идентифицирайки контекстната информация като гръбнак както на извличането на релации, така и на истинското откриване на етикети, ние възприемаме техники за вграждане, за да научим разпределените представи на контекста, които свързват всички компоненти с взаимно усъвършенстване по итеративен начин. Обширни експериментални резултати демонстрират превъзходството на REHession над най-съвременните.', 'nl': 'Relatie extractie is een fundamentele taak in informatie extractie. De meeste bestaande methoden zijn sterk afhankelijk van annotaties gelabeld door menselijke experts, die duur en tijdrovend zijn. Om dit nadeel te overwinnen, stellen we een nieuw raamwerk voor, REHession, om relatieonderwijs uit te voeren met behulp van annotaties van heterogene informatiebronnen, bijvoorbeeld kennisbasis en domeinheuristiek. Deze annotaties, heterogene supervisie genoemd, botsen vaak met elkaar, wat een nieuwe uitdaging voor de oorspronkelijke relatieontwikkeling oplevert: hoe kan het ware label worden afgeleid van noise labels voor een gegeven exemplaar. Door contextinformatie te identificeren als de ruggengraat van zowel relatieonderzoek als echte labelontdekking, gebruiken we embedding technieken om de gedistribueerde representaties van context te leren, die alle componenten op een iteratieve manier overbrugt met wederzijdse verbetering. Uitgebreide experimentele resultaten tonen de superioriteit van REHession ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art aan.', 'da': 'Relationsudvinding er en grundlæggende opgave i informationsudvinding. De fleste eksisterende metoder er meget afhængige af anmærkninger mærket af menneskelige eksperter, som er dyre og tidskrævende. For at overvinde denne ulempe foreslår vi en ny ramme, REHession, til at gennemføre relationsextraktor læring ved hjælp af annotationer fra heterogen informationskilde, f.eks. vidensbase og domæneheuristik. Disse noteringer, der kaldes heterogen overvågning, er ofte i konflikt med hinanden, hvilket bringer en ny udfordring til den oprindelige relationsudvindingsopgave: hvordan man udleder den sande etiket fra støjende etiketter i et givet tilfælde. Ved at identificere kontekstoplysninger som rygraden i både relation ekstraktion og ægte etiket opdagelse, anvender vi integreringsteknikker til at lære de distribuerede repræsentationer af kontekst, som forbinder alle komponenter med gensidig forbedring på en iterativ måde. Omfattende eksperimentelle resultater viser REHessions overlegenhed i forhold til state-of-the-art.', 'de': 'Beziehungsextraktion ist eine grundlegende Aufgabe in der Informationsextraktion. Die meisten existierenden Methoden sind stark auf Anmerkungen angewiesen, die von menschlichen Experten gekennzeichnet sind, was kostspielig und zeitaufwendig ist. Um diesen Nachteil zu überwinden, schlagen wir ein neuartiges Framework vor, REHession, um Relation Extractor Learning unter Verwendung von Annotationen aus heterogenen Informationsquellen durchzuführen, z.B. Wissensdatenbank und Domänenheuristik. Diese Annotationen, die heterogene Supervision genannt werden, kollidieren oft miteinander, was eine neue Herausforderung für die ursprüngliche Beziehungsextraktionsaufgabe mit sich bringt: Wie kann man das wahre Label aus noise labels für eine gegebene Instanz ableiten? Wir identifizieren Kontextinformationen als Rückgrat sowohl der Beziehungsextraktion als auch der wahren Label-Entdeckung und verwenden Einbettungstechniken, um die verteilten Repräsentationen des Kontexts zu erlernen, die alle Komponenten mit gegenseitiger Verbesserung auf iterative Weise überbrücken. Umfangreiche experimentelle Ergebnisse belegen die Überlegenheit von REHession gegenüber dem Stand der Technik.', 'id': 'Ekstraksi hubungan adalah tugas dasar dalam ekstraksi informasi. Kebanyakan metode yang ada bergantung berat pada anotasi yang disebut oleh ahli manusia, yang mahal dan memakan waktu. Untuk mengatasi kelemahan ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan baru, REHession, untuk melakukan ekstraktor hubungan belajar menggunakan anotasi dari sumber informasi heterogene, misalnya, dasar pengetahuan dan heuristik domain. These annotations, referred as heterogeneous supervision, often conflict with each other, which brings a new challenge to the original relation extraction task: how to infer the true label from noisy labels for a given instance.  Mengenalpasti informasi konteks sebagai tulang belakang dari ekstraksi hubungan dan penemuan label sejati, kami mengadopsi teknik penerbangan untuk mempelajari rappresentasi terhapus konteks, yang menyambung semua komponen dengan peningkatan bersama dalam cara iteratif. Hasil percobaan yang luas menunjukkan ketinggalan REHession atas state-of-the-art.', 'ko': '관계 추출은 정보 추출의 기본 임무입니다.대부분의 기존 방법은 인류 전문가가 표시한 주석에 심각하게 의존하는데, 이것은 비싸고 시간도 소모된다.이러한 단점을 극복하기 위해 우리는 이구적 정보원(예를 들어 지식 라이브러리와 영역 계발식)에서 나온 주석을 사용하여 관계 추출기 학습을 하는 새로운 프레임워크를 제시했다.이 주석들은 이구적 감독이라고 불리는데 그들 사이에 자주 충돌이 발생한다. 이것은 원시적인 관계 추출 임무에 새로운 도전을 가져왔다. 즉, 주어진 실례의 시끄러운 라벨에서 진정한 라벨을 어떻게 추론하는가이다.우리는 상하문 정보를 관계 추출과 진실 라벨 발견의 기둥으로 삼아 끼워넣는 기술로 상하문의 분포식 표시를 학습하고 모든 구성 요소를 교체하는 방식으로 연결하여 상호 강화를 실현한다.대량의 실험 결과는 가장 선진적인 기술에 비해 재치료가 우월성을 가지고 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Utoa wa uhusiano ni kazi ya msingi katika utoaji wa habari. Mindo nyingi zilizopo zinategemea matatizo makubwa yanayoonyeshwa na wataalam wa binadamu, ambazo ni gharama na matumizi ya muda. Ili kushinda mchoro huu, tunapendekeza mfumo wa riwaya, REHession, kutekeleza kujifunza kwa ajili ya kujifunza utoaji wa mahusiano kwa kutumia taarifa kutoka vyanzo vya habari vya asili, kwa mfano, msingi wa maarifa na maadhimisho ya ndani. Tamko hizi, zinazoitwa kama ufuatiliaji wa kimapenzi, mara nyingi hugombana na wao, jambo ambalo linaleta changamoto mpya kwenye kazi ya awali ya utoaji wa uhusiano: namna ya kupunguza alama halisi kutoka kwenye alama za sauti kwa mfano fulani. Kutambua taarifa za muktadha kama mgongo wa uteuzi wa mahusiano na kugundua alama halisi, tunachukua mbinu za kuandika ili kujifunza uwakilizaji wa muktadha, ambazo hupanda vipengele vyote vikuu vya kuongezeka kwa njia ya kiumbe. Extensive experimental results demonstrate the superiority of REHession over the state-of-the-art.', 'tr': 'Maglumaty a çmakda esasy täblikdir Köp bar yöntemler adamlaryň uzmanlary tarapyndan etilen ýazyklama güýçlidir. Bu şekilde deň we wagt iýmit eden ýazyklama güýçlidir. Bu çekişi üstden çykarmak üçin, REHession, birnäçe informasiýa çe şmesinden, meselâ bilim bazy we domeniň heuristiklerinden sözleşmeleri ulanmak üçin roman çerçevesini teklip edýäris. Bu duýgular, beýleki gözetim diýip adlanýarlar, köplenç bir-birine çalşyk edip başlaýan täze kynçylyk işine getirilýär. Gerçek etiketleri berilen örnek üçin nähili gürrüň etiketlerden çykarmalydyr. Kontekst maglumaty gaýşartmak we dogry etiket tapmaklarynyň arkasyny diýip tanyşdyrmak üçin daşarylan tekniklere üýtgedýäris we bu ähli komponentleri bir tertible üýtgetmelidir. Döwletler deneysel netijeleri REHesiýanyň üstüni sungatyň durumynda görkezilýär.', 'hr': 'Izvukanje odnosa je osnovni zadatak u izvlačenju informacija. Većina postojećih metoda imaju tešku pouzdanost na annotacije označene ljudskim stručnjacima, koje su skupe i potrošnje vremena. Za prevladanje ovog povlačenja, predlažemo novi okvir, REHesiju, provoditi odnose o učenju ekstraktora koristeći annotacije iz heterogeneznog izvora informacija, npr. znanstvenu bazu i domenu heuristiku. Te oznake, navedene kao heterogenetski nadzor, često se sukobe međusobno, što donosi novi izazov originalnom zadatku izvlačenja odnosa: kako dovesti pravu etiketu iz zvukovih etiketa na određeni primjer. Identificirajući kontekstske informacije kao podršku izvlačenja odnosa i otkrivanja prave etikete, usvojimo ugrađene tehnike kako bi naučili raspodjeljene predstave konteksta, koje se moste svim komponentima s zajedničkim poboljšanjem na iterativni način. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju nadvišenost REHesije nad državom umjetnosti.', 'af': "Relasie uitpakking is 'n fundamentale taak in inligting uitpakking. Die meeste bestaande metodes het swaar vertrou op annotasies wat deur menslike eksperte gemerk is, wat koste en tyd-verbruik is. Om hierdie optrekking te oorwin, voorstel ons 'n nuwe raamwerk, REHession, om verhouding van uittrekking leer te doen deur annotasie te gebruik van heterogeneese inligting bron, bv. kennisbasis en domein heuristics. Hierdie notasies, verwys as heterogeneese supervisie, dikwels konflikt met mekaar, wat bring 'n nuwe uitdrukking na die oorspronklike verwanting uittrekking taak: hoe om die waarde etiket uit geluidetikette te vir 'n gegewe voorbeeld te infeer. In die identifiseer van konteks inligting as die rugsboen van beide verwanting van uittrekking en waar etiket ontdekking, ons aanvaar inbêring teknike om die verspreidige voorstellings van konteks te leer, wat brui alle komponente met gemeenskaplike verhoog in 'n iteratiewe modus. Ekstensiewe eksperimentale resultate vertoon die hoogheid van REHession oor die staat van die kuns.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e marrëdhënieve është një detyrë thelbësore në nxjerrjen e informacionit. Shumica e metodave ekzistuese janë të varura nga anotacionet e etiketuara nga ekspertët njerëzorë, të cilat janë të shtrenjta dhe të konsumojnë kohë. Për të kapërcyer këtë pengesë, propozojmë një kuadër të ri, REHession, për të kryer mësimin e ekstraktorit të marrëdhënieve duke përdorur anotacione nga burimi heterogjene i informacionit, për shembull bazën e njohurive dhe heuristikën e domenit. Këto anotacione, të quajtura mbikqyrje heterogjene, shpesh janë në konflikt me njëri-tjetrin, gjë që sjell një sfidë të re në detyrën origjinale të nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve: si të përfshihet etiketa e vërtetë nga etiketat zhurmuese për një shembull të caktuar. Duke identifikuar informacionin e kontekstit si shpinën e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve dhe zbulimit të vërtetë të etiketës, ne miratojmë teknika të përfshirjes për të mësuar përfaqësimet e shpërndara të kontekstit, e cila lidh të gjitha komponentet me përmirësimin e ndërsjelltë në një mënyrë të përsëritur. Extensive experimental results demonstrate the superiority of REHession over the state-of-the-art.', 'am': 'Relation extraction is a fundamental task in information extraction.  አብዛኞቹ ያሉት ሥርዓቶች በሰው አዋቂዎች በተደጋገሙት እና በጊዜው የሚጠቀሙት በሚያስጨንቋቸው መደገፊያ አለባቸው፡፡ ይህንን መልስ ለማሸንፍ፣ አዲስ የውይይት መሠረት፣ REHession፣ የውይይት መረጃ ምንጭ፣ እውቀት መቀመጫ እና የውይይት ሀርሲ ተሳታፊ ትምህርት ማድረግ እናስመክራለን፡፡ እነዚህ አካባቢዎች፣ ብዙ ጊዜ እርስ በርሳቸው ይዋጋሉ፣ ይህም አዲስ የውይይት ግንኙነት ማውጣት ማድረግ ነው፤ እውነተኛውን ምልክት ከድምፅ ምልክቶች እንዴት ለማሳሰስ ነው፡፡ የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን እና እውነተኛ የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት ማግኘት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በብዙ ፈተና ውጤቶች የሬኤሽን ክፍለ ሥርዓት-የዓላማ ግዛት ላይ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաբերությունների վերացումը տեղեկատվության վերացման հիմնական խնդիր է: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների մեծ մասը շատ կախված է մարդկային մասնագետների կողմից նշումներից, որոնք թանկ են և ժամանակ են պահանջում: Այս թերությունը հաղթահարելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր շրջանակ, REHess-ը, հարաբերությունների վերացման ուսումնասիրություն կատարելու օգտագործելով տարբեր տեղեկատվական աղբյուրից ստացված նոտացիաներ, օրինակ գիտելիքի հիմքը և բնագավառի հորիստիկան Այս նշումները, որոնք կոչվում են հետրոգեն վերահսկողություն, հաճախ հակասում են միմյանց հետ, ինչը նոր մարտահրավեր է առաջացնում սկզբնական հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդիրը. ինչպես վերցնել ճշմարտությունը ձայնային նշումներից, օրինակ: Տեղադրելով կոնտեքստի ինֆորմացիան որպես հարաբերությունների վերացման և իրական պիտակների բացահայտումների ետնամասը, մենք ընդունում ենք ներդրման մեթոդներ, որպեսզի սովորենք կոնտեքստի բաշխված ներկայացումները, որոնք կապում են բոլոր բաղադրիչները փոխադարձ բարելավման հետ Ամբողջ փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս REHexion-ի գերազանցությունը տեխնոլոգիայի դեպքում:', 'az': 'İlişkilər çıxarılması məlumatlar çıxarılmasında əsas bir işdir. Ən çox mevcut metodlar insan ekspertlərinin etiketlərinə ağır təvəkküllük edir, onlar ucuz və vaxtlı istifadə edirlər. Bu çətinlikdən üstün g əlmək üçün yeni bir çerçive, REHession təklif edirik, heterogenen məlumat mənbəsindən, məsələn bilgi bazı və domenin heuristik məlumatlarını istifadə edir. Bu məlumatlar, həddi-bütün gözləmə kimi adlandırılmış, çox zaman bir-birinə qarşı mübahisə edirlər, ki bu məlumatlar, orijinal əlaqələr çıxartma işinə yeni bir çətinlik gətirir: həqiqət etiketi müəyyən edilmiş məlumatlardan necə çıxarılır. Kontekst məlumatlarını hər ikisinin əlaqəsi və doğru etiketin keşfinin sümükləri kimi təsdiqləyici kimi təsdiqləyici məlumatları öyrənmək üçün dağıtılmış məlumatların təsdiqləyici tekniklərini istifadə edirik ki, bütün komponentləri bir-birinin artırması ilə birbirimizə körpəyir. Müxtəlif təcrübə sonuçları REHesiyanın üstünlüyünü art ıqlığı üzərində göstərir.', 'fa': 'اخراج رابطه یک کار بنیادی در اخراج اطلاعات است. بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود بسیار سنگین اعتماد بر اظهار نشانه\u200cهای متخصص بشر دارند، که به اندازه\u200cی ارزش و مصرف زمان می\u200cکنند. برای تغییر دادن این بازگشت، ما یک چهارچوب رمانی، REHession را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا با استفاده از نویسندگی از منبع اطلاعات متفاوتی، مثال پایگاه دانش و حوریستیک دامنی رابطه با یادگیری استخراج کنند. این اعلام\u200cها، به عنوان نظارت متفاوتی، اغلب با یکدیگر مبارزه می\u200cکنند، که یک چالش جدید به کار خارج کردن ارتباط اصلی می\u200cآورد: چگونه نقاشی حقیقی را از نقاشی\u200cهای صوتی برای یک مثال معلوم کنیم. با شناسایی اطلاعات محیط به عنوان استخوان پشتیبانی هر دو رابطه اخراج و کشف نقاشی حقیقی، ما تکنیک\u200cهای داخل شدن را برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای داخلی محیط می\u200cگیریم، که تمام عناصره\u200cها را با افزایش همدیگر در یک حالت تکرار می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش گسترده\u200cای بیشتری از ارتفاع روی ایالت هنر نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'bn': 'সংযোগ বের করা তথ্য বিনিময়ে একটি মৌলিক কাজ। বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি মানুষের বিশেষজ্ঞদের চিহ্নিত বিষয়বস্তুর উপর ভারী নির্ভর করে, যারা খরচ এবং সময়ের খরচ। এই আবর্জনার উপর জয়ী হওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস ফ্রেম, রিহেশন, যাতে প্রস্তাব করি যে সম্পর্ক বিদেশীদের বিভিন্ন তথ্য উৎস থেকে বিবেচনা ব্যবহার করে সম্পর্কের এই বিষয়গুলোকে জাতীয় পর্যবেক্ষণ হিসেবে উল্লেখ করা হয়, প্রায়শই একে অপরের সাথে সংঘর্ষ করে, যা মূল সম্পর্ক বের করার কাজে একটি নতুন চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে আসছে: কিভ সম্পর্ক বের করা এবং সত্যিকার লেবেল আবিষ্কারের পিছনের তথ্য হিসেবে পরিচিতি করা যায়, আমরা বিতরণের প্রতিনিধি শিখতে পারি প্রযুক্তি নিয়ে, যা প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রত বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে রিহেশনের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের উপরে', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions és una tasca fonamental en l'extracció d'informació. La majoria dels mètodes existents depenen fortament de les anotacions etiquetades per experts humans, que costen i consumen temps. Per superar aquest inconvenient, proposem un nou marc, REHession, de conduir l'aprenentatge d'extractors de relacions fent servir anotacions de fonts d'informació heterogenes, per exemple la base de coneixement i heurística de domini. Aquestes anotacions, anomenades supervisió heterogenea, sovint conflicten entre elles, que porta un nou repte a la tasca original d'extracció de relació: com inferir la veritable etiqueta d'etiquetes sorolloses per exemple. Identificant la informació de contexte com el fons de l'extracció de relacions i el descobriment de veritable etiqueta, adoptem tècniques d'incorporació per aprendre les representacions distribuïdes del context, que ajunta tots els components amb millorament mútuo d'una manera iterativa. Els extensos resultats experimentals demostren la superioritat de la REHession sobre l'última.", 'bs': 'Izvukanje odnosa je osnovni zadatak u izvlačenju informacija. Većina postojećih metoda imaju tešku pouzdanost na annotacije označene ljudskim stručnjacima, koje su skupe i potrošnje vremena. Za prevladanje ovog povlačenja, predlažemo novi okvir, REHesiju, da provede veze sa učenjem ekstraktora koristeći annotacije iz heterogeneznog izvora informacija, npr. znanstvenu bazu i heuristiku domena. Ove annotacije, navedene kao heterogenetski nadzor, često se sukobe međusobno, što donosi novi izazov originalnom zadatku izvlačenja odnosa: kako zaraditi pravu etiketu iz zvukovih etiketa na određenu primjer. Identificirajući kontekstske informacije kao podršku izvlačenja odnosa i otkrivanja prave etikete, usvojimo ugrađene tehnike da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave konteksta, koje moste svim komponentima sa zajedničkim poboljšanjem na iterativni način. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju nadvišenost REHesije nad državom umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Extrakce vztahů je základním úkolem v extrakci informací. Většina stávajících metod se silně spoléhá na anotace označené lidskými odborníky, které jsou nákladné a časově náročné. Abychom tuto nevýhodu překonali, navrhujeme nový rámec REHession pro provádění extraktorového učení pomocí anotací z heterogenních informačních zdrojů, např. znalostní báze a doménové heuristiky. Tyto anotace, označované jako heterogenní dohled, se často vzájemně konfliktují, což přináší novou výzvu pro původní úlohu extrakce vztahů: jak odvodit skutečnou etiketu z hlučných etiket pro danou instanci. Identifikujeme kontextové informace jako páteř extrakce vztahů i skutečného objevování štítků, přijímáme metody vkládání k naučení distribuovaných reprezentací kontextu, které sloučí všechny komponenty se vzájemným vylepšením iterativním způsobem. Rozsáhlé experimentální výsledky ukazují nadřazenost REHesion nad nejmodernějšími.', 'et': 'Suhete ekstraheerimine on teabe ekstraheerimisel põhiülesanne. Enamik olemasolevaid meetodeid tugineb suurel määral inimekspertide märgistatud märkustele, mis on kulukad ja aeganõudvad. Selle puuduse ületamiseks pakume välja uuendusliku raamistiku REHessiooni, et viia läbi seoste ekstraktor õppimine, kasutades heterogeensest infoallikast pärit annotatsioone, nt teadmistebaasi ja domeeni heuristika. Need märkused, mida nimetatakse heterogeenseks järelevalveks, on sageli omavahel vastuolus, mis toob algsele seoste ekstraheerimise ülesandele uue väljakutse: kuidas konkreetsel juhul mürakatest etikettidest tõelist märgistust järeldada. Määratledes kontekstiteabe nii seoste ekstraheerimise kui ka tõelise etiketi avastamise selgrooga, võtame kasutusele manustamismeetodid, et õppida konteksti hajutatud esitusi, mis ühendab kõik komponendid vastastikuse täiustamisega iteratiivsel moel. Ulatuslikud eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad REHessioni paremust kaasaegse tasemega võrreldes.', 'fi': 'Suhteen poimiminen on olennainen tehtävä tiedon poimimisessa. Useimmat olemassa olevat menetelmät luottavat voimakkaasti inhimillisten asiantuntijoiden merkitsemiin huomautuksiin, jotka ovat kalliita ja aikaa vieviä. Tämän haitan voittamiseksi ehdotamme uutta viitekehystä, REHessionia, jonka avulla voidaan suorittaa suhdeekstraktorioppimista käyttämällä huomautuksia heterogeenisestä tietolähteestä, kuten tietopohjasta ja toimialueen heuristiikasta. Nämä merkinnät, joita kutsutaan heterogeeniseksi valvonnaksi, ovat usein ristiriidassa keskenään, mikä tuo uuden haasteen alkuperäiseen relaatiouuttotehtävään: kuinka päätellä todellinen etiketti meluisista etiketeistä tietyssä tapauksessa. Tunnistamalla kontekstitiedot sekä relaatioiden purkamisen että todellisen etiketin löytämisen selkärankaksi, otamme käyttöön upotustekniikoita oppiaksemme hajautetut kontekstin esitykset, jotka yhdistävät kaikki komponentit vastavuoroiseen parantamiseen iteratiivisella tavalla. Laajat kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat REHessionin ylivoimaisuuden huipputekniikkaan verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Relative extract is a basic task in information extract Rasané sing dipunangé, kuwi nggunakake dipunangé awak dhéwé, sing ngomong nik awak dhèwèké kesempatan lan akeh-ujaran. To halve this drawback, we proposal a rom frame, REHess, to konder ratio on extract Learning use anntations from Heerogeness information source, e.g. knowingbaz and domain heuristis. For undergo this drawback, we proposal a new frame, REHess, to konder ratio on extraector Learning Awak dhéwé, nggihasakno ngerasakno akeh luwih-luwih ngono nganggo cara sing gak bener, sing uwis modak kejahatan dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno sing apik dhéwé: string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Ombudhakan winih sing berarti dipontrolan ngono akeh \'REHesson\' kuwi duluran kanggo duruh-keduluran.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje odnosov je temeljna naloga pri pridobivanju informacij. Večina obstoječih metod se močno zanaša na opombe, ki jih označijo človeški strokovnjaki, ki so drage in zamudne. Za premagovanje te pomanjkljivosti predlagamo nov okvir, REHession, za izvajanje učenja odnosov ekstraktorjev z uporabo opomb iz heterogenega vira informacij, npr. baze znanja in domenske heuristike. Te opombe, ki jih imenujemo heterogen nadzor, so pogosto v nasprotju med seboj, kar prinaša nov izziv izvirni nalogi ekstrakcije relacij: kako sklepati resnično oznako iz hrupnih oznak za določen primer. Z identifikacijo kontekstnih informacij kot hrbtenice ekstrakcije relacij in resničnega odkrivanja oznak sprejemamo tehnike vgradnje, da se naučimo porazdeljenih predstavitev konteksta, ki na iterativen način povezuje vse komponente z medsebojnim izboljšanjem. Obsežni eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je REHession boljši od najsodobnejših.', 'ha': "Extrajin haɗi yana da wani aikin muhimma cikin zartar da information. Babu yawa daga metoden da ke cikin su yana da dõgara mai nauyi a kan cũtarwa na mutane, da masu buɗari da matuƙar. To, idan za mu rinjãye wannan durowa, sai mu ƙayyade wani firam na nowaya, re-heshirin, don ka yi aiki na masu kwamfyuta wa masu haɗi da amfani da zane-zane daga zane-zane-zane-zane-zane, misali, bane na ilmi da heuristics cikin wuri. Wannan kunnuwansu, aka ambaci sunan tsarin littafan tarayya, ko da yawa sunã yin husũma da jũna, da wannan yana zo da wata tsokana zuwa aikin masu husũma na farko: don ka zartar da alama na gaske daga alama na saurãre zuwa wani misali da aka ƙayyade. Ina gane bayani ga mazaɓa kamar bakin kwamfyuta da za'a gane kwamfyuta masu husũma da kuma za mu yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka da aka rarraba masu tsakanin mazaɓa, wanda ke tsohatar duk compound da ƙaranci biyu cikin wani tsari mai daidaita. Cire-jarrabai masu ƙaranci sun nuna kyauta ta ta kasa-halin-sanar.", 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནི་གནས་ཚུལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནང་དུ་རྨན་གཞི་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག་རེད། གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་དུ་ཡོད་ཚད་མེད་པའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡོད། To overcome this drawback, we propose a novel framework, REHession, to conduct relation extractor learning using annotations from heterogeneous information source, e.g., knowledge base and domain heuristics. These annotations, referred as heterogeneous supervision, often conflict with each other, which brings a new challenge to the original relation extraction task: how to infer the true label from noisy labels for a given instance. How to infer the true label from noisy labels for a given instance. Identifying context information as the backbone of both relation extraction and true label discovery, we adopt embedding techniques to learn the distributed representations of context, which bridges all components with mutual enhancement in an iterative fashion. རྒྱང་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བརྒལ་འབྱོར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དེ་སྐྱོན་རྩལ་བའི་ཚད་མཐོང་ཚད་མང་པོར་སྟོན་ཡོད།', 'he': 'חולץ מערכות יחסים הוא משימה בסיסית בחלץ מידע. לרוב השיטות הקיומות יש תלויה כבדה על ציונים שמתוויעים על ידי מומחים אנושיים, שהם יקרים ותוצרים זמן. כדי להתגבר על ההפסקה הזאת, אנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה, REHession, כדי לנהל מחלץ יחסים ללמוד באמצעות הערות ממקור מידע היטרוגני, למשל בסיס ידע והיוריסטיקה בתחום. הערות האלה, שנקראות כפיקוח heterogeneous, לעתים קרובות מתנגדות אחד עם השני, מה שמביא אתגר חדש למשימת החילוץ מערכת היחסים המקורית: איך להוציא את התווית האמיתית מתוויות רעשות למשל מסוים. מזהה מידע הקשר כעצם הגב של חיפוש יחסים וגילוי תווית אמיתי, אנו מאמצים טכניקות חיפוש כדי ללמוד את מייצגי הקשר המפורסמים, אשר מגשר את כל המרכיבים עם שיפור ביחד באופן חוזר. תוצאות ניסויים רחבות מראות את העליון של REHession מעל המצב האמנותי.'}
{'en': 'Entity Linking for Queries by Searching Wikipedia Sentences', 'ar': 'ربط الكيان للاستعلامات عن طريق البحث في جمل ويكيبيديا', 'pt': 'Vinculação de entidades para consultas pesquisando frases da Wikipedia', 'fr': "Lien d'entité pour les requêtes en recherchant des phrases Wikipédia", 'es': 'Enlace de entidades para consultas mediante la búsqueda de oraciones de Wikipedia', 'ja': 'Wikipediaの文章を検索することによるクエリのエンティティリンク', 'zh': '搜维基百科句质链接', 'hi': 'विकिपीडिया वाक्यों की खोज करके क्वेरीज़ के लिए लिंक करने वाली एंटिटी', 'ru': 'Привязка сущности к запросам путем поиска предложений в Википедии', 'ga': 'Aonán a Nascadh le haghaidh Fiosrúcháin trí Chuardach Pianbhreitheanna Vicipéid', 'hu': 'A lekérdezésekhez kapcsolódó entitás a Wikipédia mondatok keresésével', 'ka': 'ვიკიპედია სიტყვების ძიებით ერთეულობა კითხვებისთვის დაკავშირება', 'el': 'Σύνδεση οντότητας για ερωτήματα με αναζήτηση προτάσεων της Βικιπαίδειας', 'kk': 'Википедия сөздерін іздеу үшін сұраныстағы нысандарды сілтемелеу', 'it': 'Entità che collega le query cercando frasi di Wikipedia', 'ml': 'വിക്കിപീഡിയ വിധികള്\u200d തിരയുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Link ta’ Entità għal Talbiet permezz tat-Tfittxija ta’ Sentenzi tal-Wikipedia', 'mk': 'Поврзување на ентитетите за прашања со пребарување на векипедиски реченици', 'lt': 'Subjektas, susiejantis klausimus ieškant Wikipedia sakinių', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Википедийн үгийг хайж, Queries-ийн нэгж холбоотой', 'pl': 'Podmioty linkujące do zapytań poprzez wyszukiwanie zdań Wikipedii', 'no': 'Entitet som lenkjer etter spørjingar ved å søkja etter Wikipedia- teikn', 'ro': 'Legătura entității pentru interogări prin căutarea propozițiilor Wikipedia', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka degmada ee Queries by Searching Wikipedia', 'sr': 'Entitet povezan za pitanja tražeći Wikipedia rečenice', 'si': 'විකිපිඩියා වචනය සොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධය', 'sv': 'Enhet som länkar efter frågor genom att söka efter Wikipedia meningar', 'ur': 'ویکیپیڈیا سنٹنس تلاش کے ذریعہ سوال کے لئے لینک کرنے والی اینتیٹ', 'ta': 'விகிபிடியா வாக்குறுக்களை தேடும் மூலம் கேள்விகளுக்கான உள்ளீட்டு இணைப்பு', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Công ty Liên kết cho các câu hỏi bằng cách tìm kiếm Wikipedia.', 'bg': 'Свързване на обекти за заявки чрез търсене на изречения в Уикипедия', 'hr': 'Entitet povezan za zapitivanje tražeći riječi Wikipedia', 'nl': "Entiteit koppelen naar query's door te zoeken in Wikipedia zinnen", 'da': 'Entity Linking for forespørgsler ved at søge efter Wikipedia Sætninger', 'id': 'Linking Entitas untuk Pertanyaan dengan Mencari Perkataan Wikipedia', 'ko': '위키백과 문장을 검색하여 검색하는 실체 링크', 'fa': 'واحد متصل برای سوال با جستجوی کلمات ویکیپدیا', 'de': 'Entity-Verknüpfung nach Abfragen durch Durchsuchen von Wikipedia-Sätzen', 'sw': 'Kiungo cha Ujumbe kwa ajili ya maswali na Kutafuta Makosa ya Wikipedia', 'tr': 'Wikipedia Sözleri Barlap Hatlar', 'am': 'Wikipedia Sentences', 'af': 'Eenheid Skakel vir Naam deur Soektog van Wikipedia Uitdrukkings', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Lidhja e njësisë për pyetje nga kërkimi i fjalimeve në Wikipedia', 'az': 'Wikipedia Sözünü Qeyd edirək Sətirlər üçün Bağlama Entity', 'bs': 'Entitet povezan za zapitivanje tražeći Wikipedia kazne', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়া শাস্তি অনুসন্ধান করে প্রশ্নের জন্য এন্টিটি লিংকিং', 'ca': 'Entitat Linking for Queries by Searching Wikipedia Sentences', 'cs': 'Entity propojení dotazů vyhledáváním vět Wikipedie', 'et': 'Olemi lingimine päringutele Vikipeedia lausete otsimise teel', 'fi': 'Entiteetin linkittäminen kyselyihin etsimällä Wikipedian lauseita', 'jv': 'Entire Linking kanggo Kemerdekaan Nang Kelangan Sentensi Wipedipedya', 'sk': 'Povezovanje entitet za poizvedbe z iskanjem Wikipedijskih stavkov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'קישור יחסים לשאלות על ידי חיפוש אחר גזרות ויקיפדיה', 'bo': 'Entity Linking for Queries by Searching Wikipedia Sentences'}
{'en': 'We present a simple yet effective approach for linking entities in queries. The key idea is to search sentences similar to a query from Wikipedia articles and directly use the human-annotated entities in the similar sentences as candidate entities for the query. Then, we employ a rich set of features, such as link-probability, context-matching, word embeddings, and relatedness among candidate entities as well as their related entities, to rank the candidates under a regression based framework. The advantages of our approach lie in two aspects, which contribute to the ranking process and final linking result. First, it can greatly reduce the number of candidate entities by filtering out irrelevant entities with the words in the query. Second, we can obtain the query sensitive prior probability in addition to the static link-probability derived from all Wikipedia articles. We conduct experiments on two benchmark datasets on entity linking for queries, namely the ERD14 dataset and the GERDAQ dataset. Experimental results show that our method outperforms state-of-the-art systems and yields 75.0 % in F1 on the ERD14 dataset and 56.9 % on the GERDAQ dataset.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا بسيطًا ولكنه فعال لربط الكيانات في الاستعلامات. الفكرة الأساسية هي البحث عن جمل مشابهة لاستعلام من مقالات ويكيبيديا واستخدام الكيانات المشروحة بشريًا في الجمل المماثلة ككيانات مرشحة للاستعلام. بعد ذلك ، نستخدم مجموعة غنية من الميزات ، مثل احتمالية الارتباط ، ومطابقة السياق ، وتضمين الكلمات ، والارتباط بين الكيانات المرشحة وكذلك الكيانات ذات الصلة ، لتصنيف المرشحين ضمن إطار عمل قائم على الانحدار. تكمن مزايا نهجنا في جانبين ، مما يساهم في عملية التصنيف ونتائج الربط النهائية. أولاً ، يمكنه تقليل عدد الكيانات المرشحة بشكل كبير عن طريق تصفية الكيانات غير ذات الصلة بالكلمات الموجودة في الاستعلام. ثانيًا ، يمكننا الحصول على الاحتمال المسبق الحساس للاستعلام بالإضافة إلى احتمالية الارتباط الثابتة المشتقة من جميع مقالات Wikipedia. نجري تجارب على مجموعتي بيانات معياريتين حول ربط الكيانات للاستعلامات ، وهما مجموعة بيانات ERD14 ومجموعة بيانات GERDAQ. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تتفوق على أحدث الأنظمة وتنتج 75.0٪ في F1 على مجموعة بيانات ERD14 و 56.9٪ في مجموعة بيانات GERDAQ.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche simple mais efficace pour lier des entités dans des requêtes. L'idée clé est de rechercher des phrases similaires à une requête d'articles Wikipédia et d'utiliser directement les entités annotées humaines dans les phrases similaires comme entités candidates pour la requête. Ensuite, nous utilisons un ensemble complet de fonctionnalités, telles que la probabilité de liaison, la correspondance contextuelle, l'intégration de mots et la relation entre les entités candidates ainsi que leurs entités associées, pour classer les candidats dans un cadre basé sur la régression. Les avantages de notre approche résident dans deux aspects, qui contribuent au processus de classement et au résultat final de la liaison. Tout d'abord, elle peut réduire considérablement le nombre d'entités candidates en filtrant les entités non pertinentes avec les mots de la requête. Deuxièmement, nous pouvons obtenir la probabilité préalable sensible à la requête en plus de la probabilité de lien statique dérivée de tous les articles Wikipédia. Nous menons des expériences sur deux ensembles de données de référence sur la liaison d'entités pour les requêtes, à savoir le jeu de données ERD14 et le jeu de données GERDAQ. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode surpasse les systèmes de pointe et donne 75,0\xa0% en F1 sur l'ensemble de données ERD14 et 56,9\xa0% sur l'ensemble de données GERDAQ.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem simples, mas eficaz, para vincular entidades em consultas. A ideia principal é pesquisar frases semelhantes a uma consulta de artigos da Wikipédia e usar diretamente as entidades anotadas por humanos nas frases semelhantes como entidades candidatas à consulta. Em seguida, empregamos um rico conjunto de recursos, como probabilidade de link, correspondência de contexto, incorporação de palavras e relacionamento entre entidades candidatas, bem como suas entidades relacionadas, para classificar os candidatos em uma estrutura baseada em regressão. As vantagens da nossa abordagem residem em dois aspectos, que contribuem para o processo de classificação e resultado final da ligação. Primeiro, ele pode reduzir bastante o número de entidades candidatas filtrando entidades irrelevantes com as palavras na consulta. Em segundo lugar, podemos obter a probabilidade anterior sensível à consulta, além da probabilidade de link estático derivada de todos os artigos da Wikipédia. Conduzimos experimentos em dois conjuntos de dados de referência sobre vinculação de entidades para consultas, ou seja, o conjunto de dados ERD14 e o conjunto de dados GERDAQ. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método supera sistemas de última geração e rende 75,0% em F1 no conjunto de dados ERD14 e 56,9% no conjunto de dados GERDAQ.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque simple pero eficaz para vincular entidades en las consultas. La idea clave es buscar frases similares a una consulta de artículos de Wikipedia y utilizar directamente las entidades anotadas por humanos en oraciones similares como entidades candidatas para la consulta. Luego, empleamos un amplio conjunto de características, como probabilidad de enlace, coincidencia de contexto, incrustación de palabras y relación entre las entidades candidatas, así como sus entidades relacionadas, para clasificar a los candidatos bajo un marco basado en la regresión. Las ventajas de nuestro enfoque radican en dos aspectos, que contribuyen al proceso de clasificación y al resultado final de la vinculación. En primer lugar, puede reducir considerablemente el número de entidades candidatas al filtrar las entidades irrelevantes con las palabras de la consulta. En segundo lugar, podemos obtener la probabilidad previa sensible a la consulta además de la probabilidad de enlace estático derivada de todos los artículos de Wikipedia. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en dos conjuntos de datos de referencia sobre el enlace de entidades para consultas, a saber, el conjunto de datos ERD14 y el conjunto de datos GERDAQ. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método supera a los sistemas más avanzados y rinde un 75,0% en F1 en el conjunto de datos ERD14 y un 56,9% en el conjunto de datos GERDAQ.', 'zh': '臣等条上一法链接其实简而效者。 要心者,搜类维基百科文之句,直用类句之人工注实体以为询选。 然后用群富之功,如链接概率,上下文匹配,词嵌及选实相关之相关性,以框架归对候选项为名。 吾道之势在两端,其有助于排名终始者也。 先是,可漉去询中单词者不关实体大大减少候选实体之数。 其次,自诸维基百科文中静链接概率之外,犹得询敏之先验概率。 询之实体链接二准数集上实验,即ERD14数集GERDAQ数集也。 实验结果表明者,吾道优于先进之统,于ERD14数集上之F1而生75.0%之益,于GERDAQ数集上之生率为56.9%。', 'ja': 'クエリ内のエンティティをリンクするためのシンプルで効果的なアプローチを提示します。 主要なアイデアは、ウィキペディアの記事からのクエリに似た文を検索し、クエリの候補エンティティとして同様の文に人間が注釈を付けたエンティティを直接使用することです。 次に、リンク確率、コンテキストマッチング、単語埋め込み、候補エンティティ間の関連性、およびそれらの関連エンティティなどの豊富な機能を使用して、回帰ベースのフレームワークの下で候補をランク付けします。 私たちのアプローチの利点は、ランキングプロセスと最終的なリンク結果に寄与する2つの側面にあります。 まず、クエリ内の単語で無関係なエンティティをフィルタリングすることで、候補エンティティの数を大幅に削減できます。 第二に、ウィキペディアのすべての記事から導き出される静的リンク確率に加えて、クエリに敏感な事前確率を得ることができます。 私たちは、クエリのためのエンティティリンクに関する2つのベンチマークデータセット、すなわちERD 14データセットとGERDAQデータセットの実験を行います。 実験結果は、当社の方法が最先端のシステムを上回り、ERD 14データセットではF 1で75.0%、GERDAQデータセットでは56.9%の利回りをもたらすことを示しています。', 'hi': 'हम प्रश्नों में संस्थाओं को जोड़ने के लिए एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। मुख्य विचार विकिपीडिया लेखों से एक क्वेरी के समान वाक्यों की खोज करना है और क्वेरी के लिए उम्मीदवार संस्थाओं के समान वाक्यों में मानव-एनोटेटेड संस्थाओं का सीधे उपयोग करना है। फिर, हम सुविधाओं के एक समृद्ध सेट को नियोजित करते हैं, जैसे कि लिंक-संभावना, संदर्भ-मिलान, शब्द एम्बेडिंग, और उम्मीदवार संस्थाओं के साथ-साथ उनकी संबंधित संस्थाओं के बीच संबंधितता, उम्मीदवारों को प्रतिगमन आधारित ढांचे के तहत रैंक करने के लिए। हमारे दृष्टिकोण के फायदे दो पहलुओं में निहित हैं, जो रैंकिंग प्रक्रिया और अंतिम लिंकिंग परिणाम में योगदान करते हैं। सबसे पहले, यह क्वेरी में शब्दों के साथ अप्रासंगिक संस्थाओं को फ़िल्टर करके उम्मीदवार संस्थाओं की संख्या को बहुत कम कर सकता है। दूसरा, हम सभी विकिपीडिया लेखों से व्युत्पन्न स्थैतिक लिंक-प्रायिकता के अलावा क्वेरी संवेदनशील पूर्व प्रायिकता प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। हम क्वेरी के लिए जोड़ने वाली इकाई पर दो बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं, अर्थात् ERD14 डेटासेट और GERDAQ डेटासेट। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को मात देती है और ERD14 डेटासेट पर F1 में 75.0% और GERDAQ डेटासेट पर 56.9% पैदावार करती है।', 'ru': 'Представляем простой, но эффективный подход к привязке сущностей в запросах. Ключевой идеей является поиск предложений, похожих на запрос из статей Википедии, и прямое использование аннотированных человеком сущностей в аналогичных предложениях в качестве потенциальных сущностей для запроса. Затем мы используем богатый набор функций, таких как связь-вероятность, сопоставление контекста, встраивание слов и взаимосвязь между сущностями-кандидатами, а также связанными с ними сущностями, чтобы ранжировать кандидатов в рамках, основанных на регрессии. Преимущества нашего подхода заключаются в двух аспектах, которые способствуют процессу ранжирования и конечному результату связывания. Во-первых, он может значительно уменьшить количество сущностей-кандидатов, отфильтровав нерелевантные сущности словами в запросе. Во-вторых, мы можем получить чувствительную к запросу априорную вероятность в дополнение к статической связи-вероятность, выведенной из всех статей Википедии. Мы проводим эксперименты на двух эталонных наборах данных по связям между объектами для запросов, а именно наборе данных ERD14 и наборе данных GERDAQ. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод превосходит современные системы и дает 75,0% в F1 по набору данных ERD14 и 56,9% по набору данных GERDAQ.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid cur chuige simplí ach éifeachtach i láthair chun aonáin a nascadh i bhfiosruithe. Is é an príomh-smaoineamh ná abairtí atá cosúil le fiosrúchán ó ailt Vicipéide a chuardach agus na heintitis daonna-anótáilte sna habairtí comhchosúla a úsáid go díreach mar aonáin iarrthóra don cheist. Ansin, bainimid úsáid as sraith shaibhir gnéithe, mar nasc-dóchúlacht, meaitseáil comhthéacs, neadú focal, agus gaol idir na heintitis is iarrthóirí chomh maith lena n-eintitis ghaolmhara, chun na hiarrthóirí a rangú faoi chreat atá bunaithe ar chúlchéimniú. Tá dhá ghné ag baint le buntáistí ár gcur chuige, a chuireann leis an bpróiseas rangaithe agus leis an toradh ceangail deiridh. Ar an gcéad dul síos, is féidir leis líon na n-eintiteas is iarrthóirí a laghdú go mór trí aonáin nach mbaineann le hábhar a scagadh leis na focail sa cheist. Ar an dara dul síos, is féidir linn an dóchúlacht roimh ré íogair don cheist a fháil chomh maith leis an dóchúlacht nasc statach a thagann ó gach alt Vicipéid. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí tagarmhairc ar nascadh aonáin le haghaidh fiosrúcháin, is iad sin tacar sonraí ERD14 agus tacar sonraí GERDAQ. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár modh córais den scoth agus go bhfuil toradh 75.0% in F1 ar thacar sonraí ERD14 agus 56.9% ar thacar sonraí GERDAQ.', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio semplice ma efficace per collegare le entità nelle query. L'idea chiave è cercare frasi simili a una query dagli articoli di Wikipedia e utilizzare direttamente le entità annotate dall'uomo nelle frasi simili come entità candidate per la query. Quindi, impieghiamo un ricco insieme di funzionalità, come la probabilità di collegamento, la corrispondenza del contesto, le incorporazioni di parole e la relazione tra le entità candidate e le loro entità correlate, per classificare i candidati in un framework basato sulla regressione. I vantaggi del nostro approccio risiedono in due aspetti, che contribuiscono al processo di ranking e al risultato finale di linking. In primo luogo, può ridurre notevolmente il numero di entità candidate filtrando entità irrilevanti con le parole nella query. In secondo luogo, possiamo ottenere la probabilità preliminare sensibile della query in aggiunta alla probabilità di collegamento statica derivata da tutti gli articoli di Wikipedia. Conduciamo esperimenti su due set di dati di benchmark sul collegamento di entità per query, vale a dire il dataset ERD14 e il dataset GERDAQ. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo supera i sistemi all'avanguardia e produce il 75,0% in F1 sul set di dati ERD14 e il 56,9% sul set di dati GERDAQ.", 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων σε ερωτήματα. Η βασική ιδέα είναι να αναζητήσετε προτάσεις παρόμοιες με ένα ερώτημα από άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας και να χρησιμοποιήσετε άμεσα τις οντότητες που έχουν σημειώσει ο άνθρωπος στις παρόμοιες προτάσεις ως υποψήφιες οντότητες για το ερώτημα. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα πλούσιο σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών, όπως πιθανότητα σύνδεσης, αντιστοίχιση περιβάλλοντος, ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και συσχέτιση μεταξύ υποψηφίων οντοτήτων καθώς και των συναφών οντοτήτων τους, για να ταξινομήσουμε τους υποψηφίους σε ένα πλαίσιο βασισμένο στην παλινδρόμηση. Τα πλεονεκτήματα της προσέγγισής μας βρίσκονται σε δύο πτυχές, οι οποίες συμβάλλουν στη διαδικασία κατάταξης και στο τελικό αποτέλεσμα σύνδεσης. Πρώτον, μπορεί να μειώσει σημαντικά τον αριθμό των υποψήφιων οντοτήτων φιλτράροντας έξω τις άσχετες οντότητες με τις λέξεις στο ερώτημα. Δεύτερον, μπορούμε να λάβουμε την ευαίσθητη προηγούμενη πιθανότητα ερωτήματος επιπλέον της στατικής πιθανότητας σύνδεσης που προκύπτει από όλα τα άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς σχετικά με τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων για ερωτήματα, συγκεκριμένα το σύνολο δεδομένων ERD14 και το σύνολο δεδομένων GERDAQ. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα και αποδίδει 75,0% σε F1 στο σύνολο δεδομένων ERD14 και 56,9% στο σύνολο δεδομένων GERDAQ.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვითავსებთ ერთადერთი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური პროგრამის შესაბამისათვის ინტერტიკების შესაბამისათვის. გასაკუთარი იდეა, რომ ვიკიპედიაში საკითხვაზე მსგავსი სიტყვების ძიება და პირად გამოყენება ადამიანის ანოტირებული ინტერტიკების მსგავსი სიტყვებში, როგორც კითხვაზე კანდიდი შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ბედნიერი ფუნქციების ნაწილი, როგორც კონტექსტის შესაძლებლობა, კონტექსტის შესაძლებლობა, სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა და კანდიდენტის ელექციების შორის შესახებ და მათი შესახებ ელ ჩვენი წარმოდგენის გამოსახულება ორი აპექტირებში, რომლებიც დამატებით პროცესში და ბოლო დაკავშირებული შედეგი. პირველად, ის შეიძლება ძალიან გადასრულება კანდიდენტის ელემენტის რაოდენობას, რომელიც კითხვაში სიტყვებით უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ელემენტები ფილტრირე მეორე, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მივიღოთ ყველა ვიკიპედიაზე გამოიყენებული სტატიკური კონტაქტიური შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტების ორი ბენქმარკური მონაცემების შესახებ ინტერტის შესახებ კითხვების შესახებ, რომელიც ERD14 მონაცემების შესახებ და GERDA ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენება ჩვენი მეტი გავაკეთება სისტემები და F1-ში 75,0%-ს ERD14 მონაცემები და GERDAQ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის 56,9%.', 'hu': 'Egyszerű, mégis hatékony megközelítést mutatunk be a lekérdezésekben lévő entitások összekapcsolására. A kulcsfontosságú ötlet az, hogy a Wikipédia cikkekből egy lekérdezéshez hasonló mondatokat keressünk, és közvetlenül használjuk az emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott entitásokat a lekérdezéshez hasonló mondatokban. Ezután számos olyan funkciót alkalmazunk, mint például link-valószínűség, kontextus-egyezés, szóbeágyazás és kapcsolattartás a jelölt entitások és a kapcsolódó entitások között, hogy a jelölteket regresszió alapú keretrendszer alá soroljuk. Megközelítésünk előnyei két szempontból állnak, amelyek hozzájárulnak a rangsorolási folyamathoz és a végső összekapcsolási eredményhez. Először is jelentősen csökkentheti a jelölt entitások számát azáltal, hogy kiszűri az irreleváns entitásokat a lekérdezésben szereplő szavakkal. Másodszor, a lekérdezésre érzékeny korábbi valószínűséget a Wikipédia összes cikkéből származó statikus link-valószínűség mellett tudjuk megszerezni. Kísérleteket végzünk két referenciaadatkészleten a lekérdezésekhez kapcsolódó entitásokkal kapcsolatban, nevezetesen az ERD14 adatkészleten és a GERDAQ adatkészleten. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb rendszereket, és 75,0%-ot eredményez F1-ben az ERD14 adatkészleten és 56,9%-ot a GERDAQ adatkészleten.', 'kk': 'Біз сұрақтарды қосылу үшін қарапайым әлі эффективті тәртібін таңдаймыз. Негізгі идея - Wikipedia мақалаларының сұрақтарына ұқсас сөйлемелерді іздеу және сұрақтар үшін адамдардың белгіленген мәтіндерін тікелей қолдану. Содан кейін, сілтеме мүмкіндігі, контекстік сәйкестігі, сөздерді ендіру және олардың қатынастыру мүмкіндігі, кандидаттардың және оның қатынастығы мүмкіндіктерінің қатынасын қолдану үшін, кандидаттарды регресси Біздің қатынасыздың артықшылығы екі аспекте тұрады. Бұл реттеу процесіне және соңғы сілтемелеу нәтижесіне көмектеседі. Біріншіден, бұл кандидаттардың санын сұраныстағы сөздерді сүзгілеу үшін көп қысқартуға болады. Екіншіден, біз Wikipedia мақалаларынан шыққан static link- ықтималдығына қосымша сұраныс сезімдігін алдыңғы мүмкіндігін аламыз. Біз сұрақтар үшін сілтемелерді қосып, ERD14 деректер жинағы және GERDAQ деректер жинағында екі бағдарлама деректер жинағында тәжірибелерді орындаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің әдіміміздің күй- жай жүйелерін орындап, F1- де ERD14 деректер жиынында 75, 0% және GERDAQ деректер жиынында 56, 9% жүйеледі.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan sederhana tetapi efektif untuk menyambung entiti dalam pertanyaan. Idea kunci ialah mencari kalimat yang sama dengan pertanyaan dari artikel Wikipedia dan menggunakan secara langsung entiti yang dicatat oleh manusia dalam kalimat yang sama seperti entiti calon untuk pertanyaan. Kemudian, kita menggunakan set fitur yang kaya, seperti kebarangkalian pautan, persamaan konteks, penyambungan perkataan, dan hubungan antara entiti calon serta entiti berkaitan mereka, untuk menandai calon di bawah kerangka berdasarkan regresi. Keuntungan pendekatan kita berada dalam dua aspek, yang berkontribusi kepada proses peringkat dan hasil penghubungan akhir. Pertama, ia boleh mengurangkan jumlah entiti calon dengan menapis keluar entiti tidak relevan dengan kata-kata dalam pertanyaan. Second, we can obtain the query sensitive prior probability in addition to the static link-probability derived from all Wikipedia articles.  Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua set data benchmark pada entiti yang menghubungkan untuk pertanyaan, iaitu set data ERD14 dan set data GERDAQ. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melampaui sistem-state-of-the-art dan menghasilkan 75.0% dalam F1 pada set data ERD14 dan 56.9% pada set data GERDAQ.', 'mk': 'Презентираме едноставен, но ефикасен пристап за поврзување на ентитетите во прашањата. Клучната идеја е да се пребаруваат реченици слични на прашањето од статиите на Википедија и директно да се користат ентитетите кои се анотирани од човекот во слични реченици како кандидатските ентитети за прашањето. Потоа, употребуваме богат сет карактеристики, како што се веројатноста на врските, споредувањето на контекстот, вложувањето на зборовите и врската меѓу кандидатските ентитети, како и нивните поврзани ентитети, за да ги рангираме кандидатите под регресиска рамка. Преносите на нашиот пристап се во два аспекти, кои придонесуваат за процесот на рангирање и конечниот резултат на поврзувањето. Прво, може значително да го намали бројот на кандидатски ентитети со филтрирање на нерелевантните ентитети со зборовите во прашањето. Второ, можеме да ја добиеме претходната веројатност на прашањето како дополнител на статичката веројатност на поврзаност изведена од сите статии на Википедија. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на два бази на податоци за ентитетите кои се поврзуваат за прашања, а тоа е ЕРД14 бази на податоци и ГЕРДАК бази на податоци. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод ги надминува најдобрите системи и дава 75,0 отсто во Ф1 на податоците на ЕРД14 и 56,9 отсто во податоците на ГЕРДАК.', 'lt': 'Mes pateikiame paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą požiūrį į subjektų susiejimą klausimuose. Pagrindinė idėja yra ieškoti sakinių, panašių į klausimą iš Wikipedia straipsnių, ir tiesiogiai panašiuose sakiniuose naudoti žmogiškai anotuotus subjektus kaip ir kandidatus. Tuomet naudojame daug požymių, pvz., sąsajų tikimybę, konteksto derinimą, žodžių įtraukimą ir ryšį tarp subjektų kandidatų bei jų susijusių subjektų, kad kandidatai būtų priskiriami regresijos pagrindu. Mūsų požiūrio privalumai susiję su dviem aspektais, kurie prisideda prie klasifikavimo proceso ir galutinio susiejimo rezultato. Pirma, ji gali gerokai sumažinti subjektų kandidatų skaičių, filtruodama nerelevantus subjektus klausime pateiktais žodžiais. Antra, mes galime gauti klausimo jautrią ankstesnę tikimybę, be statinio ryšio tikimybės, gautos iš visų Wikipedia straipsnių. Atliekame eksperimentus dviejuose lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose apie subjektus, susiejančius klausimus, būtent ERD14 duomenų rinkinį ir GERDAQ duomenų rinkinį. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas viršija pažangiausias sistemas ir F1 duomenys sudaro 75,0 % ERP14 duomenų rinkinio ir 56,9 % GERDAQ duomenų rinkinio.', 'mn': 'Бид хүмүүсийг query-д холбох энгийн ч үр дүнтэй арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Хамгийн гол санаа нь Википедийн өгүүлбэрээс төстэй өгүүлбэрүүдийг хайж, хүн төрөлхтний анзаарсан байгууллагуудыг квадратын төлөө төстэй өгүүлбэрээс шууд ашиглах юм. Дараа нь бид холбоотой магадлал, контекст холбоотой, үгний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний холбоотой бөгөөд тэдн Бидний ойлголтын давуу талууд нь хоёр талаар байдаг. Энэ нь шагналын процесс болон эцсийн холбоотой үр дүнд тусалдаг. Эхлээд, энэ нь захирагчийн орнуудын тоо багасгаж чадна. Кверсийн үгнээс хамааралтгүй орнуудыг сүзүүлж чадна. Хоёрдугаар, бид Wikipedia бүх өгүүлбэрээс гарсан static link-магадлал дээр илүү өмнө нь мэдрэмжтэй байх магадлал авч болно. Бид кверийн холбогдолтой байрлалтай холбогдолтын хоёр салбарын өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтыг хийдэг. Энэ бол ERD14 өгөгдлийн санг, GERDAQ өгөгдлийн санг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь урлагийн тогтолцооны үйлдвэрлэл гаргаж, F1-д ERD14 өгөгдлийн санд 75.0% болон GERDAQ өгөгдлийн санд 56.9%.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ sempliċi iżda effettiv biex jintrabtu entitajiet fi mistoqsijiet. L-idea ewlenija hija li tfittex sentenzi simili għal mistoqsija minn artikoli tal-Wikipedia u tuża direttament l-entitajiet annotati mill-bniedem fis-sentenzi simili bħal entitajiet kandidati għall-mistoqsija. Imbagħad, a ħna nużaw sett għoli ta’ karatteristiċi, bħall-probabbiltà ta’ rabta, tqabbil tal-kuntest, inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, u relazzjoni fost l-entitajiet kandidati kif ukoll l-entitajiet relatati tagħhom, biex jikklassifikaw il-kandidati taħt qafas ibbażat fuq ir-rigressjoni. Il-vantaġġi tal-approċċ tagħna jinsabu f’żewġ aspetti, li jikkontribwixxu għall-proċess ta’ klassifikazzjoni u r-riżultat finali ta’ rabta. L-ewwel nett, tista’ tnaqqas ħafna n-numru ta’ entitajiet kandidati billi tiffiltra l-entitajiet irrelevanti bil-kliem fil-mistoqsija. It-tieni nett, nistgħu niksbu probabbiltà preċedenti sensittiva għall-mistoqsija flimkien mal-probabbiltà statika tal-link derivata mill-artikoli kollha tal-Wikipedia. We conduct experiments on two benchmark datasets on entity linking for queries, namely the ERD14 dataset and the GERDAQ dataset.  Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jwassal għal sistemi l-aktar avvanzati u jagħti 75,0 % f’F1 fuq is-sett tad-dejta tal-ERD14 u 56,9 % fuq is-sett tad-dejta tal-GERDAQ.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു ലളിതമായിട്ടുമുണ്ട്. വിക്കിപിഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് പോലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെരയുകയും ചോദ്യം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളായി നേരിട് പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിതികള്\u200dക്കും അവരുടെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സ്വഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളിലാണ്. അത് റാങ്ങിങ് പ്രക്രിയയിലേക്കും അവസാനം ബന്ധപ ആദ്യം, അത് വിചാരണയിലെ വാക്കുകളുമായി അപരിചിതമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന സ Second, we can obtain the query sensitive prior probability in addition to the static link-probability derived from all Wikipedia articles.  ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളുടെ രണ്ട് ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. എ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. എര്\u200dഡി14 ഡ', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy proste, ale skuteczne podejście do łączenia podmiotów w zapytaniach. Kluczowym pomysłem jest wyszukiwanie zdań podobnych do zapytania z artykułów Wikipedii i bezpośrednie wykorzystanie podmiotów z adnotacjami człowieka w podobnych zdaniach jako podmiotów kandydujących do zapytania. Następnie wykorzystujemy bogaty zestaw funkcji, takich jak prawdopodobieństwo linków, dopasowanie kontekstu, osadzenie słów i powiązanie między podmiotami kandydującymi oraz ich podmiotami powiązanymi, aby ocenić kandydatów w ramach ramowych opartych na regresji. Zalety naszego podejścia leżą w dwóch aspektach, które przyczyniają się do procesu rankingu i końcowego wyniku linkowania. Po pierwsze, może znacznie zmniejszyć liczbę kandydatów poprzez filtrowanie nieistotnych podmiotów ze słowami w zapytaniu. Po drugie, możemy uzyskać wrażliwe na zapytanie wcześniejsze prawdopodobieństwo oprócz statycznego prawdopodobieństwa linku pochodzącego ze wszystkich artykułów Wikipedii. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na dwóch zestawach danych referencyjnych dotyczących łączenia jednostek dla zapytań, a mianowicie zbioru danych ERD14 i zbioru danych GERDAQ. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy i daje 75,0% w F1 na zbiorze danych ERD14 i 56,9% na zbiorze danych GERDAQ.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein enkel, men effektiv tilnærming for å kopla einingar i spørjingar. Nøkkelideen er å søkja setningar liknande til eit spørjing frå Wikipedia-artiklar og direkte bruka dei menneskeoppmerkingane i dei liknande setningane som kandidateiningar for spørjinga. Deretter bruker vi ein rikk set av funksjonar, som lenkjesannsynligheten, kontekstsamsvar, ordinnbygging, og relateditet mellom kandidateiningar og deres relaterte entiteter, for å rankera kandidatane under eit regresjonsbasert rammeverk. Forbetringane av tilnærminga vårt ligg i to aspekter, som bidrar til rekningsprosessen og resultatet av sluttlinjing. Først kan det redusere talet på kandidateiningar ved å filtrera ut uavhengige einingar med ord i spørjinga. Andre, kan vi få spørjingsforslått førre sannsynligheten i tillegg til den statiske lenkjesannsynligheten utførte frå alle Wikipedia-artiklar. Vi gjev eksperimenter på to benchmarkdatasett på eininga som lenkjer etter spørjingar, dvs. ERD14- datasettet og GERDAQ- datasettet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at metoden vårt utfører mellom kunstsystemet og gir 75,0% i F1 på datasettet ERD14 og 56,9% på datasettet GERDAQ.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o abordare simplă, dar eficientă pentru conectarea entităților în interogări. Ideea cheie este de a căuta propoziții similare unei interogări din articolele Wikipedia și de a utiliza direct entitățile adnotate de om în propoziții similare ca entități candidate pentru interogare. Apoi, folosim un set bogat de caracteristici, cum ar fi probabilitatea link-ului, potrivirea contextului, încorporarea cuvintelor și relația dintre entitățile candidate, precum și entitățile conexe acestora, pentru a clasifica candidații într-un cadru bazat pe regresie. Avantajele abordării noastre constă în două aspecte, care contribuie la procesul de clasament și la rezultatul final de legătură. În primul rând, poate reduce considerabil numărul entităților candidate prin filtrarea entităților irelevante cu cuvintele din interogare. În al doilea rând, putem obține probabilitatea anterioară sensibilă interogării în plus față de probabilitatea legată statică derivată din toate articolele Wikipedia. Realizăm experimente pe două seturi de date de referință privind legătura entităților pentru interogări, și anume setul de date ERD14 și setul de date GERDAQ. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră depășește sistemele de ultimă generație și obține 75,0% în F1 pe setul de date ERD14 și 56,9% în setul de date GERDAQ.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan, ali efikasan pristup povezivanju entiteta u pitanja. Ključna ideja je pretražiti rečenice slične pretraživanju iz Wikipedijskih članaka i direktno iskoristiti ljudske notirane entitate u sličnim rečenicama kao kandidatske entitate za zahtev. Onda zapošljavamo bogat set karakteristika, poput povezanosti sa verovatnošću, kontekstskog odgovaranja, uključivanja riječi i povezanost između kandidatskih entitata, kao i njihovih povezanih entitata, da rankiramo kandidate pod okvirom regresije. Prednosti našeg pristupa nalaze se u dva aspekta, koji doprinose postupku rangiranja i konačnom povezivanju rezultata. Prvo, to može veoma smanjiti broj kandidatskih entitata filtriranjem nevažnih entitata sa rečima u pitanju. Drugo, možemo dobiti osjetljivu prethodnu verovatnoću zahteva osim statične verovatnoće veze iz svih članaka Wikipedije. Vodimo eksperimente na dve baze podataka o entitetu povezanoj za ispitivanje, a to je ERD14 grupa podataka i GERDAQ grupa podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava i daje 75,0% u F1 na setu podataka ERD14 i 56,9% na setu podataka GERDAQ.', 'so': "Waxaynu keennaa qaab fudud oo weli faa’iido leh oo la xiriira hay'adaha su'aalaha. Fikirada muhiimka ah waa in la raadiyo erayada la xiriira warqadaha Wikipedia islamarkaasna si toos ah u isticmaalo waxyaabaha la aqoonsan dadka oo isku mid ah oo ay u isticmaalaan waxyaabaha suurtagalka ah. Markaas waxaynu shaqaynaynaa kooxo hodan ah, tusaale ahaan xiriir, isku mid ah, hadal ku habboon, iyo xiriir ku saabsan waxyaabaha kandidada iyo waxyaabaha la xiriira, si aan u sarrayno kandidiyayaasha hoostooda hoos u dhigno tababar regime. Faahfaaha qaabilseennu waxay ku jiraan laba dhinac, taasoo ku saabsan baaraandegista iyo dhamaadka xiriirka. First, it can greatly reduce the number of candidate entities by filtering out irrelevant entities with the words in the query.  Second, waxaynu heli karnaa suurtagal horay ah oo aan ka heli karno qoraalka Wikipedia oo dhan ka soo baxay xiriirka istaariga. Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaan ku qoran labo sawir oo ku saabsan macluumaad la xiriira su’aalaha, tusaale ahaan ERD14 dataset iyo GERDAQ databaseset. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaabkeennu uu ka soo baxo habka farshaxanka iyo wuxuu ka soo saaraa 75.0% F1 oo ka soo saara dataset ERD14 iyo 56.9% oo ku saabsan danbiyada GERDAQ.", 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මුළු අදහසය තමයි විකිපිඩියාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ඊට පස්සේ, අපි විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධයක් භාවිත කරනවා, සම්බන්ධතාවක්, වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක්, වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දෙකක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200d මුලින්ම, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ වචනය සමග ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිසා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිසා  දෙවනිය, අපිට පුළුවන් විකිපිඩියා පිළිපතියෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන ස්ථිර සම්බන්ධතාව සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් ප්\u200d අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා, ERD14 දත්ත සෙට් සහ GERDAQ දත්ත ස පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට ස්ථිතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම F1 වල 75', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سادہ اور مفید طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں سوال میں متحد کرنے کے لئے۔ کلی ایڈیون یہ ہے کہ ویکیپیڈیا لکھائیوں کے مطابق ویکیپیڈیا لکھائیوں کے مطابق ویکیپیڈیا لکھائیوں کے مطابق ویکیپیڈیا لکھائیوں کے مطابق فیصلے کے مطابق انسان کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق مطابق اس کے بعد ہم ایک ثروتمند مجموعہ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، جیسے لینک-احتمال، کنٹکس-میٹ، کلمات ابڈینگ، اور ان کی نسبت دار اجتماعات کے درمیان رشتہ داری کرتا ہے، کہ کاندینٹوں کو ایک ریگرس بنیاد فرم کے اندر رشتہ دیں. ہمارے تقرب کا فائدہ دو قسموں میں ہے، جو درجے کی پرداخت اور آخری نقطہ کی تعلق میں اضافہ کرتے ہیں. پہلے، یہ کلمات کے ساتھ کڈینڈیٹ ایٹنیٹیوں کی تعداد بڑی کم کر سکتا ہے، سوال کے کلمات کے ذریعہ بغیر مسئلہ ایٹنیٹیوں کو فیلٹر کرنے کے ذریعہ۔ دوسرا، ہم ویکیپیڈیا کے سارے مقررہ لینک-احتمال کے ساتھ سوال کریں گے کہ اس سے پہلے کیوری سنسیٹی احتمال حاصل کریں۔ ہم دونوں بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کریں گے جو سواریوں کے لئے متصل ہو رہی ہے، یعنی ERD14 ڈیٹ سٹ اور GERDAQ ڈیٹ سٹ. Experimental results show that our method performs state-of-the-art systems and yields 75.0% in F1 on the ERD14 data set and 56.9% on the GERDAQ data set.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett enkelt men effektivt tillvägagångssätt för att länka enheter i frågor. Nyckelidén är att söka meningar som liknar en fråga från Wikipedia-artiklar och direkt använda de mänskliga kommenterade entiteterna i liknande meningar som kandidatentiteter för frågan. Sedan använder vi en rik uppsättning funktioner, såsom länkssannolikhet, kontextmatchning, ordinbäddningar och samband mellan kandidatentiteter samt deras relaterade entiteter, för att ranka kandidaterna under ett regressionsbaserat ramverk. Fördelarna med vårt tillvägagångssätt ligger i två aspekter som bidrar till rankningsprocessen och slutresultatet. För det första kan det kraftigt minska antalet kandidatenheter genom att filtrera bort irrelevanta enheter med orden i frågan. För det andra kan vi få den frågekänsliga tidigare sannolikheten utöver den statiska länkssannolikheten härledd från alla Wikipediaartiklar. Vi utför experiment på två benchmarkdatauppsättningar om entitetslänkning för frågor, nämligen ERD14-datauppsättningen och GERDAQ-datauppsättningen. Experimentella resultat visar att vår metod överträffar toppmoderna system och ger 75,0% F1 på ERD14-datauppsättningen och 56,9% på GERDAQ-datauppsättningen.', 'ta': 'நாம் கேள்விகளில் பொருட்களை இணைக்க ஒரு சுலபமான ஆனாலும் வெளிப்படையான வழியை காண்பிக்கிறோம். விக்கிபிடியா கட்டுரைகளில் இருந்து கேள்வி போன்ற வாக்கியங்களை தேடி மற்றும் தேர்வு செய்ய விசைபிடியா பொருட்களை நேரடியாக பயன்படுத Then, we employ a rich set of features, such as link-probability, context-matching, word embeddings, and relatedness among candidate entities as well as their related entities, to rank the candidates under a regression based framework.  எங்கள் நெருங்குதலின் விருப்பங்கள் இரண்டு பக்கங்களில் உள்ளது, அது ஆரம்ப செயலுக்கு பங்கு செய்யும் மற்றும் இறுதி  முதலில், அது தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்படாத வார்த்தைகளின் வார்த்தைகளைக் கொண்டு முறையாக குறைக்கலாம். இரண்டாவது, நாம் கேள்விகளுக்கு இணைக்கும் பொருளின் இரண்டு பெங்க்மார்க் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம், அதாவது ERD14 தரவுத்தளத பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் என்று காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் முறைமையில் நிலைமையை வெளியிடும் மற்றும் ERD14 தரவுத்தளத்தில் 75. 0% கொடுக்கும் மற்றும் GERDAQ தரவ', 'uz': "Biz savollarni bogʻlash uchun oddiy va effektiv usulni hozir qilamiz. Name Keyin biz oddiy bogʻ'lash, muhimiy qismlari, so'zning qismlari, suhbat qismlari va hozirga bog'liq suhbatlari bilan bog'liq moslamalarini ishlayapmiz, boshqarish asosida boshqa shakllarni boshlash uchun. Ko'rib chiqarish imkoniyatlarimizning foydalanishimiz ikki darajada bo'ladi. Bu chegara jarayonlariga va oxirigi bogʻ'liq natijaga ega bo'ladi. Birinchi marta, bu soʻrovdagi so'zlar bilan notoʻgʻri obʼektlarni filterlash mumkin. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz hamma Wikipedia maqoladan tashqi bogʻ'lamaning static bogʻlamasini qo'shish mumkin. Biz soʻrovlar bilan bogʻlanadigan ikkita benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibini bajaramiz, balki ERD14 maʼlumotlar satri va GERDAQ maʼlumot satri. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, bizning usuli barcha tizimning holatini bajaradi va ERD14 maʼlumotlar sohasida 75.0% va 56.9% GERDAQ maʼlumotlar satrini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để kết nối các thực thể trong các câu hỏi. Chủ đề chính là tìm kiếm câu tương tự với một câu hỏi từ các bài báo Wikipedia và sử dụng trực tiếp các thực thể được ghi chú của con người trong các câu tương tự như các thực thể ứng cử viên cho câu hỏi. Sau đó, chúng tôi sử dụng một loạt các tính năng giàu có, như khả năng kết nối, khớp ngữ cảnh, sự ràng buộc từ, và liên hệ giữa các thực thể ứng cử viên cũng như các thực thể liên quan, để xếp các ứng cử viên dưới một hệ thống phục hồi. Lợi thế của phương pháp của chúng ta nằm trong hai khía cạnh đóng góp cho tiến trình xếp hạng và kết quả kết hợp cuối cùng. Thứ nhất, nó có thể giảm đáng kể số lượng thực thể ứng cử bằng cách lọc ra các thực thể không liên quan với các từ trong câu hỏi. Thứ hai, chúng ta có thể đạt được khả năng trước nhạy cảm của câu hỏi, cùng với khả năng kết nối tĩnh được tạo ra từ mọi tác phẩm Wikipedia. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn về thực thể liên kết các yêu cầu, là bộ dữ liệu ERD14 và bộ dữ liệu Đức. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội hơn hệ thống hiện đại và cung cấp 77.0=. trong F1 trên bộ vi dữ liệu ERD14 và 56.9=. trên tập tin Đức.', 'bg': 'Представяме прост, но ефективен подход за свързване на обекти в запитвания. Ключовата идея е да се търсят изречения, подобни на заявка от статии в Уикипедия и директно да се използват човешки анотирани единици в подобни изречения като кандидати за заявката. След това използваме богат набор от функции, като например вероятност за връзка, съвпадение на контекста, вграждане на думи и свързаност между кандидат-субектите, както и свързаните с тях субекти, за да класираме кандидатите под регресионна рамка. Предимствата на нашия подход се крият в два аспекта, които допринасят за процеса на класиране и крайния резултат на свързването. Първо, тя може значително да намали броя на кандидат-субектите чрез филтриране на неуместни субекти с думите в заявката. Второ, можем да получим чувствителната предварителна вероятност за заявка в допълнение към статичната вероятност за връзка, получена от всички статии в Уикипедия. Провеждаме експерименти върху два сравнителни набора от данни за свързване на обекти за заявки, а именно набора от данни и набора от данни ГЕРДАК. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни превъзхожда най-съвременните системи и дава 75,0% във Формула 1 при набора данни и 56,9% при набора данни ГЕРДАК.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en enkel, men effektiv tilgang til at forbinde enheder i forespørgsler. Nøgleideen er at søge sætninger svarende til en forespørgsel fra Wikipedia artikler og direkte bruge menneskelige-annoterede enheder i de lignende sætninger som kandidatenheder til forespørgslen. Derefter anvender vi et rigt sæt funktioner, såsom link-sandsynlighed, kontekst-matching, ordindlejringer og relaterethed blandt kandidatenheder såvel som deres relaterede enheder, til at rangere kandidaterne under en regressionsbaseret ramme. Fordelene ved vores tilgang ligger i to aspekter, som bidrager til rangeringsprocessen og slutresultatet. For det første kan det i høj grad reducere antallet af kandidatenheder ved at filtrere irrelevante enheder ud med ordene i forespørgslen. For det andet kan vi få den forespørgselsfølsomme forudgående sandsynlighed ud over den statiske link-sandsynlighed afledt af alle Wikipedia artikler. Vi udfører eksperimenter på to benchmark datasæt om entity linking for forespørgsler, nemlig ERD14 datasættet og GERDAQ datasættet. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode overgår state-of-the-art systemer og giver 75,0% i F1 på ERD14 datasættet og 56,9% i GERDAQ datasættet.', 'nl': "We presenteren een eenvoudige maar effectieve aanpak voor het koppelen van entiteiten in query's. Het belangrijkste idee is om zinnen te zoeken die lijken op een query uit Wikipedia-artikelen en direct de door mensen geannoteerde entiteiten in de vergelijkbare zinnen te gebruiken als kandidaat entiteiten voor de query. Vervolgens gebruiken we een rijke reeks functies, zoals link-waarschijnlijkheid, context-matching, woord embeddings en relatedness tussen kandidaat-entiteiten en hun verwante entiteiten, om de kandidaten te rangschikken onder een regressie gebaseerd framework. De voordelen van onze aanpak liggen in twee aspecten, die bijdragen aan het rankingproces en het uiteindelijke linking resultaat. Ten eerste kan het aantal kandidaat-entiteiten aanzienlijk verminderen door irrelevante entiteiten met de woorden in de query uit te filteren. Ten tweede kunnen we de query gevoelige voorafgaande waarschijnlijkheid verkrijgen naast de statische link-waarschijnlijkheid afgeleid van alle Wikipedia artikelen. We voeren experimenten uit op twee benchmark datasets over entiteitskoppeling voor query's, namelijk de ERD14 dataset en de GERDAQ dataset. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode beter presteert dan state-of-the-art systemen en 75,0% levert in F1 op de ERD14 dataset en 56,9% op de GERDAQ dataset.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan, ali efikasan pristup povezivanju entiteta u pitanja. Ključna ideja je pretražiti rečenice slične na pitanje iz članaka Wikipedije i direktno koristiti ljudske ponašane subjekte u sličnim rečenicama kao kandidatne subjekte za zahtjev. Onda upotrebimo bogat skup karakteristika, kao što su povezane vjerojatnosti, kontekstskog odgovaranja, uključenje riječi i povezanost između kandidatskih subjekta i njihovih povezanih subjekta, kako bi se kandidate postavili pod okvirom regresije. Prednosti našeg pristupa nalaze se u dva aspekta, koji doprinose postupku rangiranja i konačnom povezanju rezultata. Prvo, može znatno smanjiti broj kandidatskih subjekta filtriranjem nevažnih subjekta sa riječima u pitanju. Drugo, možemo dobiti osjetljivu pretpostavku prethodne vjerojatnosti osim statične verovatnosti veze iz svih članaka Wikipedije. Provodimo eksperimente na dva standardna seta podataka o entitetu povezanoj za ispitivanje, a to je ERD14 seta podataka i GERDAQ seta podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava i daje 75,0% u F1 na setu podataka ERD14 i 56,9% na setu podataka GERDAQ.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen einfachen, aber effektiven Ansatz zur Verknüpfung von Entitäten in Abfragen. Die Schlüsselidee besteht darin, Sätze ähnlich einer Abfrage aus Wikipedia-Artikeln zu suchen und die vom Menschen annotierten Entitäten in den ähnlichen Sätzen direkt als Kandidatentitäten für die Abfrage zu verwenden. Dann verwenden wir eine Reihe von Funktionen, wie Link-Wahrscheinlichkeit, Kontext-Matching, Worteinbettungen und Verwandtschaft zwischen Kandidaten und ihren verwandten Entitäten, um die Kandidaten unter einem regressionsbasierten Framework zu rangieren. Die Vorteile unseres Ansatzes liegen in zwei Aspekten, die zum Rankingprozess und zum Endergebnis der Verlinkung beitragen. Erstens kann es die Anzahl der Kandidaten-Entitäten erheblich reduzieren, indem irrelevante Entitäten mit den Wörtern in der Abfrage herausgefiltert werden. Zweitens können wir die abfragesensitive Vorwahrwahrscheinlichkeit zusätzlich zur statischen Link-Wahrscheinlichkeit erhalten, die aus allen Wikipedia-Artikeln abgeleitet wird. Wir führen Experimente an zwei Benchmark-Datensätzen zur Entity-Verknüpfung für Abfragen durch, nämlich dem ERD14-Datensatz und dem GERDAQ-Datensatz. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode modernste Systeme übertrifft und 75,0% in F1 auf dem ERD14 Datensatz und 56,9% auf dem GERDAQ Datensatz liefert.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan sederhana namun efektif untuk menghubungkan entitas dalam pertanyaan. Ide kunci adalah mencari kalimat yang mirip dengan pertanyaan dari artikel Wikipedia dan langsung menggunakan entitas yang dicatat oleh manusia dalam kalimat yang mirip dengan entitas kandidat untuk pertanyaan. Then, we employ a rich set of features, such as link-probability, context-matching, word embeddings, and relatedness among candidate entities as well as their related entities, to rank the candidates under a regression based framework.  Keuntungan pendekatan kita terletak dalam dua aspek, yang berkontribusi ke proses peringkat dan hasil koneksi. Pertama, hal ini dapat mengurangi jumlah entitas kandidat dengan mengurangi entitas tidak relevan dengan kata-kata dalam pertanyaan. Kedua, kita dapat mendapatkan kemungkinan sebelumnya sensitif pertanyaan selain kemungkinan-kemungkinan-link statis yang didapati dari semua artikel Wikipedia. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada dua set data benchmark pada entitas yang menghubungkan untuk pertanyaan, yaitu set data ERD14 dan set data GERDAQ. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi sistem terbaik dan menghasilkan 75,0% di F1 pada set data ERD14 dan 56,9% pada set data GERDAQ.', 'sw': 'Tunaweka mbinu rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa kuunganisha vifaa katika maswali. Wazo muhimu ni kutafuta hukumu zinazofanana na maswali yanayofanana na makala za Wikipedia na kutumia moja kwa moja vitu vya kibinadamu vilivyotajwa katika sentensi sawa kama vitu vya wagombea kwa ajili ya swali hilo. Kisha, tunatumia seti zenye utajiri, kama vile uwezekano wa kuunganisha kiungo, mazingira yanayochanganya na maneno, na uhusiano kati ya vitu vya wagombea pamoja na vyombo vyao vinavyohusiana, ili kuweka nafasi ya wagombea chini ya mfumo wa kandamizi. Manufadhi ya mbinu zetu ni katika vipande viwili, ambacho kinachangia mchakato wa rangi na matokeo ya kuunganisha mwisho. Kwanza, inaweza kupunguza idadi kubwa ya vitu vya wagombea kwa kuchuja vifaa vinavyohitajika kwa maneno katika swali hilo. Pili, tunaweza kupata utafiti wa uwezekano wa awali zaidi ya uwezekano wa kiungo cha kinachotokana na makala zote za Wikipedia. We conduct experiments on two benchmark datasets on entity linking for queries, namely the ERD14 dataset and the GERDAQ dataset.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inatoa mifumo ya sanaa na hutoa asilimia 75.0 katika F1 kwenye seti ya data ya ERD14 na asilimia 56.9 kwenye seti ya data ya GERDAQ.', 'ko': '우리는 조회 중의 실체를 연결하는 간단하고 효과적인 방법을 제시했다.그 관건적인 사상은 위키백과 글에서 검색과 유사한 문장을 검색하고 유사한 문장 속의 인류 주석 실체를 검색의 후보 실체로 직접 사용하는 것이다.그 다음에 우리는 링크 확률, 상하문 일치, 단어 삽입, 후보 실체 간의 관련성과 그들의 관련 실체를 이용하여 회귀의 구조를 바탕으로 후보 실체를 정렬한다.우리의 방법의 장점은 두 가지 측면에 있는데 이것은 랭킹 과정과 최종 링크 결과에 도움이 된다.우선, 검색에서 단어와 무관한 실체를 필터하여 후보 실체의 수를 크게 줄일 수 있다.그 다음으로 모든 위키백과 글에서 얻은 정적 링크 확률을 제외하고 우리는 조회에 민감한 선험 확률을 얻을 수 있다.우리는 두 개의 조회 실체 링크의 기준 데이터 집합, 즉 ERD14 데이터 집합과 GERDAQ 데이터 집합을 실험했다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하다. ERD14 데이터 집합에서 F1의 생산률은 75.0%이고 GERDAQ 데이터 집합에서의 생산률은 56.9%이다.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش ساده و هنوز موثر برای ارتباط شرکتها در سوالات را پیشنهاد می کنیم. ایده کلید این است که جمله\u200cهای شبیه به یک سوال از مقاله\u200cهای ویکیپدیا جستجویی کنیم و مستقیماً از عنوان\u200cهای مشخص شده\u200cی انسان در جمله\u200cهای شبیه به عنوان عنوان عنوان کاندیداتی برای سوال استفاده کنیم. سپس، ما مجموعه\u200cای از ویژه\u200cهای ثروتمند را استفاده می\u200cکنیم، مثل احتمال ارتباط، هماهنگ\u200cسازی\u200cهای کنترل، پیوند\u200cسازی\u200cهای کلمه، و ارتباط بین ویژه\u200cهای کاندیده\u200cها و ویژه\u200cهای ارتباط آنها، تا کاندیده\u200cها را تحت یک چهارچوب سودهایی از دسترسی ما در دو قسمت است که به فرایند مرتبط و نتیجه نهایی مرتبط است. اول، می\u200cتواند تعداد عنوان کاندیده\u200cها را با فیلتر کردن عنوان\u200cهای بی\u200cاثر با کلمات در پرسش بسیار کاهش دهد. دوم، ما می\u200cتوانیم احتمال پیشینه\u200cای حساس سوال را در اضافه به احتمال ارتباط و ارتباط استاندیکی از تمام مقاله\u200cهای ویکیپدیا دریافت کنیم. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی در مورد یک واحد متصل برای سوال انجام می\u200cدهیم، یعنی مجموعه داده\u200cهای ERD14 و مجموعه داده\u200cهای GERDAQ. نتایج تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که روش ما سیستم\u200cهای هنری را اجرا می\u200cکند و 75.0% در F1 در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ERD14 و 56.9% در مجموعه داده\u200cهای GERDAQ ارائه می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Biz soraglarda birzatlary baglaşdyrmak üçin basit we täsirli bir nusga görkeýäris. Açyk ideýa Wikipediýadan soragy ýaly sözleri gözlemekdir we soragy üçin adam-tanyş hasaplanýan guramlary bilen edil üýtgeşmeler üçin ullanyň. Soňra, biz baý hatlary ýaly baglaýyş mümkinçiligi, kontekst eşleşenleri, sözleriň guramlaryny we zamanlaşyk guramlaryň arasynda sylaýyşlygyny ulanýarys. Biziň golaýymyzyň ýeterlikleri iki aspektde döredýär, bu iň soňky çykyş procesine kömekleýär. Ilkinji gezek, soragdaky sözler bilen nähili faýllary filtrep bilen kandidatyň sanyny azaltap biler. Ikinjisi, Wikipediýanyň hemme makalaryndan çykan statik baglaýyş-mümkinçiliklerine üýtgedip bileris. Biz soraglar üçin bir birleşme sisteminde iki benchmark veri setinde deneyler çykýarys. Bu da ERD14 veri setinde we GERDAQ veri setinde. Experimental netijelerimiz biziň metodamyzyň sanat sistemalaryndan üstün edýändigini görkezýär we F1'de 75.0% ERD14 veri setinde we GERDAQ veri setinde 56.9% berýändigini görkezýär.", 'af': "Ons stel 'n eenvoudige nog effektief toegang vir verbind van entiteite in vraagte. Die sleutel idee is om sagte soos 'n navraag van Wikipedia-artikels te soek en direk die mens-annotateerde entiteite in die gelyke setinge as kandidate entiteite vir die navraag te gebruik. Dan gebruik ons 'n ryk stel van funksies, soos skakel-waarskynlik, konteks-ooreenstemming, woord inbêding, en verwantigheid onder kandidate-entiteite en hulle verwante entiteite, om die kandidate onder 'n regresie gebaseerde raamwerk te rankeer. Die voordeel van ons toegang lê in twee aspekte wat bydra tot die ranking proses en die eindelike verbinding resultaat. Eerste, dit kan groot die nommer van kandidate entiteite verminder deur onbelangrik entiteite uit te filtreer met die woorde in die navraag. Tweede, ons kan die navraag sensitief voorheen waarskynlik kry by die statiese skakel-waarskynlik wat van alle Wikipedia-artikels afgelei het. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op twee benchmark datastel op entiteit wat koppel vir navraage, naamlik die ERD14 datastel en die GERDAQ datastel. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat ons metode uitvoer staat-van-kunstenstelsels en gee 75.0% in F1 op die ERD14 datastel en 56.9% op die GERDAQ datastel.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje të thjeshtë por efektive për lidhjen e njësive në pyetje. Ideja kyçe është të kërkosh fjalë të ngjashme me një pyetje nga artikujt e Wikipedias dhe të përdorësh drejtpërdrejt njësitë e anotuara nga njerëzit në fjalë të ngjashme me njësitë kandidate për pyetjen. Pastaj, ne përdorim një grup të pasur karakteristike, të tilla si lidhje-probabiliteti, përputhje-konteksti, përfshirje fjalësh dhe lidhje midis njësive kandidate si dhe njësive të tyre të lidhura, për të renditur kandidatët nën një kuadër bazuar në regresion. The advantages of our approach lie in two aspects, which contribute to the ranking process and final linking result.  Së pari, ajo mund të reduktojë në mënyrë të madhe numrin e njësive kandidate duke filtruar njësitë e pavarura me fjalët në pyetje. Së dyti, mund të marrim probabilitetin e parë të ndjeshëm të pyetjes, përveç probabilitetit të lidhjes statike të nxjerrë nga të gjitha artikujt e Wikipedias. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në dy baza të dhënash mbi njësinë që lidh për pyetje, veçanërisht grupin e të dhënave ERD14 dhe grupin e të dhënave GERDAQ. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë mbizotëron sistemet më të larta dhe jep 75.0% në F1 në bazën e të dhënave ERD14 dhe 56.9% në bazën e të dhënave GERDAQ.', 'am': 'አካባቢዎችን በመጠያቂያ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የኩነቱ አሳብ ከWikipedia ጽሑፎች ጋር የሚመስለውን ቃል ለመፈለግ ነው እናም የሰው-አካባቢ አካላትን በመስጠት እንደምትጠያየቁ አካላት አቅራቢያ ነው፡፡ በኋላም፣ ምናልባዊ ግንኙነት፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት፣ ቃላት ግንኙነት እና በአካባቢዎቹ አካባቢዎች መካከል ግንኙነት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የልግስናችን ጥቅማችን በሁለት ጉዳይ ላይ ነው፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ የፓርቲው ቃላት በሚያሳየው አካላትን በመጠቀም የሚችሉትን የአካባቢዎችን ቁጥር ያጎድልበታል፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ ጠይቃውን አስቀድመን የስህተት ግንኙነት ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ We conduct experiments on two benchmark datasets on entity linking for queries, namely the ERD14 dataset and the GERDAQ dataset.  ፈተና ውጤቶች የሥርዓታችንን የዐርድ ሥርዓት ግንኙነት እንዲያሳየው እና የERD14 ዳታተር ማዕከል 75.0 በመቶ F1 እና 56.9 በመቶ GERDAQ ዳታ ማዕከል እንዲያወጣ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք պարզ, սակայն արդյունավետ մոտեցում հարցերում կապելու համար: Հիմնական գաղափարն այն է, որ փնտրենք նախադասություններ, որոնք նման են Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածների հարցում և անմիջապես օգտագործենք մարդկային նկարագրված կազմակերպությունները նույն նախադասություններում, ինչպիսիք են հարցում պայքարի կազմակերպություններ Հետո մենք օգտագործում ենք հարուստ հատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են կապերի հավանականությունը, կոնտեքստի համապատասխանությունը, բառերի ներդրումը և կապը թեկնածու կազմակերպությունների, ինչպես նաև նրանց կապված կազմակերպությունների միջև, թեկնածուներին դասավորելու համար ռեգրեսիայի հիմնված շ The advantages of our approach lie in two aspects, which contribute to the ranking process and final linking result.  Նախ և առաջ, այն կարող է մեծապես նվազեցնել թեկնածու կազմակերպությունների թիվը ֆիլտրելով անկարևոր կազմակերպությունները հարցում բառերով: Երկրորդ, մենք կարող ենք ստանալ հարցը զգայուն նախկին հավանականությունը, ավելացնելով Վիքիփեդիայի բոլոր հոդվածներից ստատիկ կապերի հավանականությունը: Մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում հարցերի համար կապված երկու համեմատային տվյալների համակարգի վրա, հատկապես ERD14 տվյալների համակարգի և Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր համակարգերը և F1-ում 75.0 տոկոսը ստանում է ERD14 տվյալների համակարգի և 56.9 տոկոսը գերազանցում:', 'bn': 'আমরা অনুসন্ধানে বস্তুগুলোকে যুক্ত করার জন্য একটি সহজ কার্যকর উপায় উপস্থাপন করি। এই প্রধান ধারণা হচ্ছে উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধের মতো অনুসন্ধানের বাক্য অনুসন্ধান এবং অনুসন্ধানের প্রার্থী বিষয়বস্তু হিসেবে সরাসরি ব্যবহার করা ম তারপর আমরা একটি সমৃদ্ধ বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য চাকুরি করি, যেমন লিঙ্ক-সম্ভাব্য, কন্টেক্সটেক্সট মিল, শব্দ প্রার্থীদের সাথে এবং তাদের সংশ্লিষ্ট বস্তুর মধ্যে সম্পর্ক,  আমাদের পদক্ষেপের সুবিধা দুই প্রান্তের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যা র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং প্রক্রিয়া এবং শেষ সংযোগের ফলে কাজ করে। প্রথমত, এটি অনুসন্ধানের শব্দের মাধ্যমে প্রার্থীর সংখ্যা কমিয়ে দিতে পারে। দ্বিতীয়, আমরা পূর্বেই অনুসন্ধানের সংবেদনশীল সম্ভাবনা পেতে পারি সকল উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধ থেকে স্ট্যাটিক লিঙ্ক-সম্ভাবনা ছ আমরা প্রশ্নের জন্য যুক্ত বস্তু সম্পর্কে দুটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা করি, যেমন ERD14 ডাটাসেট এবং GERDAQ ডাটাসেট। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রতিষ্ঠানের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প সিস্টেম বের করে এবং এরডি১৪ ডাটাসেটে ৭৫.', 'az': "Biz hər şeyi soruşmaqla bağlamaq üçün asanlıq, hətta etkili bir yol göstəririk. Anahtar fikri Wikipedia maddələrindən bənzər cümlələri araşdırmaq və insanların məlumatlarını məlumatların kimi cümlələrdə istifadə etməkdir. Sonra, biz mümkün olduğu kimi, bağlantı olaraq, kontekst eşitməsi, sözlərin istifadə edilməsi və həmçinin əlaqələri ilə birlikdə olan məxluqatın arasındakı bağlılığı ilə istifadə edirik. Yaxınlıqlarımızın mənfəətləri iki tərəfdə idi ki, bu səviyyə prosesi və sonuncu bağlama sonuğuna kömək edir. İlk dəfə, bu sözlərin sözləri ilə münasibətsiz məxluqatı filtrləyib, kandidəyə məxluqatının sayını çox azaltır. İkincisi, bütün Wikipedia maddələrindən gələn statik bağlantı-mümkün olaraq əvvəlki mümkün olaraq soruşma hissəsini alabilirik. Biz iki benchmark verilən qurğular barəsində soruşmaq üçün bağlanan bir entitə təşviyyələrində, bu da ERD14 verilən qurğuları və GERDAQ verilən qurğuları təşviyyələr edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçlarımız metodumuzun, sanat sistemlərinin vəziyyətində 75.0% F1'də ERD14 verilən qutusunda və GERDAQ verilən qutusunda 56.9%.", 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament senzill però efectiu per vincular entitats en preguntes. La idea clau és buscar frases similars a una pregunta d'articles de Wikipedia i utilitzar directament les entitats anotates per humans en frases similars a entitats candidates per la pregunta. Després, utilitzem un conjunt ric de característiques, com la probabilitat d'enllaç, l'ajustament del context, l'incorporació de paraules i la relació entre les entitats candidates i les seves entitats relacionades, per classificar els candidats sota un marc basat en la regressió. Les avantatges del nostre enfocament es troben en dos aspectes, que contribueixen al procés de classificació i el resultat final del vincle. Primer, pot reduir molt el nombre d'entitats candidates filtrant entitats irrelevants amb les paraules de la consulta. Segon, podem obtenir la probabilitat anterior sensible a la consulta a més de la probabilitat estatica d'enllaç derivada de tots els articles de Wikipedia. Fem experiments en dos conjunts de dades de referència sobre les entitats que enllacen les preguntes, a saber, el conjunt de dades ERD14 i el conjunt de dades GERDAQ. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode supera els sistemes més avançats i produeix un 75,0% en F1 en el conjunt de dades ERD14 i un 56,9% en el conjunt de dades GERDAQ.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan, ali efikasan pristup povezivanju entiteta u pitanja. Ključna ideja je pretražiti rečenice slične na pitanje iz članaka Wikipedije i direktno upotrijebiti ljudske notirane entitate u sličnim rečenicama kao kandidatne entitate za pitanje. Onda zapošljavamo bogat set karakteristika, kao što su povezane verovatnoće, kontekstovno odgovaranje, uključenje riječi i povezanost između kandidatskih subjekta i njihovih povezanih subjekta, kako bi postavili kandidate pod okvirom regresije. Prednosti našeg pristupa nalaze se u dva aspekta, koji doprinose postupku rangiranja i konačnom rezultatu povezanja. Prvo, to značajno može smanjiti broj kandidatskih entitata filtriranjem nevažnih entitata sa riječima u pitanju. Drugo, možemo dobiti osjetljivu pretpostavku prethodne vjerojatnosti osim statične verovatnosti veze iz svih članaka Wikipedije. Provodimo eksperimente na dva standardna seta podataka o entitetu povezanoj za ispitivanje, a to je ERD14 seta podataka i GERDAQ seta podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava i daje 75,0% u F1 na setu podataka ERD14 i 56,9% na setu podataka GERDAQ.', 'cs': 'Představujeme jednoduchý, ale efektivní přístup pro propojení entit v dotazech. Klíčovou myšlenkou je vyhledávat věty podobné dotazu z článků Wikipedie a přímo používat lidské anotované entity v podobných větách jako kandidáty pro dotaz. Dále používáme bohatou sadu funkcí, jako je pravděpodobnost odkazu, porovnávání kontextu, vložení slov a souvislost mezi kandidátskými entitami a jejich příbuznými entitami, k zařazení kandidátů v rámci regresního rámce. Výhody našeho přístupu spočívají ve dvou aspektech, které přispívají k procesu hodnocení a konečnému výsledku linkování. Za prvé, může výrazně snížit počet kandidátských entit filtrováním irelevantních entit se slovy v dotazu. Za druhé, můžeme získat dotazovou citlivou předchozí pravděpodobnost kromě statické pravděpodobnosti odkazu odvozené ze všech článků Wikipedie. Provádíme experimenty na dvou referenčních datových sadách pro propojení entit pro dotazy, a to na datové sadě ERD14 a datové sadě GERDAQ. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda překonává nejmodernější systémy a přináší 75,0% v F1 na datové sadě ERD14 a 56,9% v datové sadě GERDAQ.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme yksinkertaisen mutta tehokkaan lähestymistavan entiteettien linkittämiseen kyselyissä. Keskeisenä ajatuksena on etsiä Wikipedian artikkeleista kyselyn kaltaisia lauseita ja käyttää suoraan ihmisillä merkittyjä entiteettejä vastaavissa lauseissa kyselyn ehdokasentiteetteinä. Tämän jälkeen käytämme runsaasti ominaisuuksia, kuten linkkien todennäköisyys, kontekstin täsmäytys, sanaupotukset ja yhteys ehdokasyhteisöjen ja niihin liittyvien entiteettien välillä, asettaaksemme ehdokkaat regressiopohjaiseen viitekehykseen. Lähestymistapamme etuna on kaksi näkökohtaa, jotka vaikuttavat sijoitusprosessiin ja lopulliseen linkitystulokseen. Ensinnäkin se voi merkittävästi vähentää ehdokasyhteisöjen määrää suodattamalla pois merkityksettömät entiteetit kyselyn sanoilla. Toiseksi voimme saada kyselyn herkkän ennakkotodennäköisyyden kaikkien Wikipedian artikkeleiden staattisen linkin todennäköisyyden lisäksi. Teemme kokeiluja kahdella kyselyjen entiteettilinkityksen vertailuaineistolla, ERD14-aineistolla ja GERDAQ-aineistolla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme tuottaa ERD14-aineistossa 75,0% F1:ssä ja GERDAQ-aineistossa 56,9%.', 'et': 'Esitame lihtsa, kuid tõhusa lähenemisviisi üksuste sidumiseks päringutes. Põhieesmärk on otsida päringuga sarnaseid lauseid Vikipeedia artiklitest ja kasutada otse inimmärkidega olemeid sarnastes lausetes nagu päringu kandidaatriigid. Seejärel kasutame rikkalikke funktsioone, nagu lingi tõenäosus, konteksti sobitamine, sõnade manustamine ja seotus kandidaadiüksuste ja nendega seotud üksuste vahel, et kandidaate järjestada regressioonipõhise raamistiku alusel. Meie lähenemisviisi eelised seisnevad kahes aspektis, mis aitavad kaasa järjestamisele ja lõplikule sidumisele. Esiteks võib see oluliselt vähendada kandidaadiüksuste arvu, filtreerides päringu sõnadega ebaolulised üksused. Teiseks saame päringu tundliku eelneva tõenäosuse lisaks staatilisele lingi tõenäosusele, mis tuleneb kõigist Wikipedia artiklitest. Teostame katseid kahe päringute üksuste linkimise võrdlusandmekogumiga, nimelt ERD14 andmekogumiga ja GERDAQ andmekogumiga. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod ületab tipptasemel süsteeme ja annab 75,0% F1 andmekogumis ERD14 ja 56,9% GERDAQ andmekogumis.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wata matsayi mai sauƙi kuma da mai amfani ga haɗi masu abubuwa a cikin tambayar. Madaidaita maɓalli shine ya nẽmi tsari kamar wata tambaya daga makala na Wikimedia kuma ya yi amfani da abun da aka sanar da mutum a cikin salon da ke daidaita kamar masu kandida wa tambayar. Sa'an nan kuma, za mu aiki wasu masu yawa kamar misãlan linki, da mazauni mai daidaita, da masu hushi a cikin masu kandida da masu danganta, da kuma masu danganta da masu danganta, dõmin su tsare kandida a ƙarƙashin kashi. The advantages of our approach lie in two aspects, which contribute to the ranking process and final linking result.  Kayyan da, yana iya ƙaranci ƙidãyar abun kandidauta da kuma yana fizge abun da maganar cikin tambayar. Dukkan, za mu iya iya samun tambayi fara mai sauri na zaman mai amfani da tsakanin link-static wanda aka samu daga duk makala na Wikimedia. Kana tafiyar jarrabo a kan data masu biyu na bankima kan abubuwa wanda ke haɗa wa tambayar, kamar tsarin ERD14 da tsarin data na GERDAQ. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa metodenmu yana samar da halin-na-sanar kuma yana bãyar da asilimi 70.0 cikin F1 kan dataset na ERD14 da asilimi 64.9 kan danne na GERDAQ.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh sistem sing wis ana luwih apik kanggo nggawe Entèji kanggo ngilangno sistêm. buddy Unya, kita nambah sistem barêng-barêng sing perusahaan, lagi "link-likely", context-match, word embedding, and Relacement" jeneng kabèh sing nganggep sistem kandidêt lan tambah saiki beraksi sing beraksi tambah, iso dianggawe kandidêt liyane wis nguasai perusahaan winih. Awakdhéwé éntuk karo hal-hal iki dadi iki, dadi sak bantuan ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang sampek. Digawe Digawe, kita iso ngeweke nggawe mulasakno sing susahe perusahaan nang sampeyan Strikethrong-sanal sing dumadhi suku saben nggambar Uripedya. section Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה פשוטה אך יעילה לקשר יחידות בשאלות. הרעיון המפתח הוא לחפש משפטים דומים לשאלה ממאמרים של ויקיפדיה ולהשתמש ישירות באנשים שמשמעו על עצמם במשפטים דומים כאנשים מועמדים לשאלה. ואז, אנו משתמשים בסט עשיר של תכונות, כמו סיכוי הקשר, התאמת הקשר, קישור מילים, וקשר בין יחידות מועמדות כמו גם יחידות הקשורות שלהם, כדי לדרג את המועמדים תחת מסגרת מבוססת regression. היתרונות של הגישה שלנו נמצאות בשני היבטים, אשר תורמים לתהליך הדרגה ותוצאה הקשר הסופית. ראשית, הוא יכול להפחית באופן גדול את מספר היחידות המועמדות על ידי להסיר את היחידות לא רלוונטיות עם המילים שבשאלה. שנית, אנחנו יכולים להשיג את הסבירות הקודמת הרגישה לשאול בנוסף לסבירות הקשר הסטטית שנוצאה מכל המאמרים של ויקיפדיה. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים על יחידות שקשורות לשאלות, כלומר קבוצת נתונים ERD14 והקבוצת נתונים GERDAQ. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהשיטה שלנו עולה מערכות חדשות ומביאה 75.0% ב-F1 על קבוצת נתונים ERD14 ו-56.9% על קבוצת נתונים GERDAQ.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo preprost, a učinkovit pristop za povezovanje subjektov v poizvedbah. Ključna ideja je iskanje stavkov, podobnih poizvedbi, iz Wikipedijskih člankov in neposredno uporabljanje entitet s človeškimi oznakami v podobnih stavkih kot entitete kandidatke za poizvedbo. Nato uporabljamo bogat nabor funkcij, kot so verjetnost povezav, ujemanje kontekstov, vključevanje besed in povezanost med subjekti kandidatov in njihovimi sorodnimi subjekti, da bi kandidate razvrstili v okvir, ki temelji na regresiji. Prednosti našega pristopa sta v dveh vidikih, ki prispevata k razvrščanju in končnemu rezultatu povezovanja. Prvič, lahko znatno zmanjša število subjektov kandidatov s filtriranjem nepomembnih subjektov z besedami v poizvedbi. Drugič, lahko dobimo tudi predhodno verjetnost, občutljivo poizvedbo, poleg statične verjetnosti povezave, ki izhaja iz vseh Wikipedijskih člankov. Izvajamo eksperimente na dveh referenčnih naborih podatkov o povezovanju entitet za poizvedbe, in sicer na naboru podatkov ERD14 in naboru podatkov GERDAQ. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda presega najsodobnejše sisteme in daje 75,0% v F1 na ERD14 podatkovni niz in 56,9% na GERDAQ podatkovni niz.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་དབུལ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་སླ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འཆར་ཡོད། གཙོ་ཆོག་འདི་ནི་ Wikipedia་ཡི་གེབ་བཟུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་ལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཡིག དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཆ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The advantages of our approach lie in two aspects, which contribute to the ranking process and final linking result. དང་པོ་དེ། འདིས་ཞུགས་པ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་དབུལ་ཆ་ཡི་གེ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཆོག གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་Wikipedia་ཡི་སྒྲུང་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་གནས་ཀྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ཁག་གི་ཆོས་ལེན་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ཆོ We conduct experiments on two benchmark datasets on entity linking for queries, namely the ERD14 dataset and the GERDAQ dataset. Experimental Results show that our method outperforms state-of-the-art systems and yields 75.0% in F1 on the ERD14 data set and 56.9% in the GERDAQ data set.'}
{'en': 'Train-O-Matic : Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data', 'ar': 'Train-O-Matic: توضيح لحس الكلمات تحت الإشراف على نطاق واسع بلغات متعددة بدون بيانات تدريب يدوية', 'es': 'Train-O-Matic: desambiguación supervisada a gran escala del sentido de las palabras en varios idiomas sin datos de entrenamiento manual', 'fr': 'Train-O-Matic\xa0: désambiguïsation supervisée à grande échelle dans plusieurs langues sans données de formation manuelle', 'pt': 'Train-O-Matic: Desambiguação de Sentido de Palavras Supervisionado em Grande Escala em Vários Idiomas sem Dados de Treinamento Manual', 'ja': 'Train - O - Matic ：手動トレーニングデータなしの複数の言語での大規模な監視下のワードセンスの曖昧さ解消', 'hi': 'ट्रेन-ओ-मैटिक: मैनुअल प्रशिक्षण डेटा के बिना कई भाषाओं में बड़े पैमाने पर पर्यवेक्षित वर्ड सेंस बहुविकल्पी', 'zh': 'Train-O-Matic:无手动多种语言大监督式词感消歧', 'ru': 'Train-O-Matic: Крупномасштабное контролируемое рассогласование смысла слов на нескольких языках без данных ручного обучения', 'ga': 'Train-O-Matic: Dí-athbhrí Mothúchán Focal faoi Mhaoirseacht ar Mhórscála in Ilteangacha gan Sonraí Oiliúna Láimhe', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Τρένο-Ο-Μάτικ: Μεγάλη κλίμακα εποπτευόμενη διαίρεση της αίσθησης λέξεων σε πολλαπλές γλώσσες χωρίς χειρωνακτικά δεδομένα κατάρτισης', 'hu': 'Train-O-Matic: nagyméretű, felügyelt szóérzékek szétbontása több nyelven manuális oktatási adatok nélkül', 'it': 'Train-O-Matic: Disambiguazione del senso della parola supervisionata su larga scala in più lingue senza dati di formazione manuale', 'lt': 'Traukinys-O-Matika: didelio masto, prižiūrimas žodžių jutimo skirtumas keliomis kalbomis be rankinio mokymo duomenų', 'mk': 'Train-O-Matic: Голем степен надгледувано раздвоумување на чувството на зборови во повеќе јазици без рачни податоци за обука', 'kk': 'Трен- O- Матик: Қолмен оқыту деректері жоқ бірнеше тілдерде үлкен- масштабтау үлкен мәтін сезімін бұғаттау', 'ms': 'Train-O-Matic: Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data', 'ml': 'ട്രെയിന്\u200d- O- മാറ്റിക്: കൈമാനുള്ള പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്ത പല ഭാഷകളില്\u200d വലിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൂപ്പര്\u200dശിക്കപ്പെട്ടു', 'mt': 'Train-O-Matic: Disambiguation of Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Sense in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data', 'mn': 'Төвлөгөө-O-Матик: Холбоо суралцах өгөгдлийн байхгүй олон хэл дээр том-хэмжээний ажиллагдсан үг мэдрэмжүүдийн хувьсгал', 'no': 'Tren-O-Matisk: Stor skala oversikt av ordførselsen i fleire språk utan manuelt øvingsdata', 'pl': 'Train-O-Matic: duża skala nadzorowana rozjasnienie zmysłu słowa w wielu językach bez ręcznych danych szkoleniowych', 'ro': 'Train-O-Matic: dezambiguizarea la scară largă a simțului cuvântului supravegheat în mai multe limbi fără date manuale de instruire', 'sr': 'Vlak-O-Matić: Velika skala nadzirana disambiguacija osjeæaja reèi na višestrukim jezicima bez podataka ruènog obuke', 'si': 'Train-O-Matic: ලොකු ස්කේල් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු වචන සම්බන්ධයක් වැඩි භාෂාවල් වලින් වැඩි භාෂාවල් වලින් ප්\u200dරධා', 'so': 'Train-O-Matic: Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Disambition in multiple luqadood without Manual Training Data', 'sv': 'Train-O-Matic: Disambiguation av ordsinne i stor skala på flera språk utan manuell utbildningsdata', 'ur': 'ٹرین-ا-ماٹیکس: مہنیل ترینینگ ڈاٹ کے بغیر بہت بڑی-اسکیل سوپرویز ہوئی کلمات سنس نامبیواٹ', 'ta': 'பயிற்சி- O- பொருத்தம்:', 'uz': 'QFontDatabase', 'vi': 'Huấn luyện Y-O-Matic: phát triển khôn lường, phát minh từ ngữ có biến đổi bằng nhiều ngôn ngữ mà không có thông tin đào tạo tay.', 'bg': 'Обучение-О-Матик: мащабно контролирано дисамбигиране на чувството на думи на няколко езика без ръчни данни за обучение', 'hr': 'Vlak-O-Matić: Disambiguacija nadgledanih riječi u višestrukim jezicima bez podataka o ručnom obuku', 'nl': 'Train-O-Matic: grootschalige supervised Word Sense Disambiguation in meerdere talen zonder handmatige trainingsgegevens', 'da': 'Train-O-Matic: Disambiguation af overvåget ordsans i stor skala på flere sprog uden manuelle træningsdata', 'fa': 'Train-O-Matic: انحراف حس کلمات بزرگ در زبانهای متعدد بدون داده های آموزش دستی', 'de': 'Train-O-Matic: Große überwachte Wortsinn-Disambiguation in mehreren Sprachen ohne manuelle Trainingsdaten', 'id': 'Train-O-Matic: Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data', 'ko': 'Train-O-Matic: 수동 트레이닝 데이터 없이 다양한 언어에서 대규모로 감독되는 단어의 의미 변조', 'sw': 'Matukio ya mafunzo: Kiwango kikubwa kinaonyesha Ukosefu wa Sensi katika lugha nyingi bila mafunzo ya Manual', 'tr': 'Tren-O-Matik', 'af': 'Oefen- O- Matic: Groot- Skaal Ondersoektog Woord Sense Ondersoektog in Veelvuldige Taal sonder Hand Oefening Data', 'sq': 'Train-O-Matic: Disambiguation in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data', 'am': 'Train-O-Matic: Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data', 'az': 'Tren-O-Matik: ∆Źlav…ô √Ėyr…ôdilmiŇü Kelimi ∆Źlav…ô Dill…ôrind…ô ∆Źlav…ô √Ėyr…ôdilm…ô Veril…ôri', 'bn': 'ট্রেন- ও-মাতিক: হাতিল প্রশিক্ষণ ছাড়া বিশাল পরিমাপ সাপার্ভিস শব্দের অনেক ভাষায় অন্তর্ভুক্ত শব্দ', 'hy': 'Օ-Մատիկ. մեծ մասշտաբով վերահսկված բառերի զգացմունքների բացահայտությունը բազմալեզուներում առանց ձեռավարման տվյալների', 'cs': 'Train-O-Matic: Rozsáhlé kontrolované rozjasnění smyslu slov v několika jazycích bez manuálních tréninkových dat', 'ca': "Train-O-Matic: Desambiguació de sentit de paraules supervisada a gran escala en moltes llengües sense dades manuals d'entrenament", 'et': 'Train-O-Matic: laiaulatuslik juhitav sõnatunnistuse disambigeerimine mitmes keeles ilma käsitsi koolitusandmeteta', 'bs': 'Vlak-O-Matić: Disambiguacija nadzornih riječi u višestrukim jezicima bez podataka ručnog obuke', 'fi': 'Train-O-Matic: Laajamittainen valvottu sanaaistin hajonta useilla kielillä ilman manuaalisia harjoitustietoja', 'jv': 'Actual', 'sk': 'Train-O-Matic: Razjasnitev obsežnega nadzorovanega zaznavanja besed v več jezikih brez ročnih podatkov o usposabljanju', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'רכבת-או-מטיקה: ניתוח תחושת מילים במערכת גדולה ללא נתוני אימון ידני', 'bo': 'Train-O-Matic: Large-Scale Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation in Multiple Languages without Manual Training Data'}
{'en': 'Annotating large numbers of sentences with senses is the heaviest requirement of current Word Sense Disambiguation. We present Train-O-Matic, a language-independent method for generating millions of sense-annotated training instances for virtually all meanings of words in a language’s vocabulary. The approach is fully automatic : no human intervention is required and the only type of human knowledge used is a WordNet-like resource. Train-O-Matic achieves consistently state-of-the-art performance across gold standard datasets and languages, while at the same time removing the burden of manual annotation. All the training data is available for research purposes at.http://trainomatic.org. ', 'ar': 'يعد وضع تعليقات توضيحية على عدد كبير من الجمل باستخدام الحواس من أصعب متطلبات توضيح معنى الكلمة الحالي. نقدم Train-O-Matic ، وهي طريقة مستقلة عن اللغة لتوليد الملايين من حالات التدريب المشروحة بالمعنى تقريبًا لجميع معاني الكلمات في مفردات اللغة. النهج آلي بالكامل: لا يتطلب أي تدخل بشري والنوع الوحيد من المعرفة البشرية المستخدمة هو مورد يشبه WordNet. يحقق Train-O-Matic باستمرار أداءً متطورًا عبر مجموعات البيانات واللغات القياسية الذهبية ، بينما يزيل في نفس الوقت عبء التعليقات التوضيحية اليدوية. جميع بيانات التدريب متاحة لأغراض البحث في <http://trainomatic.org>.', 'es': 'Anotar un gran número de oraciones con sentidos es el requisito más importante de la actual Desambiguación del Sentido de las Palabras. Presentamos Train-O-Matic, un método independiente del idioma para generar millones de instancias de entrenamiento con anotaciones sensoriales para prácticamente todos los significados de las palabras en el vocabulario de un idioma. El enfoque es totalmente automático: no se requiere intervención humana y el único tipo de conocimiento humano que se utiliza es un recurso similar a WordNet. Train-O-Matic logra un rendimiento de vanguardia constante en todos los lenguajes y conjuntos de datos de referencia y, al mismo tiempo, elimina la carga de la anotación manual. Todos los datos de entrenamiento están disponibles para fines de investigación en < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'pt': 'Anotar um grande número de frases com sentidos é o requisito mais pesado da atual Desambiguação do Sentido da Palavra. Apresentamos o Train-O-Matic, um método independente de linguagem para gerar milhões de instâncias de treinamento anotadas pelos sentidos para praticamente todos os significados das palavras no vocabulário de uma linguagem. A abordagem é totalmente automática: nenhuma intervenção humana é necessária e o único tipo de conhecimento humano utilizado é um recurso semelhante ao WordNet. O Train-O-Matic alcança desempenho consistentemente de última geração em conjuntos de dados e idiomas padrão ouro, ao mesmo tempo em que elimina o fardo da anotação manual. Todos os dados de treinamento estão disponíveis para fins de pesquisa em <http://trainomatic.org>.', 'fr': "Annoter un grand nombre de phrases avec des sens est l'exigence la plus lourde de la désambiguïsation des sens des mots actuelle. Nous présentons Train-O-Matic, une méthode indépendante de la langue permettant de générer des millions d'instances de formation annotées par sens pour pratiquement toutes les significations des mots dans le vocabulaire d'une langue. L'approche est entièrement automatique\xa0: aucune intervention humaine n'est requise et le seul type de connaissance humaine utilisé est une ressource de type WordNet. Train-O-Matic atteint constamment des performances de pointe pour les ensembles de données et les langues de référence, tout en supprimant le fardeau des annotations manuelles. Toutes les données de formation sont disponibles à des fins de recherche sur < http://trainomatic.org >.", 'ja': '多数の文章に感覚で注釈を付けることは、現在のワードセンスの曖昧さ解消の最も重い要件です。私たちは、言語に依存しない方法であるTrain - O - Maticを提示します。これは、言語のボキャブラリー内の単語のほぼすべての意味のために、何百万ものセンス注釈付きトレーニングインスタンスを生成するための方法です。アプローチは完全に自動化されています。人間の介入は必要なく、使用される人間の知識のタイプはWordNetのようなリソースのみです。Train - O - Maticは、ゴールドスタンダードのデータセットと言語全体で一貫して最先端のパフォーマンスを達成すると同時に、手動によるアノテーションの負担を軽減します。すべてのトレーニングデータは、研究目的で入手可能です<http://trainomatic.org>。', 'zh': '以感官注大句为当时词义消歧最重。 臣等建Train-O-Matic,此无关言语之法,用于语言词汇表中单词几成数百万带感官注例。 其法全自动:不须人为,用人知类,类WordNet之资也。 Train-O-Matic 于黄金格数集言语终始如一,兼消手动注之累。 凡训练数据,皆可施于<http://trainomatic.org>。', 'hi': 'इंद्रियों के साथ बड़ी संख्या में वाक्यों को एनोटेट करना वर्तमान वर्ड सेंस डिसविम्बिगेशन की सबसे भारी आवश्यकता है। हम ट्रेन-ओ-मैटिक प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो भाषा की शब्दावली में शब्दों के लगभग सभी अर्थों के लिए लाखों अर्थों के लिए अर्थ-एनोटेटेड प्रशिक्षण उदाहरणों को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक भाषा-स्वतंत्र विधि है। दृष्टिकोण पूरी तरह से स्वचालित है: कोई मानव हस्तक्षेप की आवश्यकता नहीं है और उपयोग किए जाने वाले मानव ज्ञान का एकमात्र प्रकार वर्डनेट जैसा संसाधन है। ट्रेन-ओ-मैटिक सोने के मानक डेटासेट और भाषाओं में लगातार अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जबकि एक ही समय में मैनुअल एनोटेशन के बोझ को हटा देता है। सभी प्रशिक्षण डेटा <http://trainomatic.org> पर अनुसंधान उद्देश्यों के लिए उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Аннотирование большого количества предложений с чувствами - это самое тяжелое требование современной Словосознательной Разъясненности. Мы представляем Train-O-Matic, метод, не зависящий от языка, для генерации миллионов аннотированных по смыслу обучающих экземпляров практически для всех значений слов в лексиконе языка. Подход полностью автоматический: вмешательство человека не требуется, и единственным используемым типом человеческих знаний является ресурс, подобный WordNet. Train-O-Matic последовательно достигает самых современных показателей в наборах данных и языках золотого стандарта, в то же время снимая бремя ручной аннотации. Все учебные данные доступны для исследовательских целей по адресу<http://trainomatic.org>.', 'ga': 'Is é an riachtanas is troime a bhaineann le Dí-athbhrí ar Bhriathra Focal reatha ná líon mór abairtí le céadfaí a chur in iúl. Cuirimid i láthair Train-O-Matic, modh teanga-neamhspleách chun na milliúin de chásanna oiliúna anótáilte chiall a ghiniúint do bheagnach gach brí focal i stór focal teanga. Tá an cur chuige iomlán uathoibríoch: níl aon idirghabháil dhaonna ag teastáil agus is é an t-aon chineál eolais daonna a úsáidtear ná acmhainn WordNet. Baineann Train-O-Matic feidhmíocht den scoth amach go seasta ar fud thacair shonraí agus theangacha caighdeánacha óir, agus ag an am céanna baintear ualach na nótaí láimhe. Tá na sonraí oiliúna ar fad ar fáil chun críocha taighde ag <http://trainomatic.org>.', 'el': 'Η σχολιασμός μεγάλου αριθμού προτάσεων με αισθήσεις είναι η βαρύτερη απαίτηση της τρέχουσας Αποκατάστασης της Λογικής. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο ανεξάρτητης από τη γλώσσα για την παραγωγή εκατομμυρίων περιπτώσεων εκπαίδευσης με σημειώσεις αισθήσεων για σχεδόν όλες τις έννοιες λέξεων στο λεξιλόγιο μιας γλώσσας. Η προσέγγιση είναι πλήρως αυτόματη: δεν απαιτείται ανθρώπινη παρέμβαση και ο μόνος τύπος ανθρώπινης γνώσης που χρησιμοποιείται είναι ένας πόρος που μοιάζει με το WordNet. Η Τρέιν-Ο-Μάτιτς επιτυγχάνει σταθερά υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις σε όλα τα χρυσά τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων και γλώσσες, ενώ ταυτόχρονα αφαιρεί το βάρος της χειροκίνητης σχολιασμού. Όλα τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης είναι διαθέσιμα για ερευνητικούς σκοπούς στο < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'hu': 'Az érzékszervekkel rendelkező mondatok nagy számának jegyzetelése a jelenlegi Word Sense Disegyértelműség legnagyobb követelménye. Bemutatjuk a Train-O-Matic-et, egy nyelvfüggetlen módszert, amely több millió érzékeléssel ellátott képzési példányt hoz létre gyakorlatilag minden szó jelentésére egy nyelv szókincsében. A megközelítés teljesen automatikus: nincs szükség emberi beavatkozásra, és az egyetlen típusú emberi ismeret használata WordNet-szerű erőforrás. A Train-O-Matic következetesen korszerű teljesítményt ér el az aranyszabású adatkészletek és nyelvek között, ugyanakkor megszünteti a kézi jegyzetelés terhét. Az összes képzési adat kutatási célokra elérhető < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე სიტყვების ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვების განსხვავება. ჩვენ ვამხსენებთ Train-O-Matic, სიტყვებულის სიტყვებულაში მილიონი სიტყვებულების შექმნის შესაძლებელი სიტყვების შესაძლებლობად სიტყვების ყველა ნიშნავს. პროგრამა ყველაფერად ავტომატიურია: ადამიანის ინტერვინცია არ უნდა მოჭირდება და ერთადერთი ადამიანის მეცნიერების ტიპი არის WordNet- ის რესურსი. Train-O-Matic იქნება მუშაობელი მონაცემები და ენაზების სტანდარტური მონაცემების და ენაზების განმავლობაში, როცა ერთ-ერთი დროში ხელსაწყოთა ანოტაციის გადატანა. ყველა მონაცემები შესაძლებელია შესწავლობის მიზეზებისთვის < http://trainomatic.org - ეა.', 'lt': 'Annotating large numbers of sentences with senses is the heaviest requirement of current Word Sense Disambiguation.  Mes pristatome Train-O-Matic, kalbos nepriklausomą metodą milijonams protu anotuotų mokymo atvejų sukūrimui praktiškai visoms žodžių reikšmėms kalbos žodyne. Metodas visiškai automatiškas: žmogaus įsikišimo nereikia, o vienintelis žmogaus žinių tipas yra WordNet panašus išteklius. Train-O-Matic nuosekliai užtikrina pažangiausius rezultatus aukso standartiniuose duomenų rinkiniuose ir kalbose, tuo pat metu pašalinant rankinės anotacijos naštą. Visi mokymo duomenys moksliniams tyrimams pateikiami < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'it': "Annotare un gran numero di frasi con sensi è il requisito più pesante dell'attuale Disambiguazione del senso della parola. Vi presentiamo Train-O-Matic, un metodo indipendente dal linguaggio per generare milioni di istanze di formazione annotate dai sensi per praticamente tutti i significati delle parole nel vocabolario di una lingua. L'approccio è completamente automatico: non è richiesto alcun intervento umano e l'unico tipo di conoscenza umana utilizzata è una risorsa simile a WordNet. Train-O-Matic raggiunge prestazioni costantemente all'avanguardia in tutti i set di dati e lingue standard gold, eliminando al contempo l'onere dell'annotazione manuale. Tutti i dati formativi sono disponibili per scopi di ricerca presso < http://trainomatic.org >.", 'kk': 'Сезімді үлкен сөздер санын анықтау - назардағы сөзді сезімді өшіру үлкен қажет. Біз Трен-О-Матик, тілінің сөздерінің сөздерінің әдістерін жасау үшін миллиондарды оқыту мәселелерін жасау әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл қасиеті толық автоматты түрде: адамдардың аралығы керек емес және қолданылатын адамдардың тек білім түрі - WordNet секілді ресурс. Трен- О- Матик алтын стандартты деректер қорлары мен тілдері бойынша әдеттегі күй- жағдайды жеткізеді, сондай-ақ қолмен жазбалардың жүктелігін өшіру кезінде. Барлық оқыту деректері зерттеу мақсаттары үшін қол жеткізеді < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'mk': 'Напишувањето на голем број реченици со сетила е најтешкиот услов за актуелно раздвојување на чувството на зборот. Презентираме Train-O-Matic, метод кој е независен од јазикот за генерирање милиони инциденти на обука со сетила, за речиси сите значења на зборовите во речникот на јазикот. Пристапот е целосно автоматски: не е потребна човечка интервенција и единствениот тип на човечко знаење што се користи е ресурс сличен на WordNet. Train-O-Matic achieves consistently state-of-the-art performance across gold standard datasets and languages, while at the same time removing the burden of manual annotation.  Сите податоци за обука се достапни за истражувачки цели на < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ml': 'സെന്\u200dഷനുകളുമായി വലിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അറിയിക്കുന്നത് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ വാക്കിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും ഭാരമായ ആവശ്യമാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d -O-മാറ്റിക്കിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഭാഷ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യതയുള്ള രീതിയാണ്, കോടികണക്കിന് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന പരിശീലന സ്ഥി ഈ പ്രോഗത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും സ്വയമായിട്ടുണ്ട്: മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഇടപാട് ആവശ്യമില്ല. ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരേ തരം മനുഷ്യ അറിവ് വാ ട്രെയിന്\u200d- O- മാറ്റിക് സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്റ്റര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റും ഭാഷകളും മുഴുവന്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിലനിര്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാം ലഭ്യമാണ് < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ms': 'Menganotasi bilangan besar kalimat dengan sens adalah keperluan terbesar bagi Penjelasan Sensa Perkataan semasa. Kami memperkenalkan Train-O-Matic, kaedah bebas bahasa untuk menghasilkan jutaan kejadian latihan yang dicatat dengan akal untuk hampir semua makna perkataan dalam vocabulari bahasa. pendekatan adalah sepenuhnya automatik: tiada campuran manusia diperlukan dan satu-satunya jenis pengetahuan manusia yang digunakan adalah sumber seperti WordNet. Train-O-Matic mencapai prestasi secara konsisten-state-of-the-art melalui set data piawai emas dan bahasa, sementara pada masa yang sama menghapuskan beban anotasi manual. Semua data latihan tersedia untuk tujuan kajian di < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'mt': "L-annotazzjoni ta’ għadd kbir ta’ sentenzi b’sensi hija l-aktar rekwiżit qawwi ta’ Diżambigwazzjoni tas-Sens tal-kliem attwali. We present Train-O-Matic, a language-independent method for generating millions of sense-annotated training instances for virtually all meanings of words in a language's vocabulary.  L-approċċ huwa kompletament awtomatiku: l-ebda intervent uman mhu meħtieġ u l-uniku tip ta’ għarfien uman użat huwa riżorsa simili għal WordNet. Train-O-Matic jikseb b’mod konsistenti l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fis-settijiet tad-dejta u l-lingwi standard tad-deheb, filwaqt li fl-istess ħin jitneħħa l-piż tal-annotazzjoni manwali. Id-dejta kollha tat-taħriġ hija disponibbli għal skopijiet ta’ riċerka fuq < http://trainomatic.org >.", 'pl': 'Annotacja dużej liczby zdań ze zmysłami jest najcięższym wymaganiem obecnego rozproszenia zmysłu Word Sense. Przedstawiamy Train-O-Matic, niezależną od języka metodę generowania milionów adnotacji zmysłowych dla praktycznie wszystkich znaczeń słów w słownictwie danego języka. Podejście jest w pełni automatyczne: nie wymaga interwencji ludzkiej, a jedynym rodzajem wykorzystywanej wiedzy ludzkiej jest zasób podobny do WordNet. Train-O-Matic osiąga konsekwentnie najnowocześniejszą wydajność dla złotych standardów danych i języków, jednocześnie eliminując obciążenie ręcznej adnotacji. Wszystkie dane szkoleniowe są dostępne do celów badawczych pod adresem < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ro': 'Adnotarea unui număr mare de propoziții cu simțuri este cea mai grea cerință a actualei dezambiguizare a sensului cuvântului. Vă prezentăm Train-O-Matic, o metodă independentă de limbă pentru generarea a milioane de instanțe de instruire adnotate de sens pentru aproape toate semnificațiile cuvintelor din vocabularul unei limbi. Abordarea este complet automată: nu este necesară nicio intervenție umană și singurul tip de cunoștințe umane utilizate este o resursă asemănătoare WordNet. Train-O-Matic atinge în mod constant performanțe de ultimă generație în seturi de date și limbi gold standard, eliminând în același timp povara adnotării manuale. Toate datele de formare sunt disponibile în scopuri de cercetare la < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'mn': 'Олон хэмжээний өгүүлбэрийг мэдрэмжтэй анзаарлах нь одоогийн үг мэдрэмжтэй хамгийн хүнд шаардлагатай. Бид Трэйн-О-Матик, хэлний сөрөг сөрөг дээр сая сая мэдрэмжтэй суралцах үйл ажиллагааг бий болгоход хамааралтай хэлний арга замыг илэрхийлж байна. Энэ арга баримт нь автоматжуулан байдаг: хүн төрөлхтний оролцоо шаардлагагүй. Хүн төрөлхтний мэдлэг зөвхөн хэрэглэгддэг нь WordNet-тэй адил баялаг юм. Трэйн-О-Матик нь алтын стандарт өгөгдлийн сангууд болон хэл дээр тогтмол урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг хийдэг. Гэвч одоо л гар даалгаварын зарцуулалтыг устгаж байна. Бүх сургалт өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг судалгааны зорилго дээр ашиглаж болно. http://trainomatic.org >.', 'no': 'Merk stor tal setningar med senter er det største krevst for gjeldande ord Sense avslutting. Vi presenterer Train-O-Matic, eit språk-uavhengig metode for å laga millioner av følelsesopplæringsinstanser for praktisk alle betydningar av ord i språket. Tilnærminga er fullstendig automatisk: ingen menneskelige intervensjon er nødvendig og den eneste typen menneskelige kunnskap som er brukt er eit ressurs som liknar WordNet. Tren-O-Matic oppnår konsekvent status-of-the-art-performance across gold standard datasets and languages, mens samtidig fjernar innlastinga av manual annotation. Alle treningsdata er tilgjengelege for forskningsmål på < http://trainomatic.org >', 'sr': 'Novinarenje velikih broja rečenica sa čulima je najteža zahteva trenutne rečenice osećaju disambiguaciju. Predstavljamo vlak-O-Matić, nezavisni jezik-metod za stvaranje milijuna osjećajnih treninga za praktično sve značenje riječi u jezičkom rečniku. Pristup je potpuno automatski: nema potrebne ljudske intervencije i jedini tip ljudskih znanja koji se koristi je resurs sličan na WordNet. Voz-O-Matić postiže konsekventno stanje umjetnosti na zlatnim standardnim setima podataka i jezicima, dok u isto vreme uklanja teret ručne annotacije. Svi podaci o obuci su dostupni za istraživačke svrhe na < http://trainomatic.org >', 'si': 'වැඩි සංකේතය සඳහා විශාල සංකේතය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල අවශ්\u200dයය තමයි ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරපු වචනය අව අපි ක්\u200dරේන්ස්-O-මතික්, භාෂාව ස්වයංත්\u200dර විධානයක්, භාෂාවේ භාෂාවක් වලින් හැම වචන අදහස් වලින් මිලියන්ගෙන් ප්\u200dරශ් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය වෙන්නේ: මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරවේශනය අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ ඒ වගේම මිනිස්සු දන ක්\u200dරේන්ස්-O-මැටික් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ස්ථානය සහ භාෂාවක් වලින් ස්ථානය-ස්ථානය සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා, එකම වෙලාවෙන් පු සියළුම ප්\u200dරශ්න දත්ත තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණ අදහස් සඳහා < http://trainomatic.org >', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha lagu soo sheegayo xukun badan oo aad u badan, waa baahida ugu adag ee ku saabsan baahida ereyga Sense. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab aan ku xoreen luqada ah oo u sameynaya millionka waxbarasho oo sinnaanta ah, taas oo ah macnaheedka hadalka afka ku qoran. Dhacdooyinku waa si rasmi ah: looma baahna in dadka intervention, nooca kaliya ee aqoonta dadkana lagu isticmaalo waa resource u eg WordNet. Gaadiidka O-Matic wuxuu si siman u helaa bandhigyada farshaxanka oo dhan oo ku yaala sawirada caalamiga ah oo dahabka ah iyo luuqadaha, isla markaasna la qaado culaabta dhibaatada qofka gacanta ku jira. All the training data is available for research purposes at < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'sv': 'Att anteckna ett stort antal meningar med sinnen är det tyngsta kravet på nuvarande ordsinnesdeklaration. Vi presenterar Train-O-Matic, en språkoberoende metod för att generera miljontals sanskommenterade utbildningsinstanser för praktiskt taget alla betydelser av ord i ett språks ordförråd. Metoden är helt automatisk: ingen mänsklig intervention krävs och den enda typen av mänsklig kunskap som används är en WordNet-liknande resurs. Train-O-Matic uppnår konsekvent toppmodern prestanda för datauppsättningar och språk med guldstandard, samtidigt som den tar bort bördan av manuell notering. All utbildningsdata finns tillgänglig för forskningsändamål på < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ta': 'உணர்வுடன் பெரிய வாக்கியங்களை அறிவிக்கும் பெரிய வாக்கியங்கள் தற்போதைய வார்த்தை அலட்சியமைப்பின் கடினமா ஒரு மொழியின் சொல்லத்தில் உள்ள அனைத்து வார்த்தைகளின் அர்த்தமும் உள்ளது. முழு தானாகவே உள்ளது: மனித இடைவெளி எதுவும் தேவையில்லை மற்றும் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் மனித அறிவு மட்டும் வகையான வார்த்தைன் போ Train-O-Matic achieves consistently state-of-the-art performance across gold standard datasets and languages, while at the same time removing the burden of manual annotation.  < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ur': 'سنس کے ساتھ بہت سی جماعتوں کا اظہار کرنے کا بہت سخت ضرورت ہے جبکہ اوسنی کلمات کا اظہار کرتا ہے۔ ہم ٹرین-ا-ماتیک کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک زبان-مستقل طریقہ ہے کہ ایک زبان کے لکھنے میں بہت سی کلمات کی تعلیم کے مطابق ملیوں کو پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ یہ تقریبا پوری طور پر اتوماٹ ہے: کسی انسان کی مدد کی ضرورت نہیں ہے اور صرف انسان کے علم کا نوع ہے جو WordNet جیسا منبع ہے. ٹرین-ا-ماتیک سونے کی استاندارڈ ڈاٹ سٹ اور زبانوں میں ثابت قدم رہنے والی عملکرد کو پہنچاتا ہے، اور اس کے ساتھ ہاتھ لینے کے بار کو دور کر رہا ہے. تمام تعلیم ڈیٹا موجود ہیں تحقیق کے مطابق http://trainomatic.org >', 'uz': "Foydalanuvchi soʻzlarning katta soʻzni taʼrif qilish joriy so'zlar oʻchirilishi uchun eng katta kerak. Biz o'qish O-Matikni hozir qilamiz, millionlab o'quvvat tajriba usullarni yaratish uchun o'z tilning tildagi so'zlarining hamma ma ma narsalarning imkoniyati. Bu usul avtomatik emas: inson intervention kerak emas, va faqat qo'l bilan ishlatilgan odamning faqat turi WordNet kabi manba. Name Hech narsa taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar mavjud bo'lgan taʼminot http://trainomatic.org >.", 'vi': 'Chú giải một số lượng lớn các câu với các giác quan là yêu cầu nặng nhất của biến đổi cảm xúc từ hiện thời. Chúng tôi giới thiệu Huấn luyện-O-Matic, một phương pháp ngôn ngữ-độc lập để tạo ra hàng triệu trường dạy các trường hợp có ghi chú cảm xúc về hầu hết các từ ngữ trong từ điển. Phương pháp này hoàn toàn tự động: không cần sự can thiệp của con người và loại kiến thức duy nhất của con người được dùng là một nguồn giống WordNet. Huấn luyện y-O-Matic đạt được trình độ hoàn hảo nhất trong các bộ trình dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn vàng và ngôn ngữ, trong khi gỡ bỏ gánh nặng ghi chú bằng tay. Tất cả các dữ liệu đào tạo đều có mục đích nghiên cứu http://trainomatic.org -̀.', 'bg': 'Анотирането на голям брой изречения със сетива е най-тежкото изискване на настоящото Разясняване на смисъла на словото. Представяме метод, независим от езика, за генериране на милиони инстанции за обучение с анотация на смисъл за практически всички значения на думите в речника на езика. Подходът е напълно автоматичен: не се изисква човешка намеса и единственият вид човешко познание, използвано е ресурс, подобен на WordNet. Трейн-О-Матик постига последователно най-съвременни показатели в съвкупността от данни и езици със златен стандарт, като същевременно премахва тежестта на ръчното анотиране. Всички данни за обучението са достъпни за изследователски цели на адрес < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'nl': 'Het annoteren van grote aantallen zinnen met zintuigen is de zwaarste eis van de huidige Word Sense Disambiguation. We presenteren Train-O-Matic, een taal-onafhankelijke methode voor het genereren van miljoenen zintuiglijke geannoteerde trainingsinstanties voor vrijwel alle betekenissen van woorden in de woordenschat van een taal. De aanpak is volledig automatisch: er is geen menselijke tussenkomst nodig en het enige type menselijke kennis dat wordt gebruikt is een WordNet-achtige resource. Train-O-Matic bereikt consistent state-of-the-art prestaties in alle goudstandaard datasets en talen, terwijl tegelijkertijd de last van handmatige annotatie wordt weggenomen. Alle trainingsgegevens zijn beschikbaar voor onderzoeksdoeleinden op < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'da': 'Anmærkning af et stort antal sætninger med sanser er det tungeste krav til den nuværende ordsans Disambiguation. Vi præsenterer Train-O-Matic, en sproguafhængig metode til at generere millioner af sanse-annoterede træningsinstanser for stort set alle betydninger af ord i et sprogs ordforråd. Tilgangen er fuldautomatisk: Der kræves ingen menneskelig indgriben, og den eneste type menneskelig viden, der anvendes, er en WordNet-lignende ressource. Train-O-Matic opnår konsekvent topmoderne ydeevne på tværs af guldstandarddatasæt og sprog, samtidig med at byrden ved manuel notering fjernes. Alle træningsdata er tilgængelige til forskningsformål på < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'hr': 'Najtežak je zahtjev trenutne riječi o invambigaciji. Predstavljamo vlak-O-Matić, jezički nezavisni metod za stvaranje milijuna osjećajnih treninga za praktično sve značenje riječi u jezičkom rečniku. Pristup je potpuno automatski: nije potrebna ljudska intervencija i jedina vrsta ljudskih znanja koja se koristi je resursa slična na WordNet. Vlak-O-Matić postiže konsekventno stanje umjetnosti u zlatnim standardnim podacima i jezicima, a istovremeno uklanjanje tereta ručne annotacije. Svi podaci o obuci dostupni su za istraživačke svrhe na < http://trainomatic.org >', 'de': 'Eine große Anzahl von Sätzen mit Sinnen zu kommentieren ist die höchste Anforderung der aktuellen Word Sense Disambiguation. Wir präsentieren Train-O-Matic, eine sprachunabhängige Methode zur Generierung von Millionen sinn-annotierten Trainingsinstanzen für praktisch alle Bedeutungen von Wörtern im Wortschatz einer Sprache. Der Ansatz ist vollautomatisch: Es ist kein menschliches Eingreifen erforderlich und die einzige Art von menschlichem Wissen, das verwendet wird, ist eine WordNet-ähnliche Ressource. Train-O-Matic erreicht durchgängig State-of-the-Art-Performance über Goldstandard-Datensätze und -Sprachen hinweg und entlastet gleichzeitig die manuelle Annotation. Alle Trainingsdaten stehen für Forschungszwecke zur Verfügung unter < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'id': 'Annotating large numbers of sentences with senses is the heaviest requirement of current Word Sense Disambiguation.  Kami mempersembahkan Train-O-Matic, metode bebas dari bahasa untuk menghasilkan jutaan kasus pelatihan yang dicatat dengan akal untuk hampir semua makna kata dalam vokal bahasa. pendekatannya sepenuhnya otomatis: tidak diperlukan intervensi manusia dan satu-satunya jenis pengetahuan manusia yang digunakan adalah sumber daya seperti WordNet. Train-O-Matic secara konsisten mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art melalui set data standar emas dan bahasa, sementara pada saat yang sama menghapus beban anotasi manual. Semua data pelatihan tersedia untuk tujuan penelitian di < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ko': '어의로 대량의 문장을 표시하는 것은 현재 어의의 변조를 없애는 가장 중요한 요구이다.우리는 Train-O-Matic을 제기했는데 이것은 언어에 독립된 방법으로 언어 어휘표에서 거의 모든 단어의 의미를 수백만 개의 의미 주석을 생성하는 훈련 실례에 사용된다.이런 방법은 완전히 자동적이다. 인공적인 개입이 필요 없고, 사용하는 유일한 인류 지식 유형은WordNet과 유사한 자원이다.Train-O-Matic은 골드 표준 데이터 세트와 언어에서 시종일관 최첨단 성능을 실현하면서 수동 주석의 부담을 없앴다.모든 교육 데이터는 <http://trainomatic.org>.', 'fa': 'اعلام کردن تعداد زیادی از جمله\u200cها با احساسات سخت\u200cترین نیازی از کلمه\u200cهای فعلی ناپدید شدن است. ما قطار-O-Matic را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک روش مستقل به زبان برای تولید میلیون\u200cها فعالیت\u200cهای آموزش با احساسات برای تقریباً همه معنای کلمات در کلمات زبان. دسترسی کاملاً اتوماتیک است: هیچ intervention انسانی لازم نیست و تنها نوع دانش انسانی که استفاده می\u200cشود یک منبع شبیه WordNet است. قطار-O-Matic به طور کامل اجرای وضعیت هنری در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد طلا و زبانها رسیده است، در حالی که بار اظهار دستی را حذف می\u200cکند. تمام داده های آموزش برای هدف تحقیقات در < http://trainomatic.org .', 'sw': 'Kutangaza idadi kubwa ya sentensi yenye hisia ni hitaji kubwa la kudhalilishwa kwa neno la sasa la Kuondolewa kwa Sensi. Tunawasilisha Taifa-O-Matic, njia huru ya kutengeneza mamilioni ya mafunzo yenye akili yenye maana ya maneno kwa lugha. Hatua hii ni ya kujitegemea kabisa: hakuna mahojiano ya binadamu yanahitajika na aina pekee ya maarifa yanayotumiwa ni rasilimali kama WordNet. Matukio ya mafunzo yanafanikiwa kwa ujumla wa hali ya sanaa katika seti za data na lugha za dhahabu, wakati huo huo huondoa mzigo wa uchunguzi wa manufaa. Takwimu zote za mafunzo zinapatikana kwa malengo ya utafiti kwa < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'sq': 'Shkruajtja e numrave të mëdha të fjalëve me kuptime është kërkesa më e rëndë e zhdukjes së fjalës aktuale. Ne paraqesim Train-O-Matic, një metodë e pavarur nga gjuha për të gjeneruar miliona raste stërvitjeje të anotuara me sens për praktikisht të gjitha kuptimet e fjalëve në fjalorin e një gjuhe. The approach is fully automatic: no human intervention is required and the only type of human knowledge used is a WordNet-like resource.  Train-O-Matic arrin në mënyrë të vazhdueshme shfaqjen më të moderne nëpërmjet sistemeve të dhënash dhe gjuhëve të standardeve të art ë, duke hequr në të njëjtën kohë barrën e anotacionit manual. Të gjitha të dhënat e trajnimit janë në dispozicion për qëllime kërkimi në < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'tr': 'Duygularla olan büyük sayıları ifade etmek, şu anda Kelime Sendiklerinin en ağır şarttırması. Biz Tren Bu ýagdaý doly awtomatik boldy: hiç hili adam baglanmasy gerek däldir we ýöne ullanýan adamlaryň bilimi diňe WordNet ýaly çeşmidir. Train-O Hemme bilim maglumatlary araşdyrma amaçlary üçin bar http://trainomatic.org >', 'af': "Opmerking van groot getalle setnings met senses is die swaarste verwagting van huidige Woord Sense Ontbreking. Ons stel Train-O-Matic voor 'n taal-onafhanklike metode vir die genereer van miljoene s in-annotateerde oefening voorbeelde vir virtueel alle betekenings van woorde in 'n taal se woordeboek. Die toegang is volledig automaties: geen menslike intervention is nodig en die enigste tipe menslike kennis gebruik is 'n WordNet-soos hulpbron. Train-O-Matic bereik konsistentlik state-of-the-art prestasie oor goud standaard datastelle en tale, terwyl op dieselfde tyd die laai van hand-annotasie verwyder word. Alle onderwerp data is beskikbaar vir onderwerp doels op < http://trainomatic.org >", 'az': "Ağımdaki Sözü Senz Sözünün ən ağır tələb edilməsi böyük sayı cümlələr təbliğ etməkdir. Biz Train-O-Matic'i, dillərin s özlərində hər cür sözlərin anlamına gələn milyonlarla hiss edilmiş təhsil nöqtələrini yaratmaq üçün təhsil-O-Matic təhsil etdik. Yaxınlıq tamamilə avtomatik olar: heç bir insan intervenci ehtiyacı yoxdur və istifadə edilən yalnız insan bilgisi WordNet kimi bir qrupdur. Train-O-Matic altın standart veri quruları və dilləri arasında müəyyən-müəyyən bir müddət istifadə edir, lakin bu vaxt manual annotation yükünü silər. Tüm təhsil məlumatları araşdırma məqsədilə faydalanır < http://trainomatic.org >", 'bn': 'অনুভূতি দিয়ে বিশাল সংখ্যার সংখ্যা বর্ণনা করা হচ্ছে বর্তমান শব্দের সেন্সের বিচ্ছিন্ন দরকার। আমরা ট্রেন-O-ম্যাটিকের উপস্থাপন করছি, যা ভাষার স্বাধীন ভাষায় লক্ষ লক্ষ মানসিক প্রশিক্ষণের ক্ষেত্রে সৃষ্টি করার জন্য, যা ভাষায় ভাষায় শব্দ এই পদ্ধতি পুরোপুরি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে: কোন মানুষের মধ্যে হস্তক্ষেপ নেই এবং একমাত্র মানুষের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে একটি ওয় ট্রেন-ও-ম্যাটিক স্বর্ণের স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ডাটাসেট এবং ভাষায় স্থায়ীভাবে শিল্প-শিল্পের প্রদর্শনের রাষ্ট্রের সাথে অর্জন কর গবেষণার উদ্দেশ্যে < http://trainomatic.org >', 'hy': 'Զգայարաններով մեծ քանակի նախադասություններ նշում են ներկայիս բառերի զգայարանների բացահայտության ամենաբարդ պահանջը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք "գնացք-ո-մատիկ", լեզվից անկախ մեթոդ, որն օգտագործում է միլիոնավոր զգացմունքով նշումնավորված ուսումնասիրության օրինակներ ստեղծելու համար գրեթե բոլոր բառերի իմաստների համար լեզվի բառարանում: Մոտեցումը լիովին ավտոմատիկ է. մարդկային ներխուժումը անհրաժեշտ չէ, և մարդկային գիտելիքների միակ տեսակը WordNet-ի նման ռեսուրսն է: Թրայն-Օ-Մատիկը մշտապես հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերի և լեզուների միջև, միաժամանակ վերացնում է ձեռքի նոտացիայի ծանրությունը: Բոլոր ուսուցման տվյալները հասանելի են հետազոտության նպատակների համար http://trainomatic.org ]:', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ቃላት የስሜት መግለጫ የሚጠቅሙት የፍርድ ቁጥጥር በሚያሳየቁ ቁጥጥር ነው፡፡ በቋንቋ ቋንቋ-O-ማቲክ የመሊዮን የልዩ ማስታወቂያ ተማሪ ዓይነቶችን ለመፍጠር የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ እናስባለን፡፡ መግለጫ ሙሉ አውቶማዊ ነው፤ የሰው intervention አይፈልግም፤ የሰው እውቀት ብቻ የWordNet የሚመስል ዕቃ ነው፡፡ Train-O-Matic በተጨማሪው የወርቅ ዳታተር እና ቋንቋዎች የሚኖረውን የድረ ገጽ አካባቢ አግኝቷል፤ በዚያውም ሰዓት የManual አካሄድ ሸክም የሚያስወግድ ነው፡፡ ትምህርት ማድረግ ሁሉ ለትምህርት ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ca': "Anotar un gran nombre de frases amb sentits és el requisit més pesat de la desambiguació actual del sentit de paraules. Presentam Train-O-Matic, un mètode independent de llenguatge per generar milions d'instances d'entrenament anotats amb sentit per virtualment tots els significats de paraules en el vocabulari d'un llenguatge. L'enfocament és totalment automàtic: no es requereix cap intervenció human a i l'únic tipus de coneixement humà utilitzat és un recurso similar a WordNet. Train-O-Matic aconsegueix un rendiment constantment més avançat a través de conjunts de dades i llengües d'or, alhora que elimina la càrrega de l'anotació manual. Totes les dades d'entrenament estan disponibles per fins d'investigació a < http://trainomatic.org >.", 'cs': 'Anotování velkého počtu vět se smysly je největším požadavkem současné Disambiguation Word Sense. Představujeme Train-O-Matic, jazykově nezávislou metodu pro generování milionů výcvikových instancí s anotovanými smysly pro prakticky všechny významy slov v jazykové slovní zásobě. Přístup je plně automatický: není nutný žádný lidský zásah a jediný typ použitých lidských znalostí je zdroj podobný WordNet. Train-O-Matic dosahuje konzistentně nejmodernějšího výkonu napříč datovými sadami a jazyky zlatého standardu a současně odstraňuje zátěž ruční anotace. Všechny údaje o školení jsou k dispozici pro výzkumné účely na adrese < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'bs': 'Najtežak je zahtjev trenutne riječi o disambigaciji. Predstavljamo vlak-O-Matić, jezik-nezavisni metod za stvaranje milijuna jutarnih treninga za praktično sve značenje riječi u jezičkom rečniku. Pristup je potpuno automatski: nije potrebna ljudska intervencija i jedina vrsta ljudskih znanja koja se koristi je resursa slična na WordNet. Vlak-O-Matić postiže stalno stanje umjetnosti u zlatnim standardnim podacima i jezicima, dok u isto vrijeme uklanjanje tereta ručne annotacije. Svi podaci o obuci su dostupni za istraživačke svrhe na < http://trainomatic.org - Da.', 'et': 'Meeltega lausete suure arvu annoteerimine on praeguse sõnatunde dismõistetavuse kõige raskem nõue. Esitleme Train-O-Matic, keelesõltumatut meetodit miljonite tähendustega koolituste loomiseks peaaegu kõigi keele sõnavara tähenduste jaoks. Lähenemine on täiesti automaatne: inimsekkumine ei ole vajalik ja ainus kasutatav inimteadmiste liik on WordNeti sarnane ressurss. Train-O-Matic saavutab järjepidevalt tipptasemel jõudluse kõigis kuldstandardite andmekogumites ja keeltes, eemaldades samal ajal käsitsi märgistamise koormuse. Kõik koolitusandmed on teadusuuringuteks kättesaadavad aadressil < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'fi': 'Suurten lauseiden merkitseminen aisteilla on nykyisen sanaaistin purkamisen raskain vaatimus. Esittelemme Train-O-Maticin, kielestä riippumattoman menetelmän miljoonien merkityksellisten harjoitusten tuottamiseen lähes kaikille kielen sanaston merkityksille. Lähestymistapa on täysin automaattinen: inhimillistä toimintaa ei tarvita ja ainoa käytetty inhimillinen tietämys on WordNetin kaltainen resurssi. Train-O-Matic saavuttaa johdonmukaisesti huippuluokan suorituskyvyn kultaisten tietosarjojen ja kielien osalta ja samalla poistaa manuaalisten merkintöjen taakan. Kaikki koulutustiedot ovat saatavilla tutkimustarkoituksiin osoitteessa < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'jv': 'Punika Anyadir Awak dhéwé nggawe Ndheke kang dipoleh sing automatically: ora ono jeneng sampeyan uwong nêmên karo paké dipoleh karo kesempatan wong liyane sing kelompok kelompok word netek. 3. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness http://trainomatic.org >', 'sk': 'Navedba velikega števila stavkov s čutili je najtežja zahteva trenutne razjasnitve besednega smisla. Predstavljamo Train-O-Matic, jezikovno neodvisno metodo za ustvarjanje milijonov primerov usposabljanja s smiselnimi oznakami za skoraj vse pomene besed v besedišču jezika. Pristop je popolnoma avtomatičen: človeško posredovanje ni potrebno in edina vrsta uporabljenega človeškega znanja je vir, podoben WordNetu. Train-O-Matic dosega dosledno najsodobnejše zmogljivosti v zbirkah podatkov zlatih standardov in jezikih, hkrati pa odpravlja breme ročnega označevanja. Vsi podatki o usposabljanju so na voljo za raziskovalne namene na spletni strani < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'ha': "Ana gaya ƙidãya masu yawa na sanki da sauri, yana da ƙayyade mafi girma ga Cire Bayanta Kalmar na yanzu. Tuna halatar da Train-O-Matic, wata hanyoyi mai ba'a da harshe na ƙididdige millions na shiryoyin da aka fahimta wa masu bastarwa wa kowanne ma'anar maganar cikin maganar harshe. Wannan hanyarwa na farat ɗaya: ba a buƙata wani intake da mutum kuma nau'in da aka yi amfani da shi kawai, shi ne wani resource kamar maganar Net. @ info Dukan data na aikin da aka iya amfani da wajen yin takarda wa lõkaci a < http://trainomatic.org >", 'he': 'הערות מספר גדול של משפטים עם חושים היא הדרישה הכי כבדה של הפרעה של חוש מילים הנוכחי. אנו מציגים את רכבת אומטיקה, שיטה עצמאית לשפה לייצור מיליוני מקרים אימונים מוסרים תחושה כמעט לכל המשמעות של מילים במילון של שפה. הגישה היא אוטומטית לחלוטין: אין צורך התערבות אנושית והסוג היחיד של ידע אנושי משתמש הוא משאב דומה WordNet. הרכבת-O-Matic משיגה ביצועים עדכונים באופן קבוע ברחבי קבוצות מידע סטנדרטיות זהב ושפות, ובאותו הזמן הורידה את המשקל של הערות ידנית. כל נתוני האימון זמינים למטרות מחקר ב < http://trainomatic.org >.', 'bo': 'སེམས་ཚོར་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་མང་ཆེ་བས་སྐབས་ད་ལྟོའི་དགོས་མཁོ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིན་པ ང་ཚོས་Train-O-Matic(Train-O-Matic)ཡི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཤིག་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གཟུགས་སྟངས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡོད། Train-O-Matic achieves consistently state-of-the-art performance across gold standard datasets and languages, while at the same time removing the burden of manual annotation. < http://trainomatic.org >'}
{'en': 'Universal Semantic Parsing', 'ar': 'الاعراب الدلالي العالمي', 'fr': 'Analyse sémantique universelle', 'pt': 'Análise Semântica Universal', 'es': 'Análisis semántico universal', 'ja': 'ユニバーサルセマンティック構文解析', 'zh': '通用语义解析', 'hi': 'यूनिवर्सल सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Универсальный семантический анализ', 'ga': 'Parsáil Shéimeantach Uilíoch', 'ka': 'უნივერსალური სემანტიკური პარამენტი', 'hu': 'Univerzális szemantikus értelmezés', 'el': 'Καθολική σημειακή ανάλυση', 'kk': 'Жалпы семантикалық талдау', 'it': 'Analisi semantica universale', 'mk': 'Универзално семантично анализирање', 'lt': 'Universal Semantic Parsing', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Semantik Universal', 'ml': 'പൊതുവായ സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Analiżi Semantika Universali', 'mn': 'Дуниверсал Semantic Тайлбар', 'pl': 'Uniwersalna analiza semantyczna', 'ro': 'Analizare semantică universală', 'sr': 'Univerzalno semantièko razmatranje', 'so': 'Jaamacadda guud', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'no': 'Universell semantisk tolking', 'sv': 'Universell semantisk tolkning', 'ta': 'பொதுவான செமான்டிக் பாசம்', 'ur': 'Universal Semantic Parsing', 'uz': 'Umumiy semantik parsing', 'vi': 'Phim truyền kỳ truyền thống', 'nl': 'Universele semantische parsing', 'bg': 'Универсален семантичен анализ', 'hr': 'Univerzalno semantičko razmatranje', 'da': 'Universel semantisk fortolkning', 'de': 'Universelle semantische Parsing', 'id': 'Analisasi Semantik Universal', 'ko': '통용 어의 분석', 'fa': 'تجزیه سامانتیک جهانی', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa Kimataifa', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk', 'af': 'Universele semantiese verwerking', 'sq': 'Analizë Semantike Universale', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যুত সেমান্টিক পার্সিং', 'az': 'Universal Semantic Parsing', 'ca': 'Universal Semantic Parsing', 'bs': 'Univerzalno semantično razmatranje', 'cs': 'Univerzální sémantické analýzy', 'et': 'Universaalne semantiline parsimine', 'fi': 'Yleinen semanttinen jäsentely', 'jv': 'Universal semanti Tatanan', 'he': 'בדיקת סמנטית אוניברסלית', 'sk': 'Univerzalno semantično razporejanje', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་བཅད་ཞིབ་བཤེར'}
{'en': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) offer a uniform cross-lingual syntactic representation, with the aim of advancing multilingual applications. Recent work shows that semantic parsing can be accomplished by transforming syntactic dependencies to logical forms. However, this work is limited to English, and can not process dependency graphs, which allow handling complex phenomena such as control. In this work, we introduce UDepLambda, a semantic interface for UD, which maps natural language to logical forms in an almost language-independent fashion and can process dependency graphs. We perform experiments on question answering against Freebase and provide German and Spanish translations of the WebQuestions and GraphQuestions datasets to facilitate multilingual evaluation. Results show that UDepLambda outperforms strong baselines across languages and datasets. For English, it achieves a 4.9 F1 point improvement over the state-of-the-art on GraphQuestions.', 'ar': 'توفر التبعيات العالمية (UD) تمثيلًا نحويًا موحدًا متعدد اللغات ، بهدف تطوير التطبيقات متعددة اللغات. يُظهر العمل الأخير أن التحليل الدلالي يمكن إنجازه عن طريق تحويل التبعيات النحوية إلى أشكال منطقية. ومع ذلك ، يقتصر هذا العمل على اللغة الإنجليزية ، ولا يمكنه معالجة الرسوم البيانية التبعية ، والتي تسمح بالتعامل مع الظواهر المعقدة مثل التحكم. في هذا العمل ، نقدم UDepLambda ، واجهة دلالية لـ UD ، والتي تحدد اللغة الطبيعية إلى الأشكال المنطقية بطريقة شبه مستقلة عن اللغة ويمكنها معالجة الرسوم البيانية التبعية. نجري تجارب على الإجابة على الأسئلة مقابل Freebase ونقدم ترجمات ألمانية وإسبانية لمجموعات بيانات WebQuestions و GraphQuestions لتسهيل التقييم متعدد اللغات. تظهر النتائج أن UDepLambda يتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس القوية عبر اللغات ومجموعات البيانات. بالنسبة للغة الإنجليزية ، فإنها تحقق تحسنًا بمقدار 4.9 نقطة في F1 على أحدث طراز في GraphQuestions.', 'es': 'Las Dependencias Universales (UD) ofrecen una representación sintáctica multilingüe uniforme, con el objetivo de avanzar en las aplicaciones multilingües. Un trabajo reciente muestra que el análisis semántico se puede lograr transformando las dependencias sintácticas en formas lógicas. Sin embargo, este trabajo se limita al inglés y no puede procesar gráficos de dependencias, que permiten manejar fenómenos complejos como el control. En este trabajo, presentamos UdeLambda, una interfaz semántica para UD, que mapea el lenguaje natural a las formas lógicas de una manera casi independiente del idioma y puede procesar gráficos de dependencias. Realizamos experimentos de respuesta a preguntas contra Freebase y proporcionamos traducciones al alemán y al español de los conjuntos de datos WebQuestions y GraphQuestions para facilitar la evaluación multilingüe. Los resultados muestran que UdeLambda supera las sólidas líneas de base en todos los lenguajes y conjuntos de datos. Para el inglés, logra una mejora de 4,9 puntos F1 con respecto al estado de la técnica de GraphQuestions.', 'pt': 'As Dependências Universais (UD) oferecem uma representação sintática uniforme em vários idiomas, com o objetivo de promover aplicativos multilíngues. Trabalhos recentes mostram que a análise semântica pode ser realizada transformando dependências sintáticas em formas lógicas. No entanto, este trabalho está limitado ao inglês, e não pode processar gráficos de dependência, que permitem lidar com fenômenos complexos como o controle. Neste trabalho, apresentamos o UDepLambda, uma interface semântica para UD, que mapeia linguagem natural para formas lógicas de maneira quase independente de linguagem e pode processar grafos de dependência. Realizamos experimentos de resposta a perguntas no Freebase e fornecemos traduções em alemão e espanhol dos conjuntos de dados WebQuestions e GraphQuestions para facilitar a avaliação multilíngue. Os resultados mostram que o UDepLambda supera as linhas de base fortes em idiomas e conjuntos de dados. Para o inglês, alcança uma melhoria de 4,9 pontos F1 em relação ao estado da arte em GraphQuestions.', 'fr': "Les dépendances universelles (UD) offrent une représentation syntaxique multilingue uniforme, dans le but de faire progresser les applications multilingues. Des travaux récents montrent que l'analyse sémantique peut être réalisée en transformant les dépendances syntaxiques en formes logiques. Cependant, ce travail est limité à l'anglais et ne peut pas traiter de graphes de dépendances, qui permettent de gérer des phénomènes complexes tels que le contrôle. Dans ce travail, nous présentons UdePlambda, une interface sémantique pour UD, qui mappe le langage naturel avec des formes logiques d'une manière presque indépendante de la langue et peut traiter des graphes de dépendance. Nous réalisons des expériences sur la réponse aux questions par rapport à Freebase et fournissons des traductions en allemand et en espagnol des ensembles de données WebQuestions et GraphQuestions afin de faciliter l'évaluation multilingue. Les résultats montrent que UdePlambda surpasse les lignes de base solides pour les langues et les ensembles de données. Pour l'anglais, il obtient une amélioration de 4,9 points F1 par rapport à l'état de pointe de GraphQuestions.", 'ja': 'Universal Dependencies （ UD ）は、多言語アプリケーションを進歩させることを目的として、統一されたクロスリンガル構文表現を提供します。最近の研究では、構文依存関係を論理形式に変換することで、意味解析を達成できることが示されている。しかし、本作は英語に限らず、従属グラフを処理することはできず、制御などの複雑な現象を扱うことができる。この研究では、UDのセマンティックインターフェースであるUDepLambdaを紹介します。UDは、自然言語をほぼ言語に依存しない形で論理的な形式にマッピングし、依存グラフを処理することができます。Freebaseに対する質問応答の実験を行い、多言語評価を容易にするためにWebQuestionsおよびGraphQuestionsデータセットのドイツ語とスペイン語の翻訳を提供します。結果は、UDepLambdaが言語やデータセット間の強力なベースラインを上回っていることを示しています。英語では、GraphQuestionsで最先端の4.9 F 1ポイントの改善を達成しています。', 'zh': '通用恃 (UD) 供跨语句法示,旨进多言应用程序。 近者研明,语义解析可转句法为逻辑。 然止于英语,且无以处恃,许以杂事,如制之。 于此言之,介UD之语义接口UDepLambda,以几于言而映自然语言于逻辑,而可以处依赖关系图。 对Freebase以实验,共WebQuestionsGraphQuestions数集德语西班牙语译,以趣多言评估。 结果表明,UDepLambda优于言数之基线。 英语之于GraphQuestions,先进之术4.9 F1矣。', 'hi': 'यूनिवर्सल डिपेंडेंसीज (यूडी) बहुभाषी अनुप्रयोगों को आगे बढ़ाने के उद्देश्य से एक समान क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वाक्यात्मक प्रतिनिधित्व प्रदान करता है। हाल के काम से पता चलता है कि शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग को तार्किक रूपों में वाक्यात्मक निर्भरताओं को बदलकर पूरा किया जा सकता है। हालांकि, यह काम अंग्रेजी तक सीमित है, और निर्भरता ग्राफ़ को संसाधित नहीं कर सकता है, जो नियंत्रण जैसी जटिल घटनाओं को संभालने की अनुमति देता है। इस काम में, हम UDepLambda, UD के लिए एक शब्दार्थ इंटरफ़ेस पेश करते हैं, जो प्राकृतिक भाषा को लगभग भाषा-स्वतंत्र फैशन में तार्किक रूपों में मैप करता है और निर्भरता रेखांकन को संसाधित कर सकता है। हम Freebase के खिलाफ सवाल का जवाब देने पर प्रयोग करते हैं और बहुभाषी मूल्यांकन को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए WebQuestions और GraphQuestions डेटासेट के जर्मन और स्पेनिश अनुवाद प्रदान करते हैं। परिणाम बताते हैं कि UDepLambda भाषाओं और डेटासेट में मजबूत बेसलाइन को मात देता है। अंग्रेजी के लिए, यह GraphQuestions पर अत्याधुनिक पर 4.9 F1 अंक सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Универсальные зависимости (UD) предлагают единообразное межъязыковое синтаксическое представление с целью продвижения многоязычных приложений. Недавняя работа показывает, что семантический разбор может быть выполнен путем преобразования синтаксических зависимостей в логические формы. Однако эта работа ограничена английским языком и не может обрабатывать графики зависимости, которые позволяют обрабатывать сложные явления, такие как управление. В этой работе мы вводим UDepLambda, семантический интерфейс для UD, который практически независимо от языка отображает естественный язык в логические формы и может обрабатывать графики зависимостей. Мы проводим эксперименты по ответам на вопросы в отношении Freebase и предоставляем переводы на немецкий и испанский языки наборов данных WebQuestions и GraphQuestions для облегчения многоязычной оценки. Результаты показывают, что UDepLambda превосходит сильные базовые линии для разных языков и наборов данных. Для английского языка он достигает улучшения в 4,9 пункта F1 по сравнению с современным GraphQuestions.', 'ga': 'Tairgeann Spleáchas Uilíoch (UD) ionadaíocht chomhréire tras-teangach aonfhoirmeach, agus é mar aidhm feidhmchláir ilteangacha a chur chun cinn. Léiríonn obair le déanaí gur féidir parsáil shéimeantach a dhéanamh trí spleáchais chomhréire a athrú go foirmeacha loighciúla. Mar sin féin, tá an obair seo teoranta don Bhéarla, agus ní féidir graif spleáchais a phróiseáil, a cheadaíonn feiniméin chasta mar rialú a láimhseáil. San obair seo, tugaimid isteach UDepLambda, comhéadan séimeantach do UD, a mhapálann teanga nádúrtha go foirmeacha loighciúla ar bhealach nach bhfuil neamhspleách ar an teanga agus is féidir graif spleáchais a phróiseáil. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar fhreagraí ceisteanna in aghaidh Freebase agus soláthraímid aistriúcháin Gearmáinise agus Spáinnise ar na tacair sonraí WebQuestions agus GraphQuestions chun meastóireacht ilteangach a éascú. Léiríonn torthaí go sáraíonn UDepLambda bunlínte láidre trasna teangacha agus tacair shonraí. Maidir leis an mBéarla, baineann sé feabhas 4.9 pointe F1 amach thar an stát-de-aimseartha ar GraphQuestions.', 'el': 'Οι καθολικές εξαρτήσεις προσφέρουν μια ομοιόμορφη διασταυρούμενη συντακτική αναπαράσταση, με στόχο την προώθηση πολύγλωσσων εφαρμογών. Πρόσφατες εργασίες δείχνουν ότι η σημασιολογική ανάλυση μπορεί να επιτευχθεί με τη μετατροπή συντακτικών εξαρτήσεων σε λογικές μορφές. Ωστόσο, η εργασία αυτή περιορίζεται στα αγγλικά και δεν μπορεί να επεξεργαστεί γραφήματα εξάρτησης, τα οποία επιτρέπουν τον χειρισμό πολύπλοκων φαινομένων όπως ο έλεγχος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια σημασιολογική διεπαφή για το το οποίο χαρτογραφεί τη φυσική γλώσσα σε λογικές μορφές με έναν σχεδόν γλωσσικό τρόπο και μπορεί να επεξεργαστεί γραφήματα εξάρτησης. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων έναντι της Freebase και παρέχουμε γερμανικές και ισπανικές μεταφράσεις των συνόλων δεδομένων WebQuestions και GraphQuestions για να διευκολύνουμε την πολύγλωσση αξιολόγηση. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το UDepLambda ξεπερνά τις ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης σε όλες τις γλώσσες και σύνολα δεδομένων. Για τα αγγλικά, επιτυγχάνει μια βελτίωση σημείου 4.9 έναντι της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στις ερωτήσεις γραφήματος.', 'hu': 'Az univerzális függőségek (UD) egységes, többnyelvű szintaktikus ábrázolást kínálnak, a többnyelvű alkalmazások fejlesztése érdekében. A legutóbbi munkák azt mutatják, hogy a szemantikai elemzés elvégezhető a szintaktikus függőségek logikai formákká alakításával. Ez a munka azonban az angolra korlátozódik, és nem dolgozhatja fel a függőségi grafikonokat, amelyek lehetővé teszik a komplex jelenségek kezelését, mint például az irányítás. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk az UDepLambda-t, az UD szemantikai interfészét, amely szinte nyelvfüggetlen módon térképezi a természetes nyelvet logikai formákhoz, és függőségi grafikonokat képes feldolgozni. Kísérleteket végzünk a Freebase ellen a kérdések megválaszolására, és a WebQuestions és GraphQuestions adatkészletek német és spanyol fordítását biztosítjuk a többnyelvű értékelés megkönnyítése érdekében. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az UDepLambda nyelveken és adatkészleteken felülmúlja az erős alapvonalakat. Az angol nyelven 4,9 F1 pont javulást ér el a GraphQuestions legkorszerűbb technológiájához képest.', 'ka': 'უნივერსალური განსაზღვრებულებები (UD) იყენებს უნივერტური მრავალური სინტაქტიური გამოსახულება, რაც მრავალური გამოსახულებების მიზეზით. მიმდინარე სამუშაო მუშაობა ჩვენებს, რომ სინტაქტიკური დაახლოების შესაძლებლობად სემონტიკური პარასტი შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ. მაგრამ ეს სამუშაო ინგლისურად დაფარდება და არ შეუძლიათ გავაპროცესოთ დაფარდებული გრაფიკები, რომელიც შეუძლიათ კომპლექციური ფენომენების გა ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ UDepLambda, სემენტიკი ინტერფექტი UD-სთვის, რომელიც სახური ენათის ლოგიკური ფორმებზე გადაწყენება და შეგვიძლია პროცესოთ დაახლოების გრაფიკები. ჩვენ ვიყავით ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც Freebase-ის გარეშე და გერმანური და სპანელი გარეშე WebQuestions და GraphQuestions მონაცემების დანაცემების მრავალური განსაზღვრებას. შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ UDepLambda ძალიან ძალიან ბაზის ხაზები ენების და მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში. ანგლისურად, ის მიიღება 4.9 F1 წერტილის შესაძლებლობა გრაფიკითხვების განმავლობაზე.', 'it': "Le dipendenze universali (UD) offrono una rappresentazione sintattica trasversale uniforme, con l'obiettivo di far avanzare le applicazioni multilingue. Un lavoro recente mostra che l'analisi semantica può essere eseguita trasformando dipendenze sintattiche in forme logiche. Tuttavia, questo lavoro è limitato all'inglese e non può elaborare grafici di dipendenza, che consentono di gestire fenomeni complessi come il controllo. In questo lavoro presentiamo UDepLambda, un'interfaccia semantica per UD, che mappa il linguaggio naturale alle forme logiche in modo quasi indipendente dal linguaggio e può elaborare grafici di dipendenza. Eseguiamo esperimenti sulla risposta alle domande contro Freebase e forniamo traduzioni in tedesco e spagnolo dei dataset WebQuestions e GraphQuestions per facilitare la valutazione multilingue. I risultati mostrano che UDepLambda supera le solide linee di base tra lingue e set di dati. Per l'inglese, ottiene un miglioramento di 4,9 punti F1 rispetto allo stato dell'arte su GraphQuestions.", 'lt': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) siūlo vienodą tarpkalbinį sintaksinį atstovavimą siekiant skatinti daugiakalbes programas. Neseniai atliktas darbas rodo, kad semantinis analizavimas gali būti atliekamas transformuojant sintaktines priklausomybes į logiškas formas. However, this work is limited to English, and cannot process dependency graphs, which allow handling complex phenomena such as control.  Šiame darbe pristatome UDepLambda, semantinę UD sąsają, kuri žemėlapizuoja natūralią kalbą loginėms formoms beveik nepriklausomai nuo kalbos ir gali apdoroti priklausomybės grafikus. Atliekame eksperimentus, susijusius su atsakymais į klausimus prieš Freebase ir pateikiame internetinių klausimų ir grafinių klausimų duomenų rinkinių vertimus vokiečių ir ispanų kalbomis, kad palengvintume daugiakalbį vertinimą. Rezultatai rodo, kad UDepLambda viršija tvirtas bazines linijas kalbose ir duomenų rinkiniuose. Anglų kalba ji siekia 4,9 F1 punkto pagerėjimo, palyginti su naujausia grafinių klausimų tema.', 'mk': 'Универзалните зависности (УД) нудат униформна прекујазична синтактичка претстава, со цел напредок на мултијазичните апликации. Неодамнешната работа покажува дека семантичното анализирање може да се изврши со трансформација на синтактичките зависности на логични форми. Сепак, оваа работа е ограничена на англиски и не може да процесира графики за зависност, кои овозможуваат решавање на комплексни феномени како што е контролата. Во оваа работа, ја воведуваме УДЕПЛАМБДА, семантичен интерфејс за УД, кој го мапира природниот јазик на логични форми на речиси јазички независен начин и може да процесира графики за зависност. Ние спроведуваме експерименти за одговори на прашања против Freebase и обезбедуваме германски и шпански преведувања на веб прашањата и графпрашањата за олеснување на мултијазичката проценка. Резултатите покажуваат дека UDepLambda ги надминува силните бази низ јазиците и датотеките. За англиски, истиот постигнува подобрување од 4,9 Ф1 поени во однос на најновата технологија во врска со графпрашањата.', 'kk': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) көптілік тілдер қолданбаларын жақсарту үшін бірнеше көптілік синтактикалық түрінде көрсетіледі. Жуырдағы жұмыс синтактикалық тәуелдіктерді логикалық пішімдерге аударып семантикалық талдау мүмкін болады. Бұл жұмыс ағылшын тіліне шектелген және тәуелсіздік графиктерді өзгертуге болмайды. Бұл жұмыс, басқару секілді комплекс пайдалануларды қамтамасыз ету Бұл жұмыстың ішінде UDepLambda, UD үшін семантикалық интерфейсін таңдап береміз. Бұл табиғи тілді тілдерге логикалық пішімдерге сәйкес тілдердің тәуелсіз тәуелсіздік графикалық Біз Freebase қарсы сұрақ жауап беру және неміс және испан тілдерінің WebQuestions және GraphQuestions деректер жиындарын бірнеше тілдерді оқиға көмектесу үшін аударып жатқан тәжірибелерін Нәтижелер UDepLambda тілдер мен деректер қорларының күш негізгі сызықтарын жасайды. Ағылшын тілінде, граф сұрақтарының күйінде 4,9 F1 нүктесін жақсарту үшін жеткізеді.', 'ml': 'യുഡി (യുഡി) ഒരു യൂണിഫോം ക്രില്\u200dലിങ്ക് സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക് പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനുമ അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കാന്\u200d  എന്നാലും ഈ ജോലി ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്ക് പരിധിയാണ്. ആശ്രയിച്ച ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല, അത് നിയന്ത്രണ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, യുഡിയുടെ ഒരു സെമാന്റിക്ക് ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്റ്റ് യുഡിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ മാനപ്രകാരം ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d ര ഫ്രീബാസിനെതിരെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d സ്പാനിഷ് പരിശോധനങ്ങളും വെബ്ചില അന്ത്യഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് UDepLambda ഭാഷകളിലും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും ശക്തമായ ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ ഇംഗ്ലീഷിന് വേണ്ടി, ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കാര്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200dറെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് 4', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний хэрэглэмжүүдийг улам дэвшүүлэх зорилго дэвшүүлэхэд ертөнцийн хамааралтай байдал (UD) нэгтгэл хэлний шинжлэх ухааны үзүүлэлт гаргадаг. Саяхан ажлын ажил нь синтактикийн хамааралтай байдлыг логикийн хэлбэрүүд руу шилжүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Гэхдээ энэ ажил Англи хэл хязгаарлагддаг. Харин хамааралтай график үйлдвэрлэж чадахгүй. Энэ нь хяналт гэх мэт комплекс явдалуудыг удирдах боломжтой. Энэ ажлын тулд бид UD-ын semantic интерфейс UDepLambda-г танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь байгалийн хэл нь бараг хэл-ээс хамааралгүй хэлбэрээр логикийн хэлбэрээр зурагтай, хамааралтай график болох юм. Бид Freebase-ын эсрэг асуултын туршилтыг хийж, Герман болон Испанийг WebQuestions болон GraphQuestions өгөгдлийн санг олон хэлний үнэлгээг дэмжихийн тулд олон хэлний үнэлгээг дэмжих боломжтой. Үүний үр дүнд UDepLambda хэл, өгөгдлийн санд хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргадаг. Англи хэлний хувьд энэ нь график асуултуудын хувьд 4.9 F1 цэгийн сайжруулалт гаргадаг.', 'mt': 'Id-Dipendenzi Universali (UD) joffru rappreżentanza sintattika translingwi uniformi, bil-għan li jiġu avvanzati applikazzjonijiet multilingwi. Xogħol reċenti juri li l-analiżi semantika tista’ ssir billi d-dipendenzi sintetiċi jiġu ttrasformati f’forom loġiċi. Madankollu, dan ix-xogħol huwa limitat għall-Ingliż, u ma jistax jipproċessa grafiċi tad-dipendenza, li jippermettu l-immaniġġjar ta’ fenomeni kumplessi bħall-kontroll. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nintroduċu UDepLambda, interfaċċja semantika għall-UD, li timmappa l-lingwa naturali għal forom loġiċi b’mod kważi indipendenti mil-lingwa u tista’ tipproċessa grafiċi tad-dipendenza. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti dwar it-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet kontra Freebase u nagħtu traduzzjonijiet Ġermaniżi u Spanjoli tas-settijiet tad-dejta dwar il-mistoqsijiet tal-internet u l-mistoqsijiet tal-grafika biex tiġi ffaċilitata l-evalwazzjoni multilingwi. Ir-riżultati juru li UDepLambda jaqbeż il-linji bażi b’saħħithom fil-lingwi u s-settijiet tad-dejta. For English, it achieves a 4.9 F1 point improvement over the state-of-the-art on GraphQuestions.', 'pl': 'Uniwersalne zależności (UD) oferują jednolitą, wielojęzyczną reprezentację składni, w celu rozwoju wielojęzycznych aplikacji. Ostatnie prace pokazują, że parsowanie semantyczne może być realizowane poprzez przekształcenie zależności składni w formy logiczne. Praca ta ogranicza się jednak do języka angielskiego i nie może przetwarzać wykresów zależności, które pozwalają na obsługę złożonych zjawisk, takich jak sterowanie. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy UDepLambda, interfejs semantyczny dla UD, który mapuje język naturalny do form logicznych w sposób niemal niezależny od języka i potrafi przetwarzać wykresy zależności. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty dotyczące odpowiedzi na pytania przeciwko Freebase oraz dostarczamy niemieckie i hiszpańskie tłumaczenia zbiorów danych WebQuestions i GraphQuestions, aby ułatwić wielojęzyczną ocenę. Wyniki pokazują, że UDepLambda przewyższa silne linie bazowe w językach i zbiorach danych. W przypadku angielskiego osiąga on poprawę punktów 4,9 F1 w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi w GraphQuestions.', 'no': 'Universell avhengighet (UD) tilbyr ein uniform krysspråkssintaktisk representasjon med målet for å utvikla fleirspråksprogram. Nyleg arbeidet viser at semantisk tolking kan fullførast ved å transformera syntaktiske avhengighet til logiske skjemar. Dette arbeidet er imidlertid begrenset til engelsk, og kan ikkje handtera avhengighetsgrafikk, som tillater å handtera komplekse fenomenar som kontroll. I denne arbeida introduserer vi UDepLambda, eit semantisk grensesnitt for UD, som karterer naturspråk til logiske formar i nesten språk-uavhengig måte og kan handtera avhengighetsgrafikk. Vi utfører eksperimenter på spørsmål som svarar mot Freebase og gjer tysk og spansk omsetjingar av WebQuestions og GraphQuestions-dataset for å gjere tilgjengeleg fleirspråk evaluering. Resultat viser at UDepLambda utfører sterke baselinjer over språk og datasett. For engelsk oppnår det eit forbedring av 4,9 F1 punkt over kunsten på GraphQuestions.', 'ro': 'Dependențele universale (UD) oferă o reprezentare sintactică uniformă translingvă, cu scopul de a avansa aplicații multilingve. Lucrările recente arată că parsarea semantică poate fi realizată prin transformarea dependențelor sintactice în forme logice. Cu toate acestea, această lucrare este limitată la limba engleză și nu poate procesa grafice de dependență, care permit manipularea fenomenelor complexe, cum ar fi controlul. În această lucrare, introducem UDepLambda, o interfață semantică pentru UD, care cartografiază limbajul natural la formele logice într-un mod aproape independent de limbaj și poate procesa grafice de dependență. Realizăm experimente de răspuns la întrebări împotriva Freebase și oferim traduceri germane și spaniole ale seturilor de date WebQuestions și GraphQuestions pentru a facilita evaluarea multilingvă. Rezultatele arată că UDepLambda depășește liniile de bază puternice în limbi și seturi de date. Pentru limba engleză, realizează o îmbunătățire de 4,9 puncte F1 față de starea de artă pe GraphQuestions.', 'si': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) එකම භාෂාවක් සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා, ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් විශේ අලුත් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා සංකේතික විශේෂතා නමුත්, මේ වැඩ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලට සීමාවිත වෙලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, ඒ වගේම පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් ප මේ වැඩේදී, අපි UDepLambda වෙනුවෙන්, UD වෙනුවෙන් සිමාන්තික අන්තර්ජනයක්, ඒක ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ලොකික වර්ගයකට සැකසුම් කරනවා වගේම අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න සහ ජර්මාන් සහ ස්පැනිස් භාෂාව සඳහා WebQuery සහ Gra ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ UDepLambda භාෂාවය සහ දත්ත සැට් වලින් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න. ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන්, ඒක 4.9 F1 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ස්ථානයේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව ප්\u200dරවේශනයක්', 'sr': 'Univerzalne zavisnosti (UD) nude uniformnu cross-lingual syntactic representation, sa ciljem unapređenja multijezičkih aplikacija. Poslednji rad pokazuje da se semantičko analiziranje može postići transformacijom sintaktičkih zavisnosti na logičke oblike. Međutim, ovaj rad je ograničen na engleski jezik, i ne može da obradi grafike zavisnosti, koje omogućavaju rešenje kompleksnih fenomena poput kontrole. U ovom poslu predstavljamo UDepLambdu, semantičku interfejsu za UD, koja mapira prirodni jezik logičkim oblicima na skoro nezavisnom jeziku i može procesirati grafike zavisnosti. Izvodimo eksperimente na pitanju odgovarajući protiv Freebase i pružamo njemačke i španjolske prevode podataka WebQuestions i GraphQuestions za olakšanje multijezičke procjene. Rezultati pokazuju da UDepLambda iznosi jake osnovne linije na jezicima i setima podataka. Za engleski, postiže poboljšanje 4,9 F1 tačke oko države umjetnosti na GraphQuestionima.', 'so': "Summanaanta caalamiga ah (UD) waxay u fidiyaan muuqashada koowaad oo luuqadaha kala duduwan, kaas oo la xiriira horumarinta codsiyada luuqadaha kala duduwan. Shaqoda la soo dhowaaday waxay muuqataa in baarlamaanka semantika lagu sameyn karo, in lagu beddelo noocyo xirfadeed. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shuqulkaasu waxay ku xadan tahay ingiriisiga, mana sameyn karo tallaabooyin ku xiran, taas oo u ogolaan karta xafiiska waxyaabaha adag sida kontrollka. Shaqadan ayaan UDepLambda u soo bandhignaynaa, taas oo u sawiraa luqada dabiicadda ah oo ku qoran qaab caadi ah oo luuqad xor ah, waxaana sameyn karnaa tallaabo ku xiran. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan su'aalaha ka jawaabta Freebase waxaana siinaynaa tarjumaadka Jarmalka iyo Isbanish ee Internetka Questions iyo GraphQuestions si ay u fududeeyaan qiimeynta luuqadaha kala duduwan. Midhaha resultadu waxay muuqataa in UDepLambda uu sameeyo koorasyo xoog leh oo ku qoran luuqadaha iyo danbiyada. For English, it achieves a 4.9 F1 point improvement over the state-of-the-art on GraphQuestions.", 'sv': 'Universal Dependences (UD) erbjuder en enhetlig flerspråkig syntaktisk representation, i syfte att främja flerspråkiga applikationer. Senaste arbeten visar att semantisk tolkning kan utföras genom att omvandla syntaktiska beroenden till logiska former. Detta arbete är dock begränsat till engelska och kan inte bearbeta beroendegrafer, som tillåter hantering av komplexa fenomen som kontroll. I detta arbete introducerar vi UDepLambda, ett semantiskt gränssnitt för UD, som kartlägger naturligt språk till logiska former på ett nästan språkoberoende sätt och kan bearbeta beroendegrafer. Vi utför experiment på frågesvar mot Freebase och tillhandahåller tyska och spanska översättningar av WebQuestions och GraphQuestions dataset för att underlätta flerspråkig utvärdering. Resultaten visar att UDepLambda överträffar starka baslinjer över språk och datauppsättningar. För engelska uppnår den en 4,9 F1 poäng förbättring jämfört med state-of-the-art på GraphQuestions.', 'ms': 'Dependensi Universal (UD) menawarkan perwakilan sintaktik saling bahasa seragam, dengan tujuan melangkah aplikasi berbilang bahasa. Kerja baru-baru ini menunjukkan penghuraian semantik boleh dilakukan dengan mengubah dependensi sintaktik ke bentuk logik. Namun, kerja ini terbatas kepada bahasa Inggeris, dan tidak dapat memproses graf dependensi, yang membolehkan mengendalikan fenomena kompleks seperti kawalan. Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan UDepLambda, antaramuka semantik untuk UD, yang memetakan bahasa alam kepada bentuk logik dalam cara hampir bebas bahasa dan boleh memproses graf dependensi. Kami melakukan eksperimen mengenai jawapan soalan terhadap Freebase dan menyediakan terjemahan Jerman dan Sepanyol bagi Set data soalan web dan GraphQuestions untuk memudahkan penilaian berbilang bahasa. Results show that UDepLambda outperforms strong baselines across languages and datasets.  Untuk bahasa Inggeris, ia mencapai penambahan 4.9 F1 titik atas kemajuan dalam soalan GraphQuestions.', 'ta': 'பொதுவான சார்புகள் (UD) பல மொழி பயன்பாடுகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்காக ஒரு uniform cross-மொழி ஒத்திசைவு பிரதிநிதியை வழங்குகிறது. அண்மையில் சார்ந்த சார்புகளை தொடர்ந்து சார்ந்த வடிவங்களுக்கு மாற்றியமைக்கும் பொழுது சமாதாரண பாசிங்கு மு ஆனால் இந்த வேலை ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு எல்லாம் உள்ளது, சார்ந்த வரைபடங்களை செயல்படுத்த முடியாது, அது கட்டுப்பாட்டை போன்ற சி இந்த வேலையில், UDepLambda, UD க்கான ஒரு பாதுகாரண இடைமுகத்தை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், அது இயல்பான மொழியை தொழில்நுட்ப வடிவத்தில் வரைபடமாகும் மொ நாங்கள் கேள்விகளின் பதில் அளிக்கையை செய்து ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் மொழிப்பெயர்ப்பை வழங்குகிறோம் மற்றும் வலை கேள்விகள் மற்று @ info ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு, அது ஒரு 4.9 F1 புள்ளியை மேம்படுத்தும் வரைகலை கேள்விகளின் நிலையில் மேம்படுத்தும்.', 'ur': 'Universal Dependencies اچھا کام دکھاتا ہے کہ سیمنٹی پارسینگ کو منطقی فرموں میں تبدیل کر کے کامل کر سکتا ہے۔ لیکن یہ کام انگلیسی سے محدود ہے، اور اپنا اعتمادی گراف کا پیدائش نہیں کرسکتا، جسے پیچیدہ اتفاقات کی مدد کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے جیسے کنٹرول. اس کام میں ہم UDepLambda کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، UD کے لئے ایک سیمنٹی انٹرنیفس، جسے طبیعی زبان کی منطقی زبان کی تصاویر کرتا ہے، تقریباً زبان کے غیر مستقل طریقے میں اور اعتباری گراف کی پردازش کرسکتا ہے. ہم فریبنس کے مقابلہ میں جواب دینے کے لئے سوال پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور جرمانی اور اسپانیایی کا ویب سوال اور گراف سوال ڈیٹ سٹ کا ترجمہ دیتے ہیں کہ بہت سی زبان کا ارزش آسان کریں۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ UDepLambda زبانوں اور ڈیٹ سٹوں میں طاقت والی بنسٹ لینڈ کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ انگلیسی کے لئے، یہ ایک 4.9 F1 پوینٹ پر گراف سؤال کے معاملہ میں آرتی کی حالت پر اضافہ ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': "Umumiy qoʻllanmalar (UD) bir necha tillar uchun bir xil tilni koʻpaytirish uchun uniformi qoʻllaniladi. Yaqinda ishni ko'rsatadi, semantik parsing imkoniyatlarini logical formatlariga oʻzgartirish orqali bajarishi mumkin. Lekin, bu ishni ingliz tilidagi chegara bo'lgan va ishlash qo'llanmagan murakkab narsalarni boshqarish imkoniyatlariga ruxsat beradi. Bu ishda biz UDepLambda, UD uchun semantik interfeys (UDepLambda) ko'rsatumiz. Bu tilning asosiy tilni o'zgartirish uchun logical shakllarini qaraydi. Bu tilda qo'llanmagan foydalanish mumkin va qo'llanmalar grafiklarini bajarishi mumkin. Biz Freebasega javob beruvchi savolni bajaramiz va veb- sahifa va Grafik savollari maʼlumotlar tarjimalarini ko'plab tilni qiymatga foydalanish uchun Jarmal va Ispanchaga tarjima qilamiz. @ info Ingliz tilida, bu Graphras soʻrovlari davlatida 4.9 F1 nuqtni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Sự phụ thuộc chung (UD) cung cấp một đại diện cú pháp ngôn ngữ đồng nhất với mục đích phát triển các ứng dụng đa dạng. Công trình gần đây cho thấy phân tích ngữ pháp có thể được hoàn thành bằng cách biến các mối quan hệ cú pháp thành dạng logic. Tuy nhiên, công việc này chỉ có nước Anh, và không thể xử lý các biểu đồ phụ thuộc, cho phép xử lý các hiện tượng phức tạp như kiểm soát. Trong công việc này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu UDLambda, một giao diện ngữ pháp của UD, nó sẽ vẽ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên theo một cách gần độc lập ngôn ngữ và xử lý các biểu đồ phụ thuộc. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm trả lời câu hỏi đối với Freebase và cung cấp bản dịch Đức và Tây Ban Nha của các tập tin WebQuest và Grapherils để Dễ dàng đánh giá đa dạng. Kết quả cho thấy UDEPLambda vượt qua nhiều căn cứ dài ngôn ngữ và truyền dữ liệu. Đối với người Anh, nó đạt đến một điểm 4.9 F1 cải thiện hơn cả trạng thái nghệ thuật trong đồ họa.', 'bg': 'Универсалните зависимости (UD) предлагат еднакво междуезично синтактично представяне с цел напредване на многоезичните приложения. Последната работа показва, че семантичното анализиране може да се извърши чрез трансформиране на синтактични зависимости в логически форми. Тази работа обаче е ограничена до английски език и не може да обработва графики за зависимост, които позволяват справяне със сложни явления като контрол. В тази работа ние въвеждаме семантичен интерфейс за който картографира естествения език към логически форми по почти независим от езика начин и може да обработва зависимости графики. Извършваме експерименти с отговор на въпроси срещу Фрийбаз и предоставяме немски и испански преводи на наборите от данни за улесняване на многоезичната оценка. Резултатите показват, че UDepLambda превъзхожда силните базови линии в езиците и наборите от данни. За английския език тя постига подобрение с 4,9 точки спрямо най-съвременните в Графичните въпроси.', 'hr': 'Univerzalne zavisnosti (UD) nude uniformnu međujezičku sintaktičku predstavu s ciljem unapređenja višejezičkih primjena. Posljednji rad pokazuje da se semantičko analiziranje može postići transformacijom sintaktičkih zavisnosti na logičke oblike. Međutim, ovaj rad je ograničen na engleski jezik i ne može obraditi grafike zavisnosti koje omogućavaju rješavanje složenih fenomena poput kontrole. U ovom poslu predstavljamo UDepLambda, semantički interfejs za UD, koji mapira prirodni jezik logičkim oblicima na skoro nezavisnom jeziku i može obraditi grafike zavisnosti. Mi izvodimo eksperimente na pitanju odgovarajući protiv Freebase i pružamo njemačke i španjolske prevode podataka WebQuestions i GraphQuestions kako bi olakšali multijezičku procjenu. Rezultati pokazuju da UDepLambda iznosi jake osnovne linije na jezicima i podacima. Za engleski, postiže poboljšanje tačke 4,9 F1 zbog države umjetnosti na GraphQuestionima.', 'nl': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) bieden een uniforme cross-lingual syntactische weergave, met als doel meertalige toepassingen te bevorderen. Recent werk toont aan dat semantische parsing kan worden bereikt door syntactische afhankelijkheden te transformeren naar logische vormen. Dit werk is echter beperkt tot het Engels en kan afhankelijkheidsgrafieken niet verwerken, waardoor complexe fenomenen zoals controle kunnen worden behandeld. In dit werk introduceren we UDepLambda, een semantische interface voor UD, die natuurlijke taal bijna taalonafhankelijk in kaart brengt aan logische vormen en afhankelijkheidsgrafieken kan verwerken. We voeren experimenten uit met het beantwoorden van vragen tegen Freebase en leveren Duitse en Spaanse vertalingen van de WebQuestions en GraphQuestions datasets om meertalige evaluatie te vergemakkelijken. De resultaten tonen aan dat UDepLambda beter presteert dan sterke baselines in talen en datasets. Voor het Engels bereikt het een 4.9 F1 puntverbetering ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art op GraphQuestions.', 'da': 'Universal Dependences (UD) tilbyder en ensartet tværsproget syntaktisk repræsentation med det formål at fremme flersprogede applikationer. Seneste arbejde viser, at semantisk parsing kan udføres ved at omdanne syntaktiske afhængigheder til logiske former. Dette arbejde er dog begrænset til engelsk og kan ikke behandle afhængighedsgrafer, som tillader håndtering af komplekse fænomener som kontrol. I dette arbejde introducerer vi UDepLambda, en semantisk grænseflade for UD, som kortlægger naturligt sprog til logiske former på en næsten sproguafhængig måde og kan behandle afhængighedsgrafer. Vi udfører eksperimenter med spørgsmål besvarelse mod Freebase og leverer tyske og spanske oversættelser af WebQuestions og GraphQuestions datasæt for at lette flersproget evaluering. Resultaterne viser, at UDepLambda overgår stærke basislinjer på tværs af sprog og datasæt. For engelsk opnår det en 4,9 F1 point forbedring i forhold til state-of-the-art på GraphQuestions.', 'de': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) bieten eine einheitliche syntaktische Darstellung, mit dem Ziel, mehrsprachige Anwendungen voranzutreiben. Aktuelle Arbeiten zeigen, dass semantisches Parsen durch Umwandlung syntaktischer Abhängigkeiten in logische Formen erreicht werden kann. Diese Arbeit beschränkt sich jedoch auf Englisch und kann Abhängigkeitsgrafiken nicht verarbeiten, die die Handhabung komplexer Phänomene wie Kontrolle ermöglichen. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir UDepLambda vor, eine semantische Schnittstelle für UD, die natürliche Sprache auf logische Formen nahezu sprachunabhängig abbildet und Abhängigkeitsgrafiken verarbeiten kann. Wir führen Experimente zur Beantwortung von Fragen gegen Freebase durch und liefern deutsche und spanische Übersetzungen der WebQuestions und GraphQuestions Datensätze, um eine mehrsprachige Auswertung zu ermöglichen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass UDepLambda starke Baselines über Sprachen und Datensätze hinweg übertrifft. Für Englisch erreicht es eine 4,9 F1 Punktverbesserung gegenüber dem Stand der Technik auf GraphQuestions.', 'id': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) offer a uniform cross-lingual syntactic representation, with the aim of advancing multilingual applications.  Pekerjaan baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa penghuraian semantis dapat dilakukan dengan mengubah dependensi sintaks ke bentuk logis. Namun, pekerjaan ini terbatas pada bahasa Inggris, dan tidak dapat memproses grafik dependensi, yang memungkinkan menangani fenomena kompleks seperti kontrol. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memperkenalkan UDepLambda, antaramuka semantis untuk UD, yang memetakan bahasa alam ke bentuk logis dalam cara hampir bebas bahasa dan dapat memproses grafik dependensi. Kami melakukan eksperimen dalam pertanyaan menjawab terhadap Freebase dan menyediakan terjemahan Jerman dan Spanyol dari WebQuestions dan GraphQuestions dataset untuk memudahkan evaluasi multibahasa. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa UDepLambda melebihi garis dasar yang kuat melalui bahasa dan set data. Untuk bahasa Inggris, ia mencapai 4.9 F1 titik peningkatan atas state-of-the-art dalam GraphQuestions.', 'ko': 'UD(Universal Dependencies)는 다국어 적용을 추진하기 위해 통일된 다국어 문법 표현을 제공한다.최근 연구에 따르면 의미 분석은 문법 의존 관계를 논리적 형식으로 전환시켜 완성할 수 있다.그러나 이 작업은 영어에만 한정되어 있어서 의존 관계도를 처리할 수 없다. 의존 관계도는 복잡한 현상, 예를 들어 제어를 처리할 수 있기 때문이다.이 작업에서 우리는 거의 언어와 무관한 방식으로 자연 언어를 논리적 형식으로 비추고 의존 관계도를 처리할 수 있는 UDepLambda를 소개했다.우리는 Freebase에서 퀴즈 실험을 하고 웹Questions와GraphQuestions 데이터 집합의 독일어와 스페인어 번역을 제공하여 다국어 평가를 추진한다.그 결과 UDepLambda는 언어와 데이터 집합에서 강한 기선보다 우수한 모습을 보였다.영어는 도형 문제에서 최신 수준보다 4.9점 높아졌다.', 'fa': 'وابستگی جهانی (UD) یک نمایش سازمانی متوسط زبان یونیفرم را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، با هدف افزایش کاربردهای متوسط زبان. کارهای اخیرا نشان می دهد که توسط تغییر وابستگی\u200cهای سنتاکتیک به فرم\u200cهای منطقی بازرسی semantic can be accomplished by transforming syntactic dependencies to logical forms. ولی این کار به انگلیسی محدود است، و نمی تواند گرافیک بستگی را فرایند کند، که اجازه می دهد به مدیریت پدیده های پیچیده مانند کنترل. در این کار، ما UDepLambda را معرفی می کنیم، یک منطقه semantic برای UD، که زبان طبیعی را به فرم های منطقی در یک مدت تقریباً مستقل به زبان و می تواند گرافهای بستگی را فرایند کند. ما آزمایش\u200cها را در مورد جواب سوال در مقابل Freebase انجام می\u200cدهیم و ترجمه\u200cهای آلمانی و اسپانیایی\u200cها را از سؤال\u200cهای وب و گراف سوال\u200cها برای آسانی ارزیابی\u200cهای بسیاری زبان\u200cها فراهم می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که UDepLambda خط\u200cهای بنیادی قوی را در زبان\u200cها و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد. به عنوان انگلیسی، آن یک نقطه ۴.۹ اف ۱ بر روی ایالت هنر در مورد سوالات گراف رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Kutegemea ulimwengu kote (UD) hutoa uwakilishi wa muungano wa lugha tofauti, kwa lengo la kukuza matumizi ya lugha mbalimbali. Kazi ya hivi karibuni inaonyesha kuwa wimbo wa kimapenzi unaweza kufanikiwa kwa kubadilisha kitendo cha syntactic kutegemea matumizi ya kisiasa. Hata hivyo, kazi hii imezungukwa kwa Kiingereza, na haiwezi kuchukua picha za kutegemea, ambazo zinaruhusu kukabiliana na hali tete kama vile udhibiti. Katika kazi hii, tunautambulisha UDepLambda, sura ya sekunde ya UD, ambayo inaorodhesha lugha ya asili kwa namna ya kujitegemea lugha na inaweza kuchukua picha za kutegemea. We perform experiments on question answering against Freebase and provide German and Spanish translations of the WebQuestions and GraphQuestions datasets to facilitate multilingual evaluation.  Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa UDepLambda inaonyesha misingi yenye nguvu katika lugha na seti za data. Kwa Kiingereza, inafanikiwa kuongezeka kwa pointi 4.9 F1 juu ya hali ya sanaa inayohusiana na maswali ya Taifa.', 'af': "Universele afhanklikhede (UD) bring 'n eenvoudige kruistale sintakteel voorstelling, met die doel van versterking van multitaalse toepassings. Onlangse werk wys dat semantiese verwerking kan voldoen word deur sintaktieke afhanklikhede na logiese vorms te verander. Hierdie werk is tog beperk na Engels, en kan nie afhanklikheidsgrafe proses nie, wat toelaat om komplekse fenomene soos beheer te behandel nie. In hierdie werk, introduseer ons UDepLambda, 'n semantiese koppelvlak vir UD, wat die natuurlike taal na logiese vorms in 'n amper taal-afhanklike modus kaart en kan verander afhanklikheidsgrafe. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op vraag antwoord teen Freebase en verskaf Duitse en Spaanse vertalings van die Webvraag en GraphQuestions datastelle om multitaalse evaluering te eenvoudig. Resultate wys dat UDepLambda sterk basisline oor tale en datastelle uitvoer. Vir Engels word dit 'n 4.9 F1 punt verbetering bereik oor die staat van die kuns op GraphQuestions.", 'tr': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) bir çoklu dilli uygulamaları gelişmek amacı için uniform cross-language syntaktik temsil sunuyor. Ýakyndaky işlem senetik analyz edip sintaktik baglançlygy logik formlara üýtgeden edip biler. Ýöne bu işi iňlisçe mümkin edýän we daşarylyk grafiklerini proses edip bilmeýär. Bu işi kontrol ýaly karmaşık parçalary mümkin edip bilýär. Bu işde UDepLambda, UD üçin semantik bir interfeýis görkezilýäris. Bu dogry dili ýakyn dilden howasyz şeklinde laýyk şeklinde görkezilýär we daýyklyk grafiklerini proses edip biler. Biz Freebase bilen jogap bermegi üçin soraglaryň bardygynda experimentalary ýerine ýetirýäris we WebSorularyň we Graf soraglaryň sanlaryny multilingüň deňlenmesine kömek etmek üçin nemes we espaňol terjimelerini berýäris. Netijenler UDepLambda diller we datasetleriň arasynda güýçli baseline çykarýandygyny görkezýär. Iňlisçe, Graf soraglarynyň durumynda 4.9 F1 nokat gelişmegi başarýar.', 'am': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) offer a uniform cross-lingual syntactic representation, with the aim of advancing multilingual applications.  የአሁኑ ሥራ የሴሜንቲክ ማኅበረሰብ ሲንተቲካዊ ተጠቃሚዎች ለሎጂ ፎርማቶች በመለወጥ እንዲፈጸም ያሳያል፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ ሥራ ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ግንኙነት ነው፣ በተማመሳሰል ቀረፎችን መሥራት አይችልም፣ እንደዚህም አስተዳደር የሚደረገውን ሙግት ግንኙነትን ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ UDepLambda፣ ለUD የsemantic interface እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህም የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ለሎጂካዊ ፎቶችን ለመዘርጋት እና በተለየ ቋንቋ-ነፃ ያለ ቋንቋ እና በተደገመ ቀለሞች ለመሥራት ይችላል፡፡ የፍሬባሲን መልስ ላይ የሚመልሱትን ፈተናዎች እና የጀርመን እና ስፓኒስዊ የድምፅ ጥያቄዎችን እና የግንኙነት ጥያቄዎችን በብዙ ቋንቋ ማረጋገጫ ለማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ UDepLambda ቋንቋ እና ዳታተሮች የበረታች መሳሪያዎችን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ እንግሊዘኛ፣ የሥርዓት-የዓላማ ግንኙነት ላይ 4.9 F1 ነጥብ ማድረግ ያገኛል፡፡', 'sq': 'Varësitë Universale (UD) ofrojnë një përfaqësim të uniformuar sintaktik ndërgjuhësor, me qëllim përparimin e aplikimeve shumëgjuhësore. Puna e fundit tregon se analizimi semantik mund të kryehet duke transformuar varësitë sintaktike në forme logjike. Megjithatë, kjo punë është e kufizuar në anglisht dhe nuk mund të procesojë grafikë varësie, që lejojnë trajtimin e fenomeneve komplekse të tilla si kontrolli. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim UDepLambda, një interfaqe semantike për UD, e cila harton gjuhën natyrore në forma logjike në një mënyrë pothuajse të pavarur nga gjuha dhe mund të procesojë grafikë varësie. Ne kryejmë eksperimente mbi përgjigjen e pyetjeve kundër Freebase dhe ofrojmë përkthime gjermane dhe spanjolle të grupeve të dhënash të pyetjeve web dhe GraphQuestions për të lehtësuar vlerësimin shumëgjuhësor. Rezultatet tregojnë se UDepLambda kalon linjat bazë të forta nëpërmjet gjuhëve dhe grupeve të dhënash. Për anglishtin, ajo arrin një përmirësim prej 4.9 F1 pikësh lidhur me gjendjen më të lartë në pyetjet grafike.', 'hy': 'Համաշխարհային կախվածությունները (UD) առաջարկում են հավասար երկլեզու սինտակտիկ ներկայացում, որպեսզի զարգացնեն բազլեզու ծրագրերը: Վերջին աշխատանքը ցույց է տալիս, որ սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը կարող է իրականացվել, փոխելով սինակտիկ կախվածությունները տրամաբանական ձևերի: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս աշխատանքը սահմանափակվում է անգլերենի վրա, և չի կարողանում վերլուծել կախվածության գրաֆիկներ, որոնք թույլ են տալիս վերահսկել բարդ երևույթներ, ինչպիսիք են վերահսկող Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք UDEpԼամբդա, UD-ի սեմանտիկ ինտերֆեյսը, որը քարտեզագրում է բնական լեզուն տրամաբանական ձևերին գրեթե լեզվից անկախ ձևով և կարող է վերլուծել կախվածության գրաֆիկները: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկումներ, որոնք վերաբերում են հարցերին, որոնք պատասխանում են ազատ հիմքի դեմ, և տրամադրում ենք գերմանացի և իսպաներեն Վեբ հարցերի և գրաֆ հարցերի տվյալների համակարգերի թարգմանություններ, որոնք Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ UDEpԼամբդա գերազանցում է լեզուների և տվյալների համակարգերի ուժեղ հիմնական գծերը: Անգլերենի համար այն հասնում է 4.9 F1 կետի բարելավման GrafQ-ի վերաբերյալ լավագույնը:', 'az': "Universal Dependencies (UD) çoxlu dil proqramlarını artırmaq məqsədilə uniform cross-language syntactic representation təklif edir. Son işləri sintaktik bağlılıqları lojik formlara dəyişərək semantik ayırmaq mümkün olduğunu göstərir. Ancaq bu işin İngilizə müəyyən edilmişdir, və bağımlılıq grafiklərini işlədə bilməz ki, bunlar kontrol kimi kompleks fenomenləri idarə edə bilər. Bu işdə UD üçün semantik bir interfejsi UDepLambda'yı tanıdırırıq. Bu, təbiətli dili çox dil-bağımsız şəkildə lojik formlara qoyur və bağımlılılıq grafiklərini işləyə bilər. Biz Freebase-a qarşı cavab vermək və WebQuestions və GraphQuestions veri qurğularını çoxlu dil değerlendirmək üçün Almanca və İspanyolca tərcümələrini təmin edirik. Sonuçlar UDepLambda dillər və veri qutuqları arasında qüvvətli sətirlər istifadə edir. İngilizce dilində, GraphQuestions konusundaki sanatın halı ilə 4.9 F1 nöqtəsini daha yaxşılaşdırmağa başladı.", 'bs': 'Univerzalne zavisnosti (UD) nude uniformnu međujezičku sintaktičku predstavu, u cilju unapređenja višejezičkih aplikacija. Posljednji rad pokazuje da se semantičko analiziranje može postići transformacijom sintaktičkih zavisnosti na logičke oblike. Međutim, ovaj rad je ograničen na engleski jezik i ne može obraditi grafike zavisnosti, koje omogućavaju rješavanje kompleksnih fenomena poput kontrole. U ovom poslu predstavljamo UDepLambda, semantički interfejs za UD, koji mapira prirodni jezik logičkim oblicima na skoro jezično nezavisnom načinu i može procesirati grafike zavisnosti. Mi izvodimo eksperimente na pitanju odgovarajući protiv Freebase i pružamo njemačke i španjolske prevode podataka WebQuestions i GraphQuestions za olakšanje multijezičke procjene. Rezultati pokazuju da UDepLambda iznosi jake osnovne linije na jezicima i podacima. Za engleski, postiže poboljšanje 4,9 F1 tačke na državu umjetnosti o GraphQuestionima.', 'ca': "Les Dependencies Universals (UD) ofereixen una representació sinàctica translingüística uniforme, amb l'objectiu d'avançar aplicacions multilingües. La feina recent mostra que l'analització semàntica es pot aconseguir transformant les dependencies sinàctiques en formes lògiques. Però aquesta feina està limitada a l'anglès i no pot processar gràfics de dependencia, que permeten manejar fenomens complexes com el control. In this work, we introduce UDepLambda, a semantic interface for UD, which maps natural language to logical forms in an almost language-independent fashion and can process dependency graphs.  Fem experiments en resposta a preguntes contra Freebase i proporcionem traduccions alemanes i espanyoles dels conjunts de dades WebQuestions i GraphQuestions per facilitar l'evaluació multilingüe. Els resultats mostran que UDepLambda supera les línies de base fortes a través de llengües i conjunts de dades. Per a l'anglès, aconsegueix una millora de 4,9 punts F1 en comparació amb l'actualitat en GraphQuestions.", 'cs': 'Univerzální závislosti (UD) nabízejí jednotnou syntaktickou reprezentaci vícejazyčných jazyků s cílem rozvíjet vícejazyčné aplikace. Nedávná práce ukazuje, že sémantické parsování lze provést transformací syntaktických závislostí na logické formy. Tato práce je však omezena na angličtinu a nemůže zpracovat závislostní grafy, které umožňují zvládnout složité jevy, jako je řízení. V této práci představujeme UDepLambda, sémantické rozhraní pro UD, které mapuje přirozený jazyk do logických forem téměř jazykově nezávislým způsobem a umí zpracovávat závislostní grafy. Provádíme experimenty na odpovědi na otázky proti Freebase a poskytujeme německé a španělské překlady datových sad WebQuestions a GraphQuestions pro usnadnění vícejazyčného vyhodnocování. Výsledky ukazují, že UDepLambda překonává silné základní linie napříč jazyky a datovými sadami. Pro angličtinu dosahuje 4,9 F1 bodového zlepšení oproti nejmodernějším grafickým otázkám.', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভর (ইউডি) একটি ইউনিফর্ম ক্রাশ-ভাষার সিন্ট্যাকটিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করেছে, যার উদ্দেশ্যে বহুভা সাম্প্রতিক কাজ দেখাচ্ছে যে সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং সম্পূর্ণ সিন্ট্যাক্টিক নির্ভর করে যৌক্তিক ফর্মে নির্ভর তবে এই কাজ ইংরেজীতে সীমাবদ্ধ এবং নির্ভরশীল গ্রাফ প্রক্রিয়া প্রক্রিয়া করতে পারে না, যার ফলে নিয়ন্ত্রণের মতো জটিল বিষয় হা এই কাজে আমরা ইউডির জন্য সেমেন্টিক ইন্টারফেস ইউডিপ লামব্দাকে পরিচিত করি, যা প্রায় ভাষাকে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় লোগিক্যাল ফর্মে মানচিত্র করে প্ ফ্রিবাসের বিরুদ্ধে উত্তর প্রশ্নের বিষয়ে আমরা পরীক্ষা করি এবং জার্মান এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় ওয়েব প্রশ্ন এবং গ্রাফ্যাশনের ডাটাসেটের অনুবা Results show that UDepLambda outperforms strong baselines across languages and datasets.  ইংরেজীর জন্য এটি গ্রাফিক প্রশ্নের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের উপর ৪.৯ এফ১ পয়েন্ট উন্নতি পেয়েছে।', 'fi': 'Universaaliset riippuvuudet (UD) tarjoavat yhtenäisen monikielisen syntaktisen edustuksen monikielisten sovellusten edistämiseksi. Viimeaikaiset työt osoittavat, että semanttinen jäsennys voidaan toteuttaa muuntamalla syntaktiset riippuvuudet loogisiksi muodoiksi. Tämä työ on kuitenkin rajoitettu englanninkieliseen, eikä se voi käsitellä riippuvuuskaavioita, jotka mahdollistavat monimutkaisten ilmiöiden, kuten kontrollin, käsittelyn. Tässä työssä esitellään UDepLambda, semanttinen käyttöliittymä UD:lle, joka kartoittaa luonnollisen kielen loogisiin muotoihin lähes kielestä riippumattomalla tavalla ja pystyy käsittelemään riippuvuusgraffeja. Teemme Freebasea vastaan kyselyvastauskokeita ja tarjoamme saksa- ja espanjankielisiä käännöksiä WebQuestions- ja GraphQuestions-aineistoista monikielisen arvioinnin helpottamiseksi. Tulokset osoittavat, että UDepLambda ylittää vahvat perusviivat eri kielillä ja tietosarjoilla. Englanninkielisessä versiossa se saavuttaa 4,9 F1-pisteen parannuksen GraphQuestionsin viimeisimpään tekniikkaan verrattuna.', 'et': "Universaalsed sõltuvused (UD) pakuvad ühtset keeleülest süntaktilist esitust eesmärgiga edendada mitmekeelseid rakendusi. Hiljutised tööd näitavad, et semantilist parsimist saab teha, muutes süntaktilised sõltuvused loogilisteks vormideks. Kuid see töö piirdub inglise keelega ja ei saa töödelda sõltuvusgraafikuid, mis võimaldavad käsitleda keerukaid nähtusi nagu kontroll. Käesolevas töös tutvustame UDepLambda semantilist liidest UD-le, mis kaardistab loomuliku keele loogilistele vormidele peaaegu keelest sõltumatult ning suudab töödelda sõltuvusgraafikuid. Me teeme Freebase'i vastu eksperimente küsimustele vastamisega ning pakume WebQuestionsi ja GraphQuestionsi andmekogumite saksa- ja hispaaniakeelseid tõlkeid, et hõlbustada mitmekeelset hindamist. Tulemused näitavad, et UDepLambda suudab keelte ja andmekogumite tugevaid lähtejooni ületada. Inglise keeles saavutab see 4,9 F1 punkti paremuse võrreldes tipptasemel GraphQuestions.", 'jv': 'Universal Dehensik text-editor-action Nanging, uwong-uwong saiki nggampang kanggo inggiles, lan ora bisa nguasai perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nggawe barang seneng pisan pakan. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gunakake udepMbda, semanti kapan kanggo udh (semanti) iki dadi nggawe idiomatan pakan kanggo nggawe sistem logik neng sampeyan sistem nêmên langkung sampeyan ngono iso nggawe Gambar uwong. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo nggambar ujaran mèh ning freebaz karo nggawe barang alam karo Spanish terjamahan kanggo webquestion karo Graffquestion dataset kanggo ngejaraké assempen langgambar. Jamal menehi wong ke udepMbda iso nggawe dataset sing luwih dumateng. kanggo Inggris, nanguwi kanggo ngerasakno 4.9 F1 puntuan kanggo ngerasakno-kanggo layar kanggo Kemerdekaan Graph', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Yin aikin da ake ƙara yana nũna cewa, za'a iya cika parse na semantic game da ya musanya danne-danne na syntactic zuwa fassaran lojiki. However, this work is limited to English, and cannot process dependency graphs, which allow handling complex phenomena such as control.  Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙara UDepLambda, wata interfekt na semanti ga UD, wanda ke karta harshen asiyya zuwa fassaran logical zuwa wani hoto na kusa ya huru da harshe kuma yana iya samun karatun masu ƙayyade. Munã jarraba jarrabo masu tambaya da za'a karɓa wa Freebase kuma Mu ba da fassarar-fassarar jeruman da spanish masu iya fassarar da masu SQUESTI da GrafQUESTIES don ya sauƙaƙara muhalli masu cikin multi-lingui. Result show that UDepLambda performs strong base lines throughout languages and data set. Ga Ingiriya, ta sami mafiya kyau a point 4.9 F1 kan halin-the-art on the Graffiti.", 'sk': 'Univerzalne odvisnosti (UD) ponujajo enotno medjezično sintaktično predstavitev, s ciljem napredovanja večjezičnih aplikacij. Nedavno delo kaže, da je semantično razčlenjevanje mogoče doseči s pretvorbo sintaktičnih odvisnosti v logične oblike. Vendar pa je to delo omejeno na angleščino in ne more obdelati grafov odvisnosti, ki omogočajo obravnavanje kompleksnih pojavov, kot je kontrola. V tem delu predstavljamo UDepLambda, semantični vmesnik za UD, ki skoraj neodvisno od jezika kartira naravni jezik v logične oblike in lahko obdeluje grafe odvisnosti. Izvajamo eksperimente na področju odgovarjanja na vprašanja v Freebase in zagotavljamo nemške in španske prevode podatkovnih nizov WebQuestions in GraphQuestions za lažje večjezično ocenjevanje. Rezultati kažejo, da UDepLambda presega močne osnovne črte v jezikih in naborih podatkov. Za angleščino doseže 4,9 točke F1 izboljšanje v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi pri GraphQuestions.', 'he': 'תלויות יוניברסליות (UD) מציעות ייצוג סינטקטי משותף משותף, במטרה להתקדם בתוכניות רבות שפות. העבודה האחרונה מראה שבדיקוי סמנטי ניתן להשיג על ידי שינוי תלויות סינטקטיות לצורות הגיוניות. However, this work is limited to English, and cannot process dependency graphs, which allow handling complex phenomena such as control.  בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים UDepLambda, ממשק סמנטי עבור UD, שמפית שפה טבעית לצורות הגיוניות באופן כמעט עצמאי לשפה ויכול לעבד גרפים תלויות. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על עניין על שאלות נגד הבסיס החופשי, ומספקים תרגומות גרמניות וספרדית של השאלות האינטרנטיות והשאלות הגרפיות התוצאות מראות כי UDepLambda מציג קווי בסיס חזקים ברחבי שפות וקבוצות נתונים. לאנגלית, הוא משיג שיפור של 4.9 נקודות F1 על המצב החדש על שאלות גראפ.', 'bo': 'Universal Dependencies (UD) འཕྲལ འོན་ཀྱང་། ལས་ཀ་འདི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ལས་ཀར་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན་པར་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ལས་སྦྱོར་མི་ཐུབ། In this work, we introduce UDepLambda, a semantic interface for UD, which maps natural language to logical forms in an almost language-independent fashion and can process dependency graphs. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲི་ཚིག་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བའི་སྐོར་ལས་ སྐད་རིགས་དང་སྐད་རིས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཏོང་དང་། WebQuestions དང་། GraphQuestions datasets་ལ་སྒྲུ དབྱིབས་འབྲས་ཐོག་ནས་ UDepLambda ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་གནད་སྡུད་ཆས་གཞི་རྟེན་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། དབྱིན་ཡིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་པར། དེ་གིས་རིགས་གཙང་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གནང་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚོགས་བཞིན་9 F1་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings using Subword RNNs', 'ar': 'تقليد Word Embeddings باستخدام Subword RNNs', 'es': 'Imitación de incrustaciones de palabras mediante RNN de subpalabras', 'fr': "Imitation des intégrations de mots à l'aide de RNN de sous-mots", 'pt': 'Imitando Word Embeddings usando Subword RNNs', 'ja': 'サブワードRNNを使用したワード埋め込みの模倣', 'zh': '用子词 RNN 模拟词嵌之', 'hi': 'सबवर्ड RNNs का उपयोग कर Word एम्बेडिंग की नकल करना', 'ru': 'Имитация вложений слов с помощью подслова RNN', 'ga': 'Ag déanamh aithrise ar Leabaithe Focal ag baint úsáide as RNNanna Fofhocail', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μίμηση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων με χρήση RNN υπολέξεων', 'hu': 'Szóbeágyazások utánzása alszó RNN-ek segítségével', 'it': 'Mimica delle incorporazioni di parole usando RNN di sottoparola', 'kk': 'RNN субсөзді қолданып Mimicking сөздерді ендіру', 'lt': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings using Subword RNN', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Menemukan Penciptaan Kata menggunakan RNN Subkata', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings using Subword RNNs', 'mn': 'ДНХ-ын суб үг ашиглаж Mimicking Word Embedding', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Naśladowanie osadzeń słowa przy użyciu RNN podsłów', 'ro': 'Mimarea încorporărilor de cuvinte utilizând RNN-uri subcuvinte', 'sr': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings koristeći podrijeèje RNN', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Mimicking Word Embeds using Subword RNNs', 'sv': 'Mimicera ordinbäddningar med RNN:er för underord', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bắt lắp từ từ dùng Subtừ RNN', 'bg': 'Имитиране на вграждания на думи с поддуми RNN', 'da': "Mimering af indlejringer af ord ved hjælp af RNN'er for underord", 'nl': "Woordinsluitingen imiteren met behulp van Subword RNN's", 'de': 'Nachahmen von Wort-Einbettungen mit Unterwort-RNNs', 'id': 'Memikirkan Penciptaan Kata menggunakan RNN Subword', 'ko': '하위 RNN을 사용하여 단어 포함 에뮬레이션', 'tr': 'Subsöz RNN ullanýan Sözler', 'hr': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings koristeći podriječje RNN', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mimicking Word Embedding using Subword RNN', 'fa': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings koristeći podriječje RNN', 'sq': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings duke përdorur RNN Subword', 'ca': 'Mimicking Word Embeddings utilitzant Subword RNN', 'cs': 'Napodobování vložení slov pomocí RNN podslov', 'am': 'ሚስጢራዊ ቃል አስገቡ', 'az': 'Subword RNN vasit…ôsil…ô Mimicking Kelimi ƒ∞fad…ôl…ôri', 'et': 'Sõnade põimimine alamsõnade RNN abil', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten jäljitteleminen alasanojen RNN:illä', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'he': 'מימיקציות מילים באמצעות RNNs מתחת מילה', 'sk': 'Posnemanje besednih vdelav z uporabo podbesednih RNN', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་མཚོན་པའི་ཡི་གེ'}
{'en': 'Word embeddings improve generalization over lexical features by placing each word in a lower-dimensional space, using distributional information obtained from unlabeled data. However, the effectiveness of word embeddings for downstream NLP tasks is limited by out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words, for which embeddings do not exist. In this paper, we present MIMICK, an approach to generating OOV word embeddings compositionally, by learning a function from spellings to distributional embeddings. Unlike prior work, MIMICK does not require re-training on the original word embedding corpus ; instead, learning is performed at the type level. Intrinsic and extrinsic evaluations demonstrate the power of this simple approach. On 23 languages, MIMICK improves performance over a word-based baseline for tagging part-of-speech and morphosyntactic attributes. It is competitive with (and complementary to) a supervised character-based model in low resource settings.', 'ar': 'تعمل عمليات تضمين Word على تحسين التعميم على الميزات المعجمية عن طريق وضع كل كلمة في مساحة ذات بُعد أقل ، باستخدام معلومات التوزيع التي تم الحصول عليها من البيانات غير المسماة. ومع ذلك ، فإن فعالية عمليات دمج الكلمات لمهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية في المراحل النهائية محدودة بالكلمات الخارجة عن المفردات (OOV) ، والتي لا توجد لها حفلات الزفاف. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم MIMICK ، وهو نهج لتوليد زخارف كلمة OOV تركيبيًا ، من خلال تعلم وظيفة من التهجئة إلى حفلات الزفاف التوزيعية. على عكس العمل السابق ، لا يتطلب برنامج MIMICK إعادة التدريب على الكلمة الأصلية المضمنة في النص ؛ بدلاً من ذلك ، يتم تنفيذ التعلم على مستوى النوع. تظهر التقييمات الجوهرية والخارجية قوة هذا النهج البسيط. في 23 لغة ، يعمل MIMICK على تحسين الأداء عبر خط الأساس المستند إلى الكلمات لوضع علامات على سمات جزء من الكلام والسمات التركيبية. إنها منافسة (ومكملة) للنموذج الخاضع للإشراف القائم على الشخصية في الأماكن منخفضة الموارد.', 'pt': 'Embeddings de palavras melhoram a generalização sobre recursos lexicais, colocando cada palavra em um espaço de menor dimensão, usando informações de distribuição obtidas de dados não rotulados. No entanto, a eficácia das incorporações de palavras para tarefas de PNL downstream é limitada por palavras fora do vocabulário (OOV), para as quais não existem incorporações. Neste artigo, apresentamos o MIMICK, uma abordagem para gerar embeddings de palavras OOV composicionalmente, aprendendo uma função desde a ortografia até os embeddings distribucionais. Ao contrário do trabalho anterior, o MIMICK não requer retreinamento no corpus de incorporação de palavras original; em vez disso, o aprendizado é realizado no nível do tipo. Avaliações intrínsecas e extrínsecas demonstram o poder dessa abordagem simples. Em 23 idiomas, o MIMICK melhora o desempenho em uma linha de base baseada em palavras para marcar atributos morfossintáticos e de fala. É competitivo (e complementar) com um modelo supervisionado baseado em personagens em configurações de poucos recursos.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots améliorent la généralisation par rapport aux caractéristiques lexicales en plaçant chaque mot dans un espace de dimension inférieure, à l'aide d'informations distributionnelles obtenues à partir de données non étiquetées. Cependant, l'efficacité des intégrations de mots pour les tâches de PNL en aval est limitée par les mots hors vocabulaire (OOV), pour lesquels il n'existe pas d'intégration. Dans cet article, nous présentons MIMICK, une approche pour générer des intégrations de mots OOV de manière compositionnelle, en apprenant une fonction allant des orthographes aux intégrations distributionnelles. Contrairement aux travaux antérieurs, MIMICK ne nécessite pas de formation supplémentaire sur le corpus d'intégration de mots d'origine\xa0; au lieu de cela, l'apprentissage est effectué au niveau du type. Les évaluations intrinsèques et extrinsèques démontrent la puissance de cette approche simple. Sur 23 langues, MIMICK améliore les performances par rapport à une base de référence basée sur des mots pour le balisage des attributs morphosyntaxiques et des parties du discours. Il est compétitif (et complémentaire) d'un modèle supervisé basé sur des caractères dans des environnements à faibles ressources.", 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras mejoran la generalización sobre las características léxicas al colocar cada palabra en un espacio de menor dimensión, utilizando información de distribución obtenida de datos sin etiqueta. Sin embargo, la eficacia de la incrustación de palabras para las tareas posteriores de la PNL está limitada por las palabras fuera de vocabulario (OOV), para las cuales no existen incrustaciones. En este artículo, presentamos MIMICK, un enfoque para generar incrustaciones de palabras OOV de manera compositiva, mediante el aprendizaje de una función desde la ortografía hasta la incrustación distributiva. A diferencia del trabajo anterior, MIMICK no requiere volver a capacitarse en el corpus de incrustación de palabras original; en cambio, el aprendizaje se realiza a nivel de tipo. Las evaluaciones intrínsecas y extrínsecas demuestran el poder de este enfoque simple. En 23 idiomas, MIMICK mejora el rendimiento con respecto a una línea de base basada en palabras para etiquetar atributos morfosintácticos y de parte del habla. Es competitivo con (y complementario) un modelo supervisado basado en personajes en entornos de bajos recursos.', 'ja': '単語の埋め込みは、ラベル付けされていないデータから得られた分布情報を使用して、各単語を低次元空間に配置することによって、語彙的特徴よりも一般化を改善する。しかし、下流のNLPタスクのための単語埋め込みの有効性は、埋め込みが存在しない語彙外（ OOV ）単語によって制限される。本稿では，綴りから分布埋め込みまでの関数を学習することで， OOVワード埋め込みを構成的に生成するアプローチであるMIMICKを紹介する．以前の作業とは異なり、MIMICKは元の単語埋め込みコーパスの再トレーニングを必要としません。代わりに、学習はタイプレベルで実行されます。内在的評価と外在的評価は、この単純なアプローチの力を示している。23の言語で、MIMICKは言語の一部と形態素の属性をタグ付けするために、単語ベースのベースラインよりもパフォーマンスを向上させます。リソースの少ない設定で監修されたキャラクターベースのモデルと競合している（およびそれを補完している）。', 'zh': '词嵌用未标数息,置单词较低维空间,以改词法泛化。 然词嵌于下流 NLP 者有效性为词汇外 (OOV) 词所限,而其词嵌不存。 本文引MIMICK,此学从拼写至布嵌之函数以成OOV词嵌之法也。 与前事不同,MIMICK不须重练语料库。 反此者,学也。 内与外评证其力。 23 种言语,MIMICK 增于单词基线,以记词性形句法性也。 与低资源境中监角竞争力(互补)。', 'hi': 'Word embeddings प्रत्येक शब्द को एक कम आयामी स्थान में रखकर, लेबल रहित डेटा से प्राप्त वितरण जानकारी का उपयोग करके, लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं पर सामान्यीकरण में सुधार करते हैं। हालांकि, डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग की प्रभावशीलता आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली (ओओवी) शब्दों द्वारा सीमित है, जिसके लिए एम्बेडिंग मौजूद नहीं हैं। इस पेपर में, हम MIMICK प्रस्तुत करते हैं, OOV शब्द एम्बेडिंग को रचनात्मक रूप से उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण, वर्तनी से वितरण योग्य एम्बेडिंग तक एक फ़ंक्शन सीखकर। पूर्व के काम के विपरीत, MIMICK को मूल शब्द एम्बेडिंग कॉर्पस पर फिर से प्रशिक्षण की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है; इसके बजाय, सीखने को प्रकार के स्तर पर किया जाता है। आंतरिक और बाह्य मूल्यांकन इस सरल दृष्टिकोण की शक्ति का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। 23 भाषाओं पर, MIMICK भाग के भाषण और morphosyntactic विशेषताओं टैगिंग के लिए एक शब्द-आधारित आधार रेखा पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। यह कम संसाधन सेटिंग्स में एक पर्यवेक्षित चरित्र-आधारित मॉडल के साथ (और पूरक) के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है।', 'ru': 'Вложения слов улучшают обобщение над лексическими признаками, помещая каждое слово в низкоразмерное пространство, используя распределительную информацию, полученную из немаркированных данных. Тем не менее, эффективность вложений слов для последующих задач NLP ограничена внесловными словами (OOV), для которых вложений не существует. В этой статье мы представляем MIMICK, подход к созданию композиционных вложений слов OOV, изучая функцию от написаний до дистрибутивных вложений. В отличие от предыдущей работы, MIMICK не требует повторного обучения на исходном корпусе встраивания слов; вместо этого обучение выполняется на уровне типа. Внутренние и внешние оценки демонстрируют силу этого простого подхода. На 23 языках MIMICK улучшает производительность по сравнению со словесной базой для тегирования атрибутов части речи и морфосинтаксических атрибутов. Он конкурирует с (и дополняет) контролируемой моделью, основанной на персонажах, в условиях ограниченных ресурсов.', 'ga': 'Feabhsaíonn leabaithe focal ginearálú thar ghnéithe foclóireachta trí gach focal a chur i spás tríthoiseach níos ísle, ag baint úsáide as faisnéis dáileacháin a fhaightear ó shonraí neamhlipéadaithe. Mar sin féin, tá éifeachtacht leabú focal do thascanna NLP iartheachtacha teoranta ag focail as an bhfoclóir (OOV), nach bhfuil leabaithe ann dóibh. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair MIMICK, cur chuige chun leabú focal OOV a ghiniúint go comhdhéanamh, trí fheidhm a fhoghlaim ó litriú go leabaithe dáileacháin. Murab ionann agus réamhobair, ní theastaíonn athoiliúint ó MIMICK ar an bhfocal bunaidh leabú corpas; ina ionad sin, déantar an fhoghlaim ag an leibhéal cineáil. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí intreacha agus eistreacha cumhacht an chur chuige shimplí seo. Ar 23 teanga, feabhsaítear feidhmíocht MIMICK thar bhunlíne focal-bhunaithe chun tréithe páirt-de-urlabhra agus morphosyntactic a chlibeáil. Tá sé iomaíoch le (agus comhlántach le) múnla maoirsithe bunaithe ar shaintréithe i suíomhanna acmhainní ísle.', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások javítják a lexikai jellemzők általánosítását azáltal, hogy minden egyes szót egy alacsonyabb dimenziós térbe helyezik, a címke nélküli adatokból származó eloszlási információk felhasználásával. A szóbeágyazások hatékonyságát azonban a downstream NLP-feladatok esetében korlátozzák a szókincsen kívüli (OOV) szavak, amelyek esetében nem léteznek beágyazások. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a MIMICK-ot, az OOV szóbeágyazások kompozíciós létrehozásának megközelítését, a helyesírásoktól a disztribúciós beágyazásokig. A korábbi munkákkal ellentétben a MIMICK nem igényel újraképzést az eredeti korpusz beágyazásával kapcsolatban; Ehelyett a tanulás típusszinten történik. A belső és külső értékelések bizonyítják ennek az egyszerű megközelítésnek az erejét. 23 nyelven a MIMICK javítja a teljesítményt egy szóalapú alapfelszereltséghez képest a beszédrész és morfoszintatikus attribútumok címkézéséhez. Versenyképes (és kiegészíti) egy felügyelt karakter alapú modellel alacsony erőforrás-beállításokban.', 'el': 'Οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων βελτιώνουν τη γενίκευση έναντι των λεξικών χαρακτηριστικών τοποθετώντας κάθε λέξη σε ένα χώρο χαμηλότερου διαστατικού, χρησιμοποιώντας πληροφορίες κατανομής που λαμβάνονται από δεδομένα χωρίς ετικέτα. Ωστόσο, η αποτελεσματικότητα των ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες περιορίζεται από λέξεις εκτός λεξιλογίου (OOV), για τις οποίες δεν υπάρχουν ενσωμάτωση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για τη δημιουργία ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων σύνθετα, μαθαίνοντας μια συνάρτηση από ορθογραφικά έως κατανεμητικά. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες εργασίες, το MIMICK δεν απαιτεί επανεκπαίδευση στο αρχικό σώμα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Αντίθετα, η μάθηση πραγματοποιείται σε επίπεδο τύπου. Εσωτερικές και εξωτερικές αξιολογήσεις καταδεικνύουν τη δύναμη αυτής της απλής προσέγγισης. Στις 23 γλώσσες, η MIMICK βελτιώνει την απόδοση σε σχέση με μια βάση βάσης λέξεων για την επισήμανση μέρους της ομιλίας και μορφοσυντακτικών χαρακτηριστικών. Είναι ανταγωνιστικό (και συμπληρωματικό) με ένα εποπτευμένο μοντέλο βασισμένο σε χαρακτήρες σε χαμηλούς πόρους.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შეყვარება ლექსიკალური ფუნქციების განმავლობაზე უფრო მეტადება, ყველა სიტყვების ცოტაციაში ჩატვირთვა, გამოყენებული განსაზღვრული ინფორმაცია, რომელი მაგრამ, სიტყვების ინტებექტირების ეფექტიურობა NLP დავალებებისთვის გარეშე სიტყვებულია (OOV) სიტყვებით, რომლებსაც ინტებექტირება არ არსებობს. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ MIMICK-ს გამოსახულებთ, რომელიც OOV სიტყვას კომპუზიციურად შექმნა, ფუნქციის შესწავლებით სიტყვას განსახულებელად დავსწავლოთ. MIMICK არ უნდა განაკეთება სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სიტყვების შე მაშინ, სწავლება ტიპის დონეში გავაკეთება. ინტრინსიკური და ექსტრინიკური განსაზღვრებები გამოჩვენებენ ამ სახითო პროგრამის ძალას. 23 ენაში MIMICK უფრო მეტია სიტყვების ბაზი ხაზი და მორფოსინტაქტიური ატრიბუტებისთვის შესაძლებელება. ეს კონპეციენტიურია (და კომპლენტურია) მართებული სიმბოლოების მოდელზე, რომელიც მართებული სიმბოლოების პარამეტრებში.', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole migliorano la generalizzazione sulle caratteristiche lessicali posizionando ogni parola in uno spazio dimensionale inferiore, utilizzando informazioni distributive ottenute da dati non etichettati. Tuttavia, l'efficacia delle incorporazioni di parole per attività NLP a valle è limitata da parole fuori vocabolario (OOV), per le quali non esistono incorporazioni. In questo articolo, presentiamo MIMICK, un approccio alla generazione compositiva di embedding di parole OOV, imparando una funzione dagli ortografi agli embedding distributivi. A differenza del lavoro precedente, MIMICK non richiede un aggiornamento sulla parola originale incorporante corpus; invece, l'apprendimento viene eseguito a livello di tipo. Valutazioni intrinseche ed estrinseche dimostrano la potenza di questo approccio semplice. Su 23 lingue, MIMICK migliora le prestazioni rispetto a una linea di base basata su parole per taggare gli attributi part-of-speech e morfosintattici. È competitivo con (e complementare) un modello basato su personaggi supervisionati in impostazioni a basso contenuto di risorse.", 'lt': 'žodžių įdėjimas pagerina tekstinių savybių generalizaciją, kiekvieną žodį įdėdamas į mažesnio matmens erdvę, naudojant paskirstymo informaciją, gautą iš pažymėtų duomenų. Tačiau žodžių įtraukimo į tolesnes NLP užduotis veiksmingumas ribojamas žodžiais, kurie nėra įtraukiami į žodynus. Šiame dokumente pristatome MIMICK, metodą, kaip kurti OOV žodžių įdėjimus sudėtiniu būdu, išmokant funkciją nuo raštų iki platinimo įdėjimų. Priešingai nei anksčiau atliktas darbas, MIMICK nereikalauja pakartotinio mokymo pradiniam žodžiui „incorporating corpus“; vietoj to mokymasis atliekamas tipo lygmeniu. Vidaus ir išoriniai vertinimai rodo šio paprasto metodo galią. 23 kalbomis MIMICK pagerina žodžiu pagrįstą charakteristiką žymėdamas kalbos dalį ir morfosintaksinius požymius. It is competitive with (and complementary to) a supervised character-based model in low resource settings.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањето на зборови ја подобрува генерализацијата над лексичките карактеристики со ставање на секој збор во нискодимензионален простор, користејќи дистрибутивни информации добиени од неозначени податоци. Сепак, ефикасноста на вградувањата на зборови за понатамошните NLP задачи е ограничена со зборови надвор од зборовите (OOV), за кои вградувањата не постојат. Во овој весник, го претставуваме МИМИК, пристап до генерирање композиционално внесување на OOV зборови, со учење на функција од правописи до дистрибуционални внесувања. За разлика од претходната работа, МИМИК не бара реобука за оригиналниот збор "вградување на корпус"; наместо тоа, учењето се изведува на типово ниво. Интринските и надворешните проценки ја покажуваат моќта на овој едноставен пристап. На 23 јазици, MIMICK ја подобрува резултатот во однос на зборовите за означување на дел од говорот и морфосинтактички атрибути. Тоа е конкурентно со (и комплементарно) надгледуван модел базиран на карактери во поставувањата со ниски ресурси.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру лексикалық мүмкіндіктерінен жалпы түрлендіру, әрбір сөзді төменгі өлшемі бос орында орнатып, келтірілмеген деректерден алған дистрибуттық мәліметтерді қолдан Бірақ, NLP тапсырмаларының төмендету үшін сөздерді ендіру эффектілігі - сөздердің тыс сөздері (ОOV) арқылы шектелмейді, олардың ендіру жоқ. Бұл қағазда MIMICK- ті, OOV сөздерді біріктіру үшін, мәліметтерден үлестіру үшін үлестіру үшін, үлестіру үшін, үлестіру үшін мәліметтерді оқыту арқылы көрсетеді. Алдыңғы жұмыс сияқты, MIMICK бастапқы мәліметті корпус ендіру үшін қайта оқыту керек емес. олардың орнына оқыту түрлі деңгейінде орындалады. Интриннис және сыртқы оқиғалар осы қарапайым қасиетінің күшін көрсетеді. 23 тілде MIMICK сөздердің негізгі негізгі сызығын сөздердің және морфосинтактикалық атрибуттарын тегтеру үшін әрекеттерді жақсартады. Бұл көп ресурс параметрлерінде бақылаған таңбалар негіздеген үлгісімен (және қосымша) тәртіпсіздік.', 'ms': 'Penampilan perkataan meningkatkan keseluruhan atas ciri-ciri leksikal dengan meletakkan setiap perkataan dalam ruang dimensi-rendah, menggunakan maklumat distribusi yang diperoleh dari data tidak berlebihan. However, the effectiveness of word embeddings for downstream NLP tasks is limited by out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words, for which embeddings do not exist.  Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan MIMICK, pendekatan untuk menghasilkan pembenaman perkataan OOV secara komposisi, dengan mempelajari fungsi dari ejaan ke pembenaman distribusi. Tidak seperti kerja sebelumnya, MIMICK tidak memerlukan latihan semula pada perkataan asal embedding corpus; daripada itu, belajar dilakukan pada tahap jenis. Evaluasi dalam dan luar menunjukkan kuasa pendekatan sederhana ini. On 23 languages, MIMICK improves performance over a word-based baseline for tagging part-of-speech and morphosyntactic attributes.  Ia bersaing dengan (dan kumplimentar) model berdasarkan aksara yang diawasi dalam tetapan sumber rendah.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d താഴെ സ്ഥലത്ത് വെക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമ എന്നാലും താഴെ നദിയില്\u200d NLP ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രകൃതിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം ഒഒഒവി വാക്കുകള്\u200d നിശ്ചയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മിമിക്കെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഒവി വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു വഴിയാണ്, വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്ന മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി വ്യത്യസ്തമായിട്ടില്ല, മിമിക്കെക്ക് ആദ്യമായ വാക്കിനെ വീണ്ടും പരിശീലനം ആവശ്യമില്ല അതിനു പകരം പഠിക്കുന്നത് തരത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഈ സാധനങ്ങളുടെ ശക്തിയെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. 23 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d മിമിക്കെ വാക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട അക്ഷരത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള മോഡലിനോടൊപ്പ', 'mn': 'Өөр хэмжээсүүд нь хэмжээсүүд доор хэмжээсүүд орон зайд үг бүрийг хуваалцаж, хуваалцаагүй мэдээллээс авсан хуваалцааг мэдээллийг ашиглаж, хэлбэрээс илүү олон хэмжээсүүд дээ Гэхдээ NLP давхар ажиллагаанд нэвтрүүлэх үгний үр дүнтэй үр дүнтэй байдал нь сөздөөс гадна (OOV) үгнээс хязгаарлагддаг, тэдгээр үгнүүд байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид MIMICK-г харуулж, OOV үгийг бүрдүүлэх арга зам болгож, хэвлэлээс хуваарилалт хүртэл функцийг суралцаж байна. Өмнөх ажилтай адил, MIMICK эхний корпус дээр дахин суралцах шаардлагагүй. суралцах нь төрлийн түвшинд ажилладаг. Энэ энгийн ойлголтын хүч чадлыг харуулдаг. 23 хэл дээр MIMICK хэлэлцээний хэсэг болон морфосинтактикийн харилцааны нэг хэсэг хэлэлцээний суурь шугам дээр ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг. Энэ нь бага баялаг боловсролын төлөвлөгөөнд харилцааны үндсэн загвартай өрсөлдөг.', 'no': 'Ordinnbygging forbetrar generellisering over leksiske funksjonar ved å plassera kvar ord i ein lavere dimensjonal plass ved å bruka distribusjonsinformasjon som er henta frå ubeabelte data. Dette er imidlertid effektiviteten av ordinnbygging for nedstrømte NLP- oppgåver begrenset av ikkje- ut- ordbokstavar (OOV) ord som ikkje finst innbygging. I denne papiret presenterer vi MIMICK ein tilnærming til å generera OOV- ordinnbygging saman, ved å lære ein funksjon frå stavingar til distribusjonale innbygging. I motsetjing til førre arbeid treng MIMICK ikkje om opplæring på den opprinnelige ordet som innebygger korpus. i staden blir læring utført på type-nivå. Interniske og ekstrinske evalueringar viser makten på denne enkle tilnærming. På 23 språk er MIMICK forbetra utviklinga over eit ordbasert baselinje for å merke del av tale og morfosyntaktiske attributt. Det er konkurrentivt med (og komplementar) eit oversikt teiknbasert modell i låge ressursinnstillingar.', 'pl': 'osadzenia słów poprawiają uogólnienie względem cech leksykalnych poprzez umieszczenie każdego słowa w przestrzeni niższych wymiarów, wykorzystując informacje dystrybucyjne uzyskane z nieoznakowanych danych. Skuteczność osadzeń słów dla dalszych zadań NLP jest jednak ograniczona przez słowa poza słownictwem (OOV), dla których osadzenia nie istnieją. W artykule przedstawiamy MIMICK, podejście do generowania osadzeń słów OOV kompozycyjnie, poprzez uczenie się funkcji od pisowni do osadzeń dystrybucyjnych. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac, MIMICK nie wymaga ponownego szkolenia na oryginalnym korpusie osadzania słowa; Zamiast tego uczenie się odbywa się na poziomie typu. Oceny wewnętrzne i zewnętrzne pokazują moc tego prostego podejścia. W 23-językach MIMICK poprawia wydajność nad bazą bazową opartą na słowach dla tagowania części mowy i atrybutów morfosyntaktycznych. Jest konkurencyjny (i uzupełniający) z nadzorowanym modelem opartym na charakterze w warunkach niskich zasobów.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte îmbunătățesc generalizarea asupra caracteristicilor lexicale prin plasarea fiecărui cuvânt într-un spațiu dimensional inferior, utilizând informații distribuționale obținute din date fără etichete. Cu toate acestea, eficiența încorporărilor de cuvinte pentru activitățile PNL din aval este limitată de cuvinte în afara vocabularului (OOV), pentru care nu există încorporări. În această lucrare, prezentăm MIMICK, o abordare pentru generarea compozițională a încorporărilor de cuvinte OOV, prin învățarea unei funcții de la ortografii la încorporări distribuționale. Spre deosebire de munca anterioară, MIMICK nu necesită re-instruire pe cuvântul original încorporat corpus; În schimb, învățarea se realizează la nivel de tip. Evaluările intrinsece și extrinsice demonstrează puterea acestei abordări simple. Pe 23 de limbi, MIMICK îmbunătățește performanța față de o bază de referință bazată pe cuvinte pentru etichetarea atributelor parțial-of-speech și morfosintactic. Este competitiv cu (și complementar) un model supravegheat bazat pe caractere în setări cu resurse reduse.', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධයක් ලෙක්සිකල් විශේෂතාවට සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය විශේෂය කරනවා, හැම වචනයක්ම පහළ- විශේෂතාවක් තැනක් ත නමුත්, නිමුද්\u200dරිය NLP වැඩ සඳහා වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් සීමාවිත වෙනවා, ඒ වචන සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් නෑ. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි MIMICK වෙනුවෙන්, OOv වචන සංවිධානයෙන් සංවිධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගත්තා විදුලිය මුලින් වැඩ වගේ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, MIMICK මුලින් වචනය සම්බන්ධ කරුපුස් වලින් ආයෙත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය අවශ්\u200d ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, ඉගෙන ගන්නේ වර්ගයේ ස්තූතියෙන්. ඇතුළු සහ ප්\u200dරදේශ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සරල ප්\u200dරදේශයේ බලය පෙන්වන්න. භාෂාව 23යි, MIMICK වචනය අධාරිත වචනයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන ඒක (සහ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්) බලන්න පුළුවන් අක්ෂර අධාරිත සැකසුම් වලට ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Ereyda ku qoran ayaa bedesha dhalashada alaabta leksikada ku qoran ku qoran hadal kasta oo ku qoran goob hoose ah, isticmaalaya macluumaad kala qaybsan oo laga helay macluumaad aan la aqoonin. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxyaabaha ku saabsan hadalka ku qoran shaqada hoose ee NLP waa ay ku xadgudbaan erayo aan qoraal ahayn (OOV), kaas oo aan ku jirin. Warqadan waxan ku qornaa MIMICK, waa qaab a an u sameyno qoraalka OOV ee ku habboon, taas oo lagu baro shaqo ka soo qoran hadallada iyo qaybinta. Shaqo horay looma baahna MIMICK in laguugu baahan yahay wax ku tababaro hadalka asalka ah oo ku qoran karo korpus; badalka, waxbarashada waxaa lagu sameeyaa heerka nooca ah. Qiimeynta caadiga iyo dibadda waxay muujiyaan xoogga qaababkan sahlan. MiMICK wuxuu ku hagaajiyaa aqoonta ku qoran qoraal-saldhig ah oo ku qoran qoraal-qoraal ah oo ku qoran qeyb ka mid ah hadalka iyo tusaale ahaan morphosyntactic. Waxaa ku dadaali kara (iyo mid ku saabsan) model ku saabsan aqoonta oo ku qoran habka noocyada hoose ee midhaha.', 'sr': 'Uključenje reči poboljšava generalizaciju preko leksičkih karakteristika stavljajući svaku reč u manji dimenzionalni prostor, koristeći distribucijske informacije koje su dobile od neoznačenih podataka. Međutim, učinkovitost uključenja reči za zadatak NLP dole ograničena je riječima izvan rečenika (OOV), za koje ne postoje uključenje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo MIMICK, pristup stvaranju riječi OOV-a kompozicionalno, učeći funkciju od pisanja do distribucijskih integracija. Za razliku od prethodnog posla, MIMICK ne zahteva ponovno obuku na originalnoj re či koja uključuje korpus; umjesto toga, učenje se izvršava na nivou tipa. Intrinsic i ekstrinsic procjene pokazuju moć ovog jednostavnog pristupa. Na 23 jezika, MIMICK poboljšava izvedbu na osnovnoj liniji riječi za označavanje dijelogovornih i morfosintaktičkih atributa. Konkurentno je sa (i dodatno) nadziranom modelom na karakteru u području niskih resursa.', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar förbättrar generaliseringen över lexikala funktioner genom att placera varje ord i ett lägre dimensionellt utrymme, med hjälp av distributionsinformation som erhållits från omärkta data. Effektiviteten hos ordinbäddningar för nedströms NLP-uppgifter begränsas dock av ord utanför ordförrådet (OOV), för vilka det inte finns inbäddningar. I denna uppsats presenterar vi MIMICK, ett tillvägagångssätt för att skapa OOV ordinbäddningar kompositionellt, genom att lära sig en funktion från stavningar till distributionella inbäddningar. Till skillnad från tidigare arbete kräver MIMICK inte omprövning av det ursprungliga ordet inbäddande corpus; istället utförs inlärning på typnivå. Intrinska och yttre utvärderingar visar kraften i detta enkla tillvägagångssätt. På 23 språk förbättrar MIMICK prestandan jämfört med en ordbaserad baslinje för att tagga tal- och morfosyntaktiska attribut. Den är konkurrenskraftig med (och kompletterar) en övervakad karaktärsbaserad modell i lågresursinställningar.', 'ta': 'Name எனினும், கீழே நீர்ப்பு NLP பணிகளுக்கான வார்த்தைக் குறிப்பிடும் வார்த்தைகளின் விளைவு எல்லையாகும் சொற்கோவையிலிருந்து வெளிய இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் MIMICK, OOV வார்த்தையை உருவாக்க ஒரு முறையை கொண்டு, சொற்களிலிருந்து செயல்பாட்டை பங்கீட்டு பொருள்களில்  முன்னால் வேலையை வித்தியாசமாக, மைமிக்கே முன்னிருந்த வார்த்தையை மீண்டும் பயிற்சியை தேவைப்படவில அதற்கு பதிலாக கற்றல் வகை நிலையில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது. இந்த சுலபமான செயல்பாட்டின் சக்தியை காட்டுகிறது. On 23 languages, MIMICK improves performance over a word-based baseline for tagging part-of-speech and morphosyntactic attributes.  இது குறைந்த மூலத்தின் அமைப்புகளில் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட எழுத்து அடிப்படையான மாதிரியாக இருக்கும் (மற்றும் சிக்கல்', 'ur': 'ورڈ امبرڈینگ لکسیکل ویژگی پر عمومی تغییرات کی عمدگی کرتی ہے، ہر کلم کو نیچے اندازی جگہ میں رکھنے کے ذریعہ، بٹانے والی معلومات کے مطابق بٹانے والی معلومات کے استعمال کرتی ہے، جو غیر However, the effectiveness of word embedding for downstream NLP tasks is limited by out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words, for which embedding does not exist. اس کاغذ میں ہم MIMICK کو ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ OOOV لفظ ایمبڈینگ کی پیدائش کریں، ایک فنقش کی تعلیم سے تقسیم انڈینگ تک سکھائیں۔ پہلے کے کام کے بغیر، MIMICK اصلی کلمات پر دوبارہ آموزش کی ضرورت نہیں ہے۔ اس کے بدلے، سیکھنے کی سطح پر کامل ہوتی ہے۔ اس ساده طریقے کی طاقت دکھاتے ہیں. ۲۳ زبانوں پر MIMICK ایک کلمات کی بنسٹ لین پر عملکرد ترجیح دیتا ہے کہ کلمات اور مورفوسینٹاکٹیک اثرات کو ٹیگ کرنے کے لئے۔ یہ (اور) نیچے سرمایہ کے اندر ایک نظارت کیا گیا شخصیٹ بنیادی موڈل کے ساتھ مقابلہ ہے۔', 'mt': 'Word embeddings improve generalization over lexical features by placing each word in a lower-dimensional space, using distributional information obtained from unlabeled data.  Madankollu, l-effettività tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem għal kompiti downstream NLP hija limitata minn kliem barra mill-vokabulari (OOV), li għalihom ma jeżistux inkorporazzjonijiet. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw MIMICK, approċċ għall-ġenerazzjoni kompożittiva tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelmiet OOV, billi nitgħallmu funzjoni mill-ortografiji sal-inkorporazzjonijiet tad-distribuzzjoni. Unlike prior work, MIMICK does not require re-training on the original word embedding corpus;  minflok, it-tagħlim isir fil-livell tat-tip. Evalwazzjonijiet interni u esterni juru s-saħħa ta’ dan l-approċċ sempliċi. Fit-23 lingwa, MIMICK itejjeb il-prestazzjoni fuq linja bażi bbażata fuq il-kliem għat-tikkettar ta’ attributi ta’ parti mid-diskors u morfosintattiċi. It is competitive with (and complementary to) a supervised character-based model in low resource settings.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, NLP vazifalari uchun tuzuvchi so'zlar effekti, bu soʻzlar mavjud emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz MIMICK (OOV soʻzni qo'yish) yaratish usuli, o'zgarishni o'rganish imkoniyatlaridan tashkilotni o'rganamiz. @ info: whatsthis o'rganishni turli darajada bajaradi. Bu oddiy usulning kuchini ko'rsatadi. Name It is competitive with (and complementary to) a supervised character-based model in low resource settings.", 'vi': 'Từ lắp ghép cải thiện việc tổng kết hóa các tính năng ngôn ngữ bằng cách đặt mỗi từ vào một không gian chiều dưới, bằng thông tin phân phối lấy từ dữ liệu không tải. Tuy nhiên, hiệu quả của việc ghép từ cho các công việc thuộc dòng chảy NLP chỉ do từ ngoài vốn từ (OOOV) không tồn tại. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu MIMIMICS, một cách tiếp cận để tạo ra sự gắn kết từ từ từ từ từ từ ngữ âm cho tới sự phân phát. Không giống những lần làm trước, MIMIMICHEK không cần phải được đào tạo lại từ đầu để tác thành tập thể, Thay vào đó, học được thực hiện ở mức độ kiểu. Tính năng nhập và tứ chi cho thấy sức mạnh của phương pháp đơn giản này. Với ngôn ngữ 23, MIMIMICS cải thiện lợi nhuận hơn một cơ sở cơ bản từ để in phần nói và hoá chất. Nó cạnh tranh với (và bổ sung) một mô hình có tính cách được giám sát trong thiết lập ít tài nguyên.', 'da': 'Ordindlejringer forbedrer generaliseringen i forhold til leksikalske funktioner ved at placere hvert ord i et lavere dimensionelt rum ved hjælp af distributionsoplysninger fra ikke-mærkede data. Effektiviteten af ordindlejringer til efterfølgende NLP-opgaver er imidlertid begrænset af ord uden for ordforråd (OOV), for hvilke der ikke findes indlejringer. I denne artikel præsenterer vi MIMICK, en tilgang til at generere OOV ordindlejringer kompositionelt, ved at lære en funktion fra stavninger til distributionsmæssige indlejringer. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde kræver MIMICK ikke re-træning på det oprindelige ord integrering corpus; i stedet udføres læring på typeniveau. Indgående og eksterne evalueringer viser styrken af denne enkle tilgang. På 23 sprog forbedrer MIMICK ydeevnen i forhold til en ordbaseret basislinje til mærkning af dele af tale og morfosyntaktiske attributter. Det er konkurrencedygtigt med (og supplerer) en overvåget karakterbaseret model i lav ressource indstillinger.', 'bg': 'Вградените думи подобряват обобщението върху лексикалните характеристики, като поставят всяка дума в по-нискоизмерно пространство, като използват дистрибуционна информация, получена от немаркирани данни. Ефективността на вграждането на думи за задачите по НЛП надолу по веригата обаче е ограничена от думи извън речника (OOV), за които вграждания не съществуват. В настоящата статия представяме подход за генериране на вградени думи чрез изучаване на функция от правопис до разпределителни вграждания. За разлика от предишната работа МИМИК не изисква повторно обучение по оригиналния корпус за вграждане на думата; вместо това обучението се извършва на ниво тип. Вътрешни и външни оценки демонстрират силата на този прост подход. На 23 езика подобрява ефективността на базата на думи за маркиране на част от речта и морфосинтактични атрибути. Той е конкурентен с (и допълва) надзорен модел, базиран на знаци в настройки с ниски ресурси.', 'nl': 'Woordinsluitingen verbeteren de generalisatie ten opzichte van lexicale kenmerken door elk woord in een lager-dimensionale ruimte te plaatsen, met behulp van distributiegegevens verkregen uit niet-gelabelde gegevens. De effectiviteit van woordinsluitingen voor downstream NLP-taken wordt echter beperkt door woorden buiten woordenschat (OOV), waarvoor geen insluitingen bestaan. In dit artikel presenteren we MIMICK, een benadering om OOV-woordembeddingen compositioneel te genereren, door een functie te leren van spellingen tot distributionele embeddingen. In tegenstelling tot eerdere werkzaamheden vereist MIMICK geen herscholing op het oorspronkelijke woord embedding corpus; In plaats daarvan wordt leren uitgevoerd op het type niveau. Intrinsieke en extrinsische evaluaties tonen de kracht van deze eenvoudige aanpak aan. Op 23-talen verbetert MIMICK de prestaties ten opzichte van een woord-baseline voor het taggen van delen van spraak en morfosyntactische kenmerken. Het is concurrerend met (en complementair aan) een begeleid karaktergebaseerd model in omgevingen met weinig middelen.', 'de': 'Worteinbettungen verbessern die Verallgemeinerung gegenüber lexikalischen Merkmalen, indem jedes Wort in einem niederdimensionalen Raum platziert wird, wobei Verteilungsinformationen aus nicht beschrifteten Daten verwendet werden. Die Effektivität von Wort-Einbettungen für nachgelagerte NLP-Aufgaben ist jedoch durch Out-of-Vokabelwörter (OOV) begrenzt, für die Einbettungen nicht existieren. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir MIMICK vor, einen Ansatz zur Erzeugung von OOV-Wort-Einbettungen kompositorisch, indem eine Funktion von Rechtschreibung bis hin zu verteilten Einbettungen erlernt wird. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten erfordert MIMICK keine Umschulung des ursprünglichen Worteinbettungskorpus; Stattdessen wird das Lernen auf der Typenebene durchgeführt. Intrinsische und extrinsische Auswertungen belegen die Kraft dieses einfachen Ansatzes. In 23-Sprachen verbessert MIMICK die Leistung gegenüber einer wortbasierten Baseline für das Taggen von Sprachteil- und morphosyntaktischen Attributen. Es ist wettbewerbsfähig mit (und ergänzt) einem überwachten charakterbasierten Modell in ressourcenarmen Umgebungen.', 'id': 'Penampilan kata meningkatkan generalisasi atas fitur lexik dengan menempatkan setiap kata dalam ruang dimensi-rendah, menggunakan informasi distribusi yang diperoleh dari data tidak berlebihan. Namun, efektifitas pembenaman kata untuk tugas NLP turun terbatas dengan kata-kata luar dari vocabulari (OOV), yang tidak ada pembenaman. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan MIMICK, pendekatan untuk menghasilkan pembangunan kata OOV secara komposisi, dengan mempelajari fungsi dari ejaan ke pembangunan distribusi. Tidak seperti pekerjaan sebelumnya, MIMICK tidak membutuhkan latihan ulang pada kata asli embedding corpus; sebaliknya, belajar dilakukan pada tingkat tipe. Evaluasi internal dan ekstrinsik menunjukkan kekuatan pendekatan sederhana ini. Pada 23 bahasa, MIMICK meningkatkan prestasi atas dasar kata-berdasarkan untuk menandai bagian-dari-pidato dan atribut morfosintaksi. Ini kompetitif dengan (dan komplementari) model berdasarkan karakter yang diawasi dalam pengaturan sumber daya rendah.', 'sw': 'Word embeddings improve generalization over lexical features by placing each word in a lower-dimensional space, using distributional information obtained from unlabeled data.  Hata hivyo, ufanisi wa maneno yanayoingia kwenye mito ya chini ya mto wa NLP ni ukomo wa maneno yasiyo ya lugha (OOV), ambapo ujumbe huo haupo. Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha MIMICK, mbinu ya kutengeneza maneno ya OOV kwa pamoja, kwa kujifunza kazi kutoka kwenye maneno ya kusambaza hadi mabadiliko. Tofauti na kazi zilizopita, MIMICK haihitaji mafunzo ya upya kuhusu neno halisi lililoingia kwenye makampuni; badala yake, kujifunza inafanya kwa kiwango fulani. Tathmini za msingi na nje zinaonyesha nguvu ya mbinu hii rahisi. Kwa lugha 23, MIMICK inaboresha utendaji wa msingi wa maneno kwa kutumia sehemu ya hotuba na hoja za kifo. Ni jitihada na (na yenye umuhimu) modeli inayofuatiliwa na wahusika katika mazingira ya chini ya rasilimali.', 'tr': "Sözler girişimleri, her sözü a şak boşluka içine alyp, sözlemeýän maglumatlary ullanýar. Ýöne, indiki NLP täzelikleri üçin sözlerniň etkinliýeti ýok sözleriň(OOV) daşary edilen sözler üçin yada edilýändir. Bu kagyzda MIMICK'i, OOV sözleri döretmek üçin bir nusga görkezýäris, sözleriň sözlerinden daýlamak üçin bir funksiýa öwrenip, daýlamak guramlara çevrilýäris. MYMICK öňki işiň ýaly, başlangyç sözlerinde ýene-täk okuwçylmagy gerek däl. Ol ýerine öwrenmek hili derejede geçirilýär. Bu basit yaklaşımın gücünü gösteriyor. 23 dilde MIMICK sözlerin we morfositik atributlaryny taglamak üçin sözlerin daýan edilen bazylyk çykyşyny üýtgedýär Yüksek resurs düzümlerinde gözetlenmiş bir karakter taýýarlanan nusga bilen döwletlidir.", 'fa': 'استفاده از اطلاعات تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cای که از داده\u200cهای غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cشود، بر روی ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بهتر می\u200cشود. با این حال، فعالیت ابزار کلمات برای کار NLP پایین پایین محدود به کلمات غیر از کلمات (OOV) است که برای آن ابزار وجود ندارد. در این کاغذ، ما MIMICK را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک طریقه برای تولید کلمه OOV را با تولید یک عملکرد از نوشته\u200cها تا انجمن\u200cهای تقسیم. برخلاف کارهای قبلی، MIMICK نیاز به دوباره آموزش کردن کلمه اصلی در شرکت شرکت ندارد. به جای آن، یادگیری در سطح نوع انجام می شود. ارزیابی داخلی و خارجی قدرت این روش ساده را نشان می دهند. در ۲۳ زبان، MIMICK عملکرد بر روی یک خط پایین بر اساس کلمه برای نشان کردن قسمت سخنرانی و ویژه\u200cهای مورفوسینتیک را بهتر می\u200cکند. آن با یک مدل بر اساس شخصیت\u200cهای کنترل در تنظیمات منابع کم رقابت می\u200cکند.', 'af': "Woord inbêding verbeter generalisering oor leksiese funksies deur elke woord in 'n onderkantige spasie te plaas deur te gebruik verspreidingsinformasie wat van ongeabelde data ontvang word. Maar die effektiviteit van woord inbêding vir onderstreem NLP taak is beperk deur uit-van-woordeboek (OOV) woorde, waarvan inbêding nie bestaan nie. In hierdie papier, ons stel MIMICK voor 'n toegang om OOV woord inbettings te genereer, deur 'n funksie te leer van speletjies na verspreiding inbettings. Ongelyks soos vooraf werk, MIMICK benodig nie heroerwinning op die oorspronklike woord ingesluit korpus nie; in plaas, leer word uitgevoer op die tipe vlak. Intrinsic en extrinsic evaluations demonstrate the power of this simple approach. Op 23 taal, MIMICK verbeter prestasie oor 'n woord-gebaseerde basislien vir merking van deel-van-spreek en morfosyntaktike eienskappe. Dit is rekenaar met (en complementeer aan)  'n ondersoekte karaktergebaseerde model in lae hulpbron instellings.", 'ko': '단어 삽입은 표기되지 않은 데이터에서 얻은 분포 정보를 사용하여 단어마다 낮은 차원 공간에 놓아 어휘 특징에 대한 개괄을 향상시켰다.그러나 단어 삽입은 하위 NLP 작업의 유효성에 대해 어휘표 밖(OOV) 단어의 제한을 받고 이 단어들은 삽입이 존재하지 않는다.본고에서 우리는 맞춤법부터 분포 삽입까지의 함수를 학습하여 합성 방식으로 OOV 단어 삽입을 생성하는 방법인 MIMIC를 제시했다.이전의 작업과 달리 모방은 원시 단어를 어료 라이브러리에 끼워 넣고 다시 훈련할 필요가 없다.반면 학습은 유형급에서 진행된다.내재와 외재의 평가는 이런 간단한 방법의 위력을 증명했다.MIMICK은 23개 언어에서 단어 기반 베이스라인에 비해 단어성과 형태문법 속성 표기의 성능을 향상시켰다.낮은 자원 환경에서 감독 문자를 바탕으로 하는 모델과 경쟁성을 가지며 이를 서로 보완한다.', 'am': 'የቃላት አቀማመጥ ከሌክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች ላይ በማስቀመጥ እና ሁሉንም ቃላት በአዋራጅ ቦታ በማስቀመጥ እና ከማይታወስ ዳታ የተገኘውን የግንኙነት መረጃ በመጠቀም ያሳድጋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የNLP ሥርዓት የሚደረገው ቃላት አካባቢ (OOV) ቃላት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የOOV ቃላትን በመፍጠር ማድረግ እናስቀራለን፡፡ ከቀድሞው ስራ በተለየ MIMICK የመጀመሪያውን ቃላት በክፍል ላይ መግለጫ አያስፈልጋትም፤ በፋንታ ትምህርት በዓይነት ደረጃ ውስጥ ነው:: የውይይት እና የውጭ ማስታወቂያ የዚህን ቀላል ሥልጣን ኃይል ያሳያል፡፡ በ23 ቋንቋዎች ላይ MIMICK የንግግር ክፍል እና ሞሮፎsyntactic አካላትን ለመቀላቀል የቃላት መደገፊያውን በማድረግ ያሳድጋል፡፡ በተጨማሪው (እና በተጨማሪው) በተመለከተው የፊደል ሠሌዳው በሚያሳየው በዋጭው የክፍለ ዕድሜ አካባቢ ሞዴል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներգրավումը բարելավում է ընդհանուր տարածումը լեքսիկական հատկությունների նկատմամբ՝ ամեն բառը տեղադրելով ցածր չափերի տարածքում, օգտագործելով բաշխման տեղեկատվությունը, որը ստացվում է անվավեր տվյալներից: Այնուամենայնիվ, բառերի ներգրավման արդյունավետությունը ներգրավման հետագա ՆԼՊ խնդիրների համար սահմանափակվում է բառերով, որոնց համար ներգրավման գոյություն չունի: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք MIMICK-ը, որը ստեղծում է OOOWord-ի ներդրումը բառերի համադրության մեջ, ուսումնասիրելով ֆունկցիա գրություններից մինչև բաժանման ներդրումներ: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ աշխատանքին, MIMICK-ը չի պահանջում վերադաստիարակել կորպուսի ներգրավման սկզբնական բառը, փոխարենը, սովորելը կատարվում է տիպի մակարդակում: Ինտրինսիկ և արտաքին գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս այս պարզ մոտեցումների ուժը: On 23 languages, MIMICK improves performance over a word-based baseline for tagging part-of-speech and morphosyntactic attributes.  Այն մրցակցում է (և համալրացնում է) ցածր ռեսուրսների միջավայրում կառավարվող հիմքի մոդելի հետ:', 'az': "Sözlər içərisində dil özellikləri üzərində genelləşdirilməsini, hər sözü a şağı ölçülük alana yerləşdirərək, əlamətsiz məlumatlardan alınan dağıtım məlumatlarını istifadə edir. Lakin, indik NLP işləri üçün yazılmış sözlərin faydalanılığı sözlərin dış sözləri (OOV) ilə müəyyən edilməyən sözlərdir. Bu kağızda, MIMICK'i, OOV sözlərini birlikdə yaratmaq üçün bir yol göstərdik, sözlərdən dağıtmaq üçün fəaliyyəti öyrəndik. Əvvəlki işlərə bənzər, MIMICK orijinal sözlərin körpüsü ilə yenidən təhsil etməsi lazımdır. əvəzində öyrənmək növ səviyyəsində gerçəklənir. Bu basit tərzin gücünü göstərir. 23 dildə, MIMICK sözlərin bir hissəsini və morfosintaktik əlaqələrini etiketləmək üçün sözlərin tabanlı sətir üstündə performansını daha yaxşılaşdırır. Bu, a şağı ressurs ayarlarında gözləyirlən karakter-tabanlı modeli ilə müqayisədir.", 'hr': 'Uključenje riječi poboljšava generalizaciju nad leksičkim karakteristikama stavljajući svaku riječ u niži dimenzionalni prostor, koristeći distribucijske informacije koje su dobile od neoznačenih podataka. Međutim, učinkovitost uključenja riječi za zadatke dolje NLP ograničena je riječima izvan riječi (OOV), za koje ne postoje uključenje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo MIMICK, pristup stvaranju riječi OOV-a kompozicionalno, učeći funkciju od pisanja do distribucijskih integracija. Za razliku od prethodnog rada, MIMICK ne zahtijeva ponovno obuku na originalnoj riječi koja uključuje korpus; umjesto toga, učenje se izvršava na nivou tipa. Intrinsic i ekstrinsic procjene pokazuju moć ovog jednostavnog pristupa. Na 23 jezika, MIMICK poboljšava učinkovitost na početnoj liniji na riječima za označavanje dio govora i morfosintaktičkih atributa. Konkurentno je s (i dodatno) nadziranom modelom na karakteru u nizim nastavama resursa.', 'sq': 'Përfshirja e fjalëve përmirëson gjeneralizimin mbi karakteristikat lexike duke vendosur çdo fjalë në një hapësirë dimensionale më të ulët, duke përdorur informacionin shpërndarës të marrë nga të dhënat pa etiketë. Megjithatë, efektshmëria e përfshirjeve të fjalëve për detyrat e NLP-së poshtë është e kufizuar nga fjalët jashtë fjalorit (OOV), për të cilat nuk ekzistojnë përfshirje. In this paper, we present MIMICK, an approach to generating OOV word embeddings compositionally, by learning a function from spellings to distributional embeddings.  Ndryshe nga puna e mëparshme, MIMICK nuk kërkon rindërtim në fjalën origjinale të përfshirjes së korpusit; instead, learning is performed at the type level.  Vlerësimet e brendshme dhe të jashtme demonstrojnë fuqinë e kësaj metode të thjeshtë. Në 23 gjuhë, MIMICK përmirëson performancën lidhur me një bazë fjalësh për të etiketuar atributet pjesë-të-fjalës dhe morfosintaktike. Ajo është konkurruese me (dhe komplementare) një model të mbikqyrur bazuar në karakter në rregullime të ulëta të burimeve.', 'cs': 'Vložení slov zlepšuje zobecnění nad lexikálními prvky umístěním každého slova do nižšího rozměrného prostoru za použití distribučních informací získaných z neznačených dat. Účinnost vkládání slov pro následné úlohy NLP je však omezena slovy mimo slovní zásobu (OOV), pro které vkládání neexistují. V tomto článku představujeme MIMICK, přístup k generování OOV slovních vložení kompozičně, učením se funkce od pravopisu až po distribuční vložení. Na rozdíl od předchozí práce, MIMICK nevyžaduje přeškolení na původní vkládající korpus slova; Místo toho se učení provádí na úrovni typu. Vnitřní a extrinzní hodnocení ukazují sílu tohoto jednoduchého přístupu. U 23 jazyků MIMICK zlepšuje výkon oproti základnímu základnímu principu slova pro značení části řeči a morfosyntaktických atributů. Je konkurenceschopný (a doplňuje) model založený na dohledu charakteru v nízkých prostředcích.', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর শব্দ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন স্থানে প্রত্যেক শব্দ নিম্নমিত স্থানে রাখার মাধ্যমে লেক্সি তবে নীচে এনএলপি কাজের জন্য শব্দের কার্যক্রম সীমাবদ্ধ, যেখানে এনএলপি কাজের বাইরে শব্দভাণ্ডার (ওওভি) শব্দগুলোর কারণে বিভিন্ন কাজ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মিইমিকেকে উপস্থাপন করছি, যা ওভি শব্দ বানানোর একটি উপায় তৈরি করার, বানানি থেকে বিতরণ বিতরণের কাজ শিখার মাধ্যমে। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কোর্পাসের মূল শব্দে পুনরায় প তার বদলে শিক্ষা এই ধরনের স্তরে প্রদর্শন করা হয়। এই সহজ পদ্ধতির ক্ষমতা প্রদর্শন করে। On 23 languages, MIMICK improves performance over a word-based baseline for tagging part-of-speech and morphosyntactic attributes.  এটি নিম্নলিখিত অক্ষরের ভিত্তিক মডেলের সাথে প্রতিযোগিতায় (এবং সমতুল্যের জন্য) প্রতিযোগিতায়।', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamine parandab leksikaalsete omaduste üldistamist, paigutades iga sõna madalamõõtmelisse ruumi, kasutades märgistamata andmetest saadud jaotusteavet. Sõna manustamise tõhusust piiravad uue tööprogrammi järgnevate ülesannete puhul aga sõnavara välised sõnad, mille manustamist ei ole. Käesolevas töös tutvustame MIMICK-i, lähenemisviisi OOV-sõna manustamisele kompositsiooniliselt, õppides funktsiooni õigekirjadest distributsioonilise manustamiseni. Erinevalt varasematest töödest ei nõua MIMICK ümberõpet algse sõna manustamise korpuse kohta; selle asemel toimub õppimine tüübi tasandil. Sisemine ja välishindamine näitavad selle lihtsa lähenemisviisi jõudu. 23 keeles parandab MIMICK jõudlust võrreldes sõnapõhise algväärtusega kõneosa ja morfosüntaktiliste atribuutide sildistamiseks. See on konkurentsivõimeline (ja täiendab) järelevalvega märgipõhise mudeliga madalate ressursside seadetes.', 'bs': 'Uključenje riječi poboljšava generalizaciju nad leksičkim karakteristikama stavljajući svaku riječ u manji dimenzionalni prostor, koristeći distribucijske informacije koje su dobile od neoznačenih podataka. Međutim, učinkovitost uključenja riječi za zadatak NLP dolje ograničena je riječima izvan riječi (OOV), za koje ne postoje uključenje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo MIMICK, pristup stvaranju riječi OOV-a kompozicionalno, učeći funkciju od pisanja do distribucijskih integracija. Za razliku od prethodnog posla, MIMICK ne zahtijeva ponovno obuku na originalnoj riječi koja uključuje korpus; umjesto toga, učenje se izvršava na nivou tipa. Intrinsic i ekstrinsic procjene pokazuju moć ovog jednostavnog pristupa. Na 23 jezika, MIMICK poboljšava učinku na osnovnoj liniji riječi za označavanje dijelogovornih i morfosintaktičkih atributa. Konkurentno je s (i dodatno) nadziranom modelom na karakteru u području niskih resursa.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotukset parantavat yleistymistä sanastoominaisuuksiin sijoittamalla jokaisen sanan alempaan ulottuvuuteen käyttäen merkintättömästä datasta saatua jakelutietoa. Sanaupotusten tehoa NLP:n loppupään tehtävissä rajoittavat kuitenkin sanaston ulkopuoliset sanat, joita varten upotuksia ei ole. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään MIMICK, lähestymistapa OOV-sanaupotusten tuottamiseen kompositionaalisesti oppimalla funktio oikeinkirjoituksista jakeluupotuksiin. Toisin kuin aikaisempi työ, MIMICK ei vaadi uudelleenkoulutusta alkuperäisen sanan upotuskorpus; Sen sijaan oppiminen suoritetaan tyyppitasolla. Sisäiset ja ulkoiset arvioinnit osoittavat tämän yksinkertaisen lähestymistavan voiman. 23 kielellä MIMICK parantaa suorituskykyä sanapohjaiseen perusaikatauluun verrattuna puheen osan ja morfosyntaktisten attribuuttien merkitsemiseen. Se kilpailee (ja täydentää) valvotun merkkipohjaisen mallin kanssa matalan resurssin asetuksissa.', 'ca': "L'incorporació de paraules millora la generalització sobre les característiques lècsiques posant cada paraula en un espai de baixa dimensió, utilitzant la informació distribucional obtenida a partir de dades no etiquetades. No obstant això, l'eficacia de l'incorporació de paraules per tasques avall de NLP està limitada per paraules fora de vocabulari (OOV), per les quals no existeixen incorporacions. En aquest article, presentem el MIMICK, un enfocament per a generar integracions de paraules OOV composicionalment, aprenent una funció des d'ortografies fins a integracions distribucionals. Unlike prior work, MIMICK does not require re-training on the original word embedding corpus;  en canvi, l'aprenentatge es fa a nivell de tipus. Les evaluacions intrínsiques i extrinsiques demostren el poder d'aquest enfocament senzill. En 23 llengües, MIMICK millora el rendiment sobre una base basada en paraules per etiquetar atributs part-of-speech i morfosíntacis. És competitiu amb (i complementar a) un model basat en caràcters supervisat en condicions de baix recursos.", 'jv': 'embedding politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepul iki, kita sumulakno MMYCK , dadi kanggo ngilanggar langgambar OOOOC Sing segala macem sing dibutuhke, MMMCK ora takon popong-oprem nang awak dhéwé butuh terakno; akeh mi, akeh. Tanggal, kelas kang sampeyan ing layang-layang. long politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Punika andhados akeh lan (karo akeh lan nambah) model sing wis ngawe cara-akeh sing basa gambar n\'aturan sing titimbang.', 'ha': "@ action: button However, the effectiveness of word embeddings for downstream NLP tasks is limited by out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words, for which embeddings do not exist.  Daga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da MIMICK, wata hanyarwa wa ka sami maganar OOV da ake haɗa, a kan ka sanar da wani aikin littafan daga misalin zuwa rabon da ake saka. @ info: whatsthis An cika barci a cikin nau'i. Bayani Intrinsic da Extrint sun nuna nufi'ar wannan zawara mai sauƙi. Daga harshen 23, MIMICK ya kyautata performance kan wani salon da aka ƙayyade maganar dõmin tagg-part of-magana and morfosyntactic properties. Yana yin ƙidãya da (kuma yana kamfata zuwa) wani misali mai tsaro na rubutu cikin kayan daidaita manyan resource.", 'bo': 'Word embeddings improve generalization over lexical features by placing each word in a lower-dimensional space, using distributional information obtained from unlabeled data. ཡིན་ནའང་། downstream NLP tasks་ལ་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་embeddings for downstream NLP tasks་ནི་out-of-vocabulary In this paper, we present MIMICK, an approach to generating OOV word embeddings compositionally, by learning a function from spellings to distributional embeddings. སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དང་མེད་པར། MIMICK་ནི་ཐོག་མའི་ཐོག་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བསྐྱར་དུ་གཏོང་དགོས་མེད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐབས་དེར་སློབ་ནི་དབྱེ་བ་གྱུར་བ་རེད། ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་བློ་རིམ་གཤིས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནུས་པ་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། སྐད་ཡིག་༢༣ན་གྱིས་MIMICK་གིས་གཟུགས་རིས་གཅིག་དང་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་དང་འགྱུར་སྐྱོང་དང་། དེ་ནི་ལྟ་རྟོག་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཉུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་བསྡུར་ཡོད།', 'sk': 'Vgradnje besed izboljšajo posploševanje nad leksikalnimi značilnostmi tako, da vsako besedo postavijo v nižji dimenzijski prostor z uporabo distribucijskih informacij, pridobljenih iz neoznačenih podatkov. Vendar pa je učinkovitost vdelav besed za opravila nadaljnjega novega delovnega programa omejena z besedami zunaj besedišča, za katere vdelave ne obstajajo. V prispevku predstavljamo MIMICK, pristop k ustvarjanju OOV besednih vdelav kompozicijsko, z učenjem funkcije od črkovanja do distribucijskih vdelav. Za razliko od predhodnega dela MIMICK ne zahteva ponovnega usposabljanja o izvirnem korpusu vgradnje besede; Namesto tega se učenje izvaja na ravni tipa. Notranja in zunanja vrednotenja kažejo moč tega preprostega pristopa. V 23 jezikih MIMICK izboljša učinkovitost v primerjavi z besednim osnovnim osnovnim načrtom za označevanje dela govora in morfosintaktičnih atributov. Konkurenčna je z nadzorovanim modelom, ki temelji na znakih in ga dopolnjuje v nastavitvah z nizkimi viri.', 'he': 'תוכניות מילים משתפרות את הגנרליזציה מעל תכונות לקסיות על ידי השימוש של כל מילה בחלל ממימד נמוך יותר, בשימוש מידע פיצוי שנקבל ממידע ללא סימנים. עם זאת, יעילות המילים של משימות NLP מתקדמות מוגבלת על ידי מילים מחוץ למילים (OOV), שבגלל הן אינן קיימות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את MIMICK, גישה לייצור מילים של OOV ממרכיב, על ידי ללמוד פונקציה מאיתויים למרכיבים פיצועיים. בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת, MIMICK לא דורש אימון מחדש על המילה המקורית של הקורפוס. instead, learning is performed at the type level.  הערכות פנימיות וחיצוניות מראות את כוח הגישה הפשוטה הזו. ב-23 שפות, MIMICK משפר ביצועים על בסיס מילים לתייג חלק מהנאום ומורפוסינטקטי. היא תחרותית עם (ותוספת) מודל מבוסס על אופיים מבוסס על אופיים במסדרות משאבים נמוכות.'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation with Source-Side Latent Graph Parsing', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية مع تحليل الرسم البياني الكامن من جانب المصدر', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale avec analyse graphique latente côté source', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal con análisis de gráficos latentes del lado de origen', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural com análise de gráfico latente do lado da fonte', 'ja': 'ソース側の潜在的なグラフ解析によるニューラル機械翻訳', 'zh': '有源端潜图解析之神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод с анализом скрытых графов на стороне источника', 'hi': 'स्रोत-साइड अव्यक्त ग्राफ पार्सिंग के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach le Parsáil Graf Folaigh ar an Taobh Foinse', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás forrás oldali oldali grafikon értelmezéssel', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση με πλευρική ανάλυση γραφήματος πηγής', 'kk': 'Кейінгі график талдау көзі жағындағы нейрондық машинаның аудармасы', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale con analisi del grafico laterale del lato sorgente', 'lt': 'Neuralinės mašinos vertimas su šaltinio Latent Graph analize', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural dengan Penghuraian Graf Lewat Sisi Sumber', 'ml': 'സോര്\u200dസ്സ്- സൈഡ്- ലാറ്റെന്\u200dറ് ഗ്രാഫ് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങുമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mn': 'Нээлт-талын дараагийн график шалгалтын мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni ta’ Makkinarju Newrali b’Analiżi tal-Grafiki Latenti fuq in-naħa tas-Sors', 'no': 'Neuralmaskinsomsetjing med kjeldeside- latent- tolking av grafikk', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală cu analizarea graficului lateral sursă', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe z analizą bocznego wykresu po stronie źródła', 'sr': 'Neuralna mašina prevoda sa proraèunanjem poslednjeg grafika na izvoru', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරභාව- පැත්තේ පස්සේ ග්\u200dරාෆ් විශ්ලේෂණය සමග න්\u200dයූරල මේෂින් භාවිතය', 'so': 'Translation with Source-Side Latent Graph Parsing', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning med källsidig grafisk tolkning', 'ta': 'மூலம்- பக்கத்தில் நெருக்கி இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'سورست-سائڈ لٹینٹ گراف پارسینگ کے ساتھ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch cấu trúc thần kinh với đồ hoạ tiết nền tiết', 'bg': 'Нервен машинен превод с латентно анализиране на графиките от страната на източника', 'hr': 'Neuralno preobraćanje stroja sa proračunjem posljednjih grafa na izvoru', 'nl': 'Neurale machinevertaling met bronzijde latere grafiekparsing', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse med kildeside sidefortolkning af graf', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit quellenseitigem Laternt Graph Parsing', 'id': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural dengan Analisasi Graf Terlambat Sisi Sumber', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی با تولید گراف بعد از منبع', 'ko': '원본 잠재도 해석 신경 기계 번역', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural With Chanzo-Upande Kusini Graph ya hivi karibuni', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çeşme-ýaňky Gadym Taýýarlamasy bilen Näral Mazmunlar terjime', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i Makinës Neurale me analizimin e grafikut në anën e burimit', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Qaynaq-t톛r톛fd톛n Sonra Grafik Parlamas캼 il톛 N칬ral Makinat T톛rc칲m톛si', 'bn': 'Neural Machine Translation with Source-Side Latent Graph Parsing', 'bs': 'Neuralna prevoda stroja sa proračunjem poslednjeg grafa na izvoru', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge koos allikakülje latentgraafika parsimisega', 'ca': "Traducció de màquines neuronals amb l'analització de gràfics tardius de la font", 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad s analýzou laterálního grafu na straně zdroje', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös lähdepuolen latenttigrafiikan analysoinnilla', 'jv': 'Nyural Majin Terjamahan karo Source-Side Laat Graph Tanal', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Živčni strojni prevod z latentnim razčlenjevanjem grafikonov na strani vira', 'he': 'תרגום מכונת עצבית עם מעבדת גרפים מאוחרת בצד המקור', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་མིང་འཁོར་གཞུང་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་ནང་དོན་ཕྱོགས་རྗེས་མའི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a novel neural machine translation model which jointly learns translation and source-side latent graph representations of sentences. Unlike existing pipelined approaches using syntactic parsers, our end-to-end model learns a latent graph parser as part of the encoder of an attention-based neural machine translation model, and thus the parser is optimized according to the translation objective. In experiments, we first show that our model compares favorably with state-of-the-art sequential and pipelined syntax-based NMT models. We also show that the performance of our model can be further improved by pre-training it with a small amount of treebank annotations. Our final ensemble model significantly outperforms the previous best models on the standard English-to-Japanese translation dataset.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un nouveau modèle de traduction automatique neuronale qui apprend conjointement la traduction et les représentations graphiques latentes côté source de phrases. Contrairement aux approches pipeline existantes utilisant des analyseurs syntaxiques, notre modèle de bout en bout apprend un analyseur de graphe latent dans le cadre de l'encodeur d'un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale basé sur l'attention, et ainsi l'analyseur est optimisé en fonction de l'objectif de traduction. Dans le cadre d'expériences, nous montrons d'abord que notre modèle se compare favorablement aux modèles NMT séquentiels et pipelines de dernière génération basés sur la syntaxe. Nous montrons également que les performances de notre modèle peuvent être encore améliorées en le pré-entraînant avec un petit nombre d'annotations de banque d'arbres. Notre modèle d'ensemble final surpasse largement les meilleurs modèles précédents sur le jeu de données de traduction standard de l'anglais vers le japonais.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا جديدًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية والذي يتعلم بشكل مشترك الترجمة وتمثيلات الرسم البياني الكامن من جانب المصدر للجمل. على عكس الأساليب القائمة على خطوط الأنابيب باستخدام المحلل اللغوي النحوي ، يتعلم نموذجنا الشامل محلل الرسم البياني الكامن كجزء من المشفر لنموذج ترجمة الآلة العصبية القائم على الانتباه ، وبالتالي يتم تحسين المحلل اللغوي وفقًا لهدف الترجمة. في التجارب ، أظهرنا أولاً أن نموذجنا يقارن بشكل إيجابي مع أحدث نماذج NMT المتسلسلة والمبنية على بناء الجملة. نوضح أيضًا أنه يمكن تحسين أداء نموذجنا بشكل أكبر عن طريق التدريب المسبق عليه باستخدام قدر صغير من تعليقات بنك الشجرة. يتفوق نموذج المجموعة النهائي لدينا بشكل كبير على أفضل النماذج السابقة على مجموعة بيانات الترجمة القياسية من الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un nuevo modelo de traducción automática neuronal que aprende conjuntamente la traducción y las representaciones gráficas latentes del lado de la fuente de las oraciones. A diferencia de los enfoques canalizados existentes que utilizan analizadores sintácticos, nuestro modelo de extremo a extremo aprende un analizador de gráficos latentes como parte del codificador de un modelo de traducción automática neuronal basado en la atención y, por lo tanto, el analizador se optimiza de acuerdo con el objetivo de traducción. En experimentos, primero demostramos que nuestro modelo se compara favorablemente con los modelos NMT basados en sintaxis secuenciales y segmentados de última generación. También demostramos que el rendimiento de nuestro modelo se puede mejorar aún más si lo entrenamos previamente con una pequeña cantidad de anotaciones en los bancos de árboles. Nuestro modelo de conjunto final supera significativamente a los mejores modelos anteriores en el conjunto de datos de traducción estándar del inglés al japonés.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um novo modelo de tradução automática neural que aprende conjuntamente a tradução e as representações gráficas latentes do lado da fonte de sentenças. Ao contrário das abordagens em pipeline existentes usando analisadores sintáticos, nosso modelo de ponta a ponta aprende um analisador de gráfico latente como parte do codificador de um modelo de tradução automática neural baseado em atenção e, portanto, o analisador é otimizado de acordo com o objetivo da tradução. Em experimentos, primeiro mostramos que nosso modelo se compara favoravelmente com modelos NMT baseados em sintaxe sequencial e em pipeline de última geração. Também mostramos que o desempenho do nosso modelo pode ser melhorado ainda mais ao pré-treiná-lo com uma pequena quantidade de anotações do banco de árvores. Nosso modelo de conjunto final supera significativamente os melhores modelos anteriores no conjunto de dados de tradução padrão de inglês para japonês.', 'ja': '文の翻訳とソース側の潜在的なグラフ表現を共同で学習する新規のニューラルマシン翻訳モデルを提示した。構文解析器を使用した既存のパイプライン化されたアプローチとは異なり、エンドツーエンドのモデルは、注意に基づくニューラル機械翻訳モデルのエンコーダの一部として潜在的なグラフ解析器を学習し、したがって、解析器は翻訳目標に従って最適化される。実験では、まず、私たちのモデルが最先端のシーケンシャルおよびパイプライン化された構文ベースのNMTモデルと比較して有利であることを示します。また、少量のツリーバンクアノテーションで事前トレーニングすることで、モデルのパフォーマンスをさらに向上させることができます。当社の最終的なアンサンブルモデルは、標準的な英語から日本語への翻訳データセットの以前のベストモデルを大幅に上回っています。', 'zh': '本文设一新型神经机器翻译模形,当共学句译与源侧潜在图。 与用句法解析器之流水线异,吾端学于图解析器以为神经机器翻译编码器,故解析器以译优化。 实验之中,吾先明之,与先进之序,与句法之流水线 NMT 为利。 又示以少树库注预教之,可进一步提高模形之性。 吾等终为模形英语至日语翻译数集上明优于前。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена новая модель нейронного машинного перевода, которая совместно изучает перевод и скрытые графические представления предложений на стороне источника. В отличие от существующих конвейерных подходов с использованием синтаксических парсеров, наша сквозная модель изучает скрытый парсер графов как часть кодера основанной на внимании модели нейронного машинного перевода, и, таким образом, парсер оптимизируется в соответствии с целью перевода. В экспериментах мы сначала показываем, что наша модель выгодно сравнивается с современными последовательными и конвейерными синтаксическими моделями, основанными на NMT. Мы также показываем, что производительность нашей модели можно дополнительно улучшить, предварительно обучив ее небольшим количеством аннотаций к берегам деревьев. Наша окончательная модель ансамбля значительно превосходит предыдущие лучшие модели в стандартном наборе данных перевода с английского на японский язык.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक उपन्यास न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है जो संयुक्त रूप से वाक्यों के अनुवाद और स्रोत-पक्ष अव्यक्त ग्राफ प्रतिनिधित्व सीखता है। वाक्यात्मक पार्सर का उपयोग करके मौजूदा पाइपलाइन वाले दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत, हमारा एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल एक ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल के एन्कोडर के हिस्से के रूप में एक अव्यक्त ग्राफ पार्सर सीखता है, और इस प्रकार पार्सर को अनुवाद उद्देश्य के अनुसार अनुकूलित किया जाता है। प्रयोगों में, हम पहले दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक अनुक्रमिक और पाइपलाइन वाले वाक्यविन्यास-आधारित एनएमटी मॉडल के साथ अनुकूल रूप से तुलना करता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को ट्रीबैंक एनोटेशन की एक छोटी राशि के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण द्वारा और बेहतर बनाया जा सकता है। हमारा अंतिम पहनावा मॉडल मानक अंग्रेजी-से-जापानी अनुवाद डेटासेट पर पिछले सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल को काफी बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar seo samhail néar-aistritheora meaisín nua a fhoghlaimíonn aistriúchán agus léiriú graf folaigh ó thaobh foinse d’abairtí le chéile. Murab ionann agus cineálacha cur chuige píblíne atá ann cheana féin ag baint úsáide as parsálaithe comhréire, foghlaimíonn ár múnla ceann-go-deireadh parsálaí graif folaigh mar chuid den ionchódóir ar shamhail aistriúcháin inneall néarbhunaithe aird-bhunaithe, agus mar sin déantar an parsálaí a bharrfheabhsú de réir an chuspóra aistriúcháin. I dturgnaimh, léirímid ar dtús go bhfuil comparáid fhabhrach ag ár múnla le samhlacha NMT seicheamhacha agus comhréire nua-aimseartha atá bunaithe ar chomhréir. Léirímid freisin gur féidir feidhmíocht ár múnla a fheabhsú tuilleadh ach é a réamhoiliúint le méid beag nótaí crann crann. Is fearr go mór ár múnla ensemble deiridh ná na múnlaí is fearr roimhe seo ar an mbunachar sonraí caighdeánach aistriúcháin Béarla-go-Seapáinis.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα νέο μοντέλο νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης που μαθαίνει από κοινού τη μετάφραση και τις λανθάνουσες αναπαραστάσεις γραφημάτων από την πλευρά της πηγής. Σε αντίθεση με τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις που χρησιμοποιούν συντακτικούς αναλυτές, το μοντέλο μας μαθαίνει έναν λανθάνοντα αναλυτή γραφήματος ως μέρος του κωδικοποιητή ενός μοντέλου νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης βασισμένου στην προσοχή, και έτσι ο αναλυτής βελτιστοποιείται σύμφωνα με τον στόχο της μετάφρασης. Σε πειράματα, πρώτα δείχνουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας συγκρίνεται ευνοϊκά με τα σύγχρονα διαδοχικά μοντέλα που βασίζονται στη σύνταξη. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι η απόδοση του μοντέλου μας μπορεί να βελτιωθεί περαιτέρω με την προεκπαίδευσή του με μια μικρή ποσότητα σχολίων δέντρων. Το τελικό μοντέλο συνόλου μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα προηγούμενα καλύτερα μοντέλα στο τυποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων μετάφρασης αγγλικά-ιαπωνικών.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új neurális gépi fordítási modellt mutat be, amely közösen tanulja a fordítást és a forrás oldali látens gráf ábrázolásokat mondatok. A meglévő, szintaktikus elemzőket használó pipelined megközelítésekkel ellentétben a mi end-to-end modellünk egy figyelem-alapú neurális gépi fordítási modell kódolójának részeként egy látens gráf elemzőt tanul, így az elemzőt a fordítási cél szerint optimalizáljuk. Kísérletekben először is megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk kedvezően hasonlít össze a legkorszerűbb szekvenciális és pipelined szintaxis alapú NMT modellekkel. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk teljesítményét tovább lehet javítani, ha előkészítjük egy kis mennyiségű fabank megjegyzéssel. A végső együttesmodellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a korábbi legjobb modelleket a normál angol-japán fordítási adatkészleten.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ახალგაზრდა ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების მოდელი, რომელიც ერთადერთად ვისწავლის გადაწყვეტილება და მხოლოდ მხოლოდ ლატენტი გრაფის გამო სინტაქტიკური პარაზერების გამოყენება, ჩვენი დასასრულებული მოდელი დასასრულებული მოდელის გასწავლის ლატენტიკური პარაზერი, როგორც ინფორმაციის ნეიროლური მაქსინის გასრულებული მოდელის კოდირების ნაწილი, და ასე რომ პარაზერი უ ექსპერიმენტებში, ჩვენ პირველად ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგენება შემდგენებულია სინტაქსი NMT მოდელით. ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო ჩვენი საბოლოო მოდელის მოდელია ძალიან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რაც უკეთესი მოდელის მოდელის სტანდარტული ინგლისური-იაპონური დატვირთვალთან და', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un nuovo modello di traduzione automatica neurale che impara congiuntamente la traduzione e le rappresentazioni dei grafici latenti sul lato sorgente delle frasi. A differenza degli approcci pipelined esistenti che utilizzano parser sintattici, il nostro modello end-to-end impara un parser grafico latente come parte dell'encoder di un modello di traduzione automatica neurale basato sull'attenzione, e quindi il parser è ottimizzato in base all'obiettivo di traduzione. In esperimenti, mostriamo innanzitutto che il nostro modello si confronta favorevolmente con i modelli NMT sequenziali e pipelined all'avanguardia basati sulla sintassi. Dimostriamo anche che le prestazioni del nostro modello possono essere ulteriormente migliorate predisponendolo con una piccola quantità di annotazioni sulla panchina degli alberi. Il nostro modello di ensemble finale supera significativamente i migliori modelli precedenti sul set di dati standard di traduzione inglese-giapponese.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas naujas nervinių mašinų vertimo modelis, kuriame kartu mokomi vertimai ir iš šaltinio latentiniai grafiniai frazių vaizdai. Priešingai nei esami dujotiekiai, naudojantys sintaktinius analizatorius, mūsų galutinis model is išmoko latentišką grafikos analizatorių kaip dėmesiu pagrįsto neurologinio vertimo modelio kodavimo dalį, todėl analizatorius optimizuojamas atsižvelgiant į vertimo tikslą. Eksperimentuose pirmiausia parodome, kad mūsų modelis yra palankiai lyginamas su naujausiais nuosekliais ir vamzdynais pagrįstais NMT modeliais. Taip pat rodome, kad mūsų modelio rezultatai gali būti toliau pagerinti parengiant jį nedidelėmis medienos pagrindo anotacijomis. Our final ensemble model significantly outperforms the previous best models on the standard English-to-Japanese translation dataset.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз сөздердің аудармасын және көз жағындағы сөздердің негізгі графикалық түрлендіруді біріктіретін жаңа невралдық компьютердің аудармасының үлгісін көрсетеді. Синтактикалық талдаушыларды қолдану үшін қолданатын қалай, біздің соңғы- соңғы үлгісіміз назардағы невралдық компьютерді аудару үлгісінің кодерінің бір бөлігі ретінде графикалық талдаушыларын оқып, олар аудару мақсатына сәйкес опти Тәжірибелерде бірінші рет, өзіміздің моделіміз NMT синтаксисінің негізделген синтаксис үлгілерімен салыстырады. Мұндай-ақ біз үлгіміздің әрекеттерімізді алдын- ала оқыту арқылы кішкентай мәліметтерімен жақсартуға болады. Біздің соңғы енсембрлеу үлгіміз стандартты ағылшын- жапон аудармалардың алдыңғы ең жақсы үлгілерін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan model terjemahan mesin saraf baru yang secara bersama belajar terjemahan dan mewakili graf tersembunyi sisi sumber kalimat. Tidak seperti pendekatan pipelined yang wujud menggunakan penghurai sintaktik, model akhir-akhir kita belajar penghurai graf tersembunyi sebagai sebahagian daripada pengekod model terjemahan mesin saraf berdasarkan perhatian, dan oleh itu penghurai diterima mengikut objektif terjemahan. Dalam eksperimen, kita pertama-tama menunjukkan bahawa model kita dibandingkan dengan model NMT berasaskan sintaks yang terkini. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa prestasi model kami boleh diperbaiki lebih lanjut dengan melatihnya sebelum melatih dengan jumlah kecil anotasi pokok. Model ensemble terakhir kita jauh melebihi model terbaik terdahulu pada set data terjemahan bahasa Inggeris ke Jepun piawai.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta mudell ġdid ta’ traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali li jitgħallem b’mod konġunt it-traduzzjoni u r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-grafika moħbija min-naħa tas-sors tas-sentenzi. Għall-kuntrarju ta’ approċċi pipelined eżistenti bl-użu ta’ analizzaturi sintetiċi, il-mudell tagħna minn tarf sa tarf jitgħallem analizzatur tal-grafika moħbija bħala parti mill-kodifikatur ta’ mudell ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni, u għalhekk il-analizzatur jiġi ottimizzat skont l-objettiv tat-traduzzjoni. Fl-esperimenti, l-ewwel naraw li l-mudell tagħna jqabbel b’mod favorevoli mal-mudelli NMT segwenzjali u bbażati fuq is-sintaks avvanzati. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-prestazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna tista’ tittejjeb aktar permezz ta’ taħriġ minn qabel b’ammont żgħir ta’ annotazzjonijiet fuq il-bażi tas-siġar. Il-mudell finali tagħna tal-ensemble huwa konsiderevolment akbar mill-aħjar mudelli preċedenti fuq is-sett tad-dejta standard tat-traduzzjoni Ingliż-Ġappuniż.', 'mk': 'Оваа хартија претставува нов модел за превод на неврални машини кој заедно учи превод и тајни графички претставувања на речениците од страната на изворот. За разлика од постојните нафтоводени пристапи користејќи синтактички анализатори, нашиот модел од крај до крај научи лантен анализатор на графики како дел од кодерот на модел на превод на невројална машина базиран на внимание, и така анализаторот е оптимизиран според целта на превод. Во експериментите, прво покажуваме дека нашиот модел се споредува со најдобрите секвенцијални и гасоводени НМТ модели. Исто така покажуваме дека изведбата на нашиот модел може да се подобри понатаму со преобуката со мала количина анатации на дрвјата. Нашиот финален модел на ансамблот значително ги надминува претходните најдобри модели на стандардниот англиско-јапонски преведувачки податок.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് പരിഭാഷവും സോര നിലവിലുള്ള പൈപ്പെള്\u200dട്ടിക്ക് പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിലവിലുള്ള പൈപ്പര്\u200dട്ടിക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി നമ്മുടെ അവസാന മോഡല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യം കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സാധാരണ-സാമാന്ത്രികമായ സംസ്ഥാനത്തോടും പിപ്പെള്\u200d സിന്\u200dക്സാക്സ ഞങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രകടനം കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനത്തിന നമ്മുടെ അവസാനത്തെ ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ജപ്പാനീസിലെ പരിഭാഷയുടെ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാര്\u200dട്ടാള്\u200d സാധാരണ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മു', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit nytt neuralmaskineoversettelsesmodell som lærer omsetjing og kjeldeside latentgrafiske representasjonar av setningar. I motsetjing av dei eksisterande røylinjende tilnærmingane med syntaktiske tolkarar lærer vårt sluttmodell ein latent graftolkar som del av koderen av eit kjernemaskinsomsetjingsmodul som er basert på oppmerksomsetjingsmodul, og så blir tolkaren optimalisert etter omsetjingsmodulet. I eksperimenter viser vi først at modellen vårt sammenligner favoritt med syntaksbaserte NMT-modeller i kunsttilstanden som sekvensielle og røykliniske syntaks. Vi viser også at utviklinga av modellen vårt kan vera forbetra ved å opplæra det med lite mengda treebank-notasjonar. Det siste ensemblemmodellet vårt utfører dei førre beste modelane på datasettet for omsetjingar frå engelsk til japansk.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nowy neuronowy model tłumaczenia maszynowego, który wspólnie uczy się tłumaczenia i ukrytych wykresów zdań po stronie źródła. W przeciwieństwie do istniejących podejść pipelined wykorzystujących parsery składni, nasz model end-to-end uczy się utajonego parsera wykresu jako części kodera neuronowego modelu tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na uwadze, a tym samym parser jest zoptymalizowany zgodnie z celem tłumaczenia. W eksperymentach najpierw pokazujemy, że nasz model porównuje się korzystnie z najnowocześniejszymi modelami sekwencyjnymi i opartymi na składni opartymi na pipelinej. Pokazujemy również, że wydajność naszego modelu można jeszcze bardziej poprawić poprzez przygotowanie go z niewielką ilością adnotacji na brzegu drzewa. Nasz ostateczny model zespołu znacznie przewyższa poprzednie najlepsze modele w standardowym zestawie danych tłumaczeń angielsko-japoński.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас шинэ мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт загварыг харуулдаг. Энэ нь хэлбэрүүдийн хөрөнгө оруулалт болон эх үүсвэрийн талаас харьцуулагддаг график юм. Синтактик ажиллагчид ашиглаж байгаа хоолойн шугамны арга барилгуудын ялгаатай, бидний төгсгөл-төгсгөл загвар нь анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн механикийн хөрөнгө хөрөнгө загварын нэг хэсэг болгон график ажиллагчийг сурдаг. Иймээс ажилла Эхлээд бидний загвар нь урлагийн дараагийн, хоолойн синтаксис дээр суурилсан NMT загвартай сайн харьцуулдаг. Мөн бид загварын үйл ажиллагааг бага хэмжээний загвар дээр сургалтын өмнө нь илүү сайжруулж чадна. Бидний сүүлийн загвар нь англи-Japon-д орчуулах өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайн загваруудыг илүү чухал болгодог.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un nou model de traducere mașină neurală care învață împreună traducerea și reprezentările grafice latente ale propozițiilor. Spre deosebire de abordările pipelined existente care utilizează parsere sintactice, modelul nostru end-to-end învață un parser grafic latent ca parte a codificatorului unui model de traducere neurală bazat pe atenție, și astfel parserul este optimizat în funcție de obiectivul traducerii. În experimente, am arătat mai întâi că modelul nostru se compară favorabil cu modelele NMT secvențiale și pipeliniate bazate pe sintaxă. De asemenea, arătăm că performanța modelului nostru poate fi îmbunătățită și mai mult prin pre-antrenarea acestuia cu o cantitate mică de adnotări de braebank. Modelul nostru final de ansamblu depășește semnificativ cele mai bune modele anterioare din setul standard de date din engleză-japoneză.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja nov model prevođenja neuralnih mašina koji zajedno uči prevođenje i latentne grafike izraze iz izvora. Za razliku od postojećih pristupa na cijevima koristeći sintaktične parsere, naš model kraja do kraja nauči latentni grafički analizator kao deo kodera model a prevoda na pažnji baziranog neuralnog mašine, i tako se analizator optimizuje prema cilju prevoda. U eksperimentima, prvi put pokazujemo da naš model uspoređuje favoritno sa sekvencijalnim i kanaliziranim modelima NMT-a. Takoðe pokazujemo da je provedba našeg model a mogla biti bolje pre obuke sa malim kolièinom annotacija o treebanciji. Naš poslednji model ensemble značajno iznosi prethodne najbolje modele na standardnom setu podataka za prevod engleskog na japanski.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en ny neural maskin철vers채ttningsmodell som gemensamt l채r sig 철vers채ttning och k채llsidan latenta grafrepresentationer av meningar. Till skillnad fr책n befintliga pipelinerade tillv채gag책ngss채tt som anv채nder syntaktiska tolkare l채r v책r end-to-end modell en latent graftolkare som en del av kodaren f철r en uppm채rksamhetsbaserad neural maskin철vers채ttning modell, och s책lunda 채r parsern optimerad enligt 철vers채ttningsm책let. I experiment visar vi f철rst att v책r modell j채mf철r positivt med toppmoderna sekventiella och pipelinerade syntaxbaserade NMT-modeller. Vi visar ocks책 att prestandan hos v책r modell kan f철rb채ttras ytterligare genom att pre-tr채na den med en liten m채ngd tr채dankar anteckningar. V책r slutgiltiga ensemblemodell 철vertr채ffar avsev채rt de tidigare b채sta modellerna p책 standarddataupps채ttningen engelsk-japansk 철vers채ttning.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්ත පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව මදුල් එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්නේ වාර්තාව සහ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත සංවිධානය සඳහා පායිප්ලින් විදිහට පායිප්ලින් විදිහට, අපේ end-to-end මොඩල් ඉගෙන ඉන්නවා ලේටෙන්ට් ග්\u200dරාෆ් විශේෂකයේ අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා පාය අපි පරීක්ෂණයේ පළමු පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් සහ පායිප්ලින්ඩ් සංකේතයෙන අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරමාණය තව පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ඒක පුරුද්ධියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා පු අපේ අන්තිම අන්තිම අන්තිම මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ජාපාන් අනුවර්ණ දත්ත සැ', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu diyaariyaa model turjumista maskaxda neurada ah, kaas oo si wadajir ah u barta turjumista iyo xarunta rasmiga ee ugu dambeeyey ee xukunka hadallada. Tilmaamaha joogta oo a an kala duwan ahayn oo isticmaalaya baaritaanka syntactic, modelkayaga dhammaadka ugu dambeeya ayaa baranaya xarafta ugu dambeeya oo lambarka ah sida qayb ka mid ah qoraalka turjumista maskaxda neurada ah, sidaa darteed waxaa loo optimizaa baaritaanka si waafaqsan waxyaabaha turjumaadda. Imtixaanka marka ugu horeysa waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayaga si fiican u dhigno noocyada qoraalka farshaxanka iyo sameynta sameynta qoraalka ee NMT-ka hooseeya. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in sameynta modellkayaga lagu kordhin karo waxbarashada horumarinta, iyadoo ku jirta dhibaatooyin yar oo ku saabsan treebank. Tusaale ahaan ugu dambaysta ah ayaa si muhiim ah u muuqata tusaalooyinkii hore oo ku saabsan taariikhda turjumista ee afka Ingiriiska-Jabanees.', 'ta': '@ info இருக்கும் படப்புள்ளிகள் ஒத்திசைவு பார்சர்களை பயன்படுத்தி இருக்கும் முறைமை மாதிரி மாதிரி ஒரு சமீபத்தில் வரைகலை பார்க்கிறது ஒரு கவனத்தை அடிப்படையாக்கும் புதிய இயந சோதனைகளில், முதலில் நாம் மாதிரி காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரியில் சிறப்பாக ஒப்பிடுகிறது என்று ம We also show that the performance of our model can be further improved by pre-training it with a small amount of treebank annotations.  நிலையான ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து ஜப்பானிய மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரவுத்தளத்தில் முந்தைய சிறந்த மாதிரிகளை முன்னோட்டத', 'ur': 'This paper presents a new neural machine translation model which jointly learns translation and source-side latent graph representations of sentences. سینٹکتیک پارسر کے مطابق موجود پائپ لینڈ کے مطابق طریقے سے مختلف، ہماری آخر-to-end موڈل ایک لاٹینٹ گراف پارس کو اچھی طرح سکھاتا ہے ایک توجه پر بنیاد رکھی نیورل ماشین ترجمہ موڈل کی کوڈر کے حصہ سے، اور اسی طرح پارس ترجمہ موضوع کے آزمائش میں ہم پہلی بار دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل اچھے طریقے سے مثالی کے ساتھ مثالی کرتا ہے ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے مدل کی عملکرد اس سے پہلے ترسین کے ذریعہ بہت زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتی ہے۔ ہمارے آخری امبرل موڈل کو معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ اس سے پہلے بہترین موڈل استاندارڈ انگلیسی سے جاپانی ترجمہ ڈاٹ سٹ پر عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu qog\xa0Ľoz so\xa0Ľzlarning tarjima- tarjima modelini birlashtirish va manba- side latent graph representlarini o\xa0Ľrganadi. Name Birinchi tajribada, biz modelimizni o'xshash holatda o'xshash soniyalarning holatiga va ko\xa0Ľpaytirilgan NMT modellariga kamaytirish mumkin. Biz modelimizning bajarishimizni bir kichkina treebank tajribalari bilan birinchi o'rganishga bajarishimiz mumkin. Bizning oxirgi modelimizning oldingi eng ingliz- japoncha tarjima ma\xa0ľlumot tarjimasining andoza eng yaxshi modellarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh mới mà cùng nhau học cách dịch chuyển và biểu tượng đồ đồ tần số ẩn ở bên nguồn. Không giống như những đường ống đang sử dụng các phân tách thần kinh, người mẫu cuối cùng của chúng ta học một bộ phân tích đồ thị tiềm ẩn như một phần của bộ mã hóa của mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh dựa vào sự chú ý, và do đó phân tách được tối ưu tiên theo mục tiêu dịch chuyển. Trong các thí nghiệm, chúng tôi cho thấy mẫu của chúng tôi tương thích với mẫu võng mạc và đường ống theo cấu trúc tổng thống NMB. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy hiệu quả của mô hình có thể cải thiện thêm bằng việc huấn luyện nó với một lượng nhỏ ghi chú kĩ thuật. Cách mô hình kết hợp cuối cùng của chúng tôi vượt trội hơn những mẫu tốt trước trên tập tin dịch tiếng Anh-Nhật tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Статията представя нов модел на невронен машинен превод, който съвместно изучава превода и латентните графични изображения на изречения от страна на източника. За разлика от съществуващите тръбопроводи подходи, използващи синтактични анализатори, нашият модел от край до край научава латентен анализатор на графики като част от кодера на базиран на вниманието неврален модел за машинен превод и по този начин анализаторът е оптимизиран според целта на превода. В експериментите първо показваме, че нашият модел се сравнява благоприятно с най-съвременните последователни и тръбопроводи базирани на синтаксис модели НМТ. Също така показваме, че производителността на нашия модел може да бъде допълнително подобрена чрез предварителна подготовка с малко количество анотации на дърветата. Нашият окончателен ансамбъл модел значително надминава предишните най-добри модели в стандартния набор от данни за преводи от английски на японски език.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja nov model prevoda neuralnih strojeva koji zajedno uči prevod i latentni graf na izvoru. Za razliku od postojećih pristupa cijevima koristeći sintaktične analizatore, naš model kraja do kraja uči latentni analizator grafa kao dio kodera model a prevoda na pozornosti osnovanog na neurološkom stroju, pa se analizator optimizira prema cilju prevoda. U eksperimentima, prvi put pokazujemo da se naš model uspoređuje favoritetno sa sekvencijalnim i cijevinom sintaksimalnim modelima NMT-a. Također pokazujemo da se učinkovitost našeg model a može boljeti predobučavanjem s malim količinom zabilježenja za treebank. Naš posljednji model ensemble značajno iznosi prethodne najbolje modele na standardnom setu podataka za prevod engleskog na japanski.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en ny neural maskinoversættelsesmodel, der i fællesskab lærer oversættelse og kildeside latente grafrepræsentationer af sætninger. I modsætning til eksisterende pipelined tilgange ved hjælp af syntaktiske fortolkere, vores end-to-end model lærer en latent graffortolker som en del af encoderen af en opmærksomhedsbaseret neural maskinoversættelsesmodel, og dermed fortolkeren er optimeret i henhold til oversættelsesmålet. I eksperimenter viser vi først, at vores model sammenligner positivt med state-of-the-art sekventielle og pipelined syntaks-baserede NMT modeller. Vi viser også, at ydeevnen af vores model kan forbedres yderligere ved at prætræne den med en lille mængde træbank annotationer. Vores endelige ensemble model overgår betydeligt de tidligere bedste modeller på standarddatasættet engelsk-japansk oversættelse.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een nieuw neuraal machine translation model dat gezamenlijk vertaling en bronzijde latente grafiekrepresentaties van zinnen leert. In tegenstelling tot bestaande pipeline benaderingen die syntactische parsers gebruiken, leert ons end-to-end model een latente grafiekparser als onderdeel van de encoder van een attentie-gebaseerd neural machine translation model, en dus wordt de parser geoptimaliseerd volgens het vertaaldoel. In experimenten laten we eerst zien dat ons model zich gunstig vergelijkt met state-of-the-art sequentiële en pipeline syntaxis gebaseerde NMT modellen. We laten ook zien dat de prestaties van ons model verder verbeterd kunnen worden door het vooraf te trainen met een kleine hoeveelheid boombank annotaties. Ons uiteindelijke ensemblemodel presteert aanzienlijk beter dan de vorige beste modellen op de standaard Engels-naar-Japans vertaaldataset.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt ein neuartiges neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungsmodell vor, das gemeinsam Übersetzung und quellenseitige latente Graphen-Darstellungen von Sätzen lernt. Im Gegensatz zu bestehenden pipelined-Ansätzen, die syntaktische Parser verwenden, lernt unser End-to-End-Modell einen latenten Graph Parser als Teil des Encoders eines aufmerksamkeitsbasierten neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungsmodells, und so wird der Parser entsprechend dem Übersetzungsziel optimiert. In Experimenten zeigen wir zunächst, dass sich unser Modell positiv mit modernen sequenziellen und pipelined syntaxbasierten NMT-Modellen vergleicht. Wir zeigen auch, dass die Leistung unseres Modells durch Vortraining mit einer kleinen Anzahl von Baumbank-Anmerkungen weiter verbessert werden kann. Unser endgültiges Ensemblemodell übertrifft deutlich die bisherigen besten Modelle auf dem Standard-Englisch-Japanisch-Übersetzungsdatensatz.', 'ko': '본고는 새로운 신경기계 번역 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 문장의 번역과 원단 잠재도 표시를 연합하여 학습한다.기존의 문법분석기를 사용하는 유수선 방법과 달리 우리의 끝에서 끝까지의 모델은 잠재도 분석기를 학습하고 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경기계 번역모델의 인코더의 일부로서 번역목표에 따라 분석기를 최적화시킨다.실험에서 우리는 먼저 우리의 모델이 가장 선진적인 순서와 유수선 문법을 바탕으로 하는 NMT 모델에 비해 우월성을 가진다는 것을 나타냈다.우리는 또한 소량의 트리 라이브러리 주석을 사용하여 모델에 대해 예비 훈련을 하면 모델의 성능을 더욱 높일 수 있다고 밝혔다.표준 영일 번역 데이터 집합에서 우리의 최종 집적 모델은 이전의 가장 좋은 모델보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی جدید را نشان می دهد که با همدیگر گراف ترجمه و ترجمه\u200cهای منبعی از جمله\u200cها را یاد می\u200cگیرد. برخلاف دسترسی\u200cهای لوله\u200cهای موجود با استفاده از بازرسان\u200cهای سنتاکتیک، مدل پایان به پایان\u200cمان یک بازرس گراف latent را به عنوان بخشی از کودهر یک مدل ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین\u200cهای عصبی بر روی توجه یاد می\u200cگیرد، و بنابراین پایان\u200cدهنده بر اساس هدف ترجمه\u200cای بهترین می در آزمایشات، اولین بار نشان می دهیم که مدل ما با مدل NMT بنیاد سنتاکسی که در حالت هنر تعریف می\u200cکند، با مدل\u200cهای سنتاکسی بنیاد لوله\u200cای مقایسه می\u200cکند. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که عملکرد مدل ما می تواند با توجه پیش آموزش آن را با یک مقدار کوچک توضیح درختان بهتر شود. مدل نهایی ما در مورد ترجمه داده های انگلیسی و ژاپنی استاندارد خیلی بیشتر از این مدل های قبلی را انجام می دهد.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan model terjemahan mesin saraf baru yang bersama-sama belajar terjemahan dan representasi grafik rahasia sisi sumber kalimat. Tidak seperti pendekatan pipa yang ada menggunakan parser sintaksi, model kita akhir-akhir belajar parser grafik latent sebagai bagian dari pengekoder model terjemahan mesin saraf berdasarkan perhatian, dan oleh itu parser optimisasi menurut tujuan terjemahan. Dalam eksperimen, kita pertama-tama menunjukkan bahwa model kita dibandingkan dengan model NMT yang terbaik dan berdasarkan sintaks. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa prestasi model kami dapat lebih lanjut diperbaiki dengan prapelatihan dengan jumlah kecil anotasi pokok. Model ensemble akhir kita jauh lebih besar dari model terbaik sebelumnya pada set data terjemahan bahasa Inggris-Jepang standar.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha muundo wa utafsiri wa kisasa wa taratibu ambalo kwa pamoja unajifunza tafsiri na maonyesho ya picha za hivi karibuni ya hukumu. Tofauti na mbinu zilizopo na pipesi kwa kutumia mabango ya ushirikiano, mwelekeo wetu wa mwisho wa mwisho unajifunza mchoro wa hivi karibuni unachambua kama sehemu ya mpango wa mfumo wa usafsiri wa mashine yenye msingi wa kisasa, na kwa hiyo mchanganyiko unaweza kuchaguliwa kwa mujibu wa lengo la tafsiri. Katika majaribio, tunaonyesha kwanza kuwa mifano yetu inalinganisha vizuri na mitindo ya NMT yenye mfumo wa sanaa ya aina ya aina ya mfululizo na yenye mfumo wa syntax. Tunaonyesha pia kwamba utendaji wa mifano yetu unaweza kuboreshwa zaidi kwa mafunzo ya awali kwa kiasi kidogo cha matatizo ya mitaani. Mfano wetu wa mwisho unaonyesha mifano bora ya zamani kwenye seti ya taarifa za tafsiri za Kiingereza hadi Japani.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sözlerin terjime we çeşme tarapyny öwrenýän täze bir nural maşynyň terjime modelini görkezýär. Öň bar lançylyk ýaly syntaktik tansçylaryň ullanyşynyň ýaly, soňra-soňra nusgasymyz üçin geçmiş grafik tansçysyny üns berilen näyrol maşynyň terjime modelinin bir parças ı öwredýär we şonuň üçin tansçylar terjime maksadyna görä optimizalýar. Deneylerde, biz ilkinji gezek nusgamyzyň, sungatyň durumyny ýagdaýda ýagdaýlaýan we pipetlogy syntaks tabanly NMT modelleri bilen hoñlaýandygyny görkezýäris. Biz hem modelimizin etkinleşigini biraz öňünden öňünden okuwçylar bilen gowulaşdyrylyp bileris. Biziň soňky taýýarlama nusgasymyz iňlis-ýan-japonça terjime edilýän sanlaryň öňki iň gowy nusgalaryny çykarýar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n nuwe neurale masjien vertaling model wat saamstig leer vertaling en bron-kant latente graaf voorstellings van teikens. Ongelyks van bestaande pyplynde toegang met sintaktieke verwerkers, ons einde- na- einde model leer 'n latente graaf verwerker as deel van die enkoder van' n aandag- gebaseerde neurale masjien vertaling model, en dus word die verwerker optimaliseer volgens die vertaling doel. In eksperimente wys ons eerste dat ons model genadig vergelyk met status-of-the-art sequential en pipelinede sintaks-gebaseerde NMT modele. Ons wys ook dat die prestasie van ons model verder verbeter kan word deur dit voor-oefening met 'n klein hoeveelheid van treebank-notasies. Ons eindelike ensemble model uitvoer betekeurig die vorige beste modele op die standaard Engels-na-Japaanse vertalingsdataset.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një model të ri përkthimi i makinës nervore që mëson së bashku përkthimin dhe përfaqësimet e grafikës së fshehtë nga ana e burimit të fjalëve. Ndryshe nga qasjet ekzistuese të tubuara duke përdorur analizuesit sintaktikë, modeli ynë nga fundi në fund mëson një analizues grafik të fshehtë si pjesë e koduesit të një modeli të përkthimit të makinave nervore të bazuar në vëmendje, dhe kështu analizuesi optimizohet sipas objektivit të përkthimit. Në eksperimente, ne së pari tregojmë se modeli ynë krahasohet favorisht me modelet NMT të renditur dhe të sintaksuar. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se performanca e model it tonë mund të përmirësohet më tej duke e paratrajnuar atë me një sasi të vogël anotacionesh në bazë druri. Modeli ynë përfundimtar i ansamblit paraqet ndjeshëm modelet më të mira të mëparshëm në të dhënat standarte të përkthimit anglez-japonez.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է նոր նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդել, որը միասին սովորում է թարգմանման և նախադասությունների աղբյուրի կողմից թաքնված գրաֆիկի ներկայացումներ: Ի տարբերություն գոյություն ունեցող խողովակաշարերի մոտեցումներին, օգտագործելով սինտակտիկ վերամշակողներ, մեր վերջնական մոդելը սովորում է թաքնված գրաֆիկի վերամշակողը որպես ուշադրության վրա հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելի կոդերի մաս, և այսպես վերամշակող Փորձերի ընթացքում մենք առաջին անգամ ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը համեմատում է լավագույն տեխնոլոգիական և խողովակաշար հիմնված ՆՄԹ մոդելների հետ: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելի արտադրողությունը կարող է ավելի բարելավվել նախավարժեցնելով այն մի փոքր քանակությամբ ծառի հիմնագրություններով: Մեր վերջնական համակարգչային մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է նախորդ լավագույն մոդելները ստանդարտ անգլերեն-ճապոնական թարգմանման տվյալների համակարգում:', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ሞዴል ያቀርባል፡፡ Unlike existing pipelined approaches using syntactic parsers, our end-to-end model learns a latent graph parser as part of the encoder of an attention-based neural machine translation model, and thus the parser is optimized according to the translation objective.  በተፈተና ውስጥ መጀመሪያ እናሳየዋለን፤ ሞዴላያችን ከ-የ-የ-አርእስት እና የስናክስል እና የሳንስክ ተሳታፊ የNMT ዓይነቶች ጋር ያሳያል፡፡ እናም የምናሳየው የሞዴል ፍላጎታችን በጭራሽ ብዛት የቴርቢክ አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የመጨረሻው ምሳሌያችን የቀድሞውን የፊተኛውን ትርጉም-የጃፓን ትርጉም ዳታተር ማድረጊያውን በሚያሳየው የፊተኛውን መልካሙን ሞዴላዎች በሙሉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un nou model de traducció neural que aprenen conjuntament traducció i representacions de gràfics latents de fonts de frases. A diferència dels enfocaments sistemàtics existents utilitzant analitzadors sinàtics, el nostre model de final a final aprene un analitzador de gràfics latent com part del codificador d'un model de traducció neural basat en l'atenció, i per tant l'analitzador es optimitza segons l'objectiu de traducció. En experiments, primer demostram que el nostre model es compara favorablement amb models NMT secuencials i basats en síntaxis. We also show that the performance of our model can be further improved by pre-training it with a small amount of treebank annotations.  El nostre model final d'ensemble supera significativament els millors models anteriors del conjunt de dades de traducció estàndard anglès-japonès.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja nov model prevođenja neuralnih strojeva koji zajedno uči prevođenje i latentne grafike na izvoru. Za razliku od postojećih pristupa cijevi koristeći sintaktične analizatore, naš model kraja do kraja nauči latentni grafički analizator kao dio kodera model a prevoda na pažnji baziranog neuralnog uređaja, i tako se analizator optimizira prema cilju prevoda. U eksperimentima, prvo pokazujemo da naš model uspoređuje favoritetno sa sekvencijalnim i kanaliziranim NMT modelima. Također pokazujemo da se učinkovitost našeg model a može poboljšati predobučavanjem s malim količinom annotacija o treebancima. Naš poslednji model ensemble značajno iznosi prethodne najbolje modele na standardnom setu podataka za prevod engleskog na japanski.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি একটি নভেল নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল উপস্থাপন করেছে যা একত্রে অনুবাদ এবং উৎস-পাশের সাম্প্রতিক গ্রাফের প্রতি সিন্ট্যাক্টিক পার্সার ব্যবহার করে বিদ্যমান পাইপেলিনের ক্ষেত্রেও, আমাদের শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল একটি সাম্প্রতিক গ্রাফ প্যারেজার শিখে থাকে একটি কোডার হিসেবে মনোযোগ পরীক্ষার মধ্যে আমরা প্রথমে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল ভালো ভালোভাবে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের সাথে তুলনা করে এবং পাইপেলের সিন্ট আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেলের প্রভাব আরো উন্নত হতে পারে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে। আমাদের চূড়ান্ত মডেল স্ট্যান্ডার্ড ইংরেজি থেকে জাপানী অনুবাদের ডাটাসেটে পূর্ববর্তী সেরা মডেল প্রদর্শন করে।', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje nový model neuronového strojového překladu, který se společně učí překlad a latentní grafové reprezentace vět na straně zdroje. Na rozdíl od existujících pipelined přístupů používajících syntaktické parsery se náš end-to-end model učí latentní grafový parser jako součást kodéru neuronového strojového překladového modelu založeného na pozornosti, a proto je parser optimalizován podle překladového cíle. V experimentech nejprve ukážeme, že náš model se příznivě srovnává s nejmodernějšími sekvenčními a pipelined syntaxi založenými NMT modely. Také ukazujeme, že výkon našeho modelu může být dále zlepšen předškolením s malým množstvím anotací stromového břehu. Náš konečný souborový model výrazně překonává předchozí nejlepší modely ve standardním datovém souboru z angličtiny do japonštiny.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse uudset neuraalse masintõlke mudelit, mis õpib ühiselt lausete tõlkimist ja allikast pärit latentset graafikujutust. Erinevalt olemasolevatest süntaktilisi parsereid kasutavatest torujuhtmetest õpib meie lõpp-lõpuni mudel tähelepanupõhise neuro masintõlke mudeli kodeerija osana latentset graafikaperserit ja seega on parser optimeeritud vastavalt tõlke eesmärgile. Eksperimentides näitame esmalt, et meie mudel võrdleb soodsalt kaasaegsete järjestikuste ja torupõhiste süntaksipõhiste NMT mudelitega. Samuti näitame, et meie mudeli jõudlust saab veelgi parandada eeltreenides seda väikese hulga puupanga annotatsioonidega. Meie lõplik ansambli mudel ületab oluliselt varasemaid parimaid mudeleid standardses inglise-jaapani tõlkeandmestikus.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään uusi neurokonekäännösmalli, joka oppii yhdessä käännöksen ja lähdepuolen latenttien graafisten esitysten esittämistä lauseista. Toisin kuin olemassa olevat pipelined lähestymistavat käyttäen syntaktisia parsereita, meidän end-to-end malli oppii piilevän graafiparserin osana huomiopohjaisen neuron konekäännösmallin koodausta, ja näin parserin optimoidaan käännöstavoitteen mukaisesti. Kokeissa näytämme ensin, että mallimme vertaa suotuisasti viimeisimpiin sekvenssi- ja pipelined syntaksipohjaisiin NMT-malleihin. Osoitamme myös, että mallimme suorituskykyä voidaan parantaa edelleen esikouluttamalla sitä pienellä määrällä treebank-merkintöjä. Lopullinen kokoonpanomallimme suoriutuu huomattavasti edellisistä parhaista malleista englanti-japani-käännöstiedossa.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt cümlələrin çevirilməsini öyrənən yeni nöral maşın çevirilməsi modelini göstərir. Sintaktik ayırıcılar istifadə edərkən mevcut bor çəkilən yaxınlıqlarına bənzər, sona-sona gələn modellərimiz, ünsiyyət-tabanlı nöral mašin çeviri modelinin kodlayıcısının bir parças ı olaraq latent grafik ayırıcısını öyrənir və bu səbəbdən ayırıcı tercümə məqsədilə optimizlənir. İlk sınaqlarda, modellərimizin NMT modelləri sequentiyal və bord sintaksi tabanlı modelləri ilə müqayisədə saldığını göstərdik. Biz də modelimizin performansını daha yaxşı təhsil etmək üçün daha yaxşılaşdırılabilir. Bizim son ensemble modellərimiz standart İngilizə-Japonca çevirim verilənlərin əvvəlki ən yaxşı modellərini çox çəkir.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardar da ke ƙunsa da wani motel na fassarar ɗin neural na rubutu, wanda yana iya amfani da fassarar da kuma kwanan-side grafi na latent namunar maganar. @ info: whatsthis Kayan jarrabai, za mu nuna misalinmu yana kamata mafi alhẽri da misalin-state-of-art-sequence da aka samu da misãlai na NMT-based a syntaki. Kayya, tuna nũna cewa mafarin misalinmu yana iya ƙara shi da ko ƙari masu zartar da mitebank. @ info: whatsthis', 'jv': 'Perintah iki nambah model penting itolet nang sampeyan ingkang alat, sing nggambar nggawe tarjamahan lan kelompok-side bantuan nggambar barang. lahi Nang ujaran anyar, kita ngomong mbungane soko model nyatuk karo perusahaan sugaran karo model NMT Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dianggawe model sing bisa dianggap luwih-luwih apik lan tambah bantayan seneng pisan bantayan banget. model sing ikèn assembal sing paling dhéwé iso nggampang model sing luwih apik karo dataset ingles-karo japané', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen nov model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja, ki skupaj uči prevajanje in latentne grafske reprezentacije stavkov na izvorni strani. Za razliko od obstoječih cevovodnih pristopov, ki uporabljajo sintaktične razčlenjevalnike, se naš model od konca do konca nauči latentnega razčlenjevalnika grafov kot del kodirja modela nevronskega strojnega prevajanja, ki temelji na pozornosti, in tako je razčlenjevalnik optimiziran glede na cilj prevajanja. V eksperimentih najprej pokažemo, da se naš model ugodno primerja z najsodobnejšimi zaporednimi in cevovodnimi modeli NMT na osnovi sintakse. Pokazali smo tudi, da je mogoče zmogljivost našega modela še dodatno izboljšati s predurjenjem z majhno količino opomb na drevesni bazi. Naš končni ansambel model bistveno presega prejšnje najboljše modele v standardnem naboru podatkov o prevajanju angleščine-japonščine.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג מודל תרגום מכונת עצבית חדש שלמד ביחד תרגום ויצגת גרף מוסתרת מצד מקור של משפטים. בניגוד לגישויים קבועים באמצעות מעבדות סינטאקטיות, המודל שלנו סוף-סוף לומד מעבד גרף חבוי כחלק מהקודד של מודל התרגום המכונה העצבית המבוסס על תשומת לב, ולכן המעבר אופטימיזם לפי אובייקטיבי התרגום. בניסויים, ראשית אנחנו מראים שהמודל שלנו משווה בצורה טובה עם מודלים NMT מצויינים ומבוססים בצינורות. אנחנו גם מראים שהביצועים של המודל שלנו יכולים להשתפר עוד על ידי האימונים מראש אותו עם כמות קטנה של ציונים על גבי עץ. מודל האנסמבל האחרון שלנו יוצא משמעות מהמודלים הטובים הקודמים ביותר על קבוצת נתוני התרגום הסטנדרטית אנגלית ליפנית.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚིག་རྩིས་འཁྲུལ Unlike existing pipelined approaches using syntactic parsers, our end-to-end model learns a latent graph parser as part of the encoder of an attention-based neural machine translation model, and thus the parser is optimized according to the translation objective. In experiments, we first show that our model compares favorably with state-of-the-art sequential and pipelined syntax-based NMT models. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྐུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ཀ་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation with Word Predictions', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية مع تنبؤات الكلمات', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural com previsões de palavras', 'ja': '言葉の予測を伴う神経機械翻訳', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal con predicciones de palabras', 'hi': 'शब्द भविष्यवाणियों के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale avec prédictions de mots', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод с предсказаниями слов', 'zh': '带单词占之神经机器翻译', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Neural le Tuartha Focal', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás szóelőrejelzésekkel', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση με προβλέψεις λέξεων', 'kk': 'Сөздің алдын- ала нейрондық машинаның аудармасыName', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale con predizioni di parole', 'lt': 'Neuralinės mašinos vertimas su žodžių prognozėmis', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural dengan Prediksi Perkataan', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനകളുമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali bi Tbassir tal-Kliem', 'pl': 'Neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe z prognozami słowa', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală cu predicții de cuvinte', 'mn': 'Өөр хэлбэртэй мэдрэлийн машин орчуулалт', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Neuralni prevod mašine sa predviđanjem reči', 'so': 'Neural Machine Translation with Word Predictions', 'si': 'වචන ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා න්\u200dයූරාල මැෂින් භාවිතය', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning med ordförutsägelser', 'ur': 'کلمات پیشدیکت کے ساتھ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh với dự đoán từ', 'bg': 'Невроден машинен превод с предсказания за думи', 'hr': 'Neuralna prevoda stroja sa predviđanjem riječi', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse med ordforudsigelser', 'nl': 'Neuronale machinevertaling met woordvoorspellingen', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit Wortvorhersagen', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی با پیشنهاد کلمه', 'ko': '단어 예측 기반의 신경', 'id': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural dengan Prediksi Kata', 'sw': 'Neural Machine Translation with Word Predictions', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinës nervore me parashikime fjalësh', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'tr': 'Täze sözleri bilen Nural Maşynyň terjimesi', 'af': 'Nural Masjien Vertaling met Woord Voorwoordes', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն բառերի կանխատեսումներով', 'bn': 'শব্দের পছন্দ দিয়ে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Neuralna prevoda stroja sa predviđanjem riječi', 'az': 'Sözlər təsirləri ilə nöral maşına çevirilən', 'ca': 'Traducció de màquines neuronals amb prediccions de paraules', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad s předpovědí slov', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge sõnaprognoosidega', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös sanaennusteilla', 'jv': 'Ngucap Perintah Njaral kang Kemerdekaan Wurung', 'he': 'תרגום מכונת עצבית עם ציפוי מילים', 'sk': 'Živčni strojni prevod z napovedi besed', 'ha': 'translation', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་དང་འཁྲུལ་གཞུང་གི་འགོ་བརྗོད་པ'}
{'en': 'In the encoder-decoder architecture for neural machine translation (NMT), the hidden states of the recurrent structures in the encoder and decoder carry the crucial information about the sentence. These vectors are generated by parameters which are updated by back-propagation of translation errors through time. We argue that propagating errors through the end-to-end recurrent structures are not a direct way of control the hidden vectors. In this paper, we propose to use word predictions as a mechanism for direct supervision. More specifically, we require these vectors to be able to predict the vocabulary in target sentence. Our simple mechanism ensures better representations in the encoder and decoder without using any extra data or annotation. It is also helpful in reducing the target side vocabulary and improving the decoding efficiency. Experiments on Chinese-English machine translation task show an average BLEU improvement by 4.53, respectively.', 'ar': 'في بنية وحدة فك التشفير للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ، تحمل الحالات المخفية للهياكل المتكررة في المشفر ومفكك التشفير المعلومات الهامة حول الجملة. يتم إنشاء هذه المتجهات بواسطة معلمات يتم تحديثها عن طريق الانتشار العكسي لأخطاء الترجمة عبر الزمن ، ونجادل بأن انتشار الأخطاء من خلال الهياكل المتكررة من طرف إلى طرف ليس طريقة مباشرة للتحكم في المتجهات المخفية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح استخدام تنبؤات الكلمات كآلية للإشراف المباشر. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نطلب من هذه المتجهات لتكون قادرة على التنبؤ بالمفردات في الجملة المستهدفة. تضمن آليتنا البسيطة تمثيلات أفضل في وحدة التشفير ووحدة فك التشفير دون استخدام أي بيانات إضافية أو شرح توضيحي. كما أنه مفيد في تقليل مفردات الجانب المستهدف وتحسين كفاءة فك التشفير. تُظهر التجارب على مهمة الترجمة الآلية الصينية-الإنجليزية تحسنًا متوسطًا في BLEU بمقدار 4.53 ، على التوالي.', 'fr': "Dans l'architecture codeur-décodeur pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT), les états cachés des structures récurrentes dans le codeur et le décodeur contiennent les informations cruciales concernant la phrase. Ces vecteurs sont générés par des paramètres qui sont mis à jour par rétropropagation des erreurs de traduction dans le temps.Nous soutenons que la propagation d'erreurs à travers les structures récurrentes de bout en bout ne constitue pas un moyen direct de contrôler les vecteurs cachés. Dans cet article, nous proposons d'utiliser les prédictions de mots comme mécanisme de supervision directe. Plus précisément, nous avons besoin de ces vecteurs pour pouvoir prédire le vocabulaire dans la phrase cible. Notre mécanisme simple garantit de meilleures représentations dans l'encodeur et le décodeur sans utiliser de données ou d'annotations supplémentaires. Il est également utile pour réduire le vocabulaire côté cible et améliorer l'efficacité du décodage. Des expériences sur des tâches de traduction automatique chinois-anglais montrent une amélioration moyenne de l'UEBL de 4,53, respectivement.", 'pt': 'Na arquitetura codificador-decodificador para tradução automática neural (NMT), os estados ocultos das estruturas recorrentes no codificador e no decodificador carregam as informações cruciais sobre a sentença. Esses vetores são gerados por parâmetros que são atualizados por retropropagação de erros de tradução ao longo do tempo. Defendemos que a propagação de erros através das estruturas recorrentes fim-a-fim não é uma forma direta de controlar os vetores ocultos. Neste artigo, propomos usar a previsão de palavras como um mecanismo de supervisão direta. Mais especificamente, exigimos que esses vetores sejam capazes de prever o vocabulário na frase alvo. Nosso mecanismo simples garante melhores representações no codificador e decodificador sem usar nenhum dado ou anotação extra. Também é útil para reduzir o vocabulário do lado alvo e melhorar a eficiência da decodificação. Experimentos na tarefa de tradução automática chinês-inglês mostram uma melhoria média do BLEU de 4,53, respectivamente.', 'es': 'En la arquitectura codificador-decodificador para la traducción automática neuronal (NMT), los estados ocultos de las estructuras recurrentes en el codificador y el decodificador llevan la información crucial sobre la oración. Estos vectores se generan mediante parámetros que se actualizan mediante la retropropagación de errores de traducción a lo largo del tiempo. Sostenemos que la propagación de errores a través de las estructuras recurrentes de extremo a extremo no es una forma directa de controlar los vectores ocultos. En este artículo, proponemos utilizar las predicciones de palabras como un mecanismo de supervisión directa. Más específicamente, necesitamos estos vectores para poder predecir el vocabulario de la oración objetivo. Nuestro sencillo mecanismo garantiza mejores representaciones en el codificador y el decodificador sin utilizar ningún dato o anotación adicional. También es útil para reducir el vocabulario del lado objetivo y mejorar la eficiencia de la decodificación. Los experimentos en la tarea de traducción automática chino-inglés muestran una mejora promedio de BLEU de 4,53, respectivamente.', 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳（ ＮＭＴ ）のためのエンコーダ－デコーダアーキテクチャでは、エンコーダ及びデコーダ内の反復構造の隠された状態は、文章に関する重要な情報を運ぶ。これらのベクトルは、時間経過に伴う翻訳エラーのバックプロパゲーションによって更新されるパラメータによって生成される。エンドツーエンドの再帰構造を介してエラーを伝播することは、隠れたベクトルを制御する直接的な方法ではないと主張する。本稿では、直接監督の仕組みとして、単語予測を用いることを提案する。より具体的には、これらのベクトルがターゲット文の語彙を予測できるようにする必要があります。当社のシンプルなメカニズムは、余分なデータや注釈を使用することなく、エンコーダーとデコーダーでより良い表現を保証します。ターゲット側の語彙を減らし、デコード効率を向上させるのにも役立ちます。中国語と英語の機械翻訳タスクの実験では、BLEUはそれぞれ平均4.53改善されています。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)之编码器-解码器架构,编码器与解码器之循环结构,携句之要。 此向量生于参数,参数随时转移,反传而新之。 臣愚以为端到端循环传谬,非制隐向量之术也。 本文,臣等议用单词测为直监之制。 更具体地说、向量占句词汇。 简机保编码器解码器,无用额外数。 有助于损端词汇量,以崇解码效率。 中英机器翻译职试显,均BLEU崇4.53。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) के लिए एन्कोडर-डिकोडर आर्किटेक्चर में, एन्कोडर और डिकोडर में आवर्तक संरचनाओं के छिपे हुए राज्य वाक्य के बारे में महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी लेते हैं। ये वैक्टर पैरामीटर द्वारा उत्पन्न होते हैं जो समय के माध्यम से अनुवाद त्रुटियों के बैक-प्रोपेगेशन द्वारा अपडेट किए जाते हैं। हम तर्क देते हैं कि एंड-टू-एंड आवर्तक संरचनाओं के माध्यम से त्रुटियों का प्रचार करना छिपे हुए वैक्टर को नियंत्रित करने का एक सीधा तरीका नहीं है। इस पेपर में, हम प्रत्यक्ष पर्यवेक्षण के लिए एक तंत्र के रूप में शब्द भविष्यवाणियों का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हमें इन वैक्टरों को लक्ष्य वाक्य में शब्दावली की भविष्यवाणी करने में सक्षम होने की आवश्यकता होती है। हमारा सरल तंत्र किसी भी अतिरिक्त डेटा या एनोटेशन का उपयोग किए बिना एन्कोडर और डिकोडर में बेहतर प्रतिनिधित्व सुनिश्चित करता है। यह लक्ष्य पक्ष शब्दावली को कम करने और डिकोडिंग दक्षता में सुधार करने में भी सहायक है। चीनी-अंग्रेजी मशीन अनुवाद कार्य पर प्रयोग क्रमशः 4.53 द्वारा औसत BLEU सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В архитектуре кодер-декодер для нейронного машинного перевода (NMT) скрытые состояния рекуррентных структур в кодере и декодере несут важную информацию о предложении. Эти векторы генерируются параметрами, которые обновляются путем обратного распространения ошибок преобразования во времени. Мы утверждаем, что распространение ошибок через сквозные рекуррентные структуры не является прямым способом управления скрытыми векторами. В данной работе мы предлагаем использовать словесные прогнозы в качестве механизма прямого надзора. Более конкретно, мы требуем, чтобы эти векторы могли предсказывать словарный запас в целевом предложении. Наш простой механизм обеспечивает лучшее представление в кодере и декодере без использования каких-либо дополнительных данных или аннотаций. Это также полезно для сокращения словарного запаса целевой стороны и повышения эффективности декодирования. Эксперименты с китайско-английской задачей машинного перевода показывают среднее улучшение BLEU на 4,53 соответственно.', 'ga': 'San ailtireacht ionchódóra-dhíchódóra le haghaidh aistriúchán meaisín néarúil (NMT), iompraíonn stáit fholaithe na struchtúr athfhillteach san ionchódóir agus sa díchódóir an fhaisnéis ríthábhachtach faoin abairt. Gintear na veicteoirí seo trí pharaiméadair a nuashonraítear trí chúl-iomadú earráidí aistriúcháin trí am. Áitímid nach bealach díreach chun na veicteoirí ceilte a rialú iad earráidí a iomadú trí na struchtúir athfhillteacha ceann go ceann. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn tuar focal a úsáid mar mheicníocht le haghaidh maoirseachta díreach. Go sonrach, teastaíonn uainn go mbeadh na veicteoirí seo in ann an stór focal sa sprioc- abairt a thuar. Cinntíonn ár meicníocht shimplí uiríll níos fearr san ionchódóir agus sa díchódóir gan aon sonraí breise nó anótáil a úsáid. Tá sé ina chuidiú freisin chun stór focal an sprice a laghdú agus an éifeachtúlacht díchódaithe a fheabhsú. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thasc aistrithe meaisín Sínis-Béarla feabhas meánach ar BLEU de 4.53, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქსინის განსაგულისხმებისთვის (NMT) კოდირებული სტრუქტურების კიდერებული სტრუქტურების კიდერებული სტრუქტურაციაში და დეკოდირების აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი ეს გვექტორები პარამეტრებით შექმნა, რომლებიც თავიდან შეცდომების შეცდომების შეცდომებით დაახლება. ჩვენ არგებთ, რომ შეცდომები დასრულება რეკურენტის სტრუქტურების გარეშე არ არის კონტროლური გექტურის გარეშე. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდა გამოყენოთ სიტყვის წარმოდგენები როგორც მაქსინე დანახვა. უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ გვაქვს ამ გვექტორების შესაძლებლობა გადაწყვეტა სიტყვებულაში. ჩვენი მარტივი მაქანიზმი უკეთესი რედაქტორებას კოდირებში და დეკოდირებში, არ გამოყენებული ექსტრებული მონაცემები ან ანოტაციაში. მხოლოდ მარტივი სიტყვებულების შემცირებით და გამოსახულებას გამოსახულებელია. ჩინეთი-ანგლისური მაქსინის გადაწყვეტილების ექსპერიმენტები საშუალოდ 4.53-ზე გაუკეთება BLEU.', 'el': 'Στην αρχιτεκτονική κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT), οι κρυφές καταστάσεις των επαναλαμβανόμενων δομών στον κωδικοποιητή και τον αποκωδικοποιητή μεταφέρουν τις κρίσιμες πληροφορίες σχετικά με την πρόταση. Αυτά τα διανύσματα παράγονται από παραμέτρους οι οποίες ενημερώνονται με την αναδρομική διάδοση των σφαλμάτων μετάφρασης μέσα στο χρόνο. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι η διάδοση σφαλμάτων μέσω των επαναλαμβανόμενων δομών δεν είναι ένας άμεσος τρόπος ελέγχου των κρυμμένων διανυσμάτων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε τις προβλέψεις λέξεων ως μηχανισμό άμεσης εποπτείας. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, χρειαζόμαστε αυτούς τους φορείς για να είναι σε θέση να προβλέψουν το λεξιλόγιο στην πρόταση-στόχο. Ο απλός μηχανισμός μας εξασφαλίζει καλύτερες αναπαραστάσεις στον κωδικοποιητή και τον αποκωδικοποιητή χωρίς τη χρήση επιπλέον δεδομένων ή σχολίων. Είναι επίσης χρήσιμο στη μείωση του λεξιλογίου της πλευράς στόχου και στη βελτίωση της αποδοτικότητας αποκωδικοποίησης. Τα πειράματα στην εργασία μηχανικής μετάφρασης κινέζικων-αγγλικών δείχνουν μια μέση βελτίωση κατά 4.53, αντίστοιχα.', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) kódoló-dekódoló architektúrájában a kódoló és dekódoló visszatérő struktúráinak rejtett állapota hordozza a mondat kulcsfontosságú információit. Ezeket a vektorokat olyan paraméterek generálják, amelyeket a fordítási hibák időben történő visszaterjedésével frissítenek. Azzal érvelünk, hogy a visszatérő struktúrákon keresztüli hibák terjesztése nem egy közvetlen módja a rejtett vektorok ellenőrzésének. Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy a szóelőrejelzéseket használjuk a közvetlen felügyelet mechanizmusának. Pontosabban, megköveteljük ezeket a vektorokat, hogy képesek legyenek megjósolni a célmondat szókincsét. Egyszerű mechanizmusunk biztosítja a jobb ábrázolást a kódolóban és dekódolóban anélkül, hogy további adatokat vagy jegyzeteket használna. Hasznos a céloldal szókincsének csökkentésében és a dekódolás hatékonyságának javításában is. A kínai-angol gépi fordítási feladatokkal végzett kísérletek átlagos BLEU javulást mutatnak 4,53-kal.', 'it': "Nell'architettura encoder-decoder per la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), gli stati nascosti delle strutture ricorrenti nell'encoder e nel decoder portano le informazioni cruciali sulla frase. Questi vettori sono generati da parametri che vengono aggiornati dalla retropropagazione di errori di traduzione nel tempo. Sosteniamo che la propagazione degli errori attraverso le strutture ricorrenti end-to-end non è un modo diretto di controllare i vettori nascosti. In questo articolo, proponiamo di utilizzare le previsioni di parola come meccanismo per la supervisione diretta. Più specificamente, richiediamo che questi vettori siano in grado di prevedere il vocabolario nella frase target. Il nostro semplice meccanismo garantisce migliori rappresentazioni nell'encoder e nel decoder senza utilizzare alcun dato aggiuntivo o annotazione. È anche utile per ridurre il vocabolario del lato target e migliorare l'efficienza di decodifica. Gli esperimenti sul lavoro di traduzione automatica cinese-inglese mostrano un miglioramento medio BLEU di 4,53, rispettivamente.", 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютерді аудару (NMT) үшін кодер- декодер архитектурасында, кодердегі қайталанатын құрылғылардың жасырын күйлері және декодердегі мәліметтің маңызды мәліметін береді. Бұл векторлар уақыт бойынша аудармалардың қатесін қайта пропагациясы бойынша жаңарту параметрлерінен құрылады. Біз қателерді соңғы- соңғы қайталану құрылымдары бойынша қайталану жасырын векторларды басқару жолы емес деп айтып тұрмыз. Бұл қағазда сөздерді бақылау механизмі ретінде қолдану керек. Біз бұл векторлардың сөздігін мақсатты сөздігінде алдын ала аламыз. Қарапайым механизміміз кодердегі және декодердегі қосымша деректер не жазбаларды қолданбаған жақсы көріністерді қамтамасыз етеді. Сонымен қатар, мақсатты сөздерді азайту және декодтау эффективнісін жақсарту мүмкіндігі. Қытай- ағылшын тіліндегі машинаны аудару тапсырмасының тәжірибесі 4, 53 жылдамдығында орташа BLEU жасауын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Nervų mašin ų vertimo kodavimo ir dekoderio architektūroje (NMT) slaptos pakartotinių konstrukcijų būklės koduotoje ir dekodere yra svarbiausia informacija apie sakinį. Šie vektoriai sukuriami pagal parametrus, kurie atnaujinami vėl dauginant vertimo klaidas per laiką. Mes teigiame, kad dauginamosios klaidos per nuolatines konstrukcijas nuo galo iki galo nėra tiesioginis būdas kontroliuoti paslėptus vektorius. Šiame dokumente siūlome naudoti žodžių prognozes kaip tiesioginės priežiūros mechanizmą. More specifically, we require these vectors to be able to predict the vocabulary in target sentence.  Our simple mechanism ensures better representations in the encoder and decoder without using any extra data or annotation.  Tai taip pat padeda sumažinti tikslinį žodyną ir padidinti dekodiavimo efektyvumą. Kinijos ir anglų vertimo raštu užduočių eksperimentai rodo, kad BLEU vidutiniškai pagerėjo atitinkamai 4,53 %.', 'mk': 'Во архитектурата на кодерот-декодерот за нервен машински превод (НМТ), скриените состојби на повторните структури во кодерот и декодерот ги носат клучните информации за реченицата. Овие вектори се генерирани со параметри кои се ажурираат со повторна пропагација на грешките на преводот низ времето. Ние тврдиме дека пропагацијата на грешките преку рецидентните структури од крај до крај не се директен начин за контрола на скриените вектори. Во овој весник предлагаме да се користат предвидувања за зборови како механизам за директен надзор. Поконкретно, бараме од овие вектори да можат да го предвидат речникот во целна реченица. Нашиот едноставен механизам обезбедува подобри претставувања во кодерот и декодерот без користење на дополнителни податоци или анотации. Исто така, помага во намалувањето на речникот на страната на метата и подобрувањето на ефикасноста на декодирањето. Експериментите на задачата на кинеско-англиски машински превод покажуваат просечно подобрување на БЛЕ за 4,53, односно.', 'ms': 'Dalam arkitektur pengekod-dekoder untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT), keadaan tersembunyi struktur berulang dalam pengekod dan dekoder membawa maklumat penting mengenai kalimat. Vektor ini dijana oleh parameter yang dikemaskini oleh penyebaran-belakang ralat terjemahan melalui masa. Kami menyangka bahawa pelbagai ralat melalui struktur berulang akhir-akhir bukanlah cara langsung untuk mengawal vektor tersembunyi. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan ramalan perkataan sebagai mekanisme untuk pengawasan langsung. Lebih khusus, kita memerlukan vektor ini untuk dapat meramalkan vokbulari dalam kalimat sasaran. Mekanisme sederhana kami memastikan perwakilan yang lebih baik dalam pengekod dan penyahkod tanpa menggunakan data tambahan atau anotasi. Ia juga berguna dalam mengurangkan vokbulari sisi sasaran dan meningkatkan efisiensi penyahkodan. Eksperimen pada tugas terjemahan mesin bahasa Cina-Inggeris menunjukkan perkembangan BLEU rata-rata dengan 4.53, sama ada.', 'mn': 'НМТ гэх мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд коддогч-коддогч архитекторын нуугдмал байгууллагууд коддогч болон шийдвэрлэгч нь өгүүлбэрийн тухай чухал мэдээллийг авдаг. Эдгээр векторууд цаг хугацаанд орчуулах алдаа буцаагдаж шинэчлэгдсэн параметр үүсгэдэг. Эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин алдаа өргөндөг нь нуугдах векторуудыг шууд удирдах арга биш гэдгийг бид хэлж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шууд харах механизм болгох үг таамаглалтуудыг ашиглах гэсэн санал байна. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид эдгээр векторуудыг зорилготой үгийг таамаглах хэрэгтэй. Бидний энгийн механизм кодлогч болон декодлогч дээр илүү сайн үзүүлэлтийг ашиглаж байдаг. Энэ нь мөн зорилготой хэлний үгийг багасгаж, загварын үр дүнг сайжруулахад тусалдаг. Хятад-Англи хэлний хэлний хөрөнгө оруулалтын туршилтын туршилт нь ДОБ-ын дундаж 4.53-аар сайжруулалт гаргадаг.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുവേണ്ടി എന്\u200dഎംടി (NMT) എന്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറില്\u200d, കോഡോര്\u200dഡരിലെ ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ രഹസ് ഈ വെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d സമയത്തിനുള്ള സമയത്തില്\u200d പിന്നിലുള്ള പ്രപദേശം പുതുക്കിക്കൊണ്ട് പരാമീറ്ററുകളാല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക അവസാനം മുതല്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങളിലൂടെ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നു In this paper, we propose to use word predictions as a mechanism for direct supervision.  കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമുക്ക് ഈ വെക്ടറുകളെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. നമ്മുടെ എളുപ്പമുള്ള മെക്കാനിസം കോഡെരിലും കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളും ഉപയോഗിക്കാതെ കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളോ വിവരങ്ങളോ  It is also helpful in reducing the target side vocabulary and improving the decoding efficiency.  ചൈനീസ്- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത് 4. 53 ന്റെ ഭാഗമായി 4', 'no': 'I koder- dekoderarkitekturen for neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT), gøymde tilstandane til gjentakelige strukturar i koderet og dekoder inneheld den viktige informasjonen om setninga. Desse vektorane blir laga av parametrar som vert oppdatert ved tilbakepropagasjon av omsetjingsfeilar gjennom tid. Vi argumenterer at propagasjonen av feil gjennom gjentakingsstrukturane til slutt til slutt er ikkje ei direkte måte å kontrollera gøymde vektorane. I denne papiret foreslår vi å bruka ordforhåndsvising som ein mekanisme for direkte oversikt. Meir spesifikke krev vi at desse vektorane kan foregå ordboka i målsetting. Dette enkle mekanismen er sikker på bedre representasjonar i koderen og dekoderen utan å bruka nokon ekstra data eller notasjon. Det er også nyttig i å redusera målside-ordboka og forbetra dekodingseffektiviteten. Eksperimentar om omsetjinga av kinesisk-engelsk maskin viser gjennomsnittlig forbedring av BLEU med 4,53.', 'mt': 'Fl-arkitettura tad-dekoder tal-kodiċi għat-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali (NMT), l-istati moħbija tal-istrutturi rikorrenti fil-kodiċi u d-dekoder iġorru l-informazzjoni kruċjali dwar is-sentenza. Dawn il-vetturi huma ġġenerati minn parametri li huma aġġornati permezz ta’ propagazzjoni lura ta’ żbalji ta’ traduzzjoni maż-żmien. Aħna jargumentaw li l-iżbalji ta’ propagazzjoni permezz tal-istrutturi rikorrenti minn tarf sa tarf mhumiex mod dirett ta’ kontroll tal-vetturi moħbija. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li jintużaw it-tbassir tal-kliem bħala mekkaniżmu għas-superviżjoni diretta. B’mod aktar speċifiku, jeħtieġu li dawn il-vetturi jkunu jistgħu jipprevedu l-vokabulari fis-sentenza fil-mira. Il-mekkaniżmu sempliċi tagħna jiżgura rappreżentazzjonijiet aħjar fil-kodifikatur u d-dekoder mingħajr ma tuża dejta jew annotazzjoni addizzjonali. Huwa ta’ għajnuna wkoll fit-tnaqqis tal-vokabulari tal-ġenb fil-mira u fit-titjib tal-effiċjenza tad-dekodifikazzjoni. Experiments on Chinese-English machine translation task show an average BLEU improvement by 4.53, respectively.', 'ro': 'În arhitectura encoder-decoder pentru traducerea automată neurală (NMT), stările ascunse ale structurilor recurente din encoder și decoder transportă informațiile cruciale despre propoziție. Acești vectori sunt generați de parametri care sunt actualizați prin propagarea înapoi a erorilor de traducere în timp. Susținem că erorile de propagare prin structurile recurente end-to-end nu reprezintă o modalitate directă de a controla vectorii ascunși. În această lucrare, propunem să folosim predicțiile cuvintelor ca mecanism de supraveghere directă. Mai exact, avem nevoie de acești vectori pentru a putea prezice vocabularul din propoziția țintă. Mecanismul nostru simplu asigură o reprezentare mai bună în encoder și decoder fără a utiliza date suplimentare sau adnotări. De asemenea, este util în reducerea vocabularului din partea țintă și îmbunătățirea eficienței de decodare. Experimentele pe sarcina de traducere automată chineză-engleză arată o îmbunătățire medie a BLEU cu 4,53, respectiv.', 'pl': 'W architekturze kodera-dekodera dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) ukryte stany powtarzających się struktur w koderze i dekoderze zawierają kluczowe informacje o zdaniu. Te wektory są generowane przez parametry, które są aktualizowane poprzez wsteczną propagację błędów tłumaczeniowych w czasie. Twierdzimy, że propagowanie błędów poprzez kompleksowe struktury powtarzające nie jest bezpośrednim sposobem kontroli ukrytych wektorów. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wykorzystanie słownych prognoz jako mechanizmu bezpośredniego nadzoru. Dokładniej, potrzebujemy tych wektorów, aby móc przewidzieć słownictwo w zdaniu docelowym. Nasz prosty mechanizm zapewnia lepszą reprezentację w koderze i dekoderze bez użycia dodatkowych danych lub adnotacji. Jest to również pomocne w redukcji słownictwa strony docelowej i poprawie efektywności dekodowania. Eksperymenty na zadaniu tłumaczenia maszynowego chińsko-angielskiego wykazują średnią poprawę BLEU odpowiednio o 4,53.', 'so': 'In the encoder-decoder architecture for neural machine translation (NMT), the hidden states of the recurrent structures in the encoder and decoder carry the crucial information about the sentence.  Vectoryadan waxaa lagu sameeyaa parameters oo lagu cusboonaysiiyey dib-u-sii-faamulidda khaladda turjumidda waqtiga ah. Waxaynu ka fekernaa in qaladyada lagu ogeysiiyo dhismaha lagu soo celinayo dhammaadka ugu dambaysta iyo dhammaadka ugu dambaysa ma aha jid toos ah oo maamula wadooyinka qarsoon. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan isticmaalno wax sii sheegid oo kaliya ilaaliya. Si gaar ah, waxaynu u baahan nahay wadooyinkaas in ay awoodi karto in uu soo hor dhigo hadalka uu ku qoro qoraalka. meymisyadayada fudud ayaa hubaa in ay ka fiican yihiin qofka codsiga oo aan isticmaalin macluumaad dheeraad ah ama dhibaato kale. Waxaa sidoo kale faa’iido ah in uu hoos u dhigo hadalka dhinaca goalka ah iyo in uu horumariyo awoodda deynta. Experiments on Chinese-English machine translation task show an average BLEU improvement by 4.53, respectively.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරෝල් යන්ත්\u200dරය භාවිතය (NMT) සඳහා සංකේතකය- ඩිකෝඩර් ස්ථාපනයෙන්, සංකේතකයේ ආයුත්ත ස්ථාපනයේ ආයුත්ත ස්ථාපනය @ info: whatsthis අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වීක්ටර් පාලනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නෙමෙය මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන්. විශේෂයෙන්, අපිට අවශ්\u200dය වෙක්ටර්ස්වය ලක්ෂිත වාක්යේ වචනය අනුවිශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපේ සාමාන්\u200dය පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් විශ්වාස කරනවා එන්කෝඩර් සහ ඩිකෝඩර් වල හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා විශ ඒක තියෙන්නේ ලක්ෂණ පැත්තේ වචනය අඩුවන් කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න උදව් කරන්න. චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි මැෂින් පරිවර්තන වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය BLUE ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් 4.53', 'sv': 'I encoder-avkodararkitekturen för neural maskinöversättning (NMT) bär de dolda tillstånden i de återkommande strukturerna i encoder och dekoder den avgörande informationen om meningen. Dessa vektorer genereras av parametrar som uppdateras genom bakåtspridning av översättningsfel genom tiden. Vi hävdar att spridningsfel genom de återkommande strukturerna end-to-end inte är ett direkt sätt att kontrollera de dolda vektorerna. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att man använder ordförutsägelser som en mekanism för direkt övervakning. Mer specifikt kräver vi att dessa vektorer ska kunna förutsäga ordförrådet i målmeningen. Vår enkla mekanism säkerställer bättre representationer i encoder och avkodare utan att använda några extra data eller anteckningar. Det är också till hjälp för att minska målsidans ordförråd och förbättra avkodningseffektiviteten. Experiment på kinesisk-engelsk maskinöversättningsuppgift visar en genomsnittlig BLEU förbättring med 4,53 respektive.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான குறியீட்டாளர் அடைவு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பிழைகள் மூலம் புதுப்பிக்கப்பட்ட அளபுருக்களால் இந்த நெறிகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. மறைந்த நெறிகளை கட்டுப்பாட்டில் முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவு கட்டும் மூலம் பிழையை விரிவாக்குவது என்று நாம் வார்த இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வார்த்தை முன்னோட்டங்களை நேரடி கண்காணிப்பு முறைமையாக பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு பரிந மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, இலக்கு வாக்கியத்தில் சொல்வளத்தை முடியும் என்று இந்த வெக்டார்கள் தேவைப்படுகிறது. எங்கள் எளிய முறைமையில் குறியீட்டில் சிறந்த பிரதிநிதிகள் மற்றும் குறியீட்டில் மற்றும் குறியீட்டில்  இலக்கு பக்கத்தின் சொல்வளத்தை குறைக்க உதவும் மற்றும் குறியீட்டின் விளைவை மேம்படுத்தும். Experiments on Chinese-English machine translation task show an average BLEU improvement by 4.53, respectively.', 'ur': 'نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر معماری میں، کوڈر اور ڈیکوڈر کے دوبارہ ساختاروں کی مخفی وضعیت کے بارے میں ضروری معلومات لے جاتے ہیں. These vectors are generated by parameters which are updated by back-propagation of translation errors through time. ہم argue that propagating errors through end-to-end recurrent structures are not a direct way of control of the hidden vectors. اس کاغذ میں ہم کلمات کی پیش بینی کو مستقیم نظر کے لئے مکانیسم کے طور پر استعمال کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. اور زیادہ مخصوص، ہمیں ان ویکتروں کی ضرورت ہے کہ ہدایت ویکتروں میں لکھی ہوئی ویکتروں کی پیش بینی کریں۔ ہماری ساده مکانیزمن کوڈر اور ڈیکوڈر میں بہترین نمایش کا امن دیتا ہے بغیر کسی اضافہ ڈیٹا یا نمایش کے۔ یہ بھی ہدایت کی طرف سے لکھی ہوئی آواز کاٹنے اور ڈیکوڈینگ کے اقتصادت کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے مددگار ہے. چین-انگلیسی ماشین ترجمہ کا کام پر آزمائش 4.53 کے ذریعہ ایک متوسط بلیوس ترجمہ دکھاتی ہے.', 'sr': 'U arhitekturi kodera-dekodera za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT), skrivene države rekonstruiranih struktura u koderu i dekoderu nose ključne informacije o rečenici. Ovi vektori su stvoreni parametrima koji se aktualizuju kroz vreme nakon povratne propagacije grešaka prevođenja. Tvrdimo da propagacija grešaka kroz rekonstrukciju kraja do kraja nisu direktni način kontrole skrivenih vektora. U ovom papiru predlažemo da koristimo predviđanja riječi kao mehanizam direktnog nadzora. Posebnije, zahtevamo da ovi vektori mogu predvidjeti rečenik u ciljnoj rečenici. Naš jednostavan mehanizam osigurava bolje predstave u koderu i dekoderu bez koristi dodatnih podataka ili annotacije. Takođe je korisno smanjiti rečnik ciljne strane i poboljšati učinkovitost dekodiranja. Eksperimenti o zadatku prevoda kineskog-engleskog mašina pokazuju prosjeèno poboljšanje BLEU-a od 4,53.', 'uz': "Name Ushbu vectorlar vaqt bilan tarjima xatolari qaytadan yangilangan parametrlar yaratiladi. Biz aytganimiz, oxirigi oxiriga qayta ishlab chiqarishda xato roʻy berishni hohlamaymiz, bekitilgan vectorlarni boshqarish uchun yetarli yoʻl emas. Bu hujjatda biz so'zning oldini tasavvur qilishni tasavvur qilamiz. Koʻrsatilgan, biz bu vektorlarni target soʻzdagi so'zlarni predict qilish kerak. Bizning oddiy mekaniyasiz kodlash va kodlash usulida yaxshi taʼminlovchilarni ishlatish va qodlash imkoniyatini ishlatish mumkin. It is also helpful in reducing the target side vocabulary and improving the decoding efficiency.  Name", 'vi': 'Trong cấu trúc mã hóa cho dịch thiết bị thần kinh (NMB) các trạng thái ẩn của các cấu trúc thường xuyên trong bộ mã hóa và bộ giải mang theo các thông tin quan trọng về câu chữ. Những cỗ máy này được tạo ra bởi các thông số được cập nhật bằng cách tải lại lỗi dịch qua thời gian. Chúng tôi cho rằng lỗi lây lan qua các cấu trúc thường xuyên không phải là cách điều khiển trực tiếp các sinh vật ẩn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng dự đoán từ như một cơ chế giám sát trực tiếp. Cụ thể hơn, chúng ta yêu cầu những cỗ máy này có khả năng dự đoán từ vựng trong câu đích. Cách đơn giản của chúng ta đảm bảo các mô tả tốt hơn trong bộ mã hóa và bộ giải, không cần sử dụng thêm dữ liệu hay chú thích. Nó cũng có ích trong việc giảm vốn từ bên tiêu chuẩn và cải thiện hiệu quả giải mã. Thí nghiệm dịch tiếng Trung-Anh cho thấy khả năng dịch chuyển máy có giá trị bình ổn định là 4.cô', 'nl': 'In de encoder-decoder architectuur voor neurale machinevertaling (NMT) dragen de verborgen toestanden van de terugkerende structuren in de encoder en decoder de cruciale informatie over de zin. Deze vectoren worden gegenereerd door parameters die worden bijgewerkt door back-propagatie van vertaalfouten door de tijd. We stellen dat het verspreiden van fouten door de end-to-end terugkerende structuren geen directe manier is om de verborgen vectoren te controleren. In dit artikel stellen we voor om woordvoorspellingen te gebruiken als een mechanisme voor direct toezicht. Meer specifiek hebben we deze vectoren nodig om de woordenschat in de doelzin te kunnen voorspellen. Ons eenvoudige mechanisme zorgt voor betere weergaven in de encoder en decoder zonder extra gegevens of annotatie. Het is ook nuttig bij het verminderen van de doelwoordenschat en het verbeteren van de decodering efficiëntie. Experimenten met Chinese-Engelse machinevertaaltaak tonen een gemiddelde BLEU-verbetering met respectievelijk 4,53 aan.', 'hr': 'U arhitekturi kodera-dekodera za prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT), skrivene stanje rekonstruiranih struktura u koderu i dekoderu nose ključne informacije o rečenici. Ovi vektori su stvoreni parametrima koji se aktualizuju povratnim propagacijom grešaka prevođenja kroz vrijeme. Tvrdimo da propagacije grešaka kroz rekonstrukciju kraja do kraja nisu direktni način kontrole skrivenih vektora. U ovom papiru predlažemo koristiti predviđanja riječi kao mehanizam direktnog nadzora. Posebnije, zahtijevamo da ovi vektori mogu predvidjeti riječ u ciljnoj rečenici. Naš jednostavan mehanizam osigurava bolje predstave u koderu i dekoderu bez koristi dodatnih podataka ili annotacije. Također je korisno smanjiti riječ o ciljnoj strani i poboljšati učinkovitost dekodiranja. Eksperimenti o zadatku prevoda kineskog-engleskog stroja pokazuju prosječno poboljšanje BLEU-a od 4,53.', 'de': 'In der Encoder-Decoder-Architektur für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) tragen die versteckten Zustände der wiederkehrenden Strukturen im Encoder und Decoder die entscheidende Information über den Satz. Diese Vektoren werden durch Parameter generiert, die durch Rückübertragung von Übersetzungsfehlern im Laufe der Zeit aktualisiert werden. Wir argumentieren, dass die Ausbreitung von Fehlern durch die end-to-end wiederkehrenden Strukturen kein direkter Weg ist, die versteckten Vektoren zu kontrollieren. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, Wortvorhersagen als Mechanismus für die direkte Überwachung zu verwenden. Genauer gesagt benötigen wir diese Vektoren, um den Wortschatz im Zielsatz vorhersagen zu können. Unser einfacher Mechanismus sorgt für bessere Darstellungen im Encoder und Decoder, ohne zusätzliche Daten oder Anmerkungen zu verwenden. Es ist auch hilfreich, um den Zielseitenvokabular zu reduzieren und die Dekodierungseffizienz zu verbessern. Experimente zur maschinellen Übersetzung Chinesisch-Englisch zeigen eine durchschnittliche BLEU-Verbesserung um 4,53.', 'id': 'Dalam arsitektur decoder-decoder untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT), keadaan tersembunyi dari struktur yang berulang dalam encoder dan decoder membawa informasi penting tentang kalimat. Vektor ini dihasilkan oleh parameter yang diperbarui oleh propagasi belakang dari kesalahan terjemahan melalui waktu. Kami menyangka bahwa penyebaran kesalahan melalui struktur berulang akhir-akhir bukan cara langsung untuk mengendalikan vektor tersembunyi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan prediksi kata sebagai mekanisme untuk pengawasan langsung. Lebih spesifik, kita membutuhkan vektor ini untuk dapat memprediksi vokbulari dalam kalimat sasaran. Mekanisme sederhana kami memastikan perwakilan yang lebih baik dalam pengekode dan dekoder tanpa menggunakan data atau anotasi ekstra. Hal ini juga membantu dalam mengurangi kata sisi sasaran dan meningkatkan efisiensi dekodasi. Eksperimen dalam tugas terjemahan mesin bahasa Cina-Inggris menunjukkan perkembangan BLEU rata-rata dengan 4,53, sesuai.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)에 사용되는 인코더 체계 구조에서 인코더와 인코더에서 순환구조의 숨겨진 상태는 문장에 대한 관건적인 정보를 가지고 있다.이 벡터는 매개 변수로 생성되며, 이 매개 변수는 번역 오류를 통해 시간의 역방향 전파에 따라 업데이트됩니다.우리는 끝에서 끝까지의 귀속 구조를 통해 오류를 전파하는 것은 숨겨진 벡터를 제어하는 직접적인 방법이 아니라고 생각한다.본고에서 우리는 단어 예측을 직접 감독의 메커니즘으로 사용하는 것을 권장한다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 이러한 벡터가 목표 문장의 어휘를 예측할 수 있도록 요구한다.우리의 간단한 메커니즘은 인코더와 디코더에 더 좋은 표시가 있을 뿐만 아니라, 어떠한 추가 데이터나 주석도 사용할 필요가 없다.목표단 어휘량을 줄이고 디코딩 효율을 높이는 데도 도움이 된다.한영 기계번역 임무에서의 실험에 따르면 BLEU는 평균 4.53 높아졌다.', 'fa': 'در معماری رمزبندی\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمزبندی برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) وضعیت مخفی ساختارهای بازگشت در رمزبندی و رمزبندی اطلاعات مهم درباره\u200cی جمله حمل می\u200cکنند. این ویکتورها توسط پارامترها تولید می\u200cشوند که توسط پشت گسترش خطاهای ترجمه در طول زمان آغاز می\u200cشوند. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که گسترش اشتباهی از طریق ساختارهای بازگشت پایان و پایان راهی مستقیم کنترل ویکتورهای مخفی نیستند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از پیش بینی\u200cهای کلمه به عنوان یک مکانیسم برای بررسی مستقیم استفاده کنیم. دقیقاً ما به این ویکتورها نیاز داریم که بتوانند کلمات را در جمله هدف پیش بینی کنند. مکانیسم ساده\u200cی ما به بهترین نمایش\u200cهایی در Encoder و dekoder بدون استفاده از داده\u200cهای اضافه یا اخطار می\u200cکند. همچنین برای کاهش کردن کلمه\u200cهای هدف و افزایش موثیت دیدکوندگی هم کمک می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهایی که در مورد تابع ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای چین و انگلیسی هستند، متوسط توسعه BLEU با 4.53 را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Katika ujenzi wa kodi kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa (NMT), majimbo yaliyofichikana ya miundombinu yanayoendelea katika kodi na maboresho yanabeba taarifa muhimu kuhusu hukumu hiyo. Vector hizi zinatengenezwa na parameter ambazo zinatengenezwa upya kwa kutangaza makosa ya tafsiri kwa muda. We argue that propagating errors through the end-to-end recurrent structures are not a direct way of control the hidden vectors.  Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kutumia utabiri wa maneno kama mfumo wa kudhibiti moja kwa moja. Zaidi zaidi, tunahitaji vector hizi ili kuweza kutabiri maneno katika hukumu ya lengo. Mfumo wetu rahisi unahakikisha uwakilishi bora katika kodi na kupunguza bila kutumia taarifa za ziada au kuchanganyikiwa. Pia, inasaidia kupunguza upande wa lugha inayolenga na kuboresha ufanisi wa kupungua. Majaribio kwenye kazi ya kutafsiri mashine ya Kichina-Kiingereza yanaonyesha kiwango cha wastani wa kuboreshwa kwa BLEU kwa asilimia 4.53.', 'bg': 'В архитектурата на кодер-декодер за невронен машинен превод (НМТ), скритите състояния на повтарящите се структури в кодера и декодера носят ключовата информация за изречението. Тези вектори се генерират от параметри, които се актуализират чрез обратно разпространение на грешки в превода през времето. Ние твърдим, че разпространението на грешки през повтарящите се структури от край до край не е пряк начин за контрол на скритите вектори. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме да се използват думични прогнози като механизъм за директен надзор. По-конкретно, изискваме тези вектори да могат да предвидят речника в целевото изречение. Нашият прост механизъм осигурява по-добри изображения в кодера и декодера, без да се използват допълнителни данни или анотация. Също така е полезно за намаляване на целевия речник и подобряване на ефективността на декодирането. Експериментите по китайско-английски машинен превод показват средно подобрение съответно с 4,53.', 'da': 'I encoder-dekoder-arkitekturen til neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) bærer de skjulte tilstande af de tilbagevendende strukturer i encoder og dekoder de afgørende oplysninger om sætningen. Disse vektorer genereres af parametre, der opdateres ved back-spredning af oversættelsesfejl gennem tiden. Vi hævder, at formeringsfejl gennem end-to-end tilbagevendende strukturer ikke er en direkte måde at kontrollere de skjulte vektorer på. I denne artikel foreslår vi at bruge ordforudsigelser som en mekanisme for direkte tilsyn. Mere specifikt kræver vi, at disse vektorer kan forudsige ordforrådet i målsætningen. Vores enkle mekanisme sikrer bedre repræsentationer i encoder og dekoder uden at bruge ekstra data eller annotation. Det er også nyttigt til at reducere målsidens ordforråd og forbedre afkodningseffektiviteten. Eksperimenter med kinesisk-engelsk maskinoversættelsesopgave viser en gennemsnitlig BLEU-forbedring med henholdsvis 4,53.', 'sq': 'Në arkitekturën e koduesit-dekoderit për përkthimin nervor të makinave (NMT), gjendjet e fshehta të strukturave të përsëritura në koduesin dhe dekoderin mbajnë informacionin thelbësor rreth fjalës. Këto vektorë gjenerohen nga parametrat që përditësohen nga përhapja mbrapa e gabimeve të përkthimit gjatë kohës. Ne argumentojmë se shpërndarja e gabimeve nëpërmjet strukturave të përsëritura nga fundi në fund nuk është një mënyrë e drejtpërdrejtë për të kontrolluar vektorët e fshehur. Në këtë letër, propozojmë të përdorim parashikimet e fjalëve si një mekanizëm për mbikqyrjen e drejtpërdrejtë. Më specifikisht, ne kërkojmë që këta vektorë të jenë në gjendje të parashikojnë fjalorin në fjalimin objektiv. Mekanizmi ynë i thjeshtë siguron përfaqësime më të mira në koduesin dhe dekoderin pa përdorur ndonjë të dhënë shtesë apo anotacion. Kjo është gjithashtu e dobishme në reduktimin e fjalorit anësor të objektivit dhe përmirësimin e efektshmërisë së dekodimit. Eksperimentet në detyrën e përkthimit të makinave kineze-angleze tregojnë një përmirësim mesatar BLEU me 4.53 respektivisht.', 'af': "In die enkoder- dekoder arkitektuur vir neurale masjien vertaling (NMT), die verborge staatste van die herhaalde strukture in die enkoder en dekoder dra die kruipende inligting oor die seting. Hierdie vektore word genereer deur parameters wat word opgedateer deur terug- propagasie van vertaling foute deur tyd. Ons argumenteer dat die propagasie van foute deur die einde- na- einde herhaalde strukture is nie 'n direk manier van beheer van die verborge vektore nie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons om woord voorskou te gebruik as 'n mekanisme vir direk supervisie. Meer spesifieke, ons benodig hierdie vektore om die woordeboek in die doel seting te voorskou. Ons eenvoudige mekanisme verseker beter voorstellings in die enkoder en dekoder sonder om enige ekstra data of annotasie te gebruik. Dit is ook hulp om die doelskantwoordeboek te reduseer en die dekoding effektiviteit te verbeter. Eksperimente op Sjinese-Engelse masjien vertaling opdrag vertoon 'n gemiddelde BLEU verbetering met 4.53, respectively.", 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) կոդերի-կոդերի ճարտարապետության մեջ կոդերի և կոդերի թաքնված կառուցվածքների թաքնված վիճակները ունեն նախադասության մասին կարևոր տեղեկատվություն: Այս վեկտորները ստեղծում են պարամետրերի միջոցով, որոնք վերականգնվում են թարգմանման սխալների հետ տարածման միջոցով ժամանակի ընթացքում: Մենք պնդում ենք, որ սխալների բազմազանությունը վերջ-վերջ կրկնվող կառուցվածքների միջոցով անմիջապես չեն կառավարելու թաքնված վեկտորները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել բառերի կանխատեսումները որպես անմիջական վերահսկողության մեխանիզմ: Իրականում, մենք պահանջում ենք, որ այս վեկտորները կարողանան կանխատեսել բառարանը նպատակային նախադասության մեջ: Մեր պարզ մեխանիզմն ապահովում է ավելի լավ ներկայացումներ կոդերի և կոդերի մեջ առանց օգտագործելու որևէ ավելին տվյալներ կամ նոտացիաներ: Այն նաև օգտակար է նվազեցնելով նպատակային կողմի բառարանը և բարելավելով կոդավորման արդյունավետությունը: Չինաստանի-անգլերենի մեքենայի թարգմանման խնդրի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ընդհանուր բարելավումը ԲԼԵՎ-ի միջին է 4.53-ով:', 'az': 'NMT üçün kodlayıcı-dekoder arhitektarında, kodlayıcı və dekoder içərisində yenidən yapıların gizli durumları cümlədə çox möcüzlü məlumatları daşıyır. Bu vektörlər zamanı boyunca çevirilmə xətalarının geri propagasyonu ilə yaradılır. Biz mübahisə edirik ki, sona-sona gələn xətaların yayılması gizli vektörlərin doğru yolu deyildir. Bu kağızda, söz tədbirlərini doğru gözləmə mehanizmi olaraq istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Əksinə, biz bu vektorların məqsəd cümləsində sözləri tədbir etməsini istəyirik. Bizim basit mehanizmimiz kodlayıcıda daha yaxşı göstəricilər və kodlayıcıda heç bir əlavə məlumat və məlumat istifadə etmədən daha yaxşı göstəricilər təmin edir. Bu həmçin in məqsəd sözlərini azaltmaq və kodlama faydallığını daha yaxşılaşdırmaq faydalıdır. Çin-İngilizə maşına çevirilən işləri ilə müqayisədə 4.53 ilə ortalama BLEU yaxşılıqlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের (এনএমটি) এর জন্য এনকোডার-ডেকোডার আর্কিডারের কাঠামোর মধ্যে, এনকোডারের পুনরাবর্তন কাঠামোর লুকিয়ে রাখা এবং ডেকোডারের এই ভেক্টরগুলো প্যারামিটার দ্বারা তৈরি করা হয়, যারা সময়ের মাধ্যমে অনুবাদের ভুল প্রচারণার মাধ্যমে পিছনে প্রচার কর আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে গোপন ভেক্টরের নিয়ন্ত্রণের সরাসরি উপায় নয় শেষ পর্যন্ত ভুল প্রচারণার মাধ্যমে। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা শব্দের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ব্যবহার করতে প্রস্তাব করছি সরাসরি পর্যবেক্ষণের জন্য। আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা এই ভেক্টরের প্রয়োজন যাতে লক্ষ্যের বাক্যে শব্দভাণ্ডার ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে পারি। আমাদের সহজ মেকানিস্টেম এনকোডারে আরো ভালো প্রতিনিধিত্ব নিশ্চিত করে কোনো অতিরিক্ত তথ্য বা ব্যবহার না করে। এছাড়াও লক্ষ্য পাশের শব্দভাণ্ডার কমানোর সাহায্য এবং ক্রমশ কার্যক্রম উন্নত করার জন্য। Experiments on Chinese-English machine translation task show an average BLEU improvement by 4.53, respectively.', 'bs': 'U arhitekturi kodera-dekodera za prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT), skrivene stanje rekonstruiranih struktura u koderu i dekoderu nose ključne informacije o rečenici. Ovi vektori su stvoreni parametrima koji se aktualizuju povratnim propagacijom grešaka prevođenja kroz vrijeme. Tvrdimo da propagacija grešaka kroz rekonstrukciju kraja do kraja nisu direktni način kontrole skrivenih vektora. U ovom papiru predlažemo da koristimo predviđanja riječi kao mehanizam direktnog nadzora. Posebnije, potrebno je da ovi vektori mogu predvidjeti riječ u ciljnoj rečenici. Naš jednostavan mehanizam osigurava bolje predstave u koderu i dekoderu bez koristi dodatnih podataka ili annotacije. Također je korisno smanjiti riječ o ciljnoj strani i poboljšati učinkovitost dekodiranja. Eksperimenti o zadatku prevođenja kineskog-engleskog mašina pokazuju prosječno poboljšanje BLEU-a od 4,53.', 'ca': "En l'arquitectura del codificador-decoder de traducció neuromàtica (NMT), els estats ocults de les estructures recurrents del codificador i decoder porten la informació crucial sobre la frase. Aquests vectors són generats per paràmetres actualitzats per la propagació retroactiva dels errors de traducció a través del temps. Afirmem que els errors de propagació a través de les estructures recurrents de final a final no són una manera directa de controlar els vectors ocults. En aquest paper, proposem usar prediccions de paraules com un mecanisme de supervisió direct a. Més específicament, necessitem que aquests vectors siguin capaços de predir el vocabulari en la frase alvo. El nostre mecanisme senzill assegura millors representacions en el codificador i el decodificador sense utilitzar dades o anotacions adicionals. També és útil reduir el vocabulari del costat de l'objectiu i millorar l'eficiència de la decodificació. Els experiments en la tasca de traducció de màquina xinès-anglès mostren una millora mitjana de BLEU de 4,53, respectivament.", 'cs': 'V architektuře kodéru-dekodéru pro neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) nesou skryté stavy recidivujících struktur v kodéru a dekodéru klíčové informace o větě. Tyto vektory jsou generovány parametry, které jsou aktualizovány zpětným šířením chyb překladu v čase. Argumentujeme, že šíření chyb skrze end-to-end recidivační struktury není přímým způsobem kontroly skrytých vektorů. V tomto článku navrhujeme použít slovní predikce jako mechanismus přímého dohledu. Konkrétněji vyžadujeme, aby tyto vektory byly schopny předvídat slovní zásobu v cílové větě. Náš jednoduchý mechanismus zajišťuje lepší reprezentaci v kodéru a dekodéru bez použití dalších dat nebo anotací. Je také užitečný při snížení cílové strany slovní zásoby a zlepšení efektivity dekódování. Experimenty na čínsko-anglickém strojovém překladu ukazují průměrné zlepšení BLEU o 4,53.', 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke kodeerija-dekooderi arhitektuuris kannavad kodeerija ja dekooderi korduvate struktuuride varjatud olekud lause kohta olulist infot. Neid vektoreid genereerivad parameetrid, mida ajakohastatakse tõlkevigade tagasilevimise teel. Väidame, et vigade levitamine läbi otsast otsani korduvate struktuuride ei ole otsene viis varjatud vektorite kontrollimiseks. Käesolevas dokumendis teeme ettepaneku kasutada sõnaprognoose otsese järelevalve mehhanismina. Täpsemalt nõuame, et need vektorid suudaksid ennustada sõnavara sihtlauses. Meie lihtne mehhanism tagab paremad esitused kodeerijas ja dekoodris ilma lisaandmete või annoteerimiseta. Samuti aitab see vähendada sihtkülje sõnavara ja parandada dekodeerimise tõhusust. Hiina-inglise masintõlke ülesande katsed näitavad keskmist BLEU paranemist vastavalt 4,53 võrra.', 'tr': "NMT'iň ködleme-dekoder arhitektegi, tekrarlanan strukturlaryň gizli durumlary we sözlem hakynda möhüm maglumaty taýýarlar. Bu vektörler zamany görä terjime hatalaryň arkasynda täzelenýän parameterler tarapyndan üretilýär Hatalar soňunda nihayet tekrarlayan yapılardan uzaklaştırmak, gizli vektörleri doğrudan kontrol etmenin bir yolu değildir. - Bu kagyzda, söz öngörümlerini düzgün gözlemek üçin mekanizma ulanmagy teklip edýäris. Diňe bir şekilde, bu vektörler sözleriň maksady sözleriň ön namaýyş etmesi gerek. Basit mekanizamyz kodçda daha iyi temsilleri sağlayar ve kodçda hiç bir ekli veri ya da duyurulamadan daha iyi temsilleri sağlayar. Bu ýerde maksadyň sözlerini azaltmak we kodlemek etkinliýetini täzeleşdirmek üçin kömek edip biler. Çinçe-Iňlisçe maşynyň terjime täbliginde örän jalyklaşyklar bolsa 4.53-de diýip bolan BLEU üýtgetmegini görkezýär.", 'fi': 'Neurallisen konekäännöksen (NMT) kooderi-dekooderiarkkitehtuurissa kooderin ja dekooderin toistuvien rakenteiden piilotetut tilat kantavat ratkaisevaa tietoa lauseesta. Nämä vektorit syntyvät parametreista, jotka päivitetään kääntämisvirheiden takaisinleviämisen kautta ajan. Väitämme, että virheiden leviäminen päästä päähän toistuvien rakenteiden kautta ei ole suora tapa hallita piilotettuja vektoreita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme sanaennusteiden käyttöä suoran valvonnan mekanismina. Tarkemmin sanottuna vaadimme näiden vektorien pystyvän ennustamaan sanaston kohdelauseessa. Yksinkertainen mekanismimme takaa paremman edustuksen kooderissa ja dekooderissa ilman ylimääräistä dataa tai merkintöjä. Se auttaa myös vähentämään kohdepuolen sanastoa ja parantamaan dekoodauksen tehokkuutta. Kiinan ja englannin konekäännöstehtävän kokeet osoittavat keskimääräisen BLEU-parannuksen 4,53.', 'am': 'In the encoder-decoder architecture for neural machine translation (NMT), the hidden states of the recurrent structures in the encoder and decoder carry the crucial information about the sentence.  እነዚህ vectors are generated by parameters that are updated by back-propagation of the translation errors through time. በተሰወረ መሠረቶች ውስጥ በተሰወረ መቆጣጠር የተሰወረውን vector ለመቆጣጠር ቀጥተኛ መንገድ አይደለም ብለን እናጋራለን፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ቃላት የቃላትን ትንቢት ለመቀበል የምናስፈልገው የራቀ ጉዳይ ማኀበረሰብ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ እነዚህን vectorዎች በአካባቢ ፍርድ ውስጥ ያሉትን ቃላትን ለመቀበል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ቀላል አካባቢነታችን የኮድ ክፍል እና ክፍል ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ የአካባቢውን የግልጹን ቃላት ማጎድል እና የድምፅ ውጤት ማድረግ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ መሳሪያ ትርጉም ሥራ ላይ የተፈተና ፈተናዎች በ4.53 የተለየ ብሊዩን ያሳያል፡፡', 'jv': 'Nang architecture koder To text-to-end Nanging kuwi iki, kita supoyo nggawe Perintah awak dhéwé kuwi bisa perusahaan kanggo nggawe yèn kuwi. vectors-action Awak dhéwé sistem sing beraksi perusahaan langgar-sistem sing luwih basa ning koder karo dekojer buddy Isopo sing paling kanggo tarjamahan pangan Chinese-Inggris kuwi nggambar njaluk luwih-luwih kanggo tarjamahan kanggo 4.31.', 'he': 'בארכיטקטורת הקודר-קידור לתרגום מכונות עצביות (NMT), המצבים המוסתרים של המבנים המחוזרים בקודר והקידור נושאים את המידע הקריטי על המשפט. ווקטורים אלה יוצרים על ידי פרמטרים שמעדכנים על ידי פיתוח מאחור של טעויות התרגום דרך הזמן. אנחנו מתווכחים שטעויות בהרבה דרך מבנים חוזרים סוף-סוף הם לא דרך ישירה לשלוט בוקטורים חבויים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להשתמש בחזויות מילים כמנגנון לפיקוח ישיר. במיוחד יותר, אנחנו דורשים שהווקטורים האלה כדי להיות מסוגלים לחזות את המילים במשפט המטרה. המנגנון הפשוט שלנו מאבטח ייצוגים טובים יותר בקודר והפיקוד בלי להשתמש בנתונים נוספים או ציונים. זה גם מועיל בהפחית המילון הצדדי של המטרה ולשיפור את יעילות הפענוח. ניסויים על משימה התרגום מכונות סיני-אנגלית מראים שיפור ממוצע של BLEU ב-4.53, בהתאם.', 'ha': "In tsarin kodkoder-koda wa fassarar kwamfyutan na ƙarura (NMT), an ɓõye halin da aka ƙiyaye cikin tsarin da aka sake koma cikin kodi da kwamfyuta, sunã ɗau da yanzu muhimu ga maganar. These vectors are generated by parameters which are updated by back-propagation of translation errors through time. Munã yi jãyayya da ku faɗi ɓarna a tsakanin tsarin da aka ƙara zuwa-ƙari, ba su zama wata hanya madaidaiciya wa masu ɓõya. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãta mu yi amfani da misalin kalma kamar mekanin wa tsaro madaidaici. Ko da ƙayyade, za'a buƙata wannan masu shiryuwa dõmin su iya iya gabani ga maganar da ke cikin birane. Shiryatinmu masu sauƙi na sikre masu tsari cikin kode da za'a yi amfani da wasu data ko zartar da. Yana da amfani da ƙaranci maganar hagu masu gabatar da kuma ya kyautata fassarar koda. Experiments on the job of the Machine- Ingirin Ingiriya show an abnormal improvement by 4.53.", 'sk': 'Skrita stanja ponavljajočih se struktur v kodirju in dekodirju nosijo ključne informacije o stavku. Ti vektorji nastajajo s parametri, ki se posodabljajo z nazaj širjenjem prevajalskih napak skozi čas. Trdimo, da širjenje napak skozi ponavljajoče se strukture od konca do konca ni neposreden način nadzora skritih vektorjev. V tem prispevku predlagamo uporabo besednih napovedi kot mehanizma neposrednega nadzora. Natančneje, ti vektorji morajo biti sposobni napovedati besedišče v ciljnem stavku. Naš preprost mehanizem zagotavlja boljše predstavitve v kodirniku in dekodirniku brez uporabe dodatnih podatkov ali opomb. Pomaga tudi pri zmanjšanju besedišča ciljne strani in izboljšanju učinkovitosti dekodiranja. Poskusi s kitajsko-angleškim strojnim prevajanjem kažejo povprečno izboljšanje BLEU za 4,53 oziroma 4,53.', 'bo': 'In the encoder-decoder architecture for neural machine translation (NMT)ནང་དུ་སླར་འཁོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར These vectors are generated by parameters which are updated by back-propagation of translation errors through time. We argue that propagating errors through the end-to-end recurrent structures are not a direct way of control the hidden vectors. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཐ་སྙད་རིས་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་vectors་འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དགོས་པ ང་ཚོའི་སྟབས་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱིས་གསང་བ་དང་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་དུ་འོང་བའི་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཟུར་ཕུང་ཐོག་ཚིག་དག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྒྱ་ནག'}
{'en': 'Towards Decoding as Continuous Optimisation in Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'نحو فك التشفير كتحسين مستمر في الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': "Vers le décodage en tant qu'optimisation continue dans la traduction automatique neuronale", 'pt': 'Rumo à decodificação como otimização contínua na tradução automática neural', 'es': 'Hacia la decodificación como optimización continua en la traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳における継続的最適化としてのデコードに向けて', 'zh': '迈向解码为神经机器翻译优化', 'ru': 'К декодированию как непрерывной оптимизации в нейронном машинном переводе', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में निरंतर अनुकूलन के रूप में डिकोडिंग की ओर', 'ga': 'I dTreo Díchódaithe mar Optamú Leanúnach san Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach', 'ka': 'ევკოდირების მიხედვით, როგორც შერძელებელი ოპტიმიზაცია ნეიროლური მაქინის გადამყარებაში', 'hu': 'A dekódolás felé, mint folyamatos optimalizálás a neurális gépi fordításban', 'el': 'Προς την αποκωδικοποίηση ως συνεχή βελτιστοποίηση στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Verso la decodifica come ottimizzazione continua nella traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасындағы декодтамасын өзгерту', 'mk': 'За декодирање како континуирана оптимизација во преведувањето на невралните машини', 'lt': 'Dekodavimo kaip nuolatinio optimizavimo neurologinių mašin ų vertimo srityje link', 'ms': 'Menuju Pengekodan sebagai Optimisasi Terus dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയില്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഉപാധികാരത്തിനായി മുകളിലേക്ക് കോഡിങ', 'mt': 'Lejn id-Dikodifikazzjoni bħala Optimizzazzjoni Kontinwa fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины хөрөнгө дамжуулалт гэх мэт шийдвэрлэх рүү', 'pl': 'W kierunku dekodowania jako ciągłej optymalizacji w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'ro': 'Către decodare ca optimizare continuă în traducerea automată neurală', 'sr': 'Do dekodiranja kao kontinualna optimizacija u neurološkom prevodu mašine', 'no': 'Gå til dekoding som kontinuerleg optimalisering i neiralmaskinsomsetjing', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මේෂින් පරිවර්තනයේ ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදිහට ඩිකෝඩික් කරන්න', 'so': 'Towards Decoding as Continuous Optimisation in Neural machine Translation', 'sv': 'Mot avkodning som kontinuerlig optimering i neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தில் தொடர்ந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட விருப்பங்களாக மேல் குறியீடுகள்', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ میں دائکوڈینگ کی طرف', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Để giải mã một sự tinh hoàn vĩnh viễn của máy thần kinh', 'bg': 'Към декодирането като непрекъсната оптимизация в невралния машинен превод', 'nl': 'Naar decodering als continue optimalisatie in neuronale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Prema dekodiranju kao kontinualna optimizacija u prevodu neuroloških strojeva', 'da': 'På vej mod dekodning som kontinuerlig optimering i neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Zur Dekodierung als kontinuierliche Optimierung in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'id': 'Menuju Dekodasi sebagai Optimisasi Terus dalam Translation Mesin Neural', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 중의 디코딩 지속적 최적화', 'fa': 'به سمت رمزبندی به عنوان Optimization Continuous in Neural Machine Translation', 'sw': 'Takwimu ya juu kama Utafiti unaoendelea katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'tr': 'Neural Maşynyň terjimesinde Ködleme Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Gaan na Dekodering as Continuous Optimisation in Neural Machine Translation', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'sq': 'drejt dekodimit si optimizim i vazhdueshëm në përkthimin e makinave nervore', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման շարունակական լավագույնը', 'az': 'N√∂ral Makin √áevirm…ôsind…ô h…ômiŇü…ôlik Optimizasiya olaraq Dekodlama t…ôr…ôfind…ô', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের মধ্যে চলতে থাকা অপারেশন হিসেবে উপরের ডিকোডিং', 'ca': 'Vers el descodificació com a continua optimització en la traducció de màquines neuronals', 'bs': 'Do dekodiranja kao kontinualna optimizacija u neurološkom prevodu mašine', 'cs': 'K dekódování jako kontinuální optimalizaci v neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'fi': 'Kohti dekoodausta jatkuvana optimoinnina neurokonekäännöksessä', 'et': 'Dekodeerimine kui pidev optimeerimine neuroaalses masintõlkes', 'jv': 'Optimisation', 'he': 'לעבור לפיתוח כאופטימציה ממשיכה בתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'sk': 'K dekodiranju kot stalni optimizaciji v nevralnem strojnem prevajanju', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་འགྱུར་བ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱེད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel decoding approach for neural machine translation (NMT) based on continuous optimisation. We reformulate decoding, a discrete optimization problem, into a continuous problem, such that optimization can make use of efficient gradient-based techniques. Our powerful decoding framework allows for more accurate decoding for standard neural machine translation models, as well as enabling decoding in intractable models such as intersection of several different NMT models. Our empirical results show that our decoding framework is effective, and can leads to substantial improvements in translations, especially in situations where greedy search and beam search are not feasible. Finally, we show how the technique is highly competitive with, and complementary to, reranking.', 'ar': 'نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لفك التشفير للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) بناءً على التحسين المستمر. نحن نعيد صياغة فك التشفير ، وهي مشكلة تحسين منفصلة ، إلى مشكلة مستمرة ، بحيث يمكن للتحسين الاستفادة من التقنيات الفعالة القائمة على التدرج. يسمح إطار فك التشفير القوي لدينا بفك تشفير أكثر دقة لنماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية القياسية ، فضلاً عن تمكين فك التشفير في النماذج المستعصية مثل تقاطع العديد من نماذج NMT المختلفة. تظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن إطار فك التشفير لدينا فعال ، ويمكن أن يؤدي إلى تحسينات جوهرية في الترجمات ، خاصة في المواقف التي لا يكون فيها البحث الجشع والبحث الشعاعي ممكنًا. أخيرًا ، نوضح كيف أن هذه التقنية تنافسية للغاية ومكملة لإعادة التصنيف.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle approche de décodage pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) basée sur une optimisation continue. Nous reformulons le décodage, un problème d'optimisation discret, en un problème continu, de telle sorte que l'optimisation puisse utiliser des techniques efficaces basées sur les gradients. Notre puissant framework de décodage permet un décodage plus précis pour les modèles de traduction automatique neuronale standard, ainsi que le décodage dans des modèles insolubles tels que l'intersection de plusieurs modèles NMT différents. Nos résultats empiriques montrent que notre cadre de décodage est efficace et peut conduire à des améliorations substantielles des traductions, en particulier dans les situations où la recherche gourmande et la recherche par faisceau ne sont pas réalisables. Enfin, nous montrons comment la technique est très compétitive et complémentaire au reclassement.", 'es': 'Proponemos un enfoque novedoso de decodificación para la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) basado en la optimización continua. Reformulamos la decodificación, un problema de optimización discreto, en un problema continuo, de modo que la optimización pueda hacer uso de técnicas eficientes basadas en gradientes. Nuestro potente marco de decodificación permite una decodificación más precisa para modelos de traducción automática neuronal estándar, además de permitir la decodificación en modelos intratables, como la intersección de varios modelos NMT diferentes. Nuestros resultados empíricos muestran que nuestro marco de decodificación es eficaz y puede conducir a mejoras sustanciales en las traducciones, especialmente en situaciones en las que la búsqueda codiciosa y la búsqueda de haces no son factibles. Finalmente, mostramos cómo la técnica es altamente competitiva y complementaria a la reclasificación.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova abordagem de decodificação para tradução automática neural (NMT) com base na otimização contínua. Reformulamos a decodificação, um problema de otimização discreta, em um problema contínuo, de modo que a otimização possa fazer uso de técnicas eficientes baseadas em gradiente. Nossa poderosa estrutura de decodificação permite uma decodificação mais precisa para modelos de tradução automática neural padrão, além de permitir a decodificação em modelos intratáveis, como a interseção de vários modelos NMT diferentes. Nossos resultados empíricos mostram que nossa estrutura de decodificação é eficaz e pode levar a melhorias substanciais nas traduções, especialmente em situações em que a busca gulosa e a busca por feixe não são viáveis. Por fim, mostramos como a técnica é altamente competitiva e complementar à reclassificação.', 'ja': '継続的最適化に基づくニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）のための新規のデコードアプローチを提案します。最適化が効率的な勾配ベースの技術を利用できるように、離散最適化問題である復号を連続的な問題に再構成します。当社の強力なデコードフレームワークは、標準的なニューラル機械翻訳モデルのより正確なデコードを可能にするとともに、いくつかの異なるNMTモデルの交差などの難解なモデルでのデコードを可能にします。私たちの実証結果は、私たちのデコードフレームワークが効果的であり、特に貪欲な検索とビーム検索が実行不可能な状況では、翻訳の大幅な改善につながる可能性があることを示しています。最後に、そのテクニックがどのように再ランキングと競合し、補完的であるかを示します。', 'zh': '立优化神经机器翻译(NMT)解码法。 解码(一离优化)复为连理,以优化梯度高效术。 吾之强解码框架许于准神经机器翻译模之解码,而支于棘手之中以解码之,如数NMT之交。 吾证结果表明,吾解码框架有效,且可于译中致实质性改进,尤在贪索波束不可。 最后,我们展示了该术如何与重排名有高竞争力,并与他相辅相成。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новый подход к декодированию для нейронного машинного перевода (НМП), основанный на непрерывной оптимизации. Декодирование, задача дискретной оптимизации, мы переводим в непрерывную задачу, так что оптимизация может использовать эффективные методы на основе градиента. Наша мощная структура декодирования позволяет более точно декодировать стандартные модели нейронного машинного перевода, а также позволяет декодировать в трудноразрешимых моделях, таких как пересечение нескольких различных моделей NMT. Наши эмпирические результаты показывают, что наша система декодирования эффективна и может привести к существенным улучшениям в переводах, особенно в ситуациях, когда жадный поиск и поиск лучей невозможны. Наконец, мы показываем, насколько эта методика конкурентоспособна и дополняет рерайтинг.', 'hi': 'हम निरंतर अनुकूलन के आधार पर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) के लिए एक उपन्यास डिकोडिंग दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम एक निरंतर समस्या में डीकोडिंग, एक असतत अनुकूलन समस्या को फिर से तैयार करते हैं, जैसे कि अनुकूलन कुशल ढाल-आधारित तकनीकों का उपयोग कर सकता है। हमारा शक्तिशाली डिकोडिंग फ्रेमवर्क मानक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल के लिए अधिक सटीक डिकोडिंग के लिए अनुमति देता है, साथ ही साथ कई अलग-अलग एनएमटी मॉडल के प्रतिच्छेदन जैसे असभ्य मॉडल में डिकोडिंग को सक्षम करता है। हमारे अनुभवजन्य परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा डिकोडिंग ढांचा प्रभावी है, और अनुवाद में पर्याप्त सुधार की ओर ले जा सकता है, खासकर उन स्थितियों में जहां लालची खोज और बीम खोज संभव नहीं है। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि तकनीक कैसे अत्यधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी है, और इसके पूरक, reranking।', 'ga': 'Molaimid cur chuige nua díchódaithe don néaraistriúchán meaisín (NMT) bunaithe ar bharrfheabhsú leanúnach. Athchóirímid díchódú, fadhb optamaithe scoite, ina fhadhb leanúnach, ionas gur féidir leas iomlán a bhaint as teicnící éifeachtúla atá bunaithe ar ghrádán. Ligeann ár gcreat díchódaithe cumhachtach dúinn díchódú níos cruinne a dhéanamh ar mhúnlaí caighdeánacha néaraistriúcháin meaisín, chomh maith le díchódú a chumasú i múnlaí dorochtana mar a dtrasnaíonn roinnt samhlacha NMT éagsúla. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí eimpíreacha go bhfuil ár gcreat díchódaithe éifeachtach, agus go bhféadfadh feabhsuithe suntasacha ar aistriúcháin a bheith mar thoradh air, go háirithe i gcásanna nach bhfuil cuardach santach agus cuardach bíoma indéanta. Ar deireadh, léirímid an chaoi a bhfuil an teicníocht an-iomaíoch le hathrangú agus ag comhlánú leis.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტის განახლება ნეიროლური მანქანის განახლებისთვის (NMT) პრომენტის განახლებისთვის. ჩვენ რეფორმულებთ ევკოდირების, დისკრეტური ოპტიმიზაციის პრობლემაში, მუშაობელი პრობლემაში, როგორც ოპტიმიზაცია შეიძლება გამოყენება ეფექტიურ გრადიენტი ჩვენი ძალიან დიკოდირებული ფრამეტრი უფრო მარტივი დიკოდირების შესაძლებლობა სტანდარტული ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგუმარების მოდელებისთვის, და შესაძლებლობა ინტერექტირებული მოდელში, როგ ჩვენი ემპერიკალური შედეგები აჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი დეკოდირება ეფექტიურია, და შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ ძალიან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტი ნაი-კპაწ ოჲკაზვმ კაკ ვ რვჳნთკარა მნჲდჲ კჲნკპვრვნრთგნა, ა კჲმოლთმვნრთპამვ ჟვ ჲრნჲგჲ.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση αποκωδικοποίησης για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) βασισμένη στη συνεχή βελτιστοποίηση. Επαναδιατυπώνουμε την αποκωδικοποίηση, ένα διακριτό πρόβλημα βελτιστοποίησης, σε ένα συνεχές πρόβλημα, έτσι ώστε η βελτιστοποίηση να μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσει αποτελεσματικές τεχνικές βασισμένες σε κλίση. Το ισχυρό μας πλαίσιο αποκωδικοποίησης επιτρέπει την ακριβέστερη αποκωδικοποίηση για τα τυποποιημένα μοντέλα νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης, καθώς και την αποκωδικοποίηση σε αδιάβατα μοντέλα όπως η τομή πολλών διαφορετικών μοντέλων. Τα εμπειρικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο αποκωδικοποίησης είναι αποτελεσματικό και μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις στις μεταφράσεις, ειδικά σε περιπτώσεις όπου η άπληστη αναζήτηση και η αναζήτηση ακτίνων δεν είναι εφικτή. Τέλος, δείχνουμε πώς η τεχνική είναι ιδιαίτερα ανταγωνιστική και συμπληρωματική με την επανακατάταξη.', 'hu': 'Új dekódolási megközelítést javasolunk a neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) folyamatos optimalizálására. A dekódolást, egy diszkrét optimalizálási problémát folyamatos problémává alakítjuk át, hogy az optimalizálás hatékony gradiens alapú technikákat használhasson. Erőteljes dekódolási keretrendszerünk lehetővé teszi a szabványos neurális gépi fordítási modellek pontosabb dekódolását, valamint lehetővé teszi a dekódolást olyan behatolhatatlan modellekben, mint például több különböző NMT modell metszéspontja. empirikus eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy dekódolási keretrendszerünk hatékony, és jelentős javulást eredményezhet a fordításokban, különösen olyan helyzetekben, amikor a mohó keresés és a sugárkeresés nem megvalósítható. Végezetül megmutatjuk, hogy a technika milyen versenyképes és kiegészíti az újraértékelést.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo approccio di decodifica per la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) basato sull'ottimizzazione continua. Riformuliamo la decodifica, un problema di ottimizzazione discreto, in un problema continuo, in modo che l'ottimizzazione possa fare uso di efficienti tecniche basate sul gradiente. Il nostro potente framework di decodifica consente una decodifica più accurata per i modelli di traduzione automatica neurale standard, oltre a consentire la decodifica in modelli intrattabili come l'intersezione di diversi modelli NMT. I nostri risultati empirici dimostrano che il nostro framework di decodifica è efficace e può portare a miglioramenti sostanziali nelle traduzioni, soprattutto in situazioni in cui la ricerca avida e la ricerca del fascio non sono fattibili. Infine, mostriamo come la tecnica sia altamente competitiva e complementare con la ri-ranking.", 'mk': 'Предложуваме нов пристап на декодирање за превод на невровни машини (НМТ) базиран на континуирана оптимизација. Го реформираме декодирањето, дискретниот проблем со оптимизацијата, во континуиран проблем, така што оптимизацијата може да користи ефикасни техники базирани на градиенти. Нашата моќна декодирачка рамка овозможува попрецизно декодирање на стандардните модели за превод на невровни машини, како и овозможува декодирање во неприфатливи модели како што е прекинувањето на неколку различни НМТ модели. Нашите емпириски резултати покажуваат дека нашата рамка за декодирање е ефикасна и може да доведе до значителни подобрувања во преводите, особено во ситуации во кои алчното пребарување и пребарување по прозорец не се остварливи. Конечно, покажуваме како техниката е високо конкурентна и комплиментарна со повторното врзување.', 'kk': 'Біз невралдық компьютердің аудармасының (NMT) жалғыз оптимизациялауына негізделген романдық декодизациялау тәсілін ұсынамыз. Біз декодтамыз, дискретті оптимизациялау мәселесін жалғастыру мәселесіне реформирамыз, сондықтан оптимизациялау градиенттің негізінде эффективті техникаларды қолданады. Біздің күшті декодтау фрейміміз стандартты невралдық компьютердің аудармалы моделдеріне дұрыс декодтау үшін, сондай-ақ бірнеше түрлі NMT моделдерінің көлесу үшін интрактивті моделдеріне декодтау Біздің империялық нәтижелеріміз декодтамыз бағдарламасының эффективті деп көрсетеді, және аудармалардың көп жақсартылығын өзгертуге болады, осымен қарай іздеу және жұлдыз іздеу мүм Соңында, біз техниканың қалай жарықтығын көрсету және қайта жарықтығын қосып жатқанын көрсетеміз.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują metodą dekodifikuoti nervinių mašinų vertimą (NMT), pagrįstą nuolatiniu optimizavimu. Mes iš naujo suformuluojame dekodavimą, diskretą optimizavimo problem ą, į nuolatinę problemą, kad optimizavimas galėtų pasinaudoti veiksmingais gradientais pagrįstais metodais. Mūsų galinga dekodavimo sistema leidžia tiksliau dekoduoti standartinius nervinių mašin ų vertimo modelius, taip pat leidžia dekoduoti nematomus modelius, pvz., kelių skirtingų NMT modelių tarpusavio atkarpą. Mūsų empiriniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų dekodizavimo sistema yra veiksminga ir gali labai pagerinti vertimus, ypač tais atvejais, kai nepavyksta ieškoti pigių ir paieškoti spindulių. Galiausiai parodysime, kaip šis metodas yra labai konkurencingas ir papildo pakartotinį susiejimą.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan pendekatan penyahkodan baru untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) berdasarkan optimisasi terus menerus. We reformulate decoding, a discrete optimization problem, into a continuous problem, such that optimization can make use of efficient gradient-based techniques.  kerangka penyahkodan kuat kami membolehkan penyahkodan lebih tepat untuk model terjemahan mesin saraf piawai, serta membolehkan penyahkodan dalam model yang tidak boleh diterima seperti persimpangan beberapa model NMT yang berbeza. Hasil empirik kita menunjukkan bahawa kerangka penyahkodan kita berkesan, dan boleh membawa kepada peningkatan yang besar dalam penerjemah, terutama dalam situasi di mana pencarian serakah dan pencarian cahaya tidak boleh dilakukan. Akhirnya, kita tunjukkan bagaimana teknik ini sangat kompetitif dengan, dan kumplimentar untuk, mengarah semula.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu approċċ ġdid ta’ dekodifikazzjoni għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) ibbażat fuq ottimizzazzjoni kontinwa. Aħna niriformulaw id-dekodifikazzjoni, problem a diskreta ta’ ottimizzazzjoni, f’problema kontinwa, b’tali mod li l-ottimizzazzjoni tista’ tuża tekniki effiċjenti bbażati fuq gradjenti. Il-qafas ta’ dekodifikazzjoni qawwi tagħna jippermetti dekodifikazzjoni aktar preċiża għal mudelli standard ta’ traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali, kif ukoll jippermetti dekodifikazzjoni f’mudelli intrattabbli bħall-intersezzjoni ta’ diversi mudelli NMT differenti. Ir-riżultati empiriċi tagħna juru li l-qafas tad-dekodifikazzjoni tagħna huwa effettiv, u jista’ jwassal għal titjib sostanzjali fit-traduzzjonijiet, speċjalment f’sitwazzjonijiet fejn it-tiftix u t-tiftix bir-raġġ mhux fattibbli. Finally, we show how the technique is highly competitive with, and complementary to, reranking.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө (NMT) хөрөнгө оруулах шинэ шинэ загварыг санал болгож байна. Бид шинэчлэлтийг шинэчлэх боломжтой санааны асуудлыг үргэлжлүүлэх асуудлыг шинэчлэх боломжтой болгодог. Бидний хүчирхэг загвар нь стандарт мэдрэлийн машин орчуулах загваруудыг илүү тодорхойлох боломжтой. Мөн олон төрлийн NMT загваруудын огтлолцох загваруудыг интроктив загваруудын хуваалцах боломжтой. Бидний эзэмшигтэй үр дүнд бидний шинэчлэлтийн үйл ажиллагаа үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Ингэснээр бидний шинэчлэлтийн хөгжлийн сайжруулалт, ялангуяа хүчирхэг хайх болон тэнгэрийн хайх боломжгүй нө Эцэст нь, бид техник хэрхэн өрсөлдөөнтэй, дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин өрсөлдөөнтэй байгааг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയ്ക്ക് (NMT) അടിസ്ഥാനമായി അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡെകോഡിങ്ങ് നടപടിയാണ നമ്മള്\u200d ഡികോഡിങ്ങിനെ സംസ്കരിക്കുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒപ്പിമീഷന്\u200d പ്രശ്നം, നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രശ്നത്തിലേക്ക്, അതുപോലെ അത് നമ്മുടെ ശക്തിയുള്ള ഡികോഡിങ്ങ് ഫ്രെയിംക്കോഡ് ഫ്രെയിംഗ് സാധാരണ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d കുറച്ചു കൂടുതല്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങ്  നമ്മുടെ ആശ്വാസഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഡികോഡിങ്ങ് ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാണെന്നും, വിഭാഷങ്ങളില്\u200d വെച് അവസാനം, ടെക്നിക്ക് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് നമുക്ക് കാണിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നു', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein novel dekodingstilnærming for neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT), basert på kontinuerleg optimalisering. Vi reformerer dekoding, eit diskrete optimaliseringsproblem i eit kontinuerleg problem, slik at optimalisering kan bruka effektive fargeovergangsbaserte teknikk. Vårt kraftige dekodingsrammeverk kan bruka meir nøyaktig dekoding for standardmodeller for omsetjing av neiralmaskin, og for å slå på dekoding i intraktibele modeller som kryssinga av fleire ulike NMT- modeller. Våre empiriske resultat viser at vårt dekodingsrammeverk er effektiv, og kan føra til store forbedringar i oversettelsar, spesielt i situasjonar der grensesøk og søk på strålar ikkje er tilgjengeleg. Etter slutt, viser vi korleis teknikken er svært konkurrentivt med, og komplementar til, gjenoppretting.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe podejście dekodowania neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) oparte na ciągłej optymalizacji. Przekształcamy dekodowanie, dyskretny problem optymalizacji, w problem ciągły, tak aby optymalizacja mogła wykorzystać efektywne techniki oparte na gradientach. Nasz potężny framework dekodowania pozwala na bardziej dokładne dekodowanie standardowych neuronowych modeli tłumaczenia maszynowego, a także umożliwia dekodowanie w niemożliwych modelach, takich jak przecięcie kilku różnych modeli NMT. Nasze wyniki empiryczne pokazują, że nasze ramy dekodowania są skuteczne i mogą prowadzić do znacznej poprawy tłumaczeń, zwłaszcza w sytuacjach, gdy chciwe wyszukiwanie i wyszukiwanie wiązki nie są możliwe. Na koniec pokazujemy, jak technika jest bardzo konkurencyjna i uzupełniająca do zmiany rankingu.', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă abordare de decodare pentru traducerea automată neurală (NMT) bazată pe optimizarea continuă. Reformulăm decodarea, o problemă discretă de optimizare, într-o problemă continuă, astfel încât optimizarea să poată utiliza tehnici eficiente bazate pe gradient. Cadrul nostru puternic de decodare permite o decodare mai precisă pentru modelele standard de traducere mașină neurală, precum și permite decodarea în modele intrabile, cum ar fi intersecția mai multor modele NMT diferite. Rezultatele noastre empirice arată că cadrul nostru de decodare este eficient și poate duce la îmbunătățiri substanțiale în traduceri, în special în situațiile în care căutarea lacomă și căutarea fasciculelor nu sunt fezabile. În cele din urmă, vom arăta cum tehnica este extrem de competitivă cu, și complementară cu, re-ranking.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi pristup dekodiranja za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) na temelju neprestano optimizacije. Mi reformiramo dekodiranje, diskretni optimizacijski problem, u kontinuirani problem, tako da optimizacija može iskoristiti efikasne tehnike na osnovu gradient a. Naš moćni okvir za dekodiranje omogućava precizniji dekodiranje standardnih modela prevoda neuralnih mašina, kao i omogućavajući dekodiranje intraktivnih modela kao što su prekidanje nekoliko različitih NMT modela. Naši empirički rezultati pokazuju da je naš okvir dekodiranja efikasan i može dovesti do značajnih poboljšanja prevoda, posebno u situacijama u kojima pohlepna potraga i pretraživanje zraka nije moguće. Konačno, pokazujemo kako je tehnika vrlo konkurentna, i dodatno, preokrenuta.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny avkodningsmetod för neural maskinöversättning (NMT) baserad på kontinuerlig optimering. Vi omformulerar avkodning, ett diskret optimeringsproblem, till ett kontinuerligt problem, så att optimering kan använda sig av effektiva gradientbaserade tekniker. Vårt kraftfulla avkodningsram möjliggör mer exakt avkodning för vanliga neurala maskinöversättningsmodeller, samt möjliggör avkodning i svårhanterliga modeller som skärning av flera olika NMT-modeller. Våra empiriska resultat visar att vårt avkodningsram är effektivt och kan leda till betydande förbättringar i översättningar, särskilt i situationer där girig sökning och beamsökning inte är genomförbar. Slutligen visar vi hur tekniken är mycket konkurrenskraftig med, och kompletterar, omräkning.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab ku qoran qoraalka codsiga ee tarjumidda maskaxda neurada (NMT) oo ku saleysan rajada sii-socda. Waxaynu soo bedelaynaa suurtagalka, dhibaato kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, dhibaato sii socota ah, taas oo ah in la isticmaali karo qalabka saxda ah oo ku qoran darafka. Shaqooyinkayada awoodda ah ee deynta ayaa si saxda ah looga dhigi karo tusaalaha tarjumidda maskaxda neurada ee caadiga ah, sidoo kalena waxaa loo ogolaan karaa codsiga modellada caadiga ah, tusaale ahaan qeybta noocyada kala duduwan ee NMT. Midhaha raadinta ah waxay muuqataa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu ay tayo u tahay, wuxuuna ku socon karaa hagaajiyada aad u badan turjumidda, khusuusan xaaladaha aan suurtogal ahayn raadinta faa'iidada iyo raadinta saxda ah. Ugu dambaysta waxaan tusnaynaa sida teknikada aad u adag, iyo sidoo kale kaloo u adag, si aad u kaleemeysid.", 'si': 'අපි න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව (NMT) සඳහා නියෝජිත විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. අපි ඩිකොඩ් එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක්, විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒ වගේම විශේෂ විශේෂ අපේ ශක්තිමත් ඩිකෝඩින් ෆ්\u200dරේම්ටර් එක්ක ස්ථානය න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය මදුල්ලය සඳහා විශිෂ්ට වෙනස් NMT අපේ ඉම්පිරිකාලික ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ඩිකෝඩ් ක්\u200dරියාම් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිචාර අන්තිමේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විද්\u200dයාවය කොහොමද තරඟාවක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා, ඒ වගේම පුළුවන් විදිහට,', 'ta': 'நாம் தொடர்ந்து எதிர்பார்ப்பு அடிப்படையிலான புதிய குறியீட்டு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு ஒர நாம் குறியீட்டை மாற்றுகிறோம், ஒரு வேறு வித்தியாசமான முறைமைப்படுத்தல் பிரச்சனை, தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும் பிரச்சனைக்கு, இது போ எங்கள் சக்தியான குறியீட்டு சட்டத்தில் நிலையான நெயுரல் மொழிமாற்றி மாதிரிகளுக்கு மேலும் சரியான குறியீடு அனுமதிக்கும், மற்றும் பல வேறு வேற எங்கள் விருப்பங்களின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது எங்கள் குறியீட்டு சட்டத்தில் செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் பெரிய மேம்படுத இறுதியில், தொழில்நுட்பம் எவ்வாறு மிகவும் போராட்டியாக இருக்கிறது மற்றும் மீண்டும் சிக்கலானது.', 'ur': 'ہم نے نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے ایک نئی ڈیکڈینگ طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ہمیشہ ادھر آپٹمیزی پر بنیاد ہے. ہم ڈیکوڈینگ کو تغییر دیتے ہیں، ایک مختلف optimization مسئلہ، ایک ہمیشہ مسئلہ میں، جس طرح optimization قابل استعمال کرسکتا ہے گرائڈینٹ بنیاد تکنیک. ہمارے طاقتور ڈیکوڈ ڈیکوڈ فرم کے لئے استاندارڈ نیورل ماشین ترجمہ موڈل کے لئے زیادہ دقیق ڈیکوڈ کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے، اور اس کے لئے بھی دکوڈ کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے کہ بہت سی مختلف NMT موڈل میں ڈیکوڈ کریں۔ ہمارے امپراتیک نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے ڈیکڈ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ آخر میں ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ تکنیک کس طرح مہربانی کرتی ہے اور اس کے مطابق دوبارہ مہربانی کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz davom etishni davom etish asosida yaratib, neyrol maskina tarjima (NMT) uchun novel kodlash usulini tahlil qilamiz. Biz kodlash, ajoyib optimiz muammolarini davomida muammolarga o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu amalga oshirish gradient-asosiy teknikalarni ishlatish mumkin. Kodlash usuli andoza neural tarjima modellari uchun ko'proq kodlash imkoniyatini beradi, va bir necha xil NMT modellarining qismlari kabi murojaat qilinadigan modellarda kodlash imkoniyatini yordam beradi. Bizning muvaffaqiyatli natijalarimiz ko'rsatadi, cheksiz freymlarimiz effektiv, va tarjimalarning muhimi o'zgarishga ega bo'lishi mumkin, hususan cheksiz qidirish va qiymatni qidirish mumkin emas. Endi, texnologiya qanday rivojlanishini ko'rsatdik, va qaytadan murakkablik.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp giải mã mới cho dịch thiết bị thần kinh (NMB) dựa trên một độ tối ưu tiên liên tục. Chúng tôi tái tạo lại cách giải mã, một vấn đề thuận lợi, thành một vấn đề liên tục, để cho độ cẩn thận có thể sử dụng các kỹ thuật có dốc. Hệ thống giải mã mạnh của chúng tôi cho phép giải mã chính xác hơn cho các mô hình dịch biến máy thần kinh chuẩn, cũng như thiết lập giải mã trong các mô hình khó tính như giao nhau của nhiều mô hình NMB khác nhau. Những kết quả có kinh nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hệ thống giải mã của chúng tôi có hiệu quả và có thể cải thiện bản dịch, đặc biệt trong những trường hợp tìm kiếm tham lam và tìm tia sáng không khả thi. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy kỹ thuật này rất cạnh tranh với, và còn bổ sung với, tái phát.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny afkodning tilgang til neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) baseret på kontinuerlig optimering. Vi omformulerer afkodning, et diskret optimeringsproblem, til et kontinuerligt problem, således at optimering kan gøre brug af effektive gradient-baserede teknikker. Vores kraftfulde afkodningsramme giver mulighed for mere nøjagtig afkodning til standard neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller, samt muliggør afkodning i uønskelige modeller såsom krydsning af flere forskellige NMT modeller. Vores empiriske resultater viser, at vores afkodningsramme er effektive og kan føre til væsentlige forbedringer i oversættelser, især i situationer, hvor grådig søgning og beamsøgning ikke er mulig. Endelig viser vi, hvordan teknikken er yderst konkurrencedygtig med og komplementær til genrangering.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo nov pristup dekodiranja za prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT) na temelju kontinualne optimizacije. Mi reformiramo dekodiranje, diskretni optimizacijski problem, u kontinuirani problem, tako da optimizacija može iskoristiti učinkovite tehnike na osnovu gradient a. Naš moćni okvir dekodiranja omogućava preciznije dekodiranje standardnih modela prevoda neuralnih strojeva, kao i omogućavajući dekodiranje intraktivnih modela poput prekidanja nekoliko različitih NMT modela. Naši empirički rezultati pokazuju da je naš okvir dekodiranja učinkovit i može dovesti do značajnih poboljšanja prevoda, posebno u situacijama u kojima nije moguće pohlepno pretraživanje i pretraživanje zraka. Konačno, pokazujemo kako je tehnika vrlo konkurentna s, i dodatno, preokretanje.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов декодиращ подход за невронен машинен превод (НМТ), базиран на непрекъсната оптимизация. Преформулираме декодирането, дискретен оптимизационен проблем, в непрекъснат проблем, така че оптимизацията може да използва ефективни градиентни техники. Нашата мощна декодираща рамка позволява по-точно декодиране за стандартни модели на невронен машинен превод, както и позволява декодиране в неразрешими модели като пресичане на няколко различни модела. Нашите емпирични резултати показват, че нашата декодираща рамка е ефективна и може да доведе до значителни подобрения в преводите, особено в ситуации, където алчното търсене и лъчевото търсене не са осъществими. И накрая, показваме как техниката е силно конкурентна с и допълва преанкерирането.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan pendekatan dekoding baru untuk terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) berdasarkan optimisasi terus menerus. Kami mengubah dekodifikasi, masalah optimisasi yang diskret, menjadi masalah terus menerus, sehingga optimisasi dapat menggunakan teknik berdasarkan gradien efisien. Framework dekoding kuat kami memungkinkan dekoding lebih akurat untuk model terjemahan mesin saraf standar, serta memungkinkan dekoding dalam model yang tidak dapat diterima seperti persimpangan beberapa model NMT yang berbeda. Our empirical results show that our decoding framework is effective, and can leads to substantial improvements in translations, especially in situations where greedy search and beam search are not feasible.  Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bagaimana teknik ini sangat kompetitif dengan, dan komplementari untuk, mengatur kembali.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe decodering benadering voor voor neuronale machinevertaling (NMT) gebaseerd op continue optimalisatie. We herformuleren decodering, een discreet optimalisatieprobleem, in een continu probleem, zodat optimalisatie gebruik kan maken van efficiënte gradiënt gebaseerde technieken. Ons krachtige decoderingsframework zorgt voor nauwkeurigere decodering voor standaard neurale machine translation modellen, evenals voor decodering in onbruikbare modellen, zoals kruising van verschillende NMT modellen. Onze empirische resultaten tonen aan dat ons decoderingskader effectief is en kan leiden tot substantiële verbeteringen in vertalingen, vooral in situaties waar hebzuchtig zoeken en beam search niet haalbaar zijn. Tot slot laten we zien hoe de techniek zeer concurrerend is met, en complementair aan, herschikking.', 'ko': '우리는 연속적으로 최적화된 신경기계번역(NMT) 디코딩 방법을 제시했다.우리는 디코딩이라는 이산적 최적화 문제를 하나의 연속적인 문제로 전환시킬 것이다. 이렇게 하면 최적화는 효과적인 사다리를 바탕으로 하는 기술을 이용할 수 있다.우리의 강력한 디코딩 프레임워크는 표준 신경기계 번역 모델에 대해 더욱 정확한 디코딩을 허용하고 처리하기 어려운 모델, 예를 들어 몇 개의 서로 다른 NMT 모델의 교집합을 허용한다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면, 우리의 디코딩 프레임워크는 효과적이고, 번역의 실질적인 개선을 초래할 수 있으며, 특히 탐욕스러운 검색과 빔 검색이 불가능한 상황에서는 더욱 그렇다.마지막으로 우리는 이 기술이 어떻게 재순위와 강한 경쟁력을 가지고 상호 보완할 수 있는지 보여 주었다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش\u200cهای رمانی برای ترجمه ماشین\u200cهای عصبی (NMT) بر اساس optimization continuous. ما تغییر دهندگی، یک مشکل optimization مخصوص را به یک مشکل دائمی تغییر می دهیم، که optimization can use efficient gradient-based techniques. چهارچوب دکوندن قدرتمند ما اجازه می دهد که دکوندن دقیق تر برای مدلهای ترجمه ماشین عصبی استاندارد باشد، همچنین فعال کردن دکوندن در مدلهای قابل توجه مانند تقسیم چند مدل NMT متفاوت باشد. نتیجه امپراتیک ما نشان می دهد که چهارچوب دکوندن ما موثر است، و می تواند به بهترین های زیادی در ترجمه\u200cها هدایت کند، مخصوصا در موقعیت\u200cهایی که جستجوی جستجوی آرام و جستجوی آرام قابل نیستند. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که این تکنیک چگونه با آن مسابقه بسیار مسابقه است، و به دوباره مسابقه می دهد.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen einen neuartigen Dekodierungsansatz für die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) vor, der auf kontinuierlicher Optimierung basiert. Wir formulieren die Dekodierung, ein diskretes Optimierungsproblem, in ein kontinuierliches Problem, so dass die Optimierung effiziente gradientenbasierte Techniken nutzen kann. Unser leistungsfähiges Dekodierungs-Framework ermöglicht eine genauere Dekodierung von Standard-neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungsmodellen sowie die Dekodierung in unlösbaren Modellen wie Schnittpunkten mehrerer verschiedener NMT-Modelle. Unsere empirischen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Dekodierungsrahmen effektiv ist und zu erheblichen Verbesserungen bei Übersetzungen führen kann, insbesondere in Situationen, in denen gierige Suche und Strahlsuche nicht möglich sind. Abschließend zeigen wir, wie die Technik sehr kompetitiv und komplementär zu Reranking ist.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë të re dekodimi për përkthimin e makinave nervore (NMT) bazuar në optimizimin e vazhdueshëm. Ne reformulojmë dekodimin, një problem diskret optimizmi, në një problem të vazhdueshëm, të tillë që optimizmi mund të bëjë përdorim të teknikave efektive të bazuara në gradient. Korniza jonë e fuqishme e dekodimit lejon për dekodim më të saktë për modelet standarde të përkthimit të makinave nervore si dhe për të mundësuar dekodimin në modele të pamundur, të tillë si ndërprerje e disa modeleve të ndryshme NMT. Rezultatet tona empirike tregojnë se kuadri ynë i dekodimit është i efektshëm dhe mund të çojë në përmirësime thelbësore në përkthimet, veçanërisht në situata ku kërkimi lakmues dhe kërkimi i rreze nuk janë të realizueshëm. Më në fund, ne tregojmë se si teknika është mjaft konkurruese me dhe komplementare me ripërlidhjen.', 'tr': 'NMT täzeden optimizasyna daýanýan bir nuýra maşynyň terjime edilmesi üçin bir taýdan kodleme metodasyny teklip edýäris. Biz ködleme, diskretli optimizasyň meselesini daşary bir mesele diýip reform edip, oňa optimizasyň etkinlik dégradyň tabanly tehnikalaryny ulanyp biler. Biziň güýçli dekoding frameworkymyz standart näyral maşynyň terjime modelleri üçin has dogry ködleme üçin , ýöne birnäçe farklı NMT modelleriniň kesişigine mümkin edip biljek modellerinde ködleme etmäge mümkin edýär. Biziň empirik netijelerimiz kodlemegimiz täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär we terjimelerde örän gowurak ýüze getirip biler, ýöne açylyk arama we çöplük gözlemegimiz mümkin däldir. Soňunda teknikiýanyň nähili döwletleşdirýändigini we ýene-täzeden daňlapdygyny görkezýäris.', 'am': 'በዘወትር optimisation የተመሳሳይ የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) የተመሳሳይ የኖሮውን የድክድ አቀፍ ማቀናጃ እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ቀድሞ፣ የተለየ ልማት ጉዳይ፣ ለዘወትር ጉዳይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የኃይለኛ አካባቢ የፊደል ክፍተታችን ለደካማዊ የናውሬል ሚስታን ትርጉም ሞዴላዎችን ለማሳመር ይችላል፤ እንዲሁም በተለያዩ የNMT ዓይነቶች ማቀናቀል በሚመስል በአካባቢ ዓይነቶች ውስጥ ማክበር ይችላል፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤታችን አካባቢ ፍሬማችን ፍሬማችንን እንዲያሳየው እና በተርጓሚዎች ላይ ትርጓሜዎችን እንዲያሳየው፣ ይልቁንም ገንዘብ መፈለግና ብረት መፈለጊያው የማይቻልበት ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ይችላል፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ ቴክኖክቲክ እንዴት እንደምትቃወም እና እንደተጨማሪም እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mbinu za kuboresha riwaya kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa (NMT) kwa kutumia matumaini yanayoendelea. We reformulate decoding, a discrete optimization problem, into a continuous problem, such that optimization can make use of efficient gradient-based techniques.  Miundombi yetu yenye nguvu ya kuandikwa inaruhusu kupunguza vifaa sahihi zaidi kwa mifano ya tafsiri ya mashine ya asili ya kawaida, pamoja na kuwezesha kupunguza kwa mifano inayofanana kama vile tofauti ya mifano mbalimbali ya NMT. Matokeo yetu yenye msimamo yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu wa kupunguza umekuwa na ufanisi, na unaweza kusababisha maendeleo makubwa katika tafsiri, hususani katika hali ambapo kutafuta uchunguzi wa uchumi na utafutaji wa umeme hauwezekani. Mwisho, tunaonyesha jinsi teknolojia inavyoshindwa sana na, na kwa upya, unaohusika.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe dekoding toegang vir neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) gebaseer op voortdurende optimalisasie. Ons reformeer dekodering, 'n diskrete optimalisasie probleem binne 'n voortdurende probleem, sodat optimalisasie kan gebruik van effektief gradientbaseerde teknike. Ons kragtige dekoding raamwerk laat toe vir meer presies dekoding vir standaard neurale masjien vertaling modele, en ook om te aktiveer dekoding in intrakbaar modele soos interseksie van verskillende NMT modele. Ons empiriese resultate wys dat ons dekoding raamwerk effektief is, en kan lei na substantiele verbeteringe in vertalings, spesiaal in situasies waar groet soek en trap soek nie moontlik is nie. Ons wys eindelik hoe die tekniks baie medelykbaar is en complementeer tot, terugkeer.", 'bn': 'আমরা নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের (এনএমটি) ভিত্তিক ক্রমাগত আশাবাদের ভিত্তিতে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য একটি নোভেল আমরা ক্রমাগত সমস্যার মধ্যে সংস্কার করি, বৈষম্যমূলক অপেক্ষার সমস্যা, যেমন অপেক্ষা করা যায় কার্যকর গ্রেডিয়েন্ড ভিত্তিক কৌশলের ব্যবহার করতে প আমাদের শক্তিশালী ডিকোডিং ফ্রেমের কাঠামো স্টাডার্ড নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেলের জন্য আরো সঠিক কোডিং প্রদান করতে পারে, এবং এছাড়াও বেশ কয়েকটি এনএম আমাদের সামর্থ্যের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ডিকোডিং ফ্রেম কার্যকর এবং অনুবাদের বিশেষ করে যেখানে লোভী অনুসন্ধান এবং সীমা অনুসন্ধানের কারণে  শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে প্রযুক্তিটি অত্যন্ত প্রতিযোগিতা এবং পুনরায় প্রতিযোগিতার জন্য।', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi pristup dekodiranja za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) na temelju kontinualne optimizacije. Mi reformiramo dekodiranje, diskretni optimizacijski problem u kontinuirani problem, tako da optimizacija može iskoristiti učinkovite tehnike na osnovu gradient a. Naš moćni okvir dekodiranja omogućava precizniji dekodiranje za standardne modele prevođenja neuralnih strojeva, kao i omogućavajući dekodiranje intraktivnih modela kao što su prekidanje nekoliko različitih NMT modela. Naši empirički rezultati pokazuju da je naš okvir za dekodiranje efikasan i može dovesti do značajnih poboljšanja prevoda, posebno u situacijama u kojima nije moguće pohlepno pretraživanje i pretraživanje zraka. Konačno, pokazujemo kako je tehnika vrlo konkurentna, i dodatno, preokrenuta.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový dekódovací přístup pro neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) založený na kontinuální optimalizaci. Přeformulujeme dekódování, diskrétní optimalizační problém, do kontinuálního problému, takže optimalizace může využít efektivní gradientové techniky. Náš výkonný dekódovací framework umožňuje přesnější dekódování standardních neuronových strojových překladů modelů, stejně jako umožňuje dekódování v nelehčných modelech, jako je průsečík několika různých NMT modelů. Naše empirické výsledky ukazují, že náš dekódovací rámec je efektivní a může vést k podstatnému zlepšení překladů, zejména v situacích, kdy není možné chamtivé vyhledávání a vyhledávání paprsků. Nakonec ukazujeme, jak je technika vysoce konkurenceschopná a doplňuje ji.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou enfocament de decodificació per a la traducció neural de màquines (NMT) basat en l'optimització continua. Reformulem la decodificació, un problem a discret d'optimització, en un problema continu, de tal manera que l'optimització pot utilitzar tècniques eficients basades en gradients. El nostre poderós marc de decodificació permet una decodificació més precisa de models de traducció neural normal, i permet la decodificació en models intractables com la intersecció de diversos models NMT. Els nostres resultats empírics mostren que el nostre marc de decodificació és eficaç i pot portar a millores substancials en les traduccions, especialment en situacions en les que la cerca avalladora i el raig no són viables. Finalment, demostram com la tècnica és altament competitiva amb i complementar-se a la repercussió.", 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կոդավորման մոտեցում նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համար, հիմնված շարունակական լավատեսության վրա: Մենք վերաձևավորում ենք կոդավորումը, խիստ օպտիմացման խնդիր, շարունակական խնդիր, որպեսզի օպտիմացման մեթոդները օգտագործեն արդյունավետ աճեցման հիմնված տեխնիկաներ: Մեր հզոր կոդավորման շրջանակը հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի ճշգրիտ կոդավորել ստանդարտ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելները, ինչպես նաև հնարավորություն տալ կոդավորումը անընդհատ մոդելներում, ինչպիսիք են NMT-ի տարբեր մոդե Մեր էմպրիկական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր կոդավորման շրջանակը արդյունավետ է և կարող է հանգեցնել թարգմանությունների նշանակալի բարելավմանը, հատկապես այն իրավիճակներում, երբ գաղտնի որոնումը և ճառագայթ որոնումը հնարավոր Finally, we show how the technique is highly competitive with, and complementary to, reranking.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uudse dekodeerimise lähenemisviisi neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) jaoks, mis põhineb pideval optimeerimisel. Me reformuleerime dekodeerimise, diskreetse optimeerimisprobleemi, pidevaks probleemiks, nii et optimeerimine võib kasutada tõhusaid gradientidel põhinevaid tehnikaid. Meie võimas dekodeerimisraamistik võimaldab täpsemat dekodeerimist standardsetele neuraalsete masintõlkemudelitele ning dekodeerimist mitmetes erinevates NMT mudelites. Meie empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et meie dekodeerimisraamistik on tõhus ja võib tuua kaasa märkimisväärseid parandusi tõlketes, eriti olukordades, kus ahne otsing ja kiirteotsing ei ole võimalik. Lõpuks näitame, kuidas tehnika on väga konkurentsivõimeline ja täiendab ümberpankimist.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme jatkuvaan optimointiin perustuvaa uutta neurokonekäännöksen dekoodaamista (NMT). Muodostamme diskreettisen optimointiongelman uudelleen jatkuvaksi ongelmaksi, jotta optimointi voi hyödyntää tehokkaita gradienttipohjaisia tekniikoita. Tehokas dekoodauskehyksemme mahdollistaa tarkemman dekoodauksen tavallisille neurokonekäännösmalleille sekä mahdollistaa dekoodauksen vaikeasti ratkaistavissa malleissa, kuten useiden erilaisten NMT-mallien risteyksessä. Empiiriset tutkimustuloksemme osoittavat, että dekoodauskehyksemme on tehokas ja voi johtaa merkittäviin parannuksiin käännöksissä, erityisesti tilanteissa, joissa ahne haku ja sädehaku eivät ole mahdollisia. Lopuksi näytämme, miten tekniikka on erittäin kilpailukykyinen ja täydentää uudelleenjärjestelyä.', 'az': 'Biz sürəkli optimizasiya dayanan nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün yeni kodlama metodlarını təklif edirik. Biz dekodini, diskretli optimizasyon problemini sürəkli bir problem ə dəyişdiririk ki, optimizasyon müvəffəqiyyətli gradient-based tehnikləri istifadə edə bilər. Bizim güclü dekoding framework ımız standart nöral mašin çeviri modellərinin daha doğru kodlamasına müvəffəq edər, həmçinin neçə-neçə NMT modellərin qarışmasına bənzər intraktibil modellərdə kodlamasına müvəffəq edər. Bizim impirik sonuçlarımız kodlama çarşığımızın faydalı olduğunu göstərir və təkrarların çox yaxşılıqlarına yol açar, özlərinə də dilli arama və ulduz araması mümkün deyil. Sonunda teknikin necə müqayisədə olduğunu göstəririk və yenidən təkrarlaşdırmağı ilə birləşdiririk.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake pawang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nyur manut (NMT). We Refuse decoding Kita nguasai sistem sing wis nggawe nggawe sistem sing bisa decoding dumateng manut anyar tentang karo sistem Neral, lan akeh iso nggawe dekojo akeh model sing dibenalke yo sampeyan intersection karo model NMT sampeyan. Rejalaké dhéwé empirhik menehi ngomong nik akeh operasi nggawe nguasah dumadhi, lan iso nggawe supaya supaya supaya supayano tarjamahan, supayano ing sakjane kapan kanggo ngelayakno karo pawartos surat sing ora bisa ngelarane. Sokake, awake dhewe ngerti piye teknik sing paling apik medhek, lan sumelan, iso mulai.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov pristop dekodiranja nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT), ki temelji na stalni optimizaciji. Dekodiranje, diskretni optimizacijski problem, preoblikujemo v neprekinjen problem, tako da optimizacija lahko uporabi učinkovite tehnike, ki temeljijo na gradientih. Naš zmogljiv dekodirni okvir omogoča natančnejše dekodiranje standardnih modelov nevronskega strojnega prevajanja in omogoča dekodiranje pri intraktibilnih modelih, kot je presečišče več različnih NMT modelov. Naši empirični rezultati kažejo, da je naš dekodirni okvir učinkovit in lahko vodi do bistvenih izboljšav pri prevodih, zlasti v situacijah, kjer pohlepno iskanje in iskanje z žarkom nista izvedljiva. Nazadnje pokažemo, kako je tehnika zelo konkurenčna s ponovnim razporejanjem in dopolnjuje.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים גישה חדשה לפענוח לתרגום מכונות עצביות (NMT) מבוססת על אופטימציה ממשיכה. אנו מחדשים את הפיתוח, בעיית אופטימיזציה דיסקרטית, לבעיה ממשיכה, כך שהאופטימיזציה יכולה להשתמש בטכניקות ביסודיות יעילות. המסגרת החזקה שלנו מאפשרת לפענוח מדויק יותר לדוגמנים סטנדרטיים של התרגום של מכונות עצביות, כמו גם לאפשר לפענוח בדוגמנים בלתי אפשריים, כמו פרצוף של מספר דוגמנים NMT שונים. התוצאות האמפריות שלנו מראות שמסגרת הפענוח שלנו יעילה, ויכולה להוביל לשיפורים משמעותיים בתרגשות, במיוחד במצבים שבו חיפוש חמדן וחיפוש קרן אינם אפשריים. סוף סוף, אנחנו מראים איך הטכניקה תחרותית במיוחד עם, ומתאימת, הקשר מחדש.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da wata matsayi na koda kodi wa fassarar mashine na neural (NMT) kan karatun da misumarin da ke daidai. Tuna sarrafa kodi, wata masĩfa mai gaura, cikin wata matabbata mai daidai, kamar wannan, an iya amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane masu fasan. Firmakonmu mai ƙarfi na kode kwamfyuta don ya yarda yin kodi wa misãlai masu fassarar kwamfyutan neural na daidaita, da kuma ana yarda yin kodi cikin misãlai masu cikin shirin da ke cikin shirin ayuka masu buƙata kamar intersection na wasu misãlai na NMT. MatamayinMu na nuna cewa firam na kodi yana da amfani, kuma yana iya ƙara wa masu kyautatawa cikin fassarar, hasa'a, a cikin muhimmada da ba za'a iya amfani da search na fatauci ba. Gani, za mu nũna jinin muhimmi na yi gauraya a ciki, kuma yana kamfata zuwa, ta samu.", 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་གཏོང་བཟོ་བ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། We reformulate decoding, a discrete optimization problem, into a continuous problem, such as optimization can make use of efficient gradient-based techniques. ང་བཅས་ཀྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་གིས་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞུང་གི་ནུས་པ་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཕྱོགས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ནི་སྐྱོན་རུང་བ་ཡིན་པ་དང་། ཚོར་ཡིག་གཏོང་ནང་ལ་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏ མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལག་རྩལ་བ་ཇི་ལྟར་རང་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Where is Misty? Interpreting Spatial Descriptors by Modeling Regions in Space', 'ar': 'اين ميستي؟ تفسير الواصفات المكانية عن طريق نمذجة المناطق في الفضاء', 'fr': "Où est Misty\xa0? Interprétation des descripteurs spatiaux en modélisant des régions dans l'espace", 'es': '¿Dónde está Misty? Interpretación de descriptores espaciales mediante el modelado de regiones en el espacio', 'pt': 'Onde está Misty? Interpretando Descritores Espaciais por Regiões de Modelagem no Espaço', 'ja': 'Mistyはどこですか？空間記述子を空間の領域をモデル化して解釈しています', 'zh': '米斯蒂何在? 因空建模以说符', 'ru': 'Где Туманный? Интерпретация пространственных дескрипторов путем моделирования областей в пространстве', 'ga': 'Cá bhfuil Misty? Tuairisceoirí Spáis a Léirmhíniú trí Réigiúin sa Spáis a Mhúnlú', 'hi': 'मिस्टी कहां है? अंतरिक्ष में मॉडलिंग क्षेत्रों द्वारा स्थानिक वर्णनकर्ताओं की व्याख्या करना', 'el': 'Πού είναι η Μίστυ; Ερμηνεία χωρικών περιγραφών με μοντελοποίηση περιφερειών στο διάστημα', 'ka': 'კყევ ვ მთჟრთ? სამუშაო რეგიონების მოდელირებით განსხვავება', 'hu': 'Hol van Misty? Térleírók értelmezése a térben lévő régiók modellezése szerint', 'it': "Dov'è Misty? Interpretare i descrittori spaziali per modellare le regioni nello spazio", 'kk': 'Мұсты қайда? Орындағы кеңістіктерді үлгілеу арқылы бос орын түрлендіру', 'lt': 'Kur Misti? Erdvinių aprašų aiškinimas pagal kosmoso regionų modeliavimą', 'mk': 'Каде е Мисти? Интерпретирање на просторни описи по моделирање на регионите во вселената', 'ms': 'Mana Misty? Interpreting Spatial Descriptors by Modeling Regions in Space', 'ml': 'മിസ്റ്റി എവിടെ? സ്പെയില്\u200d ഡിസ്പ്രിപ്റ്ററുകള്\u200d മോഡേലിങ് പ്രദേശങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Мисти хаана байна? Зөөн орон нутгийн тодорхойлогчид орон нутгийг загварчлах', 'no': 'Hvor er Misty? Interpreterer mellomromskildrar ved modellering av område i mellomrom', 'mt': 'Fejn huwa Misty? Interpretazzjoni tad-Deskritturi Spazjali skont il-Mudell tar-Reġjuni fl-Ispazju', 'pl': 'Gdzie jest Misty? Interpretacja opisów przestrzennych poprzez modelowanie regionów w przestrzeni kosmicznej', 'ro': 'Unde e Misty? Interpretarea descriptorilor spațiali după modelarea regiunilor din spațiu', 'sr': 'Gde je Misty? Interpretiranje svemirskih opisača modeliranjem regija u svemiru', 'si': 'මිස්ටි කොහෙද? ස්ථානය විස්තර කරුණාකරණය අභාවිතයේ ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Meeh Misty? Turjumista Spatial Descriptors by Modeling Regions in Space', 'sv': 'Var är Misty? Tolka rumsliga beskrivningar genom att modellera regioner i rymden', 'ur': 'مصیبت کہاں ہے؟ فضا میں مڈیلڈ کے ذریعے جگہ سپیل دکھانے والوں کو ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے', 'ta': 'மிஸ்டி எங்கே? இடைவெளி விவரிப்பாடுகளை மாதிரியான பிரிவுகளால் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'uz': 'Mist qayerda? Name', 'vi': 'Misty đâu? Giải thích về mô tả địa phương của Trung tâm', 'bg': 'Къде е Мисти? Интерпретиране на пространствените описатели чрез моделиране на региони в космоса', 'nl': "Waar is Misty? Interpretatie van ruimtelijke descriptoren door regio's in de ruimte te modelleren", 'da': 'Hvor er Misty? Fortolkning af geografiske beskrivelser efter modellering af regioner i rummet', 'hr': 'Gdje je Misty? Interpretiranje svemirskih opisača modeliranjem regija u svemiru', 'de': 'Wo ist Misty? Interpretation räumlicher Descriptoren durch Modellierung von Regionen im Raum', 'id': 'Dimana Misty? Interpreting Spatial Descriptors by Modeling Regions in Space', 'fa': 'ميستي کجاست؟ توضیح توضیح\u200cکنندگان فضایی با مدل\u200cسازی منطقه\u200cهای فضایی', 'tr': 'Butaý nirede? Seleň Girdir', 'sw': 'Wako wapi Misty? Kutafsiri maelezo ya Hispania na maeneo ya Modeling in Space', 'af': 'Waar is Misty? Interpreting Spasiele Beskrywings deur Modelering Regione in Spasie', 'sq': 'Ku është Misti? Përkthimi i përshkrimit të hapësirës nga modelimi i rajoneve në hapësirë', 'hy': 'Որտե՞ղ է Միստին: Տեղական նկարագրողների թարգմանումը տիեզերքում գտնվող տարածաշրջանների մոդելավորման միջոցով', 'az': 'Misty haradadır? Boşluq bölgelerini modelləşdirərək', 'am': 'Misty ወዴት ነው? መግለጫ', 'bn': 'মিস্টি কোথায়? Interpreting Spatial Descriptors by Modeling Regions in Space', 'bs': 'Gdje je Misty? Interpretiranje svemirskih opisača modeliranjem regija u svemiru', 'ca': 'On està Misty? Interpretar els descriptors espacials per modelar les regions espacials', 'ko': '미스티는 어디에 있습니까?공간의 영역 모델링을 통해 공간 묘사자를 해석하다', 'cs': 'Kde je Misty? Interpretace prostorových popisů modelováním regionů ve vesmíru', 'et': 'Kus Misty on? Ruumiliste kirjeldajate tõlgendamine kosmosepiirkondade modelleerimise abil', 'fi': 'Missä Misty on? Alueellisten kuvaajien tulkinta mallintamalla alueita avaruudessa', 'jv': 'Nèng endi Piye? politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'איפה מיסטי? פירוש תיאורים חלליים על ידי דגם אזורים בחלל', 'sk': 'Kje je Misty? Razlaga prostorskih opisovalcev z modeliranjem regij v vesolju', 'ha': 'Ina Misty? KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྐྱོ་ཤོན་དུས་མེད་དམ། བར་སྟོང་ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་རྣམ་པ་ལ་བར་སྟོང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a model for locating regions in space based on natural language descriptions. Starting with a 3D scene and a sentence, our model is able to associate words in the sentence with regions in the scene, interpret relations such as ‘on top of’ or ‘next to,’ and finally locate the region described in the sentence. All components form a single neural network that is trained end-to-end without prior knowledge of object segmentation. To evaluate our model, we construct and release a new dataset consisting of Minecraft scenes with crowdsourced natural language descriptions. We achieve a 32 % relative error reduction compared to a strong neural baseline.', 'pt': "Apresentamos um modelo para localizar regiões no espaço baseado em descrições em linguagem natural. Começando com uma cena 3D e uma frase, nosso modelo é capaz de associar palavras na frase com regiões na cena, interpretar relações como 'em cima de' ou 'ao lado' e, finalmente, localizar a região descrita na frase. Todos os componentes formam uma única rede neural que é treinada de ponta a ponta sem conhecimento prévio de segmentação de objetos. Para avaliar nosso modelo, construímos e lançamos um novo conjunto de dados que consiste em cenas do Minecraft com descrições em linguagem natural de crowdsourcing. Alcançamos uma redução de erro relativo de 32% em comparação com uma linha de base neural forte.", 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا لتحديد المناطق في الفضاء بناءً على أوصاف اللغة الطبيعية. بدءًا من مشهد ثلاثي الأبعاد وجملة ، فإن نموذجنا قادر على ربط الكلمات في الجملة بمناطق في المشهد ، وتفسير العلاقات مثل "فوق" أو "بجوار" ، وأخيراً تحديد المنطقة الموضحة في الجملة. تشكل جميع المكونات شبكة عصبية واحدة يتم تدريبها من البداية إلى النهاية دون معرفة مسبقة بتجزئة الكائن. لتقييم نموذجنا ، نقوم ببناء وإصدار مجموعة بيانات جديدة تتكون من مشاهد Minecraft مع أوصاف لغة طبيعية جماعية. نحقق انخفاضًا في الخطأ النسبي بنسبة 32٪ مقارنة بخط أساس عصبي قوي.', 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo para localizar regiones en el espacio basado en descripciones en lenguaje natural. Comenzando con una escena 3D y una oración, nuestro modelo es capaz de asociar palabras de la oración con regiones de la escena, interpretar relaciones como «encima de» o «junto a» y, finalmente, localizar la región descrita en la oración. Todos los componentes forman una única red neuronal que se entrena de extremo a extremo sin conocimientos previos de segmentación de objetos. Para evaluar nuestro modelo, construimos y publicamos un nuevo conjunto de datos que consiste en escenas de Minecraft con descripciones en lenguaje natural colaborativas. Logramos una reducción del error relativo del 32% en comparación con una línea de base neuronal fuerte.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle de localisation de régions dans l'espace basé sur des descriptions en langage naturel. En commençant par une scène 3D et une phrase, notre modèle est capable d'associer des mots de la phrase à des régions de la scène, d'interpréter des relations telles que «\xa0au-dessus de\xa0» ou «\xa0à côté\xa0», et enfin de localiser la région décrite dans la phrase. Tous les composants forment un réseau neuronal unique qui est entraîné de bout en bout sans connaissance préalable de la segmentation d'objets. Pour évaluer notre modèle, nous créons et publions un nouveau jeu de données composé de scènes Minecraft avec des descriptions en langage naturel issues du crowdsourcing. Nous obtenons une réduction de 32\xa0% de l'erreur relative par rapport à une base neuronale forte.", 'ja': '我々は、自然言語の記述に基づいて、空間内の領域を位置付けるためのモデルを提示する。3 Dシーンと文章から始めて、私たちのモデルは、文章内の単語をシーン内の領域に関連付けることができ、「の上」または「の隣」などの関係を解釈し、最後に文章に記載されている領域を見つけることができます。すべてのコンポーネントは、オブジェクトセグメンテーションの事前の知識なしにエンドツーエンドで訓練される単一のニューラルネットワークを形成する。当社のモデルを評価するために、クラウドソーシングされた自然言語の説明を含むMinecraftシーンからなる新しいデータセットを構築してリリースします。強力なニューラルベースラインと比較して、32 ％の相対的な誤差低減を達成します。', 'zh': '立一基于自然语言述于空中。 自3D、句始,模形能联句中单词,如"在顶"、"旁"之类,最后得句中所述。 凡组件成神经网络,神经网络习于端到端,无所先知。 为料我模样,我构出一个新数集,该数集由具众包自然语言描述的Minecraft场。 比之强大神经基线,32%之差减。', 'hi': "हम प्राकृतिक भाषा विवरण के आधार पर अंतरिक्ष में क्षेत्रों का पता लगाने के लिए एक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एक 3 डी दृश्य और एक वाक्य के साथ शुरू करते हुए, हमारा मॉडल दृश्य में क्षेत्रों के साथ वाक्य में शब्दों को जोड़ने में सक्षम है, 'के शीर्ष पर' या 'बगल में' जैसे संबंधों की व्याख्या करता है, और अंत में वाक्य में वर्णित क्षेत्र का पता लगाता है। सभी घटक एक एकल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क बनाते हैं जिसे ऑब्जेक्ट विभाजन के पूर्व ज्ञान के बिना एंड-टू-एंड प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। हमारे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, हम एक नए डेटासेट का निर्माण और रिलीज करते हैं जिसमें क्राउडसोर्स्ड प्राकृतिक भाषा विवरण के साथ Minecraft दृश्य शामिल हैं। हम एक मजबूत तंत्रिका आधार रेखा की तुलना में 32% सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी प्राप्त करते हैं।", 'ru': 'Представлена модель расположения регионов в пространстве, основанная на описаниях естественного языка. Начиная с 3D сцены и предложения, наша модель способна ассоциировать слова в предложении с регионами в сцене, интерпретировать отношения, такие как «на вершине» или «рядом с», и, наконец, найти регион, описанный в предложении. Все компоненты образуют единую нейронную сеть, которая обучается сквозным образом без предварительного знания сегментации объектов. Чтобы оценить нашу модель, мы создаем и выпускаем новый набор данных, состоящий из сцен Minecraft с краудсорсинговыми описаниями естественного языка. Мы достигаем относительного снижения погрешности на 32% по сравнению с сильной нейронной базовой линией.', 'ga': "Cuirimid múnla i láthair chun réigiúin a lonnú sa spás bunaithe ar chur síos ar theanga nádúrtha. Ag tosú le radharc 3D agus abairt, tá ár múnla in ann focail san abairt a cheangal le réigiúin sa radharc, léirmhíniú a dhéanamh ar ghaolmhaireachtaí mar `ar bharr' nó `in aice le,' agus ar deireadh an réigiún a bhfuil cur síos air san abairt a aimsiú. Cruthaíonn na comhpháirteanna go léir líonra néarúil amháin atá oilte ó cheann ceann go ceann gan eolas roimh ré ar dheighilt réad. Chun ár múnla a mheas, déanaimid agus scaoilimid tacar sonraí nua ina bhfuil radhairc Minecraft le cur síos ar theanga nádúrtha sluafhoinsithe. Bainimid amach laghdú earráide coibhneasta 32% i gcomparáid le bunlíne láidir neural.", 'ka': "ჩვენ მივიღეთ მოდელი, რომელიც სამყაროში რეგიონების მონაცემულებაში, რომელიც თავისუფალური ენის გამოსახულებაზე. სამჯარო სენის და სიტყვებით დავიწყებთ, ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია სიტყვებით სიტყვებით სენის რეგიონებით დაკავშიროთ, როგორც `ზემოთ' ან `ზემოთ' ან `დაკავშიროთ' და ბოლოს მონაცემულ ყველა კომპონენტები ერთი ნეიროლური ქსელის შექმნა, რომელიც საბოლოო დასრულებაში დასრულებულია საბოლოო დასრულებაში, საბოლოო წინა ჩვენი მოდელის განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ კონსტრუქტურებთ და გახსნა ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც მინიკრაპტის სენების შეფარდება, რომელიც მ ჩვენ მივიღეთ 32% რედაციური შეცდომების შემცირება, როგორც ძალიან ნეიროლური ფესტილის შემცირებით.", 'hu': 'Természetes nyelvleírások alapján bemutatjuk a térben lévő régiók meghatározásának modelljét. A 3D-s jelenettel és mondattal kezdve modellünk képes a mondatban szereplő szavakat összekapcsolni a jelenet régióival, értelmezni a kapcsolatokat, mint például "felül" vagy "mellette", és végül megtalálni a mondatban leírt régiót. Minden összetevő egyetlen neurális hálózatot alkot, amelyet végponttól végig képeznek, anélkül, hogy előzetes ismeretek lennének az objektum szegmentálásáról. Modellünk értékeléséhez új adatkészletet építünk és kiadunk, amely Minecraft jelenetekből áll, közösségi forrásokból álló természetes nyelvleírásokkal. 32%-os relatív hibacsökkenést érünk el az erős neurális alaphelyzethez képest.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο εντοπισμού περιοχών στο χώρο με βάση περιγραφές φυσικής γλώσσας. Ξεκινώντας από μια τρισδιάστατη σκηνή και μια πρόταση, το μοντέλο μας είναι σε θέση να συσχετίσει λέξεις στην πρόταση με περιοχές στη σκηνή, να ερμηνεύσει σχέσεις όπως "πάνω από" ή "δίπλα από", και τέλος να εντοπίσει την περιοχή που περιγράφεται στην πρόταση. Όλα τα συστατικά σχηματίζουν ένα ενιαίο νευρωνικό δίκτυο που εκπαιδεύεται εξ ολοκλήρου χωρίς προηγούμενη γνώση της τμηματοποίησης αντικειμένων. Για να αξιολογήσουμε το μοντέλο μας, κατασκευάζουμε και κυκλοφορούμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από σκηνές με περιγραφές φυσικής γλώσσας. Επιτυγχάνουμε μια 32% σχετική μείωση σφαλμάτων σε σύγκριση με μια ισχυρή νευρική βάση.', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello per localizzare le regioni nello spazio basato sulle descrizioni del linguaggio naturale. Partendo da una scena 3D e da una frase, il nostro modello è in grado di associare le parole della frase alle regioni della scena, interpretare relazioni come `sopra' o `accanto' e infine individuare la regione descritta nella frase. Tutti i componenti formano un'unica rete neurale che viene addestrata end-to-end senza previa conoscenza della segmentazione degli oggetti. Per valutare il nostro modello, costruiamo e rilasciamo un nuovo dataset composto da scene di Minecraft con descrizioni di linguaggio naturale crowdsourcing. Otteniamo una riduzione degli errori relativi del 32% rispetto a una base neurale forte.", 'kk': 'Біз табиғи тілдердің сипаттамасына негізделген орындарды табу үлгісін таңдаймыз. 3D сәйкестігінен бастап, үлгіміз сөздерді сәйкестіктің орналасуында, мәліметтерді "жоғары" немесе "келесі" секілді қатынастарды түсіндіруге болады, соңында сәйкестіктің аймағын табылады. Бүкіл компоненттер нысанның сегментациясын алдындағы білмеген соңғы- соңғы білмеген бір неврал желі құрылады. Өзіміздің моделімізді бағалау үшін, Minecraft сценарының жаңа деректер жиынын құру және шығару үшін көпшілікті табиғи тілінің сипаттамасы бар. Біз 32% салыстырмалы қатенің күшті невралдық негізгі сызығымен салыстырып келеді.', 'mk': 'Презентираме модел за лоцирање на регионите во вселената врз основа на природните описи на јазикот. Почнувајќи со 3Д сцена и реченица, нашиот модел е во состојба да ги поврзува зборовите во реченицата со регионите на сцената, да ги интерпретира односите како што се „ врз “ или „ до “, и конечно да го лоцира регионот опишан во реченицата. Сите компоненти формираат една нервна мрежа која е обучена крај до крај без претходно знаење за сегментацијата на објектите. За да го процениме нашиот модел, конструираме и објавуваме нов набор на податоци кој се состои од сцени на Minecraft со описи на природен јазик од публика. We achieve a 32% relative error reduction compared to a strong neural baseline.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame model į, pagal kurį kosmose esantys regionai būtų galima rasti remiantis gamtinių kalbų aprašymais. Pradedant iš 3D scenos ir sakinio, mūsų model is gali sujungti žodžius sakinyje su vietoje esančiais regionais, aiškinti santykius, pavyzdžiui, "viršuje" arba "šalia", ir galiausiai rasti sakinyje aprašytą region ą. Visos sudedamosios dalys sudaro vieną nervinį tinklą, kuris mokomas nuo vieno iki kito be išankstinės žinios apie objekto segmentaciją. To evaluate our model, we construct and release a new dataset consisting of Minecraft scenes with crowdsourced natural language descriptions.  Palyginti su stipria nervų baze, pasiekiame santykinį klaidų sumažėjimą 32 %.', 'ms': "Kami memperkenalkan model untuk mencari kawasan di luar angkasa berdasarkan deskripsi bahasa alam. Mulakan dengan adegan 3D dan kalimat, model kita boleh sekutukan perkataan dalam kalimat dengan kawasan di tempat kejadian, menerangkan hubungan seperti `di atas' atau `di sebelah', dan akhirnya mencari kawasan yang diterangkan dalam kalimat. Semua komponen membentuk rangkaian saraf tunggal yang dilatih akhir-akhir tanpa pengetahuan sebelumnya tentang segmen objek. Untuk menilai model kami, kami membina dan melepaskan set data baru yang terdiri dari adegan Minecraft dengan deskripsi bahasa alam yang banyak. We achieve a 32% relative error reduction compared to a strong neural baseline.", 'ml': "സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സ്പെയിലുള്ള സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താനുള്ള ഒര ഒരു മൂന്നാം സ്ഥലത്തും ഒരു വാക്കും കൊണ്ടും തുടങ്ങിയാല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന് വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്ഥലത്തുള്ള പ്രദേശങ്ങളില്\u200d പങ്കാളിയാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, മുകളില്\u200d 'മുകളില്\u200d' അല്ലെങ് വസ്തുവിന്റെ ഭാഗം അറിയാതെ പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200d നെറ് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുകയും മൈന്\u200dക്രാഫ്റ്റ് സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ശക്തമായ നെറുറല്\u200d ബെസ്ലൈനിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു 32% പ്രാധാനപ്പെട്ട തെറ്റിന്റെ കുറവ് നേട", 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw mudell biex jinstabu reġjuni fl-ispazju bbażat fuq deskrizzjonijiet naturali tal-lingwi. Filwaqt li jibda minn xena 3D u sentenza, il-mudell tagħna huwa kapaċi jassoċja kliem fis-sentenza mar-reġjuni fix-xena, jinterpreta relazzjonijiet bħal `fuq' jew `viċin', u fl-a ħħar mill-aħħar jinsab ir-reġjun deskritt fis-sentenza. Il-komponenti kollha jiffurmaw netwerk newrali wieħed li huwa mħarreġ minn tarf għal tarf mingħajr għarfien minn qabel dwar is-segmentazzjoni tal-oġġetti. Biex tivvaluta l-mudell tagħna, nibnu u nirrilaxxaw sett ġdid ta’ dejta li jikkonsisti f’xeni Minecraft b’deskrizzjonijiet tal-lingwi naturali crowdsourced. Aħna nilħqu tnaqqis relattiv ta’ 32% ta’ żbalji meta mqabbel ma’ linja bażi newrali b’saħħitha.", 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model lokalizacji regionów w przestrzeni oparty na opisach języka naturalnego. Zaczynając od sceny 3D i zdania, nasz model jest w stanie skojarzyć słowa w zdaniu z regionami sceny, interpretować relacje takie jak `na górze" lub `obok\', a na koniec zlokalizować region opisany w zdaniu. Wszystkie komponenty tworzą pojedynczą sieć neuronową, która jest trenowana od końca do końca bez wcześniejszej wiedzy na temat segmentacji obiektów. Aby ocenić nasz model, budujemy i wydajemy nowy zestaw danych składający się ze scen Minecraft z opisami języka naturalnego społecznościowego. Osiągamy 32% względną redukcję błędów w porównaniu do silnej bazy neuronowej.', 'ro': "Prezentăm un model pentru localizarea regiunilor în spațiu bazat pe descrieri de limbaj natural. Pornind de la o scenă 3D și o propoziție, modelul nostru este capabil să asocieze cuvintele din propoziție cu regiunile din scenă, să interpreteze relații precum `deasupra' sau `alături' și, în cele din urmă, să localizeze regiunea descrisă în propoziție. Toate componentele formează o singură rețea neurală care este instruită end-to-end fără cunoaștere prealabilă a segmentării obiectelor. Pentru a evalua modelul nostru, construim și lansăm un nou set de date format din scene Minecraft cu descrieri de limbaj natural crowdsourcing. Realizăm o reducere relativă a erorilor de 32% comparativ cu o bază neuronală puternică.", 'mn': 'Бид байгалийн хэл тодорхойлолт дээр тодорхойлж буй газрын хэсгийг олох загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. 3D хувилбараас эхлэхэд бидний загвар нь үгсийг хувилбар дээрх эсвэл хажууд нь холбогдох боломжтой болно. Бүх элементүүд нь объект хэмжээсүүдийг өмнө мэдэхгүй нэг мэдрэлийн төгсгөлд сургалтын нэг мэдрэлийн сүлжээг үүсгэдэг. Өөрсдийн загварыг үнэлэхийн тулд бид "Minecraft" хэлний тодорхойлолт бүрдсэн шинэ өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж, гаргаж өгдөг. Бид хүчтэй мэдрэлийн суурь шулуунтай харьцуулахад 32% харьцуулсан алдаа багасгаж чадна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit modell for å finna område i mellomrom basert på naturspråkkskildringar. Startar med eit 3D-scene og eit setning, er modellen vårt i stand til å assosiera ord i setninga med område i scenen, tolka forholdet som « øvre på » eller « neste til », og finn til slutt området som er beskriven i setninga. Alle komponentar lagar eit enkelt neuralnettverk som er trent til slutt til slutt utan førre kjenning av objektsegmentasjon. For å evaluera modellen vårt, konstruerer vi og løyser ei ny datasett som inneheld Minecraft-scenar med forskjellige naturskildringar. Vi oppnår ei relativt feilreduksjon på 32% sammenlignet med ein sterk neural baseline.', 'si': "අපි ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව විස්තරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා. 3D ස්ථානයක් සහ වාක්යෙක් සමග පටන් ගන්න, අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක වචන ස්ථානයේ වචන සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන්, සම්බන්ධ විදිහට `on the upper of' or `Next to',  ඔක්කොම අංකයෙන් එකම න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙක් හොයාගන්නවා ඒක අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය අපේ මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි අලුත් දත්ත සැට් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා මයින්ක්\u200dරාප්ට් ස්ථානයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විශ අපිට සම්බන්ධ වැරදි 32% විශේෂ වැරදි අඩංගුවක් ලැබෙනවා.", 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa tusaale ahaan goobaha ku yaala meel lagu qoro qoraalka afka asalka ah. Markii aad bilowdo muuqasho 3D ah iyo hal kali ah, modellkayagu wuxuu ku xiriiri karaa hadal ku saabsan qeybta ay leeyihiin meelaha lagu arko, turjumaan xiriirka sida `kor' ama `xigta ka xigta', ugudambaystana wuxuu heli karaa qeybta lagu qoray. Heeganka oo dhammu waxay sameeyaan shabakadda neurada oo keliya, taasoo lagu tababaray dhammaadka ugu dhammaadka dhammaadka dhammaadka, iyadoon aqoon ka horeysa qeybinta alaabta. Si aan u qiimeyno Tusaalkayaga, waxaynu dhisaynaa oo u dirnaa sawir cusub oo ka mid ah Minecraft sawir afkiisa asalka ah. Waxaynu gaadhnaa hal boqolkiiba oo u dhow khalad la'aanta oo la barbardhigay sameynta daryeelka neurada.", 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model za lokaciju regiona u svemiru na temelju prirodnog jezika opisa. Počevši sa 3D scenom i rečenicom, naš model može povezati reči u rečenici sa regijama na sceni, tumačiti odnose poput "na vrhu" ili "na blizini", i konačno naći regiju opisanu u rečenici. Svi komponenti formiraju jedinu neuralnu mrežu koja je obučena do kraja bez prethodnog znanja o segmentaciji objekata. Da bi procenili naš model, izgradili smo i oslobodili novi set podataka koji se sastoji od scena Minecraft sa opisima prirodnog jezika. Postižemo relativno smanjenje greške od 32% u usporedbi sa jakom neuralnom početnom linijom.', 'ta': "இயல்பான மொழி விவரிப்புகளை அடிப்படையில் நாம் வெளியில் உள்ள இடங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு மாதிரியை கா முப்பரிமாண காட்சி மற்றும் வாக்கியத்தில் துவங்கும்போது, எங்கள் மாதிரி வாக்கியத்தில் வார்த்தைகளை இணைக்க முடியும், பார்வையில் 'மேல்' அல்லது 'அடுத்துள்ளத அனைத்து பொருள்களும் பொருள் பிரிவை முன்னால் அறியாமல் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட முடிவு முடிவுக்கு ஒரு புதிய பிணை எங்கள் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிட, நாங்கள் மைன்க்ராப்ட் காட்சிகளில் உள்ள புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கி வெளியிடுகிறோம் மக்கள்  நாம் ஒரு வலிமையான நெருக்குவரியை ஒப்பிட்டு 32% சார்ந்த பிழை குறைக்கிறது.", 'sv': "Vi presenterar en modell för lokalisering av regioner i rymden baserad på naturliga språkbeskrivningar. Med utgångspunkt i en 3D-scen och en mening kan vår modell associera ord i meningen med regioner i scenen, tolka relationer som `ovanpå' eller `bredvid,' och slutligen lokalisera den region som beskrivs i meningen. Alla komponenter bildar ett enda neuralt nätverk som utbildas end-to-end utan förkunskaper om objektsegmentering. För att utvärdera vår modell bygger och släpper vi ett nytt dataset bestående av Minecraft scener med crowdsourcing naturliga språkbeskrivningar. Vi uppnår en relativ felreduktion på 32% jämfört med en stark neural baslinje.", 'ur': 'ہم نے جگہ کے منطقه کو جگہ کے مطابق طبیعی زبان کی توصیف پر بنیاد رکھا ہے ایک مدل پیش کیا ہے 3D صحنه اور ایک جماعت سے شروع ہوا، ہماری مدل کلمات کو صحنه کے منطقه میں شروع کر سکتا ہے، اس طرح رابطہ کا تفسیر کرسکتا ہے جیسے "اوپر" یا "اوپر" یا "اوپر" اور آخر میں کلمات کے منطقه کو پیدا کرسکتا ہے. سارے رقموں ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک بناتے ہیں جس کو اگلوں کی جگہ سیگنٹ کے علم کے بغیر آخر-to-end کی تعلیم دی جاتی ہے. ہمارے مدل کا ارزش کرنا، ہم نے ایک نئی ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا اور آزاد کردیا جو مائن کریٹ سٹن کے سامنے ہے، جو جماعت کی طبیعی زبان کی تعریف کے ساتھ ہے. ہم ایک مضبوط نیورل بنیس لین کے مقابلہ میں 32% مقابلہ خطا کم کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz nafaqat tilning taʼriflarini asosida bo'lgan joyda joylashtirish uchun modelni hozir qilamiz. 3D uslubi va bir so'z bilan boshlanadi, modelimizning bir joyida so'zlarni birlashtirish mumkin, huddi `yuqorida' yoki `keyingi' kabi murakkablarni tarjima qilishi mumkin, va oxirida gapiradigan maydonni aniqlash mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Biz modelimizni qiymatish uchun, biz Mencraft sceneslaridan yangi maʼlumotlar satrini yaratib chiqaramiz va bir jamoatlar asl tili taʼminlovchisi bilan bog'liq maʼlumot tizimini chiqaramiz. Biz murakkab neyrolik asosiy bazasini kamaytirish bilan 32% qisqarli xato kamaytirish imkoniyatini bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình để xác định các vùng trong không gian dựa trên mô tả ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Bắt đầu bằng một cảnh 3D và một câu, mô hình của chúng ta có thể kết hợp từ trong câu với các vùng ở hiện trường, giải thích các quan hệ như "trên đỉnh" hoặc "cạnh" và cuối cùng xác định vùng được mô tả trong câu. Tất cả các thành phần tạo thành một mạng thần kinh duy nhất được huấn luyện kết thúc mà không hề biết phân chia đối tượng. Để đánh giá mô hình của chúng tôi, chúng tôi xây dựng và công bố một bộ dữ liệu mới, gồm các cảnh Minecraft với mô tả ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Chúng ta đạt được độ giảm lỗi tương đối cao so với mức trung tâm thần kinh mạnh.', 'bg': 'Представяме модел за локализиране на региони в пространството въз основа на описания на естествения език. Започвайки с 3сцена и изречение, нашият модел е в състояние да свързва думите в изречението с регионите в сцената, да интерпретира отношения като "отгоре" или "до" и накрая да намери региона, описан в изречението. Всички компоненти формират една невронна мрежа, която се обучава от край до край без предварителни познания за сегментацията на обектите. За да оценим нашия модел, ние конструираме и пускаме нов набор от данни, състоящ се от сцени на Майнкрафт с описания на естествения език. Ние постигаме 32% относително намаляване на грешките в сравнение със силната невронна база.', 'da': "Vi præsenterer en model for lokalisering af regioner i rummet baseret på naturlige sprogbeskrivelser. Startende med en 3D scene og en sætning, vores model er i stand til at associere ord i sætningen med områder i scenen, fortolke relationer som `oven på' eller `ved siden af,' og endelig lokalisere området beskrevet i sætningen. Alle komponenter danner et enkelt neuralt netværk, der trænes end-to-end uden forudgående kendskab til objektsegmentering. For at evaluere vores model konstruerer og frigiver vi et nyt datasæt bestående af Minecraft scener med crowdsourcerede natursprogbeskrivelser. Vi opnår en relativ fejlreduktion på 32% sammenlignet med en stærk neural baseline.", 'nl': "We presenteren een model voor het lokaliseren van regio's in de ruimte op basis van natuurlijke taalbeschrijvingen. Beginnend met een 3D scène en een zin, is ons model in staat om woorden in de zin te associëren met gebieden in de scène, relaties te interpreteren zoals 'bovenop' of 'naast', en uiteindelijk het gebied te lokaliseren dat in de zin wordt beschreven. Alle componenten vormen een enkel neuraal netwerk dat end-to-end wordt getraind zonder voorafgaande kennis van objectsegmentatie. Om ons model te evalueren, bouwen en publiceren we een nieuwe dataset bestaande uit Minecraft scènes met crowdsourcing natuurlijke taalbeschrijvingen. We bereiken een 32% relatieve foutreductie vergeleken met een sterke neurale baseline.", 'de': "Wir präsentieren ein Modell zur Ortung von Regionen im Raum basierend auf natursprachlichen Beschreibungen. Ausgehend von einer 3D-Szene und einem Satz ist unser Modell in der Lage, Wörter im Satz mit Regionen in der Szene zu verknüpfen, Beziehungen wie `oben auf' oder `neben' zu' zu interpretieren und schließlich den im Satz beschriebenen Bereich zu lokalisieren. Alle Komponenten bilden ein einziges neuronales Netzwerk, das ohne Vorkenntnisse der Objektsegmentierung durchgängig trainiert wird. Um unser Modell zu evaluieren, konstruieren und veröffentlichen wir einen neuen Datensatz bestehend aus Minecraft-Szenen mit Crowdsourcing-Beschreibungen in natürlicher Sprache. Wir erreichen eine 32% relative Fehlerreduktion im Vergleich zu einer starken neuronalen Baseline.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model lokacije regija u svemiru na temelju opisa prirodnog jezika. Počevši s 3D scenom i rečenicom, naš model može povezati riječi u rečenici sa regijama na mjestu scene, tumačiti odnose poput "na vrhu" ili "na blizini", i konačno pronaći regiju opisanu u rečenici. Svi komponenti formiraju jedinu neuralnu mrežu koja je obučena do kraja bez prethodnog znanja o segmentaciji objekata. Da bi procijenili naš model, izgradili smo i oslobodili novi komplet podataka koji se sastoji od scena Minecraft-a s objavljenim prirodnim jezikom. Postigli smo relativno smanjenje greške od 32% u usporedbi s jakom neuralnom početnom linijom.', 'id': "Kami mempersembahkan model untuk menemukan daerah di luar angkasa berdasarkan deskripsi bahasa alam. Mulai dengan adegan 3D dan kalimat, model kami mampu mengassokasikan kata-kata dalam kalimat dengan daerah di tempat kejadian, menerjemahkan hubungan seperti `di atas' atau `di sebelah', dan akhirnya menemukan daerah yang diterangkan dalam kalimat. Semua komponen membentuk jaringan saraf tunggal yang dilatih dari akhir ke akhir tanpa pengetahuan sebelumnya tentang segmentasi objek. Untuk mengevaluasi model kami, kami membangun dan melepaskan set data baru yang terdiri dari adegan Minecraft dengan deskripsi bahasa alam yang banyak. Kita mencapai pengurangan kesalahan relatif 32% dibandingkan dengan dasar saraf yang kuat.", 'tr': "Biz tebigy dil waspyna daýanýan bölgeleri ýerleşdirmek üçin bir nusga görkeýäris. 3-nji sahypa we sözlem bilen başlanýand a, biziň modelimiz sözlerimizi sahypa bölgeler bilen syýalaşdyryp biler, şol ýaly `iň üstünde' ýa `iň üstünde' ýa-da syýalany terjime edip biler we soňunda sözlemde tassyklanan bölegi ýerine ýetirebilir. Hemme zatlar zadyň segmentasiýasyny öňünden bilmeden bir nuýral a ňladyr. Biziň nusgymyzy çykmak üçin, Minecraft sahypalarynyň köpüsi syýahat edilen tebigy diller bilen taýýarlanýar we çykarýarys. Biz güçlü nöral tabanlığa karşılaştığında %32 oranlı hata düşürmesine ulaştık.", 'fa': 'ما یک مدل برای پیدا کردن منطقه در فضا را بر اساس توصیف زبان طبیعی نشان می دهیم. با یک صحنه 3D و یک جمله شروع می\u200cکنیم، مدل ما می\u200cتواند کلمات را در مجله با منطقه\u200cهای صحنه، تعبیر رابطه\u200cهای مانند «بالا» یا «کنار» و بالاخره منطقه\u200cای را در مجله توصیف می\u200cکند. تمام بخش\u200cها یک شبکه عصبی را شکل می\u200cدهند که بدون دانش قبلی از جدایی\u200cکردن اشیاء آموزش داده می\u200cشود. برای ارزیابی مدل ما، یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید را ساختیم و آزاد می کنیم که از صحنه\u200cهای ماینکرافت با توضیح زبان طبیعی از جمعیت منبع شده است. ما کمتر خطای نسبت به 32 درصد در مقایسه با یک پایگاه عصبی قوی رسیدیم.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mfano wa maeneo ya maeneo ya angani kwa kutumia maelezo ya lugha ya asili. Akianza na eneo la 3D na hukumu, model yetu inaweza kushirikiana na maneno katika hukumu na maeneo ya eneo hilo, tafsiri ya mahusiano kama vile ‘juu’ au ‘karibu’ na hatimaye kuiweka eneo hilo lililoelezwa kwenye hukumu hiyo. Vifaa vyote vinaweza kutengeneza mtandao mmoja wa neura ambao umefundishwa mwisho wa mwisho bila kuelewa sehemu ya vitu. Ili kutathmini mifano yetu, tunajenga na kuachia seti mpya ya data yenye maeneo ya Minecraft yenye maelezo ya lugha asili ya watu. Tunaweza kufikia kupunguza kwa asilimia 32 ya makosa yanayohusiana na msingi mkali wa neura.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n model vir die ligging van regione in spasie gebaseer op natuurlike taal beskrywings. Beginne met 'n 3D scene en 'n seting, is ons model in staat om woorde in die seting te assosieer met regione in die scene, verduidelike verwantings soos `op bo van' of `volgende aan,' en eindelik die region in die seting te vind. Alle komponente vorm 'n enkele neurale netwerk wat is onderwerp end- to- end sonder voorheen kennis van objek segmentasie. Om ons model te evalueer, het ons 'n nuwe datastel opgesluit en opgesluit wat bestaan van Minecraft-scene met skare gevorderde natuurlike taal beskrywings. Ons bereik 'n 32% relatiewe fout reduksie vergelyk met 'n sterk neurale basislien.", 'sq': "Ne paraqesim një model për gjetjen e rajoneve në hapësirë bazuar në përshkrimin natyror të gjuhës. Duke filluar me një skenë 3D dhe një frazë, modeli ynë është në gjendje të bashkojë fjalët në frazë me rajonet në skenë, të interpretojë marrëdhënie të tilla si `mbi' ose `pranë', dhe më në fund të gjejë rajonin e përshkruar në frazë. Të gjitha komponentet formojnë një rrjet të vetëm nervor që është trajnuar nga fundi në fund pa njohuri të mëparshme për segmentimin e objekteve. Për të vlerësuar modelin tonë, ne ndërtojmë dhe lëshojmë një set të ri të dhënash që përbëhet nga skenat e Minecraft me përshkrime të shumta të gjuhës natyrore. Ne arrijmë një reduktim të gabimeve relativë 32% krahasuar me një bazë të fortë nervore.", 'am': 'ባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም በአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ መግለጫ ውስጥ ያሉትን የአካባቢ ቦታዎችን ለማግኘት ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በ3D እውቀት እና ፍርድ መጀመሪያ፣ ሞዴላያችን በተስማማው ቦታዎች ውስጥ ቃላትን ማጋራት ይችላል፣ ‘በላይ’ ወይም ’በአጠጋው’ የሚል ግንኙነት እና በፍርዱ ውስጥ የተዘጋጀውን ክልል ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ አካባቢው ክፍል ሳያውቅ የተማረከ የነጥብ መረብ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ምሳሌያችንን ለማስተዋል፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ጽሑፎችን የሜንካርፍ ስታይኖችን የሚቆጠሩ አዲስ ዳታተር ሰርሰናል፡፡ ከጠንካራ የኔural baseline ጋር 32 በመቶ የስህተት አካሄድን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տիեզերքում գտնվող տարածքների գտնման մոդել, որը հիմնված է բնական լեզվի նկարագրությունների վրա: Սկսելով 3D տեսարանից և նախադասությամբ, մեր մոդելը կարողանում է ասոցավորել նախադասության բառերը տեսարանի տարածքների հետ, թարգմանել հարաբերությունները, ինչպիսիք են `վերևում' կամ `կողքին' և վերջապես գտնել նախադասում նկարագրված տարածքը: Բոլոր բաղադրիչները կառուցում են մեկ նյարդային ցանց, որը վերջ-վերջ սովորեցված է առանց նախկինում իմանալու օբյեկտի սեգրեգացիայի մասին: To evaluate our model, we construct and release a new dataset consisting of Minecraft scenes with crowdsourced natural language descriptions.  Մենք հասնում ենք 32 տոկոսով համեմատական սխալների նվազում համեմատած ուժեղ նյարդային հիմքի հետ:", 'az': "Biz təbiətli dil təfsirələrinə dayanan alan bölgeleri təyin etmək üçün modeli göstəririk. 3D sahəsindən başlamaq və cümlədən başlamaq, modellərimiz sözləri sahədə bölümlərlə birləşdirə bilər, ''yuxarı' və ya 'yanında' kimi ilişkiləri təfsil edə bilər və sonunda sözlərdə təfsil edilən bölümünü keçə bilər. Bütün komponentlər, əvvəlcə objekt segmentasyonu bilmədən təhsil edilən bir nöral a ğ formasıdır. Modelimizi değerləşdirmək üçün, Minecraft sahələrindən olan yeni bir veri qurmaq və yayınlamaq üçün qüvvətli təbiətli dil tanımlamaları ilə istifadə edirik. Biz qüvvətli nöral səhifələri ilə müqayisədə 32%-li xəta düşürməsini başa düşürük.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model lokacije regiona u svemiru na temelju opisa prirodnog jezika. Počevši s 3D scenom i rečenicom, naš model može povezati riječi u rečenici sa regijama na sceni, tumačiti odnose poput "na vrhu" ili "na blizini", i konačno locirati regiju opisanu u rečenici. Svi komponenti formiraju jedinu neuralnu mrežu koja je obučena do kraja bez prethodnog znanja o segmentaciji objekata. Da bi procenili naš model, izgradili smo i oslobodili novi set podataka koji se sastoji od scena Minecraft sa opisima prirodnog jezika. Postigli smo relativno smanjenje greške od 32% u usporedbi sa jakom neuralnom početnom linijom.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বর্ণনা ভিত্তিক ভাষায় স্থানে অবস্থান করার জন্য একটি মডেল উপস্থাপন করি। ত্রিমাত্রিক দৃশ্য এবং একটি বাক্য দিয়ে শুরু করা শুরু করে, আমাদের মডেল এই দৃশ্যের অঞ্চলের সাথে শব্দের সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে, যেমন ‘উপরে’ অথবা ‘পাশের পাশের’ সম্পর্কের মত সকল উপাদান একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক তৈরি করে যা বস্তুর বিভাগের জ্ঞান ছাড়া প্রশিক্ষিত শেষ পর্যন্ত শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষা  আমাদের মডেলের মুল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট নির্মাণ করি এবং মাইন্ক্রাফটের দৃশ্যের মাধ্যমে একটি নতুন ডাটা সেট প্রকাশ কর আমরা একটি শক্তিশালী নিউরেল বেসাইলের তুলনায় ৩২% আত্মিক ভুল কমিয়ে নেই।', 'ko': "우리는 자연 언어 묘사를 바탕으로 하는 공간 영역 포지셔닝 모델을 제시했다.한 3D 장면과 한 문장부터 우리의 모델은 문장의 단어를 장면의 구역과 연결시켜'위에서'나'옆에서'와 같은 관계를 설명하고 마지막으로 문장에서 묘사한 구역을 찾을 수 있다.모든 구성 요소는 하나의 단일한 신경 네트워크를 구성하는데 이 네트워크는 끝에서 끝까지의 훈련을 거쳐 대상 분할의 선험 지식을 필요로 하지 않는다.모델을 평가하기 위해 Minecraft 장면과 패키지 자연 언어 설명으로 구성된 새로운 데이터 집합을 구축하고 발표했습니다.강력한 신경 기선에 비해 우리는 32%의 상대적인 오차를 낮추었다.", 'ca': "Presentam un model per localitzar les regions a l'espai basat en descripcions de llenguatges naturals. Començant amb una escena 3D i una frase, el nostre model és capaç d'associar paraules en la frase amb les regions de l'escena, interpretar relacions com `al damunt' o `al costat', i finalment localitzar la regió descrita en la frase. All components form a single neural network that is trained end-to-end without prior knowledge of object segmentation.  Per avaluar el nostre model, construïm i publicam un nou conjunt de dades que consisteix en escenes de Minecraft amb descripcions de llenguatges naturals d'una multitud. Obtenim una reducció d'errors relativs del 32% comparada amb una base neural forta.", 'et': 'Esitame looduskeele kirjeldustel põhineva mudeli ruumi piirkondade asustamiseks. Alustades 3D stseenist ja lausest, suudab meie mudel seostada lauses olevaid sõnu stseeni piirkondadega, tõlgendada seoseid nagu "peal" või "kõrval" ja lõpuks leida lauses kirjeldatud piirkonna. Kõik komponendid moodustavad ühe närvivõrgu, mis on koolitatud otsast otsa ilma eelneva teadmata objekti segmenteerimisest. Oma mudeli hindamiseks ehitame ja avaldame uue andmekogumi, mis koosneb Minecrafti stseenidest koos ühiste looduskeelte kirjeldustega. Me saavutame 32% suhtelise vea vähenemise võrreldes tugeva närvibaasiga.', 'cs': "Představujeme model lokalizace regionů v prostoru na základě popisů přirozeného jazyka. Počínaje 3D scénou a větou, náš model je schopen spojit slova ve větě s oblastmi ve scéně, interpretovat vztahy jako `nad' nebo `vedle', a nakonec lokalizovat oblast popsanou ve větě. Všechny komponenty tvoří jednu neuronovou síť, která je trénována end-to-end bez předchozích znalostí segmentace objektů. Pro zhodnocení našeho modelu vytvoříme a uvolníme novou datovou sadu sestávající z Minecraft scén s crowdsourcingovými popisy přirozeného jazyka. Dosahujeme 32% relativní snížení chyb ve srovnání se silnou neuronovou základnou.", 'fi': 'Esitämme mallin alueiden paikantamiseen avaruudessa luonnollisen kielen kuvausten perusteella. 3D-kohtauksesta ja lauseesta alkaen mallimme pystyy yhdistämään lauseen sanat kohtauksen alueisiin, tulkitsemaan suhteita, kuten "päällä" tai "vieressä", ja lopulta paikantamaan lauseessa kuvatun alueen. Kaikki komponentit muodostavat yhden neuroverkon, joka on koulutettu päästä päähän ilman ennakkotietoa kohteen segmentoinnista. Mallin arvioimiseksi rakennamme ja julkaisemme uuden aineiston, joka koostuu Minecraft-kohtauksista, joissa on joukkolähteitä luonnollisen kielen kuvauksia. Saamme aikaan 32% suhteellisen virhevähennyksen verrattuna vahvaan hermolähtötilanteeseen.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל לאתר אזורים בחלל מבוסס על תיאור שפה טבעי. בהתחלה עם סצנה 3D ומשפט, הדוגמנית שלנו מסוגלת לארגן מילים במשפט עם אזורים בסצנה, לפרש יחסים כמו "מעל" או "ליד", ולבסוף לאתר את האזור התואר במשפט. כל המרכיבים יוצרים רשת עצבית אחת שאומנת סוף-סוף ללא ידע קודם על סגמנציה של אובייקטים. כדי להעריך את המודל שלנו, אנו בונים ולשחרר קבוצת נתונים חדשה שמכילה מסצנות Minecraft עם תיאור שפה טבעית מקורקע. אנחנו משיגים 32% פחית טעויות יחסית בהשוואה לבסיס עצבי חזק.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk model kanggo nggawe kayané kapan kanggo tukang tarjamahan Mulai karo scèn 3 lan watêr, model sing iso nggawe kelalakno karo winih sing nêmêr, ditambah karo perkarahaan sing dikarepaké "top" atawa "next to", lan nganggo perkarahaan anyar sênêmêr. Laptop" and "Desktop Rasané awak dhéwé nggawe model sing dibenakake lan mbukaké perusahaan dataset sing katêpakan karo perusahaan Mine Awakdhéwé éngak dhéwé éngak dhéwé éntuk 32% nggawe gerarané karo nggawe gerakan seneng pisan Neral.', 'sk': "Predstavljamo model lokacije regij v prostoru, ki temelji na opisih naravnega jezika. Naš model lahko začne s 3D prizorom in stavkom povezuje besede v stavku z regijami v prizoru, interpretira odnose, kot je ‚na vrhu' ali ‚zraven' in končno poišče regijo, opisano v stavku. Vse komponente tvorijo eno nevronsko omrežje, ki je usposobljeno od konca do konca brez predhodnega znanja segmentacije objektov. Za oceno našega modela zgradimo in objavljamo nov nabor podatkov, sestavljen iz Minecraft scen z množičnimi opisi naravnega jezika. Dosežemo 32% relativno zmanjšanje napak v primerjavi z močnim živčnim izhodiščem.", 'ha': "Munã samun wani misali da ke samun wurãre cikin fili a kan bakin misalin harshe na asali. Ki fara da wani kwanan na 3 da wata kalma, shirinmu yana iya iya haɗa magana cikin gefen da regions cikin kwanan, kuma yana iya fassarar da danganta kamar `a kan sama' ko `na ƙarfe', kuma yana ƙarami a lokacin da aka faɗa da shi. All components form a single neural network that is trained end-to-end without prior knowledge of object segmentation.  To, domin ka ƙaddara shirin ayukanmu, muna samun kuma mu saka wani danne na daban da ke cikin zanen Mincraft wanda ke samun da misãlai na lugha na farko. Munã sami rabon ɓata a dangane rasmi na mutane da sami'a mai ƙarfi wajen neural.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ཅིག་བསམ་བྱས་ཡོད། མཇུག་དུ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེ་གཞི་འདི་དང་ཚིག་དག་ཚན་ཅིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཡིག་ཅིག་གནད་ཁོངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་སྔོན་གྱིས་དངོས་པོ་སྣང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་གཅིག་པ་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་དང་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་མཐོང་བའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་སྡུད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Continuous Representation of Location for Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology using Mixture Density Networks', 'ar': 'التمثيل المستمر للموقع الجغرافي وعلم اللهجات المعجمي باستخدام شبكات الكثافة المختلطة', 'es': 'Representación continua de la ubicación para geolocalización y dialectología léxica mediante redes de densidad de mezcla', 'pt': 'Representação Contínua de Localização para Geolocalização e Dialetologia Lexical usando Redes de Densidade de Mistura', 'fr': "Représentation continue de la localisation pour la géolocalisation et la dialectologie lexicale à l'aide de réseaux de densité de mélange", 'ja': 'ミクスチャー密度ネットワークを使用したジオロケーションと語彙方言学のための位置の連続表現', 'zh': '混合密度网络连为地理词汇言', 'ru': 'Непрерывное представление местоположения для геолокации и лексической диалектологии с использованием сетей плотности смеси', 'hi': 'मिश्रण घनत्व नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर Geolocation और Lexical Dialectology के लिए स्थान का निरंतर प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ga': 'Léiriú Leanúnach ar Shuíomh le haghaidh Geoshuíomh agus Canúint Fhoclóra ag úsáid Líonraí Dlúis Meascáin', 'el': 'Συνεχής αναπαράσταση της τοποθεσίας για γεωεντοπισμό και λεξική διαλεκτική με χρήση δικτύων πυκνότητας μείγματος', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Helyszín folyamatos ábrázolása geolokáció és lexikális dialektológia keveréksűrűségű hálózatokkal', 'kk': 'Географиялық орны және лексикалық диалектологиялық орналасуын таңдау', 'it': 'Rappresentazione continua della posizione per geolocalizzazione e dialelettologia lessicale utilizzando reti di densità mista', 'lt': 'Nuolatinis geolokacijos ir leksinės dialektologijos vietos atstovavimas naudojant mišinio tankio tinklus', 'mk': 'Континуирана претстава на локацијата за геолокација и лексикална дијалектологија користејќи мрежи за густина на мешавини', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Lanjutan Lokasi untuk Geolokasi dan Dialektologi Leksikal menggunakan Rangkaian Densitas Kabur', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjoni kontinwa tal-Post għall-Ġeolokazzjoni u d-Dijalettoloġija Lessika bl-użu ta’ Netwerks ta’ Densità ta’ Taħlita', 'ml': 'മിക്സ്റ്റര്\u200d ഡെന്\u200dസിറ്റി നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഡയലെക്ടലിയുടെയും സ്ഥ', 'no': 'Continuous Representation of Location for Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology using Mixture Density Networks', 'mn': 'Хоёр байрлал болон лексикийн диалектологийг ашиглан Хоёр байрлал болон Хоёр байрлал дээр үргэлжлүүлэх', 'sr': 'Neprestano predstavljanje lokacije za geolokaciju i leksičku dijalektologiju koristeći mrežu mješavine gustoće', 'pl': 'Ciągła reprezentacja lokalizacji dla geolokalizacji i dialektologii leksykalnej przy użyciu sieci gęstości mieszanin', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea continuă a localizării pentru geolocalizare și dialectologie lexicală folosind rețele de densitate amestecată', 'so': 'Ku baaraandegista meesha aad ku leedahay qoraalka la xiriira iyo isticmaalka Internetka Mixture Density', 'sv': 'Kontinuerlig representation av plats fﾃｶr geolokalisering och Lexisk dialelektologi med hjﾃ､lp av blandningstﾃ､thetsnﾃ､tverk', 'ta': 'பூமியின் ஒதுங்குதல் மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் உரையாடலின் இடத்திற்கான தொடர்ந்து பிரதிதித்தல் முனையம் அடர்த்தி பி', 'ur': 'جئئئوٹ اور لکسیکس ڈیلکتلوژی کے لئے موقعیت کا ادامه ادامه کرنا', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiếp tục phân tích vị trí cho địa điểm và cấu trúc ngôn ngữ dược dùng mạng tổ chức mật độ', 'bg': 'Непрекъснато представяне на местоположението за геолокация и лексикална диалектология чрез мрежи за плътност на сместа', 'da': 'Kontinuerlig repræsentation af placering til geolocation og Lexical Dialektology ved hjælp af blandingstæthedsnetværk', 'de': 'Kontinuierliche Standortdarstellung für Geolokalisierung und Lexikale Dialektologie mittels Mischdichtenetzen', 'id': 'Perwakilan Terus Lokasi untuk Geolokasi dan Dialektologi Lexik menggunakan Rangkaian Densitas Mixture', 'hr': 'Neprestano predstavljanje lokacije za geolokaciju i leksičku dijalektologiju koristeći mrežu mješavine gustoće', 'nl': 'Continue weergave van locatie voor geolocatie en Lexical Dialectology met behulp van mengdichtheidsnetwerken', 'ko': '혼합 밀도 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 지리적 위치와 어휘 사투리의 위치 연속 표시', 'fa': 'نمایش ادامه موقعیت جایگاهی و نمایش\u200cشناسی الکتروژی جغرافی با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای گستردگی مخلوط', 'tr': 'Geolocation we Lexical Dialectologiýany Mixture Density Networks kullanarak ýerleşýän ýerleşdirim', 'af': 'Verhouding van Ligging vir Geoligging en Leksiese Dialekologie deur gebruik van Mixture Density Netwerke', 'sq': 'Përfaqësimi i vazhdueshëm i Vendimit për Gjeolokimin dhe Dialektologjinë Lexike duke përdorur rrjetet e densitetit të përzier', 'am': 'ቦታ', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo yanayoendelea kwa ajili ya Utamaduni na Dilekolojia ya Kilexico kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Mijini', 'bn': 'মিক্সেচ্চার ডেন্সিসি নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে জীবনযোগ্য এবং লেক্সিক্যাল ডায়ালেক্টলজি স্থানের অবস্থানের অনল', 'hy': 'Գեոլոկացիայի և լեքսիկական դիալեկտոլոգիայի տեղակայության անընդհատ ներկայացումը, օգտագործելով խառնախտության ցանցեր', 'ca': 'Representació contínua del lloc per a la geolocalització i la dialectologia lècsica utilitzant xarxes de densitat mixta', 'az': 'Mixture Density Networks', 'cs': 'Kontinuální reprezentace polohy pro geolokaci a Lexickou dialektologii pomocí sítí hustoty směsí', 'et': 'Geolokatsiooni ja leksikoloogia asukoha pidev esindamine segu tiheduse võrkude abil', 'fi': 'Geolocation- ja lexical dialektologian sijainnin jatkuva esittäminen seostiheysverkostojen avulla', 'bs': 'Neprestano predstavljanje lokacije za geolokaciju i leksičku dijalektologiju koristeći mrežu mješavine gustoće', 'jv': 'kontinual', 'he': 'מייצג ממשיך של מיקום לגיאוליקציה ודיאלקטולוגיה לקסיקה', 'sk': 'Stalna predstavitev lokacije za geolokacijo in leksično dialektologijo z uporabo mrež gostote mešanic', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Continuous Representation of Location for Geolocation and Lexical Dialectology using Mixture Density Networks'}
{'en': 'We propose a method for embedding two-dimensional locations in a continuous vector space using a neural network-based model incorporating mixtures of Gaussian distributions, presenting two model variants for text-based geolocation and lexical dialectology. Evaluated over Twitter data, the proposed model outperforms conventional regression-based geolocation and provides a better estimate of uncertainty. We also show the effectiveness of the representation for predicting words from location in lexical dialectology, and evaluate it using the DARE dataset.', 'ar': 'نقترح طريقة لتضمين مواقع ثنائية الأبعاد في مساحة متجهية مستمرة باستخدام نموذج قائم على الشبكة العصبية يشتمل على مزيج من توزيعات Gaussian ، ويقدم متغيرين نموذجيين لتحديد الموقع الجغرافي القائم على النص واللهجة المعجمية. نظرًا للتقييم على بيانات Twitter ، فإن النموذج المقترح يتفوق على تحديد الموقع الجغرافي التقليدي القائم على الانحدار ويوفر تقديرًا أفضل لعدم اليقين. نعرض أيضًا فعالية التمثيل للتنبؤ بالكلمات من الموقع في اللهجات المعجمية ، وتقييمها باستخدام مجموعة بيانات DARE.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une méthode pour intégrer des emplacements bidimensionnels dans un espace vectoriel continu à l'aide d'un modèle basé sur un réseau de neurones incorporant des mélanges de distributions gaussiennes, présentant deux variantes de modèle pour la géolocalisation basée sur le texte et la dialectologie lexicale. Évalué sur les données Twitter, le modèle proposé surpasse la géolocalisation conventionnelle basée sur la régression et fournit une meilleure estimation de l'incertitude. Nous montrons également l'efficacité de la représentation pour prédire les mots à partir de leur emplacement en dialectologie lexicale, et nous l'évaluons à l'aide de l'ensemble de données DARE.", 'es': 'Proponemos un método para incrustar ubicaciones bidimensionales en un espacio vectorial continuo utilizando un modelo basado en redes neuronales que incorpora mezclas de distribuciones gaussianas, presentando dos variantes de modelo para la geolocalización basada en texto y la dialectología léxica. Evaluado con datos de Twitter, el modelo propuesto supera a la geolocalización convencional basada en regresión y proporciona una mejor estimación de la incertidumbre. También mostramos la eficacia de la representación para predecir palabras desde la ubicación en dialectología léxica, y la evaluamos utilizando el conjunto de datos DARE.', 'pt': 'Propomos um método para incorporar localizações bidimensionais em um espaço vetorial contínuo usando um modelo baseado em rede neural incorporando misturas de distribuições gaussianas, apresentando duas variantes de modelo para geolocalização baseada em texto e dialetologia lexical. Avaliado em dados do Twitter, o modelo proposto supera a geolocalização convencional baseada em regressão e fornece uma melhor estimativa de incerteza. Também mostramos a eficácia da representação para prever palavras a partir da localização na dialetologia lexical e a avaliamos usando o conjunto de dados DARE.', 'ja': 'ガウス分布の混合物を組み込んだニューラルネットワークベースのモデルを用いて、2次元の位置を連続ベクトル空間に埋め込む方法を提案し、テキストベースの地理学と辞書的方言学のための2つのモデル多様体を提示した。Twitterのデータを用いて評価すると、提案されたモデルは、従来の回帰ベースの地理的位置を上回り、不確実性のより良い推定を提供します。また、語彙方言学において、場所から単語を予測するための表現の有効性を示し、敢えてデータセットを用いて評価する。', 'zh': '臣等立神经网络连向量嵌二维之法,合斯之混合物,为地理词汇方言学二变体。 Twitter数以质之,形优于归,而资其善不确定性。 示词汇方言学以位占单词之有效性,而以DARE数集对之。', 'ru': 'Предложен метод встраивания двумерных локаций в непрерывное векторное пространство с использованием нейросетевой модели, включающей смеси гауссовых распределений, представляющий два варианта модели для текстовой геолокации и лексической диалектологии. Оцениваемая по данным Twitter, предлагаемая модель превосходит традиционную регрессионную геолокацию и обеспечивает лучшую оценку неопределенности. Мы также показываем эффективность представления для прогнозирования слов из местоположения в лексической диалектологии и оцениваем его с помощью набора данных DARE.', 'hi': 'हम एक सतत वेक्टर स्पेस में दो-आयामी स्थानों को एम्बेड करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित मॉडल का उपयोग किया जाता है, जिसमें गॉसियन वितरण के मिश्रण शामिल होते हैं, जो पाठ-आधारित जियोलोकेशन और लेक्सिकल द्वंद्वात्मकता के लिए दो मॉडल वेरिएंट प्रस्तुत करते हैं। ट्विटर डेटा पर मूल्यांकन किया गया, प्रस्तावित मॉडल पारंपरिक प्रतिगमन-आधारित जियोलोकेशन को मात देता है और अनिश्चितता का बेहतर अनुमान प्रदान करता है। हम लेक्सिकल डायलेक्टोलॉजी में स्थान से शब्दों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व की प्रभावशीलता भी दिखाते हैं, और डीएआरई डेटासेट का उपयोग करके इसका मूल्यांकन करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid modh chun suíomhanna déthoiseacha a leabú i spás veicteora leanúnach ag baint úsáide as samhail néarbhunaithe líonra-bhunaithe a ionchorpraíonn meascáin de dháileacháin Gaussacha, ag cur i láthair dhá leagan samhlacha le haghaidh geolocation téacs-bhunaithe agus canúint léacsach. Arna mheastóireacht ar shonraí Twitter, sáraíonn an tsamhail mholta ná gnáth-gheolonnú atá bunaithe ar chúlchéimniú agus soláthraíonn sé meastachán níos fearr ar neamhchinnteacht. Léirímid freisin éifeachtacht na hionadaíochta chun focail a thuar ó shuíomh sa chanúint fhoclóra, agus déanaimid measúnú air ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí DARE.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο ενσωμάτωσης διδιάστατων τοποθεσιών σε ένα συνεχές διανυσματικό χώρο χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο σε νευρωνικό δίκτυο που ενσωματώνει μείγματα Gaussian κατανεμήσεων, παρουσιάζοντας δύο παραλλαγές μοντέλων για τη γεωτοποίηση με βάση το κείμενο και τη λεξική διαλεκτικότητα. Εκτιμήθηκε μέσω δεδομένων του Twitter, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά τη συμβατική γεωτοποθεσία βασισμένη στην παλινδρόμηση και παρέχει καλύτερη εκτίμηση της αβεβαιότητας. Επίσης, καταδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της αναπαράστασης για την πρόβλεψη λέξεων από τοποθεσία στη λεξική διαλεκτική, και την αξιολογούμε χρησιμοποιώντας το σύνολο δεδομένων DARE.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გვეყველა მეტი, რომელიც ორგანზომილებული ადგილებების შეყვარება მუშაობელი გვქტორის სივრცეში გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელიც დაუსიანური დისტრიბუციების მისამართები, რომელიც ტექსტი Twitter-ის მონაცემების შესახებ მოწყობინებული მოდელი უფრო გავაკეთება კონტრაციონალური რეგრესის ზეოლოგიაციას და უფრო მუშაობელი მოწყობინება. ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ რესპეცენტაციის ეფექტიურობა ლექსიკალური დიალექტოლოგიაში სიტყვების წინასწარმოდგენისთვის და დავუმუშავებთ DARE მონაცემების სე', 'hu': 'Kétdimenziós helyek folyamatos vektortérbe történő beágyazásának módszerét javasoljuk egy Gauss eloszlások keverékét magában foglaló neurális hálózat alapú modell segítségével, amely két modellváltozatot mutat be szövegalapú geolokációhoz és lexikális dialektológiához. A Twitter adatok alapján értékelve a javasolt modell felülmúlja a hagyományos regressziós alapú geolokációt, és jobb becslést nyújt a bizonytalanságra. Megmutatjuk továbbá a reprezentáció hatékonyságát a lexikai dialektológiában a helyről származó szavak előrejelzésére, és értékeljük azt DARE adatkészlet használatával.', 'it': "Proponiamo un metodo per incorporare posizioni bidimensionali in uno spazio vettoriale continuo utilizzando un modello basato sulla rete neurale che incorpora miscele di distribuzioni gaussiane, presentando due varianti di modello per geolocalizzazione testuale e dialettologia lessicale. Valutato su dati Twitter, il modello proposto supera la geolocalizzazione convenzionale basata sulla regressione e fornisce una migliore stima dell'incertezza. Mostriamo anche l'efficacia della rappresentazione per predire le parole dalla posizione nella dialettologia lessicale, e la valutiamo utilizzando il dataset DARE.", 'lt': 'We propose a method for embedding two-dimensional locations in a continuous vector space using a neural network-based model incorporating mixtures of Gaussian distributions, presenting two model variants for text-based geolocation and lexical dialectology.  Vertintas naudojant Twitter duomenis, siūlomas modelis atitinka įprastinę regresijos pagrindu grindžiamą geolokaciją ir teikia geresnį neapibrėžtumo vertinimą. We also show the effectiveness of the representation for predicting words from location in lexical dialectology, and evaluate it using the DARE dataset.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме метод за вградување на дводимензионални локации во континуиран векторен простор користејќи нервен мрежен модел кој вклучува мешавини на гаусски дистрибуции, претставувајќи два моделни варијанти за текстова геолокација и лексикална дијалектологија. Оценет преку податоците на Твитер, предложениот модел ја надминува конвенционалната геолокација базирана на регресија и обезбедува подобра проценка на несигурноста. Исто така ја покажуваме ефикасноста на претставувањето за предвидување на зборови од локацијата во лексичката дијалектологија, и ја проценуваме со користење на DARE датотеката.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan kaedah untuk memasukkan lokasi dua-dimensi dalam ruang vektor terus menerus menggunakan model berasaskan rangkaian saraf yang memasukkan campuran distribusi Gaussian, memperkenalkan dua varian model untuk geolokasi berasaskan teks dan dialektologi lexik. Dihargai melalui data Twitter, model yang diusulkan melampaui prestasi geolokasi berdasarkan regresi konvensional dan menyediakan harga ketidakpastian yang lebih baik. Kami juga menunjukkan keefektiviti perwakilan untuk meramalkan perkataan dari lokasi dalam dialektologi leksikal, dan menilainya menggunakan set data DARE.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu metodu għall-inkorporazzjoni ta’ postijiet bidimensjonali fi spazju ta’ vetturi kontinwu bl-użu ta’ mudell ibbażat fuq netwerk newrali li jinkorpora taħlitiet ta’ distribuzzjonijiet Gawsjani, li jippreżentaw żewġ varjanti mudell għal ġeolokazzjoni bbażata fuq it-test u dijalektoloġija lexika. Evalwat fuq id-dejta fuq Twitter, il-mudell propost iwettaq il-ġeolokazzjoni konvenzjonali bbażata fuq ir-rigressjoni u jipprovdi stima a ħjar tal-inċertezza. Aħna nuru wkoll l-effettività tar-rappreżentazzjoni għat-tbassir tal-kliem mill-post fid-dijalektoloġija lexika, u jivvalutawha bl-użu tas-sett tad-dejta DARE.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഗാസ്സിയന്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ മികച്ചങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനായി രണ്ട് ഡിമോഡല്\u200d സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d ഇട ടൂട്ടര്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d കോണ്\u200dണെന്റല്\u200d റിക്രഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഭൂവിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്ക ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഡയലക്ട്രോളജിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനവും നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുതരുന്ന', 'mn': 'Бид хоёр хэмжээст байр суурилуулалтыг дахин үргэлжилсэн вектор орон зайд гаусийн хуваарилалтын төвөгтэй загварыг ашиглан хоёр загварын төвөгтэй загварыг суурилуулдаг. Твиттерийн өгөгдлийн хувьд дүгнэлт хийгдсэн загвар нь уламжлалтай регрессийн газрын байр суурилсан газрын байр суурилуулалт гаргаж, илүү тодорхойгүй тооцоолох боломжтой. Мөн бид Лексийн диалектологийнхээ орон зайнаас үгсийг таамаглах үзүүлэлтийн үр дүнг харуулж, DARE өгөгдлийн санг ашиглан үнэлэх хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy metodę osadzania lokalizacji dwuwymiarowych w ciągłej przestrzeni wektorowej przy użyciu modelu sieci neuronowej zawierającego mieszanki rozkładów Gaussowskich, przedstawiając dwa warianty modeli geolokalizacji tekstowej i dialektologii leksykalnej. Oceniony za pomocą danych Twittera, proponowany model przewyższa konwencjonalną geolokalizację opartą na regresji i zapewnia lepsze oszacowanie niepewności. Pokazujemy również skuteczność reprezentacji do przewidywania słów z lokalizacji w dialektologii leksykalnej i oceniamy ją za pomocą zbioru danych DARE.', 'ro': 'Propunem o metodă de încorporare a locațiilor bidimensionale într-un spațiu vectorial continuu folosind un model bazat pe rețea neurală care încorporează amestecuri de distribuții gaussiene, prezentând două variante de model pentru geolocația bazată pe text și dialectologia lexicală. Evaluat pe baza datelor Twitter, modelul propus depășește geolocalizarea convențională bazată pe regresie și oferă o mai bună estimare a incertitudinii. De asemenea, prezentăm eficacitatea reprezentării pentru predicția cuvintelor din locație în dialectologia lexicală și o evaluăm folosind setul de date DARE.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein metode for å innebygge to-dimensjonale plasseringar i ein kontinuerleg vektorplass med ein neuralnettverk-basert modell som inkluderer mixturer av Gaussianske distribusjonar, som viser to modellvariantar for tekstbasert geoplassering og leksisk dialektologi. Evaluert over Twitter-data, foreslått modellen utfører vanleg regresjonsbasert geoplassering og tilbyr ein bedre estimat av usikkerhet. Vi viser også effektiviteten av representasjonen for å foregå ord frå plassering i leksisk dialektologi, og evaluera det med DARE-datasettet.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo metodu za ugrađenje dvodimenzionalnih lokacija u kontinualnom vektorskom prostoru koristeći model na neuralnoj mreži koji uključuje mješavine Gausijskih distribucija, predstavljajući dve modelne variante za geolokaciju na tekstu i leksičku dijalektologiju. Prema podacima Twitter, predloženi model iznosi konvencionalnu geolokaciju na osnovu regresije i pruža bolju procjenu neodredjenosti. Takoðe pokazujemo efikasnost predviđanja reèi iz lokacije leksičke dijalektologije i procjenjujemo ga koristeći DARE podatke.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab ku bedela labada meelood oo kala duduwan goob wadan ah oo ku isticmaalaya noocyo shabakadda neural ah oo ku qoran isku xiran kala qaybinta Gaussian, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa laba qaabilaad oo u bedela meesha ay ku qoran yihiin qoraal iyo leksikal dialectology. Taariikhda Twitterka waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa, modelkii la soo jeeday wuxuu soo saaraa meelo lagu soo celiyo oo caadi ah, wuxuuna keenaa qiimeynta aan la garanayn. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaa shaqaalaha qaabilaada ka sii sheegidda hadallada meesha laga soo jeedo balbalbalka leksikalka, waxaana qiimeynaynaa isticmaalka danbiyada DARE.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en metod för att bädda in tvådimensionella platser i ett kontinuerligt vektorrum med hjälp av en neural nätverksbaserad modell som innehåller blandningar av gaussiska distributioner, presenterar två modellvarianter för textbaserad geolokalisering och lexikal dialektik. Utvärderad över Twitter data överträffar den föreslagna modellen konventionell regressionsbaserad geolokalisering och ger en bättre uppskattning av osäkerhet. Vi visar också hur effektiv representationen är för att förutsäga ord från plats i lexikal dialektik, och utvärderar den med hjälp av DARE datauppsättningen.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ගෝසියාන් විස්තරයේ මක්ෂණික විස්තර දෙකක් වෙක්ටර් තැනක් ස්ථානයෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන් ට්විටර් දත්ත වලින් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dර අපි ලෙක්සිකල් ඩායිලෙක්ටෝලෝජික් වලින් වචන අනතුරු කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමණයේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමය පෙන්වන්න පු', 'kk': 'Мәтін негіздеген географиялық және лексикалық диалектология үшін екі- өлшемді орналасуын бір вектор орындарына ендіру әдісін қолданамыз. Твиттердің деректері бойынша оқу үшін, ұсынылған үлгі кәдімгі регрессия негіздеген географиялық орналасуын жақсы бағалады. Сонымен қатар, Лексикалық диалектологиясындағы сөздерді таңдау үшін, DARE деректер жиынын қолдану үшін мәліметтердің ең әсерін көрсетеді.', 'ta': 'நாம் தொடர்ந்து வெக்டர் வெக்டார் இடத்தில் இரண்டு பரிமாற்றங்களை உள்ளிடுவதற்கான முறையை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம். ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி மாதிரி காஸ்சியன் பங்கீட தொடர்பு தரவிற்கு மேல் மதிப்பெடுக்கப்பட்டது, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வழக்கமான திரும்பத்திற்கு அடிப்படையிலான பூமியி நாம் பிரதிநிதியின் வார்த்தைகளை முன்வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு காட்டுகிறோம் லெக்சிக்சியல் வார்த்தைகளில் இருந்து முன்வ', 'ur': 'ہم ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ دو منبع موقعیت کو ایک ہمیشہ ویکتور جگہ میں مہینڈ کریں اور ایک نیورال نیٹورک کی بنیادی موڈل کو استعمال کریں جو گاوسی تقسیم کی مہینڈریزوں کے مطابق مہینڈ کرتی ہے، ایک متن کی بنیادی جغرائٹ موقعیت اور لکسیکل دیالکتلو توئیٹر ڈیٹا پر مطابق کیا گیا ہے، پیشنهاد کی موڈل معمولی ریگرسیش کی جئوٹی پر زیادہ مطابق ہوتی ہے اور اس سے بہتر مطابق ہے۔ ہم بھی لکسیکل دیالکتلوژی میں لکھنے کے لکھنے کے لئے کلمات کی پیش بینی کے لئے دکھاتے ہیں اور اسے DARE ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق ارزش دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "We propose a method for embedding two-dimensional locations in a continuous vector space using a neural network-based model incorporating mixtures of Gaussian distributions, presenting two model variants for text-based geolocation and lexical dialectology.  Twitter maʼlumotlariga tasdiqlangan, talab qilingan modeli, bu qo'shish asosida o'zgarishni boshlaydi va haqiqiqatga yaxshi qiymatni bajaradi. Biz hech qachon leksikal dialekologiya manzilidagi so'zlarni koʻrsatish uchun tashkilotni ko'rsamiz va uni DARE maʼlumotlar satridan qiymatlashimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp để gắn kết địa điểm hai chiều không gian trong một véc- tơ liên tục sử dụng một mô hình mạng thần kinh chứa các hỗn hợp phân phát kiểu Gauss, cung cấp hai mô hình biến thể cho địa điểm địa phương văn bản và ngôn ngữ văn học. Đánh giá qua các dữ liệu trên Twitter, mô hình đề xuất hiện ngoài địa điểm dựa trên sự phục hồi thông thường và cung cấp một ước lượng không chắc chắn. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy hiệu quả của sự đại diện để dự đoán từ địa điểm trong ngôn ngữ văn học, và đánh giá nó bằng bộ dữ liệu DARPA.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме метод за вграждане на двуизмерни локации в непрекъснато векторно пространство, използвайки модел, базиран на невронна мрежа, включващ смеси от гаусови разпределения, представящ два модела варианта за текстово-базирана геолокация и лексикална диалектология. Оценен чрез данни в Туитър, предложеният модел надминава конвенционалната регресионна геолокация и осигурява по-добра оценка на несигурността. Показваме и ефективността на представянето за предсказване на думи от място в лексикалната диалектология и го оценяваме с помощта на набора от данни.', 'nl': 'We stellen een methode voor voor het inbedden van tweedimensionale locaties in een continue vectorruimte met behulp van een neuraal netwerk gebaseerd model dat mengsels van Gaussiaanse distributies bevat, waarbij twee modelvarianten worden gepresenteerd voor tekst-gebaseerde geolocatie en lexicale dialectologie. Het voorgestelde model is geëvalueerd via Twitter-gegevens en overtreft conventionele regressie-gebaseerde geolocatie en biedt een betere schatting van onzekerheid. We tonen ook de effectiviteit van de representatie voor het voorspellen van woorden vanuit locatie in lexicale dialectologie, en evalueren deze met behulp van de DARE dataset.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en metode til indlejring af todimensionelle placeringer i et kontinuerligt vektorrum ved hjælp af en neural netværksbaseret model, der indarbejder blandinger af gaussiske distributioner, præsenterer to modelvarianter for tekstbaseret geolocation og leksikalsk dialektik. Vurderet over Twitter data, den foreslåede model overgår konventionel regressionsbaseret geolocation og giver et bedre skøn over usikkerhed. Vi viser også effektiviteten af repræsentationen til at forudsige ord fra sted i leksikalsk dialektik, og evaluerer den ved hjælp af DARE datasættet.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo metodu za ugrađenje dvodimenzionalnih lokacija u kontinualnom vektorskom prostoru koristeći model na neuralnoj mreži koji uključuje mješavine Gausijskih distribucija, koji predstavlja dvije modelne variante za geolokaciju i leksijsku dijalektologiju na tekstu. Prema podacima Twitter, predloženi model iznosi konvencionalnu geolokaciju na osnovu regresije i pruža bolju procjenu neodređenosti. Također pokazujemo učinkovitost predviđanja riječi iz lokacije leksičke dijalektologije i procjenjujemo ga koristeći DARE podatke.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan metode untuk memasukkan lokasi dua dimensi dalam ruang vektor kontinus menggunakan model jaringan saraf yang mengandung campuran distribusi Gaussia, memperkenalkan dua varian model untuk geolokasi berdasarkan teks dan dialektologi lexik. Evaluated over Twitter data, the proposed model outperforms conventional regression-based geolocation and provides a better estimate of uncertainty.  Kami juga menunjukkan efektif dari representation untuk memprediksi kata-kata dari lokasi dalam dialektologi leksik, dan mengevaluasinya menggunakan dataset DARE.', 'ko': '우리는 연속 벡터 공간에 2차원 위치를 삽입하는 방법을 제시했고 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 모델을 사용하여 고스 분포의 혼합을 결합시켜 텍스트의 지리적 위치와 어휘 방언을 바탕으로 하는 두 가지 모델 변체를 제시했다.트위터 데이터에 대한 평가를 통해 이 모델은 전통적인 회귀 기반의 지리적 포지셔닝보다 우수하고 더 좋은 불확실성 평가를 제공했다.이 표현법이 어휘 방언학에서 위치에서 단어의 유효성을 예측하고 DARE 데이터 집합을 사용해 평가한 것도 보여준다.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که جایگاهی دو بعدی را در فضای ویکتور ادامه\u200cدار با استفاده از یک مدل شبکه\u200cی عصبی که شامل ترکیب\u200cهای توزیع گاوسی است، دو متغیر مدل برای جایگاهی\u200cهای متن و دیالکتولوژی\u200cهای زبان استفاده می\u200cکند. بر روی داده های توئیتر ارزیابی شده، مدل پیشنهاد جایگاهی معمولی بر اساس تجاوز را اجرا می کند و تقدیم بهتری از مضطرب را پیشنهاد می کند. ما همچنین فعالیت نمایش را برای پیش بینی کلمات از موقعیت در دیالکتوژی زبان نشان می دهیم و با استفاده از مجموعه داده DARE ارزش می دهیم.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza njia ya kuingiza maeneo mawili katika anga ya sekta inayoendelea kwa kutumia muundo wa mtandao wa neurali unaohusisha mchanganyiko wa usambazaji wa Gaussia, na kutoa mabadiliko mawili kwa ajili ya maeneo yanayosimamia matokeo na utaalamu wa lexico. Uthibitishwa zaidi ya takwimu za Twita, muundo wa pendekezo unaonyesha maeneo ya kawaida ya ukandamizaji na inatoa kadiri bora ya kutokuwa na uhakika. Pia tunaonyesha ufanisi wa uwakilishi wa kutabiri maneno kutoka sehemu ya utaalamu wa lexico, na kutathmini kwa kutumia seti ya data ya DARE.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine Methode zur Einbettung zweidimensionaler Orte in einen kontinuierlichen Vektorraum vor, indem wir ein neuronales Netzwerk-basiertes Modell verwenden, das Mischungen von Gaußschen Verteilungen enthält und zwei Modellvarianten für textbasierte Geolokalisierung und lexikalische Dialektologie präsentiert. Über Twitter-Daten ausgewertet, übertrifft das vorgeschlagene Modell herkömmliche regressionsbasierte Geolokalisierung und liefert eine bessere Schätzung der Unsicherheit. Außerdem zeigen wir die Effektivität der Repräsentation für die Vorhersage von Wörtern von Ort aus in der lexikalischen Dialektologie auf und werten diese anhand des DARE-Datensatzes aus.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë për përfshirjen e vendeve dy-dimensionale në një hapësirë vektori të vazhdueshme duke përdorur një model të bazuar në rrjetin nervor që përfshin përzierje të shpërndarjeve Gausiane, duke paraqitur dy variante modeli për gjeologjinë e bazuar në tekst dhe dialektologjinë lexike. E vlerësuar nëpërmjet të dhënave të Twitter-it, modeli i propozuar arrin gjeologjinë tradicionale bazuar në regresion dhe ofron një vlerësim më të mirë të pasigurisë. Ne tregojmë gjithashtu efektshmërinë e përfaqësimit për parashikimin e fjalëve nga vendi në dialektologji lexike dhe e vlerësojmë duke përdorur dataset DARE.', 'am': 'በሁለት-dimensional ቦታዎችን በመጠቀም እና ለጽሑፍ ቦታ እና ለሌክሲካል ዲሌሌሎሎጂ የተለየውን የናቡራል መረብ-based ሞዴል በመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ Evaluated over Twitter data, the proposed model outperforms conventional regression-based geolocation and provides a better estimate of uncertainty.  እናም የ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկչափ տեղադրությունների ներգրավման մեթոդ անընդհատ վեկտորային տարածության մեջ օգտագործելով նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոդել, որը ներառում է Գաուսական տարածումների խառնուրդներ, ներկայացնում է երկու մոդել տեքստի հիմնված երկրաբանական տեղադրության և լեքսիկական դիալեկտո Թվիթերի տվյալների միջոցով գնահատված մոդելը հաջողությամբ արտադրում է ավանդական ռեգրեսիային հիմնված երկրագոյությունը և ավելի լավ գնահատում է անորոշությունը: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս արտահայտության արդյունավետությունը լեքսիկական դիալեկտոլոգիայի վայրից բառերի կանխատեսման համար և գնահատում ենք դրանք DAre տվյալների համակարգով:', 'tr': 'Biz iki boyutlu meýdançalar içinde daşary bir vektör uzayda näyral şebeke daşary taýýarlanan nuýdançalar üçin bir yöntem teklif edip, metin tabanly geolokasyon we lektik dialektoloji üçin iki model wariantçileri girdirip barýarys. Twitter maglumatynyň üstünde deňlenýär, teklip eden nusga döredilşik regressiýa daýanýan geografiýany çykarýar we ynamlyklygyň gowurak tahmyny berer. Biz hem mektuplardan sözleri tahmin etmek üçin etkinliğini gösterip, DARE veri setini kullanarak değerlendiriyoruz.', 'az': 'Biz Gaussian dańüńĪtńĪmlarńĪn qarńĪŇüńĪqlńĪqlarńĪnńĪ birl…ôŇüdirir, metin-tabanlńĪ geolokasyon v…ô leksik dialektoloji √ľ√ß√ľn iki modeli variablarńĪ g√∂st…ôririk. Twitter m…ôlumatlarńĪ il…ô deńüerl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü, t…ôblińü edilmiŇü modell…ôr konvencional regresiya tabanlńĪ geolokasyonu g√∂st…ôrir v…ô daha yaxŇüńĪ t…ômin edir. Biz d…ô leksik dialektolojiyadakńĪ s√∂zl…ôri t…ômin etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn g√∂st…ôririk v…ô DARE veri quruluńüu il…ô deńüerl…ôŇüdiririk.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo metodu za ugrađenje dvodimenzionalnih lokacija u kontinualnom vektorskom prostoru koristeći model na neuralnoj mreži koji uključuje mješavine Gausijskih distribucija, predstavljajući dvije modelne variante za geolokaciju na tekstu i leksičku dijalektologiju. Prema podacima Twitter, predloženi model iznosi konvencionalnu geolokaciju na osnovu regresije i pruža bolju procjenu neodredjenosti. Također pokazujemo učinkovitost predviđanja riječi iz lokacije leksičke dijalektologije i procjenjujemo ga koristeći DARE dataset.', 'ca': "Proposem un mètode per incorporar llocs bidimensionals en un espai vector continu utilitzant un model basat en la xarxa neural incorporant mezcles de distribucions gaussianes, presentant dues variants models de geolocalització basada en text i dialectòlogia lècsica. Evaluat a través de les dades de Twitter, el model proposat supera la geolocalització convencional basada en la regressió i proporciona una millor estimació de l'incertitud. També demostram l'eficacia de la representació per predir paraules de la localització de la dialectòlogia lècsica, i la valorem fent servir el conjunt de dades DARE.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme metodu vkládání dvourozměrných lokalit do spojitého vektorového prostoru pomocí modelu založeného na neuronové síti zahrnujícího směsi Gaussovských distribucí, představující dvě modelové varianty pro textovou geolokaci a lexikální dialektologii. Navržený model vyhodnocený pomocí dat Twitteru překonává konvenční geolokaci založenou na regresi a poskytuje lepší odhad nejistoty. Dále ukazujeme efektivitu reprezentace pro predikci slov z lokace v lexikální dialektologii a vyhodnocujeme ji pomocí datové sady DARE.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n metode om twee-dimensie liggings in 'n voortdurende vektorruimte te inbêer deur 'n neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde model te inkorporeer gemeenskappe van Gaussie verspreidings, wat twee model variante voorstel vir teks-gebaseerde geolokasie en leksiese dialektologie. Geevalueer deur Twitter-data, die voorgestelde model uitvoer konvensionele regresie-gebaseerde geoligging en verskaf 'n beter estimatie van onbevestigheid. Ons wys ook die effektiviteit van die voorstelling vir voorskou woorde van ligging in leksiese dialektologie en evalueer dit deur die DARE datastel te gebruik.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme menetelmää kaksiulotteisten paikannusten upottamiseksi jatkuvaan vektoriavaruuteen käyttäen neuroverkkopohjaista mallia, joka sisältää Gaussin jakaumien sekoituksia ja jossa esitellään kaksi mallivarianttia tekstipohjaiselle geolokaatiolle ja leksikaaliselle dialektologialle. Twitter-datan perusteella arvioitu malli ylittää perinteisen regressiopohjaisen geolokaation ja antaa paremman arvion epävarmuudesta. Osoitamme myös representaation tehokkuuden sanojen ennustamisessa sijainnista leksikaalisessa dialektologiassa ja arvioimme sitä DARE-aineiston avulla.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যেটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক মডেল ব্যবহার করে দুটি ডিমেনশন স্থান বিভিন্ন স্থানে প্রবেশ করার জন্য, যা গাউসিয়ান বিতরণের মিশ্রিত মিশ্রিত। টে টুইটারের তথ্যের বিরুদ্ধে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, প্রস্তাবিত মডেল কনভেন্টাল রিপোর্টিং ভিত্তিক ভূমিকম্পের অবস্থান প্রকাশ কর আমরা লেক্সিক্যাল ডায়ালেক্টলজিতে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি এবং ডায়ারি ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে এটি মূল্যায়ন করি।', 'et': 'Pakume välja meetodi kahemõõtmeliste asukohtade manustamiseks pidevasse vektoriruumi, kasutades neurovõrgupõhist mudelit, mis sisaldab Gaussi jaotuste segusid, esitades kaks mudelivarianti tekstipõhise geolokatsiooni ja leksikaalse dialektoloogia jaoks. Twitteri andmete põhjal hinnatud mudel ületab tavapärase regressioonipõhise geolokatsiooni ja annab parema hinnangu ebakindlusele. Samuti näitame esituse efektiivsust sõnade ennustamisel asukohast leksikaalses dialektoloogias ja hindame seda DARE andmekogumi abil.', 'jv': 'We proposal a method for embedding Two-Dimensial lokations in a continue vector space use a Neral network-supported model inkporting Mixturs of GoSSian Distribubutions, present nting Two model variants for text-supported jelocation and Lexcal dialectlogies. Wanggang ngendalikke podho Google, model sing supoyo iso dianggawe jeograhan sing basa gambar barang nggawe barang apik sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk efek karo repréentasi kanggo urêkêr pawaran kanggo ngilangno dialectlogi langgambar, lan jejaraké dhéwé iso nggambar barang dataset DEREE', 'sk': 'Predlagamo metodo za vgradnjo dvodimenzionalnih lokacij v kontinuirani vektorski prostor z uporabo modela, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju, ki vključuje mešanice gaussijskih distribucij, predstavlja dve modelni varianti za besedilno-temelječo geolokacijo in leksikalno dialektologijo. Predlagani model, ocenjen prek Twitterjevih podatkov, presega običajno regresijsko geolokacijo in zagotavlja boljšo oceno negotovosti. Prikazujemo tudi učinkovitost reprezentacije pri napovedovanju besed iz lokacije v leksikalni dialektologiji in jo ocenjujemo z uporabo nabora podatkov DARE.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים שיטה להכניס מיקומות שתיים מימדיים בחלל ווקטור ממשיך בשימוש מודל מבוסס ברשת עצבית שמכיל ערבות של פיצוצי גאוסים, המציג שני שונים מודל לגאולוקטולוגיה מבוססת בטקסט ודיאלקטולוגיה לקסית. מוערך על ידי מידע טוויטר, המודל המוצע מתגבר על המיקום הגיאולוגי המבוסס על גיאוגרסיה קונבנסיונלית ומספק עריכה טובה יותר של אי-בטוחות. אנחנו גם מראים את היעילות של הייצגות לחזות מילים ממיקום בדיאלקטולוגיה לקסיקה, ולעריך אותה באמצעות קבוצת נתונים DARE.', 'ha': "Tuna buɗe wani hanyor da za'a shigar da wurãre biyu-duffai cikin filin mai matsayi wanda ke daidaita, yana amfani da wata motel mai zane-zane ta cikin shirin neural wanda ke haɗa haɗi da gaussian rabõ, kuma Muke nuna variants biyu na motsi wa wuri na rubutun da aka ƙayyade matsayi. Ana ƙaddara a bayan data na Twitter, shirin da aka buƙata, yana samar da wurãren cire ta da kawaici a bakin regression kuma yana samar da kashi mafi daidaita. Kamar haka, Munã nũna masu inganci wa mai nuna maganar bayani daga inda ke cikin diƙalumogi na leksisi, kuma Muke ƙaddara shi da ake amfani da danne-danne na DAR.", 'bo': 'We propose a method for embedding two-dimensional locations in a continuous vector space using a neural network-based model incorporating mixtures of Gaussian distributions, presenting two model variants for text-based geolocation and lexical dialectology. Evaluated over Twitter data, the proposed model outperforms conventional regression-based geolocation and provides a better estimate of uncertainty. ང་ཚོས་ཟུར་བ་སྤྱོད་པར་ཨ་རིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Obj2Text : Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'ar': 'Obj2Text: إنشاء لغة وصفية بصرية من تخطيطات الكائنات', 'pt': 'Obj2Text: Gerando linguagem visualmente descritiva a partir de layouts de objetos', 'es': 'Obj2Text: Generar lenguaje visualmente descriptivo a partir de diseños de objetos', 'fr': "Obj2Text\xa0: génération d'un langage visuellement descriptif à partir de mises en page", 'zh': 'Obj2Text:视描述性言', 'ja': 'Obj 2 Text:オブジェクトレイアウトから視覚的に記述可能な言語を生成する', 'hi': 'Obj2Text: ऑब्जेक्ट लेआउट से नेत्रहीन वर्णनात्मक भाषा जनरेट करना', 'ru': 'Obj2Text: Создание визуально описательного языка из макетов объектов', 'ga': 'Obj2Text: Teanga Thuairisciúil Amhairc a Ghiniúint ó Leaganacha Oibiachta', 'ka': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'el': 'Δημιουργία οπτικά περιγραφικής γλώσσας από διατάξεις αντικειμένων', 'hu': 'Obj2Text: Vizuálisan leíró nyelv generálása objektum elrendezésekből', 'it': 'Obj2Text: Generazione del linguaggio descrittivo visivamente dai layout degli oggetti', 'kk': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'ml': 'Object Layouts', 'mt': 'Obj2Test: Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Lingwa Deskrittiva Viswalment minn Layouts ta’ Oġġetti', 'mn': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'no': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'pl': 'Obj2Text: Generowanie języka opisującego wizualnie z układów obiektów', 'ro': 'Obj2Text: Generarea limbajului descriptiv vizual din aspectele obiectelor', 'sr': 'Obj2', 'mk': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'lt': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'si': 'Obj2Text: General Visally Description language from object Layout', 'ms': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'sv': 'Obj2Text: Generera visuellt beskrivande språk från objektlayouter', 'so': 'Text: Generating Visual Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'ta': 'உரை: Generating Visual Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'ur': 'Obj2Text: Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'uz': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visual Descriptive Language from Object Layers', 'vi': 'Obj2Văn bản: Tạo ra ngôn ngữ mô tả hiển thị từ Bố trí đối tượng', 'bg': 'Генериране на визуално описващ език от оформления на обекти', 'de': 'Obj2Text: Generieren visuell beschreibender Sprache aus Objektlayouts', 'da': 'Obj2Text: Genererer visuelt beskrivende sprog fra objektlayout', 'hr': 'Obj2Text: Generiranje vizualno opisivnog jezika iz objektivnih rasporeda', 'nl': 'Obj2Text: Het genereren van visueel beschrijvende taal uit objectindelingen', 'id': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'sw': 'Text: Generating Visual Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'tr': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'ko': 'Obj2Text: 객체 레이아웃에서 시각 형상 설명 언어 생성', 'fa': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'sq': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'af': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layout', 'am': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'hy': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'az': 'Obj2Text: Visual Descriptive Language Generation from Object Layouts', 'bn': 'Obj2Text: Creating View Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'bs': 'Obj2Text: Generiranje vizualno opisivnog jezika iz objektivnih rasporeda', 'ca': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'cs': 'Obj2Text: Generování vizuálně popisného jazyka z objektových rozložení', 'et': 'Objekti paigutustest visuaalselt kirjeldava keele genereerimine', 'fi': 'Obj2Text: Visuaalisesti kuvaavan kielen luominen objektiasetteluista', 'jv': 'Text: Generating Visual Descripative Language from object Layouts', 'sk': 'Obj2Text: Ustvarjanje vizualno opisnega jezika iz postavitev objektov', 'ha': 'Text: Creating vision descriptive language from objects Layouts', 'he': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts', 'bo': 'Obj2Text: Generating Visually Descriptive Language from Object Layouts'}
{'en': 'Generating captions for images is a task that has recently received considerable attention. Another type of visual inputs are abstract scenes or object layouts where the only information provided is a set of objects and their locations. This type of imagery is commonly found in many applications in computer graphics, virtual reality, and storyboarding. We explore in this paper OBJ2TEXT, a sequence-to-sequence model that encodes a set of objects and their locations as an input sequence using an LSTM network, and decodes this representation using an LSTM language model. We show in our paper that this model despite using a sequence encoder can effectively represent complex spatial object-object relationships and produce descriptions that are globally coherent and semantically relevant. We test our approach for the task of describing object layouts in the MS-COCO dataset by producing sentences given only object annotations. We additionally show that our model combined with a state-of-the-art object detector can improve the accuracy of an image captioning model.', 'ar': 'يعد إنشاء تعليقات للصور مهمة حظيت باهتمام كبير مؤخرًا. نوع آخر من المدخلات المرئية هو المشاهد المجردة أو تخطيطات الكائنات حيث المعلومات الوحيدة المقدمة هي مجموعة من الكائنات ومواقعها. يوجد هذا النوع من الصور بشكل شائع في العديد من التطبيقات في رسومات الكمبيوتر والواقع الافتراضي ولوحة العمل. نستكشف في هذا البحث OBJ2TEXT ، نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل الذي يشفر مجموعة من الكائنات ومواقعها كتسلسل إدخال باستخدام شبكة LSTM ، ويفك تشفير هذا التمثيل باستخدام نموذج لغة LSTM. نوضح في ورقتنا البحثية أن هذا النموذج على الرغم من استخدام مشفر تسلسل يمكن أن يمثل بشكل فعال العلاقات المكانية المعقدة بين الكائن والكائن وإنتاج أوصاف متماسكة عالميًا وذات صلة معنوية. نحن نختبر نهجنا لمهمة وصف تخطيطات الكائنات في مجموعة بيانات MS-COCO من خلال إنتاج جمل تتضمن التعليقات التوضيحية للكائنات فقط. نوضح أيضًا أن نموذجنا جنبًا إلى جنب مع أحدث أجهزة الكشف عن الكائنات يمكن أن يحسن دقة نموذج التعليق على الصورة.', 'es': 'Generar subtítulos para imágenes es una tarea que recientemente ha recibido una atención considerable. Otro tipo de entradas visuales son las escenas abstractas o los diseños de objetos en los que la única información proporcionada es un conjunto de objetos y sus ubicaciones. Este tipo de imágenes se encuentra comúnmente en muchas aplicaciones de gráficos por ordenador, realidad virtual y guiones gráficos. En este artículo exploramos OBJ2TEXT, un modelo de secuencia a secuencia que codifica un conjunto de objetos y sus ubicaciones como una secuencia de entrada utilizando una red LSTM, y decodifica esta representación mediante un modelo de lenguaje LSTM. En nuestro artículo mostramos que este modelo, a pesar de utilizar un codificador de secuencia, puede representar eficazmente relaciones complejas entre objetos espaciales y producir descripciones que son coherentes a nivel mundial y semánticamente relevantes. Probamos nuestro enfoque para la tarea de describir diseños de objetos en el conjunto de datos MS-COCO mediante la producción de oraciones a partir solo de anotaciones de objetos. Además, demostramos que nuestro modelo, combinado con un detector de objetos de última generación, puede mejorar la precisión de un modelo de subtítulos de imágenes.', 'fr': "La génération de légendes pour les images est une tâche qui a récemment fait l'objet d'une attention considérable. Un autre type d'entrées visuelles est constitué par des scènes abstraites ou des mises en page d'objets où les seules informations fournies sont un ensemble d'objets et leur emplacement. Ce type d'imagerie est couramment utilisé dans de nombreuses applications en infographie, en réalité virtuelle et en storyboard. Nous explorons dans cet article OBJ2TEXT, un modèle séquence-séquence qui code un ensemble d'objets et leurs emplacements en tant que séquence d'entrée à l'aide d'un réseau LSTM, et décode cette représentation à l'aide d'un modèle de langage LSTM. Nous montrons dans notre article que ce modèle, malgré l'utilisation d'un encodeur de séquence, peut représenter efficacement des relations objet-objet spatiales complexes et produire des descriptions globalement cohérentes et sémantiquement pertinentes. Nous testons notre approche pour la description de la disposition des objets dans le jeu de données MS-COCO en produisant des phrases contenant uniquement des annotations d'objets. Nous montrons également que notre modèle combiné à un détecteur d'objets de pointe peut améliorer la précision d'un modèle de sous-titrage d'image.", 'pt': 'A geração de legendas para imagens é uma tarefa que tem recebido atenção considerável recentemente. Outro tipo de entrada visual são cenas abstratas ou layouts de objetos onde a única informação fornecida é um conjunto de objetos e suas localizações. Esse tipo de imagem é comumente encontrado em muitos aplicativos de computação gráfica, realidade virtual e storyboard. Exploramos neste artigo o OBJ2TEXT, um modelo sequência-a-sequência que codifica um conjunto de objetos e suas localizações como uma sequência de entrada usando uma rede LSTM, e decodifica essa representação usando um modelo de linguagem LSTM. Mostramos em nosso artigo que esse modelo, apesar de usar um codificador de sequência, pode efetivamente representar relações espaciais complexas de objeto-objeto e produzir descrições que são globalmente coerentes e semanticamente relevantes. Testamos nossa abordagem para a tarefa de descrever layouts de objetos no conjunto de dados MS-COCO produzindo sentenças com apenas anotações de objetos. Além disso, mostramos que nosso modelo combinado com um detector de objetos de última geração pode melhorar a precisão de um modelo de legendagem de imagens.', 'ja': '画像のキャプションを生成することは、最近かなり注目されているタスクです。 ビジュアル入力の別のタイプは、抽象的なシーンまたはオブジェクトレイアウトであり、提供される情報はオブジェクトとその場所のセットのみです。 このタイプの画像は、コンピュータグラフィックス、仮想現実、ストーリーボードの多くのアプリケーションで一般的に見られます。 本稿では， LSTMネットワークを用いて一連のオブジェクトとその位置を入力シーケンスとして符号化し， LSTM言語モデルを用いてこの表現をデコードするシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルであるOBJ 2 TEXTについて考察する。 シーケンスエンコーダを使用しているにもかかわらず、このモデルは複雑な空間的オブジェクトとオブジェクトの関係を効果的に表現し、グローバルに一貫性があり、意味的に関連性のある記述を生成することができることを論文で示しています。 MS - COCOデータセット内のオブジェクトレイアウトを記述するタスクのためのアプローチをテストし、オブジェクトアノテーションのみを与えられた文章を生成します。 さらに、最先端のオブジェクト検出器と組み合わせたモデルは、画像キャプションモデルの精度を向上させることができます。', 'zh': '图形者,近之务也。 一曰视觉输入抽象布局,一曰信息,一曰群位。 凡此诸图形常见于计算机虚拟现实节提要多应用程序中。 论OBJ2TEXT于本文,是谓序形,以LSTM网络为组,以编码为输,以LSTM言解码。 论曰:虽序编码器,效其所 - ,则全局而语义。 试于给定注句以试 MS-COCO 数。 吾犹明吾之先进检测器合,可以崇象字幕之准确性。', 'ru': 'Создание подписей к изображениям - задача, которой в последнее время уделяется значительное внимание. Другим типом визуальных входов являются абстрактные сцены или макеты объектов, где единственной предоставляемой информацией является набор объектов и их местоположение. Этот тип изображений часто встречается во многих приложениях в компьютерной графике, виртуальной реальности и раскадровке. В этой статье мы исследуем OBJ2TEXT, модель последовательности между последовательностями, которая кодирует набор объектов и их местоположения в качестве входной последовательности с использованием сети LSTM и декодирует это представление с использованием языковой модели LSTM. Мы показываем в нашей работе, что эта модель, несмотря на использование кодировщика последовательности, может эффективно представлять сложные пространственные отношения объект-объект и производить описания, которые являются глобально согласованными и семантически релевантными. Мы тестируем наш подход для задачи описания макетов объектов в наборе данных MS-COCO, создавая предложения, дающие только аннотации объектов. Дополнительно показано, что наша модель в сочетании с современным детектором объектов может повысить точность модели субтитров изображения.', 'hi': 'छवियों के लिए कैप्शन उत्पन्न करना एक ऐसा कार्य है जिसे हाल ही में काफी ध्यान दिया गया है। एक अन्य प्रकार के दृश्य इनपुट अमूर्त दृश्य या ऑब्जेक्ट लेआउट हैं जहां प्रदान की गई एकमात्र जानकारी वस्तुओं और उनके स्थानों का एक सेट है। इस प्रकार की इमेजरी आमतौर पर कंप्यूटर ग्राफिक्स, आभासी वास्तविकता और स्टोरीबोर्डिंग में कई अनुप्रयोगों में पाई जाती है। हम इस पेपर OBJ2TEXT में पता लगाते हैं, एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल जो वस्तुओं के एक सेट और उनके स्थानों को एक LSTM नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके इनपुट अनुक्रम के रूप में एन्कोड करता है, और LSTM भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके इस प्रतिनिधित्व को डीकोड करता है। हम अपने पेपर में दिखाते हैं कि अनुक्रम एन्कोडर का उपयोग करने के बावजूद यह मॉडल प्रभावी रूप से जटिल स्थानिक वस्तु-वस्तु संबंधों का प्रतिनिधित्व कर सकता है और उन विवरणों का उत्पादन कर सकता है जो विश्व स्तर पर सुसंगत और शब्दार्थ रूप से प्रासंगिक हैं। हम केवल ऑब्जेक्ट एनोटेशन दिए गए वाक्यों का उत्पादन करके एमएस-कोको डेटासेट में ऑब्जेक्ट लेआउट का वर्णन करने के कार्य के लिए अपने दृष्टिकोण का परीक्षण करते हैं। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल को अत्याधुनिक ऑब्जेक्ट डिटेक्टर के साथ संयुक्त किया गया है, जो छवि कैप्शनिंग मॉडल की सटीकता में सुधार कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tasc ar tugadh aird shuntasach air le déanaí is ea foscríbhinní a chruthú le haghaidh íomhánna. Cineál eile ionchuir amhairc is ea radhairc teibí nó leagan amach oibiachta nuair is é an t-aon fhaisnéis a chuirtear ar fáil ná sraith réad agus a láithreacha. Faightear an cineál íomhánna seo go coitianta i go leor feidhmchlár i ngrafaicí ríomhaireachta, i réaltacht fhíorúil, agus i gclárscéalta. Déanaimid iniúchadh sa pháipéar seo OBJ2TEXT, samhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh a ionchódaíonn tacar réad agus a n-ionad mar sheicheamh ionchuir ag baint úsáide as líonra LSTM, agus díchódaíonn an léiriú seo ag baint úsáide as samhail teanga LSTM. Léirímid inár bpáipéar gur féidir leis an múnla seo, ainneoin úsáid a bhaint as ionchódóir seichimh, caidrimh spásúlachta casta oibiachta a léiriú go héifeachtach agus tuairiscí a tháirgeadh atá comhleanúnach ar fud an domhain agus ábhartha ó thaobh séimeantach. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár gcur chuige maidir le cur síos a dhéanamh ar leagan amach réad sa tacar sonraí MS-COCO trí abairtí a thabhairt nach dtugtar ach nótaí oibiachta dóibh. Léirímid freisin gur féidir lenár múnla in éineacht le brathadóir oibiachta den scoth feabhas a chur ar chruinneas samhail fotheidealaithe íomhá.', 'ka': 'სურათებისთვის შესახებ შექმნა არის რაოდენობა, რომელიც ახლა აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი გურათი. სხვა ვიზუალური მონაცემების ტიპი არის აბსტრაქტური სენები ან ობიექტის მონაცემები, სადაც ერთადერთი მონაცემებული ინფორმაცია არის ობიექტის და მისი ადგილების ნა ამ ტიპის გამოსახულება მსგავსი პროგრამებში კომპიუტერული გრაფიკაში, ვირტუალური რეალურობაში და ისტორიების ბორდში მოიძებნა. ჩვენ ამ გვერდის OBJ2TEXT-ში გამოვაკვირდებით, რომელიც სამყარო მოდელს, რომელიც სამყარო ობიექტები და სამყარო ადგილების კოდირებას LSTM ქსელის გამოყენებით გამოყენებული შეცდომა და გამოყენებს ეს გამოყენ ჩვენ ჩვენი დოკუნტში ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს მოდელი კოდირების გამოყენება შეიძლება ეფექტიურად კომპლექსი სივრცეული ობიექტის საერთო შესახებ და გამოყენება გან ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ჩვენი პროგრამის მონაცემებისთვის საქმე, რომელიც MS-COCO მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის, მხოლოდ მონაცემების მონაცემების გამ ჩვენ დამატებით აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი კომბიცირებული სამყარო ობიექტის დექტორი შეუძლიათ გაუფეთქოთ გამოსახულების მოდელს.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία λεζάντων για εικόνες είναι ένα έργο που έχει λάβει πρόσφατα σημαντική προσοχή. Ένας άλλος τύπος οπτικών εισόδων είναι αφηρημένες σκηνές ή διατάξεις αντικειμένων όπου η μόνη πληροφορία που παρέχεται είναι ένα σύνολο αντικειμένων και τις θέσεις τους. Αυτός ο τύπος εικόνων βρίσκεται συνήθως σε πολλές εφαρμογές στα γραφικά υπολογιστών, την εικονική πραγματικότητα και την αφήγηση ιστοριών. Ερευνούμε σε αυτό το άρθρο ένα μοντέλο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας που κωδικοποιεί ένα σύνολο αντικειμένων και τις θέσεις τους ως ακολουθία εισόδου χρησιμοποιώντας ένα δίκτυο και αποκωδικοποιεί αυτή την αναπαράσταση χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο γλώσσας. Δείχνουμε στην εργασία μας ότι αυτό το μοντέλο παρά τη χρήση ενός κωδικοποιητή ακολουθίας μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να αναπαριστά σύνθετες σχέσεις χωροαντικειμένου-αντικειμένου και να παράγει περιγραφές που είναι παγκοσμίως συνεκτικές και σημασιολογικά σχετικές. Δοκιμάζουμε την προσέγγισή μας για το έργο της περιγραφής διάταξης αντικειμένων στο σύνολο δεδομένων με την παραγωγή προτάσεων που δίνονται μόνο σχολιασμούς αντικειμένων. Επιπλέον, αποδεικνύουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας σε συνδυασμό με έναν ανιχνευτή αντικειμένων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας μπορεί να βελτιώσει την ακρίβεια ενός μοντέλου λεζάντας εικόνας.', 'hu': 'A képekhez szükséges feliratok generálása a közelmúltban jelentős figyelmet kapott. Egy másik típusú vizuális bemenet az absztrakt jelenetek vagy objektum elrendezések, ahol az egyetlen információ az objektumok halmaza és azok helye. Ez a típusú képek gyakran megtalálhatók számos alkalmazásban a számítógépes grafika, a virtuális valóság és a storyboarding. Ebben a tanulmányban feltárjuk az OBJ2TEXT modellt, amely egy LSTM hálózat segítségével bemeneti sorozatként kódolja az objektumok halmazát és helyét, és ezt az ábrázolást LSTM nyelvi modell segítségével dekódolja. Tanulmányunkban megmutatjuk, hogy ez a modell a sorozatkódoló használata ellenére hatékonyan képes komplex térbeli objektum-objektum kapcsolatokat képviselni és globálisan koherens és szemantikailag releváns leírásokat készíteni. Az MS-COCO adatkészletben található objektumelrendezések leírására irányuló megközelítésünket úgy teszteljük, hogy kizárólag objektumjegyzetekkel rendelkező mondatokat készítünk. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk egy korszerű objektumérzékelővel kombinálva javíthatja a képalkotási modell pontosságát.', 'it': "Generare didascalie per le immagini è un compito che ha recentemente ricevuto notevole attenzione. Un altro tipo di input visivi sono scene astratte o layout di oggetti in cui l'unica informazione fornita è un insieme di oggetti e la loro posizione. Questo tipo di immagini si trova comunemente in molte applicazioni in computer grafica, realtà virtuale e storyboarding. Esploriamo in questo articolo OBJ2TEXT, un modello sequenza-sequenza che codifica un insieme di oggetti e le loro posizioni come sequenza di input utilizzando una rete LSTM, e decodifica questa rappresentazione utilizzando un modello di linguaggio LSTM. Mostriamo nel nostro articolo che questo modello nonostante l'utilizzo di un codificatore di sequenza può rappresentare efficacemente complesse relazioni spaziali oggetto-oggetto e produrre descrizioni globalmente coerenti e semanticamente rilevanti. Testiamo il nostro approccio per il compito di descrivere layout di oggetti nel dataset MS-COCO producendo frasi con annotazioni di oggetti. Mostriamo inoltre che il nostro modello combinato con un rilevatore di oggetti all'avanguardia può migliorare la precisione di un modello di didascalia delle immagini.", 'kk': 'Кескіндердің айдарларын құру - жаңа уақытта маңызды болған тапсырма. Көрінетін басқа түрі - абстракты сәзірлер немесе нысандар сәйкестіктері. Келтірілген тек мәліметі нысандар мен орналасуылар жиынында. Бұл кескіндердің түрі компьютер графикасында, виртуалды шындық және жүктеу бағыттарында көптеген қолданбаларда табылады. Біз осы қағазда OBJ2TEXT дегенді зерттеп, олардың орналасуын LSTM желімен кодтамыз және олардың орналасуын LSTM тіл үлгісімен түрлендіру үлгісін кодтамыз. Біз қағазда, бұл модель реттеу кодерін қолдануға қарамастан, комплексті жергілікті нысандар мен нысандар қатынасын көрсетуге болады және әлемдегі сәйкес және семантикалық қатынасын жасауға болады. Біз MS- COCO деректер қорларындағы нысандарды таңдау тапсырмасын тек нысандарды анықтау тапсырмасын тексереміз. Біз қосымша, өзіміздің моделіміз суреттің айдарлау үлгісінің дұрыстығын жақсартуға болады.', 'lt': 'Paveikslų antraščių kūrimas yra užduotis, kurią neseniai labai daug dėmesio skyrė. Kitas vaizdo įvedimų tipas yra abstrakčios scenos arba objektų išdėstymai, kai vienintelė pateikta informacija yra objektų rinkinys ir jų vieta. Šių vaizdų tipą dažnai galima rasti daugelyje programų kompiuterinėje grafikoje, virtualioje realybėje ir istorijoje. We explore in this paper OBJ2TEXT, a sequence-to-sequence model that encodes a set of objects and their locations as an input sequence using an LSTM network, and decodes this representation using an LSTM language model.  Mūsų dokumente parodomi, kad šis modelis, nepaisant sekos kodavimo, gali veiksmingai atspindėti sudėtingus erdvinių objektų ir objektų santykius ir pateikti apibūdinimus, kurie yra pasauliniu mastu nuoseklūs ir semantiškai svarbūs. Mes bandome savo požiūrį į užduotį aprašyti objektų išdėstymus MS-COCO duomenų rinkinyje, pateikdami tik objektų anotacijas pateiktus sakinius. Be to, rodome, kad mūsų modelis kartu su naujausiais objektų detektoriais gali pagerinti vaizdo pavadinimo modelio tikslumą.', 'mk': 'Generating captions for images is a task that has recently received considerable attention.  Друг вид на визуелни внесувања се апстрактни сцени или распоредувања на објекти каде единствената информација што се обезбедува е сет објекти и нивните локации. Овој тип на слики е обично пронајден во многу апликации во компјутерска графика, виртуелна реалност и приказни. Истражуваме во оваа хартија OBJ2TEXT, модел од секвенца до секвенца кој кодира сет објекти и нивни локации како влезна секвенца користејќи ЛСТМ мрежа, и го декодира ова претставување користејќи јазички модел ЛСТМ. Во нашата хартија покажуваме дека овој модел и покрај користењето на секвенциски кодер може ефективно да претставува комплексни просторни односи со објекти и да создаде описи кои се глобално кохерентни и семантично релевантни. We test our approach for the task of describing object layouts in the MS-COCO dataset by producing sentences given only object annotations.  Дополнително покажуваме дека нашиот модел комбиниран со најдобриот детектор на објекти може да ја подобри точноста на моделот за наслов на слика.', 'ms': 'Menjana tajuk bagi imej adalah tugas yang baru-baru ini menerima perhatian yang besar. Jenis input visual lain adalah adegan abstrak atau bentangan objek dimana satu-satunya maklumat yang diberikan adalah set objek dan lokasi mereka. This type of imagery is commonly found in many applications in computer graphics, virtual reality, and storyboarding.  Kami mengeksplorasi dalam kertas ini OBJ2TEXT, model jujukan-ke-jujukan yang mengekodkan set objek dan lokasi mereka sebagai jujukan input menggunakan rangkaian LSTM, dan mengekodkan perwakilan ini menggunakan model bahasa LSTM. Kami menunjukkan dalam kertas bahawa model ini walaupun menggunakan pengekod urutan boleh mewakili hubungan objek-objek ruang kompleks secara efektif dan menghasilkan deskripsi yang secara global konsisten dan relevan secara semantik. We test our approach for the task of describing object layouts in the MS-COCO dataset by producing sentences given only object annotations.  Kami tambahan menunjukkan bahawa model kami bergabung dengan detektor objek-state-of-the-art boleh meningkatkan ketepatan model captioning imej.', 'ml': 'images-action വേറൊരു തരം കാഴ്ചയുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും സ്ഥലങ്ങളുടെയും വിവരങ് കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ഗ്രാഫിക്ക്, വാര്\u200dച്ചുവലിയ യാഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ്യത്തിലും സ്റ്റോബോര്\u200dഡിങ്ങിലും ഈ ചിത്രം സാധാരണമായി കാണുന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ട്രോ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d, അത് ഒരു സെക്കന്\u200dസ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അവയുടെ സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റം നെറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു സെക്കന്\u200dസ് കോഡെര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചാലും സ്പാസ്റ്റിയില്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d  MS-CO ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള നമ്മുടെ നടപടി പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. കൊടുക്കുന്ന വസ്തുവ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്-ആര്\u200dട്ട് സംവിധാനം ഡിക്ടറിനോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ intestaturi għall-immaġni hija kompitu li reċentement irċeviet attenzjoni konsiderevoli. Tip ieħor ta’ inputs viżwali huma xeni astratti jew disinji ta’ oġġetti fejn l-unika informazzjoni pprovduta hija sett ta’ oġġetti u l-postijiet tagħhom. Dan it-tip ta’ immaġni jinstab b’mod komuni f’ħafna applikazzjonijiet fil-grafika tal-kompjuter, fir-realtà virtwali, u fil-storyboarding. We explore in this paper OBJ2TEXT, a sequence-to-sequence model that encodes a set of objects and their locations as an input sequence using an LSTM network, and decodes this representation using an LSTM language model.  Fid-dokument tagħna nuru li dan il-mudell minkejja l-użu ta’ kodifikatur tas-sekwenza jista’ jirrappreżenta b’mod effettiv relazzjonijiet kumplessi bejn oġġett ġeografiku u oġġett ġeografiku u jipproduċi deskrizzjonijiet li huma globalment koerenti u semantikament rilevanti. Aħna ntestjaw l-approċċ tagħna għall-kompitu li niddeskrivu t-tqassim tal-oġġetti fis-sett tad-dejta MS-COCO billi nipproduċu sentenzi mogħtija biss annotazzjonijiet tal-oġġetti. Barra minn hekk, naraw li l-mudell tagħna flimkien ma’ detettur tal-oġġetti l-aktar avvanzat jista’ jtejjeb il-preċiżjoni ta’ mudell tal-intestatura tal-immaġni.', 'pl': 'Generowanie napisów do zdjęć to zadanie, które ostatnio zyskało dużą uwagę. Innym rodzajem wejść wizualnych są abstrakcyjne sceny lub układy obiektów, w których jedyną informacją jest zestaw obiektów i ich lokalizacja. Ten rodzaj obrazów jest powszechnie spotykany w wielu aplikacjach w grafice komputerowej, wirtualnej rzeczywistości i storyboardzie. Badamy w niniejszym artykule OBJ2TEXT, model sekwencji-sekwencji, który koduje zestaw obiektów i ich lokalizacje jako sekwencję wejściową za pomocą sieci LSTM i dekoduje tę reprezentację za pomocą modelu językowego LSTM. W naszym artykule pokazujemy, że model ten pomimo zastosowania kodera sekwencji może skutecznie reprezentować złożone relacje obiektu-obiektu przestrzennego i tworzyć opisy spójne globalnie i istotne semantycznie. Testujemy nasze podejście do zadania opisującego układy obiektów w zbiorze danych MS-COCO poprzez tworzenie zdań podanych tylko adnotacjami obiektów. Dodatkowo pokazujemy, że nasz model w połączeniu z najnowocześniejszym detektorem obiektów może poprawić dokładność modelu napisów obrazu.', 'ro': 'Generarea de subtitrări pentru imagini este o sarcină care a primit recent o atenție considerabilă. Un alt tip de intrări vizuale sunt scene abstracte sau aspecte de obiecte în care singura informație furnizată este un set de obiecte și locațiile acestora. Acest tip de imagini se găsește frecvent în multe aplicații în grafică computerizată, realitate virtuală și storyboarding. Explorăm în această lucrare OBJ2TEXT, un model secvență-la-secvență care codează un set de obiecte și locațiile lor ca o secvență de intrare folosind o rețea LSTM și decodează această reprezentare folosind un model de limbaj LSTM. Aratăm în lucrarea noastră că acest model, în ciuda utilizării unui codificator de secvență, poate reprezenta în mod eficient relațiile spațiale complexe obiect-obiect și poate produce descrieri coerente la nivel global și semantic relevante. Testăm abordarea noastră pentru sarcina de a descrie aspecte de obiecte în setul de date MS-COCO prin producerea de propoziții date doar adnotări de obiecte. În plus, arătăm că modelul nostru combinat cu un detector de obiecte de ultimă generație poate îmbunătăți acuratețea unui model de subtitrare a imaginii.', 'mn': 'Шинэ зураг дээр нэр бий болгох нь саяхан анхаарал авсан ажил юм. Өөр нэг төрлийн үзүүлэлтийн орнууд бол абстракт сцен эсвэл объект төлөвлөгөө. Гэвч өгсөн ганц мэдээлэл объект болон тэдний байр суурь юм. Энэ төрлийн зураг компьютерийн график, виртуал бодит байдал, түүхийн хөгжлийн олон програм дээр ихэвчлэн олдог. Бид энэ цаасан дээр OBJ2TEXT-г судалж, олон объектуудыг, орнуудыг LSTM сүлжээ ашиглан коддог дарааллын загвар юм. Бид цаасан дээр энэ загвар дарааллын коддогч ашиглаж байгаа ч комплекс огторгуйн объект-объект холбоотой байдлыг илэрхийлж, дэлхий дээр нийгмийн холбоотой, хэмжээний холбоотой тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой Бид MS-COCO өгөгдлийн санд объектын төлөвлөгөөг тайлбарлах үйл ажиллагааг шалгаж үздэг. Зөвхөн объектын жагсаалт өгсөн өгүүлбэрээр өгүүлбэрээр. Мөн бидний загварын загвар нь урлагийн объект detektoрын байр суурь байдлаар холбогдож байгааг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Oppretting av tittel for bilete er ei oppgåve som nyleg har motteken mykje oppmerksomhet. Ein annan type visual inndata er abstrakt scenar eller objektoppsett der den einaste informasjonen som er oppgjeven er eit sett av objekt og plasseringar sine. Denne typen bilete er vanlegvis funne i mange program i datagrafikk, virtuelle virkelighet og lagringsboard. Vi utforskar i denne papiret OBJ2TEXT, eit sekvens- til- sekvensmodell som kodar eit sett objekt og plasseringa sine som ei inndata- sekvens med ein LSTM- nettverk, og dekode dette representasjonen med ein LSTM- språk- modell. Vi viser i papiret vårt at denne modellen, selv om ein sekvenskoder brukar, kan effektivt representere komplekse mellomromobjektrelasjonar og produsere skildringar som globalt er koherent og semantisk relevante. Vi testar tilnærminga vårt for oppgåva om å skildra objekteutformingar i datasettet MS-COCO ved å produsera setningar berre gjeve objektnotasjonar. I tillegg viser vi at modellen vår kombinasjon med eit kunstdetektor kan forbetra nøyaktigheten til eit biletetsamling.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka sawirada waa shaqo aad ugu dhowaad u fiirsatay. Midabka kale oo aragtida ah waa aragtida ama alaabta wax lagu sameeyo oo kaliya ee macluumaadka la siiyo waa meelo ay ku yaalaan. Sida caadiga ah sawirkan waxaa laga helaa codsiyooyin badan oo ku yaala sawir, sawir, dhab ahaan iyo taariikhda. Waxaan ka baaraynaa warqadan OBJ2TEXT, model aad soo socoto, kaas oo ku qoran alaab badan iyo meelahooda ay ku qoran yihiin mid ku soo bandhigta shabakadda LSTM, waxaana ka koobnaynaa noocyada luqada LSTM. Waxaan warqadeena ka muuqanaynaa in inkastoo ay isticmaalaan koonfureed ay si faa’iido leh u muuqan karaan xiriirka wax-objebinta adag iyo ay soo saari karaan qoraal ay ku xiran yihiin caalamiga iyo halka kala duwan. Waxaynu ku tijaabinaynaa qaababka loo qorayo dhamaadka oo lagu qorayo macluumaadka MS-CO oo ku qorayo xuquuqda oo keliya oo la soo saaray dhibaatooyin kaliya. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in modellkayaga la xidhiidhiyey xaalad-sawir-sawir-sawir-sawir-qabsashada.', 'sr': 'Generiranje naslova za slike je zadatak koji je nedavno primio značajnu pažnju. Druga vrsta vizuelnih ulaza su abstraktivne scene ili objektivne rasporede gdje je jedina informacija pružena grupa objekata i njihovih lokacija. Ova vrsta slika se uobičajeno nalazi u mnogim aplikacijama na kompjuterskoj grafici, virtualnoj realnosti i priču. Istražujemo u ovom papiru OBJ2TEXT, model sekvence do sekvence koji kodira niz objekata i njihovih lokacija kao sekvence ulaska koristeći mrežu LSTM, i dekodira ovu predstavu koristeći LSTM jezički model. U našim novinama pokazujemo da ovaj model uprkos korištenju sekvenčnog kodera može efikasno predstavljati kompleksne veze sa prostornim objektima i proizvoditi opise koje su globalno saskaņotne i semantički relevantne. Testiramo naš pristup zadatku opisanja objekata u sastavu podataka MS-COCO-a proizvodnjem rečenica dodatnim samo oznakem objekata. Dodatno pokazujemo da naš model kombiniran sa detektorom stanja umjetnih objekata može poboljšati tačnost model a snimanja slika.', 'si': 'පින්තූර සඳහා කැප්ටම් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ අවසානයෙන් ගොඩක් අවධානය ලැබුනු වැඩක්. වෙනත් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් දිහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය හෝ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය හෝ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සැකසුම මේ පින්තූර වර්ගයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පරිගණකය ග්\u200dරාෆික්ස්, අවස්ථාවක ඇත්ත, සහ කතාබට්ටුවක් පැත් අපි මේ පත්තර OBJ2TEXT වල පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, පත්තර වලින් පත්තර වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, LSTM ජාලයෙක් භාවිත කරනවා, LSTM භාෂා මොඩේලයෙක් භාවිත කරන්න,  අපි අපේ පත්තරේ පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න සහ ස්පර MS-COCO දත්ත සෙට්ටුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා. අපි තවත් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂකයෙක් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන්', 'sv': 'Att skapa bildtexter för bilder är en uppgift som nyligen har fått stor uppmärksamhet. En annan typ av visuella ingångar är abstrakta scener eller objektlayouter där den enda informationen som ges är en uppsättning objekt och deras placering. Denna typ av bilder finns ofta i många applikationer inom datorgrafik, virtuell verklighet och storyboarding. Vi utforskar i denna uppsats OBJ2TEXT, en sekvens-till-sekvensmodell som kodar en uppsättning objekt och deras platser som en inmatningssekvens med hjälp av ett LSTM-nätverk, och avkodar denna representation med hjälp av en LSTM språkmodell. Vi visar i vår uppsats att denna modell trots att använda en sekvenskodare effektivt kan representera komplexa rumsliga objekt-objekt relationer och producera beskrivningar som är globalt sammanhängande och semantiskt relevanta. Vi testar vårt tillvägagångssätt för uppgiften att beskriva objektlayouter i MS-COCO datauppsättningen genom att producera meningar som endast ges objektanteckningar. Dessutom visar vi att vår modell i kombination med en toppmodern objektdetektor kan förbättra noggrannheten hos en bildtextningsmodell.', 'ta': 'பிம்பங்களுக்கான தலைப்புகளை உருவாக்குவது சமீபத்தில் பெரிய கவனம் பெற்றது. மற்றொரு வகையான பார்வை உள்ளீடுகள் காட்சிகள் அல்லது பொருள் உருவரைகள் தான் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் மட்டுமே பொருட்கள் மற்றும் தங This type of imagery is commonly found in many applications in computer graphics, virtual reality, and storyboarding.  நாம் இந்த காகிதத்தில் OBJ2TEXT, பின்வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரியில் தேடுகிறோம். இது பொருள் மற்றும் தங்கள் இடங்களை LSTM பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்தி உள்ளீடு வரிச நாம் எங்கள் காகிதத்தில் காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் இந்த மாதிரி தொடர்பு குறியீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி சிக்கலான வெளியீட்டு பொருள் தொடர்பு MS- CO தகவல் அமைப்பில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்கள் மட்டும் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பொருள் குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்குவதற் நாம் கூடுதலாக காட்டுகிறோம் நம் மாதிரி ஒரு நிலையில்- கலை பொருள் கண்டுபிடிப்பாளருடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது ஒரு பிம்பத்தை பிட', 'ur': 'تصاویروں کے لئے کاپٹ پیدا کرنے کا ایک کام ہے جو اچھے سے بہت اچھی توجه حاصل کیا گیا ہے. اور ایک دوسری ویزیئل اینپوٹ کی طرح abstract scenes یا object layouts ہیں جہاں صرف اطلاعات دی گئی ہے object وں اور ان کی جگہ. اس طرح کی تصاویری معمولاً کمپیوٹر گرافیکس، ویرچولیٹ حقیقت اور کہانی بورد میں بہت سی کاربریوں میں پائی جاتی ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں OBJ2TEXT میں اچھی تلاش کرتے ہیں، ایک کاغذ-تا-کاغذ موڈل جو ایک مجموعہ objectوں اور ان کی جگہ کو LSTM نیٹ ورک کے مطابق ایک اینپ ورک کے ساتھ کوڈ کرتا ہے، اور اس نمایش کو LSTM زبان موڈل کے مطابق دکوڈ کرتا ہے. ہم اپنے کاغذ میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مدل ایک سطح کا انکوڈر استعمال کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ پیچیدہ فضائی اتحادیک-اتحادیک کے ارتباط کو مثبت سے دکھائے سکتے ہیں اور ان کی توصیفیں پیدا کرسکتے ہیں جو globally coherent اور semantically relevant ہیں. ہم نے اپنے طریقے کا امتحان کرنا چاہا ہے کہ MS-COCO ڈاٹ سٹ میں اوبوٹ لئائیوں کی توصیف کریں، صرف اوبوٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ اٹ آئیں۔ ہم اضافہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل ایک ایڈیٹ اوبوکسٹ ڈاکٹر کے ساتھ مل گیا ہے ایک ایڈیٹ کاپٹینگ موڈل کے دقیق کو بہتر کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Ushbu rasm turi kompyuter grafikdagi ko'p dasturda topilmadi, virtual haqiqida va yuklanmoqda. Biz bu qogʻozdagi OBJ2TEXT, cheksiz to'xtatish modeli, bir nechta obʼektlar va joylarini LSTM tarmoqni yordamida qoʻyish tarkibi sifatida kodlash mumkin, va bu tashkilotni LSTM tili modeli yordamida kodlash mumkin. Biz qogʻozimizda ko'rsatganimiz mumkin, bu model cheksiz kodlash yordamida murakkablik spatial obʼekt bilan bog'liqlarni ko'rsatish mumkin va dunyo bir xil va semantik muhit bo'lgan taʼriflarni yaratish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis We additionally show that our model combined with a state-of-the-art object detector can improve the accuracy of an image captioning model.", 'vi': 'Phát ra chú thích về ảnh là một nhiệm vụ vừa được chú ý đáng kể. Một kiểu nội dung thị giác khác là các cảnh trừu tượng hoặc bố trí đối tượng nơi mà thông tin duy nhất được cung cấp là một tập thể và vị trí của chúng. Loại hình ảnh này thường được tìm thấy trong nhiều ứng dụng trong đồ họa máy tính, thực tế ảo, và cách câu chuyện. Chúng ta sẽ khám phá trên trang này một mô hình lặp tự động mã hóa các đối tượng và vị trí của chúng như một chuỗi nhập bằng một mạng lưới LSTM, và giải mã các mô hình này bằng một mô hình ngôn ngữ LSTM. Chúng tôi cho thấy trên báo cáo rằng mặc dù mã hóa chuỗi có thể đại diện cho các mối quan hệ đối tượng với vũ trụ phức tạp và tạo ra mô tả liên quan đến toàn cầu và theo ngữ nghĩa. Chúng tôi thử cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi cho nhiệm vụ mô tả bố trí đối tượng trong bộ dữ liệu xơ rải rác CO bằng cách tạo câu chỉ chú thích đối tượng. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi kết hợp với máy dò đối tượng hiện đại có thể nâng cao độ chính xác của mô hình ảnh.', 'nl': 'Het genereren van ondertitels voor afbeeldingen is een taak die de laatste tijd veel aandacht heeft gekregen. Een ander type visuele input zijn abstracte scènes of objectlay-outs waarbij de enige informatie die wordt verstrekt een set objecten en hun locaties is. Dit type beelden wordt vaak gevonden in veel toepassingen in computergraphics, virtual reality en storyboarding. We onderzoeken in dit artikel OBJ2TEXT, een sequentie-naar-sequentiemodel dat een reeks objecten en hun locaties codeert als een invoersequentie met behulp van een LSTM netwerk, en decodeert deze representatie met behulp van een LSTM taalmodel. We laten in ons artikel zien dat dit model ondanks het gebruik van een sequence encoder complexe ruimtelijke object-object relaties effectief kan weergeven en beschrijvingen kan produceren die wereldwijd coherent en semantisch relevant zijn. We testen onze aanpak voor het beschrijven van object lay-outs in de MS-COCO dataset door zinnen te produceren die alleen object annotaties bevatten. Daarnaast tonen we aan dat ons model in combinatie met een state-of-the-art objectdetector de nauwkeurigheid van een beeldonderschriftmodel kan verbeteren.', 'da': 'Generering af billedtekster til billeder er en opgave, der for nylig har fået stor opmærksomhed. En anden type visuelle input er abstrakte scener eller objektlayout, hvor de eneste oplysninger, der gives, er et sæt objekter og deres placeringer. Denne type billeder findes ofte i mange applikationer i computergrafik, virtual reality og storyboarding. Vi udforsker i dette papir OBJ2TEXT, en sekvens-til-sekvens model, der koder et sæt objekter og deres placeringer som en inputsekvens ved hjælp af et LSTM netværk, og dekoder denne repræsentation ved hjælp af en LSTM sprogmodel. Vi viser i vores artikel, at denne model trods brug af en sekvenskoder effektivt kan repræsentere komplekse rumlige objekt-objektrelationer og producere beskrivelser, der er globalt sammenhængende og semantisk relevante. Vi tester vores tilgang til opgaven med at beskrive objektlayout i MS-COCO datasættet ved at producere sætninger med kun objektannotationer. Vi viser desuden, at vores model kombineret med en state-of-the-art objektdetektor kan forbedre nøjagtigheden af en billedtekstmodel.', 'hr': 'Generiranje načina za slike je zadatak koji je nedavno primio značajnu pažnju. Druga vrsta vizualnih ulaganja su abstraktne scene ili objektivne rasporede gdje je jedina informacija pružena skupa objekata i njihovih lokacija. Ova vrsta slika obično se nalazi u mnogim aplikacijama na računalnom grafiku, virtualnoj realnosti i priču. Istražujemo u ovom papiru OBJ2TEXT, model sekvence do sekvence koji kodira niz objekata i njihovih lokacija kao sekvence ulaska koristeći LSTM mrežu i dekodira ovu zastupanje koristeći LSTM jezički model. U našim novinama pokazujemo da ovaj model uprkos korištenju sekvenčnog kodera može učinkovito predstavljati kompleksne veze s prostornim objektima i proizvoditi opise koje su globalno saskaņotne i semantički relevantne. Testiramo naš pristup zadatku opisanja objekata u podacima MS-COCO-a proizvodnjom rečenica dodatnih samo oznake objekata. Osim toga, pokazujemo da naš model kombiniran s detektorom stanja umjetnosti može poboljšati preciznost model a snimanja slika.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на надписи за изображения е задача, която наскоро получи значително внимание. Друг вид визуални входове са абстрактни сцени или оформления на обекти, където единствената предоставена информация е набор от обекти и техните местоположения. Този тип изображения често се среща в много приложения в компютърната графика, виртуалната реалност и сценария. В тази статия изследваме модел последователност към последователност, който кодира набор от обекти и техните местоположения като входна последователност, използвайки мрежа и декодира това представяне, използвайки езиков модел. В нашата статия показваме, че този модел, въпреки използването на последователен кодер, може ефективно да представлява сложни пространствени взаимоотношения обект-обект и да произвежда описания, които са глобално съгласувани и семантично релевантни. Изпробваме подхода си за задачата за описване на оформления на обекти в набора от данни чрез създаване на изречения, дадени само обектни анотации. Освен това показваме, че нашият модел, съчетан с най-съвременния детектор на обекти, може да подобри точността на модела за надпис на изображение.', 'id': 'Menjana tajuk untuk gambar adalah tugas yang baru-baru ini menerima perhatian yang besar. Jenis input visual lain adalah adegan abstrak atau layout objek dimana satu-satunya informasi yang diberikan adalah set objek dan lokasi mereka. Jenis gambar ini biasanya ditemukan dalam banyak aplikasi dalam grafik komputer, realitas virtual, dan storyboarding. Kami mengeksplorasi dalam kertas ini OBJ2TEXT, sebuah model urutan-ke-urutan yang mengekodikan set objek dan lokasi mereka sebagai urutan input menggunakan jaringan LSTM, dan mengekodikan representati ini menggunakan model bahasa LSTM. Kami menunjukkan di kertas kami bahwa model ini meskipun menggunakan pengekode urutan dapat secara efektif mewakili hubungan objek-objek ruang kompleks dan menghasilkan deskripsi yang secara global konsisten dan semantis relevan. Kami menguji pendekatan kami untuk tugas menjelaskan layout objek di dataset MS-COCO dengan memproduksi kalimat yang diberikan hanya annotasi objek. Kami tambahan menunjukkan bahwa model kami bergabung dengan detektor objek state-of-the-art dapat meningkatkan akurasi model captioning gambar.', 'de': 'Das Generieren von Bildunterschriften ist eine Aufgabe, die in letzter Zeit große Aufmerksamkeit erfahren hat. Eine andere Art von visuellen Eingaben sind abstrakte Szenen oder Objektlayouts, bei denen die einzige Information eine Menge von Objekten und deren Positionen ist. Diese Art von Bildern wird häufig in vielen Anwendungen in Computergrafik, Virtual Reality und Storyboarding gefunden. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir OBJ2TEXT, ein Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell, das eine Menge von Objekten und deren Positionen als Eingabesequenz mithilfe eines LSTM-Netzwerks kodiert und diese Darstellung mithilfe eines LSTM-Sprachmodells dekodiert. Wir zeigen in unserer Arbeit, dass dieses Modell trotz Verwendung eines Sequenzkoders komplexe räumliche Objekt-Objekt-Beziehungen effektiv darstellen und Beschreibungen erzeugen kann, die global kohärent und semantisch relevant sind. Wir testen unseren Ansatz zur Beschreibung von Objektlayouts im MS-COCO Datensatz, indem wir Sätze produzieren, die nur Objektannotationen enthalten. Zusätzlich zeigen wir, dass unser Modell in Kombination mit einem hochmodernen Objektdetektor die Genauigkeit eines Bildunterschriftsmodells verbessern kann.', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza vichwa vya picha ni kazi ambayo hivi karibuni imepokea hisia kubwa. Aina nyingine ya vitu vinavyoonekana ni visheni au vifaa vya vitu ambavyo taarifa pekee vilivyotolewa ni seti ya vitu na maeneo yao. aina hii ya picha imepatikana mara nyingi katika programu nyingi za kompyuta, ukweli wa kawaida, na kupandisha habari. Tunapunguza katika gazeti hili la OBJ2TEXT, modeli ya mfululizo-kwa-mfululizo inayojumuisha seti ya vitu na maeneo yao kama mfululizo wa input kwa kutumia mtandao wa LSTM, na kupunguza uwakilishi huu kwa kutumia mtindo wa lugha ya LSTM. Tunaonyesha katika gazeti letu kuwa, pamoja na kutumia mfululizo wa mfululizo unaweza kuwakilisha mahusiano magumu ya vitu vya anga na kutengeneza maelezo yanayohusiana na kimataifa na yanayohusiana na kimataifa. Tunajaribu hatua yetu kwa ajili ya jukumu la kuelezea vipengele vya vitu katika taarifa za MS-CO kwa kutengeneza hukumu zinazopewa matatizo tu ya vitu. Tunaonyesha kwa nyongeza kuwa muundo wetu uliunganishwa na mtazamo wa hali ya sanaa unaweza kuboresha ukweli wa muonekano wa kuchukua picha.', 'ko': '그림에 자막을 만드는 것은 최근에 주목받는 임무이다.또 다른 유형의 시각적 입력은 추상적인 장면이나 대상 레이아웃인데 그 중에서 제공하는 유일한 정보는 한 그룹의 대상과 그 위치이다.이런 유형의 이미지는 통상적으로 컴퓨터 도형학, 가상 현실과 이야기판의 많은 응용에 존재한다.본고는 OBJ2TEXT를 연구했는데 이것은 일종의 서열에서 서열 모델이다. LSTM 네트워크를 이용하여 한 그룹의 대상과 위치를 입력 서열로 인코딩하고 LSTM 언어 모델을 이용하여 이런 표현을 디코딩한다.우리는 본고에서 서열 인코더를 사용했음에도 불구하고 이 모델은 복잡한 공간 대상 관계를 효과적으로 나타내고 전체적인 일치와 의미와 관련된 설명을 생성할 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리는 대상의 주석만 주는 문장을 생성함으로써 MS-COCO 데이터에서 대상의 레이아웃을 집중적으로 묘사하는 방법을 테스트합니다.또한 우리의 모델은 가장 선진적인 목표 검측기와 결합하여 이미지 자막 모델의 정확성을 높일 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'ایجاد عنوان برای تصاویر یک کار است که اخیرا توجه بسیار زیادی را دریافت کرده است. نوع دیگر ورودهای دیده\u200cای صحنه\u200cهای مطلق یا طرح\u200cهای شیء است که تنها اطلاعات داده شده\u200cاند، مجموعهٔ شیء و محل\u200cهایشان است. این نوع تصاویر معمولا در بسیاری از کاربردها در گرافیک کامپیوتر، واقعیت مجازی و تغییر داستان یافت می\u200cشود. ما در این کاغذ OBJ2TEXT کشف می\u200cکنیم، یک مدل رده به رده\u200cای که مجموعه اشیاء و محل\u200cهایشان را به عنوان رده\u200cای وارد می\u200cکند با یک شبکه LSTM، و این نمایش را با استفاده از مدل زبان LSTM دکود می\u200cکند. ما در کاغذ خودمان نشان می دهیم که این مدل با وجود استفاده از یک رمز رمز می تواند به طور تاثیر رابطه های شیء فضایی پیچیده را نمایش دهد و توصیف\u200cهای جهانی که به طور کلی هماهنگ و semantically ارتباط دارند را تولید کند. ما روش خودمان را برای کار توصیف طراحی اشیاء در مجموعه داده MS-COCO با تولید کردن جمله\u200cهای تنها توضیح اشیاء داده می\u200cکنیم. ما به اضافه نشان می دهیم که مدل ما با یک بازرس موجود هنری متصل شده است می تواند دقیق یک مدل عنوان تصویر را بهتر کند.', 'tr': "Resimler üçin käpşenler bejermek üçin bir täze. Bu iň soňra möhüm üns berilýän zadyr. Görsel girişi başga bir hili Abstrakt sahypalar ýa zady düzümlendirler. Bu ýerde diňe berilen maglumat bir zady we olaryň ýerlerinde durulýar. Bu hili resim köpüsi kompýuter grafiklerinde, wirtuel çykyşlyklarda we maýdançalarda tapylýar. Biz bu kagyzda OBJ2TEXT'i keşif edip, bir dizi-terjime nusgasyny LSTM a ýdan ullan çykyş we bu representasyony LSTM dil nusgasyna ulanyp ködleýäris. Biz kağıtlarımızda bu model in in bir dizi kodlayıcının kullanmasına rağmen karmaşık uzay nesne-nesne ilişkilerini temsil edip dünýäde kohereket ve semantik olarak önemli bir tasvir edeni gösteriyoruz. MS-COCO veri sistemindeki zadlary tassyklamak üçin öňümizi barlaýarys diňe zadyň täzeliklerini saýlamak üçin. Biz hem modelimiz bir sanat taýýarlayıcısı bilen birleşmiş bir nusga görkezilýäni görkez. Resim taýýarlama nusgasyny gowurap biler.", 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር መልዕክት ይህ ዓይነት መልዕክት በብዙ ፕሮግራሞች፣ የውይይት ውነት እና አቀማመጥ በመጫን ውስጥ ተገኝቷል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም OBJ2TEXT፣ የክፍለ ምርጫዎች እና ቦታዎቻቸውን የLSTM መረብ በመጠቀም የጥያቄ ክፍል እና ይህንን መልዕክት LSTM ቋንቋ ምሳሌ በመጠቀም ይክድ እናደርጋለን፡፡ We show in our paper that this model despite using a sequence encoder can effectively represent complex spatial object-object relationships and produce descriptions that are globally coherent and semantically relevant.  አካባቢውን አካባቢ አካባቢዎችን በመጠቀም በMS-CO ዳታ ማሳየትን እናስፈትናለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም እናሳያቸዋለን፤ ሞዴላዎቻችን ከሀገር-አካል አካል አካባቢ አካባቢ ጋር የተደላደለ የምስል አካባቢ አካሄዱን ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡', 'af': "Genereer titels vir beelde is 'n taak wat onlangs aandagbaar aandag ontvang het. 'n Ander tipe visuele inprop is abstrakte scene of objekte uitlegte waar die enigste inligting verskaf is 'n stel van objekte en hul ligging. Hierdie tipe beeld is gewoonlik gevind in baie programme in rekenaar grafieke, virtuele realiteit en storyboarding. Ons ondersoek in hierdie papier OBJ2TEXT, 'n sequence- to- sequence model wat kodeer 'n stel van voorwerpe en hul liggings as 'n invoer volgorde gebruik 'n LSTM netwerk, en dekodeer hierdie voorstelling met 'n LSTM taal model. Ons wys in ons papier dat hierdie model, selfs die gebruik van 'n sekwensiekoder, effektief komplekse spasiele objekte-voorwerpe verhouding kan verteenwoordig en beskrywings wat globale koherent en semantiese relevante is. Ons probeer ons toegang vir die taak van beskrywing van voorwerp uitlegte in die MS- COCO datastel deur te produseer setinge gegee slegs voorwerp notasies. Ons wys daarvan dat ons model gekombineer is met 'n staat-van-die-kuns-voorwerp-detekteerder kan die presies van 'n beeldtitelsmodel verbeter.", 'hy': 'Պատկերների վերնագրություններ ստեղծելը մի խնդիր է, որը վերջերս շատ ուշադրություն է ստացել: Տեսային ներմուծների այլ տեսակը վերացական բնապատկերներ կամ օբյեկտների դիզայներ են, որտեղ միակ տրամադրված տեղեկատվությունը օբյեկտների շարք և դրանց տեղադրություններ է: Այս տեսակի նկարները հաճախ գտնվում են համակարգչային գրաֆիկայի, վիրտուալ իրականության և պատմությունների գրաֆիկայի շատ ծրագրերում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ՕԲՋ2TEXT-ը, մի հաջորդականության մոդել, որը կոդավորում է մի շարք առարկաներ և դրանց տեղադրությունները որպես մուտքային հաջորդականություն LStm ցանցի օգտագործման միջոցով, և կոդավորում է այս ներկայացումը LStm լեզվի մոդելի օգտագործման միջ Մենք մեր թղթի մեջ ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոդելը, չնայած հաջորդականության կոդերի օգտագործման, կարող է արդյունավետ ներկայացնել բարդ տարածական օբյեկտների և օբյեկտների հարաբերությունները և ստեղծել նկարագրություններ, որոնք համաշխարհային առ Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր մոտեցումը, որպեսզի նկարագրենք օբյեկտների կառուցվածքները SM-COCOCOի տվյալների համակարգում, ստեղծում ենք նախադասություններ, որոնք միայն նշում են օբյեկտները: We additionally show that our model combined with a state-of-the-art object detector can improve the accuracy of an image captioning model.', 'sq': 'Krijimi i titujve për imazhet është një detyrë që kohët e fundit ka marrë vëmendje të konsiderueshme. Një tjetër lloj hyrjesh vizuale janë skena abstrakte apo struktura objekte ku e vetmja informacion që jepet është një sërë objekteve dhe vendet e tyre. Ky lloj imazhesh gjendet zakonisht në shumë aplikime në grafikën kompjuterike, realitetin virtual dhe shkrimin e historive. Ne eksplorojmë në këtë letër OBJ2TEXT, një model sekuencë-në-sekuencë që kodon një sërë objekteve dhe vendeve të tyre si një sekuencë hyrjeje duke përdorur një rrjet LSTM, dhe dekodizon këtë përfaqësim duke përdorur një model gjuhësh LSTM. Ne tregojmë në letrën tonë se ky model pavarësisht nga përdorimi i një kodifikues sekuence mund të përfaqësojë efektivisht marrëdhënie komplekse objekt-objekt hapësirë dhe të prodhojë përshkrime që janë globalisht koherente dhe semantikisht të rëndësishme. Ne testojmë qasjen tonë për detyrën e përshkrimit të strukturave të objekteve në sistemin e të dhënave MS-COCO duke prodhuar fjalë të dhëna vetëm anotacionet e objekteve. Përveç kësaj tregojmë se modeli ynë i kombinuar me një detektor objekti më të lartë mund të përmirësojë saktësinë e një modeli të titullimit të imazhit.', 'az': "Görüntülər üçün başlıqlar yaratmaq son zamanlarda çox gözəl məlumat alınan bir işdir. Başqa bir görsel giriş növü abstrakt sahələrdir və ya objek düzenlərindir. Onların tək məlumatları objektlərin və yerilərinin bir qurduğu yerdir. Bu cür görüntülər kompjuter grafiklərində, virtual reallığında və hekayələrində çox proqramlarda görülür. Biz bu kağızda OBJ2TEXT'i keşif edirik, bir nöqtə və yerlərini LSTM a ğ vasitəsilə kodlayıb, bu göstərişni LSTM dil modeli vasitəsilə kodlayır. Biz kağıdımızda göstəririk ki, bu modellərin seçmə kodlayıcını istifadə etməyə rağmen kompleks uzay objek-objek ilişkilerini göstərə bilər və dünya həyatında möhkəm və semantik olaraq məlumatlarını təşkil edə bilər. Biz MS-COCO verilənlərin məlumatının vəzifələrini təsbit etmək üçün tərzimizi sınağa çəkirik. Sadəcə objek məlumatlarını təsbit edir. Əvvəlcə modellərimizin bir mövcud objektu detektoru ilə birləşdirilməsini göstəririk ki, şəkillərin başlıq modelinin doğruluğunu daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər.", 'bs': 'Generiranje naslova za slike je zadatak koji je nedavno primio značajnu pažnju. Druga vrsta vizuelnih ulaza su abstraktivne scene ili objektivne rasporede gdje je jedina informacija pružena grupa objekata i njihovih lokacija. Ova vrsta slika se uobičajeno nalazi u mnogim aplikacijama na kompjuterskoj grafici, virtualnoj realnosti i ploči priče. Istražujemo u ovom papiru OBJ2TEXT, model sekvence do sekvence koji kodira niz objekata i njihovih lokacija kao sekvence ulaska koristeći LSTM mrežu i dekodira ovu zastupanje koristeći LSTM jezički model. U našim novinama pokazujemo da ovaj model uprkos korištenju sekvenčnog kodera može učinkovito predstavljati kompleksne veze s prostornim objektima i proizvoditi opise koje su globalno saskaņotne i semantički relevantne. Testiramo naš pristup zadatku opisanja objekata u podacima MS-COCO-a proizvodnjom rečenica dodatnim samo oznakem objekata. Dodatno pokazujemo da naš model kombiniran sa detektorom stanja umjetnosti može poboljšati preciznost model a imenovanja slika.', 'bn': 'Generating captions for images is a task that has recently received considerable attention.  আরেকটি ধরনের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি বা বস্তুর বৈশিষ্ট্য যেখানে শুধুমাত্র তথ্য প্রদান করা হয়েছে সেটি বস্তু এবং তাদের অবস্থান। কম্পিউটার গ্রাফিক্স, ভার্চুয়াল বাস্তবতা এবং স্টোরিবোর্ডিং এ এই ধরনের ছবি পাওয়া যায়। আমরা এই পত্রিকা ওবিজে২টেক্স টি খুঁজে বের করি, একটি সেকেন্ড-থেকে সেকেন্ড মডেল যা একটি সেট বস্তু এবং তাদের অবস্থান এনকোড করে একটি ইনপুট নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে এবং এলএসএমএস ভাষার আমরা আমাদের কাগজে দেখাচ্ছি যে এই মডেলটি সেকেন্ড এনকোডার ব্যবহার করা সত্ত্বেও কার্যকর করে স্পেশিয়াল বস্তুর সম্পর্কের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করতে পারে এবং বি আমরা শুধুমাত্র বস্তুর বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়বস্তু বিবরণের জন্য এমএস-কমো ডাটাসেটে বর্ণনা করার জন্য আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া পরীক্ষা করি। আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল একটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প বস্তু ডিটেক্টরের সাথে সম্পৃক্ত হয়েছে একটি ছবি ক্যাপ্টেশন মডেলের', 'ca': "Generar títulos per a imatges és una tasca que fa poc ha rebut molta atenció. Un altre tipus d'entrades visuals són escenes abstractes o dissenys d'objectes on l'única informació proporcionada és un conjunt d'objectes i els seus llocs. Aquest tipus d'imatge es troba comunament en moltes aplicacions en gràfics informàtics, realitat virtual i escriptura de històries. En aquest article OBJ2TEXT, un model de seqüència a seqüència que codifica un conjunt d'objectes i els seus llocs com una seqüència d'entrada utilitzant una xarxa LSTM, i codifica aquesta representació utilitzant un model de llenguatge LSTM. Mostrem en el nostre paper que aquest model malgrat l'ús d'un codificador de seqüència pot representar efectivament relacions complexes entre objectes espacials i objectes i produir descripcions globalment coherents i semànticament rellevants. Testem el nostre enfocament per a la tasca de descriure disposicions d'objectes al conjunt de dades MS-COCO produint frases donades només anotacions d'objectes. També demostram que el nostre model combinat amb un detector d'objectes més avançat pot millorar la precisió d'un model de capturació d'imatges.", 'et': 'Piltide pealdiste genereerimine on ülesanne, millele on hiljuti pööratud märkimisväärset tähelepanu. Teist tüüpi visuaalsed sisendid on abstraktsed stseenid või objektipaigutused, mille ainus teave on objektide kogum ja nende asukoht. Seda tüüpi pilte leidub tavaliselt paljudes arvutigraafika, virtuaalreaalsuse ja storyboarding rakendustes. Käesolevas töös uurime OBJ2TEXT-i, järjestusest järjestuseni mudelit, mis kodeerib objektide kogumi ja nende asukohad sisendjärjestusena LSTM võrgu abil ning dekodeerib selle esituse LSTM keelemudeli abil. Tõestame oma töös, et see mudel, vaatamata jadakooderi kasutamisele, suudab tõhusalt esindada keerukaid ruumiobjekti ja objekti suhteid ning luua kirjeldusi, mis on globaalselt sidusad ja semantiliselt olulised. Testime oma lähenemisviisi objektipaigutuste kirjeldamise ülesandele MS-COCO andmekogumis, tootes lauseid, mis sisaldavad ainult objekti annotatsioone. Lisaks näitame, et meie mudel koos kaasaegse objektidetektoriga võib parandada pildi pildistamise mudeli täpsust.', 'cs': 'Generování titulků pro obrázky je úkol, který se v poslední době věnoval značné pozornosti. Dalším typem vizuálních vstupů jsou abstraktní scény nebo rozložení objektů, kde poskytnuté jediné informace jsou sada objektů a jejich umístění. Tento typ snímků se běžně nachází v mnoha aplikacích v počítačové grafice, virtuální realitě a storyboardu. V tomto článku zkoumáme OBJ2TEXT, model sekvence-sekvence, který kóduje sadu objektů a jejich umístění jako vstupní sekvenci pomocí LSTM sítě, a dekóduje tuto reprezentaci pomocí LSTM jazykového modelu. V našem článku ukazujeme, že tento model i přes použití sekvenčního kodéru může efektivně reprezentovat složité vztahy prostorového objektu a objektu a vytvářet popisy, které jsou globálně koherentní a sémanticky relevantní. Náš přístup k popisu rozložení objektů v datové sadě MS-COCO testujeme vytvořením vět s pouze anotacemi objektů. Dále ukazujeme, že náš model v kombinaci s nejmodernějším detektorem objektů může zlepšit přesnost modelu popisků obrazu.', 'fi': 'Kuvatekstien luominen kuville on tehtävä, joka on viime aikoina saanut huomattavaa huomiota. Toisentyyppiset visuaaliset syötteet ovat abstrakteja kohtauksia tai objektiasetteluja, joissa annetaan vain joukko objekteja ja niiden sijaintia. Tämäntyyppisiä kuvia esiintyy yleisesti monissa tietokonegrafiikassa, virtuaalitodellisuudessa ja kuvakäsikirjoituksessa. Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan OBJ2TEXT-mallia, joka koodaa joukon objekteja ja niiden sijaintia syöttösekvenssina LSTM-verkon avulla, ja dekoodaa tämä esitys LSTM-kielimallin avulla. Osoitamme artikkelissamme, että tämä malli sekvenssianturin käytöstä huolimatta pystyy tehokkaasti edustamaan monimutkaisia paikkatietokohde-objektisuhteita ja tuottamaan maailmanlaajuisesti johdonmukaisia ja semanttisesti merkityksellisiä kuvauksia. Testaamme lähestymistapaamme objektiasettelujen kuvaamiseen MS-COCO-aineistossa tuottamalla lauseita, joissa annetaan vain objektimerkintöjä. Lisäksi osoitamme, että mallimme yhdistettynä viimeisimpään esineenilmaisimeen voi parantaa kuvatekstitysmallin tarkkuutta.', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje napisov za slike je naloga, ki je v zadnjem času prejela veliko pozornosti. Druga vrsta vizualnih vhodov so abstraktni prizori ali postavitve predmetov, kjer je edina podana informacija nabor predmetov in njihove lokacije. Ta vrsta slik je pogosto najdena v številnih aplikacijah v računalniški grafiki, virtualni resničnosti in storyboarding. V tem članku raziskujemo OBJ2TEXT, model zaporedja do zaporedja, ki kodira nabor objektov in njihove lokacije kot vhodno zaporedje z uporabo LSTM omrežja, in dekodira to predstavitev z uporabo LSTM jezikovnega modela. V prispevku smo pokazali, da lahko ta model kljub uporabi zaporednega kodirja učinkovito predstavlja kompleksne odnose prostorskega objekta-objekta in ustvari opise, ki so globalno koherentni in semantično relevantni. Naš pristop za nalogo opisovanja postavitev objektov v naboru podatkov MS-COCO preizkušamo tako, da ustvarimo stavke, podane samo objektne opombe. Dodatno dokazujemo, da lahko naš model v kombinaciji z najsodobnejšim detektorjem objektov izboljša natančnost modela za zapisovanje slik.', 'he': 'יצירת תווים לתמונות היא משימה שקיבלה לאחרונה תשומת לב משמעותית. סוג אחר של כניסות ויזואליות הם סצנות אובסטרקטיות או פיצוי אובייקטים שבו המידע היחיד שנספק הוא קבוצה של אובייקטים ומיקומיהם. This type of imagery is commonly found in many applications in computer graphics, virtual reality, and storyboarding.  אנו חוקרים בעיתון הזה OBJ2TEXT, מודל רצף לרצף שמקודד קבוצה של אובייקטים ומיקומים שלהם כרצף הכניסה באמצעות רשת LSTM, ומקודד את היציגה הזאת באמצעות מודל שפה LSTM. אנו מראים בעיתון שלנו שמודל זה למרות השימוש במקוד רצף יכול מייצג בעובדה מערכות יחסים מרובכות אובייקט-אובייקט מרחבי ויוצר תיאורים שהם עוקבים באופן גלובלי ורלוונטי סמנטי. אנו בודקים את הגישה שלנו למשימה לתאר פיצועי אובייקטים במערכת נתונים של MS-COCO על ידי יצירת משפטים שנתנו רק ציונים אובייקטים. בנוסף, אנו מראים שהמודל שלנו משולב עם גלאי אובייקטים מצוין ביותר יכול לשפר את מדויקת מודל ציור תמונה.', 'ha': "Mai ƙiƙiro sunayen sunayen wa zane ni wani aikin wanda ya motsa zura kallo. Wani nau'in da aka gane shi yana da tsari masu tsari ko abun duk wanda aka samar da shi kawai, da tsarin abubuwa da wurin. Wannan aina zane ko da yawa za'a sãmu cikin wasu shiryoyin kwamfyuta, da gaskiya na'ura da kuma adana cikin tsarin. Tuna karatun cikin wannan takardan OBJ2TeXT, wata misãlin-sauri-zuwa-sequence wanda ke kodi tsarin abubuwa da wurin da ke da matsayinsu kamar wani sequence da ke amfani da wani shirin LTRM, kuma yana koda wannan wakin da ke amfani da wani misalin harshen LSSM. Tuna nuna cikin takardu da mu cẽwa, kuma kõ da ya yi amfani da kodi na matsayi, wannan misalin zai iya ƙididdige danganta masu cikin abun-abun fili masu adadi da kuma za'a zaɓe misãlai da ke da amfani da shi a cikin duniya. Tuna jarraba hanyarmu ga aikin ka bayyana abun cikin tsarin MA-CO da za'a zartar da ƙananan abun da aka ba shi kawai. Tuna nuna misalinmu da haɗi da wani halin-abun-art kan ya canza tsarin motel mai tsaron zane.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop Slang iki ning kelas nang aplikasi sing paling-itik ning komputer, werak-itik lan ngaturang kanggo mbatalé Awak dhéwé éntukno karo paper iki OBj2MEXT, model sing sekondirno-to-sekondirno oleh nggawe bagian object karo lokasi nggawe layar sistem input akhir di sistem input akhir: layar, lan ngawe ngubah sistem iki oleh dumateng manut oleh dumateng ilhasar tentang Awak dhéwé éntuk ning mapuran iki banget nggawe modèl kuwi nggawe nguasai koder sing ditambah basa kang karo perusahaan object-object ka dipun-perusahaan karo akeh basa isura sakjane lan semantar dumadhi. ame Awak dhéwé nambah ngono kuwi model sing ditambah akeh nesaturan karo state-of-the-arts object', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་བརྗོད་པར་གསར་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནི་དོན་ལ་ཉེ་ཆར་དུ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུ མཐོང་བའི་ནང་འཇུག་པ་གཞན་ཞིག་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་དངོས་ཡིག་བཀོད་སྒྲིག This type of imagery is commonly found in many applications in computer graphics, virtual reality, and storyboarding. We explore in this paper OBJ2TEXT, a sequence-to-sequence model that encodes a set of objects and their locations as an input sequence using an LSTM network, and decodes this representation using an LSTM language model. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་ནང་དུ་མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ཅིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་གསལ་རིམ་པ་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་དངོས་པོ་སྣང་ཚོའི་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་འདི་ལ་ངོས་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་འབད་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གི་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་དངོས་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'End-to-end Neural Coreference Resolution', 'ar': 'دقة Coreference العصبية الشاملة', 'pt': 'Resolução de Correferência Neural de ponta a ponta', 'fr': 'Résolution de coréférence neuronale de bout en bout', 'es': 'Resolución de correlación neuronal de extremo a extremo', 'ja': 'エンドツーエンドのニューラルコアレファレンス分解能', 'zh': '端到端神经共推理解析', 'hi': 'एंड-टू-एंड न्यूरल कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन', 'ru': 'Сквозное разрешение нейронной кореференции', 'ga': 'Rún Croílár Néarach ó cheann go ceann', 'ka': 'ბოლოდან დასრულებული ნეიროლური კოფერენციის რეზოციო', 'hu': 'End-to-end idegkoreferencia feloldás', 'el': 'Ολοκληρωμένο ψήφισμα νευρωνικής συγχώνευσης', 'it': 'Risoluzione end-to-end della coreferenza neurale', 'mk': 'Резолуција на неурална кореференција од крај до крај', 'lt': 'Nuo galo iki galo Neuralinės koreferencijos rezoliucija', 'kk': 'Нейрондық қадамдастыру айырымдылығы', 'ms': 'Resolusi Kesuaian Neural Akhir-Akhir', 'ml': 'അവസാനം മുതല്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിപ്പോള്\u200dഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Riżoluzzjoni ta’ Koreferenza Newrali minn tmiem sa tmiem', 'mn': 'Эцэст нь эцэст нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шийдвэр', 'no': 'Avslutt til slutt nøyrale koreferanse oppløysing', 'pl': 'Kompleksowa rezolucja współpracy neuronowej', 'sr': 'Резолюција невралног кореференције до конца', 'ro': 'Rezoluţie completă a corefenţei neurale', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් නිර්මාණ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂණය', 'ta': 'முடிவு- முடிவு', 'so': 'End-to-end Neural Coreference Resolution', 'sv': 'End-to-end Neural Coreference Resolution', 'ur': 'نائرئرال کرفرنس روشنی', 'uz': 'Andoza moslamalar', 'vi': 'Thần kinh kết thúc', 'bg': 'Разрешаване на нервната кореференция край до край', 'da': 'End-to-end Neural Coreference resolution', 'hr': 'Rezolucija Neuralne korisnosti', 'nl': 'End-to-end Neural Coreference Resolutie', 'de': 'End-to-End Neurale Coreferenz Resolution', 'ko': '단말기부터 단말기까지 신경 관련 해상도', 'fa': 'حل\u200cسازی\u200cهای فعالیت عصبی به پایان', 'id': 'Resolusi Koreferensi Neural Akhir-Akhir', 'sw': 'Hudumu ya Uwezekano wa Neural', 'af': 'Einde- na- einde Nural Koreferensie Resolusie', 'sq': 'Rezoluta e Koreferencës Neurale nga fundi në fund', 'hy': 'Վերջ-ի վերջ նյարդային կորֆերանսի լուծումն', 'bn': 'শেষ- থেকে শেষ নিউরেল কোরেফেন্সের রিপশন', 'az': 'Nöral Qurğu Çözünürlük', 'tr': 'Nytaral Korekçysy Çaşyrma', 'cs': 'Rozlišení komplexní neuronové koreference', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'et': 'Lõpp-lõpuni neuraalse korefeferentsi lahendus', 'fi': 'Neurologisen Coreferenssin kokonaisratkaisu', 'bs': 'Rezolucija Neuralne koreferencije', 'ca': 'Resolució de coreferència neuronal de final a final', 'jv': 'Resolusi layang-pakan Neral Karo Resolusi', 'he': 'הפתרון של היחסים העצביים בסוף עד הסוף', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Odločitev nevronske koreference od konca do konca', 'bo': 'མཇུག་མའི་དུས་མའི་སྐྱེལ་གཞུང་ལུགས་གདམ་ཁ་ཚོགས'}
{'en': 'We introduce the first end-to-end coreference resolution model and show that it significantly outperforms all previous work without using a syntactic parser or hand-engineered mention detector. The key idea is to directly consider all spans in a document as potential mentions and learn distributions over possible antecedents for each. The model computes span embeddings that combine context-dependent boundary representations with a head-finding attention mechanism. It is trained to maximize the marginal likelihood of gold antecedent spans from coreference clusters and is factored to enable aggressive pruning of potential mentions. Experiments demonstrate state-of-the-art performance, with a gain of 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes benchmark and by 3.1 F1 using a 5-model ensemble, despite the fact that this is the first approach to be successfully trained with no external resources.', 'ar': 'نقدم أول نموذج دقة مرجعية شاملة ونبين أنه يتفوق بشكل كبير على جميع الأعمال السابقة دون استخدام محلل نحوي أو كاشف ذكر مصمم يدويًا. الفكرة الأساسية هي النظر بشكل مباشر في جميع الامتدادات في المستند كإشارات محتملة وتعلم التوزيعات على السوابق المحتملة لكل منها. يحسب النموذج عمليات التضمين الممتدة التي تجمع بين تمثيلات الحدود المعتمدة على السياق مع آلية جذب الانتباه. يتم تدريبه على تعظيم الاحتمال الهامشي لمسافات سابقة للذهب من مجموعات المرجان ويتم تحديده في العوامل لتمكين التقليم العدواني للإشارات المحتملة. تُظهر التجارب أداءً متطورًا ، مع زيادة 1.5 F1 على معيار OntoNotes وبواسطة 3.1 F1 باستخدام مجموعة من 5 نماذج ، على الرغم من حقيقة أن هذا هو النهج الأول الذي يتم تدريبه بنجاح بدون موارد خارجية.', 'fr': "Nous présentons le premier modèle de résolution de coréférence de bout en bout et montrons qu'il surpasse largement tous les travaux précédents sans utiliser d'analyseur syntaxique ou de détecteur de mention conçu à la main. L'idée clé est de considérer directement toutes les portées d'un document comme des mentions potentielles et d'apprendre les distributions sur les antécédents possibles pour chacune d'elles. Le modèle calcule des intégrations de travées qui combinent des représentations de limites dépendantes du contexte avec un mécanisme d'attention qui permet de trouver la tête. Il est formé pour maximiser la probabilité marginale de plages d'antécédent aurifère à partir d'amas de coréférence et est pris en compte pour permettre une élagage agressif des mentions potentielles. Les expériences démontrent des performances de pointe, avec un gain de 1,5 F1 sur le benchmark OntoNotes et de 3,1 F1 avec un ensemble de 5 modèles, malgré le fait qu'il s'agit de la première approche à être entraînée avec succès sans ressources externes.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos o primeiro modelo de resolução de correferência de ponta a ponta e mostramos que ele supera significativamente todo o trabalho anterior sem usar um analisador sintático ou um detector de menção projetado à mão. A ideia principal é considerar diretamente todos os períodos em um documento como menções potenciais e aprender distribuições sobre possíveis antecedentes para cada um. O modelo calcula incorporações de extensão que combinam representações de limites dependentes do contexto com um mecanismo de atenção de localização de cabeças. Ele é treinado para maximizar a probabilidade marginal de intervalos antecedentes de ouro de clusters de correferência e é fatorado para permitir a poda agressiva de menções potenciais. Os experimentos demonstram desempenho de última geração, com um ganho de 1,5 F1 no benchmark OntoNotes e de 3,1 F1 usando um conjunto de 5 modelos, apesar de esta ser a primeira abordagem a ser treinada com sucesso sem recursos externos.', 'es': 'Presentamos el primer modelo de resolución de correferencia de extremo a extremo y demostramos que supera significativamente a todos los trabajos anteriores sin utilizar un analizador sintáctico o un detector de menciones diseñado a mano. La idea clave es considerar directamente todos los intervalos de un documento como posibles menciones y aprender las distribuciones sobre los posibles antecedentes de cada uno. El modelo calcula las incrustaciones de span que combinan representaciones de límites dependientes del contexto con un mecanismo de atención que busca cabezas. Está entrenado para maximizar la probabilidad marginal de que el antecedente de oro se extienda a partir de conglomerados de correferencia y se factoriza para permitir una poda agresiva de posibles menciones. Los experimentos demuestran un rendimiento de vanguardia, con una ganancia de 1.5 F1 en el punto de referencia OntoNotes y de 3.1 F1 utilizando un conjunto de 5 modelos, a pesar de que este es el primer enfoque que se capacita con éxito sin recursos externos.', 'ja': '最初のエンドツーエンドのコアリファレンス解決モデルを導入し、構文解析器や手動で設計されたメンション検出器を使用せずに、これまでのすべての作業を大幅に上回るパフォーマンスを示しました。重要なアイデアは、ドキュメント内のすべてのスパンを潜在的な言及として直接検討し、それぞれの可能性のある前段階にわたって分布を学習することです。このモデルは、文脈依存の境界表現とヘッドファインディングの注意メカニズムを組み合わせたスパン埋め込みを計算します。これは、コアレファレンスクラスターからの金先行スパンの限界可能性を最大化するように訓練され、潜在的な言及の積極的な枝刈りを可能にするように要因づけられています。実験では、OntoNotesベンチマークで1.5F1、5モデルのアンサンブルを使用した3.1F1の最先端のパフォーマンスが実証されていますが、これは外部リソースなしでトレーニングに成功した最初のアプローチです。', 'zh': '首言端到端之分析模型,明其不用句法解析器巧之提检测器,其性明优于前也。 要心者,直以文档中所有跨度为潜提,而学跨度在可前置项上之分。 其模度嵌跨度,当嵌上下文关界,与头查合。 练成最大化金前验跨共指簇之际,而虑在内,以极剪潜。 实验展先进之性,得1.5 F1于OntoNotes,用5成3.1 F1,虽一成功于无外者也。', 'hi': 'हम पहले एंड-टू-एंड कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन मॉडल का परिचय देते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि यह वाक्यात्मक पार्सर या हाथ से इंजीनियर उल्लेख डिटेक्टर का उपयोग किए बिना पिछले सभी कामों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है। मुख्य विचार सीधे संभावित उल्लेख के रूप में एक दस्तावेज़ में सभी spans पर विचार करने के लिए और प्रत्येक के लिए संभव पूर्ववर्तियों पर वितरण सीखने के लिए है। मॉडल स्पैन एम्बेडिंग की गणना करता है जो एक सिर-खोज ध्यान तंत्र के साथ संदर्भ-निर्भर सीमा प्रतिनिधित्व को जोड़ता है। यह coreference समूहों से सोने के पूर्ववर्ती spans की सीमांत संभावना को अधिकतम करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और संभावित उल्लेखों की आक्रामक छंटाई को सक्षम करने के लिए factored है। प्रयोगों में स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट प्रदर्शन का प्रदर्शन किया गया है, जिसमें OntoNotes बेंचमार्क पर 1.5 F1 के लाभ के साथ और 5-मॉडल पहनावा का उपयोग करके 3.1 F1 द्वारा, इस तथ्य के बावजूद कि यह कोई बाहरी संसाधनों के साथ सफलतापूर्वक प्रशिक्षित होने वाला पहला दृष्टिकोण है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем первую сквозную модель разрешения ядра и показываем, что она значительно превосходит все предыдущие работы без использования синтаксического анализатора или ручного детектора упоминания. Ключевая идея состоит в том, чтобы непосредственно рассматривать все пролеты в документе как потенциальные упоминания и изучать распределения по возможным предшественникам для каждого. Модель вычисляет вложения диапазона, которые объединяют контекстно-зависимые граничные представления с механизмом фокусного внимания. Он обучен максимизировать предельную вероятность золотых антецедентных пролетов от кластеров сердечника и учитывается для обеспечения агрессивной обрезки потенциальных упоминаний. Эксперименты демонстрируют современную производительность с коэффициентом усиления 1,5 F1 на примере OntoNotes и 3,1 F1 с использованием 5-модельного ансамбля, несмотря на то, что это первый подход, который был успешно обучен без внешних ресурсов.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach an chéad mhúnla réitigh croí-chomhdhála ceann go ceann agus léirímid go sáraíonn sé go suntasach an obair ar fad a rinneadh roimhe seo gan úsáid a bhaint as parsálaí comhréire nó brathadóir lua lámh-innealtaithe. Is é an príomh-smaoineamh ná machnamh díreach a dhéanamh ar gach réise i ndoiciméad mar lua féideartha agus dáiltí a fhoghlaim thar réamhinsintí féideartha do gach ceann díobh. Ríomhann an tsamhail leabaithe réise a chomhcheanglaíonn uiríll teorann comhthéacs-spleách le meicníocht aird ceann-aimsithe. Tá sé traenáilte chun an dóchúlacht imeallach go mbeidh réisí tosaigh ór ó chnuasaigh chroílárnacha a uasmhéadú agus déantar é a chur san áireamh chun go bhféadfaí tagairtí féideartha a bhearradh go ionsaitheach. Léiríonn turgnaimh feidhmíocht úrscothach, le gnóthachan de 1.5 F1 ar thagarmharc OntoNotes agus trí 3.1 F1 ag baint úsáide as ensemble 5 samhail, in ainneoin gurb é seo an chéad chur chuige a ndearnadh oiliúint rathúil air gan aon acmhainní seachtracha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ პირველი ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო ბოლო მოდელს ჩვენებთ და ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ ეს ძალიან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ყველა წინა მუშაობ მნიშვნელოვანი იდეა, რომ ყველა დოკუმენტის განსხვავებაში ყველა განსხვავება როგორც შესაძლებელია განსხვავება და შესაძლებელი ანტეცენტების განსხვავება. მოდელის შემდეგ კონტექსტურის განსაკუთრებულებების განმავლობა, რომლებიც კონტექსტურის განსაკუთრებულებების განსაკუთრებულებების გამოყენებას თავიდან მოძებნა ის აკეთებულია, რომ უფრო მაქსიმიზეცირება ვალტანტესენტის ანტესენტის სპენტირების მაქსიალური შესაძლებლობა, რომელსაც უფრო მაქსიალური კლასტრების შესაძლებლობა და შესაძლებელია პ ექსპერიმენტები გამოცდილობენ წარმოადგენების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც 1.5 F1-ის მონაცემებით OntoNotes ბენქმარკზე და 3.1 F1-ზე გამოყენებენ 5-მოდელის მონაცემებით, მაგრამ ეს არის პირველი მონაცემები, რომელიც წარმოად', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε το πρώτο μοντέλο ανάλυσης συναρτήσεων και δείχνουμε ότι ξεπερνά σημαντικά όλες τις προηγούμενες εργασίες χωρίς τη χρήση συντακτικού αναλυτή ή χειροποίητου ανιχνευτή αναφορών. Η βασική ιδέα είναι να εξετάσετε άμεσα όλες τις περιοχές σε ένα έγγραφο ως πιθανές αναφορές και να μάθετε διανομές πάνω από πιθανές προηγούμενες για κάθε ένα. Το μοντέλο υπολογίζει ενσωματώσεις έκτασης που συνδυάζουν αναπαραστάσεις οριακών ορίων εξαρτώμενες από το περιβάλλον με έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής εντοπισμού κεφαλιού. Είναι εκπαιδευμένο για να μεγιστοποιήσει την οριακή πιθανότητα προηγούμενων περιόδων χρυσού από συστάδες συναφειρέσεων και λαμβάνεται υπόψη για να επιτρέψει το επιθετικό κλάδεμα πιθανών αναφορών. Τα πειράματα καταδεικνύουν επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, με κέρδος 1.5 F1 στο σημείο αναφοράς και 3.1 F1 χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνολο 5-μοντέλου, παρά το γεγονός ότι αυτή είναι η πρώτη προσέγγιση που εκπαιδεύεται επιτυχώς χωρίς εξωτερικούς πόρους.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az első end-to-end coreferencia felbontási modellt, és megmutatjuk, hogy jelentősen felülmúlja az összes korábbi munkát szintaktikus elemző vagy kézzel tervezett említődetektor használata nélkül. A kulcsfontosságú ötlet az, hogy közvetlenül tekintsük a dokumentum összes területét potenciális említésként, és tanuljuk meg a disztribúciókat a lehetséges előzmények felett. A modell olyan tartománybeágyazásokat számít ki, amelyek a kontextusfüggő határábrázolásokat kombinálják egy fejkereső figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmussal. Arra képezték ki, hogy maximalizálja az arany előzményeinek marginális valószínűségét a coreferencia klaszterektől, és tényezője lehetővé teszi a potenciális említések agresszív metszését. A kísérletek a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt mutatják, az OntoNotes referenciaértékén 1,5 F1-es, az 5 modelles együttes használatával pedig 3,1 F1-es nyereséggel, annak ellenére, hogy ez az első megközelítés, amelyet sikeresen képeznek külső erőforrások nélkül.', 'it': "Introducemo il primo modello end-to-end di risoluzione della coreferenza e mostriamo che supera significativamente tutti i lavori precedenti senza utilizzare un parser sintattico o un rilevatore di menzioni ingegnerizzato a mano. L'idea chiave è quella di considerare direttamente tutti gli intervalli di un documento come potenziali menzioni e imparare le distribuzioni sui possibili antecedenti per ciascuno. Il modello calcola le incorporazioni di span che combinano rappresentazioni di contorno dipendenti dal contesto con un meccanismo di attenzione head-finding. È addestrato per massimizzare la probabilità marginale di intervalli antecedenti dell'oro dai cluster di coreferenza ed è fattorizzato per consentire una potatura aggressiva di potenziali menzioni. Gli esperimenti dimostrano prestazioni all'avanguardia, con un guadagno di 1,5 F1 sul benchmark OntoNotes e di 3,1 F1 utilizzando un ensemble a 5 modelli, nonostante questo sia il primo approccio ad essere addestrato con successo senza risorse esterne.", 'kk': 'Біз бірінші аяқталу үлгісін таңдап, ол синтактикалық талдаушы не қол инженерлік анықтаушысы қолданбап, барлық алдыңғы жұмыс істейді. Негізгі идея - құжаттағы барлық меңзерлерді мүмкін алдын- ала көрсету және әрбір үшін мүмкін алдын- ала дистрибуттарды оқыту. Бұл үлгі контекстік тәуелді шектерді бағыттау механизмімен біріктіретін кеңістіктерді есептеп береді. Бұл алтын антецеденттің шегінің ықтималдығын сәйкестік кластерінен көбейту үшін оқылған және потенциалдық мәліметтердің агрессивні шегіні рұқсат ету үшін түсіндірілген. Тәжірибелер OntoNotes белгісінде 1,5 F1 және 3,1 F1 бағдарламасын 5 үлгісін қолдану үшін көрсетеді. Бұл - сыртқы ресурстар жоқ алғашқы жағдайды бірінші жағдай.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame pirmąjį nuo galo iki galo koreferencijos rezoliucijos model į ir parodysime, kad jis gerokai viršija visą ankstesnį darbą, nenaudodamas sintaktinio analizatoriaus arba rankiniu būdu sukurto minčių detektoriaus. Pagrindinė idėja yra tiesiogiai apsvarstyti visas dokumente esančias sritis kaip galimas paminėjimas ir išmokti paskirstyti kiekvieną iš galimų precedentų. Modelis apskaičiuoja intervalo įterpimus, kurie sujungia nuo konteksto priklausomus ribinius atvaizdus su galvos nustatymo dėmesio mechanizmu. Ji mokoma kuo labiau padidinti aukso priešpriešinių klasterių ribinę tikimybę ir yra naudojama taip, kad būtų galima agresyviai susmulkinti galimus paminėjimus. Eksperimentai rodo pažangiausius rezultatus, o OntoNotes lyginamasis rodiklis – 1,5 F1 ir 3,1 F1, naudojant 5 modelių kompleksą, nepaisant to, kad tai pirmasis metodas, kurį galima sėkmingai mokyti be išorės išteklių.', 'mk': 'Ние го претставуваме првиот модел на резолуција од крај до крај и покажуваме дека значително ја надминува целата претходна работа без користење синтактички анализатор или рачен детектор за спомени. Клучната идеја е директно да се сметаат сите области во документот како потенцијални спомени и да се научат дистрибуции над можните предходи за секој. Моделот ги компјутира вклучувањата на растојание кои комбинираат контекстно зависни гранични претставувања со механизам на внимание за пронаоѓање на главата. It is trained to maximize the marginal likelihood of gold antecedent spans from coreference clusters and is factored to enable aggressive pruning of potential mentions.  Експериментите демонстрираат најсовремени резултати, со добивка од 1,5 Ф1 на benchmark OntoNotes и од 3,1 Ф1 користејќи ансембл од 5 модели, и покрај фактот дека ова е првиот пристап кој успешно се тренира без надворешни ресурси.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model resolusi koreferensi akhir-akhir pertama dan menunjukkan bahawa ia secara signifikan melampaui semua kerja sebelumnya tanpa menggunakan penghurai sintaktik atau pengesan sebutan yang direka tangan. Idea utama ialah untuk secara langsung mempertimbangkan semua jangkauan dalam dokumen sebagai sebutan potensi dan belajar distribusi atas anteceden yang mungkin untuk setiap. Model menghitung penyambungan jangkauan yang menggabungkan perwakilan sempadan tergantung-konteks dengan mekanisme perhatian mencari kepala. Ia dilatih untuk maksimumkan kemungkinan marginal bagi jangkauan anteceden emas dari kumpulan coreference dan diperbuat untuk memungkinkan pemotongan agresif sebutan potensi. Eksperimen menunjukkan prestasi state-of-the-art, dengan keuntungan 1.5 F1 pada tanda referensi OntoNotes dan oleh 3.1 F1 menggunakan ensemble 5-model, walaupun ini adalah pendekatan pertama yang berjaya dilatih tanpa sumber luar.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu l-ewwel mudell ta’ riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza minn tarf sa tarf u nuru li dan iwettaq b’mod sinifikanti l-ħidma kollha preċedenti mingħajr l-użu ta’ analizzatur sintetiku jew detettur ta’ referenza inġinerizzat bl-idejn. L-idea ewlenija hija li l-firxiet kollha f’dokument jitqiesu direttament bħala msemmija potenzjali u jitgħallmu d-distribuzzjonijiet fuq anteċedenti possibbli għal kull wieħed. Il-mudell jikkalkula l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-firxa li jikkombinaw rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-fruntieri dipendenti fuq il-kuntest ma’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni għas-sejba tar-ras. Hija mħarrġa biex timmassimizza l-probabbiltà marġinali ta’ firxiet ta’ qabel id-deheb minn raggruppamenti ta’ koreferenza u hija fatturata biex tippermetti l-pruning aggressiv ta’ menzjonijiet potenzjali. Experiments demonstrate state-of-the-art performance, with a gain of 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes benchmark and by 3.1 F1 using a 5-model ensemble, despite the fact that this is the first approach to be successfully trained with no external resources.', 'ml': 'ആദ്യത്തെ അവസാനത്തേക്ക് അവസാനിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തി കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് മുമ്പുള്ള എല്ലാ ജോലിയെയും പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന് ഒരു രേഖയിലുള്ള എല്ലാ സ്പേനുകളെയും സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രഖ്യാപങ്ങളായി നേരിട്ട് വിതരണം പഠിക്കാനും സാധ്യതകള്\u200dക്ക്  മോഡല്\u200d സ്പെന്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് കണക്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്റെ കെന്\u200dസ്റ്റ്-ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന അതിരില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളെ കൂട്ടിചേ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് ക്ലാസ്റ്റരില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ ആന്\u200dറെന്\u200dറെന്\u200dറ് സ്പേന്\u200d സ്പേനുകളുടെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വലുതാക്കാന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളൊന്നുമില്ലാത്ത ആദ്യത്തെ പരിശീലനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d 1.5 എഫ്1 ന്റെ വേണ്ടി 1.5 എഫ്1 എടുക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Бид анхны төгсгөлд нь эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь эцэст нь шийдвэрлэлтийн загварыг танилцуулж, энэ нь синтактик ажиллагааг эсвэл гар инженерчлэн нээлтийн агуулагч ашиглахгүй бүх ажиллагааг маш чухал үр Хамгийн чухал санаа нь баримт бүх зай бүгдийг боломжтой хэлэлцүүлэх боломжтой зүйлсийн хуваарилалт сурах юм. Загвар нь контекст хамааралтай хил хязгаарын загваруудыг толгойд олох анхаарлын механизмээр нийлүүлдэг хэмжээсүүдийг тооцоолж байна. Энэ нь алтын хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний магадлалыг багасгах боломжтой бөгөөд боломжтой нэр дэвшүүлэх боломжтой юм. Илгээний туршилт нь OntoNotes-ийн багц дээр 1.5 F1 болон 3.1 F1-г 5 загварын загвар ашиглаж байгааг харуулж байна. Гэвч энэ нь гадаад нөөц багц байхгүй амжилттай сургалтын анхны арга загвар юм.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer den første modulen for oppløysing av koreferansen til slutten og viser at den utfører betydelig alle førre arbeid utan å bruka ein syntaksisk tolkar eller manuelt oppløysing. Nøkkelideen er å vurdere direkte alle mellomrom i eit dokument som potensielle minningar og lære distribusjonar over moglege antecedenter for kvar. Modellen reknar ut spendingsinnbyggingar som kombinerer kontekstavhengige grenserepresentasjonar med ein oppmerksmekanisme for å finna hovud. Det er trengd til å maksimere den marginale sannsynligheten for gull antecedent mellomrom frå koreferensklassar og blir faktorisert for å slå på aggressiv trekk av potensielle minningar. Eksperiment demonstrerer kunstendigheiten, med ein fordel av 1,5 F1 på OntoNotes-benchmarket og 3,1 F1 med ein 5-modell ensemble, selv om dette er den første tilnærminga som skal vellukkast trennast utan eksterne ressursar.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy pierwszy kompleksowy model rozdzielczości koreferencji i pokazujemy, że znacznie przewyższa wszystkie poprzednie prace bez użycia parsera składni czy ręcznie zaprojektowanego detektora wzmianek. Kluczową ideą jest bezpośrednie uwzględnienie wszystkich zakresów w dokumencie jako potencjalnych wzmianek i nauczenie się rozkładów nad możliwymi poprzednimi dla każdego z nich. Model oblicza osadzenia rozpiętości, które łączą zależne od kontekstu reprezentacje granic z mechanizmem uwagi znajdującym głowę. Jest on przeszkolony, aby maksymalizować marginalne prawdopodobieństwo wystąpienia przedziałów złota z klastrów współdziałania i jest uwzględniany w celu umożliwienia agresywnego przycinania potencjalnych wzmianek. Eksperymenty pokazują najnowocześniejszą wydajność, z przyrostem 1,5 F1 na benchmarku OntoNotes oraz 3.1 F1 przy użyciu zespołu 5-modelowego, pomimo tego, że jest to pierwsze podejście, które z powodzeniem zostało przeszkolone bez zasobów zewnętrznych.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo prvi model rezolucije dobrote na kraju i pokazujemo da značajno iznosi sve prethodne poslove bez upotrebe sintaktičkog analizatora ili detektora spominjanja na rukama. Ključna ideja je da izravno smatramo svim prostorijama u dokumentu potencijalnim spominjanjima i naučimo distribuciju preko mogućih predsednika za svakog. Model raèunava španjolske integracije koje kombiniraju granične predstave na kontekstu sa mehanizam pažnje za pronalaženje glave. Trenirana je da maksimalizuje marginalnu verovatnoću zlatnih predsjedničkih prostora iz grupa dobrodošlosti i čini se da bi omogućila agresivno pružanje potencijalnih spomena. Eksperimenti pokazuju stanje umjetnosti, uz dobitak od 1,5 F1 na kriteriji OntoNotes i od 3,1 F1 koristeći ensemble za 5 model a, uprkos činjenici da je ovo prvi pristup koji će biti uspešno obučen bez vanjskih resursa.', 'si': 'අපි පළමු අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ අත් ඉංජිනියාර්තා පරීක්ෂකයක් නොප්\u200dරයෝජ මුළු අදහසය තමයි විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වලින් සියළු ස්ථානයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතික මොඩේල් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ස්පැන්ඩ් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් සම්බන්ධ සීමාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඔළුව හොයාගන්න අවධා ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වනවා state-of-the-art Perfection, with a win of 1.5 F1 on the ONtoNotes bench ark and by 3.1 F1 with a use of 5-Model ensEmble, though this is the first approach to be accompanied by no outside source.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaa model go'aanka ugu horraysa dhammaadka ugu dambaysta, waxaana tusaynaa in aad si weyn u sameynaysaa shaqada hore oo dhan iyadoon isticmaalin xarunta syntactic ama qofka ku qoran magaca. Fikirada muhiimka ah waa in si toos ah looga fikiraa dukumentiga oo dhan sida macluumaadka suurtagalka ah iyo in lagu baro kala qaybinta daryeelka ilkaha ee suurtagalka ah. Tusaalada waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa meelaha lagu soo galo, kaas oo ku soo ururiya xuduudaha ku xiran xuduudaha iyo xuduudaha ku xiran, waxayna leeyihiin meymisyo aad ka fiiriso. Waxaa la bartaa si aad u sii kordhiso suurtagalka dahabka ah oo ka soo baxa alaabta caadiga ah, waxaana la sameeyaa in la fududeeyo caqliga caadiga ah oo macluumaadka suurtagalka ah. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda xaaladda farshaxanka, iyadoo faa'iido ah 1.5 F1 ku taal bangiga OntoNotes iyo 3.1 F1 isticmaalaya dabeecada 5-model, inkastoo ay xaqiiqdii tahay in taasi waa kooxa ugu horeysa in la barto wax aan lahaynin resources dibadda ah.", 'ro': 'Introducem primul model end-to-end de rezoluție coreferență și arătăm că depășește semnificativ toate lucrările anterioare fără a utiliza un parser sintactic sau un detector de mențiuni manual. Ideea cheie este de a lua în considerare direct toate intervalele dintr-un document ca mențiuni potențiale și de a învăța distribuțiile peste posibilele antecedente pentru fiecare. Modelul calculează încorporări de spațiu care combină reprezentările de frontieră dependente de context cu un mecanism de atenție cap-găsire. Acesta este instruit pentru a maximiza probabilitatea marginală a acoperirilor antecedente aurului de la clusterele de coreferență și este factorat pentru a permite tăierea agresivă a mențiunilor potențiale. Experimentele demonstrează performanțe de ultimă generație, cu un câștig de 1,5 F1 pe benchmark OntoNotes și de 3,1 F1 utilizând un ansamblu de 5 modele, în ciuda faptului că aceasta este prima abordare care a fost instruită cu succes fără resurse externe.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar den första end-to-end-modellen för coreferensupplösning och visar att den avsevärt överträffar allt tidigare arbete utan att använda en syntaktisk parser eller handkonstruerad omnämnandedetektor. Nyckelidén är att direkt betrakta alla spännvidder i ett dokument som potentiella omnämnanden och lära sig distributioner över möjliga företeelser för varje. Modellen beräknar inbäddningar av spännvidd som kombinerar sammanhangsberoende gränsrepresentationer med en mekanism för att hitta huvudet. Den är utbildad för att maximera den marginella sannolikheten för guldföregångare spänner från coreference kluster och faktoreras för att möjliggöra aggressiv beskärning av potentiella omnämnanden. Experiment visar state-of-the-art prestanda, med en vinst på 1,5 F1 på OntoNotes benchmark och med 3,1 F1 med en 5-modell ensemble, trots att detta är det första tillvägagångssättet som framgångsrikt tränas utan externa resurser.', 'ta': 'முதல் முடிவு இறுதி முடிவு குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் அது அனைத்து முந்தைய வேலையையும் முடியு முக்கிய யோசனை நேரடியாக ஆவணத்தில் உள்ள அனைத்து ஸ்பென்ஸ்பேன்களையும் சாத்தியமான குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட இந்த மாதிரி ஸ்பென் உள்ளடக்கங்களை கணக்கிடுகிறது அது சூழல்- சார்ந்த எல்லைகள் குறிப்பிடும் தலைப்பு கண்டுபிடிக்கும் கவனம இது செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது கூட்டத்தின் கூட்டத்திலிருந்து தங்கக்கூடிய வாய்ப்பாடுகளை அதிகப்படுத்தப்படுத்தப்பட்டது மற்றும் சாத்தியமான இது வெளி மூலங்கள் இல்லாமல் பயிற்சி செய்ய முதல் வழியாக இருந்தாலும் முதல் முறையாகும்.', 'ur': 'ہم پہلی آنڈ-پائنٹ-پائنٹ-پائنٹ-پائنٹ کے مطابق رخصت موڈل کو معلوم کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ سب اگلے کام سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے بغیر کسی سینٹکتیک پائنٹر یا ہاتھ-انجینٹ Key idea is to direct consider all spans in a document as potential mentions and learn distribution over possible antecedents for each. Model computes span embeddings that combine context-dependent boundary representations with a head-finding attention mechanism. اس کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے کہ سونے کی آنٹیسڈینٹ گھوٹوں کی حد سے بڑھائے اور اس کے ذریعہ سے بڑھائے جاتے ہیں آزمائش کی حالت-آهنت کی پرورش دکھاتی ہے، اونٹ نوٹ بنچم مارک پر 1.5 F1 کی فائدہ دے رہی ہے اور 3.1 F1 کے ذریعہ 5-نمڈل انٹامبل کے مطابق، بغیر اس بات کے کہ یہ پہلی طریقہ ہے جو اس طریقہ سے کامیابی کے ساتھ بغیر کسی خارجی سرمایہ کے بغیر تع', 'uz': "Biz birinchi oxiriga birinchi chegara bog'lash modelini anglatamiz va bu birinchi ish modelini ko'rsatamiz, buni syntactik параметри ёки қўл-engineered holat tuzuvchisi yordamida ko'rsatadi. Mavzu fikri hujjatdagi hamma spanlarni aniqlash mumkin va har bir oddiy narsalar uchun tarqatishni o'rganish mumkin. Name Bu o'rganadigan narsalarning birinchi darajadagi narsalarning eng muhimligini oshirish uchun o'rganadi. Bu g'oyalar qo'llangan suhbatlardan ko'paytirish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu kiểu nghị quyết hạn cuối cùng đầu tiên và cho thấy nó khả năng vượt trội hơn tất cả các công việc trước đó mà không sử dụng một phân tích âm mưu hay máy phát hiện nhắc bằng tay. Chủ đề chính là xem trực tiếp tất cả chi tiết trong một tài liệu như có khả năng đề cập và học phân chia về những thứ có thể trước mỗi thứ. The model trời tính toán sự nhúng ngang mà kết hợp các biểu tượng biên giới dựa vào ngữ cảnh với một cơ chế tìm kiếm đầu. Nó được huấn luyện để tối đa khả năng hạn chế hàng tỷ lệ vàng so với các cụm có khả năng cao hơn, và được sản xuất để khai thác các dự liệu tiềm năng. Thí nghiệm cho thấy khả năng hiện đại hiện đại, với một lợi thế của 1.5 F1 trên tiêu chuẩn OntoNotes và của 3.1 F1, sử dụng một dàn hợp mô-5, mặc dù đây là cách thức đầu tiên được huấn luyện thành công mà không có tài nguyên ngoại.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer den første end-to-end coreference opløsning model og viser, at den betydeligt overgår alt tidligere arbejde uden at bruge en syntaktisk fortolker eller håndkonstrueret nævnelsesdetektor. Nøgleideen er direkte at overveje alle spænder i et dokument som potentielle omtaler og lære fordelinger over mulige forudgående elementer for hver. Modellen beregner spændingsindlejringer, der kombinerer kontekstafhængige grænserepræsentationer med en head-finding opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Det er uddannet til at maksimere den marginale sandsynlighed for guld forudgående spænder fra coreference klynger og er faktoreret for at muliggøre aggressiv beskæring af potentielle omtaler. Eksperimenter viser state-of-the-art ydeevne, med en gevinst på 1,5 F1 på OntoNotes benchmark og med 3,1 F1 ved hjælp af et 5-model ensemble, på trods af at dette er den første tilgang, der med succes trænes uden eksterne ressourcer.', 'bg': 'Представяме първия модел за разделителна способност от край до край и показваме, че той значително превъзхожда всички предишни работи, без да използва синтактичен анализатор или ръчно проектиран детектор за споменаване. Ключовата идея е директно да се разглеждат всички интервали в документа като потенциални споменания и да се научат разпределения над възможните предшественици за всеки. Моделът изчислява вграждания на обхвата, които комбинират зависими от контекста гранични представи с механизъм за намиране на вниманието. Той е обучен да максимизира маргиналната вероятност от златни предшественици от клъстери и е факториран, за да позволи агресивно подрязване на потенциални споменания. Експериментите демонстрират най-съвременните резултати, с печалба от 1,5 на бенчмарка и 3,1 използвайки 5-моделен ансамбъл, въпреки факта, че това е първият подход, който успешно се обучава без външни ресурси.', 'nl': 'We introduceren het eerste end-to-end coreference resolutiemodel en laten zien dat het aanzienlijk beter presteert dan al het vorige werk zonder gebruik van een syntactische parser of hand-engineered vermeldingsmelder. Het belangrijkste idee is om alle overspanningen in een document direct te beschouwen als potentiële vermeldingen en te leren verdelingen over mogelijke antecedenten voor elk. Het model berekent span embeddings die contextafhankelijke grensrepresentaties combineren met een head-finding attention mechanisme. Het is getraind om de marginale waarschijnlijkheid van goud antecedent overspanningen van coreference clusters te maximaliseren en wordt gefactoreerd om agressief snoeien van potentiële vermeldingen mogelijk te maken. Experimenten tonen state-of-the-art prestaties aan, met een aanwinst van 1.5 F1 op de OntoNotes benchmark en met 3.1 F1 met een 5-model ensemble, ondanks het feit dat dit de eerste aanpak is die succesvol is getraind zonder externe middelen.', 'de': 'Wir stellen das erste End-to-End-Coreferenz-Auflösungsmodell vor und zeigen, dass es alle bisherigen Arbeiten deutlich übertrifft, ohne einen syntaktischen Parser oder einen handgefertigten Erwähnungsdetektor zu verwenden. Die Schlüsselidee ist, alle Spanns in einem Dokument direkt als potenzielle Erwähnungen zu betrachten und Verteilungen über mögliche Vorgänger für jede zu lernen. Das Modell berechnet Spannweiten-Einbettungen, die kontextabhängige Grenzdarstellungen mit einem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus kombinieren. Es ist darauf trainiert, die marginale Wahrscheinlichkeit von Goldantecedenzspannen aus Coreferenzclustern zu maximieren und wird faktoriert, um aggressives Kürzen potenzieller Erwähnungen zu ermöglichen. Experimente demonstrieren State-of-the-Art Performance, mit einem Gewinn von 1.5 F1 auf dem OntoNotes Benchmark und um 3.1 F1 mit einem 5-Modell Ensemble, obwohl dies der erste Ansatz ist, der erfolgreich ohne externe Ressourcen trainiert wird.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan model resolusi koreferensi akhir-akhir pertama dan menunjukkan bahwa hal itu jauh lebih berharga dari semua pekerjaan sebelumnya tanpa menggunakan parser sintaktik atau detektor sebutan yang direncanakan tangan. Ide kunci adalah untuk secara langsung mempertimbangkan semua jangkauan dalam dokumen sebagai potensi sebutan dan belajar distribusi atas mungkin anteceden untuk masing-masing. Model menghitung penerbangan jangkauan yang menggabungkan representation batas tergantung konteks dengan mekanisme perhatian pencarian kepala. Ini dilatih untuk memaksimalkan kemungkinan marginal dari jangkauan anteceden emas dari kumpulan koreferensi dan diperfaktorkan untuk memungkinkan pemotongan agresif dari potensi sebutan. Eksperimen menunjukkan prestasi terbaik, dengan keuntungan 1,5 F1 pada benchmark OntoNotes dan 3,1 F1 menggunakan ensemble 5 model, meskipun fakta bahwa ini adalah pendekatan pertama yang berhasil dilatih tanpa sumber daya luar.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha modeli ya kwanza ya utambulisho wa mwisho wa mwisho na kuonyesha kwamba utafanya kazi zote zilizopita bila kutumia mchambuzi wa kibiashara au mtangazaji wa maneno yanayotengenezwa na mikononi. Wazo muhimu ni kuangalia moja kwa moja hisia zote katika nyaraka kama kutambua uwezekano na kujifunza usambazaji wa matukio yanayoweza kwa kila mmoja. Mradi huu unahesabu vifaa vinavyotokana na mipaka inayounganisha wakiwakilishi wenye muktadha na mipaka inayotegemea na mfumo wa kutoa maoni. Ni mafunzo ya kuongeza uwezekano wa matumizi ya dhahabu kutoka kwenye viungo vya mahindi na umesababishwa ili kuwawezesha kuelewa maambukizi yanayowezekana. Majaribio yanaonyesha hali ya mambo ya sanaa, kwa mafanikio ya 1.5 F1 kwenye bendera ya OntoNotes na 3.1 F1 kwa kutumia mifano 5, pamoja na kuwa hii ni njia ya kwanza ya kufundishwa bila rasilimali za nje.', 'fa': 'ما اولین مدل تأثیر تأثیر قبلی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که این مدل تأثیر قبلی را بدون استفاده از یک بازشنگر سنتاکتیک یا بازشنگر مصنوعی به دست انجام می\u200cدهد. ایده کلیدی این است که مستقیماً تمام فضایی در یک سند را به عنوان ذکر پتانسیل و توزیع های ممکن برای هر یک یاد بگیرید. Model computes extensions embedding that combine context-dependent boundaries with a head-finding attention mechanism. تدریس می\u200cشود که احتمال محدودیت طلایی از گلوله\u200cهای مربوط به بالاترین افزایش دهد و به عنوان فشار فشار فشار فشار فشار پتانسیل می\u200cدهد. تجربه\u200cها اجرای موقعیت هنری را نشان می\u200cدهند، با سود ۱.۵ فوت ۱ در برچسب OntoNotes و ۳.۱ فوت ۱ با استفاده از یک برچسب پنج مدل، با وجود اینکه این اولین روش است که با موفقیت بدون منابع خارجی آموزش می\u200cشود.', 'af': "Ons introduseer die eerste einde-na-einde koreferensie-oplossing model en wys dat dit betekeurig uitvoer alle vorige werk sonder om 'n sintakteel ontleerder of hand-inženierde minnerdetektor te gebruik. Die sleutel idee is om alle spans in 'n dokument direk te beskou as potensiele bepaalde en te leer verspreidings oor moontlike antecedente vir elkeen. Die model bereken spennende inbêdings wat konteks-afhanklike grens voorstellings kombinieer met 'n kop-vinding aandag mekanisme. Dit is opgelei om die marjinale waarskynlik van goud antecedent spans te maksimaliseer van koreferensie klasters en is gefabrikeer om aggressiewe pruning van potensiele mentione te aktiveer. Eksperimente bevestig staat-van-kuns-prestasie, met 'n verskaf van 1.5 F1 op die OntoNotes-benchmark en deur 3.1 F1 deur 'n 5-model ensemble te gebruik, alhoewel die feit dat hierdie eerste toegang is om suksesvol onderwerp te word met geen eksterne hulpbronne nie.", 'tr': 'Biz ilkinji soňra soňra çeşme nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys we ol sintaktik täze ýa el inženjerili çykyşlygyny ulanmasa hemme öňki işiň üstüne çykypdygyny görkez. Häzirki ideýa, bir senediň ähli seleňleri potensial agzalan ýaly düşünmek we her üçin mümkin senaryň daýlamagyny öwrenmek. Model sistemi kelläp tapmaky meýdançasyna bağlı hatlary birleştirir. Bu gol anteksent sanlyklarynyň gol anteksent deplerden azaltmak üçin gurnalýar we potensial çykyşlaryny etmäge mejbur edýär. Denminatlar OntoNotes etiketinde 1', 'hr': 'Upoznajemo prvi model rezolucije dobrote na kraju i pokazujemo da značajno iznosi sve prethodne poslove bez upotrebe sintaktičkog analizatora ili detektora spominjanja s rukama. Ključna ideja je izravno razmotriti sve dijelove u dokumentu kao potencijalne spomena i naučiti distribucije nad mogućim predsjednicima za svakog. Model računa ugrađenje širenja koja kombinira granične predstave ovisnog o kontekstu s mehanizam pažnje za pronalaženje glave. Uvježbeno je maksimalizirati marginalnu vjerojatnost zlatnih predsjedničkih prostora iz skupina dobrodošlosti i činjeniti se da se omogućava agresivno pružanje potencijalnih spomena. Eksperimenti pokazuju stanje umjetnosti, uz dobitak od 1,5 F1 na kriteriji OntoNotes i od 3,1 F1 koristeći osiguranje 5 model a, uprkos činjenici da je to prvi pristup koji će uspješno obučavati bez vanjskih resursa.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë modelin e parë të rezolutës së korreferencës nga fundi në fund dhe tregojmë se ai kryen në mënyrë të konsiderueshme të gjitha punët e mëparshme pa përdorur një analizues sintaktik apo një detektor përmendimi të inxhinieruar në dorë. Ideja kryesore është të konsiderojmë drejtpërdrejt të gjitha fushat në një dokument si përmendime të mundshme dhe të mësojmë shpërndarjet mbi antecedente të mundshme për secilin. Modeli llogarit përfshirjet e fushës që kombinojnë përfaqësimet kufitare të varura nga konteksti me një mekanizëm vëmendje për gjetjen e kokës. Ajo është e trajnuar për të maksimalizuar mundësinë e kufirit të paraardhshëm të artë nga grupet e koreferencës dhe është faktorizuar për të mundësuar shqyrtimin agresiv të përmendimeve të mundshme. Eksperimentet demonstrojnë shfaqjen më të lartë, me një fitim prej 1.5 F1 në normën e OntoNotes dhe me 3.1 F1 duke përdorur një komplet 5-model ësh, pavarësisht nga fakti se kjo është qasja e parë që është trajnuar me sukses pa burime të jashtme.', 'am': 'የመጀመሪያውን የፍጻሜውን የቆርፍ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳየዋለን እና በሲንታታቲክ ተርጓፊ ወይም እጁ-engineered ተሳታፊ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የኩነቱ አሳብ በሰነድ ውስጥ ያሉትን ስፋቶች ሁሉንም ምናልባት ማሳየት እናም ለሁሉም በተቻለ አካባቢዎች ላይ ማሩ ነው፡፡ ሞዴል የሳጥን ግንኙነት-በተደገመ የዳርቻ ግንኙነቶችን በመጠቀም አካባቢ ማሰናከል ይቆጥራል፡፡ የወርቅ አቀማመጥ ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎች የ-የ-art ድረ-አካባቢ፣ 1.5 F1 በኦንቶNotes benchmark እና 3.1 F1 በመጠቀም በ3.1 F1 የውጭ ሀብት ምንም እንኳን ይህ የመጀመሪያ ሥርዓት የውጭ ሀብት ሳይኖር የተማረ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք առաջին վերջ-վերջ կորեֆերանսի լուծումների մոդելը և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է նախկին բոլոր աշխատանքները առանց օգտագործելու սինտակտիկ վերլուծում կամ ձեռքի միջոցով ստեղծված նշումների Հիմնական գաղափարն այն է, որ անմիջապես դիտարկենք փաստաթղթի բոլոր տարածքները որպես պոտենցիալ հիշողություններ և սովորենք տարածումներ յուրաքանչյուրի համար: Մոդելը հաշվարկում է տարածության ներդրումներ, որոնք համադրում են կոնտեքստից կախված սահմանների ներկայացումները գլխավոր ուշադրության գտնելու մեխանիզմի հետ: Այն վարժեցված է մեծացնելու ոսկու նախկինում եղած տարածքների սահմանափակ հավանականությունը կորեֆերանսի խմբերից և գործոններ է ստեղծում, որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի ագրեսիվ հնչել պոտենցիալ հիշողությունները: Experiments demonstrate state-of-the-art performance, with a gain of 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes benchmark and by 3.1 F1 using a 5-model ensemble, despite the fact that this is the first approach to be successfully trained with no external resources.', 'ko': '우리는 첫 번째 끝에서 끝까지의 공지 소해 모델을 소개했고 문법 분석기나 수동 디자인의 언급 검측기를 사용하지 않는 상황에서 이전의 모든 작업보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.관건적인 사상은 문서의 모든 경계를 잠재적인 언급으로 간주하고 각 경계의 가능한 전인 분포 상황을 이해하는 것이다.이 모델 계산은 상하문 관련 경계 표시와 머리 발견 주의 메커니즘의 경계 삽입을 결합시킨다.이는 공지 집합에서 황금 선행어의 경계를 최대한 넓힐 수 있는 한계 가능성으로 훈련되고 잠재적 언급을 적극적으로 삭제할 수 있는 요소로 분해된다.실험은 OntoNotes 기준 테스트에서 1.5F1을, 5모델 집적을 사용할 때 3.1F1을 획득하는 등 외부 자원 없이 훈련에 성공한 첫 번째 방법임에도 불구하고 가장 선진적인 성능을 입증했다.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রথম শেষ পর্যন্ত কোরেফারেন্সের সিদ্ধান্তের মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দেখাচ্ছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে সিন্টাক্টিক প্যারাস্টিক বা হাত-ইঞ্ প্রধান ধারণা হচ্ছে সরাসরি একটি নথিতে সকল স্পেন বিবেচনা করা সম্ভাব্য মন্তব্য হিসেবে এবং প্রত্যেকের জন্য সম্ভাব্য অ্যান্ মডেলটি প্রতিনিধিত্বের সীমানার প্রতিনিধিত্ব সংক্রান্ত বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্বের হিসেবে গণনা করে যা মাথায় মনোযো এটা প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে যে সোনার স্পেনের স্পেনের প্রাথমিক সম্ভাবনা বাড়িয়ে দিতে পারে এবং সম্ভাব্য ভাবনার ব্যাপারে আক্রান্ত বুদ্ধি প্রদ Experiments demonstrate state-of-the-art performance, with a gain of 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes benchmark and by 3.1 F1 using a 5-model ensemble, despite the fact that this is the first approach to be successfully trained with no external resources.', 'cs': 'Představujeme první end-to-end model rozlišení koreference a ukážeme, že výrazně překonává všechny předchozí práce bez použití syntaktického parseru nebo ručně navrženého detektoru zmínek. Klíčovou myšlenkou je přímo považovat všechny rozpětí v dokumentu za potenciální zmínky a naučit se distribuce nad možnými předchůdci pro každou z nich. Model vypočítá vložení rozpětí, které kombinují kontextově závislé reprezentace hranic s mechanismem pozornosti hledání hlavy. Je trénován tak, aby maximalizoval okrajovou pravděpodobnost předcházejících zlatých rozpětí z klastrů koreferencí a je zohledněn tak, aby umožnil agresivní prořezávání potenciálních zmínek. Experimenty demonstrují nejmodernější výkon, s ziskem 1,5 F1 na benchmarku OntoNotes a 3,1 F1 pomocí 5-modelového souboru, přestože je to první přístup, který byl úspěšně trénován bez externích zdrojů.', 'ca': "Introduïm el primer model de resolució de coreferència de final a final i demostrem que supera significativament tota la feina anterior sense utilitzar un analitzador sinàctic o un detector de menció artificial. La idea clau és considerar directament totes les extensions d'un document com potencials mencions i aprendre distribucions sobre possible antecedents per a cada un. El model computa integracions d'espai que combinen representacions fronteres dependents del context amb un mecanisme d'atenció de trobada de cap. Està entrenat per maximitzar la probabilitat marginal d'una extensió d'antecedents d'or a partir de clusters de coreferència i està fet per permetre un recolzament agressiu de mentions potencials. Experiments demonstrate state-of-the-art performance, with a gain of 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes benchmark and by 3.1 F1 using a 5-model ensemble, despite the fact that this is the first approach to be successfully trained with no external resources.", 'fi': 'Esittelemme ensimmäisen end-to-end-koreferenssiresoluutiomallin ja osoitamme, että se suoriutuu merkittävästi kaikista aiemmista töistä ilman synteettistä jäsennystä tai käsin suunniteltua maininnan ilmaisinta. Keskeinen idea on tarkastella suoraan asiakirjan kaikkia ulottuvuuksia mahdollisina mainintoina ja oppia jakelut mahdollisista edeltäjistä kullekin. Malli laskee span-upotuksia, jotka yhdistävät kontekstista riippuvat rajaesitykset headfinding-huomiomekanismiin. Se on koulutettu maksimoimaan koreferenssiklustereiden kullan antecedenttien marginaalisen todennäköisyyden ja se on otettu huomioon mahdollisten mainintojen aggressiivisen karsimisen mahdollistamiseksi. Kokeet osoittavat huippuluokan suorituskykyä: 1,5 F1:n voitto OntoNotes-benchmarkissa ja 3,1 F1:n voitto 5-mallin kokoonpanossa, vaikka tämä on ensimmäinen menetelmä, joka on onnistuneesti koulutettu ilman ulkoisia resursseja.', 'et': "Tutvustame esimest otsast otsa-otsa kortereferentsi resolutsiooni mudelit ja näitame, et see ületab märkimisväärselt kõiki varasemaid tööd ilma süntaktilise parseri või käsitsi projekteeritud mainimise detektorita. Põhieesmärk on vaadelda otseselt kõiki dokumendi ulatusi kui võimalikke mainimisi ja õppida jaotusi võimalike eelnevate kohta iga. Mudel arvutab ulatuse manustamist, mis kombineerivad kontekstist sõltuvad piirikujutised peaotsimise tähelepanu mehhanismiga. See on koolitatud maksimeerima kulda eelnevate ulatuste marginaalset tõenäosust kortereferentsi klastritest ja seda faktoriseeritakse, et võimaldada potentsiaalsete märkide agressiivset kärpimist. Eksperimentid näitavad tipptasemel jõudlust, kasutades OntoNotes'i võrdlusalusel 1,5 F1 ja 5-mudelilist ansamblit 3,1 F1, vaatamata asjaolule, et see on esimene lähenemisviis, mida edukalt koolitatakse ilma välisressurssideta.", 'az': 'Biz ilk sona qədər mərhəmətli çözünürlük modelini tanıyırıq və bu, sintaktik analizəçi və əl inženjeri minnətləşdirməyi istifadə etmədən bütün əvvəlki işləri çox üstün edir. Anahtar fikri, belədəki bütün uzaqlarını potensial yada salmaq və hər biri üçün mümkün öndəlişlər üzərində dağıtmaq. Model daxilində bağlı sınır göstəricilərini baş tapma mehanizmi ilə birləşdirir. Bu qızıl antecedent uzaqlarının qədər mümkün olması təhsil edilir və potensial anıların agresif parçasını fəallaşdırmaq üçün təhsil edilir. Təcrübələr OntoNotes benchmark ında 1.5 F1 və 3.1 F1 ilə 5 modeli ensemble vasitəsilə istifadə edirlər, çünki bu, başarılı olaraq heç bir dış kaynaqları olmayan ilk tərzidir.', 'bs': 'Upoznajemo prvi model rezolucije dobrote na kraju i pokazujemo da značajno iznosi sve prethodne poslove bez upotrebe sintaktičkog analizatora ili detektora spominjanja s rukama. Ključna ideja je da izravno smatramo svim prostorijama u dokumentu potencijalnim spominjanjima i naučimo distribuciju preko mogućih predsednika za svakog. Model računaje osnovne ugrađenje koje kombiniraju granične predstave ovisnog o kontekstu sa mehanizam pažnje za pronalaženje glave. Trenirana je da maksimalizuje marginalnu vjerojatnost zlatnih predsjedničkih prostora iz skupina dobrodošlosti i čini se da bi omogućila agresivno obrišanje potencijalnih spomena. Eksperimenti pokazuju stanje umjetnosti, uz dobitak od 1,5 F1 na kriteriji OntoNotes i od 3,1 F1 koristeći ensemble za 5 model a, uprkos činjenici da je to prvi pristup koji će biti uspješno obučen bez vanjskih resursa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah tanggal sing perusahaan karo nggawe gerangsang karo ngono nggawe barang apik dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngubah layang seneng pisar o manut-inênjer Layout Display boxes Awak dhéwé Gebudhakan langgambar kelas-perusahaan langkung sampeyan-perusahaan, barêng langgambar 1.5 F1 ing bench-markup OntNotin lan 3.1 F1 nambah sistem 5-model, sane ngomong sampeyan lané iki dadi perusahaan sing wis nguasah perusahaan bench.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את מודל הפתרון של התאמה קודם לקצה ולהראות שהיא מבצעת את כל העבודה הקודמת באופן משמעותי בלי להשתמש במחקר סינטקטי או גלאי הזכרות המהנדס ביד. הרעיון המפתח הוא לשקול ישירות את כל המרחקים במסמך כזיכרונות פוטנציאליים וללמד פיצוצים על קודמות אפשריים לכל אחד. המודל מחשב תוספות מגוון שמשולבים מייצגות גבולות תלויות בקשר עם מנגנון תשומת לב למציאת ראש. הוא מאומן כדי למקסימום את הסיכוי הגבול של סבירות קודמות זהב מקבוצות קופדמות והוא מוגדר כדי לאפשר לחתוך אגרסיבי של זיכרונות פוטנציאליים. ניסויים מראים ביצועים מוקדמים, עם רווח של 1.5 F1 על נקודת המייחס של OntoNotes ועל 3.1 F1 באמצעות אסמבל של 5 דוגמנים, למרות העובדה שזו הגישה הראשונה שאומרת בהצלחה ללא משאבים חיצוניים.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo prvi model ločljivosti koreference od konca do konca in pokažemo, da znatno presega vsa prejšnja dela brez uporabe sintaktičnega razčlenjevalnika ali ročno izdelanega detektorja omenjanja. Ključna ideja je, da neposredno obravnavamo vse razpone v dokumentu kot morebitne omembe in se naučimo distribucije nad morebitnimi predhodnimi elementi za vsako. Model izračuna vdelave razpona, ki združujejo od konteksta odvisne predstavitve meje z mehanizmom za iskanje glave. Usposabljen je tako, da poveča mejno verjetnost predhodnih razponov zlata iz koreferenčnih grozdov in je faktoriran tako, da omogoča agresivno obrezovanje potencialnih omemb. Eksperimenti dokazujejo najsodobnejšo zmogljivost z 1,5 F1 pri referenčnem merilu OntoNotes in 3,1 F1 pri ansamblu s petimi modeli, kljub dejstvu, da je to prvi pristop uspešno usposobljen brez zunanjih virov.', 'ha': 'Tuna nuna motel na kure ta farko zuwa ƙari, kuma Mu nuna cewa, shi mai girma yana tafiya duk aikin da ya gabata ko kuma bã da amfani da wani parse mai syntactic ko mai tsari ga sunayen-wanda aka samar da hannu. Madaidaita maɓall in shine ka ƙayyade duk spaniya cikin takardar, kamar sunan masu ƙarfi da kuma ka sanar rabon da ake yi wa dukkan kowanin da aka sani. @ info: whatsthis An sanar da shi dõmin a maximise siffantin hanyoyin zĩnãriya daga marubuta na koronto, kuma an wajabta fikanci mai bayani ga sunayen mataimaki. Experiments na nuna state-of-art, with an amfani da 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes and by 3.1 F1 use a fanel 5-motel, ingawa da gaske, this is the first move to be mafanici to be coarted with no outer resource.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་end-to-end coreference་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྲོད་བྱས་པ་ལས་དེ་ནི་འདྲ་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་མ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་མ གལ་ཆེན་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་གི་བར་སྟོང་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་སྐོར The model computes span embeddings that combine context-dependent boundary representations with a head-finding attention mechanism. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱ་མཚོན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཚད་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experiments demonstrate state-of-the-art performance, with a gain of 1.5 F1 on the OntoNotes benchmark and by 3.1 F1 using a 5-model ensemble, despite the fact that this is the first approach to be successfully trained with no external resources.'}
{'en': 'Neural Net Models of Open-domain Discourse Coherence', 'ar': 'نماذج الشبكة العصبية لترابط الخطاب المفتوح', 'fr': 'Modèles de réseaux neuronaux de cohérence du discours dans le domaine ouvert', 'pt': 'Modelos de rede neural de coerência discursiva de domínio aberto', 'es': 'Modelos de redes neuronales de coherencia del discurso de dominio abierto', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの議論の一貫性のニューラルネットモデル', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन प्रवचन सुसंगतता के तंत्रिका नेट मॉडल', 'zh': '开域语一致性神经网络模样', 'ru': 'Нейронные сетевые модели когерентности открытого дискурса', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Néaracha Glan de Chomhleanúnachas Dioscúrsa Fearainn Oscailte', 'ka': 'გახსნა დიომინის დისკურსის კონდენციის ნეირალური ქსელი მოდელები', 'hu': 'A nyílt domain diskurzus koherenciájának neurális hálózati modelljei', 'el': 'Νευρικά Δίκτυα Μοντέλα Συνοχής Διαλόγων ανοικτού τομέα', 'it': 'Modelli di rete neurale di coerenza del discorso a dominio aperto', 'mk': 'Неурални мрежни модели на кохеренција на отворен домен', 'lt': 'Atvirojo domeno diskurso nuoseklumo neutralūs tinkliniai modeliai', 'kk': 'Open- domain дискурстарының нейрондық желі үлгілері', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് കോഹെറെന്\u200dസിന്റെ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Нээлтэй холбооны мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар', 'ms': 'Model Rangkaian Neural bagi Kesesuaian Perilaku Domain Buka', 'mt': 'Mudelli Netti Newrali ta’ Koerenza ta’ Diskors f’Dominju Miftuħ', 'pl': 'Neuronowe modele sieci spójności dyskursu w otwartych domenach', 'no': 'Neurale nettmodeller for Open-domain Discourse Coherence', 'ro': 'Modele de rețea neurală de coerență a discursului în domeniu deschis', 'si': 'Open- domain හොයාගන්න සංවිධානයේ න්\u200dයූරාල නෙට් මොඩේල්ස්', 'sr': 'Neuralne mrežne modele otvorenog domena', 'so': 'Isticmaalka shabakadda ee furan', 'sv': 'Neurala nätmodeller för diskurskoherens med öppen domän', 'ur': 'Open domain Discourse Coherence کے نیورال نیٹ موڈل', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ lắp lưới thần kinh', 'nl': 'Neurale netwerkmodellen van open-domein discourscoherentie', 'bg': 'Модели на нервна мрежа на отворена дискурсна съгласуваност', 'da': 'Neurale netmodeller for diskurskohærens med åbent domæne', 'hr': 'Neuralni mrežni modeli otvorenog domena', 'id': 'Model Net Neural of Open-domain Discourse Coherence', 'ko': '개방역 문장이 일관된 신경 네트워크 모델', 'de': 'Neurale Netzmodelle der offenen Diskurskohärenz', 'fa': 'نمونه\u200cهای شبکه عصبی از مشترک گفتگوهای دامنی باز', 'af': 'Neurale Net Modelle van Open- domain Ontvaring Sagtigheid', 'tr': 'Aç-domain Kaplary Araştırmalaryň Niral Net Modelleri', 'sw': 'Modala za Mtandao wa Utafiti Huru', 'sq': 'Modelet e rrjetit nervor të koherencës së diskutimit të dominiu të hapur', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'az': 'Açıq-domenin Discourse Coherency Nöral Ağ Modelləri', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցային մոդելներ', 'bs': 'Neuralni mrežni modeli otvorenog domena', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন বিষয়বস্তুর নিউরেল নেট মডেল', 'ca': 'Models de xarxa neural de coerència del discurs de domini obert', 'cs': 'Neurální síťové modely soudržnosti diskurzu s otevřenou doménou', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni diskursuse sidususe neurovõrgumudelid', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen diskurssijohdonmukaisuuden hermoverkkomallit', 'jv': 'Nyural net model of Open-domain Diskusie coherence', 'sk': 'Modeli nevralne mreže odprte domene diskurzne koherence', 'he': 'דוגמנים רשת נוירותיים של התשובה של דיסקורס בתחום פתוח', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Neural Net Models of Open-domain Discourse Coherence'}
{'en': 'Discourse coherence is strongly associated with text quality, making it important to natural language generation and understanding. Yet existing models of coherence focus on measuring individual aspects of coherence (lexical overlap, rhetorical structure, entity centering) in narrow domains. In this paper, we describe domain-independent neural models of discourse coherence that are capable of measuring multiple aspects of coherence in existing sentences and can maintain coherence while generating new sentences. We study both discriminative models that learn to distinguish coherent from incoherent discourse, and generative models that produce coherent text, including a novel neural latent-variable Markovian generative model that captures the latent discourse dependencies between sentences in a text. Our work achieves state-of-the-art performance on multiple coherence evaluations, and marks an initial step in generating coherent texts given discourse contexts.', 'ar': 'يرتبط تماسك الخطاب ارتباطًا وثيقًا بجودة النص ، مما يجعله مهمًا لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية وفهمها. ومع ذلك ، تركز نماذج التماسك الحالية على قياس الجوانب الفردية للتماسك (التداخل المعجمي ، والبنية البلاغية ، وتمركز الكيان) في المجالات الضيقة. في هذه الورقة ، نصف النماذج العصبية المستقلة عن المجال لترابط الخطاب القادرة على قياس جوانب متعددة من التماسك في الجمل الحالية ويمكنها الحفاظ على التماسك أثناء إنشاء جمل جديدة. ندرس كلا من النماذج التمييزية التي تتعلم التمييز بين الخطاب المتماسك وغير المتماسك ، والنماذج التوليدية التي تنتج نصًا متماسكًا ، بما في ذلك نموذج ماركوفيان التوليدي المتغير العصبي الكامن الذي يلتقط تبعيات الخطاب الكامن بين الجمل في النص. يحقق عملنا أداءً متطورًا في تقييمات التماسك المتعددة ، ويمثل خطوة أولية في إنشاء نصوص متماسكة في سياق الخطاب.', 'pt': 'A coerência discursiva está fortemente associada à qualidade do texto, tornando-a importante para a geração e compreensão da linguagem natural. No entanto, os modelos existentes de coerência concentram-se em medir aspectos individuais de coerência (sobreposição lexical, estrutura retórica, centralização de entidades) em domínios estreitos. Neste artigo, descrevemos modelos neurais de coerência discursiva independentes de domínio que são capazes de medir múltiplos aspectos de coerência em sentenças existentes e podem manter a coerência ao gerar novas sentenças. Estudamos modelos discriminativos que aprendem a distinguir discurso coerente de incoerente e modelos generativos que produzem texto coerente, incluindo um novo modelo generativo markoviano de variável latente neural que captura as dependências de discurso latente entre sentenças em um texto. Nosso trabalho alcança desempenho de última geração em múltiplas avaliações de coerência e marca um passo inicial na geração de textos coerentes em contextos discursivos.', 'fr': "La cohérence du discours est fortement associée à la qualité du texte, ce qui en fait un élément important pour la génération et la compréhension du langage naturel. Pourtant, les modèles de cohérence existants se concentrent sur la mesure des aspects individuels de la cohérence (chevauchement lexical, structure rhétorique, centrage des entités) dans des domaines étroits. Dans cet article, nous décrivons des modèles neuronaux indépendants du domaine de la cohérence du discours qui sont capables de mesurer de multiples aspects de la cohérence dans des phrases existantes et de maintenir la cohérence tout en générant de nouvelles phrases. Nous étudions à la fois des modèles discriminatifs qui apprennent à distinguer le discours cohérent du discours incohérent et des modèles génératifs qui produisent un texte cohérent, y compris un nouveau modèle génératif markovien à variable latente neuronale qui capture les dépendances du discours latent entre les phrases d'un texte. Notre travail atteint des performances de pointe sur de multiples évaluations de cohérence et marque une première étape dans la génération de textes cohérents en fonction des contextes de discours.", 'es': 'La coherencia del discurso está fuertemente asociada con la calidad del texto, por lo que es importante para la generación y la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, los modelos de coherencia existentes se centran en medir los aspectos individuales de la coherencia (superposición léxica, estructura retórica, centrado de la entidad) en dominios estrechos. En este artículo, describimos modelos neuronales independientes del dominio de la coherencia del discurso que son capaces de medir múltiples aspectos de la coherencia en oraciones existentes y pueden mantener la coherencia mientras generan nuevas oraciones. Estudiamos tanto modelos discriminativos que aprenden a distinguir el discurso coherente del incoherente como modelos generativos que producen texto coherente, incluido un novedoso modelo generativo markoviano de variables latentes neuronales que captura las dependencias latentes del discurso entre las oraciones de un texto. Nuestro trabajo logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en evaluaciones de coherencia múltiple y marca un paso inicial en la generación de textos coherentes dados los contextos del discurso.', 'ja': 'ディスカッションの一貫性はテキストの質と強く関連しているため、自然言語の生成と理解を促進することが重要です。しかし、既存のコヒーレンスモデルは、狭い領域におけるコヒーレンスの個々の側面（語彙的重複、修辞的構造、エンティティの中心付け）を測定することに焦点を当てている。本稿では、既存の文の一貫性の複数の側面を測定し、新しい文を生成しながら一貫性を維持することができる、言説の一貫性の領域に依存しないニューラルモデルについて説明する。私たちは、一貫性のない話題と一貫性のない話題を区別することを学ぶ識別モデルと、一貫性のある文章を生成する生成モデルの両方を研究しています。これには、文章内の文章間の潜在的な話題依存性を取り込む新規のニューラル潜在変数Markovian生成モデルが含まれます。私たちの仕事は、複数のコヒーレンス評価で最先端のパフォーマンスを達成し、話し合いの文脈で一貫性のあるテキストを生成する最初のステップを示します。', 'zh': '语连贯性与文本相关,故自然语言解甚重。 然今之一致性形侧重于狭领之中,量一致性(词汇叠,修辞结构,实体居中)。 本文之中,述语一致性域独立神经模形,能测见句之相干性者多矣,而可以生新持一致性。 吾论学别连贯与非连语之判,及生连贯文本之生模,一新神经潜于变量马尔可夫生模,当得文本句之间。 吾事在多连贯性评中最先进,表于给定语背景下生贯文本之首。', 'ru': 'Согласованность дискурса тесно связана с качеством текста, что делает его важным для генерации и понимания естественного языка. Тем не менее, существующие модели согласованности сосредоточены на измерении отдельных аспектов согласованности (лексическое перекрытие, риторическая структура, центрирование сущности) в узких областях. В этой статье мы описываем домен-независимые нейронные модели когерентности дискурса, которые способны измерять множественные аспекты когерентности в существующих предложениях и могут поддерживать когерентность при генерации новых предложений. Мы изучаем как дискриминационные модели, которые учатся отличать когерентный от некогерентного дискурса, так и генеративные модели, которые производят когерентный текст, включая новую нейронную латентно-переменную марковскую генеративную модель, которая захватывает зависимости латентного дискурса между предложениями в тексте. Наша работа достигает самых современных результатов по множественным оценкам согласованности и знаменует собой первый шаг в создании согласованных текстов с учетом контекстов дискурса.', 'hi': 'प्रवचन सुसंगतता पाठ की गुणवत्ता के साथ दृढ़ता से जुड़ी हुई है, जिससे यह प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी और समझ के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। फिर भी सुसंगतता के मौजूदा मॉडल संकीर्ण डोमेन में सुसंगतता (लेक्सिकल ओवरलैप, बयानबाजी संरचना, इकाई केंद्रीकरण) के व्यक्तिगत पहलुओं को मापने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम प्रवचन सुसंगतता के डोमेन-स्वतंत्र तंत्रिका मॉडल का वर्णन करते हैं जो मौजूदा वाक्यों में सुसंगतता के कई पहलुओं को मापने में सक्षम हैं और नए वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करते समय सुसंगतता बनाए रख सकते हैं। हम दोनों भेदभावपूर्ण मॉडलों का अध्ययन करते हैं जो असंगत प्रवचन से सुसंगत अंतर करना सीखते हैं, और उत्पादक मॉडल जो सुसंगत पाठ का उत्पादन करते हैं, जिसमें एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका अव्यक्त-चर मार्कोवियन उत्पादक मॉडल शामिल है जो एक पाठ में वाक्यों के बीच अव्यक्त प्रवचन निर्भरताओं को कैप्चर करता है। हमारा काम कई सुसंगतता मूल्यांकन पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, और प्रवचन संदर्भों को दिए गए सुसंगत ग्रंथों को उत्पन्न करने में एक प्रारंभिक कदम को चिह्नित करता है।', 'ga': 'Tá comhleanúnachas dioscúrsa ceangailte go láidir le cáilíocht an téacs, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé tábhachtach do ghiniúint agus do thuiscint teanga nádúrtha. Ach díríonn samhlacha comhleanúnachais atá ann cheana ar ghnéithe aonair den chomhleanúnachas a thomhas (forluí foclóireachta, struchtúr reitriciúil, lárú aonáin) i réimsí cúnga. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar shamhlacha néaracha neamhspleácha fearainn de chomhleanúnachas dioscúrsa atá in ann gnéithe iolracha de chomhleanúnachas in abairtí atá ann cheana a thomhas agus ar féidir leo comhleanúnachas a choinneáil agus abairtí nua á nginiúint. Déanaimid staidéar ar mhúnlaí idirdhealaitheacha araon a fhoghlaimíonn conas idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir comhleanúnach agus dioscúrsa neamhchomhleanúnach, agus samhlacha ginideacha a tháirgeann téacs comhleanúnach, lena n-áirítear samhail giniúna Markovian folaigh-athraitheach úrscéal a ghlacann na spleáchais dioscúrsa folaigh idir abairtí i dtéacs. Baineann ár gcuid oibre feidhmíocht den scoth amach ar mheastóireachtaí comhleanúnachais iolracha, agus is céim tosaigh é chun téacsanna comhleanúnacha a ghiniúint i gcomhthéacsanna dioscúrsa.', 'el': 'Η συνοχή του λόγου συνδέεται έντονα με την ποιότητα του κειμένου, γεγονός που καθιστά σημαντικό για τη δημιουργία και κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα συνοχής επικεντρώνονται στη μέτρηση μεμονωμένων πτυχών της συνοχής (λεξική επικάλυψη, ρητορική δομή, κέντρο οντότητας) σε στενούς τομείς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε ανεξάρτητα νευρωνικά μοντέλα συνοχής λόγου που είναι ικανά να μετρήσουν πολλαπλές πτυχές συνοχής σε υπάρχουσες προτάσεις και μπορούν να διατηρήσουν συνοχή ενώ δημιουργούν νέες προτάσεις. Μελετάμε τόσο διακριτικά μοντέλα που μαθαίνουν να διακρίνουν συνεκτικά από ασυνεχή συζήτηση, όσο και παραγωγικά μοντέλα που παράγουν συνεκτικό κείμενο, συμπεριλαμβανομένου ενός νέου νευρικού λανθάνοντος-μεταβλητού Μαρκοβιανού παραγωγικού μοντέλου που αποτυπώνει τις λανθάνουσες εξαρτήσεις λόγου μεταξύ προτάσεων σε ένα κείμενο. Το έργο μας επιτυγχάνει υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις σε πολλαπλές αξιολογήσεις συνοχής και σηματοδοτεί ένα αρχικό βήμα για τη δημιουργία συνεκτικών κειμένων στα πλαίσια του λόγου.', 'hu': 'A beszéd koherenciája erősen összefügg a szövegminőséggel, ami fontos a természetes nyelv generálásához és megértéséhez. A koherencia meglévő modelljei azonban a koherencia egyes aspektusainak (lexikai átfedés, retorikai struktúra, entitásközpontosítás) mérésére összpontosítanak szűk területeken. Ebben a tanulmányban a diskurzuskoherencia doménfüggetlen neurális modelljeit ismertetjük, amelyek képesek mérni a koherencia több aspektusát a meglévő mondatokban, és fenntartani a koherenciát új mondatok generálása mellett. Mind a diszkriminatív modelleket tanulmányozzuk, amelyek megtanulják megkülönböztetni a koherens diskurzust az inkoherens diskurzustól, mind a generációs modelleket, amelyek koherens szöveget hoznak létre, beleértve egy új neurális látens változó Markoviai generatív modellt, amely rögzíti a mondatok közötti látens diskurzus függőségeket egy szövegben. Munkánk korszerű teljesítményt ér el többszörös koherencia-értékelésben, és kezdeti lépést jelent a koherens szövegek kialakításában, adott diskurzusi kontextusokban.', 'ka': 'პასუხების შესაძლებლობა ტექსტის კაalitესთან ძალიან დაკავშირებულია, რომელიც მას გასანიშვნელოვანია ჩემი ენის წარმოდგენისთვის და შესაძლებისთ მაგრამ არსებობს კონტერესტის მოდელების კონტუკურება ინდიველური აპექტების განზომილებისთვის (ლექსიკალური კონტერესტი, რეტორიკალური სტრუქტურა, ინტერტიკური ცენ ამ დომენში, ჩვენ დავწერეთ დიომინის განსარგებული ნეიროლური მოდელები, რომლებიც შეუძლებელია გავამრავლოთ მრავალური აპექტირების მრავალური აპექტირების მნიშვნელობაში და შეგვიძლია დარჩენ ჩვენ ვისწავლით ორივე დისკრიმინატიური მოდელები, რომლებიც ვისწავლით, რომ კოდენტის განსხვავებას განსხვავებას არსხვავებული დისკორესებიდან და გენერატიური მოდელები, რომლებიც კოდენტიური ტექსტის შექმნა, რომლებიც პრომენტიური ნეირ ჩვენი სამუშაო მოდის მრავალური თანასწორობის განსაზღვრებისთვის სამუშაო წარმოდგენებაში, და მონიშნავს პირველური კონტექსტის შექმნა კონტექსტის შექმნა.', 'it': "La coerenza del discorso è fortemente associata alla qualità del testo, che lo rende importante per la generazione e la comprensione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, i modelli esistenti di coerenza si concentrano sulla misurazione dei singoli aspetti della coerenza (sovrapposizione lessicale, struttura retorica, centratura delle entità) in ambiti ristretti. In questo articolo, descriviamo modelli neurali indipendenti dal dominio di coerenza del discorso che sono in grado di misurare molteplici aspetti di coerenza nelle frasi esistenti e possono mantenere la coerenza generando nuove frasi. Studiamo sia modelli discriminatori che imparano a distinguere il discorso coerente da quello incoerente, sia modelli generativi che producono testo coerente, incluso un nuovo modello generativo neurale latente-variabile Markovian che cattura le dipendenze latenti del discorso tra frasi in un testo. Il nostro lavoro raggiunge performance all'avanguardia su molteplici valutazioni di coerenza e segna un primo passo nella generazione di testi coerenti in contesti di discorso.", 'lt': 'Diskusijos nuoseklumas yra labai susijęs su teksto kokybe, todėl jis svarbus gamtinei kalbų kūrimui ir supratimui. Tačiau esamuose nuoseklumo modeliuose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama atskirų nuoseklumo aspektų (leksinio dubliavimo, retorinės struktūros, subjektų centravimo) vertinimui siaurose srityse. Šiame dokumente apibūdiname nepriklausomus sričių nervinius diskurso nuoseklumo modelius, galinčius išmatuoti įvairius esamų sakinių nuoseklumo aspektus ir išlaikyti nuoseklumą sukuriant naujus sakinius. Mes tiriame ir diskriminacinius modelius, kurie mokosi atskirti nuoseklų nuo nesuderinamo diskurso, ir generacinius modelius, kurie gamina nuoseklų tekstą, įskaitant naują neurologinį latent in į Markovijos generacinį model į, kuriame aptariamos latentinės diskurso priklausomybės tarp sakinių tekste. Mūsų darbas užtikrina pažangiausius rezultatus atliekant įvairius nuoseklumo vertinimus ir yra pirmasis žingsnis kuriant nuoseklius tekstus atsižvelgiant į diskurso aplinkybes.', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдерді құру және түсінуге маңызды болады. Бірақ барлық тең үлгілері жиі доменлердегі жеке бөліктерді өлшеу (лексикалық тең, реторикалық құрылғы, бірліктерді ортақтастыру) үлгілеріне көздейді. Бұл қағазда, біз доменге тәуелсіз невраллық үлгілерді түсіндіреміз. Бұл сөйлемелердің бірнеше аспектін бірнеше қатынасын өлшеп, жаңа сөйлемелерді құру кезінде бірнеше қатынасын түсіндіре алады. Біз дискриминациялық үлгілерді екеуі зерттейміз. Бұл дискриминациялық дискриминациялық дискриминациялық дискриминациялық дискриминациялық дискриминациялық дискриминациялық дискриминациялық түрлендіру үлгілерді және мәтіндегі сөйлемелердің арасындағы Біздің жұмысымыз көптеген тең бағалау үшін бірнеше әртүрлі әртүрлі жұмыс істеуімізді жеткізеді, жұмыс келтірілген дискурстардың контекстерін құру үшін бастапқы қадам деп белгі', 'mk': 'Конеренцијата на дискурсот е силно поврзана со квалитетот на текстот, што го прави важно за природната генерација и разбирање на јазиците. Сепак, постојните модели на кохеренција се фокусираат на мерењето на индивидуалните аспекти на кохеренцијата (лексикално прекривање, реторска структура, централизација на ентитетите) во тесни домени. Во овој документ, ние опишуваме нервни модели на дискурсни кохеренции кои се способни да мерат повеќе аспекти на кохеренцијата во постоечките реченици и можат да ја одржат кохеренцијата додека генерираат нови реченици. Ги проучуваме двете дискриминативни модели кои научиме да ги разликуваат кохерентните од несогледниот дискурс, и генеративните модели кои произведуваат кохерентен текст, вклучувајќи нов неурален лантен-променлив Марковиски генеративен модел кој ги зазема лантните дискурсни зависности поме Нашата работа постигнува најсовремена резултат во врска со многуте проценки на кохеренцијата и претставува првичен чекор во генерирањето кохерентни тексти со дискурсни контексти.', 'ms': 'Discourse coherence is strongly associated with text quality, making it important to natural language generation and understanding.  Namun model koherensi yang wujud fokus pada mengukur aspek individu koherensi (meliputi lexik, struktur retorik, pusat entiti) dalam domain yang sempit. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan model saraf independen domain yang berkuasa mengukur aspek berbilang koherensi dalam kalimat yang wujud dan boleh menyimpan koherensi semasa menghasilkan kalimat baru. Kami mempelajari kedua-dua model diskriminatif yang belajar untuk membezakan konsisten dari pembicaraan yang tidak konsisten, dan model generatif yang menghasilkan teks konsisten, termasuk model generatif Markovian pembolehubah saraf yang baru yang menahan dependensi pembicaraan yang tersembunyi diantara kalimat dalam teks. Pekerjaan kami mencapai prestasi terbaik pada penilaian kebolehan berbilang, dan menandai langkah awal dalam menghasilkan teks konsisten diberikan konteks diskors.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാഷ തലമുറകള്\u200dക്കും മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതിനും അത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാക്കുന്നു. എന്നിട്ടും നിലവിലുള്ള കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചെറിയ ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d (ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d മേല്\u200dപ്പ്, ഹെറ്റോറിക്കല്\u200d കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, സാധ്യത ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ പുതിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള പല ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d അളക്കുവാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ഡൊമെയ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരെയും വ്യത്യസ്ത സംസാരം വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പൊതുവായ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന ജനറല്\u200d മോ നമ്മുടെ ജോലി ഒരുപാട് കൂട്ടുകാരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്ക', 'mt': 'Il-koerenza tad-diskors hija assoċjata b’mod qawwi mal-kwalità tat-test, u dan jagħmilha importanti għall-ġenerazzjoni u l-fehim tal-lingwi naturali. Madankollu, il-mudelli eżistenti ta’ koerenza jiffukaw fuq il-kejl ta’ aspetti individwali ta’ koerenza (sovrappożizzjoni lexika, struttura retorika, ċentrazzjoni tal-entitajiet) f’oqsma dejjaq. F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu mudelli newrali indipendenti mid-dominju ta’ koerenza ta’ diskors li huma kapaċi jkejlu aspetti multipli ta’ koerenza fis-sentenzi eżistenti u li jistgħu jżommu koerenza waqt li jiġġeneraw sentenzi ġodda. Aħna nistudjaw kemm mudelli diskriminattivi li jitgħallmu jiddistingwu koerenti minn diskors inkoerenti, kif ukoll mudelli ġenerattivi li jipproduċu test koerenti, inkluż mudell ġenerattiv ġdid newrali latenti-varjabbli Markovian li jinkludi d-dipendenzi diskors latenti bejn sentenzi f’test. Ix-xogħol tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq evalwazzjonijiet ta’ koerenza multipla, u jimmarka pass inizjali fil-ġenerazzjoni ta’ testi koerenti minħabba kuntesti ta’ diskors.', 'pl': 'Spójność dyskusji jest silnie związana z jakością tekstu, co czyni ją ważnym elementem generowania i zrozumienia języka naturalnego. Jednak istniejące modele spójności koncentrują się na pomiarze poszczególnych aspektów spójności (nakładanie się leksykaliczne, struktura retoryczna, centrowanie jednostek) w wąskich dziedzinach. W niniejszym artykule opisujemy niezależne od domeny modele neuronowe spójności dyskursu, które są w stanie mierzyć wiele aspektów spójności w istniejących zdaniach i mogą utrzymać spójność przy generowaniu nowych zdań. Badamy zarówno modele dyskryminacyjne, które uczą się odróżniać spójny od niespójnego dyskursu, jak i modele generacyjne, które produkują spójny tekst, w tym nowy model generacyjny neuronowej zmiennej utajonej markowskiej, który uwzględnia utajone zależności dyskursu między zdaniami w tekście. Nasza praca osiąga najnowocześniejsze działania w zakresie wielu ocen spójności i stanowi pierwszy krok w tworzeniu spójnych tekstów w kontekście dyskursu.', 'mn': 'Тайлбарт хамааралтай байдлын хэл болон ойлголтын тулд хамааралтай байдаг. Гэхдээ сууж байгаа нийгмийн загварууд бага хэсэгт хоорондоо нийгмийн хэмжээсүүдийг хэмжүүлэхэд анхаарна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид холбоотой хамааралтай мэдрэлийн загваруудыг тайлбарлаж, олон хэлбэрүүдийн нийгмийн хэмжээсүүдийг хэмжиж, шинэ өгүүлбэрүүдийг бий болгоход хамааралтай байж болно. Бид хоёулаа ялгаатай загваруудыг судалж, хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хооро Бидний ажил олон нийгмийн үнэлгээнд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, ярианы нөхцөл байдлыг нэмэгдүүлэх эхний алхам гэдэг.', 'no': 'Opplesing av koherens er sterkt forbunda med tekstkvalitet, som gjer det viktig for naturspråk generering og forståking. Men eksisterande modeller av koherens fokuserer på å måle individuelle aspektar av koherens (leksisk overlapp, retorisk struktur, entitetssentrering) i lange domene. I denne papiret beskriver vi domene-uavhengige neuralmodeller av diskurskoherens som kan måle fleire aspektar av koherens i eksisterande setningar og kan beholde koherens mens det gjer nye setningar. Vi studerer både diskriminasjonske modeller som lærer å distirere koherent frå inkoherende diskursar, og generativ modeller som produserer koherent tekst, inkluderer eit nyral latentvariabel Markovian generisiv modell som tar inn latent diskursavhengighet mellom setningar i tekst. Arbeidet vårt gjer tilstand til kunstendige utvikling på fleire konsekvensevalueringar, og markerer ein startsteg i å laga samsvarande tekstar gjeven diskurskontekstar.', 'ro': 'Coerența discursului este puternic asociată cu calitatea textului, ceea ce îl face important pentru generarea și înțelegerea limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, modelele existente de coerență se concentrează pe măsurarea aspectelor individuale ale coerenței (suprapunerea lexicală, structura retorică, centrarea entităților) în domenii înguste. În această lucrare, descriem modele neurale independente de domeniu de coerență a discursului care sunt capabile să măsoare mai multe aspecte de coerență în propozițiile existente și pot menține coerența în timp ce generează noi propoziții. Studăm atât modele discriminatorii care învață să distingă discursul coerent de cel incoerent, cât și modele generative care produc text coerent, inclusiv un nou model generativ neural latent-variabil Markovian care surprinde dependențele de discurs latent dintre propoziții dintr-un text. Lucrarea noastră realizează performanțe de ultimă oră pe evaluări multiple de coerență și marchează un pas inițial în generarea textelor coerente date contextelor de discurs.', 'so': 'Takooristu waxay si adag ugu xidhiidhaan takhasuska qoraalka, taasoo muhiim u ah qarniga afka dabiiciga iyo waxgarashada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee muuqashada wadajirka ah waxay ku kalsoonaan yihiin qiyaastii dhinacyada wadajirka ah (leksikal overlap, dhismaha retori, xarunta jidhka). Qoraalkan waxaan ku qornaa noocyada neurada ee aan xor ahayn ee gudaha, taasoo awoodi kara inuu qiyaaso dhinacyo kala duduwan oo isku darsameyn karo xafiisyada joogtada ah iyo in la xiriiri karo islamarkaasna aan sameyn karno hadal cusub. Tusaale takoorista ah labadoodaba waxaan baranaynaa si ay u kala soocaan hadalka aan la soo saarin, iyo tusaalayaal dhaqan oo soo saara qoraal dhexe, kuwaas oo ku qoran model dhaqan ee ugu danbeeya marxafyada, taasoo qabta hadalka ugu dambeeya ay ku xiran tahay erayada dhexdooda. Shaqadeenu wuxuu gaadhaa bandhigyada farshaxanta ah oo ku saabsan qiimeynta kala duduwan, wuxuuna qabanqaabinayaa tallaabo bilowga ah oo sameynta qoraal-horaadka ah oo la siiyo warqadaha hadalka.', 'ta': 'விளக்கம் ஒன்று உரை தரமுடன் தொடர்புடையது, அதை இயற்கையான மொழி உருவாக்கத்திற்கும் புரிந்து கொள்ள முக்கி இன்னும் இருக்கும் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு மாதிரிகள் குறைந்த களங்களில் உள்ள தனிப்பட்ட பகுதிகளை அளவிடும் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் களம் சுதந்திரமான பேச்சு மாதிரிகளை விவரிக்கிறோம். இது இருக்கும் வாக்கியங்களில் பல பாகங்களை அளவிட முடியும் மற்றும் புதிய வா நாம் இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான மாதிரிகளையும் கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம் உள்ளார்ந்த பேச்சிலிருந்து ஒன்றாக பிரிக்க கற்றுக் கொள்ள, மற்றும் பொதுவான மாதிரிகளையும் உருவாக்குக எங்கள் வேலை பல இணைப்பு மதிப்புகளின் நிலையில் கலை செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது, மற்றும் பேச்சு முறையில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரைகளை உருவாக்கும', 'sv': 'Diskussionssamst채mmighet 채r starkt f철rknippat med textkvalitet, vilket g철r det viktigt f철r skapandet och f철rst책elsen av naturligt spr책k. 횆nd책 fokuserar befintliga modeller av samst채mmighet p책 att m채ta enskilda aspekter av samst채mmighet (lexikal 철verlappning, retorisk struktur, entitetscentrering) i smala omr책den. I denna uppsats beskriver vi dom채noberoende neurala modeller av diskurskoherens som 채r kapabla att m채ta flera aspekter av koherens i befintliga meningar och kan uppr채tth책lla koherens samtidigt som nya meningar genereras. Vi studerar b책de diskriminerande modeller som l채r oss att skilja sammanh채ngande fr책n inkoherent diskurs, och generativa modeller som producerar sammanh채ngande text, inklusive en ny neural latent-variabel markoviansk generativ modell som f책ngar latenta diskursberoenden mellan meningar i en text. V책rt arbete uppn책r state-of-the-art prestanda p책 flera konsekvensbed철mningar och utg철r ett f철rsta steg i att skapa sammanh채ngande texter givna diskurssammanhang.', 'ur': 'صحبت کا تعلق پیغام کے ساتھ مضبوطی سے متن کی کیفیت کے ساتھ مشترک ہے، اس کو طبیعی زبان کی نسل اور سمجھ کے لئے اہم بناتا ہے. لیکن موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود مو اس کاغذ میں، ہم ڈمین کے غیر مستقل نائرول موڈل کی توصیف کرتے ہیں جو موجود جماعتوں میں بہت سی نسبتوں کا اندازہ کر سکتے ہیں اور نئی جماعتوں کی پیدائش کے وقت موجود رہتے ہیں۔ ہم دونوں فرق کے نمونے پڑھتے ہیں جنہوں نے مختلف صحبت سے مشترک بات جدا کرنے کی سیکھ لیا ہے اور جنرائیٹ نمونڈل جنہوں نے متعکس متعکس پیدا کیا ہے، شامل ایک نئورل لاٹینٹ-متغیر مارکووین کی جنرائیٹ نمونڈل جو ایک متعکس کے درمیان لٹینٹ صحبت کے اعتباری کو پکڑتا ہے ہمارا کام بہت سی تعلقات کی ارزیابی پر موجود ہوتا ہے، اور ایک شروع قدم کی نشان دیتا ہے کہ تعلقات کی تفصیل کی پیدائش کرتی ہے.', 'sr': 'Prijateljska koherencija je jako povezana sa kvalitetom teksta, čineći ga važnom prirodnoj generaciji jezika i razumijevanju. Međutim, postojeći modeli saslušnosti fokusiraju se na mjerenje individualnih aspekta saslušnosti (leksički preklapanje, retorička struktura, centriranje entiteta) u uskim domenama. U ovom papiru opisujemo neovisne neuralne modele koncentracije diskusija koje su sposobne da mjere višestruke aspekte saslušnosti u postojećim rečenicama i mogu održati saslušnost dok stvaraju nove rečenice. Mi proučavamo i diskriminacijske modele koji nauče da razlikuju saslušanje od neslužnih govora i generativnih model a koji proizvode saslušan tekst, uključujući i nov generični model neuralne latentne varijante Markovije koji uključuje zavisnost latentne govore između rečenica u tekstu. Naš rad postiže izvedbu stanja umjetnosti o višestrukoj procenaciji saslušnosti, i označava početni korak u stvaranju saslušnih tekstova podignutih konteksta diskursa.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධයි. නමුත් සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය සංවිධානය (ලෙක්සිකල් ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය, රිටෝරිකාල් සංවිධානය, අන්ත මේ පැත්තේ, අපි දේමින් ස්වත්වයෙන් නිවාසිත න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේලන් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් කතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විස්තර කරන්න, ඒ වගේම අලුත්  අපි පරික්ෂා කරනවා දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක මොඩල් දෙන්නම් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා කොහෙරෙන්ට් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට, සහ ජෙනෙරෙන්ට් මොඩල් දෙන්නම්, සම්පූර්ණ නි අපේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට පටන්', 'uz': "Maʼlumot birlashtirish matn sifatida juda bog'liq. Bu tilning tabiiy generalida va tushunishga muhim qiladi. Hozirda mavjud munosabatlar qisqari domene'da bir necha narsalarni o'zgartirish (leksikal qopqo'yish, retorik strukturasi, quyidagi markaziga) birga qarshi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz suhbat bir necha gaplarni ko'paytirish mumkin va yangi so'zlar yaratishda bir necha gaplarni o'rganish mumkin. Biz ikkita ta'minlovchi modellarni o'rganamiz va bir necha matnni ajratish uchun o'rganamiz va umumiy modellarni o'rganamiz. Bu yerda yangi soʻzlarni matnning orasidagi yangilik va oʻzgaruvchi Markoviya generativ modeli bilan birga keladigan so'zlarning orasidagi soʻzni bir matnning orasidagi bir narsalarga ishlatadi. Bizning ishimiz bir necha bir necha bir xil qiymatlari haqida saqlash holatini amalga oshadi, va bir necha xizmatlarni o'rganish uchun birinchi qadam yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Sự liên kết trong trường hợp tham gia vào chất lượng văn bản, làm cho nó quan trọng với học sinh và hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình tương ứng hiện tại tập trung vào việc đo lường các khía cạnh khác nhau về sự ràng buộc (sự gấp bội ngôn ngữ, cấu trúc tu từ, điểm trung thực) trong mỗi khu vực hẹp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả các mô hình thần kinh độc lập miền về sự phù hợp trong thuyết trình, có khả năng đo được nhiều khía cạnh khác nhau trong các câu nói đã có và có thể duy trì sự đồng bộ trong khi tạo ra câu mới. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu cả những mô hình lệch lạc học cách phân biệt sự liên quan từ ngôn luận không liên quan, và các mô hình tạo ra các mô hình mang tính kết hợp, gồm cả một mô hình gen tiềm ẩn thần kinh huyền thoại người nắm bắt sự phụ thuộc giữa các câu trong văn bản. Công việc của chúng tôi đạt đến trình độ cao nhất về tỉ lệ đánh giá sự phù hợp, và đánh dấu một bước đầu tiên trong việc tạo ra các văn bản liên quan.', 'nl': 'Discurscoherentie wordt sterk geassocieerd met tekstkwaliteit, waardoor het belangrijk is voor het genereren en begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. Toch richten bestaande coherentiemodellen zich op het meten van individuele aspecten van coherentie (lexicale overlap, retorische structuur, entiteitscentrering) in smalle domeinen. In dit artikel beschrijven we domeinonafhankelijke neurale modellen van discourscoherentie die in staat zijn om meerdere aspecten van coherentie in bestaande zinnen te meten en samenhang te behouden terwijl nieuwe zinnen worden gegenereerd. We bestuderen zowel discriminatieve modellen die leren coherent van incoherent discours te onderscheiden, als generatieve modellen die coherente tekst produceren, waaronder een nieuw neuraal latent-variabele Markoviaans generatief model dat de latente discoursafhankelijkheden tussen zinnen in een tekst vastlegt. Ons werk levert state-of-the-art prestaties op meerdere coherentie evaluaties en markeert een eerste stap in het genereren van coherente teksten in discourscontexten.', 'hr': 'Složenost diskursa je čvrsto povezana s kvalitetom teksta, čineći ga važnom prirodnoj generaciji jezika i razumijevanju. Međutim, postojeći modeli koherencije usredotočili su se na mjerenje pojedinačnih aspekta koherencije (leksički preklapanje, retorička struktura, centriranje entitata) u uskim domenama. U ovom papiru opisujemo neovisne neuralne modele koncentracije diskusija koji su sposobni mjeriti višestruke aspekte koherencije u postojećim rečenicama i mogu održati koherenciju dok stvaraju nove rečenice. Mi proučavamo i diskriminacijske modele koji nauče različiti pristojnost od neslužnih govora, i generične modele koji proizvode saslušni tekst, uključujući novi generični model neuralne latentne promjene Markovija koji uključuje zavisnost latentne govore između rečenica u tekstu. Naš rad postiže postignuće stanje umjetnosti na višestrukim procjenama saslušnosti i označava početni korak u stvaranju saslušnih tekstova podataka diskusija.', 'da': 'Diskussionssammenhæng er stærkt forbundet med tekstkvalitet, hvilket gør det vigtigt for generering og forståelse af naturligt sprog. Alligevel fokuserer eksisterende modeller for sammenhæng på at måle individuelle aspekter af sammenhæng (leksikalsk overlapning, retorisk struktur, entitetscentrering) i snævre områder. I denne artikel beskriver vi domæneafhængige neurale modeller af diskurskohærens, der er i stand til at måle flere aspekter af kohærens i eksisterende sætninger og kan opretholde kohærens samtidig med at der genereres nye sætninger. Vi studerer både diskriminerende modeller, der lærer at skelne sammenhængende fra inkoherende diskurs, og generative modeller, der producerer sammenhængende tekst, herunder en ny neural latent variabel markovisk generativ model, der fanger de latente diskursafhængigheder mellem sætninger i en tekst. Vores arbejde opnår state-of-the-art performance på flere sammenhængende evalueringer og markerer et første skridt i at skabe sammenhængende tekster givet diskurskontekst.', 'id': 'Koerensi diskursus sangat terkait dengan kualitas teks, membuatnya penting untuk generasi bahasa alam dan pemahaman. Yet existing models of coherence focus on measuring individual aspects of coherence (lexical overlap, rhetorical structure, entity centering) in narrow domains.  In this paper, we describe domain-independent neural models of discourse coherence that are capable of measuring multiple aspects of coherence in existing sentences and can maintain coherence while generating new sentences.  Kami mempelajari kedua model diskriminatif yang belajar untuk membedakan konsisten dari diskors yang tidak konsisten, dan model generatif yang menghasilkan teks yang konsisten, termasuk model generatif variabel saraf-latent Markovian yang baru yang menangkap dependensi diskors latent antara kalimat dalam teks. Pekerjaan kami mencapai prestasi terbaik pada beberapa evaluasi koerensi, dan menandai langkah awal dalam menghasilkan teks koerens yang diberikan konteks diskors.', 'de': 'Diskurskohärenz ist stark mit der Textqualität verbunden, was sie für die Erzeugung und das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache wichtig macht. Allerdings konzentrieren sich bestehende Kohärenzmodelle auf die Messung einzelner Aspekte der Kohärenz (lexikalische Überlappung, rhetorische Struktur, Entitätszentrierung) in engen Domänen. In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir domänenunabhängige neuronale Modelle der Diskurskohärenz, die in der Lage sind, mehrere Aspekte der Kohärenz in bestehenden Sätzen zu messen und die Kohärenz bei der Generierung neuer Sätze aufrechtzuerhalten. Wir untersuchen sowohl diskriminierende Modelle, die lernen, kohärente von inkohärenten Diskursen zu unterscheiden, als auch generative Modelle, die kohärenten Text produzieren, einschließlich eines neuartigen neuronalen latent-variablen markovischen generativen Modells, das die latenten Diskursabhängigkeiten zwischen Sätzen in einem Text erfasst. Unsere Arbeit erreicht State-of-the-Art Performance bei multiplen Kohärenzbewertungen und markiert einen ersten Schritt zur Generierung kohärenter Texte in Diskurskontexten.', 'bg': 'Координацията на дискусиите е силно свързана с качеството на текста, което го прави важен за генерирането и разбирането на естествения език. Съществуващите модели на съгласуваност обаче се фокусират върху измерването на индивидуалните аспекти на съгласуваността (лексикално припокриване, реторична структура, центриране на същността) в тесни области. В тази статия описваме независими от домейна невронни модели на дискурсна съгласуваност, които са способни да измерват множество аспекти на съгласуваността в съществуващите изречения и могат да поддържат съгласуваност, докато генерират нови изречения. Изследваме както дискриминационни модели, които се научават да различават кохерентен от некохерентен дискурс, така и генеративни модели, които произвеждат кохерентен текст, включително нов неврално латентно-променлив марковийски генеративен модел, който улавя латентните зависимости на дискурса между изреченията в текста. Нашата работа постига най-съвременни резултати по множество оценки на съгласуваността и бележи първата стъпка в генерирането на съгласувани текстове в контекста на дискурса.', 'ko': '문장의 일관성은 문장의 질과 밀접한 관계를 가지기 때문에 자연 언어의 생성과 이해에 매우 중요하다.그러나 기존의 연관 모델은 좁은 분야에서 연관의 각 방면(어휘 중첩, 수사 구조, 실체 중심)을 평가하는 데 중심을 두었다.본고에서 우리는 분야와 무관한 문장 연관 신경 모델을 묘사했다. 이 모델은 기존 문장에서 연관된 여러 가지 측면을 측정할 수 있고 새로운 문장을 생성하는 동시에 연관성을 유지할 수 있다.우리는 연관어편과 비연관어편을 구분하는 구분모델을 학습하고 연관어편을 생성하는 생성모델을 연구했다. 이는 새로운 신경 잠재 변수인 마르코프 생성모델을 포함하고 이 모델은 문장 중의 문장 간의 잠재적 문장 의존 관계를 포착했다.우리의 업무는 다중 일관성 평가에서 가장 선진적인 표현을 얻었고 주어진 언어의 언어 환경에서 일관성 텍스트를 생성하는 첫걸음을 상징했다.', 'sw': 'Ushirikiano unahusiana sana na ubora wa maandishi, na kufanya hivyo kuwa muhimu kwa kizazi cha asili na kuelewa. Hata hivyo, mifano ya ushirikiano unalenga kuhakikisha upande binafsi wa ushirikiano (ubunifu wa lexico, muundo wa kimetokea, kituo cha taasisi) katika maeneo madogo. Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea mifano huru ya neurali ya ushirikiano wa mazungumzo ambayo ina uwezo wa kupima vipande kadhaa vya ushirikiano katika hukumu zilizopo na wanaweza kuendelea mshikamano wakati wa kutengeneza sentensi mpya. Tunafuatilia mifano yote ya ubaguzi ambao hujifunza kutofautisha pamoja na mazungumzo yasiyo ya kijinga, na mifano ya kizazi yanayotengeneza maandishi ya pamoja, ikiwa ni pamoja na modeli ya uzalendo wa hivi karibuni ya Marovi inayobadilika na mazungumzo yanayotegemea kati ya hukumu. Kazi zetu zinafanikiwa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa kuhusu tafiti za pamoja mbalimbali, na inaonyesha hatua ya mwanzo katika kutengeneza maandishi ya pamoja na matatizo ya mazungumzo.', 'tr': 'Birişiklik gürrüňler metin kalitesi bilen gaty baglanýar, tebigy diller döretmäge we düşünmäge wajyplaýar. Ýöne bolan ýerleşmelik nusgalarynyň (leksiýal öňlap, retorik strukturasy, guramlar merkezini) ýigry alanlarda ýerleşmeligine üns berýär. Bu kagyzda, biz domeny bağımsız neural nural modellerini, bu sözleriň birnäçe aspektini bar sözleriň birleşigini ölçüp, täze sözleriň üretilýän wagtlaryny hereket edip biler. Biz hem diskriminçäk nusgalary diňe soňra gürrüňsiz sözlerden tapawutlandyrmak öwrenýän, hem näsirli metin üretjek nusgalary öwrenýän, hem täsirli täsirli, täsirli, täsirli, täsirli, täsirli Markowyan döredijilik nusgalary üçin sözleriň arasyndaky bağlyklaryny alyp öwrenýän Çalışmalarymyz birden birleşik değerlendirmelerde, ilerlemeli metinleri oluşturmak için ilkinji adım sağlar.', 'af': "Onspraak koherens is sterk geassosieer met teks kwaliteit, maak dit belangrik vir natuurlike taal generasie en verstanding. Maar bestaande modele van koherens fokus op die merking van individuele aspekte van koherens (leksiese oorvloeding, retoriese struktuur, entiteitsentering) in kort domeine. In hierdie papier beskryf ons domein-afhanklike neurale modele van diskursie koherens wat is in staat om veelvuldige aspekte van koherens te maak in bestaande setinge en kan behou koherens terwyl nuwe setinge genereer word. Ons studeer beide diskriminasiewe modele wat leer om koherent te verkies van inkoherende diskursie en genereerbare modele wat koherent teks produseer, insluitend 'n nuwe neurale latent-veranderlike Markovian genereerbare model wat die latente diskursie afhanklikhede tussen teikens in 'n teks opneem. Ons werk bereik staat-van-kuns-prestasie op veelvuldige koherens-evaluasies, en merk 'n aanvanklike stap in die genereer van koherente teks gegee diskursiekontekste.", 'am': 'Discourse coherence is strongly associated with text quality, making it important to natural language generation and understanding.  ምንም እንኳን የሚኖሩት የአካባቢው ምሳሌዎች በጭራሽ አካባቢዎች (የሌክሲካዊ ክፍል፣ የሜትሮቲካዊ አካባቢ፣ አካል ማዕከል) በሚያሰናክሉ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አዲስ ቃላትን በመፍጠር የሚችሉትን ብዙዎች የውይይት ክፍሎች ማሰናከል የሚችሉትን የዶሜን-ነፃ ነጥብ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሁለትን ልዩናዊ ምሳሌዎች እናስተምራለን፡፡ ሥራችን በብዛት ሁኔታ ላይ የአርድ ድረ ገጽ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'fa': 'هماهنگی صحبت با کیفیت متن بسیار ارتباط دارد و برای نسل زبان طبیعی و درک آن را مهم می کند. هنوز مدلهای موجود موجود هماهنگی روی اندازه اندازه نقطه\u200cهای شخصی از هماهنگی (تغییر دهنده\u200cی زبانی، ساختار بازیگری، مرکز عناصر) در دامنهای تنگ تمرکز می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما مدل\u200cهای عصبی مستقل به دامنه\u200cای را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که قادر به اندازه اندازه\u200cگیری نقطه\u200cهای متعددی در جمله\u200cهای موجود هستند و می\u200cتوانیم با تولید جمله\u200cهای جدید هماهنگی را حفظ کنیم. ما هر دو مدل جدایی را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که یاد می\u200cگیریم که هماهنگی را از سخنرانی بی\u200cهماهنگ جدایی کنیم و مدل\u200cهای ژنتریفی که متن هماهنگی را تولید می\u200cکنند، شامل یک مدل ژنتریفی مارکووی نوعی متغیر عصبی که بستگی\u200cهای لاتین گفتگو بین جمله\u200cها در متن می\u200cگیرد. کارمون در مورد ارزیابی تعلق تعلق تعلق بیشتری موجود می شود و یک قدم اولیه در تولید متن های تعلق و تعلق را نشان می دهد.', 'sq': 'Koerenca e diskutimit është e lidhur fort me cilësinë e tekstit, duke e bërë të rëndësishme për gjenerimin dhe kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore. Megjithatë modelet ekzistuese të konsistencës përqëndrohen në matjen e aspekteve individuale të konsistencës (mbishtypje lexike, strukturë retorike, qendrim i njësisë) në fusha të ngushta. Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë modele neuronale të pavarur nga domeni të konsistencës diskursore që janë në gjendje të matnin aspekte të shumta të konsistencës në frazat ekzistuese dhe mund të mbajnë konsistencën ndërsa krijojnë fraza të reja. Ne studiojmë të dy modelet diskriminuese që mësojnë të dallojnë konsistentësinë nga diskursi jo konsistent, dhe modelet gjenerative që prodhojnë tekst konsistent, duke përfshirë një model gjenerativ të ndryshueshëm nervor të fshehtë Markovian që kapon varësinë e fshehtë të diskursit midis fjalëve në një tekst. Puna jonë arrin shfaqjen më të lartë në vlerësimet e shumëkoherencës dhe shënon një hap fillestar në krijimin e teksteve koherente duke dhënë kontekste diskurse.', 'hy': 'Տեքստի որակի հետ կապված է քննարկումների կապվածությունը, ինչը դարձնում է այն կարևոր բնական լեզուների ստեղծման և հասկանալու համար: Սակայն գոյություն ունի կոնցենսիայի մոդելներ, որոնք կենտրոնանում են կոնցենսիայի անհատական ասպեկտների չափման վրա (լեքսիկական կապվածություն, ռետորական կառուցվածք, էության կենտրոնացում) նեղ ո In this paper, we describe domain-independent neural models of discourse coherence that are capable of measuring multiple aspects of coherence in existing sentences and can maintain coherence while generating new sentences.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու խտրականության մոդելներ, որոնք սովորում են տարբերակել կոնցենսը անհամապատասխանատու խոսակցությունից, և սերունդային մոդելներ, որոնք ստեղծում են կոնցենսը տեքստ, ներառյալ նոր նյարդային թաքնված-փոփոխականը Մարկովիայի սերունդային մոդելը, որը վեր Մեր աշխատանքը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին բազմաթիվ համապատասխանության գնահատումների վրա և նշանակում է սկզբնական քայլ համապատասխան տեքստերի ստեղծման մեջ, հաշվի առնելով խոսակցական կոնտեքստները:', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil nəslinə və anlama üçün çox mövcuddur. Halbuki mövcuddur coherenciyə modellərin individu ölçülərinin (leksik üstünlüyü, retorik quruluşu, məlumat merkezini) qırx alanlarda tərəfləndirir. Bu kağızda, biz domeindən bağımsız nöral modellərini təsdiqləyirik ki, mövcud sözlərdə çoxlu təsdiqlənmə aspektlərini ölçə bilər və yeni cümlələri yaratmaq üçün birlikdə birlikdə saxlaya bilər. Biz hər ikisini də müəyyən edici modellərlə müəyyən edilməyi öyrənirik ki, müəyyən sözlərdən müəyyən edilməsini öyrənir, həmçin in müəyyən bir mətn məlumatlarının arasındakı yeni nöral latent-variable Markovian generiki modellərlə birlikdə müəyyən edilməsini öyrənirik. Bizim işimiz çoxlu birləşdirilmək müqayisədə müəyyənləşdirilməsi haqqında müəyyənləşdirilmiş məktubları təşkil etmək üçün ilk adım göstərir.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্ম এবং বুঝতে পারে বিষয়টি প্রাকৃতিক প্রজন্মের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। কিন্তু বিদ্যমান মোডেল স্বল্প ডোমেন্টগুলোতে (লেক্সিক্সিয়াল আপলাপ, উত্তরাধিকার কাঠামোর, প্রতিষ্ঠান কেন্দ্র) মাপের উপর মনোযোগ দ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন নিউরেল মডেলের বর্ণনা করছি যারা বিদ্যমান কারাদণ্ডের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া মাপাতে সক্ষম এবং নতুন শাস্তি তৈর আমরা উভয়কে বৈষম্যের মডেল শিক্ষা করছি যারা অন্তর্ভুক্ত কথোপকথন থেকে বিচ্ছিন্ন করার শিক্ষা প্রদান করে এবং জেনারেটিভ মডেল যারা একত্রিত লেখা তৈরি করে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে একটি নভেলের আমাদের কাজ বেশ কয়েকটি একত্রিত মূল্যের বিষয়ে শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের প্রতিষ্ঠান অর্জন করে এবং কথোপকথন প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদান করার প্রথম পদক', 'bs': 'Složenost diskursa je jako povezana sa kvalitetom teksta, čineći ga važnom prirodnoj generaciji jezika i razumijevanju. Međutim, postojeći modeli koherencije usredotoči se na mjerenje pojedinačnih aspekta koherencije (leksički preoklapanje, retorička struktura, centriranje entiteta) u uskim domenama. U ovom papiru opisujemo neovisne neuralne modele koncentracije diskusija koji su sposobni za mjerenje višestrukih aspekta koherencije u postojećim rečenicama i održavanje koherencije dok stvaraju nove rečenice. Mi proučavamo i diskriminacijske modele koji nauče da razlikuju saslušnost od neslušnih govora i generativnih model a koji proizvode saslušni tekst, uključujući i nov generični model neuralne latentne varijante Markovije koji uključuje zavisnost latentne govore između rečenica u tekstu. Naš rad postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti o višestrukoj procjeni saslušnosti, i označava početni korak u stvaranju saslušnih tekstova podataka diskusija.', 'cs': 'Kohärence diskursu je silně spojena s kvalitou textu, což je důležité pro generování a porozumění přirozeného jazyka. Stávající modely koherence se však zaměřují na měření jednotlivých aspektů koherence (lexikální překrývání, rétorická struktura, centrování entit) v úzkých oblastech. V tomto článku popisujeme doménově nezávislé neuronové modely diskurzní koherence, které jsou schopny měřit více aspektů koherence ve stávajících větách a zachovat koherenci při generování nových vět. Studujeme jak diskriminační modely, které se naučí rozlišovat koherentní od nekohärentního diskurzu, tak generativní modely, které produkují koherentní text, včetně nového neuronového latentně proměnného Markovova generativního modelu, který zachycuje latentní diskurzní závislosti mezi větami v textu. Naše práce dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů na více hodnoceních koherence a představuje počáteční krok při generování soudržných textů v diskurzním kontextu.', 'ca': "La coerència del discurs està fortament associada a la qualitat del text, fent important per la generació i l'comprensió del llenguatge natural. Però els models de coerència existents es centren en mesurar aspectes individuals de la coerència (sobreposició lèxica, estructura retòrica, centrament d'entitats) en dominis estrets. En aquest paper, descrivim models neurals independents del domini de coherencia del discurs capaços de mesurar múltiples aspectes de coherencia en frases existents i poden mantenir coherencia generant frases noves. Estudem ambdós models discriminatoris que aprenen a distingir coherents del discurs in coherent, i models generatius que produeixen text coherent, incloent un nou model generatiu neuronal latent-variable Markovia que captura les dependencies latents del discurs entre frases en un text. La nostra feina aconsegueix el desempeny més avançat en múltiples evaluacions de coherencia, i marca un pas inicial en generar textos coherents dadas contextes de discurs.", 'et': 'Diskursuse sidusus on tugevalt seotud teksti kvaliteediga, mistõttu on see oluline loomuliku keele loomiseks ja mõistmiseks. Kuid olemasolevad sidususe mudelid keskenduvad sidususe individuaalsete aspektide (leksikaalne kattuvus, retooriline struktuur, olemuse tsentreerimine) mõõtmisele kitsastes valdkondades. Käesolevas töös kirjeldame domeenist sõltumatuid diskursuse sidususe neuromudeleid, mis suudavad mõõta olemasolevates lausetes sidususe mitmeid aspekte ning säilitavad sidususe, luues samal ajal uusi lauseid. Uurime nii diskrimineerivaid mudeleid, mis õpivad eristama sidusat ja segamatut diskursust, kui ka generatiivseid mudeleid, mis toodavad sidusat teksti, sealhulgas uudset neuraalset latentset-muutujat Markovia generatiivset mudelit, mis tabab latentset diskursuse sõltuvust lausete vahel tekstis. Meie töö saavutab kaasaegse tulemuse mitme sidususe hindamisel ja tähistab esimest sammu sidusate tekstide loomisel diskursuse kontekstis.', 'fi': 'Puheen johdonmukaisuus liittyy vahvasti tekstin laatuun, mikä tekee siitä tärkeän luonnollisen kielen tuottamiselle ja ymmärtämiselle. Nykyiset koherenssimallit keskittyvät kuitenkin mittaamaan yksittäisiä koherenssin näkökohtia (sanastollinen päällekkäisyys, retorinen rakenne, entiteetin keskittäminen) kapeilla alueilla. Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme diskurssikoherenssin domeenista riippumattomia neuromalleja, jotka kykenevät mittaamaan olemassa olevien lauseiden koherenssin useita näkökohtia ja ylläpitämään johdonmukaisuutta samalla kun ne tuottavat uusia lauseita. Tutkimme sekä diskriminatiivisia malleja, jotka oppivat erottamaan johdonmukaisen epäjohdonmukaisesta diskurssista, että generatiivisia malleja, jotka tuottavat johdonmukaista tekstiä, mukaan lukien uusi neuronaalinen latentti-muuttuja Markovian generatiivinen malli, joka tallentaa tekstin lauseiden väliset piilevät diskurssiriippuvuudet. Työssämme saavutetaan uusinta suorituskykyä useissa johdonmukaisuusarvioinneissa ja se on ensimmäinen askel johdonmukaisten tekstien luomisessa diskurssikonteksteissa.', 'jv': 'Lakokke coheres saiki luwih sedhaya punika gayut karo kalitas teks, nggawe kaya cara nggawe kalih juter bangsa lan salang. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pentungé iki, kéné pisan denguné-nesaturan model alat-nesaturan karo nesaturan karo percoherencia sing gawe nggawe barang sampek karo perusahaan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan ono jipember kuwi nggawe gerakan sampek akeh nguasai winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk mulai sistem sing dioksimirato sing sampeyan nggawe geraksum sistem sing nggawe geraksum nik ngêngêngêngêng ngêngêng langgar sampeyan kuwi model sing nyimpen ngêngêng, tambah kuwi model sing wis nguasai mêr dhéwé, gambar uwong-sistem sing dadi ngêngêng langgar sampeyan kuwi ngêngêng langgar sampeyan matan seneng pisa Clear', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da ke da motsi na komai fokus a kan haƙunsa masu sakan koshi guda (leksical rufe, restorial, masu tsakiya) cikin jama'a guda. Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana misãlai masu da bakwai-da-da ke daɗaɗe wa mazaɓa da kwamfyuta wanda ke iya iya awon ya ƙaddara masu yawa da wadangan da ke cikin maganar da ke da shi kuma tuna iya tsare haɗiya a lokacin da za'a ƙãga maganar nan dabam. Munã karanta misãlai masu yin inganci da za'a sanar da su rarrabe koɗata daga magana wanda ba'a iya haɗuwa ba, kuma masu motsi na daban'a wanda ke samu da littãfi, da kuma misãlin mai yanzu-mai-daban-daban-daban, da wanda ke riƙon maganar ta ƙarani, yana daidaita a cikin wani matsayi. Our work achieves state-of-the-art performance on multiple coherence evaluations, and marks an initial step in generating coherent texts given discourse contexts.", 'he': 'הקיונציה של דיסקורס קשורה חזק לאיכות טקסט, מה שעושה אותה חשובה ליצור ושפה טבעית והבנה. למרות זאת, מודלים קיימים של תואם מתמקדים על מידוד אפקטים בודדים של תואם (התקפות לקסית, מבנה רטורי, מרכז יחידות) בתחומים צרים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתארים מודלים עצביים עצמאיים על שטח של תואם דיבורים שיכולים למדוד חלקים רבים של תואם במשפטים קיימים ויכולים לשמור על תואם בזמן ליצור משפטים חדשים. אנו לומדים שני דוגמנים דיסקרטיביים שלמדו להבדיל את התקבילות מהדיבור לא מתקבל, ודוגמנים יוצרים טקסט מתקבל, כולל דוגמן יוצר חדש של משתנה עצבית מוסתרת מארקובית Our work achieves state-of-the-art performance on multiple coherence evaluations, and marks an initial step in generating coherent texts given discourse contexts.', 'sk': 'Skladnost diskurza je močno povezana s kakovostjo besedila, zaradi česar je pomembna za ustvarjanje in razumevanje naravnega jezika. Vendar se obstoječi modeli koherence osredotočajo na merjenje posameznih vidikov koherence (leksikalno prekrivanje, retorična struktura, centriranje entitet) v ozkih področjih. V prispevku opisujemo domensko neodvisne nevronske modele diskurzne koherence, ki so sposobni meriti več vidikov koherence v obstoječih stavkih in lahko ohranijo koherenco ob ustvarjanju novih stavkov. Proučujemo diskriminativne modele, ki se naučijo razlikovati koherentno od neskladnega diskurza, in generativne modele, ki proizvajajo koherentno besedilo, vključno z novim nevralno latentno-spremenljivim markovijskim generativnim modelom, ki zajema latentne diskurzne odvisnosti med stavki v besedilu. Naše delo dosega najsodobnejše delovanje pri večkratnih vrednotenjih koherentnosti in označuje začetni korak pri ustvarjanju koherentnih besedil glede na diskurzne kontekste.', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་མཐུན་འདི་ཡིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་མཐུན་རིམ། དེ་ནི་རང་བཞིན་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་གྲངས་ཤེ Yet existing models of coherence focus on measuring individual aspects of coherence (lexical overlap, rhetorical structure, entity centering) in narrow domains. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་domain-independent neural models of discourse coherence་ཡི་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཡུལ་ཚིག་ནང་སྤྱོད་པའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ཤས་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་རྒྱུ་ འུ་ཚོས་གྲངས་སུ་མཐུད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་discriminative དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་རྣམས་in coherent discourse-དང་generative models་རྣམས་ལས་མཐུན་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་ལས་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ལས་འགན་ཅན་མི་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་མཇུག'}
{'en': 'Affinity-Preserving Random Walk for Multi-Document Summarization', 'ar': 'السير العشوائي مع الحفاظ على التقارب من أجل تلخيص متعدد المستندات', 'es': 'Paseo aleatorio que preserva la afinidad para el resumen de varios documentos', 'pt': 'Caminhada aleatória de preservação de afinidade para resumo de vários documentos', 'fr': 'Marche aléatoire préservant les affinités pour la synthèse de plusieurs documents', 'ja': 'マルチドキュメント要約のための親和性保持ランダムウォーク', 'zh': '用多文档摘要者相关性留随机游走', 'hi': 'आत्मीयता-संरक्षण बहु-दस्तावेज़ Summarization के लिए यादृच्छिक चलना', 'ru': 'Случайная дорожка с сохранением аффинности для суммирования нескольких документов', 'ga': 'Cleamhnas-Caomhnú Siúlóid Randamach le haghaidh Achoimre Il-Doiciméad', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Affinitás-megőrzés véletlenszerű séta többdokumentumos összefoglaláshoz', 'el': 'Τυχαίος περίπατος που διατηρεί τη συγγένεια για την περίληψη πολλών εγγράφων', 'lt': 'Atsitiktinis kelių dokumentų apibendrinimo nuotolių išsaugojimas', 'kk': 'Көп құжат тұжырымдамасын үшін кездейсоқ жұмыс сақтау', 'it': 'Passeggiata casuale per la sintesi di più documenti', 'mk': 'Affinity-Preserving Random Walk for Multi-Document Summarization', 'ms': 'Jalan Rawak Menjaga-Kejauhan Kejauhan untuk Penapisan Dokumen Berberbilang', 'mt': 'Il-mixja aleatorja li żżomm l-Affinità għas-Sommarju ta’ Dokumenti Multi', 'no': 'Tilfeldig trekk for sammendraging av fleire dokument', 'ml': 'പല-രേഖയുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനായി സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സുരക്ഷിതസൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Олон-баримт нийлүүлэхийн тулд тохиромжтой-хадгалах санамсаргүй алхам', 'pl': 'Losowy spacer zachowujący powiązanie dla podsumowania wielu dokumentów', 'ro': 'Păstrarea afinității plimbării aleatorii pentru rezumarea mai multor documente', 'sr': 'Slučajni hod za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'si': 'ගොඩක්- ලිපින්ත සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා අවස්ථාවත්- ආරක්ෂා කරන්න අවස්ථාවත් වැඩ කරන්න', 'so': 'Horumarinta socda ee u socoshada dukumentiyada kala duduwan', 'sv': 'Affinitetsbevarande slumpmässig promenad för sammanfattning av flera dokument', 'ta': 'பல ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'Multi-Document Summarization کے لئے ناپذیریت-حفاظت کرتا ہے Random Walk', 'uz': 'Koʻproq hujjat hisoboti uchun shaffoflikni saqlash', 'vi': 'Sự bền bỉ Ngẫu nhiên cho tổng kết nhiều tài liệu', 'bg': 'Случайна разходка за запазване на афинитета за обобщаване на множество документи', 'da': 'Affinitetsbevarende tilfældig gåtur til opsummering af flere dokumenter', 'nl': 'Affinity-behoud willekeurige wandeling voor multi-document samenvatting', 'hr': 'Slučajni hod za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'id': 'Pertahanan Affinity Random Walk untuk Penapisan Multi-Dokumen', 'fa': 'حفاظت محافظت و حفاظت تصادفی برای جمع\u200cآوری سند\u200cهای زیادی', 'de': 'Affinitätserhaltender Zufallsweg für die Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente', 'ko': '다중 문서 요약 중의 친화력은 무작위로 유동한다', 'sw': 'Kutembea Uwezeshaji wa Utawala', 'af': 'Affiniteit- Bewaarder Lukrake Walk vir Multi- Document Opsomming', 'tr': 'ګڼ-Sened Toplaýyşy üçin Wagtlaýyn', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Çoxlu Döküman Toplaşdırması üçün Xüsusiyyətli Dönüş', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Slučajni hod za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'bn': 'অনেক ডকুমেন্ট সামারিজেশনের জন্য সুবিধা', 'cs': 'Náhodná procházka zachovávající afinitu pro shrnutí více dokumentů', 'et': 'Suhtluse säilitamine juhuslik käik mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtmiseks', 'fi': 'Affinity-Preserving Random Walk for Multi-Document Summarization', 'sq': 'Shko në mënyrë të rastësishme për përmbledhjen e shumë dokumenteve', 'ca': "Una passejada aleatòria que conserva l'afinitat per a resumir múltiples documents", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Naključni sprehod za ohranjanje afinitete za povzetek več dokumentov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הליכה אקראית לשמור על הגבול לסיוריזציה של מסמכים רבים', 'bo': 'མཐའ་མེད་ཚད་ལྡོག་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྩིས་བསྡུས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་པའི་འགྲུལ་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Multi-document summarization provides users with a short text that summarizes the information in a set of related documents. This paper introduces affinity-preserving random walk to the summarization task, which preserves the affinity relations of sentences by an absorbing random walk model. Meanwhile, we put forward adjustable affinity-preserving random walk to enforce the diversity constraint of summarization in the random walk process. The ROUGE evaluations on DUC 2003 topic-focused summarization task and DUC 2004 generic summarization task show the good performance of our method, which has the best ROUGE-2 recall among the graph-based ranking methods.', 'ar': 'يوفر التلخيص متعدد المستندات للمستخدمين نصًا قصيرًا يلخص المعلومات الموجودة في مجموعة من المستندات ذات الصلة. تقدم هذه الورقة السير العشوائي للحفاظ على التقارب إلى مهمة التلخيص ، والتي تحافظ على علاقات التقارب بين الجمل من خلال نموذج مشي عشوائي ممتص. وفي الوقت نفسه ، قدمنا مسارًا عشوائيًا قابل للتعديل للحفاظ على التقارب لفرض قيود التنوع للتلخيص في عملية السير العشوائية. تُظهر تقييمات ROUGE الخاصة بمهمة التلخيص التي تركز على الموضوع في DUC 2003 ومهمة التلخيص العام لـ DUC 2004 الأداء الجيد لطريقتنا ، والتي تتميز بأفضل استدعاء لـ ROUGE-2 بين طرق التصنيف القائمة على الرسم البياني.', 'pt': 'A sumarização de vários documentos fornece aos usuários um texto curto que resume as informações em um conjunto de documentos relacionados. Este artigo introduz o passeio aleatório de preservação de afinidade para a tarefa de sumarização, que preserva as relações de afinidade de sentenças por um modelo de passeio aleatório absorvente. Enquanto isso, apresentamos um passeio aleatório de preservação de afinidade ajustável para impor a restrição de diversidade de sumarização no processo de passeio aleatório. As avaliações do ROUGE na tarefa de sumarização focada no tópico do DUC 2003 e na tarefa de sumarização genérica do DUC 2004 mostram o bom desempenho do nosso método, que tem o melhor recall do ROUGE-2 entre os métodos de classificação baseados em grafos.', 'fr': "La synthèse multidocument fournit aux utilisateurs un court texte qui résume les informations dans un ensemble de documents connexes. Cet article introduit la marche aléatoire préservant l'affinité à la tâche de synthèse, qui préserve les relations d'affinité des phrases par un modèle de marche aléatoire absorbant. Pendant ce temps, nous avons proposé une marche aléatoire ajustable préservant l'affinité pour appliquer la contrainte de diversité de la synthèse dans le processus de marche aléatoire. Les évaluations ROUGE sur la tâche de synthèse thématique DUC 2003 et la tâche de synthèse générique DUC 2004 montrent les bonnes performances de notre méthode, qui a le meilleur rappel ROUGE-2 parmi les méthodes de classement basées sur des graphiques.", 'es': 'El resumen de varios documentos proporciona a los usuarios un texto breve que resume la información en un conjunto de documentos relacionados. Este artículo introduce el paseo aleatorio que preserva la afinidad en la tarea de resumen, que preserva las relaciones de afinidad de las oraciones mediante un modelo de paseo aleatorio absorbente. Mientras tanto, proponemos una caminata aleatoria ajustable que preserve la afinidad para hacer cumplir la restricción de diversidad de la sumarización en el proceso de caminata aleatoria. Las evaluaciones ROUGE de la tarea de resumen centrada en temas DUC 2003 y la tarea de resumen genérico DUC 2004 muestran el buen rendimiento de nuestro método, que tiene el mejor recuerdo de ROUGE-2 entre los métodos de clasificación basados en gráficos.', 'ja': 'マルチドキュメントの要約は、ユーザーに関連するドキュメントのセット内の情報を要約する短いテキストを提供します。本稿では、文の親和性関係を吸収ランダムウォークモデルによって保存する、まとめタスクの親和性保持ランダムウォークを紹介する。一方、調節可能な親和性保持ランダムウォークを提唱し、ランダムウォークプロセスにおける要約の多様性制約を強制した。DUC 2003のトピック重視の要約タスクとDUC 2004の一般的な要約タスクのROUGE評価は、グラフベースのランキング方法の中で最高のROUGE -2リコールを持つ当社の方法の良好なパフォーマンスを示しています。', 'zh': '多文档摘要为用户供简短,该文本总一组相关文档中信息。 本文引相关性随机游走入摘要任,该务因吸随机游走模样留下了句子的亲和关系。 同时,我们发出可调的亲和力留随机游走,以在随机游走中强制行汇总的多样性约束。 DUC 2003 主题总事 DUC 2004 通用总结之 ROUGE ,其法有善性,在图形之最善者 ROUGE-2 召率。', 'hi': 'बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशन उपयोगकर्ताओं को एक छोटा पाठ प्रदान करता है जो संबंधित दस्तावेज़ों के सेट में जानकारी को सारांशित करता है. यह पेपर सारांशीकरण कार्य के लिए आत्मीयता-संरक्षण यादृच्छिक चलने का परिचय देता है, जो एक अवशोषित यादृच्छिक चलने वाले मॉडल द्वारा वाक्यों के आत्मीयता संबंधों को संरक्षित करता है। इस बीच, हम यादृच्छिक चलने की प्रक्रिया में सारांशीकरण की विविधता बाधा को लागू करने के लिए समायोज्य आत्मीयता-संरक्षित यादृच्छिक चलना आगे बढ़ाते हैं। DUC 2003 विषय-केंद्रित summarization कार्य और DUC 2004 जेनेरिक summarization कार्य पर रूज मूल्यांकन हमारी विधि है, जो ग्राफ-आधारित रैंकिंग विधियों के बीच सबसे अच्छा रूज-2 याद है के अच्छे प्रदर्शन को दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Резюме по нескольким документам предоставляет пользователям краткий текст, в котором резюмируется информация в наборе соответствующих документов. Эта статья вводит аффинно-сохраняющую случайную ходьбу к задаче суммирования, которая сохраняет аффинные отношения предложений с помощью поглощающей модели случайной ходьбы. Между тем, мы выдвинули регулируемое сохранение аффинности случайной ходьбы, чтобы обеспечить ограничение разнообразия суммирования в процессе случайной ходьбы. Оценки ROUGE по тематической суммирующей задаче DUC 2003 и общей суммирующей задаче DUC 2004 показывают хорошую производительность нашего метода, который имеет лучший ROUGE-2 среди методов ранжирования на основе графов.', 'ga': "Soláthraíonn achoimre ildhoiciméad téacs gearr d'úsáideoirí a dhéanann achoimre ar an bhfaisnéis i sraith doiciméad gaolmhar. Tugann an páipéar seo siúlóid randamach caomhnaithe cleamhnais isteach sa tasc achoimre, a chaomhnaíonn caidreamh cleamhnais abairtí trí shamhail siúlóide randamach ionsúiteach. Idir an dá linn, chuireamar siúlóid randamach inchoigeartaithe caomhnaithe cleamhnais ar aghaidh chun srian éagsúlachta achoimrithe a fhorfheidhmiú sa phróiseas siúlóide randamach. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí ROUGE ar thasc achoimrithe ábhar-dírithe DUC 2003 agus tasc achoimrithe cineálach DUC 2004 feidhmíocht mhaith ár modh, a bhfuil an aisghlaoch ROUGE-2 is fearr aige i measc na modhanna rangaithe graf-bhunaithe.", 'el': 'Η σύνοψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων παρέχει στους χρήστες ένα σύντομο κείμενο που συνοψίζει τις πληροφορίες σε ένα σύνολο σχετικών εγγράφων. Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει την τυχαία πορεία διατήρησης συγγένειας στην εργασία σύνοψης, η οποία διατηρεί τις σχέσεις συγγένειας των προτάσεων με ένα απορροφητικό μοντέλο τυχαίας διαδρομής. Εν τω μεταξύ, προτείνουμε τη διευθετήσιμη συγγένεια-διατήρηση τυχαίας διαδρομής για να επιβάλουμε τον περιορισμό ποικιλομορφίας της συνοψίας στην τυχαία διαδικασία περιπάτου. Οι αξιολογήσεις σχετικά με την θεματική εργασία σύνοψης και τη γενική εργασία σύνοψης δείχνουν την καλή απόδοση της μεθόδου μας, η οποία έχει την καλύτερη ανάκληση μεταξύ των μεθόδων κατάταξης βάσει γραφής.', 'hu': 'A többdokumentumos összefoglalás rövid szöveget biztosít a felhasználóknak, amely összefoglalja az információkat a kapcsolódó dokumentumokban. Ez a tanulmány az affinitást-megőrző véletlenszerű sétát mutatja be az összefoglaló feladathoz, amely egy abszorbeáló véletlenszerű sétásmodelldel őrzi meg a mondatok affinitási viszonyait. Eközben állítható affinitást-megőrző véletlenszerű járást javasolunk, hogy érvényesítsük az összefoglalás sokszínűségi korlátozását a véletlenszerű járási folyamatban. A DUC 2003 témaközpontú összefoglaló feladat és a DUC 2004 általános összefoglaló feladat ROUGE értékelései mutatják módszerünk jó teljesítményét, amely a grafikonon alapuló rangsorolási módszerek közül a legjobb ROUGE-2 visszahívással rendelkezik.', 'it': "La sintesi multi-documento fornisce agli utenti un breve testo che riassume le informazioni in una serie di documenti correlati. Questo articolo introduce la camminata casuale che preserva l'affinità al compito di sintesi, che preserva le relazioni di affinità delle frasi da un modello di camminata casuale assorbente. Nel frattempo, abbiamo proposto una camminata casuale regolabile che preserva l'affinità per imporre il vincolo di diversità della sintesi nel processo di camminata casuale. Le valutazioni ROUGE sul compito di riepilogo tematico DUC 2003 e sul compito di riepilogo generico DUC 2004 mostrano le buone prestazioni del nostro metodo, che ha il miglior richiamo ROUGE-2 tra i metodi di classificazione basati su grafici.", 'ka': 'მრავალური დოკუმენტის სიმბოლობა მომხმარებელი კონტაქტის ტექსტით, რომელიც შესაბამისი დოკუმენტის შესაბამისი ინფორმაცია. ეს დოკუმენტი აღმოჩვენებს აფრინტის შეცვალობა შემდეგ გადასრულება საქაღალდე, რომელიც აფრინტის შესახებ წარმოდგენების შესახებ გადასრულებელი მოდელზე. Meanwhile, we put forward adjustable affinity-preserving random walk to enforce the diversity constraint of summarization in the random walk process. ROUGE-ს განსაზღვრებები DUC 2003-ის ტემიკური კონსტურაციის საქმე და DUC 2004-ის განსაზღვრებული კონსტურაციის საქმე გამოჩვენება ჩვენი მედიოდის კარგი კონსტურაციას, რომელიც ყველაზე საუკეთესო ROU', 'lt': 'Daugiadokumentų santraukoje vartotojams pateikiamas trumpas tekstas, apibendrinantis informaciją susijusiuose dokumentuose. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas afinitetą išsaugojantis atsitiktinis vaikščiojimas į santraukos užduotį, kuris išsaugo frazių afinitetą naudojant absorbuojantį atsitiktinį vaikščiojimo model į. Tuo tarpu mes pasiūlėme koreguojamą afinitetą išsaugojantį atsitiktinį vaikščiojimą, kad būtų užtikrintas įvairovės suvestinių apribojimas atsitiktinio vaikščiojimo procese. ROUGE vertinimai, susiję su 2003 m. DUC teminiu apibendrinimo uždaviniu ir 2004 m. DUC bendru apibendrinimo uždaviniu, rodo gerą mūsų metodo veiksmingumą, kuris turi geriausią ROUGE-2 atšaukimą tarp grafiku pagrįstų klasifikavimo metodų.', 'kk': 'Көп құжаттардың тұжырымдамасы қосымша құжаттардың мәліметін тұжырымдамасыз қысқа мәтінде пайдаланушыларды көрсетеді. Бұл қағаз кездейсоқ жұмыс істеу тапсырмасына кездейсоқ жұмыс сақтау үшін кездейсоқ жұмыс істеу тапсырмасын сақтайды. Бұл сөздердің қатынасын кездейсоқ жұмыс үлгісімен сақтайды. Осы уақытта, біз кездейсоқ жүргізу процесінде тәртіпсіздік тәртіпсіздік шектеуді көмектесу үшін кездейсоқ жүргізуді сақтай аламыз. DUC 2003 тақырыпта нақышты тұжырымдау тапсырмасы және DUC 2004 жалпы тұжырымдау тапсырмасы біздің әдіміміздің жақсы ықтималдығын көрсетеді. Бұл графикалық тұжырымдау әдістерінің ең жақсы ROUGE-2 қайт', 'ml': 'പല രേഖകളുടെ ചുരുക്കം ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു ചെറുതായ പദാവലിയുമായി നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം ബന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കുറച്ചുകൂടാതെ സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് നടക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകളുടെ ബന്ധങ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നിര്\u200dണയിക്കാനുള്ള ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ നടക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d മുന്നോട്ട് നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നു. ഡിയൂസി 2003 പ്രമേയത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന രൂജിയുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d, ഡിയുസി 2004 സാധാരണ ചുരുക്കിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ജോലി നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ നല്ല പ്രകട', 'ms': 'Pengringkasan-dokumen berbilang menyediakan pengguna teks pendek yang menggambarkan maklumat dalam set dokumen berkaitan. Kertas ini memperkenalkan berjalan rawak yang memelihara afini ke tugas pengringkasan, yang memelihara hubungan afini kalimat oleh model berjalan rawak yang menyerap. Sementara itu, kami melanjutkan jalan rawak yang boleh disesuaikan untuk memelihara afinitas untuk memaksa keterangan pelbagai pengringkasan dalam proses berjalan rawak. Evaluasi ROUGE pada tugas pengringkasan fokus topik DUC 2003 dan tugas pengringkasan generik DUC 2004 menunjukkan prestasi yang baik kaedah kami, yang mempunyai pengingatan ROUGE-2 terbaik diantara kaedah pengukuran berdasarkan graf.', 'mt': 'Is-sommarju ta’ diversi dokumenti jipprovdi lill-utenti b’test qasir li jagħti sommarju tal-informazzjoni f’sett ta’ dokumenti relatati. Din id-dokument tintroduċi mixja każwali li tippreserva l-affinità għall-kompitu ta’ sommarju, li tippreserva r-relazzjonijiet ta’ affinità tas-sentenzi permezz ta’ mudell ta’ mixja każwali li jassorbi. Sadanittant, ippreżentajna mixja każwali aġġustabbli li tippreserva l-affinità biex tinforza r-restrizzjoni tad-diversità tas-sommarju fil-proċess tal-mixja każwali. L-evalwazzjonijiet ROUGE dwar il-kompitu ta’ sommarju ffukat fuq is-suġġett tal-DUC 2003 u l-kompitu ta’ sommarju ġeneriku tal-DUC 2004 juru l-prestazzjoni tajba tal-metodu tagħna, li għandu l-aħjar tfakkir ROUGE-2 fost il-metodi ta’ klassifikazzjoni bbażati fuq il-grafika.', 'mk': 'Мултидокументарната резимулација им овозможува на корисниците краток текст кој ги резимулира информациите во група поврзани документи. Овој весник претставува случајно одење за зачувување на афинитетот до задачата за резултатирање, што ги зачувува афинитетските односи на речениците со апсорбирачки случајен модел за одење. Во меѓувреме, предложивме прилагодлив случајен чекор со зачувување на афинитетот за да го спроведеме ограничувањето на различноста на резултатот во случајниот процес на чекор. Оценките на РУГЕ за задачата за резултатирање фокусирана на темата на ДУК 2003 и генералната задача за резултатирање на ДУК 2004 покажуваат добра резултат на нашиот метод, кој има најдобро повлекување на РУГЕ-2 помеѓу методите за рангирање базирани на графот.', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie wielu dokumentów zapewnia użytkownikom krótki tekst, który podsumowuje informacje w zestawie powiązanych dokumentów. Niniejszy artykuł wprowadza do zadania podsumowywania losowego chodzenia zachowującego powinowactwo, które zachowuje relacje powinowactwa zdań poprzez absorbujący model chodzenia losowego. Tymczasem zaproponowaliśmy regulowane powinowactwo zachowujące losowe chodzenie, aby wyegzekwować ograniczenie różnorodności podsumowania w procesie losowego chodzenia. Oceny ROUGE dotyczące tematycznego zadania podsumowania DUC 2003 i generycznego zadania podsumowania DUC 2004 pokazują dobrą wydajność naszej metody, która ma najlepsze przywołanie ROUGE-2 wśród metod rankingowych opartych na wykresie.', 'ro': 'Rezumatul mai multor documente oferă utilizatorilor un text scurt care rezumă informațiile dintr-un set de documente conexe. Această lucrare introduce afinitatea păstrând pasul aleatoriu la sarcina de rezumare, care păstrează relațiile de afinitate ale propozițiilor printr-un model de mers aleatoriu absorbint. Între timp, am propus o plimbare aleatorie reglabilă pentru păstrarea afinității pentru a impune constrângerea diversității de rezumare în procesul aleatoriu de mers. Evaluările ROUGE privind sarcina de rezumare tematică DUC 2003 și sarcina de rezumare generică DUC 2004 arată performanța bună a metodei noastre, care are cea mai bună reamintire ROUGE-2 printre metodele de clasificare bazate pe grafic.', 'mn': 'Олон-баримт дурангууд нь хэрэглэгчиддээ холбоотой баримтуудад мэдээллийг дурангуудын богино текст өгдөг. Энэ цаас санамсаргүй алхам загварын тулд хэвлэгдэх даалгаварыг хадгалах боломжтой болгодог. Тэр үед бид санамсаргүй алхам үйлдлийн хувьд олон янз бүрийн тодорхойлолтын хязгаарыг зохицуулахын тулд санамсаргүй байдлыг хадгалах боломжтой байдлыг илгээсэн. РОУGE 2003 оны DUC-ын тодорхойлолтын даалгаврын шалгалт болон DUC 2004 оны тодорхойлолтын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын сайн үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг. Энэ нь график дээр суурилсан цуврал аргын хамгийн сайн RO', 'no': 'Samandring av fleire dokument gjev brukarar ein kort tekst som samandrar informasjonen i eit sett av tilhøyrande dokument. Denne papiret introduserer tilfeldige gåve til sammendragsverktøyet, som beholder affinititetsrelasjonane til setningar ved å absorbera tilfeldige gålmodell. I tillegg legg vi fram tilfeldige korleis affinity-preservar er tilfeldige gåve for å gjera forskjellighetsgrensen for samandringa i tilfeldige gångsprosessen. ROUGE-evalueringane på DUC 2003-oppgåva med temafokusert samanseringar og DUC 2004-oppgåva for generiske samanseringar viser den gode utviklinga av metoden vårt, som har den beste oppgåva av ROUGE-2 mellom diagrambaserte rankingsmetodane.', 'sr': 'Skupina višestrukog dokumenta pruža korisnikima kratki tekst koji sažeta informacije u skupu povezanih dokumenta. Ovaj papir predstavlja nasumičnu šetnju za sačuvanje afinita, koja sačuva odnose rečenica afinitnosti, apsorbujući nasumični šetnji model. U međuvremenu, predložili smo prilagodljivu prilagodljivu afinitsku zaštitu nasumične šetnje kako bi se proveli ograničenje raznolikosti sažetka u nasumičnom šetnju. Procjenjivanja ROUGE-a o zadatku za rezimetiranje tema usredotočenom na DUC 2003. godinu i zadatku DUC-a 2004. generalno rezimetiranje pokazuju dobru funkciju našeg metoda, koja ima najbolje sjećanje ROUGE-2 među metodama na grafiku.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta dukumentiyada badan waxaad isticmaalayaasha ka heleysaa qoraal gaaban oo ku qoran macluumaadka qoraalka la xiriira. Qoraalkan wuxuu ku soo bandhigaa xafiiska xagaalka, kaas oo ilaalinaya xiriirka xiriirka xukunka, waxaana lagu soo bandhigayaa model socota fudud. Meanwhile, we put forward adjustable affinity-preserving random walk to enforce the diversity constraint of summarization in the random walk process.  Qiimeynta ROUGE ee DUC 2003 mada-focused summarization and DUC 2004 shaqo generic summarization shows the good performance of methodkeen, which has the best ROUGE-2 xusuus among the methods of grammar-based.', 'sv': 'Sammanfattning av flera dokument ger användarna en kort text som sammanfattar informationen i en uppsättning relaterade dokument. Denna uppsats introducerar affinitetsbevarande random walk till sammanfattningsuppgiften, som bevarar affinitetsrelationerna mellan meningar genom en absorberande random walk modell. Samtidigt lägger vi fram justerbar affinitet-bevarande slumpmässig promenad för att genomdriva mångfaldsbegränsningen av sammanfattning i slumpmässig promenad process. ROUGE-utvärderingarna av DUC 2003 ämnesfokuserad sammanfattningsuppgift och DUC 2004 generisk sammanfattningsuppgift visar att vår metod har den bästa ROUGE-2-återkallelsen bland de grafbaserade rankningsmetoderna.', 'si': 'Multi- ලිපින්ත සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් සම්බන්ධතා ලිපින්ත සංවේදනයෙන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතා කරනවා. මේ පත්තුව සම්පූර්ණත්වය සම්පූර්ණත්වය සම්පූර්ණත්වය සම්පූර්ණත්වය සම්පූර්ණත්වය සම්පූර්ණත්වය සම්බන්ධත අතර වෙලාවෙන්, අපි පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් ඇතුල්  ROUGE විශ්වාසය DUC 2003 ප්\u200dරශ්නය-ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සහ DUC 2004 සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සම්බන්ධ වැඩ සම්බන්ධ වි', 'ur': 'Multi-document summarization provides users with a short text that summarizes the information in a set of related documents. This paper introduces affinity-conserving random walk to the summarization task, which preserves the affinity relationships by an absorbing random walk model. یہاں تک کہ ہم نے ایک طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر DUC ۲۰۰۳ موضوع پر روGE ارزیابی کا ارزیابی ہے اور DUC ۲۰۰۴ کی عمومی ارزیابی کا ارزیابی ہے جو ہمارے طریقے کا اچھا کام دکھاتا ہے، جس کے پاس بہترین ROUGE-2 یاد کرنا گراف بنیاد رینگ طریقوں میں ہے.', 'ta': 'பல- ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கம் பயனர்களுக்கு ஒரு சிறிய உரையுடன் வழங்குகிறது, அது தகவலை சுருக்கியுள்ள ஒரு தொடர்புடைய ஆவணங்கள இந்த தாள் குறிப்பிடும் சுருக்கும் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு தொடர்பை காப்பாற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட ஒழுங்குபட்ட நடப்பு மாதிரியால் தொடர அதற்குள்ளில், நாம் முன்னோக்கி செலுத்தும் ஒழுங்குப்படையான தொடர்பு பாதுகாப்பு செல்லும் குறிப்பிட்ட நடக்கும் சுரு The ROUGE evaluations on DUC 2003 theme- focused summarization task and DUC 2004 generic summarization task show the good performance of our method, which has the best ROUGE-2 recurrence among the graph-based ranking methods.', 'uz': "@ info Ushbu qogʻoz tahrirlash vazifasini tahrirlash imkoniyatini beradi. Bu so'zlarni tahrirlash imkoniyatlarini saqlash mumkin. Bu paytda, biz cheksiz soʻzni saqlash davom etishni davom etishimiz mumkin. Tasodifiy soʻzning davomida turib turish jarayonining har xil qatlamni bajarishini bajaramiz. Name", 'vi': 'Việc tổng kết các văn bản đa tài liệu cung cấp cho người dùng một văn bản ngắn mà tổng hợp thông tin trong một tập tài liệu liên quan. Tờ giấy này giới thiệu khả năng duy trì các bước đi ngẫu nhiên cho việc mô phỏng, giữ các quan hệ đồng cảm của câu nói bằng một mô hình đi ngẫu nhiên hấp thụ. Trong khi đó, chúng tôi đưa ra các bước đi thích nghi thích nghi duy trì ngẫu nhiên để đảm bảo sự đa dạng giới hạn trong việc tóm tắt trong quá trình đi ngẫu nhiên. Những đánh giá về kết quả A lô đôi của một nhiệm vụ tổng quát về các vấn đề về các bạn đây và công việc tổng quát của A lô C/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A/A cho thấy khả năng của phương', 'bg': 'Обобщението на множество документи предоставя на потребителите кратък текст, който обобщава информацията в набор от свързани документи. Тази статия представя случайната разходка за запазване на афинитета към задачата за обобщаване, която запазва афинитетните отношения на изреченията чрез абсорбиращ модел на случайна разходка. Междувременно, ние предложихме регулируема афинитетна запазваща случайна разходка, за да се наложи ограничението на многообразието на обобщаване в процеса на случайна разходка. Оценките по тематична задача за обобщаване на ДУК 2003 и обща задача за обобщаване на ДУК 2004 показват доброто представяне на метода ни, който има най-доброто припомняне сред графичните методи за класиране.', 'da': 'Opsummering af flere dokumenter giver brugerne en kort tekst, der opsummerer oplysningerne i et sæt relaterede dokumenter. Denne artikel introducerer affinitetsbevarende tilfældig gåtur til opsummeringsopgaven, som bevarer affinitetsrelationerne mellem sætninger ved hjælp af en absorberende tilfældig gåtur model. I mellemtiden fremlagde vi justerbar affinitetsbevarende tilfældig gåtur for at håndhæve diversitetsbegrænsningen af opsummering i den tilfældige gåtur proces. ROUGE evalueringer af DUC 2003 emneofokuseret opsummeringsopgave og DUC 2004 generisk opsummeringsopgave viser den gode ydeevne af vores metode, som har den bedste ROUGE-2 tilbagekaldelse blandt de grafbaserede ranking metoder.', 'hr': 'Skupina višestrukog dokumenta pruža korisnicima kratkom tekstu koji sažete informacije u skupu povezanih dokumenta. Ovaj papir predstavlja nasumičnu šetnju sačuvajući afinitnost do zaključke zadatke, koji čuva afinitske odnose kazne apsorbujući nasumični šetnji model. U međuvremenu, predložili smo prilagodljivu prilagodljivu prilagodljivu afinitu čuvajuću nasumičnu šetnju kako bi se primjenjivali ograničenje raznolikosti sažetka u nasumičnom hodanju. Procjenjivanja ROUGE-a o zadatku usmjerenom na temu DUC 2003 i zadatku DUC-a 2004. generalne sažetke pokazuju dobre učinke našeg metoda, koja ima najbolje sjećanje ROUGE-2 među metodama postavljanja na grafiku.', 'nl': 'Samenvatting met meerdere documenten biedt gebruikers een korte tekst die de informatie samenvat in een reeks gerelateerde documenten. Dit artikel introduceert affiniteitsbehorende random walk aan de samenvattingstaak, die de affiniteitsverhoudingen van zinnen behoudt door een absorberend random walk model. Ondertussen stellen we aanpasbare affiniteit-behoud willekeurige wandeling voor om de diversiteitsbeperking van samenvatting in het willekeurige wandelproces af te dwingen. De ROUGE evaluaties op DUC 2003 topic-gerichte samenvattingstaak en DUC 2004 generieke samenvattingstaak tonen de goede prestaties van onze methode aan, die de beste ROUGE-2 recall onder de grafiek-gebaseerde rankingmethoden heeft.', 'id': 'Penapisan multi-dokumen menyediakan pengguna teks pendek yang meresumsikan informasi dalam set dokumen terkait. Kertas ini memperkenalkan perjalanan acak untuk mempertahankan afinitas ke tugas ringkasan, yang mempertahankan hubungan afinitas kalimat oleh model berjalan acak yang menyerap. Sementara itu, kami melanjutkan perjalanan acak yang dapat disesuaikan untuk mempertahankan afinitas untuk memaksa kebijaksanaan kebanyakan penglihatan dalam proses berjalan acak. The ROUGE evaluations on DUC 2003 topic-focused summarization task and DUC 2004 generic summarization task show the good performance of our method, which has the best ROUGE-2 recall among the graph-based ranking methods.', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری سند\u200cهای زیادی کاربران را با یک متن کوتاه می\u200cدهد که اطلاعات را در مجموعه سند\u200cهای ارتباط جمع می\u200cکند. این کاغذ با حفاظت تصادفی با حفاظت از اتفاقی به کار جمع\u200cآوری معرفی می\u200cکند که رابطه\u200cهای اتفاقی از جمله\u200cها را با یک مدل راه تصادفی حفاظت می\u200cکند. در ضمن، ما راه حل تصادفی که قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قرار دادیم تا محدود مختلف تغییر تعداد در پرو ارزیابهای ROUGE در مورد وظیفه جمع\u200cسازی موضوع DUC ۲۰۰۳ و وظیفه جمع\u200cسازی عمومی ۲۰۰۴ عملکرد خوب روش ما را نشان می\u200cدهند، که بهترین یادآوری ROUGE-2 در میان روش\u200cهای صف\u200cسازی بر گراف دارد.', 'ko': '다중 문서 요약은 관련 문서의 정보를 정리하는 데 사용되는 간단한 텍스트를 제공합니다.본고는 친화력을 유지하는 랜덤 유동을 요약 임무에 도입하고 흡수식 랜덤 유동 모델을 통해 문장의 친화력 관계를 유지하고자 한다.동시에 우리는 친화력을 조절할 수 있는 무작위 유동을 제기하여 무작위 유동 과정에서 요약된 다양성 제약을 강화했다.DUC 2003 주제 총결산 임무와 DUC 2004 범용 총결산 임무에 대한 ROUGE 평가에 따르면 이 방법은 좋은 성능을 가지고 그림을 바탕으로 하는 정렬 방법 중 가장 좋은 ROUGE-2 리콜률을 가진다.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa nyaraka nyingi unawapa watumiaji na ujumbe mfupi ambao unahitimisha taarifa katika mfululizo wa nyaraka zinazohusiana. Gazeti hili linaonyesha kutembea kwa urahisi usio na uwezekano wa kutembea kwenye jukumu la muhtasari, ambalo linalinda uhusiano wa mahusiano ya hukumu kwa muonekano wa kutembea bila urahisi. Wakati huo huo, tunaweka hatua ya kutengeneza mahusiano yanayoendelea ili kutekeleza vizuizi mbalimbali vya ufuatiliaji katika mchakato wa kutembea kwa urahisi. Tathmini za ROUGE zinazohusu jukumu la muhtasari la DUC 2003 na jukumu la muhtasari wa jumla la la DUC 2004 zinaonyesha utendaji mzuri wa njia yetu, ambalo ina kumbukumbu bora zaidi ya ROUGE-2 miongoni mwa njia za mipango yenye msingi wa picha.', 'af': "Multi- document opsomming verskaf gebruikers met 'n kort teks wat opsomming die inligting in' n stel van verwante dokumente. Hierdie papier introduseer affinity- preserving willekeurige wandel na die opsomming taak, wat die affinity relasies van setinge bevaar deur 'n absorberende willekeurige wandelsmodel. Tussen tyd, ons stel vorentoe aanpasbare affinity-beveiliging willekeurige wandel om die verskeidigheidgebrek van opsomming in die willekeurige wandel proses te vervul. Die ROUGE evaluasies op DUC 2003 onderwerp-fokuseerde opsomming taak en DUC 2004 generieke opsomming taak vertoon die goeie prestasie van ons metode, wat die beste ROUGE-2 herhaal onder die graaf-gebaseerde ranging metodes het.", 'am': 'የብዙ ሰነድ ማጠቃለያ የተጠቃሚ ጽሑፍ የተጠቃሚ ሆኖ የተጠቃሚ ጽሑፍ አቅራቢ ነው፡፡ ይህም ገጽ አካባቢው በተደጋጋጋሚ የመሄድ አካባቢ አካባቢ ለመሄድ አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም በተለየ ለመሄድ የልዩ ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ እናስቀናለን፡፡ የሮግጂ ውይይት በ2003 ውይይት ላይ የተጠቃሚ አዳራሽ አድራሻ እና ዲዩሲ 2004 የውጤት አቀማመጥ አድራሻ የሥርዓታችንን ጥሩ አድራጊ ያሳያል፤ በቋንቋው ላይ የተመሳሳይ የሮUGE-2 ማስታወሻ አለበት፡፡', 'de': 'Die Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente bietet Benutzern einen kurzen Text, der die Informationen in einer Reihe verwandter Dokumente zusammenfasst. Diese Arbeit führt affinitätserhaltende Zufallswanderung in die Zusammenfassungsaufgabe ein, die die Affinitätsbeziehungen von Sätzen durch ein absorbierendes Zufallslaufmodell bewahrt. Inzwischen haben wir einen einstellbaren affinitätserhaltenden Zufallslauf vorgeschlagen, um die Diversitätsbeschränkung der Zusammenfassung im Zufallslauf-Prozess durchzusetzen. Die ROUGE-Auswertungen für die thematische Zusammenfassungsaufgabe DUC 2003 und die generische Zusammenfassungsaufgabe DUC 2004 zeigen die gute Leistung unserer Methode, die unter den graphenbasierten Rankingmethoden den besten ROUGE-2-Rückruf aufweist.', 'hy': 'Շատ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրությունը տրամադրում է օգտագործողներին կարճ տեքստ, որը համառոտագրում է տեղեկատվությունը կապված փաստաթղթերի մի շարքում: Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է աֆինանտիվություն պահպանող պատահական քայլեր համառոտագրման խնդիրը, որը պահպանում է նախադասությունների աֆինանտիվությունը պատահական քայլերի մոդելի միջոցով: Միևնույն ժամանակ, մենք առաջարկում ենք հարմարավետ պատահական քայլեր, որոնք պահպանում են աֆինիտիվությունը, որպեսզի հաստատենք բազմազանության սահմանափակումները համառոտագրման ընթացքում: 2003թ-ի թեմայով կենտրոնացված համառոտագրման խնդիրը և 2004թ-ի ընդհանուր համառոտագրման խնդիրը ցույց են տալիս մեր մեթոդի լավ արտադրողությունը, որն ունի լավագույն ROUge-2 հիշողությունը գծագրի հիմնված դասակարգման մեթոդների մեջ:', 'az': 'Multi-document summarization istifadəçilərini müxtəlif dökümələr içində məlumatları toplayan qısa metin ilə təmin edir. Bu kağıt, istifadə etmə işinə istifadə edərək affinity-preserving rastgele yürüyüş göstərir, ki, cümlələrin affinity ilişkilerini istifadə edən rastgele yürüyüş modeli ilə qoruyur. Bu arada, biz müxtəlif yürüyüş sürətində müxtəlif müəyyənləşdirilmək müəyyənləşdirilməsi üçün müəyyənləşdirilmiş affinity-conservation tərzini təyin etdik. DUC 2003 təsəvvür-təsəvvür təsəvvür edilmiş təsəvvür və DUC 2004 təsəvvür təsəvvür etməsi təqdirdə bizim metodumuzun ən yaxşı performansını göstərir. Bu, grafik təsəvvür edilmiş təsəvvür metodları arasında ən yaxşı ROUGE-2 təsəvvür edir.', 'tr': 'Çoklu-sened jeminaty ulananlaryň bir sened içine gysýa metini süýtgedýär Bu kagyz affinity hasaplanjak täzeliklerine saýlayan, hasaplanjak täzeliklerini saýlaýar. Bu arada, biziň görnüşimizi taýýarlanabilir affinity hasaplamak üçin rastgelen ýüregimizi tespit edip gönderdik. ROUGE DUC 2003-nji tema görkezilen topary görkezilişi we DUC 2004-nji ýygnak görkezilişi biziň metodamyzyň gowy täsirini görkez. Bu grafik daýanýan çyzygyň iň gowy ýagdaýynda ROUGE-2 gowy ýagdaýyny görkez.', 'bs': 'Skupina višestrukog dokumenta pruža korisnicima kratkom tekstu koji sažete informacije u skupu povezanih dokumenta. Ovaj papir predstavlja nasumičnu šetnju sačuvajući afinitnost do zaključke zadatke, koji čuva afinitske odnose kazne apsorbujući nasumični šetnji model. U međuvremenu, predložili smo prilagodljivu prilagodljivu prilagodljivu afinitsku zaštitu nasumične šetnje kako bi se primjenjivali ograničenje raznolikosti sažetka u nasumičnom hodanju. Procjenjivanja ROUGE-a o zadatku za rezimetiranje tema usmjerenom na DUC 2003 i zadatku DUC-a 2004. generalne rezimetiranje pokazuju dobre funkcije našeg metoda, koja ima najbolje sjećanje ROUGE-2 među metodama rangiranja na grafiku.', 'cs': 'Shrnutí více dokumentů poskytuje uživatelům krátký text, který shrnuje informace v sadě souvisejících dokumentů. Tento článek představuje afinitně uchovávající náhodnou procházku do souhrnné úlohy, která zachovává afinitní vztahy vět absorbujícím náhodným procházkovým modelem. Mezitím jsme předložili nastavitelnou afinitu zachovávající náhodnou chůzi, abychom vynucovali omezení rozmanitosti souhrnu v procesu náhodného chůze. Hodnocení ROUGE na tématickém souhrnném úkolu DUC 2003 a generickém souhrnném úkolu DUC 2004 ukazují dobrý výkon naší metody, která má nejlepší ROUGE-2 volání mezi grafově založenými hodnoceními metodami.', 'sq': 'Përmbledhja shumëdokumentore ofron përdoruesve një tekst të shkurtër që përmbledh informacionin në një sërë dokumentesh të lidhura. Kjo letër paraqet shëtitjen e rastësisë për ruajtjen e afinitetit në detyrën e përmbledhjes, e cila ruan marrëdhëniet e afinitetit të fjalëve nga një model i përshpëritjes së shëtitjes së rastësisë. Ndërkohë, ne paraqitëm një shëtitje të rregullueshme për ruajtjen e afinitetit për të zbatuar kufizimin e diversitetit të përmbledhjes në procesin e shëtitjes së rastësisë. The ROUGE evaluations on DUC 2003 topic-focused summarization task and DUC 2004 generic summarization task show the good performance of our method, which has the best ROUGE-2 recall among the graph-based ranking methods.', 'bn': 'বহুল নথির সারসংক্ষেপ ব্যবহারকারীদের একটি সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট দিয়ে সংক্ষিপ্ত তথ্য সংক্ষিপ্ত করে। এই পত্রিকাটি সংক্ষেপের কাজে সংশ্লিষ্ট সংরক্ষণের ক্ষেত্রে আত্মীয়তা সংরক্ষণের সাথে হাঁটতে থাকে, যেটি ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হাঁটতে পারে একটি হাঁ এদিকে আমরা সংশ্লিষ্ট হাটতে বৈচিত্র্যের বৈচিত্র্য সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত বৈচিত্র্যের নিয়ন্ত্রণ বাধ্য করি। ডিউজি ২০০৩ সালের বিষয়টির উপর রুজের মূল্য দেখা যায় গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক রেঙ্কিং পদ্ধতির মধ্যে সবচেয়ে ভালো রুজেই-২ স্মরণ করে।', 'ca': "La resumida multidocumental proporciona als usuaris un text curt que resume la informació d'un conjunt de documents relacionats. Aquest article introdueix un camí aleatòri que conserva l'afinitat a la tasca de resum, que conserva les relacions d'afinitat de les frases amb un model absorbent de camí aleatòri. Mentrestant, vam presentar un camí aleatòri adaptable que conservi l'afinitat per aplicar la restricció de diversitat de la sumarització en el procés de camí aleatòri. Les evaluacions ROUGE sobre la tasca de resum centrada en el tema DUC 2003 i la tasca de resum genèric DUC 2004 mostren el bon rendiment del nostre mètode, que té el millor recul ROUGE-2 entre els mètodes de ranking basats en el gràfic.", 'fi': 'Usean asiakirjan yhteenveto tarjoaa käyttäjille lyhyen tekstin, joka tiivistää tiedot toisiinsa liittyvissä asiakirjoissa. Tämä artikkeli esittelee affiniteettia säilyttävän satunnaisen kävelyn yhteenvetotehtävään, joka säilyttää lauseiden affiniteettisuhteet absorboivan satunnaisen kävelymallin avulla. Samalla ehdotimme säädettävää affiniteettia säilyttävää satunnaista kävelyä vahvistamaan yhteenvedon monimuotoisuusrajoitusta satunnaisessa kävelyprosessissa. ROUGE-arvioinnit DUC 2003:n aihekohtaisesta yhteenvetotehtävästä ja DUC 2004:n yleisestä yhteenvetotehtävästä osoittavat menetelmämme hyvän suorituskyvyn, jolla on paras ROUGE-2-muisti graafisten ranking-menetelmien joukossa.', 'et': 'Mitme dokumendi kokkuvõte annab kasutajatele lühikese teksti, mis võtab kokku seotud dokumentide kogumi teabe. Käesolev töö tutvustab kokkuvõtliku ülesande afiinsust säilitavat juhuslikku kõndimist, mis säilitab lausete afiinsussuhteid absorbeeriva juhusliku kõndimise mudeli abil. Samal ajal pakume välja reguleeritava afiinsust säilitava juhusliku kõndimise, et jõustada mitmekesisuse piirang kokkuvõtliku kõndimise protsessis. ROUGE hinnangud DUC 2003 teemapõhise kokkuvõtlusülesande ja DUC 2004 üldise kokkuvõtlusülesande kohta näitavad meie meetodi head tulemuslikkust, millel on parim ROUGE-2 meeldetuletus graafiliste järjestusmeetodite hulgas.', 'sk': 'Povzetek več dokumentov uporabnikom omogoča kratko besedilo, ki povzema informacije v naboru sorodnih dokumentov. Prispevek predstavlja naključno hojo za ohranjanje afinitete v nalogo povzemanja, ki ohranja afinitetna razmerja stavkov s pomočjo absorpcijskega modela naključnega hoje. Medtem smo predlagali nastavljivo afiniteto, ki ohranja naključno hojo, da bi uveljavili omejitev raznolikosti povzetka v procesu naključne hoje. ROUGE ocene na tematsko usmerjeni nalogi povzetka DUC 2003 in generični nalogi povzetka DUC 2004 kažejo dobro uspešnost naše metode, ki ima najboljši ROUGE-2 pri metodah razvrščanja na grafični osnovi.', 'jv': 'Cumulate multi-document Perintah iki dadi nggawe politenessoni-tenan mulai, dadi menyang kakipun nggo resmi dadi, sing nyimpen karo perusahaan kelangan kanggo Kemerdekaan nguasar politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive DUTC 2003', 'he': 'סדרת מסמכים רבות מספקת למשתמשים טקסט קצר שמסכם את המידע בתוך קבוצת מסמכים קשורים. העיתון הזה מציג הליכה אקראית לשמור על היחסים למשימת הסכם, אשר שומר על יחסי היחסים של המשפטים על ידי מודל הליכה אקראי שמסופג. בינתיים, אנחנו מציעים הליכה אקראית מתאימה לשמור על היחסים כדי להכריח את חוסר המגווון של הסכם בתהליך הליכה אקראי. הערכות של ROUGE על משימה המתמקדת על הנושא של DUC 2003 ומשימת המתמקדת על הנושא של DUC 2004 מראות את ההופעה הטובה של השיטה שלנו, שיש לה את הזיכרון הטוב ביותר של ROUGE-2 בין השיטות המבוססות על הגרף.', 'ha': "Kurarinsa na mulki-dokuman na samar da masu amfani da wani littãfi kaɗan da ke ƙaranci information cikin wani takardar takardun da ke da husũma. Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da affinity-tsare ranar tafiya zuwa wani aikin sumarin, wanda yana tsare affinity ties of maganar da wani motel mai yin tafiya na daidai. A lokacin da za mu gabatar da shirin tsari-affinity da ba da sauri ba dõmin mu lazimta tsari masu baka cikin tafiyar da za'a yi sauri. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu", 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་མང་ཆེ་བ་བསྡུས་ནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཡིག་གེ་ཆ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་པ་དང་ཐད་རིམ་ཐང་བའི་འགྲུལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡོད། ད་དུས་བརྟན་པར། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་སྐོར་ལས་རྗེས་སུ་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། DUC 2003ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་བསྡུར་བརྗོད་བ་དང་DUC 2004ལྟ་བུ'}
{'en': 'Hierarchical Embeddings for Hypernymy Detection and Directionality', 'ar': 'التطريزات الهرمية للكشف عن فرط التباين والاتجاه', 'fr': "Embeddings hiérarchiques pour la détection de l'hypernymie et la directionnalité", 'pt': 'Incorporações hierárquicas para detecção e direcionalidade de hipernímia', 'es': 'Incorporaciones jerárquicas para la detección de hipernemias y la direccionalidad', 'ja': 'ハイパーニミー検出と方向性のための階層的埋め込み', 'zh': '以超音检方向性分嵌之', 'hi': 'Hypernymy डिटेक्शन और दिशात्मकता के लिए पदानुक्रमित एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Иерархические вложения для обнаружения гипернимии и направленности', 'ga': 'Leabú Ordlathach chun Hipirimide a Bhrath agus Treo', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ιεραρχικές Ενσωματώσεις για Ανίχνευση Υπερνυμίας και Κατευθυνότητα', 'hu': 'Hierarchikus beágyazások a hipernímia felismeréséhez és irányításához', 'it': "Embeddings gerarchici per la rilevazione e la direzionalità dell'ipernimia", 'ms': 'Hierarchical Embeddings for Hypernymy Detection and Directionality', 'kk': 'Hypernymy анықтау және бағытталу үшін хиеррикалық ендіру', 'mk': 'Хиерархиски вградувања за детекција и насока на хипернимија', 'lt': 'Hierarchinės įrangos hipernimijai nustatyti ir kryptingumui nustatyti', 'mn': 'Хиперним нээлттэй болон засагтай байдлын төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөө', 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിമി ഡിറ്റിക്റ്റീഷനും ഡയറക്ടിഷനിലും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള എംബഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Embeddings Hierarchical for Hypernymy Detection and Directionality', 'pl': 'Hierarchiczne osadzenia dla wykrywania hipernimii i kierunkowości', 'ro': 'Încorporări ierarhice pentru detectarea hiperinimiei și direcționalității', 'sr': 'Hijerarhičke integracije za hipernimu detekciju i direktionalnost', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Hierarchical Emails for Hypernymy Detection and Direction', 'sv': 'Hierarkiska inbäddningar för detektering av hypernymi och riktning', 'ta': 'Hypernymy கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் திசை', 'ur': 'Hypernymy Detection and Directionality کے لئے ہیرارشیک ایمبڈینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Hijerarhičke integracije za hipernimu otkrivanje i direktivnost', 'da': 'Hierarkiske indlejringer til detektion af hypernymi og retning', 'bg': 'Йерархични вграждания за откриване на хипернимия и посока', 'nl': 'Hiërarchische embeddings voor hyperniemiedetectie en directionaliteit', 'fa': 'انجمن\u200cسازی\u200cهای تحریک برای شناسایی و مستقیم هوپر نیمی', 'de': 'Hierarchische Einbettungen für Hypernymieerkennung und Direktionalität', 'id': 'Embeddings Hierarkis untuk Deteksi Hipernimi dan Kearahan', 'ko': '초동명 검사와 방향성 삽입에 사용', 'sw': 'Mazingira ya Hierarchical for Hypernymy Detection and Direction', 'tr': 'Hypernimiň tanyşy we Däşerlik üçin iýerarhiýal girişmeler', 'af': 'Name', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'sq': 'Embeddinget Hierarkike për zbulimin dhe drejtimin e hipernimisë', 'az': 'Hypernimik keşfini və Dərqliyyatı üçün hiyerarşik İfadələri', 'bs': 'Hijerarhičke integracije za hipernimu detekciju i direktivnost', 'bn': 'হাইপার্নিমি ডিরেক্টরিশন এবং ডিরেক্টরিশনিটির জন্য হিরেরিক্যাল ইমেডিং', 'ca': 'Embeddings Hierarquics for Hypernymy Detection and Directionality', 'cs': 'Hierarchické vložení pro detekci hypernymií a směrovost', 'et': 'Hierarhilised manustamised hüpernüümia tuvastamiseks ja suunamiseks', 'fi': 'Hierarkiset upotukset hypernyymin tunnistusta ja suuntaa varten', 'hy': 'Հիպեռնիմիայի հայտնաբերման և ուղղության հիերարխիկ ներգրավումներ', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'התקנים היררכיים לגלות היפרנימיה והכיוון', 'sk': 'Hierarhične vdelave za zaznavanje hipernimije in usmeritev', 'jv': 'Sampeyan pancening akeh akeh pancening kanggo diketeksi karo diketeksi', 'bo': 'Hypernymy Detection and Directionality དོན་ལ་སུག་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་'}
{'en': 'We present a novel neural model HyperVec to learn hierarchical embeddings for hypernymy detection and directionality. While previous embeddings have shown limitations on prototypical hypernyms, HyperVec represents an unsupervised measure where embeddings are learned in a specific order and capture the hypernymhyponym distributional hierarchy. Moreover, our model is able to generalize over unseen hypernymy pairs, when using only small sets of training data, and by mapping to other languages. Results on benchmark datasets show that HyperVec outperforms both state-of-the-art unsupervised measures and embedding models on hypernymy detection and directionality, and on predicting graded lexical entailment.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا جديدًا HyperVec لتعلم حفلات الزفاف الهرمية للكشف عن فرط الحركة والاتجاه. بينما أظهرت عمليات التضمين السابقة قيودًا على التشعبات النموذجية ، فإن HyperVec يمثل مقياسًا غير خاضع للإشراف حيث يتم تعلم الزخارف بترتيب معين والتقاط التسلسل الهرمي التوزيعي التشعبي. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن نموذجنا قادر على التعميم على أزواج hypernymy غير المرئية ، عند استخدام مجموعات صغيرة فقط من بيانات التدريب ، وعن طريق التخطيط للغات أخرى. تُظهر النتائج على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية أن HyperVec يتفوق في الأداء على كل من أحدث المقاييس غير الخاضعة للإشراف ونماذج التضمين في الكشف عن فرط التعقيد والاتجاه ، وعلى التنبؤ بالاستدلال المعجمي المتدرج.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un nouveau modèle neuronal HyperVEC pour apprendre les intégrations hiérarchiques pour la détection de l'hypernymie et la directionnalité. Alors que les intégrations précédentes ont montré des limites sur les hyperonymes prototypiques, HyperVec représente une mesure non supervisée où les intégrations sont apprises dans un ordre spécifique et capturent la hiérarchie de distribution hypernyme—hyponyme. De plus, notre modèle est capable de généraliser sur des paires d'hypernymies invisibles, en n'utilisant que de petits ensembles de données d'entraînement et en les mappant à d'autres langues. Les résultats des ensembles de données de référence montrent que HyperVec surpasse à la fois les mesures non supervisées de pointe et les modèles d'intégration sur la détection de l'hypernymie et la directionnalité, et sur la prédiction de l'implication lexicale graduée.", 'es': 'Presentamos un novedoso modelo neuronal HyperVec para aprender incrustaciones jerárquicas para la detección de hipernemias y la direccionalidad. Mientras que las incorporaciones anteriores han mostrado limitaciones en los hiperónimos prototípicos, HyperVec representa una medida no supervisada en la que las incorporaciones se aprenden en un orden específico y capturan la jerarquía distribucional del hipernimo: hipónimo. Además, nuestro modelo es capaz de generalizar sobre pares de hipernemias invisibles, cuando se utilizan solo pequeños conjuntos de datos de entrenamiento y se mapean a otros idiomas. Los resultados de los conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que HyperVec supera tanto a las medidas no supervisadas de última generación como a la incorporación de modelos en la detección y direccionalidad de la hipernemia, y en la predicción de la implicación léxica gradual.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo modelo neural HyperVec para aprender incorporações hierárquicas para detecção e direcionalidade de hipernímia. Embora as incorporações anteriores tenham mostrado limitações em hiperônimos prototípicos, o HyperVec representa uma medida não supervisionada em que as incorporações são aprendidas em uma ordem específica e capturam a hierarquia de distribuição hiperônimo-hipônimo. Além disso, nosso modelo é capaz de generalizar sobre pares de hipernímia não vistos, usando apenas pequenos conjuntos de dados de treinamento e mapeando para outras linguagens. Os resultados nos conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que o HyperVec supera as medidas não supervisionadas de última geração e os modelos de incorporação na detecção e direcionalidade de hipernímia e na previsão de vinculação lexical graduada.', 'ja': 'HyperVecは、ハイパーニミー検出と方向性のための階層的埋め込みを学習するための新規のニューラルモデルを提示します。以前の埋め込みは、プロトタイプのハイパーニームに制限を示していますが、HyperVecは、埋め込みが特定の順序で学習され、ハイパーニーム-ハイポニーム分布階層を取り込む、監督されていないメジャーを表します。さらに、私たちのモデルは、小さなトレーニングデータのセットのみを使用し、他の言語にマッピングするときに、見えない超名ペアを一般化することができます。ベンチマークデータセットの結果は、HyperVecが、ハイパーニミー検出と方向性、およびグレーディングされた語彙の関連性の予測に関する最先端の監視されていない測定と埋め込みモデルの両方を上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '立新神经模HyperVec,以学超性检方向性之分嵌。 虽前嵌已示出对原型超名之限,而HyperVec代无监督之量,其嵌以特定次学而获超名 - 下称布层次结构。 此外,当仅以少练数,泛化未见超元对,映及他语。 准数集之果表明,HyperVec于超对称检方向性及占候分级词汇内涵皆优于先进者无监督测量嵌模。', 'hi': 'हम हाइपरनिमी डिटेक्शन और दिशात्मकता के लिए पदानुक्रमित एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका मॉडल हाइपरवेक प्रस्तुत करते हैं। जबकि पिछले एम्बेडिंग ने प्रोटोटाइपिकल हाइपरनिम्स पर सीमाएं दिखाई हैं, हाइपरवेक एक असुरक्षित उपाय का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है जहां एम्बेडिंग को एक विशिष्ट क्रम में सीखा जाता है और हाइपरनिम-हाइपोनिम वितरण पदानुक्रम पर कब्जा कर लिया जाता है। इसके अलावा, हमारा मॉडल अनदेखी हाइपरनॉमी जोड़े पर सामान्यीकरण करने में सक्षम है, जब प्रशिक्षण डेटा के केवल छोटे सेट का उपयोग किया जाता है, और अन्य भाषाओं में मैपिंग करके। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर परिणाम बताते हैं कि HyperVec दोनों अत्याधुनिक असुरक्षित उपायों और hypernymy का पता लगाने और दिशात्मकता पर मॉडल एम्बेडिंग, और वर्गीकृत लेक्सिकल entailment की भविष्यवाणी पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новую нейронную модель HyperVec для изучения иерархических вложений для обнаружения гипернимии и направленности. В то время как предыдущие вложения показали ограничения на прототипические гипернимы, HyperVec представляет собой неконтролируемую меру, где вложения изучаются в определенном порядке и захватывают иерархию распределения гипернимы-гипонимы. Более того, наша модель способна обобщать невидимые гипернимические пары, при использовании только небольших наборов обучающих данных, а также путем сопоставления с другими языками. Результаты сравнительных наборов данных показывают, что HyperVec превосходит как современные неконтролируемые меры, так и модели встраивания по обнаружению гипернимии и направленности, а также по прогнозированию дифференцированного лексического влечения.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid samhail néarúil nua HyperVec i láthair chun leabaithe ordlathacha a fhoghlaim chun hipearainmneacha a bhrath agus a dtreocht. Cé gur léirigh leabuithe roimhe seo teorainneacha ar hipearainmneacha fréamhshamhla, is ionann HyperVec agus beart gan mhaoirseacht ina bhfoghlaimítear leabaithe in ord ar leith agus ina nglacann sé an t-ordlathas dáileacháin hipearnam-hyponym. Ina theannta sin, is féidir lenár múnla ginearálú a dhéanamh ar phéirí hipearainmneacha nach bhfacthas riamh cheana, nuair nach n-úsáidtear ach tacair bheaga sonraí oiliúna, agus trí mhapáil chuig teangacha eile. Léiríonn torthaí ar thacair sonraí tagarmhairc go sáraíonn HyperVec na bearta neamh-mhaoirsithe úrscothacha agus na samhlacha neadaithe maidir le hiontaofacht a bhrath agus a dtreocht, agus maidir le gabháil léacsach grádaithe a thuar.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό μοντέλο για την εκμάθηση ιεραρχικών ενσωματώσεων για την ανίχνευση υπερνύμων και την κατεύθυνση. Ενώ οι προηγούμενες ενσωματώσεις έχουν δείξει περιορισμούς στα πρωτοτυπικά υπερνύματα, το υπερVec αντιπροσωπεύει ένα μη εποπτικό μέτρο όπου οι ενσωματώσεις μαθαίνονται με μια συγκεκριμένη σειρά και συλλαμβάνουν την ιεραρχία κατανομής υπερνύμων-υπονύμων. Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας είναι σε θέση να γενικεύσει πάνω από αόρατα ζεύγη υπερνύμων, όταν χρησιμοποιεί μόνο μικρά σύνολα δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης, και αντιστοιχίζοντας σε άλλες γλώσσες. Τα αποτελέσματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι το υπερVec ξεπερνά τόσο τα σύγχρονα μη εποπτικά μέτρα όσο και τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης στην ανίχνευση υπερνύμων και την κατεύθυνση, καθώς και την πρόβλεψη διαβαθμισμένης λεξικής συνεπαγόμενης.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy új HyperVec neurális modellt, amelynek segítségével hierarchikus beágyazásokat tanulhatunk a hipernímia felismeréséhez és irányításához. Míg a korábbi beágyazások korlátozták a prototípusos hipernímeket, a HyperVec egy felügyelet nélküli mértéket jelent, ahol a beágyazásokat egy adott sorrendben tanulják, és rögzítik a hiperním-hiponym eloszlási hierarchiát. Ezenkívül modellünk képes általánosítani a láthatatlan hipernímia párokat, ha csak kis edzési adatokat használ, és más nyelvekre való leképezéssel. A benchmark adatkészletek eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a HyperVec mind a legkorszerűbb, felügyelet nélküli méréseket, mind pedig a hipernímia felismerésében és irányításában, valamint a fokozott lexikai vonatkozások előrejelzésében felülmúlja a modelleket.', 'it': "Presentiamo un nuovo modello neurale HyperVec per imparare gli incorporamenti gerarchici per il rilevamento dell'ipernimia e la direzionalità. Mentre le incorporazioni precedenti hanno mostrato limitazioni sugli ipernimi prototipici, HyperVec rappresenta una misura non supervisionata in cui le incorporazioni vengono apprese in un ordine specifico e catturano la gerarchia distributiva ipernima-iponima. Inoltre, il nostro modello è in grado di generalizzare su coppie di ipernimie invisibili, utilizzando solo piccole serie di dati di allenamento, e mappando ad altre lingue. I risultati dei set di dati di benchmark mostrano che HyperVec supera sia le misure non supervisionate all'avanguardia che l'incorporazione di modelli sul rilevamento e sulla direzionalità dell'ipernimia, sia sulla previsione del coinvolgimento lessicale graduato.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნეიროლური მოდელ HyperVec-ს, რომ ისწავლათ ჰიერარქიური ინბედინგიები ჰიპერნიმის განახლებისთვის და დირექტონალისთვის. თუმცა წინა შემდეგი შემდეგ პროტეტიპური ჰიპერნიმების განზომილებები ჩვენებენ, HyperVec იყოს განზომილებული განზომილებელი განზომილებელი განზომილებელი განზომილებელი განზომილებელი განზომილებელი განზომილებელი წერტილით დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია განახლებელი ჰიპერნიმი ზოგების გენერალიზაცია, როდესაც მხოლოდ პატარა განახლებელი მონაცემები გამოყენება და სხვა ენების მარტივი მონაცემების მონაცემების შედეგები ჩვენებს, რომ HyperVec უფრო გავამუშავებს ორივე განსხვავებული მონაცემები და მოდელები ჰიპერნიმის განსხვავება და დირექციონალიტების შესახებ და წარმოდგენებაში ლექსიკალური და', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome naują neurologinį model į HyperVec, kad išmoktume hierarchinius įdėjimus hipernimijos aptikimui ir kryptingumui. Nors ankstesni įdėjimai parodė prototipinių hipernimų apribojimus, HyperVec yra nepastebima priemonė, kai įdėjimai mokomi konkrečia tvarka ir apima hipernimų ir hiponimų paskirstymo hierarchiją. Be to, mūsų model is gali apskritai paplitti nepastebimoms hiperinimos poroms, naudojant tik nedidelius mokymo duomenų rinkinius ir žemėlapius į kitas kalbas. Lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad HyperVec veikia geriausiai kaip naujausias nepastebimas priemones ir įtraukia hipernimijos aptikimo ir kryptingumo modelius bei prognozuoja laipsnišką lexinį įtraukimą.', 'kk': 'Біз гипернимді анықтау және бағыттау үшін иерархиялық ендіруді үйрену үшін романдық невралдық моделі HyperVec деп таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы енгізулер прототипикалық гипернимдерінің шектерін көрсетеді, HyperVec деген белгілі ретінде енгізулерді оқып, гиперним- гипоним дистрибуциялық иерархиясын түсіндіреді. Қосымша, біздің үлгіміз көрсетілмеген гипернимдік екептерді жалпы түрлендіруге болады, тек кішкентай бөлім деректерді қолдану және басқа тілдерге картап беруге болады. Жинақтық деректер жиындарының нәтижелері HyperVec- ның хипернимді анықтау және бағыттаулық үлгілерді табу және бағыттаулық үлгілерді жасау үлгілеріне және классикалық жасау үлгілеріне қарай жасайды дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model saraf baru HyperVec untuk belajar pelengkapan hierarkis untuk pengesan hipernimi dan arah. Sementara penerbangan terdahulu telah menunjukkan keterangan pada hipernim prototipik, HyperVec mewakili ukuran tidak diawasi di mana penerbangan belajar dalam tertib tertentu dan menangkap hierarki distribusi hipernim-hiponym. Selain itu, model kita mampu menyeluruhkan pasangan hipernimi yang tidak terlihat, apabila menggunakan hanya set kecil data latihan, dan dengan peta ke bahasa lain. Keputusan pada set data tanda rujukan menunjukkan bahawa HyperVec melampaui kedua-dua tindakan-tindakan yang tidak diawasi state-of-the-art dan memasukkan model pada pengesan hipernimi dan arah-arah, dan pada meramalkan penyelesaian leksikal tertinggi.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов нервен модел ХиперВек за да научиме хиерархички вградувања за детекција на хипернимија и директионалност. Иако претходните вградувања покажаа ограничувања на прототипичните хиперними, ХиперВек претставува ненадгледувана мерка каде што вградувањата се научија во специфичен ред и ја заземаат дистрибуционалната хипернимска хиерархија. Покрај тоа, нашиот модел може да се генерализира преку невидени парови хиперними, кога користи само мали групи податоци за обука, и со мапирање на други јазици. Резултатите на базите на податоци покажуваат дека ХиперВек ги надминува најсовремените ненадгледувани мерки и вклучува модели за детекција на хипернимија и директионалност, како и за предвидување на оценети лексикални интелигенции.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dവെക്കിന് ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവന്നു ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dവെക്ക് ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dവെക്ക് ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമി കണ്ടെത മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രോട്ടോപ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dവെക്കിന്റെ പരിധികള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dവെക്ക് ഒരു സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത അളവില്\u200d പ്രതിഫലമാ അതുകൊണ്ടും, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d അഭൌതികമായ ഹൈപ്രെനിമി ജോട്ടുകാര്\u200dക്ക് മേല്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, ചെറിയ പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ  ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dവെക്ക് സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dവെക്ക് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowy model neuronowy HyperVec, aby nauczyć się hierarchicznych osadzeń dla wykrywania hipernimii i kierunkowości. Podczas gdy poprzednie osadzenia wykazywały ograniczenia dotyczące prototypowych hipernimów, HyperVec reprezentuje bez nadzoru miarę, w której osadzenia są uczone w określonej kolejności i przechwytują hierarchię rozkładu hipernimów-hiponimów. Ponadto nasz model jest w stanie uogólnić niewidoczne pary hipernimii, przy użyciu tylko małych zbiorów danych treningowych oraz przez mapowanie do innych języków. Wyniki dotyczące zbiorów danych referencyjnych pokazują, że HyperVec przewyższa zarówno najnowocześniejsze pomiary bez nadzoru, jak i modele osadzania w zakresie wykrywania hipernimii i kierunkowości, jak i przewidywania stopniowego pociągnięcia leksykalicznego.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein novel neuralmodell HyperVec for å lære hierarkisk innbygging for hypernymoppdaging og retning. Mens tidlegare innbyggingar har vist grenser på prototypiske hypernymar, representerer HyperVec eit uverkjend mål der innbyggingar vert lært i ein spesifikk rekkjefølgje og hent hypernymhyponymsdistribusjonslinjehierarkien. I tillegg kan modellen vårt generalisere over ukjende hypernympar, når berre brukar små opplæringsdata, og ved mapping til andre språk. Resultatet på benchmarkdatasett viser at HyperVec utfører både tilstandane til kunsten utan opprettinga av mål og innebygging av modeller på hypernymoppdaging og retningslinjer, og på forventinga av graderte leksiske innstillingar.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw mudell newrali ġdid HyperVec biex nitgħallmu inkorporazzjonijiet ġerarkiċi għad-detezzjoni tal-iperinimi u d-direzzjonalità. While previous embeddings have shown limitations on prototypical hypernyms, HyperVec represents an unsupervised measure where embeddings are learned in a specific order and capture the hypernym-hyponym distributional hierarchy.  Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna jista’ jiġġeneralizza fuq pari ta’ iperinimi mhux osservati, meta juża biss settijiet żgħar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ, u billi jimmappa għal lingwi oħra. Riżultati fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li HyperVec jaqbeż kemm il-miżuri l-aktar avvanzati mhux sorveljati kif ukoll il-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni dwar id-detezzjoni tal-iperinimi u d-direzzjonalità, u dwar it-tbassir ta’ involviment lexiku gradat.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un nou model neural HyperVec pentru a învăța încorporările ierarhice pentru detectarea hipernimii și direcționalitatea. În timp ce încorporările anterioare au arătat limitări ale hipernimelor prototipice, HyperVec reprezintă o măsură nesupravegheată în care încorporările sunt învățate într-o anumită ordine și capturează ierarhia distribuțională hipernim-hiponim. Mai mult decât atât, modelul nostru este capabil să generalizeze perechile de hipernimie nevăzute, atunci când utilizează doar seturi mici de date de formare, și prin maparea la alte limbi. Rezultatele privind seturile de date de referință arată că HyperVec depășește atât măsurile de ultimă generație nesupravegheate, cât și încorporarea modelelor în detectarea și direcționalitatea hipernimică, cât și în predicția implicațiilor lexicale gradate.', 'mn': 'Бид шинэ мэдрэлийн загвар HyperVec-г гиперним нээлттэй болон шугам загварын төлөө суралцахын тулд шинэ мэдрэлийн загвар өгдөг. Өмнөх хэмжээсүүд нь прототипик гипернимд хязгаарлагддаг ч, HyperVec нь тодорхой хэмжээгээр суралцаж, гиперним-гипоним хуваарилцааны шинжлэх ухааны хэмжээг илэрхийлдэггүй хэмжээг илэрхийлдэг. Мөн бидний загвар нь харагдаагүй гиперним хоёрын хувьд зөвхөн жижиг сургалтын өгөгдлийг ашиглаж, бусад хэлний зураг зураг хийж чадна. Банкермарк өгөгдлийн сангийн үр дүн нь HyperVec-ын хувьд урлагийн байр суурь дахь шаардлагагүй хэмжээсүүд болон гиперним нээлттэй, загварын загварууд болон хэмжээний хэмжээсүүд болон хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлж чадахыг харуулдаг.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo nov neuralni model HyperVec kako bi naučili hijerarhijske integracije za hipernimu otkrivanje i direktionalnost. Iako su prethodne ugrađenje pokazale ograničenja prototipičnih hipernima, HyperVec predstavlja neodređenu mjeru u kojoj se ugrađenje uče u određenom redosljedu i uhvati hijerarhiju distribucije hipernima-hiponima. Osim toga, naš model može generalizovati preko nevidljivih hipernimskih parova, koristeći samo male sete podataka o obuci i mapiranjem na drugim jezicima. Rezultati na setima podataka o benchmarku pokazuju da HyperVec nadmašuje i state-of-the-art neodređene mjere i uključuje modele na hipernimu otkrivanje i direktionalnost, i predviđanje ocjene leksičke namještaje.', 'so': 'Waxaynu sameynaa model neurada ee HyperVec si aan u barto hierarchical embeddings in la ogaado iyo hagitaanka. Intii ay horay ka muuqanayeen xadooyin ku saabsan samooyinka hypernym, HyperVec wuxuu ka mid yahay qiyaastii a an la ilaalinayn, meesha lagu barto koox gaar ah oo ay ku qabsadaan hierarkii qaybsiga hypernym-hyponym. Sidoo kale modellkayagu wuxuu sameyn karaa in ka badan labo aan la arkayn, marka uu isticmaalo koobo waxbarasho oo yar oo kaliya iyo sawir ku qoran luuqado kale. Dhacdooyinka taariikhda bangiga waxay muuqataa in HyperVec ka soo baxa xaaladda-farshaxanta aan la ilaalinayn iyo sidoo kale uu ka kooban yahay qaababka ku saabsan cadayn iyo hagitaanka, iyo horumarinta aqoonta leksiga ee fasalka.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny neural modell HyperVec för att lära sig hierarkiska inbäddningar för hypernymy detektering och riktning. Medan tidigare inbäddningar har visat begränsningar för prototypa hypernymer, representerar HyperVec ett oövervakat mått där inbäddningar lärs i en viss ordning och fångar hypernym-hyponym distributionshierarkin. Dessutom kan vår modell generalisera över osynliga hypernymypar, när endast små uppsättningar träningsdata används, och genom att kartlägga till andra språk. Resultat från benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att HyperVec överträffar både toppmoderna oövervakade mätningar och inbäddade modeller när det gäller hypernymymdetektering och riktighet samt förutsägelse av graderade lexikala innebörder.', 'si': 'අපි න්\u200dයායුරාල් මොඩල් හිපර්වෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න හායිපර්නිමි හොයාගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා හායිපර්නිමි සැකසුම් ස මුලින් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් වලින් ප්\u200dරොටෝපික හායිපර්නිම් වලින් සීමාව පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, HyperVec පෙන්වන්නේ නැහැ සීමාවක් වලින් ඇම්බෙන්ඩි තවත්, අපේ මොඩල් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ හායිපර්නිමි ජෝඩල් වලට, පුංචි දත්ත සෙට් විතරයි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ HyperVec ප්\u200dරතිචාරය දෙන්නම් state-of-the-art අවස්ථාවක් නැති අවස්ථාවක් සහ අවස්ථාවක් අවස්', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய பாதுகார மாதிரி ஹைபர்வெக் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அதிகப்பரிமி கண்டறிதல் மற்றும் நேர்வழியில் கற்றுக்க முந்தைய உள்ளடக்கங்கள் முன்னோட்டிக் ஹைப்பர்வெக் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட வரிசையில் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் படிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் அதிப்பரிம்- ஹை மேலும், எங்கள் மாதிரி மறைக்கப்படாத உப்பரிமி ஜோடிகளை உருவாக்க முடியும், சிறிய பயிற்சி தரவை மட்டும் பயன்படுத்தும் போது, மற பென்நிலை தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نئورل موڈل HyperVec کو ہیپر نیمی شناسایی اور دکھانے کے لئے ہیرررشیک ایمبڈینگ سکھائے۔ حالانکہ پہلے ایمبڈینگ پروٹیپٹیپٹی ہیرنیم پر محدودیت دکھائی جاتی ہیں، ہیرویک ایک غیرقابل اندازہ دکھائی جاتی ہے جہاں ایمبڈینگ ایک خاص سطح میں سکھائی جاتی ہے اور ہیرنیم-ہیرومیم تقسیم حکومت کو پکڑتی ہے. اور ہمارا مدل غیر دیکھا ہوا hypernymy جوڑوں پر قادر ہے، جب صرف چھوٹے سیٹ ڈیٹوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے، اور دوسری زبانوں کو نقشه کرتا ہے۔ بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ HyperVec ان دونوں موقعیت کی حالت ناپابندی مطابق اور ہیرنیمی شناسایی اور دقیقات پر مدلکوں کا اندازہ اضافہ کرتا ہے اور درخواست کی تغییر کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz yuqori neyrolik modeli HyperVec, hypernymi aniqlash va direktoriyatlarni o'rganish uchun hierarchik foydalanuvchilarni o'rganamiz. Oldingi qismlar prototypal hypernymning chegaralarini ko'rsatadi, HyperVec qo'llanmagan xavfsiz tartibi bilan o'rganish va hypernym- hyponym tarjima hierarchiyasini qabul qilish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, modelimizning ko'pchilik hypernemiy ikkita qoʻllarini yaratishi mumkin, faqat bir kichkina taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yordamida va boshqa tillarni kartonish bilan yaratish mumkin. Benchmark maʼlumot bazalarida HyperVec haqida saqlangan holatni bajaradi va hyperni aniqlash va direktoriyatli modellarini bajaradi va darajadagi leksikal taʼminlovchini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình thần kinh mới HyperVec để học sự phù hợp cấp phân cấp để phát hiện siêu nữ và trực tiếp. Trong khi sự nhúng đầu trước đã hiển thị giới hạn của các siêu hiện tượng nguyên mẫu, HyperVem là một biện pháp không được giám sát nơi sự gia nhập được học theo một trật tự cụ thể và ghi nhớ phân cấp siêu âm. Hơn nữa, mô hình của chúng ta có thể tổng hợp hơn các cặp siêu nữ vô hình, khi chỉ sử dụng các bộ dữ liệu tập luyện nhỏ, và bằng cách vẽ bản đồ sang các ngôn ngữ khác. Kết quả trên các dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy HyperVes còn siêu tiến bộ hơn cả những biện pháp không giám sát được loại hiện đại và cài ghép các mô hình về phát hiện siêu rung động và trực tiếp, và tính toán hạn chế ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов невронен модел за изучаване на йерархични вграждания за откриване на хипернимия и насочване. Докато предишните вграждания показват ограничения на прототипните хиперними, представлява непроводирана мярка, при която вгражданията се научават в определен ред и улавят разпределителната йерархия хиперним-хипоним. Освен това нашият модел е в състояние да обобщава над невидими двойки хипернимии, когато използва само малки набори от данни за обучение и чрез картографиране на други езици. Резултатите от сравнителните набори от данни показват, че ХиперВек превъзхожда както най-съвременните мерки без надзор, така и моделите за вграждане при откриване на хипернимия и насочване, така и при предвиждане на степенно лексикално обвързване.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny neural model HyperVec til at lære hierarkiske indlejringer til hypernymy detektion og retning. Mens tidligere indlejringer har vist begrænsninger på prototypiske hypernymer, repræsenterer HyperVec et upervåget mål, hvor indlejringer læres i en bestemt rækkefølge og fanger hypernym-hyponym distributionshierarkiet. Desuden er vores model i stand til at generalisere over usynlige hypernymypar, når der kun anvendes små sæt træningsdata, og ved at kortlægge til andre sprog. Resultater fra benchmark datasæt viser, at HyperVec overgår både state-of-the-art upraveghed målinger og integrerer modeller i hypernymy detektion og retningsbestemmelse og forudsigelse af gradueret leksikal involvering.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo nov neuronski model HyperVec kako bi naučili hijerarhijske integracije za hipernimu otkrivanje i direktionalnost. Iako su prethodne ugrađenje pokazale ograničenja prototipičnih hipernima, HyperVec predstavlja neodređenu mjeru u kojoj se ugrađenje uči u određenom redosljedu i uhvati hijerarhiju distribucije hipernima-hiponima. Osim toga, naš model je u stanju generalizirati preko nevidljivih hipernimskih parova, koristeći samo male skupine podataka o obuci i mapiranjem na drugi jezici. Rezultati podataka o referenciji pokazuju da HyperVec nadmašuje i neuobičajene mjere i uključuje modele na hipernimu otkrivanje i uputstvo, te predviđanje ocjene leksičke namještaje.', 'de': 'Wir stellen ein neuartiges neuronales Modell HyperVec vor, um hierarchische Einbettungen für Hypernymiedetektion und Direktionalität zu erlernen. Während frühere Einbettungen Einschränkungen für prototypische Hypernyme zeigten, stellt HyperVec ein unbeaufsichtigtes Maß dar, bei dem Einbettungen in einer bestimmten Reihenfolge gelernt werden und die Hypernym-Hyponym-Verteilungshierarchie erfasst werden. Darüber hinaus ist unser Modell in der Lage, über unsichtbare Hypernymiepaare zu verallgemeinern, wenn nur kleine Mengen von Trainingsdaten verwendet werden, und indem es auf andere Sprachen zuordnet. Die Ergebnisse von Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass HyperVec sowohl modernste unüberwachte Messungen als auch Einbettungsmodelle hinsichtlich Hypernymieerkennung und Direktionalität als auch bei der Vorhersage abgestufter lexikalischer Auswirkungen übertrifft.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuw neuraal model HyperVec om hiërarchische embeddings te leren voor hyperniemiedetectie en directionaliteit. Terwijl eerdere insluitingen beperkingen hebben laten zien op prototypische hyperniemen, vertegenwoordigt HyperVec een onbeheerde maatregel waarbij insluitingen in een specifieke volgorde worden geleerd en de hyperniem-hyponiem distributiehiërarchie worden vastgelegd. Bovendien is ons model in staat om te generaliseren over onzichtbare hyperniemieparen, bij gebruik van slechts kleine sets trainingsgegevens, en door in kaart te brengen naar andere talen. Resultaten op benchmarkdatasets tonen aan dat HyperVec beter presteert dan state-of-the-art onbeheerde metingen en embedded modellen op het gebied van hyperniemiedetectie en directionaliteit, en op het voorspellen van gegradeerde lexicale implicaties.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model saraf baru HyperVec untuk belajar jaringan hierarkis untuk deteksi hipernimi dan direksi. Sementara penerbangan sebelumnya telah menunjukkan batasan pada hipernim prototipik, HyperVec mewakili ukuran tidak diawasi dimana penerbangan belajar dalam tertib tertentu dan menangkap hierarki distribusi hipernim-hiponym. Moreover, our model is able to generalize over unseen hypernymy pairs, when using only small sets of training data, and by mapping to other languages.  Hasil dari set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa HyperVec melampaui kedua tindakan state-of-the-art yang tidak diawasi dan memasukkan model pada deteksi hipernimi dan direksionalitas, dan pada prediksi perkembangan leksikal kelas.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mtindo wa kisasa wa kikaragosi HyperVec ili kujifunza mabomu ya ubora kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa umeme na uongofu. Wakati vifaa vilivyopita vimeonyesha vizuizi vya mifano, HyperVec inawakilisha hatua isiyohifadhiwa ambapo vifaa vinavyojifunza katika amri fulani na kushika ukurasa wa usambazaji wa mifumo ya hyponyme. Zaidi ya hayo, mifano yetu inaweza kutengeneza zaidi ya wanandoa wasiojulikana, wakati kwa kutumia seti ndogo tu za mafunzo, na kwa ramani kwa lugha nyingine. Matokeo kwenye taarifa za bendera zinaonyesha kwamba HyperVec hufanya kazi na hatua za kisasa zisizo na usalama na kuweka mifano juu ya uchunguzi wa umeme na utaratibu, na kwa kutabiri maarufu wa kiwango cha lexico.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل عصبی جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای یاد گرفتن آفرینش\u200cهای معمولی برای شناسایی و راهنمایی hypernymy. در حالی که پیوندهای قبلی محدودیت\u200cهای پیشینیان روی هیپرنیم\u200cهای پیشینیان را نشان داده\u200cاند، هیپروک یک اندازه غیرقابل تحریک می\u200cکند که پیوند\u200cها در یک دستور خاص یاد می\u200cگیرند و سفارشی جدایی هیپرنیم-هیپونیم را گرفته\u200cاند. علاوه بر این، مدل ما قادر است بر جفت های هیپرنیمی غیر مشاهده باشد، وقتی فقط از مجموعه های کوچک اطلاعات آموزش، و با نقشه به زبانهای دیگر استفاده کند. نتیجه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی نشان می\u200cدهند که HyperVec از اندازه\u200cهای نقاشی و نقاشی از هنر و مدل\u200cهای پیدا کردن روی شناسایی و راهنمایی hypernymy و پیش\u200cبینی کردن نقاشی زبان\u200cشناسی درجه\u200cای بیشتر است.', 'tr': 'Biz hipernimi tanyş we yönelik taýýarlamak üçin bir nural modelini HyperVek bilen tanyşdyrýarys. Önceki girişimler prototipik hipernimler üzerinde sınırları gösterirken HyperVec, içeri belirlenen bir sırada öğrenilecek ve hipernim-hiponym dağıtım hiyerarşisini yakalayır. Munuň üçin biziň modelimiz görkezilmedik hipernimi çiftlerden ybarata bilýär, diňe kiçi sany okuw sanlaryny ulanyp bilýär we başga dillere görkezilip biler. benchmark veri setirleriniň netijesi HyperVec hem-de-sanat taýýarlanmadyk düzümlerini hem hipernimiň deteksiýasy we suçularyň düzümlerini hem çykaryp bilmedigini we çykaryp bilmedigini belli edýär.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n roman neurale model HyperVec om hierarkies inbettings te leer vir hipernimi-opdekking en direksionaliteit. Terwyl vorige inbêdings het die beperkings van prototipiese hipernieme vertoon, HyperVec verteenwoordig 'n ongespesifiseerde maat waar inbêdings in 'n spesifieke volgorde geleer word en die hypernym-hiponime verspreidingshierarkie opneem. Ook, ons model kan generaliseer oor onverskyn hipernieme paar, wanneer slegs klein stelle onderwerp data gebruik word, en deur kartering na ander tale te maak. Resultate op benchmark datastelle vertoon dat HyperVec beide state-of-the-art onveronderwyse maat uitvoer en inbêring modele op hipernimi-opdekking en rigtingskonstelling, en op voorskou van gegradeerde leksiese inhouding.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model neural të ri HyperVec për të mësuar përfshirje hierarkike për zbulimin e hipernimisë dhe drejtimin. Ndërsa përfshirjet e mëparshme kanë treguar kufizime në hiperinimet prototipike, HyperVec përfaqëson një masë të pazgjidhur ku përfshirjet mësohen në një rend të caktuar dhe kapin hierarkinë shpërndarëse hiperinimet-hiponimet. Moreover, our model is able to generalize over unseen hypernymy pairs, when using only small sets of training data, and by mapping to other languages.  Rezultatet në bazat e të dhënave tregojnë se HyperVec ekziston si masat më të mëdha të pa mbikqyrur, si dhe përfshirjen e modeleve mbi zbulimin e hipernimisë dhe drejtimin dhe parashikimin e përfshirjes lexike të shkallëzuar.', 'am': 'የሮሜን የደዌብ ሞዴል አፍሪካዊ አፍሪካ እና የመግለጫ መግለጫ ለመማር እናቀርባለን፡፡ የቀድሞው አካባቢዎች በprototypical hypernym ላይ ግንኙነቶችን ባሳየ ጊዜ፣ HyperVec በተለያዩ ክፍል በተማሩ ክፍል እና የhypernym-hyponym በተለየ ክፍለ ክፍል አርራርክቲቱን በመያዝ የሚቆጥረዋል፡፡ ደግሞም ሞዴሌያችን ከታወቀው አፍሪም ሁለት በላይ ማቀናቀል ይችላል፣ በተጠቃሚ ታናሽ የዳታዎችን እና ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች መዘርጋት ብቻ በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ፍሬቶች በbenchmark datasets ላይ HyperVec የ-state-of-the-art unservised measures and embedded models on hypernymy detection and directionality, and on predicting graded lexical knowledgeable.', 'az': "Biz hipernimi tanıtmaq və yönəltmək üçün hiyerarşik inşallarını öyrənmək üçün yeni nöral modeli HyperVec göstəririk. Əvvəlki inbinglər prototipik hipernimlər barəsindəki hədləri göstərdikdə, HyperVec bir ölçü göstərir ki, inbingləri müəyyən bir sırada öyrənir və hipernim-hiponim dağıtılış hiyerarşisini yakalayır. Daha sonra, modellərimiz görünmədiyimiz hipernimi çiftlərdən generalizə bilər, yalnız kiçik təhsil məlumatlarını istifadə edərkən və başqa dillərə mapa edərkən. Benchmark verilənlərin sonuçları HyperVec'in hər ikisini də müəyyən edilməmiş ölçülərdən və hipernimi tanıtmaq və yönəltmək üzərində modelləri daxil edir və dərəcəli leksik hökmünü təmin edir.", 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নভেল নিউরেল মডেল হাইপারভেক উপস্থাপন করছি হাইপারেনিমি আবিষ্কার এবং নির্দেশের জন্য হিয়ারেরাক্কিল বিভিন্ন বি পূর্ববর্তী প্রোটোটিপাইক হাইপারেনিমের উপর সীমাবদ্ধতা প্রদর্শন করেছে, হাইপারভেক একটি অরক্ষণশীল পরিমাপের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছে যেখানে বিশেষ কিছু নির্দিষ্ এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল অদৃশ্য হাইপারেনিমি জোড়ার উপর জোড়া তৈরি করতে সক্ষম, যখন শুধুমাত্র ছোট ট ট্রেনিং ডাটা ব্যবহার করে এবং অন্ বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে হাইপার্ভেক সংরক্ষিত রাষ্ট্রের অরক্ষিত পদক্ষেপ এবং হাইপারেনিমি আবিষ্কার এবং নির্দেশানীতিতে মডেলের বি', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 신경 모델인 HyperVec를 제시하여 차원화된 삽입을 학습하고 초동명 검측과 방향성에 사용한다.이전의 삽입은 이미 원형 초의어에 대한 한계를 나타냈지만 하이퍼바이크는 감독이 없는 측정 방법을 대표한다. 이런 방법에서 삽입은 특정한 순서에 따라 학습하고 초의어-하의어의 분포 차원을 포착했다.그 밖에 우리 모델은 소량의 훈련 데이터만 사용하는 상황에서 다른 언어에 비추어 보이지 않는 초음에 대한 홍보를 할 수 있다.기준 데이터 집합의 결과에 따르면 HyperVec는 초의적 검측과 방향성, 등급별 어휘의 함축을 예측하는 데 있어서 최신의 무감독 측정과 삽입 모델보다 우수하다.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo nov neuralni model HyperVec kako bi naučili hijerarhijske integracije za hipernimu otkrivanje i direktionalnost. Iako su prethodne ugrađenje pokazale ograničenja prototipičnih hipernima, HyperVec predstavlja neodređenu mjeru gdje se ugrađenje uče u određenom redosljedu i uhvati hijerarhiju distribucije hipernima-hiponima. Osim toga, naš model je u stanju generalizirati preko nevidljivih hipernimskih parova, koristeći samo male sete podataka o obuci i mapiranjem na drugi jezici. Rezultati podataka o referenciji pokazuju da HyperVec nadmašuje i state-of-the-art neodređene mjere i uključuje modele na hipernimu otkrivanje i direktivnost, i predviđanje ocjenjenog leksičkog zadržavanja.', 'cs': 'Představujeme nový neuronový model HyperVec pro naučení hierarchických vložení pro detekci hypernymií a směrování. Zatímco předchozí vložení ukázalo omezení prototypických hypernymů, HyperVec představuje bez dohledu měřítko, kde se vložení učí v určitém pořadí a zachycuje distribuční hierarchii hypernymů a hyponymů. Navíc je náš model schopen zobecňovat na neviditelné hypernymické páry, při použití malých sad tréninkových dat a mapování do jiných jazyků. Výsledky referenčních datových sad ukazují, že HyperVec překonává jak nejmodernější bez dohledu měření, tak i modely vkládání hypernymií na detekci a směrovost, tak i na predikci stupňovaného lexikálního implikace.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudset närvimudelit HyperVec, et õppida hierarhilisi manustamisi hüpernüümia tuvastamiseks ja suunatavuseks. Kuigi varasemad manustamised on näidanud prototüüpiliste hüpernüümide piiranguid, kujutab HyperVec endast järelevalveta mõõdet, kus manustamist õpitakse kindlas järjekorras ja hüpernüümi-hüpnüümi jaotushierarhiat hüpernüümi-hüpnüümi jaotamisel. Lisaks on meie mudel võimeline üldistama nähtamatute hüpernüümiapaaride üle, kasutades ainult väikeseid koolitusandmeid ja kaardistades teistesse keeltesse. Võrdlusandmekogumite tulemused näitavad, et HyperVec ületab nii kaasaegseid järelevalveta mõõtmeid kui ka põimimismudeleid hüpernüümia tuvastamisel ja suunamisel ning astmelise leksikaalse kaasamise prognoosimisel.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden HyperVec-neuromallin, jonka avulla opimme hierarkkisia upotuksia hypernyymien havaitsemiseen ja suuntaamiseen. Vaikka aiemmat upotukset ovat osoittaneet rajoituksia prototyyppien hypernyymien suhteen, HyperVec edustaa valvomatonta mittausta, jossa upotukset opetetaan tietyssä järjestyksessä ja vangitaan hypernyymi-hyponyymin jakeluhierarkia. Lisäksi mallimme pystyy yleistämään näkymättömiä hypernyymipareja käytettäessä vain pieniä harjoitusaineistoja ja kartoittamalla muille kielille. Vertailutietoaineistojen tulokset osoittavat, että HyperVec suoriutuu sekä huippuluokan valvomattomista mittauksista että upotusmalleista hypernyymin havaitsemisessa ja suuntaamisessa että asteittaisen sanamuodon ennustamisessa.', 'ca': "Presentam un nou model neural HyperVec per aprendre integracions jeràrquiques per a la detecció de l'hipernimi i la direccionalitat. While previous embeddings have shown limitations on prototypical hypernyms, HyperVec represents an unsupervised measure where embeddings are learned in a specific order and capture the hypernym-hyponym distributional hierarchy.  A més, el nostre model es pot generalitzar sobre parelles d'hiperinimia invisibles, quan només utilitza petits conjunts de dades d'entrenament i mapejant a altres llengües. Els resultats dels conjunts de dades de referència mostren que HyperVec supera les mesures no supervisades més avançades i incorpora models sobre la detecció de l'hipernimi i la direccionalitat, i sobre la predicció d'involucració lexical gradada.", 'hy': 'We present a novel neural model HyperVec to learn hierarchical embeddings for hypernymy detection and directionality.  Մինչդեռ նախորդ ներդրումները ցույց են տալիս նախատիպիկ հիպերնիմների սահմանափակումներ, Hyper-vec-ը ներդրումները ներդրումների առանց վերահսկման չափում են, որտեղ ներդրումները սովորվում են որոշակի կարգում և գրավում են հիպերնիմների-հիպերնիմների դիսփեռուցման հիեր Ավելին, մեր մոդելը կարողանում է ընդհանրացնել անտեսանելի հիպերնիմիական զույգերի դեպքում, երբ օգտագործում է միայն փոքր համակարգեր ուսուցման տվյալներ, և քարտեզագրելով այլ լեզուներ: Results on benchmark datasets show that HyperVec outperforms both state-of-the-art unsupervised measures and embedding models on hypernymy detection and directionality, and on predicting graded lexical entailment.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani misãlan neural na'ura Hypervelc dõmin ya sanar da hiera-embodi wa gane na hiserni da shiryarwa. A lokacin da aka gabatar da shirin da suka nuna tsari masu motsi na farko, Hypervelc yana da wani gwargwadon da ba'a tsare shi ba, inda an sanar da embeddinga a cikin wani ƙayyade na ƙayyade kuma a kãma hierorchy na diureri na Hyperym-Hypernym. Za kuma, misalinmu na iya iya ƙiƙiro ko da sura-nau'in da ba'a sani ba, idan ana yi amfani da tsari masu ƙarami masu tsari kawai, da kuma da yin ramani da wasu harshe. Faramata kan danne-bangon ayuka na nuna Hypervelc ke tafiyar da duk-state-of-the-art wanda ba'a tsare shi ba kuma yana cikin motel masu nuna wa hisernymi da shiryarwa, kuma a kan bayani da aka tsohatar da daraja na leksi.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov nevronski model HyperVec za učenje hierarhičnih vdelav za zaznavanje hipernimije in usmerjenost. Medtem ko so prejšnje vdelave pokazale omejitve prototipskih hipernimov, HyperVec predstavlja nenadzorovano merilo, kjer se vdelave naučijo v določenem vrstnem redu in zajemajo distribucijsko hierarhijo hipernim-hiponim. Poleg tega je naš model sposoben posplošiti preko nevidnih hipernimskih parov, pri uporabi le majhnih naborov podatkov o usposabljanju in z mapiranjem v druge jezike. Rezultati referenčnih naborov podatkov kažejo, da HyperVec presega najsodobnejše neizvajane meritve in modele vgradnje pri zaznavanju hipernimije in usmerjenosti ter pri napovedovanju stopnjene leksikalne posledice.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk bagian nyatakakno model Hyervec nggambar luwih jarasal embedding kanggo ipernimiy detection lan directionWriting direction context menu item Type of folder Laptop" and "Desktop Reults on bench dataset show that Typervec out-of-the-arts unappleted measurements and embedding modes on keyboard detection and directionness, and on preview Graded lectucal entailment.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל עצבי חדש HyperVec כדי ללמוד היירארכיות לכיוון גילוי היפרנימיה והכיוון. While previous embeddings have shown limitations on prototypical hypernyms, HyperVec represents an unsupervised measure where embeddings are learned in a specific order and capture the hypernym-hyponym distributional hierarchy.  בנוסף, המודל שלנו מסוגל לגנרליזציה על זוגות היפרנימיות בלתי נראות, כשמשתמשים רק בסטים קטנים של נתונים אימונים, ובמיפות לשפות אחרות. התוצאות על קבוצות מידע רמזים מראות שההיפרווק מעלים את המצעדים המיוחדים ביותר ללא השגחה והכניסה של דוגמנים על זיהוי היפרנימיה והכיוון, ולחיזוי התערבות לקסית מיוצדת.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སའི་དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་ལུགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ནང་གི་ཡིག་རྩིས་མཐུན་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། While previous embeddings have shown limitations on prototypical hypernyms, HyperVec represents an unsupervised measure where embeddings are learned in a specific order and capture the hypernym-hyponym distributional hierarchy. Moreover, our model is able to generalize over unseen hypernymy pairs, when using only small sets of training data, and by mapping to other languages. Results on benchmark datasets show that HyperVec outperforms both state-of-the-art unsupervised measures and embedding models on hypernymy detection and directionality, and on predicting graded lexical entailment.'}
{'en': 'Dict2vec : Learning Word Embeddings using Lexical Dictionaries', 'ar': 'Dict2vec: تعلم تضمين الكلمات باستخدام القواميس المعجمية', 'pt': 'Dict2vec: Aprendendo incorporações de palavras usando dicionários léxicos', 'fr': "Dict2vec\xa0: Apprendre l'intégration de mots à l'aide de dictionnaires lexicaux", 'es': 'Dict2vec: Aprendizaje de incrustaciones de palabras mediante diccionarios léxicos', 'ja': 'Dict 2 vec: Lexical Dictionariesを使用したWord埋め込みの学習', 'hi': 'Dict2vec: सीखना शब्द Embeddings Lexical शब्दकोशों का उपयोग कर', 'zh': 'Dict2vec : 用词汇词典学词嵌', 'ru': 'Dict2vec : Изучение вложений слов с использованием лексических словарей', 'ga': 'Dict2vec : Leabú Focal a Fhoghlaim ag Úsáid Foclóirí', 'el': 'Μάθηση Ενσωματώσεων λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας Λεξικό Λεξικό Λεξικό', 'it': 'Dict2vec: Imparare le incorporazioni di parole usando dizionari lessicali', 'ka': 'Dict2vec : Lexical Dictionaries', 'lt': 'Dict2vec : Mokyti žodžių įdėjimus naudojant leksinius žodynus', 'kk': 'Dict2vec : Лексикалық сөздерді қолданып сөздерді ендіру', 'hu': 'Dict2vec: Szóbeágyazások tanulása Lexical szótárak segítségével', 'ms': 'Dict2vec : Learning Word Embeddings using Lexical Dictionaries', 'ml': 'ഡിക്ട്രിവിക്: ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d നിഘണ്ടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mk': 'Dict2vec : Learning Word Embeddings using Lexical Dictionaries', 'mt': 'Dict2vec : Tagħlim Embedding Words bl-użu ta » Dictionaries Lexical', 'pl': 'Dict2vec: Nauka osadzeń słowa za pomocą słowników leksykalnych', 'ro': 'Dict2vec: Învățarea încorporărilor Word folosind Dicționare Lexicale', 'sr': 'Dict2vec : Uèivanje ukljuèenja reèi koristeći leksièke reèi', 'no': 'Dict2vec : Læring av tekstinnbygging ved hjelp av leksiske ordordordlister', 'mn': 'Dict2vec : Lexical Dictionaries', 'so': 'Dict2vec: Learning Word Embeddings using Luqadaha Leksikal', 'sv': 'Dict2vec: Lär dig Word Embeddings med Lexical Dictionaries', 'ta': 'Dict2vec: லெக்சிகல் அகராதிகளை பயன்படுத்தி வார்த்தை உட்பொதிகளை கற்றுக்கொள்', 'ur': 'Dict2vec : Lexical Dictionaries (Lexical Dictionaries) کے مطابق لکھی ہوئی کلمات انڈینگ سکھائی جاتی ہے', 'si': 'Dict2Vec: Lexical Dicciondictionary variant', 'uz': "Dict2vec: Leksikal lugò£atlar yordamida so'z oò£rnatilmoqda", 'vi': 'Từ điển hình mẫu', 'bg': 'Учене на вграждания на думи с помощта на лексикални речници', 'nl': 'Dict2vec: Woordinsluitingen leren met behulp van Lexical Woordenboeken', 'da': 'Dict2vec: Læring af Word Embeddings ved hjælp af Lexical Dictionaries', 'de': 'Dict2vec: Lernen von Word-Einbettungen mit Lexikalwörtern', 'id': 'Dict2vec : Learning Word Embeddings using Lexical Dictionaries', 'ko': 'Dict2vec: 단어 사전을 사용하여 단어 포함 학습', 'sw': 'Dict2vec: Kujifunza Neno Mipango kwa kutumia Lugha za Kilexico', 'tr': 'Sözlükler', 'af': 'Dict2vec : Onderleer Woord Inbetering met Leksiese Woordeboeke', 'hr': 'Dict2vec : Učenje uključenja riječi s leksičkim riječima', 'am': 'መዝገበኛ', 'fa': 'Dict2vec : یاد گرفتن آموختن کلمات با استفاده از گفتگوهای لکسیکی', 'az': 'Dict2vec : Leksik S칬zl칲kl톛ri il톛 S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛l톛rini 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'hy': 'Comment', 'ca': 'Dict2vec: Aprendre integracions de paraules utilitzant diccionaris lèxics', 'cs': 'Dict2vec: Učení se vložení slov pomocí Lexických slovníků', 'bn': 'ডিক্ট২ভেসি: লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল অভিধান ব্যবহার করে শব্দের এমবেডিং শিখানো', 'et': 'Dict2vec: Sõna manustamise õppimine leksiaalsete sõnaraamatute abil', 'sq': 'Dict2vec : Mëso përfshirjen e fjalëve duke përdorur fjalorët leksikalë', 'fi': 'Dict2vec: Sanaupotusten oppiminen Lexical Dictionaries -sanakirjojen avulla', 'bs': 'Dict2vec : Učenje uključenja riječi koristeći leksičke riječi', 'he': 'Comment', 'jv': 'Dict 2vec: FindOK', 'bo': 'Dict2vec : Lexical Dictionaries སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་ཡི་གེ', 'sk': 'Dict2vec: Učenje vdelav besed z leksičnimi slovarji', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'Learning word embeddings on large unlabeled corpus has been shown to be successful in improving many natural language tasks. The most efficient and popular approaches learn or retrofit such representations using additional external data. Resulting embeddings are generally better than their corpus-only counterparts, although such resources cover a fraction of words in the vocabulary. In this paper, we propose a new approach, Dict2vec, based on one of the largest yet refined datasource for describing words   natural language dictionaries. Dict2vec builds new word pairs from dictionary entries so that semantically-related words are moved closer, and negative sampling filters out pairs whose words are unrelated in dictionaries. We evaluate the word representations obtained using Dict2vec on eleven datasets for the word similarity task and on four datasets for a text classification task.', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن تعلم دمج الكلمات على مجموعة كبيرة من الكلمات غير المصنفة كان ناجحًا في تحسين العديد من مهام اللغة الطبيعية. تتعلم الأساليب الأكثر فاعلية وشعبية مثل هذه التمثيلات أو تعديلها باستخدام بيانات خارجية إضافية. عادة ما تكون حفلات الزفاف الناتجة أفضل من نظيراتها في المجموعة فقط ، على الرغم من أن هذه الموارد تغطي جزءًا بسيطًا من الكلمات في المفردات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا ، Dict2vec ، يعتمد على أحد أكبر مصادر البيانات حتى الآن المصقولة لوصف الكلمات - قواميس اللغة الطبيعية. ينشئ Dict2vec أزواجًا جديدة من الكلمات من إدخالات القاموس بحيث يتم تقريب الكلمات ذات الصلة الدلالية ، ويقوم أخذ العينات السلبية بتصفية الأزواج التي لا ترتبط كلماتها في القواميس. نقوم بتقييم تمثيلات الكلمات التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام Dict2vec في إحدى عشرة مجموعة بيانات لكلمة مهمة تشابه وعلى أربع مجموعات بيانات لمهمة تصنيف النص.', 'pt': 'Aprender incorporações de palavras em grandes corpus não rotulados mostrou ser bem-sucedido em melhorar muitas tarefas de linguagem natural. As abordagens mais eficientes e populares aprendem ou adaptam essas representações usando dados externos adicionais. As incorporações resultantes são geralmente melhores do que suas contrapartes somente de corpus, embora esses recursos cubram uma fração de palavras no vocabulário. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova abordagem, Dict2vec, baseada em uma das maiores e mais refinadas fontes de dados para descrever palavras – dicionários de linguagem natural. Dict2vec cria novos pares de palavras a partir de entradas de dicionário para que as palavras semanticamente relacionadas sejam aproximadas, e a amostragem negativa filtra os pares cujas palavras não estão relacionadas nos dicionários. Avaliamos as representações de palavras obtidas usando Dict2vec em onze conjuntos de dados para a tarefa de similaridade de palavras e em quatro conjuntos de dados para uma tarefa de classificação de texto.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que l'apprentissage de l'intégration de mots sur de grands corpus non étiquetés permet d'améliorer de nombreuses tâches en langage naturel. Les approches les plus efficaces et les plus populaires apprennent ou modernisent de telles représentations à l'aide de données externes supplémentaires. Les intégrations qui en résultent sont généralement meilleures que leurs homologues de corpus uniquement, bien que ces ressources couvrent une fraction des mots du vocabulaire. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle approche, Dict2vec, basée sur l'une des sources de données les plus importantes et perfectionnées pour la description des mots\xa0: les dictionnaires de langage naturel. Dict2vec construit de nouvelles paires de mots à partir d'entrées de dictionnaire afin de rapprocher les mots sémantiquement liés, et l'échantillonnage négatif filtre les paires dont les mots ne sont pas liés dans les dictionnaires. Nous évaluons les représentations de mots obtenues à l'aide de Dict2vec sur onze jeux de données pour la tâche de similarité de mots et sur quatre ensembles de données pour une tâche de classification de texte.", 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que el aprendizaje de incrustaciones de palabras en grandes corpus sin etiqueta mejora muchas tareas del lenguaje natural. Los enfoques más eficientes y populares aprenden o modernizan dichas representaciones utilizando datos externos adicionales. Las incrustaciones resultantes son generalmente mejores que sus homólogos de solo corpus, aunque dichos recursos cubren una fracción de las palabras del vocabulario. En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo enfoque, Dict2vec, basado en una de las fuentes de datos más grandes pero refinadas para describir palabras: los diccionarios de lenguaje natural. Dict2vec crea nuevos pares de palabras a partir de las entradas del diccionario para que las palabras relacionadas semánticamente se acerquen, y el muestreo negativo filtra los pares cuyas palabras no están relacionadas en los diccionarios. Evaluamos las representaciones de palabras obtenidas con Dict2vec en once conjuntos de datos para la tarea de similitud de palabras y en cuatro conjuntos de datos para una tarea de clasificación de texto.', 'hi': 'बड़े अनलेबल कॉर्पस पर शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखना कई प्राकृतिक भाषा कार्यों में सुधार करने में सफल होने के लिए दिखाया गया है। सबसे कुशल और लोकप्रिय दृष्टिकोण अतिरिक्त बाहरी डेटा का उपयोग करके इस तरह के अभ्यावेदनों को सीखते हैं या फिर से फिट करते हैं। परिणामी एम्बेडिंग आमतौर पर उनके कॉर्पस-केवल समकक्षों की तुलना में बेहतर होते हैं, हालांकि ऐसे संसाधन शब्दावली में शब्दों के एक अंश को कवर करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम शब्दों का वर्णन करने के लिए सबसे बड़े अभी तक परिष्कृत डेटासोर्स में से एक के आधार पर एक नए दृष्टिकोण, Dict2vec का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - प्राकृतिक भाषा शब्दकोश। Dict2vec शब्दकोश प्रविष्टियों से नए शब्द जोड़े बनाता है ताकि शब्दार्थ से संबंधित शब्दों को करीब ले जाया जा सके, और नकारात्मक नमूना उन जोड़ों को फ़िल्टर करता है जिनके शब्द शब्दकोशों में असंबंधित हैं। हम शब्द समानता कार्य के लिए ग्यारह डेटासेट पर Dict2vec का उपयोग करके प्राप्त शब्द अभ्यावेदन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्य के लिए चार डेटासेट पर।', 'ja': '大規模なラベル付けされていないコーパスへの単語埋め込みの学習は、多くの自然言語タスクを改善することに成功していることが示されています。最も効率的で人気のあるアプローチは、追加の外部データを使用してそのような表現を学習または改造する。結果として生じる埋め込みは、一般的にコーパスのみの埋め込みよりも優れているが、そのようなリソースは語彙の一部をカバーしている。この論文では、単語を記述するための最大で洗練されたデータソースの1つである自然言語辞書に基づいた新しいアプローチ、Dict 2 vecを提案します。Dict 2 vecは辞書エントリから新しい単語ペアを作成して、セマンティクスに関連する単語をより近くに移動させ、辞書で単語が関連していないペアをネガティブサンプリングでフィルタリングします。私たちは、Dict 2 vecを使用して得られた単語表現を、単語類似性タスクの11個のデータセットと、テキスト分類タスクの4個のデータセットで評価します。', 'ru': 'Изучение вложений слов на большом немаркированном корпусе оказалось успешным в улучшении многих задач на естественном языке. Наиболее эффективные и популярные подходы изучают или модифицируют такие представления, используя дополнительные внешние данные. Результирующие вложения, как правило, лучше, чем их только корпусные аналоги, хотя такие ресурсы охватывают часть слов в словаре. В данной работе мы предлагаем новый подход, Dict2vec, основанный на одном из крупнейших, но уточненных источников данных для описания слов – словарях естественного языка. Dict2vec создает новые пары слов из записей словаря, чтобы семантически связанные слова перемещались ближе, а отрицательная выборка отфильтровывала пары, слова которых не связаны в словарях. Мы оцениваем представления слов, полученные с помощью Dict2vec, на одиннадцати наборах данных для задачи подобия слов и на четырех наборах данных для задачи классификации текста.', 'zh': '大学于未著语料库上学词嵌证可以成功而改诸自然语言。 最有效、最流行之法,用额外数以学改造之。 凡嵌常比仅用语料库者尤佳,虽此资涵盖词汇表中一小单词。 本文新法Dict2vec,基于述单词最大而数据源一 - 自然语言词典。 Dict2vec 于字典条目构新单词对,以关语义之单词,且负采样漉字典中单词不相关者单词对。 吾以 Dict2vec 11 数集上估单词相似性得者单词,以文本分类者 4 数集上单词。', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go n-éiríonn le neadú focal foghlama ar chorpas mór gan lipéad feabhas a chur ar go leor tascanna teanga nádúrtha. Is iad na cineálacha cur chuige is éifeachtaí agus is coitianta a fhoghlaimíonn nó a iarfheistítear léiriúcháin den sórt sin ag úsáid sonraí seachtracha breise. Is fearr go hiondúil leabú na dtorthaí ná a gcomhghleacaithe corpais amháin, cé go gclúdaíonn acmhainní dá leithéid codán de na focail sa stór focal. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige nua, Dict2vec, bunaithe ar cheann de na foinsí sonraí is mó go fóill chun cur síos a dhéanamh ar fhocail – foclóirí nádúrtha teanga. Tógann Dict2vec péirí nua focal as iontrálacha an fhoclóra ionas go n-aistrítear níos dlúithe focail atá gaolmhar le séimeantach, agus scagtar amach le sampláil dhiúltach péirí nach bhfuil gaol acu lena gcuid focal i bhfoclóirí. Déanaimid measúnú ar na léirithe focal a fhaightear trí úsáid a bhaint as Dict2vec ar aon tacar sonraí déag don tasc cosúlachta focal agus ar cheithre thacar sonraí le haghaidh tasc aicmithe téacs.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων σε μεγάλο σώμα χωρίς ετικέτα έχει αποδειχθεί επιτυχής στη βελτίωση πολλών εργασιών φυσικής γλώσσας. Οι πιο αποτελεσματικές και δημοφιλείς προσεγγίσεις μαθαίνουν ή αναβαθμίζουν τέτοιες αναπαραστάσεις χρησιμοποιώντας πρόσθετα εξωτερικά δεδομένα. Οι συνακόλουθες ενσωματώσεις είναι γενικά καλύτερες από τα ομόλογά τους μόνο για το σώμα, αν και οι πόροι αυτοί καλύπτουν ένα κλάσμα λέξεων στο λεξιλόγιο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση, βασισμένη σε μια από τις μεγαλύτερες αλλά εκλεπτυσμένες πηγές δεδομένων για την περιγραφή λέξεων σε λεξικά φυσικής γλώσσας. Το χτίζει νέα ζεύγη λέξεων από καταχωρήσεις λεξικού έτσι ώστε οι σημασιολογικά σχετιζόμενες λέξεις να μετακινούνται πιο κοντά και η αρνητική δειγματοληψία φιλτράρει ζεύγη των οποίων οι λέξεις δεν σχετίζονται στα λεξικά. Αξιολογούμε τις αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων που λαμβάνονται με τη χρήση του σε έντεκα σύνολα δεδομένων για την εργασία ομοιότητας λέξεων και σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων για μια εργασία ταξινόμησης κειμένου.', 'hu': 'A nagy címke nélküli korpuszon történő szóbeágyazások tanulása sikeresnek bizonyult számos természetes nyelvi feladat fejlesztésében. A leghatékonyabb és legnépszerűbb megközelítések kiegészítő külső adatok felhasználásával tanulják meg vagy utólagosan felépítik ezeket az ábrázolásokat. Az eredményes beágyazások általában jobb, mint a korpusz-csak társaik, bár ezek az erőforrások a szókincs töredékét fedik le. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új megközelítést, a Dict2vecet javasoljuk, amely az egyik legnagyobb, de kifinomult adatforráson alapul a szavak leírására - a természetes nyelvű szótárak. A Dict2vec új szópárokat épít a szótárbejegyzésekből, így a szemantikailag kapcsolódó szavak közelebb kerülnek, a negatív mintavétel pedig kiszűri azokat a párokat, amelyeknek szavai nem kapcsolódnak a szótárakban. A Dict2vec segítségével kapott szóreprezentációkat tizenegy adatkészleten értékeljük a szóhasonlósági feladathoz, négy adatkészleten pedig egy szövegosztályozási feladathoz.', 'it': "Imparare le incorporazioni di parole su corpus non etichettati di grandi dimensioni ha dimostrato di avere successo nel migliorare molte attività di linguaggio naturale. Gli approcci più efficienti e popolari imparano o modificano tali rappresentazioni utilizzando dati esterni aggiuntivi. Le incorporazioni risultanti sono generalmente migliori delle loro controparti solo corpus, anche se tali risorse coprono una frazione di parole nel vocabolario. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo approccio, Dict2vec, basato su una delle più grandi e raffinate fonti di dati per descrivere parole - dizionari di linguaggio naturale. Dict2vec costruisce nuove coppie di parole dalle voci del dizionario in modo che le parole semanticamente correlate siano spostate più vicine, e il campionamento negativo filtra le coppie le cui parole non sono correlate nei dizionari. Valutiamo le rappresentazioni di parole ottenute utilizzando Dict2vec su undici dataset per l'attività di somiglianza delle parole e su quattro dataset per un'attività di classificazione del testo.", 'ka': 'სიტყვების შესწავლობა დიდი უცნობილი კორპუსში იქნება წარმატებულია ბევრი თავისუფალური ენის დავალებაში. ყველაზე ეფექტიური და პოლიპური დაწყვეტილებები სწავლის ან აღმოჩენოთ ასეთი გამოსახულებების გამოყენებით დამატებული გარეშე. შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი სიტყვების ნაწილი უკეთესია, მაგრამ ისეთი რესურსები სიტყვებლის ნაწილი. ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ ახალი პროგრამა, Dict2vec, ერთი უფრო დიდი, მაგრამ უფრო ახალგაზრდა მონაცემების გამოსახულება სიტყვების განსახულებლად დავიწყებთ. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ,  Dict2vec ახალი სიტყვას სიტყვანის ჩანაწერებიდან შექმნა, რომ სიმპანტიკურად დაკავშირებული სიტყვები უფრო კიდევ გადატანა, და მინუს სიტყვების გამოყენება, რომელიც სიტყვები სიტყვებში ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული სიტყვის გამოყენებული Dict2vec გამოყენებული 11 მონაცემების დანაცემებისთვის სიტყვის სხვადასხვა რაოდენობისთვის და 4 მონაცემების დანაცემებისთვის ტექს', 'kk': 'Көп тіл тапсырмаларын жақсарту үшін үлкен корпустағы сөздерді ендіру сәтті көрсетілді. Ең эффективті және мәліметті келесі мәліметтерді қосымша сыртқы деректерді қолдану немесе қайта құру. Нәтижелерді ендіру әдетте олардың тек корпус- қатынасынан жақсы, бірақ бұл ресурстар сөздердің бөлшегін сөздердің бірнеше бөлшегін жазылады. Бұл қағазда жаңа тәсілді, Dict2vec, сөздерді таңдау үшін ең үлкен, әлі түзетілген деректер көзінің біріне негізделген, табиғи тіл сөздерінің сөздеріне негізделген. Dict2vec сөздік жазуынан жаңа сөздер екеуін құрады, бұл үшін semantically- қатынастық сөздер жақында жылжытылады және сөздерді сөздіктерде байланысты емес екеуін теріс сүзгіледі. Біз сөздердің ұқсас тапсырмасының 11 деректер қорларында, төрт деректер қорларына мәтін салыстыру тапсырмасының Dict2vec қолданылатын сөздерді бағалаймыз.', 'ml': 'വലിയ അടയാളപ്പെടുത്താത്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ ജോലികള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന The most efficient and popular approaches learn or retrofit such representations using additional external data.  അവസാനം അവസാനിക്കുന്നത് അവരുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് മാത്രം കൂട്ടുകാരെക്കാള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. ഈ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ പ്രാധാന്യം, ഡിക്ട്രിവെക്ക്, വാക്കുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഏറ്റവും വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്രോതസ് ഡിക്ട്രിവെക്ക് നിഘണ്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പുതിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇണകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് സെമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടു പതിനൊന്ന് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഡിക്ട്രിവെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന', 'lt': 'Paaiškėjo, kad mokymasis žodžių įtraukimu į didelį nekaberuotą korpusą sėkmingai pagerino daugelį gamtinių kalbų užduočių. The most efficient and popular approaches learn or retrofit such representations using additional external data.  Resulting embeddings are generally better than their corpus-only counterparts, although such resources cover a fraction of words in the vocabulary.  In this paper, we propose a new approach, Dict2vec, based on one of the largest yet refined datasource for describing words - natural language dictionaries.  Dict2vec builds new word pairs from dictionary entries so that semantically-related words are moved closer, and negative sampling filters out pairs whose words are unrelated in dictionaries.  Vertiname žodžių atstovavimus, gautus naudojant Dict2vec vienuolikai duomenų rinkinių žodžių panašumo užduotims atlikti ir keturius duomenų rinkinius teksto klasifikavimo užduotims atlikti.', 'ms': 'Mempelajari penyelesaian perkataan pada korpus besar tanpa tanda telah menunjukkan berjaya dalam memperbaiki banyak tugas bahasa alam. The most efficient and popular approaches learn or retrofit such representations using additional external data.  Penampilan hasil biasanya lebih baik daripada rakan-rakan mereka-corpus sahaja, walaupun sumber tersebut menutupi sebahagian perkataan dalam vokabular. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan baru, Dict2vec, berdasarkan salah satu sumber data terbesar namun terinfinisikan untuk menggambarkan perkataan - kamus bahasa semulajadi. Dict2vec membina pasangan perkataan baru dari masukan kamus supaya perkataan berkaitan semantik dipindahkan lebih dekat, dan penapis sampel negatif keluar pasangan yang perkataan tidak berkaitan dalam kamus. Kami menilai perwakilan perkataan yang diperoleh menggunakan Dict2vec pada 11 set data untuk tugas persamaan perkataan dan pada empat set data untuk tugas klasifikasi teks.', 'mt': 'Intwera li t-tagħlim tal-integrazzjoni tal-kliem fuq korpus kbir mingħajr tikketta rnexxa fit-titjib ta’ ħafna kompiti lingwistiċi naturali. L-approċċi l-aktar effiċjenti u popolari jitgħallmu jew jerġgħu jiġu adattati tali rappreżentazzjonijiet bl-użu ta’ dejta esterna addizzjonali. Resulting embeddings are generally better than their corpus-only counterparts, although such resources cover a fraction of words in the vocabulary.  In this paper, we propose a new approach, Dict2vec, based on one of the largest yet refined datasource for describing words - natural language dictionaries.  Dict2vec jibni pari ġodda ta’ kliem minn entrati tad-dikjararju sabiex kliem relatat semantikament jitmexxew eqreb, u filtri negattivi għat-teħid ta’ kampjuni joħorġu pari li l-kliem tagħhom mhuwiex relatat fid-dikjararji. Aħna jevalwaw ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kelma miksuba bl-użu ta’ Dict2vec fuq ħdax-il sett ta’ dejta għall-kompitu tal-kelma similarità u fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta għal kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test.', 'pl': 'Uczenie się osadzeń słów na dużym nieoznakowanym korpusie okazało się skuteczne w ulepszaniu wielu zadań języka naturalnego. Najbardziej wydajne i popularne podejścia uczą się lub modernizują takie reprezentacje za pomocą dodatkowych danych zewnętrznych. Wynikające z nich osadzenia są ogólnie lepsze niż ich odpowiedniki tylko korpusowe, chociaż takie zasoby obejmują ułamek słów w słownictwie. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowe podejście, Dict2vec, oparte na jednym z największych i dopracowanych źródeł danych do opisu słów w słownikach języka naturalnego. Dict2vec tworzy nowe pary słów z wpisów słownikowych, dzięki czemu słowa związane semantycznie są bliżej, a negatywne próbkowanie filtruje pary, których słowa nie są powiązane w słownikach. Oceniamy reprezentacje słów uzyskane za pomocą Dict2vec na jedenastu zbiorach danych dla zadania podobieństwa słów oraz na czterech zbiorach danych dla zadania klasyfikacji tekstu.', 'ro': 'Învățarea încorporărilor de cuvinte pe corpuri mari fără etichete s-a dovedit a fi de succes în îmbunătățirea multor sarcini de limbaj natural. Cele mai eficiente și populare abordări învață sau modernizează astfel de reprezentări folosind date externe suplimentare. Încorporările rezultate sunt în general mai bune decât omologii lor numai corpus, deși astfel de resurse acoperă o fracțiune de cuvinte din vocabular. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă abordare, Dict2vec, bazată pe una dintre cele mai mari și rafinate surse de date pentru descrierea cuvintelor - dicționare de limbaj natural. Dict2vec construiește noi perechi de cuvinte din intrările dicționarului astfel încât cuvintele legate de semantică să fie mutate mai aproape, iar eșantionarea negativă filtrează perechile ale căror cuvinte nu sunt legate în dicționare. Evaluăm reprezentările de cuvinte obținute folosind Dict2vec pe unsprezece seturi de date pentru sarcina de similitudine cu cuvintele și pe patru seturi de date pentru o sarcină de clasificare a textului.', 'mk': 'Learning word embeddings on large unlabeled corpus has been shown to be successful in improving many natural language tasks.  The most efficient and popular approaches learn or retrofit such representations using additional external data.  Resulting embeddings are generally better than their corpus-only counterparts, although such resources cover a fraction of words in the vocabulary.  In this paper, we propose a new approach, Dict2vec, based on one of the largest yet refined datasource for describing words - natural language dictionaries.  Dict2vec builds new word pairs from dictionary entries so that semantically-related words are moved closer, and negative sampling filters out pairs whose words are unrelated in dictionaries.  Ги проценуваме зборовите претставувања добиени со користење на Dict2vec на единаесет датотеки за задачата на зборот сличност и на четири датотеки за задача на класификација на текст.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл даалгаврыг сайжруулахад амжилттай болсон. Хамгийн үр дүнтэй, олон хүн төрөлхтний арга баримтууд нэмэлт гадаад мэдээллийг ашиглаж сурах эсвэл дахин сэргээх боломжтой. Үүний үр дүнг бий болгох нь тэдний корпус зөвхөн зөвхөн хамтрагчдаас илүү сайн байдаг. Гэхдээ тэдгээр баялаг нь үгийг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг үгийг үгүйсгэдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ арга зам, Dict2vec гэх мэт санал өгдөг. Үүнийг тайлбарлахад хамгийн том боловсруулсан өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэр дээр байгалийн хэл үгийг тодорхойлж өгдөг. Dict2vec нь сөздөгч орнуудаас шинэ үг хоёрыг бий болгодог бөгөөд semantique-тэй холбоотой үг илүү ойрхон хөдөлж, мөн сөрөг үг нь сөрөг сөрөг үг дээр холбоотой хоёрыг сөрөг шалгалт хийдэг. Бид Dict2vec-г 11 өгөгдлийн сан дээр илэрхийлдэг үг болон текст хуваалтын ажил дээр 4 өгөгдлийн санг ашиглаж авсан үг дүгнэж байна.', 'no': 'Læring av ordinnbygging på stor usablert korpus er vist til å vera suksessfull i forbedring av mange naturlege språk- oppgåver. Dei mest effektive og populære tilnærmingane lærer eller gjenoppretter slike representasjonar med eksterne data. Resultatet av innbygging er generelt bedre enn korpus-berre counterpartane sine, men slike ressursar dekkar ei brøk av ord i ordlista. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit ny tilnærming, Dict2vec, basert på ein av dei største enn refinerte datakjeldene for å beskrive ord - naturspråkkordbokar. Dict2vec bygger nye ord par frå ordbokoppføringar slik at semantisk relaterte ord blir flytta nærare, og negative prøvefilterar ut par som ord er ulenta i ordboka. Vi evaluerer ordrepresentasjonane som er fått med Dict2vec på elleve datasett for oppgåva med ordsimilaritet og på fire datasett for ei tekstklassifikasjonskoppgåve.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada hadalka ku qoran qodob badan oo aan la labeyn waxaa looga muujiyaa mid ku liibaansan inuu horumariyo shaqooyin badan oo afka asalka ah. Dhaqdhaqaalaha ugu fiican ee ugu wada maamulan waxay bartaan ama dib u qaadataan noocyada caynkaas ah iyagoo isticmaalaya macluumaad dheeraad ah oo dibada ah. Qofka ugu dambeeyaa waa ka wanaagsan yihiin kuwa lammaanahooda oo kaliya, in kastoo ay taas rasmiga ah ka qarisaan hadal qayb ah oo afka. In this paper, we propose a new approach, Dict2vec, based on one of the largest yet refined datasource for describing words - natural language dictionaries.  Dict2vec wuxuu dhisaa hadal cusub laba nooc oo ka mid ah warqada ku qoran, si ay ugu dhaqdhaqaaqdo hadalka kala duwan ee semanticalka, tusaale ahaan noocyada diidmada ahna waxay ka baaraandegaan laba nooc oo erayadooda aan ku qornayn luqada. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa macluumaadka la soo bandhigayo oo lagu isticmaalay Dict2vec koob iyo toban macluumaad oo ku saabsan hadalka u eg iyo afarta macluumaad oo ku qoran shaqo qaybsan.', 'sv': 'Att lära sig ordinbäddningar på stor omärkt korpus har visat sig vara framgångsrikt för att förbättra många naturliga språkuppgifter. De mest effektiva och populära tillvägagångssätten lär sig eller eftermonterar sådana framställningar med hjälp av ytterligare externa data. Resultatet av inbäddningar är generellt bättre än deras korpusbaserade motsvarigheter, även om sådana resurser täcker en bråkdel av ord i ordförrådet. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt, Dict2vec, baserat på en av de största men förfinade datakällorna för att beskriva ord - naturligt språk ordböcker. Dict2vec bygger nya ordpar från ordlistor så att semantiskt relaterade ord flyttas närmare, och negativ sampling filtrerar ut par vars ord inte är relaterade i ordböcker. Vi utvärderar de ordrepresentationer som erhållits med Dict2vec på elva datauppsättningar för ordlikhetsuppgiften och på fyra datauppsättningar för en textklassificeringsuppgift.', 'ta': 'பல இயல்பான மொழி பணிகளை மேம்படுத்தும்போது வெற்றிகரமாக குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட வார்த்தையை கற்றுக்கொள்வது தெரியும். மிகவும் தேவையான மற்றும் பெரிய அணுகும் நெருங்குகள் கூடுதல் வெளி தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி கற்று அல்லது மீண்டும் ப முடிவுகள் பொதுவாக அவர்களுடைய கோர்பாஸ் மட்டும் இருக்கும் நண்பர்களை விட சிறப்பாக இருக்கிறது, எனினும் இத்தகைய வளங்கள் சொல்லகத் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய செயல்பாடு, Dict2vec, வார்த்தைகளை விவரிப்பதற்கான பெரிய புதிய தகவல் மூலம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது. இயல்பா Dict2vec builds new word pairs from dictionary entries so that semantically-related words are moved closer, and negative sampling filters out pairs whose words are unrelated in dictionaries.  பதினொன்று தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள வார்த்தையை பயன்படுத்தி கிடைக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். ஒரு உரை வகைப்பு பணிக்கு', 'si': 'ලොකු බොරු කොර්පුස් එක්ක වචනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්වභාවික භාෂාවක් වැඩ කරන්න සමහර විදිහට වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හා ප්\u200dරජාතික විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ඔවුන්ගේ කොර්පුස් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වඩා හොඳයි, ඒ වගේ සම්පූර්ණයක් වචන වච මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, Dict2Vec, විශාල භාෂාවක් වචනයක් විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලොකු තියෙන Dict2Vec අළුත් වචනය ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඉතින් සැමැන්තික සම්බන්ධ වචනය වඩා ලඟට ගිහින් ඉන්න, සහ අනතුරු සැ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වචන වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණතාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් Dict2Vec විසින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වචන වචන වර්ගය වැ', 'ur': 'کلمات کی ابڈینگ کی تعلیم بڑی ناپذیر کورپوس پر موفق ہوتی ہے کہ بہت سی طبیعی زبان کے کاموں کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے۔ زیادہ اضافہ اور محبوب طریقے کی تعلیم یاد کریں یا دوبارہ پیدا کریں۔ نتیجہ انبوڈینگ ان کے شریکوں سے زیادہ بہتر ہے، اگرچہ ایسے منابع کلمات کے ایک حصہ پر لکھتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کریں گے، Dict2vec، ایک بڑے اور زیادہ پاکیزہ ڈیٹ سورس پر بنیاد ہے، کلمات کی تعریف کے لئے - طبیعی زبان لکھنے لکھنے لکھنے کے لئے۔ Dict2vec لفظ کے اندر سے نئی لفظ جوڑے بناتے ہیں تاکہ سیمنٹی رابطہ دار لفظ زیادہ قریب حرکت کی جاتی ہیں، اور منفی نمپلینگ فیلٹر جڑے سے نکالتے ہیں جن کی لفظ لفظ میں غیر رابطہ ہے. ہم کلمات کے مطابق اور چار ڈیٹسٹ کے مطابق ایک ٹیکس کلسٹ کے کام کے لئے دیکسٹ 2ویک کے مطابق حاصل ہوئے کلمات کا ارزش کرتے ہیں.', 'sr': 'Pokazano je da je učenje riječi o ugrađenju velikog neopisivanog korpusa uspešno u poboljšanju mnogih prirodnih jezičkih zadataka. Najefikasniji i popularni pristupi nauči ili obnoviti takve predstave koristeći dodatne vanjske podatke. Rezultati su općenito bolji od njihovih samo kolega korpusa, iako takvi resursi pokrivaju deo reči u rečniku. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup, Dict2vec, zasnovan na jednom od najvećih, ali napravljenih izvora podataka za opisivanje riječi - prirodne jezičke reči. Dict2vec izgradi nove parove reči iz ulaska rečnika tako da se semantički povezani reči približavaju, i negativne filtere za uzorke izvlače parove čije reči nisu povezani u rečnicima. Procjenjujemo predstave riječi koje su dobile koristeći Dict2vec na 11 podataka za zadatak sličnosti riječi i na četiri podataka za zadatak klasifikacije teksta.', 'uz': "Name Koʻproq tashqi maʼlumot yordamida bu tashqi maʼlumot yordamida o'rganish yoki qayta qayta olish uchun eng eng katta va katta usullar. Natijalar umuman bir necha so'zlardan yaxshi bo'ladi, ammo shunday rasmlar so'zlarning bir qismini qaraydi. Bu hujjatda, biz tilni tahrirlash uchun eng katta fikrlangan maʼlumotlar manbasiga Dict2vec asosida yangi usulni talab qilamiz. Comment Biz bir so'zning birinchi so'zlarini Dict2vec (Dict2vec) yordamida qiymatimiz va matn classification vazifasi uchun to'rtta maʼlumot setida.", 'vi': 'Học thêm từ ngữ trên tập đoàn lớn không có giấy chứng tỏ thành công trong việc cải thiện nhiều công việc ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Cách tiếp cận hiệu quả và phổ biến nhất học hoặc sửa chữa các biểu tượng bằng các dữ liệu bên ngoài. Kết quả là sự nhúng tay tốt hơn so với các đối tác hàng đầu của họ, mặc dù nguồn tài nguyên này chỉ phủ một phần của từ trong từ điển. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mới, Ditk2vec, dựa trên một trong những nguồn dữ liệu lớn nhất nhưng tinh xảo để mô tả từ ngữ tự nhiên. Dict2vector xây dựng các từ mới đôi mới từ các mục từ điển để các từ ngữ học được di chuyển gần hơn, và ngược lại bộ lọc lấy ra các cặp từ không liên quan trong từ điển. Chúng tôi đánh giá các đơn trình diễn từ được lấy từ từ từ trên mười một tập tin về việc tương tự từ và trên bốn tập tin cho một nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản.', 'da': 'Det har vist sig at lære ordindlejringer på store umærkede korpus har succes med at forbedre mange natursproglige opgaver. De mest effektive og populære metoder lærer eller eftermonterer sådanne repræsentationer ved hjælp af yderligere eksterne data. Resultatet af indlejringer er generelt bedre end deres korpus-kun modstykker, selvom sådanne ressourcer dækker en brøkdel af ord i ordforrådet. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny tilgang, Dict2vec, baseret på en af de største endnu raffinerede datakilder til beskrivelse af ord - ordbøger på naturligt sprog. Dict2vec bygger nye ordpar fra ordbogsposter, så semantisk relaterede ord flyttes tættere på, og negativ sampling filtrerer par, hvis ord ikke er relateret til i ordbøger. Vi evaluerer ordrepræsentationerne opnået ved hjælp af Dict2vec på elleve datasæt til ordlighedsopgaven og på fire datasæt til en tekstklassifikationsopgave.', 'bg': 'Изучаването на вграждането на думи в голям немаркиран корпус е доказано успешно в подобряването на много задачи по естествен език. Най-ефективните и популярни подходи научават или модернизират такива представяния, използвайки допълнителни външни данни. Резултатните вграждания обикновено са по-добри от тези, съдържащи само корпус, въпреки че тези ресурси покриват част от думите в речника. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов подход, базиран на един от най-големите, но усъвършенствани източници на данни за описване на думи - речници с естествен език. Създава нови двойки думи от записи в речника, така че семантично свързани думи да се придвижват по-близо, а отрицателните извадки филтрират двойки, чиито думи не са свързани в речниците. Оценяваме думичните представи, получени чрез Dict2vec, върху единадесет набора данни за задачата за сходство на думата и върху четири набора данни за задача за класификация на текста.', 'de': 'Das Erlernen von Wort-Einbettungen auf großen unbeschrifteten Korpus hat sich als erfolgreich erwiesen, um viele natürliche Sprachaufgaben zu verbessern. Die effizientesten und beliebtesten Ansätze lernen oder rüsten solche Darstellungen mit zusätzlichen externen Daten nach. Die resultierenden Einbettungen sind im Allgemeinen besser als ihre korpusbasierten Pendants, obwohl solche Ressourcen einen Bruchteil der Wörter im Vokabular abdecken. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuen Ansatz vor, Dict2vec, basierend auf einer der größten und dennoch verfeinerten Datenquellen zur Beschreibung von Wörtern in natürlichen Wörterbüchern. Dict2vec erstellt neue Wortpaare aus Wörterbucheinträgen, so dass semantisch verwandte Wörter näher rücken und negative Stichproben Paare herausfiltern, deren Wörter in Wörterbüchern nicht verwandt sind. Wir evaluieren die mit Dict2vec erhaltenen Wortrepräsentationen auf elf Datensätzen für die Wortähnlichkeitsaufgabe und auf vier Datensätzen für eine Textklassifikationsaufgabe.', 'ko': '대형 미표기 자료 라이브러리에서 단어 삽입을 배우는 것은 많은 자연 언어 작업을 개선하는 데 성공할 수 있다는 것이 증명되었다.가장 효과적이고 가장 유행하는 방법은 이런 표현을 학습하거나 개선하기 위해 추가 외부 데이터를 사용하는 것이다.이로 인해 생기는 삽입은 어휘표의 일부 단어만 덮어쓰는 것보다 일반적으로 자료 라이브러리만 끼워넣는 것이 좋다.본고에서 우리는 단어를 묘사하는 가장 크고 정확한 데이터 원천 중 하나인 자연 언어 사전을 바탕으로 하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.Dict2vec는 사전 항목에서 새로운 단어 쌍을 구축하면 의미와 관련된 단어가 더욱 가까워지고, 마이너스 샘플링은 사전에서 관련되지 않은 단어 쌍을 필터합니다.Dict2vec를 사용하여 11개의 데이터 세트 (단어 유사성 작업에 사용) 와 4개의 데이터 세트 (텍스트 분류 작업에 사용) 에서 얻은 단어 표시를 평가했습니다.', 'id': 'Mempelajari pembangunan kata pada tubuh besar tanpa tanda telah menunjukkan sukses dalam meningkatkan banyak tugas bahasa alam. Pendekatan yang paling efisien dan populer belajar atau mengubah representati tersebut menggunakan data eksternal tambahan. Penampilan hasil umumnya lebih baik dari rekan-rekan mereka-corpus-only, meskipun sumber daya tersebut menutupi sebagian dari kata-kata dalam vokabular. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru, Dict2vec, berdasarkan salah satu sumber data terbesar namun terinfeksi untuk menjelaskan kata-kata - kamus bahasa alami. Dict2vec membangun pasangan kata baru dari masukan kamus sehingga kata-kata yang berhubungan semantis dipindahkan lebih dekat, dan penampilan negatif filter keluar pasangan yang kata-kata tidak berhubungan dalam kamus. Kami mengevaluasi representation kata yang diperoleh menggunakan Dict2vec pada 11 set data untuk tugas persamaan kata dan pada empat set data untuk tugas klasifikasi teks.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza maneno yanayoingia kwenye makampuni makubwa yasiyotambuliwa yameonekana kuwa na mafanikio katika kuboresha kazi nyingi za lugha za asili. Matokeo yenye ufanisi na maarufu zaidi yanajifunza au kurudisha uwakilishi wa aina hiyo kwa kutumia taarifa za nje. Matokeo ya mwisho ni bora zaidi kuliko wapinzani wao pekee, ingawa rasilimali kama hizi zinajumuisha sehemu ya maneno katika lugha hiyo. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu mpya, Dict2vec, kwa kutumia moja ya chanzo kikubwa cha taarifa ambacho bado kinaelezea maneno - lugha za asili. Dict2vec anajenga jozi mpya za maneno kutoka kwenye vituo vya dictionary ili maneno yanayohusiana na kimapenzi yanaguswa karibu zaidi, na sampuli hasi huchapisha ndoa ambazo maneno hayajapatikana kwa lugha. Tutathmini maonesho yaliyopatikana kwa kutumia Dict2vec kwenye seti za data kumi na moja kwa ajili ya kazi sawa na neno na kwenye seti nne za data kwa ajili ya kazi ya usambazaji wa maandishi.', 'nl': 'Het leren van woord embeddings op groot ongelabeld corpus is succesvol gebleken bij het verbeteren van veel natuurlijke taaltaken. De meest efficiënte en populaire benaderingen leren of retrofit dergelijke representaties met behulp van extra externe gegevens. De resulterende inbeddingen zijn over het algemeen beter dan hun corpus-only tegenhangers, hoewel dergelijke bronnen een fractie van woorden in de woordenschat omvatten. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe aanpak voor, Dict2vec, gebaseerd op een van de grootste maar verfijnde databronnen voor het beschrijven van woorden in natuurlijke taalwoordenboeken. Dict2vec bouwt nieuwe woordparen op basis van woordenboek-items, zodat semantisch gerelateerde woorden dichterbij worden gebracht, en negatieve sampling filtert paren waarvan de woorden niet gerelateerd zijn in woordenboeken. We evalueren de woordrepresentaties verkregen met Dict2vec op elf datasets voor de woordvergelijkingstaak en op vier datasets voor een tekstclassificatietaak.', 'tr': 'Iň uly ýazylmaz korpusda söz integrasyny öwrenmek tebigat dilleriniň birnäçe täzeliklerini geliştirmekde başarılı bolandy. Iň täsirli we meşhur ýagdaýlar şol ýagdaýlary daşarydaky daşary maglumatlary ulanyp öwrenip ýa-da ýene gaýd etmeli. Netijän çykyşlary diňe korpus bilen gowydyr. Bu çeşmeler sözlerinde bir bölüm sözlerini daşyrýarlar. Bu kagyzda, biz Täze bir gollaşma teklip edip görýäris Dict2vek, sözleri tassyklamak üçin iň uly we taýýarlanan dataçeşmeleriň birine daýanýar. Dict2vek sözlük girişinden täze söz çiftleri in şa edýär böylece semantik bilen ilgili sözleri ýakyn göçsin we sözleri sözleride döwürmedikleri üçin negatif örnekler çykar. Dict2vek kullanarak elimizden bir kelime benzetim görevi ve metin klasifikasyonu görevi dört veri setlerinde değerlendiriyoruz.', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن کلمه\u200cهایی که روی کورپوس بزرگ غیر نوشته شده\u200cاند نشان داده می\u200cشود که در بهترین کار بسیاری از زبان طبیعی موفق می\u200cشوند. بهترین روش\u200cهای موثرترین و محبوب این نمایش\u200cها را با استفاده از داده\u200cهای خارجی بیشتر یاد می\u200cگیرند یا بازسازی می\u200cکنند. در حالی که این منابع بخشی از کلمات در کلمات را پوشش می\u200cدهند، معمولاً بهتر از همکارانشان هستند. در این کاغذ، ما یک طریق جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، Dict2vec، بر اساس یکی از بزرگترین منبع داده\u200cهای هنوز تازه\u200cشده برای توصیف کردن کلمات - کلمات\u200cهای زبان طبیعی. Dict2vec جفت\u200cهای کلمه جدید را از ورودهای لغوی ساخته می\u200cکند تا کلمه\u200cهای متعلق به semantic به نزدیکتر حرکت شود، و فیلترهای نمونه\u200cهای منفی از جفت\u200cهایی که کلمه\u200cهایشان در لغوی\u200cها متصل نیستند. ما ارزیابی کلمه را با استفاده از Dict2vec در ۱۱ مجموعه داده برای کار شباهت کلمه و در چهار مجموعه داده برای یک کار گروه متن بررسی می کنیم.', 'hr': 'Pokazano je da su učenje riječi uključenja na veliki nezabenirani korpus uspješno u poboljšanju mnogih prirodnih jezičkih zadataka. Najučinkovitiji i popularniji pristupi naučiti ili obnoviti takve predstave koristeći dodatne vanjske podatke. Rezultati su općenito bolji od njihovih samo kolega korpusa, iako takvi resursi pokrivaju dio riječi u riječima. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup, Dict2vec, zasnovan na jednom od najvećih, ali napravljenih izvora podataka za opis riječi - prirodne jezičke riječi. Dict2vec izgradi nove parove riječi iz uređaja riječi kako bi se semantički povezani riječi približile, a negativni filtriranje uzoraka izvlači par čije riječi nisu povezani u riječima. Procjenjujemo predstave riječi koje su dobile koristeći Dict2vec na 11 podataka za zadatak sličnosti riječi i na četiri podataka za zadatak klasifikacije teksta.', 'af': "Die leer van woord inbêding op groot ongeabelde korpus is gesluit om baie natuurlike taal opdragte te verbeter te wees. Die mees effektief en populêre toegange leer of herstel sodanige voorstellings met addisionele eksterne data. Gevaalde inbettings is algemeen beter as hul korpus-slegs kunstenaars, alhoewel sodanige hulpbronne 'n breuk van woorde in die woordeboek oordek. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe toegang, Dict2vec, gebaseer op een van die grootste nog opgewerp databron vir beskrywing van woorde - natuurlike taal woordeboekvorms. Dict2vec bou nuwe woord paar van woordeboekinskrywings sodat semantiese verwante woorde naby verskuif word, en negatiewe versameling filters uit paar wie se woorde in woordeboekvorms onverwante is. Ons evalueer die woord voorstellings wat deur Dict2vec te gebruik het op elf datastel vir die woord gelykbaarheid taak en op vier datastel vir 'n teks klassifikasie taak.", 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ բառերի ներգրավման ուսումնասիրելը մեծ աննշան մարմնի վրա հաջողված է բարելավել շատ բնական լեզվի խնդիրներ: Ամենաարդյունավետ և հայտնի մոտեցումները սովորում են կամ վերափոխում են նման արտաքին տվյալներ օգտագործելով: Արդյունավետ ներդրումները սովորաբար ավելի լավ են, քան միայն իրենց կորպոս ընկերները, չնայած, որ նման ռեսուրսները ծածկում են բառերի մի մասը բառարանում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոտեցում, Դիկթ2վեք, հիմնված բառերի նկարագրման համար ամենամեծ, սակայն լավագույն տվյալների աղբյուրից մեկի վրա, բնական լեզվի բառարանների նկարագրման համար: Comment We evaluate the word representations obtained using Dict2vec on eleven datasets for the word similarity task and on four datasets for a text classification task.', 'am': 'በተለየ ባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ስራዎችን በማድረግ ቃላትን በማስተማር ትክክል ነው፡፡ የውጭ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም እንደዚህ ያሉትን መልዕክቶች ማስተማርና ለመመለስ የሚችሉት የበለጠ እና የበረታች ደረጃዎች ናቸው፡፡ የመጨረሻው አካባቢዎች ከቆርፓስ ብቻ ተቃዋሚዎቹ ይልቅ የተሻሉ ናቸው፤ ምንም እንኳ እንደዚህ ሀብት በአብሪካዊው ቃላት ክፍል ይሸፍናል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ፣ አዲስ ልውጤት፣ ዲክት2vec፣ በተለጠቀው ቃላት - የፍጥረት ቋንቋ መዝገብ በሚያሳየው ዳታተር ምንጭ በመሠረት አዲስ ጉዳይ እናሳስባለን፡፡ Dict2vec አዲስ ቃላት ከ መዝገበኛ ግንኙነት የተገኘ ቃላት ወደ ቀረበ ይነቀሳል እና የnegative ምሳሌ ቃላት በመዝገበ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ያልተገለጠውን ሁለት ዓይነቶችን ያጠነክራል፡፡ በአሥራ አንዱ ዳታ ሳትሰር እና በአራቱ ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ላይ ለጽሑፍ መግለጫ ስራ የተደረገውን ቃላት እናስተውልታለን፡፡', 'az': 'Büyük yazılmadığı korpus üstündə sözləri öyrənmək çoxlu təbiətli dil işlərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün başarılı olmuşdur. Ən müvəffəqiyyətli və qüvvətli tərzlərin böyük tərzlərini ekstra dağıtımla öyrənir və ya yenidən tərzlərini yenidən dəyişdirir. Növbəti in şalları olaraq yalnız korpus-kompartlarından daha yaxşıdır. Halbuki bu məlumatlar sözlərdə bir bölümünü örtürsünlər. Bu kağızda yeni bir tərzim, Dict2vec təklif edirik, sözləri tanımlamaq üçün ən böyük, hətta təmizlənmiş verilən məlumatlardan birinə dayanılır. Dict2vec sözlük girişindən yeni sözlər çift in şa edir ki, semantik olaraq bağlı sözlər daha yaxınlaşdırılır və sözləri sözlərdə bağlı olmayan çiftlərdən negatif örnək filtrləri çəkir. Biz dict2vec vasitəsilə alınan sözləri 11 veri qurduğu sözlərin similarlığı və metin klasifikasyonu işi üçün dörd veri qurduğu sözləri değerləşdiririk.', 'bn': 'অনেক প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার কাজ উন্নত করার ক্ষেত্রে বিশাল অল্প লেবাল কর্পাসের উপর শব্দ শিখা যাচ্ছে। আরো বাইরের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে এরকম প্রতিনিধিদের শিক্ষা বা পুনরায় ফিরিয়ে নিতে পারে। শেষ পর্যন্ত বিষয়গুলো সাধারণত তাদের কোর্পাস-শুধুমাত্র প্রতিপক্ষের চেয়ে ভাল, যদিও এই সম্পদ শব্দভাণ্ডারের কিছু শব্দের এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, ডিক্ট২ভেক, বৃহত্তম তথ্য উৎস বর্ণনা করার জন্য - প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার অভিভাবক। ডিক্ট২ভেক কনফিগারি এন্ট্রি থেকে নতুন শব্দ জোড়া তৈরি করেছে যাতে সামান্টিকালের সংশ্লিষ্ট শব্দ কাছাকাছি সরে যায় এবং নেতিবাচক নমুনা  ১১ ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে ডিক্ট২ভেক ব্যবহার করা শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বিষয়টি আমরা মূল্যায়ন করি শব্দের সমতামূলক কাজের জন্য এবং একটি', 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que aprendre les paraules incorporades en un gran cos sense etiqueta ha tingut èxit en millorar moltes tasques de llenguatge natural. Els enfocaments més eficients i populars aprenen o ajusten aquestes representacions fent servir dades externes adicionals. Les incorporacions resultants són generalment millors que els seus col·laboradors, encara que aquests recursos cobreixen una fracció de paraules al vocabulari. En aquest paper, proposem un nou enfocament, Dict2vec, basat en un dels més grans i refinats fonts de dades per descriure paraules - diccionaris de llenguatges naturals. Dict2vec construeix parells de paraules de paraules a partir d'entrades del diccionari de manera que les paraules relacionades semànticament s'apropin, i filtra les mostres negatives de parelles les paraules de les quals no estan relacionades en diccionaris. Evaluam les paraules representacions obtenides fent servir Dict2vec en onze conjunts de dades per a la tasca de similitud de paraules i en quatre conjunts de dades per a una tasca de classificació de text.", 'sq': 'Learning word embeddings on large unlabeled corpus has been shown to be successful in improving many natural language tasks.  Përqasjet më të efektshme dhe më popullore mësojnë apo përshtaten përfaqësime të tilla duke përdorur të dhëna shtesë të jashtme. Resulting embeddings are generally better than their corpus-only counterparts, although such resources cover a fraction of words in the vocabulary.  Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një qasje të re, Dict2vec, bazuar në një nga burimet më të mëdha të të dhënave ende të rafinuara për përshkrimin e fjalëve - fjalorët e gjuhës natyrore. Dict2vec builds new word pairs from dictionary entries so that semantically-related words are moved closer, and negative sampling filters out pairs whose words are unrelated in dictionaries.  Ne vlerësojmë përfaqësimet e fjalës të fituara duke përdorur Dict2vec në njëmbëdhjetë grupe të dhënash për detyrën e fjalës së ngjashmërisë dhe në katër grupe të dhënash për një detyrë klasifikimi teksti.', 'cs': 'Učení se vkládání slov na velký neoznačený korpus bylo prokázáno jako úspěšné při zlepšení mnoha úkolů přirozeného jazyka. Nejúčinnější a nejoblíbenější přístupy se naučí nebo modernizují takové reprezentace pomocí dalších externích dat. Výsledné vložení jsou obecně lepší než jejich korpusové protějšky, ačkoli tyto zdroje pokrývají zlomek slov ve slovní zásobě. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový přístup, Dict2vec, založený na jednom z největších a doposud rafinovaných datových zdrojů pro popis slov ve slovnících přirozeného jazyka. Dict2vec vytváří nové slovní páry ze slovníkových položek tak, aby se sémanticky související slova přesunula blíže a negativní vzorkování filtruje páry, jejichž slova nejsou ve slovnících spojena. Vyhodnocujeme reprezentace slov získané pomocí Dict2vec na jedenácti datových sadách pro úlohu podobnosti slov a na čtyřech datových sadách pro úlohu klasifikace textu.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten oppiminen suurelle merkitsemättömälle korpuselle on osoittautunut onnistuneeksi parantamaan monia luonnonkielitehtäviä. Tehokkaimmat ja suosituimmat lähestymistavat oppivat tai muokkaavat tällaisia esityksiä käyttämällä ulkoista lisätietoa. Tuloksena olevat upotukset ovat yleensä parempia kuin vain korpusia sisältävät vastineensa, vaikka tällaiset resurssit kattavat murto-osan sanastossa olevista sanoista. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta lähestymistapaa, Dict2vec, joka perustuu yhteen suurimmista mutta hienostuneista tietolähteistä sanojen kuvaamiseen - luonnollisen kielen sanakirjoihin. Dict2vec rakentaa uusia sanapareja sanakirjasta siten, että semanttisesti liittyvät sanat siirretään lähemmäksi ja negatiivinen näytteenotto suodattaa pois pareja, joiden sanat eivät liity sanakirjoihin. Dict2vec-menetelmällä saatuja sanaesityksiä arvioidaan yhdestätoista sanasamankaltaisuustehtävään liittyvästä aineistosta ja neljästä tekstiluokittelutehtävään liittyvästä aineistosta.', 'et': "Suure märgistamata korpuse sõnade õppimine on osutunud edukaks paljude looduskeelsete ülesannete täiustamisel. Kõige tõhusamad ja populaarsemad lähenemisviisid õpivad või uuendavad selliseid esitusi täiendavate välisandmete abil. Tulemuslikud manustamised on üldiselt paremad kui nende ainult korpusel sisalduvad vasted, kuigi sellised ressursid hõlmavad murdosa sõnavara sõnadest. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue lähenemisviisi Dict2vec, mis põhineb ühel suurimal veel rafineeritud andmeallikal sõnade kirjeldamiseks - looduskeele sõnaraamatutel. Dict2vec ehitab sõnastikukirjetest uued sõnapaarid, nii et semantiliselt seotud sõnad liigutatakse lähemale ja negatiivne valim filtreerib välja paarid, mille sõnad sõnastikus ei ole seotud. Hindame Dict2vec'i abil saadud sõnaesitusi üheteistkümnel andmekogumil sõna sarnasuse ülesande jaoks ja neljal andmekogumil teksti klassifitseerimisülesande jaoks.", 'bs': 'Pokazano je da su učenje riječi uključenja na veliki nezabelovani korpus uspješno u poboljšanju mnogih prirodnih jezičkih zadataka. Najefikasniji i popularni pristupi nauči ili obnoviti takve predstave koristeći dodatne vanjske podatke. Rezultati su općenito bolji od njihovih samo kolega korpusa, iako takvi resursi pokrivaju dio riječi u rečniku. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup, Dict2vec, zasnovan na jednom od najvećih, ali napravljenijih izvora podataka za opisivanje riječi - prirodnih jezičkih dictionara. Dict2vec izgradi nove parove riječi iz uređaja rečnika tako da se semantički povezani riječi približavaju, a negativni filtriranje uzorka izvlači par čija riječi nisu povezane u rečnicima. Procjenjujemo predstave riječi koje su dobile koristeći Dict2vec na 11 podataka za zadatak sličnosti riječi i na četiri podataka za zadatak klasifikacije teksta.', 'he': 'הוכח שלמדת מילים על קורפוס גדול ללא סימנים הצליחה בשיפור של משימות שפה טבעיות רבות. הגישויים הכי יעילים והפופולריים לומדים או מחדשים מייצגים כאלה באמצעות נתונים חיצוניים נוספים. התערבות המוצאות הן בדרך כלל טובות יותר משותפים הקורפוס היחידים שלהם, למרות משאבים כאלה מכסים חלק ממילים במילים. In this paper, we propose a new approach, Dict2vec, based on one of the largest yet refined datasource for describing words - natural language dictionaries.  Dict2vec בונה זוגות מילים חדשות ממכתבי מילון כך שמילים קשורות סמנטית נעות קרובות יותר, ומסינים דגימות שליליים החוצה זוגות שמיליהם לא קשורות במילונים. אנו מעריכים את מילים הייצגות שנקבלו באמצעות Dict2vec על 11 קבוצות נתונים עבור משימה הדומה המילית ובארבעה קבוצות נתונים עבור משימה מסווג טקסט.', 'sk': 'Učenje vključevanja besed v velik neoznačen korpus se je izkazalo za uspešno pri izboljšanju številnih nalog naravnega jezika. Najučinkovitejši in najbolj priljubljeni pristopi se naučijo ali posodobijo takšne predstavitve z uporabo dodatnih zunanjih podatkov. Posledične vdelave so na splošno boljše od njihovih korpusnih podatkov, čeprav ti viri pokrivajo delček besed v besedišču. V prispevku predlagamo nov pristop, Dict2vec, ki temelji na enem največjih, vendar prefinjenih virov podatkov za opis besed - slovarjih naravnega jezika. Dict2vec gradi nove pare besed iz slovarskih vnosov, tako da se semantično povezane besede premaknejo bližje, negativno vzorčenje pa filtrira pare, katerih besede niso povezane v slovarjih. Besedene reprezentacije, pridobljene z uporabo Dict2vec, smo ocenili na enajstih naborih podatkov za nalogo podobnosti besed in na štirih naborih podatkov za nalogo klasifikacije besedila.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness embedding Dict 2vec Dict 2vec mbubute gambar uwong sing dibutuhke ing diketeksi We assess the word representations available with Dict 2vec on 11en dataset for the word Simlarity task and on 4 dataset for a text CLASS task.', 'ha': "An nuna maganar da ke fitarwa cikin umarnin da ba'a rubutu ba, ya zama mai cin nasara a kyautata aikin harshen masu yawa. @ info: whatsthis Ganda na ƙarshen su ne mafi alhẽri daga ma'abũcin tarakinsa kawai, kuma kõ da yaushe wannan raslima ke ƙarfafa rabon maganar. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi na Dict2vc, a kan banne ɗayan ɗayan masu girma da ba'a tsare shi ba ga fassarar maganar - lugha na asili. Dict2yec na samar da new word par daga entries ɗin dictionary, dõmin a motsa magana masu hushi da semantin-related zuwa mafi kusanta, kuma misali da nega ya filter out nau'i biyu wanda maganarsu ba'a sanar da su cikin dictionary. We evaluate the word representations obtained using Dict2vec on eleven datasets for the word similarity task and on four datasets for a text classification task.", 'bo': 'སྦུང་མི་ཤེས་པའི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་དག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཏེ། ཕན་འབྲས་ཆེ་ཤོས་དང་སྐད་ཆེ་ཤོས་མཁན་གྱི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་བསླབ་དང་ཡང་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་དགོས། རྐྱེན་འབྲས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྡུད་དེ་ཚོ་ཚང་མས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྩིས་པ་ལས་ལྡན་ཤིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་སྣོད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་ Dict2vec(Dict2vec)ཞིག་དང་། དེ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་པ་ཞ Dict2vec ཡི་གེ་ནང་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གསར་པ་ལས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་ཟམ་ནང་ལས་བཟོ་བྱས་ནས་semantically་འབྲེལ་བའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཉེ་བར་ནས་སྤོར་བ་དང་བརྗོད་པའི་ཆ་ཚིག་ནང་ ང་ཚོས་Dict2vec སྤྱོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་བཅུ་ཐམ་གཅིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་རྩོམ་འབོར་བ་དང་། ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ་བཀོ'}
{'en': 'Learning Paraphrastic Sentence Embeddings from Back-Translated Bitext', 'ar': 'تعلم تضمين الجمل المعاد صياغتها من Bitext المترجمة للخلف', 'pt': 'Aprendendo incorporações de sentenças parafrásticas a partir de texto bitexto traduzido', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de incrustaciones de oraciones parafrásticas a partir de bitexto retrotraducido', 'fr': "Apprentissage de l'intégration de phrases paraphrastiques à partir d'un bitexte rétro-traduit", 'ja': '逆翻訳ビットテキストからのパラフレーズ文埋め込みの学習', 'zh': '从译双文本中学释义句', 'hi': 'वापस अनुवादित Bitext से Paraphrastic वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखना', 'ru': 'Изучение парафразированных предложений из переведенного назад битекста', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Leabú Pianbhreithe Paraphrastic ó Dhíthéacs Cúl-Aistrithe', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Parafrásztikus mondatok beágyazása visszafordított bitextből', 'el': 'Μάθηση Παραφράστικων Ενσωματώσεων από Πίσω-Μεταφρασμένο Bitext', 'lt': 'Išmokyti parafrazinių sakinių įdėjimus iš galinio vertimo biteksto', 'it': "Imparare l'incorporazione di frasi paraflastiche da bit tradotto indietro", 'mk': 'Научи парафрастични вградувања на реченици од задниот преведен битекст', 'kk': 'Парафрастикалық сөз ендіруді Back- Translated Bitext- ден үйрену', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Penjelmaan Huruf Parafrastik dari Bitext Terterjemahan-Belakang', 'ml': 'പിന്നില്\u200d നിന്നും പരാപ്രസ്താവിക വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Back-Translated Bitext-ээс парафратистик өгүүлбэрийг сурах', 'mt': 'Learning Paraphrastic Sentence Embeddings from Back-Translated Bitext', 'no': 'Lær innbygging av parafratiske teikn frå tilbakeomsette bittekst', 'pl': 'Uczenie się parafrastycznych osadzeń zdań z Back-Translated Bitext', 'ro': 'Învățarea propozițiilor parafrastice încorporate din Bitext tradus înapoi', 'sr': 'Учити парафратистичке слова из назадно преведеног битекста', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Att lära sig parafrastiska meningar inbäddade från bakåtöversatt bitext', 'so': 'Barista qalabka badbaadada', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Học cách cảm thông cảm từ những ngôn ngữ cũ', 'bg': 'Учене на вграждания парафрастични изречения от назад преведен биттекст', 'nl': 'Het leren van parafrastische zinsinsluitingen van Back-Translated Bitext', 'hr': 'Naučenje parafrastičkih uloga iz natrag prevedenog bitexta', 'da': 'Indlejring af parafrastiske sætninger fra bagoversat bitekst', 'ko': '이중 텍스트를 반역하여 해석문 삽입을 배우다', 'id': 'Mempelajari Penciptaan Sentensi Parafrastik dari Bitext Terterjemahan-Belakang', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن پیوندهای عبارت پارافراستیک از بیت مترجم پشت', 'de': 'Lernen von paraphrastischen Satz Einbettungen von Back-Translated Bitext', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Makazi ya Uchunguzi kutoka kwa Kitabuni cha Tafsiri', 'tr': 'Arka terjime edilen Bitextden parafratik söz integrlerini öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfshirjes së fjalëve parafrastike nga Bitext i përkthyer mbrapa', 'hy': 'Գիտել պարաֆրազիկական նախադասությունների ներգրավումները ետնաթարգմանված բիտեքստից', 'af': 'Comment', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাস্টিক শিক্ষা বাইটেক্সট থেকে প্যারাফ্রাস্টিক শিখানো', 'am': 'text', 'az': 'Geri-tercümlənmiş Bitextdən Parafrastik Sözü İçeridəklərini öyrənir', 'bs': 'Naučenje parafrastičkih uloga iz natrag prevedenog bitexta', 'cs': 'Učení se parafrastické věty vložení z Back-Translated Bitextu', 'ca': 'Aprendre incorporacions de frases parafràstiques a partir de Bitext tornat', 'et': 'Parafrastiliste lausete manustamise õppimine tagatõlgitud bitekstist', 'fi': 'Oppiminen parafrastisia lauseen upotuksia taaksepäin käännetystä bitekstistä', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ללמוד קישורים של גזרות פרפרסטיות מתוך Bitext מתרגם מאחור', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje parafrastičnih stavkov iz nazaj prevedenega bitexta', 'bo': 'Back-Translated Bitext'}
{'en': 'We consider the problem of learning general-purpose, paraphrastic sentence embeddings in the setting of Wieting et al. (2016b). We use neural machine translation to generate sentential paraphrases via back-translation of bilingual sentence pairs. We evaluate the paraphrase pairs by their ability to serve as training data for learning paraphrastic sentence embeddings. We find that the data quality is stronger than prior work based on bitext and on par with manually-written English paraphrase pairs, with the advantage that our approach can scale up to generate large training sets for many languages and domains. We experiment with several language pairs and data sources, and develop a variety of data filtering techniques. In the process, we explore how neural machine translation output differs from human-written sentences, finding clear differences in length, the amount of repetition, and the use of rare words.', 'fr': "Nous examinons le problème de l'apprentissage de l'intégration de phrases paraphrastiques à usage général dans le cadre de Wieting et al. (2016b). Nous utilisons la traduction automatique neuronale pour générer des paraphrases sententielles via la rétro-traduction de paires de phrases bilingues. Nous évaluons les paires de paraphrases en fonction de leur capacité à servir de données d'entraînement pour l'apprentissage de l'intégration de phrases paraphrastiques. Nous constatons que la qualité des données est meilleure que les travaux antérieurs basés sur le bitexte et comparable aux paires de paraphrases anglaises écrites manuellement, avec l'avantage que notre approche peut être étendue pour générer de grands ensembles de formation pour de nombreuses langues et domaines. Nous expérimentons plusieurs paires de langues et sources de données, et développons diverses techniques de filtrage des données. Au cours de ce processus, nous explorons comment la sortie de la traduction automatique neuronale diffère des phrases écrites par l'homme, en trouvant des différences claires en termes de longueur, de quantité de répétition et d'utilisation de mots rares.", 'es': 'Consideramos el problema del aprendizaje de inserciones de oraciones parafrásticas de propósito general en el contexto de Wieting et al. (2016b). Utilizamos la traducción automática neuronal para generar paráfrasis de oración a través de la traducción inversa de pares de oraciones bilingües. Evaluamos los pares de paráfrasis por su capacidad de servir como datos de entrenamiento para el aprendizaje de incrustaciones de oraciones parafrásticas. Descubrimos que la calidad de los datos es más sólida que el trabajo anterior basado en bitext y a la par de pares de paráfrasis en inglés escritos manualmente, con la ventaja de que nuestro enfoque puede ampliarse para generar grandes conjuntos de capacitación para muchos idiomas y dominios. Experimentamos con varios pares de idiomas y fuentes de datos, y desarrollamos una variedad de técnicas de filtrado de datos. En el proceso, exploramos cómo el resultado de la traducción automática neuronal difiere de las oraciones escritas por humanos, encontrando diferencias claras en la longitud, la cantidad de repeticiones y el uso de palabras raras.', 'ar': 'نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار مشكلة تعلم حفلات الزفاف للأغراض العامة والمعاد صياغتها في إعداد Wieting et al. (2016 ب). نحن نستخدم الترجمة الآلية العصبية لتوليد إعادة الصياغة عبر الترجمة الخلفية لأزواج الجمل ثنائية اللغة. نقوم بتقييم أزواج إعادة الصياغة من خلال قدرتها على العمل كبيانات تدريب لتعلم زخارف الجمل المعاد صياغتها. وجدنا أن جودة البيانات أقوى من العمل السابق على أساس bitext وعلى قدم المساواة مع أزواج إعادة الصياغة الإنجليزية المكتوبة يدويًا ، مع ميزة أن نهجنا يمكن أن يتوسع لإنشاء مجموعات تدريب كبيرة للعديد من اللغات والمجالات. نجرب العديد من أزواج اللغات ومصادر البيانات ، ونطور مجموعة متنوعة من تقنيات تصفية البيانات. في هذه العملية ، نستكشف كيف يختلف ناتج الترجمة الآلية العصبية عن الجمل المكتوبة بواسطة الإنسان ، ونجد اختلافات واضحة في الطول ، ومقدار التكرار ، واستخدام الكلمات النادرة.', 'pt': 'Consideramos o problema de aprender a incorporação de sentenças parafrásticas de propósito geral no cenário de Wieting et al. (2016b). Usamos a tradução automática neural para gerar paráfrases sentenciais por meio da tradução reversa de pares de frases bilíngues. Avaliamos os pares de paráfrases por sua capacidade de servir como dados de treinamento para aprender incorporações de sentenças parafrásticas. Descobrimos que a qualidade dos dados é mais forte do que o trabalho anterior baseado em bitexto e a par com pares de paráfrases em inglês escritas manualmente, com a vantagem de que nossa abordagem pode ser ampliada para gerar grandes conjuntos de treinamento para muitos idiomas e domínios. Experimentamos vários pares de idiomas e fontes de dados e desenvolvemos uma variedade de técnicas de filtragem de dados. No processo, exploramos como a saída da tradução de máquina neural difere das frases escritas por humanos, encontrando diferenças claras em comprimento, quantidade de repetição e uso de palavras raras.', 'zh': '臣等思Wieting等(2016b)设中通用,释义句嵌。 用神经机器翻译因双语句对反译以成句释义。 吾以解释为学释义句嵌练数以质释义。 吾见数胜于双文本之先事,而与手动之英语释义相当,而吾法可以广言和域之大集。 试用数语对数据源,并开诸数术。 求之神经机器翻译输与人书句不同者,见长短,复量奇单词用之明异也。', 'ja': '私たちは、Wieting et al. (2016 b)の設定で、汎用的なパラフラシックな文章埋め込みを学習する問題を考慮しています。私たちは、ニューラル機械翻訳を使用して、バイリンガル文のペアの逆翻訳を介して意味のあるパラフレーズを生成します。パラフレーズペアは、パラフレーズ文の埋め込みを学習するためのトレーニングデータとして機能する能力によって評価されます。私たちは、ビットテキストに基づいた以前の作業よりも、手動で書かれた英語のパラフレーズペアと同等にデータ品質が強力であることを発見しました。私たちのアプローチは、多くの言語とドメインのための大きなトレーニングセットを生成するためにスケールアップすることができるという利点があります。いくつかの言語ペアとデータソースを実験し、様々なデータフィルタリング技術を開発しています。このプロセスでは、神経機械翻訳出力が人間が書いた文章とどのように異なるかを探り、長さ、繰り返しの量、希少な単語の使用の明確な違いを見つけます。', 'hi': 'हम Wieting et al. (2016b) की सेटिंग में सामान्य-उद्देश्य, पैराफ्रैस्टिक वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखने की समस्या पर विचार करते हैं। हम द्विभाषी वाक्य जोड़े के बैक-अनुवाद के माध्यम से सेंसेंशियल पैराफ्रेज़ उत्पन्न करने के लिए तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद का उपयोग करते हैं। हम पैराफ्रेस्टिक वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए प्रशिक्षण डेटा के रूप में सेवा करने की उनकी क्षमता से व्याख्या जोड़े का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि डेटा की गुणवत्ता bitext पर आधारित पूर्व काम की तुलना में मजबूत है और मैन्युअल रूप से लिखित अंग्रेजी व्याख्या जोड़े के बराबर है, इस लाभ के साथ कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण कई भाषाओं और डोमेन के लिए बड़े प्रशिक्षण सेट उत्पन्न करने के लिए स्केल कर सकता है। हम कई भाषा जोड़े और डेटा स्रोतों के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, और विभिन्न प्रकार की डेटा फ़िल्टरिंग तकनीकों को विकसित करते हैं। इस प्रक्रिया में, हम यह पता लगाते हैं कि तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद आउटपुट मानव-लिखित वाक्यों से कैसे भिन्न होता है, लंबाई में स्पष्ट अंतर, पुनरावृत्ति की मात्रा और दुर्लभ शब्दों के उपयोग को खोजता है।', 'ru': 'Рассматриваем проблему обучения общецелевым, парафразированным вложениям предложений в условиях Wieting et al. (2016b). Мы используем нейронный машинный перевод для генерации сентенциальных парафраз посредством обратного перевода двуязычных пар предложений. Мы оцениваем пары перефразов по их способности служить в качестве обучающих данных для изучения парафразированных вложений предложений. Мы обнаружили, что качество данных выше, чем в предыдущей работе, основанной на битексте и наравне с написанными вручную парами английских перефразов, с тем преимуществом, что наш подход может масштабироваться для создания больших обучающих наборов для многих языков и областей. Мы экспериментируем с несколькими языковыми парами и источниками данных и разрабатываем различные методы фильтрации данных. В процессе мы исследуем, чем результат нейронного машинного перевода отличается от написанных человеком предложений, обнаруживая четкие различия в длине, количестве повторов и использовании редких слов.', 'ga': 'Breathnaímid ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le leabú abairtí ginearálta, paraphrasticacha a fhoghlaim i suíomh Wieting et al. (2016b). Bainimid úsáid as aistriúchán meaisín néarach chun athinsint abairtí a ghiniúint trí ais-aistriúchán ar phéirí abairtí dátheangacha. Déanaimid na péirí athinsinte a mheas de réir a gcumas fónamh mar shonraí oiliúna chun leabú abairtí paraphrastic a fhoghlaim. Feictear dúinn go bhfuil cáilíocht na sonraí níos láidre ná an obair a rinneadh roimhe seo bunaithe ar bhithéacs agus ar chomhchéim le péirí athinsint Béarla de láimh, agus é de bhuntáiste aige gur féidir ár gcur chuige a mhéadú chun tacair oiliúna móra a ghiniúint do go leor teangacha agus fearann. Déanaimid tástáil le roinnt péirí teanga agus foinsí sonraí, agus forbraimid éagsúlacht teicnící scagtha sonraí. Sa phróiseas, déanaimid iniúchadh ar an difríocht atá idir aschur néaraistriúcháin meaisín agus abairtí daonna-scríofa, ag aimsiú difríochtaí soiléire maidir le fad, méid an athrá, agus úsáid na bhfocal neamhchoitianta.', 'hu': 'Figyelembe vesszük az általános célú, parafrasztikus mondatbeágyazások tanulásának problémáját a Wieting et al. (2016b). Neurális gépi fordítást használunk a kétnyelvű mondatpárok visszafordításával érzékeny parafrázisok generálására. A parafrázispárokat a parafrázis-beágyazások tanulásához szükséges képességük alapján értékeljük. Úgy találjuk, hogy az adatminőség erősebb, mint a bitexten alapuló korábbi munkák és a manuálisan írt angol parafrázispárok, azzal az előnnyel, hogy a megközelítésünk nagyméretű képzési készleteket generál számos nyelvre és domain számára. Több nyelvpárral és adatforrással kísérletezünk, és különböző adatszűrési technikákat fejlesztünk ki. A folyamat során azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a neurális gépi fordítás mennyire különbözik az ember által írt mondatoktól, egyértelmű különbségeket találunk a hosszban, az ismétlés mennyiségében és a ritka szavak használatában.', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης γενικής χρήσης, παραφραστικής ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων στο πλαίσιο του κ.α. (2016β). Χρησιμοποιούμε νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση για να παράγουμε νοητικές παραφράσεις μέσω της αντίστροφης μετάφρασης δίγλωσσων ζευγαριών προτάσεων. Αξιολογούμε τα ζεύγη παραφράσεων από την ικανότητά τους να χρησιμεύσουν ως δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης για την εκμάθηση παραφράσεων ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η ποιότητα των δεδομένων είναι ισχυρότερη από την προηγούμενη εργασία βασισμένη σε bitext και ισοδύναμη με τα χειρωνακτικά γραπτά αγγλικά ζεύγη παραφράσεων, με το πλεονέκτημα ότι η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να επεκταθεί για να δημιουργήσει μεγάλα σύνολα κατάρτισης για πολλές γλώσσες και τομείς. Πειραματιζόμαστε με διάφορα γλωσσικά ζεύγη και πηγές δεδομένων και αναπτύσσουμε μια ποικιλία τεχνικών φιλτραρίσματος δεδομένων. Κατά τη διαδικασία, εξερευνούμε πώς η παραγωγή νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης διαφέρει από τις ανθρώπινες προτάσεις, βρίσκοντας σαφείς διαφορές στο μήκος, το ποσό της επανάληψης και τη χρήση σπάνιων λέξεων.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ პრობლემა საერთო მიზეზი სწავლების, პარაფრასტიული სიტყვების შემდეგ Wieting et al-ის შემდეგ. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ნეიროლური მაქანის გადაწყვეტილება, რომ გვექნება სენტიალური პარაფრაზების გადაწყვეტილებით ორივე სიტყვების გადაწყვეტილებით. ჩვენ პარაფრაზესის ზოგების შესაძლებლობით გავუმუშაოთ, როგორც საკუთარი მონაცემებისთვის პარაფრაზესტიული სიტყვებისთვის გასწავლად. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ მონაცემების კაalitეტი უფრო ძალიან უფრო ძალიან, ვიდრე წინაწინაწინაწინაწერებული ინგლისური პარაფრეზის ზოგებით, რომლებიც ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა შეიძლება გაზრუ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებთ რამდენიმე ენახის ზოგებით და მონაცემების ფორმებით და განვითარებთ რამდენიმე განსხვავებული მონაცემების ფილტრინტის პროცესში, ჩვენ ვხედავთ, როგორ ნეიროლური მაქანის გადაწყვეტილების გამოყენება ადამიანის წერტილი სიტყვებისგან განსხვავებულია, ძალიან განსხვავებულია სიტყვების განსხვავებას,', 'kk': 'Біз жалпы мақсатты оқыту мәселесін, парафратистік сөздерді Wieting et al деген орнату мәселесін ойлаймыз. (2016b). Біз невралдық компьютердің аудармасын екі тілінің аудармасынан сөздер парафразын құру үшін қолданамыз. Біз парафраздың екеуін олардың парафразтық мәтіндерін үйрену үшін оқыту мүмкіндігі үшін оқыту мүмкіндігін бағалаймыз. Біз деректер сапасы бірнеше жұмыс мәтініне негізделген жұмыс мен қолмен жазылған ағылшын парафразының парафразының екеуіне күшті деп ойлаймыз. Біздің тәсіліміз көптеген тіл мен домендердің үлкен оқыту Біз бірнеше тіл екеуі мен деректер көзі менен тәжірибедік және бірнеше деректерді сүзгілеу техникаларын құрамыз. Бұл процестің невралдық компьютердің аударуын адамдардың жазылған сөздерінен қалай айырмашылығын, ұзындығында, қайталану көлемі және қайталанған сөздердің қолдануын таба аламыз.', 'it': "Consideriamo il problema dell'apprendimento dell'incorporazione di frasi parafrastiche e generiche nell'ambito di Wieting et al. (2016b). Usiamo la traduzione automatica neurale per generare parafrasi sentimentali tramite la traduzione posteriore di coppie di frasi bilingue. Valutiamo le coppie di parafrasi in base alla loro capacità di servire come dati di formazione per l'apprendimento delle incorporazioni parafrastiche. Troviamo che la qualità dei dati è più forte del lavoro precedente basato sul bitext e alla pari con le coppie di parafrasi inglesi scritte manualmente, con il vantaggio che il nostro approccio può scalare fino a generare grandi set di formazione per molte lingue e domini. Sperimentiamo diverse coppie linguistiche e fonti di dati e sviluppiamo una varietà di tecniche di filtraggio dei dati. Nel processo, esploriamo come l'output della traduzione automatica neurale differisce dalle frasi scritte dall'uomo, trovando chiare differenze nella lunghezza, nella quantità di ripetizione e nell'uso di parole rare.", 'lt': 'Mes svarstome bendro tikslo mokymosi, parafrastinių sakinių įtraukimo į Wieting et al. sistemą problem ą (2016b). Naudojame nervinį mašinų vertimą, kad gautume sakinių parafrazes dvikalbių sakinių poros atgaliniu vertimu. Mes vertiname parafrazės poras pagal jų gebėjimą naudoti kaip mokymo duomenis mokymosi parafrazinių sakinių įtraukimui. Mes manome, kad duomenų kokybė yra stipresnė nei ankstesnis darbas, grindžiamas bitext ir lygiavertėmis rankiniu būdu rašomomis anglų parafrazės poromis, ir kad mūsų požiūris gali didinti ir sukurti didelius mokymo rinkinius daugeliui kalbų ir sričių. Eksperimentuojame su keliomis kalbų poromis ir duomenų šaltiniais ir plėtojame įvairius duomenų filtravimo metodus. Šiuo procesu mes tiriame, kaip nervinių mašin ų vertimo rezultatai skiriasi nuo žmogaus rašytinių sakinių, rasti aiškius ilgio skirtumus, kartojimo kiekį ir retų žodžių naudojimą.', 'mk': 'We consider the problem of learning general-purpose, paraphrastic sentence embeddings in the setting of Wieting et al. (2016b).  Ние користиме невропски машински превод за генерирање на реченици парафрази преку назад превод на двојазични реченици парови. Ги проценуваме парафразите според нивната способност да служат како податоци за обука на парафразни реченици. Најдовме дека квалитетот на податоците е посилен од претходната работа базирана на bitext и на парите на рачно напишани англиски парафрази, со предност дека нашиот пристап може да се зголеми за да генерира големи набори на тренинг за многу јазици и домени. Експериментираме со неколку јазички парови и извори на податоци, и развиваме различни техники за филтрирање на податоци. Во текот на процесот, истражуваме како излезот на невровниот машински превод се разликува од речениците напишани од човекот, откривајќи јасни разлики во должината, количината на повторување и употребата на ретки зборови.', 'ms': 'We consider the problem of learning general-purpose, paraphrastic sentence embeddings in the setting of Wieting et al. (2016b).  Kami menggunakan terjemahan mesin saraf untuk menghasilkan parafrasa kalimat melalui terjemahan belakang pasangan kalimat dua bahasa. Kami menilai pasangan parafrasa dengan kemampuan mereka untuk berkhidmat sebagai data latihan untuk mempelajari kandungan kalimat parafrasa. Kami mendapati kualiti data lebih kuat daripada kerja sebelumnya berdasarkan bitext dan sama dengan pasangan parafrasa Inggeris ditulis secara manual, dengan keuntungan bahawa pendekatan kita boleh skala sehingga untuk menghasilkan set latihan besar untuk banyak bahasa dan domain. Kami eksperimen dengan beberapa pasangan bahasa dan sumber data, dan mengembangkan berbagai teknik penapisan data. Dalam proses ini, kami mengeksplorasi bagaimana output terjemahan mesin saraf berbeza dari kalimat tertulis manusia, mencari perbezaan jelas dalam panjang, jumlah pengulangan, dan penggunaan perkataan langka.', 'mn': 'Бид ерөнхий зорилго суралцах, парафрастикийн өгүүлбэрүүдийг Wieting et al-ийн хэмжээнд оруулах асуудал гэж бодож байна. Бид мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө ашиглаж хоёр хэл хэл хоёрын дахин хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд мэдрэлийн параграмыг бий болгодог. Бид парафразийн өгүүлбэрийг сурах боломжтой болгон сургалтын мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой болгон тооцоолж байна. Бид өгөгдлийн сайн чанар нь өмнөх ажилдаас илүү хүчтэй гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Бидний арга баримт англи хэл болон сүлжээний олон хэл болон сүлжээний маш их сургалтын сургалтыг бий болгодог. Бид хэдэн хэл хоёр болон өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэртэй туршилт хийж, олон төрлийн өгөгдлийн сүзүүлэлтийн техник үүсгэдэг. Энэ үйл явцдаа бид мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн үр дүнг хүн төрөлхтний бичсэн өгүүлбэрээс хэрхэн ялгаатай вэ гэдгийг судалж, урт, давтах хэмжээ, ховор үгнүүдийн хэрэглээ илүү тодорхой ялгааг олж мэднэ.', 'pl': 'Rozważamy problem nauki ogólnodostępnych, parafrastycznych osadzeń zdań w otoczeniu Wieting et al. (2016b). Używamy neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego do generowania parafraz sentencjalnych poprzez tłumaczenie wsteczne dwujęzycznych par zdań. Oceniamy pary parafraz pod kątem ich zdolności służenia jako dane treningowe do nauki osadzeń parafrastycznych. Odkrywamy, że jakość danych jest lepsza niż poprzednia praca oparta na bitekscie i równa z ręcznie pisanymi parafrazami angielskimi, z tą zaletą, że nasze podejście może się skalować, aby generować duże zestawy szkoleniowe dla wielu języków i domen. Eksperymentujemy z kilkoma parami językowymi i źródłami danych oraz opracowujemy różne techniki filtrowania danych. W trakcie tego badamy, w jaki sposób wynik tłumaczenia maszynowego neuronalnego różni się od zdań napisanych przez człowieka, znajdując wyraźne różnice w długości, ilości powtórzeń i użyciu rzadkich słów.', 'ml': 'ജെനറല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. വൈറ്റിങ് എറ്റ് അലിന്\u200dറെ ക്രമീ രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ പിന്നിലേക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളിലൂടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോ പാരാഫ്രാസ്റ്റിക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളായി സേവിക്കാനുള്ള കഴിവുകളാല്\u200d പാരാഫ് കൈയ്യില്\u200d എഴുതിയ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പാരാഫ്രേസ് ജോടുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയിലും ഡാറ്റാവിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശക്തമാണെന്നും നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോ നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഭാഷ ജോടികളെയും ഡേറ്റാ സ്രോതസ്സുകളെയും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200dമിങ്ങ In the process, we explore how neural machine translation output differs from human-written sentences, finding clear differences in length, the amount of repetition, and the use of rare words.', 'ro': 'Considerăm problema învățării încorporării frazelor parafrastice de scop general în cadrul Wieting et al. (2016b). Folosim traducerea automată neurală pentru a genera parafraze sentimentale prin traducerea înapoi a perechilor de propoziții bilingve. Evaluăm perechile de parafraze prin capacitatea lor de a servi drept date de instruire pentru învățarea încorporării frazelor parafrastice. Considerăm că calitatea datelor este mai puternică decât munca anterioară bazată pe bitext și egală cu perechile de parafrază scrise manual în limba engleză, avantajul că abordarea noastră se poate extinde pentru a genera seturi mari de instruire pentru multe limbi și domenii. Experimentăm cu mai multe perechi de limbi și surse de date și dezvoltăm o varietate de tehnici de filtrare a datelor. În acest proces, explorăm modul în care rezultatul traducerii automate neurale diferă de propozițiile scrise de om, găsind diferențe clare în lungime, cantitate de repetiție și utilizarea de cuvinte rare.', 'mt': 'Aħna nqisu l-problema tat-tagħlim ta’ sentenzi b’għan ġenerali, parafrastiċi inkorporati fl-ambjent ta’ Wieting et al. (2016b). Aħna nużaw traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali biex niġġeneraw parafrażijiet sentenzjali permezz ta’ traduzzjoni lura ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi bilingwi. Aħna jevalwaw il-pari tal-parafrażi bil-kapaċità tagħhom li jservu bħala dejta ta’ taħriġ għat-tagħlim tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi parafrastiċi. Aħna nsibu li l-kwalità tad-dejta hija aktar b’saħħitha minn ħidma preċedenti bbażata fuq bitext u fuq pari ta’ parafrażi Ingliżi miktuba manwalment, bil-vantaġġ li l-approċċ tagħna jista’ jiżdied biex jiġġenera settijiet kbar ta’ taħriġ għal ħafna lingwi u dominji. Aħna ninsperimentaw b’diversi pari lingwistiċi u sorsi ta’ dejta, u niżviluppaw varjetà ta’ tekniki ta’ filtrazzjoni tad-dejta. Fil-proċess, nesploraw kif ir-riżultati tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali jvarjaw minn sentenzi miktuba mill-bniedem, isibu differenzi ċari fit-tul, l-ammont ta’ ripetizzjoni, u l-użu ta’ kliem rari.', 'no': 'Vi ser på problem et med å lære generelle mål, parafrastiske setningar i innstillinga av Wieting et al. (2016b). Vi brukar neuralmaskinsomsetjing for å laga sentensielle parafrasar gjennom tilbakeomsetjinga av bilispråkspar. Vi evaluerer parafrasiske par med dei mulighetene til å tjenera som treningsdata for å læra parafrasiske setningar. Vi finn at datakvaliteten er sterkere enn førre arbeid basert på bitetekst og på par med manuelt skriven engelsk parafrasar, med fordel at tilnærminga vårt kan skalera opp for å laga stor opplæringssett for mange språk og domene. Vi eksperimenterer med fleire språkopar og datakjelder, og utviklar fleire datafilterteknikk. I prosessen undersøker vi korleis utdata av neuralmaskinen er forskjellig frå menneskelig skriven setningar, finn klare forskjeller i lengde, kor mange gjentakingar og bruken av sjeldre ord.', 'si': 'අපි හිතන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය-අදහසක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් වාක්ෂාවක් සංවිධානයේ විටින අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව භාවිතා කරනවා දෙවිභාෂික වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. අපි පරාෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය ද අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා දත්ත ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය බිට්ස්ට් වලින් වඩා වඩා ශක්තිමත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, බිට්ස් වලින් ලියලා ඉ අපි භාෂාව සහ දත්ත ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය අනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, සහ දත්ත පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය වගේ විව අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, මිනිස්සු ලියපු වචන වලින් කොහොමද ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කියලා, පැහැදිලි වෙනස් හොයාගන්න, ප', 'sv': 'Vi betraktar problemet med att lära sig generella, parafrastiska meningar inbäddade i inställningen av Wieting et al. (2016b). Vi använder neural maskinöversättning för att generera sentimentala parafraser via backöversättning av tvåspråkiga meningspar. Vi utvärderar parafrasparen utifrån deras förmåga att fungera som träningsdata för att lära sig parafrasiska meningar inbäddade. Vi finner att datakvaliteten är starkare än tidigare arbete baserat på bittext och i nivå med manuellt skrivna engelska parafraspar, med fördelen att vårt tillvägagångssätt kan skalas upp för att generera stora utbildningsuppsättningar för många språk och domäner. Vi experimenterar med flera språkpar och datakällor och utvecklar en mängd olika datafiltreringstekniker. I processen undersöker vi hur neurala maskinöversättningar skiljer sig från människoskrivna meningar, hitta tydliga skillnader i längd, mängd repetition och användning av sällsynta ord.', 'sr': 'Smatramo problem učenja generalne svrhe, parafrastične rečenice u postavljanju Wieting et al. (2016b). Koristimo prevod neuralne mašine da bi stvorili sentencijalne parafraze preko prevoda dvojezičkih rečenica. Procjenjujemo parove parafraze njihovim sposobnostima da služe kao podaci za obuku parafrastičkih rečenica. Mi smatramo da je kvalitet podataka jača od ranijeg rada na osnovu ugriznog teksta i na par sa ručno napisanim parovima engleskog parafraza, sa prednostima koje naš pristup može povećati kako bi stvorio velike obuke za mnoge jezike i domene. Eksperimentiramo sa nekoliko jezičkih parova i izvora podataka i razvijamo razne tehnike filtriranja podataka. U tom procesu istražujemo kako se nalazi izlaz neuralne mašine razlikuje od ljudskih pisanih rečenica, pronalaženja jasnih razlika u dužini, količine ponovnosti i upotrebe rijetkih rečenica.', 'so': "Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa dhibaatada barashada waxyaabaha caadiga ah ee ku qoran qorniinka Wieting et al. (2016b). Waxaynu isticmaalnaa tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada si aan u sameyno fasaxa maandooriyaha ah ee lagu turjumo labada luqadood. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa labada lammaane si ay awooddoodu ugu adeegaan waxbarashada barashada farshaxanka ah. Waxaynu ognahay in takhasuska macluumaadku ay ka xoog badan tahay shaqada hore oo ku saleysan qaniinka iyo labo qof af Ingiriis ah oo qof gacanta lagu qoray, iyadoo faa'iido ah in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu kordhi karo si uu u sameeyo koorasyo waxbarasho badan oo af badan iyo deegaano badan. Waxaan imtixaamaynaa laba noocyo oo luuqadood ah iyo noocyo macluumaad ah, waxaana horumarinaynaa qalabka lagu barbaarinayo macluumaadyo kala duduwan. Markaas waxaynu baaraynaa sida tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada ah ay u kala duwan yihiin hadallada qoran ee biniaadamka, waxaan helaynaa kala duwan dhererka cad, tirada dib u celinta iyo isticmaalka hadallada qaaliga ah.", 'ta': 'நாங்கள் விட்டிங் எட் அல் அமைப்பில் கற்றுக் கொள்ள பொது இலக்கு கற்றல் பிரச்சனையை கருதுகிறோம். நாம் புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பை பயன்படுத்தி இரு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ஜோடி மூலம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை உருவாக்க. வாக்கியத்தை கற்றுக்கொள்ள பயிற்சி தகவலாக சேவைப்பதற்கு அளபுரு ஜோடியை நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். கைம்முறையாக எழுதப்பட்ட ஆங்கிலத்தின் சொற்றொடர் ஜோடி கொண்டு முன் வேலையை விட தரவு தரவு தரவு தரம் வலிமை என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் என்று நாம் கண் நாம் பல மொழி ஜோடி மற்றும் தரவு மூலங்களைக் கொண்டு சோதனைப்படுத்தி பல தரவு வடிகட்டி தொழில்நுட்பம் உருவாக்குக In the process, we explore how neural machine translation output differs from human-written sentences, finding clear differences in length, the amount of repetition, and the use of rare words.', 'ur': 'ہم نے ویٹینگ اور ال کی سٹینٹ میں مشکل کی تعلیم کی ہے، پارافرٹیسٹ ویٹینگ اور ال کی سٹینٹ میں۔ ہم نے نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ دو زبان جماعت جوڑوں کی پیچھے ترجمہ کے ذریعہ سنتی پارافریز پیدا کریں۔ ہم پارافریز جوڑوں کو ان کی قابلیت کے ذریعہ مطالبہ کرتے ہیں کہ پارافریزٹی جماعت ابڈینگ کی تعلیم کے لئے دکھانے کے لئے استعمال کریں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ڈاٹ کیلوٹی آگے سے زیادہ طاقتور ہے بیٹکسٹ اور پار پر جو ہاتھ سے لکھی ہوئی انگلیسی پارافریز جوڑوں کے ساتھ ہے، اس کے فائدہ کے ساتھ کہ ہماری طریقہ بہت سی زبانوں اور ڈومین کے لئے بہت بڑی آموزش سٹ پیدا کرے۔ ہم بہت سی زبان جوڑے اور ڈیٹا سروروں کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں، اور بہت سی ڈیٹا فیلٹرینگ ٹیکنیک ایجاد کرتے ہیں۔ اس طریقے میں ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ انسان کی لکھی ہوئی جماعت سے کیسے مختلف ہو سکتے ہیں، طول میں صریح مختلف ہو سکتے ہیں، تکرار کی تعداد، اور کم کلمات کا استعمال.', 'uz': "Biz Wieting et al tugmasini o'rganish umumiy qanday, paraphrastik so'zlarini o'rganish muammolarini o'ylaymiz. (2016b). Biz ikkita so'zning ikkita so'zning orqaga tarjima qilish orqali sentensial paraphraslarni yaratish uchun neyural tarjima qilamiz. Biz paraphrastik so'zlarini o'rganish uchun paraphrastik so'zlarini o'rganish uchun o'rganish amalga oshirish mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, ma'lumotning qiymati bir qismdan oldin ishni o'rganishdan ham qulay qoʻlbola yozilgan ingliz tili paraphrasining qo'llanganligidan ko'p tillar va domani uchun katta taʼminlovchi sonlarni yaratishga ega bo'ladi. Biz bir necha tillar va maʼlumot manbaslari bilan bir necha xil ko'plab chiqarish va bir necha maʼlumot filterlash usullarini yaratishmiz. Dasturda biz inson yozuvdagi so'zlardan qanday neyron tarjima natijasi ajratilgan va uzunlik, takrorlash sonini va cheksiz so'zlarni foydalanishini aniqlamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem xét vấn đề học những mục đích chung, liệt kê câu chữ được gán trong môi trường Wieting et al. (Buổi diễn tập tạ). Chúng tôi sử dụng dịch từ máy thần kinh để tạo ra hình ảnh dài hạn thông qua việc dịch lại các cặp câu hai chữ. Chúng tôi đánh giá các đôi diễn giải bằng khả năng đào tạo thông tin để học những câu ẩn dụ. Chúng tôi phát hiện rằng chất lượng dữ liệu mạnh hơn các công việc trước dựa trên thuật ngữ và bằng với các hình ảnh liệt Anh văn bản bằng tay, với lợi thế mà phương pháp của chúng tôi có thể tăng lên để tạo ra các tập hợp lớn cho nhiều ngôn ngữ và miền. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm với nhiều cặp ngôn ngữ và nguồn dữ liệu, và phát triển một loạt các kỹ thuật lọc dữ liệu. Trong quá trình đó, chúng ta khám phá cách kết xuất dịch cỗ máy thần kinh phân biệt từ những câu viết trên người, tìm ra những khác biệt rõ rệt giữa độ dài, số lượng lặp lại, và sử dụng những từ hiếm.', 'bg': 'Разглеждаме проблема с изучаването на общоприети парафрастични изречения в обстановката на Виетинг и др. (2016б). Използваме невронен машинен превод, за да генерираме сентенциални парафрази чрез обратен превод на двойки изречения. Оценяваме парафразните двойки по способността им да служат като тренировъчни данни за изучаване на парафрастични изречения. Намираме, че качеството на данните е по-силно от предишната работа, базирана на биттекст и на парафрази с ръчно написани английски двойки, с предимството, че нашият подход може да се мащабира, за да генерира големи набори от обучения за много езици и домейни. Експериментираме с няколко езикови двойки и източници на данни и разработваме различни техники за филтриране на данни. В процеса изследваме как изходът на невронния машинен превод се различава от изреченията, написани от човека, откривайки ясни разлики в дължината, количеството повторение и използването на редки думи.', 'nl': 'We beschouwen het probleem van het leren van algemene, parafrastische zinsinbeddingen in de setting van Wieting et al. (2016b). We gebruiken neurale machinevertaling om sententiële parafrases te genereren via back-translation van tweetalige zinsparen. We evalueren de parafraseparen op hun vermogen om te dienen als trainingsgegevens voor het leren van parafrastische zinsinbeddingen. We merken dat de datakwaliteit sterker is dan eerder werk op basis van bitext en op gelijke voet met handmatig geschreven Engelse parafraseparen, met het voordeel dat onze aanpak kan opschalen om grote trainingssets te genereren voor vele talen en domeinen. We experimenteren met verschillende taalparen en gegevensbronnen en ontwikkelen een verscheidenheid aan gegevensfiltertechnieken. Daarbij onderzoeken we hoe neuronale machine translation output verschilt van door mensen geschreven zinnen, waarbij we duidelijke verschillen vinden in lengte, de hoeveelheid herhaling en het gebruik van zeldzame woorden.', 'hr': 'Smatramo problem učenja generalne svrhe, parafrastične rečenice u postavljanju Wieting et al. (2016b). Koristimo prevod neuralnih strojeva kako bi stvorili sentencijalne parafraze putem povratnog prevoda dvojezičkih rečenica. Procjenjujemo parove parafraze njihovim sposobnostima da služe kao podaci obuke za učenje parafrastičkih rečenica. Mi smatramo da je kvalitet podataka jača od prije posla temeljena na ugrizu i na par s ručno pisanim engleskim parafrazom parovima, s prednostima koje naš pristup može povećati kako bi stvorio velike obuke za mnoge jezike i domene. Eksperimentiramo s nekoliko jezičkih parova i izvora podataka i razvijamo razne tehnike filtriranja podataka. U tom procesu istražujemo kako se nalazi izlaz neuroloških uređaja razlikuje od ljudskih pisanih rečenica, pronalaženje jasnih razlika u dužini, količine ponovnosti i uporabe rijetkih riječi.', 'da': 'Vi overvejer problemet med at lære generelle formål, parafrastiske sætninger indlejringer i omgivelserne af Wieting et al. (2016b). Vi bruger neural maskinoversættelse til at generere sentimental parafraser via back-oversættelse af tosprogede sætningspar. Vi evaluerer parafrasparene ud fra deres evne til at tjene som træningsdata til at lære parafrasiske sætningsindlejringer. Vi finder, at datakvaliteten er stærkere end tidligere arbejde baseret på bitekst og på niveau med manuelt skrevne engelske parafrasepar, med den fordel, at vores tilgang kan skaleres op til at generere store træningssæt til mange sprog og domæner. Vi eksperimenterer med flere sprogpar og datakilder og udvikler en række forskellige datafiltreringsteknikker. I processen undersøger vi, hvordan neural maskinoversættelse output adskiller sig fra menneskeskrevne sætninger, finder klare forskelle i længde, mængden af gentagelse og brugen af sjældne ord.', 'id': 'Kami mempertimbangkan masalah belajar tujuan umum, kalimat parafrastik embedding dalam setting Wieting et al. (2016b). Kami menggunakan terjemahan mesin saraf untuk menghasilkan parafrasa kalimat melalui terjemahan belakang pasangan kalimat dua bahasa. Kami mengevaluasi pasangan parafrasa dengan kemampuan mereka untuk melatih data untuk mempelajari penerbangan kalimat parafrasa. Kami menemukan bahwa kualitas data lebih kuat dari pekerjaan sebelumnya berdasarkan bitext dan sama dengan pasangan parafrasa Inggris yang ditulis secara manual, dengan keuntungan bahwa pendekatan kita dapat meningkat untuk menghasilkan set latihan besar untuk banyak bahasa dan domain. Kami eksperimen dengan beberapa pasangan bahasa dan sumber data, dan mengembangkan berbagai teknik penapisan data. Dalam prosesnya, kami menjelajahi bagaimana hasil terjemahan mesin saraf berbeda dari kalimat tertulis manusia, menemukan perbedaan jelas dalam panjang, jumlah pengulangan, dan penggunaan kata-kata langka.', 'de': 'Wir betrachten das Problem des Erlernens allgemeiner, paraphrastischer Satzbedingungen im Setting von Wieting et al. (2016b). Wir verwenden neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung, um sententiale Paraphrasen durch Rückübersetzung zweisprachiger Satzpaare zu generieren. Wir bewerten die Paraphrasenpaare anhand ihrer Fähigkeit, als Trainingsdaten für das Erlernen paraphrastischer Satzbedingungen zu dienen. Wir stellen fest, dass die Datenqualität stärker ist als bisherige Arbeit basierend auf Bitext und auf Augenhöhe mit manuell geschriebenen englischen Paraphrasenpaaren, mit dem Vorteil, dass unser Ansatz skaliert werden kann, um große Trainingssets für viele Sprachen und Domänen zu generieren. Wir experimentieren mit mehreren Sprachpaaren und Datenquellen und entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Datenfiltertechniken. Dabei untersuchen wir, wie sich neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungsausgaben von menschlich geschriebenen Sätzen unterscheiden und finden deutliche Unterschiede in der Länge, dem Umfang der Wiederholung und der Verwendung seltener Wörter.', 'ko': '우리는 위닝 등(2016b)의 배경에서 통용되는 해석문이 박힌 문제를 배울 것을 고려한다.우리는 신경 기계로 번역을 해서 이중 언어 문장에 대한 반역을 통해 문장의 해석을 생성한다.우리는 복술문을 학습 복술문으로 훈련 데이터를 삽입하는 능력을 통해 복술문 쌍을 평가한다.우리는bitext를 기반으로 한 이전에 비해 데이터의 질이 높고 수동으로 작성된 영어 해석과 비슷하다는 것을 발견했다. 그 장점은 우리의 방법이 확장되고 많은 언어와 분야에 대형 훈련집을 생성할 수 있다는 것이다.우리는 몇 가지 언어와 데이터 원본에 대해 실험을 하고 각종 데이터 필터 기술을 개발했다.이 과정에서 우리는 신경기계 번역 출력과 인류의 서면 문장의 차이점을 탐색하고 길이, 중복 횟수와 보기 드문 단어의 사용에 있어 현저한 차이를 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل یادگیری از هدف عمومی، جمله\u200cهای پارافراستیک در تنظیم ویتینگ و ال (۲۰۶b) را می\u200cبینیم. ما از ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا پارافریزهای احساسی را با توسط ترجمه پشت جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای دو زبان تولید کنیم. ما جفت\u200cها را با توانایی آنها ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که به عنوان داده\u200cهای آموزش برای یادگیری از جمله\u200cهای پارافراست استفاده کنند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که کیفیت داده\u200cها قوی تر از کار قبلی بر اساس متن گاز و بر اساس جفت\u200cهای مفصل انگلیسی به دست نوشته\u200cاند، با سودی که دسترسی ما می\u200cتواند برای تولید مجموعه\u200cهای بزرگ آموزش برای زبان\u200cها و دامین\u200cها بزرگتر باشد. ما با چند جفت زبان و منبع اطلاعات آزمایش می کنیم و تکنیک فیلتر داده های مختلف را توسعه می کنیم. در این فرایند، ما تحقیق می کنیم که چگونه نتیجه ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی از جمله\u200cهای نوشته شده انسان تفاوت می\u200cکند، پیدا کردن تفاوت\u200cهای روشن در طول، تعداد تکرار و استفاده از کلمات نادر است.', 'tr': 'Biz umumy maksadyň öwrenmesiniň, parafratik sözleriň girişigini Wieting et al düzeninde düşünýäris. (2016b). Biz näyral maşynyň terjimesini iki dil çepleriniň arka terjime görkezmek üçin duýgular paraphrazleri döretýäris Biz parafraz çiftlerini parafraz sözlerini öwrenmek üçin bejermek ukyplarynda deňleýäris Maglumatyň keyfiýeti öňki işiňde biten we el ýazylan iňlisçe parafraz çiftleriň üstünde has güýçlidir diýip pikir edýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz köp diller we domaýlar üçin uly okuw düzümlerni döretmäge mümkin edip bilýän üçin has gowudyr. Biz birnäçe dil çift we maglumat çeşmeleri bilen synanyşýarys we birnäçe maglumat filtreji teknikelerini geliştirdik. Bu proses içinde, biz näyral maşynyň çykyşynyň insan ýazylan sözleriden nähili üýtgeýändigini gözləýäris, uzakda dürli üýtgeýşenleri, tekrarlaryň haýratynda we nadir sözlerin ullanyşyny gözləýäris.', 'sw': 'Tunafikiri tatizo la kujifunza kwa lengo la jumla, hukumu ya msingi inaingia katika kutengeneza Wieting et al. (2016). Tunatumia tafsiri ya mashine ya kiutaratibu ili kutengeneza tafsiri za sentensi kwa kutumia tafsiri ya sentensi mbili za lugha. Tunatathmini ndoa hizo kwa uwezo wao wa kutumikia kama taarifa za mafunzo kwa kujifunza hukumu ya msingi. Tunapata kwamba kiwango cha takwimu kina nguvu zaidi ya kazi kabla ya kufanya kazi kwa kutumia utaratibu na kwa vifaa vinavyoandikwa na viwili vya Kiingereza kwa manufaa, kwa faida kwamba hatua yetu inaweza kupanda ili kutengeneza seti kubwa za mafunzo kwa lugha na maeneo mengi. Tunazijaribu kwa namna kadhaa za lugha na vyanzo vya taarifa, na kutengeneza mbinu mbalimbali za kuchuja taarifa. Katika mchakato huo, tunagundua jinsi utafsiri wa mashine ya ubongo unavyotofauti na hukumu za binadamu zilizoandikwa, kutafuta tofauti zilizo wazi kwa muda mrefu, kiasi cha mara kwa mara, na matumizi ya maneno nadra.', 'af': "Ons beskou die probleem van die leer van algemene-doel, paraphrastiese setinge in die instelling van Wieting et al. (2016b). Ons gebruik neurale masjien vertaling om sentensiele parafrase te genereer deur terug- vertaling van twee tale sin paar. Ons evalueer die parafrase paar deur hul moontlikheid om as onderwerp data te dien vir die leer van parafrase setinge. Ons vind dat die data kwaliteit sterker is as vooraf werk gebaseer op byteks en op paar met hand-skryf Engels parafrase paar, met die voordeel dat ons toegang kan skaal op om groot onderwerp stel vir baie tale en domeine te genereer. Ons eksperimenteer met verskeie taal paar en data bronne, en ontwikkel 'n verskeie data filtering tekniks. In die proses, ondersoek ons hoe neurale masjien vertaling uitvoer verskillig is van mens-skryfe setnings, om duidelike verskillinge in lengte te te vind, die hoeveelheid van herhaal en die gebruik van selfde woorde.", 'sq': 'Ne e konsiderojmë problem in e mësimit të fjalëve me qëllim të përgjithshëm, parafrastike në vendosjen e Wieting et al. (2016b). Ne përdorim përkthimin nervor të makinave për të gjeneruar parafraza fjalësh nëpërmjet përkthimit prapa të çifteve të fjalëve dygjuhëse. We evaluate the paraphrase pairs by their ability to serve as training data for learning paraphrastic sentence embeddings.  Ne zbulojmë se cilësia e të dhënave është më e fortë se puna e mëparshme bazuar në bitext dhe në krahasim me çiftet e parafrazave angleze të shkruara manualisht, me avantazhin që qasja jonë mund të rritet për të gjeneruar grupe të mëdha trajnimi për shumë gjuhë dhe fusha. Ne eksperimentojmë me disa çifte gjuhësh dhe burime të të dhënave, dhe zhvillojmë një varietet teknikash filtrimi të të dhënave. Në proces, ne eksplorojmë se si rezultati i përkthimit të makinave nervore ndryshon nga fjalët e shkruara nga njerëzit, duke gjetur dallime të qarta në gjatësi, sasinë e përsëritjes dhe përdorimin e fjalëve të rralla.', 'am': 'የጠቅላላ አቃውሞ ማወቅ ጉዳይ፣ የፋራፊስቲ ፍርድ በWieting et al በመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ክፍል የተመዘጋጀውን እና የናቡራዊ መሳሪያ ትርጉም እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የፓርላፊክራሲ ደብዳቤ ለማስተማርና ማግኘት የሚችሉትን ዳታዎችን ለማገልገል እናስተውለታለን፡፡ የዳታ ብልሃት በብዙ ቋንቋዎችና የደገቦች ትልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ እና በተጻፈ እንግሊዝኛ የፊደል ጉዳይ እና በፓርላማ ላይ ከቀድሞ ሥራ ይልቅ የበረታች እንደሆነ እናገኘዋለን፡፡ በቋንቋዎች ሁለት ሁለት እና የዳታ ምንጮች እና ልዩ ልዩ የዳታ አጣራጭ ቴክኖቶችን እናፈትናለን፡፡ In the process, we explore how neural machine translation output differs from human-written sentences, finding clear differences in length, the amount of repetition, and the use of rare words.', 'hy': 'We consider the problem of learning general-purpose, paraphrastic sentence embeddings in the setting of Wieting et al. (2016b).  Մենք օգտագործում ենք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն, որպեսզի ստեղծենք նախադասություններ երկլեզու նախադասությունների հետ թարգմանման միջոցով: Մենք գնահատում ենք պարաֆրազիայի զույգերը նրանց կարողությամբ օգտագործել որպես պարաֆրազիկական նախադասությունների ներդրման ուսումնասիրելու տվյալներ: We find that the data quality is stronger than prior work based on bitext and on par with manually-written English paraphrase pairs, with the advantage that our approach can scale up to generate large training sets for many languages and domains.  Մենք փորձում ենք բազմաթիվ լեզվի զույգերի և տվյալների աղբյուրների հետ և զարգանում ենք տվյալների ֆիլտրման տարբեր մեթոդներ: Այս ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման արտադրությունը տարբերվում մարդկային գրված նախադասություններից, պարզ տարբերություններ հայտնաբերելով երկարության, կրկնվող քանակի և հազվադեպ բառերի օգտագործման համար:', 'az': 'Biz genel-məqsədilə öyrənmək, parafrastik cümlələrlə Wieting et al. İki dil cümlənin arka çeviri ilə cümlələr yaratmaq üçün nöral maşına çevirimi istifadə edirik. Parafraz çiftlərini parafrastik cümlələrini öyrənmək üçün təhsil edilmə bacarıqları ilə təhsil edirik. Biz məlumatların keyfiyyəti əvvəlki işlərdən daha qüvvətlidir. Öz əlində yazılmış İngilizə parafraz çiftləri ilə birlikdə, bizim tərəfimiz çox dillər və domenilər üçün böyük təhsil qurmaqlarını yaratmaq üçün böyük təhsil qurmaqlarını artırmaq üçün faydalanır. Biz bir çox dil çift və veri kaynaqları ilə imtahana çəkirik və bir çox veri filtrləmə tekniklərini təhsil edirik. Bu prosesdə, insan yazılmış cümlələrdən, uzunluğunda aydın fərqli olanları, tekrarlığın sayısını və nadir sözlərin istifadəsini keşfetmişik.', 'bn': 'আমরা জেনারেল উদ্দেশ্য শিখার সমস্যা বিবেচনা করি উইটিং এন্ট আলের মাধ্যমে প্যারাফ্রেক্টিক কার্যান্ডের ব্যাপারে বিবে আমরা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ ব্যবহার করি দুই ভাষার বাক্যের জোড়ার মাধ্যমে সেন্টেন্টিল প্যারাফারেজ তৈরি করতে। প্যারাফ্রেস্টিক বাক্য শিক্ষার জন্য প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য হিসেবে সাহায্য করার ক্ষমতা দ্বারা প্যারাফ্রেক্স জো আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে এই তথ্যের মান বেশী শক্তিশালী এবং হাতে লিখিত ইংরেজি প্যারাফ্রেস জোড়ার ভিত্তিতে কাজের ভিত্তিতে পূর্বের কাজের চেয়ে বেশ আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষা জোড়া এবং তথ্য উৎস দিয়ে পরীক্ষা করি এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য ফিল্টারিং কৌশল তৈরি করি। এই প্রক্রিয়ায় আমরা খুঁজে বের করি কিভাবে নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ আউটপুট মানুষ-লিখিত বাক্য থেকে পার্থক্য রয়েছে, দীর্ঘদিনের পরিস্কার পা', 'ca': "Considerem el problema d'aprendre incorporacions de frases de propòsit general i parafràstica en el contexte de Wieting et al. (2016b). Utilitzem la traducció neural per generar parafrases de frases a través de la traducció posterior de parells de frases bilingues. Evaluam els parells de parafrases per la seva habilitat de servir com a dades d'entrenament per aprendre incorporacions de frases parafrasiques. Trobem que la qualitat de les dades és més forta que la feina anterior basada en bitext i en comparació amb parelles de parafrases angleses escrites manualment, amb l'avantatge que el nostre enfocament pot ampliar per generar grans conjunts de formació per a moltes llengües i dominis. Experimentem amb diversos parells de llengües i fonts de dades, i desenvolupem una varietat de tècniques de filtració de dades. En el procés, explorem com la producció de traducció neural de màquines diferèn de les frases escrites per humans, trobant diferències clares en la llargada, la quantitat de repetició i l'ús de paraules rares.", 'cs': 'Zabýváme se problematikou učení se všeobecnými parafrastickými větami v prostředí Wieting et al. (2016b). Používáme neuronový strojový překlad k generování sententiálních parafrází prostřednictvím zpětného překladu dvojjazyčných větových párů. Parafrázové páry hodnotíme podle jejich schopnosti sloužit jako tréninková data pro učení se vložení parafrastických vět. Zjišťujeme, že kvalita dat je silnější než předchozí práce založená na bitextu a stejně jako manuálně psané anglické parafrázové páry, s výhodou, že náš přístup může škálovat a generovat velké školicí sady pro mnoho jazyků a domén. Experimentujeme s několika jazykovými páry a datovými zdroji a vyvíjíme různé techniky filtrování dat. Přitom zkoumáme, jak se výstup neuronového strojového překladu liší od vět psaných člověkem, zjišťujeme jasné rozdíly v délce, množství opakování a použití vzácných slov.', 'et': 'Me käsitleme üldeesmärgiliste parafrastiliste lausete manustamise probleemi Wieting jt (2016b) raames. Me kasutame neuromasintõlke, et genereerida sentimentaalseid parafraase kahekeelsete lausepaaride tagasitõlkimise kaudu. Me hindame parafraasipaare nende võime kasutada parafrastiliste lausete manustamise õppimiseks koolitusandmetena. Leiame, et andmete kvaliteet on tugevam kui varasemad bitekstil põhinevad tööd ja on võrdne käsitsi kirjutatud inglise parafraasipaaridega, eelisega, et meie lähenemine võib ulatuda, et luua suured koolituskomplektid paljudele keeltele ja domeenidele. Eksperimenteerime mitmete keelepaaride ja andmeallikatega ning töötame välja erinevaid andmete filtreerimise meetodeid. Protsessi käigus uurime, kuidas neuromasintõlke väljund erineb inimkirjutatud lausetest, leides selgeid erinevusi pikkuses, korduse hulgas ja haruldaste sõnade kasutamises.', 'fi': 'Käsittelemme yleiskäyttöisten, parafrastisten lauseiden upottamisen oppimisongelmaa Wieting et al. (2016b) ympäristössä. Käytämme neurokonekäännöstä luodaksemme sentiaalisia parafraaseja kaksikielisten lauseparien takaisinkäännöksen kautta. Arvioimme parafraasipareja niiden kyvyn perusteella toimia harjoitusaineistona parafraasien upottamisen oppimiseen. Havaitsemme, että datan laatu on vahvempi kuin aikaisempi bitekstiin perustuva työ ja samalla tavalla kuin käsin kirjoitetut englanninkieliset parafraasiparit, ja etuna on, että lähestymistapamme voi skaalata ja tuottaa suuria koulutuskokonaisuuksia monille kielille ja toimialoille. Kokeilemme useita kielipareja ja tietolähteitä sekä kehitämme erilaisia tiedonsuodatustekniikoita. Prosessissa selvitämme, miten neurokonekäännös eroaa ihmisen kirjoittamasta lauseesta, löytäen selkeitä eroja pituudessa, toiston määrässä ja harvinaisten sanojen käytössä.', 'bs': 'Smatramo problem učenja generalne svrhe, parafrastične rečenice u postavljanju Wieting et al. (2016b). Koristimo prevod neuralne mašine kako bi stvorili sentencijalne parafraze preko prevoda dvojezičkih rečenica. Procjenjujemo parove parafraze njihovim sposobnostima da služe kao podaci za obuku parafrastičkih rečenica. Mi smatramo da je kvalitet podataka jača od prethodnog rada bazirana na ugrizu i na par s ručno napisanim parovima engleskog parafraza, sa prednostima koje naš pristup može povećati kako bi stvorio velike obuke za mnoge jezike i domene. Eksperimentiramo sa nekoliko jezičkih parova i izvora podataka i razvijamo razne tehnike filtriranja podataka. U tom procesu istražujemo kako se proizvod prevoda neuroloških strojeva razlikuje od ljudskih napisanih rečenica, pronalaženje jasnih razlika u dužini, količine ponovnosti i uporabe rijetkih riječi.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé isih perbudhakan kanggo nggambar usul-bukane, akeh paraFrastik kuwi tau nguasai Ning et al (2011). Laptop" and "Desktop Anyone Awak dhéwé ngêngé kuwi, dadi ngêngé luwih luwih ngéwé kuwi bagian sing katêpakan karo ngêngé kesempatan lan tambah kuwi wis manut karo paraflêr sing bisa basa Inggris, karo bener dhéwé kuwi dianggap dhéwé iso nggawe gerakan nggawe gerakan akeh dilané ngga Awak dhéwé éntuk karo alat-alat sing sampeyan karo pernik-alat saking saking saking saking saking saking saking saking saking saking saking saking saking dagat. Nang pengguna-pengguna, kéné isikno piye jeraké mbulukipun itoleh karo mulalah sing paling maneh karo cegat sing paling maneh, nggarap nggarap kalaayuni, dadi kapan pangan lan gambar uwong.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙayyade matsalar da za'a iya fahimtar maganar jumla, da kalma mai fassara a cikin muhallin Wieting et al. (2016b). @ info Tuna ƙaddara parameter biyu da abincinsu da za su yi amfani da data dõmin a shiga maganar parameteriki. Tun gane cewa tsarin data sun fi ƙarfi daga aiki a gaba ga bitan-bitan da par da mazaɓa biyu na rubutu da hannayen Ingiriya, da kyautar da hanyonmu ya iya ƙara zuwa ka sami tsarin muhimmada mai girma wa masu haɗi ga harshen da wurãren. Za jarraba su da nau'i biyu na lugha da sourcen data, kuma tuna zane-zane-filtering masu yawa. Daga tafiyar da shi, Muke jarraba jinsi masu fassarar tarjibu na ƙarami na ƙarami, masu gauraya daga maganar mutane da aka rubũta, kuma munã sami rarrabai tsawo, da tsakanin dubi'in da ake amfani da masu sauri.", 'he': 'אנחנו שוקלים את הבעיה של לימוד משפטים למטרה כללית, משפטים פרפראסטיים בתוכנית של ויטינג וס. (2016b). אנחנו משתמשים בתרגום מכונת עצבית כדי ליצור פראפרסמות משפטיות באמצעות התרגום האחורי של זוגות משפטים שתיים לשונות. אנו מעריכים את זוגות המילים על ידי היכולת שלהם לשרת כנתונים אימונים ללמוד תוספות משפטים המילים. We find that the data quality is stronger than prior work based on bitext and on par with manually-written English paraphrase pairs, with the advantage that our approach can scale up to generate large training sets for many languages and domains.  אנו מנסים עם כמה זוגות שפות ומקורות נתונים, ופתחים מגוון של טכניקות מסננת נתונים. בתהליך, אנו חוקרים איך תוצאות התרגום של מכונות עצביות שונות משפטים כתובים על ידי אדם, למצוא הבדלים ברורים באורך, כמות החזרה, ושימוש במילים נדירות.', 'sk': 'Problem učenja splošnega namena, parafrastičnih stavkov obravnavamo v okolju Wieting et al. (2016b). Z nevronskim strojnim prevajanjem ustvarjamo sententialne parafraze prek nazaj prevoda dvojezičnih stavkov. Pare parafraz ocenjujemo po njihovi sposobnosti, da služijo kot podatki o usposabljanju za učenje parafrastičnih stavkov. Ugotavljamo, da je kakovost podatkov močnejša od predhodnega dela, ki temelji na bitextu in je enaka ročno napisanim angleškim parom parafraz, s prednostjo, da se naš pristop lahko poveča in ustvari velike nabore usposabljanj za številne jezike in domene. Eksperimentiramo z več jezikovnimi pari in viri podatkov ter razvijamo različne tehnike filtriranja podatkov. V procesu raziskujemo, kako se izhod nevronskega strojnega prevajanja razlikuje od človeških stavkov, pri čemer najdemo jasne razlike v dolžini, količini ponavljanja in uporabi redkih besed.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚིག་ཁག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིའུ་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ། ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ལྕགས་རིགས་གྱི་ནང་འདྲེན་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གནང་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་ཧ་གོ་མ་ལས་བརྟེན་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག In the process, we explore how neural machine translation output differs from human-written sentences, finding clear differences in length, the amount of repetition, and the use of rare words.'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Morphological Regularities in Distributional Word Representations', 'ar': 'استغلال الانتظام المورفولوجي في تمثيلات الكلمات التوزيعية', 'fr': 'Exploiter les régularités morphologiques dans les représentations de mots distributionnelles', 'es': 'Explotación de las regularidades morfológicas en las representaciones de palabras distributivas', 'pt': 'Explorando regularidades morfológicas em representações de palavras distributivas', 'ja': '分布単語表現における形態規則性の利用', 'hi': 'वितरण शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व में रूपात्मक नियमितताओं का शोषण', 'zh': '以布词为中形', 'ru': 'Использование морфологических закономерностей в распределенных словопредставлениях', 'ga': 'Leas a bhaint as Rialta Moirfeolaíocha i Léirithe Focal Dáilte', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση Μορφολογικών Κανονικών στις Διανεμητικές Αντιπροσωπείες λέξεων', 'hu': 'A morfológiai szabályozások kiaknázása az elosztási szóképviseletekben', 'kk': 'Үлестірілген сөздерді таңдау үшін морфологикалық үлгілер', 'lt': 'Morfologinių reguliarumų naudojimas paskirstymo žodžių atstovybėse', 'mk': 'Користење на морфолошки регуларности во дистрибуционалните репрезентации на зборови', 'it': 'Sfruttare le regolarità morfologiche nelle rappresentazioni di parole distributive', 'mn': 'Марфологикийн хувилбаруудыг хуваалцах үгийн үзүүлэлтийг', 'mt': 'Exploiting Morphological Regularities in Distributional Word Representations', 'ml': 'വിതരണ വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Exploiting Morphological Regularities in Distributional Word Representations', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie regularności morfologicznych w reprezentacjach słowa dystrybucyjnego', 'ro': 'Exploatarea regularităților morfologice în reprezentarea distribuțională a cuvintelor', 'no': 'Eksplosjon av morfologiske reguleringar i distribusjonelle ordrepresentasjonar', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući morfološke pravilnosti u predstavljanju distribucijskih reči', 'si': 'විදුලි වචන ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයේ මොර්ෆෝලෝජික නියෝජික විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Exploding Morphological Regularies in Distribution Word Representations', 'sv': 'Utnyttja morfologiska regelverk i distributionsordrepresentationer', 'ta': 'வெளியேறுதல் வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடு', 'ur': 'تقسیم الفظ واحد نمایش میں Morphological Regularities Exploiting in Distributional Word Representations', 'uz': 'Tarqatish soĘ»zni tahrirlash', 'vi': 'Phát triển tính lý lịch tại các đài phát thanh', 'bg': 'Използване на морфологичните регулярности в разпространението на думи', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af morfologiske regelmæssigheder i fordelingsordrepræsentationer', 'nl': 'Het benutten van morfologische regulariteiten in verspreide woordrepresentaties', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje morfoloških pravila u predstavljanju distribucijskih riječi', 'de': 'Ausnutzung morphologischer Regelmäßigkeiten in verteilten Wortdarstellungen', 'fa': 'انفجار قانونی مورفولوژیکی در نمایش\u200cهای کلمه جدایی', 'id': 'Menggunakan Regularitas Morfologi dalam Perwakilan Kata Distribusional', 'ko': '분포어 표징 중의 형태학 법칙을 이용하다', 'sw': 'Kutumia taratibu za Kimorphological katika Representation Word', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i rregullaliteteve morfologjike në përfaqësimet e fjalëve shpërndarëse', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիական իրավունքների օգտագործումը բառերի տարածման ներկայացումներում', 'tr': 'Däpli Kelime Wasp Görkezilişinde Marfolojik Düzenlemekler Taýdyrylýar', 'az': 'Bölüşdürülən Kelimi Təşkilatlarında Morphological Regularities Exploitation', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'বিতরণের শব্দ প্রতিনিধিত্বে মরোফোলগিক নিয়ম প্রস্থান করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Explotar regularitats morfològiques en representacions de paraules distribucionals', 'cs': 'Využití morfologických pravidel v distribučních slovních reprezentacích', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući morfološke regulacije u predstavljanju distribucijskih riječi', 'fi': 'Morfologisten säännönmukaisuuksien hyödyntäminen hajautetuissa sanaesityksissä', 'et': 'Morfoloogiliste regulaarsuste kasutamine levitatavates sõnades', 'jv': 'Nobudhakan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje morfoloških pravilnosti v distribucijskih besednih predstavitvah', 'he': 'ניצל תקופות מורפולוגיות ביציגות מילים פיצועיות', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་མངོན་གསལ་ལྡན་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'We present an unsupervised, language agnostic approach for exploiting morphological regularities present in high dimensional vector spaces. We propose a novel method for generating embeddings of words from their morphological variants using morphological transformation operators. We evaluate this approach on MSR word analogy test set with an accuracy of 85 % which is 12 % higher than the previous best known system.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche non supervisée et agnostique du langage pour exploiter les régularités morphologiques présentes dans des espaces vectoriels de grande dimension. Nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour générer des intégrations de mots à partir de leurs variantes morphologiques à l'aide d'opérateurs de transformation morphologique. Nous évaluons cette approche sur un ensemble de tests d'analogie de mots MSR avec une précision de 85\xa0%, soit 12\xa0% de plus que le système le plus connu précédent.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem agnóstica de linguagem não supervisionada para explorar regularidades morfológicas presentes em espaços vetoriais de alta dimensão. Propomos um novo método para gerar embeddings de palavras a partir de suas variantes morfológicas usando operadores de transformação morfológica. Avaliamos esta abordagem no conjunto de testes de analogia de palavras MSR com uma precisão de 85%, que é 12% maior do que o sistema anterior mais conhecido.', 'ar': 'نقدم منهجًا غير خاضع للإشراف ، لاأدري للغة لاستغلال الانتظام المورفولوجي الموجود في فضاءات ناقل عالية الأبعاد. نقترح طريقة جديدة لتوليد زخارف الكلمات من متغيراتها المورفولوجية باستخدام مشغلي التحويل الصرفي. نقوم بتقييم هذا النهج على مجموعة اختبار تشبيه الكلمات MSR بدقة 85٪ وهي أعلى بنسبة 12٪ من أفضل نظام معروف سابقًا.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque no supervisado e independiente del lenguaje para explotar las regularidades morfológicas presentes en los espacios vectoriales de alta dimensión. Proponemos un método novedoso para generar incrustaciones de palabras a partir de sus variantes morfológicas mediante operadores de transformación morfológica. Evaluamos este enfoque en el conjunto de pruebas de analogía de palabras MSR con una precisión del 85%, que es un 12% más alta que el sistema anterior más conocido.', 'hi': 'हम उच्च आयामी वेक्टर रिक्त स्थान में मौजूद रूपात्मक नियमितताओं का शोषण करने के लिए एक असुरक्षित, भाषा अज्ञेयवादी दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम रूपात्मक परिवर्तन ऑपरेटरों का उपयोग करके अपने रूपात्मक रूपों से शब्दों के एम्बेडिंग उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम 85% की सटीकता के साथ MSR शब्द सादृश्य परीक्षण सेट पर इस दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं जो पिछले सबसे प्रसिद्ध सिस्टम की तुलना में 12% अधिक है।', 'ja': '我々は、高次元ベクトル空間に存在する形態規則性を利用するための、監督されていない、言語不可知論的アプローチを提示する。形態変換演算子を用いて、その形態変異形から単語の埋め込みを生成するための新たな方法を提案する。私たちは、このアプローチを、以前の最もよく知られているシステムよりも12 ％高い85 ％の精度でMSR単語類似試験セットで評価します。', 'zh': '建无监之言不可知,用高维向量间之形。 设一形变算符从其形变体生单词嵌新法。 MSR词类比试集上评此法,准确率为85%,高于前12%。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем неконтролируемый, языковой агностический подход к использованию морфологических закономерностей, присутствующих в высокомерных векторных пространствах. Предложен новый метод генерации вложений слов из их морфологических вариантов с использованием операторов морфологических преобразований. Мы оцениваем этот подход на наборе тестов-аналогов слов MSR с точностью 85%, что на 12% выше, чем предыдущая наиболее известная система.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair cur chuige agnostic teanga gan mhaoirseacht chun leas a bhaint as rialtachtaí moirfeolaíocha i spásanna veicteora ardtoiseacha. Molaimid modh nua chun leabú focal a ghiniúint óna leagan moirfeolaíocha ag baint úsáide as oibreoirí claochlaithe moirfeolaíocha. Déanaimid measúnú ar an gcur chuige seo ar thacar tástála analaí focal MSR le cruinneas 85% atá 12% níos airde ná an córas is fearr aithne roimhe seo.', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli, nyelvi agnosztikus megközelítést mutatunk be a nagy dimenziós vektortérben jelen lévő morfológiai szabályosságok kiaknázására. Új módszert javasolunk morfológiai variánsaikból származó szavak beágyazásának előállítására morfológiai transzformációs operátorok segítségével. Ezt a megközelítést az MSR szóanalógia tesztkészleten értékeljük 85%-os pontossággal, ami 12%-kal magasabb, mint az előző legismertebb rendszer.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια ασυνεπόπτη, γλωσσική αγνωστική προσέγγιση για την αξιοποίηση μορφολογικών κανονικοτήτων που υπάρχουν σε διανυσματικούς χώρους υψηλών διαστάσεων. Προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την παραγωγή ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων από τις μορφολογικές παραλλαγές τους χρησιμοποιώντας τελεστές μορφολογικού μετασχηματισμού. Αξιολογούμε αυτή την προσέγγιση στο σύνολο δοκιμής ανάλυσης λέξεων με ακρίβεια 85% η οποία είναι 12% υψηλότερη από το προηγούμενο πιο γνωστό σύστημα.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ არ განსხვავებული, ენის ადნოსტიკური პროგრამის გამოყენება მორპოლოგიური რეგულაციების გამოყენებას, რომელიც უფრო დიზიმენტიური გვეკტო ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ პრომენტის მეტი სიტყვების შექმნა მათი მორპოლოგიური გარიანტების გამოყენებაში მორპოლოგიური გარემოტანსტაციის ოპერატებით. ჩვენ ამ პროგორმა MSR სიტყვის ანალოგიის ტესტის შესაბამისი 85%-ის მართლა, რომელიც 12% უფრო მეტია წინა უცნობილი სისტემაზე.', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio non supervisionato e linguistico agnostico per sfruttare le regolarità morfologiche presenti in spazi vettoriali ad alta dimensione. Proponiamo un nuovo metodo per generare incorporazioni di parole dalle loro varianti morfologiche utilizzando operatori di trasformazione morfologica. Valutiamo questo approccio su MSR word analogy test set con una precisione dell'85% che è superiore del 12% rispetto al precedente sistema più conosciuto.", 'kk': 'Біз үлкен вектордың жоғары бос орындарында болатын морфологиялық үлгіліктерді қолдану үшін бағытталмаған, тілді агностикалық тәсілдерді таңдаймыз. Біз морфологиялық түрлендіру операторларын қолдану үшін сөздерді морфологиялық түрлендіру әдісін құру үшін романдық әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл MSR сөздерді аналогиялық сынақтарында 85% деген тәсілдігін бағалаймыз. Бұл алдыңғы белгілі жүйеңізден 12% деген артық.', 'mk': 'Презентираме ненадгледуван, јазички агностички пристап за искористување на морфолошките регуларности присутни во високи димензионални векторни простори. Предложуваме нов метод за генерирање на вложувања на зборови од нивните морфолошки варијанти користејќи морфолошки трансформациски оператори. Го проценуваме овој пристап на тестот за аналогија на зборовите на МСР со точност од 85 отсто, што е 12 отсто повисока од претходниот најпознат систем.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan agnostik bahasa yang tidak diawasi untuk mengeksploitasi regularitas morfologi yang ada dalam ruang vektor dimensi tinggi. Kami cadangkan kaedah baru untuk menghasilkan penyampaian perkataan dari varian morfologik mereka menggunakan operator perubahan morfologik. Kami menilai pendekatan ini pada set ujian analogi perkataan MSR dengan ketepatan 85% yang 12% lebih tinggi daripada sistem terkenal terdahulu.', 'lt': 'Mes pateikiame nekontroliuojamą kalbų agnostinį metodą, skirtą išnaudoti didelės dimensijos vektorių erdvėse esančius morfologinius reguliarumus. Siūlome naują metodą žodžių įterpimui iš jų morfologinių variantų gaminti naudojant morfologinių transformacijų operatorius. Vertiname šį metodą pagal MSR žodžių analoginio bandymo rinkinį, kurio tikslumas 85 %, kuris yra 12 % didesnis už ankstesnę geriausiai žinomą sistemą.', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷയുടെ അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d  മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രോഗ്രാന്റ് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനായി നോവല്\u200d രീതിയി മുമ്പ് അറിയപ്പെട്ട ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെക്കാള്\u200d 12% ഉയരത്തിലാണ് എംഎസ്.ആര്\u200d വാക്ക് അനാളജി പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പ്രാ', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein ugjennomsiktig språk agnostisk tilnærming for å bruka morfologiske reguleringar som finst i høg dimensjonal vektormellomrom. Vi foreslår ein novel metode for å laga innbygging av ord frå morfologiske variantane sine med morfologiske transformeringsoperatorar. Vi evaluerer denne tilnærminga på MSR- ordanalogiske testen med ein nøyaktig 85%, som er 12% høgare enn den førre beste kjende systemet.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ agnostiku tal-lingwa mhux sorveljat għall-isfruttar tar-regolaritajiet morfoloġiċi preżenti fi spazji ta’ vetturi dimensjonali għoljin. Aħna nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem mill-varjanti morfoloġiċi tagħhom bl-użu ta’ operaturi ta’ trasformazzjoni morfoloġika. We evaluate this approach on MSR word analogy test set with an accuracy of 85% which is 12% higher than the previous best known system.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy bez nadzoru, agnostyczne podejście językowe do wykorzystania regularności morfologicznych obecnych w wysokich wymiarowych przestrzeniach wektorowych. Proponujemy nową metodę generowania osadzeń słów z ich wariantów morfologicznych za pomocą operatorów transformacji morfologicznej. Oceniamy to podejście na zestawie testów analogii słowa MSR z dokładnością 85% która jest 12% wyższa od poprzedniego najbardziej znanego systemu.', 'mn': 'Бид өндөр хэмжээст векторын орон зайд байгаа морфологик шугамдлыг ашиглах боломжгүй, хэлний агностик арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид морфологийн шилжүүлэлтийн операторыг ашиглан үг бий болгох шинэ арга зам санал өгдөг. Бид MSR үгийн аналогикийн тест дээрх энэ арга баримт 85% нь өмнөх хамгийн сайн мэдэгдэх системээс 12% өндөр байдаг.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo neodređeni, jezički agnostički pristup za iskorištavanje morfoloških regulariteta prisutnih u visokim dimenzionalnim vektorskim prostorijama. Predlažemo novu metodu za stvaranje ugrađenja reči iz njihovih morfoloških varianta koristeći morfološke transformacije. Procjenjujemo taj pristup analogijskom testu MSR rijeèi sa taènošću od 85%, što je 12% veći od prethodnog najpoznatijeg sistema.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare nesupravegheată, agnostică a limbajului pentru exploatarea regularităților morfologice prezente în spațiile vectoriale de înaltă dimensiune. Propunem o metodă nouă pentru generarea încorporărilor de cuvinte din variantele lor morfologice folosind operatori de transformare morfologică. Evaluăm această abordare pe setul de test de analogie cu cuvinte MSR cu o precizie de 85%, care este cu 12% mai mare decât sistemul anterior cel mai cunoscut.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදේශ කරන්නේ නැහැ, භාෂාව අගොනිසික විදියට, වෙක්ටර් අවස්ථාවක් වල ඉන්න තියෙන විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ වෙනස් වලින් වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. මොර්ෆෝලෝජික වෙනස් කරුණාකරුව අපි MSR වචන විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණයේ මේ විධානය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ 85% විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම මුලින් දන්න හොඳම', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab aan la ilaalinayn oo afka u baahan, si aan u isticmaalno qaynuunno morphological ah oo ku jira goobaha wadooyinka sare. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab saxda ah oo ka sameynaya hadal ka mid ah kuwa isbedelka morphologiga ah ee isticmaalaya qofka bedelka ah. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababkan ku saabsan imtixaanka hadalka analogy ee MSR, taas oo sax ah 85% oo ka sarraysa 12% nidaamka hore ee la yaqaan.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett oövervakat språkagnostiskt tillvägagångssätt för att utnyttja morfologiska regulariteter som finns i högdimensionella vektorrum. Vi föreslår en ny metod för att generera inbäddningar av ord från deras morfologiska varianter med hjälp av morfologiska transformationsoperatorer. Vi utvärderar detta tillvägagångssätt på MSR ordanalogi test set med en noggrannhet på 85% vilket är 12% högre än det tidigare mest kända systemet.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒரு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத, மொழி குறுக்கும் வழிமுறையை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு உயர் மங்கலான வெக்டர் இடைவெளி நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு மாற்றும் மாறுபாட்டு மாறுபாடு செயல்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றும் இயக்கிகளை  முந்தைய அறியப்பட்ட முறைமையை விட 12% அதிகமாக இருக்கும்.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک غیر محفوظ، زبان اگنیسی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ اس طریقے سے مورفولوژیکی قانون کے استعمال کریں جو بالا اندازہ ویکتور فضائی میں موجود ہیں. ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کی ابڈینگ کو ان کے مورفولوژیکی الگوں سے پیدا کرنے کے لئے مورفولوژیکی تبدیل اوپراتوروں کے استعمال کریں۔ ہم اس طریقہ کو MSR کلمات آنلالوژی امتحان کے ذریعہ مطابق 85% کے مطابق مقرر کر رہے ہیں جو پہلے سے بہتر معلوم سیسٹم سے 12% زیادہ ہے.', 'uz': "Biz yuqori darajada yuqori vektorlar joylarida mavjud bo'lgan morfologik qoidalarni ishlatish uchun muvaffaqiyatlarni ishlatib chiqaramiz. Biz oddiy so'zlarning morfologik varianterlaridan so'zlarni yaratish uchun novel usulini tahlil qilamiz. Morfologik ўзгартириш operatorlari yordamida. Biz bu usulni qiymatimiz, 85% aniqlangan tizimdan 12% eng eng yaxshi ko'proq.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một phương pháp bồ đà ngôn ngữ không giám sát để khai thác các thói quen lịch sự có mặt ở các không gian vector. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để tạo ra sự gắn kết từ các biến thể của chúng bằng cách sử dụng cấu trúc di động. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp này trên thử nghiệm ngôn ngữ của MSR với một độ chính xác cao cao cao cao cao hơn so với hệ thống được biết trước.', 'bg': 'Представяме ненадзорен, езиков агностичен подход за експлоатиране на морфологичните редовности, присъстващи във високомерните векторни пространства. Предлагаме нов метод за генериране на вграждания на думи от техните морфологични варианти, използвайки морфологични трансформационни оператори. Оценяваме този подход при тест за аналогия на думи с точност 85%, което е 12% по-високо от предишната най-известна система.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en uopvåget, sprogagnostisk tilgang til udnyttelse af morfologiske regelmæssigheder i højdimensionelle vektorrum. Vi foreslår en ny metode til at generere indlejringer af ord fra deres morfologiske varianter ved hjælp af morfologiske transformationsoperatorer. Vi evaluerer denne tilgang på MSR ord analogi test sæt med en nøjagtighed på 85%, som er 12% højere end det tidligere bedst kendte system.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een niet-begeleide, taal agnostische benadering voor het benutten van morfologische regulariteiten die aanwezig zijn in hoogdimensionale vectorruimten. We stellen een nieuwe methode voor het genereren van insluitingen van woorden uit hun morfologische varianten met behulp van morfologische transformatieoperatoren voor. We evalueren deze benadering op MSR woordanalogie test set met een nauwkeurigheid van 85% die 12% hoger is dan het vorige meest bekende systeem.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo neodređen, jezički agnostički pristup za iskorištavanje morfoloških redovitosta prisutnih u visokim dimenzionalnim vektorskim prostorima. Predlažemo novu metodu za stvaranje ugrađenja riječi iz njihovih morfoloških varianta koristeći morfološke transformacije operatore. Procjenjujemo taj pristup analogijskom testu MSR riječi s preciznošću od 85%, što je 12% veći od prethodnog najpoznatijeg sustava.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen unbeaufsichtigten, sprachagnostischen Ansatz zur Ausnutzung morphologischer Regelmäßigkeiten in hochdimensionalen Vektorräumen. Wir schlagen eine neue Methode vor, um Einbettungen von Wörtern aus ihren morphologischen Varianten mittels morphologischer Transformationsoperatoren zu generieren. Wir evaluieren diesen Ansatz am MSR-Wortanalogie-Testsatz mit einer Genauigkeit von 85% die 12% höher ist als das bisher bekannteste System.', 'ko': '우리는 감독이 없고 언어가 알 수 없는 방법을 제시하여 고차원 벡터 공간에서의 형태학 규칙을 이용했다.우리는 형태 변환 산자를 이용하여 어형 변체에서 단어를 만들어 삽입하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리는 MSR 단어 비교 테스트 집합에서 이런 방법을 평가했는데 정확도는 85%로 이전에 가장 유명한 시스템보다 12% 높았다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan agnostik bahasa yang tidak diawasi untuk mengeksploitasi regularitas morfologi yang ada di ruang vektor dimensi tinggi. Kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk menghasilkan pembangunan kata dari varian morfologi mereka menggunakan operator transformasi morfologi. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan ini pada tes analogi kata MSR set dengan akurasi 85% yang 12% lebih tinggi dari sistem terkenal sebelumnya.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش غیرقابل تحریک زبان agnostic را برای استفاده از قانونی مورفولوژیکی که در فضای ویکتور بالا هستند نشان می دهیم. ما یک روش جدید برای تولید کردن ابزار کلمات از متغیرات مورفولوژیکی آنها را با استفاده از عملیات تغییرات مورفولوژیکی پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما این روش را بر روی آزمایش آنالوژی کلمه MSR با دقیق 85 درصد ارزیابی می کنیم که 12 درصد بیشتر از سیستم بهترین شناخته شده است.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza hatua isiyo na usalama wa lugha kwa kutumia kanuni za kimaadilojia zinazopo katika maeneo ya vigaidi. Tunazipendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kutengeneza mabadiliko ya maneno kutoka katika mabadiliko yao ya kifolojia kwa kutumia operesheni za mabadiliko ya kimaadilojia. Tutathmini mbinu hii kuhusu jaribio la Uanalogu la MSR lililotengenezwa na uhakika wa asilimia 85 ambayo ni asilimia 12 zaidi ya mfumo uliofahamika.', 'tr': 'Biz beýik boyutlu vektör seleňlerinde bolan morfolojik döredilmeleri ulanmak üçin bilinmeyen agnostik bir ýazşy görkeýäris. Biz morfolojik üýtgetmek operatörlerini ulanan sözlerin integrasyny morpholojik wariantlaryndan döretmek üçin bir täze täze teklip edip görýäris. Biz MSR söz analogiýasynda bu ýazşyny 85% dogrylygy bilen çykýarys. Bu ýazşyny öňki bilinen sistemden has 12% ýokary.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n ononderwerpende, taal agnostiese toegang voor die uitbreiding van morfologiese regulariteite wat in hoë dimensjonale vektorspasies voorsien is. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe metode vir die genereer van inbêding van woorde van hul morfologiese variante met gebruik van morfologiese transformasie operatore. Ons evalueer hierdie toegang op MSR woord analogie toets stel met 'n presisie van 85% wat is 12% hoër as die vorige beste bekende stelsel.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje agnostike gjuhësh pa mbikqyrje për shfrytëzimin e rregullaliteteve morfologjike të pranishme në hapësira vectore dimensionale të larta. Ne propozojmë një metodë të re për krijimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve nga variantet e tyre morfologjike duke përdorur operatorët e transformimit morfologjik. Ne vlerësojmë këtë qasje në testin e analogjisë së fjalëve MSR me një saktësi 85% e cila është 12% më e lartë se sistemi më i njohur më i mëparshëm.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አቀማመጥ ሥርዓቶችን ለመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሞሮፎሎጂ ለውጥ ተቃዋሚዎችን በመጠቀም የቃሎችን አካባቢ ማፍሰስ አቅራቢያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት ከቀድሞው ከተታወቀ ስርዓት በላይ 12 በመቶ የበለጠ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Biz yüksək ölçülük vektör uzaqlarında bulunan morfolojik düzgünlükləri istifadə etmək üçün müdafiə edilməmiş, dil agnostik approach göstəririk. Biz morfolojik transformasyon operatörlərini istifadə edərək, onların morfolojik variablarından sözləri yaratmaq üçün yeni bir metod təklif edirik. Biz bu metodları MSR sözlərin analoji sınaması üçün 85%-in doğruluğu ilə müəyyən edirik ki, əvvəlki tanınmış sistemdən 12%-dən daha yüksək.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք անվերահսկված լեզվի ագնոստիկ մոտեցում, որպեսզի օգտագործենք բարձր չափերի վեկտորների տարածքներում գոյություն ունեցող մորֆոլոգիական կարգավորությունները: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք բառեր իրենց մորֆոլոգիական տարբերակներից, օգտագործելով մորֆոլոգիական վերափոխման գործիչներ: Մենք գնահատում ենք այս մոտեցումը MSR բառի նմանատիպ փորձարկումների վրա 85 տոկոսով ճշգրտությամբ, որը 12 տոկոսով ավելի բարձր է քան նախորդ լավագույն հայտնի համակարգը:', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo neodređeni, jezički agnostički pristup za iskorištavanje morfoloških regulariteta prisutnih u visokim dimenzionalnim vektorskim prostorijama. Predlažemo novu metodu za stvaranje ugrađenja riječi iz njihovih morfoloških varianta koristeći morfološke transformacije. Procjenjujemo taj pristup na testu analogije riječi MSR sa tačnošću od 85%, što je 12% veći od prethodnog najpoznatijeg sistema.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি অরক্ষণশীল, ভাষার আগন্ত্রিক পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি উচ্চমাত্রিক ভেক্টর জায়গায় উপস্থিত থাকার জন্য। We propose a novel method for generating embeddings of words from their morphological variants using morphological transformation operators.  আমরা এমএসআর শব্দ বিশ্লেষণ পরীক্ষার ব্যাপারে এই পদক্ষেপটি মূল্যায়ন করি যা পূর্ববর্তী পরিচিত সিস্টেমের চেয়ে ১২% বেশ', 'cs': 'Představujeme bez dozoru jazykový agnostický přístup k využití morfologických pravidel přítomných ve vysoce dimenzionálních vektorových prostorech. Navrhujeme novou metodu generování vložení slov z jejich morfologických variant pomocí morfologických transformačních operátorů. Tento přístup hodnotíme na testovací sadě MSR slovní analogie s přesností 85% která je 12% vyšší než předchozí nejznámější systém.', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament agnòstic de llenguatge sense supervisió per explotar regularitats morfològiques presents en espais vectoris d'alta dimensió. Proposem un mètode nou per generar incorporacions de paraules a partir de les seves variants morfològiques utilitzant operadors de transformació morfològica. Evaluam aquest enfocament en un conjunt de tests d'analògica de paraules MSR amb una precisió del 85%, que és un 12% més alta que el sistema més conegut anterior.", 'fi': 'Esitämme valvomattoman, kieliagnostisen lähestymistavan korkean ulottuvuuden vektoriavaruuksissa esiintyvien morfologisten regulariteettien hyödyntämiseen. Ehdotamme uutta menetelmää sanojen upottamiseen niiden morfologisista varianteista käyttäen morfologisia muunnosoperaattoreita. Arvioimme tätä lähestymistapaa MSR-sanaanalogiatestissä 85% tarkkuudella, joka on 12% korkeampi kuin edellinen tunnetuin järjestelmä.', 'et': 'Esitleme järelevalveta keelegagnostilist lähenemisviisi kõrgemõõtmelistes vektoriruumides esinevate morfoloogiliste korrektsuste kasutamiseks. Pakume välja uue meetodi sõnade manustamiseks nende morfoloogilistest variantidest, kasutades morfoloogilisi transformatsiooni operaatoreid. Hindame seda lähenemisviisi MSR sõna analoogia testi täpsusega 85%, mis on 12% kõrgem kui eelmine tuntum süsteem.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe barang nggawe luwih dumadhing, nggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang banter vector We proposal a new method for Generating embedding of words from their transformative variants use modal transformation operations. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem iki ing nggambar SMR ujak, dadi kapan sistem sing apik dadi, awak dhéwé kesempatan kanggo kowé 75% kuwi 12% luwih apik kanggo sistem sing paling dhéwé.', 'ha': 'Tuna halatar da wata hanyoyi ba da tsaro, da harshe na agnostic ga yin amfani da rukuwan morfologi wanda ke cikin filayen sauri na dimiyatsi. Tuna buɗe wani hanyor node wa ka sami da saurãre masu cikin magana daga variants masu mutfologi da ke amfani da afaretan mutfologi. Tuna ƙaddara wannan hanyarwa a kan jarraba kalmar mai analogy na MR da tsari na 85% da ya fi girma daga tsarin da aka sani a gaba.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nenadzorovan jezikovni agnostični pristop za izkoriščanje morfoloških pravilnosti, prisotnih v visokodimenzionalnih vektorskih prostorih. Predlagamo novo metodo za generiranje vgradnje besed iz njihovih morfoloških variant z uporabo morfoloških transformacijskih operaterjev. Ta pristop ocenjujemo na testu analogije besed MSR z natančnostjo 85%, kar je 12% višje od prejšnjega najbolj znanega sistema.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים גישה אגנוסטית לשפה ללא השגחה לנצל חוקיות מורפולוגיות הנוכחות בחלל ווקטורים במימד גבוה. אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה לייצור קישורים של מילים מהשונים המורפולוגיים שלהם בשימוש במפעל שינוי מורפולוגי. We evaluate this approach on MSR word analogy test set with an accuracy of 85% which is 12% higher than the previous best known system.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཆེད་ཅིག་གནང་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་། We propose a new method for generating embeddings of words from their morphological variants using morphological transformation operators. ང་ཚོས་MSR་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། སྔོན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་85%དང་མཐོང་'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Word Internal Structures for Generic Chinese Sentence Representation', 'ar': 'استغلال الهياكل الداخلية للكلمة لتمثيل الجملة الصينية العامة', 'fr': 'Exploiter les structures internes des mots pour la représentation générique des phrases chinoises', 'pt': 'Explorando Estruturas Internas do Word para Representação de Frases em Chinês Genérico', 'es': 'Explotación de las estructuras internas de Word para la representación genérica de oraciones', 'ja': '一般的な中国語の文章表現のための単語内部構造の利用', 'zh': '因单词内部结构通用汉语句', 'hi': 'जेनेरिक चीनी वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए शब्द आंतरिक संरचनाओं का शोषण', 'ru': 'Использование внутренних структур слов для общего представления китайского предложения', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Struchtúir Inmheánacha Focal le haghaidh Ionadaíocht Ghinearálta Phianbhreithe Síneach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A szó belső struktúráinak kihasználása az általános kínai mondatok ábrázolásához', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση των εσωτερικών δομών λέξεων για τη γενική κινεζική εκπροσώπηση ποινών', 'it': 'Sfruttare le strutture interne delle parole per la rappresentazione generica della frase cinese', 'lt': 'Žodžių vidaus struktūrų naudojimas bendrajam Kinijos bausmės atstovavimui', 'kk': 'Сөздің ішкі құрылымдары жалпы қытайша сөзді таңдау', 'mk': 'Користење внатрешни структури на зборови за општа кинеска реченица', 'mt': 'L-isfruttament tal-Istrutturi Interni tal-Kliem għar-Rappreżentanza Ġenerika tas-Sentenza Ċiniża', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ചൈനീസ് ശിക്ഷ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഘടകം', 'mn': 'Хятад хэлсэн үгийн үндэслэлийн дотоод бүтэц', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući unutrašnje strukture riječi za generalnu kinesku predstavnicu kazne', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie wewnętrznych struktur słowa do ogólnej reprezentacji zdań chińskich', 'ro': 'Exploatarea structurilor interne ale cuvintelor pentru reprezentarea propoziției chineze generice', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය චීනි වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සඳහා වචන ඇතුළු ස්ථාපනය', 'so': 'Exploding Word Internal Structures for Generic Chinese Sentence Representation', 'sv': 'Utnyttja ordinterna strukturer för generisk kinesisk mening representation', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'جرانیک چینی سنٹنس روشنی کے لئے ویڈ داخلی ساخترات پھیلاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát triển các cấu trúc nội bộ của Trung Quốc đồn đại', 'bg': 'Използване на вътрешни структури на думи за представяне на общ китайски присъда', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući unutrašnje strukture riječi za generalnu kinesku predstavnicu kazne', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van Word interne structuren voor generieke Chinese zinnenvertegenwoordiging', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi Struktur Dalam Kata untuk Perwakilan Sentensi Generik Cina', 'ko': '단어의 내부 구조를 이용하여 중국어 문장의 범화 표현을 실현하다', 'fa': 'استفاده از ساختارهای داخلی کلمه برای نمایش کلمه چینی ژنرال', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af ordinterne strukturer til generisk kinesisk sætningsrepræsentation', 'tr': 'Däpli Çinçe Senedi Görkezilişi üçin Ady Senedi Taýýarlamak', 'de': 'Ausnutzung interner Word-Strukturen für generische chinesische Sätze', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i strukturave të brendshme të fjalëve për përfaqësimin gjeneral të dënimeve kineze', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የቻይንኛ ስርዓት ተሟጋቾች', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Mamlaka ya Ndani ya Matokeo ya Hukumu ya Kichina', 'az': '칂in S칬z칲 캻칞ind톛ki S칬z칲 캻칞ind톛ki Yap캼lar캼', 'hy': 'Exploiting Word Internal Structures for Generic Chinese Sentence Representation', 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući unutrašnje strukture riječi za generalnu kinesku predstavnicu kazne', 'ca': 'Exploitant estructures internes de paraules per a la representació genèrica de sentences xineses', 'cs': 'Využití slovních interních struktur pro obecné reprezentaci čínských vět', 'bn': 'সাধারণ চীনা শাস্তি প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য উক্ত শব্দের আভ্যন্তরীণ কাঠামো', 'et': 'Sõnade sisemiste struktuuride kasutamine üldise hiina karistuse esindamisel', 'fi': 'Sanan sisäisten rakenteiden hyödyntäminen yleiseen kiinalaiseen lauseen edustukseen', 'jv': 'Ngubah Gambar Ketok Oral structural kanggo Ketokanan Sentense Chinese', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ניצל מבנים פנימיים של מילים לייצג גזרים סינים', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje besednih notranjih struktur za zastopanje splošnih kitajskih kazni', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚིག་གྱི་ནང་འཁོད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཆ་སྟོན་པ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a novel mixed characterword architecture to improve Chinese sentence representations, by utilizing rich semantic information of word internal structures. Our architecture uses two key strategies. The first is a mask gate on characters, learning the relation among characters in a word. The second is a maxpooling operation on words, adaptively finding the optimal mixture of the atomic and compositional word representations. Finally, the proposed architecture is applied to various sentence composition models, which achieves substantial performance gains over baseline models on sentence similarity task.', 'ar': 'نقدم بنية جديدة للكلمات المميزة المختلطة لتحسين تمثيل الجملة الصينية ، من خلال استخدام المعلومات الدلالية الغنية للهياكل الداخلية للكلمة. تستخدم هندستنا استراتيجيتين رئيسيتين. الأول هو بوابة القناع على الشخصيات ، وتعلم العلاقة بين الشخصيات في الكلمة. والثاني هو عملية الجمع بين الكلمات ، وإيجاد المزيج الأمثل من تمثيلات الكلمات الذرية والتركيبية بشكل تكيفي. أخيرًا ، يتم تطبيق البنية المقترحة على نماذج تكوين الجمل المختلفة ، والتي تحقق مكاسب كبيرة في الأداء على النماذج الأساسية في مهمة تشابه الجملة.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une nouvelle architecture de caractères mixtes pour améliorer la représentation des phrases chinoises, en utilisant des informations sémantiques riches sur les structures internes des mots. Notre architecture utilise deux stratégies clés. Le premier est une porte de masque sur les caractères, apprenant la relation entre les caractères d'un mot. La seconde est une opération de mise en commun maximale des mots, qui permet de trouver de manière adaptative le mélange optimal des représentations atomiques et compositionnelles des mots. Enfin, l'architecture proposée est appliquée à divers modèles de composition de phrases, ce qui permet d'obtenir des gains de performance substantiels par rapport aux modèles de base sur la tâche de similarité de phrases.", 'pt': 'Introduzimos uma nova arquitetura de palavras de caracteres mistos para melhorar as representações de frases em chinês, utilizando informações semânticas ricas de estruturas internas de palavras. Nossa arquitetura usa duas estratégias principais. O primeiro é um portão de máscara nos caracteres, aprendendo a relação entre os caracteres em uma palavra. A segunda é uma operação de maxpooling em palavras, encontrando de forma adaptativa a mistura ideal das representações de palavras atômicas e composicionais. Por fim, a arquitetura proposta é aplicada a vários modelos de composição de sentenças, o que alcança ganhos substanciais de desempenho em relação aos modelos de linha de base na tarefa de similaridade de sentenças.', 'es': 'Presentamos una novedosa arquitectura de palabras de caracteres mixtos para mejorar las representaciones de oraciones chinas, mediante la utilización de información semántica rica de las estructuras internas de las palabras. Nuestra arquitectura utiliza dos estrategias clave. La primera es una puerta de máscara en los personajes, que aprende la relación entre los personajes de una palabra. La segunda es una operación de maxpooling en palabras, encontrando de forma adaptativa la mezcla óptima de las representaciones de palabras atómicas y composicionales. Finalmente, la arquitectura propuesta se aplica a varios modelos de composición de oraciones, lo que logra ganancias sustanciales de rendimiento con respecto a los modelos de referencia en la tarea de similitud de oraciones.', 'ja': '単語の内部構造の豊富な意味情報を活用し、中国語の文章表現を改善するための斬新な混合文字アーキテクチャを導入しました。当社のアーキテクチャは、2つの重要な戦略を使用しています。1つ目は、単語内の文字間の関係を学習する、文字上のマスクゲートです。２つ目は、適応的に原子及び組成単語表現の最適な混合物を見つける、単語の最大プール操作である。最後に、提案されたアーキテクチャは、様々な文章構成モデルに適用され、文の類似性タスクのベースラインモデルよりも実質的なパフォーマンスの向上を達成する。', 'zh': '引入一新合字符词架构,因单词内部结构之富语义以改中文句。 吾架构用二策。 一曰面具门,学单词中字符之际。 二曰大单词池化操作,自适原子组单词最为上合。 最后,将所上架构应用诸句为模形,句相似性成比基线模形者升之。', 'hi': 'हम शब्द आंतरिक संरचनाओं की समृद्ध शब्दार्थ जानकारी का उपयोग करके चीनी वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व में सुधार करने के लिए एक उपन्यास मिश्रित चरित्र शब्द वास्तुकला पेश करते हैं। हमारी वास्तुकला दो प्रमुख रणनीतियों का उपयोग करती है। पहला पात्रों पर एक मुखौटा द्वार है, जो एक शब्द में पात्रों के बीच संबंध सीखता है। दूसरा शब्दों पर एक मैक्सपूलिंग ऑपरेशन है, जो परमाणु और रचनात्मक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के इष्टतम मिश्रण को अनुकूलित रूप से खोजता है। अंत में, प्रस्तावित आर्किटेक्चर को विभिन्न वाक्य संरचना मॉडलों पर लागू किया जाता है, जो वाक्य समानता कार्य पर बेसलाइन मॉडल पर पर्याप्त प्रदर्शन लाभ प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы вводим новую архитектуру смешанных символов для улучшения китайских представлений предложений, используя богатую семантическую информацию о внутренних структурах слов. Наша архитектура использует две ключевые стратегии. Первый - это ворота маски над персонажами, изучающие отношения между персонажами в слове. Второе - это операция макспулинга над словами, адаптивно находящая оптимальное сочетание атомного и композиционного словопредставлений. Наконец, предлагаемая архитектура применяется к различным моделям состава предложений, что обеспечивает существенный рост производительности по сравнению с базовыми моделями в задаче сходства предложений.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach ailtireacht carachtar measctha úrscéal chun uiríll abairtí na Síne a fheabhsú, trí úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis shéimeantach shaibhir ar struchtúir inmheánacha focal. Úsáideann ár n-ailtireacht dhá phríomhstraitéis. Is é an chéad cheann ná geata masc ar charachtair, ag foghlaim an gaol idir carachtair i bhfocal. Oibríocht uasta ar fhocail is ea an dara ceann, a aimsíonn go hoiriúnaitheach an meascán is fearr de na hionadaíochtaí focal adamhach agus comhdhéanamh. Ar deireadh, cuirtear an ailtireacht bheartaithe i bhfeidhm ar mhúnlaí éagsúla comhdhéanamh abairtí, a ghnóthaíonn gnóthachain shuntasacha feidhmíochta thar mhúnlaí bonnlíne ar thasc cosúlachta abairtí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტის შესაბამისი სიტყვების არქტიქტურაციას ჩინეთი სიტყვების გამოყენება, რომელიც შინეთი სიტყვების გამოყენებას გამოიყენებთ ბედნიერი სმენტი ჩვენი არქტიქტიკატი გამოყენებს ორი კლავის სტრატიქტიკატი. პირველი არის სიმბოლოების მასკური გეტა, რომელიც სიმბოლოში სიმბოლოების შესახებ ვისწავლოთ. მეორე არის სიტყვების მაქსიკომპუალური მოქმედება, აეპტიფიურად აპტიმალურად აპტიმალური მოქმედება ატომიური და კომპუზიციური სიტყვების გამოსახულება. საბოლოოდ, საკუთარი შესაძლებელი არქტიქტიკური მოდელში გამოყენება განსხვავებული სიტყვების კომპოზიციის მოდელში, რომელიც მიიღებს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი გამოიყენება მ', 'hu': 'Egy új vegyes karakterszó architektúrát vezetünk be a kínai mondatok ábrázolásának javítására, a szó belső struktúráinak gazdag szemantikai információinak felhasználásával. Az építészetünk két kulcsfontosságú stratégiát alkalmaz. Az első egy maszk kapu a karaktereken, megtanulva a karakterek kapcsolatát egy szóban. A második a szavakon végzett maxpooling művelet, amely adaptívan megtalálja az atom és kompozíciós szó reprezentációinak optimális keverékét. Végül a javasolt architektúrát különböző mondatkompozíciós modellekre alkalmazzák, amelyek jelentős teljesítménynövekedést érnek el az alapvető modellekhez képest a mondatok hasonlósági feladatok esetén.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε μια νέα μικτή αρχιτεκτονική λέξεων χαρακτηριστικών για να βελτιώσουμε τις κινεζικές αναπαραστάσεις προτάσεων, χρησιμοποιώντας πλούσιες σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες των εσωτερικών δομών λέξεων. Η αρχιτεκτονική μας χρησιμοποιεί δύο βασικές στρατηγικές. Το πρώτο είναι μια πύλη μάσκας στους χαρακτήρες, μαθαίνοντας τη σχέση μεταξύ των χαρακτήρων σε μια λέξη. Η δεύτερη είναι μια λειτουργία μεγιστοποίησης των λέξεων, βρίσκοντας προσαρμοστικά το βέλτιστο μείγμα των ατομικών και σύνθετων αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων. Τέλος, η προτεινόμενη αρχιτεκτονική εφαρμόζεται σε διάφορα μοντέλα σύνθεσης προτάσεων, τα οποία επιτυγχάνουν σημαντικά κέρδη απόδοσης έναντι των προτύπων βάσης σε εργασία ομοιότητας προτάσεων.', 'it': "Introduciamo una nuova architettura mista di caratteri per migliorare le rappresentazioni delle frasi cinesi, utilizzando ricche informazioni semantiche delle strutture interne delle parole. La nostra architettura utilizza due strategie chiave. Il primo è un cancello di maschera sui personaggi, imparando la relazione tra i personaggi in una parola. Il secondo è un'operazione di maxpooling sulle parole, trovando adattivamente la miscela ottimale delle rappresentazioni atomiche e compositive delle parole. Infine, l'architettura proposta viene applicata a vari modelli di composizione delle frasi, che ottengono notevoli guadagni di prestazioni rispetto ai modelli di base sul compito di somiglianza delle frasi.", 'kk': 'Біз қытайша сөздерді жақсарту үшін, ішкі құрылғылардың баяны семантикалық мәліметін пайдалану үшін романдық аралас сөздер архитектурасын келтіреміз. Біздің архитектурамыз екі негізгі стратегия қолданады. Біріншісі - таңбалардың қалқасының қапшығы, сөздің қатынасын үйрену. Екіншісі - сөздерді шегіндіру операциясы, атомдық және композиционалық сөздердің оңтүстік араластыруын табу. Соңында, ұсынылған архитектура әртүрлі сөздерді құру үлгілеріне қолданылады. Бұл сөздердің ұқсас тапсырмасында негізгі үлгілерінен көп істеу үлгілерін жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме нова мешана карактерска архитектура за подобрување на кинеските реченици со користење богати семантични информации за зборовите внатрешни структури. Нашата архитектура користи две клучни стратегии. Првата е маскирана врата на ликовите, учејќи го односот меѓу ликовите во еден збор. The second is a maxpooling operation on words, adaptively finding the optimal mixture of the atomic and compositional word representations.  Конечно, предложената архитектура се применува на различни модели на композиција на речениците, кои постигнуваат значителни добивки од резултатите во однос на основните модели на задачата за сличност на речениците.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame naują mišrų simbolių architektūrą, kad pagerintume Kinijos sakinių atstovavimą naudojant turtingą semantinę žodžių vidaus struktūrų informaciją. Mūsų architektūra naudoja dvi pagrindines strategijas. Pirmasis yra kaukų vartas ant simbolių, mokantis santykius tarp simbolių žodžiu. Antrasis yra didžiausias žodžių išaiškinimas, pritaikant optimal ų atominių ir sudėtinių žodžių atspindimų mišinį. Galiausiai siūloma architektūra taikoma įvairiems sakinių sudėties modeliams, dėl kurių, palyginti su pradiniais sakinių panašumo modeliais, gerokai padidėja rezultatai.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur kata karakter bercampur novel untuk meningkatkan perwakilan kalimat Cina, dengan menggunakan maklumat semantik kaya struktur dalam perkataan. Our architecture uses two key strategies.  Pertama adalah pintu topeng pada aksara, mempelajari hubungan antara aksara dalam satu perkataan. Yang kedua ialah operasi maksimum pada perkataan, dengan cara yang sesuai mencari campuran optimal bagi perwakilan perkataan atom dan komposisi. Akhirnya, arkitektur yang direncanakan dilaksanakan pada pelbagai model komposisi kalimat, yang mencapai keuntungan prestasi yang besar atas model asas pada tugas persamaan kalimat.', 'mn': 'Бид Хятадын өгүүлбэр илэрхийллийг сайжруулахын тулд цуглуулсан шинэ харьцааны архитектурыг тайлбарлаж, дотоод хэлбэрүүдийн баян хэмжээний мэдээллийг ашиглаж байна. Бидний архитектур хоёр чухал стратегийг ашигладаг. Эхнийх нь дүрсийн гадаргууд, хэн дүрсийн холбоотой холбоотой. Харин хоёр дахь нь үг дээр хамгийн их нийлүүлэх үйл ажиллагаа, атом болон бүтцийн үг илэрхийллийн эерэг төвөгтэй холбоотой. Эцэст нь, санал өгсөн архитектур нь олон өгүүлбэр бүтээлтийн загвар дээр хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь өгүүлбэртэй адилхан ажил дээр суурь шугам загварын үндсэн загваруудыг хүргэж чадна.', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d കലര്\u200dത്തുന്ന അക്ഷരര്\u200dത്ഥവാക്ക് സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു. വാ നമ്മുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള രണ്ട് താക്കോലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം വാക്കിലുള്ള അക്ഷരങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധം പഠിക്കുന്ന മുഖം ഗേറ്റാണ്. രണ്ടാമത്തേതാണ് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വലിയൊരു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം, ആറ്റോമിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെയും പ്രതിനിധികളുടെയും പ്രതിനിധികളു അവസാനം, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആർക്കിട്ടറിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d വിവിധ വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് വാക്കിന്റെ', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu arkitettura ġdida ta’ karatteristiċi mħallta biex itejbu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ sentenzi Ċiniżi, billi nużaw informazzjoni semantika rikka ta’ strutturi interni tal-kliem. L-arkitettura tagħna tuża żewġ strateġiji ewlenin. L-ewwel huwa porta maskra fuq il-karattri, li titgħallem ir-relazzjoni bejn il-karattri f’kelma. It-tieni hija operazzjoni ta’ espożizzjoni massima fuq il-kliem, li b’mod adattat issib it-taħlita ottimali tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem atomiċi u kompożittivi. Fl-aħħar nett, l-arkitettura proposta hija applikata għal diversi mudelli ta’ kompożizzjoni tas-sentenzi, li jiksbu kisbiet sostanzjali fil-prestazzjoni fuq mudelli ta’ linja bażi dwar ix-xogħol ta’ similarità tas-sentenzi.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein roman blandet karakterarkitektur for å forbedra kinesiske setningar ved å bruka rikt semantisk informasjon om ord interne strukturer. Arkitekturen vårt bruker to nøkkelstrategiar. Den første er eit maskepart på teikn, som lærer forholdet mellom teikn i eit ord. Den andre er ein maksimaliseringsoperasjon på ord, som er tilpassa å finna den optimale blanden av det atomiske og komposisjonelle ordrepresentasjonane. Etter slutt, er den foreslåde arkitekturen brukt til ulike setningsmodular, som oppnår store utviklingar over baseline-modeller på setningslinjeoppgåva.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy nową architekturę mieszanych słów charakterystycznych w celu poprawy reprezentacji zdań chińskich, wykorzystując bogate informacje semantyczne o wewnętrznych strukturach słowa. Nasza architektura wykorzystuje dwie kluczowe strategie. Pierwsza to brama maski na znaki, ucząca się relacji między znakami w słowie. Druga to maksymalna operacja na słowach, adaptacyjnie znajdująca optymalną mieszankę atomowych i kompozycyjnych reprezentacji słów. Wreszcie proponowana architektura została zastosowana do różnych modeli składu zdań, co osiąga znaczny wzrost wydajności w porównaniu z modelami bazowymi w zadaniu podobieństwa zdań.', 'ro': 'Introducem o nouă arhitectură mixtă de caracteristici pentru a îmbunătăți reprezentările frazelor chinezești, prin utilizarea informațiilor semantice bogate ale structurilor interne ale cuvintelor. Arhitectura noastră foloseşte două strategii cheie. Primul este o poartă mască pe personaje, învățând relația dintre personaje într-un cuvânt. A doua este o operație de maximizare a cuvintelor, găsind adaptiv amestecul optim al reprezentărilor atomice și compoziționale ale cuvintelor. În cele din urmă, arhitectura propusă este aplicată diferitelor modele de compoziție a propozițiilor, ceea ce obține câștiguri substanțiale de performanță față de modelele de bază în sarcina de similitudine a propozițiilor.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo roman umešan karakteristični arhitektur kako bi poboljšali predstavljanje kineske rečenice, koristeći bogate semantičke informacije o unutrašnjim strukturama riječi. Naša arhitektura koristi dve ključne strategije. Prva je vrata maske na likovima, učeći odnos među likovima u reči. Druga je maksimalna operacija na reèima, adaptivno pronalažena optimalna mješavina atomskih i kompozicionalnih reèi. Konačno, predložena arhitektura se primjenjuje na različite modele kompozicije rečenica, koji postiže značajne uspješnosti nad početnim modelima na zadatku sličnosti rečenica.', 'si': 'අපි චීනි වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් විශේෂ කරනවා කියලා, වචනය ඇතුළු සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචනයේ ප්\u200dර අපේ නිර්මාණය පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ යතුරු පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. මුලින්ම අක්ෂර වලින් මාස්ක් ගේට් එකක්, වචනයක් වලින් අක්ෂර වලින් සම්බන්ධය ඉගෙන ගන්න. දෙවෙනියේ වචනයේ විශාලය සහ සංවිධාන වචනයේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශාලයක්. අන්තිමේදි, ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විවිධ වාක්ය සංවිධානයට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් වාක්ය සංවිධානය වැඩේ විශාල', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa warqad xaraf leh oo isku qasan, si aan u kordhinno qofka xarafka ee Shiino, si aan ugu isticmaalno macluumaad taajir ah ee hadalka dhismaha gudaha ah. Tirkiyadeena wuxuu isticmaalaa laba strategiyo muhiim ah. Kii ugu horeysa waa irid mask ah oo ku qoran xaraf, oo ku baranaya xiriirka ku dhexeeya qoraal. Kii labaad waa howlo ugu baaraandegista hadalka, si habboon ah u raadinta isku xiriirka qofka nuurka iyo qofka ku qoran. Ugu dambaysta waxaa lagu codsadaa dhismaha la soo jeeday tusaalooyin qeyb-dhigyo oo kala duduwan, kaas oo faa’iido badan ka hela samooyin sameynta qoraalka hoose ee shaqada isku mid ah.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en ny blandad karaktﾃ､rsordsarkitektur fﾃｶr att fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttra kinesiska meningsrepresentationer, genom att anvﾃ､nda rik semantisk information av ord interna strukturer. Vﾃ･r arkitektur anvﾃ､nder sig av tvﾃ･ nyckelstrategier. Den fﾃｶrsta ﾃ､r en maskgrind pﾃ･ tecken, lﾃ､ra sig relationen mellan tecken i ett ord. Den andra ﾃ､r en maxpooling operation pﾃ･ ord, adaptivt hitta den optimala blandningen av atomiska och kompositionella ordrepresentationer. Slutligen tillﾃ､mpas den fﾃｶreslagna arkitekturen pﾃ･ olika meningssammansﾃ､ttningsmodeller, vilket ger betydande prestandafﾃｶrbﾃ､ttringar jﾃ､mfﾃｶrt med basmodeller fﾃｶr meningssammansﾃ､ttningsuppgifter.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய கலப்பு எழுத்து உருவாக்கி சீன வாக்கு பிரதிநிதிகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, சொல்லை உள்ளார்ந்த அமைப்புகளின் பணக்க எங்கள் கட்டமைப்பு இரண்டு முக்கிய திட்டங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. The first is a mask gate on characters, learning the relation among characters in a word.  இரண்டாவது வார்த்தைகள் மீது அதிகப்படுத்தும் செயல்பாடு, அணுக்கு மற்றும் தொகுப்பு வார்த்தைகள் குறிப்பிடும் வார் இறுதியில், பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட கட்டுப்பாடு வாக்கு உருவாக்கும் மாதிரிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும், அது பெரிய செயல்பாடு வாக்கியத்தில', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوم مختلف characterword معماری معماری پیش کرتا ہے کہ چین کی جماعت کی تعلیمات کو بہتر کرے، کلمات داخلی ساختاروں کی پوری سیمانٹیکی معلومات کے ذریعہ استعمال کریں۔ ہماری معماری دو کلید استراتژی استعمال کرتی ہے۔ پہلے ایک ماسک دروازہ ہے جو شخصوں پر ہے، ایک کلمه میں لکھنے والوں کے درمیان تعلق سکھائی جاتی ہے. دوسرا کلمات پر مکس پولینگ عملیات ہے، اتمی اور ترکیب کلمات کی اچھی مکس پیدا کرتی ہے. آخر میں، پیشنهاد کی معماری مختلف جماعت کی مثالیں پر لازم کیا جاتا ہے، جو جماعت کی مثالی کے ذریعہ بنیادی لین نمڈلوں پر زیادہ فعالیت حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Biz Xitoycha so'zning tashkilotlarini yaxshi ko'paytirish uchun o'xshash so'zlar tarkibini o'zgartirish uchun o'xshash so'zlar ichki murakkablarini yordamida o'zgartirish. Bu arxituvchimiz ikkita muhim strategiya ishlatadi. Birinchi so'z so'z harflarning bogʻlanishini o'rganish mumkin. Ikkinchi so'zlarning eng kichik ko'paytirish amalni o'zgartiradi. Aks holda, atomik va kompyuterning soʻzning optimal mixtureni topish mumkin. Oxiri, talab qilingan arxituvlar bir so'z kompyuterning modellariga qoʻllaniladi. Bu gapiring bir xil vazifasi bir xil vazifasi asosiy modellaridan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc hỗn hợp để cải thiện các mô hình chữ của Trung Quốc, bằng cách tận dụng các thông tin ngữ pháp đầy diện về cấu trúc nội bộ. Kiến trúc của chúng tôi dùng hai chiến lược. Thứ nhất là cổng che mặt của các nhân vật, học được quan hệ giữa các nhân vật trong một từ. Thứ hai là một hoạt động mở rộng theo lời nói, tìm thấy một hỗn hợp tối ưu của các biểu tượng từ nguyên tử và thành lập. Cuối cùng, cách kiến trúc được chấp nhận ra một số một khủng hộp đại đại loại một câu, chúng ta có thể hiện được khác qua một cách của cơ', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo roman pomiješan karakteristični arhitektur za poboljšanje predstavljanja kineske rečenice, koristeći bogate semantičke informacije o unutrašnjim strukturama riječi. Naša arhitektura koristi dvije ključne strategije. Prva je vrata maske na likovima, učeći odnos među likovima u riječi. Druga je maksimalna operacija prikupljanja riječima, adaptivno pronalažena optimalna mješavina atomskih i kompozicionalnih riječi. Konačno se predložena arhitektura primjenjuje na različite modele sastojanja rečenica, koji postignu značajne uspješnosti nad početnim modelima na zadatku sličnosti rečenica.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме нова архитектура със смесени характерни думи, за да подобрим представянето на китайските изречения, като използваме богата семантична информация за вътрешните структури на думите. Архитектурата ни използва две ключови стратегии. Първият е маска порта на знаците, изучавайки връзката между знаците в една дума. Втората е операция по максополагане на думи, адаптивно намираща оптималната смес от атомните и композиционните думи. И накрая, предложената архитектура се прилага към различни модели на композиция на изречения, което постига значителни подобрения на производителността спрямо базовите модели при задачата за сходство на изреченията.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een nieuwe gemengde karakterwoordarchitectuur om Chinese zinnen representaties te verbeteren, door gebruik te maken van rijke semantische informatie van woord interne structuren. Onze architectuur hanteert twee belangrijke strategieën. De eerste is een maskerpoort op karakters, het leren van de relatie tussen karakters in een woord. De tweede is een maxpooling operatie op woorden, adaptief vinden van de optimale mix van de atomaire en compositionele woordrepresentaties. Ten slotte wordt de voorgestelde architectuur toegepast op verschillende zinscompositiemodellen, wat aanzienlijke prestatiewinsten behaalt ten opzichte van basismodellen op zinsgelijkenistaak.', 'de': 'Wir führen eine neuartige Mixed Characterwort-Architektur ein, um chinesische Satzdarstellungen zu verbessern, indem reiche semantische Informationen von wortinternen Strukturen verwendet werden. Unsere Architektur verfolgt zwei Schlüsselstrategien. Das erste ist ein Maskentor auf Zeichen, das die Beziehung zwischen Zeichen in einem Wort lernt. Die zweite ist eine Maxpooling-Operation an Wörtern, die adaptiv die optimale Mischung aus atomaren und kompositorischen Wortdarstellungen findet. Schließlich wird die vorgeschlagene Architektur auf verschiedene Satzkompositionsmodelle angewendet, wodurch erhebliche Leistungszuwächse gegenüber Basismodellen bei Satzähnlichkeitsaufgaben erzielt werden.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan arsitektur kata karakter campuran novel untuk meningkatkan persembahan kalimat Cina, dengan menggunakan informasi semantis kaya dari struktur kata interna. Our architecture uses two key strategies.  Yang pertama adalah gerbang topeng pada karakter, belajar hubungan antara karakter dalam satu kata. Yang kedua adalah operasi maxpooling pada kata-kata, secara adaptif menemukan campuran optimal dari representation kata atom dan komposisi. Akhirnya, arsitektur yang diusulkan diterapkan untuk berbagai model komposisi kalimat, yang mencapai keuntungan besar dari model dasar pada tugas persamaan kalimat.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 혼합 문자어 구조를 도입하여 단어 내부 구조의 풍부한 의미 정보를 이용하여 중국어 문장의 표현을 개선했다.우리의 구조는 두 가지 관건적인 전략을 사용한다.글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에, 글자는 문에 있다.두 번째는 단어에 대해 최대 연못 조작을 하고 원자와 합성 단어가 표시하는 가장 좋은 조합을 스스로 찾아낸다.마지막으로 이 체계 구조를 각종 문장 합성 모델에 응용하여 문장의 유사성 임무에서 기선 모델보다 더 큰 성능을 향상시켰다.', 'fa': 'ما یک رمان معماری کلمه\u200cهای مختلف را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش\u200cنمایش\u200cهای جمله چینی را بهتر کند، با استفاده از اطلاعات semantic ثروتمند از ساختارهای داخلی کلمه\u200cها. معماری ما از دو استراتژی کلید استفاده می کند. اولین دروازه ماسک روی شخصیت\u200cها است، ارتباط بین شخصیت\u200cها در یک کلمه یاد می\u200cگیرد. دومین یک عملیات بزرگترین جمع کردن بر کلمات است، به طور اضافه پیدا کردن ترکیب بهترین کلمات اتمی و ترکیب. بالاخره، معماری پیشنهاد بر مدل\u200cهای ترکیب جمله\u200cهای مختلف کاربرد می\u200cشود که به انجام\u200cدهنده\u200cهای زیادی بر مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط بر روی کار مشابه\u200cی جمله می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'We introduce a novel mixed characterword architecture to improve Chinese sentence representations, by utilizing rich semantic information of word internal structures.  Ujengo wetu unatumia mbinu mbili za msingi. Ya kwanza ni mlango wa maske kwa wahusika, kujifunza uhusiano kati ya wahusika kwa neno. Kila pili ni operesheni ya upungufu kwa maneno, kwa upendeleo na kutafuta mchanganyiko bora wa uwakilishi wa neno la atomu na mikusanyiko. Mwisho, ujenzi unapendekezwa unatumiwa kwenye mifano mbalimbali ya mfumo wa hukumu, ambayo inafanikiwa ufanisi mkubwa unapata zaidi ya mifano ya msingi katika kazi sawa na hukumu.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n roman gemengde karakterwoord-arkitektuur om Sjinese setvoorspreikende te verbeter deur die ryk semantiese inligting van woord interne strukture te gebruik. Ons arkitektuur gebruik twee sleutel strategies. Die eerste is 'n maskpoort op karakters, leer die verwanting onder karakters in 'n woord. Die tweede is 'n maksimalisering operasie op woorde, adaptief die optimale gemeng van die atomiese en komponensiele woord voorstellings te vind. Eindelik is die voorgestelde arkitektuur aangepas na verskillende setinge opstellingsmodele, wat betekende prestasie verskaf oor basilyn modele op setinge gelykenis taak.", 'da': 'Vi introducerer en ny blandet karakterordsarkitektur for at forbedre kinesiske sætningsrepræsentationer ved at udnytte rig semantisk information af ord interne strukturer. Vores arkitektur bruger to nøglestrategier. Den første er en maske gate på tegn, der lærer forholdet mellem tegn i et ord. Den anden er en maxpooling operation på ord, der adaptivt finder den optimale blanding af atom- og kompositionsordrepræsentationer. Endelig anvendes den foreslåede arkitektur på forskellige sætningssammensætningsmodeller, hvilket opnår betydelige præstationsgevinster i forhold til basismodeller på sætningens lighedsopgave.', 'tr': 'Biz Çinçe sözläni gowurak etmek üçin garşylan karakterleriň arhitekturmalaryny, baý semantik sözlerin daşary strukturlarynyň bilgi ullanarak taýýarlapdyk. Biziň arhitekturymyz iki açyk stratejiýasy ulanýar. Ilkinji karakterleriň üstünde masker gapysy, sözde karakterleriň baglaýyşyny öwrenýär. İkincisi, kelimelerde en güçlü birleşme operasyonudur. Bu da atom ve compositional kelimelerin uyumlu karışıklığını bulur. Soňunda, teklip eden arhitektura dürli sözler bilen meňzeşlik nusgalaryna uygulanýar. Bu sözler meňzeşlikli zada esasy çykyş nusgalarynda esasy çykyş nusgalaryna golaýar.', 'am': 'የቻይና የቃላት መልዕክት አካባቢዎችን ለማሻሻል የመጠቀምን የሀብታም የውስጥነት መረጃ በመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ መሠረታዊነታችን ሁለት የቁልፎች strategy ይጠቅማል፡፡ የመጀመሪያው የፊደል በር በንግግር በአካላት መካከል ግንኙነት ለመማር ነው፡፡ ሁለተኛይቱ ቃላት በመጠቀም እና በአካባቢው እና የቃላት መልዕክቶችን በመጠቀም የሚቃወሙት ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ Finally, the proposed architecture is applied to various sentence composition models, which achieves substantial performance gains over baseline models on sentence similarity task.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një karakter të përzier të ri arkitekturë për të përmirësuar përfaqësimet kineze të fjalëve, duke përdorur informacion të pasur semantik të fjalëve struktura të brendshme. Arkitektura jonë përdor dy strategji kryesore. E para është një portë maske në karaktere, duke mësuar lidhjen mes karaktereve në një fjalë. E dyta është një operacion maksimumi në fjalë, duke gjetur përshtatshëm përzierjen optimale të përfaqësimeve të fjalëve atomike dhe kompozitive. Më në fund, arkitektura e propozuar zbatohet në modele të ndryshme përbërjeje të frazëve, që arrin fitime thelbësore performance mbi modelet bazë në detyrën e ngjashmërisë së frazëve.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր խառնված հիերոգլիֆ՝ ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի բարելավենք չինական նախադասությունների ներկայացումները օգտագործելով ներքին կառուցվածքների բառերի հարուստ սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվությունը Մեր ճարտարապետությունը օգտագործում է երկու կարևոր ռազմավարություն: Առաջինը դիմակայի դարպասն է հերոսների վրա, ուսումնասիրելով հերոսների հարաբերությունը բառի մեջ: Երկրորդը բառերի մեծ բացահայտություն է, որն ադապտիվ գտնում է ատոմային և բառերի բաղադրամասերի լավագույն խառնուրդը: Finally, the proposed architecture is applied to various sentence composition models, which achieves substantial performance gains over baseline models on sentence similarity task.', 'ca': "Introduïm una nova arquitectura de paraules de caràcter mixte per millorar les representacions de frases xineses, utilitzant la riquesa informació semàntica de paraules estructures internes. Our architecture uses two key strategies.  La primera és una porta de màscares en caràcters, aprenent la relació entre caràcters en una paraula. The second is a maxpooling operation on words, adaptively finding the optimal mixture of the atomic and compositional word representations.  Finalment, l'arquitectura proposada s'aplica a diversos models de composició de frases, que aconsegueix guanys substancials de rendiment en comparació amb els models de base en tasca de similitud de frases.", 'bn': 'আমরা চীনা বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিদের উন্নত করার জন্য একটি উপন্যাসের মিশ্রিত অক্ষরের কাঠামো পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, যার ফলে শব্দের অভ্যন্তরীণ আমাদের প্রতিষ্ঠান দুই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কৌশল ব্যবহার করে। প্রথমটি একটি অক্ষরের মুখোশ গেট, একটি শব্দের মধ্যে অক্ষরের সম্পর্ক শিখছে। দ্বিতীয়টি হলো শব্দের উপর এক ব্যাপকপুলিং কার্যক্রম, যার মাধ্যমে পারমাণবিক এবং সংযুক্ত শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের অপ্র শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রস্তাবিত স্থাপনের কাঠামো বিভিন্ন বাক্য সংক্রান্ত মডেলে প্রয়োগ করা হয়, যা বাক্যের সমতামূলক কাজে বেসাইলাইন মডেলের উপর প', 'az': 'Biz Çin sözlərin təsirlərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün qarışıq karakter sözlərinin arhitektarını təşkil edirik. Bütün sözlərin iç yapılarının zəngin semantik məlumatlarını istifadə edirik. Bizim arhitektarımız iki düzgün strateji istifadə edir. Əvvəlkiləri cüzələr üzərində mask a qapısıdır, sözlərdə cüzələr arasındakı bağlantını öyrənir. İkincisi, atom və kompozisyonel sözlərin müəyyən edilməsinin optimal karışığını görünür. Sonunda, təbliğ edilmiş arhitektura cümlələrdən bənzər məsələlər kompozisyonu modellərə uyğunlaşdırılır ki, bu cümlələrdən bənzər işləri barəsində çox böyük performanslıq nəticəsini artırar.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo roman pomiješan karakteristični arhitektur za poboljšanje predstavljanja kineske rečenice, koristeći bogate semantičke informacije o unutrašnjim strukturama riječi. Naša arhitektura koristi dvije ključne strategije. Prva je vrata maske na likovima, učeći odnos među likovima u riječi. Druga je maksimalna operacija na riječima, adaptivno pronalažena optimalna mješavina atomskih i kompozicionalnih riječi. Na kraju, predložena arhitektura se primjenjuje na različite modele kompozicije rečenica, koji postigne značajne uspješnosti nad početnim modelima na zadatku sličnosti rečenica.', 'et': 'Tutvustame uudset segatud iseloomulikku arhitektuuri, et parandada hiina lauseesitusi, kasutades rikkalikku semantilist infot sõnasisestest struktuuridest. Meie arhitektuur kasutab kahte peamist strateegiat. Esimene on mask värav märkidele, õppides sõna märkide vahelist seost. Teine on sõnade maxpooling operatsioon, mis adaptiivselt leiab optimaalse segu aatomi ja kompositsioonilise sõna representatsioonidest. Lõpuks rakendatakse kavandatud arhitektuuri erinevatele lausekompositsiooni mudelitele, mis saavutavad märkimisväärse tulemuslikkuse võrreldes algmudelitega lausesarnasuse ülesandel.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uudenlaisen yhdistelm瓣sanaarkkitehtuurin kiinalaisten lauseiden esitt瓣misen parantamiseksi hy繹dynt瓣m瓣ll瓣 runsaasti semanttista tietoa sanan sis瓣isist瓣 rakenteista. Arkkitehtuurimme k瓣ytt瓣瓣 kahta keskeist瓣 strategiaa. Ensimm瓣inen on naamioportti merkkej瓣, oppimalla merkkien suhde sanan. Toinen on sanoihin kohdistuva maxpooling-operaatio, jossa etsit瓣瓣n adaptiivisesti optimaalinen seos atomi- ja kompositiivisista sanaesityksist瓣. Lopuksi ehdotettua arkkitehtuuria sovelletaan erilaisiin lauseiden koostumusmalleihin, mik瓣 saavuttaa huomattavan suorituskyvyn verrattuna perusmalleihin lauseidensamankaltaisuusteht瓣v瓣ss瓣.', 'cs': 'Představujeme novou architekturu smíšených charakterů slova pro zlepšení reprezentace čínských vět využitím bohatých sémantických informací slovních vnitřních struktur. Naše architektura používá dvě klíčové strategie. První je masková brána na znaky, která se učí vztah mezi znaky ve slově. Druhým je maxpooling operace na slovech, adaptivně nalezení optimální směsi atomových a kompozičních slovních reprezentací. V závěru je navržená architektura aplikována na různé modely složení vět, které dosahují značného výkonu oproti základním modelům pro úlohu podobnosti vět.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nglanggar nganggo dolanan ping kelas karbote architecture sing nggawe ngubah ujian Seneng pisan, iso nggambar kelas semantar seneng nggawe barang sampeyan wigat architecture Awak dhéwé ing kuwi mask kuwi nganggo caratar, mlaku nggawe caratar nang awak dhéwé. Sampeyan tanggal Lha wiwit, akeh supoyo architecture sing aplikasi kanggo model sampeyan nggawe sapar kang dadi, sing rumangno dhéwé nggawe barang kelas kuwi model sing bisa diagonalan sampeyan ketahan.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani noveli wanda aka haɗa maganar cikin salon da aka canza tsarin mai tsarin maganar China, da kuma za mu yi amfani da matalauci na tsarin maganar masu cikin tsari. An yi amfani da matsayinmu biyu masu muhimmi. Babu farkon yana da ƙõfa mai fuskar kwamfyuta kan karatun, kuma yana sanar da mazaɓa daga takardar cikin kalma. Dukkan na shine wani aikin maxpoopool a kan magana, mai daidai, kuma yana sami da haɗin da maganar atomic and composition. Ga ƙarshe, an applies an buƙata tsarin da aka buƙata zuwa misãlai masu cikin tsari, da za'a sami da babban ajiya ya kan misalin layin da ke daidaita aiki.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה של מילים מעורבות חדשה כדי לשפר מייצגי משפטים סינים, על ידי השימוש במידע סמנטי עשיר של מילים מבנים פנימיים. הארכיטקטורה שלנו משתמשת בשני אסטרטגיות מפתחיות. הראשון הוא שער מסיכה על דמויות, ללמוד את היחסים בין הדמויות במילה. השנייה היא פעולה מקסיפולית על מילים, למצוא באופן מתאים את התערבות האופטימלית של מילים אטומיות ומרכיבות. Finally, the proposed architecture is applied to various sentence composition models, which achieves substantial performance gains over baseline models on sentence similarity task.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo novo arhitekturo mešanih značilnih besed za izboljšanje kitajskih stavkov z uporabo bogatih semantičnih informacij besednih notranjih struktur. Naša arhitektura uporablja dve ključni strategiji. Prva je maska vrata na znake, ki se učijo razmerja med znaki v besedi. Drugi je maxpooling operacija na besedah, prilagodljivo iskanje optimalne mešanice atomskih in kompozicijskih besednih reprezentacij. Nazadnje se predlagana arhitektura uporablja za različne modele kompozicije stavkov, s čimer doseže znatno večjo zmogljivost v primerjavi z osnovnimi modeli pri nalogi podobnosti stavkov.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཚིག་ཚང་མས་སུ་འདྲ་བརྗོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྩལ་བ་ཅིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཀོད་གཞུང་གཙོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གཉིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དང་པོ་དེ་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཐོག་ཏུ་གདོང་ཁེབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་རེད། ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཅིག་ནང་གི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་བ་དང་འབྲེ གཉིས་པ་དེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐོག་ལས་ཆེ་ཤོས་མཇུག་བསྡུས་པའི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཅིག་རེད། སྒྲིག་ཆེན་གྱི་རྩ་བ་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་ མཐའ་མར་འཁྲིད་དུ། སྤྲོད་ཟིན་པའི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་གཞི་འདི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚིག་རྩོམ་པ་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'High-risk learning : acquiring new word vectors from tiny data', 'ar': 'التعلم عالي المخاطر: الحصول على متجهات كلمات جديدة من البيانات الصغيرة', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de alto risco: adquirindo novos vetores de palavras a partir de dados minúsculos', 'fr': 'Apprentissage à haut risque\xa0: acquisition de nouveaux vecteurs de mots à partir de données', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de alto riesgo: adquisición de nuevos vectores de palabras a partir de pequeños datos', 'ja': 'リスクの高い学習：小さなデータから新しい単語ベクトルを取得する', 'zh': '高风险学:取新词向量于微数', 'hi': 'उच्च जोखिम सीखने: छोटे डेटा से नए शब्द वैक्टर प्राप्त करना', 'ru': 'Обучение с высоким риском: получение новых векторов слов из крошечных данных', 'ga': 'Foghlaim ardriosca: veicteoirí focal nua a fháil ó shonraí bídeacha', 'ka': 'მაღალი რისკის სწავლება: ახალი სიტყვის გვექტორები ცოტა მონაცემებით', 'hu': 'Nagy kockázatú tanulás: új szóvektorok beszerzése apró adatokból', 'el': 'Μάθηση υψηλού κινδύνου: απόκτηση νέων διανυσμάτων λέξεων από μικροσκοπικά δεδομένα', 'it': 'Apprendimento ad alto rischio: acquisizione di nuovi vettori di parole da piccoli dati', 'lt': 'Didelės rizikos mokymasis: naujų žodžių vektorių įsigijimas iš mažų duomenų', 'kk': 'Жоғары қауіпсіздік оқыту: кішкентай деректерден жаңа сөз векторларын алу', 'mk': 'Високо ризично учење: купување нови вектори на зборови од мали податоци', 'ms': 'High-risk learning: acquiring new word vectors from tiny data', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d അപകടം പഠിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Tagħlim b’riskju għoli: akkwist ta’ vetturi ġodda ta’ kliem minn dejta żgħira', 'mn': 'Өндөр эрсдэлтэй суралцах: жижиг мэдээллээс шинэ үг векторуудыг', 'no': 'Høg risikolæring: hentar nye ordvektorar frå små data', 'pl': 'Nauka o wysokim ryzyku: pozyskiwanie nowych wektorów słów z małych danych', 'ro': 'Învățare cu risc ridicat: dobândirea de noi vectori de cuvinte din date mici', 'sr': 'Nauèenje visokog rizika: prikupljanje novih vektora reèi iz malih podataka', 'si': 'පොඩි දත්තෙන් අලුත් වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් ගන්න', 'sv': 'Hög risk lärande: förvärva nya ordvektorer från små data', 'ta': 'அதிக ஆபத்தால் கற்றுக்கொள்வது: சிறிய தரவுகளிலிருந்து புதிய வார்த்தை நெறிகளை பெறுவது', 'so': 'Waxbarashada khatarka ah: ka helashada wado macluumaad yar', 'ur': 'بلند خطر کی تعلیم: نئی لفظ ویکتروں کو چھوٹے ڈیٹے سے حاصل کرنا', 'uz': "Yuqori xavfli o'rganish: kichkina maʼlumotdan yangi so'zlar vektorlarini olish", 'vi': 'Học về rủi ro cao: phát hiện các từ mới từ trường truyền từ nhỏ', 'nl': 'Hoog risico leren: nieuwe woordvectoren verwerven uit kleine gegevens', 'da': 'Læring med høj risiko: erhvervelse af nye ordvektorer fra små data', 'hr': 'Naučenje visokog rizika: nabavljanje novih vektora riječi iz malih podataka', 'id': 'Belajar risiko tinggi: memperoleh vektor kata baru dari data kecil', 'fa': 'یادگیری ریسک بالا: خریدن ویکتورهای کلمه جدید از داده های کوچک', 'bg': 'Високо рисково учене: придобиване на нови вектори на думи от малки данни', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa hatari kubwa: kupata vectors mpya wa maneno kutoka taarifa ndogo', 'ko': '고위험 학습: 마이크로 데이터에서 새로운 단어 벡터 얻기', 'tr': 'Yüksek riskli öğrenmek:ufak verilerden yeni kelime vektörlerini elde etmek', 'de': 'Risikoreiches Lernen: Neue Wortvektoren aus winzigen Daten erwerben', 'af': 'Hoog risiko leer: nuwe woord vektore vanaf klein data verkry', 'sq': 'Mësimi me rrezik të lartë: marrja e vektorëve të reja fjalësh nga të dhëna të vogla', 'am': 'ከታናሽ ዳታዎች አዲስ ቃላት vector ማግኘት', 'bn': 'উচ্চ ঝুঁকির শিক্ষা: ছোট তথ্য থেকে নতুন শব্দ ভেক্টর পাওয়া যাচ্ছে', 'ca': 'High-risk learning: acquiring new word vectors from tiny data', 'hy': 'բարձր ռիսկի սովորելը. նոր բառերի վեկտորներ ստանալը փոքրիկ տվյալներից', 'et': 'Kõrge riskiga õppimine: uute sõnavaktorite omandamine väikestest andmetest', 'az': 'Y칲ksek riskli 칬yr톛nm톛k: ki칞ik m톛lumatlardan yeni s칬z vekt칬rl톛rini almaq', 'bs': 'Učenje visokog rizika: nabavljanje novih vektora riječi iz malih podataka', 'cs': 'Vysoce rizikové učení: získávání nových slovních vektorů z malých dat', 'fi': 'Riskipohjainen oppiminen: uusien sanavektorien hankkiminen pienestä datasta', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': 'Yin amfani da halin mai girma: domin sami shiryoyi na zane daga dane masu ƙarami', 'sk': 'Učenje z visokim tveganjem: pridobivanje novih besednih vektorjev iz drobnih podatkov', 'he': 'למידה בסיכון גבוה: לקבל ווקטורים מילים חדשים ממידע קטן', 'bo': 'ཆུང་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་པ། ཆུང་ཆུང་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་གྲངས་རིགས་གསར་བ་སྤྲོད་ནས་'}
{'en': 'Distributional semantics models are known to struggle with small data. It is generally accepted that in order to learn ‘a good vector’ for a word, a model must have sufficient examples of its usage. This contradicts the fact that humans can guess the meaning of a word from a few occurrences only. In this paper, we show that a neural language model such as Word2Vec only necessitates minor modifications to its standard architecture to learn new terms from tiny data, using background knowledge from a previously learnt semantic space. We test our model on word definitions and on a nonce task involving 2-6 sentences’ worth of context, showing a large increase in performance over state-of-the-art models on the definitional task.', 'ar': 'من المعروف أن نماذج دلالات التوزيع تكافح مع البيانات الصغيرة. من المقبول عمومًا أنه من أجل تعلم "ناقل جيد" لكلمة ما ، يجب أن يحتوي النموذج على أمثلة كافية لاستخدامه. هذا يتناقض مع حقيقة أن البشر يمكنهم تخمين معنى كلمة من مرات قليلة فقط. في هذه الورقة ، نوضح أن نموذج اللغة العصبية مثل Word2Vec لا يتطلب سوى تعديلات طفيفة على بنيته القياسية لتعلم مصطلحات جديدة من البيانات الدقيقة ، باستخدام المعرفة الخلفية من الفضاء الدلالي الذي تم تعلمه سابقًا. نحن نختبر نموذجنا على تعريفات الكلمات وعلى مهمة غير متوقعة تتضمن سياق 2-6 جمل ، مما يُظهر زيادة كبيرة في الأداء على أحدث النماذج في مهمة التعريف.', 'pt': "Os modelos de semântica distributiva são conhecidos por lutar com dados pequenos. É geralmente aceito que para aprender 'um bom vetor' para uma palavra, um modelo deve ter exemplos suficientes de seu uso. Isso contradiz o fato de que os humanos podem adivinhar o significado de uma palavra apenas a partir de algumas ocorrências. Neste artigo, mostramos que um modelo de linguagem neural como o Word2Vec necessita apenas de pequenas modificações em sua arquitetura padrão para aprender novos termos a partir de dados minúsculos, usando conhecimento prévio de um espaço semântico aprendido anteriormente. Testamos nosso modelo em definições de palavras e em uma tarefa nonce envolvendo 2-6 sentenças de contexto, mostrando um grande aumento no desempenho em relação aos modelos de última geração na tarefa de definição.", 'es': 'Se sabe que los modelos de semántica distributiva tienen problemas con los datos pequeños. En general, se acepta que para aprender «un buen vector» de una palabra, un modelo debe tener suficientes ejemplos de su uso. Esto contradice el hecho de que los humanos solo pueden adivinar el significado de una palabra a partir de unos pocos casos. En este artículo, mostramos que un modelo de lenguaje neuronal como Word2Vec solo necesita pequeñas modificaciones en su arquitectura estándar para aprender nuevos términos a partir de datos diminutos, utilizando conocimientos previos de un espacio semántico previamente aprendido. Probamos nuestro modelo en definiciones de palabras y en una tarea de un solo uso que implica un contexto de 2 a 6 oraciones, lo que demuestra un gran aumento en el rendimiento sobre los modelos más avanzados en la tarea de definición.', 'fr': "Les modèles sémantiques distributionnels sont connus pour avoir du mal à traiter de petites données. Il est généralement admis que pour apprendre «\xa0un bon vecteur\xa0» pour un mot, un modèle doit avoir suffisamment d'exemples de son utilisation. Cela contredit le fait que les humains peuvent deviner le sens d'un mot à partir de quelques occurrences seulement. Dans cet article, nous montrons qu'un modèle de langage neuronal tel que Word2Vec ne nécessite que des modifications mineures de son architecture standard pour apprendre de nouveaux termes à partir de données minuscules, en utilisant les connaissances de base d'un espace sémantique précédemment appris. Nous testons notre modèle sur des définitions de mots et sur une tâche unique impliquant 2 à 6 phrases de contexte, ce qui montre une augmentation importante des performances par rapport aux modèles de pointe sur la tâche de définition.", 'ja': '分布意味論モデルは、小さなデータでは困難であることが知られている。一般に、単語の「良いベクトル」を学習するためには、モデルがその使用例を十分に持っていなければならないことが認められています。これは、人間がわずかな出現から単語の意味を推測できるという事実と矛盾する。この論文では、Word 2 Vecのような神経言語モデルは、以前に学習した意味空間からの背景知識を使用して、小さなデータから新しい用語を学習するために、その標準的なアーキテクチャにわずかな修正を必要とするだけであることを示している。私たちは、単語の定義と2〜6文の文脈に関わるノンスタスクでモデルをテストし、定義タスクの最先端モデルよりもパフォーマンスが大幅に向上していることを示します。', 'zh': '众所周知,布语义形势,小数之难也。 人普遍认为学一单词之善向量,一形必足法示例。 此与人徒数揣单词义事相违也。 若Word2Vec之神经,但须微改其法架构,则以前学语义空中背景从微数中学新术语。 吾于单词义与2-6句之上下文随机数试吾形,显与定义之先进,性能大大提高也。', 'ru': 'Известно, что модели семантики распределения борются с небольшими данными. Общепринято, что для того, чтобы выучить «хороший вектор» для слова, модель должна иметь достаточные примеры его использования. Это противоречит тому факту, что люди могут догадываться о значении слова только из нескольких случаев. В этой статье мы показываем, что модель нейронного языка, такая как Word2Vec, требует лишь незначительных изменений в своей стандартной архитектуре, чтобы выучить новые термины из крошечных данных, используя фоновые знания из ранее изученного семантического пространства. Мы тестируем нашу модель на определениях слов и на одноразовой задаче, включающей контекст стоимостью 2-6 предложений, показывая значительное увеличение производительности по сравнению с современными моделями на задаче определения.', 'hi': "वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ मॉडल छोटे डेटा के साथ संघर्ष करने के लिए जाने जाते हैं। यह आम तौर पर स्वीकार किया जाता है कि एक शब्द के लिए 'एक अच्छा वेक्टर' सीखने के लिए, एक मॉडल में इसके उपयोग के पर्याप्त उदाहरण होने चाहिए। यह इस तथ्य के विपरीत है कि मनुष्य केवल कुछ घटनाओं से एक शब्द के अर्थ का अनुमान लगा सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम दिखाते हैं कि Word2Vec जैसे एक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल को केवल छोटे डेटा से नए शब्दों को सीखने के लिए अपने मानक वास्तुकला में मामूली संशोधनों की आवश्यकता होती है, जो पहले से सीखे गए शब्दार्थ स्थान से पृष्ठभूमि ज्ञान का उपयोग करता है। हम शब्द परिभाषाओं पर और एक nonce कार्य पर हमारे मॉडल का परीक्षण करते हैं जिसमें 2-6 वाक्यों के संदर्भ के लायक शामिल होते हैं, जो परिभाषात्मक कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक मॉडल पर प्रदर्शन में बड़ी वृद्धि दिखाते हैं।", 'ga': "Is eol go mbíonn samhlacha semantice dáileacháin ag streachailt le sonraí beaga. Glactar leis go ginearálta go gcaithfidh go leor samplaí dá úsáid a bheith ag samhail chun `veicteoir maith' a fhoghlaim d'fhocal. Tagann sé seo salach ar an bhfíric gur féidir le daoine buille faoi thuairim a dhéanamh ar bhrí focal ó chúpla teagmhas amháin. Sa pháipéar seo, léirímid nach gá ach mionathruithe ar a ailtireacht chaighdeánach ó mhúnla néartheanga ar nós Word2Vec chun téarmaí nua a fhoghlaim ó shonraí bídeacha, ag baint úsáide as eolas cúlra ó spás séimeantach a foghlaimíodh cheana. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár múnla ar shainmhínithe focal agus ar thasc neamhshuntasach a bhaineann le comhthéacs 2-6 abairt, rud a léiríonn méadú mór ar fheidhmíocht thar mhúnlaí úrscothacha ar an tasc sainmhínithe.", 'hu': 'Az elosztási szemantikai modellek ismertek, hogy küzdenek a kis adatokkal. Általánosan elfogadott, hogy ahhoz, hogy egy szó "jó vektort" tanulhasson, a modellnek elegendő példával kell rendelkeznie a használatára. Ez ellentmond annak a ténynek, hogy az emberek csak néhány esetből tudják kitalálni egy szó jelentését. Ebben a tanulmányban megmutatjuk, hogy egy olyan neurális nyelvi modell, mint a Word2Vec, csak kisebb módosításokra van szükség a szabványos architektúrájában ahhoz, hogy új kifejezéseket tanuljon apró adatokból, egy korábban megtanult szemantikai térből származó háttér felhasználásával. Modellünket szódefiníciókon és egy 2-6 mondat kontextusát magában foglaló nonce feladaton teszteljük, ami a definíciós feladat korszerű modelljeihez képest jelentős teljesítménynövekedést mutat.', 'el': 'Τα διανεμητικά σημασιολογικά μοντέλα είναι γνωστό ότι αγωνίζονται με μικρά δεδομένα. Είναι γενικά αποδεκτό ότι για να μάθουν "ένα καλό διάνυσμα" για μια λέξη, ένα μοντέλο πρέπει να έχει επαρκή παραδείγματα χρήσης του. Αυτό έρχεται σε αντίθεση με το γεγονός ότι οι άνθρωποι μπορούν να μαντέψουν το νόημα μιας λέξης μόνο από μερικά γεγονότα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, δείχνουμε ότι ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής γλώσσας όπως το απαιτεί μόνο μικρές τροποποιήσεις στην τυποποιημένη αρχιτεκτονική του για να μάθει νέους όρους από μικροσκοπικά δεδομένα, χρησιμοποιώντας γνώσεις υποβάθρου από έναν προηγουμένως μαθημένο σημασιολογικό χώρο. Δοκιμάζουμε το μοντέλο μας σε ορισμούς λέξεων και σε μια μη εργασία που περιλαμβάνει την αξία του πλαισίου των 2-6 προτάσεων, δείχνοντας μια μεγάλη αύξηση στην απόδοση σε σχέση με τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα για την καθορισμένη εργασία.', 'ka': "დისტრაციონალური სიმენტიკის მოდელები უცნობიან, რომ პატარა მონაცემებით მუშაობენ. საერთოდ მიღება, რომ საერთო სიტყვის `კარგი ვაკტორი' სწავლად, მოდელის მაგალითი გამოყენების მაგალითები უნდა იყოს. ეს მხოლოდ ცოტა, რომ ადამიანები შეუძლიათ გადაფიქროთ სიტყვას მხოლოდ რამდენიმე მოვლენებიდან. ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ნეიროლური ენის მოდელი, როგორც Word2Vec, მხოლოდ უნდა მისი სტანდარტურის სტანდარტურაციაში ცოტა შეცვლების შესახებ ახალი სიტყვები ცოტა მონაცემების გამოყენება ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელეში შევცვალობთ სიტყვების განსაზღვრებით და კონტექსტის უფრო მნიშვნელობით 2-6 სიტყვების მოსაზღვრებით, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულ დასაზღვრებით უფრო დიდი გამოიყ", 'it': 'I modelli semantici distributivi sono noti per lottare con piccoli dati. È generalmente accettato che per imparare "un buon vettore" per una parola, un modello deve avere esempi sufficienti del suo utilizzo. Questo contraddice il fatto che gli esseri umani possono indovinare il significato di una parola solo da pochi eventi. In questo articolo, mostriamo che un modello di linguaggio neurale come Word2Vec richiede solo piccole modifiche alla sua architettura standard per imparare nuovi termini da piccoli dati, utilizzando conoscenze di base da uno spazio semantico precedentemente appreso. Testiamo il nostro modello sulle definizioni delle parole e su un compito nonce che coinvolge il valore di contesto di 2-6 frasi, mostrando un grande aumento delle prestazioni rispetto ai modelli più moderni sul compito definizionale.', 'kk': "Шағын деректермен күресу үшін таратылған семантикалық үлгілер белгіледі. Бұл сөз үшін 'жақсы вектор' дегенді үйрену үшін үлгісін қолдану үшін үлгісін қолдану үшін жеткілікті мысалдар болу керек. Бұл адамдар тек бірнеше жағдайдан сөздің мәліметін ойлауға болады. Бұл қағазда Word2Vec секілді невралдық тіл үлгісінің тек стандартты архитектурасының жаңа терминдерді кішкентай деректерден үйрену үшін, алдыңғы оқылған семантикалық орындан аясы білімін қолдану үшін, жаңа терминдерді о Біз үлгімізді сөздердің анықтамасына және 2-6 сөздердің контекстігіне қатысты тапсырманы тексеріп, анықтамалы тапсырманың күй- жай моделдеріне көп өзгерту үшін көрсетеді.", 'lt': 'Žinoma, kad pasiskirstymo semantikos modeliai kovoja su mažais duomenimis. Paprastai pripažįstama, kad norint išmokti žodžio „gerą vektorių“, model is turi turėti pakankamai jo naudojimo pavyzdžių. Tai prieštarauja faktui, kad žmonės gali spėti žodžio reikšmę tik iš kelių įvykių. Šiame dokumente parodomi, kad tokiu nervinės kalbos modeliu kaip Word2Vec reikalingi tik nedideli standartinės architektūros pakeitimai, kad būtų išmokti nauji terminai iš nedidelių duomenų, naudojant fonines žinias iš anksčiau išmoktos semantinės erdvės. Bandome savo model į žodžių apibrėžimų ir nesąmoniškos užduoties, apimančios 2–6 sakinių vertę, konteksto atžvilgiu, rodydami didelį rezultatų padidėjimą, palyginti su naujausiais modeliais apibrėžimo užduoties atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Се знае дека моделите на дистрибуционална семантика се борат со мали податоци. Генерално се прифаќа дека за да се научи „добар вектор“ за збор, моделот мора да има доволни примери за неговата употреба. Ова се спротивставува на фактот дека луѓето можат да го погодат значењето на збор само од неколку случаи. Во овој весник покажуваме дека моделот на нервен јазик како што е Word2Vec бара само мали модификации на својата стандардна архитектура за да научи нови термини од мали податоци, користејќи го знаењето на позадината од претходно научен семантичен простор. Ние го тестираме нашиот модел на дефиниции на зборови и на неверојатна задача вклучувајќи контекст вреден од 2-6 реченици, покажувајќи големо зголемување на перформансите во однос на најсовремените модели на дефиницијалната задача.', 'ms': "Model semantik distribusi diketahui untuk berjuang dengan data kecil. It is generally accepted that in order to learn `a good vector' for a word, a model must have sufficient examples of its usage.  Ini bertentangan dengan fakta bahawa manusia boleh menebak makna perkataan dari beberapa kejadian sahaja. Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa model bahasa saraf seperti Word2Vec hanya memerlukan perubahan kecil kepada arkitektur piawainya untuk belajar terma baru dari data kecil, menggunakan pengetahuan latar belakang dari ruang semantik yang telah belajar sebelumnya. Kami menguji model kami pada definisi perkataan dan pada tugas nonce yang melibatkan nilai konteks 2-6 kalimat, menunjukkan peningkatan besar dalam prestasi daripada model-state-of-the-art pada tugas definisi.", 'ml': "ചെറിയ വിവരങ്ങളുമായി പൊരുതുന്നതിനായി വിതരണ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d അറിയുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കിന് 'നല്ല വെക്റ്റര്\u200d' പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി സാധാരണ സ്വീകരിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് ഇത് മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു വാക്കിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം ഊഹിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു എന്നതിനെ വിരോധമാക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു, വോര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്ക് പോലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മാത്രമേ അതിന്റെ സാധാരണ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നതിലേക്കുള്ള ചെ വാക്കുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങളിലും 2-6 വാക്കുകളുടെ വിലയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു വിഡ്ഢിത്ത ജോലിയിലും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. നിശ്ചയിക്ക", 'mt': 'Il-mudelli semantiċi distributtivi huma magħrufa li jbatu minn dejta żgħira. Huwa ġeneralment a ċċettat li sabiex jitgħallem “vettur tajjeb” għal kelma, mudell għandu jkollu eżempji suffiċjenti tal-użu tiegħu. Dan jikkontradixxi l-fatt li l-bnedmin jistgħu jaħsbu t-tifsira ta’ kelma minn ftit okkorrenzi biss. F’dan id-dokument, naraw li mudell ta’ lingwa newrali bħal Word2Vec jeħtieġ biss modifiki minuri fl-arkitettura standard tiegħu biex jitgħallmu termini ġodda minn dejta minuri, bl-użu ta’ għarfien fl-isfond minn spazju semantiku li kien jitgħallem qabel. Aħna nistestjaw il-mudell tagħna fuq id-definizzjonijiet tal-kliem u fuq kompitu nonce li jinvolvi l-valur tal-kuntest ta’ 2-6 sentenzi, li juri żieda kbira fil-prestazzjoni fuq mudelli l-aktar avvanzati fuq il-kompitu definittiv.', 'mn': 'Хувьсгалтын семантик загварууд жижиг өгөгдлийн мэдээллээр тэмцэх боломжтой. Үүнийг "сайн вектор" суралцахын тулд загварын хэрэглээ хангалттай жишээ авч болно. Энэ нь хүмүүс зөвхөн хэд хэдэн үйл явдлын утгыг тодорхойлж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Word2Vec гэх мэт мэдрэлийн хэл загвар нь зөвхөн стандарт архитектурын бага зэрэг бага зэрэгцээ өөрчлөлтийг бага өгөгдлийн шинэ хэлбэрээс сурах хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид үгийн тодорхойлолт болон 2-6 өгүүлбэрийн үнэ цэнэтэй ажлын тухай загварыг шалгаж, тодорхойлолтын ажил дээрх урлагийн загварын үнэ цэнэтэй үйл ажиллагааг маш их нэмэгдүүлж байна.', 'no': 'Name Det er vanlegvis godteken at for å lære ein god vektor for eit ord, må eit modell ha nok eksempel på bruken av det. Dette gjer mot faktum at mennesker kan gjeta betydninga til eit ord berre frå noen forekomst. I denne papiret viser vi at eit neuralspråk-modell, som Word2Vec, berre treng mindre endringar til standard arkitekturen sin for å lære nye uttrykk frå små data, ved å bruka bakgrunnsinnskap frå eit tidlegare lært semantisk plass. Vi tester modellen vårt på orddefinisjonar og på eit nyttig oppgåve som involverer verdien av 2-6 setningar i kontekst, viser ein stor økning i utviklinga over kunstmodeller på den definisjonale oppgåva.', 'ro': 'Modelele semantice distribuționale sunt cunoscute pentru a lupta cu date mici. Este general acceptat faptul că, pentru a învăța "un vector bun" pentru un cuvânt, un model trebuie să aibă suficiente exemple de utilizare a acestuia. Acest lucru contrazice faptul că oamenii pot ghici sensul unui cuvânt doar din câteva evenimente. În această lucrare, arătăm că un model de limbaj neural precum Word2Vec necesită modificări minore ale arhitecturii sale standard pentru a învăța termeni noi din date mici, folosind cunoștințe de fundal dintr-un spațiu semantic învățat anterior. Testăm modelul nostru pe definiții de cuvinte și pe o sarcină nonce care implică contextul de 2-6 propoziții, arătând o creștere semnificativă a performanțelor față de modelele de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește sarcina definițională.', 'pl': 'Dystrybucyjne modele semantyczne są znane z walki z małymi danymi. Ogólnie przyjmuje się, że aby nauczyć się "dobrego wektora" dla słowa, model musi mieć wystarczające przykłady jego użycia. Jest to sprzeczne z faktem, że ludzie mogą odgadnąć znaczenie słowa tylko z kilku zdarzeń. W niniejszym artykule pokazujemy, że neuronowy model języka, taki jak Word2Vec, wymaga tylko drobnych modyfikacji swojej standardowej architektury, aby nauczyć się nowych terminów z małych danych, wykorzystując wiedzę tła z wcześniej poznanej przestrzeni semantycznej. Testujemy nasz model na definicjach słów oraz na zadaniu nonce obejmującym kontekst wartości 2-6 zdań, pokazując duży wzrost wydajności w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi modelami zadania definicyjnego.', 'sr': 'Distribucioni semantički modeli su poznati da se bore sa malim podacima. Obično je prihvaćeno da, kako bi naučio "dobar vektor" za reč, model mora imati dovoljno primjera korištenja. To se suprotstavlja činjenici da ljudi mogu pogoditi smisao reči samo od nekoliko događaja. U ovom papiru pokazujemo da neuralni jezik model poput Word2Vec zahteva samo manje modifikacije standardne arhitekture da nauči nove uslove iz malih podataka, koristeći pozadinske znanje iz prethodno naučenog semantičkog prostora. Testiramo naš model o definicijama riječi i o nekom zadatku koji uključuje vrednost 2-6 rečenica u kontekstu, pokazujući veliki povećanje učinka nad modelima stanja umjetnosti na određenom zadatku.', 'si': "පොඩි තොරතුරු සමඟ සැමැන්ටික් මොඩල් දන්නවා. ඒක සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් පිළිගන්නවා ඒක වචනයකට `හොඳ වෙක්ටර්' කියලා ඉගෙන ගන්න, මොඩල් එකක් ඒකේ භාවිතාවට ප්\u200dරතිපා මේක විරුද්ධ වෙන්නේ මිනිස්සුන්ට පුළුවන් වචනයක් අදහස් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ Word2Vec වගේ න්\u200dයූරාල භාෂා මොඩල් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනස් විතරයි එයාගේ ප්\u200dරමාණ විද්\u200dයාපකයේ පොඩි දත්තෙන් අලුත්  අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා වචන විශ්වාස කරනවා වචන විශ්වාස කරනවා වචන 2-6 වචන විශ්වාස කරනවා, විශ්වාස කර්මයේ විශාල විශාල විශාල විශ", 'so': "Tusaalooyinka qaybsiga waxaa loo yaqaan inay la dagaalamaan macluumaad yar. Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo aqbalaa in si aad u barto `vector wanaagsan' hadal, tusaale ahaan waa in uu heystaa tusaalooyin ku filan isticmaalkiisa. Tani waxay ka leedahay xaqiiqdii in dadku awoodi karo in micneheeda ereyga ay ka soo jeedaan wax yar oo keliya. Qoraalkan waxaynu muujinnaa in tusaale ahaan qoraal afka neurada ah oo Word2Vec oo kaliya u baahan yahay isbedelka dhismaha caadiga ah si ay u barto qoraal cusub oo laga barto macluumaadka yar, isticmaalo aqoonta bakhtiga ah oo uu horay u baray sawir. Tusaalkayaga waxaan ku tijaabinaynaa sawirida hadalka iyo shaqo aan waxqaban lahayn oo ku saabsan labada-6 imtixaanka, waxaana tusinayaa siyaabo badan oo ku kordhiya sameynta qoraalka farshaxanka ah oo ku saabsan shaqada cayimanta.", 'sv': 'Distributionssemantiska modeller är kända för att kämpa med små data. Det är allmänt accepterat att en modell för att lära sig "en bra vektor" för ett ord måste ha tillräckliga exempel på dess användning. Detta motsäger det faktum att människor bara kan gissa betydelsen av ett ord från några få händelser. I denna uppsats visar vi att en neural språkmodell som Word2Vec endast kräver mindre ändringar av sin standardarkitektur för att lära sig nya termer från små data, med hjälp av bakgrundskunskap från ett tidigare lärt semantiskt utrymme. Vi testar vår modell på orddefinitioner och på en nonce uppgift som involverar 2-6 meningars kontext, vilket visar en stor ökning av prestanda jämfört med state-of-the-art modeller på definitionsuppgiften.', 'ta': "சிறிய தரவுடன் போராடுவதற்கு பெரிய பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகள் தெரியும். வார்த்தைக்கு 'ஒரு நல்ல வெக்டார்' கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு பொதுவாக ஏற்றுக் கொள்ளப்படுகிறது, ஒரு மாதிரி அதன் பயன்பாட்டின் ப இது மனிதர்கள் ஒரு சில நிகழ்வுகளில் இருந்து ஒரு வார்த்தையின் அர்த்தம் என்று நினைக்க முடியும் என்று உண்மையை  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் Word2Vec போன்ற ஒரு புதிய மொழி மாதிரி மட்டும் அதன் நிலையான கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கு சிறிய தகவலிலிருந்து புதிய வார்த்த நாம் வார்த்தை வரையறைகளில் எங்கள் மாதிரியை சோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் வீணான செயலில் 2-6 வாக்கியங்களின் மதிப்பு உள்ளது, திட்டமான செயல்பாட்டில்", 'ur': "تقسیم سیمانٹیکس موڈلز چھوٹے ڈیٹے کے ساتھ جہاد کرنے کے لئے جانتے ہیں. ایک کلمہ کے لئے 'اچھا ویکتور' سکھانے کے لئے ایک مدل کے لئے کافی مثالیں ہونا چاہیے۔ یہ حقیقت کی مخالفت کرتا ہے کہ انسان صرف تھوڑے اتفاقات سے ایک کلمہ کا معنی سمجھ سکتا ہے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک نئورل زبان موڈل جیسے Word2Vec کے لئے صرف اس کی استاندارد معماری کے اندر کم تغییرات کی ضرورت ہے کہ اس کے ذریعہ اندازے کے اندر نئی شرائط کو چھوٹے ڈاٹے سے سیکھیں، اس سے پہلے سیمانٹی جگہ سے پچھلی علم کے ہم نے اپنے مدل کو کلمات کی تعریفیں پر اور ایک نائنس کام پر آزمائش کی ہے جس میں 2-6 جماعت کا ارزش تھا، اور معلوم کام کے ذریعہ ایک بڑی عملکرد کی عملکرد کی زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.", 'uz': "Distributional semantics models are known to struggle with small data.  Umumiy qabul qilinadi, so'z uchun `yaxshi vektor' o'rganish uchun model foydalanish uchun yetarli misollar bor. Bu haqida odamlar faqat bir necha hodisadan so'zning ma'nosini o'ylab oladi. Bu hujjatda biz bir neyron tilning modeli, Word2Vec kabi oddiy arxituvchiga oʻzgarishlar kerak, yangi soʻzlarni kichkina maʼlumotdan o'rganish kerak, oldin o'rgangan semantik фазsidan orqa aniqlarni foydalanish kerak. Biz bir so'zning taʼriflarimizni va 2-6 sentencening qiymatiga ega bo'lgan vazifani sinash imkoniyatini ko'rib chiqqamiz. Tasdiqlash vazifani holatda saqlash modellarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình phân biệt ngữ pháp được biết đến để đấu tranh với dữ liệu nhỏ. Nó được thông thường chấp nhận rằng để học "một véc- tơ tốt" với một từ, một mô hình phải có đủ ví dụ về sử dụng của nó. Điều này phủ nhận sự thật rằng con người có thể đoán được ý nghĩa của một từ chỉ từ một số lần xảy ra. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cho thấy một mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh như Word2Vec chỉ cần sửa đổi nho nhỏ cho cấu trúc tiêu chuẩn của nó để học các từ các dữ liệu nhỏ, sử dụng kiến thức nền từ một khoảng trống ngữ pháp được học từ trước đây. Chúng tôi kiểm tra mô hình của chúng tôi về những lời luật liên quan tới những câu trả lời. Một cách giảm nhập của chúng tôi trên các một cái một công nghệ mớch đạn.', 'nl': "Distributionele semantische modellen staan erom bekend dat ze worstelen met kleine gegevens. Het is algemeen aanvaard dat om 'een goede vector' voor een woord te leren, een model voldoende voorbeelden moet hebben van het gebruik ervan. Dit is in tegenspraak met het feit dat mensen de betekenis van een woord slechts uit een paar voorvallen kunnen raden. In dit artikel laten we zien dat een neuraal taalmodel zoals Word2Vec slechts kleine aanpassingen nodig heeft aan de standaardarchitectuur om nieuwe termen te leren van kleine data, gebruikmakend van achtergrondkennis uit een eerder aangeleerde semantische ruimte. We testen ons model op woorddefinities en op een nonce-taak waarbij de context van 2-6 zinnen centraal staat, waarbij een grote toename van de prestaties ten opzichte van state-of-the-art modellen op de definitieve taak wordt aangetoond.", 'da': 'Distributionssemantiske modeller er kendt for at kæmpe med små data. Det er almindeligt anerkendt, at for at lære en god vektor for et ord, skal en model have tilstrækkelige eksempler på dets brug. Dette modsiger det faktum, at mennesker kun kan gætte betydningen af et ord fra nogle få hændelser. I denne artikel viser vi, at en neural sprogmodel som Word2Vec kun kræver mindre ændringer af sin standardarkitektur for at lære nye termer fra små data, ved hjælp af baggrundsviden fra et tidligere lært semantisk rum. Vi tester vores model på orddefinitioner og på en nonce opgave, der involverer 2-6 sætningers kontekst, hvilket viser en stor stigning i ydeevnen i forhold til state-of-the-art modeller på definitionsopgaven.', 'bg': 'Разпределителните семантични модели са известни, че се борят с малки данни. Общо се приема, че за да се научи "добър вектор" за дадена дума, моделът трябва да има достатъчно примери за използването му. Това противоречи на факта, че хората могат да познаят значението на една дума само от няколко събития. В тази статия ние показваме, че невронен езиков модел като Word2Vec изисква само малки модификации в стандартната си архитектура, за да научи нови термини от малки данни, използвайки фонови знания от предварително научено семантично пространство. Тестваме нашия модел на дефиниции на думи и на задача, включваща контекст на стойност 2-6 изречения, показвайки голямо увеличение на производителността спрямо най-съвременните модели на дефиниционната задача.', 'hr': "Proizvodnji semantički modeli su poznati da se bore s malim podacima. Obično se prihvaća da, kako bi naučio 'dobar vektor' za riječ, model mora imati dovoljno primjera korištenja. To se suprotstavlja činjenici da ljudi mogu pogoditi smisao riječi iz samo nekoliko događaja. U ovom papiru pokazujemo da neuralni jezik model poput Word2Vec zahtijeva samo manje modifikacije standardne arhitekture kako bi naučili nove uslove iz malih podataka, koristeći pozadinske znanje iz prethodno naučenog semantičkog prostora. Testiramo naš model o definicijama riječi i o nekom zadatku koji uključuje vrijednost 2-6 rečenica u kontekstu, pokazujući veliki povećanje učinka nad modelima stanja umjetnosti na određenom zadatku.", 'de': 'Distributionssemantische Modelle sind dafür bekannt, mit kleinen Daten zu kämpfen. Es wird allgemein akzeptiert, dass ein Modell genügend Beispiele für seine Verwendung haben muss, um einen guten Vektor für ein Wort zu lernen. Dies widerspricht der Tatsache, dass Menschen die Bedeutung eines Wortes nur aus wenigen Vorkommnissen erraten können. In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir, dass ein neuronales Sprachmodell wie Word2Vec nur geringe Änderungen an seiner Standardarchitektur erfordert, um neue Begriffe aus winzigen Daten zu lernen, wobei Hintergrundwissen aus einem zuvor erlernten semantischen Raum verwendet wird. Wir testen unser Modell an Wortdefinitionen und an einer Nonce-Aufgabe, die den Kontext von 2-6 Sätzen beinhaltet, und zeigen eine große Leistungssteigerung gegenüber modernen Modellen für die Definitionsaufgabe.', 'ko': "모두가 알다시피 분포식 의미 모델은 작은 데이터를 처리하기 어렵다.사람들은 보편적으로 단어의'좋은 벡터'를 배우기 위해 모델은 반드시 충분한 용법 예시가 있어야 한다고 생각한다.이것은 인류가 단지 몇 번의 사건에서 한 단어의 뜻을 알아낼 수 있다는 사실과 모순된다.본고에서 우리는 신경 언어 모델, 예를 들어Word2Vec를 보여 주었다. 표준 체계 구조에 대해 작은 수정만 하면 이전에 배운 의미 공간의 배경 지식을 사용하고 작은 데이터에서 새로운 용어를 배울 수 있다.우리는 단어의 정의와 2-6개의 문장 상하문과 관련된 임시 임무에서 우리의 모델을 테스트한 결과 가장 선진적인 모델에 비해 정의 임무의 성능이 크게 향상되었다.", 'id': "Distributional semantics models are known to struggle with small data.  Secara umum diterima bahwa untuk mempelajari `vektor yang baik' untuk sebuah kata, sebuah model harus memiliki contoh yang cukup dari penggunaannya. Ini bertentangan dengan fakta bahwa manusia dapat menebak arti kata dari beberapa kejadian saja. Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa model bahasa saraf seperti Word2Vec hanya membutuhkan modifikasi kecil pada arsitektur standarnya untuk belajar istilah baru dari data kecil, menggunakan pengetahuan latar belakang dari ruang semantis yang sebelumnya belajar. Kami menguji model kami pada definisi kata dan pada tugas nonce yang melibatkan nilai konteks 2-6 kalimat, menunjukkan peningkatan besar dalam prestasi atas model state-of-the-art pada tugas definisi.", 'fa': 'Models semantics distribution are known to struggle with small data. معمولاً قبول می\u200cشود که برای یاد گرفتن یک ویکتور خوب برای یک کلمه، یک مدل باید مثال کافی از استفاده از آن داشته باشد. این حقیقت بر خلاف این است که انسان می تواند معنی یک کلمه را فقط از چند اتفاقات حدس بزنند. در این کاغذ، ما نشان می دهیم که یک مدل زبان عصبی مثل Word2Vec فقط به تغییرات کوچک در معماری استاندارد خود نیاز دارد تا شرایط جدید از داده های کوچک یاد بگیرد، با استفاده از دانش پشتیبانی از یک فضای semantic که قبلا یاد گرفته است. ما مدل خود را در مورد تعریف کلمات آزمایش می\u200cکنیم و در یک کار غیر مسئله با ارزش ۲-۶ جمله، نشان می\u200cدهیم که افزایش بزرگی در عملکرد در مورد مدل\u200cهای موجود هنر در مورد کار معین است.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa sekondari unafahamika kupambana na takwimu ndogo. Kwa ujumla unakubaliwa kwamba ili kujifunza “vector nzuri” kwa neno, mfano lazima una mifano ya kutosha ya matumizi yake. Hii inapingana na ukweli kwamba binadamu wanaweza kufikiri maana ya neno kutoka kwa matukio machache tu. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha kuwa modeli ya lugha ya asili kama vile Word2Vec inahitaji mabadiliko madogo tu ya ujenzi wake wa kawaida ili kujifunza maneno mapya kutoka kwenye taarifa ndogo, kwa kutumia maarifa ya baka kutoka kwenye nafasi ya kimapenzi iliyojifunza. Tunajaribu mtindo wetu kuhusu ufafanuzi wa maneno na katika kazi isiyo na maana yanayohusu hukumu 2-6 yenye thamani ya muktadha, kuonyesha kuongezeka kwa ufanisi mkubwa wa mifano ya sanaa katika kazi ya msingi.', 'tr': 'Daýratyn semantik nusgalary kiçi maglumatlar bilen çykyp bilýär. Bir kelime için "iyi vektör" öğrenmek için genellikle kabul edilir. Bir modelde kullanımının yeterli örnekleri olmalı. Bu, insanların sadece birkaç olaydan kelime anlamını tahmin edebileceği gerçeğine ters koyuyor. Bu kagyzda, Word2Vec ýaly näural dil nusgasyny diňe özüniň standart arhitekturynyň täze sözlerini kiçi maglumatdan öwrenmek üçin az üýtgewleri gerek diýip öwrenipdir. 2-6 sözlem diýip bolan bir zadyň bardygyny we nusgasymyzy bardyrys. 2-6 sözlem diýip bolan bir zadyň bardygyny we beýleki zadyň durumynda-sanat nusgalarynyň üstünde täzeliklerini görkez.', 'af': "Name Dit is algemeen aanvaar dat om 'n goeie vektor' vir 'n woord te leer, 'n model moet genoeg voorbeelde van sy gebruik hê. Hierdie is teen die feit dat mense die betekening van 'n woord kan weet van 'n paar voorkoms slegs. In hierdie papier, wys ons dat 'n neurale taal model soos Word2Vec slegs minder veranderinge nodig het vir sy standaard arkitektuur om nuwe terme te leer van klein data, gebruik agtergrond kennis van 'n vorige geleer semantiese spasie. Ons probeer ons model op woord definisies en op 'n ongelukkige taak wat die waarde van 2-6 setings se konteks invoer, en wys 'n groot vergroot vergroting in prestasie oor staat-van-kuns-modele op die definisionale taak.", 'sq': "Modelet e semantikës shpërndarëse janë të njohura për të luftuar me të dhëna të vogla. Në përgjithësi pranohet se për të mësuar 'një vektor të mirë' për një fjalë, një model duhet të ketë shembuj të mjaftueshëm të përdorimit të tij. Kjo kundërshton faktin se njerëzit mund të gjejnë kuptimin e një fjale vetëm nga disa ndodhje. Në këtë letër, ne tregojmë se një model gjuhësh neurale si Word2Vec vetëm kërkon modifikime të vogla në arkitekturën e tij standarte për të mësuar terma të reja nga të dhëna të vogla, duke përdorur njohuri të sfondit nga një hapësirë semantike të mësuar më parë. We test our model on word definitions and on a nonce task involving 2-6 sentences' worth of context, showing a large increase in performance over state-of-the-art models on the definitional task.", 'az': "Bölünməli semantik modelləri kiçik məlumatlarla mübahisə edirlər. Həmçin in bir söz üçün 'yaxşı vektor' öyrənmək üçün modellərin istifadəsinə yeterli nümunələri olmalı. İnsanların ancaq bir neçə olaraq bir sözün anlamını tahmin edə biləcəyini təsdiqləyir. Bu kağızda, Word2Vec kimi nöral dil modeli, ancaq standart arhitektura yeni şartları öyrənmək üçün, əvvəlcə öyrənmiş semantik uzaqdan öyrənən arxa plan bilgiləri istifadə etmək üçün yeni şərtləri öyrənmək istəyirik. Biz modelimizi sözlərin tanımlamaları və 2-6 cümlələrin qiyməti olan bir işdə imtahana çəkirik, müəyyən edilmiş işin vəziyyətdə müəyyən edilmiş modellərin üstündə böyük bir art ıqlığı göstəririk.", 'hy': "Տեղաբաշխման սեմանտիկայի մոդելները հայտնի են, որ պայքարում են փոքր տվյալների հետ: It is generally accepted that in order to learn `a good vector' for a word, a model must have sufficient examples of its usage.  Սա հակառակ է այն փաստին, որ մարդիկ կարող են գուշակել բառի իմաստը միայն մի քանի իրադարձություններից: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ Word2vec-ի նյարդային լեզվի մոդելը պարտադիր է միայն փոքր փոփոխություններ իր ստանդարտ ճարտարապետության համար, որպեսզի փոքր տվյալներից նոր տերմիններ սովորեն, օգտագործելով նախկինում սովորած սեմանտիկ տարածության ետնա Մենք փորձում ենք մեր մոդելը բառերի սահմանումների և անհեթեթ առաջադրանքի վրա, որը ներառում է 2-6 նախադասությունների արժեքը կոնտեքստի վրա, ցույց տալով, որ սահմանափակումների վերաբերյալ լավագույն մոդելների արժեքը մեծ աճ է:", 'bn': "বিতরণের সেমেন্টিক মডেল ছোট তথ্য দিয়ে সংগ্রামের জন্য পরিচিত। সাধারণত এটি গ্রহণ করা হয় যে একটি শব্দের জন্য 'ভেক্টর' শিখার জন্য একটি মডেল তার ব্যবহারের যথেষ্ট উদাহরণ রয়েছে। এই বাস্তবতার বিরুদ্ধে যে মানুষ শুধুমাত্র কয়েকটি ঘটনার মানে একটি শব্দের মানে অনুমান করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একটি নিউরেল ভাষার মডেল, যেমন ওয়ার্ড২ভেক, শুধুমাত্র তার স্বাভাবিক আর্কাস্টেক্টারের ক্ষুদ্র তথ্য থেকে নতুন শর্ত শিখতে হবে  আমরা শব্দের সংজ্ঞার ব্যাপারে আমাদের মডেল পরীক্ষা করি এবং এই নির্ধারিত কাজে ২-৬ শাস্তির মূল্যের ব্যাপারে দুই-৬ শাস্তি প্রদান করা একটি অ", 'am': "አካላዊ ስሜንቲካ ምሳሌዎች ከታናሽ ዳታ ጋር ለመታገል የታወቁ ናቸው፡፡ በጠቅላላ የሚቀበል `መልካም መንገድ' ለቃላት ለመማር፣ ምሳሌ በይፋ መጠቀሚያ ምሳሌዎች ሊኖርበት ይገባዋል፡፡ ይህ ሰው ከጥቂት ሁኔታ ብቻ የቃላትን ማህበረሰብ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እንደWord2Vec የናቡral ቋንቋ ሞዴል፣ አዲስ ቃላት ከታናሹ ዳታዎች ለመማር ብቻ ትንሽ ሽፋን እንዲያስፈልጋል፣ የቀድሞው ተማረ ስምናዊ ስፍራን በመጠቀም የመደቡን እውቀት በመጠቀም ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በንግግር ግንኙነት እና በ2-6 ክፍሎች ዋጋን በሚያሳየው የንግግር ግንኙነታችንን እናስፈትናለን፡፡", 'bs': "Distribucioni semantički modeli su poznati da se bore sa malim podacima. Obično se prihvaća da, kako bi naučio 'dobar vektor' za riječ, model mora imati dovoljno primjera korištenja. To se suprotstavlja činjenici da ljudi mogu pogoditi smisao riječi iz samo nekoliko događaja. U ovom papiru pokazujemo da neuralni jezik model poput Word2Vec zahtijeva samo manje modifikacije standardne arhitekture da nauči nove uslove iz malih podataka, koristeći pozadinsko znanje iz prethodno naučenog semantičkog prostora. Testiramo naš model o definicijama riječi i o nekom zadatku koji uključuje vrijednost 2-6 rečenica u kontekstu, pokazujući veliki povećanje učinkovitosti nad modelima stanja umjetnosti na određenom zadatku.", 'ca': "Es coneix que els models de semàntica distribucional lluiten amb petites dades. En general s'accepta que per aprendre un bon vector per una paraula, un model ha de tenir prou exemples d'utilització. Això contradiu el fet que els humans poden adivinar el significat d'una paraula només d'algunes ocasions. In this paper, we show that a neural language model such as Word2Vec only necessitates minor modifications to its standard architecture to learn new terms from tiny data, using background knowledge from a previously learnt semantic space.  Testem el nostre model en definicions de paraules i en una tasca de nonce que implica la valoració del contexte de 2-6 frases, mostrant un gran augment en el rendiment dels models més avançats en la tasca definitiva.", 'fi': 'Jakelusemantiikan mallien tiedetään kamppailevan pienen datan kanssa. Yleisesti tunnustetaan, että oppiakseen sanan "hyvän vektorin", mallilla on oltava riittävät esimerkit sen käytöstä. Tämä on ristiriidassa sen tosiasian kanssa, että ihmiset voivat arvata sanan merkityksen vain muutamasta tapahtumasta. Tässä artikkelissa osoitamme, että Word2Vecin kaltainen neurokielimalli tarvitsee vain pieniä muutoksia standardiarkkitehtuuriinsa oppiakseen uusia termejä pienestä datasta käyttäen taustatietoa aiemmin opitusta semanttisesta tilasta. Testaamme malliamme sanamääritelmillä ja nonce-tehtävällä, joka sisältää 2-6 lauseen kontekstin, mikä osoittaa, että suorituskyky on lisääntynyt huomattavasti verrattuna viimeisimpiin malleihin määrittelytehtävässä.', 'cs': 'Je známo, že distribuční sémantické modely bojují s malými daty. Je obecně uznáváno, že aby se model naučil "dobrý vektor" pro slovo, musí mít dostatek příkladů jeho použití. To je v rozporu se skutečností, že lidé mohou odhadnout význam slova pouze z několika událostí. V tomto článku ukazujeme, že neuronový jazykový model, jako je Word2Vec, vyžaduje pouze drobné modifikace své standardní architektury, aby se naučil nové termíny z drobných dat za použití pozadí znalostí z dříve naučeného sémantického prostoru. Testujeme náš model na definicích slov a na nonce úkolu zahrnujícím kontext hodnoty 2-6 vět, což ukazuje velký nárůst výkonu oproti moderním modelům definičního úkolu.', 'et': "Jaotussemantika mudelid võitlevad teadaolevalt väikeste andmetega. Üldiselt tunnustatakse, et sõna `hea vektori' õppimiseks peab mudelil olema piisavalt näiteid selle kasutamisest. See on vastuolus faktiga, et inimesed suudavad arvata sõna tähendust ainult mõnest sündmusest. Käesolevas töös näitame, et neurokeele mudel nagu Word2Vec vajab vaid väikeseid muudatusi oma standardarhitektuuris, et õppida uusi termineid väikestest andmetest, kasutades taustateadmisi eelnevalt õppitud semantilisest ruumist. Testime oma mudelit sõnade definitsioonidel ja nonce ülesandel, mis hõlmab 2-6 lauset konteksti, näidates suurt jõudlust võrreldes tipptasemel mudelitega definitsiooniülesandel.", 'ha': "Ana san motsalan sakanti da aka raba su yi yãƙi da data ƙarami. Ana yarda da shi a jumla'a cewa za'a sanar da `wani shiryarwa mai kyau' wa kalma, sai ya kamata wani misali masu isa ga amfani da shi. Wannan yana da musamman da mutane ke iya zaton ma'anar kalma daga bakin nan kaɗan. Daga wannan takardan, Munã nuna cewa wani misalin harshen neural kamar word2Verc na ƙayyade musanyi ƙarami kawai zuwa matsayin tsarin da aka daidaita shi, dõmin ya sanar da wasu salo masu ƙarami daga data masu ƙarami, don ka yi amfani da ilmi na bango daga filin da aka sanar ta a gabani. Tuna jarraba misalinmu kan fassarar maganar da kuma a kan wani aikin ƙarya wanda ke ƙunsa da muhimmin muhimmada 2-6, kuma yana nuna wani ƙari mai girma ga aikin aiki na-muhimmin-sanawa kan aikin da aka ƙayyade.", 'he': 'מודלים סמנטיקה פיצועית ידועים להילחם עם נתונים קטנים. בדרך כלל מקבל כי כדי ללמוד "ווקטור טוב" למילה, מודל חייב להיות דוגמאות מספיקות של השימוש שלו. זה מתנגד לעובדה שאנשים יכולים לנחש את המשמעות של מילה ממספר התרחשות בלבד. בעיתון הזה, אנו מראים שמודל שפת עצבית כמו Word2Vec צריך רק שינויים קטנים לארכיטקטורה הסטנדרטית שלו אנחנו בודקים את הדוגמא שלנו על הגדרות מילים ובמשימה חסרת תועלת שווה של 2-6 משפטים בקשר, מראים עלייה גדולה ביצועים מעל דוגמאות מצוינות במשימה הגדרת.', 'sk': "Distribucijski semantični modeli so znani, da se borijo z majhnimi podatki. Splošno je sprejeto, da mora model imeti dovolj primerov uporabe, da bi se naučil ‚dobrega vektorja' za besedo. To je v nasprotju z dejstvom, da lahko ljudje ugibajo pomen besede le iz nekaj dogodkov. V prispevku smo pokazali, da je model nevronskega jezika, kot je Word2Vec, potreben le manjše spremembe standardne arhitekture, da bi se naučil novih izrazov iz majhnih podatkov z uporabo ozadja iz prej naučenega semantičnega prostora. Naš model testiramo na definicijah besed in na nonce opravilu, ki vključuje kontekst v vrednosti 2-6 stavkov, kar kaže veliko povečanje zmogljivosti v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi modeli pri definicijskem opravilu.", 'jv': 'Distribution semanti model are knownMonitor vendor Genjer-genjer Ngomongke barêng-barêng langgar rato kuwi kesempatan wong kuwi tindah kuwi kelas nang dadi. Nang pepulan iki, kita ngomongke tindang kuwi alam, lagi gambar kelas word 2vec butuh tentang kanggo ngubah maur kanggo architecture sabên dhéwé kanggo ngerasakno dhéwé data sithik Awak dhéwé éntuk model perusahaan kelas Definisi lan nganggo perusahaan gambar 2-6', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བརྗོད་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ལག་དབྱིབས་ཆགས་པ་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆ་ཉུང་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་གི་ སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་འཇུག་དགོས་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། འདིས་མི་ཚོས་འབྱུང་བའི་དོན་དག་ཅིག་ལས་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་དོན་དག་གང་ཞིག་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། In this paper, we show that a neural language model such as Word2Vec only needs minor modifications to its standard architecture to learn new terms from tiny data, using background knowledge from a previously learned semantic space. The first letter is from a German letter. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མིག'}
{'en': 'VecShare : A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'ar': 'VecShare: إطار عمل لمشاركة نواقل تمثيل الكلمات', 'pt': 'VecShare: uma estrutura para compartilhar vetores de representação de palavras', 'es': 'VecShare: un marco para compartir vectores de representación de palabras', 'fr': 'VecShare\xa0: un cadre pour partager des vecteurs de représentation de mots', 'ja': 'VecShare:ワード表現ベクトルを共有するためのフレームワーク', 'zh': 'VecShare:共单词向量框架', 'hi': 'VecShare: Word प्रतिनिधित्व वैक्टर साझा करने के लिए एक फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'VecShare: платформа для совместного использования векторов представления слов', 'ga': 'VecShare: Creat chun Veicteoirí Léirithe Focal a Roinnt', 'hu': 'VectShare: Egy keretrendszer a Word Representation Vektorok megosztására', 'ka': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'el': 'Ένα πλαίσιο για την κοινή χρήση διανυσμάτων αναπαράστασης λέξεων', 'it': 'VectShare: un framework per la condivisione dei vettori di rappresentazione delle parole', 'lt': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'kk': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'mk': 'VecShare: Рамка за споделување на вектори за претставување на зборови', 'ms': 'VecShare: Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'mt': 'VecShare: Qafas għall-qsim tal-vetturi tar-rappreżentanza tal-kliem', 'ml': 'വെക്ഷേര്\u200d: വാക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d', 'mn': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'ro': 'VectShare: Un cadru pentru partajarea vectorilor de reprezentare a cuvintelor', 'no': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'pl': 'VecShare: Framework do udostępniania wektorów reprezentacji słowa', 'sr': 'VecShare: okvir za dijeljenje vektora predstavljanja riječi', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'so': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'sv': 'VectShare: Ett ramverk för att dela Word Representation Vectors', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Vesharesẻ: a frame for sharing Word Representation Vectrors', 'bg': 'Рамка за споделяне на вектори за представяне на думи', 'hr': 'VecShare: okvir za dijeljenje riječi', 'da': 'VectShare: En ramme for deling af ordrepræsentation vektorer', 'nl': 'VecShare: Een raamwerk voor het delen van vectoren voor woordvertegenwoordiging', 'de': 'VecShare: Ein Framework zum Teilen von Word Representation Vektoren', 'id': 'VecShare: Sebuah Framework untuk berbagi Vektor Perwakilan Kata', 'fa': 'ویک شریک: یک چشمه برای شریک ویکتورهای نمایش کلمات', 'ko': 'VecShare: 벡터를 나타내는 단어를 공유하는 프레임워크', 'sw': 'VecShare: Miundombi ya Kushirikisha Orodha ya Maandamano', 'tr': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'af': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'am': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'sq': 'VecShare: Një kuadër për ndarjen e vektorëve të përfaqësimit të fjalëve', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'bn': 'ভেকশেয়ার: শব্দ প্রতিনিধি ভেক্টর শেয়ার করার জন্য একটি ফ্রেমার্ক', 'bs': 'VecShare: A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'ca': 'VecShare: Un marc per compartir vectors de representació de paraules', 'et': 'VecShare: raamistik sõna esindamise vektorite jagamiseks', 'cs': 'VecShare: Rámec pro sdílení vektorů reprezentace slova', 'fi': 'VecShare: Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'jv': 'vecshare: A frame job for sharing Word representation vector', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'VecShare:A Framework for Sharing Word Representation Vectors', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'VecShare: Okvir za skupno rabo vektorjev predstavitve besed'}
{'en': 'Many Natural Language Processing (NLP) models rely on distributed vector representations of words. Because the process of training word vectors can require large amounts of data and computation, NLP researchers and practitioners often utilize pre-trained embeddings downloaded from the Web. However, finding the best embeddings for a given task is difficult, and can be computationally prohibitive. We present a framework, called VecShare, that makes it easy to share and retrieve word embeddings on the Web. The framework leverages a public data-sharing infrastructure to host embedding sets, and provides automated mechanisms for retrieving the embeddings most similar to a given corpus. We perform an experimental evaluation of VecShare’s similarity strategies, and show that they are effective at efficiently retrieving embeddings that boost accuracy in a document classification task. Finally, we provide an open-source Python library for using the VecShare framework.', 'ar': 'تعتمد العديد من نماذج معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) على تمثيلات متجهية موزعة للكلمات. نظرًا لأن عملية تدريب متجهات الكلمات يمكن أن تتطلب كميات كبيرة من البيانات والحسابات ، غالبًا ما يستخدم الباحثون والممارسون في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP) حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا التي يتم تنزيلها من الويب. ومع ذلك ، فإن العثور على أفضل حفلات الزفاف لمهمة معينة أمر صعب ، ويمكن أن يكون باهظًا من الناحية الحسابية. نقدم إطار عمل ، يسمى VecShare ، والذي يجعل من السهل مشاركة واسترداد تضمين الكلمات على الويب. يستفيد إطار العمل من البنية التحتية العامة لمشاركة البيانات لاستضافة مجموعات التضمين ، ويوفر آليات مؤتمتة لاسترداد عمليات التضمين الأكثر تشابهًا مع مجموعة معينة. نجري تقييمًا تجريبيًا لاستراتيجيات التشابه الخاصة بـ VecShare ، ونظهر أنها فعالة في استرداد حفلات الزفاف بكفاءة والتي تعزز الدقة في مهمة تصنيف المستندات. أخيرًا ، نقدم مكتبة Python مفتوحة المصدر لاستخدام إطار عمل VecShare.', 'fr': "De nombreux modèles de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) reposent sur des représentations vectorielles distribuées de mots. Étant donné que le processus de formation des vecteurs de mots peut nécessiter de grandes quantités de données et de calculs, les chercheurs et les praticiens de la PNL utilisent souvent des intégrations préformées téléchargées sur le Web. Cependant, il est difficile de trouver les meilleurs intégrations pour une tâche donnée et peut être rédhibitoire en termes de calcul. Nous présentons un framework, appelé VecShare, qui facilite le partage et la récupération de mots incorporés sur le Web. Le framework tire parti d'une infrastructure publique de partage de données pour héberger des ensembles d'intégration, et fournit des mécanismes automatisés pour récupérer les intégrations les plus similaires à un corpus donné. Nous effectuons une évaluation expérimentale des stratégies de similarité de VecShare et montrons qu'elles sont efficaces pour récupérer efficacement les intégrations qui améliorent la précision dans une tâche de classification de documents. Enfin, nous fournissons une bibliothèque Python open source pour utiliser le framework VecShare.", 'pt': 'Muitos modelos de processamento de linguagem natural (NLP) dependem de representações vetoriais distribuídas de palavras. Como o processo de treinamento de vetores de palavras pode exigir grandes quantidades de dados e computação, os pesquisadores e praticantes de PNL geralmente utilizam embeddings pré-treinados baixados da Web. No entanto, encontrar os melhores embeddings para uma determinada tarefa é difícil e pode ser computacionalmente proibitivo. Apresentamos um framework, chamado VecShare, que facilita o compartilhamento e a recuperação de word embeddings na Web. A estrutura aproveita uma infraestrutura pública de compartilhamento de dados para hospedar conjuntos de incorporação e fornece mecanismos automatizados para recuperar as incorporações mais semelhantes a um determinado corpus. Realizamos uma avaliação experimental das estratégias de similaridade do VecShare e mostramos que elas são eficazes na recuperação eficiente de embeddings que aumentam a precisão em uma tarefa de classificação de documentos. Por fim, fornecemos uma biblioteca Python de código aberto para usar a estrutura VecShare.', 'es': 'Muchos modelos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) se basan en representaciones vectoriales distribuidas de palabras. Debido a que el proceso de entrenamiento de vectores de palabras puede requerir grandes cantidades de datos y computación, los investigadores y profesionales de la PNL a menudo utilizan incrustaciones previamente entrenadas que se descargan de la Web. Sin embargo, encontrar las mejores incorporaciones para una tarea determinada es difícil y puede resultar prohibitivo desde el punto de vista computacional. Presentamos un marco, llamado VecShare, que facilita compartir y recuperar incrustaciones de palabras en la Web. El marco aprovecha una infraestructura pública de intercambio de datos para alojar conjuntos de incrustaciones y proporciona mecanismos automatizados para recuperar las incrustaciones más similares a un corpus determinado. Llevamos a cabo una evaluación experimental de las estrategias de similitud de VecShare y demostramos que son eficaces para recuperar de manera eficiente las incrustaciones que aumentan la precisión en una tarea de clasificación de documentos. Por último, proporcionamos una biblioteca Python de código abierto para usar el marco VecShare.', 'ja': '多くの自然言語処理(NLP)モデルは、単語の分散ベクトル表現に依存している。ワードベクトルをトレーニングするプロセスは、大量のデータと計算を必要とする可能性があるため、NLP研究者および実践者は、ウェブからダウンロードされた事前にトレーニングされた埋め込みを利用することが多い。しかし、与えられたタスクに最適な埋め込みを見つけるのは困難であり、計算上禁止されている可能性があります。VecShareと呼ばれるフレームワークを提供しており、Web上でのワード埋め込みの共有と取得を容易にしています。このフレームワークは、埋め込みセットをホストするためにパブリックデータ共有インフラストラクチャを活用し、特定のコーパスに最も類似した埋め込みを取得するための自動化されたメカニズムを提供します。VecShareの類似性戦略の実験的評価を行い、文書分類タスクの精度を向上させる埋め込みの効率的な取得に効果的であることを示します。最後に、VecShareフレームワークを使用するためのオープンソースのPythonライブラリを提供します。', 'zh': '诸自然语言处分 (NLP) 依于单词分布式向量。 训练词向量事可须大计,NLP治人从业者常用Web下载预练者。 然为给定求最佳者为难,且计可望而却步。 我言VecShare框架,共Web检索词嵌。 其框架因公共数据共享结构以托管嵌集,而供自动机制以检给定语料库最相似者。 吾于 VecShare 之相似性,实验性而料之,明其有效而检索之,以崇文档类之准确性。 最后供一开源Python库,用于VecShare框架。', 'ru': 'Многие модели обработки естественного языка (NLP) основаны на распределенных векторных представлениях слов. Поскольку процесс обучения векторов слов может потребовать больших объемов данных и вычислений, исследователи и практики NLP часто используют предварительно обученные вставки, загруженные из Интернета. Тем не менее, найти лучшие вложения для данной задачи сложно, и это может быть невыполнимо с вычислительной точки зрения. Мы представляем фреймворк под названием VecShare, который облегчает обмен и извлечение вложений слов в Интернете. В этой структуре используется инфраструктура обмена общедоступными данными для размещения наборов вложений и предусматриваются автоматизированные механизмы для извлечения вложений, наиболее похожих на данный корпус. Мы проводим экспериментальную оценку стратегий сходства VecShare и показываем, что они эффективны для эффективного извлечения вложений, которые повышают точность в задаче классификации документов. Наконец, мы предоставляем библиотеку Python с открытым исходным кодом для использования фреймворка VecShare.', 'hi': 'कई प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) मॉडल शब्दों के वितरित वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व पर भरोसा करते हैं। क्योंकि प्रशिक्षण शब्द वैक्टर की प्रक्रिया को बड़ी मात्रा में डेटा और गणना की आवश्यकता हो सकती है, एनएलपी शोधकर्ता और चिकित्सक अक्सर वेब से डाउनलोड किए गए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं। हालांकि, किसी दिए गए कार्य के लिए सबसे अच्छा एम्बेडिंग ढूंढना मुश्किल है, और कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से निषेधात्मक हो सकता है। हम VecShare नामक एक रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो वेब पर शब्द एम्बेडिंग को साझा करना और पुनर्प्राप्त करना आसान बनाता है। फ्रेमवर्क एम्बेडिंग सेट को होस्ट करने के लिए एक सार्वजनिक डेटा-साझाकरण बुनियादी ढांचे का लाभ उठाता है, और किसी दिए गए कॉर्पस के समान एम्बेडिंग को पुनर्प्राप्त करने के लिए स्वचालित तंत्र प्रदान करता है। हम VecShare की समानता रणनीतियों का एक प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि वे कुशलतापूर्वक एम्बेडिंग को पुनर्प्राप्त करने में प्रभावी हैं जो दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण कार्य में सटीकता को बढ़ावा देते हैं। अंत में, हम VecShare ढांचे का उपयोग करने के लिए एक ओपन-सोर्स पायथन लाइब्रेरी प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Braitheann go leor samhlacha Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP) ar léirithe veicteoirí dáilte ar fhocail. Toisc gur féidir méid mór sonraí agus ríomh a bheith ag teastáil ón bpróiseas oiliúna veicteoirí focal, is minic a úsáideann taighdeoirí agus cleachtóirí NLP leabaithe réamhoilte a íoslódáiltear ón nGréasán. Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair na leabaithe is fearr a aimsiú do thasc ar leith, agus féadfaidh sé a bheith coisctheach ó thaobh ríomhaireacht de. Cuirimid creat i láthair, ar a dtugtar VecShare, a éascaíonn leabú focal a roinnt agus a aisghabháil ar an nGréasán. Déanann an creat giaráil bonneagar poiblí um chomhroinnt sonraí chun tacair leabaithe a óstáil, agus soláthraíonn sé meicníochtaí uathoibrithe chun na leabaithe is cosúla le corpas ar leith a aisghabháil. Déanaimid meastóireacht thurgnamhach ar straitéisí cosúlachta VecShare, agus léirímid go bhfuil siad éifeachtach ag aisghabháil go héifeachtach leabaithe a chothaíonn cruinneas i dtasc aicmithe doiciméad. Ar deireadh, soláthraímid leabharlann Python foinse oscailte chun creat VecShare a úsáid.', 'hu': 'Számos Natural Language Processing (NLP) modell a szavak elosztott vektoros reprezentációjára támaszkodik. Mivel a szóvektorok képzésének folyamata nagy mennyiségű adatot és számítást igényel, az NLP kutatói és szakemberei gyakran használnak előre képzett beágyazásokat az internetről letöltött. Azonban egy adott feladathoz a legjobb beágyazások megtalálása nehéz, és számítástechnikailag tiltó lehet. Bemutatunk egy VecShare nevű keretrendszert, amely megkönnyíti a szóbeágyazások megosztását és lekérését az interneten. A keretrendszer egy nyilvános adatmegosztó infrastruktúrát használ a beágyazási készletek tárolására, és automatizált mechanizmusokat biztosít az adott korpuszhoz leginkább hasonló beágyazások lekérésére. A VecShare hasonlósági stratégiáinak kísérleti értékelését végezzük, és megmutatjuk, hogy hatékonyan visszakeresik azokat a beágyazásokat, amelyek fokozzák a pontosságot egy dokumentum osztályozási feladatban. Végül nyílt forráskódú Python könyvtárat biztosítunk a VecShare keretrendszer használatához.', 'el': 'Πολλά μοντέλα επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας βασίζονται σε κατανεμημένες διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων. Επειδή η διαδικασία κατάρτισης διανύσματος λέξεων μπορεί να απαιτήσει μεγάλες ποσότητες δεδομένων και υπολογισμού, οι ερευνητές και οι επαγγελματίες χρησιμοποιούν συχνά προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις που λαμβάνονται από το διαδίκτυο. Ωστόσο, η εύρεση των καλύτερων ενσωματώσεων για μια δεδομένη εργασία είναι δύσκολη και μπορεί να είναι υπολογιστικά απαγορευτική. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πλαίσιο, που ονομάζεται το οποίο καθιστά εύκολο να μοιραστείτε και να ανακτήσετε ενσωματώσεις λέξεων στο διαδίκτυο. Το πλαίσιο αξιοποιεί μια δημόσια υποδομή κοινής χρήσης δεδομένων για να φιλοξενήσει σύνολα ενσωμάτωσης και παρέχει αυτοματοποιημένους μηχανισμούς ανάκτησης των ενσωμάτωσης που μοιάζουν περισσότερο με ένα δεδομένο σώμα. Πραγματοποιούμε μια πειραματική αξιολόγηση των στρατηγικών ομοιότητας του και αποδεικνύουμε ότι είναι αποτελεσματικές στην αποτελεσματική ανάκτηση ενσωμάτωσης που ενισχύουν την ακρίβεια σε μια εργασία ταξινόμησης εγγράφων. Τέλος, παρέχουμε μια βιβλιοθήκη ανοιχτού κώδικα για τη χρήση του πλαισίου VecShare.', 'ka': 'ბევრი ნაირადი ენერგიის პროცესი (NLP) მოდელები იყენებენ სიტყვების გაყოფილი ვექტორის გამოსახულებაზე. იმიტომ, რომ საკუთარი სიტყვის ვიქტორების პროცესი შეუძლია უფრო დიდი მონაცემები და კომპუტექტირების შესაძლებლობა, NLP პროცექტორები და პროცექტორები ბევრად გამოყენებ მაგრამ, შეიძლება იყოს კომპუტაციალურად დაბრუნებული საუკეთესო საქაღალდე. ჩვენ გვაქვს სტრამეტრი, რომელიც გვაქვს VecShare, რომელიც უფრო მარტივია გაყოფილი და მივიღეთ სიტყვები ინტერფეში. პარამეტრები საშუალო მონაცემების გაყოფილების ინფრაქტურაციას ჰოსტის დამატებული სეტებისთვის, და აკეთებს ავტომატურებული მექანიზები, რომლებიც უფრო მსგავსი კოპუ ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ექსპერიმენტიური განსაზღვრება VecShare-ის სხვადასხვა სტრატიგიების და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ისინი ექსპერიმენტიურია ექსპერიმენტიურად დაიწყება, რომელიც დოკუმენტის კ საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ განხორციელი Python ბილობრიკა გვაქვს VecShare ფრამეტრის გამოყენება.', 'it': "Molti modelli di Natural Language Processing (NLP) si basano su rappresentazioni vettoriali distribuite delle parole. Poiché il processo di formazione dei vettori di parole può richiedere grandi quantità di dati e calcolo, i ricercatori e i professionisti di PNL spesso utilizzano incorporazioni pre-addestrate scaricate dal Web. Tuttavia, trovare le migliori incorporazioni per un determinato compito è difficile e può essere computazionale proibitivo. Presentiamo un framework, chiamato VecShare, che rende facile condividere e recuperare le incorporazioni di parole sul Web. Il framework sfrutta un'infrastruttura pubblica di condivisione dei dati per ospitare insiemi di embedding e fornisce meccanismi automatizzati per recuperare gli embedding più simili a un dato corpus. Eseguiamo una valutazione sperimentale delle strategie di somiglianza di VecShare e dimostriamo che sono efficaci nel recupero efficiente di incorporazioni che aumentano l'accuratezza in un'attività di classificazione dei documenti. Infine, forniamo una libreria Python open source per l'utilizzo del framework VecShare.", 'kk': 'Көпшілік Түзіндік тіл процессоры (NLP) үлгілері сөздердің үлестіріміне тәуелді. Себебі векторлар сөздерді оқыту процесінің көп саны мен деректерді есептеу керек болуы мүмкін, NLP зерттеушілері және тәжірибелер көбірек веб- тан жүктеп алған ендіруді қолданады. Бірақ, келтірілген тапсырма үшін ең жақсы ендіру қиын, және есептеп қабылдау мүмкін. Біз VecShare деп аталатын фреймді таңдаймыз. Бұл веб- тағы сөздерді ортақтастыру және алу оңай болады. Бұл фреймдер хосттың ендіру жиындарына көпшілік деректерді ортақтастыру инфраструктурасын көмектеседі, және келтірілген корпустың ең ұқсас ендіру үшін автоматты түрде механизмтерді бер Біз VecShare- тың ұқсастық стратегияларының тәжірибесін тексеріп, құжатты классификациялау тапсырмасының дұрыстығын көтеретін ендіру үшін ең әсер ететінді көрсетедік. Соңында, VecShare бағдарламасын қолдану үшін ашық көзі Python жиынын қамтамасыз.', 'lt': 'Many Natural Language Processing (NLP) models rely on distributed vector representations of words.  Kadangi žodžių vektorių mokymo procese gali prireikti daug duomenų ir skaičiavimų, NLP mokslininkai ir praktikantai dažnai naudoja iš interneto atsiųstą iš anksto parengtą įrangą. Tačiau geriausių tam tikros užduoties sudedamųjų dalių nustatymas yra sudėtingas ir gali būti draudžiamas skaičiavimui. Mes pristatome sistemą, vadinamą VecShare, kuri palengvina dalijimąsi žodžių įterpimais internete ir juos gauti. Pagal šią sistemą viešoji dalijimosi duomenimis infrastruktūra sutelkiama priimant įterpiamuosius rinkinius ir numatoma automatizuota įrangos surinkimo priemonė, panaši į tam tikrą korpusą. Atliekame eksperimentinį VecShare panašumo strategijų vertinimą ir parodysime, kad jos veiksmingai padeda veiksmingai gauti įterpimus, kurie padidina dokumentų klasifikavimo užduoties tikslumą. Galiausiai teikiame atviro kodo Python biblioteką VecShare sistemai naudoti.', 'mk': 'Многу природни модели за процес на јазик (NLP) зависат од дистрибуирани вектори на зборови. Because the process of training word vectors can require large amounts of data and computation, NLP researchers and practitioners often utilize pre-trained embeddings downloaded from the Web.  Сепак, најдувањето на најдобрите вложувања за одредена задача е тешко и може да биде компјутативно забрането. Презентираме рамка, наречена ВеcShare, која овозможува да се сподели и да се врати зборови на интернет. Рамката влијае на јавната инфраструктура за споделување на податоци за домаќин на внатрешни компјутери и обезбедува автоматизирани механизми за преземање на внатрешните компјутери кои се најслични на одреден корпус. Ние спроведуваме експериментална проценка на стратегиите за сличност на ВеcShare, и покажуваме дека тие се ефикасни во ефикасното преземање на вградувања кои ја зголемуваат прецизноста во задачата за класификација на документите. Конечно, обезбедуваме отворена питонска библиотека за користење на рамката VecShare.', 'ms': 'Banyak model Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP) bergantung pada perwakilan vektor yang disebarkan perkataan. Kerana proses latihan vektor perkataan boleh memerlukan jumlah besar data dan komputasi, peneliti NLP dan praktek sering menggunakan penyembedding terlatih-terlatih yang dimuat turun dari Web. Bagaimanapun, mencari kandungan terbaik untuk tugas tertentu adalah sukar, dan boleh diharamkan secara kira-kira. We present a framework, called VecShare, that makes it easy to share and retrieve word embeddings on the Web.  kerangka menggunakan infrastruktur berkongsi data awam untuk set penyembedding hos, dan menyediakan mekanisme automatik untuk mendapatkan penyembedding yang paling mirip dengan corpus yang diberikan. Kami melakukan penilaian percubaan strategi persamaan VecShare, dan menunjukkan bahawa ia berkesan untuk mengambil semula bentuk yang meningkatkan ketepatan dalam tugas klasifikasi dokumen. Akhirnya, kami menyediakan perpustakaan Python sumber terbuka untuk menggunakan kerangka VecShare.', 'ml': 'Many Natural Language Processing (NLP) models rely on distributed vector representations of words.  വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്ക് വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളും കണക്ക് ചെയ്യേണ്ടതുണ്ട്, എംഎല്\u200dപി പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരും പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരും എല് എന്നാലും കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവേശങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് കണക്കില്\u200d നിരോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെക്ഷേര്\u200d എന്നൊരു ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് വെബിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും വീണ്ടും കൊ ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്ക് പൊതുവായ ഡേറ്റാ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു പൊതുവായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്  നമ്മള്\u200d വെക്ഷേരിന്റെ ഒരേപോലുള്ള ചട്ടങ്ങളെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു രേഖയുടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രാപ്തിപ് അവസാനം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെക്ഷേര്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു തുറന്ന സോര്\u200dസ്സ് പൈത്തോന്\u200d ലൈബ്രറി നല്\u200dക', 'mt': 'Ħafna mudelli ta’ Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLP) jiddependu fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ kliem ta’ vetturi distribwiti. Because the process of training word vectors can require large amounts of data and computation, NLP researchers and practitioners often utilize pre-trained embeddings downloaded from the Web.  Madankollu, is-sejba tal-a ħjar inkorporazzjonijiet għal kompitu partikolari hija diffiċli, u tista’ tkun komputazzjonalment projbittiva. Aħna nippreżentaw qafas, imsejjaħ VecShare, li jagħmilha faċli li wieħed jaqsam u jikseb il-kliem inkorporati fuq l-Internet. Il-qafas iħeġġeġ infrastruttura pubblika għall-kondiviżjoni tad-dejta biex jospita settijiet ta’ inkorporazzjoni, u jipprovdi mekkaniżmi awtomatizzati għall-ġbir tal-inkorporazzjonijiet l-aktar simili għal korpus partikolari. Aħna nagħmlu evalwazzjoni sperimentali tal-istrateġiji ta’ similarità ta’ VecShare, u nuru li huma effettivi fil-kisba effiċjenti ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet li jsaħħu l-preċiżjoni f’kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti. Fl-aħħar nett, nipprovdu librerija ta’ Python b’sors miftuħ għall-użu tal-qafas VecShare.', 'mn': 'Олон Байгалийн хэл Процессор (NLP) загварууд үгний хуваарилагдсан векторын илэрхийлэл дээр байдаг. Учир нь сургалтын үг векторуудын процесс маш олон өгөгдлийг, тооцоолох хэрэгтэй болдог. NLP судлаачид, мэргэжилтнүүд ихэвчлэн веб-ээс авсан сургалтын хөгжлийг ашигладаг. Гэвч тодорхойлогдсон ажил дээр хамгийн сайн нэвтрүүлэлт олох нь хэцүү, тооцоололтой байж болно. Бид VecShare гэдэг фрейкментийг илтгэдэг. Энэ нь Веб дээр үгийг хуваалцах болон авах амархан болгодог. Энэ хэлбэр нь олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн хуваалцах төхөөрөмжүүдийг холбогдох хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж, өгөгдлийн корпус-тай ихэвчлэн холбогдох үйлдвэрлэлүүдийг автоматжуулсан механизмуудыг хангадаг Бид VecShare-ын адилхан стратегийг туршилтын үнэлгээ хийж, баримт хэлбэрийн даалгаврын зөв байдлыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Эцэст нь бид VecShare фрэйм ашиглахын тулд нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй Python номын санг хангадаг.', 'no': 'Mange naturlege språk- handteringsmodeller (NLP) er på distribuert vektorrepresentasjonar av ord. Fordi prosessen av opplæringsordvektorar kan kreve stor mengda data og datakalkulasjon, NLP-forskere og praktiseringar brukar ofte først opplærte innbygging nedlasta frå nettet. Det er imidlertid vanskeleg å finna dei beste innbygginga for ei oppgåve, og kan vera datamaskina forhindra. Vi presenterer eit rammeverk, kalla VecShare, som gjer det lett å dele og henta ordinnbygging på nettet. Rammeverket leverer ein offentleg datadelingsinfrastruktur til vert innebygde innsett, og tilbyr automatiske mekanisme for å henta innbygginga som er mest liknande til ein gitt korpus. Vi utfører ein eksperimentell evaluering av VecShare- tilsvarende strategiar, og viser at dei er effektiv ved å henta innbyggingar som styrer nøyaktighet i eit dokumentklassifikasjonsoppgåve. Til slutt, har vi ein open-source Python-bibliotek for å bruka VecShare-rammeverket.', 'ro': 'Multe modele de procesare a limbajului natural (NLP) se bazează pe reprezentări vectoriale distribuite ale cuvintelor. Deoarece procesul de formare a vectorilor de cuvinte poate necesita cantități mari de date și calcule, cercetătorii și practicienii PNL utilizează adesea încorporări pre-instruite descărcate de pe Web. Cu toate acestea, găsirea celor mai bune încorporări pentru o anumită sarcină este dificilă și poate fi prohibitivă din punct de vedere computațional. Vă prezentăm un cadru, numit VecShare, care facilitează partajarea și recuperarea încorporărilor de cuvinte pe Web. Cadrul utilizează o infrastructură publică de partajare a datelor pentru a găzdui seturi de încorporare și oferă mecanisme automatizate pentru recuperarea încorporărilor cel mai asemănătoare cu un anumit corpus. Efectuăm o evaluare experimentală a strategiilor de similaritate ale VecShare și arătăm că acestea sunt eficiente în recuperarea eficientă a încorporărilor care sporesc acuratețea într-o sarcină de clasificare a documentelor. În cele din urmă, oferim o bibliotecă Python open-source pentru utilizarea cadrului VecShare.', 'pl': 'Wiele modeli Natural Language Processing (NLP) opiera się na rozproszonych wektorowych reprezentacjach słów. Ponieważ proces szkolenia wektorów słowa może wymagać dużych ilości danych i obliczeń, naukowcy i praktycy NLP często korzystają z wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń pobranych z sieci. Jednak znalezienie najlepszych osadzeń dla danego zadania jest trudne i może być obliczeniowo niewystarczające. Prezentujemy framework o nazwie VecShare, który ułatwia udostępnianie i pobieranie osadzeń słów w sieci Web. Framework wykorzystuje publiczną infrastrukturę udostępniania danych do hostowania zestawów osadzeń i zapewnia zautomatyzowane mechanizmy pobierania osadzeń najbardziej podobnych do danego korpusu. Przeprowadzamy eksperymentalną ocenę strategii podobieństwa VecShare i pokazujemy, że są one skuteczne w efektywnym pobieraniu osadzeń zwiększających dokładność w zadaniu klasyfikacji dokumentów. Wreszcie, dostarczamy open source bibliotekę Pythona do korzystania z frameworku VecShare.', 'sr': 'Mnogi modeli prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) oslanjaju se na raspodjeljene predstave vektora reèi. Zato što proces treninga reèi vektori mogu zahtevati velike kolièine podataka i raèunanja, istraživači NLP-a i praktičnici često koriste predobučene integracije koje su skinule sa interneta. Međutim, pronalaženje najboljih uloga za određeni zadatak je teško i može biti računalno zabranjeno. Predstavljamo okvir koji se zove VecShare, koji olakšava dijeliti i obnoviti reč ugrađenja na internetu. Okvir utiče na javnu infrastrukturu dijeljenja podataka za domaćin integracijskih setova i pruža automatske mehanizme za povratak ugrađenja najsličnijih određenom korpusu. Izvodimo eksperimentalnu procjenu strategija sličnosti VecShare-a i pokazujemo da su efikasne u efektivnom izveštaju integracija koje povećavaju preciznost u zadatku klasifikacije dokumenta. Konačno, pružamo biblioteku otvorenog izvora Python za korištenje okvira VecShare.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) මොඩේල් වචනයේ වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විතරයි. මොකද වෙක්ටර්ස් වචන වචන වෙක්ටර්ස්ගේ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව පුළුවන් විශාල දත්ත සහ ගණනාකරණය, NLP පරීක්ෂකය සහ ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ වෙබ් ව නමුත්, දැනගත්ත වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් හොඳම සංවේදනය හොයාගන්න අමාරුයි, ඒ වගේම පරිගණනය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප අපි ක්\u200dරියාමක් පෙන්වනවා, Vecshare කියලා, ඒකෙන් වෙබ් එකේ වචන සැකසුම් ගන්න ලේසි වෙන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා සාමාජික දත්ත සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූ අපි Vecshare ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ පරීක්ෂණයක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණයක් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නෙ ඔවුන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කිය අන්තිමේදි, අපි වෙක්ස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා.', 'sv': 'Många Natural Language Processing (NLP) modeller förlitar sig på distribuerade vektorrepresentationer av ord. Eftersom processen för att utbilda ordvektorer kan kräva stora mängder data och beräkningar, använder NLP-forskare och utövare ofta förklädda inbäddningar hämtade från webben. Att hitta de bästa inbäddningarna för en viss uppgift är dock svårt och kan vara beräkningsmässigt orimligt. Vi presenterar ett ramverk, VecShare, som gör det enkelt att dela och hämta ord inbäddningar på webben. Ramverket utnyttjar en offentlig infrastruktur för datadelning för att vara värd för inbäddningar, och tillhandahåller automatiserade mekanismer för att hämta inbäddningar som liknar mest en given korpus. Vi utför en experimentell utvärdering av VecShares likhetsstrategier och visar att de är effektiva på att effektivt hämta inbäddningar som ökar noggrannheten i en dokumentklassificeringsuppgift. Slutligen tillhandahåller vi ett Python-bibliotek med öppen källkod för att använda VecShare-ramverket.', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaal badan oo ka baaraandegista afka asalka ah (NLP) waxay ku xiran yihiin noocyo qeyb ah oo ku qoran qoraalka. Maxaa yeelay baaritaanka waxbarashada waxyaabaha ay u baahan karaan tiro badan oo macluumaad iyo xisaab ah, baaritaanka NLP iyo shaqo-bixiyayaasha ayaa inta badan isticmaali kara macluumaadyo horay loo tababaray oo ka soo dejiyey shabakadda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee goobta ugu wanaagsan ee shaqada la siiyo waa adag tahay, waxaana lagu heli karaa xisaab la’aan. Waxaynu keenaynaa shirkad la yidhaahdo VecShare, taasoo u fudud in lagu qeybeeyo oo lagu soo celiyo hadalka internetka. Shaqoyinku waxay leedahay infrastructure dadweynaha lagu sharrajiyo oo ay u hogaansadaan meelaha lagu soo galo, wuxuuna siiyaa meymisyo automatic ah in lagu soo celiyo meelaha lagu soo galo oo ugu habboon korpus la mid ah. Waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta qalabka isku mid ah ee VecShare, waxaana tusinaynaa inay faa’iido ku leeyihiin inay si faa’iido ah u helaan meelaha saxda ku kordhiya shaqada sharciga. Ugu dambaysta waxaynu siinaynaa maktabadda Python oo furan si aan u isticmaalno qashinka VecShare.', 'ur': 'بہت سی طبیعی زبان پرسس (NLP) موڈل کلمات کی تقسیم ہوئی ویکتوروں کی نمونات پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں. کیونکہ کلمات ویکتروں کی تعلیم کی پروسس بہت زیادہ اندازے ڈاٹ اور کمپیوٹر کی ضرورت کرتی ہے، NLP تحقیقات کرنے والوں اور تمرین کرنے والوں کو اکثر ویب سے ڈونلوڈ کیے گئے پہلے تعلیم کی ایمبڈینگ استعمال کرتے ہیں. However, finding the best embedding for a given task is difficult, and can be computationally forbidden. ہم ایک فرمود پیش کرتے ہیں جس کا نام VecShare ہے کہ ویب پر کلمات انڈینگ کا شریک کرنا اور استعمال کرنا آسان ہے فرمیک ایک عمومی ڈاٹ شریک انٹرنیسٹرک کو ہستر ایمبڈینگ سٹ کے لئے لائستر کرتا ہے اور اس کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ انڈینگ کو اٹھانے کے لئے زیادہ مشابہ ہے۔ ہم VecShare کے برابری استراتژی کا ایک امتحان کررہے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ وہ مفید طور پر ایمبڈینگ پیدا کرنے کے لئے موثر ہیں جو ایک دکھانے کے کام میں دقیق اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ آخر میں، ہم نے VecShare فرم کا استعمال کرنے کے لئے ایک کھولتا-سورس پئیٹن لئبریو پیدا کیا ہے.', 'ta': 'நிறைய இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு (NLP) மாதிரிகள் வார்த்தைகளின் பகிர்ந்த நெறிமுறைகளை நம்புகிறது. ஏனென்றால் பயிற்சி சொல்லு வெக்டார்களின் செயல்பாடு பெரிய தரவு ஆனால், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பணிக்கான சிறந்த உள்ளீடுகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பது கடினமானது, மற்றும் கணக்கில் தடை செய்ய முடியும். We present a framework, called VecShare, that makes it easy to share and retrieve word embeddings on the Web.  கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கார்புஸ் போன்ற பொது தரவு பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் அடிப்படையை புரவலனிக்க பொது தகவல் பகிர்ந்து அமைப்புகளை வழங்குகிறது, மற்றும வெக்ஷேரின் ஒத்துமையான திட்டங்களை நாம் ஒரு சோதனையின் மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம், மற்றும் அவர்கள் ஒரு ஆவண வகுப்பிடுதல் பணியில் சரியான திட்டத்தை பெறு கடைசியாக, நாம் வெக்ஷேர் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்த ஒரு திறந்த மூலம் பைதான் நூலகத்தை வழங்குகிறோம்.', 'uz': "Name Chunki so'zlar vektorlari taʼminlovchi jarayonini katta maʼlumot va kompyuter kerak, NLP taʼminlovchilar va taʼminlovchilar oddiy o'rganishdan oldin yozib olingan vaqtlardan foydalanadi. However, finding the best embeddings for a given task is difficult, and can be computationally prohibitive.  Biz VecShare deb nomli freymni hozir qilamiz, bu veb- sahifadagi so'zlarni qayta olish va qayta olish oson qiladi. Name Biz VecShare'ning bir xizmatlik strategiyani qiymatlashimiz bajaramiz va ular hujjatning tashkilotlarini tasdiqlash vazifasidagi foydalanishga ishlaydi. Biz VecShare freymini ishlatish uchun ochiq manbasi Python kutubxonasi.", 'vi': 'Nhiều mô- đun xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) dựa trên các biểu tượng vector đã phân phát từ. Bởi vì quá trình chuyển hóa từ ngữ huấn luyện có thể yêu cầu một lượng lớn dữ liệu và tính toán, các nhà nghiên cứu và các chuyên gia lập trình KDE thường sử dụng những cài ghép được rèn luyện từ web tải về. Tuy nhiên, việc tìm ra sự phù hợp tốt nhất cho một nhiệm vụ đã được đặt là khó, và có thể bị cấm tính. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống quy định mang tên VeChúng tôi sẽ dễ dàng chia sẻ và lấy lại sự nhúng vào từ trên Internet. Bộ khung vận hành một cơ sở chia sẻ dữ liệu công cộng để xây dựng những bộ khung gia nhập, và cung cấp các cơ chế tự động để lấy những bộ nối giống với một tập đoàn. Chúng tôi thực hiện một thí nghiệm đánh giá về các chiến lược tương tự của Vecince, và cho thấy chúng có khả năng lấy được s ự nhúng vào để tăng độ chính xác trong một nhiệm vụ phân hạng tài liệu. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cung cấp một thư viện Python mở nguồn để sử dụng bộ khung của VeVectron.', 'bg': 'Много модели за обработка на естествения език (НЛП) разчитат на разпределени векторни представи на думи. Тъй като процесът на обучение на вектори на думи може да изисква големи количества данни и изчисления, изследователите и практикуващите често използват предварително обучени вграждания, изтеглени от уеб. Въпреки това, намирането на най-добрите вграждания за дадена задача е трудно и може да бъде изчислително забранено. Представяме рамка, наречена която улеснява споделянето и извличането на вградени думи в уеб. Рамката използва публична инфраструктура за споделяне на данни, за да хоства набори за вграждане, и предоставя автоматизирани механизми за извличане на вграждания, които са най-близки до даден корпус. Извършваме експериментална оценка на стратегиите за сходство и показваме, че те са ефективни при ефективно извличане на вграждания, които повишават точността в задачата за класификация на документи. И накрая, предлагаме библиотека с отворен код за използване на рамката.', 'nl': 'Veel Natural Language Processing (NLP) modellen vertrouwen op gedistribueerde vectorrepresentaties van woorden. Omdat het proces van het trainen van woordvectoren grote hoeveelheden gegevens en berekeningen kan vereisen, maken NLP-onderzoekers en -beoefenaars vaak gebruik van vooraf getrainde embeddings die van het web worden gedownload. Het vinden van de beste embeddings voor een bepaalde taak is echter moeilijk en kan computationeel onbereikbaar zijn. We presenteren een framework, genaamd VecShare, dat het gemakkelijk maakt om woord embeddings op het web te delen en op te halen. Het framework maakt gebruik van een openbare infrastructuur voor het delen van gegevens om embeddingsets te hosten en biedt geautomatiseerde mechanismen voor het ophalen van embeddings die het meest lijken op een bepaald corpus. We voeren een experimentele evaluatie uit van de gelijkenisstrategieën van VecShare en laten zien dat ze effectief zijn in het efficiënt ophalen van embeddings die de nauwkeurigheid in een documentclassificatietaak verhogen. Tot slot bieden we een open-source Python bibliotheek voor het gebruik van het VecShare framework.', 'da': "Mange Natural Language Processing (NLP) modeller er afhængige af distribuerede vektorrepræsentationer af ord. Da processen med uddannelse af ordvektorer kan kræve store mængder data og beregning, bruger NLP-forskere og praktikere ofte prætrænede indlejringer downloadet fra internettet. Det er dog vanskeligt at finde de bedste indlejringer til en given opgave og kan være beregningsmæssigt forbudt. Vi præsenterer en ramme, kaldet VecShare, der gør det nemt at dele og hente ord indlejringer på nettet. Rammerne udnytter en offentlig datadelingsinfrastruktur til at hoste indlejringssæt og giver automatiserede mekanismer til at hente de indlejringer, der ligner mest et givet korpus. Vi udfører en eksperimentel evaluering af VecShare's lighedsstrategier, og viser, at de er effektive til effektivt at hente indlejringer, der øger nøjagtigheden i en dokumentklassifikationsopgave. Endelig leverer vi et open source Python bibliotek til brug af VecShare framework.", 'hr': 'Mnogi modeli prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) oslanjaju se na raspodjeljene predstave vektora riječi. Zato što proces vježbanja riječi vektori mogu zahtijevati velike količine podataka i računala, istraživači i praktičari NLP često koriste predobučene uključene ugrađenje s interneta. Međutim, pronalaženje najboljih uloga za određeni zadatak je teško i može biti računalno zabranjeno. Predstavljamo okvir koji se zove VecShare, koji olakšava dijeliti i obnoviti riječi ugrađenja na internetu. Okvir utiče na javnu infrastrukturu dijeljenja podataka za domaćin integracijskih setova i pruža automatske mehanizme za povratak ugrađenja najsličnijih određenom korpusu. Izvršimo eksperimentalnu procjenu strategija sličnosti VecShare-a i pokazujemo da su učinkoviti na učinkovito povlačenju integracija koje povećavaju preciznost u zadatku klasifikacije dokumenta. Konačno, pružamo otvorenu biblioteku Python za upotrebu okvira VecShare.', 'de': 'Viele Natural Language Processing (NLP)-Modelle basieren auf verteilten Vektordarstellungen von Wörtern. Da der Prozess des Trainings von Wortvektoren große Datenmengen und Berechnungen erfordern kann, verwenden NLP-Forscher und -Praktiker oft vortrainierte Einbettungen, die aus dem Web heruntergeladen werden. Die besten Einbettungen für eine bestimmte Aufgabe zu finden, ist jedoch schwierig und kann rechentechnisch unerschwinglich sein. Wir präsentieren ein Framework namens VecShare, das es einfach macht, Worteinbettungen im Web zu teilen und abzurufen. Das Framework nutzt eine öffentliche Datenaustauschinfrastruktur, um Einbettungssätze zu hosten, und bietet automatisierte Mechanismen zum Abrufen der Einbettungen, die einem bestimmten Korpus am ähnlichsten sind. Wir führen eine experimentelle Evaluation der Ähnlichkeitsstrategien von VecShare durch und zeigen, dass sie effektiv sind, Einbettungen zu finden, die die Genauigkeit einer Dokumentenklassifikationsaufgabe erhöhen. Schließlich stellen wir eine Open-Source-Python-Bibliothek für die Verwendung des VecShare-Frameworks zur Verfügung.', 'ko': '많은 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 모델은 단어의 분산 벡터 표현에 의존합니다.훈련어의 벡터 과정은 대량의 데이터와 계산이 필요할 수 있기 때문에, NLP 연구원과 실천자들은 보통 웹에서 다운로드한 미리 훈련된 삽입을 사용한다.그러나 주어진 임무를 위해 가장 좋은 삽입을 찾는 것은 어렵고 계산상 금지될 수도 있다.웹에서 단어를 쉽게 공유하고 검색할 수 있는 VecShare라는 프레임워크를 제시했습니다.이 프레임워크는 공공 데이터 공유 인프라 시설의 위탁 관리 삽입 집합을 이용하여 자동 메커니즘을 제공하여 주어진 자료 라이브러리와 가장 비슷한 삽입을 검색한다.우리는 VecShare의 유사성 전략에 대해 실험 평가를 실시한 결과 삽입을 효과적으로 검색하여 문서 분류 작업의 정확성을 높일 수 있음을 나타냈다.마지막으로, 우리는 VecShare 프레임워크를 사용하는 소스 오픈 Python 라이브러리를 제공했다.', 'id': 'Banyak model Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP) bergantung pada representation vektor yang didistribusikan dari kata-kata. Karena proses pelatihan vektor kata dapat membutuhkan jumlah besar data dan komputasi, peneliti dan praktek NLP sering menggunakan embedding terlatih-terlatih yang diunduh dari Web. However, finding the best embeddings for a given task is difficult, and can be computationally prohibitive.  Kami mempersembahkan sebuah rangkaian, bernama VecShare, yang membuat mudah untuk berbagi dan mengambil kata-kata embedding di Web. Rambutnya mengaktifkan infrastruktur pembagian data publik untuk host set embedding, dan menyediakan mekanisme otomatis untuk mengambil embedding yang paling mirip dengan corpus tertentu. Kami melakukan evaluasi eksperimen dari strategi persamaan VecShare, dan menunjukkan bahwa mereka efektif dalam mengambil efisien embedding yang meningkatkan akurasi dalam tugas klasifikasi dokumen. Akhirnya, kami menyediakan perpustakaan Python sumber terbuka untuk menggunakan kerangka VecShare.', 'fa': 'بسیاری از مدل\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) بر نمایش\u200cهای ویکتورهای تقسیم\u200cشده از کلمات استفاده می\u200cکنند. زیرا فرایند ویکتورهای کلمه آموزش می توانند تعداد زیادی از داده ها و محاسبات را نیاز دارند، محققان NLP و تمرین کنندگان اغلب استفاده می کنند ابتدایی پیش آموزش را از وب دانلود می کنند. ولی پیدا کردن بهترین وسیله\u200cهایی برای یک کار داده سخت است، و می\u200cتواند به صورت محاسبات ممنوع باشد. ما یک چهارچوب را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، به نام VecShare، که برای شریک کردن و بازیابی کلمات در وب آسان می\u200cشود. این چهارچوب یک زیرزمینی با شریک داده\u200cهای عمومی را برای مجموعه\u200cهای وارد کردن میزبان می\u200cکند، و مکانیسم\u200cهای خودکار برای برداشتن ابزار\u200cهای بیشتر شبیه به یک کورپوس داده می\u200cکند. ما یک ارزیابی آزمایشی از استراتژی\u200cهای شباهت VecShare انجام می\u200cدهیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آنها موثر هستند در بازیابی ابزارهای موثرتی که دقیق را در یک کار جدا کردن سند افزایش می\u200cدهند. بالاخره، ما یک کتابخانه\u200cی منبع باز Python را برای استفاده از چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار', 'tr': "Täbiýal Diller işleýän nusgalar (NLP) sözlerin daýratyn vektör represiyonlaryna ynanýar. Çünkü vektörler söz okuwçysynyň işlemleri birnäçe hatlary we hasaplamalary gerek bolup biler, NLP araştırmalaryny we praktikçileri birnäçe öňünden ýüklenen hasaplamalaryny Web tarapyndan ýüklenip bilýärler. Emma, berilen işiň iň gowy integrasyny tapmak kyn we hesaplamada saklanyp biler. Biz VecShare adlandırılan bir çerçeveyi web'de paylaşmak ve kelime içerimlerini elde etmek kolay sağlar. Çap Biz VecShare'yň meňzeşlikli stratejiýasyny barlap barýarys we sened klasifikasiýasynda dogrylyklygy artan integrleriň üstine etkinleýändigini görkez. Soňunda, VecShare frameworkyny ulanmak üçin açyk kaynakly Python kitaphanesini temin edýäris.", 'sw': 'Mradi mwingi wa Utendaji wa Lugha za asili (NLP) wanategemea uwakilishi wa vector wa maneno. Kwa sababu mchakato wa mafunzo wa vectors wa maneno yanaweza kuhitaji kiasi kikubwa cha data na kompyuta, watafiti wa NLP na wataalamu mara nyingi hutumia matumizi ya vifaa vilivyojifunza vilivyowekwa kwenye mtandao wa intaneti. Hata hivyo, kutafuta maeneo bora ya kazi hiyo ni vigumu, na inaweza kuwa haramu kwa hisabu. Tunaweza kutengeneza mfumo, unaoitwa VecShare, ambao unafanya kuwa rahisi kushirikiana na kupata ujumbe wa maneno kupitia mtandao wa intaneti. Mfumo huu unatumia miundombinu ya kushirikiana na taarifa za umma ili kuweka seti zinazopangwa, na inatoa mfumo wa kujitegemea kwa kurudisha vifaa vinavyofanana zaidi na mashirika yaliyopewa. Tunafanya tathmini za mikakati ya usawa wa VecShare, na tunaonyesha kuwa wana ufanisi katika kutafuta vifaa vinavyozidi kuhamasisha uhakika katika kazi ya usambazaji wa nyaraka. Mwisho, tunatoa maktaba huru ya Python kwa kutumia miundombi ya VecShare.', 'sq': 'Shumë modele të procesimit të gjuhës natyrore (NLP) mbështeten në përfaqësimet e vector ëve të shpërndarë të fjalëve. Sepse procesi i trajnimit të vektorëve të fjalëve mund të kërkojë sasi të mëdha të dhënash dhe llogaritjesh, kërkuesit dhe praktikantët e NLP shpesh përdorin përfshirje të paratrajnuara të shkarkuara nga interneti. Megjithatë, gjetja e përfshirjeve më të mira për një detyrë të caktuar është e vështirë dhe mund të jetë e ndalueshme nga ana llogaritare. Ne paraqesim një kuadër, të quajtur VecShare, që e bën të lehtë të ndahemi dhe të marrim fjalë në internet. Korniza nxjerr një infrastrukturë publike të ndarjes së të dhënave për të pritur grupe të përfshirjes dhe ofron mekanizma automatike për marrjen e përfshirjeve më të ngjashme me një korpus të caktuar. Ne kryejmë një vlerësim eksperimental të strategjive të ngjashmërisë s ë VecShare dhe tregojmë se ato janë efektive në marrjen efektive të përfshirjeve që rritin saktës in ë në një detyrë klasifikimi dokumentesh. Finally, we provide an open-source Python library for using the VecShare framework.', 'am': "ብዙ የተለመደው ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም (NLP) ሞዴላዎች በተለያዩ የዌር አካባቢዎች ቃላትን በመጠቀም ይታመናሉ። ምክንያቱም የቃላት መግለጫ የዌርቨሮች ብዙ ዳታዎችን እና ቁጥጥር ያስፈልጋል፣ የNLP አስተማሪዎች እና አስተማሪዎች ብዙ ጊዜ ከድረ ገጽ በፊት ተማርተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ለተሰጠው ስራ የሚሻለውን አካሄድ ማግኘት አስቸጋሪ ነው፣ በቁጥጥርም የተከለከለ ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ VecShare የሚባልን የፍሬም ፍሬም እናቀርባለን፣ በመረብ ላይ ቃልን ለማጋራትና ለማግኘት ያቃልላል፡፡ የፍሬም ሥርዓት የህዝብ ዳታ-አካባቢ መሠረት ማሰናከል እና የተሰጠውን ኮርፓስ በመስጠት የተመሳሳይ የሥልጣናት ማሰናከል ሰጥቷል፡፡ We perform an experimental evaluation of VecShare's similarity strategies, and show that they are effective at efficiently retrieving embeddings that boost accuracy in a document classification task.  በመጨረሻም VecShare Framework ለመጠቀም የክፈት የPython መብረክ እናደርጋለን፡፡", 'af': "Baie Natuurlike Taal Verwerking (NLP) modele vertrou op verspreidige vektor voorstellings van woorde. Omdat die proses van onderwerp woord vektores kan groot hoeveelheid data en rekenaar benodig, NLP onderwerkers en praktisers afgebruik dikwels voor- onderwerp ingesluit wat van die Web afgelaai word. Maar die beste inbettings vir 'n gegewe taak is moeilik te vind, en kan rekenaar verhindering wees. Ons stel 'n raamwerk, genoem VecShare, wat maak dit maklik om woord inbettings op die Web te deel en te herhaal. Die raamwerk verwyder 'n openbare data-deling infrastruktuur na bediener inbêring stel en verskaf outomatiese mekanisme vir die ontvang van die inbêring wat mees gelyk is aan 'n gegewe korpus. Ons uitvoer 'n eksperimentale evaluering van VecShare se gelykheidsstrategies en wys dat hulle effektief is by effektief ontvang van inbêdings wat presies in 'n dokumentklassifikasie taak vergroot word. Eindelik verskaf ons 'n open-bron Python biblioteek vir die gebruik van die VecShare raamwerk.", 'hy': 'Շատ բնական լեզվի մշակումների մոդելներ կախված են բառերի տարածված վեկտորների ներկայացումների վրա: Because the process of training word vectors can require large amounts of data and computation, NLP researchers and practitioners often utilize pre-trained embeddings downloaded from the Web.  Այնուամենայնիվ, որոշ խնդիրների համար լավագույն ներդրումները գտնելը դժվար է և կարող է հաշվարկների առումով արգելափակել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի կառուցվածք, որը կոչվում է Վեքshare, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս կիսել և վերցնել բառերի ներդրումները ցանցում: Համակարգը օգտագործում է հանրային տվյալների կիսման ենթակառուցվածքը, որպեսզի ընդունի ներդրման համակարգեր, և ապահովում է ավտոմատիկ մեխանիզմներ ներդրման համար, որոնք ամենանման են տվյալ կորպուսին: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկվող գնահատում ՎեքՇարի նմանության ռազմավարությունների մասին և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ դրանք արդյունավետ են փաստաթղթի դասակարգման խնդրի ճշգրտությունը բարձրացնելու համար: Վերջապես, մենք ստեղծում ենք բաց աղբյուր Պիթոնի գրադարան, որպեսզի օգտագործենք Վեքshare-ի շրջանակը:', 'ca': "Molts models de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP) confien en representacions vectorials distribuïdes de paraules. Perquè el procés de formació dels vectors de paraules pot requerer grans quantitats de dades i computació, els investigadors i practicants de la NLP sovint utilitzen incorporacions pré-entrenades descarregades de la Web. No obstant això, trobar les millors integracions per una tasca determinada és difícil, i pot ser prohibitiu computacionalment. Presentam un marc, anomenat VecShare, que fa fàcil compartir i recuperar les integracions de paraules a la Web. El marc aprofita una infraestructura pública de compartir dades per aconseguir conjunts d'incorporació, i proporciona mecanismes automatitzats per recuperar els incorporacions més semblants a un cos determinat. Fem una evaluació experimental de les estratègies de similitud de VecShare i demostrem que s ón eficaces en recuperar eficientment incorporacions que augmenten la precisió en una tasca de classificació de document s. Finalment, proporcionem una biblioteca de Python de codi obert per utilitzar el marc VecShare.", 'bn': 'অনেক স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া (এনএলপি) মডেল বিতরণ করা ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধির উপর নির্ভর করে। কারণ প্রশিক্ষণের প্রক্রিয়া বিশাল তথ্য এবং গণনা প্রয়োজন, এনএলপি গবেষক এবং প্রশিক্ষণীয় কর্মকর্তারা প্রায়শই ওয়েব থেকে ডাউনলোড করা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণে কিন্তু একটি কাজের জন্য সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রতিযোগিতা খুঁজে বের করা কঠিন এবং গণতান্ত্রিকভাবে নিষিদ্ধ হতে পারে। আমরা একটি ফ্রেমের কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করি, যার নাম ভেক শেয়ার করা এবং ওয়েবে শব্দ প্রবেশ করার সহজ। ফ্রেম কাঠামোর একটি পাবলিক তথ্য শেয়ারিং সেট হোস্ট করার জন্য পাবলিক তথ্য শেয়ার কর্ম কাঠামো প্রদান করে এবং একটি প্রদত্ত কোর্পাসের মতো বিভিন্ আমরা ভেকশারের সমতুল্য কৌশলের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি, এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে তারা কার্যকর বিষয়গুলোকে কার্যকর করে পুনরুদ্ধার করতে পারে যা নথিপত্র অবশেষে, আমরা একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স পাইথন লাইব্রেরী প্রদান করি ভেস-শেয়ার ফ্রেম ব্যবহার করার জন্য।', 'bs': 'Mnogi modeli prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP) oslanjaju se na raspodjeljene predstave vektora riječi. Zato što proces treninga riječi vektori mogu zahtijevati velike količine podataka i računala, istraživači i praktičari NLP često koriste predobučene integracije koje su skinule sa interneta. Međutim, pronalaženje najboljih uloga za određeni zadatak je teško i može biti računalno zabranjeno. Predstavljamo okvir koji se zove VecShare, koji olakšava dijeliti i obnoviti riječi o integraciji na internetu. Okvir utiče na javnu infrastrukturu podjele podataka za domaćin integracijskih setova i pruža automatske mehanizme za povratak ugrađenja najsličnijih određenom korpusu. Izvršimo eksperimentalnu procjenu strategija sličnosti VecShare-a i pokazujemo da su efikasne u učinkovitosti povlačenju integracija koje povećavaju preciznost u zadatku klasifikacije dokumenta. Konačno, pružamo biblioteku Python otvorenog izvora za korištenje okvira VecShare.', 'cs': 'Mnoho modelů Natural Language Processing (NLP) spoléhá na distribuované vektorové reprezentace slov. Vzhledem k tomu, že proces tréninku slovních vektorů může vyžadovat velké množství dat a výpočtů, výzkumníci a odborníci NLP často využívají předškolené vložení stažené z webu. Najít nejlepší vložení pro daný úkol je však obtížné a může být výpočetně prohibitivní. Představujeme framework VecShare, který usnadňuje sdílení a načítání vložení slov na webu. Framework využívá veřejnou infrastrukturu sdílení dat k hostování sad vložení a poskytuje automatizované mechanismy pro načítání vložení nejvíce podobných danému korpusu. Provádíme experimentální vyhodnocení strategií podobnosti VecShare a ukazujeme, že jsou efektivní při efektivním načítání vložení, které zvyšují přesnost v úkolu klasifikace dokumentů. Nakonec poskytujeme open-source knihovnu Python pro použití frameworku VecShare.', 'et': 'Paljud loodusliku keele töötlemise mudelid tuginevad sõnade hajutatud vektorikujutistele. Kuna sõnavaktorite koolitamise protsess võib nõuda suurt hulka andmeid ja arvutusi, kasutavad NLP teadlased ja praktikud sageli veebist allalaaditud eelkoolitud manustamist. Kuid parimate manustamiste leidmine antud ülesande jaoks on keeruline ja võib olla arvutuslikult keeruline. Esitame raamistiku nimega VecShare, mis muudab sõna manustamise veebis lihtsaks jagada ja taastada. Raamistik kasutab manustamiskomplektide majutamiseks avalikku andmejagamise infrastruktuuri ning pakub automatiseeritud mehhanisme konkreetsele korpusele kõige sarnasemate manustamiste leidmiseks. Teostame VecShare sarnasuse strateegiate eksperimentaalse hindamise ja näitame, et need on efektiivsed dokumentide klassifitseerimise ülesande täpsust suurendavate manustamiste tõhusaks taastamiseks. Lõpuks pakume avatud lähtekoodiga Pythoni teeki VecShare raamistiku kasutamiseks.', 'az': "Təbiətli Dil İşlemi (NLP) modelleri sözlərin dağıtılmış vektoru göstərilmələrinə təvəkkül edir. Çünki vektörlərin təhsil edilən söz işləri böyük məlumatları və hesablama ehtiyacı olar, NLP araştırmacıları və praktikçiləri İnternettən yüklənmiş əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş inbingləri istifadə edirlər. Ancaq verilən iş üçün ən yaxşı inşallar tapmaq çətin və hesablama qadağan edilə bilər. Biz VecShare adlı bir frameworku göstəririk ki, internette sözləri paylaşdırmaq və alınmaq üçün asanlaşdırır. Çerçive içərisində qonaqlar üçün halkı məlumat paylaşılma infrastrukturasını və verilən korpusa ən bənzər inşalları almaq üçün automatlı mehānismi təklif edir. Biz VecShare'in bənzər stratejilərinin təcrübəsini təcrübə edirik və belə göstəririk ki, onlar bir döküm klasifikasyonunda doğruluğu artıran inbingləri çox etkilidirlər. Sonunda, VecShare framework ünü istifadə etmək üçün açıq mənbə Python kitabısını təmin edirik.", 'fi': 'Monet Natural Language Processing (NLP) -mallit perustuvat hajautettuihin vektoriesityksiin sanoista. Koska sanavektorien koulutusprosessi voi vaatia suuria määriä dataa ja laskentaa, NLP:n tutkijat ja ammattilaiset käyttävät usein verkosta ladattuja esikoulutettuja upotuksia. Parhaiden upotusten löytäminen tiettyyn tehtävään on kuitenkin vaikeaa, ja se voi olla laskennallisesti kieltävää. Esittelemme VecShare-nimisen kehyksen, joka helpottaa sanaupotusten jakamista ja noutamista verkossa. Kehys hyödyntää julkista tiedonjakoinfrastruktuuria upotusjoukkojen isännöimiseksi ja tarjoaa automatisoituja mekanismeja tietyn korpusen kaltaisten upotusten hakemiseksi. Teemme kokeellisen arvioinnin VecSharen samankaltaisuusstrategioista ja osoitamme, että ne ovat tehokkaita noutamaan tehokkaasti upotuksia, jotka parantavat asiakirjojen luokittelun tarkkuutta. Lopuksi tarjoamme avoimen lähdekoodin Python-kirjaston VecShare-kehyksen käyttöön.', 'jv': 'Alternate Soalé perusahaan kelompok kelompok kelompok bisa dianggap luwih akeh data lan sak bataran, NLP cerceton lan uga praksikan seng digawe oleh basa punika dipun dianggap politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nambah rampungan, jeneng veCshare, lan dianggawe ngegampang kanggo kelas lan ijol-ijolan word embedding ing lan web. Genjer-sistem sing nyimpen nggawe sistem sing gawe data sharing publika kanggo ngubah asset sing nyimpen, lan ngewehi sistem sing otomatik kanggo nggawe barang-sistem sing koyo ngono perusahaan sing lihok sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk akses perusahaan dengané sampeyan vecshare, lan ngawe barang dhéwé sing luwih apik dhéwé iso nggawe barang nggawe basa sing apik dhéwé. Saiki, kéné ngewehi akeh open-source piraten kanggo nggambar vecc share pancen.', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion Saboda haka, jarayon mafarin magana masu iya amfani da masu motsi masu yawa na danahan da lissafa, watan na NLP da masu aikin su yi amfani da matsayin da aka haramtar da shi daga Web. Kuma an haramta shi a lissãfi. Tuna halatar da wani firam wanda ake kiran "VercShare", yana da sauƙi in sharing da za\'a sami maganar da ake shigar da shi a kan Web. Firam ɗin ke samar da wata firam na shirin da data-sharing da ɗabi\'a zuwa matangazo da ke haɗa set-ɗamfyutan, kuma yana bãyar da mekanin farat-ɗabi\'a wa ya samu masu motsa masu daidai da wata nau\'in da aka ba shi. Tuna samar jarrabi ga masu motsi da ke samu\'a na VercShare, kuma Muke nũna su masu amfani da wajen lokaci da ke ƙara taƙaita cikin wani aikin takardar share. Gani, za\'a iya samar da littãfin Python wanda aka buɗe-buɗa don mu yi amfani da firam-share', 'he': 'המודלים רבים של תהליך שפות טבעית (NLP) תלויים ביציגות ווקטורים מפוצצות של מילים. מכיוון שהתהליך של אימון ווקטורי מילים יכול לדרוש כמויות גדולות של נתונים וחישובים, חוקרים ומאמנים NLP לעתים קרובות משתמשים בתכניות מאומנות מראש שהורדו מהרשת. עם זאת, למצוא את התכניות הטובות ביותר למשימה מסוימת זה קשה, ויכול להיות מחשבי אסור. אנו מציגים מסגרת, שנקראת VecShare, שמקלה לחלוק ולהשיג מילים קישומים באינטרנט. המסגרת משתמשת בתשתית שיתוף נתונים ציבורית כדי לארח קבוצות פיתוח, ומספקת מנגנונים אוטומטיים כדי להשיג את התכניות הכי דומות לקורפוס מסוים. אנו מבצעים עריכה ניסיונית של אסטרטגיות הדמיון של VecShare, ולהראות שהם יעילים בהחזרה יעילה של תוכניות שמגיעות מדויקה במשימת מסמכים מסווג. סוף סוף, אנחנו מספקים ספריית פיתון מקור פתוח להשתמש במסגרת VecShare.', 'sk': 'Mnogi modeli za obdelavo naravnega jezika (NLP) se zanašajo na porazdeljene vektorske predstavitve besed. Ker lahko proces usposabljanja besednih vektorjev zahteva velike količine podatkov in računov, raziskovalci in strokovnjaki NLP pogosto uporabljajo vnaprej usposobljene vdelave, prenesene iz spleta. Vendar pa je iskanje najboljših vdelav za določeno opravilo težko in je lahko računalniško prepovedano. Predstavljamo okvir, imenovan VecShare, ki omogoča enostavno skupno rabo in pridobivanje vdelanih besed v spletu. Okvir uporablja javno infrastrukturo za izmenjavo podatkov za gostitev naborov vdelav in zagotavlja avtomatizirane mehanizme za pridobivanje vdelav, ki so najbolj podobne določenemu korpusu. Izvedli smo eksperimentalno oceno strategij podobnosti VecShare in pokazali, da so učinkovite pri učinkovitem pridobivanju vdelav, ki povečujejo natančnost pri opravilu klasifikacije dokumentov. Na koncu ponujamo odprtokodno Python knjižnico za uporabo okvira VecShare.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་མིག་ཆས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་ཕན་རིས་ཐོག་ཏུ་བཞག་ཡོད་པ Because the process of training word vectors can require large amounts of data and computation, NLP researchers and practitioners often utilize pre-trained embeddings downloaded from the Web. ཡིན་ནའང་། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་དཀའ་པོ་ཡོད་པ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་ལས་ཆོག ང་ཚོས་VecShare(VecShare)ཡིག་ཆའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཞིག་འདི་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་སླ་གཏོང་རྩིས་ཐོག་ཏེ། ཝེབ་གཞུང་གིས་མི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྡུ ང་ཚོས་VecShare་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་VecShare་གི་ཁུངས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་open-source Python དཔེ་མཛོད་ཁང་ཅིག་བྱིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Word Re-Embedding via Manifold Dimensionality Retention', 'ar': 'إعادة تضمين الكلمات عن طريق الاحتفاظ بأبعاد المنوع', 'fr': 'Réintégration de mots via la conservation de la dimensionnalité multiple', 'pt': 'Re-incorporação de palavras via retenção de dimensionalidade múltipla', 'es': 'Reincrustación de palabras mediante retención de dimensionalidad múltiple', 'ja': 'マニホールド寸法保持によるワード再埋め込み', 'zh': '因流形维数留词重嵌之', 'hi': 'कई गुना आयामी अवधारण के माध्यम से शब्द पुन: एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Повторное встраивание слов через сохранение размерности коллектора', 'ga': 'Ath-Leabú Focal trí Choinneáil Toise Iomadúla', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Szó újbóli beágyazása többféle dimenziós megőrzéssel', 'el': 'Επαναενσωμάτωση λέξεων μέσω της διατήρησης της πολλαπλής διαστασιμότητας', 'it': 'Re-incorporazione della parola tramite la conservazione della dimensione del collettore', 'kk': 'Манифолды өлшемдерді сақтау арқылы сөзді қайта ендіру', 'lt': 'Pakartotinis žodžio įterpimas daugialypio matmens išsaugojimas', 'mk': 'Вклучување на зборови преку задржување на манипли димензионалности', 'ms': 'Penjelmaan Semula Perkataan melalui Penjagaan Dimensii Berlipat', 'mn': 'Манифолд хэмжээст хадгалах үг', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni mill-ġdid tal-kliem permezz taż-Żamma tad-Dimensjonalità Manipli', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് മാനിഫോള്\u200dഡ് ഡീമെന്\u200dസലിറ്റിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പുനീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Ponowne osadzanie słowa poprzez zachowanie różnorodności wymiarowej', 'ro': 'Re-încorporarea cuvintelor prin reținerea dimensiunilor multiple', 'sr': 'Re č ponovno uključena putem zadržavanja dimenzionalnosti Manifold', 'so': 'Heshiiska u soo guuridda ee Manifold', 'sv': 'Ombäddning av ord via förvarning av dimensioner', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை மீண்டும் உட்பொதிந்தது Manifold Dimensibility Retention வழியாக', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Từ tái nhúng qua khả năng chiều', 'bg': 'Превграждане на думи чрез запазване на многоизмерността', 'da': 'Indlejring af ord via manifold Dimensionalitetsbevarelse', 'nl': 'Woord opnieuw insluiten via Manifold Dimensionality Retention', 'hr': 'Re č ponovno uključenje putem zadržavanja dimenzionalnosti Manifold', 'ko': '다차원 보존에 기반한 단어 삽입', 'de': 'Word Re-Embedding über Manifold Dimensionality Retention', 'id': 'Penciptaan ulang kata melalui Pemegangan Dimensionalitas Berlipat', 'sw': 'Matambo ya Kupitia Hukumu ya Manifold', 'tr': 'Manifold Ölçüliki Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Woord Herinbêer deur Manifold Dimensionaliteit Behou', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'sq': 'Word Re-Embedding via Manifold Dimensionality Retention', 'az': 'Manifold ölçülük Saqlaması vasitəsilə Söz Yenidən Dönüşdürməsi', 'bn': 'ম্যানিফোল্ড ডিমেন্সিয়ালিটি পুনরায় বিস্তারিত শব্দ', 'fa': 'Name', 'cs': 'Opětovné vložení slova prostřednictvím zachování rozmanité dimenzionality', 'et': 'Sõna ümberpaigutamine mitmemõõtmelisuse säilitamise kaudu', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Re č ponovno uključena putem zadržavanja dimenzionalnosti Manifold', 'ca': 'La reintegració de paraules a través de la retenció de dimensions múltiples', 'fi': 'Sanan uudelleensulauttaminen moniulotteisen ulottuvuuden säilyttämisen avulla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Ponovna vdelava besed z ohranjanjem razvezne dimenzionalnosti', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'שימוש מילים מחדש באמצעות שמירת מימדיות רבה', 'bo': 'མ་ནི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་བསྐྱར་འཛུགས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་'}
{'en': 'Word embeddings seek to recover a Euclidean metric space by mapping words into vectors, starting from words co-occurrences in a corpus. Word embeddings may underestimate the similarity between nearby words, and overestimate it between distant words in the Euclidean metric space. In this paper, we re-embed pre-trained word embeddings with a stage of manifold learning which retains dimensionality. We show that this approach is theoretically founded in the metric recovery paradigm, and empirically show that it can improve on state-of-the-art embeddings in word similarity tasks 0.5-5.0 % points depending on the original space.', 'ar': 'تسعى عمليات دمج الكلمات إلى استعادة مساحة مترية إقليدية عن طريق تعيين الكلمات في متجهات ، بدءًا من تواجد الكلمات المشتركة في مجموعة. قد تقلل عمليات تضمين الكلمات من التشابه بين الكلمات القريبة ، وتبالغ في تقديرها بين الكلمات البعيدة في الفضاء المتري الإقليدي. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بإعادة تضمين حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا بمرحلة من التعلم المتنوع الذي يحتفظ بالأبعاد. نظهر أن هذا النهج مؤسس نظريًا في نموذج الاسترداد المتري ، ونظهر بشكل تجريبي أنه يمكن تحسين عمليات التضمين الحديثة في مهام تشابه الكلمات 0.5 - 5.0٪ نقطة اعتمادًا على المساحة الأصلية.', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras buscan recuperar un espacio métrico euclidiano mapeando palabras en vectores, comenzando por la coocurrencia de palabras en un corpus. La incrustación de palabras puede subestimar la similitud entre palabras cercanas y sobreestimarla entre palabras distantes en el espacio métrico euclidiano. En este artículo, volvemos a integrar las incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas con una etapa de aprendizaje múltiple que conserva la dimensionalidad. Mostramos que este enfoque se basa teóricamente en el paradigma de recuperación métrica, y demostramos empíricamente que puede mejorar las incorporaciones de última generación en tareas de similitud de palabras entre 0,5 y 5,0% puntos según el espacio original.', 'pt': 'Embeddings de palavras buscam recuperar um espaço métrico euclidiano mapeando palavras em vetores, a partir de coocorrências de palavras em um corpus. A incorporação de palavras pode subestimar a semelhança entre palavras próximas e superestimá-la entre palavras distantes no espaço métrico euclidiano. Neste artigo, nós reincorporamos as incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas com um estágio de aprendizado múltiplo que retém a dimensionalidade. Mostramos que esta abordagem é teoricamente fundamentada no paradigma de recuperação métrica e mostramos empiricamente que ela pode melhorar em embeddings de última geração em tarefas de similaridade de palavras de 0,5 a 5,0% pontos dependendo do espaço original.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots cherchent à récupérer un espace métrique euclidien en mappant des mots dans des vecteurs, en commençant par les cooccurrences de mots dans un corpus. Les intégrations de mots peuvent sous-estimer la similitude entre les mots proches et la surestimer entre des mots distants dans l'espace métrique euclidien. Dans cet article, nous réintégrons les intégrations de mots pré-entraînées avec une étape d'apprentissage multiple qui conserve la dimensionnalité. Nous montrons que cette approche est théoriquement fondée sur le paradigme de récupération métrique et montrons empiriquement qu'elle peut améliorer les intégrations de pointe dans les tâches de similarité de mots de 0,5 à 5,0\xa0% selon l'espace d'origine.", 'ja': '単語埋め込みは、コーパス内で共起する単語から始まる単語をベクトルにマッピングすることによって、ユークリッドのメトリック空間を回復しようとする。単語の埋め込みは、近くの単語間の類似性を過小評価し、ユークリッドメトリック空間の遠くの単語間の類似性を過大評価する可能性があります。この論文では、次元を保持するマニホールド学習の段階で、事前に訓練された単語の埋め込みを再び組み込んだ。このアプローチは、理論的にはメトリックリカバリーパラダイムに基づいており、元のスペースに応じて0.5〜5.0 ％ポイントのワード類似性タスクの最先端の埋め込みを改善できることを実証的に示しています。', 'zh': '词嵌试射单词于向量(自语料库中单词共现始)以复欧数里得度量空间。 词嵌或低估近单词之相似性,而高估欧数里度空单词之相似性。 本文中,以一留维度流形学复嵌预练之词。 吾明此法立于度量恢复之基,而明于经验,可以原始空间改进0.5 - 5.0%点者单词相似性最先进者也。', 'hi': 'Word embeddings वैक्टर में शब्दों को मैप करके एक यूक्लिडियन मीट्रिक स्थान को पुनर्प्राप्त करना चाहते हैं, जो एक कॉर्पस में सह-घटनाओं के शब्दों से शुरू होता है। शब्द एम्बेडिंग आस-पास के शब्दों के बीच समानता को कम कर सकते हैं, और यूक्लिडियन मीट्रिक स्पेस में दूर के शब्दों के बीच इसे अधिक महत्व दे सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम कई गुना सीखने के चरण के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग को फिर से एम्बेड करते हैं जो आयामीता को बनाए रखता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह दृष्टिकोण सैद्धांतिक रूप से मीट्रिक रिकवरी प्रतिमान में स्थापित किया गया है, और अनुभवजन्य रूप से दिखाता है कि यह मूल स्थान के आधार पर शब्द समानता कार्यों में अत्याधुनिक एम्बेडिंग पर सुधार कर सकता है 0.5 - 5.0% अंक।', 'ru': 'Вложения слов стремятся восстановить евклидово метрическое пространство, отображая слова в векторах, начиная со слов соприкосновения в корпусе. Вложения слов могут недооценивать сходство между близлежащими словами и переоценивать его между отдаленными словами в евклидовом метрическом пространстве. В этой статье мы переосмыслили предварительно обученные вложения слов со стадией многогранного обучения, которая сохраняет размерность. Мы показываем, что этот подход теоретически основан на парадигме метрического восстановления, и эмпирически показываем, что он может улучшаться на самых современных вложениях в задачи подобия слов 0,5 - 5,0% баллов в зависимости от исходного пространства.', 'ga': 'Féachann leabaithe focal le spás méadrach Eoiclídeach a aisghabháil trí fhocail a mhapáil ina veicteoirí, ag tosú le focail a chomhtharlaíonn i gcorpas. D’fhéadfadh sé gur beag an meas a d’fhéadfadh leabú focal an chosúlacht idir focail in aice láimhe, agus rómheastachán a dhéanamh air idir focail i bhfad i gcéin sa spás méadrach Eoiclídeach. Sa pháipéar seo, rinneamar leabú focal réamhoilte le céim den fhoghlaim iolrach a choinníonn toiseachas i gcónaí. Léiríonn muid go bhfuil an cur chuige seo bunaithe go teoiriciúil sa paraidím aisghabhála méadrach, agus léiríonn sé go heimpíreach gur féidir leis feabhas a chur ar leabú úrscothach i dtascanna cosúlachta focal 0.5 - 5.0% pointí ag brath ar an spás bunaidh.', 'el': 'Οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων επιδιώκουν να ανακτήσουν έναν Ευκλείδειο μετρικό χώρο χαρτογράφησης λέξεων σε διανύσματα, ξεκινώντας από τις συνπαρουσίες λέξεων σε ένα σώμα. Η ενσωμάτωση λέξεων μπορεί να υποτιμήσει την ομοιότητα μεταξύ κοντινών λέξεων και να την υπερεκτιμήσει μεταξύ μακρινών λέξεων στον Ευκλείδειο μετρικό χώρο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, ενσωματώνουμε εκ νέου προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων με ένα στάδιο πολλαπλής μάθησης που διατηρεί την διαστασιμότητα. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση θεμελιώνεται θεωρητικά στο παράδειγμα της μετρικής ανάκτησης, και εμπειρικά αποδεικνύουμε ότι μπορεί να βελτιώσει τις σύγχρονες ενσωματώσεις σε εργασίες ομοιότητας λέξεων 0.5 έως 5.0% σημείων ανάλογα με τον αρχικό χώρο.', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások egy euklideai metrikus tér visszaállítására törekszenek a szavak vektorokba történő leképezésével, a korpuszban lévő szavak együttes előfordulásaitól kezdve. A szóbeágyazások alábecsülhetik a közeli szavak hasonlóságát, és túlbecsülhetik azt az euklideai metrikus térben lévő távoli szavak között. Ebben a tanulmányban újra beágyazzuk az előre képzett szóbeágyazásokat a sokféle tanulás szakaszába, amely megőrzi a dimenziót. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a megközelítés elméletileg a metrikus helyreállítási paradigmában alapul, és empirikusan megmutatjuk, hogy az eredeti tértől függően 0,5-5,0%-os szóhasonlósági feladatokban lévő korszerű beágyazásokon képes javulni.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შებრუნებები ძირებენ იუკლიდიანი მეტრიკური ადგილას, რომელიც სიტყვების მაპოვტირებით ვიქტორებით, რომელიც სიტყვების შებრუნებით კორპუსში დაწყება სიტყვების შესაბამისი სიტყვების შესაბამისი სიტყვების განსხვავება შეიძლება გადამუშავება და გადამუშავება იუკლიდიანი მეტრიკური სიტყვების განსხვავებაში. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ განვიყენებთ წინ განვიყენებული სიტყვები, რომელიც განვიყენებს განზომილებულობას. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს პროგრამი ტეორეტიკურად დააყენება მეტრიკური დაახლოების პარადიგმაში, და იმისათვიურად აჩვენებთ, რომ ის შეუძლია უფრო მეტრიკური დაახლოებით სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვებში, რო', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole cercano di recuperare uno spazio metrico euclideo mappando le parole in vettori, a partire dalle co-occorrenze di parole in un corpus. Le incorporazioni di parole possono sottovalutare la somiglianza tra parole vicine e sopravvalutarla tra parole lontane nello spazio metrico euclideo. In questo articolo, riemponiamo le incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate con una fase di apprendimento molteplice che mantiene la dimensionalità. Mostriamo che questo approccio è teoricamente fondato nel paradigma del recupero metrico, e mostriamo empiricamente che può migliorare le incorporazioni all'avanguardia nelle attività di somiglianza delle parole 0,5 - 5,0 punti a seconda dello spazio originale.", 'lt': 'žodžių įterpimo tikslas – atkurti Euklidinę metrinę erdvę, žemėlapizuojant žodžius į vektorius, pradedant žodžiais, kurie pasikartoja korpuse. Word embeddings may underestimate the similarity between nearby words, and overestimate it between distant words in the Euclidean metric space.  Šiame dokumente iš naujo įterpiame iš anksto parengtus žodžius su daugialypio mokymosi etapu, kuris išlaiko matmenį. Mes parodome, kad šis metodas teoriškai grindžiamas metriniu atsigavimo paradigma ir empiriniu požiūriu rodome, kad jis gali pagerinti naujausių įrangų į žodžių panašumo užduotis 0,5–5,0 % taškų, priklausomai nuo pradinės erdvės.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру, корпустағы сөздерді біріктіруден басталып, евклидиялық метрикалық орынды векторларға сәйкес келтіру үшін іздейді. Сөздерді ендіру жақын сөздер арасындағы ұқсастығын төмендету мүмкін және оны Еклидеяның метрикалық орындағы қашықтағы сөздер арасындағы ұқсастығын төмендету мүмкін. Бұл қағазда біз өмірлікті сақтау үшін алдын- ала оқылған сөздерді ендіруді қайта ендіреміз. Бұл тәсілді теориялық түрде метрикалық қалпынау парадигмінде негізделген деп көрсетедік. Бұл сөздердің теориялық тапсырмаларына 0,5 - 5,0% нүктелерін негізделген жерге тәуелді деп көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Вклучувањата на зборови бараат да го обноват евклидискиот метрички простор со мапирање на зборовите во вектори, почнувајќи од зборови коопозиции во корпус. Вклучувањето на зборови може да ја потцени сличноста помеѓу блиските зборови и да ја прецени помеѓу далечните зборови во евклидскиот метрички простор. Во овој весник, ние повторно вградивме предобучени зборови вградени со фаза на многупотребно учење кое ја задржува димензионалноста. Ние покажуваме дека овој пристап е теоретски основан во парадигмот на метрична обнова, и емпирички покажуваме дека може да се подобри на најсовремените вградувања во задачите за сличност на зборовите 0,5 - 5,0 отсто поени во зависност од оригиналниот простор.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d വെക്റ്ററിലേക്ക് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്ത് വാക്കുകളിലേക്ക് സംഭവിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d നിന്നും  അടുത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ഒരേപോലെയാണ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് എന്നിട്ട് ഉക്ലിദിയന്\u200d മെറ്റിക്സ്പെയിലെ  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലന വാക്കുകള്\u200d വീണ്ടും പുനര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പലതും പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സ്റ്റേജി We show that this approach is theoretically founded in the metric recovery paradigm, and empirically show that it can improve on state-of-the-art embeddings in word similarity tasks 0.5 - 5.0% points depending on the original space.', 'ms': 'Penampilan perkataan mencari untuk pulihkan ruang metrik Euclidean dengan memetakan perkataan ke dalam vektor, bermula dari perkataan yang berlaku sama dalam korpus. Pencampuran perkataan boleh meremehkan kesamaan antara perkataan dekat, dan meremehkannya antara perkataan jauh dalam ruang metrik Euclidean. Dalam kertas ini, kami memasukkan semula perkataan yang dilatih-dilatih dengan tahap pembelajaran berbilang yang memelihara dimensi. Kita tunjukkan bahawa pendekatan ini secara teori didasarkan dalam paradigma pemulihan metrik, dan secara empirik menunjukkan bahawa ia boleh meningkatkan pada penerbangan state-of-the-art dalam tugas persamaan perkataan 0.5 - 5.0% titik bergantung pada ruang asal.', 'mt': "L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem ifittxu li jirkupraw spazju metriku Euclidean billi jimmappjaw il-kliem f’vetturi, li jibdew minn kliem ko-okkorrenzi f’korpus. L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem tista’ tissottostima s-similarità bejn il-kliem qrib, u tissottostimaha bejn kliem distanti fl-ispazju metriku Euclidean. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna inkorporajna mill-ġdid kliem imħarreġ minn qabel b’stadju ta’ tagħlim multiplu li jżomm id-dimensjonalità. Aħna nuru li dan l-approċċ huwa teoretikament ibbażat fil-paradigma metrika tal-irkupru, u empirikament nuru li jista' jtejjeb fuq l-inkorporazzjonijiet l-aktar avvanzati fil-kompiti ta' similarità tal-kliem 0.5 - 5.0% punti skont l-ispazju oriġinali.", 'mn': 'Еклидийн метрик орон зайг вектор руу зураг хийж, корпусын үгнээс эхлэх болно. Хүмүүс нь ойролцоогоор байгаа үгнүүдийн хоорондох тэнцүү байдлыг багасгаж, Euclidean метрийн орон зайд хол үгнүүдийн хоорондох тэнцүү байдлыг багасгаж болно. Энэ цаасанд бид хэмжээст байдлыг хадгалах хэмжээсүүдийг олон хэмжээст суралцах шатаар дахин суралцагдсан үг бий болгоно. Бид энэ аргыг теоретик эрүүл мэндийн парадигмд байгуулсан гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ аргыг эхний орон зайд хамааралтай 0.5-5.0% цэгүүдийн хувьд илүү сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Osadzania słów mają na celu odzyskanie euklidejskiej przestrzeni metrycznej poprzez mapowanie słów na wektory, zaczynając od współwystępowania słów w korpusie. Wkłady słów mogą niedoceniać podobieństwo pomiędzy pobliskimi słowami i przeceniać je między odległymi słowami w euklidejskiej przestrzeni metrycznej. W niniejszym artykule ponownie osadzamy wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów z etapem wielokrotnego uczenia się, który zachowuje wymiarowość. Pokazujemy, że podejście to teoretycznie opiera się na paradygmacie odzyskiwania metrycznego i empirycznie pokazujemy, że może poprawić najnowocześniejsze osadzenia w zadaniach podobieństwa słów 0.5–5.0% w zależności od pierwotnej przestrzeni.', 'no': 'Ordinnbyggingar søker til å gjenoppretta eit Euklidean metrisk plass ved å kartera ord til vektorar, som startar frå ord sammenhendingar i ein korpus. Ordinnbygging kan underestimere liknande mellom nærare ord og overestimere det mellom distant ord i Euklidean metrisk plass. I denne papiret innebygger vi berre før-trenga ordinnbygging med ein stad med fleire læring som beholder dimensjonalitet. Vi viser at denne tilnærminga er teoretisk basert i paradigmet for metrisk gjenoppretting, og empirisk viser at det kan forbedra tilstanden av kunsten i ordliknande oppgåver 0,5 – 5,0 % avhengig av den opprinnelige rommet.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte caută să recupereze un spațiu metric euclidian prin maparea cuvintelor în vectori, pornind de la co-aparențele cuvintelor într-un corpus. Încorporările de cuvinte pot subestima similaritatea dintre cuvintele din apropiere și o supraestimează între cuvintele îndepărtate din spațiul metric euclidian. În această lucrare, re-încorporăm încorporări de cuvinte pre-instruite cu o etapă de învățare multiplă care păstrează dimensiunea. Arătăm că această abordare se bazează teoretic în paradigma de recuperare metrică și arătăm empiric că poate îmbunătăți încorporările de ultimă generație în sarcinile de similitudine cu cuvinte 0,5 - 5,0% puncte în funcție de spațiul original.', 'sr': 'Uklapanje reèi traže da povrati Euklideanski metrički prostor mapirajuæi reèi u vektore, poèevši od reèi koje se saraðuju u korpusu. Uključenje reèi može potceniti sliènost izmeðu bliskih reèi i preproceniti ga izmeðu udaljenih reèi u metrskom prostoru Euklideana. U ovom papiru, ponovo uključujemo predobučene re či ugrađene sa fazom mnogobrojnog učenja koja zadržava dimenzionalnost. Pokazujemo da je taj pristup teoretički osnovan u paradigmu metričkog oporavka, i empirički pokazujemo da može poboljšati stanje umetnosti u rečima sličnosti zadataka 0,5 - 5,0% bodova ovisno o originalnom prostoru.', 'si': 'වෙක්ලිඩියාන් මෙට්\u200dරික් තැනක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වචනය වෙක්ටර් වලට සැකසුම් කරනවා, කොර්පුස්  වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට පුළුවන් වචනය අතරික වචනය අතරික විදියට අනුමානය කරන්න, ඒක පුළුවන් විදියට අතරික වචනය යුක මේ පැත්තට, අපි ආයෙත් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු වචනයක් ඇම්බෙන්ඩ් කරනවා වගේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධානයක් විතරයි  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේට්\u200dරික් ආරක්ෂාව පාර්ඩිග්ම් වලට මේට්\u200dරික් ආරක්ෂාව ස්ථාපනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ කියලා, ඒක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වචන සාමාන්\u200dය ව', 'so': 'Ereyda ku qoran waxay dooneysaa in uu bogsado meel ay ku qoran tahay Euclidian metric, in uu ku sawiro erayo uu ku noqdo vector, oo uu ka bilaabayo hadal isku mid ah oo ku dhacda korpus. Ereyda ku socodkiisu wuxuu ku qiimeyn karaa isku mid ah hadallada dhaw, wuxuuna ku qiimeyn karaa erayo fog oo ku qoran baaxada Yuuclid. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa hadal horay loo tababaray, waxaana lagu soo bandhigayaa waxbarasho kala duduwan, taas oo ku sii socota aqoonta. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkan la aasaasay asalka dib u soo celinta metricka, waxaana si fiican u muujinaynaa in uu horumarin karo xaaladda farshaxanka ee hadalka u eg shaqo 0.5 - 5.0 boqolkiiba, iyadoo ku xiran xafiiska asalka ah.', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar syftar till att återställa ett euklidisk metriskt utrymme genom att kartlägga ord till vektorer, med utgångspunkt från ord som sammanfaller i en korpus. Ordinbäddningar kan underskatta likheten mellan närliggande ord och överskatta den mellan avlägsna ord i det euklidiska metriska utrymmet. I den här uppsatsen bäddar vi in färdigtränade ordinbäddningar med ett stadium av mångfaldig inlärning som behåller dimensionen. Vi visar att detta tillvägagångssätt teoretiskt grundar sig i det metriska återställningsprogrammet, och empiriskt visar att det kan förbättras på state-of-the-art inbäddningar i ordliknande uppgifter 0,5 - 5,0 procentenheter beroende på det ursprungliga utrymmet.', 'ur': 'Word embeddings seek to recover a Euclidean metric space by mapping words into vectors, starting from words co-occurrences in a corpus. کلمات ابڈینگ کی باتوں کے درمیان برابری کو کم اندازہ کر سکتی ہے اور اسے Euclidean متریک فضا میں دور کلمات کے درمیان زیادہ اندازہ کر سکتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلے تدریس کی کلمات کو ایک طرح کی تعلیم کے ساتھ جمع کر رہے ہیں جو اندازے کی حفاظت رکھتی ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ منٹریک recovery paradigm میں تئوریٹی طور پر بنیاد ہے، اور مضبوط طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ کلمات کے مطابق مطابق باتوں پر 0.5 - 5.0% پوینٹ کی اصلی جگہ پر مضبوط ہے۔', 'ta': 'Name வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்கள் சமீபத்திலுள்ள வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையேயுள்ள ஒத்திசையை குறைவாக்கலாம், மற்றும் அதை உக்லிடியன் மெட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முன் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி சொல்லில் மீண்டும் உள்ளிடப்பட்டுள்ளோம் பல கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் ஒரு ந நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மெட்ரிக் மீட்டெடுக்கும் பகுதியில் இந்த அணுக்கம் அடிப்படையாக உள்ளது என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது முதல் வெளியீடு சார்ந்ததை சார்ந்து 0', 'uz': "Name Word embeddings may underestimate the similarity between nearby words, and overestimate it between distant words in the Euclidean metric space.  Bu qogʻozda biz o'rganishdan oldin so'zlarni bir necha ta'lim o'rganish darajada qayta o'rganamiz. Biz bu usulni teoretika o'zgartirish paradigligida yaratganimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Bu so'zlar o'xshash vazifalar 0.5 - 5.0% asl joy bilan bog'liq narsalarning holatida bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Quá trình nhận từ tìm để phục hồi một khoảng trống Euclide bằng cách vẽ các từ thành vectors, bắt đầu từ các từ ngữ đồng xảy ra trong một tập thể. Từ ngữ được sắp xếp có thể đánh giá thấp nét giống nhau giữa từ gần đó, và đánh giá cao nó giữa những từ xa trong không gian đo Bắc cực. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đã tái ghép từ ngữ được đào tạo lại với một giai đoạn học tập đa chiều mà vẫn giữ được ước tính. Chúng tôi cho rằng cách này được giải thích trên cơ thể tìm tạo sự hỗ trợ lập đó... theo sự nghiệp thuật của mình, và nghiệp nghiệp cho rằng nó có thể hiểu được sự giảu đựng của nó trong những thành củ', 'bg': 'Вградените думи се стремят да възстановят евклидско метрично пространство чрез картографиране на думите във вектори, като се започне от съвпадението на думи в корпус. Вградените думи могат да подценят сходството между близките думи и да го надценят между далечните думи в евклидското метрично пространство. В тази статия ние повторно вграждаме предварително обучени словесни вграждания с етап на многообразно обучение, който запазва размерността. Показваме, че този подход е теоретично основан в парадигмата за метрично възстановяване и емпирично показва, че той може да подобри най-съвременните вграждания в задачи за сходство с думи 0,5 - 5,0% точки в зависимост от първоначалното пространство.', 'nl': 'Woordinsluitingen proberen een Euclidische metrische ruimte te herstellen door woorden in vectoren in kaart te brengen, te beginnen met woorden co-voorkomen in een corpus. Woordinbeddingen kunnen de gelijkenis tussen nabije woorden onderschatten en overschatten tussen verre woorden in de Euclidische metrische ruimte. In dit artikel integreren we vooraf getrainde woordinbeddingen opnieuw met een fase van veelvuldig leren die dimensionaliteit behoudt. We laten zien dat deze benadering theoretisch is gegrondvest in het metrische herstelparadigma, en laten empirisch zien dat het kan verbeteren op state-of-the-art embeddings in woordvergelijkingstaken 0.5 tot 5.0% punten afhankelijk van de oorspronkelijke ruimte.', 'hr': 'Uključenje riječi traže povratak Euklideanskog metričkog prostora mapirajući riječi u vektore, počevši od riječi koje se događaju zajedno u korpusu. Uključenje riječi mogu podcijeniti sličnost između bliskih riječi i preprocijeniti ga između udaljenih riječi u metričkom prostoru Euklideana. U ovom papiru, ponovno uključujemo predobučene riječi uključene u fazu mnogobrojnog učenja koja zadržava dimenzionalnost. Pokazujemo da je taj pristup teoretički osnovan u paradigmi metričkog oporavka, i empirički pokazujemo da može poboljšati stanje umjetničkih ugrađenja u riječima sličnosti zadataka 0,5 - 5,0% bodova ovisno o originalnom prostoru.', 'da': 'Ordindlejringer søger at gendanne et euklidisk metrisk rum ved at kortlægge ord i vektorer, startende fra ord samtidig forekomster i et korpus. Ordindlejringer kan undervurdere ligheden mellem ord i nærheden og overvurdere den mellem fjerne ord i det euklidiske metriske rum. I denne artikel indlejrer vi præ-trænede ordindlejringer med et stadie af mangfoldig læring, som bevarer dimensionaliteten. Vi viser, at denne tilgang teoretisk er baseret i det metriske gendannelses paradigme, og empirisk viser, at den kan forbedre på state-of-the-art indlejringer i ord lighedsopgaver 0,5 - 5,0% point afhængigt af det oprindelige rum.', 'de': 'Worteinbettungen versuchen, einen euklidischen metrischen Raum wiederherzustellen, indem sie Wörter in Vektoren abbilden, ausgehend von Wörtern in einem Korpus. Worteinbettungen können die Ähnlichkeit zwischen nahegelegenen Wörtern unterschätzen und sie zwischen entfernten Wörtern im euklidischen metrischen Raum überschätzen. In diesem Beitrag betten wir vortrainierte Worteinbettungen mit einer Stufe des mannigfaltigen Lernens, die Dimensionalität beibehält, neu ein. Wir zeigen, dass dieser Ansatz theoretisch im metrischen Wiederherstellungsparadigma begründet ist, und zeigen empirisch, dass er sich in Abhängigkeit vom ursprünglichen Raum auf modernste Einbettungen in Wortähnlichkeitsaufgaben 0,5–5,0% Punkte verbessern kann.', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمه\u200cها می\u200cخواهند فضای متریک یوکلیدی را با نقشه\u200cبندی کلمه\u200cها به ویکتورها بازیافت کنند، از کلمه\u200cهای همکاری در یک کورپوس شروع می\u200cکنند. جمع کردن کلمات ممکن است شباهت بین کلمات نزدیک را کم ارزیابی کند و بین کلمات دور در فضای متریک یوکلیدان آن را بیش ارزیابی کند. در این کاغذ، ما کلمه پیش آموزش آموزش را با مرحله یادگیری\u200cهای مختلف وارد می\u200cکنیم که اندازه\u200cای را نگه می\u200cدارد. ما نشان می دهیم که این روش تئوری در پارادیگ بازسازی متریک بنیادی شده است، و به صورت عمومی نشان می دهیم که می تواند بر استفاده از وضعیت هنر در وضعیت شبیه به کلمه 0.5 - 5.0 درصد به بستگی از فضا اصلی بهتر شود.', 'ko': '단어 삽입은 단어를 벡터에 비추어 유클리드 도량 공간을 복원하고, 어료 라이브러리의 단어부터 시작합니다.유클리드 도량 공간에서 단어 삽입은 인근 단어 간의 유사성을 과소평가하고 먼 단어 간의 유사성을 과소평가할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 유형 학습 단계를 통해 미리 훈련된 단어를 다시 삽입하고 이 단계는 차원을 보존했다.우리는 이러한 방법이 이론적으로 도량 회복 모델에 세워진 것이고 경험에 의하면 단어의 유사성 임무에서 가장 선진적인 삽입을 개선할 수 있으며 원시 공간에 따라 0.5-5.0%의 점수를 높일 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'id': 'Penampilan kata mencari untuk memulihkan ruang metrik Euclidean dengan memetakan kata-kata ke dalam vektor, dimulai dari kata-kata co-occurrences dalam corpus. Pencampuran kata mungkin meremehkan persamaan antara kata-kata dekat, dan meremehkannya antara kata-kata yang jauh di ruang metrik Euclidean. Dalam kertas ini, kami memasukkan kembali kata-kata yang terlatih-terlatih dengan tahap belajar berbilang yang memelihara dimensi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan ini secara teori didasarkan dalam paradigma pemulihan metrik, dan secara empiris menunjukkan bahwa hal ini dapat meningkat pada penerbangan state-of-the-art dalam tugas persamaan kata 0,5 - 5,0% poin tergantung pada ruang asli.', 'sw': 'Matambo yaliyoingia yanatafuta kupata nafasi ya metrici ya Euclidia kwa kutengeneza maneno katika vector, kuanzia kutoka kwa maneno yanayotokea kwa pamoja katika makampuni. Kuingia kwa maneno yanaweza kupunguza usawa wa maneno yanayokaribia, na kuikadiria zaidi kati ya maneno ya mbali katika anga la mafuriko ya Euclid. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka tena neno lililofunzwa kabla ambalo linajumuisha jukwaa la kujifunza aina mbalimbali ambalo linabakia ukubwa. Tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii kwa nadharia imeanzishwa katika upya wa upya wa mitandao, na kwa makini tunaonyesha kuwa inaweza kuboresha hali ya mambo ya sanaa katika kazi za usawa wa maneno 0.5 - 5.0% zinategemea na nafasi ya asili ya awali.', 'tr': 'Kelimeler, bir korpusdaki kelimelerden başlayan bir Euklidean metrik alanını vektörlere maplatmak için gözleýärler. Soňky sözler ýakyn sözlerin arasynyň meňzeşlikini küýtgedip biler we Euklideki metriň seleňde uzak sözlerin arasyny küýtgedip biler. Bu kagyzda öwrenmek üçin öňünden öwrenmek üçin öňünden öňünden öwrenmek üçin ýene-de okuwçylýan sözleri girdik. Biz bu metodlaryň teoriýaly metriýa gelişmeler paradigmanda guruldygyny görkeýäris we munuň özüniň başlangyç boýunça baglanmasynyň 0.5 - 5.0% nokatynyň üstinde bolup biljekdigini görkeýäris.', 'sq': 'Mbledhjet e fjalëve kërkojnë të rikuperojnë një hapësirë metrike Euklideane duke hartuar fjalët në vektorë, duke filluar nga fjalët bashkëndodhje në një korpus. Ndërtesat e fjalëve mund të nënvlerësojnë ngjashmërinë midis fjalëve të afërta dhe të mbivlerësojnë atë midis fjalëve të largëta në hapësirën metrike Euklideane. Në këtë letër, ne rindërtojmë fjalë të stërvitura me një fazë mësimi të shumëfishtë që mban dimensionalitetin. Ne tregojmë se kjo qasje është teorikisht e themeluar në paradigm ën metrike të rimëkëmbjes, dhe empirikisht tregojmë se mund të përmirësohet në përfshirjet më të larta në detyrat e ngjashmërisë së fjalëve 0.5 - 5.0% pikë në varësi të hapësirës origjinale.', 'af': "Woord inbettings soek om 'n Euklidean metriese spasie te herstel deur woorde in vektore te mapeer, begin van woorde co- occurrences in 'n korpus. Woord inbettings mag die gelykheid tussen naby woorde ondersteun en dit oorskou tussen distant woorde in die Euklidean metriese spasie. In hierdie papier, ons rein-inbêer voor-onderwerp woord inbêding met 'n stadium van manifolde leer wat die dimensionaliteit hou. Ons wys dat hierdie toepassing teorieese gefundeerd is in die metriese herstelling paradigme, en empiriese wys dat dit kan verbeter op staat-van-die-kuns inbettings in woorde gelykenis opdragte 0.5 - 5.0% punte afhang van die oorspronklike spasie.", 'am': 'የቃላት ግንኙነት በኮርፓስ ውስጥ የሚጀምር ቃላትን ወደ vector ማሳያ ለመፈለግ የዩክሊዲያ ሜትሪክ ቦታ ይፈልጋሉ። የቃላት መግቢያ ቃላት በአቅራቢያ ቃላት መካከል በሚያሳፍርበት እና በዩሱሊድ ሚትሪክ ክፍል መካከለኛ የሚቆጠር ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጥንት ተማሪ ቃላትን በብዛት ትምህርት በተደረገ ተቃውሞ እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ይህም ሥርዓት በቴትሮቲካዊ አካባቢ ውስጥ መሠረት እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፤ በመጀመሪያው ስፍራም ላይ የተደላደለ የአራተኛው ክፍል ግንኙነትን በንግግር የክፍለ ክፍል ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Word embeddings seek to recover a Euclidean metric space by mapping words into vectors, starting from words co-occurrences in a corpus.  Բառերի ներդրումը կարող է թերագնահատել մոտակա բառերի նմանությունը և գերագնահատել այն Եուկլիդիայի մետրական տարածության հեռավոր բառերի միջև: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներառում ենք նախապատրաստված բառեր բազմազան ուսումնասիրության մի փուլում, որը պահպանում է չափսերությունը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մոտեցումը տեսականորեն հիմնված է մետրական վերականգնման պարադիգմայում, և էմպիրիկապես ցույց է տալիս, որ այն կարող է բարելավվել բառի նմանության խնդիրների ամենաբարձր ներդրումների վրա՝ 0.5-5.0 տոկոս, կախված սկզբնական տարածքից:', 'bn': 'Word embeddings seek to recover a Euclidean metric space by mapping words into vectors, starting from words co-occurrences in a corpus.  শব্দের প্রবেশ করা সম্ভবত কাছাকাছি শব্দের মধ্যে একই ধরনের মানুষকে কমিয়ে দিতে পারে এবং ইউক্লিডিয়ান মেট্রিক স্থানে দূরের কথ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দের পুনরায় প্রবেশ করে দিয়েছি বিভিন্ন ধরনের শিক্ষার পর্যায়ে যা মানবতার স্থানে র আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই পদ্ধতি মেট্রিক পুনরুদ্ধারের প্যারাডিভিডিমে ভিত্তিক ভাবে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়েছে এবং সামান্য ভাবে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এটি শব্দের একই ধরনের কাজের উপরে শিল্', 'az': 'Sözlər içərisində bir korpus içində olan sözlərdən başlayan Euclidean metrik alanını vektörlərə mapa etmək istəyirlər. Sözlük in şalları yaxın sözlərin arasındakı bənzəri az değerləşdirə bilər və Euclidean metrik alanındakı uzaq sözlərin arasında aşırı değerləşdirə bilər. Bu kağızda, ölçülük saxlayan çoxlu öyrənmə müddəti ilə öyrənən əvvəl təhsil edilmiş sözləri yenidən inşa edirik. Biz bu metodların metrik təmizləmə paradigmanında teoriki olaraq qurulduğunu göstəririk, və bu metodların başlangıç kosmosa bağlı olan 0.5 - 5.0% nöqtələrindən daha yaxşılaşdığını göstəririk.', 'ca': "Les integracions de paraules busquen recuperar un espai mètric euclídic mapeant paraules en vectors, començant de paraules co-ocurrències en un corpus. L'incorporació de paraules pot subestimar la similitud entre paraules properes i sobrestimar-la entre paraules distants a l'espai mètric euclídic. En aquest paper, vam incorporar paraules pré-entrenades amb un escenari d'aprenentatge moltiplicat que manté la dimensionalitat. Mostrem que aquest enfocament està teòricament basat en el paradigma de recuperació mètrica, i empíricament demostram que pot millorar en les incorporacions més modernes en tasques de similitud de paraules 0,5-5,0% segons l'espai original.", 'cs': 'Vložení slov se snaží obnovit euklidovský metrický prostor mapováním slov do vektorů, počínaje ze společných výskytů slov v korpusu. Vložení slov může podceňovat podobnost mezi blízkými slovy a přeceňovat ji mezi vzdálenými slovy v euklidově metrickém prostoru. V tomto příspěvku jsme re-vložili předškolené vložení slov s fází rozmanitého učení, které zachovává dimenzionalitu. Ukazujeme, že tento přístup je teoreticky založen na metrickém obnovení paradigmatu a empiricky ukazujeme, že může zlepšit nejmodernější vkládání do slovních podobnostních úloh 0,5 a5,0% bodů v závislosti na původním prostoru.', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamine püüab taastada eukleidse meetrilise ruumi, kaardistades sõnad vektoriteks, alustades sõnade koosesinemisest korpuses. Sõnade manustamine võib alahinnata lähedalasuvate sõnade sarnasust ja ülehindada seda kaugete sõnade vahel euklide meetrilises ruumis. Käesolevas töös integreerime eelõpetatud sõnade manustamise mitmekülgse õppimise etapiga, mis säilitab mõõtmelisuse. Näitame, et see lähenemine põhineb teoreetiliselt meetrilise taastamise paradigmal ja empiiriliselt näitame, et see võib parandada kaasaegset manustamist sõna sarnasuse ülesannetes 0,5 - 5,0% punkti sõltuvalt algsest ruumist.', 'bs': 'Uključenje riječi traže da povrati Euklideanski metrički prostor mapirajući riječi u vektore, počevši od reči koje se događaju zajedno u korpusu. Uključenje riječi mogu podcijeniti sličnost između bliskih riječi i precijeniti ga između udaljenih riječi u metričkom prostoru Euklideana. U ovom papiru, ponovo uključujemo predobučene riječi ugrađene sa fazom mnogobrojnog učenja koja zadržava dimenzionalnost. Pokazujemo da je taj pristup teoretički osnovan u paradigmu metričkog oporavka, i empirički pokazujemo da može poboljšati stanje umjetničkog ugrađenja u riječima sličnosti zadataka 0,5 - 5,0% bodova ovisno o originalnom prostoru.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotukset pyrkiv瓣t palauttamaan euklidisen metrisen tilan kartoittamalla sanat vektoriksi alkaen sanojen rinnakkaisesiintymisist瓣 korpusessa. Sanaupotukset saattavat aliarvioida l瓣heisten sanojen samankaltaisuutta ja yliarvioida sen kaukaisten sanojen v瓣lill瓣 euklidisessa metrisess瓣 avaruudessa. T瓣ss瓣 artikkelissa upotamme uudelleen esikoulutetut sanaupotukset monimuotoiseen oppimisvaiheeseen, joka s瓣ilytt瓣瓣 mitoituksen. Osoitamme, ett瓣 t瓣m瓣 l瓣hestymistapa perustuu teoreettisesti metriseen palautumiseen, ja empiirisesti osoitamme, ett瓣 se voi parantaa viimeisimpi瓣 upotuksia sanasamankaltaisuusteht瓣viss瓣 0,5 - 5,0% pistett瓣 alkuper瓣isest瓣 tilasta riippuen.', 'jv': 'InsertInsert" [Entry] "at the beginning InsertInsert" [Entry] "at the beginning In this paper, we a re embed-embed words embedding with a phase of manipulation Awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki dadi theoretik nggawe geranggap karo pararampung pada Metric, lan alam kuwi nggawe barang-karang langkung isa luwih apik dhéwé basang langkung sampeyan pararampung 0.5 - 5.0% sing mengko cah basang langkung wigat.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Mai yiwuwa ya ƙara maganar da aka shigar da shi, yana son ya kamata daidaita tsakanin magana na kusa, kuma ya kamata shi a tsakanin magana mai nĩsa cikin filin Metric na Eucli. Ga wannan karatun, za'a fara da wata magana ta fara da wani fassara na sanar da wasu jama'a mãsu yawa da ke riƙe dimiyanci. Tuna nuna cewa wannan hanyarwa ana samar da shi kafin da hanyoyi a cikin duffai na metric, kuma ana nuna mai kyau a kan muhimmin-halin-sanannin da ke daidaita cikin kalmar 0.5 - 5.0 points yana ƙayyade kan filin farko.", 'sk': 'Vgradnje besed skušajo obnoviti evklidski metrični prostor s preslikavo besed v vektorje, začenši s sočasnim pojavljanjem besed v korpusu. Vgradnja besed lahko podcenjuje podobnost med bližnjimi besedami in jo preceni med oddaljenimi besedami v evklidskem metričnem prostoru. V tem prispevku ponovno vgradimo vnaprej usposobljene besedne vdelave s stopnjo raznolikega učenja, ki ohranja dimenzionalnost. Pokazali smo, da je ta pristop teoretično utemeljen v paradigmi metričnega obnovitve in empirično pokazali, da lahko izboljša najsodobnejše vdelave v naloge podobnosti besed 0,5 - 5,0% točke, odvisno od izvirnega prostora.', 'he': 'תוספת מילים מחפשות להשיג מרחב מטריק אוקלידי על ידי מיפות מילים לווקטורים, מתחילים ממילים מתרחשות יחד בקורפוס. תוספת מילים יכולות להעריך את הדמיון בין מילים קרובות, ולהעריך את זה יותר מדי בין מילים רחוקות בחלל המטרי האוקלידי. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מחדש מכניסים מילים מאומנות מראש עם שלב של למידה רבה שמחזיק מימדיות. אנו מראים שהגישה הזאת מבחינה תיאורטית מובססת בפרדיגמה של התאוששות המטרית, ואמפרית מראים שהיא יכולה להשתפר בהכניסות המאוכלת במשימות דומות מילים 0.5 - 5.0% נקודות בהתאם למרחב המקורי.', 'bo': 'Word embeddings seek to recover a Euclidean metric space by mapping words into vectors, starting from words co-occurrences in a corpus. Word embeddings may underestimate the similarity between nearby words, and overestimate it between distant words in the Euclidean metric space. ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་སུ་འཇོག་པའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ཡོད། We show that this approach is theoretically founded in the metric recovery paradigm. And empirically show that it can improve on state-of-the-art embeddings in word similarity tasks 0.5 - 5.0% points depending on the original space.'}
{'en': 'Reporting Score Distributions Makes a Difference : Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'ar': 'الإبلاغ عن توزيع النقاط يحدث فرقًا: دراسة أداء شبكات LSTM من أجل وضع العلامات على التسلسل', 'es': 'Reportar distribuciones de puntajes marca la diferencia: estudio de rendimiento de redes LSTM para el etiquetado de secuencias', 'fr': "L'établissement de rapports sur les distributions de scores fait la différence\xa0: étude de performance des réseaux LSTM pour le marquage de séquences", 'pt': 'Distribuições de pontuação de relatórios fazem a diferença: estudo de desempenho de redes LSTM para marcação de sequência', 'ja': 'スコア分布を報告することで違いが生じる：シーケンスタグ付けのためのLSTMネットワークのパフォーマンス研究', 'zh': '告分数分布有为:所以序标记者LSTM网络性能研究', 'ru': 'Отчетность о распределении баллов делает разницу: исследование производительности сетей LSTM для маркировки последовательностей', 'hi': 'रिपोर्टिंग स्कोर वितरण एक अंतर बनाता है: अनुक्रम टैगिंग के लिए LSTM-नेटवर्क का प्रदर्शन अध्ययन', 'ga': 'Déanann Tuairisciú Scór Dáiltí Difríocht: Staidéar Feidhmíochta ar líonraí LSTM le haghaidh Clibeáil Seicheamh', 'ka': 'შეტყობინებების მონაცემების გაყოფილება განსხვავება: LSTM- ქსელების პერფორმაციის განსხვავება', 'hu': 'Jelentési pontszámok eloszlása különbséget tesz: LSTM-hálózatok teljesítményének tanulmányozása sorozatcímkézéshez', 'it': "Le distribuzioni dei punteggi di reporting fanno la differenza: studio delle prestazioni delle reti LSTM per l'etichettatura delle sequenze", 'kk': 'Хабарлау нөмірлері үлестіруді айырмашылығын жасайды: LSTM- желілерді реттеу тегтерін зерттеу', 'mk': 'Распоредувањето на резултатите прави разлика: Студија на резултатите на LSTM- мрежите за ознака на секвенција', 'lt': 'Ataskaitų rezultatų pasiskirstymas skiriasi: LSTM tinklų, skirtų sekos ženklinimui, rezultatų tyrimas', 'ms': 'Pembahagian Skor Melapor Membuat Perbezaan: Pelajaran Performance of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'ml': '@ info: status', 'mt': 'Distribuzzjonijiet tal-Punteġġ tar-Rappurtar jagħmlu Differenza: Studju tal-Prestazzjoni tan-Netwerks LSTM għat-Tagging tas-Sekwenza', 'mn': 'Reporting Score Distribution Makes a Difference: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'el': 'Οι διανομές βαθμολογίας αναφοράς κάνουν τη διαφορά: Μελέτη απόδοσης δικτύων για τη σήμανση διαδοχής', 'no': 'Rapporteringsverdidistribusjonar Lagar ein forskjellig: Performasjonsstudie av LSTM- nettverk for sekvensmerking', 'pl': 'Raportowanie wyników dystrybucji robi różnicę: badanie wydajności sieci LSTM dla znakowania sekwencji', 'sr': 'Raspodjela rezultata izveštaja čini razliku: Proučavanje učinkovitosti LSTM mreža za označavanje sekvence', 'ro': 'Raportarea scorului de distribuție face o diferență: Studiul performanței rețelelor LSTM pentru etichetarea secvențelor', 'so': 'Reporting score distributions Makes a difference: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'sv': 'Rapportering Score Distributioner gör skillnad: Prestandastudie av LSTM-nätverk för sekvensmärkning', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis', 'ur': 'راپیوٹینگ اسکور تقسیم ایک فرق پیدا کرتا ہے: LSTM-نیٹ ورک کا پرورفونس تحقیق سکوئنس ٹاگ کے لئے', 'si': 'වාර්තාව අංකය විතරයෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන්: LSTM- ජාලය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ ටැගින් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ පරී', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Báo cáo phân chia số hiệu quả Làm nên sự khác biệt: Nghiên cứu về trình độ cho mạng LSTM để đánh giá thành quả', 'bg': 'Разпределенията на рейтинга за отчитане правят разлика: Проучване на ефективността на мрежите за маркиране на последователността', 'da': 'Rapportering Score Distributioner gør en forskel: Performance Studie af LSTM-netværk til Sequence Tagging', 'nl': 'Reporting Score Distributies Makes a Difference: Prestatiestudie van LSTM-netwerken voor Sequence Tagging', 'ko': '보고서 점수 분포는 다를 수 있습니다: 시퀀스 표기 LSTM 네트워크의 성능 연구', 'de': 'Reporting Score Distributions Makes a Difference: Performance Study of LSTM-Networks for Sequence Tagging', 'sw': 'Reporting Score Distributions Makes a Difference: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'id': 'Distribusi Skor Laporan Membuat Perbedaan: Studi Performance of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'hr': 'Raspodjela rezultata izvještavanja čini razliku: ispitivanje učinkovitosti LSTM mreža za označavanje sekvence', 'sq': 'Shpërndarjet e shënimit raportojnë bëjnë një ndryshim: Studimi i performancës i rrjeteve LSTM për shënimin e sekuencës', 'fa': 'انتقال گزارش امتیاز تفاوتی می\u200cکند: مطالعه عملکرد شبکه\u200cهای LSTM برای برچسب\u200cهای نقاشی', 'af': "Raporteer Telling Verspreidings Maak 'n Verskil: Performansie Studie van LSTM- netwerke vir Sequence Tagging", 'am': 'Performance Study of LSTM-network for Sequence Tagging', 'tr': 'Raporda Görkezilişi Mazmunlar Döwletleri Aýratýar: LSTM-netleri Taýgymlary üçin Performance Study of LSTM-networks', 'hy': 'Զեկույցման գնահատականների տարածումը տարբերություն է ստեղծում. LSMT-ցանցերի արդյունավետության ուսումնասիրությունը հաջորդականության նշանների համար', 'bs': 'Raspodjela rezultata izvještavanja čini razliku: Ispitivanje učinkovitosti LSTM mreža za označavanje sekvence', 'bn': 'Reporting Score Distributions Makes a Difference: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'az': 'Reporting Score Distributions Farklılıq edir: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'cs': 'Distribuce skóre reportingu dělá rozdíl: Studie výkonu LSTM sítí pro sekvenční tagování', 'et': 'Aruandlusskoori jaotused muudavad oluliseks: LSTM-võrkude tulemuslikkuse uuring järjestuste märgistamiseks', 'ca': 'Reporting Score Distributions makes a Difference: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'fi': 'Raportointipistejakaumat tekevät eron: LSTM-verkkojen suorituskykytutkimus sekvenssimerkintöjä varten', 'jv': 'Report Point Distributions', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Poročanje porazdelitev rezultatov pomeni razliko: študija učinkovitosti omrežij LSTM za označevanje zaporedja', 'bo': 'Reporting Score Distributions Makes a Difference: Performance Study of LSTM-networks for Sequence Tagging', 'he': 'דיווחים על פיצוי נקודות גורמים להבדל: מחקר ביצועים של רשתות LSTM עבור תוויות רצף'}
{'en': 'In this paper we show that reporting a single performance score is insufficient to compare non-deterministic approaches. We demonstrate for common sequence tagging tasks that the seed value for the random number generator can result in statistically significant (p < 10 ^ -4) differences for state-of-the-art systems. For two recent systems for NER, we observe an absolute difference of one percentage point F-score depending on the selected seed value, making these systems perceived either as state-of-the-art or mediocre. Instead of publishing and reporting single performance scores, we propose to compare score distributions based on multiple executions. Based on the evaluation of 50.000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superior performance as well as are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters.p < 10^{-4}) differences for state-of-the-art systems. For two recent systems for NER, we observe an absolute difference of one percentage point F₁-score depending on the selected seed value, making these systems perceived either as state-of-the-art or mediocre. Instead of publishing and reporting single performance scores, we propose to compare score distributions based on multiple executions. Based on the evaluation of 50.000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superior performance as well as are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters. ', 'ar': 'نوضح في هذه الورقة أن الإبلاغ عن درجة أداء واحدة غير كافٍ لمقارنة الأساليب غير الحتمية. نوضح لمهام وضع العلامات التسلسلية الشائعة أن القيمة الأولية لمولد الأرقام العشوائية يمكن أن تؤدي إلى اختلافات ذات دلالة إحصائية (p <10 ^ -4) للأنظمة الحديثة. بالنسبة إلى نظامين حديثين لـ NER ، نلاحظ فرقًا مطلقًا بمقدار نقطة مئوية واحدة درجة F اعتمادًا على قيمة البذور المختارة ، مما يجعل هذه الأنظمة يُنظر إليها إما على أنها حديثة أو متوسطة. بدلاً من نشر نتائج الأداء الفردية والإبلاغ عنها ، نقترح مقارنة توزيعات النقاط بناءً على عمليات الإعدام المتعددة. استنادًا إلى تقييم 50.000 شبكة LSTM لخمس مهام لوضع علامات التسلسل ، نقدم بنى الشبكات التي تنتج أداءً فائقًا بالإضافة إلى كونها أكثر استقرارًا فيما يتعلق بالمعلمات الفائقة المتبقية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous montrons que le fait de déclarer un seul score de performance est insuffisant pour comparer des approches non déterministes. Nous démontrons, pour les tâches courantes de marquage de séquence, que la valeur initiale du générateur de nombres aléatoires peut entraîner des différences statistiquement significatives (p < 10^-4) pour les systèmes de pointe. Pour deux systèmes récents pour NER, nous observons une différence absolue d'un point de pourcentage F₁-score en fonction de la valeur de départ sélectionnée, ce qui fait que ces systèmes sont perçus comme étant de pointe ou médiocres. Au lieu de publier et de rapporter des scores de performance uniques, nous proposons de comparer les distributions de scores en fonction de plusieurs exécutions. Sur la base de l'évaluation de 50 000 réseaux LSTM pour cinq tâches de marquage de séquence, nous présentons des architectures réseau qui produisent à la fois des performances supérieures et sont plus stables par rapport aux hyperparamètres restants.", 'es': 'En este artículo mostramos que informar de una sola puntuación de rendimiento es insuficiente para comparar los enfoques no deterministas. Demostramos para tareas comunes de etiquetado de secuencias que el valor inicial para el generador de números aleatorios puede dar lugar a diferencias estadísticamente significativas (p < 10^-4) para los sistemas de última generación. Para dos sistemas recientes de NER, observamos una diferencia absoluta de un punto porcentual F₁-score dependiendo del valor inicial seleccionado, lo que hace que estos sistemas se perciban como de vanguardia o mediocres. En lugar de publicar e informar puntuaciones de rendimiento únicas, proponemos comparar las distribuciones de puntuaciones en función de múltiples ejecuciones. Sobre la base de la evaluación de 50.000 redes LSTM para cinco tareas de etiquetado de secuencias, presentamos arquitecturas de red que producen un rendimiento superior y son más estables con respecto a los hiperparámetros restantes.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, mostramos que relatar uma única pontuação de desempenho é insuficiente para comparar abordagens não determinísticas. Demonstramos para tarefas comuns de marcação de sequência que o valor de semente para o gerador de números aleatórios pode resultar em diferenças estatisticamente significativas (p < 10^-4) para sistemas de última geração. Para dois sistemas recentes para NER, observamos uma diferença absoluta de um ponto percentual F₁-score dependendo do valor de semente selecionado, tornando esses sistemas percebidos como de última geração ou medíocres. Em vez de publicar e relatar pontuações de desempenho únicas, propomos comparar as distribuições de pontuação com base em várias execuções. Com base na avaliação de 50.000 redes LSTM para cinco tarefas de marcação de sequência, apresentamos arquiteturas de rede que produzem tanto desempenho superior quanto mais estáveis em relação aos hiperparâmetros restantes.', 'ja': 'この論文では、単一のパフォーマンススコアを報告することは、非決定論的アプローチを比較するのに不十分であることを示しています。共通配列タグ付けタスクについて、ランダム数生成器のシード値が、最先端のシステムについて統計的に有意な（ p &lt; 10 ^-4 ）差をもたらすことができることを実証した。NERのための最近の2つのシステムでは、選択されたシード値に応じて1パーセントポイントのFスコアの絶対差が観察され、これらのシステムは最先端または平凡であると認識されます。単一のパフォーマンススコアを公開および報告する代わりに、複数の実行に基づいてスコア分布を比較することを提案します。5つのシーケンスタグ付けタスクのための50.000 LSTM -ネットワークの評価に基づいて、優れたパフォーマンスと、残りのハイパーパラメータに対してより安定した両方を生成するネットワークアーキテクチャを提示します。', 'zh': '本文,臣等明白,告单性能分数不足较确定性法。 常见之序,验随机数生成器之种,可以致先进统计显(p<10^-4)异也。 近者二NER系统,观其所选绝异为一百分点F₁-score,以为最先进庸也。 臣等请以数行较分数,非出告单能分数也。 盖50.000LSTM网络五序之评,卓异于余参数者网络架构。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम दिखाते हैं कि एक एकल प्रदर्शन स्कोर की रिपोर्टिंग गैर-नियतात्मक दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना करने के लिए अपर्याप्त है। हम सामान्य अनुक्रम टैगिंग कार्यों के लिए प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि यादृच्छिक संख्या जनरेटर के लिए बीज मूल्य के परिणामस्वरूप सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण (पी < 10 ^ -4) अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों के लिए अंतर हो सकता है। एनईआर के लिए दो हालिया प्रणालियों के लिए, हम चयनित बीज मूल्य के आधार पर एक प्रतिशत बिंदु एफ-स्कोर का पूर्ण अंतर देखते हैं, जिससे इन प्रणालियों को या तो अत्याधुनिक या औसत दर्जे का माना जाता है। एकल प्रदर्शन स्कोर को प्रकाशित करने और रिपोर्ट करने के बजाय, हम कई निष्पादनों के आधार पर स्कोर वितरण की तुलना करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पांच अनुक्रम टैगिंग कार्यों के लिए 50.000 LSTM-नेटवर्क के मूल्यांकन के आधार पर, हम नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो बेहतर प्रदर्शन दोनों का उत्पादन करते हैं और साथ ही शेष हाइपरपैरामीटर के संबंध में अधिक स्थिर होते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы показываем, что одного балла эффективности недостаточно для сравнения недетерминированных подходов. Мы демонстрируем для общих задач маркировки последовательностей, что начальное значение для генератора случайных чисел может привести к статистически значимым (p &lt; 10^-4) различиям для современных систем. Для двух недавних систем для NER мы наблюдаем абсолютную разницу в один процентный пункт F - балл в зависимости от выбранного значения затравки, что делает эти системы воспринимаемыми либо как современные, либо как посредственные. Вместо того, чтобы публиковать и сообщать о единичных баллах эффективности, мы предлагаем сравнить распределение баллов на основе нескольких исполнений. Основываясь на оценке 50 000 сетей LSTM для задач маркировки пяти последовательностей, мы представляем сетевые архитектуры, которые обеспечивают как превосходную производительность, так и более стабильные по отношению к остальным гиперпараметрам.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo léirímid nach leor scór feidhmíochta aonair a thuairisciú chun cur chuige neamhchinntitheach a chur i gcomparáid. Léirímid le haghaidh tascanna clibeála seichimh coitianta go bhféadfadh difríochtaí suntasacha staitistiúla (p < 10 ^-4) a bheith mar thoradh ar luach síl an ghineadóra uimhreacha randamacha do chórais den scoth. Maidir le dhá chóras le déanaí do NER, breathnaimid ar dhifríocht absalóideach de scór F₁ pointe céatadáin amháin ag brath ar an luach síl roghnaithe, rud a fhágann go mbreathnaítear ar na córais seo mar chóras úrscothach nó meánach. In ionad scóir feidhmíochta aonair a fhoilsiú agus a thuairisciú, tá sé beartaithe againn dáiltí scóir a chur i gcomparáid bunaithe ar fhorghníomhú iolrach. Bunaithe ar mheastóireacht ar 50.000 líonraí LSTM le haghaidh cúig thasc chlibeála seicheamh, cuirimid i láthair ailtireachtaí líonra a tháirgeann feidhmíocht níos fearr agus atá níos cobhsaí maidir leis na hipearpharaiméadair atá fágtha.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία καταδεικνύουμε ότι η αναφορά ενός ενιαίου βαθμού επιδόσεων είναι ανεπαρκής για τη σύγκριση μη ντετερμινιστικών προσεγγίσεων. Αποδεικνύουμε για κοινές εργασίες επισήμανσης ακολουθίας ότι η τιμή σπόρου για τη γεννήτρια τυχαίων αριθμών μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε στατιστικά σημαντικές διαφορές (π.10^-4) για συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Για δύο πρόσφατα συστήματα παρατηρούμε απόλυτη διαφορά ενός ποσοστού βαθμολογίας ανάλογα με την επιλεγμένη τιμή σπόρου, καθιστώντας τα συστήματα αυτά αντιληπτά είτε ως υπερσύγχρονα είτε ως μέτρια. Αντί να δημοσιεύουμε και να αναφέρουμε μεμονωμένες βαθμολογίες απόδοσης, προτείνουμε να συγκρίνουμε διανομές βαθμολογίας βασισμένες σε πολλαπλές εκτελέσεις. Με βάση την αξιολόγηση των 50.000 δικτύων για πέντε εργασίες σήμανσης ακολουθίας, παρουσιάζουμε αρχιτεκτονικές δικτύων που παράγουν τόσο ανώτερη απόδοση όσο και σταθερότερες σε σχέση με τις υπόλοιπες υπερπαραμέτρους.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда бір жылдамдық нәтижесін салыстыруға жеткілікті емес деп көрсетеді. Біз кездейсоқ санды генераторының тарату мәні статистикалық түрлі (p < 10^- 4) жүйелердің түрлі айырмашылығын көрсетедік. НЕР үшін екі жаңа жүйелер үшін біз таңдалған тарату мәніне тәуелді бір пайыз нүктесінің бір пайыз айырмашылығын көреміз. Бұл жүйелерді әлде орташалық күй- жай немесе орташалық күй- жай деп қа Бір жылдамдық нәтижелерін жасау және хабарлау орнына бірнеше орындалған нәтижелер үлестірімізді салыстыру үшін таңдаймыз. 50,000 LSTM желілерін бес реттегі тапсырмалар үшін бағалау негізінде біз желік архитектураларды көрсетедік, олардың екі жоғары жағдайды және қалдырылған гиперпараметрлеріне қарай, қарай, қарай, қарай, қара', 'it': "In questo articolo mostriamo che riportare un singolo punteggio di performance non è sufficiente per confrontare approcci non deterministici. Dimostriamo per le attività comuni di tagging di sequenza che il valore di seed per il generatore di numeri casuali può determinare differenze statisticamente significative (p < 10^-4) per sistemi all'avanguardia. Per due sistemi recenti per NER, osserviamo una differenza assoluta di un punto percentuale F1-score a seconda del valore di seed selezionato, rendendo questi sistemi percepiti come allo stato dell'arte o mediocri. Invece di pubblicare e segnalare singoli punteggi di performance, proponiamo di confrontare le distribuzioni di punteggi basate su più esecuzioni. Sulla base della valutazione di 50.000 reti LSTM per cinque attività di codifica sequenziale, presentiamo architetture di rete che producono prestazioni superiori e sono più stabili rispetto ai restanti iperparametri.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente parodomi, kad vieno rezultatų vertinimo nepakanka, kad būtų galima palyginti nenustatytus metodus. Įgyvendinant bendras eilės žymėjimo užduotis įrodome, kad atsitiktinio numerio generatoriaus sėklos vertė gali lemti statistiškai reikšmingus (p < 10^-4) naujausių sistemų skirtumus. Dviejų naujausių NER sistemų atveju, atsižvelgiant į pasirinktą sėklos vertę, matome absoliučių skirtumą, lygų vienam procentiniam taškui F1, todėl šios sistemos laikomos moderniomis arba vidutinėmis. Užuot skelbdami ir teikdami ataskaitas apie vienus rezultatus, siūlome palyginti rezultatų paskirstymą, pagrįstą daugeliu įvykdymų. Remiantis 50 000 LSTM tinklų vertinimu, atliekant penkias eilės žymėjimo užduotis, pristatome tinklo architektūras, kurios gamina geresnius rezultatus ir yra stabilesnės, palyginti su likusiais hiperparatoriais.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник покажуваме дека известувањето за единствениот резултат не е доволно за да се споредат недеterminatистичките пристапи. Демонстрираме за заедничките задачи за означување на секвенца дека вредноста на семето за случајниот генератор на броеви може да резултира со статистички значајни разлики (p < 10^-4) за најсовремените системи. За двата неодамнешни системи за НЕР, набљудуваме апсолутна разлика од една процентна точка F1-оценка во зависност од избраната вредност на семето, што ги прави овие системи перцепирани како најсовремени или средни. Наместо да објавуваме и да известуваме единствени резултати, предлагаме да се споредат дистрибуциите на резултати базирани на повеќе егзекуции. Со основа на проценката на 50.000 ЛСТМ-мрежи за пет секвенциски задачи за означување на означувања, ги претставуваме мрежните архитектури кои произведуваат и супериорни резултати, како и постабилни во однос на преостанатите хиперпараметри.', 'ms': 'In this paper we show that reporting a single performance score is insufficient to compare non-deterministic approaches.  Kami menunjukkan untuk tugas tag urutan umum bahawa nilai benih bagi generator nombor rawak boleh menghasilkan perbezaan yang signifikan secara statistik (p < 10^-4) bagi sistem-state-of-the-art. Untuk dua sistem baru-baru ini untuk NER, kita memperhatikan perbezaan mutlak satu titik peratus skor F1 bergantung pada nilai benih yang dipilih, membuat sistem ini dianggap sama ada sebagai state-of-the-art atau sederhana. Daripada menerbitkan dan melaporkan skor prestasi tunggal, kami cadangkan untuk membandingkan distribusi skor berdasarkan eksekusi berbilang. Berdasarkan penilaian 50.000 rangkaian LSTM untuk lima tugas pencetakan urutan, kami mempersembahkan arkitektur rangkaian yang menghasilkan prestasi yang lebih tinggi serta lebih stabil terhadap hyperparameter yang tersisa.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban megmutatjuk, hogy egyetlen teljesítmény pontszám jelentése nem elegendő a nem determinisztikus megközelítések összehasonlításához. A közös sorozatgyűjtési feladatokhoz igazoljuk, hogy a véletlenszám generátor vetőértéke statisztikailag szignifikáns (p < 10^-4) különbségeket eredményezhet a korszerű rendszerek esetében. Két legutóbbi NER rendszer esetében a kiválasztott vetőmagértéktől függően egy százalékpontos F1-pontszám abszolút különbséget figyelünk meg, így ezeket a rendszereket vagy korszerűnek vagy középszerűnek tekintjük. Az egyszeri teljesítmény pontszámok közzététele és jelentése helyett a pontszámok eloszlását javasoljuk több végrehajtás alapján. 50.000 LSTM-hálózat értékelése alapján öt szekvencia-címkézési feladatra vonatkozóan olyan hálózati architektúrákat mutatunk be, amelyek kiváló teljesítményt és stabilabbak a fennmaradó hiperparaméterekhez képest.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു, ഒരു പ്രദര്\u200dശന സ്കോര്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നത് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കാ സാധാരണ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയില്ലാത്ത നമ്പര്\u200d ജനററേറ്റര്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിത്ര മൂല്യം statistically significant അടുത്ത രണ്ടു സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക്, നമ്മള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത വിത്യത്യാസത്തിന്റെ ഒരു ശതമാനത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസം F1- സ്കോര്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ഒരു പ്രസിദ്ധ്യ സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d പല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സ്കോര്\u200d  അഞ്ചു സെക്കന്റ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കായി 50,000 എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഗ് നെറ്റുകളുടെ വിലാസനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശേഷിച്ച ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാരാമീറ്ററു', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ერთი პროცენტის შედეგების შემდეგების შემდეგება არაფექტია. ჩვენ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ საერთო წერტილის მონაცემებისთვის, რომ მონაცემებული რიცხვის ģeneraტორისთვის შველი მნიშვნელობა შეიძლება статистичесკურად გასანიშვნელოვანი (p < 10^- 4) განსხვავებების შესახე NER-ის ორი ახალი სისტემისთვის, ჩვენ აბსოლუტური განსხვავება ერთ პროცენტის ფუნტის განსხვავება F1-სონტის განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც არჩეულია სონტის მნიშვნელობის განსხვავებაში, ამ სისტე ერთი პროცესტის შედეგების დარესტირების და რეპორტირების ნაცვლად, ჩვენ მინდომებით გადავადგენოთ მონაცემების განყოფილებების განყოფილება, რამდენიმე გამოყენ 50,000 LSTM-ქსელების განსაზღვრებაზე, ხუთ წერტილების მონაცემებისთვის, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ ქსელის არქტიქტურები, რომლებიც ორივე საუკეთესო გამოყენება და უფრო სტაბულია მარცხოვრებული', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument naraw li r-rappurtar ta’ punteġġ uniku tal-prestazzjoni mhuwiex biżżejjed biex jitqabblu approċċi mhux determinattivi. Għall-kompiti komuni tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza nagħmlu xhieda li l-valur taż-żerriegħa għall-ġeneratur tan-numri aleatorji jista’ jirriżulta f’differenzi statistikament sinifikanti (p < 10^-4) għas-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati. Għal żewġ sistemi reċenti għal NER, aħna nużaw differenza assoluta ta’ punt perċentwali wieħed ta’ punteġġ F1 skont il-valur taż-żerriegħa magħżul, li tagħmel dawn is-sistemi perċepiti jew bħala l-aktar avvanzati jew medji. Minflok li nippubblikaw u nirrappurtaw punteġġi ta’ prestazzjoni singoli, nipproponu li nipparagunaw distribuzzjonijiet ta’ punteġġi bbażati fuq eżekuzzjonijiet multipli. Abbażi tal-evalwazzjoni ta’ 50,000 netwerk LSTM għal ħames kompiti ta’ tikkettar ta’ sekwenza, aħna nippreżentaw arkitetturi tan-netwerk li jipproduċu kemm prestazzjoni superjuri kif ukoll huma aktar stabbli fir-rigward tal-parametri iperparatteristiċi li jifdal.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi at rapportering av ei enkelt resultatscore er ikkje tilstrekkelig for å sammenligne ikkje-deterministiske tilnærmingar. Vi viser for felles sekvens som merker oppgåver at frøverdien for tilfeldige tal-generatoren kan føre til statistisk signifikante forskjeller (p < 10^- 4) for kunstsystemet. For to nyleg system for NER, observerer vi ein absolutt forskjell av ein prosentpunkt F1-poeng avhengig av den valde frøverdien, og fører at desse systemene oppfattar enten som tilstanden av kunsten eller middelokken. I staden for publisering og rapportering av enkelte resultatscorer, fører vi å samanlikna poeng- distribusjonar basert på fleire køyringar. Basert på evalueringa av 50,000 LSTM-nettverk for fem rekkefølgjande oppgåver, presenterer vi nettverksarkitekturar som produserer både høgare utviklingar og er meir stabil med hensyn til reste hyperparametrar.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare demonstrăm că raportarea unui singur scor de performanță este insuficientă pentru a compara abordările non-deterministe. Demonstrăm pentru sarcinile comune de etichetare a secvențelor că valoarea semințelor pentru generatorul de numere aleatorii poate duce la diferențe semnificative statistic (p < 10^-4) pentru sistemele de ultimă generație. Pentru două sisteme recente pentru NER, observăm o diferență absolută de un punct procentual F1-scor în funcție de valoarea selectată de semințe, făcând aceste sisteme percepute fie ca state-of-the-art, fie ca mediocre. În loc să publicăm și să raportăm scoruri de performanță unice, propunem compararea distribuțiilor scorurilor bazate pe execuții multiple. Pe baza evaluării a 50.000 de rețele LSTM pentru cinci sarcini de etichetare a secvențelor, prezentăm arhitecturi de rețea care produc atât performanțe superioare, cât și mai stabile în raport cu hiperparametrii rămași.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule pokazujemy, że raportowanie pojedynczego wyniku wydajności jest niewystarczające do porównania podejść niedeterministycznych. Wykazujemy dla wspólnych zadań znakowania sekwencji, że wartość nasion dla generatora liczb losowych może powodować statystycznie istotne różnice (p,10^-4) dla najnowocześniejszych systemów. W przypadku dwóch ostatnich systemów NER obserwujemy absolutną różnicę jednego punktu procentowego F1-punktu w zależności od wybranej wartości nasion, co sprawia, że systemy te postrzegane są albo jako najnowocześniejsze, albo średnie. Zamiast publikować i raportować pojedyncze wyniki, proponujemy porównanie dystrybucji wyników opartych na wielu wykonaniach. W oparciu o ocenę sieci 50.000 LSTM dla pięciu zadań tagowania sekwencji prezentujemy architektury sieci, które zapewniają zarówno doskonałą wydajność, jak i bardziej stabilne w stosunku do pozostałych hiperparametrów.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг үйл ажиллагааны үзүүлэлтийг харуулах нь тодорхойлолтгүй ойлголтыг харьцуулахад хангалтгүй. Бид санамсаргүй тооны үйлдвэрлэгчийн тарианы утга нь статистик хэмжээтэй (p < 10^-4) урлагийн системийн ялгааг харуулж чадна. НЕР-ийн хоёр саяхан системийн хувьд бид нэг хувьд F1-н тооны ялгааг сонгогдсон тарианы утгатай хамаараад, эдгээр системүүдийг урлагийн төвшин эсвэл дундаж үзүүлдэг. Нэг үйл ажиллагааны оноо хэвлэхийн оронд, олон үйл ажиллагааны үндсэн оноо хуваарилалтыг харьцуулахыг санал болно. 50.000 LSTM-сүлжээний таван дарааллын тайлбарлалтын ажил дээр үнэлэхэд бид хоёуланг дээд ажилладаг сүлжээний архитектурууд болон үлдсэн гиперпараметрлүүдтэй илүү тогтвортой байдаг.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නෙ එකම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වාර්තා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නැහැ නිර්දේශිත අවස්ථාවක් නැති  අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරමයක් ටැග් කරනවා ක්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක අංකයක් ජීනේටර් වෙනුවෙන් සීඩ් අවශ්\u200dයය ප්\u200dරතිචාර NER වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් පද්ධතිය දෙකට, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය F1-ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය දෙයක් බලන්නේ තෝරාගත විශ ප්\u200dරකාශනය සහ වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරකාශනය වෙනුවෙන් එකම ප්\u200dරකාශනය ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරනය කරන්නේ ස්ක LSTM-ජාලය 5000ක් විශ්ලේෂණයේ පහත් පටන් ගන්න වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා, අපි ජාලය සංවිධානය සංවිධානය දෙන්නම් විශ්ලේ', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ka muujinaynaa in wargelinta koox shaqo oo kaliya aysan ku filnayn in la barbardhigo qaababka aan qiimeyn lahayn. Waxaynu muujinnaa shuqullada tagsiga ee caadiga ah in qiimaha farcanka dhaliyaha lambarka la fududeeyo uu ku sababi karo si statistic ah (p < 10^-4) kala duwanaanshaha nidaamka farshaxanka. Labada nidaam ee NER ugu dhow, waxaynu fiirinaynaa kala duwan dhamaan boqolkiiba isku qiimaha F1, waxayna ku xiran tahay qiimaha la doortay abuurka, waxaana ka dhiganaynaa nidaamkan inay u tahay xaalad-farshaxan ama mid-dhexe. Iska bedelkeeda baaraandegista iyo wargelinta kooxda waxqabadka oo kaliya, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa inaad isbarbardhigno qaybinta kooxaha oo lagu saleynayo baaritaanka kala duduwan. Sida lagu qiimeynayo shabakado 50,000 LSTM oo lagu sameeyo shan shaqooyin tagging dabadeed, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismo shabakad ah oo sameynaya tababar ka sarreeya iyo kuwo ka sii qallafsan qaabilsan bareecada hiwaayadaha hadhay.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru pokazujemo da je izveštavanje jedinstvenog rezultata izvedbe nedovoljno za usporedbu nedodređenih pristupa. Pokazujemo za zajedničku sekvenciju označavanja zadataka da vrijednost semena za generator nasumičnog broja može rezultirati statistički značajnim razlikama (p < 10^-4) za sisteme stanja umjetnosti. Za dve nedavne sisteme za NER, posmatramo apsolutnu razliku od jedne procentne tačke F1-rezultate ovisno o odabranoj vrijednosti semena, čineći da ove sisteme smatraju ili kao state-of-the-art ili mediocre. Umesto izdavanja i izveštaja pojedinih rezultata predlažemo da usporedimo distribuciju rezultata na osnovu višestrukih pogubljenja. Na osnovu procjene 50.000 LSTM-mreža za pet zadataka označavanja sekvencija, predstavljamo mrežne arhitekture koje proizvode i nadmoćne funkcije, kao i stabilnije u odnosu na ostale hiperparametre.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats visar vi att rapportering av en enda prestationspoäng är otillräcklig för att jämföra icke-deterministiska tillvägagångssätt. Vi visar för vanliga sekvensmärkningsuppgifter att utsädesvärdet för slumptalsgeneratorn kan resultera i statistiskt signifikanta (p < 10^-4) skillnader för toppmoderna system. För två nya system för NER observerar vi en absolut skillnad på en procentenhet F1-poäng beroende på det valda utsädesvärdet, vilket gör att dessa system uppfattas antingen som state-of-the-art eller medelmåttiga. Istället för att publicera och rapportera enskilda prestationspoäng föreslår vi att vi jämför poängfördelningar baserat på flera körningar. Baserat på utvärderingen av 50 000 LSTM-nätverk för fem sekvenstaggningsuppgifter presenterar vi nätverksarkitekturer som både ger överlägsen prestanda och är stabilare jämfört med de återstående hyperparametrarna.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک نمائش اسکور کی راپورت کرنے کے لئے غیر تصمیم پڑھنے کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے۔ ہم مشترک سفارش کے لئے ٹاگ کرنے کے کام کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ نافذ شمارہ جینراٹر کے لئے سیڈ کی مقدار مقدار ہے کہ ایسٹیسٹم کے لئے (p < 10^-4) تفریق کا نتیجہ ہے۔ نیر کے لئے دو اخیر سیستموں کے لئے ہم ایک فیصد پوینٹ F1-اسکور کے مطابق ایک فیصد تفاوت کو دیکھتے ہیں، یہ سیستموں کو اچھی طرح سمجھ رہے ہیں یا آرت کے مطابق یا متوسط سمجھ رہے ہیں. ہم ایک فعالیت اسکور کے پیغام پہنچانے اور راپورٹ کرنے کے بدلے اسکور کے تقسیم کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ 50.000 LSTM-نیٹ ورک کی ارزیابی پر پانچ سطح ٹاگ ٹاگ ٹاکنگ کے کاموں کے لئے، ہم نے نیٹ ورک معماروں کو پیش کیا ہے جو دونوں زیادہ عملکرد پیدا کرتی ہیں اور باقی رہنے والوں کے بارے میں زیادہ ثابت ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு செயல்பாட்டு மதிப்பு அறிக்கை போதுமானது என்று காட்டுகிறோம் என்பது தீர்மானிப்பு மு குறிப்பில்லா எண் உருவாக்கிய வித்தியின் மதிப்பு பொது தொடர் குறியீட்டு பணிகளுக்கு நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் குறிப்பிட்ட வித்தியாசமான NER-க்கான அண்மையில் இரண்டு அமைப்புகளுக்கு, நாம் ஒரு சதவிகிதத்தின் முழுமையான வேறுபாடு F1- மதிப்பை பார்க்கிறோம், தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட seed மத ஒரே செயல்பாட்டு மதிப்புகளை வெளியிடுவதற்கு மற்றும் அறிவிக்கும் பதில், பல செயல்பாடுகளை அடிப்படையில் புள்ளியின் வ 50.000 LSTM- வலைப்பின்னல்களை மதிப்பிடும் அடிப்படையில் மீது 5 வரிசையான ஒட்டும் பணிகளுக்கு, நாம் வலைப்பின்னல் அட்டவணைகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம். மீதி இருப்பின', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz bir vazifa haqida hisoblash qoidasini ko'rsatumiz. Tasdiqlash usullarini kamaytirish yetarli emas. Biz bir necha xil tarkibi vazifalarni koʻrsatishni koʻrsatish mumkin. Tasodifiy raqam generator uchun son qiymati statistik muhim (p < 10^-4) va sanam tizimning holati holatiga ega boʻlishi mumkin. Yangi ikki tizim uchun, biz tanlangan seed qiymatiga murakkab bir foiz darajasi F1 qiymatiga murakkab o'zgarishni ko'rsatumiz. Bu tizimlarning holatning holati yoki oʻrtacha qiymatga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Biz bir necha bajarish asosida qiymatni nashrish va tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlashni istaysizmi. Based on the evaluation of 50.000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superior performance as well as are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng việc báo cáo một số điểm không đủ để so sánh các phương pháp không phân biệt. Chúng tôi chứng minh cho các công việc định dạng chung rằng giá trị hạt giống cho máy phát số ngẫu nhiên có thể gây ra các khác biệt thống kê trong hệ thống hiện đại. Với hai hệ thống gần đây dành cho cái máy, chúng tôi quan sát sự khác biệt tuyệt đối của điểm số F1-điểm phụ thuộc vào giá trị hạt giống đã chọn, làm cho hệ thống này được coi là hiện đại hoặc tầm thường. Thay vì xuất bản và báo cáo điểm số đơn, chúng tôi đề nghị so sánh phân phát điểm dựa trên nhiều hình phạt. Dựa trên đánh giá 50.000 LSTM-net cho năm kế hoạch định vị, chúng tôi giới thiệu các kiến trúc trên mạng cung cấp khả năng cao cũng như ổn định với các siêu tham số còn lại.', 'bg': 'В тази статия показваме, че отчитането на единичен резултат е недостатъчно за сравняване на недетерминистични подходи. За общи задачи за маркиране на последователности демонстрираме, че стойността на семената за генератора на случайни числа може да доведе до статистически значими (p < 10^-4) разлики за най-съвременните системи. За две скорошни системи за НЕР наблюдаваме абсолютна разлика от 1 процентен пункт в зависимост от избраната стойност на семената, което прави тези системи възприемани като най-съвременни или посредствени. Вместо да публикуваме и отчитаме единични резултати за изпълнение, предлагаме да сравним разпределенията на оценките въз основа на множество екзекуции. Въз основа на оценката на 50 000 мрежи за пет задачи за маркиране на последователността, представяме мрежови архитектури, които произвеждат както превъзходна производителност, така и са по-стабилни по отношение на останалите хиперпараметри.', 'da': 'I denne artikel viser vi, at rapportering af en enkelt performance score er utilstrækkelig til at sammenligne ikke-deterministiske tilgange. Vi demonstrerer for almindelige sekvensmærkningsopgaver, at frøværdien for tilfældighedsgeneratoren kan resultere i statistisk signifikante (p < 10^-4) forskelle for state-of-the-art systemer. For to nylige systemer for NER observerer vi en absolut forskel på et procentpoint F1-score afhængigt af den valgte frøværdi, hvilket gør disse systemer opfattet enten som state-of-the-art eller middelmådige. I stedet for at offentliggøre og rapportere enkelte resultater foreslår vi at sammenligne scorefordelinger baseret på flere udførelser. Baseret på evalueringen af 50.000 LSTM-netværk til fem sekvensmærkningsopgaver præsenterer vi netværksarkitekturer, der både giver overlegen ydeevne og er mere stabile i forhold til de resterende hyperparametre.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel laten we zien dat het rapporteren van één prestatiescore onvoldoende is om niet-deterministische benaderingen te vergelijken. We demonstreren voor gangbare sequence tagging taken dat de zaadwaarde voor de random number generator kan resulteren in statistisch significante verschillen (p tot 10^-4) voor state-of-the-art systemen. Voor twee recente systemen voor NER zien we een absoluut verschil van één procentpunt F1-score afhankelijk van de geselecteerde zaadwaarde, waardoor deze systemen ofwel als state-of-the-art of middelmatig worden ervaren. In plaats van afzonderlijke prestatiescores te publiceren en te rapporteren, stellen we voor om scoreverdelingen te vergelijken op basis van meerdere uitvoeringen. Op basis van de evaluatie van 50.000 LSTM-netwerken voor vijf sequence tagging taken presenteren we netwerkarchitecturen die zowel superieure prestaties leveren als stabieler zijn ten opzichte van de resterende hyperparameters.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir, dass die Berichterstattung eines einzelnen Performance Scores nicht ausreicht, um nicht-deterministische Ansätze zu vergleichen. Wir zeigen für gängige Sequenz-Tagging-Aufgaben, dass der Seed-Wert für den Zufallszahlengenerator zu statistisch signifikanten (p,10^-4) Unterschieden für moderne Systeme führen kann. Bei zwei neueren Systemen für NER beobachten wir einen absoluten Unterschied von einem Prozentpunkt F1-Score abhängig vom ausgewählten Seed-Wert, wodurch diese Systeme entweder als state-of-the-art oder mittelmäßig wahrgenommen werden. Anstatt einzelne Performance-Scores zu veröffentlichen und zu melden, schlagen wir vor, Score-Distributionen basierend auf mehreren Ausführungen zu vergleichen. Basierend auf der Auswertung von 50.000 LSTM-Netzwerken für fünf Sequenz-Tagging-Aufgaben stellen wir Netzwerkarchitekturen vor, die sowohl eine überlegene Leistung als auch stabiler gegenüber den restlichen Hyperparametern liefern.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 보고서의 개성능 점수가 비확정적인 방법을 비교하기에 부족하다는 것을 보여준다.우리는 흔히 볼 수 있는 서열 표기 작업에 대해 가장 선진적인 시스템에 대해 무작위 생성기의 피드 값이 통계상의 현저한 차이를 초래할 수 있음을 증명했다(p<10^-4).최근 두 개의 NER 시스템에 대해 우리는 F1 점수의 절대적인 차이가 1퍼센트인 것을 관찰했다. 이것은 선택한 피드 값에 따라 이 시스템들이 가장 선진적이거나 일반적인 것으로 간주된다.우리는 단일 실적 점수를 발표하고 보고하는 것이 아니라 여러 번 실행된 점수 분포를 비교하는 것을 권장합니다.5만 개의 LSTM 네트워크에 대한 다섯 가지 시퀀스 태그 작업에 대한 평가를 토대로 우리는 우수한 성능을 낼 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 잉여 초파라미터에 대해 더욱 안정적인 네트워크 구조를 제시했다.', 'sw': 'In this paper we show that reporting a single performance score is insufficient to compare non-deterministic approaches.  Tunaonyesha juhudi za viungo vya mfululizo wa kawaida kwamba thamani ya uzao kwa ajili ya mtengenezaji wa namba ya asili inaweza kusababisha tofauti muhimu (p < 10^-4) kwa mfumo wa sanaa. Kwa mifumo miwili ya hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya NER, tunaona tofauti kamili ya kiwango cha asilimia moja cha F1 kinategemea na thamani ya uzao uliochaguliwa, na kuifanya mifumo haya yanaweza kugundua kama hali ya sanaa au ya kati. Badala ya kuchapisha na kuripoti score za maonesho moja, tunapendekeza kulinganisha vipimo vya usambazaji kwa sababu ya vifo vingi. Kutokana na tathmini za mitandao ya LSTM 50,000 kwa ajili ya kazi za viungo vinavyofuatilia mitano, tunaweka majengo ya mtandao yanayotengeneza performance za juu pamoja na kuwa na imara zaidi kwa kuhusiana na vipimo vinavyobaki.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru pokazujemo da je izvještavanje jednog rezultata performanstva nedovoljno za usporedbu nedodređenih pristupa. Pokazujemo za zajedničke poslove označavanja sekvence da vrijednost sjemena za generator slučajnog broja može rezultirati statistički značajnim razlikama (p < 10^-4) za sustave stanja umjetnosti. Za dvije nedavne sustave za NER, posmatramo apsolutnu razliku od jedne procentne tačke F1-rezultate ovisno o odabranoj vrijednosti sjemena, čineći da te sustave smatraju ili kao stanje umjetnosti ili srednje. Umjesto objavljivanja i izvještaja pojedinih rezultata učinka, predlažemo usporediti distribuciju rezultata na temelju višestrukih pogubljenja. Na temelju procjene 50.000 LSTM-mreža za pet zadataka označavanja sekvencija, predstavljamo mrežne arhitekture koje proizvode i nadmoćne funkcije, kao i stabilnije u odnosu na ostale hiperparametre.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz ýeke performans notyny a ýdylýan beýleki ýagdaýlary deňleşdirmek üçin ýeterlik däldir. Biz tussag sany jeneratöriň arasyndaky taryñ mykdary statistiki wajyp biler (p < 10^-4) sanat sistemleri üçin üýtgeşmelerini görkezip bileris. NER üçin iň soňky sistemler üçin, biz F1 nokatynyň bir prosent nokatynyň tapawutlygyny görýäris. Bu sistemleriň saýlanan sowgatlaryň ýa-da ýagdaýynyň durumyna görýäris. Tek performans notlaryny basmak we raportlamak ýerine, score daýlamagyny birnäçe işlemlere daýalan çykarmagyny maslahat berýäris. Beş sany etiketleme işi üçin 50.000 LSTM-neteleriniň deňlenmesine ynanýan, şebeke arhitektarlaryny hem üst performansyny üretýärler we galan hiperparametrlary bilen has gowy stabildir.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ نشان می دهیم که گزارش کردن یک امتیاز اجرای تک برای مقایسه کردن نزدیک\u200cهای غیر تصمیم\u200cگیری کافی نیست. ما نشان می دهیم برای برچسب کردن کار های مشترک که ارزش seed برای ژنراتور شماره تصادفی می تواند به نتیجه تفاوت های آماری معنی (p < 10^-4) برای سیستم\u200cهای هنر. برای دو سیستم اخیر برای NER، ما تفاوت کامل از یک درصد نقطه F1 را مشاهده می کنیم بستگی به ارزش دانه انتخاب شده، که این سیستم ها یا به عنوان وضعیت هنر یا متوسط دریافت می کنند. به جای انتشار دادن و گزارش دادن امتیاز تک عملکرد، پیشنهاد می کنیم که تقسیم امتیاز را بر اساس عملکرد چندین مقایسه کنیم. Based on the evaluation of 50,000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superperformance and are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne tregojmë se raportimi i një rezultati të vetëm performancë është i pamjaftueshëm për të krahasuar metodat jo-vendosëse. Ne demonstrojmë p ër detyrat e përbashkëta të shënimit të sekuencës se vlera e mbjelljes për gjeneratorin e numrave të rastësishëm mund të rezultojë në dallime statistikisht të rëndësishme (p < 10^-4) për sistemet më të larta. Për dy sisteme të fundit për NER, ne vëzhgojmë një ndryshim absolut të një pike përqindje F1-pikë në varësi të vlerës së zgjedhur të farës, duke i bërë këto sisteme të perceptuar ose si state-of-the-art ose mesatare. Në vend të botimit dhe raportimit të rezultateve të vetme të performancës, ne propozojmë të krahasojmë shpërndarjet e rezultateve bazuar në ekzekutime të shumta. Bazuar në vlerësimin e 50.000 rrjeteve LSTM për pesë detyra të shënimit të sekuencës, ne paraqesim arkitektura rrjeti që prodhojnë si performancë më të lartë, ashtu dhe janë më të qëndrueshme lidhur me hiperparametrat e mbetura.', 'af': "In hierdie papier wys ons dat die rapportering van 'n enkele prestasie is onvoldoende om non-deterministiese toegang te vergelyk. Ons wys vir gemeenskaplike volgorde merking opdragte dat die saad waarde vir die willekeurige nommer genereerder kan resultaat in statistiese betekening (p < 10^- 4) verskille vir status- of- the- art stelsels. Vir twee onlangse stelsels vir NER, ons aanhou 'n absolute verskil van een persentasie punt F1-telling afhanklik van die gekose saad waarde, maak hierdie stelsels of as state-of-the-art of mediocre aangeneem. In plaas van publikasie en rapportering van enkele prestasie punte, voorstel ons om die vergelyking van poarte verspreidings gebaseer op veelvuldige uitvoering te vergelyk. Basies op die evaluering van 50.000 LSTM-netwerke vir vyf sekwensies merking opdragte, ons voorsien netwerk-arkitektuure wat beide superior prestasie produseer en ook meer stabile is met respek na die oorblyfste hiperparameters.", 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menunjukkan bahwa laporan satu skor prestasi tidak cukup untuk membandingkan pendekatan non-deterministic. Kami menunjukkan untuk tugas penulisan urutan umum bahwa nilai benih generator nomor acak dapat menghasilkan perbedaan statistik signifikan (p < 10^-4) untuk sistem state-of-the-art. Untuk dua sistem baru-baru ini untuk NER, kita memperhatikan perbedaan mutlak dari satu poin puncak F1-skor tergantung pada nilai benih yang dipilih, membuat sistem-sistem ini dipercepti baik sebagai state-of-the-art atau medium. Daripada mempublikasikan dan melaporkan skor prestasi tunggal, kami mengusulkan untuk membandingkan distribusi skor berdasarkan eksekusi berbilang. Berdasarkan penilaian dari 50.000 jaringan LSTM untuk lima tugas penulisan urutan, kami mempersembahkan arsitektur jaringan yang menghasilkan prestasi yang lebih baik dan lebih stabil terhadap hiperparater yang tersisa.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት አንዲት የፍጥረት ደረጃን ለማስተካከል አይበቃውም፡፡ የዘር ቁጥር አዳራጭ በstatistically significant (p < 10^-4) ልዩነት ለዐርድ-ስርዓት ግንኙነት እንዲያሳየው እናሳያልን፡፡ አዲስ የሁለት ቅርብ ስርዓቶች፣ F1-score በተመረጠው ዘር ክፍል ላይ የተለየ የአንድ መቶ ክፍል እናደርጋለን፤ እነዚህንም ስርዓቶች የ-የ-art ወይም መካከለኛ አይደሉም፡፡ አንዲት የድረ ገጾችን በማሳወቅ እና ማሳየት ፋንታ፣ በብዙ ፈተናዎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ የክፍል ክፍተቶችን ለመተካከል እናሳስባለን፡፡ 50.000 LSTM-መረብ በአምስት ስራ ክፍል ማተሚያዎች ላይ በሚያሳየው የጦርብ መሠረት እና የቀረውን አፕተርተር በሚያሳየው እናስገናለን፡፡', 'hy': 'In this paper we show that reporting a single performance score is insufficient to compare non-deterministic approaches.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ընդհանուր հաջորդականության նշանների համար պատահական թվերի գեներատորի սերմի արժեքը կարող է հանգեցնել վիճակագրական նշանակալի (p ՆԵՌ-ի երկու վերջին համակարգերի համար մենք հետևում ենք F1-ի միավորի բացարձակ տարբերությունը կախված ընտրված սերմի արժեքի վրա, դարձնելով այս համակարգերը ընկալում են կամ նորագույն կամ միջին: Փոխարենը հրատարակել և զեկուցել միակ արդյունքների արդյունքներ, մենք առաջարկում ենք համեմատել արդյունքների տարածումները բազմաթիվ սպանությունների վրա հիմնված: Based on the evaluation of 50.000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superior performance as well as are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একটা প্রদর্শনীর স্কোর প্রতিবেদন করা যাচ্ছে না কোন নির্ধারিত পদ্ধতির তুলনায় যথেষ্ট নয় We demonstrate for common sequence tagging tasks that the seed value for the random number generator can result in statistically significant (p < 10^-4) differences for state-of-the-art systems.  সাম্প্রতিক দুই সিস্টেমের জন্য আমরা এক শতাংশ বিন্দুর পরিপূর্ণ পার্থক্য দেখতে পাচ্ছি নির্বাচিত বিজ্ঞানের মানের উপরে নির্ভর করে, যার ফলে এই সিস্ট প্রকাশ এবং প্রতিবেদনের পরিবর্তে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি মৃত্যুদণ্ডের ভিত্তিতে স্কোর বিতরণের তুলনা করার প্রস্তাব প্রদান করি। ৫০,০০০ এলস্টিএম-নেটওয়ার্কের মূল্যের ভিত্তিতে আমরা পাঁচটি সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং কাজের জন্য নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করি যা উভয়ের চেয়ে বেশী প্রভাব উৎপা', 'cs': 'V tomto článku ukazujeme, že vykazování jediného skóre výkonu není dostatečné pro porovnání nederministických přístupů. U běžných úloh sekvenčního tagování ukazujeme, že seed hodnota generátoru náhodných čísel může vést ke statisticky významným (p až10^-4) rozdílům pro moderní systémy. U dvou nedávných systémů NER pozorujeme absolutní rozdíl jednoho procentního bodu F1-skóre v závislosti na vybrané hodnotě osiva, takže tyto systémy jsou vnímány buď jako nejmodernější nebo průměrné. Namísto publikování a vykazování jednotlivých výkonnostních skórí navrhujeme porovnání skórových distribucí založených na více provedeních. Na základě vyhodnocení 50.000 LSTM sítí pro pět sekvenčních tagovacích úloh prezentujeme síťové architektury, které produkují jak vynikající výkon, tak jsou stabilnější s ohledem na zbývající hyperparametry.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda tək performans nöqtəsini bildirmək deterministik olmayan tərzlərini salmaq üçün kifayət deyildir. Biz müəyyən sayı generatörünün sütun qiyməti statistik olaraq mövcuddur (p < 10^-4) sistemlərin fərqlənəcəklərini göstəririk. İki yeni NER sistemi üçün, bir procent nöqtəsinin fərqli fərqli olduğunu seçilmiş əkin qiymətinə bağlı görürük, bu sistemləri sanatın və ya orta mövzusu kimi görürük. Tek performans nöqtələrini təbliğ etmək və təbliğ etmək yerinə, çoxlu idarətlərə dayanan nöqtələr dağıtmasını təklif edirik. Beş seçmə işi üçün 50.000 LSTM-ağlarının değerlendirməsinə görə, hər ikisinin üst performansını və geri qalan hiperparametrlərə qarşı daha stabil olan şəbəkə arhitektarını göstəririk.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis näitame, et ühest tulemuslikkuse skoorist teatamine on ebapiisav mittedeterministlike lähenemisviiside võrdlemiseks. Näitame tavaliste järjestuste märgistamise ülesannete puhul, et juhuslike arvude generaatori seemne väärtus võib kaasa tuua statistiliselt olulisi (p < 10^-4) erinevusi kaasaegsete süsteemide puhul. Kahe hiljutise NER-süsteemi puhul täheldame absoluutset erinevust 1 protsendipunkti F1-skoori sõltuvalt valitud seemne väärtusest, mistõttu neid süsteeme tajutakse kas tehnika tasemel või keskpärastena. Üksikute tulemuslikkuse tulemuste avaldamise ja aruandluse asemel teeme ettepaneku võrrelda tulemusjaotusi mitme täitmise põhjal. Tuginedes 50 000 LSTM-võrgu hindamisele viie järjestuse märgistamise ülesande jaoks, esitame võrguarhitektuurid, mis tagavad nii suurepärase jõudluse kui ka stabiilsemad ülejäänud hüperparameetrite suhtes.', 'ca': "En aquest article demostram que la notificació d'un únic puntuatge de rendiment és insuficient per comparar enfocaments no deterministes. Per a tasques comunes d'etiquetar seqüències demostram que el valor de la semilla del generador de nombres aleatòries pot resultar en diferències estatísticament significatives (p < 10^-4) per als sistemes d'última edat. Per dos sistemes recents de NER, observem una diferència absoluta d'un punt percentatge de puntuació F1 segons el valor de la semilla seleccionada, fent que aquests sistemes siguin perceptits com a moderns o mitjans. En lloc de publicar i reportar puntuacions únices, proposem comparar distribucions basades en múltiples execucions. Sobre la base de l'evaluació de 50.000 xarxes LSTM per cinc tasques d'etiquetage de seqüències, presentem arquitectures de xarxa que produeixen un rendiment superior i que són més estables en relació amb els hiperpàmetres restants.", 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa osoitamme, ettﾃ､ yhden tulospisteen raportointi ei riitﾃ､ vertailemaan ei-deterministisiﾃ､ lﾃ､hestymistapoja. Yleisissﾃ､ sekvenssimerkkaustehtﾃ､vissﾃ､ osoitetaan, ettﾃ､ satunnaislukugeneraattorin siemenarvo voi johtaa tilastollisesti merkittﾃ､viin (p < 10^-4) eroihin viimeisimpien jﾃ､rjestelmien osalta. Kahdessa tuoreessa NER-jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ssﾃ､ havaittiin yhden prosenttiyksikﾃｶn F1-pisteen absoluuttinen ero valitun siemenarvon mukaan, jolloin nﾃ､mﾃ､ jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t nﾃ､hdﾃ､ﾃ､n joko viimeisimpinﾃ､ tai keskinkertaisina. Yksittﾃ､isten suoritustulosten julkaisemisen ja raportoinnin sijaan ehdotamme pistejakaumien vertailua useiden suoritusten perusteella. Perustuen arvioon 50 000 LSTM-verkosta viiteen sekvenssimerkkaustehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n, esittelemme verkkoarkkitehtuurit, jotka tuottavat sekﾃ､ ylivoimaista suorituskykyﾃ､ ettﾃ､ ovat stabiileja suhteessa muihin hyperparametreihin.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru pokazujemo da je izvještavanje jednog rezultata izvedbe nedovoljno za usporedbu nedodređenih pristupa. Pokazujemo za zajedničku sekvencu označavanja zadataka da vrijednost semena za generator nasumičnog broja može rezultirati statistički značajnim razlikama (p < 10^-4) za sisteme stanja umjetnosti. Za dva nedavna sustava za NER, posmatramo apsolutnu razliku od jedne procentne tačke F1-rezultate ovisno o odabranoj vrijednosti sjemena, čineći da ove sisteme smatraju ili kao stanje umjetnosti ili srednje. Umjesto izdavanja i izvještaja pojedinih rezultata izvršnosti, predlažemo usporediti distribuciju rezultata na temelju višestrukih pogubljenja. Na temelju procjene 50.000 LSTM-mreža za pet zadataka označavanja sekvence, predstavljamo mrežne arhitekture koje proizvode i nadmoćne funkcije, kao i stabilnije u odnosu na ostale hiperparametre.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki kita menehi ngomong nik nggawe gerakan sing berarti gerakan sing ora bisa nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan sing ora nggawe gerakan. Monday Nyong sistem sing dibutuhke nggo kowé nggo kowé, kita ngubah perusahaan anyar tentang F1-punti sing dipunanggo nganggo perusahaan winih, nggawe sistem iki dadi iso dianteksikno durum-of-the-arts atawa dipunanggo. Tanian wis dipuluhaan karo pawartos nggawe barang akeh operasi sing berarti, kita supoyo perusahaan kanggo nggawe Distribution de Puntuang Basa nang assertion of 30.000 LTT-network for 5 secs tagging tasks, we present network architectures', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku smo pokazali, da poročanje o enem samem rezultatu uspešnosti ni zadostno za primerjavo nedeterminističnih pristopov. Pri običajnih nalogah označevanja zaporedja dokazujemo, da lahko vrednost semena za generator naključnih števil povzroči statistično značilne (p < 10^-4) razlike za najsodobnejše sisteme. Pri dveh nedavnih sistemih za NER opažamo absolutno razliko ene odstotne točke F1-rezultata, odvisno od izbrane vrednosti semena, zaradi česar se ti sistemi zaznavajo bodisi kot najsodobnejši bodisi povprečni. Namesto objave in poročanja o posameznih rezultatih uspešnosti predlagamo primerjavo porazdelitev rezultatov na podlagi več izvedb. Na podlagi ocene 50.000 LSTM omrežij za pet nalog označevanja zaporedja predstavljamo omrežne arhitekture, ki zagotavljajo vrhunsko zmogljivost in so stabilnejše glede na preostale hiperparametre.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke nũna cewa bã ya kasa sammenliki da hanyõyin da ba'a ƙayyade Tuna nuna wa aikin tagogi na ɗabi'a da ke nuna cewa kimar zura wa mai ƙiƙiro raƙin da za'a iya ƙara wa halin da randa (p lt; 10^-4) diffuka wa halin-na-tsari. For two recent systems for NER, we observe an absolute difference of one percentage point F1-score depending on the selected seed value, making these systems perceived either as state-of-the-art or mediocre.  Babu bayin da za'a baye da kuma ka faɗi score na fassarar aiki guda, sai muna buƙata misalin rabon nau'i a kan kashfa masu yawa. Based on the evaluation of 50.000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superior performance as well as are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters.", 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྲིས་སྒྲུབ་གྲངས་རིམ་གཅིག ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་བ་དང་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀྱི་བེ་ལུས་ཡི་རིན་ཐང་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། NER için ཆགས་སྤེལ་བའི་མ་ལག་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ངེད་ཚོའི་དབར་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་རྒྱ་ཚད་གཅིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ངེས་འཛིན་ཡོད། དེ་ལས་ཕར་ཆེན་ཚུལ་དཔར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་དང་རྗེས་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་གཅིག་པ་ཡིན་ན། འུ་ཚོས་གྲངས་རྩིས་འབྲས་བ་མང་ Based on the evaluation of 50.000 LSTM-networks for five sequence tagging tasks, we present network architectures that produce both superior performance as well as are more stable with respect to the remaining hyperparameters.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו מראים שדווח על נקודת ביצועים אחת אינו מספיק כדי להשוות גישות לא קבועות. We demonstrate for common sequence tagging tasks that the seed value for the random number generator can result in statistically significant (p < 10^-4) differences for state-of-the-art systems.  For two recent systems for NER, we observe an absolute difference of one percentage point F1-score depending on the selected seed value, making these systems perceived either as state-of-the-art or mediocre.  במקום לפרסם ולדווח על תוצאות ביצועים יחידות, אנחנו מציעים להשוות פיצועי תוצאות בהתבסס על הוצאות להורג רבות. בהתבסס על הערכה של 50,000 רשתות LSTM עבור חמישה משימות תווית רצף, אנו מציגים ארכיטקטורות רשת שמוצרות ביצועים עדיפים וגם יציבים יותר בנוגע לכל הפרמטרים הנותרים.'}
{'en': 'Learning What’s Easy : Fully Differentiable Neural Easy-First Taggers', 'ar': 'تعلم ما هو سهل: علامات تمييز عصبية سهلة أولًا قابلة للتنوع تمامًا', 'pt': 'Aprendendo o que é fácil: Tagers neurais fáceis e totalmente diferenciáveis', 'es': 'Aprender lo que es fácil: etiquetadores neuronales fáciles de diferenciar', 'fr': 'Apprendre ce qui est facile\xa0: taggers neuronaux Easy-First entièrement différenciables', 'ja': '簡単なことを学ぶ：完全に差別化されたニューラルイージーファーストタガー', 'zh': '学何简易,全可微分者神经易优先标器', 'hi': 'सीखना क्या आसान है: पूरी तरह से differentiable तंत्रिका आसान-पहले Taggers', 'ru': 'Изучение того, что легко: полностью дифференцируемые нейронные легкие первые теггеры', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Cad atá Éasca: An Chéad Clibeanna Néaracha Éasca-Difreáilte go hiomlán', 'ka': 'მასწავლება რა უფრო მარტივია: ყველაფერი განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ადვილი- პირველი ტეგერები', 'el': 'Μαθαίνοντας τι είναι εύκολο: Πλήρως διαφοροποιημένα Νευρικά Εύκολα Πρώτα Ετικέτες', 'hu': 'Az egyszerű tanulás: Teljesen megkülönböztethető neurális Easy-First Taggerek', 'kk': 'Оқыту', 'it': 'Imparare cosa è facile: Tagger Neurali Easy-First completamente differenziabili', 'lt': 'Mokymasis, kas lengva: visiškai skirtingi neurologiniai lengvai pirmieji žymekliai', 'mk': 'Научи што е лесно: Целосно различни неурални лесни први ознаки', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Apa yang Mudah: Tagger Mudah-Pertama Neural yang Boleh Berbeza Sepenuhnya', 'ml': 'എളുപ്പമാണെന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്നത്: പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ നെയുറല്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള ആദ്യത്തെ ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d', 'mt': "Tagħlim X'inhu Faċili: Taggers Newrali Faċili-Ewwel Differenzjabbli bis-s ħiħ", 'mn': 'Хамгийн хялбар зүйлийг сурах: Түүнчлэн өөрчлөгдөх мэдрэлийн амархан', 'pl': 'Nauka co jest łatwe: w pełni zróżnicowalne neuronowe Easy-First Tagery', 'no': 'Læring kva er enkelt: Fullt forskjellige nøyrale enkelte- første merkelappar', 'ro': 'Învățarea ce este ușor: Neurale complet diferențiabile Easy-First Taggers', 'sv': 'Lär dig vad som är enkelt: Helt differentierbara neurala Easy-First Taggers', 'sr': 'Naučenje što je lakše: potpuno različite neurološke lako prve etikete', 'si': 'ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් දේවල්: පුළුවන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් න්\u200dයූරාල් ලේසිය- පළමු ටැගර්ස්', 'ur': 'آسانی چیز کی تعلیم کرنا: کامل مختلف نائرل آسانی پہلی ٹاگر', 'so': "Learning What's Easy: Fully Different Neural Easy-First Taggers", 'ta': 'எளிதானது என்ன கற்றுக் கொள்வது: முழுமையாக மாறுபட்ட புதிய சுலபமான முதல் ஒட்டுக்கள்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học những gì dễ dàng: các thẻ thần kinh dễ điều khác nhau', 'nl': 'Leren wat gemakkelijk is: volledig differentieerbare neuronale Easy-First Taggers', 'bg': 'Научаване на кое е лесно: Напълно различими неврални лесно-първи маркери', 'da': 'Lære hvad der er nemt: Fuldt differentierbare Neurale Easy-First Taggers', 'de': 'Lernen, was einfach ist: Vollständig differenzierbare neuronale Easy-First Tagger', 'hr': 'Naučenje što je lakše: potpuno različiti neurološki lakši prvi etiketeri', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Kilichokuwa rahisi: Wagaji wenye tofauti tofauti', 'id': "Learning What's Easy: Fully Differentiable Neural Easy-First Taggers", 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن چه آسان است: نقشه\u200cهای عصبی کاملا متفاوت', 'ko': '간단한 것이 무엇인지 배우기: 완전 미세한 신경 단순 제1 표기기', 'am': "What's Easy: Fully Different Neural Easy-First Taggers", 'af': 'Leer wat is maklik: volledig verskillende neurale eenvoudige- eerste merkers', 'tr': 'Öwrenmek', 'az': 'Basit olan캼 칬yr톛nm톛k: Tam f톛rqli N칬ral 캻lk Etikl톛ri', 'bn': 'শিখা যাচ্ছে কি সহজ: পূর্ণ ভিন্ন নিউরেল সহজ- প্রথম ট্যাগার', 'bs': 'Naučenje što je lakše: potpuno različite neurološke lako prve etikete', 'ca': 'Aprendre el que és fàcil: Etiquetes neurals de fàcil primer lloc totalment diferenciables', 'sq': 'MĂ«soni se Ă§farĂ« Ă«shtĂ« e lehtĂ«: Taggers tĂ« lehtĂ«-tĂ« parĂ« nervorĂ« tĂ« ndryshueshĂ«m plotĂ«sisht', 'fi': 'Helppoa oppimista: Täysin erottuvat hermot Helppoa Ensimmäinen Taggerit', 'hy': 'Հեշտ է սովորել. ամբողջովին տարբերակելի նյարդային հեշտ առաջին նշանները', 'cs': 'Učení se, co je snadné: Plně diferencovatelné neuronové Easy-First Taggery', 'et': 'Õppimine, mis on lihtne: täielikult eristatavad neuroalsed lihtsalt esimesed märgistajad', 'sk': 'Učenje, kaj je enostavno: popolnoma različni živčni enostavni označevalniki', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ללמוד מה קל: Taggers נוירואלים קלים-ראשונים שונים לגמרי', 'bo': "Learning What's Easy: Fully Differential Neural Easy-First Taggers"}
{'en': 'We introduce a novel neural easy-first decoder that learns to solve sequence tagging tasks in a flexible order. In contrast to previous easy-first decoders, our models are end-to-end differentiable. The decoder iteratively updates a sketch of the predictions over the sequence. At its core is an attention mechanism that controls which parts of the input are strategically the best to process next. We present a new constrained softmax transformation that ensures the same cumulative attention to every word, and show how to efficiently evaluate and backpropagate over it. Our models compare favourably to BILSTM taggers on three sequence tagging tasks.', 'ar': 'نقدم مفكك تشفير عصبي جديد سهل أولًا يتعلم حل مهام وضع العلامات التسلسلية بترتيب مرن. على عكس أجهزة فك التشفير السابقة السهلة الأولى ، فإن نماذجنا قابلة للتفاضل من طرف إلى طرف. تقوم وحدة فك التشفير بشكل تكراري بتحديث "رسم تخطيطي" للتنبؤات عبر التسلسل. يوجد في جوهرها آلية انتباه تتحكم في أي أجزاء من المدخلات هي الأفضل استراتيجيًا للمعالجة التالية. نقدم تحويل softmax مقيدًا جديدًا يضمن نفس الاهتمام التراكمي لكل كلمة ، ويوضح كيفية تقييمها وإعادة نشرها بكفاءة. تقارن نماذجنا بشكل إيجابي مع علامات BILSTM في ثلاث مهام لوضع العلامات على التسلسل.', 'es': 'Presentamos un novedoso decodificador neuronal fácil que aprende a resolver las tareas de etiquetado de secuencias en un orden flexible. A diferencia de los decodificadores easy-first anteriores, nuestros modelos son diferenciables de extremo a extremo. El decodificador actualiza iterativamente un «boceto» de las predicciones sobre la secuencia. En esencia, hay un mecanismo de atención que controla qué partes de los insumos son estratégicamente las mejores para procesar a continuación. Presentamos una nueva transformación softmax restringida que asegura la misma atención acumulativa a cada palabra y mostramos cómo evaluarla y propagarla de manera eficiente. Nuestros modelos se comparan favorablemente con los etiquetadores BILSTM en tres tareas de etiquetado de secuencias.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un nouveau décodeur neuronal easy-first qui apprend à résoudre les tâches de marquage de séquence dans un ordre flexible. Contrairement aux décodeurs easy-first précédents, nos modèles sont différentiables de bout en bout. Le décodeur met à jour de manière itérative un «\xa0croquis\xa0» des prédictions sur la séquence. À la base se trouve un mécanisme d'attention qui contrôle quelles parties de l'entrée sont stratégiquement les meilleures à traiter ensuite. Nous présentons une nouvelle transformation softmax contrainte qui garantit la même attention cumulative à chaque mot, et montrons comment évaluer et rétropropager efficacement sur ce mot. Nos modèles se comparent favorablement aux taggers BILSTM pour trois tâches de marquage séquentiel.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo decodificador neural que aprende a resolver tarefas de marcação de sequência em uma ordem flexível. Em contraste com os decodificadores anteriores, nossos modelos são diferenciáveis de ponta a ponta. O decodificador atualiza iterativamente um “esboço” das previsões sobre a sequência. Em seu núcleo está um mecanismo de atenção que controla quais partes da entrada são estrategicamente as melhores para serem processadas em seguida. Apresentamos uma nova transformação softmax restrita que garante a mesma atenção cumulativa para cada palavra e mostramos como avaliá-la e retropropagá-la com eficiência. Nossos modelos se comparam favoravelmente aos marcadores BILSTM em três tarefas de marcação de sequência.', 'ja': '柔軟な順序でシーケンスタグ付けタスクを解くことを学ぶ新規のニューラルイージーファーストデコーダを紹介します。以前の簡単ファーストデコーダーとは対照的に、当社のモデルはエンドツーエンドの差別化が可能です。デコーダは、シーケンスにわたって予測の「スケッチ」を繰り返し更新する。その中核となるのは、インプットのどの部分を次に処理するのに戦略的に最適かを制御する注意メカニズムです。私たちは、すべての単語に対する同じ累積的な注意を保証する新しい制約されたソフトマックス変換を提示し、それを効率的に評価してバックプロパゲートする方法を示します。当社のモデルは、3つのシーケンスタグ付けタスクでBILSTMタグ付け器と比較して好ましい。', 'hi': 'हम एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका आसान-पहले डिकोडर पेश करते हैं जो एक लचीले क्रम में अनुक्रम टैगिंग कार्यों को हल करना सीखता है। पिछले आसान-पहले डिकोडर्स के विपरीत, हमारे मॉडल एंड-टू-एंड डिफरिएबल हैं। विकोडक पुनरावर्ती रूप से अनुक्रम पर भविष्यवाणियों का एक "स्केच" अपडेट करता है। इसके मूल में एक ध्यान तंत्र है जो यह नियंत्रित करता है कि इनपुट के कौन से हिस्से रणनीतिक रूप से आगे संसाधित करने के लिए सबसे अच्छे हैं। हम एक नया विवश सॉफ्टमैक्स परिवर्तन प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो हर शब्द पर एक ही संचयी ध्यान सुनिश्चित करता है, और दिखाता है कि इसे कुशलतापूर्वक मूल्यांकन और बैकप्रोपेगेट कैसे किया जाए। हमारे मॉडल तीन अनुक्रम टैगिंग कार्यों पर BILSTM taggers के लिए अनुकूल तुलना करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новый нейронный декодер с легким первым декодированием, который учится решать задачи маркировки последовательностей в гибком порядке. В отличие от предыдущих простых первых декодеров, наши модели являются сквозными дифференцируемыми. Декодер итеративно обновляет «схему» прогнозов по последовательности. В его основе лежит механизм привлечения внимания, который контролирует, какие части вводимых ресурсов являются стратегически наилучшими для обработки в будущем. Мы представляем новое ограниченное преобразование softmax, которое обеспечивает одинаковое совокупное внимание к каждому слову, и показываем, как эффективно оценивать и обратное распространение над ним. Наши модели выгодно сравниваются с тегерами BILSTM по трем задачам маркировки последовательностей.', 'zh': '引入一新神经易优先解码器,学以便宜解标记。 比之前易优先解码器,吾形端可微分。 解码器以迭代序占"草图"。 其核心是一种注意机制,该机制所输的那些在战略上最宜下一步处理。 新约束softmax转换,保单词同积,示有效而反传之。 吾三序之任,与BILSTM之器为优。', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach díchódóir néar-éasca don chéad uair a fhoghlaimíonn conas tascanna clibeála seichimh a réiteach in ord solúbtha. I gcodarsnacht le díchódóirí éasca an chéad uair roimhe seo, tá ár múnlaí difreáilte ó cheann ceann go ceann. Nuashonraíonn an díchódóir “sceitse” de na tuartha thar an seicheamh go atriallach. Ina chroílár tá meicníocht aird a rialaíonn na codanna den ionchur is fearr go straitéiseach a phróiseáil ina dhiaidh sin. Cuirimid i láthair claochlú nua srianta softmax a áirithíonn an aird charnach chéanna ar gach focal, agus a thaispeánann conas is féidir meastóireacht éifeachtach a dhéanamh agus cúl-phlódú a dhéanamh air. Is fearr comparáid idir ár múnlaí agus clibeálaithe BILSTM ar thrí thasc chlibeála seicheamh.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε έναν νέο νευρικό αποκωδικοποιητή εύκολο πρώτο που μαθαίνει να λύνει τις εργασίες σήμανσης ακολουθίας με μια ευέλικτη σειρά. Σε αντίθεση με τους προηγούμενους αποκωδικοποιητές εύκολης πρώτης χρήσης, τα μοντέλα μας είναι πλήρως διαφοροποιημένα. Ο αποκωδικοποιητής ενημερώνει επανειλημμένα ένα "σκίτσο" των προβλέψεων πάνω από την ακολουθία. Στον πυρήνα του είναι ένας μηχανισμός προσοχής που ελέγχει ποια τμήματα της εισόδου είναι στρατηγικά τα καλύτερα για να επεξεργαστούν στη συνέχεια. Παρουσιάζουμε έναν νέο περιορισμένο μετασχηματισμό που εξασφαλίζει την ίδια σωρευτική προσοχή σε κάθε λέξη και δείχνει πώς να αξιολογεί αποτελεσματικά και να αναδημιουργείται πάνω της. Τα μοντέλα μας συγκρίνονται θετικά με τις ετικέτες σε τρεις εργασίες σήμανσης ακολουθίας.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy új neurális könnyű-első dekódolót, amely rugalmas sorrendben megtanulja megoldani a szekvencia-címkézési feladatokat. A korábbi easy first dekóderekkel ellentétben modelleink teljes körű megkülönböztetést alkalmaznak. A dekóder iteratívan frissíti a jóslatok vázlatát a sorozat során. Középpontjában egy figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmus áll, amely szabályozza, hogy az input mely részei stratégiailag a legjobbak a következő feldolgozásra. Bemutatunk egy új korlátozott softmax transzformációt, amely minden szóra ugyanolyan kumulatív figyelmet biztosít, és megmutatja, hogyan lehet hatékonyan értékelni és visszaterjedni rajta. Modelljeink három szekvenciás címkézési feladatban kedvezően hasonlítanak a BILSTM címkézőkhöz.', 'ka': "ჩვენ პრომენული ნეიროლური ადვილი პირველი დეკოდირების შესახებ, რომელიც ვისწავლის, რომ სწავლის შესახებ დაწერების შესახებ მუშაობის შესახებ ფლექსიბულ ჩვენი მოდელები საკუთარი დასასრულებელია. ევკოდერები განახლებელია წარმოდგენების 'sketch' შემდეგ. მისი კუნძეში არის აღმოჩენის მექანსი, რომელიც კონტროლურებს, რომელიც შემოწყენების ნაწილი სტრატიკურად უკეთესია შემდეგ პროცესისთვის ჩვენ ახალი სტრუმექსი განცვლა, რომელიც ყველა სიტყვის იგივე კუმულატიური დაახლოებით, და ჩვენ ჩვენებთ როგორ ეფექტიურად გაუმუშაოთ და დაბრუნოთ. ჩვენი მოდელები საკუთარი მონაცემებით გადასრულება BILSTM ტეგერებისთვის საკუთარი მონაცემებით.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame naują neurologinį lengvai pirmąjį dekoderį, kuris mokosi lanksčiai išspręsti sekos ženklinimo užduotis. Priešingai nei ankstesni lengvai pirmieji dekoderiai, mūsų modeliai iš karto į galą skiriasi. Dekodorius pakartotinai atnaujina prognozių skešą. Pagrindinis dėmesio mechanizmas yra dėmesio mechanizmas, kuriuo kontroliuojama, kurios įnašo dalys yra strategiškai geriausios tolesniam procesui. Mes pristatome naują suvaržytą softmax transformaciją, kuri užtikrina tokį patį kaupiamąjį dėmesį kiekvienam žodžiui ir parodo, kaip veiksmingai įvertinti ir atgaline verte. Mūsų modeliai palankiai palyginami su BILSTM žymekliais trijose eilės žymeklių užduotyse.', 'it': "Introducemo un nuovo decoder neurale facile-primo che impara a risolvere le attività di codifica di sequenza in un ordine flessibile. A differenza dei precedenti decoder easy-first, i nostri modelli sono differenziabili end-to-end. Il decoder aggiorna iterativamente uno 'schizzo' delle previsioni durante la sequenza. Al suo centro c'è un meccanismo di attenzione che controlla quali parti dell'input sono strategicamente le migliori da elaborare successivamente. Presentiamo una nuova trasformazione softmax vincolata che assicura la stessa attenzione cumulativa ad ogni parola e mostra come valutare e propagare efficacemente su di essa. I nostri modelli si confrontano favorevolmente con i tagger BILSTM in tre attività di codifica sequenziale.", 'kk': "Біз жалғыз ретінде тапсырмаларды таңдау үшін оңай невралдық бірінші декодерді таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы оңай бірінші декодерге қарсы, біздің үлгілеріміз соңғы соңында айырмашылық. Декодердің қайталау ретінде таңдау кезінің 'sketch' дегенін жаңарту. Олардың негізгі механизмі, келесіден кейін қай бөлігін бақылау үшін стратегиялық түрде жұмыс істеу үшін ең жақсы. Біз жаңа шектелген бағдарламалық түрлендірімізді таңдап, әрбір сөздерге бірдей көпшілікті түрлендіріп, оның үстінде қалай оқу және backpropagation дегенді көрсетеді. Біздің үлгілеріміз үш реттік тапсырмаларда BILSTM тегжерлеріне салыстырылады.", 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu dekoder newrali ġdid faċli-ewwel li jitgħallem li jsolvi l-kompiti tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenza f’ordni flessibbli. B’kuntrast mad-dekoderi preċedenti li kienu faċli għall-ewwel darba, il-mudelli tagħna huma differenzjabbli minn tarf għal tarf. Id-dekoder jaġġorna b’mod iterattiv ‘sketch’ tal-previżjonijiet matul is-sekwenza. Fil-qalba tagħha hemm mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni li jikkontrolla liema partijiet tal-input huma strateġikament l-aħjar biex jiġu pproċessati li jmiss. Aħna nippreżentaw trasformazzjoni ġdida ristretta tal-softmax li tiżgura l-istess attenzjoni kumulattiva għal kull kelma, u nuru kif nistgħu jevalwaw u nippropandu b’mod effiċjenti fuqha. Il-mudelli tagħna jqabblu b’mod favorevoli mat-taggers BILSTM fuq tliet kompiti ta’ tagging ta’ sekwenza.', 'mk': 'We introduce a novel neural easy-first decoder that learns to solve sequence tagging tasks in a flexible order.  За разлика од претходните лесни први декодери, нашите модели се од крај до крај разликувачки. Декораторот итеративно ги оневозможува „цртежите“ на предвидувањата во текот на секвенцијата. Во неговото јадро е механизам на внимание кој контролира кои делови од влогот се стратешки најдобри за следен процес. Презентираме нова ограничена софтмакс трансформација која го обезбедува истото кумулативно внимание на секој збор и покажува како ефикасно да се процени и да се прошири над него. Нашите модели се споредуваат со БИЛСТМ означувачи на три задачи за означување на секвенца.', 'ml': "നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആദ്യ ഡെകോഡിറ്റര്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു ഫ്ലോക്സ മുമ്പുള്ള എളുപ്പമായ ആദ്യത്തെ ഡെക്കോഡുകള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമാണ്, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അവസാനം മാത്രം വ്യത്യസ് സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ മുമ്പിലുള്ള പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ 'സ്കേച്ച്' പുതുക്കുന്നത് ഡെകോഡേര്\u200d സാധാരണ പുതുക്കുക. അതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ വ്യവസ്ഥയാണ്. ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഏത് ഭാഗമാണെന്ന് നിയന്ത എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ഒരേ ശ്രദ്ധ നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമാക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ സോഫ്റ്റ്മാക്സ് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അതിനെക്കുറിച് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റം ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200dമാരോട് മൂന്ന് സിക്കന്\u200dസ് ടാഗിങ്ങ് ജോലികളില്\u200d താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമുള്", 'ms': "Kami memperkenalkan penyahkod saraf baru yang mudah-pertama yang belajar untuk menyelesaikan tugas tag urutan dalam tertib fleksibel. Sebaliknya dengan dekoder pertama-mudah terdahulu, model kita boleh berbeza akhir-akhir. Dekoder mengemaskini secara iteratif 'sketch' ramalan atas urutan. Pada inti adalah mekanisme perhatian yang mengawal bahagian-bahagian input yang secara strategik adalah yang terbaik untuk memproses selanjutnya. Kami memperlihatkan pengubahan softmax yang terbatas yang memastikan perhatian kumulatif yang sama kepada setiap perkataan, dan menunjukkan bagaimana untuk menilai dan mengembalikannya secara efektif. Model kita dibandingkan dengan baik dengan tag BILSTM pada tiga tugas penggunaan urutan.", 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy nowy neuronowy dekoder easy-first, który uczy się rozwiązywać zadania tagowania sekwencji w elastycznej kolejności. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich dekoderów easy-first, nasze modele są kompleksowo różnicowalne. Dekoder iteracyjnie aktualizuje "szkic" przewidywań w sekwencji. W jego rdzeniu znajduje się mechanizm uwagi, który kontroluje, które części danych są strategicznie najlepsze do przetworzenia następnie. Przedstawiamy nową ograniczoną transformację softmax, która zapewnia tę samą skumulowaną uwagę na każde słowo i pokazuje, jak skutecznie ocenić i wstecznie propagować nad nim. Nasze modele korzystnie porównują się do tagerów BILSTM w trzech zadaniach tagowania sekwencyjnego.', 'mn': 'Бид шинэ мэдрэлийн хамгийн хялбар, амархан загварыг шийдэхэд суралцдаг шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийг танилцуулдаг. Өмнөх амархан хамгийн амархан загваруудын эсрэг бидний загварууд төгсгөлд ялгаатай. Декодер дахин дахин дараагийн таамаглалтын "sketch"-г шинэчлүүлдэг. Үүний төвшинд анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм нь дараагийн үйл ажиллагаанд хамгийн сайн хэсгийг удирддаг. Бид нэг шинэ хязгаарлагдсан софтмакс өөрчлөлтийг тайлбарлаж, тэр үг бүр адилхан нийлүүлэгч анхаарлаа хангаж, үүнийг хэрхэн үр дүнтэй үнэлгээ, буцаагдах вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний загвар нь BILSTM-ийн тэмдэглэгчидтэй холбогдож байна.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer eit nyral enkelt- første dekoder som lærer å løysa sekvens for merking oppgåver i ein fleksibel rekkjefølgje. I contrast to previous easy-first decoders, our models are end-to-end differentiable. Dekoderen gjentakast oppdater ein «sketch» av forhåndsvisingane over sekvensen. På kjernen sitt er ein oppmerksmekanisme som styrer kva deler av inndata er strategisk den beste å handsama neste. Vi presenterer eit nytt begrenset softmax-transformasjon som sikrer at det samme kumulativne oppmerksomheten skal vere på kvar ord, og viser korleis det skal effektivt evaluera og tilbakepropagara over det. Modellene våre samanliknar favoritt med BILSTM-merker på tre sekvens som merker oppgåver.', 'ro': 'Introducem un nou decodor neural ușor-primul care învață să rezolve sarcinile de etichetare a secvențelor într-o ordine flexibilă. Spre deosebire de decodoarele anterioare ușor-first, modelele noastre sunt diferențiabile end-to-end. Decodorul actualizează iterativ o "schiță" a predicțiilor de-a lungul secvenței. În centrul său este un mecanism de atenție care controlează care părți ale intrării sunt strategic cele mai bune pentru a procesa în continuare. Vă prezentăm o nouă transformare softmax constrânsă care asigură aceeași atenție cumulativă pentru fiecare cuvânt și arată cum să evaluați și să vă propuneți în mod eficient peste el. Modelele noastre se compară favorabil cu etichetele BILSTM în trei sarcini de etichetare secvențială.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo nov neuralni lakši prvi dekoder koji nauèi da reši sekvenciju označavanja zadataka u fleksibilnom redu. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim lakom prvim dekoderima, naši modeli su drugačiji. Dekoder ponovno aktualizuje "skeč" predviđanja po sekvenci. Na njenoj jezgri je pažnji mehanizam koji kontroliše koji deo ulaza su strateški najbolji za proces sledeće. Predstavljamo novu ograničenu softmax transformaciju koja osigurava istu kumulativnu pažnju na svaku reč i pokazuje kako efektivno procjenjivati i proširiti nad njim. Naši modeli su dobrodošli u usporedbi sa BILSTM etiketerima na tri sekvence označavanja zadataka.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en ny neural easy-first avkodare som lﾃ､r sig att lﾃｶsa sekvensmﾃ､rkningsuppgifter i en flexibel ordning. Till skillnad frﾃ･n tidigare enkla avkodare ﾃ､r vﾃ･ra modeller heltﾃ､ckande differentierbara. Dekodaren uppdaterar iterativt en "skiss" av fﾃｶrutsﾃ､gelserna ﾃｶver sekvensen. Kﾃ､rnan ﾃ､r en uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmekanism som styr vilka delar av indata som strategiskt ﾃ､r bﾃ､st att bearbeta hﾃ､rnﾃ､st. Vi presenterar en ny begrﾃ､nsad softmax transformation som sﾃ､kerstﾃ､ller samma kumulativa uppmﾃ､rksamhet fﾃｶr varje ord, och visar hur man effektivt utvﾃ､rderar och bakﾃ･tsprider ﾃｶver det. Vﾃ･ra modeller jﾃ､mfﾃｶrs positivt med BILSTM-taggare vid tre sekvensmﾃ､rkningsuppgifter.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa saxda neurada ee ugu fudud, kaas oo baranaya in lagu xalliyo shaqooyinka tagsiga xilliga ah. Iska duwan oo ka mid ah kuwa horeeyay oo fudud, modelalkayagu waa mid u kala duwan dhammaadka ugu dambeeya. Qoraadku waxey si rasmi ah ugu cusboonaysaa warqada la sii sheegayo dhamaadka. Xilligeeda hoose waa meymisyo daryeel ah oo maamula qayb ka mid ah injiilka si strategista ah ugu wanaagsan in la sameeyo xilliga dambe. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa is-beddelasho cusub oo is-hoosaysiiyey, taas oo hubsanaya isku mid u taxadar hadal kasta, waxaana tusnaynaa siduu si fiican uga qiimeeyo iyo dib u sii wado. Tusaale'yadayada si wanaagsan ayay u simisaan waxyaabaha lagu tago ee BILSTM saddex xilli ah.", 'si': "අපි ප්\u200dරධාන න්\u200dයූරාල් පළමු ප්\u200dරධාන විස්තර ක්\u200dරියාවක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධාන විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් ව පළවෙනි ලේසිය-පළවෙනි ඩිකොඩර් එක්ක වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ මොඩල් අවසාන වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්. ඩිකෝඩර් ආයෙත් අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් 'ස්කෙච්' කිරීමක් වලින්. එයාගේ මූලයේ අවධානයක් තියෙන්නේ අවධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ඇතුළුමේ කොටස් කොටස් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක් අපි අළුත් අවධානයක් තියෙන්නේ සොෆ්ට් මැක්ස් වෙනස් කරන්න, ඒකෙන් හැම වචනයට එකම අවධානයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, හැම වචනයක්ම අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක බිල්ස්ට්ම් ටැගර්ස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ක්\u200dරමය තුනක් ටැග් කරනවා.", 'ur': "ہم ایک نئورل آسان پہلے ڈیکوڈر کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جو سیدھا ٹیکنگ کے کام حل کرنے کی تعلیم کرتا ہے پہلے آسان پہلے ڈیکوڈر کے مقابلہ میں، ہمارے مدلز آخر سے متفاوت ہیں۔ ڈیکوڈر دوبارہ دفع کرتا ہے کہ سطح پر پیش بینی کی ایک 'sketch' کو آغاز کرتا ہے. اس کے ذریعہ میں ایک توجه مکانیسم ہے جو اس میں کنٹرول کرتا ہے کہ کدوم اندازے کے ٹکڑے اس کے بعد پرسس کرنے کے لئے بہترین ہیں۔ ہم ایک نئی محدود نرم مہربانی تغییر دکھاتے ہیں جو ہر کلمہ کے ساتھ ایک ہی جمع توجه دیتا ہے اور اس پر کس طرح اثبات کا ارزش کرنا اور پچھلے پھیلانا دکھاتے ہیں ہماری مدل تین سطح ٹاگ ٹاگ ٹیگ ٹیگ ٹیگ ٹیگ ٹیگ ٹیگ ٹیگ کے ساتھ مہربانی کے ساتھ مقایسہ کرتے ہیں.", 'ta': "நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய புதிய குறியீட்டை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும் என்று ஒரு சுலபமான முதல் குறியீட்டாளரை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும்  முந்தைய சுலபமான முதல் குறியீடுகளுக்கு மாறுபட்டால், எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவு முடிவ வரிசையின் மீது முன்னோர்களின் 'வரிசையை' புதுப்பிக்கும் குறியீட்டாளர் அதன் கூற்றில் ஒரு கவனம் முறைமையாகும் உள்ளீட்டின் பகுதிகளை கட்டுப்படுத்துகிறது அடுத்த செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு சிறந்த ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் அதே கவனத்தை உறுதிப்படுத்தும் பொருட்டு புதிய மென்பொருள் மாற்றங்களை நாம் கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அதை எப்படி விர நம்முடைய மாதிரிகள் மூன்று வரிசையான ஒட்டும் வேலைகளில் BILSTM ஒப்பிடும்.", 'uz': "Biz birinchi oddiy neyrolik kodlash orqali o'rganamiz, bir xil tartibi bilan seksiz teglash vazifalarini o'rganadi. In contrast to previous easy-first decoders, our models are end-to-end differentiable.  Name Bu miyadagi paytda, kiritish qanday qismlarini boshqaruvchi, strategik keyingi vazifa uchun eng yaxshi narsa. Biz har bir so'zga bir xil munosabatlarni amalga oshirish uchun yangi qanday o'zgarishni ko'rsatdik, va bu yerda qanday tasavvur qilishni va qayta propagandan foydalanishini ko'rsatdik. Bizning modellarimiz bizga uchta marta teglagan vazifalar bilan BILSTM taggerlarga munosabatlar.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một bộ giải mã thần kinh mới, dễ dàng-đầu tiên, chuyên gia giải quyết các nhiệm vụ kích thích chuỗi trong một trật tự linh hoạt. So với các thiết bị giải mã dễ-đầu trước, các mẫu của chúng tôi rất khác nhau. Bộ giải mã cập nhật tính cách lặp đi lặp lại Điểm mấu chốt của nó là một cơ chế tập trung điều khiển những phần nào của nội dung là phần tốt nhất để tiến hành tiếp theo. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một sự biến đổi kiểu mềm bị hạn mới, đảm bảo sự chú ý tích lũy được lặp lại với mỗi từ, và cho thấy cách đánh giá hiệu quả và tái tạo nó. Các mẫu của chúng ta so sánh tốt với hiệu Bingham trong các công việc hiệu ba dãy.', 'nl': "We introduceren een nieuwe neurale easy-first decoder die leert sequence tagging taken op te lossen in een flexibele volgorde. In tegenstelling tot eerdere easy-first decoders zijn onze modellen end-to-end differentieerbaar. De decoder werkt iteratief een 'schets' van de voorspellingen over de reeks bij. In de kern zit een aandachtsmechanisme dat bepaalt welke delen van de input strategisch het beste te verwerken zijn. We presenteren een nieuwe beperkte softmax transformatie die zorgt voor dezelfde cumulatieve aandacht voor elk woord, en laten zien hoe je het efficiënt kunt evalueren en terugpropageren. Onze modellen vergelijken gunstig met BILSTM taggers op drie sequentie tagging taken.", 'bg': 'Въвеждаме нов невронен декодер, който се научава да решава задачите за маркиране на последователности в гъвкав ред. За разлика от предишните лесни декодери, нашите модели са диференцируеми от край до край. Декодерът итеративно актуализира "скица" на прогнозите през последователността. В основата си е механизъм за внимание, който контролира кои части от входа са стратегически най-добрите за обработка. Представяме нова ограничена трансформация, която осигурява еднакво кумулативно внимание към всяка дума и показва как ефективно да се оценява и да се разпространява върху нея. Нашите модели се сравняват благоприятно с маркерите при три последователни задачи за етикетиране.', 'de': 'Wir stellen einen neuartigen neuronalen Easy-First-Decoder vor, der lernt, Sequenz-Tagging-Aufgaben in einer flexiblen Reihenfolge zu lösen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Easy-First-Decodern sind unsere Modelle durchgängig differenzierbar. Der Decoder aktualisiert iterativ eine "Skizze" der Vorhersagen über die Sequenz. Im Kern steht ein Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der steuert, welche Teile des Inputs strategisch am besten verarbeitet werden sollen. Wir präsentieren eine neue eingeschränkte softmax Transformation, die die gleiche kumulative Aufmerksamkeit für jedes Wort gewährleistet, und zeigen, wie man es effizient auswerten und rückwärts propagieren kann. Unsere Modelle vergleichen sich günstig mit BILSTM-Taggern bei drei Sequenz-Tagging-Aufgaben.', 'hr': "Predstavljamo nov neuralni lakši prvi dekoder koji nauči riješiti sekvencu označavanja zadataka u fleksibilnom redu. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim lakom prvim dekoderima, naši modeli su različiti na kraju do kraja. Dekoder ponovno aktualizira 'skeč' predviđanja po sekvenci. Na njegovoj osnovi je mehanizam pažnje koji kontrolira koje dijelove ulaza su strategički najbolje za proces sljedećeg. Predstavljamo novu ograničenu softmax transformaciju koja osigurava istu kumulativnu pažnju na svaku riječ i pokazuje kako učinkovito procijeniti i propagati nad njim. Naši modeli su dobrodošli u usporedbi sa BILSTM etiketerima na tri sekvenčna označavanja zadataka.", 'da': "Vi introducerer en ny neural easy-first dekoder, der lærer at løse sekvensmærkning opgaver i en fleksibel rækkefølge. I modsætning til tidligere easy-first dekodere er vores modeller end-to-end differentierbare. Dekoderen opdaterer iterativt en 'skitse' af forudsigelserne over sekvensen. Kernen er en opmærksomhedsmekanisme, der styrer, hvilke dele af input der strategisk er bedst at behandle næste gang. Vi præsenterer en ny begrænset softmax transformation, der sikrer samme kumulative opmærksomhed på hvert ord, og viser, hvordan man effektivt evaluerer og tilbagefører det. Vores modeller sammenligner positivt med BILSTM-mærkere på tre sekvensmærkeopgaver.", 'fa': 'ما یک دستگاه عصبی آسان اول را معرفی می کنیم که برای حل کردن دستگاه یاد می گیرد که دستگاه یادگیری کردن کار را در یک دستگاه متفاوت معرفی می کنیم. در مقابل دستگاه\u200cهای آسان اول، مدل\u200cهای ما متفاوت\u200cپذیر است. Dekoder به طور تکرار یک «sketch» از پیش\u200cبینی\u200cها بر روی ترکیب آغاز می\u200cکند. در مرکز آن یک مکانیسم توجه است که کنترل می کند کدام بخشی از ورودی استراتژیکی بهترین برای فرایند بعدی است. ما یک تغییر نرم\u200cافزار محدود جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که توجه جمع\u200cآوری را به هر کلمه می\u200cدهد و نشان می\u200cدهیم چگونه به طور موثرتی ارزیابی و پشتیبانی بر آن باشد. مدل\u200cهامون با توجه به مقایسه کردن با توجه\u200cکننده\u200cهای BILSTM در سه دسته\u200cی نقاشی\u200cهای نقاشی مقایسه می\u200cکنند.', 'tr': "Biz, fleksibil bir şekilde etiketleme işlerini çözmek için öğrenýän bir roman nöral ilkinji kolay bir dekodere tanıştırıyoruz. Öňki aňsatlyk bilen aňsatlyk dekoderleriň tersine, nusgalarymyz soňunda üýtgeşirilabilir. Geditiň ön namaýyşynyň 'sketch'-yny gaýtalanýar. Onuň esasy ýerinde girişiň nähili böleginiň stratejik ýagdaýynyň yzyndaky proses etmek üçin has gowydygyny kontrol eden bir mekanizmatdir. Biz täze möhüm ýok bir hereket üýtgetmegini görkezip, hem her söze bir kumulatiw üns berip, hem munyň üstünde nähili efektiv deýtgetmegi we arkada geçirmegi mümkin edýäris. Biziň modellerimiz üç sany taglama işinde BILSTM tägleriňe el şekilde karşılaýarlar.", 'ko': "우리는 서열 표기 임무를 유연한 순서로 해결하는 새로운 신경 단순 우선 디코더를 소개했다.이전의 easy first 디코더와 비교하면, 우리의 모델은 끝에서 끝까지 미세하다.디코더가 시퀀스에서 예측한 '스케치' 를 교체해서 업데이트합니다.그 핵심은 일종의 주의력 메커니즘으로 입력의 어떤 부분을 제어하는 것이 전략적으로 다음 처리에 가장 적합한지 제어한다.우리는 모든 단어에 대해 똑같은 누적 주의를 확보하고 이를 효과적으로 평가하고 역방향으로 전파하는 방법을 보여주는 새로운 구속softmax 전환을 제시했다.세 개의 시퀀스 태그 작업에서 BILSTM 태그 지정자보다 우수한 모델이 제공됩니다.", 'sq': "Ne prezantojmë një dekoder neural të parë të lehtë që mëson të zgjidhë detyrat e shënimit të sekuencës në një rend fleksibel. Në kontrast me dekoderët e mëparshëm të parë të lehtë, modelet tona janë të ndryshueshëm nga fundi në fund. Dekoduesi përditëson përsëri një 'sketch' të parashikimeve mbi sekuencën. At its core is an attention mechanism that controls which parts of the input are strategically the best to process next.  We present a new constrained softmax transformation that ensures the same cumulative attention to every word, and show how to efficiently evaluate and backpropagate over it.  Modelet tona krahasohen në mënyrë të favorshme me etiketat BILSTM në tre detyra sekuencë të etiketave.", 'am': "የነዌብ ነጥብ የፊተኛውን ቀዳሚ አካባቢ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ከቀድሞው ቀላል መጀመሪያ አካባቢዎች ጋር ተቃውሞ ሞዴላዎቻችን መጨረሻ ወደ መጨረሻ ይለየቃሉ፡፡ The decoder iteratively updates a 'sketch' of the predictions over the sequence.  At its core is an attention mechanism that controls which parts of the input are strategically the best to process next.  አዲስ የፍትሕት መፍትወት በቃላት ሁሉ ላይ አንድ ጥያቄን እንዲያረጋግጥ እና እንዴት እንደሚበዛና እንዴት እንደምታስተምርበት እና እንዴት እንደምናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴላዎቻችን በሦስት ተከታታይ ስራ ላይ በቢLSTM ተጋሪዎችን ያሳያል፡፡", 'id': "We introduce a novel neural easy-first decoder that learns to solve sequence tagging tasks in a flexible order.  Berbeda dengan dekoder pertama mudah sebelumnya, model kita bisa berbeda dari akhir ke akhir. The decoder iteratively updates a 'sketch' of the predictions over the sequence.  Di inti adalah mekanisme perhatian yang mengendalikan bagian-bagian input strategis yang terbaik untuk memproses selanjutnya. We present a new constrained softmax transformation that ensures the same cumulative attention to every word, and show how to efficiently evaluate and backpropagate over it.  Model kita membandingkan dengan baik dengan tagger BILSTM pada tiga tugas tagging urutan.", 'az': "Biz yeni nöral ilk çox asan bir dekoderi təşkil edirik ki, seçməyi öyrənir, müxtəlif bir sıralarda işarələri çəkməyi öyrənir. Əvvəlki kolay ilk dekoderlərə qarşı modellərimiz sona qədər fərqli olaraq. Dekodlayıcı sıralıq üzərində tədbirlərin 'sketch' yeniləşdirir. Onun mərkəzində, içərilərin hansı parçalarının stratejik olaraq daha yaxşı işlədiyini kontrol edən bir məktəzindir. Biz hər kəlmə eyni kumulativ dikkatini sağlayan yeni müəyyən yumuşaq transformasyonu göstəririk və onun üstündə necə təşkil ediləcəyini və necə təşkil ediləcəyini göstəririk. Bizim modellərimiz üç seçmə işində BILSTM etiketçiləri ilə yaxşılıqla qarşılaşdırır.", 'af': "Ons introduiseer 'n roman neurale maklik- eerste dekoder wat leer om sekwensies merking opdragte te los in 'n fleksibel volgorde. In contrast to previous easy-first decoders, our models are end-to-end differentiable. Die dekoder werklik opdateer 'n 'sketch' van die voorskoue oor die volgorde. Op sy kern is 'n aandag mekanisme wat kontroleer watter deel van die invoer is strategies die beste om volgende proses te doen. Ons stel 'n nuwe beperkte sagmaks transformasie wat dieselfde kumulatiewe aandag verskaf aan elke woord, en wys hoe om effektief te evalueer en terugpropagasie daaroor te wees. Ons modele vergelyk genadig met BILSTM merkers op drie volgorde merking opdragte.", 'sw': "Tunaonyesha kiwango cha uraia cha kwanza cha neura ambacho kinajifunza kutatua kazi za kuchagua mfululizo katika amri yenye uchunguzi. In contrast to previous easy-first decoders, our models are end-to-end differentiable.  Upunguzo huo unatupa habari za 'sketch' za utabiri juu ya mfululizo. Kwenye msingi wake ni mfumo wa kusikiliza ambao unadhibiti sehemu gani ya kituo hicho ni vizuri zaidi ya kuchukua hatua zifuatazo. Tunaweza kuleta mabadiliko mapya ya mafanikio yanayolazimika yanayohakikisha hisia moja kwa moja kwenye kila maneno, na kuonyesha jinsi ya kutathmini na kutangaza kwa ufanisi na kutangaza upiganaji. Mifano yetu inalinganisha vizuri na mabango ya BILSTM katika kazi tatu za mabango.", 'ca': "Introduïm un nou decodificador neural fàcil de primer cop que aprenen a resoldre tasques d'etiquetar seqüències en un ordre flexible. A diferència dels primers decoders fàcils anteriors, els nostres models són diferenciables de final a final. El decorador actualitza iterativament un esboç de les prediccions sobre la seqüència. Al seu nucli hi ha un mecanisme d'atenció que controla quines parts de la entrada són estratègicament les millors per processar a continuació. Presentam una nova transformació de softmax restringida que assegura la mateixa atenció acumulativa a cada paraula i mostra com valorar i reproduir-se eficientment sobre ella. Els nostres models es comparan favorablement amb els etiquetadors BILSTM en tres tasques d'etiquetage de seqüències.", 'bs': "Predstavljamo nov neuralni lakši prvi dekoder koji nauči da riješi sekvencu označavanja zadataka u fleksibilnom redu. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim lakom prvim dekoderima, naši modeli su drugačiji. Dekoder ponovno aktualizira 'skeč' predviđanja po sekvenci. Na njegovoj jezgri je mehanizam pažnje koji kontroliše koje dijelove ulaza su strategički najbolje za proces sljedećeg. Predstavljamo novu ograničenu softmax transformaciju koja osigurava istu kumulativnu pažnju na svaku riječ i pokazuje kako efektivno procjenjivati i proširiti nad njim. Naši modeli su dobrodošli u usporedbi sa BILSTM etiketerima na tri sekvence označavanja zadataka.", 'cs': 'Představujeme nový neuronový easy-first dekodér, který se naučí řešit sekvenční tagovací úlohy v flexibilním pořadí. Na rozdíl od předchozích easy-first dekodérů jsou naše modely komplexně diferencovatelné. Dekodér iterativně aktualizuje "náčrt" predikcí nad sekvencí. Jeho jádrem je mechanismus pozornosti, který řídí, které části vstupu jsou strategicky nejlepší pro další zpracování. Představujeme novou omezenou transformaci softmaxu, která zajišťuje stejnou kumulativní pozornost každému slovu a ukazuje, jak efektivně vyhodnocovat a zpětně propagovat. Naše modely se příznivě srovnávají s tagery BILSTM na třech sekvenčních tagovacích úlohách.', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր նյարդային պարզ-առաջին դիկոդերը, որը սովորում է ճկուն կարգով լուծել հաջորդականության նշանակման խնդիրները: Ի հակադրություն նախորդ հեշտ առաջին դեկոդերներին, մեր մոդելները վերջ-վերջ տարբերակելի են: The decoder iteratively updates a 'sketch' of the predictions over the sequence.  Դրա հիմքում ուշադրության մեխանիզմ է, որը վերահսկում է ներմուծի ո՞ր մասերը ռազմավարական առումով լավագույն են հաջորդ գործընթացի համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր սահմանափակ ծրագրային մշակույթ, որը ապահովում է նույն հավաքական ուշադրությունը յուրաքանչյուր բառի նկատմամբ և ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես արդյունավետ գնահատել և բազմապատկել այն: Մեր մոդելները բավականին համեմատում են Բիլսթմ նշանների հետ երեք հաջորդական նշանների վրա:", 'bn': "আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের নিউরেল প্রথম কোডার পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা একটি ফ্লিক্সিবল অর্ডারে সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং কাজ সমাধান করতে শিখেছ পূর্ববর্তী সহজ-প্রথম ডেকোডারের বিপরীতে, আমাদের মডেল শেষ পর্যন্ত পার্থক্য। ডেকোডার বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীভাবে সেকেন্ডের উপর ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর একটি 'স্কেচ' আপডেট করে। তার ভূমিতে একটি মনোযোগ মাধ্যম যা নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে যে ইনপুটের কোন অংশ পরের প্রক্রিয়ার সেরা কৌশলগত ভাবে পরিচালনা করার জন্ আমরা একটি নতুন নির্ধারিত সফটম্যাক্স পরিবর্তন উপস্থাপন করছি যা প্রত্যেক শব্দের প্রতি একই ধরনের উদ্দেশ্য নিশ্চিত করে এবং তা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে  আমাদের মডেল তিনটি সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং কাজে বিলস্টিএম ট্যাগারের সাথে তুলনা করেছে।", 'et': 'Tutvustame uuenduslikku neuraalset lihtsalt esmakordset dekoodrit, mis õpib lahendama järjestuse märgistamise ülesandeid paindlikus järjekorras. Erinevalt varasematest lihtsalt esmakordsetest dekoodritest on meie mudelid täielikult diferentseeritavad. Dekooder uuendab iteratiivselt prognooside sketchi järjestuse jooksul. Selle keskmes on tähelepanumehhanism, mis kontrollib, millised sisendi osad on strateegiliselt parimad järgmiseks töötlemiseks. Esitleme uut piiratud softmax transformatsiooni, mis tagab sama kumulatiivse tähelepanu igale sõnale ning näitab, kuidas seda tõhusalt hinnata ja tagasipropageerida. Meie mudelid võrdlevad soodsalt BILSTM sildistajatega kolme järjestuse sildistamise ülesannete puhul.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden neurodekooderin, joka oppii ratkaisemaan sekvenssimerkkausteht瓣v瓣t joustavassa j瓣rjestyksess瓣. Toisin kuin aikaisemmat easy-first-dekooderit, mallimme ovat p瓣瓣st瓣 p瓣瓣h瓣n erotettavissa. Dekooderi p瓣ivitt瓣瓣 iteratiivisesti "luonnoksen" ennusteista jakson aikana. Sen ytimess瓣 on huomiomekanismi, joka ohjaa, mitk瓣 osat panoksesta ovat strategisesti parhaita k瓣sitell瓣 seuraavaksi. Esittelemme uuden rajoitetun softmax-muunnoksen, joka varmistaa saman kumulatiivisen huomion jokaiselle sanalle ja n瓣ytt瓣瓣, miten sen yli voidaan tehokkaasti arvioida ja edet瓣. Mallimme vertailevat BILSTM-tagereihin edullisesti kolmessa j瓣rjestyksess瓣.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים פיקוד נוראי נוראי קל-ראשון שלמד לפתור משימות סימני רצף בסדר גמיש. בניגוד לפיתוחים הקודמים בקלות הראשונה, הדוגמנים שלנו ניתנים להבדיל בסופו של דבר. הקודר מעדכן באופן חוזר "סקיצ" של התחזויות על הרצף. בלכתו יש מנגנון תשומת לב ששולט באיזה חלקים מהכניסה הם באופן אסטרטגי הטובים ביותר לתהליך הבא. אנחנו מציגים שינוי מוגבל חדש של softmax שמבטיח את אותו תשומת לב קבוצה לכל מילה, ולהראות איך להעריך באופן יעיל ולהתרבות אחורה מעליו. הדוגמנים שלנו משוותים באופן חיובי למתגים BILSTM על שלושה משימות תוויות רצף.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani kodi na rayin neural na farkon mai sauƙi, wanda za'a sanar da yin solar aikin tagogi masu sakan da ke cikin tsarin lokaci. Tã motsa da kodi na farkon sauri, misalinmu sune-ƙari zuwa-ƙari. @ info: whatsthis Daga ƙarƙashinsa yana da wani mekanin muhimmanci wanda ke kanna cikin shirin ayukan su zama mafi kyãwon aiki na dabam. Tuna halatar da wata musanyi na buƙata matsayi wanda aka tsare ta, yana kasancewa masu bincike wa duk kalma, kuma za mu nuna yadda zai iya ƙaddara shi da kafici ko bayani. MisalinMu masu kamfani da mafiya alhẽri ga taggeri na BILSM cikin aikin tagogi uku ta sauki.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov nevronski enostaven dekoder, ki se nauči reševati naloge označevanja zaporedja v fleksibilnem vrstnem redu. V nasprotju s prejšnjimi enostavnimi sprejemniki so naši modeli različni od konca do konca. Dekodir iterativno posodablja "skico" napovedi v zaporedju. V jedru je mehanizem pozornosti, ki nadzoruje, kateri deli vnosa so strateško najboljši za obdelavo naslednjega. Predstavljamo novo omejeno softmax transformacijo, ki zagotavlja enako kumulativno pozornost vsaki besedi in pokaže, kako učinkovito oceniti in se vrniti. Naši modeli se ugodno primerjajo z označevalci BILSTM pri treh opravilih označevanja zaporedja.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé énjaring ing Noral sing paling nggawe layang-layang seneng pisan bangsane nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng pisan. Dijarang karo akeh decoder sing perusahaan, modelo sampeyan wis mulai-dumateng. Ngubah Bilih sampeyan ing pancene perusahaan nggawe nguasai sistem sing bisa nguasai ingkang sampeyan karo perusahaan sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi perusahaan anyar modellus', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་སྔ་སྒྲིག་ལྟ་བུའི་གོ་བ་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་ནི་དབུས་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་མེ ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་འདྲ་བ་དང་སྔོན་མོ་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་འགྱུར་བ་བཏུབ་པ་ཡིན། སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་མ་གླེང་གི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་བཞིན་འགྱུར་བ། At its core is an attention mechanism that controls which parts of the input are strategically the best to process next. ང་ཚོས་མ་ཚད ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞུང་གིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆོག་ཉིད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བ།'}
{'en': 'Incremental Skip-gram Model with Negative Sampling', 'ar': 'نموذج التخطي التزايدي مع أخذ العينات السلبية', 'pt': 'Modelo Incremental Skip-gram com Amostragem Negativa', 'fr': 'Modèle incrémentiel de saut de gramme avec échantillonnage négatif', 'es': 'Modelo de omisión incremental con muestreo negativo', 'zh': '有负采样增量跳过克模', 'hi': 'नकारात्मक नमूने के साथ वृद्धिशील छोड़ें-ग्राम मॉडल', 'ja': '負のサンプリングによるインクリメンタルスキップグラムモデル', 'ru': 'Инкрементальная модель пропуска с отрицательной выборкой', 'ga': 'Múnla Incriminteach Skip-gram le Sampláil Diúltach', 'ka': 'განსაკუთრებული გადატანა- გრამის მოდელი, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Inkrementális kilépő grammos modell negatív mintavétellel', 'el': 'Προσωρινό μοντέλο Skip-gram με αρνητική δειγματοληψία', 'it': 'Modello incrementale skip-gram con campionamento negativo', 'kk': 'Негізгі түрлендіру үлгісі', 'lt': 'Incremental Skip- gram modelis su neigiamu mėginių ėmimu', 'mk': 'Модел на екстрементално прескокнување со негативно примерок', 'ms': 'Model Gram-Langkah Incremental dengan Sampel Negatif', 'ml': 'നെഗറ്റീവ് മാമ്പിളിങ്ങുമായി കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുക- ഗ്രാമ് മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudell Incremental Skip-gram b’Kampjunar Negattiv', 'mn': 'Харамсалтай хэлбэрээр нэмэгдүүлэх арга грамм загвар', 'no': 'Inkremental hopp- gram- modell med negativt samling', 'ro': 'Model incremental Skip-gram cu eșantionare negativă', 'pl': 'Przyrostowy model pomijania gramów z ujemnym pobieraniem próbek', 'sr': 'Uveæajni model skip-grama sa negativnim uzorcima', 'si': 'අක්\u200dරීය සැම්ප්ලින් එක්ක විශේෂ ස්ක්\u200dරාම් මොඩේල්', 'so': 'Tusaale diiwaangelinta', 'sv': 'Inkrementell hoppa-gram modell med negativ provtagning', 'ta': 'எதிர்மறையான மாதிரி', 'ur': 'منفی نمپلینگ کے ساتھ بڑھنے والی اسکیپ-گرم موڈل', 'uz': 'Koت»rib chiqish usuli', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Incremental Skip-gram model met negatieve monsterneming', 'da': 'Inkrement spring-gram model med negativ prøveudtagning', 'hr': 'Povećavajući model preskočenja s negativnim uzorakom', 'de': 'Inkrementelles Skip-Gramm-Modell mit negativer Sampling', 'bg': 'Модел на увеличение на пропускането на грама с отрицателно вземане на проби', 'id': 'Model Incremental Skip-gram dengan Sampel Negatif', 'sw': 'Kiongezeko cha Mradi wa Skip-gram ukiwa na Mfano Negative', 'ko': '마이너스 샘플링의 증량 Skip-gram 모형', 'tr': 'Keçmiş Samatlama Mody', 'fa': 'مدل پرتاب گرم افزایش با نمونه\u200cهای منفی', 'af': 'Incremental Spring- gram Model met Negatiewe Sampling', 'sq': 'Modeli Incremental Skip-gram me Zgjidhje Negative', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Մոդել', 'az': 'N칬vb톛ti n칲mun톛l톛ri il톛 칞ox art캼ql캼q Skip-gram Modeli', 'bn': 'নেগেটিভ নম্পলিং সহ বেশী স্কিপ- গ্রাম মডেল', 'bs': 'Povećajni model skip-grama sa negativnim uzorkom', 'ca': 'Model Incremental Skip-gram amb Sampling Negative', 'cs': 'Inkrementální přeskočený model s negativním odběrem vzorků', 'et': 'Negatiivse proovivõtmisega järkjärguline vahepealne mudel', 'fi': 'Incremental Skip-gramm Model with Negative Sampling', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'דוגמא מעלית-גרם נוספת עם דגימה שלילית', 'sk': 'Model postopnega preskoka gramov z negativnim vzorčenjem', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚད་མེད་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བ་མཚོན་རྟགས'}
{'en': 'This paper explores an incremental training strategy for the skip-gram model with negative sampling (SGNS) from both empirical and theoretical perspectives. Existing methods of neural word embeddings, including SGNS, are multi-pass algorithms and thus can not perform incremental model update. To address this problem, we present a simple incremental extension of SGNS and provide a thorough theoretical analysis to demonstrate its validity. Empirical experiments demonstrated the correctness of the theoretical analysis as well as the practical usefulness of the incremental algorithm.', 'ar': 'تستكشف هذه الورقة استراتيجية التدريب الإضافية لنموذج تخطي الجرام مع أخذ العينات السلبية (SGNS) من كل من المنظورين التجريبي والنظري. الطرق الحالية لتضمين الكلمات العصبية ، بما في ذلك SGNS ، هي خوارزميات متعددة التمريرات وبالتالي لا يمكنها إجراء تحديث تدريجي للنموذج. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقدم امتدادًا تدريجيًا بسيطًا لـ SGNS ونقدم تحليلًا نظريًا شاملاً لإثبات صحتها. أظهرت التجارب التجريبية صحة التحليل النظري وكذلك الفائدة العملية للخوارزمية الإضافية.', 'es': 'Este artículo explora una estrategia de entrenamiento incremental para el modelo de omisión de gramas con muestreo negativo (SGNS) desde una perspectiva empírica y teórica. Los métodos existentes de incrustación de palabras neuronales, incluido SGNS, son algoritmos de múltiples pasadas y, por lo tanto, no pueden realizar actualizaciones incrementales del modelo Para abordar este problema, presentamos una simple extensión incremental del SGNS y proporcionamos un análisis teórico exhaustivo para demostrar su validez. Los experimentos empíricos demostraron la exactitud del análisis teórico, así como la utilidad práctica del algoritmo incremental.', 'fr': "Cet article explore une stratégie de formation incrémentielle pour le modèle skip-gram avec échantillonnage négatif (SGNS) à la fois d'un point de vue empirique et théorique. Les méthodes existantes d'intégration de mots neuronaux, y compris SGNS, sont des algorithmes multipasses et ne peuvent donc pas effectuer de mise à jour incrémentielle du modèle. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous présentons une simple extension incrémentielle de SGNS et fournissons une analyse théorique approfondie pour démontrer sa validité. Des expériences empiriques ont démontré l'exactitude de l'analyse théorique ainsi que l'utilité pratique de l'algorithme incrémental.", 'pt': 'Este artigo explora uma estratégia de treinamento incremental para o modelo skip-gram com amostragem negativa (SGNS) tanto do ponto de vista empírico quanto teórico. Os métodos existentes de incorporação de palavras neurais, incluindo SGNS, são algoritmos de várias passagens e, portanto, não podem realizar atualização incremental do modelo. Para resolver esse problema, apresentamos uma extensão incremental simples do SGNS e fornecemos uma análise teórica completa para demonstrar sua validade. Experimentos empíricos demonstraram a correção da análise teórica, bem como a utilidade prática do algoritmo incremental.', 'ja': '本論文では，経験的観点と理論的観点の両方から，ネガティブサンプリング（ SGNS ）を伴うスキップグラムモデルのための増分トレーニング戦略を探求する． SGNSを含むニューラルワード埋め込みの既存の方法は、マルチパスアルゴリズムであるため、増分モデル更新を実行できません。この問題に対処するために、SGNSの単純な増分拡張を提示し、その妥当性を実証するための徹底的な理論分析を提供します。実証実験は、理論的分析の正しさと、増分アルゴリズムの実用的有用性を示した。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе изучается стратегия постепенного обучения для модели пропуска с отрицательной выборкой (SGNS) как с эмпирической, так и с теоретической точек зрения. Существующие методы вложений нейронных слов, включая SGNS, являются многопроходными алгоритмами и, таким образом, не могут выполнять инкрементное обновление модели. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы представляем простое постепенное расширение SGNS и предоставляем тщательный теоретический анализ, чтобы продемонстрировать его обоснованность. Эмпирические эксперименты продемонстрировали правильность теоретического анализа, а также практическую полезность инкрементного алгоритма.', 'zh': '本文于经验及论角探负抽样(SGNS)跳过革兰模形增量训练之策。 今神经词嵌法(SGNS)为多通道算法,故不得行增量模样更新。 为此者,举SGNS之简增量广之,而备其论以效其有效性。 实验验正确性、增量算法之实实用性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अनुभवजन्य और सैद्धांतिक दोनों दृष्टिकोणों से नकारात्मक नमूनाकरण (एसजीएनएस) के साथ स्किप-ग्राम मॉडल के लिए एक वृद्धिशील प्रशिक्षण रणनीति की पड़ताल करता है। SGNS सहित तंत्रिका शब्द एम्बेडिंग के मौजूदा तरीके, बहु-पास एल्गोरिदम हैं और इस प्रकार वृद्धिशील मॉडल अपडेट नहीं कर सकते हैं। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम एसजीएनएस का एक सरल वृद्धिशील विस्तार प्रस्तुत करते हैं और इसकी वैधता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए एक संपूर्ण सैद्धांतिक विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं। अनुभवजन्य प्रयोगों ने सैद्धांतिक विश्लेषण की शुद्धता के साथ-साथ वृद्धिशील एल्गोरिथ्म की व्यावहारिक उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन किया।', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo straitéis oiliúna incriminteach don tsamhail scip-gram le sampláil diúltach (SGNS) ó pheirspictíochtaí eimpíreacha agus teoiriciúla araon. Is halgartaim ilphas iad na modhanna atá ann faoi láthair le haghaidh neadú focal néarach, lena n-áirítear SGNS, agus mar sin ní féidir leo nuashonrú incriminteach ar an tsamhail a dhéanamh. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo, cuirimid síneadh incriminteach simplí ar SGNS i láthair agus cuirimid anailís theoiriciúil críochnúil ar fáil chun a bhailíocht a léiriú. Léirigh turgnaimh eimpíreacha cruinneas na hanailíse teoiriciúla chomh maith le húsáid phraiticiúil an algartam incrimintigh.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά μια σταδιακή στρατηγική κατάρτισης για το μοντέλο με αρνητική δειγματοληψία (SGNS) τόσο από εμπειρικές όσο και από θεωρητικές προοπτικές. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι ενσωμάτωσης νευρωνικών λέξεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένου του SGNS, είναι αλγόριθμοι πολλαπλών περασμάτων και ως εκ τούτου δεν μπορούν να εκτελέσουν την αυξανόμενη ενημέρωση του μοντέλου. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή σταδιακή επέκταση του και παρέχουμε μια εμπεριστατωμένη θεωρητική ανάλυση για να καταδείξουμε την εγκυρότητά του. Εμπειρικά πειράματα κατέδειξαν την ορθότητα της θεωρητικής ανάλυσης καθώς και την πρακτική χρησιμότητα του αυξητικού αλγόριθμου.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy inkrementális tréning stratégiát vizsgál a skip-gram modell negatív mintavétellel (SGNS) mind empirikus, mind elméleti szempontból. Az idegi szó beágyazásának már meglévő módszerei, beleértve az SGNS-t is, több áthaladó algoritmusok, így nem képesek inkrementális modellfrissítést végrehajtani. A probléma megoldásához bemutatjuk az SGNS egyszerű fokozatos kiterjesztését, és alapos elméleti elemzést nyújtunk annak érvényességére. Empirikus kísérletek bizonyították az elméleti elemzés helyességét, valamint az inkrementális algoritmus gyakorlati hasznosságát.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს ინტერემენტური განსხვავების სტრატიგიას, რომელიც გადაწყვეტის მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული გამოყენება (SGNS) იმპერიკური და ტე მიმდინარე ნეიროლის სიტყვების შემდეგ SGNS-ის მიმდინარე ალგორიტიმები არიან და ამიტომ არ შეუძლებელია კრემონტემალური მოდელის აუდილება. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ SGNS-ის განმავლობაში ერთადერთი ინქმენტემალური განმავლობა და გავაკეთებთ უფრო თეორეტიული ანალიზი, რომელიც მისი წარმოდგ ემპერიკური ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენეთ ტეორეტიული ანალიზის მარტივის და კრემონტემალური ალგორიტიმს პრაქტიკური გამოყენება.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз импирикалық және теоретикалық қарақтардан екеуінен негативті түрлендіру (SGNS) үлгісін өткізу үшін көптеген оқыту стратегиясын зерттейді. SGNS және невралдық сөздерді ендіру әдістері бірнеше жұмыс алгоритмдер болып, сондықтан көптеген үлгілерді жаңарту мүмкін емес. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін біз SGNS жұмысының қарапайым кеңейтуін келтіреміз және оның дұрыстығын көрсету үшін теоретикалық анализ береміз. Эмпериялық тәжірибелер теоретикалық анализ дұрыстығын, және көптеген алгоритмдің практикалық пайдалығын көрсетті.', 'it': "Questo articolo esplora una strategia di formazione incrementale per il modello skip-gram con campionamento negativo (SGNS) sia da una prospettiva empirica che teorica. I metodi esistenti di incorporazione di parole neurali, incluso SGNS, sono algoritmi multi-pass e quindi non possono eseguire l'aggiornamento incrementale del modello. Per affrontare questo problema, presentiamo una semplice estensione incrementale di SGNS e forniamo un'analisi teorica approfondita per dimostrare la sua validità. Esperimenti empirici hanno dimostrato la correttezza dell'analisi teorica e l'utilità pratica dell'algoritmo incrementale.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama papildomo mokymo strategija, skirta „skip-gram“ modeliui su neigiamu mėginių ėmimu empiriniu ir teoriniu požiūriu. Esami nervinių žodžių įterpimo metodai, įskaitant SGNS, yra daugiapakopiai algoritmai, todėl negali atlikti papildomo modelio atnaujinimo. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, mes pateikiame paprastą laipsnišką SGNS išplėtimą ir išsamią teorinę analizę, kad įrodytume jos pagrįstumą. Imperiniai eksperimentai parodė teorinės analizės tikslumą ir papildomo algoritmo praktinį naudą.', 'mk': 'Овој документ истражува екстрементална стратегија за обука за моделот skip-gram со негативно примерување (SGNS) од емпирички и теоретски перспективи. Постојаните методи на внесување на нервни зборови, вклучително и SGNS, се мултипасни алгоритми и така не можат да извршат инекстрементално моделно ажурирање. За да го решиме овој проблем, претставуваме едноставно дополнително продолжување на СГНС и обезбедуваме теоретска анализа за да ја демонстрираме неговата валидност. Империските експерименти ја покажаа точноста на теоретската анализа како и практичната корисност на екстременталниот алгоритм.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നേരിവ് മാതൃകയുമായി ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ഗ്രാമിന്റെ പരിശീലനത്തിനുള്ള ഗ്രാമ്പോള്\u200dട്ടിജ് പര ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d എസ്ജിന്\u200dസ് ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പല- പാസ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മാകളാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട് മ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എസ്ജിന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ എളുപ്പമുള്ള വികസിപ്പിയ്ക്കുന്നു. അതിന്\u200dറെ വിശ്വാ എമിരിക്കല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d തിയോറിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണത്തിന്റെ ശരിയാണെന്നും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi strategi latihan tambahan untuk model skip-gram dengan sampel negatif (SGNS) dari perspektif empirik dan teori. Kaedah penyembedding perkataan saraf yang wujud, termasuk SGNS, adalah algoritma multi-pass dan oleh itu tidak dapat melakukan kemaskini model tambahan. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami memperkenalkan sambungan tambahan sederhana SGNS dan menyediakan analisis teori yang mendalam untuk menunjukkan kehendaknya. Eksperimen empirik menunjukkan kebaikan analisis teori serta kebaikan praktik algoritma tambahan.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jesplora strateġija inkrementali ta’ taħriġ għall-mudell skip-gram b’teħid ta’ kampjuni negattiv (SGNS) kemm minn perspettivi empiriċi kif ukoll teoretiċi. Existing methods of neural word embeddings, including SGNS, are multi-pass algorithms and thus cannot perform incremental model update.  Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a, nippreżentaw estensjoni inkrementali sempliċi tal-SGNS u nipprovdu analiżi teoretika bir-reqqa biex nippruvaw il-validità tagħha. L-esperimenti empiriċi wrew il-korrettezza tal-analiżi teoretika kif ukoll l-utilità prattika tal-algoritmu inkrementali.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь эмперикийн болон теоретикийн үзэл хоёулаас сөрөг хэлбэрээр дасгал хөдөлгөөний стратегийг судалдаг. СGNS-ээс холбогдож байгаа мэдрэлийн үгний нэвтрүүлэх арга нь олон дахь алгоритмын алгоритмын арга юм. Иймээс нэмэлт загварын шинэчлэл хийж чадахгүй. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид SGNS-ийн энгийн нэмэлт нэмэлт шинжилгээг тайлбарлаж, үнэ цэнэтэй теоретикийн шинжилгээг гаргаж өгдөг. Эзэмшигийн туршилтууд теоретикийн шинжилгээний зөв байдлыг, нэмэлт алгоритмын практикийн хэрэглээ харуулсан.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł bada przyrostową strategię szkoleniową dla modelu skip-gram z ujemnym próbkowaniem (SGNS) zarówno z perspektywy empirycznej, jak i teoretycznej. Istniejące metody osadzania słów neuronowych, w tym SGNS, są algorytmami wielopłaszczowymi i tym samym nie mogą przeprowadzać przyrostowej aktualizacji modelu. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, przedstawiamy proste przyrostowe rozszerzenie SGNS i przedstawiamy gruntowną analizę teoretyczną w celu wykazania jego ważności. Eksperymenty empiryczne wykazały poprawność analizy teoretycznej oraz praktyczną przydatność algorytmu przyrostowego.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare explorează o strategie de instruire incrementală pentru modelul skip-gram cu eșantionare negativă (SGNS) atât din perspective empirice, cât și teoretice. Metodele existente de încorporare a cuvintelor neurale, inclusiv SGNS, sunt algoritmi multi-trecere și, prin urmare, nu pot efectua actualizarea incrementală a modelului. Pentru a aborda această problemă, prezentăm o simplă extensie incrementală a SGNS și oferim o analiză teoretică amănunțită pentru a demonstra validitatea acesteia. Experimentele empirice au demonstrat corectitudinea analizei teoretice, precum și utilitatea practică a algoritmului incremental.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje povećanu strategiju obuke za model skip-grama sa negativnim uzorcima (SGNS) iz empiričkih i teorijskih perspektiva. Postoje metode integracije neuralnih riječi, uključujući SGNS, su multi-pass algoritmi i tako ne mogu izvršiti incrementalnu aktualizaciju modela. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predstavljamo jednostavnu incrementalnu produženost SGNS-a i pružimo temeljnu teorijsku analizu kako bi pokazali njegovu validnost. Empirički eksperimenti su pokazali ispravnost teorijske analize, kao i praktičnu korisnost povećanog algoritma.', 'no': 'Denne papiret utforskar eit inkrementalt treningsstrategi for omslagsmodellen med negativt prøve (SGNS) frå både empiriske og teoretiske perspektiv. Existende metodar for innbygging av nøyralord, inkludert SGNS, er fleirpass algoritme, og derfor kan ikkje utføra oppdatering av økonomiske modell. For å setja opp dette problemet, presenterer vi eit enkelt inkremental utviding av SGNS og gjer ein dørsleg teoretisk analyse for å demonstrare verdien. Empiriske eksperimenter demonstrerte korrektet av teoretiske analysen, og praktiske nyttighet av økonomisk algoritme.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අවශ්\u200dයය සහ සාධාරණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා අවශ්\u200dයය සැම් ඉතින් ඉතින් න්\u200dයුරාල් වචන සම්බන්ධ විධානය, SGnS වලින්, බොහොම පාස් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉතින් ඉත මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි SGnS ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශාල විස්තරයක් පෙන්වන්න, ඒ වගේ විශේෂතාවක් පෙන්වන්න සම්ප අධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරදේශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ සාධාර්ථික විශ්ලේෂණය සහ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක අල්ගෝරිතම් ගැන ප්\u200dර', 'so': "This paper explores an incremental training strategy for the skip-gram model with negative sampling (SGNS) from both empirical and theoretical perspectives.  Qoraalka neurada ah ee ku qoran, including SGNS, waa algorithm badan oo kala duduwan, sidaas darteed ma sameyn karo qaab cusboonaysiiya. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa SGNS kordhiska fudud oo fudud, waxaana sameynaa baaritaanka theoretical si aan u muujinno xaqnimadiisa. Imtixaanka jimicsiga ah waxay muujiyaan saxda baaritaanka theoretical iyo faa'iidada caadiga ah ee algorithiga kordhinta.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker en inkrementell träningsstrategi för skip-grammomodellen med negativ sampling (SGNS) ur både empiriska och teoretiska perspektiv. Befintliga metoder för neurala ordinbäddningar, inklusive SGNS, är multi-pass algoritmer och kan därför inte utföra inkrementell modelluppdatering. För att lösa detta problem presenterar vi en enkel inkrementell förlängning av SGNS och ger en grundlig teoretisk analys för att visa dess giltighet. Empiriska experiment visade riktigheten i den teoretiska analysen samt den praktiska användbarheten av den inkrementella algoritmen.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தேவையான மற்றும் தொடர்ந்த காட்சிகளிலிருந்து SGNS சேர்ந்து இருக்கும் புதிய வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் முறைகளின் இருக்கை இந்த பிரச்சனையை விரிவாக்க, எளிதான எஸ்ஜின்ஸின் விரிவாக்கத்தை நாம் கொண்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் அதன் செல்லுபடியை காட்ட வெற்றிகரமான சோதனைகள் தியூரியல் ஆராய்ச்சியின் சரியாக மற்றும் அதிகரிப்பு ஆராய்ச்சி பயன்பாடுகளை காண்பித்தது.', 'ur': 'This paper explores an incremental training strategy for the skip-gram model with negative sampling (SGNS) from both empirical and theoretical perspectives. اسگنس کے شامل نئورل کلمات کے مطابق موجود طریقے ہیں، multi pass الگوریتم ہیں اور اس طرح اضافہ نمڈل اڈڈیٹ نہیں کر سکتے۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم SGNS کی ایک ساده اضافہ کریں گے اور اس کی طاقت دکھانے کے لئے ایک عمدہ تئوریٹی تحلیل دے رہے ہیں۔ امپراتیک تجربے نے نظریات کی تحلیل کی سیدھی تعریف کی اور اضافہ الگوریتم کی عمدھی فائدہ دکھائی۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz muvaffaqiyatli va teoretikal koʻrinishining ikkinchi nazar misol bilan bog'liq gram modelini aniqlaydi. Name Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun, biz SGNS kengaytmasi oddiy kengaytmalarini hozir qilamiz va uning haqiqiqiyligini koʻrsatish uchun juda muhimiy teoretikal analytika beramiz. Empirik tajribalari teoretikal analytiki haqida va ajoyib algoritning foydalanishini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu một chiến lược đào tạo tăng cường cho mô hình nhảy tín ngưỡng với mẫu âm bản (SGNS) từ cả triển vọng kinh tế lẫn lí thuyết. Các phương pháp tồn tại của sự nhúng vào từ thần kinh, kể cả SGNS, là thuật toán nhiều vượt và không thể thực hiện cập nhật mô hình số. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi chỉ đưa ra một sự mở rộng dần đơn giản của SGNS và cung cấp một phân tích lý thuyết tỉ mỉ để chứng minh nó có giá trị. Các thí nghiệm thực tế đã chứng minh sự đúng của phân tích lý thuyết cũng như sự hữu dụng thực tế của thuật toán số dần.', 'da': 'Denne artikel undersøger en inkrementel træningsstrategi for skip-gram modellen med negativ sampling (SGNS) fra både empiriske og teoretiske perspektiver. Eksisterende metoder til neurale ordindlejringer, herunder SGNS, er multi-pass algoritmer og kan derfor ikke udføre inkrementel modelopdatering. For at løse dette problem præsenterer vi en simpel inkrementel udvidelse af SGNS og giver en grundig teoretisk analyse for at demonstrere dens gyldighed. Empiriske eksperimenter viste korrektheden af den teoretiske analyse samt den praktiske nytte af den inkrementelle algoritme.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel onderzoekt een incrementele trainingsstrategie voor het skip-gram model met negatieve sampling (SGNS) vanuit zowel empirisch als theoretisch perspectief. Bestaande methoden voor neurale woord embeddings, waaronder SGNS, zijn multi-pass algoritmes en kunnen dus geen incrementele model update uitvoeren. Om dit probleem aan te pakken presenteren we een eenvoudige incrementele uitbreiding van SGNS en geven we een grondige theoretische analyse om de validiteit ervan aan te tonen. Empirische experimenten toonden de juistheid van de theoretische analyse en het praktische nut van het incrementele algoritme aan.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва стратегия за постепенно обучение на модела с отрицателна извадка (СГНС) както от емпирична, така и от теоретична гледна точка. Съществуващите методи за вграждане на невронни думи, включително SGNS, са многопропускови алгоритми и следователно не могат да извършват постепенно актуализиране на модела. За да се справим с този проблем, представяме просто постепенно разширение на СГНС и предоставяме задълбочен теоретичен анализ, за да докажем неговата валидност. Емпирични експерименти демонстрират коректността на теоретичния анализ, както и практическата полезност на инвентарния алгоритъм.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir istražuje povećanu strategiju obuke za model skip-grama s negativnim uzorcima uzorka (SGNS) iz empiričkih i teorijskih perspektiva. Postoje metode uključenja neuroloških riječi, uključujući SGNS, su višeprolazni algoritmi i tako ne mogu izvršiti dodatne aktualizacije modela. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predstavljamo jednostavnu incrementalnu produženost SGNS-a i pružimo temeljnu teorijsku analizu kako bi pokazali njegovu validnost. Empirički eksperimenti pokazali su ispravnost teorijske analize, kao i praktičnu korisnost povećanog algoritma.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag untersucht eine inkrementelle Trainingsstrategie für das Skip-Gramm-Modell mit negativer Stichprobe (SGNS) aus empirischer und theoretischer Perspektive. Bestehende Methoden der neuronalen Worteinbettung, einschließlich SGNS, sind Mehrpass-Algorithmen und können daher keine inkrementellen Modellaktualisierungen durchführen. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, stellen wir eine einfache inkrementelle Erweiterung von SGNS vor und liefern eine gründliche theoretische Analyse, um seine Gültigkeit zu demonstrieren. Empirische Experimente zeigten die Richtigkeit der theoretischen Analyse sowie den praktischen Nutzen des inkrementalen Algorithmus.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi strategi latihan incremental untuk model skip-gram dengan sampel negatif (SGNS) dari perspektif empirik dan teori. Metode penyembedding kata saraf yang ada, termasuk SGNS, adalah algoritma multi-pass dan oleh itu tidak dapat melakukan pemutakhiran model incremental. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mempersembahkan ekstensi incremental sederhana dari SGNS dan menyediakan analisis teori yang mendalam untuk menunjukkan validitasnya. Eksperimen kerajaan menunjukkan kebenaran dari analisis teori serta kebaikan praktis dari algoritma incremental.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linagundua mkakati wa mafunzo kwa ajili ya modeli ya gram yenye sampuli hasi (SGNS) kutoka kwa mitazamo ya kihisia na kiutamaduni. Utawala wa maneno ya neura, ikiwa ni pamoja na SGNS, ni algorithi za kupitia njia nyingi na kwa hiyo hauwezi kufanya mifano ya upya. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, tunaweka maendeleo rahisi ya SGNS na kutoa uchambuzi wa kina wa kidini ili kuonyesha ukweli wake. Majaribio ya kipekee yalionyesha ukweli wa uchambuzi wa nadharia pamoja na matumizi ya uhalisia ya utaalgorithi unaoendelea.', 'ko': '본고는 실증과 이론 양 측면에서 마이너스 표본을 가진 skip-gram모델(SGNS)의 증량 훈련 전략을 연구했다.기존의 신경 단어 삽입 방법은 SGN을 포함해 다중 채널 알고리즘이기 때문에 증량 모델 업데이트를 실행할 수 없다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 간단한 SGNS 증량 확장을 제기하고 그 유효성을 증명하기 위해 깊이 있는 이론 분석을 진행했다.실증 실험은 이론 분석의 정확성과 증량 알고리즘의 실용성을 증명했다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz empirik we teoriýaly gözlerden hem atlamak nusgasy bilen ýüze çykmak üçin azalmak üçin bir eğitim stratejisini keşfetýär. SGNS'iň içinde bar näyral söz eklenen yöntemleri, köp-geçiş algoritmalardyr we şonuň üçin artymal modelleri üýtgedip bilmeýär. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, GNS'iň basit bir ýeterlik ýuwaşyrlygyny görkezip we özüniň dogrylygyny görkezmek üçin detalyk teoriýa analizi bererik. Impirik deneyler teoriýaly analýşiniň dogrylygyny we günahlat algoritmynyň praktik ulanylygyny görkezildi.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک استراتژی آموزش افزایش برای مدل رد گرم با نمونه\u200cهای منفی (SGNS) از نقشه\u200cهای امپراتیک و نظریه\u200cی نظریه تحقیق می\u200cکند. روش\u200cهای موجود وجود دارند از جمله\u200cی SGNS، الگوریتم\u200cهای متعدد گذر هستند و بنابراین نمی\u200cتوانند مدل افزایش را انجام دهند. برای حل این مشکل، ما یک گسترش بسیار ساده از SGNS را نشان می دهیم و یک تحلیل نظریه کامل برای نشان دادن قابلیت آن را پیشنهاد می دهیم. آزمایشات امپراتیک دقیق تحلیل نظریه و استفاده عملی الگوریتم افزایش را نشان دادند.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ከኢትዮጵያዊ እና የtheoretical ምሳሌ የሳፋው-ግራም ምሳሌ (SGNS) የሚያስፈልገውን ትምህርት ይፈልጋል፡፡ የአሁኑን የነጥብ ቃላት አቀማመጥ፣ SGNS የተጨማሪው የፊደል ቅርጽ አቋራጭ ናቸው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል ቀላል የSGNS ስፋት ማውጣትን እናሳውቃለን እና እውነተኛውን ለማሳየት የtheoretical analysis እናደርጋለን፡፡ የኢሜሪካ ፈተናዎች የtheoretical Analysis አቅኑን እና የግንኙነት የአልጎሪትምን ጥቅም የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է ավելացրական ուսումնասիրության ռազմավարությունը բացասական նմուշներ վերցնելու (ՍԳՆՍ) մոդելի համար, ինչպես էմպիրիկական, ինչպես նաև տեսական տեսանկյունից: Նյարդային բառերի ներգրավման գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները, ներառյալ ՍԳՆՍ-ը, բազմահատվածային ալգորիթմներ են, և այսպես չեն կարող կատարել աճող մոդելի վերականգնումներ: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՍԳՆՍ-ի պարզ ավելացման և ապահովում ենք հիմնական տեսական վերլուծություն, որպեսզի ապացուցենք դրա ճշմարտությունը: Իմպրիկական փորձերը ցույց տվեցին տեսական վերլուծության ճշմարտությունը, ինչպես նաև աճող ալգորիթմի գործնական օգտակարությունը:', 'az': "Bu kağıt empirik və teoretik perspektivlərdən negatif nümunələrlə atlama modeli üçün artıqlıq təhsil stratejisini keşif edir. SGNS dahil olan nöral sözlərin içərisində olan metodlar çoxlu-pass algoritmi və buna görə artımlı modelləri güncelleştirə bilmir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, SGNS'nin basit artırma uzantısını göstərdik və onun valideyliğini göstərmək üçün tamamilə teorik analizi təmin edirik. Empirical experiments demonstrated the correct analysis of the theoretical analysis as well as the practical utility of the incremental algorithm.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument eksploron një strategji shtesë trainimi për modelin skip-gram me kampionat negative (SGNS) si nga perspektivat empirike ashtu edhe teorike. Metodat ekzistuese të përfshirjes së fjalëve nervore, duke përfshirë SGNS, janë algoritme me shumë kalime dhe kështu nuk mund të kryejnë përditësim shtesë të modelit. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne paraqesim një zgjerim shtesë të thjeshtë të SGNS dhe ofrojmë një analizë teorike të thelbshme për të demonstruar vlerësinë e saj. Eksperimentet perandore treguan saktësinë e analizës teorike si dhe dobësinë praktike të algoritmit shtesë.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সাম্রাজ্যিক এবং তত্ত্বিক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে জাহাজ-গ্রাম মডেলের জন্য একটি প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল ব্যবহার করেছে। এসজিন্স সহ নিউরেল শব্দের বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি হচ্ছে বহুপাস অ্যালগরিদম এবং তাই অগ্রগতির মডেল আপডেট করতে পারে না। To address this problem, we present a simple incremental extension of SGNS and provide a thorough theoretical analysis to demonstrate its validity.  সামাজিক পরীক্ষাগুলো ততিত্ব বিশ্লেষণের সঠিকভাবে প্রদর্শন করেছে এবং এগুলোর বাস্তবতা অ্যালগরিদমের বাস্তবতা প্রকাশ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir istražuje povećanu strategiju obuke za model skip-grama sa negativnim uzorcima uzorka (SGNS) iz empiričkih i teorijskih perspektiva. Postoje metode uključenja neuroloških riječi, uključujući SGNS, su multi-pass algoritmi i tako ne mogu izvršiti incrementalnu aktualizaciju modela. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predstavljamo jednostavnu incrementalnu produženost SGNS-a i pružimo temeljnu teorijsku analizu kako bi pokazali njegovu validnost. Empirički eksperimenti su pokazali ispravnost teorijske analize, kao i praktičnu korisnost povećanog algoritma.', 'af': "Hierdie papier ondersoek 'n inkremensiele onderwerking strategie vir die skip-gram model met negatiewe versameling (SGNS) van beide empiriese en teorieese perspeksies. Bestaande metodes van neurale woord inbêding, insluitend SGNS, is multi-pass algoritme, en dus kan nie inkremental model opdateer uitvoer nie. Om hierdie probleem te adres, laat ons 'n eenvoudige inkrementeel uitbreiding van SGNS voorsien en verskaf 'n groot teorieese analisie om sy geldigheid te wys. Enpiriese eksperimente het die korrekheid van die teorieese analisie en die praktiese gebruikerheid van die inkremensiele algoritme vertoon.", 'ca': "Aquest paper explora una estratègia de formació incremental per al model skip-gram amb mostratge negatiu (SGNS) de perspectives tant empíriques com teòriques. Els mètodes existents d'incorporació de paraules neuronals, incloent SGNS, són algoritmes multi-pass i així no poden fer actualització incremental del model. Per abordar aquest problem a, presentem una extensió incremental senzilla de SGNS i proporcionem una anàlisi teòrica detallada per demostrar la seva validez. Els experiments empírics van demostrar la correctesa de l'anàlisi teòrica i l'utilitat pràctica del algoritme incremental.", 'cs': 'Tento článek zkoumá inkrementální tréninkovou strategii pro skip-gram model s negativním vzorkováním (SGNS) z empirického i teoretického hlediska. Stávající metody vložení neuronových slov, včetně SGNS, jsou víceprůchodové algoritmy, a proto nemohou provádět inkrementální aktualizaci modelu. Pro řešení tohoto problému představujeme jednoduché inkrementální rozšíření SGNS a poskytneme důkladnou teoretickou analýzu k prokázání jeho platnosti. Empirické experimenty prokázaly správnost teoretické analýzy a praktickou užitečnost inkrementálního algoritmu.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö uurib negatiivse proovivõtuga (SGNS) skip-grammi mudeli täiendavat koolitusstrateegiat nii empiirilisest kui teoreetilisest vaatenurgast. Olemasolevad närvisõnade manustamise meetodid, sealhulgas SGNS, on mitmekäigulised algoritmid ja seega ei saa nad täiendavalt mudeli uuendada. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks esitame SGNSi lihtsa täiendava laienduse ja esitame põhjaliku teoreetilise analüüsi selle kehtivuse tõestamiseks. Empiirilised eksperimendid näitasid teoreetilise analüüsi õigsust ja sammuva algoritmi praktilist kasulikkust.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan skip-gram-malliin perustuvaa jatkokoulutusstrategiaa negatiivisella näytteenotolla (SGNS) sekä empiirisestä että teoreettisesta näkökulmasta. Olemassa olevat neurosanaupotusmenetelmät, mukaan lukien SGNS, ovat monikulkualgoritmeja, joten ne eivät pysty suorittamaan mallipäivitystä. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi esitämme yksinkertaisen lisäosan SGNS:stä ja teemme perusteellisen teoreettisen analyysin sen pätevyyden osoittamiseksi. Empiiriset kokeet osoittivat teoreettisen analyysin oikeellisuuden sekä inkrementaalisen algoritmin käytännöllisyyden.', 'jv': 'Name text-editor-action kanggo nganggo perbudhakan iki, kita ngomong sampeyan luwih akeh dumadhi kanggo nggawe NGNS lan nganggo perusahaan theoretik sing dumadhi kanggo ngomongke jewis ana. Wang arno empir sing bisalahan ngomongke bon akeh pancen theoretik lan nguasai njaluk praksik lan alagorim sing ngendalikno.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je raziskana strategija postopnega usposabljanja za model skip-gram z negativnim vzorčenjem (SGNS) iz empiričnega in teoretičnega vidika. Obstoječe metode vgradnje nevronskih besed, vključno s SGNS, so večprehodni algoritmi in zato ne morejo izvajati postopne posodobitve modela. Za reševanje tega problema predstavljamo preprosto postopno razširitev SGNS in temeljito teoretično analizo, ki dokazuje njegovo veljavnost. Empirični eksperimenti so pokazali pravilnost teoretične analize in praktično uporabnost incrementalnega algoritma.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun yana gane wani taki mai ƙaranci wa misalin-gram wa skip-gram da misali negative (SGNS) daga duk kallon na empirical da keɓata. @ info: whatsthis Domin da za mu yi addu'a ga wannan muammãni, Munã nuna wata faɗi mai sauƙi na ƙari SGNS kuma Mu sami wani anadi mai cikakken littafiki dõmin ya nuna gaskiyarsa. Tajarakin Empirical sun nuna gaske da hakki na analyn teori da amfani na algoritin da ke ƙara.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו חוקרת אסטרטגיה אימונים נוספת לדוגמא "skip-gram" עם דגימות שליליות (SGNS) מבחינה אמפירית וגם תיאורטית. שיטות קיימות של קישור מילים עצביות, כולל SGNS, הן אלגוריתמות רבות-מעבר ולכן אינן יכולות לבצע עדכון מודל משותף. To address this problem, we present a simple incremental extension of SGNS and provide a thorough theoretical analysis to demonstrate its validity.  ניסויים אימפריים הראו את התקנות של הניתוח התאורטי, כמו גם את השימוש המרשמי של האלגוריתם המשותף.', 'bo': 'This paper explores an incremental training strategy for the skip-gram model with negative sampling (SGNS) from both empirical and theoretical perspectives. Existing methods of neural word embedding, including SGNS, are multi-pass algorithms and thus cannot perform incremental model update. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བཤད་ན། ང་ཚོས་SGNS་ཀྱི་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་སླ་གཏོང་ཐབས་བྱས་པ་དེ་ལས་ཉེན་རྟོགས་པའི་མི་རིམ་ལུགས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད སྙན་ངག་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་གཞུང་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་བདེ་ཐམ་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་གྱི་སྤྱོད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Learning to select data for transfer learning with Bayesian Optimization', 'ar': 'تعلم تحديد البيانات لنقل التعلم باستخدام Bayesian Optimization', 'es': 'Aprender a seleccionar datos para transferir el aprendizaje con la optimización bayesiana', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a selecionar dados para transferência de aprendizado com a Otimização Bayesiana', 'fr': "Apprendre à sélectionner des données pour l'apprentissage par transfert avec l'optimisation bayésienne", 'ja': 'Bayesian Optimizationで転送学習のためのデータの選択を学ぶ', 'zh': '学择数以贝叶斯优化迁之', 'hi': 'Bayesian अनुकूलन के साथ स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए डेटा का चयन करने के लिए सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение выбору данных для передачи обучения с байесовской оптимизацией', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas sonraí a roghnú le haghaidh foghlama aistrithe le Bayesian Optimization', 'hu': 'Az adatok kiválasztásának tanulása a Bayesian Optimization segítségével', 'el': 'Μαθαίνοντας να επιλέγετε δεδομένα για μάθηση μεταφοράς με Βελτιστοποίηση', 'ka': 'Bayesian Optimization', 'it': "Imparare a selezionare i dati per l'apprendimento di trasferimento con Bayesian Optimization", 'kk': 'Bayesian Optimization арқылы оқыту үшін деректерді таңдау үйрену', 'mk': 'Научи да избереш податоци за трансфер на учење со бајезиска оптимизација', 'ml': 'ബെയിസിയന്\u200d ഓപ്ടിമിഷഷനുമായി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk memilih data untuk pemindahan belajar dengan Optimisasi Bayesian', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex tagħżel dejta għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment bl-ottimizzazzjoni Bayesiana', 'no': 'Lærar å velja data for å læra overføring med Bayesian Optimizering', 'mn': 'Bayesian Optimization-тай суралцах өгөгдлийг сонгох суралцах нь', 'lt': 'Mokymasis pasirinkti duomenis mokymosi perdavimui naudojant Bayesian Optimization', 'pl': 'Nauka wyboru danych do nauki transferowej z Bayesian Optimization', 'sr': 'Naučenje odabrati podatke za učenje premeštanja Bayesianskim optimizacijama', 'si': 'බේසියාන් විශේෂණය සඳහා දත්ත තෝරගන්න ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ro': 'Învățarea selectării datelor pentru transferul de învățare cu Bayesian Optimization', 'so': 'Waxbarashada la doorto macluumaadka iskuulka la wareejiyo Bayesian Optimization', 'sv': 'Lär dig att välja data för överföring lärande med Bayesian Optimization', 'ta': 'பேயிசியன் விருப்பத்தேர்வுகளுடன் மாற்ற முடியும் தகவல்களை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க கற்றுக்கொண்டு', 'ur': 'Bayesian Optimization', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học cách chọn dữ liệu để học cách truyền tải bằng Cách tô hợp Bayesian', 'bg': 'Научете се да избирате данни за трансферно обучение с Байезианска оптимизация', 'nl': 'Leren om data te selecteren voor overdracht leren met Bayesian Optimization', 'da': 'Lære at vælge data til overførsel af læring med Bayesian Optimering', 'de': 'Lernen, Daten für Transferlernen mit Bayesian Optimization auszuwählen', 'id': 'Belajar untuk memilih data untuk transfer belajar dengan Optimisasi Bayesian', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kuchagua taarifa kwa ajili ya kuhamisha kujifunza na Uchaguzi wa Bayesia', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن انتخاب داده برای انتقال یادگیری با optimization Bayesian', 'tr': 'Bayesian Optimizasy bilen öwrenmek üçin maglumatlary saýlamak üçin öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer om data te kies vir oordrag leer met Bayesian Optimaliseering', 'sq': 'Mësimi për të zgjedhur të dhënat për transferimin e mësimit me Optimizimin Bayesian', 'hr': 'Naučenje odabrati podatke za učenje prenošenja Bayesianom optimizacijom', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ko': '베일스로 선택 이동 학습 데이터 최적화', 'bn': 'বেয়েশিয়ান অপারেশনের সাথে শিক্ষা প্রদানের জন্য তথ্য নির্বাচন করতে শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Learning to select data for transfer learning with Bayesian Optimization', 'az': 'Bayesian Optimizasyonu il톛 칬yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n m톛lumatlar캼 se칞m톛k 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'et': 'Andmete valimise õppimine edastamiseks Bayesian Optimization abil', 'cs': 'Naučení se výběru dat pro přenos učení s Bayesovskou optimalizací', 'bs': 'Naučenje odabrati podatke za učenje prenošenja Bayesianske optimizacije', 'fi': 'Oppiminen valitsemaan dataa siirtooppimiseen Bayesian Optimization -ohjelmistolla', 'ca': 'Learning to select data for transfer learning with Bayesian Optimization', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje izbire podatkov za prenos učenja z Bayesian Optimization', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'Bayesian Optimization སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདེམས་པར་སློབ་བཞིན་པ', 'he': 'ללמוד לבחור נתונים להעברה ללמוד עם אופטימיזציה בייזית'}
{'en': 'Domain similarity measures can be used to gauge adaptability and select suitable data for transfer learning, but existing approaches define ad hoc measures that are deemed suitable for respective tasks. Inspired by work on curriculum learning, we propose to learn data selection measures using Bayesian Optimization and evaluate them across models, domains and tasks. Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks : sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing. We show the importance of complementing similarity with diversity, and that learned measures areto some degreetransferable across models, domains, and even tasks.', 'ar': 'يمكن استخدام مقاييس تشابه المجال لقياس القدرة على التكيف واختيار البيانات المناسبة لنقل التعلم ، ولكن الأساليب الحالية تحدد التدابير الخاصة التي تعتبر مناسبة للمهام المعنية. مستوحاة من العمل على تعلم المناهج الدراسية ، نقترح تعلم مقاييس اختيار البيانات باستخدام Bayesian Optimization وتقييمها عبر النماذج والمجالات والمهام. تتفوق مقاييسنا المكتسبة على مقاييس تشابه المجال الحالية بشكل كبير في ثلاث مهام: تحليل المشاعر ، وعلامات جزء من الكلام ، والتحليل. نظهر أهمية استكمال التشابه مع التنوع ، وأن المقاييس المكتسبة - إلى حد ما - قابلة للتحويل عبر النماذج والمجالات وحتى المهام.', 'fr': "Les mesures de similarité de domaines peuvent être utilisées pour évaluer la capacité d'adaptation et sélectionner des données appropriées pour l'apprentissage par transfert, mais les approches existantes définissent des mesures ad hoc qui sont jugées adaptées aux tâches respectives. Inspirés par les travaux sur l'apprentissage des programmes, nous proposons d'apprendre des mesures de sélection de données à l'aide de l'optimisation bayésienne et de les évaluer à travers des modèles, des domaines et des Nos mesures apprises surpassent de manière significative les mesures de similarité de domaines existantes sur trois tâches\xa0: l'analyse des sentiments, le balisage de parties du discours et l'analyse syntaxique. Nous montrons l'importance de compléter la similitude avec la diversité, et que les mesures apprises sont, dans une certaine mesure, transférables entre les modèles, les domaines et même les tâches.", 'pt': 'Medidas de similaridade de domínio podem ser usadas para avaliar a adaptabilidade e selecionar dados adequados para transferência de aprendizado, mas as abordagens existentes definem medidas ad hoc que são consideradas adequadas para as respectivas tarefas. Inspirados no trabalho de aprendizagem curricular, propomos aprender medidas de seleção de dados usando a Otimização Bayesiana e avaliá-las em modelos, domínios e tarefas. Nossas medidas aprendidas superam significativamente as medidas de similaridade de domínio existentes em três tarefas: análise de sentimento, marcação de parte do discurso e análise. Mostramos a importância de complementar a similaridade com a diversidade e que as medidas aprendidas são – até certo ponto – transferíveis entre modelos, domínios e até mesmo tarefas.', 'es': 'Las medidas de similitud de dominio se pueden utilizar para medir la adaptabilidad y seleccionar datos adecuados para transferir el aprendizaje, pero los enfoques existentes definen medidas ad hoc que se consideran adecuadas para las tareas respectivas. Inspirados por el trabajo sobre el aprendizaje curricular, proponemos aprender las medidas de selección de datos mediante la optimización bayesiana y evaluarlas en todos los modelos, dominios y tareas. Nuestras medidas aprendidas superan significativamente las medidas de similitud de dominio existentes en tres tareas: análisis de opiniones, etiquetado de parte del discurso y análisis. Mostramos la importancia de complementar la similitud con la diversidad y que las medidas aprendidas son, hasta cierto punto, transferibles entre modelos, dominios e incluso tareas.', 'ja': 'ドメイン類似性測定は、適応性を測定し、転送学習に適したデータを選択するために使用できますが、既存のアプローチは、それぞれのタスクに適していると見なされる臨機応変な測定を定義します。カリキュラム学習の研究に触発されて、ベイズ最適化を使用してデータ選択尺度を学習し、モデル、ドメイン、タスクにわたってそれらを評価することを提案します。学習した測定値は、センチメント分析、音声タグ付け、解析の3つのタスクで、既存のドメイン類似性測定値を大幅に上回ります。私たちは、類似性と多様性を補完することの重要性を示し、学習された尺度は、モデル、ドメイン、さらにはタスクにわたってある程度移転可能であることを示しています。', 'zh': '域相似性度量可施于量适应性而择其数以移学,然今法定义,谓之宜权。 受课程学事之启,请用贝叶斯优化以学数据选择度量,并跨模形、领域、任责质焉。 臣等学量值在三务显优于域相似性,情析词性标解析。 展多样性补相似性之要,而学度于某种程度,至于转移。', 'hi': 'डोमेन समानता उपायों का उपयोग अनुकूलन क्षमता को मापने और स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए उपयुक्त डेटा का चयन करने के लिए किया जा सकता है, लेकिन मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण तदर्थ उपायों को परिभाषित करते हैं जिन्हें संबंधित कार्यों के लिए उपयुक्त माना जाता है। पाठ्यक्रम सीखने पर काम से प्रेरित होकर, हम बायेसियन ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन का उपयोग करके डेटा चयन उपायों को सीखने और मॉडल, डोमेन और कार्यों में उनका मूल्यांकन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे सीखे गए उपाय मौजूदा डोमेन समानता उपायों को तीन कार्यों पर काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाते हैं: भावना विश्लेषण, भाग-भाषण टैगिंग, और पार्सिंग। हम विविधता के साथ समानता के पूरक के महत्व को दिखाते हैं, और यह कि सीखे गए उपाय कुछ हद तक मॉडल, डोमेन और यहां तक कि कार्यों में हस्तांतरणीय हैं।', 'ru': 'Показатели сходства областей могут использоваться для оценки адаптируемости и отбора подходящих данных для обучения передаче, но существующие подходы определяют специальные меры, которые считаются подходящими для соответствующих задач. Вдохновленные работой по обучению по учебной программе, мы предлагаем изучить меры по отбору данных с использованием байесовской оптимизации и оценить их по моделям, областям и задачам. Наши изученные показатели значительно превосходят существующие показатели сходства доменов по трем задачам: анализ настроений, тегирование части речи и синтаксический анализ. Мы показываем важность дополнения сходства с разнообразием, а также то, что изученные меры в некоторой степени передаются между моделями, доменами и даже задачами.', 'ga': 'Is féidir bearta cosúlachta fearainn a úsáid chun inoiriúnaitheacht a thomhas agus chun sonraí oiriúnacha a roghnú le haghaidh foghlama aistrithe, ach sainíonn cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana bearta ad hoc a mheastar a bheith oiriúnach do thascanna faoi seach. Arna spreagadh ag obair ar fhoghlaim curaclaim, tá sé beartaithe againn bearta roghnaithe sonraí a fhoghlaim trí leas a bhaint as Bayesian Optimization agus iad a mheas thar shamhlacha, fearainn agus tascanna. Sáraíonn ár mbearta foghlamtha na bearta cosúlachta fearainn atá ann faoi láthair go suntasach ar thrí thasc: anailís ar mheon, clibeáil pháirteach cainte, agus parsáil. Léirímid an tábhacht a bhaineann le cosúlacht a chomhlánú le héagsúlacht, agus go bhfuil bearta foghlamtha inaistrithe – go pointe áirithe – trasna samhlacha, fearainn, agus fiú tascanna.', 'hu': 'A domain hasonlósági intézkedések alkalmazhatók az alkalmazkodóképesség mérésére és a tanulás átadására szolgáló megfelelő adatok kiválasztására, de a meglévő megközelítések ad hoc intézkedéseket határoznak meg, amelyek alkalmasak az adott feladatokra. A tanterv tanulásával kapcsolatos munka ihletésére javasoljuk, hogy megtanuljuk az adatok kiválasztási intézkedéseit Bayesian Optimization segítségével, és értékeljük őket modellek, tartományok és feladatok között. Tanult méréseink három feladatban jelentősen felülmúlják a meglévő domain hasonlósági méréseket: hangulatelemzés, beszédrész címkézés és elemzés. Megmutatjuk a sokszínűséggel való hasonlóság kiegészítésének fontosságát, és hogy a tanult intézkedések – bizonyos mértékig – átvihetők modellek, területek és akár feladatok között.', 'el': 'Τα μέτρα ομοιότητας των τομέων μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για τον υπολογισμό της προσαρμοστικότητας και την επιλογή κατάλληλων δεδομένων για τη μάθηση μεταφοράς, αλλά οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις καθορίζουν μέτρα ad hoc που θεωρούνται κατάλληλα για τις αντίστοιχες εργασίες. Εμπνευσμένοι από την εργασία σχετικά με τη μάθηση προγραμμάτων σπουδών, προτείνουμε να μάθουμε μέτρα επιλογής δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας τη βελτιστοποίηση και να τα αξιολογήσουμε σε μοντέλα, τομείς και εργασίες. Τα μαθημένα μέτρα μας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τα υπάρχοντα μέτρα ομοιότητας τομέων σε τρεις εργασίες: ανάλυση συναισθημάτων, επισήμανση μέρους ομιλίας και ανάλυση. Δείχνουμε τη σημασία της συμπλήρωσης της ομοιότητας με την ποικιλομορφία και ότι τα μαθημένα μέτρα είναι – σε κάποιο βαθμό – μεταβιβάσιμα σε μοντέλα, τομείς, ακόμη και καθήκοντα.', 'ka': 'დომენის სინამდვილეობის მიზემები შეიძლება გამოიყენება აპეპტიფიკაციის განზემილებისთვის და მონიშნოთ საჭირო მონაცემები გასწავლებისთვის, მაგრამ მსგავსი მიზეზები განზემი სამუშაო სწავლების სამუშაო მუშაობით, ჩვენ გვეძებნა დავისწავლოთ მონაცემების მონიშვნის მეტრი, რომელიც გამოყენება ბაეზიანური ოპტიმიზაციის გამოყენება და გავამ ჩვენი სწავლილი მოზემები ძალიან გავაკეთებთ მსგავსი დემომინის განსხვავება სამი საქმედებზე მნიშვნელოვანი: სენტიმენტის ანალიზაცია, სიტყვების ნაწილი, ანალიზ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მნიშვნელობას, რომელიც განსხვავებული განსხვავებას დამუშავება, და რომელიც სწავლებული მოწყობილობები მოდელები, დიომენები და კიდევ საქმედები უნდა გადატ', 'it': "Le misure di somiglianza del dominio possono essere utilizzate per misurare l'adattabilità e selezionare dati adatti per l'apprendimento di trasferimento, ma gli approcci esistenti definiscono misure ad hoc ritenute idonee per i rispettivi compiti. Ispirati dal lavoro sull'apprendimento del curriculum, proponiamo di apprendere le misure di selezione dei dati utilizzando Bayesian Optimization e valutarle attraverso modelli, domini e attività. Le nostre misure apprese superano significativamente le misure esistenti di somiglianza dei domini in tre compiti: analisi sentiment, tag part-of-speech e parsing. Dimostriamo l'importanza di integrare la somiglianza con la diversità e che le misure apprese sono, in qualche misura, trasferibili tra modelli, domini e persino compiti.", 'kk': 'Домендің ұқсас өлшемдері адаптациялығын теңдеу үшін және аудару оқыту үшін жақсы деректерді таңдау үшін қолданылады, бірақ бар жағдайлары кейбір тапсырмалар үшін жақсы деп сұралатын ad hoc өл Байезия оптимизациясын қолданатын деректерді таңдау мерзімін үйрену жұмыс істеп, оларды моделдер, домендер және тапсырмалардың арасында оқу жұмыс істейміз. Біздің үйренген мерзімдеріміз барлық доменге ұқсастық мерзімдерді үш тапсырма үшін маңызды: сезімдерді анализ, сөздердің бөлігін тегжей және талдау. Біз әртүрлі мәселелерді қолданудың маңыздылығын көрсетедік, білім мәселелерді үлгілер, домендер және тіпті тапсырмалар бойынша бірнеше градус аударуға болады.', 'mk': 'Мерки за сличност на домените може да се користат за проценка на адаптабилноста и избор на соодветни податоци за трансферентно учење, но постојните пристапи дефинираат адхок мерки кои се сметаат за соодветни за задачи. Инспирирано од работата на учењето на наставните планови, предложуваме да се научат мерки за селекција на податоци користејќи ја Бејезиската оптимизација и да се проценат преку модели, домени и задачи. Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks: sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing.  Ние ја покажуваме важноста на комплиментирање на сличноста со различноста, и дека научените мерки се до некои степени префрливи меѓу моделите, домените и дури и задачите.', 'lt': 'Panašumo srityse priemonės gali būti naudojamos prisitaikymo gebėjimui įvertinti ir tinkamiems duomenims perduoti mokymuisi atrinkti, tačiau esamuose metoduose apibrėžiamos ad hoc priemonės, kurios laikomos tinkamomis atitinkamoms užduotims. Inspired by work on curriculum learning, we propose to learn data selection measures using Bayesian Optimization and evaluate them across models, domains and tasks.  Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks: sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing.  Mes parodome, kad svarbu papildyti panašumą ir įvairovę, ir kad išmoktos priemonės tam tikru mastu gali būti perkeliamos į įvairius modelius, sritis ir net užduotis.', 'ms': 'Ukuran persamaan domain boleh digunakan untuk mengukur kemampuan penyesuaian dan pilih data yang sesuai untuk pembelajaran pemindahan, tetapi pendekatan sedia ada menentukan tindakan ad hoc yang dianggap sesuai untuk tugas sesuai. Terinspirasi oleh kerja untuk belajar kurikulum, kami cadangkan untuk belajar tindakan pemilihan data menggunakan Optimisasi Bayesian dan menilai mereka melalui model, domain dan tugas. Ukuran belajar kita melampaui ukuran samaran domain yang wujud secara signifikan pada tiga tugas: analisis perasaan, tag-sebahagian-ucapan, dan penghuraian. Kami menunjukkan kepentingan untuk menambahkan persamaan dengan kebanyakan, dan bahawa tindakan belajar adalah-ke beberapa darjah-dipindahkan melalui model, domain, dan bahkan tugas.', 'ml': 'മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിനുള്ള സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാനും ഡൊമെയിനിന്റെ സമമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാനും ഉപയോഗി പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലിയാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബെയിസിയന്\u200d ഓപ്ടിമേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രൊ നിലവിലുള്ള ഡൊമെയിനിലുള്ള സമമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു ജോലികളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന നമ്മുടെ പഠിച്ചിരിക്കു വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസം പൂര്\u200dത്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. പഠിച്ചിട്ടുള്', 'mn': 'Доминийн төстэй хэмжээсүүд нь загварчлах боломжтой, шилжүүлэх сургалтын тулд зөв өгөгдлийг сонгоход хэрэглэгдэж болно. Гэхдээ сургалтын арга загварууд нь тэдгээр ажил дээр зөв гэж үздэг ad hoc хэмжээ Сургуулийн хөтөлбөрийн сургалтын талаар ажиллаж, бид Байзийн Сайн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ашиглан өгөгдлийн сонголтын шалгалтыг суралцаж, загвар, сүлжээ, үйл ажиллагаанд үнэлэх хэрэгтэй. Бидний сурсан хэмжээсүүд 3 даалгавраас илүү адилхан хэмжээсүүдийг дамжуулдаг: сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ, ярианы нэг хэсэг, хуваалцаа. Бид олон янз бүрийн төстэй тэнцүү байдлыг нэмэгдүүлэх чухал зүйлийг харуулж байна. Мөн сурсан үйл ажиллагаа зарим хэмжээст загварууд, дотор, бүр даалгаварууд дээр шилжүүлж чадна.', 'mt': 'Jistgħu jintużaw miżuri ta’ similarità tad-dominju biex titkejjel l-adattabilità u tintgħażel dejta xierqa għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment, iżda l-approċċi eżistenti jiddefinixxu miżuri ad hoc li huma meqjusa xierqa għal kompiti rispettivi. Inspirati mix-xogħol fuq it-tagħlim tal-kurrikuli, qed nipproponu li nitgħallmu miżuri għall-għażla tad-dejta bl-użu tal-Ottimizzazzjoni Bayeżjana u li jevalwawhom f’mudelli, dominji u kompiti differenti. Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks: sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing.  Aħna nuru l-importanza li tiġi kkumplimentata s-similarità mad-diversità, u li l-miżuri mitgħallma huma sa ċertu punt trasferibbli bejn mudelli, oqsma, u saħansitra kompiti.', 'sr': 'Mjere sličnosti domena mogu se koristiti za mjerenje adaptabilnosti i izabrati odgovarajuće podatke za učenje prijenosa, ali postojeći pristupi definiraju ad hoc mjere koje se smatraju odgovarajućim za odgovarajuće zadatke. Inspirirani radom o učenju nastavnih programa, predlažemo naučiti mjere selekcije podataka koristeći Bayesijsku optimizaciju i procijeniti ih preko modela, domena i zadataka. Naše naučene mjere iznosi postojeće mjere sličnosti domena značajno na tri zadatka: analiza osjećanja, dijelogovorna etiketa i analiza. Pokazujemo važnost dodatne sličnosti raznolikosti i da su naučene mjere na neke stepenice prebacivane preko modela, domena i čak i zadataka.', 'no': 'Domenetilsvarande måtar kan brukast for å gjera tilpassabilitet og velja passande data for å læra overføringar, men eksisterande tilnærmingar definerer ad hoc målar som vert kalla passande for tilsvarande oppgåver. Vi foreslår å lære datautval med Bayesian Optimizering og evaluere dei over modeller, domene og oppgåver. Våre lærte målar utfører dei eksisterande domenetilsvarande målar betydelig på tre oppgåver: sentimentanalyse, del av talemerking og tolking. Vi viser viktigheten til å complementera liknande med mangfold, og at lærte tiltak er til nokre grad overførbare over modeller, domene og til og med samme oppgåver.', 'si': 'ඩොමේන් සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් මාර්ගය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් ගුලුවන් කරන්න සහ ගුලුවන් දත්ත ත තෝරාගන්න, ඒත් තියෙන්න බේසියාන් විශ්වාසය සඳහා වැඩේ ඉගෙන ගන්න, අපි දත්ත තෝරගන්න මාර්ගයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා බේසියාන් විශ්වාසය ස අපේ ඉගෙන ගත්ත අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ, කොටස් කොටස් කිරීමට, සහ විශේෂ කරන්න. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විවිදියට සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සමඟ සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සමාන්\u200dයය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ඉගෙන ගත්ත අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළ', 'so': 'Domain similarity measures can be used to gauge adaptability and select suitable data for transfer learning, but existing approaches define ad hoc measures that are deemed suitable for respective tasks.  Shaqo lagu soo dhiibo waxbarashada waxbarashada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aad barto qaababka doorashada ee macluumaadka lagu doorto isticmaalayo Bayesian Optimization, waxaana lagu qiimeynayaa tusaalooyin, deegaanka iyo shaqooyinka. Shaqooyinkayada la bartay waxay sameeyaan qiyaastii ku jira oo isku mid ah saddex shaqooyin si muhiim ah: sawir xisaabta, qeyb ka mid ah tagging hadalka iyo baaritaanka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa muhiimka ku dhamaystirada isku mid ahaanshaha kala duduwan, taas oo lagu bartayna waa tusaalaha, deegaanka iyo xittaa hawshooyinka.', 'ro': 'Măsurile de similitudine a domeniilor pot fi utilizate pentru a evalua adaptabilitatea și pentru a selecta date adecvate pentru transferul de învățare, dar abordările existente definesc măsuri ad hoc care sunt considerate adecvate pentru sarcinile respective. Inspirați de activitatea privind învățarea curriculară, propunem să învățăm măsurile de selecție a datelor folosind Bayesian Optimization și să le evaluăm pe modele, domenii și sarcini. Măsurile noastre învățate depășesc semnificativ măsurile existente de similitudine a domeniilor în trei sarcini: analiza sentimentului, etichetarea parțială a vorbirii și analizarea. Aratăm importanța completării similarității cu diversitatea și că măsurile învățate sunt – într-o anumită măsură – transferabile între modele, domenii și chiar sarcini.', 'ta': 'டோமைன் ஒற்றை அளவுகளை பாதுகாப்புக்கு பயன்படுத்தலாம் மற்றும் மாற்றி கற்றத்திற்கு பொருத்தமான தகவலை தேர்வு செய்யலாம், ஆனால் இருக்கும் முறை பேயிசியன் தேர்வு செய்தலை பயன்படுத்தி மாதிரி, தளங்கள் மற்றும் பணிகள் முழுவதும் மதிப்பிடுக. மூன்று பணிகளில் இருக்கும் களம் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட நமது கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கும் அளவுகளை மேல் செயல்படுத்துகிறது: உணர்வு  பல்வேறுபாடுகளுடன் ஒப்பிடுவதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் கற்றுக் கொண்ட அளவு', 'sv': 'Domänlikhetsåtgärder kan användas för att mäta anpassningsförmåga och välja lämpliga data för överföring av lärande, men befintliga metoder definierar tillfälliga åtgärder som anses lämpliga för respektive uppgift. Inspirerad av arbetet med läroplaner, föreslår vi att lära oss dataval med Bayesian Optimization och utvärdera dem över modeller, domäner och uppgifter. Våra lärda mätningar överträffar befintliga domänliknande mätningar avsevärt på tre uppgifter: sentimentalanalys, del-of-talmärkning och tolkning. Vi visar vikten av att komplettera likhet med mångfald, och att lärda åtgärder i viss mån kan överföras mellan modeller, domäner och till och med uppgifter.', 'pl': 'Środki podobieństwa dziedzin mogą być wykorzystane do oceny zdolności adaptacyjnej i wyboru odpowiednich danych do uczenia się transferowego, ale istniejące podejścia definiują środki ad hoc, które są uznane za odpowiednie dla odpowiednich zadań. Zainspirowani pracą nad uczeniem się programów nauczania, proponujemy naukę środków selekcji danych za pomocą Bayeson Optimization i ocenę ich w różnych modelach, domenach i zadaniach. Nasze nauczone miary znacznie przewyższają istniejące mierniki podobieństwa domen w trzech zadaniach: analizę sentymentów, tagowanie części mowy i parsowanie. Pokazujemy, jak ważne jest uzupełnianie podobieństwa różnorodnością oraz że nauczone środki są – do pewnego stopnia – możliwe do przenoszenia między modelami, dziedzinami, a nawet zadaniami.', 'ur': 'Domain similarity measures can be used to gauge adaptability and select suitable data for transfer learning, but existing approaches define ad hoc measures that are deemed suitable for respective tasks. ہم ڈیٹی انتخاب مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے کام کے ذریعہ تحقیق کی جاتی ہیں، ہم نے ڈیٹی انتخاب مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے ڈیٹی انتخاب مطالعہ سکھائی ہے اور انہیں نمڈل، ڈومین اور کاموں کے اندر ارزش کریں ہماری تعلیم کی مطابق تین کاموں پر موجود دامین کی برابری کی مطابق مطابق ہے: احساسات تحلیل، بات کی قسمت ٹاگ، اور پارسینگ. ہم مختلف طریقوں کے مطابق مشابہ کی تعداد کو دکھاتے ہیں، اور یہ کہ سیکھا گیا ہے کہ مقدار طریقوں کے مطابق مدلکوں، ڈومینوں اور حتی تکلیف کے مطابق ایک درجہ کے مطابق اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Maktabni o'rganish uchun ishni o'rganish orqali biz Bayesian Optimization yordamida maʼlumot tanlash amallarini o'rganamiz va ularni modellar, domen va vazifalar yordamida qiymatlashni talab qilamiz. Bizning o'rganilgan amallar, mavjud domen huddi vazifalarini uchta vazifalarda muhimiy amalni bajaradi: sentiment analyzeri, gapirish qismlarining qismlari, va parsing. Biz ko'plab turli shaklga oshirishning muhimligini ko'rsatamiz va o'rganish amallar modellar, domen va vazifalarning hamma darajaga o'zgartirib boʻladi.", 'vi': 'Quy mô tương tự nông vực có thể được dùng để xác định khả năng thích ứng và chọn dữ liệu thích hợp cho việc học chuyển nhượng, nhưng các phương pháp hiện thời đã xác định các biện pháp đặc biệt thích hợp cho việc riêng. Nguồn cảm hứng từ công việc học sơ đồ học, chúng tôi đề nghị học các biện pháp tuyển chọn dữ liệu bằng cách nhân cách điểm quang Bayisian và đánh giá chúng qua các mô-đun, miền và các công việc. Những phương pháp học được của chúng tôi hoàn thành những biện pháp giống nhau trong lãnh vực có đáng kể trong ba nhiệm vụ: Chúng tôi cho thấy tầm quan trọng của sự bổ sung đến đa dạng, và những biện pháp học được có thể chuyển giao qua các mô hình, miền và thậm chí các công việc.', 'bg': 'Мерките за сходство на домейните могат да се използват за измерване на адаптивността и избор на подходящи данни за трансферно обучение, но съществуващите подходи определят ad hoc мерки, които се считат за подходящи за съответните задачи. Вдъхновени от работата по учебната програма, ние предлагаме да научим мерки за подбор на данни, използвайки Байсиевата оптимизация и да ги оценим в различни модели, домейни и задачи. Нашите научени мерки значително превъзхождат съществуващите мерки за сходство на домейните при три задачи: анализ на сентимента, маркиране на част от речта и анализиране. Показваме значението на допълването на сходството с разнообразието и че научените мерки са – до известна степен – прехвърлими между модели, области и дори задачи.', 'nl': 'Domeinnijkheidsmaatregelen kunnen worden gebruikt om het aanpassingsvermogen te meten en geschikte gegevens te selecteren voor transferleren, maar bestaande benaderingen definiëren ad hocmaatregelen die geschikt worden geacht voor de respectieve taken. Geïnspireerd door werk aan curriculum learning, stellen we voor om data selectie maatregelen te leren met behulp van Bayesian Optimization en deze te evalueren in modellen, domeinen en taken. Onze geleerde maatregelen overtreffen de bestaande domeinovereenkomsten aanzienlijk op drie taken: sentimentanalyse, part-of-speech tagging en parsing. We laten zien hoe belangrijk het is om gelijkenis met diversiteit aan te vullen en dat geleerde maatregelen – tot op zekere hoogte – overdraagbaar zijn over modellen, domeinen en zelfs taken.', 'de': 'Domänennahmlichkeitsmaße können verwendet werden, um Anpassungsfähigkeit zu messen und geeignete Daten für Transferlernen auszuwählen, aber bestehende Ansätze definieren Ad-hoc-Maßnahmen, die für die jeweiligen Aufgaben geeignet sind. Inspiriert von der Arbeit am Curriculum Learning schlagen wir vor, Daten-Selektionsmaßnahmen mit Bayesian Optimization zu erlernen und diese über Modelle, Domänen und Aufgaben hinweg zu bewerten. Unsere erlernten Maßnahmen übertreffen bestehende Domain-Ähnlichkeits-Maßnahmen signifikant in drei Aufgaben: Sentiment-Analyse, Part-of-Speech-Tagging und Parsing. Wir zeigen, wie wichtig es ist, Ähnlichkeit mit Diversität zu ergänzen und dass erlernte Maßnahmen – bis zu einem gewissen Grad – über Modelle, Domänen und sogar Aufgaben übertragbar sind.', 'id': 'Ukuran similaritas domain dapat digunakan untuk mengukur adaptabilitas dan memilih data yang cocok untuk belajar transfer, tetapi pendekatan yang ada mendefinisikan ukuran ad hoc yang dianggap cocok untuk tugas masing-masing. Terinspirasi oleh pekerjaan dalam belajar kurikulum, kami mengusulkan untuk belajar tindakan seleksi data menggunakan Optimisasi Bayesian dan mengevaluasinya melalui model, domain dan tugas. Ukuran belajar kita melebihi ukuran kesempatan domain yang ada secara signifikan pada tiga tugas: analisis perasaan, tagging bagian dari pidato, dan penganalisan. We show the importance of complementing similarity with diversity, and that learned measures are-to some degree-transferable across models, domains, and even tasks.', 'da': 'Domænelighedsforanstaltninger kan anvendes til at måle tilpasningsevnen og udvælge egnede data til overførsel af læring, men eksisterende tilgange definerer ad hoc-foranstaltninger, der anses for egnede til de respektive opgaver. Inspireret af arbejdet med læringsplaner foreslår vi at lære dataudvælgelsesforanstaltninger ved hjælp af Bayesian Optimization og evaluere dem på tværs af modeller, domæner og opgaver. Vores lærte målinger overgår eksisterende domænelighedsmålinger betydeligt på tre opgaver: sentiment analyse, del-of-speech tagging og parsing. Vi viser vigtigheden af at supplere lighed med mangfoldighed, og at lærte foranstaltninger til en vis grad kan overføres på tværs af modeller, domæner og endda opgaver.', 'sw': 'Hatua sawa za ndani inaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kupunguza upatikanaji na kuchagua taarifa zinazofaa kwa ajili ya kuhamisha elimu, lakini hatua zilizopo zinaelezea hatua za kipekee ambazo zinadhani kuwa zinafaa kwa kazi za respective. Tumehamishwa na kazi ya kujifunza elimu ya ufundi, tunapendekeza kujifunza hatua za uchaguzi wa data kwa kutumia Uchaguzi wa Bayesia na kutathmini katika mifano, maeneo na kazi. Hatua zetu zilizojifunza zinafanya hatua za usawa zilizopo katika eneo hilo kwa kiasi kikubwa katika kazi tatu: uchambuzi wa hisia, sehemu ya alama za hotuba, na kuimba. Tunaonyesha umuhimu wa kuunganisha sawa na tofauti, na kwamba hatua zilizojifunza ni kwa baadhi ya shahada zinazobadilishwa katika mifano, ndani, na hata kazi.', 'hr': 'Mjere sličnosti domena mogu se koristiti za mjerenje prilagodljivosti i izabrati odgovarajuće podatke za učenje prijenosa, ali postojeći pristupi definiraju ad hoc mjere koje se smatraju odgovarajućim za odgovarajuće zadatke. Inspirirani radom o učenju nastavnih programa, predlažemo naučiti mjere izbora podataka koristeći Bayesiansku optimizaciju i procijeniti ih preko modela, domena i zadataka. Naše naučene mjere iznosi postojeće mjere sličnosti domena značajno na tri zadatka: analiza osjećanja, dijelogovorna etiketa i analiza. Pokazujemo važnost dopunjavanja sličnosti raznolikosti i da su naučene mjere na neku stupnju prebacivane preko modela, domena i čak i zadataka.', 'ko': '영역 유사성 도량은 적응성을 평가하고 이동 학습에 적합한 데이터를 선택하는 데 쓰일 수 있으나 기존의 방법은 각자의 임무에 적합하다고 여겨지는 특수한 도량을 정의했다.과정 학습 업무의 계발을 받아 우리는 베일스를 이용하여 학습 데이터의 선택 도량을 최적화하고 모델, 분야와 임무를 뛰어넘어 이를 평가하는 것을 권장한다.감정 분석, 어성 표기와 문법 분석 세 가지 임무에서 우리의 학습 도량은 기존 분야의 유사도 도량보다 현저히 우수하다.우리는 다양성으로 유사성을 보완하는 중요성을 보여주었고 배운 도량은 어느 정도에 모델, 역, 심지어 임무를 뛰어넘어 전환할 수 있다.', 'af': "Domein gelykheidsmaat kan gebruik word om aanpasbaarheid te gauer en kies geskikte data vir oordrag leer, maar bestaande toepassings definieer ad hoc maat wat gedink word geskikte vir respektiewe taak. Ons voorstel deur die werk op die onderwerp van die onderwerp van die onderwerp van die onderwerp te leer data keuse maatskappe met gebruik van Bayesian Optimaliseering en hulle ooreenstem deur modele, domeine en opdragte. Ons leer maatskappe uitvoer bestaande domein gelykenis maatskappe betekeurig op drie taak: sentimentanalisie, deel van spraak merking en verwerking. Ons wys die belangrikheid van die complementering van gelykenis met verskeidigheid, en dat leer maat is-tot 'n paar grad-oordragbaar oor modele, domeine en selfs taak.", 'tr': 'Saýlaw öwrenmesi üçin adatýarlylyk çykarmak üçin sahypalar meýdançalyklary ullanabilir we gowy maglumatlary saýlamak üçin ullanylar, ýöne meýdançalar ad hoc ölçümlerini saylaýar. Program öwrenmesi üçin işe guruldyryldy, Bayesian Optimizasyny ulanyp veri saýlamak ölçülerini öwrenmegi we olary nusgalar, sahypalar we zadlaryň arasynda değerlendirmegi teklip edýäris. Bizim öğrendiğimiz ölçümlerimiz, varlık alan benzeri ölçülerini üç göreve önemli ölçüde etkilendirir: duygusal analizi, konuşma etiketlerinin bir parçası ve analizi. Biz çeşitlilikle meňzeşliklerini doldurmanyň wajyplygyny görkeýäris we öwrenmeli çözümler modeller, sahalar we hatta zadalar arasynda göçürülebilir.', 'sq': 'Masat e ngjashmërisë së fushës mund të përdoren për të vlerësuar përshtatshmërinë dhe për të zgjedhur të dhënat e përshtatshme për mësimin e transferimit, por qasjet ekzistuese përcaktojnë masa ad hoc që konsiderohen të përshtatshme për detyrat respektive. Inspiruar nga puna mbi mësimin e programeve mësuese, ne propozojmë të mësojmë masat e zgjedhjes së të dhënave duke përdorur Optimizimin Bayesian dhe të vlerësojmë ato nëpërmjet modeleve, domeneve dhe detyrave. Masat tona të mësuara tejkalojnë masat ekzistuese të ngjashmërisë në domeni në mënyrë të konsiderueshme në tre detyra: analiza e ndjenjave, shënimi i pjesës së fjalimit dhe analizimi. We show the importance of complementing similarity with diversity, and that learned measures are-to some degree-transferable across models, domains, and even tasks.', 'am': 'የዶሜን ብጤቶች መጠቀሚያ ለመስጠት ማቀናጃ እና ለመለወጥ የሚጠየቅ ዳታዎችን ለመምረጥ ይችላል፤ ነገር ግን የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ለስራ የሚገባውን የአካባቢ መጠቀሚያ ይዘረጋል፡፡ በመምህርት ትምህርት ላይ በሚያስተምሩ ሥራ፣ የባይስያ ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የዳታ ምርጫዎችን ለመማር እና በሞዴል፣ ድሞኖችን እና ስራዎችን እናስተውላቸዋለን፡፡ የተማሩት ሥርዓታችን የአሁኑን ዶሜን በተለያዩ ሥርዓቶች በሦስት ስራ ላይ ትክክለኛ ነው፤ የስሜት አስተያየት፣ የንግግር ማተሚያ ክፍል እና ማዘጋጀት ነው፡፡ ብልሃት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የተማሩት ተቃውሞ በዓይነቶች፣ ዲሞሎችን እና ስራዎችን የሚለወጥ አንዳንድ ደረጃ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Domena similaritə ölçüləri uyğunlaşdırılabilir və transfer öyrənməsi üçün uyğun məlumatları seçir, amma mövcud tərzlərin ad hoc ölçülərini müəyyən edir. Öyrənmək programı öyrənməsi ilə, Bayesian Optimizasyonu vasitəsilə verilən məlumatları öyrənmək və onları modellərdə, domeinlərdə və işlərdə değerlendirmək üçün təklif edirik. Bizim öyrəndiyimiz ölçülərimiz, həqiqətən də, sahələrin bir parçası etiketi və analizi üç işdə mövcuddur. Biz müxtəlif müxtəlif məsələləri ilə birləşdirmək və öyrəndiyimiz ölçülərə modellər, domeinlər və hətta işlər arasında dərəcə-dərəcə daşınabilir.', 'fa': 'اندازه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cسازی دامنه می\u200cتوانند برای اندازه\u200cگیری قابلیت adaptability و انتخاب داده\u200cهای مناسب برای یادگیری انتقال استفاده می\u200cشود، ولی روش\u200cهای موجود وجود دارد اندازه\u200cهای ad hoc را تعریف می\u200cکنند که برای وظیفه\u200cهای مناسب به نظر توسط کار در مورد یادگیری برنامه آموزشی، پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از برنامه\u200cهای برنامه آموزشی داده\u200cها یاد بگیریم و آنها را با مدل، دامنه\u200cها و وظیفه\u200cها ارزیابی کنیم. اندازه\u200cهای یادگیری ما بیشتر از اندازه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cی دامنی موجود در سه وظیفه\u200cای بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهند: تحلیل احساسات، پاره\u200cای از نقاشی سخنرانی، و پاره\u200cگیری. ما مهم تعداد مشابه با مختلف را نشان می\u200cدهیم، و این مقدار یاد گرفته\u200cایم، به بعضی درجه قابل تغییر قابل انتقال در مدل، دامنه\u200cها و حتی وظیفه\u200cها هستند.', 'hy': "Դոմենների նմանության չափումները կարող են օգտագործվել ադապտացիաների չափման և ընտրելու համապատասխան տվյալներ փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության համար, բայց գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները սահմանում են հատուկ չափումներ, որոնք համարվում են համապատասխան Հոգեշնչված ուսումնական ծրագրերի ուսումնասիրության աշխատանքով, մենք առաջարկում ենք սովորել տվյալների ընտրության մեթոդներ օգտագործելով Բեյզիացի օպտիմիզացիան և գնահատել դրանք մոդելների, բնագավառների և առաջադրանքների միջև: Մեր սովոր չափումները կատարում են գոյություն ունեցող բնագավառի նմանությունների չափումները երեք խնդիրների վրա' զգացմունքների վերլուծություն, խոսքի մասի նշաններ և վերլուծություն: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կարևորությունը բազմազանության հետ համանմանությունը լրացնելու կարևորությունը, և որ սովորված չափումները որոշ չափով փոխանցելի են մոդելների, ոլորտների և նույնիսկ խնդիրների միջև:", 'bn': 'ডোমেইনের একই ধরনের পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করা যাবে যে গ্যাগ গ্যাগেসেব্যবহার করা এবং শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের জন্য যথাযথ তথ্য নির্বাচন করতে পারে, কিন্তু বিদ্ কার্কুল শিক্ষার ব্যাপারে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বেয়েশিয়ান অপারেশন ব্যবহার করে তথ্য নির্বাচনের পদক্ষেপ শিখতে এবং মডেল, ডোমেইন এবং কাজের আমাদের শিক্ষার্থীর পদক্ষেপ বিদ্যমান ডোমেইনের একই ধরনের পদক্ষেপ তিনটি কাজের উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ: আবেগ বিশ্লেষণ, ভাষণের অংশ আমরা বৈচিত্র্যের সাথে একই ধরনের পূর্ণ সমতুল্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রদর্শন করি এবং যে পদক্ষেপ শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে তা হচ্ছে মডেল, ড', 'cs': 'Měření podobnosti domén lze použít k posouzení adaptability a výběru vhodných dat pro transferové učení, ale stávající přístupy definují ad hoc opatření, která jsou považována za vhodná pro příslušné úkoly. Inspirováni prácí na učení osnov navrhujeme naučit se opatření výběru dat pomocí Bayesovské optimalizace a vyhodnotit je napříč modely, doménami a úkoly. Naše naučená opatření výrazně překonávají stávající měření podobnosti domén ve třech úkolech: analýza sentimentu, tagování části řeči a analýza. Ukazujeme, jak důležité je doplňovat podobnost s rozmanitostí a že učená opatření jsou do určité míry přenositelná napříč modely, domény a dokonce úkoly.', 'ca': "Poden utilitzar mesures de similitud de domini per mesurar l'adaptabilitat i seleccionar dades adequades per a l'aprenentatge de transfer ència, però els enfocaments existents defineixen mesures ad hoc que es consideran adequades per a les tasques respectives. Inspirat pel treball en l'aprenentatge de programes, proposem aprendre mesures de selecció de dades fent servir l'Optimització Bayèsia i evaluar-les a través de models, dominis i tasques. Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks: sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing.  Mostrem la importància de complementar la similitud amb la diversitat, i que les mesures aprengutes són transferibles en algun grau en models, dominis i fins i tot tasques.", 'fi': 'Alueiden samankaltaisuutta voidaan käyttää sopeutumiskyvyn mittaamiseen ja sopivan tiedon valitsemiseen siirtooppimiseen, mutta olemassa olevat lähestymistavat määrittelevät tapauskohtaiset toimenpiteet, joita pidetään sopivina kulloiseenkin tehtävään. Opetussuunnitelman oppimista koskevan työn innoittamana ehdotamme, että opimme Bayesian Optimizationin avulla datan valintatoimenpiteitä ja arvioimme niitä eri malleissa, toimialueissa ja tehtävissä. Opitut mittarimme ylittävät olemassa olevat verkkotunnuksen samankaltaisuusmittarit merkittävästi kolmessa tehtävässä: tunteiden analysoinnissa, puheen osan tagauksessa ja jäsentämisessä. Osoitamme, kuinka tärkeää on täydentää samankaltaisuutta moninaisuuden kanssa ja että opitut toimenpiteet ovat jossain määrin siirrettävissä eri malleissa, toimialoilla ja jopa tehtävissä.', 'et': 'Domeeni sarnasuse meetmeid saab kasutada kohanemisvõime hindamiseks ja sobivate andmete valimiseks siirdeõppeks, kuid olemasolevad lähenemisviisid määratlevad ad hoc meetmed, mida peetakse sobivaks vastavate ülesannete jaoks. Inspireerituna tööst õppekava õppimisega, teeme ettepaneku õppida andmete valiku meetmeid Bayesi optimeerimise abil ja hinnata neid mudelite, domeenide ja ülesannete vahel. Meie õppitud mõõtmed ületavad oluliselt olemasolevaid domeeni sarnasuse mõõtmeid kolme ülesande puhul: sentimentaalüüs, kõneosa sildistamine ja parsimine. Me näitame, kui oluline on täiendada sarnasust mitmekesisusega ning et õppinud meetmed on teatud määral ülekantavad mudelite, valdkondade ja isegi ülesannete vahel.', 'bs': 'Mjere sličnosti domena mogu se koristiti za mjerenje prilagodnosti i izabrati odgovarajuće podatke za učenje prijenosa, ali postojeći pristupi definiraju ad hoc mjere koje se smatraju odgovarajućim za odgovarajuće zadatke. Inspirirani radom o učenju nastavnih programa, predlažemo naučiti mjere selekcije podataka koristeći optimizaciju Bayesija i procijeniti ih preko modela, domena i zadataka. Naše naučene mjere iznosi postojeće mjere sličnosti domena značajno na tri zadatka: analiza osjećanja, dijelogovorna etiketa i analiza. Pokazujemo važnost dopunjavanja sličnosti raznolikosti i da su naučene mjere na neku stupnju prebacivane preko modela, domena i čak i zadataka.', 'ha': "@ action: button An Inspire shi da aikin a kan karatun karatun, sai Mu buɗa ka karanta taki na zaɓallin data da za'a yi amfani da Optimisation Bayesian, kuma ka ƙaddara su a kowace misãlai, guda da aikin. Kayan takiyakanmu da aka sanar ta samar da tsari wanda ke da shi, yana da muhimu a kan aikin uku: Anarari hisia, rabon tagogi na magana, da paring. Muna nũna muhimmin ku cika misãli da wasu dabam'a, kuma masu sani yana zuwa wasu darajõji da za'a shige shi a kan misãlai, guda da aikin.", 'sk': 'Ukrepi podobnosti domen se lahko uporabljajo za merjenje prilagodljivosti in izbiro primernih podatkov za prenosno učenje, vendar obstoječi pristopi opredeljujejo ad hoc ukrepe, ki veljajo za primerne za posamezne naloge. Z navdihom dela na učnem načrtu predlagamo, da se naučimo ukrepov za izbiro podatkov z bayesijsko optimizacijo in jih ocenimo v modelih, domenah in nalogah. Naši učeni ukrepi bistveno presegajo obstoječe ukrepe podobnosti domen pri treh nalogah: analiza čustev, označevanje dela govora in razčlenjevanje. Pokazujemo pomen dopolnjevanja podobnosti z raznolikostjo in da so učeni ukrepi do neke mere prenosljivi po modelih, področjih in celo nalogah.', 'he': 'אפשר להשתמש במדידות דומיות בתחום כדי למדוד את היכולת להתאים ולבחר נתונים מתאימים ללימודי העברה, אך גישות קיימות מגדירות אמצעים ad hoc שנחשבו מתאימים למשימות מסוימות. בהשראה על ידי עבודה על לימוד תוכניות לימודים, אנו מציעים ללמוד אמצעי בחירת נתונים באמצעות אופטימיזציה בייזית Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks: sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing.  אנו מראים את חשיבותו של השלים של הדמיון עם מגוון, ושאמצעים למודעים הם-למידה מסויימת להעביר בין דוגמנים, שטחים, ואפילו משימות.', 'bo': 'Domain similarity measures can be used to gauge adaptability and select suitable data for transfer learning, but existing approaches define ad hoc measures that are deemed suitable for respective tasks. Inspired by work on curriculum learning, we propose to learn data selection measures using Bayesian Optimization and evaluate them across models, domains and tasks. Our learned measures outperform existing domain similarity measures significantly on three tasks: sentiment analysis, part-of-speech tagging, and parsing. ང་ཚོས་འདྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དང་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་བསྡུར་བ་དགོས་མཁན་གྱི་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན་པ་ནི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞུང་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་དང་བྱ་སྟངས་ལ་བསྡ', 'jv': "domain So that's the first thing to do when you first start a new tutorial program. We öyrenen measurements out play current domain Simlarityäh measurements Signibär on 3 tasks: Sensitive test, parts-of-language tagging, and paging. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing dikarepaké karo akeh sampeyan karo pirang-karang, lan kelangan langgar sampeyan luwih-sampeyan ngono nggawe model, dadi sak, lan nganggo sampeyan."}
{'en': 'Unsupervised Pretraining for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'ar': 'التدريب المسبق غير الخاضع للإشراف لتسلسل التعلم التسلسلي', 'fr': "Pré-entraînement non supervisé pour l'apprentissage séquence par séquence", 'pt': 'Pré-treinamento não supervisionado para aprendizado de sequência a sequência', 'es': 'Preentrenamiento no supervisado para el aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia', 'ja': 'シーケンスからシーケンス学習のための監督なしの事前トレーニング', 'zh': '序至序学者无监预训练', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए अनुक्रम के लिए असुरक्षित Pretraining', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемая предварительная подготовка к обучению последовательности к обучению последовательности', 'ga': 'Réamhoiliúint Gan Maoirseacht le haghaidh Seicheamh Foghlama', 'ka': 'შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი', 'el': 'Μη εποπτευόμενη προεπιλογή για μάθηση διαδοχής σε διαδοχή', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli előkészítés a szekvencia tanuláshoz', 'it': "Pretraining non supervisionato per l'apprendimento da sequenza a sequenza", 'kk': 'Сәйкестік реттеу оқыту үшін мәліметті шектеу', 'ms': 'Unsupervised Pretraining for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'ml': 'Unsupervised Pretraining for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'mt': 'Tħarriġ minn qabel mhux sorveljat għal Tagħlim tas-Sekwenza għal Tagħlim tas-Sekwenza', 'mn': 'Дараагийн суралцахын тулд тусламжгүй суралцах', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувано претренирање за секвентно учење', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowane wstępne szkolenie dla uczenia się sekwencji do sekwencji', 'ro': 'Pretindere nesupravegheată pentru învățarea secvenței la secvență', 'sr': 'Neodređeno pretvaranje za sekvencu do učenja sekvence', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරමයක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නැහැ.', 'no': 'Uødvendig trekking for sekvens til sekvenslæring', 'sv': 'Oserverad förevändning för sekvens till sekvensinlärning', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas išankstinis mokymas sekos mokymui', 'ur': 'Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'ta': 'தொடர் கற்றுக்கான முன் பயிற்சி', 'so': 'Waxbarashada aan ilaalinayn', 'vi': 'Không giám sát hình thức đòi hỏi dãy', 'uz': 'Davom etish uchun davom etilmaydi', 'bg': 'Неконтролирано предварително обучение за обучение от последователност към последователност', 'nl': 'Voortraining zonder toezicht voor sequentie naar sequentie leren', 'da': 'Ikke-overvåget foregivende om sekvens til sekvenslæring', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigtes Vortraining für Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Lernen', 'id': 'Unsupervised Pretraining for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'ko': '서열간 학습의 무감독 예훈련', 'fa': 'تغییر تغییر محافظت برای تعلیم سطح به سطح تعلیم', 'sw': 'Mafunzo yasiyopangwa kwa ajili ya Kufuatiliwa kwa Kujifunza', 'tr': 'Sıradan öğrenmek için saklanmadığı Pretraining', 'af': 'Ononderwerpende Pretraining vir Sequence na Sequence Learning', 'sq': 'Parastërvitje pa mbikqyrje për Sekuencën e Mësimit të Sekuencës', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականության սովորելու հաջորդականության համար անվերահսկված նախապատրաստումը', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স শিক্ষা শিক্ষার জন্য প্রেট্রেনিং অনভার করা হয় না', 'az': 'S캼radan 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n S캼radan 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bs': 'Neodređeno pretvaranje za sekvencu do učenja sekvence', 'ca': 'Unsupervised Pretraining for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'cs': 'Nehlídané předškolení pro učení sekvence na sekvenci', 'et': 'Järelevalveta eelõpetamine järjestusest järjestuseni õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Seuraamaton esikoulutus jaksosta jaksoon oppimiseen', 'hr': 'Neodređena pretvaranja za učenje sekvence do sekvence', 'he': 'אימון מראש ללא שליטה עבור רצף ללימוד רצף', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano predvajanje za učenje zaporedja do zaporedja', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'bo': 'sequence to sequence learning'}
{'en': 'This work presents a general unsupervised learning method to improve the accuracy of sequence to sequence (seq2seq) models. In our method, the weights of the encoder and decoder of a seq2seq model are initialized with the pretrained weights of two language models and then fine-tuned with labeled data. We apply this method to challenging benchmarks in machine translation and abstractive summarization and find that it significantly improves the subsequent supervised models. Our main result is that pretraining improves the generalization of seq2seq models. We achieve state-of-the-art results on the WMT EnglishGerman task, surpassing a range of methods using both phrase-based machine translation and neural machine translation. Our method achieves a significant improvement of 1.3 BLEU from th previous best models on both WMT’14 and WMT’15 EnglishGerman. We also conduct human evaluations on abstractive summarization and find that our method outperforms a purely supervised learning baseline in a statistically significant manner.', 'ar': "يقدم هذا العمل طريقة تعلم عامة غير خاضعة للإشراف لتحسين دقة نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (seq2seq). في طريقتنا ، تتم تهيئة أوزان المشفر ووحدة فك التشفير لنموذج seq2seq بالأوزان المحددة مسبقًا لنموذجين من اللغات ثم يتم ضبطها باستخدام البيانات المصنفة. نحن نطبق هذه الطريقة لتحدي المعايير في الترجمة الآلية والتلخيص التجريدي ووجدنا أنها تحسن بشكل كبير النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف اللاحقة. نتيجتنا الرئيسية هي أن التدريب المسبق يحسن تعميم نماذج seq2seq. نحقق أحدث النتائج في مهمة WMT English → German ، متجاوزين مجموعة من الأساليب باستخدام كل من الترجمة الآلية القائمة على العبارات والترجمة الآلية العصبية. طريقتنا تحقق تحسنًا كبيرًا في 1.3 BLEU من أفضل النماذج السابقة على كل من WMT'14 و WMT'15 الإنجليزية → الألمانية. نقوم أيضًا بإجراء تقييمات بشرية على التلخيص التجريدي ونجد أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على خط أساس التعلم الخاضع للإشراف البحت بطريقة ذات دلالة إحصائية.", 'es': "Este trabajo presenta un método general de aprendizaje no supervisado para mejorar la precisión de los modelos secuencia a secuencia (seq2seq). En nuestro método, los pesos del codificador y decodificador de un modelo seq2seq se inicializan con los pesos previamente entrenados de dos modelos de lenguaje y luego se ajustan con datos etiquetados. Aplicamos este método a puntos de referencia desafiantes en la traducción automática y la sumarización abstractiva y descubrimos que mejora significativamente los modelos supervisados posteriores. Nuestro principal resultado es que el preentrenamiento mejora la generalización de los modelos seq2seq. Logramos resultados de vanguardia en la tarea de inglés→alemán del WMT, superando una gama de métodos que utilizan tanto la traducción automática basada en frases como la traducción automática neuronal. Nuestro método logra una mejora significativa de 1.3 BLEU con respecto a los mejores modelos anteriores tanto en WMT'14 como en WMT'15 inglés→alemán. También realizamos evaluaciones humanas sobre el resumen abstractivo y descubrimos que nuestro método supera una línea de base de aprendizaje puramente supervisada de manera estadísticamente significativa.", 'pt': "Este trabalho apresenta um método geral de aprendizado não supervisionado para melhorar a precisão de modelos de sequência a sequência (seq2seq). Em nosso método, os pesos do codificador e do decodificador de um modelo seq2seq são inicializados com os pesos pré-treinados de dois modelos de linguagem e então ajustados com dados rotulados. Aplicamos esse método a benchmarks desafiadores em tradução automática e sumarização abstrativa e descobrimos que ele melhora significativamente os modelos supervisionados subsequentes. Nosso principal resultado é que o pré-treinamento melhora a generalização dos modelos seq2seq. Alcançamos resultados de última geração na tarefa WMT Inglês→Alemão, superando uma variedade de métodos usando tradução automática baseada em frases e tradução automática neural. Nosso método alcança uma melhoria significativa de 1,3 BLEU em relação aos melhores modelos anteriores tanto no WMT'14 quanto no WMT'15 Inglês→Alemão. Também realizamos avaliações humanas na sumarização abstrativa e descobrimos que nosso método supera uma linha de base de aprendizado puramente supervisionada de maneira estatisticamente significativa.", 'fr': "Ce travail présente une méthode générale d'apprentissage non supervisé pour améliorer la précision des modèles séquence à séquence (seq2seq). Dans notre méthode, les poids de l'encodeur et du décodeur d'un modèle seq2seq sont initialisés avec les poids préentraînés de deux modèles de langage, puis ajustés avec des données étiquetées. Nous appliquons cette méthode à des tests de référence complexes dans la traduction automatique et la synthèse abstraite et constatons qu'elle améliore considérablement les modèles supervisés suivants. Notre principal résultat est que le pré-entraînement améliore la généralisation des modèles seq2seq. Nous obtenons des résultats de pointe sur la tâche WMT anglais→allemand, surpassant une gamme de méthodes utilisant à la fois la traduction automatique basée sur des phrases et la traduction automatique neuronale. Notre méthode permet d'obtenir une amélioration significative de 1,3 BLEU par rapport aux meilleurs modèles précédents sur les modèles WMT'14 et WMT'15 anglais→allemand. Nous effectuons également des évaluations humaines sur la synthèse abstraite et constatons que notre méthode surpasse une base d'apprentissage purement supervisée d'une manière statistiquement significative.", 'ja': "この研究は、シーケンスからシーケンスへのシーケンス（ seq 2 seq ）モデルの精度を向上させるための一般的な無教師学習方法を提示している。 私たちの方法では、seq 2 seqモデルのエンコーダとデコーダの重みは、2つの言語モデルの事前に訓練された重みで初期化され、ラベル付けされたデータで微調整されます。 機械翻訳と抽象的な要約における挑戦的なベンチマークにこの方法を適用すると、その後の監督モデルを大幅に改善することがわかります。 私たちの主な結果は、事前トレーニングがseq 2 seqモデルの一般化を改善するということです。 私たちは、フレーズベースの機械翻訳とニューラル機械翻訳の両方を使用して、幅広い方法を超えて、WMT英語→ドイツ語タスクで最先端の結果を達成します。 当社の方法は、WMT '14およびWMT' 15英語→ドイツ語の両方で、以前のベストモデルから1.3 BLEUの大幅な改善を達成します。 抽象的な要約に関する人間の評価も行い、統計学的に有意な方法で、私たちの方法が純粋に監督された学習ベースラインを上回っていることがわかります。", 'zh': '建通用无督学之法,以崇序(seq2seq)模范之准确性。 吾法,seq2seq编码器、解码器用二言,然后用初始化数。 宜于机器翻译象摘要中有挑战性准,显善后监模。 我之大要,预练 seq2seq 模之泛化。 吾于WMT英语→德语取先进之果,越短语之机器翻译,与神经机器翻译之列。 吾道WMT于14WMT15英语→德语成于1.3 BLEU。 又于抽象总结为人工评估,见吾法显于纯督学基线。', 'ru': "В данной работе представлен общий неконтролируемый метод обучения для повышения точности моделей последовательности к последовательности (seq2seq). В нашем методе весовые коэффициенты кодера и декодера модели seq2seq инициализируются с помощью предварительно обученных весовых коэффициентов двух языковых моделей, а затем уточняются с помощью маркированных данных. Мы применяем этот метод к сложным контрольным показателям в машинном переводе и абстрактном обобщении и обнаруживаем, что он значительно улучшает последующие модели под наблюдением. Наш основной результат заключается в том, что предварительное обучение улучшает обобщение моделей seq2seq. Мы достигаем самых современных результатов по задаче WMT English→German, превзойдя ряд методов, используя как машинный перевод на основе фраз, так и нейронный машинный перевод. Наш метод обеспечивает значительное улучшение на 1,3 BLEU по сравнению с предыдущими лучшими моделями как на WMT'14, так и на WMT'15 на английском и→ немецком языках. Мы также проводим оценки человека по абстрактному обобщению и обнаруживаем, что наш метод превосходит чисто контролируемый базовый уровень обучения статистически значимым образом.", 'hi': "यह काम अनुक्रम (seq2seq) मॉडल के लिए अनुक्रम की सटीकता में सुधार करने के लिए एक सामान्य असुरक्षित सीखने की विधि प्रस्तुत करता है। हमारी विधि में, एक seq2seq मॉडल के एन्कोडर और डिकोडर के वजन को दो भाषा मॉडल के पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित वजन के साथ शुरू किया जाता है और फिर लेबल किए गए डेटा के साथ ठीक-ठीक ट्यून किया जाता है। हम इस विधि को मशीन अनुवाद और अमूर्त सारांशीकरण में चुनौतीपूर्ण बेंचमार्क पर लागू करते हैं और पाते हैं कि यह बाद के पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल में काफी सुधार करता है। हमारा मुख्य परिणाम यह है कि pretraining seq2seq मॉडल के सामान्यीकरण में सुधार करता है। हम WMT अंग्रेजी→जर्मन कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं, जो वाक्यांश-आधारित मशीन अनुवाद और तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद दोनों का उपयोग करके तरीकों की एक श्रृंखला को पार करते हैं। हमारी विधि WMT'14 और WMT'15 अंग्रेजी→जर्मन दोनों पर पिछले सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल से 1.3 BLEU का एक महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है। हम अमूर्त सारांशीकरण पर मानव मूल्यांकन भी करते हैं और पाते हैं कि हमारी विधि सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण तरीके से विशुद्ध रूप से पर्यवेक्षित सीखने की आधार रेखा को मात देती है।", 'ga': "Cuireann an obair seo i láthair modh ginearálta foghlama gan mhaoirseacht chun cruinneas na múnlaí seicheamh go seicheamh (seq2seq) a fheabhsú. Inár modh, déantar meáchain an ionchódóra agus an díchódóra de shamhail seq2seq a thúsú le meáchain réamhthraenáilte dhá mhúnla teanga agus ansin iad a mhionchoigeartú le sonraí lipéadaithe. Cuirimid an modh seo i bhfeidhm ar thagarmharcanna dúshlánacha in aistriúchán meaisín agus achoimre teibí agus feicimid go gcuireann sé go mór leis na samhlacha maoirsithe ina dhiaidh sin. Is é an príomhthoradh atá againn ná go bhfeabhsaíonn pretraining ginearálú samhlacha seq2seq. Bainimid torthaí den scoth amach ar thasc WMT Béarla→Gearmáinis, ag dul thar raon modhanna ag baint úsáide as aistriúchán meaisín frása-bhunaithe agus aistriúchán meaisín néarach araon. Baineann ár modh feabhas suntasach de 1.3 BLEU amach ón ú samhlacha is fearr roimhe seo ar WMT'14 agus WMT'15 Béarla→Gearmáinis. Déanaimid meastóireachtaí daonna freisin ar achoimriú teibí agus feicimid go sáraíonn ár modh bonnlíne foghlama atá faoi mhaoirseacht amháin ar bhealach atá suntasach go staitistiúil.", 'ka': "ეს სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაოდ სწავლის მეტი, რომელიც სწავლის წესიერებას (seq2seq) მოდელისთვის უფრო წესიერება. ჩვენი მეთოდიდან, კოდირების და დეკოდირების სიმაღლეები seq2seq მოდელის თნციალურებულია ორი ენის მოდელის მნიშვნელობით და შემდეგ კოდირებულია მონაცემებით. ჩვენ ამ მეთოდის გამოყენება მაქსინური გაგრძელებაში და აბსტრაქტიური გაგრძელებაში ბენქმარიკების შესაძლებელად და აღმოჩენით, რომ ის მნიშვნელოვანია გაუქმედება შემდეგ და ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენა, რომ წარმოდგენა სეq2seq მოდელების გენერალიზაციას უფრო მეტია. WMT ინგლისური გერმანური დავალების შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული მეტოვების პარამეტრების გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოიყენება ფრაზების მაქსინის გადატვირთვა და ნეიროლური მაქ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია 1.3 BLEU-ის წინა უკეთესი მოდელებიდან WMT'14 და WMT'15 ინგლისური გერმანეთიდან. ჩვენ ასევე ადამიანის გავამუშავებთ აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლოების შესახებ და აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო დავამუშავებული სწავლების ფესტატიკურად მნიშვნელ", 'hu': "Ez a munka egy általános, felügyelet nélküli tanulási módszert mutat be a szekvencia-szekvencia modellek pontosságának javítására. Módszerünkben egy seq2Seq modell kódolójának és dekódolójának súlyát két nyelvmodell előkészített súlyával inicializáljuk, majd címkézett adatokkal finomhangoljuk. Ezt a módszert a gépi fordítás és az absztrakt összefoglalás kihívást jelentő referenciaértékeire alkalmazzuk, és úgy találjuk, hogy jelentősen javítja a későbbi felügyelt modelleket. Fő eredményünk, hogy az előkészítés javítja a seq2seq modellek általánosítását. A WMT angol német feladat során korszerű eredményeket érünk el, amelyek számos módszert felülmúlnak a kifejezésalapú gépi fordítással és neurális gépi fordítással egyaránt. Módszerünk jelentős javulást ér el az 1.3 BLEU-val a korábbi legjobb modellekhez képest mind a WMT'14, mind a WMT'15 angol német nyelven. Az absztraktív összefoglalással kapcsolatos humán értékeléseket is végezzük, és megállapítjuk, hogy módszerünk statisztikailag szignifikáns módon felülmúlja a tisztán felügyelt tanulási alapot.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια γενική μέθοδο μάθησης χωρίς επίβλεψη για τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειας των μοντέλων ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία (seq2seq). Στη μέθοδο μας, τα βάρη του κωδικοποιητή και του αποκωδικοποιητή ενός μοντέλου αρχικοποιούνται με τα προκαθορισμένα βάρη δύο γλωσσικών μοντέλων και στη συνέχεια συντονίζονται με επισημασμένα δεδομένα. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτή τη μέθοδο σε απαιτητικά κριτήρια αναφοράς στη μηχανική μετάφραση και την αφηρημένη σύνοψη και διαπιστώνουμε ότι βελτιώνει σημαντικά τα επόμενα εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα. Το κύριο αποτέλεσμα μας είναι ότι η προεπιλογή βελτιώνει τη γενίκευση των μοντέλων. Επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο έργο της αγγλικής γερμανικής, ξεπερνώντας μια σειρά μεθόδων χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο τη φραστική μηχανική μετάφραση όσο και τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση. Η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει σημαντική βελτίωση του 1.3 από τα προηγούμενα καλύτερα μοντέλα τόσο στα Αγγλικά όσο και στα Αγγλικά Γερμανικά. Επίσης διεξάγουμε ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις σχετικά με την αφηρημένη σύνοψη και διαπιστώνουμε ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά μια καθαρά εποπτευμένη βάση μάθησης με στατιστικά σημαντικό τρόπο.', 'mk': "Оваа работа претставува генерален ненадгледуван метод на учење за подобрување на точноста на секвенцијата на моделите на секвенција (seq2seq). Во нашиот метод, тежините на кодерот и декодерот на моделот seq2seq се иницијализирани со претренираните тежини на два јазички модели и потоа фино прилагодени со означени податоци. Ние го применуваме овој метод на предизвикувањето на benchmarks во машинскиот превод и апстрактивната резултатација и откриваме дека значително ги подобрува следните надгледувани модели. Нашиот главен резултат е дека претренирањето ја подобрува генерализацијата на моделите seq2seq. Ние постигнуваме најсовремени резултати на англиската германска задача на ВМТ, надминувајќи голем број методи користејќи и машински превод базиран на фрази и невропски машински превод. Нашиот метод постигнува значително подобрување на 1,3 БЛЕУ од претходните најдобри модели на англиски германски WMT'14 и WMT'15. Ние, исто така, спроведуваме човечки проценки за апстрактивна резултатација и откриваме дека нашиот метод надминува чисто надгледувана основа на учење на статистички значителен начин.", 'lt': "Šiame darbe pateikiamas bendras neprižiūrimas mokymosi metodas, kuriuo siekiama pagerinti sekos tikslumą sekos (seq2seq) modeliams. Mūsų metodu seq2seq modelio koduotojo ir dekoderio svoriai inicijuojami dviejų kalbų modelių iš anksto apmokytomis svoriais, o vėliau tiksliai pritaikyti žymėtais duomenimis. We apply this method to challenging benchmarks in machine translation and abstractive summarization and find that it significantly improves the subsequent supervised models.  Pagrindinis mūsų rezultatas yra tai, kad išankstinis mokymas pagerina seq2seq modelių generalizaciją. Mes pasiekiame naujausius rezultatus WMT anglų kalbos užduotyje vokiečių kalba, viršijant įvairius metodus naudojant tiek frazėmis pagrįstą mašinų vertimą, tiek neurologinį mašinų vertimą. Mūsų metodas gerokai pagerina 1,3 BLEU, palyginti su ankstesniais geriausiais modeliais WMT'14 ir WMT'15 anglų kalba. Taip pat atliekame žmonių vertinimus abstraktyvios santraukos atžvilgiu ir nustatome, kad mūsų metodas statistiškai reikšmingai viršija visiškai prižiūrimą mokymosi bazę.", 'ms': "Kerja ini menghasilkan kaedah pembelajaran umum yang tidak diawasi untuk meningkatkan ketepatan urutan ke model urutan (seq2seq). Dalam kaedah kami, berat pengekod dan dekoder model seq2seq diawalkan dengan berat-berat terlatih dua model bahasa dan kemudian disesuaikan dengan data yang ditabel. Kami menerapkan kaedah ini untuk menantang tanda referensi dalam terjemahan mesin dan ringkasan abstraktif dan mendapati bahawa ia meningkatkan secara signifikan model yang dikendalikan berikutnya. Hasil utama kita adalah bahawa pretraining meningkatkan keseluruhan model seq2seq. Kami mencapai keputusan terbaik dalam tugas bahasa Jerman WMT, melebihi julat kaedah menggunakan kedua-dua terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa dan terjemahan mesin saraf. Kaedah kami mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dari 1.3 BLEU dari model terbaik ke-th terdahulu pada kedua-dua WMT'14 dan WMT'15 bahasa Inggeris. Kami juga melakukan penilaian manusia pada ringkasan abstraktif dan mencari bahawa kaedah kami melampaui dasar pembelajaran yang diawasi secara murni dengan cara statistik yang signifikan.", 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ (സെക്ക്\u200c2seq) മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d, സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് മോഡലിന്റെ തൂക്കങ്ങളും കോഡിഡറും തുടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയ മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളില്\u200d ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തിലും അസ് നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനഫലമെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d മഴ പെയ്യുന്നത് സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് മോഡലുകളുടെ ജനറലിഷന്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടു WMT ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ജോലിക്കാരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഫോള്\u200dട്ട് ഫോള്\u200dട്ട് നാം നേടുന്നു. വാക്ക് അടിസ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മുമ്പുള്ള ഏറ്റവും മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും 1.3 ബിലിയുവിന്റെ ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ മെച്ചപ്പെ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d മാത്രം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെ', 'mt': "Dan ix-xogħol jippreżenta metodu ġenerali ta’ tagħlim mhux sorveljat biex itejjeb il-preċiżjoni tas-sekwenza għal mudelli ta’ sekwenza (seq2seq). Fil-metodu tagħna, il-piżijiet tal-kodifikatur u d-dekoder ta’ mudell seq2seq jiġu inizjalizzati bil-piżijiet imħarrġa minn qabel ta’ żewġ mudelli lingwistiċi u mbagħad imnaqqsa b’dejta ttikkettata. Aħna napplikaw dan il-metodu għall-punti ta’ riferiment ta’ sfida fit-traduzzjoni bil-magna u fil-qosor astrattiv u nsibu li dan itejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-mudelli sussegwenti sorveljati. Ir-riżultat ewlieni tagħna huwa li t-taħriġ minn qabel itejjeb il-ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-mudelli seq2seq. Aħna nilħqu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar il-kompitu tal-Ġermaniż bl-Ingliż tal-WMT, li jaqbżu firxa ta’ metodi bl-użu kemm tat-traduzzjoni bil-magna bbażata fuq il-frażi kif ukoll tat-traduzzjoni bil-magna newrali. Il-metodu tagħna jikseb titjib sinifikanti ta' 1.3 BLEU mill-a ħjar mudelli preċedenti kemm fuq WMT'14 kif ukoll fuq WMT'15 Ingliż Ġermaniż. Għandna nagħmlu wkoll evalwazzjonijiet tal-bniedem dwar sommarju astrattiv u nsibu li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż linja bażi ta’ tagħlim purament sorveljata b’mod statistikament sinifikanti.", 'mn': "Энэ ажил дарааллын дарааллын тодорхойлолтыг (seq2seq) загвар руу сайжруулахын тулд ерөнхий баталгаагүй суралцах аргыг харуулдаг. Бидний арга хэлбэрээр сек2сек загварын кодлогч болон кодлогчийн жин нь хоёр хэл загварын түвшинд эхлэгдсэн бөгөөд дараа нь тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийг тодорхойлдог. Бид энэ аргыг машины хөрөнгө оруулалт, абстрактив дүгнэлт болон дараагийн удирдлагын загваруудыг маш чухал сайжруулж чадна. Бидний үндсэн үр дүнг нь суурилуулах нь seq2seq загварын ерөнхийлөгчийг сайжруулдаг. Бид WMT Англи Германы ажил дээр урлагийн үр дүн гаргаж, хэлбэрээр суурилсан машин хөгжүүлэлт болон мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлтийг ашиглан олон арга замыг дамжуулж байна. Бидний арга нь WMT'14 болон WMT'15 Англи хэлний Германы хамгийн сайн загваруудын 1.3 BLEU-ын сайжруулалттай сайжруулалт гаргадаг. Бид мөн хүн төрөлхтний тодорхойлолтын үнэлгээ хийж, бидний арга нь статистикийн хэлбэрээр зөвхөн удирдагдсан суралцах суралцах суралцах суурь шугамыг багасгаж чадна.", 'pl': "W pracy przedstawiono ogólną metodę uczenia się bez nadzoru w celu poprawy dokładności modeli sekwencji do sekwencji (seq2seq). W naszej metodzie wagi kodera i dekodera modelu seq2seq są inicjalizowane za pomocą wstępnie trenowanych wag dwóch modeli językowych, a następnie dostrajane za pomocą etykietowanych danych. Stosujemy tę metodę do wymagających poziomów referencyjnych w tłumaczeniu maszynowym i abstrakcyjnym streszczeniu i stwierdzamy, że znacząco poprawia kolejne nadzorowane modele. Naszym głównym rezultatem jest to, że trening wstępny poprawia uogólnienie modeli seq2seq. Osiągamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki w zakresie zadania WMT English German, przewyższając szereg metod wykorzystujących zarówno tłumaczenie maszynowe oparte na frazach, jak i tłumaczenie maszynowe neuronowe. Nasza metoda osiąga znaczącą poprawę 1.3 BLEU w stosunku do poprzednich najlepszych modeli zarówno na WMT'14, jak i WMT'15 angielski niemiecki. Przeprowadzamy również ludzkie oceny abstrakcyjnego podsumowania i stwierdzamy, że nasza metoda przewyższa czysto nadzorowaną bazę nauki w istotny statystycznie sposób.", 'no': "Dette arbeidet viser ein generell ulike læringsmetode for å forbetra nøyaktigheten av sekvens til sekvensmodeller (seq2seq). I metoden vårt er vektene av koderen og dekoderen av ein seq2seq-modell starta med dei pretrende vektene av to språk-modeller og så fint oppsett med merkelige data. Vi bruker denne metoden til å utfordre benchmarken i maskineomsetjing og abstraktiv sammendrag og finn at det betydelig forbedrar dei følgjande oversikte modelane. Våre hovudresultatet er at trekking forbedrar generellisering av seq2seq-modeller. Vi oppnår status-of-the-art resultatet på WMT-engelsk tysk oppgåve, som overpassar eit rekkjefølgje metodar med både oversettelse av maskinen som er basert på fråsetjingar og neuralmaskineomsetjingar. Metoden vårt gjer ein betydelig forbedring av 1,3 BLEU frå tidlegare beste modeller på både WMT'14 og WMT'15 engelsk tysk. Vi gjer også menneske evalueringar om abstraktive sammendrag og finn at metoden vårt utfører ein reint oversikt læringsbaseline på ein statistisk signifikant måte.", 'ro': "Această lucrare prezintă o metodă generală de învățare nesupravegheată pentru a îmbunătăți acuratețea modelelor secvență la secvență (seq2seq). În metoda noastră, greutățile codificatorului și decodorului unui model seq2seq sunt inițializate cu greutățile pre-instruite ale două modele lingvistice și apoi reglate fin cu date etichetate. Aplicăm această metodă criteriilor de referință provocatoare în traducerea automată și rezumarea abstractivă și constatăm că aceasta îmbunătățește semnificativ modelele supravegheate ulterioare. Principalul nostru rezultat este că pretraining îmbunătățește generalizarea modelelor seq2seq. Obținem rezultate de ultimă oră în cadrul misiunii WMT Engleză Germană, depășind o gamă largă de metode utilizând atât traducerea automată bazată pe fraze, cât și traducerea automată neurală. Metoda noastră realizează o îmbunătățire semnificativă de 1.3 BLEU față de cele mai bune modele anterioare atât pe WMT'14, cât și WMT'15 Engleză Germană. De asemenea, efectuăm evaluări umane privind rezumarea abstractivă și constatăm că metoda noastră depășește o bază de învățare pur supravegheată într-o manieră semnificativă statistic.", 'sr': "Ovaj rad predstavlja generalnu neodređenu metodu učenja kako bi poboljšala preciznost sekvence do modela sekvence (seq2seq). U našoj metodi, težina kodera i dekodera model a seq2seq inicijalizovana su sa pretkivnim težinama dva jezičkog modela, a zatim se fino uključuje sa označenim podacima. Mi primjenjujemo ovu metodu na izazov kriterija prevoda i abstraktivne sažetke i saznamo da značajno poboljšava sledeće nadzorne modele. Naš glavni rezultat je da pretkivanje poboljšava generalizaciju seq2seq modela. Postignemo rezultate umetnosti na njemačkom zadatku WMT-a, prelazeći niz metoda koristeći i prevod mašine na frazi i neuralni prevod mašine. Naš metod postiže značajno poboljšanje 1,3 BLEU od prethodnih najboljih modela na WMT'14 i WMT'15 njemačkom engleskom. Takođe vodimo ljudske procjene o abstraktivnoj sažeti i saznamo da naš metod iznosi čisto nadgledan početak učenja na statistički značajan način.", 'it': "Questo lavoro presenta un metodo di apprendimento generale non supervisionato per migliorare l'accuratezza dei modelli sequenza-sequenza (seq2Seq). Nel nostro metodo, i pesi dell'encoder e del decoder di un modello seq2Seq vengono inizializzati con i pesi pre-addestrati di due modelli di lingua e poi perfezionati con dati etichettati. Applichiamo questo metodo a benchmark impegnativi nella traduzione automatica e nella sintesi astratta e scopriamo che migliora significativamente i modelli supervisionati successivi. Il nostro principale risultato è che il pretraining migliora la generalizzazione dei modelli seq2seq. Otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia nel compito WMT English German, superando una gamma di metodi che utilizzano sia la traduzione automatica basata su frasi che la traduzione automatica neurale. Il nostro metodo raggiunge un significativo miglioramento di 1.3 BLEU rispetto ai precedenti migliori modelli sia WMT'14 che WMT'15 Inglese Tedesco. Conduciamo anche valutazioni umane sulla sintesi astratta e scopriamo che il nostro metodo supera una base di apprendimento puramente supervisionata in modo statisticamente significativo.", 'so': "Shaqadaasu wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa qaab waxbarasho oo dhan oo aan la ilaalinayn, si uu u kordhino saxda xiliga (seq2seq). Qiimahayaga, miisaanka koorada iyo codsiga modelka seq2seq waxaa la bilaabay miisaanka hore oo ah labada qaab oo luqad ah, kadibna waxaa lagu qoray macluumaad la qoray. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaababkan si aan u qasbno qiimeynta turjumidda machineedka iyo kaartaynta oo aan u baahneyno in uu si weyn u beddelo modelalka soo socda. Sababteeda ugu horeeya waa in dib u dhigidda uu kordhiyo qaababka seq2seq. Shaqada WMT Ingiriis ee Jarmalka ah ayaannu dhamaystirnaa arimaha farshaxanka ah oo ku qoran qaabooyin badan oo ku isticmaalaya turjuma machine-based iyo tarjumista neural machine. Our method achieves a significant improvement of 1.3 BLEU from th previous best models on both WMT'14 and WMT'15 English German.  Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta dadka oo ku saabsan qiimeynta jimicsiga ah, waxaana ognahay in qaab qiimaha ah oo lagu ilaaliyo qorshaha waxbarashada.", 'kk': "Бұл жұмыс реттеу (seq2seq) моделдерінің дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін жалпы оқыту әдісін көрсетеді. Біздің әдімімізде, сек2сек моделінің кодерлердің және декодерлердің тегі екі тіл моделінің тегімен инициализацияланады және содан кейін жарлықталған деректермен жақсы түзетіледі. Бұл әдістерді машина аудару мен абстрактивті тұжырымдамасының бақылау белгілерін шешуге қолданып, келесі бақылау үлгілерін өзгерту үшін табыладық. Біздің негізгі нәтижеміміз сек2сек үлгілерін жалғастыру. Біз WMT ағылшын тіліндік тапсырмасының күй- жағдайлық нәтижелерін жеткіземіз, сөздерді негіздеген машинаны аудару мен невралдық машинаны аудару арқылы бірнеше әдістерді ауысты Біздің әдіміміз WMT'14 және WMT'15 ағылшын тілінің алдыңғы ең жақсы моделдерінен 1.3 BLEU жақсы жақсарту үшін жеткізеді. Сонымен қатар, адамдардың абстрактивті тұжырымдамасын бағалап, әдіміздің статистикалық түрде оқыту негізгі жолын бақылап тұрады.", 'sv': "Detta arbete presenterar en generell oövervakad inlärningsmetod för att förbättra noggrannheten i sekvens till sekvens (seq2seq) modeller. I vår metod initieras vikterna av encoder och avkodare för en sek2seq modell med de förkränade vikterna för två språkmodeller och finjusteras sedan med märkta data. Vi tillämpar denna metod på utmanande riktmärken inom maskinöversättning och abstraktiv sammanfattning och finner att den avsevärt förbättrar efterföljande övervakade modeller. Vårt huvudsakliga resultat är att pretraining förbättrar generaliseringen av sek2seq modeller. Vi uppnår toppmoderna resultat på WMT:s engelska tyska uppgift och överträffar en rad olika metoder med både frasbaserad maskinöversättning och neural maskinöversättning. Vår metod uppnår en signifikant förbättring av 1,3 BLEU från de tidigare bästa modellerna på både WMT'14 och WMT'15 engelska tyska. Vi genomför även humana utvärderingar av abstraktiv sammanfattning och finner att vår metod överträffar en rent övervakad inlärningsgräns på ett statistiskt signifikant sätt.", 'ta': "இந்த வேலை தொடர்ச்சியின் சரியான தொடர்ச்சியை மேம்படுத்த ஒரு பொதுவான பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத கற்றி முறைமையை கூட்டுகிறது. எங்கள் முறைமையில், குறியீட்டின் எடையும் மற்றும் குறியீட்டாளரின் குறியீட்டுகளும் துவங்கப்பட்டுள்ளது இரண்டு மொழி மாதிரிகளின் மாதிரிகளி கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் செயல்படுத்தல் மற்றும் சுருக்கத்தை சவால் செய்ய இந்த முறையை நாம் பயன்படுத்தி பின்வரும் கண்காணிக்கப்பட Our main result is that pretraining improves the generalization of seq2seq models.  WMT ஆங்கிலம் ஜெர்மன் பணியின் மேல் நாம் மாநிலை- கலை முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறோம், சொற்றொடர் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள இயந்திரத் மொழிமாற்றி மற்றும்  முந்தைய சிறந்த மாதிரிகளில் இருந்து 1.3 பிலியு முன்னேற்றத்தை முடிக்கும் முறையான முறைமையை வெற்றுகிறது WMT '14 மற்றும நாம் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சுருக்கம் பற்றி மனித மதிப்புகளை செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் முறைமையை புள்ளிவிவரமாக முக்கியமான முறையில் கண", 'ur': "یہ کام ایک عمومی غیر قابل تعلیم کی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ اس طریقہ کے دقیق (seq2seq) نمڈلوں تک سیدھا کرے۔ ہمارے طریقے میں، ایک سq2seq موڈل کا کوڈر اور ڈیکوڈر کا وزن دو زبان موڈل کے پہلے بوجھ سے آغاز کیا جاتا ہے اور پھر لابلیٹ ڈیٹے سے اچھی طرح تدبیر کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے اس طریقہ کو ماشین ترجمہ اور غیرقابل ترجمہ میں بنچم مارک کو مشکل کرنے کے لئے لازم کیا ہے اور یہ دیکھ رہے ہیں کہ اس کے بعد نظارت کی مدل کو اضافہ کرتا ہے. ہماری اصلی نتیجہ یہ ہے کہ پرٹرینٹ ڈھیر سی 2سک موڈلز کی عمومی سازی سے بہتر ہوتی ہے۔ ہم WMT انگلیسی جرمن کے تابع پر قائم رہے ہیں، جو فریز بنیادی ماشین ترجمہ اور نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے مطابق طریقے سے بہت سی طریقے سے زیادہ گزر رہے ہیں. ہمارا طریقہ 1.3 BLEU کی ایک بڑی اچھی سوداگری حاصل کرتا ہے WMT'14 اور WMT'15 انگلیسی جرمن کے بارے میں سے پہلے بہترین موڈل سے۔ ہم نے انسان کی ارزیابی کو اچھی طرح کے ذریعے ادارہ کیا ہے اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ صرف تحقیق کی سیکھنے والی بنیاس لین کو ایک ایسے معتبر طریقے سے کامل کرتا ہے۔", 'si': "මේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ ඉගෙන ගන්න විධානයක් තියෙනවා ක්\u200dරමාණය (seq2seq) මොඩේල් වලට සුදු අපේ විධානයෙන්, සෙක්ස්2සෙක් මොඩේලයේ කෝඩර් සහ ඩිකෝඩර් වර්ගය පටන් ගත්තා භාෂා මොඩේල් දෙකක් වර්ගයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරලා තියෙ අපි මේ විධානය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ මැෂින් වාර්ථාව සහ අවශ්\u200dය සාර්ථාවක් වලට බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න සහ හ හොයාගන්නේ  අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තමයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තමයි seq2seq මොඩේල්ස් එකේ සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩ කරනවා. අපි WMT ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජර්මන් වැඩේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙනවා, ප්\u200dරතිචාර අධාරිත පද්ධති පද්ධති පද්ධති  අපේ විධානය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් 1.3 BLUE ගැන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා WMT'14 සහ WMT'15 ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජර්මන් වලින්  අපි මිනිස්සුන්ගේ විශේෂණය අවශ්\u200dයාවක් කරනවා සහ අපේ විධානය පුරුද්ගලික විධානයක් ස්ථානික විශේෂ විධානයක්", 'uz': "Name Bizning usulida, seq2seq modelining kodlash usuli va kodlash usulining balandligi boshlanadi. Ikki tillar modellarining qiymati bilan ishga tushirilgan va keyin cheksiz maʼlumot bilan yaxshi bog'liq. Biz bu usulni mashina tarjima va abstraktiv tahrirlashni qidirish uchun qo'llanmiz va keyingi taʼminlovchi modellarni o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Bizning asosiy natijalarimiz shunday qilishimiz, seq2seq modellarning generalisini oshirish mumkin. Biz WMT ingliz tili vazifasi haqida saqlash natijalarini bajaramiz, bir so'zlar asosida mashina tarjima va neural maskina tarjima qilish bilan bir necha metodlarni bajaramiz. Our method achieves a significant improvement of 1.3 BLEU from th previous best models on both WMT'14 and WMT'15 English German.  Biz odamning qiymatlarini abstraktiv tahrirlash haqida bajaramiz va bizning usuli faqat o'rganish o'rganish asosiy sohasini statistik muhim usulda bajaradi.", 'vi': "Công trình này cung cấp một phương pháp học chung không giám sát để nâng cao độ chính xác của các mô hình lặp lại (seq2seq). Theo phương pháp của chúng tôi, tạ lượng mã hóa và mã giải của mô hình seq2seq được khởi tạo bằng tạ phải của hai mô hình ngôn ngữ và sau đó chỉnh chính xác với dữ liệu dán nhãn. Chúng tôi dùng phương pháp này để thử thách những tiêu chuẩn trong dịch chuyển máy và tóm tắt trừu tượng. Và chúng tôi thấy nó cải thiện đáng kể các mô hình giám sát sau đó. Kết quả chính của chúng ta là lượng tuyết trước sẽ cải thiện việc tổng hợp các mô hình Kq2seq. Chúng tôi đạt được kết quả tối tân về công việc của Đức WRT, vượt qua một loạt các phương pháp dùng cả dịch ra máy và dịch thiết bị thần kinh. Cách của chúng tôi đạt đến một sự cải tiến đáng kể của 1.3 bắn từ những mẫu tốt nhất trước về cả WRT'14 và WRT'15 tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi cũng thực hiện đánh giá con người về việc tổng hợp thu nhỏ và thấy rằng phương pháp của chúng tôi hoàn toàn được giám sát để thực hiện cơ sở học theo thống kê.", 'da': "Dette arbejde præsenterer en generel uautoriseret læringsmetode til at forbedre nøjagtigheden af sekvens til sekvens (sekvens) modeller. I vores metode initialiseres vægtene af encoder og dekoder af en sek2seq model med de forudtrænede vægte af to sprogmodeller og derefter finjusteres med mærkede data. Vi anvender denne metode til udfordrende benchmarks inden for maskinoversættelse og abstraktiv opsummering og finder, at den forbedrer de efterfølgende overvågede modeller betydeligt. Vores primære resultat er, at forudtræning forbedrer generaliseringen af sek2seq modeller. Vi opnår state-of-the-art resultater på WMT engelsk tysk opgave, der overgår en række metoder ved hjælp af både sætningsbaseret maskinoversættelse og neural maskinoversættelse. Vores metode opnår en betydelig forbedring på 1,3 BLEU fra de tidligere bedste modeller på både WMT'14 og WMT'15 engelsk tysk. Vi gennemfører også menneskelige evalueringer af abstraktiv opsummering og finder ud af, at vores metode overgår en rent overvåget læringsbaseline på en statistisk signifikant måde.", 'nl': "Dit werk presenteert een algemene leermethode zonder toezicht om de nauwkeurigheid van seq2seq-modellen te verbeteren. In onze methode worden de gewichten van de encoder en decoder van een seq2seq model geïnitialiseerd met de vooraf getrainde gewichten van twee taalmodellen en vervolgens verfijnd met gelabelde gegevens. We passen deze methode toe op uitdagende benchmarks in machinevertaling en abstractieve samenvatting en stellen vast dat het de daaropvolgende begeleide modellen aanzienlijk verbetert. Ons belangrijkste resultaat is dat pretraining de generalisatie van seq2seq modellen verbetert. We bereiken state-of-the-art resultaten op de WMT Engels Duits taak, die een scala aan methoden overtreffen met zowel zinnengebaseerde machinevertaling als neurale machinevertaling. Onze methode bereikt een significante verbetering van 1.3 BLEU ten opzichte van de vorige beste modellen op zowel WMT'14 als WMT'15 Engels Duits. We voeren ook menselijke evaluaties uit op abstractieve samenvatting en constateren dat onze methode een zuiver begeleide leerbaseline op een statistisch significante manier overtreft.", 'hr': "Ovaj rad predstavlja općeg neodređenog metoda učenja kako bi poboljšala preciznost sekvencije do modela sekvencije (seq2seq). U našoj metodi, težina kodera i dekodera model a seq2seq inicijalizirana su sa pretkišnim težinama dva jezičkog modela i potom ispravljena označenim podacima. Primjenjujemo ovu metodu na izazov kriterija prevoda strojeva i apstraktivne sažetke i saznamo da značajno poboljšava sljedeće nadzorne modele. Naš glavni rezultat je da pretkivanje poboljšava generalizaciju seq2seq modela. Doživljavamo rezultate umjetnosti na njemačkom zadatku WMT-a, prelazeći niz metoda koristeći prevod strojeva na frazi i prevod neuralne strojeve. Naš metod postiže značajno poboljšanje 1,3 BLEU od prethodnih najboljih modela na WMT'14 i WMT'15 njemačkom engleskom. Također provodimo ljudske procjene o apstraktivnoj sažetici i otkrivamo da naš metod iznosi čisto nadziran početak učenja na statistički značajan način.", 'bg': 'В настоящата работа е представен общ метод на обучение без надзор за подобряване на точността на моделите последователност към последователност (seq2seq). В нашия метод теглата на кодера и декодера на модел се инициализират с предварително тренирани тегла на два езикови модела и след това фино настройват с етикетирани данни. Ние прилагаме този метод към предизвикателни показатели в машинния превод и абстрактното обобщаване и откриваме, че той значително подобрява последващите надзорни модели. Нашият основен резултат е, че предтренингът подобрява обобщаването на моделите. Ние постигаме най-съвременни резултати по задачата по английски немски език, надминавайки редица методи, използвайки както фразов машинен превод, така и невронен машинен превод. Нашият метод постига значително подобрение от 1.3 спрямо предишните най-добри модели както на английски немски език. Ние също така провеждаме човешки оценки на абстрактното обобщаване и откриваме, че нашият метод превъзхожда чисто контролираната учебна база по статистически значим начин.', 'id': "Kerja ini mempersembahkan metode belajar umum yang tidak diawasi untuk meningkatkan akurasi urutan ke model urutan (seq2seq). Dalam metode kita, berat koder dan dekoder model seq2seq diinisialisasikan dengan berat-berat terlatih dari dua model bahasa dan kemudian disesuaikan dengan data yang ditabel. Kami menerapkan metode ini untuk menantang benchmarks dalam terjemahan mesin dan ringkasan abstraktif dan menemukan bahwa hal itu meningkatkan dengan signifikan model yang diawasi berikutnya. Hasil utama kita adalah bahwa pretraining meningkatkan generalisasi model seq2seq. Kami mencapai hasil terbaik dalam tugas Inggris WMT Jerman, melebihi jangkauan metode menggunakan kedua-duanya terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa dan terjemahan mesin saraf. Metode kami mencapai peningkatan signifikan dari 1,3 BLEU dari model terbaik ke-th sebelumnya di WMT'14 dan WMT'15 Jerman Inggris. We also conduct human evaluations on abstractive summarization and find that our method outperforms a purely supervised learning baseline in a statistically significant manner.", 'fa': "این کار یک روش یادگیری عمومی را نشان می\u200cدهد که دقیقات سطح به مدل\u200cهای سq2seq را بهتر کند. در روش ما، وزن\u200cهای یک مدل seq2seq کودکتر و دکوردر یک مدل سq2seq با وزن\u200cهای پیش\u200cگیری دو مدل زبان آغاز می\u200cشوند و سپس با داده\u200cهای نقاشی آغاز می\u200cشوند. ما این روش را برای مشکل کردن برچسب\u200cها در ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و جمع\u200cآوری abstractive تغییر می\u200cدهیم و پیدا می\u200cکنیم که این مدل\u200cهای بعدی را بسیار بهتر می\u200cکند. نتیجه اصلی ما این است که جلوی جلوی جلوی جلوی جلوی جلوگیری مدل\u200cهای سq2seq را بهتر می\u200cکند. ما نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در کار آلمانی WMT می\u200cرسانیم، با استفاده از ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی به عبارت از جمله\u200cهای روش استفاده می\u200cکنیم. روش ما به بهترین توسعه ۱.۳ BLEU از بهترین مدل های قبل در هر دو WMT'14 و WMT'15 آلمانی انگلیسی رسیده است. ما همچنین ارزیابی\u200cهای انسان را در مورد جمع\u200cآوری abstractive انجام می\u200cدهیم و می\u200cیابیم که روش\u200cهایمان از یک خط پایین\u200cشناسی کاملاً تحت نظر گرفته\u200cایم، به طریق استاراتیک مهم\u200cتر انجام می\u200cدهد.", 'de': "Diese Arbeit stellt eine allgemeine Methode des unbeaufsichtigten Lernens vor, um die Genauigkeit von seq2seq-Modellen zu verbessern. In unserer Methode werden die Gewichte des Encoders und Decoders eines seq2seq-Modells mit den vortrainierten Gewichten zweier Sprachmodelle initialisiert und anschließend mit beschrifteten Daten fein abgestimmt. Wir wenden diese Methode auf anspruchsvolle Benchmarks in der maschinellen Übersetzung und abstraktiven Zusammenfassung an und stellen fest, dass sie die nachfolgenden überwachten Modelle signifikant verbessert. Unser Hauptergebnis ist, dass Vortraining die Generalisierung von seq2seq Modellen verbessert. Wir erzielen modernste Ergebnisse bei der WMT English German Aufgabe und übertreffen eine Reihe von Methoden, die sowohl phrasenbasierte maschinelle Übersetzung als auch neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung verwenden. Unsere Methode erzielt eine signifikante Verbesserung von 1.3 BLEU gegenüber den bisherigen besten Modellen sowohl auf WMT'14 als auch auf WMT'15 Englisch Deutsch. Wir führen auch menschliche Auswertungen zur abstraktiven Zusammenfassung durch und stellen fest, dass unsere Methode eine rein überwachte Lerngrundlage statistisch signifikant übertrifft.", 'tr': 'Bu iş seq2seq nusgalarynyň dogrylygyny üstinmek üçin umumy taýýarlanmadyk öwrenme yöntemi görkezýär. Biziň yönümizde, seq2seq nusgasynyň a ğırlygy we kodçysynyň ağırlygy iki dil nusgasynyň ön tarapy bilen başlandyrylýar we soňra etiket edilen maglumatlar bilen düzelenýärler. Biz bu yöntemi maşynyň terjimesinde we abstraktiwny terjime eden etimleri çözmek üçin uygulapdyrys we yzyndaky gözlemli modelleri örän gowurarak bilýäris. Biziň esasy netijesimiz bolan ýagdaýymyz seq2seq nusgalarynyň döredilişini üýtgedýär. WMT Iňlis dilinde nemesçe täsirinde, fraz daýanýan makina terjimesini we neural makina terjimesini ulanan hili yönlerden geçirip bardyk. Biziň ýüregimiz WMT 14 we WMT 15 iňlisçe Germaniýanyň öňki iň gowy nusgalaryndan 1.3 BLEU gowulaşdyrylygyny çözýär. Biz hem adamlaryň çözümlerini abstraktiv jemgyýetleşdirmegi barada çykýarys we çözümlerimizin statistik ýaly möhüm bir şekilde üýtgedigini tapdyk.', 'af': "Hierdie werk stel 'n algemene ongeonderwerpende leermeetode voor te verbeter die presisie van reeks na volgorde (seq2seq) modele. In ons metode, die gewigte van die enkoder en dekoder van 'n seq2seq modeel word geïnisialiseer met die vorreënde gewigte van twee taal modele en dan fyn- tuned met etiketeerde data. Ons wend hierdie metode toe om benchmarke in masjien vertaling en abstraktiewe opsomming te laat optrek en vind dat dit betekeurig die volgende ondersoekte modele verbeter. Ons hoofresultaat is dat die pretraining die generellisering van seq2seq-modelles verbeter. Ons bereik staat-van-die-kuns resultate op die WMT Engelse Duitse taak, deur 'n reek metodes te verbygaan deur beide frase-gebaseerde masjien vertaling en neurale masjien vertaling te gebruik. Ons metode bereik 'n betekende verbetering van 1.3 BLEU van die vorige beste modele op beide WMT'14 en WMT'15 Engels Duits. Ons doen ook menslike evaluasies op abstraktiewe opsomming en vind dat ons metode 'n pur ondersoekte leer basislien uitvoer op 'n statistiese betekende manier.", 'sw': "Kazi hii inaonyesha njia ya kujifunza kwa ujumla usiohifadhiwa ili kuboresha uhakika wa mifano ya ufuatiliaji (seq2seq). Katika njia yetu, mizani ya kodi na decodi ya muundo wa seq2seq zinaanzishwa na mizani ya mifano miwili ya lugha na kisha imewekwa vizuri kwa taarifa zilizowekwa. Tunatumia njia hii ya kupambana na kanuni katika tafsiri ya mashine na muhtasari usio na maanani na kutambua kwamba imebadilisha mifano inayofuatiliwa. Matokeo yetu ya msingi ni kwamba kutengeneza matumizi ya mitindo ya seq2seq. Tunaweza kupata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye kazi ya WMT ya Kiingereza, kupitia mbinu nyingi kwa kutumia tafsiri za mashine yenye msingi wa maneno na tafsiri ya kisasa. Utawala wetu unaweza kupata maboresho makubwa ya BLEU 1.3 kutoka mifano bora ya zamani ya WMT'14 na WMT'15 Kiingereza. We also conduct human evaluations on abstractive summarization and find that our method outperforms a purely supervised learning baseline in a statistically significant manner.", 'sq': "Ky punë paraqet një metodë të përgjithshme mësimi pa mbikqyrje për të përmirësuar saktësinë e sekuencës së modeleve (seq2seq). Në metodën tonë, peshat e koduesit dhe dekoderit të një modeli seq2seq inicializohen me peshat e parastërvitura të dy modeleve gjuhësore dhe pastaj rregullohen me të dhëna të etiketuara. Ne aplikojmë këtë metodë për të sfiduar referencat në përkthimin e makinave dhe përmbledhjen abstraktive dhe zbulojmë se kjo përmirëson ndjeshëm modelet e mbikqyrura më pas. Rezultati ynë kryesor është se parastërvitja përmirëson gjeneralizimin e modeleve seq2seq. Ne arrijmë rezultate më të larta në detyrën gjermane të WMT-së, duke kaluar një gamë metodash duke përdorur si përkthimin e makinave me bazë fraze dhe përkthimin e makinave nervore. Metoda jonë arrin një përmirësim të rëndësishëm prej 1.3 BLEU nga modelet e mëparshëm më të mira të WMT'14 dhe WMT'15 gjermane angleze. Ne gjithashtu kryejmë vlerësime njerëzore mbi përmbledhjen abstrakte dhe zbulojmë se metoda jonë mbikqyr një bazë të mësimit të mbikqyrur në një mënyrë statistikisht të rëndësishme.", 'ko': "본고는 서열에서 서열(seq2seq)모델까지의 정밀도를 높이기 위해 통용되는 무감독 학습 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법에서 seq2seq모델의 인코더와 디코더의 권한은 두 가지 언어 모델의 예비 트레이닝 권한을 초기화한 다음에 표기 데이터를 사용하여 미세하게 조정한다.우리는 이 방법을 기계 번역과 추상적 요약에서 도전적인 기준 테스트에 응용하여 후속적인 감독 모델을 현저하게 개선한 것을 발견했다.우리의 주요 결과는 예비 훈련이 seq2seq모델의 범용 능력을 향상시켰다는 것이다.우리는 WMT 영독 임무에서 가장 선진적인 성과를 거두었고 단어 기반의 기계 번역과 신경 기계 번역을 사용하는 일련의 방법을 초과했다.우리의 방법은 WMT'14와 WMT'15 영어-독일어에서 이전의 가장 좋은 모델보다 1.3BLEU 현저히 높아졌다.우리는 추상적인 요약에 대해 인류 평가를 실시했는데 우리의 방법이 통계학적으로 순수 감독 학습 기선보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.", 'am': 'ይሄ ሥራ የጠቅላላ ትምህርት ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በሥርዓታችን፣ የድኮድ ሚዛን እና የseq2seq ዓይነት ሚዛን በሁለት ቋንቋ ዓይነት ሚዛን የተመሳሳይ እና በጽሑፍ ዳታዎች የተለየ ጥሩ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት በመሳዊ ትርጓሜ እና አዲስ ማስታወቂያውን ለመቀላቀል እና በኋላው በተጠበቀው ዓይነቶች በሙሉ ማሻሻል እናገኘዋለን፡፡ የዋነታችን ፍጻሜ የseq2seq ዓይነቶች አካባቢ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በWMT እንግሊዘኛ ጀርመን አድራሻ ላይ የሀገር አዋጅ ፍሬዎችን አግኝተናል፤ በንግግር-based መሳሪያን ትርጓሜ እና የናቡራዊ መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ እና በመጠቀም የልዩ ልማድ አካሄድን እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን ከቀድሞው የበለጠውን የ.3 ቢልዩን አካባቢ ማድረግ በWMT-14 እና WMT-15 ጀርመን ጀርመን ነው፡፡ የሰው ማስታወቂያውን በቁጥጥር እናደርጋለን፣ የሥርዓታችንም ትምህርት መደገፊያውን በቁጥጥር በተለይ ትምህርት ግንኙነት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': "এই কাজের একটি সাধারণ অরক্ষিত শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছে যাতে সেকেন্সের (সেক্স২সেক) মডেলের সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করার জন্য। আমাদের পদ্ধতিতে সেক্স২সেক মডেলের ওজন এবং ডিকোডারের ওজন শুরু করা হয়েছে দুই ভাষার মডেলের ওজন এবং তারপর লেবেলেড ডার দ্বারা। মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং অস্বীকৃতিক সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের চ্যালেঞ্জ করার জন্য আমরা এই পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করি এবং এটি খুঁজে বের করি যে পরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণ কর আমাদের প্রধান ফলাফল হচ্ছে যে বৃষ্টি করা হচ্ছে সেক্স২সেক মডেলের সাধারণ বৃদ্ধি পাওয়া। আমরা উইএমটি ইংরেজি জার্মান কাজের উপর রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করি, বাক্য ভিত্তিক মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ ব্যবহার করে ব আমাদের পদ্ধতি পূর্ববর্তী সেরা মডেল থেকে ১.৩ বিলিউ এর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পেয়েছে। উইএমটি'১৪ এবং উইএমটি'১৫ ইংরেজি জা আমরা এছাড়াও মানুষের মূল্যের মূল্য প্রকাশ করি এবং আমাদের পদ্ধতি পরিসংখ্যানে পরিসংখ্যান গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে পরিসংখ্যানের পরিসংখ্", 'bs': "Ovaj rad predstavlja općinu neodređenu metodu učenja kako bi poboljšala preciznost sekvence do modela sekvence (seq2seq). U našoj metodi, težina kodera i dekodera model a seq2seq inicijalizirana su sa pretkivnim težinama dva jezičkog modela i potom ispravnim prilagođenim označenim podacima. Primjenjujemo ovu metodu na izazov kriterija prevoda i abstraktivne sažetke i saznamo da značajno poboljšava sljedeće nadzorne modele. Naš glavni rezultat je da pretkivanje poboljšava generalizaciju seq2seq modela. Postignemo rezultate umjetnosti na njemačkom zadatku WMT-a, prelazeći niz metoda koristeći i prevod mašine na frazi i neuralno prevod mašine. Naš metod postiže značajno poboljšanje 1,3 BLEU od prethodnih najboljih modela na WMT'14 i WMT'15 njemačkom engleskom. Također vodimo ljudske procjene o abstraktivnoj sažeti i saznamo da naš metod iznosi čisto nadziran početak učenja na statistički značajan način.", 'hy': "Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ընդհանուր անվերահսկված ուսումնասիրության մեթոդ, որպեսզի բարելավվի հաջորդականության ճշգրիտությունը հաջորդականության (SeQ2SeQ) մոդելների հետ: Մեր մեթոդի միջոցով, սեք2Sex մոդելի կոդերի և դեկոդերի զանգվածները սկզբնական են երկու լեզվի մոդելի նախադասավորված զանգվածներով և հետո բարձրացվում են պիտակուցված տվյալներով: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս մեթոդը մեքենայի թարգմանման և վերացական համառոտագրության հարաբերությունների մարտահրավերների համար և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ այն նշանակալի բարելավում է հետագա վերահսկված մոդելները: Մեր հիմնական արդյունքն այն է, որ նախավարժությունը բարելավում է սեք2Sex մոդելների ընդհանուր տարածումը: Մենք հասնում ենք ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ ԱՄԹ-ի անգլերեն աշխատանքի վրա, գերազանցում ենք տարբեր մեթոդներ՝ օգտագործելով նաև արտահայտություններով հիմնված մեքենայի թարգմանություն և նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն: Մեր մեթոդը նշանակալի բարելավում է 1.3 ԲԼԵՎ-ը նախորդ լավագույն մոդելներից' երկուսում' ԱՄԹ'14 և ԱՄԹ'15 անգլերենում: Մենք նաև կատարում ենք մարդկային գնահատումներ վերացական համառոտագրության վերաբերյալ և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մեր մեթոդը մաքուր վերահսկված ուսումնասիրության հիմքի արտադրողությունն է վիճակագրական նշանակալի ձևով:", 'ca': "Aquesta feina presenta un mètode general d'aprenentatge no supervisat per millorar la precisió de la seqüència a models de seq2seq. En el nostre mètode, els pesos del codificador i del decodificador d'un model seq2seq s'inicializen amb els pesos pré-entrenats de dos models de llenguatge i després s'ajustan amb dades etiquetades. We apply this method to challenging benchmarks in machine translation and abstractive summarization and find that it significantly improves the subsequent supervised models.  El nostre resultat principal és que la pré-capacitació millora la generalització dels models seq2seq. Obtenim resultats més avançats en la tasca en anglès de WMT, superant una gama de mètodes utilitzant tant la traducció automàtica basada en frases com la traducció neuromàtica. El nostre mètode aconsegueix una millora significativa de 1,3 BLEU dels meus millors models anteriors en anglès tant WMT'14 com WMT'15. També fem evaluacions humanes en una resumensió abstracta i descobrim que el nostre mètode supera una base d'aprenentatge purament supervisada d'una manera estadísticament significativa.", 'cs': "Tato práce představuje obecnou metodu učení bez dozoru pro zlepšení přesnosti modelů sekvence na sekvenci (seq2seq). V naší metodě jsou hmotnosti kodéru a dekodéru modelu seq2seq inicializovány s předtrénovanými hmotnostmi dvou jazykových modelů a následně jemně laděny s označenými daty. Tuto metodu aplikujeme na náročné benchmarky v oblasti strojového překladu a abstraktivního shrnutí a zjišťujeme, že výrazně zlepšuje následné monitorované modely. Naším hlavním výsledkem je, že předtrénink zlepšuje zobecnění modelů seq2seq. Dosahujeme nejmodernějších výsledků na úkolu WMT anglicky němčiny, překonáváme řadu metod používajících frázový strojový překlad i neuronový strojový překlad. Naše metoda dosahuje výrazného zlepšení 1.3 BLEU oproti předchozím nejlepším modelům na WMT'14 i WMT'15 anglické němčině. Dále provádíme lidská hodnocení abstraktivního shrnutí a zjišťujeme, že naše metoda překonává čistě supervizované učení základním způsobem statisticky významným způsobem.", 'et': "Käesolevas töös esitatakse üldine järelevalveta õppemeetod, et parandada jadast jadani mudelite (seq2seq) täpsust. Meie meetodis initsialiseeritakse seq2seq mudeli kodeerija ja dekoodri kaalud kahe keelemudeli eeltreenitud kaaludega ja seejärel täpsustatakse märgistatud andmetega. Me rakendame seda meetodit masintõlke ja abstraktse kokkuvõtte keerukatele võrdlusnäitajatele ning leiame, et see parandab oluliselt järgnevaid järelevalvemudeleid. Meie peamine tulemus on see, et eeltreening parandab seq2seq mudelite üldistamist. Saavutame WMT inglise saksa ülesande tipptasemel tulemusi, ületades mitmesuguseid meetodeid, kasutades nii fraasipõhist masintõlket kui ka neuromasintõlket. Meie meetod saavutab märkimisväärse paranduse 1,3 BLEU võrreldes varasemate parimate mudelitega nii WMT'14 kui WMT'15 inglise saksa keeles. Samuti teostame inimlikke hinnanguid abstraktse kokkuvõtte kohta ja leiame, et meie meetod ületab puhtalt järelevalvega õppimise algväärtuse statistiliselt olulisel viisil.", 'fi': "Tässä työssä esitellään yleinen valvomaton oppimismenetelmä sekvenssimallien tarkkuuden parantamiseksi. Menetelmässämme seq2seq-mallin kooderin ja dekooderin painot alustetaan kahden kielimallin esikoulutetuilla painoilla ja hienosäädetään sitten merkityllä datalla. Sovellamme tätä menetelmää haastaviin konekäännöksen ja abstraktisen yhteenvedon vertailuarvoihin ja havaitsemme, että se parantaa merkittävästi myöhempiä valvottuja malleja. Päätuloksemme on, että esikoulutus parantaa seq2seq-mallien yleistymistä. WMT English German -tehtävässä saavutamme huipputason tuloksia ylittäen useita menetelmiä käyttäen sekä lausepohjaista konekäännöstä että neurokonekäännöstä. Menetelmämme saavuttaa merkittävän parannuksen 1.3 BLEU:lla edellisistä parhaista malleista sekä WMT'14:ssä että WMT'15:ssä englanninsaksassa. Teemme myös inhimillisiä arviointeja abstraktiivisesta yhteenvedosta ja havaitsemme, että menetelmämme suoriutuu tilastollisesti merkitsevästi puhtaasti valvotusta oppimisperustasosta paremmin.", 'az': "Bu işlər seq2seq modellərinin doğruluğunu düzəltmək üçün çoxlu təmizlənmiş öyrənmə metodunu göstərir. Bizim metodlarımızda, seq2seq modelinin kodlayıcının və dekoderinin a ğırlığı iki dil modellərin əvvəlki ağırlığı ilə başladılır və sonra etiketli məlumatları ilə düzəldirilir. Biz bu metodu maşın çevirilməsi və abstraktiv təmizlənməsi üçün çətinliklərə istifadə edirik və sonra nəzarət edilmiş modelleri çox yaxşılaşdırır. Əsas sonuçlarımız seq2seq modellərin generalizasiyasını yaxşılaşdırır. WMT İngilizce Almanca işinin müəyyən edilməsi üçün sanat sonuçlarını başa çatdıq, fraz-tabanlı maşın çevirimi və nöral maşın çevirisini istifadə edərkən bir çox metodları a şırıq. Bizim metodumuz WMT'in 14 və WMT'in 15 İngilizce Almancıdan əvvəlki ən yaxşı modellərdən 1.3 BLEU'in münasibətli uzlaşdırmasını sağlar. Biz də abstraktiv təmizlənmək haqqında insanların değerlendirmələrini təşkil edirik və metodumuzun statistik olaraq çox möhkəm bir tərzdə təmizlənmiş öyrənmə səhifəsini təşkil edir.", 'sk': "V tem delu je predstavljena splošna metoda nenadzorovanega učenja za izboljšanje natančnosti modelov zaporedja do zaporedja (seq2seq). Pri naši metodi smo uteži kodirnika in dekoderja modela seq2seq inicializirali s predtreniranimi utežmi dveh jezikovnih modelov in nato natančno nastavili z označenimi podatki. To metodo uporabljamo za zahtevne referenčne vrednosti strojnega prevajanja in abstraktivnega povzetka ter ugotavljamo, da bistveno izboljšuje nadaljnje nadzorovane modele. Naš glavni rezultat je, da predtrening izboljša generalizacijo modelov seq2seq. Dosežemo najsodobnejše rezultate pri nalogi WMT angleško nemščino, saj presegamo vrsto metod, ki uporabljajo tako frazni strojni prevod kot nevronski strojni prevod. Naša metoda dosega znatno izboljšanje 1,3 BLEU od prejšnjih najboljših modelov na WMT'14 in WMT'15 angleško nemščino. Prav tako izvajamo človeške ocene abstraktivnega povzetka in ugotavljamo, da naša metoda na statistično pomemben način presega izključno nadzorovano izhodišče učenja.", 'he': "העבודה הזו מציגה שיטת לימוד כללית ללא השגחה כדי לשפר את מדויקת הרצף למודלים הרצף (seq2seq). בשיטתנו, המשקלים של הקודן והפיקוד של דוגמא seq2seq מתחילים עם המשקלים המתאימים מראש של שני דוגמאות שפה ואז מתאימים עם נתונים מסומנים. אנו משתמשים בשיטה הזאת לאתגר נקודות רמז בתרגום מכונות ותסכם אסטרקטיבי ומצאים שהיא משפר באופן משמעותי את הדוגמנים המשומרים לאחר מכן. התוצאה העיקרית שלנו היא שטיפול מחדש משפר את הגנרליזציה של דוגמנים seq2seq. אנו משיגים תוצאות חדשות במשימה הגרמנית של WMT, מעליים מגוון של שיטות בשימוש שתי התרגום מכונת מבוססת ביטויים ותרגום מכונת עצבית. השיטה שלנו משיגה שיפור משמעותי של 1.3 BLEU מהדוגמנים הטובים ביותר הקודמים של WMT'14 וגם WMT'15 גרמני אנגלית. We also conduct human evaluations on abstractive summarization and find that our method outperforms a purely supervised learning baseline in a statistically significant manner.", 'ha': "Wannan aikin yana gaya wata jumla na'urar da aka tsare wa tsari wa masu saka da ake haɗa (seq2seq). Yana cikin shirin mu, za'a fara nauyin kodkode da kodi na wata sheq2seq ana fara shi da nau'in da aka kiyaye nau'i biyu cikin misãlai biyu kuma a sami da data wanda aka yi wa alama. Kana amfani da wannan hanyor ya kanana cikin fassarar kwamfyutan tebur da kuma masu kanana tsari, kuma munã gane cewa ya kyautata misãlai masu ƙara da aka tsare. Mataimakinmu na farko ni'ani ne a ƙara manunufi na zaɓen misalin seq2seq. Mu sami fassarar-state-of-the-art on the WMT aikin Ingiriya na Jarmaya, surori wasu metode da ke amfani da fassarar-based mashine translation and neural mashine translation. Kayan hanyoyinmu ta sami mai kyau wa 1.3 BLEU daga na farkon mafi kyaun motsi na WMT'14 da WMT'15 Ingirin Ingiriya. Kayya, Munã yi ƙidãya ga mutane a kan karatun farata, kuma munã gane cewa hanyoyinmu yana samar da salin da aka tsare a kan karatun karatun da shi, a cikin sifatida mai muhimmi.", 'jv': "Workspace 1 Nalika dhéwé, nggambar kapan koder karo akeh sek2seq model kuwi wis disebarke karo pergambar uwong sing duwe modèl Awakdhéwé nggunakake method iki nggawe nggawe bendhèf kanggo ngilangno sistem tarjamahan karo resumen apakno lan nggawe lan akeh barang nggawe barang dagangan model sing berarti di luwih bantuan ngono. Pametuné awak dhéwé kuwi nggalakno kanggo ngerasai model seq2seq. Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar stad-of-the-arts banjuré piye basa ning ngermani WWT, kuwi nggawe barang pengguna sampek dadi ngubah perintah lan tambah sistem sing basa gambar na terjamahan. Awakdhéwé éntuk ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno kanggo 1.3 B luwih dumadhi ingkang sampeyan sing luwih dumadhi ingkang sampek sing katêpakan karo transform-sampek sing luwih dumadhi, ngon Applet's 14 lan WLT's Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno nggawe barang pancen dumadhi sing nggawe gerakan dadi, dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan kuwi nggawe barang pancen apik dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang maning.", 'bo': "འདིས་ལས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཅིག་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཡོད། In our method, the weights of the encoder and decoder of a seq2seq model are initialized with the pretrained weights of two language models and then fine-tuned with labeled data. ང་ཚོས་ལག་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ལ་གནད་དོན་དགོས་མིན་འདུག་པས་རྗེས ང་ཚོའི་རྩ་བའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ན་ཕར་ཚད་ལྟར་seq2seq མིག་ཆས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་WMT དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ལས་འགན་འགྲུལ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་བཅས་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་ཙམ་ཤེས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our method achieves a significant improvement of 1.3 BLEU from the previous best models of both WMT'14 and WMT'15 German German. ང་ཚོས་མི་རྣམ་གྲངས་བསྡད་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དུ་ལྟར་བཀོལ་བཞིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'Efficient Attention using a Fixed-Size Memory Representation', 'ar': 'الانتباه الفعال باستخدام تمثيل الذاكرة ذات الحجم الثابت', 'pt': 'Atenção eficiente usando uma representação de memória de tamanho fixo', 'es': 'Atención eficiente mediante una representación de memoria de tamaño fijo', 'fr': 'Attention efficace grâce à une représentation mémoire de taille fixe', 'ja': '固定サイズのメモリ表現を使用した効率的なアテンション', 'zh': '大小内存高效意也', 'ru': 'Эффективное внимание с использованием представления памяти фиксированного размера', 'hi': 'एक निश्चित आकार स्मृति प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग कर कुशल ध्यान', 'ga': 'Aird Éifeachtach ag baint úsáide as Léiriú Cuimhne ar Mhéid Shocraithe', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματική προσοχή χρησιμοποιώντας μια αναπαράσταση μνήμης σταθερού μεγέθους', 'hu': 'Hatékony figyelem fix méretű memóriaábrázolás használatával', 'it': 'Attenzione efficiente utilizzando una rappresentazione di memoria a dimensione fissa', 'kk': 'Тұрақты өлшемі жады таңдау көмегімен жұмыс сақтау', 'lt': 'Veiksmingas dėmesys naudojant fiksuoto dydžio atminties atstovavimą', 'mk': 'Ефикасно внимание користејќи фиксна големина на меморијата', 'ms': 'Perhatian Efisien menggunakan Perwakilan Memori Saiz-Tetap', 'ka': 'Name', 'mt': 'Attenzjoni Effiċjenti bl-użu ta’ Rappreżentazzjoni tal-Memorja Fissa', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Тайван хэмжээст санах санааны төлөөлөл', 'pl': 'Wydajna uwaga za pomocą reprezentacji pamięci o stałym rozmiarze', 'ml': 'ഫിക്സിഡ്- വലിപ്പം മെമ്മറി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ശ്രദ്ധ', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Effektiv uppmärksamhet med hjälp av en minnesrepresentation i fast storlek', 'ro': 'Atenție eficientă utilizând o reprezentare a memoriei de dimensiuni fixe', 'sr': 'Efikasna pažnja koristeći predstavu uspomene za određenu veličinu', 'so': 'Efficient Attention using a Fixed-Size Memory Representation', 'ta': 'ஒழுங்குபடுத்தப்பட்ட அளவு நினைவகத்தை பயன்படுத்தி செயல்படுத்துதல்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chú ý hiệu quả nhờ Bộ nhớ Kích cỡ cố định', 'bg': 'Ефективно внимание при използване на представяне на паметта с фиксиран размер', 'nl': 'Efficiënte aandacht met behulp van een geheugenrepresentatie met vaste grootte', 'hr': 'Učinjena pažnja koristeći predstavu uspomene za određenu veličinu', 'da': 'Effektiv opmærksomhed ved hjælp af en fast størrelse hukommelse repræsentation', 'de': 'Effiziente Aufmerksamkeit durch Verwendung einer Speicherrepräsentation mit fester Größe', 'id': 'Perhatian Efisien menggunakan Perwakilan Memori Ukuran Tetap', 'ko': '고정 크기의 기억 표현법으로 효과적인 주의', 'fa': 'توجه موثر با استفاده از نمایش حافظه اندازه ثابت', 'sw': 'Tatizo zuri kwa kutumia Representation Memory Size', 'tr': 'Sabyt Ululyk Ewez Resimi ullanýa', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Vëmendje efikase duke përdorur një përfaqësim të kujtesës me madhësi të fiksuar', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Q캼sqa 칐l칞칲 Yad캼n G칬st톛ricisi', 'hy': 'Հիշողություն', 'bn': 'মেমরি প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার করে কার্যকর মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ', 'bs': 'Efikasna pažnja koristeći predstavu uspomene za fiksnu veličinu', 'ca': 'Atenció eficient utilitzant una representació de memòria de mida fixa', 'cs': 'Efektivní pozornost pomocí reprezentace paměti pevné velikosti', 'et': 'Tõhus tähelepanu fikseeritud suurusega mälu esindamise kasutamisel', 'fi': 'Tehokas huomio kiinteän koon muistin esittämisen avulla', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'yes', 'sk': 'Učinkovita pozornost s predstavitvijo pomnilnika fiksne velikosti', 'he': 'תשומת לב יעילה באמצעות מייצג זיכרון בגודל קבוע', 'bo': 'དམིགས་པ་ཡིན་པའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཀྱི་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ནས་གདོང་དགོས'}
{'en': 'The standard content-based attention mechanism typically used in sequence-to-sequence models is computationally expensive as it requires the comparison of large encoder and decoder states at each time step. In this work, we propose an alternative attention mechanism based on a fixed size memory representation that is more efficient. Our technique predicts a compact set of K attention contexts during encoding and lets the decoder compute an efficient lookup that does not need to consult the memory. We show that our approach performs on-par with the standard attention mechanism while yielding inference speedups of 20 % for real-world translation tasks and more for tasks with longer sequences. By visualizing attention scores we demonstrate that our models learn distinct, meaningful alignments.', 'ar': 'تعتبر آلية الانتباه القائمة على المحتوى القياسية المستخدمة عادةً في نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل مكلفة من الناحية الحسابية لأنها تتطلب مقارنة حالات التشفير وفك التشفير الكبيرة في كل خطوة زمنية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح آلية انتباه بديلة تعتمد على تمثيل ذاكرة بحجم ثابت يكون أكثر كفاءة. تتنبأ تقنيتنا بمجموعة مضغوطة من سياقات الانتباه K أثناء التشفير وتسمح لوحدة فك التشفير بحساب بحث فعال لا يحتاج إلى الرجوع إلى الذاكرة. نوضح أن نهجنا يعمل على قدم المساواة مع آلية الانتباه القياسية بينما ينتج عنه تسريع في الاستدلال بنسبة 20٪ لمهام الترجمة في العالم الحقيقي والمزيد للمهام ذات التسلسلات الأطول. من خلال تصور درجات الانتباه ، نظهر أن نماذجنا تتعلم محاذاة متميزة وذات مغزى.', 'es': 'El mecanismo de atención basado en contenido estándar que se usa típicamente en los modelos de secuencia a secuencia es computacionalmente caro, ya que requiere la comparación de estados grandes del codificador y del decodificador en cada paso de tiempo. En este trabajo, proponemos un mecanismo de atención alternativo basado en una representación de memoria de tamaño fijo que sea más eficiente. Nuestra técnica predice un conjunto compacto de K contextos de atención durante la codificación y permite que el decodificador calcule una búsqueda eficiente que no necesita consultar la memoria. Demostramos que nuestro enfoque funciona a la par con el mecanismo de atención estándar, al tiempo que produce aceleraciones de inferencia del 20% para las tareas de traducción del mundo real y más para las tareas con secuencias más largas. Al visualizar los puntajes de atención, demostramos que nuestros modelos aprenden alineaciones distintas y significativas.', 'fr': "Le mécanisme d'attention standard basé sur le contenu généralement utilisé dans les modèles séquence à séquence est coûteux en termes de calcul, car il nécessite la comparaison des états importants du codeur et du décodeur à chaque pas de temps. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un mécanisme d'attention alternatif basé sur une représentation mémoire de taille fixe qui est plus efficace. Notre technique prédit un ensemble compact de K contextes d'attention pendant l'encodage et permet au décodeur de calculer une recherche efficace qui n'a pas besoin de consulter la mémoire. Nous montrons que notre approche fonctionne de la même manière que le mécanisme d'attention standard tout en produisant des accélérations d'inférence de 20\xa0% pour les tâches de traduction réelles et plus pour les tâches comportant des séquences plus longues. En visualisant les scores d'attention, nous démontrons que nos modèles apprennent des alignements distincts et significatifs.", 'pt': 'O mecanismo de atenção baseado em conteúdo padrão normalmente usado em modelos de sequência a sequência é computacionalmente caro, pois requer a comparação de grandes estados de codificador e decodificador em cada etapa de tempo. Neste trabalho, propomos um mecanismo alternativo de atenção baseado em uma representação de memória de tamanho fixo que é mais eficiente. Nossa técnica prevê um conjunto compacto de K contextos de atenção durante a codificação e permite que o decodificador calcule uma pesquisa eficiente que não precisa consultar a memória. Mostramos que nossa abordagem funciona no mesmo nível do mecanismo de atenção padrão, ao mesmo tempo em que produz acelerações de inferência de 20% para tarefas de tradução do mundo real e mais para tarefas com sequências mais longas. Ao visualizar as pontuações de atenção, demonstramos que nossos modelos aprendem alinhamentos distintos e significativos.', 'ja': 'シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルで典型的に使用される標準的なコンテンツベースの注目メカニズムは、各時間ステップでの大きなエンコーダ及びデコーダ状態の比較を必要とするため、計算的に高価である。本研究では、より効率的な固定サイズのメモリ表現に基づく代替的な注目メカニズムを提案する。当社の技術は、エンコード中のコンパクトなK注意コンテキストのセットを予測し、デコーダがメモリを参照する必要のない効率的なルックアップを計算することを可能にします。私たちのアプローチは、標準的な注意メカニズムでオンパールを実行し、現実の翻訳タスクでは20%、より長いシーケンスを持つタスクではより多くの推論スピードアップをもたらすことを示しています。アテンションスコアを視覚化することで、私たちのモデルが明確で有意義なアライメントを学ぶことを実証します。', 'zh': '凡序于序,机于数为贵,以其时步长大编码器解码器也。 凡此诸事,立一基于大小内存示代注意机宜有效。 吾术在编码中,候K上下文,令解码器计出不须阅内存者高效求之。 吾法与意机相当,兼为实译20%推理速度,而长序之任,则更高者理速。 因可视化注意分数,证吾模样学独有义。', 'hi': 'आमतौर पर अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल में उपयोग किया जाने वाला मानक सामग्री-आधारित ध्यान तंत्र कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से महंगा है क्योंकि इसके लिए प्रत्येक समय चरण में बड़े एनकोडर और डिकोडर राज्यों की तुलना की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम एक निश्चित आकार स्मृति प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर एक वैकल्पिक ध्यान तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो अधिक कुशल है। हमारी तकनीक एन्कोडिंग के दौरान कश्मीर ध्यान संदर्भों के एक कॉम्पैक्ट सेट की भविष्यवाणी करती है और डिकोडर को एक कुशल लुकअप की गणना करने देती है जिसे स्मृति से परामर्श करने की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुवाद कार्यों के लिए 20% की अनुमान स्पीडअप और लंबे समय तक अनुक्रमों वाले कार्यों के लिए अधिक उत्पन्न करते हुए मानक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ बराबर प्रदर्शन करता है। ध्यान स्कोर की कल्पना करके हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल अलग-अलग, सार्थक संरेखण सीखते हैं।', 'ru': 'Стандартный механизм внимания на основе контента, обычно используемый в моделях последовательности к последовательности, является вычислительно дорогостоящим, поскольку требует сравнения больших состояний кодера и декодера на каждом временном шаге. В этой работе мы предлагаем альтернативный механизм внимания, основанный на более эффективном представлении памяти фиксированного размера. Наша методика предсказывает компактный набор контекстов внимания K во время кодирования и позволяет декодеру вычислить эффективный поиск, который не нуждается в консультации с памятью. Мы показываем, что наш подход работает на сравнении со стандартным механизмом внимания, в то же время давая ускорения вывода 20% для задач реального перевода и больше для задач с более длинными последовательностями. Визуализируя оценки внимания, мы демонстрируем, что наши модели учатся четким, значимым выравниваниям.', 'ga': 'Tá an mheicníocht chaighdeánach aird-bhunaithe a úsáidtear go hiondúil i múnlaí seicheamh-go-seicheamh costasach ó thaobh ríomha toisc go dteastaíonn comparáid idir stáit mhóra ionchódóra agus díchódóra ag gach céim ama. Sa obair seo, molaimid meicníocht aird mhalartach atá bunaithe ar léiriú cuimhne méid seasta atá níos éifeachtaí. Déanann ár dteicníc sraith dhlúth de chomhthéacsanna aird K a thuar le linn an ionchódaithe agus ligeann sé don díchódóir cuardach éifeachtach a ríomh nach gá dul i gcomhairle leis an gcuimhne. Léirímid go bhfeidhmíonn ár gcur chuige ar chomhchéim leis an ngnáthmheicníocht airde agus go bhfaightear luasanna tátail de 20% do thascanna aistriúcháin sa saol fíor agus níos mó do thascanna le seichimh níos faide. Trí scóir aird a shamhlú léirímid go bhfoghlaimíonn ár múnlaí ailínithe ar leith, a bhfuil brí leo.', 'hu': 'A szekvencia-szekvencia modellekben jellemzően használt szabványos tartalom-alapú figyelem mechanizmus számítástechnikai szempontból drága, mivel minden időlépésben nagy kódoló és dekódoló állapotok összehasonlítását igényli. Ebben a munkában egy hatékonyabb fix méretű memóriaábrázoláson alapuló alternatív figyelemmechanizmust javasolunk. Technikánk a kódolás során a K figyelemkörnyezetek kompakt halmazát jósolja meg, és lehetővé teszi, hogy a dekódoló hatékony keresést számítson ki, amelynek nem kell konzultálnia a memóriát. Megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk a hagyományos figyelem mechanizmusával egyenlően működik, miközben a valós fordítási feladatok esetében 20%-os következtetési gyorsulást eredményez, míg a hosszabb szekvenciákkal rendelkező feladatok esetében még több. A figyelempontszámok vizualizálásával bebizonyítjuk, hogy modelleink különböző, értelmes összehangolásokat tanulnak.', 'el': 'Ο τυπικός μηχανισμός προσοχής βασισμένος στο περιεχόμενο που χρησιμοποιείται συνήθως σε μοντέλα αλληλουχίας προς αλληλουχίας είναι υπολογιστικά δαπανηρός καθώς απαιτεί τη σύγκριση των μεγάλων καταστάσεων κωδικοποιητή και αποκωδικοποιητή σε κάθε βήμα χρόνου. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε έναν εναλλακτικό μηχανισμό προσοχής βασισμένο σε μια αναπαράσταση μνήμης σταθερού μεγέθους που είναι πιο αποτελεσματική. Η τεχνική μας προβλέπει ένα συμπαγές σύνολο πλαισίων προσοχής Κ κατά την κωδικοποίηση και επιτρέπει στον αποκωδικοποιητή να υπολογίσει μια αποτελεσματική αναζήτηση που δεν χρειάζεται να συμβουλευτεί τη μνήμη. Δείχνουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας αποδίδει στο ίδιο επίπεδο με τον τυπικό μηχανισμό προσοχής ενώ αποδίδει ταχύτητες συμπερασμάτων 20% για πραγματικές μεταφραστικές εργασίες και περισσότερο για εργασίες με μεγαλύτερες ακολουθίες. Με την απεικόνιση των βαθμολογιών προσοχής αποδεικνύουμε ότι τα μοντέλα μας μαθαίνουν διακριτές, ουσιαστικές ευθυγραμμίσεις.', 'ka': 'Standard content-based attention mechanism typically used in sequence-to-sequence models is computationally expensive, as it requires the comparison of large encoder and decoder states at each time step. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ალტენტრუმენტური დაახლოების მექანსი, რომელიც უფრო ეფექტიურია. ჩვენი ტექნოგია კომპექტის კონტექსტის შესახებ კონტექსტის შესახებ კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის კონტექსტის შემდე ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა სტანდარტური ინტერნექციის მექანიზმისთვის, როცა 20% სიჩქარე რეალური მსოფლიოს გარგენისთვის და უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად მომხმარე ვიზუალურებით მონაცემების მონაცემებით ჩვენ მოდელების შესწავლობა განსხვავებული, სანიშვნელოვანი განსხვავება.', 'it': "Il meccanismo standard di attenzione basato sul contenuto utilizzato tipicamente nei modelli sequenza-sequenza è computazionale costoso in quanto richiede il confronto di grandi stati encoder e decoder ad ogni passo temporale. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un meccanismo di attenzione alternativo basato su una rappresentazione della memoria a dimensione fissa più efficiente. La nostra tecnica prevede un insieme compatto di contesti di attenzione K durante la codifica e consente al decoder di calcolare una ricerca efficiente che non ha bisogno di consultare la memoria. Dimostriamo che il nostro approccio funziona alla pari del meccanismo di attenzione standard, ottenendo al contempo velocità di inferenza del 20% per le attività di traduzione del mondo reale e altro ancora per le attività con sequenze più lunghe. Visualizzando i punteggi dell'attenzione dimostriamo che i nostri modelli imparano allineamenti distinti e significativi.", 'kk': 'Стандартты мазмұны негіздеген қызықтық механизмі, әдетте реттеу мен реттеу үлгілерінде қолданылатын үлкен кодерлерді және декодерлерді әрбір қадамда салыстыру керек болып, есептеу үлкен мазмұны Бұл жұмыстың бағдарламасының көмектесілігіне негізделген альтернативті түсіндіру механизмін ұсынамыз. Біздің техникамыз кодтамасы кезінде K контексті компакт жинағын таңдайды. Декодердің жады сұрақтау керек болмайтын ефективні іздеу үшін есептеуге мүмкіндік береді. Біз өзіміздің тәсіліміміз стандартты түсініктер механизмімен 20% жылдамдығын шын әлемді аудару тапсырмаларына және көп тапсырмаларды ұзындық реттеу тапсырмалар үшін жасайды. Бақылау нәтижелерін көрсету арқылы, өзіміздің үлгілеріміздің түрлі, маңызды түрлендіруді үйренеміз.', 'lt': 'The standard content-based attention mechanism typically used in sequence-to-sequence models is computationally expensive as it requires the comparison of large encoder and decoder states at each time step.  Šiame darbe siūlome alternatyvų dėmesio mechanizmą, pagrįstą fiksuoto dydžio atminties rodymu, kuris būtų veiksmingesnis. Mūsų metodas numato kompaktų K dėmesio kontekstų rinkinį kodavimo metu ir leidžia dekoderiui apskaičiuoti veiksmingą paiešką, kuris nereikia žiūrėti į atmintį. Mes rodome, kad mūsų požiūris vyksta lygiagrečiai su standartiniu dėmesio mechanizmu, tuo pačiu metu sukuriant 20 % rezultatų greitį realaus pasaulio vertimo užduotims ir daugiau užduotims su ilgesnėmis sekomis. Įvaizduodami dėmesio rezultatus įrodome, kad mūsų modeliai mokosi skirtingų, reikšmingų suderinimų.', 'mk': 'Стандардниот механизам на внимание базиран на содржина, обично употребен во моделите од секвенца до секвенца, е пресметувачки скап бидејќи бара споредба на големите состојби на кодер и декодер во секој чекор. Во оваа работа, предложуваме алтернативен механизам на внимание базиран на фиксна големина на меморијата која е поефикасна. Our technique predicts a compact set of K attention contexts during encoding and lets the decoder compute an efficient lookup that does not need to consult the memory.  Ние покажуваме дека нашиот пристап функционира во однос со стандардниот механизам на внимание, при што предизвика инференциски брзини од 20 отсто за реалните преводни задачи и повеќе за задачи со подолги секвенции. Со визуелизирање на резултатите на вниманието ние демонстрираме дека нашите модели научи различни, значајни поправки.', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ടോ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സാധാരണ ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്\u200dറെ ശ്രദ്ധ മെക്കിനസികം കണക്കില്\u200d വിലയുള്ളതാണ്. ഓരോ ക്രമീകരണത്തിലും വലിയ കോഡ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മാറ്റം ശ്രദ്ധ മെന്\u200dസിക്കേജിസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണമാണ്. നമ്മുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d കെ ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നത് പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. എന്\u200dകോഡിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ സമയത്ത് ഡെകോഡെറ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള സാധാരണ ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ പ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ, അര്\u200dത്ഥമായ മാന്ത്രികങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു എന്ന', 'mn': 'Стандарттай агуулагдаж байгаа анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм нь дарааллаас дарааллаар хэрэглэгддэг нь тооцоололтой үнэтэй. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь цаг бүрт том коддогч болон декоддогч орнуудын харьцуулах хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид илүү үр дүнтэй санамжийн хэмжээнд суурилсан өөр нэг анхаарлын механизмийг сануулдаг. Бидний техник кодлох үед K анхаарлын төвлөрөмжүүдийг тодорхойлох боломжтой болно. Үзэгчид санамжтайгаа зөвлөх хэрэггүй үр дүнтэй хайх хэрэгтэй зүйлийг тооцоолох боломжтой болно. Бид бодит ертөнцийн орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын орнуудын 20% хурдаар анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх стандарт анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмтэй ажилладаг. Анхаарал төвлөрүүлэхээр бидний загварууд ялгаатай, утгатай тэгшитгэл суралцдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Standardinnhaldsbasert oppmerksmekanismen som vanlegvis brukar i sekvens- til- sekvensmodeller er kalkulasjonell dyrt, sidan det krev sammenlikning av store koderingstilstandar og dekoderingstilstandar ved kvar gong. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit alternativ oppmerksmekanisme basert på ein fast storleik minne som er meir effektivt. Teknikken vårt foregår eit kompaktsett med K-oppmerksomstende under koding og lèt dekoderen rekna ut eit effektivt oppslag som ikkje treng å konsultera minnet. Vi viser at tilnærminga vårt utfører på-par med standardmaksjonen for oppmerksomhet medan det gjer inferensningsspektar på 20 % for verkeleg oversettelsoppgåver og meir for oppgåver med langre sekvensar. Ved å visualisere oppmerkspoeng, viser vi at modelane våre lærer ulike, meningsverdiar.', 'pl': 'Standardowy mechanizm uwagi oparty na treści zazwyczaj stosowany w modelach sekwencji-sekwencji jest kosztowny obliczeniowy, ponieważ wymaga porównania stanów dużych koderów i dekoderów na każdym etapie czasu. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy alternatywny mechanizm uwagi oparty na bardziej efektywnej reprezentacji pamięci o stałym rozmiarze. Nasza technika przewiduje kompaktowy zestaw kontekstów uwagi K podczas kodowania i pozwala dekoderowi obliczyć efektywne wyszukiwanie, które nie musi konsultować pamięci. Pokazujemy, że nasze podejście działa na równi ze standardowym mechanizmem uwagi przy jednoczesnym przyspieszeniu wnioskowania 20% dla rzeczywistych zadań tłumaczeniowych i więcej dla zadań z dłuższymi sekwencjami. Wizualizując wyniki uwagi pokazujemy, że nasze modele uczą się odrębnych, znaczących ustawień.', 'mt': 'The standard content-based attention mechanism typically used in sequence-to-sequence models is computationally expensive as it requires the comparison of large encoder and decoder states at each time step.  F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu mekkaniżmu alternattiv ta’ attenzjoni bbażat fuq rappreżentazzjoni fissa tal-memorja li tkun aktar effiċjenti. It-teknika tagħna tipprevedi sett kompatt ta’ kuntesti ta’ attenzjoni K waqt l-ikkodifikar u tippermetti lid-dekodifikatur jikkalkula tfittxija effiċjenti li ma jkollhiex bżonn tikkonsulta l-memorja. Aħna nuru li l-approċċ tagħna jwettaq l-istess prestazzjoni mal-mekkaniżmu standard ta’ attenzjoni filwaqt li jagħti veloċitajiet ta’ inferenza ta’ 20 % għal kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni fid-dinja reali u aktar għal kompiti b’sekwenzi itwal. Permezz tal-viżwalizzazzjoni tal-punteġġi tal-attenzjoni nagħmlu evidenza li l-mudelli tagħna jitgħallmu allinjamenti distinti u sinifikanti.', 'ro': 'Mecanismul standard de atenție bazat pe conținut utilizat în mod obișnuit în modelele secvență-la-secvență este costisitor din punct de vedere computațional, deoarece necesită compararea stărilor mari de encoder și decoder la fiecare pas temporal. În această lucrare, propunem un mecanism alternativ de atenție bazat pe o reprezentare a memoriei de dimensiuni fixe, mai eficientă. Tehnica noastră prezice un set compact de contexte de atenție K în timpul codării și permite decodorului să calculeze o căutare eficientă, care nu are nevoie să consulte memoria. Aratăm că abordarea noastră funcționează la egalitate cu mecanismul standard de atenție, obținând în același timp creșteri ale inferenței de 20% pentru sarcinile de traducere din lumea reală și mai mult pentru sarcinile cu secvențe mai lungi. Vizualizând scorurile de atenție demonstrăm că modelele noastre învață alinieri distincte și semnificative.', 'ms': 'Mekanisme perhatian berdasarkan kandungan piawai biasanya digunakan dalam model jujukan-ke-jujukan secara kira-kira mahal kerana ia memerlukan perbandingan keadaan pengekod besar dan pengekod pada setiap langkah masa. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan mekanisme perhatian alternatif berdasarkan perwakilan memori saiz tetap yang lebih efisien. Teknik kami meramalkan set kompak konteks perhatian K semasa pengekodan dan membiarkan pengekod menghitung pencarian efisien yang tidak perlu berkonsultasi memori. We show that our approach performs on-par with the standard attention mechanism while yielding inference speedups of 20% for real-world translation tasks and more for tasks with longer sequences.  By visualizing attention scores we demonstrate that our models learn distinct, meaningful alignments.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සම්බන්ධ අවධාන පද්ධතියක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් පද්ධතියෙන් පද්ධතියෙන් භාවිත වෙන්න පුළුවන් පරික්ෂණය ව මේ වැඩේ අපි වෙනස් අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ස අපේ තාක්ෂණික විශ්වාස කරනවා K අවධානය සම්බන්ධයක් සංවිධානයක් සංවිධානය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සංවිධානය කිරීමට සම්බන අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණය අවධාන පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය අවධාන පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය අවධාන විදියට 20% විදියට ඇත්ත ල අවධානය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දර්ශනය කරලා අපි පෙන්වන්නම් අපේ මොඩේල් වලින් විශේෂ, අදහස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඉ', 'so': 'meymisyada daryeelka ah ee ku qoran waxyaabaha caadiga ah ee lagu isticmaali karo tusaalayaasha xilliga iyo xilliyada, waxay qaali tahay xisaabta, sababtoo ah waxay u baahan tahay isbarbardhigga wadamada waaweyn iyo deynta marka walba. In this work, we propose an alternative attention mechanism based on a fixed size memory representation that is more efficient.  Teknonikeeyadayada ayaa ka hor jeeda qoraal ka mid ah K-ka xiliga codsiga kadibna waxaa loo ogolaadaa in uu koobi karo raadinta oo faa’iido ah oo a an u baahnayn in la taliyo xasuusta. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu uu sameynayo qaababka caadiga ah oo uu sameynayo meymisyo daryeelka caadiga ah, iyadoo uu sameynayo waqtiyada dhibaatada ku baxa 20% oo ah shaqooyinka turjumidda caalamiga ah iyo shaqooyin dheer. Sida aan aragno kooxaha dareemada, waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu ay bartaan isbedelyo kala duduwan, waxyaabaha leh.', 'sr': 'Standardni mehanizam pažnje na sadržaju koji se obično koristi u modelima sekvence do sekvence je kompjuterski skup jer zahteva usporedbu velikih država kodera i dekodera svakog koraka. U ovom poslu predlažemo alternativni mehanizam pažnje na temelju zastupanja fiksne veličine pamćenja koji je efikasniji. Naša tehnika predviđa kompaktni set K pažnje tokom kodiranja i dozvoljava dekoderu da računa efikasno potraženje koje ne mora da konsultuje sa sećanjem. Mi pokazujemo da naš pristup izvršava na-par sa standardnim pažnjom mehanizam dok daje brzine infekcije od 20% za stvarne svjetske prevodne zadatke i više za zadatke sa dužim sekvencijama. Visualizirajući rezultate pažnje pokazujemo da naše modele uče različite, značajne poravnanja.', 'sv': 'Den standardiserade innehﾃ･llsbaserade uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmekanismen som vanligtvis anvﾃ､nds i sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller ﾃ､r berﾃ､kningsmﾃ､ssigt dyr eftersom den krﾃ､ver jﾃ､mfﾃｶrelse av stora kodare- och avkodarstillstﾃ･nd vid varje tidssteg. I detta arbete fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en alternativ uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmekanism baserad pﾃ･ en minnesrepresentation i fast storlek som ﾃ､r effektivare. Vﾃ･r teknik fﾃｶrutspﾃ･r en kompakt uppsﾃ､ttning K uppmﾃ､rksamhet kontexter under kodning och lﾃ･ter avkodaren berﾃ､kna en effektiv uppslagning som inte behﾃｶver konsultera minnet. Vi visar att vﾃ･rt tillvﾃ､gagﾃ･ngssﾃ､tt presterar pﾃ･ samma nivﾃ･ som den vanliga uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmekanismen samtidigt som det ger inferenshastigheter pﾃ･ 20% fﾃｶr verkliga ﾃｶversﾃ､ttningsuppgifter och mer fﾃｶr uppgifter med lﾃ､ngre sekvenser. Genom att visualisera uppmﾃ､rksamhetspoﾃ､ng visar vi att vﾃ･ra modeller lﾃ､r sig tydliga, meningsfulla justeringar.', 'ta': 'வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகளில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் இயல்பான உள்ளடக்கத்திற்கு அடிப்படையான கவனம் முறைமை இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு நிலையான அளவு நினைவு குறிப்பிடுதலை அடிப்படையில் மாற்று கவனம் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கி எங்கள் தொழில்நுட்பம் குறியீட்டில் ஒரு ஒப்பிட்ட கே கவனம் முறைமையை முன்வாக்குகிறது மற்றும் குறியீட்டாளர் நினைவகத்திற்கு வே நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் நிலையான கவனத்தின் முறைமையுடன் எங்கள் அணுகல் செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் ஆனால் உண்மையான உலக மொழி கவனத்தை பார்க்கும் புள்ளிகளை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் நம் மாதிரிகள் வேறு வித்தியாசமான, அர்த்தமான ஒழுங்', 'ur': 'استاندارڈ منڈوبے بنیاد دار توجه مکانیسین جو عام طور پر سفارش-تا-سفارش موڈل میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کمپیوٹر کے طور پر گران ہے کیونکہ اس کے لئے ہر وقت کی سفارش میں بڑے کوڈر اور ڈیکوڈر کے حالت کی مقایسہ کی ضرورت ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک الٹی توجه مکانیسم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک مضبوط اندازہ یاد دکھانے پر بنیاد ہے جو زیادہ مفید ہے. ہماری تکنیک ایک کمپٹ سیٹ کی کنٹکسٹس کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے جو اکنوڈینڈ کے درمیان کنٹکسٹس کی ہے اور ڈیکوڈر کو ایک اثبات لکھنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے جو ذکر کے مطابق مشورہ کرنے کی ضرورت نہیں ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ استاندارڈ توجه مکانیسم کے ذریعہ ان پر عمل کرتا ہے جب کہ حقیقی دنیا کی ترجمہ کے کاموں کے لئے 20% کی سرعت پیدا کرتا ہے اور بہت سے کاموں کے ذریعہ دور طریقے کے ساتھ۔ توجه کے اسکور کو دکھانے کے ذریعہ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے نمڈلے مختلف، معنی تعمیر سکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu ishda, biz qo'shimcha xotiraga tayyorlangan xotira qo'shilgan boshqa raqamli mechanismni o'ylaymiz. Bizning texnologimiz kodlash paytidagi K muhim taqdimotini taqdim qiladi va kodlash xotira talab qilishi kerak emas deb hisoblash mumkin. Biz shunday qilamiz, bizning tuyg'iz andoza paydo mechaniyatli o'zgartiradi va biz dunyo tarjima vazifalari uchun 20% tezlik tezligini bajaradi va uzoq sonlar bilan vazifalar uchun ko'proq ishlarni bajaradi. By visualizing attention scores we demonstrate that our models learn distinct, meaningful alignments.", 'vi': "Bộ chú ý tiêu chuẩn của chế độ tiêu chuẩn thường được dùng trong các mô- trình-lập-tới-trình là tính đắt tiền vì nó yêu cầu so sánh các trạng thái mã hóa và mã giải lớn ở từng bước. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ chế chăm chú khác dựa trên mô tả bộ nhớ kích thước cố định, hiệu quả hơn. K ỹ thuật của chúng tôi dự đoán một tập hợp đặc biệt của K trong khi mã hóa và cho phép người giải mã tính to án một kế hoạch hiệu quả mà không cần phải tham khảo trí nhớ. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi tiến hành ngang với cơ chế tập trung tiêu chuẩn trong khi đạt được tăng tốc độ chịu đựng của 20='cho các công việc dịch chuyển thế giới thực và nhiều hơn cho các công việc với chuỗi dài hơn. Bằng cách hình dung điểm chú ý chúng tôi chứng minh cách làm của chúng tôi học được cách thích hợp.", 'bg': 'Стандартният механизъм за внимание, базиран на съдържание, обикновено използван в модели последователност към последователност, е изчислително скъп, тъй като изисква сравняване на големи състояния на кодер и декодер във всяка стъпка от времето. В тази работа предлагаме алтернативен механизъм за внимание, базиран на по-ефективно представяне на паметта с фиксиран размер. Нашата техника предвижда компактен набор от контексти на вниманието по време на кодиране и позволява на декодера да изчисли ефективно търсене, което не е необходимо да се консултира с паметта. Показваме, че подходът ни работи равностойно на стандартния механизъм за внимание, като същевременно дава ускорение на заключенията от 20% за преводни задачи в реалния свят и повече за задачи с по-дълги последователности. Чрез визуализиране на оценките на вниманието ние демонстрираме, че нашите модели научават различни, смислени подравнявания.', 'hr': 'Standardni mehanizam pažnje na sadržaju koji se obično koristi u modelima sekvence do sekvence je računalno skup jer zahtijeva usporedbu velikih država kodera i dekodera na svakom koraku. U ovom poslu predlažemo alternativni mehanizam pažnje na temelju zastupanja određene veličine pamćenja koja je učinkovitija. Naša tehnika predviđa kompaktni set pažnje K tijekom kodiranja i omogućava dekoderu računati učinkovito potragu koji ne mora konsultirati s pamćenjem. Mi pokazujemo da naš pristup provodi s standardnom pažnjom mehanizam, dok donosi brzinu infekcije od 20% za stvarne svjetske prevodne zadatke i više za zadatke s dužim sekvencijama. Visualizirajući rezultate pažnje pokazujemo da naše modele uče različite, značajne prilagodbe.', 'da': 'Den standard indholdsbaserede opmærksomhedsmekanisme, der typisk anvendes i sekvens til sekvens modeller, er beregningsmæssigt dyr, da den kræver sammenligning af store encoder- og dekoder-tilstande på hvert tidstrin. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en alternativ opmærksomhedsmekanisme baseret på en fast størrelse hukommelse repræsentation, der er mere effektiv. Vores teknik forudsiger et kompakt sæt K opmærksomhed kontekster under kodning og lader dekoderen beregne et effektivt opslag, der ikke behøver at konsultere hukommelsen. Vi viser, at vores tilgang fungerer på samme niveau som den almindelige opmærksomhedsmekanisme, samtidig med at det giver en deduktionshastighed på 20% for virkelige oversættelsesopgaver og mere for opgaver med længere sekvenser. Ved at visualisere opmærksomhed scores demonstrerer vi, at vores modeller lærer tydelige, meningsfulde justeringer.', 'nl': 'Het standaard contentgebaseerde aandachtsmechanisme dat typisch wordt gebruikt in sequentie-tot-sequentiemodellen is rekenkundig duur omdat het de vergelijking van grote encoder- en decodertoestanden bij elke tijdsstap vereist. In dit werk stellen we een alternatief aandachtsmechanisme voor, gebaseerd op een geheugenrepresentatie met vaste grootte die efficiënter is. Onze techniek voorspelt een compacte set K aandachtscontexten tijdens het coderen en laat de decoder een efficiënte opzoeking berekenen die het geheugen niet hoeft te raadplegen. We laten zien dat onze aanpak op gelijke voet presteert met het standaard aandachtsmechanisme en tegelijkertijd een inferentieversnelling van 20% oplevert voor reale vertaaltaken en meer voor taken met langere sequenties. Door aandachtsscores te visualiseren laten we zien dat onze modellen duidelijke, betekenisvolle uitlijningen leren.', 'de': 'Der standardmäßige inhaltsbasierte Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der typischerweise in Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modellen verwendet wird, ist rechenaufwändig, da er den Vergleich großer Encoder- und Decoderzustände in jedem Zeitschritt erfordert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen alternativen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus vor, der auf einer Speicherrepräsentation mit fester Größe basiert und effizienter ist. Unsere Technik prognostiziert einen kompakten Satz von K-Aufmerksamkeitskontexten während der Kodierung und lässt den Decoder einen effizienten Nachschlag berechnen, der nicht den Speicher konsultieren muss. Wir zeigen, dass unser Ansatz auf Augenhöhe mit dem Standard-Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus funktioniert und dabei eine Inferenz-Beschleunigung von 20% für reale Übersetzungsaufgaben und mehr für Aufgaben mit längeren Sequenzen liefert. Durch die Visualisierung von Aufmerksamkeitswerten zeigen wir, dass unsere Modelle unterschiedliche, sinnvolle Ausrichtungen lernen.', 'id': 'Mekanisme perhatian berdasarkan isi standar biasanya digunakan dalam model urutan-ke-urutan secara komputasional mahal karena membutuhkan perbandingan dari keadaan pengekode besar dan dekoder pada setiap langkah waktu. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan mekanisme perhatian alternatif berdasarkan representation memori ukuran tetap yang lebih efisien. Teknik kami memprediksi set kompakt dari konteks perhatian K selama pengekodan dan memungkinkan dekoder menghitung pencarian efisien yang tidak perlu berkonsultasi memori. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita bekerja sama dengan mekanisme perhatian standar sementara memberikan kecepatan kesimpulan 20% untuk tugas terjemahan dunia nyata dan lebih untuk tugas dengan urutan yang lebih panjang. Dengan membayangkan skor perhatian kita menunjukkan bahwa model kita belajar penyesuaian yang berbeda, berarti.', 'fa': 'مکانیسم توجه استاندارد بر اساس محتویات معمولاً در مدل\u200cهای دستورات به دستورات استفاده می\u200cشود به صورت محاسبه\u200cای گرون است، همانطور که نیاز به مقایسه کردن وضعیت\u200cهای enkoder و dekoder بزرگ در هر قدم است. در این کار، ما یک مکانیسم توجه alternatives را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس نمایش اندازه\u200cی ثابت\u200cتر حافظه است. تکنیک ما پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند که مجموعه\u200cای از موضوع توجه K در زمان رمزبندی و اجازه می\u200cدهد که دکورد یک جستجوی موثر را محاسبه کند که لازم نیست به خاطره مشورت کنید. ما نشان می دهیم که دستور ما با مکانیسم توجه استاندارد انجام می دهد، در حالی که سرعت بیست درصد برای کار ترجمه\u200cهای دنیای واقعی و بیشتر برای کار\u200cها با دستور طولانی است. با تصویر کردن امتیاز توجه نشان می دهیم که مدل های ما تعداد جدید و معنی را یاد می گیرند.', 'ko': '보통 시퀀스에서 시퀀스 모델에 사용되는 표준은 내용 기반의 주의 메커니즘이 계산에 매우 비싸다. 왜냐하면 시간마다 대형 인코더와 디코더의 상태를 비교해야 하기 때문이다.이 작업에서 우리는 고정된 크기 메모리 표시를 바탕으로 하는 대체 주의 메커니즘을 제시했는데 이 메커니즘이 더욱 효과적이다.우리의 기술은 인코딩 과정에서 촘촘한 K 주의 상하문을 예측하고 디코더로 하여금 메모리를 조회할 필요가 없는 효율적인 검색을 계산하게 했다.우리는 우리의 방법이 표준적인 주의 메커니즘과 비슷하다는 것을 증명했다. 또한 실제 세계의 번역 임무에 대해 추리 속도가 20% 증가했고 서열이 비교적 긴 임무에 대해 추리 속도가 더욱 높아졌다.시각화된 주의력 점수를 통해 우리는 우리의 모델이 뚜렷하고 의미 있는 배열을 배웠다는 것을 증명했다.', 'tr': 'Adatça sequence-to-sequence modellerinde ullanýan standart maksadat mekanizmasy, beýleki ködler we dekoder durumlaryň karşılaştyrylmagy gerekli üçin hasaplanyr. Bu işde, beýleki bir sistemada sabit ululyk yada etmäge daýan ýan başga bir üns meýdançasyny teklip edip bilýäris. Biziň teknikimiz kodlemek wagtynda kompakt K üns Kontekstlerini öňdýär we kodlemek üçin etkinlik bir gözleme hasaplamaga izin berýär. Biziň ýaryşymyz standart üns meýdançasynda 20% sany dünýäde terjime etmek täbliklerinde we köp täbliklerinde durmuş şeklinde üýtgedýändigini görkeýäris. Diňleşen notlary görkezilerek modellerimiziň tapawut we närazy çyzyglary öwrenip bilýändigini görkezýäris.', 'sq': 'Mekanizmi standard i vëmendjes bazuar në përmbajtje tipikisht i përdorur në modelet sekuencë-në-sekuencë është llogaritësisht i shtrenjtë pasi kërkon krahasimin e shteteve të mëdha të koduesit dhe dekoderit në çdo hap të kohës. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një mekanizëm alternativ vëmendjeje bazuar në një përfaqësim të kujtesës me madhësi të fiksuar që është më efektiv. Teknika jonë parashikon një set kompakt të konteksteve të vëmendjes K gjatë kodimit dhe lejon dekoderin të llogarisë një kërkim të efektshëm që nuk ka nevojë për të konsultuar kujtesën. Ne tregojmë se qasja jonë funksionon në mënyrë të barabartë me mekanizmin standard të vëmendjes duke dhënë rezultate të shpejtë prej 20% për detyrat e përkthimit në botën reale dhe më shumë për detyrat me sekuenca më të gjata. Duke vizualizuar rezultatet e vëmendjes ne demonstrojmë se modelet tona mësojnë rregullime të veçanta, të kuptueshme.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa uangalizi wa maudhui wa kawaida unaotumika katika mifano ya mfululizo-hadi mfululizo ni ghali kwa sababu inahitaji kulinganisha na nchi kubwa na kupunguza kwa kila hatua. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo mbadala wa kusikiliza kwa msingi wa uwakilishi wa kumbukumbu yenye ufanisi zaidi. Teknolojia yetu inatabiri makubaliano makubaliano ya kutafuta huduma za K wakati wa kutangazwa na kuiruhusu kuandika kwa kutafuta ufanisi ambao hauna haja ya kutojadili kumbukumbu. Tunaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inafanya kazi kwa upande wa kawaida na mfumo wa kutoa huduma za msingi wakati huo unatoa ongezeko la kasi kwa asilimia 20 kwa ajili ya kazi za kutafsiri duniani halisi na zaidi kwa ajili ya kazi zenye mfululizo wa muda mrefu. Kwa kuonyesha vipimo vya kusikiliza tunaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu hujifunza tofauti, yenye maana.', 'am': 'የመድረክ የውይይት አካባቢ አካባቢ በተለየ በቁጥር-ወደ-sequence ዓይነቶች የሚጠቀሙበት ምርጥ ዋጋ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ በተጨማሪው ትክክል ማስታሰቢያ መልዕክት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የልዩ ትምህርት አካሄድ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ Our technique predicts a compact set of K attention contexts during encoding and lets the decoder compute an efficient lookup that does not need to consult the memory.  አካባቢነታችን የዓለማዊ ትርጓሜ ስራዎችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በማሳየቅ እናሳየዋለን፤ ሞዴሎቻችን ልዩ እና አዋቂ ስርዓት እንዲማሩ እናሳይናለን፡፡', 'af': "Die standaard inhoud-gebaseerde aandag-mekanisme wat tipies gebruik word in sekwensie-na-sekwensie-modele is rekenaasjoneel koste as dit benodig die vergelyking van groot enkoder en dekoder staatste op elke tyd stap. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n alternatiewe aandag mekanisme gebaseer op 'n vaste grootte geheue voorstelling wat meer effektief is. Ons tekniks voorskou 'n kompakte stel van K aandag konteks tydens enkodering en laat die dekoder bereken 'n effektief opsyking wat nie nodig om die geheue te raak nie. Ons wys dat ons toegang op-par uitvoer met die standaard aandag mekanisme terwyl ons uitvoer van inferensie speedspandes van 20% vir werklike wêreld vertaling opdragte en meer vir opdragte met langer sekwensies. Deur die visualisering van aanmerkstelling te wys ons dat ons modele onderskynlik, betekenlike belyning leer.", 'hy': 'Ստանդարտ բովանդակությամբ հիմնված ուշադրության մեխանիզմը, որը սովորաբար օգտագործվում է հաջորդականության-հաջորդականության մոդելներում, հաշվարկների առումով թանկ է, քանի որ այն պահանջում է մեծ կոդերի և կոդերի վիճակների համեմատություն Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք այլընտրանքային ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որը հիմնված է ֆիքսավոր չափի հիշողության ներկայացման վրա, որը ավելի արդյունավետ է: Մեր տեխնիկան կանխատեսում է K ուշադրության կոնտեքստը կոդավորման ընթացքում և թույլ է տալիս կոդավորիչը հաշվարկել արդյունավետ որոնումը, որը անհրաժեշտ չէ հիշողության խորհուրդ տալ: We show that our approach performs on-par with the standard attention mechanism while yielding inference speedups of 20% for real-world translation tasks and more for tasks with longer sequences.  Ուշադրության գնահատման միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելները սովորում են տարբեր, իմաստալից հարաբերություններ:', 'bn': 'সাধারণত সেকেন্ড-থেকে সেকেন্ড মডেলে ব্যবহৃত স্বাভাবিক বস্তুভিত্তিক মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে গণনাত্রিকভাবে ব্যয়বহুল, যেহেতু প্রতিবারের প্রতি  এই কাজে আমরা একটি বিকল্প মনোযোগ প্রস্তাব করছি একটি স্থায়ী আকারের মেমরি প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভিত্তিতে যা আরো কার্যকর। আমাদের প্রযুক্তি এনকোডিং সময় কে মনোযোগ প্রতিযোগিতার একটি চুক্তি প্রতিযোগিতা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে এবং ডেকোডারের কাছে কার্যকর পর্যবেক আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা স্বাভাবিক মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়েছে এবং বাস্তব বিশ্ব অনুবাদের কাজের জন্য ২০ শতাংশের দ্রুত মনোযোগ দেখার মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রদর্শন করি যে আমাদের মডেল বিভিন্ন, অর্থপূর্ণ স্থান শিখে।', 'bs': 'Standardni mehanizam pažnje na sadržaju koji se obično koristi u modelima sekvence do sekvence je kompjuterski skup jer zahtijeva usporedbu velikih država kodera i dekodera svakog koraka. U ovom poslu predlažemo alternativni mehanizam pažnje na temelju zastupanja određene veličine pamćenja koji je efikasniji. Naša tehnika predviđa kompaktni set pažnje K tijekom kodiranja i dozvoljava dekoderu da računa efikasno potraženje koje ne mora konsultirati sa sjećanjem. Pokazujemo da naš pristup obavlja standardni mehanizam pažnje dok daje brzine infekcije od 20% za stvarne svjetske prevodne zadatke i više za zadatke sa dužim sekvencijama. Visualizirajući rezultate pažnje pokazujemo da naše modele uče različite, značajne poravnanja.', 'ca': "El mecanisme d'atenció estàndard basat en continguts que s'utilitza típicament en models de seqüència a seqüència és calculativament car requereix la comparació d'estats de codificador i codificador grans a cada pas. En aquesta feina, proposem un mecanisme alternativ d'atenció basat en una representació de memòria de mida fixa més eficient. La nostra tècnica prediu un conjunt compacte de contextos d'atenció K durant la codificació i permet al descodificador calcular una cerca eficient que no necessita consultar la memòria. Ens demostram que el nostre enfocament funciona a la mateixa manera que el mecanisme d'atenció estándar mentre produeix velocitats de inferència del 20% per a tasques de traducció del món real i més per tasques amb seqüències més llargues. Visualitzant puntuacions d'atenció demostrem que els nostres models aprenen alliniaments distints i significatius.", 'az': 'StandardlńĪ m…ôlumat tabanlńĪ dikkati mehanizmi, genellikle sequence-to-sequence modell…ôrd…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn, h…ôr d…ôf…ô b√∂y√ľk kodlayńĪcńĪ v…ô dekoder durumlarńĪnńĪn qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmasńĪ lazńĪmdńĪr. Bu iŇüd…ô, daha faydalńĪ olan fikirli √ßoxluńüun yaddaŇü g√∂st…ôricisin…ô dayanan alternatif bir g√∂zl…ôm…ô mehanizmini t…ôklif edirik. Bizim teknikimiz kodlama sńĪrasńĪnda kompakt K √ľnvanlarńĪn m√ľxt…ôlifliyini t…ômin edir v…ô dekoderin yada salmańüa gerek olmayan faydalńĪ bir g√∂zl…ôm…ô hesablayńĪr. Biz g√∂st…ôririk ki, bizim t…ôrzimiz standart dikkati mehanizmi il…ô, h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn d√ľnya t…ôrc√ľml…ôrin…ô 20% t…ôr…ôfl…ôrini v…ô daha uzun se√ß…ônl…ôr il…ô iŇül…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn daha √ßox y√ľks…ôk t…ôr…ôfl…ôrl…ô birlikd…ô istifad…ô edir. Dikkatimiz n√∂qt…ôl…ôrini g√∂r√ľrs…ôk modell…ôrimizin f…ôrqli, anlamlńĪ t…ôr…ôfl…ôri √∂yr…ôndiyini g√∂st…ôririk.', 'cs': 'Standardní obsahový mechanismus pozornosti typicky používaný v sekvenčních modelech je výpočetně nákladný, protože vyžaduje srovnání velkých stavů snímače a dekodéru v každém časovém kroku. V této práci navrhujeme alternativní mechanismus pozornosti založený na reprezentaci paměti pevné velikosti, který je efektivnější. Naše technika předpovídá kompaktní sadu kontextů pozornosti K během kódování a umožňuje dekodéru vypočítat efektivní vyhledávání, které nemusí konzultovat paměť. Ukazujeme, že náš přístup funguje stejně jako standardní mechanismus pozornosti a zároveň přináší zrychlení inference o 20% pro reálné překladatelské úlohy a více pro úlohy s delšími sekvencemi. Vizualizací skóre pozornosti ukazujeme, že se naše modely naučí odlišné, smysluplné zarovnání.', 'et': 'Standardne sisupõhine tähelepanumehhanism, mida tavaliselt kasutatakse jada-jada mudelites, on arvutuslikult kallis, kuna see nõuab suurte kodeerijate ja dekooderite olekute võrdlemist igal ajasammul. Selles töös pakume välja alternatiivse tähelepanumehhanismi, mis põhineb fikseeritud suurusega mälu esitamisel, mis on efektiivsem. Meie tehnika prognoosib kodeerimise ajal kompaktset K tähelepanu konteksti ja võimaldab dekoodril arvutada tõhusat otsingut, mis ei pea mäluga konsulteerima. Näitame, et meie lähenemisviis toimib standardse tähelepanumehhanismiga samal ajal, kui tulemused on 20% kiiremad reaalsete tõlketööde puhul ja rohkem pikemate järjestustega ülesannete puhul. Tähelepanuskooride visualiseerimisega näitame, et meie mudelid õpivad selgeid ja tähenduslikke joondusi.', 'fi': 'Standardi sisältöön perustuva huomiomekanismi, jota käytetään tyypillisesti sekvenssimalleissa, on laskennallisesti kallis, koska se vaatii suurten kooderi- ja dekooderitilojen vertailua jokaisessa vaiheessa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme vaihtoehtoista huomiomekanismia, joka perustuu kiinteäkokoiseen muistiesitykseen ja on tehokkaampi. Tekniikkamme ennustaa kompaktin joukon K-huomiokonteksteja koodauksen aikana ja antaa dekooderin laskea tehokkaan haun, jonka ei tarvitse tarkastella muistia. Osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme toimii samalla tavalla kuin normaali huomiomekanismi ja tuottaa 20% johtonopeuksia todellisissa käännöstehtävissä ja enemmän tehtävissä, joissa on pidempiä sekvenssejä. Huomiopisteitä visualisoimalla osoitamme, että mallimme oppivat selkeitä ja merkityksellisiä linjauksia.', 'sk': 'Standardni vsebinski mehanizem pozornosti, ki se običajno uporablja v modelih zaporedja do zaporedja, je računalniško drag, saj zahteva primerjavo velikih stanj kodirnikov in dekodirnikov v vsakem koraku. V tem delu predlagamo alternativni mehanizem pozornosti, ki temelji na predstavitvi pomnilnika fiksne velikosti, ki je učinkovitejši. Naša tehnika predvideva kompakten nabor K kontekstov pozornosti med kodiranjem in omogoča dekodirniku izračunati učinkovito iskanje, ki mu ni treba posvetovati s pomnilnikom. Pokazali smo, da naš pristop deluje enako standardnemu mehanizmu pozornosti, hkrati pa omogoča 20% pospešitev sklepanja za prevajanje v realnem svetu in več za opravila z daljšimi zaporedji. Z vizualizacijo rezultatov pozornosti dokazujemo, da se naši modeli naučijo različnih, smiselnih poravnave.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sistem sing paling-sistem kuwi nggawe akeh operasi ning model sing sekondirne-to-sekondirne kuwi kaluwargane kapan kuwi kudu nggawe ngubah dhéwé operasi sistem sing nyimpen karo koder karo akeh dumadhi. Nang gunggo iki, kita supoyo mecanisik penting Alternate, sing basa ning awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo mbanjurakno sing luwih apik. Teknik awak dhéwé ngerasakno String nggawe barang K atens nang koding Awak dhéwé ngerasakno diangkat dhéwé iso nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggambar tarjamahan kanggo nik nggawe barang pengaturan sing luwih apik, nik nggawe barang awak dhéwé iki luwih apik kanggo ngerasakno tarjamahan sing luwih dumadhi Ngawe ngilanggar nggambar aturan sing paling nggawe modelimu kuwi wis ngerti, ngono nggawe barang sing nyimpen.', 'ha': "Mai amfani da matsayin muhalli na kayan daidaita cikin kayan tsari na ɗabi'a, ana yi amfani da shi a cikin misãlai masu saka-zuwa-sequence, yana da ƙidãya mai girma, kamar yadda ana so da kwamfyuta masu sami ga kode babba kuma daidaita masu sakan koda ko da za'a yi amfani da duk wuri. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata matsayi mai amfani da aikin muhimmanci, a kan karatun wani taƙaitacce wa kumburar tsakanin zai iya da mafiya amfani. Tekinikinmu na gabatar da wata matsayi na tsari na K masu aikin muhimmanci a lokacin kodi kuma yana yarda koda ya lissafa wata fili mai fasahan kwamfyuta wanda ba ya kasancẽwa ya yi saka ga kumbar. Tuna nũna cewa hanyoyinmu yana aiki a kan-par da mekanin aikin taƙaitacce a lokacin da za'a sami haraka da 20% wa aikin fassarar-duniya masu gaskiya kuma yana da wasu wa'adin aikin da ke da sauri. Ga ka gane fassarar muhimmada, za mu nuna misalinmu za'a sanar da juyin-daban, mai fassara.", 'he': 'מנגנון תשומת לב סטנדרטי מבוסס בתוכן, שמשתמש בדרך כלל בדוגמנים רצף-לרצף, יקר מחשב כיוון שהוא דורש השוואה של מדיני קודד גדולים ומדיני קודד בכל צעד. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מנגנון תשומת לב אלטרנטיבי מבוסס על מייצג זיכרון בגודל קבוע שיהיה יעיל יותר. הטכניקה שלנו חוששת קבוצה חדה של קשרי תשומת לב K במהלך הקוד ומאפשרת לקודר לחשב חיפוש יעיל שלא צריך להתייעץ לזיכרון. אנו מראים שהגישה שלנו מבצעת באופן שווה עם מנגנון תשומת לב סטנדרטי בזמן שהוביל מהירות ההנחה של 20% עבור משימות התרגום בעולם האמיתי ויותר עבור משימות עם רצפים ארוכים יותר. על ידי חיזוי נקודות תשומת לב אנו מראים שהדוגמנים שלנו לומדים מתאמות ברורות וממשמעותיות.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ནང་དོན་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ལ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་sequence-to-sequence་རིམ་པ་ཚོགས་ལས་རྩིས་འཁོར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྩ In this work, we propose an alternative attention mechanism based on a fixed size memory representation that is more efficient. Our technique predicts a compact set of K attention contexts during encoding and lets the decoder compute an efficient lookup that does not need to consult the memory. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྟངས་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བརྟན་ན། མི་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་གྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་གསར་པའི་བྱ་འག ང་ཚོའི་མིག'}
{'en': 'Rotated Word Vector Representations and their Interpretability', 'ar': 'تمثيلات متجه الكلمات المستديرة وإمكانية تفسيرها', 'fr': 'Représentations vectorielles de mots pivotés et leur interprétabilité', 'es': 'Representaciones vectoriales de palabras rotadas y su interpret', 'pt': 'Representações de vetores de palavras giradas e sua interpretabilidade', 'ja': '回転した単語ベクトル表現とその解釈可能性', 'hi': 'घुमाया गया वर्ड वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व और उनकी Interpretability', 'zh': '旋词向量示其可解释性', 'ru': 'Векторные представления с чередованием слов и их интерпретируемость', 'ga': 'Léiriúcháin Veicteoir Rothlaithe Focal agus a nInléiritheacht', 'ka': 'სიტყვის ვიქტორის გამოსახულებები და მათი ინტერპექტრებულობა', 'hu': 'Forgatott szóvektoros ábrázolások és értelmezhetőségük', 'el': 'Περιστρεφόμενες αναπαραστάσεις διανυσματικών λέξεων και η ερμηνείά τους', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni vettoriali di parole ruotate e loro interpretabilità', 'kk': 'Сөздің векторының кескіндері мен оның интерпретациялығы бұрылған', 'lt': 'Sukti žodžio vektoriaus atstovai ir jų aiškinimas', 'mk': 'Ротирани вектори на зборови и нивната интерпретабилност', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Vektor Perkataan Putar dan Interpretabiliti mereka', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളും അവയുടെ അഭിപ്രായം ചുറ്റിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Rotated Word Vector Representations and their Interpretability', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдсэн үг векторын төлөөлөл болон тэдний ойлголт боломжтой', 'no': 'Rotert ordvektorrepresentasjonar og interpreteringa', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea vectorială a cuvintelor rotite și interpretabilitatea lor', 'pl': 'Reprezentacje wektorowe obrotowe słowa i ich interpretacja', 'si': 'වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය', 'so': 'Horumarinta iyo turjumaadkooda', 'sv': 'Roterade ordvektorrepresentationer och deras tolkningsbarhet', 'ta': 'சுழற்று', 'ur': 'ورڈ ویکتور معجزات اور ان کی تفصیل قابلیت', 'sr': 'Представители вектора и их интерпретност', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Các đài phát xít luân phiên và dịch vụ của chúng', 'bg': 'Завъртани текстови вектори и тяхната интерпретация', 'hr': 'Predstavljanja rotiranih riječi vektora i njihova razumljivost', 'da': 'Roterede ordvektorrepræsentationer og deres fortolkningsevne', 'nl': 'Gedraaide woordvectorrepresentaties en hun interpreteerbaarheid', 'de': 'Rotated Word Vector Darstellungen und ihre Interpretierbarkeit', 'ko': '회전사 벡터는 그 해석성을 나타낸다', 'fa': 'نمایش\u200cدهندگان ویکتور کلمات و قابلیت توضیح آنها', 'sw': 'Alizungumzia maoni ya Vector na tafsiri yao', 'af': 'Roteer Woord Vektor voorstellings en hul Interpretabiliteit', 'id': 'Perwakilan Vektor Perkataan Berputar dan Interpretabilitas mereka', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesit e vektorit të fjalës të rrotulluara dhe interpretueshmëria e tyre', 'tr': 'Sözler vektör temsilleri we olaryň düşündirmeleri', 'am': 'vectors-action', 'bn': 'শব্দ ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধি এবং তাদের অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Predstavljanja vektora i njihova interpretabilnost', 'hy': 'Բառերի վիկտորի պտտվող ներկայացումները և դրանց թարգմանելիությունը', 'ca': 'Representacions rotades del vector de paraules i la seva interpretabilitat', 'cs': 'Otočené vektorové reprezentace slova a jejich interpretovatelnost', 'et': 'Pööratavad sõnavaktori esitused ja nende tõlgendatavus', 'fi': 'Kierretyt sanavektoriesitykset ja niiden tulkittavuus', 'az': '參뙺泉饲椠噥歴쎶爠哉駅齫楬즙物⁶즙⁏湬慲쒱渠哉駅齫楬즙物⁄쎶湤쎼狃뱬淃볅鼊', 'jv': 'Ngucap', 'he': 'מייצגים ויקטורים מילים מסובבים והתרשמות שלהם', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Vrtljive predstavitve vektorjev besed in njihova tolmačljivost', 'bo': 'འདྲ་བ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Vector representation of words improves performance in various NLP tasks, but the high dimensional word vectors are very difficult to interpret. We apply several rotation algorithms to the vector representation of words to improve the interpretability. Unlike previous approaches that induce sparsity, the rotated vectors are interpretable while preserving the expressive performance of the original vectors. Furthermore, any prebuilt word vector representation can be rotated for improved interpretability. We apply rotation to skipgrams and glove and compare the expressive power and interpretability with the original vectors and the sparse overcomplete vectors. The results show that the rotated vectors outperform the original and the sparse overcomplete vectors for interpretability and expressiveness tasks.', 'ar': 'التمثيل المتجه للكلمات يحسن الأداء في مختلف مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، ولكن من الصعب جدًا تفسير ناقلات الكلمات عالية الأبعاد. نقوم بتطبيق العديد من خوارزميات الدوران على التمثيل المتجه للكلمات لتحسين قابلية التفسير. على عكس الأساليب السابقة التي تحث على التباين ، فإن المتجهات المستديرة قابلة للتفسير مع الحفاظ على الأداء التعبيري للناقلات الأصلية. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكن تدوير أي تمثيل متجه للكلمات تم إنشاؤه مسبقًا لتحسين القابلية للتفسير. نحن نطبق التدوير على التخطي والقفازات ونقارن القوة التعبيرية والقابلية للتفسير مع المتجهات الأصلية والمتجهات المتناثرة المفرطة. تظهر النتائج أن النواقل المستديرة تتفوق على المتجهات الأصلية والمتناثرة المفرطة في مهام القابلية للتفسير والتعبير.', 'pt': 'A representação vetorial de palavras melhora o desempenho em várias tarefas de PNL, mas os vetores de palavras de alta dimensão são muito difíceis de interpretar. Aplicamos vários algoritmos de rotação à representação vetorial de palavras para melhorar a interpretabilidade. Ao contrário das abordagens anteriores que induzem a esparsidade, os vetores rotacionados são interpretáveis, preservando o desempenho expressivo dos vetores originais. Além disso, qualquer representação de vetor de palavras pré-construída pode ser girada para melhor interpretabilidade. Aplicamos rotação a skipgrams e luva e comparamos o poder expressivo e interpretabilidade com os vetores originais e os vetores sobrecompletos esparsos. Os resultados mostram que os vetores rotacionados superam o original e os vetores esparsos sobrecompletos para tarefas de interpretabilidade e expressividade.', 'fr': "La représentation vectorielle des mots améliore les performances dans diverses tâches de PNL, mais les vecteurs de mots de grande dimension sont très difficiles à interpréter. Nous appliquons plusieurs algorithmes de rotation à la représentation vectorielle des mots afin d'améliorer l'interprétabilité. Contrairement aux approches précédentes qui induisent une dispersion, les vecteurs tournés sont interprétables tout en préservant les performances expressives des vecteurs d'origine. En outre, toute représentation vectorielle de mot prédéfinie peut être pivotée pour une meilleure interprétabilité. Nous appliquons la rotation aux skipgrams et au gant et comparons la puissance expressive et l'interprétabilité avec les vecteurs originaux et les vecteurs surcomplets clairsemés. Les résultats montrent que les vecteurs pivotés surpassent les vecteurs d'origine et les vecteurs surcomplets rares pour les tâches d'interprétabilité et d'expressivité.", 'es': 'La representación vectorial de palabras mejora el rendimiento en varias tareas de PNL, pero los vectores de palabras de alta dimensión son muy difíciles de interpretar. Aplicamos varios algoritmos de rotación a la representación vectorial de las palabras para mejorar la interpretabilidad. A diferencia de los enfoques anteriores que inducen la dispersión, los vectores rotados son interpretables al tiempo que preservan el rendimiento expresivo de los vectores originales. Además, cualquier representación vectorial de palabras preconstruida se puede girar para mejorar la interpretabilidad. Aplicamos la rotación a los skipgrams y al guante y comparamos el poder expresivo y la interpretabilidad con los vectores originales y los escasos vectores sobrecompletos. Los resultados muestran que los vectores rotados superan a los vectores sobrecompletos originales y dispersos en las tareas de interpretabilidad y expresividad.', 'ja': '単語のベクトル表現は、様々なＮＬＰタスクにおけるパフォーマンスを改善するが、高次元の単語ベクトルは、非常に解釈が困難である。私たちは、解釈可能性を向上させるために、いくつかの回転アルゴリズムを単語のベクトル表現に適用します。希少性を誘発する以前のアプローチとは異なり、回転したベクターは、元のベクターの発現性能を維持しながら解釈可能である。さらに、あらかじめ構築された任意の単語ベクトル表現を回転させて、解釈可能性を向上させることができる。私たちは、スキップグラムと手袋に回転を適用し、表現力と解釈可能性を元のベクトルとスパース過剰ベクトルと比較します。結果は、解釈可能性及び表現可能性タスクについて、回転したベクトルが元のベクトル及びまばらな過完全ベクトルを上回ることを示す。', 'zh': '单词之向量,示增NLP能,然高维单词向量甚难解。 数转算法用于单词矢量,以崇可解释性。 与前导疏性之法不同,旋向量可解,兼守原始向量之性。 此外,诸预构词向量示皆可旋以崇可解释性。 吾将周旋于跳手套,而以表现力可解释性与原始向量疏疏备向量较之。 结果表明在可解释性表现力,旋向量优向量疏具向量。', 'hi': 'शब्दों का वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व विभिन्न एनएलपी कार्यों में प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है, लेकिन उच्च आयामी शब्द वैक्टर की व्याख्या करना बहुत मुश्किल है। हम interpretability में सुधार करने के लिए शब्दों के वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए कई रोटेशन एल्गोरिदम लागू करते हैं। पिछले दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत जो स्पार्सिटी को प्रेरित करते हैं, घुमाए गए वैक्टर मूल वैक्टर के अभिव्यंजक प्रदर्शन को संरक्षित करते हुए व्याख्यायोग्य होते हैं। इसके अलावा, किसी भी पूर्वनिर्मित शब्द वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व को बेहतर व्याख्या के लिए घुमाया जा सकता है। हम skipgrams और दस्ताने के लिए रोटेशन लागू होते हैं और मूल वैक्टर और विरल overcomplete वैक्टर के साथ अभिव्यंजक शक्ति और interpretability की तुलना करते हैं। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि घुमाए गए वैक्टर व्याख्याऔर अभिव्यंजकता कार्यों के लिए मूल और विरल अति-पूर्ण वैक्टर से आगे निकल जाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Векторное представление слов улучшает производительность в различных задачах NLP, но высокомерные векторы слов очень трудно интерпретировать. Мы применяем несколько алгоритмов вращения к векторному представлению слов для улучшения интерпретируемости. В отличие от предыдущих подходов, которые вызывают редкость, вращающиеся векторы можно интерпретировать, сохраняя при этом экспрессивную производительность исходных векторов. Кроме того, любое предварительно построенное представление вектора слов может быть повернуто для улучшения интерпретируемости. Мы применяем вращение к скипрограммам и перчаткам и сравниваем экспрессивную силу и интерпретируемость с исходными векторами и редкими полными векторами. Результаты показывают, что повернутые векторы превосходят исходные, а редкие - неполные векторы для задач интерпретируемости и экспрессивности.', 'ga': 'Feabhsaíonn ionadaíocht veicteoireach na bhfocal feidhmíocht i dtascanna éagsúla NLP, ach tá na veicteoirí focal ardtoiseacha an-deacair a léirmhíniú. Cuirimid roinnt halgartaim rothlaithe i bhfeidhm ar léiriú veicteoireach na bhfocal chun inléirmhíniú a fheabhsú. Murab ionann agus cuir chuige roimhe seo a chothaíonn ganntanas, is féidir na veicteoirí rothlaithe a léirmhíniú agus feidhmíocht léiritheach na mbunveicteora á gcaomhnú. Ina theannta sin, is féidir aon léiriú veicteoir focal réamhthógtha a rothlú le haghaidh inléirmhínithe feabhsaithe. Cuirimid rothlú i bhfeidhm ar scipegramanna agus ar lámhainní agus cuirimid i gcomparáid leis an gcumhacht léiritheach agus inléirmhínithe leis na veicteoirí bunaidh agus leis na veicteoirí róiomlána tearca. Léiríonn na torthaí go n-éiríonn níos fearr leis na veicteoirí rothlaithe ná na veicteoirí bunaidh agus na veicteoirí tearca róchríochnaithe le haghaidh tascanna inléirmhínithe agus léiritheachta.', 'hu': 'A szavak vektoros ábrázolása javítja a teljesítményt különböző NLP feladatokban, de a nagy dimenziós szóvektorokat nagyon nehéz értelmezni. Az értelmezhetőség javítása érdekében több rotációs algoritmust alkalmazunk a szavak vektoros reprezentációjára. A korábbi, ritkaságot indukáló megközelítésekkel ellentétben a forgatott vektorok értelmezhetőek, miközben megőrzik az eredeti vektorok kifejező teljesítményét. Továbbá bármilyen előre beépített szóvektoros reprezentáció forgatható a jobb értelmezhetőség érdekében. Forgást alkalmazunk a skipgramokra és kesztyűkre, és összehasonlítjuk a kifejező erejét és értelmezhetőségét az eredeti vektorokkal és a ritka túlzott vektorokkal. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a forgatott vektorok értelmezhetőségi és expresszivitási feladatok tekintetében felülmúlják az eredeti és a ritka túlfejlesztett vektorokat.', 'el': 'Η διανυσματική αναπαράσταση των λέξεων βελτιώνει την απόδοση σε διάφορες εργασίες αλλά τα υψηλής διαστάσεων διανύσματα λέξεων είναι πολύ δύσκολο να ερμηνευθούν. Εφαρμόζουμε διάφορους αλγόριθμους περιστροφής στην διανυσματική αναπαράσταση των λέξεων για να βελτιώσουμε την ερμηνεία. Σε αντίθεση με τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις που προκαλούν σπανιότητα, τα περιστρεφόμενα διανύσματα είναι ερμηνευτικά διατηρώντας παράλληλα την εκφραστική απόδοση των αρχικών διανύσματα. Επιπλέον, οποιαδήποτε προκατασκευασμένη διανυσματική αναπαράσταση λέξεων μπορεί να περιστραφεί για βελτιωμένη ερμηνεία. Εφαρμόζουμε περιστροφή σε σκίπγραμμα και γάντι και συγκρίνουμε την εκφραστική δύναμη και ερμηνεία με τα αρχικά διανύσματα και τα αραιή υπερπλήρη διανύσματα. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι τα περιστρεφόμενα διανύσματα ξεπερνούν το αρχικό και το αραιό υπερπλήρες διανύσμα για εργασίες ερμηνείας και εκφραστικότητας.', 'ka': 'ვიქტორის სიტყვების გამოსახულება განსხვავებული NLP დავალებში გამოსახულებს, მაგრამ მეტი განსხვავებული სიტყვების ვიქტორი ძალიან რთულია განსხვავებას. ჩვენ ვიყენებთ რამდენიმე პროციაციის ალგორიტიმები სიტყვების გამოსახულებას გვქტორისთვის სიტყვების განსახულებას, რომელიც უფრო მეტივად მაშინ წინა გადასვლება, რომელიც გამოიყენებს სინამდვილეობა, ცვლილებული გვექტორები შეუძლებელია, რომელიც განსხვავებულია ორიგინალური გვექტორების გამოსახულ დამატებით, ყველაფერი წინაშექმნილი სიტყვების გამოსახულება შეიძლება გადაბრუნოთ უფრო მეტსახულებელობისთვის. ჩვენ პროციაციას გადავიტანოთ გრამებზე და პლექტის შემდეგ და გამოყენება გამოყენებული ძალიან და განსხვავებელობას ორიგინალური გვექტორებით და გამოყენებული გვექტორე წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ დაბრუნული გვექტორები ორიგიალური და დაბრუნული გვექტორებისთვის გადასრულება და გამოსახულება.', 'lt': 'žodžių vektorių atspindimas pagerina įvairių NLP užduočių veiksmingumą, tačiau labai sunku aiškinti didelio matmens žodžių vektorius. Siekiant pagerinti aiškinamumą, naudojame kelis sukimo algoritmus žodžių vektorių rodymui. Skirtingai nuo ankstesnių metodų, skatinančių spartumą, sukamieji vektoriai gali būti aiškinami išsaugodami pirminių vektorių išraišką. Be to, bet koks iš anksto pagamintas žodžių vektoriaus atvaizdas gali būti sukamas siekiant pagerinti aiškinamumą. Taikome sukimą skipgramams ir pirštinėms ir lyginame ekspresinę galią ir aiškinamumą su pradiniais vektoriais ir nedideliais pernelyg dideliais vektoriais. Rezultatai rodo, kad sukamieji vektoriai viršija pradinius ir nedidelius sukamieji vektorius interpretuojamumo ir išraiškos užduotims atlikti.', 'it': "La rappresentazione vettoriale delle parole migliora le prestazioni in vari compiti NLP, ma i vettori di parole ad alta dimensione sono molto difficili da interpretare. Applichiamo diversi algoritmi di rotazione alla rappresentazione vettoriale delle parole per migliorare l'interpretabilità. A differenza di approcci precedenti che inducono la sparsità, i vettori ruotati sono interpretabili pur conservando le prestazioni espressive dei vettori originali. Inoltre, qualsiasi rappresentazione vettoriale di parole precostruita può essere ruotata per una migliore interpretabilità. Applichiamo la rotazione a skipgrams e guanto e confrontiamo la potenza espressiva e l'interpretabilità con i vettori originali e i rari vettori sovracompleti. I risultati mostrano che i vettori ruotati superano i vettori originali e quelli rari sovracompleti per attività di interpretabilità ed espressività.", 'mk': 'Векторското претставување на зборовите ја подобрува перформансата во различните NLP задачи, но високодимензионалните вектори на зборовите се многу тешки за интерпретација. We apply several rotation algorithms to the vector representation of words to improve the interpretability.  За разлика од претходните пристапи кои индуцираат скратност, ротираните вектори се интерпретабилни додека се зачуваат експресивните изведувања на оригиналните вектори. Покрај тоа, секоја предградена претстава на векторите на зборовите може да се ротира за подобрена интерпретабилност. Ние аплицираме ротација на скокнатите грами и ракавиците и ја споредуваме експресната моќ и интерпретабилноста со оригиналните вектори и ретките преплетени вектори. Резултатите покажуваат дека ротираните вектори ги надминуваат оригиналните и ретките преплетени вектори за интерпретабилноста и изразливоста на задачите.', 'ms': 'Perwakilan vektor perkataan meningkatkan prestasi dalam pelbagai tugas NLP, tetapi vektor perkataan dimensi tinggi sangat sukar untuk ditafsirkan. Kami melaksanakan beberapa algoritma putaran untuk mewakili vektor perkataan untuk meningkatkan interpretabiliti. Tidak seperti pendekatan terdahulu yang mengakibatkan kecepatan, vektor berputar boleh diterjemahkan semasa menyimpan prestasi ekspresif vektor asal. Lagipun, mana-mana mewakili vektor perkataan yang dibina-awal boleh diputar untuk kemampuan interpretasi yang lebih baik. Kita aplikasikan putaran untuk skipgram dan sarung tangan dan membandingkan kuasa ekspresif dan keterlaluan dengan vektor asal dan vektor langka berlebihan. Hasil menunjukkan vektor berputar melebihi vektor asal dan vektor berlebihan jarang untuk tugas interpretabiliti dan ekspresif.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വിവിധ എംഎല്\u200dപി ജോലികളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പക്ഷെ അത്യുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ചുറ്റുമുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിത സ്പെയിസിറ്റി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന മുമ്പുള്ള വഴികള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമാകുമ്പോള്\u200d ചുറ്റുമുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യാഖ്യാ അതിനുശേഷം, മുന്\u200dനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്ന ഏതെങ്കിലും വ്യാഖ്യ നമ്മള്\u200d സ്കിപ്ഗ്രാമിലേക്കും ഗ്ലോവിലേക്കും ചുറ്റിപ്പിടിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേക ശക്തിയും വ്യാഖ്യാനവും ആദ്യമായ വെക്റ്ററ അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Ir-rappreżentanza tal-kliem mill-vetturi ttejjeb il-prestazzjoni f’diversi kompiti tal-NLP, iżda l-vetturi tal-kliem dimensjonali għoljin huma diffiċli ħafna biex jiġu interpretati. Aħna napplikaw diversi algoritmi ta’ rotazzjoni għar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-vettur tal-kliem biex tittejjeb l-interpretabbiltà. Għall-kuntrarju tal-approċċi preċedenti li jinduċu l-iskarsezza, il-vetturi mdawra jistgħu jiġu interpretati filwaqt li jippreservaw il-prestazzjoni espressiva tal-vetturi oriġinali. Barra minn hekk, kwalunkwe rappreżentazzjoni tal-vettur tal-kelma mibnija minn qabel tista’ tinbidel għal interpretabbiltà mtejba. Aħna napplikaw ir-rotazzjoni għal skipgrams u ingwanti u nqabblu l-qawwa espressiva u l-interpretabbiltà mal-vetturi oriġinali u l-vetturi skarsi żejda. The results show that the rotated vectors outperform the original and the sparse overcomplete vectors for interpretability and expressiveness tasks.', 'no': 'Vektorsrepresentasjonen av ord forbetrar utviklinga i ulike NLP- oppgåver, men dei høge dimensjonale ordvektorane er svært vanskeleg å tolka ut. Vi bruker fleire roteringsalgoritme til vektorrepresentasjonen av ord for å forbetra tolkingsbehandlinga. I motsetjing til førre tilnærmingar som induserer sparsitet, vert roterte vektorane tolkbare medan det lagrar uttrykket av dei originale vektorane. I tillegg kan alle forbygde ordvektorrepresentasjonane roterast for forbetra tolkingsbehandling. Vi bruker rotasjon til skippar og hjelpelinjer og samanliknar ekspressiv straum og tolkbare med den opprinnelige vektorane og dei sparse overfullførte vektorane. Resultatet viser at roterte vektorane utfører originalen og sparse over fullførte vektorar for tolkingsbehandlingar og uttrykkbare oppgåver.', 'mn': 'Үүний векторын үзүүлэлт нь олон NLP үйл ажиллагаанд үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг. Гэхдээ хэмжээст үг векторууд илүү хэцүү байдаг. Бид хэд хэдэн эргүүлэлтийн алгоритмыг илэрхийлдэг үгнүүдийг илэрхийлдэг. Өмнөх арга баримтуудтай адил, эргүүлсэн векторууд эхний векторын илэрхийлэл үйлдлийг хадгалах үед илэрхийлэл боломжтой. Үүнээс гадна бүтээгдсэн үг векторын илэрхийлэл дээр илэрхийлж чадах боломжтой. Бид эргүүлэлтийг грамм, баруун руу шилжүүлж, илэрхийлэлтэй хүч, түүхийг эхний векторуудтай харьцуулдаг. Үүний үр дүнд эргүүлсэн векторууд анхны болон илэрхийлэл болон илэрхийлэл даалгаврыг илэрхийлж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Reprezentacja wektorowa słów poprawia wydajność w różnych zadaniach NLP, ale wektory słów o wysokim wymiarze są bardzo trudne do zinterpretowania. Do wektorowej reprezentacji słów stosujemy kilka algorytmów rotacji, aby poprawić interpretację. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich podejść, które indukują rzadkość, obracane wektory są interpretowalne przy zachowaniu wyraźnej wydajności oryginalnych wektorów. Ponadto dowolna wstępnie zbudowana reprezentacja wektorowa słowa może być obracana dla lepszej interpretacji. Stosujemy rotację do skipgramów i rękawic i porównujemy moc ekspresyjną i interpretacyjność z oryginalnymi wektorami i rzadkimi wektorami nadkompletnymi. Wyniki pokazują, że obracane wektory przewyższają oryginalne i rzadkie wektory nadkompletne dla zadań interpretowalności i ekspresyjności.', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea vectorială a cuvintelor îmbunătățește performanța în diferite sarcini PNL, dar vectorii de cuvânt de înaltă dimensiune sunt foarte dificil de interpretat. Aplicăm mai mulți algoritmi de rotație la reprezentarea vectorială a cuvintelor pentru a îmbunătăți interpretabilitatea. Spre deosebire de abordările anterioare care induc scaritate, vectorii rotiți sunt interpretați, păstrând în același timp performanța expresivă a vectorilor originali. Mai mult decât atât, orice reprezentare vectorială preconstruită de cuvinte poate fi rotită pentru o interpretare îmbunătățită. Aplicăm rotația la skipgrame și mănuși și comparăm puterea expresivă și interpretabilitatea cu vectorii originali și vectorii slabi supracompletați. Rezultatele arată că vectorii rotiți depășesc vectorii originali și cei slabi supracompletați pentru sarcini de interpretare și expresivitate.', 'kk': 'Сөздердің векторлық түсініктемесі түрлі NLP тапсырмалардың істемін жақсартады, бірақ бөлшекті сөздердің векторлары толтыру үшін өте қиын. Біз бірнеше айналдыру алгоритмдерін сөздердің түсініктемесін жақсарту үшін вектордың түсініктемесіне қолданамыз. Бірінші белсенділікті көмектесетін кезде, бұрылған векторлар бастапқы векторлардың өрнекті жылдамдығын сақтау кезінде аударылады. Қосымша, барлық алдын- құрылған сөздің векторын көрсету үшін жақсы аудару мүмкіндігі үшін бұралуға болады. Біз граммалар мен қолданбаларға айналдыру және өрнекті қуатты және түсініктемесін бастапқы векторлармен және кеңістікті толық векторлармен салыстырып салыстық. Нәтижелер аударылған векторлар түріншілікті және өрнекті тапсырмалар үшін толық векторлардың көпшілігін жасайды.', 'si': 'වෙක්ටර් වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විශේෂය NLP වැඩක් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩ කරනවා, නමුත් වෙක්ටර් වචන වචන වෙක්ටර් විව අපි වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයට වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න වෙක්ටර් අල්ගෝරිත්ම් වලින් භාවිත කරන්න. මුලින් වෙක්ටර්ගේ ප්\u200dරභාවිත වෙක්ටර්සිටිය සාධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. තවත්, හැම වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්ම පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි ග්\u200dරාම්ස් සහ ලෝක්වින් වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක බලය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙක්ටර් ස ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ වෙක්ටර්ස් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර වැක්ටර්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාර', 'sr': 'Vektorska predstava reèi poboljšava izvoðenje u raznim NLP zadacima, ali visoki dimenzionalni vektori reèi su veoma teški za tumačenje. Primjenjujemo nekoliko algoritma rotacije na predstavljanje vektora reèi kako bi poboljšali interpretabilnost. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa koji induciraju sparsitnost, rotirani vektori su interpretabilni dok čuvaju ekspresivnu funkciju originalnih vektora. Osim toga, bilo kakva predgrađena reprezentacija vektora reči može se rotirati zbog poboljšane interpretabilnosti. Primjenjujemo rotaciju na skipgrame i rukavice i uspoređujemo ekspresivnu moć i interpretabilnost sa originalnim vektorima i rezervnim prekopletnim vektorima. Rezultati pokazuju da rotirani vektori iznose originalne i rezervne prekompletne vektore za obaveze interpretabilnosti i izrazitosti.', 'so': 'Vector representation of words improves performance in ay sameeyaan shaqaalaha NLP oo kala duduwan, laakiin vectors oo hadalka sare waa adag tahay in la turjumo. Waxaynu u dalbannaa warqado ku wareegsan oo ku qoran hadalka si aan u kordhinno turjubaanka. Waxyaabaha hore oo kala duwan oo ay ka mid yihiin dhaqdhaqaalaha, waxaa lagu turjumaa wadooyinka ku wareegsan marka la ilaaliyo muuqashada wadanka asalka ah. Furthermore, any prebuilt word vector representation can be rotated for improved interpretability.  Waxaynu u soo wareegnaa qalabka iyo daboolka, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa xoogga iyo turjubaanka iyo wadooyinka asalka ah iyo wadooyinka daboolka ah. Abaalku waxay muuqataa in wadooyin ku wareegsan ay sameeyaan wadooyinkii asalka ahaa iyo wadooyinkii ay ku wareegsanaayeen waxyaabaha turjubaan iyo muuqashada.', 'sv': 'Vektorrepresentation av ord förbättrar prestanda i olika NLP-uppgifter, men de högdimensionella ordvektorerna är mycket svåra att tolka. Vi använder flera rotationsalgoritmer för vektorrepresentation av ord för att förbättra tolkningen. Till skillnad från tidigare metoder som inducerar sparsamhet, är de roterade vektorerna tolkade samtidigt som de ursprungliga vektorernas uttrycksfulla prestanda bevaras. Dessutom kan alla förinbyggda ordvektorrepresentationer roteras för förbättrad tolkning. Vi tillämpar rotation på skipgram och handske och jämför uttryckskraften och tolkningen med de ursprungliga vektorerna och de glesa överkompilerade vektorerna. Resultaten visar att de roterade vektorerna överträffar originalvektorerna och de glesa överkompilerade vektorerna för tolknings- och uttrycksuppgifter.', 'ta': 'வெக்டர் வார்த்தைகளின் குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, ஆனால் அதிகப்பட்ட பரிமாற்றமான வார்த்தை நெறிகள் வி வார்த்தைகளை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டிய வார்த்தைகளின் பிரதிநிதியில் சுழற்சி எண்ணங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். சுழற்றும் வெக்டார்கள் முந்தைய செயல்பாடுகளை பாதுகாக்கும் போது முந்தைய செயல்பாடு அதற்கு மேலும், எந்த முன்கட்டப்பட்ட வார்த்தை நெறிமுறை குறிப்பிடுதலும் மேம்படுத்த முடியும். நாம் வெக்டார் மற்றும் கண்ணாடிக்கு சுற்றி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் வெளிப்படையான சக்தி மற்றும் விளக்கம் மூல வெக்டார் மற The results show that the rotated vectors outperform the original and the sparse overcomplete vectors for interpretability and expressiveness tasks.', 'ur': 'ویکتور کی تصویر مختلف NLP کے کاموں میں عملکرد بہتر کرتی ہے لیکن بالا آیمیٹ لکھ ویکتور تعبیر کرنے کے لئے بہت مشکل ہیں. ہم کلمات کی تعبیر کے لئے بہت سی چلنے والگوریتم کو لکھتے ہیں۔ اگلے طریقے کے مطابق جنہوں نے سفارشی کی پیدائش کی مختلف ہے، چوری ویکتروں کی تعبیر قابل ہے جب کہ اصلی ویکتروں کے مطابق عملکرد کو حفاظت کرتے ہیں. اور اس کے علاوہ، ہر پہلے ساختہ کلمات ویکتور کی نمونش بہترین تفسیر کے لئے پھیر سکتی ہے. ہم اسپی گرم اور گلوٹ پر چلنا لائق کرتے ہیں اور مثبت قدرت اور تفسیر قابلیت کو اصلی ویکتروں کے ساتھ اور اسپی پر کامل ویکتروں کے ساتھ مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ چورے ہوئے ویکتروں نے اصلی بات اور مفصل کے کاموں کے لئے مفصل اور استثناء کے واسطے مکمل ویکتروں سے زیادہ کامل ہوتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name We apply several rotation algorithms to the vector representation of words to improve the interpretability.  Name Koʻrsatilgan, birinchi so'zlar vektor representi o'zgartirish uchun qo'yish mumkin. Biz tashqi grammatika va glov bilan qo'llayapmiz va xuddi kuch va tarjima va asl vectorlar bilan birlashtiramiz va kichkina ko'paytirilgan vectorlar bilan moslashmiz. Natijalar turli vectorlar asl asl va tahrirlash vazifalari uchun eng kichkina katta vectorlarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Sự tượng trưng của từ dẫn đường cải thiện hiệu suất trong các công việc độc lập, nhưng các giá trị từ đa chiều cao rất khó để hiểu. Chúng tôi áp dụng nhiều thuật to án quay vào sự đại diện của các từ để có thể giải thích. Không giống các phương pháp trước gây ra sơ suất, các sinh viên xoay chuyển sẽ được giải thích, trong khi bảo vệ khả năng biểu lộ của các sinh viên gốc. Thêm vào đó, mọi sự đại diện vector từ dự kiến có thể xoay lại để hiểu được. Chúng tôi áp dụng độ xoay để bỏ qua và găng tay và so sánh sức mạnh biểu lộ và giải thích với các véc- tơ gốc và các véc- tơ vượt quá tải thoáng đãng. Kết quả cho thấy các sinh viên xoay đã hoàn thành các trình nguyên gốc và các sinh vật phức tạp do rò rỉ để giải thích và bộc phát.', 'da': 'Vektorrepræsentation af ord forbedrer ydeevnen i forskellige NLP-opgaver, men de højdimensionelle ordvektorer er meget vanskelige at fortolke. Vi anvender flere rotationsalgoritmer til vektorrepræsentationen af ord for at forbedre fortolkningen. I modsætning til tidligere tilgange, der inducerer sparsomhed, er de roterede vektorer fortolkes samtidig med at de oprindelige vektors ekspressive ydeevne bevares. Desuden kan enhver forudbygget ordvektorrepræsentation roteres for at forbedre fortolkningen. Vi anvender rotation på skipgrams og handske og sammenligner udtrykskraften og fortolkningsevnen med de oprindelige vektorer og de sparsomme overkomplette vektorer. Resultaterne viser, at de roterede vektorer overperformer de originale og de sparsomme overkomplette vektorer for fortolknings- og udtryksopgaver.', 'hr': 'Vektorska predstavljanja riječi poboljšava učinkovitost u raznim zadacima NLP-a, ali visoki dimenzionalni vektori riječi su jako teški za tumačenje. Primjenjujemo nekoliko algoritma rotacije na predstavljanje vektora riječi kako bi poboljšali interpretabilnost. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa koji induciraju sparsitnost, rotirani vektori su interpretirani dok čuvaju ekspresivnu funkciju originalnih vektora. Osim toga, bilo kakva predgrađena reprezentacija vektora riječi može se okrenuti zbog poboljšane interpretabilnosti. Primjenjujemo rotaciju na skipgrame i rukavice i uspoređujemo ekspresivnu moć i interpretabilnost s originalnim vektorima i rezervnim prekopletnim vektorima. Rezultati pokazuju da rotirani vektori nadmađuju originalne i rezervne prekompletne vektore za obaveze interpretabilnosti i izrazitosti.', 'bg': 'Векторното представяне на думи подобрява ефективността при различни задачи, но високомерните вектори на думи са много трудни за интерпретиране. Ние прилагаме няколко ротационни алгоритма към векторното представяне на думи, за да подобрим интерпретацията. За разлика от предишните подходи, които предизвикват рядкост, въртящите се вектори са интерпретирани, като същевременно запазват изразителното представяне на оригиналните вектори. Освен това всяко предварително изградено слововекторно представяне може да бъде завъртано за по-добра интерпретация. Прилагаме въртене на скипграми и ръкавици и сравняваме изразителната сила и интерпретацията с оригиналните вектори и редките свръхзавършени вектори. Резултатите показват, че въртящите се вектори превъзхождат оригиналните и редките свръхзавършени вектори за задачи по интерпретация и изразителност.', 'nl': 'Vectorweergave van woorden verbetert de prestaties in verschillende NLP-taken, maar de hoge dimensionale woordvectoren zijn zeer moeilijk te interpreteren. We passen verschillende rotatiealgoritmes toe op de vectorweergave van woorden om de interpreteerbaarheid te verbeteren. In tegenstelling tot eerdere benaderingen die sparsity veroorzaken, zijn de geroteerde vectoren interpreteerbaar met behoud van de expressieve prestaties van de oorspronkelijke vectoren. Bovendien kan elke vooraf gebouwde woordvectorrepresentatie worden gedraaid voor een betere interpreteerbaarheid. We passen rotatie toe op skipgramms en handschoen en vergelijken de expressieve kracht en interpreteerbaarheid met de originele vectoren en de schaarse overcomplete vectoren. De resultaten tonen aan dat de geroteerde vectoren beter presteren dan de originele en de schaarse overcomplete vectoren voor interpreteerbaarheid en expressiviteit taken.', 'de': 'Die Vektordarstellung von Wörtern verbessert die Leistung in verschiedenen NLP-Aufgaben, aber die hochdimensionalen Wortvektoren sind sehr schwierig zu interpretieren. Wir wenden mehrere Rotationsalgorithmen auf die Vektordarstellung von Wörtern an, um die Interpretierbarkeit zu verbessern. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Ansätzen, die Sparsity induzieren, sind die gedrehten Vektoren interpretierbar, während die expressive Leistung der ursprünglichen Vektoren beibehalten wird. Darüber hinaus kann jede vorgefertigte Wortvektordarstellung für eine verbesserte Interpretierbarkeit gedreht werden. Wir wenden Rotation auf Skipgramme und Handschuh an und vergleichen die Ausdruckskraft und Interpretierbarkeit mit den ursprünglichen Vektoren und den spärlichen Overcomplete Vektoren. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die gedrehten Vektoren die ursprünglichen und die spärlichen Overcomplete Vektoren für Interpretations- und Expressivitätsaufgaben übertreffen.', 'id': 'Perwakilan vektor kata memperbaiki prestasi dalam berbagai tugas NLP, tetapi vektor kata dimensi tinggi sangat sulit untuk diterjemahkan. Kami menerapkan beberapa algoritma rotasi untuk representation vektor kata untuk meningkatkan interpretabilitas. Tidak seperti pendekatan sebelumnya yang menginduksi kecepatan, vektor berputar dapat diterjemahkan sementara mempertahankan prestasi ekspresif vektor asli. Selain itu, setiap representasi vektor kata yang dibuat sebelumnya dapat diputar untuk meningkatkan interpretabilitas. Kami menerapkan rotasi untuk skipgram dan sarung tangan dan membandingkan kekuatan ekspresif dan interpretabilitas dengan vektor asli dan vektor langka overcomplete. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa vektor yang berputar melebihi vektor yang asli dan vektor yang sedikit melebihi untuk tugas interpretasi dan ekspresif.', 'sw': 'Uwakilishaji wa maneno yanaboresha utendaji katika kazi mbalimbali za NLP, lakini vectors wa maneno ya juu ni vigumu kueleza. Tunatumia algorithi kadhaa za mzunguko kwa uwakilishi wa maneno ili kuboresha tafsiri. Tofauti na mbinu zilizopita ambazo zinatengeneza upepo, vectors zinazozunguka zinatafsiriwa wakati wa kulinda utendaji wa vectors asili. Zaidi ya hayo, uwakilishi wowote wa vector wa neno lililotengenezwa anaweza kuizungukwa ili kuboresha tafsiri. Tunatumia mzunguko kwenye vipande vya barafu na kushinikiza na kuunganisha nguvu na ufafanuzi wa utafsiri na vectori za asili na vectori zilizokuwa zimejaa. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa vectors zinazozunguka zinafanya vectori za asili na zile zinazozunguka kwa ajili ya tafsiri na kazi za uwazi.', 'ko': '단어의 벡터는 각종 NLP 작업의 성능을 향상시켰다는 것을 나타내지만 고차원 단어의 벡터는 해석하기 어렵다.우리는 몇 가지 회전 알고리즘을 단어의 벡터 표시에 응용하여 해석성을 높일 것이다.이전에 희소성을 초래한 방법과 달리 회전 벡터는 해석할 수 있고 원시 벡터의 표현 성능을 보존할 수 있다.또한 해석성을 높이기 위해 미리 만들어진 단어의 벡터 표시는 모두 회전할 수 있다.우리는 회전을 skipgrams와glove에 응용하고 그 표현 능력과 해석 가능성을 원시 벡터와 희소한 완비 벡터와 비교할 것이다.그 결과 회전 벡터는 해석 가능성과 표현성 면에서 원시 벡터보다 우수하고 완비 벡터보다 희소한 것으로 나타났다.', 'fa': 'نمایش ویکتور کلمات عملکرد در کار های مختلف NLP را بهتر می کند، اما ویکتور کلمات بالا برای تعبیر کردن خیلی سخت است. ما الگوریتم\u200cهای چرخش چند را برای نمایش ویکتور کلمات برای تفسیر قابلیت تفسیر می\u200cکنیم. برخلاف دسترسی قبلی که آرامشی را باعث می\u200cکند، ویکتورهای چرخش قابل تعبیر می\u200cشوند در حالی که محافظت عملکرد منحصری ویکتورهای اصلی را محافظت می\u200cکنند. علاوه بر این، هر نمایش ویکتور کلمه پیش ساخته شده می\u200cتواند برای تفسیر بیشتر برگردد. ما چرخش را به گرم\u200cها و دستکش\u200cها تغییر می\u200cدهیم و قدرت و تفسیر\u200cپذیری را با ویکتورهای اصلی و ویکتورهای بیشتر کامل مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که ویکتورهای چرخش\u200cشده\u200cها از ویکتورهای اصلی و بیشتر کامل برای تعبیر قابلیت و استفاده\u200cکننده\u200cها بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'af': 'Vektor voorstelling van woorde verbeter prestasie in verskeie NLP-opdragte, maar die hoë dimensjoneel woord vektore is baie moeilik om te interpreteer. Ons het verskeie rotasie algoritme aangepas na die vektor verteenwoording van woorde om die interpretasie te verbeter. Ongelyks van vorige toegang wat sparsiteit induseer, word die roteerde vektore uitgelykbaar terwyl die uitdrukking van die oorspronklike vektore bewaar word. Verder, enige voorafgebou woord vektor voorstelling kan roteer word vir verbeterde interpretasie. Ons toewend rotasie na skip gramme en helder en vergelyk die uitdrukking krag en interpretasie met die oorspronklike vektore en die sparse oorspronklike vektore. Die resultate vertoon dat die roteerde vektore uitvoer die oorspronklike en die sparse oorspronklike vektore vir uitleggbare en uitdrukkingstaak.', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesi vektor i fjalëve përmirëson performancën në detyra të ndryshme NLP, por vektorët e fjalëve me dimensione të larta janë shumë të vështirë për të interpretuar. Ne aplikojmë disa algoritme rrotullimi në përfaqësimin vektor të fjalëve për të përmirësuar interpretueshmërinë. Ndryshe nga qasjet e mëparshme që induktojnë pakësinë, vektorët e rrotulluar janë të interpretueshëm duke ruajtur performancën shprehëse të vektorëve origjinale. Përveç kësaj, çdo përfaqësim i parandërtuar i vektorit të fjalës mund të rrotullohet për interpretueshmëri të përmirësuar. Ne aplikojmë rrotullimin në skipgram dhe dorezë dhe krahasojmë fuqinë shprehëse dhe interpretueshmërinë me vektorët origjinale dhe vektorët e pakët të mbishtypur. Rezultatet tregojnë se vektorët e rrotulluar kryejnë vektorët origjinal dhe të pakët të mbiplotësuar për detyrat e interpretueshmërisë dhe shprehësisë.', 'am': 'የ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ We apply several rotation algorithms to the vector representation of words to improve the interpretability.  የቀድሞው ጥያቄ መግለጫ በተለየ፣ የመጀመሪያውን vector በመጠበቅ ጊዜ የሚነክሩት vectorዎች ይተረጉማሉ፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ማንኛውም የቃላት መግለጫ የዌብ መልዕክት ለመሻለል ይችላል፡፡ ወደ መሳሪያዎች እና ወደ አካባቢው እና ወደ መደብ እና ወደ መሳሳይ እናደርጋለን፣ እና የፊደል ኃይል እና ትርጓሜን በመጀመሪያው vector እና በጭራሽ vector እናስተካከላለን፡፡ ፍጥረቱም የዞሩት vectors መጀመሪያውን እና ለትርጉም እና ለድምፅ ስራዎችን የሚያሳልፉትን vectors እንዲያሳዩ ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Sözlerin vektörü tanımlaması farklı NLP görevlerinde performansını geliştirir, fakat yüksek boyutlu kelime vektörleri yorumlamak için çok zor. Bir sürü dönüştürme algoritmini vektörün yorumluluğunu geliştirmek için kullanıyoruz. Görkemliliği etkileyip gelen önceki yaklaştırmalarına göre, dönüştürülen vektörler orijinal vektörlerin ifadesini korumak için yorumlaştırılabilir. Ayrıca, her önden inşa edilen kelime vektör represiyonu gelişmiş terjime edilebilir. Çeviri bakmayı ve eldivenlere uygulayıp, ifade eden gücü ve yorumluluğunu orijinal vektörlerle karşılaştırıyoruz. Sonuçlar, döndürülmüş vektörler orijinal ve yansıtıcı vektörleri yorumluluğu ve ifadesizlik görevlerinin üstünden çıkarmasını gösteriyor.', 'hy': 'Բառերի վեկտորային ներկայացումը բարելավում է արտադրողականությունը տարբեր ՆԼՊ խնդիրներում, բայց բարձր չափերի բառերի վեկտորները շատ դժվար է մեկնաբանել: Մենք կիրառում ենք բառերի վեկտորի ներկայացման բառերի մի քանի պտտվող ալգորիթմներ, որպեսզի բարելավենք թարգմանելիությունը: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ մոտեցումներին, որոնք արտադրում են հաճախականությունը, պտտվող վեկտորները մեկնաբանելի են, մինչդեռ պահպանվում են արտահայտության արտահայտությունը: Ավելին, ցանկացած նախապատրաստված բառերի վեկտորի ներկայացումը կարող է պտտվել ավելի լավ մեկնաբանելիության համար: Մենք կիրառում ենք պտտվողություն արտահայտվողական ուժը և մեկնաբանելիությունը սկզբնական վեկտորների և բազմաթիվ բազմաթիվ վեկտորների հետ համեմատում ենք: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ պտտված վեկտորները գերազանցում են արտահայտության և արտահայտության առաջադրանքների արտահայտությունը:', 'bs': 'Vektorska predstava riječi poboljšava učinkovitost u raznim zadacima NLP-a, ali visoki dimenzionalni vektori riječi su veoma teški za tumačenje. Primjenjujemo nekoliko algoritma rotacije na predstavljanje vektora riječi kako bi poboljšali interpretabilnost. Za razliku od prethodnih pristupa koji induciraju sparsitnost, rotirani vektori su interpretabilni dok čuvaju ekspresivnu funkciju originalnih vektora. Osim toga, svaka predgrađena reprezentacija vektora riječi može se rotirati zbog poboljšane interpretabilnosti. Primjenjujemo rotaciju na skipgrame i rukavice i uspoređujemo ekspresivnu moć i interpretabilnost sa originalnim vektorima i rezervnim prekompletnim vektorima. Rezultati pokazuju da rotirani vektori iznose originalne i rezervne prekompletne vektore za obaveze interpretabilnosti i izrazitosti.', 'ca': "La representació vectorial de paraules millora el rendiment en diverses tasques NLP, però els vectors de paraules d'alta dimensió són molt difícils d'interpretar. We apply several rotation algorithms to the vector representation of words to improve the interpretability.  A diferència dels enfocaments anteriors que indueixen la sparsitat, els vectors girats són interpretables mentre preserven el rendiment expressiu dels vectors originals. A més, qualsevol representació pré-construïda del vector de paraules pot ser rotada per a millorar l'interpretabilitat. Aplicam la rotació als skipgrams i al guant i comparam el poder expressiu i l'interpretabilitat amb els vectors originals i els pocs vectors superplets. Els resultats mostren que els vectors girats superen els vectors originals i escassos per a les tasques d'interpretabilitat i expressivitat.", 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন এনএলপি কাজে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন কাজের প্রভাব উন্নত করে, কিন্তু উচ We apply several rotation algorithms to the vector representation of words to improve the interpretability.  পূর্ববর্তী উপায়ের ভিন্ন ভেক্টরের প্রকাশ্য ভেক্টর সংরক্ষণ করার সময় ব্যাখ্যা করা হচ্ছে। এছাড়াও, যে কোন পূর্ববর্তী শব্দ ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে পরিবর্তন করা যাবে ব্যাখ্যার উন্নতি আমরা স্কিপ গ্রাম এবং গ্লোভের দিকে আবর্তন করি এবং প্রকাশ্য ক্ষমতা এবং ব্যাখ্যাতির সাথে মূল ভেক্টর এবং স্প্যাসের বিপরীত ভেক্টরে ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আবর্তিত ভেক্টর মূল ভেক্টর এবং স্প্যান্সের সার্বভেক্টর বিভিন্ন ব্যাখ্যা এবং প্রকাশ্য কাজের', 'cs': 'Vektorová reprezentace slov zlepšuje výkon v různých úlohách NLP, ale vysokodimenzionální slovní vektory jsou velmi obtížné interpretovat. Pro zlepšení interpretovatelnosti aplikujeme několik rotačních algoritmů na vektorovou reprezentaci slov. Na rozdíl od předchozích přístupů, které vyvolávají řídkost, jsou rotované vektory interpretovatelné při zachování expresivního výkonu původních vektorů. Kromě toho lze libovolnou předem vytvořenou vektorovou reprezentaci slova otáčet pro lepší interpretaci. Aplikujeme rotaci na skipgramy a rukavice a porovnáváme expresivní sílu a interpretovatelnost s původními vektory a řídkými overcomplete vektory. Výsledky ukazují, že rotované vektory překonávají původní a řídké překonávající vektory pro úlohy interpretovatelnosti a expresivity.', 'et': 'Sõnade vektorikujutamine parandab erinevate NLP ülesannete jõudlust, kuid kõrgemõõtmelisi sõnavaktoreid on väga raske tõlgendada. Tõlgendatavuse parandamiseks rakendame mitmeid rotatsioonialgoritme sõnade vektori esitamisele. Erinevalt varasematest lähenemisviisidest, mis indutseerivad hõredust, on pööratavad vektorid tõlgendatavad, säilitades samal ajal algsete vektorite ekspressiivse jõudluse. Lisaks saab iga eelnevalt ehitatud sõnavaktori esitust pöörata, et parandada tõlgendatavust. Me rakendame pöörlemist skipgrammidele ja kinnastele ning võrdleme väljendusvõimsust ja tõlgendatavust algsete vektorite ja hõredate ülekomplektseeritud vektoritega. Tulemused näitavad, et pööratud vektorid suudavad tõlgendatavuse ja väljenduslikkuse ülesannete puhul ületada algseid ja hõredaid üleliigseid vektoreid.', 'fi': 'Sanan vektoriesitys parantaa suorituskykyä eri NLP-tehtävissä, mutta suuriulotteisia sanavektoreita on erittäin vaikea tulkita. Sovellamme useita kiertoalgoritmeja sanojen vektoriesitykseen tulkittavuuden parantamiseksi. Toisin kuin aikaisemmat lähestymistavat, jotka aiheuttavat sparsiteettia, pyöritetyt vektorit ovat tulkittavissa säilyttäen alkuperäisten vektorien ilmeikkään suorituskykyä. Lisäksi mitä tahansa valmiiksi rakennettua sanavektoriesitystä voidaan kiertää paremman tulkittavuuden saavuttamiseksi. Käytämme kiertoa skipgrammoihin ja käsineisiin ja vertaamme ilmaisuvoimaa ja tulkittavuutta alkuperäisiin vektoreihin ja harvoihin ylikompletoituihin vektoreihin. Tulokset osoittavat, että käännetyt vektorit suoriutuvat paremmin kuin alkuperäiset ja harvat ylikompletoidut vektorit tulkittavuus- ja ekspressiivisyystehtävissä.', 'az': 'Sözlərin vektör göstəricisi NLP işlərində performansını yaxşılaşdırır, amma yüksək ölçülü söz vektörləri təfsil etmək üçün çox çətindir. Biz bir neçə dönüş algoritmini sözlərin göstəricisinə uygulayıq ki, yorumluluğu düzəltsin. Əvvəlki yaxınlıqlara bənzəyir ki, dönüş vektörləri orijinal vektörlərin ifadə etdiyi performansını qoruyarkən təfsil edə bilər. Daha sonra, hər bir əvvəlcə inşa edilmiş söz vektoru göstəricisi daha yaxşılaşdırılabilir. Biz qramma və əlavə dönüşünü istifadə edirik və ifadəli gücü və yorumluluğu orijinal vektörlərlə və çox tamamlayan vektörlərlə qarşılaşdırırıq. Sonuçlar tərəfindən dönüşülmüş vektörlərin ilk vektörünü və çox tamamlandığını göstərir.', 'jv': 'To The vector representation of words to inputs vectors-action politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness To Reject', 'sk': 'Vektorska predstavitev besed izboljšuje učinkovitost pri različnih nalogah NLP, vendar je visokodimenzionalne besedne vektorje zelo težko interpretirati. Za vektorsko reprezentacijo besed uporabljamo več rotacijskih algoritmov, da bi izboljšali interpretabilnost besed. Za razliko od prejšnjih pristopov, ki povzročajo redkost, so vrtljivi vektorji razložljivi, hkrati pa ohranjajo izrazito zmogljivost originalnih vektorjev. Poleg tega je mogoče vsako vnaprej zgrajeno besedno vektorsko predstavitev vrteti za boljšo razlagalnost. Uporabljamo rotacijo na skipgrame in rokavice ter primerjamo izrazno moč in razložljivost z originalnimi vektorji in redkimi preveč dokončanimi vektorji. Rezultati kažejo, da vrtljivi vektorji presegajo originalne in redke preveč dokončane vektorje pri opravilih interpretabilnosti in ekspresivnosti.', 'ha': "@ item: intable Text context menu item Munã shirya wasu algoritori masu cire zuwa mai gauraya wa masu kallo dõmin ya kyautata fassarar. @ info: whatsthis Furan haka, za'a juya duk mai wakilishi na magana na tsohon da aka gina ta don ya gyãra fassarar. Tuna sami juyi zuwa skigram da hanyor kuma tuna samfani ga mai ƙarfi da fassarar magana da shiryori na farko da masu sakan da ke sami. Mataimakin ya nuna cewa masu zuba masu shiryoyi masu gabatar da kwanza da kuma masu ƙaranci masu haɗi da shiryoyi wa masu fassarar da masu bayyanawa.", 'he': 'ייצוג הקטור של מילים משפר את ההופעה במשימות NLP שונות, אך הקטורים המימדיים הגבוהים קשים מאוד לפרש. אנחנו משתמשים במספר אלגוריתמים סיבוב לייצג ווקטור של מילים כדי לשפר את היכולת לפרש. Unlike previous approaches that induce sparsity, the rotated vectors are interpretable while preserving the expressive performance of the original vectors.  חוץ מזה, כל ייצוג ווקטור מילים שנבנה מראש יכול להיות מסובב עבור אפשרות לשפר. אנו מכניסים סיבוב לסקופגרמים וכפפות ושווה את הכוח המביע והאפשרות לפרשנות עם הוקטורים המקוריים והווקטורים הנמוכים. The results show that the rotated vectors outperform the original and the sparse overcomplete vectors for interpretability and expressiveness tasks.', 'bo': 'ཚགས་པ་ཚོའི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་སྟོན་ཚུལ་གྱིས་NLP ལས་ཀ་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ནང་གི་ལས་འཕར་རིས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ། ཡིན་ནའང་ཆེ་ཆུང་ག ང་ཚོས་ཕན་ཚིག་གི་རྟོགས་སྟངས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་སྐུལ་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ། དེ་ནི་གསལ་བཅད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་དང་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་འགྱུར་མཁན་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པའི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པ་ཚོར་ཕན་ཚོགས་ཐབས་རེད། ད་དུང་། སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་རྟོགས་པ་གང་ཡང་མཐོང་ཐབས་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་སྲིད། We apply rotation to skipgrams and glove and compare the expressive power and interpretability with the original vectors and the sparse overcomplete vectors. གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱུང་འགོད་པ་དེ་གིས་ཐོག་མའི་དཔེ་རིགས་སྒྲུབ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'A causal framework for explaining the predictions of black-box sequence-to-sequence models', 'ar': 'إطار سببي لشرح تنبؤات نماذج تسلسل الصندوق الأسود إلى التسلسل', 'es': 'Un marco causal para explicar las predicciones de los modelos secuencia a secuencia de caja negra', 'pt': 'Uma estrutura causal para explicar as previsões de modelos de sequência a sequência de caixa preta', 'fr': 'Un cadre causal pour expliquer les prédictions des modèles séquence-séquence en boîte noire', 'ja': 'ブラックボックス配列間シーケンスモデルの予測を説明するための因果フレームワーク', 'zh': '以说黑盒序于序框架', 'hi': 'ब्लैक-बॉक्स अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल की भविष्यवाणियों की व्याख्या करने के लिए एक कारण रूपरेखा', 'ru': 'Причинно-следственная основа для объяснения прогнозов моделей последовательности "черного ящика"', 'ga': 'Creat cúiseach chun tuar na múnlaí seicheamh-go-seicheamh-bhosca dubh a mhíniú', 'ka': 'бғЁбғҗбғ•-бғ‘бғқбғЎбғўбғҳбғЎ бғЎбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ¬бғҗбғ\xa0бғӣбғқбғ“бғ’бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғӣбғҳбғ–бғ”бғ–бғҳ бғӨбғ\xa0бғҗбғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғҳ', 'hu': 'A fekete doboz szekvencia-szekvencia modellek előrejelzéseinek elmagyarázására szolgáló okozati keretrendszer', 'el': 'Ένα αιτιολογικό πλαίσιο για την εξήγηση των προβλέψεων των μοντέλων αλληλουχίας-αλληλουχίας μαύρου κουτιού', 'it': 'Un quadro causale per spiegare le previsioni dei modelli sequenza-sequenza black-box', 'kk': 'Қара және реттеу үлгілерін түсіндіру үшін негізгі фрейміName', 'mk': 'Казуална рамка за објаснување на предвидувањата на моделите од црна кутија по секвенца', 'lt': 'Juodosios dėžės sekos modelių prognozių paaiškinimo priežastinis pagrindas', 'ms': 'A causal framework for explaining the predictions of black-box sequence-to-sequence models', 'ml': 'കറുത്ത- പെട്ടിയുടെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു കാരണ ഫ്രെയിമ്പ്', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Qafas kawżali biex jiġu spjegati t-tbassir ta’ mudelli ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza ta’ kaxxa sewda', 'mn': 'Хар хайрцгийн дарааллаас дарааллаар загварын таамаглалыг тайлбарлах шалтгаан', 'pl': 'Ramy przyczynowe do wyjaśnienia przewidywań modeli sekwencji czarnej skrzynki', 'si': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un cadru cauzal pentru explicarea predicțiilor modelelor secvență-la-secvență', 'sr': 'Prirodni okvir za objašnjavanje predviđanja modela crne kutije sekvence do sekvence', 'so': 'Qoraalka sababta ah oo loo caddeeyo wax uu sii sheegayo qaababka qoriga-box-to-sequence', 'sv': 'Ett orsakssamband för att förklara förutsägelserna av svarta rutor sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller', 'ur': 'سیاه باکس کی تعریف کی پیش بینی کی تعریف کے لئے ایک دلیل فرم', 'ta': 'கருப்புப் பெட்டியின் முன்னோட்டங்களை விளக்குவதற்கான ஒரு காரணமான சட்டம்', 'vi': 'Nguyên nhân để giải thích các dự đoán của các mô hình chuỗi-tới-trình tự đen', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Причинно-следствена рамка за обясняване на прогнозите на моделите последователност към последователност от черни кутии', 'nl': 'Een causaal kader voor het verklaren van de voorspellingen van black-box sequence-to-sequence modellen', 'hr': 'Prirodni okvir za objašnjavanje predviđanja modela crne kutije', 'da': 'En årsagssammenhæng til forklaring af forudsigelserne af sorte boks sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller', 'de': 'Ein kausaler Rahmen zur Erklärung der Vorhersagen von Black-Box Sequence-to-Sequence Modellen', 'id': 'A causal framework for explaining the predictions of black-box sequence-to-sequence models', 'ko': '블랙박스 시퀀스에서 시퀀스 모델로 예측되는 인과 프레임워크 설명', 'fa': 'یک چهارچوب دلیل برای توضیح پیش بینی\u200cهای مدل\u200cهای سیاه\u200cجعبه\u200cی سیاه\u200cجعبه', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa sababu wa kuelezea utabiri wa mifano ya mfululizo wa kisasa', 'tr': 'Kara-kuty sequence-to-sequence nusgalaryny düşündirmek üçin bir sebäbi çerçewdir', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'A causal framework for explaining the predictions of black-box sequence-to-sequence models', 'am': 'ጥቁር-box-sequence-to-sequence models', 'sq': 'A causal framework for explaining the predictions of black-box sequence-to-sequence models', 'bs': 'Prirodni okvir za objašnjavanje predviđanja modela crne kutije sekvence do sekvence', 'bn': 'কালো বাক্সের সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্সের মডেল ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য একটি কারণ ফ্রেম', 'az': 'Kara qutusu sequence-to-sequence modellərin tədbirlərini açıqlamaq üçün layiq bir quruluş', 'ca': 'Un marc causal per explicar les prediccions de models de seqüència a seqüència de caixa negra', 'cs': 'Příčinný rámec pro vysvětlení predikcí sekvenčních modelů černé skříňky', 'et': 'Põhjuslik raamistik musta kasti jada-jada mudelite prognooside selgitamiseks', 'fi': 'Syyllinen viitekehys mustan laatikon sekvenssimallien ennusteiden selittämiseksi', 'jv': "Cajal frame kanggo ngerasai pertualangan nung'ungé sekènsi layar-to-sekènsi model", 'he': 'מסגרת סיבה להסביר את התחזויות של דוגמני קופסה שחורה', 'ha': "Wani firam mai saba wa ya bayyana bayani'anin motsi na sauri-sauti-zuwa-sequence", 'sk': 'Vzročni okvir za razlago napovedi modelov zaporedja v zaporedje črnih polj', 'bo': 'A causal framework for explaining the predictions of black-box sequence-to-sequence models'}
{'en': 'We interpret the predictions of any black-box structured input-structured output model around a specific input-output pair. Our method returns an explanation consisting of groups of input-output tokens that are causally related. These dependencies are inferred by querying the model with perturbed inputs, generating a graph over tokens from the responses, and solving a partitioning problem to select the most relevant components. We focus the general approach on sequence-to-sequence problems, adopting a variational autoencoder to yield meaningful input perturbations. We test our method across several NLP sequence generation tasks.', 'ar': 'نحن نفسر تنبؤات أي نموذج إخراج منظم على شكل صندوق أسود حول زوج محدد من المدخلات والمخرجات. تقوم طريقتنا بإرجاع "تفسير" يتكون من مجموعات من الرموز المميزة للمدخلات والمخرجات المرتبطة سببيًا. يتم الاستدلال على هذه التبعيات من خلال الاستعلام عن النموذج بمدخلات مضطربة ، وإنشاء رسم بياني على الرموز المميزة من الردود ، وحل مشكلة التقسيم لتحديد المكونات الأكثر صلة. نحن نركز النهج العام على مشاكل التسلسل إلى التسلسل ، واعتماد أداة تشفير تلقائية متغيرة لإحداث اضطرابات إدخال ذات مغزى. نحن نختبر طريقتنا عبر العديد من مهام إنشاء تسلسل البرمجة اللغوية العصبية.', 'pt': 'Interpretamos as previsões de qualquer modelo de saída estruturada de entrada e estrutura de caixa preta em torno de um par específico de entrada-saída. Nosso método retorna uma “explicação” que consiste em grupos de tokens de entrada-saída que são causalmente relacionados. Essas dependências são inferidas consultando o modelo com entradas perturbadas, gerando um gráfico sobre tokens das respostas e resolvendo um problema de particionamento para selecionar os componentes mais relevantes. Nós focamos a abordagem geral em problemas de sequência a sequência, adotando um autocodificador variacional para produzir perturbações de entrada significativas. Testamos nosso método em várias tarefas de geração de sequência de PNL.', 'es': 'Interpretamos las predicciones de cualquier modelo de entrada-salida estructurada de caja negra en torno a un par de entrada-salida específico. Nuestro método devuelve una «explicación» que consiste en grupos de tokens de entrada-salida que están relacionados causalmente. Estas dependencias se deducen consultando el modelo con entradas perturbadas, generando un gráfico sobre los tokens de las respuestas y resolviendo un problema de particionamiento para seleccionar los componentes más relevantes. Centramos el enfoque general en los problemas de secuencia a secuencia, adoptando un autocodificador variacional para producir perturbaciones de entrada significativas. Probamos nuestro método en varias tareas de generación de secuencias de PNL.', 'fr': "Nous interprétons les prévisions de tout modèle structuré en entrées-sorties structurées en boîte noire autour d'une paire entrée-sortie spécifique. Notre méthode renvoie une «\xa0explication\xa0» constituée de groupes de jetons d'entrée-sortie qui sont liés de manière causale. Ces dépendances sont déduites en interrogeant le modèle avec des entrées perturbées, en générant un graphique sur des jetons à partir des réponses et en résolvant un problème de partitionnement pour sélectionner les composants les plus pertinents. Nous concentrons notre approche générale sur les problèmes de séquence à séquence, en adoptant un autoencodeur variationnel pour produire des perturbations d'entrée significatives. Nous testons notre méthode sur plusieurs tâches de génération de séquences de PNL.", 'ja': '特定の入出力ペアを中心とした任意のブラックボックス構造化入出力モデルの予測を解釈する。このメソッドは、因果関係のある入出力トークンのグループからなる「説明」を返します。これらの依存関係は、摂動された入力でモデルをクエリし、応答からトークンを介してグラフを生成し、最も関連性の高いコンポーネントを選択するためにパーティション分割問題を解決することによって推測されます。一般的なアプローチは、シーケンス間の問題に焦点を当て、バリエーションのあるオートエンコーダを採用して有意義な入力摂動を生み出します。私たちは、いくつかのNLP配列生成タスクにわたって方法をテストします。', 'zh': '绕特定之输-输一黑盒结构化-结构化之占。 吾道反一"解",因果相关之输入输出令牌组也。 扰输询模形,生成图形于应表,而决分区以择其最关者组件以推其依赖关系。 集众法于序,用变分自编码器以生义。 我们在几个NLP序生成的事中测试了我们的方法。', 'ru': 'Мы интерпретируем прогнозы любой модели ввода-вывода со структурой черного ящика вокруг конкретной пары ввода-вывода. Наш метод возвращает «объяснение», состоящее из групп маркеров ввода-вывода, которые причинно связаны. Эти зависимости выводятся путем запроса модели с возмущенными входами, создания графа над токенами из ответов и решения задачи секционирования для выбора наиболее релевантных компонентов. Мы фокусируем общий подход на задачах последовательности-последовательности, принимая вариационный автокодер для получения значимых входных возмущений. Мы тестируем наш метод с помощью нескольких задач генерации последовательностей NLP.', 'hi': 'हम एक विशिष्ट इनपुट-आउटपुट जोड़ी के आसपास किसी भी ब्लैक-बॉक्स संरचित इनपुट-संरचित आउटपुट मॉडल की भविष्यवाणियों की व्याख्या करते हैं। हमारी विधि इनपुट-आउटपुट टोकन के समूहों से मिलकर एक "स्पष्टीकरण" लौटाती है जो कारण से संबंधित हैं। इन निर्भरताओं को परेशान इनपुट के साथ मॉडल से क्वेरी करके, प्रतिक्रियाओं से टोकन पर एक ग्राफ उत्पन्न करके, और सबसे प्रासंगिक घटकों का चयन करने के लिए विभाजन समस्या को हल करके अनुमान लगाया जाता है। हम अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम समस्याओं पर सामान्य दृष्टिकोण पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, सार्थक इनपुट गड़बड़ी उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक भिन्नता ऑटोएनकोडर को अपनाते हैं। हम कई एनएलपी अनुक्रम पीढ़ी कार्यों में हमारी विधि का परीक्षण करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Léirímid na réamh-mheastacháin maidir le haon mhúnla aschuir struchtúrtha ionchuir-bhosca dubh timpeall ar phéire ionchuir-aschuir ar leith. Tugann ár modh “míniú” ar ais ina bhfuil grúpaí de chomharthaí ionchuir-aschuir a bhfuil baint acu le cúisíocht. Tátal a bhaint as na spleáchais sin trí cheist a chur ar an tsamhail le hionchuir suaite, graf thar chomharthaí a ghiniúint ó na freagraí, agus fadhb deighilte a réiteach chun na comhpháirteanna is ábhartha a roghnú. Dírímid an cur chuige ginearálta ar fhadhbanna seicheamh-go-seicheamh, ag glacadh le uath-ionchódóir athraitheach chun suaitheadh ionchuir brí a bhaint amach. Déanaimid ár modh a thástáil thar roinnt tascanna giniúna seicheamh NLP.', 'ka': "ჩვენ ინტერპუქტირებთ ყველა შავ-კონტიკური სტრუქტურული შეტყობინებული შეტყობინებული მოდელს სპექტიკური შეტყობინებაში. ჩვენი მეთოდი გამოყენება 'განახსნარება' რომელიც შექმნის მონაცემების ჯგუფებისთვის, რომელიც წარმოიდგენებულია. ამ დასახლოების შესახებ მოდელის შესახებ, პერტუბური მონაცემებით, განახლოებიდან გრაფის შესახებ, და პერტუბური პრობლემას გადაწყვება ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტებით. ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული ავტოკოდერის პრობლემებზე დავყენებთ საერთო პრობლემებზე, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ავტოკოდერის გადავიყენებთ, რომ მიიღებთ მნიშვნელოვანი გეტყვი ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ჩვენი მეთოდი რამდენიმე NLP-სკენექციების მომხმარებით.", 'hu': 'Bármely black-box strukturált bemeneti strukturált kimeneti modell előrejelzéseit egy adott bemeneti-kimeneti pár körül értelmezzük. Módszerünk egy "magyarázatot" ad vissza, amely a input-output tokenek csoportjaiból áll, amelyek okozati összefüggésben vannak. Ezeket a függőségeket a modell zavaros bemenetekkel történő lekérdezésével, a válaszokból tokenek fölötti grafikonok generálásával és a partíciós problémák megoldásával lehet kiválasztani a legrelevánsabb összetevőket. Az általános megközelítést a szekvencia-szekvencia problémákra összpontosítjuk, variációs autoencoder alkalmazásával jelentős bemeneti zavarok kialakítása érdekében. Módszerünket több NLP-szekvencia generálási feladatban teszteljük.', 'el': 'Διερμηνεύουμε τις προβλέψεις οποιουδήποτε μοντέλου δομημένης εισόδου-δομημένης εξόδου μαύρου κουτιού γύρω από ένα συγκεκριμένο ζεύγος εισόδου-εξόδου. Η μέθοδος μας επιστρέφει μια "εξήγηση" που αποτελείται από ομάδες σημάτων εισόδου-εξόδου που σχετίζονται αιτιολογικά. Αυτές οι εξαρτήσεις συνάγονται με την ερώτηση του μοντέλου με διαταραγμένες εισόδους, τη δημιουργία ενός γραφήματος πάνω από τα σήματα από τις απαντήσεις, και την επίλυση ενός προβλήματος κατάτμησης για να επιλέξετε τα πιο σχετικά συστατικά. Εστιάζουμε τη γενική προσέγγιση σε προβλήματα αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία, υιοθετώντας έναν αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή παραλλαγής για να αποφέρουμε σημαντικές διαταραχές εισόδου. Δοκιμάζουμε τη μέθοδο μας σε διάφορες εργασίες δημιουργίας ακολουθιών.', 'it': "Interpretiamo le previsioni di qualsiasi modello di output strutturato in input black-box attorno a una specifica coppia input-output. Il nostro metodo restituisce una 'spiegazione' composta da gruppi di token input-output che sono causalmente correlati. Queste dipendenze sono dedotte interrogando il modello con input perturbati, generando un grafico sui token dalle risposte e risolvendo un problema di partizionamento per selezionare i componenti più rilevanti. Focalizziamo l'approccio generale sui problemi sequenza-sequenza, adottando un autoencoder variazionale per produrre perturbazioni di input significative. Testiamo il nostro metodo in diverse attività di generazione di sequenze NLP.", 'mk': "We interpret the predictions of any black-box structured input-structured output model around a specific input-output pair.  Our method returns an 'explanation' consisting of groups of input-output tokens that are causally related.  Овие зависности се заклучуваат со прашање на моделот со нервозни внесувања, генерирање график над знаците од одговорите, и решавање на проблемот со поделбата за избор на најрелевантните компоненти. Го фокусираме генералниот пристап на проблемите од секвенца до секвенца, усвојувајќи варијационален автокодер за да предизвика значајни внесувачки пречки. Го тестираме нашиот метод преку неколку задачи на генерација на НЛП секвенца.", 'lt': "Mes aiškiname bet kokio juodos dėžutės struktūrizuoto įėjimo ir išėjimo modelio prognozes aplink konkrečią įėjimo ir išėjimo porą. Our method returns an 'explanation' consisting of groups of input-output tokens that are causally related.  Šios priklausomybės daromos klausiant modelio su sutrikdytais įvedimais, sukuriant grafiką virš žymenų iš atsakymų ir išspręsiant padalijimo problem ą, kad būtų galima pasirinkti svarbiausius komponentus. Mes sutelkiame bendrą požiūrį į kiekvienos sekos problemas, priimdami įvairius autokodus, kad būtų išvengta reikšmingų įėjimo perturbacijų. Mūsų metodą bandome atliekant keletą NLP sekos užduočių.", 'kk': "Біз қара жағындағы құрылған келтірілген шығыс үлгісінің алдын- ала түсіндіреміз. Әдіміз келтірілген шығыс белгілерінің топтарынан 'түсініктеме' дегенді қайтарады. Бұл тәуелдіктер үлгісін сұрау, жауаптардан белгілер үстінен график жасау және бөлімдеу мәселесін шешу үшін ең қатынастық компоненттерді таңдау үшін үлгілерін сұрау арқылы шешілді. Біз әлемді реттеу мәселелеріне көздеген жалпы тәсілдерді көздегендіреміз. Өзгертілген автокодерді көздегендіру үшін мәліметті келтіру үшін көздеген енгізу Біз әдімімізді NLP реттеу тапсырмаларында тексереміз.", 'ml': "We interpret the predictions of any black-box structured input-structured output model around a specific input-output pair.  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കാരണമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് അടയാളങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d 'വിശദീകരണം' എന ഈ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് പെര്\u200dട്ടര്\u200dബെഡ് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകള്\u200d ചോദിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മോഡലിനെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഉത്തരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മുതല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d പൊതുവായ പ്രോഗത്തിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. വേരിയറല്\u200d സ്വയം  നമ്മള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് കുറച്ച് NLP സെക്കന്\u200dസ് തലമുറതലമുറയിലാണ്.", 'ms': "Kami menerangkan ramalan mana-mana model output struktur-input kotak hitam sekitar pasangan input-output tertentu. Our method returns an 'explanation' consisting of groups of input-output tokens that are causally related.  Dependensi ini dicatat dengan menanyai model dengan input terganggu, menghasilkan graf atas token dari balasan, dan memecahkan masalah sekatan untuk memilih komponen yang paling berkaitan. Kami fokus pendekatan umum pada masalah urutan-ke-urutan, mengadopsi pengekod sendiri variasi untuk menghasilkan gangguan input yang bermakna. Kami menguji kaedah kami melalui beberapa tugas generasi urutan NLP.", 'mt': "Aħna ninterpretaw it-tbassir ta’ kwalunkwe mudell ta’ output strutturat b’input-structured black-box madwar par ta’ input-output speċifiku. Il-metodu tagħna jirritorna 'spjegazzjoni' li tikkonsisti minn gruppi ta' tokens input-output li huma kawżalment relatati. Dawn id-dipendenzi huma inferiti billi jintalab il-mudell b’inputs perturbed, billi jiġi ġġenerat graff fuq tokens mir-risposti, u billi tiġi solvuta problem a ta’ qsim biex jintgħa żlu l-komponenti l-aktar rilevanti. Aħna niffokaw l-approċċ ġenerali fuq problemi minn sekwenza għal sekwenza, billi niddottaw awtokodifikatur varjazzjonali biex iwassal għal perturbazzjonijiet sinifikanti fl-input. Aħna ntestjaw il-metodu tagħna f’diversi kompiti ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ sekwenzi NLP.", 'mn': 'Бид хар хайрцаг бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүний загварыг тодорхойлж байна. Бидний арга нь үр дүнтэй холбогдолтой бий болгон "тайлбарлалт" гэсэн бүлэгтэй байдаг. Эдгээр хамааралтай байдал нь загварыг хамгийн чухал компонентуудыг сонгох үед загварыг шалгаж, хариу үйлдвэрлэлээс график гаргаж, хуваагдах асуудлыг шийддэг. Бид дарааллын дарааллын асуудлуудын тухай ерөнхий арга замыг анхаарлаа хандуулж, өөр өөр өөр автокодлогч ашиглаж, утгатай орлуулалт гаргах боломжтой. Бид өөрсдийн аргыг NLP дарааллын дарааллын үйл ажиллагаанд шалгана.', 'pl': 'Interpretujemy prognozy dowolnego modelu strukturalnego wejścia strukturalnego w czarnej skrzynce wokół określonej pary wejścia-wyjścia. Nasza metoda zwraca "wyjaśnienie" składające się z grup tokenów wejściowo-wyjściowych, które są powiązane przyczynowo. Te zależności są wywnioskowane poprzez zapytanie modelu z zakłóconymi wejściami wejściowymi, generowanie wykresu tokenów z odpowiedzi i rozwiązanie problemu partycjonowania w celu wyboru najbardziej istotnych komponentów. Ogólne podejście koncentrujemy się na problemach sekwencji do sekwencji, przyjmując wariancyjny autokoder, aby uzyskać znaczące zakłócenia wejściowe. Testujemy naszą metodę w kilku zadaniach generowania sekwencji NLP.', 'ro': 'Interpretăm predicțiile oricărui model de ieșire structurat intrare-ieșire structurat în cutie neagră în jurul unei perechi specifice intrare-ieșire. Metoda noastră returnează o "explicație" constând în grupuri de jetoane intrare-ieșire care sunt legate de cauzalitate. Aceste dependențe sunt deduse prin interogarea modelului cu intrări perturbate, generarea unui grafic peste jetoane din răspunsuri și rezolvarea unei probleme de partiționare pentru a selecta componentele cele mai relevante. Concentrăm abordarea generală asupra problemelor secvență-la-secvență, adoptând un autoencoder variațional pentru a produce perturbări semnificative de intrare. Testăm metoda noastră în mai multe sarcini de generare a secvențelor PNL.', 'no': 'Vi tolkar forhåndsvisingane av eit svart boks strukturert utdata- modell rundt eit spesifikke utdata- par. Metoden vårt returnerer ein «forklaring» som inneheld grupper av inndata- teikn som er forårsakeleg relatert. Desse avhengighetene blir oppdaga ved å spørja modellen med perturberte inndata, laga eit graf over teikn frå svara, og løysa ein partisjonsproblem for å velja dei mest relevante komponentane. Vi fokuserer den generelle tilnærminga på sekvens- til- sekvens- problemar, med å adoptera ein variasjonal autokodar for å gjera meningsverdiane for inndata- perturbasjonar. Vi testar metoden vårt over fleire NLP-sekvensoppgåver.', 'sr': 'Premišljamo predviđanja svakog model a structuriranog ulaznog modela u crnoj kutiji oko određenog pare ulaznog izlaza. Naša metoda vraća "objašnjenje" koja se sastoji od grupa znakova ulaska iz izlaza koji su uzrokovano povezani. Ove zavisnosti su zaražene ispitivanjem model a sa perturbiranim ulaznicima, stvaranjem grafika preko znakova odgovora i rešavanjem problema sa delicijama kako bi odabrali najvažnije komponente. Fokusiramo općeg pristupa na probleme sekvence do sekvence, usvojeći variacionalni autokoder kako bi dobili značajne perturbacije ulaza. Testiramo našu metodu preko nekoliko zadataka generacije NLP sekvence.', 'so': 'Waxaynu turjumnaa wax ka hor jeedida tusaale kasta oo madow ah oo laga dhisay input-ka-soo baxa oo ku wareegsan labo gaar ah oo soo baxa. Metalkeenku wuxuu soo celinayaa ’fasirka’ oo ka mid ah koox ka mid ah calaamado soo baxa oo sabab ah ku saabsan. Intaasu waxay ku xiran tahay in aad sameynta midowga lagu soo qoro qoraalka lagu soo qoray, uu soo saaro sawir ka sareeya calaamadaha jawaabaha, wuxuuna xallinayaa dhibaato qaybsan si uu u doorto qeybinta ugu muhiimsan. Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa habka caadiga ah ee dhibaatooyinka soo socda, waxaana soo qaadannaa qoraal kala duduwan si aan u soo bixino baaritaanka waxyaabaha leh. Waxaynu imtixaamaynaa qaabkeenna oo ku dhex yaala shuqullada qarniyada ee NLP xilliga ah.', 'si': "අපි කළු බොක්ස් සංවිධානය කරපු ඇතුළු සංවිධානය කරපු ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරවිධානයක් විශේෂ ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරවිධ අපේ විධානය ආපහු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්' සම්බන්ධ කණ්ඩායම් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරශ් මේ විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් බලන්න, වෙනස් ස්වයංකේතකයෙක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි අපේ විධානය පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ NLP පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ විධානයක් වෙනුවෙන්.", 'sv': "Vi tolkar förutsägelserna för varje svart-box strukturerad inmatningsstrukturerad utmatningsmodell runt ett specifikt input-output par. Vår metod returnerar en 'förklaring' bestående av grupper av input-output tokens som är orsakssamband. Dessa beroenden härleds genom att fråga modellen med störda ingångar, generera en graf över tokens från svaren och lösa ett partitioneringsproblem för att välja de mest relevanta komponenterna. Vi fokuserar det allmänna tillvägagångssättet på sekvens-till-sekvensproblem och använder en variabel autoencoder för att ge meningsfulla indatastörningar. Vi testar vår metod över flera NLP-sekvensgenereringsuppgifter.", 'ta': "ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட உள்ளீட்டு வெளியீட்டு ஜோடி சுற்றி எந்த கருப்பெட்டி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு வடிவமைப்பு மாதிர எங்கள் முறைமையில் காரணமாக இணைக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு வெளியீட்டு குறியீடுகள் கூட்டத்தில் 'விளக்கம்' என்று க இந்த சார்புகள் மாதிரி உள்ளீடுகளைக் கேள்வி கொண்டு பாதிக்கப்படுகிறது, பதில் இருந்து குறியீடுகள் மேல் வரைபடம் உருவாக்குகிறது, பிரிவு பிரிவு ப We focus the general approach on sequence-to-sequence problems, adopting a variational autoencoder to yield meaningful input perturbations.  நாம் எங்கள் முறையை சோதிக்க வேண்டும் பல NLP தொடர்ச்சி தலைமுறை பணிகளில்.", 'ur': "ہم کسی سیاه باکس کی پیش بینی کی تفصیل کرتے ہیں جو ایک مخصوص اینپیٹ-اپوٹ جوڑ کے اطراف ایک سیاه باکس کی اینپیٹ-ساختہ اینپیٹ موڈل کی ہے. ہمارا طریقہ ایک 'توضیح' کو واپس کرتا ہے جو اینپیٹ-اٹوٹ ٹوکنوں کے گروہوں میں ہوتا ہے جو دلیل رابطہ سے متعلق ہیں۔ These dependencies are inferred by querying the model with perturbed inputs, generating a graph over tokens from the responses, and solving a partition problem to select the most relevant components. ہم نے سفارشی سے سفارشی مشکلات پر عمومی طریقہ کا تدبیر کیا ہے، ایک متفاوت اٹیونکوڈر کو پکڑ لیا ہے کہ معلوم منظور اٹیونٹربیٹ پیدا کرے۔ ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو NLP سطح کی نسل کے کاموں میں آزمائش کی۔", 'vi': "Chúng tôi giải thích dự đoán của bất kỳ mô hình xuất cấu trúc hộp đen nào xung quanh một cặp nhập-xuất cụ thể. Cách của chúng tôi bảo lại một'lời khai'có liên quan đến hàng của những dấu súng nhập Những mối quan hệ này được tính to án bằng cách tra hỏi mô hình với các nội dung bất động, tạo ra một đồ thị trên các thẻ từ các phản ứng, và giải quyết một vấn đề phân chia để chọn các thành phần quan trọng nhất. Chúng tôi tập trung các phương pháp chung vào các vấn đề phân biệt, sử dụng một số mã tự mã số khác nhau để tạo ra phiền phức nhập. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm phương pháp qua nhiều công việc sản xuất chuỗi gien.", 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bizning usuli sabablar bilan bog'liq boʻlgan kiritish uchun guruhlar guruhida 'forklari' keladi. Ushbu ishlatuvchilar modelni perturlab yordamida soʻrashadi, javoblar javobladagi belgilarni yaratish va eng muhim komponentlarni tanlash uchun qismlash muammolarini aniqlash. Biz bir umumiy usulni seksirlik muammolari bilan foydalanamiz, va o'zgarishni avtomatik kodlash uchun o'zgartirish imkoniyatlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. We test our method across several NLP sequence generation tasks.", 'bg': 'Ние интерпретираме прогнозите на всеки структуриран входно-структуриран изходен модел в черна кутия около конкретна входно-изходна двойка. Нашият метод връща "обяснение", състоящо се от групи входно-изходни токени, които са причинно-свързани. Тези зависимости се извеждат чрез запитване на модела с смущени входове, генериране на графика върху токени от отговорите и решаване на проблем с разделянето, за да изберете най-подходящите компоненти. Ние фокусираме общия подход върху задачите последователност към последователност, като приемаме вариационен автокодер, за да генерираме смислени входни смущения. Ние тестваме нашия метод в няколко задачи за генериране на последователност.', 'nl': "We interpreteren de voorspellingen van elk black-box gestructureerd input-gestructureerd outputmodel rond een specifiek input-outputpaar. Onze methode retourneert een 'uitleg' bestaande uit groepen input-output tokens die causaal gerelateerd zijn. Deze afhankelijkheden worden afgeleid door het model te vragen met gestoorde invoer, een grafiek te genereren over tokens uit de antwoorden, en een partitioneringsprobleem op te lossen om de meest relevante componenten te selecteren. We richten de algemene aanpak op sequentie-tot-sequentieproblemen, waarbij we een variatie autoencoder gebruiken om betekenisvolle input verstoringen te genereren. We testen onze methode in verschillende NLP sequence generatietaken.", 'da': "Vi fortolker forudsigelserne for enhver sort-boks struktureret input-struktureret outputmodel omkring et bestemt input-output par. Vores metode returnerer en 'forklaring' bestående af grupper af input-output tokens, der er årsagsrelaterede. Disse afhængigheder udledes ved at forespørge modellen med forstyrrede input, generere en graf over tokens fra svarene og løse et partitioneringsproblem for at vælge de mest relevante komponenter. Vi fokuserer den generelle tilgang på sekvens-til-sekvens problemer ved at anvende en variabel autoencoder for at give meningsfulde input forstyrrelser. Vi tester vores metode på tværs af flere NLP sekvensgenereringsopgaver.", 'hr': 'Premišljamo predviđanja svakog model a structuriranog ulaznog modela u crnoj kutiji oko određenog pare ulaznog izlaza. Naš metod vraća "objašnjenje" koja se sastoji od grupa znakova ulaska iz izlaza koji su uzrokovani povezani. Ove ovisnosti su zaražene ispitivanjem model a s uznemirenim ulaznicima, stvaranjem grafika preko znakova odgovora, i rješavanjem problema sa razdvajanjem kako bi odabrali najvažnije komponente. Fokusiramo općeg pristupa na probleme sekvence do sekvence, usvojeći varijacijski autokoder kako bi dobili značajne perturbacije ulaza. Testiramo našu metodu preko nekoliko zadataka generacije NLP sekvencije.', 'de': "Wir interpretieren die Vorhersagen jedes Black-Box strukturierten Eingangs-strukturierten Ausgabemodells um ein bestimmtes Eingangs-Ausgangs-Paar. Unsere Methode gibt eine 'Erklärung' zurück, die aus Gruppen von Input-Output-Token besteht, die kausal verwandt sind. Diese Abhängigkeiten werden abgeleitet, indem das Modell mit gestörten Eingaben abgefragt wird, ein Diagramm über Token aus den Antworten generiert und ein Partitionierungsproblem gelöst wird, um die relevantesten Komponenten auszuwählen. Wir fokussieren den allgemeinen Ansatz auf Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Probleme und verwenden einen variationalen Autoencoder, um sinnvolle Eingangsstörungen zu erzielen. Wir testen unsere Methode über mehrere NLP-Sequenzgenerierungsaufgaben hinweg.", 'ko': "우리는 특정한 입력과 출력을 둘러싼 모든 블랙박스 구조의 입력과 출력 모델에 대한 예측을 설명했다.우리의 방법은 인과 관련 입력 출력 표시로 구성된 '해석' 을 되돌려줍니다.교란 입력 조회 모델을 사용하여 응답에서 태그맵을 생성하고 구역 문제를 해결하여 가장 관련된 구성 요소를 선택하면 이러한 의존 관계를 추정할 수 있습니다.우리는 일반적인 방법을 서열 문제에 집중하여 변분 자동 인코더를 사용하여 의미 있는 입력 교란을 일으킬 것이다.우리는 몇 개의 NLP 시퀀스 생성 작업에서 우리의 방법을 테스트했다.", 'id': "Kami menerjemahkan prediksi dari setiap model input-struktur input kotak hitam sekitar pasangan input-output spesifik. Metode kami mengembalikan 'penjelasan' yang terdiri dari kelompok token input-output yang berhubungan penyebab. Dependensi ini diperkirakan dengan menanyai model dengan masukan terganggu, menghasilkan grafik atas token dari respon, dan memecahkan masalah partisi untuk memilih komponen yang paling relevan. Kami fokus pendekatan umum pada masalah urutan-urutan, mengadopsi otokoder variasi untuk menghasilkan perturbasi input yang berarti. Kami menguji metode kami melalui beberapa tugas generasi urutan NLP.", 'fa': "ما پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای هر مدل خروجی ساخته شده از جفت ورودی\u200cهای سیاه\u200cجعبه\u200cای را در اطراف یک جفت خروجی خاص تفسیر می\u200cکنیم. روش ما یک 'توضیح' را بازمی\u200cگرداند که از گروهی از نشانه\u200cهای ورودی که به دلیل ارتباط دارند. این وابستگی\u200cها با پرسیدن مدل با ورودهای ناراحت شده، تولید یک گراف بر علامت\u200cها از پاسخ\u200cها و حل یک مشکل تقسیم برای انتخاب کردن بهترین بخش\u200cها آسیب داده می\u200cشوند. ما روش عمومی را روی مشکلات ترکیب و ترکیب تمرکز می کنیم، با استفاده از یک رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار متفاوتی برای تغییرات ورودی معنی می\u200cدهیم. ما روش خودمون رو از طریق چندتا کارهای نسل NLP آزمایش می کنیم.", 'sw': "Tunafsiri utabiri wa muundo wa matokeo yaliyotengenezwa na boksi nyeusi kuhusu mbili maalum za kujitolea. Utawala wetu unarudisha 'tafsiri' ikiwa ni pamoja na makundi ya ishara za kujitolea zinazohusiana na sababu. Mategemeo haya yanaathirika kwa kuuliza muundo huo kwa kutumia vifaa vinavyotengenezwa, kutengeneza picha juu ya ishara kutoka kwenye majibu, na kutatua tatizo la kushirikiana ili kuchagua vipengele muhimu zaidi. Tunashiria hatua ya jumla juu ya matatizo yanayotokana na mfululizo, kutengeneza kodi ya mabadiliko ili kutoa matatizo yanayomaanisha. Tunajaribu mbinu yetu katika kazi kadhaa za vizazi vya NLP.", 'tr': "Biz her kara-kuty strukturly girdi nusgasynyň önümlerini belli girdi çifti töwerekde terjime edip otyrýarys. Biziň yöntemimiz sebäbi gabdaly girdi-çizgi işaretlerniň toparlarynda bir 'düşündirim' tär edir. Bu bağlyklar çykyş girdiler bilen modelini soramak üçin hasaplanýar, jogaplaryň üstünde bir grafik bejermek we bölümleme problemini iň möhüm bölekleri saýlamak üçin çözmek üçin hasaplanýar. Umumy metodoary yzarlama hasaplanyň üstine üns berýäris we üýtgeşik bir awtomatik kodeçini möhüm girdi terbaglaryny etmäge ukyp berýäris NLP sany düzenlemek üçin biziň yönümizi bar.", 'af': "Ons interpreteer die voorskoude van enige swart- boks structureerde invoer- structureerde uitset model rondom 'n spesifieke invoer- uitset paar. Ons metode gee terug 'n 'uitduidelik' wat bestaan van groepe van invoer- uitset tekens wat is oorsaaklik verwante. Hierdie afhanklikhede word uitgevra deur die model te vra met perturbeerde inputs, genereer 'n graf oor tekens van die antwoordes, en laat 'n partisionering probleem oplos om die mees relevante komponente te kies. Ons fokus die algemene toegang op sekwensie-na-sekwensie probleme, aanvaar 'n variasionale outokoder om betekende invoer perturbasies te gee. Ons probeer ons metode oor verskeie NLP sekwensies generasie taak.", 'am': 'የደረጃ ምርጫዎች የግንኙነታችን አካባቢ የውጤት ማውጣት ምልክቶች የሚቆጠሩ “ትርጉም” ነው፡፡ እነዚህ ተደጋፊዎች ምሳሌውን በመጠየቅ በመጠየቅ ይታሰቃሉ፤ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠየቅ፣ ከምልክቶቹ ላይ ምልክቶችን በመጠየቅ እና አካባቢ ጉዳዩን ለመምረጥ ይችላሉ፡፡ የውይይት ግንኙነት አካባቢ መሆኑን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የNLP ግንኙነት ትውልድ ስራዎችን እናፈትናለን፡፡', 'az': "Biz hər siyah qutusu strukturlı girdi-strukturlı çıxış modelinin tədbirlərini müəyyən bir girdi-çıxış çift ətrafında təfsil edirik. Bizim metodumuz səbəb olaraq əlaqə edilən girdi-çıxış işaretlərinin dəstələrindən olan 'açıqlama' qaytarır. Bu bağlılıqlar modeli müxtəlif inputlər ilə soruşmaq, cavab vermələrindən bir grafik yaratmaq və ən məqsədili komponentləri seçmək üçün bölüm problemini çəkmək üçün çəkilir. Biz seçmə-seçmə problemlərinə genel tərzi tərəfindən tərəf yönəlirik, dəyişiklik avtomatik kodlayıcını təşkil edirik ki, anlamlı girdi perturbasyonu təşkil etmək üçün. Biz metodlarımızı NLP sequence nəsli işləri ilə imtahana çəkirik.", 'hy': 'Մենք մեկնաբանում ենք ցանկացած սևամորթ արկղի կառուցվածքավորված ինֆորմացված ելքի մոդելի կանխատեսումները որոշակի մուտք-ելք զույգի շուրջ: Մեր մեթոդը վերադարձնում է «բացատրություն», որը կազմված է մուտք-ելք նշանների խմբերից, որոնք պատճառներով կապված են: These dependencies are inferred by querying the model with perturbed inputs, generating a graph over tokens from the responses, and solving a partitioning problem to select the most relevant components.  Մենք կենտրոնացնում ենք ընդհանուր մոտեցումը հաջորդականության առջև հաջորդականության խնդիրների վրա, որպեսզի օգտագործենք բազմազան ավտոկոդեր, որպեսզի հանգեցնենք իմաստալից ներմուծքային խառնաշփոթություններ Մենք փորձում ենք մեր մեթոդը բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ-ի հաջորդականության առաջադրանքների ընթացքում:', 'bn': "আমরা বিশেষ ইনপুট- আউটপুটের জোড়ার চারপাশে কালো বাক্স-কাঠামো আউটপুট মডেলের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ব্যাখ্যা করি। আমাদের পদ্ধতি একটি 'ব্যাখ্যা' ফিরিয়ে দিয়েছে, যেগুলো ইনপুট-আউটপুটের প্রতীক, যা কারণে সম্পর্কিত। These dependencies are inferred by querying the model with perturbed inputs, generating a graph over tokens from the responses, and solving a partitioning problem to select the most relevant components.  আমরা সাধারণ প্রযুক্তির উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি, যাতে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রযোজ্য ইনপুটের ব আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি এনএলপি সিকেন্স প্রজন্মের কাজের মধ্যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি পরীক্ষা করি।", 'bs': 'Pretumačimo predviđanja svakog model a structuriranog ulaznog modela u crnoj kutiji oko određenog pare ulaznog izlaza. Naš metod vraća "objašnjenje" koja se sastoji od grupa znakova ulaska koji su uzrokovani. Ove zavisnosti su zaražene ispitivanjem model a s uznemirenim ulaznicima, stvaranjem grafika preko znakova odgovora i rješavanjem problema sa delicijama kako bi odabrali najvažnije komponente. Fokusiramo općeg pristupa na probleme sekvence do sekvence, usvojeći variacionalni autokoder kako bi dobili značajne perturbacije ulaza. Testiramo našu metodu preko nekoliko zadataka generacije NLP sekvence.', 'cs': 'Interpretujeme predikce jakéhokoli strukturovaného výstupního modelu s černou skříňkou kolem konkrétního páru vstupu-výstupu. Naše metoda vrací "vysvětlení" sestávající ze skupin vstupních a výstupních tokenů, které jsou kauzálně související. Tyto závislosti jsou odvozeny dotazem na model s narušenými vstupy, generováním grafu tokenů z odpovědí a řešením problému rozdělení pro výběr nejdůležitějších komponent. Obecný přístup se zaměřujeme na problémy sekvence k sekvenci, přičemž používáme variační autokodér, který vytváří smysluplné vstupní poruchy. Naši metodu testujeme napříč několika úlohami generování sekvencí NLP.', 'et': 'Me tõlgendame iga musta kasti struktureeritud sisendstruktureeritud väljundmudeli prognoose konkreetse sisend-väljund paari ümber. Meie meetod tagastab "selgituse", mis koosneb sisend-väljund tokenite rühmadest, mis on põhjuslikult seotud. Need sõltuvused on järeldatud, pärides mudelilt häiritud sisenditega, genereerides vastustest graafiku tokenite üle ja lahendades partitsioneerimisprobleemi, et valida kõige asjakohasemad komponendid. Me keskendume üldisele lähenemisviisile jada-jada probleemidele, võttes kasutusele variatsioonilise automaatkodeerija, et tekitada olulisi sisendhäireid. Testime oma meetodit mitmete NLP jada genereerimise ülesannetega.', 'ca': "We interpret the predictions of any black-box structured input-structured output model around a specific input-output pair.  Our method returns an 'explanation' consisting of groups of input-output tokens that are causally related.  Aquestes dependencies es dedueixen preguntant el model amb entrades perturbades, generant un gràfic sobre fitxes de les respostes, i resolvint un problem a de divisió per seleccionar els components més rellevants. We focus the general approach on sequence-to-sequence problems, adopting a variational autoencoder to yield meaningful input perturbations.  We test our method across several NLP sequence generation tasks.", 'fi': "Tulkitsemme minkä tahansa mustan laatikon strukturoidun tulosmallin ennusteet tietyn tulo-lähtöparin ympärille. Menetelmämme palauttaa 'selityksen', joka koostuu tulo-lähtömerkkien ryhmistä, jotka ovat syy-yhteyttä. Nämä riippuvuudet johdetaan kysymällä mallia häirityillä syötteillä, luomalla kaavio merkkien päälle vastauksista ja ratkaisemalla osioongelma valitsemalla tärkeimmät komponentit. Keskitymme yleiseen lähestymistapaan sekvenssi-sekvenssiin-ongelmiin ottamalla käyttöön variaatioautomaattinen kooderi tuottaakseen merkityksellisiä syöttöhäiriöitä. Testaamme menetelmäämme useissa NLP-sekvenssin luontitehtävissä.", 'sq': "We interpret the predictions of any black-box structured input-structured output model around a specific input-output pair.  Metoda jonë kthen një 'shpjegim' që përbëhet nga grupe të shenjave input-output që janë të lidhura me shkak. These dependencies are inferred by querying the model with perturbed inputs, generating a graph over tokens from the responses, and solving a partitioning problem to select the most relevant components.  We focus the general approach on sequence-to-sequence problems, adopting a variational autoencoder to yield meaningful input perturbations.  Ne testojmë metodën tonë nëpërmjet disa detyrave të gjenerimit të sekuencës NLP.", 'sk': 'Napovedi katerega koli strukturiranega vhodno strukturiranega izhodnega modela razlagamo okoli določenega vhodno-izhodnega pare. Naša metoda vrne "pojasnilo", sestavljeno iz skupin vhodno-izhodnih žetonov, ki so vzročno povezani. Te odvisnosti se sklepajo s poizvedbo modela z motenimi vhodi, ustvarjanjem grafikona preko žetonov iz odzivov in reševanjem težav z delitvijo za izbiro najpomembnejših komponent. Splošni pristop se osredotoča na probleme od zaporedja do zaporedja, pri čemer sprejmemo variacijski samokodirnik za ustvarjanje pomembnih vhodnih motenj. Našo metodo testiramo pri več opravilih generiranja zaporedja NLP.', 'jv': 'We interject the preview of some red-box structural input-structural output model about a special input-output link. method Gampang We Focal Lenge Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerti cara-cara NLP seneng dadi.', 'ha': "Tuna bayyana bayani ga wani misãlai wanda aka samar da cikin shirin ayuka da aka tsara cikin shirin ayuka mai baƙi, cikin wani sau biyu wanda ke fitarwa da aka ƙayyade. Tsarakanmu na mayar da wani 'fassarar', wanda ke cikin ƙungiyõyi na cikin ayuka da ke sami-haɗi. Wannan masu dõgara za'a shafe su game da tambayin ayuka da aka shigar da shi a cikin shirin ayuka, kuma ya ƙãga wani grafi a kan ayukan ayukan su sami, kuma ana solar wata fitina ga rabo dõmin ya zãɓi compound masu da muhimma. Tuna fokus zuwa masu zartar da sauri-zuwa-sakan, kuma Mu ɗauki wani kode mai dabar-daban farat ɗaya dõmin ya nuna turbatori masu inganci. Tuna jarraba hanyoyinmu a cikin wasu aikin na NLP masu ƙaranci.", 'bo': "We interpret the predictions of any black-box structured input-structured output model around a specific input-output pair. Our method returns an 'explanation' རྟེན་འབྲེལ་འདི་དག་ནི་ཚོར We focus the general approach on sequence-to-sequence problems, adopting a variational autoencoder to yield meaningful input perturbations. NLP ལོ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ།", 'he': 'אנו מפרשים את התחזויות של כל דוגמנית יציאה מובנת בתיבה שחורה מסביב לזוג יציאה-input ספציפי. השיטה שלנו מחזירה "הסבר" שמכיל קבוצות של סימני כניסה-יציאה שקשורים בגלל סיבה. תלויות אלה מוצאות על ידי שאלות על המודל עם כניסות מופרעות, לייצר גרף מעל סימנים מהתגובות, ולפתור בעיה מחלקה כדי לבחור את המרכיבים הרלוונטיים ביותר. אנחנו ממוקדים את הגישה הכללית על בעיות רצף לרצף, מאמצים קודד אוטומטי שונה כדי להביא פרטורבציות כניסה משמעותיות. אנחנו בודקים את השיטה שלנו במהלך כמה משימות של דור רצף NLP.'}
{'en': 'Piecewise Latent Variables for Neural Variational Text Processing', 'ar': 'متغيرات كامنة متقطعة لمعالجة النص المتغير العصبي', 'fr': 'Variables latentes par morceaux pour le traitement de texte variationnel neuronal', 'pt': 'Variáveis latentes por partes para processamento de texto variacional neural', 'es': 'Variables latentes por partes para el procesamiento de textos neuronales variacionales', 'ja': 'ニューラルバリエーションテキスト処理のためのピースワイズ潜伏変数', 'zh': '用神经变分文本分段潜在变量', 'hi': 'Neural Variational Text Processing के लिए Piecewise अव्यक्त चर', 'ru': 'Частичные скрытые переменные для нейронной вариационной обработки текста', 'ga': 'Athróga Folaigh do Phróiseáil Néar-Athraitheach Téacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Oldalsó változók a neurális változások szövegfeldolgozásához', 'el': 'Πλαϊνές μεταβλητές κομματικά για την επεξεργασία κειμένου νευρωνικής παραλλαγής', 'it': "Variabili laterali piecewise per l'elaborazione del testo delle variazioni neurali", 'lt': 'Piecewise Latent Variables for Neural Variational Text Processing', 'kk': 'Невралдық айнымалы мәтін процесінің кейінгі айнымалыларды бөлшектеу', 'mk': 'Последните променливи за процес на неурални варијации', 'ms': 'Pembolehubah Terlambat Piecewise untuk Pemprosesan Teks Bervariasi Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d വേരിയഷന്\u200d പദാവലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അടുത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പിയിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Varjabbli Latenti Piecewise għall-Ipproċessar tat-Test Varjazzjonali Newrali', 'mn': 'Цөмийн хувьсалын Текст Процессорын сүүлийн өөрчлөлт', 'ro': 'Variabile laterale piețiale pentru procesarea textului cu variații neurale', 'sr': 'Posljednje variable za procesiranje neuroloških varijacijskih teksta', 'no': 'Snøggte variablar for nøyralvariasjonal teksthandsaming', 'pl': 'Bieżące zmienne boczne dla przetwarzania tekstów zmiennych neuronowych', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Delvis laterala variabler för textbearbetning av neurala variabler', 'so': 'Isticmaalka ugu dambeeya', 'ta': 'புதிய மாறிய உரை செயல்பாடுக்கான தற்போதைய மாறிகளை நீக்கு', 'ur': 'نئورل ویرائشن ٹیکسٹ پرسس کے لئے ٹیکسٹ ویرائبلز', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thay đổi dòng cho chế độ chữ thay đổi thần kinh', 'bg': 'Странични променливи на части за обработка на невронни променливи текстове', 'nl': 'Piecewise latere variabelen voor neurale variatie tekstverwerking', 'hr': 'Posljednje variable za procesiranje neuroloških varijacijskih teksta', 'id': 'Variabel Latent Piecewise untuk Proses Teks Variasi Neural', 'de': 'Stufenweise laterale Variablen für die Textverarbeitung neuronaler Variationen', 'ko': '신경 변분 텍스트 처리 중의 세그먼트 잠재 변수', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya Kuendesha Maandishi ya Mabadiliko', 'da': 'Delvis sidevariabler til tekstbehandling af neurale variabler', 'fa': 'تغییرات اخیر برای پرداخت متن متغیر عصبی', 'tr': 'Niral Däşerlik Metin işleýişi üçin süýtgedikler', 'hy': 'Նյարդային տարբերակային տեքստի վերջին փոփոխականները', 'sq': 'Variablet e fundit në pjesë për Procesimin e Tekstit Variacional Neural', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Nöral Dəyişikli Metin İşləməsi üçün Sonrakı Dəyişiklər', 'af': 'Name', 'bs': 'Posljednje variable za procesiranje neuroloških varijacijskih teksta', 'ca': 'Variables posteriors en trossos per processar textos variacions neuronals', 'cs': 'Postranní proměnné pro zpracování textu s neurálními variantami', 'bn': 'Name', 'et': 'Tükikesi külgmised muutujad neuromuutujate teksti töötlemiseks', 'fi': 'Osittaiset sivumuuttujat hermomuuttujan tekstinkäsittelyä varten', 'jv': 'Variable', 'sk': 'Delne stranske spremenljivke za obdelavo besedila z nevralnimi spremenljivkami', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Piecewise Latent Variables for Neural Variational Text Processing', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཡི་གེའི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་ལ་མཐའ་འགྱུར་ཅན'}
{'en': 'Advances in neural variational inference have facilitated the learning of powerful directed graphical models with continuous latent variables, such as variational autoencoders. The hope is that such models will learn to represent rich, multi-modal latent factors in real-world data, such as natural language text. However, current models often assume simplistic priors on the latent variables-such as the uni-modal Gaussian distribution-which are incapable of representing complex latent factors efficiently. To overcome this restriction, we propose the simple, but highly flexible, piecewise constant distribution. This distribution has the capacity to represent an exponential number of modes of a latent target distribution, while remaining mathematically tractable. Our results demonstrate that incorporating this new latent distribution into different models yields substantial improvements in natural language processing tasks such as document modeling and natural language generation for dialogue.', 'ar': 'سهلت التطورات في الاستدلال المتغير العصبي تعلم النماذج الرسومية الموجهة القوية ذات المتغيرات الكامنة المستمرة ، مثل المشفرات التلقائية المتغيرة. الأمل هو أن تتعلم مثل هذه النماذج تمثيل عوامل كامنة غنية ومتعددة الوسائط في بيانات العالم الحقيقي ، مثل نص اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما تفترض النماذج الحالية مقدمات مبسطة على المتغيرات الكامنة - مثل التوزيع الغاوسي أحادي الوسائط - غير القادرة على تمثيل العوامل الكامنة المعقدة بكفاءة. للتغلب على هذا القيد ، نقترح التوزيع الثابت البسيط ، ولكن شديد المرونة ، متعدد التعريف. هذا التوزيع لديه القدرة على تمثيل عدد أسي من أوضاع التوزيع المستهدف الكامن ، بينما يظل قابلاً للتتبع حسابيًا. توضح نتائجنا أن دمج هذا التوزيع الكامن الجديد في نماذج مختلفة ينتج عنه تحسينات كبيرة في مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية مثل نمذجة المستندات وتوليد اللغة الطبيعية للحوار.', 'es': 'Los avances en la inferencia variacional neuronal han facilitado el aprendizaje de potentes modelos gráficos dirigidos con variables latentes continuas, como los autocodificadores variacionales. Se espera que estos modelos aprendan a representar factores latentes multimodales ricos en los datos del mundo real, como el texto en lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, los modelos actuales a menudo asumen prioridades simplistas sobre las variables latentes, como la distribución gaussiana unimodal, que son incapaces de representar eficazmente factores latentes complejos. Para superar esta restricción, proponemos la distribución constante, simple pero altamente flexible y por partes. Esta distribución tiene la capacidad de representar un número exponencial de modos de una distribución objetivo latente, sin dejar de ser tratable matemáticamente. Nuestros resultados demuestran que la incorporación de esta nueva distribución latente en diferentes modelos produce mejoras sustanciales en las tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, como el modelado de documentos y la generación de lenguaje natural para el diálogo.', 'fr': "Les progrès de l'inférence variationnelle neuronale ont facilité l'apprentissage de puissants modèles graphiques orientés avec des variables latentes continues, tels que les auto-encodeurs variationnels. L'espoir est que ces modèles apprendront à représenter des facteurs latents multimodaux riches dans des données réelles, telles que des textes en langage naturel. Cependant, les modèles actuels supposent souvent des antécédents simplistes sur les variables latentes, telles que la distribution gaussienne unimodale, qui sont incapables de représenter efficacement des facteurs latents complexes. Pour surmonter cette restriction, nous proposons la distribution constante par morceaux simple mais très flexible. Cette distribution a la capacité de représenter un nombre exponentiel de modes d'une distribution cible latente, tout en restant mathématiquement tractable. Nos résultats démontrent que l'intégration de cette nouvelle distribution latente dans différents modèles permet d'améliorer considérablement les tâches de traitement du langage naturel, telles que la modélisation de documents et la génération de langage naturel pour le dialogue.", 'pt': 'Os avanços na inferência variacional neural facilitaram o aprendizado de poderosos modelos gráficos direcionados com variáveis latentes contínuas, como autoencoders variacionais. A esperança é que esses modelos aprendam a representar fatores latentes ricos e multimodais em dados do mundo real, como texto em linguagem natural. No entanto, os modelos atuais geralmente assumem prioris simplistas nas variáveis latentes - como a distribuição Gaussiana unimodal - que são incapazes de representar fatores latentes complexos de forma eficiente. Para superar essa restrição, propomos a simples, mas altamente flexível, distribuição constante por partes. Esta distribuição tem a capacidade de representar um número exponencial de modos de uma distribuição de alvo latente, mantendo-se matematicamente tratável. Nossos resultados demonstram que a incorporação dessa nova distribuição latente em diferentes modelos produz melhorias substanciais nas tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural, como modelagem de documentos e geração de linguagem natural para diálogo.', 'ja': '神経変動推論の進歩は、変動オートエンコーダなどの連続潜伏変数を有する強力な有向グラフィカルモデルの学習を促進してきた。 そのようなモデルは、自然言語のテキストなどの現実世界のデータで豊かなマルチモーダルの潜在的要因を表すことを学ぶことを望んでいる。 しかしながら、現在のモデルは、複雑な潜在的要因を効率的に表現することができない単一モーダルガウス分布などの潜在的要因に関する単純化された前置詞を仮定することが多い。 この制限を克服するために、我々は単純だが非常に柔軟な分割定数分布を提案する。 この分布は、潜在的なターゲット分布の指数関数的な数のモードを表す能力を有する一方で、数学的にトラクタブルなままである。 私たちの結果は、この新しい潜在的な分布を異なるモデルに組み込むことで、文書モデリングや対話のための自然言語生成などの自然言語処理タスクが大幅に改善されることを示しています。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका परिवर्तनीय अनुमान में प्रगति ने निरंतर अव्यक्त चर के साथ शक्तिशाली निर्देशित ग्राफिकल मॉडल के सीखने की सुविधा प्रदान की है, जैसे कि परिवर्तनीय ऑटोएनकोडर। आशा है कि इस तरह के मॉडल वास्तविक दुनिया के डेटा में समृद्ध, बहु-मॉडल अव्यक्त कारकों का प्रतिनिधित्व करना सीखेंगे, जैसे कि प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ। हालांकि, वर्तमान मॉडल अक्सर अव्यक्त चर पर सरलीकृत प्राथमिकताओं को मानते हैं - जैसे कि यूनि-मोडल गॉसियन वितरण - जो जटिल अव्यक्त कारकों को कुशलतापूर्वक प्रतिनिधित्व करने में असमर्थ हैं। इस प्रतिबंध को दूर करने के लिए, हम सरल, लेकिन अत्यधिक लचीले, पीसवाइज निरंतर वितरण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस वितरण में एक अव्यक्त लक्ष्य वितरण के मोड की एक घातीय संख्या का प्रतिनिधित्व करने की क्षमता है, जबकि गणितीय रूप से असभ्य शेष है। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि विभिन्न मॉडलों में इस नए अव्यक्त वितरण को शामिल करने से संवाद के लिए दस्तावेज़ मॉडलिंग और प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी जैसे प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों में पर्याप्त सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'Достижения в области нейронного вариационного вывода облегчили изучение мощных направленных графических моделей с непрерывными скрытыми переменными, такими как вариационные автокодировщики. Есть надежда, что такие модели научатся представлять богатые, мультимодальные скрытые факторы в данных реального мира, такие как текст на естественном языке. Тем не менее, современные модели часто предполагают упрощенные притязания на скрытые переменные - такие как одномодальное распределение Гаусса - которые не способны эффективно представлять сложные скрытые факторы. Чтобы преодолеть это ограничение, мы предлагаем простое, но очень гибкое, кусочно константное распределение. Это распределение обладает способностью представлять экспоненциальное число режимов скрытого целевого распределения, оставаясь при этом математически тягучим. Наши результаты показывают, что включение этого нового латентного распределения в различные модели приводит к существенным улучшениям в задачах обработки естественного языка, таких как моделирование документов и генерация естественного языка для диалога.', 'zh': '神经变分推理之进,有连变量之强,有向图形之学,变分自编码器。 愿闻世界之数(如自然语言文本)多模态在因。 然今之模形,常设潜于变量(单模态高斯布)之简先验,变量无以效于复杂之因。 为克此限,约而高分段常数。 此布能示潜在指数级模式数,兼守数学之可处理性。 吾之的结果表明,布列异形,可大改自然语言,如文档建模对自然语言成。', 'ga': 'D’éascaigh dul chun cinn i tátal athraitheach néareolaíoch foghlaim samhlacha grafacha faoi stiúir chumhachtacha le hathróga folaigh leanúnacha, mar uath-ionchódóirí athraitheacha. Táthar ag súil go bhfoghlaimeoidh samhlacha den sórt sin fachtóirí saibhre, ilmhódacha folaigh a léiriú i sonraí an fhíorshaoil, mar théacs teanga nádúrtha. Mar sin féin, is minic a ghlacann samhlacha reatha tosaíochtaí simplíocha ar na hathróga folaigh - mar an dáileadh aonmhódúil Gaussach - nach bhfuil in ann fachtóirí casta folaigh a léiriú go héifeachtach. Chun an srian seo a shárú, molaimid an dáileadh seasta de réir a chéile simplí, ach an-solúbtha. Tá an cumas ag an dáileadh seo líon easpónantúil modhanna de dháileadh sprice folaigh a léiriú, agus fós inrianaithe go matamaiticiúil. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha ar thascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha ar nós samhaltú doiciméad agus giniúint nádúrtha teanga le haghaidh comhphlé má ionchorpraítear an dáileadh folaigh nua seo i múnlaí éagsúla.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური გარიანციო ინფრენციაში მონაცემები უფრო ძალიან გარეშე გრაფიკალური მოდელების შესწავლობა, როგორც გარიანციოლური ავტოკოდერები. მედილობა არის, რომ ასეთი მოდელები დავისწავლოთ, რომ გამოსახულება ბედნიერი, მრავალური მოდელური ლატენტი ფაქტორები რეალური მსოფლიო მონაცემებში, როგორც ნაირთი მაგრამ, მიმდინარე მოდელები ზოგიერთად უცნობილური წინასწარმოებენ წინასწარმოებული ცვლილებების შესახებ, როგორც ერთმოდელური Gaussian გაყოფილება, რომლებიც არ შეუძლებელია კომპლექსი ლა ჩვენ უფრო მარტივი, მაგრამ ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან, ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ამ გაყოფილების შესაძლებლობა აქვს, როდესაც მათემატიკალურად გადარჩენა მარტიკალურად გადარჩენა. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ამ ახალი ლატენტის გაყოფილება განსხვავებული მოდელში იქნება მნიშვნელოვანი დაახლოების სახელსახულო ენის პროცესტის დავალებაში, როგორც დოკუმენტის', 'el': 'Οι πρόοδοι στην εξαγωγή νευρικών παραλλαγών έχουν διευκολύνει την εκμάθηση ισχυρών κατευθυνόμενων γραφικών μοντέλων με συνεχείς λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές, όπως οι μεταβλητοί αυτοκωδικοποιητές παραλλαγών. Η ελπίδα είναι ότι τέτοια μοντέλα θα μάθουν να αντιπροσωπεύουν πλούσιους, πολυμορφικούς λανθάνοντες παράγοντες σε δεδομένα πραγματικού κόσμου, όπως το κείμενο φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, τα σημερινά μοντέλα συχνά υποθέτουν απλουστευτικά προηγούμενα στις λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές όπως η μονοmodale Gaussian κατανομή που δεν είναι σε θέση να αναπαραστήσουν αποτελεσματικά σύνθετους λανθάνοντες παράγοντες. Για να ξεπεραστεί αυτός ο περιορισμός, προτείνουμε την απλή, αλλά εξαιρετικά ευέλικτη, κομματική σταθερή κατανομή. Αυτή η κατανομή έχει την ικανότητα να αντιπροσωπεύει έναν εκθετικό αριθμό τρόπων μιας λανθάνουσας κατανομής στόχου, ενώ παραμένει μαθηματικά ανιχνεύσιμη. Τα αποτελέσματά μας καταδεικνύουν ότι η ενσωμάτωση αυτής της νέας λανθάνουσας κατανομής σε διαφορετικά μοντέλα επιφέρει ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις στις εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, όπως η μοντελοποίηση εγγράφων και η δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας για διάλογο.', 'lt': 'Naudojant neurologinę variacinę išvadą lengviau mokytis galingų nukreiptų grafinių modelių su nuolatiniais latentiniais kintamaisiais, pavyzdžiui, variantiniais autokodatoriais. Tikimasi, kad tokie modeliai išmoks atstovauti turtingiems, daugiarūšio pobūdžio latentiems veiksniams realaus pasaulio duomenise, pavyzdžiui, natūralaus kalbos tekste. Vis dėlto dabartiniai modeliai dažnai laikosi paprastų prioritetų latentiems kintamiesiems, pvz., vieno režimo gausijos pasiskirstymui, kurie negali veiksmingai atspindėti sudėtingų latenčių veiksnių. Siekiant įveikti šį apribojimą, siūlome paprastą, bet labai lankstą, vienodai nuolatinį paskirstymą. Šis pasiskirstymas turi pajėgumą atspindėti eksponencinį latentinio tikslinio pasiskirstymo režimų skaičių, tačiau išlieka matematiškai traktuojamas. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad įtraukiant šį naują latent in į platinimą į skirtingus modelius gerokai pagerėja gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotys, pvz., dokumentų modeliavimas ir gamtos kalbų kūrimas dialogui.', 'kk': 'Невралдық айнымалылық инференциясының алдындары күшті графикалық моделдерді оқытуға көмектеседі. Мысалы айнымалылық автокодерлер секілді көмектесілген келесі айнымалылықтар бар. Бұл үлгілер, тәуелді тіл мәтіні секілді, шын әлемдік деректерінде баяны, көп модалдық латенті факторларды көрсетуді үйренеді. Бірақ қазіргі үлгілер келесі айнымалыларда қарапайым алдында, мысалы, бір- модалдық Гауссияның үлестірімі - комплексті келесі факторларды ефективті көрсетуге болмайды. Бұл шектеуді бастау үшін қарапайым, бірақ өте гибкитті, бұрышты үлестірімізді ұсынамыз. Бұл үлестірім математикалық қадағалау кезінде келесі мақсатты үлестірімінің экспоненциялық санын көрсету мүмкіндігі бар. Біздің нәтижелеріміз бұл жаңа latent үлестірімін түрлі моделдерге ендіру үшін табиғи тілдерді өзгерту тапсырмаларында, мысалы, құжат моделі мен табиғи тілдерді құру диалогының кө', 'mk': 'Напредоците во нервната варијационална инференција го олеснија учењето на моќните директирани графички модели со континуирани лантни променливи, како што се варијационалните автокодери. Се надеваме дека ваквите модели ќе научат да претставуваат богати, мултимодални лантни фактори во реалните податоци, како што е природниот јазик текст. Сепак, сегашните модели честопати претпоставуваат едноставни претходни приоритети за лантните променливи - како што е унимодалната гауска дистрибуција - кои не можат ефикасно да ги претставуваат комплексните лантни фактори. За да ја надминеме оваа рестрикција, предлагаме едноставна, но многу флексибилна, делумно константна дистрибуција. Оваа дистрибуција има капацитет да претставува експоненцијален број на режими на лантна мета дистрибуција, додека останува математички трактивна. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека вклучувањето на оваа нова тајна дистрибуција во различни модели предизвикува значителни подобрувања во природните задачи за обработување јазици како што се моделирање на документите и генерација на природен јазик за дијало', 'it': "I progressi nell'inferenza variazionale neurale hanno facilitato l'apprendimento di potenti modelli grafici diretti con variabili latenti continue, come gli autoencoder variazionali. La speranza è che tali modelli imparino a rappresentare fattori latenti ricchi e multimodali nei dati del mondo reale, come il testo in lingua naturale. Tuttavia, i modelli attuali spesso assumono priori semplicistici sulle variabili latenti - come la distribuzione gaussiana unimodale - che sono incapaci di rappresentare fattori latenti complessi in modo efficiente. Per superare questa restrizione, proponiamo la distribuzione semplice, ma altamente flessibile, piecewise costante. Questa distribuzione ha la capacità di rappresentare un numero esponenziale di modalità di una distribuzione target latente, pur rimanendo matematicamente tracciabile. I nostri risultati dimostrano che incorporare questa nuova distribuzione latente in diversi modelli produce miglioramenti sostanziali nelle attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale come la modellazione dei documenti e la generazione del linguaggio naturale per il dialogo.", 'hu': 'A neurális variációs következtetés fejlődése megkönnyítette az erőteljes irányított grafikus modellek megtanulását folyamatos látens változókkal, mint például a variációs autokódolók. A remény az, hogy az ilyen modellek megtanulják majd gazdag, multimodális látens tényezőket képviselni a valós adatokban, mint például a természetes nyelvű szöveg. A jelenlegi modellek azonban gyakran egyszerűsítik a látens változókat, mint például az unimodális Gauss eloszlást, amelyek képtelenek hatékonyan képviselni komplex látens tényezőket. E korlátozás leküzdése érdekében javasoljuk az egyszerű, de rendkívül rugalmas, aprólékos állandó eloszlást. Ez az eloszlás képes egy látens céleloszlás exponenciális számú módját reprezentálni, miközben matematikailag vonható marad. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy ennek az új látens eloszlásnak a különböző modellekbe történő beépítése jelentős javulást eredményez a természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatoknak, mint például a dokumentumok modellezése és a párbeszéd természetes nyelvének generálása.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн өөрчлөлтийн халдварын давхар нөлөөлөлд хүчтэй график загваруудын суралцах нь үргэлжлүүлсэн соронзон өөрчлөлтийг ашигладаг. Ийм загварууд байгалийн хэл текст шиг жинхэнэ дэлхийн өгөгдлийн баян, олон загварын загваруудыг илэрхийлж сурах гэдэгт итгэл найдаж байна. Гэхдээ одоогийн загварууд ихэвчлэн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн хувьсагчийн ху Энэ хязгаарыг дутагдахын тулд бид энгийн, гэхдээ маш гишүүмжтэй, жишээлбэлтэй тогтмол хуваарилалтыг сануулдаг. Энэ хуваалтын талаар математикийн давтамжтайгаар үлдэх боломжтой байдаг. Бидний үр дүнд энэ шинэ соронзон хуваарилалтыг өөр загвар руу оруулах нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлүүдийн жишээ нь баримт загвар болон байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйлдвэрлэлд маш их сайжруулдаг.', 'no': 'Avvanslar i neuralvariasjonal infeksjon har gjennomført læring av kraftige direkte grafiske modeller med kontinuerlege latente variabler, slik som variasjonale autokodingar. Håpet er at slike modeller vil lære å representera rike, fleire modal latentfaktorer i verdensdata, som naturspråk. Men gjeldande modeller gjer ofte enkelte førehandsvising på latente variabelane, som uni modal Gaussiansk distribusjon, som ikkje er i stand til å representera komplekse latente faktorer effektivt. For å overføre denne avgrensinga, foreslår vi den enkle, men svært fleksibel, piecewise konstant distribusjonen. Denne distribusjonen har kapasiteten til å representera eit eksponentsiell tal på modus til ein latent målfdeling, mens det er gjenstandande matematisk sportabell. Resultatet våre viser at inkludering av denne nye latente distribusjonen i ulike modeller gjer stor forbedringar i naturspråk-handsamingsoppgåver som dokumentmodellering og naturspråk-generering for dialogen.', 'ms': 'Kehadapan dalam kesimpulan variasi saraf telah memudahkan pembelajaran model grafik yang berkuasa direksikan dengan pembolehubah terus-menerus yang tersembunyi, seperti pengekod otomatik variasi. Harapan ialah model tersebut akan belajar mewakili faktor tersembunyi yang kaya, multi modal dalam data dunia nyata, seperti teks bahasa biasa. Namun, model semasa sering menganggap priori sederhana pada pembolehubah tersembunyi - seperti distribusi Gaussian uni modal - yang tidak mampu mewakili faktor tersembunyi kompleks secara efektif. Untuk mengatasi keterangan ini, kami cadangkan distribusi yang mudah, tetapi sangat fleksibel, secara terpisah konstan. Distribusi ini mempunyai kapasitas untuk mewakili bilangan eksponensial mod distribusi sasaran yang tersembunyi, sementara tetap boleh ditarik secara matematik. Our results demonstrate that incorporating this new latent distribution into different models yields substantial improvements in natural language processing tasks such as document modeling and natural language generation for dialogue.', 'pl': 'Postępy w wnioskowaniu wariancji neuronowych ułatwiły naukę potężnych ukierunkowanych modeli graficznych z ciągłymi utajonymi zmiennymi, takimi jak wariancjonalne autokodery. Mamy nadzieję, że takie modele nauczą się reprezentować bogate, multimodalne czynniki ukryte w danych świata rzeczywistego, takie jak tekst języka naturalnego. Jednakże obecne modele często zakładają uproszczone priory dla zmiennych utajonych, takich jak unimodalna wielkość rozkładu Gaussa, które nie są w stanie skutecznie reprezentować złożonych czynników utajonych. Aby przezwyciężyć to ograniczenie, proponujemy prostą, ale wysoce elastyczną, kawałkową stałą dystrybucję. Rozkład ten ma zdolność reprezentować wykładniczą liczbę trybów ukrytego rozkładu docelowego, pozostając jednocześnie matematycznie ściągalny. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że włączenie tej nowej ukrytej dystrybucji do różnych modeli przynosi znaczną poprawę w zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego, takich jak modelowanie dokumentów i generowanie języka naturalnego dla dialogu.', 'ro': 'Avansurile în inferența variațională neurală au facilitat învățarea unor modele grafice puternice direcționate cu variabile latente continue, cum ar fi autocoderele variaționale. Speranța este că astfel de modele vor învăța să reprezinte factori latenți bogați, multimodali în datele din lumea reală, cum ar fi textul în limba naturală. Cu toate acestea, modelele actuale presupun adesea priorități simpliste asupra variabilelor latente - cum ar fi distribuția Gaussiană unimodală - care sunt incapabile să reprezinte factori latenți complexe în mod eficient. Pentru a depăși această restricție, propunem distribuția constantă simplă, dar extrem de flexibilă. Această distribuție are capacitatea de a reprezenta un număr exponențial de moduri ale unei distribuții țintă latente, rămânând în același timp trasabilă matematic. Rezultatele noastre demonstrează că încorporarea acestei noi distribuții latente în diferite modele generează îmbunătățiri substanțiale în sarcinile de procesare a limbajului natural, cum ar fi modelarea documentelor și generarea limbajului natural pentru dialog.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ മുന്നോട്ടുകള്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ട് നേരിട്ട ഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് ഇതുപോലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ, പല-മോഡല്\u200d ലാറ്റല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാകളില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കു എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ മാറ്റങ്ങളില്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തുന്നു. യൂണി-മോഡല്\u200d ഗാസ്സിയന്\u200d വിതരണം പോലെ സാധ്യതയുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണ ഈ പരിധി വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എളുപ്പമാണ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നത്, അടുത്ത ലക്ഷ്യ വിതരണ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളുടെ എക്സ്പോണ്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200dറെ എണ്ണം രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഈ വിതരണ സാധ്യതയുണ്ട നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ പുതിയ വിതരണം വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകളിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള', 'so': 'Horumarinta cudurka kala duwan ee neurada waxay u sahlisay barashada tusaale ahaan maamulka la hagayo oo xoogga leh oo la xiriira bedelka ugu dambeeya, tusaale ahaan qodolka kala duwan. Rajada waxaa laga yaabaa in tusaalayaasha kale ay bartaan in ay ku representaan waxyaabo taajir ah oo kala duduwan oo ay ku jiraan macluumaadka arimaha caalamiga ah, tusaale ahaan qoraalka afka dabiicadda ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, tusaale ahaan noocyada hada ah waxay inta badan leeyihiin horumar fudud oo ku saabsan isbedelka ugu dambeeya, sida qaybinta uni-modal Gaussian oo aan awoodin inay si faa’iido ah u representaan waxyaabaha complex ee ugu dambeeya. Si aan uga adkaado xadgudubkan, waxaynu soo jeedinnaa fudud, laakiin si caqli leh, qaybinta joogtada ah. Qaybinta waxay leedahay awood uu ka kooban karo noocyada firaaqada lagu qeybinayo waxyaabaha ugu dambeeyay, intii ka hadhay macluumaadka ku saabsan. Abaalkayaga waxay muujiyaan in qaybinta cusub ee ugu danbeeyay noocyo kala duduwan u dhigo, waxaa ka soo bixinaya hagaajinta horumarinta ku saabsan shaqooyinka baaritaanka afka dabiicadda, tusaale ahaan sameynta qoraalka sameynta qoraalka iyo farshaxanka afka dabiiciga ah.', 'mt': 'L-avvanzi fl-inferenza varjazzjonali newrali ffaċilitaw it-tagħlim ta’ mudelli grafiċi diretti b’saħħithom b’varjabbli kontinwi moħbija, bħal awtokodifikaturi varjazzjonali. It-tama hija li mudelli bħal dawn jitgħallmu jirrappreżentaw fatturi moħbija b’ħafna modi fid-dejta reali, bħat-test tal-lingwa naturali. Madankollu, il-mudelli attwali spiss jassumu prijoritajiet sempliċi fuq il-varjabbli moħbija - bħat-tqassim unimodali Gaussian - li mhumiex kapaċi jirrappreżentaw fatturi moħbija kumplessi b’mod effiċjenti. Biex tingħeleb din ir-restrizzjoni, nipproponu distribuzzjoni kostanti sempliċi, iżda flessibbli ħafna. Din id-distribuzzjoni għandha l-kapaċità li tirrappreżenta numru esponenzjali ta’ modi ta’ distribuzzjoni fil-mira moħbija, filwaqt li tibqa’ attrabbli matematikament. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ din id-distribuzzjoni moħbija ġdida f’mudelli differenti twassal għal titjib sostanzjali fil-kompiti tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali bħall-mudell tad-dokumenti u l-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali għad-djalogu.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් වෙනස් වෙනස් විදියට පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පුළුවන් විදියට පරීක්ෂණ වෙනස් විදියට සමග අශ්වාසය තමයි ඒ වගේ මොඩල් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත, විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය, විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය ලෝකයේ දත්ත නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූත මොඩේල් හැමවෙලේම සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනස් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනස් වලින් හිතාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ - යුනික් මොඩාල් ගෝස මේ සීමාව ප්\u200dරධාන කරන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය, නමුත් ගොඩක් විශේෂ විතරයි, ප්\u200dරධාන විතරයි. මේ විතරයේ ප්\u200dරතිශාලයක් තියෙන්නේ ලේටින් ලක්ෂණ විතරයේ ප්\u200dරතිශාල සංඛ්යාවක් ප්\u200dරතිශාලය කරන්න, ගණ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නයි මේ අලුත් ලේටින් විතරය වෙනස් මොඩේල් වලට සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාර කර්ම', 'ur': 'نئورل متفاوت غیر متفاوت کثرت کے مطابق سیدھی گرافیکل موڈل کی تعلیم کو ہمیشہ دکھایا گیا ہے، جیسے متفاوت اٹونکوڈر. امید یہ ہے کہ ایسے موڈلے ثروتمند، بہت سی موڈلہ لاٹینٹ فکتوروں کی نمایش سکیں گے، جیسے طبیعی زبان متن. However, current models often assume simplistic priors on the latent variables - such as the uni modal Gaussian distribution - which are unable to represent complex latent factors efficiently. یہ محدودیت پر غالب ہونے کے لئے ہم سادھے، لیکن بہت مہربان، پاکیزہ طور پر قائم تقسیم کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. یہ تقسیم کا قابل ہے کہ ایک لاٹینٹ ٹیلٹ تقسیم کے موڈوں کی ایک منفی شمارہ کی تصویر کرے، حالانکہ ریاضی تراکٹبل باقی رہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ نئی لاٹینٹ تقسیم کو مختلف موڈلوں میں شامل کرنا طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں میں بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے جیسے سند موڈلینگ اور طبیعی زبان کی نسل ڈالنے کے لئے۔', 'ta': 'புதிய மாறிகளின் முன்னேற்றம் தானியங்கி குறியீடுகள் போன்ற மாறிகளுடன் தொடர்ந்து தொடர்ந்து வரைகலை மாறிகளுடன் கற்றுக்கொள்ள உதவிய நம்பிக்கை என்னவென்றால் இது போன்ற மாதிரிகள் பணக்கூடிய, பல மாதிரி சமாதானமான காரணிகளை உண்மையான உலக தரவில் குறிப்பிடும ஆனால் தற்போதைய மாதிரிகள் பெரும்பாலாக சுக்கல் சமீபத்தில் உள்ள மாறிகளில் எளிமையான முன்னுரிமைகளை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறார்கள் - யூனி- மாதிரி பக இந்த கட்டுப்பாட்டை வெற்றுவதற்கு, எளிதான, ஆனால் மிகவும் flexible, piecewise நிலையான பங்கீட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறது. இந்த பங்கீடு கணிதத்தில் இருக்கும் போது கணிதத்தில் அடிக்குறிப்பிடும் அடுக்குறியீட்டின் எண்ணிக்கையை குறிப்பிடும முடிவு', 'sr': 'Napredak u neuralnim varijacijskim infekcijama olakšao je učenje moćnih usmjerenih grafičkih modela sa stalnim latentnim varijacijom, poput varijacijskih autokodera. Nada je da će takvi modeli naučiti da predstavljaju bogate, multimodalne latentne faktore u podacima realnog svijeta, poput prirodnog jezika teksta. Međutim, trenutni modeli često preduzimaju jednostavne pre latentne promjene, kao što su unimodalna Gausijska distribucija, koja ne mogu efikasno predstavljati kompleksne latentne faktore. Da bi preuzeli ovu ograničenje, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali veoma fleksibilnu, pristojnu konstantnu distribuciju. Ova distribucija ima kapacitet da predstavlja eksponencijalni broj režima latentne metne distribucije, dok ostaje matematički praćen. Naši rezultati pokazuju da uključujući ovu novu latentnu distribuciju u različite modele pruža značajne poboljšanje zadataka prirodnog obrađivanja jezika poput modela dokumenta i prirodnog jezika za dijalog.', 'sv': 'Framsteg i neural variationsinferens har underlättat inlärningen av kraftfulla riktade grafiska modeller med kontinuerliga latenta variabler, såsom variationsautokodare. Förhoppningen är att sådana modeller kommer att lära sig att representera rika, multimodala latenta faktorer i verkliga data, såsom naturlig språktext. Nuvarande modeller antar dock ofta förenklade prioriteringar på latenta variabler - såsom den unimodala gaussiska fördelningen - som inte kan representera komplexa latenta faktorer effektivt. För att övervinna denna begränsning föreslår vi en enkel, men mycket flexibel, punktvis konstant fördelning. Denna fördelning har förmågan att representera ett exponentiellt antal lägen för en latent målfördelning, samtidigt som den förblir matematiskt spårbar. Våra resultat visar att införlivandet av denna nya latenta distribution i olika modeller ger betydande förbättringar i bearbetningsuppgifter som dokumentmodellering och generering av naturligt språk för dialog.', 'uz': "Name Bu ተስፋ shunday modellar asl til matni kabi hozir, ko'plab modal latent factorilarni tahrirlash uchun o'rganadi. Lekin, joriy modellar ko'pincha eng oxirgi oʻzgarishlarda oddiy darajaga ega bo'ladi. Bu murakkab latent factorilarni foydalanib boʻlmaydi mumkin. Bu cheksizni oshirish uchun oddiy, lekin juda fleksiblik, juda cheksiz va davom tarqatishni talab qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Bizning natijalarimiz yangi tarqatishni boshqa modellarga qoʻshishni ko'rsatadi. Hujjatni modellash va dialog uchun tabiiy tillar yaratish vazifalarda o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Những tiến bộ trong Liên kết thần kinh đa dạng đã giúp việc học các mô hình ảnh trực tiếp, với các biến số tiềm ẩn liên tục, như mã tự động đa số. Hy vọng là những mô hình đó sẽ được học cách đại diện cho những yếu tố tiềm ẩn đa chiều trong thực tế, như ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình hiện tại thường có những ưu tiên đơn giản trên các biến số tiềm năng (kiểu đại biểu thị phân phối kiểu Gaussian) mà không có khả năng đại diện những yếu tố tiềm ẩn phức tạp một cách hiệu quả. Để vượt qua giới hạn này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phân phối đơn giản, nhưng rất linh hoạt và lẻ tẻ. Lần phân phối này có khả năng đại diện một số số nhân số các chế độ phân phối mục tiêu tiềm ẩn, trong khi còn phải theo thuật to án. Kết quả của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng việc áp dụng sự phân phối tiềm năng mới vào các mô hình khác nhau sẽ cải thiện đáng kể các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên như việc tạo mẫu tài liệu và sản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên.', 'hr': 'Napredak u neuralnim varijacijskim infekcijama olakšao je učenje moćnih usmjerenih grafičkih modela s kontinualnim latentnim varijacijom, poput varijacijskih autokodera. Nada se da će se takvi modeli naučiti predstavljati bogate, multimodalne latentne faktore u podacima stvarnog svijeta, poput prirodnog jezika teksta. Međutim, trenutni modeli često preduzimaju jednostavne prethodne prednosti o latentnim promjenama - poput jednomodalnog Gausijskog distribucije - koje nisu u moguće učinkovito predstavljati kompleksne latentne faktore. Da bi preuzeli ovu ograničenje, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali vrlo fleksibilnu, prisutnu konstantnu distribuciju. Ova distribucija ima kapacitet da predstavlja eksponencijalni broj režima latentne ciljne distribucije, dok ostaje matematički praćen. Naši rezultati pokazuju da uključujući ovu novu latentnu distribuciju u različite modele donosi značajne poboljšanje zadataka prirodnog obradivanja jezika poput modela dokumenta i prirodne jezika za dijalog.', 'bg': 'Напредъкът в невронното вариационно заключение улеснява изучаването на мощни насочени графични модели с непрекъснати латентни променливи, като вариационни автокодери. Надеждата е, че такива модели ще се научат да представят богати, мултимодални латентни фактори в реалните данни, като текста на естествен език. Въпреки това, настоящите модели често приемат опростени приории на латентните променливи - като унимодалното гаусово разпределение - които са неспособни да представят сложни латентни фактори ефективно. За да преодолеем това ограничение, предлагаме просто, но изключително гъвкаво, постоянно разпределение на части. Това разпределение има капацитета да представлява експоненциален брой режими на латентно целево разпределение, като същевременно остава математически проследимо. Нашите резултати показват, че включването на това ново латентно разпределение в различни модели води до съществени подобрения в задачите за обработка на естествения език като моделиране на документи и генериране на естествен език за диалог.', 'nl': 'Vooruitgang in neurale variatieinferentie heeft het leren van krachtige gerichte grafische modellen vergemakkelijkt met continue latente variabelen, zoals variatie autoencoders. De hoop is dat dergelijke modellen zullen leren rijke, multimodale latente factoren te vertegenwoordigen in real-world data, zoals tekst in natuurlijke taal. Echter, huidige modellen veronderstellen vaak simplistische priors op de latente variabelen, zoals de uni-modale Gaussiaanse distributie, die niet in staat zijn complexe latente factoren efficiënt te vertegenwoordigen. Om deze beperking te overwinnen, stellen we de eenvoudige, maar zeer flexibele, stukwijze constante verdeling voor. Deze verdeling heeft de capaciteit om een exponentieel aantal modi van een latente doelverdeling weer te geven, terwijl ze wiskundig traceerbaar blijft. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het opnemen van deze nieuwe latente distributie in verschillende modellen aanzienlijke verbeteringen oplevert in natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken zoals documentmodellering en het genereren van natuurlijke taal voor dialoog.', 'id': 'Kemajuan dalam kesimpulan variasi saraf telah memfasilitasi pembelajaran dari model grafis direksi kuat dengan variabel laten terus menerus, seperti autokoder variasi. Harapannya adalah bahwa model tersebut akan belajar untuk mewakili faktor rahasia kaya, multi modal dalam data dunia nyata, seperti teks bahasa alami. Namun, model saat ini sering menganggap priori sederhana pada variabel latent - seperti distribusi Gaussi uni modal - yang tidak mampu mewakili faktor latent kompleks secara efisien. Untuk mengatasi keterangan ini, kami mengusulkan distribusi sederhana, tapi sangat fleksibel, secara terpisah konstan. Distribusi ini memiliki kapasitas untuk mewakili jumlah eksponensial modus dari distribusi sasaran latent, sementara tetap matematikal traktable. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa memasukkan distribusi rahasia baru ini ke dalam model yang berbeda memberikan peningkatan besar dalam tugas proses bahasa alami seperti model dokumen dan generasi bahasa alami untuk dialog.', 'da': 'Fremskridt i neural variationsinferens har lettet læringen af kraftfulde rettede grafiske modeller med kontinuerlige latente variabler, såsom variationsautoencodere. Håbet er, at sådanne modeller vil lære at repræsentere rige, multimodale latente faktorer i virkelighedens data, såsom natursprogtekst. De nuværende modeller antager imidlertid ofte forenklede prioriteringer på de latente variabler - såsom den unimodale gaussiske fordeling - som ikke er i stand til at repræsentere komplekse latente faktorer effektivt. For at overvinde denne begrænsning foreslår vi den enkle, men meget fleksible, delvist konstante fordeling. Denne fordeling har evnen til at repræsentere et eksponentielt antal tilstande for en latent målfordeling, mens den forbliver matematisk tracerbar. Vores resultater viser, at indarbejdelse af denne nye latente fordeling i forskellige modeller giver betydelige forbedringer i naturlig sprogbehandling opgaver såsom dokumentmodellering og generering af naturligt sprog til dialog.', 'de': 'Fortschritte in der neuronalen Variationsinterferenz haben das Erlernen leistungsfähiger gerichteter grafischer Modelle mit kontinuierlichen latenten Variablen, wie variationalen Autoencodern, erleichtert. Die Hoffnung ist, dass solche Modelle lernen, reiche, multimodale latente Faktoren in realen Daten, wie z.B. natürlicher Sprachtext, darzustellen. Allerdings gehen aktuelle Modelle oft von simplistischen Prioren auf die latenten Variablen ab, wie z.B. die unimodale Gaußsche Verteilungskraft, die nicht in der Lage sind, komplexe latente Faktoren effizient darzustellen. Um diese Einschränkung zu überwinden, schlagen wir die einfache, aber hochflexible, stückweise konstante Verteilung vor. Diese Verteilung hat die Fähigkeit, eine exponentielle Anzahl von Modi einer latenten Zielverteilung darzustellen, während sie mathematisch nachvollziehbar bleibt. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Integration dieser neuen latenten Verteilung in verschiedene Modelle erhebliche Verbesserungen bei der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache wie Dokumentenmodellierung und Generierung natürlicher Sprache für den Dialog bringt.', 'ko': '신경 변분 추리의 진전은 연속적인 잠재적인 변수를 가진 강력한 유방향 도형 모델의 학습을 촉진시켰다. 예를 들어 변분 자동 인코더이다.우리는 이러한 모델이 실제 세계의 데이터에서 풍부하고 다중모드적인 잠재적 요소, 예를 들어 자연 언어 텍스트를 표현할 수 있기를 바란다.그러나 현재의 모델은 잠재적 변수의 선험이 너무 간단하다. 예를 들어 단봉고스 분포와 같이 복잡한 잠재적 요소를 효과적으로 나타낼 수 없다.이 제한을 극복하기 위해 우리는 간단하지만 고도로 유연한 분단 상수 분포를 제시했다.이런 분포는 잠재적 목표가 분포하는 지수 수량의 모델을 대표하고 수학적 처이성을 유지할 수 있다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 이러한 새로운 잠재적 분포를 서로 다른 모델에 통합하면 문서 모델링과 자연 언어 대화 생성 등 자연 언어 처리 임무를 현저하게 개선할 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Nöral çeşitli çarpışmalarda ilerlemeler güçlü yönelik grafik modellerinin öwrenmesini sürekli geçici çarpışmalar bilen, çeşitli otoködler gibi. Bu nusgalar baý, multi modal geçen faktörler, dünýäde tebigat dilinde metin ýaly şekilde üýtgederler. Bu şekilde, günümüzdeki modeller sık sık sık geçmiş değişkenlerde basistik öbürleri tahmin ediyor. - Bu sınırı üstün etmek için basit ama çok fleksibil ve sabit dağıtımı teklif ediyoruz. Bu daýratmanyň matematiki traktable bolan wagtlar üçin geçmiş maksad daýratmanyň eksponensiýal sanyny temsil etmek ukypy bar. Biziň netijelerimiz bu täze soňky döwletlerni farklı nusgalara dahil etmek üçin tebigy diller işlemek täzeliklerinde örän gowurak getirir ýaly döwletler we tebigy diller döwletlere görkezilýändir.', 'sw': 'Maendeleo katika ugonjwa wa ubongo umewezesha kujifunza mifano yenye mifano yenye mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni, kama vile kodi zinazobadilika. Matumaini ni kuwa mifano kama hizi watajifunza kuwakilisha matokeo ya tajiri, yenye matumizi mengi katika data halisi za dunia, kama vile maandishi ya lugha ya asili. Hata hivyo, mifano ya sasa mara nyingi huchukua vipaumbele rahisi juu ya mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni - kama vile usambazaji wa asili wa Gaussia - ambavyo hawana uwezo wa kuwakilisha sababu tata za hivi karibuni kwa ufanisi. Ili kushinda vikwazo hili, tunapendekeza usambazaji rahisi, lakini kwa kiasi kikubwa, kwa kiasi kikubwa. Usambazaji huu una uwezo wa kuweka idadi kubwa ya aina ya usambazaji wa malengo ya hivi karibuni, wakati ambapo bado inabaki kwa hisabati. Our results demonstrate that incorporating this new latent distribution into different models yields substantial improvements in natural language processing tasks such as document modeling and natural language generation for dialogue.', 'sq': 'Përparimet në inferencën variacionale nervore kanë lehtësuar mësimin e modeleve grafikë të fuqishëm të drejtuar me variable të vazhdueshme të fshehta, të tilla si autokoduesit variacionalë. Shpresa është se modelet e tilla do të mësojnë të përfaqësojnë faktorë të pasur, multi modal të fshehtë në të dhënat e botës reale, të tilla si teksti natyror i gjuhës. Megjithatë, modelet e tanishme shpesh marrin paraardhje të thjeshta mbi ndryshuesit e fshehtë - të tillë si shpërndarja gauziane unimodale - që nuk janë në gjendje të përfaqësojnë faktorë kompleks të fshehtë në mënyrë efektive. Për të kapërcyer këtë kufizim, ne propozojmë shpërndarjen e thjeshtë, por shumë fleksible, pjesë-pjesë konstante. Kjo shpërndarje ka kapacitetin për të përfaqësuar një numër eksponencial të modeve të një shpërndarje të fshehtë objektiv, ndërsa mbetet e trajtueshme matematikisht. Rezultatet tona demonstrojnë se përfshirja e kësaj shpërndarjeje të re të fshehtë në modele të ndryshme sjell përmirësime thelbësore në detyrat natyrore të përpunimit të gjuhës, të tilla si modelimi i dokumenteve dhe gjenerimi natyror i gjuhës për dialog.', 'am': 'የነጥብ መለያየት አካባቢ ምርጫዎች በተጨማሪው አካባቢ የግራፊካ ዓይነቶች ማስተማርን አግኝተዋል፡፡ ተስፋው እንደዚህ ዓይነቶች ሀብታሞች፣ ብዙዎች በሀብት፣ የቅርብ አካባቢ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ጽሑፎችን በመስመር ይማራሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ ዓይነቶች በተቃውሞው መለያየት፣ እንደዩናዊ ጋውስሲ አካባቢ፣ በተጨማሪው አካባቢ ውጤቶችን በጥቅም ማሳየት አይችሉም፡፡ ይህንን እርግጠኛ ለማሸንፍ ቀላልዎችን እናስባለን፥ ነገር ግን እጅግ ጠቢብ እናስፈራራለን፡፡ ይህ አካባቢ በmathematically trackable ፍሬዎቻችን ይህ አዲስ መካነታችንን በተለየ ዓይነቶች ውስጥ እንዲያገባብል እና ለባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ትውልድ እንደሚመስል አካባቢ ትክክል ማድረጊያዎችን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'fa': 'پیشرفت در آلودگی متفاوتی عصبی یادگیری از مدل\u200cهای گرافیکی قدرتمند با تغییرات متفاوت\u200cهای متفاوتی همیشه، مانند آلودکننده\u200cهای خودکار متفاوتی را آسان کرده است. امیدوار است که چنین مدل یاد می\u200cگیرد که باعث ثروتمندی، چند مدل لاتن در داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی باشد، مثل متن زبان طبیعی. ولی مدل\u200cهای فعلی اغلب پیشینیان ساده\u200cای را بر تغییرات latent می\u200cگیرند، مانند تغییر یک مدل گاوسی، که قادر به نمایش faktورهای latent پیچیده به طور موثر نیستند. برای تغییر این محدودیت، ما پیشنهاد ساده، ولی بسیار flexible و پایین تقسیم ثابت را می\u200cدهیم. این توزیع توانایی برای نمایش تعداد نمایش عدد نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی یک توزیع هدف latent دارد، در حالی که به ریاضی قابل ردیابی باقی ماند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که شامل این توزیع لاتن جدید در مدل\u200cهای مختلف بهترین\u200cهای زیادی در کار\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی مانند مدل\u200cسازی سند و تولید زبان طبیعی برای محاورش می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Vorderings in neurale variasionale inferensie het die leer van kragtige direkte grafiese modele met voortdurende latente veranderlikes, soos variasionale outokoders. Die hoop is dat sulke modelle sal leer om ryk, multimodale latente faktore te verteenwoordig in reël- wêreld data, soos natuurlike taal teks. Maar, huidige modele aanvaar dikwels eenvoudige voorsoektes op die latente veranderlikes - soos die unimodaal Gaussian verspreiding - wat nie moontlik is om kompleks latente faktore effektief te stel nie. Om hierdie beperking te oorwin, voorstel ons die eenvoudige, maar baie fleksibel, piecewise konstante verspreiding. Hierdie verspreiding het die kapasiteit om 'n eksponensieele nommer van modus van' n latente doel verspreiding te verteenwoordig, terwyl wiskundige tractabel oorbly word. Ons resultate bevestig dat die inkorporering van hierdie nuwe latente verspreiding in verskillende modele betaling in natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte soos dokumentmodellering en natuurlike taal generasie vir dialoog.", 'hy': 'Նյարդային տարբերակային հետեւանքների զարգացումը հնարավորություն է տալիս սովորել հզոր ուղղված գրաֆիկ մոդելներ, որոնք ունեն շարունակական թաքնված փոփոխականներ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ տարբերակային ավտոկոդերը: Հույսն այն է, որ նման մոդելները սովորեն ներկայացնել հարուստ, բազմամոդալ թաքնված գործոններ իրական աշխարհի տվյալներում, ինչպիսիք են բնական լեզվի տեքստը: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս մոդելները հաճախ ենթադրում են թաքնված փոփոխականների պարզ նախաձեռնություններ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ միամոդալ Գաուսիայի տարածումը, որոնք չեն կարողանում արդյունավետ ներկայացնել բարդ թաքնված գործոններ: Այս սահմանափակումները հաղթահարելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ, բայց շատ ճկուն, մասամբ մշտապես տարածման: Այս տարածումը ունի հնարավորություն ներկայացնել թաքնված նպատակային տարածումի էքսպոնենցիալ թվերը, մինչդեռ մաթեմատիկապես գրավելի է մնում: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս նոր թաքնված բաշխման ներառումը տարբեր մոդելների մեջ նշանակալի բարելավումներ է առաջացնում բնական լեզվի վերլուծության խնդիրներում, ինչպիսիք են փաստաթղթերի մոդելը և բնական լեզվի', 'az': 'Nöral dəyişiklik infeksiyonların avansları, müxtəlif avtomenkoderlər kimi, müxtəlif latent dəyişikliklərlə güclü yönəlmiş grafik modellərin öyrənməsini çox asanlaşdırdı. Bu modellərin təbiətli dil mətnlərinin, həqiqət dünya məlumatlarında zengin, çox modal latent faktörlərini göstərməsini öyrənəcəyi ümid edir. Ancaq hökmən modellər çox olaraq, latent dəyişikliklər barəsində, bir modal Gaussian dağıtımı kimi, kompleks latent faktörləri faydalı olaraq göstərməyə qadir deyillər. Bu sınırı üstün etmək üçün basit, ancaq çox fleksibil, parça-parça sabit dağıtımı təklif edirik. Bu dağıtışda matematiksel tractable olaraq, latent hedef dağıtımın müəyyən sayısını göstərməyə qadirdir. Sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, bu yeni latent dağıtımı müxtəlif modellərə daxil etmək təbiətli dil işləmə işləri kimi döküm modelləri və təbiətli dil nəzəriyyəti kimi danışmaq üçün çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'ca': "Els avanços en la inferència variacional neuronal han facilitat l'aprenentatge de models gràfics dirigits poderosos amb variables latents contínues, com els autocodificadors variacionals. L'esperança és que aquests models aprenguin a representar factors latents rics i multimodals en dades del món real, com el text del llenguatge natural. No obstant això, els models actuals sovint assumeixen priors simplistes sobre les variables latents - com la distribució gaussia uni modal - que no són capaços de representar eficientment factors latents complexes. To overcome this restriction, we propose the simple, but highly flexible, piecewise constant distribution.  Aquesta distribució té la capacitat de representar un nombre exponencial de mods d'una distribució blanca d'objectius, mentre permaneix matemàticament tractable. Els nostres resultats demostren que incorporar aquesta nova distribució latent en diferents models produeix millores substancials en tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges com la modelació de documents i la generació natural de llenguatges per al diàleg.", 'bn': 'Advances in neural variational inference have facilitated the learning of powerful directed graphical models with continuous latent variables, such as variational autoencoders.  আশা হচ্ছে এই ধরনের মডেল সমৃদ্ধ, বহুমোডাল সাম্প্রতিক কারণগুলোকে প্রকৃত বিশ্বের তথ্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করতে শিখতে পারবে, য তবে বর্তমান মডেল প্রায়শই সাম্প্রতিক পরিবর্তনের উপর সাধারণ প্রাক্তন প্রাক্তন মনে করে - যেমন ইউনিমোডাল গাউসিয়ান বিতরণ- যারা জটিল সাম্প্রতিক ক কারণগু এই নিষেধাজ্ঞার উপর জয়ী হওয়ার জন্য আমরা সাধারণ প্রস্তাব করি, কিন্তু অত্যন্ত flexible, পাইজেসি স্থায়ী বিতরণ। এই বিতরণে সাম্প্রতিক লক্ষ্য বিতরণের এক্সপোনেন্টেল সংখ্যার সংখ্যা প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার ক্ষমতা আছে, যেখানে গণতান্তিগত ট্র্ আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এই নতুন বিতরণ বিভিন্ন মডেলে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া কাজের মাধ্যমে বিশ', 'bs': 'Napredak u neuralnim varijacijskim infekcijama olakšao je učenje moćnih usmjerenih grafičkih modela sa stalnim latentnim varijacijom, poput varijacijskih autokodera. Nada je da će takvi modeli naučiti da predstavljaju bogate, multimodalne latentne faktore u podacima realnog svijeta, poput prirodnog jezika teksta. Međutim, trenutni modeli često preduzimaju jednostavne prednosti o latentnim varijantima - poput jednomodalnog Gausijskog distribucije - koje nisu u moguće učinkovito predstavljati kompleksne latentne faktore. Da bi preuzeli ovu ograničenje, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali vrlo fleksibilnu, prisutnu konstantnu distribuciju. Ova distribucija ima kapacitet da predstavlja eksponencijalni broj režima latentne metne distribucije, dok ostaje matematički praćen. Naši rezultati pokazuju da uključujući ovu novu latentnu distribuciju u različite modele dovodi do značajnih poboljšanja zadataka prirodnog obradivanja jezika kao što su modeliranje dokumenta i prirodna generacija jezika za dijalog.', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen variaatiopäättelyn kehittyminen on helpottanut voimakkaiden ohjattujen graafisten mallien oppimista jatkuvilla piilevillä muuttujilla, kuten variaatioautomaattikoodereilla. Toivotaan, että tällaiset mallit oppivat edustamaan rikkaita, multimodaalisia latentteja tekijöitä reaalimaailman datassa, kuten luonnonkielisessä tekstissä. Nykyiset mallit kuitenkin usein olettavat yksinkertaisia prioriteetteja piileville muuttujille - kuten monomodaaliselle Gaussin jakaumalle - jotka eivät kykene edustamaan monimutkaisia piileviä tekijöitä tehokkaasti. Tämän rajoituksen voittamiseksi ehdotamme yksinkertaista, mutta erittäin joustavaa, osittaista vakiojakaumaa. Tämä jakauma pystyy esittämään piilevän kohdejakauman eksponentiaalisen määrän moodeja, mutta pysyy matemaattisesti jäljitettävänä. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että tämän uuden piilevän jakauman sisällyttäminen eri malleihin tuo merkittäviä parannuksia luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtäviin, kuten dokumenttien mallintamiseen ja luonnollisen kielen luomiseen dialogia varten.', 'cs': 'Pokroky v neuronové variační inferenci usnadnily učení výkonných směrovaných grafických modelů s kontinuálními latentními proměnnými, jako jsou variační autokodéry. Doufáme, že se tyto modely naučí reprezentovat bohaté multimodální latentní faktory v reálném světě dat, jako je například text přirozeného jazyka. Současné modely však často předpokládají zjednodušující priory latentních proměnných, jako je unimodální Gaussovská distribuce, které nejsou schopny efektivně reprezentovat komplexní latentní faktory. Pro překonání tohoto omezení navrhujeme jednoduché, ale vysoce flexibilní, kusově konstantní distribuci. Toto rozdělení má schopnost reprezentovat exponenciální počet režimů latentního cílového rozdělení, přičemž zůstává matematicky natahovatelné. Naše výsledky ukazují, že začlenění této nové latentní distribuce do různých modelů přináší podstatné zlepšení úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka, jako je modelování dokumentů a generování přirozeného jazyka pro dialog.', 'et': 'Neuraalse variatsioonilise järelduse edusammud on lihtsustanud pidevate latentsete muutujatega võimsate suunatud graafiliste mudelite, näiteks variatsiooniliste automaatkodeerijate õppimist. Loodetakse, et sellised mudelid õpivad esindama rikkalikke mitmeliigilisi latentseid tegureid reaalmaailma andmetes, näiteks looduskeelses tekstis. Kuid praegused mudelid eeldavad sageli lihtsustatud prioriteete latentsetele muutujatele, nagu näiteks monomodaalne Gaussi jaotus, mis ei suuda tõhusalt esindada keerukaid latentseid tegureid. Selle piirangu ületamiseks pakume välja lihtsa, kuid äärmiselt paindliku pideva jaotuse. Sellel jaotusel on võime esindada latentse sihtjaotuse eksponentsiaalset arvu režiime, jäädes samas matemaatiliselt jälgitavaks. Meie tulemused näitavad, et uue latentse jaotuse lisamine erinevatesse mudelitesse toob olulise täiustamise looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetes, nagu dokumentide modelleerimine ja looduskeele genereerimine dialoogiks.', 'jv': 'profiles Esperané iku, sampeyan model kuwi nggambar kelangan seneng sampeyan urip, iso nggambar barang langkung sampeyan, dadi multi modal sing data berkas kuwi dunya wis kelangan, kaya basa langkung sampeyan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness kanggo ngilanggar nggo mbêngguna iki, kita supoyo akeh seneng, ngono akeh luwih apik, supoyo cewisan kuwi kesempatan. Distribution Rejalaké awak dhéwé éntukno ngomong nik nggawe Distribuksi sing gawe nggawe tarjamahan karo model sing gawe bakal terus bantuan ngono nggawe langkung urip bantuan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan karo winih dhéwé, koyo ngono nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kelebuturan langkung banjuré.', 'sk': 'Napredek v nevronskih variacijskih sklepanjih je olajšal učenje močnih usmerjenih grafičnih modelov z neprekinjenimi latentnimi spremenljivkami, kot so variacijski samokodirniki. Upamo, da se bodo takšni modeli naučili predstavljati bogate, multimodalne latentne dejavnike v realnih podatkih, kot je besedilo v naravnem jeziku. Vendar pa sedanji modeli pogosto prevzemajo poenostavljene prednosti latentnih spremenljivk, kot je enomodalna Gausova porazdelitev, ki niso zmožne učinkovito predstaviti kompleksnih latentnih dejavnikov. Za premagovanje te omejitve predlagamo preprosto, a zelo fleksibilno konstantno porazdelitev po delih. Ta porazdelitev lahko predstavlja eksponentno število načinov latentne ciljne porazdelitve, medtem ko ostaja matematično sledljiva. Naši rezultati kažejo, da vključitev te nove latentne porazdelitve v različne modele prinaša bistvene izboljšave pri obdelavi naravnega jezika, kot sta modeliranje dokumentov in ustvarjanje naravnega jezika za dialog.', 'ha': 'Yi amfani da sanar da masu ƙarfin shiryarwa na grafyutan da variablewa masu daidaita kwanan da ke daidai, kamar kwamfyuta farat-kode. Amma tsammãni ne, misãlai za su iya sanar da su wakin matsayin matajiri, masu motsi masu ƙaranci cikin data masu cikin duniya masu gaske, kamar misali matsayin harshen. However, current models often assume simplistic priors on the latent variables - such as the uni-modal Gaussian distribution - which are incapable of representing complex latent factors efficiently.  Dõmin domin ta rinjãya wannan tsari, sai mu buƙata rabo masu sauƙi, kuma amma masu kamid da hankali mai tsawo. @ info: whatsthis MatamayinMu na nuna cewa, ta shigar da wannan rabon yanzu cikin misãlai daban, yana fitar da mafiya girma cikin aikin manajan da ke aiki na fassarar zũciya kamar misalin takardar da kuma zaje wa zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayanin.', 'he': 'Advances in neural variational inference have facilitated the learning of powerful directed graphical models with continuous latent variables, such as variational autoencoders.  התקווה היא שדוגמנים כאלה ילמדו לייצג גורמים עשירים, מולט מודליים מודאלים במידע בעולם האמיתי, כמו טקסט שפה טבעי. בכל אופן, דוגמנים הנוכחים לעתים קרובות לוקחים קודמות פשוטות על המשתנים הלאוטים - כמו ההפצה הגאוסית היחידה - שאינם מסוגלים לייצג גורמים הלאוטים מורכבים בצורה יעילה. כדי להתגבר על ההגבלה הזו, אנו מציעים את ההפצה הפשוטה, אבל גמישה מאוד, חלקית קבועה. לפיתוח הזה יש את היכולת לייצג מספר אקספונציאלי של דרכים של פייתוח מטרה מוסתר, בזמן שנשאר מתמטית מושך. התוצאות שלנו מראות שהשיתוף הפיצוץ החדש המוסתר הזה לדוגמנים שונים מוביל שיפורים משמעותיים במשימות עיבוד שפת טבעיות כמו דוגמנית מסמכים ויוצר שפת טבעית לדיולוג.', 'bo': 'Advances in neural variations inference have facilitated the learning of powerful directed graphical models with continuous latent variables, such as variations autoencoders. རེ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྩལ་ཆེ་བའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་སྟོན་དགོས། ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་མིག ཚད་འཕར་རྩིས་བ་ཞིག་གིས་བཟུང་དགོས་པར། འོན་ཀྱང་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཆེད་དུ་བཏང་བ་ཡིན། དམིགས་འབྲེལ་འདིས་མཐའ་ནས་དུས་ཚོད་གྲངས་རིག་གི་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་ཀ་གི་རྩིས་འབྲས་བ་ཞིག་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་འབྲས་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན་ཕར་ཆེན་འདི་རྣམ་པ་སོ་སོ་སོའི་ནང་དུ་ཕར་རིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན'}
{'en': 'Learning the Structure of Variable-Order CRFs : a finite-state perspective', 'ar': 'تعلم هيكل نماذج التقارير المالية ذات الترتيب المتغير: منظور الحالة المحدودة', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a estrutura de CRFs de ordem variável: uma perspectiva de estado finito', 'fr': "Apprentissage de la structure des CRF d'ordre variable\xa0: une perspective d'états finis", 'es': 'Aprendizaje de la estructura de los CRF de orden variable: una perspectiva de estados finitos', 'ja': '可変オーダーCRFの構造を学ぶ：有限状態の視点', 'zh': '学变序CRF之结构,有限视角', 'hi': 'चर-आदेश CRFs की संरचना सीखना: एक परिमित-राज्य परिप्रेक्ष्य', 'ru': 'Изучение структуры ИРК с переменным порядком: конечная перспектива', 'ga': "Ag Foghlaim Struchtúr CRFanna d'Ord Athraitheach: peirspictíocht chríochnaitheach", 'ka': 'CRF- ის სტრუქტურაცია', 'el': 'Μάθηση της δομής των CRF μεταβλητής τάξης: μια προοπτική πεπερασμένης κατάστασης', 'hu': 'A változó rendű CRF-ek struktúrájának tanulása: véges állapotú perspektíva', 'it': 'Imparare la struttura dei CRF ad ordine variabile: una prospettiva a stato finito', 'lt': 'Mokymasis kintamojo tvarkos KRF struktūra: ribotos būklės perspektyva', 'mk': 'Учење на структурата на CRF од променливи редови: перспектива на крајна состојба', 'kk': 'Айнымалы реттік CRF құрылымын оқыту: a finite- state perspective', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Struktur CRF Order-Berubah: a finite-state perspective', 'ml': 'മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ക്രമീകരണം പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Learning the Structure of Variable-Order CRFs: a finite-state perspective', 'mn': 'Өөр төрлийн дарааллын CRF-ын бүтэц суралцах нь', 'no': 'Læring av strukturen av variabel rekkefølgje- CRF- ar: a finite state perspective', 'pl': 'Nauka się struktury CRF o zmiennym porządku: perspektywa stanu skończonego', 'ro': 'Învățarea structurii CRF-urilor cu ordine variabilă: o perspectivă a stării finite', 'sr': 'Naučenje strukture CRF-ova varijantnog reda: perspektiva za krajnje države', 'si': 'වෙනස්තර- ක්\u200dරමය CRF සංස්කරණය ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Learning Structure of Order-Order CRFs: a finite-state perspective', 'sv': 'Att lära sig strukturen hos variabel ordning CRF: ett finit-state perspektiv', 'ta': 'மாறிய வரிசையின் அமைப்பை கற்றுக் கொண்டு', 'ur': 'Variable-Order CRFs کی ساختار کی تعلیم سکھائی جاتی ہے:', 'uz': 'Learning the Structure of Variable-Order CRFs: a finite-state perspective', 'vi': 'Học về cấu trúc của Quỹ tổ chức CRF: một viễn cảnh giới hạn', 'bg': 'Изучаване на структурата на КРС с променлив ред: перспектива на крайно състояние', 'nl': "Het leren van de structuur van variabele-orde CRF's: een eindige-state perspectief", 'id': 'Mempelajari Struktur CRF-Order-Variable: perspektif keadaan terbatas', 'da': "Læring af strukturen af variabel orden CRF'er: et finite-state perspektiv", 'de': 'Lernen der Struktur von CRFs mit variabler Ordnung: eine Finite-State-Perspektive', 'ko': '유한한 상태의 각도에서 CRF의 구조를 학습하다', 'hr': 'Naučenje strukture CRF-ova varijantnog reda: perspektiva krajnje države', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن ساختار CRF\u200cهای دستور متغیر: یک دیدگاه موقعیت محدود', 'af': '@ info: whatsthis', 'tr': 'Transform handle tip', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Miundombinu ya Serikali ya Mabadiliko: mtazamo mzuri wa nchi', 'sq': 'Mësimi i strukturës së CRF-ve të rendit të ndryshueshëm: një perspektivë e shtetit të kufizuar', 'am': 'CRFs', 'hy': 'Սովորեցնել փոփոխական համակարգչային հիմնադրամների կառուցվածքը. սահմանափակ վիճակի տեսանկյուն', 'az': 'Dəyişikli-Sıradan CRF strukturlarını öyrənmək: müəyyən-müəyyən qutusu perspektivi', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ক্ষেত্রের কাঠামো শিখা: একটি সুন্দর রাষ্ট্রের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি', 'cs': 'Naučení se struktury CRF s proměnným pořadím: perspektiva konečného stavu', 'ca': "Aprendre l'estructura dels CRF d'ordre variable: una perspectiva d'estat limitat", 'bs': 'Naučenje strukture CRF-a za varijabilne redove: perspektiva za određenu državu', 'et': 'Muutuva järjekorraga CRF-ide struktuuri õppimine: piiratud oleku perspektiiv', 'fi': 'Muuttuvan järjestyksen CRF:ien rakenteen oppiminen: rajallisen tilan näkökulma', 'jv': 'a finite-state perspective', 'sk': 'Učenje strukture CRF spremenljivega reda: perspektiva končnega stanja', 'he': 'ללמוד את מבנה CRF של סדר שינוי: פרספקטיבה במצב מוגבל', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Learning the structure of Variable-Order CRFs: a finite-state perspective'}
{'en': 'The computational complexity of linear-chain Conditional Random Fields (CRFs) makes it difficult to deal with very large label sets and long range dependencies. Such situations are not rare and arise when dealing with morphologically rich languages or joint labelling tasks. We extend here recent proposals to consider variable order CRFs. Using an effective finite-state representation of variable-length dependencies, we propose new ways to perform feature selection at large scale and report experimental results where we outperform strong baselines on a tagging task.', 'ar': 'يجعل التعقيد الحسابي لسلسلة الحقول العشوائية الشرطية الخطية (CRFs) من الصعب التعامل مع مجموعات الملصقات الكبيرة جدًا والتبعيات طويلة المدى. مثل هذه المواقف ليست نادرة وتظهر عند التعامل مع اللغات الغنية شكليًا أو مهام وضع العلامات المشتركة. نمد هنا المقترحات الأخيرة للنظر في نماذج CRF ذات الترتيب المتغير. باستخدام تمثيل فعال للحالة المحدودة للتبعيات متغيرة الطول ، نقترح طرقًا جديدة لأداء اختيار الميزة على نطاق واسع والإبلاغ عن النتائج التجريبية حيث نتفوق على خطوط الأساس القوية في مهمة وضع العلامات.', 'fr': "La complexité de calcul des champs aléatoires conditionnels (CRF) à chaîne linéaire rend difficile la gestion de très grands ensembles d'étiquettes et de dépendances à longue portée. De telles situations ne sont pas rares et surviennent lorsqu'il s'agit de langues morphologiquement riches ou de tâches d'étiquetage conjointes. Nous étendons ici les récentes propositions pour prendre en compte les CRF à ordre variable. En utilisant une représentation efficace des états finis des dépendances de longueur variable, nous proposons de nouvelles méthodes pour effectuer une sélection d'entités à grande échelle et rapporter des résultats expérimentaux où nous surpassons les valeurs de base solides pour une tâche de balisage.", 'pt': 'A complexidade computacional dos Campos Aleatórios Condicionais (CRFs) de cadeia linear torna difícil lidar com conjuntos de rótulos muito grandes e dependências de longo alcance. Tais situações não são raras e surgem quando se trata de linguagens morfologicamente ricas ou tarefas conjuntas de rotulagem. Estendemos aqui propostas recentes para considerar CRFs de ordem variável. Usando uma representação de estado finito eficaz de dependências de comprimento variável, propomos novas maneiras de realizar a seleção de recursos em grande escala e relatar resultados experimentais em que superamos linhas de base fortes em uma tarefa de marcação.', 'es': 'La complejidad computacional de los campos aleatorios condicionales (CRF) de cadena lineal dificulta el manejo de conjuntos de etiquetas muy grandes y dependencias de largo alcance. Tales situaciones no son raras y surgen cuando se trata de lenguajes ricos morfológicamente o de tareas de etiquetado conjunto. Ampliamos aquí las propuestas recientes para considerar los CRF de orden variable. Mediante el uso de una representación efectiva de estados finitos de dependencias de longitud variable, proponemos nuevas formas de realizar la selección de características a gran escala e informamos de resultados experimentales en los que superamos las líneas base sólidas en una tarea de etiquetado.', 'ja': '線形鎖条件ランダムフィールド（ ＣＲＦ ）の計算の複雑さは、非常に大きなラベルセット及び長距離依存性に対処することを困難にする。このような状況は稀ではなく、形態的に豊富な言語や共同ラベル付け作業を扱うときに生じる。ここでは、変数順序CRFを検討するための最近の提案を拡張します。可変長依存関係の効果的な有限状態表現を使用して、特徴選択を大規模に実行し、タグ付けタスクで強力なベースラインを上回る実験結果を報告する新しい方法を提案します。', 'zh': '线性随机场 (CRF) 之数复杂性使治大标集长距离赖以难。 此非奇也,言语合事则然。 用可变有效,大行新法,以实验告,优于强基线。', 'ru': 'Вычислительная сложность линейно-цепочечных условных случайных полей (ИРК) затрудняет работу с очень большими наборами меток и зависимостями дальнего действия. Такие ситуации не редки и возникают при работе с морфологически богатыми языками или совместными задачами по маркировке. Здесь мы расширяем недавние предложения по рассмотрению ИРК переменного порядка. Используя эффективное конечное представление зависимостей переменной длины, мы предлагаем новые способы выполнения выбора признаков в большом масштабе и сообщения экспериментальных результатов, где мы превосходим сильные базовые линии по задаче тегирования.', 'hi': 'रैखिक-श्रृंखला सशर्त यादृच्छिक फ़ील्ड (CRFs) की कम्प्यूटेशनल जटिलता बहुत बड़े लेबल सेट और लंबी दूरी की निर्भरताओं से निपटना मुश्किल बनाती है। ऐसी स्थितियां दुर्लभ नहीं हैं और रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं या संयुक्त लेबलिंग कार्यों से निपटने के दौरान उत्पन्न होती हैं। हम चर आदेश CRFs पर विचार करने के लिए यहां हाल के प्रस्तावों का विस्तार करते हैं। चर-लंबाई निर्भरताओं के एक प्रभावी परिमित-राज्य प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करते हुए, हम बड़े पैमाने पर सुविधा चयन करने और प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करने के नए तरीकों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां हम टैगिंग कार्य पर मजबूत बेसलाइन को मात देते हैं।', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar chastacht ríomhaireachta na Réimsí Randamach Coinníollacha (CRFanna) slabhraí líneach tá sé deacair déileáil le tacair lipéid an-mhór agus spleáchais fadraoin. Ní tearc cásanna dá leithéid agus tagann siad chun cinn agus iad ag déileáil le teangacha atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de nó le tascanna comhlipéadaithe. Síneann muid anseo moltaí le déanaí chun CRFanna in ord inathraithe a bhreithniú. Trí úsáid a bhaint as léiriú éifeachtach staid chríochnaithe ar spleáchais ar fhad athraitheach, molaimid bealaí nua chun roghnú gnéithe a dhéanamh ar mhórscála agus tuairisc a thabhairt ar thorthaí turgnamhacha nuair a sháraítear bonnlínte láidre maidir le tasc clibeála.', 'ka': 'ლინერიური წერტილის კომპლექციალური კომპლექციური კომპლექცია (CRFs) მას ძალიან დიდი წერტილის კომპლექცია და ძალიან დიდი განზომილებების დასახულება შეუძლებ ასეთი სიტუაციები არიან წარმოდგენია და იქნება, როდესაც მორპოლოგიურად ბეჭდვილი ენების შესახებ, ან ერთადერთი მარკულების დავალებების შესახებ. ჩვენ ახლა ახალი პროგრამები გადავიტანოთ, რომ შეცვლელი პროგრამების შესახებ. გამოყენებული განცვლების განცვლების განცვლების განცვლების განცვლების ეფექტიური განცვლების გამოყენებას, ჩვენ ახალი გზების გავაკეთებას დიდი მაგალითად და გამოყენებას ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი, სადა', 'el': 'Η υπολογιστική πολυπλοκότητα των υπό όρους τυχαίων πεδίων γραμμικής αλυσίδας καθιστά δύσκολη την αντιμετώπιση πολύ μεγάλων συνόλων ετικετών και εξαρτήσεων μεγάλης εμβέλειας. Τέτοιες καταστάσεις δεν είναι σπάνιες και προκύπτουν όταν ασχολούνται με μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες ή κοινές εργασίες επισήμανσης. Επεκτείνουμε εδώ πρόσφατες προτάσεις για να εξετάσουμε τα CRF μεταβλητής σειράς. Χρησιμοποιώντας μια αποτελεσματική αναπαράσταση πεπερασμένων καταστάσεων εξαρτήσεων μεταβλητού μήκους, προτείνουμε νέους τρόπους για να εκτελέσουμε την επιλογή χαρακτηριστικών σε μεγάλη κλίμακα και να αναφέρουμε πειραματικά αποτελέσματα όπου ξεπερνάμε ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης σε μια εργασία επισήμανσης.', 'hu': 'A lineáris láncú feltételes véletlenszerű mezők (CRF-ek) számítási összetettsége megnehezíti a nagyon nagy címkészletek és a hosszú távú függőségek kezelését. Ezek a helyzetek nem ritkák, és morfológiailag gazdag nyelvekkel vagy közös címkézési feladatokkal foglalkoznak. Itt kiterjesztjük a közelmúltbeli javaslatokat a változó sorrendű CRF-ek figyelembevételére. A változó hosszúságú függőségek hatékony véges állapotú ábrázolásával új módszereket javasolunk a funkciókiválasztás nagyszabású végrehajtására és kísérleti eredmények jelentésére, ahol erős alapvető teljesítményt nyújtunk egy címkézési feladat során.', 'it': "La complessità computazionale dei campi casuali condizionali a catena lineare (CRF) rende difficile gestire insiemi di etichette molto grandi e dipendenze a lungo raggio. Tali situazioni non sono rare e si presentano quando si tratta di lingue morfologicamente ricche o di compiti congiunti di etichettatura. Estendiamo qui proposte recenti per prendere in considerazione CRF ad ordine variabile. Utilizzando un'efficace rappresentazione a stato finito delle dipendenze di lunghezza variabile, proponiamo nuovi modi per eseguire la selezione delle funzionalità su larga scala e riportare i risultati sperimentali in cui superiamo le linee di base forti in un'attività di tagging.", 'kk': 'Сызық тізбектердің есептеу комплексілігі Кездейсоқ өрістер (CRF) дегені өте үлкен жарлық жинақтар мен ұзын аумақтардың тәуелдіктерін өзгерту қиын болады. Бұл жағдайлар морфологиялық бағатты тілдермен немесе жарлық жарлық тапсырмаларымен қатынасыз болмайды. Біз осында жаңа жағдайларды айнымалы CRF ретін қарастыру үшін қолданып келеміз. Айнымалы ұзындық тәуелдіктердің эффективті аяқтау күйін қолданып, үлкен масштабтағы мүмкіндіктерді таңдау үшін жаңа жолдарды жұмыс істеу және тегтерді таңдау тапсырмасының күшті нег', 'lt': 'Dėl linijinės grandinės sąlyginių atsitiktinių laukų (angl. Conditional Random Fields, CRF) skaičiavimo sudėtingumo sunku spręsti labai didelius etiketės rinkinius ir priklausomybę nuo ilgo nuotolio. Tokios situacijos nėra retos ir atsiranda sprendžiant morfologiškai turtingas kalbas ar bendras ženklinimo užduotis. We extend here recent proposals to consider variable order CRFs.  Naudodami veiksmingą kintamojo ilgio priklausomybės galutinę būklę, siūlome naujus būdus atlikti savybių atranką dideliu mastu ir pranešame apie eksperimentinius rezultatus, kai viršijame tvirtas bazines linijas žymėjimo užduotyje.', 'mk': 'Со компликационалната комплексност на линијарниот ланец Кондиционалните случајни пола (CRF) е тешко да се справат со многу големи набори на етикети и зависности од долг домет. Таквите ситуации не се ретки и се појавуваат кога се справуваат со морфолошки богати јазици или заеднички задачи за означување. Овде ги прошируваме неодамнешните предлози за разгледување на CRF со променлив ред. Користејќи ефикасна репрезентација на ограничена состојба на зависностите од променливи должини, предложуваме нови начини за извршување на изборот на карактеристики на голем степен и известување на експерименталните резултати каде што ги надминуваме силните основни линии на', 'ms': 'Kompleksitas pengiraan bagi medan rawak rantai linear rantai (CRF) membuat ia sukar untuk menangani set label yang sangat besar dan dependensi julat panjang. Situasi seperti ini tidak jarang dan muncul ketika berurusan dengan bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik atau tugas label bersama. Kami memperluas cadangan baru-baru ini untuk mempertimbangkan CRF tertib pembolehubah. Menggunakan perwakilan keadaan-batas yang efektif dari dependensi panjang-pembolehubah, kami cadangkan cara baru untuk melakukan pemilihan ciri pada skala besar dan laporkan hasil percubaan di mana kami melampaui garis dasar yang kuat pada tugas penanda.', 'ml': 'The computational complexity of linear-chain Conditional Random Fields (CRFs) makes it difficult to deal with very large label sets and long range dependencies.  ഇത്തരം സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിലപിടിക്കുന്നില്ല, മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ ഭാഷകളുമായി കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d  നമ്മളിവിടെ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തെ പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. മാറിയ നീളം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d വിശിഷ്ടമുള്ള തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d പുതി', 'mt': "Il-kumplessità tal-komputazzjoni tal-Oqsma Kondizzjonali Random (CRFs) b’katina lineari tagħmilha diffiċli li jiġu ttrattati settijiet kbar ħafna ta’ tikketti u dipendenzi fuq medda twila. Sitwazzjonijiet bħal dawn mhumiex rari u jinqalgħu meta jiġu ttrattati lingwi morfoloġikament rikki jew kompiti konġunti ta’ tikkettar. Hawnhekk nistennew proposti reċenti biex nikkunsidraw CRFs b'ordni varjabbli. Bl-użu ta’ rappreżentazzjoni effettiva ta’ stat finit ta’ dipendenzi ta’ tul varjabbli, nipproponu modi ġodda biex isir l-għa żla tal-karatteristiċi fuq skala kbira u nirrappurtaw riżultati sperimentali fejn inqabżu l-linji bażi b’saħħithom fuq kompitu ta’ tikkettar.", 'no': 'Den rekna kompleksiteten av lineær kjede vilkårleg tilfeller (CRF) gjer det vanskeleg å handtera veldig store merkelappane og lang område avhengighet. Desse situasjonane er ikkje sjeldne og oppstår når du arbeider med morfologisk rike språk eller samanlikne oppgåver. Vi utvidar her nyleg førehandsvising for å vurdere variabel rekkefølgje for CRF-ar. Bruk eit effektivt avslutta-tilstand representasjon av variabelgjande avhengighet, foreslår vi nye måtar å utføra utvalet av funksjonar på stor skala og rapportera eksperimentelt resultat der vi utfører sterke baselinjer på eit merking oppgåve.', 'pl': 'Złożoność obliczeniowa liniowych warunkowych pól losowych (CRF) utrudnia radzenie sobie z bardzo dużymi zestawami etykiet i zależnościami o dużym zasięgu. Takie sytuacje nie są rzadkie i występują podczas zajmowania się językami bogatymi morfologicznie lub wspólnymi zadaniami etykietowania. Rozszerzamy tutaj ostatnie propozycje, aby uwzględnić CRF o zmiennym porządku. Wykorzystując efektywną reprezentację stanów skończonych zależności o zmiennej długości, proponujemy nowe sposoby wyboru cech na dużą skalę i raportujemy wyniki eksperymentalne, w których przewyższamy silne linie bazowe w zadaniu tagowania.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлхээ тооцоолж буй санамсаргүй салбаруудын (CRF) компьютерийн төвөгтэй байдал нь маш том хэлбэрээр, урт хэлбэрээр хамааралтай хамаарах хэцүү болгодог. Ийм нөхцөл байдал нь ховор биш, морфологийн баян хэл эсвэл хамтдаа маркетингийн үйл ажиллагаатай холбоотой байдаг. Бид саяхан өөрчлөлтийн дарааллын CRF-г бодохын тулд шинэ санал дэвшүүлж байна. Өвөрмөц урт хамааралтай байдлын үр дүнтэй төгсгөл байдлыг ашиглан бид том хэмжээнд сонголтыг хийх шинэ арга замыг тайлбарлаж, туршилтын үр дүнг тайлбарлаж, тэмдэглэх ажил дээр хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Complexitatea computațională a câmpurilor aleatorii condiționate cu lanț liniar (CRF) face dificilă gestionarea seturilor de etichete foarte mari și a dependențelor de rază lungă. Astfel de situații nu sunt rare și apar atunci când se ocupă de limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic sau de sarcini comune de etichetare. Extindem aici propunerile recente pentru a lua în considerare CRF-urile cu ordine variabilă. Folosind o reprezentare eficientă în stare finită a dependențelor de lungime variabilă, propunem noi modalități de a efectua selecția caracteristicilor la scară largă și de a raporta rezultatele experimentale în cazul în care depășim valorile de bază puternice într-o sarcină de etichetare.', 'sr': 'Kompjuterska kompleksnost linearnog lanca uslovnih slučajnih polja (CRF) čini teškom rješavanje veoma velikih seta etiketa i zavisnosti dugog opsega. Takve situacije nisu rijetke i pojavljuju se kada se bave morfološki bogatim jezicima ili zajedničkim obavezama za etiketiranje. Ovde proširimo nedavne prijedloge da razmotrimo promjene CRF-e. Koristeći efikasnu predstavu zavisnosti od promjene dužine, predlažemo nove načine da izvedemo izbor karakteristika na velikoj skali i prijavimo eksperimentalne rezultate gde izvršavamo jake osnovne linije na zadatku označavanja.', 'so': 'The computational complexity of linear-chain Conditional Random Fields (CRFs) makes it difficult to deal with very large label sets and long range dependencies.  Xaaladahan cayiman ma ahan wax adag islamarkaasna ay kacaan marka lagu maamulo luqadaha hodanka ah ama shaqooyinka la xiriira wadajirka ah. Waxaynu halkan ku soo fidinnaa proposals ugu dhowaad si aan uga fikirinno amar kala bedelan ee CRFs. Sida a an isticmaalno noocyo faa’iido ah oo ku saabsan dhinaca kala duduwan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa waddooyin cusub si aad u samayso doorashooyinka gaarka ah, waxaana wargelinaynaa resultada imtixaanka, meesha aynu ku sameyno aasaasyo xoog badan oo ku saabsan shaqo tagging.', 'sv': 'Den beräkningskomplexiteten hos linjära kedjor Conditional Random Fields (CRF) gör det svårt att hantera mycket stora etikettuppsättningar och beroenden med lång räckvidd. Sådana situationer är inte sällsynta och uppstår när det gäller morfologiskt rika språk eller gemensamma märkningsuppgifter. Vi utökar här de senaste förslagen för att överväga CRF med variabel ordning. Med hjälp av en effektiv finit-state representation av variabel längd beroenden föreslår vi nya sätt att utföra funktionsval i stor skala och rapportera experimentella resultat där vi presterar bättre än starka baslinjer på en taggningsuppgift.', 'ur': 'لینیر-زنجیر کی کمپیوٹریشن پیچیدگی (CRFs) کی کمپیوٹریشن پیچیدگی بہت بڑی لابل سٹ اور طویل سیمہ مسئولیت کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے کا مشکل بناتا ہے. ایسی موقعیت کم نہیں ہوتی اور اس موقع کے باعث موافق زبانوں کے بارے میں ہوتے ہیں یا مشترک لابلینگ کے کاموں کے بارے میں ہوتے ہیں. ہم یہاں اگلے پیشنهادوں کو پھیلاتے ہیں جو بدل آئٹر سی آئٹر کی نظر کریں۔ ویرائیٹ-لانگ اعتباری کے مطابق فینٹ-سٹیٹ کی تصویر کے مطابق، ہم نئی طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ بہت بڑے اسکیل میں فکرت کا انتخاب کریں اور آزمائش نتائج کا گزارش کریں جہاں ہم ایک ٹاگ کرنے کے کام پر قوی بنسٹ لی', 'ta': 'வரிசையில் உள்ள நிலைமையான புலங்கள் (CRFs) கணக்கிட்ட சிக்கல் இத்தகைய நிலைகள் குறைந்தபட்சம் அல்ல மற்றும் எழுந்திருக்கும் போது ஆரோக்கியமான வளர்ந்த மொழிகள் அல்லது இணைய சேர்ந் CRFs மாறிய வரிசையை பரிந்து கொள்வதற்கு நாம் சமீபத்தில் பரிந்துரைகளை விரிவாக்குகிறோம். மாறி நீளம் சார்ந்த சார்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி வெளிப்படையான முடிவு நிலையின் குறிப்பிடுதலை பயன்படுத்தி புதிய தேர்வை பெரிய அளவில் செய்ய மற்றும் சோ', 'si': 'ලේනියර්-චේන්ස් සම්පූර්ණ සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරමය (CRFs) ගේ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක සංශ්\u200dය සම්පූර්ණය සහ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර මේ වගේ ස්ථානයක් අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ ඒ වගේම මොර්ෆෝලෝජික විශේෂ භාෂාවන් සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පු අපි මෙතන අලුත් ප්\u200dරතිපත්තියක් වෙනස් ක්\u200dරමයක් හිතන්න. ප්\u200dරශ්ණත්වයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනස් වීමාව-ලාම විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි ලොකු විශේෂතාවක් තෝරගන්න අලුත', 'uz': "Name Bu holatlar juda qisqa emas va oddiy tillar yoki birlashtirish vazifalari bilan boshqarishda o'sha narsalar sodda emas. Biz bu yerda o'zgaruvchining CRFs tartibi tasavvur qilish uchun eng yaqin talab qilamiz. Vazifani oʻzgaruvchi uzun ishlatuvchidan foydalanish uchun, biz xususiyatlarni katta balandda bajarish uchun yangi usullarni talab qilamiz va biz tashqi vazifani ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tính to án phức tạp của các trường hợp ngẫu nhiên sọc vằn sọc (CRF) làm khó xử với các trường hợp nhãn rất lớn và các trường phụ thuộc lâu dài. Những trường hợp như vậy không hiếm và xảy ra khi đối phó với các ngôn ngữ giàu lịch hoặc các công việc nhãn chung. Chúng tôi đưa ra những đề xuất gần đây để xem xét CRF xếp hạng biến. Sử dụng sự đại diện xác giới hạn của các mối quan hệ lâu dài, chúng tôi đề xuất các cách mới để thực hiện việc chọn các chức năng trên diện rộng và báo cáo kết quả thử nghiệm nơi chúng tôi vượt trội các bản nền vững chắc trong một nhiệm vụ đánh dấu.', 'bg': 'Изчислителната сложност на условните случайни полета с линейна верига затруднява справянето с много големи набори етикети и зависимости от дълъг обхват. Такива ситуации не са редки и възникват при работа с морфологично богати езици или съвместни задачи по етикетиране. Тук разширяваме последните предложения за разглеждане на КРС с променлив ред. Използвайки ефективно представяне на зависимости с променлива дължина, предлагаме нови начини за извършване на избор на функции в голям мащаб и докладваме експериментални резултати, при които превъзхождаме силните базови линии при задача за маркиране.', 'hr': 'Računalna kompleksnost linearnog lanca uslovnih slučajnih polja (CRF) čini teškom rješavanje vrlo velikih kompleksa etiketa i zavisnosti dugog raspona. Takve situacije nisu rijetke i pojavljuju se u odnosu na morfološki bogate jezike ili zajedničke obaveze označavanja. Ovdje proširimo nedavne prijedloge kako bi razmotrili promjennu poruku CRF-a. Koristeći učinkovito predstavljanje zavisnosti od promjene dužine, predlažemo nove načine za izvršavanje izbora funkcija na velikoj razini i prijaviti eksperimentalne rezultate gdje izvršavamo jake osnovne linije na zadatku označavanja.', 'nl': "De computationele complexiteit van lineaire keten Conditional Random Fields (CRF's) maakt het moeilijk om te gaan met zeer grote labelsets en afhankelijkheden over lange afstanden. Dergelijke situaties zijn niet zeldzaam en komen voor bij morfologisch rijke talen of gezamenlijke etiketteringstaken. We breiden hier recente voorstellen uit om rekening te houden met CRF's met variabele volgorde. Met behulp van een effectieve finite-state representatie van afhankelijkheden met variabele lengte stellen we nieuwe manieren voor om feature selectie op grote schaal uit te voeren en rapporteren we experimentele resultaten waarbij we sterke baselines overtreffen op een tagging taak.", 'da': "Den beregningsmæssige kompleksitet af lineær-chain Conditional Random Fields (CRF'er) gør det vanskeligt at håndtere meget store etikesæt og lange afhængigheder. Sådanne situationer er ikke sjældne og opstår i forbindelse med morfologisk rige sprog eller fælles mærkningsopgaver. Vi udvider her de seneste forslag til at overveje CRF'er med variabel ordre. Ved hjælp af en effektiv endelig tilstand repræsentation af afhængigheder af variabel længde foreslår vi nye måder at udføre funktionsudvælgelse i stor skala og rapportere eksperimentelle resultater, hvor vi overgår stærke basislinjer på en tagging opgave.", 'id': 'Kompleksitas komputasi dari rantai linear Conditional Random Fields (CRF) membuat sulit untuk menangani set label yang sangat besar dan dependensi jangkauan panjang. Situasi seperti ini tidak langka dan muncul ketika berurusan dengan bahasa morfologis yang kaya atau tugas label bersama. Kami memperluas di sini tawaran baru-baru ini untuk mempertimbangkan rangka variabel CRF. Menggunakan representation keadaan terbatas yang efektif dari dependensi panjang variabel, kami mengusulkan cara baru untuk melakukan seleksi fitur pada skala besar dan melaporkan hasil percobaan di mana kami melampaui batas dasar yang kuat pada tugas penandaan.', 'de': 'Die Rechenkomplexität linear-kettiger Conditional Random Fields (CRFs) macht es schwierig, mit sehr großen Labelsätzen und langen Entfernungsabhängigkeiten umzugehen. Solche Situationen sind nicht selten und treten bei morphologisch reichen Sprachen oder gemeinsamen Kennzeichnungsaufgaben auf. Wir erweitern hier die jüngsten Vorschläge, um CRFs mit variabler Reihenfolge zu berücksichtigen. Mit Hilfe einer effektiven Finite-State-Darstellung von Abhängigkeiten mit variabler Länge schlagen wir neue Wege vor, die Feature-Auswahl im großen Maßstab durchzuführen, und berichten experimentelle Ergebnisse, bei denen wir starke Baselines bei einer Tagging-Aufgabe übertreffen.', 'ko': '선형 체인 조건 랜덤 필드(CRF)의 계산 복잡성 때문에 매우 큰 라벨 집합과 장거리 의존을 처리하기 어렵다.형태가 풍부한 언어나 연합 표기 임무를 처리할 때 이런 경우는 드물지 않다.가변 CRF를 고려하기 위해 최근 제안을 확장합니다.가변 길이 의존 관계의 유효한 유한 상태에 대한 표시를 통해 우리는 대규모 집행 특징 선택의 새로운 방법을 제시했고 표기 임무에서 강한 기선보다 우수한 실험 결과를 보고했다.', 'fa': 'پیچیدگی محاسبه\u200cای از زمینه\u200cهای تصادفی خط\u200cزنجیر (CRFs) با مجموعه\u200cهای برچسب\u200cهای بزرگ و بستگی\u200cهای مدت طولانی سخت می\u200cکند. این موقعیت\u200cها نادر نیستند و وقتی با زبانهای مورفولوژیکی ثروتمند و مشترک برچسب\u200cهای مشترک در کار می\u200cآیند. ما پیشنهادهای اخیر برای توجه به سفارش تغییرات CRF را در اینجا گسترش می دهیم. استفاده از نمایش وضعیت محدودیت موثر بستگی\u200cهای طول متغیر، راه\u200cهای جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا انتخاب خصوصی در مقیاس بزرگ انجام دهیم و نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشی را گزارش دهیم که ما خطوط پایگاه\u200cهای قوی بر یک وضعیت نشان\u200cدهنده\u200c', 'sw': 'Udhibiti wa kompyuta wa Maeneo ya Ndege ya Mstari (CRFs) unafanya vigumu kukabiliana na seti kubwa na kutegemea kwa ndefu. Hali kama hizi hazina nadra na zinatokea wakati wa kushughulikia lugha zenye utajiri wa kimorphologically or joint tasks of labda. Tunaendelea mapendekezo ya hivi karibuni kutafakari amri mbadala ya CRFs. Kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa nchi yenye ufanisi wa muda mrefu wa kutegemea muda mrefu, tunapendekeza njia mpya ya kufanya uchaguzi wa tabia kwa kiwango kikubwa na kuripoti matokeo ya majaribio ambapo tunafanya misingi yenye nguvu katika kazi ya alama.', 'tr': "Saylawçy gatranç çyzygyň (CRF) hasaplanjak çyzgylykyny örän uly etiket düzümlerini we uzak düzümlerini çözmek kyn edir. Bärde ýagdaýlar morfologik baý diller bilen çykyp ýa-da etiket täblikleri bilen täsirli däldir. Burada değişken sıralar CRF'leri düşünmek için son teklifleri uzatıyoruz. Tägleme günahlarynyň etkinleşen beýik durum şeklinde täze bir şekilde üýtgetmek üçin täze yollary teklif edip, tägleme görevinde güçli temel çizgileri çykarmak üçin tester netijelerini bildirip bilýäris.", 'af': "Die rekenaasjonale kompleksiteit van lineêre ketting Bedinge Lukrake Velde (CRF) maak dit moeilik om te behandel met baie groot etiket stel en lang omvang afhanklikhede. Soos situasies is nie selfde en word opgestaan wanneer met morfologiese ryk tale of joint etiketting opdragte verwerk word. Ons uitbrei hier onlangse voorstellings om veranderlike volgorde CRF te beskou. By gebruik van 'n effektief eindelike-staat voorstelling van veranderlike-lengte afhanklikhede, voorstel ons nuwe maniere om funksiekeuse te uitvoer op groot skaal en rapporteer eksperimentale resultate waar ons sterk basisline uitvoer op 'n merking taak.", 'sq': 'Kompleksia llogaritare e zinxhirit linear Conditional Random Fields (CRF) e bën të vështirë të trajtohet me grupe shumë të mëdha etiketash dhe varësitë e intervalit të gjatë. Such situations are not rare and arise when dealing with morphologically rich languages or joint labelling tasks.  Këtu zgjerojmë propozimet e fundit për të konsideruar rradhë të ndryshme CRF. Duke përdorur një përfaqësim efektiv të shtetit të kufizuar të varësive me gjatësi të ndryshme, ne propozojmë mënyra të reja për të kryer zgjedhjen e karakteristikave në shkallë të madhe dhe për të raportuar rezultatet eksperimentale ku ne kryejmë linja bazë të forta në një detyrë etiketash.', 'am': 'ሰንሰለቲ-ሰንሰለኛ የደረጃ መሬት (CRFs) ትልቅ የሜኑባር መስመር እና ረጅም የርዝመት ተሟጋቾችን ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ እንደነዚህ ባሕላዊ ባለጠጎች ቋንቋዎች ወይም በአንድ ተሳታፊ ስራዎችን በመቀላቀል አይቆሙም፡፡ የቀድሞው የCRFs ትእዛዝ እንዲያስተካክሉ የቅርብ ጥያቄዎችን ወደዚህ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የተለየ የረጅም ግዛት ታዋቂዎችን በመጠቀም አዲስ መንገዶችን በመስጠት እና በጥልቅ ስርዓት ላይ የበረታውን መሠረት እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': 'Sətraflı zəncirlərin hesablama kompleksitəsi Şərfli Random Sahələri (CRF) çox böyük etiket setləri və uzun səviyyədə bağlılıqları ilə çəkmək çətin edir. Bütün məlumatlar morfolojik zəngin dilləri və yaxud birlikdə etiketləmə işləri ilə mübahisə edilərkən nadir deyildir. Biz burada yeni tədbirləri dəyişiklik sıralarını düşünmək üçün uzaqlaşdırırıq. Değişiklik uzunluğu bağımlılıqlarının etkinlik tərzini istifadə edərək, böyük ölçüdə fərqli seçimləri təyin etmək üçün yeni yollar təklif edirik və təcrübə sonuçlarını müşahidə edirik ki, etiketləmə işində qüvvətli səhifələrin çox səhifələr', 'bn': 'লাইনার-চেইনের সংক্রান্ত কমপিস্টিকেল (সিএসএফ) বিশাল লেবেলেট সেট এবং দীর্ঘদিনের নির্ভর করার জন্য কঠিন। এই ধরনের পরিস্থিতি অদ্ভুত এবং উঠে যায় না যখন মরোফোলজিক ভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা বা যৌথ ল্যাবেলিং কাজের সাথে মিলিত হয়। সাম্প্রতিক প্রস্তাব এখানে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে যাতে পারে বিভিন্ন নির্দেশ প্রদান করা যায়। বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘদিনের নির্ভরের একটি কার্যকর ফিনাইট-রাষ্ট্রের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে আমরা বিশাল পর্যায়ে বিশেষ বিশেষ নির্বাচন করার নতুন উপায় প্রস্', 'hy': 'Գծային շղթային պայմանավոր պատահական դաշտերի հաշվարկների բարդությունը դժվարանում է վերաբերվել շատ մեծ պիտակների և երկար տարածքի կախվածությունների հետ: Այս իրավիճակները հազվադեպ չեն և առաջանում են, երբ գործ ունենում են մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուների կամ ընդհանուր պիտակագրման խնդիրների հետ: Մենք այստեղ ընդլայնում ենք վերջին առաջարկները, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք փոփոխական հաջորդականության ՀՀՀ-ները: Օգտագործելով փոփոխական երկարության կախվածությունների արդյունավետ սահմանափակ վիճակի ներկայացումը, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր միջոցներ հատկանիշների ընտրության մեծ մասշտաբով կատարելու և զեկույցնելու փորձարկման արդյունքները, որտեղ մենք արտադրում ենք ավելի ուժեղ', 'bs': 'Računalna kompleksnost linearnog lanca uslovnih slučajnih polja (CRF) čini teškom rješavanje veoma velikih seta etiketa i dugih ovisnosti o rasponu. Takve situacije nisu rijetke i pojavljuju se kada se bave morfološki bogatim jezicima ili zajedničkim obavezama za etiketiranje. Ovdje proširimo nedavne prijedloge da razmotrimo promjenne CRF-e. Koristeći efikasnu predstavu zavisnosti od promjene-dužine, predlažemo nove načine da izvedemo izbor funkcija na velikoj skali i prijavimo eksperimentalne rezultate gdje izvršavamo jake osnovne linije na zadatku označavanja.', 'ca': "La complexitat computacional de cadena linear Conditional Random Fields (CRFs) dificulta la gestió de conjunts de etiquetes molt grans i dependencies de llarg alcance. Aquestes situacions no són rares i apareixen quan es tracta de llengües rics morfològicament o de tasques conjuntes d'etiquetage. We extend here recent proposals to consider variable order CRFs.  Utilitzant una representació efectiva d'estat finit de les dependencies de llargada variable, proposem noves maneres de fer selecció de característiques a gran escala i informar de resultats experimentals on superem línies de base fortes en una tasca d'etiquetage.", 'cs': 'Výpočetní složitost lineárních řetězců podmíněných náhodných polí (CRF) ztěžuje řešení velmi velkých sad štítků a závislostí na dlouhém rozsahu. Takové situace nejsou vzácné a vznikají při řešení morfologicky bohatých jazyků nebo společných úkolů označování. Rozšiřujeme zde nedávné návrhy na zvážení CRF s variabilním pořadím. Pomocí efektivní reprezentace závislostí s proměnnou délkou v konečném stavu navrhujeme nové způsoby, jak provádět výběr funkcí ve velkém měřítku a nahlásit experimentální výsledky, kde překonáváme silné základní linie na tagovacím úkolu.', 'et': 'Lineaarsete ahelatega tingimuslike juhusvälide (CRF) arvutuslik keerukus muudab väga suurte sildikomplektide ja pikaajaliste sõltuvustega tegelemise raskeks. Sellised olukorrad ei ole haruldased ja tekivad morfoloogiliselt rikkalike keeltega tegelemisel või ühiste märgistamisülesannetega. Siinkohal laiendame hiljutisi ettepanekuid arvestada muutuva järjekorraga kapitalinõuete arvutamiseks. Muutuva pikkusega sõltuvuste efektiivset piiritletud oleku esitamist kasutades pakume välja uusi võimalusi funktsioonivaliku teostamiseks ulatuslikus ulatuses ja esitame eksperimentaalseid tulemusi, kus me ületame sildistamisülesande tugevaid lähtejooni.', 'fi': 'Lineaaristen ketjujen ehdollisten satunnaiskenttien (CRF) laskennallinen monimutkaisuus vaikeuttaa hyvin suurten tarrasarjojen ja pitkän kantaman riippuvuuksien käsittelyä. Tällaiset tilanteet eivät ole harvinaisia, ja ne syntyvät morfologisesti rikkaiden kielten tai yhteisten merkintätehtävien yhteydessä. Laajennamme tässä yhteydessä viimeaikaisia ehdotuksia, jotka koskevat vaihtelevan järjestyksen CRF:ien tarkastelua. Käyttämällä tehokasta muuttujapituisten riippuvuuksien finite-state-esitystä ehdotamme uusia tapoja suorittaa ominaisuuksien valinta suuressa mittakaavassa ja raportoimme kokeellisia tuloksia, joissa suoriudumme vahvoista lähtökohdista tunnistetehtävässä.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Wannan halin ba su zama daidai ba kuma su tãshi idan sun yi shagala da harshen morfologically tajiri ko taskõkin sarrafiya. Tuna cire buƙatan da za'a buƙata buƙatan CRFs. Yi amfani da wani mai amfani da mai fassarar-state na ƙididdige masu shige-daidai, sai mu buɗa hanyõyi sãbuwa wa za'a yi amfani da zaɓen shirin feature a tsakanin girma kuma mu gaya matsalan jarrabãwa a inda muna samar masu ƙaranci a kan wani aikin tagging.", 'sk': 'Zaradi računalniške kompleksnosti linearnih verig pogojnih naključnih polj (CRF) je težko obravnavati zelo velike nabore oznak in odvisnosti dolgega razpona. Takšne situacije niso redke in se pojavijo pri obravnavi morfološko bogatih jezikov ali skupnih nalog označevanja. Tu razširjamo nedavne predloge za upoštevanje CRF spremenljivega reda. Z učinkovito končno predstavitvijo odvisnosti spremenljive dolžine predlagamo nove načine izbire funkcij v velikem obsegu in poročamo o poskusnih rezultatih, kjer presegamo močne osnovne črte pri opravilu označevanja.', 'jv': 'Algorithm Tulung sampeyan kuwi ora didasah lan nganggo cah-cah dumadhi Lan ingkang dipun text-editor-action politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'המורכבות החישובית של שדות אקראיים בשרשרת לינרית (CRF) מקשה להתמודד עם קבוצות תוויות גדולות מאוד ותלויות לטווח ארוך. מצבים כאלה אינם נדירים ומגיעים כשמתמודדים עם שפות עשירות מורפולוגית או משימות סימנים משותפים. אנו ממשיכים כאן הצעות לאחרונה לשקול CRF סדר משתנה. בשימוש מייצג מוגבל יעיל של תלויות באורך משתנה, אנו מציעים דרכים חדשות לבצע בחירת תכונות בקנה מידה גדולה ולדווח על תוצאות ניסויים שבו אנו עולים על קווי בסיס חזקים על משימת תג.', 'bo': 'Computational complexity of linear-chain Conditional Random Fields (CRFs) makes it difficult to deal with very large label sets and long range dependencies. Such situations are not rare and arise when dealing with morphologically rich languages or joint labelling tasks. ང་ཚོས་དེ་རིང་གིས་འགྱུར་ཅན་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་སྟོན་པར་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་བྱས། Using an effective finite-state representation of variable-length dependencies, we propose new ways to perform feature selection at large scale and report experimental results where we outperform strong baselines on a tagging task.'}
{'en': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'شبكة الانتباه المتكرر على الذاكرة لتحليل المشاعر الجانبية', 'es': 'Red de atención recurrente en memoria para el análisis de sentimientos de aspecto', 'pt': 'Rede de Atenção Recorrente na Memória para Análise de Sentimento de Aspecto', 'fr': "Réseau d'attention récurrente sur la mémoire pour l'analyse des sentiments", 'zh': '所以情析者,反覆网络', 'ja': 'アスペクトセンチメント分析のためのメモリ上の再発注意ネットワーク', 'ru': 'Периодическая сеть внимания к памяти для анализа настроений аспекта', 'hi': 'पहलू भावना विश्लेषण के लिए स्मृति पर आवर्तक ध्यान नेटवर्क', 'ga': "Líonra Airithe Athfhillteach ar Chuimhne d'Anailís ar Mhíthuiscint Ghné", 'el': 'Δίκτυο επαναλαμβανόμενης προσοχής στη μνήμη για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων πτυχής', 'ka': 'მეხსიერების შესახებ აღმოჩენის ქსელი', 'hu': 'Ism챕tl흷d흷 figyelemmel k챠s챕r흷 h찼l처zat a mem처ri찼r처l az Aspect Sentiment Analysis c챕lj찼b처l', 'it': "Rete di attenzione ricorrente sulla memoria per l'analisi dei sentimenti degli aspetti", 'kk': 'Қайталану сезімді талдау жадындағы қайталау желі', 'lt': 'Pakartotinio dėmesio tinklas, skirtas atminties aspekto analizei', 'mk': 'Рекурентно внимание на мрежата за меморија за анализа на сентиментот', 'ml': 'ആസ്പെക്റ്റ് സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം', 'mn': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Attenzjoni Rikorrenti dwar il-Memorja għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment tal-Aspett', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktig nettverk på minne for følgjande analyser', 'pl': 'Sieć Recurrent Attention Network na temat pamięci dla analizy sentymentów aspektowych', 'ro': 'Rețeaua de atenție recurentă asupra memoriei pentru analiza sentimentelor aspectelor', 'sr': 'Povratna mreža pažnje na pamćenje za analizu sentimenta aspekta', 'si': 'Aspect Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා මතකයේ ආයෙත් අවධානය ජාලය', 'so': 'Shabakadda la xiriira xasuusta la’aanta wakhtiga la socda', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு விளக்கத்திற்கான நினைவகத்தில் தற்போதைய கவனிப்பு வலைப்பின்னல்', 'sv': 'Återkommande uppmärksamhetsnätverk på minne för aspekt känselanalys', 'ur': 'Aspect Sentiment Analysis کے لئے مہمانی پر دوبارہ توجه نیٹ ورک', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Perhatian Ulang-ulang pada Memori untuk Analisis Perasaan Aspek', 'vi': 'Mạng chú ý liên tục về bộ nhớ phân tích giai điệu.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bg': 'Мрежа за многократно внимание на паметта за анализ на сентимента', 'hr': 'Povratna mreža pažnje na pamćenje za analizu sentimenta aspekta', 'nl': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis', 'da': 'Tilbagevendende opmærksomhedsnetværk på hukommelse til aspekt følelsesanalyse', 'id': 'Rangkaian Perhatian Sekali-kali pada Memori untuk Analisi Sentimen Aspekt', 'de': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis', 'fa': 'شبکه توجه دوباره در حافظه برای تحلیل احساس', 'ko': '체감 분석에 사용되는 기억 기반 중복 주의 네트워크', 'tr': 'Aspect Senedi Ta첵첵ar', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Uchunguzi unaoendelea kwenye kumbukumbu ya Uchambuzi wa Wakati wa Tazama', 'af': 'Herhaling Aangaande Netwerk op Geheue vir Aspekte Sentiment Analyseer', 'sq': 'Rrjeti i vëmendjes së përsëritur në kujtesën për analizën e ndjenjave të aspektit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Aspect Sentiment Analizi', 'bn': 'প্রত্যাশিত সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য স্মৃতিতে বর্তমান মনোযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক', 'ca': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis', 'bs': 'Povratna mreža pažnje na pamćenje za analizu sentimenta aspekta', 'et': 'Korduva tähelepanu võrgustik mälu kohta aspektitunnete analüüsi jaoks', 'fi': 'Toistuva huomioverkosto muistista aspektitunteiden analysointia varten', 'cs': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis', 'jv': 'New', 'he': 'רשת תשומת לב חוזרת על זיכרון לניתוח תחושה באפקט', 'sk': 'Mreža ponavljajoče pozornosti na pomnilniku za analizo čustva vidika', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Recurrent Attention Network on Memory for Aspect Sentiment Analysis'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel framework based on neural networks to identify the sentiment of opinion targets in a comment / review. Our framework adopts multiple-attention mechanism to capture sentiment features separated by a long distance, so that it is more robust against irrelevant information. The results of multiple attentions are non-linearly combined with a recurrent neural network, which strengthens the expressive power of our model for handling more complications. The weighted-memory mechanism not only helps us avoid the labor-intensive feature engineering work, but also provides a tailor-made memory for different opinion targets of a sentence. We examine the merit of our model on four datasets : two are from SemEval2014, i.e. reviews of restaurants and laptops ; a twitter dataset, for testing its performance on social media data ; and a Chinese news comment dataset, for testing its language sensitivity. The experimental results show that our model consistently outperforms the state-of-the-art methods on different types of data.', 'ar': 'نقترح إطار عمل جديدًا يعتمد على الشبكات العصبية لتحديد وجهة نظر أهداف الرأي في تعليق / مراجعة. يتبنى إطار العمل الخاص بنا آلية متعددة الانتباه لالتقاط ميزات المشاعر المفصولة بمسافة طويلة ، بحيث تكون أكثر قوة ضد المعلومات غير ذات الصلة. يتم دمج نتائج الانتباه المتعدد بشكل غير خطي مع الشبكة العصبية المتكررة ، مما يعزز القوة التعبيرية لنموذجنا للتعامل مع المزيد من المضاعفات. لا تساعدنا آلية الذاكرة الموزونة على تجنب العمل الهندسي للميزات كثيفة العمالة فحسب ، بل توفر أيضًا ذاكرة مصممة خصيصًا لأهداف الرأي المختلفة للجملة. ندرس ميزة نموذجنا في أربع مجموعات بيانات: اثنتان من SemEval2014 ، أي مراجعات للمطاعم وأجهزة الكمبيوتر المحمولة ؛ مجموعة بيانات تويتر لاختبار أدائها على بيانات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ؛ ومجموعة بيانات لتعليقات الأخبار الصينية ، لاختبار حساسيتها اللغوية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يتفوق باستمرار على أحدث الأساليب في أنواع مختلفة من البيانات.', 'es': 'Proponemos un marco novedoso basado en redes neuronales para identificar el sentimiento de los objetivos de opinión en un comentario/revisión. Nuestro marco adopta un mecanismo de atención múltiple para capturar las características de opinión separadas por una larga distancia, de modo que sea más robusto frente a la información irrelevante. Los resultados de múltiples atenciones se combinan de forma no lineal con una red neuronal recurrente, lo que refuerza el poder expresivo de nuestro modelo para manejar más complicaciones. El mecanismo de memoria ponderada no solo nos ayuda a evitar el laborioso trabajo de ingeniería de características, sino que también proporciona una memoria hecha a medida para diferentes objetivos de opinión de una oración. Examinamos el mérito de nuestro modelo en cuatro conjuntos de datos: dos son de SemEval2014, es decir, reseñas de restaurantes y computadoras portátiles; un conjunto de datos de Twitter, para probar su rendimiento en los datos de las redes sociales; y un conjunto de datos de comentarios de noticias chinas, para probar su sensibilidad lingüística. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo supera sistemáticamente a los métodos más avanzados en diferentes tipos de datos.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau cadre basé sur des réseaux de neurones pour identifier le sentiment des personnes cibles d'opinion dans un commentaire/examen. Notre cadre adopte un mécanisme d'attention multiple pour capturer les caractéristiques de sentiment séparées par une longue distance, de sorte qu'il est plus robuste face aux informations non pertinentes. Les résultats d'attentions multiples sont combinés de façon non linéaire avec un réseau neuronal récurrent, ce qui renforce le pouvoir expressif de notre modèle pour gérer davantage de complications. Le mécanisme de mémoire pondérée nous aide non seulement à éviter le travail d'ingénierie des fonctionnalités fastidieux, mais fournit également une mémoire sur mesure pour les différentes cibles d'opinion d'une phrase. Nous examinons le mérite de notre modèle sur quatre ensembles de données\xa0: deux proviennent de SemEval2014, c'est-à-dire des critiques de restaurants et d'ordinateurs portables\xa0; un jeu de données Twitter, pour tester ses performances sur les données des réseaux sociaux\xa0; et un ensemble de données de commentaires sur les actualités chinoises, pour tester sa sensibilité linguistique. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle surpasse constamment les méthodes de pointe sur différents types de données.", 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova estrutura baseada em redes neurais para identificar o sentimento dos alvos de opinião em um comentário/revisão. Nossa estrutura adota o mecanismo de atenção múltipla para capturar características de sentimento separadas por uma longa distância, para que seja mais robusta contra informações irrelevantes. Os resultados de múltiplas atenções são combinados de forma não linear com uma rede neural recorrente, o que reforça o poder expressivo do nosso modelo para lidar com mais complicações. O mecanismo de memória ponderada não apenas nos ajuda a evitar o trabalho intensivo de engenharia de recursos, mas também fornece uma memória sob medida para diferentes alvos de opinião de uma frase. Examinamos o mérito do nosso modelo em quatro conjuntos de dados: dois são do SemEval2014, ou seja, avaliações de restaurantes e laptops; um conjunto de dados do twitter, para testar seu desempenho em dados de mídia social; e um conjunto de dados de comentários de notícias chinesas, para testar sua sensibilidade ao idioma. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo supera consistentemente os métodos de última geração em diferentes tipos de dados.', 'ja': 'コメント/レビューで意見ターゲットの感情を特定するために、ニューラルネットワークに基づいた新しいフレームワークを提案します。 当社のフレームワークは、長い距離で区切られたセンチメント機能を取り込むために複数の注意メカニズムを採用しており、無関係な情報に対してより堅牢になります。 複数の注意の結果は、再帰的なニューラルネットワークと非線形に組み合わされ、より多くの合併症を処理するための私たちのモデルの表現力を強化します。 加重メモリメカニズムは、労働集約的な機能エンジニアリング作業を回避するだけでなく、文章のさまざまな意見ターゲットに合わせたメモリを提供します。 私たちは、4つのデータセットで私たちのモデルのメリットを検討します。2つは、レストランとノートパソコンのレビューであるSemEval 2014からのものです。ソーシャルメディアデータでのパフォーマンスをテストするためのtwitterデータセット。そしてその言語感度をテストするための中国のニュースコメントデータセットです。 実験結果は、当社のモデルがさまざまなタイプのデータで一貫して最先端の方法を上回っていることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новый фреймворк, основанный на нейронных сетях, для выявления настроений мишеней мнений в комментарии/обзоре. Наша структура использует механизм множественного внимания, чтобы фиксировать особенности настроений, разделенные большим расстоянием, так что он более устойчив к нерелевантной информации. Результаты множественного внимания нелинейно сочетаются с рекуррентной нейронной сетью, что усиливает экспрессивную силу нашей модели для решения большего количества осложнений. Механизм взвешенной памяти не только помогает нам избежать трудоемкой работы по конструированию признаков, но и обеспечивает индивидуальную память для различных целей мнения о предложении. Мы изучаем достоинства нашей модели на четырех наборах данных: два из SemEval2014, то есть обзоры ресторанов и ноутбуков; набор данных Twitter, для тестирования его производительности на данных социальных сетей; и набор данных комментариев китайских новостей, для тестирования его языковой чувствительности. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель последовательно превосходит современные методы по различным типам данных.', 'zh': '建一神经网络之新框架,以识/论之情。 吾框架以重机获远情,使不相关者益壮。 多注与递归神经网络非线性合,增我以表现力。 加权记机非止助我免劳动密集型,又可为句之不同量身记也。 四数集上论模形之美:二自SemEval2014,餐厅笔记本电脑之论也。 一推特数集,以试社交媒体数。 及一中文新闻论数据集,以试其语敏感性。 实验结果表明,吾之数终优于先进之道也。', 'hi': 'हम एक टिप्पणी / समीक्षा में राय लक्ष्यों की भावना की पहचान करने के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पर आधारित एक उपन्यास ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा ढांचा लंबी दूरी से अलग की गई भावना सुविधाओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए बहु-ध्यान तंत्र को अपनाता है, ताकि यह अप्रासंगिक जानकारी के खिलाफ अधिक मजबूत हो। कई ध्यानों के परिणाम गैर-रैखिक रूप से एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ संयुक्त होते हैं, जो अधिक जटिलताओं से निपटने के लिए हमारे मॉडल की अभिव्यंजक शक्ति को मजबूत करता है। भारित-स्मृति तंत्र न केवल हमें श्रम-गहन सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग कार्य से बचने में मदद करता है, बल्कि एक वाक्य के विभिन्न राय लक्ष्यों के लिए एक दर्जी-निर्मित स्मृति भी प्रदान करता है। हम चार डेटासेट पर हमारे मॉडल की योग्यता की जांच करते हैं: दो SemEval2014 से हैं, यानी रेस्तरां और लैपटॉप की समीक्षा; एक चहचहाना डेटासेट, सामाजिक मीडिया डेटा पर अपने प्रदर्शन का परीक्षण करने के लिए; और एक चीनी समाचार टिप्पणी डेटासेट, अपनी भाषा संवेदनशीलता का परीक्षण करने के लिए। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल लगातार विभिन्न प्रकार के डेटा पर अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid creat nua bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha chun meon na spriocanna tuairime a shainaithint i dtrácht/athbhreithniú. Glacann ár gcreat meicníocht ilairdí chun gnéithe meon a ghabháil atá scartha ó achar fada, ionas go mbeidh sé níos láidre i gcoinne faisnéise nach mbaineann le hábhar. Déantar torthaí airdí iolracha a chomhcheangal go neamhlíneach le líonra néarach athfhillteach, rud a neartaíonn cumhacht léiritheach ár múnla chun níos mó aimhréití a láimhseáil. Ní hamháin go gcabhraíonn an mheicníocht ualaithe cuimhne linn an obair innealtóireachta gné-dian ar shaothar a sheachaint, ach cuireann sé cuimhne shaincheaptha ar fáil freisin do spriocanna tuairime éagsúla na habairte. Scrúdaímid fiúntas ár múnla ar cheithre thacar sonraí: tagann dhá cheann ó SemEval2014, i.e. athbhreithnithe ar bhialanna agus ríomhairí glúine; tacar sonraí twitter, chun a fheidhmíocht ar shonraí meán sóisialta a thástáil; agus tacar sonraí tráchtaireachta nuachta Síneach, chun a íogaireacht teanga a thástáil. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár múnla go seasta na modhanna úrscothacha ar chineálacha éagsúla sonraí.', 'hu': 'Egy neurális hálózatokon alapuló új keretrendszert javasolunk a véleménycélok hangulatának megjegyzésben/áttekintésben történő azonosítására. Keretrendszerünk többszörös figyelemfelkeltő mechanizmust alkalmaz a hosszú távolsággal elválasztott érzelmi jellemzők rögzítésére, így hatékonyabb az irreleváns információkkal szemben. A többszörös figyelem eredményeit nem lineárisan kombináljuk egy visszatérő neurális hálózattal, ami erősíti modellünk kifejező erejét a komplikációk kezelésére. A súlyozott memória mechanizmus nemcsak segít elkerülni a munkaigényes funkciómérnöki munkát, hanem testre szabott memóriát is biztosít egy mondat különböző véleménycéljaihoz. Modellünk érdemét négy adatkészleten vizsgáljuk: kettő a SemEval2014-ből származik, azaz éttermek és laptopok értékelései; Twitter adatkészlet a közösségi média adatainak teljesítményének tesztelésére; és egy kínai hírek komment adatkészlet, hogy teszteljék nyelvi érzékenységét. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk következetesen felülmúlja a korszerű módszereket különböző adattípusokon.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο βασισμένο σε νευρωνικά δίκτυα για τον προσδιορισμό του συναισθήματος των στόχων γνώμης σε ένα σχόλιο/ανασκόπηση. Το πλαίσιο μας υιοθετεί μηχανισμό πολλαπλής προσοχής για να συλλάβει χαρακτηριστικά συναισθημάτων που διαχωρίζονται από μεγάλη απόσταση, έτσι ώστε να είναι πιο ανθεκτικό ενάντια σε άσχετες πληροφορίες. Τα αποτελέσματα της πολλαπλής προσοχής συνδυάζονται μη γραμμικά με ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρικό δίκτυο, το οποίο ενισχύει την εκφραστική δύναμη του μοντέλου μας για τον χειρισμό περισσότερων επιπλοκών. Ο μηχανισμός σταθμισμένης μνήμης όχι μόνο μας βοηθά να αποφύγουμε την εντατική εργασία μηχανικής χαρακτηριστικών, αλλά παρέχει επίσης μια προσαρμοσμένη μνήμη για διαφορετικούς στόχους γνώμης μιας πρότασης. Εξετάζουμε την αξία του μοντέλου μας σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων: δύο είναι από το δηλαδή κριτικές εστιατορίων και φορητών υπολογιστών. σύνολο δεδομένων Twitter, για τη δοκιμή της απόδοσής του σε δεδομένα κοινωνικών μέσων· και ένα σύνολο δεδομένων σχολίων κινεζικών ειδήσεων, για τον έλεγχο της γλωσσικής ευαισθησίας του. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά συνεχώς τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους σε διαφορετικούς τύπους δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტის პრომენტის კომპორმაცია, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელების ბაზედან იდენტიფიკაცია მისანიშნობის მიზეზების სენტიმენტი, რომელიც კომენტ ჩვენი პარამეტრები უფრო მექსინემის დააყენება, რომ სენტიმენტის ფუნქციები გაყოფილი ძალიან განსხვავებული, რადგან ეს უფრო ძალიან ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციის მრავალ აღმოჩენების შედეგები არიან linearly დაკავშირებული ნეიროლური ქსელით, რომელიც უფრო კომპლექციების გამოსახულებლად ჩვენი მოდელის გამოსახულებელი ძალიან დაახლობა მარტივი მეხსიერების მექანსი არა მხოლოდ ჩვენ დახმარებს მუშაობის ინტენექციური სამუშაო სამუშაო ინტენექციური სამუშაო, მაგრამ მხოლოდ განსხვავებული მიზეზის მი ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის მნიშვნელობას ოთხი დიატატისკეტებში შევხედავთ: ორი არის SemEval2014-დან, მაგალითად რესტორანტების და ლეპტოპის შესახებ; საზოგადომი მედია მონაცემების შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის, და ჩინეთის ახალი კომენტრების მონაცემების საქაღალდე, სახელის სიგრძნელობის ტესტისთვის. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენი მოდელი მხოლოდ გავაკეთებს განსხვავებული ტიპის მონაცემების განსხვავებულ განსხვავებული მონაცემებზე.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo framework basato su reti neurali per identificare il sentiment of opinion target in un commento/recensione. Il nostro framework adotta un meccanismo di attenzione multipla per catturare le caratteristiche del sentiment separate da una lunga distanza, in modo che sia più robusto contro informazioni irrilevanti. I risultati di molteplici attenzioni sono combinati non linearmente con una rete neurale ricorrente, che rafforza la potenza espressiva del nostro modello per gestire più complicazioni. Il meccanismo della memoria ponderata non solo ci aiuta a evitare il lavoro intensivo di feature engineering, ma fornisce anche una memoria su misura per diversi obiettivi di opinione di una frase. Esaminiamo il merito del nostro modello su quattro set di dati: due sono da SemEval2014, cioè recensioni di ristoranti e laptop; un dataset twitter, per testarne le prestazioni sui dati dei social media; e un set di dati sui commenti delle notizie cinesi, per testare la sua sensibilità linguistica. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello supera costantemente i metodi all'avanguardia su diversi tipi di dati.", 'kk': 'Біз невралдық желілерде негізделген романдық фреймді түсініктеме/қарастыру мақсаттарының сезімін анықтау үшін таңдаймыз. Біздің бағдарламамыз көптеген қатынастық механизмін ұзақ аралығымен бөліктелген сезім мүмкіндіктерін қабылдау үшін, сондықтан бұл маңызды мәліметтерге қарсы көптеген. Бірнеше қатынау нәтижесі, қайталанатын невралдық желімен біріктірілмейді, бұл біздің үлгіміздің көпшілікті күшін көмектеседі. Жұмыстың тең жады механизмі тек жұмыстың тең инженерлік жұмысын басқаруға көмектеседі, сондай-ақ мәліметтің әртүрлі мақсаттары үшін өзгертілген жады береді. Біз үлгіміздің төрт деректер қорларында қажеттігін тексереміз: екі - SemEval2014, т.е. ресторанттар мен ноутбуктардың қарауы; бұл жерде социалдық медиа деректерінің әрекетін тексеру үшін twitter деректер жинағы; тілінің сезімділігін тексеру үшін қытайша жаңалық түсініктер деректер жинағы. Тәжірибелік нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің әртүрлі деректердің күйінің әртүрлі әдістерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują sistemą, grindžiamą nervų tinklais, kad komentare ir (arba) peržiūroje būtų galima nustatyti nuomonės tikslų jausmą. Mūsų sistema nustato daugiapusiį dėmesį skiriantį mechanizmą, skirtą užfiksuoti jausmų savybes, atskirtas nuo ilgo atstumo, kad ji būtų tvirtesnė prieš nereikšmingą informaciją. Daugelio dėmesio rezultatai nelinijiniu būdu derinami su pasikartojančiu nervų tinklu, kuris stiprina mūsų modelio ekspresinę galią spręsti daugiau komplikacijų. Svarstytos atminties mechanizmas ne tik padeda mums išvengti darbo jėgai imlių charakteristikų inžinerijos darbų, bet ir suteikia pritaikytą atminties įvairiems sakinio nuomonės tikslams. Mes i šnagrinėjame savo modelio naudą keturiuose duomenų rinkiniuose: du iš SemEval2014, t. y. restoranų ir kompiuterių peržiūros; Twitter duomenų rinkinys, skirtas patikrinti socialinės žiniasklaidos duomenų rezultatus; ir Kinijos naujienų komentarų duomenų rinkinys, skirtas išbandyti jos jautrumą kalboms. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis nuosekliai viršija pažangiausius metodus įvairių rūšių duomenimis.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരുപാട് ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ പിടികൂടുന്ന വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതിന് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് വേ The results of multiple attentions are non-linearly combined with a recurrent neural network, which strengthens the expressive power of our model for handling more complications.  ഭൂമിയുള്ള മെമ്മറിയുടെ മെന്\u200dജിനിസം നമ്മള്\u200dക്ക് ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് മാത്രമല്ല, വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേറെയൊരു  നാല് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ മീറ്റ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു; രണ്ട് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d2014 ല്\u200d നിന്നാണ്, അതായത് റെസ്റ്റോ അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഒരു ട്രൂട്ടര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ ഒരു ചൈനീസ് വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റും അതിന്റെ ഭാഷ ശ്രദ്ധ പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാര്\u200dട്ട് രീതികളി', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu qafas ġdid ibbażat fuq netwerks newrali biex nidentifikaw is-sensazzjoni tal-miri tal-opinjoni f’kumment/reviżjoni. Il-qafas tagħna jadotta mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni multipla biex jinqabdu karatteristiċi ta’ sensazzjoni separati minn distanza twila, sabiex ikun aktar robust kontra informazzjoni irrelevanti. Ir-riżultati ta’ attenzjoni multipla huma kkombinati b’mod mhux lineari ma’ netwerk newrali rikorrenti, li jsaħħa ħ il-qawwa espressiva tal-mudell tagħna għall-immaniġġjar ta’ aktar kumplikazzjonijiet. The weighted-memory mechanism not only helps us avoid the labor-intensive feature engineering work, but also provides a tailor-made memory for different opinion targets of a sentence.  Aħna jeżaminaw il-mertu tal-mudell tagħna fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta: tnejn huma minn SemEval2014, jiġifieri reviżjonijiet ta’ ristoranti u laptops; sett ta’ dejta twitter, għall-ittestjar tal-prestazzjoni tiegħu fuq dejta tal-midja soċjali; u sett ta’ dejta tal-kummenti tal-a ħbarijiet Ċiniżi, għall-ittestjar tas-sensittività lingwistika tiegħu. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati fuq tipi differenti ta’ dejta.', 'ms': 'Kami melamar kerangka baru berdasarkan rangkaian saraf untuk mengenalpasti perasaan sasaran pendapat dalam ulasan/ulasan. Our framework adopts multiple-attention mechanism to capture sentiment features separated by a long distance, so that it is more robust against irrelevant information.  Hasil perhatian berbilang digabung secara tidak linear dengan rangkaian saraf berulang, yang menguatkan kuasa ekspresif model kita untuk mengendalikan lebih rumit. Mekanisme memori berat tidak hanya membantu kita menghindari kerja teknik ciri-ciri kerja yang intensiv, tetapi juga menyediakan memori yang dibuat sesuai untuk sasaran pendapat yang berbeza dari kalimat. Kami memeriksa nilai model kami pada empat set data: dua dari SemEval2014, iaitu ulasan restoran dan laptop; set data twitter, untuk menguji prestasinya pada data media sosial; and a Chinese news comment dataset, for testing its language sensitivity.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita secara konsisten melebihi kaedah state-of-the-art pada jenis data yang berbeza.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан шинэ хэлбэрүүдийг тайлбарлах/шинэчлэлт хийх зорилготой санааны мэдрэмжийг тодорхойлж чадна. Бидний хэлбэрээр маш олон анхаарлын механизмыг урт зайд ялгаатай мэдрэмжүүдийг барьж авах боломжтой болгодог. Тиймээс энэ нь хамаагүй мэдээллийн эсрэг илүү хүчтэй. Ихэнх ухааны үр дүнг нь шулуун байдлаар дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээтэй холбогдож байна. Энэ нь бидний загварын илэрхийлэл хүчийг илэрхийлдэг. Цагийн жингийн санах механизм нь зөвхөн ажлын хүчирхийллийн инженерийн ажлыг зогсооход тусалдаг биш, гэхдээ мөн өгүүлбэрийн өөр өөр санааны зорилготой санах санамж өгдөг. Бид 4 өгөгдлийн сангийн загварын үнэ цэнийг шалгаж байна: 2 нь SemEval2014, т.е. ресторанууд, ноутонуудын шинжилгээ. нийгмийн медиа өгөгдлийн ажиллагааг шалгахын тулд Twitter өгөгдлийн суурь юм. Хятад хэл мэдрэмжтэй байдлыг шалгахын тулд мэдээлэл өгөгдлийн санаа. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь өөр төрлийн мэдээллийн байр суурь аргыг үргэлжлүүлдэг.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова рамка базирана на нервните мрежи за идентификување на чувството на целите на мислењето во коментар/преглед. Нашата рамка усвојува механизам со повеќе внимание за зафатување на чувствителните карактеристики одделени од долга оддалеченост, за да биде појак против нерелевантните информации. Резултатите од повеќето внимание се нелинијално комбинирани со рецидентна нервна мрежа, која ја зајакнува експресивната моќ на нашиот модел за справување со повеќе компликации. Механизмот на тежена меморија не само што ни помага да избегнеме инженерска работа со интензивна работа, туку и да обезбеди создадена меморија за различни цели на мислењето на реченицата. Го испитуваме заслугата на нашиот модел на четири податоци: двајца се од SemEval2014, т.е. рецензии на ресторани и лаптопи; компјутер на податоци на Твитер, за тестирање на својата резултат на податоците на социјалните медиуми; и компјутер на податоци за коментари на кинеските вести, за тестирање на нејзината јазичка чувствителност. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел постојано ги надминува најдобрите методи на различни видови на податоци.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe ramy oparte na sieciach neuronowych, aby zidentyfikować sentyment celów opinii w komentarzu/przeglądzie. Nasze ramy przyjmują mechanizm wielokrotnej uwagi, aby uchwycić cechy sentymentów oddzielone dużą odległością, dzięki czemu jest bardziej odporny na nieistotne informacje. Wyniki wielokrotnych uwag są nieliniowo łączone z powtarzającą się siecią neuronową, co wzmacnia moc ekspresyjną naszego modelu do radzenia sobie z kolejnymi komplikacjami. Mechanizm pamięci ważonej nie tylko pomaga nam uniknąć pracochłonnych prac inżynieryjnych funkcji, ale także zapewnia dostosowaną do potrzeb pamięć dla różnych celów opinii zdania. Zasługę naszego modelu badamy na czterech zbiorach danych: dwa pochodzą z SemEval2014, czyli recenzje restauracji i laptopów; zbiór danych Twittera, do sprawdzania jego wydajności na danych mediów społecznościowych; i chiński zestaw danych komentarzy wiadomości, do testowania jego wrażliwości językowej. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model konsekwentnie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody na różnych typach danych.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt rammeverk basert på neiralnettverk for å identifisera følelsen til opphevingsmål i eit kommentar/gjennomsikt. Rammeboksen vårt adopterer fleire oppmerksomhetsmekanismenyen for å henta følelsesfunksjonar skilde av lange avstanden, slik at det er mer sterkt mot ulike informasjon. Resultatet av fleire oppmerkingar er ikkje lineær kombinasjon med eit rekurserande neuralnettverk, som styrker uttrykkende kraft på modellen vår for å handtera meir komplikasjonar. Mekanismenyen for vekt-minne hjelper ikkje berre oss å unngå arbeid-intensivt funksjonsmotorarbeid, men også tilbyr ein minne som er tilgjengeleg for ulike meningsmål på eit setning. Vi undersøker høve til modellen vårt på fire datasett: to er frå semiEval2014, dvs. gjennomgang av restaurantar og laptopar; ein twitter-dataset, for å testa utviklinga på sosiale media-data; og ein kinesisk kommentar-dataset for å testa språkkfølsomhet. Eksperimentale resultatene viser at modellen vårt konsistent utfører kunstmetodane på ulike typar data.', 'ro': 'Propunem un cadru nou bazat pe rețele neurale pentru identificarea sentimentului țintelor de opinie într-un comentariu/review. Cadrul nostru adoptă mecanismul de atenție multiplă pentru a capta caracteristicile sentimentelor separate de o distanță lungă, astfel încât să fie mai robust împotriva informațiilor irelevante. Rezultatele atențiilor multiple sunt combinate non-liniar cu o rețea neurală recurentă, care consolidează puterea expresivă a modelului nostru pentru a gestiona mai multe complicații. Mecanismul de memorie ponderată nu numai că ne ajută să evităm munca intensivă de inginerie a caracteristicilor, ci oferă, de asemenea, o memorie personalizată pentru diferite ținte de opinie ale unei propoziții. Examinăm meritele modelului nostru pe patru seturi de date: două sunt din SemEval2014, adică recenzii ale restaurantelor și laptopurilor; un set de date Twitter, pentru testarea performanțelor sale pe datele rețelelor sociale; şi un set de date de comentarii chinezeşti, pentru testarea sensibilităţii limbii. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru depășește în mod constant metodele de ultimă generație pe diferite tipuri de date.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku saleysan shabakado neurada ah si aan u caddeyno fikrada aragtida oo ku qoran comment/baaritaan. Our framework adopts multiple-attention mechanism to capture sentiment features separated by a long distance, so that it is more robust against irrelevant information.  Midhaha dareemaha badan waxaa lagu daryeelaa shabakadda neurada ee soo socda, kaas oo xoogaysa xoogga muuqashada modellkayaga si ay u qabtaan dhibaatooyin badan. meymisyada xusuusta la miisaamay inama caawinayo oo kaliya in aan ka leexanno shaqada waxqabadka fircoon ee shaqada, laakiin sidoo kale wuxuu xusuus u sameeyaa waxqabadka aragtida kala duduwan ee hadalka. Waxaannu baaraynaa noocyada noocyada oo ku qoran afarta databaseed: laba waxay ka yimaadaan SemEval2014, taas oo ah baaritaanka maktabadaha iyo maktabadaha; Taariikhda Twitterka, si loo imtixaamo sameynta macluumaadka bulshada; iyo taariikhda commentarka ee Shiinaha, si loo imtixaamo fahanka afkiisa. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu si joogto ah uga muujiyaa qaababka dowladda farshaxanka oo kala duduwan macluumaadyo kala duduwan.', 'si': 'අපි න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලයේ අධාරිත සංවේදනයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචා අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂ අවධාන පද්ධතිය අල්ලගන්න විශේෂ විශේෂ අවධානයක් අල්ලගන්න, ඉතින් ඒක විශේෂ තොරතු ගොඩක් බලාපොරොත්තුවක් ගැන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නොලින් සංවිධානයක් සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ, ඒකෙන් අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරතිච විශාල මතක සැකසුම් අපිට උදව් කරන්නේ නැහැ වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉන්ජිනයින් වැඩ කරන්න, නමුත් වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුව අපි අපේ මොඩල් හතරයි දත්ත සේට් හතරයි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා: දෙන්නෙක් සෙම්වෙල් 2014 වලින්, ඉතින්, රෙස්ටෝරෑන්ට් සහ ලැප්ට සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම තොරතුරු පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ට්විටර් දත්ත සෙට්; ඒ වගේම චීනි වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු සෙට්, ඒකේ භාෂාව සංවේදනය පරීක්ෂා කරන්න. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් වෙනස් වර්ගයක් තොරතුරු වලට ප්\u200d', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett nytt ramverk baserat på neurala nätverk för att identifiera sentiment of opinion måltavlor i en kommentar/recension. Vårt ramverk antar multipel-uppmärksamhet mekanism för att fånga känslofunktioner åtskilda av en lång distans, så att det är mer robust mot irrelevant information. Resultatet av flera uppmärksamheter kombineras icke-linjärt med ett återkommande neuralt nätverk, vilket stärker vår modells uttryckskraft för att hantera fler komplikationer. Den viktade minnesmekanismen hjälper oss inte bara att undvika det arbetsintensiva funktionstekniska arbetet, utan ger också ett skräddarsytt minne för olika meningsmål. Vi undersöker fördelarna med vår modell på fyra dataset: två är från SemEval2014, dvs recensioner av restauranger och bärbara datorer; ett twitter-dataset för att testa dess prestanda på sociala medier. och ett dataset för kinesiska nyhetskommentarer, för att testa dess språkkänslighet. De experimentella resultaten visar att vår modell konsekvent överträffar de senaste metoderna på olika typer av data.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir na osnovu neuronskih mreža da identifikujemo osjećaj ciljeva mišljenja u komentaru/pregledu. Naš okvir usvojava mehanizam višestruke pažnje da uhvati karakteristike sentiment a odvojene od daleke udaljenosti, tako da je jača protiv nevažnih informacija. Rezultati višestruke pažnje nisu linearno kombinirani sa rekonstruiranom neuralnom mrežom, koja jača ekspresivnu moć našeg modela za rješavanje više komplikacija. Mehanizam težine pamćenja ne samo nam pomaže da izbegnemo radni inženjerski rad sa intenzivnim funkcijama, nego takođe pruža uspomenu napravljenu krojačicom za različite ciljeve mišljenja rečenice. Ispitujemo zaslugu našeg modela na četiri dataseta: dve su iz SemEval2014, tj. preglede restorana i laptopa; seta podataka o twitter, za testiranje svojih učinka na podacima društvenih medija; i set podataka za kineske vesti, za testiranje osjetljivosti jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model stalno nadmašuje metode stanja umjetnosti na različite vrste podataka.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل نیٹورک پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے ایک نئی فرمود پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ نظر کے موقع کا احساس معلوم کریں ہمارا فرمود بہت سی توجه کی مکانیسم قبول کرتا ہے کہ ایک دور دور سے جدا ہوتا ہے کہ یہ بے اثر معلومات کے خلاف زیادہ طاقتور ہے. بہت سی توجه کے نتائج غیر linearly ایک دوبارہ نئورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ ملے جاتے ہیں، جو ہمارے مدل کی مثبت قدرت کو زیادہ پیچیدگی کے ساتھ مضبوط کرتا ہے. وزن یادگاری مکانیسم ہمیں صرف مزاحمت نہیں کرتا کہ ہم کاری مزاحمت انجینژی کے کام سے روکتے ہیں، بلکہ ایک فیصلہ کے مختلف موضوعوں کے لئے ایک ٹیلر مکانیسم کا ذکر بھی پیدا کرتا ہے. ہم نے چار ڈیٹسٹ پر ہمارے مدل کا فائدہ تحقیق کرلیا ہے: دو سیم Eval2014 سے ہیں، یعنی رستوران اور لاپٹوپ کی روشنی ہیں، ایک ٹویٹر ڈیٹ سٹ، سوسیل میڈیا ڈیٹا پر اس کی فعالیت امتحان کرنے کے لئے، اور ایک چینی نیویس کمانٹ ڈیٹ سٹ، اس کی زبان حساسیت کی آزمائش کے لئے۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا نمڈل بہرحال مختلف طریقوں کے ذریعہ مختلف طریقوں پر استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'நாம் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையில் ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் குறிப்பு/முறிப்பில் குறிப்பு நீண்ட தூரத்தால் பிரிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு குணங்களை பிடிப்பதற்கான பல கவனம் முறைமையை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறது, அதனால் அது சரியான தகவல்களுக்கு  பலவிதமான கவனத்தின் முடிவுகள் மீண்டும் நிகழ்ந்த புதிய வலைப்பின்னலுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது நம் மாதிரியின் வெளிப்பாட்டு சக்தியை அதி எடைந்த நினைவகம் மட்டும் நமக்கு உதவுவதில்லை வேலையின் உயரமான சூழ்நிரல் பொறியியலை தவிர்க்க உதவுகிறது, ஆனால் வாக்கியத்தின் வேறு விஷயத்தி நாம் நான்கு தரவுத் தளங்களில் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் ஒழுங்குப்பொருளை சோதிக்கிறோம். இரண்டு செம்Eval2014-ல் இருந்து இருக்கிறது, அதா ஒரு டிவிட்டர் தகவல் அமைப்பு, அதன் செயல்பாட்டை சோதிக்க ஒரு சீன செய்தி குறிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பு, அதன் மொழியின் உணர்வை சோதிக்க. The experimental results show that our model consistently outperforms the state-of-the-art methods on different types of data.', 'uz': "Biz neyrol tarmoqlari asosida yangi freymni izoh/tahrirlash imkoniyatini aniqlash uchun qoʻllanmiz. Bizning freymimizning bir necha paydo bo'ladi va uzun masofadan ajratilgan hisob xususiyatlarni qabul qilish uchun bir necha foydalanuvchi mechaniyatlarni olib tashlaydi, shunday qilib bu juda ko'proq maʼlumot yordam beradi. Ko'pchilik taqdimot natijalari davom etilgan neural tarmoq bilan birlashtirilmagan natijalari, bu modelimizning tashkilotni ko'p komplikliktlarni boshqarish uchun foydalanishimiz mumkin. Ko'pchilik xotira mekaniyasi faqat bizga ishlab chiqarish imkoniyatini yordam berishimizga yordam bermaydi, balki bu gapning boshqa fikr tegirmoniga qo'yish xotira beradi. We examine the merit of our model on four datasets: two are from SemEval2014, i.e. reviews of restaurants and laptops;  Twitter maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'rganish uchun va xitoycha xabar maʼlumotlar tarkibini sinash uchun. Tajriba natijalari esa modelmiz turli maʼlumot turlarida davomida holatning holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới dựa trên mạng thần kinh để xác định ý kiến về mục tiêu ý kiến trong một bình luận/kiểm tra. Cơ chế của chúng tôi sử dụng nhiều cơ chế chú ý để thu thập các tính cảm xúc cách nhau với khoảng cách xa, để nó mạnh mẽ hơn chống lại những thông tin không liên quan. Kết quả của sự chú ý đa dạng không được kết hợp trực tiếp với mạng thần kinh tồn tại, nó tăng cường sức mạnh biểu cảm của mẫu để xử lý nhiều biến chứng hơn. Cái máy đóng này không chỉ giúp chúng ta trốn khỏi công việc sự nghiệp áp, mà cũng giúp chúng ta có một trí nhớ được đặc đặt đột của một mục tiêu ti Chúng tôi xem xét khả năng của mô hình này trên bốn bộ dữ liệu: hai là từ SemEvul2004, tức là đánh giá của nhà hàng và laptop; một bộ dữ liệu trên Twitter, để kiểm tra khả năng của nó trên dữ liệu mạng xã hội; và một tập tin bình luận tin tức Trung Quốc, để kiểm tra độ nhạy ngôn ngữ. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta hoàn toàn vượt trội các phương pháp hiện đại về các loại dữ liệu khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова рамка, базирана на невронни мрежи, за да идентифицираме сентименталните цели в коментар/преглед. Нашата рамка приема механизъм за многократно внимание, за да улавя сентиментални функции, разделени от дълго разстояние, така че да е по-здрава срещу неуместна информация. Резултатите от многократното внимание са нелинейно съчетани с повтаряща се невронна мрежа, което засилва изразителната сила на нашия модел за справяне с повече усложнения. Механизмът с претеглена памет не само ни помага да избегнем трудоемката работа по инженеринг на функциите, но и осигурява персонализирана памет за различни цели на мнение на изречение. Проучваме заслугите на нашия модел на четири набора данни: два са от т.е. прегледи на ресторанти и лаптопи; набор от данни в Туитър за тестване на ефективността му в социалните медии; и набор от данни за коментари на китайски новини, за тестване на езиковата чувствителност. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел постоянно надминава най-съвременните методи при различните видове данни.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw raamwerk voor op basis van neurale netwerken om het sentiment van opiniedoelen in een commentaar/review te identificeren. Ons raamwerk maakt gebruik van meervoudige aandacht mechanisme om sentiment kenmerken gescheiden door een lange afstand vast te leggen, zodat het robuuster is tegen irrelevante informatie. De resultaten van meerdere attenties worden niet-lineair gecombineerd met een terugkerend neuraal netwerk, wat de expressieve kracht van ons model versterkt voor het omgaan met meer complicaties. Het gewogen geheugenmechanisme helpt ons niet alleen het arbeidsintensieve feature engineering werk te vermijden, maar biedt ook een op maat gemaakt geheugen voor verschillende opiniedoelen van een zin. We onderzoeken de verdienste van ons model op vier datasets: twee zijn afkomstig van SemEval2014, dat wil zeggen beoordelingen van restaurants en laptops; een twitter dataset, voor het testen van de prestaties op social media data; en een dataset van Chinese nieuwsberichten, voor het testen van de taalgevoeligheid. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model consequent beter presteert dan de state-of-the-art methoden op verschillende soorten data.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo nov okvir na osnovu neuronskih mreža da identificiramo osjećaj ciljeva mišljenja u komentaru/pregledu. Naš okvir usvojava mehanizam višestruke pažnje da uhvati karakteristike osjećaja odvojene dugim udaljenostima, tako da je jača protiv nevažnih informacija. Rezultati višestruke pažnje nisu linearno kombinirani s rekonstruiranom neuralnom mrežom, koja jača ekspresivnu moć našeg modela za rješavanje više komplikacija. Mehanizam težine pamćenja ne samo pomaže nam izbjegavati radni inženjerski rad s intenzivnim funkcijama, nego također pruža uspomenu koji je napravio krojač za različite ciljeve mišljenja kazne. Provjeravamo vrijednost našeg modela na četiri dataseta: dvije su iz SemEval2014, tj. preglede restorana i laptopa; set podataka o twitter, za testiranje svojih učinka na podacima društvenih medija; i kineski komplet podataka za komentare, za testiranje osjetljivosti jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model stalno nadmašuje metode stanja umjetnosti na različite vrste podataka.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny ramme baseret på neurale netværk til at identificere sentiment of opinion målene i en kommentar/anmeldelse. Vores rammer vedtager multiple-opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at fange følelsesfunktioner adskilt af en lang afstand, så det er mere robust mod irrelevante oplysninger. Resultaterne af flere opmærksomheder er ikke-lineært kombineret med et tilbagevendende neuralt netværk, hvilket styrker vores models udtrykskraft til at håndtere flere komplikationer. Den vægtede hukommelsesmekanisme hjælper os ikke kun med at undgå det arbejdskraftintensive feature engineering arbejde, men giver også en skræddersyet hukommelse til forskellige meningsmål i en sætning. Vi undersøger fortjenesten af vores model på fire datasæt: to er fra SemEval2014, dvs. anmeldelser af restauranter og bærbare computere; et twitter datasæt til test af dets ydeevne på sociale medier og et datasæt med kinesiske nyheder til at teste dets sprogfølsomhed. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model konsekvent overgår de nyeste metoder på forskellige typer data.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Framework vor, das auf neuronalen Netzen basiert, um die Stimmung von Meinungszielen in einem Kommentar/Review zu identifizieren. Unser Framework verwendet Mehrfachaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um Sentiment-Merkmale zu erfassen, die durch eine große Entfernung getrennt sind, so dass es robuster gegen irrelevante Informationen ist. Die Ergebnisse mehrerer Aufmerksamkeiten werden nicht-linear mit einem rezidivierenden neuronalen Netzwerk kombiniert, was die Ausdruckskraft unseres Modells für den Umgang mit weiteren Komplikationen stärkt. Der gewichtete Gedächtnismechanismus hilft uns nicht nur, die arbeitsintensive Feature Engineering Arbeit zu vermeiden, sondern bietet auch ein maßgeschneidertes Gedächtnis für verschiedene Meinungsziele eines Satzes. Wir prüfen die Vorzüge unseres Modells auf vier Datensätzen: zwei stammen aus SemEval2014, d.h. Bewertungen von Restaurants und Laptops; einen Twitter-Datensatz, um seine Leistung auf Social-Media-Daten zu testen; und einen chinesischen Nachrichtenkommentar Datensatz, um seine Sprachempfindlichkeit zu testen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell die modernsten Methoden auf verschiedenen Datentypen durchweg übertrifft.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan cadangan baru berdasarkan jaringan saraf untuk mengidentifikasi perasaan sasaran pendapat dalam komentar/ulasan. kerangka kami mengadopsi mekanisme perhatian berbilang untuk menangkap fitur sentimen terpisah dengan jarak jauh, sehingga lebih kuat melawan informasi yang tidak relevan. Hasil dari perhatian berbilang tidak linear bergabung dengan jaringan saraf berkurang, yang memperkuat kekuatan ekspresif model kita untuk menangani komplikasi yang lebih banyak. The weighted-memory mechanism not only helps us avoid the labor-intensive feature engineering work, but also provides a tailor-made memory for different opinion targets of a sentence.  Kami memeriksa keuntungan model kami pada empat set data: dua dari SemEval2014, yaitu penelitian restoran dan laptop; sebuah set data twitter, untuk menguji prestasinya pada data media sosial; dan dataset komentar berita Cina, untuk menguji sensitivitas bahasa. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa model kita secara konsisten melebihi metode terbaik pada tipe data yang berbeda.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب نوی بر اساس شبکه\u200cهای عصبی تا احساس هدف نظر را در یک توضیح/تحقیق شناسایی کند. چهارچوب ما مکانیسم متعدد توجه را برای گرفتن ویژه\u200cهای احساسات که با فاصله طولانی جدا شده است، برای این که بر خلاف اطلاعات بی\u200cاثر قوی تر است. نتیجه\u200cهای متعدد توجه غیر خطی با شبکه عصبی تکرار می\u200cشود که قدرت مثبت مدل ما را برای کنترل پیچیدگی\u200cهای بیشتری نیرومند می\u200cکند. مکانیسم وزن حافظه نه تنها به ما کمک می\u200cکند از کار مهندسی مهندسی\u200cهای فعالیت کار فرار کنیم، بلکه همچنین حافظه\u200cای که برای هدف\u200cهای نظر مختلف از یک جمله ساخته شده\u200cاند را تغییر می\u200cدهد. ما ارزش مدل خود را در چهار مجموعه داده\u200cها تحقیق می\u200cکنیم: دو از سیم\u200cEval2014، یعنی تحقیقات رستوران و لپ\u200cتاپ است. یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای ترویتر، برای آزمایش عملکرد آن در داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، و یک مجموعه اطلاعات اظهار چینی برای آزمایش حساسیت زبانش. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که مدل ما همیشه روش\u200cهای ایالت هنری را بر نوع داده\u200cهای مختلف انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa riwaya unaofanywa na mitandao ya kijamii ili kutambua hisia za malengo ya maoni katika maoni/maoni. Mifumo yetu inachukua mfumo wa kutangaza hisia zilizotenganishwa na umbali mrefu, kwa hiyo inavutiwa zaidi dhidi ya taarifa zisizo sahihi. Matokeo ya hatua mbalimbali yanaunganishwa na mtandao wa neura unaoendelea, ambayo inaongezea nguvu ya muundo wetu kwa kudhibiti migogoro zaidi. Mfumo mzito wa kumbukumbu sio tu unatusaidia kuepuka kazi za ubunifu wenye nguvu za kazi, lakini pia hutoa kumbukumbu iliyotengenezwa kwa malengo tofauti ya maoni ya hukumu. Tunatachunguza muundo wetu kwenye seti za takwimu nne: mbili zimetoka SemEval2014, yaani tathmini za migahawa na kompyuta; a twitter dataset, for testing its performance on social media data;  na seti ya taarifa za maoni ya China, kwa kujaribu uelewa wa lugha yake. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaendelea kutengeneza mbinu za hali ya sanaa katika aina tofauti za data.', 'ko': '우리는 논평/평론에서 의견 목표의 정서를 식별하는 데 사용되는 신경 네트워크를 기반으로 한 새로운 구조를 제시했다.우리의 틀은 다주의 메커니즘을 이용하여 원거리 분리된 감정 특징을 포착하여 무관한 정보에 대해 더욱 강한 노봉성을 가진다.다중 관심의 결과와 귀속 신경 네트워크의 비선형 결합은 우리 모델이 더 많은 복잡한 문제를 처리하는 표현 능력을 강화시켰다.가중 기억 메커니즘은 우리가 힘든 특징 공정을 피하는 데 도움을 줄 뿐만 아니라 문장의 서로 다른 관점 목표에 맞춤형 기억을 제공할 수 있다.우리는 네 개의 데이터 집합에서 우리 모델의 장점을 검증했다. 두 가지는Sem Eval 2014, 즉 식당과 노트북에서 온 평론이다.트위터 데이터 집합은 소셜 미디어 데이터의 성능을 측정하는 데 사용된다.언어의 민감성을 측정하는 데 사용되는 중국어 뉴스 평론 데이터 집합실험 결과에 의하면 서로 다른 유형의 데이터에 대해 우리의 모델은 시종 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri bazuar në rrjetet nervore për të identifikuar ndjenjën e objektivave të opinionit në një koment/përmbledhje. Korniza jonë miraton mekanizmin e vëmendjes së shumtë për të kapur karakteristikat e ndjenjave të ndara nga një distancë e gjatë, në mënyrë që të jetë më e fortë kundër informacionit të pavarur. Rezultatet e vëmendjes së shumëfishtë janë të kombinuara jo-linearisht me një rrjet neural të përsëritur, i cili forcon fuqinë shprehëse të modelit tonë për trajtimin e më shumë komplikacioneve. The weighted-memory mechanism not only helps us avoid the labor-intensive feature engineering work, but also provides a tailor-made memory for different opinion targets of a sentence.  Ne e shqyrtojmë merit ën e modelit tonë në katër grupe të dhënash: dy janë nga SemEval2014, pra shqyrtimet e restauranteve dhe laptopeve; një set të dhënash Twitter, për të testuar performancën e saj në të dhënat e medias sociale; dhe një grup të dhënash për komentet kineze për testimin e ndjeshmërisë së gjuhës. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë vazhdimisht kalon metodat më të larta në lloje të ndryshme të të dhënash.', 'tr': 'Biz neural şebekelere daýanýan bir roman çerçevesini terjime/resmäge maksadyň duýgyny tanyşdyrmak üçin teklip edýäris. Biziň çarpakymyz duýgular özelliklerini uzak uzaklaşdyrmak üçin birnäçe üns mekanizmasyny kabul edip görýär, şeýle däl-de hiç hili möhüm informasiýa garşylamak üçin. Birnäçe ünsliň netijesi çalňyşlyk ýok bir nuýral şebekesi bilen birleşýär. Bu biziň nuýdanymyzyň köp çykyşlyklary ýüze çykarmak üçin nuýramyzyň ukypyny güýçleýär. Ýalňyş-agtar mekanismi işgär-ynjynyň işini ýitirmegimize kömek eden däl, ýöne sözläniň beýleki noktalary üçin üýtgeden yada saýlaýar. Biz öz nusgamyzyň hökmüni dört sany veri setirlerinde barýarys: iki hem SemEval2014-nji ýyldan, diýip restoranlaryň we laptoplaryň barlygyny barýarys; social media maglumaty barlamak üçin twitter maglumaty düzeni; Çinçe täzelikler namaýyşlaryny barlamak üçin. Deneysel netijeler biziň nusgamyzyň daşary ýagdaýynyň durumyny daşary ýagdaýynyň üstüne çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'am': 'በናውራዊ መረብ ላይ የተመሳሳይ የዓይነ አካሄዱን ለመግለጽ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ ስሜት በተለየ፣ በተለየ የራቀ መረጃን ለመያዝ ብዙዎችን የጥያቄ አካሄድ ይወስዳል፡፡ የብዙዎቹ አዳራሽ ውጤቶች በተደጋገመ የነዌብ መረብ ጋር ሳይተያያይዘው ነው፣ የሞዴላያችንን የግልጽ ኃይል በብዙ ሙከራዎችን ለመቀበል የሚጨምር ነው፡፡ ሚዛን ማስታሰቢያ ማሰናከል የድካም ኃይል የኢንተርኔጂን ሥራ ብቻ አይረዳንም፥ ነገር ግን ለልዩ ልዩ አስተያየት የፍርድ ማስታወሻ የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡ በአራቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ የሞላማችንን ብዛት እንሞክራለን፤ ሁለቱም ከሴምEval2014 ናቸው፤ የሬስራትሬት እና የሎፕቶፎች ፍጥረት ነው፡፡ የኢትዮጵያ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን ለመፈትነው የTwitter Dataset የቻይና ዜና የመስታወሻ ዳታተር ለቋንቋው ስህተት ለመፈተና ነው፡፡ የሞከሩ ውጤቶች ምሳሌያችን በተለየ ዓይነቶች የ-የ-የ-የ-art ሥርዓቶችን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe raamwerk gebaseer op neurale netwerke om die sentiment van besonderhede doels in 'n kommentaar/hersiening te identifiseer. Ons raamwerk aanvaar veelvuldige-aandagmekanisme om sentimente-funksies te vang wat deur 'n lang afstand geskei is, sodat dit meer kragtiger is teen onbelangrike inligting. Die resultate van veelvuldige aandag is nie-lineêre gekombineer met 'n herhaalde neuralnetwerk wat die uitdrukking krag van ons model versterk om meer komplikasies te hanteer. Die gewigte-geheue mekanisme hulp ons nie alleen om die werk-intensiewe funksie inženiering werk te vervaar nie, maar ook verskaf 'n sterk gemaakte geheue vir verskillende opisiedoels van 'n seting. Ons ondersoek die merit van ons model op vier datastelle: twee is van SemEval2014, bv. hersiening van restaurante en laptops; en â\x80\x99n twitter datastel, vir toets van sy prestasie op sosiale media data; en 'n Sjinese nuuskommentaar datastel vir toets van sy taal sensitiviteit. Die eksperimentele resultate vertoon dat ons model konsistentlik die state-of-the-art metodes op verskillende tipes data uitvoer.", 'hy': 'We propose a novel framework based on neural networks to identify the sentiment of opinion targets in a comment/review.  Մեր կառուցվածքը ընդունում է բազմաթիվ ուշադրություն դարձնող մեխանիզմ զգացմունքների առանձնահատկությունների նկարահանման համար, որոնք բաժանված են երկար հեռավորության միջոցով, այնպես որ այն ավելի ուժեղ է անկարևոր տեղեկա Բազմաթիվ ուշադրության արդյունքները միավորվում են ոչ գծային ձևով նորից առկա նյարդային ցանցի հետ, ինչը ուժեղացնում է մեր մոդելի արտահայտության ուժը ավելի շատ բարդություններ վարելու համար: Կրկված հիշողության մեխանիզմը ոչ միայն օգնում է մեզ խուսափել աշխատանքի ինտենսիվ հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտական աշխատանքից, այլ նաև հնարավորություն է տալիս հատուկ հիշողություն նախադասության տարբեր կարծիքային նպատակների համար: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մեր մոդելի արժեքները չորս տվյալների համակարգերի վրա. երկուսը 2014 թվականից են, այսինքն՝ ռեստորանների և համակարգերի վերլուծումները: Թվիթերի տվյալների համակարգ, որպեսզի ստուգենք սոցիալական լրատվյալների արդյունքները, և չինական նորությունների մեկնաբանությունների տվյալների համակարգ, որպեսզի փորձենք լեզվի զգացմունքը: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը մշտապես գերազանցում է տարբեր տեսակի տվյալների վերջին մեթոդները:', 'bn': 'আমরা নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি উপন্যাসের কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি মন্তব্য/পর্যবেক্ষণে মতামতের লক্ষ্য চিহ্নিত করতে। আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো দীর্ঘ দূরত্বে বিচ্ছিন্ন অনুভূতির বৈশিষ্ট্য গ্রহণ করার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি মনোযোগ প্রয়োগ করে, যাতে এটা অনিচ্ছু বেশ কিছু মনোযোগের ফলাফল পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে একত্রিত হয়েছে, যা আমাদের মডেলের প্রকাশ্য ক্ষমতা বাড়িয়ে দেয় আরো জটিল করার জন্য। ওজনের মেমরি মেক্সিমেন্ট শুধুমাত্র শ্রমিক-গভীর বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রকৌশল কাজ থেকে আমাদের সাহায্য করে না, কিন্তু বিভিন্ন মতামতের লক্ষ্যের আমরা চারটি ডাটাসেটে আমাদের মডেলের মিট পরীক্ষা করি: দুটি সেমভাল ২০১৪ থেকে এসেছে, যেমন রেস্তুরেন্ট এবং ল্যাপটপের প্রতিবেদন; a twitter dataset, for testing its performance on social media data;  এবং চীনা সংবাদ মন্তব্যের ডাটাসেট, এর ভাষার সুবিধা পরীক্ষা করার জন্য। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্যের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতিতে প্রকাশ করে।', 'az': 'Biz nöral a ğlarına dayanan yeni bir framework ə təklif edirik ki, fikir nişanələrinin hissini təsdiqləmək/tərzdə təsdiqləmək üçün. Bizim qurğumuz uzun uzaqları ilə ayrılmış hisslərin fərqlənməsi üçün çoxlu təsirli mehanizmini qəbul edir, böyük ki, bu məlumatların əleyhinə çox möhkəmdir. Müxtəlif təsirlərin sonuçları sətirsiz olmayan bir nöral a ğ ilə birləşdirilmişdir. Bu, modelimizin daha komplikasiyaları idarə etmək üçündür. Bu a ğırlıq-hafıza mehanizmi bizə ancaq işin şiddətli mühendislik işindən çəkinməyə kömək edir, lakin cümlənin müxtəlif fikirlərin məqsədilərinə də təmizlənmiş memori təmizləyir. Biz modelimizin dörd veri setlərində qiymətini incidirik: ikisi SemEval2014-dən, t.i. restoranlar və laptoplar tərzlərindəndir; sosial media məlumatlarında performansını imtahana çəkmək üçün twitter verilən quruluşu; və Çin xəbərlərin məlumatlarını sınamaq üçün verilən məlumatlar qurulmuşdur. Müxtəlif sonuçlar, modellərimiz müxtəlif məlumatların vəziyyətlərində müxtəlif məlumatların vəziyyətlərini istifadə edir.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo nov okvir na osnovu neuronskih mreža da identifikujemo osjećaj ciljeva mišljenja u komentaru/pregledu. Naš okvir usvojava mehanizam višestruke pažnje da uhvati karakteristike osjećaja odvojene od daleke udaljenosti, tako da je jača protiv nevažnih informacija. Rezultati višestruke pažnje nisu linearno kombinirani sa rekonstruiranom neuralnom mrežom, koja jača ekspresivnu moć našeg modela za rješavanje više komplikacija. Mehanizam težine pamćenja ne samo pomaže nam da izbjegnemo radni inženjerski rad sa intenzivnim funkcijama, nego također pruža uspomenu koji je napravio krojač za različite ciljeve mišljenja kazne. Provjeravamo zaslugu našeg modela na četiri dataseta: dvije su iz SemEval2014, tj. preglede restorana i laptopa; seta podataka o twitter, za testiranje svojih učinka na podacima društvenih medija; i kompleta podataka za kineske vijesti, za testiranje osjetljivosti jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model stalno nadmašuje metode stanja umjetnosti na različite vrste podataka.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou marc basat en xarxes neurals per identificar el sentiment dels objectius d'opinió en un comentari/revisió. El nostre marc adopta un mecanisme de múltiple atenció per capturar característiques sentimentals separats per una llarga distància, de manera que sigui més robust contra informació irrelevant. Els resultats de múltiples atencions estan combinats de manera no lineal amb una xarxa neural recurrent, que fortaleix el poder expressiu del nostre model per manejar més complicacions. El mecanisme de memòria pesada no només ens ajuda a evitar el treball d'enginyeria de característiques intensives en treball, sinó també proporciona una memòria adaptada a diferents objectius d'opinió d'una frase. We examine the merit of our model on four datasets: two are from SemEval2014, i.e. reviews of restaurants and laptops;  un conjunt de dades de twitter, per provar el seu rendiment en les dades dels mitjans socials; i un conjunt de dades de comentaris de notícies xinesos, per provar la seva sensibilitat al llenguatge. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model contínuament supera els mètodes més avançats en diferents tipus de dades.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový rámec založený na neuronových sítích pro identifikaci sentimentu názorových cílů v komentáři/recenzi. Náš rámec přijímá mechanismus více pozornosti pro zachycení sentimentních rysů oddělených dalekou vzdáleností, takže je odolnější vůči irelevantním informacím. Výsledky několika pozorností jsou nelineárně kombinovány s recidivující neuronovou sítí, což posiluje expresivní sílu našeho modelu pro zvládnutí dalších komplikací. Mechanismus vážené paměti nám nejen pomáhá vyhnout se pracovně náročné práci inženýrství funkcí, ale také poskytuje paměť na míru pro různé názorové cíle věty. Zkoumáme hodnotu našeho modelu na čtyřech datových sadách: dva jsou ze SemEval2014, tj. recenze restaurací a notebooků; datový soubor twitteru pro testování jeho výkonnosti na údajích sociálních médiích; a soubor komentářů čínských zpráv pro testování jazykové citlivosti. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model konzistentně překonává nejmodernější metody na různých typech dat.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uudse närvivõrkudel põhineva raamistiku, et tuvastada arvamuseesmärkide tunded kommentaarides/ülevaates. Meie raamistik võtab kasutusele mitme tähelepanu mehhanismi, et jäädvustada sentimentaalseid funktsioone, mis on eraldatud pika vahemaaga, nii et see on ebaolulise teabe vastu tugevam. Mitmekordse tähelepanu tulemused on mittelineaarselt kombineeritud korduva närvivõrguga, mis tugevdab meie mudeli väljendusvõimet suuremate komplikatsioonide käsitlemisel. Kaalutud mälu mehhanism mitte ainult ei aita vältida töömahukat funktsioonide inseneritööd, vaid pakub ka kohandatud mälu lause erinevatele arvamuseesmärkidele. Uurime mudeli väärtust nelja andmekogumi põhjal: kaks on pärit SemEval2014, st restoranide ja sülearvutite ülevaated; twitteri andmekogum selle toimimise testimiseks sotsiaalmeedia andmetes; ja Hiina uudiste kommentaaride andmekogum selle keeletundlikkuse testimiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel on järjepidevalt ületanud kaasaegseid meetodeid erinevate andmetüüpide puhul.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uudenlaista neuroverkkoihin perustuvaa viitekehystä, jonka avulla voidaan tunnistaa mielipidekohteiden tuntemus kommentissa/arvostelussa. Kehyksessämme on käytössä monipuolinen huomiomekanismi, joka tallentaa tunteiden ominaisuuksia, jotka on erotettu pitkän matkan avulla, jotta se on kestävämpi epäolennaista tietoa vastaan. Moninkertaisen huomion tulokset yhdistetään epälineaarisesti toistuvaan hermoverkkoon, mikä vahvistaa mallimme ilmeistä voimaa käsitellä lisää komplikaatioita. Painotettu muistimekanismi ei ainoastaan auta välttämään työlästä ominaisuussuunnittelutyötä, vaan tarjoaa myös räätälöidyn muistin lauseen eri mielipidetavoitteille. Tutkimme mallimme ansioita neljästä aineistosta: kaksi on SemEval2014-tietokannasta eli ravintoloiden ja kannettavien tietokoneiden arvosteluista; twitter-aineisto, jolla testataan sen suorituskykyä sosiaalisen median datassa; ja kiinalaisen uutiskommentin aineisto kieliherkkyyden testaamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti huipputekniikan menetelmistä erityyppisten tietojen osalta.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov okvir, ki temelji na nevronskih omrežjih, za prepoznavanje občutkov mnenjskih ciljev v komentarju/pregledu. Naš okvir sprejema mehanizem več pozornosti za zajemanje čustvenih funkcij, ločenih z dolgo razdaljo, tako da je robustnejši proti nepomembnim informacijam. Rezultati več pozornosti so nelinearno kombinirani s ponavljajočim se živčnim omrežjem, kar krepi izrazno moč našega modela za obravnavanje več zapletov. Mehanizem tehtanega pomnilnika nam ne pomaga le preprečiti delovno intenzivnega inženiringa funkcij, temveč zagotavlja tudi prilagojen spomin za različne cilje mnenja stavka. Prednost našega modela preučujemo na štirih naborih podatkov: dva sta iz SemEval2014, tj. pregledi restavracij in prenosnih računalnikov; nabor podatkov Twitterja za testiranje njegove učinkovitosti na podatkih družbenih omrežjih; in nabor podatkov o komentarjih kitajskih novic za testiranje jezikovne občutljivosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš model dosledno presega najsodobnejše metode pri različnih vrstah podatkov.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה מבוססת על רשתות עצביות כדי לזהות את הרגשה של מטרות דעת בתוך תגובה/ביקור. המסגרת שלנו מאמצת מנגנון תשומת לב מרובה כדי לתפוס תכונות רגשות נפרדים על ידי מרחק ארוך, כך שהוא חזק יותר נגד מידע לא רלוונטי. התוצאות של תשומת לב רבה שולבות לא לינרית עם רשת עצבית חוזרת, שמחזיקה את כוח הביטוי של המודל שלנו לטפל יותר סיבוכים. מנגנון הזיכרון המשקל לא רק עוזר לנו להימנע מעבודת הנדסה של תכונות אינטנסיביות עבודה, אלא גם מספק זיכרון מתוכנן למטרות דעה שונות של משפט. אנחנו בודקים את הרווחה של המודל שלנו על ארבעה קבוצות נתונים: שניים הם מ-SemEval2014, כלומר ביקורות של מסעדות וחשבנים ניידים; קבוצת מידע טוויטר, לבדוק את ההופעה שלה על מידע התקשורת החברתית; and a Chinese news comment dataset, for testing its language sensitivity.  התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהדוגמנית שלנו מתאימה בצורה קבועה יותר מהשיטות המיוחדות על סוגים שונים של נתונים.', 'ha': "Munã buɗa wani firam na nowaya a kan karatun zane-zane-zane neura dõmin su gane hisia'in maganar maganar sharuya cikin wata fitina/misãli. Firammananmu na zãɓe mekanin masu sauki ko da yawa dõmin ka sami fili masu iya tsakanin hisãbi da aka tsakani tsawo a tsawo, don haka kuma za'a yi sauri don a sami bayani. The results of multiple attentions are non-linearly combined with a recurrent neural network, which strengthens the expressive power of our model for handling more complications.  Akamatarin memorin da aka yi nauyi ba yana amfani da mu kange aikin muhalli na muhimmin aikin da ke iya ƙaranci, kuma amma yana da lokacin da aka samar da shi kumbar kwamfyutan da aka samu zuwa ga misalin daban-daban. Yana jarraba misalin mu kan tsarin bayani huɗu: samun mutane na Twitter, dõmin ya jarraba mafarinsa a kan data na jamii; da danne na ɗabi'a na mawaƙa na China, dõmin jarraba ma'anarsa na harshen. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu yana ƙaranci kowace metoden-state-the-art kan wasu nau'i-data.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan nganggo dolanan sing wis dipunatus nang tambah kuwi ngéwangi luwih nggawe tarjamahan nggawe tarjamahan ning komentar/resmi. Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi akeh-atang kanggo ngerasakno ngerasakno iki dadi, dadi iki sing luwih apik kejahatan informasi ora kejahatan. Rejalaké kapan tanggal sing butakon linear, sampek karo netek sing tatagan nyerung, kiye nguasai perusahaan pakan anyar tentang kanggo nguasai komplikasi sing apik. The kowé-nggunian mehanimis sing nggawe ora oleh nglanggar nglanggar aturan operasi tambah nggunian, tambah nganggep nggawe panelok-nggunian sing paling apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan ning modelu dhéwé nang sampek apat dataset: duruh sing katêpakan karo semiinval2013, te.d. seneng resmi restoran lan Laptop; dataset Sampeyan kanggo kelebugan pangalan barang Chinese Rejalaké sing paling-paling mbukaké banjuré punika ingkang model sing sumulahing karo hal-kalungé perkaran sing kalagayaan karo perkaran dadi.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏུ་གསར་དེབ་ཅིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་སྟོན་ཚོགས་དང་། སྟོན་བཤད ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐག་རིང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྲོལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། བྱས་ན་ཉེས མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་བའི་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་མེད་པས། The weighted-memory mechanism not only helps us avoid the labor-intensive feature engineering work, but also provides a tailor-made memory for different opinion targets of a sentence. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རང་གི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་པར་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་༢རྣམས་སྤྱི་ལོངས་༢རྣམས་ལས ཅིག་གསར་བརྗོད་མཁན་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན།སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཉར་ཆེན་ལྟར་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། གྲུབ་སྐྱེས་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བཀོད་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་མིག'}
{'en': 'Author-aware Aspect Topic Sentiment Model to Retrieve Supporting Opinions from Reviews', 'ar': 'نموذج وجهة نظر موضوع الجانب المدرك للمؤلف لاسترداد الآراء الداعمة من المراجعات', 'es': 'Modelo de sentimiento de tema de aspecto consciente del autor para recuperar opiniones de apoyo de las reseñas', 'fr': "Modèle de sentiment de sujet d'aspect conscient de l'auteur pour récupérer les opinions à l'appui des avis", 'pt': 'Modelo de opinião sobre o tópico com reconhecimento do autor para recuperar opiniões de apoio das revisões', 'ja': 'レビューから裏付けとなる意見を取り出すための著者意識の高いアスペクトトピック感情モデル', 'zh': '作者感知方面主题,以从论议中检持', 'ru': 'Авторская модель настроения темы аспекта для извлечения поддерживающих мнений из отзывов', 'hi': 'लेखक-जागरूक पहलू विषय भावना मॉडल समीक्षाओं से समर्थन राय पुनः प्राप्त करने के लिए', 'ga': 'Samhail Mothúcháin atá feasach ar an Údar maidir le Topaicí chun Tuairimí Tacaíochta a Aisghabháil ó Athbhreithnithe', 'el': 'Μοντέλο συναισθημάτων για την ανάκτηση υποστηρικτικών απόψεων από κριτικές', 'hu': 'Szerző-tudatos aspekt téma érzelmi modell, hogy visszaszerezze a támogató véleményeket a véleményekből', 'ka': 'ავტორის ცნობიერებელი ანსპექტის ტემიკის გაგზავნა მოდელი, რომელიც განახლებებიდან მხარდაჭერების შესახებ', 'it': "Modello sentimentale dell'argomento consapevole dell'autore per recuperare opinioni di supporto dalle recensioni", 'lt': 'Autorių žinomas teminio jausmo aspekto modelis, kuriuo siekiama gauti nuomones, kuriomis remiamos peržiūros', 'mk': 'Модел на чувство за тема со аспект свесен за авторот за добивање поддржувачки мислења од прегледот', 'kk': 'Авторды түсіндіру аспекті тақырыпты көзгерту үшін қолдау мәліметтерін қабылдау үшін мәліметтер үлгісі', 'ms': 'Comment', 'ml': 'രചയിതാവിന്റെ അറിവുള്ള ആസ്പെക്ക് പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ സെന്റിമെന്റ് മോഡല്\u200d വീണ്ടും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന പ്രോഗ', 'no': 'Modell for å henta støtte innstillingar frå gjennomsikt', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Sentiment Topiku li huwa konxju mill-awtur biex jinkisbu Opinjonijiet ta’ Appoġġ minn Reviżjonijiet', 'pl': 'Model sentymentów świadomy autora aspektów, aby uzyskać opinie pomocne z recenzji', 'mn': 'Author-aware Aspect Topic Sentiment Model to Retrieve Supporting Opinions from Reviews', 'ro': 'Modelul sentimentului subiectului conștient de autor pentru a obține opinii susținătoare din recenzii', 'sr': 'Model sentimenta tema svesti autora za osvajanje mišljenja podrške iz revizija', 'so': 'Model Sentiment to Retrieve Support Opinions from Reviews', 'sv': 'Författarmedveten aspekt ämne sentiment modell för att hämta stödjande åsikter från recensioner', 'si': 'ලේඛකය-අවධානය Aspect විශේෂය Sentiment Model to retrrieve backing Opinions from Revises', 'ta': 'எழுத்தாளர் தெரிந்து கொள்ளும் பொருள் அமர்வு மாதிரி', 'ur': 'لیکور-aware Aspect Topic Sentiment Model for Retrieving Support Opinions from Revision', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Dịch bởi tập tin/ ảnhName', 'bg': 'Модел на сентимента, който да извлече подкрепящи мнения от рецензиите', 'hr': 'Model osjetljivog tema svesnih autora za prikupljanje mišljenja podrške iz revizija', 'nl': 'Auteursbewust aspect topic sentiment model om ondersteunende meningen uit beoordelingen op te halen', 'da': 'Forfatterbevidst aspekt emne sentiment model til at hente støttende meninger fra anmeldelser', 'de': 'Autorenbewusstes Aspect Topic Sentiment Modell, um unterstützende Meinungen aus Bewertungen abzurufen', 'id': 'Author-aware Aspect Topic Sentiment Model to Retrieve Supporting Opinions from Reviews', 'ko': '작가 감지 방면의 화제 정서 모델은 평론에서 지지적인 의견을 검색한다', 'sw': 'Mwandishi aliyefahamika na mtazamo wa Tamko la Sentiment to restore Operations Support from Reviews', 'fa': 'مدل احساس\u200cکننده\u200cی موضوع موضوع آگاهی نویسنده برای بازیافت تصورات پشتیبانی از تحقیقات', 'tr': 'Otomatik gaýd etmek üçin Aýratyn Aýry Gaýd Etmek Mazmunlary', 'af': 'Outeur- aware Aspekte Tema Sentiment Model om ondersteunde Opsies te ontvang van Aansig', 'sq': 'Modeli i ndjerjes së temës së vetëdijshëm për autorin për të marrë opinionet mbështetëse nga shqyrtimet', 'hy': 'Հաշվի առնող հեղինակի տեսակի թեմային զգացմունքի մոդել վերցնելու աջակցող կարծիքներ վերլուծություններից', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'az': 'G칬zl톛m톛l톛rd톛n d톛st톛k fikirl톛rini almaq 칲칞칲n yaz캼c캼-bil톛n Aspect Mevzu Sentiment Modeli', 'bs': 'Model osjetljivog tema svesti autora za osvajanje mišljenja podrške iz revizija', 'bn': 'রিভিউ থেকে সমর্থিত অপারিনিশন পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য লেখক-সচেতনভাবে প্রত্যাশিত অ্যাসপেক্ট বিষয়ের মোডেল', 'cs': 'Model vnímání aspektu tématu k získání podpůrných názorů z recenzí', 'ca': "Model de sentiment tòpic d'aspecte conscient de l'autor per rebre opinions de suport a partir de revisions", 'et': 'Autoriteadlik aspektiteema tunnetusmudel, et saada toetavaid arvamusi arvustustest', 'fi': 'Kirjoittajatietoinen Aspect Aihe Tunnemalli, jolla haetaan tukevia mielipiteitä arvosteluista', 'jv': 'Coverage', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודע לכותב מודל תחושת הנושא של האפקט כדי להשיג דעות תומכות מערכות', 'sk': 'Model čustva teme, ki se zaveda avtorja, za pridobivanje podpornih mnenj iz mnenj', 'bo': 'Author-aware Aspect Topic Sentiment Model to Retrieve Support Opinions from Reviews'}
{'en': 'User generated content about products and services in the form of reviews are often diverse and even contradictory. This makes it difficult for users to know if an opinion in a review is prevalent or biased. We study the problem of searching for supporting opinions in the context of reviews. We propose a framework called SURF, that first identifies opinions expressed in a review, and then finds similar opinions from other reviews. We design a novel probabilistic graphical model that captures opinions as a combination of aspect, topic and sentiment dimensions, takes into account the preferences of individual authors, as well as the quality of the entity under review, and encodes the flow of thoughts in a review by constraining the aspect distribution dynamically among successive review segments. We derive a similarity measure that considers both lexical and semantic similarity to find supporting opinions. Experiments on TripAdvisor hotel reviews and Yelp restaurant reviews show that our model outperforms existing methods for modeling opinions, and the proposed framework is effective in finding supporting opinions.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يكون المحتوى الذي ينشئه المستخدم حول المنتجات والخدمات في شكل مراجعات متنوعًا وحتى متناقضًا. هذا يجعل من الصعب على المستخدمين معرفة ما إذا كان الرأي في المراجعة سائدًا أم متحيزًا. ندرس مشكلة البحث عن الآراء الداعمة في سياق المراجعات. نقترح إطارًا يسمى SURF ، والذي يحدد أولاً الآراء المعبر عنها في المراجعة ، ثم يعثر على آراء مماثلة من المراجعات الأخرى. نصمم نموذجًا رسوميًا احتماليًا جديدًا يلتقط الآراء كمجموعة من أبعاد الجانب والموضوع والمشاعر ، ويأخذ في الاعتبار تفضيلات المؤلفين الفرديين ، فضلاً عن جودة الكيان قيد المراجعة ، ويشفر تدفق الأفكار في المراجعة من خلال تقييد توزيع العرض إلى الارتفاع ديناميكيًا بين مقاطع المراجعة المتتالية. نشتق مقياس تشابه يأخذ في الاعتبار التشابه المعجمي والدلالي للعثور على الآراء الداعمة. تُظهر التجارب على تقييمات الفنادق على موقع TripAdvisor ومراجعات مطاعم Yelp أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب الحالية لنمذجة الآراء ، والإطار المقترح فعال في العثور على الآراء الداعمة.', 'pt': 'O conteúdo gerado pelo usuário sobre produtos e serviços na forma de avaliações geralmente é diversificado e até mesmo contraditório. Isso torna difícil para os usuários saberem se uma opinião em uma revisão é predominante ou tendenciosa. Estudamos o problema de buscar opiniões de apoio no contexto de revisões. Propomos uma estrutura chamada SURF, que primeiro identifica as opiniões expressas em uma revisão e depois encontra opiniões semelhantes de outras revisões. Projetamos um novo modelo gráfico probabilístico que captura opiniões como uma combinação de dimensões de aspecto, tópico e sentimento, leva em consideração as preferências de autores individuais, bem como a qualidade da entidade sob revisão e codifica o fluxo de pensamentos em uma revisão restringindo a distribuição de aspectos dinamicamente entre sucessivos segmentos de revisão. Derivamos uma medida de similaridade que considera a similaridade lexical e semântica para encontrar opiniões de apoio. Experimentos em avaliações de hotéis do TripAdvisor e avaliações de restaurantes do Yelp mostram que nosso modelo supera os métodos existentes para modelar opiniões, e a estrutura proposta é eficaz para encontrar opiniões de apoio.', 'fr': "Le contenu généré par les utilisateurs sur les produits et services sous forme d'avis est souvent diversifié et même contradictoire. Il est donc difficile pour les utilisateurs de savoir si une opinion dans un avis est prévalente ou biaisée. Nous étudions le problème de la recherche d'opinions justificatives dans le contexte des revues. Nous proposons un cadre appelé SURF, qui identifie d'abord les opinions exprimées dans un avis, puis trouve des opinions similaires dans d'autres revues. Nous concevons un nouveau modèle graphique probabiliste qui capture les opinions en tant que combinaison de dimensions d'aspect, de sujet et de sentiment, prend en compte les préférences des auteurs individuels, ainsi que la qualité de l'entité examinée, et encode le flux de pensées dans une revue en limitant l'aspect distribution dynamique entre les segments d'avis successifs. Nous dérivons une mesure de similitude qui tient compte de la similitude lexicale et sémantique pour trouver des opinions à l'appui. Les expériences sur les avis d'hôtels TripAdvisor et les critiques de restaurants Yelp montrent que notre modèle surpasse les méthodes existantes pour modéliser les opinions, et que le cadre proposé est efficace pour trouver des opinions à l'appui.", 'es': 'El contenido generado por los usuarios sobre productos y servicios en forma de reseñas suele ser diverso e incluso contradictorio. Esto hace que sea difícil para los usuarios saber si una opinión en una opinión es prevalente o sesgada. Estudiamos el problema de buscar opiniones de apoyo en el contexto de las revisiones. Proponemos un marco llamado SURF, que primero identifica las opiniones expresadas en una reseña y luego encuentra opiniones similares de otras reseñas. Diseñamos un modelo gráfico probabilístico novedoso que captura las opiniones como una combinación de dimensiones de aspecto, tema y sentimiento, tiene en cuenta las preferencias de los autores individuales, así como la calidad de la entidad objeto de revisión, y codifica el flujo de pensamientos en una revisión al restringir el aspecto distribución dinámica entre los sucesivos segmentos de revisión. Derivamos una medida de similitud que considera la similitud léxica y semántica para encontrar opiniones de apoyo. Los experimentos con las reseñas de hoteles de TripAdvisor y las reseñas de restaurantes de Yelp muestran que nuestro modelo supera a los métodos existentes para modelar opiniones, y el marco propuesto es eficaz para encontrar opiniones de apoyo.', 'ja': 'ユーザーが作成したレビュー形式の製品やサービスに関するコンテンツは、しばしば多様であり、矛盾しています。 これにより、レビューの意見が一般的か偏見的かをユーザーが知ることが困難になります。 私たちは、レビューの文脈で裏付けとなる意見を検索する問題を検討しています。 まずレビューで表明された意見を特定し、その後他のレビューから同様の意見を見つけるという、SURFと呼ばれるフレームワークを提案します。 私たちは、アスペクト、トピック、感情の次元の組み合わせとして意見を取り込み、個々の著者の好み、およびレビュー対象のエンティティの質を考慮し、連続したレビューセグメント間のアスペクト分布を動的に制約することによって、レビューにおける思考の流れをコード化する新規の確率的グラフィカルモデルを設計します。 私たちは、裏付けとなる意見を見つけるために、語彙的および意味的な類似性の両方を考慮する類似性測定を導き出します。 TripAdvisorホテルのレビューとYelpレストランのレビューの実験では、当社のモデルは既存の意見をモデリングする方法よりも優れており、提案されたフレームワークは裏付けとなる意見を見つけるのに効果的であることが示されています。', 'zh': '用户以论文生品服务,率多端揆,至有矛盾。 此使用户难知论议之论,普有偏见也。 臣等论议求赞。 臣等建SURF之框架,当框架先定论中之议,而后求类于他论。 设新概率图形模型,执意为之,题情维度合,虑其偏好,审其实质,约束连论片段之间编码论其思想流。 臣等推导出一相似性量,当度其词汇与语义相似性,以求其助。 TripAdvisor酒肆论Yelp餐厅之实验,吾形优于今建模术,而所建框架有效。', 'hi': 'समीक्षाओं के रूप में उत्पादों और सेवाओं के बारे में उपयोगकर्ता द्वारा उत्पन्न सामग्री अक्सर विविध और यहां तक कि विरोधाभासी भी होती है। इससे उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए यह जानना मुश्किल हो जाता है कि समीक्षा में कोई राय प्रचलित है या पक्षपातपूर्ण है। हम समीक्षाओं के संदर्भ में सहायक राय की खोज की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम SURF नामक एक ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो पहले एक समीक्षा में व्यक्त की गई राय की पहचान करता है, और फिर अन्य समीक्षाओं से समान राय पाता है। हम एक उपन्यास संभाव्य ग्राफिकल मॉडल डिजाइन करते हैं जो पहलू, विषय और भावना आयामों के संयोजन के रूप में राय को कैप्चर करता है, व्यक्तिगत लेखकों की प्राथमिकताओं के साथ-साथ समीक्षा के तहत इकाई की गुणवत्ता को ध्यान में रखता है, और लगातार समीक्षा खंडों के बीच पहलू वितरण को गतिशील रूप से बाधित करके समीक्षा में विचारों के प्रवाह को एन्कोड करता है। हम एक समानता उपाय प्राप्त करते हैं जो सहायक राय खोजने के लिए लेक्सिकल और शब्दार्थ समानता दोनों पर विचार करता है। TripAdvisor होटल समीक्षाओं और येल्प रेस्तरां समीक्षाओं पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल मॉडलिंग राय के लिए मौजूदा तरीकों से बेहतर है, और प्रस्तावित ढांचा सहायक राय खोजने में प्रभावी है।', 'ru': 'Сформированный пользователями контент о товарах и услугах в виде отзывов часто бывает разнообразным и даже противоречивым. Это затрудняет для пользователей выяснение того, является ли мнение в обзоре преобладающим или предвзятым. Изучаем проблему поиска обосновывающих мнений в контексте отзывов. Мы предлагаем структуру под названием SURF, которая сначала определяет мнения, выраженные в обзоре, а затем находит аналогичные мнения из других обзоров. Мы разрабатываем новую вероятностную графическую модель, которая фиксирует мнения как сочетание аспектов, тем и настроений, учитывает предпочтения отдельных авторов, а также качество рассматриваемого субъекта и кодирует поток мыслей в обзоре, ограничивая динамическое распределение аспектов среди последовательных сегментов обзора. Мы получаем меру сходства, которая учитывает как лексическое, так и семантическое сходство, чтобы найти подтверждающие мнения. Эксперименты с обзорами отелей TripAdvisor и ресторанов Yelp показывают, что наша модель превосходит существующие методы моделирования мнений, и предлагаемая структура эффективна в поиске подтверждающих мнений.', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhíonn ábhar a ghintear ag úsáideoirí faoi tháirgí agus seirbhísí i bhfoirm athbhreithnithe éagsúil agus fiú salach ar a chéile. Mar sin bíonn sé deacair d’úsáideoirí a fháil amach an bhfuil tuairim in athbhreithniú forleithne nó claonta. Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le tuairimí tacaíochta a chuardach i gcomhthéacs athbhreithnithe. Molaimid creat ar a dtugtar SURF, a shainaithníonn ar dtús tuairimí a cuireadh in iúl in athbhreithniú, agus ansin a aimsíonn tuairimí comhchosúla ó athbhreithnithe eile. Dearaímid múnla grafach nua-dhóchúil a ghlacann tuairimí mar mheascán de thoisí gné, topaicí agus meon, a chuireann san áireamh roghanna na n-údar aonair, chomh maith le cáilíocht an eintitis faoi athbhreithniú, agus a ionchódaíonn sreabhadh smaointe in athbhreithniú. tríd an dáileadh gné a shrianadh go dinimiciúil i measc na míreanna athbhreithnithe leantacha. Dírímid beart cosúlachta a bhreithníonn cosúlachtaí foclóireachta agus shéimeantach araon chun teacht ar thuairimí tacaíochta. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar athbhreithnithe óstán TripAdvisor agus athbhreithnithe ar bhialanna Yelp go sáraíonn ár samhail na modhanna atá ann cheana féin chun tuairimí a shamhaltú, agus tá an creat molta éifeachtach chun tuairimí tacaíochta a aimsiú.', 'el': 'Το περιεχόμενο που δημιουργείται από τους χρήστες σχετικά με τα προϊόντα και τις υπηρεσίες με τη μορφή αξιολογήσεων είναι συχνά ποικίλο και ακόμη και αντιφατικό. Αυτό καθιστά δύσκολο για τους χρήστες να γνωρίζουν αν μια άποψη σε μια κριτική είναι διαδεδομένη ή προκατειλημμένη. Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της αναζήτησης υποστηρικτικών γνωμοδοτήσεων στο πλαίσιο των αναθεωρήσεων. Προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο που ονομάζεται το οποίο προσδιορίζει πρώτα τις απόψεις που εκφράζονται σε μια ανασκόπηση και στη συνέχεια βρίσκει παρόμοιες απόψεις από άλλες αναθεωρήσεις. Σχεδιάζουμε ένα νέο πιθανό γραφικό μοντέλο που συλλαμβάνει απόψεις ως συνδυασμό διαστάσεων πτυχής, θέματος και συναισθημάτων, λαμβάνει υπόψη τις προτιμήσεις των επιμέρους συγγραφέων, καθώς και την ποιότητα της υπό εξέταση οντότητας και κωδικοποιεί τη ροή σκέψεων σε μια ανασκόπηση περιορίζοντας δυναμικά την κατανομή πτυχών μεταξύ διαδοχικών τμημάτων ανασκόπησης. Παράγουμε ένα μέτρο ομοιότητας που εξετάζει τόσο τη λεξική όσο και τη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα για να βρούμε υποστηρικτικές απόψεις. Τα πειράματα σε κριτικές ξενοδοχείων και κριτικές εστιατορίων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους μοντελοποίησης απόψεων και το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο είναι αποτελεσματικό στην εύρεση υποστηρικτικών απόψεων.', 'hu': 'A felhasználók által termékekről és szolgáltatásokról létrehozott értékelések formájában létrehozott tartalom gyakran változatos, sőt ellentmondásos. Ez megnehezíti a felhasználók számára annak megtudását, hogy egy értékelésben szereplő vélemény elterjedt-e vagy elfogult-e. Tanulmányozzuk a támogató vélemények keresésének problémáját a felülvizsgálatok összefüggésében. Javasoljuk a SURF nevű keretrendszert, amely először azonosítja a felülvizsgálatban kifejezett véleményeket, majd hasonló véleményeket talál más véleményekből. Egy új valószínűségi grafikai modellt tervezünk, amely a véleményeket aspektus-, téma- és érzelmi dimenziók kombinációjaként rögzíti, figyelembe veszi az egyes szerzők preferenciáit, valamint a vizsgált entitás minőségét, és a gondolatok áramlását egy áttekintésben kódolja azáltal, hogy dinamikusan korlátozza az aspekteloszlást egymást követő áttekintési szegmensek között. Olyan hasonlósági mértéket vezetünk le, amely mind a lexikai, mind a szemantikai hasonlóságot figyelembe veszi, hogy alátámasztó véleményeket találjon. A TripAdvisor hotelértékelésekkel és Yelp éttermekkel kapcsolatos értékelésekkel kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja a meglévő vélemények modellezésére szolgáló módszereket, és a javasolt keretrendszer hatékony a támogató vélemények megtalálásában.', 'it': "I contenuti generati dagli utenti su prodotti e servizi sotto forma di recensioni sono spesso diversi e persino contraddittori. Questo rende difficile per gli utenti sapere se un'opinione in una recensione è prevalente o di parte. Studiamo il problema della ricerca di opinioni di supporto nel contesto delle recensioni. Proponiamo un framework chiamato SURF, che identifica prima le opinioni espresse in una recensione, e poi trova opinioni simili da altre recensioni. Progettiamo un nuovo modello grafico probabilistico che cattura le opinioni come una combinazione di dimensioni di aspetto, argomento e sentiment, prende in considerazione le preferenze dei singoli autori, così come la qualità dell'entità in esame, e codifica il flusso di pensieri in una recensione limitando dinamicamente la distribuzione degli aspetti tra segmenti di revisione successivi. Ne deriva una misura di somiglianza che considera sia la somiglianza lessicale che semantica per trovare opinioni di sostegno. Esperimenti sulle recensioni degli hotel TripAdvisor e sulle recensioni dei ristoranti Yelp mostrano che il nostro modello supera i metodi esistenti per modellare le opinioni e il framework proposto è efficace nel trovare opinioni di supporto.", 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი გამოყენებულია პროდისტების და სერვისების შესახებ განსხვავებული და კონტერექტორია. ეს ძალიან რთულია, რომ მომხმარებელი იცოდნენ თუ არა განსხვავებაში მნიშვნელობა განსხვავებულია ან განსხვავებულია. ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ პრობლემა, რომელიც განახლებების კონტექსტში მხარდაჭირება. ჩვენ გვეძლევა სახელი SURF, რომელიც პირველად განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულებები, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულებაში, და შემდეგ იგივე განსაზღვრებულებები ს ჩვენ პრომენტის შესაბამისი გრაფიკალური მოდელის შექმნა, რომელიც აპექტირების, თემენტის და სენტიმენტის განზომილებების კომბინეციაციის კომბინეციაციას შევხედავთ ინდიველური ავტორების პროგრამეტების, რომელიც შევხედავთ განზომილების კომბინეციაციას ჩვენ განვითარებთ სხვადასხვა მაზი, რომელიც ვფიქრობს ლექსიკალური და სენმანტიური სხვადასხვა, რომელიც ძალიან მხარდაჭერების მიღება. ექსპერიმენტები TripAdvisor ჰოტელის რეცენტირების და Yelp რესტორანში რეცენტირების რეცენტირების რესპერიმენტებით ჩვენი მოდელის მონაცემენტებით უფრო გავაკეთება არსებობს მოდელირების მონაცე', 'kk': 'Пайдаланушысы жасалған продукттар мен қызметтер түрінде көбірек әртүрлі және әртүрлі. Бұл пайдаланушылардың түсініктерінің көпшілігі не көпшілікті болғанын білуі қиын болады. Біз сұхбаттарды қолдау үшін іздеу мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз SURF деп аталатын фреймді таңдаймыз. Бұл біріншіден тексерілген мәліметтерді анықтайды, содан кейін басқалардың ұқсас мәліметтерін табылады. Біз мәліметтерді аспекті, нақышты және сезімдік өлшемдері ретінде түсіндіретін романдық ықтималдық графикалық моделін құрастырамыз, әрбір авторлардың параметрлерін, және қарайтын мақсаттың сапатын сәйкестігін қарап, сәйкес қарау сегменттерінің динамикалық түсіндірім Біз тек лексикалық және семантикалық ұқсас ойларды табу үшін ұқсас өлшемін түсіндіреміз. TripAdvisor Hotel рецензиясы және Yelp ресторантың рецензиясының тәжірибелері біздің моделіміздің мәліметтерін моделдіру әдістерінен арналған тәжірибелерін көрсетеді, және таңдалған бағдарламаларды қолдау үші', 'lt': 'Vartotojų sukauptas turinys apie produktus ir paslaugas peržiūros forma dažnai yra įvairus ir netgi prieštarauja. Dėl to vartotojams sunku žinoti, ar peržiūros nuomonė yra plačiai paplitusi arba šališka. Mes nagrinėjame klausimą, susijusią su nuomonių palaikymu peržiūrų kontekste. Siūlome sistemą, vadinamą SURF, kurioje pirmiausia nurodomos peržiūroje išreikštos nuomonės, o vėliau pateikiamos panašios kitų peržiūrų nuomonės. Sukuriame naują probabilistinį grafinį model į, kuriame apibūdinamos nuomonės kaip aspektų, teminių ir jausmų matmenų derinys, atsižvelgiama į atskirų autorių pageidavimus, taip pat į peržiūrėto subjekto kokybę ir koduojamas minčių srautas peržiūroje, dinamiškai apribojant aspektų pasiskirstymą tarp peržiūros segmentų. Mes gauname panašumo priemonę, kuri vertina tiek tekstinį, tiek semantinį panašumą, kaip ir patvirtinančias nuomones. TripAdvisor viešbučių apžvalgų ir Yelp restoranų apžvalgų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų model is atitinka esamus nuomonių modeliavimo metodus, o siūloma sistema yra veiksminga ieškant patvirtinamųjų nuomonių.', 'mk': 'Корисникот генерира содржина за производите и услугите во форма на рецензии честопати се различни и дури и контрадикторни. Ова им овозможува на корисниците да знаат дали мислењето во прегледот е превентивно или пристрасно. Го проучуваме проблемот со барањето поддршка за мислењата во контекст на рецензиите. Предложуваме рамка наречена СУРФ, која прво ги идентификува мислењата изразени во преглед, а потоа ги пронајде сличните мислења од другите прегледи. Ние дизајнираме нов веројатен графички модел кој ги прифаќа мислењата како комбинација на аспекти, тема и чувства димензии, ги зема во предвид преференциите на индивидуалните автори, како и квалитетот на ентитетот кој се прегледа, и го кодира текот на мислите во преглед со ограничување на дистрибуцијата на аспектот динамично помеѓу Добиваме сличност која смета за лексикална и семантична сличност за да најдеме поддржувачки мислења. Експериментите на рецензиите на хотелот TripAdvisor и рецензиите на ресторанот Јелп покажуваат дека нашиот модел ги надминува постојните методи за моделирање на мислењата, а предложената рамка е ефикасна во пронаоѓањето поддржувачки мислења.', 'ms': 'Kandungan yang dijana oleh pengguna mengenai produk dan perkhidmatan dalam bentuk ulasan sering berbeza dan bahkan bertentangan. Ini membuat ia sukar bagi pengguna untuk mengetahui jika pendapat dalam ulasan adalah prevalent atau biased. Kami mempelajari masalah mencari pendapat sokongan dalam konteks ulasan. Kami melamar kerangka bernama SURF, yang pertama mengenalpasti pendapat yang diungkapkan dalam ulasan, dan kemudian mendapati pendapat yang sama dari ulasan lain. Kami merancang model grafik kemungkinan baru yang menangkap pendapat sebagai kombinasi aspek, topik dan dimensi sentimen, mempertimbangkan keutamaan penulis individu, serta kualiti entiti yang sedang diulang, dan mengekodkan aliran fikiran dalam ulasan dengan mengharamkan distribusi aspek secara dinamik diantara segmen ulasan berturut-turut. Kita dapat ukuran persamaan yang mempertimbangkan persamaan lexik dan semantik untuk mencari pendapat yang mendukung. Eksperimen mengenai ulasan hotel TripAdvisor dan ulasan restoran Yelp menunjukkan bahawa model kami melampaui kaedah sedia ada untuk mendamalkan pendapat, dan kerangka yang direncanakan adalah berkesan dalam mencari pendapat sokongan.', 'mt': 'Il-kontenut iġġenerat mill-utent dwar il-prodotti u s-servizzi fil-forma ta’ reviżjonijiet ta’ spiss huwa varjat u saħansitra kontradittorju. Dan jagħmilha diffiċli għall-utenti li jkunu jafu jekk opinjoni f’reviżjoni hijiex prevalenti jew preġudikata. Aħna nistudjaw il-problema tat-tfittxija għal opinjonijiet ta’ appoġġ fil-kuntest tar-reviżjonijiet. Aħna nipproponu qafas imsejjaħ SURF, li l-ewwel jidentifika l-opinjonijiet espressi f’reviżjoni, u mbagħad isib opinjonijiet simili minn reviżjonijiet oħra. Aħna niddisinjaw mudell grafiku probabilistiku ġdid li jinkludi l-opinjonijiet bħala kombinazzjoni ta’ dimensjonijiet ta’ aspett, suġġett u sentiment, li jqisu l-preferenzi tal-awturi individwali, kif ukoll il-kwalità tal-entità taħt reviżjoni, u jikkodifika l-fluss ta’ ħsibijiet f’reviżjoni billi jirrestrinġi d-distribuzzjoni tal-aspett b’mod dinamiku fost is-segmenti suċċessivi ta’ reviżjoni. Aħna nidderivaw miżura ta’ similarità li tikkunsidra kemm similarità lexika kif ukoll semantika biex jinstabu opinjonijiet ta’ appoġġ. L-esperimenti dwar ir-reviżjonijiet tal-lukandi TripAdvisor u r-reviżjonijiet tar-ristoranti Yelp juru li l-mudell tagħna jaqbeż il-metodi eżistenti għall-immudellar tal-opinjonijiet, u l-qafas propost huwa effettiv fis-sejba ta’ opinjonijiet ta’ appoġġ.', 'ml': 'പരിശോധന രൂപത്തില്\u200d ഉള്ള വസ്തുക്കളെയും സേവനങ്ങളെയും കുറിച്ച് ഉപയോക്താവ് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഉള്ളടക്കം പല ഇത് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു നിരീക്ഷണത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു അഭിപ്രായം മുന്\u200dഗണനാണോ അല ആശയങ്ങളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശുര്\u200dഫ് എന്നൊരു ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊജക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ആദ്യം ഒരു പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന അഭിപ്രായങ് We design a novel probabilistic graphical model that captures opinions as a combination of aspect, topic and sentiment dimensions, takes into account the preferences of individual authors, as well as the quality of the entity under review, and encodes the flow of thoughts in a review by constraining the aspect distribution dynamically among successive review segments.  പിന്നെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമുക്ക് ഒരു തുല്യമായ ഒരു അളവ് കിട്ടുന്നു. ട്രിപ്പ് ഹോട്ടലിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, യെല്\u200dഫ് റെസ്റ്റോറന്റ് പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ മോഡില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d', 'pl': 'Treści generowane przez użytkowników na temat produktów i usług w postaci recenzji są często zróżnicowane, a nawet sprzeczne. Utrudnia to użytkownikom ustalenie, czy opinia w recenzji jest powszechna lub stronnicza. Badamy problem poszukiwania opinii wspierających w kontekście recenzji. Proponujemy ramy o nazwie SURF, która najpierw identyfikuje opinie wyrażone w recenzji, a następnie znajduje podobne opinie z innych recenzji. Projektujemy nowy probabilistyczny model graficzny, który uwzględnia opinie jako kombinację wymiarów aspektów, tematów i sentymentów, uwzględnia preferencje poszczególnych autorów, jak również jakość badanego podmiotu oraz koduje przepływ myśli w recenzji poprzez dynamiczne ograniczanie dystrybucji aspektów między kolejnymi segmentami recenzji. Wyprowadzamy miarę podobieństwa, która uwzględnia zarówno podobieństwo leksykalne, jak i semantyczne, aby znaleźć opinie popierające. Eksperymenty na temat recenzji hoteli TripAdvisor i recenzji restauracji Yelp pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa istniejące metody modelowania opinii, a proponowane ramy są skuteczne w znalezieniu opinii popierających.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчид бүтээгдэхүүний болон үйлчилгээний тухай бүтээгдэхүүний тухай бүтээгдэхүүнийг шийдвэрлэх хэлбэрээр ихэвчлэн өөр, тэр ч эсрэг байдаг. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчид шийдвэрлэлт дээр үзэл бодол өргөн эсвэл өргөн байдлыг мэдэх нь хэцүү. Бид үнэлгээний тухай хайж байгаа асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид СУРФ гэдэг хэлбэрийг санал дэвшүүлдэг. Эхлээд шинэчлэлд илэрхийлэгдсэн санаануудыг тодорхойлж, дараа нь бусад шинэчлэлээс төстэй санаануудыг олох болно. Бид өөрсдийн зохиолчдын сонирхолтой боломжтой график загварыг зохион байгуулдаг шинэ шинэ магадлалтай загварын загвар бүтээж, ойлголтыг асуудлын, сэтгэл санааны хэмжээсүүдийн хоорондоо холбогдож, өөрсдийн зохиолчдын сонирхолтой болон шалгаж буй бүтээгдэхүүний сайн чанарыг тооцоолж Бид хэлэлцээний болон семантийн адилхан хэмжээсүүдийг дэмжиж буй санаануудыг олох гэж боддог. TripAdvisor хотын шалгалтын туршилтын туршилт, Yelp ресторан шалгалтын туршилт нь бидний загвар нь ойлголтын загварын арга загварын арга загварын үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ санал дэвшүүлсэн хэмжээст нь ойлголтыг дэмжих болом', 'no': 'Brukar generert innhald om produkt og tenester i form av revisjonar er ofte forskjellig og til og med kontradiktorar. Dette gjer det vanskeleg for brukarar å vite om eit opplysning i ei gjennomgang er utbredt eller forstådd. Vi studerer problemet med å søkja etter å støtta opinionar i konteksten av oversiktar. Vi foreslår eit rammeverk som kalles SURF, som først identifiserer opinionar uttrykt i ei oversikt, og så finner likevel opinionar frå andre oversiktar. Vi designerer eit nytt sannsynlig grafisk modell som hentar tankar som eit kombinasjon av aspekt, emne og sentimentdimensjonar, hentar opp innstillingane av individuelle forfattarane, og kvaliteten til entitetet som vert gjennomsikt, og koderer flytten av tankar i ei gjennomsikt ved å begrense aspektfordelinga dynamisk blant etterspåverkssegment. Vi deriverer ein tilsvarende mål som ser både leksisk og semantisk liknande for å finna støttande meningar. Eksperimentar om gjennomgang av TripAdvisor-hotel og gjennomgang av Yelp-restaurant viser at modellen vår utfører eksisterande metoder for modellering av opinionar, og den foreslåde rammeverket er effektivt i å finna støtte opinionar.', 'ro': 'Conținutul generat de utilizatori despre produse și servicii sub formă de recenzii este adesea divers și chiar contradictoriu. Acest lucru face dificil pentru utilizatori să știe dacă o opinie dintr-o recenzie este predominantă sau părtinitoare. Studiem problema căutării de opinii susținătoare în contextul recenziilor. Propunem un cadru numit SURF, care identifică mai întâi opiniile exprimate într-o revizuire, apoi găsește opinii similare din alte recenzii. Proiectăm un nou model grafic probabilistic care captează opiniile ca o combinație de dimensiuni de aspect, subiect și sentiment, ia în considerare preferințele autorilor individuali, precum și calitatea entității examinate și codifică fluxul de gânduri într-o revizuire prin constrângerea dinamică a distribuției aspectelor între segmentele succesive de revizuire. Provinem o măsură de similitudine care ia în considerare atât similitudinea lexicală, cât și semantică pentru a găsi opinii susținătoare. Experimentele privind recenziile hotelurilor TripAdvisor și recenziile restaurantelor Yelp arată că modelul nostru depășește metodele existente de modelare a opiniilor, iar cadrul propus este eficient în găsirea opiniilor susținătoare.', 'sr': 'Korisnik je proizveo sadržaj o proizvodima i uslugama u obliku pregleda često su različiti i čak i kontradiktorni. To je teško da korisnici saznaju da li je mišljenje u pregledu prevaleno ili predrasude. Proučavamo problem pretraživanja mišljenja u kontekstu pregleda. Predlažemo okvir koji se zove SURF, koji prvi put identifikuje mišljenje izražene u pregledu, a zatim pronađe slične mišljenje iz drugih pregleda. Mi dizajniramo nov verovatnoj grafički model koji uključuje mišljenje kao kombinaciju aspekta, tema i dimenzija sentiment a, uzima u obzir preferencije pojedinih autora, kao i kvalitetu pregledanog entiteta, i kodira tok razmišljanja u pregledu, ograničavajući dinamički distribuciju aspekta između poslednjih segmenta preglede. Izvodimo sličnu mjeru koja smatra leksičkom i semantičkom sličnošću da pronađemo podrške mišljenja. Eksperimenti o pregledima hotela TripAdvisora i pregledima Yelp restorana pokazuju da naš model iznosi postojeće metode modelizacije mišljenja, a predloženi okvir je efikasan u pronalaženju podrške mišljenja.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා නිර්මාණය සහ සේවය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය සාමාන්\u200dය මේක පාවිච්චිකරුවන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්නම් අමාරුයි. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි SURF කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, මෙයා පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ අනිත් ප්\u200dරශ් අපි නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසික ග්\u200dරාෆිකල් මොඩේල් එකක් හොයාගන්න පිළිබඳු විදිහට, විදිහට, විදිහට සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයන්ගේ අභ්\u200dයාසය, සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයේ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම ලෙක්සිකාලි සහ සාමාන්තික වගේම සාමාන්තික විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා. Tripadvissor හෝටල් පරීක්ෂණය සහ Yelp රෙස්ටෝරෑන්ට් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ මෝඩේල් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dර', 'sv': 'Användargenererat innehåll om produkter och tjänster i form av recensioner är ofta skiftande och till och med motsägelsefullt. Detta gör det svårt för användare att veta om en åsikt i en recension är utbredd eller partisk. Vi studerar problemet med att söka efter stödjande åsikter i samband med recensioner. Vi föreslår ett ramverk som kallas SURF, som först identifierar åsikter som uttrycks i en recension, och sedan hittar liknande åsikter från andra recensioner. Vi utformar en ny probabilistisk grafisk modell som fångar åsikter som en kombination av aspekt-, ämne- och sentimentdimensioner, tar hänsyn till individuella författares preferenser, liksom kvaliteten på den enhet som granskas, och kodar tankeflödet i en granskning genom att begränsa aspektfördelningen dynamiskt mellan olika granskningssegment. Vi härleder en likhetsmått som beaktar både lexikal och semantisk likhet för att hitta stödjande åsikter. Experiment på TripAdvisor hotellomdömen och Yelp restaurangrecensioner visar att vår modell överträffar befintliga metoder för att modellera åsikter, och det föreslagna ramverket är effektivt när det gäller att hitta stödjande åsikter.', 'so': 'Isticmaaluhu wuxuu sameeyay macluumaad ku saabsan alaabta iyo adeegyada qaabka baaritaanka inta badan waa kala duwan yihiin, xataa iskala duwan. Taasi waa adag tahay in isticmaalayaasha ay ogaadaan in fikir baaritaanku uu yahay mid horumar ah ama la khilaafsan yahay. Waxaynu baranaynaa dhibaatada raadinta aragtida kaalmeynta marka lagu jiro baaritaanka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal SURF la yidhaahdo, kaas oo marka ugu horeysa aqoonsanaya fikrada lagu qoray baaritaanka, kadibna waxaynu helnaa fikrada la mid ah oo ka timaada baaritaanka kale. Waxaynu qornaa muusiko sawir ah oo ku qoran aragtida sida isku xiran dhinaca, mada iyo xisaabta, waxaana xisaabinayaa doorashada qof-ka-qoran, sidoo kale qiimaha waxyaabaha laga fiiriyo, waxaana ku qornaa baaritaanka fikirrada si loo fiiriyo marka loo dhiso qaybaha dabagalka ah. Waxaynu helaynaa qiyaastii isku mid ah oo ka fikiraya isku mid ah aragtida caawinta. Imtixaanka TripAdvisor hotel ka baaraandegista iyo kuriinka restauranteen Yelp waxay muujiyaan in modellkayagu uu sameeyo qaababka joogta ah oo uu sameynayo aragtida, waxaana ka shaqeynayaa in uu helo aragtida taageerada.', 'ta': 'பார்வையின் முறைமையில் பொருள் மற்றும் சேவைகள் பற்றி பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பொருள்களை பொருளாகவும் வித்திய இது பரிசோதனையில் ஒரு கருத்து முன்னோக்கமாக அல்லது பொருத்தமாக இருக்கிறதா என்று பயனர்களுக்கு தெரியும் கடினமா நாங்கள் முன்னோக்குதல் பொருளில் தேடும் கருத்துக்களை ஆதரிக்கும் பிரச்சனையை படிக்கிறோம். SURF என்ற ஒரு சட்டத்தை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது முதலில் ஒரு முறையாக குறிப்பிட்ட கருத்துக்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும், பின்னர நாம் ஒரு புதிய சாத்தியமான வரைகலை மாதிரி வடிவமைக்கிறோம். அது கருத்துக்களை ஒரு கூட்டு, தலைப்பு மற்றும் உணர்வு அளவுகளாக எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறது, தனிப்பட்ட ஆசிரியர்களின் முன்னுரிமைகளை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறது, மற்று நாம் ஒரு சமமான அளவை கிடைத்துள்ளோம் அது துணைபுரிந்த கருத்துக்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும். Experiments on TripAdvisor hotel reviews and Yelp restaurant reviews show that our model outperforms existing methods for modeling opinions, and the proposed framework is effective in finding supporting opinions.', 'ur': 'کارساز نے اثرات اور خدمات کے بارے میں منصفات پیدا کئے ہیں اور اثر مختلف اور مخالف ہیں۔ یہ کاربران کے لئے مشکل ہے کہ یہ جان لیں کہ کسی نظر میں پھیلا یا غیر منظور ہے. ہم نظریوں کے بارے میں نظریوں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے تلاش کرنے کے مسئلہ کی تلاش کرتے ہیں. ہم ایک فرمود پیش کریں گے جن کا نام SURF ہے، جو پہلی بار ایک روشنی میں بیان کیا گیا ہے اور پھر دوسری روشنی سے برابر نظریں پائیں گے۔ ہم ایک نوم احتمالات گرافیکی موڈل طراحی کرتے ہیں جو نظریوں کو اثر، موضوع اور احساسات کی ترکیب کے طور پر پکڑتا ہے، ایک شخصی لکھنے والوں کی ترجیح اور تحقیق کے ذریعہ کی کیفیت کے ذریعہ سے حساب کرتا ہے، اور نظریوں کی روشنی کو ایک روشنی میں تغییر دیتا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے اثر تغییر کے ذریعہ سے تغییر دینا ہم ایک مثال کے اندازے لکھ رہے ہیں جو زبانی اور سیمانتی مثال کو دیکھ رہے ہیں TripAdvisor Hotel reviews اور Yelp restaurant reviews کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل موجود منظوروں کے مطابق موجود طریقے سے کام لیتا ہے، اور پیش کیا گیا فرمود نظر کی مدد کرنے کے لئے اثر ہے.', 'uz': "Name Name Koʻrib chiqishni qoʻllash uchun fikrlarni qidirish muammosini o'rganamiz. Biz SURF deb nomli freymni taqdimiz, birinchi narsalarni taqdim qiladi va keyin boshqa taʼminlovchidagi fikrlarni topadi. Biz yaxshi grafik modelini yaratib, ma'lum va hissiyot shakllarini birlashtirish mumkin, shaxsiy mualliflarning parametrlarini va taʼminlovchi narsalarning sifatini hisoblash mumkin, va o'zgarishga ega bo'lgan narsalarning sifatini hisoblash mumkin, va o'ylab chiqarish usulini muvaffaqiyatli o'zgartirish orqali o'ylab turadi. Biz o'ylab, leksikal va semantik fikrlarini qo'llash qo'llanmagan fikrlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. TripAdvisor hotel' ni tahrirlash va Yelp restaurant' ni tahrirlash imtiyozlarini koʻrsatish mumkin. modelimiz modellash uchun mavjud usullarni bajaradi, va talab qilingan freym fikrlarini qoʻllash uchun qoʻllanmagan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Người dùng cung cấp nội dung về sản phẩm và dịch vụ dưới dạng đánh giá thường rất đa dạng và có mâu thuẫn. Việc này làm cho người dùng khó biết liệu ý kiến của người xem xét có phổ biến hay thiên vị không. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề tìm kiếm những ý kiến hỗ trợ trong những bài kiểm tra. Chúng tôi đề xuất một khung cảnh gọi là Quỹ dự phòng, trước tiên xác định những ý kiến được đưa ra trong một cuộc kiểm tra, sau đó tìm thấy những ý kiến tương tự từ các cuộc phỏng vấn khác. Chúng tôi thiết kế một mô hình thể xác minh mới có hình ảnh chụp ý kiến như một sự kết hợp các chiều giao tiếp, chủ đề và các chiều cảm xúc, cân nhắc các sở thích cá nhân, cũng như chất lượng của thực thể đang xem xét, và mã hóa dòng chảy của tư tưởng trong một bài kiểm tra bằng cách hạn chế các phân phối hình thể theo nhịp đập. Chúng tôi nhận ra một thước đo tương đồng xem xét nét văn bản và ngữ pháp giống nhau là tìm ra quan điểm ủng hộ. Thí nghiệm về đánh giá khách sạn Trip Cố vấn và đánh giá nhà hàng trên Yelp cho thấy rằng mô hình của chúng tôi hoàn thiện các phương pháp để người mẫu ý kiến, và những khung cảnh đã đề xuất có hiệu quả trong việc tìm kiếm ý kiến.', 'bg': 'Създадено от потребителите съдържание за продукти и услуги под формата на рецензии често е разнообразно и дори противоречиво. Това затруднява потребителите да знаят дали мнението в даден преглед е преобладаващо или предубедено. Проучваме проблема с търсенето на подкрепящи становища в контекста на прегледите. Предлагаме рамка, наречена СРФ, която първо идентифицира мненията, изразени в преглед, а след това намира подобни мнения от други прегледи. Ние проектираме нов вероятностен графичен модел, който улавя мненията като комбинация от аспекти, теми и сентименти измерения, взема предвид предпочитанията на отделните автори, както и качеството на разглеждания обект, и кодира потока от мисли в преглед чрез ограничаване динамично разпределението на аспектите между последователните сегменти на рецензиите. Извличаме мярка за сходство, която отчита както лексикалното, така и семантичното сходство, за да намерим подкрепящи мнения. Експериментите на хотелските рецензии и отзивите на ресторантите показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда съществуващите методи за моделиране на мнения, а предложената рамка е ефективна при намирането на подкрепящи мнения.', 'da': 'Brugernes indhold om produkter og tjenester i form af anmeldelser er ofte forskelligartet og endda modstridende. Dette gør det vanskeligt for brugerne at vide, om en mening i en anmeldelse er udbredt eller partisk. Vi undersøger problemet med at søge efter støttende udtalelser i forbindelse med anmeldelser. Vi foreslår en ramme kaldet SURF, der først identificerer meninger udtrykt i en anmeldelse, og derefter finder lignende meninger fra andre anmeldelser. Vi designer en ny sandsynligvis grafisk model, der indfanger meninger som en kombination af aspekt-, emne- og sentimentdimensioner, tager højde for individuelle forfatteres præferencer samt kvaliteten af den gennemgåede enhed, og koder strømmen af tanker i en anmeldelse ved at begrænse aspektfordelingen dynamisk mellem på hinanden følgende anmeldelsesegmenter. Vi udleder en lighedsmåling, der tager hensyn til både leksikisk og semantisk lighed for at finde understøttende meninger. Eksperimenter med TripAdvisor-hotelanmeldelser og Yelp-restaurantanmeldelser viser, at vores model overgår eksisterende metoder til modellering af meninger, og de foreslåede rammer er effektive til at finde understøttende meninger.', 'nl': 'Gebruikers gegenereerde content over producten en diensten in de vorm van reviews is vaak divers en zelfs tegenstrijdig. Dit maakt het moeilijk voor gebruikers om te weten of een mening in een review overheersend of bevooroordeeld is. We bestuderen het probleem van het zoeken naar ondersteunende meningen in het kader van beoordelingen. We stellen een raamwerk voor genaamd SURF, dat eerst meningen identificeert die in een review zijn uitgedrukt, en vervolgens soortgelijke meningen van andere beoordelingen vindt. We ontwerpen een nieuw probabilistisch grafisch model dat meningen vastlegt als een combinatie van aspect-, onderwerp- en sentimentdimensies, rekening houdt met de voorkeuren van individuele auteurs, evenals de kwaliteit van de onderzochte entiteit, en codeert de gedachtestroom in een review door de aspectverdeling dynamisch te beperken tussen opeenvolgende beoordelingssegmenten. We leiden een gelijkenismaat af die zowel lexicale als semantische gelijkenis overweegt om ondersteunende meningen te vinden. Experimenten met TripAdvisor-hotelbeoordelingen en Yelp-restaurantbeoordelingen tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan bestaande methoden voor het modelleren van meningen, en dat het voorgestelde kader effectief is bij het vinden van ondersteunende meningen.', 'hr': 'Korisnik proizveden sadržaj o proizvodima i uslugama u obliku pregleda često su različiti i čak i suprotstavni. To je teško za korisnike znati da li je mišljenje u pregledu prevaleno ili predrasude. Proučavamo problem traženja podrške mišljenja u kontekstu pregleda. Predlažemo okvir nazvan SURF, koji prvi put identificira mišljenje izražene u pregledu, a zatim pronalazi slične mišljenje iz drugih pregleda. Mi dizajniramo nov vjerojatni grafički model koji uključuje mišljenje kao kombinaciju aspekta, teme i dimenzija osjećaja, uzimaju u obzir preferencije pojedinih autora, kao i kvalitetu predviđenog subjekta i kodira tok razmišljanja u pregledu ograničavajući dinamički distribuciju aspekta između posljednjih segmenta preglede. Nalazimo sličnu mjeru koja smatra leksičkom i semantičkom sličnošću kako bi pronašli podrške mišljenja. Eksperimenti o pregledima hotela TripAdvisor i pregledima Yelp restorana pokazuju da naš model iznosi postojeće metode modeliranja mišljenja, a predloženi okvir je učinkovit u pronalaženju podrške mišljenja.', 'de': 'Nutzergenerierte Inhalte zu Produkten und Dienstleistungen in Form von Bewertungen sind oft vielfältig und sogar widersprüchlich. Dies macht es für Benutzer schwierig zu wissen, ob eine Meinung in einer Bewertung vorherrschend oder voreingenommen ist. Wir untersuchen das Problem der Suche nach unterstützenden Meinungen im Rahmen von Reviews. Wir schlagen ein Framework namens SURF vor, das zuerst Meinungen identifiziert, die in einem Review geäußert wurden, und dann ähnliche Meinungen aus anderen Reviews findet. Wir entwerfen ein neuartiges probabilistisches grafisches Modell, das Meinungen als Kombination aus Aspekt-, Thema- und Sentiment-Dimensionen erfasst, die Präferenzen einzelner Autoren sowie die Qualität der zu prüfenden Entität berücksichtigt und den Gedankenfluss in einer Rezension kodiert, indem die Aspektverteilung dynamisch zwischen aufeinanderfolgenden Review-Segmenten eingeschränkt wird. Wir leiten ein Ähnlichkeitsmaß ab, das sowohl lexikalische als auch semantische Ähnlichkeit berücksichtigt, um unterstützende Meinungen zu finden. Experimente mit TripAdvisor Hotelbewertungen und Yelp Restaurantbewertungen zeigen, dass unser Modell bestehende Methoden zur Modellierung von Meinungen übertrifft und das vorgeschlagene Framework effektiv ist, um unterstützende Meinungen zu finden.', 'id': 'Konten yang dibuat oleh pengguna tentang produk dan layanan dalam bentuk penelitian sering berbeda dan bahkan bertentangan. Ini membuat sulit bagi pengguna untuk mengetahui apakah pendapat dalam penelitian prevalent atau biased. Kami mempelajari masalah mencari pendapat mendukung dalam konteks penelitian. Kami mengusulkan cadangan bernama SURF, yang pertama mengidentifikasi pendapat yang diungkapkan dalam penelitian, dan kemudian menemukan pendapat yang sama dari penelitian lain. Kami merancang model grafis probabilistik yang baru yang menangkap pendapat sebagai kombinasi dari aspek, topik dan dimensi sentimen, mempertimbangkan keutamaan para penulis individu, serta kualitas entitas yang sedang diuji, dan mengkode aliran pikiran dalam penelitian dengan membatasi distribusi aspek secara dinamik diantara segment penelitian berturut-turut. We derive a similarity measure that considers both lexical and semantic similarity to find supporting opinions.  Eksperimen di resensi hotel TripAdvisor dan resensi restoran Yelp menunjukkan bahwa model kita melebihi metode yang ada untuk mendamalkan pendapat, dan cadangan yang diusulkan adalah efektif dalam menemukan pendapat mendukung.', 'ko': '사용자가 평론의 형식으로 생성한 제품과 서비스에 관한 내용은 왕왕 다양하고 심지어 서로 모순된다.이것은 사용자로 하여금 평론 중의 관점이 보편적인지 편견이 있는지 알기 어렵게 한다.우리는 평론에서 지지 의견을 찾는 문제를 연구한다.우리는 먼저 리뷰에서 표현된 관점을 식별한 다음 다른 리뷰에서 비슷한 관점을 찾아내는 SURF라는 프레임을 제시했다.우리는 새로운 확률 도형 모델을 설계했다. 이 모델은 관점을 방면, 주제와 정서적 차원의 조합으로 포획하고 개인 작가의 선호도, 그리고 심사된 실체의 질을 고려했으며 동태적인 제약을 통해 연속 심사 단계 간의 방면 분포를 통해 심사 중의 사상 흐름을 인코딩했다.우리는 어휘와 의미의 유사성을 동시에 고려하는 유사성 도량을 유도하여 지지 의견을 찾았다.TripAdvisor 호텔 평론과 Yelp 식당 평론에서의 실험에 따르면 우리의 모델은 기존의 관점 모델링 방법보다 우수하고 제시된 틀은 지지 관점을 찾는 데 효과적이다.', 'fa': 'استفاده از محتوای تولید شده در مورد محصولات و خدمات در شکل تحقیقات اغلب مختلف و حتی مخالف هستند. این برای کاربران سخت می\u200cکند که بدانند که آیا یک نظر در یک تحقیقات فراوان یا مخالفت است. ما مشکل جستجویی برای پشتیبانی نظر در محیط تحقیقات مطالعه می کنیم. ما یک چهارچوب به نام SURF پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که اولین بار نظریه\u200cها را در یک تحقیق مشخص می\u200cکند، و سپس نظریه\u200cهای مشابه از تحقیقات دیگر را پیدا می\u200cکند. ما یک مدل احتمالات گرافیک رمان را طراحی می کنیم که نظریه\u200cها را به عنوان ترکیب عناصر، موضوع و اندازه\u200cهای احساسات می\u200cگیرد، برگزیده\u200cهای نویسندگان شخصی و کیفیت عناصر تحت تحت تحت تحت تحت تحت تحت تحقیق به نظر می\u200cگیرد، و جریان فکر\u200cها را در یک تحقیق با محدود کردن توزیع عناصر را دینامیک بین بخش\u200cهای ما اندازه\u200cای شبیه\u200cای را می\u200cگیریم که هر دو شبیه\u200cای زبان\u200cشناسی و طبیعی را برای پیدا کردن نظریه\u200cهای پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهایی در مورد تحقیقات هتل TripAdvisor و تحقیقات رستوران Yelp نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما روش\u200cهای موجود موجود برای مدل\u200cسازی نظریه\u200cهای موجود بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد، و این برنامه پیشنهاد در پیدا کردن نظریه\u200cهای پشتیبانی موثر است.', 'sw': 'Mtumiaji alitengeneza maudhui kuhusu bidhaa na huduma katika namna ya kutafiti mara nyingi huwa tofauti na hata tofauti. Hii inafanya vigumu kwa watumiaji kujua kama maoni katika tafiti hiyo ni ya kipekee au upinzani. Tunafoma tatizo la kutafuta maoni katika muktadha wa kutafuta maoni. Tunazipendekeza mfumo unaoitwa SURF, ambao mara ya kwanza unaonyesha maoni yaliyoonyeshwa katika tafiti hiyo, na baadae hupata maoni yanayofanana na yanayotokana na matokeo mengine. Tunaweza kutengeneza mtindo wa picha inayowezekana wa riwaya ambao unachukua maoni kama muunganiko wa dhana, mada na hisia, tunazingatia upendeleo wa waandishi binafsi, pamoja na kiwango cha entity kinachopitiwa na utafiti huo, na unajumuisha utoaji wa mawazo katika tafiti kwa kujenga usambazaji wa mtazamo uliofanywa vibaya kati ya vipengele vya baadae. Tunapata hatua sawa ambazo zinafikiri kuwa ni sawa na hali ya lexico na semi za kimapenzi ili kutafuta maoni yanayounga mkono. Majaribio kuhusu tathmini za hoteli ya TripAdvisor na tathmini za mgahawa wa Yelp zinaonyesha kwamba modeli yetu inaonyesha njia zilizopo kwa ajili ya kutengeneza maoni, na mfumo huu unapendekezwa una ufanisi katika kutafuta maoni yanayounga mkono.', 'af': "Gebruiker genereer inhoud oor produkte en dienste in die vorm van hersienings is dikwels verskeie en selfs teenwoordig. Hierdie maak dit moeilik vir gebruikers om te weet of 'n besondering in 'n hersiening oorvloedig of voorspoedig is. Ons studeer die probleem om te soek vir ondersteun van besonderhede in die konteks van hersiening. Ons voorstel 'n raamwerk genaamd SURF, wat eerste bepalings uitgevoer in 'n hersiening, en dan vind gelyke besonderings van ander hersienings. Ons ontwerp 'n roman waarskynlik grafiese model wat besonderhede as 'n kombinasie van aspekt, onderwerp en sentimente dimensies opneem, neem in rekening die voorkeure van individuele outeure, en die kwaliteit van die entiteit onder hersiening, en kodeer die vloei van gedagtes in 'n hersiening deur die aspekte verspreiding dinamies onder suksesvolle hersiesegmente te beheing. Ons afgelei 'n gelykenis maat wat ook leksiese en semantiese gelykenis beskou om ondersteunde besonderhede te vind. Eksperimente van TripAdvisor hotel hersienings en Yelp restaurant hersienings wys dat ons model uitvoer bestaande metodes vir modellering van besonderhede, en die voorgestelde raamwerk is effektief in te vind ondersteunde besonderhede.", 'tr': 'Ullançylar çykyşlar we häsiýetler barada maksady üretildi. Ullançylaryň habarynyň üstünde ýa-da möhüm bolup geçýändigini bilmekleriniň kynlaşdyrýar. Gözlerin üstüne golaýlaşyk üçin gözlemek kynçylygyny öwrenip otyrys. Biz SURF adly bir çerçew teklip edip, ilkinji gezek review içinde ifade edilen soňra beýleki düşünjeleri tapýar. Biz düşünjeleri aspekt, tema we duýgular boyutlarynyň birleşigine alýan bir roman mümkinçiligi grafik nusgasyny tasarlýarys, we olaryň häzirki awtorlaryň seçeneklerini we revisiýa edilen zadyň keyfiýetini we pikirlerin aklyny görkez we olaryň aspekt daýratyny dinamik görkeýän segmentleriň arasynda süýtgedeniňi kömekleyär. Biz sözleri we semantik meňzeşlikleri golaýlaýan pikirleri tapmak üçin meňzeşlik ölçüsini çykarýarys. TripAdvisor hotely reviewleriniň we Yelp restoran reviewleriniň örän experimentalary biziň modelimiziň meýdany pikirleri modelleşdirmek üçin ýüze çykarýandygyny görkezýär we öngörülenen frameworkyň düşünjelerini tapmakda täsirli däldir.', 'sq': 'Përdoruesit e krijuar përmbajtje rreth prodhimeve dhe shërbimeve në form ën e shqyrtimeve janë shpesh të ndryshme dhe madje kundërshtuese. Kjo i bën të vështirë përdoruesit të dinë nëse një opinion në një përmbledhje është i përhershëm apo i paragjykuar. Ne studiojmë problem in e kërkimit për mbështetjen e opinioneve në kontekstin e shqyrtimeve. Ne propozojmë një kuadër të quajtur SURF, që së pari identifikon opinionet e shprehura në një përmbledhje dhe pastaj gjen opinione të ngjashme nga përmbledhje të tjera. Ne dizajnojmë një model grafik të ri probabilistik që përfshin opinionet si një kombinim të aspekteve, temave dhe dimensioneve të ndjenjave, merr parasysh preferimet e autorëve individual ë si dhe cilësinë e njësisë në shqyrtim dhe kodon rrjedhjen e mendimeve në një shqyrtim duke kufizuar shpërndarjen e aspekteve dinamikisht midis segmenteve të shqyrtimit të vazhdueshëm. We derive a similarity measure that considers both lexical and semantic similarity to find supporting opinions.  Eksperimentet mbi shqyrtimet e hotelit TripAdvisor dhe shqyrtimet e restauranteve Yelp tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron metodat ekzistuese për modelimin e opinioneve dhe kuadri i propozuar është efektiv në gjetjen e opinioneve mbështetëse.', 'am': 'የተጠቃሚ የፍሬዎችን እና አገልግሎቶችን በመመለስ መልክ የተለየ ይዞታሉ፡፡ ይህም የተጠቃሚዎች ማስታወቂያውን ማወቅ ይችላል፡፡ በሁኔታ ላይ አካባቢዎችን ለመደገፍ የመፈለግን ጉዳይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የፊደል አስተያየትን ለመግለጽ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የአባቢው የግራፊካዊ ምሳሌ አካባቢ፣ የውይይት፣ የጉዳዩ እና የስሜት እውቀት አካባቢዎች ምርጫዎችን እና የአካባቢውን ጥሩ እና በጥያቄ በተመለከተው አካሄድ ጥያቄ እና የአሳብን ውጤት ማቀናቀል በጥያቄ ክፍተት በጥያቄ ክፍተት እና የአካባቢውን ውጤት ማነሳቀስ ይዘረጋል፡፡ የልስክሲ እና የስሜት ብጤት እና የደጋጋፊ አሳብ ለማግኘት እንደምትመስል መጠን እናገኛለን፡፡ TripAdvisor hotel (TripAdvisor hotel) እና Yelp restaurant review (Yelp restaurant) ሞዴላታችን የአሁኑን ሥርዓት ምሳሌ እንዲያሳየው እና በተፈጻገው ፍሬም የዓይነቶችን አስተያየት ለመፈለግ ማግኘት የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Օգտագործողների ստեղծված պարունակությունը արտադրանքների և ծառայությունների մասին վերանայման ձևով հաճախ բազմազան է և նույնիսկ հակառակն է: Սա դժվարանում է օգտագործողներին իմանալ, թե արդյոք վերլուծության մեջ կարծիքը գոյություն ունի կամ կողմնականում է: We study the problem of searching for supporting opinions in the context of reviews.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի կառուցվածք, որը կոչվում է ՍուՌՖ, որը նախ հայտնաբերում է կարծիքներ, որոնք արտահայտվում են վերլուծության մեջ, և հետո գտնում է նման կարծիքներ այլ վերլուծություններից: Մենք նախագծում ենք նոր հավանական գրաֆիկ մոդել, որը ներառում է կարծիքները որպես ասպեկտի, թեմայի և զգացմունքների չափերի համակցություն, հաշվի առնում է անհատական հեղինակների նախընտրությունները, ինչպես նաև վերանայման ենթակառության որակը, և կոդավորում է մտքերի հոսքը վերանայման մեջ, դինամիկ սահմանափակում է ասպեկ Մենք ստանում ենք նմանության չափումը, որը վերաբերում է լեքսիկական և սեմանտիկական նմանություններին աջակցող կարծիքների գտնելու համար: Թրիպ-խորհրդատու հյուրանոցային վերանայման և Յելփ ռեստորանի վերանայման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող կարծիքների մոդելներ ձևավորելու մեթոդները, և առաջարկված շրջա', 'az': 'İstifadəçi ürəklər və servislər haqqında müxtəlif və hətta müxtəlif məlumatlar yaratdı. Bu, istifadəçilər üçün müəyyən edilən fikirlərin genişliyi və ya təsiri olduğunu bilmək çətin edir. Gözlərin məsələsində fikirləri dəstəkləmək üçün arama problemini öyrənirik. Biz SURF adlı bir frameworku təklif edirik, ilk dəfə görünüşünü təşkil edir, sonra da başqa görünüşündən bənzər fikirlər tapır. Biz bir yeni mümkün olaraq grafik modeli tasarlayırıq ki, fikirləri aspekt, məsələlər və hisslər ölçülərinin birləşdirilməsi olaraq, individual yazıcıların seçimlərini, həmçin in gözləyirlənən məsələlərin keyfiyyətini də hesablayır və düşüncələrin axışını bir dəyişdirir, aspekt dağıtımı dinamik olaraq sonrakı dəyişiklik segmentlərin arasında dəyişiklik edə Biz özümüzə kömək göstərən fikirləri tapmaq üçün dil və semantik bir ölçü çəkirik. TripAdvisor hotel təcrübələrini və Yelp restoran təcrübələrini təcrübə edirlər ki, modellərimiz mövcud fikirləri modelləşdirmək metodlarından üstün olduğunu göstərir, və təklif olunan frameworklər fikirləri dəstəkləməkdə etkilidir.', 'bs': 'Korisnik je proizveo sadržaj o proizvodima i uslugama u obliku pregleda često su različiti i čak i kontradiktorni. To je teško da korisnici saznaju da li je mišljenje u pregledu prevaleno ili predrasude. Proučavamo problem pretraživanja mišljenja u kontekstu pregleda. Predlažemo okvir nazvan SURF, koji prvi put identificira mišljenje izražene u pregledu, a zatim pronalazi slične mišljenje iz drugih pregleda. Mi dizajniramo nov verovatno grafički model koji uključuje mišljenje kao kombinaciju aspekta, teme i dimenzija osjećaja, uzima u obzir preferencije pojedinih autora, kao i kvalitetu pregledanog entiteta, i kodira tok razmišljanja u pregledu, ograničavajući dinamički distribuciju aspekta između nasljednih segmenta preglede. Nalazimo sličnu mjeru koja smatra leksičkom i semantičkom sličnošću da pronađemo podrške mišljenja. Eksperimenti o pregledima hotela TripAdvisor i pregledima Yelp restorana pokazuju da naš model iznosi postojeće metode modeliranja mišljenja, a predloženi okvir je efikasan u pronalaženju podrške mišljenja.', 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীরা প্রায়শই বিভিন্ন এবং বিরোধী এবং এমনকি বিতর্কিত। এটা ব্যবহারকারীদের জানার জন্য কঠিন হয় যে একটি প্রতিবেদনে একটি মতামত বা বৈষম্য কিনা। আমরা পুনরাবৃত্তির প্রেক্ষাপটে মতামত সমর্থন করার সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি। We propose a framework called SURF, that first identifies opinions expressed in a review, and then finds similar opinions from other reviews.  আমরা সম্ভবত একটি উপন্যাস্তিক গ্রাফিক্যাল মডেল ডিজাইন করি যেখানে মন্তব্য, বিষয়বস্তু এবং অনুভূতির সাথে একত্রিত করে, ব্যক্তিগত লেখকের পছন্দের ব্যাপারে বিবেচনা করে এবং এই বস্তুর মান পর্যবেক্ষণের মধ্যে চিন্তার প্রব আমরা একই ধরনের প্রতিক্রিয়া পেয়েছি যা দুটো লেক্সিক এবং সেমান্টিক সমতার মতামত খুঁজে বিবেচনা করে। ট্রিপ অ্যাডভিসার হোটেল পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং ইয়েল্প রেস্তুরেন্ট পর্যবেক্ষণ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেলটি মডেলের মতামত প্রদর্শনের জন্য বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করে, আর প', 'ca': "El contingut generat pels usuaris sobre productes i serveis en forma de revisions sovint són diversos i fins i tot contraditoris. Això dificulta per als usuaris saber si una opinió en una revisió és prevalent o biasada. Estudem el problema de buscar opinions de suport en el context de les revisions. Proposem un marc anomenat SURF, que primer identifica les opinions expresses en una revisió, i després troba opinions semblants d'altres revisions. dissenyem un nou model gràfic probabilista que captura les opinions com una combinació de dimensions d'aspecte, tema i sentiment, tenim en compte les preferències dels autors individuals, així com la qualitat de l'entitat a examen, i codifica el flux de pensaments en una revisió limitant la distribució d'aspectes dinàmicament entre segments successius de revisió. Destinuem una mesura de similitud que considera la similitud lèxica i semàntica per trobar opinions de suport. Els experiments d'exàmens d'hotels TripAdvisor i d'exàmens de restaurants Yelp mostren que el nostre model supera els mètodes existents per modelar opinions, i el marc proposat és eficaç en trobar opinions de suport.", 'fi': 'Käyttäjän luoma sisältö tuotteista ja palveluista arvosteluiden muodossa on usein monipuolinen ja jopa ristiriitainen. Tämän vuoksi käyttäjien on vaikea tietää, onko arvostelu yleinen vai puolueellinen. Tutkimme tukilausuntojen etsimisen ongelmaa katsausten yhteydessä. Ehdotamme SURF-nimistä kehystä, joka tunnistaa ensin arvostelussa esitetyt mielipiteet ja löytää sitten samankaltaisia mielipiteitä muista arvosteluista. Suunnittelemme uuden todennäköisen graafisen mallin, joka tallentaa mielipiteet näkökulma-, aihe- ja tunteiden ulottuvuuksien yhdistelmänä, ottaa huomioon yksittäisten tekijöiden mieltymykset sekä tarkasteltavan kokonaisuuden laadun ja koodaa arvostelun ajatusten virtauksen rajoittamalla näkökulmien jakautumista dynaamisesti peräkkäisten tarkistussegmenttien kesken. Johdatamme samankaltaisuusmittarin, joka ottaa huomioon sekä sanastollisen että semanttisen samankaltaisuuden löytääksemme tukevia mielipiteitä. TripAdvisorin hotelliarvostelujen ja Yelpin ravintolaarvostelujen kokeilut osoittavat, että mallimme on parempi kuin olemassa olevat mielipiteiden mallintamismenetelmät, ja ehdotettu kehys on tehokas tukevien mielipiteiden löytämisessä.', 'cs': 'Obsah generovaný uživateli o produktech a službách ve formě recenzí je často různorodý a dokonce protichůdný. To uživatelům ztěžuje zjistit, zda je názor v recenzi převládající nebo zaujatý. Studujeme problém hledání podpůrných názorů v kontextu recenzí. Navrhujeme rámec nazvaný SURF, který nejprve identifikuje názory vyjádřené v recenzi a následně najde podobné názory z jiných recenzí. Navrhujeme nový pravděpodobnostní grafický model, který zachycuje názory jako kombinaci dimenzí aspektu, tématu a sentimentu, bere v úvahu preference jednotlivých autorů, stejně jako kvalitu hodnocené entity a kóduje tok myšlenek v recenzi dynamickým omezením distribuce aspektů mezi následující segmenty recenze. Odvozujeme míru podobnosti, která bere v úvahu lexikální i sémantickou podobnost, abychom našli podpůrné názory. Experimenty na recenzích hotelů TripAdvisor a recenzích restaurací Yelp ukazují, že náš model překonává stávající metody modelování názorů a navržený rámec je efektivní při hledání podpůrných názorů.', 'et': 'Kasutaja loodud sisu toodete ja teenuste kohta ülevaatete kujul on sageli mitmekesine ja isegi vastuoluline. Seetõttu on kasutajatel raske teada saada, kas ülevaates sisalduv arvamus on levinud või erapooletu. Uurime ülevaatete kontekstis toetavate arvamuste otsimise probleemi. Pakume välja raamistiku nimega SURF, mis kõigepealt tuvastab ülevaates väljendatud arvamused ja seejärel leiab sarnased arvamused teistest ülevaatest. Me kujundame uudse tõenäosusliku graafilise mudeli, mis kajastab arvamusi aspekti, teema ja sentimentaalsete mõõtmete kombinatsioonina, võtab arvesse üksikute autorite eelistusi, samuti vaadeldava olemuse kvaliteeti ning kodeerib ülevaate mõttevoogu, piirates aspektide jaotust dünaamiliselt järjestikuste ülevaate segmentide vahel. Tuletame sarnasuse mõõdu, mis arvestab nii leksikaalset kui semantilist sarnasust, et leida toetavaid arvamusi. TripAdvisori hotelliarvustuste ja Yelpi restoranide arvustuste eksperimendid näitavad, et meie mudel ületab olemasolevaid arvamuste modelleerimise meetodeid ning pakutud raamistik on tõhus toetavate arvamuste leidmisel.', 'he': 'תוכן שנוצר ע"י המשתמש בנוגע למוצרים ושירותים בצורת ביקורות הוא לעתים קרובות מגוון ואפילו נגד. זה גורם למשתמשים קשה לדעת אם דעה בבדיקה שולטת או משותפת. אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של חיפוש לתמוך בדעות בקשר לבדיקות. אנו מציעים מסגרת שנקראת SURF, אשר קודם מזהה דעות מבטאות בבדיקה, ואז מוצאת דעות דומות מבדיקות אחרות. We design a novel probabilistic graphical model that captures opinions as a combination of aspect, topic and sentiment dimensions, takes into account the preferences of individual authors, as well as the quality of the entity under review, and encodes the flow of thoughts in a review by constraining the aspect distribution dynamically among successive review segments.  אנחנו משיגים מדידת דמיון ששוקלת דמיון לקסי וסמנטי למצוא דעות תומכות. ניסויים על ביקורות במלון TripAdvisor ובדיקורות במסעדה Yelp מראים שהדוגמא שלנו עולה על שיטות קיימות לדמיון דעות, והסגרת המוצעת יעילה במציאת דעות תומכות.', 'ha': "Mai amfani da ya ƙãga wani ƙunci na masu amfani da manunukan da service cikin fomat mai nunawa, ko da yawa masu sãɓãnin, kuma kõ dã sunã da sãɓãnin. Wannan yana da sauƙi ga mãsu amfani da shi dõmin su san idan wani marubuci ya kasance mai gabatar da shi ko kuwa ya sãɓa. Munã karãtun mataimaki da za'a nẽman taimakon mawaƙo cikin muhimmada mai bincike. Mu goyya da wani firam wanda ake kiran SURF, wanda ke iya ƙayyade fikãfin da aka nuna cikin rabo, sa'an nan kuma yana sãmu misãlai daga wasu misãlai. Tuna ƙayyade wani motali na node mai yiwuwa wanda ke riƙon maganar ka kamar wata haɗa fuskar, madaidaici da kuma kyauta, yana hisãbi da tsarin marubuci masu mutane, da kuma sifar abun da aka yi bayani da shi, kuma yana koda kofi masu ƙaranci wa mawaƙo a cikin kure da za'a ƙunsa da bakin rabon sharuɗe-daban a tsakanin rabo-daban rabo. Tuna sami wani takwara wanda ke sami karatun lokaci da ke sami, ko kuma ma'anar mutane da ke sami ga mataimaki. Tajararin da aka samu karatun hotel na TrepAdvancer hotel da kurewanan Yelf na nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da metoden da ke da baka kan motsi kalmõmi, kuma an sami firam da aka buɗe shi yana da amfani da a gane misãlai.", 'sk': 'Uporabniki ustvarjene vsebine o izdelkih in storitvah v obliki pregledov so pogosto raznolike in celo nasprotujoče si. Zato uporabniki težko vedo, ali je mnenje v pregledu prevladujoče ali pristransko. Proučujemo problem iskanja podpornih mnenj v kontekstu pregledov. Predlagamo okvir, imenovan SURF, ki najprej identificira mnenja, izražena v pregledu, nato pa najde podobna mnenja iz drugih pregledov. Oblikujemo nov verjetnostni grafični model, ki zajema mnenja kot kombinacijo vidikov, teme in sentimentalnih dimenzij, upošteva preference posameznih avtorjev in kakovost pregledovanega subjekta ter kodira pretok misli v pregledu z dinamičnim omejevanjem porazdelitve vidikov med zaporednimi preglednimi segmenti. Izpeljemo merilo podobnosti, ki upošteva tako leksikalno kot semantično podobnost za iskanje podpornih mnenj. Eksperimenti na TripAdvisor hotelskih pregledih in Yelp restavracijah kažejo, da naš model presega obstoječe metode modeliranja mnenj, predlagani okvir pa je učinkovit pri iskanju podpornih mnenj.', 'jv': 'User generated information about output and services in the format of the checksum Iki lak susah-susahe nggo yen nggawe ngerti, nek akeh njaluk kanggo resmi dadi, or a bisa biasane. Awak dhéwé jajal perbudhakan kanggo nglanggar nggunaké aturan mruput. Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem SURF, nambah perusahaan pamilangan ingkang pisan anyar, lan uga njaluk akeh pisan anyar neng cuwarakno Awak dhéwé ngênêmên ngerasakno praramalistik modèl anyar sing nêmên karo halene ngênêmên karo ngênêmên anyar, tema lan dimensi penting, nêmên langgar ngênêmên terêmên mrêvewong, tambah pisan karo kalitas banjuré akeh hêmên bakal terêmên, lan kode ngêngêmên aksir luwih nêmên bakal Awak dhéwé éngak perusahaan sampeyan luwih dumadhi ngono semanti kuwi nggawe sapa ngono nggawe layakno. Ngerti pertama karo hal-perusahaan TripAdvIsr Hotel lan arno restoran yelp kuwi nggawe modèlan sing nyimpen karo perusahaan akeh modèl kanggo ngerayakno ngerti, lan mbukakipun dianggawe sistem sing apik efek kanggo ngilanggar nggunakake tresnane', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་ཞིབ འདིས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་མཐོང་ནི་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཞིག་གི་ནང་གི་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་ཞིག་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཀློག་ཚུལ་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནང་གི་ཡིག་གཏོང་འཚོལ་བ་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་བལྟ་ཀློག ང་ཚོས་SURF(SURF)མིང་དང་ཐོག་མའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ཐོག་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་ཡོད་པའི་མདོག་གཞུང་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད We design a novel probabilistic graphical model that captures opinions as a combination of aspect, topic and sentiment dimensions, takes into account the preferences of individual authors, as well as the quality of the entity under review, and encodes the flow of thoughts in a review by constraining the aspect distribution dynamically among successive review segments. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་དང་སྟངས་རྣམས་མཐུན་མཚུངས་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཟོ་འདོད་ཡོད། TripAdvisor hotel reviews and Yelp restaurant reviews experiments show that our model outperforms existing methods for modeling opinions, and the proposed framework is effective in finding support of opinions.'}
{'en': 'Magnets for Sarcasm : Making Sarcasm Detection Timely, Contextual and Very Personal', 'ar': 'مغناطيس للسخرية: جعل الكشف عن السخرية في الوقت المناسب ، وسياقيًا وشخصيًا للغاية', 'pt': 'Ímãs para sarcasmo: tornando a detecção de sarcasmo oportuna, contextual e muito pessoal', 'fr': 'Aimants pour le sarcasme\xa0: rendre la détection des sarcasmes opportune, contextuelle et très personnelle', 'es': 'Imanes para el sarcasmo: hacer que la detección del sarcasmo sea oportuna, contextual y muy personal', 'ja': '皮肉用マグネット：皮肉の検出をタイムリーに、コンテキストに、そして非常に個人的にする', 'zh': '刺磁铁:使刺检及时,上下文相关个性化', 'ru': 'Магниты для сарказма: своевременное, контекстное и очень личное обнаружение сарказма', 'hi': 'व्यंग्य के लिए मैग्नेट: व्यंग्य का पता लगाना समय पर, प्रासंगिक और बहुत व्यक्तिगत बनाना', 'ga': 'Maighnéid le haghaidh Sarcasm: Brath Sarcasm a Dhéanamh Tráthúil, Comhthéacsúil agus An-phearsanta', 'ka': 'Sarcasm- ის მაგენტი: Sarcasm- ის განვიცნობის დრო, კონტექსტური და ძალიან პირადი', 'el': 'Μαγνήτες για τον σαρκασμό: Κάνοντας την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού έγκαιρη, περιεκτική και πολύ προσωπική', 'hu': 'Mágnesek a szarkazmushoz: a szarkazmus felismerése időben, kontextusban és nagyon személyes', 'it': 'Magneti per Sarcasmo: Rendere la rilevazione del Sarcasmo tempestiva, contestuale e molto personale', 'kk': 'Саркассм магниттері: Саркассм уақытты анықтау, контексті және өте жеке', 'lt': 'Sarkazmo magnetai: Sarkazmo nustatymas laiku, kontekstu ir labai asmeniškai', 'mk': 'Магнети за сарказмот: правење на детекција на сарказмот на време, контекстно и многу лично', 'ms': 'Magnet untuk Sarkasm: Membuat Pengesanan Sarkasm Secara Masa, Konteksual dan Sangat Peribadi', 'mt': 'Magni għas-Sarkazmu: L-identifikazzjoni tas-Sarkazmu ssir f’waqtha, fil-Kuntest u Personali Ħafna', 'mn': 'Саркассмын магнитууд: Саркассмын мэдээлэл цаг хугацаанд, сортолтой, маш хувийн', 'ml': 'സര്\u200dക്കാസിനുള്ള മാഗ്നെറ്റുകള്\u200d: സാര്\u200dക്കാസം ഡിറ്റിക്റ്റീഷന്\u200d സമയത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, വിശേഷവ', 'no': 'Magnettar for sarkasm: Lagar sarkasm- oppdaging tidlegare, kontekstalt og svært personleg', 'pl': 'Magnety na sarkazm: czasowe, kontekstowe i bardzo osobiste wykrywanie sarkazmu', 'ro': 'Magneți pentru sarcasm: detectarea sarcasmului la timp, contextuală și foarte personală', 'sr': 'Magneti za Sarkasm: Vremenski, kontekstualni i vrlo lični otkrivanje sarkasma', 'si': 'සාර්කාස්ම් වෙනුවෙන් මැජැන්ට්ස්: සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න වෙලාවක්, සංවේදනය සහ ගොඩක් පුද්ග', 'so': 'Magnets for Sarkasm: Making Sarcasm Detection Timely, Contextual and Very Personal', 'sv': 'Magneter för sarkasm: Att göra sarkasm detektering i tid, kontextuellt och mycket personligt', 'ta': 'Sarcasm க்கான மெக்கன்ட்ஸ்: Sarcasm Detection Timely, Contextual and Very Personal', 'ur': 'سارکاسم کے مگنٹ: سارکاسم کی آزمائش سامنے، متوسط اور بہت شخصی بنا رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nam châm cho Sarcasm: Tính toán hóa chất kịp thời, tình hình và rất cá nhân', 'bg': 'Магнити за сарказъм: откриване на сарказма навреме, контекстно и много лично', 'nl': 'Magneten voor sarcasme: Sarcasmedetectie tijdig, contextueel en zeer persoonlijk maken', 'da': 'Magneter til Sarkasme: At gøre Sarkasme detektion rettidig, kontekstuel og meget personlig', 'hr': 'Magneti za Sarkasm: Vrijeme otkrivanja sarkasma, kontekstualne i vrlo osobne', 'de': 'Magnete für Sarkasmus: Sarkasmus-Erkennung zeitnah, kontextuell und sehr persönlich machen', 'id': 'Magnets for Sarcasm: Making Sarcasm Detection Timely, Contextual and Very Personal', 'ko': '풍자자석: 풍자 검측을 제때에 하고 상하문과 매우 개인화시킨다', 'fa': 'Magnets for Sarcasm: Making Sarcasm Detection Timely, Contextual and Very Personal', 'sw': 'Mashindano ya Kisarcasm: Kutengeneza Uchunguzi wa Kisarcasm kwa muda, Kihusika na Binafsi', 'tr': 'Sarkasm için Magnet:Sarkasm Gezgini Tarama zamanı, Kontekstsel ve Çok Şahsi', 'af': 'Magnets vir Sarcasm: Maak Sarcasm Opdekking Tyd, Konteksual en Baie Persoonlike', 'am': 'የሳርካሲ መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Սարկազմի մագնիսները. Սարկազմի հայտնագործման արագ, կոնտեքստալ և շատ անձնական դարձնելը', 'sq': 'Magnetët për Sarkazmin: Duke bërë zbulimin e sarkazmit në kohë të duhur, kontekstual dhe shumë personal', 'az': 'Sarkasm Magnets for Sarcasm: Sarkasm Detection Timely, Contextual and Very Personal Making', 'bn': 'সার্কাস্মের জন্য ম্যাগনেট: সার্কাস্ম গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য, বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং খুব ব্যক্তিগত', 'bs': 'Magneti za Sarkasm: Vrijeme otkrivanja Sarkasma, kontekstualno i vrlo lično', 'ca': 'Magnets per al sarcasme: fer la detecció del sarcasme a temps, contextual i molt personal', 'cs': 'Magnety pro sarkasmus: Včasná, kontextová a velmi osobní detekce sarkasmu', 'et': 'Magnetid sarkasmi jaoks: sarkasmi tuvastamine õigeaegselt, kontekstaalselt ja väga isiklikult', 'fi': 'Magneetit sarkasmiin: Sarkasmin havaitseminen on oikea-aikaista, kontekstuaalista ja hyvin henkilökohtaista', 'jv': 'Ngucap luwih kanggo Sarkasm: Gak Sarkasm detection timed, contextual lan So Personal', 'he': 'מגנטים לסרקזם: להפוך את גילוי הסרקזם בזמן, קונטקסט ומאוד אישי', 'ha': 'Making Sarcasm Diagnore Timely, Content and Very Personal', 'sk': 'Magneti za sarkazem: pravočasno, kontekstualno in zelo osebno zaznavanje sarkazma', 'bo': 'དྲ་སྒྲིག་ནང་དུ་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞེས་བྱུང་བའི་དུས་ཚོད་བཟོ་བཞིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Sarcasm is a pervasive phenomenon in social media, permitting the concise communication of meaning, affect and attitude. Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker’s mindset. Insight into a speaker’s psychological profile at the time of production is a valuable source of context for sarcasm detection. Using a neural architecture, we show significant gains in detection accuracy when knowledge of the speaker’s mood at the time of production can be inferred. Our focus is on sarcasm detection on Twitter, and show that the mood exhibited by a speaker over tweets leading up to a new post is as useful a cue for sarcasm as the topical context of the post itself. The work opens the door to an empirical exploration not just of sarcasm in text but of the sarcastic state of mind.', 'ar': 'السخرية ظاهرة منتشرة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، تسمح بالتواصل المختصر للمعنى والتأثير والموقف. يتطلب التوافق الذكاء للإنتاج والذكاء في الفهم ، الأمر الذي يتطلب معرفة كل طرف بالمعايير والسياق وعقلية المتحدث. إن التبصر في الملف النفسي للمتحدث في وقت الإنتاج هو مصدر قيم للسياق لاكتشاف السخرية. باستخدام الهندسة المعمارية العصبية ، نظهر مكاسب كبيرة في دقة الكشف عندما يمكن استنتاج معرفة الحالة المزاجية للمتحدث في وقت الإنتاج. ينصب تركيزنا على الكشف عن السخرية على Twitter ، وإظهار أن الحالة المزاجية التي يظهرها المتحدث على التغريدات التي أدت إلى منشور جديد هي إشارة مفيدة للسخرية مثل السياق الموضعي للمنشور نفسه. يفتح العمل الباب أمام استكشاف تجريبي ليس فقط للسخرية في النص ولكن للحالة الذهنية الساخرة.', 'fr': "Le sarcasme est un phénomène omniprésent dans les médias sociaux, permettant la communication concise du sens, de l'affect et de l'attitude. La concision exige de l'esprit pour produire et de l'esprit pour comprendre, ce qui exige de chaque partie une connaissance des normes, du contexte et de l'état d'esprit de l'orateur. Un aperçu du profil psychologique d'un orateur au moment de la production est une source précieuse de contexte pour la détection du sarcasme. À l'aide d'une architecture neuronale, nous montrons des gains significatifs en termes de précision de détection lorsque la connaissance de l'humeur du locuteur au moment de la production peut être déduite. Nous nous concentrons sur la détection du sarcasme sur Twitter et montrons que l'humeur manifestée par un orateur sur les tweets précédant un nouveau message est un indice de sarcasme aussi utile que le contexte actuel de la publication elle-même. L'œuvre ouvre la porte à une exploration empirique non seulement du sarcasme dans le texte, mais aussi de l'état d'esprit sarcastique.", 'es': 'El sarcasmo es un fenómeno generalizado en las redes sociales, que permite la comunicación concisa de significado, afecto y actitud. La concisión requiere ingenio para producir e ingenio para comprender, lo que exige que cada parte conozca las normas, el contexto y la mentalidad del orador. La comprensión del perfil psicológico de un hablante en el momento de la producción es una valiosa fuente de contexto para la detección del sarcasmo. Al utilizar una arquitectura neuronal, mostramos ganancias significativas en la precisión de la detección cuando se puede inferir el conocimiento del estado de ánimo del hablante en el momento de la producción. Nuestro enfoque está en la detección del sarcasmo en Twitter, y demostrar que el estado de ánimo exhibido por un orador ante los tuits que conducen a una nueva publicación es una señal de sarcasmo tan útil como el contexto actual de la publicación en sí. La obra abre la puerta a una exploración empírica no solo del sarcasmo en el texto, sino del estado mental sarcástico.', 'pt': 'O sarcasmo é um fenômeno difundido nas mídias sociais, permitindo a comunicação concisa de significado, afeto e atitude. A concisão exige sagacidade para produzir e sagacidade para entender, o que exige de cada parte o conhecimento das normas, do contexto e da mentalidade do falante. A percepção do perfil psicológico de um falante no momento da produção é uma fonte valiosa de contexto para detecção de sarcasmo. Usando uma arquitetura neural, mostramos ganhos significativos na precisão da detecção quando o conhecimento do humor do falante no momento da produção pode ser inferido. Nosso foco está na detecção de sarcasmo no Twitter e mostra que o humor exibido por um orador sobre os tweets que levam a uma nova postagem é uma dica tão útil para o sarcasmo quanto o contexto tópico da postagem em si. O trabalho abre as portas para uma exploração empírica não apenas do sarcasmo no texto, mas do estado de espírito sarcástico.', 'ja': '皮肉はソーシャルメディアに蔓延する現象であり、意味、影響、態度の簡潔なコミュニケーションを可能にします。コンシジョンには、WITが生成し、理解するためのWITが必要です。これは、規範、文脈、スピーカーの考え方に関する各当事者の知識を必要とします。制作時のスピーカーの心理的プロファイルへの洞察は、皮肉を検出するための貴重な文脈のソースです。ニューラルアーキテクチャーを使用して、生産時のスピーカーの気分に関する知識が推測できる場合、検出精度に大きな利点を示します。私たちはTwitterでの皮肉検出に焦点を当てており、新しい投稿につながるツイートを通じてスピーカーが示す気分が、投稿自体のトピックコンテキストと同様に皮肉の手がかりとして役立つことを示しています。この作品は、テキストの皮肉だけでなく、心の皮肉的な状態の実証的な探求への扉を開きます。', 'zh': '刺刺者,社交媒体之普遍存在也,许简传其义,情貌。 约以机知,方以知规,背景以言心。 夫制作察演讲者者心理特征刺检之宝背景本也。 用神经架构者,推断出扬声器生之情知,检准确性之所加也。 我们的重点是Twitter上的刺检,并明演讲者在新帖子的推文中见的情况与帖子本身的主题背景一样有用。 此为经验探索开门,非唯讽刺文本,且有讽刺之心。', 'hi': 'व्यंग्य सोशल मीडिया में एक व्यापक घटना है, जो अर्थ, प्रभाव और दृष्टिकोण के संक्षिप्त संचार की अनुमति देता है। Concision का उत्पादन करने के लिए बुद्धि और समझने के लिए बुद्धि की आवश्यकता होती है, जो मानदंडों, संदर्भ और स्पीकर की मानसिकता के प्रत्येक पार्टी ज्ञान से मांग करता है। उत्पादन के समय एक वक्ता के मनोवैज्ञानिक प्रोफ़ाइल में अंतर्दृष्टि व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए संदर्भ का एक मूल्यवान स्रोत है। एक तंत्रिका वास्तुकला का उपयोग करते हुए, हम पता लगाने की सटीकता में महत्वपूर्ण लाभ दिखाते हैं जब उत्पादन के समय स्पीकर के मूड के ज्ञान का अनुमान लगाया जा सकता है। हमारा ध्यान ट्विटर पर व्यंग्य का पता लगाने पर है, और यह दर्शाता है कि एक नई पोस्ट के लिए अग्रणी ट्वीट्स पर एक वक्ता द्वारा प्रदर्शित मनोदशा पोस्ट के सामयिक संदर्भ के रूप में व्यंग्य के लिए एक क्यू के रूप में उपयोगी है। काम न केवल पाठ में व्यंग्य के एक अनुभवजन्य अन्वेषण के लिए दरवाजा खोलता है, बल्कि मन की व्यंग्यात्मक स्थिति का भी।', 'ru': 'Сарказм - это широко распространенное явление в социальных сетях, позволяющее лаконично передавать смысл, влияние и отношение. Концепция требует умения создавать и умения понимать, что требует от каждой стороны знания норм, контекста и мировоззрения оратора. Понимание психологического профиля говорящего во время производства является ценным источником контекста для обнаружения сарказма. Используя нейронную архитектуру, мы показываем значительные достижения в точности обнаружения, когда можно сделать вывод о знании настроения говорящего на момент производства. Наш фокус на обнаружении сарказма в Twitter, и показать, что настроение, проявленное оратором в твитах, ведущих к новому посту, является таким же полезным сигналом для сарказма, как и тематический контекст самого поста. Эта работа открывает дверь к эмпирическому исследованию не только сарказма в тексте, но и саркастического состояния ума.', 'ga': 'Is feiniméan forleatach é an searbhas sna meáin shóisialta, a cheadaíonn brí, tionchar agus dearcadh a chur in iúl go beacht. Éilíonn coinbhleacht le héirim a thabhairt ar aird agus le tuiscint a fháil, a éilíonn eolas ó gach páirtí ar noirm, comhthéacs agus meon an chainteora. Is foinse luachmhar comhthéacs é léargas a fháil ar phróifíl shíceolaíoch an chainteora tráth an táirgthe chun searbhas a bhrath. Ag baint úsáide as ailtireacht néarúil, léirímid gnóthachain shuntasacha i gcruinneas braite nuair is féidir tátal a bhaint as eolas ar ghiúmar an chainteora tráth an táirgthe. Dírímid ar bhrath searbhas ar Twitter, agus léirímid go bhfuil an meon a thaispeánann cainteoir thar tweets roimh post nua chomh húsáideach leide don searbhas is atá comhthéacs tráthúla an phoist féin. Osclaíonn an saothar an doras d’iniúchadh eimpíreach ní hamháin ar an searbhas sa téacs ach ar an staid mheoin searbhasach.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში საპირო ფენომენია, რომელიც შესაძლებელია სანიშვნელობის კომუნიკაციას, შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია. კონფიზიცია უნდა გავაკეთოთ და გავაკეთოთ, რომელიც ყველა ოჯახის მეცნიერების ნორმების, კონტექსტის და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა. პროდისტურის დროში მნიშვნელოვანი კონტექსტური ფექოლოგიური პროფილის შესახებ იქნება საპკასმის განვიცნობისთვის. გამოყენებული ნეიროლური არქტიქტურის გამოყენება, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების შესაძლებელია, როდესაც სტ ჩვენი ტუკუნსტი არის საპკასმის განახლებაზე Twitter-ში, და გამოჩვენება, რომ სტუკუნტის განახლება, რომელიც სტუკუნტის განახლება, რომელიც ახალი პოსტის გადატანა, იგივეა საპკასმის გამოყენება, როგორ პაბჲრარა ჲრგჲპთ გპარარა ჱა თმოთპთფვნ თჱკლძფგანვ ნვ ჟამჲ ჟაპკაჱყმ გ რვკჟყრ, ნჲ ჱა ჟაპკაჟრთფვნ ჟყჟრჲწრ.', 'hu': 'A szarkazmus egy átfogó jelenség a közösségi médiában, amely lehetővé teszi a jelentés, a hatás és a hozzáállás tömör kommunikációját. Az egyeztetés szellemet igényel a termeléshez és a megértéshez, ami minden féltől megköveteli a normák, a kontextus és a beszéd gondolkodásmódja ismeretét. Egy előadó pszichológiai profiljába való betekintés a gyártás idején értékes kontextusforrás a szarkazmus felismeréséhez. Neurális architektúra segítségével jelentős mértékű észlelési pontosságot mutatunk, amikor a hangszóró hangulatának ismerete a gyártás idején következtethető le. A Twitteren a szarkazmus felismerésére összpontosítunk, és megmutatjuk, hogy egy előadó által az új bejegyzéshez vezető tweeteken kifejezett hangulat ugyanolyan hasznos a szarkazmusra, mint maga a bejegyzés aktuális kontextusa. A mű nemcsak a szövegben lévő szarkazmus empirikus feltárásához nyitja meg az ajtót, hanem a szarkasztikus elmeállapot empirikus feltárásához.', 'el': 'Ο σαρκασμός είναι ένα διαδεδομένο φαινόμενο στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, που επιτρέπει τη συνοπτική επικοινωνία του νοήματος, της επίδρασης και της στάσης. Η συνεννόηση απαιτεί ευφυΐα για την παραγωγή και ευφυΐα για την κατανόηση, η οποία απαιτεί από κάθε μέρος γνώση των κανόνων, του πλαισίου και της νοοτροπίας του ομιλητή. Η γνώση του ψυχολογικού προφίλ ενός ομιλητή κατά τη στιγμή της παραγωγής αποτελεί πολύτιμη πηγή περιβάλλοντος για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού. Χρησιμοποιώντας μια νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική, δείχνουμε σημαντικά κέρδη στην ακρίβεια ανίχνευσης όταν μπορεί να συναχθεί γνώση της διάθεσης του ομιλητή κατά τη στιγμή της παραγωγής. Η εστίαση μας είναι στην ανίχνευση σαρκασμού στο Twitter, και να δείξουμε ότι η διάθεση που επιδεικνύει ένας ομιλητής πάνω από τα tweets που οδηγούν σε μια νέα δημοσίευση είναι εξίσου χρήσιμη ένδειξη για σαρκασμό όσο και το επίκαιρο πλαίσιο της ίδιας της ανάρτησης. Το έργο ανοίγει την πόρτα σε μια εμπειρική διερεύνηση όχι μόνο του σαρκασμού στο κείμενο, αλλά και της σαρκαστικής κατάστασης του νου.', 'it': "Il sarcasmo è un fenomeno pervasivo nei social media, che permette la comunicazione concisa di significato, effetto e atteggiamento. La conciliazione richiede spirito per produrre e spirito per capire, che richiede da ogni parte conoscenza delle norme, del contesto e della mentalità di un oratore. La comprensione del profilo psicologico di un oratore al momento della produzione è una preziosa fonte di contesto per la rilevazione del sarcasmo. Utilizzando un'architettura neurale, mostriamo significativi guadagni nella precisione di rilevamento quando si può dedurre la conoscenza dell'umore dell'altoparlante al momento della produzione. Il nostro focus è sulla rilevazione del sarcasmo su Twitter, e mostrare che l'umore mostrato da un relatore nei tweet che portano a un nuovo post è utile come spunto per il sarcasmo quanto il contesto attuale del post stesso. L'opera apre le porte ad un'esplorazione empirica non solo del sarcasmo nel testo ma dello stato d'animo sarcastico.", 'kk': 'Сарказм - әлемдік медиақтардың көпшілігі, мәліметті, әсерін және қатынасын түсінуге мүмкіндік береді. Концессия бір партия нормаларды, контексті және сөйлейтінің ойлығын түсінуге және қуатты түсінуге талап етеді. Сарказмды анықтау үшін мәндік контекстің көзі. Невралдық архитектурасын қолдану үшін, шығару уақытында сөйлейтінің дұрыстығын анықтау үшін оның дұрыстығын көрсетеді. Біздің көздегіміз Твиттердегі сарказмды анықтау үшін, жаңа поштаға көздеген жаңа пошта арқылы сөйлейтін сөйлейтінің күйін көрсету үшін сарказмды өзінің нақышты контексті ретінде қолдану үшін пайдалы Жұмыс тек мәтіндегі сарказм емес, бірақ саркастық оқыту күйінің есігін ашады.', 'mk': 'Сарказмот е первазивен феномен во социјалните медиуми, овозможувајќи кратка комуникација на значењето, влијанието и ставот. Концезијата бара разум за производство и разум за разбирање, што бара од секоја партија знаење за норми, контекст и мислење на говорникот. Внимание на психолошкиот профил на говорникот во времето на производството е вреден извор на контекст за детекција на сарказмот. Користејќи нервна архитектура, покажуваме значителни зголемувања во прецизноста на детекцијата кога знаењето за расположението на говорникот во времето на производството може да се заклучи. Нашиот фокус е на детекцијата на сарказмот на Твитер, и покажува дека расположението изложено од говорник преку твитови кои водат до нов пост е корисен знак за сарказмот како и точкиот контекст на самиот пост. Работата ја отвора вратата за емпирична истрага не само на сарказмот во текстот, туку и на саркастичната состојба на умот.', 'lt': 'Sarkazmas yra plačiai paplitęs socialinių žiniasklaidos reiškinys, leidžiantis trumpai pranešti apie reikšmę, poveikį ir požiūrį. Iš tikrųjų reikalingas protas gaminti ir protas suprasti, o tai reikalauja, kad kiekviena šalis žinotų normas, kontekstą ir kalbėtojo mąstymą. Kalbėtojo psichologinis profilis gamybos metu yra vertingas sarkazmo aptikimo konteksto šaltinis. Naudodami neurologinę architektūrą, matome reikšmingą patobulinimą aptikimo tikslumui, kai galima daryti išvadą apie kalbėjo nuotaiką gamybos metu. Mūsų dėmesys sutelktas į sarkazmo nustatymą Twitter, ir rodo, kad nuotaika, kurią parodė kalbėtojas per tweetus, vedančius į naują post ą, yra toks pat naudingas ženklas sarkazmui kaip ir dabartinis paties posto kontekstas. Darbas atveria duris empiriniam ne tik teksto sarkazmui, bet ir sarkastinei minties būklei.', 'ms': "Sarkasme adalah fenomena yang luas dalam media sosial, membenarkan komunikasi singkat makna, pengaruh dan sikap. Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker's mindset.  Penglihatan ke dalam profil psikologi seorang pembicara pada masa produksi adalah sumber konteks yang berharga untuk pengesan sarkasme. Dengan menggunakan arkitektur saraf, kita menunjukkan kemajuan yang signifikan dalam ketepatan pengesan apabila pengetahuan tentang mood pembicara pada masa produksi boleh dikira. Fokus kami adalah pada pengesan sarkasme di Twitter, dan menunjukkan suasana hati yang dipaparkan oleh seorang pembicara melalui tweet yang membawa ke pos baru adalah sebaik-baiknya tanda untuk sarkasme seperti konteks topik pos sendiri. Kerja ini membuka pintu untuk eksplorasi empirik bukan hanya sarkasme dalam teks tetapi keadaan sarkastik fikiran.", 'ml': 'സര്\u200dക്കാസം സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംഭവം തന്നെയാണ്, അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥത്തിന്റെയും പ്രഭാവിക്കുന പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതും മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതും ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, അത് ഓരോ പാര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വീക്ഷണിക്കുന്ന ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സമയത്ത് സ്പീക്ടറുടെ സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d പ്രൊഫൈലിലേക്ക് ഇട്ടുകൊള്ളുക, സര്\u200dക്കാസം കണ്ടെത ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സമയത്ത് സംസാരിക്കുന്നവരുടെ മൂദ്യത്തെ അറിയുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത് നമ്മുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടിയാണ്, പുതിയ പോസ്റ്റിലേക്ക് കൊണ്ടുപോകുന്ന ഒരു സ്പീക്ടറിന്റെ മൂഡ് പ് വാതില്\u200d തുറന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ശാസ്ത്രീയ പരിശോധനത്തിന് വാതില്\u200d തുറന്നുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mt': "Is-sarkasmu huwa fenomenu mifrux fil-midja soċjali, li jippermetti komunikazzjoni konċiża tat-tifsira, l-effett u l-attitudni. Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker's mindset.  Il-viżjoni fil-profil psikoloġiku ta’ kelliem fiż-żmien tal-produzzjoni hija sors prezzjuż ta’ kuntest għad-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu. Bl-użu ta’ arkitettura newrali, nagħmlu kisbiet sinifikanti fil-preċiżjoni tad-detezzjoni meta jista’ jiġi konkluż l-għarfien tal-burdata tal-kelliem fiż-żmien tal-produzzjoni. L-attenzjoni tagħna hija fuq l-individwazzjoni tas-sarkasmu fuq Twitter, u turi li l-burdata li turi kelliem fuq twitter li twassal għal post ġdid hija sinjal utli għas-sarkasmu daqs il-kuntest topiku tal-post innifsu. Il-ħidma tiftaħ il-bieb għal esplorazzjoni empirika mhux biss tas-sarkasmu fit-test iżda tal-istat sarkastiku tal-moħħ.", 'mn': 'Энэ нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээний шинж тэмдэглэл, нөлөө үзүүлэлт болон харилцааны тодорхой харилцаа юм. Шүүмжлэх нь хэн бүрт норм, туршлага, илтгэгчдийн бодлын талаар хүсэж буй зүйлсийг бүтээх, ухаантай болгох ухаантай хэрэгтэй. Үйлдүүлэгчийн сэтгэл зүйн профилийг үйлдвэрлэх үед үнэ цэнэтэй байдлын эх үүсвэр юм. Бид мэдрэлийн архитектурыг ашиглан илтгэгчийн сэтгэл санааны тодорхойлолтын тухай мэдлэг бүтээмжийн цаг үед нэмэгдүүлж чадна. Бидний төвлөрөмж нь Твиттерийн саркассмын нээлттэй тулгарч, tweets дээр илтгэгчийн сэтгэл хөдлөл нь шинэ нээлттэй хүрэх сэтгэл хөдлөл нь өөрийнхөө нээлттэй сэтгэл хөдлөл шиг саркассмын тухай хэрэгтэй гэ Ажил нь зөвхөн текст биш, сэтгэл санааны гайхалтай байдлын хаалга нээгддэг.', 'pl': 'Sarkazm to wszechobecne zjawisko w mediach społecznościowych, pozwalające na zwięzłą komunikację znaczenia, wpływu i postawy. Pojednanie wymaga dowcipu do produkcji i dowcipu do zrozumienia, co wymaga od każdej strony znajomości norm, kontekstu i sposobu myślenia mówcy. Wgląd w profil psychologiczny mówcy w momencie produkcji jest cennym źródłem kontekstu wykrywania sarkazmu. Wykorzystując architekturę neuronową, wykazujemy znaczący wzrost dokładności wykrywania, gdy można wnioskować wiedzę o nastroju mówcy w momencie produkcji. Koncentrujemy się na wykrywaniu sarkazmu na Twitterze i pokazaniu, że nastrój prelegenta nad tweetami prowadzącymi do nowego postu jest równie przydatnym wskazówkiem dla sarkazmu, jak aktualny kontekst samego postu. Praca otwiera drzwi do empirycznej eksploracji nie tylko sarkazmu w tekście, ale i sarkastycznego stanu umysłu.', 'ro': 'Sarcasmul este un fenomen cuprinzător în rețelele sociale, permițând comunicarea concisă a sensului, afectului și atitudinii. Concilierea necesită spirit pentru a produce și spirit pentru a înțelege, ceea ce cere de la fiecare parte cunoașterea normelor, contextului și mentalitatea unui vorbitor. Privirea profilului psihologic al unui vorbitor în momentul producerii este o sursă valoroasă de context pentru detectarea sarcasmului. Folosind o arhitectură neurală, prezentăm câștiguri semnificative în precizia detectării atunci când se poate deduce cunoștințele despre starea de spirit a vorbitorului în momentul producției. Ne concentrăm pe detectarea sarcasmului pe Twitter și arătăm că starea de spirit expusă de un vorbitor în timpul tweeturilor care duc la un nou post este la fel de utilă pentru sarcasm ca contextul actual al postării în sine. Lucrarea deschide ușa unei explorări empirice nu doar a sarcasmului în text, ci a stării de spirit sarcastice.', 'no': 'Sarkasm er ein vasivt fenomen i sosiale medier, som tillater konklusive kommunikasjon av mening, påvirkar og handsaming. Konsesjonen krev wit til å produsere og forstå, som krev frå kvar parti kunnskap om normar, kontekst og opplesaren. Dette er eit verdileg kjelde for kontekst for oppdaging av sarkasm. Når vi bruker ein neuralarkitektur, viser vi signifikante forståking i oppdaging av nøyaktighet når det kjenner om talerens måte når det er produksjonstid, kan det gjerast. Vårt fokus er på oppdaging av sarkasm på Twitter, og viser at månaden som vert vist av ein taler over tweet som fører til ei ny post er så nyttig for sarkasm som den tematiske konteksten av post sjølv. Arbeidet opnar døren til ein empirisk utforsk, ikkje berre av sarkasm i tekst, men av den sarkastiske tanken.', 'sr': 'Sarkazam je širok fenomen u društvenim medijima, omogućavajući konkretnu komunikaciju smisla, utjecaj na i stav. Zaključenje zahteva vještina da proizvodi i razume, što zahteva od svake stranke znanje norme, konteksta i razmišljanja govornika. Inzistiranje psihološkog profila govornika u vreme proizvodnje je vrijedan izvor konteksta za detekciju sarkazma. Koristeći neuralnu arhitekturu, pokazujemo značajne dobitke u točnosti otkrivanja kada se znanje raspoloženja govornika u vreme proizvodnje može inficirati. Naš fokus je na otkrivanju sarkazma na Twitteru, i pokazujemo da raspoloženje koje je izložio govornik preko tweeta koji vodi do novog post a je koristan znak za sarkazam kao temalni kontekst samog posta. Rad otvara vrata empirièkog istraživanja ne samo sarkazma u tekstu, nego sarkastiènog stanja uma.', 'sv': 'Sarkasm är ett genomgripande fenomen i sociala medier som möjliggör kortfattad kommunikation av mening, påverkan och attityd. Samråd kräver förstånd för att producera och förstånd för att förstå, vilket kräver av varje part kunskap om normer, sammanhang och en talares tankesätt. Insikt i en talares psykologiska profil vid produktionstillfället är en värdefull källa till sammanhang för att upptäcka sarkasm. Med hjälp av en neural arkitektur visar vi betydande vinster i detektionsnoggrannhet när kunskap om högtalarens humör vid produktionstillfället kan härledas. Vårt fokus ligger på att upptäcka sarkasm på Twitter, och visa att stämningen som en talare uppvisar över tweets som leder fram till ett nytt inlägg är lika användbar för sarkasm som själva inlägget. Verket öppnar dörren till en empirisk utforskning inte bara av sarkasm i texten utan av det sarkastiska sinnestillståndet.', 'si': 'සර්කාස්ම් තමයි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ විශාල ප්\u200dරදේශයක්, අදහස් සම්බන්ධයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ හැදිරීම ස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න හැම පාටියක්ම දන්න හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සහ ප්\u200dර ස්පීකර්ටර්ගේ මානසික විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිකාර න්\u200dයූරල් ස්ථාපනයක් භාවිතා කරනවා, අපි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් පෙන්වනවා ස්පීකර්ටර්ගේ මූඩය ගැන දන්න පුළ අපේ අවධානය තව ට්විටර් වල සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න, ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නෙ අලුත් පොස්ට්ටුවක් වලින් ස්පීකර් වලින් අලුත් පොස්ට්ටුවක් ලඟ ප වැඩේ දොර විවෘත කරන්නේ ඉම්ප්\u200dරියාජික පරීක්ෂණයක් විතරයි ලිපිනයේ සාර්කාස්ම් විතරයි විතරයි මනස ස්ථාන', 'so': "Sarkasm waa wax badan oo ku saabsan shabakada bulshada ah, kaas oo ruqsan in la xiriiro macluumaadka, saameyn iyo dhaqdhaqaaq. Xukummada waxaa loola baahan yahay in la soo saaro waxyaabo la garto, taas oo u baahan yahay aqoonta caadooyinka, tababarka iyo fikrada hadalka. Xilliga dhaqdhaqaalaha waxaa ku qoran sawir cilmi ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka sarcaska. Using a neural architecture, we show significant gains in detection accuracy when knowledge of the speaker's mood at the time of production can be inferred.  Fogaankayagu wuxuu ku qoran yahay garsoorida cassarka ee Twitterka, waxaana tusinayaa in dhaqdhaqaaq uu ka muujiyo qofka hadla oo ku qoran tweetka, kaasoo loo keenay boostada cusub waa mid faa’iido leh oo ku saabsan sarcasm, kaas oo ah xarunta ku qoran. Shaqadu wuxuu albaabka u furan yahay baaritaan faa'iido ah, mana aha mid ku qoran qasarka oo kaliya, laakiin waa xaaladda qasarka ah.", 'ta': 'Sarcasm is a pervasive phenomenon in social media, permitting the concise communication of meaning, affect and attitude.  தொடர்பு தேவைப்படுகிறது புரிந்து புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும், ஒவ்வொரு துணையிலிருந்தும் சாதாரண, சூழல் மற்றும் பேச பொருள் உருவாக்கும் நேரத்தில் ஒரு பேச்சாளரின் மனநிலை விவரக்குறிப்பிற்கு ஒளியிடு ஒரு புதிய நிறுவனம் பயன்படுத்தி, பேசுபவரின் மனதை பாதிக்கும் நேரத்தில் பாதிக்கும் பொழுது பாதிப்பாளரின் அறிவு பாதிக்கும் போது  நம்முடைய கவனத்தை தொடர்ந்து பார்ப்பது பரிசுத்தம் கண்டுபிடிப்பது தெரிவிக்கும் மற்றும் ஒரு பேச்சாளர் வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது ஒரு புதிய புதிய கு வேலை ஒரு விருப்பமான தேடுதல் கதவை திறக்கும் உரையில் மட்டும் பரிசுத்தம் மட்டும் இல்லை ஆனால் மனதின் சிரமம் நிலைமை', 'ur': 'سارکاسم سوسیل میڈیا میں ایک گھیرے پھیرے ہوئے پھیرے ہوئے ہے، یعنی مطلب، اثر اور اثر کے مطابق معلوم کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. فیصلہ کی ضرورت ہے کہ اسے پیدا کرے اور سمجھ سکے جو ہر فریق سے ایک فریق کے معاملہ، معاملہ اور بات کرنے والوں کے ذهن کا علم مانگتا ہے. ایک صحبت کرنے والے کی روانشن پروفایل میں سوال کرنا سارکاسم شناسایی کے لئے ایک مقدار منزل ہے۔ ایک نئورل معماری کے مطابق ہم ضروری اثبات کو دکھانے کے مطابق دکھاتے ہیں جب صحبت کرنے والے کی چاند کا علم اس موقع میں کمزور ہو سکتا ہے۔ ہمارا منتظر توئیٹر پر سارکاسم کا اظہار کرنا ہے اور دکھا دینا ہے کہ ٹویٹوں پر ایک صحبت کرنے والے کے ذریعہ ایک نوی پوسٹ تک پہنچا رہا ہے اس طرح سارکاسم کے لئے ایک نشانی ہے جس طرح پوسٹ کے موضوع کا موضوع ہے۔ یہ کام ایک امپریزی تحقیق کے دروازے کھول دیتا ہے نہ صرف پیغام میں سارکاسم کے بلکہ ذهن کے سارکاسم کی حالت کے.', 'uz': "Sarkasm jamiyat media'da juda ko'p narsalar, ma'nosi, таъсир qiladigan va hayot tarkibini ruxsat beradi. Ko'pchilik qoidalar, muhit va gapiruvchi fikrlaridan foydalanishi kerak. Bu hamma bir bir bir bir qoidadan foydalanish kerak. Name Neural arxituvchidan foydalanishda, gapiruvchi ma'lumotning hayotini aniqlashda juda muhim narsalarni ko'rsamiz. Bu taqdimlik vaqtda gapiruvchi ma'lumotni bilish mumkin. Bizning fokusimiz Twitterda sarkasmni aniqlashimiz mumkin, va gapiruvchi xabarga yangi postga keladigan Twitterdan gapiruvchi shaklga ko'rsatishimiz sarkasm uchun foydalanishi mumkin. Ish o'zini o'qishni tashkilotga ochadi. Faqat matnning sarkazik holatida emas, balki sarkazlik holati.", 'vi': 'Âm nhạc là một hiện tượng lan tràn trong các phương tiện xã hội, cho phép kết nối ngắn gọn về ý nghĩa, tác động và thái độ. Kết luận đòi hỏi trí tuệ để s ản xuất và trí tuệ để hiểu, điều đó đòi hỏi từ mỗi bên hiểu biết về các quy tắc, ngữ cảnh và tư tưởng của người nói. Tiếp cận vào hồ s ơ tâm lý của một diễn viên vào thời điểm sản xuất là một nguồn đáng giá để phát hiện mỉa mai. Sử dụng kiến trúc thần kinh, chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng phát hiện chính xác khi hiểu biết tâm trạng của loa vào thời điểm s ản xuất có thể được ngụ ý. Chúng tôi tập trung vào việc phát hiện mỉa mai trên Twitter, và cho thấy rằng tâm trạng của một diễn giả qua những tweet dẫn đến một bài viết mới cũng có ích như một dấu hiệu mỉa mai như một nền tảng của bài viết. Công việc mở ra cánh cửa cho một cuộc thám hiểm có kinh nghiệm không chỉ vì mỉa mai trong văn bản mà còn vì tinh thần châm biếm.', 'hr': 'Sarkazam je prošireni fenomen u društvenim medijima, omogućavajući konkretnu komunikaciju smisla, utjecaju na i stav. Zaključenje zahtijeva vještina proizvodnje i razumijevanja, što zahtijeva od svake stranke znanje norme, konteksta i razmišljanja govornika. Inzistiranje psihološkog profila govornika u vrijeme proizvodnje je vrijedan izvor konteksta za otkrivanje sarkazma. Koristeći neuralnu arhitekturu, pokazujemo značajne dobitke u točnosti otkrivanja kada se znanje raspoloženja govornika u vrijeme proizvodnje može inficirati. Naš fokus je na otkrivanju sarkazma na Twitteru, i pokazuje da raspoloženje koje je izložio govornik preko tweeta koji vodi do novog mjesta je kao koristan znak za sarkazam kao temeljni kontekst samog mjesta. Rad otvara vrata empiričkog istraživanja ne samo sarkazma u tekstu nego sarkastičkog stanja uma.', 'bg': 'Сарказмът е широко разпространен феномен в социалните медии, позволяващ кратката комуникация на смисъла, ефекта и отношението. Умирането изисква остроумие, за да произвежда и остроумие, за да разбере, което изисква от всяка страна познаване на нормите, контекста и мисленето на оратора. Прозрението в психологическия профил на говорителя по време на производството е ценен източник на контекст за откриване на сарказъм. Използвайки невронна архитектура, ние показваме значителни печалби в точността на откриването, когато може да се направи извод за настроението на говорителя по време на производството. Фокусът ни е върху откриването на сарказъм в Туитър и показва, че настроението, показвано от говорителя през туитове, водещи до нова публикация, е също толкова полезно за сарказъм, колкото и актуалният контекст на самата публикация. Работата отваря вратата към емпирично изследване не само на сарказма в текста, но и на саркастичното състояние на ума.', 'da': 'Sarkasme er et gennemtrængende fænomen i sociale medier, der tillader kortfattet kommunikation af mening, påvirkning og holdning. Forsoning kræver vittighed til at producere og vittighed til at forstå, hvilket kræver fra hver part kendskab til normer, kontekst og en talers tankegang. Indsigt i en talers psykologiske profil på produktionstidspunktet er en værdifuld kontekst for opdagelse af sarkasme. Ved hjælp af en neural arkitektur viser vi betydelige gevinster i detektionsnøjagtighed, når viden om højttalerens humør på produktionstidspunktet kan udledes. Vores fokus er på opdagelse af sarkasme på Twitter, og viser, at stemningen udvises af en taler over tweets, der fører op til et nyt indlæg, er lige så nyttig som den aktuelle kontekst i selve indlægget. Værket åbner døren for en empirisk udforskning ikke blot af sarkasme i teksten, men af den sarkastiske sindstilstand.', 'nl': 'Sarcasme is een alomtegenwoordig fenomeen in sociale media, dat de beknopte communicatie van betekenis, affect en houding mogelijk maakt. Concessie vereist humor om te produceren en humor om te begrijpen, wat van elke partij kennis van normen, context en mindset van een spreker vereist. Inzicht in het psychologische profiel van een spreker op het moment van productie is een waardevolle bron van context voor sarcasme detectie. Met behulp van een neurale architectuur laten we significante verbeteringen zien in detectie nauwkeurigheid wanneer kennis van de stemming van de spreker op het moment van productie kan worden afgeleid. Onze focus ligt op sarcasme detectie op Twitter, en laten zien dat de stemming die een spreker vertoont over tweets die leiden tot een nieuw bericht net zo nuttig is als de actuele context van het bericht zelf. Het werk opent de deur naar een empirische verkenning niet alleen van sarcasme in tekst, maar ook van de sarcastische gemoedstoestand.', 'id': 'Sarkasme adalah fenomena yang menyebar dalam media sosial, memungkinkan komunikasi singkat dari arti, pengaruh dan sikap. Kesimpulan membutuhkan kebijaksanaan untuk menghasilkan dan kebijaksanaan untuk memahami, yang menuntut dari setiap partai pengetahuan tentang norma, konteks dan pikiran seorang pembicara. Penglihatan ke profil psikologi seorang pembicara pada s a at produksi adalah sumber konteks yang berharga untuk deteksi sarkasme. Menggunakan arsitektur saraf, kita menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan dalam akurasi deteksi ketika pengetahuan suasana hati pembicara pada s a at produksi dapat diperkirakan. Fokus kami adalah pada deteksi sarkasme di Twitter, dan menunjukkan bahwa suasana hati yang diungkapkan oleh seorang pembicara melalui tweet yang mengarah ke pos baru adalah tanda yang berguna untuk sarkasme seperti konteks topik post sendiri. Pekerjaan membuka pintu untuk eksplorasi empirik bukan hanya sarkasme dalam teks tetapi keadaan pikiran sarkastik.', 'de': 'Sarkasmus ist ein allgemeines Phänomen in sozialen Medien, das die prägnante Kommunikation von Bedeutung, Affekt und Haltung ermöglicht. Verständigung erfordert Witz zu produzieren und Witz zu verstehen, was von jeder Partei Kenntnis von Normen, Kontext und Denkweise eines Sprechers erfordert. Der Einblick in das psychologische Profil eines Sprechers zum Zeitpunkt der Produktion ist eine wertvolle Quelle des Kontexts für die Sarkasmuserkennung. Mit Hilfe einer neuronalen Architektur zeigen wir signifikante Verbesserungen in der Erkennungsgenauigkeit, wenn Erkenntnisse über die Stimmung des Sprechers zum Zeitpunkt der Produktion abgeleitet werden können. Unser Fokus liegt auf der Sarkasmus-Erkennung auf Twitter und zeigt, dass die Stimmung eines Redners über Tweets, die zu einem neuen Beitrag führen, genauso nützlich ist wie der aktuelle Kontext des Beitrags selbst. Die Arbeit öffnet die Tür zu einer empirischen Auseinandersetzung nicht nur mit dem Sarkasmus im Text, sondern auch mit dem sarkastischen Geisteszustand.', 'ko': '풍자는 소셜 미디어에서 보편적으로 존재하는 현상으로 사람들이 의미와 감정, 태도를 간결하게 전달할 수 있게 한다.말은 간단명료해야 지혜가 생기고 지혜가 있어야 이해할 수 있기 때문에 각측이 규범, 언어 환경과 말하는 사람의 심리 상태를 이해해야 한다.말하는 사람이 제작할 때의 심리 상태를 깊이 이해하는 것은 풍자를 검출하는 중요한 언어 환경의 원천이다.신경 구조를 사용함으로써 말하는 사람이 제작할 때의 정서를 추정하여 검측 정밀도를 현저히 높일 수 있다.우리의 중점은 트위터의 풍자 검출과 한 강연자가 트위터에 보여준 정서가 새로운 게시물에 앞서 게시물 자체의 주제 상하문과 마찬가지로 풍자의 유용한 단서임을 보여주는 것이다.이 작업은 텍스트 속의 풍자일 뿐만 아니라 풍자 심리에 대한 탐구의 문을 열었다.', 'sw': 'Utaratibu ni jambo kubwa katika mitandao ya kijamii, linaruhusu mawasiliano makubwa ya maana, madhara na mtazamo. Utawala unahitaji wito wa kutengeneza na kuelewa, ambao unahitaji ufahamu wa utamaduni, muktadha na mtazamo wa mazungumzaji. Uchunguzi katika profile ya kisaikolojia ya mzungumzaji wakati wa uzalishaji ni chanzo cha thamani cha muktadha wa kutambua kemikali. Kwa kutumia ujenzi wa ubongo, tunaonyesha mafanikio makubwa katika kutambua ukweli wa ukweli pale maarifa ya mtazamo wa mzungumzaji wakati wa uzalishaji unaweza kuathirika. Lengo letu linahusu kutambuliwa kwa kejeli kwenye mtandao wa Twita, na kuonyesha kwamba mtazamo ulioonyeshwa na msemaji wa twiti zinazoongoza kwenye makala mpya ni muhimu sana kwa kejeli kama muktadha wa makala hiyo yenyewe. Kazi hiyo inafungua mlango wa uchunguzi wa kihisia si tu wa kejeli kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maandishi bali kwa hali ya kejeli ya akili.', 'af': "Sarkasme is 'n uitbreidige fenomen in sosiale media, wat die saamste kommunikasie van betekening, influens en aanhouding toelaat. Besluit benodig wit om te produseer en wit te verstaan, wat van elke party kennis van norme, konteks en 'n sprekker se verstand vra. Inligting in 'n spreker se psykologiese profiel op die tyd van produksie is 'n waardelike bron van konteks vir sarkasme opdekking. By die gebruik van 'n neurale arkitektuur, wys ons betekeurige verskaffings in beskrywing presies wanneer kennis van die sprekker se mood op die tyd van produksie kan uitgevoer word. Ons fokus is op 'n sarkasme-opdekking op Twitter, en wys dat die mood wat deur 'n sprekker oor tweets uitgewys word, wat op 'n nuwe pos loop, is so nuttig 'n teken vir sarkasm as die onderwerp konteks van die pos self. Die werk maak die deur oop aan 'n empiriese uitsoek nie net van sarkasm in teks nie, maar van die sarkasiese aanstand van gedagte.", 'sq': "Sarkazmi është një fenomen i përhapur në media sociale, duke lejuar komunikimin e shkurtër të kuptimit, ndikimit dhe qëndrimit. Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker's mindset.  Shikimi në profilin psikologjik të një folësi në kohën e prodhimit është një burim i vlefshëm konteksti për zbulimin e sarkazmit. Duke përdorur një arkitekturë nervore, ne tregojmë fitime të rëndësishme në saktës in ë e zbulimit kur mund të përfundohet njohuria e humorit të zëdhënësit në kohën e prodhimit. Fokusi ynë është në zbulimin e sarkazmit në Twitter, dhe tregon se humori i shfaqur nga një zëdhënës gjatë tweeteve që çojnë në një post të ri është një shenjë e dobishme për sarkazmin si konteksti aktual i vetë postit. Puna hap derën për një eksplorim empirik jo vetëm të sarkazmit në tekst, por të gjendjes sarkastike të mendjes.", 'am': "ሳርካሲም በማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ ብዙ ነገር ነው፡፡ Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker's mindset.  በተወለደው ጊዜ የሲኮሎጂ ፕሮፋይል ውስጥ መክፈት ለሳርካሲም ማግኘት ዋጋው የክፍል ምንጭ ነው፡፡ የናቡር አካውንት በመጠቀም፣ የንግግር አካሄዱን ማወቅ በተደረገበት ጊዜ ሲታወቅ የሚያሳውቅ ትርፍን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ አዲስ ደብዳቤ ወደ አዲስ ደብዳቤ በሚገኘው በትዊተር ላይ የሚታየው አካባቢ እና አዲስ ደብዳቤ የጣዖት ጉዳይ ለጣፋጭ ጥቅም ነው፡፡ ሥራው የስርዓት አካባቢ ስህተት ነው እንጂ የጽሕፈት ስርዓት ብቻ አይደለም፡፡", 'fa': 'سارکاسم (Sarcasm) یک پدیده گسترده در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی است که اجازه می\u200cدهد ارتباط کامل معنی، تاثیر و رفتار باشد. تصمیم نیاز به دانشمندی برای تولید و دانشمندی که از هر گروهی می خواهد دانش طبیعی، موضوع و ذهن یک صحبت کننده باشد. توجه به پروژه روانشناسی یک صحبت کننده در زمان تولید یک منبع محیط ارزشمند برای شناسایی سارکاسم است. با استفاده از یک معماری عصبی، ما در دقیق کشف پیروزی مهم را نشان می دهیم وقتی دانش موجود صحبت کننده در زمان تولید می تواند آلوده شود. تمرکز ما روی شناسایی سارکاسم در توئیتر است، و نشان دهیم که روشنی که توسط یک صحبت کننده بر روی توئیت\u200cها به یک پست جدید هدایت می\u200cکند به عنوان محیط موضوع موضوع محیط محیط محیط است. این کار در را برای یک کشف امپراتیک باز می\u200cکند، نه تنها سارکاسم در متن، بلکه وضعیت سارکاسم ذهن.', 'hy': "Սարկազմը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում տարածված երևույթ է, որը թույլ է տալիս կարծիքի, ազդեցության և դիրքի կարճ հաղորդակցման: Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker's mindset.  Խոսախոսի հոգեբանական պրոֆիլը արտադրության ժամանակ արժեքավոր կոնտեքստի աղբյուր է սարկազմի հայտնաբերման համար: Օգտագործելով նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս նշանակալի բարձրացումներ հայտնաբերելու ճշգրտության մեջ, երբ խոսացողի տրամադրության գիտելիքը արտադրության ժամանակ կարող է ենթադրվել: Մեր կենտրոնացումն այն է, որ սարկազմը հայտնաբերվում է Թվիթերի վրա, և ցույց է տալիս, որ ելույթի կողմից ցուցադրված տրամադրությունը, որը առաջնորդում է նոր պոստին, նույնքան օգտակար է սարկազմի համար, որքան պոստի թեմային կոնտեքստը: Աշխատանքը բացում է դռները էմպրիկական ուսումնասիրության համար ոչ միայն տեքստի սարկազմի, այլ նաև ուղեղի սարկաստական վիճակի մասին:", 'tr': "Sosyal medýdanlaryň içindeki görnüşler bolup geçýän ýagdaýdyr. Bölüm düşünmesi gerekli, her partiden normaller, kontekstler ve s özlerin aklını almak gerekli. Ol oglan çykyşyň psikolojiki profilini üretilmegi şol wagtda gözöňünde sarkasm tanyşynyň üçin deňli çeşmesi bar. Näyral arhitektura ulanarak, s özleýäniň keýpişligini tapylyp bilýän wagtynda, özüniň keýpişligini tapylyp biljek wagtynda wajyp ýeterlik gazanýarys. Biziň tanyşymyz Twitter'da sarkasm alyp bardyr we tweets üzerinden sözleşýän kişiniň keýpişligi täze postlara çevrilýän ýagdaýyny görkezýäris. Işler empirik keşfedilmegiň gapyny açýar diňe keýfedilýän, aklyň sarkasy durumyndan däl.", 'az': "Sarkasm sosyal media içində böyük bir parçadır, anlama, təsirlərinin və davranışların müfəssəl bağlantısını sağlayar. Bütün dəstələrin normları, məlumatları və danışanların fikrindən öyrənməsini və anlamağı tələb edir. Söylənicinin psikolojik profilini təhsil etmə vaxtı sarkasm keşfinin değerli bir məlumatın mənbəsidir. Nöral arhitektura istifadə edərək, ürək vaxtında danışıcının vəziyyətini bilən kimi çox möhkəm keçirdik. Bizim təsirimiz Twitter'da sarkasm keşfinin üstündədir və göstəririk ki, yeni postaya qovuşan twetlərdən bir söhbətçinin vəziyyəti, postanın məsələsi kimi sarkasm üçün faydalı bir işaretdir. İş empirik keşif üçün qapısını açır. Sadəcə məktubla sarkasm deyil, lakin sarkastik fikirlərin durumunu.", 'bn': 'সার্কাস্মাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে একটি বিশাল ব্যাপার, যার মানে, প্রভাবিত এবং মনোভাব যোগাযোগের অনুমতি দেয়। প্রত্যেক দলের স্বাভাবিক, প্রেক্ষেত্র এবং বক্তৃপক্ষের মতামতের জ্ঞানের দাবি জানার জন্য উৎপাদন এবং উজ্জ্ঞান উৎপাদন করা উৎপাদনের সময় একজন বক্তাকারীর মানসিক প্রোফাইলে ঢোকাও বিদ্রোহী সনাক্তির জন্য একটি মূল্যবান উৎস। একটি নিউরেল কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে আমরা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অর্জন দেখাচ্ছি যখন কথাবার্তার মানসিক জ্ঞানের ব্যাপারে প্রযুক্তির সময় ক্ষতিগ্ আমাদের মনোযোগ টুইটারে বিদ্রূপ সনাক্তির উপর এবং দেখাচ্ছে যে টুইটের উপর একজন বক্তাকারীর মুদ্রা প্রদর্শন করেছে যা একটি নতুন পোস্টের দিকে নিয়ে যাচ্ছে তা বিদ্র বিদ্রোহীত অবস্থার বিরুদ্ধে কাজ খুলে দেয়া হয়েছে।', 'ca': "El sarcasme és un fenomen generalitzat en els mitjans socials, que permet la comunicació concisa del sentit, l'afecte i l'actitud. La concisió requereix que la intel·ligència produeixi i que la intel·ligència entengui, que requereix que cada parti coneixi les normes, el context i la mentalitat d'un orador. La visió del perfil psicològic d'un orador en el moment de la producció és una fontde context valiosa per la detecció del sarcasme. Utilitzant una arquitectura neuronal, demostram avanços significatius en la precisió de la detecció quan es pot deduir el coneixement de l'humor del parlant en el moment de la producció. El nostre foc és la detecció del sarcasme a Twitter, i mostra que l'humor mostrat per un orador a través de tweets que porta a un nou post és tan útil com el contexte tòpic del propi post. L'obra obre la porta a una exploració empírica no només del sarcasme en text, sinó de l'estat de ment sarcàstic.", 'bs': 'Sarkazam je prošireni fenomen u društvenim medijima, omogućavajući konkretnu komunikaciju smisla, utjecaj na i stav. Zaključenje zahtijeva vještina da proizvodi i razumije, što zahtijeva od svake strane znanje norme, konteksta i razuma govornika. Inzistiranje psihološkog profila govornika u vrijeme proizvodnje je vrijedan izvor konteksta za otkrivanje sarkazma. Koristeći neuralnu arhitekturu, pokazujemo značajne dobitke u točnosti otkrivanja kada se znanje raspoloženja govornika u vrijeme proizvodnje može inficirati. Naš fokus je na otkrivanju sarkazma na Twitteru, i pokazuje da raspoloženje koje je izložio govornik preko tweeta koji vodi do novog post a je kao korisno znak za sarkazam kao temalni kontekst samog posta. Rad otvara vrata empiričkog istraživanja ne samo sarkazma u tekstu, već sarkastičnog stanja uma.', 'et': 'Sarkasm on sotsiaalmeedias leviv nähtus, mis võimaldab tähenduse, mõju ja suhtumise lühidalt edastada. Lepitus nõuab tarkust toota ja mõista, mis nõuab igalt osapoolelt teadmisi normidest, kontekstist ja kõneleja mõtteviisist. Sisevaade kõneleja psühholoogilisest profiilist tootmise ajal on väärtuslik kontekstiallikas sarkasmi tuvastamiseks. Närviarhitektuuri abil näitame märkimisväärset kasu tuvastamise täpsuses, kui on võimalik järeldada teadmisi kõneleja meeleolust tootmise ajal. Meie keskendume sarkasmi tuvastamisele Twitteris ja näitame, et kõneleja poolt uue postituseni viinud säutsude kaudu väljendatud meeleolu on sarkasmi jaoks sama kasulik kui postituse enda aktuaalne kontekst. Teos avab ukse empiirilisele uurimisele mitte ainult sarkasmi tekstis, vaid sarkastilise meeleseisundi kohta.', 'cs': 'Sarkasmus je všudypřítomným jevem v sociálních médiích, který umožňuje stručnou komunikaci významu, vlivu a postoje. Smírání vyžaduje vtip k produkci a vtip k pochopení, což vyžaduje od každé strany znalost norem, kontextu a myšlení řečníka. Vhled do psychologického profilu řečníka v době produkce je cenným zdrojem kontextu pro detekci sarkasmu. Pomocí neuronové architektury ukazujeme významné zvýšení přesnosti detekce, když lze odvodit znalost nálady mluvčího v době produkce. Zaměřujeme se na detekci sarkasmu na Twitteru a ukazujeme, že nálada mluvčího nad tweety vedoucími k novému příspěvku je stejně užitečná jako aktuální kontext samotného příspěvku. Práce otevírá dveře k empirickému zkoumání nejen sarkasmu v textu, ale i sarkastického stavu mysli.', 'fi': 'Sarkasmi on sosiaalisen median yleinen ilmiö, joka mahdollistaa merkityksen, vaikutuksen ja asenteen ytimekkään viestinnän. Sovittelu vaatii älyä tuottaa ja älyä ymmärtää, mikä edellyttää jokaiselta osapuolelta tietoa normeista, kontekstista ja puhujan ajattelutavasta. Sisältö puhujan psykologiseen profiiliin tuotantohetkellä on arvokas kontekstin lähde sarkasmin havaitsemisessa. Neuroarkkitehtuurin avulla osoitamme merkittäviä parannuksia tunnistustarkkuuteen, kun voidaan päätellä kaiuttimen mielialasta tuotantohetkellä. Keskitymme sarkasmin havaitsemiseen Twitterissä ja osoitamme, että puhujan uuteen postaukseen johtavien twiittien kautta esittämä mieliala on yhtä hyödyllinen sarkasmille kuin itse postauksen ajankohtainen konteksti. Teos avaa oven empiiriselle tutkimukselle, joka ei koske vain sarkasmia tekstissä, vaan myös sarkastista mielentilaa.', 'sk': 'Sarkazem je prodoren pojav v družbenih medijih, ki omogoča jedrnato komunikacijo pomena, vpliva in odnosa. Sprava zahteva duhovito za produkcijo in duhovito za razumevanje, kar od vsake stranke zahteva poznavanje norm, kontekst in govornikovo miselnost. Vpogled v psihološki profil govornika v času produkcije je dragocen vir konteksta za odkrivanje sarkazma. Z nevronsko arhitekturo pokažemo znatne dobičke pri natančnosti zaznavanja, ko lahko sklepamo o razpoloženju govornika v času produkcije. Osredotočamo se na zaznavanje sarkazma na Twitterju in pokažemo, da je razpoloženje, ki ga govornik pokaže preko tweetov, ki vodijo do novega objave, enako koristno kot aktualni kontekst samega objave. Delo odpira vrata empiričnemu raziskovanju ne le sarkazma v besedilu, temveč sarkastičnega stanja duha.', 'ha': "Sarkasm yana da wani abu mai girma a cikin mitandai na jamii, yana yarda da koma da muhimmada, ma'anar muhimmin, mai amfani da muhimmada. Concision requires wit to produce and wit to understand, which demands from each party knowledge of norms, context and a speaker's mindset.  InsInspect cikin profilen aikin mai magana a lokacin manunufi shi ne wani kilo mai inganci wa canza za'a gane sarcasm. Yin amfani da matsayin neura, Munã nuna marufai mai girma a cikin karatun na tsari idan an san ma'anar mai magana a lokacin da za'a zartar da shi. Fokusiyarmu yana kan ganin sarkasm a Twitter, kuma yana nũna cewa muhimmin da wani mai magana ya nuna shi a kanzu hoteten kowace ta ƙara zuwa wani makala na daban, yana da amfani ga sarkasm kamar muhimmin makala da yake. Yin aikin yana buɗe ƙõfõfi zuwa wani jarrabi na muhimmi ba ta zama ba fãce sarki da littãfi, kuma amma halin sarcastic ne.", 'he': 'סרקזם הוא תופעה שגרתית בתקשורת חברתית, שמאפשרת לתקשורת קצרה של משמעות, השפעה וגישה. התאמה דורשת חוכמה כדי לייצר וחכמה כדי להבין, אשר דורש מכל ידע מסיבה של נורמות, הקשר ומחשבה של רמקול. הראייה לפרופיל הפסיכולוגי של רמקול בזמן הייצור היא מקור ערך של הקשר לזיהוי סרקזם. באמצעות ארכיטקטורה עצבית, אנו מראים שיפוטים משמעותיים בדיקת גילוי כאשר יודע על מצב הרוח של הרמקול בזמן הייצור יכול להיות מסכם. המרכז שלנו הוא על זיהוי סרקזם בטוויטר, ולהראות שהמצב הרוח המוצג על ידי רמקול על ידי טוויטרים שמובילים לתפקיד חדש הוא סימן שימושי לסרקזם כמו הקשר הנוכחי של הפוסט עצמו. העבודה פותחת את הדלת לחקירה אמפירית לא רק של סרקזם בטקסט, אלא של מצב המוח הסרקסטי.', 'jv': 'Sarkasm kuwi events sing perdadi nèng media sothik, iso ngejarakno komunikasi sing dikarepaké, titik lan titik. Tulung luwih akeh kelas kuwi nggawe lan kelas kuwi mau ngerti, awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo sabên ngerti apat kanggo kalawartané, kontèks lan salakno-salakno. Yacah ingkang dipuluhaan kelompok sing pisar dumadhi neng cuairing pancene nggawe barang kelompok nggawe barang sarkasm. Ngawe ngubah akeh alat sing nêr, kéné iso nggawe barang langkung pawar neng ngono nggawe barang langkung barang bakal seneng nggawe barang nggawe barang urip kuwi. Awakdhéwé éntuka perusahaan karo sarkasma dipunangé Tutor, lan mbukakipun kuwi nglanggar oleh bantuan winih dhéwé kuwi perusahaan mrobakno sing gawe ngulinakake tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno param sing dumadhi i i kebutuhan mrobat. Awak dhéwé éntuk mbukaké banjuré kebudhak éné, ora tau ngomong nik sarkasm sing nêmên, mengko iso nggawe gerakan.', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཆེད་དུ་འཇུག་པའི་སྐྱེས་བ་ཞིག་རེད། བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ལྟ་བ་དག་གི་རྟོགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་རྟོགས་པའི་སྐོར་བྲིས་དང་ཐབས་ཤེས་རྟོགས་དགོས། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡིན་དུས་ཚོད་དམ། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་ཌིས་ཌིར་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་རེད། ལས་ཀ་ནི་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་གི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སུ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པ་དེ་མིན་ན་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་དུས་ཡོད་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Identifying Humor in Reviews using Background Text Sources', 'ar': 'تحديد الفكاهة في المراجعات باستخدام مصادر نص الخلفية', 'pt': 'Identificando humor em resenhas usando fontes de texto de fundo', 'fr': "Identifier l'humour dans les revues à l'aide de sources de", 'es': 'Identificación del humor en las reseñas mediante fuentes de texto de fondo', 'ja': '背景テキストソースを使用したレビューでのユーモアの特定', 'zh': '用背景文本源识论幽默', 'hi': 'पृष्ठभूमि पाठ स्रोतों का उपयोग कर समीक्षा में हास्य की पहचान', 'ru': 'Идентификация юмора в отзывах с использованием источников текста фона', 'ga': 'Greann a Aithint i Léirmheasanna ag úsáid Foinsí Téacs Cúlra', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Humor azonosítása az értékelésekben a háttérszövegforrások segítségével', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση χιούμορ στις κριτικές χρησιμοποιώντας πηγές κειμένου φόντου', 'it': "Identificare l'umorismo nelle recensioni utilizzando fonti di testo di sfondo", 'mk': 'Идентификување на хумор во прегледовите користејќи извори на текст од позадина', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Humor dalam Periksaan menggunakan Sumber Teks Latar Belakang', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tal-Humor fir-Reviżjonijiet bl-użu ta’ Sorsi tat-Test tal-Isfond', 'ml': 'പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിന്റെ പദാവലി ഉറവിടങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് മൂന്തുകാരെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mn': 'Хавтасны Текст эх үүсвэрийг ашиглан шалгалтын хүндрэл тодорхойлох', 'no': 'Identifiserer humor i revisjonar med bakgrunntekstkjelder', 'kk': 'Аясының мәтін көзі бойынша сұлбаларындағы Humor- ды анықтау', 'lt': 'Atliekant peržiūras nustatomas humoras naudojant fono teksto šaltinius', 'ro': 'Identificarea umorului în recenzii folosind surse text de fundal', 'pl': 'Identyfikowanie humoru w recenzjach za pomocą źródeł tekstu w tle', 'sr': 'Identifikacija Humora u revizijama koristeći izvore teksta pozadine', 'si': 'පිටිපස්සේ පාළුවේ ප්\u200dරභාවිතය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණයේ හුමෝර් අඳුන්න', 'sv': 'Identifiera humor i recensioner med hjälp av bakgrundstextkällor', 'so': 'Identification Humor in Reviews using Background Text Sources', 'ta': 'பின்னணி உரை மூலங்களை பயன்படுத்தி காட்சியில் இனம் அடையாளம்', 'ur': 'پشتیبانی ٹکسٹ سورس کے استعمال کے ذریعے روشنی میں ہمور پہچان رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng con trai trong giờ xem thử dùng nguồn văn bản nền', 'hr': 'Identificiranje Humora u revizijama koristeći izvore teksta pozadine', 'nl': 'Humor identificeren in beoordelingen met behulp van achtergrondtekstbronnen', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на хумора в отзивите с помощта на фонови текстови източници', 'da': 'Identificering af humor i anmeldelser ved hjælp af baggrundstekstkilder', 'de': 'Erkennung von Humor in Rezensionen mithilfe von Hintergrundtextquellen', 'id': 'Identifikasi Humor dalam Revisi menggunakan Sumber Teks Latar Belakang', 'fa': 'شناسایی Humor در تحقیقات با استفاده از منبع متن زمینه', 'ko': '배경 텍스트 원본을 사용하여 평론의 유머를 식별하다', 'sw': 'Kutambua Binadamu katika Mapitio kwa kutumia vyanzo vya maandishi', 'tr': 'Arkaplan Metin Çeşmeleri ullanýan Ýygymy Tanyşdyrylýa', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i humorit në shqyrtime duke përdorur burimet e tekstit të sfondit', 'am': 'መደብ', 'hy': 'Հոմորի հայտնաբերումը վերլուծություններում օգտագործելով ֆոնդ տեքստի աղբյուրներ', 'az': 'Arxa plan Metin KaynaqlarńĪnńĪ istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk R…ônvanlarda Humor t…ôŇükil edilir', 'bn': 'পটভূমির টেক্সট উৎস ব্যবহার করে প্রতিবেদনে মানুষকে পরিচয় করা হবে', 'bs': 'Identifikacija Humora u revizijama koristeći izvore teksta pozadine', 'ca': "Identificar l'humor en revisions utilitzant fonts de text de fons", 'cs': 'Identifikace humoru v recenzích pomocí zdrojů textu na pozadí', 'et': 'Huumori tuvastamine ülevaates taustateksti allikate abil', 'fi': 'Huumorin tunnistaminen arvosteluissa taustatekstilähteiden avulla', 'af': 'Name', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Ugotavljanje humorja v pregledih z uporabo virov besedila v ozadju', 'he': 'מזהה הומור במחזורים באמצעות מקורות טקסט רקע', 'ha': 'Suna gane Duk da Hakima cikin Cire da ake amfani da Sources na Text Background', 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཡི་གེའི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་སྤྱོད་པའི་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ་འཕགས་རིས་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of automatically identifying humorous text from a new kind of text data, i.e., online reviews. We propose a generative language model, based on the theory of incongruity, to model humorous text, which allows us to leverage background text sources, such as Wikipedia entry descriptions, and enables construction of multiple features for identifying humorous reviews. Evaluation of these features using supervised learning for classifying reviews into humorous and non-humorous reviews shows that the features constructed based on the proposed generative model are much more effective than the major features proposed in the existing literature, allowing us to achieve almost 86 % accuracy. These humorous review predictions can also supply good indicators for identifying helpful reviews.', 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة التحديد التلقائي للنص الدعائي من نوع جديد من البيانات النصية ، أي المراجعات عبر الإنترنت. نقترح نموذجًا للغة التوليدية ، استنادًا إلى نظرية التناقض ، لنمذجة نص فكاهي ، مما يسمح لنا بالاستفادة من مصادر نص الخلفية ، مثل أوصاف إدخال ويكيبيديا ، ويتيح إنشاء ميزات متعددة لتحديد المراجعات المرحة. يُظهر تقييم هذه الميزات باستخدام التعلم الخاضع للإشراف لتصنيف المراجعات إلى مراجعات روح الدعابة وغير روح الدعابة أن الميزات التي تم إنشاؤها بناءً على النموذج التوليدي المقترح أكثر فاعلية بكثير من الميزات الرئيسية المقترحة في الأدبيات الحالية ، مما يسمح لنا بتحقيق ما يقرب من 86 ٪ من الدقة . يمكن أن توفر تنبؤات المراجعة روح الدعابة هذه أيضًا مؤشرات جيدة لتحديد المراجعات المفيدة.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el problema de identificar automáticamente texto humorístico a partir de un nuevo tipo de datos de texto, es decir, reseñas en línea. Proponemos un modelo de lenguaje generativo, basado en la teoría de la incongruencia, para modelar el texto humorístico, lo que nos permite aprovechar las fuentes de texto de fondo, como las descripciones de entradas de Wikipedia, y permite la construcción de múltiples funciones para identificar reseñas humorísticas. La evaluación de estas características mediante el aprendizaje supervisado para clasificar las reseñas en reseñas humorísticas y no humorísticas muestra que las características construidas en base al modelo generativo propuesto son mucho más efectivas que las principales características propuestas en la literatura existente, lo que nos permite alcanzar casi el 86% precisión. Estas divertidas predicciones de reseñas también pueden proporcionar buenos indicadores para identificar reseñas útiles.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le problème de l'identification automatique d'un texte humoristique à partir d'un nouveau type de données textuelles, c'est-à-dire des critiques en ligne. Nous proposons un modèle de langage génératif, basé sur la théorie de l'incongruité, pour modéliser le texte humoristique, qui nous permet d'exploiter des sources de texte d'arrière-plan, telles que les descriptions d'entrées Wikipédia, et permet de construire de multiples fonctionnalités pour identifier les critiques humoristiques. L'évaluation de ces caractéristiques à l'aide de l'apprentissage supervisé pour classer les revues en revues humoristiques et non humoristiques montre que les caractéristiques construites sur la base du modèle génératif proposé sont beaucoup plus efficaces que les principales fonctionnalités proposées dans la littérature existante, ce qui nous permet d'atteindre près de 86\xa0% précision. Ces prévisions humoristiques peuvent également fournir de bons indicateurs pour identifier des avis utiles.", 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema da identificação automática de texto humorístico a partir de um novo tipo de dado de texto, ou seja, resenhas online. Propomos um modelo de linguagem generativa, baseado na teoria da incongruência, para modelar o texto humorístico, o que nos permite alavancar fontes de texto de fundo, como descrições de verbetes da Wikipédia, e possibilita a construção de múltiplos recursos para identificação de resenhas humorísticas. A avaliação desses recursos usando aprendizado supervisionado para classificação de revisões em humorísticas e não humorísticas mostra que as características construídas com base no modelo generativo proposto são muito mais eficazes do que as principais características propostas na literatura existente, permitindo atingir quase 86% de acerto . Essas previsões humorísticas de revisão também podem fornecer bons indicadores para identificar revisões úteis.', 'ja': '私たちは、新しい種類のテキストデータ、すなわちオンラインレビューからユーモラスなテキストを自動的に識別する問題を研究しています。私たちは、ユーモラスなテキストをモデル化するために、不整合理論に基づいた生成言語モデルを提案します。これにより、ウィキペディアのエントリ記述などの背景テキストソースを活用し、ユーモラスなレビューを識別するための複数の機能を構築することができます。レビューをユーモラスなレビューと非ユーモラスなレビューに分類するための監督学習を使用したこれらの特徴の評価は、提案された生成モデルに基づいて構築された特徴が、既存の文献で提案された主要な特徴よりもはるかに効果的であり、ほぼ86 ％の精度を達成することを可能にすることを示している。これらのユーモラスなレビュー予測は、有用なレビューを特定するための良い指標を提供することもできます。', 'hi': 'हम एक नए प्रकार के पाठ डेटा से विनोदी पाठ की स्वचालित रूप से पहचान करने की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं, यानी, ऑनलाइन समीक्षा। हम असंगतता के सिद्धांत के आधार पर एक उत्पादक भाषा मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, विनोदी पाठ को मॉडल करने के लिए, जो हमें पृष्ठभूमि पाठ स्रोतों का लाभ उठाने की अनुमति देता है, जैसे कि विकिपीडिया प्रविष्टि विवरण, और विनोदी समीक्षाओं की पहचान करने के लिए कई सुविधाओं के निर्माण को सक्षम बनाता है। समीक्षाओं को विनोदी और गैर-विनोदी समीक्षाओं में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए पर्यवेक्षित सीखने का उपयोग करके इन विशेषताओं के मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित उत्पादक मॉडल के आधार पर निर्मित विशेषताएं मौजूदा साहित्य में प्रस्तावित प्रमुख विशेषताओं की तुलना में बहुत अधिक प्रभावी हैं, जिससे हमें लगभग 86% सटीकता प्राप्त करने की अनुमति मिलती है। ये विनोदी समीक्षा भविष्यवाणियां भी सहायक समीक्षाओं की पहचान करने के लिए अच्छे संकेतक प्रदान कर सकती हैं।', 'zh': '考之新文数(在线论)自动识别幽文。 发一本于不调之语,以拟幽默之本,使吾辈得用背景本源,如维基百科条目描述,而能构多种功能以识幽论。 用督学之类,幽非幽论,质之于成模,有效于文献,使近86%之准确率。 幽论可以知有用之指标。', 'ru': 'Изучаем проблему автоматической идентификации юмористического текста из нового вида текстовых данных - онлайн-рецензий. Мы предлагаем генеративную языковую модель, основанную на теории несогласованности, для моделирования юмористического текста, которая позволяет нам использовать фоновые текстовые источники, такие как описания записей в Википедии, и позволяет построить множество функций для идентификации юмористических отзывов. Оценка этих признаков с использованием контролируемого обучения для классификации отзывов на юмористические и несюмористические показывает, что признаки, построенные на основе предлагаемой генеративной модели, гораздо более эффективны, чем основные признаки, предложенные в существующей литературе, что позволяет нам достичь почти 86% точности. Эти юмористические прогнозы отзывов также могут обеспечить хорошие показатели для выявления полезных отзывов.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le téacs greannmhar a aithint go huathoibríoch ó chineál nua sonraí téacs, i.e., léirmheasanna ar líne. Molaimid múnla giniúna teanga, bunaithe ar theoiric na míréireachta, chun téacs greannmhar a shamhaltú, a ligeann dúinn úsáid a bhaint as foinsí cúlra téacs, mar shampla tuairiscí iontrála Vicipéid, agus a chuireann ar ár gcumas gnéithe iolracha a thógáil chun léirmheasanna greannmhara a aithint. Léiríonn meastóireacht ar na gnéithe seo agus úsáid á baint as foghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht chun athbhreithnithe a rangú ina léirmheasanna greannmhara agus neamhghreannmhara go bhfuil na gnéithe a tógadh bunaithe ar an tsamhail giniúna molta i bhfad níos éifeachtaí ná na príomhghnéithe a mholtar sa litríocht reatha, rud a ligeann dúinn beagnach 86% cruinneas a bhaint amach. . Is féidir leis na tuartha athbhreithnithe greannmhara seo táscairí maithe a sholáthar chun athbhreithnithe cuiditheacha a aithint.', 'hu': 'Tanulmányozzuk a humoros szövegek automatikus azonosításának problémáját egy új típusú szövegadatból, azaz online értékelésekből. A humoros szöveg modellezésére egy generációs nyelvi modellt javasolunk, amely lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy kihasználjuk a háttérszövegforrásokat, mint például a Wikipédia bejegyzések leírását, és lehetővé teszi számos funkció létrehozását a humoros vélemények azonosításához. Ezeknek a funkcióknak a felügyelt tanulással történő értékelése humoros és nem humoros értékelésekbe történő besorolására azt mutatja, hogy a javasolt generációs modell alapján kialakított funkciók sokkal hatékonyabbak, mint a meglévő szakirodalomban javasolt főbb jellemzők, így közel 86%-os pontosságot érhetünk el. Ezek a humoros értékelési előrejelzések jó mutatókat is szolgáltathatnak a hasznos értékelések azonosítására.', 'it': "Studiamo il problema dell'identificazione automatica del testo umoristico da un nuovo tipo di dati testuali, cioè le recensioni online. Proponiamo un modello di linguaggio generativo, basato sulla teoria dell'incongruenza, per modellare il testo umoristico, che ci permette di sfruttare fonti di testo di sfondo, come le descrizioni delle voci di Wikipedia, e consente la costruzione di molteplici funzionalità per identificare recensioni umoristiche. La valutazione di queste caratteristiche utilizzando l'apprendimento supervisionato per classificare le recensioni in recensioni umoristiche e non umoristiche mostra che le caratteristiche costruite sulla base del modello generativo proposto sono molto più efficaci delle principali caratteristiche proposte nella letteratura esistente, permettendoci di raggiungere quasi l'86% di accuratezza. Queste divertenti previsioni di revisione possono anche fornire buoni indicatori per identificare recensioni utili.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ავტომატურად ჰუმური ტექსტის მონაცემების პრობლემას შევსწავლობთ ახალი ტიპის ტექსტის მონაცემებით, ანუ, online reviews. ჩვენ განვითარებთ გენერაციური ენათის მოდელი, რომელიც არსებობის ტექსტის თეორია, რომელიც მოდის ჩვენ ფონური ტექსტის გამოსახულება, როგორც ვიკიპედიაში ჩანაწერების გამოსახულება, და მრავალ განსახულებების შექმნა ჰ ამ განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრება, რომლებიც გამოყენებული სწავლების გამოყენება, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებების კლასიფიკაციაში ჰუმორიური და არ ჰუმორიური განსაზღვრებებისთვის გამოყენებული განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებული მოდელზე უფრო эффективнია ეს ჰუმური განახლებები შეიძლება ასევე კარგი ინდექტორის განახლებისთვის გამოიყენება.', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame problem ą automatiškai nustatyti humorinį tekstą i š naujos rūšies teksto duomenų, t. y. internetinių peržiūrų. Siūlome generuojantį kalbų model į, pagrįstą neatitikimo teorija, modeliuoti humorinį tekstą, kuris leidžia mums sutelkti foninio teksto šaltinius, pvz., Wikipedia įrašo aprašymus, ir sudaryti galimybę sukurti įvairias savybes humorinėms apžvalgoms nustatyti. Vertinant šias savybes, naudojant prižiūrėtą mokymąsi peržiūroms klasifikuoti į humorines ir ne humorines peržiūras, matyti, kad pagal siūlomą kartos model į sukurtos savybės yra daug veiksmingesnės nei pagrindinės esamoje literatūroje siūlomos savybės, leidžiančios mums pasiekti beveik 86 proc. tikslumą. Šios humoriškos peržiūros prognozės taip pat gali suteikti gerų rodiklių, kaip nustatyti naudingas peržiūras.', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме проблемот со автоматското идентификување на хуморен текст од нови видови на текстови податоци, т.е. онлајн рецензии. Предложуваме генеративен јазички модел, базиран на теоријата на несогласувањето, за модел на хуморен текст, кој ни овозможува да ги искористиме изворите на текст од позадина, како што се описите на влезот на Википедија, и овозможува изградба на повеќе карактеристики за идентификување на хуморни Оценката на овие карактеристики користејќи го надгледуваното учење за класификација на рецензиите во хуморни и нехуморни рецензии покажува дека карактеристиките изградени врз основа на предложениот генерациски модел се многу поефикасни од главните карактеристики предложени во постоечката литература, што ни овозмож Овие хуморни прегледувања, исто така, можат да обезбедат добри индикатори за идентификување на корисни прегледувања.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari masalah untuk mengidentifikasi teks kelakar secara automatik dari jenis baru data teks, iaitu ulasan online. Kami mengusulkan model bahasa generatif, berdasarkan teori ketidaksamaan, untuk model teks humor, yang membolehkan kita menggunakan sumber teks latar belakang, seperti deskripsi masukan Wikipedia, dan membolehkan pembangunan beberapa ciri-ciri untuk mengenalpasti ulasan humor. Penghargaan ciri-ciri ini menggunakan pembelajaran yang diawasi untuk mengklasifikasikan ulasan ke ulasan yang kelakar dan tidak kelakar menunjukkan bahawa ciri-ciri yang dibina berdasarkan model generasi yang diusulkan jauh lebih berkesan daripada ciri-ciri utama yang diusulkan dalam literatur yang ada, membolehkan kita mencapai kepekatan hampir 86%. Ramalan ulasan humor ini juga boleh menyediakan indikator yang baik untuk mengenalpasti ulasan yang berguna.', 'kk': 'Біз жаңа мәтін деректерінен, яғни онлайн редакцияларынан, хумор мәтінді автоматты түрде анықтау мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз жалпы тіл үлгісін қолданамыз, тұрақтық теориясына негізделген, хумориялық мәтін үлгісін үлгілеуге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл біздің аясының мәтін көздерін, мысалы Википедия жазуының түсініктемелерін, және х Бұл мүмкіндіктерді бақылау үшін дәрігерлерді дәрігерлерді дәрігерлеу және дәрігерлерді дәрігерлеу үшін бақылау үшін дәрігерлерді дәрігерлеу және дәрігерлерді дәрігерлеу үшін дәрігерлерінің негізінде құрылған мүмкіндікт Бұл хумориялық қарау бақылауы да көмектесетін қарауларды анықтау үшін жақсы индикаторлар бере алады.', 'mn': 'Бид шинэ төрлийн текст өгөгдлийг автоматаар мэдээллийг автоматаар олж мэдэх асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид бүтээлч хэл загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Хуморын текст загварын үндсэн. Энэ нь бидэнд хөнгөн текст эх үүсвэрүүдийг ашиглах боломжтой. Жишээ нь Википедиа нэвтрүүлэх загварын тайлбар боломжтой. Эдгээр тодорхойлолтуудыг хямрал болон хямрал биш шүүмжлэлтүүдийн хувьд судалгааг хичээлдэг суралцаа ашиглаж байгаа эдгээр тодорхойлолтуудын үнэлгээ үзүүлэх нь бидэнд бараг 86% зөв байдалд хүрэх боломжтой болгож байна. Эдгээр хямрал шинжилгээний таамаглал нь мөн тусламжтай шинжилгээг тодорхойлдохын тулд сайн тодорхойлж чадна.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പുതിയ തരത്തിലെ ടെക്സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഡേറ്റാകളില്\u200d നിന്നും തമാശയുള്ള പദാവലിയെ സ്വയം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രശ്ന വിക്കിപിഡിയ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയുള്ള വിക്കിപ്പിഡിയയുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയുള്ള ഒരു ജനററിവ് ഭാഷ മോഡേല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് തമാശയുള്ള പരിശോ നിലവിലുള്ള സാഹിത്യത്തിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സാഹിത്രത്തെക്കാള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും തമാശയില്ലാത്ത പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് ഈ തമാശ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα του αυτόματου εντοπισμού χιουμοριστικού κειμένου από ένα νέο είδος δεδομένων κειμένου, δηλαδή διαδικτυακές κριτικές. Προτείνουμε ένα παραγωγικό γλωσσικό μοντέλο, βασισμένο στη θεωρία της ασυνέπειας, για να μοντελοποιήσουμε χιούμορ κείμενο, το οποίο μας επιτρέπει να αξιοποιήσουμε πηγές κειμένου υποβάθρου, όπως περιγραφές καταχωρίσεων της Βικιπαίδειας, και επιτρέπει την κατασκευή πολλαπλών χαρακτηριστικών για τον προσδιορισμό χιουμοριστικών κριτικών. Η αξιολόγηση αυτών των χαρακτηριστικών με τη χρήση εποπτευόμενης μάθησης για την ταξινόμηση των αναθεωρήσεων σε χιουμοριστικές και μη χιουμοριστικές κριτικές δείχνει ότι τα χαρακτηριστικά που κατασκευάζονται με βάση το προτεινόμενο παραγωγικό μοντέλο είναι πολύ πιο αποτελεσματικά από τα κύρια χαρακτηριστικά που προτείνονται στην υπάρχουσα βιβλιογραφία, επιτρέποντας την επίτευξη σχεδόν 86% ακρίβειας. Αυτές οι αστείες προβλέψεις ανασκόπησης μπορούν επίσης να παρέχουν καλούς δείκτες για τον προσδιορισμό χρήσιμων αναθεωρήσεων.', 'no': 'Vi studerer problemet med å automatisk identifisera humoren tekst frå ein ny type tekstdata, t.d. online reviews. Vi foreslår eit generert språk-modell, basert på teorien om inkongruitet, til å modellere humoren-tekst, som tillater oss å levera bakgrunnskilder, som Wikipedia-oppføringskildringar, og slår på å konstruera fleire funksjonar for å identifisera humorene gjennomsikt. Evaluering av desse funksjonane ved å bruka oversikt læring for å klassifisera gjennomsikt i humorene og ikkje-humorene gjennomsikt viser at funksjonane som er konstruerte basert på den foreslåde genereringsmodellen er mykje meir effektive enn dei viktige funksjonane som er foreslått i den eksisterande literaturen, og tillater oss å oppnå nesten 86% n Desse humorene gjennomgang kan også tilbys gode indikatorer for å identifisera hjelpelige gjennomgang.', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw il-problem a tal-identifikazzjoni awtomatika tat-test humoruż minn tip ġdid ta’ dejta tat-test, jiġifieri reviżjonijiet onlajn. Aħna nipproponu mudell lingwistiku ġenerattiv, ibbażat fuq it-teorija tal-inkogrunità, biex nimmudellaw test humoruż, li jippermettilna nagħmlu użu minn sorsi tat-test fl-isfond, bħad-deskrizzjonijiet tad-dħul tal-Wikipedia, u jippermettilna l-kostruzzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi multipli għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ reviżjonijiet humorużi. L-evalwazzjoni ta’ dawn il-karatteristiċi bl-użu ta’ tagħlim sorveljat għall-klassifikazzjoni ta’ reviżjonijiet f’reviżjonijiet humorożi u mhux humorożi turi li l-karatteristiċi mibnija abbażi tal-mudell ġenerattiv propost huma ħafna aktar effettivi mill-karatteristiċi ewlenin proposti fil-letteratura eżistenti, li jippermettulna niksbu kważi 86 % preċiżjoni. Dawn il-previżjonijiet ta’ reviżjoni humorosa jistgħu jipprovdu wkoll indikaturi tajbin għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ reviżjonijiet utli.', 'pl': 'Badamy problem automatycznego identyfikowania humorystycznego tekstu z nowego rodzaju danych tekstowych, czyli recenzji online. Proponujemy generatywny model językowy, oparty na teorii niezgodności, do modelowania tekstu humorystycznego, który pozwala nam wykorzystać źródła tekstu tła, takie jak opisy wpisów Wikipedii, oraz umożliwia budowę wielu funkcji identyfikacji humorystycznych recenzji. Ocena tych cech przy użyciu nauki nadzorowanej do klasyfikacji recenzji na recenzje humorystyczne i niehumorystyczne pokazuje, że cechy zbudowane w oparciu o proponowany model generatywny są znacznie skuteczniejsze niż główne cechy proponowane w istniejącej literaturze, pozwalając osiągnąć prawie 86% dokładności. Te humorystyczne prognozy recenzji mogą również dostarczyć dobrych wskaźników do identyfikacji pomocnych recenzji.', 'ro': 'Studiem problema identificării automate a textului umoristic dintr-un nou tip de date text, adică recenzii online. Propunem un model de limbaj generativ, bazat pe teoria incongruenței, pentru a modela text umoristic, care ne permite să utilizăm surse de text de fundal, cum ar fi descrierile intrărilor Wikipedia, și permite construirea mai multor caracteristici pentru identificarea recenziilor umoristice. Evaluarea acestor caracteristici folosind învățarea supravegheată pentru clasificarea recenziilor în recenzii umoristice și non-umoristice arată că caracteristicile construite pe baza modelului generativ propus sunt mult mai eficiente decât caracteristicile majore propuse în literatura de specialitate existentă, permițându-ne să obținem o precizie de aproape 86%. Aceste previziuni umoristice de revizuire pot furniza, de asemenea, indicatori buni pentru identificarea recenziilor utile.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo problem automatske identifikacije humorog teksta iz novih podataka teksta, tj. online preglede. Predlažemo generični jezički model, na temelju teorije nepoštovanja, modelu humoroznog teksta, koji nam omogućava da iskoristimo izvore teksta pozadine, poput opisa ulaska u Wikipediju, i omogućava izgradnju višestrukih karakteristika za identifikaciju humoroznih pregleda. Evaluacija tih karakteristika koristeći nadzorno učenje za klasifikaciju pregleda u humorozne i nehumorozne preglede pokazuje da su karakteristike izgrađene na temelju predloženog genetskog modela mnogo efikasnije od najvećih karakteristika predloženih u postojećoj literaturi, omogućavajući nam da postignemo skoro 86% tačnosti. Ove humorozne predviđanja preglede takođe mogu pružiti dobre indikatore za identifikaciju korisnih pregleda.', 'so': "Dhibaatooyinka aan si bilowga ah u aqoonsan karno qoraal fudud oo macluumaad cusub ah, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka internetka. Waxaan horumarinaynaa tusaale ahaan afka geneeral ah oo ku saleysan fikrada aan shaqo la’aanta, si aan u sameynno qoraal fudud, kaasoo inagu ogolaa in aan soo dirno sourceed sawir ah ee warqada bakhtiga ah, tusaale ahaan qoraalka qorashada Wikipedia, waxaana sameyn kara qaab badan, si aan loo aqoonsado baaritaanka fudud. Ka qiimeynta waxyaabahaas oo lagu isticmaalo waxbarashada la ilaaliyo oo loo qorayo baaritaanka fudud iyo fududaadka la'aanta ayaa tusaya in xayawayaasha lagu dhisay tusaalaha la soo jeeday ay ay ka faa’iido badan yihiin sharciga muhiimka ah ee la soo jeeday qoraalka heysta, waxayna inaga dhigi karaan qiyaastii 86 boqolkiiba saxda ah. Aqoonta fududaanka waxaad sidoo kale heli kartaa calaamado wanaagsan oo ku qoran kara aqoonsiga baaritaanka caawinta ah.", 'sv': 'Vi studerar problemet med att automatiskt identifiera humoristisk text från en ny typ av textdata, dvs. online recensioner. Vi föreslår en generativ språkmodell, baserad på teorin om inkonsekvens, för att modellera humoristisk text, som gör det möjligt för oss att utnyttja bakgrundstexter, såsom Wikipedia-postbeskrivningar, och möjliggör konstruktion av flera funktioner för att identifiera humoristiska recensioner. Utvärdering av dessa funktioner med hjälp av övervakad inlärning för att klassificera recensioner i humoristiska och icke-humoristiska recensioner visar att de funktioner som konstruerats baserat på den föreslagna generativa modellen är mycket effektivare än de viktigaste funktioner som föreslås i befintlig litteratur, vilket gör att vi kan uppnå nästan 86% noggrannhet. Dessa humoristiska granskningsförslag kan också ge bra indikatorer för att identifiera användbara recensioner.', 'si': 'අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අළුත් පාළුවක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඉතින්, අන්ලයි අපි නිර්මාණක භාෂාවක් මොඩේලයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, නිර්මාණයේ සිද්ධිය, හිමෝරු පාළුවක් මොඩේල් කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අපිට පිටිපසුම් පාළුවක් මූල්\u200dයා විශ්වාස කරන්නේ මේ විශේෂතාවන්ගේ අවශ්\u200dය භාවිතා සාධාරණය සඳහා සාධාරණය සඳහා විශේෂ විශේෂතාවන් සඳහා විශේෂ විශේෂතාවන් සඳහා විශේෂතාවන් නිර මේ විහිළුවක් පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් හොඳ සංඥාවක් සමහර විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய வகையான உரை தகவலிலிருந்து தானாகவே வேடிக்கையான உரையை கண்டறியும் பிரச்சினையை படிக்கிறோம், அதாவத நாம் விகிபிடியா நுழைவு விவரிப்புகள் போன்ற பொதுவான மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை மாதிரிக்க முடியும், அது விக்கிபிடியா நுழைவு விவரிப்புகளை போன்ற பின்னணி உரை மூலங்களை ப இந்த குணங்களை பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள படிப்பார்வைகளை வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கு பயன்படுத்தி சிகிச்சைக்கும் மற்றும் வேடிக்கைக்கும் முறையில்லாத முறைமையின் அடிப்படையில் அமைக்கப்பட்ட பண்புகள இந்த வேடிக்கையான முன்னோட்டம் முன்னோட்டங்களை கொடுக்க முடியும் நல்ல சுட்டிக்குறிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்', 'ur': 'ہم اپنا مسئلہ اپنا پڑھنا چاہتے ہیں کہ ایک نوی نوی نوع ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ سے ہنسی ٹیکسٹ پہچان سکتے ہیں، یعنی آنلاین ریوئیز. ہم ایک ژنرانیٹ زبان موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر معلومات کی نظریہ پر، جسے ہمیں پچھلی ٹیکسٹ سروروں کے ذریعہ استعمال کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے، جیسے ویکیپیڈیا اندر کی توص یہ فرضیات کا مطالبہ کرتا ہے کہ ہنسی اور غیر ہنسی روشنی میں روشنی کرنا کے لئے تحقیق کی تعلیم کے مطابق تحقیق کی استعمال کرتا ہے، یہ نشان دیتا ہے کہ ان فرضیات جو پیشنهاد کی جنرائیٹ موڈل پر بنائے گئے ہیں ان سے بہت زیادہ مطالب ہیں جو موجود ادبیات میں پیشنهاد کی گئی ہیں، اور ہمیں تقری یہ ہنسی آزمائش کی آزمائش بھی بہترین نشانیوں کو مددگار آزمائش کے لئے پہچان سکتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz yangi matn maʼlumotidan aniqlashni avtomatik aniqlash muammolarini o'rganamiz, balki online ravishda. We propose a generative language model, based on the theory of incongruity, to model humorous text, which allows us to leverage background text sources, such as Wikipedia entry descriptions, and enables construction of multiple features for identifying humorous reviews.  Bu imkoniyatlarni o'rganish uchun taʼminlovchi o'rganish uchun o'rganish imkoniyatlarni o'rganish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatish mumkin, ilova qilingan generativ modeli asosida yaratilgan imkoniyatlar mavjud littatidagi maksimal imkoniyatlarning asosiy xususiyatlaridan ko'proq ishlatiladi, bizni qanchalik 86% tizimga erishga ruxsat beradi. Bu g'oyalar taʼminlovchisi qoʻllanmalarni aniqlashga yordam berish uchun yaxshi indikatlarni qo'shish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề tự động nhận diện văn bản hóm hỉnh từ một loại dữ liệu văn bản mới, tức là đánh giá qua mạng. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình ngôn ngữ tạo hóa, dựa trên lý thuyết bất đồng, để mô hình văn bản cười, cho phép chúng tôi sử dụng các nguồn văn bản nền, như mô tả thư mục Wikipedia, và cho phép xây dựng nhiều tính năng để xác định các bài phỏng hài hước. Đánh giá các tính năng này qua việc học hành giám sát để phân loại các bài phỏng vấn thành các bài kiểm tra hài hước và không hài hước cho thấy các tính năng được xây dựng dựa trên mô hình gây ra đề nghị hiệu quả nhiều hơn các yếu tố chính xác trong văn học hiện tại, cho phép chúng ta đạt được gần hơn 86. Những dự đoán khoa học hài hước cũng có thể cung cấp những chỉ thị tốt để xác định xem xét hữu ích.', 'da': 'Vi studerer problemet med automatisk identificering af humoristisk tekst ud fra en ny form for tekstdata, dvs. online anmeldelser. Vi foreslår en generativ sprogmodel, baseret på teorien om uoverensstemmelse, til at modellere humoristisk tekst, som giver os mulighed for at udnytte baggrundstekstkilder, såsom Wikipedia-indgangsbeskrivelser, og muliggør opbygning af flere funktioner til at identificere humoristiske anmeldelser. Evaluering af disse funktioner ved hjælp af overvåget læring til klassificering af anmeldelser i humoristiske og ikke-humoristiske anmeldelser viser, at de funktioner, der er konstrueret på baggrund af den foreslåede generative model, er langt mere effektive end de vigtigste funktioner, der foreslås i den eksisterende litteratur, hvilket giver os mulighed for at opnå næsten 86% nøjagtighed. Disse humoristiske anmeldelser forudsigelser kan også give gode indikatorer til at identificere nyttige anmeldelser.', 'bg': 'Проучваме проблема за автоматично идентифициране на хумористичен текст от нов вид текстови данни, т.е. онлайн рецензии. Предлагаме генеративен езиков модел, базиран на теорията за несъгласието, за моделиране на хумористичен текст, който ни позволява да използваме фонови текстови източници, като описания на записи в Уикипедия, и да позволи изграждането на множество функции за идентифициране на хумористични отзиви. Оценката на тези характеристики чрез контролирано обучение за класифициране на ревюта в хумористични и нехумористични ревюта показва, че функциите, изградени въз основа на предложения генеративен модел, са много по-ефективни от основните характеристики, предложени в съществуващата литература, което ни позволява да постигнем почти 86% точност. Тези хумористични прогнози за преглед също могат да предоставят добри показатели за идентифициране на полезни прегледи.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen het probleem van het automatisch identificeren van humoristische tekst uit een nieuw soort tekstgegevens, namelijk online reviews. We stellen een generatief taalmodel voor, gebaseerd op de theorie van incongruïteit, om humoristische tekst te modelleren, waarmee we gebruik kunnen maken van achtergrondtekstbronnen, zoals Wikipedia-ingangsbeschrijvingen, en de constructie van meerdere functies voor het identificeren van humoristische beoordelingen mogelijk maakt. Evaluatie van deze kenmerken met behulp van supervised learning voor het classificeren van reviews in humoristische en niet-humoristische reviews toont aan dat de kenmerken die zijn geconstrueerd op basis van het voorgestelde generatieve model veel effectiever zijn dan de belangrijkste kenmerken die in de bestaande literatuur worden voorgesteld, waardoor we bijna 86% nauwkeurigheid kunnen bereiken. Deze humoristische review voorspellingen kunnen ook goede indicatoren leveren voor het identificeren van nuttige reviews.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah untuk mengidentifikasi secara otomatis teks humor dari jenis baru data teks, i.e., resensi online. Kami mengusulkan model bahasa generatif, berdasarkan teori ketidakkonsistensi, untuk model teks humor, yang memungkinkan kita menggunakan sumber teks latar belakang, seperti deskripsi masukan Wikipedia, dan memungkinkan konstruksi berbagai fitur untuk mengidentifikasi resensi humor. Evaluasi ciri-ciri ini menggunakan belajar yang diawasi untuk mengklasifikasi penelitian menjadi penelitian humor dan tidak humor menunjukkan bahwa ciri-ciri yang dibuat berdasarkan model generasi yang diusulkan jauh lebih efektif daripada ciri-ciri utama yang diusulkan dalam literatur yang ada, memungkinkan kita mencapai hampir 86% akurasi. Persoalan penelitian humor ini juga dapat menyediakan indikator yang baik untuk mengidentifikasi penelitian yang berguna.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo problem automatske identifikacije humornog teksta iz novih podataka teksta, tj. online preglede. Predlažemo generični jezički model, temeljito na teoriji neskladnosti, modelu humoroznog teksta, koji nam omogućava utjecati na izvore teksta pozadine, poput opisa ulaska u Wikipedia, i omogućava izgradnju višestrukih karakteristika za identifikaciju humoroznih pregleda. Procjenjivanje tih karakteristika koristeći nadzorno učenje za klasifikaciju pregleda u humorozne i ne humorozne preglede pokazuje da su karakteristike izgrađene na temelju predloženog generičnog modela mnogo učinkovitije od najvećih karakteristika predloženih u postojećoj literaturi, omogućavajući nam ostvariti skoro 86% preciznosti. Ove humorozne predviđanja preglede mogu također pružiti dobre indikatore za identifikaciju pomoćnih pregleda.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das Problem der automatischen Identifizierung humorvoller Texte aus einer neuen Art von Textdaten, d.h. Online-Rezensionen. Wir schlagen ein generatives Sprachmodell vor, das auf der Theorie der Inkongruität basiert, um humorvollen Text zu modellieren, das es uns ermöglicht, Hintergrundtextquellen wie Wikipedia-Eintragsbeschreibungen zu nutzen und die Konstruktion mehrerer Funktionen zur Identifizierung humorvoller Rezensionen ermöglicht. Die Bewertung dieser Merkmale mittels überwachten Lernens zur Klassifizierung von Reviews in humorvolle und nicht humorvolle Reviews zeigt, dass die auf dem vorgeschlagenen generativen Modell konstruierten Merkmale viel effektiver sind als die in der bestehenden Literatur vorgeschlagenen Hauptfunktionen, wodurch wir fast 86% Genauigkeit erreichen können. Diese humorvollen Review-Vorhersagen können auch gute Indikatoren liefern, um hilfreiche Reviews zu identifizieren.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل شناسایی متن خنده\u200cدار از یک نوع داده\u200cهای متن جدید، یعنی بررسی\u200cهای آنلاین را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما یک مدل ژنرال زبانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، بر اساس تئوری غیرعامل، برای مدل متن خنده\u200cدار، که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد منبع متن پشتیبانی را تحت تاثیر قرار دهیم، مثل توضیح وارد ویکیپدیا، و به ساختن ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا اجازه می\u200cدهد که ارزیابی این ویژگی\u200cها با استفاده از یادگیری تحت نظر برای تحقیقات تحقیقات به تحقیقات خنده\u200cدار و غیر خنده\u200cدار نشان می\u200cدهد که ویژگی\u200cهای ساخته شده بر اساس مدل پیشنهاد نسل\u200cآوری بسیار مثبت\u200cتر از ویژگی\u200cهای بزرگ پیشنهاد در ادبیات موجود هستند، که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد این پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای بازرسی خنده\u200cآور می\u200cتوانند نشان\u200cدهنده\u200cهای خوب را برای شناسایی بررسی\u200cهای کمک\u200cکننده نیز تهیه کنند.', 'sw': 'Tunafundisha tatizo la kutambua ujumbe wa kuchekesha kutoka kwa aina mpya ya taarifa za maandishi, yaani, utafiti wa mtandaoni. Tunapendekeza muundo wa lugha ya kizalendo, kwa kutumia nadharia ya kutokuwepo na ukosefu, kutengeneza ujumbe wa kuchekesha, ambao unaruhusu kututumia vyanzo vya maandishi ya nyuma, kama vile maelezo ya Wikipedia, na inawezesha kujenga vipengele kadhaa kwa ajili ya kutambua tafiti za kuchekesha. Uthibiti wa tabia hizi kwa kutumia elimu inayofuatiliwa kwa ajili ya kutafiti kwa utafiti wa ucheshi na wasio na utani unaonyesha kwamba vipengele vilivyojengwa kwa msingi wa muundo wa jenerali unaopendekezwa ni ufanisi zaidi ya vipengele vikuu ambavyo vinaturuhusu kufikia takribani asilimia 86. Tabiri hizi za ucheshi zinaweza pia kutoa alama nzuri kwa kutambua tafiti zinazosaidia.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 텍스트 데이터, 즉 온라인 평론에서 유머러스한 텍스트를 자동으로 식별하는 문제를 연구한다.우리는 부조화 이론을 바탕으로 하는 생성적 언어 모델을 제시하여 유머 텍스트를 모의했다. 이 모델은 배경 텍스트의 원본, 예를 들어 위키백과 항목 묘사를 활용하고 여러 가지 특징을 구축하여 유머 평론을 식별할 수 있도록 지원한다.감독 학습을 이용하여 이러한 특징을 평가하고 평론을 유머와 비유머 평론으로 나눈 결과 제시된 생성 모델을 바탕으로 구축된 특징이 기존 문헌에서 제시한 주요 특징보다 훨씬 효과적이어서 우리는 거의 86%의 정확도를 얻을 수 있다.이런 유머러스한 평론 예측도 유용한 평론을 확정하는 데 좋은 지표를 제공할 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë problemin e identifikimit automatik të tekstit humor nga një lloj i ri të dhënash teksti, pra, përmbledhje online. Ne propozojmë një model gjuhësh gjenerative, bazuar në teorinë e mospërputhjes, për të modeluar tekstin humor, që na lejon të përdorim burimet e tekstit të sfondit, të tilla si përshkrimet e hyrjes në Wikipedia dhe lejon ndërtimin e karakteristikave të shumta për identifikimin e përmbledhjeve humore. Vlerësimi i këtyre karakteristikave duke përdorur mësimin e mbikqyrur për klasifikimin e shqyrtimeve në shqyrtime humore dhe jo humore tregon se karakteristikat e ndërtuara bazuar në model in e propozuar gjenerativ janë shumë më efektive se karakteristikat kryesore të propozuara në letërsinë ekzistuese, duke na lejuar të arrijmë saktësinë pothuajse 86%. Këto parashikime të shqyrtimit humor mund të ofrojnë gjithashtu tregues të mirë për identifikimin e shqyrtimeve të dobishme.', 'am': 'የአዲስ ዓይነት የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች የሐሳብ ጽሑፎችን በአዲስ ዓይነት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እንደWikipedia የመግለጫ ጽሑፎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል የውይይት የጽሑፍ ጽሑፎችን ማሳሰል እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡ እነዚህን ምርጫዎች በማስተማርና ለመደነቂያ እና የማስቆጣጠር ማድረግ ለመጠየቅ እና በሐሳብ እና በማይደነግጥ ስርዓቶች በተዘጋጀው አነስተኛዊ ሞዴል ላይ የተመሠረቱት ምርጫዎች በአሁኑ ሐሳብ ላይ ከታዋቂው ትልቁ ምርጫዎች የበለጡ ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህም የሐሳብ ፍጻሜዎች የሚጠቅሙትን የጥቅም ጉዳይ ማሳየት እንዲችሉ ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': 'Biz özümizden näçe tür metin maglumatyndan, i ň.ýagdaýynda, online çykyşlaryň özüni awtomatik tanamagyň meselelerini okaýarys. Biz ýene-de bolmadyk dil nusgasyny teklip edip, garyp metin teoriýasyna daýanýan bir nusgasyny teklip edip, bu nusgasy biziň arkada metin çeşmelerini etmäge rugsat berýär ýaly Wikipediýa girdi tasvir edilýän ýaly, we gyzgyt barlamaklary üçin birnäçe özellikleri gurmana mümkin edýäris Bu özellikleriň deňlenmesi çykyşlary garyp we ýüzünç çykyşlara klasifikasyň üçin gözetli öwrenmeleri ulanan çykyşlaryň çykyşlaryň üýtgeýän nusgalarynyň öngörülen döredijilik modelleriň esasy edebiýatda esasy özelliklerinden has möhüm üýtgeýändigini görkezýär. Bu biziň 86% dygga Bu ýüregi çykyş öngörümleri hem gowy görkezmeler kömek çykyşlaryny tanamak üçin saýlayabilir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հենց նոր տեսակի տեքստի տվյալներից, այսինքն՝ առցանց վերլուծություններից հումորային տեքստի ինքնաբացահայտելու խնդիրը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի սերունդային լեզվի մոդել, որը հիմնված է անհամապատասխանության տեսության վրա, հումորային տեքստի մոդելը, որը թույլ է տալիս մեզ օգտագործել հումորային տեքստի աղբյուրները, ինչպիսիք են Վիքիփեդիայի մուտքի նկարագրությունները, և հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմա Այս հատկանիշների գնահատումը օգտագործելով վերահսկված ուսումնասիրությունը հումորային և ոչ հումորային վերահսկումների դասակարգման համար ցույց է տալիս, որ հատկանիշները, կառուցված առաջարկված սերնդի մոդելի վրա, շատ ավելի արդյունավետ են, քան գոյություն ունի գոյություն ունեցող գրականության հիմնական հա These humorous review predictions can also supply good indicators for identifying helpful reviews.', 'az': 'Biz yeni məlumat məlumatlarından, əlbəttə, onlayn məlumatlarından humor məlumatlarını avtomatik təşkil etmək problemlərini öyrənirik. Bizim Wikipedia giriş tanımlamaları kimi arxa plan mətn mənbələrini yaratmağımız üçün çoxlu xüsusiyyətlərin inşallarını mümkün edə bilər. Bu xüsusiyyətlərin müəyyən edilmiş öyrənməsi ilə istifadə edilən tərzlərin müəyyən edilməsini humor və humor olmayan tərzlərin tərzlərinə görə qurulduğu xüsusiyyətlərin, qurulduğu nümunədir modeli üzərində qurulduğu xüsusiyyətlər mövcuddur literaturada tərzlərin ən böyük xüsusiyyətlərindən daha et Bu gülünç görünüş tədbirləri də faydalı görünüşləri tanıtmaq üçün yaxşı indikator sağlayabilir.', 'bs': 'Proučavamo problem automatske identifikacije humorog teksta iz novih podataka teksta, tj. online preglede. Predlažemo generični jezički model, temeljito na teoriji neskladnosti, modelu humoroznog teksta, koji nam omogućava da iskoristimo izvore teksta pozadine, poput opisa ulaska u Wikipediju, i omogućava izgradnju višestrukih karakteristika za identifikaciju humoroznih pregleda. Procjenjivanje tih karakteristika koristeći nadzorno učenje za klasifikaciju pregleda u humorozne i ne humorozne preglede pokazuje da su karakteristike izgrađene na temelju predloženog genetskog modela mnogo učinkovitije od glavnih karakteristika predloženih u postojećoj literaturi, omogućavajući nam da postignemo skoro 86% tačnosti. Ove humorozne predviđanja preglede također mogu pružiti dobre indikatore za identifikaciju pomoćnih pregleda.', 'ca': "We study the problem of automatically identifying humorous text from a new kind of text data, i.e., online reviews.  Proposem un model de llenguatge generador, basat en la teoria de l'incongruïtat, per modelar text humorós, que ens permet aprofitar fonts de text de fons, com les descripcions d'entrada de Wikipedia, i permet la construcció de múltiples característiques per identificar revisions humoroses. Evaluation of these features using supervised learning for classifying reviews into humorous and non-humorous reviews shows that the features constructed based on the proposed generative model are much more effective than the major features proposed in the existing literature, allowing us to achieve almost 86% accuracy.  Aquestes prediccions humoroses de revisió també poden aportar bons indicadors per identificar revisions útils.", 'bn': 'আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি নতুন ধরনের টেক্সট ডাটা থেকে হাস্যকর লেখার সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি, যেমন অনলাইন রিভিউ। আমরা একটি জেনারেটিভ ভাষার মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যা অন্তর্ভুক্ত তত্ত্বের ভিত্তিতে, হাস্যকর টেক্সট মডেল করার জন্য, যা আমাদের পটভূমির টেক্সট উৎস, যেমন উইকিপিডিয়া এন্ট্রি বিবরণ এব এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিষয়গুলো পর্যবেক্ষণের শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে হাস্যকর এবং হাস্যকর পর্যবেক্ষণের জন্য ব্যবহার করা শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে তা দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত জেনারেটিভ মডেলের ভিত্তিতে নির্ এই হাস্যকর প্রত্যাখ্যানের ভবিষ্যৎবাণীগুলো সাহায্য প্রতিবেদনের জন্য ভালো নিদর্শন প্রদান করতে পারে।', 'cs': 'Studujeme problém automatické identifikace humorného textu z nového druhu textových dat, tedy online recenzí. Navrhujeme generativní jazykový model, založený na teorii nesrovnalosti, k modelování humorného textu, který nám umožňuje využít zdroje textu na pozadí, jako jsou popisy záznamů Wikipedie, a umožňuje konstruovat více funkcí pro identifikaci humorných recenzí. Vyhodnocení těchto vlastností pomocí supervizovaného učení pro klasifikaci recenzí do humorních a nevtipných recenzí ukazuje, že funkce konstruované na základě navrženého generativního modelu jsou mnohem efektivnější než hlavní funkce navržené ve stávající literatuře, což nám umožňuje dosáhnout téměř 86% přesnosti. Tyto humorné předpovědi recenzí mohou také poskytnout dobré ukazatele pro identifikaci užitečných recenzí.', 'et': 'Uurime huumorilise teksti automaatse tuvastamise probleemi uut tüüpi tekstiandmetest, st online-arvustustest. Pakume välja generatiivse keelemudeli, mis põhineb ebakõla teoorial, humoorse teksti modelleerimiseks, mis võimaldab kasutada taustatekstiallikaid, näiteks Wikipedia kirjeldusi, ning võimaldab luua mitmeid funktsioone humoorsete arvustuste tuvastamiseks. Nende omaduste hindamine juhendatud õppe abil arvustuste klassifitseerimiseks humoorseteks ja mittehumoorseteks ülevaadeteks näitab, et kavandatud generatiivse mudeli põhjal ehitatud omadused on palju tõhusamad kui olemasolevas kirjanduses pakutud peamised omadused, mis võimaldavad saavutada peaaegu 86% täpsuse. Need humoorikad ülevaateprognoosid võivad anda ka häid näitajaid kasulike ülevaatete tuvastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme huumorillisen tekstin automaattista tunnistamista uudenlaisesta tekstiaineistosta eli verkkoarvosteluista. Ehdotamme ristiriitaisuusteoriaan perustuvaa generatiivista kielimallia humoristisen tekstin mallintamiseksi, jonka avulla voimme hyödyntää taustatekstilähteitä, kuten Wikipedian merkintäkuvauksia, ja mahdollistaa useiden ominaisuuksien rakentamisen humoristisen arvostelun tunnistamiseksi. Näiden ominaisuuksien arviointi ohjatulla oppimisella arvosteluiden luokittelussa humoristisiksi ja ei-humoristisiksi arvosteluiksi osoittaa, että ehdotetun generatiivisen mallin perusteella rakennetut ominaisuudet ovat paljon tehokkaampia kuin olemassa olevassa kirjallisuudessa ehdotetut pääpiirteet, mikä mahdollistaa lähes 86%:n tarkkuuden. Nämä humoristiset arviointiennusteet voivat myös tarjota hyviä indikaattoreita hyödyllisten arvostelujen tunnistamiseen.', 'af': "Ons leer die probleem van outomaties die identifiseer van humoreerde teks van 'n nuwe soort teks data, bv. online hersiening. Ons voorstel 'n genereerbare taal model, gebaseer op die teorie van onregruiteit, om humorese teks te model, wat laat ons toe om agtergrond teks bronne te verwyder, soos Wikipedia-inskrywing beskrywings, en laat konstruksie van veelvuldige funksies toe om humorese hersienings te identifiseer. Evalueer van hierdie funksies met die gebruik van ondersoekte leer vir klassifisering van hersienings binne humorese en non-humorese hersienings vertoon dat die funksies gebaseerde op die voorgestelde genereerbare model is baie meer effektief as die groot funksies voorgestelde in die bestaande literaat, toelaat ons byna 86% waarskynlik bereik. Hierdie humorese oorskou voorskou kan ook goeie indikators verskaf vir hulpbrekende oorskou te identifiseer.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé milih perkoro sing otomatik nggolaké seneng pisan dhéwé Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing luwih-luwih, basa sak tekan theori nggawe gerakan seneng alat dumadhi, iki supoyo awak dhéwé iso nggawe perusahaan seneng kapetan kanggo nambah winih (sing paling-perusahaan) nggawe gerakan unyarep winih kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan winih. assertion Bilih perusahaan arno punika dipunseraning winih kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan luwih.', 'sk': 'Proučujemo problem avtomatičnega prepoznavanja humornega besedila iz nove vrste besedilnih podatkov, tj. spletnih recenzij. Predlagamo generativni jezikovni model, ki temelji na teoriji neskladnosti, za modeliranje humornega besedila, ki nam omogoča izkoriščanje virov besedila v ozadju, kot so opisi vnosov v Wikipediji, in gradnjo več funkcij za prepoznavanje humornih kritik. Ocena teh značilnosti s pomočjo nadzorovanega učenja za razvrščanje pregledov v humorne in nehumorne preglede kaže, da so značilnosti, zgrajene na podlagi predlaganega generativnega modela, veliko učinkovitejše od glavnih značilnosti, predlaganih v obstoječi literaturi, kar nam omogoča doseganje skoraj 86% natančnosti. Te humorne napovedi pregledov lahko zagotovijo tudi dobre kazalnike za identifikacijo koristnih pregledov.', 'ha': "Munã karatun matsayin da ke gane matsayin na farat ɗaya daga wani nau'in matsayi na rubutu, misali, misãlin mutane na akwatin bayani. Kana goyyar da wata motsi na harshen da ba'a yi ba, a kan littafan na ƙidãya, wa'anar kwamfyuta, wanda yana yarda mu iya ƙara manyan kwanan rubutu, kamar misali da misalin ayuka na Wikimedia, kuma yana yarda ka samun wasu mistakardar misãlai dõmin ka gane surori na fara. Kaniyar waɗannan tayari da ake yi wa amfani da tsaro wa karatun ta zama mai rarraba kurekuwa zuwa rabo na mai raɗaɗi da kuma bã mai sha'awa yana nũna cewa, wasu misfealumai wanda aka gina a kan motsi mai ɗabi'a da aka buƙace shi, sun fi girma ga amfani da ko mafi girma daga fasihi masu buƙata cikin littafin da ke gaba, kuma yana yarda mu isa cika taki 86% na gaskiya. Furofarin nan da ake yi na bushãra, za'a iya samar da indikatori mai kyau dõmin a gane misãlai masu taimako.", 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של זיהוי אוטומטי טקסט הומור מסוג חדש של נתונים טקסט, כלומר, ביקורות באינטרנט. אנו מציעים מודל שפה יוצר, מבוסס על התיאוריה של אי-תואמות, למודל טקסט הומור, שמאפשר לנו להשתמש במקורות טקסט רקע, כמו תיאור הכניסה בוויקיפדיה, ומאפשר לבנות תכונות רבות לזהות ביקורות הומורים. הערכה של המאפיינים האלה באמצעות הלימודים המשגיחים להקליזת ביקורות לבדיקות הומורות ולא הומורות מראה שהתכונות שנבנו בהתבסס על מודל הדור המוצע הם הרבה יותר יעילים מהתכונות העיקריות המוצעות בספרות קיימת, מאפשרות לנו להשיג מדויקת כמעט 86%. התחזויות ההומוריות האלה יכולות גם לספק אינדיקטורים טובים לזהות ביקורות מועילות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་མ་དཔེ་བརྗོད་བྱས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། Evaluation of these features using supervised learning for classifying reviews in to humorous and non-humorous reviews shows that the features built based on the proposed generative model are much more effective than the major features proposed in the existing literature, allowing us to achieve almost 86% accuracy. དགོད་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'ar': 'بناء معجم المشاعر مع التعلم التمثيلي القائم على إشراف المشاعر الهرمي', 'fr': "Construction d'un lexique des sentiments avec apprentissage des représentations basé sur la supervision hiérarchique des sentiments", 'pt': 'Construção do Léxico do Sentimento com Aprendizagem da Representação Baseada na Supervisão Hierárquica do Sentimento', 'es': 'Construcción de léxico de sentimiento con aprendizaje de representación basado en la supervisión jerárquica de sentimientos', 'ja': '階層的な感情監視に基づく表現学習を伴う感情語彙構築', 'zh': '盖情监之情词典构也', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित भावना पर्यवेक्षण के आधार पर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के साथ भावना शब्दकोश निर्माण', 'ru': 'Построение сентиментального лексикона с репрезентативным обучением на основе иерархического надзора за сентиментами', 'ga': 'Tógáil Foclóir Mothúcháin le Foghlaim Ionadaíochta Bunaithe ar Mhaoirseacht Ordlathach Mothúchán', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Érzelmi Lexikon építés hierarchikus érzelmi felügyeleten alapuló reprezentációs tanulással', 'el': 'Κατασκευή λεξικού συναισθημάτων με εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης βασισμένη στην ιεραρχική εποπτεία συναισθημάτων', 'it': 'Costruzione del lessico sentimentale con apprendimento della rappresentazione basato sulla supervisione del sentimento gerarchico', 'kk': 'Жиерархикалық сезімді бақылау бағдарламасына негізделген презентациялық оқыту үшін Sentiment Lexicon құрылымы', 'lt': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'mk': 'Конструкција на лексикони за чувства со учење на претставување базирано на хиерархиска надгледба на чувства', 'ms': 'Pembangunan Leksikon Sentiment dengan Pemperkembangan Belajar Berdasarkan Supervisi Sentiment Hierarkikal', 'mt': 'Kostruzzjoni tal-Lexicon tas-Sentiment b’Tagħlim tar-Rappreżentanza bbażat fuq Superviżjoni tas-Sentiment Erarkiku', 'ml': 'പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d ക്രമീകരണം', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч Лексикон Байгуулалт Байгуулалт Хэрэглэгч Сургуулалт Байгуулалт', 'pl': 'Konstrukcja leksykonu sentymentów z uczeniem się reprezentacji w oparciu o hierarchiczny nadzór sentymentów', 'no': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representative Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'sr': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representative Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'ro': 'Construcție Lexicon sentiment cu învățare de reprezentare bazată pe supravegherea sentimentelor ierarhice', 'so': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'si': 'Comment', 'ta': 'வெற்றிகரமான உணர்வு மேலாளர்பார்வையில் அடிப்படையிலான பிரதிநியாயமான மெக்சிகோன் கட்டமைப்பு', 'sv': 'Sentiment Lexikonkonstruktion med representationslärande baserat på hierarkisk känsla övervakning', 'ur': 'سینٹیمینٹ لکسیسون ساختمون جگہ سینٹریشن سینٹینگ پر بنیاد ہے', 'vi': 'Công ty thể hình nền Lexicon Xây dựng với giáo dục cổ đại', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Сентимент Лексикон Строителство на Сентимент Лексикон с Представителство Учене въз основа на Йерархичен Сентимент Надзор', 'nl': 'Sentiment Lexicon Constructie met Representatie Learning gebaseerd op hiërarchisch Sentiment Supervisie', 'hr': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representative Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'da': 'Sentiment Lexikon konstruktion med repræsentation læring baseret på hierarkisk følelse overvågning', 'de': 'Sentiment Lexikon Konstruktion mit Repräsentationslernen basierend auf hierarchischer Sentiment Supervision', 'id': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'ko': '층별 감정 모니터링을 바탕으로 표징 학습 감정 사전 구축', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'tr': 'Görkezilişi öwrenmek bilen Sentiment Lexicon Gurama Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision Based on Sentiment Learning', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i Sentiment Lexicon me Mësim Përfaqësues bazuar në mbikqyrjen e Sentimenteve Hierarkike', 'af': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction met Representative Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'am': 'Sentiment Construction with Representation Learn Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'az': 'Hirarchical Sentiment Supervision Based on Representation Learning with Sentiment Lexicon Construction', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সেন্টাইমেন্ট লেক্সিকোন নির্মাণ', 'bs': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representative Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision', 'cs': 'Konstrukce citového Lexikonu s reprezentačním učením založeným na hierarchickém dohledu sentimentů', 'ca': 'Construcció de Lexicòns de Sentiment amb Aprendiment de Representació basat en supervisió del Sentiment Hieràrquic', 'et': 'Sentiment Lexiconi ehitus koos esindusõppega, mis põhineb hierarhilisel tunnete järelevalvel', 'fi': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Valvontaan', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'jv': 'Sentiment Leksion Learning', 'he': 'בניית רגשות לקסיקון עם לימוד מייצג מבוסס על פיקוח רגשות הייררכיים', 'sk': 'Konstrukcija čustvenega leksikona s predstavniškim učenjem na podlagi hierarhičnega nadzora čustva', 'bo': 'Sentiment Lexicon Construction with Representation Learning Based on Hierarchical Sentiment Supervision'}
{'en': 'Sentiment lexicon is an important tool for identifying the sentiment polarity of words and texts. How to automatically construct sentiment lexicons has become a research topic in the field of sentiment analysis and opinion mining. Recently there were some attempts to employ representation learning algorithms to construct a sentiment lexicon with sentiment-aware word embedding. However, these methods were normally trained under document-level sentiment supervision. In this paper, we develop a neural architecture to train a sentiment-aware word embedding by integrating the sentiment supervision at both document and word levels, to enhance the quality of word embedding as well as the sentiment lexicon. Experiments on the SemEval 2013-2016 datasets indicate that the sentiment lexicon generated by our approach achieves the state-of-the-art performance in both supervised and unsupervised sentiment classification, in comparison with several strong sentiment lexicon construction methods.', 'fr': "Le lexique des sentiments est un outil important pour identifier la polarité des sentiments des mots et des textes. La construction automatique de lexiques de sentiments est devenue un sujet de recherche dans le domaine de l'analyse des sentiments et de l'exploration d'opinions. Récemment, des tentatives ont été faites pour utiliser des algorithmes d'apprentissage des représentations pour construire un lexique des sentiments avec intégration de mots sensibles aux sentiments. Cependant, ces méthodes étaient normalement entraînées sous la supervision des sentiments au niveau du document. Dans cet article, nous développons une architecture neuronale pour entraîner une intégration de mots sensible aux sentiments en intégrant la supervision des sentiments au niveau du document et du mot, afin d'améliorer la qualité de l'intégration des mots ainsi que le lexique des sentiments. Les expériences réalisées sur les ensembles de données SemEval 2013-2016 indiquent que le lexique des sentiments généré par notre approche atteint des performances de pointe en matière de classification des sentiments supervisés et non supervisés, en comparaison avec plusieurs méthodes de construction de lexiques de sentiments forts.", 'pt': 'O léxico de sentimentos é uma ferramenta importante para identificar a polaridade de sentimentos de palavras e textos. Como construir automaticamente léxicos de sentimentos tornou-se um tópico de pesquisa no campo da análise de sentimentos e mineração de opinião. Recentemente, houve algumas tentativas de empregar algoritmos de aprendizado de representação para construir um léxico de sentimentos com incorporação de palavras sensível a sentimentos. No entanto, esses métodos foram normalmente treinados sob supervisão de sentimento em nível de documento. Neste artigo, desenvolvemos uma arquitetura neural para treinar uma incorporação de palavras com reconhecimento de sentimentos, integrando a supervisão de sentimentos nos níveis de documento e palavra, para melhorar a qualidade da incorporação de palavras, bem como o léxico de sentimentos. Experimentos nos conjuntos de dados SemEval 2013-2016 indicam que o léxico de sentimento gerado por nossa abordagem alcança o desempenho de última geração na classificação de sentimento supervisionado e não supervisionado, em comparação com vários métodos de construção de léxico de sentimento forte.', 'ar': 'يعد قاموس المشاعر أداة مهمة لتحديد قطبية المشاعر للكلمات والنصوص. أصبحت كيفية إنشاء معاجم المشاعر تلقائيًا موضوعًا بحثيًا في مجال تحليل المشاعر والتنقيب عن الرأي. في الآونة الأخيرة ، كانت هناك بعض المحاولات لاستخدام خوارزميات التعلم التمثيلي لبناء معجم المشاعر مع تضمين الكلمات الواعية للمشاعر. ومع ذلك ، تم تدريب هذه الأساليب عادة تحت إشراف المشاعر على مستوى الوثيقة. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتطوير بنية عصبية لتدريب تضمين كلمة مدركة للمشاعر من خلال دمج الإشراف على المشاعر على مستويي المستند والكلمة ، لتحسين جودة تضمين الكلمات بالإضافة إلى قاموس المشاعر. تشير التجارب على مجموعات بيانات SemEval 2013-2016 إلى أن معجم المشاعر الناتج عن نهجنا يحقق أحدث أداء في كل من تصنيف المشاعر الخاضع للإشراف وغير الخاضع للإشراف ، مقارنة بالعديد من طرق بناء معجم المشاعر القوية.', 'es': 'El léxico de los sentimientos es una herramienta importante para identificar la polaridad de los sentimientos de palabras y textos. Cómo construir automáticamente lexicones de opinión se ha convertido en un tema de investigación en el campo del análisis de sentimientos y la minería de opiniones. Recientemente hubo algunos intentos de emplear algoritmos de aprendizaje de representación para construir un léxico de sentimientos con incrustación de palabras conscientes del sentimiento. Sin embargo, estos métodos normalmente se entrenaban bajo la supervisión de sentimientos a nivel de documento. En este artículo, desarrollamos una arquitectura neuronal para entrenar una incrustación de palabras sensible al sentimiento mediante la integración de la supervisión de sentimientos tanto a nivel de documento como de palabra, para mejorar la calidad de la incrustación de palabras, así como el léxico de los sentimientos. Los experimentos en los conjuntos de datos de SemEval 2013-2016 indican que el léxico de sentimiento generado por nuestro enfoque logra el rendimiento más avanzado en la clasificación de sentimientos supervisada y no supervisada, en comparación con varios métodos de construcción de léxicos de sentimiento sólidos.', 'zh': '情者词典识单词文之情极性之具也。 何以自结词典已为情析意掘域之研究课题。 近有试用示学算法以构情感知词嵌情词典。 然其法常于文档级督之。 于本文中,开一神经架构,以文档单词为情,以练情感知词,以崇词情词典之量。 SemEval 2013-2016数集之实验,比诸强情词典构,吾道成情词典督无督情之类,皆得其先进之性。', 'ja': 'センチメント辞書は、単語やテキストのセンチメントの極性を識別するための重要なツールです。どのように感情の辞書を自動的に構築するかは、感情分析とオピニオンマイニングの分野で研究課題となっています。最近では、センチメントを意識した単語埋め込みを伴うセンチメント辞書を構築するために、表現学習アルゴリズムを採用する試みもありました。しかし、これらの方法は通常、文書レベルの感情監督の下で訓練されていました。本稿では、文書レベルと単語レベルのセンチメント監視を統合することにより、センチメントを認識する単語埋め込みを訓練し、単語埋め込みの品質とセンチメント辞書を向上させるためのニューラルアーキテクチャを開発する。SemEval 2013 -2016データセットの実験では、私たちのアプローチによって生成されたセンチメント辞書は、いくつかの強力なセンチメント辞書構築方法と比較して、監督されたセンチメント分類と監督されていないセンチメント分類の両方で最先端のパフォーマンスを達成していることが示されています。', 'hi': 'भावना शब्दकोश शब्दों और ग्रंथों की भावना ध्रुवीयता की पहचान करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण उपकरण है। कैसे स्वचालित रूप से भावना शब्दकोशों का निर्माण करने के लिए भावना विश्लेषण और राय खनन के क्षेत्र में एक शोध विषय बन गया है। हाल ही में भावना-जागरूक शब्द एम्बेडिंग के साथ एक भावना शब्दकोश का निर्माण करने के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के एल्गोरिदम को नियोजित करने के कुछ प्रयास किए गए थे। हालांकि, इन विधियों को आमतौर पर दस्तावेज़-स्तर की भावना पर्यवेक्षण के तहत प्रशिक्षित किया गया था। इस पेपर में, हम एक तंत्रिका वास्तुकला विकसित करने के लिए एक भावना-जागरूक शब्द एम्बेडिंग को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए दस्तावेज़ और शब्द दोनों स्तरों पर भावना पर्यवेक्षण को एकीकृत करके एम्बेड करते हैं, ताकि शब्द एम्बेडिंग की गुणवत्ता के साथ-साथ भावना शब्दकोश को बढ़ाया जा सके। SemEval 2013-2016 डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से संकेत मिलता है कि हमारे दृष्टिकोण द्वारा उत्पन्न भावना शब्दकोश कई मजबूत भावना शब्दकोश निर्माण विधियों की तुलना में पर्यवेक्षित और असुरक्षित भावना वर्गीकरण दोनों में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Сентиментальный лексикон является важным инструментом для определения полярности настроений слов и текстов. Как автоматически конструировать сентиментальные лексиконы стало темой исследования в области анализа сентиментов и изучения общественного мнения. Недавно были предприняты попытки использовать алгоритмы репрезентативного обучения для создания лексикона настроений с встраиванием слов, учитывающих настроения. Тем не менее, эти методы обычно обучаются под контролем настроений на уровне документов. В этой статье мы разрабатываем нейронную архитектуру для обучения внедрению слов, осознающих чувства, путем интеграции надзора за настроениями как на уровне документа, так и на уровне слов, для повышения качества встраивания слов, а также лексики настроений. Эксперименты с наборами данных SemEval 2013-2016 показывают, что лексикон настроений, созданный нашим подходом, достигает самых современных показателей как в контролируемой, так и в неконтролируемой классификации настроений, по сравнению с несколькими методами построения лексикона сильных настроений.', 'ga': 'Uirlis thábhachtach is ea foclóir meon chun polaraíocht meon na bhfocal agus na dtéacsanna a shainaithint. Is ábhar taighde anois i réimse na hanailíse meoin agus mianadóireacht tuairimí conas foclóirí meon a thógáil go huathoibríoch. Le déanaí rinneadh roinnt iarrachtaí chun algartaim foghlama ionadaíochta a úsáid chun foclóir meon a chruthú le leabú focal feasach ar mheon. Mar sin féin, cuireadh oiliúint ar na modhanna seo de ghnáth faoi mhaoirsiú ar leibhéal doiciméad. Sa pháipéar seo, forbraímid ailtireacht néarúil chun leabú focal atá feasach ar dhearcadh a oiliúint trí mhaoirseacht na meon a chomhtháthú ag leibhéal doiciméad agus focal, chun cáilíocht leabú focal a fheabhsú chomh maith leis an bhfoclóir meon. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí SemEval 2013-2016 go mbaineann an foclóir meon a ghineann ár gcur chuige amach an fheidhmíocht úrscothach maidir le haicmiú sentiment maoirsithe agus neamh-mhaoirsithe araon, i gcomparáid le roinnt modhanna tógála foclóir mothúcháin láidre.', 'el': 'Το λεξικό συναισθημάτων είναι ένα σημαντικό εργαλείο για τον προσδιορισμό της πολικότητας συναισθημάτων των λέξεων και των κειμένων. Το πώς να κατασκευάσετε αυτόματα λεξικά συναισθημάτων έχει γίνει ένα ερευνητικό θέμα στον τομέα της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων και της εξόρυξης γνώμης. Πρόσφατα υπήρξαν κάποιες προσπάθειες να χρησιμοποιηθούν αλγόριθμοι εκμάθησης αναπαράστασης για την κατασκευή ενός λεξικού συναισθημάτων με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων ευαισθητοποιημένων συναισθημάτων. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι μέθοδοι εκπαιδεύονταν κανονικά υπό την εποπτεία συναισθημάτων σε επίπεδο εγγράφων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναπτύσσουμε μια νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική για να εκπαιδεύσουμε την ενσωμάτωση μιας λέξης με συνείδηση συναισθημάτων ενσωματώνοντας την εποπτεία συναισθημάτων τόσο σε επίπεδο εγγράφου όσο και λέξεων, για να βελτιώσουμε την ποιότητα της ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων καθώς και το λεξικό συναισθημάτων. Τα πειράματα στα σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το λεξικό συναισθημάτων που δημιουργείται από την προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση τόσο στην εποπτευόμενη όσο και στην μη εποπτευόμενη ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων, σε σύγκριση με αρκετές μεθόδους κατασκευής ισχυρών λεξικών συναισθημάτων.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmi lexikon fontos eszköz a szavak és szövegek érzelmi polaritásának azonosítására. Az érzelmi lexikonok automatikus felépítése kutatási témává vált az érzelmi elemzés és a véleménybányászat területén. A közelmúltban történt néhány próbálkozás arra, hogy reprezentációs tanulási algoritmusokat alkalmazzanak egy érzelmek lexikonjának létrehozására érzelmek-tudatos szóbeágyazással. Ezeket a módszereket azonban általában dokumentum szintű érzelmi felügyelet mellett tanították. Ebben a tanulmányban egy idegi architektúrát fejlesztünk ki, amely egy érzelemtudatos szó beágyazását képezi a szentimentális felügyelet integrálásával mind dokumentum, mind szó szintjén, hogy javítsa a szóbeágyazás minőségét, valamint a szentimentális lexikon. A SemEval 2013-2016 adatkészleteivel végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a megközelítésünk által generált sentiment lexikon a felügyelt és felügyelet nélküli sentiment osztályozásban egyaránt a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt éri el, számos erős sentiment lexikon konstrukciós módszerrel összehasonlítva.', 'lt': 'Sentimento leksikonas yra svarbi įrankis žodžių ir tekstų jautrumo poliarumui nustatyti. Kaip automatiškai sukurti jausmų leksikonus tapo jausmų analizės ir nuomonės kasybos mokslinių tyrimų tema. Pastaruoju metu buvo bandymų naudoti reprezentacinio mokymosi algoritmus, kad būtų sukurtas jausmų leksikonas su jausmų žinomu žodžiu. Tačiau šie metodai paprastai buvo mokomi prižiūrint dokumentų lygį. Šiame dokumente sukuriame neurologinę architektūrą, kuria siekiama treniruoti jausmų supratimą turintį žodį integruojant jausmų priežiūrą tiek dokumentų, tiek žodžių lygiais, siekiant pagerinti žodžių įtraukimo kokybę, taip pat jausmų leksikoną. Experiments on the SemEval 2013-2016 datasets indicate that the sentiment lexicon generated by our approach achieves the state-of-the-art performance in both supervised and unsupervised sentiment classification, in comparison with several strong sentiment lexicon construction methods.', 'it': "Il lessico sentimentale è uno strumento importante per identificare la polarità sentimentale di parole e testi. Come costruire automaticamente lessici sentimentali è diventato un argomento di ricerca nel campo dell'analisi sentimentale e dell'opinion mining. Recentemente ci sono stati alcuni tentativi di utilizzare algoritmi di apprendimento della rappresentazione per costruire un lessico sentimentale con embedding di parole sentiment-aware. Tuttavia, questi metodi sono stati normalmente addestrati sotto supervisione del sentiment a livello di documento. In questo articolo, sviluppiamo un'architettura neurale per formare un embedding di parole consapevoli del sentiment integrando la supervisione del sentiment sia a livello di documento che di parola, per migliorare la qualità dell'embedding di parole così come il lessico sentiment. Esperimenti sui dataset SemEval 2013-2016 indicano che il lessico sentimentale generato dal nostro approccio raggiunge le prestazioni all'avanguardia nella classificazione sentimentale supervisionata e non supervisionata, rispetto a diversi metodi di costruzione del lessico sentimentale forti.", 'kk': 'Sentiment лексикасы сөздер мен мәтіндердің сезімдігін анықтау үшін маңызды құрал. Сезімдік лекцияларды қалай автоматты түрде құру үшін сезімдік анализ және оқиғалардың балауын зерттеу нақышы болды. Соңғы уақытта мәліметтерді оқыту алгоритмдерін көзгерту үшін көзгертілген сөздерді ендіру үшін көзгертілген лексиконды құру әрекеттері болды. Бұл әдістер әдетте құжат деңгейіндегі сезімдерді бақылау арқылы оқылған. Бұл қағазда біз невралдық архитектурасын құжат мен сөз деңгейіндегі көзгерту үшін көзгертілген сөзді көзгерту үшін, құжат мен сөз деңгейіндегі көзгертілген сөздердің сапатын және көзгерту лексиканы Деректер бағдарламасының 2013-2016 жыл бөлшегі тәжірибелері біздің тәжірибеміздің жасалған сезімдік лексиканың күй- жайын қарағанда, қарағанда және қарағанда, қарағанда және қарағандай сезімдік классификациясының қарағанда', 'mk': 'Лексиконот на чувствата е важна алатка за идентификување на поларитетот на чувствата на зборовите и текстовите. Како автоматски да се изградат сентиментални лексикони стана истражувачка тема во областа на анализа на сентиментите и минирање на мислењето. Неодамна имаше некои обиди да се употребат алгоритми за учење на репрезентација за конструкција на лексикон за чувства со вградување на зборови со свесност за чувства. Сепак, овие методи нормално беа обучени под надзор на чувствително ниво на документите. Во овој весник, развиваме нервна архитектура за обука на збор со свесност за чувствата вклучен со интеграција на надзорот на чувствата на документите и на зборовите нивоа, за подобрување на квалитетот на зборовите вклучени како и на лексиконот на чувствата. Експериментите на податоците на SemEval 2013-2016 покажуваат дека лексиконот на чувствата генериран од нашиот пристап ја постигнува најновата резултат во класификацијата на чувствата што е надгледувана и ненадгледувана, во споредба со неколку силни методи на изградба на лексиконите на чувствата.', 'ms': 'Leksikon perasaan adalah alat penting untuk mengenalpasti polariti perasaan perkataan dan teks. Bagaimana membina leksikon sentimen secara automatik telah menjadi topik kajian dalam medan analisis sentimen dan penambangan pendapat. Baru-baru ini terdapat beberapa cubaan untuk menggunakan algoritma pembelajaran mewakili untuk membina leksikon perasaan dengan memasukkan perkataan yang sedar perasaan. Namun, kaedah ini biasanya dilatih di bawah pengawasan perasaan aras dokumen. In this paper, we develop a neural architecture to train a sentiment-aware word embedding by integrating the sentiment supervision at both document and word levels, to enhance the quality of word embedding as well as the sentiment lexicon.  Eksperimen pada set data SemEval 2013-2016 menunjukkan bahawa leksikon perasaan yang dijana oleh pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam kedua-dua klasifikasi perasaan yang diawasi dan tidak diawasi, dibandingkan dengan beberapa kaedah pembangunan leksikon perasaan yang kuat.', 'ml': 'Sentiment lexicon is an important tool for identifying the sentiment polarity of words and texts.  എങ്ങനെയാണ് സ്വയം വിചാരകങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് എന്താണെന്ന് തോന്നുന്ന അന്വേഷണ വിഷയത അടുത്തുതന്നെ ചില പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചു എന്നാലും, ഈ രീതികള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുരുഷന്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കിന്റെയും വാക്കുകളുടെയും നിലപാടില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂട് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2013-2016 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടി', 'mt': 'Il-lexicon tas-sensazzjoni huwa għodda importanti għall-identifikazzjoni tal-polarità tas-sensazzjoni tal-kliem u t-testi. Kif jinbnew awtomatikament il-lexikoni tas-sentimenti saru suġġett ta’ riċerka fil-qasam tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti u l-minjieri tal-opinjonijiet. Recently there were some attempts to employ representation learning algorithms to construct a sentiment lexicon with sentiment-aware word embedding.  Madankollu, dawn il-metodi normalment kienu mħarrġa taħt superviżjoni tas-sentiment fil-livell tad-dokument. In this paper, we develop a neural architecture to train a sentiment-aware word embedding by integrating the sentiment supervision at both document and word levels, to enhance the quality of word embedding as well as the sentiment lexicon.  L-esperimenti fuq is-settijiet tad-dejta SemEval 2013-2016 jindikaw li l-lexicon tas-sentiment iġġenerat mill-approċċ tagħna jikseb l-aqwa prestazzjoni kemm fil-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentiment sorveljata kif ukoll mhux sorveljata, meta mqabbel ma’ diversi metodi qawwija ta’ kostruzzjoni tal-lexicon tas-sentiment.', 'mn': 'Sentiment lexicon гэдэг нь үг болон текст мэдрэмжийг тодорхойлдох чухал хэрэгсэл юм. Яаж сэтгэл хөдлөлийг автоматаар зохион байгуулах вэ гэвэл сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ, санааны сүлжээний сүлжээний судалгааны сэдэв болсон. Саяхан сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлголтын алгоритмыг ашиглан сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлголтын хэлбэрээр сэтгэл хөдлөл бий болгохын тулд зарим хичээл байсан. Гэхдээ эдгээр арга нь баримт түвшинд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн даалгавраар сургалт авсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийг баримт болон үгийн түвшинд нэгтгэх сэтгэл хөдлөлийг мэдрэмжтэй үгийг суралцах, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг бичсэн үг болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн чадварыг нэмэгдүүлэх, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэмжээг нь нэмэгд 2013-2016 оны SemEval өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний ойлголтын үүсгэсэн сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөл нь хандлагагүй, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрээс харьцуулахад хэд хэдэн хүчтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийн бүтээлийн арга хэмжээнд урлагийн үйл ажиллагаа', 'ka': 'სიტყვების და ტექსტის სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის განსაზღვრებისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი ელექსიკონია. როგორ ავტომატურად კონტუქტირება სენტიმენტების ლექსიკონები გახდება სენტიმენტების ანალიზაციის და მხოლობის მინუსაციის ტექმია. მიმდინარე იყო რამდენიმე მოცდილობა გამოყენება განსწავლებელი ალგორიტემის გასაკეთებლად სენტიმენტური ლექსიკონის შექმნა, რომელიც სენტიმენტური ცნობიერი სიტ მაგრამ, ეს მეტირები ნორმალურად განაკეთებულია დოკუმენტის სენტიმენტის ნახვა. ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ ნეიროლური აქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც სენტიმენტური სიტყვას, რომელიც სიტყვას და სიტყვას დოკუმენტური დანარწმუნებით, სენტიმენტური დანარწმუნებით, და სენტი SemEval 2013-2016 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციების გამოცდილებები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამის შექმნა სენტიმენტური ლექსიკონი მიიღებს სენტიმენტური კონფიგურაციაში, რომლებიც დანარწმუნებულიან და არ განსხვავებულიან სენ', 'ro': 'Lexiconul sentimentelor este un instrument important pentru identificarea polarității sentimentelor cuvintelor și textelor. Modul de construire automată a lexicoanelor sentimentale a devenit un subiect de cercetare în domeniul analizei sentimentelor și al opiniei miniere. Recent au existat unele încercări de a utiliza algoritmi de învățare a reprezentării pentru a construi un lexicon sentiment cu încorporarea cuvintelor conștiente de sentiment. Cu toate acestea, aceste metode au fost instruite în mod normal sub supravegherea sentimentului la nivel de document. În această lucrare, dezvoltăm o arhitectură neurală pentru a instrui un cuvânt conștient de sentiment prin integrarea supravegherii sentimentului atât la nivel de document, cât și de cuvânt, pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea încorporării cuvintelor, cât și a lexiconului sentiment. Experimentele efectuate pe seturile de date SemEval 2013-2016 indică faptul că lexiconul sentimental generat de abordarea noastră atinge performanțele de ultimă oră atât în clasificarea sentimentală supravegheată, cât și în cea nesupravegheată, în comparație cu mai multe metode puternice de construcție a lexiconului sentimental.', 'no': 'Sentiment- leksikon er eit viktig verktøy for å identifisera sentiment- polariteten av ord og tekst. Korleis sentimentleksikon automatisk skal konstruerast har blitt eit forskningsemne i feltet for sentimentanalyse og meningsmining. Nyleg var det nokre forsøk på å bruka representasjon-læringsalgoritme for å konstruera ein sentimentleksikon med sentiment-bevisst ord innebygging. Desse metodane er imidlertid vanlegvis trengte under dokumentnivåsentimentovervaking. I denne papiret utviklar vi ein neuralarkitektur for å trena eit følsomsorg ord innebygd ved å integrere sentimentovervaking på både dokument og ord-nivå, for å forbetra kvaliteten på ord innebygd og sentimentleksikon. Eksperimentane på dataset for semiEval 2013-2016 tyder på at sentimentleksikonen som er generert av tilnærminga vårt gjer kunsten i både overvåka og usikkerte sentimentklassifikasjon, sammenlignet med fleire sterke sentimentleksikonskonstruksjonsmetodar.', 'pl': 'Leksykon sentymentów jest ważnym narzędziem do identyfikacji polaryzacji sentymentów słów i tekstów. Jak automatycznie budować leksykony sentymentów stało się tematem badawczym w dziedzinie analizy sentymentów i opinii miningu. Ostatnio podjęto kilka prób wykorzystania algorytmów uczenia się reprezentacji do skonstruowania leksykonu sentymentów z osadzeniem słów świadomych sentymentów. Jednakże metody te były zwykle szkolone pod nadzorem sentymentów na poziomie dokumentów. W niniejszym artykule opracowujemy architekturę neuronową, aby trenować osadzanie słów świadomych sentymentów poprzez integrację nadzoru sentymentów zarówno na poziomie dokumentów, jak i słów, w celu poprawy jakości osadzania słów, jak i leksykonu sentymentów. Eksperymenty na zbiorach danych SemEval 2013-2016 wskazują, że leksykon sentymentów generowany przez nasze podejście osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność zarówno w klasyfikacji sentymentów nadzorowanych, jak i bez nadzoru, w porównaniu z kilkoma metodami konstrukcji leksykonów silnych sentymentów.', 'so': 'Leksikanka xilliga ah waa qalabka muhiimka ah oo ay aqoonsadaan kalsoonaanta hadalka iyo qoraalka. Sida ay automatic u dhisan karto leksisiyada leksis waxay noqotay maadooyin waxbarasho ku yaala beerta baaritaanka kaleemeynta iyo qiyaastii fikirka. Dhab ahaantii waxaa jirtay isku dayo in loo shaqeeyo wakiilka barashada algorithm si ay u dhiso fekerka leksisinka oo ku qoran hadalka digtoonaanta ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababkan waxaa sida caadiga ah lagu tababaray ilaalinta daryeelka fekerka. Qoraalkan waxaan horumarinaa dhismo neurada ah si aan u tababarinno hadal la taqaan oo la taqaan, taasoo ku qoraya si aan u qabsato ilaalinta fikrada labada darajada warqada iyo hadalka, si aan u kordhino takhasirka hadalka ku qoran iyo kaleba leksikanka. Imtixaanka sawirada ee SemEval 2013-2016 waxay ka muuqataa in xisaabta leksikon ka soo dhashay qaababkayaga ay dhamaystirto xaalada farshaxanka iyo fasaxa aan la ilaalinayn, iyadoo la barbardhiga qaabab aad u xoog leh oo la dhiso leksis.', 'sv': 'Sentiment lexikon är ett viktigt verktyg för att identifiera sentiment polaritet i ord och texter. Hur man automatiskt konstruerar sentimentlexikon har blivit ett forskningsämne inom sentimentanalys och opinion mining. Nyligen fanns det några försök att använda representationsinlärningsalgoritmer för att konstruera ett sentimentlexikon med sentimentmedveten ordinbäddning. Dessa metoder tränades dock normalt under sentimentövervakning på dokumentnivå. I denna uppsats utvecklar vi en neural arkitektur för att träna ett sentimentmedvetet ord inbäddning genom att integrera sentimentövervakning på både dokument- och ordnivå, för att förbättra kvaliteten på ord inbäddning samt sentimentlexikonet. Experiment på SemEval 2013-2016-datauppsättningarna tyder på att sentimentlexikonet som genereras av vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår den senaste prestandan i både övervakad och obevakad sentimentklassificering, jämfört med flera starka sentimentlexikonkonstruktionsmetoder.', 'sr': 'Sentiment leksikon je važan alat za identifikaciju polarnosti sentimenta riječi i teksta. Kako se automatski konstrukcija leksiona sentiment a postala je istraživačka tema u oblasti analize sentimenta i rudarstva mišljenja. Nedavno je bilo nekih pokušaja da upotrebimo algoritme za učenje predstavljanja da izgradimo leksikon sentiment a sa osjećajnim rečima uključenim. Međutim, ove metode su normalno obučene pod nadzorom sentimenta na nivou dokumenta. U ovom papiru razvijamo neuralnu arhitekturu kako bi obučili osjećajnu reč koja uključuje integraciju nadzora sentiment a na dokument i nivou riječi, kako bi poboljšali kvalitet reči uključene kao i leksikon sentimenta. Eksperimenti na podacima semiEval 2013-2016 ukazuju na to da leksion osjećanja koji je proizveden našim pristupom postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u klasifikaciji nadzornih i neodređenih sentimenta u usporedbi sa nekoliko jakih metoda konstrukcije leksiona sentimenta.', 'si': 'සංවේදනය කලිකෝන් විශේෂ උපකරණයක් වචන සහ පාළුවන්ගේ සංවේදනය අඳින්න වැදගත් උපකරණයක්. කොහොමද ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ හිත විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ. මුලින්ම තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් වලට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා දැනුම්  නමුත්, මේ විද්\u200dයාවය සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත වි මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා දැනගන්න පුළුවන් වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, වාර්තාව සහ වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා වචනයක් වගේ සේම්වේල් 2013-2016 දත්ත සේට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහා අපේ අතිරීක්ෂණයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා අපේ අතිරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ නිර්', 'ta': 'வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் உரைகளின் உணர்வு தீவிரத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு முக்கியமான கருவி உணர்வு ஆராய்வு மற்றும் கருத்து குறைந்ததின் புலத்தில் தானாகவே உணர்வு லெக்சிக்சன்களை உருவாக்க வேண்டும். சமீபத்தில் சில பிரதிநிதியினர் கற்றுக்கொள்ள கற்றல் முயற்சிகள் வேலை செய்ய முயற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது உணர்வு அறிந்து கொள்ளும் வார் ஆனால், இந்த முறைகள் சாதாரண ஆவண- மட்டத்தின் உணர்வு கண்காணிப்பில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய உருவாக்கியத்தை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு உணர்வு உணர்வு சொல்லை பயிற்சி செய்யும் ஆவணத்தில் மற்றும் சொல்லு மட்டத்திலும் உள்ள நி செம்Eval 2013-2016 தரவு அமைப்புகளின் சோதனைகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டினால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு லெக்சிக்சன் நிலையை பெறுகிறது பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத உணர்வு வகுப்பில்', 'ur': 'Sentiment lexicon is an important tool for identifying the sentiment polarity of words and texts. کس طرح احساسات لکسونز کو اپنا سامان بنانا ہوتا ہے کہ احساسات تحقیق اور نظر کے ذریعے ایک تحقیق موضوع ہو جاتا ہے۔ اچھے سے کچھ کوشش ہوئی تھی کہ آلگوریتموں کی تعلیم کا استعمال کریں کہ ایک احساسات لکسون بنائیں جو احساسات جانتا ہے لفظ کے ساتھ استعمال کریں۔ لیکن یہ طریقے معمولاً دفتر سطح احساسات نظر کے نیچے تعلیم دیے گئے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نئورل معماری تخلیق کرنے کے لئے ایک احساسات جاننے والی کلمہ کی تدریج کرنے کے لئے ڈکومکسٹ اور کلمز سطح میں احساسات نظارت کو تخلیق کرنے کے ذریعہ، کلمز کی کیفیت اور احساسات لکسیون کو زیادہ تخلیق کرنے کے لئے۔ SemEval 2013-2016 ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش نشان دیتی ہے کہ ہمارے طریقے سے پیدا ہوا احساس لکسون نے آزمائش کی حالت کی فعالیت both supervised and unsupervised sentiment classification میں پہنچ دی ہے، بہت سی قوی احساسات لکسیون بنیاد طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں۔', 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ là một công cụ quan trọng để xác định quan điểm của quan điểm của các từ và văn bản. Cách tự động xây dựng ngôn ngữ đa cảm đã trở thành một chủ đề nghiên cứu trong lĩnh vực phân tích cảm xúc và khai thác ý kiến. Gần đây có vài nổ lực để sử dụng các thuật to án học đại diện để xây dựng ngôn ngữ cảm xúc bằng từ ngữ cảm xúc. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp này thường được huấn luyện dưới sự giám sát ủy mị. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi phát triển một kiến trúc thần kinh để huấn luyện một từ ngữ có ý nghĩa bằng cách nhập vào sự giám sát tình cảm ở cả các cấp độ văn bản và từ ngữ, để nâng cao chất lượng của sự nhúng vào từ ngữ cũng như ngôn từ ủy mị. Thử nghiệm trên các tập tin lưu niệm SemEvol-tê-6 cho thấy rằng ngôn ngữ đa cảm gây ra từ phương pháp của chúng ta đạt đến hiệu suất hiện đại nghệ thuật được cấu trúc cảm xúc được giám sát và không được giám sát, so với nhiều phương pháp thiết kế đa cảm mạnh mẽ.', 'uz': "Sentiment leksision - so'zlar va matnlarning sentiment polariyatini aniqlash uchun muhim asbobi. Xitoy leksikalarni avtomatik qanday tuzishni tasavvur qilish, hissiyotni analyzer va fikrlarni qiymatlashning davrida o'rganish mavzusi edi. Recently there were some attempts to employ representation learning algorithms to construct a sentiment lexicon with sentiment-aware word embedding.  However, these methods were normally trained under document-level sentiment supervision.  Bu qogʻozda biz ma'lum arxituvni o'rganish uchun hisob-aqlli so'zni qo'yish va so'zlar darajada qo'shish uchun o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. Bu hujjat va so'zlar darajada qo'yish va hisob leksikaning sifatini oshirish uchun. SemEval 2013-2016 maʼlumotlar tarkibini tajriba qilayotgan imtiyozlar esa, bizning usuli yaratgan leksikaning hissiyot holatini boshqarish va xavfsiz qilmagan hissiyalarning holatiga bajarishi mumkin. Bu bir necha kalit leksik tuzuvchi usullarda bir necha qiyin tuzuvchi usullar bilan o'rganadi.", 'bg': 'Сентиментният лексикон е важен инструмент за идентифициране на сантименталната полярност на думите и текстовете. Как автоматично да се конструират сентиментални лексикони се превърна в изследователска тема в областта на анализа на сентимента и извличането на мнения. Наскоро имаше някои опити да се използват алгоритми за изучаване на представителството, за да се изгради лексикон на сантимента с вграждане на думи, осъзнаващи сантименталността. Въпреки това, тези методи обикновено се обучават под контрола на сантиментално ниво на документи. В тази статия ние разработваме невронна архитектура, която да обучава вграждане на думи, осъзнаващи чувствата, чрез интегриране на надзора на чувствата както на ниво документи, така и на ниво думи, за да подобри качеството на вграждането на думи, както и на лексикона на чувствата. Експериментите с наборите от данни показват, че сентименталният лексикон, генериран от нашия подход, постига най-съвременното представяне както при контролирана, така и без надзор класификация на сентимента, в сравнение с няколко метода за изграждане на силни сентиментални лексикони.', 'hr': 'Sentiment leksikon je važan alat za identifikaciju polarnosti osjećaja riječi i teksta. Kako se automatski konstrukcija leksiona osjećaja postala je istraživačka tema u oblasti analize osjećaja i rudarstva mišljenja. Nedavno je bilo nekih pokušaja zapošljavati algoritme za učenje predstave kako bi izgradili leksikon osjećaja sa osjećajnim riječima. Međutim, te metode su normalno obučene pod nadzorom osjećaja na razini dokumenta. U ovom papiru razvijamo neuronsku arhitekturu kako bi obučili osjećajnu riječ uključenu integracijom nadzora osjećaja na dokumentima i razini riječi, kako bi poboljšali kvalitet riječi uključene kao i leksikon osjećaja. Iskusi na podacima semiEval 2013-2016 ukazuju na to da leksikon osjećanja koji je proizveden našim pristupom postigne postignuće stanja umjetnosti u klasifikaciji nadziranih i neodređenih osjećaja u usporedbi s nekoliko jakih metoda konstrukcije leksiona osjećanja.', 'da': 'Sentiment leksikon er et vigtigt redskab til at identificere sentiment polaritet af ord og tekster. Hvordan man automatisk konstruerer sentiment leksikoner er blevet et forskningsemne inden for sentiment analyse og opinion mining. For nylig var der nogle forsøg på at anvende repræsentationslæringsalgoritmer til at konstruere et sentiment leksikon med sentiment-bevidst ord indlejring. Disse metoder blev imidlertid normalt uddannet under følelsestilsyn på dokumentniveau. I denne artikel udvikler vi en neural arkitektur til at træne et sentimentbevidst ord indlejring ved at integrere sentimentovervågningen på både dokument- og ordniveau, for at forbedre kvaliteten af ord indlejring såvel som sentimentleksikonen. Eksperimenter med SemEval 2013-2016 datasættet viser, at sentimentleksikonet genereret af vores tilgang opnår den nyeste præstation i både overvåget og ukontrolleret sentimentklassifikation sammenlignet med flere stærke sentimentleksikonstruktionsmetoder.', 'nl': 'Sentiment lexicon is een belangrijk hulpmiddel om de sentiment polariteit van woorden en teksten te identificeren. Het automatisch samenstellen van sentimentlexicons is een onderzoeksonderwerp geworden op het gebied van sentimentanalyse en opinion mining. Onlangs zijn er enkele pogingen gedaan om representatie learning algoritmes te gebruiken om een sentiment lexicon te bouwen met sentiment-bewust woord embedding. Deze methoden werden echter normaal gesproken getraind onder sentiment supervisie op documentniveau. In dit artikel ontwikkelen we een neurale architectuur om een sentimentbewuste woordinbedding te trainen door de sentimentsupervisie op zowel document- als woordniveau te integreren, om de kwaliteit van woordinbedding en het sentimentlexicon te verbeteren. Experimenten op de SemEval 2013-2016 datasets geven aan dat het sentimentlexicon gegenereerd door onze aanpak de state-of-the-art prestaties bereikt in zowel begeleide als niet-begeleide sentimentclassificatie, in vergelijking met verschillende sterke sentimentlexicon constructiemethoden.', 'de': 'Sentiment Lexikon ist ein wichtiges Werkzeug, um die Sentiment Polarität von Wörtern und Texten zu identifizieren. Die automatische Konstruktion von Sentiment-Lexikonen ist zu einem Forschungsthema im Bereich der Sentiment-Analyse und des Opinion Mining geworden. Kürzlich gab es einige Versuche, Repräsentationslernalgorithmen einzusetzen, um ein Sentiment-Lexikon mit sentimentbewusster Worteinbettung zu konstruieren. Diese Methoden wurden jedoch normalerweise unter Stimmungsüberwachung auf Dokumentenebene trainiert. In diesem Beitrag entwickeln wir eine neuronale Architektur, um eine sentimentbewusste Worteinbettung zu trainieren, indem wir die Sentiment Supervision auf Dokument- und Wortebene integrieren, um die Qualität der Worteinbettung sowie des Sentiment Lexikons zu verbessern. Experimente an den SemEval 2013-2016 Datensätzen zeigen, dass das Sentiment Lexikon, das durch unseren Ansatz generiert wird, im Vergleich zu mehreren starken Sentiment Lexikon-Konstruktionsmethoden sowohl in der überwachten als auch in der unbeaufsichtigten Sentiment-Klassifizierung den Stand der Technik erreicht.', 'id': 'Leksikon sensasi adalah alat penting untuk mengidentifikasi polaritas sensasi kata-kata dan teks. Bagaimana secara otomatis membangun leksikon sentimen telah menjadi topik penelitian dalam bidang analisis sentimen dan pendapat tambang. Recently there were some attempts to employ representation learning algorithms to construct a sentiment lexicon with sentiment-aware word embedding.  Namun, metode ini biasanya dilatih di bawah pengawasan sensasi tingkat dokumen. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan arsitektur saraf untuk melatih kata yang sadar dengan perasaan dengan mengintegrasi pengawasan perasaan pada kedua tingkat dokumen dan kata, untuk meningkatkan kualitas penerbangan kata serta leksikon perasaan. Eksperimen pada set data SemEval 2013-2016 menunjukkan bahwa lexikon sentimen yang dihasilkan oleh pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam kedua klasifikasi sentimen yang diawasi dan tidak diawasi, dibandingkan dengan beberapa metode konstruksi lexikon sentimen yang kuat.', 'fa': 'زبان احساساتی یک ابزار مهم برای شناسایی قطبی احساسات کلمات و متن است. چگونه ساختن زبان احساسات به طور خودکار یک موضوع تحقیق در زمینه تحلیل احساسات و ذخیره کردن نظر تبدیل شده است. اخیراً تلاش\u200cهایی برای استفاده از الگوریتم\u200cهای یادگیری از نمایش\u200cگذاری برای ساختن یک لغوی احساسات با کلمه\u200cهای آگاهی احساسات بود. ولی این روش\u200cها معمولا تحت نظارت احساسات سطح سند آموزش داده می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک معماری عصبی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا یک کلمه آگاهی احساسات را آموزش دهیم که با توسعه نظارت احساسات در هر دو سطح سند و کلمه کلمه را جمع می\u200cکنیم، تا کیفیت کلمه جمع شده و کلمه احساسات را افزایش دهیم. تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نیمه ۲۰۰۳-۲۰۰۶ نشان می\u200cدهند که کلکسیون احساساتی که توسط دستور ما تولید شده\u200cاند انجام\u200cدهنده\u200cی موقعیت هنری در کلکسیون احساسات تحت نظر و غیرقابل تحت نظر قرار می\u200cگیرد، در مقایسه با چند روش ساختن احساسات سخ', 'ko': '감정 사전은 단어와 텍스트의 감정을 식별하는 중요한 도구다.어떻게 감정 어휘를 자동으로 구축하는지는 이미 감정 분석과 관점 발굴 분야의 연구 과제가 되었다.최근 표징 학습 알고리즘을 이용해 감정 감지어가 박힌 감정 사전을 구축하려는 시도가 있다.그러나 이런 방법은 보통 문서급 정서 감독 아래 훈련된다.본고에서 우리는 문서와 단어의 단계에 감정 감시를 통합시켜 감정 감지의 단어 삽입을 훈련시켜 단어 삽입의 질과 감정 사전을 향상시키는 신경 구조를 개발했다.SemEval 2013-2016 데이터 세트에서의 실험은 몇 가지 강한 감정 사전 구축 방법에 비해 우리의 방법으로 생성된 감정 사전은 감독이 있는 것과 감독이 없는 감정 분류에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 보였다.', 'sw': 'Leksiko la muda ni zana muhimu ya kutambua hisia za uchafuzi wa maneno na maandishi. Namna jinsi ya kutengeneza hisia za lexico zimekuwa mada ya utafiti katika uwanja wa uchambuzi wa hisia na uchimbaji wa maoni. Hivi karibuni kulikuwa na jaribio la kuwatumia uwakilishi kwa ajili ya kujifunza algorithi ya kutengeneza hisia za lexico na neno linalofahamika. Hata hivyo, mbinu hizi kawaida zilifundishwa chini ya kufuatiliwa na hisia za kiwango cha nyaraka. Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza ujenzi wa ubongo wa kufundisha neno linalofahamika kwa kuunganisha ufuatiliaji wa hisia katika ngazi za nyaraka na maneno, ili kuongeza ubora wa maneno yanayoingia pamoja na hisia za lexico. Tatizo la taarifa za SemEval 2013-2016 zinaonyesha kuwa hisia za lexico zilizotengenezwa na mbinu zetu zinaweza kupata hali ya utendaji wa sanaa katika kutangazwa na hisia zisizo na uhakika, ukilinganisha na njia kadhaa za ujenzi wa lexico yenye nguvu.', 'tr': 'Senýat sözleri sözler we metinlerin duýgylygyny tanımak üçin wajyp bir aramdır. Duýgular leksiýasyny nähili otomatik gurulmaly duýgular analyzasynda we pikir taýýarlanmasynda bir tema boldy. Son zamanlarda duygusal kelimeler içinde duygusal bir leksikon oluşturmak için temsil öğrenme algoritmalarını kullanmak için bir denek vardı. Ýöne bu yöntemler, adatça desktap derejesi duýgulary gözünde bilinmediler. Bu kagyzda, duýgular we söz derejesinde bolan duýgular we sentsiýa leksiýasyny üýtgetmek üçin näural arhitektura guruldyk. SemEval 2013-2016 veri sapaglarynyň experimentalary ýagdaýymyz tarapyndan döredilen duýgular leziksiýasynyň durumyny hem gözlemýän we hem goramaýan duýgular klasifikasynda ýetip bilýär.', 'af': "Sentiment lexicon is 'n belangrike hulpmiddel vir identifiseer die sentiment polarisie van woorde en teks. Hoe om sentimentele leksies outomaties te konstrukteer het 'n ondersoek onderwerp geword in die veld van sentimente analisie en besonderhede mining. Onlangs was daar 'n paar probeer om voorstellingsalgoritme te gebruik om 'n sentimentele lexikon te konstrukteer met sentiment-bevestig woord inbêring. Maar hierdie metodes is gewoonlik onder dokumentvlak sentiment-supervisie opgelei. In hierdie papier ontwikkel ons 'n neurale arkitektuur om 'n sentiment-bevestig woord te tref deur die sentiment-supervisie by beide dokument en woord vlakke te integreer, om die kwaliteit van woord inbêring en die sentiment-lexikon te verbeter. Eksperimente op die semiEval 2013-2016-datastelle aandui dat die sentimentleksikoon wat deur ons toegang genereer is, die staat-van-kuns-prestasie bereik word in beide ondersoekte en onbehoeftige sentiment-klasifikasie, in vergelyking met verskeie sterke sentiment-leksikon-konstruksie metodes.", 'sq': 'Lexikona e ndjenjave është një mjet i rëndësishëm për identifikimin e polaritetit të ndjenjave të fjalëve dhe teksteve. Si të ndërtohen automatikisht lexikonat e ndjenjave është bërë një temë kërkimi në fushën e analizës së ndjenjave dhe minierave të opinionit. Recently there were some attempts to employ representation learning algorithms to construct a sentiment lexicon with sentiment-aware word embedding. Megjithatë, këto metoda janë trajnuar zakonisht nën mbikqyrjen e ndjenjave në nivel të dokumentit. Në këtë letër, ne zhvillojmë një arkitekturë nervore për të trajnuar një fjalë të ndërgjegjshme për ndjenjat duke integruar mbikqyrjen e ndjenjave në nivelet e dokumentit dhe të fjalëve, për të përmirësuar cilësinë e përfshirjes së fjalëve si dhe lexikonin e ndjenjave. Eksperimentet në grupet e të dhënave SemEval 2013-2016 tregojnë se lexikoni i ndjenjave të gjeneruar nga qasja jonë arrin shfaqjen më të lartë si në klasifikimin e ndjenjave të mbikqyrura ashtu edhe të pazgjidhura, në krahasim me disa metoda të forta të ndërtimit të lexikonit të ndjenjave.', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների լեքսիկոնն կարևոր գործիք է բառերի և տեքստների զգացմունքների կողմնականության հայտնաբերման համար: Ինչպե՞ս ավտոմատ կառուցել զգացմունքների լեքսիկոնները դարձավ զգացմունքների վերլուծության և կարծիքի հանքարության ոլորտում հետազոտություն: Recently there were some attempts to employ representation learning algorithms to construct a sentiment lexicon with sentiment-aware word embedding.  Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մեթոդները սովորաբար պատրաստված էին փաստաթղթի մակարդակի զգացմունքների վերահսկման տակ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի պատրաստենք զգացմունքներով գիտակցած բառ, ներառելով զգացմունքների վերահսկողությունը փաստաթղթի և բառերի մակարդակների վրա, բարելավելու համար բառերի ներառման որակը, ինչպես նաև զգացմունք 2013-2016 թվականի կիսագնդի տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցման միջոցով ստեղծված զգայարանների լեքսիկոնը հասնում է վերահսկված և անվերահսկված զգայարանների դասակարգումների ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին, համեմատած զգայարանների լեքսիկոնի կառուցման մի քանի ուժեղ մեթո', 'am': 'የመስኮት ዝርዝርዝሮች እና ጽሑፎችን የሚያውቅ የስሜት ርኵሰት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ሐሳብ ልኬክሲኖችን እንዴት እንደሚመሠረት የስሜት ትምህርት እና አስተያየት ግንኙነት መፍጠር ሆነዋል፡፡ በቅርቢቱ መጨረሻ የአልጎርጂም መምህርት ትምህርት ማድረግ የሚሞክሩ አንዳንዶች ሞከራዎች ነበሩ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች በሰነድ-ደረጃ አስተያየት የተማሩ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የነዌብ አካውንት እና የስሜት ጉዳይ እና ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና የልኬክሲን ውጤት እና የስሜት አካባቢ ቃላትን ለማስተማር እና ለማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሳምEval 2013-2016 ዳታተሮች ፈተናዎች በመግኘታችን የተለየውን ልኬክሲን የልዩ ልዩ-የ-አርጤት ሥርዓት በመጠበቅ እና በተጠበቀው ስሜት ክፍተት በማድረግ በብዙ ኃይለኛ የሊክሲክ ግንኙነት እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bs': 'Sentimentni leksikon je važan alat za identifikaciju polarnosti osjećaja riječi i teksta. Kako se automatski konstrukcija leksiona sentiment a postala je istraživačka tema u oblasti analize sentimenta i rudarstva mišljenja. Nedavno je bilo nekih pokušaja da upotrebljava algoritme učenja predstavljanja kako bi izgradila leksikon sentiment a sa osjećajnim riječima. Međutim, te metode su normalno obučene pod nadzorom osjećaja na nivou dokumenta. U ovom papiru razvijamo neuralnu arhitekturu kako bi obučili osjećajnu riječ uključenu integracijom nadzora osjećaja na dokumentima i razini riječi, kako bi poboljšali kvalitet riječi uključene kao i leksikon osjećaja. Eksperimenti na podacima semiEval 2013-2016 ukazuju na to da leksion osjećanja koji je proizveden našim pristupom postigne postupak države umjetnosti u klasifikaciji nadzornih i neodređenih osjećaja u usporedbi sa nekoliko jakih metoda konstrukcije leksiona osjećanja.', 'az': 'Sentiment sözləri sözlərin və metinlərin duygularını tanıtmaq üçün vacib bir vasitədir. Duyguların təhsil edilməsi və fikirlərin qurması sahəsində necə avtomatik təhsil edilir? Son zamanlarda hisslər bilən sözlərlə bir sentiment leksikini inşa etmək üçün göstəricisi öyrənmək algorimlərini istifadə etmək üçün bəzi çabalar idi. Ancaq bu metodlar normally document-level sentiment supervision altında təhsil edilmişdir. Bu kağızda, duyguları və sözlərin səviyyələrinə birləşdirmək üçün hisslərdən xəbərdar olan sözü təhsil etmək üçün nöral arhitektir təhsil edirik, həmçinin də hisslərin təhsil edilməsi üçün. SemEval 2013-2016 verilən quruluşların təcrübələri bizim tərəfimizdən yaratdığımız hisslər leksikonu, həmçin in gözlənilmiş, həmçinin təhlükəsizlik edilməmiş hisslər klasifikasyonunda, çoxlu güclü hisslər leksikon in şaat metodları ilə qarşılaşdırılır.', 'bn': 'সেন্টাইমেন্ট লেক্সিকোন একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ টুল যা শব্দ এবং টেক্সটের অনুভূতির দূরত্ব পরিচিতির জন্য। কিভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আবেগের লেক্সিকোর নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে আবেগ বিশ্লেষণ এবং মতামত খনির ক্ষেত্রে। সম্প্রতি কিছু প্রতিনিধিত্বের কাজ করার চেষ্টা ছিল যেখানে আবেগ-সচেতনতা শব্দ বানানোর সাথে একটি অনুভূতি লেক্সিকোর নির্মাণ করার তবে এই পদ্ধতিগুলো সাধারণত ডকুমেন্ট-স্তরের অনুভূতি পর্যবেক্ষণের অধীনে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নিউরুল কাঠামো উন্নয়ন করি যাতে একটি আবেগ-সচেতনতা শব্দ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করতে পারি যা দুই নথিপত্র ও শব্দের পর্যায়ে অনুভূতির পর্যবেক্ষণকে একত্রিত করে, যা সেমইভাল ২০১৩-২০১৬ ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা নির্দেশ করছে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপের মাধ্যমে তৈরি হয়েছে লেক্সিকোর অনুভূতি প্রকাশ করে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কিছু শক্তিশালী লেক্সিকোর নির্মা', 'ca': "El lexicó del sentiment és una eina important per identificar la polaritat del sentiment de les paraules i els textos. Com construir automàticament els lexicòns del sentiment s'ha convertit en un tema de recerca en el camp de l'anàlisi del sentiment i la mineria d'opinió. Recentment hi ha hagut alguns intents d'utilitzar algoritmes d'aprenentatge de representació per construir un lexicó de sentiments amb integració de paraules conscients del sentiment. However, these methods were normally trained under document-level sentiment supervision.  En aquest article, desenvolupem una arquitectura neuronal per formar una paraula conscient del sentiment incorporada integrant la supervisió del sentiment a nivells tant documental com de paraula, per millorar la qualitat de l'incorporació de paraula i la lexicònica del sentiment. Experiments on the SemEval 2013-2016 datasets indicate that the sentiment lexicon generated by our approach achieves the state-of-the-art performance in both supervised and unsupervised sentiment classification, in comparison with several strong sentiment lexicon construction methods.", 'et': 'Sentimendi leksikon on oluline vahend sõnade ja tekstide sentimentaalse polaarsuse tuvastamiseks. Kuidas automaatselt konstrueerida sentimentaalsed leksikonid on muutunud teadusteemaks sentimentaalüüsi ja arvamuse kaevandamise valdkonnas. Hiljuti tehti mõningaid katseid kasutada representatsiooniõppe algoritme, et ehitada sentimentaalne leksikon sentimentaalse sõna manustamisega. Kuid neid meetodeid koolitati tavaliselt dokumentide tasandil sentimentaalse järelevalve all. Käesolevas töös töötame välja närviarhitektuuri, et koolitada sentimentaalset sõna, integreerides sentimentaalse järelevalve nii dokumendi kui ka sõna tasandil, et parandada sõna manustamise kvaliteeti kui ka sentimentaalse leksikoni. SemEval 2013-2016 andmekogumitega tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et meie lähenemisviisist loodud sentimentaalleksikon saavutab kaasaegse tulemuse nii järelevalve kui ka järelevalveta sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni puhul, võrreldes mitmete tugevate sentimentaalleksikoni konstruktsiooni meetoditega.', 'cs': 'Sentimentní lexikon je důležitým nástrojem pro identifikaci sentimentní polarity slov a textů. Jak automaticky konstruovat sentimentní lexikony se stalo výzkumným tématem v oblasti analýzy sentimentů a dolování opinion. Nedávno došlo k některým pokusům využít algoritmy učení reprezentace k vytvoření sentimentního lexikonu s integrováním sentimentu. Tyto metody byly však obvykle trénovány pod dohledem sentimentu na úrovni dokumentů. V tomto článku vyvíjíme neuronovou architekturu pro trénování vkládání slov orientovaných na sentimenty integrovaným dohledem nad sentimenty na úrovni dokumentů i slov, abychom zvýšili kvalitu vložení slov a slovního slovníku. Experimenty na datových sadách SemEval 2013-2016 ukazují, že slovník sentimentů generovaný naším přístupem dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů v klasifikaci sentimentů pod dohledem i bez dohledu, ve srovnání s několika metodami konstrukce silných sentimentů.', 'fi': 'Tunnesanasto on tärkeä työkalu sanojen ja tekstien tunnepolariteetin tunnistamiseen. Tunteeleksikonien automaattisesta rakentamisesta on tullut tunteiden analysoinnin ja mielipiteiden louhinnan tutkimusaihe. Äskettäin on yritetty käyttää representaatiooppimisalgoritmeja tunteiden sanaston rakentamiseen tunteiden tietoisella sanaupotuksella. Näitä menetelmiä kuitenkin koulutettiin yleensä dokumenttitason tunteiden valvonnassa. Tässä artikkelissa kehitämme neuroarkkitehtuurin, jolla koulutetaan tunnetietoista sanan upottamista integroimalla tunteiden valvonta sekä dokumentti- että sanatasolla, parantaaksemme sanan upottamisen laatua ja tunnesanastoa. SemEval 2013-2016 -aineistojen kokeilut osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme tuottama tunnesanasto saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn sekä valvotussa että valvomattomassa tunneluokituksessa verrattuna useisiin vahvoihin tunnesanaston rakentamismenetelmiin.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Awak dhéwé nggawe sawal sistem sing automatik dhéwé éntuk tema sing ngubah perusahaan winih karo hal-salamat seneng nggawe ngubah. Saying Kamadhi, ditambah-ditambah wong kuwi ora ngerasakno ngono nggarahaan seneng pisan kelas kuwi. Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé nggawe Arkiru Neral sing luwih basa gambar kelas kuwi wis dipunangé awak dhéwé kuwi wis dipunangé awak dhéwé ning acara awak dhéwé lan basa gambar, iso nglanggar kuwi wis luwih apik dhéwé uga awak dhéwé Tatanan sing beraksi lan alam kuwi duwé Awakdhéwé éntuk kelompok Samsul 2013-2013 dataset nggawe barang kelompok nggawe barang kelompok nggawe barang kelompok nggawe barang dhéwé-kebutuhan karo hal-kebutuhan karo hal-kebutuhan seneng gawe nguasai macem gawe nguasai winih dhéwé, nggawe gerakan karo akeh Sentem layang seneng nggawe barang sen', 'ha': "@ action: button Yãye za'a gina matsayin littafin leksiya farat ɗaya, ta kasance madaidaici na ƙidãya a cikin birnin anayyar hisia da kunnuwanta misalin sharia. A yanzu, akwai jarrabi ko da za su yi aiki ga wakili da algorituman su sanar wa ya baka wani littafin leksikon da kalma mai fahimta. However, these methods were normally trained under document-level sentiment supervision.  Daga wannan takardan, Munã developer wani matsayin neural dõmin Mu sanar da wani maganar mai sanawa da shi, yana guda da shirin tsarin hisia a duk dukkan takardar da magana, dõmin a ƙara sifar maganar da ke fitarwa da kuma ma'anar leksikon. Tajararin da aka tsare na Semeval 2013-2016 data-set sun nuna cewa cema cewa sautin leksikon wanda aka haife da hanyarmu ya kai ga halin-sanar a cikin tsarin da aka tsare da kuma ba'a tsare shi ba, sami da wasu hanyoyin kuɓutar da mai ƙarfi na sanyin leksisi.", 'sk': 'Sentimentalni leksikon je pomembno orodje za prepoznavanje sentimentalne polarnosti besed in besedil. Kako samodejno graditi sentimentalne leksikone je postalo raziskovalna tema na področju analize sentimentalnosti in rudarjenja mnenja. V zadnjem času je bilo nekaj poskusov uporabe algoritmov za učenje reprezentacije za oblikovanje sentimentalnega leksikona z vključevanjem besed, ki se zavedajo sentimentalnosti. Vendar so se te metode običajno usposabljale pod nadzorom občutkov na ravni dokumentov. V tem prispevku razvijamo nevronsko arhitekturo za usposabljanje vključevanja čustvenih besed z integracijo nadzora čustva na ravni dokumentov in besed, da bi izboljšali kakovost vključevanja besed in čustveni leksikon. Eksperimenti na naborih podatkov SemEval 2013-2016 kažejo, da sentimentalni leksikon, ki ga ustvari naš pristop, dosega najsodobnejšo uspešnost pri nadzorovani in nenadzorovani sentimentalni klasifikaciji v primerjavi z več močnimi metodami konstrukcije sentimentalnega leksikona.', 'he': 'לקסיקון רגשות הוא כלי חשוב לזהות את קוטביות הרגשות של מילים וטקסטים. איך לבנות אוטומטית לקסיקונים רגשות הפכה לנושא מחקר בשטח ניתוח רגשות ומכרת דעות. לאחרונה היו כמה ניסיונות להשתמש באלגוריתמים לימודים של מייצגה לבנות לקסיקון רגשות עם מילה מודעת לשימוש. עם זאת, השיטות הללו היו בדרך כלל מאומנים תחת פיקוח רגשות ברמה מסמכים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מפתחים ארכיטקטורה עצבית כדי לאמן מילה מודעת לרגשות שמעורבת על ידי האינגרציה של פיקוח הרגשות ברמות המסמכים וגם מילים, כדי לשפר את איכות הכניסה של מילה וגם את לקסיקון הרגשות. ניסויים על חבילות נתונים של SemEval 2013-2016 מצביעים כי לקסיקון הרגשות שנוצר על ידי הגישה שלנו משיג את ההופעה המאודמנית במסגרת רגשות ששולטת ולא שולטת, בהשוואה לכמה שיטות בניית לקסיקון רגשות חזקות.', 'bo': 'ཆེད་མཚམས་མཚོན་རྟགས་ནི་གསལ་རྟགས་དང་ཡི་གེའི་སྟོན་རྟགས་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་རེད། སེམས་ཚོར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་དེ་sentiment་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་གླེང མཐའ་མ་དེར་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་སྟོན་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྟོན་རྩོལ་བ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པའི་དཔའ་བཅས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཚོ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལྟ་རྟོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་སྒྲུང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ལ་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་དང་། Experiments on the SemEval 2013-2016 datasets indicate that the sentiment lexicon generated by our approach achieves the state-of-the-art performance in both supervised and unsupervised sentiment classification, in comparison with several strong sentiment lexicon construction methods.'}
{'en': 'Towards a Universal Sentiment Classifier in Multiple languages', 'ar': 'نحو مصنف عالمي للمشاعر بلغات متعددة', 'pt': 'Rumo a um classificador de sentimento universal em vários idiomas', 'fr': 'Vers un classificateur universel des sentiments en plusieurs langues', 'es': 'Hacia un clasificador universal de sentimientos en varios idiomas', 'ja': '複数の言語の普遍的な感情分類子に向けて', 'zh': '迈向多种语言之通用情类器', 'hi': 'एकाधिक भाषाओं में एक सार्वभौमिक भावना क्लासिफायर की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к универсальному классификатору настроений на нескольких языках', 'ga': 'I dTreo Aicmitheora Mothúcháin Uilíoch in Ilteangacha', 'ka': 'მრავალური ენების უნივერსალური სინტემინტის კლასიფიერების მიხედვით', 'el': 'Προς μια καθολική ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων σε πολλές γλώσσες', 'hu': 'Towards a Universal Sentiment Classifier több nyelven', 'it': 'Verso un annuncio universale del sentimento in più lingue', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілде Universal Sentiment классификаторына қарсы', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്കു് ഒരു പൊതുവായ സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് ക്ലാസിഫയര്\u200d', 'mk': 'За универзален класификатор на чувства на повеќе јазици', 'lt': 'Universalaus jutimo klasifikatoriaus keliomis kalbomis link', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл дээр ертөнцийн мэдрэмжтэй классификатор руу', 'mt': 'Lejn Klassifikatur Universali tas-Sentiment f’diversi lingwi', 'no': 'Gå til ein universell sentimentalklassifisering i fleire språk', 'pl': 'W kierunku uniwersalnej klasyfikacji sentymentów w wielu językach', 'ro': 'Către un clasificator universal de sentimente în mai multe limbi', 'sr': 'На универсални классифирач чувства на много езика', 'so': 'Dhagaxa fasaxa jaamacadda ee luqadaha kala duduwan', 'ms': 'Menuju Pengklasifikasi Sensan Universal dalam bahasa berbilang', 'sv': 'Mot en Universal Sentiment Classifier på flera språk', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවල් වලට සංවේදනය ක්\u200dලාසිෆර් වලට', 'ta': 'பொதுவான அமர்வு', 'ur': 'ایک Universal Sentiment Classifier کی طرف بہت سی زبانوں میں', 'uz': 'Umumiy Sentiment Classifier in multiple languages', 'vi': 'Hướng tới một mẫu giáo chung theo nhiều ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Към универсален сентиментен класификатор на няколко езика', 'hr': 'Prema univerzalnom klasifikatoru sentimenta na višestrukim jezicima', 'da': 'På vej mod en universel sentiment Classifier på flere sprog', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einem universellen Stimmungsklassifier in mehreren Sprachen', 'ko': '다언어 통용 감정 분류기 연구', 'nl': 'Naar een universele sentiment classificator in meerdere talen', 'fa': 'به سمت کلاس\u200cشناس\u200cکننده\u200cی احساسات جهانی در زبان\u200cهای متعدد', 'sw': 'Mpaka Msalama wa Seneti Duniani kwa lugha nyingi', 'id': 'Menuju Klasifikator Sentimen Universal dalam berbagai bahasa', 'tr': 'Birnäçe dillerde bir Universal Sentiment Sözleyici', 'af': "Na 'n Universele Sentiment Klassifier in veelvuldige tale", 'sq': 'Për një klasifikues të ndjenjave universale në gjuhë të shumta', 'am': 'Sentiment Classifier in Multiple languages', 'az': '칂oxlu dill톛rd톛 Universel Sentiment Klasif톛칞i t톛r톛find톛', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের সেন্টেমেন্ট ক্লাসিফার', 'hy': 'Համաշխարհային զգացմունքների դասակարգիչ բազմալեզուներում', 'cs': 'Směrem k univerzálnímu klasifikátoru citů ve více jazycích', 'bs': 'Prema univerzalnom klasifikatoru sentimenta na višestrukim jezicima', 'ca': 'cap a un classificador universal de sentiments en moltes llengües', 'et': 'Towards a Universal Sentiment Classifier in Multiple Language', 'fi': 'Kohti Universal Sentiment Classifier useilla kielillä', 'jv': 'Tulung ing Universal Sentiment', 'ha': 'Towards a Universal Sentiment Classifier in Multiple languages', 'sk': 'Proti univerzalnemu čustvenemu klasifikatorju v več jezikih', 'he': 'לכיוון מסווג רגשות יוניברסליים בשפות רבות', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ནང་དུ་ཆེད་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཤིག་ཏུ་'}
{'en': 'Existing sentiment classifiers usually work for only one specific language, and different classification models are used in different languages. In this paper we aim to build a universal sentiment classifier with a single classification model in multiple different languages. In order to achieve this goal, we propose to learn multilingual sentiment-aware word embeddings simultaneously based only on the labeled reviews in English and unlabeled parallel data available in a few language pairs. It is not required that the parallel data exist between English and any other language, because the sentiment information can be transferred into any language via pivot languages. We present the evaluation results of our universal sentiment classifier in five languages, and the results are very promising even when the parallel data between English and the target languages are not used. Furthermore, the universal single classifier is compared with a few cross-language sentiment classifiers relying on direct parallel data between the source and target languages, and the results show that the performance of our universal sentiment classifier is very promising compared to that of different cross-language classifiers in multiple target languages.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تعمل مصنفات المشاعر الحالية للغة واحدة محددة فقط ، وتستخدم نماذج تصنيف مختلفة بلغات مختلفة. نهدف في هذا البحث إلى بناء مصنف عالمي للمشاعر بنموذج تصنيف واحد بلغات مختلفة متعددة. من أجل تحقيق هذا الهدف ، نقترح تعلم حفلات الزفاف متعددة اللغات التي تراعي المشاعر في نفس الوقت بناءً على المراجعات المصنفة باللغة الإنجليزية والبيانات المتوازية غير المصنفة المتوفرة في عدد قليل من الأزواج اللغوية. لا يشترط وجود البيانات المتوازية بين اللغة الإنجليزية وأي لغة أخرى ، لأنه يمكن نقل معلومات المشاعر إلى أي لغة عبر اللغات المحورية. نقدم نتائج تقييم مصنف المشاعر العام لدينا بخمس لغات ، والنتائج واعدة للغاية حتى في حالة عدم استخدام البيانات المتوازية بين اللغة الإنجليزية واللغات المستهدفة. علاوة على ذلك ، تتم مقارنة المصنف الفردي العالمي مع عدد قليل من مصنفات المشاعر عبر اللغات التي تعتمد على البيانات الموازية المباشرة بين المصدر واللغة الهدف ، وتظهر النتائج أن أداء مصنف المشاعر العام لدينا واعد للغاية مقارنة بأداء مختلف عبر- مصنفات اللغة في لغات مستهدفة متعددة.', 'fr': "Les classificateurs d'opinion existants ne fonctionnent généralement que pour une langue spécifique, et différents modèles de classification sont utilisés dans différentes langues. Dans cet article, nous visons à créer un classificateur de sentiments universel avec un modèle de classification unique dans plusieurs langues différentes. Afin d'atteindre cet objectif, nous proposons d'apprendre simultanément des intégrations de mots multilingues sensibles aux sentiments sur la base uniquement des avis étiquetés en anglais et des données parallèles non étiquetées disponibles dans quelques paires de langues. Il n'est pas nécessaire que des données parallèles existent entre l'anglais et toute autre langue, car les informations de sentiment peuvent être transférées dans n'importe quelle langue via les langues pivot. Nous présentons les résultats de l'évaluation de notre classificateur de sentiment universel en cinq langues, et les résultats sont très prometteurs même lorsque les données parallèles entre l'anglais et les langues cibles ne sont pas utilisées. En outre, le classificateur unique universel est comparé à quelques classificateurs de sentiments interlinguistiques s'appuyant sur des données parallèles directes entre les langues source et cible, et les résultats montrent que les performances de notre classificateur universel de sentiments sont très prometteuses par rapport à celles de différents classificateurs de sentiments croisés des classificateurs de langues dans plusieurs langues cibles.", 'pt': 'Os classificadores de sentimento existentes geralmente funcionam apenas para um idioma específico, e diferentes modelos de classificação são usados em diferentes idiomas. Neste artigo, pretendemos construir um classificador de sentimento universal com um único modelo de classificação em várias linguagens diferentes. Para atingir esse objetivo, propomos aprender a incorporação de palavras multilíngues com reconhecimento de sentimentos simultaneamente, com base apenas nas revisões rotuladas em inglês e dados paralelos não rotulados disponíveis em alguns pares de idiomas. Não é necessário que existam dados paralelos entre o inglês e qualquer outro idioma, pois as informações de sentimento podem ser transferidas para qualquer idioma por meio de idiomas dinâmicos. Apresentamos os resultados da avaliação do nosso classificador universal de sentimentos em cinco idiomas, e os resultados são muito promissores mesmo quando os dados paralelos entre o inglês e os idiomas de destino não são usados. Além disso, o classificador único universal é comparado com alguns classificadores de sentimento entre linguagens que contam com dados paralelos diretos entre as linguagens de origem e de destino, e os resultados mostram que o desempenho do nosso classificador de sentimento universal é muito promissor em comparação com o de diferentes classes cruzadas. classificadores de idiomas em vários idiomas de destino.', 'es': 'Los clasificadores de opinión existentes normalmente funcionan solo para un idioma específico, y se utilizan diferentes modelos de clasificación en diferentes idiomas. En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es crear un clasificador de sentimientos universal con un único modelo de clasificación en varios idiomas diferentes. Para lograr este objetivo, proponemos aprender simultáneamente incrustaciones de palabras multilingües conscientes de la opinión basada solo en las revisiones etiquetadas en inglés y en los datos paralelos no etiquetados disponibles en algunos pares de idiomas. No es necesario que existan datos paralelos entre el inglés y cualquier otro idioma, porque la información de opinión se puede transferir a cualquier idioma a través de idiomas puente. Presentamos los resultados de la evaluación de nuestro clasificador universal de sentimientos en cinco idiomas, y los resultados son muy prometedores incluso cuando no se utilizan los datos paralelos entre el inglés y los idiomas de destino. Además, el clasificador único universal se compara con unos pocos clasificadores de sentimientos interlingüísticos que se basan en datos paralelos directos entre los idiomas de origen y de destino, y los resultados muestran que el rendimiento de nuestro clasificador universal de sentimientos es muy prometedor en comparación con el de diferentes clasificadores de idiomas en varios idiomas de destino.', 'ja': '既存のセンチメント分類子は通常、1つの特定の言語でのみ機能し、異なる分類モデルが異なる言語で使用されます。 本稿では、複数の異なる言語における単一の分類モデルを用いた普遍的な感情分類器の構築を目指す。 この目標を達成するために、英語でラベル付けされたレビューと、いくつかの言語ペアで利用可能なラベル付けされていない並列データのみに基づいて、多言語センチメント認識ワード埋め込みを同時に学習することを提案します。 センチメント情報は、ピボット言語を介して任意の言語に転送できるため、並列データが英語と他の言語との間に存在する必要はありません。 ユニバーサルセンチメントクラスターの評価結果を5言語で提示し、英語と対象言語の並列データを使用しなくても非常に有望です。 さらに、ユニバーサル単一分類子は、ソース言語とターゲット言語の間の直接的な並列データに依存するいくつかのクロス言語センチメント分類子と比較され、結果は、複数のターゲット言語の異なるクロス言語分類子と比較して、当社のユニバーサルセンチメント分類子のパフォーマンスが非常に有望であることを示しています。', 'zh': '今情类器常用一特定言语,异言异体。 本文,我们的是用多种语言的单个分类模样构建一个通用情分类器。 所以然者,吾徒据英语之论,与数语之可用者并行数据,兼学多情感知词嵌。 不须并行英语语,情信透视言传输。 吾以五言见通情类器之评,虽不用英语与语言之间并行数据,亦甚可冀也。 此外将通用单一分类器与少数依源言语和语言间直行数据的跨语情分类器较较,结果表明与多的言语中不同跨言语分类器相比,我们的通用情分类器的性情很有前途。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा भावना क्लासिफायर आमतौर पर केवल एक विशिष्ट भाषा के लिए काम करते हैं, और विभिन्न वर्गीकरण मॉडल का उपयोग विभिन्न भाषाओं में किया जाता है। इस पेपर में हम कई अलग-अलग भाषाओं में एक एकल वर्गीकरण मॉडल के साथ एक सार्वभौमिक भावना क्लासिफायर बनाने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। इस लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करने के लिए, हम केवल अंग्रेजी में लेबल की गई समीक्षाओं और कुछ भाषा जोड़े में उपलब्ध बिना लेबल वाले समानांतर डेटा के आधार पर बहुभाषी भावना-जागरूक शब्द एम्बेडिंग को एक साथ सीखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह आवश्यक नहीं है कि समानांतर डेटा अंग्रेजी और किसी अन्य भाषा के बीच मौजूद है, क्योंकि भावना जानकारी को धुरी भाषाओं के माध्यम से किसी भी भाषा में स्थानांतरित किया जा सकता है। हम पांच भाषाओं में हमारे सार्वभौमिक भावना क्लासिफायर के मूल्यांकन परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और अंग्रेजी और लक्ष्य भाषाओं के बीच समानांतर डेटा का उपयोग नहीं किए जाने पर भी परिणाम बहुत आशाजनक होते हैं। इसके अलावा, सार्वभौमिक एकल क्लासिफायर की तुलना स्रोत और लक्ष्य भाषाओं के बीच प्रत्यक्ष समानांतर डेटा पर निर्भर कुछ क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज भावना क्लासिफायरके साथ की जाती है, और परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारे सार्वभौमिक भावना क्लासिफायर का प्रदर्शन कई लक्ष्य भाषाओं में विभिन्न क्रॉस-लैंग्वेज क्लासिफायरकी तुलना में बहुत आशाजनक है।', 'ru': 'Существующие классификаторы настроений обычно работают только для одного конкретного языка, и в разных языках используются разные модели классификации. В данной работе мы стремимся построить универсальный классификатор настроений с единой классификационной моделью на нескольких разных языках. Для достижения этой цели мы предлагаем изучать многоязычные встраивания слов, основанные одновременно только на меченых обзорах на английском языке и немеченых параллельных данных, доступных в нескольких языковых парах. Не требуется, чтобы параллельные данные существовали между английским и любым другим языком, потому что информация о настроениях может быть передана на любой язык с помощью сводных языков. Мы представляем результаты оценки нашего универсального классификатора настроений на пяти языках, и результаты очень многообещающие даже тогда, когда параллельные данные между английским и целевыми языками не используются. Кроме того, универсальный единый классификатор сравнивается с несколькими межъязыковыми классификаторами настроений, основанными на прямых параллельных данных между исходным и целевым языками, и результаты показывают, что производительность нашего универсального классификатора настроений очень перспективна по сравнению с производительностью различных межъязыковых классификаторов на нескольких целевых языках.', 'ga': 'Is iondúil go n-oibríonn aicmitheoirí mothúcháin atá ann cheana féin do theanga ar leith amháin, agus úsáidtear samhlacha éagsúla aicmithe i dteangacha éagsúla. Sa pháipéar seo tá sé mar aidhm againn aicmitheoir meon uilíoch a thógáil le múnla amháin aicmithe i dteangacha éagsúla. Chun an sprioc seo a bhaint amach, tá sé beartaithe againn leabú focal ilteangach atá feasach ar an meon a fhoghlaim go comhuaineach bunaithe ar na hathbhreithnithe lipéadaithe i mBéarla amháin agus ar shonraí comhthreomhara gan lipéad atá ar fáil i gcúpla péire teangacha. Ní gá go mbeadh na sonraí comhthreomhara ann idir Béarla agus teanga ar bith eile, mar is féidir an t-eolas meon a aistriú go teanga ar bith trí theangacha maighdeogacha. Cuirimid i láthair torthaí meastóireachta ár n-aicmitheoir sentiments uilíoch i gcúig theanga, agus tá na torthaí an-dearfach fiú nuair nach n-úsáidtear na sonraí comhthreomhara idir Béarla agus na sprioctheangacha. Ina theannta sin, déantar an t-aicmitheoir aonair uilíoch a chur i gcomparáid le roinnt aicmeoirí meon trasteanga a bhíonn ag brath ar shonraí comhthreomhara díreacha idir an fhoinse agus na sprioctheangacha, agus léiríonn na torthaí go bhfuil feidhmíocht ár n-aicmitheora sentiment uilíoch an-gealtach i gcomparáid le feidhmíocht tras-teangacha éagsúla. aicmitheoirí teanga i sprioctheangacha iolracha.', 'ka': 'Existing sentiment classifiers usually work for only one specific language, and different classification models are used in different languages. ამ დოგუმენში ჩვენ მინდომით უნივერსალური სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაცია ერთი კლასიფიკაციის მოდელზე მრავალი განსხვავებული ენაში. ამ მიზეზის გავაკეთებელად, ჩვენ მრავალენგური სიტყვების გასწავლისთვის, რომ მრავალენგური სიტყვების გასწავლისთვის მხოლოდ მართლად ანგლისური და არაწერი პარალელური მონაცემების დაბათება არ უნდა იყოს, რომ პარალელი მონაცემები ინგლისური და სხვა ენის შორის არსებობს, რადგან სენტიმენტის ინფორმაცია შეიძლება pivot ენების გამოყენებაში ყველა ენაში გადატან ჩვენ ჩვენი უნივერსოლური სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციის გავამუშავებთ ხუთი ენაში, და შედეგილები მნიშვნელოვანია, თუმცა ანგლისური და მისაღების შორის პარალელი მონაცემები არ გამ დამატებით, უნივერსოლური ერთი კლასიფიკაციატორი შემდგომარებულია რამდენიმე კლასიფიკაციატორიებით, რომლებიც მსგავსი პერალელური ინფორმაციის და მისაღების ენების შორის მონაცემებისთვის დაკავშირებული მონაცემებისთვის, და შედე', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχοντες ταξινομητές συναισθημάτων συνήθως λειτουργούν μόνο για μια συγκεκριμένη γλώσσα και διαφορετικά μοντέλα ταξινόμησης χρησιμοποιούνται σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες. Στην παρούσα εργασία στοχεύουμε στην οικοδόμηση ενός καθολικού ταξινομητή συναισθημάτων με ένα ενιαίο μοντέλο ταξινόμησης σε πολλές διαφορετικές γλώσσες. Για την επίτευξη αυτού του στόχου, προτείνουμε να μάθουμε ταυτόχρονα πολυγλωσσικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων με γνώμονα το συναίσθημα βασισμένες μόνο στις επισημάνσεις στα αγγλικά και χωρίς επισήμανση παράλληλα δεδομένα διαθέσιμα σε λίγα γλωσσικά ζεύγη. Δεν απαιτείται η ύπαρξη παράλληλων δεδομένων μεταξύ της αγγλικής και οποιασδήποτε άλλης γλώσσας, επειδή οι πληροφορίες συναισθημάτων μπορούν να μεταφερθούν σε οποιαδήποτε γλώσσα μέσω των γλωσσών περιστροφής. Παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης του καθολικού ταξινομητή συναισθημάτων μας σε πέντε γλώσσες, και τα αποτελέσματα είναι πολλά υποσχόμενα ακόμη και όταν δεν χρησιμοποιούνται τα παράλληλα δεδομένα μεταξύ των αγγλικών και των γλωσσών-στόχων. Επιπλέον, ο καθολικός ενιαίος ταξινομητής συγκρίνεται με μερικούς γλωσσικούς ταξινομητές συναισθημάτων που βασίζονται σε άμεσα παράλληλα δεδομένα μεταξύ της γλώσσας προέλευσης και της γλώσσας-στόχου, και τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η απόδοση του καθολικού ταξινομητή συναισθημάτων μας είναι πολύ ελπιδοφόρα σε σύγκριση με εκείνη των διαφορετικών γλωσσικών ταξινομητών σε πολλαπλές γλώσσες-στόχους.', 'hu': 'A meglévő hangulatosztályozók általában csak egy adott nyelven dolgoznak, és különböző osztályozási modelleket használnak különböző nyelveken. Ebben a tanulmányban egy univerzális hangulatosztályozót kívánunk létrehozni egyetlen osztályozási modellel, több különböző nyelven. E cél elérése érdekében azt javasoljuk, hogy egyszerre tanuljunk többnyelvű hangulattudatos szóbeágyazásokat, kizárólag a címkézett angol értékelések és néhány nyelvpárban rendelkezésre álló, címke nélküli párhuzamos adatok alapján. Nem szükséges, hogy az angol és bármely más nyelv között párhuzamos adatok léteznek, mert a hangulatinformációk pivot nyelven keresztül bármely nyelvre továbbíthatók. Az egyetemes hangulatosztályozónk értékelési eredményeit öt nyelven mutatjuk be, és az eredmények akkor is nagyon ígéretesek, ha az angol és a célnyelv közötti párhuzamos adatokat nem használjuk. Továbbá az univerzális egyszeri osztályozót néhány nyelvközi hangulatosztályozóval hasonlítjuk össze, amelyek a forrás- és célnyelvek közötti közvetlen párhuzamos adatokra támaszkodnak, és az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy univerzális hangulatosztályozónk teljesítménye nagyon ígéretes a különböző nyelvközi osztályozók teljesítménye több célnyelven.', 'it': "I classificatori di sentiment esistenti di solito lavorano per una sola lingua specifica e diversi modelli di classificazione sono utilizzati in lingue diverse. In questo articolo puntiamo a costruire un classificatore universale di sentiment con un unico modello di classificazione in più lingue diverse. Al fine di raggiungere questo obiettivo, proponiamo di imparare simultaneamente incorporazioni di parole consapevoli del sentimento basate solo sulle recensioni etichettate in inglese e sui dati paralleli non etichettati disponibili in poche coppie linguistiche. Non è necessario che i dati paralleli esistano tra l'inglese e qualsiasi altra lingua, perché le informazioni sul sentiment possono essere trasferite in qualsiasi lingua tramite lingue pivot. Presentiamo i risultati della valutazione del nostro classificatore universale di sentiment in cinque lingue, e i risultati sono molto promettenti anche quando i dati paralleli tra l'inglese e le lingue di destinazione non vengono utilizzati. Inoltre, il singolo classificatore universale è confrontato con alcuni classificatori di sentiment cross-language basati su dati paralleli diretti tra la lingua di origine e quella di destinazione, e i risultati mostrano che le prestazioni del nostro classificatore universale di sentiment sono molto promettenti rispetto a quelle di diversi classificatori cross-language in più lingue di destinazione.", 'kk': 'Бар сезімдер классификациясы әдетте тек бір тіл үшін жұмыс істейді, және әртүрлі классификациялау үлгілері әртүрлі тілдерде қолданылады. Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше тілдерде бір жалпы классификациялау үлгісімен әлемдік сезім классификациясын құруға мақсатымыз. Бұл мақсатты жеткізу үшін біз бірнеше тілдерде бар параллель деректерді тек ағылшын тілінде жазылған және жазылмаған параллель деректерге негізделген сөздерді бір-бірімен үйрену үшін ұсынамыз. Ағылшынша мен басқа тіл арасындағы параллел деректер бар екенін қажет емес, себебі көңіл мәліметі pivot тілдерінен кез келген тіліне аударылады. Біз әлемдік сезімдік классификациясының нәтижелерін бес тілде таңдаймыз. Нәтижелері ағылшын тілдер мен мақсатты тілдер арасындағы параллель деректер қолданылмаса да өте жақсы ұсын Қосымша, әлемдік бір классификатор көпшілік тілдер мен мақсатты тілдер арасындағы көпшілік параллель деректерге көмектесетін бірнеше тілдер көпшілігімен салыстырылады, және нәтижелер біздің әлемдік сезімді классификаторымыздың ә', 'lt': 'Esami jausmų klasifikatoriai paprastai dirba tik viena konkrečia kalba, o skirtingose kalbose naudojami skirtingi klasifikavimo modeliai. Šiame dokumente siekiame sukurti universal ų jausmų klasifikatorių su vienu klasifikavimo modeliu įvairiomis kalbomis. In order to achieve this goal, we propose to learn multilingual sentiment-aware word embeddings simultaneously based only on the labeled reviews in English and unlabeled parallel data available in a few language pairs.  Nėra reikalaujama, kad lygiagretūs duomenys egzistuotų tarp anglų ir bet kurios kitos kalbos, nes jausmų informacija gali būti perduodama į bet kurią kalbą per pagrindines kalbas. Mes pristatome mūsų universalaus jausmų klasifikatoriaus vertinimo rezultatus penkiomis kalbomis, ir rezultatai labai žadantys net tada, kai nėra naudojami lygiagretūs anglų ir tikslinių kalbų duomenys. Be to, universalus vienintelis klasifikatorius lyginamas su keliais tarpkalbiniais jausmų klasifikatoriais, grindžiamais tiesioginiais lygiagrečiais duomenimis tarp šaltinio ir tikslinių kalbų, ir rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų universalus jausmų klasifikatorius yra labai perspektyvus, palyginti su skirtingų tarpkalbinių klasifikatorių įvairiomis tikslinėmis kalbomis rezultatais.', 'mk': 'Постојаните класификатори на чувства обично работат за само еден специфичен јазик, а различни модели на класификација се користат на различни јазици. Во овој весник имаме за цел да изградиме универзален класификатор на чувства со еден модел на класификација на повеќе различни јазици. За да ја оствариме оваа цел, предлагаме да се научат мултијазични зборови свесни за чувствата, истовремено базирани само на означените рецензии на англиски и неозначени паралелни податоци достапни во неколку јазички парови. Не е потребно паралелните податоци да постојат помеѓу англискиот и било кој друг јазик, бидејќи информациите за чувствата можат да бидат пренесени на било кој јазик преку обратни јазици. Ги претставуваме резултатите од евалуацијата на нашиот универзален класификатор на чувства на пет јазици, и резултатите се многу ветувачки дури и кога паралелните податоци помеѓу англиските и металните јазици не се користат. Покрај тоа, универзалниот единствен класификатор се споредува со неколку класификатори на меѓујазички чувства кои се потпираат на директни паралелни податоци помеѓу изворот и јазиците на целта, и резултатите покажуваат дека изведбата на нашиот универзален класификатор на чувства е многу ветувачка во споредба со онаа на различните', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള വിചാരകങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് മാത്രമേ ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d വ്യത് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൊതുവായ വിവിധ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രാപിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകഭാഷയിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാകുന്നു. അതോടൊപ്പം ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലുള്ള ലേബിള്\u200d  ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും മറ്റൊരു ഭാഷയിലും തമ്മിലുള്ള പാരല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ നിലനില്\u200dക്കേണ്ടത് ആവശ്യമില്ല, കാരണം പിവോട്ട് ഭാഷകളിലൂടെ വിശേ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അഞ്ചു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രപഞ്ചത്തിലെ അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ പ്രത്യേകമാണ്. ഇംഗ്ലീഷി അതിനുമുമ്പ്, പ്രപഞ്ചത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ക്രോസ്ഫ്ലാന്\u200dസ് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d നേരിട്ടുള്ള പാരാളില്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്ന ചില വിഭാഷക്കാരോടും', 'ms': 'Pengklasifikasi perasaan yang wujud biasanya berfungsi hanya untuk satu bahasa tertentu, dan model klasifikasi yang berbeza digunakan dalam bahasa yang berbeza. Dalam kertas ini kita bermaksud untuk membina pengklasifikasi perasaan universal dengan model klasifikasi tunggal dalam berbilang bahasa. Untuk mencapai tujuan ini, kami cadangkan untuk belajar pelbagai bahasa penyelesaian perkataan bersamaan berdasarkan hanya ulasan yang ditabel dalam bahasa Inggeris dan data selari tidak ditabel yang tersedia dalam beberapa pasangan bahasa. It is not required that the parallel data exist between English and any other language, because the sentiment information can be transferred into any language via pivot languages.  Kami memperkenalkan keputusan penilaian pengklasifikasi perasaan universal kami dalam lima bahasa, dan keputusan sangat berjanji walaupun data selari antara bahasa Inggeris dan bahasa sasaran tidak digunakan. Selain itu, pengklasifikasi tunggal universal dibandingkan dengan beberapa pengklasifikasi perasaan bahasa salib bergantung pada data selari langsung antara sumber dan bahasa sasaran, dan keputusan menunjukkan bahawa prestasi pengklasifikasi perasaan universal kita sangat berjanji dibandingkan dengan pengklasifikasi bahasa salib berbeza dalam bahasa sasaran berbilang.', 'mn': 'Ингээд байгаа сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалцагчид ихэвчлэн ганц хэл дээр ажилладаг, өөр өөр хэл дээр ашигладаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон төрлийн хэлний нэг ангилалын загвартай универсал мэдрэмжүүдийг бүтээхийг зориулсан. Энэ зорилго хүртэхийн тулд бид олон хэлний мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй үг суралцах нь зөвхөн Англи хэлний, хэдэн хэлний хоорондох параллел өгөгдлийн шалгалтын үндсэн үг юм. Англи болон бусад хэл хоорондох параллел өгөгдлийн хувьд байх шаардлагагүй. Учир нь мэдрэмжтэй мэдээллийг pivot хэл дээр ямар ч хэл рүү шилжүүлж чадна. Бид өөрсдийн ертөнцөд мэдрэмжүүдийг таван хэл дээр дүгнэх үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүний үр дүнг Англи болон зорилготой хэл хоорондын параллел өгөгдлийг ашиглахгүй ч гэсэн маш их амлалтай. Үүнээс гадна ертөнцөд нэг хэлбэртэй нэг хэлбэртэй харьцуулсан хэдэн хэлний мэдрэмжүүд нь эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой хэлний хоорондын шууд параллел өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг хадгалдаг. Үүний үр дүнд бидний ертөнцөд мэдрэмжүүдийн дасгал нь олон зорилготой хэлний хэл', 'no': 'Dei eksisterande sentimentklassifikatorane arbeider vanlegvis for berre ein spesifikke språk, og ulike klassifikasjonsmodular vert brukte i ulike språk. I denne papiret må vi bygge ein universell sentimentklassifiserer med ein enkel klassifikasjonsmodul i fleire forskjellige språk. For å oppnå dette målet, foreslår vi å lære fleirspråk sentiment ære ordinnbygging samtidig basert berre på merkelige område på engelsk og ikkje merkelige parallelle data tilgjengelege i nokre språkopar. Det er ikkje nødvendig at parallelle data eksisterer mellom engelsk og andre språk, fordi sentimentinformasjonen kan overførast til kvar språk via pivotspråk. Vi presenterer evalueringsresultatet av vår universell sentimentklassifisering i fem språk, og resultatet blir veldig fortalt sjølv når det parallelle data mellom engelsk og målspråket ikkje vert brukt. I tillegg er den universelle enkelte klassifiseringen samanlikna med nokre krysspråk sentimentklassifiseringar som lever på direkte parallelle data mellom kjeldespråka og målspråka, og resultatet viser at utviklinga av vår universelle sentimentklassifisering er svært viktig samanlikna med det av ulike krysspråk klassifiseringar i fleire målspråk.', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikaturi tas-sentimenti eżistenti normalment jaħdmu għal lingwa speċifika waħda biss, u mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni differenti jintużaw f’lingwi differenti. F’dan id-dokument għandna l-għan li nibnu klassifikatur tas-sentimenti universali b’mudell uniku ta’ klassifikazzjoni f’diversi lingwi differenti. Sabiex jintlaħaq dan l-għan, qed nipproponu li jitgħallmu inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem multilingwi li jkunu konxji mis-sentimenti fl-istess ħin ibbażati biss fuq ir-reviżjonijiet ittikkettati bl-Ingliż u dejta parallel a mhux ittikkettata disponibbli fi ftit pari lingwistiċi. Mhuwiex meħtieġ li d-dejta parallela teżisti bejn l-Ingliż u kwalunkwe lingwa oħra, minħabba li l-informazzjoni tas-sentiment tista’ tiġi trasferita fi kwalunkwe lingwa permezz ta’ lingwi pivoti. Aħna nippreżentaw ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni tal-klassifikatur tas-sentimenti universali tagħna f’ħames lingwi, u r-riżultati huma promettenti ħafna anki meta ma tintużax id-dejta parallela bejn l-Ingliż u l-lingwi fil-mira. Barra minn hekk, il-klassifikatur uniku universali jitqabbel ma’ ftit klassifikaturi tas-sentimenti translingwi li jiddependu fuq dejta parallel a diretta bejn is-sors u l-lingwi fil-mira, u r-riżultati juru li l-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikatur tas-sentimenti universali tagħna hija promettenti ħafna meta mqabbla ma’ dik tal-klassifikaturi translingwi differenti f’diversi lingwi fil-mira.', 'pl': 'Istniejące klasyfikatory sentymentów zwykle działają tylko dla jednego konkretnego języka, a różne modele klasyfikacji są używane w różnych językach. W artykule chcemy zbudować uniwersalny klasyfikator sentymentów z jednym modelem klasyfikacji w wielu różnych językach. Aby osiągnąć ten cel, proponujemy jednocześnie nauczyć się wielojęzycznych osadzeń słów świadomych sentymentów opartych tylko na etykietowanych recenzjach w języku angielskim i nieoznakowanych danych równoległych dostępnych w kilku parach językowych. Nie jest wymagane, aby dane równoległe istniały między językiem angielskim a innym, ponieważ informacje sentymentów mogą być przenoszone do dowolnego języka za pośrednictwem języków pivot. Wyniki oceny naszego uniwersalnego klasyfikatora sentymentów prezentujemy w pięciu językach, a wyniki są bardzo obiecujące nawet wtedy, gdy nie są używane równoległe dane między językiem angielskim a językami docelowymi. Ponadto uniwersalny pojedynczy klasyfikator jest porównywany z kilkoma wielojęzycznymi klasyfikatorami sentymentów opierającymi się na bezpośrednich równoległych danych między językiem źródłowym i docelowym, a wyniki pokazują, że wydajność naszego uniwersalnego klasyfikatora sentymentów jest bardzo obiecująca w porównaniu z wynikami różnych klasyfikatorów wielojęzycznych w wielu językach docelowych.', 'ro': 'Clasificatorii existenți de sentimente funcționează de obicei pentru o singură limbă specifică, iar diferite modele de clasificare sunt utilizate în diferite limbi. În această lucrare ne propunem să construim un clasificator universal de sentimente cu un singur model de clasificare în mai multe limbi diferite. Pentru a atinge acest obiectiv, propunem să învățăm simultan încorporările multilingve conștiente de sentimente bazate pe recenziile etichetate în limba engleză și datele paralele fără etichetare disponibile în câteva perechi de limbi. Nu este necesar ca datele paralele să existe între limba engleză și orice altă limbă, deoarece informațiile sentimentului pot fi transferate în orice limbă prin intermediul limbilor pivot. Prezentăm rezultatele evaluării clasificatorului nostru universal de sentimente în cinci limbi, iar rezultatele sunt foarte promițătoare chiar și atunci când datele paralele dintre limba engleză și limbile țintă nu sunt utilizate. În plus, clasificatorul universal unic este comparat cu câțiva clasificatori de sentimente translingvistice bazându-se pe date paralele directe între limbile sursă și limbile țintă, iar rezultatele arată că performanța clasificatorului nostru universal de sentimente este foarte promițătoare în comparație cu cea a diferitelor clasificatori translingvistici în mai multe limbi țintă.', 'sr': 'Postojeći klasifikatori sentimenta obično rade samo za jedan poseban jezik, a različiti klasifikacijski modeli se koriste na različitim jezicima. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da izgradimo univerzalni klasifikator sentiment a sa jednom modelom klasifikacije na više različitih jezika. Da bismo postigli ovaj cilj, predlažemo naučiti višejezičke sentimentalne reči koje se uključuju istovremeno na temelju etiketiranih pregleda na engleskom i neopisivanih paralelnih podataka dostupnih u nekoliko jezičkih parova. Nije potrebno da paralelni podaci postoje između engleskog i bilo kog drugog jezika, jer informacije o sentimentu mogu da se prebace na bilo koji jezik putem jezika pivota. Predstavljamo rezultate procjene našeg univerzalnog klasifikatora sentimenta na pet jezika, a rezultati su veoma obećavajući čak i kada se ne koriste paralelni podaci između engleskog i ciljnog jezika. Osim toga, univerzalni jedinstveni klasifikator se uspoređuje sa nekoliko klasifikatora sentiment a koji se oslanjaju na direktne paralelne podatke između izvora i ciljnih jezika, i rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovitost našeg univerzalnog klasifikatora sentimenta veoma obećavajuće u usporedbi s onim različitim klasifikatorima kroz jezik na višestrukim ciljnim jezici', 'si': 'විශේෂ භාෂාවක් විතරයි, වගේම වෙනස් භාෂාවක් වල භාෂාවක් විතරයි. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අල්ලගන්නවා වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වලින් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සමග සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ ක මේ අරමුණ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් දැනගැනීම් වචන සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් ලේබල් පරීක්ෂණය ස ඒක අවශ්\u200dය නෑ ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය සහ අනිත් භාෂාවක් අතර සමාන්\u200dය දත්ත තියෙන්න, මොකද දැනුම් තොරතුරු පිවෝට් භාෂා අපි භාෂාවල් පහයින් අපේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරපු ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය ඉතින්, සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික විශ්වාස කරුණාකරණය විශේෂ භාෂාවක් කිහිපයක් සමඟ විශේෂ කරුණාකරණය වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂ කරුණාකරණය සමඟ ප', 'so': 'Sida caadiga ah fasalayaasha xisaabta ah waxay u shaqeeyaan luuqad gaar ah oo kaliya, noocyo kala duduwanna waxaa lagu isticmaalaa luuqado kala duduwan. Kanu warqaddan waxaan ku talo galaynaa inaan dhisno fasax jaamacad ah oo ku qoran qaabab kaliya oo luuqado kala duduwan. Si aan u gaadhno goalkan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan barno hadal aad u yaqaan oo luuqadaha kala duduwan oo ku qoran isla markaasna lagu saleyn karo baaritaanka afka Ingiriiska iyo macluumaadka lambarka ah oo aan la mid ahayn oo laga helo laba labo oo luuqad ah. Laguma baahna in macluumaadka lambarka ah ay ku jiraan afka ingiriiska iyo luuqad kale, sababtoo ah macluumaadka maandooriyaha waxaa lagu beddeli karaa luqad kasta oo ku qoran luqada pivot. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa resultinta qiimeynta fikirkayada caalamiga ah oo ku qoran shan luqadood, resultigooduna waa ballan badan yihiin xataa marka aan lagu isticmaalin macluumaadka isbarka ah ee afka Ingiriiska iyo luqada la jeedo. Intaas waxaa kaloo la barbaranayaa fasaxa caalamiga ah qaar ka mid ah fasaxa fikrada luuqadaha kala duduwan, waxayna ku tiirsanayaan macluumaadka tooska ah oo lambarka ah oo ku dhexeeya luuqadaha noocyada iyo waxyaabaha la jeedo, resultiyadana waxay muuqataa in fasaxa kaleemeyska fikirkeena caalamiga ah aad looga dhigo kuwa kala duwan fasaxa luuqadaha kala duduwan oo luqadaha la jeedo.', 'ta': 'இருக்கும் உணர்வு வகுப்பாளர்கள் வழக்கமாக ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிக்கு மட்டுமே வேலை செய்கிறார் இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான உணர்வு வகுப்பாளரை உருவாக்க வேண்டும் பல மொழிகளில் ஒரு வகுப்பு மாதிரி இந்த இலக்கை அடைய வேண்டுமானால், நாம் பல மொழி உணர்வு புரிந்து கொள்ளும் வார்த்தைகளை ஒரே நேரத்தில் கற்றுக்கொள்வதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் ஆங்கிலத்தில @ info We present the evaluation results of our universal sentiment classifier in five languages, and the results are very promising even when the parallel data between English and the target languages are not used.  மேலும், பொதுவான ஒற்றை வகுப்பாளர் மூலத்திற்கும் இலக்கு மொழிகளுக்கும் இடையே நம்பிக்கை கொண்ட சில மொழி வகுப்பாளர்களுடன் ஒப்பிடுவது சில மொழி வகுப்பாளர்களுடன் ஒப்பிடுவதாகும், முடிவுகள', 'sv': 'Befintliga sentimentklassificerare arbetar vanligtvis bara för ett specifikt språk, och olika klassificeringsmodeller används på olika språk. I denna uppsats syftar vi till att bygga en universell sentimentklassificerare med en enda klassificeringsmodell på flera olika språk. För att uppnå detta mål föreslår vi att lära sig flerspråkiga sentimentmedvetna ordinbäddningar samtidigt baserat endast på märkta recensioner på engelska och omärkta parallella data tillgängliga i ett fåtal språkpar. Det krävs inte att parallelldata finns mellan engelska och något annat språk, eftersom sentimentinformationen kan överföras till vilket språk som helst via pivotspråk. Vi presenterar utvärderingsresultaten från vår universella sentimentklassificerare på fem språk, och resultaten är mycket lovande även när parallella data mellan engelska och målspråken inte används. Dessutom jämförs den universella enskilda klassificeraren med ett fåtal flerspråkiga klassificerare som förlitar sig på direkta parallella data mellan käll- och målspråk, och resultaten visar att vår universella klassificerare av sentiment är mycket lovande jämfört med resultaten hos olika tvärspråkiga klassificerare på flera målspråk.', 'ur': 'Existing sentiment classifiers usually work for only one specific language, and different classification models are used in different languages. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک یونلوسٹ احساسات کا کلیسٹر بنانا چاہتے ہیں ایک کلیسٹ موڈل کے ساتھ مختلف زبانوں میں۔ یہ مقصد تک پہنچانے کے لئے، ہم نے بہت سی زبان کی احساسات جاننے والی لغات کی تعلیم کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ صرف انگلیسی اور بہت سی زبان جوڑوں میں موجود ہونے والی لیبل ریونڈ پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ انگلیسی اور کسی دوسری زبان کے درمیان parallel data موجود نہیں ہے، کیونکہ احساس معلومات pivot زبانوں کے ذریعہ کسی زبان میں انتقال کر دی جاتی ہے. ہم پانچ زبانوں میں ہمارے اعلیٰ احساسات کا ارزش نتیجے پیش کرتے ہیں، اور نتیجے بہت وعدہ دیتے ہیں، اگرچہ انگلیسی اور موجود زبانوں کے درمیان موجود داٹا استعمال نہیں ہوتا۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، واحد واحد کلاسیٹر ایک کلاسیٹر کے مقابلہ میں ایک چند کلاسیٹ کلاسیٹر کے ساتھ مقابلہ کی جاتی ہے جو سورس اور موجود زبانوں کے درمیان سیدھی مشابل ڈاٹے پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں، اور نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے واحد احساس کلاسیٹر کی عملکرد بہت وعدہ دینے', 'uz': "Mavjud sentiment turlari odatda faqat bir foydalanuvchi tillar uchun ishlayapti, va har xil darajalashtirish modellari boshqa tillarda ishlatiladi. Bu hujjatda biz bir necha xil tillarda bir xil darajalashtirish modeli bilan bir umumiy hissiyot darajasini yaratishga harakat qilamiz. Bu maqsadni amalga oshirish uchun biz bir necha tillar foydalanuvchi so'zlarni o'rganishni davomida shunday paytda faqat ingliz tilida taʼminlovchi narsalar va bir necha tillar qo'linda mavjud bo'lgan parametrlar asosida o'rganishni talab qilamiz. It is not required that the parallel data exist between English and any other language, because the sentiment information can be transferred into any language via pivot languages.  Biz besh tillarda umumiy hissiyotning natijalarimizni qiymatlashimiz hozir qilamiz, va natijalar ingliz tilida va qanchalik tilning o'rtasida bir xil maʼlumot ishlatilmaydi. Ko'rasiz, umumiy bir klassifi bir necha xil tilning bir necha xil foydalanuvchiga bog'liqlar bilan bir necha xil xil sinfning bir necha darajalariga ishlatiladi, va natijalari ko'proq qanday foydalanuvchimizning umumiy hissiyotlarimizning fasifiyati bir necha xil tildagi bir xil tildagi bir xil darajadagi bir xil darajalar bilan ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Những người phân loại cảm xúc tồn tại thường chỉ làm việc cho một ngôn ngữ cụ thể, và các mô hình phân loại khác nhau được sử dụng ở các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi muốn tạo ra một người phân loại cảm xúc phổ biến có một mô hình phân loại duy nhất bằng nhiều ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để đạt được mục tiêu này, chúng tôi đề nghị học sự nhúng vào từ ngữ đa dạng chỉ cùng lúc dựa trên các bản đánh giá bằng tiếng Anh và các dữ liệu song song song song đã không được dán trên vài cặp ngôn ngữ. Không cần thiết phải có dữ liệu song song giữa tiếng Anh và bất kỳ ngôn ngữ nào khác, vì thông tin tình cảm có thể truyền sang bất kỳ ngôn ngữ nào qua các ngôn ngữ pivot. Chúng tôi đưa ra kết quả đánh giá của người phân loại cảm xúc phổ biến của chúng tôi bằng năm ngôn ngữ, và kết quả rất có triển vọng kể cả khi không sử dụng dữ liệu song song giữa tiếng Anh và ngôn ngữ đích. Hơn nữa, người phân loại đơn phổ biến được so sánh với vài người phân loại cảm xúc ngôn ngữ khác nhau dựa trên dữ liệu song trực tiếp giữa nguồn và ngôn ngữ đích, và kết quả cho thấy hiệu quả của người phân loại cảm xúc phổ biến của chúng ta rất có triển vọng so với hiệu ứng của các phân loại ngôn ngữ khác nhau tại nhiều ngôn ngữ đích.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите класификатори на сентименти обикновено работят само за един конкретен език, а различни модели на класификация се използват на различни езици. В настоящата статия се стремим да изградим универсален класификатор на сентименти с един модел на класификация на няколко различни езика. За да постигнем тази цел, предлагаме да научим едновременно многоезични вграждания на думи, осъзнаващи сантименталностите, базирани само на етикетирани отзиви на английски и неетикетирани паралелни данни, налични в няколко езикови двойки. Не се изисква паралелните данни да съществуват между английски и който и да е друг език, тъй като информацията за чувствата може да бъде прехвърлена на всеки език чрез пивот езици. Представяме резултатите от оценката на нашия универсален класификатор на сентименти на пет езика, като резултатите са много обещаващи дори когато паралелните данни между английски и целевите езици не се използват. Освен това универсалният единичен класификатор се сравнява с няколко междуезични класификатори на сентименти, разчитащи на директни паралелни данни между изходния и целевия език, а резултатите показват, че ефективността на нашия универсален класификатор на сентименти е много обещаваща в сравнение с това на различните междуезични класификатори на множество целеви езици.', 'hr': 'Postojeći klasifikatori osjećaja obično rade samo za jedan određeni jezik, a različiti klasifikacijski modeli se koriste na različitim jezicima. U ovom papiru imamo cilj izgraditi univerzalni klasifikator osjećanja sa jednom modelom klasifikacije na višestrukim različitim jezicima. Da bismo postigli ovaj cilj, predlažemo naučiti višejezičke osjećajne riječi uključene istovremeno na temelju etiketiranih pregleda na engleskom i neoznačenih paralelnih podataka dostupnih u nekoliko jezičkih parova. Nije potrebno da paralelni podaci postoje između engleskog i bilo kojeg drugog jezika, jer informacije o osjećajima mogu biti prenesene na bilo koji jezik putem pivotskih jezika. Predstavljamo rezultate procjene našeg univerzalnog klasifikatora osjećanja na pet jezika, a rezultati su veoma obećavajući čak i kada se ne koriste paralelni podaci između engleskog i ciljnog jezika. Osim toga, univerzalni jedinstveni klasifikator se uspoređuje s nekoliko klasifikatora prijevoza koji se oslanjaju na direktne paralelne podatke između izvora i ciljnih jezika, i rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovitost našeg univerzalnog klasifikatora osjećanja vrlo obećavajuće u usporedbi s različitim klasifikatorima prijevoznih jezika na višestrukim ciljnim jez', 'da': 'Eksisterende sentimentklassificerere arbejder normalt kun for ét bestemt sprog, og forskellige klassifikationsmodeller bruges på forskellige sprog. I denne artikel har vi til formål at opbygge en universel sentiment klassificering med en enkelt klassifikationsmodel på flere forskellige sprog. For at nå dette mål foreslår vi at lære flersprogede følelsesbevidste ordindlejringer samtidig baseret kun på de mærkede anmeldelser på engelsk og ikke-mærkede parallelle data tilgængelige på et par sprogpar. Det er ikke nødvendigt, at der eksisterer parallelle data mellem engelsk og andre sprog, fordi sentiment information kan overføres til ethvert sprog via pivot sprog. Vi præsenterer evalueringsresultaterne af vores universelle sentiment klassificerer på fem sprog, og resultaterne er meget lovende, selv når de parallelle data mellem engelsk og målsprog ikke anvendes. Endvidere sammenlignes den universelle enkeltklassifikation med nogle få tværsprogsklassifikationer, der er afhængige af direkte parallelle data mellem kilde- og målsprog, og resultaterne viser, at vores universelle sentimentklassifikations ydeevne er meget lovende sammenlignet med resultaterne hos forskellige tværsprogsklassifikationer på flere målsprog.', 'nl': 'Bestaande sentimentclassificatoren werken meestal voor slechts één specifieke taal en verschillende classificatiemodellen worden gebruikt in verschillende talen. In dit artikel willen we een universele sentimentclassificator bouwen met één classificatiemodel in meerdere talen. Om dit doel te bereiken, stellen we voor om meertalige sentimentbewuste woordinsluitingen gelijktijdig te leren op basis van de gelabelde beoordelingen in het Engels en niet-gelabelde parallelle gegevens beschikbaar in een paar taalparen. Het is niet nodig dat de parallelle gegevens bestaan tussen het Engels en een andere taal, omdat de sentiment informatie kan worden overgedragen in elke taal via pivot talen. We presenteren de evaluatieresultaten van onze universele sentimentclassificator in vijf talen, en de resultaten zijn zeer veelbelovend, zelfs als de parallelle gegevens tussen het Engels en de doeltalen niet worden gebruikt. Verder wordt de universele enkelvoudige classificator vergeleken met enkele taaloverschrijdende sentimentclassificatoren die gebaseerd zijn op directe parallelle gegevens tussen de bron- en doeltaal, en de resultaten tonen aan dat de prestaties van onze universele sentimentclassificator zeer veelbelovend zijn in vergelijking met die van verschillende taaloverschrijdende classificatoren in meerdere doeltalen.', 'de': 'Bestehende Stimmungsklassifikatoren funktionieren normalerweise nur für eine bestimmte Sprache, und verschiedene Klassifizierungsmodelle werden in verschiedenen Sprachen verwendet. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir einen universellen Stimmungs-Klassifikator mit einem einzigen Klassifizierungsmodell in mehreren Sprachen aufbauen. Um dieses Ziel zu erreichen, schlagen wir vor, mehrsprachige sentimentbewusste Worteinbettungen simultan zu erlernen, die nur auf den beschrifteten Bewertungen in Englisch und nicht beschrifteten parallelen Daten basieren, die in einigen Sprachpaaren verfügbar sind. Es ist nicht erforderlich, dass die parallelen Daten zwischen Englisch und einer anderen Sprache existieren, da die Stimmungsinformationen über Pivot-Sprachen in jede beliebige Sprache übertragen werden können. Wir präsentieren die Auswertungsergebnisse unseres universellen Stimmungsklassifikators in fünf Sprachen, und die Ergebnisse sind sehr vielversprechend, auch wenn die parallelen Daten zwischen Englisch und den Zielsprachen nicht verwendet werden. Darüber hinaus wird der universelle Einzelklassifikator mit einigen wenigen sprachübergreifenden Sentiment-Klassifikatoren verglichen, die auf direkten parallelen Daten zwischen Quell- und Zielsprache beruhen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Leistung unseres universellen Sentiment-Klassifikators im Vergleich zu verschiedenen sprachübergreifenden Klassifikatoren in mehreren Zielsprachen sehr vielversprechend ist.', 'ko': '기존의 감정 분류기는 일반적으로 특정한 언어에만 적용되고 서로 다른 언어는 서로 다른 분류 모델을 사용한다.본고에서 우리의 목표는 통용되는 감정 분류기를 구축하고 다양한 언어에서 단일한 분류 모델을 사용하는 것이다.이 목표를 실현하기 위해 우리는 영어에 표시된 평론과 소수의 언어가 사용할 수 있는 평행 데이터만 바탕으로 다중 언어의 감정 감지 단어를 학습하는 것을 권장한다.영어와 그 어떠한 다른 언어 사이에도 평행 데이터가 필요하지 않다. 왜냐하면 감정 정보는 pivot 언어를 통해 모든 언어로 전송될 수 있기 때문이다.우리는 다섯 가지 언어로 통용되는 감정분류기의 평가 결과를 제시했는데 영어와 목표 언어 간의 병행 데이터를 사용하지 않아도 결과는 매우 희망적이다.그 밖에 유니버설 단일 분류기와 몇 가지 원시 언어와 목표 언어 간의 직접적인 병행 데이터를 바탕으로 하는 다중 언어 감정 분류기를 비교한 결과 다중 목표 언어 중의 서로 다른 다중 언어 분류기에 비해 우리의 유니버설 감정 분류기의 성능은 비현실적이다.', 'id': 'Existing sentiment classifiers usually work for only one specific language, and different classification models are used in different languages.  Dalam kertas ini kami bermaksud untuk membangun klasifikasi sentimen universal dengan model klasifikasi tunggal dalam berbagai bahasa yang berbeda. Untuk mencapai tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk belajar pembangunan kata-kata berbagai bahasa yang sadar sentimen secara bersamaan berdasarkan hanya resensi yang ditabel dalam bahasa Inggris dan data paralel yang tidak ditabel yang tersedia dalam beberapa pasangan bahasa. Tidak diperlukan bahwa data paralel ada antara bahasa Inggris dan bahasa lainnya, karena informasi sentimen dapat dipindahkan ke bahasa apapun melalui bahasa pivot. Kami mempersembahkan hasil evaluasi dari klasifikasi sensasi universal kami dalam lima bahasa, dan hasil sangat berjanji bahkan ketika data paralel antara bahasa Inggris dan bahasa sasaran tidak digunakan. Furthermore, the universal single classifier is compared with a few cross-language sentiment classifiers relying on direct parallel data between the source and target languages, and the results show that the performance of our universal sentiment classifier is very promising compared to that of different cross-language classifiers in multiple target languages.', 'fa': 'محرمانان احساسات موجود معمولا برای یک زبان خاص کار می\u200cکنند و مدل\u200cهای مختلف محرمانه در زبانهای مختلف استفاده می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ ما هدف داریم که یک محرمانه\u200cی احساسات جهانی با یک مدل محرمانه\u200cای در زبانهای متفاوتی بسازیم. برای رسیدن به این هدف، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که کلمه\u200cهای متوجه شدن احساسات به زبان\u200cهای زیادی یاد بگیریم که همزمان بر روی بررسی\u200cهای etiket\u200cشده در انگلیسی و داده\u200cهای متحده\u200cای که در چند جفت زبان دسترسی ندارند. لازم نیست که داده\u200cهای متفاوتی بین انگلیسی و هر زبان دیگری وجود دارند، زیرا اطلاعات احساسات می\u200cتوانند به هر زبانی از طریق زبان pivot انتقال شوند. ما نتایج ارزیابی احساسات جهانی ما را به پنج زبان نشان می دهیم، و نتایج خیلی قول می دهند حتی وقتی داده های متفاوتی بین انگلیسی و زبانهای هدف استفاده نمی شود. و نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که عملکرد مجموعه\u200cکننده\u200cی احساسات جهانی ما بسیار وعده\u200cدهنده در مقایسه با مجموعه\u200cکننده\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی در زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی است.', 'sw': 'Wagaji wa hisia wanaoendelea kawaida hufanya kazi kwa lugha moja tu, na mitindo tofauti ya kutafsiri hutumiwa katika lugha tofauti. Katika karatasi hii tunalenga kutengeneza hisia za kimataifa yenye modeli ya kutangaza moja kwa lugha mbalimbali. Ili kupata lengo hili, tunapendekeza kujifunza maneno yanayofahamika kwa lugha mbalimbali yanayoingia kwa wakati mmoja tu kwa kutumia mtazamo uliopangwa kwa lugha ya Kiingereza na takwimu isiyofanana zinazopatikana kwa namna chache za lugha. Haihitaji kuwa taarifa zinazofanana zinapo kati ya lugha yoyote ya Kiingereza na lugha nyingine, kwa sababu taarifa za hisia zinaweza kuhamishwa kuwa lugha yoyote kupitia lugha za pivo. Tunaonyesha matokeo ya utafiti wa hisia zetu ulimwengu kwa lugha tano, na matokeo yanakuwa na matumaini mengi hata kama taarifa za usambazaji kati ya Kiingereza na lugha zinazolenga hazitumiki. Zaidi ya hayo, mwandishi mmoja ulimwengu unalinganishwa na wataalamu wachache wa hisia za lugha zinazotegemea takwimu za moja kwa moja kati ya vyanzo na lugha zinazolenga, na matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa utendaji wa mwandishi wetu wa hisia za ulimwengu ni wa ahadi sana ukilinganishwa na yale ya wataalamu tofauti wa lugha za cross-language katika lugha mbalimbali za lengo.', 'sq': 'Klasifikuesit ekzistues të ndjenjave zakonisht punojnë për vetëm një gjuhë specifike dhe modele të ndryshme klasifikimi përdoren në gjuhë të ndryshme. Në këtë letër ne synojmë të ndërtojmë një klasifikues universal të ndjenjave me një model të vetëm klasifikimi në gjuhë të ndryshme të shumta. Me qëllim që të arrijmë këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë të mësojmë ndërtesa fjalësh shumëgjuhëse të ndërgjegjshme me ndjenja në të njëjtën kohë bazuar vetëm në përmbledhjet e etiketuara në anglisht dhe të dhënat paralele pa etiketë në dispozicion në disa çifte gjuhësh. Nuk kërkohet që të dhënat paralele të ekzistojnë midis anglisht dhe çdo gjuhë tjetër, sepse informacioni i ndjenjave mund të transferohet në çdo gjuhë nëpërmjet gjuhëve pivot. Ne paraqesim rezultatet e vlerësimit të klasifikuesit tonë universal të ndjenjave në pesë gjuhë dhe rezultatet janë shumë premtuese edhe kur të dhënat paralele midis anglisht dhe gjuhëve objektive nuk përdoren. Përveç kësaj, klasifikuesi i vetëm universal krahasohet me disa klasifikuesit e ndjenjave ndërgjuhësore që mbështeten në të dhëna paralele të drejtpërdrejta midis burimit dhe gjuhëve objektive dhe rezultatet tregojnë se performanca e klasifikuesit tonë universal të ndjenjave është shumë premtuese krahasuar me atë e klasifikuesve të ndryshëm ndërgjuhësore në gjuhë objektive të shumta.', 'af': "Bestaande sentiment klassifiseerders werk gewoonlik vir slegs een spesifieke taal, en verskillende klassifiseringmodele word gebruik in verskillende tale. In hierdie papier doen ons doel om 'n universele sentiment klassifiseerder te bou met 'n enkele klassifikasie model in veelvuldige verskillende tale. Om hierdie doel te bereik, stel ons voorstel om multilinglike sentiment-bevestig woord inbêring te leer simultaan net op die etiketeerde hersiening in Engels en ongeabelde parallele data beskikbaar in 'n paar taal paar. Dit is nie benodig dat die parallele data bestaan tussen Engels en enige ander taal, omdat die sentiment inligting in enige taal deur pivottaal oordra kan word nie. Ons stel die evalueringsresultate van ons universele sentiment klassifiseerder in vyf tale, en die resultate is baie beloftende selfs wanneer die parallele data tussen Engels en die doel tale nie gebruik word nie. Verder is die universele enkele klassifiseerder vergelyk met 'n paar kruistaal sentimente klassifiseerders wat op direk parallele data tussen die bron en doel tale vertoon, en die resultate wys dat die prestasie van ons universele sentiment klassifiseerder baie beloftelik is vergelyk met die verskillende kruistaal klassifiseerders in veelvuldige doel tale.", 'tr': 'Öň bar duýgular klasifikalary adatça diňe bir takyk dil üçin işleýär, we dürli klasifikasyon nusgalary dürli dillerde ullanylar. Bu kagyzda biz uniwersal duýgym klasifikatçysyny birnäçe dürli dillerde bir klasifikatçy bilen gurmagy amaçlandyrys. Bu maksady başarmak üçin, birnäçe dil duýgulary bilen bilinç sözleri diňe iňlis dilinde etitlenmiş we birnäçe dil çiftlerde mejbur parallel maglumatlary öwrenmegi teklip edýäris. Iňlisçe we başga diller arasynda parallel maglumatlar bar däl, sebäbi duýgym maglumatlary pivot dilleri bilen her dile göçürilip biler. Biz umumiy duýgularymyzyň klasifikatçymyzyň netijesini beş dilde çykýarys we netijesi iňlisçe we maksat dilleriň arasynda parallel maglumatlaryň ullanyşynda hem örän söz berýäris. Munuň üçin, uniwersal ýeke klassifikatçi birnäçe çarpaz dil klassifikatçi bilen, çeşme we maksadat dilleriň arasynda dury parallel maglumatlar bilen baglaşýar, we netijelerimiz uniwersal duýgymlyk klassifikatçimiziň tanyşygynyň birnäçe maksadat dilinde tapawutlyk bilen örän söz berýän', 'am': 'የአገኘው ስሜት መፍለጫዎች በተለየ አንዲት ቋንቋ ብቻ ይሠራሉ፥ የተለያየ ክፍል ዓይነቶች በልዩ ቋንቋዎች ይጠቀማሉ። በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ በብዙ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች የተለያየውን የዓለምነዊ ስሜት መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማድረግ፣ በጥቂት ቋንቋዎች ሁለት ዓይነቶች ውስጥ የተገኘውን የቋንቋ አስተዋይ ቃላትን እና በንግግሊዝኛ የጽሑፍ መልዕክት ብቻ በተመሳሳይ እና በተለያዩ የፍላጎት ዳታዎችን ለመማር እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ በንግልዝኛ እና በሌላ ቋንቋ መካከል ተያያይነት ዳታ እንዲኖር አያስፈልግም፤ ምክንያቱም የስሜት መረጃ በመስመር በቋንቋ ቋንቋ ላይ በመለስ ይችላል። በአምስት ቋንቋዎች የተለያየን የአስተባቢነት ስሜት ፍጥረቶችን እናደርጋለን፤ ፍሬዎቹም በንግግሊዝና በተቃውሞ ቋንቋዎች መካከል የሚተያያየው ዳታ እንኳ ቢሆን እንኳ በጣም ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር ዓለምአቀፍ አንዲት ክፍላፊ ከልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ቀጥተኛ ተያያያይነት ዳታ በሚታመኑት ከአንዳንዶቹ ጋር ይተያያያል፤ ፍሬዎቹም የዓለምአቀፍ ስሜት ክፍላፊያችን በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ይታያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող զգացմունքների դասակարգիչները սովորաբար աշխատում են միայն մեկ կոնկրետ լեզվի համար, և տարբեր դասակարգի մոդելները օգտագործվում են տարբեր լեզուներում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք կառուցել համաշխարհային զգացմունքների դասակարգում մեկ դասակարգության մոդելի հետ բազմաթիվ տարբեր լեզուներում: Այս նպատակի հասնելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք սովորել բազմալեզու զգացմունքներով գիտակցած բառեր միաժամանակ, հիմնված միայն անգլերենով պիտակ վերլուծումների վրա և մի քանի լեզվով զուգահեռ հասանելի անպիտակ տվյալների վրա: Պարտադիր չէ, որ զուգահեռ տվյալները գոյություն ունենան անգլերենի և ցանկացած այլ լեզվի միջև, քանի որ զգացմունքային տեղեկատվությունը կարող է փոխանցվել ցանկացած լեզվի միջոցով: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր համընդհանուր զգացմունքների դասակարգչի արդյունքները հինգ լեզուներով, և արդյունքները շատ խոստացնող են նույնիսկ երբ անգլերենի և նպատակային լեզուների միջև զուգահեռ տվյալները չեն օգտագործվում: Ավելին, համընդհանուր մեկ դասակարգիչը համեմատում է մի քանի համընդհանուր լեզվի զգացմունքների դասակարգիչների հետ, որոնք հիմնված են ուղիղ զուգահեռ տվյալների միջև աղբյուրի և նպատակային լեզուների միջև, և արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր համընդհանուր զգացմունքների դասակարգիչների ար', 'bs': 'Postojeći klasifikatori sentimenta obično rade samo za jedan određeni jezik, a različiti klasifikacijski modeli se koriste na različitim jezicima. U ovom papiru ciljamo izgraditi univerzalni klasifikator sentiment a sa jednom modelom klasifikacije na višestrukim različitim jezicima. Da bismo postigli ovaj cilj, predlažemo naučiti multijezičke sentimentalne riječi koje se uključuju istovremeno na temelju etiketiranih pregleda na engleskom i neoznačenih paralelnih podataka dostupnih u nekoliko jezičkih parova. Nije potrebno da paralelni podaci postoje između engleskog i bilo kog drugog jezika, jer informacije o osjećanjima mogu biti prevedene na bilo koji jezik putem pivotskih jezika. Predstavljamo rezultate procjene našeg univerzalnog klasifikatora osjećanja na pet jezika, a rezultati su veoma obećavajući čak i kada se ne koriste paralelni podaci između engleskog i ciljnog jezika. Osim toga, univerzalni jedinstveni klasifikator se uspoređuje sa nekoliko klasifikatora prijelaznih sentiment a koji se oslanjaju na direktne paralelne podatke između izvora i ciljnih jezika, i rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovitost našeg univerzalnog klasifikatora osjećanja veoma obećavajuće u usporedbi s onim različitim klasifikatorima prijelaznih jezika na višestru', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান অনুভূতি ব্যবহারকারীরা সাধারণত একটি নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার জন্য কাজ করে এবং বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় ব এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি বিশ্বব্যাপী অনুভূতি বিভিন্ন ভাষায় এক শ্রেণীকরণ মডেল নির্মাণ করতে চাই। এই লক্ষ্য অর্জনের জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে আমরা মাল্টিভাষায় অনুভূতি-সচেতনতা শব্দ শিখতে পারি একই সাথে ইংরেজি ভাষায় লেবেল পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং কয়েকটি ভাষায় প্যারাল পিভোট ভাষার মাধ্যমে প্যারালেলেল ডাটা ইংরেজি এবং অন্যান্য ভাষার মধ্যে উপস্থিত, কারণ অনুভূতির তথ্য পিভোট ভাষায় পরিবর্তন কর আমরা পাঁচ ভাষায় আমাদের বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষকদের মূল্যের ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করি এবং ফলাফল খুব প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল, এমনকি যদি ইংরেজী ও লক্ এছাড়াও, বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের একক শ্রেণীবিদের তুলনা করা হচ্ছে কয়েকটি ক্রস-ভাষার বিভিন্ন অনুভূতির সাথে যারা সোর্স এবং লক্ষ্যের ভাষার মধ্যে সরাসরি তালিকার তথ্য নির্ভর করেছে এবং ফলাফল দেখাচ', 'az': 'Existing hisslər klasifikatçıları genellikle yalnız bir məxluqat dili üçün çalışır və farklı klasifikasiya modelləri müxtəlif dillərdə istifadə edilir. Bu kağızda, çoxlu fərqli dillərdə üniversal hisslər klasifikatçısı ilə tək klasifikasiya modeli in şa etmək istəyirik. Bu məqsədi başa çatmaq üçün, bir neçə dil çiftində faydalanmış paralel məlumatların məlumatlarına dayanan çoxlu dil duygularını öyrənməsini təklif edirik. İngilizə ilə başqa dillər arasında paralel məlumatlar olması lazımdır, çünki hiss məlumatları pivot dilləri vasitəsilə hər bir dilə göndərilə bilər. Biz üniversal hisslərimizin müəyyən edilənlərin sonuçlarını beş dildə göstəririk. Sonuçlar İngilizə və məqsəd dillərin arasındakı paralel verilər istifadə edilməsə də çox vəd verirlər. Daha sonra, universel təkrar klasifikatçı, mənbə və məqsəd dillərin arasındakı doğru paralel məlumatlarına güvən bir neçə dil hissləri ilə qarşılaşdırılır, və sonuçlar bizim universal hisslərin klasifikatçısı müxtəlif dil klasifikatçıları ilə müxtəlif dil klasifikatçıları ilə qarşılaşdırılır.', 'ca': "Existing sentiment classifiers usually work for only one specific language, and different classification models are used in different languages.  En aquest article volem construir un classificador universal de sentiments amb un únic model de classificació en múltiples llengües diferents. Per tal d'aconseguir aquest objectiu, proposem aprendre integracions de paraules multilingües conscients del sentiment simultàneament basades només en les revisions etiquetades en anglès i dades paralleles sense etiqueta disponibles en alguns parells de llenguatges. No es requereix que existin dades paralleles entre l'anglès i qualsevol altre llenguatge, perquè la informació de sentiment es pot transferir a qualsevol llenguatge a través de llenguatges pivots. Presentam els resultats d'evaluació del nostre classificador universal de sentiments en cinc llengües, i els resultats són molt prometedors fins i tot quan no s'utilitzen les dades paralleles entre l'anglès i les llengües alvo. A més, el classificador únic universal es compara amb alguns classificadors de sentiments translingüístics que confien en dades paralleles directes entre la font i les llengües alvo, i els resultats mostren que el rendiment del nostre classificador universal de sentiments és molt prometedor comparat amb el de diferents classificadors de sentiments translingüístics en múltiples llengües alvo.", 'cs': 'Stávající klasifikátory sentimentů obvykle fungují pouze pro jeden konkrétní jazyk a různé klasifikační modely se používají v různých jazycích. Cílem tohoto článku je vytvořit univerzální klasifikátor sentimentů s jedním klasifikačním modelem v několika různých jazycích. Abychom dosáhli tohoto cíle, navrhujeme naučit se vícejazyčné vkládání slov orientovaných na sentimenty současně založené pouze na označených recenzích v angličtině a neoznačených paralelních datech dostupných v několika jazykových párech. Není nutné, aby paralelní data existovala mezi angličtinou a jiným jazykem, protože sentimentní informace mohou být přenášeny do libovolného jazyka pomocí pivotových jazyků. Výsledky hodnocení našeho univerzálního klasifikátoru sentimentů prezentujeme v pěti jazycích a výsledky jsou velmi slibné i v případě, že nejsou použita paralelní data mezi angličtinou a cílovými jazyky. Dále je univerzální jednotlivý klasifikátor porovnáván s několika mezijazyčnými klasifikátory sentimentu spoléhajícími na přímá paralelní data mezi zdrojovým a cílovým jazykem a výsledky ukazují, že výkon našeho univerzálního klasifikátoru sentimentu je velmi slibný ve srovnání s výkonem různých klasifikátorů mezi jazyky ve více cílových jazycích.', 'fi': 'Nykyiset tunneluokitukset toimivat yleensä vain yhdellä tietyllä kielellä, ja eri kielillä käytetään erilaisia luokitusmalleja. Tässä työssä pyrimme rakentamaan universaalin tunteiden luokittelijan, jossa on yksi luokitusmalli useilla eri kielillä. Tämän tavoitteen saavuttamiseksi ehdotamme, että oppisimme samanaikaisesti monikielisiä tunteita tuntevia sanaupotuksia, jotka perustuvat vain englanninkielisiin merkkeihin ja muutamassa kieliparissa käytettävissä oleviin rinnakkaisiin tietoihin. Englannin ja minkään muun kielen välillä ei vaadita rinnakkaistietoja, koska tunnetiedot voidaan siirtää mille tahansa kielelle pivot-kielillä. Esitämme yleisen tunteiden luokittelijamme arviointitulokset viidellä kielellä, ja tulokset ovat hyvin lupaavia silloinkin, kun englannin ja kohdekielten välistä rinnakkaistietoa ei käytetä. Lisäksi yleismaailmallista yksittäistä luokittelijaa verrataan muutamiin monikielisiin tunteiden luokittelijoihin, jotka perustuvat suoraan rinnakkaistietoihin lähde- ja kohdekielten välillä, ja tulokset osoittavat, että yleismaailmallisen tunteiden luokittelijamme suorituskyky on erittäin lupaava verrattuna eri kielien luokittelijoihin useilla kohdekielillä.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad sentimentaalsed klassifitseerijad töötavad tavaliselt ainult ühe konkreetse keele jaoks ja erinevates keeltes kasutatakse erinevaid klassifitseerimismudeleid. Käesolevas töös on meie eesmärk ehitada universaalne sentimentaalne klassifitseerija, millel on üks klassifitseerimismudel mitmes erinevas keeles. Selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks teeme ettepaneku õppida samaaegselt mitmekeelseid sentimentaalseid sõnade manustamisi, mis põhinevad ainult inglise keeles märgistatud ülevaatetel ja mõnes keelepaaris saadaval olevatel märgistamata paralleelsetel andmetel. Paralleelsete andmete olemasolu inglise ja mõne muu keele vahel ei ole nõutav, sest sentimentaalset teavet saab edastada mis tahes keelde pivot keelte kaudu. Esitleme oma universaalse sentimentaalse klassifikaatori hindamise tulemusi viies keeles ning tulemused on väga paljulubavad isegi siis, kui inglise ja sihtkeele paralleelseid andmeid ei kasutata. Lisaks võrreldakse universaalset üksikklassifikaatorit mõne keeleülese sentimentaalse klassifikaatoriga, mis põhinevad otsestel paralleelsetel andmetel lähte- ja sihtkeelte vahel, ning tulemused näitavad, et meie universaalse sentimentaalse klassifikaatori jõudlus on väga paljutõotav võrreldes erinevate keeleüleste klassifikaatoritega mitmes sihtkeeles.', 'he': 'Existing sentiment classifiers usually work for only one specific language, and different classification models are used in different languages.  בעיתון הזה אנו מתכוונים לבנות מסווג רגשות אוניברסלי עם מודל מסווג אחד בשפות שונות רבות. כדי להשיג את המטרה הזאת, אנו מציעים ללמוד מילים רבות שפות מודעות לרגשות בהתבסס באותו זמן רק על הביקורות המתוויקות באנגלית ובמידע מקביל ללא סימנים זמין בכמה זוגות שפות. לא נדרש שהנתונים המקבילים קיימים בין אנגלית לכל שפה אחרת, כי מידע ההרגשה יכול להעביר לכל שפה דרך שפות פיווט. אנו מציגים את תוצאות הערכה של מסגרת הרגשות האוניברסלית שלנו בחמש שפות, והתוצאות מבטיחות מאוד אפילו כשנתונים מקבילים בין אנגלית לשפות המטרה לא משתמשים. חוץ מזה, המקלסס היחיד האוניברסלי שווה עם מספר מערכי רגשות בין שפות-שפת שמסומכים על נתונים מקבילים ישירים בין המקור לשפות המטרה, והתוצאות מראות שהביצוע של מערכת הרגשות האוניברסלית שלנו מבטיח מאוד בהשוואה לאותו של מערכי רגשות בין שפות-שפת שונות בשפות-מט', 'jv': 'email-custom-header-Security Nanging kuwi iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem universel Sensitif kanggo nguasar sistem sing nyebutakno karo tindang sing sampa. Ngawe nggunakake punika punika ingkang, kita supoyo nggawe layang-ingkang sampeyan luwih-ingkang ambang. Kowe kudu nggo yen perusahaan langkung sampeyan ingkang karo akeh luwih apik, mergane informasi kapan kelangan langkung Awak dhéwé éntukno karo pertualangan kanggo ngerasakno ning limi, lan dipoletan karo pertualangan kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe datayang dipolerané ning ingles karo cilik sing ora bisa ijolan. Label', 'sk': 'Obstoječi klasifikatorji sentimentalnih občutkov običajno delujejo samo za en določen jezik, različni modeli klasifikacije pa se uporabljajo v različnih jezikih. V prispevku želimo zgraditi univerzalni klasifikacijski klasifikacijski model z enim samim klasifikacijskim modelom v več različnih jezikih. Za dosego tega cilja predlagamo, da se učimo večjezičnih vključitev besed, ki se zavedajo sentimenta, hkrati na podlagi označenih pregledov v angleščini in vzporednih podatkov, ki so na voljo v nekaj jezikovnih parih. Ni potrebno, da obstajajo vzporedni podatki med angleščino in katerim koli drugim jezikom, saj se informacije o občutkih lahko prenesejo v kateri koli jezik prek pivot jezikov. Rezultate ocenjevanja univerzalnega klasifikatorja sentimenta predstavljamo v petih jezikih, rezultati pa so zelo obetavni tudi, če se ne uporabljajo vzporedni podatki med angleščino in ciljnimi jeziki. Poleg tega se univerzalni enojni klasifikator primerja z nekaj medjezikovnimi klasifikatorji sentimenta, ki temeljijo na neposrednih vzporednih podatkih med izvornim in ciljnim jezikom, rezultati pa kažejo, da je uspešnost našega univerzalnega klasifikatorja sentimenta zelo obetavna v primerjavi z uspešnostjo različnih medjezikovnih klasikatorjev v več ciljnih jezikih.', 'ha': "Ana amfani da wasu fasali na fitarwa, ɗammãnin sunã aiki zuwa harshe guda kawai, kuma ana yi amfani da misãlai masu darafõfi daban-daban. Daga wannan takardan, Munã nufin ka gina wani mai kalma na ɗabi'a da wani misãla mai daraja guda cikin wasu harshe daban-daban. To, dõmin ya isa ga wannan goa, Munã kwaɗayin mu karanta maganar hisãbi masu fahimta na mulki-lingui da ke haɗa a sami, a kan karatun matsayin takardar littafin Ingiriya da ba'a yi amfani da data masu daidaita cikin sauri kaɗan. Ba za'a ƙayyade data da ke daidaita tsakanin Ingiriya da wani harshe na daban, kwani za'a iya shige information ga hisãban zuwa wani harshe na pivot. Tuna halatar da fassaran mai fassarar hisãbai da ke cikin harshen 5, kuma matsala za'a yi wa'adi mai girma kõ da za'a yi amfani da data masu daidaita tsakanin Ingiriya da lugha masu amfani da. Furan haka, a samfani ga mai ɗabi'a da masu sauri masu sami ga ma'anar sauri-lugha masu tsakanin shiryuwa da data masu daidaita tsakanin maɓallin maganar da ake amfani da shi, kuma matsalan na nuna cewa aikin kallumori na ɗabi'ar da za'a yi wa muhimmi da sami da kuma misalin wasu fasalararai na fassarar-harshe-na-nau'in mulki masu yiwuni.", 'bo': 'གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དབྱེ་བ་དག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐད་རིགས་ཁོ་ན་གཅིག་ལས་ཀྱང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག To achieve this goal, we propose to learn multilingual sentiment-aware word embeddings simultaneously based only on the labeled reviews in English and unlabeled parallel data available in a few language pairs. In order to achieve this goal, we propose to learn multilingual sentiment-aware word embeddings simultaneously based only on the labeled reviews in English and unlabeled parallel data available in a few languages pairs. སྐད ང་ཚོའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས མ་ཟད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆ་འཛིན་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་གཅིག་པ་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་ཅིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ནས་nsiས་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་སྐད་དབྱེ་སྟངས་པར་མཐུན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཁ་ཤས་ཁག་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'Capturing User and Product Information for Document Level Sentiment Analysis with Deep Memory Network', 'ar': 'الحصول على معلومات المستخدم والمنتج لتحليل المشاعر على مستوى المستند باستخدام شبكة الذاكرة العميقة', 'pt': 'Capturando informações do usuário e do produto para análise de sentimento em nível de documento com Deep Memory Network', 'fr': "Capture des informations sur les utilisateurs et les produits pour l'analyse des sentiments au niveau du document avec Deep Memory Network", 'ja': 'ディープメモリネットワークを使用した文書レベルのセンチメント分析のためのユーザー情報と製品情報のキャプチャ', 'es': 'Captura de información de usuarios y productos para el análisis de opinión a nivel de documento con Deep Memory Network', 'hi': 'गहरी स्मृति नेटवर्क के साथ दस्तावेज़ स्तर भावना विश्लेषण के लिए उपयोगकर्ता और उत्पाद जानकारी कैप्चर करना', 'ru': 'Захват информации о пользователе и продукте для анализа настроений на уровне документа с помощью сети глубокой памяти', 'zh': '用深度内存网络获用户及产物信息以文档其情', 'ga': 'Faisnéis Úsáideora agus Táirge a Ghabháil le haghaidh Anailís Mothúcháin ar Leibhéal Doiciméid le Líonra Cuimhne Dhaimhneach', 'hu': 'Felhasználói és termékinformációk rögzítése dokumentumszintű hangulatelemzéshez a Deep Memory Network segítségével', 'el': 'Καταγραφή πληροφοριών χρήστη και προϊόντος για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων επιπέδου εγγράφου με βαθύ δίκτυο μνήμης', 'ka': 'Comment', 'it': "Acquisizione di informazioni utente e prodotto per l'analisi dei sentimenti a livello di documento con Deep Memory Network", 'lt': 'Gaunama naudotojo ir produkto informacija, skirta dokumento lygio jutimo analizei, naudojant gilaus atminties tinklą', 'kk': 'Comment', 'ms': 'Menangkap Maklumat Pengguna dan Produk untuk Analisi Sensiti Aras Dokumen dengan Rangkaian Memori Dalam', 'mk': 'Земање информации за корисникот и производот за анализа на чувството на нивото на документот со мрежа на длабока меморија', 'ml': 'രേഖയുടെ നിലനില വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഉപയോക്താവും പ്രൊട്ടോക്ട് വിവരങ്ങളും പിടികൂടുന്നു', 'mt': 'Qbid ta’ Informazzjoni dwar l-Utent u l-Prodott għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment fil-Livell tad-Dokument b’Netwerk ta’ Memorja Profonda', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч болон бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээлэл баримтын түвшин Sentiment Analysis with Deep Memory Network', 'no': 'Hentar brukar- og produktinformasjon for sentidssanalysering av dokumentnivået med dørmt minnet- nettverk', 'pl': 'Przechwytywanie informacji o użytkownikach i produktach do analizy sentymentów na poziomie dokumentów za pomocą sieci głębokiej pamięci', 'ro': 'Capturarea informațiilor despre utilizator și produs pentru analiza sentimentelor la nivel de document cu rețeaua de memorie profundă', 'sr': 'Ухватају информацију користера и производа за анализу Sentimenta на уровне документа са мрежом глубоких памета', 'so': 'Ku qabsashada macluumaadka qofka isticmaalka iyo ka soo saarista heerka dukumentiga', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මතක ජාලය සමග ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තොරතුරු අල්ලගන්න', 'sv': 'Fånga in användar- och produktinformation för analys av känslor på dokumentnivå med djupt minnesnätverk', 'ta': 'Capturing User and Product Information for Document Level Sentiment Analysis with Deep Memory Network', 'ur': 'ڈیکومٹ لئویل سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل کے لئے کارساز اور پروڈوکٹ معلومات کو ڈیکومٹ میموری نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ کپٹر کر رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Bắt lấy thông tin người dùng và sản phẩm cho Trình phân tích kỷ lục bằng mạng bộ nhớ sâu', 'nl': 'Het vastleggen van gebruikers- en productinformatie voor sentimentanalyse op documentniveau met Deep Memory Network', 'hr': 'Uhvaćanje informacija korisnika i proizvoda za analizu sentimenta razine dokumenta s dubokom mrežom pamćenja', 'da': 'Indsamling af bruger- og produktoplysninger til analyse af følelser på dokumentniveau med dybt hukommelsesnetværk', 'ko': '심도 있는 기억 네트워크를 이용하여 사용자와 제품 정보를 포착하여 문서급 감정 분석을 하다', 'fa': 'دستگیر اطلاعات کاربر و تولید برای تحلیل مرحله سند مجموعه با شبکه حافظه عمیق', 'bg': 'Заснемане на потребителска и продуктова информация за анализ на сентимента на ниво документ с мрежа за дълбока памет', 'sw': 'Anachambua muda wa kiwango cha Document na Mtandao wa Kumbukumbu', 'id': 'Menangkap Informasi Pengguna dan Produk untuk Analisi Sentimen Tingkat Dokumen dengan Jaringan Memori Dalam', 'de': 'Erfassen von Benutzer- und Produktinformationen für die Sentiment-Analyse auf Dokumentenebene mit Deep Memory Network', 'af': 'Kies gebruiker en Produk Informasie vir Dokumentvlak Sentiment Analiseer met Deep Geheue Netwerk', 'hy': 'Բռնել օգտագործողի և արտադրողի տեղեկատվությունը փաստաթղթի մակարդակի զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար խորը հիշողության ցանցով', 'az': 'D칬k칲mat seviyy톛si Sentiment Analizi 칲칞칲n 캻stifad톛칞i v톛 Produkt Mal칲mat캼n캼 Q캼sqa Etir', 'tr': 'Sened Seviye Sentiýasyny Taýýarlamak üçin Ullançy we Produkt Maglumaty', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্ট সেন্টেমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য ব্যবহারকারী এবং প্রোডেক্ট তথ্য গ্রেপ্তার করা হচ্ছে গভীর মেমরি নেটওয়ার', 'sq': 'Duke kapur informacionin e përdoruesit dhe të prodhimit për analizën e ndjenjave të nivelit të dokumentit me rrjetin e kujtesës së thellë', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bs': 'Uhvaćenje informacija korisnika i proizvoda za analizu sentimenta na nivou dokumenta sa dubokom mrežom pamćenja', 'fi': 'Käyttäjä- ja tuotetietojen talteenotto dokumenttitason tunteiden analysointia varten Deep Memory Network -verkon avulla', 'et': 'Kasutaja- ja tooteabe jäädvustamine dokumenditaseme sentimentaalüüsi jaoks süvamäluvõrguga', 'cs': 'Zachycování informací o uživatelích a produktech pro analýzu sentimentů na úrovni dokumentů pomocí sítě hluboké paměti', 'ca': "Captura d'informació d'usuari i producte per a l'anàlisi del sentiment del nivell de documentació amb una xarxa de memòria profunda", 'jv': 'Capture User and Produkt Informasi kanggo document evel Sentiment Test nganggo deep membersar Network', 'he': 'מציאת מידע משתמש ומוצר עבור ניתוח רגשות רמת המסמך עם רשת זיכרון עמוקה', 'sk': 'Zajemanje informacij o uporabnikih in izdelkih za analizo čustva na ravni dokumenta z globokim pomnilniškim omrežjem', 'ha': 'Ana kãma Shiryoyin Mai amfani da Ƙarawa wa Agahiya na Ƙarawa wa na Naƙasan Kwamfyuta', 'bo': 'Capturing User and Product Information for Document Level Sentiment Analysis with Deep Memory Network'}
{'en': 'Document-level sentiment classification is a fundamental problem which aims to predict a user’s overall sentiment about a product in a document. Several methods have been proposed to tackle the problem whereas most of them fail to consider the influence of users who express the sentiment and products which are evaluated. To address the issue, we propose a deep memory network for document-level sentiment classification which could capture the user and product information at the same time. To prove the effectiveness of our algorithm, we conduct experiments on IMDB and Yelp datasets and the results indicate that our model can achieve better performance than several existing methods.', 'ar': 'يعد تصنيف المشاعر على مستوى المستند مشكلة أساسية تهدف إلى التنبؤ بمشاعر المستخدم العامة حول منتج ما في المستند. تم اقتراح عدة طرق لمعالجة المشكلة بينما فشل معظمها في مراعاة تأثير المستخدمين الذين يعبرون عن المشاعر والمنتجات التي يتم تقييمها. لمعالجة المشكلة ، نقترح شبكة ذاكرة عميقة لتصنيف المشاعر على مستوى المستند والتي يمكن أن تلتقط معلومات المستخدم والمنتج في نفس الوقت. لإثبات فعالية الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا ، نجري تجارب على مجموعات بيانات IMDB و Yelp وتشير النتائج إلى أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يحقق أداءً أفضل من العديد من الطرق الحالية.', 'es': 'La clasificación de opiniones a nivel de documento es un problema fundamental que tiene como objetivo predecir la opinión general de un usuario sobre un producto de un documento. Se han propuesto varios métodos para abordar el problema, mientras que la mayoría de ellos no tienen en cuenta la influencia de los usuarios que expresan el sentimiento y los productos que se evalúan. Para abordar el problema, proponemos una red de memoria profunda para la clasificación de opiniones a nivel de documento que pueda capturar la información del usuario y del producto al mismo tiempo. Para demostrar la eficacia de nuestro algoritmo, realizamos experimentos en conjuntos de datos de IMDB y Yelp y los resultados indican que nuestro modelo puede lograr un mejor rendimiento que varios métodos existentes.', 'fr': "La classification des sentiments au niveau du document est un problème fondamental qui vise à prédire le sentiment général d'un utilisateur à propos d'un produit dans un document. Plusieurs méthodes ont été proposées pour résoudre le problème alors que la plupart d'entre elles ne tiennent pas compte de l'influence des utilisateurs qui expriment le sentiment et des produits évalués. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un réseau de mémoire profonde pour la classification des sentiments au niveau du document, qui pourrait capturer les informations relatives à l'utilisateur et au produit en même temps. Pour prouver l'efficacité de notre algorithme, nous menons des expériences sur des ensembles de données IMDB et Yelp et les résultats indiquent que notre modèle peut atteindre de meilleures performances que plusieurs méthodes existantes.", 'pt': 'A classificação de sentimento em nível de documento é um problema fundamental que visa prever o sentimento geral de um usuário sobre um produto em um documento. Vários métodos foram propostos para resolver o problema, enquanto a maioria deles não considera a influência dos usuários que expressam o sentimento e os produtos avaliados. Para resolver o problema, propomos uma rede de memória profunda para classificação de sentimento em nível de documento que poderia capturar as informações do usuário e do produto ao mesmo tempo. Para provar a eficácia do nosso algoritmo, realizamos experimentos em conjuntos de dados IMDB e Yelp e os resultados indicam que nosso modelo pode alcançar melhor desempenho do que vários métodos existentes.', 'ja': '文書レベルの感情分類は、文書内の製品に関するユーザーの全体的な感情を予測することを目的とした基本的な問題です。この問題に取り組む方法はいくつか提案されているが、そのほとんどは感情を表現するユーザーや評価される製品の影響を考慮していない。この問題に対処するために、文書レベルのセンチメント分類のためのディープメモリネットワークを提案します。これは、ユーザーと製品情報を同時にキャプチャすることができます。当社のアルゴリズムの有効性を証明するために、当社はIMDBおよびYelpデータセットの実験を行い、その結果は、当社のモデルが既存のいくつかの方法よりも優れたパフォーマンスを達成することができることを示しています。', 'zh': '文档情类为本,指用户文档中物。 已发数术以决之,而其术多不及用户、料产。 为此一文档情类之深内存网络,可兼收用户产。 为算法之有效性,于IMDB、Yelp数集上为实验,结果表明吾形胜于数术也。', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़-स्तरीय भावना वर्गीकरण एक मौलिक समस्या है जिसका उद्देश्य किसी दस्तावेज़ में किसी उत्पाद के बारे में उपयोगकर्ता की समग्र भावना की भविष्यवाणी करना है। समस्या से निपटने के लिए कई तरीकों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है जबकि उनमें से अधिकांश उन उपयोगकर्ताओं के प्रभाव पर विचार करने में विफल रहते हैं जो भावनाओं और उत्पादों को व्यक्त करते हैं जिनका मूल्यांकन किया जाता है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम दस्तावेज़-स्तर की भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए एक गहरी मेमोरी नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक ही समय में उपयोगकर्ता और उत्पाद जानकारी को कैप्चर कर सकता है। हमारे एल्गोरिथ्म की प्रभावशीलता को साबित करने के लिए, हम IMDB और Yelp डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं और परिणाम इंगित करते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल कई मौजूदा तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Классификация настроений на уровне документа - это фундаментальная проблема, которая направлена на прогнозирование общего отношения пользователя к продукту в документе. Для решения этой проблемы было предложено несколько методов, в то время как в большинстве из них не учитывается влияние пользователей, выражающих свои чувства, и оцениваемых продуктов. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем сеть глубокой памяти для классификации настроений на уровне документа, которая могла бы одновременно фиксировать информацию о пользователе и продукте. Чтобы доказать эффективность нашего алгоритма, мы проводим эксперименты на наборах данных IMDb и Yelp, и результаты показывают, что наша модель может достичь лучшей производительности, чем несколько существующих методов.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb bhunúsach é aicmiú meon an doiciméid a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige dearcadh foriomlán úsáideora i leith táirge i ndoiciméad a thuar. Tá go leor modhanna molta chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb ach ní mheasann an chuid is mó acu tionchar na n-úsáideoirí a chuireann an meon agus na táirgí a bhfuil meastóireacht á déanamh orthu. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist, molaimid líonra cuimhne domhain le haghaidh aicmiú meon ar leibhéal doiciméad a d’fhéadfadh faisnéis a thabhairt don úsáideoir agus don táirge ag an am céanna. Chun éifeachtacht ár n-algartam a chruthú, déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí IMDB agus Yelp agus léiríonn na torthaí gur féidir lenár múnla feidhmíocht níos fearr a bhaint amach ná roinnt modhanna atá ann cheana féin.', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων σε επίπεδο εγγράφου είναι ένα θεμελιώδες πρόβλημα που αποσκοπεί στην πρόβλεψη του συνολικού συναισθήματος ενός χρήστη για ένα προϊόν σε ένα έγγραφο. Έχουν προταθεί διάφορες μέθοδοι για την αντιμετώπιση του προβλήματος ενώ οι περισσότερες από αυτές δεν λαμβάνουν υπόψη την επιρροή των χρηστών που εκφράζουν το συναίσθημα και τα προϊόντα που αξιολογούνται. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα δίκτυο βαθιάς μνήμης για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων σε επίπεδο εγγράφων, το οποίο θα μπορούσε να συλλάβει ταυτόχρονα τις πληροφορίες χρήστη και προϊόντος. Για να αποδείξουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του αλγόριθμου μας, διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων και τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να επιτύχει καλύτερη απόδοση από αρκετές υπάρχουσες μεθόδους.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის დონემენტის სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაცია არის ფუნდამენტიური პრობლემენტი, რომელიც მინდა გამოყენებელი სამყარო სენტიმენტი დოკუმენტის პრობ რამდენიმე მეტები იყენებულია პრობლემის გარეშე, მაგრამ უფრო მეტი მათგანი არ შეუძლებელია აღმოჩენოთ მომხმარებელი, რომლებიც გამოსაყვანეთ სენტიმენტი და პ ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მივიღეთ დოკუმენტის სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციაში შავი მეხსიერების ქსელი, რომელიც შეიძლება იგივე დროში მომხმარებელი რომ ჩვენი ალგორიტიმს ეფექტიურობას წარმოიდგინოთ, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები IMDB და Yelp მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გავაკეთებთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია გავაკეთებთ უფრო მ', 'hu': 'A dokumentum szintű hangulatosztályozás alapvető probléma, amelynek célja, hogy megjósolja a felhasználó általános hangulatát egy termékkel kapcsolatban egy dokumentumban. A probléma kezelésére számos módszert javasoltak, míg a legtöbbjük nem veszi figyelembe azon felhasználók befolyását, akik kifejezik az érzelmet és az értékelt termékeket. A probléma megoldása érdekében olyan mély memóriás hálózatot javasolunk dokumentumszintű hangulatosztályozáshoz, amely egyszerre rögzítheti a felhasználói és termékinformációkat. Algoritmusunk hatékonyságának bizonyítása érdekében IMDB és Yelp adatkészleteken végzünk kísérleteket, és az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk több meglévő módszernél jobb teljesítményt tud elérni.', 'it': "La classificazione del sentiment a livello di documento è un problema fondamentale che mira a prevedere il sentiment generale di un utente su un prodotto in un documento. Sono stati proposti diversi metodi per affrontare il problema, mentre la maggior parte di essi non tiene conto dell'influenza degli utenti che esprimono il sentimento e i prodotti che vengono valutati. Per risolvere il problema, proponiamo una rete di memoria profonda per la classificazione del sentiment a livello di documento che potrebbe catturare le informazioni utente e prodotto allo stesso tempo. Per dimostrare l'efficacia del nostro algoritmo, eseguiamo esperimenti su set di dati IMDB e Yelp e i risultati indicano che il nostro modello può ottenere prestazioni migliori rispetto a diversi metodi esistenti.", 'kk': 'Құжаттың деңгейіндегі сезімдерді шектеу - негізгі мәселе. Бұл құжатта пайдаланушының жалпы сезімдерін таңдау үшін мақсатты. Бірнеше әдістер мәселеді шешуге ұсынылды, бірақ олардың көпшілігі мәселесін шешуге болмайды. Бірақ олардың көпшілігі мәселелерді және құрылғыларды дұрыстыруға Мәселеді шешу үшін біз құжат деңгейіндегі сезімдер үшін қолданатын және продукттың мәліметін бір-бір уақытта алып алуға мүмкін болатын жады желіне ұсынамыз. Алгоритміздің эффективнігін тексеру үшін, IMDB және Yelp деректер қорларында тәжірибелерді жұмыс істеу үшін, нәтижелер біздің үлгіміздің бірнеше әдістерден артық істеу мүмкіндігін', 'lt': 'Dokumentų lygmens jausmų klasifikavimas yra pagrindinproblema, kuria siekiama dokumente numatyti bendrą vartotojo jausmą apie produktą. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, buvo pasiūlyti keli metodai, o dauguma jų neatsižvelgia į vartotojų, kurie išreiškia vertinamą jausmą ir produktus, įtaką. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome sukurti gilią atminties tinklą, skirtą dokumentų lygmens jutimo klasifikacijai, kuri galėtų tuo pačiu metu surinkti naudotojo ir produkto informaciją. Kad įrodytume mūsų algoritmo veiksmingumą, atliekame eksperimentus su IMDB ir Yelp duomenų rinkiniais ir rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali pasiekti geresnius rezultatus nei keli esami metodai.', 'mk': 'Класификацијата на чувства на ниво на документ е фундаментален проблем кој има за цел да го предвиде целокупното чувство на корисникот за производ во документот. Неколку методи се предложени за решавање на проблемот, додека повеќето од нив не го разгледуваат влијанието на корисниците кои го изразуваат чувството и производите кои се проценети. За да го решиме ова прашање, предложуваме длабока мрежа на меморија за класификација на чувства на ниво на документ, која би можела да ја зафати информацијата за корисникот и производот во исто време. За да ја докажеме ефикасноста на нашиот алгоритм, спроведуваме експерименти на IMDB и Yelp податоци и резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да постигне подобра резултатност од неколку постоечки методи.', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi sentimen aras dokumen adalah masalah dasar yang bermaksud meramalkan sentimen umum pengguna mengenai produk dalam dokumen. Beberapa kaedah telah diusulkan untuk menangani masalah sementara kebanyakan daripada mereka gagal mempertimbangkan pengaruh pengguna yang mengekspresikan perasaan dan produk yang diteliti. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian memori dalam untuk klasifikasi perasaan aras dokumen yang boleh menangkap maklumat pengguna dan produk pada masa yang sama. Untuk membuktikan kegunaan algoritma kami, kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data IMDB dan Yelp dan hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa model kami boleh mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik daripada beberapa kaedah yang ada.', 'ml': 'രേഖയില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രൊജറ്റിനെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ മൊത്തം വിചാരം പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ പ്രശ്നത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പല രീതികള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാല്\u200d അവരിലേറെപ്പേരും വിലയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്ക ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴമുള്ള മെമ്മറി ശൃംഖലം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരേ സമയത്ത് ഉപയോക നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തിയെ തെളിയിക്കാനാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d IMDB, യെല്\u200dഫ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നത്. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ', 'no': 'Dokumentnivå sentimentklassifikasjon er ein grunnleggjande problem som måtar å foregå overalt sentiment til ein brukar om eit produkt i eit dokument. Dei fleire metodane er foreslått å løyse problemet, men dei fleste av dei ikkje kan gjere til å vurdere påvirkninga av brukarar som uttrykker sentimenten og produktane som er evaluert. For å handtera problemet, foreslår vi ein dyp minnetwark for dokumentnivåsentimentklassifikasjon som kan henta brukaren og produktinformasjonen samtidig. For å bevise effektiviteten av algoritmen vår, gjer vi eksperimenter på IMDB- og Yelp- datasett, og resultatet tyder på at modellen vårt kan oppnå bedre utvikling enn fleire eksisterande metodar.', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti fil-livell tad-dokument hija problem a fundamentali li għandha l-għan li tipprevedi s-sentiment ġenerali ta’ utent dwar prodott f’dokument. Ġew proposti diversi metodi biex tiġi indirizzata l-problema filwaqt li ħafna minnhom jonqsu milli jikkunsidraw l-influwenza tal-utenti li jesprimu s-sentiment u l-prodotti li huma evalwati. Biex nindirizzaw il-kwistjoni, qed nipproponu netwerk ta’ memorja profonda għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti fil-livell tad-dokument li jista’ jinkiseb l-informazzjoni tal-utent u tal-prodott fl-istess ħin. Biex nippruvaw l-effettività tal-algoritmu tagħna, nagħmlu esperimenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta tal-IMDB u Yelp u r-riżultati jindikaw li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jikseb prestazzjoni aħjar minn diversi metodi eżistenti.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja sentymentów na poziomie dokumentu jest podstawowym problemem, którego celem jest przewidywanie ogólnego sentymentu użytkownika na temat produktu w dokumencie. Zaproponowano kilka metod rozwiązania problemu, podczas gdy większość z nich nie uwzględnia wpływu użytkowników, którzy wyrażają sentyment i oceniane produkty. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy sieć głębokiej pamięci do klasyfikacji sentymentów na poziomie dokumentów, która mogłaby jednocześnie uchwycić informacje o użytkowniku i produktach. Aby udowodnić skuteczność naszego algorytmu, przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na zbiorach danych IMDB i Yelp, a wyniki wskazują, że nasz model może osiągnąć lepszą wydajność niż kilka istniejących metod.', 'mn': 'Документын түвшинд мэдрэмжүүдийн түвшинд ангилах нь нэг үндсэн асуудал юм. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчийн бүтээгдэхүүний мэдрэмжүүдийг баримт бичсэн юм. Ихэнх арга нь асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд санал өгсөн. Гэхдээ ихэнх нь үнэлэх сэтгэл хөдлөл, үйлдвэрлэлийг илэрхийлдэг хэрэглэгчийн нөлөө үзүүлэхгүй. Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид баримтын түвшинд мэдрэгч болон бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээллийг хадгалах гүн гүнзгий санамжийн сүлжээний хувьд санал болгож байна. Алгоритмын үр дүнг баталахын тулд бид IMDB болон Yelp өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилт хийдэг. Үүний үр дүнд бидний загвар олон оршин байгаа арга замын илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea sentimentelor la nivel de document este o problemă fundamentală care are ca scop prezicerea sentimentului general al unui utilizator despre un produs într-un document. Au fost propuse mai multe metode pentru a aborda problema, în timp ce majoritatea dintre ele nu reușesc să ia în considerare influența utilizatorilor care exprimă sentimentul și produsele care sunt evaluate. Pentru a rezolva problema, propunem o rețea de memorie profundă pentru clasificarea sentimentelor la nivel de document, care ar putea capta în același timp informațiile utilizatorului și produsului. Pentru a dovedi eficiența algoritmului nostru, efectuăm experimente pe seturi de date IMDB și Yelp, iar rezultatele indică faptul că modelul nostru poate obține performanțe mai bune decât mai multe metode existente.', 'si': 'ලිපින්ත- ලේවල සංවේදනය විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශාල ප කිහිපයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් ඔවුන් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අසා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විදිහට ලොකු මතක ජාලය සඳහා විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වි අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් සාක්ෂා කරන්න, අපි IMDB සහ Yelp දත්ත සේට් වල පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාව', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija sentiment a na nivou dokumenta je osnovni problem koji je cilj predviđati ukupni osjećaj korisnika o proizvodu u dokumentu. Predloženo je nekoliko metoda da rješe problem, a većina njih ne razmišlja o utjecaju korisnika koji izražavaju osjećaj i proizvode koje se procjenjuju. Da bi se riješili pitanje, predlažemo duboku mrežu pamćenja za klasifikaciju sentiment a na nivou dokumenta koja bi mogla da uhvati informacije o korisniku i proizvodu u isto vreme. Da bismo dokazali učinkovitost našeg algoritma, provodili smo eksperimente na setima podataka IMDB i Yelp i rezultati ukazuju na to da naš model može postići bolji izvod nego nekoliko postojećih metoda.', 'so': 'Takhasuska farsamada ee dukumentigu waa dhibaato aasaasi ah, kaas oo loola jeedaa inuu horay u sii sheego fikrada uu isticmaalayo oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha dukumenti ku qoran. Waxaa la soo jeeday in loo tacliiyo dhibaatada qaarkood, laakiin intooda badan waxay ka fekeri waayeen saamaynta isticmaalayaasha ka muujiya fikrada iyo waxyaabaha lagu qiimeynayo. Markaas waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa shabakad aad u dheer oo xasuusta, si loo kala qabsado fasaxa farsamada, kaas oo ku qabsan karta macluumaadka isticmaalaha iyo warbixinta. Si aan u caddeyno awoodda algorithimadeenna, waxaynu sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan IMDB iyo Yelp, resultiyadana waxan tusinayaa in modellkayagu uu sameyn karo wax ka wanaagsan sameyn karo qaababka ay jiraan.', 'sv': 'Klassificering av sentiment på dokumentnivå är ett grundläggande problem som syftar till att förutsäga en användares allmänna sentiment om en produkt i ett dokument. Flera metoder har föreslagits för att ta itu med problemet medan de flesta av dem inte beaktar påverkan från användare som uttrycker den känsla och de produkter som utvärderas. För att ta itu med problemet föreslår vi ett djupt minnesnätverk för sentimentklassificering på dokumentnivå som kan fånga användar- och produktinformation samtidigt. För att bevisa effektiviteten av vår algoritm genomför vi experiment på IMDB och Yelp datauppsättningar och resultaten indikerar att vår modell kan uppnå bättre prestanda än flera befintliga metoder.', 'ta': 'ஆவண- நிலை உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல் ஒரு முக்கிய பிரச்சினை பிரச்சினைக்கு எதிர்பார்க்க பல முறைகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது ஆனால் அவர்களில் பெரும்பாலானவர் பிரச்சனையை விளக்க, நாம் ஆவண- மட்டத்திற்கான உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு ஒரு ஆழமான நினைவகம் பிணையத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்.  எங்கள் ஆல்பரிதமின் விளைவை தெரிவிக்க, நாம் IMDB மற்றும் Yelp தரவுத்தளத்தின் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் முடிவுகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது எங', 'ur': 'دکھانے-سطح احساسات کلاسپیٹ ایک بنیادی مسئلہ ہے جو ایک دکھانے میں ایک محصول کے بارے میں ایک کارساز کا سارے احساسات پیش کرنا چاہتا ہے. بہت سی طریقے مشکل کے حل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں حالانکہ ان میں سے اکثر کارساز کے تأثیر کو نظر نہیں آتے جنہوں نے احساسات اور محصولات کا ارزش کیا ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک عمیق مہمانی نیٹورک کی پیشنهاد دیتے ہیں ڈکومکسٹ لئویل احساسات کلاسیفوں کے لئے جو ایک ہی موقع کارساز اور محصول معلومات کو پکڑ سکتا ہے. ہمارے الگوریتم کے اثبات ثابت کرنے کے لئے ہم IMDB اور Yelp ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارا مدل بہتر عمل پہنچا سکتا ہے بہت سے موجود طریقے سے۔', 'uz': "Hujjatning darajasi hisoblanishi asosiy muammosi, bu hujjatdagi narsalar haqida foydalanuvchining umumiy hisobini koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun bir necha usullar talab qilindi. Chunki ularning ko'pchiligi foydalanuvchilarning hissiyotni va narsalarni ko'rsatadigan foydalanuvchilarga ishlatishni tasavvur qilmaydi. To address the issue, we propose a deep memory network for document-level sentiment classification which could capture the user and product information at the same time.  Algoritmizning effektligini tasdiqlash uchun, biz IMDB va Yelp maʼlumotlar sahifalarini bajaramiz va natijalarimiz esa modelmiz mavjud ko'plab usuldan yaxshi bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chất phân loại cảm xúc cấp tài liệu là một vấn đề cơ bản nhằm dự đoán tình cảm chung của người dùng về một s ản phẩm trong một tài liệu. Một số phương pháp được đề xuất để giải quyết vấn đề trong khi hầu hết họ đều không xem xét sự ảnh hưởng của người dùng biểu lộ cảm xúc và sản phẩm được đánh giá. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng bộ nhớ sâu rộng để phân loại cảm xúc của các tài liệu có thể thu thập thông tin người dùng và sản phẩm cùng một lúc. Để chứng minh hiệu quả thuật toán của chúng tôi, chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu thai nhi và Yelp, và kết quả cho thấy rằng mô hình của chúng tôi có thể đạt kết quả tốt hơn nhiều phương pháp tồn tại.', 'bg': 'Класификацията на сентимента на ниво документ е фундаментален проблем, който има за цел да предскаже цялостното мнение на потребителя за даден продукт в документ. Предложени са няколко метода за справяне с проблема, докато повечето от тях не отчитат влиянието на потребителите, които изразяват чувствата и продуктите, които се оценяват. За да решим проблема, предлагаме мрежа за дълбока памет за класификация на сентимента на ниво документ, която може да улавя информация за потребителя и продукта едновременно. За да докажем ефективността на нашия алгоритъм, провеждаме експерименти с набори от данни и резултатите показват, че нашият модел може да постигне по-добра производителност от няколко съществуващи метода.', 'da': 'Klassificering af sentiment på dokumentniveau er et grundlæggende problem, der har til formål at forudsige en brugers overordnede sentiment om et produkt i et dokument. Der er foreslået flere metoder til at løse problemet, mens de fleste af dem ikke tager hensyn til indflydelsen fra brugere, der udtrykker den følelse og de produkter, der evalueres. For at løse problemet foreslår vi et dybt hukommelsesnetværk til klassificering af sentiment på dokumentniveau, som kan indsamle bruger- og produktoplysninger på samme tid. For at bevise effektiviteten af vores algoritme gennemfører vi eksperimenter på IMDB og Yelp datasæt, og resultaterne indikerer, at vores model kan opnå bedre ydeevne end flere eksisterende metoder.', 'nl': 'De classificatie van sentimenten op documentniveau is een fundamenteel probleem dat tot doel heeft het algemene sentiment van een gebruiker over een product in een document te voorspellen. Er zijn verschillende methoden voorgesteld om het probleem aan te pakken, terwijl de meeste geen rekening houden met de invloed van gebruikers die het sentiment en de producten die worden geëvalueerd. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een deep memory netwerk voor sentiment classificatie op documentniveau voor, dat de gebruiker en productinformatie tegelijkertijd kan vastleggen. Om de effectiviteit van ons algoritme te bewijzen, voeren we experimenten uit op IMDB en Yelp datasets en de resultaten geven aan dat ons model betere prestaties kan bereiken dan verschillende bestaande methoden.', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija osjećaja na razini dokumenta je osnovni problem koji je cilj predvidjeti ukupni osjećaj korisnika o proizvodu u dokumentu. Predloženo je nekoliko metoda rješavanja problema, dok većina njih ne razmatra utjecaj korisnika koji izražavaju osjećaj i proizvode koje se procjenjuju. Da bi se riješili pitanje, predlažemo duboku mrežu sjećanja za klasifikaciju osjećanja na razini dokumenta koja bi u isto vrijeme mogla uhvatiti informacije o korisniku i proizvodu. Da bismo dokazali učinkovitost našeg algoritma, provodili smo eksperimente na podacima IMDB i Yelp i rezultati ukazuju na to da naš model može postići bolji učinkovit nego nekoliko postojećih metoda.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi sensasi tingkat dokumen adalah masalah dasar yang bertujuan untuk memprediksi sensasi umum pengguna tentang produk dalam dokumen. Beberapa metode telah diusulkan untuk mengatasi masalah sementara kebanyakan dari mereka gagal mempertimbangkan pengaruh pengguna yang mengekspresikan perasaan dan produk yang diteliti. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan memori dalam untuk klasifikasi sensasi tingkat dokumen yang bisa menangkap informasi pengguna dan produk pada saat yang sama. Untuk membuktikan efektivitas algoritma kami, kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data IMDB dan Yelp dan hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa model kami dapat mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dari beberapa metode yang ada.', 'de': 'Die Klassifizierung von Stimmungen auf Dokumentenebene ist ein grundlegendes Problem, das darauf abzielt, die allgemeine Stimmung eines Benutzers über ein Produkt in einem Dokument vorherzusagen. Es wurden mehrere Methoden vorgeschlagen, um das Problem anzugehen, während die meisten von ihnen den Einfluss der Nutzer, die die Stimmung und die zu bewertenden Produkte äußern, nicht berücksichtigen. Um das Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein Deep-Memory-Netzwerk für die Stimmungsklassifizierung auf Dokumentenebene vor, das Benutzer- und Produktinformationen gleichzeitig erfassen könnte. Um die Effektivität unseres Algorithmus zu beweisen, führen wir Experimente an IMDB- und Yelp-Datensätzen durch und die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell eine bessere Leistung erzielen kann als mehrere bestehende Methoden.', 'ko': '문서급 감정 분류는 기본적인 문제로 사용자가 문서 속 제품에 대한 전체적인 감정을 예측하는 데 목적을 둔다.사람들은 몇 가지 방법을 제시하여 이 문제를 해결했지만, 대부분의 방법은 감정을 표현하는 사용자와 평가받는 제품의 영향을 고려하지 않았다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 문서급 감정 분류에 사용되는 심도 있는 기억 네트워크를 제시했는데 사용자와 제품 정보를 동시에 포착할 수 있다.알고리즘의 유효성을 검증하기 위해 IMDB와 Yelp 데이터 세트에서 실험을 실시한 결과 우리의 모델은 기존의 몇 가지 방법보다 더 좋은 성능을 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'گرم احساسات سطح سند یک مشکل بنیادی است که هدف دارد احساسات عمومی یک کاربر در مورد یک محصول در یک سند پیش بینی کند. چند روش پیشنهاد داده شده که مشکل را حل کنند، در حالی که بیشتر از آنها تأثیر کاربران را که احساسات و محصولات را ارزیابی می کنند به نظر نمی رسند. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک شبکه حافظه عمیق برای فرهنگ احساسات سطح سند پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند اطلاعات کاربر و محصولات را در آن زمان بگیرد. برای ثابت کردن موثیت الگوریتم ما، ما آزمایش\u200cهای IMDB و Yelp datasets را انجام می\u200cدهیم و نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما می\u200cتواند عملکرد بهتر از روش\u200cهای موجود باشد.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya kiwango cha nyaraka ni tatizo la msingi ambalo linakusudia kutabiri hisia za jumla za mtumiaji kuhusu bidhaa katika nyaraka. Utawala kadhaa umependekezwa kukabiliana na tatizo ambapo wengi wao hawakushindwa kuangalia ushawishi wa watumiaji ambao wanaelezea hisia na bidhaa ambazo zinapitiwa. Ili kushughulikia suala hili, tunapendekeza mtandao wa ndani wa kumbukumbu kwa kutangaza hisia za kiwango cha nyaraka ambacho kinaweza kumkamata mtumiaji na taarifa za uzalishaji wakati huo huo. Ili kuthibitisha ufanisi wa utaalgorithi wetu, tunafanya majaribio kwenye seti za IMDB na Yelp na matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mfano wetu unaweza kupata ufanisi bora kuliko njia kadhaa zilizopo.', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i ndjenjave në nivel të dokumentit është një problem thelbësor që synon të parashikojë ndjenjat e përgjithshme të një përdoruesi rreth një produkti në një dokument. Disa metoda janë propozuar për të trajtuar problemin ndërsa shumica e tyre nuk konsiderojnë ndikimin e përdoruesve që shprehin ndjenjat dhe prodhimet që vlerësohen. Për të trajtuar çështjen, ne propozojmë një rrjet kujtese të thellë për klasifikimin e ndjenjave në nivel të dokumentit që mund të kapë informacionin e përdoruesit dhe të prodhimit në të njëjtën kohë. Për të vërtetuar efektshmërinë e algoritmit tonë, ne kryejmë eksperimente në IMDB dhe Yelp datasets dhe rezultatet tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të arrijë performancë më të mirë se disa metoda ekzistuese.', 'tr': 'Sened derejesi duýgulamak esasy meseledir. Ullançylaryň hemme duýgularyny bir sened içinde täze bir meseledir. Meseläni çözmek üçin birnäçe yöntem teklip edildi, ýöne olaryň köpüsi duýgulary we önümlerini bejeren hasaplamaýarlar. Meseleyi çözmek üçin, desktap derejesi duýgulamak üçin derin bir ýagtylyk şebekesini teklip edip, ullançy we önüm maglumaty bir gezek yakalayabilir. Algoritmyzyň etkinliýetini barlamak üçin, IMDB we Yelp veri setirlerinde deneyler etdik we netijelerimiz biziň modelimizin birnäçe bar ýoldan gowy etkinliýeti başaryp biljekdigini görkez.', 'af': "Dokumentvlak sentiment klasifikasie is 'n fundamentele probleem wat doel om 'n gebruiker se hele sentiment oor' n produkt in 'n dokument te voorskou. Verskeie metodes is voorgestel om die probleem te hanteer, terwyl die meeste van hulle misluk om die influens van gebruikers wat die sentiment en produkte uitdruk wat evalueer word. Om die probleem te adres, voorstel ons 'n diep geheue netwerk vir dokumentvlak sentiment klasifikasie wat die gebruiker en produkt inligting op dieselfde tyd kan vang. Om die effektiviteit van ons algoritme te bevestig, doen ons eksperimente op IMDB en Yelp datastelle en die resultate wys dat ons model beter effektiviteit kan bereik as verskeie bestaande metodes.", 'am': 'ሰነድ-ደረጃ ስሜት መግለጫ የተመሳሳይ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ጉዳዩን ለመቀናቀል ብዙ ሥርዓቶች ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ጉዳዩን ለመጠየቅ፣ የሰነድ-ደረጃ አስተያየት ለመጠየቅ ጥልቅ የማስታወሻ መረብ እና የፍሬት መረጃዎችን በተሰናከሉ ጊዜ ለመያዝ እናስባለን፡፡ የአልgoritማችንን ፍቃድ ለማረጋገጥ፣ በIMDB እና በይሌፍ ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Թղթերի մակարդակի զգացմունքների դասակարգումը հիմնարար խնդիր է, որը նպատակում է կանխատեսել օգտագործողի ընդհանուր զգացմունքները մի ապրանքի մասին փաստաթուղում: Բազմաթիվ մեթոդներ են առաջարկվել խնդիրը լուծելու համար, մինչդեռ նրանցից շատերը չեն հաշվի առնում օգտագործողների ազդեցությունը, ովքեր արտահայտում են գնահատված զգացմունքները և արտադրանքները: Խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք խորը հիշողության ցանց փաստաթղթի մակարդակի զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար, որը կարող է միաժամանակ վերցնել օգտագործողի և արտադրանքի տեղեկատվությունը: Որպեսզի ապացուցենք մեր ալգորիթմի արդյունավետությունը, մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկումներ ԻՄԴԲ և Յելփ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, և արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է ավելի լավ արդյունավետություն հասնել, քան մի քանի գ', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্ট-স্তরের অনুভূতিগুলো একটি মৌলিক সমস্যা, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি নথিতে একটি পণ্য সম্পর্কে ব্যবহারকারীর সাধারণ মনোভাব ভবিষ্যত করা। এই সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু তাদের বেশীরভাগ ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রভাব বিবেচনা করতে ব্যর্থ হয়ে এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা নথিভুক্ত-স্তরের অনুভূতি বিভাগের জন্য গভীর মেমরি নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি, যা একই সময়ে ব্যবহারকারী ও প আমাদের অ্যালগরিদমের কার্যক্রম প্রমাণ করার জন্য আমরা আইএমডিবি এবং ইয়েল্প ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করছি এবং ফলাফলের লক্ষ্য করছি যে আমাদের মডেল বিভ', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija sentiment a na nivou dokumenta je osnovni problem koji je cilj predvidjeti ukupni osjećaj korisnika o proizvodu u dokumentu. Predloženo je nekoliko metoda da rješe problem, dok većina njih ne razmatra utjecaj korisnika koji izražavaju osjećaj i proizvode koje se procjenjuju. Da bi se riješili pitanje, predlažemo duboku mrežu pamćenja za klasifikaciju osjećanja na nivou dokumenta koja bi mogla da uhvati informacije o korisniku i proizvodu u isto vrijeme. Da bismo dokazali učinkovitost našeg algoritma, provodili smo eksperimente na IMDB i Yelp podacima i rezultati ukazuju na to da naš model može postići bolji učinkovit nego nekoliko postojećih metoda.', 'az': 'Vesiqət s əviyyəsi hissləri təsdiqlənməsi əs a s problemidir ki, bir proqramda istifadəçin in bütün hisslərini təsdiqləmək istəyir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün bir neçə metod təbliğ edildi, amma onların əksəriyyəti təcrübə edilən hissləri və məhsulları ifadə edən istifadəçilərin təsirini düşünmədi. Məsələni çəkmək üçün, belə bir dəfə istifadəçi və ürək məlumatını tutub saxlaya biləcək dökümət seviyyəti hissləri üçün derin yaddaş a ğını təklif edirik. Algoritimizin etkinliğini kanıtlamaq üçün, IMDB və Yelp veri qurularında eksperimentlər təşkil edirik və sonuçlar modelimizin bir çox mövcuddur metodlardan daha yaxşı performansını başa çıxara biləcəyini göstərir.', 'ca': "La classificació del sentiment a nivell documental és un problema fonamental que mira a predir el sentiment general d'un usuari sobre un producte en un document. S'han proposat diversos mètodes per abordar el problema mentre la majoria no considera l'influència dels usuaris que expressen el sentiment i els productes que s'evaluen. Per abordar la qüestió, proposem una xarxa de memòria profunda per a la classificació de sentiments a nivell documental que podria capturar la informació d'usuari i producte al mateix temps. To prove the effectiveness of our algorithm, we conduct experiments on IMDB and Yelp datasets and the results indicate that our model can achieve better performance than several existing methods.", 'cs': 'Klasifikace sentimentů na úrovni dokumentu je základním problémem, jehož cílem je předpovědět celkový sentiment uživatele k produktu v dokumentu. Pro řešení problému bylo navrženo několik metod, zatímco většina z nich nezohlední vliv uživatelů, kteří vyjadřují sentiment a hodnocené produkty. Pro řešení problému navrhujeme síť hluboké paměti pro klasifikaci sentimentů na úrovni dokumentů, která by mohla zachytit informace o uživateli a produktech současně. Abychom dokázali efektivitu našeho algoritmu, provádíme experimenty na IMDB a Yelp datových sadách a výsledky ukazují, že náš model může dosáhnout lepšího výkonu než několik existujících metod.', 'fi': 'Asiakirjatason tunneluokitus on perustavanlaatuinen ongelma, jonka tavoitteena on ennustaa käyttäjän yleistä mielipidettä tuotteesta asiakirjassa. Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi on ehdotettu useita menetelmiä, mutta useimmissa niistä ei oteta huomioon tunteita ilmaisevien käyttäjien ja arvioitavien tuotteiden vaikutusta. Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme dokumenttitason tunteiden luokittelua varten syvämuistiverkkoa, joka voisi tallentaa käyttäjä- ja tuotetiedot samanaikaisesti. Todistaaksemme algoritmimme tehokkuuden teemme kokeita IMDB- ja Yelp-aineistoilla ja tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy saavuttamaan paremman suorituskyvyn kuin useat olemassa olevat menetelmät.', 'et': 'Dokumenditasemel sentimentaalne klassifitseerimine on põhiprobleem, mille eesmärk on ennustada kasutaja üldist arvamust toote kohta dokumendis. Probleemi lahendamiseks on välja pakutud mitmeid meetodeid, samas kui enamik neist ei arvesta nende kasutajate mõju, kes väljendavad tundeid ja hinnatavaid tooteid. Probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja süvamälu võrgustiku dokumenditasemel sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni jaoks, mis võiks jäädvustada kasutaja- ja tooteavet samal ajal. Algoritmi efektiivsuse tõestamiseks teeme IMDB ja Yelpi andmekogumitega katseid ning tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel suudab saavutada parema jõudluse kui mitmed olemasolevad meetodid.', 'jv': 'Sensitif Awak dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi kanggo nggawe kesempatan perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai nggunaken winih sing ora bisa nguasai nggunakake bener seneng pisan lan alam sing bisa luwih apik dhéwé. Rasané awak dhéwé, kita mbukak tanggal alat sing deep Ngawe ngerasai efek karo Algorithmu anyar, awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan gambaran SMDB lan yelp dataset sing bakal ono model nyengke dhéwé iso dianggawe akeh operasi sing luwih apik karo sistem sing bisa dianggawe.', 'ha': "Shiryarwa na-daraja na takardar-dokuman wata matsayi ne mai bincike, yana aimar ya yi ɗabi'a wa mai amfani da shi gaba ɗaya a kan wani birnin cikin takarda. An goyya da wasu hanyoyi dõmin su yi mataimaki ga matabbata, kuma mafi yawansu ba su iya shagala ga masu amfani da waɗanda ke faɗa hison da manunukan da ake qiranta. Ga mu buɗa'a ga masu buƙata, muna goyyade wata jerin memory mai girma wa fassarar fanel-daraja, wanda zai iya kãma mai amfani da shi, da kuma ma'anar halayyar da shi sami guda. To prove the effectiveness of our algorithm, we conduct experiments on IMDB and Yelp datasets and the results indicate that our model can achieve better performance than several existing methods.", 'sk': 'Klasifikacija občutkov na ravni dokumenta je temeljni problem, katerega cilj je napovedati splošno občutke uporabnika o izdelku v dokumentu. Za reševanje problema je bilo predlaganih več metod, večina pa ne upošteva vpliva uporabnikov, ki izražajo čustva in izdelkov, ki se ocenjujejo. Za reševanje težave predlagamo globoko pomnilniško omrežje za klasifikacijo občutkov na ravni dokumenta, ki bi lahko hkrati zajela informacije o uporabniku in izdelku. Da bi dokazali učinkovitost našega algoritma, izvajamo eksperimente na IMDB in Yelp podatkovnih naborih, rezultati pa kažejo, da lahko naš model doseže boljšo učinkovitost kot več obstoječih metod.', 'he': 'מסווג רגשות ברמה המסמכים הוא בעיה בסיסית שמתכוונת לחזות את רגשות כלליות של משתמש לגבי מוצר במסמכים. הציעו כמה שיטות להתמודד עם הבעיה בעוד רובם לא שוקלים את השפעה של משתמשים שמביעים את הרגשה והמוצרים שמערכים. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא, אנו מציעים רשת זיכרון עמוקה לסימון רגשות ברמה מסמכים שיכול לתפוס את מידע המשתמש והמוצר באותו זמן. כדי להוכיח את היעילות של האלגוריתם שלנו, אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצות מידע IMDB ו Yelp והתוצאות מצביעות על כך שהמודל שלנו יכול להשיג ביצועים טובים יותר מכמה שיטות קיימות.', 'bo': 'ཡིག ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་བེད་སྤྲོད་འདོད་བྱས་ཡོད། གང་ལགས་ཀྱང་། མང་ཆེ་བ་ནི་སྐྱེས་པས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་སྟོན་རུང་དང To address the issue, we propose a deep memory network for document-level sentiment classification which could capture the user and product information at the same time. ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྤྱོད་ཚད་ལྡན་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོས་IMDB དང་Yelp ཡིག་ཆའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཐུབ་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་ཐུབ་པར་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་'}
{'en': 'Identifying and Tracking Sentiments and Topics from Social Media Texts during Natural Disasters', 'ar': 'تحديد وتتبع المشاعر والمواضيع من نصوص وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي أثناء الكوارث الطبيعية', 'es': 'Identificación y seguimiento de los sentimientos y temas de los textos de las redes sociales durante los desastres naturales', 'pt': 'Identificando e rastreando sentimentos e tópicos de textos de mídia social durante desastres naturais', 'fr': 'Identifier et suivre les sentiments et les sujets abordés dans les textes des réseaux sociaux pendant les catastrophes naturelles', 'ja': '自然災害時のソーシャルメディアテキストからの感情とトピックの特定と追跡', 'zh': '识与踪社交媒体文本情题', 'ru': 'Выявление и отслеживание настроений и тем из текстов социальных сетей во время стихийных бедствий', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक आपदाओं के दौरान सोशल मीडिया ग्रंथों से भावनाओं और विषयों की पहचान और ट्रैकिंग', 'ga': 'Mothúcháin agus Ábhair ó Théacsanna Meáin Shóisialta a Aithint agus a Rianú le linn Tubaistí Nádúrtha', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση και παρακολούθηση συναισθημάτων και θεμάτων από κείμενα κοινωνικών μέσων κατά τη διάρκεια φυσικών καταστροφών', 'hu': 'Érzelmek és témák azonosítása és nyomon követése a közösségi média szövegeiből természeti katasztrófák során', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიატექსტის ტექსტის განსაზღვრება და შენახვა სისტემა', 'it': 'Identificare e tracciare sentimenti e argomenti dai testi dei social media durante i disastri naturali', 'kk': 'Табиғи белгілер арасындағы социалдық медиа мәтіндерінің мәтіндерін анықтау және қадағалау', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹ്യ മിഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സാമൂഹിക വിപത്തുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സെന്റിമെയിന്റുകളെയും പരിചയപ്പ', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos tekstų jausmų ir temų nustatymas ir sekimas gaivalinių nelaimių metu', 'mk': 'Идентификување и следење на чувствата и темите од текстите на социјалните медиуми за време на природните катастрофи', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti dan Mengejar Perasaan dan Topik dari Teks Media Sosial semasa bencana alam', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн Мэдээллийн Мэдээллийн Мэдээллийн Мэдээллийн Мэдээллийн Мэдээллийн Үеэс', 'no': 'Identifikasjon og sporing av følgjande og emne frå sosiale mediatekst under naturlege katastrof', 'mt': 'Identifying and Tracking Sentiments and Topics from Social Media Texts during Natural Disasters', 'pl': 'Identyfikowanie i śledzenie sentymentów i tematów z tekstów mediów społecznościowych podczas klęsk żywiołowych', 'ro': 'Identificarea și urmărirea sentimentelor și subiectelor din textele social media în timpul dezastrelor naturale', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක පාළුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'sr': 'Identifikacija i praćenje sentimenta i tema iz teksta socijalnih medija tokom prirodnih katastrofa', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada iyo baaritaanka arimaha iyo macluumaadka dhaqanka bulshada', 'sv': 'Identifiera och spåra känslor och ämnen från sociala medier texter under naturkatastrofer', 'ta': 'Identifying and Tracking Sentiments and Topics from Social Media Texts during Natural Disasters', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا ٹیکسٹ کے ٹیکسٹ سے سنٹیمینٹ اور ٹریکینگ کی شناسایی اور ٹریکینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng và theo dõi tình cảm và các bản thảo từ các bản thảo phương tiện xã hội trong giai đoạn biến cố', 'da': 'Identificering og sporing af følelser og emner fra sociale medier tekster under naturkatastrofer', 'hr': 'Identificiranje i praćenje smisla i teme iz teksta socijalnih medija tijekom prirodnih katastrofa', 'nl': 'Identificeren en volgen van gevoelens en onderwerpen uit social media teksten tijdens natuurrampen', 'bg': 'Идентифициране и проследяване на чувства и теми от текстове в социалните медии по време на природни бедствия', 'ko': '자연 재해 기간의 소셜 미디어 텍스트의 정서와 화제를 식별하고 추적하다', 'fa': 'شناسایی و ردیابی احساسات و موضوع از متن رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی در طول مصیبت طبیعی', 'de': 'Erkennung und Verfolgung von Gefühlen und Themen aus Social Media Texten während Naturkatastrophen', 'id': 'Mengidentifikasi dan melacak Sentimen dan Topik dari Teks Media Sosial selama bencana alam', 'sw': 'Kutambua na kufuatilia Seneti na mada kutoka Makala ya Mitandao ya kijamii wakati wa majanga ya asili', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Social Media Textlerin Natural Disasters sırasynda Sentiments we Toparlary belirlenmek we bellenen', 'sq': 'Identifikimi dhe ndjekja e ndjenjave dhe temave nga tekstet e medias sociale gjatë katastrofave natyrore', 'am': 'እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ጽሑፎችን እና ማግኘት እና ማግኘት', 'hy': 'Բնական աղետների ժամանակ սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստների զգացմունքների և թեմաների հայտնաբերումը և հետևումը', 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtli x…ôst…ôl…ôr sńĪrasńĪnda Sosyal Medya Metni t…ôŇükil etm…ôk v…ô ńįzl…ôm…ôk', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের টেক্সট থেকে সেন্টাইমেন্ট এবং ট্র্যাকিং করা এবং প্রাকৃতিক বিপর্যয়ের সময় সামাজি', 'ca': 'Identificar i seguir sentiments i temes dels textos dels mitjans socials durant desastres naturals', 'cs': 'Identifikace a sledování sentimentů a témat z textů sociálních médií během přírodních katastrof', 'et': 'Tundete ja teemade tuvastamine ja jälgimine sotsiaalmeedia tekstidest looduskatastroofide ajal', 'bs': 'Identifikacija i praćenje Sentimenta i Tema iz teksta socijalnih medija tijekom prirodnih katastrofa', 'fi': 'Tunteiden ja aiheiden tunnistaminen ja seuranta sosiaalisen median teksteistä luonnonkatastrofien aikana', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'Idonation and Trailing Sessions and Topics from social Media Texts during Natural Disasters', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje in sledenje čustvov in tem iz besedil socialnih medijev med naravnimi nesrečami', 'he': 'זיהוי ומעקב אחר רגשות ונושאים מתוך טקסטים של מדיה חברתית במהלך אסונות טבעיות', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་རྗེས་བསྟར་ན།'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of identifying the topics and sentiments and tracking their shifts from social media texts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters. We propose a location-based dynamic sentiment-topic model (LDST) which can jointly model topic, sentiment, time and Geolocation information. The experimental results demonstrate that LDST performs very well at discovering topics and sentiments from social media and tracking their shifts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters. We will release the data and source code after this work is published.', 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة تحديد الموضوعات والمشاعر وتتبع تحولاتها من نصوص مواقع التواصل الاجتماعي في مناطق جغرافية مختلفة أثناء الطوارئ والكوارث. نقترح نموذج موضوع المشاعر الديناميكي المستند إلى الموقع (LDST) والذي يمكنه بشكل مشترك وضع نموذج للموضوع والمشاعر والوقت ومعلومات تحديد الموقع الجغرافي. توضح النتائج التجريبية أن LDST يؤدي أداءً جيدًا للغاية في اكتشاف الموضوعات والمشاعر من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي وتتبع تحولاتها في مناطق جغرافية مختلفة أثناء حالات الطوارئ والكوارث. سنصدر البيانات وكود المصدر بعد نشر هذا العمل.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el problema de identificar los temas y sentimientos y rastrear sus cambios desde los textos de las redes sociales en diferentes regiones geográficas durante emergencias y desastres. Proponemos un modelo dinámico de sentimiento-tema (LDST) basado en la ubicación que puede modelar conjuntamente el tema, el sentimiento, el tiempo y la información de geolocalización. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que LDST funciona muy bien en el descubrimiento de temas y sentimientos de las redes sociales y en el seguimiento de sus cambios en diferentes regiones geográficas durante emergencias y desastres. Publicaremos los datos y el código fuente después de que se publique este trabajo.', 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema de identificar os tópicos e sentimentos e rastrear suas mudanças de textos de mídia social em diferentes regiões geográficas durante emergências e desastres. Propomos um modelo de tópico de sentimento dinâmico baseado em localização (LDST) que pode modelar conjuntamente informações de tópico, sentimento, tempo e geolocalização. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que o LDST funciona muito bem na descoberta de tópicos e sentimentos das mídias sociais e no rastreamento de suas mudanças em diferentes regiões geográficas durante emergências e desastres. Liberaremos os dados e o código-fonte após a publicação deste trabalho.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le problème de l'identification des sujets et des sentiments et suivons leur évolution par rapport aux textes des médias sociaux dans différentes régions géographiques pendant les urgences et les catastrophes. Nous proposons un modèle dynamique sentiment-sujet (LDST) basé sur la localisation qui peut modéliser conjointement des informations de sujet, de sentiment, de temps et de géolocalisation. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que LDST réussit très bien à découvrir les sujets et les sentiments des médias sociaux et à suivre leurs évolutions dans différentes régions géographiques lors d'urgences et de catastrophes. Nous publierons les données et le code source après la publication de ce travail.", 'ja': '私たちは、緊急事態や災害の際に、さまざまな地理的地域のソーシャルメディアテキストからトピックや感情を特定し、その変化を追跡する問題を研究しています。ロケーションベースの動的センチメントトピックモデル（ LDST ）を提案し、トピック、センチメント、時間、地理的位置情報を共同でモデル化することができます。実験結果は、LDSTが、ソーシャルメディアからトピックや感情を発見し、緊急事態や災害時に異なる地理的地域でそれらのシフトを追跡するのに非常に優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。本作が公開された後、データとソースコードを公開します。', 'zh': '论急难之间,识主情而迹社交媒体移。 立情主(LDST),共建模主情。。 实验结果表明,LDST于社交媒体中得言情及踪迹之急难,形于变化之间。 发数源代码。', 'hi': 'हम विषयों और भावनाओं की पहचान करने और आपात स्थिति और आपदाओं के दौरान विभिन्न भौगोलिक क्षेत्रों में सोशल मीडिया ग्रंथों से उनके बदलावों को ट्रैक करने की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम एक स्थान-आधारित गतिशील भावना-विषय मॉडल (LDST) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संयुक्त रूप से विषय, भावना, समय और जियोलोकेशन जानकारी को मॉडल कर सकता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि एलडीएसटी सोशल मीडिया से विषयों और भावनाओं की खोज करने और आपात स्थिति और आपदाओं के दौरान विभिन्न भौगोलिक क्षेत्रों में उनके बदलावों को ट्रैक करने में बहुत अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है। हम इस काम को प्रकाशित होने के बाद डेटा और स्रोत कोड जारी करेंगे।', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем проблему выявления тем и настроений и отслеживания их сдвигов от текстов в социальных сетях в разных географических регионах во время чрезвычайных ситуаций и катастроф. Мы предлагаем модель динамических настроек на основе местоположения (LDST), которая может совместно моделировать информацию о теме, настроениях, времени и геолокации. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что LDST очень хорошо раскрывает темы и настроения из социальных сетей и отслеживает их сдвиги в различных географических регионах во время чрезвычайных ситуаций и стихийных бедствий. Мы выпустим данные и исходный код после публикации этой работы.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann leis na topaicí agus na mothúcháin a aithint agus a n-aistrithe ó théacsanna meán sóisialta i réigiúin gheografacha éagsúla a rianú le linn éigeandálaí agus tubaistí. Molaimid samhail dhinimiciúil de thopaic sentiment (LDST) atá bunaithe ar shuíomh, lenar féidir faisnéis faoi thopaic, meon, am agus Geoshuíomh a chomhshamhaltú. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfeidhmíonn LDST go han-mhaith ag aimsiú topaicí agus mothúcháin ó na meáin shóisialta agus ag rianú a n-athruithe i réigiúin gheografacha éagsúla le linn éigeandálaí agus tubaistí. Scaoilfimid na sonraí agus an cód foinse tar éis don obair seo a bheith foilsithe.', 'hu': 'Tanulmányozzuk a témák és érzelmek azonosításának problémáját, valamint a különböző földrajzi régiókban a közösségi média szövegeiről való eltolódásuk nyomon követését vészhelyzetek és katasztrófák során. Helyszínalapú dinamikus sentiment-topic modellt (LDST) javasolunk, amely közösen modellezheti a téma, sentiment, idő és geolokáció információit. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az LDST nagyon jól teljesít a témák és érzelmek felfedezésében a közösségi médiában, és nyomon követésében a különböző földrajzi régiókban vészhelyzetek és katasztrófák esetén. Az adatokat és a forráskódot a munka közzététele után közzétesszük.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα του εντοπισμού των θεμάτων και των συναισθημάτων και της παρακολούθησης των μετατοπίσεων τους από τα κείμενα των κοινωνικών μέσων σε διαφορετικές γεωγραφικές περιοχές κατά τη διάρκεια έκτακτης ανάγκης και καταστροφών. Προτείνουμε ένα δυναμικό μοντέλο συναισθημάτων-θέματος βάσει τοποθεσίας (το οποίο μπορεί από κοινού να μοντελοποιήσει πληροφορίες θέματος, συναισθημάτων, χρόνου και γεωγραφικής τοποθεσίας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν ότι το LDST αποδίδει πολύ καλά στην ανακάλυψη θεμάτων και συναισθημάτων από τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και στην παρακολούθηση των μετατόπισών τους σε διαφορετικές γεωγραφικές περιοχές κατά τη διάρκεια έκτακτης ανάγκης και καταστροφών. Θα απελευθερώσουμε τα δεδομένα και τον πηγαίο κώδικα μετά τη δημοσίευση αυτής της εργασίας.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ ტემების და სენტიმენტების განსაცნობის პრობლემა და სოციალური მედია ტექსტიდან განსხვავებული გეგოგოფიკალური რეგიონებში განსხვავებული განსხვავებების და კარტ ჩვენ დავწყვებთ ადგილაზე დაფარდებული დინამიკური სენტიმენტი-ტემიკური მოდელი (LDST), რომელიც შეუძლია ერთადერთად მოდელურად მოდელურად თემი, სენტიმენტი, დრო და გე ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ LDST ძალიან კარგი გავაკეთებს საზოგადომიური მედიაზე და სოციალური მედიაზე განსხვავებული გეგოგოფიკალური რეგიონებში განსხვავებული გა ჩვენ მონაცემები და ფორმა კოდის გახსნა, როდესაც ეს სამუშაო დააღწერა.', 'it': "Studiamo il problema dell'identificazione degli argomenti e dei sentimenti e del monitoraggio dei loro spostamenti dai testi dei social media in diverse regioni geografiche durante emergenze e disastri. Proponiamo un modello dinamico di sentiment-topic basato sulla posizione (LDST) che può modellare congiuntamente argomenti, sentimenti, tempo e informazioni sulla geolocalizzazione. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che LDST si comporta molto bene nel scoprire argomenti e sentimenti dai social media e nel monitorare i loro spostamenti in diverse regioni geografiche durante emergenze e disastri. Rilasciamo i dati e il codice sorgente dopo la pubblicazione di questo lavoro.", 'kk': 'Біз тақырыптарды, сезімдерін анықтау және социалдық медиақтарының мәтіндерінен түрлі географиялық аумақтардың өзгерістерін қадағалау мәселесін зерттейміз. Орналасу негіздеген динамикалық сезім- нақыштар үлгісін (LDST) тақырыпты, сезім, уақыт және географиялық мәліметін біріктіруге болады. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер LDST әлемдегі медиақтардың нақыштарын, сезімдерін табу және түрлі географиялық аумақтардың өзгерістерін қадағалау үшін жақсы жұмыс істейді. Бұл жұмыс шығарылғаннан кейін деректер мен көзі кодын шығару.', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме проблемот со идентификувањето на темите и чувствата и следењето на нивните промени од текстите на социјалните медиуми во различни географски региони за време на итни случаи и катастрофи. Предложуваме динамичен модел на тема на чувства (LDST) базиран на локација кој заедно може да моделира информации за тема, чувства, време и геолокација. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека ЛДСТ оди многу добро во откривањето теми и чувства од социјалните медиуми и следењето на нивните промени во различни географски региони за време на итни случаи и катастрофи. Ќе ги ослободиме податоците и изворниот код откако оваа работа ќе биде објавена.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari masalah mengenali mengenali topik dan perasaan dan melacak perubahan mereka dari teks media sosial di kawasan geografi yang berbeza semasa keadaan kecemasan dan bencana. We propose a location-based dynamic sentiment-topic model (LDST) which can jointly model topic, sentiment, time and Geolocation information.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa LDST berjaya dengan baik dalam penemuan topik dan perasaan dari media sosial dan melacak perubahan mereka di kawasan geografi berbeza semasa keadaan kecemasan dan bencana. Kami akan melepaskan data dan kod sumber selepas kerja ini diterbitkan.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്തോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയാ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അവരുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെയും പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്ക സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഡൈനാമിക്ക് സെന്റിമെന്റ് പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d (LDST) നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു എന്തെന്നാല്\u200d ഈ ജോലി പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ചശേഷം നമ്മള്\u200d ഡേറ്റായും സോര്\u200dസ് കോഡും വിടും.', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw il-problema tal-identifikazzjoni tas-suġġetti u s-sentimenti u t-traċċar tal-bidliet tagħhom mit-testi tal-midja soċjali f’reġjuni ġeografiċi differenti matul emerġenzi u diżastri. Aħna nipproponu mudell dinamiku tas-sentiment-suġġett ibbażat fuq il-post (LDST) li jista’ jimmudella b’mod konġunt informazzjoni dwar is-suġġett, is-sentiment, il-ħin u l-ġeolokazzjoni. The experimental results demonstrate that LDST performs very well at discovering topics and sentiments from social media and tracking their shifts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters.  Ser nirrilaxxaw id-dejta u l-kodiċi tas-sors wara li dan ix-xogħol jiġi ppubblikat.', 'mn': 'Бид сэдэв, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг тодорхойлох, нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэвлэлээс өөрчлөлтийг олох асуудлыг судалсан. Бид байрлал дээр суурилсан динамик сэтгэл санааны загвар (LDST) загварыг нийлүүлж чадна. Энэ нь сэтгэл санаа, мэдрэмж, цаг, Geolocation мэдээлэл. Энэ туршилтын үр дүнд LDST нийгмийн мэдээллээс сэтгэл хөдлөл, мэдрэмжүүдийг олох болон түүний өөр газрын хэсэгт өөрчлөлттэй байдлаар ажилладаг. Энэ ажлын дараа бид өгөгдлийн болон эх үүсвэрийн кодыг хэвлэх болно.', 'lt': 'We study the problem of identifying the topics and sentiments and tracking their shifts from social media texts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters.  Siūlome vietoje pagrįstą dinaminį jausmų temos model į (LDST), kuris kartu gali modeliuoti temą, jausmą, laiką ir geolokacijos informaciją. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad MTST labai gerai veikia nustatant social in ės žiniasklaidos temas ir jausmus ir stebint jų pokyčius įvairiuose geografiniuose regionuose avarijų ir nelaimių metu. Po šio darbo paskelbimo paskelbsime duomenis ir šaltinio kodą.', 'pl': 'Badamy problem identyfikacji tematów i sentymentów oraz śledzenia ich zmian z tekstów mediów społecznościowych w różnych regionach geograficznych w sytuacjach kryzysowych i katastrof. Proponujemy dynamiczny model sentyment-temat oparty na lokalizacji (LDST), który może wspólnie modelować temat, sentyment, czas i informacje geolokalizacyjne. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że LDST świetnie sprawdza się w odkrywaniu tematów i sentymentów z mediów społecznościowych oraz śledzeniu ich zmian w różnych regionach geograficznych podczas sytuacji kryzysowych i katastrof. Dane i kod źródłowy udostępnimy po opublikowaniu tej pracy.', 'ro': 'Studiem problema identificării subiectelor și sentimentelor și urmăririi schimbărilor acestora de la textele social media în diferite regiuni geografice în timpul urgențelor și dezastrelor. Propunem un model dinamic sentiment-topic bazat pe locație (LDST), care poate modela împreună subiect, sentiment, timp și informații de geolocalizare. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că LDST se descurcă foarte bine în descoperirea subiectelor și sentimentelor de pe rețelele de socializare și în urmărirea schimbărilor lor în diferite regiuni geografice în timpul urgențelor și dezastrelor. Vom elibera datele și codul sursă după publicarea acestei lucrări.', 'so': 'We study the problem of identifying the topics and sentiments and tracking their shifts from social media texts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters.  Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale muuqashada maandooriyaha (LDST) oo ku qoran karta wadajirka ah mada, xisaabta, xilliga iyo macluumaadka boolidka. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in LDST si wanaagsan u sameeyo in laga ogaado mada iyo fekerka shabakada sooshalka iyo sidoo kale bedelkooda goobaha geographican kala duduwan waqtiga xaaladaha iyo dhibaatada. Waxaannu bixinaynaa kaarka macluumaadka iyo kooxda sourceeda marka shaqadan la soo daabaco.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar problemet med att identifiera ämnen och känslor och följa deras skiftningar från sociala medier texter i olika geografiska regioner vid nödsituationer och katastrofer. Vi föreslår en platsbaserad dynamisk sentiment-topic model (LDST) som tillsammans kan modellera ämne, sentiment, tid och geolokalisering information. De experimentella resultaten visar att LDST presterar mycket bra på att upptäcka ämnen och känslor från sociala medier och spåra deras skiftningar i olika geografiska regioner vid nödsituationer och katastrofer. Vi kommer att släppa data och källkod efter att detta arbete publicerats.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo problem identifikacije tema i osećanja i praćenja njihovih promena iz tekstova socijalnih medija u različitim geografskim regijama tokom hitnih i katastrofa. Predlažemo dinamični model sentiment a-tema na lokaciji (LDST), koji može zajedno modelirati informacije o temi, sentimentu, vremenu i geolokaciji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da LDST dobro izvodi na otkrivanju tema i osećanja iz društvenih medija i praćenju njihovih promjena u različitim geografskim regijama tokom hitnih i katastrofa. Pustit ćemo podatke i izvorni kod nakon objave ovog posla.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා විදියට, විදියට, දැනුම් අඳුන්න සහ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක පණිවිඩයෙන් වෙනස් භාත්\u200d අපි ස්ථානය අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපක විද්\u200dයාපකයක් (LDST) ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරන්න පු පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා LDST ගොඩක් හොඳ විදිහට සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් හොය අපි මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු පස්සේ දත්ත සහ ප්\u200dරභාව කෝඩ් නිදහස් කරන්නම්.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் பிரச்சனையை கண்டுபிடிப்பது பிரச்சனையில் படிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் துன்பங்கள் மற்றும் போது வித்தியாசமான ஊடக உரைகளி We propose a location-based dynamic sentiment-topic model (LDST) which can jointly model topic, sentiment, time and Geolocation information.  சோதனை முடிவு இந்த வேலை வெளியிடப்பட்ட பிறகு நாம் தகவல் மற்றும் மூல குறியீட்டை விடுவோம்.', 'no': 'Vi studerer problemet med å identifisera emne og følelser og etterfølgja forskyvingane frå sosiale media-tekstar i ulike geografiske område under utviklingar og katastrof. Vi foreslår ein dynamisk sentimentemål- modell (LDST) basert på plasseringsplassering, som kan samstundes modellere emne, sentiment, tid og geoplasseringsinformasjon. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at LDST utfører svært godt ved å oppdaga emne og følelser frå sosiale medier og etterfølgja forskyvingane i ulike geografiske område under utviklingar og katastrof. Vi vil opna data og kjeldekoden etter at denne arbeiden er publisert.', 'ur': 'ہم نے موضوع اور احساسات کا شناسایا کرنا اور ان کی تغییرات کو سوسیل میڈیا پیغام میں مختلف جغرافی منطقه میں تلاش کرنا ہے۔ ہم ایک موقعیت-بنیادی دینامیک احساس-ٹوپ موڈل (LDST) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک ساتھ موڈل، احساس، زمان اور جئئوٹوک معلومات سکتا ہے۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ LDST بہت اچھا کام کرتا ہے سوسیل میڈیا سے موضوع اور احساسات اچھی طرح اور مختلف جغرافی منطقه میں ان کی تغییرات تلاش کرتا ہے۔ ہم اس کام کے منتشر ہونے کے بعد ڈیٹا اور سورس کوڈ آزاد کریں گے.', 'uz': "Biz mavzu va hissiyotni aniqlashning muammolarini o'rganamiz va shaxsiy holatda boshqa jamiyat media matnlaridan o'zgarishlarni o'rganamiz. Mavzu, sentiment, vaqt va Geolocation haqida birlashtirish mumkin. Tekshirish natijalari, LDST muammolarni topish va hissiyotni ko'rsatish va shaxsiyatlar va shaxsiyatlar paytida boshqa geografik sohalarda o'zgarishlarni o'rganish uchun juda yaxshi ishlaydi. Biz shu vazifa publiclashdan keyin maʼlumot va manba kodi chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề xác định các chủ đề và tình cảm, và theo dõi sự thay đổi của họ từ các văn bản truyền thông xã hội ở các địa điểm khác nhau trong trường hợp khẩn cấp và thảm họa. Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình động tình cảm ở địa điểm (LDST) có thể cùng mô hình về chủ đề, tình cảm, thời gian và địa điểm. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy LDAP rất tài giỏi trong việc tìm ra các chủ đề và cảm xúc từ các phương tiện xã hội và theo dõi sự thay đổi của họ tại các địa phương khác nhau trong trường hợp khẩn cấp và thảm họa. Chúng tôi sẽ phát hành dữ liệu và mã nguồn sau khi công việc này được công bố.', 'nl': "We bestuderen het probleem van het identificeren van de onderwerpen en sentimenten en het volgen van hun verschuivingen van sociale media teksten in verschillende geografische regio's tijdens noodsituaties en rampen. We stellen een locatie-based dynamisch sentiment-topic model (LDST) voor dat gezamenlijk onderwerp, sentiment, tijd en geolocatie informatie kan modelleren. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat LDST zeer goed presteert in het ontdekken van onderwerpen en sentimenten van sociale media en het volgen van hun verschuivingen in verschillende geografische regio's tijdens noodsituaties en rampen. We zullen de gegevens en broncode vrijgeven nadat dit werk is gepubliceerd.", 'bg': 'Проучваме проблема с идентифицирането на темите и настроенията и проследяването на тяхното изместване от текстовете в социалните медии в различни географски региони по време на извънредни ситуации и бедствия. Предлагаме динамичен сентимент-тематичен модел, базиран на местоположението, който може съвместно да моделира тема, сентимент, време и геолокация информация. Експерименталните резултати показват, че ЛДСТ се справя много добре в откриването на теми и настроения от социалните медии и проследяването на техните промени в различни географски региони по време на извънредни ситуации и бедствия. Ще публикуваме данните и изходния код след публикуването на тази работа.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo problem identifikacije tema i osjećaja i praćenja njihovih promjena iz teksta socijalnih medija u različitim geografskim regijama tijekom hitnih i katastrofa. Predlažemo dinamični model teme osjećaja na lokaciji (LDST), koji može zajedno modelirati informacije o temi, osjećaju, vremenu i geolokaciji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da LDST dobro izvodi na otkrivanju tema i osjećaja iz društvenih medija i praćenju njihovih promjena u različitim geografskim regijama tijekom hitnih i katastrofa. Pustit ćemo podatke i izvorni kod nakon objave ovog rada.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger problemet med at identificere emner og følelser og spore deres skift fra sociale medier tekster i forskellige geografiske regioner under nødsituationer og katastrofer. Vi foreslår en lokationsbaseret dynamisk sentiment-emne model (LDST), som i fællesskab kan modellere emne, sentiment, tid og geolocation information. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at LDST klarer sig meget godt til at opdage emner og følelser fra sociale medier og spore deres skift i forskellige geografiske regioner under nødsituationer og katastrofer. Vi frigiver data og kildekode, når dette arbejde er offentliggjort.', 'ko': '우리가 연구한 문제는 긴급한 상황과 재난 기간에 서로 다른 지리적 지역의 소셜 미디어 텍스트에서 주제와 정서를 식별하고 그들의 변화를 추적하는 것이다.우리는 화제, 감정, 시간과 지리적 위치 정보를 연합하여 모델링할 수 있는 위치 기반의 동적 감정 화제 모델(LDST)을 제시했다.실험 결과 LDST는 소셜미디어에서 화두와 감정을 발견하고 유사시와 재난 기간 지리적 영역별 변화를 추적하는 데 뛰어난 모습을 보였다.우리는 이 작업이 발표된 후에 데이터와 원본 코드를 발표할 것이다.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah mengenai mengidentifikasi topik dan perasaan dan melacak perubahan dari teks media sosial di daerah geografi yang berbeda selama keadaan darurat dan bencana. Kami mengusulkan model emosi-topik dinamik berdasarkan lokasi (LDST) yang dapat bersama-sama model topik, emosi, waktu dan informasi Geolokasi. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa LDST bekerja dengan baik dalam menemukan topik dan perasaan dari media sosial dan melacak perubahan mereka di daerah geografi yang berbeda selama keadaan darurat dan bencana. Kita akan melepaskan data dan kode sumber setelah pekerjaan ini diterbitkan.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das Problem, Themen und Gefühle zu identifizieren und deren Verschiebungen von Social Media Texten in verschiedenen geografischen Regionen während Notfällen und Katastrophen zu verfolgen. Wir schlagen ein standortbasiertes dynamisches Sentiment-Topic-Modell (LDST) vor, das gemeinsam Themen-, Sentiment-, Zeit- und Geolocation-Informationen modellieren kann. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass LDST sehr gut dabei ist, Themen und Gefühle aus sozialen Medien zu entdecken und deren Verschiebungen in verschiedenen geografischen Regionen während Notfällen und Katastrophen zu verfolgen. Wir werden die Daten und den Quellcode nach Veröffentlichung dieser Arbeit veröffentlichen.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل شناسایی موضوع و احساسات را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم و تغییرات آنها را از متن رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی در منطقه\u200cهای جغرافی مختلف در طول حادثه\u200cها و فاجعه\u200cها دنبال می\u200cکنیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل احساسات و موضوع (LDST) که می\u200cتواند با هم موضوع، احساسات، زمان و اطلاعات جغرافی را مدل کند. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که LDST در کشف موضوع و احساسات از رسانه های اجتماعی بسیار خوب انجام می دهد و تغییرات آنها را در منطقه های جغرافی مختلف در طول حادثه اضطراری و فاجعه ها ردیابی می کند. بعد از اینکه این کار منتشر شد، اطلاعات و کد منبع را آزاد می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunafundisha tatizo la kutambua mada na hisia na kufuatilia mabadiliko yao kutoka kwenye ujumbe wa mitandao ya kijamii katika maeneo mbalimbali ya jiografia wakati wa dharura na majanga. Tunazipendekeza mtindo wa hisia-mada wa eneo hilo (LDST) ambao unaweza kuunda mada, hisia, wakati na taarifa za kujitenga kwa pamoja. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba LDST inafanya vizuri katika kutambua mada na hisia kutoka kwenye mitandao ya kijamii na kufuatilia mabadiliko yao katika maeneo mbalimbali ya jiografia wakati wa matatizo na majanga. Tutaachia taarifa na taarifa za vyanzo baada ya kazi hii ilichapishwa.', 'tr': 'Biz temalary we duýgularyny tanap we sosyal medýdanlaryň metinlerinden çykyşyny çykarmak we çykyşlyklaryň dürli geografik bölgelerinde öwrenip barýarys. Bir ýer tabanly duýgular-tema nusgasyny (LDST) bilen nusgasyna, duýgular, zamany we ýerleşdirilip biljek bir nusgasyny teklip edip bileris. Deneysel netijeler LDST sosyal medýdanlaryň temalary we duýgularyny tapmakda örän gowy edip ýöreýändigini görkeýär we olaryň görnüşlerini dürli geografik bölgelerde ajaýyp ýagdaýlar wagtynda yzarlaýar. Bu işi basypdan soň veri we çeşme kody çykarjak.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die probleem van die onderwerpe en sentimente te identifiseer en hulle verskuiwes van sosiale media tekste in verskillende geografiese regione tydens nugtige en katastrofe. Ons voorstel 'n ligging-gebaseerde dinamiese sentiment-onderwerp model (LDST) wat jointly model onderwerp, sentiment, tyd en Geoligging inligting kan word. Die eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat LDST baie goed uitvoer by ontdekking van onderwerpe en sentimente van sosiale media en hulle verskuiwes in verskillende geografiese regione onder uitbreidings en katastrofe. Ons sal die data en bronkode verlos na hierdie werk gepubliseer word.", 'am': 'የአስቸኳይ ግዜ እና ጉዳይ በተለዩ የጂዮግራፊ ክልሎች ያሉትን የጦማሪ ሚዲያ ጽሑፎቻቸውን ለማሳወቅ ጉዳይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ ቦታ፣ አስተያየት፣ ሰዓት እና ዝግጅት መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም የሚችል የድምፅ አስተያየት አካባቢ (LDST) ሞዴል እናስጀምራለን፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች LDST ከማኅበራዊ አውታር መሬቶች እና ስሜቶችን በመግለጥ እና በአስቸጋሪና በጉዳይ ጊዜ የተለየ የጂዮግራፊ ክፍሎች መተላለፊያቸውን በመግለጥ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህ ሥራ ከተገለጸ በኋላ የዳታ እና የኩነቶች ኮድ እናወጣለን፡፡', 'sq': 'We study the problem of identifying the topics and sentiments and tracking their shifts from social media texts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters.  Ne propozojmë një model dinamik ndjesi-temë bazuar në vendndodhje (LDST) që mund të modelojë së bashku tematin, ndjesinë, kohën dhe informacionin gjeologjik. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se LDST punon shumë mirë në zbulimin e temave dhe ndjenjave nga media sociale dhe ndjekjen e ndryshimeve të tyre në rajone të ndryshme gjeografike gjatë emergjencës dhe katastrofave. Ne do të lëshojmë të dhënat dhe kodin burimor pasi ky punë të botohet.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք թեմաների և զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման խնդիրը և հետևում ենք դրանց տեղափոխություններին սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տեքստներից տարբեր գերագրական տարածքներում անհրաժեշտությունների և աղետների ընթացքում: Մենք առաջարկում ենք տեղադրության վրա հիմնված դինամիկ զգացմունքների թեմայի (ԼԴՍԹ) մոդել, որը միասին կարող է մոդելավորել թեմա, զգացմունքներ, ժամանակ և գեոտեղադրության տեղեկատվություն: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ԼԴՍԹ-ը շատ լավ աշխատում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների թեմաների և զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման և տեղափոխությունների հետևելու համար տարբեր գերագրական տարածքներում անհրաժեշտությունների և աղետների ընթա We will release the data and source code after this work is published.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন জরুরী এবং দুর্যোগের সময় সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের টেক্সট থেকে তাদের পরিবর্তন চিহ্নিত করার সমস্যা আমরা গবেষণা করছি। আমরা একটি অবস্থান ভিত্তিক আবেগ-বিষয়বস্তু মডেল (এলডিএসটি) প্রস্তাব করি যা একত্রে মডেল বিষয়, অনুভূতি, সময় এবং জিওলোকশন তথ্য মোডেল করতে পারে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এলডিএসটি সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম থেকে বিষয় এবং অনুভূতি আবিষ্কার করে এবং জরুরী এবং বিপর্যয়ের সময় বিভিন্ন ভূমিকার এলাকায় এই কাজ প্রকাশিত হওয়ার পর আমরা তথ্য এবং উৎস কোড মুক্তি দেব।', 'az': 'Biz məsələləri, hissləri tanıma və sosyal media məktublarından dəyişikliklərini müxtəlif geografik bölgelerində təşkil etmək və fəsad törətmək üçün çalışırıq. Yer-tərəfində olan dinamik hisslər-məsələlər modeli (LDST) təklif edirik ki, məsələləri, hissləri, vaxt və Geolokasyon məlumatlarını birlikdə modelləşdirə bilər. Müxtəlif sonuçlar LDST sosyal mediyaların məsələlərini və hisslərini keşfetməkdə çox yaxşı işlər edir və onların dəyişikliklərini müxtəlif geografik bölgelerində istifadə edir. Bu işin yayınlandığından sonra məlumatları və mənbə kodunu yayınlayacağıq.', 'bs': 'Proučavamo problem identifikacije tema i osjećaja i praćenja njihovih promjena iz tekstova socijalnih medija u različitim geografskim regijama tijekom hitnih i katastrofa. Predlažemo dinamični model teme sentiment a na lokaciji (LDST), koji može zajedno modelirati informacije o temi, osjećanju, vremenu i geolokaciji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da LDST dobro izvodi na otkrivanju tema i osjećaja iz društvenih medija i praćenju njihovih promjena u različitim geografskim regijama tijekom hitnih i katastrofa. Pustit ćemo podatke i izvorni kod nakon objave ovog posla.', 'cs': 'Studujeme problém identifikace témat a citů a sledování jejich posunu z textů sociálních médií v různých geografických oblastech během mimořádných situací a katastrof. Navrhujeme dynamický model sentimentu založený na lokalitě (LDST), který může společně modelovat informace o tématu, sentimentu, čase a geolokaci. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že LDST se velmi dobře vede při odhalování témat a sentimentů ze sociálních médií a sledování jejich posunu v různých geografických oblastech během mimořádných situací a katastrof. Data a zdrojový kód uvolníme po zveřejnění této práce.', 'et': 'Uurime teemade ja tunnetuste tuvastamise probleemi ning nende muutuste jälgimise probleemi sotsiaalmeedia tekstidest erinevates geograafilistes piirkondades hädaolukordade ja katastroofide ajal. Pakume välja asukohapõhise dünaamilise sentimentaalse teema mudeli (LDST), mis suudab ühiselt modelleerida teema, sentimentaalsuse, aja ja geolokatsiooni teavet. Katsetulemused näitavad, et LDST suudab väga hästi avastada teemasid ja tundeid sotsiaalmeedias ning jälgida nende muutusi eri geograafilistes piirkondades hädaolukordade ja katastroofide ajal. Andmed ja lähtekoodi avaldame pärast selle töö avaldamist.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme aiheiden ja tunteiden tunnistamista ja niiden siirtymistä sosiaalisen median teksteistä eri maantieteellisillä alueilla hätätilanteiden ja katastrofien aikana. Ehdotamme sijaintiin perustuvaa dynaamista tuntemus-aihemallia (LDST), joka voi yhdessä mallintaa aihe-, tunne-, aika- ja geolokaatiotietoja. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että LDST pystyy erittäin hyvin löytämään aiheita ja tunteita sosiaalisesta mediasta ja seuraamaan niiden muutoksia eri maantieteellisillä alueilla hätätilanteissa ja katastrofeissa. Julkaisemme aineiston ja lähdekoodin työn julkaisemisen jälkeen.', 'ca': "Estudem el problema d'identificar els temes i sentiments i seguir els seus canvis dels textos dels mitjans socials en diferents regions geogràfiques durant emergencies i desastres. Proposem un model de tema de sentiment dinàmic basat en la localització (LDST) que pot modelar conjuntament informació sobre tema, sentiment, temps i geolocalització. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el LDST es dóna molt bé a descobrir temes i sentiments dels mitjans socials i a seguir els seus canvis a diferents regions geogràfics durant emergencies i desastres. We will release the data and source code after this work is published.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé jajal perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar nggawe tema karo Seneng nglanggar ujaran mulai nggawe ngubah kuwi texti media sotiki nang kaya jeografi sing gawe nguwarni winih sing katêpakan karo hal-iki. Awak dhéwé ngeruhke sistem-sistem sistem sing basa nêmên, gambar, terus lan informasi jewêrung nêmên. Rejaliane sing paling-paling dipontrolan ngono hal-paling bakal dumadhining kalang kelas karo pakem sing dumadhil karo perambul kuwi tindakan media sothik karo ngubah ujaran kanggo ngubah ujaran jeografi sing paling maneh lan jeografi sing bisa pasar. Awak dhéwé bakal ngewehke dadi lan kelompok kuwi ngéwé ngerjaké iki.', 'ha': "Munã karatun matsalar da za'a gane madaidaita da hisia kuma mu bi musanya daga matsayin mitandai na jamii cikin regional dabam-daban geografi a lokacin da za'a kashe su. Munã buɗe wani misali na madaidaita wanda ke samar da a wuri (LDS) wanda ke iya iya motsa madaidaici, da hisoyi, da lokaci da maɓallin cioyi. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa LDS ke aikata mazaɓa mai kyau a kan gane madaidaita da hisia daga mitandan jamii kuma ya bi musanyi da su a cikin regional dabam-daban geographical a lokacin da za'a yi shige. Za sakar da kodi na danne da kwanan aiki a bayan a nuna wannan aikin.", 'sk': 'Proučujemo problem prepoznavanja teme in občutkov ter sledenja njihovim premikom od besedil na družbenih medijih v različnih geografskih regijah med izrednimi razmerami in nesrečami. Predlagamo model dinamične sentimentalne teme na lokaciji (LDST), ki lahko skupaj modelira temo, sentimenta, čas in geolokacijske informacije. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da LDST zelo dobro odkriva teme in občutke iz družbenih omrežij ter sledi njihovim premikom v različnih geografskih regijah med izrednimi razmerami in nesrečami. Podatke in izvorno kodo bomo objavili po objavi tega dela.', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של זיהוי הנושאים והרגשות ולעקב אחר המשמרות שלהם מסמכים של התקשורת החברתית באזורים גאוגרפיים שונים במהלך מקרים חירום ואסונות. אנו מציעים מודל נושא רגשות דינמי מבוסס במיקום (LDST) שיכול למדל יחד נושא, רגשות, זמן ומידע גיאולוקציה. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות כי LDST מצליח מאוד לגלות נושאים ומרגשות ממדיה חברתית ולעקב אחר המשמרות שלהם באזורים גיאוגרפיים שונים במהלך מקרים חירום ואסונות. We will release the data and source code after this work is published.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་དོན་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་ཚོར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་དང་། རྣམ་གནས་ཚུལ་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ We propose a location-based dynamic sentiment-topic model (LDST) which can jointly model topic, sentiment, time and Geolocation information. experimental results demonstrate that LDST performs very well at discovering topics and sentiments from social media and tracking their shifts in different geographical regions during emergencies and disasters. བྱ་ཚིག་འདི་དཔར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་རྗེས་ཀྱིས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཨང་རྩིས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད'}
{'en': 'Refining Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'تكرير الكلمات المتضمنة لتحليل المشاعر', 'pt': 'Refinando Word Embeddings para Análise de Sentimentos', 'fr': "Affiner les intégrations de mots pour l'analyse des sentiments", 'es': 'Refinando las incrustaciones de palabras para el análisis de opiniones', 'ja': 'センチメント分析のための単語埋め込みの改善', 'zh': '优化以情析之词嵌之', 'hi': 'भावना विश्लेषण के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग को परिष्कृत करना', 'ru': 'Уточнение вложений слов для анализа настроений', 'ga': 'Leabú Focal a Mheabhsú le hAghaidh Anailís Mothúchán', 'ka': 'სიტყვების ინტებექციის გაგრძელება Sentiment ანალიზაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Szóbeágyazások finomítása az érzelmek elemzéséhez', 'el': 'Βελτίωση των ενσωματώσεων λέξεων για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων', 'it': "Raffinare le incorporazioni di parole per l'analisi dei sentimenti", 'kk': 'Жіберуші анализ үшін сөздерді ендіру', 'lt': 'Rafinuojant žodžių įdėjimus jautrumo analizei', 'mk': 'Рафинирање на вградувањата на зборови за анализа на чувствата', 'ms': 'Menyempurnakan Penjelmaan Kata untuk Analisi Sentiment', 'ml': 'സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങുകള്\u200d പുതുക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Sentiment шинжилгээний үг нэвтрүүлэх', 'mt': 'Riffinar tal-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment', 'pl': 'Doskonalenie osadzeń słowa do analizy sentymentów', 'no': 'Refiner tekstinnbygging for sendingsanalyser', 'ro': 'Rafinarea încorporărilor de cuvinte pentru analiza sentimentelor', 'si': 'වාර්තාව විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා වචනය ඇම්බෙඩ් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය කරනවා', 'so': 'Fiirinta qalabka hadalka', 'sv': 'Förfina ordinbäddningar för känsloanalys', 'sr': 'Refiniranje uključenja reèi za analizu sentimenta', 'ta': 'உணர்வு ஆராய்வுக்கான வார்த்தை புதுப்பிக்கிறது', 'ur': 'سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل کے لئے ویڈ انڈینگ ڈیفٹ کیے جاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Sentiment Analysi uchun soò£z oò£rnatilmoqda', 'vi': 'Nhúng chữ vào vết phân tích tình cảm', 'da': 'Raffinering af ordindlejringer til følelsesanalyse', 'nl': 'Woordinsluitingen verfijnen voor sentimentanalyse', 'id': 'Menyempurnakan Embedding Word untuk Analisi Sentiment', 'bg': 'Уточняване на вграждането на думи за анализ на чувствата', 'hr': 'Refiniranje uključenja riječi za analizu osjećaja', 'ko': '정서 분석에 사용되는 세분화 단어 삽입', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Seneti', 'de': 'Verfeinern von Word-Einbettungen für die Stimmungsanalyse', 'tr': 'Senedi Taýýarlamak üçin Sözler Refine Et', 'af': 'Verwyder Woord Inbetering vir Sentiment Analiseer', 'sq': 'Refining Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'fa': 'تغییر وارد کردن کلمه برای تحلیل فرصت', 'bs': 'Refining Embedding Word for Sentiment Analysis', 'bn': 'সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য শব্দের বার্তা সংরক্ষণ করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'Sentiment Analizi üçün Kelimi İçeri', 'hy': 'Comment', 'cs': 'Zlepšení vložení slov pro analýzu sentimentů', 'ca': 'Refining Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamise täpsustamine sentimentaalüüsi jaoks', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten tarkentaminen tunteiden analysointia varten', 'jv': 'Ngubah Kemerdekaan Sentiment', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje vdelav besed za analizo čustva', 'he': 'מגדיר קידום מילים לניתוח רגשות', 'ha': 'Yi Reference wa Bayani da aka Ƙara wa Analyze na Saidai', 'bo': 'Sentiment Analysis ལ་ཆ་མཚོན་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་མཚོན་རྟགས་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Word embeddings that can capture semantic and syntactic information from contexts have been extensively used for various natural language processing tasks. However, existing methods for learning context-based word embeddings typically fail to capture sufficient sentiment information. This may result in words with similar vector representations having an opposite sentiment polarity (e.g., good and bad), thus degrading sentiment analysis performance. Therefore, this study proposes a word vector refinement model that can be applied to any pre-trained word vectors (e.g., Word2vec and GloVe). The refinement model is based on adjusting the vector representations of words such that they can be closer to both semantically and sentimentally similar words and further away from sentimentally dissimilar words. Experimental results show that the proposed method can improve conventional word embeddings and outperform previously proposed sentiment embeddings for both binary and fine-grained classification on Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots qui peuvent capturer des informations sémantiques et syntaxiques à partir de contextes ont été largement utilisées pour diverses tâches de traitement du langage naturel. Cependant, les méthodes existantes d'apprentissage des intégrations de mots contextuelles ne parviennent généralement pas à saisir suffisamment d'informations sur les sentiments. Cela peut entraîner des mots avec des représentations vectorielles similaires ayant une polarité de sentiment opposée (par exemple, bon et mauvais), dégradant ainsi les performances d'analyse des sentiments. Par conséquent, cette étude propose un modèle de raffinement de vecteur de mots qui peut être appliqué à tous les vecteurs de mots pré-entraînés (par exemple, Word2VEC et Glove). Le modèle de raffinement est basé sur l'ajustement des représentations vectorielles de mots de telle sorte qu'ils puissent être plus proches de mots similaires sur le plan sémantique et sentimentalement similaires et plus éloignés des mots sentimentalement dissemblables. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que la méthode proposée peut améliorer les intégrations de mots classiques et surpasser les intégrations de sentiment proposées précédemment pour la classification binaire et fine sur Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).", 'pt': 'Embeddings de palavras que podem capturar informações semânticas e sintáticas de contextos têm sido amplamente usados para várias tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural. No entanto, os métodos existentes para aprender incorporações de palavras baseadas em contexto geralmente falham em capturar informações de sentimento suficientes. Isso pode resultar em palavras com representações vetoriais semelhantes com uma polaridade de sentimento oposta (por exemplo, bom e ruim), degradando assim o desempenho da análise de sentimento. Portanto, este estudo propõe um modelo de refinamento de vetor de palavras que pode ser aplicado a quaisquer vetores de palavras pré-treinados (por exemplo, Word2vec e GloVe). O modelo de refinamento é baseado no ajuste das representações vetoriais das palavras de forma que elas possam estar mais próximas de palavras semanticamente e sentimentalmente semelhantes e mais distantes de palavras sentimentalmente diferentes. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o método proposto pode melhorar os embeddings de palavras convencionais e superar os embeddings de sentimento propostos anteriormente para classificação binária e refinada no Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'ar': 'تم استخدام عمليات تضمين الكلمات التي يمكنها التقاط المعلومات الدلالية والنحوية من السياقات على نطاق واسع في العديد من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأساليب الحالية لتعلم تضمين الكلمات المستندة إلى السياق عادةً ما تفشل في الحصول على معلومات كافية عن المشاعر. قد ينتج عن ذلك كلمات ذات تمثيلات متجهية متشابهة لها قطبية عاطفية معاكسة (على سبيل المثال ، جيدة وسيئة) ، مما يؤدي إلى تدهور أداء تحليل المشاعر. لذلك ، تقترح هذه الدراسة نموذجًا لتحسين متجه الكلمات يمكن تطبيقه على أي متجهات كلمات مُدرَّبة مسبقًا (على سبيل المثال ، Word2vec و GloVe). يعتمد نموذج الصقل على ضبط تمثيلات المتجهات للكلمات بحيث يمكن أن تكون أقرب إلى الكلمات المتشابهة لغويًا وعاطفيًا وبعيدًا عن الكلمات المتباينة عاطفياً. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة يمكن أن تحسن عمليات دمج الكلمات التقليدية وتتفوق في الأداء على زخارف المشاعر المقترحة مسبقًا لكل من التصنيف الثنائي والدقيق الحبيبات في Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras que pueden capturar información semántica y sintáctica de contextos se han utilizado ampliamente para diversas tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, los métodos existentes para aprender incrustaciones de palabras basadas en el contexto generalmente no capturan suficiente información de opinión. Esto puede dar como resultado palabras con representaciones vectoriales similares que tienen una polaridad de opinión opuesta (por ejemplo, buena y mala), degradando así el rendimiento del análisis de opinión. Por lo tanto, este estudio propone un modelo de refinamiento de vectores de palabras que se puede aplicar a cualquier vector de palabras previamente entrenado (por ejemplo, Word2vec y GLOe). El modelo de refinamiento se basa en ajustar las representaciones vectoriales de las palabras de manera que puedan estar más cerca de palabras semántica y sentimentalmente similares y más alejadas de palabras sentimentalmente diferentes. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el método propuesto puede mejorar la incrustación de palabras convencionales y superar las incrustaciones de sentimiento propuestas anteriormente para la clasificación binaria y detallada en Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'ja': '文脈から意味情報および構文情報を取り込むことができる単語埋め込みは、様々な自然言語処理タスクに広く使用されてきた。 しかしながら、文脈に基づく単語埋め込みを学習するための既存の方法は、通常、十分な感情情報を取り込むことができない。 これは、反対の感情の極性（例えば、良くも悪くも）を有する同様のベクトル表現を有する単語をもたらし得、したがって、感情分析のパフォーマンスを低下させる。 したがって、この研究は、任意の事前に訓練されたワードベクトル（例えば、Word 2 vecおよびGloVe ）に適用可能なワードベクトルリファインメントモデルを提案する。 洗練モデルは、言葉のベクトル表現を調整することに基づいており、意味的および感情的に類似した単語の両方に近づき、感情的に異なった単語からさらに離れることができるようになっている。 実験結果は、提案された方法が、従来の単語埋め込みを改善し、スタンフォード・センチメント・ツリーバンク（ SST ）のバイナリ分類と細かい分類の両方について、以前に提案されたセンチメント埋め込みを上回ることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '可以上下文获语义及句法信息之词,广施于诸自然语言。 然学本于上下文词,今法常不可得足之情。 或致相似矢量单词有反情极性(如好恶),以杀情析性也。 故论一可以豫训者词向量(如Word2vecGloVe)之词向量细化。 细化形于调单词之向量,以近语义情之单词,而远情之单词。 实验结果表明,所上法可改旧词嵌入,且优于前所建斯坦福情树库(SST)上二元及细粒度类者嵌之。', 'ru': 'Вложения слов, которые могут захватывать семантическую и синтаксическую информацию из контекстов, широко используются для различных задач обработки естественного языка. Тем не менее, существующие методы изучения контекстных вложений слов, как правило, не захватывают достаточную информацию о настроениях. Это может привести к тому, что слова с похожими векторными представлениями будут иметь противоположную полярность настроений (например, хорошую и плохую), что ухудшит производительность анализа настроений. Поэтому в этом исследовании предлагается модель уточнения вектора слов, которая может быть применена к любым предварительно обученным векторам слов (например, Word2vec и GloVe). Модель уточнения основана на корректировке векторных представлений слов таким образом, чтобы они могли быть ближе как к семантически, так и к сентиментально схожим словам и дальше от сентиментально несхожих слов. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод может улучшить традиционные вложения слов и превзойти ранее предложенные вложения настроений как для двоичной, так и для мелкозернистой классификации на Стэнфордском древовидном банке настроений (SST).', 'hi': 'संदर्भों से शब्दार्थ और वाक्यात्मक जानकारी को कैप्चर करने वाले शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग विभिन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर किया गया है। हालांकि, संदर्भ-आधारित शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए मौजूदा तरीके आमतौर पर पर्याप्त भावना जानकारी कैप्चर करने में विफल रहते हैं। इसके परिणामस्वरूप समान वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व वाले शब्दों में विपरीत भावना ध्रुवीयता (जैसे, अच्छा और बुरा) हो सकती है, इस प्रकार भावना विश्लेषण प्रदर्शन को कम किया जा सकता है। इसलिए, यह अध्ययन एक शब्द वेक्टर शोधन मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करता है जिसे किसी भी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द वैक्टर (जैसे, Word2vec और GloVe) पर लागू किया जा सकता है। शोधन मॉडल शब्दों के वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व को समायोजित करने पर आधारित है जैसे कि वे शब्दार्थ और भावनात्मक रूप से समान शब्दों दोनों के करीब हो सकते हैं और भावनात्मक रूप से असमान शब्दों से दूर हो सकते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि पारंपरिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग में सुधार कर सकती है और स्टैनफोर्ड सेंटिमेंट ट्रीबैंक (एसएसटी) पर बाइनरी और ठीक-ठाक वर्गीकरण दोनों के लिए पहले से प्रस्तावित भावना एम्बेडिंग को मात दे सकती है।', 'ga': "Baineadh leas go forleathan as leabaithe focal ar féidir leo faisnéis shéimeantach agus chomhréire a ghabháil ó chomhthéacsanna le haghaidh tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha éagsúla. Mar sin féin, is gnách go dteipeann ar mhodhanna atá ann cheana féin chun leabú focal comhthéacs-bhunaithe a fhoghlaim dóthain faisnéise meon a ghabháil. D’fhéadfadh sé go mbeadh sé mar thoradh air seo go mbeidh polaraíocht dhearcadh codarsnach ag focail a bhfuil léirithe comhchosúla veicteoirí acu (m.sh., maith agus olc), rud a dhéanfadh táireach ar fheidhmíocht anailíse meon. Mar sin, molann an staidéar seo múnla mionchoigeartaithe veicteoir focal is féidir a chur i bhfeidhm ar aon veicteoirí focal réamhoilte (m.sh., Word2vec agus GloVe). Tá an tsamhail mhionchoigeartaithe bunaithe ar léirithe veicteoirí na bhfocal a choigeartú ionas gur féidir leo a bheith níos gaire d'fhocail atá cosúil le seimeantach agus le cuma sentimental araon agus níos faide ar shiúl ó fhocail neamhchosúla sentimentalacha. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir leis an modh atá molta feabhas a chur ar ghnáthleabú focal agus go n-éireoidh sé níos fearr leis na leabú meon a bhí molta roimhe seo maidir le haicmiú dénártha agus mínghráin ar Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).", 'ka': 'სიტყვების ინტერქსტი, რომელიც შეუძლია სენმანტიკური და სინტაქტიკური ინფორმაციას კონტექსტებიდან გამოყენება განსხვავებული ნატრავილური ენის პროცესირების მო მაგრამ კონტექსტური სიტყვების გასწავლების მიმდინარე მეტირები, როგორც ტიპოლურად შეუძლებელია, რომ სენტიმენტური ინფორმაცია შეიძლება გააკ ეს შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ სიტყვები, რომელიც განსხვავებული გვქტორის გამოსახულებებით, რომელიც განსხვავებული სენტიმენტის პოლარიტია (მაგალითად, კარგი და ცოტა), ამიტომ სენტიმენ ამიტომ, ეს სწავლება მოძლევს სიტყვების რეფინქციის მოდელი, რომელიც შეიძლება აყენება ყველა წინატვირთებული სიტყვების ვიქტორებისთვის (მაგალითად Word2vec და Glove). პრეფინქციის მოდელი დაბაზიან სიტყვების გამოსახულებების განსახულებაზე, რომელიც ისინი შეიძლება იყოს სემონტიკურად და სენტიმენტიკურად მსგავსი სიტყვებისთვის და სხვადასხვადასხვადას ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენების შესაძლებელია, რომ პროგენტიური მეტი შეუძლია უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole che possono catturare informazioni semantiche e sintattiche dai contesti sono state ampiamente utilizzate per varie attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, i metodi esistenti per imparare le incorporazioni di parole basate sul contesto in genere non riescono a catturare sufficienti informazioni sentimentali. Ciò può risultare in parole con rappresentazioni vettoriali simili che hanno una polarità del sentiment opposta (ad esempio, buono e cattivo), degradando così le prestazioni dell'analisi del sentiment. Pertanto, questo studio propone un modello di raffinazione del vettore di parola che può essere applicato a qualsiasi vettore di parola pre-addestrato (ad esempio Word2vec e GloVe). Il modello di perfezionamento si basa sulla regolazione delle rappresentazioni vettoriali delle parole in modo che possano essere più vicine a parole semanticamente e sentimentalmente simili e più lontane da parole sentimentalmente dissimili. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il metodo proposto può migliorare le incorporazioni di parole convenzionali e superare le incorporazioni di sentiment precedentemente proposte sia per la classificazione binaria che a grana fine su Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).", 'hu': 'A kontextusokból származó szemantikai és szintaktikai információkat rögzítő szövegbeágyazásokat széles körben használták különböző természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokhoz. A kontextusalapú szóbeágyazások tanulására szolgáló meglévő módszerek azonban általában nem tudnak elegendő érzelmi információt rögzíteni. Ez azt eredményezheti, hogy a hasonló vektorreprezentációs szavak ellentétes érzelmi polaritással rendelkeznek (pl. jó és rossz), így romlik az érzelmi elemzés teljesítménye. Ezért ez a tanulmány egy szóvektoros finomítási modellt javasol, amely alkalmazható bármely előre képzett szóvektorra (pl. Word2vec és GloVe). A finomítási modell a szavak vektoros reprezentációjának beállításán alapul, úgy, hogy közelebb kerülhessenek a szemantikai és érzelmileg hasonló szavakhoz, és távolabb legyenek az érzelmileg eltérő szavaktól. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer javíthatja a hagyományos szóbeágyazásokat, és felülmúlhatja a korábban javasolt sentiment beágyazásokat mind a bináris, mind a finom szemű osztályozásban Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'el': 'Οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που μπορούν να συλλάβουν σημασιολογικές και συντακτικές πληροφορίες από τα πλαίσια έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί εκτενώς για διάφορες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι για την εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων βασισμένων στο πλαίσιο συνήθως αποτυγχάνουν να συλλάβουν επαρκείς πληροφορίες συναισθημάτων. Αυτό μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε λέξεις με παρόμοιες διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις να έχουν αντίθετη πολικότητα συναισθημάτων (π.χ., καλή και κακή), υποβαθμίζοντας έτσι την απόδοση ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων. Ως εκ τούτου, η παρούσα μελέτη προτείνει ένα μοντέλο βελτίωσης διανυσμάτων λέξεων που μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε οποιαδήποτε προ-εκπαιδευμένα διανύσματα λέξεων (π.χ., Word2vec και GloVe). Το μοντέλο τελειοποίησης βασίζεται στην προσαρμογή των διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων των λέξεων έτσι ώστε να μπορούν να είναι πιο κοντά σε σημασιολογικά και συναισθηματικά παρόμοιες λέξεις και πιο μακριά από συναισθηματικά διαφορετικές λέξεις. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μπορεί να βελτιώσει τις συμβατικές ενσωματώσεις λέξεων και να ξεπεράσει τις προηγούμενες προτεινόμενες ενσωματώσεις συναισθημάτων τόσο για τη δυαδική όσο και για την λεπτόκοκκη ταξινόμηση στην τράπεζα συναισθημάτων του Στάνφορντ.', 'lt': 'Įterpiami žodžiai, galintys surinkti semantinę ir sintaksinę informaciją iš kontekstų, buvo plačiai naudojami įvairioms gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotims. Tačiau esami mokymosi kontekstu grindžiamų žodžių įtraukimo metodai paprastai nesuteikia pakankamai jautrumo informacijos. This may result in words with similar vector representations having an opposite sentiment polarity (e.g., good and bad), thus degrading sentiment analysis performance.  Todėl šiame tyrime siūlomas žodžio vektorių patobulinimo modelis, kuris gali būti taikomas visiems iš anksto parengtiems žodžio vektoriams (pvz., Word2vec ir GloVe). Rafinavimo model is grindžiamas koreguojant žodžių vektorių rodmenis taip, kad jie galėtų būti artimesni tiek semantiškai, tiek sentimentaliai panašiems žodžiams ir toliau nuo sentimentaliai skirtingų žodžių. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gali pagerinti tradicinius žodžių įdėjimus ir viršyti anksčiau siūlomus jausmų įdėjimus dviejų ir smulkių grūdų klasifikacijai Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'mk': 'Вклучувањата на зборови кои можат да заземат семантични и синтактички информации од контексти се искористени екстремно за различни природни задачи за обработување јазик. Сепак, постоечките методи за учење на контекстни зборови базирани на контекст обично не можат да прифатат доволно информации за чувствата. Ова може да резултира со зборови со слични векторни претставувања кои имаат спротивна поларитет на чувствата (на пример, добро и лошо), со што се деградираат резултатите на анализата на чувствата. Затоа, оваа студија предложува зборен модел за рефинансирање на векторите кој може да се примени на било кој предобучен зборен вектор (на пример Word2vec и GloVe). Моделот на рафинансирање се базира на прилагодување на векторните претставувања на зборови така што тие можат да бидат поблиску до семантички и сентиментално слични зборови и далеку од сентиментално различни зборови. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот метод може да ги подобри конвенционалните вградувања на зборови и да ги надмине претходно предложените вградувања на чувства за бинарна и фина класификација на Стенфорд Сентимент Treebank (ССТ).', 'ms': 'Name Namun, kaedah yang wujud untuk mempelajari pembenaman perkataan berdasarkan konteks biasanya gagal menangkap maklumat sentimen yang cukup. Ini boleh menghasilkan perkataan dengan persembahan vektor yang sama mempunyai polariti perasaan bertentangan (cth., baik dan buruk), sehingga prestasi analisis perasaan yang rendah. Oleh itu, kajian ini mencadangkan model penyembuhan vektor perkataan yang boleh dilaksanakan pada mana-mana vektor perkataan terlatih dahulu (cth., Word2vec dan GloVe). Model penarafan berdasarkan penyesuaian perwakilan vektor perkataan sehingga ia boleh lebih dekat dengan perkataan yang sama secara semantik dan sentimental dan jauh dari perkataan yang sentimentally berbeza. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh meningkatkan penyembedding perkataan konvensional dan melampaui penyembedding sentimen yang diusulkan sebelumnya untuk kedua-dua kelasukan binari dan benih-gandum di Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കും സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുവാന്\u200d സാധാരണ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വ് എന്നാലും സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഇത് വെക്റ്ററിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ (ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി നല്ലതും മോശവുമുള്ളതു്) കൊണ അതുകൊണ്ട് ഈ പഠനം വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ശുദ്ധീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വാക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അതിനു മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ക്രമീകരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ് ഈ മോഡല്\u200d അവയ്ക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകളും സാ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡ് സെന്\u200dടിമെന്\u200dറ് ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡ് സെന്\u200dറ്റര്\u200dമെന്\u200dറ് ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d ഉള്', 'kk': 'Семантикалық және синтактикалық мәліметті контексттерден алу мүмкін болатын сөздерді ендіру әртүрлі табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмалары үшін қолданылады. Бірақ, контексті сөздерге негізделген сөздерді үйрену әдістері кәдімгі мәліметті жеткілікті түсінбейді. Бұл сөздерге ұқсас вектордың түрінде қарсы сезімдердің поляриясы (мысалы, жақсы және жаман) болуы мүмкін, сондықтан сезімдердің анализациясының әрекетін азайту мүмкін. Сондықтан бұл зерттеу кез келген алдын- оқылған сөздер векторына қолданатын сөздерді рефининг үлгісін ұсынады (мысалы, Word2vec және Glove). Рефининг үлгісі сөздердің вектордың кескіндерін түзетуге негізделген, сондықтан олар семантикалық және сентименталдық сөздерге жақын болады және сентименталдық сөздерге ұқсас болады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер таңдалған әдістердің кәдімгі сөздерді ендіру және алдыңғы таңдалған сезімдер ендіру үшін Станфорд Sentiment Treebank (SST) секретінде екі бинарлық және таңдалған классификациясының қа', 'mn': 'Синтактик болон синтактик мэдээллийг тодорхойлж чадах үгнүүд нь олон байгалийн хэл боловсруулах үйл ажиллагаанд маш их ашиглана. Гэхдээ орчин тойронд суралцах арга зам нь мэдрэмжтэй мэдээллийг авч чадахгүй. Энэ нь эсрэг сэтгэл хөдлөл (жишээ нь, сайн, муу), мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний үйл ажиллагааг бууруулж болно. Тиймээс энэ судалгаа ямар ч урд сургалтын үгний векторууд (жишээ нь Word2vec болон Glove) дээр хэрэглэгдэж болно гэсэн үгний рефингер загварыг сануулдаг. Шинэ цэвэрлэлтийн загвар нь хэлбэрийн тодорхойлолтуудыг зөвшөөрүүлэхээр суурилуулагдсан бөгөөд тэдгээр үгүүдийн тодорхойлолтуудын тодорхойлолтуудын тодорхойлолтуудын тодорхойлолтуудын тулд ихэ Үүний туршилтын үр дүнг нь Стэнфорд Сентимент Treebank (SST) дээрх хоёр давхар болон цэвэр давхар тарианы хуваалцааны хуваалцааны хуваалцааны хуваалцааны арга нь улам хэмжээний үг нэмэгдүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem li jistgħu jaqbdu informazzjoni semantika u sintattika minn kuntesti ntużaw b’mod estensiv għal diversi kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Madankollu, il-metodi eżistenti għat-tagħlim tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem ibbażati fuq il-kuntest tipikament jonqsu milli jaqbdu biżżejjed informazzjoni dwar is-sensazzjoni. Dan jista’ jirriżulta fi kliem b’rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ vetturi simili li jkollhom polarità ta’ sensazzjoni opposta (e ż., tajba u ħażina), u b’hekk jiddegradaw il-prestazzjoni tal-analiżi tas-sensazzjoni. Għalhekk, dan l-istudju jipproponi mudell ta’ raffinar tal-kliem vettur li jista’ jiġi applikat g ħal kwalunkwe vettur tal-kliem imħarreġ minn qabel (e ż., Word2vec u GloVe). Il-mudell tar-raffinar huwa bbażat fuq l-aġġustament tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi tal-kliem b’tali mod li jistgħu jkunu eqreb kemm għal kliem semantiku kif ukoll sentimentalment simili u ’l bogħod minn kliem sentimentalment differenti. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu propost jista’ jtejjeb l-inkorporazzjonijiet konvenzjonali tal-kliem u jwettaq inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentimenti proposti qabel kemm għall-klassifikazzjoni binarja kif ukoll għal klassifikazzjoni ta’ ħbub fin fuq is-Sentiment Treebank (SST) ta’ Stanford.', 'no': 'Ordinnbygging som kan henta semantisk og syntaksisk informasjon frå kontekstar er utvida brukt for ulike naturlege språkshandsamingsoppgåver. Men eksisterande metodar for å læra kontekstbaserte ordinnbygging vanlegvis kan ikkje henta nok følelsesinformasjon. Dette kan føre til ord med liknande vektorrepresentasjonar som har eit motsatt sentiment- polaritet (f.eks. godt og dårlig), slik at sentimentanaliseringar er forvrengde. Dette studiet foreslår derfor eit ordvektorrefineringsmodell som kan brukast til alle føretrainerte ordvektorar (f.eks. Word2vec og Glove). Refineringsmodellen er basert på å justera vektorrepresentasjonane av ord slik at dei kan vera nærmere både semantisk og sentimentelt liknande ord og lenger bort frå sentimentelt ulike ord. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde metoden kan forbetra konvensjonelle ordinnbygging og utføra førehandsvising av sentiment for både binær og fingrensert klassifikasjon på Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'pl': 'Integracje słów, które mogą przechwytywać semantyczne i składniowe informacje z kontekstów, zostały szeroko wykorzystane do różnych zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Jednak istniejące metody uczenia się kontekstowych osadzeń słów zazwyczaj nie są w stanie przechwycić wystarczającej ilości informacji o sentymentach. Może to spowodować, że słowa o podobnych reprezentacjach wektorowych mają przeciwną polaryzację sentymentów (np. dobrą i złą), co pogarsza wydajność analizy sentymentów. Dlatego też w niniejszym opracowaniu proponuje się model udoskonalenia wektorów słowa, który może być zastosowany do dowolnych wstępnie przeszkolonych wektorów słowa (np. Word2vec i GloVe). Model udoskonalenia opiera się na dostosowaniu wektorowych reprezentacji słów tak, aby mogły one być bliżej zarówno semantycznie, jak i sentymentalnie podobnych słów i dalej od sentymentalnie odmiennych słów. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda może poprawić konwencjonalne osadzenia słów i przewyższyć wcześniej proponowane osadzenia sentymentów zarówno dla klasyfikacji binarnej, jak i drobnoziarnistej na Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte care pot capta informații semantice și sintactice din contexte au fost utilizate pe scară largă pentru diverse sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, metodele existente pentru învățarea încorporărilor de cuvinte bazate pe context, de obicei, nu reușesc să capteze suficiente informații sentimentale. Acest lucru poate duce la cuvinte cu reprezentări vectoriale similare având o polaritate opusă a sentimentului (de exemplu, bun și rău), degradand astfel performanța analizei sentimentului. Prin urmare, acest studiu propune un model de rafinare a vectorilor de cuvinte care poate fi aplicat oricărui vector de cuvinte pre-instruit (de exemplu, Word2vec și GloVe). Modelul de rafinare se bazează pe ajustarea reprezentărilor vectoriale ale cuvintelor astfel încât acestea să poată fi mai aproape atât de cuvinte semantic, cât și sentimental similare și mai departe de cuvinte sentimental diferite. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda propusă poate îmbunătăți încorporarea convențională a cuvintelor și depăși încorporarea sentimentelor propuse anterior pentru clasificarea binară și fină pe Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'sr': 'Uključenje reèi koje mogu uhvatiti semantičke i sintaktiène informacije iz konteksta široko su korišteno za različite prirodne zadatke za obradu jezika. Međutim, postojeće metode za učenje na kontekstu osnovanih rečima obično ne mogu uhvatiti dovoljno informacija o osjećanjima. To može rezultirati rečima sa sličnim predstavljanjima vektora koji imaju suprotnu polarnost sentimenta (npr. dobru i lošu), tako smanjujući analizu sentimenta. Stoga, ova istraživanja predlaže model refinženja reči vektora koji se može primjenjivati na bilo koji predobučeni vektor reči (npr. Word2vec i Glove). Model refinzije je zasnovan na prilagodbi predstavljanja vektora reèi tako da mogu biti bliže semantičkim i sentimentalno sličnim reèima i dalje od sentimentalno nesličnih reèi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda može poboljšati konvencionalne reèi ugraðenje i izvršiti prethodno predložene sentimentalne integracije za binarnu i fino-zrenu klasifikaciju na Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'si': 'සංවේදනයෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් සහ සංවේදනය තොරතුරු අල්ලන්න පුළුවන් වචන සංවේදනය විවිධ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපන නමුත්, සංවේදනය අධාරිත වචනය ඉගෙනීමට තියෙන්න තියෙන විදිහාවක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට මේක සමාන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වචන වචන වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ (උදාහරණය, හොඳයි නරකයි),  ඉතින්, මේ පරීක්ෂණය යෝජනා කරනවා වචන වෙක්ටර් රිෆින්ජින් මෝඩේල් එකක්, මුලින් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුව වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වචනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වචනය සඳහා වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වචනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වචනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් සෙන්ටිමන්ට් ට්\u200dරීබැන්ක් වල සාමාන්\u200dය වචන සම්බන්ධයක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළු', 'ta': 'Word embeddings that can capture semantic and syntactic information from contexts have been extensively used for various natural language processing tasks.  ஆயினும், சூழல் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள வார்த்தைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள தற்போதைய முறைமை இது வெக்டர் போன்ற வார்த்தைகளுடன் ஒரு எதிர்பார்த்த உணர்வு தீவிரம் (உதாரணமாக நல்ல மற்றும் மோசமாக) இருக்கும் வார்த்தைகளுடன் சொல்லு ஆகையால், இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி ஒரு வார்த்தை வெக்டார் திருத்த மாதிரி முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தை வெக்டார்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்த முட புதுப்பித்தல் மாதிரி வெக்டார் பிரதிநிதிகளின் வார்த்தைகளை சரிபார்க்கும் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது இது போன்ற வார்த்தைகளின் அருகில் இருக்கும பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் தெரியும் முறைமையான முறைமையில் வழக்கமான வார்த்தைகளை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் மற்றும் முன்னால் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு பொருட்களை', 'sv': 'Ordinbäddningar som kan fånga semantisk och syntaktisk information från kontexter har använts i stor utsträckning för olika bearbetningsuppgifter av naturligt språk. Men befintliga metoder för att lära sig kontextbaserade ordinbäddningar misslyckas vanligtvis med att fånga tillräcklig sentimentinformation. Detta kan resultera i att ord med liknande vektorrepresentationer har en motsatt sentimentpolaritet (t.ex. bra och dåligt), vilket försämrar sentimentanalysens prestanda. Därför föreslår denna studie en ordvektorförfiningsmodell som kan tillämpas på alla förkunskaperade ordvektorer (t.ex. Word2vec och GloVe). Förfiningsmodellen bygger på att justera vektorrepresentationerna av ord så att de kan vara närmare både semantiskt och sentimentalt liknande ord och längre bort från sentimentalt olika ord. Experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna metoden kan förbättra konventionella ordinbäddningar och överträffa tidigare föreslagna sentimentinbäddningar för både binära och finkorniga klassificeringar på Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha kala duduwan oo luqada dabiicadda ah waxaa loo isticmaalay si ballaadhan loogu baaraandegay macluumaadka kala duduwan ee la xiriiri karo qoraalka isbedelka iyo isbitaalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka joogta ah ee barashada hadalka ku qoran ee ku qoran qoraalka, sida caadiga ah ma baaqan karo macluumaad ku filan dareemeshada. Taasi waxay ku sababi kartaa hadal ay ku leedahay qof u e g wado oo ay leedahay xaalad ka gees ah (tusaale ahaan wanaag iyo xumaan), taas oo lagu sameynayo sameynta kaleemeyska. Sidaa darteed waxbarashadu wuxuu soo jeedaa model hagitaanka wado oo lagu codsan karo qof kasta oo hadal horay loo tababaray (tusaale ahaan Word2vec iyo GloVe). Tusaalada hagitaanka waxaa lagu saleyn karaa si loo hagaajiyo qofka qaabka ah oo hadalka ku qoran, kuwaas oo ay u dhowaan karaan hadalka isbedelka iyo fikradda isku mid ah iyo si ka fog hadalka kala duwan ee fikradda. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababka la soo jeeday uu hagaajin karo qalabka caadiga ah oo uu horay u soo bandhigi karo qalabka la soo jeeday oo uu ku qori karo fasaxa labaad iyo si fiican loo qoray Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'ur': 'Word embeddings that can capture semantic and syntactic information from contexts are extensively used for various natural language processing tasks. لیکن موجود طریقے ہیں کہ کانٹ بنیادی لغات کی تعلیم کے لئے مطابق کافی احساسات معلومات کو پکڑ سکتے ہیں. یہ باتوں کا نتیجہ ہے جیسا ویکتور نمایش کے ساتھ جو مخالف احساسات مضبوط ہے (جیسا: اچھا اور برا) اور اسی طرح احساسات تحلیل کامیابی کو ذلت دیتا ہے. لہٰذا، یہ تحقیق ایک لفظ ویکتور رافینٹ منڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ہر پہلے تحقیق کی لفظ ویکتوروں پر لازم کر سکتا ہے (جیسے Word2vec اور Glove). ریفینٹ میڈل کلمات کے ویکتور نمونات کی تعمیر پر بنیاد ہے کہ وہ دونوں سیمنٹی اور احساساتی شبہ کلمات کے قریب ہو سکتے ہیں اور احساساتی شبہ کلمات سے دور ہو سکتے ہیں۔ تجربہ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ سنٹیمینٹ تری بینک (SST) پر سنٹیمینٹ تری بینک کے لئے سائنری اور نیک دانے کی کلاسپینٹ کے لئے کلاسپینٹ کی بات کا زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتی ہے اور پہلے پیشنهاد کی سنٹیمینٹ تر', 'uz': "Name Ammo, oddiy soʻz tuzuvchi soʻzni o'rganish uchun mavjud usullar qoʻllanilmadi. Bu esa o'z o'z o'zgarishni o'zgartirish hissiyotlarida o'xshash o'zgarishga ega so'zlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Shunday qilib, bu o'qituvni o'rganishdan oldin so'zlar vektoriga qoʻllaniladi (m.g. Word2vec va GloVe). Name Tajriba natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan usulni qo'shish mumkin va avval boshlangan foydalanuvchilarni boshqarishi mumkin va Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST) uchun ikki marta va yaxshi qo'llangan darajasini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Từ ngữ có thể nắm giữ thông tin theo ngữ pháp và cấu trúc từ ngữ cảnh đã được sử dụng rộng rãi cho các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp tồn tại để học sự ghép nối từ ngữ cảnh thường không thu thập đủ thông tin tình cảm. Điều này có thể dẫn đến các biểu tượng vector tương tự có một cực quang tình cảm đối lập (v.d., tốt và xấu) làm phân tích tình cảm kém hiệu quả. Do đó, nghiên cứu này đề xuất một mô hình cấu tạo vector có thể sử dụng từ tương ứng với các từ véc- tơ (v. d. Word2vec và GloVe). Sự tinh chỉnh được dựa trên việc điều chỉnh các biểu tượng vector của từ ngữ để chúng có thể gần gũi với từ ngữ văn học và tình cảm tương tự và tránh xa các từ khác nhau. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị có thể cải thiện sự nhúng vào các từ thông thường và hoàn thành những sự nhúng cảm xúc trước đây cho cả hai phân loại nhị phân loại và loại lọc tốt trên đơn vị Stanford (SST).', 'bg': 'Вградените думи, които могат да улавят семантична и синтактична информация от контексти, са широко използвани за различни задачи за обработка на естествени езици. Съществуващите методи за учене, базирани на контекст, обаче обикновено не успяват да уловят достатъчна сентиментална информация. Това може да доведе до думи с подобни векторни изображения, които имат противоположна полярност на сантимента (например добри и лоши), като по този начин влошават ефективността на анализа на сантимента. Ето защо, това изследване предлага модел за усъвършенстване на вектора на думата, който може да бъде приложен към всеки предварително обучен вектор на думата (напр. Word2vec и GloVe). Моделът на усъвършенстване се основава на коригиране на векторните представи на думите така, че те да могат да бъдат по-близо както до семантично, така и сантиментално сходни думи и по-далеч от сантиментално различни думи. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният метод може да подобри конвенционалните вграждания на думи и да превъзхожда предложените преди това вграждания на сентименти както за двоична, така и за фина класификация на Станфорд Сентимент Treebank (SST).', 'da': 'Ordindlejringer, der kan fange semantiske og syntaktiske oplysninger fra sammenhænge, er blevet i vid udstrækning brugt til forskellige natursprogbehandlingsopgaver. Men eksisterende metoder til at lære kontekstbaserede ordindlejringer generelt ikke fanger tilstrækkelige oplysninger om sentiment. Dette kan resultere i ord med lignende vektorrepræsentationer, der har en modsat sentimentpolaritet (f.eks. god og dårlig), hvilket nedbryder sentimentanalysens ydeevne. Derfor foreslår denne undersøgelse en ordvektorraffineringsmodel, der kan anvendes på alle forududdannede ordvektorer (f.eks. Word2vec og GloVe). Raffineringsmodellen er baseret på at justere vektorrepræsentationerne af ord, således at de kan være tættere på både semantisk og sentimentalt lignende ord og længere væk fra sentimentalt forskellige ord. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede metode kan forbedre konventionelle ord indlejringer og overgå tidligere foreslåede sentiment indlejringer for både binær og finkornet klassificering på Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'hr': 'Uključenje riječi koje mogu uhvatiti semantičke i sintaktičke informacije iz konteksta široko se koriste za različite prirodne obaveze obrade jezika. Međutim, postojeće metode za učenje na kontekstu osnovanih riječima obično ne mogu uhvatiti dovoljno informacija o osjećajima. To može rezultirati riječima s sličnim predstavljanjima vektora koji imaju suprotnu polarnost osjećaja (npr. dobru i lošu), tako smanjujući učinkovitost analize osjećaja. Stoga, u ovom ispitivanju predlaže model refineracije riječi vektora koji se može primjenjivati na bilo koji predobučeni vektori riječi (npr. Word2vec i Glove). Model refinzije se temelji na prilagodbi predstavljanja vektora riječi tako da mogu biti bliže semantički i sentimentalno sličnim riječima i dalje od sentimentalno neskladnih riječi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi metod može poboljšati konvencionalne riječi ugrađenje i iznijeti prethodno predložene osjećajne ugrađenje za binarnu i fino zrncanu klasifikaciju na Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'de': 'Worteinbettungen, die semantische und syntaktische Informationen aus Kontexten erfassen können, wurden häufig für verschiedene Aufgaben der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache verwendet. Allerdings können vorhandene Methoden zum Lernen kontextbasierter Worteinbettungen in der Regel nicht genügend Stimmungsinformationen erfassen. Dies kann dazu führen, dass Wörter mit ähnlichen Vektorrepräsentationen eine entgegengesetzte Sentiment-Polarität aufweisen (z.B. gut und schlecht), wodurch die Sentiment-Analyseleistung beeinträchtigt wird. Daher schlägt diese Studie ein Wortvektorverfeinerungsmodell vor, das auf alle vorgetrainierten Wortvektoren angewendet werden kann (z.B. Word2vec und GloVe). Das Verfeinerungsmodell basiert darauf, die Vektordarstellungen von Wörtern so anzupassen, dass sie sowohl semantisch als auch sentimental ähnlichen Wörtern näher und weiter weg von sentimental ungleichen Wörtern sein können. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode herkömmliche Worteinbettungen verbessern und zuvor vorgeschlagene Sentiment Einbettungen sowohl für binäre als auch feinkörnige Klassifikationen auf der Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST) übertreffen kann.', 'ko': '단어 삽입은 상하문에서 의미와 문법 정보를 얻을 수 있으며, 이미 각종 자연 언어 처리 임무에 광범위하게 사용되고 있다.그러나 기존의 상하문에 기반한 단어 삽입 학습 방법으로는 충분한 감정 정보를 얻을 수 없다.이는 벡터와 유사한 표현을 가진 단어가 상반된 정서적 극성(예를 들어 좋고 나쁨)을 가지게 되어 정서 분석 성능을 떨어뜨릴 수 있다.따라서 본 연구는 사전 훈련된 단어 벡터(예를 들어 Word2vec와GloVe)에 응용할 수 있는 단어 벡터 정화 모델을 제시했다.정화 모델의 기초는 단어의 벡터 표시를 조정하여 의미와 감정적으로 비슷한 단어에 더욱 가깝게 하고 감정적으로 다른 단어를 멀리하는 것이다.실험 결과 스탠포드 감정 트리 라이브러리(Stanford Operation Treebank, SST)에서 이 방법은 전통적인 단어 삽입을 개선할 수 있고 2치와 세립도 분류 측면에서 이전에 제시한 감정 삽입보다 우수하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'nl': 'Word embeddings die semantische en syntactische informatie uit contexten kunnen vastleggen, zijn uitgebreid gebruikt voor verschillende natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken. Bestaande methoden voor het leren van contextgebaseerde woordinsluitingen bevatten echter meestal onvoldoende sentimentinformatie. Dit kan ertoe leiden dat woorden met vergelijkbare vectorrepresentaties een tegenovergestelde sentimentpolariteit hebben (bijvoorbeeld goed en slecht), waardoor sentimentanalyseprestaties afnemen. Daarom stelt deze studie een woordvectorverfijningsmodel voor dat kan worden toegepast op alle vooraf getrainde woordvectoren (bijvoorbeeld Word2vec en GloVe). Het verfijningsmodel is gebaseerd op het aanpassen van de vectorrepresentaties van woorden zodat ze dichter bij zowel semantisch als sentimenteel vergelijkbare woorden kunnen zijn en verder weg van sentimenteel ongelijke woorden. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode conventionele woordinbeddingen kan verbeteren en eerder voorgestelde sentimentinbeddingen kan overtreffen voor zowel binaire als fijnkorrelige classificatie op Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمات که می\u200cتوانند اطلاعات semantic و syntactic را از محیط\u200cها بگیرند برای کار\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی مختلف استفاده می\u200cشوند. با این حال، روش\u200cهای موجود برای یادگیری کلمه\u200cهای متصل بر روی محیط معمولاً اطلاعات احساسات کافی را دریافت نمی\u200cکنند. این ممکن است به عنوان کلمات با نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور مشابه\u200cای که قطعیت احساسات مخالف دارند (مثلاً خوب و بد) بدین\u200cسان اجرای تحلیل احساسات را نابود می\u200cکند. بنابراین، این مطالعه یک مدل بازسازی ویکتور کلمه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند به هر ویکتور کلمه پیش آموزش داده شود (مثلاً Word2vec و Glove). Model refinement is based on adjusting the vector representations of words such as that they can be closer to both semantically and sentimentally similar words and further away from sentimentally dissimilar words. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که این روش پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند کلمه\u200cهای معمولی را بهتر کند و پیشنهاد\u200cهای پیشنهاد احساسات را به عنوان classification binary and fine grained on Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST) بیفزاید.', 'sw': 'Matokeo yanayoweza kupata taarifa za kimapenzi na ushirikiano kutoka kwenye matatizo yametumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa ajili ya kazi mbalimbali za utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Hata hivyo, mbinu zilizopo kwa ajili ya kujifunza maneno yanayohusiana na muktadha hushindwa kupata taarifa za kutosha za hisia. This may result in words with similar vector representations having an opposite sentiment polarity (e.g., good and bad), thus degrading sentiment analysis performance.  Kwa hiyo utafiti huu unapendekeza muundo wa mageuzi wa neno ambalo unaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya vector zote zilizofunzwa kabla (kwa mfano, Word2vec na GloVe). Mradi wa mageuzi unajikita na kuboresha uwakilishi wa vector wa maneno kama vile kwamba wanaweza kuwa karibu na maneno yanayofanana na hisia na pia mbali na maneno yanayotofautiana na hisia. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu hiyo ya pendekezo inaweza kuboresha ujumbe wa maneno ya kawaida na kutengeneza hisia zilizopendekezwa kabla kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa viwili vya binafsi na vizuri kwenye mtandao wa Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'id': 'Pencampuran kata yang dapat menangkap informasi semantis dan sintaksi dari konteks telah digunakan secara ekstensif untuk berbagai tugas proses bahasa alam. Namun, metode yang ada untuk belajar pembangunan kata berdasarkan konteks biasanya gagal menangkap informasi sentimen yang cukup. Hal ini dapat mengakibatkan kata-kata dengan representation vektor yang sama memiliki polaritas sentimen bertentangan (misalnya baik dan buruk), sehingga rendah analisis sentimen yang rendah. Oleh karena itu, studi ini mengusulkan sebuah model pengrafinasi vektor kata yang dapat diaplikasikan pada setiap vektor kata yang terlatih sebelumnya (contohnya Word2vec dan GloVe). Model refinement berdasarkan penyesuaian representation vektor dari kata-kata sehingga mereka bisa lebih dekat dengan kata-kata yang sama secara semantis dan sentimental dan jauh dari kata-kata yang sentimental berbeda. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan dapat meningkatkan penyembedding kata konvensional dan melampaui penampilan sentimen yang diusulkan sebelumnya untuk kedua klasifikasi binari dan berkulit gandum di Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'tr': 'Semantik we sintaktik maglumaty senediň içine alyp biljek söz girişmeleri beýleki diller işlemek üçin ullanýarlar. Ýöne, kontekst tabanly sözleri öwrenmek üçin bar hilli yöntemler duýdurma maglumaty ýeterlik şekilde almaz. Bu, vektör ifadeleri ile ters bir duygu polaritet sahip olabilir (mesela iyi ve kötü), bu yüzden duygu analizi performansını azaltır. Bu nedenle, bu çalışma, her önceki e ğitimli kelime vektörlerine uygulanabilen bir kelime vektör yenileme modelini teklif ediyor. Refiner modeli, vektör kelimelerin ifadelerini ayarlamak üzere dayanarak, hem semantik hem de duygusal kelimelere yakın olabilir ve hem de sentiment benzeri kelimelerden uzak olabilir. Experimental netijeleri teklip eden yöntemiň düzgün söz integrasyny geliştirebilir we öňki hem iki we iň-tagam klasifikasynda Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST) duýgular içerisinde özüni gowylaşdyryp biljekdigini görkez.', 'af': "Woord inbêring wat semantiese en sintaktis inligting van kontekste kan opneem het uitbreidig gebruik vir verskeie natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte. Alhoewel, bestaande metodes vir die leer van konteksgebaseerde woord inbêding tipies misluk om genoeg sentiment inligting te vang. Hierdie kan resulteer in woorde met soortgelyke vektor voorstellings wat 'n teenstelende sentiment polarisie (bv. goed en sleg), sodat verdraai sentimentanalisie effektiviteit. Daarom, hierdie studie voorstel 'n woord vektor refineeringsmodel wat kan aanwend word na enige vooraf- onderwerp woord vektore (bv. Word2vec en Glove). Die refineeringsmodel is gebaseer op die aanpassing van die vektor voorstellings van woorde sodat hulle naby kan wees beide semantiese en sentimenteel gelyke woorde en verder weg van sentimenteel onvergelyke woorde. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metode konvensionale woord inbettings kan verbeter en voorgestel voorheen sentimente inbettings vir beide binêre en fyn-graad klasifikasie op Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).", 'sq': 'Përfshirjet e fjalëve që mund të kapin informacion semantik dhe sintaktik nga kontekstet janë përdorur gjerësisht për detyra të ndryshme të procesimit natyror të gjuhës. However, existing methods for learning context-based word embeddings typically fail to capture sufficient sentiment information.  Kjo mund të rezultojë në fjalë me përfaqësime të ngjashme vektorësh që kanë një polaritet të ndjenjave të kundërta (për shembull, të mira dhe të këqija), duke e degraduar kështu rezultatin e analizës së ndjenjave. Prandaj, ky studim propozon një model të rafinuar fjalë vektor që mund të aplikohet në çdo vektor fjalësh të paratrajnuar (për shembull Word2vec dhe GloVe). Modeli i rafinuar është bazuar në rregullimin e përfaqësimeve vektorë të fjalëve të tilla që ato mund të jenë më pranë si fjalëve semantike ashtu edhe sentimentale të ngjashme dhe më larg nga fjalët sentimentalisht të ndryshme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar mund të përmirësojë përfshirjet konvencionale të fjalëve dhe të përmirësojë përfshirjet e ndjenjave të propozuara më parë për klasifikimin si binar ashtu edhe të hollësishëm në Treebank Sentiment Stanford (SST).', 'am': 'የንግግር አቀማመጥ እና የስምናዊ መረጃዎችን ከመቀበል የሚችል የፊደል ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ በተስፋው ተጠቃሚ ሆኖአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሥርዓት ቃላትን ለመማር ሥርዓት በመጠቀም የሚበቃውን የስሜት መረጃ ለመያዝ አይችልም፡፡ ይህም በተለያዩ የሜትዌር መልዕክቶች በተቃዋሚ ስሜት (ምሳሌ መልካም እና ክፋት) በሚያሳፍር እና በሚያሳፍር የስሜት ትርፍን አዋራጅ እንዲሆን ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህ ይህ ትምህርት የቃላት የዌctor አስተካክል ሞዴል ለመጠቀም የሚችለውን ቃላት vector (e.g. Word2vec እና GloVe) ያሳያል፡፡ አካባቢ እና በተለያዩ ቃላት እና በአሳማሚ እና በሚያሳየው እና ከስሜት የተለየ ቃላት እንዲቀረቡ የሚችሉትን የвектር መልዕክቶች በመሠረት ነው፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች በተፈተናው የስቴንፎርድ ሰናትሬት Treebank (SST) ላይ የተዘጋጀውን የአስቸጋሪነቱን ቃላት ማሻሻል እንዲችል እና አስቀድሞ የልማት ስሜት ማድረግ ማድረግ እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Word embeddings that can capture semantic and syntactic information from contexts have been extensively used for various natural language processing tasks.  Այնուամենայնիվ, կոնտեքստին հիմնված բառերի ներգրավման գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները սովորելու համար սովորաբար չեն ընդունում բավարար զգացմունքային տեղեկատվություն: Սա կարող է հանգեցնել նման վեկտորների ներկայացումների բառերին, որոնք ունեն հակառակ զգացմունքների կողմնականություն (օրինակ, լավ և վատ), ինչը նվազեցնում է զգացմունքների վերլուծության արդյունքը: Այսպիսով, այս ուսումնասիրությունը առաջարկում է բառերի վերականգնման մոդել, որը կարող է կիրառվել ցանկացած նախապատրաստված բառերի վերականգնման մոդելի վրա (օրինակ Word2vec և Global). Զարգացման մոդելը հիմնված է բառերի վեկտորների ներկայացումների կարգավորման վրա, որպեսզի դրանք ավելի մոտ լինեն սեմանտիկ և զգայական նման բառերին և հեռու լինեն զգայական տարբեր բառերից: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը կարող է բարելավել ավանդական բառերի ներդրումը և արտադրել նախկինում առաջարկված զգացմունքների ներդրումը երկու և նույնիսկ նրբագեղ դասակարգում Ստենֆորդ զգացմունքների ծառի (SST) վրա', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের জন্য ব্যাপকভাবে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। তবে বিভিন্ন কন্টেক্স-ভিত্তিক শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক শিখতে বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি সাধারণত যথেষ্ট অনুভূতির তথ এর ফলে একই ধরনের ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বে একটি বিরোধী অনুভূতির বিরুদ্ধে (উদাহরণস্বরূপ ভাল এবং খারাপ), যার ফলে অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণের প তাই এই গবেষণাটি একটি শব্দ ভেক্টর সুসংস্কার মডেল প্রস্তাব করেছে যা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ভেক্টরের (যেমন ওয়ার্ড২ভেক এবং গ্লোভে এই সংস্কারের মডেল ভিত্তিক ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব সংশোধনের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে যেমন তারা দুই শব্দের মধ্যে কাছাকাছি থাকতে পারে এবং অনুভূতিক ভাব পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি স্ট্যানফোর্ড সেন্টিমেন্ট ট ট্রিবাঙ্কের (এসটি) বাইনারি এবং ভালো গ্রাফিকেশনের ব্যাপারে প্রস্তাবিত', 'bs': 'Uključenje riječi koje mogu uhvatiti semantičke i sintaktičke informacije iz konteksta su se široko koristile za različite prirodne zadatke obrade jezika. Međutim, postojeće metode za učenje na kontekstu osnovanih riječi obično ne mogu uhvatiti dovoljno informacija o osjećajima. To može rezultirati riječima sa sličnim predstavljanjima vektora koji imaju suprotnu polarnost osjećaja (npr. dobru i lošu), tako smanjujući učinkovitost analize osjećaja. Stoga, ova istraživanja predlaže model refinženja riječi vektora koji se može primjenjivati na bilo koji predobučeni vektor riječi (npr. Word2vec i Glove). Model refinzije se temelji na prilagodbi predstavljanja vektora riječi tako da mogu biti bliže semantičkim i sentimentalno sličnim riječima i dalje od sentimentalno nesličnih riječi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda može poboljšati konvencionalne reči ugrađenje i izvršiti prethodno predložene integracije sentimenta za dvojnu i fino zrncanu klasifikaciju na Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamist, mis suudavad koguda semantilist ja süntaktilist teavet kontekstist, on laialdaselt kasutatud erinevate looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete jaoks. Kuid olemasolevad kontekstipõhiste sõnade manustamise õppimise meetodid ei suuda tavaliselt koguda piisavalt tundeid. Selle tulemusena võivad sarnaste vektorikujutistega sõnad omada vastupidist sentimentaalset polaarsust (nt hea ja halb), mis halvendab sentimentaalüüsi tulemuslikkust. Seetõttu pakutakse käesolevas uuringus välja sõnavaktorite rafineerimise mudel, mida saab rakendada kõigile eeltreenitud sõnavaktoritele (nt Word2vec ja GloVe). Täiustamismudel põhineb sõnade vektorikujutiste kohandamisel nii, et need oleksid nii semantiliselt kui sentimentaalselt sarnastele sõnadele lähemal ja sentimentaalselt erinevatest sõnadest kaugemal. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod võib parandada tavapäraseid sõnade manustamist ja ületada varem kavandatud sentimentaalseid manustamisi nii binaar- kui peeneteteralise klassifikatsiooni Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST) puhul.', 'az': 'Səmantik və sintaktik məlumatları müxtəlif dil işləmə işləri üçün çox geniş istifadə edilmişdir. Lakin, məlumatları bağlı sözləri öyrənmək üçün mövcuddur metodlar genellikle hiss məlumatlarını almaq üçün yeterli olar. Bu sözlərə bənzər vektör g östəriciləri ilə müxtəlif hisslərin polarisi (məsələn, yaxşı və pis), böylece hisslərin analizi performansını azaldırır. Buna g örə də bu təhsil hər bir əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş söz vektörlərinə uygulanabilen vektör refinçəsi modeli təklif edir. Refinement modeli sözlərin vektoru düzəltməsinə dayanılır ki, onlar semantik və sentimental kimi sözlərə daha yaxın olarlar və sentimental sözlərdən daha çox uzaqlaşarlar. Həqiqətən, təcrübə göstərən təcrübə etdiyi metodların, Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST) təcrübə etdiyi və əvvəlcə təcrübə etdiyi hisslər içərisində ikili və yaxşı dənəli klasifikasyon üçün daha yaxşılaşdırılabilir.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotuksia, joilla voidaan tallentaa semanttista ja syntaktista tietoa konteksteista, on käytetty laajasti erilaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä. Nykyiset menetelmät kontekstipohjaisten sanaupotusten oppimiseen eivät kuitenkaan yleensä kerää riittävästi tuntemustietoa. Tämä voi johtaa siihen, että sanoilla, joilla on samanlaisia vektoriesityksiä, on vastakohtainen tunteiden polariteetti (esim. hyvä ja huono), mikä heikentää tunteiden analyysin suorituskykyä. Tämän vuoksi tässä työssä ehdotetaan sanavektorin jalostusmallia, jota voidaan soveltaa mihin tahansa ennalta koulutettuun sanavektoriin (esim. Word2vec ja GloVe). Tarkennusmalli perustuu sanojen vektoriesitysten säätämiseen siten, että ne voivat olla lähempänä sekä semanttisesti että tunteellisesti samankaltaisia sanoja ja kauempana tunteellisesti poikkeavista sanoista. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä voi parantaa perinteisiä sanaupotuksia ja ylittää aiemmin ehdotetut sentiment upotukset sekä binääri- että hienorakeisessa luokituksessa Stanford Sentiment Treebankissa (SST).', 'ca': "Les integracions de paraules que poden capturar informació semàntica i sinàctica dels contextos han estat utilitzades ampliament per diverses tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges. However, existing methods for learning context-based word embeddings typically fail to capture sufficient sentiment information.  Això pot resultar en paraules amb representacions vectorals similars tenint una polaritat del sentiment oposta (per exemple, bo i dolent), i així degradant el rendiment de l'an àlisi del sentiment. Per tant, aquest estudi propon un model de refinament de paraules per vectors que es pot aplicar a qualsevol vector de paraules pré-entrenat (per exemple Word2vec i GloVe). El model de refinament es basa en ajustar les representacions vectorials de paraules de manera que puguin estar més properes a paraules semàntiques i sentimentalment similars i més lluny de paraules sentimentalment dissimilars. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el mètode proposat pot millorar l'incorporació de paraules convencionals i superar l'incorporació de sentiments proposada anteriorment tant per a la classificació binaria com fina de grans a Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).", 'cs': 'Vložení slov, které dokáží zachytit sémantické a syntaktické informace z kontextů, bylo široce používáno pro různé úlohy zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Stávající metody výuky kontextově založených slov však obvykle nedokážou zachytit dostatečné informace o sentimentu. To může mít za následek, že slova s podobnými vektorovými reprezentacemi mají opačnou polaritu sentimentu (např. dobrou a špatnou), což snižuje výkon sentimentu analýzy. Proto tato studie navrhuje model zpřesnění slovních vektorů, který lze aplikovat na jakékoliv předem trénované slovní vektory (např. Word2vec a GloVe). Model zdokonalení je založen na úpravě vektorových reprezentací slov tak, aby mohla být blíže jak sémanticky, tak sentimentálně podobným slovům a dále daleko od sentimentálně odlišných slov. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržená metoda může zlepšit konvenční vložení slov a překonat dříve navržené vložení sentimentu pro binární i jemnozrnnou klasifikaci na Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'jv': 'embedding politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Punika politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngubah Refirm', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da, shirin da ke ƙunsa wa karanta maganar da aka ƙunsa da shi a cikin zane-zane, ana kasa sami tsarin bayani, ma'anar zũciya mai isa. Wannan yana iya ƙara wa maganar kwamfyuta masu kamili da wakili masu motsi na hisia'a (misali, mai kyau da wani mummunan), sabõda haka yana wulãkantar da aikin anarwa. Saboda haka, wannan littafi yana buƙata wani misali mai gyare-gyare na shiryarwa da za'a iya amfani da wasu shiryoyi na gaba-wa-gyare (misali, word2ve da GL). Modalin da ake daidaita shi ne a kan ka juya masu tsari ga masu mayarwa na maganar kwamfyutan da za su iya kusanta zuwa ga duk kalmõmi da ke daidaita, kuma ka nĩsa daga kalmõmin da ke rarraba. Matarin jarrabawa na nuna cewa metoden da aka buƙata yana iya improve maganar da aka shigar da su a cikin shirin ayuka da aka buɗe wa zaman da aka buɗe wa sauri da kuma mai kyau-grafi a kan fasasar ta Stanford-sensitin Treebank (SST).", 'he': 'תוספות מילים שיכולות לתפוס מידע סמנטי וסינטקטי מהקשרים השתמשו באופן רחב למשימות מעבדת שפה טבעית שונות. עם זאת, שיטות קיימות ללמוד מילים מבוססות על הקשר בדרך כלל לא מצליחות לתפוס מידע רגשות מספיק. זה יכול להוביל במילים עם מיצוגי ווקטורים דומים שיש קוטביות רגשות אחורה (למשל טובה ורעה), כך משפיל ביצועי ניתוח רגשות. לכן, המחקר הזה מציע מודל מילה של שיפור וקטורים שיכול להיות שימוש על כל וקטורים מילים מאומנים מראש (למשל Word2vec וגלוב). דוגמנית הדיפוי מבוססת על התאמה של ייצוגי הוקטור של מילים כך שהם יכולים להיות קרובים יותר למילים סמנטיות וגם רגשיות דומות תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהשיטה המוצעת יכולה לשפר את הכנסות המילים הקונסיונליות ולהפוך את הכנסות הרגשות המוצעות קודם לכן עבור כיוון בינרי וגם בינר-גרטני על סנטימנט עץ סטנפורד (SST).', 'sk': 'Vgradnje besedil, ki lahko zajemajo semantične in sintaktične informacije iz kontekstov, so bile obsežno uporabljene za različna opravila obdelave naravnega jezika. Vendar obstoječe metode za učenje vključevanja besed, ki temeljijo na kontekstu, običajno ne zajemajo zadostnih informacij o čustvih. To lahko povzroči, da imajo besede s podobnimi vektorskimi predstavitvami nasprotno polarnost sentimenta (npr. dobro in slabo), kar zmanjšuje učinkovitost analize sentimenta. Zato je v tej študiji predlagan model izboljšanja besednega vektorja, ki ga je mogoče uporabiti za vse predhodno usposobljene besedne vektorje (npr. Word2vec in GloVe). Model prefinjevanja temelji na prilagajanju vektorskih predstavitev besed tako, da so lahko bližje semantično in sentimentalno podobnim besedam in dlje stran od sentimentalno različnih besed. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko predlagana metoda izboljša običajne vgradnje besed in presega predhodno predlagane vgradnje sentimenta za binarno in drobnozrnato klasifikacijo na Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཁོངས་ ཕན་ཚུན་སྒྲིག་དང་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡུལ་གནས་སྟངས་གཞི་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཡོད་པ་དེ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐྱེན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ འདིས་ཚོར་བརྒྱུད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཉམ་པའི་སྙན་རིས་ཚོར་མཚུངས་ཡོད་པ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པས། དེར་བརྟེན། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་གྲངས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་བརྗོད་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། Word2vec དང་ Glove གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་ཉི མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་དེ་ནི་སྒུལ་གྱི་བརྗོད་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚགས་རྣམས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བ་དང་མཐུན་པ་མཚུངས་ཡིན། Experimental results show that the proposed method can improve conventional word embedding and outperform previously proposed sentiments embedding for both binary and fine-grain classification on Stanford Sentiment Treebank (SST).'}
{'en': 'Sentiment Intensity Ranking among Adjectives Using Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'fr': "Classement de l'intensité du sentiment parmi les adjectifs à l'aide d'intégrations de mots porteurs de sentiment", 'es': 'Clasificación de la intensidad de sentimiento entre adjetivos que utilizan incrustaciones de palabras que contienen sentimiento', 'ar': 'ترتيب شدة المشاعر بين الصفات باستخدام تضمين المشاعر في الكلمات', 'pt': 'Classificação de intensidade de sentimento entre adjetivos usando incorporação de palavras com sentimento', 'hi': 'भावना असर शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग कर विशेषणों के बीच भावना तीव्रता रैंकिंग', 'zh': '用情承载词嵌形容词间情度排名', 'ru': 'Ранжирование интенсивности сентиментов среди прилагательных, использующих вкладыши слов, несущих сентименты', 'ja': 'センチメントベアリングの単語埋め込みを使用した形容詞間のセンチメント強度ランキング', 'ga': 'Rang첬 D챕ine Mointe i measc na nAidiachta챠 ag 횣s찼id Leabaithe Focal Moth첬ch찼in', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Érzelmi intenzitás rangsorolás a mellékhatások között az érzelemhordozó szóbeágyazások használatával', 'el': 'Κατάταξη έντασης συναισθημάτων μεταξύ των εθίμων που χρησιμοποιούν το συναίσθημα που φέρει τις ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'it': "Classificazione dell'intensità dei sentimenti tra gli aggettivi che utilizzano incorporazioni di parole che sopportano sentimenti", 'kk': 'Таңдаушылардың арасындағы жіберушілердің тегіздігі', 'lt': 'Sentimento intensyvumo klasifikavimas tarp subjektų, naudojančių Sentimento nešiojimo žodžių įdėjimus', 'mk': 'Равенирање на интензитетот на чувството меѓу адјективите кои користат вградување на зборови со носење на чувство', 'ml': 'സെന്റിമെന്റ് വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് ഇന്\u200d', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Intensiti Sentiment diantara Adjektif Mengguna Pencampuran Perkataan Sentiment Bearing Word', 'mt': 'Il-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Intensità tas-Sentiment fost l-Addettivi bl-Użu ta’ Embeddings tal-kliem li jġorru s-Sentiment', 'mn': 'Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'no': 'Sentidsstyrke for intensitet mellom oppgjevnader ved bruk av innbygging av tekst frå sentidsstyrke', 'pl': 'Ranking intensywności sentymentów wśród adjektiwów za pomocą osadzeń słowa Sentiment Bearing', 'ro': 'Clasarea intensității sentimentelor printre adjectivi folosind încorporarea cuvintelor cu sentimente', 'sr': 'Уређавање интенсивности пријатеља користећи пријатеље користења сложних дух', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරවේශකයන් අතර ප්\u200dරවේශකයන් අතර ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශකය තුරක්ෂාවත්වය ප්\u200dරවේශකය ප්\u200dරවේශකය', 'so': 'Heeganka shaqada', 'sv': 'Rankning av känslointensitet bland adjektiv med hjälp av känslobärande ordinbäddningar', 'ta': 'Sentiment Intensity Ranking among Adjectives Using Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'ur': 'Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'uz': 'Sentiment chegarasi', 'vi': 'Cấp độ cao cảm xúc giữa các đối tượng nhiễm cảm xúc.', 'da': 'Ranking af følelsesintensitet blandt adjektiver ved hjælp af følelseslæbende ordindlejringer', 'bg': 'Класиране на интензивността на сентимента сред прилагателните елементи, използващи вграждания на думи за носене на сентимента', 'hr': 'Ranjenje osjećajne intenzitete između dodatnika koristeći uključenje riječi o osjećaju', 'id': 'Rangkaian Intensitas Sentiment diantara Adjektif Menggunakan Embedding Sentiment Bearing Word', 'ko': '정서적 강도는 정서어가 박힌 형용사 중 순위를 사용한다', 'fa': 'مرحله\u200cی هوشیاری فرستاده در میان پذیرفتگان استفاده از استفاده از استفاده کردن کلمه\u200cهای هوشیاری', 'sw': 'Sentiment Intensity Ranking among Adjectives Using Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'tr': 'Görevler arasynda Sentiment Bearing Kelimi Dolamak', 'af': 'Stuurder Intensiteit Ranking onder Adjectives gebruik Sentiment Bearing Woord Inbetering', 'sq': 'Rregullimi i intensitetit të ndjenjave midis objektivave duke përdorur përmbajtjet e fjalëve të ndjenjave', 'nl': 'Sentiment Intensity Ranking onder bijvoeglijke naamwoorden met behulp van Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'am': 'Sentiment Bearing Word Embedding', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների ինտենսիվության դասակարգման միջև, օգտագործելով զգացմունքներ բարձրացող բառեր', 'de': 'Sentiment Intensity Ranking unter Adjektiven unter Verwendung von Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'bn': 'সেন্টিমেন্ট বিয়ারিং শব্দ ব্যবহার করে সেন্টিমেন্ট ইনসেটিমেন্ট সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষা', 'az': '캻stifad톛칞il톛r aras캼nda Sentiment Bearing Kelimi 캻fad톛l톛ri istifad톛 edirl톛r', 'bs': 'Pregled intenzitete poslanika između pristupnika koristeći uključenje slobodnih riječi', 'ca': 'Sentiment Intensity Ranking among Adjectives Using Sentiment Bearing Word Embeddings', 'et': 'Sentimendi intensiivsuse järjestamine adjektiivide seas, kasutades sentimenti kandvat sõna manustamist', 'cs': 'Hodnocení intenzity sentimentů mezi adjektivy pomocí vložení slov s sentimentem', 'fi': 'Tunteen intensiteetin sijoitus adjektiivien joukossa käyttämällä tunteita sisältävää sanaupotusta', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'he': 'מערכת דיווח רגשות בין הגיוניים בשימוש בתכנית מילים בעלת רגשות', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'sk': 'Razvrščanje intenzivnosti čustva med pripomočki z uporabo besedilnih vdelav čustva', 'bo': 'འཆར་འདེགས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་དུས་འཕགས་རིས་སྟོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Identification of intensity ordering among polar (positive or negative) words which have the same semantics can lead to a fine-grained sentiment analysis. For example, ‘master’, ‘seasoned’ and ‘familiar’ point to different intensity levels, though they all convey the same meaning (semantics), i.e., expertise : having a good knowledge of. In this paper, we propose a semi-supervised technique that uses sentiment bearing word embeddings to produce a continuous ranking among adjectives that share common semantics. Our system demonstrates a strong Spearman’s rank correlation of 0.83 with the gold standard ranking. We show that sentiment bearing word embeddings facilitate a more accurate intensity ranking system than other standard word embeddings (word2vec and GloVe). Word2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity ordering task.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يؤدي تحديد ترتيب الشدة بين الكلمات القطبية (الإيجابية أو السلبية) التي لها نفس الدلالات إلى تحليل دقيق للمشاعر. على سبيل المثال ، تشير كلمة "رئيسي" و "متمرس" و "مألوف" إلى مستويات شدة مختلفة ، على الرغم من أنها تحمل جميعًا نفس المعنى (الدلالات) ، أي الخبرة: امتلاك معرفة جيدة بـ. في هذا البحث ، نقترح أسلوبًا شبه خاضع للإشراف يستخدم تزوير كلمات تحمل المشاعر لإنتاج ترتيب مستمر بين الصفات التي تشترك في دلالات مشتركة. يوضح نظامنا ارتباط تصنيف سبيرمان القوي بنسبة 0.83 مع تصنيف المعيار الذهبي. نظهر أن تضمين الكلمات التي تحمل المشاعر تسهل نظام تصنيف كثافة أكثر دقة من مزايدات الكلمة القياسية الأخرى (word2vec و GloVe). Word2vec هو أحدث ما توصلت إليه مهمة الترتيب المكثف.', 'es': 'La identificación del orden de intensidad entre palabras polares (positivas o negativas) que tienen la misma semántica puede conducir a un análisis de opinión detallado. Por ejemplo, «maestro», «experimentado» y «familiar» apuntan a diferentes niveles de intensidad, aunque todos transmiten el mismo significado (semántica), es decir, pericia: tener un buen conocimiento de. En este artículo, proponemos una técnica semi-supervisada que utiliza incrustaciones de palabras con sentimiento para producir una clasificación continua entre adjetivos que comparten semántica común. Nuestro sistema demuestra una fuerte correlación de rango de Spearman de 0.83 con la clasificación estándar oro. Demostramos que las incrustaciones de palabras con sentimiento facilitan un sistema de clasificación de intensidad más preciso que otras incrustaciones de palabras estándar (word2vec y GLOe). Word2vec es el estado de la técnica para la tarea de pedidos de intensidad.', 'fr': "L'identification de l'ordre d'intensité parmi les mots polaires (positifs ou négatifs) qui ont la même sémantique peut conduire à une analyse fine des sentiments. Par exemple, «\xa0maître\xa0», «\xa0expérimenté\xa0» et «\xa0familier\xa0» indiquent des niveaux d'intensité différents, bien qu'ils aient tous la même signification (sémantique), c'est-à-dire expertise\xa0: avoir une bonne connaissance de. Dans cet article, nous proposons une technique semi-supervisée qui utilise des intégrations de mots porteurs de sentiment pour produire un classement continu parmi les adjectifs qui partagent une sémantique commune. Notre système démontre une forte corrélation de rang de Spearman de 0,83 avec le classement étalon-or. Nous montrons que les intégrations de mots porteurs de sentiment facilitent un système de classement d'intensité plus précis que les autres intégrations de mots standard (word2vec et Glove). Word2VEC est à la pointe de la technologie pour les tâches de commande d'intensité.", 'pt': "A identificação da ordenação de intensidade entre palavras polares (positivas ou negativas) que possuem a mesma semântica pode levar a uma análise de sentimento refinada. Por exemplo, 'mestre', 'temperado' e 'familiar' apontam para diferentes níveis de intensidade, embora todos transmitam o mesmo significado (semântica), ou seja, perícia: ter um bom conhecimento de. Neste artigo, propomos uma técnica semi-supervisionada que usa embeddings de palavras portadoras de sentimento para produzir uma classificação contínua entre adjetivos que compartilham semânticas comuns. Nosso sistema demonstra uma forte correlação de classificação de Spearman de 0,83 com a classificação padrão-ouro. Mostramos que as incorporações de palavras com sentimento facilitam um sistema de classificação de intensidade mais preciso do que outras incorporações de palavras padrão (word2vec e GloVe). Word2vec é o estado da arte para tarefas de ordenação de intensidade.", 'ja': '同じ意味を持つ極性（正または負）単語間の強度順序の識別は、細かい感情分析につながる可能性があります。たとえば、「マスター」、「シーズンテッド」、「おなじみ」は、すべて同じ意味（意味論）を伝えていますが、異なる強度レベルを指しています。つまり、専門知識：についての十分な知識を持っています。本稿では、共通の意味論を共有する形容詞の間で連続的なランキングを生み出すために、センチメントベアリングの単語埋め込みを使用する半監修技術を提案する。私たちのシステムは、ゴールドスタンダードのランキングと0.83の強力なスピアマンのランク相関を示しています。センチメントベアリングの単語埋め込みは、他の標準的な単語埋め込み（ word 2 vecとGloVe ）よりも正確な強度ランキングシステムを容易にすることを示しています。Word 2 vecは、最先端の強度順序付けタスクです。', 'zh': '识同语义者极性(正数或负数)词之强,可以致细粒度之情。 如"大师","经验丰富"、"熟",虽传同义(语义),专业知识:良知也。 于本文中,设一半监督之术,该用带情词嵌入常见语义形容词之间连续排名。 吾属统显,斯皮尔曼名与金本位相关性为0.83。 吾等明与他格词嵌(word2vec比GloVe),带情词嵌助强度排名系统。 Word2vec者,所以先进之术也。', 'hi': "ध्रुवीय (सकारात्मक या नकारात्मक) शब्दों के बीच तीव्रता क्रम की पहचान, जिनमें समान शब्दार्थ हैं, एक ठीक-ठाक भावना विश्लेषण का कारण बन सकते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, 'मास्टर', 'अनुभवी' और 'परिचित' अलग-अलग तीव्रता के स्तर को इंगित करते हैं, हालांकि वे सभी एक ही अर्थ (शब्दार्थ) को व्यक्त करते हैं, यानी, विशेषज्ञता: एक अच्छा ज्ञान होना। इस पेपर में, हम एक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित तकनीक का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो सामान्य शब्दार्थ साझा करने वाले विशेषणों के बीच एक निरंतर रैंकिंग का उत्पादन करने के लिए भावना असर शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है। हमारी प्रणाली सोने के मानक रैंकिंग के साथ 0.83 के एक मजबूत Spearman रैंक सहसंबंध प्रदर्शित करता है. हम दिखाते हैं कि भावना असर शब्द embeddings अन्य मानक शब्द embeddings (word2vec और GloVe) की तुलना में एक अधिक सटीक तीव्रता रैंकिंग प्रणाली की सुविधा. Word2vec तीव्रता आदेश कार्य के लिए अत्याधुनिक है।", 'ru': 'Выявление порядка интенсивности среди полярных (положительных или отрицательных) слов, имеющих одинаковую семантику, может привести к мелкозернистому анализу настроений. Например, «мастер», «опытный» и «знакомый» указывают на разные уровни интенсивности, хотя все они передают одно и то же значение (семантику), то есть опыт: хорошее знание. В этой статье мы предлагаем полунадзорный метод, который использует вкладыши слов, несущих чувства, для создания непрерывного ранжирования среди прилагательных, которые имеют общую семантику. Наша система демонстрирует сильную корреляцию ранга Спирмена 0,83 с рейтингом золотого стандарта. Мы показываем, что вложения слов, несущих настроения, облегчают более точную систему ранжирования интенсивности, чем другие стандартные вложения слов (word2vec и GloVe). Word2vec - это современная задача упорядочения интенсивности.', 'ga': "D’fhéadfadh anailís mhionsonraithe ar an meon a bheith mar thoradh ar ord déine a shainaithint i measc na bhfocal polar (dearfach nó diúltach) a bhfuil an tséimeantaic chéanna acu. Mar shampla, léiríonn `máistir', `séasúrach' agus `familiar' leibhéil déine éagsúla, cé go dtugann siad go léir an bhrí chéanna (séimeantaic), i.e., saineolas: eolas maith a bheith agat ar. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid teicníocht leath-mhaoirsithe a úsáideann leabaithe focal ar a bhfuil meon chun rangú leanúnach a dhéanamh i measc aidiachtaí a bhfuil an tséimeantaic choitianta acu. Léiríonn ár gcóras comhghaol láidir céime Spearman de 0.83 leis an rangú caighdeán óir. Léirímid go n-éascaíonn leabú focal le meon le córas rangaithe déine níos cruinne ná le leabú focal caighdeánach eile (word2vec agus GloVe). Is é Word2vec an tasc is nua-aimseartha maidir le déine a ordú.", 'hu': 'Azonos szemantikájú poláris (pozitív vagy negatív) szavak intenzitási rendjének azonosítása finomszemcsés érzelmek elemzéséhez vezethet. Például a "mester", a "tapasztalt" és a "ismerős" intenzitási szintekre mutatnak, bár mindegyik ugyanazt a jelentést (szemantikát), azaz a szakértelmet: jó ismeretekkel rendelkezik. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan félig felügyelt technikát javasolunk, amely érzelmeket hordozó szóbeágyazásokat használ, hogy folyamatos rangsorolást hozzon létre a közös szemantikában használt melléknevek között. Rendszerünk a Spearman 0,83-as rangkorrelációját mutatja az arany standard rangsorral. Megmutatjuk, hogy az érzelmeket hordozó szóbeágyazások pontosabb intenzitási rangsorolási rendszert tesznek lehetővé, mint más standard szóbeágyazások (word2vec és GloVe). A Word2vec a legkorszerűbb intenzitás rendezési feladat.', 'el': 'Ο προσδιορισμός της τάξης έντασης μεταξύ πολικών (θετικών ή αρνητικών) λέξεων που έχουν την ίδια σημασιολογία μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε μια λεπτή ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Για παράδειγμα, "δάσκαλος", "έμπειρος" και "οικείος" υποδεικνύουν διαφορετικά επίπεδα έντασης, αν και όλα μεταφέρουν το ίδιο νόημα (σημασιολογία), δηλαδή τεχνογνωσία: έχοντας καλή γνώση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια τεχνική ημι-εποπτευμένη που χρησιμοποιεί ενσάρκωση λέξεων συναισθημάτων για να παράγει μια συνεχή κατάταξη μεταξύ των επίθετων που μοιράζονται κοινή σημασιολογία. Το σύστημά μας δείχνει μια ισχυρή συσχέτιση βαθμού του Σπίαρμαν 0.83 με την κατάταξη του χρυσού προτύπου. Δείχνουμε ότι οι ενσάρκωσες λέξεων συναισθημάτων διευκολύνουν ένα ακριβέστερο σύστημα κατάταξης έντασης από άλλες τυποποιημένες ενσάρκωσες λέξεων (και GloVe). Το Word2vec είναι η υπερσύγχρονη εργασία για την παραγγελία έντασης.', 'ka': "ინტენსიტეტის დაწყვეტილების ინტენსიტეტის განსაზღვრება პოლარის (პოლიტიური ან negaტიური) სიტყვის, რომლებიც იგივე სემონტიკები აქვს, შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ სენტიმე მაგალითად, `მასტერი', `მოცემულ' და `მოცემულ' უნდა განსხვავებული ინტენსტიური დონეზე, მაგრამ ყველა იგივე ნიშნავს (სმენტიკები), მაგალითად, ექსპერტიკური ექსპერტიკური ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მივიღებთ ნახევარწმუნებული ტექნექცია, რომელიც გამოყენებს სენტიმენტის სიტყვების შესაბამისი სიტყვების შესაბამისათვის, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული სენტიკების შორის მუშ ჩვენი სისტემა გამოჩვენება ძალიან სპერმანის კორელაციას 0.83-ის სისტემაში, რომელიც უფრო ძალიან სპერმანის სისტემა. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სენტიმენტის სიტყვების შემდეგ სიტყვების შემდეგ უფრო მარტივია ინტენსტივის რენგენციის სისტემა, ვიდრე სხვა სენტანდერული სიტყვების შემდეგ (სიტყ Word2vec არის ინტენსტიტური დაწყვეტის საქმე.", 'it': 'L\'identificazione dell\'ordine di intensità tra parole polari (positive o negative) che hanno la stessa semantica può portare ad un\'analisi del sentiment a grana fine. Ad esempio, "master", "staged" e "familiar" indicano livelli di intensità diversi, sebbene tutti trasmettano lo stesso significato (semantica), cioè competenze: avere una buona conoscenza di. In questo articolo, proponiamo una tecnica semi-supervisionata che utilizza embedding di parole portatrici di sentiment per produrre una classifica continua tra aggettivi che condividono semantica comune. Il nostro sistema dimostra una forte correlazione di livello Spearman di 0,83 con il ranking gold standard. Mostriamo che le incorporazioni di parole con sentiment bearing facilitano un sistema di classificazione dell\'intensità più accurato rispetto ad altre incorporazioni di parole standard (word2vec e GloVe). Word2vec è lo stato dell\'arte per il compito di ordine dell\'intensità.', 'lt': 'Intensiškumo nustatymas tarp polinių (teigiamų arba neigiamų) žodžių, turinčių tą pačią semantiką, gali lemti smulkių grūdų jausmų analizę. Pavyzdžiui, „šeimininkas“, „sezoninis“ ir „žinomas“ rodo skirtingus intensyvumo lygius, nors jie visi reiškia tą pači ą reikšmę (semantiką), t. y. patirtį: gerai žinoti. Šiame dokumente siūlome pusiau prižiūrimą metodą, kuriuo naudojami jausmą turintys žodžių įterpimai, kad būtų nuolat klasifikuojami adjektyvai, kurie dalijasi bendra semantika. Mūs ų sistema rodo stiprią Spearmano 0,83 laipsnio koreliaciją su aukso standartiniu laipsniu. Mes rodome, kad jausmą turintys žodžių įdėjimai palengvina tikslesnę intensyvumo klasifikavimo sistemą nei kiti standartiniai žodžių įdėjimai (word2vec ir GloVe). Word2vec yra naujausia intensyvumo tvarkymo užduotis.', 'mk': 'Идентификацијата на редењето на интензитетот помеѓу поларните (позитивни или негативни) зборови кои имаат иста семантика може да доведе до фина анализа на чувствата. На пример, „господар“, „сезониран“ и „познат“ покажуваат на различни нивоа на интензитет, иако сите тие го пренесуваат истото значење (семантика), т.е. експертиза: имаат добро знаење за. Во овој весник предложуваме полунадгледувана техника која користи вградување на зборови со чувства за да создаде континуиран рангирање меѓу прилегтивите кои делат заедничка семантика. Нашиот систем покажува силна корелација на Спирман од 0,83 со златниот стандарден ранг. Ние покажуваме дека вградувањето на зборови со чувства овозможува попрецизен систем на рангирање на интензитетот од другите стандардни вградувања на зборови (word2vec и GloVe). Word2vec е најновата задача за редење интензитет.', 'kk': "Бірақ семантикасы бар полярдық (оң не негативті) сөздер арасындағы тең реттеу тізбегін анықтауға болады. Бірақ симпатикалардың бірдей симпатикалық симпатикалық анализациясы жақ Мысалы, `мастер', `тәжірибелі' және `білмейтін' деңгейіне бірнеше тең деңгейіне белгіледі, бірақ олар бір мақсатты (семантикалық), т.е. білім: жақсы білім бар. Бұл қағазда біз жарты бақылау техникасын таңдаймыз. Бұл сөздерді ендіру үшін жарты бақылау техникасын қолданады. Бұл жалпы семантикаларды ортақтастыратын адрестер арасында тұрақты реттеу үшін. Біздің жүйеміз Спеарманың 0,83-нің алтын стандартты жолдарының күшті қатынасын көрсетеді. Біз сөздерді ендіру сезіміміз басқа стандартты сөздерді ендіру (2vec және Glove сөздерінің) дегеннен артықшылығын көмектеседі. Word2vec is the state- of- the- art for intensity ordering task.", 'ms': "Pengenalan pengaturan intensiti diantara perkataan kutub (positif atau negatif) yang mempunyai semantik yang sama boleh membawa kepada analisis perasaan yang berwarna ganda. Contohnya, `master', `seasoned' dan `familiar' menunjukkan aras intensiti yang berbeza, walaupun mereka semua menyampaikan makna yang sama (semantik), iaitu keahlian: mempunyai pengetahuan yang baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan teknik setengah-mengawasi yang menggunakan penerbangan sentimen yang membawa perkataan untuk menghasilkan rangkaian terus-menerus diantara adjektif yang berkongsi semantik umum. Sistem kita menunjukkan korelasi tingkat Spearman yang kuat 0.83 dengan tingkat piawai emas. We show that sentiment bearing word embeddings facilitate a more accurate intensity ranking system than other standard word embeddings (word2vec and GloVe).  Word2vec adalah state-of-the-art untuk tugas perintah intensiti.", 'ml': "ഒരേ സെമാന്റിക്കുകളിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ഉറപ്പുള്ള ഉത്തരവാക്കുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴിയ ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, മാസ്റ്റര്\u200d 'സീസ്' എന്നിട്ടും 'പരിചയപ്പെട്ടു' വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഉള്ള നിലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. അവരെല്ലാം ഒരേ അര്\u200dത്ഥം വിവരിച്ചാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സെമി-സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്നിക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ശക്തിയുള്ള സ്പെയുമാന്\u200dറെ സ്വർണ്ണസ്റ്റാർഡ് റാങ്കിങുമായി സ്പെയിന്\u200dറെ സ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് മറ്റുള്ള സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തുള്ളതിനെക വാര്\u200dഡ്\u200c2വെക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിനുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയാണ്.", 'mt': "L-identifikazzjoni tal-ordni tal-intensità fost il-kliem polari (pożittiv jew negattiv) li għandhom l-istess semantika tista’ twassal għal analiżi tas-sentiment imqadded fin. Pereżempju, `kaptan', `staġonat' u `familjari' jindikaw livelli different i ta' intensità, għalkemm dawn kollha jgħaddu l-istess tifsira (semantika), jiġifieri l-għarfien espert: li jkollhom għarfien tajjeb dwar. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu teknika semi-sorveljata li tuża inkorporazzjonijiet bil-kliem sensittiv biex tipproduċi klassifikazzjoni kontinwa fost l-a ġġettivi li jaqsmu s-semantika komuni. Is-sistema tagħna turi korrelazzjoni qawwija tal-grad ta’ Spearman ta’ 0.83 mal-gradazzjoni standard tad-deheb. Aħna nuru li l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem li jġorru s-sentimenti jiffaċilitaw sistema ta’ klassifikazzjoni ta’ intensità aktar preċiża minn inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem standard oħrajn (word2vec u GloVe). Word2vec huwa l-aktar xogħol avvanzat għall-ordnar tal-intensità.", 'mn': 'Яг ижил хэмжээний шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэртэй (эерэг эсвэл сөрөг) үгнүүдийн хэмжээний тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тухай мэдрэмжүүдийн шинжлэх ухаанд хүргэж чадна. Жишээлбэл, "магистр", "салбар" болон "танил" өөр хүчирхийллийн түвшинд ижил утгыг илэрхийлж байгаа ч, тэд бүгд ижил утгыг илэрхийлж чаддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэмжтэй үг нэвтрүүлэх сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ашигладаг талаарх удирдлагатай техник гаргаж байна. Бидний систем Спеарманын 0.83-ийн алт стандарттай холбоотой хүчтэй холбоотой байдлыг харуулдаг. Бид өөр стандарт үгнээс илүү зөв хэмжээсүүдтэй мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөл нь бусад стандарт үгнээс илүү зөв хэмжээсүүдтэй байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Word2vec гэдэг нь хүчирхийлэл захирах үйлдлийн төвшин урлагийн төвшин юм.', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av intensitetsordning mellom polar (positiv eller negativ) ord som har samme semantikk kan føra til ein fin-korn sentimentanalyse. For eksempel «master», «seasoned» og «familiar» viser ulike intensitetsnivåar, men all e gjev det same mening (semantikk), t.d. ekspertisert: å ha ein god kunnskap om. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein semioversikt teknikk som brukar sentiment som innebærar ord for å produsere ein kontinuerleg ranking blant adjektiv som deler felles semantikk. Sistemet vårt demonstrerer ein sterk spearman rankkorrelasjon av 0,83 med gull standard rekning. Vi viser at følelsesinnbygging av ord gjer enklarer eit meir nøyaktig intensitetsrangeringssystem enn andre standardverdingar (ord2vec og Glove). Word2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity order task.', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja porządku intensywności wśród słów polarnych (pozytywnych lub negatywnych), które mają tę samą semantykę, może prowadzić do dokładnej analizy sentymentów. Na przykład, "mistrz", "doświadczony" i "znany" wskazują na różne poziomy intensywności, choć wszystkie przekazują to samo znaczenie (semantyka), tj. wiedzę: posiadanie dobrej wiedzy. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy technikę pół-nadzorowaną, która wykorzystuje osadzenia sentymentów noszących słowa do tworzenia ciągłego rankingu wśród przymiotników, które mają wspólną semantykę. Nasz system wykazuje silną korelację rankingową Spearmana 0.83 z rankingiem standardowym złota. Pokazujemy, że osadzenia słów noszących sentyment ułatwiają dokładniejszy system rankingu intensywności niż inne standardowe osadzenia słów (word2vec i GloVe). Word2vec jest najnowocześniejszym zadaniem w zakresie porządkowania intensywności.', 'ro': 'Identificarea ordinii intensității între cuvintele polare (pozitive sau negative) care au aceeași semantică poate duce la o analiză fină a sentimentului. De exemplu, "maestru", "condimentat" și "familiar" indică diferite niveluri de intensitate, deși toate transmit același sens (semantică), adică expertiză: a avea o bună cunoaștere a acestora. În această lucrare, propunem o tehnică semi-supravegheată care utilizează încorporări de cuvinte purtătoare de sentimente pentru a produce un clasament continuu între adjective care împărtășesc semantica comună. Sistemul nostru demonstrează o corelație puternică a rangului Spearman de 0,83 cu clasamentul standard de aur. Aratăm că încorporările cuvintelor purtătoare de sentiment facilitează un sistem de clasificare a intensității mai precis decât alte încorporări standard de cuvinte (word2vec și GloVe). Word2vec este cea mai modernă sarcină pentru ordinea intensității.', 'sr': "Identifikacija intenzitetne nareðenja izmeðu polarnih (pozitivnih ili negativnih) reèi koje imaju iste semantike može dovesti do analize finog zrnca sentiment a. Na primer, `master', `seasoned' i `poznat' ukazuju na različite nivoe intenzitete, iako svi predstavljaju isto značenje (semantika), tj. stručnost: imati dobro znanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo polu-nadzornu tehniku koja koristi osjećaj noseći riječi o integraciji kako bi proizvela stalnu ranking među adjektivima koji dijele zajedničke semantike. Naš sistem pokazuje snažnu korelaciju Spearman a od 0,83 sa standardnom redom zlata. Pokazujemo da osećanja koje nose reči, olakšavaju tačniji sistem rendžanja intenzitete nego drugi standardni uređaji reči (reč 2vec i Glove). Word2vec je država umjetnosti za naređenje intenziteta.", 'si': "සමාන විද්\u200dයාවක් තියෙන පුළුවන් විශාල විශේෂණයකට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයා උදාහරණයෙන්, `මාස්ටර්', `සම්බන්ධ' සහ `දන්නවන්' වෙනස් උත්තර ස්ථානයකට පෙන්වන්න, ඔවුන් හැමෝම එකම අර්ථය (සෙමාන්ටික්සික්),  මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ පරික්ෂා විද්\u200dයාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා සමා අපේ පද්ධතිය පෙන්වන්නේ ශක්තිමත් ස්පෙර්මාන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය 0.83 ක් තියෙන්නේ සුන් ස්ටැන්ඩ් රේට් එක්ක. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ වචන සැකසුම් විතරයි අනිත් ප්\u200dරමාණ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචන වචන සැකසුම් වලට වඩා සැකසුම් ව Word2Vec is the state-of-the-art for Intersity Sorting job.", 'so': "Aqoonsashada daryeelka koronta (positive ama negative) oo ay leeyihiin isku mid midibka ah waxay ku socon karaan baaritaanka fikrada. Tusaale ahaan `macallin', `xilliga' iyo `aqoonta' waxay leeyihiin heerar aad u kala duduwan, in kastoo ay dhammaantood soo bandhigaan micnaha isku mid ah (semantika), waa aqoonta aad u yaqaaniin. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa tekniko la ilaaliyo hal ka mid ah oo isticmaalaya xisaabta ku saabsan hadalka ku jirta, si aan u soo bixino safar sii socota ah oo ku saabsan semantika caadiga ah. nidaamkayagu wuxuu muujiyaa derejada xoogga leh ee Spearman oo ku xiran 0.83 heerka kaarka dahabka ah. Waxaynu tusnaynaa fikrada ay leedahay hadalka ku socota, waxay u fududaysaa nidaamka aad u saxda ee ka mid ah nidaamka kaleba oo ka mid ah hadalka caadiga ah (Word2vec iyo GloVe). Word2vec waa xaalad-u-art oo aad u amartaa shaqo intense ah.", 'sv': 'Identifiering av intensitetsordning bland polära (positiva eller negativa) ord som har samma semantik kan leda till en finkornig sentimentalanalys. Exempelvis pekar "master", "rutinerad" och "bekant" på olika intensitetsnivåer, även om de alla förmedlar samma mening (semantik), dvs. expertis: ha en god kunskap om. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en halvövervakad teknik som använder sentimentbärande ordinbäddningar för att producera en kontinuerlig rankning bland adjektiv som delar gemensam semantik. Vårt system visar en stark Spearmans rank korrelation på 0,83 med gold standard ranking. Vi visar att sentimentbärande ordinbäddningar underlättar ett mer exakt intensitetsrankningssystem än andra standardordinbäddningar (word2vec och GloVe). Word2vec är den toppmoderna uppgiften för intensitetsbeställning.', 'ta': "போரில் (நேரான அல்லது எதிர்மறை) வார்த்தைகளுக்கிடையில் உறுதிப்படுத்தல் கட்டளையை அடையாளம் கொடுக்கலாம் அதே போன்ற அமைப்புகள் உள்ளன உதாரணத்திற்கு 'அமர்ந்து' மற்றும் 'தெரியும்' வெவ்வேறு நிலைகளுக்கு புள்ளி In this paper, we propose a semi-supervised technique that uses sentiment bearing word embeddings to produce a continuous ranking among adjectives that share common semantics.  எங்கள் கணினியில் ஒரு வலிமை ஸ்பெர்மான் நிலையில் 0.83 தொடர்பை காட்டுகிறது தங்கப்பட்ட நிலை நிலையில் உள்ளது. நாம் வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கும் உணர்வு காட்டுகிறது மற்ற நிலையான வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுதலை விட அதிக சரியான உயரத்திற்கு முறைமையை காட்டுக Word2vec என்பது உறுதியான வரிசைப்படுத்தும் பணிக்கான நிலையில் உள்ளது.", 'ur': 'مضبوط (مثبت یا منفی) کلمات کے درمیان مضبوط طریقے کے سفارش کا پہچان کرنا ہے جس کے پاس ایک ہی سیمانٹیکس ہے، ایک پاکیزہ دانے کے احساس تحلیل کی وجہ سے پیش کرسکتا ہے. مثال یہ ہے کہ "master"، "seasoned" اور "familiar" مختلف مضبوط سطح کو نشان دیتے ہیں، اگرچہ وہ سب ایک ہی معنی پہنچاتے ہیں، یعنی علم، خوب جانتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نصف نظارت کی تکنیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو کلمات ابندینگ کے ذریعے استعمال کرتا ہے کہ ان کے ساتھیوں میں ایک دائمی رقم پیدا کرے جو مشترک سیمانٹیک کے ساتھ شریک ہیں ہماری سیستم ایک قوی اسپیرمن کی صف تعلق 0.83 کی سونے کی استاندارڈ رینگ کے ساتھ دکھاتی ہے ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ احساسات بوجھ اٹھانے والی باتیں دوسرے استاندارڈ کلمات سے زیادہ دقیق ترین ترکیب سیستم کو آسان کرتی ہیں۔ Word2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity ordering task.', 'uz': 'Tashqi (positiv yoki negativ) so\'zlari орасида aniqlash imkoniyatini aniqlash mumkin. Bu huddi semantik bo\'lgan so\'zlarni ajratish mumkin. Masalan, "Master" va "ko\'rsatilgan" har xil darajaga boshqa darajaga ega bo\'ladi, agar hamma ma ma\'lumot bir necha ma\'lumotga ega bo\'lsa, balki ma\'lumotga yaxshi bilmagan. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir semiz taʼminlovchi teknikani foydalanuvchi so\'zlarni o\'zgartirish mumkin, bir davom etish uchun umumiy semantika bilan bir davomida chegarani yaratish mumkin. Our system demonstrates a strong Spearman\'s rank correlation of 0.83 with the gold standard ranking.  Biz shunday hisob qilamiz, so\'zlar ichki so\'zlar ichki soʻzni boshqa standard soʻzni boshqa soʻzlardan foydalanishini aniqlaydi. Name', 'vi': "Nhận diện mật khẩu độ mạnh giữa từ vùng cực (dương hay âm) mà có cùng ngữ nghĩa thì có thể dẫn đến phân tích cảm xúc sắc màu. Ví dụ như,'thầy','gia vị'và'quen thuộc' chỉ đi ểm với mức độ độ độ độ nhiệt độ khác nhau, mặc dù chúng đều mang cùng một ý nghĩa (ngữ pháp), tức là chuyên môn: có kiến thức tốt về. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một kỹ thuật bán giám sát sử dụng sự gắn bó từ tình cảm để tạo ra một vị trí liên tục giữa tính từ chia sẻ mọi ngữ pháp. Hệ thống của chúng ta thể hiện mối tương quan hàng loạt của Spearman với thứ hạng chuẩn vàng. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng sự nhúng vào từ chứa cảm xúc giúp một hệ thống có tỷ lệ độ mạnh hơn nhiều so với những sự nhúng vào từ chuẩn khác (Word2Véc và GloVe). Word2Véc là công cụ hiện đại cho nhiệm vụ đặt độ mạnh.", 'bg': 'Идентифицирането на подреждането на интензивността сред полярни (положителни или отрицателни) думи, които имат една и съща семантика, може да доведе до фин анализ на сантименталността. Например, "майстор", "опитен" и "познат" сочат към различни нива на интензивност, въпреки че всички те изразяват едно и също значение (семантика), т.е. опит: да имат добри познания. В тази статия ние предлагаме полу-надзорна техника, която използва сантиментални вграждания на думи, за да създаде непрекъснато класиране сред прилагателните, които споделят обща семантика. Системата ни демонстрира силна корелация на Спиърман от 0.83 с класирането на златния стандарт. Показваме, че вграждането на сантиментални думи улеснява по-точната система за класиране на интензивността от другите стандартни вграждания на думи (word2vec и GloVe). Word2vec е най-съвременната задача за подреждане на интензивността.', 'da': "Identifikation af intensitetsorden blandt polære (positive eller negative) ord, der har samme semantik, kan føre til en finkornet sentimentalanalyse. For eksempel peger 'master', 'erfarne' og 'velkendte' på forskellige intensitetsniveauer, selvom de alle formidler den samme betydning (semantik), dvs. ekspertise: at have et godt kendskab til. I denne artikel foreslår vi en semi-overvåget teknik, der bruger sentimentbærende ordindlejringer til at producere en kontinuerlig placering blandt adjektiver, der deler fælles semantik. Vores system viser en stærk Spearmans rangkorrelation på 0,83 med gold standard ranking. Vi viser, at sentimentbærende ordindlejringer letter et mere præcist intensitetsrankingssystem end andre standard ordindlejringer (word2vec og GloVe). Word2vec er den state-of-the-art til intensitetsbestillingsopgave.", 'hr': "Identifikacija intenzitetne naređenja između polarnih (pozitivnih ili negativnih) riječi koje imaju iste semantike može dovesti do analize osjećaja u fino zrno. Na primjer, `master', `seasoned' i `poznat' ukazuju na različite razine intenzitete, iako svi donose isto značenje (semantika), tj. stručnost: imati dobro znanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo polu-nadzornu tehniku koja koristi osjećaj noseći riječi o integraciji kako bi proizvela neprestano rangiranje među adjektivima koji dijele zajedničke semantike. Naš sustav pokazuje jaku korelaciju Spearman a od 0,83 sa standardnom redom zlata. Pokazujemo da osjećaji koji nose riječi uključuju točniji sustav rendžanja intenzitete nego drugi standardni uključujući riječi (rečeno 2vec i Glove). Word2vec je država umjetnosti za naređenje intenzitete.", 'id': "Identifikasi perintah intensitas diantara kata-kata polar (positif atau negatif) yang memiliki semantik yang sama dapat menyebabkan analisis sentimen yang sempurna. Contohnya, `master', `seasoned' dan `familiar' menunjukkan tingkat intensitas yang berbeda, meskipun mereka semua menyampaikan arti yang sama (semantik), yaitu keahlian: memiliki pengetahuan yang baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan teknik semi-supervised yang menggunakan sentimen bearing word embedding untuk menghasilkan rangkaian terus-menerus diantara adjektif yang berbagi semantik umum. Our system demonstrates a strong Spearman's rank correlation of 0.83 with the gold standard ranking.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa penerbangan sentimen yang membawa kata memudahkan sistem peringkat intensitas yang lebih akurat daripada penerbangan kata standar lainnya (word2vec dan GloVe). Word2vec adalah state-of-the-art untuk tugas perintah intensitas.", 'ko': "같은 의미를 가진 극성(긍정적 또는 소극적)어 간의 강도 순서를 식별하면 세립도 정서 분석을 할 수 있다.예를 들어'대사','노련함'과'익숙함'은 서로 다른 강도 등급을 가리킨다. 비록 그들은 모두 같은 의미(의미), 즉 전문 지식을 전달했지만 지식에 대해 잘 알고 있다.본고에서 우리는 반감독 기술을 제기했는데 이 기술은 감정을 가진 단어를 삽입하여 공통된 의미를 가진 형용사 사이에 연속적인 순서를 형성한다.우리 시스템에 따르면 스필만 등급과 금 본위 등급 사이에는 0.83의 강한 관련성이 존재한다.우리는 다른 표준 단어 삽입(word2vec와GloVe)에 비해 감정이 있는 단어 삽입은 더욱 정확한 강도 정렬 시스템을 구축하는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 발견했다.Word2vec는 가장 선진적인 강도 정렬 작업입니다.", 'fa': 'شناسایی سفارش شدت بین کلمات قطعی (مثبت یا منفی) که همان سیمانتیک دارند می\u200cتواند به یک تحلیل احساسات پاکیزه برساند. برای مثال، «استاد», «شناخته شده» و «آشنا» به سطح تند مختلف نشان می\u200cدهند، اگرچه همه آنها معنی مشابه (semantics) را می\u200cدهند، یعنی متخصص: دانش خوبی دارند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک تکنیک نیمه تحت نظر قرار گرفته که از احساسات استفاده می\u200cکند که کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکند برای تولید یک صفحه دائمی بین مصاحبه\u200cهای مشترک که سیمانتیک مشترک را شریک می\u200cکنند. سیستم ما یک ارتباط صف اسپرمن قوی 0.83 با صف استاندارد طلا نشان می دهد. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که احساسات با کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکنند، سیستم تنظیم دقیق\u200cتر از کلمه\u200cهای استاندارد (کلمه 2vec و Glove) را آسان می\u200cسازند. Word2vec (به انگلیسی: Word2vec) وضعیت هنری برای دستور شدت است.', 'sw': 'Kutambua amri yenye umuhimu kati ya maneno ya uchaguzi (chanya au hasi) ambayo ina mifano hiyo yanaweza kusababisha uchambuzi mzuri wa hisia. Kwa mfano, ‘Mheshimiwa’ na ‘kufahamu’ inakusudia kiwango tofauti cha kiwango, ingawa wote wanaeleza maana sawa (semantics), yaani utaalam: kuwa na ujuzi mzuri. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza teknolojia inayofuatiliwa na sekondari ambayo inatumia hisia zinazobeba maneno yanayoendelea kutengeneza rangi ya kuendelea miongoni mwa washiriki ambao hugawanyia mifano ya kawaida. Mfumo wetu unaonyesha cheo cha nguvu cha Spearman kinachohusiana na 0.83 kwa kiwango cha dhahabu. Tunaonyesha kwamba hisia zinazobeba maneno yanayoweza kusaidia mfumo wa ngazi sahihi zaidi ya maneno mengine ya kawaida (Word2vec na GloVe). Word2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity ordering task.', 'de': 'Die Identifizierung von Intensitätsordnungen bei polaren (positiven oder negativen) Wörtern mit gleicher Semantik kann zu einer feinkörnigen Stimmungsanalyse führen. Beispielsweise weisen "Meister", "Erfahrene" und "Vertraute" auf unterschiedliche Intensitätsstufen hin, obwohl sie alle die gleiche Bedeutung (Semantik) vermitteln, d.h. Expertise: gute Kenntnisse haben. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine semi-überwachte Technik vor, die sentimenttragende Worteinbettungen verwendet, um ein kontinuierliches Ranking unter Adjektiven zu erzeugen, die gemeinsame Semantik teilen. Unser System zeigt eine starke Spearmans Rangkorrelation von 0,83 mit dem Gold Standard Ranking. Wir zeigen, dass sentimenttragende Wort-Einbettungen ein genaueres Intensitäts-Ranking-System ermöglichen als andere Standard-Wort-Einbettungen (word2vec und GloVe). Word2vec ist der Stand der Technik für die Intensitätsbestellung.', 'tr': "Polar (pozitif ýa-da negatif) sözleriň arasyndaky ýigrenlik terjimesini tanyşdyrmak hem de ýigrenç duýgular analyzasyna sebep biler. mysal. `maestr', `meňzedili' we `tanyş' diýjek derejesi birnäçe ýigrenç derejesine görkezýär, hemmesi birnäçe meňzedilik (sematik), diýipdir ukyplary: gowy bilim bar. Bu kağıt içinde, orta semantik bölünen adjektivler arasında sürekli bir yerleşik şeklinde duyglama taýýarlanan, yarı gözlemli bir teknik sunuyoruz. Biziň sistemamyz Spearman'yň 0,83 derejesi derejesi bilen güýçli bir gabdalygyny görkez. Biz kelime taýýarlayan duygulary başga standart kelimelerden (word2vec we Glove) dogry derecede ýigrenç sistemi bejerjekdigini görkeýäris. Söz2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity ordering task.", 'nl': "Identificatie van intensiteitsordening tussen polaire (positieve of negatieve) woorden die dezelfde semantiek hebben, kan leiden tot een fijnkorrelige sentimentanalyse. Bijvoorbeeld, 'meester', 'doorgewinterd' en 'vertrouwd' wijzen op verschillende intensiteitsniveaus, hoewel ze allemaal dezelfde betekenis (semantiek) overbrengen, d.w.z. expertise: een goede kennis van hebben. In dit artikel stellen we een semi-supervised techniek voor die gebruik maakt van sentimentdragende woord embeddings om een continue rangschikking te produceren tussen bijvoeglijke naamwoorden die gemeenschappelijke semantiek delen. Ons systeem toont een sterke rangcorrelatie van Spearman van 0.83 met de goudstandaard rang. We laten zien dat sentimentdragende woord embeddings een nauwkeuriger intensiteitsrankingssysteem vergemakkelijken dan andere standaard woord embeddings (word2vec en GloVe). Word2vec is de state-of-the-art voor intensiteit ordenen taak.", 'am': 'በፖርቲካ (positive ወይም negative) ቃላት መካከል የጥቅረት አዋጅ የሚያሳውቅ እና የተመሳሳይ ስሜት የሚያሳውቅ ይችላል፡፡ ለምሳሌ ‹መምህር›› እና ‹ማወቅ› ለልዩ ደረጃዎች አካባቢ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የተጠበቀው የስሜት ግንኙነትን የሚሸከሙትን ቃላት የሚሸከሙትን የዘወትር ግንኙነት ለመፍጠር እናስባለን፡፡ ሲስተምረታችን የ0.83 የጦር አካባቢ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የቃላትን አቀማመጥ የሚሸከሙት ስህተት ከሌሎቹ ትክክለኛ ቃላት (የword2vec እና GloVe) የሚደረገውን ስህተት ማሻሻሻል፡፡ Word2vec - የ-art-state-of-the-art - for intense order job.', 'sq': "Identifikimi i renditjes së intensitetit midis fjalëve polare (pozitive apo negative) që kanë të njëjtin semantik mund të çojë në një analizë të mirë të ndjenjave. Për shembull, `master', `seasoned' and `familiar' point to different intensity levels, though they all convey the same meaning (semantics), i.e., expertise: having a good knowledge of. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një teknikë gjysmë-mbikqyrure që përdor ndjenjat që mbajnë fjalë të përfshira për të prodhuar një renditje të vazhdueshme midis adjektivëve që ndajnë semantikën e përbashkët. Our system demonstrates a strong Spearman's rank correlation of 0.83 with the gold standard ranking.  Ne tregojmë se përfshirjet me fjalë të ndjeshme lehtësojnë një sistem të renditjes më të saktë të intensitetit se përfshirjet e tjera të fjalës standard (word2vec dhe GloVe). Word2vec është më i miri për detyrën e renditjes së intensitetit.", 'hy': "Ինտենսինսիվության կարգավորումը հյուսիսային (դրական կամ բացասական) բառերի միջև, որոնք ունեն նույն սեմանտիկա, կարող է հանգեցնել նրբագեղ զգացմունքների վերլուծության: Օրինակ, «մեծապետ», «ժամանակավոր» և «ծանոթ» նշանակում են տարբեր ինտենսիվության մակարդակներ, չնայած որ նրանք բոլորն էլ միևնույն իմաստը (սեմանտիկա), այսինքն՝ մասնագիտություն ունենալը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք կես-վերահսկված տեխնիկա, որը օգտագործում է զգացմունքներով բառերի ներդրումներ, որպեսզի ստեղծի անընդհատ դասակարգում ընդհանուր սեմանտիկայի միջև: Our system demonstrates a strong Spearman's rank correlation of 0.83 with the gold standard ranking.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ զգացմունքներով ներդրված բառերը ավելի ճշգրիտ ինտենսիվության դասակարգման համակարգը հեշտացնում են, քան այլ ստանդարտ բառերի ներդրման համակարգը (Word2ve և Global). Word2vc-ը ինտենսիվության կարգավորման ամենաբարձր խնդիրների համար է:", 'af': "Identifikasie van intensiteit ordening tussen polêre (positiewe of negatiewe) woorde wat dieselfde semantieke het kan lei na 'n fyn-koring sentimentanalisie. Byvoorbeeld, `master', `seasoned' en `familiar' punt na verskillende intensiteit vlakke, alhoewel hulle almal dieselfde betekening (semantieke), t.d. ekspertiseer: het 'n goeie kennis van. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n semi-ondersoekte teknike wat sentiment gebruik wat word inbêding dra om 'n voortdurende rangering te produseer onder adjektives wat gemeenskaplike semantieke deel. Ons stelsel wys 'n sterk Spearman se rank korrelasie van 0.83 met die goud standaard ranging. Ons wys dat sentiment wat word inbêding dra het, â\x80\x99n meer presies intensiteit rangering stelsel gemeenskap as ander standaard woord inbêding (woorde 2vec en Glove). Word2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity order task.", 'az': "AynńĪ semantik olan polar (pozitif v…ô negatif) s√∂zl…ôrin arasńĪnda Ňüidd…ôtli sńĪralamasńĪnńĪn t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsi q…ôd…ôr g√∂z…ôl hiss analizi olar. M…ôs…ôl…ôn, `master', `seasoned' v…ô `familiar' m√ľxt…ôlif s…ôviyy…ôl…ôr…ô m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr istifad…ô edirl…ôr, amma hamńĪsńĪ aynńĪ m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri anlayńĪrlar, m…ôs…ôl…ôn t…ôhsil edirl…ôr: yaxŇüńĪ bilirl…ôr. Bu kańüńĪzda, ortaq semantik paylaŇüan adjektivel…ôr arasńĪnda h…ômiŇü…ôlik bir d…ôr…ôc…ô yaratmaq √ľ√ß√ľn duygularńĪ il…ô istifad…ô ed…ôn yarńĪ-g√∂zl…ôyirli bir tekniki t…ôklif edirik. Sistemimiz g√ľcl√ľ Spearman d…ôr…ôc…ôsinin 0,83 il…ô altńĪn standart d…ôr…ôc…ôsini g√∂st…ôrir. Biz s√∂zl…ôri daŇüńĪyan hissl…ôrin baŇüqa standart s√∂zl…ôrd…ôn daha dońüru bir s…ôviyy…ôt sistemini asanlaŇüdńĪrmańüńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôririk. Word2vec Ňüidd…ôtli sńĪralama iŇül…ôrinin durumu.", 'bs': "Identifikacija intenzitetne naređenja između polarnih (pozitivnih ili negativnih) riječi koje imaju iste semantike može dovesti do analize finog zrnca osjećanja. Na primjer, `master', `seasoned' i `poznat' ukazuju na različite nivoe intenzitete, iako svi predstavljaju isto značenje (semantika), tj. stručnost: imati dobro znanje. U ovom papiru predlažemo polu-nadzornu tehniku koja koristi osjećaj noseći riječi o integraciji kako bi proizvela stalnu ranking među adjektivima koji dijele zajedničke semantike. Naš sistem pokazuje jaku korelaciju Spearman a od 0,83 sa standardnom redom zlata. Mi pokazujemo da osjećaji koji nose riječi, olakšavaju precizniji sistem rendžanja intenzitete nego druge standardne rečenice (rečeno 2vec i Glove). Word2vec je država umjetnosti za naređenje intenziteta.", 'ca': "La identificació de l'ordenació d'intensitat entre paraules polars (positives o negatives) que tenen la mateixa semàntica pot portar a una anàlisi de sentiments fines. Per exemple, «mestre», «temporat» i «familiar» aporten a nivells d'intensitat diferents, tot i que tots transmetren el mateix significat (semàntica), és a dir, experiència: tenir un bon coneixement. En aquest paper, proposem una tècnica semisupervisada que utilitza integracions de paraules portant sentiments per a produir una classificació continua entre adjectius que comparteixen semàntica comú. El nostre sistema demostra una forta correlació de 0,83 per Spearman amb la classificació d'or. We show that sentiment bearing word embeddings facilitate a more accurate intensity ranking system than other standard word embeddings (word2vec and GloVe).  Word2vec és l'última tasca d'ordenació d'intensitat.", 'bn': "Identification of intensity ordering among polar (positive or negative) words which have the same semantics can lead to a fine-grained sentiment analysis.  উদাহরণস্বরূপ, 'মাস্টার' এবং 'পরিচিত' বিভিন্ন পর্যায়ে বিভিন্ন শক্তিশালী পর্যায়ে নির্দেশ দিয়েছে, যদিও তারা সবাই একই অর্থ প্রকাশ করেছে (সেম্যান্টি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সেমি পর্যবেক্ষক প্রযুক্তি প্রস্তাব করি যা ব্যবহার করে অনুভূতি ব্যবহার করে যে শব্দ বিভিন্ন ব্যবহার করে সাধারণ সেমেন্টি আমাদের সিস্টেম স্পেয়ারম্যানের মর্যাদা প্রদর্শন করছে যে সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার রেঙ্কিং এর সাথে সোনার স্থানীয় রে আমরা অন্যান্য স্ট্যান্ডার্ড শব্দের প্রবেশের চেয়ে আরো সঠিকভাবে রেঙ্কিং সিস্টেমের সুবিধা দেখাচ্ছি (ওয়ার্ড ২ভেক এবং গ্লোভি) Word2vec হচ্ছে শক্তিশালী কাজের জন্য শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র।", 'cs': 'Identifikace intenzity uspořádání polárních (pozitivních nebo negativních) slov, která mají stejnou sémantiku, může vést k jemnozrnné sentimentové analýze. Například "mistr", "kořeněný" a "známý" ukazují na různé úrovně intenzity, ačkoli všechny vyjadřují stejný význam (sémantika), tj. odborné znalosti: mít dobré znalosti. V tomto článku navrhujeme polovičně dohledovanou techniku, která využívá sentimentní vložení slov k vytvoření kontinuálního řazení mezi adjektivy, která sdílejí společnou sémantiku. Náš systém ukazuje silnou korelaci Spearmanovy hodnosti 0,83 se zlatým standardem. Ukazujeme, že sentimentové vložení slov umožňuje přesnější hodnocení intenzity než ostatní standardní vložení slov (Word2vec a GloVe). Word2vec je nejmodernější pro úlohu intenzity objednávání.', 'et': 'Intensiivsuse järjestuse kindlakstegemine polaarsete (positiivsete või negatiivsete) sõnade vahel, millel on sama semantika, võib viia täpse sentimentaalüüsini. Näiteks "meister", "kogenud" ja "tuttav" viitavad erinevatele intensiivsustasemetele, kuigi need kõik annavad sama tähenduse (semantika), st oskusteave: heade teadmiste omamine. Käesolevas töös pakume välja pooljuhitatud tehnika, mis kasutab sentimentaalsust kandvaid sõnu, et luua pidev järjestus omadussõnade hulgas, mis jagavad ühist semantikat. Meie süsteem näitab tugevat Spearmani auaste korrelatsiooni 0,83 kuldstandardi auhinnaga. Me näitame, et tundeid kandvad sõnad hõlbustavad täpsemat intensiivsuse järjestamise süsteemi kui teised standardsed sõnad (word2vec ja GloVe). Word2vec on tipptasemel intensiivsuse korraldamise ülesanne.', 'fi': 'Vahvuusjärjestyksen tunnistaminen polaaristen (positiivisten tai negatiivisten) sanojen välillä, joilla on sama semantiikka, voi johtaa hienojakoiseen tunteiden analyysiin. Esimerkiksi "mestari", "kokenut" ja "tuttu" viittaavat erilaisiin intensiteettitasoihin, vaikka niillä kaikilla on sama merkitys (semantiikka), eli asiantuntemus: hyvä tuntemus. Tässä työssä ehdotamme puolivalvottua tekniikkaa, joka käyttää tunteita kantavia sanaupotuksia tuottaakseen jatkuvan sijoituksen adjektiiveihin, joilla on yhteinen semantiikka. Järjestelmämme osoittaa, että Spearmanin sijoituskorrelaatio on 0,83 ja kultastandardin mukainen. Osoitamme, että tunnepitoiset sanaupotukset helpottavat tarkempaa intensiteettiluokitusjärjestelmää kuin muut vakiosanaupotukset (word2vec ja GloVe). Word2vec on intensiteetin järjestyksen uusinta tekniikkaa.', 'jv': "Sampeyan Kemerdekaan Winter Ballot, gambar, 'sir', 'sesyoned' lan 'nesyone' mengko awak dhéwé, nganggep wong kabèh dumadhi sing dikarepakan (sematik), ya wis ngerasakno: awak dhéwé ngerasakno sing apik. Awak dhéwé, ngêwé ngerasai tékno sing wis nguasai luwih-luwih nguasai winih sing ngerasai winih dhéwé nggawe barang kejahatan Sistem awak dhéwé éntuk sawetara perusahaan kelas nang 0. Ok word 2vec is the state-of-the-arts for effectual order task.", 'he': "זיהוי האינטנסיביות המסדרת בין מילים קוטביות (חיוביות או שליליות) שיש להם אותה סמנטיקה יכול להוביל לניתוח רגשות מעולה. לדוגמה, `מאסטר', `עונה' ו ''מוכר' מצביעים על רמות אינטנסיביות שונות, למרות שכולם מעבירים את אותו המשמעות (סמנטיקה), כלומר, מומחיות: יש ידע טוב על. In this paper, we propose a semi-supervised technique that uses sentiment bearing word embeddings to produce a continuous ranking among adjectives that share common semantics.  המערכת שלנו מראה שידור של ספירמן חזק של 0.83 עם הדרגה הסטנדרטית הזהב. אנו מראים שהקישורים של מילים עם רגשות מקלים מערכת מערכת מעמד אינטנסיביות מדויקת יותר מאשר קישורים של מילים סטנדרטיות אחרות (מילים 2vec וגלוב). Word2vec הוא מצב המיוחד למשימה להזמין אינטנסיביות.", 'ha': 'Ina iya gane wa tabbatarwa a tsakanin wata kalma (mai gabatar ko negative) da ke da samu\'a, kan ta ƙara wani anayi mai kyau. Misali, "Mai yinin" da "wanda aka sani" yana gaya zuwa daraja dabam-dabam, kuma kõ da dukansu sun iyar da fassararsa daidai, kamar da akwai wani ilmi mai kyau. In a cikin wannan takardan, za mu buɗa wani takin da aka tsare shi na ƙara, wanda ke yi amfani da hisia mai ɗaukar maganar da za\'a sami wani matsayi mai daidai a tsakanin mutane da ke raba semantiki. GafuyinMu na nuna wata daraja mai ƙarfi na Spearman da danganki na 0.83 da danganki na zĩnãriya. Tuna nũna cewa da ke ɗaukar maganar da aka shigar da shi, yana da amfani da tsarin mai saukarwa masu daidaita ko da wasu kalma na daidaita (word2ve da GloV). QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'Identifikacija intenzivnosti razvrščanja med polarnimi (pozitivnimi ali negativnimi) besedami, ki imajo enako semantiko, lahko vodi do drobnozrnate analize sentimenta. Na primer, "mojster", "začinjen" in "znan" kažejo na različne stopnje intenzivnosti, čeprav vsi izražajo enak pomen (semantika), tj. strokovno znanje: dobro znanje. V prispevku predlagamo pol-nadzorovano tehniko, ki uporablja vgradnjo čustvenih besed za ustvarjanje stalnega razvrščanja med pridevniki, ki imajo skupno semantiko. Naš sistem dokazuje močno Spearmanovo stopnjo korelacije 0,83 z zlatim standardom. Pokazujemo, da vgradnje besed z občutki omogočajo natančnejši sistem razvrščanja intenzivnosti kot druge standardne vgradnje besed (word2vec in GloVe). Word2vec je najsodobnejša naloga za urejanje intenzivnosti.', 'bo': "དམིགས་བསལ་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱ་ཚིག་དག་རྣམས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་དང་། དཔེར་ན་ 'master'དང་ 'seasoned'དང་ 'familiar'གཉིས་ཀྱི་འཕྱུར་འགྲོས་འདྲ་ཡིན་མིན་ནའང་འདི་ཚོ་ཚང་མར་མཚུངས་གཅིག་དང་། དཔེར་ན། སྟོན་ཤེས་ན་(semantics)ཞིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་ན ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཚད་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཚད་0.83 ཡི་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཤིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་མང་ཙམ་རིང་ཐོག་ཏེ། Word2vec is the state-of-the-art for intensity ordering task."}
{'en': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'ar': 'توسع معجم المشاعر استنادًا إلى تعلم PU العصبي والبحث عن قاموس مزدوج ورابطة القطبية', 'fr': "Expansion du lexique des sentiments basée sur l'apprentissage neuronal PU, la double recherche dans le dictionnaire et l'association de polarité", 'es': 'Expansión del léxico de sentimientos basada en el aprendizaje de PU neuronal, la búsqueda de doble diccionario y la asociación de polaridad', 'pt': 'Expansão do léxico do sentimento com base no aprendizado de PU neural, pesquisa de dicionário duplo e associação de polaridade', 'hi': 'भावना शब्दकोश विस्तार तंत्रिका पु सीखने, डबल शब्दकोश लुकअप, और Polarity एसोसिएशन पर आधारित', 'zh': '基于神经PU学、双字典求与极性情词典广', 'ja': 'ニューラルPU学習、ダブル辞書ルックアップ、極性関連に基づくセンチメント辞書拡張', 'ru': 'Расширение сентиментального лексикона на основе нейронного обучения PU, двойного поиска словаря и ассоциации полярности', 'ga': 'Leathnú Foclóir Meon bunaithe ar Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, agus Polarity Association', 'ka': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'hu': 'Érzelmi Lexikon bővítés Neurális PU tanulás, kettős szótárkeresés és polaritás társulás alapján', 'el': 'Επέκταση λεξικού συναισθημάτων βασισμένη στη Νευρική Μάθηση, διπλή αναζήτηση λεξικού και συσχέτιση πολικότητας', 'kk': 'Нейралық PU оқытуға негізінде, екі рет сөздік іздеу және Польшалық ассоциясына негізделген сезімсіздік лексикандық кеңейтуі', 'lt': 'Sentiment Lexicon expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Search and Polarity Association', 'it': "Espansione del lessico sentimentale basata sull'apprendimento neurale dell'unità di elaborazione, sulla ricerca del doppio dizionario e sull'associazione di polarità", 'mk': 'Раширување на чувството на лексиконите врз основа на неурално учење на пу, двојно барање на речник и асоцијација на поларитет', 'ms': 'Perkembangan Leksikon Sentiment Berdasarkan Belajar PU Neural, Carian Kamus Dua, dan Asosiasi Polariti', 'mt': 'Espansjoni tal-Lexicon tas-Sentiment Ibbażata fuq Tagħlim Newrali tal-PU, Tfittxija Doppja tad-Dikjarazzjoni, u Assoċjazzjoni tal-Polarità', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d പിയു പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d എക്സപ്പെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie słowników sentymentów oparte na nauce neuronalnej PU, podwójnym wyszukiwaniu słownika i skojarzeniu polarystycznym', 'ro': 'Expansiunea Lexiconului sentimental bazată pe învățarea neurală PU, căutarea dublă a dicționarului și asociația polarității', 'sr': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'so': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Search, and Polarity Association', 'sv': 'Utvidgning av känsloleksikon baserad på neuralt PU-lärande, dubbel ordlista sökning och polaritetsassociation', 'si': 'Comment', 'ta': 'நெயுரல் பியு கற்றுக்கொள்ள அடிப்படையிலான சென்டிமென்ட் லெக்சிகோன் வெளியீடு, இரட்டை அகராதி தேடுதல், மற்றும் போலாரி', 'ur': 'سینٹیمنٹ لکسیسون اکسپانس نیورال PU سیکھنے پر بنیاد ہے، دوبل لکھنے والی لکھنے والی اور پولیریٹی اتصال پر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cảm xúc Lexicon mở rộng Dựa trên chương trình học chân thần kinh, tìm kiếm bộ xúc đôi, và Hội đồng Polarity', 'bg': 'Разширяване на лексикона на сентимента въз основа на изучаване на неврални ПУ, търсене на двоен речник и асоциация за полярност', 'da': 'Sentiment Lexicon udvidelse baseret på neural PU læring, dobbelt ordbogsopslag og polaritetsforening', 'hr': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'nl': 'Sentiment Lexicon uitbreiding gebaseerd op neural PU leren, dubbele woordenboek opzoeken en polariteit associatie', 'de': 'Sentiment Lexikon Erweiterung basierend auf neuronalem PU-Lernen, doppelter Wörterbuchsuche und Polaritätsassoziation', 'id': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'ko': '신경 네트워크 학습, 이중 사전 찾기와 극성 관련 감정 사전 확장', 'fa': 'افزایش مجموعه Lexicon Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Sentiment Lexicon Based on Neural PU Learning, Search Dictionary Double, and Association of Polarity', 'tr': 'Sintaksiýa Gerçeklik PU öwrenmesine, Çift Sözlük Görkezmesine we Polyarlık Derjesine ynanýar', 'sq': 'Zgjerimi i Sentiment Lexicon bazuar në mësimin neuronal PU, kërkimin e dyfishtë fjalor dhe Shoqatën e Polaritetit', 'af': 'Sentiment Lexicon Uitbreiding Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'am': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learn, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների լեքսիկոնի ընդլայնումը, հիմնված նյարդային ԱՄՆ ուսումնասիրության վրա, երկու բառարանի որոնման վրա և պոլարիտության ասոցիաների վրա', 'bn': 'নিউরাল পিউ শিক্ষা, দ্বিগুণ অভিধান অনুসন্ধান এবং পোলারিটি অংশ', 'az': '仃뙲慬⁐唠쎶祲즙湭즙獩Ⱐ쎇楦琠參뙺泃뱫⁇쎶狃뱮淉饳椠盉餠偯汯煬쒱焠쒰얟祡污狄넊', 'bs': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'ca': "L'expansió de la lexicònica del sentiment basada en l'aprenentatge neuronal de PU, la cerca de doble diccionari i l'associació de polaritat", 'cs': 'Rozšíření citového slovníku založené na učení neurálního PU, dvojitém vyhledávání slovníku a asociaci polarity', 'et': 'Sentimendi leksikoni laienemine, mis põhineb neuraalsel PU õppel, topeltsõnastiku otsingul ja polaarsuse assotsiatsioonil', 'fi': 'Tunteen leksikonin laajennus perustuu hermojen PU-oppimiseen, kaksoissanakirjan hakuun ja polaarisuussuhteeseen', 'jv': 'Download first', 'sk': 'Razširitev sentimentalnega leksikona na podlagi učenja nevralnega PU, iskanja dvojnega slovarja in združenja polarnosti', 'ha': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association', 'he': 'התרחבות לקסיקון הרגשה בהתבסס על לימוד פו-איי נוירולי, חיפוש מילון כפול', 'bo': 'Sentiment Lexicon Expansion Based on Neural PU Learning, Double Dictionary Lookup, and Polarity Association'}
{'en': 'Although many sentiment lexicons in different languages exist, most are not comprehensive. In a recent sentiment analysis application, we used a large Chinese sentiment lexicon and found that it missed a large number of sentiment words in social media. This prompted us to make a new attempt to study sentiment lexicon expansion. This paper first poses the problem as a PU learning problem, which is a new formulation. It then proposes a new PU learning method suitable for our problem using a neural network. The results are enhanced further with a new dictionary-based technique and a novel polarity classification technique. Experimental results show that the proposed approach outperforms baseline methods greatly.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من وجود العديد من معاجم المشاعر بلغات مختلفة ، إلا أن معظمها ليس شاملاً. في تطبيق تحليل المشاعر الأخير ، استخدمنا قاموسًا صينيًا كبيرًا للمشاعر ووجدنا أنه فقد عددًا كبيرًا من كلمات المشاعر في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. دفعنا هذا إلى القيام بمحاولة جديدة لدراسة توسيع قاموس المشاعر. تطرح هذه الورقة أولاً المشكلة باعتبارها مشكلة تعلم PU ، وهي صيغة جديدة. ثم يقترح طريقة جديدة لتعلم PU مناسبة لمشكلتنا باستخدام شبكة عصبية. تم تحسين النتائج بشكل أكبر باستخدام تقنية جديدة قائمة على القاموس وتقنية تصنيف قطبية جديدة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن النهج المقترح يتفوق على أساليب خط الأساس بشكل كبير.', 'fr': "Bien qu'il existe de nombreux lexiques des sentiments dans différentes langues, la plupart ne sont pas exhaustifs. Dans une application récente d'analyse des sentiments, nous avons utilisé un vaste lexique des sentiments chinois et avons constaté qu'il manquait un grand nombre de mots d'opinion dans les médias sociaux. Cela nous a incités à faire une nouvelle tentative pour étudier l'expansion du lexique des sentiments. Cet article pose d'abord le problème comme un problème d'apprentissage du PU, qui est une nouvelle formulation. Il propose ensuite une nouvelle méthode d'apprentissage du PU adaptée à notre problème à l'aide d'un réseau de neurones. Les résultats sont encore améliorés par une nouvelle technique basée sur un dictionnaire et une nouvelle technique de classification de polarité. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que l'approche proposée surpasse largement les méthodes de base.", 'pt': 'Embora existam muitos léxicos de sentimentos em diferentes idiomas, a maioria não é abrangente. Em um aplicativo de análise de sentimento recente, usamos um grande léxico de sentimento chinês e descobrimos que ele perdeu um grande número de palavras de sentimento nas mídias sociais. Isso nos levou a fazer uma nova tentativa de estudar a expansão do léxico de sentimentos. Este artigo primeiro coloca o problema como um problema de aprendizado de PU, que é uma nova formulação. Em seguida, propõe um novo método de aprendizado de PU adequado ao nosso problema usando uma rede neural. Os resultados são aprimorados ainda mais com uma nova técnica baseada em dicionário e uma nova técnica de classificação de polaridade. Os resultados experimentais mostram que a abordagem proposta supera em muito os métodos de linha de base.', 'es': 'Aunque existen muchos léxicos de opinión en diferentes idiomas, la mayoría no son exhaustivos. En una aplicación reciente de análisis de sentimientos, utilizamos un gran léxico de sentimiento chino y descubrimos que no tenía un gran número de palabras de opinión en las redes sociales. Esto nos llevó a hacer un nuevo intento de estudiar la expansión del léxico de los sentimientos. En primer lugar, este documento plantea el problema como un problema de aprendizaje de la PU, que es una formulación nueva. Luego propone un nuevo método de aprendizaje de PU adecuado para nuestro problema mediante una red neuronal. Los resultados se mejoran aún más con una nueva técnica basada en diccionarios y una novedosa técnica de clasificación de polaridad. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el enfoque propuesto supera en gran medida a los métodos de referencia.', 'ja': 'さまざまな言語の感情辞典が多数存在するが、ほとんどは包括的なものではない。最近のセンチメント分析アプリケーションでは、大きな中国語のセンチメント辞書を使用し、ソーシャルメディアで多数のセンチメント単語を見逃していることがわかりました。これをきっかけに、センチメント語彙拡張の研究を新たに試みることになった。本稿では，まずPU学習問題として問題を提示し，新たな定式化を行った．そして、ニューラルネットワークを使用して私たちの問題に適した新しいPU学習方法を提案します。その結果は、新しい辞書ベースの技術と新しい極性分類技術でさらに強化されています。実験結果は、提案されたアプローチがベースライン法を大きく上回ることを示している。', 'zh': '虽多异言之词典,而多不周悉。 近情析应用程序,用一大情词典,遗情于社交媒体词汇。 新试以究情词典之广也。 本文首以问为PU学,此一新提法也。 然后立新PU学术,宜用于神经网络。 以一新字典之术,与一新极性分类,则益强矣。 实验结果表明,性能大优基线法。', 'hi': 'हालांकि विभिन्न भाषाओं में कई भावना शब्दकोश मौजूद हैं, अधिकांश व्यापक नहीं हैं। हाल ही में एक भावना विश्लेषण आवेदन में, हमने एक बड़े चीनी भावना शब्दकोश का उपयोग किया और पाया कि यह सोशल मीडिया में बड़ी संख्या में भावना शब्दों को याद करता है। इसने हमें भावना शब्दकोश विस्तार का अध्ययन करने के लिए एक नया प्रयास करने के लिए प्रेरित किया। यह पेपर पहले एक पीयू सीखने की समस्या के रूप में समस्या पैदा करता है, जो एक नया सूत्रीकरण है। यह तब एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके हमारी समस्या के लिए उपयुक्त एक नई पीयू सीखने की विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है। परिणामों को एक नई शब्दकोश-आधारित तकनीक और एक उपन्यास ध्रुवीयता वर्गीकरण तकनीक के साथ आगे बढ़ाया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण बेसलाइन विधियों को बहुत बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Хотя существует много сентиментальных лексиконов на разных языках, большинство из них не являются исчерпывающими. В недавнем приложении для анализа настроений мы использовали большой китайский лексикон настроений и обнаружили, что он пропустил большое количество слов настроений в социальных сетях. Это побудило нас сделать новую попытку изучения расширения сентиментального лексикона. Эта статья сначала ставит проблему как проблему обучения PU, которая является новой формулировкой. Затем он предлагает новый метод обучения PU, подходящий для нашей задачи с использованием нейронной сети. Результаты дополнительно улучшены с новым словари-основанным методом и романным методом классификации полярности. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый подход значительно превосходит базовые методы.', 'ga': "Cé go bhfuil go leor foclóir meon i dteangacha éagsúla ann, níl a bhformhór cuimsitheach. In iarratas ar anailís sentiment le déanaí, d'úsáideamar foclóir mór meon na Síne agus fuaireamar amach gur chaill sé líon mór focal meon sna meáin shóisialta. Spreag sé seo sinn chun iarracht nua a dhéanamh chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar leathnú foclóir meon. Cuireann an páipéar seo an fhadhb ar dtús mar fhadhb foghlama PU, ar foirmliú nua é. Molann sé ansin modh foghlama PU nua atá oiriúnach dár bhfadhb agus úsáid á baint as líonra néarach. Cuirtear tuilleadh feabhais ar na torthaí le teicníocht nua foclóir-bhunaithe agus teicníc nua aicmithe polaraíocht. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an cur chuige atá beartaithe modhanna bunlíne go mór.", 'ka': 'თუმცა ბევრი სენტიმენტის ლექსიკონი განსხვავებული ენაში არსებობს, უფრო მეტი არსებობს. შემდეგ სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის პროგრამაში, ჩვენ ჩინეთი სენტიმენტის ლექსიკონის გამოყენეთ და მოვიღეთ, რომ მას სოციალური მედიაში დიდი რაოდენობა სიტყვები გადა ეს ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ ახალი მოცდილობა სენტიმენტის ლექსიკონის გაფარდება. პირველად ეს წიგნი პრობლემა პრობლემა როგორც PU სწავლების პრობლემა, რომელიც ახალი ფორმულაცია. შემდეგ ეს ჩვენი პრობლემების გამოყენება ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება ახალი PU სწავლების მეტი. წარმოდგენები ახალი სიტყვანის განსაზღვრებული ტექნექტიკის და პოლარიტის კლასიფიკაციის ტექნექტიკის შესაძლებელია. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ საზოგადომის მიღება ძალიან გავამუშავებს ფესტლინიური მეტოვები.', 'hu': 'Bár sok érzelmi lexikon létezik különböző nyelveken, a legtöbb nem átfogó. Egy közelmúltbeli érzelmi elemző alkalmazásban egy nagy kínai érzelmi lexikont használtunk, és azt találtuk, hogy sok érzelmi szó hiányzik a közösségi médiában. Ez arra ösztönzött minket, hogy új kísérletet tegyünk az érzelmek lexikon terjeszkedésének tanulmányozására. Ez a tanulmány először PU tanulási problémaként veti fel a problémát, ami egy új megfogalmazás. Ezután egy új PU tanulási módszert javasol, amely alkalmas a problémánkra egy neurális hálózat segítségével. Az eredményeket egy új szótár alapú technika és egy új polaritás osztályozási technika továbbfejleszti. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés nagymértékben felülmúlja a kiindulási módszereket.', 'el': 'Αν και υπάρχουν πολλά λεξικά συναισθημάτων σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες, τα περισσότερα δεν είναι ολοκληρωμένα. Σε μια πρόσφατη εφαρμογή ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων, χρησιμοποιήσαμε ένα μεγάλο κινεζικό λεξικό συναισθημάτων και διαπιστώσαμε ότι έχασε μεγάλο αριθμό λέξεων συναισθημάτων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Αυτό μας ώθησε να κάνουμε μια νέα προσπάθεια μελέτης της επέκτασης του λεξικού συναισθημάτων. Η παρούσα εργασία θέτει πρώτα το πρόβλημα ως μαθησιακό πρόβλημα, το οποίο είναι μια νέα διατύπωση. Στη συνέχεια προτείνει μια νέα μέθοδο μάθησης κατάλληλη για το πρόβλημά μας χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο. Τα αποτελέσματα ενισχύονται περαιτέρω με μια νέα τεχνική βασισμένη στο λεξικό και μια νέα τεχνική ταξινόμησης πολικότητας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις μεθόδους βάσης.', 'it': "Sebbene esistano molti lessici sentimentali in diverse lingue, la maggior parte non è completa. In una recente applicazione di analisi del sentiment, abbiamo usato un ampio lessico cinese del sentiment e abbiamo scoperto che mancava un gran numero di parole sentiment nei social media. Questo ci ha spinto a fare un nuovo tentativo di studiare l'espansione del lessico sentimentale. Questo articolo pone in primo luogo il problema come un problema di apprendimento PU, che è una nuova formulazione. Propone quindi un nuovo metodo di apprendimento PU adatto al nostro problema utilizzando una rete neurale. I risultati sono ulteriormente migliorati con una nuova tecnica basata sul dizionario e una nuova tecnica di classificazione della polarità. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che l'approccio proposto supera notevolmente i metodi di base.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілде көп сезімдік лекциялар бар болса да, көпшілігі толық емес. Жуырдағы сезімдерді анализ қолданбаларында, біз үлкен қытайша сезімдердің лексиконын қолдандық. Ол социаллық медиақтағы көп сезімдердің сөздері жоқ деп ойладық. Бұл бізге сезімдік лексиканың кеңейтуін оқыту үшін жаңа әрекетті сұрады. Бұл қағаз біріншіден мәселеді PU оқыту мәселесі ретінде көрсетеді, бұл жаңа формулация. Содан кейін, біздің мәселемізге невралды желімізді қолдану үшін жаңа PU оқыту әдісін ұсынады. Нәтижелер жаңа сөздік негіздеген техникалық және романдық поляриттік классификациялық техникалық арқылы көтерілген. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері таңдалған тәсілдердің негізгі жолдарды көп жасайды.', 'mk': 'Иако постојат многу лексикони за чувства на различни јазици, повеќето не се комплетни. Во неодамнешната апликација за анализа на чувствата, користевме голем кинески лексикон за чувства и откривме дека пропушти голем број зборови за чувства во социјалните медиуми. Ова не поттикна да направиме нов обид да проучуваме проширување на лексиконите на чувствата. Овој весник прво го претставува проблемот како проблем со учењето на ПУ, што е нова формулација. Потоа предложува нов метод за учење на ПУ, кој е соодветен за нашиот проблем со користење на нервна мрежа. Резултатите се подобрени понатаму со нова техника базирана на речникот и нова техника за класификација на поларитетот. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот пристап многу ги надминува основните методи.', 'lt': 'Nors įvairiomis kalbomis egzistuoja daug jausmų leksikonų, dauguma jų nėra išsamių. Neseniai atlikus jausmų analizės programą, mes naudojome didelį Kinijos jausmų leksikoną ir nustatėme, kad ji praleido daug jausmų žodžių social in ėje žiniasklaidoje. Tai paskatino mus pradėti naują bandymą išplėsti jausmų leksikoną. This paper first poses the problem as a PU learning problem, which is a new formulation.  Tuomet siūlomas naujas švietimo ir mokymosi metodas, tinkamas mūsų problemai spręsti naudojant nervinį tinklą. Rezultatai toliau didinami naudojant naują žodynu pagrįstą metodą ir naują poliarumo klasifikavimo metodą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gerokai viršija pradinius metodus.', 'mt': 'Għalkemm jeżistu ħafna lexicons tas-sentimenti f’lingwi differenti, il-biċċa l-kbira mhumiex komprensivi. F’applikazzjoni reċenti ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti, użajna lexicon kbir tas-sentimenti Ċiniżi u sabu li naqset għadd kbir ta’ kliem tas-sentimenti fil-midja soċjali. Dan wassal biex nagħmlu tentattiv ġdid biex nistudjaw l-espansjoni tal-lexicon tas-sentiment. Dan id-dokument l-ewwel joħloq il-problem a bħala problema tat-tagħlim tal-PU, li hija formulazzjoni ġdida. Imbagħad jipproponi metodu ġdid ta’ tagħlim tal-PU adattat għall-problem a tagħna bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali. Ir-riżultati jissaħħu aktar b’teknika ġdida bbażata fuq id-dikjarazzjoni u teknika ġdida ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-polarità. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-approċċ propost jaqbeż il-metodi ta’ bażi ħafna.', 'ms': 'Walaupun banyak leksikon perasaan dalam bahasa yang berbeza wujud, kebanyakan tidak kompleks. Dalam aplikasi analisis perasaan baru-baru ini, kami menggunakan leksikon perasaan Cina yang besar dan mendapati bahawa ia melewatkan banyak perkataan perasaan dalam media sosial. Ini meminta kita untuk membuat cubaan baru untuk mempelajari pengembangan leksikon sentimen. Kertas ini pertama-tama mengakibatkan masalah sebagai masalah pembelajaran PU, yang merupakan bentuk baru. Kemudian ia mencadangkan kaedah pembelajaran PU baru yang sesuai untuk masalah kita menggunakan rangkaian saraf. The results are enhanced further with a new dictionary-based technique and a novel polarity classification technique.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan melampaui kaedah asas dengan sangat.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പലതും വിചാരിക്കുന്ന വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും ഏറെപ്പേരും പൂര്\u200dണ് അടുത്തിടെയുള്ള ഒരു വികാരത്തിന്റെ അന്വേഷണ പ്രയോഗത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ചൈനീസ് വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു സാമൂഹിക മ ഇത് നമ്മളെ ഒരു പുതിയ ശ്രമിച്ചു ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ആദ്യം പിയു പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമാണ് പ്രശ്നം, അതൊരു പുതിയ ഫോര്\u200dമുലേഷന്\u200d. പിന്നീട് അത് പുതിയ പിയു പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രശ്നം ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റെര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച ഒരു പുതിയ നിഘണ്ടിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവും ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പോലിറ്റി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ടെക്കിക്കേഷനുമ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥ', 'pl': 'Chociaż istnieje wiele leksykonów sentymentów w różnych językach, większość z nich nie jest kompleksowa. W niedawnej aplikacji do analizy sentymentów użyliśmy dużego chińskiego leksykonu sentymentów i stwierdziliśmy, że brakuje dużej liczby słów sentymentów w mediach społecznościowych. To skłoniło nas do podjęcia nowej próby badania ekspansji leksykonu sentymentów. W artykule przedstawiono najpierw problem jako problem uczenia się PU, który jest nową formułą. Następnie proponuje nową metodę uczenia się PU odpowiednią dla naszego problemu z wykorzystaniem sieci neuronowej. Wyniki zostały dodatkowo wzmocnione dzięki nowej technice opartej na słowniku i nowej technice klasyfikacji polaryzacji. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane podejście znacznie przewyższa metody bazowe.', 'mn': 'Өөр хэл дээр олон сэтгэл хөдлөл өгүүлэлт байдаг ч ихэнх нь бүрэн тодорхой биш. Саяхан сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээний хэрэглээнд бид Хятадын чухал сэтгэл хөдлөлийн лексикон ашиглаж, нийгмийн хэвлэлд маш олон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үг алдагдсан. Энэ нь бидэнд сэтгэл хөдлөлийг судлах шинэ хичээл хийсэн. Эхлээд энэ цаас нь PU суралцах асуудлыг шинэ томъёо гэж боддог. Дараа нь бидний бодлого ашиглах шинэ ПУ суралцах аргыг сануулдаг. Үүний үр дүн нь дуудал дээр суурилсан шинэ техник болон шинэ загварын хуваалтын техник дээр нэмэгдсэн. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь суурь шугам арга замыг маш их ашигладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Deși există multe lexicoane sentimentale în diferite limbi, majoritatea nu sunt cuprinzătoare. Într-o aplicație recentă de analiză a sentimentelor, am folosit un mare lexicon chinez al sentimentelor și am constatat că lipsește un număr mare de cuvinte sentimentale în rețelele sociale. Acest lucru ne-a determinat să facem o nouă încercare de a studia expansiunea lexiconului sentimental. Această lucrare pune mai întâi problema ca o problemă de învățare PU, care este o nouă formulare. Apoi propune o nouă metodă de învățare PU potrivită pentru problema noastră folosind o rețea neurală. Rezultatele sunt îmbunătățite în continuare cu o nouă tehnică bazată pe dicționar și o nouă tehnică de clasificare a polarității. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea propusă depășește foarte mult metodele de bază.', 'no': 'Selv om mange sentimentalekseksjonar i ulike språk finst, er dei fleste ikkje komplette. I eit nyleg program for sentimentanalyser brukte vi ein stor kinesisk sentiment leksikon og fant at det mista mange følelsesord i sosiale media. Dette førte oss til å gjera ein ny forsøk på å studera sentiment- leksikonsutviding. Denne papiret viser det første problemet som eit PU-læringsproblem, som er eit ny formasjon. Det foreslår derfor ein ny PU-læringsmetode som passar for problemet vår med eit neuralnettverk. Resultatet er forbetra lenger med ein ny ordbokbasert teknikk og ein novel polaritetsklassifikasjon. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga utfører grunnlinjesmetoden mykje.', 'sr': 'Iako postoje mnogo osećajnih leksija na različitim jezicima, većina nisu sveobuhvatni. U nedavnoj aplikaciji za analizu sentiment a, koristili smo veliki kineski leksikon sentimenta i otkrili da je propustio veliki broj sentimentalnih reči u društvenim medijima. To nas je nateralo da napravimo novi pokušaj da proučimo proširenje sentiment a leksiona. Ovaj papir prvo predstavlja problem kao problem učenja PU-a, što je nova formulacija. Onda predlaže novu metodu učenja PU odgovarajuću za naš problem koristeći neuralnu mrežu. Rezultati su dalje poboljšani sa novom tehnikom na rečniku i novom tehnikom klasifikacije polariteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup veoma iznosi početne metode.', 'si': 'වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වලින් විශේෂ කතාවක් තියෙනවා නමුත් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් තියෙනවා නමුත් වැඩි අලුත් විශේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ අවශ්\u200dයයෙන්, අපි ලොකු චීනි දැනුම් ලෙක්සිකෝන් එකක් භාවිත කරලා හොයාගත්තා ඒක සාමා මේකෙන් අපිට අලුත් උත්සාහ කරන්න පුළුවන් වුනා දැනුම් ලෙක්සිකෝන් විස්තර විස්තර කරන්න. මේ පත්තර පළවෙනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් PU ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට තියෙනවා, ඒක අළුත් පත්තරයක්. ඒ පස්සේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් අලුත් PU ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dර ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරධානයක් අලුත් විශ්වාසය අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගොඩක් විදිහට ප', 'sv': 'Även om det finns många sentimentlexikon på olika språk är de flesta inte heltäckande. I en nyligen genomförd applikation för sentimentalanalys använde vi ett stort kinesiskt sentimentallexikon och fann att det missade ett stort antal sentimentord i sociala medier. Detta fick oss att göra ett nytt försök att studera sentimentlexikonexpansion. Denna uppsats ställer först upp problemet som ett PU inlärningsproblem, vilket är en ny formulering. Den föreslår sedan en ny PU inlärningsmetod lämplig för vårt problem med hjälp av ett neuralt nätverk. Resultaten förstärks ytterligare med en ny ordbok baserad teknik och en ny polaritetsklassificeringsteknik. Experimentella resultat visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet överträffar baslinjemetoderna kraftigt.', 'so': 'In kastoo ay leeyihiin leksis badan oo luuqado kala duduwan, inta badan ma ahan mid kamid ah. Dhab ahaan ayaannu ku isticmaalnay fikrad badan oo Shiino ah, waxaynu ogaanay inay ka baaqatay hadal faro badan oo daryeelka bulshada ah. Taasi waxay nagu sababtay inaan sameeyo isku dayo cusub inaan barano kordhiska leksikon. Qoraalkan marka hore dhibaatada waxaa looga jeedaa dhibaato ku saabsan waxbarashada PU, taasi waa sawir cusub. It then proposes a new PU learning method suitable for our problem using a neural network.  Abaalkooda waxaa lagu kordhiyaa tekniko cusub oo ku saleysan luqada iyo teknikada fasaxa ee warqadda ah. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaababka lagu soo jeeday ay ay aad u muuqato qaabab hoose ah.', 'ta': 'பல உணர்வு லெக்சிக்சன்கள் வேறு மொழிகளில் இருந்தாலும் பெரும்பாலும் சூழ்நிலையில் இல்லை. சமீபத்தில் ஒரு உணர்வு ஆய்வு பயன்பாட்டில், நாங்கள் ஒரு பெரிய சீனமான உணர்வு லெக்சிகோனை பயன்படுத்தி அது சமூக ஊடகங்களில் அதிகமான உணர்வு  இது எங்களுக்கு ஒரு புதிய முயற்சி செய்து உணர்வு லெக்சிகோன் விரிவாக்கத்தை படிக்க ஆரம்பித்தது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் முதலில் பியூ கற்றல் பிரச்சனையாக பிரச்சனையை கொண்டுள்ளது, அது புதிய வடிவமைப்பு. பின்னர் அது புதிய பியூ கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறையை நம் பிரச்சனைக்கு பொருத்தமான பிரச்சனையை புதிய பி @ info பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகள் மிகவும் பெரிய அடிப்படையான முறைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டு', 'ur': 'اگرچہ بہت سی احساسات لکسونز مختلف زبانوں میں موجود ہیں، بہت سی احساسات کامل نہیں ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک بڑے چینی احساسات لکسون کو استعمال کیا اور دیکھا کہ اس نے سوسیل میڈیا میں بہت سی احساسات لکھ دی تھی۔ اس نے ہمیں ایک نئی کوشش کی تھی کہ sentiment lexicon expansion کی تلاش کریں. یہ کاغذ پہلے مشکل کو PU کی تعلیم مشکل کے طور پر رکھتا ہے، جو ایک نئی فرمول ہے۔ اس کے بعد یہ ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک کے مطابق ہمارے مسئلہ کے لئے مناسب ایک نوی پی سیکھنے کا طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. نتیجے ایک نئی لکھنے والی تکنیک اور ایک نئی قطعی قطعی تکنیک سے اضافہ ہوتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا بنسلین طریقے بہت زیادہ انجام دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik g'oyalar boshqa tillardan foydalanuvchilar mavjud бўлса ҳам, ko'pchilik butunlay emas. In a recent sentiment analysis application, we used a large Chinese sentiment lexicon and found that it missed a large number of sentiment words in social media.  Bu bizga hisob lekson kengayligini o'rganish uchun yangi harakat qiladi. Bu qogʻoz birinchi muammolar PU o'rganish muammosi deb hisoblanadi. Bu yangi formulyat. Keyin u neyrol tarmoqni ishlatish uchun yangi PU o'rganish usulini tahrirlaydi. @ info: status Tekshirish natijalarini koʻrsatish, talab qilingan usul asosiy uslublar juda katta bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù có nhiều ngôn ngữ đa cảm tồn tại, nhưng hầu hết đều không toàn diện. Trong một chương trình phân tích cảm xúc gần đây, chúng tôi đã sử dụng một ngôn ngữ đa cảm Trung Quốc lớn và phát hiện rằng nó đã bỏ lỡ rất nhiều từ tình cảm trong các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội. Điều này khiến chúng tôi phải thực hiện một nỗ lực mới để nghiên cứu mở rộng ngôn ngữ đa cảm. Bài viết này trước tiên đặt vấn đề như một vấn đề học tập loại Quý, một công thức mới. Nó đề xuất một phương pháp học hỏi bằng loại sào mới thích hợp với vấn đề của chúng ta bằng mạng thần kinh. Kết quả được tăng thêm nhờ một kỹ thuật mới có từ điển và một kỹ thuật phân loại cực mới. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị đạt hiệu quả lớn về phương pháp cơ bản.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че съществуват много сантиментални лексикони на различни езици, повечето не са изчерпателни. В последно приложение за анализ на сантименталността използвахме голям китайски сантиментален лексикон и открихме, че липсва голям брой сантиментални думи в социалните медии. Това ни подтикна да направим нов опит да изучим разширението на сентименталния лексикон. Тази статия първо поставя проблема като обучителен проблем, който е нова формулировка. След това той предлага нов метод за обучение на ПУ, подходящ за нашия проблем, използвайки невронна мрежа. Резултатите са допълнително подобрени с нова техника, базирана на речник и нова техника за класификация на полярността. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният подход превъзхожда значително базовите методи.', 'da': 'Selvom der findes mange følelsesleksikoer på forskellige sprog, er de fleste ikke omfattende. I en nylig følelsesanalyseansøgning brugte vi et stort kinesisk følelsesleksikon og fandt ud af, at det savnede et stort antal følelsesord i sociale medier. Dette fik os til at gøre et nyt forsøg på at studere sentiment leksikon ekspansion. Denne artikel rejser først problemet som et PU læringsproblem, som er en ny formulering. Det foreslår derefter en ny PU læringsmetode egnet til vores problem ved hjælp af et neuralt netværk. Resultaterne forbedres yderligere med en ny ordbogsbaseret teknik og en ny polaritetsklassifikationsteknik. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede tilgang i høj grad overstiger basismetoderne.', 'hr': 'Iako postoje mnogo osjećajnih leksija na različitim jezicima, većina nisu sveobuhvatni. U nedavnoj primjeni analize osjećanja, koristili smo veliki kineski leksikon osjećanja i otkrili da je propustio veliki broj osjećajnih riječi u društvenim medijima. To nas je nateralo da napravimo novi pokušaj da proučimo proširenje sentiment a leksiona. Ovaj papir prvo predstavlja problem kao problem učenja PU-a, što je nova formulacija. Tada predlaže novu metodu učenja PU odgovarajuću za naš problem koristeći neuralnu mrežu. Rezultati su dalje poboljšani s novom tehnikom baziranom na rečniku i novom tehnikom klasifikacije polariteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup veoma iznosi početne metode.', 'nl': 'Hoewel er veel sentimentlexicons in verschillende talen bestaan, zijn de meeste niet volledig. In een recente sentimentanalyse applicatie gebruikten we een groot Chinees sentimentlexicon en ontdekten dat het een groot aantal sentimentwoorden miste in sociale media. Dit heeft ons ertoe aangezet een nieuwe poging te doen om de uitbreiding van sentimentlexicon te bestuderen. Dit artikel stelt het probleem eerst als een PU leerprobleem, dat een nieuwe formulering is. Vervolgens stelt het een nieuwe PU leermethode voor die geschikt is voor ons probleem met behulp van een neuraal netwerk. De resultaten worden verder verbeterd met een nieuwe woordenboek-gebaseerde techniek en een nieuwe polariteitsclassificatietechniek. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak veel beter presteert dan baseline methoden.', 'de': 'Obwohl es viele Stimmungslexikone in verschiedenen Sprachen gibt, sind die meisten nicht umfassend. In einer kürzlich durchgeführten Sentiment-Analyse-Anwendung haben wir ein großes chinesisches Sentiment-Lexikon verwendet und festgestellt, dass es eine große Anzahl von Sentiment-Wörtern in sozialen Medien verpasst hat. Dies veranlasste uns, einen neuen Versuch zu unternehmen, Sentiment Lexikon Erweiterung zu studieren. Diese Arbeit stellt das Problem zunächst als PU-Lernproblem dar, das eine neue Formulierung ist. Es schlägt dann eine neue PU-Lernmethode vor, die für unser Problem mit Hilfe eines neuronalen Netzes geeignet ist. Die Ergebnisse werden durch eine neue Wörterbuch-basierte Technik und eine neuartige Polaritätsklassifikationstechnik weiter verbessert. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz die Basismethoden deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Meskipun banyak leksikon sentimen dalam bahasa yang berbeda ada, kebanyakan tidak komprensif. Dalam aplikasi analisis perasaan baru-baru ini, kami menggunakan leksikon perasaan Cina yang besar dan menemukan bahwa ia melewatkan banyak kata perasaan dalam media sosial. Ini mendorong kita untuk melakukan percobaan baru untuk mempelajari ekspansi lexikon sentimen. Kertas ini pertama menimbulkan masalah sebagai masalah belajar PU, yang merupakan formulasi baru. Kemudian mengusulkan metode belajar PU baru yang cocok untuk masalah kita menggunakan jaringan saraf. The results are enhanced further with a new dictionary-based technique and a novel polarity classification technique.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan melampaui metode dasar sangat.', 'ko': '서로 다른 언어에는 많은 감정 어휘가 존재하지만 대부분은 전면적이지 않다.최근의 정서 분석 프로그램에서 우리는 대형 중국어 정서 사전을 사용했는데, 그것이 소셜 미디어의 대량의 정서어를 빠뜨린 것을 발견했다.이것은 우리로 하여금 감정 어휘의 확장에 대해 새로운 시도를 하게 했다.본고는 먼저 PU 학습 문제를 제기했는데 이것은 새로운 공식이다.그리고 새로운 신경 네트워크 기반의 PU 학습 방법을 제시했다.새로운 사전 기반 기술과 새로운 극성 분류 기술은 결과를 더욱 강화시켰다.실험 결과 이 방법의 성능은 기선 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'اگرچه بسیاری از سخنرانی احساسات در زبانهای مختلف وجود دارد، بیشتر از آنها کامل نیستند. در یک کاربرد تحلیل احساسات اخیر، ما از یک لکسیون احساسات بزرگ چینی استفاده کردیم و فهمیدیم که کلمات احساسات زیادی را در رسانه های اجتماعی از دست داد. این باعث شد ما یک تلاش جدید برای تحقیق افزایش احساسات را انجام دهیم. این کاغذ اول مشکل را به عنوان یک مشکل یادگیری PU قرار می دهد که یک فرمول جدید است. سپس یک روش یادگیری PU جدید برای مشکل ما با استفاده از شبکه عصبی پیشنهاد می کند. نتیجه\u200cها با یک تکنیک جدید بر اساس لغوی و یک تکنیک شناسی قطعیت جدید بیشتر بیشتری می\u200cیابند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور پیشنهاد زیادی روش\u200cهای پایین را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Although many sentiment lexicons in different languages exist, most are not comprehensive.  Katika matumizi ya uchambuzi wa hisia za hivi karibuni, tulitumia hisia kubwa la Kichina la lexico na tukagundua kuwa imekosa maneno mengi ya hisia katika mitandao ya kijamii. Hii ilitufanya juhudi mpya ya kusoma kuongezeka kwa hisia za lexico. Gazeti hili la kwanza linaleta tatizo kama tatizo la kujifunza kwa chama cha PU, ambalo ni utaratibu mpya. Kisha inapendekeza mbinu mpya ya kujifunza PU inayofaa kwa tatizo letu kwa kutumia mtandao wa neura. Matokeo yanaongezeka zaidi na teknolojia mpya yenye msingi wa lugha na teknolojia ya usambazaji wa riwaya. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinafanya mbinu za msingi sana.', 'tr': 'Aýratyn bir köp duýgular dilinde bolsa-da köp duýgular meňzeş däldir. Ýakyndaky duýgular analyzasynda biz Çin çe duýgular lezikanyny ulandyk we sosyal medýýasynda köp duýgular sözlerini ýitirdik. Bu bizi duýgular leksiýasyny öwrenmek üçin täze bir synanyş etdi. Bu kagyz ilkinji gezek meseläni PU öwrenmek meseläsi hökmünde täze bir formül döreýär. Sonra bu mesele üçin ýeterli PU öwrenmek täze bir teklip teklip edýär. Netijiler täze sözlük tabanly tekniki we roman polaritet klasifikasy tekniki bilen gowylaşdyrylýar. Araşdyrylyk netijeleri teklip eden ýagdaýyň esasy çyzgyly ýüze çykýandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Alhoewel baie sentimentele leksies in verskillende tale bestaan, is die meeste nie kompenseerde nie. In 'n onlangse sentimentanalisie toepassing het ons 'n groot Sjinese sentiment lexikon gebruik en gevind dat dit 'n groot aantal sentimente woorde in sosiale media mis het. Hierdie het ons gevra om 'n nuwe probeer te maak om sentiment lexikon uitbreiding te studeer. Hierdie papier stel eerste die probleem as 'n PU leer probleem, wat is 'n nuwe formasie. Dit voorstel dan 'n nuwe PU leer metode wat geskik is vir ons probleem met gebruik van 'n neural netwerk. Die resultate word verder verbeter met 'n nuwe woordeboek-gebaseerde tekniks en 'n nuwe polariteit-klasifikasie tekniks. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat die voorgestelde toegang groot baselyn metodes uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Megjithëse shumë leksikone ndjenjash në gjuhë të ndryshme ekzistojnë, shumica nuk janë komplekse. Në një aplikim të fundit të analizës së ndjenjave, përdorëm një lexikon të madh të ndjenjave kineze dhe zbuluam se humbi një numër të madh fjalësh ndjenjash në media sociale. Kjo na nxiti të bëjmë një përpjekje të re për të studiuar zgjerimin e lexikonëve të ndjenjave. Ky dokument e paraqet problemin si një problem mësimi PU, i cili është një formulim i ri. Pastaj propozon një metodë të re mësimi PU të përshtatshme për problemin tonë duke përdorur një rrjet nervor. Rezultatet përmirësohen më tej me një teknikë të re bazuar në fjalor dhe një teknikë të re klasifikimi polar. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja e propozuar tejkalon mjaft metodat bazë.', 'am': 'ብዙ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ቢኖሩ ግን ብዙዎቹ አዋቂዎች አይደሉም፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የቻይና አስተያየት ፕሮግራም፣ ትልቅ የቻይና ስሜት ሌክሲኮን ተጠቀምን በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ ብዙ የስሜት ቃላት እንደተሳሳተ አግኝተናል፡፡ ይህም አዲስ ስሜት ሊክሲዮን መፍጠርን ለመማር አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህች ገጽ መጀመሪያ ችግርን በPU ትምህርት ጉዳይ ነው፤ ይህም አዲስ ፎልማት ነው፡፡ በኋላም አዲስ PU ትምህርት ሥርዓት ለመጠቀም ለችግረታችን የሚገባውን የናቡር መረብ በመጠቀም ያስጀምራል፡፡ ፍሬዎቹ በአዲስ መዝገበኛ የመዝገበ የመዝገበ ቋንቋ ስህተት እና አዲስ የረኀብ ምርጫ መፍጠር ስህተት ይበረታሉ፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የተፈጸመ ጥያቄ የbaseline ሥርዓት እጅግ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Չնայած տարբեր լեզուներում շատ զգացմունքների լեքսիկոններ գոյություն ունեն, մեծամասնությունը ընդհանուր չէ: Վերջին զգացմունքների վերլուծության ընթացքում մենք օգտագործեցինք մի մեծ չինական զգացմունքների լեքսիկոն և հայտնաբերեցինք, որ այն բաց թողեց սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում շատ զգացմունքների բառեր: Սա ստիպեց մեզ նոր փորձել ուսումնասիրել զգացմունքների լեքսիկոնի ընդլայնումը: Այս աշխատանքը առաջին հերթին առաջացնում է խնդիրը որպես համալսարանի ուսուցման խնդիր, որը նոր ձևափոխություն է: It then proposes a new PU learning method suitable for our problem using a neural network.  Արդյունքները զարգանում են նոր բառարանի հիմնված տեխնիկա և նոր հյուսիսային դասակարգման տեխնիկա միջոցով: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը շատ ավելի լավ է քան հիմնական մեթոդները:', 'az': 'Başqa dillərdə bir çox hiss leksiyonları varsa da, çox geniş deyil. Son hisslər analizi uyğulamasında, biz böyük Çin hisslərinin leksiyonunu istifadə etdik və sosyal media içində çox hisslərin sözlərini qeyb etdik. Bu bizim sentiment leksikon genişlənməsini öyrənmək üçün yeni bir imtahan etdi. Bu kağıt ilk dəfə problemini PU öyrənmə problemi kimi göstərir, bu yeni formülasyon. Sonra da problemimizə uyğun bir PU öyrənmə metodu təklif edir. Sonuçlar yeni sözlük tabanlı tekniki və yeni polaritət klasifikasiyası tekniki ilə daha yaxşılaşdırılır. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları təbliğ edilən tərzim tərzlərinin əsas çətinliklərinin çox üstünlüyünü göstərir.', 'bn': 'যদিও বিভিন্ন ভাষায় অনেক অনুভূতি লেক্সিকোন বিভিন্ন ভাষায় আছে, তবুও বেশীরভাগ ভাষায় বিস্তৃত নয়। In a recent sentiment analysis application, we used a large Chinese sentiment lexicon and found that it missed a large number of sentiment words in social media.  এটা আমাদের একটি নতুন প্রচেষ্টা করে লেক্সিকোন বিস্তৃতি পড়ার জন্য। প্রথমে এই পত্রিকাটি পিউ শিক্ষার সমস্যা হিসেবে সমস্যা প্রকাশ করে, যা একটি নতুন ফর্মুলেশন। তারপর এটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে আমাদের সমস্যার জন্য একটি নতুন পিউ শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করে। নতুন অভিভাবক ভিত্তিক প্রযুক্তি এবং একটি উপন্যাস দূরীতি বিভিন্ন প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে এর ফলাফল আরো বৃদ্ধি করা হয়েছে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি বেসাইলাইনের মাধ্যমে অনেক বেশি কাজ করে।', 'ca': "Although many sentiment lexicons in different languages exist, most are not comprehensive.  En una aplicació recent d'anàlisi de sentiments, vam utilitzar un gran lexicó xinès de sentiments i vam descobrir que havia perdut un gran nombre de paraules de sentiments als mitjans socials. This prompted us to make a new attempt to study sentiment lexicon expansion.  En primer lloc aquest article pose el problem a com un problema d'aprenentatge PU, que és una nova formulació. Llavors proposa un nou mètode d'aprenentatge PU adequat per al nostre problem a utilitzant una xarxa neuronal. Els resultats es milloren més amb una nova tècnica basada en diccionaris i una nova tècnica de classificació de polaritat. Els resultats experimentals mostren que l'enfocament proposat supera molts mètodes de base.", 'cs': 'Přestože existuje mnoho sentimentních slovníků v různých jazycích, většina z nich nejsou komplexní. V nedávné aplikaci pro analýzu sentimentů jsme použili velký slovník čínských sentimentů a zjistili, že v sociálních médiích chybí velké množství sentimentů. To nás přimělo k novému pokusu studovat rozšíření sentimentního lexikonu. Tento článek nejprve klade problém jako problém učení PU, což je nová formulace. Následně navrhuje novou metodu učení PU vhodnou pro náš problém s využitím neuronové sítě. Výsledky jsou dále rozšířeny novou technikou založenou na slovníku a novou technikou klasifikace polarity. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržený přístup výrazně předčí základní metody.', 'bs': 'Iako postoje mnogo osjećajnih leksija na različitim jezicima, većina nisu sveobuhvatni. U nedavnoj aplikaciji za analizu sentiment a, koristili smo veliki kineski leksikon sentimenta i otkrili da je propustio veliki broj sentimentalnih riječi u društvenim medijima. To nas je nateralo da napravimo novi pokušaj da proučimo proširenje sentiment a leksiona. Ovaj papir prvo predstavlja problem kao problem učenja PU-a, što je nova formulacija. Onda predlaže novu metodu učenja PU odgovarajuću za naš problem koristeći neuralnu mrežu. Rezultati su dalje poboljšani sa novom tehnikom baziranom na rečniku i novom tehnikom klasifikacije polariteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup veoma iznosi početne metode.', 'fi': 'Vaikka eri kielillä on monia tunteiden sanastoja, useimmat eivät ole kattavia. Äskettäisessä tunteiden analyysisovelluksessa käytimme suurta kiinalaista tunteiden sanastoa ja huomasimme, että sosiaalisessa mediassa ei ollut paljon tunteiden sanoja. Tämä sai meidät tekemään uuden yrityksen tutkia tunteiden sanaston laajenemista. Tämä artikkeli esittää ensin ongelman PU oppimisongelma, joka on uusi muotoilu. Tämän jälkeen se ehdottaa uutta PU-oppimismenetelmää, joka sopii ongelmamme neuroverkon avulla. Tuloksia täydennetään uudella sanakirjapohjaisella tekniikalla ja uudella polaarisuusluokitustekniikalla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa on huomattavasti parempi kuin perusmenetelmät.', 'et': 'Kuigi erinevates keeltes on olemas palju sentimentaalseid leksikone, ei ole enamik neist terviklikke. Hiljutises sentimentaalüüsi rakenduses kasutasime suurt Hiina sentimentaalsõnavara ja avastasime, et sotsiaalmeedias puudusid suur hulk sentimentaalsõnu. See ajendas meid tegema uut katset õppida sentimentaalse leksikoni laienemist. Käesolev raamat esitab kõigepealt probleemi PU õppimise probleem, mis on uus sõnastus. Seejärel pakutakse välja uus PU õppemeetod, mis sobib meie probleemile neurovõrgu abil. Tulemusi täiustatakse veelgi uue sõnastikupõhise tehnika ja uue polaarsuse klassifitseerimise tehnikaga. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab oluliselt lähtemeetodeid.', 'he': 'למרות שהרבה לקסיקונים רגשיים בשפות שונות קיימים, רוב הם לא כוללים. בתוכנית ניתוח רגשות לאחרונה, השתמשנו בלקסיקון רגשות סיני גדול ומצאנו שהוא פספס מספר גדול של מילים רגשות בתקשורת חברתית. זה גרם לנו לעשות ניסיון חדש ללמוד פיתוח לקסיקון רגשות. העיתון הזה קודם מעלה את הבעיה בתור בעיה ללמוד PU, שהיא תרופה חדשה. ואז הוא מציע שיטת לימוד PU חדשה מתאימה לבעיה שלנו באמצעות רשת עצבית. התוצאות משתפרות יותר עם טכניקה חדשה מבוססת במילונים וטכניקת שיגור קוטביות חדשה. התוצאות הניסוייות מראות שהגישה המוצעת מעלית את שיטות הבסיס בצורה גדולה.', 'sk': 'Čeprav obstaja veliko sentimentalnih leksikonov v različnih jezikih, večina ni celovitih. V nedavni aplikaciji za analizo sentimenta smo uporabili velik kitajski sentimentalni leksikon in ugotovili, da je spregledal veliko število sentimentalnih besed v družbenih omrežjih. To nas je spodbudilo k novemu poskusu preučevanja širitve sentimentalnega leksikona. Ta prispevek najprej predstavlja problem kot učni problem PU, ki je nova formulacija. Nato predlaga novo metodo učenja PU, primerno za naš problem z uporabo nevronskega omrežja. Rezultate nadaljujemo z novo slovarsko tehniko in novo tehniko polarnosti klasifikacije. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagani pristop precej presega osnovne metode.', 'jv': 'Gak dhéwé, akeh luwih sing paling kelesik kanggo langgar sampeyan, akeh liyane ora luwih akeh. Ana aplikasi ana sing dibenalke Sensitis, awak dhéwé nggambar kelas Sensitis Cino nganggo kuwi padha akeh akeh akeh akeh Sensitis nang media sotiki. Nyong mbut awak dhéwé nggawe ngubah ujian sing nggawe lewat kesalahan luwih. Pamir sing susahe pergunakake bote nganggo pergunakake punika ingkang PI, kuwi ngupakake formalasi sing apik. Mungkin ngerti sistem sing dibutuhke sistem PI sing gak bener kanggo nyeleh ning arah sing wurung. Rejalaké mbubuti luwih bantuan karo teknik sing basa gambar diketeksi lan teknik sing kelas polarity Pametuné sing paling nggambar kuwi nggawe akeh unéwong liya sing ngerasah basa.', 'ha': "Kuma kõ da da yawa masu hisori na leksisi masu cikin harshen dabam-dabam, ba su zama mafi kamfata ba. Daga wani applet na ƙidãya a yanzu, mun yi amfani da wani hisia mai girma na ki-China, kuma muka gane ya ɓace wa sauri mai yawa a cikin mitandai na jamii. Wannan ya yarda da mu sami wani jarrabo na iya karanta faɗin leksikon. Wannan karatun na farkon ta zama matsayin a matsayin a PU, wannan wata tsaro na daban. Sa'an nan yana fara wani metode na karatun wa PU mai daidai wa masu amfani da wani shirin neural. Ana ƙarfafa matsala da wani technical na-asansa na dictionary da zane-zane-zanen sigarin surori na yanzu. Experimental results show that the proposed approach outperforms baseline methods greatly.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྩིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྐད་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་འཇུག འདིས་ང་ཚོར་སེམས་ཚོར་རྒྱ་ཆེ་རུ་བརྩོན་ལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་དཔའ་བཅས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་བཟོ་བཅུག་སོང་། ཤོག་བྱང་འདི་དང་པོ་དེ་ཡིས་སྔ་ནས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚོད་ལྟ་བུ་རེད། དེ་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་དཀའ་ངལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་PU སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་གསརཔ་དང་འབྲེལ་མིའི་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་བ་དང་གསར་གཏོང་ཕྱུག་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཤིག་ཏུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'DeepPath : A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'ar': 'DeepPath: أسلوب تعلم معزز لاستدلال الرسم البياني المعرفي', 'fr': "DeepPath\xa0: une méthode d'apprentissage par renforcement pour le raisonnement des graphes de connaissances", 'pt': 'DeepPath: um método de aprendizado por reforço para raciocínio de gráfico de conhecimento', 'es': 'DeepPath: un método de aprendizaje reforzado para el razonamiento de Knowledge Graph', 'ja': 'DeepPath ：ナレッジグラフ推論のための強化学習方法', 'hi': 'DeepPath: ज्ञान ग्राफ़ तर्क के लिए एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने की विधि', 'zh': 'DeepPath曰:一以知图谱推理之强学也', 'ru': 'DeepPath: Метод обучения подкреплению для рассуждения графа знаний', 'ga': 'DeepPath: Modh Foghlama Treisithe le haghaidh Réasúnú Grafa Faisnéise', 'el': 'Μια Μέθοδος Μάθησης Ενίσχυσης για τη Λογιστική Γραφημάτων Γνώσης', 'ka': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'hu': 'DeepPath: A megerősített tanulási módszer a tudásgraf észleléséhez', 'it': 'DeepPath: un metodo di apprendimento di rinforzo per la ragione del grafico della conoscenza', 'kk': 'DeepPath: A reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'lt': 'Gilesnis kelias: Mokymosi žinių grafiko pagrįstumo stiprinimo metodas', 'mk': 'Длабока патека: Метод за зајакнување на учењето за размислување на знање на графикот', 'ms': 'Jalan Dalam: Kaedah Belajar Pengesahan untuk Pengesanan Graf Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'DeepPath: Metodu ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Tisħiħ għar-Raġunar tal-Grafika tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'DeepPath: A reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'pl': 'DeepPath: Metoda uczenia się wzmocnienia dla rozumowania grafu wiedzy', 'sr': 'DeepPath: Metod učenja pojačanja znanja grafika', 'ro': 'DeepPath: o metodă de învățare consolidată pentru raționarea graficului cunoștințelor', 'no': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'si': 'Deeppath: A Strengrmment Training Metodo for KnowKnowKnowKnowKnow Graph Reasoning', 'so': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning method for Reading Graph of Aqoonta', 'sv': 'DeepPath: En förstärkt inlärningsmetod för kunskapsgrafer resonemang', 'ta': 'ஆழமான பாதை: அறிவு வரைப்பட வாசிப்பு முறைமை', 'ur': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'vi': 'Deepwater: Một phương pháp học tiếp theo lý lẽ đồ sộ.', 'uz': 'DeepPath: Maò¥lumot darajasi oò£qish usuli', 'bg': 'Метод за укрепване на обучението за обосновка на графиката на знанието', 'da': 'DeepPath: En forstærket læringsmetode til vidensgrafering', 'nl': 'DeepPath: Een versterking leermethode voor het redeneren van kennisgrafieken', 'hr': 'DeepPath: Metod učenja pojačanja znanja grafika', 'id': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'ko': 'DeepPath: 지식도 추리에 사용되는 강화 학습 방법', 'fa': 'مسیر عمیق: یک روش یادگیری بیشتری برای دلیل سازی گراف دانش', 'de': 'DeepPath: Eine Verstärkungs-Lernmethode für Wissensgrafik Reasoning', 'sw': 'Path deep: Utawala wa Kufundisha Ufundilishaji wa Kusoma Graph ya Sayansi', 'tr': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'af': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'sq': 'DeepPath: Një metodë e forcimit të mësimit për arsyetimin e grafikut të njohurisë', 'am': 'Path: A Reinforcement Learn method for Known Graph Reading', 'hy': 'Deeppath. Գիտելու գրաֆիկի պատասխանատվության ուսումնասիրության ուժեղացման մեթոդը', 'bn': 'গভীর পাথ: জ্ঞান গ্রাফ পাঠানোর জন্য পুনর্গঠন শিক্ষা শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি', 'bs': 'DeepPath: Metod učenja pojačanja znanja grafika', 'ca': "DeepPath: Un mètode d'aprenentatge de reforç per a raonar el gràfic del coneixement", 'az': 'DeepPath: A reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning', 'fi': 'DeepPath: Vahvistettu oppimismenetelmä tietokaavion järkeilyyn', 'et': 'DeepPath: teadmiste graafiku põhjendamise tugevdamise õppemeetod', 'cs': 'DeepPath: Metoda posílení učení pro odůvodnění znalostního grafu', 'jv': 'deep pPath: A Backforcement Learning Method for knowknowknowknowGraph ratiosuning', 'sk': 'DeepPath: Okrepitev učne metode za razumevanje grafikona znanja', 'he': 'DeepPath: שיטת לימוד מחזקת לגיון גרף ידע', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'DeepPath: A Reinforcement Learning Method for Knowledge Graph Reasoning'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of learning to reason in large scale knowledge graphs (KGs). More specifically, we describe a novel reinforcement learning framework for learning multi-hop relational paths : we use a policy-based agent with continuous states based on knowledge graph embeddings, which reasons in a KG vector-space by sampling the most promising relation to extend its path. In contrast to prior work, our approach includes a reward function that takes the accuracy, diversity, and efficiency into consideration. Experimentally, we show that our proposed method outperforms a path-ranking based algorithm and knowledge graph embedding methods on Freebase and Never-Ending Language Learning datasets.', 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة تعلم العقل في الرسوم البيانية المعرفية واسعة النطاق (KGs). بشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نصف إطارًا جديدًا للتعلم المعزز لتعلم المسارات العلائقية متعددة القفزات: نستخدم عاملًا قائمًا على السياسة مع حالات مستمرة بناءً على زخارف الرسم البياني المعرفي ، والتي تتسبب في مساحة متجه رياض الأطفال عن طريق أخذ عينات من العلاقة الواعدة للتوسيع طريقه. على عكس العمل السابق ، يتضمن نهجنا وظيفة مكافأة تأخذ الدقة والتنوع والكفاءة في الاعتبار. من الناحية التجريبية ، نوضح أن طريقتنا المقترحة تتفوق في الأداء على الخوارزمية القائمة على ترتيب المسار وطرق تضمين الرسم البياني للمعرفة في مجموعات بيانات Freebase وتعلم اللغة الذي لا ينتهي أبدًا.', 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema de aprender a raciocinar em grafos de conhecimento de grande escala (KGs). Mais especificamente, descrevemos uma nova estrutura de aprendizado por reforço para aprender caminhos relacionais de vários saltos: usamos um agente baseado em políticas com estados contínuos com base em embeddings de grafos de conhecimento, que raciocina em um espaço vetorial KG amostrando a relação mais promissora para estender seu caminho. Em contraste com o trabalho anterior, nossa abordagem inclui uma função de recompensa que leva em consideração a precisão, diversidade e eficiência. Experimentalmente, mostramos que nosso método proposto supera um algoritmo baseado em path-ranking e métodos de incorporação de grafos de conhecimento em conjuntos de dados Freebase e Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le problème de l'apprentissage de la raison dans des graphes de connaissances à grande échelle (KG). Plus précisément, nous décrivons un nouveau cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement pour l'apprentissage de chemins relationnels multi-sauts\xa0: nous utilisons un agent basé sur des règles avec des états continus basés sur des intégrations de graphes de connaissances, qui raisonne dans un espace vectoriel KG en échantillonnant la relation la plus prometteuse pour étendre son chemin. Contrairement aux travaux antérieurs, notre approche inclut une fonction de récompense qui tient compte de la précision, de la diversité et de l'efficacité. Expérimentalement, nous montrons que la méthode que nous proposons surpasse un algorithme basé sur le classement des chemins et des méthodes d'intégration de graphes de connaissances sur les ensembles de données Freebase et Never-Ending Language Learning.", 'es': 'Estudiamos el problema de aprender a razonar en gráficos de conocimiento (KG) a gran escala. Más específicamente, describimos un marco de aprendizaje por refuerzo novedoso para aprender rutas relacionales de múltiples saltos: utilizamos un agente basado en políticas con estados continuos basados en incrustaciones de gráficos de conocimiento, que razona en un espacio vectorial KG al muestrear la relación más prometedora para extender su camino. A diferencia del trabajo anterior, nuestro enfoque incluye una función de recompensa que tiene en cuenta la precisión, la diversidad y la eficiencia. Experimentalmente, demostramos que nuestro método propuesto supera a un algoritmo basado en la clasificación de rutas y los métodos de incrustación de gráficos de conocimiento en los conjuntos de datos de Freebase y Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'ja': '大規模知識グラフ（ KG ）で推論を学ぶ問題を研究している。より具体的には、マルチホップ関係パスを学習するための新規の強化学習フレームワークを説明します。私たちは、知識グラフ埋め込みに基づいて連続的な状態を持つポリシーベースのエージェントを使用しています。これは、パスを拡張するために最も有望な関係をサンプリングすることによってKGベクトル空間での理由となります。以前の仕事とは対照的に、私たちのアプローチには、正確性、多様性、効率性を考慮した報酬機能が含まれています。実験的に、私たちの提案された方法は、FreebaseおよびNever - Ending Language Learningデータセット上のパスランキングベースのアルゴリズムおよびナレッジグラフ埋め込み方法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем проблему обучения разуму в крупномасштабных графах знаний (КГ). Более конкретно, мы описываем новую структуру обучения усилению для обучения многохоповым реляционным путям: мы используем основанный на политике агент с непрерывными состояниями, основанными на вложениях графа знаний, что обусловливает в векторном пространстве KG выборкой наиболее перспективного отношения для расширения его пути. В отличие от предыдущей работы, наш подход включает функцию вознаграждения, которая учитывает точность, разнообразие и эффективность. Экспериментально мы показываем, что предлагаемый нами метод превосходит алгоритм, основанный на ранжировании пути, и методы встраивания графа знаний на наборах данных Freebase и Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'hi': 'हम बड़े पैमाने पर ज्ञान रेखांकन (केजी) में तर्क करने के लिए सीखने की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम बहु-हॉप रिलेशनल पथ सीखने के लिए एक उपन्यास सुदृढीकरण सीखने के ढांचे का वर्णन करते हैं: हम ज्ञान ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर निरंतर राज्यों के साथ एक नीति-आधारित एजेंट का उपयोग करते हैं, जो अपने पथ का विस्तार करने के लिए सबसे आशाजनक संबंध का नमूना लेकर केजी वेक्टर-स्पेस में कारण बनता है। पूर्व के काम के विपरीत, हमारे दृष्टिकोण में एक इनाम समारोह शामिल है जो सटीकता, विविधता और दक्षता को ध्यान में रखता है। प्रयोगात्मक रूप से, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि एक पथ-रैंकिंग आधारित एल्गोरिथ्म और ज्ञान ग्राफ को Freebase और Never-Ending Language Learning datasets पर एम्बेड करने के तरीकों को मात देती है।', 'zh': '吾究于大图谱(KG)之学也。 更具体地说,述一种用学多跳关路径的新型强化学框架:我们用基于方略的代理,该摄有基于知识图嵌入的连续,这因对最希望的采样来推理KG向量空间以广其路径。 比之前事,吾道兼一奖能,当思准确性,多样性与效率。 实验以明Freebase、无穷之言集上优于算法、知识图谱嵌之法。', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb maidir le foghlaim conas réasúnaíocht i ngraif eolais ar scála mór (KGanna). Go sonrach, déanaimid cur síos ar chreat foghlama athneartaithe úrscéal chun cosáin choibhneasta il-hop a fhoghlaim: úsáidimid gníomhaire bunaithe ar bheartais le stáit leanúnacha bunaithe ar leabú graif eolais, a chuireann cúiseanna i veicteoir-spás KG trí sampláil a dhéanamh ar an gcaidreamh is tuar dóchais inti a leathnú. a cosán. I gcodarsnacht le réamhobair, cuimsíonn ár gcur chuige feidhm luach saothair a chuireann cruinneas, éagsúlacht agus éifeachtúlacht san áireamh. Go turgnamhach, léirímid go sáraíonn an modh atá molta againn algartam atá bunaithe ar chéim-rangú agus modhanna leabaithe graf eolais ar thacair sonraí Freebase agus Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης της λογικής σε γραφήματα γνώσης μεγάλης κλίμακας (ΚΓ). Πιο συγκεκριμένα, περιγράφουμε ένα νέο μαθησιακό πλαίσιο ενίσχυσης για την εκμάθηση σχεσιακών μονοπατιών πολλαπλών χορού: χρησιμοποιούμε έναν παράγοντα βασισμένο στην πολιτική με συνεχείς καταστάσεις βασισμένες σε ενσωμάτωση γραφήματος γνώσης, ο οποίος αιτιολογεί σε ένα διανυσματικό χώρο δειγματοληπτικά την πιο ελπιδοφόρα σχέση για να επεκτείνει την πορεία του. Σε αντίθεση με την προηγούμενη εργασία, η προσέγγισή μας περιλαμβάνει μια λειτουργία ανταμοιβής που λαμβάνει υπόψη την ακρίβεια, την ποικιλομορφία και την αποτελεσματικότητα. Πειραματικά, δείχνουμε ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνά έναν αλγόριθμο με βάση την κατάταξη διαδρομής και τις μεθόδους ενσωμάτωσης γραφήματος γνώσης σε σύνολα δεδομένων Freebase και Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'hu': 'Az érvelés megtanulásának problémáját nagyszabású tudásgrafokon (KG) vizsgáljuk. Pontosabban egy új erősítési tanulási keretrendszert írunk le a multi-hop relációs pályák tanulására: egy olyan politikai alapú ügynököt használunk, amely folyamatos állapotú tudásgrafok beágyazásán alapul, és amely egy KG vektor-térben a legígéretesebb kapcsolatot mintázza, hogy kiterjeszti útját. A korábbi munkákkal ellentétben megközelítésünk olyan jutalmazási funkciót tartalmaz, amely figyelembe veszi a pontosságot, a sokszínűséget és a hatékonyságot. Kísérleti szempontból megmutatjuk, hogy javasolt módszerünk felülmúlja az útvonal-rangsoroláson alapuló algoritmust és tudásgrafokon beágyazási módszereket Freebase és Never-Ending Language Learning adatkészleteken.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ პრობლემა, რომელიც გავისწავლობთ დიდი მეცნიერების გრაფიკაში (KGs). უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ აღწერეთ პრომენტის სწავლების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას მრავალ-ჰოპის შესწავლებისთვის: ჩვენ გამოყენებთ პოლიტიკური დაბათი ადვნენტი, რომელიც ცნობიერების გრაფიკის შესაბამისათვის დაბა პირველი სამუშაო შესახებ, ჩვენი პროგორმაცია აქვს სამუშაო ფუნქცია, რომელიც წარმოადგენს, განსხვავებას და ეფექციურობას. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა გავაკეთებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა გავაკეთება მონაცემების ალგორიტიმა და ცნობიერი გრაფიკაში, რომელიც Freebase და Never-Ending Language Learning Data sets.', 'kk': 'Біз үлкен білім графиктерінде оқыту мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз көп-хоп қатынастық жолдарды үйрену үшін романдық оқыту бағдарламасын түсіндіреміз: біз мәлімет графикалық ендіру күйіне негізделген ережелер негізделген агентті қолданамыз, бұл KG вектор бос орында, жолын кеңейту үшін ең үлкен қа Алдыңғы жұмыс жұмысына қарсы, біздің тәсіліміздің дұрыстығын, әртүрлікті және ефективдігін қарастыру функциясы бар. Тәжірибелі, біз таңдалған әдіміміздің жол жолдарына негізделген алгоритм мен білім графикасын Freebase және ешқашан аяқталмаған тіл оқыту деректер жиындарында ендіру әдістерін көрсетеді.', 'it': "Studiamo il problema dell'imparare a ragionare in grafici di conoscenza su larga scala (KG). In particolare, descriviamo un nuovo framework di apprendimento di rinforzo per l'apprendimento di percorsi relazionali multi-hop: utilizziamo un agente basato su policy-based con stati continui basati su embedding di grafici di conoscenza, che ragiona in uno spazio vettoriale KG campionando la relazione più promettente per estendere il suo percorso. A differenza del lavoro precedente, il nostro approccio include una funzione di ricompensa che prende in considerazione l'accuratezza, la diversità e l'efficienza. Sperimentalmente, mostriamo che il nostro metodo proposto supera un algoritmo basato su path-ranking e metodi di incorporazione del grafico della conoscenza su set di dati Freebase e Never-Ending Language Learning.", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame mokymosi pagrįstumu problem ą didelio masto žinių grafikoje (KG). Konkrečiau apibūdiname naują mokymosi sustiprinimu sistemą mokymuisi daugiapakopiais santykiniais keliais: naudojame politiniu pagrindu pagrįstą agent ą su nuolatinėmis valstybėmis, grindžiamomis žinių grafikos įtraukomis, dėl kurių KG vektorių erdvėje atsiranda priežastis, imant mėginius labiausiai žadantį santykį išplėsti jo kelią. In contrast to prior work, our approach includes a reward function that takes the accuracy, diversity, and efficiency into consideration.  Eksperimentiniu požiūriu mes parodome, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas yra didesnis už kelių klasifikavimu pagrįstą algoritmą ir žinių grafiką, įtraukiantį metodus į Freebase ir Never Ending Language Learning duomenų rinkinius.', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме проблемот со учењето на разумот во графиките на голем степен на знаење (КГ). Поконкретно, опишуваме нова рамка за зајакнување на учењето за учење на повеќекупни односни патишта: користиме агент базиран на политика со континуирани држави базирани на вградувања на знање график, што причинува во вектор-простор КГ со примерок на најветувачкиот однос за проширување на својот пат. За разлика од претходната работа, нашиот пристап вклучува функција на награда која ја зема во предвид точноста, различноста и ефикасноста. Експериментално, покажуваме дека нашиот предложен метод го надминува алгоритмот базиран на рангирање на патиштата и графот на знаење кој ги вклучува методите на Freebase и never-ending Language Learning datasets.', 'ml': 'കാര്യം പഠിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രശ്നം നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. വലിയ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാഫുകളില്\u200d. കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല-ഹോപ്പ് ബന്ധപാതകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പഠിപ്പിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവലിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു: മുമ്പ് ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടിയാണെങ്കില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പ്രതിഫലം കൂടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ കൃത്യമായ, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ, പ് Experimentally, we show that our proposed method outperforms a path-ranking based algorithm and knowledge graph embedding methods on Freebase and Never-Ending Language Learning datasets.', 'mt': 'We study the problem of learning to reason in large scale knowledge graphs (KGs).  B’mod aktar speċifiku, a ħna niddeskrivu qafas ġdid ta’ tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar għat-tagħlim ta’ rotot relazzjonali multihops: aħna nużaw aġent ibbażat fuq il-politika b’stati kontinwi bbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-grafika ta’ l-għarfien, li jirriżultaw fi spazju ta’ vetturi KG billi nużaw kampjuni tar-relazzjoni l-aktar promettenti biex jestendu t-triq tagħha B’kuntrast max-xogħol preċedenti, l-approċċ tagħna jinkludi funzjoni ta’ premju li tqis il-preċiżjoni, id-diversità, u l-effiċjenza. Esperimentalment, nagħmlu evidenza li l-metodu propost tagħna jwassal għal algoritmu u grafika tal-għarfien ibbażati fuq il-klassifikazzjoni tal-passaġġi li jinkorporaw metodi fuq settijiet ta’ dejta dwar it-Tagħlim tal-Lingwa Freebase u ta’ Tagħlim tal-Lingwa li Qatt ma jintemm.', 'mn': 'Бид маш их хэмжээний мэдлэг графикаар суралцах асуудлыг судалж байна. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид олон холбоотой харилцааны замыг сурах шинэ дэвшилтэй суралцах суралцах системийг тайлбарлаж байна: бид мэдлэгтэй график тогтмол байрлал дээр тогтмол бодит агентай ашиглаж байна. Энэ нь KG вектор орон зайд хамгийн амлалтай харилцааны шалтгаан юм. Өмнөх ажлын эсрэг бидний арга барилга нь зөв, олон төрлийн, үр дүнтэй байдлыг бодох шагналын функц юм. Үүний туршилтад бидний санал өгсөн арга нь "Freebase" болон "Never-End Language Learning өгөгдлийн санг" дээр нэмэгдүүлэх алгоритм болон мэдлэг график ашигладаг.', 'no': 'Vi studerer problemet med å lære å forstå på stor grad kunnskap (KGs). Dette er meir spesifikt at vi beskriver eit nytt reinforcement-læringsrammeverket for å lære fleire hopper relasjonelle baner: vi bruker ein politikkbasert agent med kontinuerlege tilstandar basert på kunnskap-grafen-innbygging, som grunner i ein KG vektorrom ved å samla dei mest foreslåande relasjonane til å utvida banen. I contrast to previous work, our approach includes a reward function that takes the accuracy, diversity and efficiency into consideration. Eksperimentelt viser vi at vår foreslått metode utfører ein bane-rankeringsbasert algoritme og kunnskapsgraf som innebyr metoder på Freebase og Aldri-sluttande språk-læringsdatasett.', 'pl': 'Badamy problem nauki rozumu w dużej skali wykresów wiedzy (KG). W szczególności opisujemy nowe ramy uczenia się wieloskojowych ścieżek relacyjnych wzmacniające: używamy agenta opartego na polityce o stanach ciągłych opartych na osadzeniu wykresów wiedzy, który uzasadnia w przestrzeni wektorowej KG próbując najbardziej obiecującą relację w celu rozszerzenia jej ścieżki. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac nasze podejście obejmuje funkcję nagrody, która uwzględnia dokładność, różnorodność i wydajność. Eksperymentalnie pokazujemy, że nasza proponowana metoda przewyższa algorytm oparty na rankingu ścieżek i wykres wiedzy osadzający metody na zbiorach danych Freebase i Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'ms': 'We study the problem of learning to reason in large scale knowledge graphs (KGs).  Lebih khususnya, kami menggambarkan kerangka pembelajaran pembangkuan baru untuk mempelajari laluan hubungan berbilang-hop: kami menggunakan ejen berdasarkan kebijakan dengan keadaan terus menerus berdasarkan pembangkuan graf pengetahuan, yang sebab dalam ruang vektor KG dengan mengambil sampel hubungan yang paling berjanji untuk memperluas laluannya. Sebaliknya dengan kerja sebelumnya, pendekatan kita termasuk fungsi hadiah yang mempertimbangkan ketepatan, pelbagai, dan efisiensi. Secara eksperimen, kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami diusulkan melampaui algoritma dan grafik pengetahuan yang berdasarkan peringkat-laluan menggabungkan kaedah pada set data Freebase dan never-Ending Language Learning.', 'ro': 'Studiem problema invatarii rațiunii în grafice de cunoaștere la scară largă (KG). Mai exact, descriem un nou cadru de învățare de armare pentru învățarea căilor relaționale multi-hop: folosim un agent bazat pe politici cu stări continue bazate pe încorporări grafice de cunoaștere, care raționează într-un vector-spațiu KG prin eșantionarea relației cele mai promițătoare pentru a-și extinde calea. Spre deosebire de munca anterioară, abordarea noastră include o funcție de recompensare care ia în considerare precizia, diversitatea și eficiența. Experimental, arătăm că metoda noastră propusă depășește un algoritm bazat pe trasee-ranking și metode de încorporare a graficului cunoștințelor pe seturile de date Freebase și Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'so': 'Dhibaatada waxbarashada waxaynu baranaynaa sababo ku saabsan aqoonta aad u weyn (KGs). Si gaar ah, waxaynu u qoraynaa qoraal horumarinta waxbarashada barashada waddooyinka kala duduwan: waxaynu isticmaalnaa qoys siyaasadeed oo wadamada ku qoran oo ku qoran wadamada aqoonta, taasoo sababta ku jirta KG vector-space sameynaya xiriirka aad u ballanqaaday inuu wado. Inta ka duwan shaqada hore waxaa ku jira shaqo mushaar ah oo si saxda ah, kala duduwan iyo faa’iidada ka fiirsashada. Imtixaanka, waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday uu soo saaraa qoraaliim iyo aqoonta oo ku qoran qaababka ku saabsan barashada luqada ee Freebase iyo qoraalka waxbarashada ee dhammaadka luqada.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo problem učenja razuma u velikim graficima znanja (KG). Posebno, opisujemo novi okvir učenja pojačanja za učenje multihopskih odnosivnih puteva: koristimo politički agent sa stalnim državama na osnovu ugrađenja grafika znanja, koji je razlog u vektorskom prostoru KG-a uzorkom najobećavajućeg odnosa da proširi put. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim radom, naš pristup uključuje funkciju nagrade koja uzima u obzir tačnost, raznolikost i efikasnost. Eksperimentalno, pokazujemo da naša predložena metoda iznosi algoritam i grafik znanja koji ugrađuje metode Freebase i bezokončanih podataka za učenje jezika.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar problemet med att lära sig resonera i storskaliga kunskapsgrafer (KG). Mer specifikt beskriver vi en ny förstärkning inlärningsram för lärande av multi-hop relationella vägar: vi använder en policybaserad agent med kontinuerliga tillstånd baserade på kunskapsgrafer inbäddningar, som resonerar i ett KG vektor-rum genom att provspela den mest lovande relationen för att utvidga dess väg. I motsats till tidigare arbete inkluderar vårt tillvägagångssätt en belöningsfunktion som tar hänsyn till noggrannhet, mångfald och effektivitet. Experimentellt visar vi att vår föreslagna metod överträffar en sökrankningsbaserad algoritm och kunskapsgrafer inbäddningsmetoder på Freebase och Never Ending Language Learning datauppsättningar.', 'ta': 'நாம் பெரிய கல்வி வரைபடங்களில் காரணமாக கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பிரச்சனையை படிக்கிறோம். மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் பல-hop தொடர்பு பாதைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கான ஒரு புதிய விளையாட்டு வலிமைப்படுத்தும் சட்டத்தை விவரிக்கிறோம்: நாம் தொடர்ந்து நாடுகளின் அறிவு வரைபடத்தை மூ முன்னால் வேலைக்கு மாறுபட்டால், எங்கள் முறைமையில் சரியான, பல்வேறு மற்றும் சிந்தனையின் விளைவுகளை எடுத்துக் கொ முயற்சிக்கப்பட்டது, எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் பாதையில் அடிப்படையான கலைப்பொருள் மற்றும் அறிவு வரைபடத்தை பொருத்தும் முறையான', 'ur': 'ہم بڑے علم گراف (KGs) میں سمجھانے کے لئے سیکھنے کے مسئلہ کی تلاش کرتے ہیں۔ اور زیادہ مخصوصا، ہم ایک نوم کی تدبیر یادہانی فرم کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں multi-hop رابطہ کے مسائل کی تعلیم کے لئے: ہم ایک پولیس کی بنیادی اگنٹ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں جو علم گراف ابڈینگ پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے، جو KG ویکتور-فضا میں بہترین وعدہ دینے والی رابطہ کے مطابق ہے۔ پہلے کے کاموں کے مقابلہ میں، ہماری تقریبا ایک پاداش فعالیت شامل ہوتی ہے جو دقیق، مختلف اور فعالیت کو سمجھتا ہے. آزمائش کے طور پر، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ایک مسیر رینگ بنیاد الگوریتم اور علم گراف کے مطابق فریبنس اور کبھی ختم نہ ہونے کی زبان کی تعلیم ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطابق ہے.', 'si': 'අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල දන්නවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා. තව විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් විස්තර කරනවා විස්තර දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ගොඩක් හොප් සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා පොලිසික අයිතිකාරියක්  මුලින් වැඩට වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ, සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය, විවිධාවය, සහ හැකියා පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානය ය', 'uz': "Biz ko'p ko'p ta'rif grafiklariga sabab o'rganish muammolarini o'rganamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz bir necha-hop bog'liq yordamlarni o'rganish uchun novel o'rganishni o'rganish qoidani bajaramiz: biz davom etish davom etish davom etish davomida qoidalar bilan foydalanamiz, bu sabablarni KG vektor-romanida o'rganish uchun eng yaxshi munosabatlarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Birinchi ishni boshqarish bilan o'zgarishga, bizning hayotimizda ma'lumot funksiyatlarni qo'shish mumkin. Experimentally, we show that our proposed method outperforms a path-ranking based algorithm and knowledge graph embedding methods on Freebase and Never-Ending Language Learning datasets.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề học lý lẽ trong các biểu đồ kiến thức trên diện rộng (KG). Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi mô tả một cơ sở học củng cố mới để học các đường dẫn liên hệ đa hop: Chúng tôi sử dụng một điệp viên dựa trên chính sách với các bang liên tiếp dựa trên sự nhúng tay của đồ thị kiến thức, lý do tại một vector-space của KG, bằng cách lấy mẫu từ mối quan hệ hứa hẹn nhất để mở rộng con đường. Trái với công việc trước, cách tiếp cận của chúng ta gồm một hàm phần thưởng mang tính chính xác, đa dạng và hiệu quả. Thử nghiệm, chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp được đề xuất vượt qua hiệu quả của thuật toán có ưu tiên hàng đường dẫn và đồ thị kiến thức chứa phương pháp dựa trên bộ gia nhập ngôn ngữ Freebase và Không bao giờ kết thúc.', 'nl': "We bestuderen het probleem van het leren redeneren in grootschalige kennisgrafieken (KG's). Meer specifiek beschrijven we een nieuw versterkingsleerkader voor het leren van multi-hop relationele paden: we gebruiken een beleidsgebaseerde agent met continue staten gebaseerd op kennisgrafiekembeddingen, die in een KG vectorruimte redeneert door de meest veelbelovende relatie te nemen om het pad uit te breiden. In tegenstelling tot eerdere werkzaamheden omvat onze aanpak een beloningsfunctie die rekening houdt met nauwkeurigheid, diversiteit en efficiëntie. Experimenteel laten we zien dat onze voorgestelde methode beter presteert dan een pad-ranking gebaseerd algoritme en kennisgrafiek embedmethoden op Freebase en Never-Ending Language Learning datasets.", 'da': 'Vi studerer problemet med at lære at fornufte i store vidensgrafer (KG). Mere specifikt beskriver vi en ny forstærkning læringsramme for læring af multi-hop relationelle veje: Vi bruger en politik-baseret agent med kontinuerlige tilstande baseret på vidensgraf embeddings, som begrunder i et KG vektor-rum ved at prøve den mest lovende relation til at udvide dens vej. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde omfatter vores tilgang en belønningsfunktion, der tager hensyn til nøjagtighed, mangfoldighed og effektivitet. Eksperimentelt viser vi, at vores foreslåede metode overgår en sti-ranking baseret algoritme og viden graf indlejring metoder på Freebase og Never-Ending Language Learning datasæt.', 'bg': 'Проучваме проблема с ученето на разума в широкомащабни знателни графики (КГ). По-конкретно, описваме нова рамка за укрепване на обучението за изучаване на релационни пътища на мулти-хоп: използваме базиран на политика агент с непрекъснати състояния, базирани на вграждания на графики на знанието, който мотивира в векторно пространство чрез вземане на проби от най-обещаващата връзка за разширяване на неговия път. За разлика от предишната работа, нашият подход включва функция за възнаграждение, която взема под внимание точността, разнообразието и ефективността. Експериментално показваме, че предложеният ни метод превъзхожда методите за вграждане на алгоритъм и графика на знанието, базирани на рейтинг по пътища, в набори от данни за свободно и безкрайно езиково обучение.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das Problem des Lernens zur Vernunft in großen Wissensgraphen (KGs). Konkret beschreiben wir ein neuartiges Verstärkungs-Lernframework für das Lernen von Multi-Hop-Beziehungspfaden: Wir verwenden einen richtlinienbasierten Agenten mit kontinuierlichen Zuständen basierend auf Knowledge Graph Embeddings, der in einem KG Vektorraum begründet, indem er die vielversprechendste Beziehung entnimmt, um seinen Pfad zu erweitern. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten beinhaltet unser Ansatz eine Belohnungsfunktion, die Genauigkeit, Vielfalt und Effizienz berücksichtigt. Experimentell zeigen wir, dass unsere vorgeschlagene Methode einen Pfad-Ranking-basierten Algorithmus und Knowledge Graph Einbettungsmethoden in Freebase und Never-Ending Language Learning Datensätzen übertrifft.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل یاد گرفتن به دلیل در گرافهای دانش بزرگ (KGs) مطالعه می کنیم. دقیقاً ما یک چهارچوب یادگیری تازه را برای یادگیری مسیرهای رابطه\u200cای چندین هپ توصیف می\u200cکنیم: ما از یک مامور قابل سیاست استفاده می\u200cکنیم با وضعیت\u200cهای پایدار بر اساس انجمن\u200cسازی گراف دانش، که دلیل\u200cهایی در فضای ویکتور KG با نمونه\u200cسازی از ترین رابطه\u200cای که قو در مقابل کارهای پیشینه، دسترسی ما شامل یک عملکرد پاداش است که دقیق، مختلف و موثرت را به توجه می گیرد. به طور تجربه، ما نشان می دهیم که روش پیشنهاد ما یک الگوریتم و گراف علمی که روش\u200cهای آموزش داده\u200cهای freebase و بی\u200cپایان زبان\u200cآموزش را بر پایان می\u200cدهد بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo problem učenja razuma u velikim znanstvenim graficima (KGs). Posebno, opisujemo novi okvir učenja pojačanja za učenje multihopskih odnosivnih puteva: koristimo politički agent s kontinualnim državama na osnovu ugrađenja grafika znanja, koji je razlog u vektorskom prostoru KG-a uzorak najobećavajućeg odnosa za proširenje svog puta. U suprotnosti s prethodnim radom, naš pristup uključuje funkciju nagrade koja uzima u obzir preciznost, raznolikost i učinkovitost. Eksperimentalno, pokazujemo da naša predložena metoda iznosi algoritam i grafik znanja koji se ugrađuje metode Freebase-a i nikada ne završavajući jezički učenje podataka.', 'sw': 'Tunafoma tatizo la kujifunza kuelewa maana katika picha kubwa za maarifa (KGs). Zaidi zaidi, tunaelezea mfumo wa kuimarisha riwaya wa kujifunza kwa ajili ya kujifunza njia za mahusiano ya watu wengi: tunatumia mtengenezaji wa sera yenye nchi zinazoendelea kwa msingi wa maendeleo ya ufahamu, ambao unasababisha katika eneo la vector la KG kwa sampuli mahusiano makubwa zaidi ya kutangaza njia yake. In contrast to prior work, our approach includes a reward function that takes the accuracy, diversity, and efficiency into consideration.  Kwa mazungumzo, tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu ya pendekezo inaonyesha utambulisho na maarifa ya ufahamu unaoendelea kwenye njia za Ufunzi wa Lugha za Uhuru na Kuhitimisha.', 'tr': 'Biz uly ölçekli bilim grafiklerinde sebäbi öwrenmek üçin meselelerini okaýarys. Adatça, biz multi-Hop Relativ ýolary öwrenmek üçin roman taýýarlanmagy çarpyşlygyny tassyýarys: Bilim grafiklerine daýanýan politika daýanýan ajaýyny ulanýarys, bu sebäbi KG vektör-seleňde iñ söz berýän baglaýyşyny örenýäk. Öňki işiň ýagdaýynyň üstünde, biziň ýagdaýymyz takyklygyny, düýbürligini we etkinlik wajyplygyny pikir eden täsirlerimiz bar. Dentisiýa görä, teklip eden metodumyzyň Freebase we hiç haçan sözlemeýän dil öwrenme datasetlerinde algoritmus we bilgi grafiklerinden daşary çykýandygyny görkezýäris.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah belajar untuk alasan dalam grafik pengetahuan skala besar (KG). Lebih spesifik, kami menggambarkan cadangan pembelajaran pembangunan novel untuk belajar jalur hubungan multi-hop: kami menggunakan agen berdasarkan kebijakan dengan negara-negara terus-menerus berdasarkan pembangunan grafik pengetahuan, yang alasan di ruang vektor KG dengan mengambil sampel hubungan yang paling berjanji untuk memperluas jalannya. Berbeda dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya, pendekatan kita termasuk fungsi hadiah yang mempertimbangkan akurasi, diversitas, dan efisiensi. Secara eksperimen, kami menunjukkan bahwa metode kami yang diusulkan melampaui algoritma berdasarkan peringkat jalur dan grafik pengetahuan memasukkan metode pada Freebase dan never-Ending Language Learning dataset.', 'ko': '우리는 대규모 지식도(KG)에서 추리를 배우는 문제를 연구했다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 다중 점프 관계 경로를 학습하는 데 사용되는 신형 강화 학습 구조를 묘사했다. 우리는 전략 기반의 에이전트를 사용하고 지식 그래프가 삽입된 연속 상태를 바탕으로 샘플링을 통해 가장 희망적인 관계를 확장하여 KG 벡터 공간에서 추리를 한다.이전의 업무에 비해 우리의 방법은 정확성, 다양성, 효율을 고려한 장려 함수를 포함한다.실험에 의하면 Freebase와 끝이 없는 언어 학습 데이터 집합에서 우리가 제시한 방법은 경로 정렬을 바탕으로 하는 알고리즘과 지식 그래프를 삽입하는 방법보다 낫다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'af': "Ons leer die probleem van leer om te rede in groot skaal kennis grafieke (KG). More specifically, we describe a novel reinforcement learning framework for learning multi- hop relational paths: we use a policy- based agent with continuous states based on knowledge graph embedding, which reasons in a KG vector- space by sampling the most promising relation to extend its path. In contrast to previous work, our approach includes a reward function that takes the accuracy, diversity and efficiency into consideration. Eksperimenteel, ons wys dat ons voorgestelde metode uitvoer 'n pad-ranking gebaseerde algoritme en kennis graaf inbetering metodes op Freebase en Nooit-eindelike taal leer datastelle.", 'am': 'ብዙ እውቀት ቀረፎችን (KGs) ለማስተማርን ጉዳይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ብዙ-hop ግንኙነት መንገዶች ለማስተማር የመረጃን ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ In contrast to prior work, our approach includes a reward function that takes the accuracy, diversity, and efficiency into consideration.  በተፈተና፣ በተዘጋጀው ልማችን የደረጃ አሌጎርቲም እና እውቀት ቀረጽ የፍሬባስ እና የቋንቋ ትምህርት ማቀናጃ ማድረግ ዘዴዎችን እንዲያሳየው እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք գիտելիքի լայն մակարդակի գրաֆիկներում հասկանալու ուսումնասիրության խնդիրը: Ավելի հատկապես, մենք նկարագրում ենք նոր ուժեղացման ուսումնական շրջանակը բազմահուսային հարաբերական ուղիների ուսումնասիրելու համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք քաղաքականության հիմնված գործիչ, որն անընդհատ կազմում է գիտելիքների գծագրային ներդրումների վրա, ինչը պատճառներ է KG-ի վեկտորի տարածքում, ըն Ի հակադրություն նախորդ աշխատանքին, մեր մոտեցումը ներառում է վարձի ֆունկցիա, որը հաշվի առնում է ճշգրիտությունը, բազմազանությունը և արդյունավետությունը: Experimentally, we show that our proposed method outperforms a path-ranking based algorithm and knowledge graph embedding methods on Freebase and Never-Ending Language Learning datasets.', 'az': 'Biz böyük ölçülü bilgi grafiklərində öyrənmək problemini öyrənirik. Biz çoxlu-Hop ilişkili yolları öyrənmək üçün yeni çoxlu-Hop öyrənmək öyrənmək sistemini təsdiqləyirik: elm grafı in şallarına dayanan siyasi-tabanlı ajanı istifadə edirik ki, KG vektör-kosmosunda ən söz verilən ilişki yolunu genişləmək üçün ən çoxlu nümunə çəkirir. Əvvəlki işin qarşısında, bizim yaxınlığımız haqq-hesab, müxtəlif və faydalanılığını düşünən mükafat funksiyasını daxil edir. Həqiqətən, biz təklif etdiyimiz metodumun, Freebase və Never Ending Dil Öyrənmə veri qurularında bir yol səviyyəsinə dayanan algoritm və elm grafı inşa etmə metodlarını göstəririk.', 'bn': 'আমরা বিশাল পর্যায়ের জ্ঞান গ্রাফের কারণে কারণ শিখার সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি। আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা বহুহাপের সম্পর্কের রাস্তা শিক্ষা শিক্ষা শিক্ষার ক্ষেত্রে একটি উপন্যাস ব্যাখ্যা করছি: আমরা একটি নীতির ভিত্তিক এজেন্ট ব্যবহার করি যাদের জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ বিভিন্ন ভিত্তি পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিরুদ্ধে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতার মধ্যে একটি পুরস্কার ফাংশন রয়েছে যা সঠিক, বৈচিত্র্যময় এবং কার্যকর বি পরীক্ষায় আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি পাথ-রেঙ্কিং ভিত্তিক অ্যালগরিদম এবং জ্ঞান গ্রাফ ফ ফ্রিবাস এবং কখনো শেষ-শেখার ভাষা শ', 'ca': "Estudem el problema d'aprendre a raonar en gràfics de coneixement a gran escala. Més concretament, descrivim un nou marc d'aprenentatge de reforç per aprendre viatges relacionals multihops: utilitzem un agent basat en polítiques amb estats continus basats en integracions de gràfics de coneixement, que raons en un espai vector-KG agafant mostres de la relació més prometedora per estendre el seu camí. Al contrari de la feina anterior, el nostre enfocament inclou una funció de recompensa que té en compte la precisió, la diversitat i l'eficiència. Experimentalment, demostram que el nostre mètode proposat supera un algoritme basat en la classificació de camí i un gràfic de coneixement que incorporen mètodes en conjunts de dades d'aprenentatge de llenguatge Freebase i never-ending.", 'bs': 'Proučavamo problem učenja razuma u velikim graficima znanja (KGs). Posebno, opisujemo novi okvir učenja pojačanja za učenje multihopskih odnosivnih puteva: koristimo politički agent sa neprestano države na osnovu ugrađenja grafika znanja, koji je razlog u vektorskom prostoru KG-a uzorkom najobećavajućeg odnosa da proširi svoj put. U suprotnosti s prethodnim radom, naš pristup uključuje funkciju nagrade koja uzima u obzir preciznost, raznolikost i učinkovitost. Eksperimentalno, pokazujemo da naša predložena metoda iznosi algoritam i grafik znanja koji se ugrađuje metode Freebase-a i datumskih seta učenja jezika koji nikad ne završavaju.', 'cs': 'Problém učení se rozumovat studujeme v rozsáhlých znalostních grafech (KG). Konkrétněji popisujeme nový zesílený učební rámec pro učení multi-hop relačních cest: používáme agent založený na politice s kontinuálními stavy založenými na vložení znalostních grafů, který odůvodňuje v KG vektorovém prostoru vzorkováním nejslibnějšího vztahu k rozšíření jeho cesty. Na rozdíl od předchozí práce zahrnuje náš přístup funkci odměny, která bere v úvahu přesnost, rozmanitost a efektivitu. Experimentálně ukazujeme, že naše navrhovaná metoda překonává algoritmus založený na hodnocení cest a znalostní grafy vložení metod do datových sad Freebase a Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë problem in e mësimit të arsyetimit në grafikë të njohurive të shkallës së madhe (KG). Më specifikisht, ne përshkruajmë një kuadër të ri të mësimit të forcimit për mësimin e rrugëve të lidhjeve me shumëhop a: ne përdorim një agjent të bazuar në politikë me shtete të vazhdueshme bazuar në përfshirjet e grafikut të njohurive, të cilat arsyetojnë në një hapësirë vektori KG duke marrë mostrat e lidhjes më premtuese për të zgjeruar rrugën e saj. Në kundërshtim me punën e mëparshme, qasja jonë përfshin një funksion shpërblimi që merr parasysh saktësinë, diversitetin dhe efektshmërinë. Eksperimentalisht, ne tregojmë se metoda jonë e propozuar ekziston mbi një algoritëm dhe grafik të njohurive të bazuar në renditjen e rrugëve që përfshin metodat në bazën e lirë dhe të dhënat për mësimin e gjuhës kurrë të fundit.', 'et': 'Me uurime mõistuse õppimise probleemi suuremahulistes teadmiste graafikutes (KGs). Täpsemalt kirjeldame uudset tugevdusõpperaamistikku multihüppeliste relatsiooniteede õppimiseks: kasutame poliitikapõhist agenti, mille pidevad olekud põhinevad teadmisgraafikutel, mis põhjustab KG vektoriruumi, valides kõige paljutõotavama seose oma tee laiendamiseks. Erinevalt varasemast tööst hõlmab meie lähenemisviis preemiafunktsiooni, mis võtab arvesse täpsust, mitmekesisust ja tõhusust. Eksperimentaalselt näitame, et meie kavandatud meetod ületab teejärjekorras põhinevaid algoritme ja teadmisgraafikute manustamise meetodeid Freebase ja lõputu keeleõppe andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme järkeilyn oppimista suurten tietograafien avulla. Tarkemmin sanottuna kuvaamme uudenlaista lujitettua oppimiskehystä multi-hop-relaatiopolkujen oppimiseen: käytämme politiikkapohjaista agenttia, jonka jatkuvat tilat perustuvat tietograafien upotuksiin, jotka perustelevat KG vektoriavaruutta ottamalla näytteitä lupaavimmasta suhteesta polkunsa laajentamiseksi. Aiempaan työhön verrattuna lähestymistapamme sisältää palkitsemistoiminnon, joka ottaa huomioon tarkkuuden, monimuotoisuuden ja tehokkuuden. Kokeellisesti osoitamme, että ehdotettu menetelmä on parempi kuin polkusijoitukseen perustuva algoritmi ja tietokaavio upotusmenetelmät Freebase- ja Never-Ending Language Learning -aineistoihin.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan kanggo nggambar nggawe barang nggambar luwih (KGs). Additionally, we describe a rome refforcement Learning frame for Learn multi-top Relative paths: we use a policy-basic ajan with continue state bazed on knowinggraphembedding, that ratios in a KG vector-space by sampling the mesthine umurting ratio to expand the path. A compromise one of the paths that are underlined as usual can be undone. Tulung ning basa sing wis digawe, dadi kapan-kapan wong liyane mung sabanjuré awak dhéwé buturan, ngregani lan ijol-ijolan sing beraksi. Name', 'ha': "Munã karatun matsalar da za'a iya fahimtar kunnuwa masu girma (KGs). Kayya, Munã bayyana wani kure na ƙarani da aka sanar da hanyõyi masu haɗi na multi-jump: za mu yi amfani da wani ma'anar-rayi wanda na da daidai a cikin mataifa da daidai a kan karatun fassara na ilmi, wanda ke kasancẽwa a cikin wani fili na KG-matsayi, ko misali da mafi yawan muhimmada mai yi wa'adi da za'a shimfiɗa hanyarsa. Tsamman da kafin aiki da ke gabani, hanyarmu yana da wani aikin ijãra wanda ya ɗauki taƙaitacce, da masu farin tarawa da fassarata. Kayyan da, za mu nuna cewa hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata, yana samar da algoritm da fassarar da ilmi masu shiga hanyoyin ta cikin Freebase da Shirin Learnin Lugha da Aldawi.", 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של הלימודים להבין בגרפי ידע במרחב גדול (KG). במיוחד יותר, אנו מתארים מסגרת לימוד חיבור חדשה ללמוד דרכים יחסיות רבות-הופ: אנו משתמשים בסוכן מבוסס על מדינות עם מדינות ממשיכות מבוססת על מערכות גרף ידע, שסיבות במרחב וקטור KG על ידי דגימה של מערכת יחסים המבטיחות ביותר להאריך את דרכו. בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת, הגישה שלנו כוללת תפקיד פרס שיקח בחשבון את הדיוק, המגווון והיעילות. מבחינה ניסיונית, אנו מראים שהשיטה המוצעת שלנו עולה על אלגוריתם ומבוסס על רמות דרכים וגרף הידע שמכיל שיטות על בסיס חופשי וללמוד שפות לעולם לא נגמר.', 'sk': 'Proučujemo problem učenja razuma v obsežnih grafih znanja (KG). Natančneje opisujemo nov okrepitveni učni okvir za učenje multi-hop relacijskih poti: uporabljamo agent, ki temelji na politiki, s stalnimi stanji, ki temeljijo na vgradnji grafov znanja, ki razloži vektorski prostor KG z vzorčenjem najbolj obetavnega relacije za razširitev njegove poti. V nasprotju s predhodnim delom naš pristop vključuje funkcijo nagrajevanja, ki upošteva natančnost, raznolikost in učinkovitost. Eksperimentalno pokažemo, da je naša predlagana metoda boljša od metod vključevanja algoritmov na podlagi razvrščanja poti in grafov znanja v nabore podatkov Freebase in Never-Ending Language Learning.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚད་ཆེན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གྱི་ཚད་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བསམ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྗེས་སུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་གསར་གཏོད་ཅིག་བྲིས་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་དག་ཚད་དང་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་མིན་འདུག། Experimentally, we show that our proposed method outperforms a path-ranking algorithm and knowledge graph embedding methods on Freebase and Never-Ending Language Learning datasets.'}
{'en': 'Sentence Simplification with Deep Reinforcement Learning', 'fr': 'Simplification des phrases avec apprentissage par renforcement profond', 'ar': 'تبسيط الجمل مع التعلم المعزز العميق', 'pt': 'Simplificação de Frases com Aprendizado por Reforço Profundo', 'es': 'Simplificación de oraciones con aprendizaje por refuerzo profundo', 'zh': '以深度强化学简化句', 'ja': '深層強化学習による文章の簡素化', 'hi': 'गहरी सुदृढीकरण सीखने के साथ वाक्य सरलीकरण', 'ru': 'Упрощение предложения с глубоким обучением подкреплению', 'ga': 'Pianbhreith a Shimpliú le Foghlaim Neartú Dhomhain', 'ka': 'სიტყვების გამოსახულება ძალიან სწავლებით', 'hu': 'A mondat egyszerűsítése mélyreható megerősítéssel', 'el': 'Απλοποίηση φράσεων με βαθιά μάθηση ενίσχυσης', 'it': 'Semplificazione delle frasi con Deep Reinforcement Learning', 'lt': 'Nuomonės supaprastinimas giliai stiprinant mokymąsi', 'kk': 'Сөздерді қарапайым түсіндіру оқытуы', 'mk': 'Едноставување на речениците со длабоко засилување на учењето', 'ms': 'Permudahan perkataan dengan Pembelajaran Pengesahan Tepat', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ശിക്ഷ ലളിതമാക്കുക', 'mt': 'Is-Simplifikazzjoni tas-Sentenza bit-Tagħlim ta’ Tisħiħ Profond', 'mn': 'Үүнийг гүн гүнзгий reinforcement Learning', 'no': 'Uttrykk med dyppa forstørring', 'pl': 'Uproszczenie zdań dzięki Deep Reinforcement Learning', 'ro': 'Simplificarea sentințelor prin învățarea profundă a consolidării', 'sr': 'Jednostavno rečenje sa učenjem dubokog pojačanja', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සාමාන්\u200dයය සඳහා ගොඩක් විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'so': 'Heshiiska waxbarashada Deg-Deg', 'sv': 'Förenkling av meningar med djupförstärkt lärande', 'ur': 'سنت سادگی سیکھنے کے ساتھ', 'ta': 'வாக்குறுப்பு ஆழமான பின்னணி கற்றுக்கொண்டு சுலபமாக்கம்', 'uz': 'Sentence Simplification with Deep Reinforcement Learning', 'vi': 'Đơn giản hóa bản án với giáo dục sâu', 'bg': 'Опростяване на изреченията с задълбочено обучение', 'nl': 'Vereenvoudiging van zinnen met Deep Reinforcement Learning', 'hr': 'Jednostavanje kazne sa učenjem dubokog pojačanja', 'da': 'Forenkling af sætninger med dyb forstærkning af læring', 'de': 'Satzvereinfachung mit Deep Reinforcement Learning', 'id': 'Persederhanaan hukuman dengan Pembelajaran Perkuatan Tepat', 'ko': '문장 간소화와 깊이 강화 학습', 'fa': 'ساده\u200cسازی کلمه با یادگیری عمیق', 'sw': 'Hukumu kwa Ufumbuzi wa Kingi', 'sq': 'Simplifikimi i dënimeve me mësimin e thellë të forcimit', 'tr': 'Sözler Derin Küçleme Öwrenmek bilen Basitlendirme', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Պատասխանների պարզաբանությունը խորը ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրությամբ', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'গভীর পুনঃসংস্কার শিক্ষার সাথে শাস্তি সহজ করো', 'bs': 'Jednostavno kazne sa učenjem dubokog pojačanja', 'ca': 'Simplificació de sentences amb aprenentatge profund de reforç', 'cs': 'Zjednodušení věty pomocí hlubokého posilování učení', 'et': 'Lause lihtsustamine sügava tugevdamise õppega', 'af': 'Soektog Vereenvoudiging met Deep Versterking Leer', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden yksinkertaistaminen syventävällä oppimisella', 'jv': 'Simplification', 'he': 'הפשטת גזרה עם לימוד חיבור עמוק', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'Poenostavitev stavkov s poglobljenim učenjem', 'bo': 'Sentence Simplification with Deep Reinforcement Learning'}
{'en': 'Sentence simplification aims to make sentences easier to read and understand. Most recent approaches draw on insights from machine translation to learn simplification rewrites from monolingual corpora of complex and simple sentences. We address the simplification problem with an encoder-decoder model coupled with a deep reinforcement learning framework. Our model, which we call DRESS (as shorthand for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explores the space of possible simplifications while learning to optimize a reward function that encourages outputs which are simple, fluent, and preserve the meaning of the input. Experiments on three datasets demonstrate that our model outperforms competitive simplification systems.Deep\n      REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explores the space of possible\n      simplifications while learning to optimize a reward function that\n      encourages outputs which are simple, fluent, and preserve the meaning of\n      the input. Experiments on three datasets demonstrate that our model\n      outperforms competitive simplification systems.\n    ', 'es': 'La simplificación de oraciones tiene como objetivo facilitar la lectura y la comprensión de las oraciones. Los enfoques más recientes se basan en los conocimientos de la traducción automática para aprender a simplificar las reescrituras a partir de corpus monolingües de oraciones complejas y simples. Abordamos el problema de simplificación con un modelo de codificador-decodificador junto con un marco de aprendizaje de refuerzo profundo. Nuestro modelo, que llamamos DRESS (abreviatura de Simplificación de Sentencias de Refuerzo Profundo), explora el espacio de posibles simplificaciones mientras aprende a optimizar una función de recompensa que fomenta las salidas que son simples, fluidas y preservan el significado de la entrada. Los experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos demuestran que nuestro modelo supera a los sistemas de simplificación de la competencia.', 'pt': 'A simplificação de frases visa tornar as frases mais fáceis de ler e entender. As abordagens mais recentes baseiam-se em insights da tradução automática para aprender reescritas de simplificação de corpora monolíngues de frases simples e complexas. Abordamos o problema de simplificação com um modelo codificador-decodificador acoplado a uma estrutura de aprendizado por reforço profundo. Nosso modelo, que chamamos de DRESS (abreviação de Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explora o espaço de possíveis simplificações enquanto aprende a otimizar uma função de recompensa que incentiva saídas simples, fluentes e preservam o significado da entrada. Experimentos em três conjuntos de dados demonstram que nosso modelo supera os sistemas de simplificação competitivos.', 'ar': 'يهدف تبسيط الجمل إلى تسهيل قراءة الجمل وفهمها. تعتمد معظم الأساليب الحديثة على رؤى من الترجمة الآلية لتعلم إعادة كتابة التبسيط من مجموعة أحادية اللغة من الجمل المعقدة والبسيطة. نعالج مشكلة التبسيط من خلال نموذج وحدة فك التشفير مقترنًا بإطار عمل تعليمي معزز عميق. يستكشف نموذجنا ، الذي نسميه DRESS (كاختصار لتبسيط جملة التعزيز العميق) ، مساحة التبسيط الممكنة أثناء تعلم تحسين وظيفة المكافأة التي تشجع المخرجات التي تكون بسيطة وطلاقة وتحافظ على معنى المدخلات. توضح التجارب على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على أنظمة التبسيط التنافسية.', 'fr': "La simplification des phrases vise à faciliter la lecture et la compréhension des phrases. Les approches les plus récentes s'appuient sur les connaissances de la traduction automatique pour apprendre les réécritures simplifiées à partir de corpus monolingues de phrases complexes et simples. Nous abordons le problème de la simplification avec un modèle encodeur-décodeur couplé à un cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement profond. Notre modèle, que nous appelons DRESS (en tant que raccourci pour Deep Reinforcement Sentence Simplification), explore l'espace des simplifications possibles tout en apprenant à optimiser une fonction de récompense qui encourage des sorties simples, fluides et préservant le sens de l'entrée. Des expériences sur trois ensembles de données démontrent que notre modèle surpasse les systèmes de simplification concurrents.", 'ja': '文章の簡略化は、文章を読みやすく理解しやすくすることを目的としている。ほとんどの最近のアプローチは、機械翻訳からの洞察を活用して、複雑で単純な文章の単語帳からの簡略化書き換えを学習しています。深層強化学習フレームワークと組み合わせたエンコーダデコーダモデルで、単純化の問題に対処します。DRESS （ Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplificationの略）と呼ばれる当社のモデルは、シンプルで流暢な出力を奨励し、入力の意味を維持する報酬関数を最適化することを学びながら、可能な単純化の空間を探求しています。3つのデータセットでの実験は、当社のモデルが競争力のある単純化システムよりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '句简意易读。。 近法皆用机器翻译见,从杂句单语语料库中学简重写。 吾以编码器- 解码器形,与深化学框架合而决之。 吾之模形,吾谓之DRESS(为Deep REinforcement简之简写),探其可虚,而学优化奖函数,劝其约,流其输,存其义。 三数之实验,优于竞争性简。', 'hi': 'वाक्य सरलीकरण का उद्देश्य वाक्यों को पढ़ने और समझने में आसान बनाना है। सबसे हाल के दृष्टिकोण मशीन अनुवाद से अंतर्दृष्टि पर आकर्षित करने के लिए जटिल और सरल वाक्यों के मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट से सरलीकरण फिर से लिखना सीखते हैं। हम एक गहरी सुदृढीकरण सीखने के ढांचे के साथ युग्मित एक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल के साथ सरलीकरण समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल, जिसे हम ड्रेस कहते हैं (डीप रेनफोर्समेंट वाक्य सरलीकरण के लिए शॉर्टहैंड के रूप में), एक इनाम समारोह को अनुकूलित करने के लिए सीखने के दौरान संभावित सरलीकरण के स्थान की पड़ताल करता है जो आउटपुट को प्रोत्साहित करता है जो सरल, धाराप्रवाह हैं, और इनपुट के अर्थ को संरक्षित करते हैं। तीन डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल प्रतिस्पर्धी सरलीकरण प्रणालियों को बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Упрощение предложений призвано облегчить их чтение и понимание. Самые последние подходы опираются на идеи из машинного перевода, чтобы узнать, как упрощение переписывает из моноязычных корпусов сложных и простых предложений. Мы решаем проблему упрощения с помощью модели кодер-декодер в сочетании с системой обучения с глубоким армированием. Наша модель, которую мы называем DRESS (как сокращение от Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), исследует пространство возможных упрощений, учась оптимизировать функцию вознаграждения, которая поощряет выходы, которые просты, свободны и сохраняют значение входных данных. Эксперименты с тремя наборами данных показывают, что наша модель превосходит конкурентоспособные системы упрощения.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag simpliú abairtí abairtí a dhéanamh níos éasca le léamh agus le tuiscint. Tarraingíonn na cineálacha cur chuige is déanaí ar léargais ó mheaisín-aistriúchán chun simpliú a athscríobh ó chorpra aonteangach d’abairtí casta agus simplí a fhoghlaim. Tugaimid aghaidh ar fhadhb an tsimpliúcháin le samhail ionchódóra-díchódóra mar aon le creat foghlama treisithe domhain. Scrúdaíonn ár múnla, ar a dtugaimid DRESS (mar ghearrscannán do Shimpliú Pianbhreithe Deep REinforcement Simpliú), an spás ina bhfuil simplithe féideartha agus ag foghlaim conas feidhm luach saothair a bharrfheabhsú a spreagann aschuir atá simplí, líofa, agus a chaomhnaíonn brí an ionchuir. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí go sáraíonn ár samhail córais iomaíochais simplithe.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების განსახულება უფრო მარტივის შესაძლებელია, რომ სიტყვები უფრო მარტივის გაკითხვა და გავიგოთ. საბოლოოდ შემდეგ მიღება მაქინის გარგულისხმების შესაძლებლობად მონოლენგური კოპორაზე კომპლექსიკური და მარტივი სიტყვების გარგულისხმების შესახებ. ჩვენ განხორციელება პრობლემა, რომელიც კოდირების მოდელისთვის, რომელიც კოდირების მოდელისთვის დაკავშირებულია ძალიან სწავლების ფრამეტრისთვის. ჩვენი მოდელ, რომელიც ჩვენ მივუხედავთ DRESS (როგორც ძალიან ძალიან გადაწყვეტილებელი სიტყვებისთვის) შესაძლებელი გადაწყვეტილებების სივრცე განსხვავებს, როდესაც სწავლობენ დააკეთებელი ფუნქცია, რომელიც უფრო მხო სამი მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი კონკრენტებური განხორციების სისტემებს გაუკეთებს.', 'hu': 'A mondatok egyszerűsítése célja, hogy könnyebben olvashatóvá és érthetővé tegye a mondatokat. A legújabb megközelítések a gépi fordításból származó betekintésekre támaszkodnak, hogy megtanulják az egyszerűsítő újraírásokat a komplex és egyszerű mondatok egynyelvű korpuszaiból. Az egyszerűsítési problémát egy útmérő-dekódoló modell és egy mély megerősítésű tanulási keretrendszer segítségével kezeljük. Modellünk, amelyet DRESS-nek hívunk (mint a Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification rövidírása), feltárja a lehetséges egyszerűsítések terét, miközben megtanulja optimalizálni a jutalomfüggvényt, amely ösztönzi az egyszerű, folyékony kimeneteket, és megőrzi a bemenet jelentését. Három adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja a versenyképes egyszerűsítési rendszereket.', 'it': "La semplificazione delle frasi mira a rendere le frasi più facili da leggere e capire. Gli approcci più recenti si basano sulle intuizioni della traduzione automatica per imparare le riscritture di semplificazione da corpora monolingue di frasi complesse e semplici. Affrontiamo il problema della semplificazione con un modello encoder-decoder accoppiato con un framework di apprendimento di rinforzo profondo. Il nostro modello, che chiamiamo DRESS (abbreviazione di Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), esplora lo spazio di possibili semplificazioni imparando ad ottimizzare una funzione di ricompensa che incoraggia output semplici, fluenti e preserva il significato dell'input. Esperimenti su tre set di dati dimostrano che il nostro modello supera i sistemi di semplificazione competitivi.", 'kk': 'Сөздерді қарапайым, сөздерді оқу және түсінуге оңай қылу мақсаты. Ең жаңа жағдайлар комплекс және қарапайым сөздердің бірлілік корпорасынан қарапайым жазуларын оқыту үшін машинаның аудармасынан түсініктерді көрсетеді. Біз кодер декодер үлгісімен біріктірілген қарапайым мәселесін жасаймыз. Біздің DRESS деген үлгіміз (қарапайым REinforcement sentence Simplification үшін қысқартылық) деп аталатын үлгісіміз, қарапайым, жылдамдық және кіріс мазмұнын сақтау үшін оқыту мүмкін қарапайымдарының орынын зерттейді. Үш деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелер үлгіміздің бағыттау жүйелерін орындайды.', 'el': 'Η απλοποίηση των προτάσεων έχει ως στόχο να κάνει τις προτάσεις πιο ευανάγνωστες και κατανοητές. Οι πιο πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις βασίζονται σε γνώσεις από τη μηχανική μετάφραση για να μάθουν απλοποιήσεις από μονογλωσσικά σώματα σύνθετων και απλών προτάσεων. Αντιμετωπίζουμε το πρόβλημα απλοποίησης με ένα μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή σε συνδυασμό με ένα πλαίσιο μάθησης βαθιάς ενίσχυσης. Το μοντέλο μας, το οποίο ονομάζουμε ως συντομογραφία για την απλοποίηση της πρότασης βαθιάς ενίσχυσης, εξερευνά το χώρο των πιθανών απλοποιήσεων ενώ μαθαίνει να βελτιστοποιεί μια λειτουργία ανταμοιβής που ενθαρρύνει τα αποτελέσματα που είναι απλά, άπταιστα και διατηρούν το νόημα της εισαγωγής. Τα πειράματα σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα ανταγωνιστικά συστήματα απλοποίησης.', 'ms': 'Permudahan perkataan bermaksud untuk membuat perkataan lebih mudah dibaca dan memahami. Pendekatan terbaru menggunakan pandangan dari terjemahan mesin untuk belajar tulisan semula pemudahan dari korpra monobahasa kalimat kompleks dan sederhana. Kami mengatasi masalah pemudahan dengan model pengekod-pengekod yang ditambah dengan kerangka pembelajaran kuasa kuasa. Model kami, yang kami panggil DRESS (sebagai pendek untuk Simplifikasi Hukuman Ulangkuasa Dalam Dalam), mengeksplorasi ruang kemungkinan pemudahan sementara belajar untuk optimize fungsi hadiah yang mendorong output yang mudah, mudah, dan menyimpan makna input. Eksperimen pada tiga set data menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui sistem pemudahan kompetitif.', 'mt': 'Is-simplifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi għandha l-għan li tagħmel is-sentenzi aktar faċli biex jinqraw u jinftiehmu. L-approċċi l-aktar riċenti huma bbażati fuq l-għarfien mit-traduzzjoni tal-magni biex jitgħallmu l-kitbiet mill-ġdid tas-simplifikazzjoni minn korpura monolingwi ta’ sentenzi kumplessi u sempliċi. Aħna nindirizzaw il-problem a tas-simplifikazzjoni b’mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder flimkien ma’ qafas ta’ tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar profond. Our model, which we call DRESS (as shorthand for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explores the space of possible simplifications while learning to optimize a reward function that encourages outputs which are simple, fluent, and preserve the meaning of the input.  L-esperimenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa akbar minn sistemi ta’ simplifikazzjoni kompetittiva.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d വായിക്കുകയും മനസ്സിലാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ശിക്ഷ ലളിതമാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തിടെയുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കണ്ണുപിടിക്കുന്ന കണ്ണുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും എളുപ്പമുള്ള നമ്മള്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള പ്രശ്നം സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലിനെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ആഴത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡ്രെയിസ് എന്ന് വിളിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d (ആഴത്തെ വിധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ചെറുതായി വിധിക്കുന്നതിനായി), സാധ്യതകളുടെ സ്ഥലം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതിഫല പ്രവര്\u200dത് മൂന്നു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള എളുപ്പമുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തി', 'mn': 'Үүний хялбарчлал нь өгүүлбэрийг уншиж, ойлгох амархан болгох зорилго юм. Хамгийн сүүлийн арга баримтууд машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын ойлголтыг нэг хэл хэлний корпоратаас дахин хөгжүүлэх болон энгийн өгүүлбэрүүдийн тухай ойлголтыг сурах болно. Бид кодлогч-онгоцлогч загвартай холбогдсон энгийн асуудлыг шийдвэрлэхэд тусалдаг. Бидний DRESS гэж нэрлэдэг загвар (гүн гүнзгий REinforcement Sentence Simplification гэх зэрэг богино гар) нь боломжтой хялбарчлалтын орон зайг судалдаг. Харин шагналын функцийг сайжруулахын тулд энгийн, шингэн үр дүнг дэмжиж, өгөгдлийн утгыг хадгалдаг. Гурван өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн туршилтууд бидний загвар нь өрсөлдөөний хялбарчлалын системээс илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Førehandsvising av setningar mål gjera setningar enklare å lesa og forstå. Dei nyeste tilnærmingane teiknar på innsyningar frå maskineoversettelse for å lære omskrivinga frå monospråk korpora av komplekse og enkle setningar. Vi adresserer problem med enkoder- dekodermodellen kopla med eit dyp forstørringsframmeverk. Modellen vårt, som vi kallar DRESS (som kort hjelp for dømt REinforcement Sentence Simplification), utforskar mellomrom av moglege forenklingar mens vi lærer å optimalisera eit rekkefunksjon som oppfordrer utdata som er enkelt, fluent og beholder meningen til inndata. Eksperimentar på tre datasett viser at modellen vårt utfører konkurrentiv forenklingssystemer.', 'mk': 'Sentence simplification aims to make sentences easier to read and understand.  Најпоследните пристапи се користат од информации од машински превод за да се научи препишување на едноставноста од монојазични корпора на сложени и едноставни реченици. Ние го решаваме проблемот со едноставувањето со модел на кодер-декодирање, заедно со длабока рамка за зајакнување на учењето. Our model, which we call DRESS (as shorthand for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explores the space of possible simplifications while learning to optimize a reward function that encourages outputs which are simple, fluent, and preserve the meaning of the input.  Experiments on three datasets demonstrate that our model outperforms competitive simplification systems.', 'pl': 'Uproszczenie zdań ma na celu ułatwienie czytania i zrozumienia zdań. Najnowsze podejścia opierają się na spostrzeżeniach z tłumaczenia maszynowego, aby nauczyć się przepisów uproszczeń z jednojęzycznych korpusów złożonych i prostych zdań. Problem uproszczenia rozwiązujemy za pomocą modelu kodera-dekodera w połączeniu z ramą uczenia się głębokiego wzmocnienia. Nasz model, który nazywamy DRESS (skrót głębokiego uproszczenia zdań REinforcement), bada przestrzeń możliwych uproszczeń, ucząc się optymalizacji funkcji nagrody, która zachęca do wyjść, które są proste, płynne i zachowują znaczenie wejścia. Eksperymenty na trzech zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa konkurencyjne systemy uproszczenia.', 'si': 'වාක්ය සරලීකරණය අදහස් කරනවා වචනය කියලා තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් කරන්න. ගොඩක් අලුත් අවස්ථාවක් පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න යන්ත්\u200dර පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් පරී අපි සාමාන්\u200dයය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා එන්කෝඩර්-ඩිකෝඩර් මෝඩෙල් එක්ක ගොඩක් උපකාරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග සම අපේ මොඩේල්, අපි DRESS කියනවා කියලා (Deep REInforment Sentence සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා කොටස් විදියට), පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළ දත්ත සැටි තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති කියලා.', 'sr': 'Jednostavna rečenica je cilj da olakša rečenice da čitaju i razumeju. Najskoriji pristupi nacrtaju na uvid od prevoda mašine kako bi naučili prepisanje jednojezičkog tela složenih i jednostavnih rečenica. Mi rješavamo problem pojednostavljanja sa modelom kodera povezanim sa dubokim okvirom učenja za pojačanje. Naš model, koji zovemo DRESS (kao kratka ruka za jednostavljenje dubokog kazne o povlačenju, istražuje prostor mogućih pojednostavljanja dok učimo optimizirati funkciju nagrade koja poticava ishode koje su jednostavne, tekuće i sačuvaju smisao unosa. Eksperimenti na tri seta podataka pokazuju da naš model iznosi konkurentne sisteme pojednostavljanja.', 'lt': 'Sprendimų supaprastinimo tikslas – lengviau skaityti ir suprasti sakinius. Naujausi metodai grindžiami žiniomis, gautomis iš mašininio vertimo, siekiant išmokti supaprastinimo perrašymus iš sudėtingų ir paprastų sakinių vienakalbių korporų. Mes sprendžiame supaprastinimo problem ą naudojant kodavimo kodavimo model į ir gilią mokymosi stiprinimo sistemą. Mūsų modelis, kurį vadiname DRESS (kaip nuodugnio atgaivinimo bausmės supaprastinimo trumpą laiką), nagrinėja galimybių supaprastinimo erdvę ir mokosi optimizuoti atlyginimo funkciją, skatinančią paprastus, lankstus rezultatus ir išsaugojančią įvedimo reikšmę. Trijų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis atitinka konkurencinio supaprastinimo sistemas.', 'so': 'Heshiiska waxaa loola jeedaa in uu si fudud u dhigo erayada la akhriyo oo la garto. Dhaqdhaqaaqyada ugu dambeeyay waxay ka soo saaraan aragtida tarjumaadda machine si ay u barto fududnimada oo ay uga qoraan shirkadda noocyada afka ah oo adag oo fudud. Dhibaatada fududaanka waxaynu kula macaamiloonaa model codcodsiga oo la xiriiray qalabka waxbarashada aad u dheer. Tusaale ahaan aan ugu magacaabno DRESS (sida gaaban u fududeynta xukunka Deep-RESS), wuxuu baaraandegayaa meelaha fudud oo suurtagalka ah, marka lagu barto si aad u bedeshaan shaqo mushaar ah oo ku dhiirrigeliya soo bixinta sahlan, islamarkaasna ilaalinaya micnaha input. Imtixaanka saddexda databaset waxay muujiyaan in modelkeenu uu ka muujiyo nidaamka fududaada oo iskutallada ah.', 'sv': 'Syftet med förenkling av meningar är att göra meningar lättare att läsa och förstå. De senaste metoderna bygger på insikter från maskinöversättning för att lära sig förenklade omskrivningar från enspråkiga korpor av komplexa och enkla meningar. Vi tar itu med förenklingsproblemet med en encoder-avkodarmodell tillsammans med ett djupförstärkt lärramverk. Vår modell, som vi kallar DRESS (som förkortning för Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), utforskar utrymmet för möjliga förenklingar samtidigt som vi lär oss att optimera en belöningsfunktion som uppmuntrar resultat som är enkla, flytande och bevarar innebörden av indata. Experiment på tre datauppsättningar visar att vår modell överträffar konkurrenskraftiga förenklingssystem.', 'ur': 'فیصلہ سادگی کا ارادہ ہے کہ کلمات کو پڑھنے اور سمجھنے کے لئے آسان بنانے کا۔ اگلوں سے اگلے طریقے سے مشین کی ترجمہ سے بصیرت کے ذریعے پیچیدہ اور ساده جماعتوں کی ایک زبان کی جگہ سے سادھایا جاتا ہے۔ ہم ایک کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل کے ساتھ ساده مشکل کے بارے میں مشکل کریں گے جو ایک عمیق افزایش کی تعلیم فرمود کے ساتھ ملی ہے. ہماری مدل، جسے ہم DRESS (Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification کے لئے کوتاہ ہاتھ) کہتے ہیں، ممکن simplifications کی جگہ پھیر رہے ہیں اور ایک اجرت فناوری کے مطابق مطابق سکھاتے ہیں جو اجرت کے مطابق آسان، روشن، اور اطلاعات کا معنی حفاظت کرتا ہے. تین ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل مہربانی سازونی سیستموں سے زیادہ کام کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம் எளிமைப்படுத்தல் வாக்கியங்களை படித்து புரிந்து கொள்ள எளிதாக்க வேண்டும். அண்மையில் பெரும்பாலான நெருங்குகள் கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பிலிருந்து பார்வைகளை வரையும் சிக்கலான மற்றும் எளிதான வாக் நாம் எளிதாக்கும் பிரச்சனையை குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரியில் குறியீட்டாளர் முறைமையை முடிவு செய்கிறோம். அது ஆ எங்கள் மாதிரி, அதை நாம் DRESS என்று அழைக்கிறோம் (ஆழமான பின்னணி சுருக்கமாக) சாத்தியமான எளிதாக்கத்திற்கான இடைவெளியை தேடுகிறது, இது சுலபமான, தூண்டும் வெளியீடுகளை பாத மூன்று தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் நமது மாதிரி பொருத்தமான எளிதாக்கல் அமைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'ro': 'Simplificarea propozițiilor urmărește să facă propozițiile mai ușor de citit și de înțeles. Cele mai recente abordări se bazează pe perspective din traducerea automată pentru a învăța rescrierea simplificării din corpuri monolingve de propoziții complexe și simple. Abordăm problema simplificării cu un model codificator-decodor cuplat cu un cadru de învățare profund de armare. Modelul nostru, pe care îl numim DRESS (ca prescurtare pentru Simplificarea Sentinței Deep REinforcement), explorează spațiul posibilelor simplificări în timp ce învățăm să optimizăm o funcție de recompensă care încurajează rezultatele care sunt simple, fluente și păstrează sensul intrării. Experimentele efectuate pe trei seturi de date demonstrează că modelul nostru depășește performanțele sistemelor de simplificare competitive.', 'uz': "Sensorning oddiylashtirish so'zlarni oʻqish va tushunishga oson qilishi mumkin. Yaqinda ko'pchilik murakkab va oddiy so'zlardan foydalanish uchun oddiylikni o'rganish uchun mashina tarjimalaridan ko'rinishni chiqaradi. Biz oddiylik muammolarni kodlash modeli bilan boshqaramiz va o'rganish chegarasini juda oshirish mumkin. Biz DRESS deb nomlanamiz modelimiz (Deep RESS soddalashtirish uchun qisqarli qisqa) oddiy holatni aniqlaydi va oddiy, saqlash va kiritish imkoniyatini saqlash mumkin. Uch maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi imtiyozlar modelimiz murakkab soddalash tizimini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Đơn giản hình phạt nhằm làm câu án dễ đọc và hiểu hơn. Cách tiếp cận gần đây nhất dựa trên hiểu biết từ bản dịch cỗ máy để học sự đơn giản viết lại bằng một chữ viết bằng ngôn ngữ phức tạp và đơn giản. Chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề đơn giản bằng một mô hình mã hóa, kết hợp với một hệ thống học củng cố sâu. Cách chúng tôi gọi là Công Tước Mật (như một dạng ngắn cho đơn giản đơn giản đơn giản đơn giản đơn đơn giản hóa cảm xúc sâu sắc), khám phá các khoảng trống của sự đơn giản và học cách tối ưu hóa chức năng phần thưởng, khuyến khích các kết xuất đơn giản, thông thạo, và bảo tồn ý nghĩa của nội dung. Thí nghiệm trên ba tập tin cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta hoàn thiện hệ thống mô-tô cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Опростяването на изреченията цели да направи изреченията по-лесни за четене и разбиране. Най-новите подходи се възползват от прозрения от машинния превод, за да научат опростяване на пренаписванията от едноезични корпуси на сложни и прости изречения. Ние решаваме проблема с опростяването с модел на кодер-декодер, съчетан с рамка за дълбоко укрепване на обучението. Нашият модел, който наричаме опростяване на присъдата, изследва пространството на възможните опростявания, докато се учи да оптимизира функция за възнаграждение, която насърчава изходите, които са прости, плавни и запазват смисъла на входа. Експериментите върху три набора от данни показват, че нашият модел надминава конкурентните системи за опростяване.', 'hr': 'Jednostavna kazna cilja je lakše pročitati i razumjeti rečenice. Najskoriji pristupi nacrtaju na uvid iz prevoda strojeva kako bi naučili prepisanje jednojezičkog tijela složenih i jednostavnih rečenica. Mi rješavamo problem pojednostavljanja s modelom kodera-dekodera povezanom s dubokim okvirom učenja za pojačanje. Naš model, koji zovemo DRESS (kao kratko za pojednostavljenje dubokog kazne za povlačenje kazne o povlačenju), istražuje prostor mogućih pojednostavljanja dok učimo optimizirati funkciju nagrade koja poticava ishode koje su jednostavne, tekuće i čuvaju smisao ulaza. Eksperimenti na tri podataka pokazuju da naš model iznosi konkurentne sustave pojednostavljanja.', 'nl': 'Zinnvereenvoudiging is bedoeld om zinnen gemakkelijker te lezen en te begrijpen. De meest recente benaderingen maken gebruik van inzichten uit machinevertaling om vereenvoudigingsherschrijvingen te leren van eentalige corpora van complexe en eenvoudige zinnen. We pakken het vereenvoudigingsprobleem aan met een encoder-decoder model gekoppeld aan een deep versterking learning framework. Ons model, dat we DRESS noemen (als afkorting voor Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), verkent de ruimte van mogelijke vereenvoudigingen terwijl we leren om een beloningsfunctie te optimaliseren die outputs aanmoedigt die eenvoudig, vloeiend zijn en de betekenis van de input behouden. Experimenten op drie datasets tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan concurrerende vereenvoudigingssystemen.', 'da': 'Formålet med forenkling af sætninger er at gøre sætninger lettere at læse og forstå. De seneste tilgange trækker på indsigt fra maskinoversættelse for at lære forenklingsomskrivelser fra ensprogede korpora af komplekse og enkle sætninger. Vi løser forenklingsproblemet med en encoder-dekoder model kombineret med en dyb forstærkning læringsramme. Vores model, som vi kalder DRESS (som forkortelse for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), undersøger mulighederne for forenklinger, mens vi lærer at optimere en belønningsfunktion, der fremmer output, der er enkle, flydende og bevarer betydningen af input. Eksperimenter med tre datasæt viser, at vores model overgår konkurrencedygtige forenklingssystemer.', 'de': 'Die Vereinfachung von Sätzen soll Sätze leichter lesbar und verständlich machen. Die neuesten Ansätze stützen sich auf Erkenntnisse aus der maschinellen Übersetzung, um vereinfachte Umschreibungen aus einsprachigen Korpora komplexer und einfacher Sätze zu erlernen. Wir adressieren das Vereinfachungsproblem mit einem Encoder-Decoder-Modell gekoppelt mit einem Deep Enforcement Learning Framework. Unser Modell, das wir DRESS nennen (als Abkürzung für Deep REinforcement Satence Simplification), erforscht den Raum möglicher Vereinfachungen und lernt, eine Belohnungsfunktion zu optimieren, die einfache, fließende Ergebnisse fördert und die Bedeutung der Eingabe bewahrt. Experimente an drei Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Modell wettbewerbsfähige Vereinfachungssysteme übertrifft.', 'id': 'Penyederhanaan hukuman bermaksud membuat kalimat lebih mudah dibaca dan mengerti. Pendekatan terbaru menggunakan pandangan dari terjemahan mesin untuk belajar penyimplifikasi tulisan ulang dari korpora monobahasa kalimat kompleks dan sederhana. Kami mengatasi masalah penyimplifikasi dengan model kode-dekoder tergabung dengan cadangan belajar pemkuatan dalam. Our model, which we call DRESS (as shorthand for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explores the space of possible simplifications while learning to optimize a reward function that encourages outputs which are simple, fluent, and preserve the meaning of the input.  Eksperimen pada tiga set data menunjukkan bahwa model kita lebih berharga dari sistem penyimplifikasi kompetitif.', 'ko': '문장을 간소화하는 목적은 문장을 더욱 쉽게 읽고 이해하게 하는 것이다.최신 방법은 기계 번역의 관점을 참고하여 복잡하고 간단한 문장의 단어 자료 라이브러리에서 간단하게 다시 쓰는 것을 배웠다.우리는 인코더 - 디코더 모델과 깊이 있는 학습 프레임워크로 간소화 문제를 해결한다.DRESS(문장의 간소화를 깊이 있게 강화하는 줄임말)라고 불리는 모델은 가능한 간소화 공간을 탐색하고 보상 함수를 최적화하는 것을 배우며 간단하고 유창한 출력을 장려하고 입력의 의미를 보존한다.세 개의 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리의 모델이 경쟁적인 간소화 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'fa': 'ساده\u200cسازی کلمه\u200cها هدف می\u200cدهد که جمله\u200cها را برای خواندن و درک آسان سازی کند. نزدیکترین روش\u200cهای تازه روی مشاهده\u200cها از ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین می\u200cکشند تا نوشته\u200cهای ساده\u200cسازی را از شرکت یک زبان از جمله\u200cهای پیچیده و ساده یاد بگیرند. ما مشکل ساده\u200cسازی را با یک مدل رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری با یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها مدل ما، که ما به نام DRESS (به عنوان کوتاه\u200cای برای ساده\u200cسازی sentences deep REinforcement Simplification) می\u200cگوییم، فضای ساده\u200cسازی\u200cهای ممکن را در حالی که یاد می\u200cگیریم تا عملکرد پاداش را بهترین کنیم که نتیجه\u200cهای ساده، آسان و حفظ معنی ورودی را تشویق می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهای سه مجموعه داده\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما سیستم\u200cهای ساده\u200cسازی مسابقه\u200cی مسابقه\u200cای را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Ukurahisi wa hukumu unalenga kufanya sentensi rahisi kusoma na kuelewa. Matokeo ya hivi karibuni yanavuta macho yanayotokana na tafsiri ya mashine ili kujifunza urahisi unaoandikwa tena kutoka makampuni ya lugha ya kiuchumi na sentensi rahisi. Tunaongelea tatizo la urahisi na mtindo wa kodi unaoanganishwa na mfumo wa kujifunza. Mfano wetu, ambao tunaiita DRESS (kama fupi kwa ajili ya Ufumbuzi wa Hukumu ya Kideep), unatafuta nafasi ya uwezekano wa urahisi wakati wanajifunza kuboresha kazi ya malipo ambayo inahamasisha matokeo ambayo ni rahisi, yenye mafanikio, na kuhifadhi maana ya input. Experiments on three datasets demonstrate that our model outperforms competitive simplification systems.', 'tr': 'Sözleriň esaslaryny okamak we düşünmegi aňsatlaşdyrmak maksady. Eň soňky ýakynlaşyklar maşynyň terjimesinden, karmaşık we ýeňil sözleriniň ýene-den diňe ýerleşmägi öwrenmek üçin masynyň terjimesini çekýärler. Biz esaslaşdyrma meseleni koder-koder modeli bilen derin bir güçlendirmek üçin çykýarys. DRESS diýilip atlandyrýan nusgasymyz (derin REinforcement Sentence Basitleştirmek üçin gysga elimizde), mümkin basitleştirmeler üçin bir täsirli funksiýany optimizlemek üçin öwrenýän, basit, akyl we girişiň maksadyny goramak üçin mektuplaryň ýerini keşfetýär. Üç veri setirinde örän barlag nusgasymyz döwletleşdirýän basitleşdirim sistemalaryny çykarýar.', 'af': "Soektog eenvoudiging doel doen om sê makliker te maak om te lees en te verstaan. Mees onlangse toegang teken op inligtings van masjien vertaling om eenvoudiging te leer herskrifte van monolingse korpora van komplekse en eenvoudige setings. Ons adres die eenvoudiging probleem met 'n enkoder-dekoder model saamgekoppel met 'n diep versterking leer raamwerk. Ons model, wat ons noem DRESS (as kortpad vir Deep Verwysing Sentence Vereenvoudiging), ondersoek die ruimte van moontlike eenvoudiginge terwyl ons leer om 'n vergelde funksie te optimaliseer wat uitvoerings versterk wat eenvoudig, fluent is en die betekenis van die invoer bewaar. Eksperimente op drie datastelle bevestig dat ons model uitvoer mededingste eenvoudigingsstelsels.", 'sq': 'Simplifikimi i dënimeve synon të bëjë fjalët më të lehta për të lexuar dhe kuptuar. Përqafimet më të fundit mbështeten në kuptimet nga përkthimi i makinave për të mësuar rithkrimin e thjeshtësimit nga korpra monogjuhësore me fjalime komplekse dhe të thjeshta. Ne trajtojmë problemin e thjeshtësimit me një model kodues-dekoder të bashkuar me një kuadër mësimi të thellë forcimi. Modeli ynë, i cili ne e quajmë DRESS (si shkurt për Simplifikimin e Dënimeve të Riforcimit të thellë), eksploron hapësirën e thjeshtimeve të mundshme ndërsa mësojmë për të optimizuar një funksion shpërblimi që inkurajon daljet që janë të thjeshta, të fluente dhe ruajnë kuptimin e hyrjes. Eksperimentet në tre grupe të dhënash tregojnë se modeli ynë është më i mirë se sistemi konkurrues i thjeshtimit.', 'am': 'የፍርድ ቀላል ቃላትን ለማንበብና ለማስተዋል ማቅረብ ይችላል፡፡ የቀድሞው ግንኙነት ከሞክራዊ ትርጓሜ የተለየ ውይይቶችን ለመማር ከሞሎልጋዊ ኮርፖርት የተቃውሞ እና ቀላል ቃላት ተቃውሞ ይጽፋል፡፡ የድምፅ ቀላል ስህተት ከሆድ ዶላር ጋር በተጨማሪው ትምህርት ፍሬማር ጋር ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ ድሬስ (ለጥልቅ ቀላል የሥርዓት ቀላል መጠን) የምንጠራው ሞዴላታችን፣ ቀላል፣ የውጤት ውጤት እንዲያበረክት የሚችሉትን የዋጋ ስርዓት ማድረግ እና የግንኙነቱን ማድረግ የሚችሉትን የአስቸጋሪነት ስርዓት መፍጠርን ይፈልጋል፡፡ በሦስት ዳታተር ፈተናዎች ሞዴሌዎቻችን የፍላጎት ቀላል ስብስብ እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Պատասխանների պարզեցման նպատակն է դարձնել նախադասությունները ավելի հեշտ կարդալ և հասկանալ: Վերջին մոտեցումները հիմնված են մեքենայի թարգմանությունից եզրակացությունների վրա, որպեսզի սովորեն պարզաբանելու վերագրություններ բարդ և պարզ նախադասությունների միալեզվով մարմնից: Մենք լուծում ենք պարզաբանության խնդիրը կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելի հետ, միասին խորը ուժեղացման ուսուցման շրջանակի հետ: Մեր մոդելը, որը մենք անվանում ենք "Դրեսս" (որպես խորը վերաինֆորմացիոն զգացմունքների պարզաբանման կարճ), ուսումնասիրում է հնարավոր պարզաբանությունների տարածքը, մինչ սովորում է օպտիմացնել վարձի ֆունկցիան, որը խրախուսում է պարզ, հեշտ արտադրանքներ և պահպանում է ներմուծի Երեք տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է մրցակցության պարզեցման համակարգերը:', 'az': 'Sözünü basitləşdirmək cümlələri oxumaq və anlamaq üçün asanlaşdırmaq istəyir. Ən son tərzlərin maşın çevirindən öyrənmək üçün, kompleks və basit sözlərin monodil korporasından basitləşdirilmiş tərzlərini öyrənmək üçün maşın tərzlərindən öyrənir. Biz koder-dekoder modeli ilə birlikdə çətinlikləmə öyrənmə qurğusu ilə birliklənmiş çətinlikləmə problemini çəkirik. Bizim modelimiz DRESS adlandırır (Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification üçün qısa əlamət kimi), mümkün basitləşdirilmələrin məlumatını keşfetir, sadəcə, fərqli və girişin məlumatını qoruyan mükafat funksiyasını optimizləndirir. Üç verilən qurğuda təcrübələr modelimizin yarışmaq sistemlərindən üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'শাস্তি সহজ করার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে শাস্তি পড়া এবং বুঝতে সহজ করার জন্য। সাম্প্রতিক ক্ষেত্রে মেশিন অনুবাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তুলে ধরার জন্য মোনোলিভাল কোর্পোরায় জটিল এবং সাধারণ শাস্তি থেকে লি আমরা একটি এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেলের সাথে সহজেকভাবে সমস্যা নিয়ে কথা বলি যা গভীর ক্ষেত্রে শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের সাথে যুক্ত। আমাদের মডেল, যাকে আমরা ড্রিএসস বলি (গভীর প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য সংক্ষিপ্ত হিসেবে), সম্ভাব্য সুস্পষ্ট স্থান খুঁজে বের করে যাচ্ছে যে পুরস্কারের কাজের সম্ভাবনা সম্ভব, যা সা তিনটি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের মডেল প্রতিযোগিতায় সহজেকশন সিস্টেমের প্রতিযোগিতা করে।', 'bs': 'Jednostavna kazna cilja je da rečenice olakšaju čitanje i razumijevanje. Najskoriji pristupi nacrtaju na uvid od prevoda mašine kako bi naučili prepisanje jednojezičkog tijela složenih i jednostavnih rečenica. Mi rješavamo problem pojednostavljanja sa modelom kodera koji se povezuje sa dubokim okvirom učenja pojačanja. Naš model, koji zovemo DRESS (kao kratka ruka za jednostavljenje dubokog kazne o prepreku), istražuje prostor mogućih pojednostavljanja dok učimo optimizirati funkciju nagrade koja poticava ishode koje su jednostavne, tekuće i sačuvaju smisao ulaza. Eksperimenti na tri seta podataka pokazuju da naš model iznosi konkurentne sisteme pojednostavljanja.', 'ca': "La simplificació de les frases té l'objectiu de fer més fàcil llegir i entendre les frases. Els enfocaments més recents es basan en la comprensió de la traducció màquina per aprendre reescriptures de simplificació de corpora monolingüe de frases complexes i simples. Afectem el problem a de simplificació amb un model de codificador i un marc d'aprenentatge de reforç profund. El nostre model, que anomenem DRESS (en breu paraula de Simplificació de la Sentencia de Reanforcement Profund), explora l'espai de possibles simplificacions mentre aprenem a optimitzar una funció de recompensa que estimula productes que són simples, fluents i conserven el significat de la entrada. Els experiments en tres conjunts de dades demostren que el nostre model supera els sistemes de simplificació competitius.", 'cs': 'Cílem zjednodušení vět je usnadnit čtení a porozumění větám. Nejnovější přístupy čerpají z poznatků strojového překladu, aby se naučily zjednodušovací přepisy z jednojzyčných korpusů složitých a jednoduchých vět. Problém zjednodušení řešíme pomocí modelu kodéru-dekodéru spojeného s rámcem hluboké zesílení učení. Náš model, který nazýváme DRESS (jako zkratka pro Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), zkoumá prostor možných zjednodušení a zároveň se učí optimalizovat funkci odměny, která podporuje výstupy, které jsou jednoduché, plynulé a zachovávají význam vstupu. Experimenty na třech datových sadách ukazují, že náš model překonává konkurenční zjednodušovací systémy.', 'et': 'Lausete lihtsustamise eesmärk on muuta lauseid lihtsamaks lugeda ja mõista. Kõige uuemad lähenemisviisid põhinevad masintõlkest saadud teadmistel, et õppida keerukate ja lihtsate lausete ühekeelsete korpuste lihtsustamise ümberkirjutamist. Lihtsustamise probleemi lahendame kodeerija-dekooderi mudeli koos sügava tugevdamise õpperaamistikuga. Meie mudel, mida me nimetame DRESS-iks (sügava reanforement lause lihtsustamise lühendina), uurib võimalike lihtsustamiste ruumi, õppides optimeerima preemiafunktsiooni, mis julgustab väljundeid, mis on lihtsad, sujuvad ja säilitavad sisendi tähenduse. Kolme andmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie mudel on konkurentsivõimelised lihtsustamissüsteemid.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden yksinkertaistamisella pyritään helpottamaan lauseiden lukemista ja ymmärtämistä. Viimeisimmät lähestymistavat hyödyntävät konekäännöksen näkemyksiä oppiakseen yksinkertaistettuja uudelleenkirjoituksia monimutkaisten ja yksinkertaisten lauseiden yksikielisistä korpusista. Yksinkertaistamisongelmaa käsitellään kooderi-dekooderimallilla ja syventävällä oppimiskehyksellä. Mallimme, jota kutsumme DRESSiksi (lyhenteenä Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), tutkii mahdollisten yksinkertaistamisten tilaa ja oppii optimoimaan palkitsemistoimintoa, joka kannustaa tuotoksia, jotka ovat yksinkertaisia, sujuvat ja säilyttävät syötteen merkityksen. Kolmella aineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme on kilpailukykyisiä yksinkertaistamisjärjestelmiä parempi.', 'jv': 'Simplification Awak dhéwé nglanggar sampeyan nganggo urip nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan kanggo nggambar barang sampeyan urip kuwi suku kelangan sampeyan karo perusahaan sampeyan. Awak dhéwé seneng nggawe kesemplikasi sistem lan akeh-decoder model kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Model awak dhéwé, sing nyimpen "DEESS" (gampang kanggo Kebebasan Sentense Along), dadi kapan kelas perusahaan seneng kesempatan kanggo kelas supaya kapan dadi nggawe nyimpen winih dhéwé nggawe barang langkung dianggap bantuan winih Gederambungan telu dataset sing bisa ngomongke sampeyan model sing wis ngerasai sistem seneng pisan banget.', 'he': 'הפשטת גזר משפטים מתכוונת לעשות משפטים קלים יותר לקרוא ולהבין. Most recent approaches draw on insights from machine translation to learn simplification rewrites from monolingual corpora of complex and simple sentences.  אנחנו מתייחסים לבעיה של הפשטה עם מודל קודד-פיקוד מוצד עם סגרת לימוד התגבורה עמוקה. המודל שלנו, שאנחנו קוראים לו DRESS (כקצר עבור שיפוט גזרה עמוק) חוקר את המרחב של שיפוטים אפשריים בזמן ללמוד לאופטימיזם תפקיד פרס שמעודד תוצאות שפשוטות, נוזלות, ושמור על המשמעות של הכניסה. Experiments on three datasets demonstrate that our model outperforms competitive simplification systems.', 'ha': "Similar hali na zartar da sauri don ya sauƙaƙara kalmõmi dõmin a karanta da fahimta. Ga mafi ƙaranci na farko, za'a nuna gannai daga fassarar mashine dõmin a sanar da sauri na rubutu daga makampuni na monoli-harshen na sauri. Munã shawarar masu sauƙi da wata misali na kode-kode da aka haɗa shi da firam mai ƙaranci. Our model, which we call DRESS (as shorthand for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification), explores the space of possible simplifications while learning to optimize a reward function that encourages outputs which are simple, fluent, and preserve the meaning of the input.  Fijaroyi na samun taki uku sun nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da tsarin sauki na'ura.", 'sk': 'Cilj poenostavitve stavkov je olajšati branje in razumevanje stavkov. Najnovejši pristopi temeljijo na vpogledih iz strojnega prevajanja, da se naučijo preprostih in enojezičnih korpusov zapletenih stavkov. Problem poenostavitve obravnavamo z modelom kodirnika-dekoderja v kombinaciji z okvirom za globlje ojačanje učenja. Naš model, ki ga imenujemo DRESS (kot kratka besedila za poenostavitev globokih rezultatov), raziskuje prostor možnih poenostavitev, medtem ko se uči optimizirati funkcijo nagrajevanja, ki spodbuja izhode, ki so preprosti, tekoči in ohranjajo pomen vhoda. Poskusi na treh naborih podatkov kažejo, da naš model presega konkurenčne sisteme za poenostavitev.', 'bo': 'ཚིག་རྐང་འཇགས་རིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚིག་རྐང་འདི་ཀློག་འཇུག་དང་རྟོགས་འཛུགས་ཐབས་མེད་པར་སླ་གཏོང་། ཆེས་ཤོས་མཐའ་མ་ཡིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འགྱུར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད། We address the simplification problem with an encoder-decoder model coupled with a deep reinforcement learning framework. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞེས་པ་དེ་ལྡན་མཁན་DRESS(as shorthand for Deep REinforcement Sentence Simplification)ཞེས་ཏེ། ལག་ཆ་སྟངས་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ན་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱས་ཐལ'}
{'en': 'Learning how to Active Learn : A Deep Reinforcement Learning Approach', 'ar': 'تعلم كيفية التعلم النشط: نهج التعلم المعزز العميق', 'fr': "Apprendre à apprendre activement\xa0: une approche d'apprentissage par renforcement profond", 'es': 'Aprender a aprender activamente: un enfoque de aprendizaje por refuerzo profundo', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a Aprendizagem Ativa: Uma Abordagem de Aprendizagem por Reforço Profundo', 'ja': 'アクティブラーニングの方法を学ぶ：深い強化学習アプローチ', 'zh': '学何以自学,深度强学术', 'hi': 'सीखना कैसे सक्रिय जानने के लिए: एक गहरी सुदृढीकरण सीखने के दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Обучение активному обучению: подход к обучению с глубоким подкреплением', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim conas Foghlaim Ghníomhach: Cur Chuige Foghlama Treisithe Dhomhain', 'hu': 'Az aktív tanulás megtanulása: Mélyreható tanulási megközelítés', 'el': 'Μάθετε πώς να μάθετε ενεργά: Μια προσέγγιση μάθησης βαθιάς ενίσχυσης', 'ka': 'სწავლება როგორ აკრთვის სწავლებას: ძალიან სწავლების მიღება', 'kk': 'Белсенді оқыту үшін оқыту: Үлкен оқыту жағдайы', 'lt': 'Mokymasis aktyviai mokytis: gilus mokymosi stiprinimo metodas', 'ms': 'Membelajar bagaimana untuk Mempelajari Aktif: Pendekatan Pemkuatan Dalam', 'it': 'Imparare a imparare attivamente: un approccio di apprendimento approfondito', 'ml': 'സജീവമായ പഠിക്കണമെന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്നു: ആഴത്തിലെ പുനര്\u200dത്ഥ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ആഴത്തിലുള്ള വിവ', 'mn': 'Актив суралцах талаар суралцах: Гүн гүнзгий нэмэгдүүлэх суралцах ойлголт', 'no': 'Læring av korleis å lære aktiv læring: ein dyp forstørring av læringstilgang', 'pl': 'Nauka aktywnego uczenia się: podejście do uczenia się głębokiego wzmocnienia', 'ro': 'Învățarea cum să înveți activ: o abordare profundă de învățare întărită', 'sr': 'Naučenje kako aktivno naučiti: duboki pristup učenju učenja', 'si': 'සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙන ගන්න කොහොමද කියලා ඉගෙන ගන්නේ: ගොඩක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'mk': 'Учење како активно учење: длабок пристап до зајакнување учење', 'so': 'Waxbarashada sida aad u shaqeyso waxbarashada: A Deep Learning', 'mt': 'Tagħlim kif jitgħallem Attiv: Approċċ ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Tisħiħ Profond', 'sv': 'Lär dig att aktivt lära dig: En djupförstärkt inlärningsmetod', 'ur': 'سیکھنے کی طرح فعال سیکھنا: ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی تقرب', 'ta': 'எப்படி செயல்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்று கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளேன்: ஆழமான விருப்பங்களின் அணுகல்', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Học cách học hành: Một phương pháp học tập tăng cường sâu sắc', 'bg': 'Научаване как да се учи активно: Подход за дълбоко укрепване на обучението', 'hr': 'Naučenje kako aktivno naučiti: pristup dubokom pojačanju učenja', 'da': 'Lære at lære aktiv læring: En dyb forstærket læringsmetode', 'nl': 'Leren hoe actief te leren: Een Deep Reinforcement Learning Approach', 'de': 'Aktives Lernen lernen: Ein Deep Reinforcement Learning Ansatz', 'id': 'Belajar cara untuk Mempelajari Aktif: Sebuah Pendekatan Perkuatan Dalam Belajar', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن آموزش فعالی: تقریبا یادگیری عمیق', 'ko': '어떻게 주동적으로 학습하는가: 일종의 깊이 있는 강화 학습 방법', 'sw': 'Kujifunza jinsi ya Kujifunza Kiharakati: Kufunza Maendeleo ya Kingi', 'af': "Leer hoe om Aktiewe Leer te leer: ' n Deep Versterking Ondersoek", 'sq': 'Mësimi si të mësohet aktivisht: një metodë e thellë e forcimit të mësimit', 'tr': "%s'i nähili janlaşdyrmalydygy öwrenmek", 'am': 'እንዴት ለመማር ትማር: የጥልቅ ማስተማር ቅድሚያ', 'hy': 'Ակտիվ սովորելու սովորելը. խորը ուժեղացման սովորելու մոտեցում', 'az': 'Etkinlik öyrənməyi öyrənmək: Öyrənmə yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'কিভাবে সক্রিয় শিক্ষা শিখতে শিখা যাচ্ছে: গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রতিষ্ঠান শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Naučenje kako aktivno naučiti: pristup dubokom pojačanju učenja', 'ca': "Aprendre a aprendre activament: Un enfocament profund d'aprenentatge de reforç", 'et': 'Aktiivse õppimise õppimine: sügava tugevdamise lähenemisviis', 'cs': 'Naučit se aktivně učit: přístup k hlubokému posílení učení', 'fi': 'Aktiivisen oppimisen oppiminen: Syvän oppimisen vahvistaminen', 'jv': 'Learn Mode to Active Learn: A deep', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ללמוד כיצד ללמוד פעיל: גישה לחזק עמוק ללמוד', 'sk': 'Učenje aktivnega učenja: pristop za globlje okrepitev učenja', 'bo': 'ཤེས་ཚད་ལྟར་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ། རྒྱུན་པོ་ལྡན་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་མཐུན་འབྲི་ན།'}
{'en': 'Active learning aims to select a small subset of data for annotation such that a classifier learned on the data is highly accurate. This is usually done using heuristic selection methods, however the effectiveness of such methods is limited and moreover, the performance of heuristics varies between datasets. To address these shortcomings, we introduce a novel formulation by reframing the active learning as a reinforcement learning problem and explicitly learning a data selection policy, where the policy takes the role of the active learning heuristic. Importantly, our method allows the selection policy learned using simulation to one language to be transferred to other languages. We demonstrate our method using cross-lingual named entity recognition, observing uniform improvements over traditional active learning algorithms.', 'ar': 'يهدف التعلم النشط إلى تحديد مجموعة فرعية صغيرة من البيانات للتعليق التوضيحي بحيث يكون المصنف الذي تعلمه على البيانات دقيقًا للغاية. يتم ذلك عادةً باستخدام طرق الاختيار التجريبية ، ولكن فعالية هذه الأساليب محدودة ، وعلاوة على ذلك ، يختلف أداء الاستدلال بين مجموعات البيانات. لمعالجة أوجه القصور هذه ، نقدم صياغة جديدة من خلال إعادة صياغة التعلم النشط كمشكلة تعلم معزز والتعلم صراحة لسياسة اختيار البيانات ، حيث تأخذ السياسة دور إرشاد التعلم النشط. الأهم من ذلك ، أن طريقتنا تسمح بنقل سياسة الاختيار التي تم تعلمها باستخدام المحاكاة إلى لغة واحدة إلى لغات أخرى. نوضح طريقتنا باستخدام التعرف على الكيانات المسمى عبر اللغات ، مع ملاحظة التحسينات الموحدة على خوارزميات التعلم النشط التقليدية.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage actif vise à sélectionner un petit sous-ensemble de données à annoter de telle sorte qu'un classificateur appris sur les données soit très précis. Cela se fait généralement à l'aide de méthodes de sélection heuristiques, mais l'efficacité de ces méthodes est limitée et, de plus, les performances de l'heuristique varient d'un jeu de données à l'autre. Pour remédier à ces lacunes, nous introduisons une nouvelle formulation en recadrant l'apprentissage actif comme un problème d'apprentissage par renforcement et en apprenant explicitement une politique de sélection des données, dans laquelle la politique joue le rôle de l'heuristique d'apprentissage actif. Il est important de noter que notre méthode permet de transférer la politique de sélection apprise par simulation dans une langue dans d'autres langues. Nous démontrons notre méthode en utilisant la reconnaissance d'entités nommées multilingues, en observant des améliorations uniformes par rapport aux algorithmes d'apprentissage actif traditionnels.", 'pt': 'O aprendizado ativo visa selecionar um pequeno subconjunto de dados para anotação, de modo que um classificador aprendido nos dados seja altamente preciso. Isso geralmente é feito usando métodos de seleção heurística, no entanto, a eficácia de tais métodos é limitada e, além disso, o desempenho das heurísticas varia entre os conjuntos de dados. Para resolver essas deficiências, introduzimos uma nova formulação reformulando o aprendizado ativo como um problema de aprendizado por reforço e aprendendo explicitamente uma política de seleção de dados, onde a política assume o papel da heurística de aprendizado ativo. É importante ressaltar que nosso método permite que a política de seleção aprendida usando simulação para um idioma seja transferida para outros idiomas. Demonstramos nosso método usando reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em vários idiomas, observando melhorias uniformes em relação aos algoritmos tradicionais de aprendizado ativo.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje activo tiene como objetivo seleccionar un pequeño subconjunto de datos para la anotación, de modo que un clasificador aprendido en los datos sea muy preciso. Esto generalmente se hace mediante métodos de selección heurística, sin embargo, la eficacia de dichos métodos es limitada y, además, el rendimiento de la heurística varía entre los conjuntos de datos. Para abordar estas deficiencias, introducimos una formulación novedosa replanteando el aprendizaje activo como un problema de aprendizaje de refuerzo y aprendiendo explícitamente una política de selección de datos, en la que la política asume el papel de la heurística del aprendizaje activo. Es importante destacar que nuestro método permite que la política de selección aprendida mediante simulación a un idioma se transfiera a otros idiomas. Demostramos nuestro método mediante el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas en varios idiomas, observando mejoras uniformes con respecto a los algoritmos tradicionales de aprendizaje activo.', 'ja': '能動学習は、データ上で学習された分類子が非常に正確であるように、注釈のためにデータの小さなサブセットを選択することを目的としている。これは通常、ヒューリスティック選択方法を使用して行われるが、そのような方法の有効性は限定的であり、さらに、ヒューリスティックの性能はデータセット間で変化する。これらの欠点に対処するために、アクティブラーニングを強化学習問題として再構築し、データ選択方針を明示的に学習することで、アクティブラーニングヒューリスティックの役割を果たす新規の定式化を導入する。重要なことは、私たちの方法は、シミュレーションを使用して学習した選択ポリシーを他の言語に転送することを可能にします。私たちは、従来のアクティブラーニングアルゴリズムよりも一様な改善を観察しながら、クロスリンガルの名前付きエンティティ認識を使用して方法を実演します。', 'zh': '学旨在择小分数而注之,以从数学之分器高准。 此常用启发式择术成,然其有效性有限,而启发式术之性因数集而异。 新颖之公式,将自学重构为强学,明数择策,其策有自学启发式之用。 要者,吾法许将模拟学到一种语言的择策移到他语言。 吾以跨言名实识之,观与古法同改。', 'ru': 'Активное обучение направлено на выбор небольшого подмножества данных для аннотации, так что классификатор, изученный на данных, является высокоточным. Обычно это делается с использованием методов эвристического отбора, однако эффективность таких методов ограничена и, кроме того, производительность эвристики варьируется в зависимости от набора данных. Чтобы устранить эти недостатки, мы вводим новую формулировку, переформулировав активное обучение как проблему усиления обучения и прямо обучаясь политике отбора данных, где политика принимает роль эвристики активного обучения. Важно отметить, что наш метод позволяет перенести политику отбора, изученную с помощью моделирования на один язык, на другие языки. Мы демонстрируем наш метод, используя межязычное распознавание именованных сущностей, наблюдая равномерные улучшения по сравнению с традиционными алгоритмами активного обучения.', 'hi': 'सक्रिय सीखने का उद्देश्य एनोटेशन के लिए डेटा के एक छोटे से सबसेट का चयन करना है जैसे कि डेटा पर सीखा गया क्लासिफायर अत्यधिक सटीक है। यह आमतौर पर हेरिस्टिक चयन विधियों का उपयोग करके किया जाता है, हालांकि इस तरह के तरीकों की प्रभावशीलता सीमित है और इसके अलावा, ह्यूरिस्टिक्स का प्रदर्शन डेटासेट के बीच भिन्न होता है। इन कमियों को दूर करने के लिए, हम एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने की समस्या के रूप में सक्रिय सीखने को फिर से तैयार करके और स्पष्ट रूप से एक डेटा चयन नीति सीखकर एक उपन्यास सूत्रीकरण पेश करते हैं, जहां नीति सक्रिय सीखने के ह्युरिस्टिक की भूमिका निभाती है। महत्वपूर्ण रूप से, हमारी विधि एक भाषा में सिमुलेशन का उपयोग करके सीखी गई चयन नीति को अन्य भाषाओं में स्थानांतरित करने की अनुमति देती है। हम क्रॉस-लिंगुअल नामित इकाई मान्यता का उपयोग करके अपनी विधि का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, पारंपरिक सक्रिय शिक्षण एल्गोरिदम पर समान सुधार देखते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag an bhfoghlaim ghníomhach fothacar beag sonraí a roghnú le haghaidh anótála sa chaoi is go mbíonn aicmitheoir an-chruinn a d’fhoghlaim ar na sonraí. Déantar é seo de ghnáth ag baint úsáide as modhanna roghnúcháin heorastúla, ach tá éifeachtacht modhanna den sórt sin teoranta agus ina theannta sin, athraíonn feidhmíocht heuristics idir tacair shonraí. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na heasnaimh sin, tugaimid foirmliú nua isteach tríd an bhfoghlaim ghníomhach a athfhrámú mar fhadhb foghlama athneartaithe agus trí bheartas roghnúcháin sonraí a fhoghlaim go sainráite, ina nglacann an beartas ról an heorasaí foghlama gníomhaí. Rud atá tábhachtach, ligeann ár modh an polasaí roghnúcháin a foghlaimíodh trí úsáid a bhaint as ionsamhlú go teanga amháin a aistriú go teangacha eile. Léirímid ár modh trí úsáid a bhaint as aitheantas tras-teangach aonáin ainmnithe, ag breathnú ar fheabhsuithe aonfhoirmeacha thar algartam foghlama gníomhacha traidisiúnta.', 'el': 'Η ενεργή μάθηση στοχεύει στην επιλογή ενός μικρού υποσύνολου δεδομένων για σχολιασμό, έτσι ώστε ένας ταξινομητής που μαθαίνεται στα δεδομένα να είναι εξαιρετικά ακριβής. Αυτό γίνεται συνήθως χρησιμοποιώντας μεθόδους heuristic selection, ωστόσο η αποτελεσματικότητα αυτών των μεθόδων είναι περιορισμένη και επιπλέον, η απόδοση των heuristics ποικίλλει μεταξύ συνόλων δεδομένων. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτές οι ελλείψεις, εισάγουμε μια νέα διατύπωση επαναδιατυπώνοντας την ενεργή μάθηση ως πρόβλημα ενίσχυσης της μάθησης και μαθαίνοντας ρητά μια πολιτική επιλογής δεδομένων, όπου η πολιτική παίρνει το ρόλο της ενεργού μαθησιακής heuristικής. Σημαντικό είναι ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτρέπει τη μεταφορά της πολιτικής επιλογής που μαθαίνεται μέσω προσομοίωσης σε μια γλώσσα σε άλλες γλώσσες. Επιδεικνύουμε τη μέθοδο μας χρησιμοποιώντας τη γλωσσική αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων, παρατηρώντας ομοιόμορφες βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τους παραδοσιακούς αλγόριθμους ενεργού μάθησης.', 'hu': 'Az aktív tanulás célja, hogy kiválassza az adatok kis részhalmazát jegyzeteléshez, hogy az adatokon tanult osztályozó rendkívül pontos legyen. Ezt általában heurisztikus kiválasztási módszerekkel végezzük, azonban az ilyen módszerek hatékonysága korlátozott, sőt, a heurisztika teljesítménye adathalmazonként eltérő. E hiányosságok orvoslása érdekében új megfogalmazást vezetünk be az aktív tanulást erősítő tanulási problémának átalakításával, és kifejezetten megismerjük az adatválasztási politikát, ahol a politika az aktív tanulás heurisztikájának szerepét vállalja. Fontos, hogy módszerünk lehetővé teszi, hogy a szimuláció segítségével tanult kiválasztási irányelveket egy nyelvre átvigyük más nyelvekre. Módszerünket többnyelvű, nevezett entitás felismeréssel mutatjuk be, figyelemmel kísérve a hagyományos aktív tanulási algoritmusokkal szemben egységes fejlesztéseket.', 'ka': 'აქტიური სწავლების მიზეზია მონაცემების პატარა სესესეტის მონაცემებისთვის, როგორც მონაცემების კლასიფიკაცია ძალიან მარტივია. ეს საერთოდ იქნება ჰერისტიკური მონიშნული მეტოვების გამოყენება, მაგრამ ასეთი მეტოვების ეფექტიკურობა უფრო დაზრუნდება და უფრო მეტია, ჰერისტიკის ეფექტიკურობა ჩვენ აკეთებულ სწავლის პრობლემას გადავიწყებთ, რომელიც აკეთებულ სწავლის პრობლემას გაუკეთებული სწავლის პრობლემა და გავისწავლით მონაცემების მონიშნული პოლიტიკას, სადაც პოლიტიკაც აკ მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენი მეთოდი მონიშნული პოლიტიკის გამოყენება სიმულაციის ერთი ენაში გადატანა სხვა ენაში. ჩვენ ჩვენი მეთოდის გამოყენება საკუთარ ენტიგური განახლების გამოყენებით, საკუთარ განახლების განახლებით, საკუთარ განახლებით განახლებით განახლებით, საკუთარ', 'it': "L'apprendimento attivo mira a selezionare un piccolo sottoinsieme di dati per l'annotazione in modo tale che un classificatore appreso sui dati sia altamente accurato. Ciò avviene solitamente utilizzando metodi di selezione euristica, tuttavia l'efficacia di tali metodi è limitata e inoltre, le prestazioni dell'euristica variano da set di dati a set. Per ovviare a queste carenze, introduciamo una nuova formulazione riformulando l'apprendimento attivo come un problema di apprendimento di rafforzamento e imparando esplicitamente una politica di selezione dei dati, in cui la politica assume il ruolo di euristica dell'apprendimento attivo. È importante sottolineare che il nostro metodo consente di trasferire la politica di selezione appresa utilizzando la simulazione in una lingua ad altre lingue. Dimostriamo il nostro metodo utilizzando il riconoscimento di entità denominate cross-lingual, osservando miglioramenti uniformi rispetto ai tradizionali algoritmi di apprendimento attivo.", 'kk': 'Белсенді оқыту мақсатында, мәліметтерде оқылған классификатор дұрыс деген мәліметтердің кішкентай бөлшегін таңдау үшін. Бұл кәдімгі геуристикалық таңдау әдістерін қолданады, бірақ бұл әдістердің эффективтілігі шектелген, сондай-ақ, геуристикалық жұмыс ортасында айырмалы. Бұл жеткіліктерді шешу үшін, белсенді оқыту мәселесін көтеру мәселесі ретінде жаңарту және деректерді таңдау ережесін оқыту үшін романдық формулацияны таңдаймыз. Сонда ережесі белсенді оқыту геурист Мүмкін, біздің әдіміміз таңдау ережелерін бір тілде аудару үшін бір тіліне аударуға мүмкіндік береді. Біз әдімімізді көптілікке аталған нысандарды анықтау арқылы, әдімгі белсенді оқыту алгоритмдерінің бірдей жақсартуларын қарай көрсету арқылы көрсетедік.', 'lt': 'Active learning aims to select a small subset of data for annotation such that a classifier learned on the data is highly accurate.  Paprastai tai daroma naudojant heuristinius atrankos metodus, tačiau tokių metodų veiksmingumas yra ribotas ir, be to, heuristikos veiksmingumas skiriasi tarp duomenų rinkinių. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos trūkumus, įvedame naują formuluotę pertvarkydami aktyvų mokymąsi kaip mokymosi stiprinimo problem ą ir aiškiai išmokdami duomenų atrankos politiką, kurioje politika atlieka aktyvaus mokymosi heuristikos vaidmenį. Svarbu, kad mūsų metodas leidžia atrankos politiką, išmokytą imituojant vieną kalbą, perkelti į kitas kalbas. Mes parodome savo metodą naudojant tarpkalbinį pavadinimą turinčio subjekto pripažinimą, stebint vienodus patobulinimus, palyginti su tradiciniais aktyvaus mokymosi algoritmais.', 'mk': 'Активното учење има за цел да избере мал подгруп податоци за анотација така што класификаторот научен на податоците е многу прецизен. Ова обично се прави користејќи хеористички методи за селекција, сепак ефикасноста на ваквите методи е ограничена и, покрај тоа, ефикасноста на хеористиката се разликува помеѓу датотеките. За да ги решиме овие недостатоци, воведуваме нова формулација со реформација на активното учење како проблем на зајакнување на учењето и експлицитно учење на политиката за селекција на податоци, каде политиката ја презема улогата на активното учење хеористика. Важно е, нашиот метод овозможува политиката на селекција научена користејќи симулација на еден јазик да се префрли на други јазици. Го демонстрираме нашиот метод користејќи прекујазичко препознавање на ентитетите, набљудувајќи униформни подобрувања во однос на традиционалните алгоритми за активно учење.', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran aktif bermaksud memilih subset data kecil untuk anotasi sehingga pengklasifikasi yang belajar pada data sangat tepat. Ini biasanya dilakukan menggunakan kaedah pemilihan heuristik, bagaimanapun efektivitas kaedah tersebut adalah terbatas dan selain itu, prestasi heuristik berbeza antara set data. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan ini, kami memperkenalkan bentuk baru dengan mengubahsuai pembelajaran aktif sebagai masalah pembelajaran kuasa dan mempelajari secara eksplicit kebijakan pemilihan data, di mana kebijakan mengambil peran heuristik pembelajaran aktif. Yang penting, kaedah kami membolehkan polisi pemilihan yang belajar menggunakan simulasi ke satu bahasa untuk dipindahkan ke bahasa lain. Kami menunjukkan kaedah kami menggunakan pengenalan entiti bernama saling bahasa, memerhatikan peningkatan seragam atas algoritma pembelajaran aktif tradisional.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ചെറിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു ഇത് സാധാരണയായി ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ചെയ്യുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഇതുപോലുള്ള രീതികളുടെ പ്രവർത്ത ഈ ചെറുപ്പുകളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, സജ്ജീവമായ പഠനം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്നത് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളായി പുനരുത്ഥാപിക്കുന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് സിമുലേഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന പോളിസിയെ മറ സാധാരണ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് യൂണിഫോമിന്റെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim attiv għandu l-għan li jagħżel sottosett żgħir ta’ dejta għall-annotazzjoni b’tali mod li klassifikatur imgħallem fuq id-dejta jkun preċiż ħafna. Normalment dan isir bl-użu ta’ metodi ta’ għażla ewristika, madankollu l-effettività ta’ metodi bħal dawn hija limitata u barra minn hekk, il-prestazzjoni tal-ewristika tvarja bejn settijiet ta’ dejta. To address these shortcomings, we introduce a novel formulation by reframing the active learning as a reinforcement learning problem and explicitly learning a data selection policy, where the policy takes the role of the active learning heuristic.  B’mod importanti, il-metodu tagħna jippermetti li l-politika tal-għażla li titgħallem permezz tas-simulazzjoni għal lingwa waħda tiġi trasferita għal lingwi oħra. Aħna nuru l-metodu tagħna bl-użu tar-rikonoxximent ta’ entitajiet imsejħa b’mod translingwistiku, filwaqt li nuru titjib uniformi fuq algoritmi tradizzjonali ta’ tagħlim attiv.', 'no': 'Aktivt læring må velja ein liten undergruppe av data for merking slik at ein klassifiser lært på data er svært nøyaktig. Dette blir vanlegvis gjort ved høuristiske utvalmetodar, men effektiviteten av desse metodane er begrenset, og likevel varierer effekten av heuristikk mellom datasett. For å handtere desse kortingane, introdusere vi ein novel formasjon ved å reframera den aktive læringa som eit forstørringsfolkningsproblem og uttrykk lære eit datautvalspolitikk, der politikken tar rolen på den aktive læringa heuristisk. Det er viktig at metoden vårt gjer at utvalspolitikken som er lært med simulering til ein språk skal overførast til andre språk. Vi demonstrerer metoden vårt ved å bruka krysspråk- gjenkjenning av entitet, med å sjå uniforme forbedringar over tradisjonelle aktive læringsalgoritme.', 'mn': 'Актив суралцах зорилго нь өгөгдлийн талаар сурсан ангилагч маш зөв байдаг. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн геуристикийн сонголтын аргыг ашиглан хийгддэг. Гэхдээ эдгээр аргын үр дүнтэй байдал хязгаарлагддаг. Гэхдээ геуристикийн үйл ажиллагаа өгөгдлийн сануудын хоорондоо өөр өөр өөр Эдгээр алдагдлыг удирдахын тулд бид актив суралцаж суралцах асуудлыг нэмэгдүүлж, өгөгдлийн сонголтын бодлогыг тодорхой суралцаж, бодлого нь актив суралцах хэмжээний үүрэг авдаг шинэ тодорхойлолтыг танилцуулдаг. Хамгийн чухал нь, бидний арга нь сонголтын бодлогыг нэг хэл руу шилжүүлэхэд суралцаж сурсан. Бид өөрсдийн арга замыг олон хэл хэлний нэгдсэн хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлж, уламжлалтай суралцах алгоритмын хувьд нэгтгэл хөгжүүлэх арга замыг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Aktywne uczenie się ma na celu wybór małego podzbioru danych do adnotacji, tak aby klasyfikator uczony na danych był bardzo dokładny. Zazwyczaj odbywa się to metodami selekcji heurystycznej, jednak skuteczność takich metod jest ograniczona, a ponadto wydajność heurystyki różni się w zależności od zbiorów danych. Aby rozwiązać te niedociągnięcia, wprowadzamy nową formułę poprzez przekształcenie aktywnego uczenia się jako problemu uczenia się wzmacniającego i wyraźnie uczenie się polityki wyboru danych, w której polityka ta odgrywa rolę heurystyki aktywnego uczenia się. Co ważne, nasza metoda umożliwia przeniesienie polityki selekcji uczonej za pomocą symulacji do jednego języka na inne języki. Naszą metodę demonstrujemy przy użyciu wielojęzycznego rozpoznawania nazw jednostek, obserwując jednolite ulepszenia w stosunku do tradycyjnych algorytmów aktywnego uczenia się.', 'ro': 'Învățarea activă își propune să selecteze un mic subset de date pentru adnotare, astfel încât un clasificator învățat pe date să fie foarte precis. Acest lucru se face de obicei folosind metode de selecție euristică, cu toate acestea eficacitatea acestor metode este limitată și, în plus, performanța euristică variază de la un set de date la altul. Pentru a remedia aceste deficiențe, introducem o formulă nouă prin reformarea învățării active ca o problemă de consolidare a învățării și învățarea explicită a unei politici de selecție a datelor, în care politica ia rolul de euristică a învățării active. Important este că metoda noastră permite ca politica de selecție învățată prin simulare să fie transferată în alte limbi. Demonstrăm metoda noastră folosind recunoașterea entităților denumite între limbi, observând îmbunătățiri uniforme față de algoritmii tradiționali de învățare activă.', 'sr': 'Aktivno učenje cilja je izabrati malu podskupinu podataka za annotaciju tako da je klasifikator naučen na podacima veoma tačan. To se obično čini koristeći heurističke metode selekcije, međutim, učinkovitost takvih metoda je ograničena i više, učinkovitost heuristike se razlikuje između seta podataka. Za rješavanje tih nedostataka, predstavljamo novu formulaciju ponovno reframirajući aktivno učenje kao problem učenja pojačanja i jasno učiti politiku selekcije podataka, gde politika uzima ulogu aktivnog heurističkog učenja. Naša metoda omogućava da se izborna politika naučila koristeći simulaciju na jedan jezik prebaci na druge jezike. Pokazujemo našu metodu korištenjem prejezičkog priznanja entiteta, posmatrajući uniformne poboljšanje u tradicionalnim aktivnim algoritmima učenja.', 'si': 'සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙනගන්න අදහසක් තියෙන්නේ පුංචි දත්ත සම්බන්ධයක් තෝරාගන්න, ඒ වගේම දත්තේ ඉගෙනගන්න විශ මේක සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම හයුරිස්ටික් තෝරණ විධාන භාවිතා කරනවා, නමුත් මේ විධාන විධානයේ පරීක්ෂාවත් සීමාවෙන් ඉ අපි මේ අවස්ථාවක් විධානය කරන්න, සක්\u200dරිය ඉගෙනීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, දත්ත තෝරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉග වැදගත් විදියට, අපේ විදියට තෝරාගන්න පොලිසියට අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ අනිත් භාෂාවට ප්\u200d අපි අපේ විධානය පෙන්වන්නම් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් නාමයි අයිතික අඳුරගන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය සක්\u200dරිය සික්ෂණා ඇල්ගෝ', 'so': 'Waxbarashada waxqabad ah waxaa loogu talagalay in lagu doorto koob yar oo macluumaad ka mid ah in fasax lagu baranayo macluumaadka aad u saxday. Sida caadiga ah waxaa lagu sameeyaa isticmaalka hababka doorashada ee qoraalka ah, habase yeeshee waxyaabaha noocyada caynkaas ah waa xad iyo weliba, dhamaadka hiuristiyadu waxay u kala duwan yihiin macluumaadka. Si aan u qabsado qalabkan, waxaynu u soo bandhignaynaa qoraal warqad ah, si loo horumariyo waxbarashada waxqabadka ah sida dhibaato barashada iyo si cad u barashada siyaasadda doorashada ee macluumaadka, kaasoo siyaasadu qaybaha ku qaata waxbarashada waxqabadka ah. Si muhiim ah, qaabkeenu wuxuu u ogolaan karaa siyaasadda doorashada oo lagu bartay qaabilo luqad kaliya in lagu wareejiyo luuqado kale. Waxaynu muujinnaa qaababka aan ku isticmaalno aqoonsiga aqoonsiga aqoonta entity, waxaynu aragnaa horumarinta kooxaha waxbarashada ee caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Aktivt lärande syftar till att välja en liten delmängd data för anteckningar så att en klassificerare som lärts sig på data är mycket korrekt. Detta görs vanligtvis med hjälp av heuristiska urvalsmetoder, men effektiviteten hos sådana metoder är begränsad och dessutom varierar heuristikens prestanda mellan datauppsättningar. För att åtgärda dessa brister introducerar vi en ny formulering genom att omforma det aktiva lärandet som ett förstärkt inlärningsproblem och uttryckligen lära oss en dataurvalspolicy, där politiken tar rollen som den aktiva lärandeheuristiken. Viktigt är att vår metod gör det möjligt att överföra urvalspolicyn som lärs genom simulering till ett språk till andra språk. Vi demonstrerar vår metod genom att använda korspråkig namngiven entitetsigenkänning, observera enhetliga förbättringar jämfört med traditionella aktiva inlärningsalgoritmer.', 'ta': 'செயலில் கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கும் தகவல் அறிவிப்பிற்கு ஒரு சிறிய பிணைப்பை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் பொருள் தகவலில் ஒரு வக இது வழக்கமாக உயரமான தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி செய்யப்படும், ஆனாலும் இவ்வாறு முறைகளின் விளைவு வரையறுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதில இந்த சிறிய குறைப்புகளை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் செயல்படும் கற்றல் பிரச்சனையை புதுப்பித்தலாம் மற்றும் தெளிவாக தகவல் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு கொள்கையை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முக்கியமாக, எங்கள் முறைமையில் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு கொள்கையை பாவனையில் ஒரு மொழிக்கு மாற்றி மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கு  நாம் எங்கள் முறையைக் காண்பிக்கிறோம் பொருள் அடையாளம் பெயர்க்கப்பட்ட மொழியை பயன்படுத்தி, மரபார்ந்த செயல்பாட்டு படிக்', 'ur': 'فعال تعلیم کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ انٹوریٹ کے لئے ایک چھوٹے سائسٹ ڈیٹ کا انتخاب کریں جیسا کہ ڈیٹ پر سیکھا گیا ایک کلاسیٹر بہت دقیق ہے. یہ معمولاً ہوریستیک انتخاب طریقے کے مطابق کر رہا ہے، لیکن یہ طریقے طریقے کے مطابق محدود ہے اور اس سے بھی زیادہ، ہوریستیکس کے مطابق ڈاٹ سٹ کے درمیان متفاوت ہیں. ان کمزوریوں کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک نو فرمول کی تعلیم کو فعال کی تعلیم کے طور پر مضبوط تعلیم کی سفارش کے طور پر دفع کر دیا اور ایک ڈیٹا انتخاب پالیس کی سیکھ لینے کے لئے، جہاں پالیس فعال تعلیم کی رول لیتا ہے۔ اہم طریقہ ہے کہ ایک زبان میں سیمالیٹ کے مطابق سیمالیٹ کی سیمالیٹ کے ذریعہ سیمالیٹ کی سیمالیٹ کو دوسری زبانوں کی طرف منتقل کیا جائے۔ ہم اپنے طریقے کو کرس زبان کی نام کی اجازت کے مطابق دکھا رہے ہیں، ایک طریقہ کی تعلیم الگوریتم پر ایک طریقہ کی سوداگری دیکھتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "@ info Ushbu odatda heuristik tanlash usullari yordamida bajariladi, ammo bu usullarning effekti chegara va yana boshqa, heuristik bajarishi maʼlumotlar tarkibida ajratuvchi. Bu muammolarni talab qilish uchun, aktiv o'rganishni o'rganish muammolari sifatida qayta ishlatish va taʼrif tanlash qoidasini aniqlash mumkin, qayerda qoidagi aktiv o'rganishni o'rganish qoidasining roli qabul qiladi. Importantly, our method allows the selection policy learned using simulation to one language to be transferred to other languages.  Biz tashkilotni tasdiqlash va tabiiy aktiv o'rganish algoritlarini ko'rib chiqqamiz.", 'vi': 'Tập tin đang hoạt động nhằm mục đích chọn một nhóm nhỏ dữ liệu để ghi chú, để một người phân loại học được trên dữ liệu có độ chính xác cao. Điều này thường được làm bằng phương pháp chọn thần kinh, tuy nhiên hiệu quả của các phương pháp này bị hạn chế và còn lại, chức năng của thần kinh khác nhau giữa các nhà dữ liệu. Để giải quyết những thiếu sót này, chúng ta sẽ tạo ra một công thức mới bằng cách phản hồi học hành để tăng cường vấn đề học tập và học chi tiết một chính sách chọn dữ liệu, nơi chính sách sẽ đóng vai trò của thần kinh học tích cực. Quan trọng là, phương pháp của chúng tôi cho phép chính sách chọn được học sử dụng mô phỏng thành một ngôn ngữ khác được chuyển sang các ngôn ngữ khác. Chúng tôi sử dụng phương phạm này bằng cách đã giải nhận nó bằng cách đó, quan tâm đến sự giải quyết truyền thống báo thuật.', 'bg': 'Активното обучение има за цел да избере малък поднабор от данни за анотация, така че класификаторът, научен върху данните, да е много точен. Това обикновено се прави с помощта на методи за евристичен подбор, но ефективността на тези методи е ограничена и освен това ефективността на евристиката варира между наборите от данни. За да преодолеем тези недостатъци, въвеждаме нова формулировка, като преформулираме активното учене като проблем за засилване на ученето и изрично изучаваме политика за подбор на данни, в която политиката поема ролята на активната евристика на ученето. Важно е, че методът ни позволява политиката за подбор, научена чрез симулация на един език, да бъде прехвърлена на други езици. Ние демонстрираме нашия метод, използвайки междуезично разпознаване на обекти, наблюдавайки еднакви подобрения спрямо традиционните алгоритми за активно обучение.', 'hr': 'Aktivno učenje cilja je izabrati mali podskup podataka za annotaciju tako da je klasifikator naučen na podacima vrlo precizan. To se obično čini koristeći heurističke metode selekcije, međutim, učinkovitost takvih metoda je ograničena, a i dalje, učinkovitost heuristike se razlikuje između seta podataka. Za rješavanje tih nedostataka, predstavljamo novu formulaciju ponovljajući aktivno učenje kao problem pojačanja učenja i jasno učiti politiku izbora podataka, gdje politika uzima ulogu aktivnog heurističkog učenja. Naša metoda omogućava da se izborna politika naučila koristeći simulaciju na jedan jezik prebaci na druge jezike. Pokazujemo našu metodu korištenjem prejezičkog priznanja entiteta, posmatrajući uniformne poboljšanje nad tradicionalnim aktivnim algoritmima učenja.', 'nl': 'Actief leren heeft tot doel een kleine subset van gegevens te selecteren voor annotatie, zodat een classificator die op de gegevens is geleerd zeer nauwkeurig is. Dit gebeurt meestal met behulp van heuristische selectiemethoden, maar de effectiviteit van dergelijke methoden is beperkt en bovendien verschillen de prestaties van heuristieken per dataset. Om deze tekortkomingen aan te pakken, introduceren we een nieuwe formulering door het actief leren te herschikken als een versterkend leerprobleem en expliciet een dataselectiebeleid te leren, waarbij het beleid de rol van de actieve leerheuristiek inneemt. Belangrijk is dat onze methode het selectiebeleid dat met behulp van simulatie is geleerd, naar één taal kan worden overgebracht naar andere talen. We demonstreren onze methode met behulp van cross-lingual named entity herkenning, waarbij uniforme verbeteringen worden waargenomen ten opzichte van traditionele actieve leeralgoritmes.', 'da': 'Aktiv læring sigter mod at vælge en lille delmængde data til annotering, således at en klassificering, der læres på dataene, er meget nøjagtig. Dette gøres normalt ved hjælp af heuristiske udvælgelsesmetoder, men effektiviteten af sådanne metoder er begrænset, og desuden varierer heuristikkens ydeevne mellem datasæt. For at afhjælpe disse mangler indfører vi en ny formulering ved at omdanne den aktive læring som et forstærket læringsproblem og udtrykkeligt lære en dataudvælgelsespolitik, hvor politikken indtager rollen som den aktive læringsheuristisk. Det er vigtigt, at vores metode gør det muligt at overføre den udvælgelsespolitik, der læres ved hjælp af simulering til et sprog, til andre sprog. Vi demonstrerer vores metode ved hjælp af tværsproget navngivet entitetsgenkendelse, observerer ensartede forbedringer i forhold til traditionelle aktive læringsalgoritmer.', 'ko': '능동 학습의 목적은 데이터의 일부분을 선택하여 주석을 함으로써 데이터에서 학습하는 분류기가 높은 정확성을 가지도록 하는 것이다.이것은 보통 계발식 선택 방법을 사용하여 완성하지만, 이러한 방법의 유효성은 유한하고, 계발식의 성능은 서로 다른 데이터 집합 사이에 다르다.이러한 부족함을 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 공식을 도입하여 능동학습을 강화학습 문제로 재정립하고 데이터 선택 전략을 명확하게 학습했다. 그 중에서 이 전략은 능동학습 계발식의 역할을 한다.중요한 것은 우리의 방법이 한 언어의 선택 전략을 시뮬레이션을 통해 다른 언어로 옮길 수 있도록 하는 것이다.우리는 다중 언어 명명 실체 식별을 사용하여 우리의 방법을 보여주고 전통적인 능동 학습 알고리즘에 비해 일치된 개선을 관찰했다.', 'id': 'Active learning aims to select a small subset of data for annotation such that a classifier learned on the data is highly accurate.  Ini biasanya dilakukan dengan menggunakan metode pemilihan heuristik, namun efektivitas metode tersebut terbatas dan selain itu, prestasi heuristik berbeda antara set data. Untuk mengatasi kekurangan-kekurangan ini, kami memperkenalkan formulasi baru dengan mengubah pembelajaran aktif sebagai masalah pembelajaran penuh dan secara eksplicit mempelajari kebijakan pemilihan data, di mana kebijakan mengambil peran heuristik pembelajaran aktif. Yang penting, metode kita memungkinkan kebijakan pemilihan yang belajar menggunakan simulasi ke satu bahasa untuk dipindahkan ke bahasa lain. We demonstrate our method using cross-lingual named entity recognition, observing uniform improvements over traditional active learning algorithms.', 'fa': 'یادگیری فعال هدف برای انتخاب یک زیر زیر داده کوچک برای یادگیری مانند آن است که یک راهنمایی که روی داده یاد گرفته شده بسیار دقیق است. این معمولا با استفاده از روش انتخاب هوریستیک انجام می\u200cشود، ولی فعالیت این روش\u200cها محدود و بیشتر است، فعالیت هوریستیک بین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها متفاوت می\u200cشود. برای حل این کوتاهی، ما یک فرمول رمانی را با تغییر دادن یادگیری فعال به عنوان مشکل یادگیری پشتیبانی و بطور واضح یاد گرفتن سیاست انتخاب داده را معرفی می کنیم، جایی سیاست نقش یادگیری فعال هوریست را می گیرد. مهم است که روش ما اجازه می دهد سیاست انتخاب را که با استفاده از شبیه\u200cسازی به یک زبان به زبان دیگر منتقل شود. ما روش خودمان را با استفاده از شناسایی متزبان به عنوان یک چیز نشان می دهیم، مراقبت بهترین یونیفرم بر الگوریتم های یادگیری فعال سنتی.', 'de': 'Aktives Lernen zielt darauf ab, eine kleine Teilmenge von Daten für Annotation auszuwählen, so dass ein Klassifikator, der auf den Daten gelernt wird, sehr genau ist. Dies geschieht in der Regel mit heuristischen Selektionsmethoden, jedoch ist die Wirksamkeit solcher Methoden begrenzt und darüber hinaus variiert die Leistung von Heuristiken zwischen Datensätzen. Um diese Mängel zu beheben, führen wir eine neuartige Formulierung ein, indem wir das aktive Lernen als Verstärkungs-Lernproblem umrahmen und explizit eine Datenauswahl-Politik erlernen, bei der die Politik die Rolle der aktiven Lernheuristik übernimmt. Wichtig ist, dass unsere Methode es ermöglicht, die durch Simulation erlernte Auswahlpolitik auf eine Sprache zu übertragen. Wir demonstrieren unsere Methode mit Hilfe der sprachübergreifenden Namenserkennung und beobachten dabei einheitliche Verbesserungen gegenüber traditionellen aktiven Lernalgorithmen.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa haraka inakusudia kuchagua vipande kidogo cha taarifa kwa ajili ya kutangaza kama vile mtaalamu aliyejifunza kwenye taarifa ni sahihi sana. Jambo hili mara nyingi linafanywa kwa kutumia njia za uchaguzi wa heuristi, hata hivyo ufanisi wa njia hizi ni ukomo na zaidi, utendaji wa heuristi unatofautiana kati ya takwimu. Ili kukabiliana na upungufu huu, tunaanzisha utaratibu wa riwaya kwa kuizuia elimu ya harakati kama tatizo la kujifunza na kujifunza kwa uwazi sera ya uchaguzi wa data, ambapo sera inachukua nafasi ya kazi za kujifunza kwa utaalamu. Kimuhimu, njia yetu inaruhusu sera ya uchaguzi inayojifunza kwa kutumia simulizi kwa lugha moja ili kuhamishwa kwa lugha nyingine. Tunaonyesha mbinu yetu kwa kutumia lugha inayoitwa kutambua entity, kuona maendeleo ya kiungo zaidi ya mifululimo ya kujifunza za kitamaduni.', 'sq': "Mësimi aktiv synon të zgjedhë një nëngrup të vogël të të dhënash për anotacion në mënyrë që një klasifikues i mësuar në të dhënat të jetë shumë i saktë. Kjo zakonisht bëhet duke përdorur metodat e zgjedhjes heuristike, megjithatë efektshmëria e metodave të tilla është e kufizuar dhe gjithashtu, performanca e heuristikës ndryshon midis grupeve të dhënash. Për t'i trajtuar këto mungesa, ne futim një formulim të ri duke riformuar mësimin aktiv si një problem të forcimit të mësimit dhe duke mësuar shprehësisht një politikë zgjedhjeje të të dhënave, ku politika merr rolin e heuristikës aktive të mësimit. Më e rëndësishme, metoda jonë lejon që politika e zgjedhjes e mësuar duke përdorur simulimin në një gjuhë të transferohet në gjuhë të tjera. Ne demonstrojmë metodën tonë duke përdorur njohjen ndërgjuhësore të njësisë së quajtur, duke vëzhguar përmirësime uniforme mbi algoritmet tradicionale të mësimit aktiv.", 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ይህ በተለየ ይደረጋል በሀውሪክኛ ምርጫ ማድረግ ይደረጋል፣ ነገር ግን የዚህ ዓይነት ሥርዓቶች ጥቅም ይደረግበታል፣ ከዚያም በላይ የኦርቲክስ ውጤት ከዳታ ማዕከላዎች መካከል የተለየ ነው፡፡ እነዚህን አካባቢዎች ለመቀበል፣ የፖለቲካ በአካባቢው ትምህርት መግለጫ እንዲያበረታና የዳታ ምርጫ ፖሊሲ እናስተማርካለን፡፡ በአጠቃሚ፣ የሥርዓታችን ምርጫ ፖሊሲ በተማረ በአንድ ቋንቋ ወደ ሌላ ቋንቋ ለመለስ ይፈቅዳል፡፡ አካባቢ መሆኑን በተባለው የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እናሳየዋለን፣ የባሕላዊ ትምህርት አልጎርጂቶችን በመጠቀም የዩንፍረት ትክክል ማሳየትን እናየዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Aktiewe leer doel om 'n klein subartikel van data te kies vir annotasie sodat 'n klassifiseerder leer op die data is baie presies. Hierdie word gewoonlik gedoen met gebruik van heuristiese keuse metodes, maar die effektiviteit van sodanige metodes is beperk en meer, die effektiviteit van heuristieke verander tussen datastelle. Om hierdie kortpad te adres, introduseer ons 'n nuwe formasie deur die aktiewe leer as 'n versterking leer probleem te reframeer en 'n data kies beleid te leer, waar die beleid die rol van die aktiewe leer heuristies neem. Ons metode laat toe die keuse beleid wat geleer word deur simulasie na een taal om na ander tale te oordra. Ons wys ons metode deur die gebruik van kruistale genaamde entiteiterkenning, aansig van eenforme verbeteringe oor tradisionele aktiewe leer algoritme.", 'hy': 'Ակտիվ սովորելու նպատակն է ընտրել մի փոքրիկ տվյալների ենթախումբ, որպեսզի տեղեկատվության վրա սովորված դասակարգիչը շատ ճշգրիտ լինի: Սա սովորաբար կատարվում է հյուրիստիկ ընտրության մեթոդներ օգտագործելով, սակայն նման մեթոդների արդյունավետությունը սահմանափակ է, և ավելին, հյուրիստիկայի արդյունավետությունը տարբերվում է տվյալների համակարգերի միջև: Այս թերությունները լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր ձևափոխություն, վերափոխելով ակտիվ ուսումնասիրությունը որպես ուսուցման խնդիր և բացատրաբար ուսումնասիրելով տվյալների ընտրության քաղաքականությունը, որտեղ քաղաքականությունը վերցնում է ակտիվ ուսուցման հորիստիկայի դերը Ամեն կարևոր է, որ մեր մեթոդը թույլ է տալիս ընտրության քաղաքականությունը, որը սովորվում է օգտագործելով սիմուլյացիա մեկ լեզու, փոխանցվել այլ լեզուների: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մեթոդը, օգտագործելով երկլեզվով կոչված էության ճանաչելը, հետևելով ավանդական ակտիվ ուսուցման ալգորիթմների հետ կապված հավասար բարելավումներ:', 'bn': 'সক্রিয় শিক্ষার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে যে তথ্যের ব্যাপারে ক্লাসিফারের জন্য একটি ছোট তথ্য বেছে নিতে পারে তা খুব সঠিক। এটি সাধারণত হিউরিস্টিক নির্বাচন পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা হয়, তবে এই ধরনের পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম সীমাবদ্ধ এবং এছাড়াও হিউরিস্টিক্সের প্রভাব ডা এই সমস্ত সংক্রান্ত বিষয়গুলো নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা সক্রিয় শিক্ষা শিক্ষা নির্মাণ করার মাধ্যমে একটি উপন্যাস স্থাপন করি শিক্ষার ক্ষেত্রে আরো শক্তিশালী ক্ষেত্রে বা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আমাদের পদ্ধতি অন্য ভাষায় সিমুলেশন ব্যবহার করে নির্বাচন নীতি শিক্ষা প্রদান করেছে। আমরা আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করি প্রথা স্বীকৃতি ব্যবহার করে, ঐতিহ্যবাহী সক্রিয় শিক্ষা অ্যালগোরিদমের উপর ইউনিফর্ম উন্নতি দেখি।', 'az': 'Etkili öyrənmək məlumatlarda öyrənən bir səssifəçi çox doğrudur. Bu, genellikle heuristik seçim metodlarından istifadə edilir, amma bu metodların etkinliği sınırlı və daha çox, heuristik işləri veri quruları arasında dəyişir. Bu ucbatları çəkmək üçün, fəaliyyət öyrənmək problemi olaraq fəaliyyət öyrənmək və məlumat seçmək siyasəsini a çıq-aydın öyrənmək üçün yeni bir formül tanıyırıq, və siyasəti fəaliyyətli öyrənmək heuristiğinin rolünü alır. Önemli olaraq, bizim metodumuz seçmə siyasəsini bir dilə simulasiya ilə öyrənmək üçün başqa dillərə daşımağa imkan verir. Bizim metodumuzu çox dilli entitə tanımasını istifadə edərək, nəticə etibarlı öyrənmə algoritminin üstündə üniformalı düzəltmələri gözləyirik.', 'bs': 'Aktivno učenje cilja je izabrati mali podskup podataka za annotaciju tako da je klasifikator naučen na podacima vrlo precizan. To se obično čini koristeći heurističke metode selekcije, međutim, učinkovitost takvih metoda je ograničena i više, učinkovitost heuristike se razlikuje između seta podataka. Za rješavanje tih nedostataka, predstavljamo novu formulaciju, ponovljajući aktivno učenje kao problem učenja pojačanja i jasno učeći politiku selekcije podataka, gdje politika uzima ulogu aktivnog heurističkog učenja. Naša metoda omogućava da se izborna politika naučila koristeći simulaciju na jedan jezik prebaci na druge jezike. Pokazujemo našu metodu korištenjem prejezičkog priznanja entiteta, posmatrajući uniformne poboljšanje nad tradicionalnim aktivnim algoritmima učenja.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge activ té l'objectiu de seleccionar un petit subconjunt de dades per anotació de tal manera que un classificador aprengut en les dades sigui molt precis. Això es fa normalment amb mètodes de selecció heurística, però l'eficacia d'aquests mètodes és limitada i, a més, el rendiment de l'heurística varia entre conjunts de dades. Per abordar aquestes deficiències, introduïm una nova formulació reformant l'aprenentatge actiu com un problem a d'aprenentatge de reforç i aprenent explícitament una política de selecció de dades, on la política té el paper de l'heurística d'aprenentatge actiu. Important, el nostre mètode permet que la política de selecció aprenida fent servir la simulació a un llenguatge sigui transferida a altres llengües. Demonstrem el nostre mètode utilitzant el reconeixement interlingüístic d'entitats anomenades, observant millores uniformes sobre algoritmes tradicionals d'aprenentatge actiu.", 'cs': 'Aktivní učení si klade za cíl vybrat malou podmnožinu dat pro anotaci tak, aby klasifikátor získaný na datech byl vysoce přesný. To se obvykle provádí pomocí heuristických metod výběru, nicméně efektivita těchto metod je omezená a výkonnost heuristiky se navíc liší mezi datovými sadami. Pro řešení těchto nedostatků představujeme novou formulaci tím, že přeformujeme aktivní učení jako problém posilování učení a explicitně se učíme politiku výběru dat, kde tato politika zaujímá roli heuristiky aktivního učení. Důležité je, že naše metoda umožňuje přenést politiku výběru pomocí simulace do jednoho jazyka do jiných jazyků. Naši metodu demonstrujeme pomocí cross-jazyčného rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit, pozorujeme jednotná zlepšení oproti tradičním algoritmům aktivního učení.', 'et': 'Aktiivse õppe eesmärk on valida väike alamhulk andmeid annoteerimiseks nii, et andmetest õppinud klassifitseerija oleks väga täpne. Seda tehakse tavaliselt heuristiliste valikumeetodite abil, kuid selliste meetodite efektiivsus on piiratud ja pealegi varieerub heuristika toimivus andmekogumite vahel. Nende puuduste kõrvaldamiseks võtame kasutusele uue sõnastuse, kujundades aktiivse õppe ümber tugevdava õppeprobleemina ja õppides selgesõnaliselt andmevaliku poliitikat, kus poliitika võtab üles aktiivse õppeheuristika rolli. Oluline on see, et meie meetod võimaldab simulatsiooni abil õppitud valikupoliitikat üle kanda teistesse keeltesse. Näitame oma meetodit, kasutades keeleülest nimega olemite tuvastamist, jälgides traditsiooniliste aktiivse õppe algoritmide ühtseid täiustusi.', 'tr': 'janlaşdyryş öwrenmek üçin sowgat üçin kiçi bir topary maglumaty saýlamak amaýyna gelinýär. Bu senediň üstünde bir klasifikaty gaty dogry. Bu köplenç heuristik saýlaw yöntemleri ullanýar, ýöne bu yönleriň etkinlik ýöne çykarylýar. Ýöne, heuristik saýlawlaryň arasynda üýtgeşmeleri çalşyrýar. Bu ýetlere çykmazlary çözmek üçin, aktiw öwrenmek üçin janlaşdyrmak üçin bir roman formasyny guruldyrys we maglumat saýlamak üçin, nirede polisiýa aktiw öwrenmek heuristikleriniň rolini alýar. Mümkin döwürimiz, simulasyýany bir dile ulanarak öwrenmek üçin saýlaw politikasyny başga dillere göçürmege rugsat berýär. Biz öz yöntemimizi çarpaz dilli bir zat tanamagy ullanýarys we däpli aktiw öwrenme algoritmalarynda üniforma gelişmeleri görmek üçin görkeýäris.', 'fi': 'Aktiivisen oppimisen tavoitteena on valita pieni tietojoukko merkintöjä varten siten, että tiedoista opittu luokittelija on erittäin tarkka. Tämä tehdään yleensä heuristisilla valintamenetelmillä, mutta näiden menetelmien tehokkuus on rajallinen ja lisäksi heuristiikan suorituskyky vaihtelee aineistojen välillä. Näiden puutteiden korjaamiseksi otamme käyttöön uudenlaisen muotoilun muotoilemalla aktiivisen oppimisen uudelleen vahvistavaksi oppimisongelmaksi ja oppimalla nimenomaisesti tiedon valintapolitiikkaa, jossa politiikka omaksuu aktiivisen oppimisen heuristiikan roolin. On tärkeää, että menetelmämme mahdollistaa simuloinnin avulla opitun valintakäytännön siirtymisen toiselle kielelle. Esittelemme menetelmämme käyttäen monikielistä nimettyä entiteettitunnistusta ja havainnoimme yhdenmukaisia parannuksia perinteisiin aktiivisiin oppimisalgoritmeihin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé, nglakoni nggambar sistem heuristik diuwisan, mengko iso nggawe sistem dadi, akeh operasi kanggo hekuristik dadi sak dadi. Ngawe mendhing nggawe dolanan sing beraksi iki, kita nguweh inputi tunnel perbudhakan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno sistêm kuwi nggawe kesempatan kanggo ngerasaye politik sing dipileksi dadi, supoyo kedhah politik tentang tanggal kuwi heuristik. Awak dhéwé, nggunakake sistem sing nyebatuhke diuwisan politik sing oleh nggunakake sistem sampeyan kanggo saben langa sing wis ngeranyir. Awak dhéwé éntukno ngerwih nggawe barang kelangan kelangan sami koyok nggawe barang kelangan winih, nggawe barang-nyebute kanggo ngerwih akeh cara-nyebute sistem yen nggawe lanjut layang-sistem.', 'ha': "Ana iya amfani da shirin aiki yana nufin ya zãɓi wani ƙarami na danne ɗin wa mai zartar da shirin zartar da kwamfyuta kamar wani mai fasasar da aka sanar da kan data, ya zama mai girma. Wannan ana yi amfani da shiryoyin zaɓanta na heuristic, kuma amma an ƙunsa da aikin waɗannan hanyõyin kuma a ƙara, aikin heuristics yana sãɓãni a tsakanin danasãri. Yana ƙara wa masu ƙaranci, ko kuma za mu fara wani takardar nowaya da za'a tsare learning masu haraka kamar wata ƙaranci wa lõkaci na ƙaranci, kuma munã fahimta wata rayi na zãɓen data, a inda musamman za'a karɓi rolin kara na da za'a karanta heuristic. Kima muhimu, metoden mu na yarda wata na zaɓa wanda aka sanar da shirin ayuka zuwa harshe guda dõmin a shige shi zuwa wasu harshe. Tuna nuna hanyoyinmu da za'a yi amfani da sunan cikin harshen-nau'in-nau'in-nau'in da aka faɗa abun gaskiya, domin ka ga gyarata kodi a kan algoritori na zamani da aka sani.", 'he': 'הלימודים הפעילים מתכוונים לבחור תת-קבוצה קטנה של נתונים להציעה ככה שהקלאסיפור שלמד על הנתונים מדויק מאוד. זה בדרך כלל נעשה באמצעות שיטות בחירה היוריסטית, עם זאת היעילות של שיטות כאלה מוגבלת וחוץ מזה, ההופעה של היוריסטיקה שונה בין קבוצות נתונים. כדי להתמודד עם החסרונות האלה, אנחנו מציגים צורה חדשה על ידי שינוי הלימוד הפעיל כבעיה של לימוד חיבורי וללמד באופן ברור מדיניות בחירת נתונים, שבה המדיניות לוקחת את תפקיד ההוריסטיקה של הלימוד הפעיל. חשוב, השיטה שלנו מאפשרת למדיניות הבחירה ללמוד באמצעות סימולציה לשפה אחת להעביר לשפות אחרות. אנחנו מציגים את השיטה שלנו באמצעות זיהוי ישויות בשם שפתיים, ומצפים בשיפורים במדים על אלגוריתמים של לימוד פעיל מסורתיים.', 'sk': 'Cilj aktivnega učenja je izbrati majhen podnabor podatkov za označevanje, tako da je klasifikator, ki se je naučil na podatkih, zelo natančen. To se običajno izvaja z uporabo heurističnih selekcijskih metod, vendar je učinkovitost teh metod omejena in poleg tega se učinkovitost heuristike razlikuje med nabori podatkov. Da bi odpravili te pomanjkljivosti, uvajamo novo formulacijo s preoblikovanjem aktivnega učenja kot okrepitvenega učnega problema in izrecno učenjem politike izbire podatkov, kjer politika prevzame vlogo aktivne učne heuristike. Pomembno je, da naša metoda omogoča, da se politika izbire, ki se je naučila s simulacijo v en jezik, prenese v druge jezike. Našo metodo predstavljamo z uporabo medjezičnega prepoznavanja entitet, pri čemer opazujemo enotne izboljšave v primerjavi s tradicionalnimi aktivnimi algoritmi učenja.', 'bo': 'སྒུལ་སློང་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆུང་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ཚན་ཆུང་ཞིག་བདམས་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ འདི་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་ཧྲིལ་ཡག་གདམ་ཀྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། འདིའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག To address these shortcomings, we introduce a novel formulation by reframing the active learning as a reinforcement learning problem and explicitly learning a data selection policy, where the policy takes the role of the active learning heuristic. གལ་སྲིད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་དང་། སྲོལ་སྒྱུར་གྱི་ཤེས་སྦྱོར'}
{'en': 'Split and Rephrase', 'ar': 'انقسام وإعادة صياغة', 'es': 'Dividir y reformular', 'fr': 'Scinder et reformuler', 'pt': 'Dividir e reformular', 'ja': '分割と言い換え', 'zh': '拆分及改撰', 'hi': 'विभाजित करें और Rephrase', 'ru': 'Разделить и перефразировать', 'ga': 'Scoilt agus Athfhriotal', 'hu': 'Felosztás és átfogalmazás', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διαίρεση και επαναδιατύπωση', 'kk': 'Бөлу және қайталау', 'it': 'Dividi e riformula', 'mk': 'Split and Rephrase', 'ml': 'വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചു പിരിയ്ക്കുക', 'mn': 'Тайлбарлаж', 'mt': 'Il-qsim u r-riformulazzjoni', 'lt': 'Skirti ir perskaičiuoti', 'pl': 'Podziel i sformułowanie', 'ro': 'Împărțirea și reformularea', 'no': 'Del og gjenopprett', 'ms': 'Split and Rephrase', 'sr': 'Razdvojite i ponovite', 'si': 'විස්තර කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයා', 'ta': 'பிரித்து மாற்று', 'ur': 'ٹکڑے ٹکڑے', 'so': 'Qaybin iyo dib u celin', 'sv': 'Dela och omformulera', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Chia và nhắc lại', 'nl': 'Splits en Herformuleren', 'hr': 'Razdvojiti i Rephrazirati', 'bg': 'Разделяне и преразглеждане', 'id': 'Split and Rephrase', 'da': 'Opdel og omformér', 'sw': 'Kugawanya na Rephrase', 'de': 'Teilen und Umformulieren', 'fa': 'تقسیم کنید و تکرار کنید', 'ko': '분할 및 재표현', 'tr': 'Ayrla we Gaýtala', 'am': 'undo-type', 'sq': 'Ndrysho dhe Riformo', 'af': 'Skei en Herhaal', 'az': 'Bölün və dəyişdir', 'hy': 'Բաժանել և վերաբաժանել', 'bn': 'বিভক্ত এবং পুনরায় বিভক্ত করুন', 'cs': 'Rozdělit a přeformulovat', 'bs': 'Razdvojite i ponovite', 'fi': 'Jakaminen ja muotoileminen uudelleen', 'ca': 'Dividir i reformular', 'et': 'Jaotamine ja ümbersõnastamine', 'jv': 'Split lan Debug', 'he': 'מחלק ושוב', 'sk': 'Razdelitev in preoblikovanje', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'bo': 'Split and Rephrase'}
{'en': 'We propose a new sentence simplification task (Split-and-Rephrase) where the aim is to split a complex sentence into a meaning preserving sequence of shorter sentences. Like sentence simplification, splitting-and-rephrasing has the potential of benefiting both natural language processing and societal applications. Because shorter sentences are generally better processed by NLP systems, it could be used as a preprocessing step which facilitates and improves the performance of parsers, semantic role labellers and machine translation systems. It should also be of use for people with reading disabilities because it allows the conversion of longer sentences into shorter ones. This paper makes two contributions towards this new task. First, we create and make available a benchmark consisting of 1,066,115 tuples mapping a single complex sentence to a sequence of sentences expressing the same meaning. Second, we propose five models (vanilla sequence-to-sequence to semantically-motivated models) to understand the difficulty of the proposed task.', 'ar': 'نقترح مهمة جديدة لتبسيط الجملة (Split-and-Rephrase) حيث يكون الهدف هو تقسيم الجملة المعقدة إلى معنى يحافظ على تسلسل الجمل القصيرة. مثل تبسيط الجملة ، فإن التقسيم وإعادة الصياغة لديه القدرة على الاستفادة من معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتطبيقات المجتمعية. نظرًا لأن الجمل القصيرة يتم معالجتها بشكل أفضل بواسطة أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، يمكن استخدامها كخطوة معالجة مسبقة تسهل وتحسن أداء المحللين ، واسمي الأدوار الدلالية وأنظمة الترجمة الآلية. يجب أن يكون مفيدًا أيضًا للأشخاص الذين يعانون من صعوبات في القراءة لأنه يسمح بتحويل الجمل الأطول إلى جمل أقصر. تقدم هذه الورقة مساهمتين في هذه المهمة الجديدة. أولاً ، نقوم بإنشاء وإتاحة مقياس مرجعي يتكون من 1066115 مجموعة ، مع تعيين جملة معقدة واحدة إلى سلسلة من الجمل التي تعبر عن نفس المعنى. ثانيًا ، نقترح خمسة نماذج (تسلسل الفانيليا إلى التسلسل إلى النماذج ذات الدوافع الدلالية) لفهم صعوبة المهمة المقترحة.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova tarefa de simplificação de frases (Split-and-Rephrase) onde o objetivo é dividir uma frase complexa em uma sequência de frases mais curtas preservando o significado. Assim como a simplificação de frases, a divisão e reformulação tem o potencial de beneficiar tanto o processamento de linguagem natural quanto as aplicações sociais. Como sentenças mais curtas geralmente são melhor processadas por sistemas de PNL, ela pode ser usada como uma etapa de pré-processamento que facilita e melhora o desempenho de analisadores, rotuladores de papéis semânticos e sistemas de tradução automática. Também deve ser útil para pessoas com deficiência de leitura, pois permite a conversão de frases mais longas em frases mais curtas. Este artigo traz duas contribuições para essa nova tarefa. Primeiro, criamos e disponibilizamos um benchmark composto por 1.066.115 tuplas mapeando uma única sentença complexa para uma sequência de sentenças que expressam o mesmo significado. Em segundo lugar, propomos cinco modelos (sequência-a-sequência baunilha a modelos semanticamente motivados) para entender a dificuldade da tarefa proposta.', 'es': 'Proponemos una nueva tarea de simplificación de oraciones (dividir y reformular) donde el objetivo es dividir una oración compleja en una secuencia de oraciones más cortas que preserve el significado. Al igual que la simplificación de oraciones, la división y reformulación tiene el potencial de beneficiar tanto al procesamiento del lenguaje natural como a las aplicaciones sociales. Debido a que las oraciones más cortas generalmente se procesan mejor en los sistemas de PNL, podrían usarse como un paso de preprocesamiento que facilita y mejora el rendimiento de los analizadores, los etiquetadores de roles semánticos y los sistemas de traducción automática. También debería ser útil para personas con discapacidades de lectura porque permite la conversión de oraciones más largas en oraciones más cortas. Este documento hace dos contribuciones para esta nueva tarea. Primero, creamos y ponemos a disposición un punto de referencia que consiste en 1.066.115 tuplas que asignan una sola oración compleja a una secuencia de oraciones que expresan el mismo significado. En segundo lugar, proponemos cinco modelos (de secuencia a secuencia de vainilla a modelos motivados semánticamente) para comprender la dificultad de la tarea propuesta.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle tâche de simplification des phrases (Split-and-Rephrase) dans laquelle l'objectif est de scinder une phrase complexe en une séquence de phrases plus courtes préservant le sens. Tout comme la simplification des phrases, la division et la reformulation peuvent bénéficier à la fois au traitement du langage naturel et aux applications sociétales. Étant donné que les phrases plus courtes sont généralement mieux traitées par les systèmes NLP, elles peuvent être utilisées comme étape de prétraitement qui facilite et améliore les performances des analyseurs, des étiqueteurs de rôles sémantiques et des systèmes de traduction automatique. Il devrait également être utile aux personnes ayant des troubles de lecture, car il permet de convertir des peines plus longues en peines plus courtes. Ce document apporte deux contributions à cette nouvelle tâche. Tout d'abord, nous créons et mettons à disposition un benchmark composé de 1 066 115 tuples mappant une phrase complexe unique à une séquence de phrases exprimant le même sens. Ensuite, nous proposons cinq modèles (modèles classiques de séquence à séquence à motifs sémantiques) pour comprendre la difficulté de la tâche proposée.", 'ja': '複雑な文を短い文の意味を保持するシーケンスに分割することを目的とした新しい文の簡略化タスク（分割と置換）を提案します。 文章の簡略化と同様に、分割と言い換えは、自然言語処理と社会的アプリケーションの両方に利益をもたらす可能性があります。 短い文章は一般に、ＮＬＰシステムによってより良好に処理されるため、それは、構文解析器、セマンティックロールラベラー、及び機械翻訳システムのパフォーマンスを容易にし、向上させる前処理ステップとして使用され得る。 長い文章を短い文章に変換できるので、読書障害者にとっても有用であるはずです。 本論文は、この新しいタスクに向けて2つの貢献をしている。 まず、単一の複雑な文章を同じ意味を表す一連の文章にマッピングする1,066,115タプルからなるベンチマークを作成し、利用可能にします。 第二に、提案されたタスクの難しさを理解するために、5つのモデル（意味論的に動機づけられたモデルへのバニラシーケンスからシーケンス）を提案する。', 'zh': '新句简务(拆分改作),拆为短句之序。 与句简化同,拆分改写有可使自然语言处世宜有益。 短句常以NLP统为善,故可以为预处理步驿,以趋解析器,语义角色机器翻译之性也。 亦当有用于有阅读障碍者,以其许转长为短句也。 本文为二献。 首创一由 1,066115 个元基试之,该元组将杂句映同义之句序。 其次,立五(vanilla sequence-to-sequence于语义)以知其难。', 'hi': 'हम एक नए वाक्य सरलीकरण कार्य (स्प्लिट-एंड-रेफ्रेज़) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां उद्देश्य एक जटिल वाक्य को छोटे वाक्यों के संरक्षित अनुक्रम को संरक्षित करने वाले अर्थ में विभाजित करना है। वाक्य सरलीकरण की तरह, विभाजन-और-rephrasing में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण और सामाजिक अनुप्रयोगों दोनों को लाभान्वित करने की क्षमता है। क्योंकि छोटे वाक्यों को आम तौर पर एनएलपी सिस्टम द्वारा बेहतर तरीके से संसाधित किया जाता है, इसका उपयोग एक प्रीप्रोसेसिंग चरण के रूप में किया जा सकता है जो पार्सर, सिमेंटिक रोल लेबलर और मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों के प्रदर्शन को सुविधाजनक और बेहतर बनाता है। यह पढ़ने की अक्षमता वाले लोगों के लिए भी उपयोग किया जाना चाहिए क्योंकि यह लंबे वाक्यों को छोटे लोगों में परिवर्तित करने की अनुमति देता है। यह पेपर इस नए कार्य के लिए दो योगदान देता है। सबसे पहले, हम एक बेंचमार्क बनाते हैं और उपलब्ध कराते हैं जिसमें 1,066,115 ट्यूपल्स एक ही अर्थ को व्यक्त करने वाले वाक्यों के अनुक्रम में एक एकल जटिल वाक्य का मानचित्रण करते हैं। दूसरा, हम प्रस्तावित कार्य की कठिनाई को समझने के लिए पांच मॉडल (वेनिला अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम को शब्दार्थ-प्रेरित मॉडल के लिए) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую задачу по упрощению предложения (Split-and-Rephrase), где цель состоит в том, чтобы разделить сложное предложение на смысл, сохраняя последовательность коротких предложений. Как и упрощение предложения, разделение и перефразирование может принести пользу как обработке естественного языка, так и социальным приложениям. Поскольку более короткие предложения, как правило, лучше обрабатываются системами NLP, их можно использовать в качестве этапа предварительной обработки, что облегчает и улучшает производительность парсеров, семантических ролевых меток и систем машинного перевода. Он также должен быть полезен для людей с ограниченными способностями к чтению, поскольку он позволяет преобразовывать более длинные предложения в более короткие. Настоящий документ представляет собой два вклада в решение этой новой задачи. Во-первых, мы создаем и делаем доступным эталон, состоящий из 1 066 115 кортежей, сопоставляющих одно сложное предложение с последовательностью предложений, выражающих одно и то же значение. Во-вторых, мы предлагаем пять моделей (ванильная последовательность к семантически мотивированным моделям), чтобы понять сложность предлагаемой задачи.', 'ga': 'Molaimid tasc nua simplithe abairte ( Scoilt agus Athfhráma ) ina bhfuil sé mar aidhm abairt chasta a roinnt ina seicheamh abairtí níos giorra a chaomhnú. Cosúil le simpliú na n-abairtí, tá an poitéinseal ag scoilteadh agus athfhriotú dul chun sochair do phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha agus d’fheidhmeanna na sochaí. Toisc gur fearr a dhéanann córais NLP abairtí níos giorra a phróiseáil go ginearálta, d’fhéadfaí é a úsáid mar chéim réamhphróiseála a éascaíonn agus a fheabhsaíonn feidhmíocht parsálaí, lipéadóirí róil shéimeantacha agus córais aistriúcháin mheaisín. Ba cheart go mbeadh sé úsáideach freisin do dhaoine faoi mhíchumas léitheoireachta toisc go gceadaíonn sé abairtí níos faide a thiontú go abairtí níos giorra. Déanann an páipéar seo dhá chuidiú leis an tasc nua seo. Ar an gcéad dul síos, cruthaímid agus cuirimid ar fáil tagarmharc comhdhéanta de 1,066,115 tuple ag mapáil abairt choimpléascach amháin le seicheamh abairtí a chuireann an bhrí chéanna in iúl. Ar an dara dul síos, molaimid cúig mhúnla (seicheamh fanaile go seicheamh go samhlacha seimeantach-spreagtha) chun deacracht an taisc mholta a thuiscint.', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy új mondatszerűsítési feladatot (Split-and-Reforme), amelynek célja, hogy egy komplex mondatot rövidebb mondatsorozatot megőrizzünk. A mondatok egyszerűsítéséhez hasonlóan a felosztás és az átfogalmazás mind a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás, mind a társadalmi alkalmazások előnyeit is előnyös lehet. Mivel a rövidebb mondatokat általában az NLP rendszerek jobban feldolgozják, előfeldolgozási lépésként lehetne használni, amely megkönnyíti és javítja az elemzők, a szemantikus szerepkörcímkézők és a gépi fordítási rendszerek teljesítményét. Hasznosnak kell lennie az olvasási fogyatékossággal élők számára is, mivel lehetővé teszi a hosszabb mondatok rövidebbé alakítását. Ez a dokumentum két hozzájárulást nyújt ehhez az új feladathoz. Először is létrehozunk és rendelkezésre bocsátunk egy 1 066 115 tupletből álló referenciaértéket, amely egyetlen komplex mondatot egy azonos jelentést kifejező mondatsorozathoz rendel. Másodszor öt modellt javasolunk (vanília szekvenciától szekvenciáig szemantikailag motivált modellekig), hogy megértsük a javasolt feladat nehézségét.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια νέα εργασία απλοποίησης προτάσεων (Διαίρεση και αναδιατύπωση) όπου ο στόχος είναι να διαιρεθεί μια σύνθετη πρόταση σε μια έννοια που διατηρεί ακολουθία συντομότερων προτάσεων. Όπως και η απλοποίηση των προτάσεων, ο διαχωρισμός και η αναδιατύπωση έχουν τη δυνατότητα να ωφελήσουν τόσο την επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας όσο και τις κοινωνικές εφαρμογές. Επειδή οι συντομότερες προτάσεις γενικά επεξεργάζονται καλύτερα από τα συστήματα θα μπορούσε να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως βήμα προεπεξεργασίας που διευκολύνει και βελτιώνει την απόδοση των αναλύσεων, των σημασιολογικών ετικετών ρόλων και των συστημάτων μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Θα πρέπει επίσης να είναι χρήσιμο για άτομα με αναγνωστική αναπηρία, επειδή επιτρέπει τη μετατροπή μακρύτερων προτάσεων σε μικρότερες. Το παρόν έγγραφο συνεισφέρει δύο φορές σε αυτό το νέο έργο. Πρώτον, δημιουργούμε και θέτουμε στη διάθεση μας ένα σημείο αναφοράς που αποτελείται από 1,066,115 Tuples που αντιστοιχούν μια ενιαία σύνθετη πρόταση σε μια ακολουθία προτάσεων που εκφράζουν το ίδιο νόημα. Δεύτερον, προτείνουμε πέντε μοντέλα (αλληλουχία βανίλιας σε σημασιολογικά υποκινούμενα μοντέλα) για να κατανοήσουμε τη δυσκολία της προτεινόμενης εργασίας.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი სიტყვების განსახულებელი დავალება (გაყოფილი და განსახულებელი) სადაც მიზეზი არის გაყოფილი კომპლექსი სიტყვების შესახებ ცოტა სიტყვების შესახებ. მაგალითად სიტყვების განხორცია, გაყოფილება და რეფრაცია აქვს პროცენტის გამოსახულება და საზოგადოებო პროცესი და საზოგადოებო პროცესი. რადგან კიდევ კიდევ სიტყვები უფრო უფრო უფრო გამოყენებულია NLP სისტემებით, ეს შეიძლება გამოყენება როგორც წინაპროცესების წინაპროცესების წინაპროცესების, სიმენტიკური ასევე უნდა იყოს გამოყენება ადამიანებისთვის, რომლებიც უფრო ცოტა სიტყვების შემცვლელობას უფრო ცოტა სიტყვებისთვის. ეს წიგნი ახალი დავალების შესახებ ორი დამატება. პირველად, ჩვენ შექმნით და გამოიყენებთ 1 066,115 tuples-ზე, რომელიც ერთი კომპლექსი სიტყვას ერთი სიტყვას, რომელიც იგივე ნიშნავს. მეორე, ჩვენ გვეძლევა ხუთ მოდელები (განილური სერექცია-დან-სერექცია სმენტიკურად მოტივირებული მოდელებისთვის) გავიგოთ მინდომარებული რაოდენობის რთული.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują sakinio supaprastinimo užduotį (dalijimąsi ir perskaičiavimą), kuria siekiama padalyti sudėtingą sakinį į reikšmę, išsaugojančią trumpesnių sakinių seką. Kaip ir sakinių supaprastinimas, dalijimasis ir pakartotinis formuluotės gali būti naudingos natūraliam kalbų apdorojimui ir visuomenei. Kadangi trumpesnius sakinius paprastai geriau tvarko NLP sistemos, jie galėtų būti naudojami kaip parengiamasis etapas, palengvinantis ir gerinantis analizatorių, semantinio vaidmens etikečių ir mašinų vertimo sistemų veiksmingumą. Ji taip pat turėtų būti naudinga skaitymo neįgaliesiems, nes leidžia pakeisti ilgesnius sakinius trumpesniais. Šiame dokumente prisidedama prie šios naujos užduoties. Pirma, mes sukuriame ir pateikiame lyginamąjį rodiklį, sudarytą iš 1 066 115 kartų, kuriame pateikiamas vienas sudėtingas sakinys, išreikštas ta pačia prasme. Antra, siūlome penkis modelius (vanilės seka po sekos semantiškai motyvuotiems modeliams) suprasti siūlomos užduoties sunkumus.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo compito di semplificazione della frase (Split-and-Refrase) in cui l'obiettivo è quello di dividere una frase complessa in una sequenza di frasi più brevi. Come la semplificazione delle frasi, la suddivisione e la riformulazione ha il potenziale di beneficiare sia dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale che delle applicazioni sociali. Poiché le frasi più brevi sono generalmente elaborate meglio dai sistemi NLP, potrebbe essere usato come fase di pre-elaborazione che facilita e migliora le prestazioni di parser, etichettatori di ruolo semantici e sistemi di traduzione automatica. Dovrebbe essere utile anche per le persone con disabilità di lettura perché consente la conversione di frasi più lunghe in frasi più brevi. Il presente documento fornisce due contributi a questo nuovo compito. In primo luogo, creiamo e mettiamo a disposizione un benchmark composto da 1.066.115 tuples mapping di una singola frase complessa ad una sequenza di frasi che esprimono lo stesso significato. In secondo luogo, proponiamo cinque modelli (sequenza a sequenza vanilla a modelli semanticamente motivati) per comprendere la difficoltà del compito proposto.", 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова задача за поедноставување на речениците (Разделење и рефразирање) каде што целта е поделба на комплексна реченица во значење зачувување на посредба на кратки реченици. Како и поедноставувањето на речениците, поделбата и рефразирањето има потенцијал да има корист од природното обработување на јазикот и општествените апликации. Бидејќи кратките реченици генерално се подобро процесирани од страна на системите на НЛП, истиот може да се користи како предпроцесиран чекор кој го олеснува и подобрува резултатот на анализаторите, семантичните означувачи на улогата и машинските преведувачки системи. Исто така, треба да биде корисно за луѓето со инвалидност во читање бидејќи овозможува претворање на подолги реченици во помали. Овој документ дава два придонеси за оваа нова задача. Прво, ние создаваме и ставаме на располагање benchmark кој се состои од 1.066.115 двојни мапирање на една комплексна реченица на секвенца на реченици кои го изразуваат истото значење. Второ, предложуваме пет модели (ванилска секвенца по секвенца за семантички мотивирани модели) за да се разбере тешкотијата на предложената задача.', 'kk': 'Біз жаңа сөздерді қайталау тапсырмасын (бөлу және қайталау) тапсырмасын таңдаймыз. Мақсатты комплексті сөздерді қысқа сөздердің ретін сақтау мәліметіне бөлу. Сөздерді қарапайымдастыру, бөлу және рефрациялау сияқты табиғи тілдерді өңдеу және әлемдік қолданбаларды пайдалану мүмкіндігі бар. Себебі қысқа сөйлемелер кәдімгі NLP жүйелерінде жақсы өзгертілген болса, ол талдаушыларды, семантикалық роль жарлықтарын және машинаны аудару жүйелерін көмектесу және жақсарту үшін қолданады. Сонымен қатар бұл қиындықтарды оқу мүмкіндігін қолдану керек, себебі бұл ұзақ сөздерді қысқа сөздерге аударуға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл қағаз жаңа тапсырмаға екі көмек береді. Біріншіден, біз 1 066,115 tuple құрылып, бір комплекс сөздерді бір мәліметті келтірген сөздер ретінде көрсету және қол жеткіземіз. Екіншіден, бұл тапсырманың маңыздылығын түсінуге бес үлгілерін (vanilla sequence-to-sequence) ұсындық.', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu kompitu ġdid ta' simplifikazzjoni tas-sentenza (Split-and-Rephrase) fejn l-għan huwa li sentenza kumplessa tinqasam f'sens li tippreserva sekwenza ta' sentenzi iqsar. Bħal simplifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi, il-qsim u r-riformulazzjoni għandhom il-potenzjal li jibbenefikaw kemm mill-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali kif ukoll mill-applikazzjonijiet tas-soċjetà. Because shorter sentences are generally better processed by NLP systems, it could be used as a preprocessing step which facilitates and improves the performance of parsers, semantic role labellers and machine translation systems.  Għandu jkun utli wkoll għal persuni b’diżabilitajiet fil-qari minħabba li jippermetti l-konverżjoni ta’ sentenzi itwal f’sentenzi iqsar. This paper makes two contributions towards this new task.  L-ewwel nett, a ħna nħolqu u nqiegħdu għad-dispożizzjoni punt ta’ riferiment li jikkonsisti f’1,066,115-il darba li jimmappa sentenza kumplessa waħda għal sekwenza ta’ sentenzi li jesprimu l-istess tifsira. It-tieni nett, qed nipproponu ħames mudelli (minn sekwenza għal sekwenza għall-mudelli motivati semantikament) biex nifhmu d-diffikultà tal-kompitu propost.", 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan tugas mudahsuaian kalimat baru (Split-and-Rephrase) dimana tujuan adalah untuk membahagi kalimat kompleks kepada makna menyimpan urutan kalimat yang lebih pendek. Seperti kemudahan kalimat, pemisahan-dan-semula perkataan mempunyai potensi untuk menguntungkan kedua-dua pemprosesan bahasa alam dan aplikasi masyarakat. Because shorter sentences are generally better processed by NLP systems, it could be used as a preprocessing step which facilitates and improves the performance of parsers, semantic role labellers and machine translation systems.  Ia juga patut digunakan untuk orang-orang dengan cacat membaca kerana ia membolehkan penukaran kalimat yang lebih panjang menjadi kalimat yang lebih pendek. Kertas ini membuat dua kontribusi untuk tugas baru ini. Pertama, kita mencipta dan memperolehkan tanda referensi yang terdiri dari 1,066,115 kali lipat memetakan satu kalimat kompleks ke urutan kalimat yang mengekspresikan makna yang sama. Kedua, kami cadangkan lima model (rangkaian-ke-rangkaian vanila untuk model bermotif semantik) untuk memahami kesulitan tugas yang diusulkan.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt setningsfeileringsoppgåve (Split-and-Rephrase) der målet er å dele eit kompleks setning til ein betydning som lagrar sekvens av kortere setningar. Som setningsfunksjon, splitting og rephrasing har potensialen til å bruka både naturspråkoplingar og samfunnsprogrammer. Fordi kortere setningar er generelt bedre handsamar av NLP-systemet, kan det brukast som eit forhandsamingssteg som tilgjengeleg og forbedrar utviklinga av tolkare, semantiske rolletikettar og maskineoversettelsystemer. Det bør også vera nyttig for folk med lesing av invaliditet, fordi det tillater konvertering av lengre setningar til kortere. Denne papiret gjer to bidrag mot denne nye oppgåva. Først lager vi og gjer tilgjengeleg ein benchmark som inneheld av 1.066.115 tuplar som karterer ei enkelt kompleks setning til ei rekkjefølgje setningar som uttrykker det same mening. Andre, vi foreslår fem modeller (vanilla sequence-to-sequence til semantisk motivert modeller) for å forstå vanskeligheten til den foreslåde oppgåva.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പുതിയ വാക്ക് എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്ന ജോലി (വിഭാഗം- ആന്\u200dഡ്-റിപ്രാസ്) വാക്കുകള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം വേര വാക്ക് ലളിതമാക്കുന്നത് പോലെ, വിഭജിക്കുന്നതും പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും സാമൂഹിക പ് കാരണം കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകള്\u200d NLP സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പൊതുവായി മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പാര്\u200dസറുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും സ വായിക്കുന്ന പ്രാബല്ലാത്ത വായിക്കുന്ന ആളുകള്\u200dക്കും അത് ഉപയോഗിക്കേണ്ടതാണ്. കാരണം അത് കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകളിലേ This paper makes two contributions towards this new task.  ആദ്യം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഉണ്ടാക്കുകയും, ഒരേ അര്\u200dത്ഥം പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരേ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു വാക രണ്ടാമത്, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയുടെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ട് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d അഞ്ച് മോഡലുകള്\u200d (വാനില്ലാ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ്', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă sarcină de simplificare a propozițiilor (Split-and-Refraze) în care scopul este de a împărți o propoziție complexă într-o înțeles păstrând secvența de propoziții mai scurte. Ca și simplificarea propozițiilor, divizarea și reformularea are potențialul de a beneficia atât de prelucrarea limbajului natural, cât și de aplicațiile societale. Deoarece propozițiile mai scurte sunt, în general, mai bine procesate de sistemele NLP, ar putea fi folosite ca un pas de pre-procesare care facilitează și îmbunătățește performanța parserelor, etichetelor de roluri semantice și a sistemelor de traducere automată. De asemenea, ar trebui să fie utilă persoanelor cu dizabilități de citire, deoarece permite conversia propozițiilor mai lungi în propoziții mai scurte. Acest document aduce două contribuţii la această nouă sarcină. În primul rând, creăm și punem la dispoziție un benchmark format din 1.066.115 tuples care cartografiază o singură propoziție complexă la o secvență de propoziții care exprimă același sens. În al doilea rând, propunem cinci modele (vanilie secvență-la-secvență la modele motivate semantic) pentru a înțelege dificultatea sarcinii propuse.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe zadanie uproszczenia zdań (Split-and-Redfrase), w którym celem jest podzielenie zdania złożonego na znaczenie zachowujące sekwencję krótszych zdań. Podobnie jak uproszczenie zdań, podział i przekształcenie może przynieść korzyści zarówno przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego, jak i zastosowaniom społecznym. Ponieważ krótsze zdania są zazwyczaj lepiej przetwarzane przez systemy NLP, można je wykorzystać jako krok wstępnego przetwarzania, który ułatwia i poprawia wydajność parserów, semantycznych oznaczaczy systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego. Powinna być również przydatna dla osób z niepełnosprawnością czytania, ponieważ umożliwia konwersję dłuższych zdań na krótsze. Niniejszy dokument wnosi dwa wkłady w realizację tego nowego zadania. Po pierwsze, tworzymy i udostępniamy referencję składającą się z 1,066,115 kroków mapujących pojedyncze złożone zdanie do sekwencji zdań wyrażających to samo znaczenie. Po drugie, proponujemy pięć modeli (waniliowa sekwencja do semantycznie motywowane modele), aby zrozumieć trudność proponowanego zadania.', 'mn': 'Бид шинэ өгүүлбэрийг хялбарлах үйл ажиллагаа (Split-and-Rephrase) гэсэн зорилго нь цогц өгүүлбэрийг богино өгүүлбэрийг хадгалах утгатай болгох юм. Жишээ нь өгүүлбэр хялбарчлах, хуваагдах, хуваагдах нь байгалийн хэл болон нийгмийн хэрэглээ хоёуланг ашиглах боломжтой байдаг. Яагаад гэвэл богино өгүүлбэрүүд нь NLP системээс илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэж байгаа учраас энэ нь ажиллаачид, semantic role labeller, машины орчуулах системийн үйлдвэрлэлийг дэмжиж, сайжруулж чадна. Энэ нь өвчин чадварыг уншиж чадах хүмүүст хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй. Учир нь энэ нь урт өгүүлбэрийг богино өгүүлбэрт шилжүүлэх боломжтой. Энэ цаас шинэ ажил дээр хоёр нөлөөлөх болно. Эхлээд бид нэг комплекс өгүүлбэрийг ижил утгыг илэрхийлж байгаа өгүүлбэрүүдийн дарааллаар газрын зураг бүтээж, ашиглаж байна. Хоёрдугаар, бид таван загвар (vanilla sequence-to-sequence to semantically-motivated models) санал өгсөн ажлын хэцүү хэцүү байдлыг ойлгохын тулд санал өгдөг.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa shaqo fudud oo xafiiska fudud (Split-and-Rephrase) kaas oo ay ku qoran tahay in lagu kala qeybiyo ereyga complex ah oo loogu talo galay in lagu ilaaliyo xiliga hadalka gaaban. Sida fududeynta ereyga, kala soocmaalidda iyo dib-u-soocidda waxaa suurtagal ah in uu faa’iido u helo baaraandegista luqada dabiiciga iyo codsiga bulshada. Maxaa yeelay nidaamka NLP waxey si gaaban uga baaraandegaan hababka gaaban, waxaa loo isticmaali karaa qalabka hor-baaraandegista oo hagaajiya sameynta baarlamayaasha, tababarada halka iyo nidaamka turjumidda maskaxda. Sidoo kale waxaa haboon in loo isticmaalo dadka naafada la’aanta akhriyo, sababtoo ah waxay u fasaxaa in lagu beddelo fursad dheer. Warqadan ayaa laba qayb u dhigaya shaqadan cusub. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu abuurnaa iyo waxaynu samaysanaynaa sawir ay ka mid tahay 1,066,115 tusaale oo ku sawiraan kaliya hal erayo oo isku mid ah. Second, waxaan soo jeedaynaa shan tusaale (vanilla xilli-jeer-jeer) si aan u fahanno dhibaatada shaqada la soo jeeday.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi zadatak pojednostavljanja rečenica (Split-and-Rephrase), gdje je cilj podeliti složenu rečenicu u značenje čuvanja sekvence kraćih rečenica. Kao pojednostavljanje rečenica, razdvajanje i represiranje ima potencijal koristi prirodne jezičke obrade i društvene aplikacije. Zato što su kraće rečenice uglavnom bolje obrađuje NLP sistemi, moglo bi se koristiti kao korak preobrađivanja koji olakšava i poboljšava učinkovitost parsera, semantičkih etiketera uloge i sistema prevoda mašine. To bi takođe trebalo biti korisno i za ljude sa pročitanjem invaliditeta jer omogućava preobraćanje duže rečenice u kraće rečenice. Ovaj papir donosi dva doprinosa prema ovom novom zadatku. Prvo, stvorimo i dostavljamo kritiku koja sastoji od 1.066.115 tupla, mapirajući jednu složenu rečenicu u sekvenci rečenica koja izražavaju isto značenje. Drugo, predlažemo pet modela (vanilna sekvencija do sekvence semantički motiviranih modela) da bi razumeli teškoće predloženog zadatka.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய வாக்கு எளிதாக்கும் செயலை (பிரித்து மற்றும்- மற்றும் பிரித்தால்) தொடர் சிறிய வாக்கியங்களை சேமி வாக்கு எளிமைப்படுத்தல், பிரித்தல் மற்றும் மீண்டும் பிரித்தல் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு மற்றும் சமூக பயன்பாடு ஏனென்றால் சிறிய வாக்குகள் NLP அமைப்புகளால் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது பொதுவாக முன்செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது பார்சர்கள், அரைந்திக் பங்கு விளையாட்டு  இதுவும் சிறிய வாக்கியங்களை மாற்ற அனுமதிக்கும் படிக்க முடியாத மக்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்தல் வேண்டும். இந்த தாள் இந்த புதிய பணிக்கு இரண்டு பங்கு செய்கிறது. முதலில், நாம் 1,066,115 துப்புகளை உருவாக்கி ஒரே சிக்கலான வாக்கியங்களின் பின்னணி வாக்கியங்களுக்கு ஒரே துண்டு வாக்கியத்தை வரைதலாம். இரண்டாவது, நாம் ஐந்து மாதிரிகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் ( வானிலா தொடர்ச்சி- அடுக்கு வரிசையில் இருக்கும் மாதிரிகளுக்கு), பரிந்துரைக', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් වාක්ය සරලකුණු වාක්ය (ස්ප්\u200dරිට් හා ප්\u200dරතිකාරය) කිරීමේ අරමුණය තමයි සංකුණු වාක්ය වෙනුවෙන් අදහස් කරනවා කියල වාක්ය සරලිකරණය වගේ, පැටලීම් සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරණය සමග සාමාජික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ සමාජික භාවිතාව සඳහා ප මොකද පොඩි වාක්ය NLP පද්ධතියෙන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම හොඳයි ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා  ඒක වගේම පාවිච්චි වෙන්න ඕනේ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා, මොකද ඒක ලොකු වචන වච මේ පැත්තේ මේ අලුත් වැඩයට සම්බන්ධ දෙකක් තියෙනවා. මුලින්ම, අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එකක් හදන්න සහ පුළුවන් කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ 1,066,115 ටුප්ල් එකක් සංකෘතික වාක්යයක් එකම අද දෙවෙනි විදියට, අපි මොඩේල් පහක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා (vanilla sequence-to-sequence to semantic-Motive Model) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු වැඩේ අමාරුය තේරුම් ගන්න.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی جماعت سفارش کا کام پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جہاں ایک پیچیدہ جماعت کو چھوٹی جماعت کی سفارش کرنے کا مطلب ہے جیسے جماعت آسانی، تقسیم اور دوبارہ تقسیم کرنے کی امکان ہے کہ طبیعی زبان پردازش اور اجتماعی کاروباروں کو فائدہ پہنچا سکے۔ کیونکہ چھوٹے جماعتیں NLP سیستموں سے بہتر طریقہ کی جاتی ہیں، یہ ایک پرپرپرس سٹم کے طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے جو پارس، سیمانٹی رول لیبلر اور ماشین ترجمہ سیستموں کے کامیابی کو آسان اور بہتر کر دیتا ہے. یہ بھی مصیبت پڑھنے والے لوگوں کے لئے فائدہ پہنچانا چاہیے کیونکہ یہ بہت زیادہ کلمات کو چھوٹی باتوں میں تبدیل کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. یہ کاغذ اس نوی کام کی طرف دو حصہ دیتا ہے۔ پہلے، ہم نے ایک بنچم مارک بنایا اور موجود بنایا ہے جو 1,066,115 ٹوپل میں ہے جو ایک پیچیدہ جماعت کا ایک جماعت کی تعریف کے ساتھ ایک ہی معنی بیان کرتی ہے۔ دوسرا، ہم پانچ مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں (vanilla sequence-to-sequence to semantically-motivated models) کہ پیشنهاد کے کام کی مشکل سمجھ سکیں.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny mening förenkling uppgift (Split-and-Refrase) där syftet är att dela upp en komplex mening i en betydelsebevarande sekvens av kortare meningar. Liksom förenkling av meningar har uppdelning och omformulering potential att gynna både behandling av naturligt språk och samhällstillämpningar. Eftersom kortare meningar generellt behandlas bättre av NLP-system, skulle det kunna användas som ett förbehandlingssteg som underlättar och förbättrar prestandan hos tolkare, semantiska rollmärkningssystem och maskinöversättningssystem. Den bör också vara till nytta för personer med lässvårigheter eftersom den gör det möjligt att omvandla längre meningar till kortare. Detta dokument ger två bidrag till denna nya uppgift. Först skapar och gör vi ett riktmärke bestående av 1 066 115 tupler som kartlägger en enda komplex mening till en sekvens av meningar som uttrycker samma mening. För det andra föreslår vi fem modeller (vanilj sekvens-till-sekvens till semantiskt motiverade modeller) för att förstå svårigheten med den föreslagna uppgiften.', 'uz': "Biz yangi so'zlarni ajratish va qayta almashtirish imkoniyatini bir necha so'zlarni saqlash imkoniyatini yaratish mumkin. Shunday so'zlar oddiylik so'zlarini ajratish va qaytadan qayta tahrirlash nativiy tilni boshqarish va jamiyat dasturlariga yordam berish mumkin. Chunki bir nechta so'zlar NLP tizimlari orqali yaxshi bajariladi, buni parserlar, semantik role labellari va maskin tarjima tizimlarini bajarish imkoniyatini bajarishiga foydalanishi mumkin. Ularni oʻqish uchun foydalanish kerak, chunki uzoq soʻzlarni qisqa soʻzlarga aylantirish imkoniyatini yaratishga ruxsat beradi. Bu qogʻoz bu yangi vazifa uchun ikkita muammolar qiladi. Birinchisi, biz 1,066,115 vositalarning bir murakkab so'zni chizish va bir xil so'zlarni bir necha so'zlar bilan kelib chiqarish. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz quyidagi vazifaning qismini tushunish uchun besh modellarni (vanilla sequence to'xtatish uchun o'ylaymiz).", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một nhiệm vụ cải tạo bản án mới (tách và lặp lại) nơi mục đích là chia một câu phức tạp thành một nghĩa là giữ chuỗi các câu ngắn hơn. Giống như đơn giản bản án, chia và diễn tả lại có khả năng cả việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên lẫn các ứng dụng xã hội. Bởi vì các câu ngắn hơn thường được xử lý tốt hơn bởi hệ thống Njala, nó có thể được dùng như một bước tiến xử lý trước, hỗ trợ và cải thiện hiệu quả của cha xứ, soạn thảo bí kíp và hệ thống dịch chuyển máy. Nó cũng nên có ích cho người khuyết tật đọc vì nó cho phép phiên bản dài hơn thành câu ngắn hơn. Tờ giấy này đóng góp hai phần cho nhiệm vụ mới này. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi tạo ra và cung cấp một tiêu chuẩn có thể gồm một đường ống 1,062,115, quét một bản vẽ một bản án phức tạp thành một chuỗi các câu diễn tả cùng một ý nghĩa. Thứ hai, chúng tôi đề xuất năm mô hình (dãy-tới-trình-vani với các mô hình động theo ngữ nghĩa) để hiểu được khó khăn của nhiệm vụ được đề nghị.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова задача за опростяване на изреченията (разделяне и рефразиране), където целта е да се раздели сложно изречение на смисъл, запазвайки последователността от по-кратки изречения. Подобно на опростяването на изреченията, разделянето и преформулирането има потенциала да облагодетелства както обработката на естествения език, така и обществените приложения. Тъй като по-кратките изречения обикновено се обработват по-добре от системите за НЛП, тя може да се използва като стъпка на предварителна обработка, която улеснява и подобрява ефективността на анализаторите, семантичните етикетери за роли и системите за машинен превод. Тя трябва да бъде полезна и за хора с увреждания на четенето, тъй като позволява превръщането на по-дълги изречения в по-къси. Този документ прави два приноса към тази нова задача. Първо, създаваме и предоставяме показател, състоящ се от 1 066 115 тупле, картографирайки едно сложно изречение към последователност от изречения, изразяващи същото значение. Второ, предлагаме пет модела (ванилова последователност-към-последователност до семантично мотивирани модели), за да разберем трудността на предложената задача.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe zinvereenvoudigingstaak voor (splitsen en herformuleren) waarbij het doel is om een complexe zin op te splitsen in een betekenisbehoud opeenvolging van kortere zinnen. Net als de vereenvoudiging van zinnen heeft splitsing-and-herformulering het potentieel om zowel natuurlijke taalverwerking als maatschappelijke toepassingen ten goede te komen. Omdat kortere zinnen over het algemeen beter worden verwerkt door NLP-systemen, kan het worden gebruikt als een voorverwerkingsstap die de prestaties van parsers, semantische rollabellers en machinevertaalsystemen vergemakkelijkt en verbetert. Het zou ook nuttig moeten zijn voor mensen met een leesbeperking omdat het de omzetting van langere zinnen in kortere zinnen mogelijk maakt. Dit document levert twee bijdragen aan deze nieuwe taak. Eerst maken we een benchmark die bestaat uit 1,066,115 tupels die een enkele complexe zin toewijzen aan een reeks zinnen die dezelfde betekenis uitdrukken. Ten tweede stellen we vijf modellen voor (vanille sequence-to-sequence tot semantisch gemotiveerde modellen) om de moeilijkheid van de voorgestelde taak te begrijpen.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine neue Satzvereinfachungsaufgabe (Split-and-Reprase) vor, bei der das Ziel besteht, einen komplexen Satz in eine bedeutungserhaltende Abfolge kürzerer Sätze aufzuteilen. Ähnlich wie die Vereinfachung von Sätzen hat auch die Aufteilung und Neuformulierung das Potenzial, sowohl natürliche Sprachverarbeitung als auch gesellschaftliche Anwendungen zu nutzen. Da kürzere Sätze in der Regel besser von NLP-Systemen verarbeitet werden, könnte es als Vorverarbeitungsschritt verwendet werden, der die Leistung von Parsern, semantischen Rollenetikettierern und maschinellen Übersetzungssystemen erleichtert und verbessert. Es sollte auch für Menschen mit Lesebehinderungen nützlich sein, da es die Umwandlung von längeren Sätzen in kürzere ermöglicht. Dieses Papier leistet zwei Beiträge zu dieser neuen Aufgabe. Zunächst erstellen und stellen wir einen Benchmark zur Verfügung, der aus 1,066,115 Tupeln besteht, die einen einzelnen komplexen Satz auf eine Sequenz von Sätzen abbilden, die die gleiche Bedeutung ausdrücken. Zweitens schlagen wir fünf Modelle vor (Vanillesequenz-to-Sequenz bis semantisch motivierte Modelle), um die Schwierigkeit der vorgeschlagenen Aufgabe zu verstehen.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny sætning forenkling opgave (Split-and-Refrase), hvor formålet er at opdele en kompleks sætning i en betydning, der bevarer sekvensen af kortere sætninger. Ligesom forenklingen af sætninger har opdeling og omformulering potentiale til gavn for både behandling af naturligt sprog og samfundsmæssige anvendelser. Fordi kortere sætninger generelt bedre behandles af NLP-systemer, kunne det bruges som et forbearbejdningstrin, der letter og forbedrer ydeevnen af fortolkere, semantiske rollemærkningssystemer og maskinoversættelsessystemer. Den bør også være nyttig for personer med læsehandicap, fordi den gør det muligt at konvertere længere sætninger til kortere sætninger. Dette dokument yder to bidrag til denne nye opgave. Først skaber og stiller vi et benchmark bestående af 1.066.115 tupler, der kortlægger en enkelt kompleks sætning til en række sætninger, der udtrykker samme betydning. For det andet foreslår vi fem modeller (vaniljesekvens-til-sekvens til semantisk motiverede modeller) for at forstå vanskeligheden ved den foreslåede opgave.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan tugas penyimplifikasi kalimat baru (Split-and-Rephrase) dimana tujuan adalah membagi kalimat kompleks menjadi arti menjaga urutan kalimat yang lebih pendek. Seperti penyimplifikasi kalimat, pemisahan-dan-ulang memiliki potensi untuk menguntungkan kedua proses bahasa alam dan aplikasi masyarakat. Because shorter sentences are generally better processed by NLP systems, it could be used as a preprocessing step which facilitates and improves the performance of parsers, semantic role labellers and machine translation systems.  Ini juga seharusnya berguna bagi orang-orang dengan cacat membaca karena memungkinkan konversi kalimat yang lebih panjang menjadi kalimat yang lebih pendek. Kertas ini membuat dua kontribusi untuk tugas baru ini. Pertama, kita membuat dan membuat tersedia benchmark yang terdiri dari 1.066.115 kali lipat memetakan satu kalimat kompleks ke urutan kalimat yang mengekspresikan arti yang sama. Kedua, kami mengusulkan lima model (urutan vanila-ke-urutan untuk model yang bermotivasi semantis) untuk memahami kesulitan tugas yang diusulkan.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi zadatak pojednostavljanja rečenica (Split-and-Rephrase), gdje je cilj podijeliti složenu rečenicu u značenje čuvanja sekvence kraćih rečenica. Kao pojednostavljanje rečenica, razdvajanje i rephrasiranje ima potencijal koristi prirodnog obrazovanja jezika i društvenih primjena. Zato što su kraće rečenice općenito bolje obrađene sustavima NLP-a, moglo bi se koristiti kao korak preobrađivanja koji olakšava i poboljšava učinkovitost parsera, semantičkih oznake i sustava preobrađivanja strojeva. To bi također trebalo biti korisno za ljude s invaliditetom jer omogućava preobraćanje dužih rečenica u kraće rečenice. Ovaj papir donosi dva doprinosa prema ovom novom zadatku. Prvo, stvaramo i dostavljamo kritiku koja sastoji od 1.066.115 tupla koje mapiraju jednu složenu rečenicu na sekvencu rečenica koja izražava isto značenje. Drugo, predlažemo pet modela (vanilna sekvencija do sekvence semantički motiviranih modela) kako bi razumjeli poteškoće predloženog zadatka.', 'ko': '우리는 복잡한 문장을 보존하는 짧은 문장 서열로 나누는 새로운 문장 간소화 임무를 제시했다.문장을 간소화하는 것과 마찬가지로 분리와 재표현도 자연 언어 처리와 사회 응용에 유리하다.NLP 시스템은 일반적으로 비교적 짧은 문장을 더 잘 처리하기 때문에 이를 예처리 절차로 사용하여 해석기, 의미 역할 표시기와 기계 번역 시스템의 성능을 촉진하고 향상시킬 수 있다.그것도 읽기 장애자에게 유용해야 한다. 왜냐하면 긴 문장을 짧은 문장으로 바꿀 수 있기 때문이다.본고는 이 새로운 임무에 두 가지 공헌을 했다.우선, 우리는 1066115개의 원조로 구성된 기준 테스트를 만들고 제공했다. 이 원조는 하나의 복잡한 문장을 같은 의미를 나타내는 문장 서열에 비추었다.그 다음에 우리는 다섯 가지 모델(일반 서열에서 의미 구동 모델)을 제시하여 제시한 임무의 난이도를 이해했다.', 'tr': 'Biz täze bir sözlem bejermeleri täze bir täze täze teklip edip görýäris (Böle-we-Böle-Böle-Böle) maksadyň şu ýerde bir karmaşık sözlem kiçiräk sözleriň dizini saýlamak üçin bir näme üçin bölmek. Sözler bejermek ýaly, bölmek we yzarlamak ýaly tebigy diller işlemegine we sosial uygulamalaryna etmäge mümkin edip bilýär. Çünkü kiçiräk sözler NLP sistemalary tarapyndan has gowy işleýän bolýar, bu işi parsleriň, semantik nöbetçilik etiketleriň we maşynyň terjime sistemleri üçin ulanyp bilýär. Bu kynçylyklary okamak bilen adamlar üçin ulanmaly bolmaly çünki bu sözleriň uly sözleriň gysga sözlerine üýtgetmesine mümkin edýär. Bu kagyz täze täze zada üçin iki hili gabat berýär. Ilkinji gezek, 1,066,115 tupl diýip bir karmaşık sözläni meňzeş ifade eden sözlerniň ardamasyna üýtgederis we ýerine ýetirdik. Ikinjisi, bu zadyň kynçylygyny düşünmek üçin beş nusga (vanilla sequence-to-sequence) teklip edýäris.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza kazi mpya ya ufumbuzi wa hukumu (Kutenga na-Rephrase) ambapo lengo la kupambanua hukumu tata katika maana ya kuhifadhia mfululizo wa hukumu fupi. Kama urahisi wa sentensi, kutenganisha na kurudisha tena kuna uwezekano wa kusaidia upatikanaji wa lugha za asili na matumizi ya kijamii. Kwa sababu hukumu fupi zaidi ni bora zaidi na mifumo ya NLP, inaweza kutumika kama hatua ya upasuaji inayosaidia na kuboresha utendaji wa mabunge, maboreshaji wa jukumu la kimapenzi na mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine. Pia lazima iwe matumizi kwa watu wenye ulemavu kusoma kwa sababu inaruhusu kubadilisha hukumu ndefu katika maeneo machache. Gazeti hili linafanya michango miwili katika kazi hii mpya. Kwanza, tunatengeneza na kutengeneza bendera yenye vifaa 1,066,115 vinavyoorodhesha hukumu moja ya tatizo kwa mfululizo wa sentensi zinazoelezea maana hiyo. Pili, tunapendekeza mifano mitano (mfululizo wa wastani kwa mara nyingine kwa mifano ya kimapenzi) kuelewa changamoto ya kazi hiyo.', 'fa': 'ما یک کار ساده کردن جمله جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که هدف این است که یک جمله پیچیده را به یک معنی حفظ ترین جمله\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cتر تقسیم کنیم. مثل ساده کردن جمله، تقسیم کردن و بازگشت پتانسیل از سود دادن به زبان طبیعی و کاربردهای اجتماعی دارد. چون جمله\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cتر معمولاً توسط سیستم\u200cهای NLP بهتر پرداخت می\u200cشوند، می\u200cتواند به عنوان قدم پیش پرداخت استفاده شود که فعالیت پرداختگران، نقشه\u200cهای semantic labeller و سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین را آسان و بهبود می\u200cدهد. همچنین باید برای مردم با خواندن بیماری استفاده کند چون به تبدیل کردن جمله\u200cهای طولانی به جمله\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cتر اجازه می\u200cدهد. این کاغذ دو تاثیر برای این کار جدید دارد. اول، ما یک نقشه\u200cای را ایجاد می\u200cکنیم و در دسترسی می\u200cکنیم که از ۱.066.115 تابل است که یک جمله پیچیده را با یک مجموعه از جمله\u200cهای معنی مشابه می\u200cکند. دوم، ما پنج مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم (sequence-to-sequence vanilla به مدل\u200cهای semantically-motivated) تا مشکلات وظیفه پیشنهاد را بفهمیم.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe seting eenvoudiging taak (Split-and-Rephrase) waar die doel is om 'n kompleks seting in' n betekenis te onderhou volgorde van korter setings. Soos sentence eenvoudiging, splitting-en-rephrasing het die potensiaal van voordeel van die natuurlike taal verwerking en samelewing. Want kortere setnings is algemeen beter verwerk deur NLP stelsels, kan dit gebruik word as 'n voorprosessering stap wat die prestasie van verwerkers, semantiese rol etiketeerers en masjien vertalingsstelsels vermoë en verbeter. Dit moet ook gebruik word vir mense met ongelukkigheid lees, omdat dit toelaat die omskakeling van langer setnings na kortere. Hierdie papier maak twee byvoegings teenoor hierdie nuwe taak. Eerste, ons skep en maak beskikbaar 'n benchmark wat bestaan van 1,066,115 tuples met 'n enkele kompleks seting na' n reeks van setings wat dieselfde betekening uitdruk. Tweede, ons voorstel vyf modele (vanilla sequence-to-sequence to semantically-motivated models) om die moeilikheid van die voorgestelde taak te verstaan.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një detyrë të re të thjeshtësimit të fjalëve (ndarje-dhe-përsëritje) ku synimi është të ndarë një fjalë komplekse në një kuptim ruajtje të sekuencës së fjalëve më të shkurtra. Ashtu si thjeshtimi i fjalëve, ndarja dhe rifreshimi ka potencialin e përfitimit si të përpunimit natyror të gjuhës, ashtu edhe të aplikimeve shoqërore. Because shorter sentences are generally better processed by NLP systems, it could be used as a preprocessing step which facilitates and improves the performance of parsers, semantic role labellers and machine translation systems.  Ajo duhet të jetë gjithashtu e dobishme për njerëzit me paaftësi leximi sepse lejon konvertimin e fjalëve më të gjata në fjalë më të shkurtra. Ky dokument bën dy kontribute për këtë detyrë të re. Së pari, ne krijojmë dhe bëjmë në dispozicion një normë që përbëhet nga 1,066,115 dyfishe duke hartuar një fjalë të vetme komplekse në një sekuencë fjalësh që shprehin të njëjtën kuptim. Së dyti, ne propozojmë pesë modele (sekuencë-në-sekuencë vanile për modele të motivuar semantikisht) për të kuptuar vështirësinë e detyrës së propozuar.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նախադասությունների պարզաբանման խնդիր (բաժանել և վերաբաժանել), որտեղ նպատակն է բաժանել բարդ նախադասությունը կարճ նախադասությունների հաջորդականությամբ պահպանելու իմաստով: Օրինակ նախադասությունների պարզաբանումը, բաժանելը և վերարտահայտումը ունի պոտենցիալ օգտագործելու և բնական լեզվի վերամշակման, և հասարակական ծրագրերի համար: Քանի որ ավելի կարճ նախադասությունները սովորաբար ավելի լավ են վերաբերվում ՆԼՊ համակարգերի միջոցով, դրանք կարող են օգտագործվել որպես նախավերաբերյալ քայլ, որը հեշտացնում է և բարելավում է վերլուծողների, սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակների և մեքենային թարգմանման համակարգերի գործ Այն պետք է օգտագործվի նաև անկարողություններով կարդալու մարդկանց համար, որովհետև այն թույլ է տալիս երկար նախադասությունների վերածել ավելի կարճ նախադասությունների: Այս աշխատանքը երկու ներդրում է ներդրում այս նոր խնդրի համար: Առաջինը, մենք ստեղծում ենք և հասանելի դարձնում ենք 1,066,155 անգամ ավելի բարդ նախադասություն քարտեզագրելով նույն իմաստը արտահայտող նախադասությունների հաջորդականությանը: Երկրորդ, մենք առաջարկում ենք հինգ մոդել (վանիլայի հաջորդականություն-հաջորդականություն սեմանտիկապես մոդելների համար), որպեսզի հասկանանք առաջարկած խնդիրը:', 'am': 'አዲስ የቃላት ቀላል ስርዓት (Split-and-Rephrase) ማሰናከል የአንዲት ቃላት አዲስ ስርዓት ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ እንደ ቃላት ቀላል፣ መለያየት እና ማሰናከል፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ እና ማኅበራዊ ፕሮግራሙን ለመጠቀም የሚችል ነው፡፡ ምክንያቱም አነስተኛ ቃላት በNLP ስርዓቶች ይሻላልና፣ የፓርራርስ፣ የsemantic role labels እና የmachine ትርጉም ስርዓት ስርዓቶች እንዲያሳድጉ የሚችል የፕሮግራም ደረጃዎች እንዲሆን ይቻላል፡፡ ደካማዎች ለማንበብ ደካማዎች ለመቀበል ይጠቅማል፡፡ ይህች ገጽ ለዚህ አዲስ ስራ ሁለት ድጋፍ ያቀርባል፡፡ በመጀመሪያ፣ 1,066,115 የተባለው የአንዲት ደብዳቤ ግንኙነትን በተለየ አንዲት ደብዳቤ የሚያሳልፍ የጽሑፍ ክፍል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የአምስት ዓይነቶች (የvanilla ክፍለ-ምርጫ ለsemantically motivated ዓይነቶች) የተፈቃደውን ስራ ጭንቀትን ለማስተዋል እናሳልቃለን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন বাক্য সাধারণ কাজের প্রস্তাব করছি (বিভক্ত এবং পুনরায়) যেখানে একটি জটিল শাস্তি বিভক্ত করার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সংক্ষিপ্ত শাস্তি সংরক্ষণে যেমন শাস্তি সহজ, বিভক্ত এবং পুনরায় বিভক্ত করার সম্ভাবনা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং সামাজিক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের সুবিধ কারণ সাধারণত এনএলপি সিস্টেমের দ্বারা সংক্ষিপ্ত শাস্তি সাধারণত ভালো প্রক্রিয়া প্রক্রিয়ায় ব্যবহার করা হয়, যা পার্সার, সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা লে It should also be of use for people with reading disabilities because it allows the conversion of longer sentences into shorter ones.  এই পত্রিকাটি এই নতুন কাজের দিকে দুটি অংশগ্রহণ করে। প্রথমত, আমরা একটি বেনম্যার্ক তৈরি করি এবং তৈরি করি যার মানে ১,০৬৬৬,১১৫ টুপলের মাধ্যমে একটি জটিল বাক্য ম্যাপের মানচিত্র করা হচ্ছে একই ম দ্বিতীয়, আমরা পাঁচটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি (ভানিলা সেকেন্স-ব্যাপারে সেম্পেন্টিক্যালিক-উদ্দেশ্য মডেলের জন্য) এই প্রস্তাবিত কাজ', 'ca': "Proposem una nova tasca de simplificació de frases (Divisió-i-Refresa) on l'objectiu és dividir una frase complex a en un sentit que conservi seqüència de frases més curtes. Like sentence simplification, splitting-and-rephrasing has the potential of benefiting both natural language processing and societal applications.  Perquè les frases més curtes són generalment millor processades pels sistemes NLP, es podria utilitzar com un pas de preprocessió que facilita i millora el rendiment dels analistes, els etiquetadors de rol semàntic i els sistemes de traducció màquina. També hauria de ser útil per a les persones amb discapacitats lectores perquè permet la conversió de frases més llargues en frases més curtes. Aquest paper fa dues contribucions a aquesta nova tasca. En primer lloc, creem i fem disponible un punt de referència compost de 1.066.115 dobles que mapeixen una sola frase complex a a una seqüència de frases expressant el mateix significat. Segon, proposem cinc models (seqüència a seqüència de vanilla a models motivats semànticament) per entendre la dificultat de la tasca proposta.", 'az': 'Biz yeni cümlələr tərzdə sadiqləmə işini təbliğ edirik ki, bu məqsəd kompleks cümləni daha qısa cümlələrin seçimlərini qorumaq məqsədilə bölüşdirməkdir. Sözümün basitlaşdırması, bölünməsi və yenidən fərqlənməsi kimi təbiətli dil işləməsi və sosyal uyğulamaları faydalanması mümkün olar. Çünki daha qısa cümlələr genellikle NLP sistemləri ilə daha yaxşı işlədilər, bu cümlələr analizacıların, semantik rol etiketçilərinin və maşın tercümə sistemlərinin performansını asanlaşdırır və daha yaxşılaşdırır. Bu həmçinin xəstəlikləri oxuyan insanlar üçün istifadə edilməli olmalı, çünki uzun cümlələri daha qısa cümlələrə çevirir. Bu kağıt bu yeni işə iki kömək edir. Birincisi, biz 1.066.115 tupl olub, bir kompleks cümlənin eyni anlamı ifade edən cümlələrin seçməsi ilə birləşdiririk. İkincisi, biz 5 modeli təklif edirik (vanilla sequence-to-sequence to semantically-motivated modellərə) təklif edilmiş işin çətinliklərini anlamaq üçün.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue lause lihtsustamise ülesande (Split-and-Refrase), mille eesmärk on jagada keeruline lause tähenduseks, säilitades lühemate lausete jada. Sarnaselt lausete lihtsustamisele võib ka jagamine ja ümbersõnastamine tuua kasu nii looduskeele töötlemisele kui ka ühiskondlikele rakendustele. Kuna lühemaid lauseid töödeldakse üldjuhul paremini NLP-süsteemides, võiks seda kasutada eeltöötluse etapina, mis hõlbustab ja parandab parserite, semantiliste rollimärgistuste ja masintõlkesüsteemide jõudlust. See peaks olema kasulik ka lugemispuudega inimestele, sest see võimaldab pikemate lausete muutmist lühemateks lauseteks. Käesolevas dokumendis antakse sellele uuele ülesandele kaks panust. Esiteks loome ja teeme kättesaadavaks võrdlusaluse, mis koosneb 1066 115 tuplist, mis kaardistavad ühe keerulise lause sama tähendust väljendavate lausete jadale. Teiseks pakume välja viis mudelit (vanilje järjestus järjestuseni semantiliselt motiveeritud mudelini), et mõista kavandatava ülesande raskust.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta lauseen yksinkertaistamistehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､ (Split-and-Refrase), jossa tavoitteena on jakaa monimutkainen lause merkitykseen sﾃ､ilyttﾃ､en lyhyemmﾃ､t lauseet. Lausekkeiden yksinkertaistamisen tavoin jakaminen ja muotoileminen uudelleen voi hyﾃｶdyttﾃ､ﾃ､ sekﾃ､ luonnollisten kielten kﾃ､sittelyﾃ､ ettﾃ､ yhteiskunnallisia sovelluksia. Koska lyhyemmﾃ､t lauseet kﾃ､sitellﾃ､ﾃ､n yleensﾃ､ paremmin NLP-jﾃ､rjestelmissﾃ､, sitﾃ､ voitaisiin kﾃ､yttﾃ､ﾃ､ esikﾃ､sittelyvaiheena, joka helpottaa ja parantaa jﾃ､sentﾃ､jien, semanttisten roolimerkintﾃｶjen ja konekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶsjﾃ､rjestelmien suorituskykyﾃ､. Sen pitﾃ､isi olla hyﾃｶdyllinen myﾃｶs lukuvammaisille, koska se mahdollistaa pidempien lauseiden muuntamisen lyhyemmiksi lauseiksi. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ asiakirjassa esitetﾃ､ﾃ､n kaksi panosta tﾃ､hﾃ､n uuteen tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n. Ensin luomme ja tuomme saataville vertailuarvon, joka koostuu 1 066 115 tuplasta, jotka kartoittavat yhden monimutkaisen lauseen samaa merkitystﾃ､ ilmaiseviin lauseisiin. Toiseksi ehdotamme viittﾃ､ mallia (vanilja-sekvenssi-sekvenssiin semanttisesti motivoituneisiin malleihin) ehdotetun tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n vaikeuden ymmﾃ､rtﾃ､miseksi.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi zadatak pojednostavljanja rečenica (Split-and-Rephrase), gdje je cilj podijeliti složenu rečenicu u značenje čuvanja sekvence kraćih rečenica. Kao pojednostavljanje rečenica, razdvajanje i rephrasiranje ima potencijal koristi i prirodnog obrazovanja jezika i društvenih primjena. Zato što su kraće rečenice općenito bolje obradile NLP sistemi, moglo bi se koristiti kao korak preobradivanja koji olakšava i poboljšava učinkovitost parsera, semantičkih etiketera uloge i sustava prevoda mašine. To bi takođe trebalo biti korisno i za ljude s invaliditetom jer omogućava preobraćanje dužih rečenica u kraće rečenice. Ovaj papir donosi dva doprinosa prema ovom novom zadatku. Prvo, stvaramo i dostavljamo kritiku koja sastoji od 1.066.115 tupla, mapirajući jednu složenu rečenicu na sekvencu rečenica koja izražava isto značenje. Drugo, predlažemo pet modela (vanilna sekvencija do sekvence semantički motiviranih modela) da bi shvatili teškoće predloženog zadatka.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme novou úlohu zjednodušení vět (Split-and-Refrese), kde je cílem rozdělit složitou větu do významu zachovajícího posloupnost kratších vět. Stejně jako zjednodušení vět má i rozdělení a přeformulování potenciál přínosu jak pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka, tak pro společenské aplikace. Protože kratší věty jsou obecně lépe zpracovávány NLP systémy, mohou být použity jako krok předzpracování, který usnadňuje a zlepšuje výkon analyzátorů, sémantických označovačů rolí a systémů strojového překladu. Měl by být také užitečný pro lidi s postižením čtení, protože umožňuje přeměnu delších vět na kratší. Tento článek přispívá dvěma příspěvky k tomuto novému úkolu. Nejprve vytvoříme a zpřístupníme benchmark sestávající z 1,066,115 tulů mapujících jednu složitou větu k sekvenci vět vyjadřujících stejný význam. Za druhé navrhujeme pět modelů (vanilková sekvence po sémanticky motivované modely), abychom porozuměli obtížnosti navrhovaného úkolu.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem Panjenengan nggawe Sampeyan nguasai Simplification, sepirkan-lan-sepirkan iso nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar tentang karo aplikasi sing nggawe barang nggo ijol-ijolan. Soalé kapan kelas mbut sing dipunangé sampeyan NLP sistem sing luwih apik, dadi iso nggawe ngubah perusahaan karo perusahaan pakan sing bisa ngubah perusahaan karo akeh lansangan, etiket sematik karo sistem penterjamahan karo perusahaan mrogram. Kayané iso nggambar kanggo wong liyane karo akeh basa awak dhéwé kuwi mau, dadi supoyo iso nggawe dolanan luwih dumateng. Perintah sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo tinggal sing iki. Awak dhéwé, ngéwé nggawe lan nggawe bench-aram sing mempernik 1,06. Siji-siji, kita supoyo sampeyan 5 model (falilne secanse-to-secanse) kanggo sampeyan nganggo usul sing apik nggawe task.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים משימה חדשה להפשטת משפטים (Split-and-Rephrase) שבה המטרה היא לחלק משפט מורכב לשמור על רצף משפטים קצרים. כמו הפשטת משפטים, החלק והשינוי מחדש יש את הפוטנציאל של היתרון גם לעבודת שפת טבעית וגם שימושים חברתיים. מכיוון שבכלל משפטים קצרים מתמודדים טוב יותר על ידי מערכות NLP, אפשר להשתמש בו כצעד מתמודד שמקל ומשתפר את ביצועים של מערכות מעבדות, תוויות תפקידים סמנטיים ומערכות התרגום מכונות. זה צריך להיות שימושי גם לאנשים עם נכונות קריאה כי זה מאפשר להפוך משפטים ארוכים לאנשים קצרים יותר. העיתון הזה עושה שתי תרומות למשימה החדשה הזאת. ראשית, אנו יוצרים ויוצרים פנויים נקודת רמז שמכילה 1,066,115 פעמים ממפית משפט מורכב אחד לרצף משפטים שמביעים את אותו המשמעות. שנית, אנו מציעים חמש דוגמנים (רצף ואנילה לרצף לדוגמנים מוטיבציה סמנטית) כדי להבין את הקשה של המשימה המוצעת.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo novo nalogo poenostavitve stavka (Razdeli in preoblikuj), kjer je cilj razdeliti kompleksen stavek v pomen, ki ohranja zaporedje krajših stavkov. Tako kot poenostavitev stavkov lahko tudi delitev in preoblikovanje koristi tako obdelavi naravnega jezika kot tudi družbenim uporabam. Ker so krajši stavki na splošno bolje obdelani s sistemi NLP, bi se lahko uporabili kot korak predobdelave, ki olajša in izboljša učinkovitost razčlenjevalnikov, semantičnih označevalcev vlog in sistemov strojnega prevajanja. Prav tako bi moral biti uporaben za ljudi s težavami pri branju, saj omogoča pretvorbo daljših stavkov v krajše stavke. Ta dokument vsebuje dva prispevka k tej novi nalogi. Najprej ustvarimo in dajemo na voljo referenčno vrednost, sestavljeno iz 1.066.115 tuplov, ki preslikajo en kompleksen stavek v zaporedje stavkov, ki izražajo isti pomen. Drugič, predlagamo pet modelov (vanilijev zaporedje do semantično motiviranih modelov) za razumevanje težavnosti predlagane naloge.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da wani aikin sauki na maganar sauƙi (Digi-kuma-Reparase) inda shirin ya yi nufin a raba wata kalma mai adadi zuwa wani muhimmin da za'a tsare cewa masu ƙaranci. Kama saurin maganar, farin-da-rabai yana da wani mataimaki ga amfani da shiryoyin harshen asili da shiryoyin ayuka na jamii. Saboda haka da cewa masu ƙaranci na zartar da tsarin NLP, za'a iya amfani da shi kamar wata ƙyama mai gabatar da aiki wanda ke amfani da shi kuma ya kyautata performance wa parparparser, mai fassarar rubutu na semantic da tsarin fassarori na mashine. Daidai ya kamata a yi amfani da wasu mutane da ke kasa karatun karatun nau'i, kwani yana yarda da musanya sonar sauri zuwa masu ƙaranci. Wannan takardan na ƙara mataimaki biyu zuwa wannan aikin sãbuwa. Kayyan, za mu halitta kuma mu samar da wani bangon da ke ƙunsa da 1,066,115 turbuɗe ɗin da ke karya wata salon da ya zama mai adadi zuwa wani sautin da za'a gaɓa da mazaɓa. Dukkan, za mu buƙata misãlai shan (mai sauri-sauri zuwa misãlai masu motsi da aka yi motsi na semantiki) dõmin su fahimta ma'anar aikin da aka buƙata.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་གི་སྔོན་འཕགས་རིས་བྱ་ཚིག་གསརཔ་ཞིག་བསམ་འཆར་བྱ་རྒྱུ་ཞིག་ལ། དཔེར་ན། ཚིག་རྟགས་སྔོན་simplification དང་བསྡུར་ན་ངོ་མ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས Because shorter sentences are generally better processed by NLP systems, it could be used as a preprocessing step which facilitates and improves the performance of parsers, semantic role labellers and machine translation systems. འདི་ཡང་ན་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བྱས་མེད་པའི་མི་མང་ལ་སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ཅིག་རེད། གང་ལེགས་ནི་ཚིག་རྐང་ཚིག་མང་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བྱ་འགུལ་གསར་བ་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་འདུག དང་པོར་བརྗོད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་༡༦༦,115 སྤྱི་གྲངས་ཀ་རྣམས་ལས་ ཚིག་རྟགས་གཅིག་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་གཅིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་འཛིན་བྱས་ཏེ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་པ་(vanilla sequence-to-sequence་ཀྱིས་semantically-motivated models)སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་གནད་དེ་རྟོགས་ཐབས་འཇུག་གི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Neural Response Generation via GAN with an Approximate Embedding Layer', 'ar': 'توليد الاستجابة العصبية عبر GAN مع طبقة تضمين تقريبية', 'pt': 'Geração de resposta neural via GAN com uma camada de incorporação aproximada', 'es': 'Generación de respuestas neuronales a través de GAN con una capa de incrustación aproximada', 'fr': "Génération de réponse neuronale via GAN avec une couche d'enrobage approximative", 'ja': 'おおよその埋め込み層を持つGANを介したニューラルレスポンス生成', 'zh': '以近嵌 GAN 生神经应之', 'hi': 'एक अनुमानित एम्बेडिंग परत के साथ GAN के माध्यम से तंत्रिका प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Генерация нейронного отклика с помощью GAN с приблизительным уровнем встраивания', 'ga': 'Giniúint Freagra Néarach trí GAN le Ciseal Leabaithe Neas', 'el': 'Δημιουργία νευρωνικής απόκρισης μέσω GAN με ένα κατά προσέγγιση στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Generazione di risposta neurale tramite GAN con un livello approssimativo di incorporazione', 'kk': 'Жақын ендіру қабатты GAN арқылы нейрондық жауап жасау', 'hu': 'Neurális válasz generálása GAN segítségével hozzávetőleges beágyazási réteggel', 'ms': 'Neural Response Generation via GAN with an Approximate Embedding Layer', 'ml': 'ഗ്യാന്\u200d വഴിയിലൂടെ നെയുറല്\u200d ഉത്തരവ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുക', 'mn': 'ГАН-ээр мэдрэлийн хариу үйлдэл үүсгэх нь ойролцоогоор нэвтрүүлэх давхартай', 'no': 'Generering av nøyrale svar via GAN med eit tilnærmingslåg innbygging', 'pl': 'Generowanie odpowiedzi neuronowej poprzez GAN z przybliżoną warstwą osadzania', 'lt': 'Neural Response Generation via GAN with an Approximate Embedding Layer', 'ro': 'Generarea răspunsului neural prin GAN cu un strat aproximativ de încorporare', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Rispons Newrali permezz ta’ GAN b’Saff ta’ Inkorporazzjoni Approssimattiva', 'sr': 'Generacija neuroloških odgovora preko GAN sa približnim slojem uključenja', 'so': 'Generation of responses Neural via GAN with a safar degdega ah', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Generation av neural respons via GAN med ett ungefärligt inbäddningslager', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'mk': 'Генерација на нервен одговор преку GAN со приближна вградена пласт', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống phản ứng thần kinh thông với lớp đệm phân tán', 'bg': 'Генериране на неврален отговор чрез GAN с приблизителен вграден слой', 'da': 'Generation af neural respons via GAN med et omtrentligt indlejringslag', 'nl': 'Generatie van neurale respons via GAN met een approximatieve insluitlaag', 'hr': 'Generacija neuroloških odgovora preko GAN sa približnim slojem uključenja', 'ko': '근사한 내장 레이어가 있는 GAN을 통한 신경 반응', 'de': 'Generierung neuronaler Reaktionen über GAN mit einer ungefähren Einbettungsschicht', 'id': 'Generasi Respon Neural melalui GAN dengan Lapisan Pencampuran Sekitar', 'fa': 'تولید پاسخ عصبی از طریق GAN با یک لایه وارد کردن نزدیک', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'GAN aralygy golaýlaşyk gabdaly gatlaky bilen nätaral jogabat döredişi', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i përgjigjes nervore nëpërmjet GAN me një shtresë të përafërt të përfshirë', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa majibu ya asili kupitia GAN na Eneo la Karibu', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Neural Response Generation via GAN with an Approximate Embedding Layer', 'az': 'N칬ral cavab Yenilm톛si', 'bs': 'Generacija neuroloških odgovora preko GAN sa približnim slojem uključenja', 'bn': 'গ্যানের মাধ্যমে নিউরেল প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্ম দ্বারা এক প্রাক্ষিত এমবেডিং স্টেল দিয়ে', 'cs': 'Generování nervové odezvy prostřednictvím GAN s přibližnou vloženou vrstvou', 'fi': 'Hermovasteen generointi GAN:n kautta, jossa on likimääräinen upotuskerros', 'et': 'Neuraalse reaktsiooni genereerimine GAN kaudu ligikaudse põimimiskihiga', 'ca': "La generació de resposta neuronal a través de GAN amb una capa d'integració aproximada", 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'גידול תגובה עצבית באמצעות GAN עם שכבה מעורבת', 'jv': 'Neral response Generation', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje nevronskega odziva prek GAN s približno vgradno plastjo', 'bo': 'GAN ལ་མཚུངས་བསྡུས་པའི་བང་རིམ་དང་མཚུངས་བསྡུས་བའི་ཚོར་བའི་རྗེས་སྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones. In addition, the proposed method introduces an approximate embedding layer to solve the non-differentiable problem caused by the sampling-based output decoding procedure in the Seq2Seq generative model. The GAN setup provides an effective way to avoid noninformative responses (a.k.a safe responses), which are frequently observed in traditional neural response generators. The experimental results show that the proposed approach significantly outperforms existing neural response generation models in diversity metrics, with slight increases in relevance scores as well, when evaluated on both a Mandarin corpus and an English corpus.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة شبكة الخصومة التوليدية (GAN) لنمذجة المحادثات النصية القصيرة أحادية المنعطف ، والتي تدرب شبكة تسلسل إلى تسلسل (Seq2Seq) لتوليد الاستجابة في وقت واحد مع مصنف تمييزي يقيس الاختلافات بين الاستجابات التي ينتجها الإنسان و المولدة آليًا. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تقدم الطريقة المقترحة طبقة تضمين تقريبية لحل المشكلة غير القابلة للتفاضل الناتجة عن إجراء فك تشفير الإخراج القائم على أخذ العينات في النموذج التوليفي Seq2Seq. يوفر إعداد GAN طريقة فعالة لتجنب الاستجابات غير المعلوماتية (المعروفة أيضًا باسم "الاستجابات الآمنة") ، والتي يتم ملاحظتها بشكل متكرر في مولدات الاستجابة العصبية التقليدية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن النهج المقترح يتفوق بشكل كبير على نماذج توليد الاستجابة العصبية الحالية في مقاييس التنوع ، مع زيادات طفيفة في درجات الملاءمة أيضًا ، عند تقييمها على كل من مجموعة الماندرين والمضمون الإنجليزي.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta una Red Generativa Adversarial (GAN) para modelar conversaciones de texto corto de un solo giro, que entrena una red de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq) para la generación de respuestas simultáneamente con un clasificador discriminativo que mide las diferencias entre las respuestas producidas por el hombre y la máquina generadas. Además, el método propuesto introduce una capa de incrustación aproximada para resolver el problema no diferenciable causado por el procedimiento de decodificación de salida basado en el muestreo en el modelo generativo Seq2Seq. La configuración de GAN proporciona una forma eficaz de evitar respuestas no informativas (también conocidas como «respuestas seguras»), que se observan con frecuencia en los generadores de respuestas neuronales tradicionales. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el enfoque propuesto supera significativamente a los modelos de generación de respuesta neuronal existentes en métricas de diversidad, con ligeros aumentos en las puntuaciones de relevancia, cuando se evalúa tanto en un corpus en mandarín como en un corpus en inglés.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) para modelar conversas de texto curto de turno único, que treina uma rede sequência a sequência (Seq2Seq) para geração de respostas simultaneamente com um classificador discriminativo que mede as diferenças entre respostas produzidas por humanos e gerados por máquina. Além disso, o método proposto introduz uma camada de imersão aproximada para resolver o problema não diferenciável causado pelo procedimento de decodificação de saída baseado em amostragem no modelo generativo Seq2Seq. A configuração GAN fornece uma maneira eficaz de evitar respostas não informativas (também conhecidas como “respostas seguras”), que são frequentemente observadas em geradores de respostas neurais tradicionais. Os resultados experimentais mostram que a abordagem proposta supera significativamente os modelos de geração de resposta neural existentes em métricas de diversidade, com ligeiros aumentos nas pontuações de relevância também, quando avaliadas em um corpus mandarim e um corpus inglês.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un réseau antagoniste génératif (GAN) pour modéliser des conversations textuelles courtes à un tour, qui entraîne un réseau séquence à séquence (Seq2Seq) pour la génération de réponses simultanément avec un classificateur discriminant qui mesure les différences entre les réponses produites par l'homme et les réponses produites par la machine. ceux générés. De plus, le procédé proposé introduit une couche d'intégration approximative pour résoudre le problème non différenciable causé par la procédure de décodage de sortie basée sur l'échantillonnage dans le modèle générateur Seq2Seq. La configuration GAN fournit un moyen efficace d'éviter les réponses non informatives (appelées «\xa0réponses sûres\xa0»), qui sont fréquemment observées dans les générateurs de réponses neuronales classiques. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que l'approche proposée surpasse de manière significative les modèles existants de génération de réponse neuronale dans les métriques de diversité, avec également de légères augmentations des scores de pertinence, lorsqu'elle est évaluée à la fois sur un corpus mandarin et un corpus anglais.", 'ja': '本論文では、シングルターンショートテキスト会話をモデル化するためのジェネレータブルアドバサリアルネットワーク（ GAN ）を提示し、人間が生成した応答と機械が生成した応答の違いを測定する識別分類器と同時に応答生成のためのシーケンスツーシーケンス（ Seq 2 Seq ）ネットワークを訓練する。また、Seq 2 Seq生成モデルにおいて、サンプリングベースの出力復号手順によって生じる非微分問題を解決するために、近似的な埋め込み層を導入する方法が提案されている。GANセットアップは、従来のニューラルレスポンスジェネレータで頻繁に観察される非情報的応答（別名「安全な応答」）を回避するための効果的な方法を提供する。実験結果は、提案されたアプローチが多様性指標において既存のニューラルレスポンス生成モデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しており、普通話コーパスと英語コーパスの両方で評価された場合、関連性スコアもわずかに増加している。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एकल-टर्न शॉर्ट-टेक्स्ट वार्तालापों को मॉडल करने के लिए एक जेनरेटिव एडवर्सियल नेटवर्क (जीएएन) प्रस्तुत करता है, जो प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी के लिए एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) नेटवर्क को एक भेदभावपूर्ण क्लासिफायरके साथ एक साथ प्रशिक्षित करता है जो मानव-उत्पादित प्रतिक्रियाओं और मशीन-जनित लोगों के बीच अंतर को मापता है। इसके अलावा, प्रस्तावित विधि Seq2Seq उत्पादक मॉडल में नमूना-आधारित आउटपुट डिकोडिंग प्रक्रिया के कारण गैर-विभेद्य समस्या को हल करने के लिए एक अनुमानित एम्बेडिंग परत का परिचय देती है। GAN सेटअप noninformative प्रतिक्रियाओं (उर्फ "सुरक्षित प्रतिक्रियाओं") से बचने के लिए एक प्रभावी तरीका प्रदान करता है, जो अक्सर पारंपरिक तंत्रिका प्रतिक्रिया जनरेटर में मनाया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण विविधता मैट्रिक्स में मौजूदा तंत्रिका प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी के मॉडल को काफी बेहतर बनाता है, प्रासंगिकता स्कोर में मामूली वृद्धि के साथ-साथ, जब मंदारिन कॉर्पस और एक अंग्रेजी कॉर्पस दोनों पर मूल्यांकन किया जाता है।', 'zh': '本文立一生抗网络(GAN)以拟单轮短文本对,当网络用可测人为应机器生成应异之判分类器并训练序(Seq2Seq)网络。 引入近嵌,以决Seq2Seq生於采样输解码不可微分也。 GAN设一效以避非信息性应(亦谓之安应),此古神经响应发生器常观之也。 实验结果表明在多样性指标,其法显优于今神经反应生成模样,当于普通话语料库、英语语料库上评之,相关性得分亦稍增。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена генеративная соперническая сеть (GAN) для моделирования одноповоротных коротких текстовых разговоров, которая обучает сеть последовательности-последовательности (Seq2Seq) для генерации ответов одновременно с дискриминационным классификатором, который измеряет различия между человеческими ответами и машинными. Кроме того, предлагаемый способ вводит приближенный слой встраивания для решения недифференцируемой задачи, вызванной процедурой декодирования вывода на основе выборки в генеративной модели Seq2Seq. Установка GAN обеспечивает эффективный способ избежать неинформативных реакций (также известных как «безопасные реакции»), которые часто наблюдаются в традиционных генераторах нейронных реакций. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый подход значительно превосходит существующие модели генерации нейронной реакции в метриках разнообразия, с небольшим увеличением баллов релевантности, также при оценке как на мандаринском корпусе, так и на английском корпусе.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair Líonra Sáraíochta Ginideach (GAN) chun comhráite gearrthéacs aon-uaine a shamhaltú, a chuireann oiliúint ar líonra seicheamh-go-seicheamh (Seq2Seq) chun freagairt a ghiniúint ag an am céanna le haicmitheoir idirdhealaitheach a thomhaiseann na difríochtaí idir freagairtí arna dtáirgeadh ag an duine agus cinn meaisín-ghinte. Ina theannta sin, leis an modh atá beartaithe tugtar isteach ciseal leabaithe neas chun an fhadhb neamh-idirdhealaithe a réiteach de bharr an nós imeachta díchódaithe aschuir atá bunaithe ar shampláil sa tsamhail giniúna Seq2Seq. Soláthraíonn socrú GAN bealach éifeachtach chun freagraí neamhfhaisnéiseacha a sheachaint (aka “freagraí sábháilte”), a bhreathnaítear go minic i gineadóirí freagartha néaracha traidisiúnta. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an cur chuige atá beartaithe go mór na samhlacha giniúna freagartha néaracha atá ann cheana i méadracht éagsúlachta, le harduithe beaga ar scóir ábharthachta freisin, nuair a dhéantar meastóireacht air ar chorpas Mandairínis agus ar chorpas Sasanach.', 'ka': "ეს დოკუმენტი განსაზღვრებული კონტექსტური პარამეტრების მოდელისთვის, რომელიც განსაზღვრებისთვის კონტექსტური პარამეტრებისთვის (Seq2Seq) ქსელის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის დისკრიმინა დამატებით, საზოგადომის მეტი შეტყობინებს საკუთარ დამატებული სიახლეში, რომელიც არ განსხვავებელი პრობლემების გარეშე, რომელიც გამოყენებული გამოყენება განსხვავებული პრობლემების გამო GAN-ის დასრულება ეფექტიური გზა, რომელიც არ ინფორმაციური პასუხების გამოწვებას (ანუ 'ბოლოდ პასუხები'), რომელიც ძალიან დაახლოებით ტრადიციონალური ნეიროლური პასუხის ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ მინდომარებული პროგენტის მნიშვნელოვანი მოდელები განსხვავებული მეტრიკაში გააკეთებენ, როდესაც მანდერინური კორპუსში და ანგლისური კორპუსში გააკეთებულია.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα Generative Adversarian Network (GAN) για τη μοντελοποίηση συνομιλιών μικρού κειμένου με μία στροφή, το οποίο εκπαιδεύει ένα δίκτυο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας (Seq2Seq) για την παραγωγή απόκρισης ταυτόχρονα με έναν διακριτικό ταξινομητή που μετρά τις διαφορές μεταξύ των ανθρώπινων και των μηχανικών αποκρίσεων. Επιπλέον, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος εισάγει ένα κατά προσέγγιση στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης για την επίλυση του μη διαφοροποιημένου προβλήματος που προκαλείται από τη διαδικασία αποκωδικοποίησης εξόδου βάσει δειγματοληψίας στο παραγωγικό μοντέλο Seq2Seq. Η ρύθμιση παρέχει έναν αποτελεσματικό τρόπο αποφυγής μη πληροφοριακών αποκρίσεων (άλλως "ασφαλείς αποκρίσεις"), οι οποίες παρατηρούνται συχνά σε παραδοσιακές γεννήτριες νευρικής απόκρισης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα δημιουργίας νευρωνικής απόκρισης στις μετρήσεις ποικιλομορφίας, με μικρές αυξήσεις στις βαθμολογίες συνάφειας, όταν αξιολογείται τόσο σε ένα σώμα μανταρινιών όσο και σε ένα αγγλικό σώμα.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) egy egyfordulós rövid szöveges beszélgetések modellezését, amely egy sorozat-sorozat (Seq2Seq) hálózatot készít a válasz generálására egyidejűleg egy diszkriminatív osztályozóval, amely méri az ember által előállított válaszok és a gép által generált válaszok közötti különbségeket. Ezenkívül a javasolt módszer hozzávetőleges beágyazási réteget vezet be a Seq2Seq generációs modellben a mintavételi alapú kimeneti dekódolási eljárás által okozott nem differenciálható probléma megoldására. A GAN beállítás hatékony módja annak, hogy elkerüljük a nem információs válaszokat (más néven "biztonságos válaszok"), amelyek gyakran megfigyelhetők a hagyományos neurális válasz generátorokban. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés jelentősen felülmúlja a meglévő neurális válasz generálási modelleket a diverzitási metrikákban, a relevancia pontszámok kismértékű emelkedésével, mind mandarin korpuszon, mind angol korpuszon.', 'it': 'Questo articolo presenta una Rete Adversariale Generativa (GAN) per modellare conversazioni brevi a singolo turno, che addestra una rete sequenza-sequenza (Seq2Seq) per la generazione di risposte contemporaneamente ad un classificatore discriminatorio che misura le differenze tra risposte prodotte dall\'uomo e quelle generate dalla macchina. Inoltre, il metodo proposto introduce un livello di incorporazione approssimativo per risolvere il problema non differenziabile causato dalla procedura di decodifica dell\'output basata sul campionamento nel modello generativo Seq2Seq. La configurazione GAN fornisce un modo efficace per evitare risposte non informative (dette anche "risposte sicure"), che sono frequentemente osservate nei generatori di risposta neurale tradizionali. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che l\'approccio proposto supera significativamente i modelli esistenti di generazione di risposta neurale nelle metriche di diversità, con lievi aumenti anche nei punteggi di rilevanza, se valutato sia su un corpus mandarino che su un corpus inglese.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas Generacinis prieštaringas tinklas (GAN), skirtas modeliuoti vienkartinius trumpųjų tekstų pokalbius, kuriuose rengiamas sekos po sekos (Seq2Seq) tinklas reagavimo gamybai kartu su diskriminaciniu klasifikatoriumi, kuriuo matuojami žmonių gautų ir mašinų gautų atsakų skirtumai. Be to, siūlomu metodu nustatomas apytikslis įterpimo sluoksnis, siekiant išspręsti nediferencijuojamą problem ą, kylančią dėl ėminių ėmimo pagrindu vykdomos išėjimo dekodinimo procedūros Seq2Seq kartos modelyje. GAN nustatymas yra veiksmingas būdas išvengti neinformacinių atsakų (taip pat vadinamų saugiais atsakais), kurie dažnai stebimi tradiciniuose nervinių atsakų generatoriuose. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gerokai viršija esamus neurologinio atsako generavimo modelius įvairovės metriniais rodikliais, o reikšmingumo rodikliai taip pat šiek tiek padidėja vertinant ir Mandarino korpus, ir anglų korpus.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува генеративна непријатна мрежа (ГАН) за модел на еднокругови кратко-текстови разговори, кои обучуваат секвенца-на-секвенца (Seq2Seq) мрежа за генерација на одговор истовремено со дискриминативен класификатор кој ги мери разликите помеѓу одговорите произведени од човекот и оние генериран Покрај тоа, предложениот метод воведува околу вграден слој за решавање на неразликувачкиот проблем предизвикан од процедурата на декодирање на излезот базирана на примероци во генеративниот модел Seq2Seq. Поставувањето на ГАН обезбедува ефикасен начин да се избегнат неинформативни одговори (познати како „безбедни одговори“), кои често се набљудуваат во традиционалните генератори на нервен одговор. The experimental results show that the proposed approach significantly outperforms existing neural response generation models in diversity metrics, with slight increases in relevance scores as well, when evaluated on both a Mandarin corpus and an English corpus.', 'ml': "This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones.  കൂടാതെ, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് ജനററിവ് മോഡലില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുള്ള പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കാത്ത പ്രശ്നം പരിഹരിക്ക ജിയാന്\u200d സജ്ജീകരണം വിവരങ്ങളില്ലാത്ത ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒഴിവാക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തമായ വഴി നല്\u200dകുന്നു (ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d 'സുരക്ഷിതമായ ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d'),  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d പ്രതികരിക്കുന്ന തലമുറയുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്, വിവിധ സ്കോര്\u200d", 'ms': "This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones.  In addition, the proposed method introduces an approximate embedding layer to solve the non-differentiable problem caused by the sampling-based output decoding procedure in the Seq2Seq generative model.  The GAN setup provides an effective way to avoid noninformative responses (a.k.a 'safe responses'), which are frequently observed in traditional neural response generators.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan jauh melebihi model generasi balas saraf yang wujud dalam metrik pelbagai, dengan sedikit meningkat skor relevansi juga, apabila diteliti pada kedua-dua Korpus Mandarin dan Korpus Inggeris.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хүн төрөлхтний тусламжтай холбоотой богино текст ярилцлагуудын загвар (GAN) загвар өгч байна. Энэ цаас хүн төрөлхтний хариу болон машины гаргасан хариу үйлдвэрлэлийн хоорондын ялгааг тооцоолж байгаа дарааллаас дарааллаар дарааллаар (Seq2Seq) сүлжээг дамжуул Үүнээс гадна, санал өгсөн арга нь Seq2Seq-ын үйлдвэрлэлийн загварын шалгалтын үндсэн өргөн шийдвэрлэх боломжгүй асуудлыг шийдэх ойролцоогоор орших давхарга юм. ГАН-ын суурь нь мэдээллийн бус хариултуудыг (яг л "аюулгүй хариулт"-ээс алдагдахын тулд) үр дүнтэй арга хангадаг. Энэ нь уламжлалтын мэдрэлийн хариу үйлдвэрлэгчид ихэвчлэн анзаарлагддаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд мандарин корпус болон Англи корпус хоёуланд бага зэрэг нэмэгдүүлэхэд суурилсан мэдрэлийн хариу үйлдвэрлэлийн загваруудыг маш чухал болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono generatywną sieć przeciwników (GAN) do modelowania konwersacji krótkoterminowych z pojedynczym obrotem, która szkoli sieć sekwencji do sekwencji (Seq2Seq) do generowania odpowiedzi jednocześnie z klasyfikatorem dyskryminacyjnym, który mierzy różnice między odpowiedziami wytwarzanymi przez człowieka a maszynowymi. Ponadto proponowana metoda wprowadza przybliżoną warstwę osadzania w celu rozwiązania problemu nieróżnicowalnego spowodowanego przez procedurę dekodowania wyjściowego opartą na próbkowaniu w modelu generatywnym Seq2Seq. Ustawa GAN zapewnia skuteczny sposób na uniknięcie odpowiedzi nieinformacyjnych (zwanych "bezpiecznymi odpowiedziami"), które są często obserwowane w tradycyjnych generatorach odpowiedzi neuronowej. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane podejście znacząco przewyższa istniejące modele generowania odpowiedzi neuronowej w miernikach różnorodności, z nieznacznym wzrostem wyników trafności również w przypadku oceny zarówno na korpusie mandaryńskim, jak i angielskim.', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз жалпы конверсариялық желі (GAN) бір қысқа мәтін сұлбаларының үлгісін көрсетеді. Бұл қағаз жауап беру үшін келесі реттеу (Seq2Seq) желісін бір-біріне жауап беру үшін, адам жауап берілген және машина құрылған қайстардың айырмашылығы Қосымша, таңдалған тәсілі Seq2Seq генеративті үлгісінде баптау негіздеген шығыс декодтау процедурының шешу үшін жақын ендіру қабатты таңдайды. GAN параметрлері мәліметті емес жауаптарды (мысалы 'қауіпсіз жауаптар') сақтау үшін эффективні жолын береді. Бұл әдімгі невралдық жауаптар генераторларында көптеген. Тәжірибелі нәтижелерді көрсетеді, бұл тәжірибе мандариялық корпус мен ағылшын корпус үшін оқу үлгілерінде невралдық жауаптарды жасау үлгілерінде көмектеседі.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o rețea adversară generativă (GAN) pentru modelarea conversațiilor text scurte cu un singur rând, care pregătește o rețea secvență-la-secvență (Seq2Seq) pentru generarea de răspunsuri simultan cu un clasificator discriminatoriu care măsoară diferențele dintre răspunsurile produse de om și cele generate de mașină. În plus, metoda propusă introduce un strat de încorporare aproximativ pentru a rezolva problema nedifferențiabilă cauzată de procedura de decodare a ieșirii bazată pe eșantionare în modelul generativ Seq2Seq. Configurarea GAN oferă o modalitate eficientă de a evita răspunsurile noninformative (cunoscute și sub numele de "răspunsuri sigure"), care sunt frecvent observate în generatoarele tradiționale de răspuns neural. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea propusă depășește semnificativ modelele existente de generare a răspunsului neural în măsurătorile diversității, cu ușoare creșteri ale scorurilor de relevanță, atunci când este evaluată atât pe un corpus mandarin, cât și pe un corpus englez.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja generativnu konservacijsku mrežu (GAN) u modelu razgovora o kratkom tekstu, koja trenira mrežu sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) za generaciju reakcija istovremeno sa diskriminacijskim klasifikatorom koja mjera razlike između odgovora iz ljudskih proizvodnika i uređaja iz mašine. Pored toga, predložena metoda predstavlja približni ugrađeni sloj da reši problem koji se ne razlikuje uzrokovan procedurom dekodiranja izlaza na osnovu uzorka u generičnom modelu Seq2Seq. Ustava GAN pruža efikasan način da izbjegne neoinformativne odgovore (npr. sigurne odgovore), koji se često posmatraju u tradicionalnim generatorima neuroloških odgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup značajno iznosi postojeće modele generacije neuralnih reakcija u metrici raznolikosti, s malo povećanjem rezultata relevantnosti takođe, kada je procenio i Mandarinski korpus i engleski korpus.', 'si': 'This papers presents a geneve adviersarial network (GAN) to Model Single-turn short-text Conversations, that train a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for reapposition neration at a discrimitive classifier that Measures the Diffections Betwich Human-Made Answer and machine-generous one. ඒ වගේම, ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානයක් සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරන්න සැම්ප්ලින් ආධාරිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳ GAN සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාර විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිච', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu u diyaariyaa shabakadda Generative Adversarive Network (GAN) si uu u modeleeyo hadallada qoraalka gaaban ee hal-jeer ah, kaas oo ku tababarida shabakadda koob-jeer-jeex (Seq2Seq) shabakada jawaabta marka lagu sameynayo takoorista kala duwan oo qiyaasa kala duwanaanshaha u dhexeeya jawaabaha dadka iyo machine-generay. Intaas waxaa dheer in qaabkii la soo jeeday ay ay soo bandhigtaa darajada ku dhow oo ay xalliyaan dhibaatada aan kala duwanaanayn, sababtuna waa sameynta qalabka koodeynta midowga Seq2Seq. Buurka GAN wuxuu bixiyaa qaab faa’iido ah oo k a leexda jawaabaha a an macluumaad lahayn (tusaale ahaan jawaabaha nabadgelyada), kuwaas oo marar badan lagu arkayaa dhaqaalaha jawaabta neurada. Midhaha imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeedo uu si weyn u muujiyo muuqashada jawaabta neurada oo ku jira metric kala duduwan, isla markaasna waxaa lagu kordhiyaa qiimaha la xiriira xiliga iyo marka lagu qiimeeyo qoyska Mandarin iyo korpuska Ingiriiska.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jippreżenta Netwerk Ġenerattiv Adversarju (GAN) biex jimmudella konverżjonijiet b’test qasir b’dawr wieħed, li jħarreġ netwerk minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (Seq2Seq) għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons simultanjament ma’ klassifikatur diskriminatorju li jkejjel id-differenzi bejn ir-risponsi prodotti mill-bniedem u dawk iġġenerati mill-magna. Barra minn hekk, il-metodu propost jintroduċi saff ta’ inkorporazzjoni approssimattiv biex tiġi solvuta l-problema mhux differenzjabbli kkawżata mill-proċedura ta’ dekodifikazzjoni tal-output ibbażata fuq it-teħid ta’ kampjuni fil-mudell ġenerattiv Seq2Seq. It-twaqqif tal-GAN jipprovdi mod effettiv biex jiġu evitati risponsi mhux informattivi (magħrufa wkoll bħala 'risponsi sikuri'), li ta' spiss jiġu osservati fil-ġeneraturi tradizzjonali tar-rispons newrali. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-approċċ propost jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-mudelli eżistenti ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons newrali fil-metriċi tad-diversità, b’żidiet żgħira fil-punteġġi ta’ rilevanza wkoll, meta evalwat kemm fuq korpus Mandarin kif ukoll fuq korpus Ingliż.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ett Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) för att modellera korttextkonversationer i en vändning, som tränar ett sekvens-till-sekvens (Seq2Seq) nätverk för responsgenerering samtidigt med en diskriminerande klassificerare som mäter skillnaderna mellan mänskligt producerade och maskingenererade svar. Dessutom införs den föreslagna metoden ett ungefärligt inbäddningsskikt för att lösa det icke-differentierbara problemet som orsakas av den samplingsbaserade utdataavkodningen i den generativa modellen Seq2Seq. GAN-konfigurationen ger ett effektivt sätt att undvika icke-informativa svar (alias säkra svar), som ofta observeras i traditionella neurala svarsgeneratorer. De experimentella resultaten visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet avsevärt överträffar befintliga modeller för generering av neural respons i diversity metrics, med små ökningar av relevans poäng också, när det utvärderas på både en mandarin korpus och en engelsk korpus.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein generelt konserversarial nettverk (GAN) til modellen for korte tekstsamtaler som treng ein sekvens- til- sekvens- nettverk (Seq2Seq) for å laga svar samtidig med ein diskriminasjonal klassifiserer som målar forskjellene mellom menneskelige svar og maskinelaga. I tillegg introduserer den foreslåde metoden eit omtrent innbyggingslag for å løyse det ikkje-diferensivelt problemet som er forårsaket av samplingsbasert utdekodingsprosedyren i Seq2Seq-genererande modellen. Oppsettet for GAN tilbyr ein effektiv måte å unngå ikkje informativ svar (t.d. «trygg svar»), som ofte blir observert i tradisjonelle neurale svargeneratorer. Den eksperimentelle resultatene viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga utfører dei eksisterande modeller for generering av neuralsvar i ulike metrikar, med liten økning i relevantne poeng også, når det er evaluert både på ein Mandarin corpus og ein engelsk korpus.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு பொது முறை சிறிய உரையாடல்களை மாதிரிக்க ஒரு புதிய மேலாளர் வலைப்பின்னலை வழங்குகிறது, அது ஒரு வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ந்து வரும் வலைப்பின்னலை பயிற்சி செய்கிறது, அது ஒரே சமயத்தில் விவ மேலும், முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில், Seq2Seq பொதுவான மாதிரியில் இருந்து மாதிரியாத வெளியீட்டு குறியீட்டு செயல்பாட்டின் முறைமை GAN அமைப்பு அறிவிப்பு இல்லாத பதில்களை தவிர்க்க ஒரு விருப்பமான வழி வழங்குகிறது (உதாரணமாக, பாதுகாப்பான பதில்கள்), அது வழக்கமாக பாதுகாப்ப பரிந்துரையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மான்டாரின் கார்புஸ் மற்றும் ஒரு ஆங்கில கார்புஸ் மற்றும் மதிப்பிடும் போது இருக்கும் புதிய புதிய பதில', 'ur': 'This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones. اس کے علاوہ، پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ایک تقریباً انڈینگ لائر کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ سq2Seq جنرائیٹ موڈل میں نمپلینگ-بنیاد آئٹ ڈیکونگ پردازی کے سبب بغیر تفریق کے مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے۔ GAN سٹاپ نے غیر معلومات کی جواب سے روکنے کے لئے اثری طریقہ پیدا کیا ہے (یعنی "امن جواب") جسے اکثر سنتی نیورل جواب جوڑانے والوں میں دیکھا جاتا ہے. آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا بہت اچھی طرح سے موجود نورول جواب کے نمونڈل مختلف متریک میں اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور اس کے ساتھ بھی بہت کم اضافہ ہوتا ہے، جب ایک منڈرین کورپوس اور انگلیسی کورپوس کے ذریعہ مطابق کیا جاتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu một Hệ thống Lãnh đạo Cơ Đốc (GAN) để mô tả các cuộc trò chuyện ngắn gọn quay một lần, phát hành một mạng nối tiếp nhau (Seq2Seq) để sản xuất phản ứng đồng thời với một phân loại phân biệt được phân biệt các phản ứng nhân tạo và các phản ứng máy tạo ra. Thêm vào đó, theo phương pháp đề nghị, sẽ có một lớp ghép ước lượng để giải quyết vấn đề không phân biệt được gây ra bởi thủ tục giải mã xuất dựa trên mẫu trong mô hình gây ra Seq2Seq. Hệ thống GAN cung cấp một cách hiệu quả để tránh các phản ứng không thông tin (biệt danh "các phản ứng an to àn) được phát hiện thường xuyên trong các máy phát sóng thần kinh truyền thống. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị khả năng cao hơn khả năng sản xuất các mô hình phản ứng thần kinh hiện tại trong các lượng đa dạng đo lường, với một số hiệu suất nhỏ trong điểm liên quan, khi đánh giá cả trên hình thể Mandarin và trên tập đoàn Anh.', 'uz': "Name Koʻrsatilgan usul Seq2Seq generativ modelidagi sampul asosida yaratilgan boʻlmagan muammolarni aniqlash uchun qisqa cheksiz qatlamni koʻrsatiladi. Name Tajribalar natijalarini ko'rsatadi, rivojlanadigan usul muloqat metrikada mavjud neyrol javob yaratish modellarini ko'rsatadi, va ma'lumotlar qiymatlarini ko'paytadi. Mandarin corpus va Ingliz kopusi haqida qiymatlashayotganda.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя Генеративна противоречива мрежа (ГАН) за моделиране на кратки текстови разговори с един завой, която обучава мрежа последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq) за генериране на отговор едновременно с дискриминационен класификатор, който измерва разликите между човешки и машинно генерирани реакции. В допълнение, предложеният метод въвежда приблизителен вграден слой за решаване на недиференцируемия проблем, причинен от процедурата за декодиране на изхода въз основа на извадка в генеративния модел Seq2Seq. Настройката осигурява ефективен начин за избягване на неинформативни реакции (наричани още "безопасни реакции"), които често се наблюдават в традиционните генератори на невронни реакции. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният подход значително превъзхожда съществуващите модели за генериране на невронни реакции в показателите за многообразие, с леко увеличение на оценките за релевантност, когато се оценява както на мандарин корпус, така и на английски корпус.', 'nl': "Dit artikel presenteert een Generatieve Adversarial Netwerk (GAN) om single-turn korte tekstgesprekken te modelleren, dat een seq2Seq (seq2Seq) netwerk traint voor responsgeneratie gelijktijdig met een discriminerende classificator die de verschillen meet tussen menselijke en machine gegenereerde reacties. Daarnaast introduceert de voorgestelde methode een approximatieve insluitingslaag om het niet-differentieerbare probleem op te lossen dat wordt veroorzaakt door de bemonsteringsgebaseerde outputdecoderingsprocedure in het Seq2Seq generatieve model. De GAN-opstelling biedt een effectieve manier om niet-informatieve reacties (ook bekend als 'veilige reacties') te vermijden, die vaak worden waargenomen in traditionele neurale responsgeneratoren. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak significant overtreft bestaande neurale responsgeneratiemodellen in diversiteitsmetrieken, met lichte verhogingen in relevantiescore's ook, wanneer geëvalueerd op zowel een Mandarijn corpus als een Engels corpus.", 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer et Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) til modellering af single-turn korttekstsamtaler, der træner et sekvens-to-sekvens (Seq2Seq) netværk til responsgenerering samtidig med en diskriminerende klassificering, der måler forskellene mellem menneskelige-producerede og maskingenererede svar. Desuden indfører den foreslåede metode et omtrentligt indlejringslag for at løse det ikke-differentierbare problem forårsaget af den prøveudtagningsbaserede outputdekodningsprocedure i Seq2Seq generative model. GAN opsætningen giver en effektiv måde at undgå ikke-informative reaktioner (også kaldet "sikre reaktioner"), som ofte observeres i traditionelle neurale responsgeneratorer. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede tilgang betydeligt overgår eksisterende neurale responsgenereringsmodeller i diversity metrics, med små stigninger i relevans scores også, når vurderet på både et mandarin korpus og et engelsk korpus.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt ein Generatives Adversarial Network (GAN) vor, um Single-Turn Kurztext-Konversationen zu modellieren, das ein Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Netzwerk (Seq2Seq) zur Antwortgenerierung gleichzeitig mit einem diskriminierenden Klassifikator trainiert, der die Unterschiede zwischen menschlich erzeugten und maschinell erzeugten Antworten misst. Darüber hinaus führt die vorgeschlagene Methode eine approximative Einbettungsschicht ein, um das nicht differenzierbare Problem zu lösen, das durch das sampling-basierte Ausgabedekodierungsverfahren im generativen Seq2Seq-Modell verursacht wird. Das GAN-Setup bietet eine effektive Möglichkeit, nichtinformative Antworten (auch bekannt als "sichere Antworten"), die häufig in traditionellen neuronalen Antwortgeneratoren beobachtet werden, zu vermeiden. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz bestehende neuronale Antwortgenerierungsmodelle in Diversity-Metriken signifikant übertrifft, wobei auch die Relevanz-Scores leicht erhöht werden, wenn er sowohl auf einem Mandarin-Korpus als auch auf einem englischen Korpus evaluiert wird.', 'ko': "본고는 일종의 생성적 대항 네트워크(GAN)를 제시하여 단원 짧은 텍스트 대화를 모의했다. 이 네트워크는 서열(Seq2Seq) 네트워크를 훈련하는 동시에 구분적 분류기를 사용하여 인류가 발생하는 응답과 기계가 발생하는 응답 사이의 차이를 측정한다.또한 이 방법은 Seq2Seq 생성 모델에서 샘플링을 바탕으로 하는 출력 디코딩 과정이 일으키는 미세한 문제를 해결하기 위해 근사한 삽입층을 도입했다.GAN 설정은 비정보적 반응('안전반응')을 피하기 위해 효과적인 방법을 제공했다. 이것은 전통적인 신경반응 발생기에서 자주 관찰된 것이다.실험 결과에 의하면 중국어 어료 라이브러리와 영어 어료 라이브러리에서 이 방법은 다양성 도량에서 기존의 신경반응 생성 모델보다 현저히 우수하고 관련성 득점도 약간 증가했다.", 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja generativnu poručnu mrežu (GAN) u modelu razgovora o kratkom tekstu, koja trenira mrežu sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) za generaciju reakcije istovremeno sa diskriminacijskim klasifikatorom koji mjera razlike između odgovora iz ljudskih proizvodnja i proizvodnje strojeva. Osim toga, predložena metoda predstavlja približni ugrađeni sloj za rješavanje problema koji se ne razlikuje uzrokovan postupkom dekodiranja izlaza na osnovu uzoraka u generičnom modelu Seq2Seq. Ustava GAN-a pruža učinkovit način izbjegavanja neoinformativnih odgovora (tj. sigurnih odgovora), koji se često primjećuju u tradicionalnim generatorima neuroloških odgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup značajno iznosi postojeće modele generacije neuroloških odgovora u metrici raznolikosti, s malo povećanjem rezultata relevantnosti također, kada su procjenjivali i Mandarinski korpus i engleski korpus.', 'id': "Kertas ini mempersembahkan Jaringan Adversial Generatif (GAN) untuk model konversasi teks pendek satu pusingan, yang melatih jaringan rangkaian ke rangkaian (Seq2Seq) untuk generasi respon secara bersamaan dengan klasifikasi diskriminatif yang mengukur perbedaan antara respon yang dibuat manusia dan yang dibuat mesin. Selain itu, metode yang diusulkan memperkenalkan lapisan penyembedding sekitar untuk memecahkan masalah yang tidak berbeda disebabkan oleh prosedur dekoding output berdasarkan sampel dalam model generasi Seq2Seq. Pengaturan GAN menyediakan cara yang efektif untuk menghindari respon tidak informatif (alias 'respon aman'), yang sering diawasi dalam generator respon saraf tradisional. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan jauh lebih besar dari model generasi respon saraf yang ada dalam metrik kebanyakan, dengan sedikit meningkat skor relevansi juga, ketika diavaluasi pada kedua korpus Mandarin dan korpus Inggris.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک شبکه مخالفی نسل (GAN) را به مدل گفتگوهای متن کوتاه\u200cای که شبکه\u200cهای sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) را برای نسل\u200cهای پاسخ همزمان با یک گروهی مخالفی که تفاوت بین پاسخ\u200cهای تولید شده\u200cی انسان و دستگاه\u200cهای تولید می\u200cکنند نشان می\u200cدهد. در addition, the proposed method introduces an approximate embedding layer to solve the non-differentiable problem caused by the sampling based output decoding procedure in the Seq2Seq generative model. سازمان GAN راه موثری برای جلوگیری از پاسخهای غیر اطلاعاتی (به عنوان پاسخهای امن) می\u200cدهد که اغلب در ژنراتورهای پاسخ عصبی سنتی مشاهده می\u200cشوند. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که این دستور پیشنهاد بسیار بیشتر از مدل\u200cهای نسل پاسخ عصبی موجود در متریک مختلف انجام می\u200cدهد، با کمی افزایش نمونه\u200cهای مربوط به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای مربوط به عنوان ارزیابی در یک کورپوس ماندرین و یک کورپوس انگلیسی است.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n Genereerde Adversarial Network (GAN) voorsien na model enkel- draai kort- teks gesprekke, wat trein 'n volgorde- na- volgorde (Seq2Seq) netwerk vir reaksie genereering simultaan met 'n diskriminasiewe klassifiseerder wat maak die verskille tussen mens- produseerde reaksies en masjien- genereerde een. In addition, the proposed method introduces an approximate embedding layer to solve the non- differentiable problem caused by the sample- based output decoding procedure in the Seq2Seq generative model. Die GAN opstelling verskaf 'n effektief manier om oninformatiewe antwoordes te veroorskou (bv. 'n veilige antwoordes'), wat dikwels in tradisionele neurale antwoordegenereerders aangesien word. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat die voorgestelde toegang betekeurig uitvoer bestaande neurale reaksogensie modele in verskeidigheid metries, met klein vergroot toekoms in relevante poeiers ook, wanneer geevalueer word op beide 'n Mandarin corpus en 'n Engelske korpus.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz döredijili jemgyş sözleşmeleri (GAN) gysga metin sözleşmeleri üçin bir nusga görkezýär. Bu hat adamlaryň üretilen jogaplaryň we maşynyň üretilen çykyşlaryň arasyndaky tapawutlaryny üýtgedýär. Üstünde, teklif edilen yöntem Seq2Seq generatiýa modinde örnek tabanly çizgi kodleme procedesinden çözmek üçin golaýlaşyk gatlaky girdirdi. GAN düzümleri informatyýan jogabatlary ýok etmek üçin täsirli bir ýoly täsirleýär (mysal. 'howply jogablar') däldir. Bu nuýral jogabat jeneratorlarynda k öplenç seredilýär. Deneymeli netijeler teklip eden ýagdaýyň meýdany närol jogabat döredilmesiniň metriklerde örän köp ukypdygyny görkeýär. Bu ýagdaýda hem Mandarin korpusynda hem iňlis korpusynda deňleýär.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaleta Mtandao wa Kizalendo (GAN) wa kutengeneza mazungumzo ya simu fupi ya moja-moja, ambayo inafundisha mtandao wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo (Seq2Seq) kwa ajili ya kizazi cha majibu sambamba na mchanganyiko wa kibaguzi unaohamasisha tofauti kati ya miitikio ya binadamu na zile zilizotengenezwa kwa mashine. Zaidi ya hayo, mbinu zilizopendekezwa inaonyesha kiwango cha karibu cha kuingia ili kutatua tatizo ambalo halina tofauti lilisababishwa na mchakato wa decodi wa output kwa sampuli katika muundo wa jeneti wa Seq2Seq. The GAN setup provides an effective way to avoid noninformative responses (a.k.a 'safe responses'), which are frequently observed in traditional neural response generators.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu hizo zilizopendekezwa zinaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa utoaji wa miitikio ya neurali katika mitindo mbalimbali, na kuongezeka kidogo kwa vipimo vya usawa pia, wakati ambapo kutathmini kwenye viungo vya Mandarin na makampuni ya Kiingereza.", 'sq': "This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones.  In addition, the proposed method introduces an approximate embedding layer to solve the non-differentiable problem caused by the sampling-based output decoding procedure in the Seq2Seq generative model.  The GAN setup provides an effective way to avoid noninformative responses (a.k.a 'safe responses'), which are frequently observed in traditional neural response generators.  Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja e propozuar tejkalon ndjeshëm modelet ekzistuese të gjenerimit të përgjigjes nervore në metrikat e diversitetit, me rritje të lehta në rezultatet e rëndësishme gjithashtu, kur vlerësohet si në një korpus mandarin ashtu edhe në një korpus anglez.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ አዲስ የፍትሕት ምርጫዎች መረብ (GAN) የሰው አካባቢዎች እና የመሳሳይ አካባቢዎችን እና የሆኑትን መለያየት እና የመስመር አካባቢ እና የመስመር ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የሚችል አዲስ ክፍል የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በSeq2Seq አወራጅ ሞዴል ውስጥ የመሠረቱት ውጤት የክድድ ክፍተት ጉዳይ ለመፍታት የሚቀርበውን ደረጃ ያስተካክላል፡፡ የGAN ግንኙነት የጠቅላላ ጥያቄ መልስ (ለምሳሌ ‘የደኅንነት መልስ’) ለመራቅ የሚችል ጥሩ መንገድን ነው፡፡ በተፈተናው ውጤቶች የተዘጋጀው ጥያቄ የነዌብ መልስ ትውልድ ምሳሌዎችን በተለያዩ ሚትሪኮች ውስጥ ያሳያል፣ የግንኙነት ነጥቦች ትንሽ እየጨመረ እና ማዳሪን ኮፕስ እና እንግሊዝኛ ኮፕስ በተመሳሳይ ጊዜ ይታያል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt təkrar-təkrar mətn danışmalarının modelini seq2Seq (Seq2Seq) şəklinə cavab vermək üçün təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar şəklinə təkrar edir ki, insanların təkrar-təkrar danışmalarının və maşın təkrar-təkrar arasındakı fərqləri ölçür. Əvvəlcə, təklif edilən metod Seq2Seq generativ modelində nümunə çəkilməyə dayanan çıxış kodlama proqramının çəkilməsi üçün yaxınlaşdırılma səviyyəsini təşkil edir. GAN quruluşu, sadəcə olaraq nöral cavab generatörlərində çox çox gözləyir. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş tərzim, müxtəlif metriklərdə olan nöral reaksiya nəslinin modellərini daha çox üstün edir. Mandarin korpusu və İngilizci korpusu ilə müəyyən olunduğu zaman da çox çox mövcuddur.', 'hy': 'This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones.  Ավելին, նախագծված մեթոդը ներկայացնում է մոտավորապես ներդրման շերտ, որպեսզի լուծվի ոչ տարբերակելի խնդիրը, որը առաջացել է SeQ2SeQ-ի սերունդային մոդելի արտադրման կոդավորման գործընթացի արդյունքում: ԳԱՆ կառուցվածքը ապահովում է արդյունավետ միջոց, որպեսզի խուսափենք ոչ ինֆորմատիվ արձագանքներից (նաև «ապահով արձագանքներ»), որոնք հաճախ դիտում են ավանդական նյարդային արձագանքների գեներատորներում: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը նյարդային արձագանքի գոյություն ունեցող մոդելների արձագանքը շատ ավելի մեծ է բազմազանության մետրաչափության մեջ, որտեղ նշանակալի բարձրացում են նաև նշանակալի գնահատականները, երբ գնահատ', 'bn': "This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones.  এছাড়াও প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সেক্ট২সেকের জেনারেটিভ মডেলের সামলিক ভিত্তিক আউটপুট ডিকোডিং প্রক্রিয়ার সমাধানের জন্য একটি প্রায় বিভিন্ন স্তরের জিএনএ সেটআপ একটি কার্যকর উপায় প্রদান করেছে যাতে তথ্য প্রতিক্রিয়া এড়াতে পারে (উদাহরণস্বরূপ 'নিরাপদ প্রতিক্রিয়া'), যা প্রায়শই ঐতিহ্যব পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রজন্মের বৈচিত্র্যময়ে বিভিন্ন নিউরেল প্রজন্ম মডেলে বিভিন্ন প্রজন্মের মডেল প্রকাশ করে, যার ফলে প্রাসঙ্গিক স্কো", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje generační nepříznivou síť (GAN) pro modelování jednotlivých krátkých textových konverzací, která trénuje síť sekvence-sekvence (Seq2Seq) pro generování odpovědí současně s diskriminačním klasifikátorem, který měří rozdíly mezi lidmi produkovanými a strojově generovanými reakcemi. Navržená metoda navíc zavádí přibližnou vrstvu vkládání k řešení nelišitelného problému způsobeného postupem dekódování výstupu založeným na vzorkování v generativním modelu Seq2Seq. Nastavení GAN poskytuje efektivní způsob, jak zabránit neinformativním odpovědím (tzv. "bezpečným odpovědím"), které jsou často pozorovány u tradičních generátorů neuronových odpovědí. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržený přístup výrazně překonává existující modely generace neuronových odpovědí v metrikách diverzity, s mírným zvýšením skóre relevance i při hodnocení jak na mandarínském korpusu, tak na anglickém korpusu.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta una xarxa adversaria generativa (GAN) per modelar converses de text curt a un gir únic, que entrena una xarxa seqüència a seqüència (Seq2Seq) per generar resposta simultàniament amb un classificador discriminatiu que mesura les diferències entre les respostes produïdes per humans i les generades per màquina. A més, el mètode proposat introdueix una capa d'incorporació aproximada per resoldre el problema no diferenciable causat pel procés de decodificació de la producció basada en la mostra del model generador Seq2Seq. La configuració de GAN proporciona una manera eficaç d'evitar respostes no informatives (anomenades 'respostes segures'), que sovint es observen en generadors tradicionals de resposta neuronal. Els resultats experimentals mostren que l'enfocament proposat supera significativament els models de generació de resposta neuronal existents en mètriques de diversitat, amb ligers augments de puntuacions de relevància també, quan es valora tant en un corpus mandarin com en un corpus anglès.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja generativnu konsultativnu mrežu (GAN) na modelu razgovora o kratkom tekstu, koja trenira mrežu sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) za generaciju reakcija istovremeno sa diskriminacijskim klasifikatorom koji mjera razlike između odgovora iz ljudskih proizvoda i strojeva. Osim toga, predložena metoda predstavlja približni ugrađeni sloj kako bi riješio problem koji se ne razlikuje uzrokovan procedurom dekodiranja izlaza na osnovu uzoraka u generativnom modelu Seq2Seq. Ustava GAN-a pruža efikasan način da izbjegne neoinformativne odgovore (npr. sigurne odgovore), koji se često posmatraju u tradicionalnim generatorima neuroloških odgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup značajno iznosi postojeće modele generacije neuroloških reakcija u metrici raznolikosti, s malo povećanjem rezultata relevantnosti također, kada su procjenjivali i Mandarinski korpus i engleski korpus.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) yhden käännöksen lyhyttekstikeskustelujen mallintamiseen, joka kouluttaa sekvenssistä sekvenssiin (Seq2Seq) -verkon vasteiden tuottamiseen samanaikaisesti diskriminatiivisen luokittelijan kanssa, joka mittaa ihmisen tuottamien ja koneellisesti tuotettujen vastausten välisiä eroja. Lisäksi ehdotetussa menetelmässä otetaan käyttöön likimääräinen upotuskerros Seq2Seq-generatiivisessa mallissa näytteenottopohjaisen ulostulodekooderin aiheuttaman ei-eroteltavan ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. GAN-järjestelmä tarjoaa tehokkaan tavan välttää ei-informatiivisia reaktioita (eli turvallisia vastauksia), joita havaitaan usein perinteisissä hermovastegeneraattoreissa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa on merkittävästi parempi kuin olemassa olevat neurovasteen generointimallit monimuotoisuusmittareissa, ja myös relevanssipitoisuudet ovat hieman kohonneet, kun sitä arvioidaan sekä mandariinikorpuksella että englanninkielisellä korpusella.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö tutvustab generatiivset adversariaalset võrgustikku (GAN) ühekordse lühiteksti vestluste modelleerimiseks, mis koolitab reaktsioonide genereerimiseks järjestusest järjestuseni (Seq2Seq) võrku reaktsioonide genereerimiseks samaaegselt diskrimineeriva klassifikaatoriga, mis mõõdab erinevusi inimese toodetud reaktsioonide ja masinaga genereeritud reaktsioonide vahel. Lisaks võetakse kavandatud meetodiga kasutusele ligikaudne manustamiskiht Seq2Seq generatiivse mudeli valimipõhise väljundi dekodeerimise protseduuri põhjustatud mittediferentseeritava probleemi lahendamiseks. GAN seadistus pakub tõhusat võimalust vältida mitteinformatiivseid reaktsioone (ehk ohutuid reaktsioone), mida tavapärastes närvireaktsioonigeneraatorites sageli täheldatakse. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab oluliselt olemasolevaid närvireaktsiooni genereerimise mudeleid mitmekesisuse mõõdikutes, samuti mõningaid asjakohasuse skoore, kui seda hinnatakse nii mandariini kui ka inglise korpusel.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani jerin mai Gabatar Adversarial Netware (GAN) ga motsar magana masu ƙaranci-matsayin kwanan-turu, wanda yana mai amfani da jerin-sauri-biyu-sequence (Seq2Seq) zuwa birnin mai jiba sami da wani darafõfi mai rarraba wanda ke ƙayyade difyuta tsakanin mutum-wanda aka samu da masu ƙidãya. Da wannan, shirin da aka buɗe shi na introduce wani zane mai kusantar cikin embargo dõmin ya nẽmi sola wa problem an da ba'a rarraba shi ba don a sami'a da aikin kodi-danne cikin shirin mai nuna Seq2Seq. Kibaindin GAN na bãyar da wata hanya mai amfani dõmin k a nĩsantar majibu na bã da labanci (misali'a masu aminci), wanda ake nuna wa maras a cikin zakatan ajiya na neural. Matarin jarrabai na nũna cewa, hanzarin da aka buƙata ta wajen sha'ani da misãlai masu motsi na neural cikin metric, da sauri masu ƙari ga score masu husũma da kuma, idan an ƙaddara kofin Mandarin da wata naus'in Ingiriya.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה רשת נוגדית גנרטיבית (GAN) כדי לדוגמא שיחות טקסט קצר מסיבה אחת, אשר מאמן רשת רצף-לרצף (Seq2Seq) לדורת תגובה באותו הזמן עם מסווג דיסקרטיבי שמדוד את ההבדלים בין תגובות יוצרות ע"י האדם לבין הגיבות יוצרות ע"י מכונות. בנוסף, השיטה המוצעת מכניסה שכבת קישום מתקרבת כדי לפתור את הבעיה הלא דיפרנציאלית שנגרמה ע"י תהליך פיתוח יציאה מבוסס על דגימה במודל הדור Seq2Seq. The GAN setup provides an effective way to avoid noninformative responses (a.k.a \'safe responses\'), which are frequently observed in traditional neural response generators.  התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהגישה המוצעת מעלית באופן משמעותי את דוגמני הדור של תגובה עצבית קיימים במטריות מגוון, עם גיבוי קל בתוצאות רלוונטיות גם, כאשר הוערכה על גוף מנדרין וגם גוף אנגלי.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena generativna adversarna mreža (GAN) za modeliranje kratkotrajnih besedilnih pogovorov z enim obratom, ki usposablja mrežo Seq2Seq za generiranje odzivov hkrati z diskriminativnim klasikatorjem, ki meri razlike med človeškimi in strojno generiranimi odzivi. Poleg tega predlagana metoda uvaja približno vgradno plast za reševanje nediferenciranega problema, ki ga povzroča postopek dekodiranja izhodnih izhodov na podlagi vzorčenja v generativnem modelu Seq2Seq. Nastavitev GAN zagotavlja učinkovit način za preprečevanje neinformativnih odzivov (tudi "varnih odzivov"), ki se pogosto opažajo v tradicionalnih generatorjih nevronskega odziva. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da predlagani pristop bistveno presega obstoječe modele generiranja nevronskih odzivov pri meritvah raznolikosti, z rahlim povečanjem relevantnosti tudi pri oceni mandarinskega korpusa in angleškega korpusa.', 'jv': "This paper represents a Generative Advertary Network Genjer-Genjer Setup GN nyong donge kawit menyang kapan pangan sing ora nggawe gambar gak dhéwé (tild.a 'gambar respons sewis'), sing dadi usual menyang cukup nguasai perusahaan maneh operasi alat. Reoleh sing perbudhakan wong-wong kuwi nggawe dianggap luwih akeh bantuan ing model sing gawe nguasai winih dhéwé kuwi ngregani soko ajeng-ajeng, lan kelangan langutan kuwi dianggap sing bakal terus lanjut, soalé dhéwé asserti cara mangan lan cara pangan inggiles.", 'bo': 'This paper presents a Generative Adversarial Network (GAN) to model single-turn short-text conversations, which trains a sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) network for response generation simultaneously with a discriminative classifier that measures the differences between human-produced responses and machine-generated ones. In addition, the proposed method introduces an approximate embedding layer to solve the non-differentiable problem caused by the sampling-based output decoding procedure in the Seq2Seq generative model. GAN སྒྲིག The experimental results show that the proposed approach significantly outperforms existing neural response generation models in diversity metrics, with slight increases in relevance scores as well, when evaluated on both a Mandarin corpus and an English corpus.'}
{'en': 'A Hybrid Convolutional Variational Autoencoder for Text Generation', 'ar': 'أداة تشفير تلقائية متغيرة تلافيفية هجينة لتوليد النص', 'fr': 'Un autoencodeur variationnel convolutif hybride pour la génération de texte', 'es': 'Un autocodificador variacional convolucional híbrido para la generación de texto', 'pt': 'Um Autoencoder Variacional Convolucional Híbrido para Geração de Texto', 'ja': 'テキスト生成用ハイブリッド畳み込みバリエーションオートエンコーダ', 'zh': '文本混合卷积变分自编码器', 'ru': 'Гибридный сверточный вариационный автокодер для генерации текста', 'hi': 'पाठ जनरेशन के लिए एक हाइब्रिड Convolutional Variational Autoencoder', 'ga': 'Uath-ionchódóir Athraitheach Hibrideach do Ghiniúint Téacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένας υβριδικός αυτόματος κωδικοποιητής παραλλαγής για τη δημιουργία κειμένου', 'hu': 'Hibrid konvolúciós variációs automatikus kódoló szöveggeneráláshoz', 'it': 'Un codificatore automatico a variazione convoluzionale ibrido per la generazione di testo', 'kk': 'Мәтінді құру үшін гибридтік аутоматты түрлі аутоматты кодтамасыName', 'ms': 'A Hybrid Convolutional Variational Autoencoder for Text Generation', 'mk': 'A Hybrid Convolutional Variational Autoencoder for Text Generation', 'ml': 'Text Generation', 'mn': 'Хибрид Автоматикийн Хэрэглээний Хэрэглээний Хэрэглээний Хэрэглээний Автоматикийн Кодер', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Hybrydowy automatyczny koder zmian konwolucyjnych do generowania tekstu', 'ro': 'Un codificator automat hibrid de variații conveluționale pentru generarea de text', 'sr': 'Hibridni konvolucionalni autokoder za generaciju teksta', 'si': 'Name', 'lt': 'Name', 'so': 'A Hybrid Convolution Variable Autoencoder for Text Generation', 'sv': 'En hybrid konvulutionell variationskoder för textgenerering', 'ta': 'உரை உருவாக்கத்திற்கான ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் தானியங்கி குறியீடு', 'ur': 'Name', 'mt': 'Awtokodifikatur tal-Varjazzjoni Konverzjonali Ibridu għall-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Hibridni konvolucionalni autokoder za generaciju teksta', 'de': 'Ein Hybrid Convolutional Variational Autoencoder für die Texterstellung', 'bg': 'Хибриден конвелуционален вариационен автокодер за генериране на текст', 'da': 'En hybrid konvulutiv variabel autoencoder til tekstgenerering', 'nl': 'Een hybride Convolutional Variational Autoencoder voor tekstgeneratie', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kodi la kujibadilisha kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Maandishi', 'id': 'A Hybrid Convolutional Variational Autoencoder for Text Generation', 'tr': 'Metin Döndürmek üçin Hybrid Taýtgeşik Awtomatik Ködleme', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një Autokodues Hibrid i Variacionit Konveolutiv për Gjenerimin e Tekstit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Name', 'ko': '텍스트 생성에 사용되는 혼합 볼륨 변분 자동 인코더', 'bs': 'Hibridni konvolucionalni autokoder za generaciju teksta', 'ca': 'Un autocodificador hibride de variacions de conversió per a generar text', 'az': 'Metin Məxluqatı üçün Hibrid Konvolucional Variasyonal Autoencoder', 'cs': 'Hybridní konvenční variantní autokodér pro generování textu', 'et': 'Hübriidne konvolutsiooniline automaatkodeerija teksti genereerimiseks', 'fi': 'Hybridi konvolutional variational automaattinen koodaus tekstin luomiseen', 'jv': 'Text Generation', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Hibridni konvolucijski variacijski samokodirnik za ustvarjanje besedila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Hybrid Convolutional Variational Autoencoder for Text Generation'}
{'en': 'In this paper we explore the effect of architectural choices on learning a variational autoencoder (VAE) for text generation. In contrast to the previously introduced VAE model for text where both the encoder and decoder are RNNs, we propose a novel hybrid architecture that blends fully feed-forward convolutional and deconvolutional components with a recurrent language model. Our architecture exhibits several attractive properties such as faster run time and convergence, ability to better handle long sequences and, more importantly, it helps to avoid the issue of the VAE collapsing to a deterministic model.', 'ar': 'نستكشف في هذا البحث تأثير الخيارات المعمارية على تعلم المشفر التلقائي المتغير (VAE) لتوليد النص. على عكس نموذج VAE الذي تم تقديمه مسبقًا للنص حيث يكون كل من المشفر ووحدة فك التشفير هما RNNs ، نقترح بنية هجينة جديدة تمزج المكونات التلافيفية والتلافيفية deconvolutional بالكامل مع نموذج اللغة المتكررة. تعرض الهندسة المعمارية الخاصة بنا العديد من الخصائص الجذابة مثل وقت التشغيل والتقارب الأسرع ، والقدرة على التعامل بشكل أفضل مع التسلسلات الطويلة ، والأهم من ذلك أنها تساعد على تجنب مشكلة انهيار VAE إلى نموذج حتمي.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous explorons l'effet des choix architecturaux sur l'apprentissage d'un autoencodeur variationnel (VAE) pour la génération de texte. Contrairement au modèle VAE précédemment introduit pour le texte où l'encodeur et le décodeur sont des RNN, nous proposons une nouvelle architecture hybride qui combine des composantes convolutionnelles et déconvolutives entièrement prévisionnelles avec un modèle de langage récurrent. Notre architecture présente plusieurs propriétés intéressantes telles que le temps d'exécution et la convergence plus rapides, la capacité à mieux gérer les séquences longues et, plus important encore, elle permet d'éviter le problème de l'effondrement de la VAE en un modèle déterministe.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, exploramos o efeito das escolhas arquiteturais no aprendizado de um autoencoder variacional (VAE) para geração de texto. Em contraste com o modelo VAE introduzido anteriormente para texto, onde o codificador e o decodificador são RNNs, propomos uma nova arquitetura híbrida que combina componentes convolucionais e deconvolucionais totalmente feed-forward com um modelo de linguagem recorrente. Nossa arquitetura exibe várias propriedades atraentes, como tempo de execução e convergência mais rápidos, capacidade de lidar melhor com sequências longas e, mais importante, ajuda a evitar o problema do VAE entrar em colapso para um modelo determinístico.', 'es': 'En este artículo exploramos el efecto de las elecciones arquitectónicas en el aprendizaje de un autocodificador variacional (VAE) para la generación de texto. En contraste con el modelo VAE introducido anteriormente para texto en el que tanto el codificador como el decodificador son RNN, proponemos una arquitectura híbrida novedosa que combina componentes convolucionales y deconvolucionales totalmente alimentados con un modelo de lenguaje recurrente. Nuestra arquitectura exhibe varias propiedades atractivas, como un tiempo de ejecución y convergencia más rápidos, la capacidad de manejar mejor las secuencias largas y, lo que es más importante, ayuda a evitar que el VAE colapse a un modelo determinista.', 'ja': 'この論文では、テキスト生成のためのバリエーションオートエンコーダ（ VAE ）を学習するためのアーキテクチャ選択の効果を探求する。エンコーダとデコーダの両方がRNNであるテキストのために以前に導入されたVAEモデルとは対照的に、私たちは、完全にフィードフォワード畳み込みおよびデコンボリューションのコンポーネントを再帰言語モデルとブレンドする新規のハイブリッドアーキテクチャを提案します。当社のアーキテクチャは、実行時間と収束の高速化、長いシーケンスをより適切に処理する能力、そしてより重要なことに、VAEが決定論的モデルに崩壊する問題を回避するのに役立つなど、いくつかの魅力的な特性を示しています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम पाठ पीढ़ी के लिए एक परिवर्तनीय ऑटोएनकोडर (वीएई) सीखने पर वास्तुशिल्प विकल्पों के प्रभाव का पता लगाते हैं। पाठ के लिए पहले से पेश किए गए वीएई मॉडल के विपरीत जहां एनकोडर और डिकोडर दोनों आरएनएन हैं, हम एक उपन्यास हाइब्रिड आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक आवर्तक भाषा मॉडल के साथ पूरी तरह से फ़ीड-फॉरवर्ड कनवल्शनल और डिकंवोल्यूशनल घटकों को मिश्रित करता है। हमारी वास्तुकला कई आकर्षक गुणों को प्रदर्शित करती है जैसे कि तेजी से चलने का समय और अभिसरण, लंबे अनुक्रमों को बेहतर ढंग से संभालने की क्षमता और, अधिक महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि यह वीएई के मुद्दे से बचने में मदद करता है जो एक नियतात्मक मॉडल के लिए ढह जाता है।', 'zh': '本文之中,讨论架构择生成之变分自编码器(VAE)也。 比之前所引文本VAE模(其编码器与解码器皆RNN)相比,发一新合架构,其将尽前馈卷积与反卷积组件与循环言语相参。 吾架构有数人之性,如更快行时收敛,更善处长序之能,尤要于避VAE溃为确定性模。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы исследуем влияние архитектурных решений на изучение вариационного автокодера (VAE) для генерации текста. В отличие от ранее введенной модели VAE для текста, где и кодировщик, и декодер являются RNN, мы предлагаем новую гибридную архитектуру, которая полностью сочетает в себе компоненты подачи вперед свертки и деконволюции с рекуррентной языковой моделью. Наша архитектура демонстрирует несколько привлекательных свойств, таких как более быстрое время выполнения и сходимость, способность лучше обрабатывать длинные последовательности и, что более важно, она помогает избежать проблемы коллапсирования VAE в детерминированную модель.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid iniúchadh ar éifeacht roghanna ailtireachta ar uathchódóir athraitheach (VAE) a fhoghlaim chun téacs a ghiniúint. I gcodarsnacht leis an tsamhail VAE do théacs a tugadh isteach roimhe seo ina bhfuil an t-ionchódóir agus an díchódóir araon ina RNNanna, molaimid ailtireacht hibrideach nua a chumasc comhpháirteanna conbhlóideacha agus dí-chonbhlóideacha atá lán-chothaithe go hiomlán le samhail teanga athfhillteach. Léiríonn ár n-ailtireacht roinnt tréithe tarraingteacha cosúil le ham rite níos tapúla agus cóineasú, an cumas seichimh fhada a láimhseáil ar bhealach níos fearr agus, níos tábhachtaí fós, cuidíonn sé le ceist an VAE a sheachaint ag titim i dtreo múnla cinntitheach.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban az építészeti választások hatását vizsgáljuk a variációs autoencoder (VAE) tanulására szöveggeneráláshoz. A korábban bevezetett VAE modellel ellentétben, ahol mind a kódoló, mind a dekódoló RNN-ek, egy új hibrid architektúrát javasolunk, amely teljes mértékben átviteli konvolúciós és dekonvolúciós komponenseket ötvözi egy visszatérő nyelvi modellel. Az építészetünk számos vonzó tulajdonsággal rendelkezik, mint például a gyorsabb futási idő és konvergencia, a hosszú sorozatok jobb kezelésének képessége, és ami még fontosabb, segít elkerülni, hogy a VAE egy determinisztikus modellbe omlik.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία διερευνούμε την επίδραση των αρχιτεκτονικών επιλογών στην εκμάθηση ενός παραλλαγικού αυτόματου κωδικοποιητή (VAE) για την παραγωγή κειμένου. Σε αντίθεση με το παλαιότερα εισαγόμενο μοντέλο για κείμενο όπου τόσο ο κωδικοποιητής όσο και ο αποκωδικοποιητής είναι RNN, προτείνουμε μια νέα υβριδική αρχιτεκτονική που συνδυάζει πλήρως τροφοδοτικά σύνθετα και αποσυμφιεστικά συστατικά με ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο γλωσσικό μοντέλο. Η αρχιτεκτονική μας παρουσιάζει πολλές ελκυστικές ιδιότητες όπως ταχύτερος χρόνος εκτέλεσης και σύγκλιση, ικανότητα καλύτερης διαχείρισης μεγάλων ακολουθιών και, το σημαντικότερο, βοηθά στην αποφυγή της κατάρρευσης του VAE σε ένα ντετερμινιστικό μοντέλο.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ტექსტის განვითარებისთვის განსხვავებული ავტოკოდერების (VAE) ეფექტის გამოყენება. პირდაპირად შემდეგ გადატანა VAE მოდელი ტექსტისთვის, სადაც ორივე კოდირები და დეკოდირები RNN არიან, ჩვენ გვეძლოთ პრომენტური ჰიბრიტური აქტიქტიქტურა, რომელიც ყველაფერად გადატანა კონგულური და განკ ჩვენი არქტიქტიკური გამოჩვენება რამდენიმე ატრაქტიური განსაზღვრებები, როგორც უფრო სწრაფად გადაწყენებული დრო და კონგერგენცია, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესაძლებლობა და, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ეს და', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз мәтін құру үшін архитектуралық таңдаулардың әртүрлі автокодерді (VAE) үйренудің эффектін зерттейміз. Мәтін үшін алдыңғы келтірілген VAE үлгісіне қарсы, кодер мен декодер RNN деген мәтін үлгісіне қарсы, біз қайталанатын тіл үлгісімен біріктіретін жаңа гибрид архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Біздің архитектурамыз жылдам жүргізу уақыты мен конвергенциясы, ұзын реттеулерді жақсы шектеу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді және, маңызды, бұл VAE дефицистикалық моделіне сүйреу мәселесін шектеуге көмектеседі.', 'it': "In questo articolo esploriamo l'effetto delle scelte architettoniche sull'apprendimento di un autoencoder variazionale (VAE) per la generazione di testo. A differenza del modello VAE precedentemente introdotto per il testo in cui sia l'encoder che il decoder sono RNN, proponiamo una nuova architettura ibrida che fonde completamente componenti convoluzionali e deconvoluzionali feed-forward con un modello di linguaggio ricorrente. La nostra architettura presenta diverse proprietà interessanti come tempi di esecuzione e convergenza più rapidi, capacità di gestire al meglio sequenze lunghe e, cosa ancora più importante, aiuta a evitare che il problema del VAE collassi in un modello deterministico.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വേരിയറല്\u200d സ്വയം കോഡെര്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിഎം മോഡലിന്റെ മാത്രം വിരോധമാണ്, അവിടെ കോഡെരും ഡികോഡേറും RNNs എന്നിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടാര്\u200dക നമ്മുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള കുറച്ച് ആകര്\u200dഷകരമായ വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വേഗത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സമയവും മാറ്റുന്നതും നീണ്ട സെക്കന', 'lt': 'In this paper we explore the effect of architectural choices on learning a variational autoencoder (VAE) for text generation.  Priešingai nei anksčiau įdiegtas teksto VAE modelis, kuriame tiek koduotojas, tiek dekoderis yra RNN, mes siūlome naują hibridinę architektūrą, kuri visiškai sujungia konvoliucinius ir dekovoliacinius komponentus su pakartotiniu kalbos modeliu. Our architecture exhibits several attractive properties such as faster run time and convergence, ability to better handle long sequences and, more importantly, it helps to avoid the issue of the VAE collapsing to a deterministic model.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го истражуваме ефектот на архитектурните избори на учењето на варијационален автокодер (VAE) за генерација на текст. За разлика од претходно воведениот ВАЕ модел за текст каде кодерот и декодерот се РНН, предложуваме нова хибридна архитектура која целосно ги меша конволуционалните и деконволуционалните компоненти со рецидент јазички модел. Нашата архитектура покажува неколку атрактивни сопствености, како што се побрзо време за трчање и конвергенција, способноста за подобро да се справат со долги секвенции и, што е поважно, помага да се избегне колапсијата на ВЕЕ во децентристички модел.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mengeksplorasi kesan pilihan arkitektur pada belajar pengekod otomatik variasi (VAE) untuk generasi teks. Sebaliknya dengan model VAE yang telah diperkenalkan sebelumnya untuk teks di mana pengekod dan pengekod adalah RNN, kami melamar arkitektur hibrid baru yang mencampur komponen konvolusi dan dekonvolusi penuh dengan model bahasa berulang. Our architecture exhibits several attractive properties such as faster run time and convergence, ability to better handle long sequences and, more importantly, it helps to avoid the issue of the VAE collapsing to a deterministic model.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид архитектур сонголтуудын нөлөөг текст үеийн өөр өөр автокодчуудыг сурах боломжтой. Өмнө нь танилцуулсан VAE загварын эсрэгээр, коддогч болон коддогч нь RNN-тэй хоёр шинэ шинэ гибрид архитектурыг бид дахин дахин хэл загвартай холбогдож, хөгжүүлэгч болон хувьсгал үйлдвэрлэгчдийг цуглуулдаг. Бидний архитектур илүү хурдан гүйцэтгэх цаг, хоорондоо холбогдох, урт дарааллыг илүү сайн зохицуулах чадварыг харуулдаг. Хамгийн чухал нь энэ нь ДОХ-ын асуудлыг тодорхойлолт загвар руу унах боломжтой болгодог.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nistudjaw l-effett ta’ għa żliet arkitettoniċi fuq it-tagħlim ta’ awtokoder varjazzjonali (VAE) għall-ġenerazzjoni tat-test. B’kuntrast mal-mudell VAE introdott preċedentement għat-test fejn kemm l-ikkodifikatur kif ukoll id-dekodifikatur huma RNNs, qed nipproponu arkitettura ibrida ġdida li tħallat kompletament komponenti konvoluzzjonali u dekonvuluzzjonali feed-forward ma’ mudell lingwistiku rikorrenti. L-arkitettura tagħna turi diversi karatteristiċi attraenti bħall-ħin ta’ run aktar mgħa ġġel u l-konverġenza, il-kapaċit à li jiġu mmaniġġjati aħjar sekwenzi twal u, aktar importanti, tgħin biex tiġi evitata l-kwistjoni tal-kollass tal-VAE għal mudell determinanti.', 'no': 'I denne papiret utforskar vi effekten av arkitektursval på å lære eit variasjonalt autokoding (VAE) for tekstgenerering. I contrast to the previous introduced VAE model for text where both the encoder and decoder are RNN, we propose a new hybrid architecture that blends fully feed-forward convolutional and deconvolutional components with a recurrent language model. Arkitekturen vårt viser fleire attraktive eigenskapar som raskare kjøringstid og konvergence, kapasiteten til å bedre handtere lange sekvensar og, meir viktigere, hjelper det å unngå problemet på VAE-kollappen til ein deterministisk modell.', 'pl': 'W artykule badamy wpływ wyborów architektonicznych na naukę wariancyjnego autokodera (VAE) do generowania tekstu. W przeciwieństwie do wcześniej wprowadzonego modelu VAE dla tekstu, w którym koder i dekoder są RNN, proponujemy nową architekturę hybrydową, która łączy w pełni zwojowe i dekwolucyjne komponenty z powtarzającym się modelem językowym. Nasza architektura wykazuje kilka atrakcyjnych właściwości, takich jak szybszy czas pracy i konwergencja, zdolność do lepszego obsługi długich sekwencji, a co ważniejsze, pomaga uniknąć zapadania się VAE do modelu deterministycznego.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo uticaj arhitekturnih izbora na učenje variacionalnog autokodera (VAE) za generaciju teksta. Za razliku od prethodnog uvođenog model a VAE za tekst gde su i koder i dekoder RNN, predlažemo novu hibridnu arhitekturu koja uključuje konvolucione i dekonvolucione komponente potpuno napredne hrane sa rekonstruiranim jezičkim modelom. Naša arhitektura pokazuje nekoliko privlačnih vlasnika kao što su brže trčanje vremena i konverģencija, sposobnost boljeg rješavanja dugih sekvencija i, važnije, pomaže da izbegne pitanje kolapsanja VAE u deterministički model.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare explorăm efectul alegerilor arhitecturale asupra învățării unui autoencoder variațional (VAE) pentru generarea de text. Spre deosebire de modelul VAE introdus anterior pentru text în care atât encoder, cât și decoder sunt RNN, propunem o arhitectură hibridă nouă care îmbină complet componentele convoluționale și deconvoluționale de alimentare cu un model de limbaj recurent. Arhitectura noastră prezintă mai multe proprietăți atractive, cum ar fi timpul de rulare și convergența mai rapidă, capacitatea de a gestiona mai bine secvențe lungi și, mai important, ajută la evitarea colapsării VAE la un model determinist.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ විශේෂ ස්වයංකේතකය (VAE) පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ ස්වයංකේතකයෙක් ඉගෙන ග ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් VAE මොඩේල් වෙනුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් ඇතුළත් වෙනුවෙන්, එන්කෝඩර් සහ ඩිකෝඩර් දෙන්නම් RNN වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරති අපේ නිර්මාණය ප්\u200dරදර්ශන විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා වගේම වේගයෙන් පටන් ගන්න වෙලාවක් සහ සම්බන්ධ වෙලාවක් වගේම', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku baaraynaa saamaynta doorashada dhismaha ee ku saabsan barashada qoraalka iskudarka ah (VAE). Iska duwan qaabkii horay u soo bandhigay tusaale ahaan VAE oo ku qoran qoraal, kaasoo ay ku qoran yihiin qoraal qodi-cod iyo codcod-bixiyuhu RNNs, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa dhismo sawir ah oo ku biiri karta sawir-sawir oo dhamaan cunto-horumar iyo kooxo ka mid ah oo ku qoran qaab luuqad soo socda. Our architecture exhibits several attractive properties such as faster run time and convergence, ability to better handle long sequences and, more importantly, it helps to avoid the issue of the VAE collapsing to a deterministic model.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats undersöker vi effekten av arkitektoniska val på att lära sig en variabel autoencoder (VAE) för textgenerering. I motsats till den tidigare introducerade VAE-modellen för text där både kodare och dekoder är RNN, föreslår vi en ny hybridarkitektur som blandar helt framåtgående konvulutionella och dekonvulutionella komponenter med en återkommande språkmodell. Vår arkitektur uppvisar flera attraktiva egenskaper såsom snabbare körtid och konvergens, förmåga att bättre hantera långa sekvenser och, ännu viktigare, det hjälper till att undvika att frågan om VAE kollapsar till en deterministisk modell.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் உரை உருவாக்கத்திற்கான மாறியின் தானியங்கி குறியீடு (VAE) கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பொழுது கட்டுரை  முன்னால் குறியீடு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு மற்றும் RNNs இருக்கும் உரைக்கான VAE மாதிரி மாதிரியில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஹைப்ரி கட்டுப்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது மு நீண்ட வரிசைகளை சிறந்து கையாள முடியும் சக்தியை விட வேகமாக இயக்கும் நேரம் மற்றும் மாற்றும் போன்ற பல ஆச்சரியமான பண்புகளை காட்டுகிறது, மேலும் முக்கியமானது,', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں متن نسل کے لئے ایک متفاوت اتوکینکڈر (VAE) کی تعلیم پر معماری انتخاب کے اثر کو دیکھتے ہیں. اس سے پہلے پیدا کیے گئے VAE موڈل کے مقابلہ میں جہاں Encoder اور Decoder RNN ہیں، ہم ایک نئی ہیبریڈ معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک دوبارہ زبان موڈل کے ساتھ کامل فائدہ-فائدہ آغاز کرنے والی اور ناکنولیوشن رقم جمع کرتا ہے. ہماری معماری بہت سی اچھی خصوصیات کو دکھاتی ہے جیسے تیز چلنے کا وقت اور کنورجنس، بہت زیادہ طویل سطح کے ساتھ ادارہ کرنے کا قابل اور، بہت اہم، یہ ایک مقررہ مدل کے بارے میں VAE کے مسئلہ سے ٹلنے کے لئے مدد کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz matn generalida variant avtomatik kodlash usulini o'rganish uchun arxituvchi tanlangan effektini aniqlamiz. Kodlash va kodlash usuli RNNs boʻlgan matn uchun oldin ishlatilgan VAE modeli bilan boshqaruvchi bo'lsa, biz qaytadan oldingan tilning modeli bilan bir novel hybrid arxituvchisini tahlil qilamiz. Arxituvchimiz bir necha ajoyib xususiyatlarni ko'rsatadi, tez vaqt va suhbat boshqarish, uzun sonlarni yaxshi boshqarish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatadi va muhim bo'lsa, bu VAE modelga qo'yish muammolarini ajratish uchun yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi khám phá các hiệu quả của các sự lựa chọn kiến trúc về việc học một mã tự mã số khác nhau (VAE) cho sản xuất văn bản. So với mẫu chữ VAE được giới thiệu trước đây, nơi cả mã hóa và bộ giải mã đều là RNN, chúng tôi đề xuất một cấu trúc lai tạo mới có thể kết hợp các thành phần xoắn ốc và cách mạng liên tục với mô hình ngôn ngữ thường xuyên. Kiến trúc của chúng tôi có nhiều tính chất hấp dẫn như thời gian chạy nhanh hơn và sự hội tụ, khả năng điều khiển chuỗi dài tốt hơn và, quan trọng hơn, nó giúp tránh vấn đề sụp đổ VAE theo một mô hình cụ thể.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo učinak arhitekturnih izbora na učenje variacionalnog autokodera (VAE) za generaciju teksta. U suprotnosti s prethodnim uvođenim modelom VAE za tekst gdje su i koder i dekoder RNN-i, predlažemo novu hibridnu arhitekturu koja uključuje konvolucionalne i dekonvolucionalne komponente u potpunosti naprijed sa rekonstruiranim jezičkim modelom. Naša arhitektura pokazuje nekoliko privlačnih vlasništva poput brže trčanje vremena i konvergencije, sposobnosti boljih rješavanja dugih sekvencija i, važnije, pomaže izbjegavati pitanje kolapsanja VAE u deterministički model.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме ефекта от архитектурния избор върху изучаването на вариационен автокодер (ВАЕ) за генериране на текст. За разлика от въведения по-рано модел за текст, в който както кодерът, така и декодерът са RNN, ние предлагаме нова хибридна архитектура, която съчетава напълно конвелуционни и деконволюционни компоненти с повтарящ се езиков модел. Архитектурата ни показва няколко атрактивни свойства като по-бързо време на работа и конвергенция, способност за по-добро управление на дълги последователности и, по-важното, помага да се избегне проблемът с колапса на АЕ към детерминистичен модел.', 'da': "I denne artikel undersøger vi effekten af arkitektoniske valg på læring af en variabel autoencoder (VAE) til tekstgenerering. I modsætning til den tidligere introducerede VAE-model til tekst, hvor både encoder og dekoder er RNN'er, foreslår vi en ny hybrid arkitektur, der blander fuldt fremførte konvulutielle og dekonvulutionelle komponenter med en tilbagevendende sprogmodel. Vores arkitektur udstiller flere attraktive egenskaber såsom hurtigere driftstid og konvergens, evne til bedre at håndtere lange sekvenser og vigtigere, det hjælper med at undgå problemet med VAE kollapser til en deterministisk model.", 'nl': "In dit artikel onderzoeken we het effect van architectonische keuzes op het leren van een variantionele autoencoder (VAE) voor tekstgeneratie. In tegenstelling tot het eerder geïntroduceerde VAE model voor tekst waarbij zowel de encoder als decoder RNN's zijn, stellen we een nieuwe hybride architectuur voor die volledig feed-forward convolutionele en deconvolutionele componenten combineert met een terugkerend taalmodel. Onze architectuur vertoont verschillende aantrekkelijke eigenschappen zoals snellere looptijd en convergentie, het vermogen om lange sequenties beter te verwerken en, belangrijker, het helpt om te voorkomen dat de VAE instort tot een deterministisch model.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir den Einfluss architektonischer Entscheidungen auf das Lernen eines Variational Autoencoders (VAE) für die Textgenerierung. Im Gegensatz zum zuvor eingeführten VAE-Modell für Text, bei dem Encoder und Decoder RNNs sind, schlagen wir eine neuartige hybride Architektur vor, die voll feed-forward convolutionale und dekonvolutionale Komponenten mit einem rezidivierenden Sprachmodell verbindet. Unsere Architektur weist mehrere attraktive Eigenschaften auf, wie schnellere Laufzeit und Konvergenz, Fähigkeit, lange Sequenzen besser zu handhaben und vor allem hilft sie, das Problem des Zusammenbruchs der VAE zu einem deterministischen Modell zu vermeiden.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mengeksplorasi efek dari pilihan arsitektur pada belajar autokoder variasi (VAE) untuk generasi teks. Sebaliknya dengan model VAE yang telah diperkenalkan sebelumnya untuk teks di mana kedua pengekoder dan dekoder adalah RNN, kami mengusulkan arsitektur hibrid baru yang mencampur komponen konvolusi dan dekonvolusi penuh feed-forward dengan model bahasa yang berulang-ulang. Arkitektur kami menunjukkan beberapa properti menarik seperti waktu berjalan lebih cepat dan konvergensi, kemampuan untuk menangani lebih baik urutan panjang dan, yang lebih penting, membantu untuk menghindari isu VAE runtuh ke model determinis.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 구조 선택이 텍스트 생성에 사용되는 변분 자동 인코더(VAE)를 학습하는 데 미치는 영향을 연구했다.앞서 소개한 인코딩과 디코딩이 모두 RNN인 텍스트 VAE 모델과 달리 우리는 완전한 피드백 볼륨과 반볼륨 구성 요소를 귀속 언어 모델과 결합시키는 새로운 혼합 구조를 제시했다.우리의 체계 구조는 더욱 빠른 운행 시간과 수렴성, 긴 서열을 잘 처리하는 능력 등 매력적인 특성을 보여 주었다. 더욱 중요한 것은 VAE 붕괴가 확정적인 모델로 돌아가는 문제를 피하는 데 도움이 된다는 것이다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz metin döredilmesi üçin arhitektura saýlawlaryň täsirini tapýarys. Öňki görkezilen VAE nusgasyna görä, hem ködleme hem dekoder RNN bolan metin üçin, bir täze hibrid arhitektegi we nusgasyzlyk bilen doly feed-ileri we çykyş komponentlerini teklip edýäris. Biziň arhitekturymyz çalt ýören wagt we jemgyýet ýaly birnäçe atraktiv hasaplaryny görkezýär, uzak hatlary gowy gözleýän başaryşlaryny we daha möhüm bolsa, bu VAE-nyň beýleki nusgasyna daşyrmak üçin kömekleýär.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما اثر گزینه های معماری بر یادگیری یک کاغذ\u200cدهنده\u200cی خود متفاوتی (VAE) برای نسل متن تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. بر خلاف مدل VAE معرفی پیش از این برای متن که هر کدام رمز\u200cدهنده و dekoder RNN هستند، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک معماری جدید hybrid که کاملاً بخش\u200cهای متغیر و متغیر را با یک مدل زبان تکرار می\u200cکند. معماری ما چندتا ویژگی جذابی را نشان می دهد مثل زمان سریع و کنفرانس، توانایی برای بهتر کنترل ردیابی طولانی و، مهمتر تر، کمک می کند از مسائل خراب کردن VAE به یک مدل deterministic.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunachunguza athari ya uchaguzi wa ujenzi juu ya kujifunza utaratibu wa mabadiliko (VAE) kwa kizazi cha maandishi. Tofauti na mtindo wa zamani wa VAE wa maandishi ambapo kodi na decode hizo ni RNN, tunapendekeza ujenzi wa riwaya wa kimataifa unaohamasisha vifaa vinavyotumika kwa umakini na vifaa vya kupunguza kwa kutumia lugha inayoendelea. Ujengo wetu unaonyesha vifaa kadhaa vya kuvutia kama vile muda wa haraka na mazungumzo, uwezo wa kukabiliana na mfululizo wa muda mrefu na, muhimu zaidi, inasaidia kuepuka suala la VAE kuanguka kwa mtindo wa uhakika.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ճարտարապետական ընտրությունների ազդեցությունը տեքստի ստեղծման համար տարբերակային ավտոկոդեր սովորելու վրա: Ի հակադրություն նախկինում ներկայացված տեքստի նախկինում ներկայացված ՎԱԵ մոդելի, որտեղ նաև կոդերը և կոդերը ՌՆՆ են, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր հիբրիդ ճարտարապետություն, որը միավորում է ամբողջությամբ ներկայացված համընդհանուր և անհամընդհանուր բաղադրիչներ կր Մեր ճարտարապետությունը ցույց է տալիս մի քանի գրավիչ հատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են արագ ընթացքի ժամանակը և համընդհանուրությունը, երկար հաջորդականությունների ավելի լավ վարելու ունակությունը, և ամենակարևորը, այն օգնում է խուսափել ՎԵ-ի խնդիրը, որ ընկնի դետեմինիս', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne eksplorojmë efektin e zgjedhjeve arkitekturale në mësimin e një autokoduesi variacional (VAE) për gjenerimin e tekstit. Në kundërshtim me modelin VAE të paraqitur më parë për tekst ku si koduesi ashtu dhe dekodiuesi janë RNN, ne propozojmë një arkitekturë të re hibride që përzien plotësisht komponente konvolutive dhe dekonvolucionale me një model gjuhësh të përsëritur. Arkitektura jonë ekspozon disa prona tërheqëse të tilla si kohë e vrapimit më të shpejtë dhe konvergencë, aftësia për të trajtuar më mirë sekuencat e gjata dhe, më e rëndësishme, ndihmon për të shmangur çështjen e rrëzimit të VAE në një model përcaktues.', 'af': "In hierdie papier ondersoek ons die effek van arkitektuur keuses op die leer van 'n veranderlike outokoder (VAE) vir teks generasie. In contrast to the previously introduced VAE model for text where both the encoder and decoder are RNN, we propose a novel hybrid architecture that blends fully feed-forward convolutional and deconvolutional components with a recurrent language model. Ons arkitektuur vertoon verskeie attraktiewe eienskappe soos vinniger hardlooptyd en konvergensie, moontlik om lange sekwensies beter te hanteer en, meer belangrik, dit help om die probleem van die VAE te verdwyn na 'n deterministiese model.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የመሠረታዊ ምርጫዎችን ለጽሑፍ ትውልድ የተለየ የፖለቲካዊ ኮድ (VAE) በማስተማር ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የVAE ምሳሌ ለጽሑፍ፣ ኮድ እና ቀድሞ RNNs የሆኑበት የጽሑፍ አካባቢ መሠረት በተለየ፣ በሙሉ ማሰማርያ እና በቋንቋ ምሳሌ ላይ የሚጠቅመውን የሮሜ ሂቢ መሠረት እና መደጋጋገሚያን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የመዝገብ ግንኙነታችን፣ ፈጥኖ ሰዓት እና ማቀናቀል፣ ረጅም ግንኙነቶችን ለመቀበል የሚችል፣ በተጨማሪም፣ የVAE ጉዳይ ለቆጣጠር ሞዴል ለመራቅ ይረዳል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, mətn nəsillərini öyrənmək üçün arhitektür seçimlərin etkisini keşfetirik. Əvvəlki təşkil edilmiş VAE modeli ilə birləşdirilmiş məktəblərə baxmayaraq, Encoder və Dekoder RNN olduğu məktəblərə baxmayaraq, yeni hibrid arhitektarını təklif edirik ki, yenidən bir dil modeli ilə birləşdirilmiş konvolucional və deconvolucional komponentləri birləşdirir. Bizim arhitekturımız daha hızlı çalışma vaxtı və konverģenci kimi bir neçə təsirli xüsusiyyətləri göstərir, uzun sequencelərdən daha yaxşı müdafiə edə bilər və daha önemlidir ki, bu, VAE məsələsinin deterministik modellə çəkilməsindən uzaqlaşmasına kömək edir.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo učinak arhitekturnih izbora na učenje variacionalnog autokodera (VAE) za generaciju teksta. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim uvedenim modelom VAE za tekst gdje su i koder i dekoder RNN, predlažemo novu hibridnu arhitekturu koja uključuje konvolucione i dekonvolucione komponente potpuno napredne hrane sa rekonstruiranim jezičkim modelom. Naša arhitektura pokazuje nekoliko privlačnih vlasnika kao što su brže trčanje vremena i konverģencija, sposobnost boljeg rješavanja dugih sekvencija i, važnije, pomaže da izbjegne pitanje kolapsanja VAE u deterministički model.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা টেক্সট প্রজন্মের জন্য ভেয়ারিয়েশন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কোডার (ভিএই) শিখার প্রভাব খুঁজে বের করি। পূর্ববর্তী ভিএই মডেলের জন্য টেক্সটের পরিবর্তে যেখানে এনকোডার এবং ডেকোডার উভয়ই RNNs, আমরা একটি নোভেল হাইব্রিড আর্কিটেক্টারের প্রস্তাব করছি যা পুরোপুরি ফিড-অগ্রগতি আমাদের আর্কিকেটারের বেশ কয়েকটি আকর্ষণীয় বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদর্শন করেছে, যেমন দ্রুত সময় চালানো এবং পরিবর্তন করা, দীর্ঘ সময়ের সাথে সামলাতে সক্ষম এবং আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, এটা ভি', 'ca': "En aquest paper explorem l'efecte de les eleccions arquitectòniques en aprendre un autocodificador variacional (VAE) per a generar text. En contrast amb el model VAE anteriorment introduït per text on tant el codificador com el decodificador són RNN, proposem una nova arquitectura híbrida que combina components convolucionals i desconvolucionals completament avançats amb un model de llenguatge recurrent. La nostra arquitectura mostra diverses propietats atractives, com el temps de correr més ràpid i la convergència, l'habilitat de manejar millor les seqüències llargues i, més important, ajuda a evitar el problema del col·lapse del VAE en un model determinista.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku zkoumáme vliv architektonických voleb na učení variačního autokodéru (VAE) pro generování textu. Na rozdíl od dříve zavedeného VAE modelu pro text, kde kodér i dekodér jsou RNN, navrhujeme novou hybridní architekturu, která plně kombinuje konvoluční a dekonvoluční komponenty s recidivujícím jazykovým modelem. Naše architektura vykazuje několik atraktivních vlastností, jako je rychlejší doba běhu a konvergence, schopnost lépe zvládnout dlouhé sekvence a co je důležitější, pomáhá zabránit tomu, že VAE zhroutí do deterministického modelu.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä selvitämme arkkitehtonisten valintojen vaikutusta variaatioautomaattisen koodaajan (VAE) oppimiseen tekstintuotantoa varten. Toisin kuin aiemmin esitelty VAE-malli tekstille, jossa sekä kooderi että dekooderi ovat RNN:itä, ehdotamme uudenlaista hybridiarkkitehtuuria, joka yhdistää täysin konvolutionaaliset ja dekonvolutionaaliset komponentit toistuvaan kielimalliin. Arkkitehtuurillamme on useita houkuttelevia ominaisuuksia, kuten nopeampi käyttöaika ja konvergenssi, kyky käsitellä paremmin pitkiä sekvenssejä ja mikä tärkeintä, se auttaa välttämään VAE:n romahtamisen deterministiseksi malliksi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime arhitektuuriliste valikute mõju variatsioonilise autokodeerija (VAE) õppimisele teksti genereerimiseks. Vastupidiselt varem kasutusele võetud VAE mudelile tekstile, kus nii kodeerija kui dekooder on RNN-id, pakume välja uudse hübriidarhitektuuri, mis ühendab täielikult konvolutsioonilised ja dekonvolutsioonilised komponendid korduva keelemudeliga. Meie arhitektuuril on mitmeid atraktiivseid omadusi, nagu kiirem tööaeg ja lähenemine, võime paremini käsitleda pikki järjestusi ja mis veelgi tähtsam, see aitab vältida sõiduki elektroonika kokkuvarisemist deterministliku mudeliga.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kita ngubah efek bakir pilihan arkhitektur kanggo ngulinakake koder sampeyan (VE) kanggo ngerasakno teks Genjer-Genjer esungkamu model sing dumadhi VOE nggo teks sing dumadhi koder karo dekojer architecture', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו חוקרים את השפעה של בחירות ארכיטקטורניות על הלימודים של קודד אוטומטי שונה (VAE) לדור טקסט. בניגוד לדוגמא VAE הוציאה קודם לטקסט שבו גם הקודן וגם הקודן הם RNN, אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה היברידית חדשה שמערבבת לחלוטין רכיבים משתנים וחסרי השתנה עם דוגמא שפה חוזרת. הארכיטקטורה שלנו מציגה כמה תכונות מושכות כמו זמן לרוץ ומהירות מהיר יותר, יכולת לטפל טוב יותר ברצועות ארוכות, וחשוב יותר, היא עוזרת להימנע מהבעיה של התמוטטות VAE למודל קבוע.', 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo učinek arhitekturnih izbir na učenje variacijskega samokodirnika (VAE) za generiranje besedila. V nasprotju s predhodno uvedenim VAE modelom za besedilo, kjer sta kodirnik in dekoder RNN, predlagamo novo hibridno arhitekturo, ki v celoti združuje konvolucijske in dekonvolucijske komponente s ponavljajočim se jezikovnim modelom. Naša arhitektura kaže več privlačnih lastnosti, kot so hitrejši čas delovanja in konvergenca, sposobnost boljšega obvladovanja dolgih zaporedij in, kar je še pomembneje, pomaga preprečiti, da bi VAE padel v deterministični model.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takardan, Munã jarraba aikin shirin ayuka na masu tsari a kan karanta wata dabar-dabar kwamfyuta (vAU) wa kizaɓen matsayin. Tsamman da shirin ayuka na farko da ya fara introduce na vAU wa matsayin, inda kode da kode da kwamfyuta su zama RNNs, za'a buƙata wani matsayin sauri na yanzu wanda ke haɗa cikakken matsayin-forward da wata motel na tsohon-bakin harshe wanda aka sake koma. Bayanmu na nuna wasu properties masu kwaɗayi kamar tafiyar da lokaci da muhimmada, ma'abũcin ya fi canza masu amfani da matsayin sauri, kuma, a kan muhimu, yana taimako da ya kange masu al'amarin da za'a yi samu'a zuwa wani motel na ƙayyade.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་རྩལ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་གདམ་ཁ་ཕྱེད་ཀྱི་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་དང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་ནང་ལ། In contrast to the previously introduced VAE model for text where both the encoder and decoder are RNNs, we propose a new hybrid architecture that blends fully feed-forward convolutional and deconvolutional components with a recurrent language model. Our architecture exhibits several attractive properties such as faster run time and convergence, ability to better handle long sequences and, more importantly, it helps to avoid the issue of the VAE collapsing to a deterministic model.'}
{'en': 'Measuring Thematic Fit with Distributional Feature Overlap', 'ar': 'قياس التوافق الموضوعي مع تداخل الميزات التوزيعية', 'pt': 'Medindo o ajuste temático com sobreposição de recursos de distribuição', 'es': 'Medición del ajuste temático con la superposición de características distribucionales', 'fr': "Mesure de l'ajustement thématique avec chevauchement des entités distributionnelles", 'ja': '分布機能の重複によるテーマ適合の測定', 'zh': '量有分布特徵重叠的主题拟合', 'hi': 'वितरण सुविधा ओवरलैप के साथ विषयगत फिट को मापने', 'ru': 'Измерение тематической подгонки с перекрытием функций распределения', 'ga': 'Feisteas Téamach a Thomhas le Forluí Gné Dáilte', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A tematikus illeszkedés mérése elosztási funkcióval', 'el': 'Μέτρηση της θεματικής τακτοποίησης με την κατανεμητική επικάλυψη χαρακτηριστικών', 'it': 'Misura della vestibilità tematica con sovrapposizione di funzionalità distributiva', 'mk': 'Мерање на тематски соодветен со дистрибуционално прекршење', 'lt': 'Teminių priemonių, atitinkančių paskirstymo charakteristikų viršijimą, matavimas', 'kk': 'Тематикалық үлестіру мүмкіндіктерінің үстінен театикалық сәйкестігін өлшеу', 'ms': 'Mengukur Tema Terpadan dengan Gandakan Feature Distributional', 'mt': 'Il-Kejl Tematiku Aqbel mal-Karatteristiċi Distribuzzjonali', 'mn': 'Тематикийн хэмжээний хуваарилалтын харилцааныг хэмжих', 'ml': 'വിതരണ പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ വിശിഷ്ടമുള്ള വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ അളവു് വരുത്തുന്നു', 'no': 'Målar tematisk tilpassing med distribusjonell funksjonsoverlapping', 'pl': 'Pomiar dopasowania tematycznego z funkcją dystrybucyjną', 'ro': 'Măsurarea potrivirii tematice cu suprapunerea caracteristicilor distribuționale', 'sr': 'Izmjerenje tematskog odgovara sa prekršavanjem distribucijske funkcije', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Mätning av tematisk passform med fördelningsfunktion överlappning', 'ta': 'பங்கீட்டு பண்புகள் மேல்மட்டுப் போன்ற தலைப்புப் பொருத்தத்தை அளவு செய்கிறது', 'so': 'Measurementation tiyaatarka la xiriira tababarka', 'ur': 'تقسیم فرصت اورلپ کے ساتھ تئمیٹیکیسی فائدہ اندازہ کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Mavzuni oĘ»zgartirish', 'vi': 'Bộ đệm phụ đề tiêu đề với giá trị phụ kiện', 'hr': 'Mjerenje temične prilike s prekršavanjem distribucijske funkcije', 'bg': 'Измерване на тематичната съвместимост с разпределителна характеристика', 'da': 'Måling af tematisk pasform med fordelingsfunktion Overlap', 'nl': 'Het meten van Thematische Fit met Distributionele Feature Overlap', 'de': 'Messung der thematischen Passform mit Verteilungsmerkmal Overlap', 'id': 'Mengukur Tema yang cocok dengan Overlap Feature Distributional', 'fa': 'Ш§ЩҶШҜШ§ШІЩҮвҖҢЪҜЫҢШұЫҢ ШӘШҰШ§ШӘЫҢЪ© ШЁШ§ ШӘШәЫҢЫҢШұ ЩҲЫҢЪҳЩҮвҖҢЩҮШ§ЫҢ ШӘЩҲШІЫҢШ№', 'ko': '분포 특징이 중첩된 주제 일치도 측정을 바탕으로', 'sw': 'Kupima maudhui yenye Tamko la Usambazaji', 'af': 'Maat Tematiese Pas met Verspreidionale Funksie Oorvloei', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'sq': 'Mesimi tematik i përshtatshëm me përmbysjen e funksionit shpërndarës', 'tr': 'Tematik Geditiň Aýratynyň üstünden çykmasy', 'hy': 'Տեմատիկական չափումը համապատասխանում է բաշխման առանձնահատկությանը', 'az': 'Bölüşdürücü özelliklərin aşağısıyla tematik uyğunluğunu ölçür', 'bn': 'বিতরণ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মাপ পরিমাপ', 'ca': 'mesurar el tema adequat a la superfície de característiques distribucionals', 'cs': 'Měření tematického přizpůsobení s překrytím distribučních funkcí', 'et': 'Temaatilise sobivuse mõõtmine jaotusfunktsioonide ülekandega', 'bs': 'Mjerenje tematskog odgovara sa preklapanjem distribucijske funkcije', 'fi': 'Aihekohtaisen istuvuuden mittaaminen ja hajautetun ominaisuuden päällekkäisyys', 'jv': 'Mejer Thematik buffet karo Distribution Attribution', 'he': 'מידוד נושאי מתאים עם מעטפת תכונות פיצוי', 'sk': 'Merjenje tematskega prileganja s prekrivanjem porazdelitvenih funkcij', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Measuring Thematic Fit with Distributional Feature Overlap'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we introduce a new distributional method for modeling predicate-argument thematic fit judgments. We use a syntax-based DSM to build a prototypical representation of verb-specific roles : for every verb, we extract the most salient second order contexts for each of its roles (i.e. the most salient dimensions of typical role fillers), and then we compute thematic fit as a weighted overlap between the top features of candidate fillers and role prototypes. Our experiments show that our method consistently outperforms a baseline re-implementing a state-of-the-art system, and achieves better or comparable results to those reported in the literature for the other unsupervised systems. Moreover, it provides an explicit representation of the features characterizing verb-specific semantic roles.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم طريقة توزيع جديدة لنمذجة الأحكام الموضوعية الملائمة للحجج المسند. نحن نستخدم الدليل التشخيصي والإحصائي القائم على بناء الجملة لبناء تمثيل نموذجي لأدوار محددة للفعل: لكل فعل ، نستخرج سياقات الترتيب الثاني الأكثر بروزًا لكل من أدواره (أي الأبعاد الأكثر بروزًا لمواد ملء الأدوار النموذجية) ، ثم نقوم حساب الملاءمة الموضوعية كتداخل مرجح بين السمات العليا لمواد الحشو المرشحة ونماذج الأدوار. تُظهر تجاربنا أن طريقتنا تتفوق باستمرار على خط الأساس لإعادة تنفيذ نظام حديث ، وتحقق نتائج أفضل أو قابلة للمقارنة لتلك المذكورة في الأدبيات للأنظمة الأخرى غير الخاضعة للإشراف. علاوة على ذلك ، فإنه يوفر تمثيلًا واضحًا للسمات التي تميز الأدوار الدلالية الخاصة بالأفعال.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo método de distribuição para modelar julgamentos de ajuste temático predicado-argumento. Usamos um DSM baseado em sintaxe para construir uma representação prototípica de papéis específicos de verbos: para cada verbo, extraímos os contextos de segunda ordem mais salientes para cada um de seus papéis (ou seja, as dimensões mais salientes de preenchimentos de papéis típicos) e, em seguida, calcule o ajuste temático como uma sobreposição ponderada entre os principais recursos de preenchimentos de candidatos e protótipos de função. Nossos experimentos mostram que nosso método supera consistentemente uma linha de base reimplementando um sistema de última geração e alcança resultados melhores ou comparáveis aos relatados na literatura para os outros sistemas não supervisionados. Além disso, fornece uma representação explícita das características que caracterizam os papéis semânticos específicos do verbo.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un nuevo método de distribución para modelar juicios de ajuste temático de argumentos predicados. Utilizamos un DSM basado en sintaxis para construir una representación prototípica de los roles específicos de los verbos: para cada verbo, extraemos los contextos de segundo orden más destacados para cada uno de sus roles (es decir, las dimensiones más sobresalientes de los rellenos de roles típicos), y luego calculamos el ajuste temático como una superposición ponderada entre la parte superior características de los candidatos a rellenar y prototipos de roles. Nuestros experimentos muestran que nuestro método supera sistemáticamente una línea de base que vuelve a implementar un sistema de última generación y logra resultados mejores o comparables a los informados en la literatura para los otros sistemas no supervisados. Además, proporciona una representación explícita de las características que caracterizan los roles semánticos específicos de los verbos.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle méthode distributionnelle pour modéliser des jugements d'ajustement thématiques d'arguments prédicaux. Nous utilisons un DSM basé sur la syntaxe pour construire une représentation prototypique des rôles spécifiques au verbe\xa0: pour chaque verbe, nous extrayons les contextes de second ordre les plus saillants pour chacun de ses rôles (c'est-à-dire les dimensions les plus saillantes des remplisseurs de rôles typiques), puis nous calculons l'ajustement thématique comme un chevauchement pondéré entre le haut caractéristiques des candidats remplisseurs et des prototypes de rôle. Nos expériences montrent que notre méthode surpasse systématiquement une base de réimplémentation d'un système de pointe, et permet d'obtenir des résultats meilleurs ou comparables à ceux rapportés dans la littérature pour les autres systèmes non supervisés. De plus, il fournit une représentation explicite des caractéristiques caractérisant les rôles sémantiques spécifiques aux verbes.", 'ja': '本稿では、述語論証のテーマ適合判定をモデル化するための新しい分布法を紹介する。構文ベースのDSMを使用して、動詞固有の役割のプロトタイプ表現を構築します。すべての動詞について、その役割ごとに最も顕著な二次コンテキスト（つまり、典型的な役割充填剤の最も顕著な次元）を抽出し、候補充填剤のトップ機能とロールプロトタイプの重み付けされたオーバーラップとしてテーマ適合性を計算します。私たちの実験は、当社の方法が最先端のシステムを再実装するベースラインを一貫して上回り、他の監督されていないシステムについて文献で報告されているものよりも優れたまたは同等の結果を達成することを示しています。さらに、動詞固有の意味的役割を特徴付ける特徴の明示的な表現を提供します。', 'zh': '本文中,言新布法,以建模谓词论主题拟合决。 吾用语法之 DSM 以立特定于动词角之文:凡动词,吾取其尤异者二阶上下文(则角色充塞之最著维度),然后计题拟合为候选填充物角原型之加权重叠。 吾实验明始终优于基线复得先进之统,而与他无监统文献之善者相若也。 供表征动词特定语义角之显式。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы вводим новый дистрибутивный метод для моделирования предикат-аргументных суждений о тематической пригодности. Мы используем DSM на основе синтаксиса для построения прототипического представления ролей, специфичных для глаголов: для каждого глагола мы извлекаем наиболее значимые контексты второго порядка для каждой из его ролей (т.е. наиболее значимые измерения типичных заполнителей ролей), а затем вычисляем тематическую подгонку как взвешенное перекрытие между верхними признаками заполнителей-кандидатов и прототипами ролей. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наш метод последовательно превосходит базовую линию, повторно внедряя современную систему, и достигает лучших или сопоставимых результатов с теми, о которых сообщается в литературе для других неконтролируемых систем. Кроме того, он обеспечивает четкое представление признаков, характеризующих семантические роли, специфичные для глагола.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम मॉडलिंग विधेय-तर्क विषयगत फिट निर्णय के लिए एक नई वितरण विधि पेश करते हैं। हम क्रिया-विशिष्ट भूमिकाओं के प्रोटोटाइपिकल प्रतिनिधित्व का निर्माण करने के लिए एक वाक्यविन्यास-आधारित डीएसएम का उपयोग करते हैं: प्रत्येक क्रिया के लिए, हम अपनी प्रत्येक भूमिका के लिए सबसे प्रमुख दूसरे क्रम के संदर्भों को निकालते हैं (यानी विशिष्ट भूमिका भराव के सबसे प्रमुख आयाम), और फिर हम उम्मीदवार भराव और भूमिका प्रोटोटाइप की शीर्ष विशेषताओं के बीच भारित ओवरलैप के रूप में विषयगत फिट की गणना करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि लगातार एक राज्य-की-कला प्रणाली को फिर से लागू करने वाली एक आधार रेखा को फिर से लागू करती है, और अन्य असुरक्षित प्रणालियों के लिए साहित्य में रिपोर्ट किए गए लोगों के लिए बेहतर या तुलनीय परिणाम प्राप्त करती है। इसके अलावा, यह क्रिया-विशिष्ट शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं की विशेषता वाली विशेषताओं का एक स्पष्ट प्रतिनिधित्व प्रदान करता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach modh dáileacháin nua chun breithiúnais oiriúnachta téamacha réamh-argóint a shamhaltú. Bainimid úsáid as DSM atá bunaithe ar chomhréir chun léiriú fréamhshamhalta a dhéanamh ar róil a bhaineann go sonrach le briathra: do gach briathar, bainimid amach na comhthéacsanna dara hord is suntasaí do gach ceann dá róil (i.e. na toisí is suntasaí de líontóirí róil tipiciúla), agus ansin déanaimid feisteas téamach a ríomh mar fhorluí ualaithe idir na gnéithe is fearr de líontóirí iarrthóra agus rólfhréamhshamhlacha. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn ár modh go seasta bonnlíne a athfhorfheidhmíonn córas úrscothach, agus go mbaineann sé amach torthaí níos fearr nó inchomparáide leo siúd a thuairiscítear sa litríocht do na córais eile nach bhfuil faoi mhaoirseacht. Ina theannta sin, cuireann sé léiriú follasach ar fáil ar na gnéithe a shainíonn róil shéimeantacha a bhaineann go sonrach le briathar.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új disztribúciós módszert a predikát-argumentum tematikus illeszkedési ítéletek modellezésére. Szintaxis alapú DSM-t használunk az igék specifikus szerepeinek prototípusos ábrázolására: minden igéhez kivonjuk a legfontosabb másodrendű kontextusokat minden egyes szerephez (azaz a tipikus szerepköltők legkiemelkedőbb dimenzióit), majd kiszámítjuk a tematikus illeszkedést, mint egy súlyozott átfedést a jelöltek és a szerepkör prototípusai között. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk következetesen felülmúlja egy korszerű rendszer újratelepítését, és jobb vagy összehasonlítható eredményeket ér el a többi felügyelet nélküli rendszer irodalmában szereplőkkel. Ezenkívül kifejezetten ábrázolja az igék-specifikus szemantikai szerepeket jellemző jellemzőket.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια νέα μέθοδο κατανομής για τη μοντελοποίηση των κριτηρίων θεματικής προσαρμογής προδιάθεσης-επιχειρήματος. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα βασισμένο στη σύνταξη για να οικοδομήσουμε μια πρωτότυπη αναπαράσταση των ρόλων που αφορούν το ρήμα: για κάθε ρήμα, εξάγουμε τα πιο σημαντικά πλαίσια δεύτερης τάξης για κάθε έναν από τους ρόλους του (δηλαδή τις πιο σημαντικές διαστάσεις των τυπικών πληρωμάτων ρόλων), και στη συνέχεια υπολογίζουμε τη θεματική προσαρμογή ως μια σταθμισμένη επικάλυψη μεταξύ των κορυφαίων χαρακτηριστικών των υποψήφιων πληρωμάτων ρόλων και των πρωτοτύπων ρόλων. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά σταθερά μια βασική αρχή επανεγκατάστασης ενός συστήματος τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα ή συγκρίσιμα αποτελέσματα με αυτά που αναφέρονται στη βιβλιογραφία για τα άλλα συστήματα χωρίς επίβλεψη. Επιπλέον, παρέχει μια ρητή αναπαράσταση των χαρακτηριστικών που χαρακτηρίζουν συγκεκριμένους σημασιολογικούς ρόλους των ρήμων.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი დისტრიბუტიური მეტი მოდელექტურებაში გადავიყენებთ პრედიკატიკური არგუმენტიკური თავისწორება. ჩვენ ვიყენებთ სინტაქსური DSM-ს პროტიპური პროლეების პროტიპური გამოსახულება: ყოველ გერბისთვის, ჩვენ ყველა გერბისთვის ყველა პროლეების ყველა პროლეების ყველა პროლეებისთვის ყველა სინტაქსური პროლექტის ყველა სინტაქსური განზომილებებისთვის გამოყენებთ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი მუშაობელად უფრო მეტი სისტემის გადამუშაობა, და უფრო მეტი ან შემდგომარებელი შედეგების შედეგება, რომლებიც ლიტერიტატატატა დამატებით, ის უფრო გამოსახულებელია განსახულებელი გამოსახულება სიმენტიკური პროლების განსახულებელია.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente įvedame naują paskirstymo metodą, pagal kurį modeliuojami argumentuojami teminiai tinkamumo sprendimai. Mes naudojame sintaksinę DSM, kad sukurtume prototipinius žodžiui būdingų vaidmenų vaizdavimus: kiekvienam žodžiui i štraukiame svarbiausius antrosios eilės kontekstus kiekvienam iš jų vaidmenų (t. y. svarbiausius tipinių vaidmenų užpildytojų matmenis), o tada apskaičiuojame teminį pritaikymą kaip svertinį viršijimą tarp didžiausių kandidatų užpildytojų ir vaidmenų prototipų savybių. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas nuosekliai viršija pradinę naujausios sistemos atnaujinimą ir gauna geresnių ar palyginamų rezultatų, palyginamų su kitų nepastebimų sistemų literatūroje nurodytais rezultatais. Be to, jame aiškiai nurodomos charakteristikos, apibūdinančios konkrečių žodžių semantinius vaidmenis.', 'it': "In questo articolo, introduciamo un nuovo metodo distributivo per modellare i giudizi di adattamento tematici predicato-argomento. Usiamo un DSM basato sulla sintassi per costruire una rappresentazione prototipale dei ruoli specifici dei verbi: per ogni verbo estraiamo i contesti di secondo ordine più salienti per ciascuno dei suoi ruoli (cioè le dimensioni più salienti dei tipici role filler), e poi calcoliamo l'adattamento tematico come una sovrapposizione ponderata tra le caratteristiche principali dei candidati filler e prototipi di ruolo. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro metodo supera costantemente una base di ri-implementazione di un sistema all'avanguardia e raggiunge risultati migliori o comparabili a quelli riportati in letteratura per gli altri sistemi non supervisionati. Inoltre, fornisce una rappresentazione esplicita delle caratteristiche che caratterizzano i ruoli semantici specifici dei verbi.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз предикциялық аргументтің нақышты сәйкестіктерді үлгілеу үшін жаңа дистрибуттық әдісін келтіреміз. Біз синтаксис негіздеген DSM- ді Верб- ерекше рольдердің прототипикалық түрін құру үшін қолданамыз: әрбір верб үшін оның рольдарының ең салиентті екінші ретіндегі контексті (т. е. әдетті роль толтырушыларының ең салиентті өлшемдері), содан кейін кандидатты толтырушылардың жоғары мүмкі Біздің тәжірибеміздің әдіміміздің негізгі жолын қайта орындау жүйесіне қайта іске асырып, әдебиеттік жүйелерінде жақсы немесе салыстырылған нәтижелерімізді басқа бағдарламалы жүйелер үшін салыстыр Сонымен қатар, бұл Верб- ерекшелі семантикалық рольдерді таңдау мүмкіндіктерінің түсінікті көрсетіледі.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah pembahagian baru untuk memmodelkan penilaian tematik predikat-argumen. Kami menggunakan DSM berasaskan sintaks untuk membina perwakilan prototipik peranan spesifik-verb: untuk setiap verb, kami mengekstrak konteks tertib kedua paling penting untuk setiap peranan (iaitu dimensi paling penting bagi penpenuhi peranan biasa), dan kemudian kami menghitung muatan tematik sebagai meliputi berlebihan antara ciri-ciri atas penuhi calon dan prototip peranan. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami secara konsisten melampaui batas dasar melaksanakan semula sistem-state-of-the-art, dan mencapai keputusan yang lebih baik atau yang boleh dibandingkan dengan yang dilaporkan dalam literatur untuk sistem lain yang tidak diawasi. Lagipun, ia menyediakan perwakilan eksplicit bagi ciri-ciri yang mengkatakan peranan semantik-spesifik verb.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, воведуваме нов дистрибуционален метод за моделирање на тематични пресуди за предикат-аргумент. Користиме синтаксичен ДСМ за да изградиме прототипичен претстав на улоги специфични за јазици: за секој јазик, ги извадуваме најпознатите контексти од вториот ред за секоја од своите улоги (т.е. најпознатите димензии на типичните полнечи на улоги), а потоа ја пресметуваме тематичката соодветност како тежирана преплавување помеѓу највисоките карактеристики на кандидатските полнечи и Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека нашиот метод постојано го надминува основното респроведување на најсовремениот систем и постигнува подобри или споредливи резултати со оние што се пријавуваат во литературата за другите ненадгледувани системи. Покрај тоа, истиот обезбедува експлицитно претставување на карактеристиките кои карактеризираат семантични улоги специфични за јазици.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ വിതരണ രീതിയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന വിധികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രത്യേക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിന്റാക്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡിഎസിം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വെര്\u200dബ്-പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിക്കല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി: ഓരോ വാര്\u200dപ്പിലും നമ്മള്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഏറ്റവും സ്വാഭാവികമായ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d വീണ്ടും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണെന്നും, മറ്റൊരു സാഹിത്യത്തിന് വേണ്ടി സംരക്ഷി അതിനും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'I denne papiret introduserer vi ein ny distribusjonsmetode for modellering av predikat-argument tematiske tilpassande sprøytebrukar. Vi bruker ein syntaksbasert DSM for å bygge eit prototipisk representasjon av verbspesifikke roller: for kvar verb ekstraherer vi dei mest salient andre rekkefølgje kontekstane for kvar av sine roller (t.d. dei mest salient dimensjonane av typiske rollfyller), og deretter reknar vi tematiske passar som eit vekta overlapping mellom dei øvste funksjonane av kandidatfyller og rollprototypane. Eksperimentane våre viser at metoden vårt konsekvent utfører ein baseline som gjenoppretter eit kunstsystemet på nytt, og oppnår bedre eller sammenlignbare resultat med dei som er rapporterte i litteraturen for dei andre ukjende system a. Det gjev også ein ekspliskt representasjon av funksjonane som karakteriserer verbspesifikke semantiske rolar.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu metodu ta’ distribuzzjoni ġdid għall-immudellar ta’ sentenzi tematiċi adattati predikati-argumenti. Aħna nużaw DSM ibbażat fuq is-sintaks biex nibnu rappreżentanza prototipika ta’ rwoli speċifiċi għall-verbi: għal kull verb, neħħew l-aktar kuntesti salienti tat-tieni ordni għal kull wieħed mir-rwoli tiegħu (jiġifieri l-aktar dimensjonijiet salienti tal-fillers tipiċi tar-rwoli), u mbagħad nikkalkulaw l-adattament tematiku bħala sovrappożizzjoni peżata bejn il-karatteristiċi ta’ fuq tal-fillers kandidati u l-prototipi tar-rwoli. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-metodu tagħna b’mod konsistenti jeċċedi linja bażi li timplimenta mill-ġdid sistema avvanzata, u jikseb riżultati a ħjar jew komparabbli ma’ dawk irrappurtati fil-letteratura għas-sistemi l-oħra mhux sorveljati. Barra minn hekk, tipprovdi rappreżentazzjoni espliċita tal-karatteristiċi li jikkaratterizzaw rwoli semantiċi speċifiċi għall-verbi.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nową metodę dystrybucji modelowania tematycznych osądów dopasowania predykatów-argumentów. Używamy DSM opartego na składni, aby zbudować prototypową reprezentację ról specyficznych dla czasownika: dla każdego czasownika wyodrębniamy najbardziej istotne konteksty drugiego rzędu dla każdej z jego ról (tj. najbardziej istotne wymiary typowych wypełniaczy ról), a następnie obliczamy dopasowanie tematyczne jako ważone nakładanie się najważniejszych cech wypełniaczy kandydatów i prototypów ról. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasza metoda konsekwentnie przewyższa podstawową implementację najnowocześniejszego systemu i osiąga lepsze lub porównywalne wyniki do opisanych w literaturze dla innych systemów bez nadzoru. Ponadto zapewnia wyraźną reprezentację cech charakteryzujących role semantyczne specyficzne dla czasownika.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, introducem o nouă metodă distribuțională pentru modelarea judecăților tematice de potrivire predicat-argument. Utilizăm un DSM bazat pe sintaxă pentru a construi o reprezentare prototipă a rolurilor specifice verbelor: pentru fiecare verb extragem cele mai importante contexte de ordin secund pentru fiecare dintre rolurile sale (adică cele mai importante dimensiuni ale materialelor tipice de umplere a rolurilor), apoi calculăm potrivirea tematică ca o suprapunere ponderată între caracteristicile de top ale materialelor de umplere candidate și prototipurile de roluri. Experimentele noastre arată că metoda noastră depășește în mod constant o referință de reelementare a unui sistem de ultimă generație și obține rezultate mai bune sau comparabile cu cele raportate în literatura de specialitate pentru celelalte sisteme nesupravegheate. Mai mult decât atât, oferă o reprezentare explicită a caracteristicilor care caracterizează rolurile semantice specifice verbelor.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ хуваарилцааны арга загварын тулд шинэ хуваарилцааны арга загвар бий болгодог. Бид синтаксис дээр суурилсан DSM-г хэлний тодорхой дүрслэлүүдийн прототипик хэмжээсүүдийг бүтээх үед хэрэглэдэг: хэлний тулд бид түүний дүрслэлүүдийн хамгийн сайхан хоёр дахь дахь дахь дараагийн төлөвлөгчийн төлөвлөгчийн хамгийн сайхан хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглаж байна (т.е. энгийн дүрслэлийн хамгийн сайхан Бидний туршилтууд бидний арга нь суурь урлагийн системийг дахин хөгжүүлж, уран зохиолынхаа зарцуулагддаг хүмүүстэй илүү сайн эсвэл харьцуулагддаг үр дүн гаргадаг. Дараа нь, энэ нь хэлний тодорхойлолтой хэмжээний үйл ажиллагааг тодорхойлох чадваруудыг тодорхойлж өгдөг.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi distribucijski metod za modeliranje predikatskih argument a tematskih pristojnih sudova. Koristimo sintaksički DSM kako bi izgradili prototipičnu predstavu uloga specifičnih verb a: za svaku verbu izvlačimo najsaliènije druge redovne kontekste za svaku od njihovih uloga (tj. najsaliènijih dimenzija tipičnih punača uloga), a onda računamo tematičku priliku kao težinu preklapanja između najvećih karakteristika punača kandidata i prototipa uloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naša metoda konsekventno iznosi početnu liniju za ponovno provedbu državnog umjetničkog sistema i postiže bolji ili usporedbeni rezultati onima koji su prijavljeni u književnosti za ostale nepotrebne sisteme. Osim toga, ona pruža jasnu predstavu karakteristika koje karakteriziraju semantičke uloge na verbima.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් විදුලි විදුලි විධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන විදුලි විධානයක් පිළිබඳින්න ප Name අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය හොඳයි සමා ඒවගේම, ඒක පැහැදිලි ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියක් ලැබෙනවා වර්ගය-විශේෂ සෙමාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියක්.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa qaab cusub oo kala qaybsan oo u sameynaya tusaale ku saabsan xukummo ku habboon. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa DSM si aan u dhisno qaab tusaale ah oo u eg qoraal gaar ah: waayo, mar kasta waxaan ka soo bixinaa qoraalka labaad e e ugu badnaan, mid kasta oo ka mid ah qaybtiisa (tusaale ahaan kooxaha ugu badnaan qaybaha dabiicadda buuxinta), kadibna waxaynu u xisaabnaynaa tiyaatarka oo miisaanka miisaanka ah oo u dhexeeya xuquuqda ugu sarreeya fililayaasha kandida iyo tusaalaha kale. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu si joogto ah u soo saaro qoraalka farshaxanka, wuxuuna helaa resulto ka wanaagsan ama u eg kuwa warqadda qoraalka u soo qoray nidaamka kale oo aan la ilaalinayn. Sidoo kale waxaa sidoo kale ku qoran qaab cad oo ku saabsan tababaro gaar ah.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats introducerar vi en ny distributionsmetod för modellering av predikat-argument tematiska passbedömningar. Vi använder en syntaxbaserad DSM för att bygga en prototyp representation av verbspecifika roller: för varje verb extraherar vi de mest framträdande andra ordningens kontexter för var och en av dess roller (dvs de mest framträdande dimensionerna av typiska rollfyllare), och sedan beräknar vi tematisk anpassning som en viktad överlappning mellan toppfunktionerna i kandidatfyllare och rollprototyper. Våra experiment visar att vår metod konsekvent överträffar en baseline återimplementering av ett state-of-the-art system, och uppnår bättre eller jämförbara resultat jämfört med de som rapporterats i litteraturen för andra oövervakade system. Dessutom ger den en explicit representation av de egenskaper som kännetecknar verbspecifika semantiska roller.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک نئی تقسیم طریقہ معلوم کرتا ہے کہ پیشڈیکٹ-آرژوٹ کے مطابق فیصلہ کے مطابق مطابق فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم ایک سینٹکس بنیادی دی ڈیسم کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک دفعہ پر مشخص رئولوں کی پروٹیپٹی تصویر بنائیں: ہر ورب کے لئے ہم اس کے رئولوں کے لئے سب سے زیادہ سینٹی دوسری رئولوں کے لئے (یعنی سب سے زیادہ سینٹی رئولوں کی اندازے) اٹھاتے ہیں اور پھر ہم ٹیماتیک فیٹ کو ٹیماتیک فیٹ کا شمار بناتے ہیں کہ ایک دوسری رئولوں اور رول پروٹی ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ ایک بنیادی لین کو دوبارہ آزمائش کرتا ہے اور بہتر یا برابر نتیجے پہنچتا ہے ان کے ساتھ جو کتاب میں دکھائے گئے ہیں اور دوسرے غیر قائم ہونے والے سیستموں کے لئے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ایک کھول کھول کھول کھول کھول رہا ہے جو کلام کے مطابق سیمانٹی رول کو دکھائے جاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய பங்கீட்டு முறைமையை முன்னிருப்பு வார்ப்பு தீர்ப்புகளை பொருத்தமான தீர நாம் ஒரு ஒத்திசைப்படைக்கப்பட்ட ட டிஎஸ்எம் விவரிப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட பங்களை உருவாக்க பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். ஒவ்வொரு விவரிப்புக்கும், நாம் ஒவ்வொரு பங்குகளுக்கும் மிகவும் விற்பனையான இரண்டாவது வரிசையை வெளியேற்றுகிறோ எங்கள் சோதனைகள் தெரியும் என்றால் எங்கள் முறைமையில் தொடர்ந்து ஒரு அடிப்படைக்கோட்டை மீண்டும் செயல்படுத்துகிறது ஒரு கலை முறைமையை மீண்டும் செயல்படுத்த மேலும், அது ஒரு வெளிப்படையான குணங்களின் குறிப்பிட்ட எழுத்துருக்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறது.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz predictor-argumentni o'zgartirish uchun yangi tarqatish usulini anglatamiz. Biz bir xizmatga asosiy DSM (verb- specific rolarning prototypikni yaratish uchun foydalanamiz: har bir verb uchun, biz har bir xizmatning eng salimi ikkinchi tartizoni o'zgartirib chiqaramiz va keyin tugmalar fayllarning eng yuqori xususiyatlariga qaramamiz. Bizning tajribalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bizning usuli butun saqlash tizimini qayta ishga tushirib boshlaydi, va o'zimning boshqa saqlab qolmagan tizimning haqida o'xshash yoki kamaxshash natijalariga bajaradi. Ko'rsatilgan, u verb-specific semantik qobiliyatlarini xususiyatlash xususiyatlarini koʻrsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ đưa ra một phương pháp phân phát mới để mô hình các phán xét về ngữ pháp chuẩn. Chúng tôi sử dụng DSS dựa trên cú pháp luật để tạo ra mô tả mô- sắc mô tả các vai cụ thể của các động từ: cho mỗi động từ, chúng tôi trích xuất các mặt trận thứ hai nổi bật nhất cho mỗi vai trò của nó (tức là các kích thước nổi bật nhất của các bộ đệm đóng vai đi ển hình), và sau đó chúng tôi tính cách hợp chủ đề như một sự chồng chéo cân giữa các tính chất đỉnh của ứng viên đệm và các nguyên mẫu vai. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi hoàn to àn vượt trội so với cơ sở cơ bản tái tạo lại hệ thống hiện đại, và đạt được kết quả tốt hơn hoặc tương tự với những kết quả được ghi nhận trong văn học về các hệ thống không giám sát khác. Hơn nữa, nó cung cấp một sự mô tả rõ ràng về các đặc điểm theo ngữ pháp cụ thể.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия въвеждаме нов дистрибуционен метод за моделиране на предикатно-аргументални тематични приспособления. Използваме синтаксисов ДСМ, за да изградим прототипно представяне на специфичните за глагола роли: за всеки глагол извличаме най-значимите контексти от втори ред за всяка от неговите роли (т.е. най-значимите измерения на типичните ролеви пълнители), след което изчисляваме тематичната съвпадение като претеглено припокриване между основните характеристики на кандидатите за пълнене и прототипите за роли. Нашите експерименти показват, че методът ни последователно надминава базовата база за повторно внедряване на най-съвременна система и постига по-добри или сравними резултати с тези, докладвани в литературата за другите системи без надзор. Освен това, тя осигурява изрично представяне на характеристиките, характеризиращи глагол-специфичните семантични роли.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel introduceren we een nieuwe distributiemethode voor het modelleren van predicaat-argument thematische fit oordelen. We gebruiken een syntaxis-gebaseerde DSM om een prototypische representatie van werkwoordspecifieke rollen te bouwen: voor elk werkwoord extraheren we de meest opvallende tweede orde contexten voor elk van zijn rollen (d.w.z. de meest opvallende dimensies van typische rolvullers) en berekenen we vervolgens thematische fit als een gewogen overlap tussen de belangrijkste kenmerken van kandidaat-vullers en rolprototypes. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat onze methode consequent beter presteert dan een baseline-herimplementatie van een state-of-the-art systeem, en betere of vergelijkbare resultaten behaalt als die in de literatuur voor de andere systemen zonder toezicht. Bovendien biedt het een expliciete representatie van de kenmerken die werkwoordspecifieke semantische rollen karakteriseren.', 'da': 'I denne artikel introducerer vi en ny distributionsmetode til modellering af prædikat-argument tematiske pasdomme. Vi bruger en syntaksbaseret DSM til at opbygge en prototyp repræsentation af verbsspecifikke roller: For hvert verb udtrækker vi de mest fremtrædende anden ordens sammenhænge for hver af dens roller (dvs. de mest fremtrædende dimensioner af typiske rollefyldstoffer), og derefter beregner vi tematisk pasform som en vægtet overlapning mellem de øverste funktioner i kandidatfyldstoffer og rolleprototyper. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores metode konsekvent overgår en baseline gennemførelse af et state-of-the-art system, og opnår bedre eller sammenlignelige resultater som rapporteret i litteraturen for de andre ikke-overvågede systemer. Desuden giver det en eksplicit repræsentation af de træk, der karakteriserer verbspecifikke semantiske roller.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi distribucijski metod za modeliranje predikatnih argument a tematskih pristojnih sudova. Koristimo sintaksički DSM kako bi izgradili prototipičnu predstavu uloga specifičnih verb a: za svaki verb izvlačimo najsaličnije drugačije redovne kontekste za svaku od njihovih uloga (tj. najsaličnije dimenzije tipičnih punača uloga), a onda računamo tematičku priliku kao težinu preklapanja između najvećih karakteristika punača kandidata i prototipa uloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naša metoda konsekventno iznosi početnu liniju za ponovno provedbu stanja umjetnosti i postiže bolji ili usporedbeni rezultati onima koji su prijavljeni u književnosti za ostale nepotrebne sustave. Osim toga, ona pruža jasnu predstavu karakteristika koje karakteriziraju semantičke uloge specifične na verbu.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan metode distribusi baru untuk memmodelir penilaian tematis predikat-argumen. Kami menggunakan DSM berdasarkan sintaks untuk membangun sebuah representation prototipik dari peran spesifik verb: untuk setiap verb, kami mengekstrak konteks tertinggi perintah kedua untuk setiap perannya (i.e. dimensi tertinggi dari penuhi peran tipis), dan kemudian kami menghitung persamaan tematis sebagai overlap berlebihan antara ciri-ciri atas penuhi kandidat dan prototip peran. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa metode kami secara konsisten melampaui batas dasar memaksa ulang sistem state-of-the-art, dan mencapai hasil yang lebih baik atau dibandingkan dengan hasil yang dilaporkan dalam literatur untuk sistem lain yang tidak diawasi. Selain itu, itu menyediakan persembahan eksplicit dari karakteristik peran semantis spesifik verb.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine neue Verteilungsmethode zur Modellierung von Prädikat-Argumenten thematischer Fit Urteile vor. Wir verwenden ein syntaxbasiertes DSM, um eine prototypische Darstellung verbspezifischer Rollen zu erstellen: Für jedes Verb extrahieren wir die wichtigsten Kontexte zweiter Ordnung für jede seiner Rollen (d.h. die auffälligsten Dimensionen typischer Rollenfüller) und berechnen dann die thematische Anpassung als gewichtete Überlappung zwischen den Top-Features von Kandidatenfüllern und Rollenprototypen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Methode eine Baseline-Re-Implementation eines State-of-the-Art-Systems durchweg übertrifft und bessere oder vergleichbare Ergebnisse erzielt, die in der Literatur für die anderen unbeaufsichtigten Systeme berichtet wurden. Darüber hinaus bietet es eine explizite Darstellung der Merkmale, die verbspezifische semantische Rollen charakterisieren.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش جدید تقسیم برای نمونه\u200cسازی قضاوت\u200cهای متعادلانه\u200cای را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. ما از DSM بنیاد سنتاکس استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک نمایش پیش\u200cترین نمایش نقش\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای را بسازیم: برای هر کلمه، بیش\u200cترین نمایش\u200cهای سطح دوم برای هر نقش\u200cهایش بیرون می\u200cکشیم (یعنی بیش\u200cترین اندازه\u200cهای سطح\u200cترین نمایش\u200cکنندگان نقش\u200cهای معمولی) و سپس می\u200cتوانیم با عنوان یک تغییر سنگین در میان ویژه\u200cهای بالای پر آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما به طور کامل یک خط بنیادی که یک سیستم هنری را دوباره عملکرد می\u200cکند، و نتیجه\u200cهای بهتر یا قابل مقایسه با کسانی که در ادبیات گزارش شده\u200cاند برای سیستم\u200cهای غیر قابل تحسین شده\u200cاند به دست می\u200cآورند. علاوه بر این، نمایش مشخصی از ویژه\u200cهایی که توصیف کردن نقش\u200cهای semantic ویژه\u200cای به زبان خاص می\u200cباشند، پیشنهاد می\u200cکند.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, öňki-öňki argumlar temasy ýakyn çözümlerini örenmek üçin täze daýlaşma yöntemi tanyşdyrýarys. Biz sintaks tabanlı DSM'i verb takyklı rollerinin prototipi bir temsil etmek üçin kullanırız: her verb üçin, her roliniň i ň salit ikinji sıralar contextlerini (i.e. türli rol doldurucılaryň iň salit ölçülerini) çykaryp, we soňra tematik örgütlerini kandidat doldurucılaryň iň üst özelliklerinden ve prototiplerinin arasynda çykaryp hasaplaýarız. Biziň deneylerimiz biziň metodumyzyň esasy bir sistemany täzeden üýtgedip bolýandygyny görkezýär we literatýada beýleki garşyrmadyk sistemalar üçin a ýdylan ýa gowy ýa-da deňeşik netijelerimizi ýeňýär. Munuň üstine, verb spesifikaly semantik rollerini karakterlere alýan özellikleriň takyk bir suratyny temin edip bilýär.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha njia mpya ya usambazaji kwa ajili ya kuonyesha mada yenye hoja zinazofanana na maamuzi yanayofanana. Tunatumia DSM yenye mfumo wa ushirikiano ili kutengeneza uwakilishi wa aina maalum katika kazi za verb: kwa kila upande, tunatoa mikakati ya taratibu za pili kwa kila jukumu lake (yaani, utofauti mkubwa zaidi wa jukumu la kawaida), na kisha tunakadiria utamaduni unaoendelea kama uzito wa uzito kati ya vipengele vya juu vya filamu za wagombea na mifano ya majukumu. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu kwa kawaida hufanya upya upya katika mfumo wa hali ya sanaa, na hufanikiwa matokeo bora au yanayofanana kwa wale walioripotiwa katika fasihi kwa mfumo mwingine usio na uhakika. Zaidi ya hayo, inatoa uwakilishi wa wazi wa vipengele vinavyohusisha nafasi maalum za kiungo.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 새로운 분포 방법을 소개하여 술어 파라미터의 주제 일치 판단을 모델링했다.우리는 문법을 바탕으로 하는DSM을 사용하여 특정한 동사의 역할의 원형을 구축한다. 각 동사에 대해 우리는 각 역할의 가장 현저한 2단계 상하문(즉 전형적인 역할 충전자의 가장 현저한 차원)을 추출한 다음에 주제가 일치하도록 계산하고 후보 충전자와 역할 원형의 상부 특징 간의 가중 중첩을 계산한다.우리의 실험은 우리의 방법이 최첨단 시스템의 기선을 다시 실현하는 것보다 낫고 문헌에서 보도된 다른 무감독 시스템에 비해 더 좋고 비교할 수 있는 결과를 얻었다는 것을 보여 주었다.그 밖에 동사의 특정한 의미 역할 특징에 대한 현식 표시도 제공했다.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n nuwe verspreidingsmetode vir die modellering van predikaat-argument tematiske pas oordele. Ons gebruik 'n sintaks-gebaseerde DSM om 'n prototipiese voorstelling van verb-spesifieke roles te bou: vir elke verb, uitpak ons die mees salient tweede volgorde konteks vir elke van sy role (i.e. die mees salient dimensies van tipiese rolvulers), en dan tel ons tematieke pas as 'n gewigte oorvloei tussen die bo-funksies van kandidatievullers en rolprototipes. Ons eksperimente wys dat ons metode konsistentlik 'n basisline herimplementeer 'n staat van die kunstenstelsel, en bereik beter of vergelykbaar resultate met die wat in die literatuur berig is vir die ander ongeonderwerp stelsels. Ook, dit verskaf 'n eksplisiese voorsiening van die funksies wat verb-spesifieke semantiese roles karakteriseer.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne futim një metodë të re shpërndarëse për modelimin e gjykimeve tematike të përshtatshme predikat-argument. Ne përdorim një DSM me bazë sintakse për të ndërtuar një përfaqësim prototipik të roleve specifike verb ësh: për çdo verb, nxjerrim kontekstet më të rëndësishëm të rendit të dytë për secilin nga rolet e tij (i.e. dimensionet më të rëndësishme të plotësuesve tipikë roli), dhe pastaj llogarisim përshtatjen tematike si një mbishtypje të peshuar midis karakteristikave më të larta të plotësuesve kandidatë dhe prototipave roli. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se metoda jonë vazhdimisht ekziston në një bazë të rindërtimit të një sistemi më të lartë dhe arrin rezultate më të mira apo të krahasueshme me a to të raportuara në letërsi për sistemet e tjera të pa mbikqyrur. Përveç kësaj, ajo ofron një përfaqësim të qartë të karakteristikave që karakterizojnë rolet semantike specifike verb ëve.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም አዲስ የውጤት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ፍርድ ማሳየት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለሁሉም verb፣ ለሁሉም ትክክለኛውን የሁለተኛውን ትእዛዝ ትክክል እናወጣለን (ምናልባት ትክክለኛውን ትክክለኛ ክፍል ሞላፊዎች) እናስቆጣለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ለሌሎች ያልጠበቀው ስርዓቶች የተባለውን ብሔራዊ-የ-የ-ዐርድ ሥርዓት መግለጫ እንዲያስተካክሉ እና የተሻለ ወይም የተስተያየ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የverb-specific semantic role የሚያስተካክል ምርጫዎችን የሚያሳየው ግልፅ መልዕክት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'In this paper, we introduce a new distributional method for modeling predicate-argument thematic fit judgments.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք սինտաքսի հիմնված DSM-ը բայերի հատուկ դերերի նախատիպիկ ներկայացումը կառուցելու համար. յուրաքանչյուր բայի համար մենք դուրս ենք բերում երկրորդ շարժման ամենակարևոր կոնտեքստները իր դերերի յուրաքանչյուրի համար (այսինքն, բնորոշ դերերի լրացողների ամենակարևոր չափերը), և հետո հաշվարկում ենք թեմատիկական հարմարությունը որպես թեմատիկական լրաց Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը մշտապես գերազանցում է հիմքային վերականգնումը բարձրազանգվածի համակարգի և հասնում է ավելի լավ կամ համեմատական արդյունքներ, քան այն, որ գրականության մեջ հայտարարվել է այլ անվերահսկված համակարգերի համար: Ավելին, այն պարզապես ներկայացնում է բայի մասնավոր սեմանտիկ դերերի առանձնահատկությունները:', 'bn': 'In this paper, we introduce a new distributional method for modeling predicate-argument thematic fit judgments.  আমরা একটি সিন্ট্যাক্স ভিত্তিক ডিএসএম ব্যবহার করি ভার্ব-নির্দিষ্ট ভূমিকার প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণের জন্য: প্রত্যেক ভার্বের জন্য আমরা তার প্রত্যেক ভূমিকার জন্য সবচেয়ে বেদনাদায়ক দ্বিতীয় আদেশ প্রতিযোগিতা বের করে আনি (য আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সাধারণ সাহিত্যে অন্যান্য অরক্ষিত সিস্টেমের জন্য সাহিত্যে রিপোর্ট করা হয়েছে তাদের কাছে সাহিত্যের স এছাড়াও এটি ভার্ব-নির্দিষ্ট সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করেছে।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi distribucijski metod za modeliranje predikatnih argument a tematskih pristojnih sudova. Koristimo sintaksički DSM kako bi izgradili prototipičnu predstavu uloga specifičnih verb a: za svaku verbu izvlačimo najsalijantije druge redovne kontekste za svaku od njihovih uloga (tj. najsalijantije dimenzije tipičnih punača uloga), a onda računamo tematsku priliku kao težinu preklapanja između najvećih karakteristika punača kandidata i prototipa uloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naša metoda konsekventno iznosi početnu liniju za ponovno provedbu državnog umjetničkog sistema, i postiže bolji ili usporedbeni rezultati onima koji su prijavljeni u književnosti za ostale nepotrebne sisteme. Osim toga, ona pruža jasnu predstavu karakteristika koje karakteriziraju semantičke uloge specifične na verbu.', 'ca': "En aquest article introduim un nou mètode de distribució per modelar els judicis predicats-arguments temàtics adequats. Utilitzem un DSM basat en sintaxis per construir una representació prototípica de rols específics de verbs: per cada verb extraim els contextes de segon ordre més salients per cada un dels seus rols (és a dir, les dimensions més salients dels fillers típics), i després calculem l'ajustament temàtic com una sobreposió ponderada entre les principals característiques dels fillers candidats i els prototips del paper. Els nostres experiments demostren que el nostre mètode supera consistentment un sistema basal de reemplementació d'un sistema d'última generació i aconsegueix resultats millors o comparables a aquells reportats a la literatura dels altres sistemes no supervisats. A més, proporciona una representació explícita de les característiques que caracteritzen rols semàntics específics de verbs.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme novou distribuční metodu pro modelování predikátových argumentů tematických hodnocení fit. Pomocí syntaxe založeného DSM sestavíme prototypickou reprezentaci rolí specifických pro slovesa: pro každé sloveso extrahujeme nejvýznamnější kontexty druhého řádu pro každou z jeho rolí (tj. nejvýraznější dimenze typických vyplňovačů rolí) a poté vypočítáme tematickou shodu jako vážený překrývání hlavních rysů kandidátů a prototypů rolí. Naše experimenty ukazují, že naše metoda konzistentně překonává základní základní implementaci nejmodernějšího systému a dosahuje lepších nebo srovnatelných výsledků s výsledky uvedenými v literatuře pro ostatní systémy bez dozoru. Kromě toho poskytuje explicitní reprezentaci rysů charakterizujících sloveso specifické sémantické role.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut jaotusmeetodit predikaatargumentide temaatilise sobivuse otsuste modelleerimiseks. Me kasutame süntaksipõhist DSM-i, et luua tegusõnade spetsiifiliste rollide prototüüpiline esitus: iga tegusõna puhul ekstraheerime kõige silmapaistvamad teise järgu kontekstid iga rolli kohta (st tüüpiliste rollitaite kõige silmapaistvamad dimensioonid) ja seejärel arvutame temaatilise sobivuse kaalutud kattumisena kandidaatide täitjate ja rolliprototüüpide peamiste omaduste vahel. Meie katsed näitavad, et meie meetod on järjepidevalt ületanud algväärtuse, uuendades kaasaegset süsteemi, ning saavutab paremad või võrreldavad tulemused, mida on kirjeldatud kirjanduses teiste järelevalveta süsteemide puhul. Lisaks annab see selgesõnalise esituse verbipõhiseid semantilisi rolle iseloomustavatest omadustest.', 'az': "Bu kağızda, yeni dağıtış metodlarını təşkil edirik ki, predikat-argumenti tematik uyğun hökmləri modelləşdirmək üçün. Biz sintaks-tabanlı DSM'i verb-specifik rollərin prototipik bir göstəricisi yaratmaq üçün istifadə edirik: hər verb üçün, hər bir rolin üçün ən salient ikinci sıralı müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxt Bizim təcrübələrimiz təcrübələrimiz həmişəlik təcrübə sistemini yenidən istifadə edir və başqa təcrübə edilməmiş sistemlərə bildirilmiş səhifələrimizin daha yaxşısını və daha müəyyənləşdirilmiş sonuçlarını göstərir. Daha sonra, verb-specific semantik rollərini təhsil edən özelliklərin açıq-aydın göstəricisi təmin edir.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään uusi jakomenetelmä predikaatti-argumentti temaattisten sopivuustutkimusten mallintamiseen. Käytämme syntaksipohjaista DSM:ää verbikohtaisten roolien prototyyppien luomiseen: jokaisesta verbistä poimimme kullekin roolille merkittävimmät toisen järjestyksen kontekstit (eli tyypillisten roolitäyttöjen tärkeimmät ulottuvuudet) ja laskemme sitten temaattisen sopivuuden painotettuna päällekkäisyytenä ehdokkaiden ja rooliprototyyppien pääpiirteiden välillä. Kokeemme osoittavat, että menetelmämme on johdonmukaisesti parempi kuin perusskenaarion uusinta tekniikkaa hyödyntävä järjestelmä ja saavuttaa parempia tai vertailukelpoisia tuloksia kuin kirjallisuudessa raportoidut muut valvomattomat järjestelmät. Lisäksi se tarjoaa selkeän esityksen verbikohtaisia semanttisia rooleja luonnehtivista piirteistä.', 'jv': 'Nang pemberke iki, kita mulai un method di disebution nggawe sistem preduplicate-argument, pakek judgments tematik. We use a Sentrax-basate Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasai pertama awak dhéwé ngerasai sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan, lan ijol-ijol sing luwih apik dhéwé, lan ijol-ijol sing beraksi lan ijol-ijolan sing paling dhéwé ning basa sing sakjané perusahaan sistèm sing gak nggawe gerakan. Label', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo novo distribucijsko metodo za modeliranje predikatno-argumentov tematskih presoj prileganja. Z DSM, ki temelji na sintaksi, gradimo prototipično reprezentacijo glagolsko specifičnih vlog: za vsak glagol izvlečemo najbolj pomembne kontekste drugega reda za vsako njegovo vlogo (tj. najbolj pomembne dimenzije tipičnih polnilnikov vlog), nato pa izračunamo tematsko prileganje kot tehtano prekrivanje med vrhunskimi značilnostmi kandidatov in prototipi vlog. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da naša metoda dosledno presega osnovno ponovno uvedbo najsodobnejšega sistema in dosega boljše ali primerljive rezultate, kot so jih poročali v literaturi za druge sisteme brez nadzora. Poleg tega zagotavlja eksplicitno predstavitev značilnosti, ki označujejo glagolsko specifične semantične vloge.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, za mu introduce wata hanyoyi na dabam-daban dõmin ka sami misalin mutane da bakwai masu fitarwa. Tuna amfani da wani DSM wanda ke samar da shi na synkassa dõmin ka gina wani misalin misãlai na verb: ga kõwane verb, Munã fitar da muhimman masu sali da tarakin na ƙaranci na rubutu wa duk a aikin shi (misali da mafi sali da ke cikakken kima), kuma a sa'an nan kuma munã ƙidãya da muhimmada da za'a lissafa da nau'i mai nau'i a tsakanin tsarin masu tsari na filayen da misãlai na kirki. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa, hanyoyinmu yana ƙara bayani na ƙididdige wata na'urar-halin-sanar, kuma yana sãmun mafiya alhẽri ko da misãli zuwa waɗand a aka bai wa littãfin da aka tsare wa wasu na'urar da ba'a tsare. Za kuma, yana ƙunsa da wani mai bayyani na misãlai masu ƙayyade rolen da ke rubutu-wa'ura.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים שיטה פיצוי חדשה לדוגמא טיעון-טיעון נושאי שיפוטים מתאימים. אנו משתמשים בסינטקסית DSM כדי לבנות ייצוג פרוטופי של תפקידים ספציפיים לכל פרוטופים: לכל פרוטופים, אנו מוציאים את הקונקסטים המפורסמים ביותר של סדר שני לכל תפקיד שלה (כלומר המימדים המפורסמים ביותר של מלאי תפקידים טיפוסיים), ואז אנו מחשבים את התאמה הטימטית כהתקפות משקלת בין התאמות העליונות של מלאי המועמדים לבין פרוט הניסויים שלנו מראים שהשיטה שלנו ביצעה באופן קבוע מערכת חידוש שיפעלה מחדש מערכת מצוינת לאמנות, ושיגה תוצאות טובות או שוויות לאלה שדווחות בספרות עבור מערכות שאר לא מושגת. חוץ מזה, הוא מספק מייצג ברור של המאפיינים שמתאימים תפקידים סמנטיים ספציפיים לכתבים.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་དགོས། We use a syntax-based DSM to build a prototypical representation of verb-specific roles: for every verb, we extract the most salient second order contexts for each of its roles (i.e. the most salient dimensions of typical role fillers), and then we compute thematic fit as a weighted overlap between the top features of candidate fillers and role prototypes. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་ཕྱོགས་ནི། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དེ་ལས་གཞི་རྩལ་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྐྱོད་པ་ཞིག་ལས་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་བྱས་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུལ ད་དུང་། འདིས་བྱ་ཚིག་དམིགས་འབེབས་པའི་སྐད་ཆ་ཚོའི་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་ཅན་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Supervised Learning of Universal Sentence Representations from Natural Language Inference Data', 'pt': 'Aprendizado supervisionado de representações de sentenças universais a partir de dados de inferência de linguagem natural', 'ar': 'التعلم الخاضع للإشراف لتمثيلات الجملة الشاملة من بيانات استدلال اللغة الطبيعية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje supervisado de representaciones universales de oraciones a partir de datos de inferencia de lenguaje natural', 'fr': "Apprentissage supervisé des représentations de phrases universelles à partir de données d'inférence en", 'ja': '自然言語推論データからの普遍的な文章表現の監督学習', 'zh': '盖自然语言推理数据之通句也', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान डेटा से यूनिवर्सल वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व की पर्यवेक्षित सीखना', 'ru': 'Контролируемое изучение универсальных представлений предложений на основе данных вывода на естественном языке', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Mhaoirseachta ar Léirithe Pianbhreithe Uilíoch ó Shonraí Tátail Teanga Nádúrtha', 'hu': 'Az univerzális mondatábrázolások felügyeleti tanulása természetes nyelvi fertőzési adatokból', 'ka': 'უნივერსალური სიტყვების გამოსახულებების შესწავლება', 'el': 'Εποπτευμένη εκμάθηση καθολικών αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων από δεδομένα συμπερασμάτων φυσικής γλώσσας', 'it': 'Apprendimento supervisionato delle rappresentazioni universali delle frasi dai dati di inferenza del linguaggio naturale', 'mk': 'Супервизирано учење на универзалните реченици од природните инференциски податоци за јазик', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдерінің кеңейту деректерінен Universal sentence Representations', 'lt': 'Prižiūrimas visuotinio bausmės mokymasis iš gamtinių kalbų nelaimės duomenų', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Perwakilan Hukuman Universal Diperhatikan dari Data Inferensi Bahasa Alami', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ പഠനം', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Sorveljat ta’ Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ Sentenza Universali minn Dejta ta’ Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл инференцийн өгөгдлийн ертөнцийн өгүүлбэр суралцах', 'no': 'Overvakt læring av universelle setningssrepresentasjonar frå naturleg språk', 'pl': 'Nadzorowane uczenie się uniwersalnych reprezentacji zdań z danych wnioskowania języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Învățarea supravegheată a reprezentărilor universale ale sentințelor din datele de inferență ale limbajului natural', 'sr': 'Nadzoreno učenje univerzalnih predstavljanja kazne iz podataka prirodnog jezika', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Övervakad inlärning av universella meningsrepresentationer från naturliga språkinferensdata', 'so': 'Macluumaadka diiwaangelinta afka asalka ah', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி புகுத்தகத்திலிருந்து பொதுவான வாக்கியத்தின் பிரதிரிவுகளின் படிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'ur': 'ناطبیعی زبان انفورن ڈاٹا سے Universal Sentence Representations کی سیکھنے کی نظارت کی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình giám sát giáo dục đại diện từ các dữ liệu liên lạc ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'hr': 'Nadzoreno učenje univerzalnih predstavljanja kazne iz podataka prirodnog jezika', 'bg': 'Наблюдавано изучаване на универсални представи на изречения от данни за естествено езиково заключение', 'da': 'Overvåget læring af universelle sætningsrepræsentationer fra Natural Language Inference Data', 'nl': 'Toezicht op het leren van universele zinnen representaties van natuurlijke taal Inference Data', 'de': 'Supervised Learning of Universal Satz Representations from Natural Language Inference Data', 'ko': '자연 언어 추리 데이터 기반의 통용 문장 표시 감독 학습', 'id': 'Pembelajaran dari Perwakilan Sentensi Universal dari Data Inferensi Bahasa Alami', 'sw': 'Kufundishwa kwa ajili ya Mazungumzo ya Sentensi Duniani kutoka data za Kuzuia Lugha za asili', 'fa': 'یادگیری از نماینده\u200cهای جمله\u200cی جهانی از داده\u200cهای تغییر زبان طبیعی', 'tr': 'Täbiýal Dil Inferensiýa Maglumatdan Halkara sözler Görkezilişi', 'af': 'Ondersoektog Leer van Universele Sagtelsvoorstellings van Natuurlike Taal Inferensie Data', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'sq': 'Mësimi i mbikqyrur i përfaqësimeve të dënimeve universale nga të dhënat e referimit të gjuhës natyrore', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսիայի տվյալների միջոցով համաշխարհային արտահայտությունների վերահսկված սովորելը', 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtli Dil Inference Veril…ôrind…ôn Universal Sentence Representations √ñyr…ônm…ôsi', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রতিনিধির শিক্ষা সুপারিশ ভাষার তথ্য থেকে', 'ca': 'Aprendència supervisada de representacions de sentences universals a partir de dades de referència a llenguatges naturals', 'bs': 'Nadzoreno učenje univerzalnih predstavljanja kazne iz podataka prirodnog jezika', 'cs': 'Sledované učení univerzálních reprezentací vět z údajů z inference přirozeného jazyka', 'et': 'Universaalsete lauseesinduste juhitav õppimine loodusliku keele järelduste andmetest', 'fi': 'Universaalisten lauseesitteiden ohjattu oppiminen luonnollisen kielen inference-tiedoista', 'sk': 'Nadzorovano učenje univerzalnih stavkov iz podatkov o sklepanju naravnega jezika', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'למידה מושגת של מייצגים של גזר יוניברסלי ממידע השפה הטבעית', 'jv': 'Learn Universal Sentenci', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྷན་ཁང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་'}
{'en': 'Many modern NLP systems rely on word embeddings, previously trained in an unsupervised manner on large corpora, as base features. Efforts to obtain embeddings for larger chunks of text, such as sentences, have however not been so successful. Several attempts at learning unsupervised representations of sentences have not reached satisfactory enough performance to be widely adopted. In this paper, we show how universal sentence representations trained using the supervised data of the Stanford Natural Language Inference datasets can consistently outperform unsupervised methods like SkipThought vectors on a wide range of transfer tasks. Much like how computer vision uses ImageNet to obtain features, which can then be transferred to other tasks, our work tends to indicate the suitability of natural language inference for transfer learning to other NLP tasks. Our encoder is publicly available.', 'pt': 'Muitos sistemas modernos de PNL contam com word embeddings, previamente treinados de forma não supervisionada em grandes corpora, como recursos básicos. Esforços para obter embeddings para pedaços maiores de texto, como frases, no entanto, não foram tão bem-sucedidos. Várias tentativas de aprender representações não supervisionadas de sentenças não alcançaram desempenho satisfatório o suficiente para serem amplamente adotadas. Neste artigo, mostramos como as representações de sentenças universais treinadas usando os dados supervisionados dos conjuntos de dados da Stanford Natural Language Inference podem superar consistentemente métodos não supervisionados como vetores SkipThought em uma ampla variedade de tarefas de transferência. Assim como a visão computacional usa o ImageNet para obter recursos, que podem ser transferidos para outras tarefas, nosso trabalho tende a indicar a adequação da inferência de linguagem natural para transferir o aprendizado para outras tarefas de PNL. Nosso codificador está disponível publicamente.', 'fr': "De nombreux systèmes de PNL modernes s'appuient sur des intégrations de mots, préalablement entraînées de manière non supervisée sur de grands corpus, comme caractéristiques de base. Les efforts visant à obtenir des intégrations pour de plus grands blocs de texte, tels que des phrases, n'ont toutefois pas été aussi fructueux. Plusieurs tentatives d'apprentissage de représentations non supervisées de phrases n'ont pas atteint des résultats suffisamment satisfaisants pour être largement adoptées. Dans cet article, nous montrons comment les représentations de phrases universelles entraînées à l'aide des données supervisées des ensembles de données Stanford Natural Language Inference peuvent constamment surpasser les méthodes non supervisées telles que les vecteurs SkipThought sur un large éventail de tâches de transfert. Tout comme la façon dont la vision par ordinateur utilise ImageNet pour obtenir des fonctionnalités, qui peuvent ensuite être transférées à d'autres tâches, notre travail tend à indiquer la pertinence de l'inférence du langage naturel pour l'apprentissage par transfert vers d'autres tâches de PNL. Notre encodeur est accessible au public.", 'ar': 'تعتمد العديد من أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الحديثة على حفلات الزفاف ، والتي سبق تدريبها بطريقة غير خاضعة للإشراف في مجموعات كبيرة ، كميزات أساسية. ومع ذلك ، فإن الجهود المبذولة للحصول على حفلات الزفاف لأجزاء أكبر من النص ، مثل الجمل ، لم تكن ناجحة. لم تصل المحاولات العديدة لتعلم التمثيلات غير الخاضعة للرقابة للجمل إلى أداء مرضٍ كافٍ ليتم اعتمادها على نطاق واسع. في هذه الورقة ، نوضح كيف يمكن لتمثيلات الجملة الشاملة المدربة باستخدام البيانات الخاضعة للإشراف لمجموعات بيانات استدلال اللغة الطبيعية في ستانفورد أن تتفوق باستمرار على الأساليب غير الخاضعة للإشراف مثل متجهات SkipThought في مجموعة واسعة من مهام النقل. يشبه إلى حد كبير كيفية استخدام رؤية الكمبيوتر لشبكة ImageNet للحصول على ميزات ، والتي يمكن نقلها بعد ذلك إلى مهام أخرى ، يميل عملنا إلى الإشارة إلى ملاءمة الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي لنقل التعلم إلى مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الأخرى. برنامج التشفير الخاص بنا متاح للجمهور.', 'es': 'Muchos sistemas modernos de PNL se basan en incrustaciones de palabras, previamente entrenadas de manera no supervisada en grandes corpus, como características básicas. Sin embargo, los esfuerzos para obtener incrustaciones para fragmentos más grandes de texto, como oraciones, no han tenido tanto éxito. Varios intentos de aprender representaciones no supervisadas de oraciones no han alcanzado un rendimiento lo suficientemente satisfactorio como para ser ampliamente adoptados. En este artículo, mostramos cómo las representaciones de oraciones universales entrenadas con los datos supervisados de los conjuntos de datos de Inferencia de Lenguaje Natural de Stanford pueden superar consistentemente a los métodos no supervisados, como los vectores SkipThought, en una amplia gama de tareas de transferencia. Al igual que la visión artificial utiliza ImageNet para obtener funciones, que luego se pueden transferir a otras tareas, nuestro trabajo tiende a indicar la idoneidad de la inferencia del lenguaje natural para transferir el aprendizaje a otras tareas de la PNL. Nuestro codificador está a disposición del público.', 'zh': '诸今世NLP统赖于词嵌,前于大语料库上以无监督之教,以为基本特征。 然为文本大者(如句)取嵌之力不然。 学句者无监示数试不能满意,不可博采。 于本文,展用斯坦福自然语言推理数集之通句传输终优于 SkipThought 向量等无监督之法。 犹计算机视之所以用ImageNet也,然后可以移于他务,吾事归于明自然语言理之于移学于NLP适用性也。 吾编码器明矣。', 'ja': '多くの現代のNLPシステムは、以前は大規模なコーパスで監督されていない方法でトレーニングされていたワード埋め込みをベース機能として使用しています。しかし、文章などの大きなテキストの塊の埋め込みを取得する努力は、それほど成功していません。文の監督されていない表現を学習するいくつかの試みは、広く採用されるのに十分なパフォーマンスに達していない。この論文では、スタンフォード自然言語推論データセットの監視対象データを使用してトレーニングされた普遍的な文章表現が、幅広い転送タスクでスキップ思考ベクトルのような監視対象外の方法を一貫して上回ることができる方法を示します。コンピュータビジョンがImageNetを使用して機能を取得し、それを他のタスクに転送する方法と同様に、私たちの研究は、学習を他のNLPタスクに転送するための自然言語推論の適合性を示す傾向があります。当社のエンコーダは一般に公開されています。', 'ru': 'Многие современные системы NLP полагаются на встраивания слов, ранее обученные неконтролируемым образом на больших корпусах, в качестве базовых функций. Однако усилия по получению вложений для более крупных фрагментов текста, таких как предложения, не увенчались успехом. Несколько попыток изучить неконтролируемое представление приговоров не принесли достаточно удовлетворительных результатов для того, чтобы их можно было широко принять. В этой статье мы показываем, как универсальные представления предложений, обученные с использованием контролируемых данных наборов данных Stanford Natural Language Inference, могут последовательно превосходить неконтролируемые методы, такие как векторы SkipThought, по широкому спектру задач переноса. Подобно тому, как компьютерное зрение использует ImageNet для получения функций, которые затем могут быть перенесены на другие задачи, наша работа, как правило, указывает на пригодность вывода естественного языка для переноса обучения на другие задачи NLP. Наш энкодер общедоступен.', 'hi': 'कई आधुनिक एनएलपी सिस्टम शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर भरोसा करते हैं, जो पहले बड़े कॉर्पोरेट पर एक असुरक्षित तरीके से प्रशिक्षित थे, आधार सुविधाओं के रूप में। पाठ के बड़े हिस्सों के लिए एम्बेडिंग प्राप्त करने के प्रयास, जैसे कि वाक्य, हालांकि इतने सफल नहीं हुए हैं। वाक्यों के असुरक्षित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के कई प्रयास व्यापक रूप से अपनाए जाने वाले संतोषजनक पर्याप्त प्रदर्शन तक नहीं पहुंचे हैं। इस पेपर में, हम दिखाते हैं कि स्टैनफोर्ड प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान डेटासेट के पर्यवेक्षित डेटा का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित सार्वभौमिक वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व लगातार स्थानांतरण कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर SkipThought वैक्टर जैसे असुरक्षित तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं। बहुत कुछ कैसे कंप्यूटर दृष्टि सुविधाओं को प्राप्त करने के लिए ImageNet का उपयोग करता है, जिसे तब अन्य कार्यों में स्थानांतरित किया जा सकता है, हमारा काम अन्य एनएलपी कार्यों में सीखने के हस्तांतरण के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान की उपयुक्तता को इंगित करता है। हमारा एन्कोडर सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध है।', 'ga': 'Braitheann go leor córais NLP nua-aimseartha ar leabú focal, a bhí oilte roimhe seo ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht ar chorpas mór, mar bhunghnéithe. Mar sin féin, níor éirigh chomh maith sin leis na hiarrachtaí chun leabú a fháil do phíosaí níos mó téacs, mar abairtí. Ní raibh feidhmíocht shásúil go leor bainte amach ag roinnt iarrachtaí ar léiriú abairtí gan maoirsiú a fhoghlaim le go nglacfaí go forleathan leo. Sa pháipéar seo, léirímid conas is féidir le huiríll abairtí uilíocha arna n-oiliúint ag baint úsáide as sonraí maoirsithe thacair sonraí Tátail Teanga Nádúrtha Stanford feidhmiú níos fearr go seasta ar mhodhanna gan mhaoirseacht cosúil le veicteoirí SkipThought ar raon leathan tascanna aistrithe. Cosúil leis an gcaoi a n-úsáideann fís ríomhaire ImageNet chun gnéithe a fháil, ar féidir iad a aistriú go tascanna eile ansin, is gnách go léiríonn ár gcuid oibre oiriúnacht tátal nádúrtha teanga don fhoghlaim aistrithe go tascanna NLP eile. Tá ár n-ionchódóir ar fáil go poiblí.', 'hu': 'Számos modern NLP rendszer alapvető jellemzőként szóbeágyazásra támaszkodik, amelyeket korábban felügyelet nélkül képzettek a nagy corporákra. A nagyobb szövegdarabok, például mondatok beágyazására irányuló erőfeszítések azonban nem voltak olyan sikeresek. A mondatok felügyelet nélküli ábrázolásának tanulására irányuló kísérletek nem értek el elég kielégítő teljesítményt ahhoz, hogy széles körben elfogadhatók legyenek. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogy a Stanford Natural Language Inference adatkészletek felügyelt adatainak felhasználásával képzett univerzális mondatok reprezentációi hogyan képesek következetesen felügyelet nélküli módszereket felülmúlni, mint például a SkipThought vektorok széles skáláján. Ahogy ahogy a számítógépes látás az ImageNet-et használja a funkciók eléréséhez, amelyek ezután átvihetők más feladatokra, munkánk általában arra utal, hogy a természetes nyelvi következtetés alkalmas-e a tanulás más NLP feladatokra történő átvitelére. A kódolónk nyilvánosan elérhető.', 'el': 'Πολλά σύγχρονα συστήματα βασίζονται σε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, που προηγουμένως εκπαιδεύτηκαν χωρίς επίβλεψη σε μεγάλα σώματα, ως βασικά χαρακτηριστικά. Οι προσπάθειες για ενσωμάτωση σε μεγαλύτερα κομμάτια κειμένου, όπως προτάσεις, ωστόσο δεν ήταν τόσο επιτυχείς. Αρκετές προσπάθειες εκμάθησης χωρίς επίβλεψη αναπαραστάσεων των προτάσεων δεν έχουν επιτύχει ικανοποιητικές επιδόσεις ώστε να υιοθετηθούν ευρέως. Σε αυτή την εργασία, δείχνουμε πώς οι καθολικές αναπαραστάσεις προτάσεων που εκπαιδεύονται χρησιμοποιώντας τα εποπτευόμενα δεδομένα των συνόλων δεδομένων Συμπερασμάτων Φυσικής Γλώσσας του Στάνφορντ μπορούν να ξεπεράσουν σταθερά τις ανεπίτρεπτες μεθόδους όπως οι διανύσματα ΣκίπΣκέψης σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών μεταφοράς. Όπως και η υπολογιστική όραση χρησιμοποιεί το ImageNet για να αποκτήσει χαρακτηριστικά, τα οποία στη συνέχεια μπορούν να μεταφερθούν σε άλλες εργασίες, η εργασία μας τείνει να υποδείξει την καταλληλότητα της συμπερασμάτων φυσικής γλώσσας για τη μεταφορά μάθησης σε άλλες εργασίες. Ο κωδικοποιητής μας είναι δημόσιος διαθέσιμος.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი NLP სისტემები იყენებენ სიტყვების შებრუნებისთვის, რომელიც წინ განაკეთებულია დიდი კოპორაზე, როგორც ბაზის ფუნქციები. ტექსტის უფრო დიდი ნაწილად, როგორც სიტყვები, მაგრამ არ იყო რამდენიმე წარმატები. რამდენიმე მოცდილობა მასწავლისგან არ განსხვავებული გამოსახულებების გამოსახულებების შესაძლებლობელი გამოსახულებას არ მიიღეთ. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორ უნივერსალური წესების გამოყენება, როგორც სტანფორდის ნახვა ენერგიის ინფერენციის მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენებული მონაცემების გამოყენება როგორც კომპიუტერის ხედვა ImageNet გამოიყენება, რომელიც შეიძლება სხვა დავალებისთვის გადატვირთვა, ჩვენი სამუშაო უნდა დააჩვენოთ, რომ ჩვენი სამუშაო მონაცემულობა სახელსახური ენის ინ ნაქთჲრ კჲეყპ ვ ნა ოსბლთკა.', 'it': "Molti moderni sistemi NLP si basano sulle incorporazioni di parole, precedentemente addestrate in modo non supervisionato sui grandi corpora, come caratteristiche di base. Gli sforzi per ottenere incorporazioni per grandi porzioni di testo, come le frasi, non sono stati tuttavia così efficaci. Diversi tentativi di apprendere rappresentazioni non supervisionate di frasi non hanno raggiunto prestazioni sufficientemente soddisfacenti da essere ampiamente adottati. In questo articolo, mostriamo come le rappresentazioni di frasi universali formate utilizzando i dati supervisionati dei dataset di inferenza del linguaggio naturale di Stanford possano costantemente superare metodi non supervisionati come i vettori SkipThought in una vasta gamma di attività di trasferimento. Proprio come il computer vision utilizza ImageNet per ottenere funzionalità, che possono poi essere trasferite ad altre attività, il nostro lavoro tende a indicare l'idoneità dell'inferenza del linguaggio naturale per trasferire l'apprendimento ad altre attività NLP. Il nostro codificatore è pubblicamente disponibile.", 'kk': 'Көп қазіргі NLP жүйелері негізгі мүмкіндіктері ретінде үлкен корпора жүйесінде өзгертілмеген сөздерді ендіру үшін тұрады. Мәтін бөлшектері үлкен бөлшектеріне ендіру әрекеттері, мысалы сөйлемелер, бірақ бұл жетті емес. Бірнеше сұлбалардың көптеген мәліметтерін оқыту үшін көптеген жеткілікті істеу мүмкін емес. Бұл қағазда, Stanford Natural Language Inference деректер жиындарының қаншалық мәліметтері, SkipThought векторларының көптеген аудару тапсырмаларында, қаншалық мәліметтерді көрсетеді. Компьютердің көрінісі ImageNet қалай мүмкіндіктерді алу үшін қолданады, сондай-ақ басқа тапсырмаларга аударылады, жұмыс біздің басқа NLP тапсырмаларына аудару үшін табиғи тілдерді аудару үшін тәуелді ті Кодеріміз көпшілікті қол жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Daugelis šiuolaikinių NLP sistemų remiasi žodžių įdėjimais, kurie anksčiau nebuvo prižiūrimi didelių korprų, kaip pagrindinės savybės. Tačiau pastangos gauti didesnių teksto dalių, pavyzdžiui, sakinių, įterpimą nebuvo tokios sėkmingos. Keletas bandymų mokytis nepastebimo sakinių atstovavimo nepasiekė pakankamai veiksmingų rezultatų, kad jie būtų plačiai priimti. Šiame dokumente parodomi, kaip universal ūs sakiniai, parengti naudojant prižiūrimus Stanfordo gamtinių kalbų infekcijos duomenų rinkinius, gali nuosekliai viršyti nepastebimus metodus, pvz., SkipThought vektorius įvairiose perdavimo užduotyse. Much like how computer vision uses ImageNet to obtain features, which can then be transferred to other tasks, our work tends to indicate the suitability of natural language inference for transfer learning to other NLP tasks.  Mūsų kodatorius yra viešai prieinamas.', 'ms': 'Many modern NLP systems rely on word embeddings, previously trained in an unsupervised manner on large corpora, as base features.  Usaha untuk mendapatkan penyampaian bagi bahagian teks yang lebih besar, seperti kalimat, bagaimanapun, belum berjaya. Several attempts at learning unsupervised representations of sentences have not reached satisfactory enough performance to be widely adopted.  Dalam kertas ini, kita menunjukkan bagaimana perwakilan kalimat universal dilatih menggunakan data yang dikendalikan set data Inferensi Bahasa Alami Stanford boleh secara konsisten melampaui kaedah yang tidak dikendalikan seperti vektor SkipThought pada julat luas tugas pemindahan. Sama seperti bagaimana penglihatan komputer menggunakan ImageNet untuk mendapatkan ciri-ciri, yang kemudian boleh dipindahkan ke tugas lain, kerja kita cenderung menunjukkan kemampuan kesimpulan bahasa semulajadi untuk dipindahkan belajar ke tugas NLP lain. Pengekod kami tersedia secara umum.', 'ml': 'ആധുനികമായ NLP സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. വലി വാക്കുകള്\u200d പോലെയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വലിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഇങ്ങോട്ട് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കിലും  സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പല ശ്രമിക്കുകള്\u200d വിശാലമായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡിന്റെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് നമുക്ക് കാണിച കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ദര്\u200dശനം ഇമേജ്നെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ നമ്മുടെ എക്കോഡെര്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Ħafna sistemi moderni tal-NLP jiddependu fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, li qabel kienu mħarrġa b’mod mhux sorveljat fuq korpora kbira, bħala karatteristiċi bażiċi. Madankollu, l-isforzi biex jinkisbu inkorporazzjonijiet għal biċċiet akbar ta’ test, bħal sentenzi, ma kinux daqshekk ta’ suċċess. Diversi tentattivi biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet mhux sorveljati tas-sentenzi ma laħqux prestazzjoni sodisfaċenti biżżejjed biex tiġi adottata b’mod wiesa’. F’dan id-dokument, nistgħu nuru kif ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet universali tas-sentenzi mħarrġa bl-użu tad-dejta sorveljata tas-settijiet tad-dejta tal-Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali ta’ Stanford jistgħu b’mod konsistenti jaqbżu metodi mhux sorveljati bħall-vetturi SkipThought fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ kompiti ta’ trasferiment. Bħal kif il-viżjoni tal-kompjuter tuża ImageNet biex tikseb karatteristiċi, li mbagħad jistgħu jiġu trasferiti għal kompiti oħra, ix-xogħol tagħna għandu t-tendenza li jindika l-adegwatezza tal-inferenza lingwistika naturali għat-trasferiment tat-tagħlim għal kompiti NLP oħra. Il-kodifikatur tagħna huwa disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'mn': 'Олон орчин үеийн NLP систем нь нэг үг бий болгож, өмнө нь том корпора дээр сургалтын тухай багш байдлаар сургалтын тухай хэлбэрээр сургалтыг авч ирсэн. Мэдээллүүд шиг том хэсгийг олж авах хичээл, гэхдээ ийм амжилттай байхгүй. Олон зүйл өгүүлбэрүүдийн тусламжгүй байдлыг сурах хичээл олон хүмүүс дэлхийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөх хангалттай үйл ажиллагааг хүрэхгүй байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Stanford Natural Language Inference өгөгдлийн сангийн хэрхэн удирдагдаж сургалтын универсал өгүүлбэрүүдийг харуулж байна. SkipThought векторууд шиг олон шилжүүлбэрийн ажлыг дамжуулж чадахгүй аргыг үргэлжлүүлж чадна. Компьютерийн үзэл нь ImageNet-ийг хэрхэн ашиглаж бусад ажил руу шилжүүлж чадах боломжтой, бидний ажил өөр NLP ажил руу суралцах боломжтой байгалийн хэл халдварын тулд баялаг байгалийн халдварын тухай илэрхийлдэг. Бидний кодлогч олон нийтэд ашиглаж байна.', 'no': 'Mange moderne NLP-systemer er på ordinnbygging, som tidlegare trengte på ein ukjend måte på stor korpora, som grunnfunksjonar. Prøver å få innbygging for større tekstpunkt, som setningar, har imidlertid ikkje blitt så vellukka. Mange forsøk på å lære ulike representasjonar av setningar har ikkje nådd tilfredsstillende nok effekt for å veldig godta. I denne papiret viser vi korleis universelle setningar trengte med oversikte data av datasettet for Stanford Natural Language Inference kan konsekvent utføra ulike metodar som SkipThought-vektorar på eit brett område av overføringsverkingar. Som slik datavisinga brukar ImageNet for å få funksjonar. Dette kan derfor overførast til andre oppgåver. Arbeidet vårt har tendens til å vise korleis det er tilgjengeleg for naturspråk-infeksjon for å overføra læring til andre NLP-oppgåver. Kodaren vårt er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'pl': 'Wiele nowoczesnych systemów NLP opiera się na osadzeniach słów, przeszkolonych wcześniej w sposób bez nadzoru na dużych korporach, jako podstawowych funkcjach. Wysiłki na rzecz uzyskania osadzeń dla większych fragmentów tekstu, takich jak zdania, nie okazały się jednak tak skuteczne. Kilka prób uczenia się bez nadzoru reprezentacji zdań nie osiągnęło wystarczającej skuteczności, aby było szeroko przyjęte. W niniejszym artykule pokazujemy, jak uniwersalne reprezentacje zdań trenowane przy użyciu nadzorowanych danych ze zbiorów danych Stanford Natural Language Inference mogą konsekwentnie przewyższać metody bez nadzoru, takie jak wektory SkipThought w szerokim zakresie zadań transferowych. Podobnie jak wizja komputerowa wykorzystuje ImageNet do uzyskiwania funkcji, które można następnie przenieść do innych zadań, nasza praca ma tendencję do wskazywania przydatności wniosków języka naturalnego do transferu nauki na inne zadania NLP. Nasz koder jest publicznie dostępny.', 'mk': 'Многу модерни НЛП системи се потпираат на зборови вградени, претходно обучени на ненадгледуван начин на големи капори, како основни карактеристики. Сепак, напорите за добивање вложувања за поголеми делови од текстот, како што се речениците, не беа толку успешни. Several attempts at learning unsupervised representations of sentences have not reached satisfactory enough performance to be widely adopted.  Во овој документ, покажуваме како универзалните реченици обучени користејќи ги надгледуваните податоци на податоците на Стенфорд природен јазик инференција може константно да ги надмине ненадгледуваните методи како векторите SkipThought на широк опсег на трансферентни задачи. Како што компјутерската визија ја користи ImageNet за да добие карактеристики, кои потоа може да се префрлат на други задачи, нашата работа има тенденција да ја индицира соодветноста на природната инференција на јазик за префрлање на учењето на други NLP задачи. Нашиот кодер е јавно достапен.', 'ro': 'Multe sisteme moderne de PNL se bazează pe încorporarea cuvintelor, antrenate anterior într-o manieră nesupravegheată pe corpore mari, ca caracteristici de bază. Eforturile de a obține încorporări pentru bucăți mai mari de text, cum ar fi propozițiile, nu au fost totuși atât de reușite. Mai multe încercări de a învăța reprezentări nesupravegheate ale propozițiilor nu au atins performanțe suficient de satisfăcătoare pentru a fi adoptate pe scară largă. În această lucrare, vom arăta cum reprezentările universale ale frazelor instruite folosind datele supravegheate din seturile de date Stanford Natural Language Inference pot depăși în mod constant metodele nesupravegheate precum vectorii SkipThought într-o gamă largă de sarcini de transfer. La fel ca modul în care viziunea computerizată folosește ImageNet pentru a obține caracteristici, care pot fi apoi transferate la alte sarcini, munca noastră tinde să indice adecvarea inferenței limbajului natural pentru transferul de învățare la alte sarcini PNL. Encoder-ul nostru este disponibil public.', 'sr': 'Mnogi moderni NLP sistemi se oslanjaju na uključenje reči, koje su prethodno obučene na neodređen naèin na veliku korporu, kao osnovne karakteristike. Poticaji za dobivanje integracija za veće komade teksta, poput rečenica, međutim nisu bili tako uspješni. Nekoliko pokušaja učenja neodređenih predstavljanja rečenica nije dostigao dovoljno zadovoljavajuće učinke za široko usvojenje. U ovom papiru pokazujemo kako univerzalne predstave rečenice obučene koristeći nadzorne podatke podataka Stanford a prirodne jezičke neprijateljske podatke konsekventno mogu izvršiti neodređene metode poput SkipThought vektora na širokom nizu zadataka za prenošenje. Kao što kompjuterska vizija koristi ImageNet da bi dobila karakteristike, koje se onda mogu prebaciti na druge zadatke, naš rad navodi na odgovarajuće prirodne jezičke infekcije za prebacivanje učenja na druge NLP zadatke. Naš koder je javno dostupan.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka NLP ee modern u dhow waxay ku xiran yihiin hadal ku habboon, horay waxay ku tababareen qaab aan la ilaalinayn shirkad waaweyn, sida gaar gaar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka laga helo qoraal aad u weyn, tusaale ahaan hadallada, ma liibaanin. Jahaado badan oo lagu baro noocyada hadallada aan la ilaaliyeyn ma gaadhin sameynta ku filan in la kordhiyo. Warqadan waxan ka muuqanaynaa sida loo tababariyey macluumaadka la ilaaliyey ee macluumaadka iskudarka ee luqada Stanford waxay ku socon karaan qaababka aan la ilaalinayn, sida vectoryada SkipThought oo ah shaqooyin kala duduwan oo la wareejiyo. Sida oo kale tusaale ahaan muuqashada kambiyuutarku uu u isticmaalaa ImageNet si uu u helo faa’iido, kaas oo markaas loo wareejiyo shaqooyin kale, shaqadayadu waxey ka muuqataa habboonaanta ku habboon barashada afka dabiicadda ee loo wareejiyo shaqooyinka kale ee NLP. Qodxadeena wuxuu si bayaan ah u helaa.', 'sv': 'Många moderna NLP-system förlitar sig på ordinbäddningar, tidigare utbildade på ett oövervakat sätt på stora corpora, som basfunktioner. Insatser för att få inbäddningar för större textdelar, till exempel meningar, har dock inte varit så framgångsrika. Flera försök att lära sig obevakade framställningar av meningar har inte uppnått tillräckligt tillfredsställande resultat för att kunna antas allmänt. I denna uppsats visar vi hur universella meningsrepresentationer tränade med övervakad data från Stanford Natural Language Inference dataset konsekvent kan överträffa oövervakade metoder som SkipThought-vektorer på ett brett spektrum av överföringsuppgifter. Precis som hur datorseende använder ImageNet för att få funktioner, som sedan kan överföras till andra uppgifter, tenderar vårt arbete att indikera lämpligheten av naturligt språk inferens för överföring av lärande till andra NLP-uppgifter. Vår kodare är offentligt tillgänglig.', 'ta': 'நிறைய அமர்ந்த NLP அமைப்புகள் வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்களை நம்புகிறார்கள், முன்னர் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பெரிய குறும்போர்கா வாக்கியங்கள் போன்ற பெரிய எழுத்துருக்களுக்கான உள்ளீடுகளை பெற முயற்சிகள் எப்போதும் வெற்றியடையவில்லை. பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத வாக்கியங்களின் குறிப்புகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள பல முயற்சிகள் பொருத்தமான செயல்பாட்டை பெரிதாக் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் எவ்வாறு பொதுவான வாக்கு பிரதிநிர்வாகிகள் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம் ஸ்டான்போர்ட் இயல்பான மொழி புகுத்தகத்தின்  கணினியின் பார்வை எப்படி உருவங்களை பெற பயன்படுத்துகிறது என்பது போல, அது மற்ற பணிகளுக்கு மாற்றப்பட முடியும், எங்கள் வேலை வழக்கம் மற்ற NLP பணிகளுக்கு கற்றுக் கொள எங்கள் குறியீடு பொதுவாக இருக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'بہت سے modern NLP systems rely on word embeddings, previously trained in an unsupervised manner on large corpora, as base features. بڑے ٹکڑوں کے لئے ابڈینگ حاصل کرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے، جیسے جماعت، اگرچہ اس طرح کامیابی نہیں ہوتی۔ بہت سی کوشش باتوں کی غیر قابل تعلیم سکھانے کے لئے کافی کامیابی نہیں پہنچ گئی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ استنفورد طبیعی زبان انفارنس ڈیٹسٹ کی تحقیق کی دکھائی کے مطابق کس طرح عمومی جماعت کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے جیسے SkipThought ویکتوروں کی طرح ایک وسیع طریقے پر غیرقابل تحقیق کی طریقہ سے کام کرسکتے ہیں. کمپیوٹر کی نظر کس طرح ImageNet کو فائدے حاصل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے، اور پھر دوسرے کاموں کی طرف منتقل کئے جاتے ہیں، ہمارا کام ایسا کرتا ہے کہ دوسرے NLP کاموں کی تعلیم کے لئے طبیعی زبان کے مطابقت کا مطابق دکھائے جاتے ہیں. ہمارا کوڈر صریح طور پر موجود ہے.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් අද්\u200dයුතික NLP පද්ධතිය ලොකු කොර්පෝරා වලින් පද්ධතියක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, මුලින් පද්ධතියක් විදිහට පු වැඩි පැත්තක් පැත්තට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සැලසුම් කරනවා, වචනය වගේ, ඒත් වැඩේ සාර්ථක වෙනුවෙන් නෑ. කීපයක් උත්සාහ කරන්නේ වාක්ෂාවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි උත්සාහ කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අවශ මේ පත්තේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් ප්\u200dරාකෘති භාෂාවික භාෂාවික දත්ත සැකසුම් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය වෙක්ටර් වගේ ස්කිප්ට් වෙක ගොඩක් වගේම පරිගණක දර්ශනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේම, ඒ වගේම අනිත් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, අපේ  අපේ සංකේතකය ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයි.', 'uz': "Koʻp yangi NLP tizimi bir necha soʻzlarga ishlatadi, avval katta kompaniya bilan xavfsiz qilmagan, asosiy imkoniyatlar sifatida. Name Javob berilmagan so'zlar tashkilotlarini o'rganishda bir necha jarayon so'zlarni katta ishlatish uchun yetarli amalni yetardi. Bu qogʻozda, biz Stanford tabiiy tilning taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlari haqida qanday o'rganish mumkin, SkipThought vektorlarini ko'p tarkibi vazifalarga ko'p tarkibida saqlash muvaffaqiyatlarni ishlatish mumkin. Kompyuterning koʻrinishida ImageNet tashkilotlarini olish uchun imkoniyatlarni foydalanishi mumkin, keyin yana boshqa vazifalarga olib tashlash mumkin, bizning ishimiz boshqa NLP vazifalarga o'rganish uchun tabiiy tillar infeksiyatlarini ko'rsatadi. Kodlash usuli topilmadi.", 'vi': 'Nhiều hệ thống Njala hiện đại dựa trên sự gắn ghép từ, đã được huấn luyện một cách không giám sát, như những tính năng cơ bản. Nỗ lực đạt được sự nhúng tay vào những đoạn văn bản lớn hơn, như câu, tuy nhiên đã không thành công đến vậy. Nhiều nỗ lực học những diễn văn không giám sát chưa đạt đủ trình độ thỏa đáng để được thông qua rộng rãi. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cho thấy các đài phát biểu toàn cầu được đào tạo bằng dữ liệu giám sát của các tập tin Liên Xô ngôn ngữ tự nhiên Stanford có thể hoàn thành các phương pháp không được giám sát như SkipNghĩ trên một loạt các nhiệm vụ thuyên chuyển. Giống như cách ảo thuật máy tính sử dụng ImageNet để có được các tính năng, mà sau đó có thể chuyển sang các công việc khác, công việc của chúng tôi có xu hướng xác định mức độ phù hợp của ám chỉ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho việc chuyển học sang các công việc khác của NMB. Máy mã hóa của chúng tôi công khai.', 'nl': "Veel moderne NLP-systemen vertrouwen op woord embeddings, die eerder zonder toezicht op grote corpora's zijn getraind, als basisfuncties. Pogingen om insluitingen te verkrijgen voor grotere stukjes tekst, zoals zinnen, zijn echter niet zo succesvol geweest. Verschillende pogingen om zonder toezicht zinnen te leren representaties te leren, hebben onvoldoende resultaten bereikt om breed te worden aangenomen. In dit artikel laten we zien hoe universele zinsrepresentaties getraind met behulp van de begeleide data van de Stanford Natural Language Inference datasets consistent kunnen presteren boven onbeheerde methoden zoals SkipThought vectoren op een breed scala van overdrachttaken. Net zoals computervisie ImageNet gebruikt om functies te verkrijgen, die vervolgens kunnen worden overgebracht naar andere taken, heeft ons werk de neiging om de geschiktheid van natuurlijke taalinferentie aan te geven voor overdracht van leren naar andere NLP-taken. Onze encoder is openbaar beschikbaar.", 'da': 'Mange moderne NLP-systemer er afhængige af ordindlejringer, som tidligere er trænet uden opsyn på store korpora, som grundfunktioner. Indsatsen for at få indlejringer til større stykker tekst, såsom sætninger, har dog ikke været så vellykket. Adskillige forsøg på at lære uopvågede repræsentationer af sætninger har ikke opnået tilfredsstillende resultater til at blive vedtaget i vid udstrækning. I denne artikel viser vi, hvordan universelle sætningsrepræsentationer trænet ved hjælp af de overvågede data fra Stanford Natural Language Inference datasæt konsekvent kan overgå uopvågede metoder som SkipThought vektorer på en bred vifte af overførselsopgaver. Ligesom hvordan computer vision bruger ImageNet til at opnå funktioner, som derefter kan overføres til andre opgaver, har vores arbejde tendens til at indikere egnetheden af naturlig sprog inference til overførsel af læring til andre NLP-opgaver. Vores koder er offentligt tilgængelig.', 'hr': 'Mnogi moderni NLP sustavi se oslanjaju na uključenje riječi, koje su prethodno obučene na neodređen način na veliku korporu, kao osnovne karakteristike. Nasilje za dobivanje ugrađenja za veće dijelove teksta, poput rečenica, međutim nisu bile tako uspješne. Nekoliko pokušaja učenja neodređenih predstavljanja kazne nisu dostiglo dovoljno zadovoljavajućih učinka za široko usvojenje. U ovom papiru pokazujemo kako univerzalne predstave rečenice obučene koristeći nadzorne podatke podataka Stanford prirodnog jezika Inferencije podataka koji konsekventno mogu izvršiti neodređene metode poput SkipThought vektora na širokom rasponu zadataka prijenosa. Kao što računalna vizija koristi ImageNet kako bi dobila karakteristike, koje se onda mogu prebaciti na druge zadatke, naš rad navodi na odgovarajuće prirodne jezičke infekcije za prebacivanje učenja na druge NLP zadatke. Naš koder je javno dostupan.', 'bg': 'Много съвременни системи разчитат на вграждането на думи, предварително обучени без надзор върху големи корпуси, като основни характеристики. Усилията за получаване на вграждания за по-големи парчета текст, като изречения, обаче не са толкова успешни. Няколко опита за изучаване на безнадзорни представи на изреченията не са достигнали достатъчно задоволително представяне, за да бъдат широко приети. В тази статия ние показваме как универсалните представи на изреченията, обучени с помощта на надзорните данни на Станфордските масиви от данни за изводи на естествения език, могат последователно да превъзхождат ненадзорни методи като векторите при широк спектър от задачи за прехвърляне. Подобно на начина, по който компютърното зрение използва за получаване на функции, които след това могат да бъдат прехвърлени към други задачи, нашата работа е склонна да показва пригодността на изводите на естествения език за трансфер на обучение към други задачи на НЛП. Нашият кодер е публично достъпен.', 'de': 'Viele moderne NLP-Systeme setzen als Basisfunktionen auf Worteinbettungen, die zuvor unbeaufsichtigt auf große Korpora trainiert wurden. Versuche, Einbettungen für größere Textabschnitte wie Sätze zu erhalten, waren jedoch nicht so erfolgreich. Mehrere Versuche, unbeaufsichtigte Repräsentationen von Sätzen zu erlernen, haben nicht zufriedenstellend genug Leistung erreicht, um weit verbreitet zu werden. In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir, wie universelle Satzrepräsentationen, die mit den überwachten Daten der Stanford Natural Language Inference-Datensätze trainiert werden, bei einer Vielzahl von Transferaufgaben konsistent unüberwachte Methoden wie SkipThought-Vektoren übertreffen können. Ähnlich wie Computer Vision ImageNet verwendet, um Funktionen zu erhalten, die dann auf andere Aufgaben übertragen werden können, tendiert unsere Arbeit dazu, die Eignung natürlicher Sprachinferenzen für den Transfer von Lernen auf andere NLP-Aufgaben anzuzeigen. Unser Encoder ist öffentlich verfügbar.', 'ko': '많은 현대 NLP 시스템은 단어 삽입에 의존하고 예전에는 대형 어료 라이브러리에서 무감독의 방식으로 훈련을 하는 것이 기본적인 특징이었다.그러나 더 큰 텍스트 블록 (예: 문장) 을 삽입하기 위한 노력은 그다지 성공하지 못했다.몇 차례 문장을 배우려는 무감독 표징이 있었지만 만족스러운 효과가 없어 널리 사용되지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 스탠퍼드 자연 언어 추리 데이터 집합의 감독 데이터 훈련이 통용되는 문장 표현을 어떻게 사용하는지 보여 주었기 때문에 광범위한 이전 임무에서 무감독 방법, 예를 들어 SkipThought 벡터보다 우수하다.컴퓨터 시각이 ImageNet을 어떻게 사용해서 특징을 얻고 다른 작업으로 옮기는지와 같이 우리의 작업은 자연 언어 추리가 다른 NLP 작업으로 옮기는 데 적용되는 것을 나타내는 경향이 있다.우리의 인코더는 공개적이다.', 'fa': 'بسیاری از سیستم\u200cهای NLP مدرن به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای بنیادی استفاده می\u200cکنند که قبلاً به طریق غیرقابل تعلیم داده شده\u200cاند. تلاش برای پیدا کردن پیوندهای بزرگترین قطعات متن، مانند جمله\u200cها، به هر حال خیلی موفق نبوده است. چندتا تلاش در یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای غیرقابل تحریک از جمله\u200cها به اندازه کافی عملکرد مناسب برای پذیرش فراوان رسیده\u200cاند. در این کاغذ، ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه نمایش جمله\u200cهای جهانی با استفاده از داده\u200cهای تحت نظارت داده\u200cهای تنظیم زبان طبیعی استنفورد می\u200cتوانند همیشه روش\u200cهای غیرقابل تغییر داده\u200cای مانند ویکتورهای SkipThought در یک مجموعه از کارهای انتقال را انجام دهند شبیه این است که چگونه دید کامپیوتر از ImageNet استفاده می کند تا ویژه\u200cهایی را دریافت کند، که بعدش می\u200cتواند به کارهای دیگر انتقال داده شود، کار ما به نشان دادن مناسبی آلودگی زبان طبیعی برای انتقال یادگیری به کار های دیگر NLP نشان می\u200cدهد. Encoder ما به طور عمومي دسترسي داره', 'id': 'Banyak sistem NLP modern bergantung pada pembangunan kata, sebelumnya dilatih dengan cara yang tidak diawasi pada corpora besar, sebagai fitur dasar. Usaha untuk mendapatkan embedding untuk bagian teks yang lebih besar, seperti kalimat, bagaimanapun belum begitu sukses. Beberapa percobaan untuk belajar rappresentasi tidak diawasi kalimat belum mencapai prestasi yang cukup memuaskan untuk diadopsi secara luas. Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan bagaimana representation kalimat universal dilatih menggunakan data yang diawasi dari set data Inferensi Bahasa Alami Stanford dapat secara konsisten melebihi metode tidak diawasi seperti vektor SkipThought pada jangkauan lebar tugas transfer. Seperti bagaimana penglihatan komputer menggunakan ImageNet untuk mendapatkan fitur, yang kemudian dapat dipindahkan ke tugas lain, pekerjaan kita cenderung menunjukkan kemampuan dari kesimpulan bahasa alam untuk dipindahkan belajar ke tugas NLP lainnya. Pengkode kami tersedia publik.', 'tr': "Köp modern NLP sistemalary uly korpora üýtgeýän şeklinde, öňki hem bilinmedik şeklinde bilinmedilen söz integrasyna ynanýarlar. Çözümler ýaly uly bölekler üçin girişini almak üçin çabalar. Sözlelerin garaşylmadyk täzeliklerini öwrenmek üçin birnäçe synanyşy kän çenli üýtgetmek üçin ýeterlik täzeliklere ýetmedi. Bu kagyzda, Stanford Dobiýal Diller Referans verileri ýaly Skip we Thought vektörleri birnäçe göçüp görenlerden üýtgeýän uniwersal sözleriň önümlerini görkezip bilýärler. Kompýuter görnüşiniň ImageNet'i nähili özellikleri almak üçin ulanýandygy ýaly, ol soňra başga işlere göçürilebilir. Biziň işimiz be ýleki NLP işlerine öwrenmek üçin tebigat diliň azalygynyň ýeterliklerini görkezmäge mümkin edip bilýär. Biziň kodçymyz publika bar.", 'sw': 'Mfumo wa NLP wa kisasa wanategemea maneno yanayotumiwa, ambao hapo awali walifunzwa kwa namna isiyo na usalama katika kampuni kubwa, kama vipengele vya msingi. Juhudi za kupata mabango kwa makundi makubwa ya maandishi, kama vile sentensi, hata hivyo bado haijafanikiwa. Jaribio kadhaa za kujifunza uwakilishi usio na uhakika wa hukumu hazijapata ufanisi wa kutosha wa kutekelezwa vizuri. In this paper, we show how universal sentence representations trained using the supervised data of the Stanford Natural Language Inference datasets can consistently outperform unsupervised methods like SkipThought vectors on a wide range of transfer tasks.  Kama ilivyo kwa jinsi gani maono ya kompyuta inavyotumia Picha Net ili kupata sifa, ambayo inaweza kuhamishwa kwa kazi nyingine, kazi zetu huenda kuonyesha uwezekano wa kutokuwepo kwa lugha asili kwa ajili ya kuhamisha kujifunza kwa kazi nyingine za NLP. Kodi letu linapatikana wazi.', 'af': "Baie moderne NLP-stelsels vertrou op woorde inbêding, voorheen onderwerp in 'n ongeonderwerp manier op groot korpora, as basiese funksies. Versoekte om inbêring te kry vir grootte stukke teks, soos teikens, het egter nie so suksesvol gewees nie. Verskeie probeers om onverondersteunde voorstellings van teikens te leer het nie voldoende genoeg prestasie bereik om vaste aangeneem te word nie. In hierdie papier, wys ons hoe universele seting voorstellings onderwerp word deur die onderwerp data van die Stanford Natuurlike Taal Inferensie datastelle kan konsistentlik uitvoer ononderwerp metodes soos SkipThought vektore op 'n wyde reek van oordrag taak. Baie soos rekenaar sien ImageNet gebruik om eienskappe te kry, wat dan kan na ander taak oordra word, ons werk tendeer om die geskikheid van natuurlike taal inferensie te wys vir oordra van leer na ander NLP taak. Ons koder is openlik beskikbaar.", 'am': 'Many modern NLP systems rely on word embeddings, previously trained in an unsupervised manner on large corpora, as base features.  የጽሑፉን አቀማመጥ ለማግኘት ፍላጎች እንደዚህ የጽሑፎች ቁጥጥር እንዲያገኙ ፍላጎት ግን አልተቻለም፡፡ በተጠበቀው የፍርድ መልዕክቶች በማስተማር በብዙ ፈተናዎች የሥርዓት መልዕክቶች በጠቅላላ ለመፈለግ አይደርሱም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተዘጋጀ ስቴንፎርድ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ የቋንቋ የመቃወም ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም እንዴት የተጠቃሚ የድምፅ አቀማመጥ አቀማመጥ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ከኮምፒውተር ራእይታችን ምስልጋኔት እንዴት እንደሚጠቀም፣ ከዚያም በኋላ ወደ ሌሎች ስራ እንዲለወጥ ይችላል፣ ሥራችን ወደ ሌሎች NLP ስራ ለመማር የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ድካም ማቀናኘት የሚገባውን ያስታውቃል፡፡ የፊደላችን አቀማመጥ ግልፅ አለበት፡፡', 'az': "Həqiqətən, çox modern NLP sistemləri, əvvəlcə böyük korpora üzərində təhsil edilməmiş, böyük korpora üzərində təhsil edilməmiş sözlərə təvəkkül edirlər. Cümlələr kimi böyük mətn parçalarının inşallarını almaq üçün çabalar, amma bu qədər başarılı olmamışdır. Sözümlərin müəyyən edilməyən tərzlərini öyrənməyə çalışan bir neçə cümlələr genişliyi qəbul etmək üçün yeterli tərzlərinə yetişmədi. Bu kağızda, Stanford Təbiətli Dil Inference verilənlərin nəticəsi ilə təhsil edilmiş üniversal cümlələr kimi SkipThought vektörlərinin çox dəyişiklik işləri ilə təhsil edildiyini göstəririk. Bilgisayar görünüşünün ImageNet'i başqa işlərə göndərilməsi üçün istifadə edəcəyi şəkillər kimi, işlərimiz başqa NLP işlərinə öyrənmək üçün təbiətli dil dəyişikliklərinin uyğunluğunu göstərir. Bizim koderimiz açıq-aşkar mövcuddur.", 'sq': 'Shumë sisteme moderne NLP mbështeten në përfshirje fjalësh, të trajnuara më parë në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur në korpra të mëdha, si elemente bazë. Efforts to obtain embeddings for larger chunks of text, such as sentences, have however not been so successful.  Disa përpjekje për të mësuar përfaqësime të pazgjidhura të dënimeve nuk kanë arritur performancë të mjaftueshme për të miratuar gjerësisht. Në këtë letër, ne tregojmë se si përfaqësimet universale të fjalëve të trajnuara duke përdorur të dhënat e mbikqyrura të të dhënave të Inferencës së gjuhës natyrore të Stanfordit mund të kalojnë vazhdimisht metodat e pa mbikqyrura si vektorët SkipThought në një gamë të gjerë detyrash transferimi. Ashtu si vizioni i kompjuterit përdor ImageNet për të marrë karakteristika, që pastaj mund të transferohen në detyra të tjera, puna jonë ka tendencë të tregojë përshtatësinë e përfundimit natyror të gjuhës për transferimin e mësimit në detyra të tjera NLP. Koduesi ynë është në dispozicion publik.', 'bn': 'অনেক আধুনিক এনএলপি সিস্টেম বিভিন্ন শব্দের প্রতি নির্ভর করে, পূর্বে বিশাল কোর্পোরায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে বিশাল কোর বৃহত্তর টেক্সটের ব্যাপারের প্রচেষ্টার জন্য, যেমন বাক্য, তবে এত সফল হয়নি। সংরক্ষিত বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে বেশ কয়েকটি প্রচেষ্টা ব্যাপকভাবে গ্রহণ করা যায় না। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে স্ট্যানফোর্ড প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার তথ্য ব্যবহার করে স্ট্যান্ডফোর্ডের প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছ যেমন কম্পিউটারের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ইমেজেন্ট ব্যবহার করে অন্যান্য কাজে পরিণত করা যায়, আমাদের কাজ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার আক্রান্তির সাথে অন্যান্য এনএলপি কাজে  আমাদের এনকোডার প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'ca': "Molts sistemes moderns de NLP confien en integracions de paraules, formes anteriorment sense supervisió en grans corpores, com a característiques bàsiques. Però els esforços per aconseguir incorporacions per trossos de text més grans, com les frases, no han tingut tant èxit. Diversos intents d'aprendre representacions no supervisades de frases no han aconseguit un rendiment suficient per a ser ampliament adoptats. En aquest paper, demostram com les representacions universals de frases entrenades utilitzant les dades supervisades dels conjunts de dades d'Inferència de Llingua Natural de Stanford poden superar sistemàticament mètodes no supervisats com els vectors SkipThought en una gran gama de tasques de transfer ència. Com la visió informàtica utilitza ImageNet per aconseguir característiques, que després es poden transferir a altres tasques, la nostra feina tendeix a indicar l'adequació de la inferència natural del llenguatge per transferir l'aprenentatge a altres tasques del NLP. El nostre codificador està disponible al públic.", 'hy': 'Շատ ժամանակակից ՆԼՊ համակարգերը հիմնված են բառերի ներդրման վրա, որոնք նախկինում անվերահսկվող կերպով սովորեցրել են մեծ կապորա վրա, որպես հիմնական հատկություններ: Այնուամենայնիվ, փորձերը հավաքել տեքստի մեծ մասերի, ինչպիսիք են նախադասությունները, այնքան էլ հաջողակ չեն եղել: Բազմաթիվ փորձեր սովորել նախադասությունների անվերահսկված ներկայացումներ բավարար արդյունք չեն հասել, որպեսզի դրանք լայնորեն ընդունվեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես համաշխարհային նախադասությունների ներկայացումները, որոնք վարժեցվել են Ստենֆորդ բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսի տվյալների վերահսկվող տվյալների օգտագործման միջոցով, կարող են մշտապես գերազանցել անվերահսկվող մեթոդներ, ինչ Կարծես թե ինչպես է համակարգչային տեսողությունը օգտագործում պատկերացումներ ստանալու համար, որոնք հետո կարող են փոխանցվել այլ խնդիրների վրա, մեր աշխատանքը հակված է նշել բնական լեզվի եզրակացության համապատասխանությունը սովորելու համար այլ ՆԼՊ խնդիրների վրա: Մեր կոդերը հանրային հասանելի է:', 'et': 'Paljud kaasaegsed NLP süsteemid tuginevad sõnade manustamisele, mis on varem suurtele korpustele järelevalveta koolitatud. Jõupingutused suuremate tekstitükkide (nt lausete) manustamiseks ei ole siiski olnud nii edukad. Mitmed katsed õppida järelevalveta lausete esitamist ei ole saavutanud piisavalt rahuldavat tulemust, et seda laialdaselt kasutada. Käesolevas töös näitame, kuidas Stanfordi looduskeele järelduste andmekogumite järelevalvega koolitatud universaalsed lauseesitused võivad järjepidevalt ületada järelevalveta meetodeid, nagu SkipThought vektorid, paljudes ülekandeülesannetes. Sarnaselt sellele, kuidas arvutinägemine kasutab ImageNeti funktsioonide hankimiseks, mida saab seejärel teistele ülesannetele üle kanda, kaldub meie töö näitama looduskeele järelduse sobivust õppimise ülekandmiseks teistele NLP ülesannetele. Meie kodeerija on avalikult kättesaadav.', 'fi': 'Monet nykyaikaiset NLP-järjestelmät käyttävät perusominaisuuksina sanaupotuksia, jotka on aiemmin koulutettu valvomattomasti suuriin korpusiin. Pyrkimykset suurempien tekstiosien, kuten lauseiden, upottamiseksi eivät ole kuitenkaan olleet yhtä onnistuneita. Useat yritykset oppia hallitsemattomia lauseiden esityksiä eivät ole saavuttaneet riittävää suorituskykyä laajalle omaksuttavaksi. Tässä artikkelissa näytämme, miten Stanfordin luonnollisen kielen päättelyaineistojen valvotulla datalla koulutetut universaalit lauseesitykset voivat johdonmukaisesti päihittää valvomattomat menetelmät, kuten SkipThought-vektorit monissa siirtotehtävissä. Aivan kuten tietokonenäkö käyttää ImageNetiä saadakseen ominaisuuksia, jotka voidaan sitten siirtää muihin tehtäviin, työmme pyrkii osoittamaan luonnollisen kielen päättelyn soveltuvuutta muihin NLP-tehtäviin. Kooderimme on julkisesti saatavilla.', 'bs': 'Mnogi moderni NLP sistemi se oslanjaju na uključenje riječi, koje su prethodno obučene na neodređen način na veliku korporu, kao osnovne karakteristike. Nasilje za dobivanje ugrađenja za veće dijelove teksta, poput rečenica, međutim nisu bile tako uspješne. Nekoliko pokušaja učenja neodređenih predstavljanja rečenica nije dostigao dovoljno zadovoljavajuće učinke za široko usvojenje. U ovom papiru pokazujemo kako univerzalne predstave rečenice obučene koristeći nadzorne podatke podataka Stanford prirodnog jezika Inferencije podataka konsekventno mogu izvršiti neodređene metode poput SkipThought vektora na širokom nizu zadataka za prenošenje. Kao što kompjuterska vizija koristi ImageNet da bi dobila karakteristike, koje se onda mogu prebaciti na druge zadatke, naš rad se navodi na odgovarajuće prirodne jezičke infekcije za prebacivanje učenja na druge NLP zadatke. Naš koder je javno dostupan.', 'cs': 'Mnoho moderních NLP systémů spoléhá na vkládání slov, které bylo dříve trénováno bez dohledu na velké korpusy, jako základní funkce. Snaha o získání vložení pro větší kusy textu, jako jsou věty, však nebyla tak úspěšná. Několik pokusů o naučení se bez dohledu reprezentace vět nedosáhlo dostatečného výkonu na to, aby bylo široce přijato. V tomto článku ukazujeme, jak univerzální reprezentace vět trénované pomocí kontrolovaných dat ze Stanford Natural Language Inference datových sad může konzistentně překonat bez dozoru metody, jako jsou SkipThought vektory na široké škále transferových úloh. Podobně jako počítačové vidění používá ImageNet k získávání funkcí, které lze pak přenést do jiných úkolů, naše práce má tendenci naznačovat vhodnost inference přirozeného jazyka pro přenos učení na jiné úkoly NLP. Náš kodér je veřejně dostupný.', 'sk': 'Veliko sodobnih sistemov NLP se kot osnovnih značilnosti zanaša na vgradnjo besed, ki so jih predhodno nenadzorovano usposabljali na velikih korpusih. Prizadevanja za vdelavo večjih delov besedila, kot so stavki, pa niso bila tako uspešna. Več poskusov učenja nenadzorovanih predstavitev stavkov ni doseglo zadovoljive učinkovitosti, da bi jih bilo mogoče široko sprejeti. V tem prispevku bomo pokazali, kako lahko univerzalne predstavitve stavkov, usposobljene z uporabo nadzorovanih podatkovnih nizov Stanfordovih sklepov naravnega jezika, dosledno presegajo nenadzorovane metode, kot so vektorji SkipThought pri širokem naboru prenosnih nalog. Podobno kot računalniški vid uporablja ImageNet za pridobivanje funkcij, ki jih nato lahko prenesemo na druge naloge, naše delo nakazuje primernost sklepanja naravnega jezika za prenos učenja na druge naloge NLP. Naš kodirnik je javno dostopen.', 'he': 'מערכות NLP מודרניות רבות סומכות על קישור מילים, מאומנים בעבר באופן בלתי משגיח על גופורה גדולה, כתכונות בסיסיים. מאמץ להשיג תוספות לגזרים גדולים יותר של טקסט, כמו משפטים, עם זאת לא הצליח כל כך. מספר ניסיונות ללמוד מייצגים לא משומרים של משפטים לא הגיעו להופעה מספיק מרוצה כדי להיות מאושרת באופן רחב. בעיתון הזה, אנו מראים כיצד מייצגי משפטים אוניברסליים מאומנים באמצעות הנתונים המפוקחים של קבוצת הנתונים של שפת טבעית סטנפורד יכולים להתגבר באופן קבוע על שיטות לא מעוקבות כמו ווקטורים SkipThought על מגוון רחב של משימות העברה. בדיוק כמו איך חזון המחשב משתמש ImageNet כדי להשיג תכונות, שאפשר להעביר לאחר מכן למשימות אחרות, העבודה שלנו נוטה להציג את התאימות של ההנחה של שפה טבעית להעברה ללימוד למשימות NLP אחרות. הקודן שלנו זמין לציבור.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sistem NLP sistem nambah ing embedding word, ditawak dhéwé suji cara-cara sing gak nggawe barang dumadhi, nganggo cara-cara sing nyimpen Efs kanggo ndhukan embedding kanggo Ketok sing luwih dumadhi, kaya pedalah @title: window Nan pepulan iki, kita sembarang kelas universel seneng dipunangkat dipunangkat dipunangkat data nggawe dataset durung nggawe alêter nggawe barang nggawe nguasai perusahaan winih dhéwé Daftar winih komputer menyang dipunangé Imagenet nggawe peringatan, sing bisa ngubah ujaran cara sing wis ngerwih cara sing wis ngerwih, awak dhéwé nggawe cara nggawe adalah kanggo ngerasakno nggawe perusahaan langkung nggo ngerwih cara NLP sisara. Koder-koder anyar kang didasakno', 'ha': "Akwai mãsu yawa na NLP-system na yanzu, sunã dõgara ga maganar embedded, a gabãni, an ƙidãya su a cikin wata irin tsari ba'a tsare wa makampuni mai girma, kamar masu basin sifati. Tsarin da za'a iya samun filinaiki wa masu girma na matsayin, kamar misali, ba za'a ci nasara ba. Babu wasu jarrabo da aka sanar da masu tsaron maganar da ba'a tsare ba, ba su isa cikakken gyarata mai cikakken da za'a yi amfani da shi ba. Daga wannan takarda, Munã nũna wa ko da aka sanar da masĩfa na ɗabi'a da aka tsare data na fassarar Lugha na Taurar Stanford za ta iya samar da shiryoyin da ba'a tsare shi ba, kamar shiryoyi na skiipThThoud kan aiki mai yawa. Kama misãlin gani na kwamfyutan ya yi amfani da zane-Net dõmin a sami wasu feature, wanda za'a iya shige su zuwa wasu aikin daban, aikinmu na kamfata yana kasancẽwa ga muhimmin wa'ura wa harshe na asili wa shige da za'a sanar da shi zuwa wasu aikin NLP. Aka samar da kodĩniyarmu.", 'bo': 'ད་ལྟོའི་NLP མ་ལག་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་འཛིན་པ་ཡིན། སྔོན་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ ཡི་གེའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་དུ་རྩོལ་ནུས་བྱས་ན། དཔེར་ན་ཚིག ཚིག་ཚན་གྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་པའི་སྟོན་རྟགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་མི་འབྱུང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་Stanford སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མཐོང་ནི། ང་ཚོའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ལྟ་རྟོག་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ ང་ཚོའི་གསང་བ་མང་ཆོག་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Determining Semantic Textual Similarity using Natural Deduction Proofs', 'es': 'Determinación de la similitud textual semántica mediante pruebas de deducción natural', 'pt': 'Determinando a semelhança textual semântica usando provas de dedução natural', 'ar': 'تحديد التشابه النصي الدلالي باستخدام أدلة الاستنتاج الطبيعي', 'fr': "Déterminer la similitude textuelle sémantique à l'aide de preuves de déduction", 'ja': '自然減点証明を使用したセマンティックテキストの類似性の決定', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक कटौती प्रमाणों का उपयोग करके शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता का निर्धारण करना', 'zh': '用自然演证定语义文本相似性', 'ru': 'Определение семантического текстового сходства с использованием доказательств естественной дедукции', 'ga': 'Cosúlacht Téacs Shéimeantach a Chinneadh trí úsáid a bhaint as Cruthúnas Asbhainte Nádúrtha', 'el': 'Προσδιορισμός Σημματικής Ομοιότητας κειμένων χρησιμοποιώντας φυσικές αποδείξεις αφαίρεσης', 'ka': 'Semantic Textual Similarity Determining using Natural Deduction Proofs', 'hu': 'A szemantikus szöveghasonlóság meghatározása természetes levonási bizonyítékokkal', 'it': 'Determinazione della somiglianza testuale semantica utilizzando prove di deduzione naturale', 'kk': 'Негізгі қиындыру профилерін қолдану үшін семантикалық мәтіннің ұқсастығын анықтау', 'lt': 'Semantinio teksto panašumo nustatymas naudojant gamtos išskaičiavimo įrodymus', 'mk': 'Одредување на семантична текстуална сличност со природни докази за одземање', 'ms': 'Menentukan Persamaan Teks Semantik menggunakan Bukti Pengurangan Alam', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഡുവക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രോഫുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സെമാന്റിക് ടെക്സ്റ്റുവല്\u200d സമമാക്കുന്നത് തീരുമാ', 'mn': 'Байгалийн багасгал багасгах судалгаагаар Semantic Textual Similarity-г тодорхойлох', 'no': 'Bestemmer semiantisk tekstliknande ved bruk av naturlege deklarasjonsprøver', 'mt': 'Id-determinazzjoni ta’ Similarità Tekstulari Semantika bl-użu ta’ Provi ta’ Tnaqqis Naturali', 'pl': 'Określenie semantycznej podobności tekstowej za pomocą naturalnych dowodów dedukcji', 'ro': 'Determinarea similitudinii textuale semantice folosind dovezi naturale de deducere', 'sr': 'Определење семантичне текстуалне сличности користећи природне показане', 'si': 'සාමාන්තික පාළුවන් සැමාන්තික පාළුවන් සැමාන්තික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Takhasuska isku mid ahaanshaha dhaqanka dabiicadda', 'sv': 'Bestämning av semantisk textlig likhet med hjälp av naturliga avdrag', 'ur': 'سیمنٹیک ٹکسٹیول سیمالیٹی کی تعریف کرتی ہے', 'ta': 'இயல்பான வழிமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி செமான்டிக் உரையின் ஒத்திசை', 'vi': 'Phân định tỷ lệ Văn bản kỳ cục bằng bột phân', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Определяне на семантична текстова сходство с помощта на естествени доказателства за приспадане', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje semantičke sličnosti teksta s primjenom prirodnog odvajanja', 'nl': 'Het bepalen van semantische tekstuele gelijkenis met behulp van natuurlijke aftrekbewijzen', 'da': 'Bestemmelse af semantisk tekstuel lighed ved hjælp af naturlige deduktionsbeviser', 'de': 'Bestimmung der semantischen textuellen Ähnlichkeit mit natürlichen Deduktionsnachweisen', 'id': 'Menentukan Simulasi Teks Semantik menggunakan Bukti Deduksi Alami', 'fa': 'تعیین شبیه\u200cسازی متن\u200cسازی با استفاده از مدرک\u200cهای کاهش طبیعی', 'ko': '자연연역을 이용하여 의미 확정-텍스트 유사도 증명', 'sw': 'Kugundua Similarity of the Semantic Text', 'sq': 'Përcaktimi i ngjashmërisë tekstuale Semantike duke përdorur provat e shkurtimit natyror', 'tr': 'Semantik metin benzetiligini Natural Deduction Proofs kullanarak takyklaýar', 'am': 'text-tool-action', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ տեքստոլային նմանության որոշումը բնական քայքայման ապացույցներով', 'az': 'T톛bi톛tli Dediksyon Prooflar캼n캼 istifad톛 ed톛r톛k Semantik Textual Similar캼 t톛yin edir', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ডিডুকশন প্রোফ ব্যবহার করে সেমান্টিক টেক্সটেক্সটের সমতামূলক সিনির্ধারণ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje semantične tekstualne sličnosti koristeći prirodne dokaze za odvajanje', 'ca': 'Determinar la similitud textual Semàtica fent servir provas de deducció natural', 'et': 'Semantilise teksti sarnasuse määramine looduslike mahaarvamise tõendite abil', 'cs': 'Stanovení sémantické textové podobnosti pomocí přirozených odvodů', 'fi': 'Semanttisen tekstin samankaltaisuuden määrittäminen käyttämällä luonnollisia päättelytodistuksia', 'af': 'Bepaal Semantiese Tekstuele Ligtigheid gebruik Natuurlike Uitdrukking Proofs', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'קובע דמיון טקסטולי סמנטי באמצעות הוכחות חיתוך טבעיים', 'sk': 'Določanje semantične besedilne podobnosti z uporabo dokazov naravnega odbitka', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྟག་པར་མཐུན་རྒྱུན་ཡིག་འབྲི་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ཕར་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལྟར་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Determining semantic textual similarity is a core research subject in natural language processing. Since vector-based models for sentence representation often use shallow information, capturing accurate semantics is difficult. By contrast, logical semantic representations capture deeper levels of sentence semantics, but their symbolic nature does not offer graded notions of textual similarity. We propose a method for determining semantic textual similarity by combining shallow features with features extracted from natural deduction proofs of bidirectional entailment relations between sentence pairs. For the natural deduction proofs, we use ccg2lambda, a higher-order automatic inference system, which converts Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) derivation trees into semantic representations and conducts natural deduction proofs. Experiments show that our system was able to outperform other logic-based systems and that features derived from the proofs are effective for learning textual similarity.', 'pt': 'Determinar a semelhança textual semântica é um assunto central de pesquisa em processamento de linguagem natural. Como os modelos baseados em vetores para representação de sentenças geralmente usam informações superficiais, é difícil capturar semânticas precisas. Em contraste, representações semânticas lógicas capturam níveis mais profundos de semântica de sentença, mas sua natureza simbólica não oferece noções graduais de similaridade textual. Propomos um método para determinar a similaridade textual semântica combinando características superficiais com características extraídas de provas de dedução natural de relações de vinculação bidirecionais entre pares de sentenças. Para as provas de dedução natural, usamos ccg2lambda, um sistema de inferência automática de ordem superior, que converte árvores de derivação de Gramática Categorial Combinatória (CCG) em representações semânticas e conduz provas de dedução natural. Experimentos mostram que nosso sistema foi capaz de superar outros sistemas baseados em lógica e que recursos derivados das provas são eficazes para aprender similaridade textual.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد التشابه النصي الدلالي موضوعًا بحثيًا أساسيًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. نظرًا لأن النماذج القائمة على المتجهات لتمثيل الجملة غالبًا ما تستخدم معلومات ضحلة ، فمن الصعب التقاط دلالات دقيقة. على النقيض من ذلك ، تلتقط التمثيلات الدلالية المنطقية مستويات أعمق من دلالات الجملة ، لكن طبيعتها الرمزية لا تقدم مفاهيم متدرجة للتشابه النصي. نقترح طريقة لتحديد التشابه النصي الدلالي من خلال الجمع بين الميزات الضحلة مع الميزات المستخرجة من براهين الاستنتاج الطبيعي لعلاقات الاستنتاج ثنائية الاتجاه بين أزواج الجمل. لإثباتات الاستنتاج الطبيعي ، نستخدم ccg2lambda ، وهو نظام استدلال آلي عالي المستوى ، يحول أشجار الاشتقاق النحوي التجميعي (CCG) إلى تمثيلات دلالية ويقوم بإجراء براهين استنتاج طبيعية. تُظهر التجارب أن نظامنا كان قادرًا على التفوق في الأداء على الأنظمة الأخرى المستندة إلى المنطق وأن الميزات المشتقة من البراهين فعالة في تعلم التشابه النصي.', 'es': 'La determinación de la similitud textual semántica es un tema de investigación central en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Dado que los modelos basados en vectores para la representación de oraciones a menudo utilizan información superficial, es difícil capturar una semántica precisa. Por el contrario, las representaciones semánticas lógicas capturan niveles más profundos de semántica de oraciones, pero su naturaleza simbólica no ofrece nociones graduales de similitud textual. Proponemos un método para determinar la similitud textual semántica combinando características superficiales con características extraídas de pruebas de deducción natural de relaciones de implicación bidireccionales entre pares de oraciones. Para las pruebas de deducción natural, utilizamos ccg2lambda, un sistema de inferencia automática de orden superior, que convierte los árboles de derivación de gramática categorial combinatoria (CCG) en representaciones semánticas y realiza pruebas de deducción natural. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro sistema fue capaz de superar a otros sistemas basados en la lógica y que las características derivadas de las pruebas son eficaces para aprender la similitud textual.', 'fr': "La détermination de la similitude textuelle sémantique est un sujet de recherche fondamental dans le traitement du langage naturel Étant donné que les modèles vectoriels pour la représentation de phrases utilisent souvent des informations peu profondes, il est difficile de saisir une sémantique précise. En revanche, les représentations sémantiques logiques capturent des niveaux plus profonds de sémantique des phrases, mais leur nature symbolique n'offre pas de notions graduées de similitude textuelle. Nous proposons une méthode pour déterminer la similitude textuelle sémantique en combinant des caractéristiques superficielles avec des caractéristiques extraites de preuves de déduction naturelle de relations d'implication bidirectionnelles entre des paires de phrases. Pour les preuves de déduction naturelle, nous utilisons ccg2lambda, un système d'inférence automatique d'ordre supérieur, qui convertit les arbres de dérivation de la grammaire catégorielle combinatoire (CCG) en représentations sémantiques et effectue des preuves de déduction naturelle. Les expériences montrent que notre système était capable de surpasser les autres systèmes basés sur la logique et que les fonctionnalités dérivées des preuves sont efficaces pour apprendre la similitude textuelle.", 'ja': 'セマンティックテキストの類似性を決定することは、自然言語処理における中心的な研究対象である。 文章表現のベクトルベースのモデルは浅い情報を使用することが多いため、正確な意味論を捉えることは困難である。 対照的に、論理的意味論的表現は、より深いレベルの文章意味論を捉えますが、その象徴的性質は、テキストの類似性の段階的な概念を提供しません。 浅い特徴と、文のペア間の双方向的帰結関係の自然な推論の証明から抽出された特徴を組み合わせることで、意味的なテキストの類似性を判断する方法を提案した。 自然演算の証明には、組み合わせカテゴリアル文法（ CCG ）の導出木を意味論的表現に変換し、自然演算の証明を行う高次の自動推論システムであるccg 2 lambdaを使用します。 実験は、当社のシステムが他の論理ベースのシステムを上回る性能を発揮し、証明から導き出される機能がテキストの類似性を学習するのに効果的であることを示しています。', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता का निर्धारण प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक मुख्य शोध विषय है। चूंकि वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए वेक्टर-आधारित मॉडल अक्सर उथली जानकारी का उपयोग करते हैं, इसलिए सटीक शब्दार्थ को कैप्चर करना मुश्किल है। इसके विपरीत, तार्किक शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व वाक्य शब्दार्थ के गहरे स्तर पर कब्जा कर लेते हैं, लेकिन उनकी प्रतीकात्मक प्रकृति पाठ्य समानता के वर्गीकृत विचारों की पेशकश नहीं करती है। हम वाक्य जोड़े के बीच द्विदिश अनिवार्यता संबंधों के प्राकृतिक कटौती प्रमाणों से निकाली गई विशेषताओं के साथ उथले सुविधाओं के संयोजन से उथले सुविधाओं के संयोजन से शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता का निर्धारण करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्राकृतिक कटौती प्रमाणों के लिए, हम ccg2lambda का उपयोग करते हैं, एक उच्च-क्रम स्वचालित अनुमान प्रणाली, जो Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) व्युत्पत्ति पेड़ों को शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व में परिवर्तित करती है और प्राकृतिक कटौती प्रमाणों का संचालन करती है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी प्रणाली अन्य तर्क-आधारित प्रणालियों को पछाड़ने में सक्षम थी और यह कि सबूतों से प्राप्त विशेषताएं पाठ्य समानता सीखने के लिए प्रभावी हैं।', 'zh': '定语义文本相似性自然语言处心研究课题。 盖向量句示模常用浅层息,故难得其语义。 逻辑语义得更深层次句语义,然其象不供文本相似性分级概。 设浅层句之双向蕴涵关系,合而定之语义文本相似性法。 其于自然,吾用ccg2lambda,此高阶自推理系统,合类语法(CCG)推导树转语义示自然之验也。 实验明,吾所以优于逻辑之统,而得之于学相似性有效也。', 'ru': 'Определение семантического текстового сходства является основным предметом исследования в обработке естественного языка. Поскольку векторные модели для представления предложений часто используют неглубокую информацию, захват точной семантики затруднен. Напротив, логические семантические представления охватывают более глубокие уровни семантики предложений, но их символическая природа не предлагает дифференцированных понятий текстового сходства. Предложен метод определения семантического текстового сходства путем объединения мелких признаков с признаками, извлеченными из естественных доказательств дедукции двунаправленных отношений влечения между парами предложений. Для естественных доказательств дедукции мы используем ccg2lambda, автоматическую систему вывода более высокого порядка, которая преобразует производные деревьев комбинированной грамматики категорий (CCG) в семантические представления и проводит естественные доказательства дедукции. Эксперименты показывают, что наша система смогла превзойти другие логические системы и что функции, полученные из доказательств, эффективны для изучения текстового сходства.', 'ga': 'Is ábhar lárnach taighde i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha é cosúlacht shéimeantach téacs a chinneadh. Ós rud é go n-úsáideann samhlacha veicteoir-bhunaithe le haghaidh léiriú abairtí faisnéis éadomhain go minic, tá sé deacair séimeantaic chruinn a ghabháil. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, gabhann léirithe shéimeantacha loighciúla leibhéil níos doimhne de shéimeantaic abairtí, ach ní thairgeann a nádúr siombalach tuairimí grádaithe de chosúlachtaí téacs. Molaimid modh chun cosúlacht théacsúil shéimeantach a chinneadh trí ghnéithe éadomhain a chomhcheangal le gnéithe a bhaintear as cruthúnais asbhainte nádúrtha ar an gcaidreamh déthreomhaireachta idir péirí abairtí. Le haghaidh cruthúnais asbhainte nádúrtha, bainimid úsáid as ccg2lambda, córas táirgthe uathoibríoch níos airde, a thiontaíonn crainn díorthaithe Gramadaí Catagóire Comhcheangailte (CCG) go léiriúcháin shéimeantacha agus a sheolann cruthúnais asbhainte nádúrtha. Léiríonn turgnaimh go raibh ár gcóras in ann feidhmiú níos fearr ná córais eile atá bunaithe ar loighic agus go bhfuil gnéithe a dhíorthaítear ó na cruthúnais éifeachtach chun cosúlachtaí téacs a fhoghlaim.', 'hu': 'A szemantikai szöveghasonlóság meghatározása a természetes nyelv feldolgozásának alapvető kutatási témája. Mivel a mondatok ábrázolására használt vektoros modellek gyakran sekély információt használnak, a pontos szemantika rögzítése nehéz. Ezzel szemben a logikai szemantikai reprezentációk a mondatszemetika mélyebb szintjeit fogják meg, de szimbolikus természetük nem kínál osztályozott fogalmakat a szöveghasonlóságról. Javasoljuk a szemantikai szöveghasonlóság meghatározására szolgáló módszert a sekély jellemzők és a mondatpárok közötti kétirányú vonatkozási viszonyok természetes dedukciós bizonyítékaiból kivont tulajdonságok kombinálásával. A természetes dedukciós bizonyítékokhoz a ccg2lambda-t használjuk, egy magasabb rendű automatikus következtetési rendszert, amely a Kombinált Kategorikus Nyelvtan (CCG) származási fákat szemantikai reprezentációkká alakítja, és természetes dedukciós bizonyítékokat végez. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy rendszerünk képes volt felülmúlni más logikai alapú rendszereket, és hogy a bizonyítékokból származó funkciók hatékonyak a szöveghasonlóság tanulására.', 'ka': 'სემონტიკური ტექსტულური განსხვავების განსაზღვრება არის სახელსაწინო ენის პროცესისში მნიშვნელოვანი გასწავლობა. ვიდრე ვიქტორის დაბათებული მოდელები წესების გამოსახულებელად გამოყენება ცოტა ინფორმაციას, მარტივი სიმენტიკების გამოყენება ძალიან რთულია. კონტრასტურით, ლოგიკური სიმენტიკური გამოსახულებები უფრო დიდი სიმენტიკური დონეები გააკეთებენ, მაგრამ მათი სიმბოლოგიური ნაპირობა არ მინდა ტექსტური სიმბ ჩვენ გვეძლევა სემონტიკური ტექსტულის განსაზღვრებისთვის პროგრამის გამოყენებას, რომელიც საშუალო ფუნქციების გამოყენებას გამოყენებული ფუნქციებისთვის, რომლებიც საშუალო წილა ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ccg2lambda, მეტი სისტემის ავტომატური ინფრენციის სისტემის, რომელიც კომბინირო კატეგორიალური გრამარი (CCG) განსხვავებული ხელები სიმენტიკური გამოსახულებაში და გამოყენებს ნაირადი განსხვავება. ექსპერიმენტები გაჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი სისტემა შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ სხვა ლოგიკური სისტემა და რომ მოწმებით გამოიყენებული ფერიმენტები ტექსტულური განსხვავებაში ეფ', 'el': 'Ο προσδιορισμός σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας κειμένου αποτελεί βασικό ερευνητικό αντικείμενο στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Δεδομένου ότι τα διανυσματικά μοντέλα για την αναπαράσταση προτάσεων χρησιμοποιούν συχνά ρηχές πληροφορίες, η καταγραφή της ακριβούς σημασιολογίας είναι δύσκολη. Αντίθετα, οι λογικές σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις αιχμαλωτίζουν βαθύτερα επίπεδα σημασιολογίας προτάσεων, αλλά η συμβολική τους φύση δεν προσφέρει διαβαθμισμένες έννοιες κειμενικής ομοιότητας. Προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο προσδιορισμού σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας κειμένου συνδυάζοντας ρηχά χαρακτηριστικά με χαρακτηριστικά που εξάγονται από φυσικά αποδεικτικά συμπεράσματα αμφίδρομης σχέσης συνεπειών μεταξύ ζευγαριών προτάσεων. Για τις φυσικές αποδείξεις αφαίρεσης, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα σύστημα αυτόματης συμπερασμάτων ανώτερης τάξης, το οποίο μετατρέπει τα δέντρα παραγώγων της Συνδυαστικής Κατηγορικής Γραμματικής (CCG) σε σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις και διεξάγει φυσικές αποδείξεις αφαίρεσης. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το σύστημά μας ήταν σε θέση να ξεπεράσει άλλα συστήματα βασισμένα στη λογική και ότι τα χαρακτηριστικά που προέρχονται από τις αποδείξεις είναι αποτελεσματικά για την εκμάθηση κειμενικής ομοιότητας.', 'it': "Determinare la somiglianza testuale semantica è un argomento di ricerca fondamentale nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Poiché i modelli vettoriali per la rappresentazione di frasi spesso utilizzano informazioni superficiali, catturare semantica accurata è difficile. Al contrario, le rappresentazioni semantiche logiche catturano livelli più profondi della semantica delle frasi, ma la loro natura simbolica non offre nozioni graduate di somiglianza testuale. Proponiamo un metodo per determinare la somiglianza testuale semantica combinando caratteristiche superficiali con caratteristiche estratte da prove deduttive naturali delle relazioni bidirezionali di implicazione tra coppie di frasi. Per le prove deduttive naturali, utilizziamo ccg2lambda, un sistema di inferenza automatica di ordine superiore, che converte gli alberi di derivazione Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) in rappresentazioni semantiche e conduce prove deduttive naturali. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro sistema è stato in grado di superare altri sistemi basati sulla logica e che le caratteristiche derivate dalle prove sono efficaci per imparare la somiglianza testuale.", 'kk': 'Семантикалық мәтіннің ұқсастығын анықтау - табиғи тілді өңдеу үшін негізгі зерттеу темасы. Сөздерді көрсету үшін вектордың негіздеген үлгілері көбірек жалғыз мәліметті қолданады, дұрыс симантикаларды түсіру қиын. Әртүрлі, логикалық семантикалық кескіндер сөздердің терең деңгейлері семантикалық деңгейлерін алады, бірақ олардың символдық қасиеті текстік ұқсас деңгейлері жазылмайды. Біз семантикалық мәтіннің ұқсастығын анықтау әдісін таңдаймыз, сөйлеме екеуі арасындағы қатынастық қасиеттерді таңдау құқықтардан шығарылған қасиеттерді біріктіріп тұрады. Табиғлық түзету мәліметі үшін біз ccg2lambda, автоматты түзету жүйесін қолданамыз. Бұл комбинациялық санаттық Grammar (CCG) түзету ағаштарын семантикалық кескіндерге аударып, табиғлық түзету мәліметтерін өзгертеді. Тәжірибелер біздің жүйеміздің басқа логикалық жүйелерді жұмыс істеуге болады және мәтіндік ұқсастығын оқыту үшін әсер етеді.', 'ms': 'Menentukan persamaan tekstual semantik adalah subjek kajian utama dalam pemprosesan bahasa alami. Since vector-based models for sentence representation often use shallow information, capturing accurate semantics is difficult.  Sebaliknya, perwakilan semantik logik menangkap aras semantik kalimat yang lebih dalam, tetapi sifat simbolik mereka tidak menawarkan maklumat tertinggi tentang persamaan teks. Kami cadangkan kaedah untuk menentukan persamaan tekstual semantik dengan menggabungkan ciri-ciri rendah dengan ciri-ciri yang dikeluarkan dari bukti deduksi alami hubungan bidireksi antara pasangan kalimat. Untuk bukti pengeluaran semulajadi, kita gunakan ccg2lambda, sistem pengeluaran automatik tertib yang lebih tinggi, yang menukar pokok pengeluaran Grammar Kategori Kombinator (CCG) ke persembahan semantik dan menjalankan bukti pengeluaran semulajadi. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita mampu melampaui sistem lain berdasarkan logik dan bahawa ciri-ciri yang berasal dari bukti adalah berkesan untuk mempelajari persamaan teks.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d തുല്യമാക്കുന്നത് ഒരു  വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും വെറുതെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിരോധമായി ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക്സിന്റെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d പിടിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ അവരുടെ പ്രകൃത വാക്കിന്റെ ജോടികള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d നിന്ന് പുറപ്പെടുത്തിയ സ്വാഭാവികമായ തെളിവുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിശേഷതകളുമായി സെമാന്റിക് സ്വാഭാവികമായ തെളിവുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രമാണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d Cg2lambda ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് കൊമ്മിണേറ്റര്\u200d ക്യാറ്ററിയല്\u200d ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d (സിസിജി) വി പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് മറ്റു ലോഗിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമെ', 'mt': 'Id-determinazzjoni ta’ similarità testwali semantika hija suġġett ewlieni ta’ riċerka fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Billi mudelli bbażati fuq il-vetturi għar-rappreżentazzjoni tas-sentenza ta’ spiss jużaw informazzjoni baxxa, il-qbid ta’ semantika preċiża huwa diffiċli. B’kuntrast, rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi loġiċi jaqbdu livelli aktar profondi ta’ sentenzi semantiċi, iżda n-natura simbolika tagħhom ma toffrix kunċetti gradati ta’ similarità testwali. Aħna nipproponu metodu għad-determinazzjoni ta’ similarità testwali semantika billi nikkombinaw karatteristiċi baxxi ma’ karatteristiċi estratti minn provi ta’ tnaqqis naturali ta’ relazzjonijiet bidirezzjonali ta’ involviment bejn pari ta’ sentenzi. Għall-provi tat-tnaqqis naturali, a ħna nużaw ccg2lambda, sistema ta’ inferenza awtomatika ta’ ordni ogħla, li tikkonverti siġar tad-derivazzjoni tal-Grammar Kategorjali Kombinatorju (CCG) f’rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi u twettaq provi tat-tnaqqis naturali. L-esperimenti juru li s-sistema tagħna kienet kapaċi twettaq sistemi oħra bbażati fuq il-loġika u li l-karatteristiċi derivati mill-provi huma effettivi għat-tagħlim ta’ similarità testwali.', 'mn': 'Сэмантик текст төстэй байдал нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн үндсэн судалгаа юм. Учир нь вектор суурилсан загварууд нь ихэвчлэн гүн зэрэг мэдээллийг хэрэглэдэг учраас зөв хэмжээний зэрэг хэмжээний баримтууд нь хэцүү. Харамсалтай нь логикийн semantic үзүүлэлт нь илүү гүнзгий хэмжээний хэмжээг бий болгодог. Гэхдээ тэдний символ байдал нь текстур төстэй байдлын төсөөлөл өгдөггүй. Бид семантик текстур тэнцүү байдлыг тодорхойлох арга зааж өгүүлбэл өгүүлбэл хоёр хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байгалийн ухамсарт гаргасан бөгөөд хэт хэт хэт хэмжээс Байгалийн бууралтын баталгаанд бид ccg2lambda-г автоматик халдварын систем ашигладаг. Энэ нь Комбинацийн Категорийн Граммар (CCG) моднуудыг semantic илэрхийлэл болгож байгалийн бууралтын баталгаа хийдэг. Эмчилгээний туршилт нь бидний систем өөр логикийн үндсэн системээс илүү чадвартай гэдгийг харуулж байна. Баталгаанаас гарсан чадварууд нь textual similarity сурах үед үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Bestemming av semantisk tekstulikhet er ein kjerneforskningsemne i naturspråkshandtering. Sidan vektorbaserte modeller for setningssrepresentasjon ofte brukar så lite informasjon, er det vanskeleg å henta nøyaktige semantikk. I contrast, logiske semantiske representasjonar får dypere nivå av setningsemantikk, men sine symboliske natur tilbyr ikkje graderte notasjon om tekstulikhet. Vi foreslår ein metode for å bestemme semantisk tekstulikhet ved å kombinere fleire funksjonar med funksjonar ekstrahert frå naturlege deduksjonsprøver av bidireksjonelle innføring mellom setningspar. For den naturlege deduksjonsprøvinga bruker vi ccg2lambda, eit høgare rekkefølgje automatisk infeksjonssystem, som konverterer kombinasjonsbehandlingstem (CCG) til semantiske representasjonar og gjer naturlege deduksjonsprøvingar. Eksperimentar viser at systemet vårt var i stand til å utføra andre logikkbaserte systemar og at funksjonar som er utvikla frå prøvinga er effektiv for å lære tekstulikheten.', 'pl': 'Określenie semantycznego podobieństwa tekstowego jest podstawowym przedmiotem badań w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Ponieważ modele wektorowe do reprezentacji zdań często wykorzystują płytkie informacje, przechwytywanie dokładnej semantyki jest trudne. Natomiast logiczne reprezentacje semantyczne uwzględniają głębsze poziomy semantyki zdań, ale ich symboliczny charakter nie oferuje stopniowanych pojęć podobieństwa tekstowego. Proponujemy metodę określania semantycznego podobieństwa tekstowego poprzez łączenie płytkich cech z cechami wydobytymi z naturalnych dowodów dedukcji dwukierunkowych relacji pomiędzy parami zdań. Do naturalnych dowodów dedukcji używamy ccg2lambda, automatycznego systemu wnioskowania wyższego rzędu, który przekształca drzewa pochodzące z Gramatyki Kategorii Połączonej (CCG) w reprezentacje semantyczne i przeprowadza naturalne dowody dedukcji. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz system był w stanie przewyższyć inne systemy oparte na logice i że cechy pochodzące z dowodów są skuteczne do nauki podobieństwa tekstowego.', 'ro': 'Determinarea similarității textuale semantice este un subiect de cercetare de bază în procesarea limbajului natural. Deoarece modelele vectoriale pentru reprezentarea frazelor utilizează adesea informații superficiale, captarea semanticii precise este dificilă. Prin contrast, reprezentările semantice logice captează niveluri mai profunde ale semanticii propozițiilor, dar natura lor simbolică nu oferă noțiuni gradate de similaritate textuală. Propunem o metodă de determinare a similarității textuale semantice prin combinarea caracteristicilor superficiale cu caracteristici extrase din dovezi naturale de deducție a relațiilor bidirecționale de implicare între perechile de propoziții. Pentru dovezile naturale de deducție, folosim ccg2lambda, un sistem automat de deducție de ordine superioară, care transformă arborii de derivație Combinator Categorial Grammar (CCG) în reprezentări semantice și efectuează dovezi naturale de deducție. Experimentele arată că sistemul nostru a fost capabil să depășească alte sisteme bazate pe logică și că caracteristicile derivate din dovezi sunt eficiente pentru învățarea similarității textuale.', 'lt': 'Semantinio tekstinio panašumo nustatymas yra pagrindinis natūralios kalbos apdorojimo mokslinis tyrimas. Kadangi pagal vektorius naudojami frazių pateikimo modeliai dažnai naudoja plokščią informaciją, tikslią semantiką sunku surinkti. Priešingai, logiškos semantinės nuorodos apima gilesnius sakinių semantikos lygius, tačiau jų simbolinis pobūdis nesuteikia klasifikuotų tekstinio panašumo sąvokų. Siūlome metodą semantiniam tekstiniam panašumui nustatyti derinant plokščias savybes su savybėmis, gautomis iš natūralaus atskaitymo įrodymų apie dvikrypčius santykius tarp sakinių poros. Gamtiniams atskaitymo įrodymams naudojame ccg2lambda, aukštesnės eilės automatinio atskaitymo sistemą, kuri konvertuoja Kombinuotosios kategorijos gramos (CCG) išvestinius medžius į semantinius atskaitymus ir atlieka gamtinius atskaitymo įrodymus. Experiments show that our system was able to outperform other logic-based systems and that features derived from the proofs are effective for learning textual similarity.', 'mk': 'Одредувањето на семантичната текстуална сличност е основна тема на истражување во природното обработување јазик. Бидејќи моделите засновани на вектори за претставување на речениците честопати користат плошки информации, capturing точна семантика е тешко. За разлика од тоа, логичните семантични претставувања заземаат подлабоки нивоа на семантична реченица, но нивната симболична природа не нуди оценети идеи за текстуална сличност. Предложуваме метод за одредување на семантичната текстуална сличност со комбинација на плошките карактеристики со карактеристики извадени од природните докази за одземање на двогледните односи меѓу паровите на реченици. За природните докази за одземање, користиме ccg2lambda, систем на автоматска инференција со повисок ред, кој ги претвора дрвјата од комбинаторната категоријална грама (CCG) во семантични претставувања и води природни докази за одземање. Experiments show that our system was able to outperform other logic-based systems and that features derived from the proofs are effective for learning textual similarity.', 'so': 'Go’aanka isku mid ah ee qoraalka semantika waa wax baaritaan hoose ah oo ku qoran baaritaanka afka asalka ah. Sida darteed tusaalooyin ku saleysan vector-based oo loo qeybeeyo go’aanka inta badan waxay isticmaalaan macluumaad khaas ah, si aad u sahlan u qabsashada semantiga waa adag tahay. Isku xiriir ahaan waxaa laga helaa heerarka qoraalka ee hoos u dhexeeya ee semantika, laakiin dabiicadda sawirkooda ma bixiyo fikrada qoraalka si siman ah. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qaab aan u go’aanno isku mid ahaanshaha qoraalka ah oo aan ku soo ururinno qalabka khaas ah oo la soo saaray tusaale ahaan lammaanaha la xiriira cilmiga leh oo u dhexeeya labada xabsiga. Calaamadaha kharashka dabiicadda ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa Cg2lambda, taas oo u bedela dhirta ka soo baxa jaamacadda (CCG) oo u bedela qaybaha qeybta, wuxuuna sameynaa caddeynta dhaqaalaha dabiicadda. Imtixaanka waxaa tusaya in nidaamkayagu ay awoodi karto inay soo bandhigaan nidaamka kale ee jimicsiga ku saleysan iyo in tayooyin laga soo jeedo calaamado ay faa’iido u yihiin waxbarashada qoraalka oo isku mid ah.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje semantičke tekstualne sličnosti je temelj istraživanja prirodnog jezika. Budući da modeli na vektoru za predstavljanje rečenica često koriste plitke informacije, teško je uhvatiti tačne semantike. Pored toga, logičke semantičke predstave uhvate dublje nivoe semantike rečenice, ali njihova simbolička priroda ne nudi ocjene pojma o tekstualnoj sličnosti. Predlažemo metodu za određivanje semantičke tekstualne sličnosti kombinacijom plitkih karakteristika sa karakteristikama izvučenim iz prirodnih dokaza odvajanja dokaza o dvodirektivnim odnosima između parova rečenica. Za prirodne dokaze odvajanja, koristimo ccg2lambda, sistem automatskog infekcije, koji pretvara kombinirane kategorijske Grammar (CCG) derivacije u semantičke predstave i vodi prirodne dokaze odvajanja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš sistem uspeo da izvede druge sisteme na logici i da su karakteristike iz dokaza efikasne za učenje tekstualne sličnosti.', 'sv': 'Fastställande av semantisk textlikhet är ett kärnämne inom naturspråksbehandling. Eftersom vektorbaserade modeller för frasrepresentation ofta använder ytlig information är det svårt att fånga korrekt semantik. Däremot fångar logiska semantiska representationer djupare nivåer av meningsemantik, men deras symboliska natur erbjuder inte graderade föreställningar om textmässig likhet. Vi föreslår en metod för att bestämma semantisk textlikhet genom att kombinera ytliga egenskaper med egenskaper extraherade från naturliga deduktionsbevis på tvåriktade involveringsrelationer mellan meningspar. För de naturliga deduktionsbevisen använder vi ccg2lambda, ett automatiskt deduktionssystem av högre klass, som omvandlar CCG-derivatträd till semantiska representationer och genomför naturliga deduktionsbevis. Experiment visar att vårt system kunde överträffa andra logikbaserade system och att funktioner som härrör från bevisen är effektiva för att lära sig textlikhet.', 'si': 'සාමාන්තික පාළුවන් වගේ සාමාන්තික විශේෂතාව නිර්ධාරණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරකාරී වෙක්ටර් අධාරිත මොඩේල් වාක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා බොහොම තොරතුරු පාවිච්චි කරන්න, හරියට සැමැන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයෙන්, ලෝකික සෙමාන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන සෙමාන්ටික්ස් වලට වඩා ගොඩක් ස්ථානයක් අල්ලගන්නවා, ඒත් ඔවුන්ගේ  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සෙමාන්ටික් පැත්තක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග ස්වභා ස්වභාවික විස්තර සාක්ෂිකය සඳහා, අපි ccg2Lambda භාවිත කරනවා, තරම් ක්\u200dරමයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පද්ධතියක්, සම්බන්ධ විස්තර ග්\u200dරාම්මර් (CC පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය අනිත් ලෝකික පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වුනා කියලා, ඒ වගේම සාක්ෂිකයෙන', 'ta': 'பெம்பென்டிக் நூல் ஒத்திசையை கண்டறியும் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலில் ஒரு மூல ஆராய்ச்சி பொருள். Since vector-based models for sentence representation often use shallow information, capturing accurate semantics is difficult.  மாறுபடுத்தப்பட்டால், தொகுதி பாதிப்புகள் வாக்கியத்தின் semantics ஆழமான நிலைகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்கிறது, ஆனால் அவர்களுடைய குறியீட்டு இய வாக்கு ஜோடிகளுக்கிடையில் இருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட குணங்களை கூட்டும் தன்மையான வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள தன்மைகளுடன் கூட்டிணைக்கும் பாம இயற்கையான வெளிப்பாடுகளுக்கு, நாம் உயர்ந்த வரிசையில் சிக்கி2லாம்பாவை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அது கூட்டு வரிசையில் தானாகவே தோற்றத்தை மாற்றுகிறது, அது கூட்டு வக பரிசோதனைகள் நமது அமைப்பு மற்ற தொழில்நுட்ப அமைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்த முடியும் மற்றும் அத்தாட்சிகளிலிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்ட குணங', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی ٹکسٹیول برابری کا فیصلہ کرنا طبیعی زبان پرسس میں ایک اصلی تحقیق موضوع ہے. ویکتور-بنیادی موڈل کیونکہ ویکتوروں کی تصویر کے لئے بہت زیادہ کم معلومات کا استعمال کرتا ہے، دقیق سیمانٹیکوں کو پکڑنا مشکل ہے. مقابلہ میں، منطقی سیمانٹی نمونٹیوں کی عمیق سطح سیمانٹیکوں کو پکڑتے ہیں، لیکن ان کی سیمانٹیکی سیمانٹیکوں کی نمونٹیوں کو تفصیل کے مطابق نہیں پہنچاتا۔ ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ سیمنٹی ٹکسٹیول برابری کا فیصلہ کریں، جبکہ ان دونوں کے درمیان دوسری طریقے کی تعلقات کی تعلقات کی تعلقات کی تعلقات کے ذریعہ سیمنٹی ٹکسٹیول سے نکالی جاتی ہیں. طبیعی دھوکا دکھانے کے لئے، ہم ccg2lambda کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، ایک بلند اوٹوٹوٹ آٹوٹ آٹوٹ سٹم، جسے Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) دھوپ درختوں کو semantic representations میں تبدیل کرتا ہے اور طبیعی دھوپ دکھانے کے دکھانے میں عمل کرتے ہیں. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا سیستم دوسرے لوجیک بنیادی سیستموں سے زیادہ کام کرسکتا تھا اور یہ نشانیاں پائی جاتی ہیں کہ ٹکسٹیول جیسے سیکھنے کے لئے مفید ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Hullas, vektor asosiy modellar soʻzni taqdim qilish uchun oddiy maʼlumot yordamida foydalanadi, аниқ semantika olish qiyin. Ikkinchi darajada, logical semantik taʼminlovchilari gapiruv semantika eng yuqori darajalarini qabul qiladi, lekin ularning xususiyati texnologiya bir xil g'oyalarini bermaydi. Biz bir usulni o'zgartirib chiqqan so'zlar orasidan o'zgarishni o'zgartirish mumkin. Aslida qo'llangan hujjatlar uchun biz yuqori chegara avtomatik raqamli tizimdan Cg2lambda foydalanamiz, bu Kombinator kategorial grammatika (CCG) darajasini semantik tashkilotlariga aylantirish va tabiiy ishlab chiqarish imkoniyatini bajaradi. Sinovlar bizning tizimmiz boshqa logik asosiy tizimlarni bajarishga imkoniyatli mumkin va xususiyatlarning imkoniyatlaridan olingan imkoniyatlar texnologiya bir xil o'rganish uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Phân định nét chữ giống nhau là một chủ đề nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Vì các mô hình vector để đại diện câu nói thường sử dụng ít thông tin, bắt giữ ngữ pháp chính xác là khó. Tuy nhiên, các biểu tượng theo logic theo ngữ pháp nắm bắt mức độ ngữ pháp sâu hơn, nhưng bản chất tượng trưng của chúng không cho ra các khái niệm có nét giống nhau. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp xác định nét giống nhau theo chữ nghĩa nhỏ bằng cách kết hợp các tính năng nông cạn với các tính năng chiết xuất từ các chứng cứ tính toán tự nhiên giữa các cặp câu. Để dự phòng khấu trừ dự trữ tự nhiên, chúng tôi dùng cc 2lamda, một hệ thống suy luận tự động cao cấp, điều chỉnh hóa các cây phân loại Categorial Grammar (CCG) phân phát từ theo các biểu ngữ học và thực hiện các dự đoán tự nhiên. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy hệ thống của chúng ta có khả năng vượt trội các hệ thống theo logic khác và các tính năng từ các chứng minh có hiệu quả để học kết cấu giống nhau.', 'nl': 'Het bepalen van semantische tekstuele gelijkenis is een kernonderzoeksonderwerp in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Aangezien vectorgebaseerde modellen voor zinsweergave vaak oppervlakkige informatie gebruiken, is het moeilijk om nauwkeurige semantiek vast te leggen. Logische semantische representaties vangen daarentegen diepere niveaus van zinssemantiek op, maar hun symbolische aard biedt geen gegradeerde noties van tekstuele gelijkenis. We stellen een methode voor om semantische tekstuele gelijkenis te bepalen door oppervlakkige kenmerken te combineren met kenmerken die zijn geëxtraheerd uit natuurlijke deductie bewijzen van bidirectionele implicatierelaties tussen zinsparen. Voor de natuurlijke deductie bewijzen gebruiken we ccg2lambda, een hoger-order automatisch inferentiesysteem, dat Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) afgeleidingsbomen omzet in semantische representaties en natuurlijke deductie bewijzen uitvoert. Experimenten tonen aan dat ons systeem in staat was om andere logica-gebaseerde systemen te overtreffen en dat kenmerken afgeleid van de bewijzen effectief zijn voor het leren van tekstuele gelijkenis.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje semantičke tekstualne sličnosti je temelj istraživanja prirodnog jezika. Budući da modeli na vektoru za predstavljanje rečenica često koriste plitke informacije, teško je uhvatiti precizne semantike. Uzgred, logičke semantičke predstave uhvate dublje razine semantike kazne, ali njihova simbolička priroda ne nudi ocjene pojma o tekstualnoj sličnosti. Predlažemo metodu za određivanje semantičke tekstualne sličnosti kombiniranjem plitkih karakteristika s karakteristikama izvučenim iz prirodnog odvajanja dokaza dvodirektivnih odnosa između parova kazne. Za prirodne dokaze odvajanja, koristimo ccg2lambda, veći automatski sustav infekcije, koji pretvara drveće iz kombinacije kategorije Grammar a (CCG) u semantičke predstave i vodi prirodne dokaze odvajanja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš sustav bio u stanju izvršiti druge logičke sustave i da su karakteristike iz dokaza učinkovite za učenje tekstualne sličnosti.', 'bg': 'Определянето на семантична текстова сходство е основен предмет на изследване в обработката на естествения език. Тъй като векторните модели за представяне на изречения често използват плитка информация, улавянето на точна семантика е трудно. За разлика от това, логическите семантични представи улавят по-дълбоки нива на семантиката на изреченията, но тяхната символична природа не предлага степенни понятия за текстово сходство. Предлагаме метод за определяне на семантична текстова сходство чрез комбиниране на плитки черти с черти, извлечени от доказателства за естествено дедуктиране на двупосочни връзки между двойки изречения. За доказателствата за естествено дедуктиране използваме система за автоматично извеждане от по-висок ред, която преобразува дърветата за комбинирана категорична граматика в семантични представяния и провежда доказателства за естествено дедуктиране. Експериментите показват, че нашата система е била в състояние да надмине други логически базирани системи и че характеристиките, получени от доказателствата, са ефективни за изучаване на текстово сходство.', 'da': 'Fastlæggelse af semantisk tekstlig lighed er et kerneforskningsemne i naturlig sprogbehandling. Da vektorbaserede modeller til sætningsrepræsentation ofte bruger overfladisk information, er det vanskeligt at fange nøjagtig semantik. I modsætning hertil fanger logiske semantiske repræsentationer dybere niveauer af sætningsemantik, men deres symbolske natur tilbyder ikke graduerede begreber om tekstlig lighed. Vi foreslår en metode til at bestemme semantisk tekstlighed ved at kombinere overfladiske træk med træk udvundet fra naturlige deduktionsbeviser for bidirektionelle involveringsrelationer mellem sætningspar. Til de naturlige deduktionsbeviser bruger vi ccg2lambda, et automatisk deduktionssystem i højere rækkefølge, som konverterer CCG-derivattræer til semantiske repræsentationer og udfører naturlige deduktionsbeviser. Eksperimenter viser, at vores system var i stand til at overperforme andre logikbaserede systemer, og at funktioner afledt af beviserne er effektive til at lære tekstlig lighed.', 'id': 'Menentukan persamaan tekstual semantis adalah subjek penelitian utama dalam proses bahasa alami. Karena model berdasarkan vektor untuk representation kalimat sering menggunakan informasi rendah, menangkap semantik akurat sulit. Sebaliknya, represisi semantis logis menangkap tingkat semantis kalimat yang lebih dalam, tetapi sifat simbolik mereka tidak menawarkan gagasan nilai dari persamaan tekstual. Kami mengusulkan metode untuk menentukan persamaan tekstual semantis dengan menggabungkan ciri-ciri rendah dengan ciri-ciri yang dikeluarkan dari bukti deduksi alami hubungan bidireksi antara pasangan kalimat. Untuk bukti deduksi alami, kami menggunakan ccg2lambda, sistem deduksi otomatis tertib yang lebih tinggi, yang mengubah pohon derivasi Kombinator Categorial Grammar (CCG) menjadi represisi semantis dan melakukan bukti deduksi alami. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita mampu melampaui sistem lain berdasarkan logika dan bahwa ciri-ciri yang berasal dari bukti-bukti efektif untuk mempelajari persamaan tekstual.', 'ko': '의미 텍스트의 유사도 확정은 자연 언어 처리의 핵심 연구 과제이다.벡터를 바탕으로 하는 문장 표시 모델은 일반적으로 천박한 정보를 사용하기 때문에 정확한 의미를 얻기 어렵다.그에 비해 논리적 의미 표징은 문장의 의미를 더욱 깊이 있게 포착했지만 그들의 기호 본질은 텍스트의 유사성을 등급별 개념을 제공하지 않았다.우리는 얕은 특징과 문장 대 사이의 양방향 함축 관계를 자연연역 증명에서 추출한 특징을 결합시켜 의미 텍스트의 유사도를 확정하는 방법을 제시했다.자연 추리 증명에 대해 우리는 고급 자동 추리 시스템인 ccg2lambda를 사용하는데 이 시스템은 조합 범주 문법(CCG) 파생 트리를 의미 표시로 전환하고 자연 추리 증명을 한다.실험에 의하면 우리의 시스템은 다른 논리 기반의 시스템보다 우수할 수 있고 증명에서 얻은 특징은 학습 텍스트의 유사성에 효과적이다.', 'de': 'Die Bestimmung der semantischen Textähnlichkeit ist ein zentrales Forschungsthema in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Da vektorbasierte Modelle zur Satzdarstellung häufig oberflächliche Informationen verwenden, ist es schwierig, genaue Semantik zu erfassen. Logische semantische Repräsentationen erfassen dagegen tiefere Ebenen der Satzsameantik, aber ihre Symbolik bietet keine abgestuften Vorstellungen von Textähnlichkeit. Wir schlagen eine Methode zur Bestimmung der semantischen Textähnlichkeit vor, indem flache Merkmale mit Merkmalen kombiniert werden, die aus natürlichen deduktiven Beweisen für bidirektionale Zusammenhänge zwischen Satzpaaren extrahiert wurden. Für die natürlichen Deduktionsnachweise verwenden wir ccg2lambda, ein automatisches Inferenzsystem höherer Ordnung, das Ableitungsbäume der Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) in semantische Repräsentationen umwandelt und natürliche Deduktionsnachweise durchführt. Experimente zeigen, dass unser System in der Lage war, andere logikbasierte Systeme zu übertreffen und dass aus den Beweisen abgeleitete Merkmale effektiv sind, um Textähnlichkeit zu lernen.', 'fa': 'تعیین شبیه\u200cسازی متن\u200cهای semantic یک موضوع تحقیقات اصلی در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. از آنجا که مدل\u200cهای بنیاد ویکتور برای نمایش جمله اغلب از اطلاعات کم استفاده می\u200cکند، دستگیری سیمانتی دقیق سخت است. بر خلاف این، نمایش\u200cهای سیمانتیک منطقی سطح عمیق\u200cتر از جمله\u200cهای سیمانتیک را می\u200cگیرند، ولی طبیعت سیمانتیک آنها نمایش\u200cهای درجه\u200cای از شبیه\u200cهای متن را پیشنهاد نمی\u200cکند. ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای تعیین شبیه\u200cسازی متن سنتی با ترکیب ویژه\u200cهای کوچک با ویژه\u200cهای کوچک طبیعی از مدرک\u200cهای کوچک\u200cسازی طبیعی رابطه\u200cهای کوچک\u200cسازی بین جفت جمله\u200cها. برای مدرک تخمین طبیعی، ما از ccg2lambda استفاده می کنیم، یک سیستم تخمین اتوماتیک بالاتر، که درخت تخمین کاتوریک کاتوریک (CCG) را تبدیل می کند به نمایش\u200cهای semantic و مدرک تخمین طبیعی می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که سیستم ما قادر بود سیستم\u200cهای دیگر را بر منطقی انجام دهد و ویژگی\u200cهایی که از مدارک به دست آورده\u200cاند برای یادگیری شبیه\u200cهای متن موثر است.', 'sq': 'Përcaktimi i ngjashmërisë tekstuale semantike është një subjekt thelbësor kërkimi në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Meqenëse modelet bazuar në vektor për përfaqësimin e fjalëve shpesh përdorin informacion të thellë, kapja e semantikës së saktë është e vështirë. Përkundrazi, përfaqësimet logjike semantike kapin nivele më të thella të semantikës së fjalëve, por natyra simbolike e tyre nuk ofron koncepte të graduara të ngjashmërisë tekstuale. Ne propozojmë një metodë për përcaktimin e ngjashmërisë tekstuale semantike duke kombinuar karakteristika të thella me karakteristika të nxjerra nga provat natyrore të zbritjes së marrëdhënieve dy-drejtuese të përfshirjes midis çifteve të fjalëve. Për provat natyrore të zbulimit, ne përdorim ccg2lambda, një sistem më të lartë të zbulimit automatik, i cili konverton pemët e derivative të kombinuar të Gramave Kategorore (CCG) në përfaqësime semantike dhe kryen provat natyrore të zbulimit. Eksperimentet tregojnë se sistemi ynë ishte në gjendje të kalonte sisteme të tjera bazuar në logjikë dhe se karakteristikat e nxjerra nga provat janë efektive për mësimin e ngjashmërisë tekstuale.', 'sw': 'Kugundua usawa wa teknolojia ya kimapenzi ni utafiti wa msingi katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Kwa kuwa mifano ya uwakilishi wa hukumu mara nyingi hutumia taarifa mbaya, kupata mifano sahihi ni vigumu. Kwa kinyume chake, maonesho ya kimwili yanachukua kiwango kina zaidi cha semantics cha hukumu, lakini mazingira yao hayatoa mawazo ya kiwango kinachofanana na uhalisia. Tunazipendekeza njia ya kuamua uhalisia wa kimapenzi unaofanana kwa kuunganisha vipengele vibaya na vipengele vilivyotolewa kutoka kwa utoaji wa asili ya ushahidi wa mahusiano ya watu wasiofahamu kati ya wanandoa wa hukumu. For the natural deduction proofs, we use ccg2lambda, a higher-order automatic inference system, which converts Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) derivation trees into semantic representations and conducts natural deduction proofs.  Majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu uliweza kutekeleza mifumo mingine yenye msingi wa mantiki na kwamba vipengele vinavyotokana na ushahidi ni vyema kwa kujifunza usawa wa msingi.', 'tr': 'Semantik metinň meňzeşliklerini takyklamak tebigy dil işleminde esasy bir araştyrma temidir. Çözümler temsilleri için vektöre tabanlı modeller köplenç çirkin bilgi kullanır, titiz semantik almak kyn. Hiç tersine, logik semantik temsiller sözlerin derin seviyelerini çykarýar, ýöne olaryň simbolik tebilikleri tekst benzeri görünüşlerini teklif etmez. Biz semantik tekstuň meňzeşliklerini çykarmak üçin bir yöntem teklif edip, sözlem çiftleri arasyndaky a ýratyş çykarmak täsiýetlerinden çekilýäris. Doğal değerlendirme kanıtları için, ccg2lambda, daha yüksek sıralar otomatik hasaplama sistemi kullanırız ve bu şekilde Kombinatör Grammar (CCG) atılan agaçları semantik temsillere çevirir ve doğal değerlendirme kanıtlarını gerçekleştirir. Denminatlar biziň sistemimiziň başga logik tabanly sistemalary çykyp bilýändigini görkezýär we kanulardan çykan özelliklerimiz tekst ýaly meňzeşliklerini öwrenmek üçin täsirli bolup bilýändigini görkezýär.', 'af': "Die bepaal van semantiese tektuele gelykenis is 'n nuwe onderwerp in natuurlike taal verwerking. Omdat vektor-gebaseerde modele vir seting voorstelling dikwels slag inligting gebruik, is die opvang van presies semantieke moeilik. Deur teenstelling, logiese semantiese voorstellings vang diepter vlakke van sin semantieke, maar hul simboliese natuur offer nie gegradeerde notisies van tekstuele gelykenis nie. Ons voorstel 'n metode vir die bepaal van semantiese tekstuele gelykenis deur die kombinasie van slagte funksies met funksies uitgevoer van natuurlike deduksie bevestings van bidireksjonele verhouding tussen sin paar. Vir die natuurlike afdrukkingsbevestige gebruik ons ccg2lambda, 'n hoër volgorde automatiese inferensie stelsel, wat konverteer Kombinasiese Kategorie Grammar (CCG) afgeleidingsbome in semantiese voorstellings en gedoen natuurlike afdrukkingsbevestings. Eksperimente wys dat ons stelsel kon ander logiese gebaseerde stelsels uitvoer en dat funksies van die bevestige afgeleide is effektief vir die leer van tekstuele gelykenis.", 'am': 'የsemantic ጽሑፍ ምሳሌ በመፍጠር ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል የሆኑን መርምር ነው፡፡ የvector-based models for sentence representation ብዙ ጊዜ ጥሩ መረጃ ይጠይቃሉ፤ እርግጠኛ semantics ማግኘት አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ በተለይ፣ የግንኙነት ስምናሲ አካባቢዎች የፍርድ አካላዊ ጥልቅ ደረጃዎችን ይያዛሉ፣ ነገር ግን የባሕላዊው ጥያቄ የጽሑፍ ጥያቄ ብጤት አይሰጥም፡፡ የሥርዓት ሁኔታ እና የፍጥረት አካባቢ የውይይት ግንኙነትን በተለየ ጥሩ ምርጫዎችን በማቀናቀል እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ለባሕላዊ ጥያቄ ማስረጃ ላይ Cg2lambda፣ ከፍተኛ የኮምፒዩተር ኮምፒተርቲያዊ ግራማር (CCG) ዛፎችን ለsemantic representation እና ፍጥረታዊ ምርጫዎችን የሚያደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች ስርዓታችን ሌሎችን የሎጂ-based ስርዓቶች ማሳየት እንዲችል እና ማስታወቂያው የተገኘ ስርዓቶች የጽሑፍ ብጤት ለመማር ጥቅም እንዲችሉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ տեքստոլային նմանությունը բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ ուսումնասիրության հիմնական թեման է: Քանի որ նախադասությունների ներկայացման վեկտորների հիմնված մոդելները հաճախ օգտագործում են մակերեսային տեղեկատվություն, ճշգրիտ սեմանտիկայի վերցնելը դժվար է: Ի հակառակ, տրամաբանական սեմանտիկ ներկայացումները ներառում են նախադասությունների սեմանտիկայի ավելի խորը մակարդակներ, բայց նրանց սիմվոլիկ բնույթը չի առաջարկում տեքստային նմանության գնահատված հասկացություններ: We propose a method for determining semantic textual similarity by combining shallow features with features extracted from natural deduction proofs of bidirectional entailment relations between sentence pairs.  Բնական հաշվի առնելու ապացույցների համար մենք օգտագործում ենք CC-2լամբդա, ավտոմատիկ հաշվի առնելու համակարգ, որը փոխակերպում է կոմպինացիոն կատեգորիալ գրամար (CC-ի) ծառերը սեմանտիկ ներկայացումների և կատարում է բնական հաշվի առնելու ապացույցներ: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը կարողացավ արտադրել այլ տրամաբանական համակարգեր, և որ ապացույցներից ստացված հատկությունները արդյունավետ են դասական նմանությունների սովորելու համար:', 'az': 'Semantik textual similaritəsini təbiətli dil işləməsində ilk araştırma məsəlinədir. Sözüm göstəricisi üçün vektor tabanlı modelleri çox az bilgi istifadə edir, doğru semantik tutmaq çətin. Əksinə, lojik semantik göstəricilər sözlərin daha derin səviyyələrini alırlar, amma onların simbolik təbiəti textual bənzər fikirlərini göstərməz. Biz semantik tekst oxumasını təsdiqləmək üçün bir yol təklif edirik, cümlələr arasındakı təbiətli deçmə kanıtlarından çıxarılan xüsusiyyətləri birləşdirib. Təbiətli deduction kanıtları üçün, biz ccg2lambda, yüksək sıralar automatik infeksyon sistemini istifadə edirik. Bu, Combinative Categorial Grammar (CCG) a ğaclarını semantik göstəricilərə çevirir və təbiətli deduction kanıtlarını təşkil edir. Həqiqətən, təcrübələrimiz sistemimizin başqa logik sistemlərindən üstün olduğunu göstərir və kanıtlardan gələn özelliklərin textual similaritə öyrənmək üçün faydalı olduğunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় সেমেন্টিক টেক্সচুয়াল সমতুল্য সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণ করা হচ্ছে। কারাদণ্ডের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য ভেক্টর ভিত্তিক মডেল প্রায়শই অল্প তথ্য ব্যবহার করে, যেহেতু সঠিক সেমেন্টিক বিপরীতে, বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিরা শাস্তির সেম্যান্টিকের গভীর পর্যায়ে ধরে, কিন্তু তাদের প্রতীক প্রক আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যে সেমেন্টিক টেক্সচুয়ালের সমতুল্য সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণের মাধ্যমে প্রাকৃতিক উৎপাদনের প্রমাণ থেকে উৎপাদন করা হয়েছে  প্রাকৃতিক উৎসর্গের প্রমাণের জন্য আমরা উচ্চ ক্ষেত্রে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আক্রান্ত ব্যবস্থা সিজি২লাম্বাদা ব্যবহার করি, যা কম্বিনেটরিয়াল গ্রামার (সিসিজি) বৃক্ পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম অন্যান্য লোগিক ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম প্রকাশ করতে সক্ষম হয়েছে এবং প্রমাণ থেকে প্রমাণ প্রদান করা', 'ca': "Determinar la similitud textual semàntica és un tema de recerca central en el processament natural de llenguatges. Com que els models de representació de frases basats en vectors sovint utilitzen informació superficial, capturar semàntica exacta és difícil. En canvi, les representacions semàntiques lògiques capturen nivells més profunds de la semàntica de frases, però la seva naturalesa simbòlica no ofereix nocions gradades de similitud textual. We propose a method for determining semantic textual similarity by combining shallow features with features extracted from natural deduction proofs of bidirectional entailment relations between sentence pairs.  Per a les provas de deducció natural, utilitzem ccg2lambda, un sistema de inferència automàtica d'ordre superior, que converteix arbres de derivació de grama categoria combinadora (CCG) en representacions semàntiques i fa provas de deducció naturals. Els experiments demostren que el nostre sistema va poder superar altres sistemes lògics i que les característiques derivades de les provas són efectives per aprendre la similitud textual.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje semantičke tekstualne sličnosti je temelj istraživanja prirodnog jezika. Budući da modeli na vektoru za predstavljanje rečenica često koriste plitke informacije, teško je uhvatiti tačne semantike. Uzgred, logičke semantičke predstave uhvate dublje nivoe semantike kazne, ali njihova simbolička priroda ne nudi ocjene pojma o tekstualnoj sličnosti. Mi predlažemo metodu za određivanje semantičke tekstualne sličnosti kombinacijom plitkih karakteristika sa karakteristikama izvučenim iz prirodnih dokaza odvajanja dokaza o dvodirektivnim odnosima između parova kazne. Za prirodne dokaze o dedukciji koristimo ccg2lambda, sistem automatskog infekcije visokog reda, koji pretvara drveće iz kombinacije kategorije Grammar a (CCG) u semantičke predstave i vodi prirodne dokaze o dedukciji. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš sistem bio u stanju izvršiti druge sisteme na logici i da su karakteristike iz dokaza učene za učenje tekstualne sličnosti.', 'cs': 'Stanovení sémantické textové podobnosti je hlavním výzkumným předmětem zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Vzhledem k tomu, že vektorové modely pro reprezentaci vět často používají mělké informace, je zachycení přesné sémantiky obtížné. Naproti tomu logické sémantické reprezentace zachycují hlubší úrovně sémantiky vět, ale jejich symbolická povaha nenabízí stupňované pojmy textové podobnosti. Navrhujeme metodu určení sémantické textové podobnosti kombinací mělkých rysů s rysy extrahovanými z přirozených dedukčních důkazů obousměrných implikačních vztahů mezi větovými páry. Pro přirozené dedukce používáme ccg2lambda, automatický inferenční systém vyššího řádu, který převádí derivační stromy kombinované kategorické gramatiky (CCG) na sémantické reprezentace a provádí přirozené dedukce. Experimenty ukazují, že náš systém byl schopen překonat ostatní systémy založené na logice a že vlastnosti odvozené z důkazů jsou efektivní pro učení textové podobnosti.', 'et': 'Semantilise tekstisarnasuse määramine on looduskeele töötlemise põhiteem. Kuna vektoripõhised lausete esitamise mudelid kasutavad sageli madalat teavet, on täpse semantika jäädvustamine keeruline. Seevastu loogilised semantilised representatsioonid hõlmavad lausesemantika sügavamaid tasemeid, kuid nende sümboolne olemus ei paku tekstilise sarnasuse astmelist mõistet. Pakume välja meetodi semantilise tekstisarnasuse määramiseks, kombineerides madalaid omadusi lausepaaride kahesuunaliste kaasamissuhete loomulikust deduktsioonist saadud omadustega. Loomuliku deduktsiooni tõendite puhul kasutame ccg2lambda, kõrgema astme automaatset järelduste süsteemi, mis muundab kombineeritud kategooriagrammatika (CCG) tuletamispuud semantilisteks esitusteks ja viib läbi loomuliku deduktsiooni tõendeid. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie süsteem suutis ületada teisi loogikal põhinevaid süsteeme ja et tõenditest tuletatud funktsioonid on tõhusad teksti sarnasuse õppimiseks.', 'fi': 'Semanttisen tekstin samankaltaisuuden määrittäminen on luonnonkielen käsittelyn ydinaihe. Koska vektoripohjaiset lauseiden esittämismallit käyttävät usein matalaa tietoa, tarkan semantiikan saaminen on vaikeaa. Sen sijaan loogiset semanttiset esitykset vangitsevat lausesemantiikan syvempiä tasoja, mutta niiden symbolinen luonne ei tarjoa asteittaista käsitystä tekstin samankaltaisuudesta. Ehdotamme menetelmää semanttisen tekstin samankaltaisuuden määrittämiseksi yhdistämällä pinnallisia piirteitä lauseparien välisten kaksisuuntaisten sidossuhteiden luonnollisiin päättelytodistuksiin. Luonnollisissa deduktiovedoksissa käytämme ccg2lambda-järjestelmää, korkeamman luokan automaattista päättelyjärjestelmää, joka muuntaa CCG:n (Combinatory Categorial Grammar) päättelypuut semanttisiksi esityksiksi ja suorittaa luonnollisia deduktiovedoksia. Kokeet osoittavat, että järjestelmämme pystyi suoriutumaan paremmin kuin muut logiikkapohjaiset järjestelmät ja että todisteista johdetut ominaisuudet ovat tehokkaita tekstien samankaltaisuuden oppimisessa.', 'jv': 'Kumpulan sampeyan sematik Tekst politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Yura wigatining, semanti kuwi nggambar kelangan langgar sampeyan luwih kelas semanti, karo sapa sampeyan simbol sing ora ngerasakno akeh seneng ngregani. Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem kanggo nggawe semanti nggambar semanti nggo ngerasai cara-cara sing nyimpen karo winih dhéwé butuhan karo aturan deduktion nggawe sapa nyimpen winih dhéwé. For the normal deduktion testing, we use scg2mbda, a height-order automatically deduktion System, that convert the Kombinorial category Gramm (CG) mines to semanti representations and konds normal deduktion testing. For the Perintah sing dipontrolan nganggep sistem awak dhéwé iso nggawe sistem sing paling logik barêng. Perintah sing paling nggambar kuwi nggunaken apa bener', 'he': 'לקבוע דמיון טקסטלי סמנטי הוא נושא מחקר בסיסי בעבודת שפת טבעית. מכיוון שמדוגמנים מבוססים בוקטורים לייצג משפטים משתמשים לעיתים קרובות במידע שטחי, לתפוס סמנטיקה מדויקת קשה. בניגוד לזה, מייצגים סמנטיים הגיוניים שולטים רמות עמוקות יותר של סמנטיקה משפטית, אבל הטבע הסימболי שלהם לא מציע רעיונות מסוימים של דומות טקסטאליות. אנו מציעים שיטה לקבוע דמיון טקסטלי סמנטי על ידי שילוב תכונות שטחים עם תכונות שמוציאים מההוכחות טבעיות של מערכות יחסים בין זוגות משפטים. עבור הוכחות ההנחה הטבעיות, אנו משתמשים במערכת ההנחה האוטומטית ccg2lambda, מערכת ההנחה האוטומטית של סדר גבוה יותר, שמהפכת עצי ההנחה הקטגורית הקבוצורית (CCG) למציגות סמנטיות ומבצעת הוכחות ההנחה הטבעיות. ניסויים מראים שהמערכת שלנו היתה מסוגלת להעביר מערכות נוספות מבוססות בהיגיון ושתכונות שנוצרו מההוכחות הן יעילות ללמוד דמיון טקסטלי.', 'ha': "An gane masu daidaita matsayin na semantic shi ne wata sanarwa mai ƙaranci cikin jarraba harshen kwance. Kama da misãlai masu bincike na masu tsari ga cewa, masu yiwuwa ana yi amfani da shaidar baya-baya, don ka sami motsi masu inganci na daidaita. By contrast, logical semantic representations capture deeper levels of sentence semantics, but their symbolic nature does not offer graded notions of textual similarity.  Tuna goyyar da wata hanyoyi wa yin hukunta misalin littãfin na semantiki da za'a haɗa wasu masu shale da wasu abũbuwan da aka nuna daga shekara masu yin sauri daga shekarar masu da sani bakwai. Yana yin amfani da Cg2lambda, wata na'ura farat ɗaya, wanda ke mayar da itãcen cirari na kombinorial grammar (CCG) ta zama masu motsi ga semantic kuma yana tafiyar bayanin shekarar tamkar ta kanana. Saurin suka nuna cewa, na'asarmu ya iya iya samar da wasu na'urar da aka ƙayyade na logiki, kuma wasu tayari da aka zo daga ayukan ayuka, sun yi amfani da wa karanta misãlai na rubutu.", 'sk': 'Ugotavljanje semantične besedilne podobnosti je osrednji raziskovalni predmet obdelave naravnega jezika. Ker vektorski modeli za predstavitev stavkov pogosto uporabljajo plitke informacije, je zajemanje natančne semantike težko. Nasprotno pa logične semantične reprezentacije zajemajo globlje stopnje semantike stavkov, vendar njihova simbolična narava ne ponuja stopnjevanja pojmov besedilne podobnosti. Predlagamo metodo za določanje semantične besedilne podobnosti z združevanjem plitvih značilnosti s značilnostmi, pridobljenimi iz dokazov naravne dedukcije dvosmernih posledičnih relacij med stavkovnimi pari. Za dokaze naravne dedukcije uporabljamo ccg2lambda, sistem avtomatskih sklepov višjega reda, ki drevesa izpeljanja kombinirane kategorijske slovnice (CCG) pretvori v semantične reprezentacije in izvaja dokaze naravne dedukcije. Eksperimenti kažejo, da je bil naš sistem sposoben preseči druge logične sisteme in da so značilnosti, ki izhajajo iz dokazov, učinkovite za učenje besedilne podobnosti.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྨན་གཞི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། བརྒྱུད་འཕྲུལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས དེ་ལ་འཕར་བ་དང་མིན་དུས་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚོར་བ་མཚོན་པའི་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚུལ་ཡིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དམིགས་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་འདོད་དགོས། For the natural deduction proofs, we use ccg2lambda, a higher-order automatic inference system, which converts Combinatory Categorial Grammar (CCG) derivation trees into semantic representations and conducts natural deduction proofs. Experiments show that our system is able to perform other logic based systems'}
{'en': 'Multi-Grained Chinese Word Segmentation', 'fr': 'Segmentation de mots chinois à grains multiples', 'es': 'Segmentación de palabras en chino con múltiples granos', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات الصينية متعددة الحبيبات', 'pt': 'Segmentação de palavras em chinês multigranulado', 'ja': 'マルチグレイン中国語の単語セグメンテーション', 'zh': '多粒度中文分词', 'hi': 'बहु-दानेदार चीनी शब्द विभाजन', 'ru': 'Разнозернистая сегментация китайских слов', 'ga': 'Deighilt Focal Síneach Ilghráinneach', 'ka': 'Multi-Grained Chinese Word Segmentation', 'el': 'Πολυκοκκώδης τμηματοποίηση κινεζικών λέξεων', 'hu': 'Többszemű kínai szószegmentáció', 'it': 'Segmentazione di parole cinesi multicolore', 'kk': 'Көптеген қытайша сөз сегментациясы', 'lt': 'Multi-Grained Chinese Word Segmentation', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Multi- Grained Chinese Word Segmentation', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem Ċiniżi Multi-Grained', 'mn': 'Хятад хэлбэртэй хэлбэртэй үг хэвлэлт', 'no': 'Multigrensert kinesisk ordsegmentasjon', 'pl': 'Wieloziarnista segmentacja chińskich słów', 'ro': 'Segmentarea cuvintelor chinezești multigranulate', 'sr': 'Višeogranièna kineska segmentacija reèi', 'so': 'qeybinta erayga Shiino ee aad u badan', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් චීනි වචන සෙග්මෙන්ටමන්', 'sv': 'Segmentering av flera korniga kinesiska ord', 'ta': 'பல- சீன வார்த்தை பிரிவு', 'ur': 'Multi-Grained Chinese Word Segmentation', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Kata Cina Berganda', 'uz': 'Multi-Grained Chinese Word Segmentation', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Многозърнеста сегментация на китайски думи', 'hr': 'Multigravirana kineska segmentacija riječi', 'da': 'Flerkarnet kinesisk ordsegmentering', 'nl': 'Meerkorrelige Chinese woordsegmentatie', 'de': 'Mehrkörnige chinesische Wortsegmentierung', 'id': 'Segmentasi kata Cina Multi-Grained', 'fa': 'جدایی کلمه چینی چند گرانه', 'ko': '다립도 중국어 분사', 'tr': 'Birnäçe Gratik Çinçe Sözi Segmentation', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa neno la Kichina', 'af': 'Multi- Grain Sjinese Woord Segmentasie', 'az': 'Çincə Söz Segmentasyonu', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i Fjalëve Kineze Multi-Grained', 'am': 'የቻይንኛ ቃላት አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Segmentació de paraules xineses multiples', 'bs': 'Višeogranična kineska segmentacija riječi', 'cs': 'Segmentace vícezrnných čínských slov', 'fi': 'Monijyväinen kiinan sanasegmentointi', 'et': 'Mitme teralise hiina sõna segmenteerimine', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'סגרטציה מילים סיניות רבות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Večzrnata kitajska segmentacija besed', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བ་མང་ཙམ་འབྱུང་བའི་རྒྱ་ཡིག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་སྣོད།'}
{'en': 'Traditionally, word segmentation (WS) adopts the single-grained formalism, where a sentence corresponds to a single word sequence. However, Sproat et al. (1997) show that the inter-native-speaker consistency ratio over Chinese word boundaries is only 76 %, indicating single-grained WS (SWS) imposes unnecessary challenges on both manual annotation and statistical modeling. Moreover, WS results of different granularities can be complementary and beneficial for high-level applications. This work proposes and addresses multi-grained WS (MWS). We build a large-scale pseudo MWS dataset for model training and tuning by leveraging the annotation heterogeneity of three SWS datasets. Then we manually annotate 1,500 test sentences with true MWS annotations. Finally, we propose three benchmark approaches by casting MWS as constituent parsing and sequence labeling. Experiments and analysis lead to many interesting findings.', 'ar': 'تقليديا ، يتبنى تجزئة الكلمات (WS) الشكلية أحادية الحبيبة ، حيث تتوافق الجملة مع تسلسل كلمة واحدة. ومع ذلك ، Sproat et al. (1997) يوضح أن نسبة الاتساق بين المتحدثين الأصليين على حدود الكلمات الصينية هي 76 ٪ فقط ، مما يشير إلى أن WS أحادي الحبيبات (SWS) يفرض تحديات غير ضرورية على كل من التعليقات التوضيحية اليدوية والنمذجة الإحصائية. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكن أن تكون نتائج WS ذات الأحجام المختلفة مكملة ومفيدة للتطبيقات عالية المستوى. يقترح هذا العمل ويعالج WS متعدد الحبيبات (MWS). نحن نبني مجموعة بيانات MWS زائفة واسعة النطاق لتدريب النموذج وضبطه من خلال الاستفادة من عدم تجانس التعليقات التوضيحية لثلاث مجموعات بيانات SWS. ثم نقوم يدويًا بتعليق 1500 جملة اختبارية مع تعليقات توضيحية حقيقية لـ MWS. أخيرًا ، نقترح ثلاثة مناهج معيارية من خلال اختيار MWS كتحليل مكوِّن ووسم متسلسل. التجارب والتحليلات تؤدي إلى العديد من النتائج المثيرة للاهتمام.', 'pt': 'Tradicionalmente, a segmentação de palavras (WS) adota o formalismo de grão único, onde uma sentença corresponde a uma única sequência de palavras. No entanto, Sproat et al. (1997) mostram que a razão de consistência entre falantes nativos sobre os limites das palavras chinesas é de apenas 76%, indicando que WS de granulação única (SWS) impõe desafios desnecessários tanto na anotação manual quanto na modelagem estatística. Além disso, os resultados do WS de diferentes granularidades podem ser complementares e benéficos para aplicativos de alto nível. Este trabalho propõe e aborda WS multi-granulado (MWS). Construímos um conjunto de dados pseudo MWS em grande escala para treinamento e ajuste de modelos, aproveitando a heterogeneidade de anotação de três conjuntos de dados SWS. Em seguida, anotamos manualmente 1.500 frases de teste com anotações MWS verdadeiras. Por fim, propomos três abordagens de benchmark, lançando MWS como análise constituinte e rotulagem de sequência. Experimentos e análises levam a muitas descobertas interessantes.', 'es': 'Tradicionalmente, la segmentación de palabras (WS) adopta el formalismo de grano único, en el que una oración corresponde a una sola secuencia de palabras. Sin embargo, Sproat et al. (1997) muestran que la relación de consistencia entre hablantes nativos sobre los límites de las palabras chinas es solo del 76%, lo que indica que el WS de grano único (SWS) impone desafíos innecesarios tanto en la anotación manual como en el modelado estadístico. Además, los resultados de WS de diferentes granularidades pueden ser complementarios y beneficiosos para aplicaciones de alto nivel. Este trabajo propone y aborda WS de grano múltiple (MWS). Creamos un pseudo conjunto de datos de MWS a gran escala para el entrenamiento y el ajuste de modelos aprovechando la heterogeneidad de anotación de tres conjuntos de datos de SWS. Luego, anotamos manualmente 1500 frases de prueba con anotaciones MWS reales. Finalmente, proponemos tres enfoques de referencia mediante la conversión de MWS como análisis de constituyentes y etiquetado de secuencias. Los experimentos y los análisis conducen a muchos hallazgos interesantes.', 'fr': "Traditionnellement, la segmentation de mots (WS) adopte le formalisme à grain unique, où une phrase correspond à une séquence de mots unique. Cependant, Sproat et al. (1997) montrent que le rapport de cohérence entre locuteurs natifs sur les limites des mots chinois n'est que de 76\xa0%, ce qui indique que WS à grain unique (SWS) impose des défis inutiles à la fois à l'annotation manuelle et à la modélisation statistique. De plus, les résultats WS de granularités différentes peuvent être complémentaires et bénéfiques pour les applications de haut niveau. Ce travail propose et aborde les WS multigrains (MWS). Nous créons un jeu de données pseudo MWS à grande échelle pour l'apprentissage et le réglage des modèles en tirant parti de l'hétérogénéité des annotations de trois jeux de données SWS. Ensuite, nous annotons manuellement 1 500 phrases de test avec de véritables annotations MWS. Enfin, nous proposons trois approches de référence en utilisant MWS comme analyse des constituants et étiquetage de séquence. Les expériences et les analyses mènent à de nombreuses découvertes intéressantes.", 'zh': '故事,分词(WS)用单粒度形式主义,其句应单词序。 然Sproat等(1997)明,中文单词界上母语人士之间一致性比率仅为76%,明单粒度WS(SWS)手动注计建模皆挑战也。 异粒度者 WS 其于高应用程序互补有益也。 事遂决多粒度WS(MWS)。 因三 SWS 之注异构性,构一以练调优之大伪 MWS 集。 然后手动注 1,500 试句,并带真 MWS 注。 最后条上三准测试方法,以MWS为解析序。 实验与析生多趣。', 'ja': '伝統的に、単語セグメンテーション（ ＷＳ ）は、文が単一の単語シーケンスに対応する単一粒度フォーマリズムを採用する。しかしながら、Sproat et al .( 1997)は、中国語の単語境界にわたるネイティブスピーカー間の一貫性比率がわずか76%であることを示し、単一粒子WS (SWS)が手動注釈と統計モデリングの両方に不必要な課題を課していることを示している。さらに、異なる粒度のWS結果は、高レベルのアプリケーションにとって相補的かつ有益であり得る。この作業では、複数粒子のWS （ MWS ）を提案し、対処します。3つのSWSデータセットのアノテーションの不均一性を活用して、モデルトレーニングとチューニングのための大規模な疑似MWSデータセットを構築します。次に、真のMWSアノテーションを使用して1,500のテスト文に手動でアノテーションを行います。最後に、構成解析及び配列標識としてＭＷＳをキャスティングすることによる３つのベンチマークアプローチを提案する。実験と分析は、多くの興味深い発見につながります。', 'hi': 'परंपरागत रूप से, शब्द विभाजन (डब्ल्यूएस) एकल-दाने वाली औपचारिकता को अपनाता है, जहां एक वाक्य एक शब्द अनुक्रम से मेल खाता है। हालांकि, Sproat et al. (1997) से पता चलता है कि चीनी शब्द सीमाओं पर अंतर-देशी-स्पीकर स्थिरता अनुपात केवल 76% है, जो एकल-दाने वाले WS (SWS) को दर्शाता है, जो मैन्युअल एनोटेशन और सांख्यिकीय मॉडलिंग दोनों पर अनावश्यक चुनौतियों को लागू करता है। इसके अलावा, विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटी के डब्ल्यूएस परिणाम उच्च-स्तरीय अनुप्रयोगों के लिए पूरक और फायदेमंद हो सकते हैं। यह काम बहु-दानेदार डब्ल्यूएस (एमडब्ल्यूएस) का प्रस्ताव करता है और संबोधित करता है। हम तीन SWS डेटासेट की एनोटेशन विषमता का लाभ उठाकर मॉडल प्रशिक्षण और ट्यूनिंग के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर छद्म MWS डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं। फिर हम मैन्युअल रूप से सच्चे MWS एनोटेशन के साथ 1,500 परीक्षण वाक्यों को एनोटेट करते हैं। अंत में, हम घटक पार्सिंग और अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के रूप में MWS कास्टिंग द्वारा तीन बेंचमार्क दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगों और विश्लेषण कई दिलचस्प निष्कर्षों के लिए नेतृत्व करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Традиционно сегментация слов (WS) принимает однозернистый формализм, где предложение соответствует одной последовательности слов. Тем не менее, Sproat et al. (1997) показывают, что коэффициент согласованности между носителями языка над границами китайского слова составляет только 76%, что указывает на то, что однозернистая WS (SWS) налагает ненужные проблемы как на ручную аннотацию, так и на статистическое моделирование. Кроме того, результаты WS различной детализации могут быть взаимодополняющими и полезными для приложений высокого уровня. В этой работе предлагаются и рассматриваются многозернистые РС (MWS). Мы создаем крупномасштабный набор данных псевдо MWS для обучения и настройки моделей, используя неоднородность аннотаций трех наборов данных SWS. Затем мы вручную аннотируем 1500 тестовых предложений с истинными аннотациями MWS. Наконец, мы предлагаем три эталонных подхода, определяя MWS как компонентный синтаксический анализ и маркировку последовательности. Эксперименты и анализ приводят к многим интересным выводам.', 'ga': "Go traidisiúnta, glacann deighilt focal (WS) leis an bhfoirmiúlacht aonghnáthach, áit a bhfreagraíonn abairt do sheicheamh focal amháin. Mar sin féin, tá Sproat et al. (1997) nach bhfuil ach 76% sa chóimheas comhsheasmhachta idirdhúchasach-chainteoirí thar theorainneacha focal na Síne, rud a thugann le fios go gcuireann WS aonghráin (SWS) dúshláin nach bhfuil gá leo ar anótáil láimhe agus ar shamhaltú staitistiúil araon. Thairis sin, is féidir le torthaí WS de ghráinneacha éagsúla a bheith comhlántach agus tairbheach d'iarratais ardleibhéil. Molann an obair seo agus tugtar aghaidh ar WS ilghráin (MWS). Tógaimid tacar sonraí bréagach MWS ar mhórscála le haghaidh oiliúint agus tiúnadh samhlacha trí ilchineálacht nótaí trí thacar sonraí SWS a ghiaráil. Ansin déanaimid anótáil de láimh ar 1,500 abairt tástála le fíornótaí MWS. Ar deireadh, molaimid trí chur chuige tagarmharcála trí MWS a chaitheamh mar pharsáil comhábhar agus mar lipéadú seichimh. Tagann go leor torthaí suimiúla as trialacha agus anailís.", 'ka': 'ტრადიციონალურად, სიტყვების სეგმენტაცია (WS) ერთადერთიანი ფორმალიზმის მიღება, სადაც სიტყვები ერთადერთიანი სიტყვების სეგმენტისთვის კონფიგურ მაგრამ, Sproat et al. (1997) გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩინეთის სიტყვების ზომის კონსტენსტურება მხოლოდ 76%-ია, რომელიც ამოჩვენებს, რომ WS (SWS) არ უნდა უნდა გამოყენება მანქანური ანტორაციის და სტატისტიკური მოდელეზე. დამატებით, განსხვავებული გრანულაციების WS წარმოდგენები შეიძლება იყოს კომპლენტური და ბენექტიური პროგრამებისთვის. ეს სამუშაო მხოლოდ სამუშაო WS (MWS) და მისამართება. ჩვენ შევქმნით დიდი მაგალითი პესედო MWS მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია მოდელური განაცემებისთვის და კონფიგურაციისთვის, რომელიც სამი SWS მონაცემების ჰეტე შემდეგ ჩვენ პირდაპირად ამბობით 1500 ტესტის სიტყვებით მართლა MWS ამბობით. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ სამი ბენქმარკის მიღება MWS-ს გადატანა როგორც კონსტუტენტური პარასტირება და სექსირების მარტილირება. ექსპერიმენტები და ანალიზი უფრო ინტერესური მონაცემებების შესახებ.', 'el': 'Παραδοσιακά, η τμηματοποίηση λέξεων υιοθετεί τον μονοκόκκο φορμαλισμό, όπου μια πρόταση αντιστοιχεί σε μια ενιαία ακολουθία λέξεων. Ωστόσο, τα Sproat κ.α. (1997) δείχνουν ότι η αναλογία συνοχής μεταξύ μητρικών ομιλητών στα σύνορα των κινεζικών λέξεων είναι μόνο 76%, υποδεικνύοντας ότι η μονόκοκκη WS (SWS) επιβάλλει περιττές προκλήσεις τόσο στη χειρωνακτική σχολαστική όσο και στη στατιστική μοντελοποίηση. Επιπλέον, τα αποτελέσματα διαφορετικών κοκκοποιητικών ουσιών μπορούν να είναι συμπληρωματικά και ευεργετικά για εφαρμογές υψηλού επιπέδου. Η εργασία αυτή προτείνει και αντιμετωπίζει πολυκόκκους WS (MWS). Κατασκευάζουμε ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας ψευδο-σύνολο δεδομένων για εκπαίδευση και συντονισμό μοντέλων αξιοποιώντας την ετερογένεια σχολιασμού τριών συνόλων δεδομένων. Στη συνέχεια σχολιάζουμε χειροκίνητα τις προτάσεις δοκιμής 1.500 με αληθινά σχόλια. Τέλος, προτείνουμε τρεις προσεγγίσεις αναφοράς χρησιμοποιώντας τη χρήση ως ανάλυση συστατικών και σήμανση ακολουθίας. Τα πειράματα και η ανάλυση οδηγούν σε πολλά ενδιαφέροντα ευρήματα.', 'hu': 'Hagyományosan a szószegmentáció (WS) az egyszemű formalizmust alkalmazza, ahol egy mondat egyetlen szósorozatnak felel meg. A Sproat és mások (1997) azonban azt mutatják, hogy az anyanyelvűek közötti konzisztencia aránya a kínai szóhatárok között mindössze 76%, ami azt jelzi, hogy az egyszemű WS (SWS) szükségtelen kihívásokat jelent mind a manuális jegyzetelésre, mind a statisztikai modellezésre. Ezenkívül a különböző granulációk WS eredményei kiegészítik és előnyösek lehetnek a magas szintű alkalmazások számára. Ez a munka javaslatot tesz és foglalkozik a többszemű WS (MWS). Nagyléptékű pszeudo MWS adatkészletet építünk modellképzéshez és hangoláshoz a három SWS adatkészlet jegyzetelési heterogenitásának kihasználásával. Ezután manuálisan jegyzetelünk 1500 tesztmondatot valódi MWS jegyzetekkel. Végezetül három benchmark megközelítést javasolunk az MWS öntésével, mint alkotóelemek elemzése és szekvencia címkézése. A kísérletek és elemzések sok érdekes eredményhez vezetnek.', 'mk': 'Традиционално, зборната сегментација (ВС) го усвои единствениот формализам, каде што реченицата одговара на единствена зборна секвенца. Сепак, Спроат и други (1997) покажуваат дека односот на константност на меѓуродниот говорник над кинеските граници на зборовите е само 76 отсто, што индицира дека еднограничен ВС (СВС) наметнува непотребни предизвици за рачната анотација и статистичкото моделирање. Покрај тоа, резултатите на ВС од различни грануларности можат да бидат комплементарни и корисни за апликациите на високо ниво. Оваа работа предлага и се обраќа на мултиграничен WS (MWS). Ние изградуваме голем псевдо MWS датотеки за обука на модели и налаштување со искористување на хетерогенитетот на анотациите на три SWS датотеки. Потоа рачно ги анотираме 1500 тестови реченици со вистински MWS анотации. Finally, we propose three benchmark approaches by casting MWS as constituent parsing and sequence labeling.  Експериментите и анализата водат до многу интересни откритија.', 'lt': 'Tradiciškai žodžių segmentacija (WS) priima vienkartinį formalumą, kai sakinys atitinka vienkartinę žodžių seką. Tačiau Sproat et al. (1997 m.) rodo, kad tarpgimtinių kalbėtojų nuoseklumo santykis virš Kinijos žodžių ribų yra tik 76 %, o tai rodo, kad vienagrūdinis WS (SWS) kelia nereikalingų iššūkių tiek rankiniam anotacijai, tiek statistiniam modeliavimui. Be to, skirtingų granuliarumų WS rezultatai gali būti papildomi ir naudingi aukšto lygio taikymui. Šiame darbe siūloma ir sprendžiama daugiasluoksnių WS (MWS). Mes sukuriame didelio masto pseudo MWS duomenų rinkinį modelių mokymui ir koregavimui, naudodami trijų SWS duomenų rinkinių anotacijų heterogeniškumą. Tada rankiniu būdu anotuojame 1 500 bandymų sakinių su tikromis MWS anotacijomis. Galiausiai siūlome tris lyginamuosius metodus, nustatant MWS kaip sudedamųjų dalių analizę ir sekos ženklinimą. Eksperimentai ir analizė sukelia daug įdomių išvadų.', 'it': "Tradizionalmente, la segmentazione delle parole (WS) adotta il formalismo a grana singola, dove una frase corrisponde a una singola sequenza di parole. Tuttavia, Sproat et al. (1997) mostrano che il rapporto di coerenza tra parlanti nativi rispetto ai confini delle parole cinesi è solo del 76%, indicando che il WS a grana singola (SWS) impone inutili sfide sia per l'annotazione manuale che per la modellazione statistica. Inoltre, i risultati WS di granularità diverse possono essere complementari e utili per applicazioni di alto livello. Questo lavoro propone e affronta WS multi-grained (MWS). Costruiamo un set di dati pseudo MWS su larga scala per la formazione e la messa a punto dei modelli sfruttando l'eterogeneità delle annotazioni di tre set di dati SWS. Poi annotiamo manualmente 1.500 frasi di prova con annotazioni MWS vere. Infine, proponiamo tre approcci di benchmark utilizzando MWS come analisi costituente e etichettatura di sequenza. Esperimenti e analisi portano a molti risultati interessanti.", 'kk': 'Дәстүрлі, сөздің сегментациясы (WS) бір-бір жұлдық формализмін қабылдайды, бұл сөзді бір сөздің ретіне сәйкес келеді. Бірақ Sproat et al. (1997) Қытай сөздер шектерінің арасындағы жергілікті сөйлердің қатынасы ғана 76% - дегенді көрсетеді. Бір жергілікті WS (SWS) қолмен белгілеу және статистикалық моделлеу үшін қажетті мәселелерді қолданып береді. Сонымен қатар, басқа грануляриялардың WS нәтижелері жоғары деңгейіндегі қолданбаларға қосымша және пайдалы болады. Бұл жұмыс көптеген WS (MWS) жұмысын және адрестерін ұсынады. Біз үш SWS деректер қорларының белгілер гетерогенитетін үлкен көлемі псевдо MWS деректер қорларын құрамыз. Содан кейін біз 1,500 сынақ сөздерді MWS жазбаларымен жазып береміз. Соңғы кезде, MWS дегенді бағыттау және реттеу жарлығы ретінде үш бағыттау керектігін ұсынамыз. Тәжірибелер мен анализ көп қызықты тапсырмалар болады.', 'ml': 'സാഹചര്യത്തില്\u200d, വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d (WS) ഒരു കൈക്കൊള്ളുന്ന ഫോര്\u200dമാലിസം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്ക് ഒരു വാക എന്നാലും സ്പ്രോവാറ്റ് എറ്റ് അല്\u200d. (1997) കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് സ്പെരോട്ട് എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നാട്ടിലെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ അതിര്\u200dത്തിയില്\u200d സം വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഗ്രാന്റിയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപകാരമുള്ളതും ആയിരിക്കാം. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പല കൈക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിസ്സിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിനും ട്രെയിങ്ങിനും വേണ്ടി മൂന്ന് SWS ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തിനുമായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ പെസുഡോ  അപ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d 1500 ടെസ്റ്റ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നു. Finally, we propose three benchmark approaches by casting MWS as constituent parsing and sequence labeling.  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും അന്വേഷണങ്ങളും വളരെ രസകരമായ കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Ерөнхийдөө үг загвар (WS) нь нэг жингийн официализмыг ашигладаг. Энэ үг нь нэг үг дарааллыг харьцуулдаг. Гэхдээ Sproat et al. (1997) Хятадын үгийн хязгаарын дотор хэлэгчийн харьцаа нь зөвхөн 76%-ын харьцаа гэдгийг харуулж байна. Нэг тарианы WS (SWS) нь зөвхөн гарын анзаарлын болон статистикийн загварын дотор хэрэггүй сорилт хийдэг. Түүнчлэн, WS-ын үр дүн нь өндөр түвшинд хэрэглэгдэхэд нэмэлтэй болон ашигтай. Энэ ажил олон тарианы WS (MWS) гэдэгт санал өгдөг. Бид загварын сургалт болон тохиромжтой хэмжээнд том хэмжээний MWS өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж, 3 SWS өгөгдлийн сангийн тэгшитгэлийг ашиглана. Тэгээд бид 1,500 шалгалтын өгүүлбэрийг үнэн MWS нээлттэй анзаарах болно. Эцэст нь бид MWS-г тогтмол хуваалцах болон дарааллын тэмдэглэх болон хуваалцах үед гурван арга зам зааж өгдөг. Эмчилгээ болон шинжилгээ олон сонирхолтой ололтууд үүсгэдэг.', 'no': 'Tradisjonelt, ordsegmentasjon (WS) gjev det enkelte formalismen, der eit setning tilsvarar ei enkelt ordsekvens. Sproat et al. (1997) viser imidlertid at forholdet mellom innslagstaler er berre 76% over kinesiske ordgrenser, som viser at enkelgrensene WS (SWS) legger unngåve utfordringar på både manuelt annotasjon og statistisk modellering. I tillegg kan WS-resultatet av ulike granulariser vera komplementar og nyttig for høg nivå-programmer. Dette arbeidet foreslår og adresser fleirkorna WS (MWS). Vi bygger eit stor pseudo- MWS- dataset for modelleopplæring og tuning ved å levera merknaden på heterogeneitet av tre SWS- datasett. Så vi markerer manuelt 1500 testsetningar med sanne MWS- notasjonar. I slutt foreslår vi tre benchmarktilnærmingar ved å kasta MWS som konstituent tolking og sekvensmerkelapp. Eksperiment og analyse fører til mange interessante finning.', 'ro': 'În mod tradițional, segmentarea cuvintelor (WS) adoptă formalismul cu o singură granulă, în cazul în care o propoziție corespunde unei singure secvențe de cuvinte. Cu toate acestea, Sproat et al. (1997) arată că raportul de consistență inter-nativ-vorbitori peste limitele cuvintelor chinezești este de doar 76%, indicând WS cu o singură granulație (SWS) impune provocări inutile atât pentru adnotare manuală, cât și pentru modelarea statistică. Mai mult decât atât, rezultatele WS ale diferitelor granulații pot fi complementare și benefice pentru aplicații de nivel înalt. Această lucrare propune și abordează WS multi-grained (MWS). Construim un set de date pseudo MWS la scară largă pentru instruirea și reglarea modelelor prin valorificarea heterogenității adnotărilor a trei seturi de date SWS. Apoi adnotăm manual 1.500 de propoziții de testare cu adnotări MWS adevărate. În cele din urmă, propunem trei abordări de referință prin turnarea MWS ca analizare constitutivă și etichetare secvențială. Experimentele și analizele duc la multe descoperiri interesante.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjnie segmentacja słów (WS) przyjmuje jednoznaczny formalizm, gdzie zdanie odpowiada jednej sekwencji słów. Sproat et al. (1997) pokazują jednak, że współczynnik spójności między native speakerami na granicach słów chińskich wynosi tylko 76%, wskazując na to, że jednoznaczne WS (SWS) stawia niepotrzebne wyzwania zarówno dla adnotacji ręcznej, jak i modelowania statystycznego. Ponadto wyniki WS o różnych granulacjach mogą być uzupełniające i korzystne dla zastosowań wysokiego poziomu. W niniejszej pracy proponuje się i zajmuje się wieloziarkowym WS (MWS). Budujemy duży zestaw danych pseudo MWS do szkolenia i dostrajania modeli, wykorzystując heterogeniczność adnotacji trzech zbiorów danych SWS. Następnie ręcznie adnotacja 1.500 zdań testowych prawdziwymi adnotacjami MWS. Wreszcie proponujemy trzy podejścia referencyjne, odrzucając MWS jako parsowanie składników i etykietowanie sekwencji. Eksperymenty i analizy prowadzą do wielu ciekawych odkryć.', 'sr': 'Tradicionalno, segmentacija reèi (WS) usvoji jedinstvenog formalizma, gde rečenica odgovara jedinstvenoj reèi. Međutim, Sproat et al. (1997) pokazuje da je odnos međunarodnog govornika konsistencije preko kineskih granica riječi samo 76%, ukazujući na jedinstveno zrno WS (SWS) uvećao nepotrebne izazove na rukovnu annotaciju i statističku modelizaciju. Osim toga, rezultati WS različitih granulacija mogu biti komplementni i korisni za aplikacije visokog nivoa. Ovaj rad predlaže i adresuje višerogenog WS (MWS). Napravili smo veliku pseudosku pseudosku MWS podatke za obuku i prilagodbu model a povećavajući neverogenetnost annotacije tri SWS podataka. Onda ručno annotiramo 1500 test rečenica sa pravim MWS annotacijom. Konačno predlažemo tri pristupa kriteriji bacajući MWS kao sastavno analiziranje i etiketiranje sekvencije. Eksperimenti i analiza vode do mnogo zanimljivih nalaza.', 'so': 'Sida caadiga ah, qeybinta hadalka (WS) wuxuu qaadaa qaab kaliya oo kaliya, kaas oo eray isku mid ah ku habboon. Si kastaba ha ahaatee Sproat et al. (1997) waxay muujiyaan in qaybaha ku saabsan hadalka hooyo-ku hadla ee xuduudaha Shiino uu yahay 76 boqolkiiba oo kaliya, taas oo tusaya WS (SWS) oo keliya ayaa dhibaatooyin aan u baahnayn qofka gacanta ah iyo sameynta takhasuska. Intaas waxaa dheer in WS-ka soo baxa lacag-maalmeedyo kala duduwan ay noqon karaan mid ku adag oo faa’iido leh codsiga heerka sare. Shaqodaas wuxuu soo jeedaa oo ku addeeco WS (MWS). We build a large-scale pseudo MWS dataset for model training and tuning by leveraging the annotation heterogeneity of three SWS datasets.  Markaas waxaynu si rasmi ah ugu baahan nahay 1,500 imtixaan si dhab ah ee MWS. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa saddex meelood oo ay ku soo bandhigtaan MWS oo ah baaritaanka firaaqada iyo imtixaanka dabadeed. Imtixaanka iyo baaritaanka waxa uu ku hogaamiyaa wax badan oo xiiso leh.', 'ms': 'Secara tradisional, segmen perkataan (WS) mengadopsi formalisme berukuran tunggal, di mana kalimat sepadan dengan urutan perkataan tunggal. Namun, Sproat et al. (1997) menunjukkan bahawa nisbah konsistensi inter native-speaker di atas sempadan perkataan Cina hanya 76%, yang menunjukkan WS satu-bijian (SWS) mengakibatkan cabaran yang tidak diperlukan pada kedua-dua anotasi manual dan pemodelan statistik. Selain itu, keputusan WS dari granulariti yang berbeza boleh berkumplimentar dan berguna untuk aplikasi tahap tinggi. Kerja ini melamar dan alamat WS berbilang-benih (MWS). Kami membina set data MWS pseudo skala besar untuk latihan model dan penyesuaian dengan menggunakan heterogeniti anotasi tiga set data SWS. Then we manually annotate 1,500 test sentences with true MWS annotations.  Akhirnya, kami cadangkan tiga pendekatan benchmark dengan melemparkan MWS sebagai penghuraian dan label urutan. Eksperimen dan analisis membawa kepada banyak penemuan yang menarik.', 'mt': 'Tradizzjonalment, is-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem (WS) tadotta l-formaliżmu b’żerriegħa waħda, fejn sentenza tikkorrispondi għal sekwenza ta’ kliem waħda. However, Sproat et al. (1997) show that the inter-native-speaker consistency ratio over Chinese word boundaries is only 76%, indicating single-grained WS (SWS) imposes unnecessary challenges on both manual annotation and statistical modeling.  Moreover, WS results of different granularities can be complementary and beneficial for high-level applications.  Dan ix-xogħol jipproponi u jindirizza WS b’ħafna ħbub (MWS). Aħna nibnu sett tad-dejta psewdo-MWS fuq skala kbira għat-taħriġ u l-a ġġustament tal-mudelli billi ninfurzaw l-eteroġeneità tal-annotazzjoni ta’ tliet settijiet tad-dejta SWS. Imbagħad aħna nnutaw manwalment 1,500 sentenza tat-test b’annotazzjonijiet reali tal-MWS. Fl-aħħar nett, qed nipproponu tliet approċċi referenzjarji billi nikkastjaw l-MWS bħala analiżi kostitwenti u tikkettar tas-sekwenza. L-esperimenti u l-analiżi jwasslu għal ħafna sejbiet interessanti.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විදියටම, වචන සැකස්මය (WS) එක්ක ක්\u200dරීන්ඩ් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට අනුවෙන් වෙනවා, වචන එක්ක වචන සැකසුම් එක නමුත්, Sproit et al. (1997) පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ චීනි වචන සීමාවක් වලින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විතරයි 76% විතරයි, එක-ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් WS තවත්, වෙනස් වෙනස් ග්\u200dරැන්ලුරිසියට WS ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර මේ වැඩේ විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ලිපිනය වෙන්නේ විශාල විශාල වැඩිය WS (MWS). අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් MWS දත්ත සූදානයක් හදන්නේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරේෂණය සහ සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳ ඊට පස්සේ අපි පරීක්ෂා වචන 1500ක් ඇත්ත MWS නිරීක්ෂණය සමඟ පරීක්ෂා කරනවා. අන්තිමේදී, අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා MWS විශාල විශාල පරික්ෂණය සහ පරික්ෂණය ලේබිල් විද පරීක්ෂණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය ගොඩක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'Traditionellt antar ordsegmentering (WS) den enfärgade formalismen, där en mening motsvarar en enda ordsekvens. Sproat et al. (1997) visar dock att konsistensförhållandet mellan infödda talare över kinesiska ordgränser endast är 76%, vilket indikerar att enkelkornig WS (SWS) medför onödiga utmaningar både för manuell notering och statistisk modellering. Dessutom kan WS-resultat av olika granulariteter vara kompletterande och fördelaktiga för tillämpningar på hög nivå. Detta arbete föreslår och behandlar flerkorniga WS (MWS). Vi bygger en storskalig pseudo MWS-datauppsättning för modellutbildning och tuning genom att utnyttja kommenteringsheterogeniteten hos tre SWS-datauppsättningar. Sedan kommenterar vi manuellt 1 500 testmeningar med riktiga MWS-anteckningar. Slutligen föreslår vi tre riktmärken genom att gjuta MWS som komponenttolkning och sekvensmärkning. Experiment och analyser leder till många intressanta fynd.', 'ur': 'پیغمبر، کلمات جدائی (WS) ایک دانہ فرمولیسم کو قبول کرتا ہے، جہاں ایک کلمات ایک کلمات کے پیچھے مطابق ہے. However, Sproat et al. (1997) show that the inter-native-speaker consistency ratio over Chinese word boundaries is only 76%, indicating single grained WS (SWS) imposes unnecessary challenges on both manual annotation and statistical modeling. اور اس کے علاوہ، WS کا نتیجہ مختلف گرانولاریٹوں کے ساتھ اضافہ اور فائدہ اٹھانے کے لئے ہے. یہ کام بہت سی دانے WS (MWS) کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے اور آدرس کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے ایک بڑی اسکیل pseudo MWS ڈیٹ سٹ بنایا ہے تین SWS ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطالعہ اور تنظیم کے لئے۔ پھر ہم 1,500 امتحان جماعتوں کو حقیقی MWS انٹیزونیوں کے ساتھ دکھا دیتے ہیں۔ بالآخر، ہم تین بنچم مارک کے پاس پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، MWS کو کامیٹ پارسینگ اور سطح لابلینگ کے طور پر کاسٹ کر۔ تجربے اور تحلیل بہت سی علاقمند پیدا کرنے کی وجہ سے ہے.', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரிய, வார்த்தை பிரிவு (WS) ஒற்றைப் பிரித்த வடிவமைப்பை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறது, ஒரு வாக்கியம் ஒரு வார்த்தை பொருத்தும However, ஸ்ப்ரூட் et al. (1997) காட்டுகிறது சீன வார்த்தை எல்லைகளில் உள்ள பேச்சாளர் ஒத்திசையான விகிதம் 76%, தனிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட WS (SWS) இரண்டு கைமுறை அறிவிப்பு மற்றும் புள்ளிவ மேலும், வேறு வித்திய சிறப்புகளின் விளைவுகள் உயர்நிலை பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு சிக்கலாம் மற்றும் பயனாக இருக்கலாம். இந்த வேலை பலகைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட WS (MWS) முகவரிக்கிறது. நாம் மாதிரி பயிற்சி மற்றும் பயிற்சிக்கு ஒரு பெரிய அளவு MWS தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மூன்று SWS தரவுத்தளத்தின் வெப் 1500 சோதனைகளை உண்மையான MWS அறிவிப்புடன் கைமுறையாக அறிவிப்போம். இறுதியில், நாம் மூன்று பெங்குருக்கு நெருங்குகளை எம்விஎஸ் பாடல் மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து குறிப்பிட்ட சிட்டியை  Experiments and analysis lead to many interesting findings.', 'uz': "Anʼanaviy, soʻzni ajratish (WS) bir so'z bir so'zga bir necha xizmatga mos keladi. Albatta, Sproat et al. (1997) ko'rsatish mumkin, har xitoycha so'zlar chegarasining o'rtasida bir xitoyl chegarasining qismi 76%, balki bitta qo'llangan WS (SWS) qoʻlbola taʼminlovchi va statistik modelidagi muhim qiymatlarni anglatadi. Ko'rsatilgan, WS boshqa granulatlar natijalari juda murakkablik va yuqori darajadagi dasturlar uchun foydalanishi mumkin. Bu ishni ko'plab qo'llangan WS (MWS) bilan ishlatiladi. Biz uchta SWS maʼlumotlar tarkibini ishlab chiqarish uchun katta Pudo MWS maʼlumot tarkibini yaramiz. Keyin biz 1,500 sinov so'zlarini haqiqiqiy MWS taqdimoti bilan boshqaramiz. Oxirgi, biz MWS'ni tashqarish va cheksiz taʼminlovchisi sifatida o'zgartirish orqali uchta benchmark usullarini talab qilamiz. Experiments and analysis lead to many interesting findings.", 'vi': 'Theo truyền thống, phân đoạn từ (WS) nhận chính thức một phần, nơi câu tương ứng với một chuỗi từ. Tuy nhiên, Sprate et al. (1997) cho thấy tỷ lệ liên kết đối với các diễn giả trên giới hạn từ Trung Quốc chỉ là Cà Name, vì thế hệ số một (SCS) mới tạo ra những thử thách không cần thiết cho cả lịch sử và mô hình thống thống thống. Hơn nữa, kết quả phòng ngừa nhận dạng hạt có thể bổ sung và có lợi cho các ứng dụng cấp cao. Công việc này đề xuất và ám chỉ nhiều tầng WS. Chúng tôi xây dựng một tập tin dựa dẫm gốc MX cỡ lớn cho việc đào tạo và chỉnh bằng cách dùng độ khác nhau của ba bộ dữ liệu SWS. Sau đó ta sẽ tự ghi chú câu thử 1,500 với lịch sử MX thực sự. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi đề xuất ba phương pháp tiêu chuẩn bằng cách chọn MX như phân tích và phân tách dãy số. Thí nghiệm và phân tích dẫn đến nhiều kết quả thú vị.', 'da': 'Traditionelt anvender ordsegmentering (WS) den enkeltkornede formalisme, hvor en sætning svarer til en enkelt ordsekvens. Sproat et al. (1997) viser imidlertid, at konsistensforholdet mellem indfødte talere over kinesiske ordgrænser kun er 76%, hvilket indikerer, at enkeltkornet WS (SWS) stiller unødvendige udfordringer på både manuel annotation og statistisk modellering. Desuden kan WS resultater af forskellige granulariteter være komplementære og gavnlige for applikationer på højt niveau. Dette arbejde foreslår og omhandler multikornet WS (MWS). Vi bygger et stort pseudo MWS datasæt til modeltræning og tuning ved at udnytte annotationsheterogeniteten i tre SWS datasæt. Derefter annoterer vi manuelt 1.500 testsætninger med sande MWS annotationer. Endelig foreslår vi tre benchmark-metoder ved at støbe MWS som komponentanalyse og sekvensmærkning. Eksperimenter og analyser fører til mange interessante resultater.', 'nl': 'Traditioneel neemt woordsegmentatie (WS) het enkelkorrelige formalisme aan, waarbij een zin overeenkomt met een enkele woordreeks. Sproat et al. (1997) laten echter zien dat de consistentieverhouding tussen moedertaalsprekers over Chinese woordgrenzen slechts 76% bedraagt, wat aangeeft dat enkelkorrelige WS (SWS) onnodige uitdagingen oplevert voor zowel handmatige annotatie als statistische modellering. Bovendien kunnen WS-resultaten van verschillende granulariteiten complementair zijn en gunstig zijn voor toepassingen op hoog niveau. Dit werk stelt multi-granined WS (MWS) voor en behandelt deze. We bouwen een grootschalige pseudo MWS dataset voor modeltraining en afstemming door gebruik te maken van de annotatie heterogeniteit van drie SWS datasets. Vervolgens maken we handmatig annotaties van 1.500 testzinnen met echte MWS annotaties. Tot slot stellen we drie benchmarkbenaderingen voor door MWS te casten als component parsing en sequence labeling. Experimenten en analyses leiden tot veel interessante bevindingen.', 'bg': 'Традиционно, словесната сегментация приема еднозърнестия формализъм, където изречение съответства на една последователност от думи. Въпреки това, Sproat и др. (1997) показват, че съотношението на последователност между родните говорещи над границите на китайските думи е само 76%, което показва, че еднозърнестите WS (SWS) налагат ненужни предизвикателства както върху ръчната анотация, така и върху статистическото моделиране. Освен това, резултатите от различни гранулации могат да бъдат допълващи се и полезни за приложения на високо ниво. Настоящата работа предлага и разглежда многозърнести WS (МВС). Изграждаме мащабен псевдо МВС набор от данни за обучение и настройка на моделите чрез използване на анотационната хетерогенност на три набора данни. След това ръчно анотираме 1500 тестови изречения с истински анотации. И накрая, предлагаме три еталонни подхода чрез отливане като съставно анализиране и етикетиране на последователността. Експериментите и анализа водят до много интересни открития.', 'de': 'Traditionell nimmt die Wortsegmentierung (WS) den einfarbigen Formalismus an, bei dem ein Satz einer einzelnen Wortfolge entspricht. Sproat et al. (1997) zeigen jedoch, dass das Konsistenzverhältnis zwischen Muttersprachlern über chinesische Wortgrenzen nur 76% beträgt, was bedeutet, dass Single-Grained WS (SWS) unnötige Herausforderungen sowohl für die manuelle Annotation als auch für die statistische Modellierung darstellt. Darüber hinaus können WS-Ergebnisse unterschiedlicher Granularitäten komplementär und vorteilhaft für Anwendungen auf hohem Niveau sein. In dieser Arbeit werden mehrkörnige WS (MWS) vorgeschlagen und behandelt. Wir bauen einen großen Pseudo-MWS-Datensatz für Modelltraining und -tuning auf, indem wir die Annotationsheterogenität von drei SWS-Datensätzen nutzen. Anschließend kommentieren wir 1.500-Testsätze manuell mit echten MWS-Anmerkungen. Schließlich schlagen wir drei Benchmark-Ansätze vor, indem wir MWS als Component Parsing und Sequence Labeling einsetzen. Experimente und Analysen führen zu vielen interessanten Erkenntnissen.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalno, segmentacija riječi (WS) usvojila je jedinstvenog formalizma, gdje rečenica odgovara jedinstvenoj rečenici. Međutim, Sproat et al. (1997) pokazuje da je odnos konsistencije međunarodnog govornika preko kineskih granica riječi samo 76%, ukazujući na jedinstveno zrno WS (SWS) uvlači nepotrebne izazove na rukovnu annotaciju i statističku modelizaciju. Nadalje, rezultati WS različitih granulacija mogu biti dodatni i korisni za primjene visoke razine. Ovaj rad predlaže i adresira višerogenog WS (MWS). Napravili smo veliku pseudosku pseudosku MWS podatke za obuku i prilagodbu model a, uključujući neverogenetnost annotacije tri SWS podataka. Onda ručno annotiramo 1500 test rečenica s pravim MWS annotacijom. Napokon, predlažemo tri pristupa kriteriji bacajući MWS kao sastavno razmatranje i označavanje sekvencije. Eksperimenti i analiza vode do mnogih zanimljivih nalaza.', 'sw': 'Kihistoria, mchanganyiko wa maneno (WS) unachukua utaratibu wa moja kwa moja, ambapo hukumu inalinganisha na mfululizo wa neno moja. Hata hivyo, Sproat et al. (1997) inaonyesha kuwa mzungumzaji wa asili ya asili ni kiwango kikubwa zaidi ya mipaka ya maneno ya China ni asilimia 76 tu, ikionyesha kuwa WS (SWS) inaweka changamoto zisizo na haja juu ya matangazo ya manufaa na mifano ya takwimu. Zaidi ya hayo, matokeo ya WS yanaweza kuwa ya uungwaji na yenye manufaa kwa matumizi ya juu. This work proposes and addresses multi-grained WS (MWS).  Tunajenga taarifa za MWS kwa kiwango kikubwa kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya mifano na kutuma kwa kutuma upinzani wa taarifa tatu za SWS. Kisha tunatangaza hukumu za majaribio 1500 kwa matangazo ya kweli ya MWS. Mwisho, tunapendekeza mbinu tatu za bendera kwa kutuma MWS kama kitengo cha mabunge na maabara ya mfululizo. Ujaribu na uchambuzi unapelekea matokeo mengi ya kuvutia.', 'fa': 'به طور سنتی، بخش کلمه (WS) فرمولیسم یک دانه را قبول می\u200cکند، جایی که یک جمله به یک دسته کلمه متصل می\u200cشود. با این حال، Sproat et al. (۱۹۹۷) نشان می دهد که نسبت هماهنگی بین حرفه\u200cای که در مرزهای کلمه چین می\u200cگویند فقط 76 درصد است، نشان می\u200cدهد که WS (SWS) تنها یک دانه نیازمند چالش\u200cهای بی\u200cنیاز را بر هر نوشته\u200cی دستی و نمونه\u200cهای آماری قرار می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، نتایج WS از granularities متفاوت می توانند برای کاربردهای سطح بالا اضافه و منافع باشند. این کار پیشنهاد می\u200cکند و آدرس می\u200cکند WS چند دانه (MWS). ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات MWS بسازیم برای آموزش و تنظیم مدل با تأثیر تأثیر تأثیر داده\u200cهای ۳ SWS با تأثیر تأثیر داده\u200cها. سپس به دستی ۱۵۰۰ جمله آزمایش را با توضیح واقعی MWS نشان می دهیم. بالاخره، ما به عنوان برچسب\u200cبندی و برچسب\u200cبندی MWS سه دسترسی برچسب\u200cبندی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cها و تحلیل\u200cها به پیدا\u200cهای بسیار جالب می\u200cرسند.', 'tr': "Adatça, söz segmentasiýasy (WS) ýeke taýdan formalismi kabul edip, bir sözlem ýeke söz sequencesi bilen meňzeýär. Ýöne Sproat et al. (1997) Çinçe sözleri arasynda ýerli sözleri diňe 76%-dir diňe sözleri bilen meňzeş kynçylyklar döwürýär. Bu ýere görkezilýän WS (SWS) her iki eliň sözleri we statistik modellerinde boýunça kynçylyklar çykýar. Ynsakda, WS üýtgeşik granularynyň netijesi ýokary dereje uygulamalar üçin ýeterlik we faydaly bolup biler. Bu işe birnäçe gaty WS (MWS) teklip edip we adresini berýär. Biz örän uly ölçekli pseudo MWS veri setini SWS veri setleriniň dograşlygyny etmäge täzeden edip, örän okuw we düzenlemek üçin örän bir pseudo setini inşa edýäris. Sonra biz 1,500 sany sözleri dogry MWS duýdurmalary bilen elimizden duýdurýarys. Soňunda MWS'i constituent parsing we sequence etiketleme şeklinde 3 benchmark yaklaşmasyny teklip edip görkezip. Denminat we analýusiýa köp gyzykly tapylyga mejbur edýär.", 'af': "Tradisjoneel, woord segmentasie (WS) aanvaar die enkele-graad formalisme, waar 'n seting ooreenstem met 'n enkele woord sekvensie. Maar Sproat et al. (1997) wys dat die inter-native-speaker-konsistensie verhouding oor Sjinese woord grense slegs 76% is, wat indigeer enkel-graad WS (SWS) onnoodsaaklike uitdrukkings op beide manuele annotasie en statistiese modellering. Ook, WS resultate van verskillende granulariteite kan wees komplementaar en voordeel vir hoë vlak toepassings. Hierdie werk voorstel en adresse meerder- graad WS (MWS). Ons bou 'n groot-skaal pseudo MWS datastel vir model onderwerp en tuning deur die annotasie heterogeneeit van drie SWS datastelle te verwyder. Toe het ons manueel 1,500 toets setinge met waar MWS-notasies annoteer. Eindelik, ons voorstel drie benchmark toegang deur MWS as konstituent verwerking en volgorde etiketting te kaseer. Eksperimente en analisie lei na baie interessante vindings.", 'ko': '전통적으로 분사(WS)는 한 문장이 한 단어의 서열에 대응하는 단립도 형식을 채택한다.그러나 Sproat 등(1997)은 중국어 단어 경계상의 모국어자 일치성 비율이 76%에 불과하다고 밝혀 단립도 WS(SWS)가 수동 주석과 통계 모델링에 불필요한 도전을 가져왔다는 것을 보여준다.또한 세분화된 WS 결과는 상호 보완적일 수 있어 고급 응용프로그램에 유리하다.이 작업은 다립도 WS(MWS)를 제시하고 해결했다.세 개의 SWS 데이터 집합의 주석 이구성을 이용하여 우리는 모델 훈련과 조정에 사용되는 대규모 위조 MWS 데이터 집합을 구축했다.그리고 우리는 진짜 MWS 주석으로 1500개의 테스트 문장을 수동으로 주석했다.마지막으로 MWS를 성분 분석과 서열 표기로 전환함으로써 세 가지 기준 테스트 방법을 제시했다.실험과 분석을 통해 많은 재미있는 발견을 얻어냈다.', 'am': 'በባሕላዊው፣ የንግግር ግንኙነት አንዲት ቃላት በተለየ አንዲት ቃላት በሥርዓት የሚታያየው ብሔራዊ ፎርማሌሽን (WS) ይወስዳል፡፡ However, Sproat et al. (1997) show that the inter-native-speaker consistency ratio over Chinese word boundaries is only 76%, indicating single-grained WS (SWS) imposes unnecessary challenges on both manual annotation and statistical modeling.  በተጨማሪም የWS ውጤቶች በተለያዩ አካባቢ እና ለከፍተኛ ደረጃ ፕሮግራሞች የሚጠቅመው ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ሥራ በብዙ ተጨማሪ WS (MWS) ያሳያል፡፡ የሦስት የSWS ዳታተር አካባቢነቱን በመስጠት እና በመስመር ማስተማርና ማቀናጃ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ 1500 የሞከርን ፍርድ እውነተኛ MWS ማስታወቂያ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ ሦስት የbenchmark approaches (MWS) አካባቢ የፓርቲ ማኅበረሰቢያ እና የግንኙነት ማኅበረሰብ በመጥለፍ እና መፍጠርን እናስጀምራለን፡፡ ፈተና እና ማስታወቂያው በብዙ ተማያቂዎች ፍላጎቶችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'az': "Adətli olaraq, söz segmentasiyası (WS) tək dənəli formalismi qəbul edir, və bir söz tək söz seçməsinə uyğun olur. Ancaq Sproat et al. (1997) Çin söz sınırlarının arasındakı inter-native-speaker-consistency ratio yalnız 76%-i göstərir, ki, tək dənəli WS (SWS) hər ikisinin manual annotation və statistik modellərinin istiqamətlərinə müvafiq çətinlikləri qoyur. Daha sonra, müxtəlif granularitlərin WS sonuçları yüksək səviyyə uyğulamalarına uyğunlaşdırılabilir. Bu iş çoxlu dənəli WS (MWS) təklif edir və adresini təbliğ edir. Biz üç SWS veri qurularının çox ölçülü pseudo MWS veri quruluğunu modellərin təhsil etməsi və düzəltməsi üçün yaratdıq. Sonra biz 1.500 sınaq cümlələrini doğru MWS məlumatları ilə bildiririk. Sonunda, MWS'i müəyyən ayırma və sıralama etiketi olaraq üç benchmark yaxınlığına təklif edirik. Həqiqətən, təcrübələr və analizi çox maraqlı tapılara yol verir.", 'hy': 'Հաճախ բառերի սեգմետրացիան (wS) ընդունում է մեկ հատիկ ֆորմալիզմը, որտեղ նախադասությունը համապատասխանում է մեկ բառի հաջորդականությանը: Այնուամենայնիվ, Sprot et al. (1997) ցույց են տալիս, որ չինական բառերի սահմանների միջբնիկ խոսնակների կոնստենցիայի հարաբերակցությունը միայն 76 տոկոս է, ինչը նշանակում է, որ միահատիկ համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգ Ավելին, տարբեր գրանիլարությունների համակարգի արդյունքները կարող են համալրացնել և օգտակար լինել բարձր մակարդակի ծրագրերի համար: Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է և դիտարկում բազմահացած աշխարհային սեղանի (MwS) բազմահացած աշխարհը: We build a large-scale pseudo MWS dataset for model training and tuning by leveraging the annotation heterogeneity of three SWS datasets.  Հետո մենք ձեռքով նշում ենք 1,500 փորձարկման նախադասություն իրական MW-ի նշումներով: Վերջապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք երեք համեմատային մոտեցումներ MW-ի որպես բաղադրիչ վերլուծում և հաջորդականության պիտակ գտնելով: Փորձերը և վերլուծությունը հանգեցնում են շատ հետաքրքիր հայտնաբերությունների:', 'bs': 'Tradicionalno, segmentacija riječi (WS) usvojava jednorogenog formalizma, gdje rečenica odgovara jednoj rečenici. Međutim, Sproat et al. (1997) pokazuje da je odnos međunarodnog govornika konsistencije preko kineskih granica riječi samo 76%, ukazujući na jedinstveno zrno WS (SWS) uvećao nepotrebne izazove na rukovnu annotaciju i statističku modelizaciju. Osim toga, rezultati WS različitih granulacija mogu biti komplementni i korisni za aplikacije visokog nivoa. Ovaj rad predlaže i adresuje višerogenog WS (MWS). Napravili smo veliku pseudosku pseudosku MWS podatke za obuku i prilagodbu model a uvećanjem heterogenetstva annotacije tri SWS podataka. Onda ručno annotiramo 1500 test rečenica sa pravim MWS annotacijom. Konačno predlažemo tri pristupa kriteriji bacajući MWS kao sastavno analiziranje i etiketiranje sekvencije. Eksperimenti i analiza vode do mnogo zanimljivih nalaza.', 'bn': 'ঐতিহ্যবাহীতভাবে শব্দ বিভক্তির (উইউ এস) একক গ্রেপ্তারিত ফরমালিজমেন্ট গ্রহণ করে, যেখানে একটি বাক্যের সাথে একটি শব্দের সংখ্ তবে স্প্রোয়াট এবং আল. (১৯৭) দেখাচ্ছে যে চীনা শব্দের সীমানার মধ্যে স্প্রোয়াট এবং স্প্রোয়াটারের মধ্যে স্পিকেট-ভাষাকারীর সীমানার সীমান্তের সীমান্তের সংশোধনে Moreover, WS results of different granularities can be complementary and beneficial for high-level applications.  এই কাজের প্রস্তাব এবং অনেক গ্রেফতারিত উইএস (এমডিউএস) ঠিকানা প্রস্তাব করে। আমরা তিনটি এসওয়াইএস ডাটাসেটের বিস্তারিত উজ্জ্বলতা প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ এবং ট্রেনিং এর জন্য একটি বিশাল পর্যায়ে এমডাউএস তারপর আমরা নিজেদের হাতে ১৫০০ টেস্টের শাস্তি প্রকাশ করি সত্যিকার MWS বিবৃতি দিয়ে। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা এমডিউএস পার্সিং এবং সেকেন্ড লেবেলিং হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করে তিনটি বেনম্যার্কের প্রস্তাব করি। Experiments and analysis lead to many interesting findings.', 'id': 'Traditionally, word segmentation (WS) adopts the single-grained formalism, where a sentence corresponds to a single word sequence.  Namun, Sproat et al. (1997) menunjukkan bahwa nisbah konsistensi inter native-speaker di atas perbatasan kata Cina hanya 76%, menunjukkan satu-grain WS (SWS) mengakibatkan tantangan yang tidak diperlukan pada annotasi manual dan model statistik. Selain itu, hasil WS dari granularitas yang berbeda dapat menjadi komplementari dan berguna untuk aplikasi tingkat tinggi. Pekerjaan ini mengusulkan dan mengatasi WS multi-grain (MWS). Kami membangun dataset MWS pseudo skala besar untuk latihan model dan tuning dengan menggunakan anotasi heterogeneity dari tiga dataset SWS. Kemudian kita secara manual anotasi 1.500 kalimat tes dengan anotasi MWS yang benar. Akhirnya, kami mengusulkan tiga pendekatan benchmark dengan melemparkan MWS sebagai penghuraian konstituen dan label urutan. Eksperimen dan analisis membawa ke banyak penemuan menarik.', 'sq': 'Tradicional, word segmentation (WS) adopts the single-grained formalism, where a sentence corresponds to a single word sequence. Megjithatë, Sproat et al. (1997) tregojnë se raporti i konsistencës ndërkombëtare-folëse mbi kufijtë e fjalëve kineze është vetëm 76%, duke treguar se WS me një kokërr (SWS) imponon sfida të panevojshme si në anotacionin manual ashtu edhe në modelimin statistik. Përveç kësaj, rezultatet e WS të granulariteteve të ndryshme mund të jenë komplementare dhe të dobishme për aplikimet e nivelit të lartë. Ky punë propozon dhe trajton WS me shumë kokrra (MWS). We build a large-scale pseudo MWS dataset for model training and tuning by leveraging the annotation heterogeneity of three SWS datasets.  Pastaj anotojmë me dorë 1,500 fjalë testimi me anotacione të vërteta MWS. Më në fund, ne propozojmë tre metoda referuese duke hedhur MWS si analizim përbërës dhe etiketë sekuence. Eksperimentet dhe analizat shpien në shumë gjetje interesante.', 'ca': "Tradicionalment, la segmentació de paraules (WS) adopta el formalisme de graus únics, on una frase correspon a una seqüència de paraules únices. Tot i així, Sproat et al. (1997) mostran que la proporció de consistencia entre parlants indígenas sobre els límits de paraules xineses només és és del 76%, indicant que WS d'un grau (SWS) imposa desafiaments innecessaris tant a l'anotació manual com a la modelació estadística. A més, els resultats dels WS de diferents granularitats poden ser complementars i beneficiosos per aplicacions d'alt nivell. Aquesta feina proposa i aborda WS multigranulat (MWS). Construim un conjunt de dades pseudo MWS a gran escala per a formar i ajustar models aprofitant la heterogeneitat d'anotació de tres conjunts de dades SWS. Llavors anotem manualment 1.500 frases de prova amb anotacions MWS veritables. Finalment, proposem tres enfocaments de referència posant MWS com a components d'analització i etiqueta de seqüència. Els experiments i l'anàlisi porten a molts descobriments interessants.", 'cs': 'Tradičně slovní segmentace (WS) přijímá jednozrnný formalismus, kdy věta odpovídá jednomu slovnímu posloupnosti. Nicméně Sproat et al. (1997) ukazují, že poměr konzistence mezi rodilými mluvčími přes hranice čínských slov je pouze 76%, naznačující, že jednozrnný WS (SWS) představuje zbytečné výzvy jak pro manuální anotaci, tak pro statistické modelování. Výsledky WS s různými granulacemi se navíc mohou doplňovat a přispívat k vysokým úrovním aplikací. Tato práce navrhuje a řeší vícezrnné WS (MWS). Vytváříme rozsáhlou pseudo MWS datovou sadu pro trénink a ladění modelů využitím anotace heterogenity tří SWS datových sad. Pak ručně anotujeme 1.500 testovací věty pravými MWS anotacemi. V závěru navrhujeme tři benchmarkové přístupy pomocí metody MWS jako součástkové parsování a sekvenční značení. Experimenty a analýza vedou k mnoha zajímavým poznatkům.', 'et': 'Traditsiooniliselt võtab sõnasegmentatsioon (WS) kasutusele üheteralise formaalsuse, kus lause vastab ühele sõnasjärjestusele. Sproat jt (1997) näitavad siiski, et emakeelena kõnelejate vaheline sidususe suhe hiina sõnapiiridel on vaid 76%, mis näitab, et üheteraline WS (SWS) tekitab tarbetuid probleeme nii käsitsi annoteerimisele kui ka statistilisele modelleerimisele. Lisaks võivad erinevate graanulite WS tulemused olla täiendavad ja kasulikud kõrgetasemeliste rakenduste puhul. Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja ja käsitletakse mitme teralise WS (MWS). Me ehitame mudelite koolitamiseks ja häälestamiseks suuremahulise pseudoMWS andmekogumi, kasutades kolme SWS andmekogumi annotatsiooniheterogeensust. Seejärel märgistame käsitsi 1500 testilauset tõeliste MWS märkustega. Lõpuks pakume välja kolm võrdlusmeetodit, valades MWS komponentide parsimiseks ja järjestuse märgistamiseks. Katsed ja analüüsid viivad paljude huvitavate avastusteni.', 'fi': 'Perinteisesti sanasegmentointi (WS) omaksuu yksirakeisen formalismin, jossa lause vastaa yhtä sanajärjestystä. Sproat et al. (1997) osoittavat kuitenkin, että natiivipuhujien välinen johdonmukaisuussuhde kiinalaisten sanarajojen yli on vain 76%, mikä osoittaa, että yksirakeinen WS (SWS) asettaa tarpeettomia haasteita sekä manuaaliseen merkintöihin että tilastolliseen mallinnukseen. Lisäksi WS-tulokset eri rakeisuuksista voivat olla täydentäviä ja hyödyllisiä korkean tason sovelluksissa. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan ja käsitellään monirakeisia WS (MWS). Rakennamme suuren mittakaavan pseudoMWS-aineiston mallikoulutukseen ja viritykseen hyödyntämällä kolmen SWS-aineiston merkintäheterogeenisyyttä. Sitten teemme 1 500 testilausetta manuaalisesti oikeilla MWS-huomautuksilla. Lopuksi ehdotamme kolmea vertailumenetelmää valamalla MWS komponentin jäsentämiseksi ja sekvenssimerkinnäksi. Kokeet ja analyysit johtavat moniin mielenkiintoisiin löydöksiin.', 'jv': 'Text segmentation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Label Wurusi iki eraus karo alamat tresnane WS karo akeh gris Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem podho karo akeh-kalalah psepsepsepsepsepsepsepsepsepsepseuds" kanggo ngilangno nggawe modèl tukong lan tuning nggawe jané perusahaan kelangan karo telu sWS dataset. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Fine Gebudhakan karo hales dadi akèh sing sampeyan akeh sing nariyan.', 'he': 'באופן מסורתי, מחלקת המילים (WS) מאמצת את הפורמליזם היחיד, שבו משפט מתאים לרצף מילים אחד. בכל אופן, Sproat et al. (1997) מראה כי יחסי התקבלות בין דוברים-מקומיים מעל גבולות מילים סיניים הוא רק 76%, המצביע על WS חד-גרעין (SWS) מכריח אתגרים בלתי הכרחיים על כתובת ידנית וגם מודל סטטיסטי. חוץ מזה, תוצאות WS של גרניליות שונות יכולות להיות תוספות ותועלת לתוכניות ברמה גבוהה. העבודה הזאת מציעה וכתובת WS מורכבת (MWS). אנו בונים קבוצת מידע MWS בסולם גדול לאימוני מודל ולהתרגיל על ידי השתמש בהטרוגניות הערות של שלושה קבוצות מידע SWS. ואז אנו מציינים באופן ידני 1500 משפטים מבחן עם ציונים אמיתיים MWS. סוף סוף, אנו מציעים שלושה גישות רנטרל על ידי טיפול MWS כמחקר קבוצתי ותווית רצף. ניסויים וניתוח מובילים למציאות מעניינות רבות.', 'sk': 'Tradicionalno segmentacija besed (WS) sprejema enozrnat formalizem, kjer stavek ustreza enemu zaporedju besed. Vendar pa Sproat et al. (1997) kažejo, da je razmerje doslednosti med maternimi govorci preko kitajskih besednih meja le 76%, kar kaže, da enozrnata WS (SWS) nalaga nepotrebne izzive tako ročnemu označevanju kot statističnemu modeliranju. Poleg tega so rezultati WS različnih granulacij lahko dopolnilni in koristni za uporabo na visoki ravni. To delo predlaga in obravnava večzrnate WS (MWS). Zgradimo obsežen psevdo MWS podatkovni niz za usposabljanje in uglaševanje modelov z izkoriščanjem heterogenosti opomb treh SWS podatkovnih nizov. Nato ročno označimo 1500 preskusnih stavkov z resničnimi označbami MWS. Nazadnje predlagamo tri referenčne pristope z litjem MWS kot sestavno razčlenjevanje in označevanje zaporedja. Eksperimenti in analize vodijo do številnih zanimivih ugotovitev.', 'ha': "Kitraditionn, segment of word (WS) na ɗauki formalism na dam guda, inda maganar ta daidai da wata kalma. A lokacin da aka nuna, salon da ke cikin mai faɗa guda-native, yana da rabo mai daidaita a tsakanin maganar China kawai, yana da 76%, kuma yana gaya wa WS (SWS) ya sanya muhimmada wanda ba'a so ba da amfani ba a kan zane-zane da kuma motsarin statistical. Da haka, matsalar WS na dabam-dabam kan ya kasance masu kamfata da amfani ga shiryoyin ayuka masu tsawo. Wannan aikin yana ƙarfafa da kuma yana shiryarwa WS masu yawa wanda aka riƙe (MWS). Tuna samar da tsarin mutane masu girma na MWS wa masallaci na shirin misalin sami da za'a gaura hoteogenity of data sau SWS. Sa'an nan za mu taɓa da cire 1000 na jarrabo da gaskiya na MWS. Gani, za mu buɗa matsayi uku da za'a jẽfa MWS kamar parse da matsayi. Fijarati da Ana ƙara zuwa matsayin mãsu yawa.", 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་ཚིག་སྒྲུང་གི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་(WS)ལ་ཚིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་གཅིག་གི་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། Sproat et al. (1997)ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཅིག་པུ་76% ཡིན་པ་དང་། སྒྲ་སྐད་གཅིག་པའི་WS(SWS)ནང་དུ་ལག་ཐོག ད་དུང་། ཉེན་རིས་བྱ་རིམ་མི་འདྲ་བར་བསྡུར་བ་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་སྤྱོད་ཚད་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཡིན། ལས་ཀ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྒེར་གྱི་WS(MWS)དང་ཁ་བྱང་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We build a large-scale pseudo MWS dataset for model training and tuning by leveraging the annotation heterogeneity of three SWS datasets. དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་བདེན་པའི་MWS་སྟོན་ཚོགས་ལྡན་པའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་༡༥༠་ལག་སྟར་གཏོང་གི་ཡོད། Finally, we propose three benchmark approaches by casting MWS as constituent parsing and sequence labeling. ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་དང་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནི་སྐྱེས་ཚོད་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Do n’t Throw Those Morphological Analyzers Away Just Yet : Neural Morphological Disambiguation for Arabic', 'ar': 'لا تتخلص من هذه المحللات الصرفية بعد: توضيح مورفولوجي عصبي للغة العربية', 'fr': "Ne jetez pas encore ces analyseurs morphologiques\xa0: désambiguïsation morphologique neuronale pour l'arabe", 'pt': 'Não jogue fora esses analisadores morfológicos ainda: desambiguação morfológica neural para árabe', 'es': 'No tire esos analizadores morfológicos todavía: desambiguación morfológica neuronal para el árabe', 'ja': 'アラビア語のための神経形態学的な曖昧さ', 'zh': '勿弃其形分析器:阿拉伯语神经消歧义', 'hi': 'उन रूपात्मक विश्लेषकों को अभी तक दूर मत फेंको: अरबी के लिए तंत्रिका रूपात्मक बहुविकल्पी', 'ru': 'Не выбрасывайте эти морфологические анализаторы пока: нейронная морфологическая дезагрегация для арабского языка', 'ga': 'Ná Caith Na hAnailíseoirí Moirfeolaíocha Sin Amach Fós Fós: Dí-athbhrí Néar-mhirfeolaíocha don Araibis', 'ka': 'არ გადატანა ამ მორფოლოგიური ანალიზერების გარეშე მაგრამ: ნეიროლური მორფოლოგიური განამბიგუაცია არაბულისთვის', 'el': 'Μην πετάτε αυτούς τους μορφολογικούς αναλυτές μακριά ακριβώς ακόμα: Νευρική μορφολογική αποσαφήνιση για τα αραβικά', 'hu': 'Ne dobd el azokat a morfológiai elemzőket még: Neural Morphological Disambiguation for Arab', 'lt': 'Netrukus neišmeskite t ų morfologinių analizatorių:', 'it': "Non buttare via quegli analizzatori morfologici: Disambiguazione morfologica neurale per l'arabo", 'kk': 'Бұл морфологикалық анализерлерді әлі қалдырмасын: Араб үшін нейрондық морфологикалық дембигациясы', 'mk': 'Не ги фрлајте тие морфолошки анализатори веднаш: неврална морфолошка дебабигуација за арапски', 'ms': "Don't Throw Those Morphological Analyzers Away Just Yet: Neural Morphological Disambiguation for Arabic", 'mt': 'Twarrakx lil Dawk l-Analizzaturi Morfoloġiċi Għad: Diżambigwazzjoni Morfoloġika Newrali għall-Għarab', 'ml': 'ആ മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായിക്കുന്നവരെ എറിഞ്ഞുകളയരുത് ഇപ്പോഴും തന്നെ', 'mn': 'Битгий тэдгээр морфологик шинжилгээчдийг алга болгохгүй л дээ: Арабын сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөл', 'no': 'Ikkje fjern desse morfologiske analyserane vekk berre enno: Neurale morfologiske disambiguasjon for arabisk', 'pl': 'Nie wyrzucaj jeszcze tych analizatorów morfologicznych: Neural Morfological Disambiguation for Arabic', 'ro': 'Nu arunca aceste analizoare morfologice departe încă: dezambiguizare morfologică neurală pentru arabă', 'sr': 'Ne bacite te morfološke analizatore dalje, još uvijek: neurološka morfološka disambiguacija za arapski', 'si': 'ඒ මොර්ෆෝලික විශ්ලේෂකයෝ දාලා යන්න එපා.', 'so': "Don't Throw Those Morphological Analyzers Away Just Yet: Neural Morphological Disambiguation for Arabic", 'ta': 'அந்த ஆராய்ந்த ஆராய்ச்சிப்பாளர்களை வெளியே எறிய வேண்டாம் இன்னும் இன்னும்: அரேபிய காரணத்திற்கான நியூகமான மா', 'sv': 'Kasta inte bort dessa morfologiska analysatorer ännu: Neural morfologisk disambiguation för arabiska', 'ur': 'اُن مورفولوژیک تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو ہٹا نہ ڈالو، اگرچہ عربی کے لئے عصبی مورفولوژیکی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر', 'uz': "Ushbu Morfologik analyzerlarni o'chirib tashlaning emas. Lekin ham: Arab uchun Neural Morfological Disambiguation", 'vi': 'Đừng vứt đi những nhà phân t ích Morphological chỉ là một biến biến biến đổi thần kinh bằng tiếng Ả Rập.', 'da': 'Smid ikke disse morfologiske analysatorer væk lige endnu: Neural morfologisk disambiguation for arabisk', 'bg': 'Не изхвърляйте тези морфологични анализатори все още: неврална морфологична дисамбигация за арабски език', 'hr': 'Nemojte baciti te morfološke analizatore dalje samo još: neurološka morfološka disambiguacija za arapski', 'nl': 'Gooi die morfologische analysatoren nog niet weg: Neurale morfologische disambiguatie voor Arabisch', 'id': 'Jangan Lemparkan Analisasi Morfologi-nya Belum lagi: Pengambiguasi Morfologi Neural untuk Arab', 'de': 'Werfen Sie diese morphologischen Analysatoren noch nicht weg: Neurale morphologische Disambiguation für Arabisch', 'sw': 'Usitumie wale wachambuzi wa Kimorphological Away Just Bado: Utanganyifu wa Kimorphological kwa Kiarabu', 'fa': 'این تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cهای مورفیولوژیکی را در حال حاضر بیرون نکنید: ناپدید شدن مورفیولوژیکی عصبی برای عربی', 'tr': 'Morfolojik analýzçylary entäk terk etme', 'af': 'Moenie daardie morfologiese analiseerders weggooi Net Nog: Neurale morfologiese ontwikkeling vir Arabske', 'sq': 'Mos i hedh këta analizues morfologjikë larg ende: Zhdukje neurologjike morfologjike për arabisht', 'ko': '당분간 그런 형태학 분석기: 아랍어의 신경 형태학적 분열을 버리지 마라', 'am': 'እነዚህን የሞርፎሎጂ Analyzer ተለይተው ግን አትጣሉ፤ የኒውራዊ ሞርፎሎጂ ሽብር ለአረብኛ', 'hy': 'Մի նետեք այդ մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծությունները դեռևս: Արաբական լեզվով նյարդային մորֆոլոգիական բացահայտությունը', 'az': 'Bu Morfolojik Analizatçıları Daha öncə fırlatma: Nöral Morfolojik Qısqa Arapça', 'ca': "No deixeu fora aquests analitzadors morfològics encara mateix: Desambiguació morfològica neuronal per a l'àrab", 'bn': 'এই মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষকদের দূরে নিক্ষেপ করবেন না এখনও: আরবীর জন্য নিউরেল মরোফোলজিক্যাল বিভ্রান্ত', 'bs': 'Nemoj baciti te morfološke analizatore daleko, još uvijek: neurološka morfološka disambiguacija za arapski', 'cs': 'Nezahazujte tyto morfologické analyzátory ještě pryč: Neurální morfologické disambiguace pro arabštinu', 'fi': 'Älä heitä noita morfologisia analysaattoreita pois juuri vielä: neuraalinen morfologinen disambiguaatio arabialle', 'et': 'Ärge visake neid morfoloogilisi analüsaatoreid veel minema: neuraalne morfoloogiline disambiguatsioon araabia keele jaoks', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'Kada ku jẽfa The Motfological Analysars Away Kuna: Neural morfological Disambition for Arabic', 'he': 'אל תזרוק את הניתוחים המורפולוגיים הללו רק עוד:', 'sk': 'Ne zavrzite teh morfoloških analizatorjev še zdaj stran: živčna morfološka razpoka za arabščino', 'bo': 'ཁོང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་མཁན་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟ་བྱེད་མ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a model for Arabic morphological disambiguation based on Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). We train Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) cells in several configurations and embedding levels to model the various morphological features. Our experiments show that these models outperform state-of-the-art systems without explicit use of feature engineering. However, adding learning features from a morphological analyzer to model the space of possible analyses provides additional improvement. We make use of the resulting morphological models for scoring and ranking the analyses of the morphological analyzer for morphological disambiguation. The results show significant gains in accuracy across several evaluation metrics. Our system results in 4.4 % absolute increase over the state-of-the-art in full morphological analysis accuracy (30.6 % relative error reduction), and 10.6 % (31.5 % relative error reduction) for out-of-vocabulary words.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا للتوضيح الصرفي للغة العربية بناءً على الشبكات العصبية المتكررة (RNN). نقوم بتدريب خلايا الذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM) في العديد من التكوينات ومستويات التضمين لنمذجة الميزات المورفولوجية المختلفة. تُظهر تجاربنا أن هذه النماذج تتفوق في الأداء على أحدث الأنظمة دون استخدام صريح لهندسة الميزات. ومع ذلك ، فإن إضافة ميزات التعلم من محلل صرفي لنمذجة مساحة التحليلات الممكنة يوفر تحسينًا إضافيًا. نحن نستفيد من النماذج المورفولوجية الناتجة لتسجيل درجات وتصنيف تحليلات المحلل المورفولوجي من أجل توضيح الغموض المورفولوجي. تظهر النتائج مكاسب كبيرة في الدقة عبر العديد من مقاييس التقييم. ينتج عن نظامنا زيادة مطلقة بنسبة 4.4٪ على أحدث التقنيات في دقة التحليل الصرفي الكاملة (30.6٪ تقليل الخطأ النسبي) ، و 10.6٪ (31.5٪ تقليل الخطأ النسبي) للكلمات خارج المفردات.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un modèle de désambiguïsation morphologique arabe basé sur les réseaux de neurones récurrents (RNN). Nous entraînons des cellules de mémoire à long terme (LSTM) dans plusieurs configurations et niveaux d'intégration afin de modéliser les différentes caractéristiques morphologiques. Nos expériences montrent que ces modèles surpassent les systèmes de pointe sans recours explicite à l'ingénierie des caractéristiques. Cependant, l'ajout de fonctionnalités d'apprentissage provenant d'un analyseur morphologique pour modéliser l'espace des analyses possibles apporte une amélioration supplémentaire. Nous utilisons les modèles morphologiques résultants pour noter et classer les analyses de l'analyseur morphologique en vue de la désambiguïsation morphologique. Les résultats montrent des gains significatifs en termes de précision pour plusieurs mesures d'évaluation. Notre système se traduit par une augmentation absolue de 4,4\xa0% par rapport à l'état actuel de la précision de l'analyse morphologique complète (réduction de 30,6\xa0% de l'erreur relative) et de 10,6\xa0% (réduction de l'erreur relative de 31,5\xa0%) pour les mots hors vocabulaire.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um modelo para desambiguação morfológica árabe baseado em Redes Neurais Recorrentes (RNN). Treinamos células de Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) em várias configurações e níveis de incorporação para modelar as várias características morfológicas. Nossos experimentos mostram que esses modelos superam os sistemas de última geração sem o uso explícito de engenharia de recursos. No entanto, adicionar recursos de aprendizado de um analisador morfológico para modelar o espaço de possíveis análises fornece melhorias adicionais. Utilizamos os modelos morfológicos resultantes para pontuar e classificar as análises do analisador morfológico para desambiguação morfológica. Os resultados mostram ganhos significativos de precisão em várias métricas de avaliação. Nosso sistema resulta em um aumento absoluto de 4,4% sobre o estado da arte na acurácia total da análise morfológica (30,6% de redução de erro relativo) e 10,6% (31,5% de redução de erro relativo) para palavras fora do vocabulário.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un modelo para la desambiguación morfológica árabe basado en redes neuronales recurrentes (RNN). Entrenamos células de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM) en varias configuraciones y niveles de incrustación para modelar las diversas características morfológicas. Nuestros experimentos muestran que estos modelos superan a los sistemas de última generación sin el uso explícito de la ingeniería de funciones. Sin embargo, la adición de funciones de aprendizaje de un analizador morfológico para modelar el espacio de posibles análisis proporciona una mejora adicional. Utilizamos los modelos morfológicos resultantes para puntuar y clasificar los análisis del analizador morfológico para la desambiguación morfológica. Los resultados muestran mejoras significativas en la precisión en varias métricas de evaluación. Nuestro sistema da como resultado un aumento absoluto del 4,4% con respecto al estado de la técnica en la precisión total del análisis morfológico (reducción del error relativo del 30,6%) y del 10,6% (reducción del error relativo del 31,5%) para las palabras fuera del vocabulario.', 'ja': '本論文は、再発性ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）に基づくアラビア語の形態曖昧化のモデルを提示する。長期記憶（ LSTM ）細胞をいくつかの構成と埋め込みレベルで訓練し、様々な形態学的特徴をモデル化します。当社の実験によると、これらのモデルは、機能工学を明示的に使用せずに、最先端のシステムを上回る性能を発揮することが示されています。しかしながら、可能な分析の空間をモデル化するために形態学的分析器から学習機能を追加することは、さらなる改善を提供する。私たちは、結果として得られた形態モデルを利用して、形態解析器の分析をスコアリングし、ランク付けして、形態の曖昧さを解消します。この結果は、いくつかの評価指標にわたって、正確性の大幅な向上を示しています。我々のシステムは、完全な形態解析精度において、最先端のものよりも絶対的に4.4 ％増加し（相対的誤差低減30.6 ％ ）、語彙外の単語では10.6 ％ （相対的誤差低減31.5 ％ ）をもたらします。', 'zh': '本文立一递归神经网络(RNN)阿拉伯语形消歧义模。 数种配嵌长短期记(LSTM)细胞,以拟诸形。 臣等实验明,未明征役,优于先进之统。 然从形分析器添学特征建模可供额外改进。 吾因其所生而评分之,以消形态学歧义。 结果显示,于数评指标中,准确性显进。 全形析准确性(差减于至30.6%),4.4%于至进,词汇外单词于至10.6%(,31.5%)于下。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (RNN) के आधार पर अरबी रूपात्मक बहुविकल्पी के लिए एक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है। हम विभिन्न रूपात्मक विशेषताओं को मॉडल करने के लिए कई कॉन्फ़िगरेशन और एम्बेडिंग स्तरों में लंबी अल्पकालिक मेमोरी (एलएसटीएम) कोशिकाओं को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि ये मॉडल फीचर इंजीनियरिंग के स्पष्ट उपयोग के बिना अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों से आगे निकल जाते हैं। हालांकि, संभावित विश्लेषणों के स्थान को मॉडल करने के लिए एक रूपात्मक विश्लेषक से सीखने की सुविधाओं को जोड़ना अतिरिक्त सुधार प्रदान करता है। हम रूपात्मक बहुविकल्पी के लिए रूपात्मक विश्लेषक के विश्लेषण को स्कोर करने और रैंकिंग करने के लिए परिणामी रूपात्मक मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं। परिणाम कई मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स में सटीकता में महत्वपूर्ण लाभ दिखाते हैं। हमारे सिस्टम के परिणामस्वरूप पूर्ण रूपात्मक विश्लेषण सटीकता (30.6% सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी) में अत्याधुनिक पर 4.4% पूर्ण वृद्धि होती है, और आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली शब्दों के लिए 10.6% (31.5% सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी) होती है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлена модель арабской морфологической дезамбигментации на основе рекуррентных нейронных сетей (RNN). Мы обучаем клетки Длинной Краткосрочной Памяти (LSTM) в нескольких конфигурациях и уровнях встраивания для того чтобы смоделировать различные морфологические характеристики. Наши эксперименты показывают, что эти модели превосходят современные системы без явного использования функциональной инженерии. Тем не менее, добавление признаков обучения из морфологического анализатора для моделирования пространства возможных анализов обеспечивает дополнительное улучшение. Мы используем полученные морфологические модели для оценки и ранжирования анализов морфологического анализатора для морфологической дезамбигуляции. Результаты показывают значительное повышение точности по нескольким показателям оценки. Наша система приводит к абсолютному увеличению на 4,4% по сравнению с современным уровнем точности полного морфологического анализа (уменьшение относительной ошибки на 30,6%) и на 10,6% (уменьшение относительной ошибки на 31,5%) для слов, не входящих в словарь.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo múnla i láthair le haghaidh dí-athbhrí moirfeolaíocha Araibis bunaithe ar Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha (RNN). Cuirimid oiliúint ar chealla Cuimhne Fadtéarmach Gearrthéarmach (LSTM) i roinnt cumraíochtaí agus leibhéil leabaithe chun na gnéithe moirfeolaíocha éagsúla a shamhaltú. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn na samhlacha seo na córais nua-aimseartha gan úsáid shainráite a bhaint as gné-innealtóireacht. Mar sin féin, cuirtear feabhas breise ar fáil trí ghnéithe foghlama ó anailísí moirfeolaíocha a chur leis an spás anailísí féideartha. Bainimid úsáid as na samhlacha moirfeolaíocha a eascraíonn as seo chun anailísí an anailísí moirfeolaíocha a scóráil agus a rangú le haghaidh dí-athbhrí moirfeolaíocha. Léiríonn na torthaí gnóthachain shuntasacha i gcruinneas thar roinnt méadracht mheastóireachta. Is é an toradh atá ar ár gcóras ná 4.4% de mhéadú absalóideach ar chruinneas anailíse moirfeolaíoch iomlán (laghdú earráide coibhneasta 30.6%), agus 10.6% (laghdú earráide coibhneasta 31.5%) d’fhocail as-focal.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აპაბიური მორპოლოგიური განამბიგუაციისთვის მოდელია, რომელიც განვითარებული ნეიროლური ქსელები (RNN) დაბაზიან. ჩვენ მრავალი კონფიგურაციაში და სხვადასხვა მოპოროლოგიური ფუნქციების მოდელისთვის ძირითადი მარცხნის მეხსიერება (LSTM) კონფიგურაციაში და სხვადასხვა ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ ეს მოდელები გავაკეთებენ სისტემის განმავლობას, რომელიც არ გამოყენებენ ფუნქციების ინეზინერიციას. მაგრამ, მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზერიდან სწავლების ფუნქციების დამატება შესაძლებელი ანალიზების მსოფლიოს მოდელეში დამატება დამატება. ჩვენ მომპოროლოგიური მოდელეების გამოყენება მოპოროლოგიური განსხვავებაში მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზატორის ანალიზაციების გამოყენება. წარმოდგენები მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენება რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებული მეტრიკაში. ჩვენი სისტემის შემდეგ 4.4% აბსოლოგიური გაზრდება მოპროლოგიური ანალიზაციის წარმატებით (30.6% შემდეგ შეცდომის შემდეგ) და 10.6% (31.5% შემდეგ შეცდომის შემდეგ) სიტყვების გარეშე.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα μοντέλο αραβικής μορφολογικής αποσαφήνισης με βάση τα Επαναλαμβανόμενα Νευρικά Δίκτυα (RNN). Εκπαιδεύουμε κύτταρα μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης (σε διάφορες διαμορφώσεις και επίπεδα ενσωμάτωσης για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τα διάφορα μορφολογικά χαρακτηριστικά. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι αυτά τα μοντέλα ξεπερνούν τα σύγχρονα συστήματα χωρίς ρητή χρήση της μηχανικής χαρακτηριστικών. Ωστόσο, η προσθήκη μαθησιακών χαρακτηριστικών από έναν μορφολογικό αναλυτή για τη μοντελοποίηση του χώρου των πιθανών αναλύσεων παρέχει πρόσθετη βελτίωση. Χρησιμοποιούμε τα προκύπτουσα μορφολογικά μοντέλα για την βαθμολόγηση και ταξινόμηση των αναλύσεων του μορφολογικού αναλυτή για μορφολογική αποσαφήνιση. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν σημαντικά κέρδη στην ακρίβεια σε διάφορες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης. Το σύστημά μας έχει ως αποτέλεσμα 4,4% απόλυτη αύξηση έναντι της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε πλήρη ακρίβεια μορφολογικής ανάλυσης (30,6% σχετική μείωση σφαλμάτων) και 10,6% (31,5% σχετική μείωση σφαλμάτων) για λέξεις εκτός λεξιλογίου.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az arab morfológiai egyértelműsítés modelljét az ismétlődő neurális hálózatok (RNN) alapján. Hosszú rövid távú memória (LSTM) sejteket képezünk több konfigurációban és beágyazási szinten a különböző morfológiai jellemzők modellezésére. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy ezek a modellek felülmúlják a legkorszerűbb rendszereket anélkül, hogy kifejezetten használnák a funkciótervezést. Azonban a morfológiai analizátorból származó tanulási funkciók hozzáadása a lehetséges analízisek területének modellezéséhez további javulást jelent. A kapott morfológiai modelleket felhasználjuk a morfológiai analizátor analíziseinek pontozására és rangsorolására morfológiai egyértelműsítésre. Az eredmények számos értékelési mutatóban jelentős pontosságnövekedést mutatnak. Rendszerünk 4,4%-os abszolút növekedést eredményez a korszerű morfológiai elemzési pontosság (30,6%-os relatív hibacsökkentés), és 10,6%-os (31,5%-os relatív hibacsökkentés) a szókincsen kívüli szavak esetében.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un modello di disambiguazione morfologica araba basato sulle reti neurali ricorrenti (RNN). Formiamo cellule Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) in diverse configurazioni e livelli di incorporazione per modellare le varie caratteristiche morfologiche. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che questi modelli superano i sistemi all'avanguardia senza l'uso esplicito di feature engineering. Tuttavia, l'aggiunta di funzionalità di apprendimento da un analizzatore morfologico per modellare lo spazio di possibili analisi fornisce ulteriori miglioramenti. Utilizziamo i modelli morfologici risultanti per valutare e classificare le analisi dell'analizzatore morfologico per la disambiguazione morfologica. I risultati mostrano significativi incrementi di accuratezza in diverse metriche di valutazione. Il nostro sistema si traduce in un aumento assoluto del 4,4% rispetto allo stato dell'arte nella precisione completa dell'analisi morfologica (riduzione degli errori relativi del 30,6%) e del 10,6% (riduzione degli errori relativi del 31,5%) per le parole fuori vocabolario.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз араб морфологикалық дисамбигвациясының үлгісін көрсетеді. Қайталану невралдық желілер (RNN) негізінде. Біз қысқа уақыт жады (LSTM) ұяшықтарын бірнеше конфигурациялау мен ендіру деңгейінде бірнеше морфологиялық мүмкіндіктерді үлгілеу үшін ұзындық ұяшықтарды Біздің тәжірибеміз бұл үлгілер өзгертілікті инженерлік инженерлігін қолданбаған күй- жай жүйелерді жасайды. Бірақ морфологиялық анализатордан оқыту мүмкін анализациялардың орынын үлгілеу үшін қосылу мүмкін жақсарту үшін қосылады. Біз морфологиялық дезамбигуация үшін морфологиялық анализатордың анализацияларын сұрау және реттеу үшін морфологиялық моделогиялық моделогтарды қолданамыз. Нәтижелер бірнеше бағалау метрикалықтардың дұрыстығын көрсетеді. Жүйеміздің 4,4% деген сөздерді сөздердің тығыс үшін морфологиялық анализ дұрыстығында (30,6% салыстырық қатесін азайту) және 10,6% (31,5% салыстырық қатесін азайту үшін) абсолюттік көтеріп тұрады.', 'lt': 'This paper presents a model for Arabic morphological disambiguation based on Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN).  Keliose konfigūracijose ir įterpimo lygiuose mokome ilgalaikę trumpalaikę atminties (LSTM) ląsteles modeliuoti įvairias morfologines savybes. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad šie modeliai viršija pažangiąsias sistemas be aiškios savybių inžinerijos. However, adding learning features from a morphological analyzer to model the space of possible analyses provides additional improvement.  Naudojamės gautais morfologiniais modeliais morfologiniam analizatoriui morfologiniam atsisakymui įvertinti ir klasifikuoti. Rezultatai rodo, kad daugelio vertinimo rodiklių tikslumas labai padidėjo. Mūsų sistema sukuria 4,4 proc. absoliutųjį aukščiausios kokybės padidėjimą visiškai morfologinės analizės tikslumui (30,6 proc. santykinis klaidų sumažėjimas) ir 10,6 proc. (31,5 proc. santykinis klaidų sumažėjimas) ne žodiniams žodžiams.', 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува модел за арапска морфолошка деамбигуација базирана на рекурентните неврални мрежи (РНН). Ги тренираме клетките на долгорочна меморија (LSTM) во неколку конфигурации и вградуваме нивоа за да ги моделираме различните морфолошки карактеристики. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека овие модели ги надминуваат најсовремените системи без експлицитна употреба на инженерство на карактеристики. Сепак, додавањето на фактеристики на учење од морфолошкиот анализатор за моделирање на просторот на можните анализи обезбедува дополнително подобрување. Ние ги користиме резултатите на морфолошките модели за оценка и рангирање на анализите на морфолошкиот анализатор за морфолошка дебабигуација. Резултатите покажуваат значителни зголемувања во точноста во неколку метрики на проценка. Нашиот систем резултира со 4,4 отсто апсолутно зголемување во однос на најсовремената морфолошка анализа во точност (30,6 отсто релативно намалување на грешките) и 10,6 отсто (31,5 отсто релативно намалување на грешките) за зборови кои не се релативни.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടും വരുത്തുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി അറബിക്ക് മൊര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d ഡിസ നമ്മള്\u200d പല ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളിലും ക്രമീകരിക്കുന്ന നിലങ്ങളിലും നീണ്ട കുറഞ്ഞ മെമ്മറിയിലും പരിശീലിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ പ്രതിഫല എഞ്ചിനിജിനീയറിന് ഉപയോഗിക്കാ എന്നാലും ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായോജിക്കുന്നവനില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് സാധ്യതക്ക വിശ മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായോജിക്കുന്നവന്റെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമുള്ള The results show significant gains in accuracy across several evaluation metrics.  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായത്തില്\u200d 4.4% പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മുഴുവന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ് (30.6% relative error reduction), 10.6% (31.5% relative error reduction)', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan model untuk penyelesaian morfologik Arab berdasarkan Rangkaian Neural (RNN) berulang-ulang. Kami melatih sel ingatan jangka pendek panjang (LSTM) dalam beberapa konfigurasi dan tahap penyampaian untuk memmodelkan pelbagai ciri-ciri morfologik. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa model ini melampaui sistem state-of-the-art tanpa menggunakan secara eksplicit teknik ciri-ciri. Namun, menambah ciri-ciri pembelajaran dari analisis morfologik untuk model ruang analisis yang mungkin menyediakan penambahan tambahan. Kami menggunakan model morfologi yang menghasilkan untuk mencetak dan menandakan analisis morfologi untuk penyelesaian morfologi. Keputusan menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan dalam ketepatan melalui beberapa metrik penilaian. Our system results in 4.4% absolute increase over the state-of-the-art in full morphological analysis accuracy (30.6% relative error reduction), and 10.6% (31.5% relative error reduction) for out-of-vocabulary words.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta mudell għal diżambiguazzjoni morfoloġika Għarbija bbażata fuq Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti (RNN). Aħna nħarrġu ċ-ċelloli tal-Memorja fuq medda twila ta’ żmien qasira (LSTM) f’diversi konfigurazzjonijiet u livelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni biex nimmudellaw id-diversi karatteristiċi morfoloġiċi. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li dawn il-mudelli jaqbżu s-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati mingħajr l-użu espliċitu tal-inġinerija tal-karatteristiċi. However, adding learning features from a morphological analyzer to model the space of possible analyses provides additional improvement.  Aħna nagħmlu użu mill-mudelli morfoloġiċi li jirriżultaw għall-valutazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-analiżi tal-analizzatur morfoloġiku għad-diżambigwazzjoni morfoloġika. Ir-riżultati juru żidiet sinifikanti fil-preċiżjoni f’diversi metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni. Is-sistema tagħna tirriżulta f’żieda assoluta ta’ 4.4% fuq l-aktar avvanzata fl-eżattezza sħiħa tal-analiżi morfoloġika (tnaqqis relattiv ta’ żball ta’ 30.6%), u 10.6% (tnaqqis relattiv ta’ żball ta’ 31.5%) għal kliem barra mill-vokabulari.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээ (RNN) дээр суурилсан Араб морфологик хэмжээсүүдийн загварыг харуулдаг. Бид урт хугацааны санамж (LSTM) эсүүдийг олон тохируулалт болон өөр өөр морфологик чадварыг загварчлахын тулд сургалтын түвшинд суралцаж байна. Бидний туршилтууд эдгээр загварууд маш тодорхой инженерийн хэрэглээгүй байдал дээр ажилладаг. Гэвч морфологийн шинжилгээчээс суралцах боломжтой шинжилгээний орон зайд суралцах чадварыг нэмэх нь нэмэлт сайжруулах боломжтой. Бид морфологикийн шинжилгээний шинжилгээг шалгахын тулд үр дүнтэй морфологик загварыг ашигладаг. Үүний үр дүнд хэд хэдэн тооцооллын метриктик дээр тодорхойлолтой ашиг гаргадаг. Бидний систем бүрэн морфологик шинжилгээний тодорхойлолт дээр 4.4%-ийн абсолютт нэмэгдэж байна (30.6% харьцангуй алдаа багасгаж буй), мөн 10.6% (31.5% харьцангуй алдаа багасгаж буй) үгсийн үгсийн тулд 10.6%.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit modell for arabisk morfologisk disambiguasjon basert på gjentaande neiralnettverk (RNN). Vi treng langsiktige minne (LSTM) i fleire oppsett og innbyggingsnivå for å modellere ulike morfologiske funksjonar. Eksperimentane våre viser at desse modelane utfører tilstandssystemet utan eksplisitt bruk av funksjonsengineering. Men å leggja til læringsfunksjonar frå ein morfologisk analyser for å modellera mellomrom på moglege analyser gjer tilleggsvising. Vi bruker den resultanta morfologiske modellen for å skalera og rankera analysene av morfologiske analyseren for morfologiske disambiguasjon. Resultatet viser signifikante forståking i nøyaktighet over fleire evalueringsmetrikar. Sistemet vårt resulterer i 4,4% absolutt økning over kunsttilstanden i fullstendig morfologisk analyser (30,6% relativt feilreduksjon), og 10,6% (31,5% relativt feilreduksjon) for uten ordliste.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia model arabskiego rozpoznawania morfologicznego opartego na Recurrent Neuroral Networks (RNN). Szkolimy komórki LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) w kilku konfiguracjach i poziomach osadzenia w celu modelowania różnych cech morfologicznych. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że modele te przewyższają najnowocześniejsze systemy bez wyraźnego użycia inżynierii funkcji. Jednak dodanie cech uczenia się z analizatora morfologicznego do modelowania przestrzeni możliwych analiz zapewnia dodatkową poprawę. Wykorzystujemy wynikające z nich modele morfologiczne do oceny i rankingu analiz morfologicznych analizy dla rozpoznawania morfologicznego. Wyniki pokazują znaczący wzrost dokładności w kilku wskaźnikach oceny. Nasz system powoduje 4,4% bezwzględny wzrost w stosunku do najnowocześniejszego stanu techniki w pełnej dokładności analizy morfologicznej (30,6% względna redukcja błędów względnych) dla słów poza słownictwem.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un model de dezambiguizare morfologică arabă bazat pe Rețelele Neurale Recurente (RNN). Instruim celulele Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) în mai multe configurații și niveluri de încorporare pentru a modela diferitele caracteristici morfologice. Experimentele noastre arată că aceste modele depășesc performanțele sistemelor de ultimă generație fără utilizarea explicită a ingineriei caracteristicilor. Cu toate acestea, adăugarea caracteristicilor de învățare de la un analizor morfologic pentru a modela spațiul de analize posibile oferă îmbunătățiri suplimentare. Utilizăm modelele morfologice rezultate pentru punctarea și clasificarea analizelor analizorului morfologic pentru dezambiguizarea morfologică. Rezultatele arată câștiguri semnificative în precizie în mai multe măsurători de evaluare. Sistemul nostru are ca rezultat o creștere absolută de 4,4% față de cea mai modernă a acurateții complete a analizei morfologice (reducere relativă a erorilor cu 30,6%) și 10,6% (reducere relativă a erorilor cu 31,5%) pentru cuvintele din afara vocabularului.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za arapsku morfološku disambiguaciju na osnovu ponovnih neuronskih mreža (RNN). Treniramo kratkoročnu uspomenu (LSTM) ćelije u nekoliko konfiguracija i ugrađenih nivoa kako bi modelili različite morfološke funkcije. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da ovi modeli izvršavaju stanje umjetnosti bez objašnjenja inženjeringa. Međutim, dodavanje znakova učenja morfološkog analizatora u modelu prostora mogućih analiza pruža dodatno poboljšanje. Koristimo rezultate morfoloških modela za izvlačenje i rankiranje analize morfološkog analizatora morfološkog disambiguacije. Rezultati pokazuju značajne dobitke tačnosti u nekoliko metrika procjene. Naš sistem rezultira apsolutnom povećanju stanja umjetnosti od 4,4% u potpunoj morfološkoj analizi tačnosti (relativno smanjenje grešaka od 30,6%) i 10,6% (relativno smanjenje grešaka od 31,5%) za nečije reči.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්ත පෙන්වන්නේ අරාබික මෝර්ෆිකෝලික අසාර්ථක විස්තරයක් වෙනුවෙන් මෝඩෙල් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ.  අපි විවිදිහට සංවිධානය සහ සම්බන්ධ ස්ථානය සඳහා විවිදිහට විවිදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න ලොකු කාලාවක් මතක ස්මත අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල් ස්ථානයේ ඉන්ජිනියාර්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැති විසින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන නමුත්, විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශේෂකයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් අ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්ලේෂක විශ්ලේෂකයේ විශ්ලේෂක විශ්ලේෂකය විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශේෂයෙන් ව අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාර 4.4% ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණය සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණය (30.6% සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ලේෂණය අවසානය) සහ 10', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en modell för arabisk morfologisk disambiguation baserad på återkommande neurala nätverk (RNN). Vi tränar LSTM-celler (Long Short-Term Memory) i flera konfigurationer och inbäddningsnivåer för att modellera de olika morfologiska egenskaperna. Våra experiment visar att dessa modeller överträffar toppmoderna system utan uttrycklig användning av funktionsteknik. Men att lägga till inlärningsfunktioner från en morfologisk analysator för att modellera utrymmet för möjliga analyser ger ytterligare förbättringar. Vi använder oss av de resulterande morfologiska modellerna för att poängsätta och rangordna analyser av den morfologiska analysatorn för morfologisk disambiguation. Resultaten visar betydande förbättringar i noggrannhet över flera utvärderingsmetoder. Vårt system resulterar i en absolut ökning på 4,4% jämfört med den senaste tekniken av fullständig morfologisk analysnoggrannhet (30,6% relativ felreduktion) och 10,6% (31,5% relativ felreduktion) för ord utanför ordförrådet.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa tilmaamo ku saabsan shabakada Neural Network (RNN). Waxaan ku tababarinaa xubnaha dhaadheerka dheer (LSTM) oo ku tababaraya koonfureedyo badan iyo heerarka lagu sameynayo si aan u sameyno tababaro kala duduwan. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in modelladan ay ka samaystaan nidaamka farshaxanka oo aan si cad u isticmaalin injiilka gaarka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ku daro barashada analyegista morphologiga ah si uu u sameyno booska baaritaanka suurtagalka ah ayaa beddelaya kororo dheeraad ah. We make use of the resulting morphological models for scoring and ranking the analyses of the morphological analyzer for morphological disambiguation.  Abaalkooda waxaa ka muuqda faa'iido aad u weyn oo ku saxda meelo kala gedisan. nidaamkayaga waxaa ka soo baxay korodho kaliya oo ka korodhsan xaaladda farshaxanka oo dhan (30.6% ee u dhow khaladda), iyo 10.6% (31.5% ee khaladda ku saabsan khaladda) hadalka aan hadalka ahayn.", 'ta': '@ info நாம் பல வடிவமைப்புகளில் நீண்ட சிறிய நினைவகம் (LSTM) செல்களை பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் உள்ளமைப்பு நிலைகளில் மாற்றுவதற்கான பல நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது இந்த மாதிரிகள் சிறப்பு பொறியியல் பயன்படுத்தாமல் கலை அமைப்புகளை வெளிப்படையாக்கு ஆயினும், ஒரு ஆராய்ந்த ஆராய்ச்சியிலிருந்து கற்றல் குணங்களை சேர்த்து, சாத்தியமான ஆய்வுகளின் இடைவெளியை மாதிரி நாம் மோர்போலிக் பரிசுத்தம் மற்றும் ஆராய்ச்சி ஆராய்ச்சியின் முடிவு மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மோர்போலிக் பிரிவின முடிவுகள் சில மதிப்பின் முறைகளில் சரியான வெற்றியை காண்பிக்கிறது. எங்கள் கணினியின் முழு morphological analysis accuracy (30. 6% relative error reduction), மற்றும் 10. 6% (31. 5% சொல்லாத பிழை குறைப்பு)', 'ur': 'This paper presents a model for Arabic morphological disambiguation based on Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). ہم بہت سی پیکربندی اور مختلف مورفولوژیکوں کی موڈل کے لئے لانگ ترمیم مہمانی (LSTM) سلولوں کو ٹرین کریں گے۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ موڈلے مضبوط طریقہ انجینژی کے استعمال کے بغیر استعمال کرتے ہیں. However, learning features from a morphological analyzer to model the space of possible analyses provide additional improvement. ہم اس کے نتیجے کے مورفولوژیکی موڈل سے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ مورفولوژیکی نامبوغ کے لئے مورفولوژیکی تحلیل کرنے والے کی تحلیل کریں اور رنگ کریں۔ نتیجے مختلف مطالعہ متریک کے اندر مطالعہ کے مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے اہم کامیابی دکھاتے ہیں ہماری سیستمی 4.4% کی مطلوب زیادتی کی وجہ سے کامل مورفولوژیکی تحلیل دقیق میں (30.6% نسبت خطا کم) اور 10.6% (31.5% نسبت خطا کم) باتوں کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Name Biz bir necha moslamalarda uzun uzun xotira (LSTM) hujayralarni o'rganamiz va boshqa morfologik imkoniyatlarini modellash uchun boshqa darajada. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz shu modellar shaxsiy tizimlarning holatini bajarishini ko'rsatadi, bu foydalanuvchi muhandiya ishlatilmaydi. However, adding learning features from a morphological analyzer to model the space of possible analyses provides additional improvement.  Biz natijasida morfologik modellaridan foydalanamiz. Morfologik analyzerni o'zgartirish uchun o'anaviy qilamiz. @ info Bizning tizimimiz sohalar davlatda butun morfologik analytika haqida 4.4% uzadi (30.6% relative xato kamaytirish) va 10.6% (31.5% relative xato kamaytirish) ga keladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này tượng trưng cho mô hình biến dạng morphine của A Rập dựa trên các mạng thần kinh liên miên (RNN). Chúng tôi đào tạo các tế bào rối trí nhớ ngắn hạn (LSTM) trong nhiều cấu hình và chồng chéo cấp để mô tả các tính chất lịch sự khác nhau. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy những mẫu này vượt trội các hệ thống hiện đại mà không có kỹ thuật đặc trưng. Tuy nhiên, việc thêm các tính chất học từ một phân tích lịch sử để mô tả khoảng trống các phân tích có thể giúp cải tiến thêm. Chúng tôi sử dụng các mô hình morphical cho việc ghi điểm và xếp hạng các phân tích của chất lượng phân tách lịch học. Kết quả cho thấy khả năng chính xác cao hơn nhiều so với tỉ lệ đánh giá. Hệ thống của chúng ta kết quả là 4.4=.=) tăng hoàn toàn trên độ chính xác tiến hóa phân tích lịch học đầy đủ (30.6=.=) cắt giảm lỗi tương đối) và 10.6=. (31.5=. giảm lỗi tương đối) cho từ ra khỏi từ vựng.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een model voor Arabische morfologische verduidelijking gebaseerd op Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). We trainen Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) cellen in verschillende configuraties en embedding niveaus om de verschillende morfologische kenmerken te modelleren. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat deze modellen beter presteren dan state-of-the-art systemen zonder expliciet gebruik van feature engineering. Het toevoegen van leerfuncties van een morfologische analyzer om de ruimte van mogelijke analyses te modelleren levert echter extra verbetering op. We maken gebruik van de resulterende morfologische modellen voor het scoren en rangschikken van de analyses van de morfologische analysator voor morfologische verduidelijking. De resultaten tonen significante toename in nauwkeurigheid bij verschillende evaluatiestatistieken. Ons systeem resulteert in 4,4% absolute toename ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art in volledige morfologische analysenauwkeurigheid (30,6% relatieve foutreductie), en 10,6% (31,5% relatieve foutreductie) voor woorden buiten woordenschat.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en model for arabisk morfologisk forståelse baseret på tilbagevendende neurale netværk (RNN). Vi træner Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) celler i flere konfigurationer og indlejringsniveauer for at modellere de forskellige morfologiske træk. Vores eksperimenter viser, at disse modeller overgår state-of-the-art systemer uden eksplicit brug af feature engineering. Men at tilføje læringsfunktioner fra en morfologisk analysator til at modellere rummet for mulige analyser giver yderligere forbedringer. Vi anvender de resulterende morfologiske modeller til at score og rangere analyserne af den morfologiske analysator for morfologisk forståelse. Resultaterne viser betydelige gevinster i nøjagtighed på tværs af flere evalueringsmetrics. Vores system resulterer i 4,4% absolut stigning i fuld morfologisk analyse nøjagtighed i forhold til state-of-the-art (30,6% relativ fejlreduktion) og 10,6% (31,5% relativ fejlreduktion) for ord uden for ordforråd.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя модел за арабско морфологично разграничаване въз основа на повтарящи се неврални мрежи (РНН). Обучаваме клетки за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (ЛСТМ) в няколко конфигурации и вградени нива, за да моделираме различните морфологични характеристики. Нашите експерименти показват, че тези модели превъзхождат най-съвременните системи без изрично използване на функционален инженеринг. Добавянето на учебни функции от морфологичен анализатор за моделиране на пространството на възможни анализи обаче осигурява допълнително подобрение. Използваме получените морфологични модели за оценка и класиране на анализите на морфологичния анализатор за морфологично разграничаване. Резултатите показват значителни печалби в точността на няколко показателя за оценка. Нашата система води до 4,4% абсолютно увеличение спрямо най-съвременните в пълна точност на морфологичния анализ (30,6% намаление на относителната грешка) и 10,6% (31,5% намаление на относителната грешка) за думи извън речника.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za arapsku morfološku disambiguaciju na temelju ponovnih neuronskih mreža (RNN). Treniramo kratkoročnu sjećanje (LSTM) ćelije u nekoliko konfiguracija i ugrađenih razina kako bi modelili različite morfološke funkcije. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da ovi modeli izvršavaju stanje umjetničkih sustava bez objašnjenja inženjeringa. Međutim, dodavanje znakova učenja morfološkog analizatora u modelu prostora mogućih analiza pruža dodatno poboljšanje. Koristimo rezultate morfoloških modela za izvlačenje i rankiranje analize morfološkog analizatora morfološkog disambiguacije. Rezultati pokazuju značajne dobitke tačnosti u nekoliko mjera procjene. Naš sustav rezultira apsolutnom povećanju stanja umjetnosti od 4,4% u potpunoj točnosti morfološke analize (relativno smanjenje grešaka od 30,6%) i 10,6% (relativno smanjenje grešaka od 31,5%) za riječi izvan riječi.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan model untuk penyelesaian morfologi Arab berdasarkan Rangkaian Neural Rekorden (RNN). Kami melatih sel Memori Panjang-Panjang (LSTM) dalam beberapa konfigurasi dan tahap embedding untuk model berbagai ciri-ciri morfologi. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa model ini melebihi sistem state-of-the-art tanpa penggunaan eksplicit dari teknik fitur. Namun, menambah fitur belajar dari analisir morfologi untuk model ruang dari analisis kemungkinan menyediakan perkembangan tambahan. Kami menggunakan model morfologi hasilnya untuk mencetak dan mengatur analisis morfologi untuk penyelesaian morfologi. Hasilnya menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan dalam akurasi melalui beberapa metrik evaluasi. Our system results in 4.4% absolute increase over the state-of-the-art in full morphological analysis accuracy (30.6% relative error reduction), and 10.6% (31.5% relative error reduction) for out-of-vocabulary words.', 'de': 'Die vorliegende Arbeit stellt ein Modell für arabische morphologische Disambiguation basierend auf wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken (RNN) vor. Wir trainieren Long-Short-Term Memory (LSTM)-Zellen in verschiedenen Konfigurationen und Einbettungsebenen, um die verschiedenen morphologischen Merkmale zu modellieren. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass diese Modelle moderne Systeme ohne explizite Verwendung von Feature Engineering übertreffen. Das Hinzufügen von Lernmerkmalen aus einem morphologischen Analysator, um den Raum möglicher Analysen zu modellieren, bietet jedoch zusätzliche Verbesserungen. Die daraus resultierenden morphologischen Modelle nutzen wir für die Bewertung und Rangfolge der Analysen des morphologischen Analysators zur morphologischen Disambiguation. Die Ergebnisse zeigen signifikante Genauigkeitssteigerungen über mehrere Bewertungsmetriken hinweg. Unser System führt zu 4,4% absoluter Anstieg gegenüber dem Stand der Technik in voller morphologischer Analysegenauigkeit (30,6% relative Fehlerreduktion) und 10,6% (31,5% relative Fehlerreduktion) für Wörter außerhalb des Wortschatzes.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مدل برای تغییرات مورفولوژیکی عربی بر اساس شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره (RNN) را نشان می\u200cدهد. ما سلولهای حافظه کوتاه مدت طولانی (LSTM) را در چند تنظیمات و سطح تنظیمات برای مدل ویژه های متفاوتی مورفولوژیکی آموزش می\u200cدهیم. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که این مدل\u200cها بدون استفاده از مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از سیستم\u200cهای ایالت هنری بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهند. با این حال، اضافه کردن ویژه\u200cهای یادگیری از یک تحلیل\u200cکننده مورفولوژیکی برای مدل فضای تحلیل\u200cهای ممکن بهترین اضافه می\u200cکند. ما از مدل\u200cهای مرفولژیک نتیجه\u200cای استفاده می\u200cکنیم که برای تحلیل\u200cهای مرفولژیک برای تغییر تغییر مرفولژیکی انجام می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cها برتری مهمتری در دقیق در متریک\u200cهای چندین ارزیابی را نشان می\u200cدهند. سیستم ما به 4.4% افزایش کامل در حالت هنر با دقیق تحلیل کامل مورفولوژیکی (کاهش خطای نسبت به 30.6%) و 10.6% (کاهش خطای نسبت به 31.5% نسبت) برای کلمات خارج از کلمات صحبت می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz tekrarly Näralnetlere (RNN) tabanly arabça morfolojik çalyşmak üçin bir nusga görkezýär. Biz birnäçe konfigurasiýa we düzümlerde gysga geçirmek üçin Uzun Zaman Hata (LSTM) häsiýetleri belleýäris. Biziň deneylerimiz bu nusgalar özellikleriň enjiniýanyň tapawutlyk ulanmasyny üstün edýärler. Ýöne, morfolojik analizatçiden öwrenme özelliklerini baglamak mümkin analyzlaryň boşluklarının örneklerine eklenmek üçin eklenmez. Morfolojik değişiklikler için morfolojik modellerini tara ve sıralamak için kullanıyoruz. Netijeler birnäçe deňlenme metriklerinde has dogry gazanlygyny görkezýär. Sistemimiz 4.4% sanat titizliginiň doly morfolojik analýşiniň dogrylygyna ýükselişi däldir (30.6% relative error reduction), we 10.6% (31.5% relative error reduction) sözlerimiz ýok edildi.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mfano wa ubaguzi wa kimarabu kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea (RNN). Tunafundisha seli za kumbukumbu za muda mrefu (LSTM) katika maeneo kadhaa na kuzuia viwango vya kuelezea sifa mbalimbali za kimaadilojia. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mifano hii inafanya mifumo ya sanaa bila matumizi ya uhalisia. Hata hivyo, kuongeza vipengele vya kujifunza kutoka kwa mchambuzi wa morphological ili kutengeneza nafasi ya uchambuzi unaowezekana inatoa maendeleo zaidi. Tunatumia mifano ya kimaadilojia kwa kucheza na kuchora uchambuzi wa mchambuzi wa kimaadilojia kwa ajili ya ubaguzi wa kimaadilojia. Matokeo yanaonyesha mafanikio makubwa katika maeneo kadhaa ya uchunguzi. Mfumo wetu unasababisha kuongezeka kwa asilimia 4.4 zaidi ya hali ya sanaa katika uchambuzi mzima (asilimia 30.6 inayohusiana na kupunguza makosa), na asilimia 10.6 (asilimia 31.5 inayohusiana na kupunguza makosa) kwa maneno isiyo ya maneno.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n model vir arabiese morfologiese ontsammings gebaseer op Herhaalde Neurale Netwerke (RNN). Ons trein Long- Term Geheue (LSTM) selle in verskeie konfigurasies en inbêer vlakke om die verskeie morfologiese funksies te model. Ons eksperimente wys dat hierdie modele uitvoer state-of-the-art stelsels sonder eksplisiese gebruik van funksieengineering. Maar by die byvoeg van leer funksies van 'n morfologiese analiseerder na model die spasie van moontlike analiseerdes verskaf addisionele verbetering. Ons maak gebruik van die resulteerde morfologiese modele vir skoring en rangering van die analiseerdes van die morfologiese analiseerder vir morfologiese ontsammings. Die resultate wys betekende verskaffings in presisiteit oor verskeie evalueringsmetries. Ons stelsel resultaat in 4.4% absolute vergroot oor die staat-van-die-kuns in volledige morfologiese analisie-presisie (30.6% relatiewe fout verduur), en 10.6% (31.5% relatiewe fout verduur) vir uitwoorde woorde.", 'am': 'ይህም ፕሮግራም የቀድሞው ኔural ኔትርክ (RNN) በመሠረት ላይ የአረብኛ የሞሮፎሎጂ ክፍላጎችን ምሳሌ ያቀርባል፡፡ የረጅም ቆራጭ ማስታወሻ (LSTM) ክፍሎችን በብዙ ምርጫዎች እና የሞሮፎሎጂ ምርጫዎችን ለማስተካከል እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የዓላማ ሥርዓት ሥርዓት ስርዓቶችን ሳይገልጹ የፊደል ኢንጂንጂንተር ሲጠቀም ያሳየቃሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ሞሮፎሎጂ አስተያይር ላይ መማር ፍትሕርቶችን በመጨመር የቻልባትን ትርጉም ማሻሻሻል፡፡ የሞሮፎሎጂ analyzer ን ለማንቀሳቀስ እና ለማንቀሳቀስ እናጠይቃለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ በብዙ ማስታወቂያው ማተሚያዎች ላይ ትክክለኛ ግንኙነት ያሳያል፡፡ ስርዓታችን በሙሉ ሞሮፎሎጂ ትክክል (30.6 በመቶ የስህተት ጉዳይ) እና 10.6 በመቶ (31.5 በመቶ የስህተት ጉዳይ) ለባሕላዊ ቃላት አካባቢ ትክክል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një model për çambiguacionin morfologjik arab bazuar në rrjetet neurale të përsëritura (RNN). Ne trajnojmë qelizat e Kujtesës së Lartë afat-shkurtër (LSTM) në disa konfigurime dhe nivele të përfshirjes për të modeluar karakteristikat e ndryshme morfologjike. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se këto modele tejkalojnë sistemet më të larta pa përdorim eksplicit të inxhinierisë së karakteristikave. Megjithatë, shtimi i karakteristikave mësimi nga një analizues morfologjik për të modeluar hapësirën e analizave të mundshme ofron përmirësim shtesë. We make use of the resulting morphological models for scoring and ranking the analyses of the morphological analyzer for morphological disambiguation.  Rezultatet tregojnë fitime të rëndësishme në saktësinë në disa metrika vlerësimi. Sistemi ynë rezulton në 4.4% rritje absolute mbi gjendjen e fundit në saktësinë e analizës morfologjike të plotë (30.6% reduktim relativ i gabimeve) dhe 10.6% (31.5% reduktim relativ i gabimeve) për fjalët jashtë fjalëkalimit.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է արաբական մորֆոլոգիական բացատրության մոդել, որը հիմնված է Կարգավոր Նյարդային ցանցերի (ՌՆՆ) վրա: Մենք վարժեցնում ենք երկարաժամկետ հիշողության (LSMT) բջիջները բազմաթիվ կազմակերպություններում և ներգրավում մակարդակներ, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք տարբեր մորֆոլոգիական հատկությունները: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մոդելները գերազանցում են ամենաբարձր համակարգերը առանց առանձնահատկության ճարտարագիտության օգտագործման: Այնուամենայնիվ, մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծությունից ուսումնական հատկություններ ավելացնելը հնարավոր վերլուծությունների տարածքի մոդելավորման համար ապահովում է ավելին բարելավում: Մենք օգտագործում ենք արդյունքում ստացված մորֆոլոգիական մոդելները, որպեսզի կարողանանք գնահատել և գնահատել մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծողի վերլուծությունը մորֆոլոգիական բացառման համար: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս որոշ գնահատման չափումների ճշգրտության մեջ նշանակալի բարձրացում: Մեր համակարգը հանգեցնում է 4.4 տոկոսի բացարձակ աճի վերաբերյալ լավագույն մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության ճշգրտության (30.6 տոկոսի հարաբերական սխալների կրճատման) և 10.6 տոկոսի (31.5 տոկոսի հարաբերական սխալների կրճատման) բառերի համար:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, yenidən Nöral Networks (RNN) vasitəsilə ərəbcə morfolojik səbəbçilik modelini göstərir. Biz çoxlu konfigurasiyada və müxtəlif morfolojik fəaliyyətlərini modelləşdirmək üçün uzun-uzun Qısqa Yadını (LSTM) hücrelərini təhsil edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz bu modellərin fərqli inženjeri istifadə etmədən istifadə edilməsini göstərir. Lakin, morfolojik analizacıdan öyrənmə fərqli əlamətlərini mümkün analizacıların məsəlinə model etmək üçün daha yaxşılıqlarını verir. Biz morfolojik disambiguasyon üçün morfolojik analizacının analizasyonlarını scoring və ranking etmək üçün növbəti morfolojik modellərini istifadə edirik. Sonuçlar bir neçə değerlendirmə metriklərinin doğruluğunda mövcud qənimətləri göstərir. Sistemimiz tamamilə morfolojik analizi dəqiqliyində 4.4%-dən tamamilə art ırmağa başladı (30.6%-in qohum xəta düşürməsi), və sözləri olmayan 10.6% (31.5%-in qohum xəta düşürməsi).', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja model za arapsku morfološku disambiguaciju na temelju ponovnih neuronskih mreža (RNN). Treniramo kratkoročnu sjećanje (LSTM) ćelije u nekoliko konfiguracija i ugrađenih nivoa kako bi modelili različite morfološke funkcije. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da ovi modeli izvršavaju state-of-the-art sisteme bez objašnjenja funkcionalnog inženjeringa. Međutim, dodavanje znakova učenja morfološkog analizatora u modelu prostora mogućih analiza pruža dodatno poboljšanje. Koristimo rezultate morfoloških modela za izvlačenje i rankiranje analize morfološkog analizatora morfološkog disambiguacije. Rezultati pokazuju značajne dobitke tačnosti u nekoliko metrika procjene. Naš sistem rezultira apsolutnom povećanju stanja umjetnosti od 4,4% u potpunoj točnosti morfološke analize (relativno smanjenje grešaka od 30,6%) i 10,6% (relativno smanjenje grešaka od 31,5%) za riječi izvan riječi.', 'ko': '역귀신경망(RNN)을 기반으로 한 아랍어 어형 소멸 모델을 제시했다.우리는 다양한 형태 특징을 시뮬레이션하기 위해 장단기기억(LSTM) 세포의 몇 가지 구성과 삽입 수준을 훈련한다.우리의 실험은 특징 공정을 명확하게 사용하지 않은 상황에서 이런 모델들이 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.그러나 형태학 분석기에서 학습 기능을 추가하여 가능한 분석 공간을 모의함으로써 추가적인 개선을 제공할 수 있다.우리는 얻은 형태학 모델을 이용하여 형태학 분석기의 분석을 평가하고 정렬하여 형태학의 분열을 없앴다.그 결과 여러 평가 지표 중 정확성이 현저히 높아진 것으로 나타났다.우리 시스템은 완전 형태 분석 정확도(상대 오차 감소 30.6%)와 어휘량 외 단어의 정확도(상대 오차 감소 31.5%) 측면에서 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 4.4% 높아졌다.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি পুনরায় নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (আরএনএন) ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক আরবী মরোফোলজিক্যাল বিভ্রান্তির জন্য একটি মডেল উপস আমরা বেশ কনফিগারেশনে লম্বা শর্ট-টার্ম ম মেমোরি প্রশিক্ষণ করি এবং বিভিন্ন নৈতিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী মডেল করার জন্য। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে এই মডেলগুলো প্রকাশ্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প ব্যবস্থার বাইরে প্রকা তবে মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষকের কাছ থেকে শিক্ষা বৈশিষ্ট্য যোগ করে সম্ভাব্য বিশ্লেষণের স্থান মডেল করার জন্যে আরো উন্নত আমরা মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষকের বিশ্লেষণ ব্যবহার করি মরোফোলিক্যাল বিভ্রান্ত করার জন্য মডেল ব্যবহার করি। ফলাফল বেশ কয়েকটি মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিকে সঠিকভাবে বিশাল অর্জন প্রদর্শন করে। আমাদের সিস্টেমের ফলে পুরো মরোফোলিকাল বিশ্লেষণের সঠিকভাবে ৪. ৪% পরিমাণ বৃদ্ধি হয়েছে (৩০. ৬% আত্মিক ভুল কমে) এবং শব্দভাণ্ডারের কথার জন্য ১০.৬% (৩১.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje model arabského morfologického rozcestnění založený na recidivních neuronových sítích (RNN). Trénujeme dlouhodobou krátkodobou paměť (LSTM) buňky v několika konfiguracích a integrovaných úrovních pro modelování různých morfologických rysů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že tyto modely překonávají nejmodernější systémy bez explicitního využití funkčního inženýrství. Přidání učebních funkcí z morfologického analyzátoru k modelování prostoru možných analýz však přináší další zlepšení. Výsledné morfologické modely využíváme pro skórování a hodnocení analýz morfologického analyzátoru pro morfologické rozlišení. Výsledky ukazují významné zvýšení přesnosti v několika hodnotících metrikách. Náš systém vede k 4,4% absolutnímu nárůstu oproti nejmodernějšímu stavu techniky v plné morfologické přesnosti analýzy (30,6% relativní redukce chyb) a 10,6% (31,5% relativní redukce chyb) pro slova mimo slovní zásobu.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un model de desambiguació morfològica àrab basat en xarxes neurals recurrents (RNN). Ensenyem cèl·lules de memòria a curt termini (LSTM) en diverses configuracions i nivells d'incorporació per modelar les diverses característiques morfològiques. Els nostres experiments demostren que aquests models superen els sistemes més avançats sense utilitzar explícitament l'enginyeria de característiques. Tanmateix, afegir característiques d'aprenentatge d'un anàlisi morfològic per modelar l'espai de possible anàlisis proporciona millora adicional. Utilitzem els models morfològics resultants per puntuar i classificar les anàlisis del analitzador morfològic per la desambiguació morfològica. Els resultats mostren millors significatius en la precisió a través de diverses mètriques d'evaluació. El nostre sistema resulta en un increment absolut del 4,4% en la precisió de l'anàlisi morfològica completa (30,6% de reducció d'errors relativs) i en un 10,6% (31,5% de reducció d'errors relativs) per paraules fora de vocabulari.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse araabia morfoloogilise eristamise mudel, mis põhineb korduvatel närvivõrkudel (RNN). Me koolitame pikaajalise lühiajalise mälu (LSTM) rakke mitmetes konfiguratsioonides ja manustamistasemetes, et modelleerida erinevaid morfoloogilisi omadusi. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et need mudelid ületavad kaasaegseid süsteeme ilma funktsioonide insenerita. Kuid morfoloogilise analüsaatori õppimisfunktsioonide lisamine võimalike analüüside ruumi modelleerimiseks pakub täiendavat paranemist. Kasutame saadud morfoloogilisi mudeleid morfoloogilise analüsaatori analüüside skoorimiseks ja järjestamiseks morfoloogilise selgituse saavutamiseks. Tulemused näitavad märkimisväärset täpsuse kasvu mitme hindamismeetodika puhul. Meie süsteemi tulemusena suureneb morfoloogilise analüüsi täielik täpsus 4,4% (suhtelise vea vähenemine 30,6%) ja sõnavara väliste sõnade puhul 10,6% (31,5% suhtelise vea vähenemine).', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään arabian morfologisen erittelyn malli, joka perustuu toistuviin hermoverkkoihin (RNN). Koulutamme Long Short-Term Memory (LSTM) -soluja useissa kokoonpanoissa ja upotustasoissa erilaisten morfologisten ominaisuuksien mallintamiseksi. Kokeemme osoittavat, että nämä mallit suoriutuvat huippuluokan järjestelmistä ilman nimenomaista ominaisuussuunnittelua. Morfologisen analysaattorin oppimisominaisuuksien lisääminen mahdollisten analyysien tilan mallintamiseen tarjoaa kuitenkin lisäparannuksia. Hyödynnämme saatuja morfologisia malleja morfologisen analysaattorin analyysien pisteyttämiseen ja luokitteluun morfologista erittelyä varten. Tulokset osoittavat, että useiden arviointimittareiden tarkkuus paranee merkittävästi. Järjestelmämme tuottaa täydellisen morfologisen analyysin tarkkuuden 4,4% absoluuttisen lisäyksen huipputekniikkaan verrattuna (30,6% suhteellinen virhevähennys) ja sanaston ulkopuolisten sanojen osalta 10,6% (31,5% suhteellinen virhevähennys).', 'jv': 'Perintah iki nambah model kanggo mbenggo maneh dumalusi sistem arab sing basa ning, recurent Neral Network (DNN). Awak dhéwé luwih Ketokan Latar Where am I politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngéwangi gambarang penggunaké modèl mrolengké kanggo ngilangno karo hal basa karo hal-iwak cara nggawe mrolengké. ontrol Sistem dhéwé éntuk 4.4% olèhku nggawe geraksi kanggo langgar-kanggo langgar stadu-kanggo langgar bantuan mrolemang (30.6% nambah perusahaan eror), lan 10.6% (31.5% nambah perusahaan langgar-perusahaan) kanggo langgar-perusahaan langgar.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen model za arabsko morfološko razločitev, ki temelji na ponavljajočih se živčnih omrežjih (RNN). Celice dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilnika (LSTM) treniramo v različnih konfiguracijah in nivojih vdelave za modeliranje različnih morfoloških značilnosti. Naši poskusi kažejo, da ti modeli presegajo najsodobnejše sisteme brez eksplicitne uporabe funkcijskega inženiringa. Vendar pa dodajanje učnih funkcij iz morfološkega analizatorja za modeliranje prostora možnih analiz omogoča dodatno izboljšanje. Pridobljene morfološke modele uporabljamo za ocenjevanje in razvrščanje analiz morfološkega analizatorja za morfološko razločitev. Rezultati kažejo znatno povečanje natančnosti pri več meritvah ocenjevanja. Naš sistem zagotavlja 4,4% absolutno povečanje natančnosti popolne morfološke analize (30,6% zmanjšanje relativne napake) in 10,6% (31,5% zmanjšanje relativne napake) za besede zunaj besedišča.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה דוגמא לניתוח מורפולוגי ערבי מבוסס על רשתות נוירוליות מתחזרות (RNN). אנו מאמן תאי זיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר (LSTM) במספר תצורות ורמות קיצוב כדי לדוגמא את התחומים המורפולוגיים השונים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהדוגמנים האלה עולים מערכות חדשות בלי שימוש ברור בהנדסה של תכונות. עם זאת, להוסיף תכונות למידה מאנליזר מורפולוגי כדי לדוגמא את המרחב של ניתוחים אפשריים מספק שיפור נוסף. אנו משתמשים בדוגמנים המורפולוגיים הנוצאים כדי לנקוט ולצביע את הניתוחים של הניתוח המורפולוגי עבור ניתוח מורפולוגי. התוצאות מראות שיפוטים משמעותיים בדיוק במטריות הערכה רבות. המערכת שלנו תוצאת בגילוי מוחלט של 4.4% על המצב המיוחד בתוך בדיקת ניתוח מורפולוגי מלאה (30.6% שינוי טעויות יחסית), ו-10.6% (31.5% שינוי טעויות יחסית) למילים מחוץ למילים המיליים.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani motel wa mutfologi na Larabci, a kan karatun Naural Networks (RNN). Tuna tafiyar da lokaci masu yiwuwa na Kwamfyuta Kwamfyuta Kwamfyutan Nayi (LSSM) cikin wasu tsari da ke ƙunsa da zane-ƙunsa dõmin a motsar wasu fuskar morfologi. Kayan jarrabõyinmu, za'a nũna cewa waɗannan misalin su fara halin-na'urar-sanar kuma bã da wani amfani da muhalli na masu tsari. Amma, ku ƙara wasu masu amfani da karatun daga mai analyzawa na morfologi zuwa ya motsa filin analyki masu yiwuwa, yana da ƙari mai kyau. Tuna amfani da misãlai masu ƙara na morfologi ga yin ƙidãya da yin chegara a kan analyren mutfologi wa rabo. Mataimakin za'a nuna matsayin mai muhimmi cikin taƙaitacce a kowace metrici mai ƙidãya. Our system results in 4.4% absolute increase over the state-of-the-art in full morphological analysis accuracy (30.6% relative error reduction), and 10.6% (31.5% relative error reduction) for out-of-vocabulary words.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཨ་རིའི་ནང་དུ་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། We train Long-Term Memory (LSTM) cells in several configurations and embedding levels to model the various morphological features. Our experiments show that these models outperform state-of-the-art systems without explicit use of feature engineering. ཡིན་ནའང་། དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་སྣེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཆས་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་ཞིབ We make use of the resulting morphological models for scoring and ranking the analyses of the morphological analyzer for morphological disambiguation. གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པར་ངེས་པར་ལྡན་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བ་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་མངོན་འཆར། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙང་བཟོས་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Paradigm Completion for Derivational Morphology', 'ar': 'إكمال النموذج للصرف الاشتقاقي', 'es': 'Finalización del paradigma para la morfología derivacional', 'pt': 'Conclusão de Paradigma para Morfologia Derivacional', 'fr': 'Complétion de paradigme pour la morphologie dérivée', 'zh': '遣生形态学范式成', 'ja': '派生形態のパラダイム補完', 'hi': 'व्युत्पत्ति आकृति विज्ञान के लिए प्रतिमान पूर्णता', 'ru': 'Завершение парадигмы для производной морфологии', 'ga': 'Críochnú Paradigm do Mhoirfeolaíocht Dhíorthaigh', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ολοκλήρωση Παραδείγματος για την παράγωγη Μορφολογία', 'hu': 'Paradigma-kiegészítés származékos morfológiához', 'it': 'Completamento Paradigma per Morfologia Derivativa', 'kk': 'Деривациялық морфология парадигмінің толтыруы', 'lt': 'Derivacinės morfologijos paradigmos užbaigimas', 'mk': 'Дополнување на парадигмите за деривационална морфологија', 'ms': 'Penyempurnaan Paradigm untuk Morfologi Derivasi', 'mt': 'Tlestija tal-Paradigma għall-Morfoloġija Derivattiva', 'mn': 'Өтгөлдөр үхрийн морфологийн парадигм дуусгал', 'ml': 'ഡെറിവേഷന്\u200d മോര്\u200dഫോലോഗിയ്ക്കുള്ള പാരാഡിഗം പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുക', 'pl': 'Ukończenie paradygmatu dla morfologii pochodnej', 'ro': 'Finalizarea Paradigmului pentru morfologia derivată', 'sr': 'Završenje paradigma za odvojenu morfologiju', 'no': 'Paradigm- fullføring for derivasjonske morfologi', 'so': 'Dhameynta baaritaanka', 'sv': 'Paradigmkomplettering för härledd morfologi', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'முழுமையான மார்போலிகலிக்கான பாராடியம் முடிவு', 'ur': 'پاراڈیگ کامل کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự gõ xong cẩm thạch căn bản', 'hr': 'Završenje paradigma za odvratnu morfologiju', 'bg': 'Завършване на парадигмата за деривативна морфология', 'da': 'Paradigmafslutning for afledt morfologi', 'nl': 'Paradigmavoltooiing voor afgeleide morfologie', 'de': 'Paradigmendefinition für die Derivationsmorphologie', 'id': 'Penyelesaian Paradigm untuk Morfologi Derivasi', 'ko': '파생 형태학의 범례가 완벽하다.', 'fa': 'تعمیر پارادیگم برای مرفولژی نابودی', 'sw': 'Kumaliza kwa Kifolojia', 'sq': 'Paradigm Completion for Derivational Morphology', 'tr': 'Derivative Marforosy üçin paradigm tamamlamasy', 'af': 'Paradigm Voltooiïng vir Derivational Morphology', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Պարիվացիոն մորֆոլոգիայի պարադիգմային ավարտը', 'bn': 'Paradigm Completion for Derivational Morphology', 'az': 'Derivational Morphology üçün Paradigm Tamamlama', 'ca': 'Completació del paradigma per a la morfologia derivada', 'bs': 'Završenje paradigma za odvojenu morfologiju', 'cs': 'Dokončení paradigmatu pro derivativní morfologii', 'et': 'Paradigmi lõpuleviimine tuletatud morfoloogia jaoks', 'fi': 'Paradigmin loppuun saattaminen johdettua morfologiaa varten', 'jv': 'Coverage', 'he': 'סיום פרדיגמה למורפולוגיה משולשת', 'sk': 'Zaključek paradigme za izpeljano morfologijo', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གི་སྐྱེས་བ་ཆེན་ཚོའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འདི་ལ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པ།'}
{'en': 'The generation of complex derived word forms has been an overlooked problem in NLP ; we fill this gap by applying neural sequence-to-sequence models to the task. We overview the theoretical motivation for a paradigmatic treatment of derivational morphology, and introduce the task of derivational paradigm completion as a parallel to inflectional paradigm completion. State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns, and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16.4 %. However, due to semantic, historical, and lexical considerations involved in derivational morphology, future work will be needed to achieve performance parity with inflection-generating systems.', 'ar': 'كان إنشاء أشكال معقدة من الكلمات المشتقة مشكلة تم التغاضي عنها في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ؛ نقوم بملء هذه الفجوة من خلال تطبيق نماذج التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل على المهمة. نحن نلقي نظرة عامة على الدافع النظري للمعالجة النموذجية للصرف الاشتقاقي ، ونقدم مهمة إكمال النموذج الاشتقاقي كموازاة لإكمال النموذج التصريف. أحدث النماذج العصبية التي تم تكييفها من مهمة الانعطاف قادرة على تعلم مجموعة من أنماط الاشتقاق ، وتتفوق على خط الأساس غير العصبي بنسبة 16.4٪. ومع ذلك ، نظرًا للاعتبارات الدلالية والتاريخية والمعجمية المتضمنة في علم التشكل الاشتقاقي ، ستكون هناك حاجة إلى العمل المستقبلي لتحقيق التكافؤ في الأداء مع أنظمة توليد الانعكاس.', 'fr': "La génération de formes de mots dérivées complexes a été un problème négligé dans la PNL\xa0; nous comblons cette lacune en appliquant des modèles de séquence neuronale à séquence à la tâche. Nous passons en revue la motivation théorique pour un traitement paradigmatique de la morphologie dérivationnelle et introduisons la tâche de l'achèvement du paradigme dérivationnel en parallèle de l'achèvement du paradigme flexionnel. Les modèles neuronaux de pointe adaptés à partir de la tâche d'inflexion sont capables d'apprendre la gamme de modèles de dérivation et de surpasser une base non neuronale de 16,4\xa0%. Cependant, en raison de considérations sémantiques, historiques et lexicales impliquées dans la morphologie dérivationnelle, des travaux futurs seront nécessaires pour atteindre la parité des performances avec les systèmes générateurs d'inflexion.", 'pt': 'A geração de formas de palavras derivadas complexas tem sido um problema negligenciado na PNL; preenchemos essa lacuna aplicando modelos neurais de sequência a sequência à tarefa. Nós revisamos a motivação teórica para um tratamento paradigmático da morfologia derivacional e introduzimos a tarefa de conclusão do paradigma derivacional como um paralelo à conclusão do paradigma flexional. Modelos neurais de última geração adaptados da tarefa de inflexão são capazes de aprender a gama de padrões de derivação e superam uma linha de base não neural em 16,4%. No entanto, devido a considerações semânticas, históricas e lexicais envolvidas na morfologia derivacional, trabalhos futuros serão necessários para alcançar paridade de desempenho com sistemas geradores de inflexão.', 'es': 'La generación de formas de palabras derivadas complejas ha sido un problema pasado por alto en la PNL; llenamos este vacío aplicando modelos neuronales de secuencia a secuencia a la tarea. Revisamos la motivación teórica para un tratamiento paradigmático de la morfología derivacional e introducimos la tarea de completar el paradigma derivacional como un paralelo a la finalización del paradigma de inflexión. Los modelos neuronales de última generación adaptados de la tarea de inflexión son capaces de aprender el rango de patrones de derivación y superar un 16,4% a una línea de base no neuronal. Sin embargo, debido a consideraciones semánticas, históricas y léxicas involucradas en la morfología derivacional, será necesario trabajar en el futuro para lograr la paridad de rendimiento con los sistemas generadores de inflexión.', 'ja': '複雑な派生語形の生成は、NLPでは見落とされてきた問題である。我々は、ニューラルシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルをタスクに適用することによって、このギャップを埋める。導出形態論のパラダイム的扱いの理論的動機を概観し、導出パラダイムの完成の課題を、変形パラダイムの完成と並行して紹介する。変形タスクから適応した最先端のニューラルモデルは、導出パターンの範囲を学習することができ、非ニューラルベースラインを16.4%上回るパフォーマンスを発揮する。しかしながら、派生形態に関わる意味的、歴史的、および語彙的な考察のために、インフレを生成するシステムとのパフォーマンスパリティを達成するためには、今後の作業が必要となる。', 'zh': '杂派生词文生于NLP,盖一被忽视也。 吾将神经序于序,以补其空。 吾概述范形态学,并言衍生之事,以为平行拐点范式之事。 拐点改编之最先进者神经模能学推导式,而比非神经基线高16.4%。 然形态学及语义、史、词汇之虑,未来之事,将成其词形变化而奇偶验之。', 'hi': 'जटिल व्युत्पन्न शब्द रूपों की पीढ़ी एनएलपी में एक अनदेखी समस्या रही है; हम कार्य करने के लिए तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल लागू करके इस अंतर को भरते हैं। हम व्युत्पन्न आकृति विज्ञान के एक रूपात्मक उपचार के लिए सैद्धांतिक प्रेरणा का अवलोकन करते हैं, और व्युत्पन्न प्रतिमान पूर्णता के कार्य को प्रतिबिंबित प्रतिमान पूर्णता के समानांतर के रूप में पेश करते हैं। इन्फ्लेक्शन कार्य से अनुकूलित अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका मॉडल व्युत्पत्ति पैटर्न की सीमा को सीखने में सक्षम हैं, और 16.4% तक एक गैर-तंत्रिका आधार रेखा को मात देते हैं। हालांकि, व्युत्पत्ति आकृति विज्ञान में शामिल शब्दार्थ, ऐतिहासिक और लेक्सिकल विचारों के कारण, भविष्य के काम को इन्फ्लेक्शन-जनरेटिंग सिस्टम के साथ प्रदर्शन समानता प्राप्त करने की आवश्यकता होगी।', 'ru': 'Генерация сложных производных словоформ была упущена из виду в NLP; мы заполняем этот пробел, применяя нейронные модели последовательности к задаче. Рассматриваем теоретическую мотивацию парадигматического подхода к производной морфологии и вводим задачу завершения производной парадигмы как параллель к завершению инфлективной парадигмы. Современные нейронные модели, адаптированные из задачи перегиба, способны изучать диапазон закономерностей деривации и на 16,4% превосходят ненейронную базовую линию. Однако из-за семантических, исторических и лексических соображений, связанных с производной морфологией, потребуется будущая работа для достижения паритета производительности с системами, генерирующими перегибы.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb í giniúint foirmeacha casta díorthaithe focal in NLP; líonaimid an bhearna seo trí mhúnlaí néaracha seicheamh-go-seicheamh a chur i bhfeidhm ar an tasc. Déanaimid forbhreathnú ar an spreagadh teoiriciúil le cóireáil paradigmatach a dhéanamh ar mhoirfeolaíocht díorthach, agus tugtar isteach an tasc a bhaineann le paraidím díorthach a chríochnú mar chomhthreomhar le cur i gcrích paraidím infhillte. Tá samhlacha nua-aimseartha néarúla arna gcur in oiriúint ón tasc infhillte in ann raon na bpatrún díorthaithe a fhoghlaim, agus sáraíonn siad bonnlíne neamhnéarach faoi 16.4%. Mar sin féin, mar gheall ar bhreithnithe shéimeantacha, stairiúla agus foclóireachta a bhaineann le moirfeolaíocht díorthach, beidh gá le hobair amach anseo chun paireacht feidhmíochta a bhaint amach le córais ginte infhillte.', 'ka': 'კომპლექსიკური განვითარებული სიტყვების პრობლემა NLP-ში იყო გადარჩენებული პრობლემა. ჩვენ ამ განსხვავებას დავუყენებთ ნეიროლური განსხვავებული მოდელების დაყენებით. ჩვენ ვხედავთ ტეორეტიკური მოტივაციის პარადიგმატიკური მორცემებისთვის განვითარებული მოპორგოლოგიის პარადიგმატიკური მეტაციას და გავაკეთებთ განვითარებული პარადიგმის დასრულება როგორც პონალელი ინ ინფლექციის რაოდენობიდან აეპორტირებულია წარმოიდგინეთ ნეიროლური მოდელების განსაზღვრება შეუძლებელია გადასწავლა განსაზღვრებული შაბლოების განსაზღვრება და 16.4%-ის განსაზღვრე მაგრამ, სემონტიკური, ისტორიული და ლექსიკური შესახებ, რომლებიც დაკავშირებული მორფოლოგიაში, მომავალური სამუშაო მუშაობა იქნება, რომ გავაკეთოთ მუშაობის პარიტი, რო', 'hu': 'Az összetett származtatott szóformák generálása figyelmen kívül hagyott probléma volt az NLP-ben; Ezt a hiányt úgy töltjük ki, hogy neurális szekvencia-szekvencia modelleket alkalmazunk a feladathoz. Áttekintjük a derivációs morfológia paradigmatikus kezelésének elméleti motivációját, és bemutatjuk a derivációs paradigma kiegészítésének feladatát az inflexiós paradigma kiegészítésével párhuzamosan. Az inflexiós feladatból adaptált korszerű neurális modellek képesek megismerni a származási minták tartományát, és 16,4%-kal felülmúlják a nem neurális kiindulási értéket. A származtatott morfológiával kapcsolatos szemantikai, történelmi és lexikai megfontolások miatt azonban jövőbeli munkára lesz szükség az inflexiós rendszerekkel való teljesítményegyenlőség eléréséhez.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία σύνθετων παράγωγων μορφών λέξεων υπήρξε ένα παραβλέψιμο πρόβλημα στο NLP. Καλύπτουμε αυτό το κενό εφαρμόζοντας μοντέλα νευρωνικής αλληλουχίας στην εργασία. Εξετάζουμε το θεωρητικό κίνητρο για μια παραδειγματική αντιμετώπιση της παράγωγης μορφολογίας και εισάγουμε το έργο της ολοκλήρωσης του παράγωγου παραδείγματος ως παράλληλο με την ολοκλήρωση του καμπικού παραδείγματος. Τα σύγχρονα νευρωνικά μοντέλα προσαρμοσμένα από την εργασία καμπύλης είναι σε θέση να μάθουν το εύρος των προτύπων παραγώγων και να ξεπεράσουν μια μη-νευρωνική βάση κατά 16,4%. Ωστόσο, λόγω σημασιολογικών, ιστορικών και λεξιλογικών σκέψεων που εμπλέκονται στην παράγωγη μορφολογία, θα χρειαστεί μελλοντική εργασία για την επίτευξη ισοτιμίας απόδοσης με συστήματα παραγωγής κλίσης.', 'lt': 'Sudėtingų išvestinių žodžių formų sukūrimas buvo nepastebėta NLP problema; užpildomi šią spragą taikant neurologinius sekos modelius. We overview the theoretical motivation for a paradigmatic treatment of derivational morphology, and introduce the task of derivational paradigm completion as a parallel to inflectional paradigm completion.  Naujausieji neurologiniai modeliai, pritaikyti pagal įpurškimo užduotį, gali išsiaiškinti išvestinių modelių įvairovę ir 16,4 % viršyti ne neurologinį pradinį rodiklį. Tačiau dėl semantinių, istorinių ir leksinių priežasčių, susijusių su išvestine morfologija, ateityje reikės dirbti siekiant veiksmingumo lygybės su inflekciją sukeliančiomis sistemomis.', 'it': "La generazione di complesse forme di parola derivate è stato un problema trascurato nella PNL; Riempiamo questo vuoto applicando modelli neurali sequenza-sequenza al compito. Riassumiamo la motivazione teorica per un trattamento paradigmatico della morfologia derivativa e introduciamo il compito del completamento del paradigma derivativo come parallelo al completamento del paradigma flessionale. Modelli neurali all'avanguardia adattati dal compito di inflessione sono in grado di apprendere la gamma dei modelli di derivazione, e superano una linea di base non neurale del 16,4%. Tuttavia, a causa di considerazioni semantiche, storiche e lessicali coinvolte nella morfologia derivativa, sarà necessario lavorare in futuro per raggiungere la parità di prestazioni con i sistemi di generazione di flessioni.", 'mk': 'Генерацијата на сложени форми на зборови била пропуштен проблем во НЛП; ја пополнуваме оваа празнина со апликација на модели од нервна секвенца до секвенца на задачата. Ние ја прегледуваме теоретската мотивација за парадигматски третман на деринеционалната морфологија, и ја воведуваме задачата за комплетирање на деринеционалниот парадигм како паралелно со комплетирање на инфекционалниот парадигм. Стандардните нервни модели адаптирани од задачата за привлекување се во можност да го научат опсегот на шеми на дериминации, и да ја надминат нервната основа за 16,4 отсто. Сепак, поради семантичните, историските и лексичките размислувања вклучени во дерименталната морфологија, ќе биде потребна идна работа за постигнување паричност на резултатите со системите што генерираат инфекција.', 'kk': 'Комплекс келтірілген сөз пішімдерін құру NLP- де қарай көрінген мәселе болды. Бұл бос орын тапсырмаға невралдық реттеу үлгілерін қолдануға болады. Біз теориялық морфологияның парадигматикалық тәртібін қарастыру үшін теориялық мотивациясын қарастыру және түрлі парадигмді толтыру тапсырмасын инфекциялық парадигмді толтыру үшін келтіреміз. Инфлекциялық тапсырмасынан адаптер етілген невралдық моделдері түрлендіру үлгілерінің аумағын үйрене алады және невралдық негізгі жолын 16,4% дегенге жеткізе алады. Бірақ семантикалық, тарихлық және лексикалық маңыздылық морфологиясында қатысулардың себебі болашақ жұмыс инфлектциялық жасау жүйелерімен әсер ету үшін қажет болады.', 'ms': 'Jenerasi bentuk perkataan terhasil kompleks telah menjadi masalah yang terlepas dalam NLP; kita mengisi ruang ini dengan menggunakan model urutan-ke-urutan saraf untuk tugas. Kami memandang secara melihatkan motivasi teori untuk rawatan paradigm a morfologi derivasi, dan memperkenalkan tugas penyelesaian paradigma derivasi sebagai selari dengan penyelesaian paradigma inflectional. Model saraf state-of-the-art disesuaikan dari tugas inflection mampu belajar julat corak derivasi, dan melampaui dasar bukan saraf dengan 16.4%. Namun, kerana pertimbangan semantik, sejarah, dan leksikal yang terlibat dalam morfologi derivasi, kerja masa depan akan diperlukan untuk mencapai persamaan prestasi dengan sistem yang menghasilkan pengaruh.', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ forom kumplessi ta’ kliem derivati kienet problema injorata fil-NLP; nimlew din id-distakk billi napplikaw mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza newrali għall-kompitu. Aħna nħarsu lejn il-motivazzjoni teoretika għal trattament paradigmatiku tal-morfoloġija derivattiva, u nintroduċu l-kompitu tat-tlestija tal-paradigm a derivattiva bħala parallel għat-tlestija tal-paradigma inflezzjonali. Modelli newrali l-aktar avvanzati adattati mill-kompitu ta’ inflezzjoni huma kapaċi jitgħallmu l-firxa ta’ mudelli ta’ derivazzjoni, u jwettqu linja bażi mhux newrali b’16.4%. Madankollu, minħabba kunsiderazzjonijiet semantiċi, storiċi u lexiċi involuti fil-morfoloġija derivattiva, se jkun meħtieġ xogħol futur biex tinkiseb parità fil-prestazzjoni mas-sistemi li jiġġeneraw l-inflezzjoni.', 'ml': 'സംഭവിച്ച വാക്ക് രൂപങ്ങളുടെ തലമുറയാണ് NLP-ല്\u200d ഒരു പ്രശ്നം; ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ സ്പാപ്പ് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നു. We overview the theoretical motivation for a paradigmatic treatment of derivational morphology, and introduce the task of derivational paradigm completion as a parallel to inflectional paradigm completion.  പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് രാഷ്ട്രീതിയിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിന്റെ രീതികള്\u200d പ എന്നാലും സെമാന്റിക്, ചരിത്രത്തിലുള്ള, ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിചാരങ്ങളുടെ കാരണമാണ് ഭാവിയുടെ ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സിസ്റ്റീമുകളുട', 'no': 'Generasjonen av komplekse avgelerte ord- formar har vært eit oversikt problem i NLP. fyller vi denne mellomrommet ved å bruka neuralsekvens-til-sekvensmodeller til oppgåva. Vi oversjører teoretiske motivasjon for ein paradigmatisk behandling av derivasjonske morfologi, og introduserer oppgåva av derivasjonale paradigmsfullføring som ein parallell til infleksjonell paradigmsfullføring. Neyral-modeller som er tilpassa frå infleksjonsoppgåva kan lære området av deriveringsmønsteret og utføre eit ikkje-neural baseline med 16,4%. Men på grunn av semantiske, historiske og leksiske forståking som er involvert i derivasjonale morfologi, vil framtidige arbeid vere nødvendig for å oppnå utviklingsplaritet med infleksjonsgenereringssystemar.', 'mn': 'Комплекс үүсгэсэн үгний хэлбэрүүдийн үе нь NLP-д хамааралтай асуудал юм. бид үүнийг мэдрэлийн дарааллаас дарааллаар дүүргэдэг. Бид теоретикийн урам зориулалтыг хуваалцах урам зориулалтын парадигматикийн эмчилгээ дээр үзэж, урам зориулалтын парадигм дуусах үйл ажилыг нөлөөлөлтийн парадигм дуусгалттай параллел болгож тайлбарлаж байна. Урлагийн мэдрэлийн төвшин загварууд нөлөөлөлтийн даалгавараас зохицуулагдсан байгууллагын загваруудын хэсэг нь суралцаж, мэдрэлийн биш суурь шугам нь 16.4%-аар илүүтэй. Гэхдээ урсгалын морфологид оролцож байгаа семантик, түүх, лексикийн бодлого учраас ирээдүйн ажил нөлөөлөлт үйлдвэрлэх системтэй бүтээмжийг хүргэх хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'Generowanie złożonych pochodnych form słów jest problemem pomijanym w NLP; Wypełniamy tę lukę, stosując modele sekwencji neuronowej do zadania. Przeglądamy teoretyczną motywację do paradygmatycznego traktowania morfologii pochodnej oraz przedstawiamy zadanie uzupełniania paradygmatu pochodnego jako równoległość do uzupełniania paradygmatu inflekcyjnego. Najnowocześniejsze modele neuronowe dostosowane do zadania przekształcenia są w stanie nauczyć się zakresu wzorców pochodnych i przewyższać wartość bazową nieneuronową o 16,4%. Jednak ze względów semantycznych, historycznych i leksykalicznych związanych z morfologią pochodną, konieczne będą przyszłe prace w celu osiągnięcia parytetu wydajności z systemami generującymi przekształcenie.', 'ro': 'Generarea de forme de cuvinte derivate complexe a fost o problemă trecută cu vederea în PNL; Vom umple acest gol aplicând modele neuronale secvenţă-la-secvenţă la sarcină. Prezentăm motivația teoretică pentru un tratament paradigmatic al morfologiei derivative și introducem sarcina finalizării paradigmei derivative ca o paralelă cu finalizarea paradigmei inflexionale. Modelele neuronale de ultimă generație adaptate în funcție de sarcina de inflexiune sunt capabile să învețe gama de modele de derivație și să depășească o bază non-neurală cu 16,4%. Cu toate acestea, datorită considerațiilor semantice, istorice și lexicale implicate în morfologia derivată, vor fi necesare lucrări viitoare pentru a obține paritatea performanțelor cu sistemele generatoare de inflexiune.', 'so': 'Qarniga murugaysan oo soo saaray foomka ereyga waxay ahayd dhibaato laga dhaafay NLP; waxan ka buuxinaynaa burburka, si aan u dalbanno noocyada cudurada Waxaynu ka fiirinnaa dhaqdhaqaaqa cilmiga ah oo u baaraandegista dhaqdhaqaaqa morphologka, waxaana soo bandhignaynaa shaqada ku dhammaystirka iskudarka, si lamid ah oo u eg dhammaystirka iskudarka. Tusaalada neurada ee lagu sameeyo shaqada is-qabsashada waxay baran karaan noocyada jidhka, wuxuuna sameyn karaa saldhig aan neurada lahayn 16.4 boqolkiiba. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxaa loo baahan yahay in shaqada dambe la gaadho barwaaqo la xiriira nidaamka soo saara.', 'sv': 'Skapandet av komplexa härledda ordformer har varit ett förbisett problem i NLP. Vi fyller denna lucka genom att tillämpa neurala sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller för uppgiften. Vi överblickar den teoretiska motivationen för en paradigmatisk behandling av härledd morfologi, och introducerar uppgiften att härledd paradigmkomplettering som en parallell med böjande paradigmkomplettering. Toppmoderna neurala modeller anpassade från böjningsuppgiften kan lära sig intervallet av härledningsmönster och prestera bättre än en icke-neural baslinje med 16,4%. Men på grund av semantiska, historiska och lexikala överväganden som är involverade i härledd morfologi, kommer framtida arbete att behövas för att uppnå prestanda paritet med böjelsegenererande system.', 'sr': 'Generacija složenih formulara iz reèi bila je problem u NLP-u. ispunjavamo ovu prazninu primjenjivanjem modela neuralne sekvence do sekvence na zadatak. Pregledali smo teorijsku motivaciju za paradigmatsku tretmanu derivacijske morfologije i predstavljali zadatak završetka derivacijske paradigme kao paralelnu kompletnoj paradigmi. State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns, and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16,4%. Međutim, zbog semantičkih, istorijskih i leksičkih razmišljanja uključenih u derivacijsku morfologiju, budući rad će biti potreban za ostvarivanje paritete provedbe sa sistemima generiranja inflekcije.', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නය NLP වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා; අපි මේ අවස්ථාව පුරවන්නේ න්\u200dයූරල් ක්\u200dරමයක් වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරමයක් වෙනුවෙන්. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්න වැඩයෙන් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න න්\u200dයූරල් මෝඩේල් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විය, සහ 16.4% විතරක් න නමුත්, සෙමාන්ටික්, ඉතිහාසික්, ලෙක්සිකාලික් සිද්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට, අනාගතයේ වැඩේ අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා ප්\u200dරභාවිත', 'ur': 'پیچیدہ لفظ فرموں کی نسل NLP میں ایک مشکل ہے۔ ہم اس جگہ کو کام کے لئے نیورل کی سطح کے ذریعے مطابق بھر دیتے ہیں۔ ہم تئوریٹیکی مورفالژی کے معاملہ میں تئوریٹیکی مورفالژی کے ذریعہ تئوریٹیکی مورفالژی کو نظر انداز کر رہے ہیں، اور اپنا مورفالژی پارادیجیم پورا کرنے کا کام مشابہ کر رہے ہیں. اینٹر کی نئورل موڈلز جو اینٹریس ٹاکس سے اڈسٹ کیے گئے ہیں اڈریس پٹرونٹوں کی سیکھ سکتے ہیں اور 16.4% سے غیر نئورل بنسٹ لین کو اضافہ کرسکتے ہیں. However, due to semantic, historical and lexical considerations involved in derivational morphology, future work will be needed to achieve performance parity with inflection-generating systems.', 'ta': 'சிக்கலான வார்த்தை வடிவமைப்புகளின் உருவாக்கம் NLP ல் புறக்கணிக்கப்பட்ட பிரச்சனையாக இருக்கிறது; நாம் இந்த இடைவெளியை நிரப்புகிறோம் நாங்கள் ஒரு அளபுருக்கமான சிகிச்சைக்கான தியூரியல் ஊக்கத்தை கண்டறிந்து கொள்கிறோம் மற்றும் பொருள் அலகுமதிப்பு முடிவு செய்ய வேண்டும் கூட் தொகுப்பு பணியில் இருந்து ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் நிலைமை புதிய மாதிரிகள் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, வெளியீட்டு வடிவங்களை கற்றலாம், மற்றும்  ஆயினும், பாதிப்பு, வரலாற்று, மற்றும் மென்சிக்கல் கருத்துகளுக்கு சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, எதிர்கால வேலை செய்ய வேண்டும் பாகுபாடு உருவாக', 'uz': "Name bu gapni ishga qo'llash uchun neyural sequence-to-sequence modellarini ishga tushirish mumkin. Biz tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz va tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz va tashkilotni ishlab chiqaramiz, inflektiv paradigm to ʻliqligini o'zgartirish. Vazifaning vazifa tomonidan oʻzgartirilgan neyural modellari chegarasini o'rganish mumkin, va 16.4%bilanneyural asosiy bazasini ishga tushirish mumkin. Lekin, semantik, tarixi va leksikal murakkablariga murakkab o'zgarishga ega sababi, kelajak ishni tasdiqlash tizimi bilan ishlashi kerak.", 'vi': 'Sản xuất từ ngữ phát sinh phức tạp là một vấn đề bị bỏ qua ở Njala; Chúng ta lấp đầy khoảng trống này bằng cách áp dụng các mô hình phân tử thần kinh. Chúng ta xem xét động cơ lý thuyết cho việc điều trị theo lịch học hàng hóa, và giới thiệu công việc tiến hành mô hình bắt nguồn như song song với việc hoàn thành biểu tượng ngẫu nhiên. Các mô hình thần kinh cổ đại được thích nghi từ nhiệm vụ phun trào có khả năng học các mô hình bắt cóc, và thoát ra một đường cơ sở không-thần kinh theo hướng 16.4 Name Tuy nhiên, nhờ vào các quan điểm theo ngữ nghĩa, lịch sử và ngôn ngữ liên quan đến mức độ morphology, thì tương lai sẽ cần thiết phải làm việc để đạt được sự tương ứng giống với hệ thống tạo từ chối.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на сложни производни словесни форми е пренебрегнат проблем в НЛП; Ние запълваме тази празнина чрез прилагане на невронни модели последователност към последователност към задачата. Преглеждаме теоретичната мотивация за парадигматично третиране на деривационната морфология и въвеждаме задачата за завършване на деривационната парадигма като паралел на завършване на флексионната парадигма. Най-съвременните невронни модели, адаптирани от задачата за инфлекция, са в състояние да научат диапазона на моделите на деривация и да превъзхождат неневронната база с 16,4%. Въпреки това, поради семантични, исторически и лексикални съображения, свързани с деривативната морфология, ще бъде необходима бъдеща работа за постигане на паритет на производителността със системи, генериращи флексия.', 'hr': 'Generacija složenih formulara iz riječi bila je problem koji je u NLP-u pregledao; ispunjavamo taj praznik primjenjivanjem modela neuralne sekvence do sekvence na zadatak. Pregledamo teorijsku motivaciju za paradigmatsko liječenje derivacijske morfologije i predstavljamo zadatak završetka derivacijske paradigme kao paralelnu kompletnoj paradigmi. State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16,4%. Međutim, zbog semantičkih, istorijskih i leksičkih razmišljanja uključenih u derivacijsku morfologiju, bit će potreban budući rad za ostvarivanje paritete učinkovitosti s sustavima generiranja utjecaja.', 'da': 'Generationen af komplekse afledte ordformer har været et overset problem i NLP; Vi udfylder hullet ved at anvende neurale sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller til opgaven. Vi overblikker den teoretiske motivation til en paradigmatisk behandling af derivationsmorfologi, og introducerer opgaven med derivationsparadigmefærdiggørelse som en parallel til fleksionsparadigmefærdiggørelse. State-of-the-art neurale modeller tilpasset ud fra bøjleopgaven er i stand til at lære rækken af derivationsmønstre, og overperforme en ikke-neural baseline med 16,4%. Men på grund af semantiske, historiske og leksikske overvejelser involveret i derivationsmorfologi, vil fremtidigt arbejde være nødvendigt for at opnå præstationsparitet med bøjningsgenererende systemer.', 'nl': 'Het genereren van complexe afgeleide woordvormen is een over het hoofd gezien probleem in NLP; We vullen deze kloof door neurale sequentiemodellen toe te passen op de taak. We geven een overzicht van de theoretische motivatie voor een paradigmatische behandeling van derivatieve morfologie, en introduceren de taak van derivatieve paradigmacompletie als parallelle aan inflectionale paradigmacompletie. State-of-the-art neurale modellen aangepast aan de flexietaak kunnen het bereik van afleidingspatronen leren en een niet-neurale baseline met 16,4%. Vanwege semantische, historische en lexicale overwegingen die betrokken zijn bij afgeleide morfologie, zal echter toekomstig werk nodig zijn om prestatiepariteit te bereiken met inflectie-genererende systemen.', 'de': 'Die Generierung komplexer abgeleiteter Wortformen ist ein übersehenes Problem in NLP. Wir füllen diese Lücke, indem wir neuronale Sequenzmodelle auf die Aufgabe anwenden. Wir geben einen Überblick über die theoretische Motivation für eine paradigmatische Behandlung derivativer Morphologie und stellen die Aufgabe der derivativen Paradigmavervollständigung als Parallele zur reflexiven Paradigmavervollständigung vor. Modernste neuronale Modelle, die an die Flexionsaufgabe angepasst sind, können den Bereich der Ableitungsmuster erlernen und eine nicht-neuronale Baseline um 16,4%. Aufgrund semantischer, historischer und lexikalischer Überlegungen, die in der Derivationsmorphologie involviert sind, werden jedoch zukünftige Arbeiten erforderlich sein, um Performanceparität mit flexionsgenerierenden Systemen zu erreichen.', 'fa': 'نسل فرم\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cای در NLP یک مشکل غیر قابل توجه است. ما این فاصله را با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای ترکیب عصبی به ترکیب به کار پر می\u200cکنیم. ما motivation theoretical for a paradigmatic treatment of derivational morphology را تغییر نظر می\u200cکنیم و وظیفه کامل پارادیگرم derivational را به عنوان پارادیگرم تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهیم. مدل\u200cهای عصبی هنری که از وظیفه اثرات تغییر داده می\u200cشود قادر است که مدل\u200cهای الگوی اثرات را یاد بگیرد، و یک خط بنیادی غیر عصبی را به 16.4 درصد برساند. ولی به دلیل توجه\u200cهای semantic, historical and lexical considerations involved in derivational morphology، کار آینده نیاز خواهد بود تا با سیستم\u200cهای تولید تأثیر اجرای عملکرد به دست آورد.', 'ko': '복잡파 새 단어의 생성은 줄곧 NLP에서 무시되는 문제이다.우리는 신경 서열을 임무의 서열 모델에 응용함으로써 이 공백을 메운다.우리는 파생 형태학에 대해 모범 처리를 하는 이론적 동기를 개괄하고 파생 모범 완성 임무와 굴절 모범 완성 임무의 평행성을 소개했다.전환점 임무에 따라 개편된 가장 선진적인 신경모델은 파생모델의 범위를 학습할 수 있어 비신경기선보다 16.4% 높다.그러나 파생어법은 의미, 역사와 어휘에 대한 고려와 관련되기 때문에 미래의 작업은 굴절 생성 시스템의 성능 실현과 대등해야 한다.', 'id': 'Generasi bentuk kata terhasil kompleks telah menjadi masalah yang diabaikan di NLP; kita mengisi ruang ini dengan menggunakan model urutan saraf-ke-urutan untuk tugas. Kami memperlihatkan motivasi teori untuk perawatan paradigm a dari morfologi derivasi, dan memperkenalkan tugas menyelesaikan paradigma derivasi sebagai paralel dengan menyelesaikan paradigma infleksional. Model saraf state-of-the-art yang disesuaikan dari tugas infleksi mampu mempelajari jangkauan pola derivasi, dan melampaui batas dasar bukan saraf dengan 16,4%. Namun, karena pertimbangan semantis, sejarah dan lexik yang terlibat dalam morfologi derivasi, pekerjaan masa depan akan diperlukan untuk mencapai persamaan prestasi dengan sistem pembuatan infleksi.', 'tr': "Karmaşık çykan söz formlaryň döwletleri NLP'da gözden ýok bir mesele boldy. Biz bu boşluky täsirlere näyral sequence-to-sequence nusgalary üçin doldurýarys. Bir paradigmatik şekilde derivasyon morfolojisinin paradigmatik tedavisi için teorik motivasyonu duyuyoruz ve türü paradigmin tamamlamasını etkileyip başlatıyoruz. infleksiýa täblisinden uygulanan möhüm-sanat nural modelleri çykyş şarnlarynyň arasyny öwrenip bilýär we nural-baseliniň arasyndan 16.4%-a çenli çykyp bilýär. Ýöne, semantik, taryhy we çykyş morfologiýada rol alýan düşünjelere sebäbi gelejek işe etkinleşik tören sistemalar bilen ýetirmek üçin gerek bolar.", 'sw': 'Kizazi cha mfumo wa maneno magumu kimekuwa tatizo lililojitokeza nchini NLP; tunajaza gaidi hili kwa kutumia mifano ya mfululizo wa neura kwa mfululizo wa kazi. Tunaona msimamo wa msingi wa matibabu ya kimapenzi ya maadili ya kifolojia, na tunaonyesha jukumu la kumaliza vifaa vinavyotokana na vifaa vinavyotokana na kinachofanana na kumaliza vifaa vya kimbunga. Mradi wa neura ulioandaliwa na kazi ya kuhamasisha wanaweza kujifunza kiwango cha miundo ya kutengenezwa, na kutengeneza msingi wa kisasa kwa asilimia 16.4. Hata hivyo, kwa sababu ya mtazamo wa kimapenzi, kihistoria na uchunguzi unaohusika na folojia za kifo, kazi za baadae itahitajika kupata ushirikiano wa utendaji na mifumo ya uzalishaji.', 'sq': 'Gjenerata e formave komplekse të fjalëve të përdorura ka qenë një problem i harruar në NLP; ne e mbushim këtë boshllëk duke aplikuar modele nga sekuenca në sekuencë neurone në detyrë. Ne e shqyrtojmë motivimin teorik për një trajtim paradigmatik të morfologjisë derivative, dhe futim detyrën e kompletimit të paradigm ës derivative si një paralel me kompletimin e paradigmës inflektionale. Modelet neuronale të modernizuara të përshtatura nga detyra e përdorimit janë në gjendje të mësojnë gamën e modeleve të përdorimit dhe të kalojnë një bazë jo-neuronale me 16.4%. Megjithatë, për shkak të konsideratave semantike, historike dhe leksike të përfshira në morfologjinë derivuese, do të jetë e nevojshme puna e ardhshme për të arritur paritetin e performancës me sistemet që gjenerojnë ndikime.', 'af': "Die generasie van kompleks afgeleide woord vorms is 'n oorskynlike probleem in NLP; ons vul hierdie gap deur die toepassing van neural sekwensie-na-sekwensie-modele na die taak te doen. Ons oorskou die teorieese motivasie vir 'n paradigmatiese behandeling van afgeleide morfologie en introduseer die taak van afgeleide paradigme voltooiing as 'n parallele tot infleksionele paradigme voltooiing. State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns, and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16.4%. Maar vanweë semantiese, historiese en leksiese aandagings wat in afgeleide morfologie betrokke is, sal toekomstige werk benodig word om effektiepariteit te bereik met infleksie-genereering stelsels.", 'am': 'የአንድ ትውልድ የቃላት ፎርማቶች በNLP ውስጥ ተለይቶ ነበር፤ የናውራዊ ቁጥር ወደ ስራው መተላለፊያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የtheoretical motivation ለጥያቄ ሞሮፎሎጂ ለመቀበል እና የፍላጎት ፍላጎቱን ለመፈጸም እንደተያያየናል፡፡ አካባቢ አድራሻ የተጠቀመ የሁኔታ አካባቢ ሞዴላዎችን የሚያስተምሩ የግንኙነቱን ሥርዓት እና በ16.4 በመቶ ያልጠየቁትን የጥሩ መሠረት ማድረግ ይችላሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ማኅበረሰብ፣ ታሪካዊ እና የሌክሲካዊ ጥያቄ ምክንያት፣ የመጨረሻው ሥራ በጥያቄ ስርዓት ማድረግ ስርዓት ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի բարդ ձևերի սերունդը ՆԼՊ-ում անտեսված խնդիր է եղել: մենք լրացնում ենք այս տարբերությունը, օգտագործելով նյարդային հաջորդականության մոդելներ այս խնդրի վրա: Մենք ընդհանուր դիտարկում ենք նախատեսական մոտիվացիայի վերաբերյալ վերջնական մորֆոլոգիայի պարադիգմատիկ բուժումը և ներկայացնում ենք վերջնական պարադիգմային ավարտելու խնդիրը որպես զուգահեռ վերջնական պարադիգմային ավարտելուն: State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns, and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16.4%.  Այնուամենայնիվ, սեմանտիկ, պատմական և լեքսիկական դիտարկումների պատճառով, որոնք ներգրավված են արտադրյալ մորֆոլոգիայում, ապագա աշխատանքը կկարիք ունենա արտադրյալ համակարգերի հետ կապված արդյունավետության հավասարության հասնելու համար:', 'bn': 'এনএলপিতে জটিল শব্দ ফর্মের প্রজন্ম একটি সমস্যা ছিল। আমরা এই জায়গা পূর্ণ করি নিউরেল সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স মডেল প্রয়োগ করার মাধ্যমে। আমরা নৈতিক উদ্দেশ্য প্রতিষ্ঠানের প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য প্রতিযোগিতার উদ্দেশ্য পর্যবেক্ষণ করি এবং প্রভাবিক প্যারাডিম পূর্ণ করার কাজের সাথে তুলনা করি। স্টেট-অফ-শিল্পের নিউরেল মডেলটি প্রতিষ্ঠানের কাজ থেকে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়েছে তারা বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরন শিখতে পারবে এবং ১৬. তবে সেমেন্টিক, ঐতিহাসিক এবং লেক্সিক্যাল বিবেচনার কারণে প্রচণ্ড মরোফোলজিতে যুক্ত, ভবিষ্যতের কাজের প্রতিষ্ঠানের প্রতিষ্ঠানের প্', 'az': "Kompleksik yazılmış söz formlarının nəsili NLP'də çox gözəl bir problemi idi. Biz bu boşluğu işə nöral sequence-to-sequence modelləri uydurduq. Biz dəyişiklik morfolojinin paradigmatik tedavisinin teoriki motivasisini görürük və dəyişiklik paradigmin tamamlamasının işini infleksiyonel paradigmin tamamlamasına parallel olaraq tanıyırıq. Müəllif işindən uyğunlanan məlumatların məlumatlarının məlumatlarının səviyyəsini öyrənə bilər və nöral olmayan səviyyəsini 16.4%-dən art ıra bilər. Halbuki, təhrif morfolojində olan semantik, tarixi və leksik düşüncələrə görə, gələcək işlər infleksiyon-generator sistemləri ilə performans paritetini başa çatmaq üçün lazım olacaq.", 'bs': 'Generacija složenih formulara iz riječi bila je problem koji je u NLP-u pregledao; ispunjavamo tu prazninu primjenjivanjem modela neuralne sekvence do sekvence na zadatak. Pregledamo teorijsku motivaciju za paradigmatsku tretmanu derivacijske morfologije i predstavljamo zadatak završetka derivacijske paradigme kao paralelnu kompletnoj paradigmi. State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns, and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16,4%. Međutim, zbog semantičkih, istorijskih i leksičkih razmišljanja uključenih u derivacijsku morfologiju, budući rad će biti potreban za ostvarivanje paritete učinkovitosti sa sistemima generiranja inflekcije.', 'ca': "La generació de formes complexes de paraules derivades ha estat un problema ignorat en NLP; omplem aquest buit aplicant models seqüència a seqüència neuronal a la tasca. Veiem en general la motivació teòrica per un tractament paradigm àtic de la morfologia derivada, i introduim la tasca de la completació del paradigm a derivat com a parallela a la completació del paradigma inflexional. Els models neurals més avançats adaptats a partir de la tasca de inflexió són capaços d'aprendre l'abast de patrons de derivació, i superar un 16,4% el basal no neural. Però, a causa de consideracions semàntiques, històriques i lècsiques involucradas en la morfologia derivativa, serà necessària treball futur per aconseguir la paritat de rendiment amb els sistemes generadors de inflexió.", 'cs': 'Generování složitých odvozených slovních forem je v NLP přehlíženým problémem; tuto mezeru vyplníme aplikací neuronových modelů sekvence na sekvenci. Přehled teoretické motivace pro paradigmatické zacházení s derivační morfologií a představujeme úlohu kompletace derivačního paradigmatu jako paralelu s kompletací flexičního paradigmatu. Nejmodernější neuronové modely přizpůsobené flexičním úkolem jsou schopny naučit se rozsah derivačních vzorů a překonat non-neuronovou základnu o 16,4%. Nicméně vzhledem k sémantickým, historickým a lexikálním úvahům, které se týkají derivační morfologie, bude potřeba budoucí práce dosáhnout parity výkonu se systémy generujícími flexe.', 'et': 'Keeruliste tuletatud sõnavormide tekkimine on olnud uue õppekava probleem; Me täidame selle lünga, rakendades ülesandele närvijada-jada mudeleid. Anname ülevaate teoreetilisest motivatsioonist tuletise morfoloogia paradigmaatiliseks käsitlemiseks ja tutvustame tuletise paradigma lõpuleviimise ülesannet paralleelselt paindliku paradigma lõpuleviimisega. Tipptasemel närvimudelid, mis on kohandatud paindumisülesandest, suudavad õppida tuletamismustrite ulatust ja ületada mitte-närvilise lähtetaseme 16,4%. Tuletamismorfoloogiaga seotud semantiliste, ajalooliste ja leksikaalsete kaalutluste tõttu on siiski vaja tulevikus tööd, et saavutada jõudluspariteet paindlikkust tekitavate süsteemidega.', 'fi': 'Monimutkaisten johdettujen sanamuotojen syntyminen on ollut NLP:ssä unohdettu ongelma. Täytämme tämän aukon soveltamalla neurosekvenssimalleja tehtävään. Tarkastelemme teoreettista motivaatiota johdannaismorfologian paradigmaattiseen käsittelyyn ja esittelemme johdannaisparadigman täydennystehtävän rinnakkaisena taipumusparadigman täydennyksen kanssa. Uusimmat taipumustehtävästä sovitetut hermomallit pystyvät oppimaan johdannaiskuvioiden kirjon ja suoriutumaan ei-neuraalisista lähtökohdista 16,4 prosentilla. Johtamismorfologiaan liittyvien semanttisten, historiallisten ja leksikaalisten näkökohtien vuoksi tarvitaan kuitenkin tulevaisuudessa työtä, jotta suorituskykypariteetti saadaan aikaan taipumusta tuottavien järjestelmien kanssa.', 'he': 'הדור של צורות מילים מורכבות שנוצאות היה בעיה מתעלמת ב-NLP; אנחנו ממלאים את הפער הזה באמצעות השימוש של דוגמני רצף לרצף למשימה. אנו מסתכלים על המוטיבציה התאורטית לטיפול פרדיגמטי של מורפולוגיה התוצאות, ומציגים את המשימה של השלים של פרדיגמה התוצאות כמקביל לשלים פרדיגמה התוצאות. מודלים עצביים מוקדמים מתאימים משימת ההשפעה מסוגלים ללמוד את טווח הדפוסים של ההשפעה, ולהפוך מעבר לבסיס לא עצבי ב-16.4%. בכל אופן, בשל השקולות סמנטיות, היסטוריות ולקסיות שמעורבות במורפולוגיה התוצאות, תהיה צורך עבודה עתידית כדי להשיג שוויון ביצועים עם מערכות יוצרות השפעה.', 'ha': "Kijan tsarin kalmar da aka samu da shi ya kasance wata matalauci wanda aka ƙẽtare shi a cikin NLP; za mu cika wannan gaura da za'a samun misãlai na tsohon-zuwa-sequence zuwa aikin. Kayyar da aikin da aka samu da takardar mutfolojiya, kuma Mu ƙara aikin da ke cika paradigm da ke sami da kamfan da kammala fasadam. @ action: button A lokacin da, amma, aka buƙata kafaffiyar da masu sakan da ke cikin mutafani na dabar-dabar, za'a buƙata aikin da za'a sami muhimmanci da na'urar-zafi.", 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje kompleksnih izpeljanih besednih oblik je bil v NLP spregledan problem; To vrzel zapolnimo z uporabo modelov nevronskega zaporedja v zaporedje. Pregledamo teoretično motivacijo za paradigmatično obravnavo derivacijske morfologije in predstavimo nalogo dokončanja derivacijske paradigme kot vzporednika dokončanja inflekcijske paradigme. Najsodobnejši nevronski modeli, prilagojeni z nalogo inflekcije, so sposobni naučiti obseg vzorcev derivacije in preseči nevronsko osnovno vrednost za 16,4%. Vendar pa bo zaradi semantičnih, zgodovinskih in leksikalnih vidikov, vključenih v morfologijo derivacij, potrebno prihodnje delo za doseganje paritete zmogljivosti s sistemi, ki ustvarjajo infleksijo.', 'jv': 'Genjer-Genjer perusahaan kelas-kelas sing dikarepaké kelas nang NLP kuwi wis kelas mungkin; wrap Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan theoretik nggawe barang dumadhiné karo pertama karo pertama karo pertama alédong Stat-of-the-arts Neral model sing dadi kapan titimbal kelangan kelangan podho kelangan kelangan sampek dadi tanggal pararung, lan sumusulah akeh linen ne-Neral bu 16.4%. Saiki, ngentang semanti, dadi, lan akeh langgar sampeyan ingkang dipulangan oleh tarjamahan, iso dianggap kanggo ngerasakno punika ingkang dipulangan akeh sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan winih.', 'bo': 'ཆེས་རྙོག་འཛིང་གི་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་མི་ཚིག་རྣམས་ནི་NLP ནང་དུ་ཚོང་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་བར་སྟོང་འདི་དག་བྱས་པ་ལས་དབུལ་གྱི་གྲལ་རིམ་ལ་ལས་དབྱེ་རིམ་མཐུན་བཟོ་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། འུ་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་སྣེ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བལྟ་སྟངས་ཡོད། State-of-the-art neural models adapted from the inflection task are able to learn the range of derivation patterns, and outperform a non-neural baseline by 16.4%. ཡིན་ནའང་། semantic, historical, and lexical considerations involved in derivative morphology ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟེ། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་ལས་ཚོད་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་འཕར་རིས་ལུགས་སྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཚོར་ར'}
{'en': 'Do LSTMs really work so well for PoS tagging?   A replication study', 'ar': 'هل تعمل LSTMs جيدًا في وضع علامات PoS؟ - دراسة تكرار', 'es': '¿Funcionan realmente los LSTM para el etiquetado de PoS? — Un estudio de replicación', 'fr': 'Les LSTM fonctionnent-ils si bien pour le balisage des bons de commande\xa0? — Une étude de réplication', 'pt': 'Os LSTMs realmente funcionam tão bem para a marcação de PoS? – Um estudo de replicação', 'ja': 'LSTMは本当にPOSタグ付けにうまく機能しますか？ –複製研究', 'zh': 'LSTM果宜用于PoS乎? – 复制研究', 'ru': 'Действительно ли LSTM работают так хорошо для маркировки PoS? – Исследование репликации', 'hi': 'क्या एलएसटीएम वास्तव में पीओएस टैगिंग के लिए इतनी अच्छी तरह से काम करते हैं? – एक प्रतिकृति अध्ययन', 'ga': 'An n-oibríonn LSTManna chomh maith sin maidir le clibeáil PoS? – Staidéar macasamhlaithe', 'ka': 'LSTMs ნათჟრთნა ლთ პაბჲრწრ რჲლკჲგა ეჲბპვ ჱა ოჲS რვლვდთპაŒვ? რეპლიკური სწავლა', 'el': 'Τα LSTMs λειτουργούν τόσο καλά για την επισήμανση PoS; Μελέτη αντιγραφής', 'hu': 'Tényleg olyan jól működnek az LSTMek a PoS címkézéshez? replikációs vizsgálat', 'it': 'Gli LSTMs funzionano davvero così bene per il tag PoS? Uno studio di replicazione', 'lt': 'Ar LSTM tikrai taip gerai veikia PoS žymėjimui? replikacijos tyrimas', 'kk': 'LSTMs PoS тегтері үшін дұрыс жақсы жұмыс істейді бе? Репликация зерттеу', 'mk': 'Дали LSTMs навистина функционираат толку добро за поS означување? Студија за репликација', 'ms': 'Adakah LSTM benar-benar berfungsi dengan baik untuk penanda PoS? kajian replikasi', 'no': 'Verkeleg arbeider LSTMs så godt for PoS- merking? Name', 'mt': 'L-LSTMs jaħdmu tajjeb ħafna għat-tikkettar tal-PoS? Studju ta’ replikazzjoni', 'pl': 'Czy LSTMs naprawdę działają tak dobrze do tagowania PoS? Badanie replikacji', 'mn': 'LSTMs PoS-ийн тэмдэглээнд үнэхээр сайн ажилладаг уу? Дараагийн судалгаа', 'ro': 'LSTMs chiar funcționează atât de bine pentru etichetarea PoS? Un studiu de replicare', 'ml': 'എല്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിമിസ് പോസ് ടാഗിങ്ങിന് വളരെ നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ? ഒരു റിപ്പിക്ഷന്\u200d പഠനം', 'si': 'LSTMs ඇත්තටම පොස් ටැග් කරන්න හොඳට වැඩ කරනවද? ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමණ පරීක්ෂණයක්', 'sv': 'Fungerar LSTMs verkligen så bra för PoS taggning? - En replikationsstudie', 'sr': 'Da li LSTMs stvarno dobro radi za označavanje PoS-a? Proučavanje replikacije', 'ta': 'LSTMs உண்மையில் போஸ் ஒட்டுதலுக்கு நன்றாக வேலை செய்யுமா? Name', 'ur': 'کیا LSTMs پوس ٹاگ کے لئے بہت اچھا کام کرتا ہے؟ ایک مطالعہ', 'so': 'LSTMs ma si wanaagsan u shaqeeyaa baayacsiga PoS? A replication study', 'uz': '@ info Name', 'vi': 'Có phải LSTMT thực sự hoạt động tốt cho nhiếp ảnh gia gia? Nghiên cứu sao chép', 'nl': 'Werkt LSTMs echt zo goed voor PoS tagging? Een replicatieonderzoek', 'da': 'Virker LSTMs virkelig så godt til PoS tagging? - En replikationsundersøgelse', 'hr': 'Da li LSTMs stvarno dobro radi za označavanje PoS-a? Proučavanje replikacije', 'bg': 'Наистина ли ЛСТМ работят толкова добре за маркиране на PoS? Проучване за репликация', 'id': 'Apakah LSTM benar-benar bekerja begitu baik untuk penanda PoS? Sebuah studi replikasi', 'ko': 'LSTM은 정말 단어의 표시를 잘 할 수 있습니까? -복사 연구', 'de': 'Funktionieren LSTMs wirklich so gut für PoS-Tagging? Eine Replikationsstudie', 'fa': 'آیا LSTMs واقعا برای نشان\u200cگذاری POS خیلی خوب کار می\u200cکنند؟ یک مطالعه تکرار', 'sw': 'Je LSTMs anafanya kazi vizuri kwa ajili ya alama za PoS? Utafiti wa ufundi', 'sq': 'A funksionojnë LSTMs me të vërtetë kaq mirë për etiketat PoS? Një studim replikimi', 'am': 'LSTMs በውኑ ለPoS tagging እጅግ መልካም ይሠራልን? ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'LSTMsler PoS etiketlemek üçin gaty gowy işleýärlermi? Çykyş öwrenmesi', 'bn': 'এলস্টিমি কি পোস ট্যাগিং এর জন্য খুব ভাল কাজ করে? Name', 'af': "Doen LSTMs werk regtig so goed vir PoS merking? 'n replikasie studie", 'ca': 'Els LSTMs funcionen molt bé per a etiquetar PoS? Un estudi de replicació', 'az': 'LSTMs həqiqətən də PoS etiketi üçün çox yaxşı çalışır? Bir replikasyon təhsil', 'cs': 'Opravdu LSTMs fungují tak dobře pro PoS tagování? Replikační studie', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք LSMT-ները այնքան լավ են աշխատում PoS-ի նշանների համար: Կարճման ուսումնասիրությունը', 'et': 'Kas LSTMd töötavad tõesti nii hästi PoS märgistamisel? Replikatsiooni uuring', 'bs': 'Da li LSTMs stvarno dobro radi za označavanje PoS-a? Proučavanje replikacije', 'fi': 'Toimivatko LSTMs todella niin hyvin PoS taggingissa? Replikaatiotutkimus', 'sk': 'Ali LSTMs res delujejo tako dobro za označevanje PoS? Študija replikacije', 'ha': 'Shin, mai aiki ne mafi alhẽri ga tagogin PoS? QShortcut', 'he': 'Do LSTMs really work so well for PoS tagging? -  מחקר שיכפול', 'jv': 'Opo rawe lan GLTS tenan ngerti ngopo ? Workspace', 'bo': 'LSTMs ར་ཡིན་ན་PoS རྟགས་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལ་ལས་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནམ། ཚབ་བཟོ་ཞིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'A recent study by Plank et al. (2016) found that LSTM-based PoS taggers considerably improve over the current state-of-the-art when evaluated on the corpora of the Universal Dependencies project that use a coarse-grained tagset. We replicate this study using a fresh collection of 27 corpora of 21 languages that are annotated with fine-grained tagsets of varying size. Our replication confirms the result in general, and we additionally find that the advantage of LSTMs is even bigger for larger tagsets. However, we also find that for the very large tagsets of morphologically rich languages, hand-crafted morphological lexicons are still necessary to reach state-of-the-art performance.', 'ar': 'دراسة حديثة أجراها بلانك وآخرون. وجد (2016) أن علامات PoS المستندة إلى LSTM تتحسن بشكل كبير على أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا عند تقييمها في مجموعة مشروع التبعيات العالمية التي تستخدم مجموعة علامات خشنة. قمنا بتكرار هذه الدراسة باستخدام مجموعة جديدة من 27 مجموعة من 21 لغة مشروحة بمجموعات علامات دقيقة بأحجام مختلفة. يؤكد النسخ المتماثل النتيجة بشكل عام ، ونجد أيضًا أن ميزة LSTMs أكبر بالنسبة لمجموعات العلامات الأكبر. ومع ذلك ، نجد أيضًا أنه بالنسبة لمجموعة العلامات الكبيرة جدًا للغات الغنية شكليًا ، لا تزال المعاجم الصرفية المصنوعة يدويًا ضرورية للوصول إلى أحدث أداء.', 'fr': "Une étude récente de Plank et al. (2016) a révélé que les taggers PoS basés sur LSTM s'améliorent considérablement par rapport à l'état actuel de la technique lorsqu'ils sont évalués sur les corpus du projet Universal Dependencies qui utilisent un jeu de balises grossier. Nous reproduisons cette étude à l'aide d'une nouvelle collection de 27 corpus de 21 langues annotés avec des ensembles de balises à grain fin de taille variable. Notre réplication confirme le résultat en général, et nous constatons en outre que l'avantage des LSTM est encore plus grand pour les ensembles de balises plus importants. Cependant, nous constatons également que pour les très grands ensembles de balises de langues riches sur le plan morphologique, des lexiques morphologiques fabriqués à la main sont toujours nécessaires pour atteindre des performances de pointe.", 'pt': 'Um estudo recente de Plank et al. (2016) descobriram que os marcadores PoS baseados em LSTM melhoram consideravelmente em relação ao estado da arte atual quando avaliados nos corpora do projeto Dependências Universais que usam um conjunto de tags de granulação grossa. Replicamos este estudo usando uma nova coleção de 27 corpora de 21 idiomas que são anotados com conjuntos de tags refinados de tamanho variável. Nossa replicação confirma o resultado em geral e, além disso, descobrimos que a vantagem dos LSTMs é ainda maior para conjuntos de tags maiores. No entanto, também descobrimos que para os conjuntos de tags muito grandes de línguas morfologicamente ricas, léxicos morfológicos artesanais ainda são necessários para alcançar um desempenho de última geração.', 'es': 'Un estudio reciente de Plank et al. (2016) encontró que los etiquetadores PoS basados en LSTM mejoran considerablemente con respecto al estado actual cuando se evalúan en los corpus del proyecto Dependencias Universales que utilizan un conjunto de etiquetas de grano grueso. Replicamos este estudio utilizando una nueva colección de 27 corpus de 21 idiomas que están anotados con juegos de etiquetas de grano fino de diferentes tamaños. Nuestra replicación confirma el resultado en general y, además, descubrimos que la ventaja de los LSTM es aún mayor para los juegos de etiquetas más grandes. Sin embargo, también encontramos que para los juegos de etiquetas muy grandes de idiomas ricos en morfología, los léxicos morfológicos elaborados a mano siguen siendo necesarios para alcanzar un rendimiento de vanguardia.', 'ja': 'Plank et al .( 2016)の最近の研究では、LSTMベースのPoSタガーは、粗粒タグセットを使用するUniversal Dependenciesプロジェクトのコーパスで評価された場合、現在の最先端のものよりもかなり改善されることがわかった。この研究は、さまざまなサイズの細かいタグセットでアノテーションされた21言語の27のコーパの新鮮なコレクションを使用して複製します。私たちの複製は一般的にその結果を確認し、さらに、LSTMの利点は、より大きなタグセットにとってさらに大きいことがわかります。しかし、形態的に豊富な言語の非常に大きなタグセットにとって、最先端のパフォーマンスに到達するためには、手作りの形態学的辞書が依然として必要であることもわかっています。', 'zh': 'Plank等(2016)近者究之,于粗粒度标集通用依赖性项目之语料库上评之,盖LSTM之PoS标器先时最先进者标器有显改。 余以27一语料库新集复制之,语料库含21种语,并以大小细粒度标集注释。 吾复制总体证之,犹见大标集,LSTM势更大。 然亦见形之多言者,手工之形词典犹先进之需也。', 'hi': 'प्लैंक एट अल द्वारा हाल ही में किए गए एक अध्ययन (2016) में पाया गया कि एलएसटीएम-आधारित पीओएस टैगर्स वर्तमान राज्य-कला में काफी सुधार करते हैं जब सार्वभौमिक निर्भरता परियोजना के कॉर्पोरेट पर मूल्यांकन किया जाता है जो एक मोटे-दाने वाले टैगसेट का उपयोग करता है। हम इस अध्ययन को 21 भाषाओं के 27 कॉर्पोरेट के एक ताजा संग्रह का उपयोग करके दोहराते हैं जो अलग-अलग आकार के ठीक-ठाक टैगसेट के साथ एनोटेट किए जाते हैं। हमारी प्रतिकृति सामान्य रूप से परिणाम की पुष्टि करती है, और हम अतिरिक्त रूप से पाते हैं कि LSTMs का लाभ बड़े टैगसेट के लिए भी बड़ा है। हालांकि, हम यह भी पाते हैं कि रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं के बहुत बड़े टैगसेट के लिए, हाथ से तैयार किए गए रूपात्मक शब्दकोश अभी भी अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचने के लिए आवश्यक हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавнее исследование Plank et al. (2016) показало, что PoS-метки на основе LSTM значительно улучшаются по сравнению с текущим уровнем техники при оценке на корпусах проекта Universal Dependencies, которые используют грубозернистый набор меток. Мы воспроизводим это исследование, используя новую коллекцию из 27 тел 21 языка, которые аннотированы с мелкозернистыми тегами различного размера. Наша репликация подтверждает результат в целом, и мы дополнительно обнаруживаем, что преимущество LSTMs еще больше для больших тегов. Тем не менее, мы также обнаруживаем, что для очень больших тегов морфологически богатых языков, созданные вручную морфологические лексиконы все еще необходимы для достижения современной производительности.', 'ga': 'Rinne staidéar le déanaí le Plank et al. (2016) fuarthas amach go bhfuil feabhas suntasach ar chlibéirí PoS bunaithe ar LSTM thar an úrscothacht faoi láthair nuair a dhéantar meastóireacht orthu ar chorparáid an tionscadail Spleáchais Uilíoch a úsáideann tacar clibeanna garbh. Déanaimid an staidéar seo a mhacasamhlú ag baint úsáide as cnuasach úr de 27 corpora de 21 teanga atá anótáilte le clibeanna mínghlanta de mhéideanna éagsúla. Deimhníonn ár macasamhlú an toradh go ginearálta, agus feicimid freisin go bhfuil buntáiste LSTManna níos mó fós i gcás tacair chlibeanna níos mó. Mar sin féin, feicimid freisin go bhfuil foclóirí moirfeolaíocha lámhcheardaithe fós riachtanach chun feidhmíocht úrscothach a bhaint amach do na tacair mhóra de theangacha atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de.', 'hu': 'A Plank és mások közelmúltbeli tanulmánya (2016) megállapította, hogy az LSTM alapú PoS címkézők jelentős mértékben javulnak a jelenlegi korszerűséghez képest, ha az Universal Dependences projekt korpusait értékelik, amelyek durva szemű tagset-et használnak. Ezt a tanulmányt 21 nyelvből álló 27 korpusz friss gyűjteményével replikáljuk, amelyeket különböző méretű, finomszemcsés tagsetekkel jegyzetelünk fel. A replikációnk általánosságban megerősíti az eredményt, és azt is találjuk, hogy az LSTMs előnye még nagyobb a nagyobb tagsetek esetében. Ugyanakkor azt is megállapítjuk, hogy a morfológiailag gazdag nyelvek nagyon nagy tagszettjeinek még mindig szükségesek a kézzel készített morfológiai lexikonok a korszerű teljesítmény eléréséhez.', 'it': "Un recente studio di Plank et al. (2016) ha rilevato che i tag PoS basati su LSTM migliorano notevolmente rispetto all'attuale stato dell'arte quando vengono valutati sui corpora del progetto Universal Dependences che utilizzano un tagset a grana grossa. Riproduciamo questo studio utilizzando una nuova collezione di 27 corpora di 21 lingue che sono annotati con tagset a grana fine di varie dimensioni. La nostra replica conferma il risultato in generale, e scopriamo inoltre che il vantaggio degli LSTMs è ancora più grande per i tagset più grandi. Tuttavia, troviamo anche che per i tagset molto grandi di linguaggi morfologicamente ricchi, lessici morfologici artigianali sono ancora necessari per raggiungere performance all'avanguardia.", 'el': 'Μια πρόσφατη μελέτη του κ.α. (2016) διαπίστωσε ότι οι ετικέτες που βασίζονται στο LSTM βελτιώνονται σημαντικά σε σχέση με την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας όταν αξιολογούνται στα σώματα του έργου Οικουμενικές Εξαρτήσεις που χρησιμοποιούν ένα χονδρόκοκκο σύνολο ετικετών. Αναπτύσσουμε αυτή τη μελέτη χρησιμοποιώντας μια νέα συλλογή 27-σωμάτων 21-γλωσσών που έχουν σχολιαστεί με λεπτόκοκκες ετικέτες διαφορετικού μεγέθους. Η αντιγραφή μας επιβεβαιώνει το αποτέλεσμα γενικά, και επιπλέον διαπιστώνουμε ότι το πλεονέκτημα των είναι ακόμα μεγαλύτερο για μεγαλύτερα σύνολα. Ωστόσο, διαπιστώνουμε επίσης ότι για τις πολύ μεγάλες ετικέτες των μορφολογικά πλούσιων γλωσσών, τα χειροποίητα μορφολογικά λεξικά εξακολουθούν να είναι απαραίτητα για την επίτευξη της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας απόδοσης.', 'ka': 'Plank et al. (2016) აღმოჩნდა, რომ LSTM-based PoS taggers მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი პროექტის კოპორაზე, რომელიც გამოიყენებს სუფრო უფრო დაა ჩვენ ამ სწავლის გამოყენება 21 ენაში 27 კოპორაციის ახალი კოლექციაზე, რომელიც განსხვავებული ზომის კომპორაციაზე მონიშნულია. ჩვენი რეპიპუფიკაცია დარწმუნდება პირველ შედეგი, და ჩვენ დამატებით ვფიქრობთ, რომ LSTMs უფრო დიდი მაგრამებისთვის უფრო დიდია. მაგრამ ჩვენ ასევე აღმოჩნეთ, რომ მორპოლოგიურად ბედნიერი ენების ძალიან დიდი ტეგექტებისთვის მორპოლოგიური ლექსიკონები უკვე უნდა იყოს, რომ მიიღებთ მსგავსი კო', 'lt': 'Neseniai atliktame Plank et al. tyrime (2016 m.) nustatyta, kad LSTM pagrįsti PoS ženklai gerokai pagerėja, palyginti su dabartinėmis pažangomis, vertinant pagal Universal Dependencies projekto korprą, kuriame naudojamas didžiųjų grūdų ženklų rinkinys. We replicate this study using a fresh collection of 27 corpora of 21 languages that are annotated with fine-grained tagsets of varying size.  Mūsų replikacija patvirtina rezultatą apskritai, ir mes taip pat nustatome, kad LSTM pranašumas yra dar didesnis didesniams žymenų rinkiniams. Vis dėlto taip pat manome, kad labai dideliems morfologiškai turtingų kalbų ženklams rankinius morfologinius leksikonus vis dar būtina pasiekti pažangiausius rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешната студија на Планк и други (2016) покажа дека означувачите на ЛСТМ базирани на ПоС значително се подобруваат во однос на сегашната техничка состојба кога се оценуваат на корпората на проектот Универзални зависности кој користи грубо-зелен означувач. Ние ја репликираме оваа студија користејќи нова колекција од 27 тела од 21 јазик кои се анотирани со фино зелени тагети од различна големина. Нашата репликација го потврдува резултатот генерално, и додатно откриваме дека предноста на ЛСТМ е уште поголема за поголеми тагети. Сепак, исто така, откриваме дека за многу големите ознаки на морфолошки богати јазици, рачно направени морфолошки лексикони се сé уште неопходни за да се постигнат најсовремени изведувања.', 'ms': 'Pelajaran baru-baru ini oleh Plank et al. (2016) mendapati bahawa tag PoS berasaskan LSTM meningkat jauh lebih daripada keadaan-keadaan semasa apabila diteliti pada korpra projek Dependenci Universal yang menggunakan set tag berubah lebar. Kami mereplikasikan kajian ini menggunakan koleksi segar dari 27 korpra dari 21 bahasa yang dicatat dengan set tag berwarna gandum yang berbeza saiz. Replikasi kami mengesahkan hasil secara umum, dan kami tambahan mendapati keuntungan LSTM lebih besar untuk set tag yang lebih besar. Namun, kita juga mendapati bahawa bagi set tag yang sangat besar bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik, leksikon morfologik buatan tangan masih diperlukan untuk mencapai prestasi terbaik.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы Plank et al. (2016) зерттеулері LSTM-негіздеген PoS тегжерлерінің қазіргі әлемдік тәуелсіздік жобасының корпорасындағы тегжерлері қолданылатын әлемдік тәуелсіздік жобасының корпорасында жақсы жасайды. Бұл зерттеулерді 21 тілдің 27 корпорасының жаңа жинақтарын қолдануға көмектесеміз. Бұл зерттеулерді өзгертілген өлшемдердің жаңа тегтерімен жаңа жинақтарымен жаңа жина Біздің репликациямыз жалпы нәтижесін тексереді, және біз қосымша, LSTMs-нің артықшылығы үлкен тегтер үшін үлкен деп табылады. Бірақ біз сондай-ақ морфологиялық баяны тілдердің үлкен тегтері үшін қол құрылған морфологикалық лексикондар әлі қажетті болып табылады.', 'mn': 'Plank et al. (2016) саяхан судалгаагаар LSTM-д суурилсан PoS-ийн тэмдэглэгчид орчин үеийн урлагийн төслийн корпора дээр дүгнэхэд үнэхээр сайхан хөгжүүлдэг. Бид энэ судалгааг 21 хэл дээрх 27 корпора цэвэр цуглуулах хэрэгтэй хуваалцаж байна. Бидний хариулт нь ерөнхийдөө үр дүнг тодорхойлдог. Мөн бид нэмэлтэй нь LSTMs-ийн давуу талыг илүү том хэмжээнд олж мэднэ. Гэхдээ бид мөн морфологийн баян хэл, гар бүтээгдэхүүний морфологик лексиконууд урлагийн үйл ажиллагаанд хүрэх хэрэгтэй гэдгийг олж мэднэ.', 'no': 'Ein nyleg studie av Plank et al. (2016) fant at LSTM-baserte PoS-taggere betydelig forbedrar over den gjeldande kunsttilstanden når det er evaluert på korporen av den universele avhengighetsprosjektet som brukar eit merkelapp som er avgrensa. Vi kopierer denne studien med eit nytt samling av 27 korporar av 21 språk som er merkt med fin korn merkelappar med ulike storleik. Replikasjonen vårt stadfestar resultatet generelt, og vi finn tillegg at fordelen av LSTMs er enda større for større merkelappar. Men vi finn også at for dei store merkelappene av morfologisk rike språk er det fortsatt nødvendige for å nå tilstanden av kunsten.', 'mt': 'A recent study by Plank et al. (2016) found that LSTM-based PoS taggers considerably improve over the current state-of-the-art when evaluated on the corpora of the Universal Dependencies project that use a coarse-grained tagset.  Aħna nirreplikaw dan l-istudju billi nużaw ġabra ġdida ta’ 27 korpra ta’ 21 lingwa li huma annotati b’settijiet ta’ tikketti ta’ ħbub fin ta’ daqs varju. Ir-replikazzjoni tagħna tikkonferma r-riżultat b’mod ġenerali, u barra minn hekk isibu li l-vantaġġ tal-LSTMs huwa saħansitra akbar għal settijiet akbar ta’ tikketti. Madankollu, isibu wkoll li għal settijiet kbar ħafna ta’ lingwi morfoloġikament rikki, il-lexikoni morfoloġiċi maħduma bl-idejn għadhom meħtieġa biex jilħqu l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata.', 'ro': 'Un studiu recent realizat de Plank et al. (2016) a constatat că etichetele PoS bazate pe LSTM se îmbunătățesc considerabil față de starea actuală a tehnologiei atunci când sunt evaluate pe corpurile proiectului Universal Dependences care folosesc un tagset grosier. Reproducem acest studiu folosind o colecție proaspătă de 27 de corpuri din 21 de limbi care sunt adnotate cu tagseturi fine de dimensiuni diferite. Reproducerea noastră confirmă rezultatul în general și constatăm în plus că avantajul LSTMs este și mai mare pentru tagseturi mai mari. Cu toate acestea, constatăm, de asemenea, că pentru tagseturile foarte mari de limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic, lexicoane morfologice lucrate manual sunt încă necesare pentru a atinge performanțe de ultimă generație.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badanie Planka i wszystkich. (2016) wykazało, że tagery PoS oparte na LSTM znacznie poprawiają się w porównaniu z obecnym stanem techniki, gdy oceniają korpusy projektu Universal Dependencies, które używają gruboziarnistego tagsetu. Powtarzamy to badanie wykorzystując świeżą kolekcję 27 korpusów 21-języków, które są adotatowane drobnoziarnistymi tagsetami o różnej wielkości. Nasza replikacja potwierdza ogólnie wynik, a dodatkowo zauważamy, że zaleta LSTMów jest jeszcze większa w przypadku większych tagsetów. Stwierdzimy jednak również, że dla bardzo dużych tagsetów języków bogatych morfologicznie, ręcznie wykonane leksykony morfologiczne są nadal niezbędne do osiągnięcia najnowocześniejszej wydajności.', 'ml': 'പ്ലാങ്ക് എറ്റ് അല്\u200d. (2016) അടുത്തൊരു പഠനം കണ്ടെത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയിലുള്ള LSTM-അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള പോസ്സ് ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കോര്\u200dപ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പഠനം മാറ്റുന്നത് 27 കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ 21 ഭാഷകളുടെ ഒരു പുതിയ സംഘത്തിന് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മാറ്റുന്നു. അത് നല്ല കൈക്കൊള്ളുന് നമ്മുടെ പ്രതികരണം പൊതുവിലെ ഫലം ഉറപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു LSTMs ന്റെ ഉപകാരം വലിയ ടാഗ്സെറ എന്നാലും നമ്മളും കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, ഏറ്റവും വലിയ മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കായി കൈക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള മൊര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കോന്\u200dസ', 'si': 'A new study by Plank et al. (2016) find that LSTM-based POS Taggers have seen a lot better over the ongoing state-of-the-art, in evangelation on the CorCorCorcora of the Universal Dependencies ProJECT that use a coarse-grened Tagset. а¶…а¶ҙа·’ а¶ёа·ҡ а¶ҙа¶»а·“а¶ҡа·Ҡа·Ӯа¶«а¶ә а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а¶ӯа·’а¶ҡа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а·’а¶әа·Ҹ а¶ҡа¶»а¶ұа·Җа·Ҹ а·Җа¶»а·Ҡа¶ңа¶әа¶ҡа·Ҡ а·Җа·ҷа¶ұа·ға·Ҡ а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а¶ёа·Ҹа¶«а¶әа¶ҡа·Ҡ а¶ӯа·’а¶әа·ҷа¶ұа·Ҡа¶ұа·ҡ а¶·а·Ҹа·Ӯа·Ҹа·Җа¶Ҫа·Ҡ 21 а¶ҡа·ңа¶»а·Ҡа¶ҙа·қа¶»а·Ҹ 27а¶ҡа·Ҡ а·ға¶ёа·Ҡа¶ёа·–а¶ӯа·’а¶әа¶ҡ а¶…а¶ҙа·ҡ а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а¶ӯа·’а¶\xa0а·Ҹа¶»а¶ә а·ға·Ҹа¶ёа·Ҹа¶ұа·ҠвҖҚа¶ә а·Җа·’а¶Ҝа·’а¶әа¶§ а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а¶ӯа·’а¶\xa0а·Ҹа¶»а¶әа¶ҡа·Ҡ а¶ӯа·’а¶әа·ҷа¶ұа·Җа·Ҹ, а¶’ а·Җа¶ңа·ҡа¶ё а¶…а¶ҙа·’ а¶ӯа·Җа¶ӯа·Ҡ а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а¶ӯа·’а¶\xa0а·Ҹа¶»а¶әа¶ҡа·Ҡ а·„а·ңа¶әа·Ҹа¶ңа¶ұа·Ҡа¶ұа·Җа·Ҹ LSTMs а¶ңа·ҡ а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а¶ә а¶ұа¶ёа·”а¶ӯа·Ҡ, а¶…а¶ҙа·’ а·„а·ңа¶әа·Ҹа¶ңа¶ӯа·Ҡа¶ӯа·Ҹ а¶’ а·Җа¶ңа·ҡа¶ё а¶ёа·ңа¶»а·Ҡа·Ҷа·қа¶Ҫа·қа¶ўа·’а¶ҡ а·Җа·’а·Ға·Ҹа¶Ҫ а¶·а·Ҹа·Ӯа·Ҹа·Җа¶ұа·Ҡа¶ңа·ҡ а¶ңа·ңа¶©а¶ҡа·Ҡ а¶Ҫа·ңа¶ҡа·” а¶§а·җа¶ңа·Ҡ а·ға·ҷа¶§а·Ҡа¶§а·Ҡ а·Җа¶Ҫа¶§, а¶…а¶ӯа·Ҡ а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а·Җа·ҳа¶ӯа·Ҡа¶ӯа·’а¶ә а¶ҙа·ҠвҖҚа¶»а·Җ', 'sv': 'En nyligen genomförd studie av Plank m.fl. (2016) fann att LSTM-baserade PoS-taggare förbättras avsevärt jämfört med nuvarande state-of-the-art när de utvärderas på corpora av Universal Dependences-projektet som använder en grovkornig tagset. Vi replikerar denna studie med hjälp av en färsk samling av 27 korpor med 21 språk som är kommenterade med finkorniga tagset av varierande storlek. Vår replikering bekräftar resultatet generellt, och vi finner dessutom att fördelen med LSTMs är ännu större för större tagset. Men vi finner också att för de mycket stora tagsets av morfologiskt rika språk är handgjorda morfologiska lexikon fortfarande nödvändiga för att nå toppmoderna prestanda.', 'ta': 'ஒரு சமீபத்தில் ப்ளாங்க் மற்றும் அல். (2016) ஒரு பட்டியல் கண்டுபிடித்தால் LSTM-அடிப்படையில் போஸ் குறிகள் தற்போதைய நிலையில் உள்ள கலைஞர்களை மேலும் மேம்படுத்துகிறது என் நாம் இந்த படிப்பாட்டை மாற்றியமைக்கப்பட்ட 27 கோர்போரா 21 மொழிகளின் புதிய தொகுப்பை பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றியமைக்கிறோம். இது  எங்கள் பதில் முடிவை பொதுவாக உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும் நாம் கூடுதலாக LSTMs இன் பயன்பாடு அதிகப்பெரிய ஒட்டுக்களுக்கு ம ஆனாலும், நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் என்றாலும் மிகவும் பெரிய ஒட்டுப்பொருளான வளர்ந்த மொழிகளுக்கு, கையில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட மார்', 'ur': 'Plank et al. (2016) نے اچھی تحقیق کی کہ LSTM-based PoS ٹاگروں نے موجود state-of-the-art پر بہت زیادہ اچھی بات کی جبکہ ارومیل Dependencies پروژے کے کوپور پر ارزش کی جاتی ہے جو ایک کورس-grained ٹاگرسٹ استعمال کرتی ہے. ہم نے اس مطالعہ کو 21 زبانوں کے 27 تازہ ترکیب کے مطالعہ سے دفع کیا ہے جو بہترین دانے کے ٹیجسٹ سے متفاوت ہیں۔ ہماری جواب کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ نتیجہ عمومی کے ساتھ ہے، اور ہم اضافہ طور پر دیکھتے ہیں کہ LSTMs کا فائدہ بڑے ٹاگنٹوں کے لئے بہت بڑا ہے. لیکن ہم نے بھی دیکھا ہے کہ مورفولوژیکی ثروت زبانوں کے بہت بڑے ٹاگزٹ کے لئے ہاتھ بنائے ہوئے مورفولوژیکوں کی لکھائی ابھی بھی ضرورت ہے کہ ان کی حالت کی فعالیت تک پہنچ سکیں۔', 'sr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje Plank a et al. (2016) otkrilo je da se značajno poboljšavaju oznake PoS na LSTM-u nad trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti kada su procenili na korporaciji projekta Univerzalnih zavisnosti koji koristi kompletu prezrenih oznake. Mi kopiramo ovu studiju sa novom kolekcijom 27 korpora od 21 jezika koja su notirana sa finom zrnom oznakem različitih veličina. Naša replikacija potvrđuje rezultat uopšte, i dodatno otkrivamo da je prednost LSTMs još veća za veće etikete. Međutim, takođe smatramo da su za veoma velike oznake morfološki bogatih jezika, morfološki leksikoni koji su napravljeni rukama i dalje neophodni za postizanje stanja umjetnosti.', 'so': "A recent study by Plank et al. (2016) found that LSTM-based PoS taggers considerably improve over the current state-of-the-art when evaluated on the corpora of the Universal Dependencies project that use a coarse-grained tagset.  Waxbarashadan waxaynu ku bedelaynaa urur cusub oo 27 shirkadood oo ah 21 luuqadood oo lagu dhibayo tiro kala duduwan. Jawaabteenu wuxuu xaqiijiyaa dhamaadka, waxaana kaloo ognahay in faa'iidada LSTMs ay ka weyn tahay tageecada waaweyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaynu ognahay in looga baahdo alaabta aad u waaweyn oo luuqadaha hodanka ah ee morphologicalka ah ayaa weli loo baahan yahay in lagu gaadho bandhigyada farshaxanka.", 'uz': "Yaqinda Plank et al. (2016) asosida LSTM asosiy PoS taglarini ko'rsatadi, koʻp qo'llangan taglardan foydalanadigan Universal Dependencies projektining kompaniyatiga qiymatlashda, Joriy kuni holatda o'zgartiradi. Biz bu o'rganishni 21 tillar bir yangi bir necha toʻplam yordamida almashtirishmiz. Ularning ko'plab turli oʻlchami bilan bog'liq yozuvlar bilan bir necha toʻplamlar. @ info Lekin biz ko'pchilik yordamchi ko'pchilik yordamlar uchun, qo'llab qo'llangan morfologik leksikalari hodisa bajarishga kerak.", 'vi': 'Một nghiên cứu gần đây của Plank et al. (thẩm 6) cho thấy các nhóm ám ảnh dựa trên LSTM đã cải thiện đáng kể hơn trạng thái hiện đại khi được đánh giá về cơ thể của dự án Chuyên môn chung mà sử dụng các trường độ dày đặc. Chúng tôi sao chép nghiên cứu này bằng một bộ sưu tập mới của tàu hạ sĩ 27 của 21 sẽ được ghi chú với các biển màu sắc khác nhau có kích cỡ khác nhau. Sự mô phỏng của chúng tôi xác nhận kết quả chung, và chúng tôi cũng nhận thấy rằng lợi thế của LSD còn lớn hơn cho các tác phẩm lớn hơn. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi cũng tìm thấy rằng trong các trường hợp lớn của các ngôn ngữ giàu lịch sử, ngôn ngữ lịch sử tự động tay tạo ra vẫn cần thiết để đạt được trình độ hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Неотдавнашно проучване на Планк и др. (2016) установи, че базираните на ЛСТМ маркировки значително се подобряват в сравнение с настоящото състояние на изкуството, когато се оценяват на корпусите на проекта Универсални зависимости, които използват грубозърнести тагове. Ние репликираме това изследване, използвайки прясна колекция от 27 корпора от 21 езика, които са анотирани с фино зърнести тагсети с различен размер. Нашата репликация потвърждава резултата като цяло и освен това откриваме, че предимството на ЛСТМ е още по-голямо за по-големи тагсети. Въпреки това, ние също така откриваме, че за много големите тагове на морфологично богати езици, ръчно изработени морфологични лексикони все още са необходими, за да се постигне най-съвременно изпълнение.', 'nl': 'Een recent onderzoek van Plank et al. (2016) heeft aangetoond dat LSTM-gebaseerde PoS-taggers aanzienlijk verbeteren ten opzichte van de huidige state-of-the-art wanneer ze worden geëvalueerd op de corpora van het Universal Dependencies project die een grove tagset gebruiken. We repliceren deze studie met behulp van een nieuwe verzameling 27-corpora van 21-talen die zijn geannoteerd met fijnkorrelige tags van verschillende grootte. Onze replicatie bevestigt het resultaat in het algemeen, en we vinden bovendien dat het voordeel van LSTMs nog groter is voor grotere tags. We vinden echter ook dat voor de zeer grote tagsets van morfologisch rijke talen, handgemaakte morfologische lexicons nog steeds nodig zijn om state-of-the-art prestaties te bereiken.', 'da': 'En nylig undersøgelse af Plank et al. (2016) viste, at LSTM-baserede PoS taggere forbedrer sig betydeligt i forhold til den nuværende state-of-the-art, når de evalueres på korpora af Universal Dependences projektet, der bruger en grovkornet tagset. Vi replikerer denne undersøgelse ved hjælp af en frisk samling af 27 korpora af 21 sprog, der er annoteret med finkornede tagsæt af varierende størrelse. Vores replikering bekræfter resultatet generelt, og vi finder desuden, at fordelen ved LSTMs er endnu større for større tagsets. Men vi finder også, at for de meget store tagsets af morfologisk rige sprog er håndlavede morfologiske leksikoner stadig nødvendige for at nå state-of-the-art performance.', 'id': 'Sebuah studi baru-baru ini oleh Plank et al. (2016) menemukan bahwa tagger PoS berdasarkan LSTM konsideratif meningkat atas keadaan-state-of-the-art saat diteliti pada korpra proyek Universal Dependencies yang menggunakan tagset terbesar. Kami mereplikasikan studi ini menggunakan koleksi segar dari 27 korpra dari 21 bahasa yang dicatat dengan tagset-bijian yang berbeda ukuran. Replikasi kami mengkonfirmasi hasilnya secara umum, dan kami tambahan menemukan bahwa keuntungan LSTM bahkan lebih besar untuk tag set yang lebih besar. Namun, kami juga menemukan bahwa untuk tagset yang sangat besar bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis, lexikon morfologi yang dibuat tangan masih diperlukan untuk mencapai prestasi terbaik.', 'de': 'Eine aktuelle Studie von Plank et al. (2016) ergab, dass LSTM-basierte PoS-Tagger sich gegenüber dem aktuellen Stand der Technik deutlich verbessern, wenn sie auf Korpora des Universal Dependencies-Projekts ausgewertet werden, die ein grobkörniges Tagset verwenden. Wir replizieren diese Studie mit einer neuen Sammlung von 27-Korpora von 21-Sprachen, die mit feinkörnigen Tagsets unterschiedlicher Größe kommentiert sind. Unsere Replikation bestätigt das Ergebnis im Allgemeinen, und wir stellen zusätzlich fest, dass der Vorteil von LSTMs bei größeren Tagsets noch größer ist. Wir finden aber auch, dass für die sehr großen Tagsets morphologisch reicher Sprachen handgefertigte morphologische Lexikone immer noch notwendig sind, um State-of-the-Art Performance zu erreichen.', 'ko': '프랭크 등(2016년)의 최근 연구에 따르면 굵은 입도 표기집을 사용하는 유니버설 디펜던스 프로젝트 어료 라이브러리에서 평가를 할 때 LSTM 기반 어성 표기기가 현재의 기술 수준보다 크게 향상된 것으로 나타났다.우리는 21개 언어의 27개 자료 라이브러리의 새로운 집합을 사용하여 이 연구를 복제했는데, 이 자료 라이브러리들은 서로 다른 크기의 세립도 표기집으로 주석을 달았다.우리의 복제는 전체적으로 이 결과를 증명했고, 그 밖에 비교적 큰 표지 집합에 대해 LSTM의 장점이 더욱 크다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 형태가 풍부한 언어의 대형 표기집에 대해 수공으로 만든 형태 어휘는 여전히 가장 선진적인 성능을 달성하는 데 필수적이라는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'A recent study by Plank et al. (2016) found that LSTM-based PoS taggers considerably improve over the current state-of-the-art when evaluated on the corpora of the Universal Dependencies project that use a coarse-grained tagset.  Tunaibadilisha utafiti huu kwa kutumia mkusanyiko mpya wa makampuni 27 ya lugha 21 ambazo huguswa na vifaa vinavyochanganyika vizuri. Maitikio yetu yanathibitisha matokeo kwa ujumla, na kwa nyongeza tunagundua kuwa faida ya LSTMs ni kubwa zaidi kwa seti kubwa. Hata hivyo, tunagundua kuwa kwa viungo vikubwa vingi vya lugha zenye utajiri wa kimaadilojia, leuksi wenye mikono ya kisiasa bado ni muhimu ili kufikia utendaji wa sanaa.', 'hr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje Plank et al. (2016) utvrdilo je da značajno poboljšavaju oznake PoS na LSTM-u nad trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti kada je procjenjeno na korporaciji projekta Univerzalne zavisnosti koji koristi vrhunski oznake. Mi kopiramo ovu studiju s novom kolekcijom 27 tijela od 21 jezika koje su notirane finom zrnom oznakem različitih veličina. Naša replikacija potvrđuje rezultat općenito, a dodatno otkrivamo da je prednost LSTMs još veća za veće oznake. Međutim, također smatramo da su za veoma velike oznake morfološki bogatih jezika, morfološki leksikoni koji su napravljeni rukama još uvijek potrebni za postizanje stanja umjetnosti.', 'sq': 'Një studim i fundit nga Plank et al. (2016) gjeti se etiketat PoS me bazë në LSTM përmirësohen konsiderueshmërisht lidhur me gjendjen aktuale të teknologjisë kur vlerësohen në korprën e projektit Universal Dependencies që përdorin një grup etiketash me kokrra të mëdha. Ne e përsërisim këtë studim duke përdorur një koleksion të freskët prej 27 corpora prej 21 gjuhësh që janë shënuar me etiketa të hollësishme të madhësisë së ndryshme. Përpjekja jonë konfirmon rezultatin në përgjithësi, dhe ne gjithashtu gjejmë se avantazhi i LSTMs është edhe më i madh për tagset më të mëdha. Megjithatë, gjejmë gjithashtu se për etiketat e mëdha të gjuhëve morfologjikisht të pasura, lexikonet morfologjike të ndërtuara me dorë janë ende të nevojshme për të arritur shfaqjen më të lartë.', 'tr': 'Plank et al. (2016) tarapyndan soňky bir öwrenme üçin LSTM tabanly PoS taglarynyň häzirki möhüm taýýarlarynda Uniwersal Baýumlyklar Projesinde deňlenýän wagtyň üstünde has gowurak gelinýändigini öňdi. Bu okuwçyny 21 diliň täze bir kopora ullanýan, beýleki toparlar bilen duýýan täze bir topar bilen koplaýarys. Biziň ýagdaýymyz umumy netijesini tassyklaýar, we biz hem LSTMyň üstünlikleriniň uly tägler üçin has hem uly tägler üçin uly tägleriň bardygyny tapýarys. Ýöne biz hem morfolojik baý dilleriniň örän uly tägleri üçin, elimizden gelen morfolojik leksiýalaryň durumyny ýetmek üçin hala gerek bolýar.', 'am': 'በፕላንክ እና አል (2016) የቅርብ ትምህርት በኮርፖርት ላይ በተመሳሳይ የዓለማዊ ድጋፍ ፕሮጀክት ፕሮጀክት የኮርፖርት ፕሮጀክት የኮርፖርት ግንኙነትን የሚጠቅመውን LSTM-መሠረት ታቦቶችን በአሁኑ የዓለማዊ ድጋፍ ግንኙነት ላይ እንዲያበዛ አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህንን ትምህርት በተለየ ጥሩ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች በተለየ 27 ኮርፖራ የ21 ቋንቋዎች አዲስ ሰብስብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ መልዕክታችን ፍሬውን በሙሉ ያረጋግጣል፣ እናም የLSTMs ጥቅም ለትልቁ መዝገብ ትልቅ እንደሆነ እናገኛለን፡፡ እንግዲህ ደግሞ ለብዙ የሞፎሎጂ ባለ ሀብታሞች ቋንቋዎች፣ እጆቹ የሞሮፎሎጂ ልኩስክሲዎች የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት እንዲደርሱ ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'fa': 'یک مطالعه اخیر توسط Plank et al. (۲۰۱۶) پیدا کرد که نقاشی PoS based on LSTM با توجه به زیادی بر وضعیت فعلی هنر در ارزیابی پروژه اعتماد جهانی که استفاده از یک نقاشی از زراعت زراعت می\u200cکند بهتر می\u200cشود. ما این مطالعه را با استفاده از یک مجموعه تازه از ۲۷ شرکت از ۲۱ زبان تکرار می\u200cکنیم که با مجموعه\u200cهای تغییر گوناگون ترکیب داده شده است. تکرار ما نتیجه عمومی را تایید می\u200cکند، و اضافه می\u200cکنیم که سودهایی LSTMs بیشتر برای ترکیب\u200cهای بزرگتر است. ولی ما همچنین پیدا می\u200cکنیم که برای بسیار بزرگ\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای مورفولوژیکی پولدار، زبان\u200cهای مورفولوژیکی\u200cهای دست\u200cساخته\u200cشده هنوز نیاز دارند تا به عملکرد هنری رسیده باشند.', 'af': "'n Onlangse studie deur Plank et al. (2016) het gevind dat LSTM-gebaseerde PoS-etiketers betekenlik verbeter oor die huidige staat-van-die-kuns wanneer geevalueer word op die korpora van die Universele Afhanklikheidsprojek wat 'n kors-graad etikette gebruik. Ons kopieer hierdie studie deur te gebruik van 'n nuwe versameling van 27 korpora van 21 taal wat met fyn-kornerede etikette van verskillende grootte aangekies word. Ons replikasie bevestig die resultaat in algemeen, en ons vind addisioneel dat die voordeel van LSTMs selfs groter is vir groter etikette. Maar ons vind ook dat vir die baie groot etikette van morfologiese ryk tale, hand-grafte morfologiese leksikone is nog nodig om staat-van-kuns-prestasie te bereik.", 'bn': 'প্ল্যাঙ্ক এন্ট আল. (২০১৬) একটি সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা পেয়েছে যে এলস্টিএম ভিত্তিক পোস্টার বর্তমান অবস্থার পরিস্থিতিতে বেশী উন্নতি পেয়েছে যখন বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভর প আমরা এই গবেষণার প্রতিনিধিত্ব করি ২৭ কোর্পোরা ২১ ভাষার একটি নতুন সংগ্রহ ব্যবহার করে যা ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া জেনারেলের ফলাফল নিশ্চিত করেছে এবং আমরা এলস্টিএমএসের সুবিধা বৃহত্তর ট্যাগেটের জন্য আরো বড়। তবে আমরা আবিষ্কার করি যে অনেক বিশাল ট্যাগসেটের জন্য নৈতিক ভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষার জন্য হাতের ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত মরোফোলিক্যাল ল লেক্সিকোরা এখনো শিল', 'az': 'Plank et al. (2016) tərəfindən yeni bir təcrübə çəkildi ki, LSTM-ə dayanan PoS etiketçilərinin şimdiki təcrübə müəyyən edilən Universal Dependencies projesinin korporasında müəyyən edildiyi zaman, LSTM-ə dayanan PoS etiketçilərinin çox yaxşılıqlarını öyrəndi. Biz bu təhsiləni 21 dildən 27 korpora ilə yeni bir koleksiyon ilə dəyişdiririk ki, müxtəlif böyüklük etiketləri ilə təmizlənir. Bizim replikasyonumuz sonuçlarını genel təsdiqləyir, və biz də artıq LSTMs-lərin mənfəəti daha böyük etiketlər üçün daha böyükdür. Ancaq biz də çox böyük mərcolojik zəngin dillərin, əl yaratdığı morfolojik leksiklərinin hələ də sanat performansına yetişmək üçün lazımdır.', 'hy': 'A recent study by Plank et al. (2016) found that LSTM-based PoS taggers considerably improve over the current state-of-the-art when evaluated on the corpora of the Universal Dependencies project that use a coarse-grained tagset.  Մենք կրկնօրինակում ենք այս ուսումնասիրությունը օգտագործելով 21 լեզու 27 մարմնի նոր հավաքածու, որը գրված է տարբեր չափսերով պատրաստված նուրբ հագուստներով: Our replication confirms the result in general, and we additionally find that the advantage of LSTMs is even bigger for larger tagsets.  However, we also find that for the very large tagsets of morphologically rich languages, hand-crafted morphological lexicons are still necessary to reach state-of-the-art performance.', 'cs': 'Nedávná studie Planka et al. (2016) zjistila, že značky PoS založené na LSTM se výrazně zlepšují oproti současnému stavu techniky, pokud jsou hodnoceny na korpusech projektu Universal Dependences, které používají hrubozrnný tagset. Tato studie replikujeme pomocí nové sbírky 27 korpusů 21 jazyků, které jsou anotovány jemně zrnitými tagsety různé velikosti. Naše replikace potvrzuje výsledek obecně a navíc zjišťujeme, že výhoda LSTMs je ještě větší u větších tagsetů. Zjišťujeme však také, že u velmi velkých tagsetů morfologicky bohatých jazyků jsou ručně vytvořené morfologické lexikony stále nezbytné k dosažení nejmodernějšího výkonu.', 'ca': "Un estudi recent de Plank et al. (2016) va descobrir que les etiquetes PoS basades en LSTM milloren considerablement en comparació amb l'actualitat quan es valora en la corpora del projecte Universal Dependencies que utilitzen un conjunt d'etiquetes amb grans grossos. Reproduim aquest estudi fent servir una col·lecció fresca de 27 corpores de 21 llengües anotats amb etiquetes fines de tamany diferent. La nostra replicació confirma el resultat en general, i també trobem que l'avantatge dels LSTMs és encara més gran per a conjunts d'etiquetes més grans. Tot i així, també trobem que per a les grans etiquetes de llengües rics morfològicament, els lexicons morfològics artificials encara són necessaris per arribar a l'actuació més avançada.", 'et': 'Plank et al. (2016) hiljutises uuringus leiti, et LSTM-põhised PoS-märgistajad paranevad praeguse tehnika tasemega võrreldes märkimisväärselt, kui neid hinnatakse universaalsete sõltuvuste projekti korpuste põhjal, kus kasutatakse jämeda terasega märgistajaid. Me paljundame seda uuringut, kasutades värsket kogumit 27 korpusest 21 keelest, mis on märgitud erineva suurusega peeneteraliste märgistega. Meie replikatsioon kinnitab tulemust üldiselt ja lisaks leiame, et LSTMde eelis on suuremate tagsetide puhul veelgi suurem. Siiski leiame ka, et morfoloogiliselt rikkalike keelte väga suurte tagikomplektide jaoks on käsitsi valmistatud morfoloogilised leksikonid ikka veel vajalikud, et saavutada tipptasemel esitus.', 'fi': 'Plank et al:n hiljattain tekemässä tutkimuksessa (2016) todettiin, että LSTM-pohjaiset PoS-tunnisteet paranevat huomattavasti nykytekniikan tasoon verrattuna, kun niitä arvioidaan karkearakeisia tunnisteita käyttävän Universal Dependences -projektin korpusilla. Jäljitimme tämän tutkimuksen käyttämällä tuoretta kokoelmaa 27 korpusta 21 kielellä, jotka on merkitty erikokoisilla hienorakeisilla tagseilla. Replikointimme vahvistaa tuloksen yleisesti, ja huomaamme lisäksi, että LSTMien etu on vielä suurempi suuremmissa tagsseissä. Havaitsemme kuitenkin myös, että hyvin suurille morfologisesti rikkaiden kielten tageille käsityönä valmistetut morfologiset sanastot ovat edelleen välttämättömiä huippuluokan esitysten saavuttamiseksi.', 'bs': 'Nedavno ispitivanje Plank et al. (2016) otkrilo je da značajno poboljšavaju oznake PoS na LSTM-u nad trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti kada je procjenjeno na korporaciji projekta Univerzalne zavisnosti koji koristi kompletu s ogromnim oznakem. Mi kopiramo ovu studiju s novom kolekcijom 27 korporacije od 21 jezika koja su notirana sa finom zrnom oznakem različitih veličina. Naša replikacija potvrđuje rezultat općenito, i dodatno otkrivamo da je prednost LSTMs još veća za veće etikete. Međutim, također smatramo da su za veoma velike oznake morfološki bogatih jezika, morfološki leksikoni koji su napravljeni rukama još uvijek potrebni za postizanje stanja umjetnosti.', 'ha': "A yanzu karatun na Plak et al. (2016) ya gane cewa taggers masu ƙari da LTRM-based PoS masu girma bisa halin-art yanzu idan an evaluce a kan CorCorCorma of the Universal Deputies that use a coarted tagset. Tuna musanya wannan littafin da ke amfani da wani takardar takarda na 27 koropa cikin lugha 21 waɗanda aka yi wa cũtar da wasu tags masu tsari da hannayen hanyõyi mãsu sãɓãni. Jami'yinmu yana gaskata matsayin a jumla, kuma munã iya ƙaranci gane cewa ni'imar LTRM ne mafi girma wa tags masu girma. Kayya, ko da haka, munã gane cewa don wasu tagogi masu girma na mutfologi da ke rikin lugha, za'a buƙata da hannayen hannayen da hannayen hannayen na hannayen, sai ya kamata zuwa halin-da-sanar.", 'he': 'מחקר לאחרונה על ידי פלנק ואל. (2016) גילה שטגים פוס מבוססים על LSTM משתפרים באופן משמעותי מעל המצב הנוכחי של האמנות כשהוערכו על הקופורה של פרויקט היניברסל תלויות אשר משתמשים בתגים גזעים. We replicate this study using a fresh collection of 27 corpora of 21 languages that are annotated with fine-grained tagsets of varying size.  המשכפלה שלנו מאשרת את התוצאה באופן כללי, ואנחנו מוצאים באופן נוסף שהיתרון של LSTMs הוא אפילו גדול יותר עבור תגים גדולים יותר. However, we also find that for the very large tagsets of morphologically rich languages, hand-crafted morphological lexicons are still necessary to reach state-of-the-art performance.', 'sk': 'Nedavna študija Planka et al. (2016) je ugotovila, da se označevalci PoS, ki temeljijo na LSTM, znatno izboljšajo v primerjavi s sedanjim najsodobnejšim, če so ocenjeni na korpusih projekta Univerzalne odvisnosti, ki uporabljajo grobo zrnat nabor oznak. To študijo ponovimo s svežo zbirko 27 korpusov 21 jezikov, ki so označeni z drobnozrnatimi oznakami različnih velikosti. Naša replikacija potrjuje rezultat na splošno, poleg tega ugotavljamo, da je prednost LSTMs še večja za večje oznake. Vendar pa ugotavljamo tudi, da so za zelo velike oznake morfološko bogatih jezikov še vedno potrebni ročno izdelani morfološki leksikoni, da bi dosegli najsodobnejšo predstavo.', 'jv': 'Una bijaring liyane karo Awak dhéwé digawe nglanggar wih-wih akeh nggawe kartuluh sing nyeneng asai angan langgar sapa waé, nik awak dhéwé nggawe barang dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerti nggunaké pejalaké mruput gak orol, lan nambah awak dhéwé ngerti nyimpen manut kanggo kalah luwih apik dhéwé lan tambah sing luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe etiket sing luwih dumadhi. Nanging, awak dhéwé mulai ngono kuwi nggawe wih-wih akeh pisan ning langgar modorologi, lan akeh bantuan modorologi sing bisa basa isuk dhéwé.', 'bo': 'Plank et al(2016)ནང་གི་ལྟ་བ་ཞིག་ལས་མཐོང་ནི་ཨ་ལྟའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་PoS taggers་ནི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཟེར་བ་དེ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་འདི་གསར་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྐད་རིགས་༢༧་པོ་ཞིག་གི་མཐོ་རིམ་མཐོང་ནི་རྣམས་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་མཐོང་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཚབ་བཤེར་གྱིས་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་མི་འདྲ་བརྟན་སྟོན་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མཐོང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཆེན་པོ་ཆགས་པ་ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': 'The Labeled Segmentation of Printed Books', 'ar': 'التجزئة الموصوفة للكتب المطبوعة', 'es': 'La segmentación etiquetada de los libros impresos', 'pt': 'A segmentação rotulada de livros impressos', 'fr': 'La segmentation étiquetée des livres imprimés', 'ja': '印刷された本のラベル付けされたセグメンテーション', 'zh': '印书标细分', 'hi': 'मुद्रित पुस्तकों का लेबल विभाजन', 'ru': 'Маркированная сегментация печатных книг', 'ga': 'An Deighleog Lipéadaithe de Leabhar Clóbhuailte', 'ka': 'დაშორებული კონფიგურაციის ნაწილი სეგენტიკაცია', 'el': 'Η επισήμαντη τμηματοποίηση των τυπωμένων βιβλίων', 'hu': 'A nyomtatott könyvek címkézett szegmense', 'lt': 'Spausdintų knygų žymėta segmentacija', 'it': 'La segmentazione etichettata dei libri stampati', 'kk': 'Басып шығарылған кітаптардың жарлық сегментациясы', 'mk': 'Обележаната сегментација на печатените книги', 'ms': 'Segmentasi Label Buku Tercetak', 'ml': 'അച്ചടിയ്ക്കപ്പെട്ട പുസ്തകങ്ങളുടെ ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'Is-Segmentazzjoni Tikkettata tal-Ktejjeb Stampati', 'mn': 'Хэвлэгдсэн номын маргаан хэвлэл', 'no': 'Merkt segmentasjon av utskriftbøker', 'sr': 'Naznačena segmentacija štampanih knjiga', 'pl': 'Segmentacja etykietowanych książek drukowanych', 'ro': 'Segmentarea etichetată a cărților tipărite', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Den märkta segmenteringen av tryckta böcker', 'so': 'Segment of Printed Books', 'ta': 'The Labeled Segmentation of Printed Books', 'ur': 'پرینٹ کی کتابوں کی علامت', 'uz': 'Bosib chiqarish kitoblarining belgini oʻzgartirish', 'vi': 'Vị trí Xếp hiệu của sách in', 'bg': 'Етикетирана сегментация на печатните книги', 'nl': 'De gelabelde segmentatie van gedrukte boeken', 'id': 'Segmentasi Label Buku Tercetak', 'de': 'Die beschriftete Segmentierung gedruckter Bücher', 'fa': 'برچسب برچسب کتابهای چاپ شده', 'ko': '인쇄 서적의 라벨 분할', 'da': 'Den mærkede segmentering af trykte bøger', 'hr': 'Označena segmentacija štampanih knjiga', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa Vitabu vya Uchapisho', 'tr': 'Çaplanjak Kitaplaryň etitlenýän Segmentation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Çap kitablarının etiketli Segmentation', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i etiketuar i librave të printuar', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Գրքերի տպագրված բաժանվածությունը', 'bs': 'Naznačena segmentacija štampanih knjiga', 'bn': 'মুদ্রণ বইয়ের লেবেলেট বিভাগ', 'fi': 'Painettujen kirjojen merkitty segmentointi', 'ca': 'La segmentació etiquetada dels llibres impresos', 'cs': 'Označená segmentace tištěných knih', 'et': 'Trükitud raamatute märgistatud segmenteerimine', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Označena segmentacija tiskanih knjig', 'he': 'הספרים המודפסים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དཔར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་ཟིན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཚན'}
{'en': 'We introduce the task of book structure labeling : segmenting and assigning a fixed category (such as Table of Contents, Preface, Index) to the document structure of printed books. We manually annotate the page-level structural categories for a large dataset totaling 294,816 pages in 1,055 books evenly sampled from 1750-1922, and present empirical results comparing the performance of several classes of models. The best-performing model, a bidirectional LSTM with rich features, achieves an overall accuracy of 95.8 and a class-balanced macro F-score of 71.4.', 'pt': 'Introduzimos a tarefa de rotular a estrutura do livro: segmentar e atribuir uma categoria fixa (como Índice, Prefácio, Índice) à estrutura do documento de livros impressos. Anotamos manualmente as categorias estruturais em nível de página para um grande conjunto de dados totalizando 294.816 páginas em 1.055 livros amostrados uniformemente de 1750 a 1922 e apresentamos resultados empíricos comparando o desempenho de várias classes de modelos. O modelo de melhor desempenho, um LSTM bidirecional com recursos avançados, atinge uma precisão geral de 95,8 e uma pontuação F macro balanceada de classe de 71,4.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons la tâche de l'étiquetage de la structure du livre\xa0: segmenter et affecter une catégorie fixe (telle que table des matières, préface, index) à la structure du document des livres imprimés. Nous annotons manuellement les catégories structurelles au niveau de la page pour un ensemble de données volumineux totalisant 294 816 pages dans 1 055 livres échantillonnés uniformément de 1750 à 1922, et présentons des résultats empiriques comparant les performances de plusieurs classes de modèles. Le modèle le plus performant, un LSTM bidirectionnel doté de nombreuses fonctionnalités, atteint une précision globale de 95,8 et un score macro F équilibré de 71,4.", 'es': 'Presentamos la tarea de etiquetar la estructura del libro: segmentar y asignar una categoría fija (como Tabla de contenido, Prefacio, Índice) a la estructura del documento de los libros impresos. Anotamos manualmente las categorías estructurales a nivel de página para un conjunto de datos grande que totaliza 294.816 páginas en 1.055 libros muestreados uniformemente de 1750-1922, y presentamos resultados empíricos que comparan el rendimiento de varias clases de modelos. El modelo de mejor rendimiento, un LSTM bidireccional con funciones completas, logra una precisión general de 95,8 y una puntuación F macro balanceada en clase de 71,4.', 'ar': 'نقدم مهمة تصنيف بنية الكتاب: تجزئة وتعيين فئة ثابتة (مثل جدول المحتويات ، التمهيد ، الفهرس) لهيكل مستندات الكتب المطبوعة. نقوم يدويًا بتعليق الفئات الهيكلية على مستوى الصفحة لمجموعة بيانات كبيرة يبلغ مجموعها 294816 صفحة في 1055 كتابًا تم أخذ عينات منها بالتساوي من 1750-1922 ، ونقدم نتائج تجريبية تقارن أداء عدة فئات من النماذج. يحقق النموذج الأفضل أداءً ، وهو LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه مع ميزات غنية ، دقة إجمالية تبلغ 95.8 ودرجة F ماكرو متوازنة في الفئة تبلغ 71.4.', 'ja': '書籍構造ラベリング：印刷された書籍の文書構造に固定されたカテゴリ（目次、序文、索引など）をセグメント化して割り当てる作業を紹介します。1750 -1922から均等にサンプリングされた1,055冊の大規模なデータセットのページレベルの構造カテゴリに手動で注釈を付け、いくつかのクラスのモデルのパフォーマンスを比較した経験的な結果を提示します。最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するモデルは、豊富な機能を備えた双方向LSTMで、全体的な精度は95.8、クラスバランスのマクロFスコアは71.4を達成します。', 'zh': '余辈言书籍结构标签之任:印刷之文档结构细分与分配定类(如目录,前言索引)。 手动注大率集页面级构类,当数集于1,055本书均抽样,自1750-1922年均抽样,凡294,816頔,并为较几类模性能之验。 至善之双向LSTM,总而为95.8,平宏观F为71.4。', 'hi': 'हम पुस्तक संरचना लेबलिंग के कार्य का परिचय देते हैं: मुद्रित पुस्तकों की दस्तावेज़ संरचना के लिए एक निश्चित श्रेणी (जैसे सामग्री तालिका, प्रस्तावना, अनुक्रमणिका) को विभाजित करना और असाइन करना। हम मैन्युअल रूप से 1,055 पुस्तकों में 294,816 पृष्ठों के लिए पृष्ठ-स्तरीय संरचनात्मक श्रेणियों को एनोटेट करते हैं, जो 1750-1922 से समान रूप से नमूना लिया गया है, और मॉडल के कई वर्गों के प्रदर्शन की तुलना में अनुभवजन्य परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाला मॉडल, समृद्ध सुविधाओं के साथ एक द्विदिश एलएसटीएम, 95.8 की समग्र सटीकता और 71.4 का एक वर्ग-संतुलित मैक्रो एफ-स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Введем задачу маркировки книжной структуры: сегментирование и присвоение фиксированной категории (например, Оглавление, Предисловие, Указатель) документальной структуре печатных книг. Мы вручную аннотируем структурные категории на уровне страниц для большого набора данных общим объемом 294 816 страниц в 1055 книгах, равномерно отобранных с 1750-1922 годов, и представляем эмпирические результаты сравнения производительности нескольких классов моделей. Самая эффективная модель, двунаправленная LSTM с богатыми функциями, достигает общей точности 95,8 и сбалансированного по классу макрокомандного показателя F 71,4.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach an tasc maidir le lipéadú struchtúr leabhar: deighilt agus shannadh catagóir sheasta (cosúil le Clár na nÁbhar, Réamhfhocal, Innéacs) do struchtúr doiciméad na leabhar clóite. Déanaimid anótáil de láimh ar na catagóirí struchtúracha ag leibhéal na leathanach do thacar sonraí mór ar a bhfuil 294,816 leathanach san iomlán i 1,055 leabhar a sampláladh go cothrom ó 1750-1922, agus cuirimid torthaí eimpíreacha i láthair ag déanamh comparáide idir feidhmíocht aicmí éagsúla samhlacha. Baineann an tsamhail is fearr feidhmíochta amach, LSTM déthreoch le gnéithe saibhre, cruinneas foriomlán 95.8 agus macra-scór-F atá cothrom le haicme de 71.4.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε το καθήκον της επισήμανσης δομής βιβλίων: τμηματοποίηση και ανάθεση μιας σταθερής κατηγορίας (όπως Πίνακας περιεχομένων, Πρόλογος, Δείκτης) στη δομή εγγράφων των τυπωμένων βιβλίων. Σημειώνουμε χειροκίνητα τις δομικές κατηγορίες σε επίπεδο σελίδας για ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων που συνοψίζει τις σελίδες 294,816 σε βιβλία 1,055 που έχουν δειγματοληφθεί ομοιόμορφα από 1750-1922, και παρουσιάζουμε εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα συγκρίνοντας την απόδοση διαφόρων κατηγοριών μοντέλων. Το μοντέλο με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις, ένα αμφίδρομο με πλούσια χαρακτηριστικά, επιτυγχάνει μια συνολική ακρίβεια 95.8 και μια ισορροπημένη τάξη μακρο-βαθμολογία 71.4.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ წიგნის სტრუქტურის ნიშანების დავაყენებთ: წიგნის სექმენტირება და დააყენება განსაზღვრული კატეგორია (როგორც Contents Table, Preface, Index) დოკუმენტის სტრუქტურაში. ჩვენ ხელსახურად ამოწერეთ გვერდის სტრუქტური კატეგორია დიდი მონაცემების საერთო 294 816 გვერდის 1750-1922-დან ერთადერთი მონაცემებში, და მონაცემული მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენება. ნაი-ეჲბპთწრ მჲევლ, ბვეთეთპვკუთჲნნალ LSTM ჟ ბჲდართ ფსგჟრგვნთ, ეჲჟრигნაგა ჲბღარა ოპთწრნჲჟრ ნა 95,8 თ კლაჟა ბალანჟთპან მაკპჲ F-ჟოაპრ ნა 71,4.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a könyvszerkezet címkézésének feladatát: rögzített kategóriák (például Tartalomjegyzék, Előszó, Index) szegmentálása és hozzárendelése a nyomtatott könyvek dokumentumszerkezetéhez. Az 1750-1922 között egyenletesen mintázott 1055 könyvben 294 816 oldalt tartalmazó, oldalszintű strukturális kategóriákat manuálisan jegyzeteljük fel, és több modellosztály teljesítményét összehasonlító empirikus eredményeket mutatunk be. A legjobb teljesítményű modell, a gazdag funkciókkal rendelkező kétirányú LSTM teljesítmény 95,8 pontosságot és 71,4 pontos osztályban kiegyensúlyozott makró F pontszámot ér el.', 'it': 'Introducemo il compito di etichettare la struttura del libro: segmentare e assegnare una categoria fissa (come Indice, Prefazione, Indice) alla struttura del documento dei libri stampati. Annotamo manualmente le categorie strutturali a livello di pagina per un grande set di dati per un totale di 294.816 pagine in 1.055 libri campionati uniformemente dal 1750 al 1922, e presentiamo risultati empirici confrontando le prestazioni di diverse classi di modelli. Il modello più performante, un LSTM bidirezionale con caratteristiche ricche, raggiunge una precisione complessiva di 95,8 e un punteggio macro F bilanciato in classe di 71,4.', 'lt': 'Įvedame knygų struktūros ženklinimo užduotį: atskirti ir priskirti fiksuotą kategoriją (pvz., turinio lentelę, išankstinę, indeksą) spausdintų knygų dokumentų struktūrai. Rankiai anotuojame puslapių struktūrines kategorijas dideliam duomenų rinkiniui, kuriame iš viso 294 816 puslapiai, 1 055 knygose, vienodai atrinktose iš 1750–1922 m., ir pateikiame empirinius rezultatus, palyginančius kelių modelių klasių rezultatus. Geriausiai veikiantis modelis – dvikryptis LSTM, turintis daug savybių, užtikrina bendrą tikslumą 95,8 ir klasės pusiausvyrą atitinkantį makro F balas 71,4.', 'mk': 'Ја воведуваме задачата на етикетирање на структурата на книгите: сегментирање и додавање фиксна категорија (како што е Таблата на содржини, Прелица, Индекс) на структурата на документите на печатените книги. Рачно ги анотираме структурните категории на ниво на страници за голем компјутер на податоци во вкупно 294.816 страници во 1.055 книги еднакво примерени од 1750-1922 година, и претставуваме емпириски резултати во споредба со изведувањето на неколку класи модели. The best-performing model, a bidirectional LSTM with rich features, achieves an overall accuracy of 95.8 and a class-balanced macro F-score of 71.4.', 'kk': 'Біз кітаптар құрылғысының жарлығының тапсырмасын келтіреміз: белгіленген кітаптардың құжаттың құрылғысына сегмент және тапсырмалар санатын (мысалы, Мазмұны, Префицес, Индекс Біз парақтар деңгейіндегі структуралық санаттарын қолмен жазып, 1750- 1922 жылдан бірнеше моделдер классының істеуін салыстырып, 294 816 парақтардың құрамындағы құрамындағы құрамындағы беттер санаттарын жазып, бірнеше моделдер клас Ең жақсы орындау үлгісі - баяны қасиеттер бар LSTM - 95,8 деген және класс балансияланған макро F- нәтижесін 71,4 деп жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan tugas untuk mengetikkan struktur buku: menyegmen dan menyerahkan kategori tetap (seperti Jadual Kandungan, Premuka, Indeks) ke struktur dokumen buku dicetak. Kami secara manual anotasi kategori struktur aras halaman untuk set data besar yang mengumpulkan 294,816 halaman dalam 1,055 buku yang sama ditempatkan dari 1750-1922, dan menghasilkan keputusan empirik yang membandingkan prestasi beberapa kelas model. Model yang paling berkesan, LSTM bidireksi dengan ciri-ciri kaya, mencapai ketepatan keseluruhan 95.8 dan makro-skor F yang seimbang kelas 71.4.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പുസ്തകത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ കാര്യം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: അച്ചടിയ്ക്കുന്ന പുസ്തകങ്ങളുടെ രേഖകളുടെ രേഖയിലേക്ക് വേര്\u200dത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാല്\u200dസെറ്റിന്റെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പേജ് നിലനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പേജ് നിലനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. 1,055 പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും 1750 ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d, സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള LSTM, 95. 8 ന്റെ മൊത്തം കൃത്യമായ ഒരു ക്ലാസ്സില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന മാക്രോ F- സ്കോര്\u200d 71.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu l-kompitu tat-tikkettar tal-istruttura tal-kotba: is-segmentazzjoni u l-assenjazzjoni ta’ kategorija fissa (bħat-Tabella tal-Kontenuti, il-Prefaċċja, l-Indiċi) lill-istruttura tad-dokument tal-kotba stampati. Inannotaw manwalment il-kategoriji strutturali fil-livell tal-paġna għal sett kbir ta’ dejta li jammonta għal 294 816 paġna f’1 055 kotba li ttieħdu kampjuni b’mod ugwali minn 1750-1922, u nippreżentaw riżultati empiriċi li jqabblu l-prestazzjoni ta’ diversi klassijiet ta’ mudelli. Il-mudell bl-a ħjar prestazzjoni, LSTM bidirezzjonali b’karatteristiċi rikki, jikseb preċiżjoni globali ta’ 95.8 u punteġġ F makro bbilanċjat skont il-klassi ta’ 71.4.', 'mn': 'Бид номын бүтцийн жагсаалтын ажил: хэвлэгдсэн номын баримтуудын бүтцийн бүтцийг загварчлах, загварчлах, загварчлах. Бид хуудас-түвшин бүтэц категориудыг 1 055 ном дээр 294 816 хуудас бүтээсэн. 1750-1922 оны хуудас бүтээгдэхүүний харьцуулахад үндсэн үр дүн гаргаж байна. Хамгийн сайн ажиллах загвар бол баян чанартай LSTM, 95.8-ийн нийтлэг тодорхойлолтой, 71.4-ийн класс баланслагдсан макро F-тоо гарч ирнэ.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer oppgåva til bokstrukturmerkelappen: segmentering and assigning a fixed category (such as Table of Contents, Preface, Index) to the document structure of printed books. Vi merker manuelt opp strukturkategoriane for sidenivået for ei stor datasett som totalt 294 816 sider i 1 055 bøker som samme utvalet frå 1750-1922, og presenterer empiriske resultat som samanliknar utvalet av fleire modellerklasser. Den beste utføringsmodulen, ein bidireksjonal LSTM med rike funksjonar, oppnår eit totalt nøyaktig av 95,8 og ein klassebalansert makro F-score av 71,4.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy zadanie etykietowania struktury książek: segmentowanie i przypisanie stałej kategorii (takiej jak Spis treści, Przedmówka, Indeks) do struktury dokumentu książek drukowanych. Ręcznie anomentujemy kategorie strukturalne na poziomie strony dla dużego zbioru danych sumującego strony 294,816 w książkach 1,055 równomiernie próbkowanych z 1750-1922 oraz przedstawiamy wyniki empiryczne porównujące wydajność kilku klas modeli. Najlepiej wydajny model, dwukierunkowy LSTM z bogatymi funkcjami, osiąga ogólną dokładność 95,8 i zrównoważony klasowo makro F-score 71,4.', 'ro': 'Introducem sarcina etichetării structurii cărților: segmentarea și atribuirea unei categorii fixe (cum ar fi Cuprins, Prefață, Index) structurii documentelor cărților tipărite. Adnotăm manual categoriile structurale la nivel de pagină pentru un set mare de date care totalizează 294.816 pagini în 1.055 cărți eșantionate uniform din 1750-1922 și prezentăm rezultate empirice comparative cu performanța mai multor clase de modele. Cel mai performant model, un LSTM bidirecțional cu caracteristici bogate, atinge o precizie generală de 95,8 și un scor macro F echilibrat de clasă de 71,4.', 'si': 'Name අපි ලොකු දත්ත සැකසුම් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පොත් 294,816 පොත් 1,055 වලින් පරිස්සම් වලින් පරිස්සම් කරනවා 1750-1922 වලින් පරිස්සම් වලින් පරිස්සම් වලින් පො හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණයක්, සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂිත LSTM එකක්, 95.8 ගැන සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂතාවක් සහ 71.4 ගැන විශේෂ මැක්රෝ F-ස්කෝර් එකක්', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo zadatak označavanja strukture knjiga: segmentiranje i određivanje određene kategorije (poput Tablice sadržaja, preface, indeks) dokumentskoj strukturi štampanih knjiga. Ručno annotiramo strukturne kategorije na nivou stranica za veliku skupinu podataka u ukupnoj 294 816 stranica u 1 055 knjiga jednako uzorke iz 1750-1922, i predstavljamo empiričke rezultate usporedbe učinka nekoliko klasa modela. Najbolji model, dvodirektivni LSTM sa bogatim karakteristikama, postiže ukupnu tačnost od 95,8 i makro F-rezultat od 71,4 klase.', 'so': 'Shaqada kooxaha qoraalka waxaan u soo bandhignaa: qeybinta iyo qaybinta kooxo cayiman (tusaale ahaan miiska Contents, Preface, Index) oo qoraalka qoraalka la qoray. Waxaan si rasmi ah ugu qornaa kooxo dhismaha saqafka saqafka ah ee kooxa macluumaadka oo dhamaantood 294,816 buugaagta 1,055 buugaagta ugu wada qoran 1750-1922, waxaana soo wadannaa resultooyin jimicsi ah oo isbarbardhiga fasalka kala duduwan. Tusaale ugu fiican sameynta, LSTM oo haysta tayooyin hodan ah, wuxuu gaadhaa saxda u dhexeeya 95.8 iyo kooxda macro F-si la siman yahay 71.4.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar uppgiften att märka bokstrukturen: segmentera och tilldela en fast kategori (t.ex. innehållsförteckning, förord, index) till dokumentstrukturen i tryckta böcker. Vi kommenterar manuellt strukturella kategorier på sidnivå för en stor datamängd på sammanlagt 294 816 sidor i 1 055 böcker jämnt provtagna från 1750-1922, och presenterar empiriska resultat som jämför prestanda för flera klasser av modeller. Den bästa modellen, en dubbelriktad LSTM med rika funktioner, uppnår en total noggrannhet på 95,8 och en klassbalanserad makro F-poäng på 71,4.', 'ta': 'நாம் புத்தக அமைப்பு குறியீட்டின் செயலை அறிவிக்கிறோம்: அச்சிட்ட புத்தகங்களின் அட்டவணையில் பிரிப்பு மற்றும் நிலையான வகுப்பு (போன்ற உள 1,055 புத்தகங்களில் 294,816 பக்கங்களை கைமுறையாக நாம் பக்கத்தின் நிலை கட்டுப்பாட்டு வகுப்புகளை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம். முதலில் 1750-1922 இருந்து மாதிரிகளின் செயல் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரி, பணக்கூடிய LSTM, மொத்த சரிவு 95. 8 மற்றும் வகுப்பு நிறைந்த மாக்ரோ F- score 71. 4.', 'ur': 'ہم کتاب ساختاری لابلینگ کے کام کو پیش کریں گے: ایک مقررہ کائٹ (جیسے منزل کے ٹیبل، Preface، انڈیکس) کو پرینٹ کئے ہوئے کتابوں کی ساختاری کے لئے سقم اور مقررہ کریں۔ ہم نے ایک بڑے ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے صفحہ سٹکٹر کاٹیوں کو اپنا ذهن دکھاتے ہیں جو 1.055 کتابوں میں 294.816 صفحے ہیں جو 1750-1922 سے برابر نمونہ لگائے گئے ہیں اور بہت سی کلاس نمونڈلوں کی عملکرد کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کررہے ہیں۔ سب سے بہتر کامل موڈل، ایک دوسری کامل LSTM کے ساتھ مالدار فکرات کے ساتھ، 95.8 اور 71.4 کی ایک کلاس کے برابر مکرو F-اسکور کو پہنچ سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz kitob tuzilishini tahrirlash va bosib chiqarish kitoblar tuzuvlariga ajratish va tayyorlash turini (masalan tarkibi, Preface, Index) yaratish mumkin. Biz 1,055 kitobdagi 294,816 sahifani qoʻlbola qo'llab-qo'lbola tahlil qilamiz va bir necha sinfning bir sinflari bajariladigan bir necha sinfning bajarishga qarang. Bu eng yaxshi bajarish modeli, yordamchi LSTM xossalari bilan o'xshash imkoniyatini 95. 8 va klassi balandlik makro F scori 71.4.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu công việc mô tả cấu trúc sách: phân đoạn và phân bổ một loại cụ thể (như Bàn Nội dung, Quận trưởng, Chỉ mục) cho cấu trúc tài liệu của các cuốn sách in. Chúng tôi ghi chú lại các phân loại cấu trúc trang cấp cho một bộ dữ liệu lớn, tổng số trang 294,816 trong một,055, các cuốn sách được thử đều từ 1750-192, và cung cấp kết quả có kinh nghiệm so sánh các lớp mô hình. Mô hình hiệu quả tốt nhất, một LSTM có tính chất giàu có, đạt đến độ chính xác tổng thể của 95', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме задачата за етикетиране на структурата на книгата: сегментиране и присвояване на фиксирана категория (например Съдържание, Предговор, Индекс) към структурата на документа на печатните книги. Ръчно анотираме структурните категории на ниво страница за голям набор от данни на обща стойност 294 816 страници в 1055 книги, равномерно извадени от 1750-1922 г., и представяме емпирични резултати, сравняващи производителността на няколко класа модели. Най-добре представящият модел, двупосочен с богати функции, постига обща точност от 95,8 и балансиран клас макрос от 71,4.', 'nl': "We introduceren de taak van boekstructuur labeling: segmenteren en toewijzen van een vaste categorie (zoals inhoudsopgave, voorwoord, index) aan de documentstructuur van gedrukte boeken. We maken handmatig annotatie van de structurele categorieën op paginaniveau voor een grote dataset die 294,816 pagina's in 1,055 boeken gelijkmatig bemonsterd vanaf 1750-1922, en presenteren empirische resultaten die de prestaties van verschillende klassen van modellen vergelijken. Het best presterende model, een bidirectionele LSTM met rijke functies, bereikt een algehele nauwkeurigheid van 95,8 en een klasse gebalanceerde macro F-score van 71,4.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo zadatak označavanja strukture knjiga: segmentiranje i određivanje određene kategorije (kao što je Tablica sadržaja, preface, indeks) u dokumentsku strukturu štampanih knjiga. Ručno označavamo strukturne kategorije razine stranica za veliku skupu podataka s ukupnim 294 816 stranica u 1 055 knjiga jednako uzorkom iz 1750-1922, i predstavljamo empiričke rezultate usporedbe učinkovitosti nekoliko klasa modela. Najbolji model, bidirektivni LSTM s bogatim karakteristikama, postiže ukupnu preciznost od 95,8 i makro F-rezultat od 71,4 klase.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer opgaven med bogstrukturmærkning: segmentering og tildeling af en fast kategori (såsom indholdsfortegnelse, forord, indeks) til dokumentstrukturen i trykte bøger. Vi annoterer manuelt strukturelle kategorier på sideniveau for et stort datasæt på i alt 294.816 sider i 1.055 bøger jævnt samlet fra 1750-1922, og præsenterer empiriske resultater, der sammenligner ydeevnen af flere klasser af modeller. Den bedst ydende model, en tovejet LSTM med rige funktioner, opnår en samlet nøjagtighed på 95,8 og en klasseafbalanceret makro F-score på 71,4.', 'ko': '우리는 도서 구조 표시의 임무를 소개했다. 인쇄 도서의 문서 구조를 분할하고 고정된 종류(예를 들어 목록, 전언, 색인)를 지정한다.우리는 1750-1922년 동안 평균 표본을 추출한 1055권의 책에서 총 294816페이지의 대형 데이터 집합의 페이지급 구조 유형을 수동으로 주석하고 몇 가지 모델의 성능을 비교한 실증 결과를 제시했다.성능이 가장 좋은 모델은 풍부한 기능을 가진 양방향 LSTM으로 전체 정밀도는 95.8이고 학급 균형 거시적 F점수는 71.4이다.', 'de': 'Wir führen die Aufgabe der Buchstrukturbeschriftung ein: Segmentieren und Zuordnen einer festen Kategorie (z.B. Inhaltsverzeichnis, Vorwort, Index) zur Dokumentenstruktur gedruckter Bücher. Wir kommentieren manuell die Strukturkategorien auf Seitenebene für einen großen Datensatz von 294,816 Seiten in 1,055 Büchern, die gleichmäßig von 1750-1922 abgetastet wurden, und präsentieren empirische Ergebnisse, die die Leistung mehrerer Klassen von Modellen vergleichen. Das leistungsstärkste Modell, ein bidirektionaler LSTM mit umfangreichen Funktionen, erreicht eine Gesamtgenauigkeit von 95,8 und einen klassenausbalancierten Makro-F-Score von 71,4.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha jukumu la muundo wa kitabu kinachoitwa: kutengeneza na kutengeneza makundi madhubuti (kama vile Mifuko ya Maudhui, Mifumo, Index) katika muundo wa nyaraka wa vitabu vilivyochapishwa. Tunaweza kutangaza makundi makubwa ya ujenzi wa ukurasa huo kwa manufaa kwa ajili ya seti kubwa ya taarifa yenye jumla ya kurasa 294,816 katika vitabu 1,055 vilivyosambazwa hivi karibuni kutoka 1750-1922, na matokeo ya msisimu yanayofanana na utendaji wa darasa kadhaa za mifano. Mfano bora wa kufanya kazi, mstari wa LSTM wenye utajiri wenye utajiri, unapata uhakika wa jumla wa 95.8 na kipindi cha F-kipimo cha darasa cha 71.4.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan tugas dari label struktur buku: segmen dan menyerahkan kategori tetap (seperti Tabel Kandungan, Preface, Index) ke struktur dokumen buku yang dicetak. Kami secara manual anotasi kategori struktur level halaman untuk set data besar yang mengumpulkan 294.816 halaman dalam 1.055 buku yang sama ditempatkan dari 1750-1922, dan mempersembahkan hasil empiris membandingkan prestasi beberapa kelas model. Model terbaik, LSTM bidireksi dengan ciri-ciri kaya, mencapai akurasi umum 95,8 dan makro F-skor yang seimbang kelas 71,4.', 'fa': 'ما وظیفه برچسب ساختار کتاب را معرفی می\u200cکنیم: برچسب کردن و تعیین کردن یک برچسب ثابت (مثل میز محتویات، برچسب، برچسب) به ساختار سند کتاب چاپ شده. ما به دستگیری کلاس ساختاری صفحه را برای یک مجموعه اطلاعات بزرگ که در ۱۵۵۵ کتاب به اندازه\u200cای از ۱۷۵۰-۱۹۲۲ نمونه داده می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهیم و نتایج امپراتیک را در مقایسه کردن عملکرد چندین کلاس مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم. بهترین مدل انجام می\u200cدهد، یک LSTM با ویژه\u200cهای ثروتمند، دقیق عمومی 95.8 و یک مکرو F-نمونه با کلاس 71.4 را می\u200cرساند.', 'am': 'የመጽሐፉ አካባቢ ማድረጊያውን እናሳውቃለን፤ በተጨማሪው የክፍል ክፍል (እንደምሳሌ የይዞታዎች ጽሑፍ፣ ፊትስ፣ Index) ወደ የተዘረጉት መጻሕፍት አካባቢ እናሳርጋለን፡፡ በ1,055 መጻሕፍት ውስጥ 294,816 ገጾችን ለመፍጠር የገጹን ደረጃዎች አካባቢ ክፍሎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተሻለ የደረጃ ሞዴል፣ የሀብታም ምርጫዎች የሆኑት LSTM፣ የ95.8 ውስጥነት እና የክፍለ ሚኮር F-score 71.4 የደረጃ ትክክል አግኝቷል፡፡', 'af': "Ons introduseer die taak van boek struktuur etiketting: segmentering en toewysing van 'n vaste kategorie (soos Tabel van Inhoud, Voorkeure, Indeks) na die dokumentstruktuur van drukke boeke. Ons kennis die bladsy-vlak strukturele kategories vir 'n groot datastel wat totaal 294,816 bladsye in 1,055 boeke eenvoudig uitgelyk is van 1750-1922, en voorsien empiriese resultate vergelyk die prestasie van verskeie klase van modele. Die beste-uitvoerde model, 'n bidireksjonale LSTM met ryke funksies, bereik 'n heeltemal presisie van 95.8 en 'n klas-balanse makro F-telling van 71.4.", 'sq': 'We introduce the task of book structure labeling: segmenting and assigning a fixed category (such as Table of Contents, Preface, Index) to the document structure of printed books.  Ne anotojmë manualisht kategoritë strukturore të nivelit të faqeve për një grup të madh të dhënash që përfshin 294,816 faqe në 1,055 libra të marrë në mënyrë të barabartë nga 1750-1922 dhe paraqesim rezultate empirike që krahasojnë performancën e disa klasave modelesh. The best-performing model, a bidirectional LSTM with rich features, achieves an overall accuracy of 95.8 and a class-balanced macro F-score of 71.4.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք գրքի կառուցվածքի պիտակ տալու խնդիրը՝ սեգմետրացիան և ֆիքսավոր կատեգորիան (ինչպիսիք են Պարունակությունների աղյուսակը, նախագծը, ինդեքսը) պատվիրելը տպագրված գրքերի կառուցվածքին: Մենք ձեռքով նշում ենք էջի մակարդակի կառուցվածքային կատեգորիաները մի մեծ տվյալների համակարգի համար, որն ընդհանուր շրջանակում է 224,816 էջ 1750-1922 թվականներից հավասար նմուշներ վերցված գրքերում, և ներկայացնում ենք էմպիրիկ արդյունքներ, որոնք համեմա Ամենալավ արդյունավետ մոդելը, երկու ուղղությամբ հարուստ հատկանիշներով LSMT-ն, հասնում է 95.8 և 71.4 դասարանի հավասարակշռությամբ մակրո F-գնահատականի:', 'tr': 'Biz kitap strukturlarynyň etitlemelerini täze edip görýäris: segmenting and assigning a fixed category (such as Table of Contents, Preface, Index) to the document structure. Biz 1,055 kitaplarda 1,055 sany derejesinden örän baýram düzümleri üçin sahypa düzümlerini elimizden duýýarys we munuň üstüne empirik netijesi birnäçe sany nusgalaryny görä çykýarys. Iň gowy eden nusga, baý özellikleri bar bir LSTM, 95.8 we 71.4 derejesini ýetip bilýär.', 'bn': 'আমরা বই কাঠামো লেবেলের কাজের পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি: মুদ্রিত বইের নথিপত্রের কাঠামো কাঠামোর মাধ্যমে বিভক্ত এবং নির্ধারিত বিভাগ বিভাগ বিভ আমরা নিজেদের হাতে পাতা স্তরের ক্ষেত্রে বিশাল ডাটাসেটের বিভাগ বিভাগের জন্য বিজ্ঞাপন করি যা ১,০৫৫ থেকে ১৭৫০-১৯২২ থেকে সম্পূর্ণ ২৯৪,৮১৬ পাতায় পৃষ্ঠা  সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনীর মডেল, বাইডিয়ারেক্টরিয়াল এলস্টিএম, যার সমৃদ্ধ বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে, সেটা ৯৫. ৮ এবং ৭১.', 'az': 'Kitab quruluŇüu etiketl…ôrinin iŇüaretini t…ôŇükil edirik: yazńĪlmńĪŇü kitablarńĪn quruluŇüuna segment v…ô assigning a fixed category (such as Table of Contents, Preface, Index) g√∂st…ôririk. Biz s…ôhif…ô s…ôviyy…ôsi strukturlu kategoriyalarńĪnńĪ 1 055 kitablarda 294.816 sayfa il…ô t…ôklif edirik. 1750-1922-d…ôn t…ôklif n√ľmun…ô edil…ôn v…ô √ßoxlu modell…ôrin performansńĪnńĪ qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪran empirik sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôririk. ∆Źn yaxŇüńĪ g√∂st…ôrici modeli, z…ôngin x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôri olan LSTM, 95.8 d…ôqiqliyin…ô v…ô 71.4 d…ôqiqliyin…ô sahib bir makro F d…ôqiqliyin…ô nail olur.', 'ca': "Introduïm la tasca d'etiquetar l'estructura del llibre: segmentar i asignar una categoria fixa (com Tabla de Contents, Preface, Índix) a l'estructura del document dels llibres impresos. Anotem manualment les categories estructurals a nivell de pàgines d'un gran conjunt de dades, totalitzant 294.816 pàgines, en 1.055 llibres de mostra uniforme entre 1750 i 1922, i presentem resultats empírics comparant el rendiment de diverses classes de models. El model de millor rendiment, un LSTM bidireccional amb característiques rics, aconsegueix una precisió global de 95,8 i una puntuació F equilibrada per classe de 71,4.", 'cs': 'Představujeme úlohu označování struktury knih: segmentování a přiřazení pevné kategorie (jako Obsah, Předmluva, Index) ke struktuře dokumentů tištěných knih. Ručně anotujeme strukturální kategorie na úrovni stránek pro velký datový součet 294,816 stránek v knihách 1,055 rovnoměrně vzorkovaných z 1750-1922 a prezentujeme empirické výsledky porovnávání výkonnosti několika tříd modelů. Nejlépe výkonný model, obousměrný LSTM s bohatými funkcemi, dosahuje celkové přesnosti 95,8 a makro F-skóre vyvážené třídou 71,4.', 'et': 'Tutvustame raamatustruktuuri märgistamise ülesannet: trükitud raamatute dokumendistruktuurile kindla kategooria segmenteerimine ja määramine (nt Sisukord, Eelnõud, Indeks). Lisame käsitsi lehekülje tasandi struktuurikategooriad suurele andmekogumile kokku 294 816 lehekülge 1055 raamatus, mis on ühtlaselt proovitud aastatel 1750-1922, ning esitame empiirilisi tulemusi, mis võrdlevad mitme mudeliklassi jõudlust. Parima tulemusega mudel, rikkalike funktsioonidega kahesuunaline LSTM, saavutab üldise täpsuse 95,8 ja klassi tasakaalustatud makro F-skoori 71,4.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme kirjan rakenteen merkitsemisen tehtävän: segmentoidaan ja määritetään kiinteä luokka (kuten Sisällysluettelo, Esipuhe, Indeksi) painettujen kirjojen asiakirjarakenteeseen. Annotoimme manuaalisesti sivutason rakenneluokat suurelle aineistolle, joka on yhteensä 294 816 sivua 1 055 kirjaan, jotka on otettu tasaisesti näytteiksi vuosina 1750-1922, ja esitämme empiirisiä tuloksia, joissa vertaillaan useiden malliluokkien suorituskykyä. Parhaiten suorituskykyinen malli, kaksisuuntainen LSTM, jolla on runsaasti ominaisuuksia, saavuttaa kokonaistarkkuuden 95,8 ja luokkatasapainon makron F-pisteen 71,4.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo zadatak označavanja strukture knjiga: segmentiranje i određivanje određene kategorije (poput Tablice sadržaja, Preface, Indeks) u dokumentsku strukturu štampanih knjiga. Ručno annotiramo strukturne kategorije na nivou stranica za veliku skupinu podataka s ukupnim 294 816 stranica u 1 055 knjiga jednako uzorkom iz 1750-1922, i predstavljamo empiričke rezultate usporedbe učinka nekoliko klasa modela. Najbolji model, bidirektivni LSTM sa bogatim karakteristikama, postiže ukupnu tačnost od 95,8 i makro F-rezultat od 71,4 klase.', 'jv': 'segmenting and AllProgress section Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את המשימה של תווית מבנה ספרים: מחלקה והמחלקה של קטגוריה קבועה (כמו שולחן התוכנים, מראש, אינדקס) לבניין המסמכים של ספרים דפוסים. אנו מצביעים באופן ידני את הקטגוריות המבניות של רמת הדפים עבור קבוצת נתונים גדולה בסך הכל 294,816 דפים ב-1,055 ספרים שנדגימו באופן שווה מ-1750-1922, ומציגים תוצאות אמפיריות בהשוואה ביצועים של מספר כיסות של דוגמנים. The best-performing model, a bidirectional LSTM with rich features, achieves an overall accuracy of 95.8 and a class-balanced macro F-score of 71.4.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nalogo označevanja strukture knjig: segmentiranje in dodeljevanje fiksne kategorije (npr. kazalo vsebine, predgovor, indeks) strukturi dokumenta tiskanih knjig. Ročno označujemo strukturne kategorije na ravni strani za velik nabor podatkov v skupnem obsegu 294.816 strani v 1055 knjigah, enakomerno vzorčenih v obdobju 1750-1922, in predstavljamo empirične rezultate primerjave zmogljivosti več razredov modelov. Najboljši model, dvosmerni LSTM z bogatimi funkcijami, dosega splošno natančnost 95,8 in makro F-rezultat 71,4.', 'ha': "Tuna fara aikin tsarin littafin da ake lissafa: Tuna sanar da takardar-level in rubutu na rubutu da hannuwanMu, wa'uran matsayin matsayin da aka sami duk 294,816 pages cikin littattafai 1,055 a shekara 1,055 ta sami daidaita daga 1750-1922, kuma a yanzu matsalar tamkar ta sammeni da aikin wasu darajõji na misãlai. Ki kyakkyawan mai amfani da shi, wata LSSM mai ƙunci da wasu abinci, yana sami tsari na 95.8 da wani mai daidaita macro F-score na 71.4.", 'bo': 'We introduce the task of book structure labeling: segmenting and assigning a fixed category (such as Table of Contents, Preface, Index) to the document structure of printed books. ང་ཚོས་ལག་སྟར་གྱིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞན་294,816 ཤོག་ལེབ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་པ་ལས་ 1750-1922 ཤོག་བྱང་དང་ལས་ཀར་ངལ The best-performing model, a bidirectional LSTM with rich features, achieves an overall accuracy of 95.8 and a class-balanced macro F-score of 71.4.'}
{'en': 'Word-Context Character Embeddings for Chinese Word Segmentation', 'ar': 'تضمين أحرف سياق الكلمات لتجزئة الكلمات الصينية', 'fr': 'Insertion de caractères contextuels de mots pour la segmentation de mots chinois', 'pt': 'Incorporações de caracteres de contexto de palavras para segmentação de palavras em chinês', 'es': 'Incrustaciones de caracteres de contexto de palabras para segmentación de palabras en chino', 'ja': '中国語の単語セグメンテーションのためのWord - Context文字埋め込み', 'zh': '用中文分词词-上下文字符嵌', 'ru': 'Встраивание текстовых символов для сегментации китайских слов', 'hi': 'चीनी Word विभाजन के लिए Word-Context Character Embeddings', 'ga': 'Leabú Carachtair Comhthéacs Focal le haghaidh Deighilt Focal Síneach', 'hu': 'Szó-kontextus karakterek beágyazása a kínai szószegmentációhoz', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενσωματώσεις χαρακτήρων κειμένου-πλαισίου για την κινεζική τμηματοποίηση λέξεων', 'it': 'Incorporazioni di caratteri Word-Context per la segmentazione di parole cinesi', 'kk': 'Қытай сөз сегментациясының сөз- контексті таңбаларын ендіру', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Вклучувања на знаци со контекст на зборови за сегментација на кинески зборови', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Word-Context Character Embeddings for Chinese Word Segmentation', 'mn': 'Хятад үгийн хэлбэрийн үг-контекст хэмжээсKCharselect unicode block name', 'pl': 'Wbudowanie znaków kontekstowych dla chińskiej segmentacji słów', 'no': 'Innebygging av ord- kontekstteikn for kinesisk ordsegmentasjon', 'ro': 'Încorporarea caracterelor Word-Context pentru segmentarea cuvintelor chinezești', 'sr': 'Сред контекста интеграције символе за китајску сегментацију речи', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Inbäddningar av ord och kontexttecken för kinesisk ordsegmentering', 'so': 'Heshiiska qoraalka ee ku qoran qoraalka', 'ta': 'சீன வார்த்தை பிரித்தலுக்கான வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கம்', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-Karatteri tal-Kuntest tal-Kliem għas-Segmentazzjoni tal-Kliem Ċiniżi', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Uklapanje znakova riječi- konteksta za kinesku segmentaciju riječi', 'bg': 'Вградяване на символи за китайска сегментация на думи', 'nl': 'Woordcontexttekens insluiten voor Chinese woordsegmentatie', 'de': 'Word-Kontext Zeicheneinbettungen für chinesische Wortsegmentierung', 'ko': '중국어 분사의 상하문 문자 삽입', 'sw': 'Hifadhi ya Kanala la Matokeo kwa ajili ya Kutengezea neno la China', 'da': 'Word-kontekst tegn indlejringer til kinesisk ordsegmentering', 'af': 'Woord- Konteks Karakter Inbetering vir Sjinese Woord Segmentasie', 'fa': 'Name', 'sq': 'Embedding Character-Context për Segmentimin e Fjalave Kineze', 'tr': 'Çinçe Kelemek üçin Söz Konteksti Karakterler', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Çin Kelimi Segmentasyon üçün Söz-Kontekst Karakteri İçeri', 'bn': 'চীনা শব্দ বিভাগের জন্য শব্দ- বিষয়বস্তু', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ አቋራጭ', 'cs': 'Vložení znaků v kontextu slova pro čínskou segmentaci slov', 'id': 'Embedding Karakter Konteks-Kata untuk Segmentasi Kata Cina', 'bs': 'Uklapanje znakova riječi- konteksta za kinesku segmentaciju riječi', 'fi': 'Word- Context Character Embeddings for Chinese Word Segmentation', 'ca': 'Incorporacions de caràcters de contexte de paraules per a la segmentació de paraules xinesa', 'et': 'Sõna- konteksti märkide manustamine hiina sõna segmentatsiooni jaoks', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'embed" is a verb (command description).', 'sk': 'Vgradnje znakov za besedilo in kontekst za kitajsko segmentacijo besed', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་ཡི་གེ་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ལ་ཡི་གེ'}
{'en': 'Neural parsers have benefited from automatically labeled data via dependency-context word embeddings. We investigate training character embeddings on a word-based context in a similar way, showing that the simple method improves state-of-the-art neural word segmentation models significantly, beating tri-training baselines for leveraging auto-segmented data.', 'ar': 'استفاد المحللون العصبيون من البيانات التي تم تصنيفها تلقائيًا عبر عمليات تضمين كلمة سياق التبعية. نحن نحقق في عمليات دمج الشخصيات التدريبية في سياق قائم على الكلمات بطريقة مماثلة ، مما يوضح أن الطريقة البسيطة تعمل على تحسين نماذج تجزئة الكلمات العصبية الحديثة بشكل كبير ، متجاوزة خطوط الأساس للتدريب الثلاثي للاستفادة من البيانات المجزأة تلقائيًا.', 'pt': 'Os analisadores neurais se beneficiaram de dados rotulados automaticamente por meio de embeddings de palavras de contexto de dependência. Investigamos a incorporação de caracteres de treinamento em um contexto baseado em palavras de maneira semelhante, mostrando que o método simples melhora significativamente os modelos neurais de segmentação de palavras de última geração, superando as linhas de base de tri-treinamento para alavancar dados auto-segmentados.', 'es': 'Los analizadores neuronales se han beneficiado de los datos etiquetados automáticamente a través de incrustaciones de palabras de contexto de dependencia. Investigamos la incorporación de caracteres de entrenamiento en un contexto basado en palabras de manera similar, lo que demuestra que el método simple mejora significativamente los modelos de segmentación de palabras neuronales de última generación, superando las líneas de base de triple entrenamiento para aprovechar los datos autosegmentados.', 'fr': "Les analyseurs neuronaux ont bénéficié de données étiquetées automatiquement via l'intégration de mots contextuels de dépendance. Nous étudions de la même manière les intégrations de caractères d'entraînement dans un contexte basé sur des mots, montrant que la méthode simple améliore considérablement les modèles de segmentation neuronale de mots de pointe, dépassant les lignes de base tri-entraînement pour tirer parti des données auto-segmentées.", 'hi': 'तंत्रिका पार्सर को निर्भरता-संदर्भ शब्द एम्बेडिंग के माध्यम से स्वचालित रूप से लेबल किए गए डेटा से लाभ हुआ है। हम एक समान तरीके से एक शब्द-आधारित संदर्भ पर प्रशिक्षण चरित्र एम्बेडिंग की जांच करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि सरल विधि अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका शब्द विभाजन मॉडल में काफी सुधार करती है, ऑटो-सेगमेंटेड डेटा का लाभ उठाने के लिए त्रि-प्रशिक्षण बेसलाइन को हराती है।', 'zh': '神经解析器已赖上下文词嵌从自标记数中受益。 吾以类究单词上下文之训符嵌之,明其简易之法显改先进之神经分词,过于自割之数三重基线。', 'ja': 'ニューラルパーサーは、依存関係-文脈の単語埋め込みを介して自動的にラベル付けされたデータの恩恵を受けています。私たちは、単語ベースの文脈へのトレーニング文字埋め込みを同様の方法で調査し、シンプルな方法が最先端の神経単語セグメンテーションモデルを大幅に改善し、自動セグメント化されたデータを活用するための三つのトレーニングベースラインを打ち破ることを示します。', 'ru': 'Нейронные парсеры получили выгоду от автоматически помеченных данных с помощью вложений зависимостей и контекстных слов. Аналогичным образом мы исследуем обучающие вставки символов в контексте на основе слов, показывая, что простой метод значительно улучшает современные модели нейронной сегментации слов, превосходя три обучающие базовые линии для использования автоматических сегментированных данных.', 'ga': 'Bhain parsálaithe néaracha leas as sonraí a lipéadaítear go huathoibríoch trí leabú focal spleáchais-chomhthéacs. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar leabú carachtar oiliúna ar chomhthéacs focal-bhunaithe ar bhealach comhchosúil, rud a thaispeánann go bhfeabhsaítear go suntasach leis an modh simplí samhlacha nua-aimseartha deighilte focal néaracha, ag baint amach bonnlínte trí-oiliúna chun sonraí uath-dheighilte a ghiaráil.', 'ka': 'Name ჩვენ შევასწავლობთ სიტყვების კონტექსტის შესაბამისი სიტყვების შესაბამისი სიტყვების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამი', 'el': 'Οι νευρωνικοί αναλυτές έχουν επωφεληθεί από αυτόματα επισημασμένα δεδομένα μέσω ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων εξαρτήσεων-πλαισίου. Ερευνούμε την ενσωμάτωση χαρακτήρων εκπαίδευσης σε ένα πλαίσιο βασισμένο σε λέξεις με παρόμοιο τρόπο, δείχνοντας ότι η απλή μέθοδος βελτιώνει σημαντικά τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα τμηματοποίησης νευρωνικών λέξεων, ξεπερνώντας τις γραμμές βάσης τρι-προπόνησης για την αξιοποίηση των αυτόματα τμηματοποιημένων δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'A neurális elemzők a függőség-kontextus szóbeágyazásokon keresztül automatikusan címkézett adatok előnyeit élvezték. Hasonló módon vizsgáljuk a képzési karakterek beágyazását egy szóalapú kontextusban, bizonyítva, hogy az egyszerű módszer jelentősen javítja a legkorszerűbb neurális szószegmentációs modelleket, legyőzve a három tréning alapvető vonalakat az automatikus szegmentált adatok felhasználása érdekében.', 'lt': 'Neuraliniai analizatoriai naudojosi automatiškai pažymėtais duomenimis per priklausomybės konteksto žodžių įdėjimus. Panašiai tiriame mokymo charakteristikų įtraukimą į žodžiu grindžiamą kontekstą, parodant, kad paprastas metodas gerokai pagerina pažangiausius neurologinio žodžių segmentavimo modelius ir smarkiai pakelia trijų mokymo bazines linijas, skirtas automatiškai segmentuojamiems duomenims gauti.', 'mk': 'Неуралните анализатори имаат корист од автоматски означени податоци преку вградувања на зборови во контекст на зависност. Истражуваме обуки на карактеристички карактеристики во зборен контекст на сличен начин, покажувајќи дека едноставниот метод значително ги подобрува најновите модели на нервна сегментација на зборови, победувајќи ги три бази за обука на автоматски сегментирани податоци.', 'it': "I parser neurali hanno beneficiato di dati etichettati automaticamente tramite incorporazioni di parole di contesto-dipendenza. Investighiamo l'incorporazione di caratteri formativi in un contesto basato su parole in modo simile, dimostrando che il metodo semplice migliora significativamente i modelli di segmentazione neurale delle parole all'avanguardia, superando le linee di base tri-training per sfruttare i dati auto-segmentati.", 'ms': 'Penghurai saraf telah mengambil manfaat dari data yang ditabel secara automatik melalui penyambungan perkataan dependensi-konteks. Kami menyelidiki penyembelihan aksara latihan pada konteks berdasarkan perkataan dengan cara yang sama, menunjukkan bahawa kaedah sederhana memperbaiki model segmen perkataan saraf state-of-the-art secara signifikan, mengalahkan garis dasar tri-latihan untuk menggunakan data segmen-automatik.', 'ml': 'ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നത്- കെന്\u200dസ്റ്റെന്റ് വാക്കുകളിലൂടെ നെയുറല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d സ്വയം ലേബെല്\u200d ചെയ്ത ഡേറ്റ ഒരു വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള ഒരു വാക്കുകളിലുള്ള പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീതി', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік- контексті сөздерді ендіру арқылы көздеген деректерді автоматты түрде белгілеу үшін ньюралдық талдаушылар пайдалы болды. Біз сөздерді негіздеген контекстіне ұқсас түрде оқыту әдістерін зерттеп, кәдімгі әдістері невралдық сөздерді сегментациялау үлгілерін өзгертеді, автосегменталдық деректерді көмектеу үшін үш оқыту негізгі жо', 'mt': 'Il-analizzaturi newrali bbenefikaw minn dejta ttikkettata awtomatikament permezz ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem fil-kuntest tad-dipendenza. Investigaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-karatteristiċi tat-taħriġ f’kuntest ibbażat fuq il-kliem b’mod simili, li juru li l-metodu sempliċi jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-mudelli ta’ segmentazzjoni tal-kliem newrali l-aktar avvanzati, u jgħaffu l-linji bażi ta’ tliet taħriġ għall-ingranaġġ tad-dejta awtosegmentata.', 'pl': 'Parsery neuronowe korzystały z automatycznie oznaczonych danych za pomocą osadzeń słów kontekstowych zależności. Badamy osadzenia znaków treningowych w kontekście opartym na słowach w podobny sposób, pokazując, że prosta metoda znacząco poprawia najnowocześniejsze neuronowe modele segmentacji słów, pokonując podstawy trójtreningowe do wykorzystania automatycznie segmentowanych danych.', 'ro': 'Analizoarele neurale au beneficiat de date etichetate automat prin intermediul încorporărilor de cuvinte din contextul dependenței. Investigăm încorporarea caracterelor de formare într-un context bazat pe cuvinte într-un mod similar, arătând că metoda simplă îmbunătățește semnificativ modelele de segmentare neurală a cuvintelor, batând liniile de bază tri-training pentru valorificarea datelor auto-segmentate.', 'mn': 'Харин сэтгэл судлаачид хамааралтай-контекст үгийг нэвтрүүлэхээр автоматаар нэвтрүүлсэн өгөгдлийг ашиглаж байна. Бид илэрхийлэл дээр сургалтын харилцааны хөгжлийг судалж, энгийн арга нь автозагварын өгөгдлийг автозагварчлахын тулд гурван сургалтын суурь шугам шугам дээр сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Neuralanalyser har brukt frå automatisk merkelige data via avhengighetskontekst- ord innebygging. Vi undersøker innbygging av treningsteikn på eit ordbasert kontekst på ein liknande måte, viser at den enkle metoden forbedrar modellen for «status-of-the-art» for «neural word segmentation», og slår tre-treningsbaselinjer for å levera automatisk segmentert data.', 'sr': 'Neuralni parseri su koristili od automatski označenih podataka putem integracije riječi o zavisnosti-kontekstu. Istražujemo integraciju karaktera obuke na reèima baziranom kontekstu na slièan naèin, pokazujuæi da je jednostavna metoda značajno poboljšava modele neuralne reèi segmentacije stanja umetnosti, prebijajuæi osnovne linije tri obuke za uklanjanje podataka automatski segmentiranih.', 'so': 'Baarlamaanka naadiga ah waxey si automatic ah u soo bandhigtay macluumaad ku saabsan hadalka ku qoran-xiriirka. Waxaynu baaraynaa qoraalka waxbarashada oo ku qoran qoraal isku mid ah, waxaana tusinayaa in qaabka fudud uu u beddelo qaababka qaybaha afka-farsamada ah, in lagu garaaco qoraalka kooxaha ah oo loo soo dhiibo macluumaadka iskuulka.', 'sv': 'Neurala tolkare har dragit nytta av automatiskt mﾃ､rkta data via beroendekontext ordinbﾃ､ddningar. Vi undersﾃｶker trﾃ､ningskaraktﾃ､rsinbﾃ､ddningar i ett ordbaserat sammanhang pﾃ･ ett liknande sﾃ､tt, vilket visar att den enkla metoden fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttrar state-of-the-art neurala ordsegmenteringsmodeller avsevﾃ､rt och slﾃ･r tri-training baslinjer fﾃｶr att utnyttja auto-segmenterad data.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ලේබල් කරලා තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙනවා  අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්ණ අක්ෂර පරීක්ෂණයක් වචන පරීක්ෂණයක් වගේම වචන පරීක්ෂණයක් වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්ණ කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත විද්\u200dයා', 'ta': 'சார்பு- சார்ந்த- சூழல் சொல்லை உள்ளடக்கம் வழியாக தானாகவே குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலிலிருந்து நெய்யூர் பார்சர்கள்  ஒரு வார்த்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பயிற்சியின் எழுத்துக்களை நாம் தேடுகிறோம், சுலபமான முறைமையில் சார்ந்த புதிய வார்த்தை துண்டு துண்டு மாதிரிகளை முன்னோக்கும்', 'ur': 'نائورل پارسر نے اپنا اعتماد-کنٹنسیٹ ویڈ ایمبڈینگ کے ذریعے اپنا لیبل ڈاٹ سے فائدہ اٹھایا ہے. ہم ایک ایسی طریقہ پر تدریس شخصیٹ کے مطابق پیدا کرتے ہیں جو ایک کلمات کی بنیادی کنٹنسیٹ پر ہے، اس طرح دکھاتے ہیں کہ ساده طریقہ کی حالت-آرتی نئورل کلمات سیگنٹ موڈل کو بہتر کر رہا ہے، جو اپنے ساتھ سیگنٹ ڈیٹ کے لئے تین تدریس بنیاس لینڈ', 'vi': 'Các phân tích thần kinh đã lợi dụng dữ liệu nhãn tự động qua sự nhúng từ ngữ phụ thuộc. Chúng tôi điều tra sự cấy ghép nhân cách dựa vào một ngữ cảnh tương tự, cho thấy rằng phương pháp đơn giản cải thiện tỷ lệ phân biệt các từ thần kinh nghệ thuật, đánh bại các nền tập luyện ba để tăng cường dữ liệu tự vệ.', 'uz': "Neural parsers have benefited from automatically labeled data via dependency-context word embeddings.  Biz so'zning asosida o'rganadigan taʼminlovchi belgini o'rganamiz, shunday usulda oddiy usul shunday holatni o'zgartiradi. Bu holatni o'zgartirish holatini o'zgartiradi. Avto-qo'yilgan maʼlumot yozib olish uchun uchta ta ta'lim asosiy satrini o'rganamiz.", 'hr': 'Neuralni analizači koristili su od automatski označenih podataka putem ugrađenja riječi o zavisnosti-kontekstu. Istražujemo uključenje karaktera obuke na sličnom kontekstu na riječima, pokazujući da je jednostavna metoda značajno poboljšava modele segmentacije stanja umjetnih neuroloških riječi, prebijajući osnovne linije za ciljanje podataka automatski segmentiranih.', 'bg': 'Невралните анализатори са се възползвали от автоматично етикетирани данни чрез вграждането на думи в контекста на зависимост. По подобен начин изследваме вграждането на обучителни знаци в контекст, базиран на думи, показвайки, че простият метод подобрява значително най-съвременните модели на невронна сегментация на думи, биейки базовите линии на трите тренировки за използване на автосегментирани данни.', 'da': 'Neurale fortolkere har draget fordel af automatisk mærkede data via afhængighedskontekst ordindlejringer. Vi undersøger indlejringer af træningsfigurer i en ordbaseret kontekst på en lignende måde, hvilket viser, at den enkle metode forbedrer state-of-the-art neurale ordsegmenteringsmodeller betydeligt og slår tri-træning basislinjer for at udnytte auto-segmenterede data.', 'nl': 'Neurale parsers hebben geprofiteerd van automatisch gelabelde gegevens via dependence-context woord embeddings. We onderzoeken op een vergelijkbare manier insluitingen van trainingskarakters in een woordgebaseerde context, waaruit blijkt dat de eenvoudige methode state-of-the-art neurale woordsegmentatiemodellen aanzienlijk verbetert en tri-training basislijnen verslaat voor het gebruik van auto-segmenteerde gegevens.', 'de': 'Neuronale Parser haben von automatisch beschrifteten Daten über Abhängigkeitskontext Wort Einbettungen profitiert. Wir untersuchen auf ähnliche Weise die Einbettung von Trainingscharaktern in einem wortbasierten Kontext und zeigen, dass die einfache Methode modernste neuronale Wortsegmentierungsmodelle signifikant verbessert und Tri-Training-Baselines für die Nutzung von autosegmentierten Daten übertrifft.', 'ko': '신경 해석기는 자동으로 표시된 데이터에 상하문에 의존하여 삽입함으로써 이득을 얻는다.우리는 유사한 방식으로 단어를 바탕으로 하는 상하문에 있는 문자 삽입 훈련을 연구한 결과 이런 간단한 방법은 가장 선진적인 신경분사 모델을 현저하게 개선했고 자동분사 데이터를 이용하는 데 있어서 세 가지 훈련 기선을 넘어섰다.', 'fa': 'بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای عصبی از داده\u200cهای خودکار با توسط بررسی\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای بستگی- محیط بستگی استفاده کرده\u200cاند. ما تحقیق شخصیت آموزشی را در یک محیط بر اساس کلمه به طریق مشابه تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش ساده\u200cای مدل جدایی کلمه\u200cهای عصبی را به طور معنی بهتر می\u200cکند، با شکست از خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cآموزشی سه برای تأثیر داده\u200cهای جدایی خودکار.', 'id': 'Pemproses saraf telah mengambil keuntungan dari data yang otomatis ditabel melalui penyampilan kata-kata konteks-dependency. Kami menyelidiki penerbangan karakter pelatihan pada konteks berdasarkan kata dengan cara yang sama, menunjukkan bahwa metode sederhana meningkatkan model segmentasi kata saraf state-of-the-art dengan signifikan, mengalahkan garis dasar tripelatihan untuk menggunakan data segmen otomatis.', 'sw': 'Wabunge wa kiserikali wamefaidika na taarifa zinazowekwa automatically kwa kupitia neno la kujitegemea na muktadha. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa mhusika wa mafunzo unaofanywa na muktadha wa maneno kwa namna hiyo, kuonyesha kuwa njia rahisi inaboresha hali ya a in a ya upigaji maneno ya asili ya sanaa, kwa kiasi kikubwa, tunapiga mistari ya mafunzo ya tatu kwa kutumia taarifa zinazotengenezwa wenyewe.', 'sq': 'Analizatorët nervorë kanë përfituar nga të dhënat e etiketuara automatikisht nëpërmjet përfshirjeve të fjalëve të varësisë-kontekstit. Ne hetojmë përfshirjen e karaktereve të trajnimit në një kontekst të bazuar në fjalë në një mënyrë të ngjashme, duke treguar se metoda e thjeshtë përmirëson në mënyrë të konsiderueshme modelet e segmentimit të fjalëve nervore më të moderne, duke mundur linjat bazë tre-trajnimit për përdorimin e të dhënave të segmentuara automatikisht.', 'am': 'የውይይት ፓርላማዎች በአጠቃላይ-የግንኙነት ቃላት አቀማመጥ ሲሆን ከዳታ አውቶማዊ ተለይተዋል፡፡ በንግግር በተለየ ቃላት አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Näyral tanyşçylar öz-özünden etilen maglumaty baglanşyk-kontekst sözleri bilen ullanýarlar. Biz kelimelerde tabanly bir kontekstde okuw karakterlerini meňzeş bir şekilde inceleýäris. Bu basit yöntemiň öz-a ýratynyň durumyny neural söz segmentasyon modellerini örän köpräk gowurap ýöreýär, otomatik segmentasyz berüvleri üçin üçin üçin 3-okuw tabanlyklaryny urup berýäris.', 'af': "Nurale verwerkers het voordeel van outomatiese etiketeerde data deur afhanklikheid- kontekswoord inbêring. Ons ondersoek onderwerp karakter inbettings op 'n woord-gebaseerde konteks op 'n gelyke manier, wat die eenvoudige metode verbeter die state-of-the-art neurale woord segmentasie modele betekeurig, met die slag van tri-onderwerp baselyne vir die verwysing van outomatiese segmenteerde data.", 'hy': 'Նյարդային վերլուծումները օգտագործել են ինքնաբերաբար պիտակուցված տվյալներ կախվածության-կոնտեքստի բառերի ներդրման միջոցով: Մենք նույն կերպ ուսումնասիրում ենք պատրաստվող կերպարների ներդրումը բառի հիմնված կոնտեքստում, ցույց տալով, որ պարզ մեթոդը մեծ չափով բարելավում է ամենաբարձր նյարդային բառերի սեգմետրացիայի մոդելները, հաղթահարելով ավտոսեգմետրացված տվյալների օգտագործման երեք', 'bn': 'নিউরেল পার্সার স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত তথ্য থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করেছে নির্ভরিত-কন্টেক্সটেন্ট শব্ আমরা একটি শব্দ ভিত্তিক প্রেক্ষাপটে প্রশিক্ষণের চরিত্র অনুসন্ধান করি, যেখানে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সাধারণ পদ্ধতি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক তথ্য প্রদানের জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক', 'az': 'Nöral ayırıcılar bağımlılıq-kontekst sözləri ilə avtomatik etiketlənmiş məlumatlardan faydalandı. Biz təhsil karakterlərini sözlərin təhsil edilməsi ilə bənzər bir yolla incidirik, sadəcə təhsil nöral sözlərin segmentasiya modellərini çox yaxşılaşdırır, avtomatik segmentasiya verilən məlumatları üçün üç təhsil səhifələrini dövərək.', 'cs': 'Neuronální parsery těžily z automaticky označených dat prostřednictvím vložení slov v kontextu závislosti. Podobným způsobem zkoumáme vkládání tréninkových znaků do kontextu založeného na slovech, což ukazuje, že jednoduchá metoda výrazně zlepšuje nejmodernější modely segmentace neuronových slov a překonává tri-tréninkové základní linie pro využití automaticky segmentovaných dat.', 'ca': "Els analitzadors neuronals han beneficiat de dades etiquetades automàticament mitjançant incorporacions de paraules de contexte de dependencia. Investiguem l'incorporació de caràcters d'entrenament en un context basat en paraules d'una manera similar, mostrant que el mètode senzill millora significativament els models de segmentació neuronal de paraules més modernes, superant les línies de base de tres entrenaments per aprofitar les dades autosegmentades.", 'bs': 'Neuralni parseri su koristili od automatski označenih podataka putem ugrađenja riječi o zavisnosti-kontekstu. Istražujemo uključenje karaktera obuke na sličnom kontekstu na riječima, pokazujući da je jednostavna metoda značajno poboljšava modele segmentacije stanja umjetnih neuralnih riječi, prebijajući osnovne linije tri obuke za uključenje podataka automatski segmentiranih.', 'fi': 'Hermojen parserit ovat hyötyneet automaattisesti merkityistä tiedoista riippuvuuden kontekstin sanaupotusten kautta. Tutkimme harjoitushahmojen upottamista sanapohjaiseen kontekstiin vastaavalla tavalla, osoittaen, että yksinkertainen menetelmä parantaa merkittävästi viimeisimpiä neurosanasegmentointimalleja, päihittäen kolmiharjoittelun peruslinjoja automaattisen segmentoidun datan hyödyntämiseksi.', 'et': 'Närviparserid on saanud kasu automaatselt märgistatud andmetest sõltuvuse konteksti sõnade manustamise kaudu. Sarnaselt uurime treeningmärkide manustamist sõnapõhises kontekstis, näidates, et lihtne meetod parandab oluliselt kaasaegseid neurosõnasegmentatsiooni mudeleid, võideldes kolmekoolituse alusjooni automaatselt segmenteeritud andmete kasutamiseks.', 'he': 'מחקרי עצבים התרוויחו ממידע שמתווים באוטומטית באמצעות קישור מילים תלויות-קונטקסט. We investigate training character embeddings on a word-based context in a similar way, showing that the simple method improves state-of-the-art neural word segmentation models significantly, beating tri-training baselines for leveraging auto-segmented data.', 'sk': 'Živčni razčlenjevalci so imeli koristi od samodejno označenih podatkov prek vdelav besed v kontekstu odvisnosti. Na podoben način raziskujemo vključevanje znakov usposabljanja v besedni kontekst, pri čemer pokažemo, da preprosta metoda bistveno izboljšuje najsodobnejše modele nevralne segmentacije besed in premaga osnovne črte tri treninga za izkoriščanje samosegmentacijskih podatkov.', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name Tuna ƙidãya karatun mafarin da ke fito a kan wani muhalli na magana, kuma munã nuna cewa, hanyar kawaici na kyautata mazaɓan-muhalli na-muhimmin-muhimmi-maganar-yanzu-yanzu, suna yi muhimmin, kuma ana ƙara danna-muhalli ta uku wa adana danne-da-fara-segment.', 'jv': 'section Anyone', 'bo': 'རྒྱུད་ལུགས་གྱི་མིང་དཔྱད་པ་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཁ་ཡིག་གྱིས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་context་ཡི་གེ་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁ་སྐོང་བ We investigate training character embeddings on a word-based context in a similar way, showing that the simple method improves state-of-the-art neural word segmentation models significantly, beating three-training baselines for leveraging auto-segmented data.'}
{'en': 'Segmentation-Free Word Embedding for Unsegmented Languages', 'es': 'Incorporación de palabras sin segmentación para idiomas no segmentados', 'ar': 'تضمين كلمة خالية من التقسيم للغات غير مقسمة', 'pt': 'Incorporação de palavras sem segmentação para idiomas não segmentados', 'fr': 'Intégration de mots sans segmentation pour les langues non segmentées', 'zh': '用未分段语无分段词嵌', 'ja': 'セグメント化されていない言語のためのセグメンテーションフリーの単語埋め込み', 'hi': 'विभाजन-मुक्त Word Unsegmented भाषाओं के लिए एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Встраивание слов без сегментации для несегментированных языков', 'ga': 'Deighleogú-Leabú Focal Saor in Aisce do Theangacha Neamhdheighilte', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Szegmentációmentes szóbeágyazás a szegmentálatlan nyelvekhez', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση λέξεων χωρίς τμηματοποίηση για μη διαβαθμισμένες γλώσσες', 'it': 'Embedding di parole senza segmentazione per lingue non segmentate', 'kk': 'Сегментация бос сөздерді тілдерге ендіру', 'lt': 'Nesegmentuojamų kalbų žodžių įterpimas be segmentacijos', 'ms': 'Penjelmaan Kata Bebas Segmentasi untuk Bahasa Tidak Segmentasi', 'mk': 'Вклучување на зборови без сегментација за несегментирани јазици', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem mingħajr Segmentazzjoni għal-Lingwi Mhux Segmentati', 'ml': 'ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിഭാഷകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүнгүй хэл дээр хэлбэрээр үг нэмж', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Încorporarea cuvintelor fără segmentare pentru limbi nesegmentate', 'sr': 'Segmentacija slobodne reči', 'pl': 'Bezsegmentacyjne osadzanie słów dla języków niesegmentowanych', 'si': 'සෙග්මෙන්ටම් නිදහස් භාෂාවක් සඳහා සෙග්මෙන්ටම් නිදහස් වචන සම්බන්ධය', 'so': 'Heshiiska-xor ee hadalka ku saabsan luqadaha aan la xiriirin', 'sv': 'Segmenteringsfri Word Embedding för osegmenterade språk', 'ta': 'Segmentation-Free Word Embedding for Unsegmented Languages', 'ur': 'غیر منظم زبانوں کے لئے سپٹمنٹ- فائدہ ویڈ امبرڈ', 'uz': 'Boò£sh joy', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Вградяване на думи без сегментация за несегментирани езици', 'da': 'Segmenteringsfri indlejring af ord til ikke-segmenterede sprog', 'nl': 'Segmentatievrije woordinsluiting voor ongesegmenteerde talen', 'hr': 'Uklapanje riječi bez segmentacije za nepoštene jezike', 'de': 'Segmentierungsfreies Einbetten von Wörtern für nicht segmentierte Sprachen', 'ko': '비분단 언어의 무분단 단어 삽입', 'id': 'Penjelmaan Kata Bebas Segmentasi untuk Bahasa Tidak Segmentasi', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلمه\u200cهای بی\u200cجدایی برای زبان\u200cهای بی\u200cجدایی', 'sw': 'Hifadhi ya neno la kujitenga-Free Word kwa ajili ya lugha zisizopangwa', 'tr': 'Segmentasi boş Sözler Aňlamýän Diller üçin dahyl edilen', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përfshirja e fjalëve pa segmentim për gjuhët e pa segmentuar', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'অংশগ্রহণকারী ভাষার জন্য বিভাগ- মুক্ত শব্দ বিভাগ', 'bs': 'Uključenje slobodnih riječi bez segmentacije za neodređene jezike', 'az': 'Segmentasyon-Özgür Kelimi İçeri', 'ca': 'Segmentation-Free Word Embedding for Unsegmented Languages', 'cs': 'Vkládání slov bez segmentace pro nesegmentované jazyky', 'et': 'Segmentatsioonivaba sõnavaba põimimine segmenteerimata keeltele', 'fi': 'Segmentointivapaa sanaupotus segmentoimattomille kielille', 'he': 'קידום מילים ללא סגמנציה לשפות ללא סגמנציה', 'ha': 'Ƙarako na Tsarawa wa Kalmar da aka Sage', 'jv': 'Omah Kemerdekaan Pasing Gak Bebas', 'sk': 'Vgradnja besed brez segmentacije za nesegmentirane jezike', 'bo': 'སྡུད་རུང་མེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་མཚུངས་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་མཚོན་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a new pipeline of word embedding for unsegmented languages, called segmentation-free word embedding, which does not require word segmentation as a preprocessing step. Unlike space-delimited languages, unsegmented languages, such as Chinese and Japanese, require word segmentation as a preprocessing step. However, word segmentation, that often requires manually annotated resources, is difficult and expensive, and unavoidable errors in word segmentation affect downstream tasks. To avoid these problems in learning word vectors of unsegmented languages, we consider word co-occurrence statistics over all possible candidates of segmentations based on frequent character n-grams instead of segmented sentences provided by conventional word segmenters. Our experiments of noun category prediction tasks on raw Twitter, Weibo, and Wikipedia corpora show that the proposed method outperforms the conventional approaches that require word segmenters.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح خط أنابيب جديدًا لتضمين الكلمات للغات غير المقسمة ، يسمى تضمين الكلمات الخالية من التجزئة ، والذي لا يتطلب تجزئة الكلمات كخطوة معالجة مسبقة. على عكس اللغات المحددة بمسافات ، تتطلب اللغات غير المقسمة ، مثل الصينية واليابانية ، تجزئة الكلمات كخطوة معالجة مسبقة. ومع ذلك ، فإن تجزئة الكلمات ، التي تتطلب غالبًا موارد مشروحة يدويًا ، صعبة ومكلفة ، والأخطاء التي لا يمكن تجنبها في تجزئة الكلمات تؤثر على المهام النهائية. لتجنب هذه المشاكل في تعلم متجهات الكلمات للغات غير المقسمة ، فإننا نأخذ في الاعتبار إحصائيات التكرار المشترك للكلمات على جميع المرشحين المحتملين للتجزئة بناءً على الأحرف المتكررة n-grams بدلاً من الجمل المجزأة التي توفرها مقسمات الكلمات التقليدية. تُظهر تجاربنا لمهام التنبؤ بفئة الأسماء على Twitter و Weibo و Wikipedia corpora الخام أن الطريقة المقترحة تتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب التقليدية التي تتطلب تجزئة الكلمات.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos una nueva canalización de incrustación de palabras para lenguajes no segmentados, llamada incrustación de palabras sin segmentación, que no requiere segmentación de palabras como paso de preprocesamiento. A diferencia de los idiomas delimitados por espacios, los idiomas no segmentados, como el chino y el japonés, requieren la segmentación de palabras como paso de preprocesamiento. Sin embargo, la segmentación de palabras, que a menudo requiere recursos anotados manualmente, es difícil y costosa, y los errores inevitables en la segmentación de palabras afectan a las tareas posteriores. Para evitar estos problemas en el aprendizaje de vectores de palabras de lenguajes no segmentados, tenemos en cuenta las estadísticas de co-ocurrencia de palabras sobre todos los posibles candidatos de segmentaciones basadas en n-gramas de caracteres frecuentes en lugar de oraciones segmentadas proporcionadas por los segmentadores de palabras convencionales. Nuestros experimentos de tareas de predicción de categorías de sustantivos en los corpus de Twitter, Weibo y Wikipedia muestran que el método propuesto supera a los enfoques convencionales que requieren segmentadores de palabras.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau pipeline d'intégration de mots pour les langues non segmentées, appelé intégration de mots sans segmentation, qui ne nécessite pas de segmentation de mots comme étape de prétraitement. Contrairement aux langues délimitées par des espaces, les langues non segmentées, telles que le chinois et le japonais, nécessitent la segmentation des mots comme étape de prétraitement. Cependant, la segmentation de mots, qui nécessite souvent des ressources annotées manuellement, est difficile et coûteuse, et des erreurs inévitables dans la segmentation des mots affectent les tâches en aval. Pour éviter ces problèmes lors de l'apprentissage des vecteurs de mots de langues non segmentées, nous considérons les statistiques de co-occurrence de mots pour tous les candidats possibles de segmentations basées sur des n-grammes de caractères fréquents au lieu de phrases segmentées fournies par les segmenteurs de mots conventionnels. Nos expériences de tâches de prédiction de catégories nominales sur les corpus bruts Twitter, Weibo et Wikipédia montrent que la méthode proposée surpasse les approches conventionnelles qui nécessitent des segmenteurs de mots.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um novo pipeline de incorporação de palavras para linguagens não segmentadas, chamado de incorporação de palavras sem segmentação, que não requer segmentação de palavras como etapa de pré-processamento. Ao contrário dos idiomas delimitados por espaço, os idiomas não segmentados, como chinês e japonês, exigem segmentação de palavras como uma etapa de pré-processamento. No entanto, a segmentação de palavras, que geralmente requer recursos anotados manualmente, é difícil e cara, e erros inevitáveis na segmentação de palavras afetam as tarefas posteriores. Para evitar esses problemas no aprendizado de vetores de palavras de idiomas não segmentados, consideramos estatísticas de co-ocorrência de palavras sobre todos os possíveis candidatos de segmentação com base em n-gramas de caracteres frequentes em vez de sentenças segmentadas fornecidas por segmentadores de palavras convencionais. Nossos experimentos de tarefas de previsão de categorias de substantivos em corpora brutos do Twitter, Weibo e Wikipedia mostram que o método proposto supera as abordagens convencionais que exigem segmentadores de palavras.', 'ja': '本稿では、前処理ステップとしてワードセグメンテーションを必要としない、セグメンテーションフリーワード埋め込みと呼ばれる未セグメンテーション言語のワード埋め込みの新しいパイプラインを提案する。スペースで区切られた言語とは異なり、中国語や日本語などのセグメント化されていない言語は、前処理ステップとして単語セグメント化を必要とします。しかしながら、手動でアノテーションされたリソースを必要とすることが多い単語セグメンテーションは困難で高価であり、単語セグメンテーションのやむを得ないエラーはダウンストリームタスクに影響を及ぼす。セグメント化されていない言語のワードベクトルを学習する際のこれらの問題を回避するために、従来のワードセグメンタによって提供されるセグメント化された文の代わりに、頻繁な文字nグラムに基づくセグメント化のすべての可能性のある候補にわたるワード共起統計を考慮する。生のTwitter、Weibo、Wikipedia corporaでの名詞カテゴリ予測タスクの実験では、提案された方法は、ワードセグメンタを必要とする従来のアプローチを上回ることが示されています。', 'zh': '于本文中,发未分段语嵌新管道,谓之无分割词嵌,不须分词为预处理步驿。 与空格分隔言语不同,未分段语(如中文与日文)须分词为预处理步驿。 然常须手动注资源者分词既难且贵,且分词不免于下流。 所以避未分段语言之词向量,虑在频字符n-gram非故事词段器分段句之分段可得分段候选者者共现计也。 于始Twitter,微博与维基百科语料库上实验名词,优于单词分割器旧。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम अविभाजित भाषाओं के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग की एक नई पाइपलाइन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे विभाजन-मुक्त शब्द एम्बेडिंग कहा जाता है, जिसे प्रीप्रोसेसिंग चरण के रूप में शब्द विभाजन की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। अंतरिक्ष-सीमांकित भाषाओं के विपरीत, चीनी और जापानी जैसी अविभाजित भाषाओं को एक पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण चरण के रूप में शब्द विभाजन की आवश्यकता होती है। हालांकि, शब्द विभाजन, जिसे अक्सर मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए संसाधनों की आवश्यकता होती है, मुश्किल और महंगा होता है, और शब्द विभाजन में अपरिहार्य त्रुटियां डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों को प्रभावित करती हैं। खंडित भाषाओं के शब्द वैक्टर सीखने में इन समस्याओं से बचने के लिए, हम पारंपरिक शब्द सेगमेंटर्स द्वारा प्रदान किए गए खंडित वाक्यों के बजाय लगातार चरित्र एन-ग्राम के आधार पर विभाजन के सभी संभावित उम्मीदवारों पर शब्द सह-घटना आंकड़ों पर विचार करते हैं। कच्चे चहचहाना, Weibo, और विकिपीडिया corpora पर संज्ञा श्रेणी भविष्यवाणी कार्यों के हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण है कि शब्द segmenters की आवश्यकता है outperforms.', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем новый конвейер встраивания слов для несегментированных языков, называемый встраиванием слов без сегментации, который не требует сегментации слов в качестве этапа предварительной обработки. В отличие от языков, разделяемых пробелами, несегментированные языки, такие как китайский и японский, требуют сегментации слов в качестве этапа предварительной обработки. Однако сегментация слов, которая часто требует ручных аннотированных ресурсов, является сложной и дорогостоящей, а неизбежные ошибки в сегментации слов влияют на последующие задачи. Чтобы избежать этих проблем в изучении векторов слов несегментированных языков, мы рассматриваем статистику совместного появления слов по всем возможным кандидатам сегментаций на основе частых символьных n-грамм вместо сегментированных предложений, предоставляемых традиционными сегментаторами слов. Наши эксперименты с задачами прогнозирования категорий существительных в RAW Twitter, Weibo и Wikipedia показывают, что предлагаемый метод превосходит традиционные подходы, требующие сегментаторов слов.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid píblíne nua leabú focal do theangacha neamhdheighilte, ar a dtugtar leabú focal gan deighilt, nach gá deighilt focal mar chéim réamhphróiseála. Murab ionann agus teangacha spás-teoranta, teastaíonn teangacha neamhdheighilte, mar an tSínis agus an tSeapáinis, le deighilt focal mar chéim réamhphróiseála. Mar sin féin, bíonn deighilt focal, a éilíonn acmhainní anótáilte de láimh go minic, deacair agus costasach, agus bíonn tionchar ag earráidí dosheachanta i ndeighilt focal ar thascanna iartheachtacha. Chun na fadhbanna seo a sheachaint agus veicteoirí focal teangacha neamhdheighilte á bhfoghlaim againn, déanaimid machnamh ar staitisticí comhtharlú focal thar gach iarrthóir féideartha ar dheighiltí bunaithe ar charachtair n-gram go minic in ionad abairtí deighilte a sholáthraíonn gnáth-dheighiltí focal. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar thascanna tuar chatagóirí ainmfhocail ar chorparáidí amh Twitter, Weibo, agus Vicipéid go sáraíonn an modh molta na gnáthchur chuige a dteastaíonn deighleoirí focal uathu.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალი სიტყვების სიტყვების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც არ უნდა გავაკეთოთ სიტყვების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც არ უნდა გავაკეთოთ სიტყვების კონფიგურაცია როგ სამყარო განსხვავებული ენების განმავლობაში, სამყარო ენების განმავლობაში, როგორც ჩინეთი და იაპონეთი, სიტყვების სეგმენტაცია უნდა იყოს სამყარო პროცე მაგრამ სიტყვის სეგმენტაცია, რომელიც ხშირად მოჭირდება ხელსაწყოფილი რესურსები, არის რთული და ძალიან ძალიან, და სიტყვის სეგმენტაციის შეცდომარების შეცდომარები ამ პრობლემების გამოცდილობა სიტყვების გვექტორებში, ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ სიტყვების კონფიგურაციის სტატისტიკაში ყველა შესაძლებელი კონდიდეტების კონდიდეტებზე, რომელიც n-გრამებზე დაბაზიან, სე ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები კატეგორიის წინასწარმოდგენების საქმები, საიბო და ვიკიპედიის კოპორაში ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოიყენება, რომ პროგენტირებული მეთოდია უფრო გა', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα γραμμή ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για γλώσσες χωρίς τμήματα, που ονομάζεται ενσωμάτωση λέξεων χωρίς τμήματα, η οποία δεν απαιτεί τμηματοποίηση λέξεων ως βήμα προεπεξεργασίας. Σε αντίθεση με τις γλώσσες οριοθετημένες στο χώρο, οι μη διατεταγμένες γλώσσες, όπως τα κινεζικά και τα ιαπωνικά, απαιτούν τμηματοποίηση λέξεων ως βήμα προεπεξεργασίας. Ωστόσο, η κατάτμηση λέξεων, που συχνά απαιτεί χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένους πόρους, είναι δύσκολη και δαπανηρή, και αναπόφευκτα λάθη στην κατάτμηση λέξεων επηρεάζουν τις επόμενες εργασίες. Για να αποφευχθούν αυτά τα προβλήματα στην εκμάθηση διανύσματος λέξεων των μη διατεταγμένων γλωσσών, εξετάζουμε στατιστικές συνεμφάνισης λέξεων σε όλους τους πιθανούς υποψηφίους τμημάτων που βασίζονται σε συχνά γραμμάρια χαρακτήρων αντί για τμηματικές προτάσεις που παρέχονται από συμβατικά τμήματα λέξεων. Τα πειράματά μας με εργασίες πρόβλεψης κατηγοριών ουσιαστικών σε ακατέργαστα σώματα Twitter, Weibo και Wikipedia δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνά τις συμβατικές προσεγγίσεις που απαιτούν τμηματοποιητές λέξεων.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új szóbeágyazási csatornát javasolunk a nem megmentett nyelvekhez, úgynevezett szegmentációmentes szóbeágyazást, amely nem igényel szószegmentációt előfeldolgozási lépésként. A szóközzel határolt nyelvekkel ellentétben a megmentetlen nyelvek, mint például a kínai és a japán, szószegmentálást igényelnek előfeldolgozási lépésként. A szószegmentálás azonban, amely gyakran manuálisan jegyzetelt erőforrásokat igényel, nehéz és drága, és a szószegmentálás elkerülhetetlen hibái befolyásolják a további tevékenységeket. Annak érdekében, hogy elkerüljük ezeket a problémákat a nem megmentett nyelvek szóvektorainak tanulásával kapcsolatban, a hagyományos szószegmentálók által biztosított szegmentált mondatok helyett a szó együttes előfordulási statisztikákat figyelembe vesszük az összes lehetséges szegmentálási jelöltet, gyakori karakter n-gramm alapján. A főnévkategória előrejelzési feladatokkal kapcsolatos kísérleteink nyers Twitteren, Weibo-n és Wikipedia corporákon azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer felülmúlja a hagyományos megközelítéseket, amelyek szószegmentálást igényelnek.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova pipeline di embedding di parole per linguaggi non segmentati, chiamata embedding di parole senza segmentazione, che non richiede segmentazione di parole come passaggio di preelaborazione. A differenza delle lingue delimitate dallo spazio, le lingue non segmentate, come il cinese e il giapponese, richiedono la segmentazione delle parole come passaggio preliminare. Tuttavia, la segmentazione delle parole, che spesso richiede risorse annotate manualmente, è difficile e costosa e gli errori inevitabili nella segmentazione delle parole influenzano le attività a valle. Per evitare questi problemi nell'apprendimento dei vettori di parole di lingue non segmentate, consideriamo le statistiche di co-occorrenza delle parole su tutti i possibili candidati di segmentazioni basate su n-grammi di caratteri frequenti invece di frasi segmentate fornite dai segmentatori di parole convenzionali. I nostri esperimenti sulle attività di previsione delle categorie di sostantivi su Twitter grezzo, Weibo e Wikipedia corpora mostrano che il metodo proposto supera gli approcci convenzionali che richiedono segmentatori di parole.", 'mk': 'In this paper, we propose a new pipeline of word embedding for unsegmented languages, called segmentation-free word embedding, which does not require word segmentation as a preprocessing step.  За разлика од вселенските јазици, неразделените јазици, како што се кинеските и јапонските, бараат сегментација на зборовите како предпроцесиран чекор. Сепак, сегментацијата на зборовите, која честопати бара рачно анотирани ресурси, е тешка и скапа, и неизбежните грешки во сегментацијата на зборовите влијаат на долните задачи. За да ги избегнеме овие проблеми во учењето на вектори на зборови на нерегистрирани јазици, ние ги разгледуваме статистиките за соопштество на зборови во врска со сите можни кандидати на сегментации базирани на чести знаци n-грами наместо сегментирани реченици обезбедени од конвен Нашите експерименти со задачи за предвидување на категоријата на именици на твитер, Вајбо и Википедија корпора покажуваат дека предложениот метод ги надминува конвенционалните пристапи кои бараат зборови сегментери.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naują žodžių rinkinį, įterpiamą į neapimtas kalbas, vadinamą neapimtu žodžių įterpimu, kuris nereikalauja žodžių segmentavimo kaip parengiamojo proceso etapo. Unlike space-delimited languages, unsegmented languages, such as Chinese and Japanese, require word segmentation as a preprocessing step.  Tačiau žodžių segmentavimas, kuris dažnai reikalauja rankiniu būdu anotuotų išteklių, yra sudėtingas ir brangus, o neišvengiamos žodžių segmentavimo klaidos daro poveikį tolesnėms užduotims. Siekiant išvengti šių problemų mokymosi žodžių vektoriais nesegmentuotomis kalbomis, mes svarstome žodžių pasikartojimo statistiką apie visus galimus segmentacijų kandidatus, pagrįstus dažnais n-gramais, o ne tradicinių žodžių segmentatorių pateiktus segmentuotus sakinius. Mūsų eksperimentai, susiję su nenumatytų pavadinimų kategorijos prognozavimo užduotimis žaliaviniame Twitter, Weibo ir Wikipedia corpora, rodo, kad siūlomas metodas viršija įprastus metodus, kuriems reikalingi žodžių segmentatoriai.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз үлгілмеген тілдер үшін ендірілген сөздердің жаңа жолын, сегментациялық сөздердің ендіру деп аталады. Бұл сөздердің сегментациясын алдын- алдын- ала өткізу керек емес. Бос орын бөліктелген тілдеріне, үлгілмеген тілдер, Қытай және Япония секілді, сөздің сегментациясын алдын- ала өткізу қадамы ретінде талап етеді. Бірақ сөздер сегментациясы, көбінде қолмен жазбаланған ресурстарды талап етеді, қиын және бағатты және сөздер сегментациясындағы қателер көмектесілмейді. Бұл мәселелерді шектелмеген тілдердің векторларын оқыту үшін, әдетті сөз сегменттерінің орнына, n- граммдардың көптеген сегменттердің n- граммдарына негізделген кезде, сөздердің біріктіру статистикасына қатынаймыз. Біздің Твиттер, Вайбо және Википедия корпорасындағы атау санаттарының бақылау тапсырмаларының тәжірибелеріміз сөздердің сегменттері қажет етілген әдеттегі әдістерді жасайды.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan paip baru penyembelihan perkataan untuk bahasa yang tidak terpisah, dipanggil penyembelihan perkataan bebas segmen, yang tidak memerlukan segmen perkataan sebagai langkah memproses. Tidak seperti bahasa terbatas ruang, bahasa tidak terpisah, seperti bahasa Cina dan Jepun, memerlukan segmen perkataan sebagai langkah pemprosesan. Namun, segmen perkataan, yang sering memerlukan sumber yang dicatat secara manual, adalah sukar dan mahal, dan ralat yang tidak dapat dihindari dalam segmen perkataan mempengaruhi tugas turun. Untuk menghindari masalah ini dalam mempelajari vektor perkataan bahasa yang tidak terpisah, kita mempertimbangkan statistik sambungan perkataan atas semua calon kemungkinan segmen berdasarkan aksara sering n-gram daripada kalimat segmen disediakan oleh segmen perkataan konvensional. Eksperimen kami untuk tugas ramalan kategori nama pada Twitter mentah, Weibo, dan korpra Wikipedia menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan melampaui pendekatan konvensional yang memerlukan segmen perkataan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ പുതിയ പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d നാം പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പേര് സിഗ്മെന്റേഷ സ്പെയിന്\u200dറ് നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകള്\u200d, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200d, ചൈനീസിനെയും ജപ്പാനീസിനെയും പോലെ, വാക്കുകള എന്നാലും വാക്കുകളുടെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ളത് കൈകാര്യമായി പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകളില്\u200d പിരിയാനാവാത്ത പിശകുകള്\u200d കഠിനമാണ്. വിലയേ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഭാഷകളുടെ വാക്ക് വെക്ടറുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ഒഴിവാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, സെഗ്മെന്റേഷനുകളുടെ എല്ലാ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികളില വെയിബോ, വിക്കിപ്പീഡിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ്റയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് വാക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള പ്രാദേശിക', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu ġabra ġdida ta’ kliem inkorporati għal lingwi mhux integrati, imsejħa inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem mingħajr segmentazzjoni, li ma teħtieġx segmentazzjoni ta’ kliem bħala pass ta’ preproċessar. Unlike space-delimited languages, unsegmented languages, such as Chinese and Japanese, require word segmentation as a preprocessing step.  Madankollu, is-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem, li spiss tirrikjedi riżorsi annotati manwalment, hija diffiċli u għalja, u żbalji inevitabbli fis-segmentazzjoni tal-kliem jaffettwaw il-kompiti downstream. Biex jiġu evitati dawn il-problemi fit-tagħlim ta’ vetturi tal-kliem ta’ lingwi mhux integrati, aħna nqisu statistika tal-kookkorrenza tal-kliem fuq il-kandidati possibbli kollha ta’ segmentazzjonijiet ibbażati fuq karattru frekwenti n-grammi minflok sentenzi segmentati pprovduti minn segmentaturi tal-kliem konvenzjonali. L-esperimenti tagħna ta’ kompiti ta’ tbassir tal-kategorija ta’ nomi fuq Twitter mhux ipproċessat, Weibo, u Wikipedia corpora juru li l-metodu propost jaqbeż l-approċċi konvenzjonali li jeħtieġu segmentaturi tal-kliem.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ хоолойн шугам гэдэг нь загвар ашиггүй үг бий болгох гэсэн үг бий болгох шинэ хоолойн шугам гэдгийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь үг загварыг аль хэдийн ажиллах шаардлагагүй. Хятад болон Япон зэрэг орон зайд хуваагдаагүй хэл, хуваагдаагүй хэл зэрэг үг хэлбэрээр аль хэдийн ажиллах шаардлагатай. Гэхдээ хэлбэрийн хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний мэдээллийг хэрэглэдэг нь хэцүү, үнэтэй, үгийн хэмжээний хэмжээний алдаа нь доорх үйл ажилд нөлөөлдөг. Эдгээр асуудлуудыг суралцахын тулд бид анхны хэлний векторуудыг суралцахын тулд энгийн үг сегментерүүдийн оронд ихэвчлэн n-грамм хэлбэрээр багтаж байгаа бүх загварын тохиолдлын тохиолдлын статистик гэж боддог. Бидний нэр төрлийн таамаглалтын туршилтууд нь Twitter, Weibo, Wikipedia корпора дээр илэрхийлэгдсэн арга зам нь үг загваруудыг хэрэгжүүлэх энгийн арга зам хэрэгжүүлдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi eit ny røyrlinje med ord innebygd for ikkje-undersøkte språk, kalla «segmentasjon-fri ord innebygd», som ikkje krev ordsegmentasjon som eit forhandteringssteg. I motsetjing av mellomromdelimiterte språk, uavhengige språk, som kinesisk og japansk, krev ordsegmentasjon som eit forhandteringssteg. Det er imidlertid vanskeleg og expensive, og uavhengige feil i ordsegmentasjonen påvirkar nedstrekkoppgåver. For å unngå desse problemene i læring av ord-vektorar av ikkje-gmenterte språk, ser vi ut for at ordsammenhendingsstatistikk over alle moglege kandidatane av segmentasjonar baserte på ofte teikn n-gramer i staden for segmenterte setningar som gjeld av konvensjonelle ordsegmentarar. Våre eksperimenter av førehandsvising av namn-kategorier på rå Twitter, Weibo og Wikipedia-korpora viser at den førehandsviste metoden utfører dei konvensjonale tilnærmingane som krev ordsegmenterande.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową linię osadzania słów dla języków niesegmentowanych, zwaną osadzaniem słów bez segmentacji, która nie wymaga segmentacji słów jako kroku wstępnego przetwarzania. W przeciwieństwie do języków ograniczonych przestrzenią, języki niesegmentowane, takie jak chiński i japoński, wymagają segmentacji słów jako kroku wstępnego przetwarzania. Jednak segmentacja słów, która często wymaga ręcznie adnotacji zasobów, jest trudna i kosztowna, a nieuniknione błędy w segmentacji słów wpływają na dalsze zadania. Aby uniknąć tych problemów w nauce wektorów słów języków niesegmentowanych, rozważamy statystyki współwystępowania słów we wszystkich możliwych kandydatach segmentacji opartych na częstych n-gramach znaków zamiast zdań segmentowanych dostarczanych przez konwencjonalne segmenty słów. Nasze eksperymenty z zadaniami predykcyjnymi kategorii rzeczowników na surowych korpusach Twittera, Weibo i Wikipedii pokazują, że proponowana metoda przewyższa konwencjonalne podejścia wymagające segmentów słów.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu cijevinu reèi ukljuèujuæi za neprekomenirane jezike, zvanu ukljuèujuæi reèi bez segmentacije, koja ne zahteva segmentaciju reèi kao korak predobraæanja. Za razliku od svemirskih jezika, neodgovorenih jezika, poput kineskog i japanskog, zahtevaju segmentaciju riječi kao korak predobrazovanja. Međutim, segmentacija rijeèi, koja često zahteva ruèno annotirane resurse, je teška i skupa, i neprihvatljiva greška u reèima segmentacija utječe na zadatak. Da bi izbegavali te probleme u učenju rečnih vektora neodgovorenih jezika, razmišljamo o statistici saradnje reči o svim mogućim kandidatima segmentacija baziranim na čestom karakteru n-grama umjesto segmentiranih rečenica koje predstavljaju konvencionalni segmenteri reči. Naši eksperimenti predviđanja imenskih kategorija na sirovom Twitter, Weibo i Vikipedijskom korporaciji pokazuju da predloženi metod iznosi konvencionalne pristupe koje zahtevaju segmentere reči.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o nouă conductă de încorporare a cuvintelor pentru limbile nesegmentate, numită încorporare fără segmentare a cuvintelor, care nu necesită segmentarea cuvintelor ca un pas de pre-procesare. Spre deosebire de limbile delimitate de spațiu, limbile nesemmentate, cum ar fi chineza și japoneza, necesită segmentarea cuvintelor ca un pas de pre-procesare. Cu toate acestea, segmentarea cuvintelor, care necesită adesea resurse adnotate manual, este dificilă și costisitoare, iar erorile inevitabile în segmentarea cuvintelor afectează activitățile din aval. Pentru a evita aceste probleme în învățarea vectorilor de cuvinte ai limbilor nesemmentate, luăm în considerare statisticile de coerență a cuvintelor asupra tuturor candidaților posibili de segmentări bazate pe n-grame frecvente de caractere în loc de propoziții segmentate furnizate de segmentatorii convenționali de cuvinte. Experimentele noastre de predicție a categoriilor de substantive pe Twitter brut, Weibo și corpora Wikipedia arată că metoda propusă depășește abordările convenționale care necesită segmentatori de cuvinte.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ නැති භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් අළුත් පායිප්ලයින් වචනයක්, කියලා කියලා සෙග්මන් නිදහස් වචන ස්ථානය- විශේෂ භාෂාවක් වගේ වෙනස්, චීනි සහ ජාපානි භාෂාවක් වගේ, වචන විශේෂ විශේෂාවක් පුරා නමුත්, වචන සැකසුම්, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, වචන සැකසුම් වලින් අවශ්\u200dයයි, වචන සැකසුම් ව මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති භාෂාවන් වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් ඉගෙනගන්න, අපි වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියත් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක සාමාන්\u200dය විදියත් වලින් සැකසී අපේ පරීක්ෂණාවන්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වයිබෝ, විකිපිඩියා සහ විකිපිඩියා කොර්පෝරා වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචන ව', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal cusub oo ku qoran luuqado aan la aqoonsan, oo lagu magacaabaa qeyb-xor ah oo aan u baahnayn qeyb-qaybinta hadalka sida tallaabo ka hor-baaraandegista. Luuqado aan kala duwan ee space-delimited, luuqado aan la aqoonin, tusaale ahaan Shiino iyo Jabanees, waxay u baahan yihiin qeyb-ka-soocsiga hadalka sida tallaabo ka baaraandegista. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qeybinta hadalka, kaas oo inta badan u baahan yihiin hanti ay si gacan ah u dhibaataysan, waa adag iyo qaali, waxaana saameyn ku yeelan kara qasabka qeybinta hadalka. Iska fogayno dhibaatooyinkaas barashada qalabka luuqadaha aan la aqoonin, waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa takhasuska soo socoshada hadalka oo dhan oo suurtagal ah oo ku saleysan xaraf n-gram, badalka goobaha qeybaha ku qoran ee qeybaha sida caadiga ah. Imtixaanadayada ku saabsan waxyaabaha la sii sheegay oo nooca ah ee ku saabsan Twitterka, Weibo iyo Wikipedia waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay soo bandhigaan qaababka caadiga ah oo u baahan yihiin kuwa u baahan hadalka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny pipeline av ordinbäddning för osegmenterade språk, kallad segmenteringsfri ordinbäddning, som inte kräver ordsegmentering som ett förbehandlingssteg. Till skillnad från mellanrumsavgränsade språk kräver osegmenterade språk, som kinesiska och japanska, ordsegmentering som ett förbehandlingssteg. Ordsegmentering, som ofta kräver manuellt kommenterade resurser, är dock svårt och dyrt, och oundvikliga fel i ordsegmentering påverkar aktiviteter nedströms. För att undvika dessa problem med att lära sig ordvektorer av osegmenterade språk, överväger vi ordförekomststatistik över alla möjliga kandidater till segmenteringar baserade på frekventa tecken n-gram istället för segmenterade meningar som tillhandahålls av konventionella ordsegmenterare. Våra experiment med substantiv kategori förutsägelse uppgifter på rå Twitter, Weibo och Wikipedia corpora visar att den föreslagna metoden överträffar de konventionella tillvägagångssätt som kräver ordsegmentering.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய மொழிகளுக்கு உட்பொதிந்த வார்த்தையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். பிரிப்பெண்டெட்- இலவச வார்த்தை குறிப்பிட விண்வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழிகள், குறிப்பிடாத மொழிகள், சீனா மற்றும் ஜப்பானிய போன்ற மொழிகள், முன்செயல்படுத்தல் படி வார் ஆனால், வார்த்தை பிரித்தல், அது பெரும்பாலாக கைமுறையாக வேண்டும், கடினமான மற்றும் விலையானது, வார்த்தை பிரித்தலில் இல்லாத பிழைகள் தா குறிப்பிடாத மொழிகளின் வார்த்தை நெறிகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ள இந்த பிரச்சினைகளை தவிர்க்க, நாம் சொல்லின் ஒத்திசைந்த புள்ளிவிவரங்களை அனைத்து சாத்தியமான துண்டுகள வெறும் விகிபிடியா மற்றும் விக்கிபிடியா நிறுவனத்தில் நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் வெளியேறும் வேலை பிரிவுகள் தேவைப்படும் சொல்லை பிரிவுகள் தேவைப', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی پیپ لین کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو غیر منظم کی زبانوں کے لئے ایمبڈینگ لکھی جاتی ہے، جسے سپٹینٹ-بے فائدہ لکھی جاتی ہے، جو لکھی سپٹینٹ کی ضرورت نہیں ہے ایک پہلے پردازش قدم کے طور پر۔ جگہ مٹی زبانوں کے مطابق، غیر مٹی زبانیں، جیسے چینی اور جاپانی، لفظ مٹی کے مطابق لفظ مٹی کی ضرورت ہے. However, word segmentation, which often requires manually annotated resources, is difficult and expensive, and unavoidable errors in word segmentation affect downstream tasks. ان مشکلات سے بچنے کے لئے کہ کلمات ویکتروں کی تعلیم سے غیر منظم زبانوں کی، ہم نے کلمات کی تعلیم سند لیا ہے کہ کلمات کی تعلیم سند کے بغیر غیر منظم کلمات کی جمع ہونے کے تمام امکان کاندیٹوں کے متعلق کلمات n گرم پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہمارے نام کاٹی پیش بینی کے کاموں کی آزمائش کرتی ہیں جو روئے ٹویٹر، ویبو اور ویکیپیڈیا کی کمپورا پر ہیں کہ پیش بینی کی طریقہ ایسی معمولی طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے جو کلمات سیگنٹر کی ضرورت کرتی ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz cheksiz boʻlmagan tillar uchun qoʻllanmagan yangi pipeline soʻzni tahlil qilamiz, segmentation-free soʻzni kiritish kerak, bu soʻzni bir vazifa sifatida ajratish kerak emas. Unlike space-delimited languages, unsegmented languages, such as Chinese and Japanese, require word segmentation as a preprocessing step.  Lekin so'zni ajratish, ko'pincha qoʻllanmalar qo'llanmalar kerak, qiyin va qiymatdir va so'zning qisqartmasligi notoʻgʻri soʻzni ajratish vazifalarini qo'lbola qiladi. Bu muammolarni o'rganish uchun o'z tilni o'rganish uchun, biz oddiy so'zlar qismlarini o'rganish uchun soʻzni koʻpaytirish statistikasini o'ylaymiz. Bu soʻzlardan foydalanuvchi soʻzlardan foydalanuvchi soʻzni ko'paytirish mumkin. Bizning tashkilotlarimiz raqamli Twitter, Weibo, va Wikipedia kompaniyadagi tashkilotlarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, ilova qilingan usuli so'zlar qismlarini kerak bo'lgan oddiy narsalarni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một đường ống mới chứa từ cho các ngôn ngữ không được khai thác, gọi là sự nhúng vào các từ không phân biệt, không cần phân biệt từ làm một bước xử lý trước. Không giống ngôn ngữ phân chia không gian, ngôn ngữ không khai, như Trung Quốc và Nhật Bản, đòi hỏi phân biệt từ như bước xử lý trước. Tuy nhiên, phân đoạn từ, mà thường cần phải được ghi chú bằng tay, rất khó và tốn kém, và lỗi không thể tránh được trong việc phân chia từ ảnh hưởng tới các công việc xuôi dòng. Để tránh những vấn đề về môi trường học từ sinh ra các ngôn ngữ không được định nghĩa, chúng tôi cân nhắc các thống kê chuyện tồn tại từ ngữ trên tất cả các ứng cử viên phân nhánh có thể dựa trên các ký tự thường xuyên n-grams thay vì các câu đã phân đoạn của các từ truyền thống. Những thí nghiệm về các nhiệm vụ tiên đoán của danh từ trên Twitter, Weibo, và Wikipedia hạ cho thấy phương pháp này vượt trội các cách tiếp cận truyền thống yêu cầu các từ gián đoạn.', 'bg': 'В тази статия ние предлагаме нов канал от вграждане на думи за несегментирани езици, наречен вграждане на думи без сегментация, който не изисква сегментация на думи като предварителна стъпка. За разлика от езиците с разделяне на пространството, несегментираните езици, като китайски и японски, изискват сегментиране на думите като предварителна стъпка. Въпреки това, сегментацията на думи, която често изисква ръчно анотирани ресурси, е трудна и скъпа, а неизбежните грешки в сегментацията на думи засягат задачите надолу по веригата. За да се избегнат тези проблеми при изучаването на словни вектори на несегментирани езици, разглеждаме статистиката за съвместното слово върху всички възможни кандидати за сегментации въз основа на чести символи н-грама вместо сегментирани изречения, предоставени от конвенционалните словни сегментатори. Нашите експерименти с задачи за предсказване на категории съществителни в сурови корпуси показват, че предложеният метод превъзхожда конвенционалните подходи, които изискват сегментиране на думи.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe pijplijn voor woord embedding voor niet-gesegmenteerde talen voor, genaamd segmentatie-vrije woord embedding, die geen woord segmentatie vereist als een preprocessing stap. In tegenstelling tot talen met ruimtescheiding vereisen niet-gesegmenteerde talen, zoals Chinees en Japans, woordsegmentatie als een voorverwerkingsstap. Woordsegmentatie, waarvoor vaak handmatig geannoteerde resources nodig zijn, is echter moeilijk en duur en onvermijdelijke fouten in woordsegmentatie beïnvloeden downstreamtaken. Om deze problemen bij het leren van woordvectoren van niet-gesegmenteerde talen te vermijden, beschouwen we woordco-incident statistieken voor alle mogelijke kandidaten van segmentaties gebaseerd op frequente teken n-grammen in plaats van gesegmenteerde zinnen aangeboden door conventionele woordsegmenters. Onze experimenten met voorspellingstaken voor zelfstandige naamwoorden op ruwe Twitter-, Weibo- en Wikipedia-corpora tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode de conventionele benaderingen overtreft die woordsegmenters vereisen.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny rørledning af ord indlejring til usegmenterede sprog, kaldet segmenteringsfri ord indlejring, som ikke kræver ordsegmentering som et forbearbejdningstrin. I modsætning til mellemrumsafgrænsede sprog kræver usgmenterede sprog, såsom kinesisk og japansk, ordsegmentering som et forbearbejdningstrin. Ordsegmentering, der ofte kræver manuelt noterede ressourcer, er imidlertid vanskelig og dyr, og uundgåelige fejl i ordsegmentering påvirker downstream-opgaver. For at undgå disse problemer med at lære ordvektorer af usegmenterede sprog, overvejer vi ordsammenkomststatistik over alle mulige kandidater til segmentering baseret på hyppige tegn n-gram i stedet for segmenterede sætninger leveret af konventionelle ordsegmentere. Vores eksperimenter med substantiv kategori forudsigelse opgaver på rå Twitter, Weibo og Wikipedia corpora viser, at den foreslåede metode overgår de konventionelle tilgange, der kræver ordsegmentere.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novi cijevi riječi uključujući za neprekomenirane jezike, zvane uključujući riječi bez segmentacije, što ne zahtijeva segmentaciju riječi kao korak predobrazovanja. Za razliku od svemirskih jezika, nepromištenih jezika, poput kineskih i japanskih, zahtijevaju segmentaciju riječi kao korak predobrazovanja. Međutim, segmentacija riječi, koja često zahtijeva manualno annotirane resurse, je teška i skupa, a neprihvatljiva greška u riječima segmentacija utječe na zadatak niz strane. Da bi se izbjegao ovih problema u učenju riječi vektori neodgovorenih jezika, smatramo statistiku o istodogađaju riječi o svim mogućim kandidatima segmentacija na temelju čestog karaktera n grama umjesto segmentiranih rečenica koje su predstavljale konvencionalni segmenteri riječi. Naši eksperimenti predviđanja imenskih kategorija na sirovom Twitter, Weibo i Wikipedia korporaciji pokazuju da predložena metoda iznosi konvencionalne pristupe koje zahtijevaju segmenteri riječi.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neue Pipeline der Worteinbettung für nicht segmentierte Sprachen vor, die segmentierungsfreie Worteinbettung genannt wird, die keine Wortsegmentierung als Vorverarbeitungsschritt erfordert. Anders als durch Leerzeichen getrennte Sprachen erfordern unsegmentierte Sprachen, wie Chinesisch und Japanisch, Wortsegmentierung als Vorverarbeitungsschritt. Allerdings ist die Wortsegmentierung, die oft manuell kommentierte Ressourcen erfordert, schwierig und teuer, und unvermeidliche Fehler in der Wortsegmentierung beeinflussen nachgelagerte Aufgaben. Um diese Probleme beim Erlernen von Wortvektoren unsegmentierter Sprachen zu vermeiden, betrachten wir die Ko-Vorkommensstatistik von Wörtern über alle möglichen Kandidaten von Segmentierungen basierend auf häufigen Zeichen n-Gramm anstelle von segmentierten Sätzen, die von herkömmlichen Wortsegmentern bereitgestellt werden. Unsere Experimente zur Vorhersage von Nomenkategorien auf rohen Twitter-, Weibo- und Wikipedia-Korpora zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode die herkömmlichen Ansätze übertrifft, die Wortsegmente erfordern.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 미분단 언어에 사용되는 새로운 단어 삽입 파이프라인을 제시했는데, 이를 무분단 단어 삽입이라고 하는데, 단어를 분할하여 예처리 절차로 삼을 필요가 없다.공백으로 구분된 언어와 달리 단락을 나누지 않은 언어(예를 들어 중국어와 일본어)는 단어를 미리 처리하는 절차로 해야 한다.그러나 수동으로 주석을 달아야 하는 단어는 어렵고 비싸며, 단어에서 피할 수 없는 오류는 하위 작업에 영향을 미칠 수 있다.미분단 언어의 어향량을 학습할 때 이러한 문제가 발생하지 않도록 하기 위해 우리는 빈번한 문자 n-gram을 기반으로 하는 모든 가능한 분단 후보어의 공통 통계를 고려했다. 전통적인 분사기가 제공하는 분단 문장이 아니라.원시 트위터, 웨이보, 위키백과 어료 라이브러리에서 명사 유형 예측 임무를 실험한 결과, 이 방법은 분사기가 필요한 전통적인 방법보다 낫다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pipeline baru dari pembangunan kata untuk bahasa tidak terpisah, disebut pembangunan kata bebas segmentasi, yang tidak memerlukan segmentasi kata sebagai langkah preproses. Tidak seperti bahasa terbatas ruang, bahasa tidak terpisah, seperti bahasa Cina dan Jepang, membutuhkan segmen kata sebagai langkah yang memproses. Namun, segmen kata, yang sering memerlukan sumber daya yang dicatat secara manual, sulit dan mahal, dan kesalahan yang tidak dapat dihindari dalam segmen kata mempengaruhi tugas turun. Untuk menghindari masalah ini dalam mempelajari vektor kata dari bahasa yang tidak terpisah, kita mempertimbangkan statistik keberadaan kata pada semua kemungkinan kandidat segmen berdasarkan karakter frekuen n-gram bukan kalimat segmen yang diberikan oleh segmen kata konvensional. Eksperimen kami dari tugas prediksi kategori nama di Twitter, Weibo, dan korpora Wikipedia menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan melampaui pendekatan konvensional yang memerlukan segmen kata.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza picha mpya ya neno ambalo limewekwa kwa lugha zisizo na maana, inayoitwa neno lisilo huru la kujitenga, ambalo halihitaji kujitenga kwa maneno kama hatua ya upasuaji. Tofauti na lugha zilizotengenezwa kwa anga, lugha zisizo sahihi, kama vile China na Kijapani, zinahitaji kuongezeka kwa maneno kama hatua ya upasuaji. Hata hivyo, unyanyasaji wa maneno, ambayo mara nyingi inahitaji rasilimali zinazokerwa manufaa, ni vigumu na gharama, na makosa yasiyoeleweka kwa maneno yanaathiri kazi za mto wa chini. Ili kuepuka matatizo haya katika kujifunza vectors za lugha zisizo sahihi, tunafikiria takwimu za pamoja za maneno kwa ajili ya wagombea wote wanaowezekana kwa kutumia tabia na grams mara nyingi badala ya sentensi zilizotengenezwa zilizotolewa na wanamgangiaji maneno ya kawaida. Majaribio yetu ya kazi za kutabiri kwa makundi yasiyo na maana kwenye mtandao wa Twita, Weibo na kampuni ya Wikipedia yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa hutoa mbinu za kawaida zinazohitaji wachaguzi wa maneno.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک لوله\u200cی جدید از کلمه\u200cای که برای زبان\u200cهای غیرقابل تغییر داده می\u200cشود، به نام جمع کردن کلمه\u200cهای آزاد بخش، که به عنوان قدم پیش\u200cپردازی کلمه نیاز ندارد. برخلاف زبان\u200cهای محدودیت فضا، زبان\u200cهای غیر محدودیت، مثل چینی و ژاپنی، قطع کردن کلمات به عنوان قدم پیش\u200cپردازی نیاز دارند. با این حال، بخش کلمه، که اغلب به منابع دستی که به دست نشان داده شده نیاز دارد، سخت و گران است، و اشتباه\u200cهای بی\u200cفایده\u200cای در بخش کلمه\u200cها در کار پایین\u200cترین تأثیر می\u200cدهد. برای جلوگیری از این مشکلات در یادگیری ویکتورهای کلمه\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای غیرقابل تغییر تغییر داده می\u200cشود، ما در نظر می\u200cگیریم که آمار اتفاق\u200cافزایش کلمه\u200cها بر روی تمام کاندیداتی\u200cهای ممکن از قطعه\u200cها بر اساس شخصیت n گرم\u200cهای اغ آزمایش\u200cهای ما از کار پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای کائنات اسم در توئیتر، ویبو و شرکت ویکپیدیا نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش پیشنهاد از طریق\u200cهای معمولی که نیاز به بخش\u200cکنندگان کلمه\u200cها دارند بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, ymlassyz diller üçin ýene bir pipeline gaýd etmek üçin täze bir pipeline teklip edýäris, segmentasiýa boş söz gaýd etmek üçin, bu söz segmentasiýasynyň öňden işlenýän adı diýmek gerek däl. Gaýd edilen ýerleri beýleki diller ýaly, iňlislerde, Çinçe we Japonça ýaly söz segmentasyny öň-işlemek adı ýaly gerek. Ýöne söz segmentasiýasy, köplenç elimden näsazlanýan çeşmelere gerek bolan, söz segmentasiýasynda wagt kyn we gymmatlyk, we söz segmentasiýasynda ulanmaýan hatalar indiki işlere täsir edýär. Beýik dilleriň vektörlerini öwrenmek üçin bu meseleleri ýok etmek üçin, düzgün sözler tarapyndan berilen segmentleriň iň-gramleriň ýerine ýerleşýän sözleriň ýerine ýerleşýän sahypalaryň arasynda ýerleşýän sözleriň istatistiklerini pikir edýäris. Biziň sut kategoriýanyň öngörüm uzmanlarymyz çyz Twitter, Weibo we Wikipediýa korporatynda gurulduň teklipden söz segmentlerine gerek gelen geleneklerden çykyp çykýandygyny görkez.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe pyplyn van woord inbêer vir onbekende tale, genoem segmentasie-vry woord inbêer, wat nie nodig woord segmentasie as 'n voorafverwerking stap. Ongelyks van spasie-delimiteerde tale, ongeregmenteerde tale, soos Sjinees en Japanse, nodig woord segmentasie as 'n voorafverwerking stap. Maar, woord segmentasie, wat dikwels hand-aanmerkte hulpbronne benodig, is moeilik en koste, en onbeskikbaar foute in woord segmentasie beïnvloor onderstreem opdragte. Om hierdie probleem te voorkom in die leer van woord vektores van onbekende tale, dink ons die woord saam-voorkoms statistiek oor alle moontlike kandidate van segmentasies gebaseer op dikwels karakter n-grame in plaas van segmenteerde setinge wat deur konvensionale woord segmenteers verskaf word. Ons eksperimente van noukategorie voorskou opdragte op rooi Twitter, Weibo en Wikipedia korpora wys dat die voorgestelde metode die konvensionale toegange wat woord segmenters nodig het, uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një tubacion të ri fjalësh të përfshirë për gjuhë të pashprerë, të quajtur përfshirje fjalësh pa segmentim, e cila nuk kërkon segmentimin e fjalëve si një hap paraprocesues. Ndryshe nga gjuhët e kufizuara në hapësirë, gjuhët e pazgjidhura, të tilla si kinezët dhe japonezët, kërkojnë segmentimin e fjalëve si një hap paraprocesues. Megjithatë, segmentimi i fjalëve, që shpesh kërkon burime të anotuara manualisht, është i vështirë dhe i shtrenjtë dhe gabime të pashmangshme në segmentimin e fjalëve ndikojnë në detyrat e poshtme. Për të shmangur këto probleme n ë mësimin e vektorëve të fjalëve të gjuhëve të pashprera, ne konsiderojmë statistikat e bashkëndodhjes së fjalëve mbi të gjithë kandidatët e mundshëm të segmentacioneve bazuar në karakterin e shpejtë n-gram në vend të fjalëve të segmentuara të ofruara nga segmentuesit konvencionalë të fjalëve. Eksperimentet tona të detyrave parashikuese të kategorisë së emrave në Twitter, Weibo dhe Wikipedia corpora tregojnë se metoda e propozuar tejkalon qasjet konvencionale që kërkojnë segmentues fjalësh.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ ለቋንቋዎች ያልተቋረጠው የቃላት አዲስ ቅጂን መፍጠር እናስባለን፣ የsegmentation-ነፃ ቃል አግኝቷል፡፡ በተለየ space-delimited ቋንቋዎች፣ ያልተገለጸ ቋንቋዎች፣ እንደቻይና የጃፓን ቋንቋ፣ ቃላትን የፊደል ጉዳይ እንዲሆን ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ነገር ግን የንግግር ግንኙነት፣ ብዙ ጊዜ በጅማት የሚያስቸገር ሀብት፣ አስቸጋሪ እና የከበረ ነው፣ በንግግር ግንኙነት የማይቻል ስህተት ከውኃው ውኃ ስራቶች ይጠቅማል፡፡ እነዚህን መከራዎች ለመማር ቃላትን የቋንቋዎች መግለጫ ለመራቀቅ፣ በአካባቢው ቃላት አካባቢዎች በይፋ ክፍል n-gram በሚያሳየው ክፍል ክፍል ክፍተት ክፍተቶችን በሚያሳየው በአካባቢው ቃላት ክፍል ማሳየት የሚችሉትን ቃላት ቁጥጥር እናስባለን፡፡ በተፈተናው የኢትዮጵያ፣ የዌይቦና የWikipedia ኮፕሮፓር ላይ የውይይት አካባቢ ጉዳይ የቃላትን ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልጉትን አካባቢ ግንኙነታችንን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք բառերի նոր խողովակաշար, որը ներառվում է անբացատրված լեզուների համար, որը կոչվում է անբացատրված բառերի ներառում, որը չի պահանջում բառերի ներառման որպես նախագործող քայլ: Ի տարբերություն տարածության սահմանափակ լեզուներին, անբացատրված լեզուները, ինչպիսիք են չինական և ճապոներեն լեզուները, պահանջում են բառերի սեգրեգացիա որպես նախագործող քայլ: Այնուամենայնիվ, բառերի սեգմետրացիան, որը հաճախ պահանջում է ձեռքով գրված ռեսուրսներ, դժվար է և թանկ, և անխուսափելի սխալները բառերի սեգմետրացիայի մեջ ազդում են ներքևի գործերին: Որպեսզի խուսափենք այս խնդիրներից անբացատրված լեզուների բառերի վեկտորների սովորելու մեջ, մենք դիտարկում ենք բառերի համապատասխանատվության վիճակագրություն բոլոր հնարավոր թեկնածուների մասին, որոնք հիմնված են n-գրամ հաճախ բնորոշների վրա, ավանդական բառերի սե Մեր փորձարկումները անվանումների կատեգորիայի կանխատեսման առաջադրանքների մասին ոչ թվիթերի, Վեյբոյի և Վիքիփեդիայի կապորայի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մեթոդը գերազանցում է ավանդական մոտեցումները, որոնք պահանջում', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন পাইপেলাইন প্রস্তাব করছি যা নির্ধারিত ভাষার জন্য বিভিন্ন ভাষার জন্য বিভিন্ন ভাষার প্রস্তাব করা হয়, যার নাম হচ্ছে বিভিন্ Unlike space-delimited languages, unsegmented languages, such as Chinese and Japanese, require word segmentation as a preprocessing step.  তবে শব্দের বিভাগ, যা প্রায়শই হাতে বিরক্তিকর সম্পদ প্রয়োজন, কঠিন এবং দাম এবং শব্দ বিভক্ত করার ক্ষেত্রে অকার্যকর ভুল প্রভাবিত হয়। এই সমস্যা থেকে বিরত রাখার জন্য আমরা সাধারণ শব্দ বিভাগের প্রতিষ্ঠানের পরিসংখ্যা বিবেচনা করি প্রার্থীদের বিভিন্ন প্রার্থীদের উপরে প্রায়শ ক্যারেক্টার n-gram ভিত্ত ভুল টুইটার, উইবো এবং উইকিপিডিয়া কোর্পোরায় আমাদের নির্বাচনের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি কনফিগারেল মাধ্যমের প্রয়োজনীয় শ', 'ca': "En aquest article, proposem un nou conjunt de paraules incorporades per llengües no segmentades, anomenat integració de paraules sense segmentació, que no requereix segmentació de paraules com un pas de preprocessió. A diferència de les llengües delimitades a l'espai, les llengües no fragmentades, com el xinès i el japonès, requeren segmentació de paraules com un pas preprocessor. Però la segmentació de paraules, que sovint requereix recursos anotats manualment, és difícil i cara, i els errors inevitables en la segmentació de paraules afecten les tasques avall. Per evitar aquests problemes en aprendre vectors de paraules de llengües no segmentades, considerem estadístiques de coincidència de paraules sobre tots els possibles candidats de segmentacions basats en n-grams de caràcter freqüent en lloc de frases segmentades proporcionades per segmentadors de paraules convencionals. Els nostres experiments de tasques de predicció de categories de noms en Twitter brut, Weibo i corpora de Wikipedia mostren que el mètode proposat supera els enfocaments convencionals que necessiten segmentadors de paraules.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, söz segmentasiyonu əvvəlcə işləmə adı olaraq qeyd edilməmiş dillər üçün yeni bir pipeline təklif edirik. Uzay ayırılmış dillərin, Çinli və Japonca kimi qeyd edilməmiş dillərin eyni olmasına qədər, əvvəlcə işləmə adımı kimi söz segmentasiyasını istəyirlər. Lakin, söz segmentasiyası, çox dəstəklə əlində məlumatlar lazımdır, çətin və mal və söz segmentasiyasının səhvlərini aşağı yüksək işlərə təsir edir. Bu problemlərdən uzaqlaşmayan dillərin vektörlərini öyrənmək üçün, bəzi sözlərin segmentatçıların yerinə n-gramlərin mümkün olan segmentatların bütün mümkün qiymətlərin bərabər statistiklərini düşün ürük. Bizim adı kategoriyanın tədbir törətmələrinin səviyyə Twitter, Weibo və Wikipedia korporasında tədbir edilmiş metodların sözlərin segmentləri lazımdır.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu cijevinu riječi uključujući za neprekomenirane jezike, koja se zove integracija riječi bez segmentacije, koja ne zahtijeva segmentaciju riječi kao korak predobrazovanja. Za razliku od svemirskih jezika, nepromištenih jezika, poput kineskih i japanskih, zahtijevaju segmentaciju riječi kao korak predobrazovanja. Međutim, segmentacija riječi, koja često zahtijeva manualno annotirane resurse, je teška i skupa, a neprihvatljiva greška u riječima segmentacija utječe na zadatak niz strane. Da bi se izbjegao ovih problema u učenju rečnih vektora nepromijenjenih jezika, smatramo statistiku za saradnju riječi o svim mogućim kandidatima segmentacija baziranim na čestom karakteru n-grama umjesto segmentiranih rečenica predstavljenih od strane konvencionalnih segmentera riječi. Naši eksperimenti predviđanja imenskih kategorija na sirovom Twitter, Weibo i Wikipedia korporaciji pokazuju da predloženi metod iznosi konvencionalne pristupe koje zahtijevaju segmenteri riječi.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme novou potrubí vkládání slov pro nesegmentované jazyky, nazvanou bezsegmentační vložení slov, které nevyžaduje segmentaci slov jako krok předzpracování. Na rozdíl od jazyků vymezených mezerou vyžadují nesegmentované jazyky, jako je čínština a japonština, segmentaci slov jako krok předzpracování. Segmentace slov, která často vyžaduje ručně anotované zdroje, je však obtížná a nákladná a nevyhnutelné chyby v segmentaci slov ovlivňují následné úkoly. Abychom se vyhnuli těmto problémům při učení se slovních vektorů nesegmentovaných jazyků, zvažujeme statistiku současného výskytu slov u všech možných kandidátů segmentací založených na častých znakových n-gramech namísto segmentovaných vět poskytovaných konvenčními segmentery slov. Naše experimenty s predikcí podstatných kategorií na surových korpusech Twitteru, Weibo a Wikipedie ukazují, že navržená metoda překonává konvenční přístupy, které vyžadují segmenty slov.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja uut segmenteerimata keelte sõnade manustamise toru, mida nimetatakse segmenteerimisvabaks sõnade manustamiseks, mis ei nõua sõnade segmenteerimist eeltöötluse etapina. Erinevalt tühikutega eraldatud keeltest nõuavad segmenteerimata keeled, nagu hiina ja jaapani keel, eeltöötluse etapina sõna segmenteerimist. Kuid sõnasegmenteerimine, mis sageli nõuab käsitsi märgitud ressursse, on keeruline ja kallis ning vältimatud vead sõnasegmenteerimisel mõjutavad järgnevaid ülesandeid. Selleks et vältida neid probleeme segmenteerimata keelte sõnavaktorite õppimisel, kaalume sõnade koosesinemise statistikat kõigi võimalike segmenteerimise kandidaatide puhul, mis põhinevad sagedastel märkidel n-grammidel tavapäraste sõnasegmenteerijate poolt pakutavate segmenteeritud lausete asemel. Meie eksperimendid substantiivkategooria ennustamise ülesannetega Twitteris, Weibo ja Wikipedia korpustes näitavad, et kavandatud meetod ületab tavapäraseid lähenemisviise, mis nõuavad sõnasegmentereid.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme uutta segmentointivapaata sanaupotusta, jota kutsutaan segmentointivapaaksi sanaupotukseksi, joka ei vaadi sanan segmentointia esikäsittelyvaiheena. Toisin kuin avaruusrajatut kielet, segmentoimattomat kielet, kuten kiina ja japani, vaativat sanan segmentoinnin esikäsittelyvaiheena. Sanasegmentointi, joka vaatii usein manuaalisesti merkittyjä resursseja, on kuitenkin vaikeaa ja kallista, ja väistämättömät virheet sanasegmentoinnissa vaikuttavat loppupään tehtäviin. Jotta vältettäisiin nämä ongelmat segmentoimattomien kielten sanavektorien oppimisessa, tarkastelemme sanarinnakkaisesiintymistilastoja kaikkien mahdollisten segmentoitujen ehdokkaiden osalta tavallisten sanasegmentoitujen lauseiden sijaan. Kokeemme substantiivikategorian ennustamistehtävistä Twitterissä, Weibossa ja Wikipediassa osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä ylittää perinteiset lähestymistavat, jotka vaativat sanasegmentointia.', 'jv': 'section Gak bener luwih-luwih langa sing nggawe luwih, lan luwih-luwih tentang kanggo Cino lan Jepang, njuk kuwi wis nggawe gerakan kelangan kuwi wis ana. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive bookmark Awakdhéwé éntuk perbudhakan ngéwé éntuk kategori dipunangé ngéwé éntuk Tom, Webo lan babangé kening ngéwé nggawe nguasai perusahaan ngéwé ngerasai pawaran kanggo ngilanggar ngéwé, kuwi jenis gedhéwé.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predlagamo nov načrt vdelave besed za negmentirane jezike, imenovan vdelava besed brez segmentacije, ki ne zahteva segmentacije besed kot korak predobdelave. Za razliko od jezikov, ločenih s presledkom, negmentirani jeziki, kot sta kitajščina in japonščina, zahtevajo segmentacijo besed kot korak predobdelave. Vendar pa je segmentacija besed, ki pogosto zahteva ročno označene vire, težka in draga, neizogibne napake pri segmentaciji besed pa vplivajo na opravila nadaljnje verige. Da bi se izognili tem težavam pri učenju besednih vektorjev negmentiranih jezikov, upoštevamo statistiko sočasnega pojavljanja besed pri vseh možnih kandidatih segmentacij na podlagi pogostih znakov n-gramov namesto segmentacijskih stavkov, ki jih zagotavljajo običajni segmentatorji besed. Naši eksperimenti nalog napovedovanja kategorij samostalnikov v surovih korpusih Twitter, Weibo in Wikipedia kažejo, da predlagana metoda presega običajne pristope, ki zahtevajo segmentatorje besed.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים צינור חדש של קישור מילים לשפות לא מופרצות, שנקרא קישור מילים ללא סגמנציה, שלא דורש סגמנציה מילים כצעד מתקדם. בניגוד לשפות מוגבלות בחלל, שפות לא מוגבלות, כמו סינית ויפנית, דורשות סגמל מילים כצעד מתקדם. בכל אופן, התחלוקת מילים, שדורשת לעתים קרובות משאבים מוכתבים ידנית, קשה ויקרה, ושגיאות בלתי נמנעות בתחלוקת מילים משפיעות על משימות מתחתיות. כדי להימנע מהבעיות הללו בללמד ווקטורי מילים של שפות לא מופרדות, אנו שוקלים סטטיסטיקה של שיתוף מילים על כל מועמדים אפשריים של סגמנציות מבוססים על אופי תדירים n-גרם במקום משפטים מופרדים על ידי סגמנצי מילים קונסיבציוניים. הניסויים שלנו של משימות צפייה בקטגוריה של שמות בטוויטר, וייבו, ויקיפדיה ראויות מראים שהשיטה המוצעת מגבילה את הגישות הקונסיונציונליות שדורשות מגזרים מילים.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardar, Munã goyyade wani new pipe na magana wanda ke ƙunsa da wa harshen waɗanda ba'a sãɓa ba, abin da aka yi wa sunan segmentation-bure, da kuma ba ta buƙata tsarin magana kamar wata hanyor aiki. @ item license A lokacin da aka raba maganar, wanda aka ƙayyade manyan zartar da hannayen su ba, yana mai nauyi da kuma masu nauyi, kuma makorari da bã za'a kare shi ba na samun aikin da aka saka ƙarami. Dõmin ka n ĩsanci wa masu zartar da su a kan karanta masu shiryarwa na maganar da ba'a lissafa ba, muna bincike statistics na koma da magana a kan duk masu yiwuwa na tsohon sigogi, a kan karatun na-gram masu daidai da matsayin na-gram ko da kuma a musamman da sigogi da aka ƙayyade da kalmõn in da ke jin ɗabi'a. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na kabarin abin da ba'a sani ba a kan Twitter, Weibo da Wikiledia, yana nũna cewa, shirin da aka buƙata, za'a sami zuwa ga mataimaki masu kawaici wanda ke bukatar maganar rage.", 'bo': 'In this paper, we propose a new pipeline of word embedding for unsegmented languages, called segmentation-free word embedding, which does not require word segmentation as a preprocessing step. སྐད་རིགས་འདི་ལྟ་མི་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་མི་རྣམས་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་སྐད་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། རྒྱ་ནག་དང་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྔོ ཡིན་ནའང་། ཡིག་གེ་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་པུ་ལག་ལེན་གྱིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་ཆས་དགོས་པ་དེ་གནད་པོ་དང་སྐྱུར་བརྡན་པའི་འཛོལ་བ་ཚེ་ནང To avoid these problems in learning words vectors of unsegmented languages, we consider word co-occurrence statistics over all possible candidates of segmentations based on frequent character n-grams instead of segmented sentences provided by conventional word segmenters. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'From Textbooks to Knowledge : A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to Solve Geometry Problems', 'ar': 'من الكتب المدرسية إلى المعرفة: دراسة حالة في حصاد المعرفة البديهية من الكتب المدرسية لحل مشاكل الهندسة', 'fr': 'Des manuels à la connaissance\xa0: une étude de cas sur la collecte de connaissances axiomatiques à partir de manuels scolaires pour résoudre des problèmes de géométrie', 'pt': 'Dos livros didáticos ao conhecimento: um estudo de caso na coleta de conhecimento axiomático de livros didáticos para resolver problemas de geometria', 'es': 'De los libros de texto al conocimiento: un estudio de caso sobre la recolección del conocimiento axiomático de los libros de texto para resolver problemas de geometría', 'ja': '教科書から知識へ：幾何学的問題を解決するための教科書からの公理的知識の収穫におけるケーススタディ', 'zh': '自教科书至于知,取公理于教科书,以决几何之例', 'hi': 'पाठ्यपुस्तकों से ज्ञान तक: ज्यामिति समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए पाठ्यपुस्तकों से स्वयंसिद्ध ज्ञान की कटाई में एक केस स्टडी', 'ru': 'От учебников к знаниям: тематическое исследование по сбору аксиоматических знаний из учебников для решения задач геометрии', 'ga': 'Ó Théacsleabhair go hEolas: Cás-Staidéar maidir le hEolas Aiseach a Fhómhair ó Théacsleabhair chun Fadhbanna Céimseata a Réiteach', 'ka': 'ტექსტიკონიდან ცნობიერებაზე: აკსიომატიკური ცნობიერებაზე აკსიომატიკური ცნობიერებაზე ტექსტიკონიდან გემეტრიის პრობლემების გარეშე', 'el': 'Από τα βιβλία στη γνώση: Μια μελέτη περίπτωσης στη συλλογή της αξιοματικής γνώσης από τα βιβλία για την επίλυση προβλημάτων γεωμετρίας', 'hu': 'A tankönyvektől a tudásig: esettanulmány az axiomatikus tudás tankönyvekből történő kihasználásáról a geometriai problémák megoldására', 'it': 'Dai libri di testo alla conoscenza: un caso di studio per raccogliere conoscenze assiomatiche dai libri di testo per risolvere problemi di geometria', 'lt': 'Nuo tekstinių knygų iki žinių: eksiomatinių žinių rinkimo iš tekstinių knygų iki geometrijos problemų sprendimo atvejų tyrimas', 'kk': 'Мәтіндіктерден білім: Аксиоматтық білім беру үшін мәтіндіктерден геометриялық мәселелерді шешу', 'mk': 'Од текстовите книги до знаење: Студија на случаи за собирање аксиоматско знаење од текстовите книги до решавање на геометриски проблеми', 'ms': 'Dari Buku Teks hingga Pengetahuan: Pengelajaran Kes dalam Menerima Pengetahuan Axiomatik dari Buku Teks hingga Menyelesaikan Masalah Geometri', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн номоос мэдлэгтэй хүртэл: Сургуулийн номоос газрын асуудлуудыг шийдэхэд', 'ml': 'From Textbooks to Knowledge: A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to Solve Geometry Problems', 'mt': 'Mill-Ktejjeb tat-Test sal-Għarfien: Studju ta’ Każijiet fil-Ħsil ta’ Għarfien A żiomatiku mill-Ktejjeb tat-Test sal-Soluzzjoni tal-Problemi Ġeometriċi', 'no': 'Fra tekstbøker til kjennomsikt: Eit tilfeldige studie i oppretting av aksiomatiske kjennomsikt frå tekstbøker til løysing av geometriske problemer', 'ro': 'De la cărți la cunoaștere: un studiu de caz în recoltarea cunoștințelor axiomatice din cărți de manuale pentru a rezolva problemele de geometrie', 'sr': 'Od školskih knjiga do znanja: Istraživanje slučaja u prikupljanju aksiomatskih znanja iz školskih knjiga do rješavanja geometrijskih problema', 'pl': 'Od podręczników do wiedzy: studium przypadku w zbieraniu wiedzy aksjomatycznej z podręczników do rozwiązywania problemów geometrycznych', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Textbook-to-aqoon: A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to solve dhibaatooyinka Geometry', 'ur': 'Textbooks to Knowledge: A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to Solve Geometry Problems', 'sv': 'Från läroböcker till kunskap: En fallstudie i att skörda axiomatisk kunskap från läroböcker för att lösa geometriproblem', 'ta': 'உரைப் புத்தகங்களிலிருந்து கல்வியிலிருந்து தெரியும்: உரைப் புத்தகங்களிலிருந்து சிகிச்சை பிரச்னைகளை தீர்வு செய', 'uz': 'Matn kitobdan taʼlumotga ega: Axiomatik maʼlumotini tekst kitoblardan Geometriya muammolalarini qidirish', 'vi': 'Từ sách văn hóa sang kiến thức: Một nghiên cứu về lĩnh vực thu hoạch thức trục trặc từ sách pháp tới giải Dịch vật lý học.', 'da': 'Fra lærebøger til viden: Et casestudie i at høste aksiomatisk viden fra lærebøger for at løse geometriproblemer', 'nl': 'Van studieboeken naar kennis: Een casestudy in het oogsten van axiomatische kennis uit studieboeken om geometrische problemen op te lossen', 'hr': 'Od učenika do znanja: Istraživanje slučaja u prikupljanju aksiomatskih znanja iz učenika do rješavanja geometrijskih problema', 'de': 'Von Lehrbüchern zum Wissen: Eine Fallstudie zur Gewinnung axiomatischen Wissens aus Lehrbüchern zur Lösung von Geometrieproblemen', 'bg': 'От учебници до знания: казус за събиране на аксиоматични знания от учебници за решаване на геометрични проблеми', 'id': 'Dari Buku Teks hingga Pengetahuan: Sebuah Penelitian Kasus dalam Pemukulan Pengetahuan Axiomatic dari Buku Teks hingga Menyelesaikan Masalah Geometri', 'sw': 'Kutoka Vitabu vya Teknolojia hadi ufahamu: Utafiti wa Kesi katika Kuzidi Ujuzi wa Kixiomatika kutoka Vitabu vya Teknolojia ili Kusuluhisha Tatizo la Geometry', 'fa': 'از کتاب\u200cهای آموزش به دانش: یک مطالعه پرونده در برداشتن دانش اکسیومتیک از کتاب\u200cهای آموزش تا حل مشکلات ژومتری', 'ko': '교과서부터 지식까지: 교과서에서 공리지식을 얻어 기하학적 문제를 해결하는 사례 연구', 'tr': 'Textbooks to Knowledge: A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to Solve Geometry Problems', 'sq': 'Nga librat e tekstit deri në njohuri: Një studim rasti në mbledhjen e njohurive aksiomatike nga librat e tekstit deri në zgjidhjen e problemeve të gjeometrisë', 'af': "Van Teksbokke tot kennis: 'n Kas studie in Axiomatiese kennis van Teksbokke tot Oplos Geometrie Probleme", 'hy': 'Տեքստի գրքերից մինչև գիտելիք. Տեքստի գրքերից մինչև երկրաչափության խնդիրների լուծման գործընթացի ուսումնասիրություն', 'bn': 'টেক্সটবই থেকে জ্ঞান পর্যন্ত: টেক্সটবই থেকে জিওমিটির সমস্যা সমাধান করার জন্য একটি কেস স্টিডি গবেষণা', 'am': 'ከጽሑፍ መጽሐፍ ወደ እውቀት: A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to solve Geometry problems', 'az': '칐zg칲r Kitablardan Bilm톛y톛: 칐zg칲r Kitablardan Axiomatik Biliml톛rin Yay캼n캼lmas캼na q톛d톛r Geometriya Probleml톛rini 칞톛km톛y톛 q톛d톛r', 'bs': 'Od učenika do znanja: Istraživanje slučaja u prikupljanju aksiomatskih znanja iz učenika do rješavanja geometrijskih problema', 'cs': 'Od učebnic ke znalostem: Případová studie sběru axiomatických znalostí z učebnic k řešení geometrických problémů', 'et': 'Õpperaamatutest teadmisteni: juhtumiuuring aksiomaatiliste teadmiste kogumisel õpperaamatutest geomeetriaprobleemide lahendamiseks', 'fi': 'Oppikirjoista tietoon: tapaustutkimus aksiomaattisen tiedon keräämisestä oppikirjoista geometrian ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi', 'ca': 'Des de llibres de text al coneixement: Un estudi de cas en recollir coneixements axiòmàtics des de llibres de text a resoldre problemes de geometria', 'jv': 'Text books to knowknowknownA Case Learning in harstoning axijomati knownLanguage from textbooks to Resolve GemapsPanelPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPingPing.', 'ha': 'From TextScripts to Cilm: A case Research in Harversing Axome Cilm from Textbooks to solve Geomery Problem', 'sk': 'Od učbenikov do znanja: študija primera pri zbiranju aksiomatičnega znanja iz učbenikov za reševanje geometrijskih problemov', 'he': 'מספרי טקסט למידע: מחקר מקרים באספת ידע אקסיומטי מספרי טקסט לפתור בעיות גיאומטריה', 'bo': 'From Textbooks to Knowledge: A Case Study in Harvesting Axiomatic Knowledge from Textbooks to Solve Geometry Problems'}
{'en': 'Textbooks are rich sources of information. Harvesting structured knowledge from textbooks is a key challenge in many educational applications. As a case study, we present an approach for harvesting structured axiomatic knowledge from math textbooks. Our approach uses rich contextual and typographical features extracted from raw textbooks. It leverages the redundancy and shared ordering across multiple textbooks to further refine the harvested axioms. These axioms are then parsed into rules that are used to improve the state-of-the-art in solving geometry problems.', 'ar': 'الكتب المدرسية هي مصادر غنية للمعلومات. يعد حصاد المعرفة المنظمة من الكتب المدرسية تحديًا رئيسيًا في العديد من التطبيقات التعليمية. كدراسة حالة ، نقدم نهجًا لحصاد المعرفة البديهية المنظمة من الكتب المدرسية في الرياضيات. يستخدم نهجنا ميزات سياقية ومطبعية غنية مستخرجة من الكتب المدرسية الأولية. إنه يعزز التكرار والطلب المشترك عبر كتب مدرسية متعددة لتحسين البديهيات المحصودة. يتم بعد ذلك تحليل هذه البديهيات إلى قواعد تُستخدم لتحسين أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا في حل المشكلات الهندسية.', 'fr': "Les manuels scolaires sont de riches sources d'information. La collecte de connaissances structurées à partir de manuels scolaires constitue un défi majeur dans de nombreuses applications pédagogiques. En tant qu'étude de cas, nous présentons une approche pour récolter des connaissances axiomatiques structurées à partir de manuels de mathématiques. Notre approche utilise de riches fonctionnalités contextuelles et typographiques extraites de manuels scolaires bruts. Il tire parti de la redondance et de la commande partagée entre plusieurs manuels scolaires pour affiner davantage les axiomes récoltés. Ces axiomes sont ensuite analysés en règles qui sont utilisées pour améliorer l'état de la technique en matière de résolution des problèmes de géométrie.", 'pt': 'Os livros didáticos são fontes ricas de informação. Coletar conhecimento estruturado de livros didáticos é um desafio fundamental em muitas aplicações educacionais. Como estudo de caso, apresentamos uma abordagem para colher conhecimentos axiomáticos estruturados de livros didáticos de matemática. Nossa abordagem usa recursos contextuais e tipográficos ricos extraídos de livros didáticos brutos. Ele aproveita a redundância e a ordenação compartilhada em vários livros didáticos para refinar ainda mais os axiomas colhidos. Esses axiomas são então analisados em regras que são usadas para melhorar o estado da arte na resolução de problemas de geometria.', 'es': 'Los libros de texto son fuentes ricas de información. La recolección de conocimientos estructurados de los libros de texto es un desafío clave en muchas aplicaciones educativas. Como estudio de caso, presentamos un enfoque para recolectar conocimiento axiomático estructurado de los libros de texto de matemáticas. Nuestro enfoque utiliza características contextuales y tipográficas enriquecidas extraídas de libros de texto sin procesar. Aprovecha la redundancia y el orden compartido en varios libros de texto para refinar aún más los axiomas recopilados. Estos axiomas se analizan luego en reglas que se utilizan para mejorar el estado de la técnica en la resolución de problemas de geometría.', 'ja': '教科書は豊富な情報源です。教科書から構造化された知識を収集することは、多くの教育アプリケーションで重要な課題である。ケーススタディとして、数学の教科書から構造化された公理的知識を収穫するためのアプローチを提示する。私たちのアプローチは、生の教科書から抽出された豊富な文脈的および活字的特徴を使用しています。複数の教科書にわたる冗長性と共有注文を活用して、収穫された公理をさらに洗練させます。次に、これらの公理を解析して、最先端のジオメトリ問題を解決するために使用されるルールに変換します。', 'zh': '教科书者,富信之原也。 以教科书收结构化,教之要也。 为例研究,立数学教科书中收结构化公理知识之法。 吾法用始教科书取上下文印功。 因冗余跨数教科书之序以尽收获之理。 然后以公理解析为法,所以更进最新术也。', 'hi': 'पाठ्यपुस्तकें जानकारी के समृद्ध स्रोत हैं। पाठ्यपुस्तकों से संरचित ज्ञान की कटाई कई शैक्षिक अनुप्रयोगों में एक प्रमुख चुनौती है। एक मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में, हम गणित की पाठ्यपुस्तकों से संरचित स्वयंसिद्ध ज्ञान की कटाई के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण कच्चे पाठ्यपुस्तकों से निकाले गए समृद्ध प्रासंगिक और टाइपोग्राफिकल सुविधाओं का उपयोग करता है। यह काटे गए स्वयंसिद्धों को और अधिक परिष्कृत करने के लिए कई पाठ्यपुस्तकों में अतिरेक और साझा आदेश का लाभ उठाता है। इन स्वयंसिद्धों को तब उन नियमों में पार्स किया जाता है जिनका उपयोग ज्यामिति समस्याओं को हल करने में अत्याधुनिक सुधार करने के लिए किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Учебники являются богатыми источниками информации. Сбор структурированных знаний из учебников является ключевой проблемой во многих образовательных приложениях. В качестве примера мы представляем подход к сбору структурированных аксиоматических знаний из учебников по математике. Наш подход использует богатые контекстуальные и типографические особенности, извлеченные из необработанных учебников. Он использует избыточность и совместное упорядочение по нескольким учебникам для дальнейшего уточнения собранных аксиом. Эти аксиомы затем анализируются в правилах, которые используются для улучшения современного решения задач геометрии.', 'ga': 'Is foinsí saibhir faisnéise iad téacsleabhair. Is príomhdhúshlán in go leor feidhmeanna oideachais é eolas struchtúrtha a bhaint as téacsleabhair. Mar chás-staidéar, cuirimid cur chuige i láthair chun eolas struchtúrtha aiseachtach a bhaint as téacsleabhair matamaitice. Úsáideann ár gcur chuige gnéithe saibhre comhthéacsúla agus clóghrafacha a bhaintear as téacsleabhair amh. Déanann sé an iomarcaíocht agus an t-ordú roinnte a ghiaráil trasna na n-iliomad téacsleabhar chun na haicsiomaí buainte a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Déantar na haicsiomaí seo a pharsáil ansin i rialacha a úsáidtear chun an úrscothacht a fheabhsú chun fadhbanna céimseata a réiteach.', 'hu': 'A tankönyvek gazdag információforrások. A tankönyvekből származó strukturált ismeretek betakarítása kulcsfontosságú kihívás számos oktatási alkalmazásban. Esettanulmányként bemutatjuk a matematikai tankönyvekből származó strukturált axiomatikus ismeretek betakarításának megközelítését. Megközelítésünk gazdag kontextuális és tipográfiai funkciókat használ nyers tankönyvekből. Kihasználja a redundanciát és a megosztott rendelést több tankönyvben, hogy tovább finomítsa a betakarított axiómákat. Ezeket az axiómákat ezután olyan szabályokká alakítják, amelyeket a geometriai problémák megoldásának korszerűsítésére használnak.', 'el': 'Τα βιβλία είναι πλούσια πηγή πληροφοριών. Η συλλογή δομημένης γνώσης από βιβλία αποτελεί βασική πρόκληση σε πολλές εκπαιδευτικές εφαρμογές. Ως μελέτη περίπτωσης, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για τη συλλογή δομημένων αξιωματικών γνώσεων από βιβλία μαθηματικών. Η προσέγγισή μας χρησιμοποιεί πλούσια περιεκτικά και τυπογραφικά χαρακτηριστικά που εξάγονται από ακατέργαστα εγχειρίδια. Αξιοποιεί την πλεονασματικότητα και την κοινή τάξη σε πολλαπλά εγχειρίδια για να βελτιώσει περαιτέρω τα αξίωμα που συλλέγονται. Αυτά τα αξιώματα αναλύονται στη συνέχεια σε κανόνες που χρησιμοποιούνται για τη βελτίωση της κατάστασης της τεχνολογίας στην επίλυση προβλημάτων γεωμετρίας.', 'it': "I libri di testo sono ricche fonti di informazione. Raccogliere conoscenze strutturate dai libri di testo è una sfida chiave in molte applicazioni educative. Come caso di studio, presentiamo un approccio per la raccolta di conoscenze assiomatiche strutturate da libri di matematica. Il nostro approccio utilizza ricche funzionalità contestuali e tipografiche estratte da libri di testo grezzi. Sfrutta la ridondanza e l'ordinamento condiviso tra più libri di testo per perfezionare ulteriormente gli assiomi raccolti. Questi assiomi vengono poi analizzati in regole che vengono utilizzate per migliorare lo stato dell'arte nella risoluzione dei problemi di geometria.", 'ka': 'ტექსტიკური ინფორმაციის ბედნიერი გამოსახულება. სტრუქტურული მეცნიერების კოსტრუქტურაციის შექმნა მნიშვნელოვანი განახლებაში არის მნიშვნელოვანი განახლება. როგორც სწავლის შესახებ, ჩვენ მათემატიკური სწავლის წიგნიდან სტრუქტურული აკსიომატიკური მეცნიერების შესახებ გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენი პროგრამის გამოყენება ბედნიერი კონტექსტური და ტიპოგრაფიური ფუნქციების გამოყენება, რომლებიც წყალი ტექსტური წიგნაბ ეს უფრო მეტი სტუქტური კოსტუქტურების შესახებ გამოსახულება და გაყოფილი სტუქტური კოსტუქტურების შესახებ, რომ უფრო მეტი აკესომის შე ეს აკსიომები შემდეგ გადაწყენება წესულებში, რომლებიც გამოყენებულია, რომ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მსგავსი წესულებაში გემეტრიის', 'lt': 'Tekstų knygos yra daug informacijos šaltinių. Daugelyje švietimo programų pagrindinis uždavinys – surinkti struktūrines žinias iš vadovų. Kaip atvejų tyrimas, mes pristatome metodą, kaip surinkti struktūrizuotas a šiomatiškas žinias iš matematikos vadovų. Mūsų metodas naudoja daug kontekstinių ir tipografinių savybių, gautų iš žaliavinių vadovų. Ji skatina atleidimą nuo darbo ir paskirstytą užsakymą įvairiose vadovų knygose, kad būtų toliau patobulintos derliaus ašios. Tada šios aksioms priskiriamos taisyklėms, kuriomis siekiama pagerinti pažangiausią geometrijos problemų sprendimą.', 'kk': 'Мәтіндік кітаптары мәліметтің баяны көзі. Құрастырылған мәліметтерді оқыту - көп білім беру қолданбаларында негізгі мәлімет. Мәселе зерттеу үшін, біз математиканың оқу кітаптарынан құрылған асиоматикалық білімдерді жасау арқылы таңдаймыз. Біздің тәсіліміздің баяны контекстуалды және типографикалық қасиеттері сызық мәтіндіктерден шығарылды. Бұл бірнеше мәтін кітаптарының ортақтастырылығын күшін қайталап, ортақтастырылып жазылған осыптарды қайталау үшін. Бұл асиптерді геометриялық мәселелерді шешу үшін қолданылатын ережелер ретінде талдауға болады.', 'mk': 'Книгите се богати извори на информации. Земањето структурирано знаење од учебниците е клучен предизвик во многу образовни апликации. Како случајна студија, претставуваме пристап за собирање структурирано аксиоматско знаење од учебниците за математика. Нашиот пристап користи богати контекстуални и типографски карактеристики извадени од сурови учебници. It leverages the redundancy and shared ordering across multiple textbooks to further refine the harvested axioms.  Овие аксиоми потоа се анализираат во правила кои се користат за подобрување на најдобрата технологија во решавањето на геометриските проблеми.', 'ms': 'Buku teks adalah sumber maklumat yang kaya. Menerima pengetahuan struktur dari buku teks adalah cabaran utama dalam banyak aplikasi pendidikan. Sebagai kajian kes, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk mengambil pengetahuan aksiomatik struktur dari buku teks matematik. pendekatan kita menggunakan ciri-ciri kontekstual dan tipografik yang kaya yang dikekstrak dari buku teks mentah. Ia menggunakan pengunduran dan berkongsi perintah melalui beberapa buku teks untuk menaikkan lebih lanjut aksiom yang dikongsi. Aksiom ini kemudian dihapus menjadi peraturan yang digunakan untuk meningkatkan keadaan-state-of-the-art dalam memecahkan masalah geometri.', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн ном бол баян мэдээллийн эх үүсвэр. Сургуулийн номоос бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэгийг багасгах нь олон боловсрол хэрэглээнд чухал асуудал юм. Мэдээж судалгааны хувьд бид математикийн сургуульдаас бүтээгдэхүүнтэй ассиоматик мэдлэг боловсруулахын тулд арга зам өгдөг. Бидний арга баримт баян орчин, типтографик дүрсийг сургуульдаас гаргасан. Энэ нь олон сургуулийн ном дээр дахин үржүүлсэн тэнхлэгүүдийг дахин сэргээх боломжтой болгодог. Эдгээр тэнхлэг нь геометрийн асуудлыг шийдэхэд хэрэглэгддэг дүрэм болгон хуваалцагдана.', 'no': 'Tekstbokar er rike kjelde for informasjon. Oppretting av strukturerte kunnskap frå tekstbokar er ein nøkkelutfordring i mange utdanningsprogrammer. Som tilfeldige studier, presenterer vi ein tilnærming for å bygge strukturert aksiomatisk kunnskap frå matematiske tekstbokar. Tilnærming vårt brukar rikke kontekst- og typografiske funksjonar ut frå råbok. Det leverer redundans og delt ordning over fleire tekstbøker for å refinera dei avslutta aksene. Desse aksjonane blir derfor tolka i reglane som vert brukt til å forbedra kunsttilstanden i løysing av geometriske problemar.', 'mt': 'Il-kotba tat-test huma sorsi rikki ta’ informazzjoni. Il-ġbir ta’ għarfien strutturat mill-kotba ta’ tagħlim huwa sfida ewlenija f’ħafna applikazzjonijiet edukattivi. Bħala studju ta’ każ, qed nippreżentaw approċċ għall-ġbir ta’ għarfien assejomatiku strutturat minn kotba ta’ tagħlim tal-matematika. L-approċċ tagħna juża karatteristiċi kuntestwali u tipografiċi rikki estratti minn kotba ta’ tagħlim mhux ipproċessati. Jixpruna s-sensja u l-ordni kondiviża bejn diversi ktieb ta’ tagħlim biex ikomplu jirfinaw l-assiomi maħsuda. Dawn l-assiomi mbagħad jiġu analizzati f’regoli li jintużaw għat-titjib tal-aħħar fis-soluzzjoni tal-problemi ġeometriċi.', 'sr': 'Učitelji su bogati izvori informacija. Skupljanje strukturiranih znanja iz školskih knjiga je ključni izazov u mnogim obrazovnim aplikacijama. Kao studija slučajeva, predstavljamo pristup za skupljanje strukturiranih aksiomatičkih znanja iz matematičkih udžbenika. Naš pristup koristi bogate kontekstualne i tipografske karakteristike izvučene iz sirovih udžbenika. To utiče na redundanciju i zajedničku naređenje preko višestrukih udžbenika kako bi dalje refinirao prikupljene aksije. Ove aksiome se onda analiziraju u pravila koje se koriste za poboljšanje stanja umjetnosti u rješavanju geometrijskih problema.', 'ro': 'Manualele sunt surse bogate de informaţii. Recoltarea cunoștințelor structurate din manuale este o provocare cheie în multe aplicații educaționale. Ca studiu de caz, prezentăm o abordare pentru recoltarea cunoștințelor axiomatice structurate din manuale de matematică. Abordarea noastră folosește caracteristici contextuale și tipografice bogate extrase din manuale brute. Acesta valorifică redundanța și ordinea partajată în mai multe manuale pentru a rafina în continuare axiomele recoltate. Aceste axiome sunt apoi analizate în reguli care sunt folosite pentru a îmbunătăți starea de ultimă generație în rezolvarea problemelor de geometrie.', 'pl': 'Podręczniki są bogatym źródłem informacji. Zbieranie strukturyzowanej wiedzy z podręczników jest kluczowym wyzwaniem w wielu zastosowaniach edukacyjnych. Jako studium przypadku przedstawiamy podejście do zbierania strukturalnej wiedzy aksjomatycznej z podręczników matematycznych. Nasze podejście wykorzystuje bogate cechy kontekstowe i typograficzne uzyskane z surowych podręczników. Wykorzystuje redundancję i wspólne porządkowanie w wielu podręcznikach do dalszego udoskonalania zebranych aksjomów. Te aksjomy są następnie analizowane na reguły, które są używane do poprawy stanu sztuki w rozwiązywaniu problemów geometrii.', 'so': 'buugaagta qoraalku waa noocyo taajir ah oo macluumaad ah. Horumarinta aqoonta aasaasiga ah ee buugaagta waa dhibaato muhiim ah ee codsiyada waxbarashada badan. Waxbarashada xaaladda, waxaynu u soo bandhignaa qaab u soo bandhigyo soo koritaanka aqoonta iskuulka ah ee la dhisay buugaagta xisaabta. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu isticmaalaa taajir ah oo ku qoran iyo qoraal dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo laga soo bixiyey buugaagta quraanka. Waxay u fidisaa dhamaanshaha iyo hagitaanka buugaagta kala duduwan si ay u hagaajiyaan faasiyooyinka la soo baxay. Markaas waxaa lagu qeybiyaa qaynuunnada lagu hagaajiyo xaaladda farshaxanka ee xafiiska dhibaatooyinka joomiyada.', 'sv': 'Läroböcker är rika informationskällor. Att skörda strukturerad kunskap från läroböcker är en viktig utmaning i många pedagogiska tillämpningar. Som fallstudie presenterar vi ett tillvägagångssätt för att skörda strukturerad axiomatisk kunskap från matematiska läroböcker. Vårt tillvägagångssätt använder rika kontextuella och typografiska funktioner extraherade från råa läroböcker. Den utnyttjar redundansen och delade beställningar över flera läroböcker för att ytterligare förfina de skördade axiomen. Dessa axiom tolkas sedan till regler som används för att förbättra det senaste inom att lösa geometriproblem.', 'si': 'පාළ පොත් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්ණයි. පස්සේ පොත්තු වලින් සංවිධානය කරපු දැනගන්න පුළුවන් අභ්\u200dයාසයක් විතරයි. විදිහට පරීක්ෂණයක් විදිහට, අපි ගණිත පාසක පුත්තෙන් සංවිධානය අක්සියෝමේටික් දන්නවක් අරගෙන ඉ අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණ සංවේදනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විදියට පාවිච්චි විදියට පාවිච්චි කරනවා. ඒක පුළුවන් විශාල පොත්තු වලින් විශාල පුළුවන් වලින් විශාල පුළුවන් විශාල කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ මේ අක්සියෝම්ස් පස්සේ විශ්ලේෂණය වෙනුවෙන් නියෝජිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න පාවිච්චි කරනවා.', 'ta': 'உரை புத்தகங்கள் தகவல்களின் பணக்க மூலங்கள். Harvesting structured knowledge from textbooks is a key challenge in many educational applications.  ஒரு விஷயத்தின் படிப்பாடு, கணிப் புத்தகங்களிலிருந்து உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அசியலியல் அறிவை வெளியிட ஒரு வழியை கொண்டு வர நம்முடைய அணுக்கம் பணக்கமான புத்தகங்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட பணம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பண்புகளை  அது குறைவு மற்றும் பல புத்தகங்கள் முழுவதும் பகிர்ந்து கட்டளைகளை மற்றும் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அச்சுகளை மேலும் செய்ய. பிறகு இந்த அச்சுறுத்தல் பின்னர் விதிமுறைகளாக பிரிக்கப்படுகிறது இது பூமியியல் பிரச்னைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய பயன்படுத்தப', 'ml': 'പദാവലിപുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സമ്പന്നരൂപത്തിലാണ്. പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ പരിജ്ഞാനം കഠിനമാക്കുന്നത് വളരെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത് ഒരു കേസ് പഠനത്തിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഗണിത പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട അക്സിയോമിക്കല്\u200d അറിവ് കൊണ്ടു നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുനിന്ന് സമ്പന്നതയും ടൈപ്പോഗ്രാഫിക്കൽ പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. കൊയ്തിരിക്കുന്ന അക്സിയോമുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d അത് കുറച്ച് പുസ്തകങ്ങളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത് കൊ പിന്നീട് ഈ അക്സിയോമികള്\u200d ജോമിത്രിയ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നിയമങ്ങളിലേക്ക് പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കപ', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹ کتاب معلومات کے ثروت منبع ہیں۔ تعلیم کتابوں سے ساختہ علم حاصل کرنا بہت سی تعلیم کاروباروں میں ایک کلی چال ہے۔ ہم ایک مطالعہ کے طور پر ریاضی کتابوں سے ساختہ آکسیومتیک علم کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا تقریبا بہترین متوسط اور تایپگرافیک فرصت استعمال کرتا ہے جو روے ٹیکسٹ کتابوں سے نکالے گئے ہیں۔ اس نے بہت سی کتابوں میں بہت سی سفارشی اور مشترک سفارشی کا ذریعہ اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ اس کے ذریعہ سے اضافہ کرے۔ اس کے بعد یہ آکسیوم قانون میں تقسیم کیے جاتے ہیں جو جہامتری مسائل حل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Matn kitoblar maʼlumot manbasiga ega. Kitoblarning tashkilotlaridan tashkilotli maʼlumot bir ta'lim dasturdagi muhim muammolar. As a case study, we present an approach for harvesting structured axiomatic knowledge from math textbooks.  Bizning muvaffaqiyatlarimiz yomon kitobdan tashqarilgan taxminan hozir va typografik xususiyatlaridan foydalanadi. Bu ko'plab kitoblarda bir necha kitob orqali qo'shish va bir necha to ʻplab tartib bo'lgan aksiomlarni oshirish uchun. Keyin bu aksiomlar geometriy muammolarni ҳал этиш учун фойдаланадиган қоидаларга ажратилади.", 'vi': 'Văn bản là nguồn thông tin dồi dào. Thu hoạch kiến thức cơ cấu từ sách giáo khoa là một thách thức quan trọng trong nhiều ứng dụng giáo dục. Để nghiên cứu các trường hợp, chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp thu hoạch kiến thức Á vâng cấu trúc từ các giáo khoa toán. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi sử dụng các tính chất ngữ và đánh chữ được chiết xuất từ sách văn bản thô. Nó nhân lực hỗ trợ dự phòng và chia sẻ xếp hàng qua nhiều sách giáo khoa để trau dồi các trục máy thu hoạch. Chúng được phân tích thành những quy định được dùng để cải thiện trạng thái nghệ thuật trong việc giải quyết các vấn đề hình học.', 'hr': 'Učitelji su bogati izvori informacija. Skupljanje strukturiranih znanja iz udžbenika je ključni izazov u mnogim obrazovnim aplikacijama. Kao istraživanje slučajeva, predstavljamo pristup za skupljanje strukturiranih aksiomatičkih znanja iz udžbenika matematike. Naš pristup koristi bogate contextualne i tipografske karakteristike izvučene iz sirovih udžbenika. To utječe na redundanciju i zajedničku naređenje preko višestrukih udžbenika kako bi dalje refiniralo računate aksiome. Tada se te aksiome analiziraju u pravila koje se koriste za poboljšanje stanja umjetnosti u rješavanju problema geometrije.', 'nl': "Tekenboeken zijn rijke informatiebronnen. Het oogsten van gestructureerde kennis uit studieboeken is een belangrijke uitdaging in veel onderwijstoepassingen. Als casestudy presenteren we een aanpak voor het oogsten van gestructureerde axiomatische kennis uit wiskundeboeken. Onze aanpak maakt gebruik van rijke contextuele en typografische functies die zijn geëxtraheerd uit ruwe studieboeken. Het maakt gebruik van redundantie en gedeelde ordening in meerdere studieboeken om de geoogste axioma's verder te verfijnen. Deze axioma's worden vervolgens verwerkt in regels die worden gebruikt om de state-of-the-art bij het oplossen van geometrieproblemen te verbeteren.", 'bg': 'Учебниците са богати източници на информация. Събирането на структурирани знания от учебници е ключово предизвикателство в много образователни приложения. Като казус представяме подход за събиране на структурирани аксиоматични знания от учебниците по математика. Нашият подход използва богати контекстуални и типографски характеристики, извлечени от сурови учебници. Той използва съкращението и споделеното подреждане в множество учебници, за да усъвършенства допълнително събраните аксиоми. Тези аксиоми след това се анализират в правила, които се използват за подобряване на състоянието на техниката при решаване на геометрични проблеми.', 'da': 'Lærebøger er rige informationskilder. At høste struktureret viden fra lærebøger er en vigtig udfordring i mange uddannelsesmæssige applikationer. Som et casestudie præsenterer vi en tilgang til at høste struktureret aksiomatisk viden fra matematiske lærebøger. Vores tilgang bruger rige kontekstuelle og typografiske funktioner udvundet fra rå lærebøger. Det udnytter redundansen og delt bestilling på tværs af flere lærebøger til yderligere at forbedre de høstede aksiomer. Disse aksiomer fortolkes derefter i regler, der bruges til at forbedre state-of-the-art i løsning af geometri problemer.', 'id': 'Buku teks adalah sumber informasi yang kaya. Menculik pengetahuan struktur dari buku teks adalah tantangan kunci dalam banyak aplikasi pendidikan. Sebagai studi kasus, kami mempersembahkan pendekatan untuk mengumpulkan pengetahuan aksiomatik struktur dari buku teks matematika. pendekatan kita menggunakan karakteristik kontekstual dan tipografik yang kaya yang dikeluarkan dari buku teks mentah. It leverages the redundancy and shared ordering across multiple textbooks to further refine the harvested axioms.  Aksium-aksium ini kemudian dihapus menjadi aturan yang digunakan untuk meningkatkan state-of-the-art dalam memecahkan masalah geometri.', 'fa': 'کتاب\u200cهای آموزش منبع اطلاعات ثروتمند هستند. جمع کردن دانش ساخته از کتابهای آموزشی یک چالش کلیدی در بسیاری از کاربردهای آموزشی است. به عنوان یک مطالعه پرونده، ما یک روش برای جمع کردن دانش آکسیومتیک ساخته شده از کتابهای آموزش ریاضی را پیشنهاد می کنیم. دستور ما از ویژه\u200cهای متوسط و تایپگرافی پولدار استفاده می\u200cکند که از کتابهای آموزشی خارج شده است. این سفارش بیشتری را به تأثیر داد و سفارش مشترک در کتابهای متعدد تا بیشتری آکسیوم\u200cهای خریده را تأثیر دهد. این آکسیوم\u200cها به قانون\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cشوند که در حل مشکلات ژومتریکی استفاده می\u200cشوند.', 'de': 'Lehrbücher sind reiche Informationsquellen. Strukturiertes Wissen aus Lehrbüchern zu gewinnen ist eine zentrale Herausforderung in vielen Bildungsanwendungen. Als Fallstudie präsentieren wir einen Ansatz zur Gewinnung strukturierter axiomatischer Kenntnisse aus mathematischen Lehrbüchern. Unser Ansatz verwendet umfangreiche kontextbezogene und typografische Funktionen, die aus rohen Lehrbüchern extrahiert wurden. Es nutzt die Redundanz und die gemeinsame Ordnung über mehrere Lehrbücher hinweg, um die geernteten Axiome weiter zu verfeinern. Diese Axiome werden dann in Regeln parst, die verwendet werden, um den Stand der Technik bei der Lösung von Geometrieproblemen zu verbessern.', 'ko': '교과서는 풍부한 정보의 원천이다.많은 교육 응용에서 교과서에서 구조화된 지식을 얻는 것은 관건적인 도전이다.사례 연구로서 우리는 수학 교과서에서 구조화된 공리 지식을 얻는 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 원시 교과서에서 추출한 풍부한 상하문과 조판 특징을 사용했다.그것은 여러 교과서 간의 불필요함과 공유 순서를 이용하여 수확의 공리를 더욱 보완한다.그리고 이러한 공리를 규칙으로 해석하여 기하학적 문제를 해결하는 기술 수준을 향상시키는 데 사용한다.', 'tr': 'Metin kitaplar bagy maglumatyň çeşmeleridir. Okuw kitaplardan düzümlenmiş bilim almak köp okuw uygulamalarynda a çyk kynçylyk däldir. Bir ýagdaý öwrenmesi bolsa, matematika okuwçylardan düzenli aksiýatik bilgi hasaplamak üçin bir nusga görkeýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz çyz ders kitaplardan çykylýan baý contextual we typografiýalyk özelliklerini ulanýar. Güçlü ve paylaşık düzenlemesini birden fazla okuw kitaplarında, hasaplanmış akslarını daha fazla refine etmek için etkinleýär. Bu asymlar, soňra geometriň problemlerini çözmek üçin ullanýan kurallara bölünýär.', 'af': "Teksbokke is ryk bronne van inligting. Struktuurte kennis van teksbokke is 'n sleutel uitdaging in baie onderwysingstoepassings. As 'n geval studie, voorsien ons 'n toegang vir die oering van structureerde aksiomatiese kennis van matematiese teksbokke. Ons toegang gebruik ryk konteksual en tipografiese funksies wat uit rouboeke uitgevoer word. Dit verwyder die redundansie en gedeelde ordening oor veelvuldige teksbokke om die aangeneeste aksies verder te herstel. Hierdie aksiome is dan verwerk in reëls wat gebruik word om die staat van die kuns te verbeter in geometrie probleme te los.", 'sw': 'Vitabu vya teknolojia ni vyanzo vingi vya taarifa. Kudhibiti maarifa yaliyotengenezwa kutoka vitabu ni changamoto muhimu katika matumizi mengi ya elimu. Kama utafiti wa kesi, tunaweka mbinu ya kuvuna maarifa ya kiuchumi kutoka vitabu vya hisabati. Our approach uses rich contextual and typographical features extracted from raw textbooks.  Inatumia uchunguzi na kusambaza amri kupitia vitabu mbalimbali ili kuendelea kuboresha maafisa yaliyovunjwa. Hizi misukosuko yanachapishwa katika sheria ambazo zinatumiwa kuboresha hali ya sanaa katika kutatua matatizo ya hali ya kijiji.', 'sq': 'Librat e tekstit janë burime të pasura të informacionit. Harvesting structured knowledge from textbooks is a key challenge in many educational applications.  Si një studim rasti, ne paraqesim një qasje për mbledhjen e njohurive aksiomatike të strukturuara nga librat e mësimeve të matematikës. Përqasja jonë përdor karakteristika të pasura kontekstuale dhe tipografike të nxjerra nga librat e mesme të papërpunuara. Ajo nxjerr dorëheqjen dhe porositë e përbashkëta nëpër shumë libra mësimi për të rafinuar më tej aksiomet e korrura. Këto aksiome analizohen pastaj në rregulla që përdoren për të përmirësuar gjeografinë më të avancuar në zgjidhjen e problemeve gjeometrike.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ መጻሕፍት የሀብት መረጃዎች ናቸው የመጽሐፉ መጻሕፍት እውቀትን መጨመር በብዙ ትምህርት ፕሮግራሞች የቁልፍ ውሸት ነው፡፡ የሥርዓት ትምህርት መሆኑን በመካነ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተመሳሰለውን የባሕላዊ እውቀትን ለማከማቻል እናቀርባለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን ከጥሩ መጻሕፍት የተወለደውን ሀብታሞች እና የጦማሪካዊ ምርጫዎች ይጠቅማል፡፡ በሁለት መጽሐፎች ላይ የተሰናከረውን አክስዮምን ለማድረግ እና የተካፈለውን ትእዛዝ ሰጥቷል፡፡ የዚህ አካክሲዮዎች የጂዮት ችግር መፍታትን ለመሻል የሚጠቀሙትን ሥርዓቶች ተለይተዋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Գրքերը տեղեկատվության հարուստ աղբյուրներ են: Հաւելացնելը դասագրքերից կառուցվածված գիտելիքների հիմնական մարտահրավերն է շատ կրթական ծրագրերում: Ինչպես դեպքի ուսումնասիրություն, մենք ներկայացնում ենք մաթեմատիկայի դասագրքերից կառուցված աքսիոմատիկ գիտելիքների հավաքածու մոտեցում: Մեր մոտեցումը օգտագործում է հարուստ կոնտեքստուալ և տիպոգրաֆիկ հատկություններ, որոնք ստացվում են դասագրքերից: Այն օգտագործում է անհրաժեշտությունը և համապատասխանում է բազմաթիվ դասագրքերում հաջորդ բարելավելու համար հնձնված առանցքները: Այս աքսիոմները վերլուծում են կանոնների մեջ, որոնք օգտագործվում են երկրաչափության խնդիրների լուծման մեջ բարելավելու համար:', 'az': 'Kitablar m…ôlumatlarńĪn zengin m…ônb…ôl…ôridir. YazńĪlńĪm kitablarńĪndan yapńĪlmńĪŇü bilgi almaq √ßoxlu t…ôhsil proqramlarńĪnda anahtar √ß…ôtinlikdir. M…ôs…ôl…ôn t…ôhsil olaraq, biz matematika √∂yr…ônm…ôk kitablarńĪndan qurulmuŇü axiomatik bilgi almaq √ľ√ß√ľn bir yol g√∂st…ôririk. Bizim yaxńĪnlńĪńüńĪmńĪz √ß…ôtin kitablardan √ßńĪxarńĪlan m√ľxt…ôlif v…ô typografik √∂zellikl…ôrini istifad…ô edir. Bu √ßoxlu m…ôkt…ôb kitablarńĪnda √ßoxlu d…ôyiŇüiklik v…ô paylaŇüńĪlńĪq …ômrini daha √ßox d…ôyiŇüiklik edir. Bu axiomlar geometriya probleml…ôrini √ß…ôkm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edil…ôn kurallara ayńĪrńĪlńĪr.', 'bs': 'Učitelji su bogati izvori informacija. Skupljanje strukturiranih znanja iz udžbenika je ključni izazov u mnogim obrazovnim aplikacijama. Kao studija slučajeva, predstavljamo pristup prikupljanju strukturovanih aksiomatičkih znanja iz matematičkih učionika. Naš pristup koristi bogate contextualne i tipografske karakteristike izvučene iz sirovih udžbenika. To utiče na redundanciju i zajedničku naređenje preko višestrukih udžbenika kako bi dalje refinirao računate aksije. Ove aksiome se onda analiziraju u pravila koje se koriste za poboljšanje stanja umjetnosti u rješavanju problema geometrije.', 'bn': 'টেক্সট বই তথ্যের সমৃদ্ধ উৎস। অনেক শিক্ষা অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ। As a case study, we present an approach for harvesting structured axiomatic knowledge from math textbooks.  আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা সমৃদ্ধ এবং টাইপোগ্রাফিকেল বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে ভূল বই থেকে বের করা হয়েছে। এটি ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত এক্সিওম আরো সুস্থ করার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি টেক্সবইয়ের বিভিন্ন নির্দেশ প্রদান করেছে। এরপর এই অক্সিওমের নীতিতে পার্স করা হয়, যা ভৌমিতিক সমস্যার সমাধানে রাষ্ট্রের অবস্থা উন্নত করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়।', 'cs': 'Učebnice jsou bohatým zdrojem informací. Získávání strukturovaných znalostí z učebnic je klíčovou výzvou v mnoha vzdělávacích aplikacích. Jako případová studie představujeme přístup pro sběr strukturovaných axiomatických znalostí z matematických učebnic. Náš přístup využívá bohaté kontextové a typografické prvky extrahované ze surových učebnic. Využívá redundanci a sdílené uspořádání napříč několika učebnicemi k dalšímu zdokonalení získaných axiomů. Tyto axiomy jsou pak analyzovány do pravidel, která se používají ke zlepšení stavu techniky při řešení geometrických problémů.', 'ca': "Els llibres de text són fonts rics d'informació. Recollir coneixements estructurats dels llibres de text és un repte clau en moltes aplicacions educatives. Com a estudi de cas, presentem un enfocament per recollir coneixements axiomàtics estructurats dels llibres de matemàtiques. El nostre enfocament utilitza característiques contextuals i tipogràfiques rics extraïts dels llibres de text bruts. It leverages the redundancy and shared ordering across multiple textbooks to further refine the harvested axioms.  Aquests axiomes s'analitzen en normes que s'utilitzen per millorar l'última tecnologia en resoldre problemes geometrics.", 'et': 'Õpperaamatud on rikkalikud teabeallikad. Struktureeritud teadmiste kogumine õpikutest on paljudes hariduslikes rakendustes peamine väljakutse. Juhtumiuuringuna tutvustame lähenemisviisi struktureeritud aksiomaatiliste teadmiste kogumiseks matemaatika õpikutest. Meie lähenemisviis kasutab rikkalikke konteksti- ja tüpograafilisi funktsioone, mis on saadud toorõpikutest. See võimendab redundantsust ja jagatud järjestust mitme õpiku vahel, et täiendada kogutud aksioome. Need aksioomid parsitakse seejärel reegliteks, mida kasutatakse geomeetria probleemide lahendamisel kaasaegse taseme parandamiseks.', 'fi': 'Oppikirjat ovat rikkaita tietolähteitä. Strukturoidun tiedon kerääminen oppikirjoista on keskeinen haaste monissa opetussovelluksissa. Tapaustutkimuksena esittelemme lähestymistavan strukturoidun aksiomaattisen tiedon keräämiseen matematiikan oppikirjoista. Lähestymistapamme käyttää monipuolisia kontekstuaalisia ja typografisia ominaisuuksia, jotka on saatu raaka-kirjoista. Se hyödyntää redundanssia ja jaettua järjestystä useiden oppikirjojen välillä hioakseen korjattuja aksioomoja entisestään. Tämän jälkeen nämä aksioomat jäsennetään sääntöihin, joita käytetään parantamaan tekniikan tasoa geometrian ongelmien ratkaisemisessa.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Mbak nggawe ngerti sistem structural navigation Sampeyan kelas granang, kita dadi biasane nggawe aturan kanggo nggawe luwih dumaten aksiomatik karo puku matat. Name Slackfree Kernel', 'he': 'ספרי טקסט הם מקורות עשירים של מידע. הרכיבה של ידע מובנה מספרי לימוד היא אתגר מפתח בתוכניות חינוכיות רבות. כמחקר מקרים, אנחנו מציגים גישה לקצירת ידע אקסיומטי מבוסס מספרי לימוד למתמטיקה. Our approach uses rich contextual and typographical features extracted from raw textbooks.  It leverages the redundancy and shared ordering across multiple textbooks to further refine the harvested axioms.  ואז אוקסיומים אלה מתמחקים לחוקים שמשתמשים לשפר את המצב המיוחד בפתרון בעיות גיאומטריה.', 'ha': "QScriptBreakpointsModel Haƙĩƙa, ƙididdigewa da ilmi daga littattafan littattafai yana da muhimu cikin shiryoyin ayuka mãsu yawa. Kama karatun wani kashfa, Munã gaura wata hanyoyi wa kuɓutar da ma'anar axio da aka samar daga littãfin matsayi. Mataimakinmu yana amfani da matalauci na fasihi da typografi wanda aka samo daga littafin raw. It leverages the redundancy and shared ordering across multiple textbooks to further refine the harvested axioms.  Sa'an nan kuma aka raba wannan axomi cikin sharciyar da ake amfani da su dõmin a kyautata halin-sanar da su sola mataimako na geometry.", 'sk': 'Učbeniki so bogati viri informacij. Zbiranje strukturiranega znanja iz učbenikov je ključni izziv v številnih izobraževalnih aplikacijah. Kot študija primera predstavljamo pristop k zbiranju strukturiranega aksiomatičnega znanja iz matematičnih učbenikov. Naš pristop uporablja bogate kontekstualne in tipografske značilnosti, pridobljene iz surovih učbenikov. Izkorišča redundanco in skupno razvrščanje v več učbenikih, da dodatno izboljša izbrane aksiome. Ti aksiomi so nato razdeljeni v pravila, ki se uporabljajo za izboljšanje stanja tehnike pri reševanju geometrijskih problemov.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་དེབ་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དགའ་པོ་ཡིན་པས། བཟོ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེབ་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་གནད་དོན་དག་རེད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་རིག་གི་དཔེ་དེབ་དག་གི་བཟོ་བརྩོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡུལ་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་སྟངས་རྩོམ་འབྲི་དེབ འདིས་རྩིས་བྱུང་བའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གོ་རིམ་དཔེ་དེབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་བཟོ་བྱེད། These axioms are then parsed in to rules that are used to improve the state-of-the-art in solving geometry problems.'}
{'en': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing : Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'pt': 'Além da análise semântica sentencial: abordando o Math SAT com uma cascata de transdutores de árvore', 'es': 'Más allá del análisis semántico sentencial: abordando el SAT matemático con una cascada de transductores de árbol', 'ar': 'ما وراء التحليل الدلالي الشامل: معالجة الرياضيات SAT بسلسلة من محولات الطاقة الشجرية', 'fr': "Au-delà de l'analyse sémantique sententielle\xa0: aborder le SAT mathématique avec une cascade de transducteurs arborescents", 'zh': '越感知语义解析:用树换能器级联理数学SAT', 'ja': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'ru': 'За пределами смыслового семантического анализа: решение математических задач С помощью каскада древовидных преобразователей', 'hi': 'Sentential शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग से परे: ट्री Transducers के एक कैस्केड के साथ गणित SAT से निपटने', 'ga': 'Taobh amuigh de Pharsáil Shéimeantach Pianbhreith: Ag Dul i nGleic leis an Math SAT le Cascáid Trasduchtóirí Crann', 'ka': 'სენტენტიალური სემანტიკური პარამენტიკის გარეშე: მათემატიკური SAT-ის გარეშე', 'el': 'Πέρα από την συναισθηματική σημειακή ανάλυση: Αντιμετώπιση των μαθηματικών με μια Cascade από μετατροπείς δέντρων', 'hu': 'Az ítéleti szemantikus értelmezésen túl: A matematikai SAT leküzdése egy kaszkád fa transzducerekkel', 'it': "Oltre l'analisi semantica sentimentale: affrontare il SAT matematico con una cascata di trasduttori di alberi", 'kk': 'Сентифиялық семантикалық талдау: математикалық SAT- ты ағаш аударушыларының каскадымен қолдану', 'mk': 'Покрај сентенцијалното семантично анализирање: Се справува со математиката САТ со каскада на пренесувачи на дрвја', 'lt': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'ms': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'ml': 'സെന്\u200dറെന്\u200dറിയല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനു പുറത്ത്: ഗണിത സാറ്റിന്\u200dറെ ടാക്കില്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് മരത്തിലെ ട്രാ', 'mt': 'Lil hinn mill-Analiżi Semantika Sentenzjali: L-indirizzar tas-SAT Matematika b’Kaskata ta’ Tradutturi tas-Siġar', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл санааны семантийн талаар: Математикийн САТ-г модны Трансducers-ын Каскадтай холбоотой', 'no': 'Utan sentensiell semantisk tolking: Teikna matematiske SAT med en kaskade av tretransduktorar', 'pl': 'Poza parsowaniem semantycznym sentencjalnym: rozwiązanie matematycznego SAT z kaskadą przetworników drzew', 'ro': 'Dincolo de parsarea semantică sentințială: abordarea SAT-ului de matematică cu o cascadă de traducători de copaci', 'sr': 'Iznad semantičkog razmatranja Sentential: uzbuđenje matematičkog SAT sa kaskadom drvetskih prevodioca', 'si': 'සංවේදනය සමාන්තික විශ්ලේෂණය අතර: ගණිත SAT එක්ක කැස්කේඩ් ගස්සකාර්ස් එක්ක', 'so': 'Xirfadda Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transistors', 'sv': 'Bortom sententiell semantisk tolkning: Att tackla matematik SAT med en kaskad av trädtransducers', 'ta': 'பொதுவான செமாண்டிக் பாசிங் க்கு முன்னால்: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transistors', 'ur': 'Sentential Semantic Parsing کے بعد: Math SAT کو ایک درخت Transducers کے کاسڈ سے تاک کرنے والا ہے', 'uz': 'Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transistors', 'vi': 'Vượt ra giới hạn học kỳ dị: Chặn kỳ thi Toán SAT với một Cascade of Tree Transucers', 'nl': 'Meer dan sentential semantisch parsen: het aanpakken van de wiskunde SAT met een cascade van boomtransducers', 'hr': 'Iznad semantičkog razmatranja Sentencijalnog razmatranja: prebacivanje matematičkog SAT sa kaskadom prevoditelja drveta', 'id': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'bg': 'Отвъд сетивния семантичен анализ: справяне с математическия SAT с каскада от дървесни трансдуктори', 'fa': 'بیرون تحلیل سیمانتیک احساساتی: با کاسکد ترنسوکیر درخت تغییر دادن SAT ریاضی', 'ko': '문장의 의미를 초월한 분석: 트리 센서급으로 수학 문제를 해결한다', 'sw': 'Zaidi ya Uchapishaji wa Semantic Semantic: Kufungua Mataifa ya Mataifa kwa kaskadi ya Watafirishaji wa mti', 'af': "Buitend Sententiale Semantiese Toepassing: Toepassing van die Mathematike SAT met 'n Kaskade van Boom Oordragers", 'da': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: tackle matematik SAT med en kaskade af trætransducere', 'am': 'Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'de': 'Jenseits von semantischem Parsing: Math SAT mit einer Kaskade von Baumwandlern bewältigen', 'hy': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers', 'bn': 'সেন্টেন্টিয়াল সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর পাশে: গাছের ট্যাকেড অফ ট্রান্সপার্সার্সারের এক ক্যাস্কেড', 'tr': "Özgürlü Semantik Parsing ötesinde: Matematik SAT'i a ğaç Transducerlerin Cascade ile tahliye atma", 'bs': 'Iznad semantičkog razmatranja Sentential: uzbuđenje matematičkog SAT sa kaskadom drvetskih prevodioca', 'az': "Sentential Semantic Parsing √∂yr…ônm…ôsind…ôn: Mathematical SAT'i a ƒüac Transducers Cascade il…ô", 'ca': "Després de l'analització Semàtica Sentencial: afrontar la matemàtica amb una caixa de transformadors d'arbres", 'fi': 'Tunteellisen semanttisen analysoinnin takana: matemaattisen SAT:n käsittely puuantureiden kaskadilla', 'sq': 'Përtej analizimit Semantik Sentencial: trajtimi i SAT-së matematike me një kaskade Transducers të Pemëve', 'et': 'Lisaks tunnetavale semantilisele parsimisele: matemaatika SAT-i lahendamine puumuundurite kaskaadiga', 'cs': 'Kromě sententiálního sémantického parsování: Řešení matematického SAT s kaskádou stromových převodníků', 'he': 'מעבר לפרסם סמנטי רגשי: להתמודד עם SAT מתמטיקה עם קסקיד של מעברי עצים', 'sk': 'Nad sencialnim semantičnim razpravljanjem: reševanje matematičnega SAT s kaskado drevesnih pretvornikov', 'ha': 'Talling the Math SAT with a caskade of Tree Transistors', 'jv': 'Tulung Sentental semanti Parasing:', 'bo': 'Beyond Sentential Semantic Parsing: Tackling the Math SAT with a Cascade of Tree Transducers'}
{'en': 'We present an approach for answering questions that span multiple sentences and exhibit sophisticated cross-sentence anaphoric phenomena, evaluating on a rich source of such questions   the math portion of the Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). By using a tree transducer cascade as its basic architecture, our system propagates uncertainty from multiple sources (e.g. coreference resolution or verb interpretation) until it can be confidently resolved. Experiments show the first-ever results 43 % recall and 91 % precision) on SAT algebra word problems. We also apply our system to the public Dolphin algebra question set, and improve the state-of-the-art F1-score from 73.9 % to 77.0 %.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque para responder preguntas que abarcan múltiples oraciones y exhiben fenómenos anafóricos sofisticados entre frases, evaluando una rica fuente de tales preguntas: la parte matemática del Examen de Aptitud Escolar (SAT). Al utilizar una cascada de transductores de árbol como arquitectura básica, nuestro sistema propaga la incertidumbre desde múltiples fuentes (por ejemplo, resolución de correferencia o interpretación de verbos) hasta que se pueda resolver con confianza. Los experimentos muestran los primeros resultados de la historia (43% de memoria y 91% de precisión) en problemas verbales de álgebra SAT. También aplicamos nuestro sistema al conjunto de preguntas públicas de álgebra de Dolphin y mejoramos el puntaje F1 de última generación del 73,9% al 77,0%.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche pour répondre à des questions qui s'étendent sur plusieurs phrases et qui présentent des phénomènes anaphoriques croisés sophistiqués, en évaluant sur une source riche de telles questions — la partie mathématique du Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). En utilisant une cascade de transducteurs en arbre comme architecture de base, notre système propage l'incertitude provenant de sources multiples (par exemple, la résolution de coréférence ou l'interprétation des verbes) jusqu'à ce qu'elle puisse être résolue en toute confiance. Les expériences montrent les tout premiers résultats (43\xa0% de rappel et 91\xa0% de précision) sur les problèmes de mots d'algèbre SAT. Nous appliquons également notre système à l'ensemble de questions d'algèbre de Dolphin public et améliorons le score F1 de 73,9\xa0% à 77,0\xa0%.", 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا للإجابة على الأسئلة التي تمتد عبر جمل متعددة وتظهر ظواهر تشوه الكلمات المتقاطعة المعقدة ، وتقييم مصدر غني لمثل هذه الأسئلة - الجزء الرياضي من اختبار الكفاءة الدراسية (SAT). باستخدام تسلسل محول الطاقة الشجري باعتباره بنيته الأساسية ، ينشر نظامنا عدم اليقين من مصادر متعددة (مثل دقة المرجع أو تفسير الفعل) حتى يمكن حلها بثقة. تُظهر التجارب النتائج الأولى على الإطلاق لاسترجاع 43٪ ودقة 91٪) في مسائل الكلمات الجبرية SAT. نقوم أيضًا بتطبيق نظامنا على مجموعة أسئلة Dolphin algebra العامة ، وتحسين درجة F1 الحديثة من 73.9٪ إلى 77.0٪.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem para responder a perguntas que abrangem várias frases e exibem fenômenos anafóricos sofisticados de frases cruzadas, avaliando uma rica fonte de tais perguntas - a parte matemática do Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). Ao usar uma cascata de transdutores de árvore como sua arquitetura básica, nosso sistema propaga a incerteza de várias fontes (por exemplo, resolução de correferência ou interpretação de verbos) até que possa ser resolvida com confiança. Experimentos mostram os primeiros resultados de 43% de recall e 91% de precisão) em problemas de palavras de álgebra SAT. Também aplicamos nosso sistema ao conjunto público de perguntas de álgebra Dolphin e melhoramos a pontuação F1 de última geração de 73,9% para 77,0%.', 'ja': '私たちは、複数の文にまたがり、洗練された交差文の類似現象を示す質問に答えるためのアプローチを提示し、そのような質問の豊富なソース（ Scholastic Aptitude Test （ SAT ）の数学部分）を評価します。ツリートランスデューサーカスケードを基本的なアーキテクチャとして使用することで、当社のシステムは自信を持って解決できるまで、複数のソースから不確実性を伝播します（例：コアリファレンス解決または動詞解釈）。実験では、SAT代数の単語問題に関する初めての結果（リコール43%、精度91%）が示されている。また、公開されているドルフィン代数の質問集にもシステムを適用し、最先端のF 1スコアを73.9 ％から77.0 ％に向上させます。', 'zh': '设一对越数句,杂句厌烦,评其丰源 - 学术倾(SAT)数学。 用树传感器级联以为本架构,吾道播自数源(如共指寻解析动词解释)之不确定性,至于自信解析。 实验显于SAT代数单词,首生43%召率91%之精)。 宜于公共海豚代数,先进F1分73.9%至77.0%。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем подход к ответам на вопросы, которые охватывают несколько предложений и демонстрируют сложные перекрестные анафорические явления, оценивая на богатом источнике таких вопросов – математической части теста школьных способностей (SAT). Используя каскад древовидных преобразователей в качестве базовой архитектуры, наша система распространяет неопределенность из нескольких источников (например, разрешение ядра или интерпретация глаголов), пока она не может быть уверенно решена. Эксперименты показывают первые в истории результаты 43% запоминания и 91% точности) НА задачах SAT-алгебры. Мы также применяем нашу систему к публичному набору вопросов алгебры дельфинов и улучшаем современный показатель F1 с 73,9% до 77,0%.', 'hi': 'हम उन सवालों के जवाब देने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो कई वाक्यों को फैलाते हैं और परिष्कृत क्रॉस-वाक्य एनाफोरिक घटनाओं को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, इस तरह के सवालों के एक समृद्ध स्रोत पर मूल्यांकन करते हैं - स्कोलास्टिक एप्टीट्यूड टेस्ट (एसएटी) का गणित हिस्सा। अपने मूल वास्तुकला के रूप में एक पेड़ ट्रांसड्यूसर कैस्केड का उपयोग करके, हमारी प्रणाली कई स्रोतों (जैसे कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन या क्रिया व्याख्या) से अनिश्चितता का प्रचार करती है जब तक कि इसे आत्मविश्वास से हल नहीं किया जा सकता है। प्रयोगों में SAT बीजगणित शब्द समस्याओं पर पहली बार परिणाम 43% याद और 91% परिशुद्धता) दिखाई देते हैं। हम सार्वजनिक डॉल्फिन बीजगणित प्रश्न सेट पर भी अपनी प्रणाली लागू करते हैं, और 73.9% से 77.0% तक अत्याधुनिक F1-स्कोर में सुधार करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid cur chuige i láthair chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt a chuimsíonn abairtí iolracha agus a thaispeánann feiniméin anafóracha tras-abairtí sofaisticiúla, ag déanamh meastóireachta ar fhoinse shaibhir ceisteanna den sórt sin - an chuid matamaitice den Triail Inniúlachta Scholastic (SAT). Trí úsáid a bhaint as trasduchtóir crann mar bhun-ailtireacht, iomadaíonn ár gcóras éiginnteacht ó fhoinsí iolracha (m.sh. réiteach croí-chomhdhála nó léirmhíniú briathar) go dtí gur féidir é a réiteach go muiníneach. Léiríonn turgnaimh na torthaí den chéad uair riamh aisghairm 43% agus cruinneas 91%) ar fhadhbanna focal ailgéabar SAT. Cuirimid ár gcóras i bhfeidhm freisin ar thacar ceisteanna poiblí ailgéabar deilf, agus feabhsaítear an scóir F1 úrscothach ó 73.9% go 77.0%.', 'hu': 'Olyan megközelítést mutatunk be, amely több mondatot átfogó és kifinomult keresztmondat anafórikus jelenségeket mutat be, és értékeljük az ilyen kérdések gazdag forrását - a Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT) matematikai részét. Egy faátalakító kaszkád használatával alapvető architektúrának köszönhetően rendszerünk több forrásból származó bizonytalanságot (pl. coreferencia felbontás vagy ige értelmezés) terjeszt, amíg az biztonságosan meg nem oldható. A kísérletek szerint az első eredmények 43% visszahívás és 91% pontosság) SAT algebra szóproblémákon. Rendszerünket a nyilvános Dolphin algebra kérdéskészletre is alkalmazzuk, és javítjuk a korszerű F1-pontszámot 73,9%-ról 77,0%-ra.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων που εκτείνονται σε πολλαπλές προτάσεις και παρουσιάζουν εξελιγμένα διασταυρούμενα αναφορικά φαινόμενα, αξιολογώντας σε μια πλούσια πηγή τέτοιων ερωτήσεων στο μαθηματικό τμήμα του Τεστ Σχολικής Ικανότητας (ΣΕΤ). Χρησιμοποιώντας έναν καταρράκτη μετατροπέα δέντρου ως βασική αρχιτεκτονική του, το σύστημά μας μεταδίδει αβεβαιότητα από πολλαπλές πηγές (π.χ. ανάλυση συγχορήγησης ή ερμηνεία ρήματος) μέχρι να μπορέσει να επιλυθεί με σιγουριά. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν τα πρώτα αποτελέσματα 43% ανάκλησης και 91% ακρίβεια) σε προβλήματα λέξεων άλγεβρας SAT. Εφαρμόζουμε επίσης το σύστημά μας στο δημόσιο σύνολο ερωτήσεων άλγεβρας και βελτιώνουμε την υπερσύγχρονη βαθμολογία από 73.9% έως 77.0%.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღეთ წარმოდგენა კითხვების გასაღებისთვის, რომლებიც მრავალ წარმოდგენების განმავლობა და გამოჩვენება სფესტიკური წარმოდგენების ანაფორიკური ფენომენების განმავლობა, რომლებიც ასეთი კითხვების ბედნი ჩვენი სისტემა მრავალური გამოყენებით, რამდენიმე მსგავსი ფოსტებიდან უცნობიერებას გამოყენებს (მაგალითად, შესაძლებლობა წესულება ან გერბის ინტერპუქტირება) სანამ შეიძლება დარწმ ექსპერიმენტები პირველი წარმოდგენა 43% და 91% წარმოდგენა SAT ალდბერის სიტყვების პრობლემებზე. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი სისტემა დავყენებთ ადამიანური დელფინის ალბებრის კითხვაზე, და დავიწყენებთ სისტემა F1- სოფლიოს სისტემა 73,9% დან 77,0%.', 'kk': 'Біз бірнеше сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін жауап береміз. Бұл сұрақтардың баяны көзінде - Шоластық Аптитуд Сынауының математикалық бөлігі (SAT). Бұтақ аударғыш каскады негізгі архитектурасы ретінде қолданып, жүйеміз бірнеше көзгертілген көзгертіліктерден (мысалы, мәселелердің айырмашылығы немесе вербтердің толықтауы) шешілмейді. Тәжірибелер SAT алгебралық сөздер мәселелерінде 43% және 91% дұрыстығын көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, жүйемізді қолданатын Dolphin алгебрі сұрақтарына қолданып, 73,9% дегеннен 77,0% дегенге жылдамдық.', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio per rispondere a domande che abbracciano più frasi e mostrano sofisticati fenomeni anaforici cross-sentence, valutando su una ricca fonte di tali domande - la parte matematica dello Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). Utilizzando una cascata di trasduttori ad albero come architettura di base, il nostro sistema propaga l'incertezza da più fonti (ad esempio risoluzione di coreferenza o interpretazione dei verbi) fino a quando non può essere risolta con sicurezza. Gli esperimenti mostrano i primi risultati in assoluto 43% di richiamo e 91% di precisione) su problemi di parole algebra SAT. Applichiamo il nostro sistema anche al set pubblico di domande sull'algebra Dolphin e miglioriamo il punteggio F1 all'avanguardia dal 73,9% al 77,0%.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame požiūrį į atsakymus į klausimus, apimančius kelis sakinius ir turinčius sudėtingus tarpsakinius anaforinius reiškinius, vertinant iš turtingo tokių klausimų šaltinio - mokyklinio apsirūpinimo testo (SAT) matematikos dalį. Naudojant medžio transducerių kaskadą kaip pagrindinę architektūrą, mūsų sistema skleidžia neapibrėžtį iš daugelio šaltinių (pvz., koreferencijos rezoliucija arba žodžio aiškinimas), kol jis gali būti išspręstas patikimai. Eksperimentai rodo pirmuosius rezultatus 43% atšaukimo ir 91% tikslumo) dėl SAT algebra žodžių problemų. Mes taip pat taikome savo sistemą viešajam delfinų algebros klausimų rinkiniui ir geriname pažangiausią F1 rezultatą nuo 73,9 % iki 77,0 %.', 'ms': 'We present an approach for answering questions that span multiple sentences and exhibit sophisticated cross-sentence anaphoric phenomena, evaluating on a rich source of such questions - the math portion of the Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT).  Dengan menggunakan kaskad pemindah pokok sebagai arkitektur asasnya, sistem kita menyebarkan ketidakpastian dari sumber berbilang (cth. resolusi koreferensi atau interpretasi verb) sehingga ia boleh diselesaikan dengan yakin. Eksperimen menunjukkan hasil pertama 43% pengingatan dan 91% ketepatan) pada masalah perkataan algebra SAT. Kami juga melaksanakan sistem kami untuk set soalan algebra awam Dolphin, dan meningkatkan skor F1-state-of-the-art dari 73.9% kepada 77.0%.', 'ml': 'പല വാക്കുകളുടെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വഴിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അതുപോലുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സമ്പത്തായ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ കണക്കി അതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു മരത്തിന്റെ ട്രാന്\u200dസ്സറ്റര്\u200d കാസ്കേഡ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരുപാട് സ്രോത സാറ്റ് ആല്\u200dഗെബ്രാവിന്റെ വാക്ക് പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d 43% ഓര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതും 91% പരിശോധനം കാണിക്ക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെ പൊതു ഡോള്\u200dഫിന്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗെബ്രാ ചോദ്യത്തിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, 73. 9% മുതല്\u200d 77.', 'mk': 'Презентираме пристап за одговори на прашања кои ги опфаќаат повеќето реченици и изложуваат софистицирани крсторечени анафорски феномени, оценувајќи на богат извор на вакви прашања - математичкиот дел од Школатскиот тест за аптитуда (САТ). Со користење на каскадата на трансдукерот на дрвјата како основна архитектура, нашиот систем пропагира несигурност од повеќе извори (на пример резолуција на кореференција или интерпретација на резултатите) додека не може да се реши доверливо. Експериментите покажуваат први резултати 43 отсто повлекување и 91 отсто прецизност) на проблемите со зборовите на SAT алгебра. Ние, исто така, го применуваме нашиот систем на јавното поставување на прашања за алгебрата на Делфините, и го подобруваме најдобриот резултат Ф1 од 73,9 отсто на 77,0 отсто.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ għat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet li jkopru sentenzi multipli u juru fenomeni anaforiċi sofistikati ta' sentenzi trasversali, li jevalwaw fuq sors rikk ta' mistoqsijiet bħal dawn - il-porzjon matematiku tat-Test tal-Aptitude Skolastiku (SAT). Billi tuża kaskata tat-trasdutur tas-siġar bħala l-arkitettura bażika tagħha, is-sistema tagħna tippropaga l-inċertezza minn sorsi multipli (e ż. riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza jew interpretazzjoni tal-verb) sakemm tkun tista’ tiġi solvuta b’mod kunfidenzjali. L-esperimenti juru l-ewwel riżultati 43% tal-ġbir lura u 91% tal-preċiżjoni) dwar problemi tal-kliem tal-alġebra SAT. Aħna napplikaw ukoll is-sistema tagħna għas-sett pubbliku ta' mistoqsijiet dwar l-alġebra tad-Dolphin, u ntejbu l-punteġġ F1 l-aktar avvanzat minn 73.9% għal 77.0%.", 'mn': 'Бид олон өгүүлбэрүүдийн хариултын тулд олон өгүүлбэрүүдийг тооцоолж, олон өгүүлбэрүүдийн анафорик үзэгдлийг харуулж, ийм асуултуудын баян эх үүсвэр дээр үнэлдэг, Школастикийн Аптитудын тест (SAT) математикийн хэсэг. Модны хөгжүүлэгч каскад нь үндсэн архитектур гэж ашиглаж, бидний систем олон эх үүсвэрээс тодорхойгүй байдлыг (жишээ нь, зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэл эсвэл үг илэрхийлэл) шийдэж чадна. Эхний туршилт SAT алгебрийн үгийн асуудлын талаар 43% дурсамж, 91% тодорхойлолтыг харуулдаг. Мөн бид өөрсдийн системийг олон нийтийн Долфин алгебрийн асуулт дээр ашиглаж, урлагийн F1 оноо 73,9% аас 77,0% руу хөгжүүлж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein tilnærming for å svara på spørsmåla som utvidar fleire setningar og viser sofistikerte anaforiske fenomen for kryssetningar, som evaluerer på ein rike kjelde av slike spørsmåla – matematikkdelen av den skolastiske testen (SAT). Ved å bruka ein tretransduktorkaskade som sin grunnleggjande arkitektur, vert systemet vårt utvikla usikkerhet frå fleire kilder (f.eks. koreferanse oppløysing eller verbtolking) til at den kan verta tiltrukkeleg løyst. Eksperiment viser den første gongen resultatet av rekkjellen av 43% og presisjon av 91% på SAT- algebra- ordproblemet. Vi bruker også systemet vårt til den offentlege algebraspørsmålene for Dolphin, og forbedra F1- poeng i kunsten frå 73,9% til 77,0%.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy podejście do odpowiedzi na pytania, które obejmują wiele zdań i wykazują zaawansowane zjawiska anaforyczne krzyżowe, oceniając na bogatym źródłu takich pytań część matematyczną Testu Aptitude Scholastic (SAT). Wykorzystując kaskadę przetwornika drzewa jako podstawową architekturę, nasz system propaguje niepewność z wielu źródeł (np. rozdzielczość koreferencji lub interpretacja czasowników), aż będzie można ją pewnie rozwiązać. Eksperymenty pokazują pierwsze w historii wyniki 43% recall i 91% precyzji) na problemach słowa algebry SAT. Nasz system stosujemy również do publicznego zestawu pytań algebry Dolphin i poprawiamy najnowocześniejszy wynik F1 od 73,9% do 77,0%.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o abordare pentru a răspunde la întrebări care se întind pe mai multe propoziții și prezintă fenomene anaforice sofisticate încrucișate, evaluând pe o sursă bogată de astfel de întrebări - porțiunea matematică a Testului Aptitude Scolastic (SAT). Utilizând o cascadă a traductorului copac ca arhitectură de bază, sistemul nostru propagă incertitudinea din mai multe surse (de exemplu, rezoluția coreferenței sau interpretarea verbelor) până când aceasta poate fi rezolvată cu încredere. Experimentele arată primele rezultate vreodată 43% rechemare și 91% precizie) pe problemele cuvintelor SAT algebra. De asemenea, aplicăm sistemul nostru setului public de întrebări de algebră Dolphin și îmbunătățim scorul F1 de ultimă generație de la 73,9% la 77,0%.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම වාර්තාවක් වගේම සම්පූර්ණ වාර්තාවක් වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්න ගස් ක්\u200dරීඩුකර් කැස්කේඩ් එකක් භාවිතා කරලා එයාගේ මූලික ස්ථාපනය විදියට, අපේ පද්ධතිය විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ විශ්වාස කරන්න බැර පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා SAT ඇල්ජෙබ්\u200dරියා වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය සාමාජික ඩොල්ෆින් ඇල්ජීබ්\u200dරා ප්\u200dරශ්න සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ස්ථානය F1-ප්\u200dරශ', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pristup odgovorima na pitanja koje šire višestruke rečenice i pokazuju sofisticirane anaforske fenomene prekrasne rečenice, procjenjujući bogati izvor takvih pitanja - matematički deo školskog testiranja Aptitude (SAT). Koristivši kaskadu za prevoditelj drveta kao osnovnu arhitekturu, naš sistem proširi nesigurnost iz višestrukih izvora (npr. rezolucija pristojnosti ili interpretacija verb a) dok se ne može povereno rešiti. Eksperimenti pokazuju prvi ikad rezultat sjećanja 43% i preciznost 91% na probleme sa SAT algebrom riječima. Takođe primjenjujemo naš sistem na postavljeno pitanje javnog algebre Dolfina i poboljšavamo rezultat države umjetnosti F1 od 73,9% na 77,0%.', 'so': "Waxaynu keennaa qaab ka jawaabta su'aalaha ay ka soo jeedaan hadallo badan oo ay ku qoran yihiin cilmiga kala duduwan oo ay ku qoran yihiin cilmiga iskuulka ee Aptitude (SAT). Sida uu ku isticmaalo geed soo diraha kaskad ah oo ah dhismaha aasaasiga ah, nidaamkayaga ayaa ka sii sheegaya aqoonta aan laga garanaynin sourceoyin badan (tusaale ahaan saameyn ama turjubaan qoraal ah) ilaa ay si kalsoonaan u xalli karto. Imtixaanka ugu horeeyay waxay ka muuqataa 43% xusuusta iyo 91% si saxda ah) dhibaatooyinka hadalka ee SAT algebra. We also apply our system to the public Dolphin algebra question set, and improve the state-of-the-art F1-score from 73.9% to 77.0%.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt för att besvara frågor som spänner över flera meningar och uppvisar sofistikerade korsmeningsanaforiska fenomen, utvärderar på en rik källa till sådana frågor - den matematiska delen av Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). Genom att använda en trädgivare kaskad som dess grundläggande arkitektur, sprider vårt system osäkerhet från flera källor (t.ex. coreference upplösning eller verbtolkning) tills den kan lösas med säkerhet. Experiment visar de första resultaten någonsin 43% återkallelse och 91% precision) på SAT algebra ordproblem. Vi tillämpar också vårt system på den offentliga Dolphin algebra frågeuppsättningen, och förbättrar den senaste F1-poängen från 73,9% till 77,0%.', 'ta': 'நாம் பல வாக்குகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்கும் கேள்விகளுக்கு ஒரு வழியை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் முக்கியமான வாக்கியத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம். இது போன்ற செல்வத்தின் பணக ஒரு மரத்தை மாற்றுபவர் கஸ்கேடை அதன் அடிப்படையான கட்டுப்பாட்டில் பயன்படுத்தி, நம்முடைய அமைப்பு பல மூலங்களிலிருந்து நம்பிக்கை வெளியிடும் வரை நம்பிக்க SAT ஆல்ஜெப்ராவின் வார்த்தை பிரச்சனைகளில் முதல் முடிவுகள் 43% நினைவு மற்றும் 91% துல்லியம் காட்டும். நாம் எங்கள் கணினியை பொது டால்பின் அல்ஜெப்ரா கேள்வி அமைப்புக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், மற்றும் 73.9% வரை 77.', 'ur': 'ہم سوالوں کے جواب دینے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی جماعتیں پھیلاتے ہیں اور بہت سی جماعتیں پھیلاتے ہیں اور ان کے سوالوں کے ایک ثروت منبع پر مطابق کریں گے - اسکولاسٹی آپٹیڈ تست (SAT) کی ریاضی حصہ۔ ایک درخت ڈرنڈوکرر کاسکڈ کو اس کی بنیادی معماری کے طور پر استعمال کر رہا ہے، ہماری سیستم نے بہت سی سورجوں سے یقینی پھیلائی ہے (جیسے رضامندی رضامندی یا verb تعبیر) یہاں تک کہ وہ مطمئن طور پر حل ہو سکے۔ آزمائش کا پہلا نتیجہ 43% یاد کرنا اور 91% دقیق) SAT الجبریل لفظ مشکلات پر دکھاتے ہیں۔ ہم بھی اپنے سیستم کو جمهور ڈالفین الجبری سؤال سٹ پر لازم کریں، اور 73.9% سے 77.0% تک فصل کی حالت پر اچھی طرح کریں۔', 'uz': "Biz bir necha so'zlarni javob beradigan savollarning javob beruvchi usulni ko'p so'zlar bilan qo'l so'zlar anaphorik holatni ko'rsatamiz va bu savollarning rich manbasiga qiymatlashimiz mumkin - Makolastik Aptitude Test (SAT) matn qismi qismini ko'rsatdik. Name Name We also apply our system to the public Dolphin algebra question set, and improve the state-of-the-art F1-score from 73.9% to 77.0%.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp để trả lời câu hỏi dài dòng và hiển thị các hiện tượng đảo chữ thập phức tạp, đánh giá dựa trên một nguồn giàu của các câu hỏi như vậy... phần toán trong thử thách khả năng Scholastic (SAT). Bằng cách sử dụng một máy thu phát điện cây làm kiến trúc cơ bản của nó, hệ thống này tạo ra sự mơ hồ từ nhiều nguồn (v.d. có độ phân giải nhiệt thành hay diễn tả động từ) cho đến khi nó có thể được giải quyết bí mật. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy kết quả cao nhất...44=.==.=) và l=.=) for sat Algebra word problems. Chúng tôi cũng áp dụng hệ thống của chúng tôi vào câu hỏi đại số Dolphin công cộng đã đặt, và nâng cao trạng thái vừa rồi F1-số lượng từ 73.9=-7.0 Name', 'bg': 'Представяме подход за отговаряне на въпроси, обхващащи множество изречения и проявяващи сложни анафорични явления на кръстосани изречения, като оценяваме върху богат източник на такива въпроси - математическата част на Шотластичния тест за способност (САТ). Чрез използването на каскада от дървесни датчици като основна архитектура, нашата система разпространява несигурността от множество източници (например резолюция на кореференцията или тълкуване на глаголите), докато тя може да бъде уверено решена. Експериментите показват първите резултати, 43% припомняне и 91% прецизност) по задачи по САТ алгебра. Също така прилагаме нашата система към обществения набор от въпроси по алгебра на делфините и подобряваме най-съвременния резултат от 73,9% на 77,0%.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo pristup odgovorima na pitanja koje šire višestruke rečenice i pokazuju sofisticirane anaforske fenomene prekršetne rečenice, procjenjujući na bogatom izvoru takvih pitanja - matematički dio školskog testa za apetitude (SAT). Koristeći kaskadu za prevoditelj drveta kao osnovnu arhitekturu, naš sustav proširi nesigurnost iz višestrukih izvora (npr. rješenje pristojnosti ili interpretacije verb a) dok se ne može povjerljivo riješiti. Eksperimenti pokazuju prvi ikad rezultat sjećanja 43% i preciznosti 91%) na probleme sa SAT algebrom riječima. Također se primjenjujemo naš sustav na postavljeno pitanje javnog algebre Dolphina i poboljšavamo rezultat stanja umjetnosti F1 od 73,9% na 77,0%.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en tilgang til besvarelse af spørgsmål, der spænder over flere sætninger og udviser sofistikerede tværsætningsanaforiske fænomener, og evaluerer på en rig kilde til sådanne spørgsmål - den matematiske del af Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). Ved at bruge en trætransducer kaskade som grundlæggende arkitektur, vores system udbreder usikkerhed fra flere kilder (f.eks. coreference opløsning eller verbfortolkning), indtil den kan løses trygt. Eksperimenter viser de første resultater nogensinde 43% tilbagekaldelse og 91% præcision) på SAT algebra ordproblemer. Vi anvender også vores system på det offentlige Dolphin algebra spørgsmål sæt, og forbedrer state-of-the-art F1-score fra 73,9% til 77,0%.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen Ansatz zur Beantwortung von Fragen, die mehrere Sätze umfassen und komplexe satzübergreifende anaphorische Phänomene aufweisen, wobei wir anhand einer reichen Quelle solcher Fragen im mathematischen Teil des Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT) evaluieren. Durch die Verwendung einer Baumwandlerkaskade als Grundarchitektur propagiert unser System Unsicherheiten aus mehreren Quellen (z.B. Coreferenzauflösung oder Verbinterpretation), bis sie sicher aufgelöst werden kann. Experimente zeigen die ersten Ergebnisse 43% Rückruf und 91% Präzision) auf SAT Algebra Wortprobleme. Wir wenden unser System auch auf den öffentlichen Fragensatz der Dolphin Algebra an und verbessern den aktuellen F1-Score von 73,9% auf 77,0%.', 'ko': '우리는 여러 문장에 걸쳐 있는 문제에 대답하고 복잡한 문장에 걸쳐 가리키는 현상을 표현하며 이런 문제의 풍부한 출처인 학술능력성향테스트(SAT)의 수학 부분을 평가하는 방법을 제시했다.트리 센서의 등급을 기본 구조로 사용함으로써, 우리 시스템은 여러 출처에서 불확실성 (예를 들어, 모두 소해나 동사 해석을 가리키는 것) 을 전파하여, 그것이 믿음직스럽게 해결될 때까지 한다.실험에 따르면 SAT 대수 단어 문제에서 처음으로 리콜율 43%와 정확도 91%를 얻었다.공공 돌고래 대수 문제집에도 시스템을 적용해 최첨단 F1 성적을 73.9%에서 77.0%로 높였다.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een aanpak voor het beantwoorden van vragen die meerdere zinnen omvatten en geavanceerde dwarszinnige anaforische fenomenen vertonen, waarbij wordt geëvalueerd op een rijke bron van dergelijke vragen, namelijk het wiskundige gedeelte van de Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). Door een boomtransducercascade als basisarchitectuur te gebruiken, verspreidt ons systeem onzekerheid vanuit meerdere bronnen (bijv. coreferentie resolutie of werkwoordverklaring) totdat deze met vertrouwen kan worden opgelost. Experimenten tonen de eerste resultaten ooit 43% recall en 91% precisie) op SAT algebra woordproblemen. We passen ons systeem ook toe op de openbare Dolphin algebra vragenlijst en verbeteren de state-of-the-art F1-score van 73,9% tot 77,0%.', 'fa': 'ما روش جواب سوالات را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که جمله\u200cهای زیادی را تغییر می\u200cدهند و روی یک منبع ثروتمندی از چنین سوالات، قسمت ریاضی آزمایش آزمایش آزمایش آزمایش (SAT) را نمایش می\u200cدهند. با استفاده از کاسکید ترجمه کننده درخت به عنوان معماری بنیادی آن، سیستم ما مطمئنی را از منبع چندین (مثال حل\u200cسازی یا ترجمه\u200cسازی کلمه) به طور مطمئنی گسترش می\u200cدهد. تجربه\u200cها اولین نتایج 43 درصد یادآوری و دقیق 91 درصد را نشان می\u200cدهند در مشکلات الجبری SAT. ما همچنین سیستم خودمان را به سؤال الجبری عمومی درخواست می\u200cکنیم، و از 73.9% تا 77.0% در حالت وضعیت هنر', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan untuk menjawab pertanyaan yang meliputi banyak kalimat dan menunjukkan fenomena anafora cross-kalimat yang sophistikasi, mengevaluasi pada sumber kaya pertanyaan seperti itu - bagian matematika dari ujian Aptitude Sekolah (SAT). Dengan menggunakan kaskade pemindah pohon sebagai arsitektur dasarnya, sistem kita menyebarkan ketidakpastian dari berbagai sumber (contohnya resolusi koreferensi atau interpretasi verb) sampai dapat diselesaikan dengan yakin. Eksperimen menunjukkan hasil pertama 43% recall dan 91% presisi) pada masalah kata algebra SAT. Kami juga menerapkan sistem kami untuk set pertanyaan algebra Dolphin publik, dan meningkatkan skor F1 state-of-the-art dari 73,9% ke 77,0%.', 'sw': 'Tunaweka mbinu ya kujibu maswali yanayohusu hukumu mbalimbali na kuonyesha matukio yanayofanana na mifano ya kupitia hukumu hiyo, kwa kutathmini chanzo cha tajiri cha maswali kama hayo - sehemu ya jaribio la Kihisabu la Utakati (SAT). Kwa kutumia mabomu ya mti yenye mabadiliko kama ujenzi wake wa msingi, mfumo wetu unatangaza usio na uhakika kutoka vyanzo mbalimbali (kwa mfano, utambulisho wa msingi au tafsiri ya maneno) mpaka utakapokuwa na imani. Experiments show the first-ever results 43% recall and 91% precision) on SAT algebra word problems.  We also apply our system to the public Dolphin algebra question set, and improve the state-of-the-art F1-score from 73.9% to 77.0%.', 'am': 'እንደዚህ ባለ ሀብታም የጥያቄ ጥያቄ የስሕተት ተፈተና (SAT) የመካነ ትክክለኛ ክፍል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዛፍ መስኮት በመጠቀም የመሠረተ መሠረት ማድረግ፣ ስርዓታችን በብዙ ምንጮች (ለምሳሌ የክፍል ትርጓሜ ወይም የverb ትርጓሜ) እስኪታረጋገጥ ድረስ የማይታወቅ ይናገራል፡፡ Experiments show the first-ever results 43% recall and 91% precision) on SAT algebra word problems.  ሲስተኛችንን ከ73.9% ጀምሮ እስከ 77.0 በመቶ እናሳድጋለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe sözleri uzaklaştırıp, birnäçe çerçe sözleri anaforik parçalarını görüp, şöyle soraglaryň baý çeşmesinde değerlendirip bilýän bir şekilde çözümlenmek üçin bir yolu gösteriyoruz. Ağa ç terjimeçisi kaskadyny özüniň esasy arhitektura g örä, biziň sistemamyz birnäçe çe şmeden (meselâ, çekişmeler we verb terjimelerinden) ynamly çözülmekden çykarýar. Deneyler SAT cebirsel kelimeleri üzerinde ilkinji gezek 43% hatırlatma ve 91% kesin değerini gösteriyor. Biz hem sistemimizi Dolphin algebra soraglaryna uygulapdyk we şu şekilde soraglaryň durumyny 73,9% den 77,0% üstüne geliştirdik.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n toegang vir antwoord van vrae wat veelvuldige setnings uitbrei en sofistikeerde kruisseting anaforiese fenomene, wat op 'n ryk bron van sodanige vrae evalueer - die matematiese deel van die skolastiese toets (SAT). Deur die gebruik van 'n boom oordrukker kaskade as sy basiese arkitektuur, spreek ons stelsel onbevestigheid uit veelvuldige bronne (bv. koreferensie oplossing of verb uitlegging) totdat dit vertroulik opgelos kan word. Eksperimente vertoon die eerste-ooit resultate 43% herhaal en 91% presisie) op SAT algebra woord probleme. Ons het ook ons stelsel aan die publieke Dolphin algebra vraag aangepas en die staat van die kuns F1-telling van 73,9 % tot 77,0 % verbeter.", 'sq': "Ne paraqesim një qasje për t'u përgjigjur pyetjeve që zgjasin fjalime të shumta dhe ekspozojnë fenomene anaforike të sofistikuara ndër-fjalime, duke vlerësuar në një burim të pasur të pyetjeve të tilla - pjesën matematike të Testit të Aptitudës Scholastike (SAT). Duke përdorur një kaskadë transduceri pemësh si arkitekturën e saj bazë, sistemi ynë përhap pasigurinë nga burime të shumta (për shembull rezoluta koreference apo interpretimi i verbeve) deri sa të zgjidhet me besim. Eksperimentet tregojnë rezultatet e para 43% të tërheqjes dhe 91% të saktësisë) në problemet e fjalëve të SAT algebra. Ne gjithashtu aplikojmë sistemin tonë në grupin publik të pyetjeve të algjebrës së Dolphin ëve dhe përmirësojmë rezultatin më të lartë F1 nga 73.9% në 77.0%.", 'bn': 'We present an approach for answering questions that span multiple sentences and exhibit sophisticated cross-sentence anaphoric phenomena, evaluating on a rich source of such questions - the math portion of the Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT).  একটি গাছের ট্রান্সপারেন্সার ক্যাসেড ব্যবহার করে এর মৌলিক কাঠামো হিসেবে আমাদের সিস্টেম বেশ কিছু সূত্র থেকে বিশেষ ব্যাখ্যা করেছে (যেমন কোরেফার পরীক্ষাগুলোর প্রথম ফলাফল ৪৩% স্মরণ এবং ৯১% সঠিকভাবে) সাটি আলজেব্রার শব্দের সমস্যায় প্রদর্শন করে। এছাড়াও আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রয়োগ করি জনগণ ডলফিন আলজেব্রা প্রশ্নের সেটে এবং ৭৩. ৯% থেকে ৭৭.', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu cümlələri genişləndirir və çoxlu cümlələri anaforik parçalarını göstərən, bu sualların zəngin mənbəsini değerləndiririk - Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT) matematik parçasını. Ağa ç tərcümcisi kaskadını özünün temel arhitektürü kimi istifadə edərək, sistemimiz müvəffəqiyyəti çəkilməyənə qədər çoxlu kaynaqlardan təhlükəsizlik g östərər. Vəziyyətlər SAT algebra sözlərinin problemlərində ilk dəfə 43%-ni yada salmaq və 91%-ini göstərər. Biz həmçinin sistemimizi halkı Dolphin algebra suallarına uygulayıq, və sanat F1-ni 73,9%-dən 77,0%-ə düzəltdik.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք հարցերին պատասխանելու մոտեցում, որոնք ընդհանուր են բազմաթիվ նախադասություններում և ցույց են տալիս բարդ խաչը նախադասությունների անաֆորական երևույթներ, գնահատելով այս հարցերի հարուստ աղբյուրը՝ դպրոցական ապտիվության թեստի (ՍԱT) մաթեմատիկական մասը: By using a tree transducer cascade as its basic architecture, our system propagates uncertainty from multiple sources (e.g. coreference resolution or verb interpretation) until it can be confidently resolved.  Experiments show the first-ever results 43% recall and 91% precision) on SAT algebra word problems.  We also apply our system to the public Dolphin algebra question set, and improve the state-of-the-art F1-score from 73.9% to 77.0%.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pristup odgovorima na pitanja koje šire višestruke rečenice i pokazuju sofisticirani anaforski fenomeni prekrštenih rečenica, procjenjujući bogati izvor takvih pitanja - matematički dio školskog testa za apetitude (SAT). Koristeći kaskadu za prevoditelj drveta kao osnovnu arhitekturu, naš sistem proširi nesigurnost iz višestrukih izvora (npr. rezolucija pristojnosti ili interpretacija verb a) dok se ne može sigurno riješiti. Eksperimenti pokazuju prvi ikad rezultat sjećanja 43% i preciznost 91%) na probleme sa SAT algebrom riječima. Također primjenjujemo naš sistem na postavljeno pitanje javnog algebre Dolphina i poboljšavamo rezultat države umjetnosti F1 od 73,9% na 77,0%.', 'et': 'Esitame lähenemisviisi küsimustele, mis hõlmavad mitut lauset ja esindavad keerukaid ristlauseid anafoorseid nähtusi, hinnates selliste küsimuste rikkalikku allikat - matemaatika osa Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT). Kasutades põhilist arhitektuuri puuandurite kaskaadi, levitab meie süsteem ebakindlust mitmest allikast (nt koreferensi resolutsioon või verbitõlgendus), kuni see on kindlalt lahendatud. Katsed näitavad esimesi tulemusi 43% tagasikutsumine ja 91% täpsus) SAT algebra sõnaprobleemide puhul. Samuti rakendame oma süsteemi avaliku Dolphin algebra küsimuste komplekti ja parandame state-of-the-art F1-skoori 73,9% 77,0%.', 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup k odpovědi na otázky, které zahrnují více vět a vykazují sofistikované anaforické jevy v křížových větách, vyhodnocující bohatý zdroj těchto otázek, jako je matematická část testu scholastické aptitude (SAT). Použitím kaskády stromového převodníku jako základní architektury náš systém šíří nejistotu z více zdrojů (např. rozlišení koreference nebo interpretace slovesa), dokud ji nebude možné s jistotou vyřešit. Experimenty ukazují vůbec první výsledky 43% odvolání a 91% přesnost) na SAT algebry slovní problémy. Aplikujeme náš systém také na veřejnou sadu otázek algebry Dolphin a zlepšujeme nejmodernější skóre F1 od 73,9% do 77,0%.', 'fi': 'Esitämme lähestymistavan moniosaisiin lauseisiin liittyviin kysymyksiin vastaamiseen, joissa esiintyy monimutkaisia ristikkäisiä anaforisia ilmiöitä, ja arvioimme näiden kysymysten runsaasta lähteestä - Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT) -matemaattista osaa. Käyttämällä puuanturikaskadia perusarkkitehtuurinaan järjestelmämme levittää epävarmuutta useista lähteistä (esim. koreferenssin resoluutio tai verbin tulkinta), kunnes se on luotettavasti ratkaistavissa. Kokeet osoittavat kaikkien aikojen ensimmäiset tulokset 43% palautus ja 91% tarkkuus) SAT algebran sanaongelmista. Sovellamme järjestelmäämme myös julkiseen Dolphin algebran kysymykseen ja parannamme huippuluokan F1-pisteitä 73,9 prosentista 77,0 prosenttiin.', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament per respondre a preguntes que abarcan múltiples frases i exhibeixen fenomens anafòrics de frases cruzades sofisticats, valorant en una font rica d'aquestes preguntes - la porció matemàtica del Test d'Aptitude Escolàstica (SAT). Utilitzant una cascada de transdutor d'arbre com a arquitectura bàsica, el nostre sistema propaga la incertitud de múltiples fonts (per exemple, resolució de coreferença o interpretació de verbs) fins que es pot resoldre amb confiança. Experiments show the first-ever results 43% recall and 91% precision) on SAT algebra word problems.  També apliquem el nostre sistema al conjunt de preguntes públics d'àlgebra de Dolphin, i millorem la puntuació F1 de 73,9% a 77,0%.", 'he': 'אנו מציגים גישה לענות על שאלות שגורמות למשפטים רבים ומציגים תופעות אנפוריות מתוחכמות במשפטים הצלבים, הערכים על מקור עשיר של שאלות כאלה - חלק המתמטיקה של מבחן האפטיודיה הספולאטית (SAT). באמצעות השימוש בארכיטקטורה הבסיסית של מעבר עץ, המערכת שלנו פוזרת אי-בטוחות ממקורים רבים (למשל פיתרון קולפרנס או פרשנות אלברים) עד שיוכל לפתור אותה באופן בטוח. ניסויים מראים את התוצאות הראשונות אי פעם 43% זיכרון ודיוק 91% על בעיות מילים של אלגברה SAT. We also apply our system to the public Dolphin algebra question set, and improve the state-of-the-art F1-score from 73.9% to 77.0%.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pristop k odgovarjanju na vprašanja, ki obsegajo več stavkov in kažejo prefinjene anaforične pojave navzkrižnih stavkov, ocenjujemo na bogatem viru takšnih vprašanj - matematični del šolskega testa sposobnosti (SAT). Z uporabo kaskade drevesnih pretvornikov kot osnovne arhitekture naš sistem širi negotovost iz več virov (npr. ločljivost koreference ali interpretacija glagolov), dokler jo ni mogoče zanesljivo rešiti. Eksperimenti kažejo prve rezultate, ki so jih dosegli 43% odpoklica in 91% natančnost) na SAT algebrnih besednih težavah. Naš sistem uporabljamo tudi za javni nabor vprašanj Dolphin algebre in izboljšamo najsodobnejši rezultat F1 s 73,9% na 77,0%.', 'ha': "We present an approach for answering questions that span multiple sentences and exhibit sophisticated cross-sentence anaphoric phenomena, evaluating on a rich source of such questions - the math portion of the Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT).  Ga ku yi amfani da misalin wata it ãce mai transmiter kaskade kamar matsayin na'urar, na'asarmu yana faɗi da hakki daga manyan source masu yawa (misali, fassarar fancy ko fassarar verb) sai an iya riga shi da tabbaci. Saurin na nuna matsalar ta farkon da za'a motsa 43% tunãni da daidai 91% daidai) a kan masu kalmar SAT algebra. Kayya, muna amfani da kasansa zuwa ma'anar Algebrawa na Dorfin, kuma munã ƙarfafa halin-sanar-F1 daga 73.9 zuwa 77.0%.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk akses kanggo ngomong nik nggambar aturan sing luwih-luwih kanggo ngerasai winih lan nganggep kuwi anaphoric, nggunakake tuaweke nggo sistem sing gak dhéwé - patik dhéwé ning pancene Rong Minggu (SaT). Taning ( Awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem dhéwé kanggo nggawe Algibra Publik Dolf, lan uga luwih-luwih kanggo kalawartané F1-nambah sing mengko karo 75.9% sampek 75.0%.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལ་མཐུན་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་འདི་ཚིག ཤིག་བུ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་བཟོས་བཞིན་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་བདེ་སྟངས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས། བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་SAT སྙན་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་པའི་གྲངས་རྩིས་ཐོག་དང་མཐར་91% (precision) ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་གྲངས་སྐོར་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལ་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Learning Fine-Grained Expressions to Solve Math Word Problems', 'ar': 'تعلم التعبيرات الدقيقة لحل مسائل الرياضيات الكلامية', 'pt': 'Aprendendo expressões refinadas para resolver problemas de palavras matemáticas', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de expresiones finas para resolver problemas verbales matemáticos', 'fr': 'Apprendre des expressions fines pour résoudre des problèmes mathématiques', 'ja': '数学の単語問題を解決するための細かい表現を学ぶ', 'ru': 'Изучение мелкозернистых выражений для решения задач с математическим словом', 'zh': '学细粒度表达式以决数学单词', 'hi': 'गणित शब्द समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए ठीक दानेदार अभिव्यक्तियों सीखना', 'ga': 'Nathanna Mínnithe a Fhoghlaim chun Fadhbanna Focal Mata a Réiteach', 'ka': 'მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემების გადასწავლობა', 'hu': 'Finomszemű kifejezések tanulása a matematikai szó problémáinak megoldására', 'el': 'Μάθηση λεπτόκοκκων εκφράσεων για την επίλυση προβλημάτων μαθηματικών λέξεων', 'it': 'Imparare espressioni a grana fine per risolvere problemi di parole matematiche', 'kk': 'Математикалық сөз мәселелерін шешу үшін дұрыс сызылған өрнектерді үйрену', 'lt': 'Mokyti švelniagrūdžius išraiškas matematikos žodžių problemoms išspręsti', 'mk': 'Научи фини изрази за решавање на проблемите со математичките зборови', 'ms': 'Learning Fine-Grained Expressions to Solve Math Word Problems', 'ml': 'Math Word പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനായി നല്ല ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ് എക്സ്പ്രഷന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Математикийн үг асуудлыг шийдэхэд сайн дүүрэн илэрхийллийг сурах', 'mt': 'Learning Fine-Grained Expressions to Solve Math Word Problems', 'ro': 'Învățarea expresiilor cu granule fine pentru a rezolva problemele cuvintelor matematice', 'no': 'Læring av fintegrende uttrykk for å løysa matematiske ordproblemer', 'sr': 'Naučenje dobrog izraza za rešenje problema matematičkih reči', 'pl': 'Uczenie się drobnoziarnistych wyrażeń w celu rozwiązywania problemów ze słowami matematycznymi', 'ta': 'கணித சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய நல்ல பிரித்த கூற்றுகளை கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளது', 'si': 'ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'Lär dig finkorniga uttryck för att lösa problem med matematiska ord', 'so': 'Barista Fine-Grained expressions to solve problems of Math Word', 'ur': 'ریاضی کلمات مشکلات حل کرنے کے لئے پاکیزہ گرین مثالیں سیکھ رہی ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học các điều kiện vùng nhỏ giải quyết từ to án', 'bg': 'Научаване на фини изрази за решаване на проблеми с математически думи', 'nl': 'Fijn korrelige uitdrukkingen leren om wiskundige woordproblemen op te lossen', 'da': 'Læring af finkornede udtryk for at løse matematiske ordproblemer', 'de': 'Feinkörnige Ausdrücke lernen, um mathematische Wortprobleme zu lösen', 'ko': '세립도 표현식을 배워서 수학 단어 문제를 해결하다', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن واژه\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای برای حل مشکلات کلمه ریاضی', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Tamko linalozungumzwa vizuri ili kutatua Tatizo la Hadithi', 'hr': 'Naučenje lijepih izraza za rješavanje problema s matematičkim riječima', 'tr': 'Matematikanyň sözi meselelerini çözmek üçin iň köp-taýýarlyk ifadeleri öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mëso shprehje të holla për të zgjidhur problemet e fjalëve matematike', 'id': 'Mempelajari ekspresi benih-baik untuk memecahkan masalah kata matematika', 'am': 'Math Word Problems', 'hy': 'Մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրների լուծման համար սովորելը', 'az': 'Matematik Sözü Problemlərini çəkmək üçün yaxşı Graxin İfadələrini öyrənmək', 'af': 'Leer Fine- Grain Uitdrukking om Mathematike Woord Probleme te los', 'bn': 'Math Word সমস্যা সমাধান করার জন্য ভালো গ্রেনের এক্সপ্রেশন শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Naučenje lijepih izraza za rješavanje problema s matematičkim riječima', 'et': 'Matemaatika sõna probleemide lahendamiseks peenete avaldiste õppimine', 'cs': 'Učení se jemnozrnných výrazů pro řešení problémů s matematickým slovem', 'fi': 'Opitaan hienojakoisia lausekkeita matemaattisten sanaongelmien ratkaisemiseksi', 'ca': 'Aprendre expressions fines per resoldre problemes de paraules matemàtiques', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje drobnozrnatih izrazov za reševanje težav z matematičnim besedilom', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ללמוד ביטויים מעורבים כדי לפתור בעיות מילים מתמטיקות', 'bo': 'གྲངས་རིག་གི་སྐད་ཆ་དཀའ་ངལ་མོས་མཐུན་པར་སྨོན་པ།'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a novel template-based method to solve math word problems. This method learns the mappings between math concept phrases in math word problems and their math expressions from training data. For each equation template, we automatically construct a rich template sketch by aggregating information from various problems with the same template. Our approach is implemented in a two-stage system. It first retrieves a few relevant equation system templates and aligns numbers in math word problems to those templates for candidate equation generation. It then does a fine-grained inference to obtain the final answer. Experiment results show that our method achieves an accuracy of 28.4 % on the linear Dolphin18 K benchmark, which is 10 % (54 % relative) higher than previous state-of-the-art systems while achieving an accuracy increase of 12 % (59 % relative) on the TS6 benchmark subset.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة طريقة جديدة تعتمد على القوالب لحل مسائل الكلمات الرياضية. تتعلم هذه الطريقة التعيينات بين عبارات المفاهيم الرياضية في مسائل الكلمات الرياضية وتعبيراتها الرياضية من بيانات التدريب. لكل قالب معادلة ، نقوم تلقائيًا بإنشاء رسم قالب غني عن طريق تجميع المعلومات من المشكلات المختلفة بنفس القالب. يتم تنفيذ نهجنا في نظام من مرحلتين. يقوم أولاً باسترداد عدد قليل من قوالب نظام المعادلات ذات الصلة ويقوم بمحاذاة الأرقام في مسائل الكلمات الرياضية مع تلك القوالب لتوليد المعادلات المرشح. ثم يقوم باستدلال دقيق للحصول على الإجابة النهائية. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن طريقتنا تحقق دقة قدرها 28.4٪ على معيار Dolphin18K الخطي ، وهو أعلى بنسبة 10٪ (54٪ نسبيًا) من أحدث الأنظمة السابقة مع تحقيق زيادة في الدقة بنسبة 12٪ (59٪ نسبيًا) ) في المجموعة الفرعية لمعيار TS6.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un novedoso método basado en plantillas para resolver problemas verbales matemáticos. Este método aprende las asignaciones entre las frases de conceptos matemáticos en problemas verbales de matemáticas y sus expresiones matemáticas a partir de los datos de entrenamiento. Para cada plantilla de ecuaciones, construimos automáticamente un boceto de plantilla enriquecido agregando información de varios problemas con la misma plantilla. Nuestro enfoque se implementa en un sistema de dos etapas. Primero recupera algunas plantillas de sistemas de ecuaciones relevantes y alinea los números de los problemas verbales de matemáticas con esas plantillas para la generación de ecuaciones candidatas. Luego hace una inferencia detallada para obtener la respuesta final. Los resultados del experimento muestran que nuestro método logra una precisión del 28,4% en el punto de referencia lineal Dolphin18K, que es un 10% (54% relativo) más alto que los sistemas de última generación anteriores, al tiempo que logra un aumento de precisión del 12% (59% relativo) en el subconjunto de referencia TS6.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une nouvelle méthode basée sur des modèles pour résoudre des problèmes de mots mathématiques. Cette méthode permet d'apprendre les correspondances entre les phrases conceptuelles mathématiques dans les problèmes de mots mathématiques et leurs expressions mathématiques à partir des données d'entraînement. Pour chaque modèle d'équation, nous construisons automatiquement une esquisse de modèle enrichie en agrégeant les informations provenant de divers problèmes avec le même modèle. Notre approche est mise en œuvre dans un système en deux étapes. Il récupère d'abord quelques modèles de systèmes d'équations pertinents et aligne les nombres dans les problèmes de mots mathématiques sur ces modèles pour la génération d'équations candidates. Il effectue ensuite une inférence fine pour obtenir la réponse finale. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que notre méthode atteint une précision de 28,4\xa0% sur le banc d'essai linéaire Dolphin18K, soit 10\xa0% (54\xa0% relatif) de plus que les systèmes de pointe précédents, tout en atteignant une augmentation de la précision de 12\xa0% (59\xa0% relative) sur le sous-ensemble de référence TS6.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um novo método baseado em modelo para resolver problemas de palavras matemáticas. Esse método aprende os mapeamentos entre frases de conceito matemático em problemas de palavras matemáticas e suas expressões matemáticas a partir de dados de treinamento. Para cada modelo de equação, construímos automaticamente um esboço de modelo rico agregando informações de vários problemas com o mesmo modelo. Nossa abordagem é implementada em um sistema de dois estágios. Primeiro, ele recupera alguns modelos de sistema de equações relevantes e alinha números em problemas de palavras matemáticas a esses modelos para geração de equações candidatas. Em seguida, ele faz uma inferência refinada para obter a resposta final. Os resultados do experimento mostram que nosso método atinge uma precisão de 28,4% no benchmark linear Dolphin18K, que é 10% (54% relativo) maior do que os sistemas de última geração anteriores, enquanto alcança um aumento de precisão de 12% (59% relativo ) no subconjunto de benchmark TS6.', 'ja': '数学の単語問題を解くための新たなテンプレートベースの方法を提示した。この方法では、数学の単語問題における数学概念フレーズとその数学表現との間のマッピングをトレーニングデータから学習する。式テンプレートごとに、同じテンプレートでさまざまな問題からの情報を集約して、豊富なテンプレートスケッチを自動的に構築します。私たちのアプローチは2段階のシステムで実装されています。まず、いくつかの関連する方程式システムテンプレートを取得し、数学の単語問題の数値を候補方程式生成のためのそれらのテンプレートに整列させます。その後、微細な推論を行い、最終的な答えを得る。実験結果は、TS 6ベンチマークサブセットで12 ％ （相対的に59 ％ ）の精度増加を達成しながら、従来の最先端システムより10 ％ （相対的に54 ％ ）高い線形Dolphin 18 Kベンチマークで28.4 ％の精度を達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '本文立模板数学单词问新型法。 其法从练数中学数学单词数学之概短语与其数学表达式间映射。 凡方程模板,同模板之信以自为模板草图。 吾法分两端。 先检方程统模板,并数学单词数与模板齐,以成候选方程。 然后推细粒度以得终报。 实验结果表明,其法在线性Dolphin18K准试上得28.4%之精,高于先进之统10%(相对54%),兼于TS6准测试子集上成12%(对59%)之精升。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен новый метод на основе шаблонов для решения задач математических слов. Этот метод изучает отображение между математическими концептуальными фразами в задачах математического слова и их математическими выражениями из обучающих данных. Для каждого шаблона уравнения мы автоматически создаем эскиз богатого шаблона путем агрегирования информации из различных задач с одним и тем же шаблоном. Наш подход реализован в двухэтапной системе. Сначала он извлекает несколько соответствующих шаблонов системы уравнений и выравнивает числа в задачах математического слова с этими шаблонами для генерации уравнений-кандидатов. Затем он делает тонкий вывод, чтобы получить окончательный ответ. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что наш метод достигает точности 28,4% по линейному эталону Dolphin18K, что на 10% (54% относительно) выше, чем предыдущие современные системы, при этом достигается увеличение точности на 12% (59% относительно) по эталонному подмножеству TS6.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर गणित शब्द समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए एक उपन्यास टेम्पलेट-आधारित विधि प्रस्तुत करता है। यह विधि गणित शब्द समस्याओं में गणित अवधारणा वाक्यांशों और प्रशिक्षण डेटा से उनके गणित अभिव्यक्तियों के बीच मैपिंग सीखती है। प्रत्येक समीकरण टेम्पलेट के लिए, हम स्वचालित रूप से एक ही टेम्पलेट के साथ विभिन्न समस्याओं से जानकारी एकत्रित करके एक समृद्ध टेम्पलेट स्केच का निर्माण करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण दो-चरणीय प्रणाली में लागू किया गया है। यह पहले कुछ प्रासंगिक समीकरण प्रणाली टेम्पलेट्स को पुनर्प्राप्त करता है और उम्मीदवार समीकरण पीढ़ी के लिए उन टेम्पलेट्स के लिए गणित शब्द समस्याओं में संख्याओं को संरेखित करता है। यह तब अंतिम उत्तर प्राप्त करने के लिए एक ठीक-ठाक अनुमान लगाता है। प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि रैखिक डॉल्फिन 18K बेंचमार्क पर 28.4% की सटीकता प्राप्त करती है, जो टीएस 6 बेंचमार्क सबसेट पर 12% (59% सापेक्ष) की सटीकता वृद्धि प्राप्त करते हुए पिछले अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों की तुलना में 10% (54% सापेक्ष) अधिक है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo modh úrscéal bunaithe ar theimpléad i láthair chun fadhbanna focal matamaitice a réiteach. Foghlaimíonn an modh seo na mapálacha idir frásaí coincheap matamaitice i bhfadhbanna focal matamaitice agus a gcuid téarmaí matamaitice ó shonraí oiliúna. Maidir le gach teimpléad cothromóide, tógaimid sceitse saibhir teimpléad go huathoibríoch trí fhaisnéis ó fhadhbanna éagsúla leis an teimpléad céanna a chomhiomlánú. Cuirtear ár gcur chuige i bhfeidhm i gcóras dhá chéim. Aisghabhann sé ar dtús roinnt teimpléid chórais ábhartha cothromóidí agus ailíníonn sé uimhreacha i bhfadhbanna focal matamaitice leis na teimpléid sin do ghiniúint cothromóidí iarrthóra. Ansin déanann sé tátal mín chun an freagra deiridh a fháil. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh go mbaineann ár modh cruinneas 28.4% amach ar thagarmharc líneach Dolphin18K, atá 10% (54% coibhneasta) níos airde ná na córais nua-aimseartha roimhe seo agus méadú cruinnis 12% (59% coibhneasta) á bhaint amach. ) ar fhothacar tagarmharcála TS6.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები ახალგაზრდება პრომენტის შაბლონის გარეშე პრობლემების გარეშე. მათემატიკური კონცექტის პრობლემების და მათემატიკური გამოსახულების მარტიკური გამოსახულების მარტიკური გამოსახულების შესახებ. ყოველ განტოლების შაბლონისთვის, ჩვენ ავტომატურად განტოლებული შაბლონის შაბლონის შაბლონის შაბლონის შექმნა, განსხვავებული პრობლემების ინფორმაციის შე ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა ორ ცენტური სისტემაში იმპლექტირებულია. პირველად მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემებით მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემებით კონდიდეტური განტოლებების შემდეგ რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანია. შემდეგ იქნება საბოლოო პასუხის მიღებად საკუთარი განსხვავება. გამოცდილებების შედეგი ჩვენი მეტი გავაკეთება, რომ ლინიერი Dolphin18K ბენქმარკზე 28.4%-ის წესიერება, რომელიც 10% (54%) უფრო მეტია წინახალი სისტემების წესიერებაზე, რომელიც 12% (59% რედაქტირებული) წესიერებაში გავაკეთებთ.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un nuovo metodo basato su modelli per risolvere problemi di parole matematiche. Questo metodo impara le mappature tra le frasi concettuali matematiche nei problemi di parole matematiche e le loro espressioni matematiche dai dati di allenamento. Per ogni modello di equazione, costruiamo automaticamente uno schizzo di modello ricco aggregando informazioni provenienti da vari problemi con lo stesso modello. Il nostro approccio è implementato in un sistema a due fasi. In primo luogo recupera alcuni modelli di sistema di equazioni rilevanti e allinea i numeri nei problemi di parole matematiche a quei modelli per la generazione di equazioni candidate. Fa poi un'inferenza fine per ottenere la risposta finale. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che il nostro metodo raggiunge un'accuratezza del 28,4% sul benchmark lineare Dolphin18K, che è superiore del 10% (54% relativo) rispetto ai precedenti sistemi allo stato dell'arte, raggiungendo un aumento di precisione del 12% (59% relativo) sul sottoinsieme di benchmark TS6.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз математикалық сөздердің мәселелерін шешу үшін романдық үлгі негіздеген әдісін көрсетеді. Бұл әдіс математикалық концепциялардың мәселелері мен математикалық өрнектерінің мәселелері арасындағы картаптауларын оқыды. Әрбір түрлендіру үлгісінде бір үлгімен мәліметті бір мәселелерден бөлек үлгілерден автоматты түрде құрамыз. Біздің қасиетіміз екі этап жүйесінде орындалады. Біріншіден ол бірнеше қатынау жүйесінің үлгілерін алу және сандарды математикалық сөздер мәселелеріне кандидатты теңдеу үлгілеріне теңдейді. Содан кейін соңғы жауап алу үшін жақсы жұмыс істейді. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері біздің тәсіліміздің сызық Dolphin18K белгісінде 28,4% дегенді көрсетеді, бұл TS6 белгісінде 12% (59% қатынасыз) деген бағдарламасының алдыңғы орындалық жүйелерден 10% (54% қатынасыз) дегеннен артық.', 'lt': 'This paper presents a novel template-based method to solve math word problems.  Šis metodas iš mokymo duomenų išmoko žemėlapius tarp matematikos koncepcijos frazių matematikos žodžių problemose ir jų matematikos išraiškose. Kiekvienam lygties šablonui automatiškai sukuriame turtingą šablono skešą sujungdami informaciją iš įvairių problemų su tuo pačiu šablonu. Mūsų požiūris įgyvendinamas dviejų etapų sistemoje. Pirmiausia ji paima keletą atitinkamų lygčių sistemos šablonų ir matematinių žodžių problemų numerius suderina su tų šablonų kandidatų lygčių kūrimui. Tuomet ji daro smulkią išvadą, kad gautų galutinį atsakymą. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas pasiekia 28,4 % tikslumą linijiniame Dolphin18K lyginamuoju rodikliu, kuris yra 10 % (54 % santykinis) didesnis už ankstesnes moderniausias sistemas, o TS6 lyginamojo rodiklio pogrupyje tikslumas padidėja 12 % (59 % santykinis).', 'mk': 'Оваа вест претставува нов метод базиран на шаблони за решавање на проблемите со математичките зборови. Овој метод ги научи мапирањата помеѓу фразите на математичкиот концепт во проблемите со математичките зборови и нивните математички изрази од податоците за обука. За секој шаблон на еднакви, автоматски конструираме богат цртеж на шаблони со агрегирање на информации од различни проблеми со истиот шаблон. Нашиот пристап е спроведен во двофазивен систем. Прво добива неколку релевантни шаблони на системот за еднакви и ги израмнува броевите во проблемите со математичките зборови со оние шаблони за генерација на кандидатски еднакви. Потоа прави фина конференција за да го добие последниот одговор. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот метод постигнува прецизност од 28,4 отсто на линијарната референтна оценка Dolphin18K, која е 10 % (54 отсто релативно) повисока од претходните најсовремени системи, додека постигнува прецизно зголемување од 12 % (59 отсто релативно) на подгрупата референтна оценка TS6', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα μέθοδο βασισμένη σε πρότυπα για την επίλυση προβλημάτων μαθηματικών λέξεων. Αυτή η μέθοδος μαθαίνει τις αντιστοιχίσεις μεταξύ των φράσεων μαθηματικής έννοιας σε μαθηματικά προβλήματα λέξεων και των μαθηματικών εκφράσεων τους από τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Για κάθε πρότυπο εξίσωσης, κατασκευάζουμε αυτόματα ένα πλούσιο σκίτσο προτύπων συγκεντρώνοντας πληροφορίες από διάφορα προβλήματα με το ίδιο πρότυπο. Η προσέγγισή μας υλοποιείται σε ένα σύστημα δύο σταδίων. Αρχικά ανακτά μερικά σχετικά πρότυπα συστήματος εξίσωσης και ευθυγραμμίζει τους αριθμούς στα μαθηματικά προβλήματα λέξεων σε αυτά τα πρότυπα για την παραγωγή υποψήφιων εξίσσεων. Στη συνέχεια, κάνει ένα λεπτό συμπέρασμα για να λάβει την τελική απάντηση. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 28,4% στο γραμμικό σημείο αναφοράς Dolphin18K, το οποίο είναι 10% (54% σχετικά) υψηλότερο από τα προηγούμενα συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, ενώ επιτυγχάνει αύξηση ακρίβειας 12% (59% σχετικά) στο υποσύνολο αναφοράς TS6.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új sablon alapú módszert mutat be matematikai szóproblémák megoldására. Ez a módszer a matematikai szóproblémák matematikai fogalmi kifejezéseinek és matematikai kifejezéseinek leképezését tanulja a képzési adatokból. Minden egyenletsablon esetében automatikusan létrehozunk egy gazdag sablonvázlatot a különböző problémákból származó információk összesítésével ugyanazzal a sablonnal. A megközelítésünket egy kétlépcsős rendszerben hajtjuk végre. Először megkeres néhány releváns egyenletrendszer sablont, és igazítja a matematikai szóproblémák számait azokhoz a sablonokhoz, amelyek a jelölt egyenlet generálásához szükségesek. Ezután finomszemcsés következtetést tesz a végső válasz megszerzéséhez. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk 28,4%-os pontosságot ér el a lineáris Dolphin18K referenciaértéken, ami 10%-kal (54%-kal relatív) magasabb a korábbi korszerű rendszereknél, miközben 12%-os pontosságnövekedést ér el a TS6 referenciaértéken.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan kaedah berasaskan templat baru untuk menyelesaikan masalah perkataan matematik. Kaedah ini mempelajari pemetaan antara frasa konsep matematik dalam masalah perkataan matematik dan ungkapan matematik mereka dari data latihan. Untuk setiap templat persamaan, kita secara automatik membina sketsa templat kaya dengan mengumpulkan maklumat dari pelbagai masalah dengan templat yang sama. pendekatan kita dilaksanakan dalam sistem dua tahap. Ia pertama-tama mengambil beberapa templat sistem persamaan yang relevan dan jajarkan nombor dalam masalah perkataan matematik kepada templat tersebut untuk generasi persamaan calon. Kemudian ia membuat kesimpulan yang baik-bijian untuk mendapatkan jawapan akhir. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita mencapai ketepatan 28.4% pada tanda referensi linear Dolphin18K, yang 10% (54% relatif) lebih tinggi daripada sistem state-of-the-art sebelumnya sementara mencapai peningkatan ketepatan 12% (59% relatif) pada subset tanda referensi TS6.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta metodu ġdid ibbażat fuq mudelli biex jissolvew il-problemi tal-kliem matematiku. Dan il-metodu jitgħallem l-immappjar bejn il-frażijiet tal-kunċett tal-matematika fil-problemi tal-kliem tal-matematika u l-espressjonijiet tal-matematika tagħhom mid-dejta tat-taħriġ. Għal kull mudell ta’ ekwazzjoni, inbnew awtomatikament skessjoni rikka ta’ mudell billi nġabru informazzjoni minn diversi problemi bl-istess mudell. L-approċċ tagħna huwa implimentat f’sistema f’żewġ stadji. L-ewwel tiġbor xi mudelli rilevanti tas-sistema ta’ ekwazzjoni u tallinja n-numri fil-problemi tal-kliem matematiku ma’ dawk il-mudelli għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-ekwazzjoni kandidata. Imbagħad tagħmel inferenza ta’ ħbub fin biex tikseb it-tweġiba finali. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li l-metodu tagħna jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 28.4% fuq il-parametru referenzjarju lineari Dolphin18K, li huwa 10% (54% relattiv) ogħla mis-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati preċedenti filwaqt li jikseb żieda ta’ preċiżjoni ta’ 12% (59% relattiv) fuq is-sottosett ta’ parametru referenzjarju TS6.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас математикийн үг асуудлуудыг шийдэх шинэ шалгалтын үндсэн аргыг харуулдаг. Энэ арга нь математикийн тодорхойлолтын бодлого болон математикийн тодорхойлолтын хоорондын газрын зураг суралцаж байна. Тэгшитгэлийн шалгалтын хувьд бид өөр олон асуудлын мэдээллийг ижил шалгалтын хувьд автоматаар баян шалгалтыг бүтээж байна. Бидний арга хэмжээнд хоёр давхар системд хэрэглэгддэг. Эхлээд тэгшитгэлийн системийн хэд хэдэн асуудлыг авч, математикийн үгийн асуудлын тоонуудыг тэгшитгэлийн төлөвлөлтийн үеэр зохион байгуулдаг. Дараа нь эцсийн хариултыг авч үзэхэд сайхан тарианы халдвар авдаг. Түүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь шулуун Dolphin18K-ийн багц дээр 28.4%-ын тодорхойлолт гаргаж байна. Энэ нь өмнөх урлагийн системээс 10% (54% харьцуулсан) өндөр байна. TS6 багш багш багш багш багш багш багш багш багш багш багш багш багш нарийвчлалтай 12% (59', 'no': 'Name Denne metoden lærer mappingar mellom matematiske konseptfraser i matematiske ordproblemer og matematiske uttrykk frå opplæringsdata. For kvar likningsmal, konstruerer vi automatisk ein rikk maleskett ved å samla informasjon frå ulike problemar med det same malen. Tilnærming vårt er implementert i eit to stadssystem. Det hentar først nokre relevante likningssystememal og justerer tal i matematiske ordproblemer til dei malene for å laga kandidatligningar. Det gjer derfor ein fin korn infeksjon for å få ein sluttsvar. Eksperimentresultatet viser at metoden vårt når det gjer noko nøyaktig av 28,4% på lineær dollphin18K-benchmarket, som er 10% (54% relativt) høgare enn tidlegare kunstsystemet mens det gjer noko nøyaktig økt på 12% (59% relativt) på undergruppa TS6-benchmarket.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nowatorską metodę opartą na szablonach rozwiązywania problemów słów matematycznych. Metoda ta uczy się mapowania pomiędzy zwrotami koncepcyjnymi matematycznymi w matematycznych problemach słowowych a ich wyrażeniami matematycznymi z danych treningowych. Dla każdego szablonu równania automatycznie budujemy bogaty szkic szablonu poprzez agregowanie informacji z różnych problemów za pomocą tego samego szablonu. Nasze podejście realizowane jest w systemie dwustopniowym. Najpierw pobiera kilka istotnych szablonów systemu równań i wyrównuje liczby w matematycznych problemach słowa do tych szablonów do generowania równań kandydatów. Następnie dokonuje precyzyjnych wniosków, aby uzyskać ostateczną odpowiedź. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że nasza metoda osiąga dokładność 28,4% na liniowym odniesieniu Dolphin18K, która jest 10% (54% względna) wyższa niż poprzednie najnowocześniejsze systemy, przy jednoczesnym osiągnięciu wzrostu dokładności 12% (59% względnie) w podzbiorze referencyjnym TS6.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o metodă nouă bazată pe șabloane pentru a rezolva problemele cuvintelor matematice. Această metodă învață mapările dintre frazele conceptuale matematice în problemele cuvintelor matematice și expresiile lor matematice din datele de antrenament. Pentru fiecare șablon de ecuație, construim automat o schiță de șablon bogată prin agregarea informațiilor din diferite probleme cu același șablon. Abordarea noastră este implementată într-un sistem în două etape. Mai întâi recuperează câteva șabloane relevante de sistem de ecuații și aliniază numerele din problemele cuvintelor matematice la acele șabloane pentru generarea ecuațiilor candidate. Apoi face o deducție fină pentru a obține răspunsul final. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că metoda noastră atinge o precizie de 28,4% pe benchmark liniar Dolphin18K, care este cu 10% (54% relativ) mai mare decât sistemele anterioare de ultimă oră, obținând în același timp o creștere a preciziei de 12% (59% relativ) pe subset de benchmark TS6.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මේ විධානය තමයි ගණිත වචන වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ගණිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ගණිත ව හැම සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සඳහා, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංස්ථාපනය කරන්නේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය දෙකක් පද්ධතියක් ඇතුලත් වෙනවා. මුලින්ම ඒක සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ පද්ධතිය ටෙම්ප්ලේට්ස් කිහිපයක් ලැබෙනවා සහ ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා ඒ ට ඊට පස්සේ ඒක අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විද්\u200dයාව 28.4% සම්පූර්ණත්වයක් ලිනියර් ඩොල්ෆින් 18K බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වල, ඒක 10% (54% සම්පූර්ණත්වයක්) පළවෙනි ස්ථානයේ පද්ධති', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novu metodu na osnovu šablona da reši probleme sa matematičkim riječima. Ovaj metod nauči mapiranje između rečenica matematike u problemima sa rečenicama matematike i njihovim izrazima matematike iz podataka o obuci. Za svaki šablon jednačine, automatski konstruiramo bogat skeč šablona sakupljanjem informacija iz različitih problema sa istim šablom. Naš pristup je proveden u sistemu dve faze. Prvo dobija nekoliko relevantnih šablona jednačine i poravna brojeve u matematičkim riječima problemima sa tim šablonama za generaciju kandidatnih jednačin a. Onda dobija konačni odgovor. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da naš metod postiže tačnost od 28,4% na linearnoj salonu Dolphin18K, što je 10% (54% relativno) veći od prethodnih stanja umjetničkih sustava dok postignemo povećanje tačnosti od 12% (59% relativno) na podskupini TS6.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu soo saaraa qaab ku saleysan qoraalka saxda ah si ay u xalliso dhibaatooyin ku saabsan hadalka xisaabta. Kanu wuxuu ku baran karaa sawirada ay ka dhexeeyaan fekerka xisaabta dhibaatooyinka hadalka xisaabta iyo hadalka xisaabta iyo macluumaadka waxbarashada. Qoraalka isku qiimo ahaanshaha oo dhan, waxaynu automatic ka dhisnaa jardiino taajir ah, waxaana ku qornaa macluumaad ku saabsan dhibaatooyin kala duduwan ee isbedelka. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa lagu sameeyaa nidaam labaad. Marka ugu horeysa waxay soo celisaa isboortii nidaamka isku mid ahaanshaha, waxayna lambaro ku bedeshaa dhibaatooyin ku saabsan hadalka xisaabta, waxayna u bedeshaa macluumaadkaas qaabilaadda qofka isku qiimeeya. Markaas waxaa jirta cudur wanaagsan in la helo jawaabta ugu dambeeya. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaabkanagu ay saxda 28.4% ku gaadho bangiga qoriga ee Dolphin18K, taasoo ka sareeya 10% (54% relative) oo ka sareeya nidaamka farshaxanka hore, marka uu dhamaado koritaanka rasmi ah 12% (59% relative) oo ku qoran guntiga TS6.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en ny mallbaserad metod för att lösa matematiska ordproblem. Denna metod lär sig mappningarna mellan matematiska begreppsfraser i matematiska ordproblem och deras matematiska uttryck från träningsdata. För varje ekvationsmall skapar vi automatiskt en omfattande mallskiss genom att samla information från olika problem med samma mall. Vårt tillvägagångssätt genomförs i ett tvåstegssystem. Den hämtar först några relevanta ekvationssystemmallar och anpassar tal i matematiska ordproblem till dessa mallar för kandidatekvationsgenerering. Den gör sedan en finkornig slutsats för att få det slutliga svaret. Experimentsresultat visar att vår metod uppnår en noggrannhet på 28,4% på det linjära Dolphin18K-riktmärket, vilket är 10% (54% relativ) högre än tidigare state-of-the-art system samtidigt som den uppnår en noggrannhetsökning på 12% (59% relativ) på TS6-riktmärket delmängd.', 'ml': 'ഗണിത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നോവല്\u200d template-based രീതിയിലുണ്ട്. ഗണിത വാക്ക് പ്രശ്നങ്ങളിലും ഗണിത വാക്കുകളിലും ഗണിത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയിലുള്ള മാപ്പിങ്ങുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഈ രീ എല്ലാ സമത്തിന്റെ മാതൃകയ്ക്കും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം സമ്പന്നരായ ഒരു മാതൃകയുടെ സ്കേച്ച് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രശ്നങ്ങള രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ആദ്യം കുറച്ച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സമ്മതിപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മാമ്പുകള്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നു. ഗണിത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള അവസാനത്തെ ഉത്തരം ലഭിക്കുന്നതിന് അത് നല്ലൊരു ദുര്\u200dബലമാണ്. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d 28.4% ഡോള്\u200dഫിന്\u200d18K ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d എത്തിയെടുക്കുന്നത്, ടിഎസ്6 ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക്', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் கணித சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய ஒரு புதிய வார்ப்புருவை அடிப்படையான முறைமையை க கணக்கு சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகள் மற்றும் கணித த தொடர்கள் பயிற்சி தரவிலிருந்து கணினி சொற்றொடர்களுக்கிடையே வரைபடங்களை கற் ஒவ்வொரு சமன்பாட்டு வார்ப்புருவுக்கும், ஒரே வார்ப்புருவில் இருந்து வேறு பிரச்சனைகளில் இருந்து தகவலை பிரித்து வர இரண்டு நிலைமை அமைப்பில் எங்கள் செயல்பாடு செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது. முதலில் சில தொடர்புடைய சமன்பாட்டு முறைமையின் வார்ப்புருக்களை மீட்டெடுக்கும் மற்றும் கணித சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகளில் எண பிறகு அது இறுதியின் விடையை பெறுவதற்கு ஒரு நல்ல பிரச்சனை செய்கிறது. முயற்சி முடிவுகள் தெரியும் என்று காட்டுகிறது TS6 பெங்குருக்குப் பகுதியில் இருந்து சரியாக இருக்கும் வரிசையில் 28.4% டால்பின்18K பெங்க்குப் பெறும், அது 10% (54% சம்பந்தம்) முந்', 'ur': 'This paper presents a new template-based method to solve math word problems. یہ طریقہ ریاضی کلمات کے مشکلات اور ان کی ریاضی اثرات کے درمیان مکاپینگ کا سیکھا جاتا ہے. ہر برابری ٹیپلٹ کے لئے، ہم اپنے ساتھ ایک ثروت ٹیپلٹ sketch بناتے ہیں، ایک ہی ٹیپلٹ کے ساتھ مختلف مشکلات سے معلومات جمع کر رہے ہیں۔ ہمارا تقریبا دو مرحلہ سیسٹم میں ہے۔ یہ پہلی بار ایک کم معاملہ سازمان سیستم ٹیپلٹ لیتا ہے اور ریاضی کلمات مشکلات میں شمارے کو ان ٹیپلٹوں کے لئے کڈینڈیٹ سازمان کی نسل کے لئے برابر کرتا ہے. پھر اس کے بعد اچھا جواب ملے گا آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ لائنیر ڈالفین 18ک بنچم مارک پر 28.4% کی دقیقیق حاصل کرتی ہے، جو 10% (54% نسبت) پہلے آزمائش سیستموں سے زیادہ ہے جبکہ TS6 بنچم مارک سٹم پر 12% (59% نسبت) دقیق اضافہ حاصل کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name This method learns the mappings between math concept phrases in math word problems and their math expressions from training data.  @ info: whatsthis Bizning usuli ikki darajada ishlaydi. Birinchi marta, bir necha bogʻliq tizim namunasini olib tashlaydi, matn so'zlar muammolasidagi raqamlarni tahrirlash uchun namunalarni moslash. Keyin bu oxirgi javob olish uchun yaxshi ko'rinadi. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, bizning usuli TS6 benchmark qutisida 28.4% yordamida aniqligimiz mumkin, bu 10% (54% qisqarli) o'zgarishning oldingi holatidan foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một phương pháp mới căn cứ mẫu để giải quyết các vấn đề từ to án. Phương pháp này học bản đồ giữa các cụm từ toán trong các vấn đề từ toán học và biểu thức toán từ dữ liệu tập luyện. Với mỗi mẫu phương trình, chúng tôi tự động tạo ra một bản vẽ mẫu giàu có bằng cách tổng hợp thông tin từ các vấn đề khác nhau với mẫu tương tự. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta được áp dụng trong hai giai đoạn. Nó lần đầu tiên lấy lại một số mẫu phương trình liên quan và chỉnh số trong các vấn đề từ to án cho các mẫu dành cho thế hệ phương trình ứng cử viên. Sau đó, nó có kết quả hoàn hảo để có được câu trả lời cuối cùng. Kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp này đạt đến độ chính xác 28.4=. trên tiêu chuẩn Dolphin18K tuyến, mà là 10=.= (54=) tương đối) còn cao hơn hệ thống hiện đại trước cùng với độ chính xác tăng cao 12=.= (59=. tương đối) trên nhóm tiêu chuẩn TS6.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя нов шаблон-базиран метод за решаване на задачи с математически думи. Този метод научава картографирането между фразите за математически концепции в задачи с математически думи и техните математически изрази от тренировъчни данни. За всеки шаблон на уравнение ние автоматично конструираме богата скица на шаблон чрез агрегиране на информация от различни проблеми с един и същ шаблон. Нашият подход се прилага в двуетапна система. Първо той извлича няколко подходящи шаблона на системата за уравнения и подравнява числата в задачите с математически думи към тези шаблони за генериране на кандидат уравнения. След това прави фино заключение, за да получи окончателния отговор. Резултатите от експериментите показват, че методът ни постига точност от 28,4% при линейния показател което е с 10% (54% относително) по-високо от предишните съвременни системи, като същевременно постига увеличение на точността с 12% (59% относително) при поднабора показател.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een nieuwe sjabloon-gebaseerde methode om wiskundige woordproblemen op te lossen. Deze methode leert de toewijzingen tussen wiskundige conceptzinnen in wiskundige woordproblemen en hun wiskundige uitdrukkingen op basis van trainingsgegevens. Voor elk vergelijkingssjabloon maken we automatisch een uitgebreide sjabloonschets door informatie uit verschillende problemen met hetzelfde sjabloon samen te voegen. Onze aanpak wordt geïmplementeerd in een tweefasensysteem. Het haalt eerst een paar relevante sjablonen voor vergelijkingssystemen op en lijnt getallen in wiskundige woordproblemen uit op die sjablonen voor het genereren van kandidaatvergelijkingen. Het doet dan een fijnkorrelige conclusie om het definitieve antwoord te verkrijgen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode een nauwkeurigheid van 28,4% bereikt op de lineaire Dolphin18K benchmark, die 10% (54% relatief) hoger is dan eerdere state-of-the-art systemen, terwijl een nauwkeurigheidsverhoging van 12% (59% relatief) bereikt op de TS6 benchmark subset.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en ny skabelonbaseret metode til at løse matematiske ordproblemer. Denne metode lærer kortlægningerne mellem matematiske begrebssætninger i matematiske ordproblemer og deres matematiske udtryk fra træningsdata. For hver ligningsskabelon konstruerer vi automatisk en omfattende skabelonsskitse ved at samle oplysninger fra forskellige problemer med den samme skabelon. Vores tilgang er implementeret i et todrinssystem. Det henter først et par relevante ligningssystem skabeloner og justerer tal i matematiske ordproblemer til disse skabeloner til kandidatligning generering. Den udfører derefter en finkornet konklusion for at opnå det endelige svar. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode opnår en nøjagtighed på 28,4% på det lineære Dolphin18K benchmark, som er 10% (54% relativ) højere end tidligere state-of-the-art systemer, samtidig med at der opnås en nøjagtighedsstigning på 12% (59% relativ) på TS6 benchmark delmængden.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novu metodu baziranu na šablonu kako bi riješio probleme s riječima matematike. Ovaj metod nauči mapiranje između rečenica matematike u problemima s riječima matematike i njihovim izrazima matematike iz podataka obuke. Za svaki obrazac jednačine, automatski konstruiramo bogat obrazac šablona sakupljanjem informacija iz različitih problema s istim šablom. Naš pristup je proveden u dvofaznom sustavu. Prvo dobija nekoliko relevantnih šablona sustava jednačine i prilagođuje brojeve u matematičkim riječima problemima s tim šablonama za generaciju jednačine kandidata. Onda dobija konačni odgovor. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da je naš metod postigao tačnost od 28,4% na linearnoj referenciji Dolphin18K, što je 10% (54% relativno) veći od prethodnih sustava umjetnosti dok postignemo povećanje tačnosti od 12% (59% relativno) na podzemnoj referenciji TS6.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt eine neuartige vorlagenbasierte Methode zur Lösung mathematischer Wortprobleme vor. Diese Methode lernt die Zuordnungen zwischen mathematischen Konzeptphrasen in mathematischen Wortproblemen und ihren mathematischen Ausdrücken aus Trainingsdaten. Für jede Gleichungsvorlage erstellen wir automatisch eine reichhaltige Vorlage, indem wir Informationen aus verschiedenen Problemen mit derselben Vorlage aggregieren. Unser Ansatz wird in einem zweistufigen System umgesetzt. Zunächst werden einige relevante Gleichungssystemvorlagen abgerufen und Zahlen in mathematischen Wortproblemen mit diesen Vorlagen für die Generierung von Kandidatengleichungen ausgerichtet. Es führt dann eine feinkörnige Schlussfolgerung aus, um die endgültige Antwort zu erhalten. Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Methode eine Genauigkeit von 28,4% auf dem linearen Dolphin18K Benchmark erreicht, der 10% (54% relativ) höher ist als vorherige State-of-the-Art Systeme, während eine Genauigkeitserhöhung von 12% (59% relativ) auf der TS6 Benchmark Teilmenge erreicht wird.', 'id': 'This paper presents a novel template-based method to solve math word problems.  Metode ini mempelajari peta antara frasa konsep matematika dalam masalah kata matematika dan ekspresi matematika mereka dari data latihan. Untuk setiap templat persamaan, kita secara otomatis membangun sketsa templat kaya dengan menggabungkan informasi dari berbagai masalah dengan templat yang sama. pendekatan kita dieksploitasi dalam sistem dua tahap. Pertama ia mengambil beberapa templat sistem persamaan relevan dan menyesuaikan angka dalam masalah kata matematika ke templat tersebut untuk generasi persamaan kandidat. Kemudian ia membuat kesimpulan yang baik untuk mendapatkan jawaban akhir. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita mencapai akurasi 28,4% pada benchmark linear Dolphin18K, yang 10% (54% relatif) lebih tinggi dari sistem state-of-the-art sebelumnya sementara mencapai peningkatan akurasi 12% (59% relatif) pada subset benchmark TS6.', 'ko': '본고는 새로운 틀에 기초한 수학 어휘 풀이 방법을 제시했다.이 방법은 훈련 데이터에서 수학 단어 문제의 수학 개념 단어와 그 수학 표현식 사이의 반사성을 배운다.모든 방정식 템플릿에 대해 우리는 같은 템플릿을 사용하여 서로 다른 문제에서 온 정보를 집합하여 풍부한 템플릿 초도를 자동으로 구축한다.우리의 방법은 두 단계의 시스템에서 실현된 것이다.그것은 우선 관련 방정식 시스템 템플릿을 검색하고 수학 단어 문제의 숫자를 이 템플릿과 정렬하여 후보 방정식을 생성한다.그리고 나서, 그것은 최종 답안을 얻기 위해 세립도 추리를 했다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 온라인 Dolphin18K 기준에서 28.4%의 정밀도를 실현했고 이전의 최첨단 시스템보다 10%(상대 54%) 높았으며 TS6 기준 서브집합에서 12%(상대 59%)의 정밀도를 향상시켰다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک روش بر اساس نمونه\u200cهای نوی برای حل مشکلات کلمات ریاضی را نشان می\u200cدهد. این روش نقشه\u200cبندی بین فرض\u200cهای مفهوم ریاضی در مشکلات کلمه ریاضی و تعریف ریاضی\u200cشان از داده\u200cهای آموزش یاد می\u200cگیرد. برای هر قالب معادل، ما با جمع اطلاعات از مشکلات مختلف با یک قالب خودکار یک قالب قالب ثروتمند را بسازیم. روش ما در یک سیستم دو مرحله انجام شده است. اولین بار چند کلمات سیستم معادل مربوط به دریافت می\u200cکند و شماره\u200cها را در مشکلات کلمات ریاضی به آن کلمات برای تولید معادل کاندیده تنظیم می\u200cکند. سپس به پاسخ نهایی دریافت می\u200cکند. نتایج تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما دقیق ۲۸.۴ درصد روی نقشه\u200cهای خطی Dolphin18K را می\u200cرساند، که ۱۰ درصد (54 درصد نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نسبت به نس', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu za riwaya yenye msingi wa makala ili kutatua matatizo ya maneno ya hisabati. Utawala huu unajifunza ramani kati ya maneno ya hisabati katika matatizo ya maneno ya hisabati na hisabati yao kutoka kwenye taarifa za mafunzo. Kwa kila namba ya usawa, tunajijenga namba yenye utajiri kwa kuongeza taarifa kutoka kwenye matatizo mbalimbali yanayohusu namba moja. Hatua yetu imetekelezwa katika mfumo wa hatua mbili. Kwanza inaleta namba chache za mfumo wa usawa na kuingiza idadi katika matatizo ya maneno ya hisabati kwa ajili ya vizazi vya usawa wa mgombea. Kisha hufanya maambukizi mazuri ili kupata jibu la mwisho. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inapata sahihi ya asilimia 28.4 kwenye bendera ya kisasa ya Dolphin18K, ambayo ni asilimia 10 (asilimia 54 inayohusiana na asilimia 54) zaidi ya mifumo ya sanaa iliyopita wakati akipata ongezeko la sahihi la asilimia 12 (59% inayohusiana na asilimia) kwenye kanzu ya bendera ya TS6.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የመካነሻ ቃላትን መፍታት የሚችል የሜኑባር መክፈት ነው፡፡ This method learns the mappings between math concept phrases in math word problems and their math expressions from training data.  ሁሉንም ምሳሌ ማድረግ በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም እናስጀምር፡፡ የሁለት ደረጃዎች ሲሆን ይደረጋል፡፡ አስቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ ስርዓት ማድረጊያውን ያስተካክላል እና ቁጥሮችን ለመቆጣጠር ትውልድ ላይ በሚያስተካክሉ ምሳሌዎች ያስተካክላል፡፡ የኋለኛውን መልስ ለማግኘት የተጠቀመ ውጤት ነው፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የTS6 benchmark አካባቢ ላይ አሥር በመቶ (54 በመቶ relative) የሚደረገው የሀብት ሥርዓት ግንኙነት ላይ የሚደረገውን 28.4 በመቶ አካሄድ እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një metodë të re bazuar në modele për të zgjidhur problemet e fjalëve matematike. Kjo metodë mëson hartimin midis frazave të konceptit matematik në problemet e fjalëve matematike dhe shprehjet e tyre matematike nga të dhënat e trajnimit. Për secilin model ekuacioni, ne automatikisht ndërtojmë një sketch të pasur modeli duke mbledhur informacione nga probleme të ndryshme me të njëjtin model. Përqasja jonë zbatohet në një sistem dy fazash. Së pari merr disa modele të rëndësishme të sistemit ekuacioni dhe rendit numrat në problemet e fjalëve matematike me a to modele për gjenerimin e ekuacionit kandidat. Pastaj bën një përfundim të hollë për të marrë përgjigjen përfundimtare. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë se metoda jonë arrin një saktësi prej 28.4% në normën lineare të Dolphin18K, e cila është 10% (54% relativisht) më e lartë se sistemet e mëparshme të rendit ndërsa arrin një rritje saktësi prej 12% (59% relativisht) në nëngrupin e normës TS6.', 'af': "Name Hierdie metode leer die kaart tussen matematiese konsepte frase in matematiese woord probleme en hulle matematiese uitdrukkings van onderwerp data. For each equation template, we automatically construct a rich template sketch through aggregating information from various problems with the same template. Name Ons toegang is implementeer in 'n twee stadige stelsel. Dit herhaal eerste 'n paar relevante vergelyking stelsel sjabloone en vergelyk nommers in matematiese woord probleme na dié sjabloone vir kandidate vergelyking generasie. Dit doen dan 'n fine-koring inferensie om die eindelike antwoord te kry. Eksperiment resultate wys dat ons metode 'n presies van 28.4% bereik op die lineêre Dolphin18K benchmark, wat is 10% (54% relatiewe) hoër as vorige state- of- the- art stelsels terwyl 'n presies vergroot van 12% (59% relatiewe) op die TS6 benchmark subartikel bereik word.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz matematik sözleriniň meselelerini çözmek üçin roman nusgalary tabanly yöntemi görkezýär. Bu yöntem matematika düşünjäniň frazleriniň arasynda matematika sözleriniň problemalarynda we matematika ifadeleriniň şeklinde maglumatlaryny öwrenýär. Her denklem şampiyonu için, aynı şampiyonla bilgi toplarak zengin bir şampiyonun çizimini otomatik olarak inşa ediyoruz. Biziň ýaryşymyz 2-ýoluň sistemasynda implementedildi. İlk olarak bir kaç değerli denklem sistemi örneklerini alır ve matematik kelime sorunlarına bu denklem üretilmesi için sayıları sıralar. Sonra soňky jogaby almak için güzel titreme bir şekilde gelir. Testler netijesi biziň metodumyzyň TS6 etiketli jemgyýetiň 28.4%-iniň dogrylygyny ýetişdirýändigini görkez.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt matematik sözlərinin problemlərini çəkmək üçün yeni şablon tərəfindən bir metodu göstərir. Bu metod matematik məlumatlarının məlumatlarından və matematik ifadələrinin məlumatlarından məlumatları arasındakı məlumatları öyrənir. Hər tənləşdirmə şablonu üçün, eyni şablo ilə müxtəlif problemlərdən məlumatları toplayaraq, zəngin şablon skeçisini avtomatik olaraq inşa edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız iki dəfə sistemdə istifadə edilir. Bu ilk dəfə bir neçə məlumatlı tənliklər sistemini alır və nömrələri matematik sözlərinin problemlərinə kandidát tənliklərinin nəsillərinə çəkir. Sonra sonuncu cavab vermək üçün gözəl dənələr düşür. Experiment sonuçları göstərir ki, metodumuzun linear Dolphin18K benchmark üzərində 28,4%-in doğruluğuna nail ola bilər, bu TS6 benchmark aparıcısında 12% (59%-in qohum-qohum) art ıqlığından 10% (54%-in qohum-qohum) daha yüksəkdir.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրների լուծման նոր մոդել: Այս մեթոդը սովորում է մաթեմատիկայի հասկացության արտահայտությունների միջև մաթեմատիկայի բառերի խնդիրներում և նրանց մաթեմատիկայի արտահայտություններից ուսուցման տվյալներից: Յուրաքանչյուր հավասարման կաղապարի համար մենք ինքնաբերաբար կառուցում ենք հարուստ կաղապարի կաղապար՝ հավաքելով տարբեր խնդիրների տեղեկատվությունը նույն կաղապարի հետ: Մեր մոտեցումը իրականացվում է երկու փուլում: Սկզբում այն վերցնում է մի քանի նշանակալի հավասարման համակարգի մոդելներ և հարմարեցնում է մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրների թվերը հավասարման հավասարման ստեղծման մոդելների հետ: Այնուհետև այն կատարում է նրբագեղ եզրակացություն վերջնական պատասխանը ստանալու համար: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը հասնում է 28.4 տոկոսի ճշմարտությունը գծային Դոլֆին18K-ի հարաբերականի վրա, որը 10 տոկոսի (54 տոկոսի հարաբերականը) ավելի բարձր է, քան նախորդ բարձրագույն համակարգերը, մինչդեռ հասնում է 12 տոկոսի ճշմարտության աճ (59 տոկոսի', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি গণিত শব্দের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য একটি নভেল ট্যাম্পেল-ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছে। এই পদ্ধতি গণিত শব্দের সমস্যা এবং তাদের গণিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য থেকে মানচিত্রের মধ্যে ম্যাপপিং শিখে। প্রত্যেক সমতুল্য মন্দির জন্য আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সমৃদ্ধ মন্দির স্ক্যাচ নির্মাণ করি একই ধরনের সমস্যা থেকে বিভিন্ন সমস্যার আমাদের পদক্ষেপ দুই স্টেজ ব্যবস্থায় বাস্তবায়ন করা হয়েছে। এটি প্রথমে কয়েকটি প্রার্থী সমতুল্য সিস্টেমের মন্দির পুনরুদ্ধার করে গণিত শব্দের সমস্যার সংখ্যার সাথে সংখ্যার সংখ্যা স্থ তারপর এটা চূড়ান্ত উত্তর পাওয়ার জন্য ভালো ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি টিএস৬ বেনম্যার্ক বেনম্যাক্টটিতে ২৮.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja novu metodu baziranu na šablonu da riješi probleme sa matematičkim riječima. Ovaj metod nauči mapiranje između rečenica matematike u problemima sa riječima matematike i njihovim izrazima matematike iz podataka o obuci. Za svaki obrazac jednačine, automatski konstrujemo bogat obrazac šablona sakupljanjem informacija iz različitih problema sa istim šablom. Naš pristup je proveden u dvofaznom sistemu. Prvo dobija nekoliko relevantnih šablona jednačine i poravna brojeve u matematičkim riječima problemima sa tim šablonama za generaciju kandidatnih jednačin a. Onda dobija konačni odgovor. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da naš metod postigne tačnost od 28,4% na linearnoj kriteriji Dolphin18K, što je 10% (54% relativno) veći od prethodnih sustava umjetnosti dok postignemo povećanje tačnosti od 12% (59% relativno) na podskupini kriterija TS6.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un mètode nou basat en models per resoldre problemes de paraules matemàtiques. Aquest mètode aprenen el mapatge entre frases de concepte matemàtic en problemes de paraules matemàtiques i les seves expressions matemàtiques a partir de dades d'entrenament. Per cada model d'equació, construim automàticament un esboç de model ric agregant informació de diversos problemes amb el mateix model. El nostre enfocament està implementat en un sistema de dos etapes. Primer recupera alguns patrons pertinents del sistema d'equacions i allinja números en problemes de paraules matemàtiques a aquells patrons per a generar equacions candidates. Llavors fa una inferència fina per obtenir la resposta final. Els resultats d'experiments demostren que el nostre mètode aconsegueix una precisió del 28,4% en el valor de referència linear Dolphin18K, que és 10% (relativa al 54%) més alt que els sistemes més avançats anteriors, aconseguent un augment de precisió del 12% (relativa al 59%) en el subgrup de referència TS6.", 'et': 'Käesolev töö esitleb uudset mallipõhist meetodit matemaatika sõna probleemide lahendamiseks. See meetod õpib matemaatika kontseptsiooni fraaside kaardistamist matemaatiliste sõnade probleemides ja nende matemaatiliste avaldiste vahel treeninguandmetest. Iga võrrandimalli jaoks koostame automaatselt rikkaliku malli visandi, koondades sama malliga erinevate probleemide teavet. Meie lähenemisviisi rakendatakse kaheastmelises süsteemis. Kõigepealt toob see välja mõned asjakohased võrrandisüsteemi mallid ja joondab arvud matemaatiliste sõnade probleemides nende mallidega kandidaadi võrrandite genereerimiseks. Seejärel teeb ta peeneteraline järeldus, et saada lõplik vastus. Eksperimentide tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod saavutab 28,4% täpsuse lineaarsel Dolphin18K võrdlusalusel, mis on 10% (54% suhteliselt) kõrgem kui varasemad kaasaegsed süsteemid, saavutades samas 12% (59% suhteliselt) täpsuse TS6 võrdlusalusel.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje novou metodu založenou na šablonách pro řešení matematických slovních problémů. Tato metoda se naučí mapování mezi matematickými konceptními frázemi v matematických slovních úlohách a jejich matematickými výrazy z tréninkových dat. Pro každou šablonu rovnice automaticky sestavíme bohatý náčrt šablony agregováním informací z různých problémů se stejnou šablonou. Náš přístup je realizován ve dvoustupňovém systému. Nejprve získá několik relevantních šablon systému rovnic a zarovná čísla v matematických slovních úlohách s těmito šablonami pro generování kandidátů rovnic. Následně provede jemný závěr k získání konečné odpovědi. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že naše metoda dosahuje přesnosti 28,4% na lineárním Dolphin18K benchmarku, která je 10% (54% relativní) vyšší než předchozí moderní systémy, přičemž dosahuje zvýšení přesnosti o 12% (59% relativní) na benchmarkové podmnožině TS6.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään uusi mallipohjainen menetelmä matematiikan sanaongelmien ratkaisemiseksi. Tämä menetelmä oppii matemaattisten sanaongelmien matemaattisten käsitteellisten lauseiden ja niiden matemaattisten lausekkeiden välisen kartoituksen harjoitustiedoista. Jokaiselle yhtälömallille rakennamme automaattisesti rikkaan mallin luonnoksen kokoamalla tietoja eri ongelmista samalla mallilla. Lähestymistapamme toteutetaan kaksivaiheisessa järjestelmässä. Se hakee ensin muutamia olennaisia yhtälöjärjestelmän malleja ja tasaa matemaattisten sanaongelmien numerot niihin malleihin ehdokasyhtälön tuottamista varten. Sitten se tekee hienojakoisen johtopäätöksen saadakseen lopullisen vastauksen. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme saavuttaa 28,4% tarkkuuden lineaarisessa Dolphin18K-vertailussa, joka on 10% (54% suhteellinen) korkeampi kuin aikaisemmat huipputekniset järjestelmät ja saavuttaa 12% (59% suhteellinen) tarkkuuden nousun TS6-vertailuryhmässä.', 'jv': 'Binding and finishing Digawe akhir yèn digawe arep nggambar cara-cara nggambar barang matamatik kuwi mungkun kesempresan karo ingkang mataten. Sampeyan template Ndheke awak dhéwé ngerasakno ning sistem sing durus-iki. Laptop" and "Desktop Amarok ugo ora nganggo perbudhakan nganggo coro-perbudhakan Ngucap perintah sing paling nggambar uwong kelompok nggambar dhéwé ngerasakno ning awak dhéwé sing dirangkamunyatan pukka sing 18.4%, ditambah sabêr kelompok dolan18K, sing uwong 10% (49% nyilah) sing wis luwih dumadhakan sistem sing susahé disranrangké sampeyan karo hal dadi 12% (49% nyilah) ing nggawe bench-arah sing berarti', 'ha': "@ info Wannan shiryarwa yana karanta karogi tsakanin fassarar matsayin da ke cikin masu matsayin matsayin da akwatin matsayi daga dane na tsari. @ info: tooltip An cika hanyarmu a cikin wani matsayi biyu. Tana fara ta mottar da wasu namuna masu da inganci na daidaita cikin matsayin matsayi zuwa wannan namani wa kizagon equation. Sa'an nan na sami kyakkyawan zargi dõmin ya sãmi jibar ƙarshen. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa metodenmu yana sãmu taƙaita 28.4% a kan bangon Dolfhin18K, wanda ke da 10% (54% ma'abũcin) da ya fi girma daga halin-na-sanar da ya zaman idan yana sami ƙari rasmi na 12% (59% ma'abũcin) a kan ƙanshin TS6.", 'he': 'This paper presents a novel template-based method to solve math word problems.  השיטה הזאת לומדת את המפיות בין משפטי מושג מתמטיקה בבעיות מילים מתמטיקה לבעיות המתמטיקה שלהם מידע אימון. עבור כל מודל משוואה, אנו בונים באופן אוטומטי סקיצ מודל עשיר על ידי לאסוף מידע משני בעיות עם אותו מודל. הגישה שלנו מופעלת במערכת בשתי שלבים. הוא קודם משיג כמה דוגמאות מערכת משוואות רלוונטיות ומייצב מספרים בבעיות מילים מתמטיקות למדוגמאות אלה לדור משוואות מועמדים. ואז הוא עושה מסקנה מעולה כדי להשיג את התשובה הסופית. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שהשיטה שלנו משיגה מדויקת של 28.4% על נקודת המבט של דולפין 18K לינרית, שהיא 10% (54% יחסית) גבוהה יותר ממערכות המצב המיוחד הקודמות בזמן השיגה הגיעה מדויקת של 12% (59% יחסית) על נקודת המבט של TS6.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena nova metoda na osnovi predlog za reševanje problemov matematičnih besed. Ta metoda uči preslikave med matematičnimi konceptnimi frazami v težavah z matematičnimi besedami in njihovimi matematičnimi izrazi iz podatkov o usposabljanju. Za vsako predlogo enačbe samodejno sestavimo bogato skico predloge z združevanjem informacij iz različnih težav z isto predlogo. Naš pristop se izvaja v dvostopenjskem sistemu. Najprej pridobi nekaj ustreznih predlog sistema enačb in poravna števila v težavah z matematičnimi besedami s temi predlogami za ustvarjanje kandidatnih enačb. Nato naredi drobnozrnat sklep, da dobi končni odgovor. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da naša metoda doseže 28,4% natančnost linearnega merila Dolphin18K, kar je 10% (54% relativno) višja od prejšnjih najsodobnejših sistemov, pri čemer doseže 12% (59% relativno) povečanje natančnosti referenčnega podnabora TS6.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྩིས་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་གྲངས་རིག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་མཐུན་པ། འདི་གྲངས་རིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་རིག་གི་ཚིག དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་ལམ་ལུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲུབ་འདུག། དང་པོར་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན་ཆེས་ཉིད་གྱི་སྙན་རིས་མ་ལག་གི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཉིད་ཅིག་དང་ཨང་རིས་ཡིག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གསལ་ཚིག དེ་ནས་ཆེས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་ལན་པར་ལེན་པའི་རྐྱེན་བ་ཞིག་རེད། Experiment results show that our method achieves an accuracy of 28.4% on the linear Dolphin18K benchmark, which is 10% (54% relative) preceding state-of-the-art systems while achieving the accuracy of 12% (59% relative) benchmark subset.'}
{'en': 'Structural Embedding of Syntactic Trees for Machine Comprehension', 'ar': 'التضمين الهيكلي للأشجار النحوية لفهم الآلة', 'pt': 'Incorporação Estrutural de Árvores Sintáticas para Compreensão da Máquina', 'fr': "Intégration structurelle d'arbres syntaxiques pour la compréhension des machines", 'es': 'Incorporación estructural de árboles sintácticos para la comprensión de las máquinas', 'ja': '機械理解のための構文木の構造的埋め込み', 'hi': 'मशीन समझ के लिए वाक्यात्मक पेड़ों की संरचनात्मक एम्बेडिंग', 'zh': '机器解句法树结构嵌', 'ru': 'Структурное встраивание синтаксических деревьев для машинного понимания', 'ga': 'Leabú Struchtúrtha Crainn Syntactic le haghaidh Tuisceana Meaisín', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δομική ενσωμάτωση συντακτικών δέντρων για την κατανόηση μηχανών', 'hu': 'Szintaktikus fák szerkezeti beágyazása a gépi megértéshez', 'it': 'Embedding strutturale di alberi sintattici per la comprensione della macchina', 'lt': 'Struktūrinis sintaktinių medžių įterpimas mašinoms suprasti', 'kk': 'Машина құрылғысының синтактикалық бұтақтарын ендіру', 'ms': 'Name', 'mk': 'Структурно вградување на синтактички дрвја за машинско разбирање', 'ml': 'യന്ത്രം പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സിന്\u200dടാക്ടിക്കിക് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളുടെ സ്ക്രോക്ട്രൂറല്\u200d എം', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni Strutturali tas-Siġar Sintattiku għall-Komprensjoni tal-Magni', 'mn': 'Машин давхарлалтын Синтактик модын бүтэц', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Strukturalno uključenje sintaktičkih drveća za kompresiju mašine', 'pl': 'Strukturalne osadzenie drzew syntaktycznych dla zrozumienia maszyn', 'ro': 'Încorporarea structurală a copacilor sintactici pentru înțelegerea mașinilor', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Deganaanshaha dhismaha ee geedaha Syntactic ee Masiinka Completion', 'sv': 'Strukturell inbyggnad av syntaktiska träd för maskinförståelse', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தை முடிப்பதற்கான ஒத்திசைவு மரங்களின் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khung kết cấu của cây Tâm pháp cho ảnh ghép máy', 'bg': 'Структурно вграждане на синтактични дървета за разбиране на машината', 'nl': 'Structurele inbedden van syntactische bomen voor het begrijpen van machines', 'da': 'Strukturel indlejring af syntaktiske træer til maskinforståelse', 'hr': 'Strukturalno uključenje sintaktičkih drveća za kompresiju stroja', 'id': 'Pemasangan Struktur dari Pohon Sintaktik untuk Pemahaman Mesin', 'de': 'Strukturelle Einbettung von syntaktischen Bäumen für Maschinenverständnis', 'tr': 'Maşynyň Çykyşyrymy üçin Sintaktik agaçlaryň düzümlenmesi', 'sw': 'Structural Embedding of Syntactic Trees for Machine Comprehension', 'ko': '기계 이해 중 문법 트리의 구조 삽입', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Structural Embedding of Syntactic Trees for Machine Comprehension', 'hy': 'Սինտակտիկ ծառերի կառուցվածքային ներգրավումը մեքենայի ընկալումը', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi strukturor i pemëve sintaktike për kompresimin e makinës', 'az': 'Makinelə Kompərəstləndirmək üçün Sintaktik Ağacların strukturlu İçeri', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Strukturalno uključenje sintaktičkih drveća za kompresiju stroja', 'ca': "Incorporació estructural d'arbres sintàctics per a la comprensió de la màquina", 'cs': 'Strukturální vložení syntaktických stromů pro porozumění strojů', 'et': 'Süntaktiliste puude struktuuriline paigaldamine masinate mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'Syntaktisten puiden rakenteellinen upotus koneiden ymmärtämistä varten', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Strukturna vgradnja sintaktičnih dreves za razumevanje strojev', 'he': 'קידום מבנה של עצים סינטקטיים למבנה של מכונות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Structureural Embedding of Syntactic Trees for Machine Comprehension'}
{'en': 'Deep neural networks for machine comprehension typically utilizes only word or character embeddings without explicitly taking advantage of structured linguistic information such as constituency trees and dependency trees. In this paper, we propose structural embedding of syntactic trees (SEST), an algorithm framework to utilize structured information and encode them into vector representations that can boost the performance of algorithms for the machine comprehension. We evaluate our approach using a state-of-the-art neural attention model on the SQuAD dataset. Experimental results demonstrate that our model can accurately identify the syntactic boundaries of the sentences and extract answers that are syntactically coherent over the baseline methods.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تستخدم الشبكات العصبية العميقة لفهم الآلة عمليات تزوير الكلمات أو الشخصيات فقط دون الاستفادة بشكل صريح من المعلومات اللغوية المنظمة مثل أشجار الدوائر الانتخابية وأشجار التبعية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح التضمين الهيكلي للأشجار النحوية (SEST) ، وهو إطار عمل خوارزمية لاستخدام المعلومات المنظمة وترميزها في تمثيلات متجهية يمكن أن تعزز أداء الخوارزميات لفهم الآلة. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا باستخدام أحدث نموذج للانتباه العصبي في مجموعة بيانات SQuAD. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يمكنه تحديد الحدود النحوية للجمل بدقة واستخراج الإجابات المتماسكة نحويًا على طرق خط الأساس.', 'pt': 'As redes neurais profundas para compreensão de máquina normalmente utilizam apenas incorporações de palavras ou caracteres sem tirar vantagem explicitamente de informações linguísticas estruturadas, como árvores de constituintes e árvores de dependência. Neste artigo, propomos a incorporação estrutural de árvores sintáticas (SEST), um framework de algoritmos para utilizar informações estruturadas e codificá-las em representações vetoriais que podem aumentar o desempenho de algoritmos para a compreensão da máquina. Avaliamos nossa abordagem usando um modelo de atenção neural de última geração no conjunto de dados SQuAD. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso modelo pode identificar com precisão os limites sintáticos das sentenças e extrair respostas sintaticamente coerentes sobre os métodos de linha de base.', 'es': 'Las redes neuronales profundas para la comprensión automática generalmente utilizan solo incrustaciones de palabras o caracteres sin aprovechar explícitamente la información lingüística estructurada, como los árboles de distritos electorales y los árboles de dependencias. En este artículo, proponemos la incrustación estructural de árboles sintácticos (SEST), un marco de algoritmos para utilizar información estructurada y codificarla en representaciones vectoriales que pueden aumentar el rendimiento de los algoritmos para la comprensión de la máquina. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque utilizando un modelo de atención neuronal de última generación en el conjunto de datos sQuad. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro modelo puede identificar con precisión los límites sintácticos de las oraciones y extraer respuestas que son sintácticamente coherentes sobre los métodos de referencia.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones profonds pour la compréhension automatique n'utilisent généralement que l'intégration de mots ou de caractères sans tirer parti explicitement des informations linguistiques structurées telles que les arbres de constituants et les arbres de dépendance. Dans cet article, nous proposons l'intégration structurelle d'arbres syntaxiques (SEST), un cadre d'algorithmes permettant d'utiliser des informations structurées et de les coder dans des représentations vectorielles qui peuvent améliorer les performances des algorithmes pour la compréhension des machines. Nous évaluons notre approche à l'aide d'un modèle de pointe de l'attention neuronale sur le jeu de données Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre modèle peut identifier avec précision les limites syntaxiques des phrases et extraire des réponses syntaxiquement cohérentes par rapport aux méthodes de base.", 'ja': '機械理解のための深いニューラルネットワークは、典型的には、選挙区ツリーや依存関係ツリーなどの構造化された言語情報を明示的に利用することなく、単語または文字の埋め込みのみを利用する。本稿では、構造化された情報を利用し、機械理解のためのアルゴリズムのパフォーマンスを向上させることができるベクトル表現に符号化するためのアルゴリズムフレームワークである構文木（ SEST ）の構造的埋め込みを提案する。私たちは、SQuADデータセット上の最先端のニューラルアテンションモデルを使用してアプローチを評価します。実験結果は、私たちのモデルが文の構文境界を正確に識別し、ベースライン法にわたって構文的に一貫性のある回答を抽出できることを示しています。', 'zh': '凡机器解之深神经网络常以单词或字符嵌之,而不显式用结构化言语信息,如选区树与倚树。 本文中,发句法树(SEST)结构嵌之,此算法框架,可因结构化信而示其编码为矢量,以崇机器解算法之性。 吾于SQuAD数集上用先进之神经,以料吾法。 实验结果表明,准识句句法界,并取基线法语法连贯答案。', 'hi': 'मशीन की समझ के लिए गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आमतौर पर केवल शब्द या चरित्र एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं, स्पष्ट रूप से निर्वाचन क्षेत्र के पेड़ों और निर्भरता के पेड़ों जैसे संरचित भाषाई जानकारी का लाभ उठाए बिना। इस पेपर में, हम वाक्यात्मक पेड़ों (एसईएसटी) के संरचनात्मक एम्बेडिंग का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो संरचित जानकारी का उपयोग करने के लिए एक एल्गोरिथ्म फ्रेमवर्क है और उन्हें वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोड करता है जो मशीन की समझ के लिए एल्गोरिदम के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा दे सकता है। हम SQuAD डेटासेट पर एक अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका ध्यान मॉडल का उपयोग करके अपने दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल वाक्यों की वाक्यात्मक सीमाओं की सटीक पहचान कर सकता है और उन उत्तरों को निकाल सकता है जो बेसलाइन विधियों पर वाक्यात्मक रूप से सुसंगत हैं।', 'ru': 'Глубокие нейронные сети для машинного понимания обычно используют только вложения слов или символов без явного использования структурированной лингвистической информации, такой как деревья избирательных округов и деревья зависимостей. В этой статье мы предлагаем структурное встраивание синтаксических деревьев (SEST), фреймворк алгоритма для использования структурированной информации и кодирования их в векторные представления, которые могут повысить производительность алгоритмов для понимания машины. Мы оцениваем наш подход, используя современную модель нейронного внимания на датасете SQuAD. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель может точно идентифицировать синтаксические границы предложений и извлекать ответы, которые синтаксически когерентны над базовыми методами.', 'ga': 'Is iondúil go n-úsáideann líonraí néaracha doimhne le haghaidh meaisíntuisceana amháin leabú focal nó carachtar gan leas a bhaint go sainráite as faisnéis struchtúrtha teanga ar nós crainn dáilcheantair agus crainn spleáchais. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid leabú struchtúrach crann comhréire (SEST), creat algartam chun úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis struchtúrtha agus iad a ionchódú i léiriúcháin veicteora ar féidir leo feidhmíocht na n-algartam don tuiscint meaisín a threisiú. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár gcur chuige agus úsáid á baint againn as samhail aire néarúil den scoth ar thacar sonraí SQuAD. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir lenár múnla teorainneacha comhréire na n-abairtí a aithint go cruinn agus freagraí a bhaint as atá comhleanúnach go comhleanúnach thar na modhanna bonnlíne.', 'ka': 'ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელები მაქსინის შესაძლებლობისთვის ტიპულად გამოიყენება მხოლოდ სიტყვები ან სიტყვების შესაძლებლობისთვის სტრუქტურებული ლუნგურისტიკური ინფორმაციის გამოყენ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ გვეძლოთ სინტრაქტიკური ხეების სტრუქტურაცია (SEST) სტრუქტურაციული ინფორმაციის გამოყენება ალგორიტიმური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც მაქსინის გაგრძნობისთვის ალგორიტიმს გამოყენება და გა ჩვენ გავამუშავებთ ჩვენი მიღება, რომელიც SQuAD მონაცემების სახელის ნეიროლური მოდულის გამოყენებით. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია წარმოდგენოთ სინტაქტიური წარმოდგენების და ექსტრაქტიური პასუხი, რომლებიც სინტაქტიურად კონექ', 'hu': 'A gépi megértéshez szükséges mély neurális hálózatok általában csak szó- vagy karakterek beágyazását használják anélkül, hogy kifejezetten kihasználnák a strukturált nyelvi információkat, mint például a választókerületi fák és a függőségi fák. Jelen tanulmányban a szintaktikus fák (SEST) strukturális beágyazását javasoljuk, amely egy algoritmus keretrendszert alkalmaz strukturált információk felhasználására és vektorreprezentációkba való kódolására, amely növelheti az algoritmusok teljesítményét a gép megértéséhez. Megközelítésünket a legkorszerűbb neurális figyelemmodellek segítségével értékeljük az SQUAD adatkészleten. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk pontosan azonosítani tudja a mondatok szintaktikai határait és kivonni a válaszokat, amelyek szintaktikailag koherensek az alapmódszerekhez képest.', 'el': 'Τα βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα για μηχανική κατανόηση συνήθως χρησιμοποιούν μόνο ενσωμάτωση λέξεων ή χαρακτήρων χωρίς να εκμεταλλεύονται ρητά δομημένες γλωσσικές πληροφορίες, όπως δέντρα εκλογικών περιφερειών και δέντρα εξάρτησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε τη δομική ενσωμάτωση συντακτικών δέντρων (ένα πλαίσιο αλγόριθμου για τη χρήση δομημένων πληροφοριών και την κωδικοποίησή τους σε διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις που μπορούν να ενισχύσουν την απόδοση αλγορίθμων για την κατανόηση της μηχανής. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύγχρονο μοντέλο νευρικής προσοχής στο σύνολο δεδομένων SQuAD. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να προσδιορίσει με ακρίβεια τα συντακτικά όρια των προτάσεων και να εξάγει απαντήσεις που είναι συντακτικά συνεκτικές σε σχέση με τις μεθόδους βάσης.', 'it': "Le reti neurali profonde per la comprensione automatica utilizzano tipicamente solo incorporazioni di parole o caratteri senza sfruttare esplicitamente informazioni linguistiche strutturate come alberi di circoscrizione e alberi di dipendenza. In questo articolo, proponiamo l'embedding strutturale di alberi sintattici (SEST), un framework algoritmico per utilizzare informazioni strutturate e codificarle in rappresentazioni vettoriali che possono aumentare le prestazioni degli algoritmi per la comprensione della macchina. Valutiamo il nostro approccio utilizzando un modello di attenzione neurale all'avanguardia sul set di dati SQUAD. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello può identificare con precisione i confini sintattici delle frasi ed estrarre risposte sintatticamente coerenti rispetto ai metodi di base.", 'lt': 'Grįžtamieji nerviniai tinklai mašinų supratimui paprastai naudoja tik žodžių ar požymių įdėjimus aiškiai nepasinaudojant struktūrizuota kalbine informacija, pavyzdžiui, rinkinių medžiai ir priklausomybės medžiai. Šiame dokumente siūlome struktūrinį sintaksinių medžių įterpimą (SEST), algoritmo sistemą, skirtą naudoti struktūrinę informaciją ir koduoti jas į vektorius, kurie gali padidinti algoritmų veikimą mašinos supratimui. Vertiname savo požiūrį naudojant naujausią SQuAD duomenų rinkinio neurologinio dėmesio model į. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali tiksliai nustatyti sintaktines sakinių ribas ir gauti atsakymus, kurie yra sintaktiškai nuoseklūs palyginti su pradiniais metodais.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің түсініктері үшін түсінікті невралдық желілер әдетте тек сөз не таңбалар ендіру үшін құрылған лингвистикалық мәліметтерді, мысалы, тәуелсіздік ағаштар мен ағаштардың құрылым Бұл қағазда синтактикалық ағаштарды (SEST) құрылған мәліметті қолданатын алгоритм қоршауын және оларды машинаның түсініктемесінің алгоритмдерінің істеуін көмектесетін вектор түсініктеріне кодтамыз. Біз SQuAD деректер жинағында өзіміздің тәсілімізді күй- жайындағы невралдық түсіндіру үлгісін қолданып бағалаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің үлгіміз сөйлемелердің синтактикалық шектерін дұрыс анықтай алады және негізгі жолдар арқылы синтактикалық жауаптарды тазалады.', 'ms': 'Rangkaian saraf mendalam untuk pemahaman mesin biasanya menggunakan hanya penyampaian kata atau aksara tanpa secara eksplicit mengambil keuntungan dari maklumat bahasa struktur seperti pokok-pokok kawasan dan pokok dependensi. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan penyambungan struktur pokok sintaktik (SEST), kerangka algoritma untuk menggunakan maklumat struktur dan mengekodkannya ke dalam perwakilan vektor yang boleh meningkatkan prestasi algoritma untuk pemahaman mesin. We evaluate our approach using a state-of-the-art neural attention model on the SQuAD dataset.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita boleh mengenalpasti tepat sempadan sintaktik kalimat dan mengekstrak jawapan yang secara sintaktik konsisten atas kaedah asas.', 'mk': 'Длабоките нервни мрежи за машинско разбирање обично користат само зборови или карактеристички вложувања без експлицитно искористување на структурирани јазични информации како што се дрвјата на изборните области и дрвјата на зависноста. In this paper, we propose structural embedding of syntactic trees (SEST), an algorithm framework to utilize structured information and encode them into vector representations that can boost the performance of algorithms for the machine comprehension.  Го проценуваме нашиот пристап користејќи најнов модел на нервно внимание на SQuAD податоците. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел може точно да ги идентификува синтактичките граници на речениците и да ги извади одговорите кои се синтактички кохерентни во однос на основните методи.', 'ml': 'യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിപാടിയ്ക്കുള്ള ആഴത്തിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്കോ അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ അകത്തേക്ക് മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിന്\u200dറാക്റ്റിക്ക് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളുടെ (സെസ്റ്റി) പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതി സ്കുവാഡ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക് അതിരുകളെ ശരിയായി തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നതും,', 'mn': 'Машины ойлголтын гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд зөвхөн үг эсвэл харин дүрсийг тодорхой ашиглаж, бүтээгдэхүүний мод болон хамааралтай мод зөвхөн бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээллийг ашиглахгүй ашигладаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид синтактик мод (SEST), бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээллийг ашиглаж, машины ойлголтын алгоритмыг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой вектор илэрхийллийг шинэчлэх боломжтой алгоритмыг санал болгодог. Бид SQuAD өгөгдлийн сангийн төвшин дээр урлагийн мэдрэлийн төвшин анхаарлын загварыг ашиглан бидний арга загварыг үнэлдэг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь өгүүлбэрийн синтактик хил хязгаарыг тодорхойлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүний суурь шулууны аргаар синтактик холбоотой хариулт гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Djupne neuralnettverk for maskineundersøking brukar vanlegvis berre ord eller teiknbrukingar utan ekspliskt bruk av strukturerte lingviske informasjon, slik som konstitusjonstrær og avhengighetstrær. I denne papiret foreslår vi strukturelle innbygging av syntaktiske tre (SEST), ein algoritmisk rammeverk for å bruka strukturerte informasjon og koda dei inn i vektorrepresentasjonar som kan auka utviklinga av algoritmer for maskinen. Vi evaluerer tilnærminga vårt ved å bruka ein modell for kunsttilstanden til neuraloppmerksomhet på SQuAD-datasettet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vårt kan nøyaktig identifisera syntaktiske grensene for setningane og ekstrahera svar som er syntaksisk samanlig over baseline-metodane.', 'mt': 'In-netwerks newrali profondi għall-komprensjoni tal-magna tipikament jużaw biss l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem jew tal-karattru mingħajr ma jieħdu vantaġġ espliċitu minn informazzjoni lingwistika strutturata bħal siġar tal-kostitwenza u siġar tad-dipendenza. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu l-inkorporazzjoni strutturali tas-siġar sintattiku (SEST), qafas ta’ algoritmu biex tiġi utilizzata l-informazzjoni strutturata u jiġu kkodifikati f’rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi li jistgħu jsaħħu l-prestazzjoni tal-algoritmi għall-komprensjoni tal-magna. Aħna nivvalutaw l-approċċ tagħna bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ attenzjoni newrali avvanzat fuq is-sett tad-dejta SQuAD. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jidentifika b’mod preċiż il-limiti sinrattiċi tas-sentenzi u jastrezzjona tweġibiet li huma sinrattikament koerenti fuq il-metodi ta’ referenza.', 'pl': 'Głębokie sieci neuronowe do rozumienia maszynowego zazwyczaj wykorzystują tylko osadzenia słów lub znaków bez wyraźnego wykorzystania strukturalnych informacji językowych, takich jak drzewa wyborcze i drzewa zależności. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy strukturalne osadzenie drzew składniowych (SEST), framework algorytmu do wykorzystania informacji ustrukturyzowanych i kodowania ich w reprezentacje wektorowe, które mogą zwiększyć wydajność algorytmów do zrozumienia maszyny. Nasze podejście oceniamy za pomocą najnowocześniejszego modelu uwagi neuronowej na zbiorze danych SQuAD. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model potrafi dokładnie zidentyfikować składniowe granice zdań i wyodrębnić odpowiedzi, które są spójne składniowo w stosunku do metod bazowych.', 'si': 'යන්ත්\u200dරය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් විතරයි වචන හා අක්ෂරය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විතරයි, සං මේ පැත්තේ, අපි සංවිධාන වර්ගයේ සංවිධානය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා (SEST), සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය තොරතුරු භාවිත කරන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් සංවිධා අපි SQuAD දත්ත සෙට් එකේ ස්ථානයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න අපේ අවධානය විශ්වාස කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් හරියටම පුළුවන් වාක්ෂාවේ සංවිධාන සීමාව සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්', 'ro': 'Rețelele neuronale profunde pentru înțelegerea mașinii utilizează de obicei numai încorporări de cuvinte sau caractere fără a profita în mod explicit de informații lingvistice structurate, cum ar fi arborii de circumscripție și arborii de dependență. În această lucrare, propunem încorporarea structurală a arborilor sintactici (SEST), un cadru algoritm pentru utilizarea informațiilor structurate și codificarea lor în reprezentări vectoriale care pot spori performanța algoritmilor pentru înțelegerea mașinii. Evaluăm abordarea noastră folosind un model de atenție neurală de ultimă generație pe setul de date SQUAD. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că modelul nostru poate identifica cu exactitate limitele sintactice ale propozițiilor și extrage răspunsuri care sunt sintactic coerente peste metodele de bază.', 'so': 'Shabakada neurada hoose ee machine comprool sida caadiga ah wuxuu u isticmaalaa hadal ama xaraf oo keliya oo aan bayaan u isticmaaleyn macluumaadka afka la dhisay, tusaale ahaan geedaha bulshada ah iyo geedaha ku xiran. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa dhismo ku kooban dhirta syntactic (SEST), kaas oo ah koob algorithm si loo isticmaalo macluumaad la dhisay oo u kooban karo kooxo vector ah oo ku kordhin karo tababarka algorithm ee maskinenka hoos-dhigidda. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababka aan ku isticmaalno sameynta qaababka caqabada ee xaaladda-horaadka ee caqliga ah ee SQuAD. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in modellkayagu uu si saxda ah u aqoonsan karo xuduudaha imtixaanka islamarkaasna uu ka soo bixi karo jawaabaha si la isku xiriira qaababka aasaasiga ah.', 'sr': 'Duboke neuralne mreže za mašinsko razumijevanje obično koriste samo reči ili uloge karaktera bez objašnjenja iskorištavanja strukturiranih lingvističkih informacija kao što su drveća konstitucija i drveća zavisnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo strukturno uključenje sintaktičkih drveća (SEST), algoritmskog okvira za korištenje strukturiranih informacija i kodiranje ih u vektorske predstave koje mogu povećati funkciju algoritma za razumijevanje mašine. Procjenjujemo naš pristup koristeći model neuralne pažnje u stanju SQuAD podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može precizno identifikovati sintaktične granice rečenica i izvući odgovore koje su sintaktički saskašne prema početnim metodama.', 'sv': 'Djupa neurala nätverk för maskinförståelse använder vanligtvis endast ord- eller teckenbäddningar utan att uttryckligen utnyttja strukturerad språklig information som valkretsträd och beroendeträd. I denna uppsats föreslår vi strukturell inbäddning av syntaktiska träd (SEST), ett algoritmrammverk för att använda strukturerad information och koda dem till vektorrepresentationer som kan öka prestandan hos algoritmer för maskinförståelse. Vi utvärderar vårt tillvägagångssätt med hjälp av en state-of-the-art neural uppmärksamhet modell på SQUAD datauppsättningen. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell exakt kan identifiera de syntaktiska gränserna för meningarna och extrahera svar som är syntaktiskt sammanhängande över baslinjemetoderna.', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் சூழ்நிலைக்கான ஆழமான புதிரிய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் வழங்கப்படுகிறது பொருள் அல்லது எழுத்து உள்ளிடப்பட்டிருக்கும் உள்ளடக்கங்களை வெளிப்பட இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு ஒத்திசைவு மரங்களின் கட்டுப்பாட்டு உள்ளடக்கத்தை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம், அமைப்பு தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி நெறிய குறியீட்டில் குறியீ நாம் எஸ்குவாட் தரவுத்தளத்தில் ஒரு நிலையில் உள்ள புதிய கவனத்தின் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தி எங்கள் அணுக்கத்தை மதிப்பி முயற்சி முடிவுகள் நம் மாதிரி வாக்கியங்களின் எல்லைகளை சரியாக கண்டறிய முடியும் மற்றும் அடிப்படைக்கோட்டு முறைகளில் ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்டுள்', 'ur': 'ماشین کی سمجھ کے لئے عمیق نیورال نیورل نیٹورک صرف لفظ یا شخصیت کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے بغیر صرف ساختہ زبانی معلومات کے فائدہ اٹھانے کے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم سینٹاکتیک درختوں (SEST) کے ساختاری پیدا کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک الگوریتم فرم کے لئے ساختاری معلومات کا استعمال کرنا اور ان کو ویکتور معلومات میں Encode کر سکتے ہیں جو ماشین کی سمجھ کے لئے الگوریتم کا فعالیت اضافہ کرسکتے ہیں۔ ہم اپنے طریقے کو SQuAD ڈیٹ سٹ پر ایک ایست کی نظر نظر اندازے کے مطابق ارتفاع کرتے ہیں. تجربے کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل کلمات کے سینٹکتیک حدود کو دقیق پہچان سکتی ہے اور جواب نکالتے ہیں جو بنیاس لین طریقے پر سینٹکتیک طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'vi': 'Các mạng lưới thần kinh thâm sâu cho việc thấu hiểu máy tính thường chỉ sử dụng các từ hay ký tự mà không sử dụng trực tiếp các thông tin ngôn ngữ có cấu trúc như cây bầu cử và cây phụ thuộc. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị ghép cấu trúc của cây đồng pháp (SIST), một bộ thuật to án để sử dụng thông tin cơ cấu trúc và mã hóa chúng thành các biểu tượng vector để tăng hiệu suất các thuật toán cho sự thấu hiểu cỗ máy. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi bằng một mô hình thần kinh cao nhất trên bộ dữ liệu SQurAD. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta có thể xác định chính xác ranh giới cấu trúc của các câu và tìm ra các câu trả lời có liên quan đến các phương pháp cơ bản.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz syntactik daraxtlarini (SEST) qo'llaniladik, tashkilotli maʼlumot yordamida ishlatish va ularni vektori representiyatlariga kodlash mumkin, mashinaning kompyuterning algoritlarini bajarish mumkin. Biz SQuAD maʼlumotlar sahifadagi davlat neyron paydo modeli bilan qiymatmiz. Tajriba natijalari esa modelmiz so'zlarning sintaktik chegaralarini aniqlash mumkin va bir nechta birlashtirilgan javoblarni olib tashlash mumkin.", 'bg': 'Дълбоките невронни мрежи за машинно разбиране обикновено използват само вграждания на думи или знаци, без изрично да се възползват от структурирана езикова информация като избирателни дървета и дървета за зависимост. В настоящата статия предлагаме структурно вграждане на синтактични дървета (алгоритъмна рамка за използване на структурирана информация и кодиране в векторни представяния, които могат да повишат производителността на алгоритмите за машинното разбиране. Ние оценяваме нашия подход, използвайки най-модерен модел на невронно внимание върху набора от данни SQuAD. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел може точно да идентифицира синтактичните граници на изреченията и да извлече отговори, които са синтактично съгласувани спрямо базовите методи.', 'nl': 'Diepe neurale netwerken voor machinebegrip gebruiken meestal alleen woord- of tekeninsluitingen zonder expliciet gebruik te maken van gestructureerde linguïstische informatie zoals kiesdistrictbomen en afhankelijkheidsbomen. In dit artikel stellen we structurele inbedding van syntactische bomen (SEST) voor, een algoritme framework om gestructureerde informatie te gebruiken en te coderen in vectorrepresentaties die de prestaties van algoritmen voor het machinebegrip kunnen verbeteren. We evalueren onze aanpak met behulp van een state-of-the-art neural attention model op de SQuAD dataset. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model de syntactische grenzen van de zinnen nauwkeurig kan identificeren en antwoorden kan extraheren die syntactisch coherent zijn over de baseline methoden.', 'da': 'Dybe neurale netværk til maskinforståelse bruger typisk kun ord eller tegn indlejringer uden eksplicit at drage fordel af strukturerede sproglige oplysninger såsom valgkredsstræer og afhængighedstræer. I denne artikel foreslår vi strukturel indlejring af syntaktiske træer (SEST), en algoritme ramme til at udnytte struktureret information og kode dem i vektorrepræsentationer, der kan øge ydeevnen af algoritmer til maskinforståelse. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang ved hjælp af en state-of-the-art neural opmærksomhedsmodel på SQUAD datasættet. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model nøjagtigt kan identificere de syntaktiske grænser for sætningerne og udtrække svar, der er syntaktisk sammenhængende over basismetoderne.', 'hr': 'Duboke neuronske mreže za razumijevanje strojeva obično koriste samo riječi ili uloge karaktera bez objašnjenja iskorištavanja strukturiranih jezičkih informacija poput drveća konstitucija i drveća zavisnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo strukturno uključenje sintaktičkih drveća (SEST), algoritmskog okvira za upotrebu strukturiranih informacija i kodiranje ih u predstavljanja vektora koji mogu povećati učinkovitost algoritma za razumijevanje strojeva. Procjenjujemo naš pristup koristeći model neuralne pažnje na SQuAD podacima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može precizno identificirati sintaktične granice rečenica i izvući odgovore koje su sintaktički saskašne prema početnim metodama.', 'ko': '기계 이해에 사용되는 깊이 신경 네트워크는 일반적으로 단어나 문자만 사용하고 구조화된 언어 정보, 예를 들어 선택 트리와 의존 트리를 명확하게 이용하지 않는다.본고에서 우리는 구조화된 정보를 활용하고 이를 벡터 표시로 인코딩하는 알고리즘 프레임워크인 구법 트리의 구조삽입(SEST)을 제시했는데 이것은 기계가 알고리즘을 이해하는 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.우리는 팀 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 신경 주의 모델을 사용하여 우리의 방법을 평가한다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 문장의 문법 경계를 정확하게 식별하고 기선 방법과 문법적으로 일치하는 답안을 추출할 수 있다.', 'de': 'Deep neuronale Netze für maschinelles Verstehen verwenden typischerweise nur Wort- oder Zeicheneinbettungen, ohne explizit strukturierte linguistische Informationen wie Wahlkreisbäume und Abhängigkeitsbäume zu nutzen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir die strukturelle Einbettung syntaktischer Bäume (SEST) vor, ein Algorithmus-Framework, um strukturierte Informationen zu nutzen und sie in Vektorrepräsentationen zu kodieren, die die Leistung von Algorithmen für das maschinelle Verständnis steigern können. Wir evaluieren unseren Ansatz anhand eines hochmodernen neuronalen Aufmerksamkeitsmodells auf dem SQuAD-Datensatz. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell die syntaktischen Grenzen der Sätze genau identifizieren und Antworten extrahieren kann, die syntaktisch kohärent über die Basismethoden sind.', 'id': 'Jaringan saraf dalam untuk pemahaman mesin biasanya menggunakan hanya kata atau karakter embedding tanpa secara eksplicit mengambil keuntungan dari informasi bahasa strukturasi seperti pohon konstitusi dan pohon dependensi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pembangunan struktur dari pohon sintaksi (SEST), sebuah rangkaian algoritma untuk menggunakan informasi struktur dan mengkode mereka ke represisi vektor yang dapat meningkatkan prestasi algoritma untuk pemahaman mesin. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan kami menggunakan model perhatian saraf terbaik di dataset SQuAD. Experimental results demonstrate that our model can accurately identify the syntactic boundaries of the sentences and extract answers that are syntactically coherent over the baseline methods.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق برای فهمیدن ماشین معمولاً تنها کلمه\u200cها یا شخصیت\u200cها را استفاده می\u200cکند بدون استفاده از اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی ساخته می\u200cشود، مثل درختان محیط و درختان بستگی. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که ساختاری از درختان سنتاکتیک (SEST) یک چهارچوب الگوریتم برای استفاده از اطلاعات ساخته\u200cشده و آن\u200cها را به نمایش\u200cهای ویکتوری که می\u200cتوانند عملکرد الگوریتم\u200cها را برای درک ماشین افزایش دهند. ما با استفاده از یک مدل توجه عصبی در مجموعه داده\u200cهای SQuAD، روش خود را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما می\u200cتواند محدوده\u200cهای سنتاکتیک جمله\u200cها را دقیقا شناسایی کند و جواب\u200cها را خارج کند که به طور ساده بر روش\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط هماهنگ هستند.', 'sw': 'Kingi cha mitandao ya neura kwa ajili ya kompyuta ya mashine mara kwa kawaida hutumia maneno au tabia inayoingia bila matumizi ya wazi ya taarifa za lugha zilizotengenezwa kama vile miti ya ubunifu na miti ya kutegemea. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa miundombinu ya miti ya ushirikiano (SEST), mfumo wa algorithi wa kutumia taarifa zilizotengenezwa na kuingiza katika uwakilishi wa vector ambao unaweza kuongeza utendaji wa algorithi wa kompyuta wa mashine. Tutathmini mbinu yetu kwa kutumia muundo wa hali ya kisasa wa kisasa kwenye seti ya data ya SQuAD. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu unaweza kutambua mipaka ya ushirikiano wa hukumu na kutoa majibu yanayounganishwa kwa pamoja zaidi ya njia za msingi.', 'af': "Deep neuralnetwerke vir masjien verstaan tipies gebruik slegs woord of karakter inbettings sonder eksplisiese voordeel van struktureerde lingwisiese inligting soos constituency bome en afhanklikheidbome. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons strukturele inbêding van sintaktiële bome (SEST), â\x80\x99n algoritme raamwerk om struktureerde inligting te gebruik en hulle in vektorvoorstellings te kodeer wat die prestasie van algoritme vir die masjien verstaan kan vergroot. Ons evalueer ons toegang met 'n staat van die kunste neurale aandag model op die SQuAD datastel. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons model kan presies die sintakteel grense van die setings identifiseer en uitpak antwoorde wat sintakteel saamstig is oor die basisline metodes.", 'sq': "Rrjetet nervore të thella për kuptimin e makinës zakonisht përdorin vetëm përmbajtje fjalësh apo karakteresh pa përfituar eksplicitalisht nga informacioni gjuhësor të strukturuar si pemët e qarkut zgjedhor dhe pemët e varësisë. Në këtë letër, propozojmë përfshirjen strukturore të pemëve sintaktike (SEST), një kuadër algoritmi për të përdorur informacionin e strukturuar dhe për t'i koduar ato në përfaqësime vektorësh që mund të rritin performancën e algoritmave për kuptimin e makinës. Ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë duke përdorur një model të vëmendjes nervore në SQuAD. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se modeli ynë mund të identifikojë saktësisht kufijtë sintaktike të fjalëve dhe të nxjerrë përgjigjet që janë sintaktikisht koherente lidhur me metodat bazë.", 'tr': 'Maşynyň düşünmesi üçin gaty näurul şebekeler adatça diňe söz ýa-da karakter köpügini, durmuş agaçlary we baglary ýaly strukturlyk maglumatynyň faydasyny ulanmakdan ullanýar. Bu kagyzda sintaktik agaçlar (SEST), strukturly maglumatlary ulanmak üçin bir algoritm çerçevesini teklip edip, olary makina düşünmesi üçin algoritmalaryň eserini artdyrabilen vektör temsillere kodlaýar. SQuAD veri setirinde ýagdaýymyzy çykarýarys. Testiýa netijeleri biziň modelimiz sözlerin sintaktik sınırlaryny dogry tanap biler we çykyşlaryň sintaktik çykyşlaryny baseline yönlerde birleştirip biler diýip kanıtlaýar.', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի հասկանալու համար խորը նյարդային ցանցերը սովորաբար օգտագործում են միայն բառերի կամ բնավորների ներդրումներ առանց բացահայտորեն օգտագործելու կառուցվածված լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվությունը, ինչպիսիք են ընտրական շրջանների ծառերը և կախվածություն Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք սինտակտիկ ծառերի կառուցվածքային ներգրավումը (SESTA), ալգորիթմի կառուցվածք, որպեսզի օգտագործենք կառուցվածքային տեղեկատվությունը և դրանք կոդավորենք վեկտորների ներկայացումների մեջ, որոնք կարող են բարձրացնել մեքենայի Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը օգտագործելով SQUADի տվյալների համակարգի ամենաբարձր նյարդային ուշադրության մոդելը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է ճշգրիտ բացահայտել նախադասությունների սինտակտիկ սահմանները և ստանալ պատասխաններ, որոնք սինտակտիկ համապատասխան են հիմնական մեթոդների հետ:', 'bn': 'মেশিনের গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক সাধারণত শুধুমাত্র শব্দ বা অক্ষর ব্যবহার করে কোন স্পষ্ট ভাষার তথ্য ব্যবহার করে না যেমন সংসদ গাছ এবং নির্ভর গাছের মতো  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সিন্ট্যাক্টিক গাছের (সেস্টি) প্রস্তাব করি একটি অ্যালগরিদম ফ্রেক্কার ব্যবহার করে তাদের ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বে এনকোড করার জন্য য যা মেশিনের সম আমরা স্কুয়াড ডাটাসেটে একটি নিউরেল মনোযোগ মডেল ব্যবহার করে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ মূল্যায়ন করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল সঠিকভাবে বাক্যের সীমানা পরিচিত করতে পারে এবং বেসেলাইন পদ্ধতিতে যে সমস্ত উত্তরের সাথে একত্রিত।', 'am': 'ጥልቅ የናውሬል መረብ ለመmachine compression በተለመደው ቃላት ወይም የፊደል ክፍተቶችን ብቻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሳንተቲክ ዛፎችን (SEST) አካባቢ ፍሬማር ለመጠቀም እና የመረጃ መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም እና የዌctor መልዕክቶች እንዲያሳድጉት የኤልጎሪትምን ውጤት ለመጠቀም እናስቀድማቸዋለን፡፡ በSquaAD ዳታ ማውጣት የየ የአሁኑን የደዌብ ትኩረት ሞዴል በመጠቀም እናስተውሉናለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ሞዴላታችን የቃላትን ዳርቻ በኩል እንዲያሳውቅ እና በጥያቄ በመስመር ላይ የሚቆጠሩትን መልስ እንዲያወጣ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Makinelərin anlaşılması üçün derin nöral ağları genellikle yalnız söz və karakter inşalları istifadə edir, müxtəlif ağacları və bağımlılıq ağacları kimi strukturlı dil məlumatlarından istifadə etmədən. Bu kağızda, sintaktik ağacların (SEST) strukturlu inşallarını təklif edirik, strukturlı məlumatları istifadə etmək üçün algoritm çerçivesi və onları maşının anlaşılması üçün algorimlərin performansını artırmaq üçün vektor göstərilmələrinə kodlayacağıq. SQuAD verilənlər qutusunda nöral təsiri modeli vasitəsilə tərzimizi değerləşdiririk. Vəziyyət sonuçları bizim modelimiz cümlələrin sintaktik sınırlarını və sintaktik olaraq sintaktik çətinliklərlə birləşdirilmiş cavabları təsdiqləyə bilər.', 'bs': 'Duboke neuronske mreže za razumijevanje strojeva obično koriste samo riječi ili uloge karaktera bez objašnjenja iskorištavanja strukturiranih jezičkih informacija kao što su drveća konstitucija i drveća zavisnosti. U ovom papiru predlažemo strukturno uključenje sintaktičkih drveća (SEST), algoritmskog okvira za upotrebu strukturiranih informacija i kodiranje ih u predstavljanja vektora koji mogu povećati učinkovitost algoritma za razumijevanje mašine. Procjenjujemo naš pristup koristeći model neuralne pažnje u stanju SQuAD podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može precizno identificirati sintaktične granice rečenica i izvući odgovore koje su sintaktički saskašne prema početnim metodama.', 'ca': "Les xarxes neuronals profundes per a la comprensió de la màquina normalment utilitzen només integracions de paraules o caràcters sense aprofitar explícitament informació lingüística estructurada, com ara arbres de circumstàncies i arbres de dependencia. En aquest paper, proposem incorporació estructural d'arbres sinàctics (SEST), un marc d'algoritmes per utilitzar informació estructurada i codificar-les en representacions de vectors que puguin impulsar el rendiment d'algoritmes per a la comprensió de la màquina. Evaluam el nostre enfocament fent servir un model d'atenció neuronal més avançat del conjunt de dades SQuAD. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre model pot identificar amb precisió els límits sinàctics de les frases i extrair respostes sinàcticament coherents sobre els mètodes de base.", 'cs': 'Hluboké neuronové sítě pro strojové porozumění obvykle využívají pouze vložení slov nebo znaků, aniž by explicitně využívaly strukturované jazykové informace, jako jsou stromy voličů a stromy závislostí. V tomto článku navrhujeme strukturální vložení syntaktických stromů (SEST), algoritmu pro využití strukturovaných informací a jejich kódování do vektorových reprezentací, které mohou zvýšit výkon algoritmů pro porozumění strojů. Náš přístup hodnotíme pomocí nejmodernějšího modelu neuronové pozornosti na datové sadě SQuAD. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model dokáže přesně identifikovat syntaktické hranice vět a extrahovat odpovědi, které jsou syntakticky koherentní nad základními metodami.', 'et': 'Masinamõistmiseks kasutavad sügavad neurovõrgud tavaliselt ainult sõna- või märgipõimimisi, kasutamata selgesõnaliselt ära struktureeritud keelelist teavet, nagu valimisringkonna puud ja sõltuvuspuud. Käesolevas töös pakume välja süntaktiliste puude struktuurilise manustamise (SEST) algoritmiraamistiku struktureeritud informatsiooni kasutamiseks ja kodeerimiseks vektorrepresentatsioonideks, mis võivad parandada algoritmide jõudlust masinate mõistmiseks. Hindame oma lähenemisviisi, kasutades SQuAD andmekogumi tipptasemel neurotähelepanu mudelit. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel suudab täpselt tuvastada lausete süntaktilised piirid ja välja võtta vastused, mis on süntaktiliselt sidusad võrreldes algmeetoditega.', 'fi': 'Koneen ymmärtämiseen tarkoitetut syvät neuroverkot käyttävät tyypillisesti vain sana- tai merkkiupotuksia hyödyntämättä nimenomaisesti strukturoitua kielellistä tietoa, kuten vaalipiiripuita ja riippuvuuspuita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme syntaktisten puiden rakenteellista upotusta (SEST), algoritmikehystä, joka hyödyntää strukturoitua tietoa ja koodaa ne vektoriesityksiksi, jotka voivat parantaa algoritmien suorituskykyä koneymmärryksessä. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme käyttämällä SQuAD-aineistossa uusinta neurohuomiomallia. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy tunnistamaan lauseiden syntaktiset rajat tarkasti ja poimimaan vastaukset, jotka ovat syntaktisesti johdonmukaisia perusasetuksen menetelmiin nähden.', 'jv': 'deep In this paper, we proposal structural embedding of textattr We assertive Gebudhakan langkung wigatining langkung wigatining modèl dhéwé iso nggawe aksi perusahaan anyar sing dibutuhé awak dhéwé nggambar barang seneng pisan karo perusahaan langkung sampek sing sampek isiné awak dhéwé.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa firam mai haɗi da itãce na syntactic (SAS), wata firam na algoritm dõmin ya yi amfani da amfani da masu tsari da information kuma ka kode su zuwa masu shiryarwa masu shiryarwa da ke iya ƙaranci aikin algoritm wa Compression na mashine. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyinmu da misãlin muhalli na-halin-yanzu kan SQuAD. Matarin jarrabai ya nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya iya gane grensa na syntactic da ke sami'a sami'a kan hanyon ayuka.", 'sk': 'Globoka nevronska omrežja za strojno razumevanje običajno uporabljajo samo besede ali znake, ne da bi izrecno izkoristila strukturirane jezikovne informacije, kot so drevesa volilnih okrožij in drevesa odvisnosti. V prispevku predlagamo strukturno vdelavo sintaktičnih dreves (SEST), algoritmski okvir za uporabo strukturiranih informacij in kodiranje v vektorske reprezentacije, ki lahko povečajo delovanje algoritmov za strojno razumevanje. Naš pristop ocenjujemo z uporabo najsodobnejšega modela nevronske pozornosti na naboru podatkov SQuAD. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko naš model natančno identificira sintaktične meje stavkov in izvleče odgovore, ki so sintaktično koherentni v osnovnih metodah.', 'he': 'רשתות עצביות עמוקות כדי להבין מכונות בדרך כלל משתמשות רק בתכניות מילים או אופיים בלי לנצל באופן ברור מידע שפתי מבוסס כמו עצי מחוזי הבחירות ועצי תלויות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים קיצוב מבנה של עצים סינטקטיים (SEST), מסגרת אלגוריתם כדי להשתמש במידע מבוסס ולקוד אותם לתוך מייצגים ווקטורים שיכולים לגדל את ביצועי האלגוריתם עבור הבנה המכונה. אנו מעריכים את הגישה שלנו באמצעות מודל תשומת לב עצבית חדש במידע SQuAD. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהדוגמנית שלנו יכולה לזהות בדיוק את הגבולות הסינטקטיים של המשפטים ולוציא תשובות שיותרות סינטקטית תואם על השיטות הבסיסית.', 'bo': 'Deep neural networks for machine comprehension typically use only word or character embeddings without explicitly taking advantage of structured linguistic information such as constituency trees and dependency trees. In this paper, we propose structural embedding of syntactic trees (SEST), an algorithm framework to utilize structured information and encode them into vector representations that can boost the performance of algorithms for the machine comprehension. The first step is to translate the keyword between brackets (e.g. ServerName, ServerAdmin, etc.) We evaluate our approach using a state-of-the-art neural attention model on the SQuAD dataset. ལག་འཚོལ་བ་འཐབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་དག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་བདེ་འཇགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་སྒྲིག་དང་ཁ་ཤས་ཐུབ་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'World Knowledge for Reading Comprehension : Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions', 'ar': 'المعرفة العالمية لفهم القراءة: تنبؤ كيان نادر باستخدام نماذج LSTM الهرمية باستخدام الأوصاف الخارجية', 'es': 'Conocimiento mundial para la comprensión lectora: predicción de entidades raras con LSTM jerárquicas mediante descripciones externas', 'pt': 'Conhecimento Mundial para Compreensão de Leitura: Previsão de Entidades Raras com LSTMs Hierárquicos Usando Descrições Externas', 'fr': "Connaissances mondiales pour la compréhension de lecture\xa0: prédiction d'entités rares avec des LSTM hiérarchiques à l'aide de descriptions externes", 'ja': '理解のための世界的な知識：外部記述を使用した階層的なLSTMによる希少なエンティティ予測', 'zh': '观世界:用外言LSTM稀有实体', 'hi': 'पढ़ने की समझ के लिए विश्व ज्ञान: बाहरी विवरण का उपयोग करके पदानुक्रमित LSTMs के साथ दुर्लभ इकाई भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Мировые знания для понимания чтения: редкое предсказание сущностей с помощью иерархических LSTM с использованием внешних описаний', 'ga': 'Eolas Domhanda don Léamhthuiscint: Tuar Aonán Neamhchoitianta le LSTM Ordlathach ag Úsáid Cur síos Seachtrach', 'hu': 'Világtudás az olvasáshoz: ritka entitások előrejelzése hierarchikus LSTM-ekkel külső leírásokat használva', 'el': 'Παγκόσμια γνώση για την κατανόηση ανάγνωσης: Σπάνια πρόβλεψη οντοτήτων με ιεραρχικές χρησιμοποιώντας εξωτερικές περιγραφές', 'ka': 'world Knowledge for reading Comprehension: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions', 'it': 'Conoscenza del mondo per la comprensione della lettura: previsione di entità rare con LSTMs gerarchici che utilizzano descrizioni esterne', 'kk': 'Қосымша оқу үшін әлемдік білім: Шығыс сипаттамасын қолданатын иерарикалық LSTMs арқылы жеке нысандар', 'lt': 'Pasaulinės supratimo skaitymo žinios: retų subjektų prognozė su hierarchiniais LSTM naudojant išorinius aprašus', 'mk': 'Светско знаење за читање: Предвидување на ретки ентитети со хиерархички ЛСТМ користејќи надворешни описи', 'ms': 'Pengetahuan Dunia untuk Membaca Pemahaman: Prediksi Entiti jarang dengan LSTM Hierarkikal Mengguna Huraian Luar', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുവാനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Għarfien Dinji għall-Qarar Komprensjoni: Tbassir ta’ Entitajiet Rari b’LSTMs Erarkiċi bl-Użu ta’ Deskrizzjonijiet Esterni', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн шинжлэх ухаан унших мэдлэг: Хэдэн ховорхон нэгдэл гэдэг гадаад тодорхойлолтуудыг ашиглаж', 'no': 'World Knowledge for reading Comprehension: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions', 'pl': 'Światowa wiedza do czytania zrozumienia: rzadkie prognozowanie jednostek z hierarchicznymi LSTMs przy użyciu opisów zewnętrznych', 'ro': 'Cunoștințe mondiale pentru înțelegerea citirii: predicția entităților rare cu LSTMs ierarhice folosind descrieri externe', 'sr': 'Svjetska znanost za čitanje kompresije: Predviđanje rijetkih podataka sa hijerarhičkim LSTMsima korištenjem vanjskih opisa', 'si': 'ලෝකය දන්නවය සම්පූර්ණය කියවන්න: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග හියර්චික LSTMs ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Aqoonta aduunka ee akhriska: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions', 'sv': 'Världskunskap för läsförståelse: Sällsynta entitetsförutsägelser med hierarkiska LSTMs som använder externa beskrivningar', 'ta': 'வாசிப்பதற்கான உலக அறிவிப்பு: வெளி விவரிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்துவதில் குறைந்த முன்னுரிமை முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'World Knowledge for Reading Comprehension: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions', 'uz': 'Oò£qish uchun dunyo haqida maò¥lumot: Tashqi taò¥riflardan foydalanish', 'vi': 'Thế giới có hiểu biết về quy mô đọc: khả năng dự đoán bé nhỏ với các tập luật leo trèo sử dụng các mô tả ngoài.', 'bg': 'Световно познание за разбиране на четенето: прогнозиране на редки същества с йерархични ЛТМ, използващи външни описания', 'hr': 'Svjetska znanost za čitanje kompresije: Predviđanje rijetkih područja s hijerarhičkim LSTMsima koristeći vanjske opise', 'da': 'Verdenskendskab til læseforståelse: Sjælden entitetsforudsigelse med hierarkiske LSTMs ved hjælp af eksterne beskrivelser', 'nl': 'Wereldkennis voor leesbegrip: zeldzame entiteitsvoorspelling met hiërarchische LSTMs met behulp van externe beschrijvingen', 'de': 'Weltwissen für Leseverständnis: Seltene Entitätenvorhersage mit hierarchischen LSTMs unter Verwendung externer Beschreibungen', 'id': 'Pengetahuan Dunia untuk Membaca Kompresi: Prediksi Entitas Langka dengan LSTM Hierarkis Menggunakan Deskripsi Luar', 'ko': '읽기와 이해의 세계 지식: 외부 설명을 사용한 층별 LSTM의 보기 드문 실체 예측', 'fa': 'دانش جهانی برای خواندن توضیح: پیشنهاد عناصر کمی با LSTMs تحریک استفاده از توضیح خارجی', 'sw': 'Ujuzi wa Dunia kwa ajili ya Kusoma Uwezeshaji: Udhibiti wa Ujadala Mwanzo na Udhibiti wa LSTMs Usitumia maelezo ya nje', 'af': 'Wêreld kennis vir lees van komprehensie: Vaneeldige Eenheidvoordeel met Hierarchical LSTMs gebruik eksterne beskrywings', 'tr': 'Dünýä Bilim Derjesi okamak üçin: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions', 'sq': 'Njohja botërore për leximin e kuptimit: parashikimi i njësisë së rrallë me LSTM hierarkike duke përdorur përshkrime të jashtme', 'am': 'የዓለም እውቀት ለማንበብ አቀማመጥ: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs using External Descriptions', 'bn': 'পাঠানোর জন্য বিশ্ব জ্ঞান: বিদেশী বর্ণনা ব্যবহার করে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এন্টিটি প্রেকশন', 'bs': 'Svjetska znanost za čitanje kompresije: Predviđanje rijetkih područja sa hijerarhičkim LSTMsima koristeći vanjske opise', 'ca': "Conèixement mundial per a la lectura comprensió: Predicció d'entitats rares amb LSTMs hieràrquics utilitzant descripcions externes", 'cs': 'Světové znalosti pro porozumění čtení: vzácná předpověď entit s hierarchickými LSTMs pomocí externích popisů', 'et': 'Maailma teadmised lugemise mõistmiseks: haruldaste olendite prognoosimine hierarhiliste LSTMdega väliste kirjelduste abil', 'fi': 'World Knowledge for Reading Comprehension: Harvinaisten entiteettien ennustaminen hierarkisilla LSTMillä käyttäen ulkoisia kuvauksia', 'az': 'Dünya Bilgi Yazılımı: Hiyerarşik LSTMs Dışarı Yazılımlar istifadə edir', 'hy': 'Աշխարհային գիտելիքներ ընթերցման ընկալումների համար. հազվադեպ հասակի կանխատեսումներ, որոնք օգտագործում են արտաքին նկարագրություններ', 'jv': 'Monday Bilih kanggo Kelesi Compréncion', 'he': 'ידע עולמי לקרוא הבנה: צפוי איכויות נדירות עם LSTMs הייררכיים בשימוש בתיאורים חיצוניים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Svetovno znanje za razumevanje branja: napoved redkih entitet z hierarhičnimi LSTMs z uporabo zunanjih opisov', 'bo': 'World Knowledge for Reading Comprehension: Rare Entity Prediction with Hierarchical LSTMs Using External Descriptions'}
{'en': 'Humans interpret texts with respect to some background information, or world knowledge, and we would like to develop automatic reading comprehension systems that can do the same. In this paper, we introduce a task and several models to drive progress towards this goal. In particular, we propose the task of rare entity prediction : given a web document with several entities removed, models are tasked with predicting the correct missing entities conditioned on the document context and the lexical resources. This task is challenging due to the diversity of language styles and the extremely large number of rare entities. We propose two recurrent neural network architectures which make use of external knowledge in the form of entity descriptions. Our experiments show that our hierarchical LSTM model performs significantly better at the rare entity prediction task than those that do not make use of external resources.', 'ar': 'يفسر البشر النصوص فيما يتعلق ببعض المعلومات الأساسية ، أو المعرفة العالمية ، ونود تطوير أنظمة فهم القراءة التلقائية التي يمكنها فعل الشيء نفسه. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مهمة والعديد من النماذج لدفع التقدم نحو هذا الهدف. على وجه الخصوص ، نقترح مهمة التنبؤ بالكيان النادر: بالنظر إلى مستند الويب مع إزالة العديد من الكيانات ، يتم تكليف النماذج بالتنبؤ بالكيانات المفقودة الصحيحة المشروطة بسياق المستند والموارد المعجمية. هذه المهمة صعبة بسبب تنوع أنماط اللغة والعدد الكبير للغاية من الكيانات النادرة. نقترح هيكلين متكررين للشبكة العصبية يستفيدان من المعرفة الخارجية في شكل أوصاف الكيان. تُظهر تجاربنا أن نموذج LSTM الهرمي يؤدي بشكل أفضل في مهمة التنبؤ بالكيان النادرة من تلك التي لا تستخدم الموارد الخارجية.', 'fr': "Les humains interprètent les textes en fonction de certaines informations de base, ou connaissances du monde, et nous aimerions développer des systèmes automatiques de compréhension de la lecture qui puissent faire de même. Dans cet article, nous présentons une tâche et plusieurs modèles permettant de progresser vers cet objectif. En particulier, nous proposons la tâche de prédiction d'entités rares\xa0: étant donné un document Web avec plusieurs entités supprimées, les modèles sont chargés de prédire les entités manquantes correctes en fonction du contexte du document et des ressources lexicales. Cette tâche est difficile en raison de la diversité des styles linguistiques et du très grand nombre d'entités rares. Nous proposons deux architectures de réseaux neuronaux récurrentes qui font appel à des connaissances externes sous forme de descriptions d'entités. Nos expériences montrent que notre modèle LSTM hiérarchique est nettement plus performant pour la tâche de prédiction d'entités rares que ceux qui n'utilisent pas de ressources externes.", 'es': 'Los seres humanos interpretamos textos con respecto a cierta información de fondo, o conocimiento del mundo, y nos gustaría desarrollar sistemas automáticos de comprensión de lectura que puedan hacer lo mismo. En este documento, presentamos una tarea y varios modelos para impulsar el progreso hacia este objetivo. En particular, proponemos la tarea de predicción de entidades raras: dado un documento web con varias entidades eliminadas, los modelos tienen la tarea de predecir las entidades faltantes correctas según el contexto del documento y los recursos léxicos. Esta tarea es desafiante debido a la diversidad de estilos lingüísticos y al gran número de entidades raras. Proponemos dos arquitecturas de redes neuronales recurrentes que utilizan conocimientos externos en forma de descripciones de entidades. Nuestros experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo LSTM jerárquico funciona significativamente mejor en la tarea de predicción de entidades raras que aquellos que no utilizan recursos externos.', 'ja': '人間は何らかの背景情報や世界の知識に関してテキストを解釈し、私たちは同じことができる自動読解システムを開発したいと考えています。この論文では、この目標に向けて進歩を推進するためのタスクといくつかのモデルを紹介します。特に、稀なエンティティ予測のタスクを提案します。いくつかのエンティティが削除されたWebドキュメントが与えられた場合、モデルは、ドキュメントのコンテキストと語彙リソースを条件とする正しい欠落したエンティティを予測することができます。このタスクは、言語スタイルの多様性と極めて稀な数のエンティティのために困難です。エンティティ記述の形で外部知識を利用した2つの再帰的ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを提案します。私たちの実験では、階層的LSTMモデルは、外部リソースを利用しないものよりも、希少なエンティティ予測タスクで著しく優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することが示されています。', 'hi': 'मनुष्य कुछ पृष्ठभूमि जानकारी, या विश्व ज्ञान के संबंध में ग्रंथों की व्याख्या करते हैं, और हम स्वचालित पढ़ने की समझ प्रणालियों को विकसित करना चाहते हैं जो ऐसा ही कर सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम इस लक्ष्य की दिशा में प्रगति को चलाने के लिए एक कार्य और कई मॉडल पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम दुर्लभ इकाई भविष्यवाणी के कार्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: कई संस्थाओं के साथ एक वेब दस्तावेज़ को देखते हुए, मॉडल को दस्तावेज़ संदर्भ और लेक्सिकल संसाधनों पर वातानुकूलित सही लापता संस्थाओं की भविष्यवाणी करने का काम सौंपा जाता है। भाषा शैलियों की विविधता और दुर्लभ संस्थाओं की बहुत बड़ी संख्या के कारण यह कार्य चुनौतीपूर्ण है। हम दो आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो इकाई विवरण के रूप में बाहरी ज्ञान का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा पदानुक्रमित एलएसटीएम मॉडल उन लोगों की तुलना में दुर्लभ इकाई भविष्यवाणी कार्य में काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है जो बाहरी संसाधनों का उपयोग नहीं करते हैं।', 'pt': 'Os seres humanos interpretam textos com relação a algumas informações básicas, ou conhecimento do mundo, e gostaríamos de desenvolver sistemas automáticos de compreensão de leitura que possam fazer o mesmo. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma tarefa e vários modelos para impulsionar o progresso em direção a esse objetivo. Em particular, propomos a tarefa de previsão de entidades raras: dado um documento web com várias entidades removidas, os modelos são encarregados de prever as entidades ausentes corretas condicionadas ao contexto do documento e aos recursos lexicais. Essa tarefa é desafiadora devido à diversidade de estilos de linguagem e ao número extremamente grande de entidades raras. Propomos duas arquiteturas de redes neurais recorrentes que fazem uso de conhecimento externo na forma de descrições de entidades. Nossos experimentos mostram que nosso modelo LSTM hierárquico tem desempenho significativamente melhor na tarefa de previsão de entidade rara do que aqueles que não fazem uso de recursos externos.', 'ru': 'Люди интерпретируют тексты относительно некоторой справочной информации или мировых знаний, и мы хотели бы разработать автоматические системы понимания чтения, которые могут сделать то же самое. В настоящем документе мы представляем задачу и несколько моделей для продвижения к этой цели. В частности, мы предлагаем задачу предсказания редких сущностей: учитывая веб-документ с несколькими удаленными сущностями, модели ставятся задачи предсказания правильных отсутствующих сущностей в зависимости от контекста документа и лексических ресурсов. Эта задача является сложной из-за разнообразия языковых стилей и чрезвычайно большого количества редких сущностей. Мы предлагаем две рекуррентные архитектуры нейронной сети, которые используют внешние знания в виде описаний сущностей. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наша иерархическая модель LSTM значительно лучше выполняет задачу прогнозирования редких сущностей, чем те, которые не используют внешние ресурсы.', 'zh': '人以背景信世界知识解文本,愿发自读解系。 在本文中,我们介绍了一个事务和几个模样,以推动成这一的进展。 特为奇质之任:给定一删数实之Web文档,模形之任,占文档上下文词汇之正。 言语风格多样性至稀有实体,其事有挑战性。 二递归神经网络架构者,以实体用外也。 吾实验之明,吾之分LSTM形于希有之体,明优于不用之外者也。', 'ga': 'Déanann daoine téacsanna a léirmhíniú maidir le roinnt eolais chúlra, nó eolas domhanda, agus ba mhaith linn córais uathoibríocha léamhthuisceana a fhorbairt ar féidir leo an rud céanna a dhéanamh. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach tasc agus roinnt samhlacha chun dul chun cinn a thiomáint i dtreo na sprice seo. Molaimid go háirithe an tasc a bhaineann le heintitis neamhchoitianta a thuar: nuair a chuirtear doiciméad gréasáin ar fáil ina bhfuil roinnt eintiteas bainte de, tá sé de chúram ar na samhlacha na heintitis atá in easnamh i gceart a thuar atá coinníollach ar chomhthéacs an doiciméid agus ar na hacmhainní foclóireachta. Tá an tasc seo dúshlánach mar gheall ar éagsúlacht na stíleanna teanga agus líon an-mhór na n-eintiteas neamhchoitianta. Molaimid dhá ailtireacht líonra néaracha athfhillteacha a bhaineann úsáid as eolas seachtrach i bhfoirm tuairiscí aonáin. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfeidhmíonn ár múnla ordlathach LSTM i bhfad níos fearr ag an tasc réamh-mheasta aonáin annamh ná iad siúd nach mbaineann úsáid as acmhainní seachtracha.', 'ka': 'ადამიანები ტექსტის ინფორმაციის შესახებ, ან მსოფლიოს მეცნიერების შესახებ, და ჩვენ მინდა ავტომატური კითხვის შესახებ სისტემის განვითარება, რომელიც იგივე შეუძლია ამ დოკუმენში ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ რაოდენობა და რაოდენობა მოდელები, რომლებიც ამ მიზეზის გარეშე პროგრესი გადავიყენებთ. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ განვითარებთ წარმოიდგინეთ ინტერტის განსაკუთრების რაოდენობა: გვერდის დოკუმენტი, რამდენიმე ინტერტიები წაშლა, მოდელები დავამუშავებენ, რომელიც წარმოიდგინ ეს სამუშაო შესაძლებელია ენის სტილის განსხვავებას და ძალიან დიდი რაოდენობას. ჩვენ მუშაობთ ორი განმეორებული ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურები, რომლებიც გარეშე ცნობილების გამოყენება ინტერტის აღწერების ფორმაში. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი იერაქტიკური LSTM მოდელის მნიშვნელოვანი უკეთესი გავაკეთებენ რეტალური ინტერტის წარმოდგენის რაოდენობაში, ვიდრე', 'hu': 'Az emberek értelmezik a szövegeket bizonyos háttérinformációk, vagy világtudás tekintetében, és szeretnénk automatikus olvasásértő rendszereket fejleszteni, amelyek ugyanerre képesek. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy feladatot és több modellt, hogy előmozdítsuk ezt a célt. Különösen a ritka entitások előrejelzésének feladatát javasoljuk: ha egy webes dokumentum több entitást is eltávolít, a modellek feladata a dokumentum kontextusától és a lexikai erőforrásoktól függően a megfelelő hiányzó entitások előrejelzése. Ez a feladat kihívást jelent a nyelvi stílusok sokfélesége és a ritka entitások rendkívül nagy száma miatt. Két visszatérő neurális hálózati architektúrát javasolunk, amelyek entitás leírások formájában külső ismereteket használnak fel. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy hierarchikus LSTM modellünk jelentősen jobban teljesít a ritka entitás előrejelzési feladatban, mint azok, amelyek nem használnak külső erőforrásokat.', 'el': 'Οι άνθρωποι ερμηνεύουν κείμενα σε σχέση με κάποιες πληροφορίες υποβάθρου, ή παγκόσμια γνώση, και θα θέλαμε να αναπτύξουμε αυτόματα συστήματα κατανόησης ανάγνωσης που μπορούν να κάνουν το ίδιο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα έργο και διάφορα μοντέλα για την προώθηση της προόδου προς αυτόν τον στόχο. Ειδικότερα, προτείνουμε το έργο της πρόβλεψης σπάνιων οντοτήτων: δεδομένου ενός εγγράφου ιστού με πολλές οντότητες που έχουν αφαιρεθεί, τα μοντέλα έχουν ως αποστολή να προβλέψουν τις σωστές ελλείψεις οντοτήτων με βάση το πλαίσιο του εγγράφου και τους λεξικούς πόρους. Αυτό το έργο αποτελεί πρόκληση λόγω της ποικιλομορφίας των γλωσσικών στυλ και του εξαιρετικά μεγάλου αριθμού σπάνιων οντοτήτων. Προτείνουμε δύο επαναλαμβανόμενες αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων που χρησιμοποιούν εξωτερική γνώση με τη μορφή περιγραφών οντοτήτων. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το ιεραρχικό μοντέλο αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα στην εργασία πρόβλεψης σπάνιων οντοτήτων από εκείνα που δεν χρησιμοποιούν εξωτερικούς πόρους.', 'it': 'Gli esseri umani interpretano i testi rispetto ad alcune informazioni di base, o conoscenza del mondo, e vorremmo sviluppare sistemi automatici di comprensione della lettura che possano fare lo stesso. In questo articolo presentiamo un compito e diversi modelli per guidare il progresso verso questo obiettivo. In particolare, proponiamo il compito della previsione di entità rare: dato un documento web con diverse entità rimosse, i modelli hanno il compito di prevedere le entità mancanti corrette condizionate dal contesto del documento e dalle risorse lessicali. Questo compito è impegnativo a causa della diversità degli stili linguistici e del numero estremamente elevato di entità rare. Proponiamo due architetture di rete neurale ricorrenti che fanno uso di conoscenze esterne sotto forma di descrizioni di entità. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello gerarchico LSTM funziona significativamente meglio nel compito raro di previsione delle entità rispetto a quelli che non fanno uso di risorse esterne.', 'mk': 'Луѓето ги интерпретираат текстовите во однос на некои подложни информации, или светско знаење, и би сакале да развиеме автоматски системи за разбирање на читањето кои можат да го направат истото. Во овој документ претставуваме задача и неколку модели за движење напредок кон оваа цел. Особено, ние ја предложуваме задачата на редок предвид на ентитетите: со оглед на веб-документот со неколку ентитети отстранети, моделите се задолжени со предвидување на точните исчезнати ентитети условени на документскиот контекст и лексикалните ресурси. This task is challenging due to the diversity of language styles and the extremely large number of rare entities.  Предложуваме две рецидентни архитектури на нервната мрежа кои користат надворешно знаење во форма на описи на ентитетите. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека нашиот хиерархичен модел на ЛСТМ функционира значително подобро во редката задача за предвидување на ентитетите отколку оние кои не користат надворешни ресурси.', 'lt': 'Žmonės aiškina tekstus, susijusius su tam tikra pagrindine informacija arba pasaulio žiniomis, ir norėtume sukurti automatinio skaitymo supratimo sistemas, kurios galėtų tai padaryti. Šiame dokumente pristatome užduotį ir keletą modelių, kuriais siekiama pažangos siekiant šio tikslo. Visų pirma siūlome užduotį, susijusią su retų subjektų prognoze: atsižvelgiant į interneto dokumentą su keliais subjektais pašalintais, modeliams tenka užduotis prognozuoti teisingus trūkstamus subjektus, atsižvelgiant į dokumento kontekstą ir lexinius išteklius. Ši užduotis yra sunki dėl kalbų stilių įvairovės ir labai didelio retų subjektų skaičiaus. Siūlome dvi pasikartojančias nervinių tinklų architektūras, kurios naudojasi išorinėmis žiniomis kaip subjektų aprašymais. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų hierarchinis LSTM modelis labai geriau atlieka retų subjektų prognozavimo užduotį nei tie, kurie nepasinaudoja išorės ištekliais.', 'kk': 'Адамдар кейбір аясының мәліметіне немесе әлемдік білім туралы мәтіндерді толтыруды қалайды. Біз осылай істей алатын автоматты оқу жүйелерін жасауды қалаймыз. Бұл қағазда біз тапсырманы және бірнеше үлгілерді бұл мақсатты жасау үшін тапсырманы таңдаймыз. Есінікте, біз бұл құжат контексті және лексикалық ресурстардың дұрыс жоқ нысандарын алдын алатын веб құжаттың тапсырмасын ұсынып береміз. Бұл тапсырма тілдер стилінің түрлігін және әдемі бірнеше бірліктерінің көпшілігін сезіп жатыр. Біз екі қайталанатын невралдық желінің архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Бұл сыртқы білім сипаттамасына қолданылады. Біздің тәжірибеміздің иерархиялық LSTM моделіміз сыртқы ресурстарды пайдалануға болмайтындардың тапсырмасынан артық жұмыс істейді.', 'ms': 'Manusia menerjemahkan teks mengenai beberapa maklumat latar belakang, atau pengetahuan dunia, dan kami ingin mengembangkan sistem pemahaman pembacaan automatik yang boleh melakukan hal yang sama. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan tugas dan beberapa model untuk memandu kemajuan ke arah tujuan ini. Secara khususnya, kami cadangkan tugas ramalan entiti langka: diberikan dokumen web dengan beberapa entiti dibuang, model ditugaskan meramalkan entiti hilang yang betul tergantung pada konteks dokumen dan sumber leksikal. Tugas ini mencabar kerana pelbagai gaya bahasa dan bilangan yang sangat besar entiti langka. Kami cadangkan dua arkitektur rangkaian saraf berulang yang menggunakan pengetahuan luaran dalam bentuk deskripsi entiti. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa model LSTM hierarkik kami berjalan lebih baik pada tugas ramalan entiti yang jarang daripada yang tidak menggunakan sumber luaran.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യര്\u200d പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചോ ലോകത്തിലെ അറിവിനെക്കുറിച്ചോ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന പദാവലികള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലേക്ക് മുന്നോട്ട് പോകാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ജോലിയും പല മോഡലുകളും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തും. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ചുരുക്കം വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രവചനത്തിന്റെ ജോലി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു: പല വസ്തുക്കളും നീക്കം ചെയ്ത വെബ് രേഖകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് മോ ഭാഷ രീതികളുടെ വ്യത്യാസവും വളരെ ചുരുക്കം വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വ്യത്യാസവും കാരണം ഈ ജോലി വിലപാട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് പുനരുത്ര നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d എസ്റ്റിം മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗ', 'mt': 'Il-bnedmin jinterpretaw testi fir-rigward ta’ xi informazzjoni ta’ sfond, jew għarfien dinji, u nixtiequ niżviluppaw sistemi ta’ komprensjoni awtomatika tal-qari li jistgħu jagħmlu l-istess. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu kompitu u diversi mudelli biex nimxu ’l quddiem lejn dan l-għan. B’mod partikolari, nipproponu l-kompitu ta’ tbassir ta’ entitajiet rari: meta wieħed iqis dokument fuq l-internet b’diversi entitajiet imneħħija, il-mudelli għandhom il-kompitu li jipprevedu l-entitajiet nieqsa korretti kkundizzjonati fuq il-kuntest tad-dokument u r-riżorsi lexiċi. Dan il-kompitu huwa ta’ sfida minħabba d-diversità tal-istili lingwistiċi u n-numru estremament kbir ta’ entitajiet rari. We propose two recurrent neural network architectures which make use of external knowledge in the form of entity descriptions.  L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-mudell ġerarkiku tagħna ta’ LSTM iwettaq prestazzjoni sinifikanti aħjar fil-kompitu ta’ tbassir ta’ entitajiet rari minn dawk li ma jagħmlux użu mir-riżorsi esterni.', 'ro': 'Oamenii interpretează textele cu privire la unele informații de fond, sau cunoștințe mondiale, și am dori să dezvoltăm sisteme automate de înțelegere a citirii care pot face același lucru. În această lucrare, prezentăm o sarcină și mai multe modele pentru a conduce progresul către acest obiectiv. În special, propunem sarcina predicției entităților rare: având în vedere un document web cu mai multe entități eliminate, modelele au sarcina de a prezice entitățile lipsă corecte condiționate de contextul documentului și de resursele lexicale. Această sarcină este provocatoare datorită diversității stilurilor lingvistice și numărului extrem de mare de entități rare. Propunem două arhitecturi de rețele neurale recurente care utilizează cunoștințele externe sub formă de descrieri ale entităților. Experimentele noastre arată că modelul nostru ierarhic LSTM performează semnificativ mai bine la sarcina rară de predicție a entităților decât cele care nu utilizează resurse externe.', 'pl': 'Ludzie interpretują teksty w odniesieniu do pewnych informacji podstawowych lub wiedzy świata, a my chcielibyśmy opracować automatyczne systemy rozumienia czytania, które mogą robić to samo. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy zadanie i kilka modeli mających na celu napędzanie postępów w realizacji tego celu. W szczególności proponujemy zadanie przewidywania rzadkich jednostek: biorąc pod uwagę dokument internetowy z usuniętymi kilkoma podmiotami, modele mają za zadanie przewidywanie poprawnych brakujących jednostek uwarunkowanych kontekstem dokumentu i zasobami leksykalnymi. Zadanie to jest wyzwaniem ze względu na różnorodność stylów językowych i niezwykle dużą liczbę rzadkich podmiotów. Proponujemy dwie powtarzające się architektury sieci neuronowych wykorzystujące wiedzę zewnętrzną w postaci opisów jednostek. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz hierarchiczny model LSTM sprawdza się znacznie lepiej w zadaniu przewidywania rzadkich jednostek niż te, które nie wykorzystują zasobów zewnętrznych.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтөн зарим мэдээлэл, эсвэл дэлхийн мэдлэгтэй холбогдолтой текстүүдийг илтгэдэг. Бид ижил хийж чадах автоматик унших ухааны системүүдийг хөгжүүлэхийг хүсч байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ зорилго руу хөгжүүлэх даалгавар болон олон загварыг танилцуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид ховор биетийн таамаглалтын даалгаварыг санал болгож байна: хэдэн биетүүдийг устгасан веб баримтууд, загварууд баримтуудын нөхцөл болон лексикийн нөхцөл байдлыг зөв алдагдсан биетүүдийг таамаглаж байна. Энэ үйл ажиллагаа хэл хэлбэрийн төлөвлөгөөс болон маш их ховор зүйлсийн шалтгааныг шалтгаалдаг. Бид эдийн засгийн тодорхойлолтын хэлбэрээр гадаад мэдлэг ашигладаг хоёр дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний архитектуруудыг санал болгож байна. Бидний туршилтууд бидний төрөлхтний LSTM загвар нь гадаад нөөцийг ашиглахгүй хүмүүсээс ховор биетийн таамаглалтаас илүү сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Menneske tolkar tekstar med respekt til nokre bakgrunnsinformasjon eller verdenskunnskap, og me vil utvikla automatisk lesingsforståkingssystemer som kan gjera det same. I denne papiret introduserer vi ei oppgåve og fleire modeller for å køyra framgang mot dette målet. I særskilt foreslår vi oppgåva av rekke entitetsforhåndsvising: gitt eit nettdokument med fleire entiteter fjerna, vert modeller oppgåve med å forhåndsvisa dei rette manglande entitetene som er avhengig av dokumentkonteksten og leksiske ressursane. Denne oppgåva er vanskeleg på grunn av ulike språksstilar og det ekstremt stor talet på rekke einingar. Vi foreslår to rekurserande neuralnettverksarkitekturar som brukar eksterne kunnskap i form av entitetsskildringar. Eksperimentane våre viser at vårt hierarkisk LSTM-modell utfører betydelig bedre i den rekke foregåvelsen av entitet enn dei som ikkje brukar eksterne ressursar.', 'sr': 'Ljudi interpretiraju tekste u pogledu neke pozadinske informacije ili svetske znanje, i želimo razviti sisteme automatske razumevanja èitanja koje mogu isto da urade. U ovom papiru predstavljamo zadatak i nekoliko modela da se pokrenu napredak ka ovom cilju. Posebno predlažemo zadatak predviđanja rijetkih entiteta: s obzirom na web dokument sa nekoliko uklonjenih entitata, modeli su zaduženi predviđanjem ispravnih nestalih entitata pod uvjetom dokumenta i leksičkih resursa. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan zbog raznolikosti jezičkih stilova i izuzetno velikog broja rijetkih entitata. Predlažemo dve repertovane neuralne mreže arhitekture koje koriste vanjske znanje u obliku opisa entiteta. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš hijerarhički LSTM model izvodi značajno bolje na zadatku predviđanja retkih entiteta nego one koji ne koriste vanjske resurse.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන් පිටිපස්සේ තොරතුරු සමහර විශ්වාස කරනවා, නැත්තම් ලෝකය දන්නවන්, අපි කැමතියි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පාළුවන මේ පත්තරේ අපි වැඩක් සහ මොඩේල් වල් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් අරගෙන යන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි විශේෂයෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: වෙබ් ලිපිණියක් විතරයි, වෙබ් ලිපිණියක් විතරයි, ම මේ කාර්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ භාෂාවක් වර්ගයක් වලින් වර්ගයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විස්තර දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය LSTM මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා පුරුද්ධ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ පුර', 'sv': 'Människor tolkar texter utifrån viss bakgrundsinformation, eller världskunskap, och vi vill utveckla automatiska läsförståelsesystem som kan göra detsamma. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en uppgift och flera modeller för att driva utvecklingen mot detta mål. I synnerhet föreslår vi uppgiften att förutsäga sällsynta entiteter: givet ett webbdokument med flera entiteter borttagna, har modellerna i uppgift att förutsäga rätt saknade entiteter beroende på dokumentets kontext och lexikala resurser. Denna uppgift är utmanande på grund av mångfalden av språkstilar och det extremt stora antalet sällsynta enheter. Vi föreslår två återkommande neurala nätverksarkitekturer som utnyttjar extern kunskap i form av entitetsbeskrivningar. Våra experiment visar att vår hierarkiska LSTM-modell presterar betydligt bättre på den sällsynta entitetsprediktionsuppgiften än de som inte använder sig av externa resurser.', 'so': 'Humans interpret texts with respect to some background information, or world knowledge, and we would like to develop automatic reading comprehension systems that can do the same.  Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa shaqo iyo tusaalooyin badan in horumarinta loo sii wado goalkan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu horumarinaynaa wax ka sii sheegashada shaqada aqoonta saxda ah: haddii lagu sameeyo warqad internetka oo la guuray qaar jidh ah, waxaa lagu shaqeeyaa sameynta qaabilsan in lagu sii sheegayo jidhka xaqiiqda ah oo ku qoran qoraalka dukumentiga iyo hantida lexicka. Shaqadaasu waa dhibaatooyin badan yahay noocyo kala duduwan oo luqada ah iyo waxyaabaha aad u badan ee qaali ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa laba dhismo ah oo shabakado neuro ah oo soo socda oo isticmaalaya aqoonta dibadda sida qoraalka macluumaadka. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in qaababkayaga LSTM ee hierarchi ah uu si aad uga fiican u sameeyaa shaqada wax la sii sheego ee qaaliga ah oo aan isticmaaleyn maalmaha dibadda.', 'ur': 'انسانوں کی تعبیر کس طرح کے پشتیبانی معلومات کے ساتھ یا دنیا کی علم کے ساتھ ہے، اور ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ خود پڑھنے کی تعبیر سیستموں کی تخلیق کریں جو اس طرح کر سکیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک کام اور بہت سی موڈل پیشرفت کرنے کے لئے پیشرفت کرنے کے لئے پیش کریں گے۔ مخصوصاً ہم ایک کم انٹیٹی پیش بینی کے کام کو پیش بینی کرتے ہیں: چند انٹیٹیوں کے ساتھ ویب دکھانے کے ساتھ ویب دکھانے کے ذریعہ، نمڈیلوں کو دکھانے کے کنٹیسٹ اور لکسیکل سروسیلوں پر مستحکم گم ہونے والے انٹیٹیو یہ کام زبان طریقوں کی مختلف طریقوں کی وجہ سے مشکل ہے اور بہت زیادہ تعداد کمزور چیزوں کی وجہ سے۔ ہم دوبارہ نیورل نیٹ ورک معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو باہر علم کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہماری آزمائش LSTM موڈل کم اچھی طرح کام کرتا ہے ان سے جو بیرون منبع سے استعمال نہیں کرتے۔', 'ta': 'மனிதர்கள் சில பின்னணி தகவல் அல்லது உலக அறிவை பற்றி உரைகளை பொருளாக்குகிறார் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு செயல் மற்றும் பல மாதிரிகளை இந்த இலக்குக்கு முன்னேற்றம் இயக்குவதற்கு அறிவிக்க குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் முன் விரும்புகிறோம்: ஒரு வலைப்பு ஆவணம் நீக்கப்பட்ட பல பொருள்களுடன் கொடுக்கப்பட்டால், மாதிரிகள்  இந்த செயல் சவால் செய்யும் மொழி பாணிகளின் பல்வேறு வகைகளால் மற்றும் மிகவும் குறைந்த சிறிய பொருள்களின் எண நாம் மீண்டும் திரும்பி இரு நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கங்களை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பொருள் விவரிப்பு வடிவத் Our experiments show that our hierarchical LSTM model performs significantly better at the rare entity prediction task than those that do not make use of external resources.', 'vi': 'Loài người hiểu được văn bản dựa trên một số thông tin nền, hay kiến thức thế giới, và chúng tôi muốn phát triển hệ thống hiểu biết tự động có thể làm điều tương tự. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một nhiệm vụ và vài mẫu để hướng tới mục tiêu này. Cụ thể, chúng tôi đề nghị nhiệm vụ dự đoán đối tượng hiếm gặp: dựa trên một tài liệu web với vài thực thể bị gỡ bỏ, các mô- đun có nhiệm vụ dự đoán các thực thể mất tích đúng dựa trên ngữ cảnh tài liệu và các nguồn ngôn ngữ văn bản. Nhiệm vụ này rất khó khăn vì phong cách ngôn ngữ đa dạng và rất nhiều thực thể hiếm gặp. Chúng tôi đề xuất hai kiến trúc dây thần kinh liên tục sử dụng kiến thức bên ngoài dưới dạng mô tả thực thể. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hệ thống LSD của chúng tôi thực hiện tốt hơn rất nhiều trong nhiệm vụ dự đoán đối với thực thể hiếm hơn những thứ không sử dụng nguồn tài nguyên bên ngoài.', 'uz': "Inson bir necha orqa fon maʼlumoti yoki dunyo ilim haqida matnlarni tarjima qiladi. Biz bunday qiladigan kompyuterni avtomatik o'qish tizimini aniqlashni istaysizmi. Bu qogʻozda, biz shu maqsadga harakat qilish uchun vazifa va bir necha modellarni anglatamiz. In particular, we propose the task of rare entity prediction: given a web document with several entities removed, models are tasked with predicting the correct missing entities conditioned on the document context and the lexical resources.  Bu vazifa tilning turli turli turlarining turlari va juda katta qisqarli narsalarning soni sababda murakkab qiladi. Biz ikkita takrorlanadigan tarmoq maktablarini talab qilamiz, bu obʼekt tahrirlarida tashqi narsalarni foydalanish mumkin. Bizning tajribalarimiz esa, bizning hierarchik LSTM modeli tashkilotni ishlatilmagan narsalarning tashkilotni ishlatmaydigan narsalardan juda juda yaxshi ishlaydi.", 'bg': 'Хората интерпретират текстовете по отношение на някаква основна информация или световно познание и ние бихме искали да разработим автоматични системи за разбиране на четенето, които могат да направят същото. В тази статия представяме задача и няколко модела, които да стимулират напредъка към тази цел. По-специално, ние предлагаме задачата за предсказване на редки единици: при даден уеб документ с няколко единици премахнати, моделите са натоварени с предсказване на правилните липсващи единици, обусловени от контекста на документа и лексикалните ресурси. Тази задача е предизвикателна поради многообразието на езиковите стилове и изключително големия брой редки същества. Предлагаме две повтарящи се невронни мрежови архитектури, които използват външни знания под формата на описания на същността. Нашите експерименти показват, че нашият йерархичен модел работи значително по-добре при задачата за предвиждане на редки обекти, отколкото тези, които не използват външни ресурси.', 'nl': 'Mensen interpreteren teksten met betrekking tot enige achtergrondinformatie, of wereldkennis, en we willen graag automatische leesbegripssystemen ontwikkelen die hetzelfde kunnen. In dit artikel introduceren we een taak en verschillende modellen om vooruitgang te boeken in de richting van dit doel. In het bijzonder stellen we de taak voor van zeldzame entiteiten voorspelling: gegeven een webdocument waarbij meerdere entiteiten zijn verwijderd, worden modellen belast met het voorspellen van de juiste ontbrekende entiteiten afhankelijk van de documentcontext en de lexicale bronnen. Deze taak is uitdagend vanwege de diversiteit aan taalstijlen en het extreem grote aantal zeldzame entiteiten. We stellen twee terugkerende neurale netwerkarchitecturen voor die gebruik maken van externe kennis in de vorm van entiteitsbeschrijvingen. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat ons hiërarchische LSTM model aanzienlijk beter presteert bij de zeldzame entiteitsvoorspelling taak dan degenen die geen gebruik maken van externe bronnen.', 'da': 'Mennesker fortolker tekster i forhold til nogle baggrundsoplysninger, eller verdenskendskab, og vi vil gerne udvikle automatiske læseforståelsessystemer, der kan gøre det samme. I denne artikel introducerer vi en opgave og flere modeller til at drive fremskridt mod dette mål. Især foreslår vi opgaven med sjældne entiteter forudsigelse: I betragtning af et webdokument med flere entiteter fjernet, har modellerne til opgave at forudsige de korrekte manglende entiteter betinget af dokumentkonteksten og leksikalske ressourcer. Denne opgave er udfordrende på grund af mangfoldigheden af sprogstilarter og det ekstremt store antal sjældne enheder. Vi foreslår to tilbagevendende neurale netværksarkitekturer, der gør brug af ekstern viden i form af entitetsbeskrivelser. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores hierarkiske LSTM model klarer sig betydeligt bedre til den sjældne entitetsforudsigelsesopgave end dem, der ikke gør brug af eksterne ressourcer.', 'hr': 'Ljudi interpretiraju tekste s obzirom na neke pozadinske informacije ili svjetske znanje, i želimo razviti sisteme automatske razumijevanja čitanja koje mogu učiniti isto. U ovom papiru predstavljamo zadatak i nekoliko modela kako bi se pokrenuli napredak ka ovom cilju. Posebno predlažemo zadatak predviđanja rijetkih entitata: s obzirom na web dokument s nekoliko uklonjenih entitata, modeli su zaduženi predviđanjem ispravnih nestalih entitata pod uvjetom dokumenta i leksičkih resursa. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan zbog raznolikosti jezičkih stilova i izuzetno velikog broja rijetkih entitata. Predlažemo dvije rekonstruirane arhitekture neuralne mreže koje koriste vanjske znanje u obliku opisa entiteta. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš hijerarhički LSTM model izvodi značajno bolje na zadatku predviđanja rijetkih entitata nego one koji ne koriste vanjske resurse.', 'id': 'Manusia menerjemahkan teks mengenai beberapa informasi latar belakang, atau pengetahuan dunia, dan kami ingin mengembangkan sistem pemahaman pembacaan otomatis yang dapat melakukan hal yang sama. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan tugas dan beberapa model untuk mendorong kemajuan menuju tujuan ini. Terutama, kami mengusulkan tugas prediksi entitas langka: diberikan dokumen web dengan beberapa entitas dihapus, model ditugaskan untuk prediksi entitas yang hilang yang benar tergantung pada konteks dokumen dan sumber daya lexik. Tugas ini menantang karena kebanyakan gaya bahasa dan jumlah yang sangat besar entitas langka. Kami mengusulkan dua arsitektur jaringan saraf yang berulang-ulang yang menggunakan pengetahuan luar dalam bentuk deskripsi entitas. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa model LSTM hierarkis kami melakukan lebih baik pada tugas prediksi entitas langka daripada yang tidak menggunakan sumber daya luar.', 'de': 'Menschen interpretieren Texte in Bezug auf Hintergrundinformationen oder Weltwissen, und wir möchten automatische Leseverständnissysteme entwickeln, die dasselbe können. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Aufgabe und mehrere Modelle vor, um Fortschritte auf diesem Weg voranzutreiben. Insbesondere schlagen wir die Aufgabe der Vorhersage seltener Entitäten vor: Wenn ein Webdokument mit mehreren Entitäten entfernt wird, sind Modelle mit der Vorhersage der korrekten fehlenden Entitäten beauftragt, abhängig vom Dokumentkontext und den lexikalischen Ressourcen. Diese Aufgabe ist aufgrund der Vielfalt der Sprachstile und der extrem großen Anzahl seltener Entitäten anspruchsvoll. Wir schlagen zwei rezidivierende neuronale Netzwerkarchitekturen vor, die externes Wissen in Form von Entitätsbeschreibungen nutzen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unser hierarchisches LSTM-Modell bei der seltenen Entitätsvorhersageaufgabe deutlich besser abschneidet als solche, die keine externen Ressourcen verwenden.', 'ko': '인류는 일부 배경 정보나 세계 지식에 따라 텍스트를 해석하는데 우리는 자동 읽기 이해 시스템을 개발하고 이를 할 수 있기를 바란다.본고에서 우리는 이 목표를 향해 전진하도록 추진하는 임무와 몇 가지 모델을 소개했다.특히 우리는 보기 드문 실체 예측 임무를 제시했다. 여러 개의 실체를 삭제한 웹 문서를 정하고 모델의 임무는 문서의 상하문과 어휘 자원에 따라 정확한 실체 부족을 예측하는 것이다.언어 풍격의 다양성과 수량이 매우 방대한 희귀 실체 때문에 이 임무는 도전적이다.우리는 실체 묘사 형식의 외부 지식을 이용한 두 가지 귀속 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시했다.우리의 실험은 외부 자원을 사용하지 않는 모델에 비해 우리의 층별 LSTM 모델이 희귀한 실체 예측 임무에서 더욱 잘 나타난다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Watu wanatafsiri maandishi kwa kuhusiana na baadhi ya taarifa za nyuma, au ufahamu wa dunia, na tunapenda kuendeleza mfumo wa kujisomea binafsi ambao unaweza kufanya hivyo. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha kazi na mifano kadhaa ya kuendesha hatua hii. Kwa hakika, tunapendekeza jukumu la utabiri nadra: kwa kutumia nyaraka ya mtandaoni yenye vitu kadhaa vilivyoondolewa, mifano inafanywa na kutabiri vifaa vinavyopotea sahihi vilivyowekwa katika muktadha wa nyaraka na rasilimali za lexico. Kazi hii inachangamoto kutokana na tofauti za aina za lugha na idadi kubwa sana ya vitu vidogo. Tunawapendekeza majengo mawili yanayoendelea katika mtandao wa neura ambazo hutumia maarifa ya nje kwa namna ya maelezo ya entity. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu wa LSTM unafanya vizuri zaidi katika kazi ya kutabiri nadra kuliko wale ambao hawatumii rasilimali za nje.', 'tr': 'İnsanlar arkaplan bilgileri we dünýä bilgileri barada metinleri terjime edip otyrýarlar. Biz şonuň ýaly edip biljek awtomatik okama sistemlerini geliştirmek isleýäris. Bu kagyzda biz bu maksadyň ýerini ýönetmek üçin bir zady we birnäçe nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys. Aýratyn bolsa, biz nadir bir zatlaryň tahmini teklip edip otyrýarys: birnäçe taýdan edilen web senedi berilýär, nusgalar sened kontekstinde we leksiýaly çeşmelerde mümkin däl taýýarlanan zady täze tahmin etmek üçin zada tapylýar. Bu zady dil stilleriniň näçe görnüşinden we iň köp sanlarynyň aňsatly kynçylygyna görä kynçylyklaşýar. Biz daşarydaky bilim şeklinde birnäçe tekrarly näral aýry arhitektarlaryny maslahat berýäris. Biziň deneylerimiz iýerarhiýa LSTM nusgasymyz daşarydaky çeşmeleri ulanmaýanlardan has gowy işleýär.', 'fa': 'مردم متن ها را با احترام اطلاعات پشتیبانی یا دانش جهانی تعبیر می کنند، و ما می خواهیم سیستم\u200cهای درک خودکار را توسعه کنیم که می\u200cتوانند همین کار را انجام دهند. در این کاغذ، ما یک کار و چندین مدل را معرفی می کنیم تا پیشرفت به سوی این هدف رانندگی کنیم. مخصوصا، ما وظیفه پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای شرکت نادر را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: به عنوان یک سند وب با چند شرکت برداشته شده، مدل\u200cها با پیش\u200cبینی از شرکت\u200cهای درست گم شده را در محیط سند و منابع زبان\u200cشناسی انجام می\u200cدهند. این وظیفه به دلیل مختلف استیلهای زبان و تعداد بسیار بزرگی از موجودات نادر مشکل دارد. ما دو معماری شبکه عصبی دوباره پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از دانش خارجی در شکل توضیح عنوان استفاده می\u200cکنند. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که مدل LSTM قانونی ما در کار پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای شرکت کمی بهتر از آن\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد که از منابع خارجی استفاده نمی\u200cکنند.', 'am': 'ሰዎች ጽሑፎችን በአንዳንዱ የመደቡን መረጃ ወይም የዓለም እውቀት ላይ ይተርጉማሉ፤ እናም ያንን ማድረግ የሚችሉትን የአስታተም ማነብ ስርዓት ማድረግ እንፈልጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ፣ የስራ እና ለዚህ አቃውሞ ለመነዳት ብዙዎችን ምሳሌዎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የራሱ አካል ጉዳይ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳስባታለን፤ የዌብ ሰነዱን በብዙ አካላት በተነሳቀው፣ ሞዴሎቹ በሰነዱ ክፍል እና የሊክሲካሲ ሀብት ላይ የተመሳሰለውን የእውነቱ አካላትን በመቀበል ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ ይህ ስራ የቋንቋ ዓይነቶች ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እና እጅግ በጣም ትንሽ አካል ነው፡፡ ሁለትን የሚቀጥለው የደዌብ መረብ መሠረት መሠረት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የኤርተርክ LSTM ሞዴል ከውጭ ሀብት ከማይጠቀም በላይ ትንሽ ውይይት በሚያሳየው አካባቢ ስራ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'af': "Mense verduidelik tekste met respek na sommige agtergrond inligting, of wêreld kennis, en ons wil graag om outomatiese lees verstaan stelsels te ontwikkel wat dieselfde kan doen. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n taak en verskeie modele om vordering na hierdie doel te dra. In spesifieke voorstel ons die taak van selfde entiteitvoorskou: gegewe 'n web dokument met verskeie entiteite verwyder, modele word opgestel met die voorskou van die korrekte ontbrekende entiteite wat op die dokumentkonteks en die leksiese hulpbronne bevestig is. Hierdie taak is uitgelyk vanweë die verskeidigheid van talestyle en die ekstrem groot aantal selfde entiteite. Ons voorstel twee herhaalde neuralnetwerk arkitektuure wat gebruik van eksterne kennis in die vorm van entiteitbeskrywings. Ons eksperimente wys dat ons hierarkies LSTM model beter uitvoer by die selfde entiteitvoorskou taak as die wat nie gebruik van eksterne hulpbronne maak nie.", 'sq': 'Njerëzit interpretojnë tekstet lidhur me disa informacione të sfondit, apo njohuri botërore, dhe ne do të donim të zhvillonim sisteme automatike të kuptimit të leximit që mund të bëjnë të njëjtën gjë. Në këtë letër, ne prezantojmë një detyrë dhe disa modele për të nxitur përparimin drejt këtij qëllimi. Në veçanti, ne propozojmë detyrën e parashikimit të njësive të rralla: duke pasur parashikimin e një dokumenti web me disa njësi të hequr, modelet janë detyruar të parashikojnë njësitë e sakta të sakta të kushtuar nga konteksti i dokumentit dhe burimet lexike. Kjo detyrë është sfiduese për shkak të diversitetit të stileve gjuhësore dhe numrit të madh ekstremisht të njësive të rralla. Ne propozojmë dy arkitektura të rrjetit neural të përsëritur që përdorin njohuri të jashtme në form ën e përshkrimit të njësisë. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se modeli jonë hierarkik LSTM performon ndjeshëm më mirë në detyrën e rrallë parashikimi të njësisë se ato që nuk përdorin burimet e jashtme.', 'bn': 'Humans interpret texts with respect to some background information, or world knowledge, and we would like to develop automatic reading comprehension systems that can do the same.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটা কাজ এবং বেশ কয়েকটি মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই এই লক্ষ্যের দিকে এগিয়ে যাওয়ার জন্য। বিশেষ করে, আমরা দুর্লভ বৈশিষ্ট্যের ভবিষ্যতার কাজ প্রস্তাব করি: বেশ কয়েকটি বস্তু অপসারিত একটি ওয়েব নথি দিয়ে মডেলের দায়িত্ব প্রদান করা হয়েছে যার ফলে নথিপত্ ভাষা স্টাইলের বৈচিত্র্যের কারণে এই কাজ চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে এবং অত্যন্ত কঠিন বিশাল সংখ্যা। আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো যারা বাইরের জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে বস্তুর বর্ণনার মাধ্যমে। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের হায়েরার্কিল এলস্টিএম মডেল অনেক ভালো কাজ করছে যারা বাইরের সম্পদ ব্যবহার করে না।', 'hy': 'Մարդիկ թարգմանում են տեքստերը որոշ հետնային ինֆորմացիայի կամ աշխարհային գիտելիքների վերաբերյալ, և մենք ցանկանում ենք զարգացնել ավտոմատիկ կարդալու ընկալումների համակարգեր, որոնք կարող են նույնը անել: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի խնդիր և մի քանի մոդելներ առաջընթացի ուղղությամբ դեպի այս նպատակը: Մենք հատկապես առաջարկում ենք հազվադեպ էության կանխատեսման առաջադրանքը. հաշվի առնելով վեբ-փաստաթղթին, որտեղ բազմաթիվ էակներ են վերացվել, մոդելները պարտադիր են կանխատեսել ճիշտ կորցված էակները, որոնք կախված են փաստաթղթի Այս խնդիրը դժվար է լեզվի ոճերի բազմազանության և հազվադեպ էության չափազանց մեծ քանակի պատճառով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություն, որոնք օգտագործում են արտաքին գիտելիքները առանձնահատկությունների նկարագրման ձևով: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր հիերարխիկ LSMT մոդելը շատ ավելի լավ է աշխատում հազվադեպ էության կանխատեսման խնդրում, քան նրանք, ովքեր արտաքին ռեսուրսներ չեն օգտագործում:', 'bs': 'Ljudi interpretiraju tekste u odnosu na neke pozadinske informacije ili svjetske znanje, i želimo razviti sisteme automatske razumijevanja čitanja koje mogu učiniti isto. U ovom papiru predstavljamo zadatak i nekoliko modela da se pokrenu napredak ka ovom cilju. Posebno predlažemo zadatak predviđanja rijetkih entiteta: s obzirom na web dokument s nekoliko uklonjenih entitata, modeli su zaduženi predviđanjem pravih nestalih entitata pod uvjetom dokumenta i leksičkih resursa. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan zbog raznolikosti jezičkih stilova i izuzetno velikog broja rijetkih entitata. Predlažemo dva rekonstruirana arhitektura neuralne mreže koja koriste vanjske znanje u obliku opisa entiteta. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš hijerarhički LSTM model izvodi značajno bolje na zadatku predviđanja rijetkih entiteta nego one koji ne koriste vanjske resurse.', 'az': 'ńįnsanlar arxa plan m…ôlumatlarńĪna v…ô ya d√ľnya elmi haqqńĪnda m…ôlumatlarńĪ t…ôfsil edir v…ô biz d…ô bunu ed…ô bil…ôc…ôk avtomatik oxumaq sisteml…ôrini t…ôhsil etm…ôk ist…ôyirik. Bu kańüńĪzda, bu m…ôqs…ôdil…ô t…ôdbir g√∂st…ôrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir iŇü v…ô bir ne√ß…ô modeli t…ôŇükil edirik. √Ėzellikle, biz nadir t…ôdbirl…ôrin t√∂vsiy…ôsini t…ôblińü edirik: bir ne√ß…ô m…ôlumat alńĪnmńĪŇü web s…ôhif…ôsin…ô g√∂r…ô, modell…ôr s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin v…ô leksik resurslarńĪn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü dońüru √ßńĪxmńĪŇü m…ôlumatlarńĪn t…ôdbirl…ônm…ôsini t…ômin edirl…ôr. Bu iŇüin dil still…ôrinin m√ľxt…ôlifliyin…ô v…ô √ßox nadir hiss…ôl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô √ß…ôtinlik edir. Biz birc…ô d…ôf…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik n√∂ral ańü arhitektarńĪnńĪ t…ôblińü edirik ki, bu d…ôyiŇüiklik tanńĪmlamasńĪ kimi dńĪŇü bilgi istifad…ô ed…ôrl…ôr. Bizim t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimiz hiyerarŇüik LSTM modeliyimiz dńĪŇü resurslardan istifad…ô etm…ôy…ônl…ôrd…ôn daha xeyirli olar.', 'ca': "Els humans interpreten textos en relació a alguna informació de fons, o coneixement mundial, i ens agradaria desenvolupar sistemes de comprensió automàtica de llectura que puguin fer el mateix. En aquest paper, introduïm una tasca i varis models per impulsar el progrés cap a aquest objectiu. En particular, proposem la tasca de predicció d'entitats rares: dada un document web amb diverses entitats eliminades, els models tenen la tasca de predir les entitats que falten correctament condicionades amb el context del document i els recursos lèxics. Aquesta tasca és desafiadora degut a la diversitat dels estils lingüístics i al gran nombre d'entitats rares. Proposem dues arquitectures recurrents de xarxa neural que utilitzen coneixements externs en forma de descripcions d'entitats. Els nostres experiments demostren que el nostre model jeràrquic LSTM funciona significativament millor en la tasca de predicció d'entitats rares que aquells que no utilitzen recursos externs.", 'et': 'Inimesed tõlgendavad tekste taustainfo või maailma teadmiste põhjal ning me sooviksime välja töötada automaatsed lugemise mõistmise süsteemid, mis suudavad sama teha. Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame ülesannet ja mitmeid mudeleid selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks. Eelkõige pakume välja haruldaste üksuste ennustamise ülesande: arvestades veebidokumenti, kus mitu üksust eemaldatakse, on mudelite ülesanne ennustada õigeid puuduvaid üksusi, olenevalt dokumendi kontekstist ja leksikaalsetest ressurssidest. See ülesanne on keelestiilide mitmekesisuse ja haruldaste üksuste äärmiselt suure arvu tõttu keeleline. Pakume välja kaks korduvat neurovõrgu arhitektuuri, mis kasutavad väliseid teadmisi olemikirjelduste kujul. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et meie hierarhiline LSTM mudel toimib haruldaste üksuste prognoosimise ülesandes oluliselt paremini kui need, mis ei kasuta välisressursse.', 'fi': 'Ihmiset tulkitsevat tekstejä taustatiedon tai maailmankuvan perusteella, ja haluaisimme kehittää automaattisia lukemisen ymmärtämisjärjestelmiä, jotka pystyvät samaan. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme tehtävän ja useita malleja, joilla edistetään tämän tavoitteen saavuttamista. Erityisesti ehdotamme harvinaisten entiteettien ennustamisen tehtävää: kun otetaan huomioon web-dokumentti, jossa useita entiteettejä on poistettu, mallien tehtävänä on ennustaa oikeat puuttuvat entiteetit dokumentin kontekstin ja sanaston resurssien mukaan. Tämä tehtävä on haastava kielityylien moninaisuuden ja harvinaisten kokonaisuuksien erittäin suuren määrän vuoksi. Ehdotamme kahta toistuvaa neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria, jotka hyödyntävät ulkoista tietoa entiteettikuvausten muodossa. Kokeemme osoittavat, että hierarkkinen LSTM-mallimme suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin harvinaisten kokonaisuuksien ennustamistehtävässä kuin ne, jotka eivät käytä ulkoisia resursseja.', 'cs': 'Lidé interpretují texty s ohledem na nějaké podkladové informace nebo znalosti světa a my bychom rádi vyvinuli automatické systémy porozumění čtení, které dokážou totéž. V tomto článku představujeme úkol a několik modelů, které vedou k pokroku směrem k tomuto cíli. Konkrétně navrhujeme úlohu predikce vzácných entit: vzhledem k webovému dokumentu s odstraněním několika entit jsou modely pověřeny predikcí správných chybějících entit podmíněných kontextem dokumentu a lexikálními zdroji. Tento úkol je náročný vzhledem k rozmanitosti jazykových stylů a extrémně velkému počtu vzácných entit. Navrhujeme dvě rekurentní architektury neuronových sítí, které využívají externích znalostí formou popisů entit. Naše experimenty ukazují, že náš hierarchický LSTM model vede výrazně lépe při predikci vzácných entit než ty, které nevyužívají externích zdrojů.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerngerti pergambar gambaran seneng nggawe informasi layar kanggo ngerasah karo awak dhéwé, lan awak dhéwé kepengin nggawe sistem sing bisa nguasai pergambar obah-obahan sing bisa ngelarang kuwi iki. Nang pember iki, kita mulai nggawe task lan akeh model sing bisa dadi bisa dumadhi iki dadi. Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan Entité sampeyan: wong web dokumen karo sijih sampeyan karo akeh Entité: model sing dianggantawak dhéwé sampeyan karo prebudhak sampeyan akeh sing paling dhéwé kuwi kontext sampeyan karo akeh langgar sampeyan. Perintah iki lak segala sak duluran ning sampeyan akeh dilané, lan akeh dumadhi sing akeh barang sampeyan. Awak dhéwé ngerasah akeh sing nyerungan alat iki, iki dadi seneng pisan kelamèh dumadhi kaé bakal nggawe barang kelamèh dumadhi iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk sing ngomong nik model sing paling-alahku, iso nglanggar barang kelas supaya winih sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi jenis sing ora bisa nggawe barang nggawe winih dhéwé.', 'he': 'בני אדם מפרשים טקסטים בנוגע למידע רקע מסוים, או ידע עולמי, ואנחנו רוצים לפתח מערכות הבנה אוטומטית לקריאה שיכולות לעשות את אותו הדבר. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים משימה וכמה דוגמנים כדי להוביל התקדמות לכיוון המטרה הזאת. במיוחד, אנו מציעים את המשימה של חיזוי ישויות נדירות: בהתחשב במסמך אינטרנט עם כמה ישויות הוסרות, מודלים מועמדים לחזוי את היחידות הנכונות הנעדרות בהתאם בקשר המסמך והמשאבים הלקסיים. המשימה הזאת מאתגרת בגלל מגוון של סגנוני שפה ומספר גדול מאוד של ישויות נדירות. We propose two recurrent neural network architectures which make use of external knowledge in the form of entity descriptions.  הניסויים שלנו מראים שהדוגמאל הייררכי שלנו LSTM מבצע טוב יותר משמעותי בתפקיד חזיון היחידות נדיר מאשר אלה שלא משתמשים במשאבים חיצוניים.', 'ha': "Mutane sunã fassarar littãfi game da some information na bangon bangon, ko da ilmi ga duniya, kuma munã so kwaɗayin mu buɗa'ura masu karantawa farat ɗaya, da za'a iya aikata kamar wannan. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wani aikin da wasu misãlai da za'a tafiyar gaba-gaba zuwa wannan goan. Kayyade, Munã buɗa aikin bayani na masu sauri: a sami wata takardar web da aka tafiyar da wasu abubuwa, za'a yi amfani da misalin misalin abubuwan da ke da tsarin mazaɓa a cikin mazaɓan takardar da kuma ma'anar leksisi. Wannan aikin yana tsõratar da wa'yan nau'in harshe da yawan abun da suka fi girma. Tuna goyyar da bakin tarakiki biyu masu karin neura da ke amfani da ilmi bakwai cikin tsarin maɓallin abun. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa misalinmu na hiirarki LSSM yana aiki mai girma ga aikin bayani na shaidar abubuwa masu nadwai daga waɗanda ba su yi amfani da abincin bakwai.", 'sk': 'Ljudje razlagajo besedila glede na nekatere osnovne informacije oziroma svetovno znanje, zato bi radi razvili sisteme samodejnega razumevanja branja, ki lahko storijo enako. V prispevku predstavljamo nalogo in več modelov za spodbujanje napredka v smeri tega cilja. Predlagamo zlasti nalogo napovedovanja redkih entitet: glede na spletni dokument z odstranjenimi več entitetami so modeli zadolženi za napovedovanje pravilnih manjkajočih entitet, pogojenih s kontekstom dokumenta in leksikalnimi viri. Ta naloga je zahtevna zaradi raznolikosti jezikovnih slogov in izjemno velikega števila redkih entitet. Predlagamo dve ponavljajoči se arhitekturi nevronskih omrežij, ki uporabljata zunanje znanje v obliki opisov entitet. Naši poskusi kažejo, da je naš hierarhični model LSTM bistveno boljši pri nalogi napovedovanja redkih entitet kot tisti, ki ne uporabljajo zunanjih virov.', 'bo': 'Humans interpret texts with respect to some background information, or world knowledge, and we want to develop automatic reading comprehension systems that can do the same. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་མིག In particular, we propose the task of rare entity prediction: given a web document with several entities removed, models are tasked with predicting the correct missing entities conditioned on the document context and the lexical resources. སྐད་ཡིག་བཟོ་རྣམ་དང་དབྱེ་བ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་ཚད་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་ཐོག་གཉིས་བ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our experiments show that our hierarchical LSTM model performs significantly better at the rare entity prediction task than those that do not use external resources.'}
{'en': 'Two-Stage Synthesis Networks for Transfer Learning in Machine Comprehension', 'ar': 'شبكات التركيب ذات المرحلتين لنقل التعلم في الفهم الآلي', 'fr': "Réseaux de synthèse en deux étapes pour l'apprentissage par transfert en compréhension automatique", 'es': 'Redes de síntesis de dos etapas para transferir el aprendizaje en la comprensión automática', 'pt': 'Redes de síntese de dois estágios para aprendizado de transferência em compreensão de máquina', 'ja': '機械理解における転送学習のための2段階合成ネットワーク', 'zh': '以机器解迁学之两为网络', 'ru': 'Двухступенчатые сети синтеза для передачи обучения в машинном понимании', 'hi': 'मशीन समझ में स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए दो चरण संश्लेषण नेटवर्क', 'ga': "Líonraí Sintéise Dhá Chéim d'Fhoghlaim Aistrithe sa Chuimsiú Meaisín", 'ka': 'მაქსინური კომპრენციაში ტრანსტრების სწავლებისთვის ორ- სტაზი სინტეზის ქსელი', 'el': 'Δισταδικά δίκτυα σύνθεσης για τη μάθηση μεταφοράς στην κατανόηση μηχανών', 'hu': 'Kétlépcsős szintézis hálózatok a transzfer tanuláshoz a gépi értésben', 'it': "Reti di sintesi in due fasi per l'apprendimento di trasferimento nella comprensione automatica", 'mk': 'Две фази синтезички мрежи за преносно учење во машинско разбирање', 'kk': 'Комплексиясындағы аудару оқыту үшін екі қадам синтезалық желіName', 'lt': 'Dviejų etapų sintezės tinklai, skirti mokymuisi perkelti į mašin ų suvokimą', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Sintesis Dua Tahap untuk Belajar Pemindahan dalam Pemahaman Mesin', 'mt': 'Netwerks ta’ Sintesi ta’ Żewġ Stadji għat-Tagħlim tat-Trasferiment fil-Komprensjoni tal-Magni', 'ml': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хоёр-стэж синтезийн сүлжээний шилжүүлэлт машины комплекс дээр суралцах боломжтой', 'no': 'To- stadssyntetiske nettverk for overføringslæring i maskinekomprehension', 'pl': 'Dwustopniowe sieci syntezy dla uczenia się transferowego w zrozumieniu maszyn', 'ro': 'Rețele de sinteză în două etape pentru învățarea transferului în înțelegerea mașinilor', 'sr': 'Dva stadijska sintezna mreža za učenje prijenosa u komprehenziji mašine', 'si': 'දෙකක් ස්ටේජ් සංවිධානය සඳහා මැෂින් සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Shabakada Heshiiska Iswidishka ee laba-bandhig', 'sv': 'Syntesnätverk i två steg för överföring av lärande i maskinförståelse', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ماشین کمپرنسیون میں ترنسفر سیکھانے کے لئے دو سٹیج سینٹس نیٹورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mạng người máy hai giai đoạn để học chuyển khoản về tổng hợp máy', 'bg': 'Двуетапни синтезни мрежи за трансферно обучение в машинното разбиране', 'da': 'To-trins syntese netværk til overførsel af læring i maskinforståelse', 'nl': 'Synthese Netwerken in twee fasen voor Transfer Learning in Machine Comprehension', 'hr': 'Dva stupnja sintezne mreže za učenje prijenosa u komprehenziji strojeva', 'de': 'Zweistufige Synthesenetzwerke für Transfer Learning im maschinellen Verständnis', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Rangkaian Sintesis Dua Tahap untuk Belajar Transfer dalam Pemahaman Mesin', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Uunganishaji wa Vuguvugu mbili kwa Kufundisha Uhamiaji', 'ko': '기계 이해 중 이동 학습의 2단계 종합 네트워크', 'tr': 'Maşynda Öwrenmek üçin İki Staj Sentez Ağları', 'af': 'Twee- Stapel Sintetiseerde Netwerke vir Oordrag Leer in Masjien Komprimensie', 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Rrjetet e sintezës dy-fazore për mësimin e transferimit në kompresimin e makinave', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի ընկալում տեղափոխվող սովորելու երկու աստիճանի սինթեզի ցանցեր', 'az': 'Makinel톛 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n 캻ki Staj Sintez S톛ntl톛ri', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Dva stadijska sintezna mreža za učenje prijenosa u komprehenziji mašine', 'ca': 'Redes de sintèsis en dos etapes per aprendre a transferències en la comprensió de la màquina', 'cs': 'Dvoufázové syntetické sítě pro transferové učení ve strojovém porozumění', 'et': 'Kaheastmelised sünteesivõrgud siirdeõppe jaoks masinateadmises', 'fi': 'Kaksivaiheinen synteesiverkosto siirtooppimiseen koneymmärryksessä', 'he': 'רשתות סינתזיה בשתי שלבים ללמוד העברה בהבנת מכונות', 'jv': 'Two-Stage Sensitis Network for transfer Learning in Masjid Compréncion', 'sk': 'Dvostopenjska sintezna omrežja za prenosno učenje v strojnem razumevanju', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Two-Stage Synthesis Networks for Transfer Learning in Machine Comprehension'}
{'en': 'We develop a technique for transfer learning in machine comprehension (MC) using a novel two-stage synthesis network. Given a high performing MC model in one domain, our technique aims to answer questions about documents in another domain, where we use no labeled data of question-answer pairs. Using the proposed synthesis network with a pretrained model on the SQuAD dataset, we achieve an F1 measure of 46.6 % on the challenging NewsQA dataset, approaching performance of in-domain models (F1 measure of 50.0 %) and outperforming the out-of-domain baseline by 7.6 %, without use of provided annotations.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتطوير تقنية لنقل التعلم في الفهم الآلي (MC) باستخدام شبكة تركيب جديدة من مرحلتين. بالنظر إلى نموذج MC عالي الأداء في مجال واحد ، تهدف تقنيتنا إلى الإجابة على أسئلة حول المستندات في مجال آخر ، حيث لا نستخدم بيانات معنونة لأزواج من الأسئلة والأجوبة. باستخدام شبكة التوليف المقترحة مع نموذج تم اختباره مسبقًا على مجموعة بيانات SQuAD ، نحقق مقياس F1 بنسبة 46.6 ٪ على مجموعة بيانات NewsQA الصعبة ، وتقترب من أداء النماذج داخل المجال (مقياس F1 بنسبة 50.0 ٪) وتفوقنا على خارج المجال خط الأساس بنسبة 7.6٪ ، دون استخدام التعليقات التوضيحية المقدمة.', 'es': 'Desarrollamos una técnica para el aprendizaje de transferencia en la comprensión automática (MC) utilizando una novedosa red de síntesis de dos etapas. Dado un modelo de MC de alto rendimiento en un dominio, nuestra técnica tiene como objetivo responder preguntas sobre documentos en otro dominio, donde no utilizamos datos etiquetados de pares de preguntas y respuestas. Mediante el uso de la red de síntesis propuesta con un modelo previamente entrenado en el conjunto de datos sQuad, logramos una medida F1 del 46,6% en el desafiante conjunto de datos NewsQA, acercándonos al rendimiento de los modelos dentro del dominio (medida F1 del 50,0%) y superando el nivel de referencia fuera del dominio en un 7,6%, sin el uso de las anotaciones proporcionadas.', 'fr': "Nous développons une technique d'apprentissage par transfert en compréhension automatique (MC) à l'aide d'un nouveau réseau de synthèse en deux étapes. Compte tenu d'un modèle MC très performant dans un domaine, notre technique vise à répondre à des questions sur des documents d'un autre domaine, où nous n'utilisons aucune donnée étiquetée de paires question-réponse. En utilisant le réseau de synthèse proposé avec un modèle préentraîné sur l'ensemble de données sQuAD, nous obtenons une mesure F1 de 46,6\xa0% sur le jeu de données NewsQA difficile, approchant les performances des modèles dans le domaine (mesure F1 de 50,0\xa0%) et surpassant la référence hors domaine de 7,6\xa0%, sans utiliser les annotations fournies.", 'pt': 'Desenvolvemos uma técnica para transferência de aprendizado em compreensão de máquina (MC) usando uma nova rede de síntese de dois estágios. Dado um modelo de MC de alto desempenho em um domínio, nossa técnica visa responder perguntas sobre documentos em outro domínio, onde não usamos dados rotulados de pares pergunta-resposta. Usando a rede de síntese proposta com um modelo pré-treinado no conjunto de dados SQuAD, alcançamos uma medida F1 de 46,6% no conjunto de dados NewsQA desafiador, aproximando o desempenho dos modelos no domínio (medida F1 de 50,0%) e superando o desempenho fora do domínio linha de base em 7,6%, sem uso de anotações fornecidas.', 'ja': '機械理解（ MC ）における転送学習のための技術を、新規の2段階合成ネットワークを用いて開発した。1つのドメインで高性能なMCモデルを使用することを考慮して、当社のテクニックは、質問-回答ペアのラベル付けされたデータを使用しない別のドメインのドキュメントに関する質問に答えることを目的としています。SQuADデータセット上に事前に訓練されたモデルを備えた提案された合成ネットワークを使用して、私たちは、提供された注釈を使用することなく、困難なNewsQAデータセット上で46.6 ％のF 1メジャーを達成し、ドメイン内モデルのパフォーマンスに近づき（ 50.0 ％のF 1メジャー）、ドメイン外ベースラインを7.6 ％上回ります。', 'hi': 'हम एक उपन्यास दो-चरण संश्लेषण नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके मशीन समझ (एमसी) में स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए एक तकनीक विकसित करते हैं। एक डोमेन में एक उच्च प्रदर्शन करने वाले एमसी मॉडल को देखते हुए, हमारी तकनीक का उद्देश्य दूसरे डोमेन में दस्तावेजों के बारे में सवालों के जवाब देना है, जहां हम प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े के लेबल किए गए डेटा का उपयोग नहीं करते हैं। SQuAD डेटासेट पर एक पूर्वप्रशिक्षित मॉडल के साथ प्रस्तावित संश्लेषण नेटवर्क का उपयोग करते हुए, हम चुनौतीपूर्ण NewsQA डेटासेट पर 46.6% का F1 उपाय प्राप्त करते हैं, इन-डोमेन मॉडल (50.0% का F1 माप) के प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचते हैं और प्रदान किए गए एनोटेशन के उपयोग के बिना आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन बेसलाइन को 7.6% तक आउट-परफॉर्म करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Разработана методика трансферного обучения в машинном понимании (МС) с использованием новой двухступенчатой сети синтеза. Учитывая высокую эффективность модели MC в одном домене, наша методика нацелена на ответы на вопросы о документах в другом домене, где мы не используем помеченные данные пар вопрос-ответ. Используя предлагаемую сеть синтеза с предварительно обученной моделью на наборе данных SQuAD, мы достигаем показателя F1 46,6% на сложном наборе данных NewsQA, приближаясь к показателям внутридоменных моделей (показатель F1 50,0%) и опережая внедоменную базовую линию на 7,6%, без использования предоставленных аннотаций.', 'zh': '开一用新型合网络机器解(MC)迁学。 给定一域之高性能MC模形,吾术指答一域之文档,吾不用问对之数。 用所合成网络、SQuAD数集上之预训模形,吾于有挑战性之NewsQA数集上成46.6%之F1,近域内之性(F1量为50.0%),而于不供注者比域外基线高7.6%。', 'ga': 'Forbraímid teicníc le haghaidh foghlama aistrithe sa mheaisínthuiscint (MC) ag baint úsáide as líonra sintéise dhá chéim nua. I bhfianaise mhúnla ardfheidhmíochta MC i bhfearann amháin, tá sé mar aidhm ag ár dteicníc ceisteanna a fhreagairt faoi dhoiciméid i bhfearann eile, áit nach n-úsáidimid aon sonraí lipéadaithe de phéirí ceisteanna-freagra. Ag baint úsáide as an líonra sintéise molta le múnla réamhoilte ar thacar sonraí SQuAD, bainimid amach tomhas F1 de 46.6% ar thacar sonraí dúshlánach NewsQA, ag druidim le feidhmíocht na samhlacha in-fearainn (tomhas F1 de 50.0%) agus ag déanamh níos fearr leis an lasmuigh den fhearann. bonnlíne 7.6%, gan úsáid a bhaint as nótaí a cuireadh ar fáil.', 'hu': 'Egy új kétlépcsős szintézis hálózat segítségével fejlesztünk ki egy transzfer tanulási technikát a gépi megértésben (MC). Tekintettel arra, hogy egy területen nagy teljesítményű MC modellre, technikánk célja, hogy válaszoljon egy másik területen lévő dokumentumokkal kapcsolatos kérdésekre, ahol nem használunk kérdés-válasz párok címkézett adatait. A javasolt szintézis hálózat alkalmazásával az SQUAD adatkészleten előkészített modellel 46,6%-os F1 mértéket érünk el a kihívást jelentő NewsQA adatkészleten, közelítve a tartományonbeli modellek teljesítményét (F1 mértéke 50,0%) és 7,6%-kal túllépve a tartományon kívüli alapkészletet.', 'el': 'Αναπτύσσουμε μια τεχνική για την εκμάθηση μεταφοράς στη μηχανική κατανόηση χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νέο δίκτυο σύνθεσης δύο σταδίων. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ένα μοντέλο υψηλής απόδοσης σε έναν τομέα, η τεχνική μας στοχεύει να απαντήσει σε ερωτήσεις σχετικά με έγγραφα σε έναν άλλο τομέα, όπου δεν χρησιμοποιούμε δεδομένα με ετικέτα από ζεύγη ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων. Χρησιμοποιώντας το προτεινόμενο δίκτυο σύνθεσης με ένα προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο στο σύνολο δεδομένων επιτυγχάνουμε ένα μέτρο F1 46,6% στο απαιτητικό σύνολο δεδομένων NewsQA, προσεγγίζοντας την απόδοση των μοντέλων εντός τομέα (μέτρο F1 50,0%) και ξεπερνώντας τη γραμμή εκτός τομέα κατά 7,6%, χωρίς χρήση παρεχόμενων σχολίων.', 'kk': 'Біз компьютердің түсініктері (MC) арқылы екі этап синтезатор желінде оқыту техникасын жасаймыз. Бір доменде жоғары оқу MC моделі болса, біздің техникамыз басқа домендегі құжаттар туралы сұрақтарды жауап беруге мақсат береді. Біз сұрақ-жауап екеуінің мәліметі қолданбаған. SQuAD деректер қорларындағы синтезатор желіне қолданылатын синтезатор үлгісін қолдану үшін, NewsQA деректер қорларындағы 46,6% деңгейін F1 өлшемін жеткіземіз, домендық моделдерінің (50,0% деңгейіндегі F1 өлшемі және 7,6% деңгейіндегі негізгі деңгейінде жұмыс істеу үшін', 'it': "Sviluppiamo una tecnica per il trasferimento di apprendimento nella comprensione automatica (MC) utilizzando una nuova rete di sintesi a due stadi. Dato un modello MC ad alte prestazioni in un dominio, la nostra tecnica mira a rispondere a domande su documenti in un altro dominio, dove non utilizziamo dati etichettati di coppie domanda-risposta. Utilizzando la rete di sintesi proposta con un modello pre-addestrato sul set di dati SQUAD, raggiungiamo una misura F1 del 46,6% sul set di dati NewsQA impegnativo, avvicinandoci alle prestazioni dei modelli in-domain (misura F1 del 50,0%) e superando del 7,6% la baseline out-of-domain senza l'uso di annotazioni fornite.", 'mk': 'Развиваме техника за трансфер на учење во машинско разбирање (MC) користејќи нова двофазиска мрежа на синтеза. Со оглед на високо функционален модел на MC во еден домен, нашата техника има за цел одговор на прашања за документите во друг домен, каде што не користиме означени податоци од парови прашања-одговори. Користејќи ја предложената синтезиска мрежа со предобучен модел на SQuAD датотеката, постигнуваме мерка F1 од 46,6 отсто на предизвикувачкиот NewsQA датотек, приближувајќи се до резултатите на моделите во домен (мерка F1 од 50,0 отсто) и надминувајќи ја основата надвор од домен за 7,6 отсто, без користење на обезбедените анотации.', 'ms': 'Kami mengembangkan teknik untuk pemindahan belajar dalam pemahaman mesin (MC) menggunakan rangkaian sintesis dua tahap novel. Berdasarkan model MC yang berfungsi tinggi dalam satu domain, teknik kami bermaksud menjawab soalan mengenai dokumen dalam domain lain, di mana kami tidak menggunakan data yang ditabel pasangan soalan-jawapan. Dengan menggunakan rangkaian sintesis yang diusulkan dengan model terlatih di set data SQuAD, kami mencapai ukuran F1 46.6% pada set data NewsQA yang mencabar, mendekati prestasi model dalam domain (ukuran F1 50.0%) dan melampaui dasar luar domain dengan 7.6%, tanpa menggunakan anotasi yang diberikan.', 'lt': 'Mes plėtojame mokymosi perdavimo mašin ų supratimo (MC) metodą naudojant naują dviejų etapų sintezės tinklą. Atsižvelgiant į aukšto lygio MC model į vienoje srityje, mūsų metodu siekiama atsakyti į klausimus dėl dokumentų kitose srityse, kur nenaudojame pažymėtų klausimų ir atsakymų poros duomenų. Naudodami siūlomą sintezės tinklą su iš anksto parengtu SQuAD duomenų rinkinio modeliu, pasiekiame 46,6 proc. F1 rodiklį sunkiame NewsQA duomenų rinkinyje, artėjame prie domeno modelių veiklos rezultatų (50,0 proc. F1 rodiklis) ir 7,6 proc. viršijame ne domeno bazinę vertę, nenaudojant pateiktų anotacijų.', 'ml': 'നോവല്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജ് സിന്\u200dറീസ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ടെ ഒരു ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d എംസി മോഡല്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നത് കൊണ്ട്, മറ്റൊരു ഡൊമെയിനിലെ രേഖകളെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d നമ് സ്ക്വാഡ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച സിന്\u200dറീസ് ശെര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വിലപാട് 46. 6% ന്യൂസ്ക്യാ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ വിലപിടിക്കുന', 'mt': 'Aħna niżviluppaw teknika għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment fil-komprensjoni tal-magni (MC) bl-użu ta’ netwerk ġdid ta’ sinteżi f’żewġ stadji. Minħabba mudell MC ta’ prestazzjoni għolja f’qasam wieħed, it-teknika tagħna għandha l-għan li twieġeb mistoqsijiet dwar dokumenti f’qasam ieħor, fejn ma tużax dejta ttikkettata ta’ pari ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet. Bl-użu tan-netwerk ta’ sinteżi propost b’mudell imħarreġ minn qabel fuq is-sett ta’ dejta SQuAD, inkisbu miżura F1 ta’ 46.6% fuq is-sett ta’ dejta ta’ NewsQA li qed jisfida, li tilħaq il-prestazzjoni ta’ mudelli in-domain (miżura F1 ta’ 50.0%) u li taqbeż il-linja bażi barra d-domain b’7.6%, mingħajr l-użu ta’ annotazzjonijiet ipprovduti.', 'no': 'Vi utviklar ein teknikk for å overføra læring i maskineforståelse (MC) ved å bruka eit roman to stadssyntesiske nettverk. Given eit høg MC-modell i ein domene, må vårt teknikke svara på spørsmål om dokument i ein annan domene, der vi ikkje bruker nokon merkelige data om spørsmål-svarpar. Bruk den foreslåtte syntetiske nettverket med eit pretrensert modell på SQuAD-datasettet, oppnår vi F1-målet på 46,6% på den vanskelege datasettet NewsQA, nærmer utføringen av i domenemodeller (F1-målet på 50,0%) og utfører baselinja ut av domenet med 7,6%, utan bruk av oppgjevne notasjonar.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვითარებთ ტექნექცია, რომელიც პრომენტის ორ-ფაეჯის სინტესტის ქსელის გამოყენებით მაქსინური შესახებ. მარტივი MC მოდელი ერთი დიომინში იყო, ჩვენი ტექნექტიკის მიზეზია გაუკეთოთ დოკუმენტების შესახებ სხვა დოკუმენტების შესახებ, სადაც ჩვენ არ გამოყენებთ მარტივი გამოყენებული სინტეზის ქსელის გამოყენება SQuAD მონაცემების მოდელზე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ F1 მონაცემების 46,6% განმავლობაში, საშუალებელი NewsQA მონაცემების მოდელზე (F1 მონაცემების 50,0% განმავლობაში) და 7,6% განმავლობაში, საშუალებელი მონაცემების გამოყენება.', 'mn': 'Бид машины ойлголтын түвшинд суралцах техникыг хоёр дахь шинжлэх ухааны сүлжээ ашиглан хөгжүүлдэг. Нэг хүрээнд MC загварын өндөр ажиллагааны загвар өгсөн учраас, бидний техник өөр хэлбэрийн баримтын тухай асуултуудыг хариулах зорилготой. Харин бид асуулт-хариултын хооронд нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийг аш SQuAD өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжлэх ухааны сүлжээг ашиглан бид шаардлагатай NewsQA өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээнд F1 хэмжээг 46.6% хүртэл хүргэдэг. Домены загварын үйлдвэрлэл (F1 хэмжээг 50.0%) болон суурь загварын суурь шугам нь 7.6% хүртэл гарч ирсэн.', 'pl': 'Opracowujemy technikę uczenia się transferowego w rozumieniu maszynowym (MC) z wykorzystaniem nowej dwustopniowej sieci syntezy. Biorąc pod uwagę wysoce wydajny model MC w jednej dziedzinie, nasza technika ma na celu odpowiedzieć na pytania dotyczące dokumentów w innej dziedzinie, gdzie nie używamy etykietowanych danych par pytania-odpowiedzi. Wykorzystując proponowaną sieć syntezy z wstępnie przeszkolonym modelem na zbiorze danych SQuAD, osiągamy miarę F1 46,6% na trudnym zbiorze danych NewsQA, zbliżającą się do wydajności modeli wewnątrz domeny (miara F1 50,0%) i wydajność poza domeną o 7,6%, bez użycia dostarczonych adnotacji.', 'ro': 'Dezvoltăm o tehnică de transfer de învățare în înțelegerea mașinii (MC) folosind o rețea nouă de sinteză în două etape. Având în vedere un model MC de înaltă performanță într-un domeniu, tehnica noastră își propune să răspundă la întrebări despre documente din alt domeniu, unde nu folosim date etichetate ale perechilor întrebări-răspuns. Folosind rețeaua de sinteză propusă cu un model pre-instruit pe setul de date SQUAD, obținem o măsură F1 de 46,6% pe setul de date NewsQA provocator, apropiindu-ne de performanța modelelor in-domeniu (măsura F1 de 50,0%) și depășind valoarea de referință din afara domeniului cu 7,6%, fără a utiliza adnotările furnizate.', 'sr': 'Razvijamo tehniku za prebacivanje učenja u razumijevanju mašin a (MC), koristeći novu dvofaznu sinteznu mrežu. S obzirom na visoki izvršni MC model u jednom domenu, naša tehnika ima cilj da odgovori na pitanja o dokumentima u drugoj domenu, gde ne koristimo označene podatke o parovima odgovora na pitanje. Koristeći predloženu sinteznu mrežu sa pretkišnim modelom na SQuAD datasetu, postigli smo mjeru F1 od 46,6% na izazovnom setu podataka NewsQA, približavajući učinkovitosti model a u domenu (mjera F1 od 50,0%) i nadmaženje početne linije izvan domena za 7,6%, bez upotrebe pruženih annotacija.', 'so': "Waxaynu horumarinaynaa tekniko u bedelka waxbarashada hoos-dhigidda maskaxda (MC) oo lagu isticmaalayo shabakadda saxda labaad. Sida uu sameynayo model MC oo aad u samaysan hal domain ah, teknikistayaga waxaa loola jeedaa inuu jawaabo su'aalo ku saabsan dukumentiyada gudaha kale, kaas oo aannan isticmaalin macluumaad la xiriira labada jawaabta ee su'aalaha. Using the proposed synthesis network with a pretrained model on the SQuAD dataset, we achieve an F1 measure of 46.6% on the challenging NewsQA dataset, approaching performance of in-domain models (F1 measure of 50.0%) and outperforming the out-of-domain baseline by 7.6%, without use of provided annotations.", 'sv': 'Vi utvecklar en teknik för överföring av lärande i maskinförståelse (MC) med hjälp av ett nytt tvåstegs syntesnätverk. Med tanke på en högpresterande MC-modell inom en domän syftar vår teknik till att besvara frågor om dokument inom en annan domän, där vi inte använder några märkta data från fråga-svar par. Genom att använda det föreslagna syntesnätverket med en förklädd modell på SQUAD-datauppsättningen uppnår vi ett F1-mått på 46,6% på den utmanande NewsQA-datauppsättningen, närmar oss prestandan för in-domain modeller (F1 mått på 50,0%) och överträffar baseline utanför domänen med 7,6%, utan användning av medföljande kommentarer.', 'si': 'අපි පණිවිඩය දෙකක් සංවිධානයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විස්තර කරනවා. අපේ තාක්ෂණය තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි SQuAD දත්ත සූදානයේ ප්\u200dරතිරීම් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරීම සඳ', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய இரண்டு நிலை ஒத்திசைவு வலைப்பின்னலை பயன்படுத்தி இயந்திர சூழ்நிலையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள மாற்றும் தொழி ஒரு களத்தில் மிக அதிக செயல்படுத்தும் MC மாதிரி கொடுத்தால், எங்கள் தொழில்நுட்பம் மற்றொரு களத்தில் உள்ள ஆவணங்களை பற்றி பதில் அளிக்கும SQuAD தரவுத்தளத்தில் ஒரு முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்தி நாம் சவாலிக்கும் செய்திக்கும் செய்திக்கு 46. 6% வடிவமைப்பை பெறுகிறோம், உள்ளமைப்பு மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாடு (F1 அளவு 50. 0%) மற்று', 'ur': 'ہم نے ماشین سمجھنے میں سیکھنے کے لئے ایک ٹیکنیک ایجاد کرتا ہے، ایک نوم دو سٹیج سینٹسیس نیٹ ورک کے مطابق۔ ایک ڈومین میں ایک عملہ MC موڈل کی وجہ سے، ہماری تکنیک ایک دوسرے ڈومین کے بارے میں سوال جواب دینے کا ارادہ کرتا ہے، جہاں ہم سوال جوڑوں کے ذریعہ کوئی لابلی نہیں استعمال کرتے۔ اسکوئڈ ڈاٹ سٹ پر پیشنهاد سینٹس نیٹ ورک کے مطابق ایک نمڈل سے استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم نے اچانک نیٹس کی ڈاٹ سٹ پر 46.6% کی F1 اندازہ پہنچ لیا ہے، ڈومین نمڈل (50.0% کی F1 اندازہ) کی عملکرد کے قریب پہنچ رہے ہیں اور 7.6% کے بغیر ڈومین بیس لائن کے بغیر استعمال کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': 'We develop a technique for transfer learning in machine comprehension (MC) using a novel two-stage synthesis network.  Biz bir domenadagi MC modelini juda katta bajarish bilan, texnologimiz boshqa domenadagi hujjatlar haqida javob berishi mumkin. Bu yerda biz savol javob qoʻllanmiz. Name', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phát triển một kỹ thuật để học cách vận chuyển trong khả năng thấu hiểu cỗ máy (MC) bằng một mạng lưới tổng hợp hai giai đoạn mới. Dựa vào một kiểu MC có trình độ cao trong một miền, kỹ thuật của chúng tôi nhằm trả lời câu hỏi về tài liệu trong một miền khác, nơi chúng tôi không sử dụng dữ liệu có các cặp câu hỏi. Sử dụng mạng tổng hợp đề xuất với một mô hình premưa trên tập tin SQurAD, chúng tôi sẽ đạt được một cỡ F1 của 46', 'bg': 'Разработваме техника за трансферно обучение в машинното разбиране (МК), използвайки нова двустепенна синтеза мрежа. Предвид високоефективния модел на МС в една област, нашата техника има за цел да отговори на въпроси за документи в друга област, където не използваме етикетирани данни от двойки въпрос-отговор. Използвайки предложената синтеза мрежа с предварително трениран модел върху набора от данни постигаме мярка от 46,6% на предизвикателния набор от данни, доближавайки ефективността на вътрешните модели (мярка от 50,0%) и превъзхождайки изходната база извън домейна със 7,6%, без да използваме предоставени анотации.', 'hr': 'Razvijamo tehniku za učenje prijenosa u razumijevanju strojeva (MC), koristeći novu dvofaznu sinteznu mrežu. S obzirom na visoki izvršni MC model u jednom domenu, naša tehnika ima cilj odgovoriti na pitanja o dokumentima u drugoj domenu, gdje ne koristimo označene podatke o parovima odgovora na pitanje. Koristeći predloženu sinteznu mrežu s pretkišnim modelom na SQuAD podacima, postigli smo mjeru F1 od 46,6% na izazovnom setu podataka NewsQA-a, približavajući učinkovitosti modela u domenu (mjera F1 od 50,0%) i nadmašući početnu liniju izvan domena za 7,6%, bez primjene pruženih annotacija.', 'da': 'Vi udvikler en teknik til overførsel af læring i maskinforståelse (MC) ved hjælp af et nyt todrins syntese netværk. I betragtning af en højtydende MC model på ét domæne har vores teknik til formål at besvare spørgsmål om dokumenter på et andet domæne, hvor vi ikke bruger mærkede data fra spørgsmål-svar par. Ved hjælp af det foreslåede syntesenetværk med en forudtrænet model på SQUAD datasættet opnår vi en F1 måling på 46,6% på det udfordrende NewsQA datasæt, nærmer os ydeevnen af in-domæne modeller (F1 måling på 50,0%) og overperformer baseline uden for domæne med 7,6%, uden brug af medfølgende noteringer.', 'nl': 'We ontwikkelen een techniek voor transfer learning in machine understanding (MC) met behulp van een nieuw tweetraps synthese netwerk. Gezien een hoog presterend MC model in één domein, is onze techniek gericht op het beantwoorden van vragen over documenten in een ander domein, waar we geen gelabelde gegevens van vraag-antwoord paren gebruiken. Met behulp van het voorgestelde synthese netwerk met een vooraf getraind model op de SQuAD dataset, bereiken we een F1 meting van 46,6% op de uitdagende NewsQA dataset, benaderen de prestaties van in-domain modellen (F1 meting van 50,0%) en overtreffen de out-of-domain baseline met 7,6%, zonder gebruik van verstrekte annotaties.', 'de': 'Wir entwickeln eine Technik zum Transferlernen im maschinellen Verständnis (MC) unter Verwendung eines neuartigen zweistufigen Synthesenetzwerkes. Angesichts eines leistungsfähigen MC-Modells in einer Domäne zielt unsere Technik darauf ab, Fragen zu Dokumenten in einer anderen Domäne zu beantworten, in der wir keine markierten Daten von Frage-Antwort-Paaren verwenden. Mit Hilfe des vorgeschlagenen Synthesenetzwerks mit einem vortrainierten Modell auf dem SQuAD-Datensatz erreichen wir ein F1-Maß von 46,6% auf dem herausfordernden NewsQA-Datensatz, nähern uns der Leistung von In-Domain-Modellen (F1-Maß von 50,0%) und übertreffen die Out-of-Domain-Baseline um 7,6%, ohne Verwendung von bereitgestellten Annotationen.', 'fa': 'ما یک تکنیک برای تغییر یادگیری در مفهوم ماشین (MC) را با استفاده از شبکه ساختمان دو مرحله توسعه می\u200cکنیم. با وجود یک مدل MC عملکرد بالا در یک دامنه، تکنیک ما هدف دارد که به سوال درباره سند های دیگر در دامنه دیگر جواب دهیم، جایی که هیچ داده ای از جفت سوال و جواب نامیده ای استفاده نکنیم. با استفاده از شبکه تنظیمات پیشنهاد با یک مدل پیش\u200cفرض روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای SQuAD، ما یک اندازه F1 در مقدار 46.6% از مجموعه داده\u200cهای NewsQA مشکل رسیدیم، نزدیک\u200cشدن عملکرد مدل\u200cهای دامنی (F1 اندازه\u200cای از 50.0%) و بیرون\u200cخط\u200cهای baseline به 7.6%، بدون استفاده از نوشته\u200cهای پیشنهاد.', 'id': 'Kami mengembangkan teknik untuk transfer belajar dalam pemahaman mesin (MC) menggunakan jaringan sintesis dua tahap novel. Mengingat model MC yang berpengaruh tinggi dalam satu domain, teknik kami bermaksud menjawab pertanyaan tentang dokumen di domain lain, di mana kami tidak menggunakan data yang ditabel pasangan pertanyaan-jawaban. Dengan menggunakan jaringan sintesis yang diusulkan dengan model terlatih di dataset SQuAD, kami mencapai ukuran F1 46,6% pada dataset NewsQA yang menantang, mendekati prestasi model dalam domain (ukuran F1 50,0%) dan melampaui batas dasar luar domain dengan 7,6%, tanpa menggunakan anotasi yang diberikan.', 'sw': 'Tunaengeneza teknolojia ya kuhamisha kujifunza katika kompyuta ya mashine (MC) kwa kutumia mtandao wa usangazaji wa daraja mbili. Kutokana na muundo mkubwa wa MC katika eneo moja, teknolojia yetu inakusudia kujibu maswali kuhusu nyaraka nyingine, ambapo hatutumii takwimu za majibu mawili. Using the proposed synthesis network with a pretrained model on the SQuAD dataset, we achieve an F1 measure of 46.6% on the challenging NewsQA dataset, approaching performance of in-domain models (F1 measure of 50.0%) and outperforming the out-of-domain baseline by 7.6%, without use of provided annotations.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 2단계 종합 네트워크를 이용하여 기계 이해 중의 이동 학습 기술을 개발했다.한 도메인의 고성능 MC 모델을 지정합니다. Dell의 기술은 다른 도메인의 문서에 대한 질문에 답하기 위해 설계되었으며, 이 도메인에서는 문제 - 정답이 맞는 태그 데이터를 사용하지 않습니다.제시된 종합 네트워크를 사용하여 소대 데이터 집합에서 예훈련 모델을 사용했다. 우리는 도전적인 뉴스QA 데이터 집합에서 46.6%의 F1 도량을 실현했고 역내 모델에 가까운 성능(F1 도량은 50.0%)을 실현했다. 제공된 주석을 사용하지 않은 상황에서 역외 기선보다 7.6% 높았다.', 'tr': 'Biz maşynyň düşünmesinde öwrenmek üçin bir tekniki gelişýäris. 2-stage sintez şebekesini ulanarak. Bir domandaki yüksek etkinlik MC modeli görä, bizim teknikimiz başka domandaki senetler hakkında sorulara cevap vermek amaçladır. Soru-cevap çiftlerinin etiketli verileri kullanmadığımız noktalar. SQuAD veri setirinde önlenmiş sintez şebekesini ullanýarys. Biz NewsQA veri setirinde F1 ölçüsi 46.6% diýip, domeniň (F1 ölçüsi 50.0%) we 7.6% tarapyndan daşarylýan şekillerini golaýlaýarys.', 'sq': 'Ne zhvillojmë një teknikë për transferimin e mësimit në kuptimin e makinave (MC) duke përdorur një rrjet të ri sinteze dy-fazësh. Duke pasur parasysh një model MC me performancë të lartë në një domeni, teknika jonë synon të përgjigjet pyetjeve rreth dokumenteve në një domeni tjetër, ku nuk përdorim të dhëna të etiketuara të çifteve pyetje-përgjigje. Duke përdorur rrjetin e sintezës së propozuar me një model të parastërvitur në grupin e të dhënave SQuAD, ne arrijmë një masë F1 prej 46.6% në grupin e të dhënave të sfidueshme NewsQA, duke u afruar performancës së modeleve në domeni (masë F1 prej 50.0%) dhe duke tejkaluar bazën jashtë domenit me 7.6%, pa përdorur anotacionet e dhëna.', 'am': 'የሁለት ደረጃዎች ሲንተሳትስ መረብ በመጠቀም የመኪና ትምህርት ለመለወጥ (MC) እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በአንድ ዶሜን ውስጥ የMC ሞዴል ከፍተኛ ሲሆን የቴክኖክናዊ ስህተታችን በሌላ ድምፅ ውስጥ ያሉትን ሰነድ ጥያቄዎችን ለመመልስ ይችላል፡፡ በSQuAD ዳታ ማድረጊያው ላይ የተዘጋጀውን የስንቲትስ መረብ በመጠቀም የF1 መስኮት 46.6 በመቶ በመጠቀም እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Ons ontwikkel 'n tekniks vir oordrag leer in masjien verstaan (MC) deur te gebruik van 'n roman twee stadige sintetisenetwerk. Gien 'n hoë uitvoerde MC model in een domein, ons tekeniek doen doel om vrae te antwoord oor dokumente in 'n ander domein, waar ons geen etiketeerde data van vraag-antwoord paar gebruik nie. By gebruik van die voorgestelde sintetisenetwerk met 'n pretreënde model op die SQuAD datastel, het ons 'n F1-maat van 46.6% op die verwagte NewsQA-datastel bereik, naby die prestasie van in-domein-modele (F1-maat van 50.0%) en die buite-domein-basislien deur 7.6%, sonder gebruik van verskaf notasies.", 'hy': 'Մենք զարգանում ենք մեքենայի ընկալում սովորելու փոխանցման մեթոդներ՝ օգտագործելով նոր երկու փուլում գտնվող սինթեզի ցանց: Եթե հաշվի առնենք բարձր արտադրողականություն ունեցող MC մոդելը մեկ ոլորտում, մեր տեխնիկան նպատակն է պատասխանել մեկ այլ ոլորտում փաստաթղթերի մասին, որտեղ մենք չենք օգտագործում հարցերի և պատասխանների զույգերի պիտակ տվյալ Օգտագործելով առաջարկված սինթեզի ցանցը SQUADի տվյալների համակարգում նախապատրաստված մոդելի հետ, մենք հասնում ենք 46.6 տոկոսի F1 չափումը NewsQA-ի դժվար տվյալների համակարգում, մոտենում ենք տիեզերական մոդելների (F1 չափումը 50.0 տոկոսի) արտադրողություններին և 7.6 տոկոսի չափումը գերազանցում ենք արտադրողություններից դուրս', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি প্রযুক্তি তৈরি করি মেশিন সম্পর্কে শিক্ষা প্রদান করার জন্য (এমসি) একটি উপন্যাস দুই-মেশিন সিন্টিস নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহ এক ডোমেইনে এমসি মডেলের উচ্চ চালু করা হয়েছে, আমাদের প্রযুক্তির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে অন্য ডোমেইনে নথিপত্রের ব্যাপারে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার জন্য,  প্রস্তাবিত সিন্টিস নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে এসকোয়াড ডাটাসেটে একটি প্রাপ্ত মডেল ব্যবহার করে আমরা ৪৬.', 'bs': 'Razvijamo tehniku za prebacivanje učenja u razumijevanju strojeva (MC), koristeći novu mrežu sinteze dvije faze. S obzirom na visoki izvršni MC model u jednom domenu, naša tehnika ima cilj da odgovori na pitanja o dokumentima u drugoj domenu, gdje ne koristimo označene podatke o parovima odgovora na pitanje. Koristeći predloženu sinteznu mrežu sa pretkišnim modelom na SQuAD datasetu, postigli smo mjeru F1 od 46,6% na izazovnom setu podataka NewsQA, približavajući učinkovitosti model a u domenu (mjeru F1 od 50,0%) i nadmašujući početnu liniju izvan domena za 7,6%, bez primjene pruženih annotacija.', 'az': 'Biz mašin anlayışında öyrənmək üçün bir tekniki təhsil edirik, iki-fərzi sintez a ğı vasitəsilə. Bir domain içində yüksək göstərici MC modeli olduğuna görə, teknikimiz başqa domandaki dökümlər haqqında soruşmağı haqqında cavab vermək niyyətində idi. Biz sual-cavab çiftlərinin etiketli məlumatlarını istifadə etmədik. SquAD veri quruluğunda öndərilmiş sintez a ğını kullanarak, SqA veri quruluğunda f1 ölçüsi 46.6%-dir, domenin modellərin (F1 ölçüsü 50.0%) əməllərinə yaxınlaşır və 7.6%-dən uzaq domenin baz çizgisini istifadə etmədən f1 ölçüsünü başa çatdıq.', 'ca': "Desenvolvem una tècnica de transfer ència d'aprenentatge en la comprensió màquina (MC) utilitzant una nova xarxa de síntesi en dos etapes. Tenint en compte un model MC de gran rendiment en un domini, la nostra tècnica busca respondre preguntes sobre documents en un altre domini, on no utilitzem dades etiquetades de parells de preguntes-respostes. Utilitzant la xarxa de síntesi proposada amb un model pré-entrenat en el conjunt de dades SQuAD, aconsegueixem una mesura F1 del 46,6% en el conjunt de dades desafiant NewsQA, aproximant-nos al rendiment de models en domini (mesura F1 del 50,0%) i superant la base fora de domini en 7,6%, sense utilitzar anotacions proporcionades.", 'fi': 'Kehitämme tekniikan koneymmärryksessä tapahtuvaan siirtooppimiseen käyttämällä uutta kaksivaiheista synteesiverkkoa. Kun otetaan huomioon suorituskykyinen MC-malli yhdellä toimialueella, tekniikkamme pyrkii vastaamaan kysymyksiin dokumenteista toisella toimialueella, jossa emme käytä kysely-vastausparien merkittyjä tietoja. Käyttämällä ehdotettua synteesiverkkoa ja esikoulutettua mallia SQuAD-aineistossa saavutamme 46,6% F1-mittarin haastavassa NewsQA-aineistossa, lähestyen toimialueen sisäisten mallien suorituskykyä (50,0% F1-mittari) ja ylittäen toimialueen ulkopuolisen lähtötilanteen 7,6% ilman annettuja huomautuksia.', 'cs': 'Vyvíjíme techniku transferového učení ve strojovém porozumění (MC) pomocí nové dvoustupňové syntézy sítě. Vzhledem k vysoce výkonnému MC modelu v jedné oblasti se naše technika snaží zodpovědět otázky týkající se dokumentů v jiné oblasti, kde nepoužíváme žádná označená data párů otázek-odpověď. Pomocí navržené syntézní sítě s předtrénovaným modelem na SQuAD datové sadě dosáhneme F1 míry 46,6% na náročném datovém setu NewsQA, přibližující se výkonu in-doménových modelů (F1 míra 50,0%) a překonáváme mimo doménu směrnici o 7,6%, bez použití poskytnutých anotací.', 'et': 'Töötame välja masinase mõistmise (MC) siirdeõppe tehnika, kasutades uudset kaheastmelist sünteesivõrku. Arvestades kõrge jõudlusega MC mudelit ühes valdkonnas, on meie tehnika eesmärk vastata küsimustele dokumentide kohta teises valdkonnas, kus me ei kasuta märgistatud andmeid küsimuste ja vastuste paaridest. Kasutades kavandatud sünteesivõrku koos eeltreenitud mudeliga SQuAD andmekogumil, saavutame F1 mõõtme 46,6% ulatuses väljakutsuva NewsQA andmekogumi puhul, lähenedes domeenisiseste mudelite jõudlusele (F1 mõõde 50,0%) ja ületades domeenivälise lähtetaseme 7,6% võrra ilma esitatud märkusteta.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé nggawe teknik nggawe barang kelas telu nggawe barang kelas (XM) nyebute nyebute kuwi seneng pisan. GIVE a height playing XM model in one domain, we teknik goal to question about documents in a second domain, Where we use no label data of question-responses. Using the proposal concheses network with a preshined model on the squ ED dataset, we success an F1 measurement of 49.6% on the chancelling New XqA dataset, attributing output of in-domain modes (F1 measurement of 5.0 %) and out-of-domain basic line by 7.6%, no use of given anntations.', 'ha': "Tuna buɗe wani technci wa iya shige learning a cikin Compression da kwamfyutan (MC) da ke amfani da zanen sigarin sau biyu-daraja. Gida wani misalin mai girma da ya sami MC cikin guda, aikin tuɓallinmu yana nufin ya karɓa wa maswali masu tambayar takardun dukka cikin gudan, a inda ba mu yi amfani da data wanda aka rubũta matsayin-su-tambayi ba. Yi amfani da shirin kwamfyutan da aka buɗe wa'urar synthesis da wani motel mai daɗa ɗewa a kan data na SQuAD, za'a sami wata F1 gwargwadon F1 da 46.6%, a kan gamuwa da tsarin data masu motsi na NewsQA, yana kusantar cikakken misãlai masu cikin-Domin (F1 gwargwadon 50.0%) da kuma ke samun bayan-bayan-Domen da 7.6%, kuma bã ya amfani da alararori wanda aka bai wa shirin taƙayyade.", 'he': 'אנחנו מפתחים טכניקה להעברה ללמוד בהבנת מכונות (MC) באמצעות רשת סינטזה בשתי שלבים חדשה. בהתחשב במודל MC ביצוע גבוה בתחום אחד, הטכניקה שלנו מטורפת לענות על שאלות על מסמכים בתחום אחר, שבו אנחנו לא משתמשים במידע מסוים של זוגות תשובות-שאלות. בשימוש ברשת הסינטזיה המוצעת עם מודל מתאמן מראש על קבוצת המידע SQuAD, אנו משיגים מדד F1 של 46.6% על קבוצת המידע המתאגרת NewsQA, מתקרב להופעה של מודלים בתחום (מדד F1 של 50.0%) ומעביר את הבסיס מחוץ לתחום ב-7.6%, בלי להשתמש בהערכות מוסמכות.', 'sk': 'Razvijamo tehniko transfernega učenja v strojnem razumevanju (MC) z uporabo nove dvostopenjske sintezne mreže. Glede na visoko zmogljiv model MC v eni domeni je naša tehnika namenjena odgovarjanju na vprašanja o dokumentih v drugi domeni, kjer ne uporabljamo označenih podatkov parov vprašanja-odgovorov. Z uporabo predlaganega sinteznega omrežja s predtreniranim modelom na naboru podatkov SQuAD dosežemo merilo F1 46,6% na zahtevnem naboru podatkov NewsQA, približamo se zmogljivosti notranjih modelov (merilo F1 50,0%) in izven domene presežemo osnovno izhodišče za 7,6%, brez uporabe navedenih opomb.', 'bo': 'We develop a technique for transfer learning in machine comprehension (MC) using a novel two-stage synthesis network. Given a high performing MC model in one domain, our technique aims to answer questions about documents in another domain, where we use no labeled data of question-answer pairs. Using the proposed synthesis network with a pretrained model on the SQuAD dataset, we achieve an F1 measure of 46.6% on the challenging NewsQA dataset, approaching performance of in-domain models (F1 measure of 50.0%) and outperforming the out-of-domain baseline by 7.6%, without use of provided annotations.'}
{'en': 'Deep Neural Solver for Math Word Problems', 'ar': 'Deep Neural Solver لمشكلات الكلمات الرياضية', 'pt': 'Solucionador Neural Profundo para Problemas de Palavras Matemáticas', 'fr': 'Solveur neuronal profond pour les problèmes de mathématiques', 'es': 'Solucionador neuronal profundo para problemas verbales matemáticos', 'ja': '数学の単語問題の深層神経ソルバー', 'hi': 'गणित शब्द समस्याओं के लिए गहरी तंत्रिका सॉल्वर', 'zh': '数学单词之深神经求解器', 'ru': 'Глубокий нейронный решатель задач математического слова', 'ga': 'Réiteach Neural domhain le haghaidh Fadhbanna Focal Mata', 'ka': 'მათემატიკური სიტყვის პრობლემებისთვის ძალიან ნეიროლური გარეშე', 'hu': 'Deep Neural Solver for Math Word problémákhoz', 'el': 'Βαθύς Νευρικός Λύτης για Προβλήματα Μαθηματικών Λέξεων', 'it': 'Risolutore neurale profondo per problemi di parole matematiche', 'lt': 'Gilus neurologinis tirpiklis matematikos žodžių problemoms spręsti', 'kk': 'Математикалық сөз мәселелерінің түйінгі невралдық шешуші', 'mk': 'Deep Neural Solver for Math Word Problems', 'ms': 'Penyelesaikan Neural Dalam Untuk Masalah Kata Matematik', 'mn': 'Математикийн үг асуудлын гүнзгий мэдрэлийн шийдвэр', 'mt': 'Solvent Newrali Profond għall-Problemi tal-kliem Matematiku', 'ml': 'Math Word പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ആഴത്തിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുക', 'no': 'Djupne neuralløysar for matematiske ordproblemer', 'pl': 'Rozwiązywacz głębokich neuronów dla problemów słowa matematycznego', 'sr': 'Duboko neurološki rješavač za probleme sa matematičkim riječima', 'ro': 'Solutor neural profund pentru probleme cu cuvintele matematice', 'si': 'ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරල් විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Xalalka Neural ee dhibaatooyinka Math Word', 'sv': 'Deep Neural Solver för matematiska ordproblem', 'ta': 'Deep Neural Solver for Math Word Problems', 'ur': 'ریاضی کلمات مشکلات کے لئے عمیق نیورال حل کرنے والا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sâu giải thần kinh cho các vấn đề về Toán', 'bg': 'Дълбок нервен разрешител за задачи с математически думи', 'hr': 'Duboko neurološko rješavanje za probleme s riječima matematike', 'nl': 'Diepe Neural Oplosser voor Math Word Problemen', 'da': 'Dyb neural løser til matematiske ordproblemer', 'id': 'Penyelesaikan Neural dalam untuk masalah kata matematika', 'fa': 'حل عصبی عمیق برای مشکلات کلمه ریاضی', 'de': 'Deep Neural Solver für Math Word Probleme', 'tr': 'Matematik söz meseleleri üçin Gurhan Neural çözümleri', 'af': 'Deep Neural Oplosser vir Wiskundige Woord Probleme', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Neural la Kihisabu', 'sq': 'Zgjidhës i thellë neuronal për problemet e fjalëve matematike', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Matematik Sözü Problemlərinin Derin Nöral Çözücü', 'hy': 'Deep Neural Solver for Math Word Problems', 'ko': '수학 단어 문제의 심층 신경 해산기', 'bn': 'Math Word সমস্যার জন্য গভীর নিউরেল সমাধান', 'bs': 'Duboko neurološki rješavač za probleme s matematičkim riječima', 'ca': 'Un solucionador neuronal profund per problemes de paraules matemàtiques', 'et': 'Matemaatika sõna probleemide sügav neurolahendaja', 'cs': 'Hluboký neuronový řešitel pro matematické slovo problémy', 'fi': 'Syvä hermoratkaisu matemaattisten sanojen ongelmiin', 'jv': 'deep', 'sk': 'Globoko živčno reševalnik za težave z matematičnimi besedami', 'he': 'פתר עצבי עמוק לבעיות מילים מתמטיקות', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'གྲངས་རིག་གི་ཡི་གེ་དཀའ་ངལ་ལ་སྤྲོད་མཁན་དབུས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a deep neural solver to automatically solve math word problems. In contrast to previous statistical learning approaches, we directly translate math word problems to equation templates using a recurrent neural network (RNN) model, without sophisticated feature engineering. We further design a hybrid model that combines the RNN model and a similarity-based retrieval model to achieve additional performance improvement. Experiments conducted on a large dataset show that the RNN model and the hybrid model significantly outperform state-of-the-art statistical learning methods for math word problem solving.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة حلًا عصبيًا عميقًا لحل مشاكل الكلمات الرياضية تلقائيًا. على عكس مناهج التعلم الإحصائي السابقة ، فإننا نترجم مباشرة مسائل الكلمات الرياضية إلى قوالب المعادلات باستخدام نموذج الشبكة العصبية المتكررة (RNN) ، دون هندسة ميزات معقدة. نقوم أيضًا بتصميم نموذج هجين يجمع بين نموذج RNN ونموذج استرجاع قائم على التشابه لتحقيق تحسين إضافي في الأداء. أظهرت التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعة بيانات كبيرة أن نموذج RNN والنموذج الهجين يتفوقان بشكل كبير على أحدث طرق التعلم الإحصائي لحل مشكلة الكلمات الرياضية.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un solucionador neuronal profundo para resolver automáticamente problemas matemáticos. A diferencia de los enfoques de aprendizaje estadístico anteriores, traducimos directamente los problemas verbales de matemáticas en plantillas de ecuaciones utilizando un modelo de red neuronal recurrente (RNN), sin ingeniería de funciones sofisticada. Además, diseñamos un modelo híbrido que combina el modelo RNN y un modelo de recuperación basado en similitudes para lograr una mejora adicional del rendimiento. Los experimentos realizados en un gran conjunto de datos muestran que el modelo RNN y el modelo híbrido superan significativamente a los métodos de aprendizaje estadístico de última generación para la resolución de problemas verbales matemáticos.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um solucionador neural profundo para resolver automaticamente problemas de palavras matemáticas. Em contraste com as abordagens anteriores de aprendizado estatístico, traduzimos diretamente problemas de palavras matemáticas para modelos de equação usando um modelo de rede neural recorrente (RNN), sem engenharia de recursos sofisticada. Além disso, projetamos um modelo híbrido que combina o modelo RNN e um modelo de recuperação baseado em similaridade para obter melhorias de desempenho adicionais. Experimentos conduzidos em um grande conjunto de dados mostram que o modelo RNN e o modelo híbrido superam significativamente os métodos de aprendizado estatístico de última geração para a resolução de problemas de palavras matemáticas.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un solveur neuronal profond permettant de résoudre automatiquement des problèmes de mots mathématiques. Contrairement aux approches d'apprentissage statistique précédentes, nous traduisons directement les problèmes de mots mathématiques en modèles d'équations à l'aide d'un modèle de réseau neuronal récurrent (RNN), sans ingénierie sophistiquée des caractéristiques. Nous concevons également un modèle hybride qui combine le modèle RNN et un modèle de récupération basé sur la similarité afin d'obtenir une amélioration supplémentaire des performances. Les expériences menées sur un vaste ensemble de données montrent que le modèle RNN et le modèle hybride surpassent de manière significative les méthodes d'apprentissage statistique de pointe pour la résolution de problèmes de mots mathématiques.", 'ja': '本論文では、数学の単語問題を自動的に解くための深層神経解法を紹介している。これまでの統計的学習アプローチとは対照的に、私たちは洗練された特徴工学なしに、再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）モデルを使用して数学の単語問題を方程式テンプレートに直接翻訳します。さらに、RNNモデルと類似性ベースの検索モデルを組み合わせたハイブリッドモデルを設計し、さらなるパフォーマンス向上を実現します。大規模なデータセットで実施された実験では、RNNモデルとハイブリッドモデルは、数学単語問題解決のための最先端の統計的学習方法を著しく上回ることが示された。', 'zh': '本文发深度神经求解器,以自解数学单词。 比之前计,用递归神经网络(RNN)直将数学单词转为方程模板,而无烦杂之工。 设一混合,合RNN于相似性,以成其性。 集上数之实验,RNN合之数学单词明先计数。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर गणित शब्द की समस्याओं को स्वचालित रूप से हल करने के लिए एक गहरा तंत्रिका सॉल्वर प्रस्तुत करता है। पिछले सांख्यिकीय सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के विपरीत, हम सीधे परिष्कृत सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग के बिना, एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (आरएनएन) मॉडल का उपयोग करके समीकरण टेम्पलेट्स में गणित शब्द समस्याओं का अनुवाद करते हैं। हम आगे एक हाइब्रिड मॉडल डिजाइन करते हैं जो अतिरिक्त प्रदर्शन सुधार प्राप्त करने के लिए आरएनएन मॉडल और एक समानता-आधारित पुनर्प्राप्ति मॉडल को जोड़ता है। एक बड़े डेटासेट पर किए गए प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि आरएनएन मॉडल और हाइब्रिड मॉडल गणित शब्द समस्या को हल करने के लिए अत्याधुनिक सांख्यिकीय सीखने के तरीकों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен глубокий нейронный решатель для автоматического решения задач математического слова. В отличие от предыдущих статистических подходов к обучению, мы напрямую переводим задачи математического слова в шаблоны уравнений, используя модель рекуррентной нейронной сети (RNN), без сложной инженерии признаков. Мы также разрабатываем гибридную модель, которая сочетает в себе модель RNN и модель поиска на основе сходства для достижения дополнительного улучшения производительности. Эксперименты, проведенные на большом наборе данных, показывают, что модель RNN и гибридная модель значительно превосходят современные статистические методы обучения для решения задач математического слова.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair néar-réiteoir domhain chun fadhbanna focal matamaitice a réiteach go huathoibríoch. I gcodarsnacht le cur chuige foghlama staidrimh roimhe seo, aistrímid fadhbanna focal matamaitice go teimpléid cothromóidí ag baint úsáide as samhail líonra néarach athfhillteach (RNN), gan gné-innealtóireacht sofaisticiúla. Dearaimid tuilleadh samhail hibrideach a chomhcheanglaíonn samhail RNN agus samhail aisghabhála bunaithe ar chosúlachtaí chun feabhas breise feidhmíochta a bhaint amach. Léiríonn turgnaimh a rinneadh ar thacar sonraí mór go sáraíonn samhail an RNN agus an tsamhail hibrideach modhanna foghlama staitistiúla den scoth maidir le réiteach fadhbanna focal matamaitice.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία παρουσιάζει έναν βαθύ νευρωνικό λύτη για να λύσει αυτόματα προβλήματα μαθηματικών λέξεων. Σε αντίθεση με τις προηγούμενες στατιστικές προσεγγίσεις μάθησης, μεταφράζουμε άμεσα μαθηματικά προβλήματα λέξεων σε πρότυπα εξίσωσης χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο επαναλαμβανόμενου νευρικού δικτύου (χωρίς εξελιγμένη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών. Σχεδιάζουμε περαιτέρω ένα υβριδικό μοντέλο που συνδυάζει το μοντέλο και ένα μοντέλο ανάκτησης βασισμένο στην ομοιότητα για να επιτύχουμε πρόσθετη βελτίωση απόδοσης. Τα πειράματα που διεξήχθησαν σε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο και το υβριδικό μοντέλο ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις σύγχρονες στατιστικές μεθόδους μάθησης για την επίλυση προβλημάτων μαθηματικών λέξεων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja egy mély neurális megoldót, amely automatikusan megoldja a matematikai szó problémáit. A korábbi statisztikai tanulási megközelítésekkel ellentétben a matematikai szóproblémákat közvetlenül egyenletsablonokra fordítjuk visszatérő neurális hálózat (RNN) modell segítségével, kifinomult funkciótervezés nélkül. Továbbá olyan hibrid modellt tervezünk, amely kombinálja az RNN modellt és egy hasonlóságon alapuló visszahívási modellt, hogy további teljesítményfejlesztést érjen el. Egy nagyméretű adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az RNN modell és a hibrid modell jelentősen felülmúlja a matematikai szóproblémamegoldás legkorszerűbb statisztikai tanulási módszereit.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები აჩვენებს ძალიან ნეიროლური გარეშე მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემების ავტომატურად გარეშე. მიმდინარე სტატისტიკური სწავლების შესახებ, ჩვენ მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემების განტოლების შაბლონებისთვის გამოყენებული რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს, სოფისტი ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ ჰიბრიდის მოდელს, რომელიც RNN მოდელს და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მოდელს. დიდი მონაცემების შესახებ ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენება, რომ RNN მოდელია და ჰიბრიდის მოდელია მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთებთ სტატისტიკური სწავლების პრობლემა მათემატიკური', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un risolutore neurale profondo per risolvere automaticamente problemi di parole matematiche. A differenza dei precedenti approcci di apprendimento statistico, traduciamo direttamente i problemi delle parole matematiche in modelli di equazioni utilizzando un modello di rete neurale ricorrente (RNN), senza sofisticate funzionalità ingegneristiche. Progettiamo inoltre un modello ibrido che combina il modello RNN e un modello di recupero basato sulla somiglianza per ottenere ulteriori miglioramenti delle prestazioni. Esperimenti condotti su un grande set di dati mostrano che il modello RNN e il modello ibrido superano significativamente i metodi di apprendimento statistico all'avanguardia per la risoluzione dei problemi di parole matematiche.", 'lt': 'Šiame popieriuje pateikiamas gilus neurologinis tirpiklis, skirtas automatiškai išspręsti matematinių žodžių problemas. Priešingai nei ankstesni statistinio mokymosi metodai, mes tiesiogiai išversti matematikos žodžių problemas į lygčių šablonus naudojant pakartotinio nervinio tinklo (RNN) model į, be sofistikuotos savybių inžinerijos. We further design a hybrid model that combines the RNN model and a similarity-based retrieval model to achieve additional performance improvement.  Iš didelio duomenų rinkinio atliktų eksperimentų matyti, kad RNN modelis ir hibridinis modelis gerokai viršija naujausius statistinio mokymosi metodus matematikos žodžių problemoms spręsti.', 'mk': 'This paper presents a deep neural solver to automatically solve math word problems.  За разлика од претходните статистички пристапи на учење, директно ги преведуваме проблемите со математичките зборови во шаблони на еднакви користејќи рецидентна нервна мрежа (РНН) модел, без софистицирано инженерство на карактеристики. Понатаму дизајнираме хибриден модел кој го комбинира моделот РНН и моделот на сличност за да постигне дополнително подобрување на перформансата. Експериментите спроведени на голем компјутер податоци покажуваат дека моделот РНН и хибридниот модел значително ги надминуваат најдобрите методи на статистичко учење за решавање на проблемите со математичките зборови.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз математикалық сөздердің мәселелерін автоматты түрде шешу үшін терең неврал шешімін көрсетеді. Алдыңғы статистикалық оқыту көмегімен қарсы, біз математикалық сөздердің мәселелерін теңдеу үлгілеріне қайталанатын неврал желі (RNN) үлгісін қолдану үшін, жұмыс істеу инженериясы жоқ. Біз басқа RNN үлгісін біріктіретін гибрид үлгісін құрамыз және ұқсас істеу үшін қосымша жұмыс істеу үшін біріктіретін ұқсас үлгісін жасаймыз. Үлкен деректер жинағында жасалған тәжірибелер, RNN моделі мен гибрид моделі математикалық сөздердің мәселелерін шешу үшін статистикалық оқыту әдістерінің күйінің күйіне арналған.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan penyelesaian saraf dalam untuk menyelesaikan masalah perkataan matematik secara automatik. Sebaliknya dengan pendekatan pembelajaran statistik terdahulu, kita secara langsung menerjemahkan masalah perkataan matematika ke templat persamaan menggunakan model rangkaian saraf (RNN) berulang-ulang, tanpa teknik ciri yang canggih. We further design a hybrid model that combines the RNN model and a similarity-based retrieval model to achieve additional performance improvement.  Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada set data yang besar menunjukkan bahawa model RNN dan model hibrid secara signifikan melebihi kaedah pembelajaran statistik state-of-the-art untuk penyelesaian masalah perkataan matematika.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കണക്കിന്റെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ആഴത്തെ പുരുതപ്പെട്ട നെയൂ മുമ്പുള്ള സ്റ്റാസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഗണിത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് സമമാക്കുന്ന രേഖ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് RNN മോഡലിനെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ച ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d നടത്തിയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് RNN മോഡലും ഹൈബ്രിഡ് മോഡലും ഗണിത വാക്ക് പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിന', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta solver newrali profond biex isolvi awtomatikament il-problemi tal-kliem matematiku. B’kuntrast ma’ approċċi ta’ tagħlim statistiku preċedenti, a ħna ttrasferixxu direttament problemi ta’ kliem matematiku għal mudelli ta’ ekwazzjoni bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ netwerk newrali rikorrenti (RNN), mingħajr inġinerija ta’ karatteristiċi sofistikati. We further design a hybrid model that combines the RNN model and a similarity-based retrieval model to achieve additional performance improvement.  L-esperimenti mwettqa fuq sett kbir ta’ dejta juru li l-mudell RNN u l-mudell ibridu jwettqu metodi ta’ tagħlim statistiku avvanzati b’mod sinifikanti għas-soluzzjoni tal-problem a tal-kliem matematiku.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein dyp neuralløysar for å løysa matematiske ordproblemer automatisk. I contrast to previous statistical learning approaches, we directly translate math word problems to equation males using a recurrent neural network (RNN) model, without sophisticated feature engineering. Vi design meir eit hybridmodell som kombinerer RNN-modellen og eit tilsvarende hendingsmodul for å oppnå ekstra forbedring av utviklingar. Eksperiment gjennomført på eit stor datasett viser at RNN-modellen og hybridmodellen utfører ståande av kunsten statistiske læringsmetodar for å løysa problemet med matematikk.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia głęboki rozwiązywacz neuronowy do automatycznego rozwiązywania problemów słów matematycznych. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich metod uczenia się statystycznego, bezpośrednio tłumaczymy matematyczne problemy słów na szablony równań przy użyciu modelu rekrutującej sieci neuronowej (RNN), bez zaawansowanej inżynierii funkcji. Ponadto projektujemy model hybrydowy, który łączy model RNN i model pobierania oparty na podobieństwie, aby osiągnąć dodatkową poprawę wydajności. Eksperymenty przeprowadzone na dużym zbiorze danych pokazują, że model RNN i model hybrydowy znacznie przewyższają najnowocześniejsze metody nauki statystycznej w zakresie rozwiązywania problemów słów matematycznych.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас математикийн үгийн асуудлыг автоматаар шийдэхэд гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн шийдвэрлэгч бий болгодог. Өмнөх статистикийн суралцах ойлголтын эсрэг бид математикийн үг асуудлуудыг шууд тэгшитгэлийн шалгалтуудад дахин дахин сэтгэл сүлжээ (RNN) загварыг ашиглаж, сайхан чадвартай инженерчлэлгүй орлуулдаг. Бид дараа нь ДНХ загварыг холбоотой гибрид загварын загварыг бүтээж, нэмэлт үйл ажиллагааны сайжруулалтыг хүргэх төлөвлөгөөтэй холбоотой. Маш их өгөгдлийн сан дээр хийсэн туршилтууд нь РНХ загвар болон гибридын загвар математикийн үгийн асуудлыг шийдэх хэмжээний статистикийн суралцах арга зэрэг илүү чухал байдаг.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un rezolvator neuronal profund pentru a rezolva automat problemele matematice cuvinte. Spre deosebire de abordările anterioare de învățare statistică, traducem direct problemele cuvintelor matematice în șabloane de ecuații folosind un model de rețea neurală recurentă (RNN), fără inginerie sofisticată a caracteristicilor. În continuare, proiectăm un model hibrid care combină modelul RNN și un model de recuperare bazat pe similaritate pentru a obține îmbunătățiri suplimentare a performanței. Experimentele efectuate pe un set mare de date arată că modelul RNN și modelul hibrid depășesc semnificativ metodele de învățare statistică de ultimă generație pentru rezolvarea problemelor cuvintelor matematice.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල් විසිද්ධකයෙක් පෙන්වනවා ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන පසුගින් ස්ථානික සිහින්ධ විදියට විරුද්ධ විදියට, අපි ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරිවර් අපි තව හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් මොඩේලයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා ඒ වගේම RNN මොඩේලය සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ආධාරිත ආරක්ෂා මොඩේලය සඳහා අව ලොකු දත්ත සූදානයක් පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ RNN මොඩේල් සහ හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් ස්ථිතිය-අංක්\u200dරී', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu soo saaraa xalal aad u dheer oo neurada ah si ay automatic u xalaato dhibaatooyinka hadalka xisaabta ah. Si ka duwan qaababka hore ee waxbarashada, toos ayaannu u turjumnaa dhibaatooyinka hadalka xisaabta si aan u dhigno templates, tusaale ahaan shabakadda neurada ee soo socda (RNN), iyadoon sophisticated feature engineering. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa model hibrid ah oo isku darsameynaya modelka RNN iyo model u soo celinta si siman ah si aan u helno horumarinta horumarinta dheeraadka ah. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu sameeyay sawir weyn oo lagu tusayo modelka RNN iyo modelka hybrid si muhiim ah ayuu u soo saaraa qaababka waxbarashada takhasuska ee xafiiska dhibaatada ku saabsan hadalka xisaabta.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en djup neural lösare för att automatiskt lösa matematiska ordproblem. Till skillnad från tidigare statistiska inlärningsmetoder översätter vi matematiska ordproblem direkt till ekvationsmallar med hjälp av en återkommande neuralt nätverk (RNN) modell, utan sofistikerad funktionsteknik. Vi designar vidare en hybridmodell som kombinerar RNN-modellen och en liknande återvinningsmodell för att uppnå ytterligare prestandaförbättring. Experiment utförda på en stor datamängd visar att RNN-modellen och hybridmodellen avsevärt överträffar de senaste statistiska inlärningsmetoderna för problemlösning av matematiska ord.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja duboko neuralno rešenje da bi automatski rešio probleme matematike riječi. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim pristupima statističkog učenja, direktno prevodimo probleme sa matematičkim riječima u šablone jednačine koristeći rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu (RNN), bez sofisticiranog inženjeringa. Dalje dizajniramo hibridni model koji kombinira RNN model i model povratka na osnovu sličnosti kako bi postigli dodatno poboljšanje učinka. Eksperimenti provedeni na velikom setu podataka pokazuju da model RNN i hibrid model značajno iznosi statističke metode učenja za rešavanje problem a sa matematičkim riječima.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் கணிப்பான சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகளை தானாகவே தீர்க்க ஒரு ஆழமான புதிரை தீர்வு அளிக்கிறது. முந்தைய புள்ளிவிவரம் படிக்கும் முறைகளுக்கு எதிராக, நாம் நேரடியாக கணக்கில் சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகளை சமன்பாட்டு வார்ப்புருக்களை ஒப்புக்கொள நாம் மேலும் ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் மாதிரியை வடிவமைக்கிறோம். அது RNN மாதிரியை இணைக்கும் மற்றும் ஒரு ஒப்பிட்ட முடிவு முன்னேற்றத்த Name', 'ur': 'This paper presents a deep neural solver to automatically solve math word problems. پہلے کی آمار سیکھنے کے قریبوں کے مقابلہ میں ہم ریاضی کلمات مسئلہ کو مستقیم ترجمہ کریں گے ایک دوبارہ نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک (RNN) موڈل کے مطابق، بغیر سفیسٹیکٹ فعالیت انجینژی کے. ہم ایک ہیبریڈ موڈل طراحی کر رہے ہیں جو RNN موڈل اور ایک مثالی بنیاد پھیرنے موڈل کو ترکیب کرتا ہے اور اضافہ عملومات کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ ایک بڑے ڈاٹ سٹ پر عمل کی تجربیات دکھاتی ہے کہ RNN موڈل اور ہیبراڈ موڈل ضرور ریاضی کلمات مشکل حل کے لئے استیٹ کی استیٹ سیکھنے کے طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogĘ»oz matn soĘ»zning muammolarini avtomatik o'zgartirish uchun miya neyrolikni aniqlaydi. @ info: whatsthis Biz qoĘ»shimcha bajarishni bajarish uchun RNN modelini birlashtirish va bir xil qayta olish modelini birlashtiramiz. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này có một chuyên gia giải quyết thần kinh sâu để tự động giải quyết các vấn đề từ to án. Tương đối với các phương pháp học thống kê trước đó, chúng tôi dịch trực tiếp các vấn đề về từ to án để tìm dạng mẫu bằng một mô hình mạng thần kinh liên tục (RNN) không có kỹ năng tinh vi. Chúng tôi còn thiết kế một mô hình lai mà kết hợp mô hình RNN và mô hình mang theo nét giống nhau để đạt hiệu suất tốt hơn. Các thí nghiệm được thực hiện trên một bộ dữ liệu lớn cho thấy mô hình RNN và mô hình người lai có khả năng vượt trội hơn những phương pháp học thống kê tiên tiến để giải quyết vấn đề từ toán học.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя дълбоко нервно решаване за автоматично решаване на задачи с математически думи. За разлика от предишните подходи за статистическо учене, ние директно превеждаме задачите с математически думи в шаблони на уравнения, използвайки модел на повтаряща се невронна мрежа (без сложно инженерство на функциите). Освен това проектираме хибриден модел, който съчетава модела и базиран на сходство модел за възстановяване, за да постигнем допълнително подобрение на производителността. Експериментите, проведени върху голям набор от данни, показват, че моделът и хибридният модел значително превъзхождат най-съвременните методи за статистическо учене за решаване на задачи с математически думи.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja duboko neuralno rješavanje kako bi automatski riješio probleme s riječima matematike. U suprotnosti s prethodnim pristupima statističkog učenja, direktno prevodimo probleme matematičkih riječi u šablone jednačine koristeći rekonstruirani model neuralne mreže (RNN), bez sofisticiranog inženjeringa funkcija. Dalje dizajniramo hibridni model koji kombinira RNN model i model povratka na osnovu sličnosti kako bi postigli dodatno poboljšanje učinka. Eksperimenti provedeni na velikom setu podataka pokazuju da model RNN i hibrid model značajno iznosi stanje umjetnosti statističke metode učenja za rješavanje problem a s riječima matematike.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en dyb neural løser til automatisk at løse matematiske ordproblemer. I modsætning til tidligere statistiske læringsmetoder oversætter vi matematiske ordproblemer direkte til ligningsskabeloner ved hjælp af en tilbagevendende neuralt netværk (RNN) model, uden sofistikeret feature engineering. Vi designer yderligere en hybridmodel, der kombinerer RNN modellen og en lighedsbaseret hentningsmodel for at opnå yderligere ydeevne forbedring. Eksperimenter udført på et stort datasæt viser, at RNN-modellen og hybridmodellen betydeligt overgår state-of-the-art statistiske læringsmetoder til matematisk ordproblemløsning.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert een diepe neurale oplosser om automatisch wiskundige woordproblemen op te lossen. In tegenstelling tot eerdere statistische leerbenaderingen vertalen we wiskundige woordproblemen rechtstreeks naar vergelijkingssjablonen met behulp van een recidivierend neuraal netwerk (RNN) model, zonder geavanceerde feature engineering. We ontwerpen verder een hybride model dat het RNN model combineert met een op overeenkomsten gebaseerd retrieval model om extra prestatieverbetering te bereiken. Experimenten uitgevoerd op een grote dataset tonen aan dat het RNN-model en het hybride model aanzienlijk beter presteren dan state-of-the-art statistische leermethoden voor het oplossen van wiskundige woordproblemen.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt einen tiefen neuronalen Solver vor, um mathematische Wortprobleme automatisch zu lösen. Im Gegensatz zu bisherigen statistischen Lernansätzen übersetzen wir mathematische Wortprobleme direkt in Gleichungsvorlagen mit Hilfe eines RNN-Modells (Recidiviering Neuronal Network) ohne ausgeklügeltes Feature Engineering. Weiterhin entwickeln wir ein Hybridmodell, das das RNN-Modell und ein Ähnlichkeits-basiertes Retrieval-Modell kombiniert, um zusätzliche Leistungsverbesserungen zu erzielen. Experimente an einem großen Datensatz zeigen, dass das RNN-Modell und das Hybridmodell die neuesten statistischen Lernmethoden für mathematische Wortprobleme deutlich übertreffen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan penyelesaian saraf dalam untuk secara otomatis memecahkan masalah kata matematika. Sebaliknya dengan pendekatan belajar statistik sebelumnya, kami secara langsung menerjemahkan masalah kata matematika ke templat persamaan menggunakan model jaringan saraf (RNN) yang berkurang, tanpa teknik fitur yang sophistik. Kami lebih lanjut merancang model hibrid yang menggabungkan model RNN dan model pemulihan berdasarkan persamaan untuk mencapai peningkatan prestasi tambahan. Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada set data yang besar menunjukkan bahwa model RNN dan model hibrid secara signifikan melebihi metode belajar statistik state-of-the-art untuk memecahkan masalah kata matematika.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک حل عصبی عمیق را برای حل خودکار مشکلات کلمه ریاضی نشان می دهد. در مقابل نزدیک آموزش آمار گذشته، ما مستقیماً مشکلات کلمه ریاضی را به عبارت معادل با استفاده از یک مدل شبکه عصبی (RNN) تکرار می\u200cکنیم، بدون مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای متفاوت ترجمه می\u200cکنیم. ما دیگر یک مدل هیبرید را طراحی می\u200cکنیم که مدل RNN را ترکیب می\u200cکند و یک مدل بازیابی بر بنیاد شباهت را برای رسیدن بهبود عملکرد اضافه می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهایی که روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای بزرگ انجام می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل RNN و مدل هیبرید به طور کلی از روش آموزش آموزش آماری هنری برای حل مشکلات کلمه ریاضی بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'ko': '본고는 수학 단어 문제를 자동으로 해결하는 심층 신경 구해기를 제시했다.이전의 통계 학습 방법과 달리 우리는 복잡한 특징 공정이 필요 없이 귀속신경망(RNN) 모델을 이용하여 수학 단어 문제를 방정식 모델로 직접 전환한다.우리는 RNN 모델과 유사성을 바탕으로 하는 검색 모델을 결합시켜 추가적인 성능 개선을 실현하는 혼합 모델을 한층 더 설계했다.한 빅데이터 집합에서 진행된 실험에 따르면 RNN모델과 혼합모델은 수학 단어 문제를 해결하는 데 있어서 가장 선진적인 통계 학습 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta suluhisho la ndani ya ubongo ili kutatua matatizo ya neno la hisabati. Tofauti na mbinu za zamani za kujifunza takwimu za takwimu, tunatafsiri moja kwa moja matatizo ya maneno ya hisabati kwa usafananisha namba kwa kutumia muundo wa mtandao wa neura unaoendelea tena (RNN), bila uhandisi wa kihandisi. Tunaweza zaidi kutengeneza modeli ya hybrid inayounganisha muundo wa RNN na modeli ya upya wa upya kwa mfano huo ili kupata maboresho ya utendaji wa ziada. Majaribio yaliyofanyika kwenye seti kubwa ya taarifa zinaonyesha kuwa modeli ya RNN na modeli ya hybrid kwa kiasi kikubwa inafanya mbinu za elimu za takwimu za kisasa za kutatua tatizo la neno la hisabati.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz matematika sözleriniň problemalaryny otomatik çözmek üçin derin nural çözücügini tanaýar. Önceki istatistik öğrenme yaklaşımlarına karşı, matematik kelime sorunlarını tekrar denkleme örneklerine (RNN) modelini kullanarak tekrar tercüme ediyoruz. Daha uzak bir hybrid modelini RNN modelini birleşdirmek üçin bir nusga düzenledirip, üstüne bir şekilde taýýarlamak üçin bir nusga düzenlediriz. Ullakan veri setinde işlenýän deneyler RNN modeliniň we hybrid modeliniň matematik sözleriniň çözmesi üçin statistik öwrenmek yöntemleriniň üstüne ýok bolmagyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n diep neural oplosser om outomaties mathematike woord probleme te los. In contrast to previous statistical learning approaches, we directly translate math word problems to equation templates using a recurrent neural network (RNN) model, without sophisticated feature engineering. Ons ontwerp verder 'n hybrid model wat die RNN model en 'n gelykenis-gebaseerde ontvang model kombinieer om addisionele prestasie verbetering te bereik. Eksperimente wat op 'n groot datastel gedoen is, vertoon dat die RNN model en die hybridmodel betekeurig uitvoer state-of-the-art statistiese leer metodes vir matematiese woord probleme oplossing.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një zgjidhës nervor të thellë për të zgjidhur automatikisht problemet e fjalëve matematike. In contrast to previous statistical learning approaches, we directly translate math word problems to equation templates using a recurrent neural network (RNN) model, without sophisticated feature engineering.  Ne dizajnojmë më tej një model hibridë që kombinon modelin RNN dhe një model tërheqjeje bazuar në ngjashmëri për të arritur përmirësim shtesë të performancës. Eksperimentet e kryera në një sërë të dhënash të mëdha tregojnë se modeli RNN dhe modeli hibridë kryejnë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme metodat e mësimit statistik më të larta për zgjidhjen e problemeve me fjalët matematike.', 'am': 'ይህም ፕሮግራም የጥልቅ የናቡር መረጃ መፍታትን ለገጣጠር ቃላት ችግር ለመፍታት ያስችላል፡፡ In contrast to previous statistical learning approaches, we directly translate math word problems to equation templates using a recurrent neural network (RNN) model, without sophisticated feature engineering.  የRNN ሞዴል እና በተስማማማው የድምፅ አካባቢ ሞዴል እና ጨምር የድምፅ አካባቢ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የRNN ሞዴል እና የhybrid ሞዴል በሥርዓት-አርእስቲካዊ ትምህርት ትምህርት ሥርዓት ለመቆጣጠር የሥርዓት ትምህርት ሥርዓት እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt matematik sözlərinin problemlərini otomatik çəkmək üçün derin nöral çözücüsünü göstərir. Əvvəlki statistik öyrənmə yaxınlıqlarına baxmayaraq, biz matematik sözlərinin problemlərini yenidən nöral a ğ (RNN) modelini istifadə edib, sofistikli fəaliyyət inženjeri olmadan təkrarlayırıq. Biz artıq RNN modelini birləşdirən hibrid modelini və bənzər bir alış modelini daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün daha yaxşılaşdırırıq. Büyük verilən qurduğu təcrübələr RNN modeli və hibrid modeli matematik sözlərin problemlərini çəkmək üçün statistik öyrənmə metodlarından çox üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է խորը նյարդային լուծողը, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար լուծի մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրները: Հակառակը նախորդ վիճակագրական ուսումնասիրության մոտեցումներին, մենք անմիջապես մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրները փոխակերպում ենք հավասարման մոդելների, օգտագործելով կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի (ՌՆՆ) մոդելը, առանց բարդ հատկությունների ճար Մենք նաև ստեղծում ենք հիբրիդ մոդել, որը համադրում է ՌՆԹ մոդելը և նմանության հիմնված վերադարձման մոդելը, որպեսզի հասնի ավելին բարելավման: Experiments conducted on a large dataset show that the RNN model and the hybrid model significantly outperform state-of-the-art statistical learning methods for math word problem solving.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা গভীর নিউরেল সমাধানের জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে গণিত শব্দের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য উপস্থাপন করে। পূর্ববর্তী পরিসংখ্যান শিক্ষা পদক্ষেপের বিপরীতে, আমরা এক পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (RNN) মডেল ব্যবহার করে গণিত শব্দের সমস্যাকে সরাসরি অনুবাদ করি। আমরা আরো একটি হাইব্রিড মডেল ডিজাইন করি যা আরএনএন মডেল এবং একই সাথে ভিত্তিক পুনরুদ্ধার মডেলের সাথে যুক্ত করে যাতে আরো কাজের উন্নতি পাওয় Experiments conducted on a large dataset show that the RNN model and the hybrid model significantly outperform state-of-the-art statistical learning methods for math word problem solving.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje hluboký neuronový řešitel pro automatické řešení matematických slovních problémů. Na rozdíl od předchozích statistických učebních přístupů překládáme matematické slovní úlohy přímo do rovnicových šablon pomocí modelu rekurentní neuronové sítě (RNN), bez sofistikovaného funkčního inženýrství. Dále navrhujeme hybridní model, který kombinuje RNN model a podobnostní retrieval model pro dosažení dalšího zlepšení výkonu. Experimenty provedené na velkém datovém souboru ukazují, že RNN model a hybridní model výrazně překonávají nejmodernější statistické učební metody pro řešení problémů matematických slov.', 'ca': "This paper presents a deep neural solver to automatically solve math word problems.  A diferent dels enfocaments d'aprenentatge estadística anteriors, traduem directament els problemes de paraules matemàtiques a models d'equació utilitzant un model recurrent de xarxa neural (RNN), sense enginyeria sofisticada. També dissenyem un model híbrid que combina el model RNN i un model de recuperació basat en similitud per aconseguir millora adicional del rendiment. Els experiments fets en un gran conjunt de dades mostren que el model RNN i el model híbrid superen significativament els mètodes d'aprenentatge estadística més avançats per resoldre problemes de paraules matemàtiques.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös on esitatud sügav neurolahendaja matemaatika sõna probleemide automaatseks lahendamiseks. Vastupidiselt varasematele statistilistele õppemeetoditele tõlgime matemaatiliste sõnade probleemid otse võrrandimallidesse, kasutades korduvat närvivõrgu (RNN) mudelit, ilma keerukate funktsioonide insenerita. Lisaks projekteerime hübriidmudeli, mis ühendab RNN mudeli ja sarnasusel põhineva taastamismudeli täiendava jõudluse parandamiseks. Suure andmekogumiga läbi viidud eksperimendid näitavad, et RNN-mudel ja hübriidmudel on oluliselt suuremad kui kaasaegsed statistilised õppemeetodid matemaatika sõna probleemide lahendamiseks.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja duboko neuralno rješavanje kako bi automatski riješio probleme s riječima matematike. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim pristupima statističkog učenja, direktno prevodimo probleme sa matematičkim riječima u hrame jednačine koristeći rekonstruirani model neuralne mreže (RNN), bez sofisticiranog inženjeringa funkcija. Dalje dizajniramo hibridni model koji kombinira RNN model i model povratka na osnovu sličnosti kako bi postigli dodatno poboljšanje učinka. Eksperimenti provedeni na velikom setu podataka pokazuju da model RNN i hibrid model značajno iznosi statističke metode učenja stanja umjetnosti za rješavanje problem a s riječima matematike.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään syvä neuroratkaisu matemaattisten sanaongelmien automaattiseen ratkaisemiseen. Toisin kuin aikaisemmat tilastolliset oppimismenetelmät, käännämme matemaattiset sanaongelmat suoraan yhtälömalleiksi käyttäen toistuvaa neuroverkkomallia (RNN), ilman kehittyneitä ominaisuuksia. Lisäksi suunnittelemme hybridimallin, joka yhdistää RNN-mallin ja samankaltaisuuteen perustuvan hakumallin suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Suurella aineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että RNN-malli ja hybridimalli suoriutuvat merkittävästi matemaattisten sanojen ongelmanratkaisun uusimmista tilastollisista oppimismenetelmistä.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop drawable-action Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem pilihan dumateng sing beraksi model DNN lan babagan barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang pengaturan tambah bantuan nggawe Jejaring Name', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wata suluɗi mai ƙaranci dõmin ya nẽmi solar matsayi farat ɗaya. @ info: whatsthis Tuna sami wani misalin Hybrid wanda ke haɗa misalin RNN da wani motel mai samu'a da kwatanka, dõmin ya sami ƙari gyaranta. Tajararin da aka samar a kan wani tsari mai girma na nuna cewa misalin RNN da motel na Hybri mai girma zai nuna metoden sanarwa na-da-sanar wa matsayin don ya nẽmi solar matsayin.", 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג פתרון עצבי עמוק כדי לפתור אוטומטית בעיות מילים מתמטיקה. בניגוד לשיטות לימוד סטטיסטי קודמות, אנחנו מתרגמים ישירות בעיות מילים מתמטיקה למבנות משוואות באמצעות מודל רשת עצבית (RNN) מתחזרת, ללא הנדסה מתוחכמת של תכונות. אנחנו מעצבים עוד מודל היברידי שמשולב את מודל RNN ומודל שיחזור מבוסס על דמיון כדי להשיג שיפור ביצועים נוסף. ניסויים שעשויים על קבוצת נתונים גדולה מראים שהמודל RNN והמודל היברידי יוצאים משמעות יותר משיטות לימוד סטטיסטי חדשות לפתור בעיות במתמטיקה.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen globoki nevronski reševalec za samodejno reševanje težav z matematičnimi besedami. V nasprotju s prejšnjimi pristopi statističnega učenja težave matematičnih besed neposredno prevajamo v predloge enačb z uporabo modela ponavljajočega se nevronskega omrežja (RNN), brez sofisticiranega inženiringa funkcij. Nadalje oblikujemo hibridni model, ki združuje RNN model in na podlagi podobnosti temelječi model za pridobivanje dodatnega izboljšanja zmogljivosti. Eksperimenti na velikem naboru podatkov kažejo, da RNN model in hibridni model bistveno presegata najsodobnejše metode statističnega učenja za reševanje problemov matematičnih besed.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གྲངས་རིག་གི་དོན་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གྲངས་རིག་གི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཉིད་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ། In contrast to previous statistical learning approaches, we directly translate math word problems to equation templates using a recurrent neural network (RNN) model, without sophisticated feature engineering. འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་hybrid་གི་མ་དབུགས་ཞིག་ལས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག Experiments conducted on a large data set show that the RNN model and the hybrid model are significantly outperforming state-of-the-art statistical learning methods for math word problems solving.'}
{'en': 'Question Generation for Question Answering', 'ar': 'توليد الأسئلة للإجابة على الأسئلة', 'es': 'Generación de preguntas para responder preguntas', 'fr': 'Génération de questions pour répondre aux questions', 'pt': 'Geração de perguntas para resposta de perguntas', 'ja': '質問への回答のための質問生成', 'zh': '以问答为生', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए प्रश्न जनरेशन', 'ru': 'Формирование вопроса для ответа на вопрос', 'ga': 'Giniúint Ceisteanna le Freagra Ceist', 'hu': 'Kérdések generálása a kérdések megválaszolásához', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δημιουργία ερωτήσεων για απάντηση ερωτήσεων', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру үшін сұрақтарды құру', 'it': 'Generazione delle domande per rispondere alle domande', 'lt': 'Klausimų atsakymo generacija', 'mk': 'Генерација на прашања за одговори на прашања', 'ms': 'Penjanaan soalan untuk Jawapan soalan', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള ചോദ്യം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet għat-tweġibiet għal Mistoqsijiet', 'mn': 'Суулт хариултын тулд асуулт үүсгэх', 'no': 'Generering av spørsmål for svar på spørsmål', 'pl': 'Generowanie pytań do odpowiedzi na pytania', 'ro': 'Generarea întrebărilor pentru răspunsul la întrebări', 'sr': 'Generacija pitanja za odgovor na pitanja', 'sv': 'Frågagenerering för besvarande av frågor', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය', 'ta': 'கேள்வி பதில் கேள்வி உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'سوال جواب کے لئے سوال پیدا کرنا', 'uz': 'Soò£rov javobi uchun soò£rov yaratish', 'vi': 'Thế hệ câu hỏi cho câu trả lời', 'bg': 'Създаване на въпроси за отговор на въпроси', 'nl': 'Generatie van vragen voor het beantwoorden van vragen', 'hr': 'Generacija pitanja za odgovor na pitanja', 'da': 'Spørgsmålstegnelse til besvarelse af spørgsmål', 'id': 'Generasi Pertanyaan untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan', 'de': 'Generierung von Fragen zur Beantwortung von Fragen', 'ko': '문답에 사용되는 문제 생성', 'fa': 'تولید سوال برای جواب سوال', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa swali kwa jibu la swali', 'af': 'Vraog Generasie vir Vraog Antwoord', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i pyetjeve për përgjigjet e pyetjeve', 'tr': 'Sorag jogap üçin soragy Jeşirmek', 'am': 'የጥያቄ አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Հարցը պատասխանելու հարցերի ստեղծման համար', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য প্রশ্ন জেনারেশন', 'az': 'sual cavab vermÉ™k ĂĽĂ§ĂĽn sual yaradÄ±lÄ±Ĺź', 'bs': 'Generacija pitanja za odgovor na pitanja', 'ca': 'Generació de preguntes per respondre a preguntes', 'cs': 'Generování otázek pro zodpovězení otázek', 'et': 'Küsimuste genereerimine küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Kysymysten luominen kysymyksiin vastaamista varten', 'jv': 'Stock label', 'he': 'יצירת שאלות לענות על שאלות', 'sk': 'Oblikovanje vprašanj za odgovarjanje na vprašanja', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ལན་གསལ་སའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་Generation'}
{'en': 'This paper presents how to generate questions from given passages using neural networks, where large scale QA pairs are automatically crawled and processed from Community-QA website, and used as training data. The contribution of the paper is 2-fold : First, two types of question generation approaches are proposed, one is a retrieval-based method using convolution neural network (CNN), the other is a generation-based method using recurrent neural network (RNN) ; Second, we show how to leverage the generated questions to improve existing question answering systems. We evaluate our question generation method for the answer sentence selection task on three benchmark datasets, including SQuAD, MS MARCO, and WikiQA. Experimental results show that, by using generated questions as an extra signal, significant QA improvement can be achieved.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة كيفية إنشاء أسئلة من مقاطع معينة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية ، حيث يتم الزحف تلقائيًا إلى أزواج ضمان الجودة الكبيرة ومعالجتها من موقع Community-QA ، واستخدامها كبيانات تدريب. مساهمة الورقة مكونة من شقين: أولاً ، تم اقتراح نوعين من أساليب توليد الأسئلة ، أحدهما أسلوب قائم على الاسترجاع باستخدام الشبكة العصبية الالتفافية (CNN) ، والآخر طريقة قائمة على الجيل باستخدام الشبكة العصبية المتكررة (RNN). ) ؛ ثانيًا ، نوضح كيفية الاستفادة من الأسئلة التي تم إنشاؤها لتحسين أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة الحالية. نقوم بتقييم طريقة إنشاء الأسئلة الخاصة بنا لمهمة اختيار جملة الإجابة على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات معيارية ، بما في ذلك SQuAD و MS MARCO و WikiQA. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أنه باستخدام الأسئلة التي تم إنشاؤها كإشارة إضافية ، يمكن تحقيق تحسن كبير في ضمان الجودة.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta cómo generar preguntas a partir de pasajes determinados mediante redes neuronales, donde los pares de control de calidad a gran escala se rastrean y procesan automáticamente desde el sitio web de control de calidad de la comunidad, y se utilizan como datos de capacitación. La contribución del artículo es doble: primero, se proponen dos tipos de enfoques de generación de preguntas, uno es un método basado en la recuperación que utiliza la red neuronal de convolución (CNN), el otro es un método basado en generaciones que utiliza redes neuronales recurrentes (RNN); segundo, mostramos cómo aprovechar las preguntas generadas para mejorar los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas existentes. Evaluamos nuestro método de generación de preguntas para la tarea de selección de frases de respuesta en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia, incluidos sQuad, MS MARCO y WikiQA. Los resultados experimentales muestran que, al utilizar las preguntas generadas como señal adicional, se puede lograr una mejora significativa del control de calidad.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta como gerar perguntas a partir de determinadas passagens usando redes neurais, onde pares de QA em larga escala são rastreados e processados automaticamente no site Community-QA e usados como dados de treinamento. A contribuição do artigo é dupla: primeiro, dois tipos de abordagens de geração de perguntas são propostos, um é um método baseado em recuperação usando rede neural de convolução (CNN), o outro é um método baseado em geração usando rede neural recorrente (RNN ); Em segundo lugar, mostramos como aproveitar as perguntas geradas para melhorar os sistemas de resposta a perguntas existentes. Avaliamos nosso método de geração de perguntas para a tarefa de seleção de frases de resposta em três conjuntos de dados de referência, incluindo SQuAD, MS MARCO e WikiQA. Os resultados experimentais mostram que, usando perguntas geradas como um sinal extra, pode ser alcançada uma melhoria significativa de QA.', 'fr': "Cet article explique comment générer des questions à partir de passages donnés à l'aide de réseaux neuronaux, où des paires d'assurance qualité à grande échelle sont automatiquement explorées et traitées à partir du site Web de la communauté d'assurance qualité, et utilisées comme données de formation La contribution de l'article est double\xa0: premièrement, deux types d'approches de génération de questions sont proposés, l'un est une méthode basée sur la récupération utilisant un réseau neuronal à convolution (CNN), l'autre est une méthode basée sur la génération utilisant un réseau neuronal récurrent (RNN)\xa0; Deuxièmement, nous montrons comment tirer parti des questions générées pour améliorer les systèmes de réponse aux questions existants. Nous évaluons notre méthode de génération de questions pour la tâche de sélection de phrases de réponse sur trois ensembles de données de référence, dont SQuad, MS MARCO et WikiQA. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent qu'en utilisant les questions générées comme signal supplémentaire, une amélioration significative de l'AQ peut être obtenue.", 'ja': '大規模なQAペアをCommunity - QAのウェブサイトから自動的にクロールして処理し、トレーニングデータとして使用するニューラルネットワークを使用して、与えられたパッセージから質問を生成する方法を提示する。論文の貢献は2つあります。1つは、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）を使用した検索ベースの方法で、もう1つは再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）を使用した生成ベースの方法です。2つ目は、生成された質問を活用して既存の質問回答システムを改善する方法を示します。SQuAD、MS MARCO、WikiQAを含む3つのベンチマークデータセットで、回答文選択タスクの質問生成方法を評価します。実験結果は、生成された質問を余分なシグナルとして使用することで、有意なQA改善を達成できることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文言用神经网络生于给定之段落,其大者QACommunity-QA网站自取,以为训练之数。 贡献倍2:一曰用卷积神经网络(CNN),一曰用递归神经网络(RNN);二曰用生,二曰用生。 其次,我们展示了怎么生成的事情来改进现在的问答系统。 余于三准数集(包 SQuAD、MS MARCO 、 WikiQA)上评对案句择事成法。 实验结果表明以生成为号,可以显QA。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлено, как генерировать вопросы из заданных отрывков с помощью нейронных сетей, где крупномасштабные пары QA автоматически сканируются и обрабатываются с веб-сайта Community-QA, а также используются в качестве обучающих данных. Вклад работы 2-х кратный: во-первых, предложены два типа подходов генерации вопросов, один из которых представляет собой метод на основе поиска с использованием сверточной нейронной сети (CNN), другой - метод на основе генерации с использованием рекуррентной нейронной сети (RNN); во-вторых, мы показываем, как использовать сгенерированные вопросы для улучшения существующих систем ответов на вопросы. Мы оцениваем наш метод генерации вопросов для задачи выбора предложения ответа на трех эталонных наборах данных, включая SQuAD, MS MARCO и WikiQA. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что, используя сгенерированные вопросы в качестве дополнительного сигнала, можно добиться значительного улучшения QA.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर प्रस्तुत करता है कि तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके दिए गए मार्गों से प्रश्न कैसे उत्पन्न किए जाएं, जहां बड़े पैमाने पर क्यूए जोड़े स्वचालित रूप से क्रॉल किए जाते हैं और समुदाय-क्यूए वेबसाइट से संसाधित होते हैं, और प्रशिक्षण डेटा के रूप में उपयोग किए जाते हैं। पेपर का योगदान 2-गुना है: सबसे पहले, दो प्रकार के प्रश्न पीढ़ी के दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित हैं, एक कनवल्शन न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) का उपयोग करके पुनर्प्राप्ति-आधारित विधि है, दूसरा आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (आरएनएन) का उपयोग करके एक पीढ़ी-आधारित विधि है; दूसरा, हम दिखाते हैं कि मौजूदा प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाली प्रणालियों को बेहतर बनाने के लिए उत्पन्न प्रश्नों का लाभ कैसे उठाया जाए। हम SQuAD, MS MARCO और WikiQA सहित तीन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर उत्तर वाक्य चयन कार्य के लिए हमारी प्रश्न जनरेशन विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि, एक अतिरिक्त संकेत के रूप में उत्पन्न प्रश्नों का उपयोग करके, महत्वपूर्ण क्यूए सुधार प्राप्त किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair conas ceisteanna a ghiniúint as sleachta tugtha ag baint úsáide as líonraí néaracha, ina ndéantar péirí QA ar mhórscála a chraobhscaoileadh agus a phróiseáil go huathoibríoch ó shuíomh Gréasáin Community-QA, agus a úsáid mar shonraí oiliúna. Tá ranníocaíocht an pháipéir faoi dhó: Ar dtús, moltar dhá chineál cur chuige giniúna ceiste, is modh aisghabhála-bhunaithe ceann amháin a úsáideann líonra convolution neural (CNN), is modh giniúna-bhunaithe é an ceann eile ag baint úsáide as líonra neural athfhillteach (RNN). ); Ar an dara dul síos, léirímid conas na ceisteanna ginte a ghiaráil chun na córais freagartha ceisteanna atá ann cheana a fheabhsú. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár modh giniúna ceisteanna don tasc roghnúcháin abairtí freagraí ar thrí thacar sonraí tagarmharcála, lena n-áirítear SQuAD, MS MARCO, agus WikiQA. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha, trí úsáid a bhaint as ceisteanna ginte mar chomhartha breise, gur féidir feabhas suntasach QA a bhaint amach.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τον τρόπο δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων από δεδομένα περάσματα χρησιμοποιώντας νευρωνικά δίκτυα, όπου ζεύγη QA μεγάλης κλίμακας ανιχνεύονται αυτόματα και επεξεργάζονται από τον ιστότοπο της κοινότητας-QA και χρησιμοποιούνται ως δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Η συμβολή της εργασίας είναι διττή: Πρώτον, προτείνονται δύο τύποι προσεγγίσεων δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων, η μία είναι μια μέθοδος βασισμένη στην ανάκτηση χρησιμοποιώντας νευρωνικό δίκτυο σύγχυσης (Η άλλη είναι μια μέθοδος βασισμένη σε γενιά χρησιμοποιώντας επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο (RNN). Δεύτερον, δείχνουμε πώς να αξιοποιήσουμε τις δημιουργημένες ερωτήσεις για να βελτιώσουμε τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα απάντησης ερωτήσεων. Αξιολογούμε τη μέθοδο δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων για την εργασία επιλογής προτάσεων απάντησης σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των SQuAD, MS MARCO και WikiQA. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι, χρησιμοποιώντας τις παραγόμενες ερωτήσεις ως επιπλέον σήμα, μπορεί να επιτευχθεί σημαντική βελτίωση της ποιότητας.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja, hogyan lehet kérdéseket generálni adott átjárókból neurális hálózatok segítségével, ahol a nagyméretű minőségi párokat automatikusan feltérképezni és feldolgozni a Közösség-minőségi honlapról, és képzési adatként használják fel. A tanulmány kétszeres hozzájárulása: Először is két típusú kérdésgenerálási megközelítést javasolunk, az egyik a konvolúciós neurális hálózatot (CNN) alkalmazó visszakeresési alapú módszer, a másik pedig a visszatérő neurális hálózatot (RNN) alkalmazó generációs alapú módszer; Másodszor megmutatjuk, hogyan lehet a generált kérdéseket kihasználni a meglévő kérdésre válaszoló rendszerek javítása érdekében. A válaszmondat kiválasztására vonatkozó kérdések generálásának módszerét három referenciaadatkészleten értékeljük, köztük SQUAD, MS MARCO és WikiQA. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a generált kérdések plusz jelként való felhasználásával jelentős minőségi javulás érhető el.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს როგორ შექმნას კითხვების შექმნა, რომლებიც ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენებაში, სადაც დიდი QA ზოგიები ავტომატურად გადატანა და გამოყენება სამუშაო-Q პირველი, ორი ტიპი კითხვის შემდეგების მიღება, ერთი არის კონგუროციის ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება, ერთი არის კონგუროციის ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება, მეორე არის შემდეგების მიღებული მეტი, რომელიც გამოყენება რეკურენ მეორე, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ როგორ გავაკეთებთ წარმოიქმნა კითხვების გამოსახულება, როგორ გავაკეთებთ მსოფლიო კითხვების განსახულება. ჩვენ ჩვენი კითხვის წარმოდგენის პროცემის გადავიწყება სამი ბენქმარკური მონაცემების საქმე მონაცემების მიხედვით SQuAD, MS MARCO და WikiQA. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი გამოყენებული კითხვების გამოყენებით, როგორც ექსპერიმენტიური სიგნალს, შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი QA-ს შე', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiami klausimai, kylantys iš tam tikrų dalių naudojant nervinius tinklus, kuriuose didelio masto QA poros automatiškai siunčiamos ir apdorojamos iš Bendrijos QA interneto svetainės ir naudojamos kaip mokymo duomenys. Popieriaus indėlis yra dvigubas: pirma, siūloma taikyti dviejų rūšių klausimų generavimo metodus, vienas – atkūrimo metodas naudojant konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą (CNN), kitas – kartos metodas naudojant pakartotinį nervinį tinklą (RNN); Antra, parodysime, kaip panaudoti iškeltus klausimus, kad pagerintume esamas atsakymo į klausimus sistemas. Vertiname klausimų rengimo metodą atsakymų sakinių atrankos užduotims trijuose lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose, įskaitant SQuAD, MS MARCO ir WikiQA. Experimental results show that, by using generated questions as an extra signal, significant QA improvement can be achieved.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta come generare domande da determinati passaggi utilizzando reti neurali, dove coppie di QA su larga scala vengono automaticamente scansionate ed elaborate dal sito Web Community-QA e utilizzate come dati di formazione. Il contributo dell'articolo è duplice: in primo luogo, vengono proposti due tipi di approcci di generazione delle domande, uno è un metodo basato sul recupero che utilizza la rete neurale convoluzione (CNN), l'altro è un metodo basato sulla generazione che utilizza la rete neurale ricorrente (RNN); In secondo luogo, mostriamo come sfruttare le domande generate per migliorare i sistemi di risposta alle domande esistenti. Valutiamo il nostro metodo di generazione delle domande per l'attività di selezione delle frasi di risposta su tre set di dati benchmark, tra cui SQUAD, MS MARCO e WikiQA. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che, utilizzando le domande generate come segnale aggiuntivo, è possibile ottenere un significativo miglioramento del QA.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз невралдық желілерді қолданып келтірілген пассажалардан сұрақтарды қалай құру керектігін көрсетеді, олардың үлкен масштабы QA екеуі автоматты түрде Community-QA вебсайтынан жасалған және о Қағаздың қатынасы 2 рет қосымша: біріншіден, екі сұрақ құру түрлерінің қатынасы ұсынылады, біріншіден қайталану невралдық желі (CNN) қолданылатын, біріншіден қайталану невралдық желі (RNN) қолданылатын, қайталану т Екіншіден, жауап беру жүйелерін жасау үшін құрылған сұрақтарды қалай көмектесуін көрсетедік. Біз сұрақ құру әдісімізді SQuAD, MS MARCO және WikiQA деген үш кеңістік деректер қорларындағы жауап таңдау тапсырмасын бағалаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер жасалған сұрақтарды қосымша сигнал ретінде қолдану үшін QA жақсарту мүмкін болады.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува како да се генерираат прашања од одредени премини користејќи невровни мрежи, каде што големи парови на QA се автоматски преполнуваат и процесираат од веб-страницата на Community-QA, и се користат како податоци за обука. Придонесот на хартијата е двојен: Прво, се предложуваат два вида на пристапи за генерација на прашања, еден е метод базиран на преземање со користење на конволуционалната неурална мрежа (CNN), другиот е метод базиран на генерација со користење на рекурентна неурална мрежа (RNN); Второ, покажуваме како да ги искористиме генерираните прашања за подобрување на постојните системи за одговори на прашања. Ние го проценуваме нашиот метод на генерација на прашања за задачата за избор на речениците на одговорите на три бази на податоци, вклучително и SQuAD, MS MARCO и WikiQA. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека со користење на генерираните прашања како дополнителен сигнал може да се постигне значително подобрување на QA.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan bagaimana untuk menghasilkan soalan dari laluan yang diberikan menggunakan rangkaian saraf, di mana pasangan QA skala besar secara automatik merangkak dan diproses dari laman web Community-QA, dan digunakan sebagai data latihan. kontribusi kertas adalah 2-kali: Pertama, dua jenis pendekatan generasi soalan diusulkan, satu adalah kaedah berdasarkan pemulihan menggunakan rangkaian saraf konvolution (CNN), yang lain adalah kaedah berdasarkan generasi menggunakan rangkaian saraf recurrent (RNN); Second, we show how to leverage the generated questions to improve existing question answering systems.  Kami menilai kaedah generasi soalan kami untuk tugas pemilihan kalimat jawapan pada tiga set data benchmark, termasuk SQuAD, MS MARCO, dan WikiQA. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa, dengan menggunakan soalan yang dijana sebagai isyarat tambahan, peningkatan QA yang signifikan boleh dicapai.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കൊടുത്ത പാസേജുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ഈ പേപ്പറിന് കാണിക്കുന് പത്രത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗരണ രണ്ടിരട്ടി: ആദ്യം, രണ്ടു തരം ചോദ്യ തലമുറയുടെ അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്നത് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാണ്, ഒന്നാണ് ക്യൂണുള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച രണ്ടാമത്, നിലവിലുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് നമുക്ക് കാ മൂന്നു ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള നമ്മുടെ ചോദ്യ തലമു പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, കൂടുതല്\u200d സിഗ്നല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഉല്\u200dപാദിച്ച ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തു', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta kif jistgħu jiġu ġġenerati mistoqsijiet minn passaġġi partikolari bl-użu ta’ netwerks newrali, fejn par QA fuq skala kbira jiġu awtomatikament imtella’ u pproċessati mill-websajt tal-Komunità-QA, u użati bħala dejta ta’ taħriġ. Il-kontribuzzjoni tal-karta hija darbtejn: L-ewwel, żewġ tipi ta’ approċċi għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet huma proposti, wieħed huwa metodu bbażat fuq l-irkupru bl-użu tan-netwerk newrali ta’ konvoluzzjoni (CNN), l-ieħor huwa metodu bbażat fuq il-ġenerazzjoni bl-użu tan-netwerk newrali rikorrenti (RNN); It-tieni nett, nagħmlu evidenza dwar kif nistgħu ninfurzaw il-mistoqsijiet iġġenerati biex itejbu s-sistemi eżistenti ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet. Aħna jevalwaw il-metodu tagħna ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet għall-kompitu ta’ għażla ta’ sentenza ta’ tweġiba fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza, inklużi SQuAD, MS MARCO, u WikiQA. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li, bl-użu ta’ mistoqsijiet iġġenerati bħala sinjal addizzjonali, jista’ jinkiseb titjib sinifikanti fil-QA.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж өгсөн хэсгүүдээс асуултуудыг хэрхэн гаргах вэбсайтаас автоматаар QA хоёр автоматаар хөгжүүлж, боловсруулж, сургалт өгөгдлийн хувьд хэрэглэгддэгийг харуулдаг. Цагийн нийлүүлэлт нь 2 дахин: Эхлээд, хоёр төрлийн асуулт бий болгох аргыг санал болгож байна, нэг нь convolution neural network (CNN), нөгөө нь сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглан дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл сүлжээний аргыг ашиглаж байна. Хоёрт, бид сурагчийн хариултын системийг сайжруулахын тулд үүсгэсэн асуултуудыг хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг талаар харуулж байна. Бид асуулт бий болгох аргыг хариултын өгүүлбэрийн сонголтын даалгаврын даалгаврын арга хэмжээнд үнэлдэг. SQuAD, MS MARCO, WikiQA. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд, үүсгэсэн асуултуудыг нэмэлт сигнал болгон ашигласнаар QA-ын сайжруулалт гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser korleis å laga spørsmål frå oppgjevne passar ved hjelp av neiralnettverk, der stor skala QA-par vert automatisk oppløyst og handsama frå nettstaden for Community-QA og brukt som treningsdata. Bidraget på papiret er 2 gangar: Først er to typar spørsmål-genereringstilnærmingar foreslått, éin er ein tilhendingsbasert metode med konvolusjonsneuralnettverk (CNN), den andre er ein genereringsbasert metode ved hjelp av rekurserande neuralnettverk (RNN). Andre, viser vi korleis å leverara dei genererte spørsmålene for å forbedra det eksisterande spørsmålsystemet. Vi evaluerer spørsmål vårt metode for utvalet av svarsetningar på tre benchmarkdatasett, inkludert SQuAD, MS MARCO og WikiQA. Eksperimentale resultat viser at, ved å bruka genererte spørsmål som eit ekstra signal, kan det gjerast signifikante forbetringa av QA.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono sposób generowania pytań z danych fragmentów za pomocą sieci neuronowych, gdzie duże para QA są automatycznie przeszukiwane i przetwarzane ze strony internetowej Community-QA oraz wykorzystywane jako dane treningowe. Wkład artykułu jest dwukrotny: Po pierwsze, zaproponowano dwa rodzaje podejść do generowania pytań, jeden jest metodą opartą na odzyskiwaniu wykorzystującą konwolucyjną sieć neuronową (CNN), drugi jest metodą opartą na generacji wykorzystującą rekrutującą sieć neuronową (RNN); Po drugie, pokazujemy, jak wykorzystać generowane pytania do ulepszenia istniejących systemów odpowiedzi na pytania. Oceniamy naszą metodę generowania pytań dla zadania wyboru zdań odpowiedzi na trzech zestawach danych referencyjnych, w tym SQuAD, MS MARCO i WikiQA. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że dzięki wykorzystaniu generowanych pytań jako dodatkowego sygnału można osiągnąć znaczną poprawę jakości.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja kako se stvara pitanja iz određenih prolaza koristeći neuralne mreže, gde se velika skala par QA automatski prebacuju i obrađuju sa web stranice zajednice-QA i koriste kao podaci obuke. Dodatak papira je dva puta: Prvo, predloženi su dva tipa pristupa generaciji pitanja, jedan je metod na osnovu povratka koristeći konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu (CNN), drugi je metod na osnovu generacije koristeći rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu (RNN); Drugo, pokazujemo kako da utièemo na stvaranje pitanja kako bi poboljšali postojeæe odgovorne sisteme pitanja. Procjenjujemo našu metodu generacije pitanja za zadatak izbora odgovorne rečenice na tri serije podataka, uključujući SQuAD, MS MARCO i WikiQA. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, koristeći generirane pitanja kao dodatni signal, mogu postići značajno poboljšanje QA.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă modul în care se generează întrebări din pasaje date utilizând rețele neurale, unde perechile QA la scară largă sunt crawled și procesate automat de pe site-ul comunitar-QA și utilizate ca date de formare. Contribuția lucrării este de două ori: În primul rând, sunt propuse două tipuri de abordări de generare a întrebărilor, una este o metodă bazată pe recuperare care utilizează rețeaua neurală de convoluție (CNN), cealaltă este o metodă bazată pe generație care utilizează rețeaua neurală recurentă (RNN); În al doilea rând, arătăm cum să valorificăm întrebările generate pentru a îmbunătăți sistemele existente de răspuns la întrebări. Evaluăm metoda noastră de generare a întrebărilor pentru activitatea de selectare a frazelor de răspuns pe trei seturi de date de referință, inclusiv SQUAD, MS MARCO și WikiQA. Rezultatele experimentale arată că, utilizând întrebările generate ca semnal suplimentar, se poate obține o îmbunătățire semnificativă a calității.', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa su'aalo ka soo saarista baasaboor la siiyo oo lagu isticmaalayo shabakado neurada ah, meesha ay laba noocyo oo waaweyn oo QA ah ka baaraandegaan bogagga Community-QA, waxaana looga isticmaalaa macluumaad waxbarasho ah. The contribution of the paper is 2-fold: First, two types of question generation approaches are proposed, one is a retrieval-based method using convolution neural network (CNN), the other is a generation-based method using recurrent neural network (RNN);  Second, waxaynu tusnaynaa sida loo soo celiyo su'aalaha la soo saaray si ay u hagaajiyaan nidaamka jawaabta ee su'aalaha jira. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababka ay ku qoran yihiin qaababka jawaabta doorashada oo ku saabsan saddex sawirada benchmark, including SQuAD, MS MARCO iyo WikiQA. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in horumarinta QA oo muhiim ah lagu sameyn karo su'aalo dhashay sida calaamad dheer ah.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar hur man genererar frågor från givna passager med hjälp av neurala nätverk, där storskaliga QA-par automatiskt genomsöks och bearbetas från Community-QA webbplats, och används som träningsdata. Uppsatsens bidrag är tvåfaldigt: För det första föreslås två typer av frågegenereringsmetoder, den ena är en återvinningsbaserad metod som använder konvulutionsneuralt nätverk (CNN), den andra är en generationsbaserad metod som använder återkommande neuralt nätverk (RNN). För det andra visar vi hur man utnyttjar de genererade frågorna för att förbättra befintliga frågesvarssystem. Vi utvärderar vår frågegenereringsmetod för svarsutvalsuppgiften på tre benchmarkdatauppsättningar, inklusive SQUAD, MS MARCO och WikiQA. Experimentella resultat visar att genom att använda genererade frågor som en extra signal kan betydande kvalitetsförbättring uppnås.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද දෙන්න පාසල් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය භාවිත කරන්න, කොහොමද ලොකු QA ජාලය පත්තරයේ සම්බන්ධය 2-පැත්තක්: මුලින්, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා, එක තමයි ප්\u200dර දෙවනිය, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කොහොමද උ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිච්චි වාක්ය තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට පරික්ෂා කරන්නේ බෙන්ච්මාර් පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනව', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கடவுச்செல்களிலிருந்து எவ்வாறு கேள்விகளை உருவாக்குவது புதிய பிணையமான வலைப்பின்னல் தாளின் பங்கு 2 மடங்கு: முதலில், இரண்டு வகையான கேள்வி உருவாக்குதல் முன்னுரிமைகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது, ஒன்று மீட்டெடுக்கப்பட்ட முறையாகும் முறைமையாகும். மற்றொர இரண்டாவது, நாம் எப்படி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகளை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம். நாம் எங்கள் கேள்வி உருவாக்க முறைமையை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மூன்று பென்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் சேர்க்க வேண்டிய வாக்கிய தே முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது, உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகளை கூடுதல் குறிகையை பயன்படுத்தினால், முக்கியமான QA மேம்பட', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ دکھاتا ہے کہ نورول نیٹورک کے استعمال سے سوال کس طرح پیدا کریں، جہاں بہت سی اسکیل کیا جوڑے اپنا کامیونٹ-کیا ویٹورک سے پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، اور ٹرینگ ڈیٹ کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. کاغذ کا حصہ دو دفعہ ہے: پہلے، دو قسم سؤال کی نسل کی تقریبا پیش کیے جاتے ہیں، ایک کانولوٹن نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک (سی ان ان) کے استعمال سے پھیر لینے کی بنیادی طریقہ ہے، دوسرا ایک نسل کی بنیادی طریقہ ہے، دوبارہ نیورل نیٹ ورک (RNN) کے است دوسرا، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ موجود سوال جواب دینے کے لئے کس طرح سوال اضافہ کریں۔ ہم اپنے سوال پیدا کرنے کے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں کہ جواب دینے کے لئے جواب دینے کے لئے تین بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ، SQuAD، MS MARCO اور WikiQA کے ساتھ۔ تجربے کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ، پیدا کئے گئے سوالات کو اضافہ سیگنالہ کے طور پر استعمال کر رہے ہیں، اضافہ سیگنالہ کے طور پر، اضافہ سیگنالہ کے ساتھ، اضافہ سیگنالہ کے ساتھ،', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp cách để tạo câu hỏi từ các đoạn được đưa ra sử dụng mạng thần kinh, nơi các cặp cá nhân lớn tự động được bò và xử lý từ trang web đánh dấu cộng đồng và được dùng làm dữ liệu đào tạo. The contribution of the paper is 2-gấp: Đầu tiên, two type of question generation approaches are proposed, one is a seat-based methods using xoắn-solal network (CNN) the other is a generation-based methods using recurti noron network (RNN). Thứ hai, chúng tôi chỉ cách thúc đẩy những câu hỏi tạo ra để cải thiện hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi hiện tại. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp tạo câu hỏi cho nhiệm vụ lựa chọn câu trả lời trên ba tập tin tiêu chuẩn, bao gồm: SCOAD, xơ MACO, và WikiLQA. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy bằng cách sử dụng các câu hỏi tạo ra như một tín hiệu phụ, đạt được khả năng cải thiện lớn.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz qoʻllanilgan maxfiy soʻzlardan neyrol tarmoqda savollarni yaratish imkoniyatini beradi. Bu yerda katta QA qoʻllanmalar avtomatik qoʻllangan va Komunity- QA veb- saytdan boshqarish va taʼminlovchi maʼlumot sifatida ishlatiladi. Qogʻozning qandaydigan ikki marta-ikki marta: Birinchi, ikki turli savol taʼminlovchi soʻzlari talab qilinadi, biri convolution neyrol tarmoqni (CNN) yordamida qaytadan foydalanish mumkin, boshqa qayta tarmoq (RNN) yordamida foydalanadigan foydalanuvchi tarmoq (qayta tarmoq tarmoʻllanmagan) bilan qayta qol Ikkinchi so'zda, biz hosil qiladigan savollarni qanday amalga oshirish uchun ko'rsatumiz. Biz savol yaratish usulini qiymatimiz, uchta benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibida SQuAD, MS MARCO va WikiQA kabi. Tekshirish natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, qoʻshimcha signal sifatida yaratilgan savollar yordamida juda muhim QA yaxshi bajarishi mumkin.", 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer, hvordan man genererer spørgsmål fra givne passager ved hjælp af neurale netværk, hvor store QA-par automatisk crawles og behandles fra Community-QA websted og bruges som træningsdata. Bidraget fra artiklen er dobbelt: For det første foreslås to typer spørgsmålstegn generering metoder, den ene er en hentningsbaseret metode ved hjælp af konvulution neurale netværk (CNN), den anden er en generationsbaseret metode ved hjælp af tilbagevendende neurale netværk (RNN); For det andet viser vi, hvordan man udnytter de genererede spørgsmål til at forbedre eksisterende spørgsmål besvarelsessystemer. Vi evaluerer vores metode til generering af spørgsmål til opgaven med udvælgelse af svarsætninger på tre benchmark datasæt, herunder SQUAD, MS MARCO og WikiQA. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at ved at bruge genererede spørgsmål som ekstra signal, kan der opnås betydelige kvalitetsforbedringer.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя как да генерираме въпроси от дадени пасажи, използвайки невронни мрежи, където широкомащабните двойки за оценка на качеството автоматично се обхождат и обработват от уебсайта на Общността и се използват като данни за обучение. Приносът на статията е двукратен: Първо са предложени два вида подхода за генериране на въпроси, единият е базиран на извличане метод, използващ конволюционна невронна мрежа (CNN), другият е базиран на поколение метод, използващ повтаряща се невронна мрежа (RNN); Второ, показваме как да използваме генерираните въпроси, за да подобрим съществуващите системи за отговор на въпроси. Ние оценяваме нашия метод за генериране на въпроси за задачата за избор на изречения за отговор на три сравнителни набора данни, включително SQuAD, MS MARCO и WikiQA. Експерименталните резултати показват, че чрез използването на генерирани въпроси като допълнителен сигнал може да се постигне значително подобрение на качеството.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje kako se stvara pitanja iz određenih prolaza koristeći neuralne mreže, gdje se velika skala parova QA automatski otvaraju i obrađuju sa stranice stranice zajednice-QA i koriste kao podaci obuke. Dodatak papira je dva puta: Prvo, predloženi su dva tipa pristupa generaciji pitanja, jedan je metod na osnovu povratka koristeći konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu (CNN), drugi je metod na osnovu generacije koristeći rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu (RNN); Drugo, pokazujemo kako utjecati na stvaranje pitanja za poboljšanje postojećih sustava odgovora na pitanja. Procjenjujemo našu metodu generacije pitanja za zadatak izbora odgovorne rečenice na tri seta podataka o kriteriji, uključujući SQuAD, MS MARCO i WikiQA. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se može postići značajno poboljšanje QA-a, koristeći proizvedena pitanja kao dodatni signal.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert hoe je vragen kunt genereren vanuit bepaalde passages met behulp van neurale netwerken, waarbij grootschalige QA-paren automatisch worden gecrawld en verwerkt vanaf de Community-QA-website, en worden gebruikt als trainingsdata. De bijdrage van het artikel is tweeledig: Ten eerste worden twee soorten benaderingen van vragengeneratie voorgesteld, de ene is een retrieval-gebaseerde methode met behulp van convolution neural network (CNN), de andere is een generatie-gebaseerde methode met behulp van recurrent neural network (RNN); Ten tweede laten we zien hoe je de gegenereerde vragen kunt gebruiken om bestaande vragen beantwoordingssystemen te verbeteren. We evalueren onze vragengeneratie methode voor de selectie van antwoordzinnen op drie benchmark datasets, waaronder SQuAD, MS MARCO en WikiQA. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat, door gegenereerde vragen als extra signaal te gebruiken, aanzienlijke kwaliteitsverbetering kan worden bereikt.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird gezeigt, wie aus bestimmten Passagen mithilfe neuronaler Netze Fragen generiert werden können, in denen große QA-Paare automatisch gecrawlt und von der Community-QA-Website verarbeitet und als Trainingsdaten verwendet werden. Der Beitrag des Aufsatzes ist zweifach: Erstens werden zwei Arten von Fragegenerierungsansätzen vorgeschlagen, einer ist eine Retrieval-basierte Methode unter Verwendung von Convolution Neuronal Network (CNN), der andere ist eine generationsbasierte Methode unter Verwendung von Rekurrent Neuronal Network (RNN); Zweitens zeigen wir, wie die generierten Fragen genutzt werden können, um bestehende Fragebeantworterungssysteme zu verbessern. Wir evaluieren unsere Fragegenerierungsmethode für die Antwortsatzauswahlaufgabe auf drei Benchmark-Datensätzen, darunter SQuAD, MS MARCO und WikiQA. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass durch die Verwendung generierter Fragen als zusätzliches Signal eine signifikante Verbesserung der Qualitätssicherung erreicht werden kann.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan bagaimana menghasilkan pertanyaan dari pasar yang diberikan menggunakan jaringan saraf, di mana pasar QA skala besar secara otomatis merangkak dan diproses dari situs Community-QA, dan digunakan sebagai data latihan. Kontribusi kertas adalah 2 kali lipat: Pertama, dua jenis pendekatan generasi pertanyaan diusulkan, satu adalah metode berdasarkan penemuan menggunakan jaringan neural konvolusi (CNN), yang lain adalah metode berdasarkan generasi menggunakan jaringan neural rekuren (RNN); Kedua, kita menunjukkan bagaimana menggunakan pertanyaan yang dihasilkan untuk meningkatkan sistem jawaban pertanyaan yang ada. Kami mengevaluasi metode generasi pertanyaan kami untuk tugas seleksi kalimat jawaban pada tiga set data benchmark, termasuk SQuAD, MS MARCO, dan WikiQA. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa, dengan menggunakan pertanyaan yang dihasilkan sebagai sinyal tambahan, peningkatan QA signifikan dapat dicapai.', 'ko': '본고는 신경 네트워크를 어떻게 사용하여 주어진 단락에서 문제를 생성하는지를 소개했다. 그 중에서 대규모의 퀴즈는 지역사회 퀴즈 사이트에서 자동으로 캡처하고 처리하며 훈련 데이터로 사용된다.본고의 공헌은 두 가지가 있다. 첫째, 두 가지 문제 생성 방법을 제시했다. 하나는 권적신경망(CNN)을 바탕으로 하는 검색 방법이고, 다른 하나는 귀속신경망(RNN)을 바탕으로 하는 생성 방법이다.그 다음으로 우리는 생성된 문제를 어떻게 활용하여 기존의 퀴즈 시스템을 개선하는지 보여줄 것이다.우리는 세 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서 답안 문장 선택 작업의 문제 생성 방법을 평가했는데, SQuad, MARCO 여사, WikiQA를 포함한다.실험 결과 생성된 문제를 추가 신호로 사용함으로써 QA를 현저하게 높일 수 있다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ نشان می\u200cدهد که چگونه سوالات را از مسیر داده شده با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی تولید می\u200cکند، جایی که جفت\u200cهای مقیاس بزرگ QA از وبسایت جامعه\u200cی اجتماعی-QA و به عنوان داده\u200cهای آموزش استفاده می\u200cکنند و از آن دسترسی کاغذ دو بار است: اول، دو نوع دسترسی نسل سوال پیشنهاد می\u200cشود، یکی از روش\u200cهای بازیابی با استفاده از شبکه عصبی کنورل (CNN) استفاده از شبکه عصبی (RNN) است، یکی از روش\u200cهای نسل بر اساس استفاده از شبکه عصبی بازیافت می\u200cشود. دوم، ما نشان می دهیم چگونه سوالات تولید شده را برای بهتر کردن سیستم جواب سوالات موجود تحویل دهیم. ما روش نسل سوال خود را برای انتخاب جواب دادن مجوز در سه مجموعه اطلاعات سنجیره ارزیابی می کنیم، شامل SQuAD، MS MARCO و WikiQA. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که با استفاده از سوالات تولید شده به عنوان سیگنال اضافی، بهترین QA معنی می\u200cتواند رسیده شود.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet sesi të gjenerohen pyetje nga pasazhet e dhëna duke përdorur rrjetet neuronale, ku çiftet e shkallës së madhe QA janë automatikisht të mbushura dhe të procesuara nga faqja e faqes Community-QA dhe përdorur si të dhëna trajnimi. Kontributi i gazetës është dy herë: Së pari, propozohen dy lloje qasjesh të gjenerimit të pyetjeve, një është një metodë bazuar në marrje duke përdorur rrjetin nervor konvolutor (CNN), tjetri është një metodë bazuar në gjeneratë duke përdorur rrjetin nervor recurrent (RNN); Së dyti, ne tregojmë se si të përdorim pyetjet e gjeneratuara për të përmirësuar sistemet ekzistuese të përgjigjesh pyetjeve. Ne vlerësojmë metodën tonë të gjenerimit të pyetjeve për detyrën e zgjedhjes së fjalëve për tre baza të dhënash, duke përfshirë SQuAD, MS MARCO dhe WikiQA. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se, duke përdorur pyetjet e gjeneratuara si një sinjal shtesë, mund të arrihet përmirësim i rëndësishëm QA.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha jinsi ya kutengeneza maswali kutoka kwa njia zilizopewa kwa kutumia mitandao ya kiserikali, ambapo wanandoa makubwa wa QA hupangwa na kutengenezwa kwa manufaa kutoka tovuti ya Jumuiya-QA, na hutumiwa kama taarifa za mafunzo. Mchango wa karatasi ni mara mbili: Kwanza, aina mbili za vizazi vya maswali zinapendekezwa, moja ni njia ya kupokea kwa kutumia mtandao wa taratibu za kijeshi (CNN), mwingine ni njia ya kizazi kwa kutumia mtandao wa kijamii unaoendelea tena (RNN); Pili, tunaonyesha namna ya kutumika maswali yaliyozaliwa ili kuboresha maswali yanayopo kwenye mfumo wa kujibu. Tutathmini njia ya kizazi chetu cha maswali kwa jukumu la uchaguzi wa hukumu kwenye seti tatu za bendera, ikiwa ni pamoja na SQuAD, MS MARCO na WikiQA. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa, kwa kutumia maswali yaliyozaliwa kama ishara ya ziada, maboresho makubwa ya QA yanaweza kufanikiwa.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz neural şebekelerinden nädip berilen geçirlerden soraglary döretmäni görkezýär, nirede Uly QA çizgiler awtomatik olaraň üýtgedilip, toplumyň-QA website-dan işledilip işledilýär we bu ýerde bilim maglumatlary hökmünde ullanylýar. Kagyzyň gaýşartmaky 2 gezek: Ilkinji gezek, iki hili soragy döretmäge gollaşyk teklip edildi, birisi konvolusiýan neural netek (CNN) bilen taýýarlanan täze döredir, beýlekisi tekrarly netral netek ullanýan täze döredir. Ikinjisi, biz bar soraglary jogap sistemlerini geliştirmek üçin üretilen soraglary nähili etkinleştirmegi görkeýäris. Cevap saýlamak görevini üç benchmark veri setirlerinde soraglarymyz döredilmesi üçin değerlendiriyoruz. SQuAD, MS MARCO we WikiQA dahil. Experimental netijeleri, üretilen soraglary ekstra sinyal bolup ulanarak, möhüm QA gelişmeleri başaryp biler.', 'af': "Hierdie papier vertoon hoe om vrae te genereer van gegewe wagte te te gebruik neurale netwerke, waar groot skaal QA paar outomaties kryf en verwerk word van Community-QA webwerk, en gebruik word as onderwerp data. Die bydrang van die papier is 2-vouer: Eerste, twee tipe vraaggeneeringstoegange word voorgestel, een is 'n herhaal-gebaseerde metode gebruik konvolusie neuralnetwerk (CNN), die ander is 'n generasie-gebaseerde metode gebruik herhaalde neuralnetwerk (RNN); Tweede, ons wys hoe om die genereerde vrae te verwys om bestaande vraag antwoord stelsels te verbeter. Ons evalueer ons vraag generasie metode vir die antwoord setseleksie taak op drie benchmark datastelle, insluitend SQuAD, MS MARCO en WikiQA. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat deur gegenereerde vrae as 'n ekstra sein te gebruik, betekende QA verbetering kan bereik word.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ከተሰጠው መግለጫ እንዴት እንዲፈለግ ጠያቄዎችን ከጠቅላላ መረብ የተጠቃሚ ጥያቄ ያሳያል፣ የትልቁ ቁልፎች የQA ዓይነቶች ማኅበረሰብ-QA ድረ ገጽ እና ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን እንደሚጠቀም እና የተጠቃሚ ዳታዎችን ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ የጋዜጠው አቀማመጥ ሁለት እጥፍ ነው፤ መጀመሪያ፣ ሁለት ዓይነት የጥያቄ ትውልድ ግንኙነት ተዘጋጅቷል፣ አንዱ ጉዳይ የውይይት መረብ (CNN)፣ ሁለተኛው ትውልድ የኔሩኤል መረብ (RNN) በመጠቀም የተመሳሳይ ትውልድ ነው፡፡ ሁለተኛ፣ እንዴት የተፈጠረውን ጥያቄዎችን እንዲያሳድግ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የጥያቄን ትውልድ ሥርዓታችንን በሦስት benchmark ዳታዎችን እና SQuAD፣ MS ማርኮ እና WikiQA ያሉትን የድምፅ ምርጫ ሥርዓት እናስተውሉናለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች፣ የፍጥረት ጥያቄዎችን እንደ ጥያቄ በመጠቀም፣ የQA ማስታወቂያ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'This paper presents how to generate questions from given passages using neural networks, where large scale QA pairs are automatically crawled and processed from Community-QA website, and used as training data.  পত্রিকার অবদান দুই গুণ: প্রথম, দুটি ধরনের প্রশ্ন প্রজন্মের ক্ষেত্রে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, একটি পুনরুদ্ধারের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি (সিএনএন), অন্যটি পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহ দ্বিতীয়, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে তৈরি হয়েছে প্রশ্নের প্রতিক্রিয়া উন্নত করার জন্য। আমরা তিনটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে আমাদের প্রশ্নের প্রজন্মের পদ্ধতি মূল্যায়ন করি, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে SQuAD, এমএস মার্কো এবং উইকিকিউএ। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বেশী সিগন্যাল হিসেবে তৈরি করা প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কিউএ উন্নয়নশীল হতে', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է, թե ինչպես ստեղծել հարցեր որոշ հատվածներից, օգտագործելով նյարդային ցանցեր, որտեղ մեծ մակարդակի QA զույգերը ինքնաբերաբար ձգվում են և վերլուծում են համայնքի-QA վեբ կայքից, և օգտագործվում են որպես ուսուցման Թղթի ներդրումը երկու անգամ է: Առաջինը, առաջարկում են երկու տեսակի հարցերի ստեղծման մոտեցումներ, մյուսը վերադարձման հիմնված մեթոդ է, որը օգտագործում է կոնվոլյուցիոն նեյրոնային ցանց (CNN), մյուսը՝ սերնդի հիմնված մեթոդ, որը օգտագործում է վերադարձ նե Երկրորդ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես օգտագործել ստեղծված հարցերը, որպեսզի բարելավենք գոյություն ունեցող հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգերը: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր հարցերի ստեղծման մեթոդը պատասխանի նախադասությունների ընտրության հանձնարարության համար երեք համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ներառյալ SQUADը, MS MARCO ը և WiKiQA-ը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ օգտագործելով ստեղծված հարցերը որպես ավելին ազդանշան, կարելի է հասնել կարևոր QA բարելավման:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje kako se stvara pitanja iz određenih prolaza koristeći neuralne mreže, gdje se velika skala parova QA automatski otvaraju i obrađuju sa stranice stranice zajednice-QA i koriste kao podaci obuke. Dodatak papira je dva puta: Prvo, predloženi su dva tipa pristupa generaciji pitanja, jedan je metod na osnovu povratka koristeći konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu (CNN), drugi je metod na osnovu generacije koristeći rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu (RNN); Drugo, pokazujemo kako utjecati na stvaranje pitanja za poboljšanje postojećih sustava odgovora na pitanja. Procjenjujemo našu metodu generacije pitanja za zadatak odabiranja odgovornih rečenica na tri serije podataka o referenciji, uključujući SQuAD, MS MARCO i WikiQA. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da se može postići značajno poboljšanje QA, koristeći generirane pitanja kao dodatni signal.', 'ca': "Aquest article mostra com generar preguntes a partir de passatges donats fent servir xarxes neurals, on parells de QA a gran escala s'obtienen automàticament i es processen a partir de la pàgina web de Community-QA, i s'utilitzen com dades d'entrenament. La contribució del paper és doble: primer, es proponen dos tipus d'enfocaments de generació de preguntes, un és un mètode basat en recuperació utilitzant la xarxa neural de convolució (CNN), l'altre és un mètode basat en generació utilitzant la xarxa neural recurrent (RNN); Second, we show how to leverage the generated questions to improve existing question answering systems.  Evaluam el nostre mètode de generació de preguntes per a la tasca de selecció de frases de resposta en tres conjunts de dades de referència, com SQuAD, MS MARCO i WikiQA. Els resultats experimentals mostren que, utilitzant les preguntes generades com a senyal extra, es pot aconseguir una millora significativa de la QA.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt nöral ağları vasitəsilə verilən keçmişlərdən soruşmaları necə yaratmağı göstərir. Büyük ölçüdə QA çiftlərinin otomatik olaraq Cənnət-QA web sitəsindən təhsil edilir və təhsil məlumatları olaraq istifadə edilir. Kağızın səbəbi 2 dəfə belədir: İlk, iki tür sual nəslinin yaxınlıqlarını təbliğ edilir, birisi konvolution nöral a ğ (CNN) ilə istifadə edərək, digərini yenidən nöral ağ (RNN) vasitəsilə nəsilə tabanlı bir yöntemdir. İkincisi, biz həmin sual cavab verən sistemlərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün yaratdığımız sualları necə yaratmağımızı göstəririk. Qəbul sözlərini seçmək üçün sorğu nəsil metodumuzu SQuAD, MS MARCO və WikiQA ilə birlikdə üç benchmark veri qurularında değerlendiririk. Eksperiment sonuçları göstərir ki, təşkil edilmiş sualları artıq sinyal kimi istifadə edərək, möhkəm QA düzəltməsi başarılı olar.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse, kuidas luua küsimusi antud lõikudest neurovõrkude abil, kus suuremahulisi kvaliteedi tagamise paare automaatselt kogukonna ja kvaliteedi tagamise veebisaidilt analüüsitakse ja neid kasutatakse koolitusandmetena. Töö panus on kahekordne: Esiteks pakutakse välja kahte tüüpi küsimuste genereerimise lähenemisviise, üks neist on päringupõhine meetod, mis kasutab konvolutsiooni neurovõrku (CNN), teine on põlvkonnapõhine meetod, mis kasutab korduvat neurovõrku (RNN); Teiseks näitame, kuidas kasutada tekkinud küsimusi olemasolevate küsimustele vastamise süsteemide parandamiseks. Hindame oma küsimuste genereerimise meetodit vastuselause valimise ülesandeks kolme võrdlusandmekogumi alusel, sealhulgas SQuAD, MS MARCO ja WikiQA alusel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et genereeritud küsimuste kasutamisega lisasignaalina on võimalik saavutada oluline kvaliteedi tagamise parandamine.', 'cs': 'Tento článek prezentuje, jak generovat otázky z daných pasáží pomocí neuronových sítí, kde jsou rozsáhlé QA páry automaticky procházeny a zpracovávány z webových stránek Community-QA a využívány jako tréninková data. Příspěvek je dvojnásobný: Nejprve jsou navrženy dva typy přístupů generování otázek, jeden je metoda založená na retrievalu využívající konvoluční neuronovou síť (CNN), druhý je generační metoda využívající recidivní neuronovou síť (RNN); Za druhé ukazujeme, jak využít generované otázky ke zlepšení stávajících systémů odpovědí na otázky. Hodnotíme metodu generování otázek pro úlohu výběru věty odpovědi na třech referenčních datových sadách, včetně SQuAD, MS MARCO a WikiQA. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že použitím generovaných otázek jako dalšího signálu lze dosáhnout významného zlepšení kvality.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään, miten voidaan luoda kysymyksiä tietyistä osioista käyttämällä neuroverkkoja, joissa laajamittaiset laadunvarmistusparit indeksoidaan ja käsitellään automaattisesti yhteisön ja laadunvarmistuksen verkkosivustolta ja käytetään koulutustietona. Tutkimuksen panos on kaksinkertainen: Ensinnäkin ehdotetaan kahdentyyppisiä kysymysten tuottamiseen liittyviä lähestymistapoja, joista toinen on takaisinhakuun perustuva menetelmä, jossa käytetään konvolution neural network (CNN), toinen on sukupolviin perustuva menetelmä, jossa käytetään toistuvia hermoverkkoja (RNN). Toiseksi näytämme, miten luotuja kysymyksiä voidaan hyödyntää nykyisten vastausjärjestelmien parantamiseksi. Arvioimme vastauslauseiden valintatehtävään liittyvän kysymysteknologiamenetelmämme kolmella vertailuaineistolla, mukaan lukien SQuAD, MS MARCO ja WikiQA. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että käyttämällä generoituja kysymyksiä lisäsignaalina voidaan saavuttaa merkittävää laadunvarmistuksen parantamista.', 'jv': "Awak iki mudheng pirsa tindakan nggawe kesempatan kanggo ngilanggar aturan pasar sing nyimpen gambar n' netwisan Neral, wong kuwi tindakan sistem wis dipateng lan ijol-ijol sing nggawe ngulinggo winih (gedit) sing isin oleh dumateng sumulakno dumateng sumulakno dumateng. Ombudhakan kelompok ing papat 2-tambah: Siji, sampeyan karo sistem sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke batir, sampeyan karo backtrace-basai method nggunakake convolution Neral network wis segond, kéné ngerti piye nganggep nggawe kesempatan sing beraksi perusahaan gampang Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe kesempatan sistem kanggo langgambar nggo langgambar terus bench dataset, gambar sêfto nggo Perintah sing dipontrolan ngono, nek nggunakake suaraning layang kelas siji wis dumadhi, akeh lanjut sing luwih nggawe", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljeno, kako ustvariti vprašanja iz določenih odlomkov z uporabo nevronskih omrežij, kjer se veliki pari kakovosti samodejno brskajo in obdelujejo s spletnega mesta Skupnosti-kakovosti ter se uporabljajo kot podatki o usposabljanju. Prispevek prispevka je dvakratni: Prvič, predlagamo dve vrsti pristopov za ustvarjanje vprašanj, eden je metoda, ki temelji na iskanju z uporabo konvolucijskega nevronskega omrežja (CNN), drugi pa generacijska metoda, ki uporablja ponovno nevronsko omrežje (RNN); Drugič, pokažemo, kako izkoristiti ustvarjena vprašanja za izboljšanje obstoječih sistemov odgovarjanja na vprašanja. Našo metodo ustvarjanja vprašanj za opravilo izbire odgovornih stavkov ocenjujemo na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov, vključno s SQuAD, MS MARCO in WikiQA. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da je z uporabo ustvarjenih vprašanj kot dodatnega signala mogoče doseči znatno izboljšanje kakovosti.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na bãyar da shirin ka zartar da tambayar daga wata maras da aka ba su yi amfani da zanen tsarin neural, inda nau'i biyu masu girma za'a shawara QA farat ɗaya, kuma aka yi amfani da su kamar data na tsari. Bayani cikin takardar ta zama sau-biyu: A farko, ana ƙayyade nau'i biyu masu motsi zuwa matsayin tambayar, guda yana da amfani da shirin mai riƙo na tsarin fanel ɗin neural (CNN), kuma gudan yana da wata metode a danganta da ke amfani da wagon neural wanda ya mutu (RNN). Dukkan, Munã nũna jinsi za mu komai da tambayar da aka ƙãga domin improve tsarin masu karɓa wa tambayar da ke gaba. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyinmu na zaɓen tambayar ta wajen aikin shaidar ayuka na zãɓen maganar ta akan data ta uku, kamar SQuAD, M MARCO da WikiQA. Matarin jarrabawa na nuna cewa, ana iya amfani da tambayar da aka ƙãga su kamar wata saini ƙara, za'a iya samar da QA mai girma.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה איך ליצור שאלות ממעברים מסוימים באמצעות רשתות עצביות, שבו זוגות QA בקנה מידה גדולה נמצאים באופן אוטומטי זוחלים ומעבדים מאתר QA-קהילתי, ומשתמשים כנתונים אימונים. התרומה של הנייר היא כפולה: ראשית, שני סוגים של גישות לדור שאלות מוצעות, אחת היא שיטה מבוססת על השיגור באמצעות רשת עצבית משתנה (CNN), השנייה היא שיטה מבוססת על דור באמצעות רשת עצבית משתנה (RNN); Second, we show how to leverage the generated questions to improve existing question answering systems.  אנו מעריכים את שיטת יוצר השאלות שלנו למשימת הבחירה של משפט התשובה בשלושה קבוצות מידע רמזי, כולל SQuAD, MS MARCO, ויקיQA. תוצאות ניסויים מראות כי, על ידי השימוש בשאלות שנוצרות כאות נוסף, אפשר להשיג שיפור משמעותי QA.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཇི་ལྟར་བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྱོད་ནས་གནད་སྡུད་དུ་རྩིས་ཆེ་ཆུང་གིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛིན་ནས་སྦྱོར་བ་དང་ལས་ ཤོག་བྱང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཉིས་ཡིན། གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གིས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཕྱོགས་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཡར་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད། We evaluate our question generation method for the answer sentence selection task on three benchmark datasets, including SQuAD, MS MARCO, and WikiQA. Experimental results show that, by using generated questions as an extra signal, significant QA improvement can be achieved.'}
{'en': 'Learning to Paraphrase for Question Answering', 'ar': 'تعلم إعادة الصياغة للإجابة على الأسئلة', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a parafrasear para responder perguntas', 'es': 'Aprender a parafrasear para responder a preguntas', 'fr': 'Apprendre à paraphraser pour répondre aux questions', 'ja': '質問への回答のための言い換え方法を学ぶ', 'zh': '学对之释义', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए व्याख्या करना सीखना', 'ru': 'Учимся перефразировать ответы на вопросы', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Athinsint le haghaidh Freagra Ceist', 'ka': 'პარაფრაზეზის შესწავლობა', 'hu': 'A kérdések megválaszolásának megtanulása', 'el': 'Μάθετε να παραφράζετε για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων', 'it': 'Imparare a parafrasare per rispondere alle domande', 'lt': 'Mokymasis atsakyti į klausimus parafraze', 'mk': 'Learning to Paraphrase for Question Answering', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру үшін парафраны үйрену', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Belajar ke Parafrasa untuk Jawapan soalan', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хариултын парафрейз суралцах нь', 'mt': 'Tagħlim għall-Parafrażi għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet', 'no': 'Læring til parafrase for svar på spørsmål', 'pl': 'Nauka parafrazowania do odpowiedzi na pytania', 'sr': 'Naučenje parafraze za odgovor na pitanja', 'ro': 'Învățarea parafrazei pentru răspunsul la întrebări', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': "Baritaanka Paraphrase jawaabta su'aalaha", 'sv': 'Att lära sig parafrasera för att besvara frågor', 'ta': 'கேள்விக்கு பதில் பாராப்ப்ராஜ் கற்றுக் கொண்டு', 'ur': 'سوال جواب کے لئے پارافریز کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học tới từ điển hình trả lời câu hỏi', 'nl': 'Leren parafraseren voor het beantwoorden van vragen', 'bg': 'Научете се да парафразирате за отговор на въпроси', 'hr': 'Naučenje parafraze za odgovor na pitanja', 'da': 'At lære at parafrasere til besvarelse af spørgsmål', 'de': 'Lernen, wie man für die Beantwortung von Fragen paraphrasiert', 'id': 'Belajar untuk Parafrasa untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن پارافریز برای جواب سوال', 'ko': '학습은 문제에 대답하기 위해 해석을 한다', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Paraphrase kwa ajili ya kujibu swali', 'tr': 'Sorag jogap üçin parafraze öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi i parafrazës për përgjigjen e pyetjeve', 'af': 'Leer na parafrase vir vraag antwoord', 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանների պարաֆրանսի սովորելը', 'am': 'የጥያቄን መልስ ለመማር', 'az': 'Sual cavab캼 칲칞칲n Parafraze 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য প্যারাফ্রাজে শিখছে', 'bs': 'Naučenje parafraze za odgovor na pitanja', 'ca': 'Aprendre a parafrasar la resposta a preguntes', 'cs': 'Naučit se parafrázovat pro zodpovězení otázek', 'et': 'Õppimine parafraasiseerima küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Oppiminen toistamaan kysymyksiä', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ללמוד לפרפרסמה לענות על שאלות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje parafrazirati za odgovor na vprašanja', 'bo': 'གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ལན་གསལ་སའི་སྐོར་གྱི་གནད་སྒྲུང་ལ་ཤེས་པ'}
{'en': 'Question answering (QA) systems are sensitive to the many different ways natural language expresses the same information need. In this paper we turn to paraphrases as a means of capturing this knowledge and present a general framework which learns felicitous paraphrases for various QA tasks. Our method is trained end-to-end using question-answer pairs as a supervision signal. A question and its paraphrases serve as input to a neural scoring model which assigns higher weights to linguistic expressions most likely to yield correct answers. We evaluate our approach on QA over Freebase and answer sentence selection. Experimental results on three datasets show that our framework consistently improves performance, achieving competitive results despite the use of simple QA models.', 'ar': 'تعتبر أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) حساسة للعديد من الطرق المختلفة التي تعبر بها اللغة الطبيعية عن نفس الحاجة إلى المعلومات. ننتقل في هذه الورقة إلى إعادة الصياغة كوسيلة لالتقاط هذه المعرفة وتقديم إطار عام يتعلم إعادة صياغة جيدة لمختلف مهام ضمان الجودة. يتم تدريب طريقتنا من البداية إلى النهاية باستخدام أزواج الأسئلة والأجوبة كإشارة إشراف. يعمل السؤال وإعادة صياغته كمدخلات لنموذج التسجيل العصبي الذي يعين أوزانًا أعلى للتعبيرات اللغوية التي من المرجح أن تسفر عن إجابات صحيحة. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا بشأن ضمان الجودة على Freebase واختيار الجملة للإجابة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات أن إطار عملنا يعمل باستمرار على تحسين الأداء ، وتحقيق نتائج تنافسية على الرغم من استخدام نماذج ضمان الجودة البسيطة.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de réponse aux questions (AQ) sont sensibles aux nombreuses façons dont le langage naturel exprime le même besoin d'information. Dans cet article, nous nous tournons vers les paraphrases comme moyen de saisir ces connaissances et présentons un cadre général qui apprend des paraphrases heureuses pour diverses tâches d'assurance qualité. Notre méthode est entraînée de bout en bout à l'aide de paires question-réponse comme signal de supervision. Une question et ses paraphrases servent d'entrée à un modèle de notation neuronale qui attribue des poids plus élevés aux expressions linguistiques les plus susceptibles de donner des réponses correctes. Nous évaluons notre approche en matière d'assurance qualité par rapport à Freebase et de sélection de phrases de réponse Les résultats expérimentaux sur trois ensembles de données montrent que notre structure améliore constamment les performances, obtenant des résultats compétitifs malgré l'utilisation de modèles d'assurance qualité simples.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas (QA) son sensibles a las diferentes formas en que el lenguaje natural expresa la misma necesidad de información. En este artículo pasamos a las paráfrasis como un medio para capturar este conocimiento y presentamos un marco general que aprende paráfrasis afortunadas para varias tareas de control de calidad. Nuestro método está entrenado de principio a fin utilizando pares de preguntas y respuestas como señal de supervisión. Una pregunta y sus paráfrasis sirven como insumo para un modelo de puntuación neuronal que asigna mayor peso a las expresiones lingüísticas con mayor probabilidad de dar respuestas correctas. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque de control de calidad sobre Freebase y la selección de frases de respuesta. Los resultados experimentales en tres conjuntos de datos muestran que nuestro marco mejora constantemente el rendimiento, logrando resultados competitivos a pesar del uso de modelos simples de control de calidad.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de resposta a perguntas (QA) são sensíveis às muitas maneiras diferentes pelas quais a linguagem natural expressa a mesma necessidade de informação. Neste artigo, nos voltamos para as paráfrases como meio de capturar esse conhecimento e apresentamos uma estrutura geral que aprende paráfrases adequadas para várias tarefas de controle de qualidade. Nosso método é treinado de ponta a ponta usando pares de perguntas e respostas como um sinal de supervisão. Uma pergunta e suas paráfrases servem como entrada para um modelo de pontuação neural que atribui pesos mais altos a expressões linguísticas com maior probabilidade de fornecer respostas corretas. Avaliamos nossa abordagem de controle de qualidade sobre o Freebase e a seleção de frases de resposta. Resultados experimentais em três conjuntos de dados mostram que nosso framework melhora consistentemente o desempenho, alcançando resultados competitivos apesar do uso de modelos simples de QA.', 'ja': '質疑応答（ QA ）システムは、自然言語が同じ情報ニーズを表現するさまざまな方法に敏感です。この論文では、この知識を取り込む手段としてパラフレーズに目を向け、さまざまなQAタスクのために適切なパラフレーズを学習する一般的な枠組みを提示する。私たちの方法は、質問と回答のペアを監督信号として使用して、エンドツーエンドで訓練されています。質問とそのパラフレーズは、正解をもたらす可能性が最も高い言語表現に高い重みを割り当てるニューラルスコアリングモデルへの入力として機能します。私たちは、FreebaseよりもQAのアプローチを評価し、文の選択に答えます。3つのデータセットの実験結果は、当社のフレームワークが一貫してパフォーマンスを向上させ、単純なQAモデルを使用しているにもかかわらず、競争力のある結果を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '问答(QA)系统对自然语言同信息者众矣。 于本文,以释义为得一术,发一通用框架,当框架为诸QA学适释义。 用问对为监督端到端训练。 及其释义为神经评分,最有正对之语。 估Freebase上QA法,并答句择。 三集之实验结果表明,虽用简QA,吾框架犹能持重,而有竞争力之效。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) सिस्टम कई अलग-अलग तरीकों से संवेदनशील हैं प्राकृतिक भाषा एक ही जानकारी की आवश्यकता को व्यक्त करती है। इस पेपर में हम इस ज्ञान को कैप्चर करने के साधन के रूप में व्याख्याओं की ओर मुड़ते हैं और एक सामान्य रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो विभिन्न क्यूए कार्यों के लिए प्रशंसात्मक पैराफ्रेज़ सीखता है। हमारी विधि को पर्यवेक्षण संकेत के रूप में प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़े का उपयोग करके एंड-टू-एंड प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। एक प्रश्न और इसके पैराफ्रेज़ एक तंत्रिका स्कोरिंग मॉडल के इनपुट के रूप में कार्य करते हैं जो भाषाई अभिव्यक्तियों को उच्च वजन प्रदान करता है जो सही उत्तर देने की सबसे अधिक संभावना है। हम Freebase पर QA पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और वाक्य चयन का जवाब देते हैं। तीन डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा ढांचा लगातार प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है, सरल क्यूए मॉडल के उपयोग के बावजूद प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Системы ответов на вопросы (QA) чувствительны ко многим различным способам выражения естественным языком одной и той же потребности в информации. В этой статье мы обращаемся к перефразам как к средству захвата этих знаний и представляем общую структуру, которая изучает успешные перефразы для различных задач QA. Наш метод обучения является сквозным, используя пары вопрос-ответ в качестве сигнала наблюдения. Вопрос и его перефразы служат в качестве входных данных для модели нейронной оценки, которая присваивает более высокие веса лингвистическим выражениям, которые, скорее всего, дадут правильные ответы. Мы оцениваем наш подход к обеспечению качества, а не к Freebase, и отвечаем на вопросы о выборе предложений. Экспериментальные результаты по трем наборам данных показывают, что наша структура последовательно улучшает производительность, достигая конкурентных результатов, несмотря на использование простых моделей обеспечения качества.', 'ga': 'Tá córais chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt íogair don iliomad bealaí éagsúla ina gcuireann teanga nádúrtha an riachtanas céanna faisnéise in iúl. Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid ar athróga mar mhodh chun an t-eolas seo a ghabháil agus cuirimid i láthair creat ginearálta a fhoghlaimíonn paraphrasaí mealltacha do thascanna éagsúla QA. Déantar ár modh a oiliúint ó cheann ceann go ceann ag baint úsáide as péirí ceisteanna-freagra mar chomhartha maoirseachta. Feidhmíonn ceist agus a habairtí mar ionchur do mhúnla scórála néarúil a sannann meáchain níos airde do nathanna teangeolaíocha is dóichí a thabharfaidh freagraí cearta. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár gcur chuige maidir le QA thar Freebase agus freagraimid roghnú abairtí. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thrí thacar sonraí go bhfeabhsaíonn ár gcreat feidhmíochta go seasta, ag baint amach torthaí iomaíocha ainneoin úsáid a bhaint as samhlacha simplí QA.', 'ka': 'კითხვების პასუხი (QA) სისტემები განსხვავებული განსხვავებული გზებისთვის იგივე ინფორმაციის მოჭირდება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ პარაფრაზების გადავიწყებთ, როგორც სხვა QA დავალებებისთვის სხვა სხვა პარაფრაზებისთვის გავისწავლეთ საერთო ფრამეტრი. ჩვენი მეთოდი დასრულებული დასრულებული დასრულებაში გამოყენებული კითხვა-პასუხი როგორც სურნალის სიგნალის გამოყენება. კითხვა და მისი პარაფრაზები იყენებენ, რომელიც ნეიროლური სკორინგის მოდელში, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სიგრძნობის გამოსახულებებისთვის დააყენებს. ჩვენ QA-ის მიღება Freebase-ის და შესაძლებლობის მონიშვნის შესაძლებლობად გავამუშავებთ. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები სამი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში ჩვენი კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებლობა დაახლოებით, რომ ჩვენი კონფიგურაცია კონფი', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA) είναι ευαίσθητα στους πολλούς διαφορετικούς τρόπους με τους οποίους η φυσική γλώσσα εκφράζει την ίδια ανάγκη πληροφόρησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία στρέφουμε στις παραφράσεις ως μέσο σύλληψης αυτής της γνώσης και παρουσιάζουμε ένα γενικό πλαίσιο που μαθαίνει επιτυχείς παραφράσεις για διάφορα καθήκοντα QA. Η μέθοδος μας εκπαιδεύεται εξ ολοκλήρου χρησιμοποιώντας ζεύγη ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων ως σήμα επίβλεψης. Μια ερώτηση και οι παραφράσεις της χρησιμεύουν ως εισαγωγή σε ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής βαθμολογίας το οποίο αποδίδει υψηλότερα βάρη στις γλωσσικές εκφράσεις που είναι πιο πιθανό να δώσουν σωστές απαντήσεις. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας σχετικά με τις ερωτήσεις πάνω από την Freebase και την επιλογή προτάσεων απάντησης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας βελτιώνει σταθερά τις επιδόσεις, επιτυγχάνοντας ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα παρά τη χρήση απλών μοντέλων QS.', 'hu': 'A kérdésre válaszoló rendszerek érzékenyek arra, hogy a természetes nyelv számos különböző módon fejezi ki ugyanazt az információigényt. Ebben a tanulmányban parafrázisokhoz fordulunk ennek a tudásnak a megszerzésére és egy olyan általános keretrendszert mutatunk be, amely különböző minőségbiztosítási feladatokhoz hasznos parafrázisokat tanul. Módszerünket a kérdés-válasz párok felügyeleti jelként végponttól végpontig képezzük. Egy kérdés és parafrázisai bemenetként szolgálnak egy neurális pontszámozási modellhez, amely nagyobb súlyt rendel a nyelvi kifejezésekhez, amelyek valószínűleg helyes válaszokat adnak. Értékeljük a minőségbiztosítással kapcsolatos megközelítésünket a Freebase felett és válaszoljuk a mondatok kiválasztását. Három adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy keretrendszerünk következetesen javítja a teljesítményt, versenyképes eredményeket érve el az egyszerű minőségbiztosítási modellek használata ellenére.', 'it': "I sistemi di risposta alle domande (QA) sono sensibili ai molti modi in cui il linguaggio naturale esprime lo stesso bisogno di informazioni. In questo articolo ci rivolgiamo alle parafrase come mezzo per catturare questa conoscenza e presentiamo un quadro generale che impara parafrase felici per vari compiti di QA. Il nostro metodo è addestrato end-to-end utilizzando coppie domanda-risposta come segnale di supervisione. Una domanda e le sue parafrase servono da input per un modello di punteggio neurale che assegna pesi più elevati alle espressioni linguistiche più suscettibili di fornire risposte corrette. Valutiamo il nostro approccio sul QA su Freebase e rispondiamo alla selezione delle frasi. I risultati sperimentali su tre set di dati mostrano che il nostro framework migliora costantemente le prestazioni, ottenendo risultati competitivi nonostante l'uso di semplici modelli di QA.", 'mk': 'Question answering (QA) systems are sensitive to the many different ways natural language expresses the same information need.  Во овој документ се свртиме кон парафрази како средство за заземање на ова знаење и претставуваме генерална рамка која научи среќни парафрази за различни задачи на QA. Нашиот метод е трениран од крај до крај користејќи парови прашања-одговори како сигнал за надзор. Прашањето и нејзините парафрази служат како влог во моделот на нервни оценки кој додава повисоки тегови на јазичките изрази кои најверојатно ќе дадат точни одговори. Го проценуваме нашиот пристап на QA над Freebase и одговориме на изборот на реченица. Експерименталните резултати на трите податоци покажуваат дека нашата рамка постојано ја подобрува резултатот, постигнувајќи конкурентни резултати и покрај употребата на едноставни модели на QA.', 'ms': 'Sistem menjawab soalan (QA) sensitif kepada cara yang berbeza bahasa alam mengekspresikan maklumat yang sama. Dalam kertas ini kita berubah kepada parafrasa sebagai cara untuk menangkap pengetahuan ini dan mempersembahkan kerangka umum yang mempelajari parafrasa yang berjaya untuk berbagai tugas QA. Kaedah kita dilatih akhir-akhir menggunakan pasangan soalan-jawapan sebagai isyarat pengawasan. Soalan dan parafrasanya berkhidmat sebagai input ke model skor saraf yang menyerahkan berat lebih tinggi kepada ungkapan bahasa yang paling mungkin akan memberikan jawapan yang betul. Kami menilai pendekatan kita pada QA melalui Freebase dan memilih kalimat jawapan. Keputusan percubaan pada tiga set data menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kita secara konsisten meningkatkan prestasi, mencapai keputusan kompetitif walaupun menggunakan model QA sederhana.', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру (QA) жүйелері бір мәліметті табиғи тілінің көптеген түрлі мәліметті көрсетеді. Бұл қағазда білімді түсіру үшін парафразтарға аударып, әртүрлі QA тапсырмаларының жалпы парафразтарын үйренетін жалпы қоршауын көрсетеді. Біздің әдіміміз сұрақ жауап екеуін бақылау сигналы ретінде аяқтау мен аяқтау арқылы оқылған. Сұрақ мен парафразтары невралдық скоринг үлгісіне енгізу үшін қылу үшін, бұл лингвистикалық өрнектерге көптеген жауаптарды қалай жеткізеді. QA арқылымызды Freebase және жауап сөздерді таңдау арқылы бағалаймыз. Үш деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің бағдарламамыздың ең жақсы нәтижелерін жақсартып, кәдімгі QA үлгілерін пайдалануға қарамастырып жатқан,', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം (ക്യൂഎ) സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം സ്വാഭാവികമായ പലതും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ In this paper we turn to paraphrases as a means of capturing this knowledge and present a general framework which learns felicitous paraphrases for various QA tasks.  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു അവസാനം അവസാനിക്കുന്നത് ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ജോട ഒരു ചോദ്യം അതിന്റെ പാരാഫ്രസ്സും ന്യൂറല്\u200d സ്കോരിങ്ങ് മോഡലിലേക്കുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ആയി സേവിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉ ഫ്രീബാസിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ ക്യൂഎയുടെ നടപടിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വിലയിക്കുകയും, വാക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെ മൂന്നു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതും, സാധാരണ ക്യൂഎ മോഡ', 'lt': 'Klausimų atsakymo sistemos yra jautrios daugeliui skirtingų būdų, kaip natūrali kalba išreiškia tą patį informacijos poreikį. In this paper we turn to paraphrases as a means of capturing this knowledge and present a general framework which learns felicitous paraphrases for various QA tasks.  Mūsų metodas yra apmokytas nuo pabaigos, naudojant klausimų ir atsakymų poras kaip priežiūros signal ą. Klausimas ir jo parafrazės naudojami kaip neurologinio vertinimo modelio įvestis, pagal kurį kalbinėms išraiškoms skiriamas didesnis svoris, kuris greičiausiai duoda teisingus atsakymus. Vertiname savo požiūrį į QA, palyginti su Freebase, ir atsakome į sakinių pasirinkimą. Eksperimentiniai trijų duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema nuosekliai gerina rezultatus ir, nepaisant paprastų QA modelių, siekia konkurencinių rezultatų.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi tat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) huma sensittivi għall-ħafna modi differenti kif il-lingwa naturali tesprimi l-istess ħtieġa ta’ informazzjoni. F’dan id-dokument irrikorru għall-parafrażijiet bħala mezz biex inqabdu dan l-għarfien u nippreżentaw qafas ġenerali li jitgħallem parafrażijiet feliċiti għal diversi kompiti ta’ QA. Il-metodu tagħna huwa mħarreġ minn tarf għal tarf bl-użu ta’ pari ta’ mistoqsijiet-tweġibiet bħala sinjal ta’ superviżjoni. Mistoqsija u l-parafrażijiet tagħha jservu bħala input għal mudell ta’ punteġġ newrali li jassenja piżijiet ogħla għall-espressjonijiet lingwistiċi li x’aktarx jagħtu tweġibiet korretti. We evaluate our approach on QA over Freebase and answer sentence selection.  Riżultati esperimentali fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta juru li l-qafas tagħna jtejjeb b’mod konsistenti l-prestazzjoni, u jikseb riżultati kompetittivi minkejja l-użu ta’ mudelli sempliċi ta’ QA.', 'no': 'Spørsmålsystemet (QA) er sensitiv til mange ulike måtar naturspråk uttrykker same informasjon. I denne papiret blir vi sett til parafraser som ein måte å henta denne kunnskapen og gjera eit generell rammeverk som lærer felicite parafraser for ulike QA-oppgåver. Metoden vårt er trent til slutten ved å bruka spørsmål- svarpar som eit oversiktsingnal. Name Vi evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på QA over utval av Freebase og svarsetningar. Eksperimentale resultat på tre datasett viser at rammeverket vårt konsekvent forbetrar utviklingar, og når det gjer konkurentære resultat selv om bruken av enkle QA-modeller.', 'mn': 'Хариулт асуулт (QA) систем нь байгалийн хэл нь ижил мэдээллийн хэрэгцээг илэрхийлж байгаа олон өөр аргаар мэдрэгддэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ мэдлэгийг барьж, олон QA даалгаварын тулд аз жаргалтай хэлбэрүүдийг суралцаж байгаа ерөнхий хэлбэрийг ашиглах арга болно. Бидний арга бол асуулт хариулт хоёрыг удирдлагын сигнал болгож сургалтын төгсгөл-төгсгөл. Энэ асуулт болон парафразууд нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварын оролцоо юм. Энэ нь хэл хэлний илэрхийлэлд илэрхийлэлтэй илэрхийлэлтэй ихэнх нь зөв хариултыг өгдөг. Бид QA-ын аргыг Freebase болон хариултын өгүүлбэрийн сонголтыг үнэлдэг. Гурван өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний хөрөнгө оруулалт үр дүнг сайжруулж, өрсөлдөг үр дүнг ашиглаж, QA загварын хэрэглээ ч байдаг.', 'pl': 'Systemy odpowiadania na pytania (QA) są wrażliwe na wiele różnych sposobów, w jaki język naturalny wyraża tę samą potrzebę informacyjną. W artykule zwracamy się do parafraz jako środka przechwytywania tej wiedzy i przedstawiamy ogólne ramy, które uczą się dobrych parafraz do różnych zadań QA. Nasza metoda jest przeszkolona od końca do końca przy użyciu par pytania-odpowiedzi jako sygnału nadzoru. Pytanie i jego parafrazy służą jako wejście do neuronowego modelu punktowania, który przypisuje wyższe wagi wyrażeniom językowym, które najprawdopodobniej dają poprawne odpowiedzi. Oceniamy nasze podejście do QA przez Freebase i wyboru zdań odpowiedzi. Wyniki eksperymentalne na trzech zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasze ramy konsekwentnie poprawiają wydajność, osiągając konkurencyjne wyniki pomimo zastosowania prostych modeli jakości.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de răspuns la întrebări (QA) sunt sensibile la numeroasele moduri diferite în care limbajul natural exprimă aceeași nevoie de informații. În această lucrare ne întoarcem la parafraze ca mijloc de captare a acestor cunoștințe și prezentăm un cadru general care învață parafraze fericite pentru diferite sarcini QA. Metoda noastră este instruită end-to-end folosind perechi de întrebări-răspuns ca semnal de supraveghere. O întrebare și parafrazele sale servesc ca input la un model de scoring neural care atribuie greutăți mai mari expresiilor lingvistice cel mai probabil să dea răspunsuri corecte. Evaluăm abordarea noastră asupra QA peste Freebase și selecția propozițiilor de răspuns. Rezultatele experimentale pe trei seturi de date arată că cadrul nostru îmbunătățește în mod constant performanța, obținând rezultate competitive în ciuda utilizării unor modele simple de calitate.', 'sr': 'Sistemi odgovora na pitanja (QA) su osjetljivi na različite načine na koji prirodni jezik izražava istu potrebu informacija. U ovom papiru pretvaramo se u parafraze kao sredstvo da uhvatimo ovo znanje i predstavimo općeg okvira koji nauči srećne parafraze za razne QA zadatke. Naš metod je obučen kraj do kraja koristeći parove odgovora na pitanje kao signal nadzora. Pitanje i njegova parafraza služe kao ulaz u model neuralnog skretanja koji dodaje veću težinu jezičkim izrazom najverovatnije da će dobiti ispravne odgovore. Procjenjujemo naš pristup QA preko Freebase i odabranje rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri seta podataka pokazuju da naš okvir konstantno poboljšava izvedbu, ostvario konkurentne rezultate uprkos upotrebom jednostavnih modela QA.', 'so': "Isticmaalka jawaabta su'aalaha (QA) waa u jilicsan yihiin sida luqada asalka ah oo kala duduwan oo ay u muujiyaan macluumaad isku mid ah. Warqaddan waxaynu u leennahay baaritaanka aqoontan, waxaana soo bandhignaynaa firaaqad caadiga ah oo ku barta baaritaanka farsamada ee shaqada QA oo kala duduwan. Midabkayaga waxaa lagu tababaray dhammaadka ugu dambaysta, waxayna isticmaalaan labada jawaabta sida calaamada ilaalinta. Midabka koorsiga ee neurada ah waxaa laga yaabaa in lagu soo jeedo jawaabo saxda ah. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaabilaada QA ee ku saabsan Freebase, waxaana ka jawaabaynaa doorashada go'aanka. Imtixaanka ku saabsan saddexda databaset waxay muuqataa in firaaqadeenu ay sii kordhiso horumarinta horumarinta, in kastoo ay isticmaali karto tusaalaha fudud ee QA.", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර (QA) පද්ධතිය සංවේදනය වෙනස් විදිහට ස්වභාවික භාෂාව සමාන තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය විදි මේ පැත්තේ අපි පැරප්\u200dරේස් වලින් මේ දන්නවය අල්ලගන්න සහ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ ක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dෂිත QA වැඩකට සඳහා සම අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳ සංඥාවක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනව Name අපි QA ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නිදහස් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තෝරාගන්න. දත්ත සැටි තුනක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, සාමාන්\u200dය QA මො', 'sv': 'Frågeställningssystem är känsliga för de många olika sätt som naturligt språk uttrycker samma informationsbehov. I denna uppsats vänder vi oss till parafraser som ett sätt att fånga denna kunskap och presenterar ett generellt ramverk som lär sig lyckosamma parafraser för olika QA-uppgifter. Vår metod tränas från början med hjälp av frågesvarspar som övervakningssignal. En fråga och dess parafraser fungerar som input till en neural scoring modell som tilldelar högre vikt till språkliga uttryck som mest sannolikt ger korrekta svar. Vi utvärderar vårt förhållningssätt till QA över Freebase och besvarar meningsval. Experimentella resultat på tre datauppsättningar visar att vårt ramverk konsekvent förbättrar prestanda och uppnår konkurrenskraftiga resultat trots användning av enkla kvalitetssäkringsmodeller.', 'ta': 'கேள்வி பதில் (QA) அமைப்புகள் பல்வேறு வழிகளிலும் இயல்பான மொழி அதே தகவல் தேவையை கூறுகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் இந்த அறிவை பிடித்து ஒரு முறையாக மாற்றுகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு பொது சட்டத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது வெற்றிக எங்கள் முறை முடிவு முடிவில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது கேள்வி பதில் ஜோடி ஒரு கண்காணிப்பு குறிகை ஒரு கேள்வி மற்றும் அதன் குறிப்புகள் உள்ளீட்டாக ஒரு புதிய மதிப்பெண் மாதிரிக்கு சேர்க்கும். அது மொழிகளில் உயர்ந்த எடைகளை சரியான பதி நாம் QA மீது எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பீடு மற்றும் வாக்கியத்தை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க வேண்டும். மூன்று தரவுத்தளங்களின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'سؤال جواب دینے (QA) سیسٹم بہت سے مختلف طریقوں پر تنبیہ ہیں کہ طبیعی زبان ایک ہی معلومات کی نیاز ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم اس علم کو پکڑنے کا وسیلہ بناتے ہیں اور ایک عمومی فرم بناتے ہیں جو مختلف QA کاموں کے لئے فلاح کے مطابق پکڑے جاتے ہیں. ہمارا طریقہ پوچھ-جواب جوڑوں کے مطابق آخر-پایان کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے ایک سوال اور اس کے پارافریز ایک نئورل اسکورینگ موڈل کے لئے اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ہم QA کے ذریعے فریبنس اور جواب دینے کے ذریعے اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں۔ تین ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے فرمیک عملکرد کو ثابت قدم سے بہتر کر رہے ہیں، سفید QA موڈل کے استعمال کے بغیر مساوی نتیجے کو پہنچاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz bu ta'rifni olib tashlash va bir qanchalik QA vazifalar uchun muvaffaqiyatli paraphraslarni o'rganish uchun umumiy freymni hozir qilamiz. Soʻrov javob-javob-javob qoʻllarini supervissiya signal sifatida yordamida o'rganadi. Name Biz QA bilan Freebase haqida qiymatimiz va gaplarni tanlash uchun javob beramiz. Uch maʼlumotlar satrlarida tajriba natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, chegaramiz ishlatishni davom etishda oddiy QA modellarini ishlatishda davom etishda rivojlanish natijalarini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi nhạy cảm với nhiều cách ngôn ngữ tự nhiên thể hiện nhu cầu thông tin tương tự. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi sử dụng lời diễn giải để nắm giữ kiến thức này và trình bày một cơ sở chung mà học được những lời diễn văn có vẻ thích hợp cho nhiều công việc. Cách của chúng tôi được huấn luyện từ đầu đến cuối sử dụng các cặp câu hỏi như một tín hiệu giám sát. Một câu hỏi và các diễn văn của nó phục vụ như là nhập vào một mô hình đánh dấu thần kinh mà đặt các trọng lượng cao vào các biểu thức ngôn ngữ nhiều khả năng cung cấp câu trả lời đúng. Chúng tôi đánh giá cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi về QA qua Freebase và trả lời phần chọn. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên ba tập tin cho thấy cơ sở của chúng ta luôn cải thiện lợi nhuận, đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh bất chấp việc sử dụng các mô hình QA đơn giản.', 'bg': 'Системите за отговор на въпроси са чувствителни към многото различни начини, по които естественият език изразява една и съща нужда от информация. В тази статия се обръщаме към парафразите като средство за улавяне на тези знания и представяме обща рамка, която изучава щастливи парафрази за различни задачи за контрол на качеството. Нашият метод е обучен от край до край, като се използват двойки въпроси-отговори като надзорен сигнал. Въпросът и неговите парафрази служат като вход за неврален модел за оценка, който придава по-високи тежести на езиковите изрази, които най-вероятно дават правилни отговори. Оценяваме подхода си за въпроси и отговори на избора на изречения. Експерименталните резултати на три набора от данни показват, че нашата рамка постоянно подобрява производителността, постигайки конкурентни резултати въпреки използването на прости модели за контрол на качеството.', 'nl': 'Vragenantwoordsystemen (QA) zijn gevoelig voor de vele verschillende manieren waarop natuurlijke taal dezelfde informatiebehoefte uitdrukt. In dit artikel gaan we over op parafrases als middel om deze kennis vast te leggen en presenteren we een algemeen kader dat gelukkige parafrases leert voor verschillende QA taken. Onze methode wordt end-to-end getraind met vraag-antwoord paren als supervisie signaal. Een vraag en zijn parafrases dienen als input voor een neuraal scoremodel dat hogere gewichten toekent aan taalkundige uitdrukkingen die waarschijnlijk correcte antwoorden opleveren. We evalueren onze aanpak van QA over Freebase en selectie van antwoordzinnen. Experimentele resultaten op drie datasets tonen aan dat ons framework consistent prestaties verbetert en concurrerende resultaten behaalt ondanks het gebruik van eenvoudige QA-modellen.', 'da': 'Spørgsmålsbesvarelsessystemer er følsomme over for de mange forskellige måder, naturligt sprog udtrykker det samme informationsbehov på. I denne artikel henvender vi os til parafraser som et middel til at fange denne viden og præsenterer en generel ramme, der lærer lykkelige parafraser til forskellige QA-opgaver. Vores metode trænes end-to-end ved hjælp af spørgsmål-svar par som overvågningssignal. Et spørgsmål og dets parafraser tjener som input til en neural scoring model, der tildeler højere vægt til sproglige udtryk mest sandsynlige for at give korrekte svar. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang til QA over Freebase og besvarer sætningsvalg. Eksperimentelle resultater på tre datasæt viser, at vores framework konsekvent forbedrer ydeevnen og opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater trods brugen af enkle QA-modeller.', 'hr': 'Sistemi odgovora na pitanja (QA) osjetljivi su na različite načine na koji prirodni jezik izražava istu potrebu informacija. U ovom papiru se pretvaramo u parafraze kao sredstvo za uhvaćenje ovog znanja i predstavljanje općeg okvira koji uči srećne parafraze za različite QA zadatke. Naš metod je obučen kraj do kraja koristeći par odgovora na pitanje kao signal nadzora. Pitanje i njegova parafraza služe kao ulaz u model neuralnog skretanja koji daje veće težine jezičkim izrazom najvjerojatnije da će dobiti ispravne odgovore. Procjenjujemo naš pristup QA na slobodnoj bazi i izbor rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri seta podataka pokazuju da naš okvir stalno poboljšava učinkovitost, ostvario konkurentne rezultate uprkos upotrebom jednostavnih QA modela.', 'de': 'Fragebeantworterungssysteme (QA) reagieren sensibel auf die vielen verschiedenen Arten, wie natürliche Sprache den gleichen Informationsbedarf ausdrückt. In diesem Beitrag wenden wir uns den Paraphrasen als Mittel zur Erfassung dieses Wissens zu und stellen einen allgemeinen Rahmen vor, der gelungene Paraphrasen für verschiedene QA-Aufgaben lernt. Unsere Methode wird durchgängig mit Frage-Antwort-Paaren als Überwachungssignal trainiert. Eine Frage und ihre Paraphrasen dienen als Input für ein neuronales Scoring-Modell, das linguistischen Ausdrücken höhere Gewichte zuweist, die wahrscheinlich korrekte Antworten liefern. Wir evaluieren unseren Ansatz zur Qualitätssicherung über Freebase und zur Auswahl von Antwortsätzen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an drei Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Framework die Leistung kontinuierlich verbessert und trotz der Verwendung einfacher QA-Modelle wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse erzielt.', 'id': 'Sistem menjawab pertanyaan (QA) sensitif kepada banyak cara bahasa alam mengekspresikan kebutuhan informasi yang sama. Dalam kertas ini kita berubah ke parafrasa sebagai cara untuk menangkap pengetahuan ini dan mempersembahkan rangka umum yang mempelajari parafrasa yang berhasil untuk berbagai tugas QA. Our method is trained end-to-end using question-answer pairs as a supervision signal.  Sebuah pertanyaan dan parafrasanya berguna sebagai input ke model skor saraf yang mengatur berat badan yang lebih tinggi untuk ekspresi bahasa yang paling mungkin memberikan jawaban yang benar. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan kita pada QA melalui Freebase dan menjawab seleksi kalimat. Hasil percobaan pada tiga set data menunjukkan bahwa rangka kita secara konsisten meningkatkan prestasi, mencapai hasil kompetitif meskipun menggunakan model QA sederhana.', 'ko': '퀴즈 시스템은 자연 언어가 같은 정보를 표현하는 다양한 방식에 민감하다.본고에서 우리는 해석을 이러한 지식을 얻는 수단으로 삼고 전체적인 틀을 제시하여 각종 QA 임무의 적절한 해석을 배우는 데 사용한다.우리의 방법은 문답을 사용하여 감독 신호로 끝까지 훈련하는 것이다.하나의 문제와 해석은 신경 평점 모델의 입력으로 사용할 수 있으며 이 모델은 정답을 얻을 수 있는 언어 표현에 더욱 높은 권한을 부여한다.우리는 자유기와 답안 문장에서 선택한 QA 방법을 평가했다.세 개의 데이터 세트에서의 실험 결과는 간단한 QA모델을 사용했음에도 불구하고 우리의 프레임워크는 시종일관 성능을 향상시키고 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다는 것을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای پاسخ سوال (QA) به طریق\u200cهای متفاوتی که زبان طبیعی همان اطلاعات را نشان می\u200cدهد حساسی دارند. در این کاغذ به عنوان وسیله گرفتن این دانش و پیشنهاد یک چهارچوب عمومی که پارافریز\u200cهای شایسته را برای کار های مختلف QA یاد می\u200cگیرد تبدیل می\u200cکنیم. روش ما با استفاده از جفت جواب سوال به عنوان سیگنال نظارت تمرین شده است. یک سوال و پارافریزش به عنوان ورودی به یک مدل اسکورینگ عصبی که وزن بالاتر را به عبارت زبان می\u200cدهد که احتمالاً جواب درست می\u200cدهد. ما روش QA را بر روی پایگاه Freebase و انتخاب جواب دادیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی سه مجموعه داده\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که چهارچوب ما به طور کامل عملکرد را بهتر می\u200cکند، با وجود استفاده از مدل\u200cهای ساده QA به صورت رسیدن نتیجه\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cای.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa maswali wa kujibu (QA) umekuwa na vizuri kwa namna nyingi tofauti za lugha asili huelezea kinachohitaji habari hizo. Katika karatasi hii tunageuza misingi kama njia ya kupata maarifa haya na kuweka mfumo wa jumla ambao unajifunza misingi yenye mafanikio kwa kazi mbalimbali za QA. Utawala wetu umefundishwa mwisho wa mwisho kwa kutumia majibu mawili kama ishara ya ufuatiliaji. Swali na vipengele vyake vinatumika kama input kwa muundo wa uvumbuzi wa ubongo ambao unaweka mizigo ya juu kwa hisia za lugha zinaweza kutoa majibu sahihi. Tutathmini mbinu yetu kuhusu QA juu ya Uhuru wa Uhuru na jibu la uchaguzi wa hukumu. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti tatu za takwimu zinaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu unaendelea kuboresha ufanisi, kupata matokeo ya ushindani pamoja na matumizi ya mifano rahisi ya QA.', 'af': "Fraag antwoord (QA) stelsels is sensitief na die baie verskillende maniere natuurlike taal uitdruk dieselfde inligting nodig. In hierdie papier draai ons na parafrase as 'n betekening om hierdie kennis te vang en 'n algemene raamwerk te voorsien wat die felisiese parafrase leer vir verskillende QA taak. Ons metode is opgelei end-to-end gebruik vraag-antwoord paar as 'n supervisie sein. 'n Vrag en sy parafrase dien as invoer na 'n neurale skoring model wat hoër gewigte toewys na lingwisiese uitdrukkings waarskynlik korrekte antwoordes te gee. Ons evalueer ons toegang op QA oor Freebase en antwoord setkeuse. Eksperimentale resultate op drie datastelle vertoon dat ons raamwerk konsistentlik die prestasie verbeter, en samekomstige resultate tot veral die gebruik van eenvoudige QA modele.", 'tr': "Sorag jogaplary (QA) sistemleri tebigy diliň bir hili maglumaty bejermek üçin hasaplanyr. Bu kagyzda biz parafrazlere bu bilimi almak üçin bir ýagdaýa çevrilýäris we bu ýagdaýda örän gysga görnüşler üçin felikli parafrazleri öwredýäris. Biziň yöntemimiz üstünlik sinyali şeklinde sorag-jogabat çiplerini ulanyp bilim edildi. Bir sorag we parafrazleriň näyral skoring modeliniň girişi bolup, iň yükselen a ğırlyk dil ifadelerine iň köp jogaplary etmäge mümkin edýär. Biz QA'da Freebase we sözleşme saýlawlarymyzy deňleýäris Üç sany datajyk düzümlerinde örän netijeleri biziň çarpyşymyzyň etkinleşigini diňe üýtgedýändigini görkez, basit QA nusgalarynyň ullanyşynyň ýöne ýaryşykly netijelerini ýetirmek.", 'sq': 'Sistemet që përgjigjen pyetjeve (QA) janë të ndjeshëm ndaj shumë mënyrave të ndryshme që gjuha natyrore shpreh të njëjtin nevojë informacioni. Në këtë letër ne kthehemi në parafraza si një mjet për të kapur këtë njohuri dhe paraqesim një kuadër të përgjithshëm që mëson parafraza të lumtura për detyra të ndryshme QA. Metoda jonë është e trajnuar nga fundi në fund duke përdorur çifte pyetje-përgjigje si një sinjal mbikqyrjeje. Një pyetje dhe parafrazat e saj shërbejnë si hyrje në një model shënimesh neuronale që cakton pesha më të larta për shprehjet gjuhësore me gjasa më shumë të japin përgjigje të sakta. We evaluate our approach on QA over Freebase and answer sentence selection.  Rezultatet eksperimentale në tre grupe të dhënash tregojnë se kuadri ynë përmirëson vazhdimisht performancën, duke arritur rezultate konkurruese pavarësisht nga përdorimi i modeleve të thjeshta QA.', 'am': 'የጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ስርዓቶች በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች በአንድ መረጃ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የዚህን እውቀት ለመያዝ እና ለብዙዎች የQA ስራ ትክክል የተሰናከረውን የፍሬክራምቶችን ለማቀናቀል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የጥያቄ መልስ ሁለት እየሆኑ ሲያሳየቁ የፍጻሜ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ጥያቄ እና ግንኙነቶቹ የናውሬው ነጥብ ሚዛን ለቋንቋዊ ቋንቋዎች ሚዛኖችን የሚያስቀምጥ ጥሩ መልስ እንዲያሳየው እንደሚቻል ነው፡፡ በQA ላይ ነፃነት ነፃነት እና የፍርድ መምረጫን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሦስት ዳታተሮች ላይ የፍሬማችን ፍሬም በጥቅት የQA ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም እንኳ የሚቻለውን ፍሬታዎችን ለማድረግ እና ፍሬታዎችን ለማግኘት የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգերը զգայուն են շատ տարբեր ձևերի վրա, որոնց միջոցով բնական լեզուն արտահայտում է նույն տեղեկատվության կարիքը: In this paper we turn to paraphrases as a means of capturing this knowledge and present a general framework which learns felicitous paraphrases for various QA tasks.  Մեր մեթոդը վերջ-վերջ սովորեցված է հարցերի և պատասխանների զույգերի միջոցով որպես վերահսկողական ազդանշան: Հարցը և դրա պարաարտահայտությունները օգտագործում են որպես նյարդային գնահատման մոդելը, որն ավելի բարձր կշիռ է տալիս լեզվաբանական արտահայտումներին, որոնք հավանաբար ճիշտ պատասխաններ են տալիս: Մենք գնահատում ենք QA-ի մեջ մեր մոտեցումը ազատ հիմքի և պատասխանի նախադասությունների ընտրության հարցում: Երեք տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր կառուցվածքը մշտապես բարելավում է արդյունքը, մրցակցության արդյունքները հասնելով չնայած պարզ QA մոդելների օգտագործման:', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) সিস্টেম অনেক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষার প্রকৃতি একই তথ্য প্রকাশ করেছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই জ্ঞান ধরার উপায় হিসেবে প্যারাফ্রেক্সে পরিণত হয়েছি এবং একটি সাধারণ কার্যক্রম উপস্থাপন করেছি যা কিউএ কাজের জন্য সফলতা  আমাদের প্রশ্নের উত্তর জোড়া দুটো সুপারিভিশন সিগন্যাল হিসেবে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। একটি প্রশ্ন এবং এর প্যারাফ্রেক্সগুলো একটি নিউরুল স্কোরিং মডেল হিসেবে প্রশ্ন করে যা ভাষার ভাষার ভাষায় উচ্চমানভাবে সঠিক উত্তর দেয়া ফ্রিবাসের ব্যাপারে আমরা কিউ এ-এর ব্যাপারে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া মূল্যায়ন করি এবং কার্য নির্বাচনের তিনটি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম সাধারণ কিউ এ মডেল ব্যবহার করা সত্ত্বেও প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল প', 'ca': "Els sistemes de resposta a preguntes són sensibles a les moltes maneres diferents que el llenguatge natural expressa la mateixa necessitat d'informació. En aquest paper ens girem a parafrases com a mitjà de capturar aquest coneixement i presentam un marc general que aprenen parafrases felices per diverses tasques de QA. El nostre mètode és entrenat de cap a cap utilitzant parells de preguntes-respostes com a senyal de supervisió. Una pregunta i les seves parafrases serveixen com entrada a un model de puntuació neuronal que afegeix més pes a les expressions lingüístices que és més probable que aporten respostes correctes. Evaluam el nostre enfocament en QA sobre Freebase i responem a la selecció de frases. Els resultats experimentals de tres conjunts de dades mostren que el nostre marc millora constantment el rendiment, aconseguint resultats competitius malgrat l'ús de models simples de QA.", 'az': 'sual cevapları (QA) sistemləri təbiətli dil eyni məlumatları ifadə edir. Bu kağızda parafrazlərə bu elmi almaq və müxtəlif QA işləri üçün uğurlu parafrazləri öyrənən genel bir çerçive göstəririk. Bizim metodumuz sual-cavab çiftlərini supervizyon sinyali olaraq istifadə edilən sona-sona təhsil edilmişdir. Bir sual və parafrazləri nöral scoring modelinin istifadəsi olaraq, bu dil ifadələrinə ən yüksək a ğırlıq verir ki, ən mümkün olaraq doğru cavab verir. QA tərzimi Freebase və cevap sözlərinin seçimi ilə təmin edirik. Üç verilənlərin təcrübəsinin sonuçlarını göstərir ki, qurğumuz həmişə performansını yaxşılaşdırır, sadəcə QA modellərin istifadəsinə baxmayaraq münafiq sonuçlarını başa düşər.', 'bs': 'Sistemi odgovora na pitanja (QA) su osjetljivi na različite načine na koji prirodni jezik izražava istu potrebu informacija. U ovom papiru se pretvaramo u parafraze kao sredstvo za uhvatanje ovog znanja i predstavljanje općeg okvira koji uči srećne parafraze za različite QA zadatke. Naš metod je obučen kraj do kraja koristeći par odgovora na pitanje kao signal nadzora. Pitanje i njegova parafraza služe kao ulaz u model neuralnog skretanja koji daje veće težine jezičkim izrazom najvjerojatnije da će dobiti ispravne odgovore. Procjenjujemo naš pristup QA preko Freebase i odgovorimo na izbor rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri seta podataka pokazuju da naš okvir stalno poboljšava učinkovitost, ostvario konkurentne rezultate uprkos upotrebom jednostavnih modela QA-a.', 'cs': 'Systémy odpovědí na otázky (QA) jsou citlivé na mnoho různých způsobů, jak přirozený jazyk vyjadřuje stejnou potřebu informací. V tomto článku se obracíme na parafráze jako prostředek k zachycení těchto znalostí a prezentujeme obecný rámec, který se učí skvělé parafráze pro různé úkoly QA. Naše metoda je trénována end-to-end s využitím párů otázek-odpověď jako signálu dohledu. Otázka a její parafráze slouží jako vstup do neuronového skórovacího modelu, který přiřazuje vyšší váhy jazykovým výrazům s největší pravděpodobností, že poskytne správné odpovědi. Hodnotíme náš přístup k QA přes Freebase a výběru věty odpovědi. Experimentální výsledky na třech datových sadách ukazují, že náš framework důsledně zlepšuje výkon a dosahuje konkurenčních výsledků i přes použití jednoduchých modelů QA.', 'et': "Küsimustele vastamise süsteemid on tundlikud paljude erinevate viiside suhtes, kuidas looduslik keel väljendab sama teabevajadust. Käesolevas töös pöördume parafraaside kui vahendi nende teadmiste kogumiseks ja esitame üldise raamistiku, mis õpib õnnelikke parafraase erinevate kvaliteedi tagamise ülesannete jaoks. Meie meetod on koolitatud otsast otsa, kasutades küsimus-vastus paare järelevalvesignaalina. Küsimus ja selle parafraasid on sisendiks neuroskoorimise mudelile, mis määrab keelelistele väljenditele suurema kaalu, mis tõenäoliselt annavad õigeid vastuseid. Me hindame oma lähenemisviisi kvaliteedi tagamisele Freebase'i ja vastame lause valikule. Kolme andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie raamistik parandab pidevalt jõudlust, saavutades konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi vaatamata lihtsate kvaliteedi tagamise mudelite kasutamisele.", 'fi': 'Kysymysten vastausjärjestelmät ovat herkkiä monille eri tavoille, joilla luonnollinen kieli ilmaisee saman tietotarpeen. Tässä työssä käännymme parafraaseihin keinona kerätä tämä tieto ja esittelemme yleisen viitekehyksen, joka oppii onnellisia parafraaseja eri laadunvarmistustehtäviin. Menetelmämme on koulutettu päästä päähän käyttämällä kysymys-vastauspareja valvontasignaalina. Kysymys ja sen parafraasit toimivat syötteenä neuropisteytysmalliin, joka asettaa suuremmat painot kielellisille ilmaisuille, jotka todennäköisesti tuottavat oikeita vastauksia. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme laadunvarmistukseen Freebasen yli ja vastaamme lauseiden valintaan. Kokeelliset tulokset kolmesta aineistosta osoittavat, että viitekehyksemme parantaa suorituskykyä johdonmukaisesti ja saavuttaa kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia yksinkertaisista laadunvarmistusmalleista huolimatta.', 'sk': 'Sistemi za odgovarjanje na vprašanja so občutljivi na različne načine, kako naravni jezik izraža isto potrebo po informacijah. V prispevku se obračamo na parafraze kot sredstvo za zajem tega znanja in predstavljamo splošni okvir, ki se uči srečnih parafraz za različne naloge kakovosti. Naša metoda je trenirana od konca do konca z uporabo parov vprašanj-odgovorov kot nadzorni signal. Vprašanje in njegove parafraze služijo kot vhod v model nevronskega ocenjevanja, ki jezikovnim izrazom dodeljuje višje teže, ki najverjetneje dajejo pravilne odgovore. Ocenjujemo naš pristop pri zagotavljanju kakovosti preko Freebase in odgovarjamo na izbiro stavkov. Eksperimentalni rezultati treh naborov podatkov kažejo, da naš okvir dosledno izboljšuje učinkovitost in dosega konkurenčne rezultate kljub uporabi preprostih modelov kakovosti.', 'he': 'מערכות תשובות לשאלות (QA) רגישות לדרכים רבות שונות שפה טבעית מבטת את אותו צורך מידע. בעיתון הזה אנו פונים למפרסמות כדרך לתפוס את הידע הזה ולהציג מסגרת כללית שלמדה פרסמות מאושרות למשימות QA שונות. השיטה שלנו מאומנת סוף-סוף בשימוש זוגות תשובה-שאלה כאות פיקוח. שאלה והפראפרסמות שלה משמשות כתוצאה לדוגמא ניקוד עצבי שמוסיף משקלים גבוהים יותר לבטאות שפתיים סביר להביא תשובות נכונות. אנו מעריכים את הגישה שלנו על QA על בסיס חופשי ובחירת משפט תשובה. תוצאות ניסיוניות על שלושה קבוצות נתונים מראות שהמסגרת שלנו משפר באופן קבוע את ההופעה, להשיג תוצאות תחרותיות למרות השימוש בדוגמאות QA פשוטות.', 'ha': "Surar tambaya na da ake karɓa (QA) na'urar system masu shafi zuwa masu cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka na daban-daban, da za'a bayyana maganar da misãlin maɓalli. Daga wannan takardan, Munã jujjuya masu fassarar da wannan ilmi kuma tuna wata firam mai jumla da za'a sanar da fasafari masu cin nasara wa aikin QA. An sanar da metodenmu ƙari-zuwa-ƙari, a yi amfani da nau'in-jibar-su-nau'i biyu kamar wata alama na gani. Wani mai tambaya da parameters ke amfani da shi kamar an shigar da shi zuwa motel mai nufi na neural, wanda ke ƙayyade nau'i mafi girma zuwa maganar linguistic, ana yiwuwa ya iya motsa masu daidai. Ina ƙaddara hanyarmu a kan QA kan Freebase kuma mu karɓi zaɓen azãba. Matarin jarrabo a kan daidaita taki uku ya nuna cewa firam-framenmu yana ƙari gaba ga aikin, kuma yana sami matsala masu yin gaura, kuma kõ da amfani da misãlai na QA mai sauƙi.", 'jv': 'Sugeng rawisan sing sabanjuré Nang pepulan iki, kita mudhaya paraFrases nganggo perusahaan kanggo ngerasar awakdhéwé iki lan nyimpen kuwi nggawe barang-barang nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngerasar tentang kanggo mulai nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngilanggar nggawe operasi Name question Awak dhéwé ngejaraké awak dhéwé ning kA mulai freebaz lan gambarang langgar. Rejalaké sing beraksi barêng-barêng telu dataset menehi wong kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe sawasara dadi, iso nglanggar barang sampek iso nggawe model sing sampeyan KA.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ལ་གནད་དོན་ལན་གསལ་བ(QA)མ་ལག་ཚོ་ནི་རང་བཟོས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིན་པ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚིག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཡིག་ཆའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ལྟར Our method is trained end-to-end using question-answer pairs as a supervision signal. ང་ཚོའི་བརྗོད་གྲངས་དང་དེའི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ནུས་རབ་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ལས་ནང་འཇུག་སྐྱེས་བ་ཅིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་QA འདིའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རང་དབང་གཞིའི་རྟེན་དང་ཚིག་གདམ་ཀ་དང་མཐུན་གྱི་ཡིག་གདམ་ཀ་ཡོད་ཀྱི་རྩི ལག་འཚོལ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་མཇུག་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཞི་ཁུང་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Temporal Information Extraction for Question Answering Using Syntactic Dependencies in an LSTM-based Architecture', 'fr': "Extraction d'informations temporelles pour répondre à des questions à l'aide de dépendances syntaxiques dans une architecture basée sur LSTM", 'pt': 'Extração de informações temporais para resposta a perguntas usando dependências sintáticas em uma arquitetura baseada em LSTM', 'ar': 'استخراج المعلومات الزمنية للإجابة على الأسئلة باستخدام التبعيات النحوية في بنية قائمة على LSTM', 'es': 'Extracción de información temporal para responder preguntas mediante dependencias sintácticas en una arquitectura basada en LSTM', 'ja': 'LSTMベースのアーキテクチャにおける構文依存関係を使用した質問回答のための時間的情報抽出', 'zh': '于 LSTM 体系结构中用句法凭问答日月', 'hi': 'एक LSTM-आधारित आर्किटेक्चर में वाक्यात्मक निर्भरताओं का उपयोग कर प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए अस्थायी जानकारी निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Временное извлечение информации для ответов на вопросы с использованием синтаксических зависимостей в архитектуре на основе LSTM', 'ga': 'Sliocht Faisnéise Sealadach le haghaidh Freagairt Ceist ag Úsáid Spleáchais Chomhréire in Ailtireacht atá bunaithe ar LSTM', 'hu': 'Időbeli információkivonás a kérdések megválaszolásához szintaktikus függőségek használatával LSTM-alapú architektúrában', 'el': 'Προσωρινή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας συντακτικές εξαρτήσεις σε μια αρχιτεκτονική βασισμένη στο LSTM', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Laikina informacija, skirta atsakymui į klausimus, ekstrahuojama naudojant sintaktines priklausomybes LSTM grindžiamoje architektūroje', 'it': "Estrazione di informazioni temporali per rispondere alle domande utilizzando dipendenze sintattiche in un'architettura basata su LSTM", 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'LSTM негіздеген архитектурасында синтактикалық тәуелдерді қолдану үшін сұрақ жауап беру үшін температуралық мәліметті тарқату', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Maklumat Temporal untuk Jawapan Pertanyaan Menggunakan Dependensi Sintaktik dalam arkitektur berasaskan LSTM', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Temporanja għal Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet bl-Użu ta’ Dipendenzi Sintattiċi f’Arkitettura bbażata fuq LSTM', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുക', 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av mellombels informasjon for spørsmålssvar ved bruk av syntaktiske avhengighet i ein LSTM-basert arkitektur', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja informacji czasowych do odpowiedzi na pytania za pomocą zależności syntaktycznych w architekturze opartej na LSTM', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor temporale pentru răspunsul la întrebări utilizând dependențe sintactice într-o arhitectură bazată pe LSTM', 'so': 'Ka soo saarista macluumaadka ku meelgaarka ah ee su’aalaha ku saabsan isticmaalka kaalmada Syntactic ee ku saleysan taariikhda LSTM', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija temporalne informacije za odgovor na pitanje korištenje sintaktičkih zavisnosti u arhitekturi na osnovu LSTM-a', 'mn': 'LSTM-ын архитектур дээр Синтактик хамааралтай байдлыг ашиглах асуулт хариултын хувьд Температур мэдээллийн нээв', 'sv': 'Tillfällig informationsutvinning för frågesvar med hjälp av syntaktiska beroenden i en LSTM-baserad arkitektur', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න සඳහා තාම්කාලික තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය', 'ta': 'LSTM அடிப்படையில் உள்ள அடிப்படையில் ஒத்திசைவு சார்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும் கேள்வியின் தற்காலிக தகவல் வெளியேற்றம்', 'ur': 'LSTM-based Architecture میں سینٹاکتیک اعتباری استعمال کرنے کے لئے سوال کے لئے تیموں معلومات اضافہ کرنا', 'vi': 'Sơ tán thông tin thời gian cho câu hỏi đáp ứng bằng sự phụ thuộc pháp thuật trong kiến trúc LSTM', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Privremena izvlačenja informacija za odgovor na pitanja koristeći sintaktičke zavisnosti u arhitekturi na LSTM-u', 'da': 'Uddrag af tidsmæssig information til spørgsmål besvarelse ved hjælp af syntaktiske afhængigheder i en LSTM-baseret arkitektur', 'nl': 'Tijdelijke informatie extractie voor het beantwoorden van vragen met behulp van syntactische afhankelijkheden in een LSTM-gebaseerde architectuur', 'bg': 'Извличане на времева информация за отговор на въпроси чрез използване на синтактични зависимости в архитектура базирана на ЛСТМ', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Informasi Temporal untuk menjawab Pertanyaan Menggunakan Dependensi Sintaktik dalam arsitektur berdasarkan LSTM', 'ko': 'LSTM 기반 아키텍처에서 구문 종속 기반 Q&amp;A 시제 정보 추출', 'de': 'Temporale Informationsextraktion zur Beantwortung von Fragen mithilfe syntaktischer Abhängigkeiten in einer LSTM-basierten Architektur', 'sw': 'Temporal Information Extraction for Question Answering Using Syntactic Dependencies in an LSTM-based Architecture', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i informacionit të përkohshëm për përgjigjen e pyetjeve duke përdorur varësitë sintaktike në një arkitekturë bazuar në LSTM', 'am': 'Temporal Information Extraction for Question Answering Using Syntactic Dependencies in an LSTM-based Architecture', 'tr': 'Sorag jogapy üçin Wagtlaýyn Maglumaty Açmak', 'af': "Tydelike inligting uitpak vir vraag antwoord met gebruik van sintaktieke afhengigheid in 'n LSTM-gebaseerde arkitektuur", 'bn': 'একটি LSTM ভিত্তিক আর্কিটিকেক্টরে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক নির্ভরশীল ব্যবহার করার জন্য প্রশ্নের সময় তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'az': 'Söylə cavab vermək üçün vaxtlı Malümat Çıqış LSTM tabanlı Arhitektura istifadə edilən Sintaktik bağlılıqları', 'bs': 'Privremena izvlačenja informacija za odgovor na pitanje koristeći sintaktičke zavisnosti u arhitekturi na LSTM-u', 'ca': "Extracció temporal d'informació per respondre a preguntes utilitzant dependencies sintàctiques en una arquitectura basada en LSTM", 'cs': 'Extrakce časových informací pro zodpovězení otázek pomocí syntaktických závislostí v architektuře založené na LSTM', 'et': 'Ajalise teabe väljavõtmine küsimustele vastamiseks, kasutades süntaktilisi sõltuvusi LSTM-põhises arhitektuuris', 'fi': 'Temporaalinen tiedonhankinta kysymyksiin vastaamiseen käyttämällä synteettisiä riippuvuuksia LSTM-pohjaisessa arkkitehtuurissa', 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات زمانی برای پاسخ سوال استفاده از بستگی\u200cهای سنتاکتیک در یک معماری بنیاد LSTM', 'hy': 'Temporal Information Extraction for Question Answering Using Syntactic Dependencies in an LSTM-based Architecture', 'sk': 'Časovno pridobivanje informacij za odgovarjanje na vprašanja z uporabo sintetičnih odvisnosti v arhitekturi, ki temelji na LSTM', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': "Extractin Agaji na Akwai wa tambayi na Jabu'a da Yi amfani da Kyauta Duk da Kyauta cikin an LSSM-based arkiki", 'bo': 'Temporal Information Extraction for Question Answering Using Syntactic Dependencies in an LSTM-based Architecture', 'he': 'מחלץ מידע זמני לענות על שאלות בשימוש תלויות סינטקטיות בארכיטקטורה מבוססת על LSTM'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose to use a set of simple, uniform in architecture LSTM-based models to recover different kinds of temporal relations from text. Using the shortest dependency path between entities as input, the same architecture is used to extract intra-sentence, cross-sentence, and document creation time relations. A double-checking technique reverses entity pairs in classification, boosting the recall of positive cases and reducing misclassifications between opposite classes. An efficient pruning algorithm resolves conflicts globally. Evaluated on QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), our proposed technique outperforms state-of-the-art methods by a large margin. We also conduct intrinsic evaluation and post state-of-the-art results on Timebank-Dense.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح استخدام مجموعة من النماذج البسيطة والموحدة في العمارة القائمة على LSTM لاستعادة أنواع مختلفة من العلاقات الزمنية من النص. باستخدام أقصر مسار تبعية بين الكيانات كمدخلات ، تُستخدم نفس البنية لاستخراج العلاقات الزمنية داخل الجملة ، والجملة المتقاطعة ، والعلاقات الزمنية لإنشاء المستندات. تعمل تقنية "التحقق المزدوج" على عكس أزواج الكيانات في التصنيف ، مما يعزز استدعاء الحالات الإيجابية ويقلل من سوء التصنيف بين الفئات المقابلة. تعمل خوارزمية التقليم الفعالة على حل النزاعات على مستوى العالم. بعد تقييمها على QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) ، تفوقت تقنيتنا المقترحة على أحدث الأساليب بهامش كبير. نقوم أيضًا بإجراء تقييم جوهري ونشر أحدث النتائج على Timebank-Dense.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos utilizar un conjunto de modelos basados en LSTM de arquitectura simple y uniforme para recuperar diferentes tipos de relaciones temporales del texto. Al utilizar la ruta de dependencia más corta entre entidades como entrada, se utiliza la misma arquitectura para extraer relaciones de tiempo entre frases, frases cruzadas y de tiempo de creación de documentos. Una técnica de «doble verificación» revierte los pares de entidades en la clasificación, lo que aumenta la recuperación de casos positivos y reduce las clasificaciones erróneas entre clases opuestas. Un algoritmo de poda eficiente resuelve los conflictos de forma global. Evaluada en QA-TempeVal (Tarea 5 de SemEval2015), nuestra técnica propuesta supera a los métodos más avanzados por un amplio margen. También realizamos evaluaciones intrínsecas y publicamos resultados de vanguardia en Timebank-Dense.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons d'utiliser un ensemble de modèles simples et uniformes basés sur LSTM pour récupérer différents types de relations temporelles à partir de texte. En utilisant le chemin de dépendance le plus court entre les entités comme entrée, la même architecture est utilisée pour extraire les relations temporelles intra-phrases, croisées et de création de documents. Une technique de «\xa0double vérification\xa0» inverse les paires d'entités dans la classification, ce qui augmente le rappel des cas positifs et réduit les erreurs de classification entre les classes opposées. Un algorithme d'élagage efficace résout les conflits au niveau mondial Évaluée sur QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), notre technique proposée surpasse largement les méthodes de pointe. Nous effectuons également des évaluations intrinsèques et publions des résultats de pointe sur Timebank-Dense.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos usar um conjunto de modelos simples e uniformes em arquitetura baseados em LSTM para recuperar diferentes tipos de relações temporais do texto. Usando o caminho de dependência mais curto entre entidades como entrada, a mesma arquitetura é usada para extrair relações de tempo de criação de documentos entre frases, frases cruzadas e. Uma técnica de “verificação dupla” reverte pares de entidades na classificação, aumentando a recuperação de casos positivos e reduzindo erros de classificação entre classes opostas. Um algoritmo de poda eficiente resolve conflitos globalmente. Avaliada no QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Tarefa 5), nossa técnica proposta supera os métodos de última geração por uma grande margem. Também realizamos avaliação intrínseca e postamos resultados de última geração no Timebank-Dense.', 'ja': '本稿では、LSTMベースのモデルにおける単純で一様なアーキテクチャのセットを用いて、テキストから異なる種類の時間関係を回復することを提案する。エンティティ間の最短の依存経路を入力として、同じアーキテクチャを使用して、文内、クロス文、およびドキュメント作成時間関係を抽出します。「ダブルチェック」手法は、分類におけるエンティティペアを逆転させ、陽性症例のリコールを促進し、反対のクラス間の誤った分類を減少させる。効率的な枝刈りアルゴリズムは、競合をグローバルに解決します。QA - TempEval （ SemEval 2015 Task 5 ）で評価したところ、当社が提案するテクニックは最先端の方法を大幅に上回っています。また、本質的な評価を行い、最先端の結果をTimebank - Denseに投稿しています。', 'zh': '本文,臣等议用简一之基于LSTM架构,从文本复异类之时。 用实体最短者依径为输,用同体系结构以取句内、交句与文档创时。 「重检」可以反类中的实体对,以崇正例的召率,并减对反类的错误分类。 高效之剪算,可以决全局。 QQ-TempEval(SemEval2015务5)评,吾术优于先进。 Timebank-Dense内评最先进。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы предлагаем использовать набор простых, однородных в архитектуре LSTM-основанных моделей для восстановления различных видов временных отношений из текста. Используя кратчайший путь зависимости между сущностями в качестве входных данных, одна и та же архитектура используется для извлечения внутрипредложений, перекрестных предложений и отношений времени создания документов. Метод «двойной проверки» меняет местами пары сущностей в классификации, стимулируя отзыв положительных случаев и уменьшая ошибочную классификацию между противоположными классами. Эффективный алгоритм обрезки разрешает конфликты на глобальном уровне. Оцениваемая на QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), наша предлагаемая методика значительно превосходит современные методы. Мы также проводим внутреннюю оценку и публикуем самые современные результаты на Timebank-Dense.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम पाठ से विभिन्न प्रकार के अस्थायी संबंधों को पुनर्प्राप्त करने के लिए आर्किटेक्चर एलएसटीएम-आधारित मॉडल में सरल, वर्दी के एक सेट का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इनपुट के रूप में निकायों के बीच सबसे छोटी निर्भरता पथ का उपयोग करते हुए, एक ही आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग इंट्रा-वाक्य, क्रॉस-वाक्य और दस्तावेज़ निर्माण समय संबंधों को निकालने के लिए किया जाता है। एक "डबल-चेकिंग" तकनीक वर्गीकरण में इकाई जोड़े को उलट देती है, सकारात्मक मामलों की याद को बढ़ावा देती है और विपरीत वर्गों के बीच गलत वर्गीकरण को कम करती है। एक कुशल छंटाई एल्गोरिथ्म विश्व स्तर पर संघर्षों को हल करता है। QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) पर मूल्यांकन किया गया, हमारी प्रस्तावित तकनीक एक बड़े मार्जिन से अत्याधुनिक तरीकों को मात देती है। हम आंतरिक मूल्यांकन भी करते हैं और टाइमबैंक-घने पर अत्याधुनिक परिणामों के बाद भी करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn úsáid a bhaint as sraith samhlacha simplí, aonfhoirmeacha san ailtireacht atá bunaithe ar LSTM chun cineálacha éagsúla caidrimh ama a aisghabháil ó théacs. Agus an cosán spleáchais is giorra idir eintitis á n-úsáid mar ionchur, úsáidtear an ailtireacht chéanna chun caidreamh idir-abairte, tras-abairt agus cruthú doiciméad a bhaint as. Déanann teicníocht “seiceáil dhúbailte” péirí aonán a aisiompú san aicmiú, rud a chuireann dlús leis an aisghairm ar chásanna dearfacha agus ag laghdú mí-ranguithe idir aicmí codarsnacha. Réitíonn algartam bearradh éifeachtach coinbhleachtaí ar fud an domhain. Arna mheastóireacht ar QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Tasc 5), tá sár-fheidhmíocht ag ár dteicníocht bheartaithe na modhanna úrscothacha go mór. Déanaimid meastóireacht intreach freisin agus iar-thorthaí den scoth ar Timebank-Dense.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy az LSTM alapú architektúrában egyszerű, egységes modelleket használjunk a különböző időbeli kapcsolatok visszaállítására a szövegből. Az entitások közötti legrövidebb függőségi útvonal használatával bevitként ugyanazt az architektúrát használja a mondaton belüli, keresztmondaton belüli és dokumentált létrehozási időkapcsolatok kivonására. A "kettős ellenőrzési" technika megfordítja a jogalanypárokat az osztályozásban, fokozza a pozitív esetek visszahívását és csökkenti az ellentétes osztályok közötti téves besorolásokat. A hatékony metszési algoritmus globális konfliktusokat old meg. A QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) alapján értékelt technikánk nagy mértékben felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket. Belső értékelést is végezünk és a legkorszerűbb eredményeket közzétesszük a Timebank-Dense-en.', 'ka': "ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდა გამოყენოთ საუკეთესო, სუნიფორმა აქტიქტიკური LSTM-ის ბაზეული მოდელში, რომ ტექსტიდან განსხვავებული თავსოფლიო დაკავშირება. ელემენტების შესახებ ყველაზე კიდევ კიდევ კონფიგურირებული გეზის გამოყენება, იგივე აქტიქტიქტიკური გამოყენება, რომელიც შექმნა დროის შესახებ. 'double-checking' ტექნოგია კლასიფიკაციაში განსაზღვრებულ ზოგის გადაბრუნდება, პოტიფიკაციის შემხსენება და შეცდომა კლასიფიკაცია განსაზღვრებულ კლასის შორის. ეფექტიური აღწერის ალგორიტიმა გლობალურად კონფლიქტებს გადაწყვებს. QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) განსაზღვრებულია, ჩვენი განსაზღვრებული ტექნოგია დიდი მარტინით გავაკეთებს სახელსაწყისი მეტოვები. ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ საინტერესო განსაზღვრება და შემდეგ სამყარო წარმოდგენება Timebank-Dense-ზე.", 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε ένα σύνολο απλών, ομοιόμορφων στην αρχιτεκτονική μοντέλων βασισμένων σε LSTM για να ανακτήσουμε διαφορετικά είδη χρονικών σχέσεων από το κείμενο. Χρησιμοποιώντας τη συντομότερη διαδρομή εξάρτησης μεταξύ οντοτήτων ως εισαγωγή, η ίδια αρχιτεκτονική χρησιμοποιείται για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων χρόνου δημιουργίας εντός πρότασης, διασταυρούμενης πρότασης και εγγράφου. Μια τεχνική "διπλού ελέγχου" αντιστρέφει ζεύγη οντοτήτων στην ταξινόμηση, ενισχύοντας την ανάκληση θετικών περιπτώσεων και μειώνοντας τις λανθασμένες ταξινομήσεις μεταξύ αντίθετων κατηγοριών. Ένας αποτελεσματικός αλγόριθμος κλαδέματος επιλύει συγκρούσεις παγκοσμίως. Αξιολογημένη με QA-TempEvalu (εργασία 5), η προτεινόμενη τεχνική μας ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο. Επίσης, διεξάγουμε εγγενή αξιολόγηση και μετά τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε Χρονοδιάγραμμα-Πυκνότητα.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, proponiamo di utilizzare un insieme di modelli semplici e uniformi in architettura basati su LSTM per recuperare diversi tipi di relazioni temporali dal testo. Utilizzando il percorso di dipendenza più breve tra entità come input, la stessa architettura viene utilizzata per estrarre relazioni di tempo di creazione intra-frase, cross-frase e documenti. Una tecnica di "doppio controllo" inverte le coppie di entità nella classificazione, aumentando il richiamo di casi positivi e riducendo le classificazioni errate tra classi opposte. Un efficiente algoritmo di potatura risolve i conflitti a livello globale. Valutata su QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), la nostra tecnica proposta supera ampiamente i metodi all\'avanguardia. Conduciamo anche valutazioni intrinseche e post risultati all\'avanguardia su Timebank-Dense.', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда, біз мәтіннен басқа түрлі уақытша қатынастарды қайта алу үшін архитектура LSTM негіздеген үлгілерде қарапайым, біріктіріп қолдануға ұсынамыз. Нысандар арасындағы ең қысқа тәуелсіздік жолын келтіру үшін бір архитектура сөзді, көбейтілік сөзді және құжатты құру уақыт қатынасын шығару үшін қолданылады. 'Қосымша тексеру' техникасы құрылғысында нысандардың екеуін қайтарып, оң жақсы жағдайларды қайтаруға көмектеседі және қарсы класс арасындағы жарамсыз классификацияларын азайтады. Эффективті таңдау алгоритмі әлемдегі қайшылықтарды шешу. QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) дегенде оқу үшін қолданылатын техникамыздың күй- жай әдістерін үлкен шектеу арқылы істейді. Сонымен қатар, Timebank-Dense-де ішкі оқиға және өзгерту күйінің соңындағы нәтижелерін жасаймыз.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naudoti paprastų, vienodų architektūros modelių rinkinį LSTM pagrįstiems modeliams, kad būtų atkurti skirtingi laiko santykiai nuo teksto. Naudojant trumpiausią subjektų priklausomybės kelią kaip įvestį, ta pati architektūra naudojama ištraukti santykius tarp sakinių, kryžminių sakinių ir dokumentų kūrimo laiko. Įgyvendinant dvigubo tikrinimo metodą klasifikuojamos subjektų poros atvirkščiai, didinamas teigiamų atvejų atšaukimas ir mažinamos klaidingos klasifikacijos tarp skirtingų klasių. Efektyvus smulkinimo algoritmas pasauliniu mastu išspręsia konfliktus. Įvertinus QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 užduotis Nr. 5), mūsų siūlomas metodas gerokai viršija pažangiausius metodus. We also conduct intrinsic evaluation and post state-of-the-art results on Timebank-Dense.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, предложуваме да се користи еден сет едноставни униформи во архитектурните модели базирани на ЛСТМ за да се обноват различни видови на временски односи од текст. Користејќи го најкратокот пат на зависност помеѓу ентитетите како влез, истата архитектура се користи за извлекување на односите меѓу речениците, крсторечениците и времето на создавање на документите. Техниката на „двојно проверување“ ги враќа паровите на ентитетите во класификацијата, зголемувајќи го повлекувањето на позитивните случаи и намалувајќи ги лошите класификации помеѓу спротивните класи. Еден ефикасен алгоритм за исцепување ги решава конфликтите глобално. Оценети на QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 задача 5), нашата предложена техника ги надминува најсовремените методи со голема маргина. Ние, исто така, спроведуваме внатрешна проценка и пост-современи резултати за Timebank-Dense.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan set sederhana, seragam dalam model berdasarkan arsitektur LSTM untuk pulihkan jenis-jenis hubungan sementara yang berbeza dari teks. Mengguna laluan dependensi paling pendek diantara entiti sebagai input, arkitektur yang sama digunakan untuk mengekstrak hubungan masa penciptaan intra-kalimat, salib-kalimat, dan dokumen. Teknik 'pemeriksaan ganda' membalikkan pasangan entiti dalam klasifikasi, meningkatkan pengulangan kes positif dan mengurangkan klasifikasi salah diantara kelas lawan. Algoritma pemotong efisien menyelesaikan konflik secara global. Dihargai dalam QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), teknik kami diusulkan melampaui kaedah state-of-the-art dengan margin besar. Kami juga melakukan penilaian intrinsik dan hasil post-state-of-the-art pada Timebank-Dense.", 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi å bruka eit sett enkle, uniforme i arkitekturen LSTM-baserte modeller for å gjenoppretta ulike typar temporale forhold frå tekst. Bruk den korte avhengighetsbanen mellom einingar som inndata, vert det same arkitekturen brukt til å pakka ut forholdet med innsetjing, kryssetjing og dokumentopprettingstid. Eit « dobbelsjekkingsteknik » omvender einingspar i klassifikasjon, styrer rekninga på positiv tilfeller og reduserer feil klassifikasjonar mellom motsatte klassar. Eit effektivt prøving- algoritme løyser konflikt globalt. Evaluert på QA-TempEval (semiEval2015 Task 5), vår foreslått teknikk utfører stått-av-kunstensmetoder med ein stor margin. Vi gjer også interne evalueringa og etter kunsttilstanden på Timebank-Dense.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li jintużaw sett ta’ mudelli sempliċi u uniformi fl-arkitettura bbażati fuq LSTM biex jiġu rkuprati tipi differenti ta’ relazzjonijiet temporali mit-test. Bl-użu tal-iqsar triq ta’ dipendenza bejn l-entitajiet bħala input, tintuża l-istess arkitettura biex jiġu estratti r-relazzjonijiet bejn is-sentenza, is-sentenza trasversali u l-ħin tal-ħolqien tad-dokumenti. Teknika ta' 'verifika doppja' tgħaddi lura pari ta' entitajiet fil-klassifikazzjoni, issaħħaħ ir-rifjut ta' każijiet pożittivi u tnaqqas il-klassifikazzjonijiet żbaljati bejn il-klassijiet opposti. An efficient pruning algorithm resolves conflicts globally.  Evalwata fuq QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), it-teknika proposta tagħna taqbeż il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati b’marġini kbir. Għandna twettaq ukoll evalwazzjoni intrinsika u riżultati ta' wara l-aktar avvanzati dwar Timebank-Dense.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид архитектур LSTM-ын суурилсан загваруудыг өөр төрлийн хугацааны харилцааны эрүүл мэндийлэхийн тулд энгийн, нэгтгэл хэрэглэх боломжтой санал өгдөг. Объектуудын харилцааны хамгийн богино хамааралтай зам ашиглаж, ижил архитектур нь өгүүлбэр, хэлбэрээр, баримт бүтээх цаг харилцаа гаргахад хэрэглэгддэг. "хоёр дахин шалгах" техник нь нэгж хоёрыг хуваалцах, эерэг тохиолдлыг нэмэгдүүлж эсрэг ангийнх хоорондын буруу хуваалцааныг багасгаж байна. Эффектив пронинг алгоритм дэлхийн зөрчилдөөг шийддэг. QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) дээр дүгнэлт хийгдсэн, бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн техник урлагийн төвшин аргыг том хэмжээгээр үржүүлдэг. Мөн бид Timebank-Dense-д дотоод дүгнэлт, урлагийн дараагийн үр дүнг хийдэг.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ലെസ്റ്റി-അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ലെസ്റ്റി-മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ, യൂണിഫോമിറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ ആശ്രയിതമായ പാത ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് എന്നിവയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരേ ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോ ഒരു 'ഇരട്ടി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത്' സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ ജോടികളെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നു, പ്രോസിറ്റിവ് കേസുകളു സാധുവായ ഒരു ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ലോകത്തുള്ള കുഴപ്പം പരിഹരിക്കുന്നു. QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 ടാസ്ക് 5) മുമ്പില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്കിന്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ മാര്\u200dഗിന്\u200d മുഴു ടിമെബാങ്ക്-ഡെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഫോള്\u200dട്ട് സംഭവിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും", 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem utilizarea unui set de modele simple, uniforme în arhitectură bazate pe LSTM pentru a recupera diferite tipuri de relații temporale din text. Utilizând cea mai scurtă cale de dependență între entități ca intrare, aceeași arhitectură este utilizată pentru a extrage relațiile intra-frază, încrucișate și timpul de creare a documentelor. O tehnică de "dublă verificare" inversează perechile de entități în clasificare, sporind retragerea cazurilor pozitive și reducând clasificările eronate între clasele opuse. Un algoritm eficient de tăiere rezolvă conflictele la nivel global. Evaluată pe QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), tehnica noastră propusă depășește cu o marjă mare metodele de ultimă generație. De asemenea, efectuăm evaluări intrinsece și postăm rezultate de ultimă generație pe Timebank-Dense.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wykorzystanie zestawu prostych, jednolitych w architekturze modeli opartych na LSTM do odzyskania różnego rodzaju relacji czasowych z tekstu. Korzystając z najkrótszej ścieżki zależności między jednostkami jako wejścia, ta sama architektura jest używana do wyodrębniania relacji czasu tworzenia wewnątrz zdań, krzyżowych i dokumentów. Technika "podwójnego sprawdzania" odwraca pary jednostek w klasyfikacji, zwiększając odzyskiwanie pozytywnych przypadków i zmniejszając błędne klasyfikacje między przeciwnymi klasami. Wydajny algorytm przycinania rozwiązuje konflikty globalnie. Oceniono w oparciu o QA-TempEvalu (SemEvalu2015 Task 5), nasza proponowana technika znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody. Przeprowadzamy również wewnętrzną ocenę i wyniki post-state-of-the-art na Timebank-Dense.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi att använda en uppsättning enkla, enhetliga i arkitektur LSTM-baserade modeller för att återställa olika typer av temporala relationer från text. Med hjälp av den kortaste beroendevägen mellan entiteter som inmatning används samma arkitektur för att extrahera intramening-, korsmening- och dokumenttidsrelationer. En teknik med dubbelkontroll ändrar enhetspar i klassificeringen, vilket ökar återkallandet av positiva fall och minskar felklassificeringar mellan olika klasser. En effektiv beskärningsalgoritm löser konflikter globalt. Utvärderad på QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) överträffar vår föreslagna teknik med stor marginal de senaste metoderna. Vi genomför även intern utvärdering och publicerar toppmoderna resultat på Timebank-Dense.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da iskoristimo set jednostavnih, uniformnih modela na arhitekturi LSTM kako bi se oporavili različite vrste vremenskih odnosa sa teksta. Koristeći najkraći put zavisnosti između entitata kao ulaz, isti arhitektura se koristi za izvlačenje unutrašnje rečenice, krstorečenice i odnosa o vremenu stvaranja dokumenta. Tehnika "dvostruko provjeravanje" obraæa parove entiteta u klasifikaciji, povećava seæanje pozitivnih slučajeva i smanjenje pogrešnih klasifikacija izmeðu suprotnih klasa. Efikasan algoritam obrezanja rješava sukobe globalno. Procjenjena na QA-TempEval (zadatak 5. semiEval2015), naša predložena tehnika iznosi metode države umjetnosti velikom marginom. Takoðe vodimo unutrašnju procjenu i posle stanja umjetnosti rezultate Timebank-Dense.', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் உரையில் இருந்து வேறு வகையான நேர தொடர்புகளை மீட்டெடுக்க ஒரு சுலபமான, uniform அமைப்பு LSTM-அடிப்படையில் பயன்படு உள்ளீட்டு பொருளுக்கு இடையே உள்ளீடுகளுக்கு மிகவும் குறைந்த சார்பு பாதை 'இரட்டை தேர்வு' தொழில்நுட்பம் வகுப்பில் பொருள் ஜோடி ஜோடியை மாற்றுகிறது, நேர்ந்த நிகழ்வுகளை நினைவூட்டுவதை அதிகரிக்கிறத ஒரு விருப்பமான புரிந்து கொள்ளும் ஆல்ஜிரியம் உலகத்தில் குழப்பங்களை தீர்வு செய்கிறது. Evaluated on QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), our proposed technique outperforms state-of-the-art methods by a large margin.  நாம் டிமெபாங்க்-டென்ஸ் மீது உள்ளே ஆய்வு மற்றும் கலை முடிவுகள் பின்னர் நடத்துகிறோம்.", 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය, සංස්ථාපනය LSTM-අධාරිත මොඩේල් වලින් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් විදියට පත්තර සම භාවිතාවක් අතර ඇතුළු විදියට අතර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, සමාන විශ්වාස සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඇතුළු වාක්ය, ක්\u200dරිස 'double-checking' පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂයෙන් අන්තිම ජාතියක් පරීක්ෂණය වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණයෙන්  ප්\u200dරශ්ණ අල්ගෝරිත්මයක් ජාතිකව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විනාශ කරනවා. QA-Tempeval (semeval2015 Job 5) විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිය අපි සමහර විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා සහ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර", 'so': "In this paper, we propose to use a set of simple, uniform in architecture LSTM-based models to recover different kinds of temporal relations from text.  Isku isticmaalaya jidadka ugu gaaban ee ku saabsan ku saabsan waxyaabaha u dhexeeya sida input, waxaa loo isticmaalaa in la soo bixiyo xariir, xadhig, iyo warqad abuurista xilliga. Teqooyiga 'double-checking' wuxuu bedelaa labada labo oo isbedela fasalka, wuxuuna kordhisaa xusuusta xaaladaha suurtagalka ah, wuxuuna hoos u dhigi karaa iskuullada kala duwan. Algorithm oo faa’iido leh ayaa go’aansada dagaalladaha caalamiga ah. QA-TempEval Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta gudaha ah iyo ka dib xaaladda farshaxanka ee Timebank-Dense.", 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک مجموعہ ساده، یونیفرم کا استعمال کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے لس ٹیکسٹم کی بنیاد دار موڈل میں مختلف طریقے معمولی رابطہ استعمال کرنے کے لئے۔ انٹنیٹوں کے درمیان بہت چھوٹا اعتباری مسیر کا استعمال کرنا، اسی طرح معمار کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ انٹرنا-جماعت، کرسٹ-جماعت اور ڈوکیٹ پیدا کرنے کے وقت رابطہ نکالیں. ایک 'دوبل-چک' ٹیکنیک کلاسیفوں میں اجتماعی جوڑوں کو تبدیل کرتا ہے، مثبت کیسوں کی یاد دہانی کرتا ہے اور مخالف کلاس کے درمیان غلط کلاسیفوں کو کم کرتا ہے. ایک قابل تحرینگ الگوریتم جہاں سے مخالفت حل کرتا ہے۔ QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) پر مطالبہ کیا گیا ہے، ہماری پیشنهاد تکنیک ایک بڑی مرز سے state-of-the-art methodologies کو اضافہ کرتی ہے. ہم نے تایمبانک-ڈنس کے بارے میں داخل تحقیقات اور ایٹیٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ-ایٹ نتیجے بھی انجام دیے ہیں.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz LSTM asosida yaratilgan bir oddiy, uniformini ishlatishni talab qilamiz va matnning boshqa vaqt aloqalarini aniqlash uchun. @ info: whatsthis Name Algoritni tasdiqlash kerak bo'lgan muammolarni dunyo yo yo'qlaydi. @ info Biz Timebank-Dense davomida ichki qiymatni bajaramiz va shaxsiy natijalar davomida bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng một bộ đơn giản, đồng phục trong kiến trúc LSTM-nền để phục hồi các kiểu quan hệ thời gian khác nhau từ văn bản. Sử dụng con đường phụ thuộc ngắn nhất giữa các thực thể để nhập, cấu trúc giống nhau được dùng để trích dẫn nội dung, chữ thập, và tài liệu các mối quan hệ thời gian tạo ra. Một kỹ thuật "kiểm soát kép" đảo ngược các tổ chức theo phân hạng, tăng sự hồi phục các trường hợp tích cực và giảm tỷ lệ sai lệch giữa các lớp đối lập. Một thuật toán cắt tỉa hiệu quả giải quyết xung đột toàn cầu. Đánh giá cao kỹ thuật của chúng ta vượt trội các phương pháp hiện đại. Chúng tôi cũng thực hiện bản đánh giá và hậu quả của thời gian.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi at bruge et sæt enkle, ensartede i arkitektur LSTM-baserede modeller til at gendanne forskellige former for tidsmæssige relationer fra tekst. Ved hjælp af den korteste afhængighedssti mellem enheder som input bruges den samme arkitektur til at udtrække intra-sætning, krydssætning og dokumentoprettelsestidsrelationer. En"dobbeltkontrolteknik"vender enhedspar i klassificeringen, øger tilbagekaldelsen af positive tilfælde og reducerer fejlklassificeringer mellem modsatte klasser. En effektiv beskæringsalgoritme løser konflikter globalt. Evalueret på QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), vores foreslåede teknik overgår med stor margin state-of-the-art metoder. Vi foretager også iboende evaluering og opfører state-of-the-art resultater på Timebank-Dense.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we voor om een reeks eenvoudige, uniforme in architectuur LSTM-gebaseerde modellen te gebruiken om verschillende soorten tijdelijke relaties uit tekst te herstellen. Met behulp van het kortste afhankelijkheidspad tussen entiteiten als invoer wordt dezelfde architectuur gebruikt voor het extraheren van tijdsrelaties tussen zinnen, zinnen en documenten. Een 'double-checking' techniek keert entiteitsparen in classificatie om, stimuleert het terugroepen van positieve gevallen en vermindert misclassificaties tussen tegengestelde klassen. Een efficiënt snoei algoritme lost conflicten wereldwijd op. Geavalueerd op QA-TempEval (SemEvalu2015 Taak 5), presteert onze voorgestelde techniek met een grote marge beter dan state-of-the-art methoden. We voeren ook intrinsieke evaluaties uit en post-state-of-the-art resultaten op Timebank-Dense.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме да се използва набор от прости, унифицирани в архитектурата модели, базирани на ЛСТМ, за да се възстановят различни видове времеви отношения от текста. Използвайки най-краткия път на зависимост между субектите като вход, същата архитектура се използва за извличане на времеви връзки в рамките на изречение, кръстосано изречение и създаване на документи. Техниката за "двойна проверка" обръща двойките субекти в класификацията, стимулира връщането на положителни случаи и намалява грешните класификации между противоположните класове. Ефективен алгоритъм за подрязване решава конфликти в световен мащаб. Оценена по задача 5, предложената ни техника надминава най-съвременните методи с голям марж. Също така провеждаме вътрешна оценка и пост-на-най-съвременни резултати на Таймбанк-гъст.', 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 간단하고 통일된 체계 구조를 바탕으로 하는 LSTM 모델을 사용하여 텍스트에서 서로 다른 유형의 시간 관계를 회복하는 것을 권장한다.실체 간의 가장 짧은 의존 경로를 입력으로 하고 같은 체계 구조를 사용하여 문장 내, 문장 간과 문서의 창설 시간 관계를 추출한다.'이중 검사'기술은 분류 중의 실체 쌍을 역전시켜 양성 환자의 회상률을 높이고 상반된 유형 간의 잘못된 분류를 줄일 수 있다.효율적인 가지치기 알고리즘은 전역적으로 충돌을 해결할 수 있다.QA Temp Eval(SemEval 2015 임무 5)에 대한 평가를 통해 우리가 제시한 기술은 가장 선진적인 방법보다 훨씬 우수하다.또한 Timebank Dense에 대한 내부 평가와 향후 최신 결과를 제공합니다.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo iskoristiti skup jednostavnih, uniformnih modela na arhitekturi LSTM-a kako bi se oporavili različite vrste vremenskih odnosa s teksta. Koristeći najkraći put zavisnosti između entitata kao ulaz, isti arhitektura se koristi za izvlačenje unutrašnje rečenice, krstorečenice i odnosa o stvaranju vremena dokumenta. Tehnika "dvostruko provjeravanje" obraća pare subjekta u klasifikaciji, povećava sećanje pozitivnih slučajeva i smanjenje pogrešnih klasifikacija između suprotnih klasa. Efikasan obrijač algoritma rješava sukobe globalno. Procjenjivano na QA-TempEval (zadatak 5. semiEval2015), naša predložena tehnika iznosi metode stanja umjetnosti velikom marginom. Također provodimo unutrašnju procjenu i nakon stanja umjetnosti rezultate Timebank-Dense.', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan set sederhana, seragam dalam arsitektur model berdasarkan LSTM untuk memulihkan berbagai jenis hubungan temporal dari teks. Menggunakan jalur terpendek dependensi antara entitas sebagai input, arsitektur yang sama digunakan untuk mengekstrak hubungan waktu dalam kalimat, kalimat salib, dan pembuatan dokumen. Sebuah teknik 'pemeriksaan ganda' membalikkan pasangan entitas dalam klasifikasi, meningkatkan kembali kasus positif dan mengurangi salah klasifikasi antara kelas yang berlawanan. Algoritma pemotong efisien memecahkan konflik secara global. Dinilai pada QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), teknik kami diusulkan melampaui metode state-of-the-art dengan margin besar. Kami juga melakukan evaluasi intrinsik dan hasil post-state-of-the-art pada Timebank-Dense.", 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kutumia seti rahisi, uniform katika miundo yenye msingi wa LSTM kutafuta a in a mbalimbali ya mahusiano ya muda kutoka kwenye maandishi. Kwa kutumia njia fupi ya kutegemea kati ya vitu vidogo kama input, ujenzi huo ule unatumiwa kutengeneza hukumu ya ndani, hukumu ya kupita, na nyaraka za kutengeneza mahusiano ya muda. Teknolojia ya 'kuchunguza mara mbili' inarudisha viwili vya entity katika darasa, kuongeza kumbukumbu za kesi chanya na kupunguza tofauti kati ya darasa tofauti. Ualgorithi wenye ufanisi wa kutatua migogoro duniani. Tamko la QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Kazi 5), teknolojia yetu iliypendekezwa inaonyesha hali ya sanaa kwa njia kubwa. Pia tunafanya tathmini za ndani na baada ya matokeo ya sanaa kwenye Timebank-Dense.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, eine Reihe einfacher, in der Architektur einheitlicher LSTM-basierter Modelle zu verwenden, um verschiedene Arten von zeitlichen Beziehungen aus Text wiederherzustellen. Unter Verwendung des kürzesten Abhängigkeitspfads zwischen Entitäten als Eingabe wird dieselbe Architektur verwendet, um die Zeitbeziehungen innerhalb von Sätzen, Sätzen und Dokumenten zu extrahieren. Eine "Double-Checking"-Technik kehrt Entitätspaare in der Klassifizierung um, fördert den Rückruf positiver Fälle und reduziert Fehlklassifikationen zwischen entgegengesetzten Klassen. Ein effizienter Beschneidungsalgorithmus löst Konflikte global. Ausgewertet auf QA-TempEval (SemEvalu2015 Task 5) übertrifft unsere vorgeschlagene Technik modernste Methoden deutlich. Darüber hinaus führen wir intrinsische Evaluierungen und Post-State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf Timebank-Dense durch.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از مجموعه\u200cای از مدل\u200cهای ساده، یونیفرم در معماری LSTM استفاده کنیم تا نوع\u200cهای رابطه\u200cهای موقتی متفاوت را از متن بازیافت کنیم. استفاده از مسیر کوتاه\u200cترین بستگی بین واحدها به عنوان ورودی، همان معماری برای خروج رابطه\u200cهای زمان ساختن داخل جمله، عبارت\u200cجمله و سند استفاده می\u200cشود. یک تکنیک "دوبار بررسی" جفت\u200cهای شرکت را در قسمت\u200cبندی برعکس می\u200cکند، افزایش یادآوری پرونده\u200cهای مثبت و کاهش گروه\u200cهای غلط بین کلاس\u200cهای مخالف است. یک الگوریتم فعال\u200cآوری در جهان مخالفت را حل می\u200cکند. در QA-TempEval (Task 5) ارزیابی شده، تکنیک پیشنهاد ما با یک مرز بزرگ روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری را به طور بزرگ انجام می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین تحقیقات داخلی و نتیجه\u200cهای بعد از هنری در تایمبانک-دنس انجام می\u200cدهیم.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, biziň arhitektura LSTM tabanly nusgalaryň beýleki görnüşlerini tekerden almak üçin basit, uniformy ulanmagy teklip berýäris. Giriş ýaly biretler arasynyň iň kiçi baglanylyk ýoldan ullanýar, bir arhitektura giriş sözlerimi, çarpaz sözlerimi we sened bejermek üçin ullanylýar. 'çift kontrol' tekniki eşit çiftlerini klasifikasynda tertibleyir, pozitif durumları gürrüňleýär we ters klaslaryň arasynda yanlış klaslary azaltýar. Etkinlik gabdalyk algoritmi dünýädäki çaglaryny çözýär. QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), biziň teknikimiz möhüm gabdalyk bilen durum-of-the-art yöntemlerini çykarýar. Biz hem iç daşarkı değerlendirme ve Timebank-Dens'e dair sanat sonuçlarını gerçekleştirdik.", 'am': "በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ልዩ ዓይነት የጊዜው ግንኙነት ከጽሑፍ ለማድረግ ቀላል፣ uniforms በመሠረቱ LSTM-based ዓይነቶች እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ አካባቢዎች መካከል እንደሚገባ ትንሽ የአካባቢነት መንገድ በመጠቀም፣ same የመዝገብ መሠረት ይጠቅማል፡፡ A 'double-checking' technique reverses entity pairs in classification, boosting the recall of positive cases and reducing misclassifications between opposite classes.  ብልሃተኛ አሌጎርቲም ግጭቶችን በዓለማዊ ላይ ይገናኛል፡፡ የQA-TempEval (SemEval2015 ስራ 5) የተዘጋጀ የቴክኖክናዊ ስህተታችን በተለየ ትልቅ ማረፊያ የሀገር-of-the-art methods outperform. በቴምባንክ-ዴንስ ላይ የኢትዮጵያ አዋቂውን ውጤት እናደርጋለን፡፡", 'az': "Bu kağızda, məktubların müxtəlif məlumatlarını geri qaytarmaq üçün basit, uniformalı məktəbə modellərdə istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Ən qısa təvəkküllük yolunu giriş kimi istifadə edərək, aynı arhitektura cümlələr, cümlələr və döküm yaratma vaxt bağlantılarını çıxartmaq üçün istifadə edilir. 'double-checking' tekniki birinci çiftləri klasifikasyonda dəyişdirir, pozitiv məsələlərin yadına salmağını artırar və tersi sınıf arasındakı yanlış klasifikasyonu azaltır. Etkili qırma algoritmi küresel müxtəlifləri çəkir. QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5) ilə değerlendirilmiş, təklif edilmiş teknikimiz böyük bir margin ilə mövcuddur. Biz də Timebank-Dense-ə dair daxili değerlendirmə və məhsul sonuçlarını idarə edirik.", 'af': "In hierdie papier voorstel ons om 'n stel van eenvoudige, uniforme in arkitektuur LSTM-gebaseerde modele te gebruik om verskillende soorte tydelike verwantings van teks te herstel. Gebruik van die kortste afhanklikheid pad tussen entiteite as invoer, word die selfde arkitektuur gebruik om intra- seting, kruisseting en dokument skep tydsrelasies te uitpak. 'n Dubbel- kontroleer' tekniks omgekies entiteite paar in klasifikasie, boonstem die rekening van positiewe gevalle en reduseer misklasifikasies tussen teenwoordige klasse. 'n Effektiewe pruning algoritme oplos konflikte globale. Geevalueer op QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Taak 5), ons voorgestelde teknike uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes deur 'n groot lyn. Ons doen ook binneste evaluasie en post-staat-van-kunste resultate op Timebank-Dense.", 'sq': "In this paper, we propose to use a set of simple, uniform in architecture LSTM-based models to recover different kinds of temporal relations from text.  Duke përdorur rrugën më të shkurtër të varësisë midis njësive si hyrje, përdoret e njëjta arkitekturë për të nxjerrë marrëdhëniet brenda fjalës, ndër-fjalës dhe për të krijuar dokumente kohë. Një teknikë e 'kontrollit të dyfishtë' kthen çiftet e njësive në klasifikim, duke rritur tërheqjen e rasteve pozitive dhe duke reduktuar klasifikimet e gabuara midis klasave të kundërta. Një algoritëm i efektshëm zgjidh konfliktet globalisht. Evaluated on QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), our proposed technique outperforms state-of-the-art methods by a large margin.  We also conduct intrinsic evaluation and post state-of-the-art results on Timebank-Dense.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել մի շարք պարզ, հավասար ճարտարապետական LSMT հիմնված մոդելներ տեքստից վերականգնելու տարբեր տեսակի ժամանակական հարաբերություններ: Using the shortest dependency path between entities as input, the same architecture is used to extract intra-sentence, cross-sentence, and document creation time relations.  "կրկնակի ստուգում" տեխնիկան հակադարձնում է անհատականությունների զույգերը դասակարգում, աճեցնում դրական դեպքերի վերադարձումը և նվազեցնում է հակառակ դասակարգերի միջև սխալ դասակարգումները: Արդյունավետ խզբզելու ալգորիթմը գլոբալ կերպ լուծում է հակամարտությունները: Արժեցված QA-Թեմպ-Եվալի (2015-ի կիսագնահատականը 5-ն) միջոցով, մեր առաջարկված տեխնիկան շատ ավելի բարձր մեթոդներ է արտադրում: Մենք նաև կատարում ենք ներքին գնահատականներ և ժամանակաշրջանի տեխնոլոգիական արդյունքներ:', 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে স্থাপত্য এলএসটিএম ভিত্তিক মডেলে একটি সাধারণ, ইউনিফর্ম ব্যবহার করতে পারি, যাতে লেখা থেকে বিভিন্ন ধর ইনপুট হিসেবে বস্তুর মধ্যে সর্বোচ্চ নির্ভর পাথ ব্যবহার করে, একই সাথে আর্কিটেক্টার ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে ইন্টার- বাক্য, ক্রাস-বাক্য, এবং ন একটি 'দ্বিগুণ পরীক্ষা' প্রযুক্তির প্রযুক্তি বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীর মধ্যে জোড়ার জোড়া প্রতিরোধ করে, ইতিবাচক ক ক্ষেত্রের স্মরণ বাড় সারা বিশ্বব্যাপী সংঘর্ষের সমাধান করার জন্য কার্যকর বুদ্ধিমান। কিউএ-টেম্প ইভাল (সেমইভাল২০১৫ কাজ ৫) সম্পর্কে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত প্রযুক্তিগত প্রযুক্তিগত প্রযুক্তি বিশা আমরা তিমেবাঙ্ক-ডেন্সের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ", 'et': "Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku kasutada lihtsaid, ühtseid arhitektuuris LSTM-põhinevaid mudeleid, et taastada tekstist erinevaid ajalisi seoseid. Kasutades sisendina olemite vahelist lühimat sõltuvusteed, kasutatakse sama arhitektuuri lausesiseste, ristlausete ja dokumendi loomise ajasuhete ekstraheerimiseks. Topeltkontrolli meetodiga pööratakse üksuste paarid klassifitseerimisel ümber, suurendades positiivsete juhtumite tagasikutsumist ja vähendades vastupidiste klassifikatsioonide valesid. Tõhus pügamisalgoritm lahendab konfliktid globaalselt. Hinnatud QA-TempEval'i (SemEval2015 Task 5) põhjal, on meie pakutud tehnika suure marginaali võrra parem kui kaasaegsed meetodid. Samuti teostame sisemist hindamist ja postitame Timebank-Dense'i tipptasemel tulemusi.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme použít sadu jednoduchých, uniformních v architektuře modelů založených na LSTM k obnovení různých druhů časových vztahů z textu. Použitím nejkratší cesty závislosti mezi entitami jako vstup se používá stejná architektura pro extrakci časových vztahů uvnitř věty, křížových vět a dokumentů. Technika "dvojité kontroly" obrátí páry entit v klasifikaci, posiluje odvolání kladných případů a snižuje nesprávné klasifikace mezi opačnými třídami. Efektivní algoritmus prořezávání řeší konflikty globálně. Naše navržená technika, která byla hodnocena na QA-TempEvalu (SemEvalu2015 Task 5), výrazně překonává nejmodernější metody. Dále provádíme vnitřní hodnocení a post-state-of-the-art výsledky na Timebank-Dense.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem utilitzar un conjunt de models simples i uniformes en arquitectura basats en LSTM per recuperar diferents tipus de relacions temporals del text. Utilitzant el camí de dependencia més curt entre entitats com entrada, la mateixa arquitectura s'utilitza per extraure relacions entre frases, frases cruzades i temps de creació de documents. Una tècnica de duble verificació inverteix parells d'entitats en la classificació, augmentant el recuperació de casos positius i reduint les malclassificacions entre classes oposes. Un algoritme eficient de pruning resol conflictes globalment. Evaluat en QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), la nostra tècnica proposada supera els mètodes més avançats en gran marge. També fem una evaluació intrínseca i resultats posteriors a Timebank-Dense.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme yksinkertaisten, yhtenäisten arkkitehtuurimallien käyttämistä erilaisten aikasuhteiden palauttamiseksi tekstistä. Kun syötteenä käytetään entiteettien välistä lyhintä riippuvuusreittiä, samaa arkkitehtuuria käytetään purkamaan lauseen sisäisiä, ristilauseen ja dokumentin luonti-aikasuhteita. Kaksinkertaisen tarkastuksen tekniikka kääntää yksikköpareja luokittelussa, parantaa positiivisten tapausten takaisinkutsua ja vähentää vääriä luokitteluja eri luokkien välillä. Tehokas karsimisalgoritmi ratkaisee ristiriidat maailmanlaajuisesti. QA-TempEval-menetelmällä (SemEval2015 Task 5) arvioitu ehdotettu tekniikkamme ylittää huipputason menetelmät suurella marginaalilla. Teemme myös sisäistä arviointia ja julkaisemme uusimmat tulokset Timebank-Dense -palvelussa.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da iskoristimo set jednostavnih, uniformnih modela na arhitekturi LSTM kako bi se oporavili različite vrste vremenskih odnosa sa teksta. Koristeći najkraći put zavisnosti između entitata kao ulaz, isti arhitektura se koristi za izvlačenje unutrašnje rečenice, krstorečenice i odnosa o vremenu stvaranja dokumenta. Tehnika "dvostruko provjeravanje" obraća pare entiteta u klasifikaciji, povećava sećanje pozitivnih slučajeva i smanjenje pogrešnih klasifikacija između suprotnih klasa. Efikasan algoritam brisanja rješava sukobe globalno. Procjenjivano na QA-TempEval (zadatak 5. semiEval2015), naša predložena tehnika iznosi metode države umjetnosti velikom marginom. Također provodimo unutrašnju procjenu i nakon stanja umjetnosti rezultate Timebank-Dense.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa mu yi amfani da wasu misãlai masu sauƙi, mai uniform a cikin matsayin na LTRM dõmin ya canza wasu irin mutane na lokaci daga matsayin. Yi amfani da hanyar da ke ƙaranci da ƙayyade tsakanin abun da aka shigar da shi kamar shirin ayuka, ana yi amfani da shi ga fitar da nau'in-dictionary, tsohon-ɗabi'a, da kuma tsarin lokaci na halitta. Kinikin 'checking' na mayar da nau'i biyu cikin shirin daraja, yana ƙara tunãnin sakan masu raɗaɗi kuma yana ƙara fasafa masu motsi. Wata algoritm mai da inganci ke solve conflict a global. Ana ƙayyade kan QA-Tempevaal (Semevaal2015 Tasksi 5), kananmu na buƙata technical outperforms state-of-the-art metodes by a huge margin. Kayya, Munã samun ƙidãya mai guda da matsalar-sanan da aka samu a kan Timebank-Dense.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predlagamo uporabo nabora preprostih, enotnih v arhitekturi LSTM osnovanih modelov za obnovitev različnih vrst časovnih relacij iz besedila. Z uporabo najkrajše poti odvisnosti med entitetami kot vnosom se ista arhitektura uporablja za ekstrakcijo časovnih odnosov znotraj stavka, navzkrižnega stavka in ustvarjanja dokumenta. Tehnika "dvojnega preverjanja" obrne pare subjektov pri razvrščanju, povečuje odpoklic pozitivnih primerov in zmanjšuje napačne razvrstitve med nasprotnimi razredi. Učinkovit algoritem obrezovanja rešuje spore globalno. Ocenjena na podlagi QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), naša predlagana tehnika za veliko maržo presega najsodobnejše metode. Prav tako izvajamo notranjo vrednotenje in objavljamo najsodobnejše rezultate na Timebank-Dense.', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འདིའི་སྔོན་པོ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་རོགས་སྔོན་པ། སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག དབྱིབས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ནང་འདྲེན་པ་དང་ཐུག་མའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་ལམ་ལུགས 'double-checking' ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བྱེད། དམིགས་འབྲེལ་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཀྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5)ནང་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་བྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་འཆར་བཀོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཆུ་ཚོད་ཁག་ལ་བགོ་སྤྱད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལས་ཀྱང་ཕལ་ཆེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།", 'jv': "Nang mapun iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem sing sampeyan sampeyan karo akeh lan sampeyan ing model sing basa gambar n'al LTT M kanggo nambah akeh operasi sing sampeyan sampeyan suk teks. Ngawe ngubah akeh shorter Global Algorithm Escalator Awak dhéwé éntuk sing beraksikno karo hal-teka sing perusahaan dengan ngulinakake sistêm lan neng timebang-Dense.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להשתמש בסט של מדים פשוטים בארכיטקטורה מודלים מבוססים LSTM כדי לחזור סוגים שונים של יחסים זמניים מהטקסט. בשימוש בדרך התלויה הקצרה ביותר בין היחידות כתוצאה, אותה ארכיטקטורה משתמשת כדי לחלץ יחסי זמן בין המשפט, המשפט הצלב, וליצור מסמכים. טכניקה של "בדיקה כפולה" מעבירה זוגות יחידות בסיווג, מגבירה את הזיכרון של מקרים חיוביים ומפחית הסיווגים הלא נכונים בין שיעורים שונים. אלגוריתם פיצוץ יעיל פותר קונפליקטים גלובלי. בהערכה על QA-TempEval (SemEval2015 Task 5), הטכניקה המוצעת שלנו עולה על שיטות חדשות במידה גדולה. אנחנו גם מבצעים עריכה פנימית ותוצאות מתקדמות על Timebank-Dense.'}
{'en': 'Ranking Kernels for Structures and Embeddings : A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model', 'ar': 'حبات الترتيب للهياكل والزخارف: نموذج تفضيل وتصنيف مختلط', 'es': 'Clasificación de núcleos para estructuras e incrustaciones: un modelo híbrido de preferencias y clasificación', 'pt': 'Ranking de Kernels para Estruturas e Incorporações: Um Modelo Híbrido de Preferência e Classificação', 'fr': 'Classement des noyaux pour les structures et les intégrations\xa0: un modèle hybride de préférence et de classification', 'ja': '構造と埋め込みのためのランキングカーネル：ハイブリッドの好みと分類モデル', 'zh': '结构与嵌序内核:偏好与分形', 'hi': 'संरचनाओं और एम्बेडिंग के लिए रैंकिंग कर्नेल: एक हाइब्रिड वरीयता और वर्गीकरण मॉडल', 'ru': 'Ранжирование ядер по структурам и закладным изделиям: гибридная модель предпочтения и классификации', 'ga': 'Eithne Rangaithe do Struchtúir agus Leabaithe: Samhail Tosaíochta Hibrideach agus Aicmithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Πυρήνες κατάταξης για δομές και ενσωμάτωση: Ένα υβριδικό μοντέλο προτίμησης και ταξινόμησης', 'hu': 'Szerkezetek és beágyazások rangsorolása: Hibrid preferencia és osztályozási modell', 'kk': 'Құрылымдар және ендіру үшін түзету деректері: гибрид параметрлері және классификациялау үлгісі', 'it': 'Ranking Kernel per strutture e incorporazioni: un modello ibrido di preferenza e classificazione', 'lt': 'Struktūrų ir įrenginių klasifikavimo branduoliai: hibridinis preferencijos ir klasifikavimo modelis', 'mk': 'Рајтинг на јадрата за структури и вградувања: Хибриден модел на преференција и класификација', 'ms': 'Ranking Kernels for Structures and Embeddings: A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model', 'mt': 'Kernels tal-klassifikazzjoni għall-istrutturi u l-inkorporazzjonijiet: Mudell ta’ Preferenza u Klassifikazzjoni Ibridi', 'ml': 'സ്ട്രാക്ട്രെക്റ്ററുകള്\u200dക്കും എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200dക്കും കെര്\u200dണലുകള്\u200d റാങ്ങിംഗ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mn': 'Структурууд, интернеттүүдийн эргүүлэлт: Хибридын тааламж, Классификацийн загвар', 'no': 'Ranking kjerner for struktur og innbygging: Eit hybridpreferensjon og klassifikasjonsmodul', 'pl': 'Jądra rankingowe dla struktur i osadzeń: hybrydowy model preferencji i klasyfikacji', 'ro': 'Nucleuri de clasificare pentru structuri și încorporări: un model de preferință și clasificare hibridă', 'sr': 'Ranking Kernels za strukture i integracije: Hibridne preferencije i klasifikacijski model', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Kernels: A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model', 'sv': 'Rankningskärnor för strukturer och inbäddningar: En hybridpferens- och klassificeringsmodell', 'ta': 'அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் உட்பொதிகளுக்கான கெர்னல்கள் வரிசை', 'ur': 'ساختاروں اور ایمبڈینگ کے لئے رنگ کرنل: ایک ہیبراڈ Preference اور کلاسیفی موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhân viên phân phối các cấu trúc và nền chứa: Kiểu ứng phó tráo đổi và mô phỏng', 'bg': 'Класиране на ядра за конструкции и вграждания: хибриден модел за предпочитания и класификация', 'hr': 'Ranking Kernels za strukture i uključenje: Hibridna preferencija i model klasifikacije', 'nl': 'Rankingkernels voor structuren en embeddings: een hybride preference- en classificatiemodel', 'da': 'Ranking Kerner for strukturer og indlejringer: En hybridpræference- og klassificeringsmodel', 'id': 'Ranking Kernel for Structures and Embeddings: A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model', 'de': 'Ranking Kernels für Strukturen und Einbettungen: Ein hybrides Präferenz- und Klassifizierungsmodell', 'ko': '구조와 삽입된 정렬 핵: 혼합 선호와 분류 모델', 'fa': 'رنگ کرنل برای ساختارها و انجمن: یک مدل پیشنهاد هیبرید و کلاس\u200cشناسی', 'tr': 'structural and Emblems için Ranking Kerneler: A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model', 'sw': 'Kernels kwa ajili ya Miundombinu na Mazingira: Utawala wa Biblia na Utawala', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Korniza e bërthamave për strukturat dhe përfshirjet: Një model preferimi dhe klasifikimi hibridë', 'am': 'Ranking Kernels for Structures and Embeddings: A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model', 'hy': 'Հիբրիդային նախընտրությունների և դասակարգման մոդել', 'az': 'Structures and Embeddings üçün rəngli Kernelər: Hybrid Preferences and Classification Model', 'bn': 'কাঠামো এবং বিদ্যমানের জন্য র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং কের্নেলস: হাইব্রিডের পছন্দ এবং ক্লাসিশন মডেল', 'bs': 'Ranking Kernels za strukture i integracije: Hibridna preferencija i model klasifikacije', 'ca': 'Nàcles de classificació per estructures i incorporacions: Un model de preferència i classificació híbrids', 'cs': 'Hodnocení jádra pro struktury a vložení: hybridní preferenční a klasifikační model', 'et': 'Konstruktsioonide ja manuste järjestuse tuumad: hübriidne eelistus- ja klassifitseerimismudel', 'fi': 'Rakenteiden ja upotusten sijoitusytimet: hybridi-oletus- ja luokitusmalli', 'jv': 'Kernels karo structural karo Bubungu:', 'he': 'גרעיני מעמד עבור מבנים וקליפצים: מודל העדיפות והקליфікаציה היברידית', 'sk': 'Razvrstitvena jedra za konstrukcije in vgradnje: hibridni model prednosti in klasifikacije', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Ranking Kernels for Structures and Embeddings: A Hybrid Preference and Classification Model'}
{'en': 'Recent work has shown that Tree Kernels (TKs) and Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) obtain the state of the art in answer sentence reranking. Additionally, their combination used in Support Vector Machines (SVMs) is promising as it can exploit both the syntactic patterns captured by TKs and the embeddings learned by CNNs. However, the embeddings are constructed according to a classification function, which is not directly exploitable in the preference ranking algorithm of SVMs. In this work, we propose a new hybrid approach combining preference ranking applied to TKs and pointwise ranking applied to CNNs. We show that our approach produces better results on two well-known and rather different datasets : WikiQA for answer sentence selection and SemEval cQA for comment selection in Community Question Answering.', 'ar': 'أظهر العمل الأخير أن Tree Kernels (TKs) والشبكات العصبية التلافيفية (CNNs) تحصل على أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في إعادة ترتيب الجملة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن توليفتها المستخدمة في Support Vector Machines (SVMs) واعدة لأنها يمكن أن تستغل كل من الأنماط النحوية التي تم التقاطها بواسطة TKs وحفلات الزفاف التي تعلمتها CNNs. ومع ذلك ، يتم إنشاء الزخارف وفقًا لوظيفة التصنيف ، والتي لا يمكن استغلالها بشكل مباشر في خوارزمية ترتيب التفضيلات الخاصة بـ SVMs. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نهجًا هجينًا جديدًا يجمع بين ترتيب التفضيل المطبق على المعارف التقليدية والترتيب النقطي المطبق على شبكات CNN. نظهر أن نهجنا ينتج نتائج أفضل على مجموعتي بيانات مشهورتين ومختلفتين نوعًا ما: WikiQA لاختيار جملة الإجابة و SemEval cQA لاختيار التعليقات في المجتمع سؤال الإجابة.', 'pt': 'Trabalhos recentes mostraram que Tree Kernels (TKs) e Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) obtêm o estado da arte em reclassificação de sentenças de resposta. Além disso, sua combinação usada em Support Vector Machines (SVMs) é promissora, pois pode explorar tanto os padrões sintáticos capturados por TKs quanto os embeddings aprendidos por CNNs. No entanto, os embeddings são construídos de acordo com uma função de classificação, que não é diretamente explorável no algoritmo de classificação de preferência dos SVMs. Neste trabalho, propomos uma nova abordagem híbrida combinando classificação de preferência aplicada a TKs e classificação pontual aplicada a CNNs. Mostramos que nossa abordagem produz melhores resultados em dois conjuntos de dados bem conhecidos e bastante diferentes: WikiQA para seleção de sentenças de resposta e SemEval cQA para seleção de comentários no Community Question Answering.', 'es': 'Un trabajo reciente ha demostrado que Tree Kernels (TKs) y las redes neuronales convolucionales (CNN) obtienen el estado del arte en la reorganización de frases de respuesta. Además, su combinación utilizada en máquinas de vectores de soporte (SVM) es prometedora, ya que puede explotar tanto los patrones sintácticos capturados por los TKs como las incrustaciones aprendidas por las CNN. Sin embargo, las incrustaciones se construyen de acuerdo con una función de clasificación, que no es directamente explotable en el algoritmo de clasificación de preferencias de las SVM. En este trabajo, proponemos un nuevo enfoque híbrido que combina la clasificación de preferencias aplicada a los TKs y la clasificación puntual aplicada a las CNN. Demostramos que nuestro enfoque produce mejores resultados en dos conjuntos de datos bien conocidos y bastante diferentes: WikiQA para la selección de oraciones de respuesta y SemEval CQa para la selección de comentarios en la respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad.', 'fr': "Des travaux récents ont montré que les noyaux d'arbres (TKs) et les réseaux de neurones convolutifs (CNN) sont à la pointe de la technologie en matière de reclassement des phrases de réponse. De plus, leur combinaison utilisée dans les machines à vecteurs de support (SVM) est prometteuse car elle peut exploiter à la fois les modèles syntaxiques capturés par les TK et les intégrations apprises par les CNN. Cependant, les intégrations sont construites selon une fonction de classification, qui n'est pas directement exploitable dans l'algorithme de classement des préférences des SVM. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle approche hybride combinant le classement des préférences appliqué aux CT et le classement ponctuel appliqué aux CNN. Nous montrons que notre approche produit de meilleurs résultats sur deux ensembles de données bien connus et assez différents\xa0: WikiQA pour la sélection des phrases de réponse et SemEval CQA pour la sélection des commentaires dans Community Question Answering.", 'ja': '最近の研究では、ツリーカーネル（ ＴＫ ）及び畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ ＣＮＮ ）は、答え文の再ランキングで最先端を取得することが示されている。さらに、Support Vector Machines （ SVM ）で使用されるそれらの組み合わせは、TKによってキャプチャされた構文パターンとCNNによって学習された埋め込みの両方を利用できるため、有望です。しかしながら、埋め込みは分類関数に従って構築され、SVMのプリファレンスランキングアルゴリズムでは直接利用できない。本研究では、TKに適用されるプリファレンスランキングとCNNに適用されるポイントワイズランキングを組み合わせた新しいハイブリッドアプローチを提案する。私たちのアプローチは、回答文選択のためのWikiQAとコミュニティ質問回答のコメント選択のためのSemEval cQAの2つの既知でかなり異なるデータセットでより良い結果を生み出すことを示しています。', 'hi': 'हाल के काम से पता चला है कि ट्री कर्नेल (टीके) और कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (CNN) उत्तर वाक्य reranking में कला की स्थिति प्राप्त करते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, समर्थन वेक्टर मशीनों (एसवीएम) में उपयोग किया जाने वाला उनका संयोजन आशाजनक है क्योंकि यह टीके द्वारा कैप्चर किए गए वाक्यात्मक पैटर्न और सीएनएन द्वारा सीखे गए एम्बेडिंग दोनों का शोषण कर सकता है। हालांकि, एम्बेडिंग का निर्माण एक वर्गीकरण फ़ंक्शन के अनुसार किया जाता है, जो एसवीएम के वरीयता रैंकिंग एल्गोरिथ्म में सीधे शोषण योग्य नहीं है। इस काम में, हम एक नया हाइब्रिड दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो टीके पर लागू वरीयता रैंकिंग और सीएनएन पर लागू पॉइंटवाइज रैंकिंग के संयोजन का प्रस्ताव करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण दो प्रसिद्ध और बल्कि अलग-अलग डेटासेट पर बेहतर परिणाम उत्पन्न करता है: उत्तर वाक्य चयन के लिए विकिक्यूए और सामुदायिक प्रश्न उत्तर में टिप्पणी चयन के लिए सेमेवल सीक्यूए।', 'zh': '近之研明,树核(TKs)卷积神经网络(CNN)对句重名,得先进之术。 此外支向量机(SVM)中用者甚有前途,以其可以TK获语法式、CNN学嵌入也。 然嵌以类函数构,函数于SVM偏好排算法不得直用。 此一新混合之法,将施于TK之偏好,合于CNN之逐点。 吾法于两众所周知而异数集上生善终:WikiQA以对句择之,SemEval cQA以社区问答之论择之。', 'ru': 'Недавние работы показали, что ядра деревьев (TK) и сверточные нейронные сети (CNN) получают современный уровень в перестановке предложений ответов. Кроме того, их комбинация, используемая в опорных векторных машинах (SVM), является многообещающей, поскольку она может использовать как синтаксические шаблоны, захваченные TK, так и вложения, изученные CNN. Однако вложения строятся по классификационной функции, которая не является непосредственно эксплуатируемой в алгоритме ранжирования предпочтений виртуальных машин защиты. В этой работе мы предлагаем новый гибридный подход, объединяющий преференциальный рейтинг, применяемый к ТЗ, и точечный рейтинг, применяемый к CNN. Мы показываем, что наш подход дает лучшие результаты на двух хорошо известных и довольно разных наборах данных: WikiQA для выбора предложения ответа и SemEval cQA для выбора комментария в ответе на вопрос сообщества.', 'ga': "Tá sé léirithe ag obair le déanaí go bhfaigheann Eithne Crann (TKanna) agus Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite (CNNanna) an úrscothacht in athrangú abairtí freagraí. Ina theannta sin, tá an teaglaim a úsáidtear i Meaisíní Veicteoir Tacaíochta (SVManna) geallta mar is féidir leis leas a bhaint as na patrúin chomhréire arna ngabháil ag TKanna agus na leabaithe a d'fhoghlaim CNNanna. Mar sin féin, déantar na leabaithe de réir feidhm aicmithe, nach féidir a shaothrú go díreach in algartam rangú tosaíochta SVManna. San obair seo, molaimid cur chuige hibrideach nua a chomhcheanglaíonn rangú tosaíochta a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar TKanna agus rangú de réir a chéile a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar CNNanna. Léirímid go n-éiríonn lenár gcur chuige torthaí níos fearr ar dhá thacar sonraí atá ar eolas go maith agus atá éagsúil go leor: WikiQA le haghaidh roghnú abairtí freagraí agus SemEval cQA le haghaidh roghnú tuairimí i bhFreagar Ceisteanna an Chomhphobail.", 'ka': 'ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო დააჩვენება, რომ სახელის კერნელი (TKs) და კონვალუციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNNs) მიღებენ ხელის სტაციის სტაციას გადა დამატებით, მათი კომბიზაცია, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოიყენება "Support Vector Machines" (SVMs)-ში, როგორც შეიძლება გამოიყენება სინტაქტიური შაბლონები, რომლებიც TKs-ის და CNN-ის დასწავლილი შე მაგრამ, კლასიფიკაციის ფუნქციის შესახებ, რომელიც პრეფიკაციის ალგორიტიმში არ ექსპლექტიურად გამოყენებელია. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ახალი ჰიბრიდის მიღება, რომლებიც პრეფინციების რენგიზაციას TKs-ში და CNN-ზე გამოყენებულია. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა უკეთესი შემდეგ გამოცნობა ორი უკეთესი და უფრო განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ: WikiQA მონიშნობისთვის და SemEval cQA მონიშნობისთვის კომე', 'hu': 'A közelmúltbeli munkák kimutatták, hogy a famag (TK) és a konvolúciós neurális hálózatok (CNN) a legkorszerűbb választ kapják meg a válaszmondatok átrendezésében. Ezenkívül a Support Vector Machines (SVM) kombinációja ígéretes, mivel mind a TK-k által rögzített szintaktikus mintákat, mind a CNN-k által tanult beágyazásokat kihasználhatja. A beágyazások azonban olyan osztályozási függvény alapján készülnek, amely nem használható közvetlenül az SVM preferencia rangsorolási algoritmusában. Ebben a munkában egy új hibrid megközelítést javasolunk, amely ötvözi a TK-kre alkalmazott preferencia rangsorolást és a CNN-kre alkalmazott pontos rangsorolást. Megmutatjuk, hogy megközelítésünk jobb eredményeket eredményez két jól ismert és meglehetősen különböző adatkészleten: WikiQA a válaszmondatok kiválasztására és SemEval cQA a megjegyzések kiválasztására a Közösségi Kérdések Válaszolása során.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εργασίες έχουν δείξει ότι οι Πυρήνες Δέντρου (ΤΚs) και τα Νευρικά Δίκτυα Σύλληψης (ΚΝs) αποκτούν την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στην επανακατάταξη προτάσεων απάντησης. Επιπλέον, ο συνδυασμός τους που χρησιμοποιείται στις μηχανές υποστήριξης είναι ελπιδοφόρος καθώς μπορεί να εκμεταλλευτεί τόσο τα συντακτικά μοτίβα που καταγράφονται από τα TK όσο και τις ενσωμάτωσεις που μαθαίνονται από τα CNN. Ωστόσο, οι ενσωματώσεις κατασκευάζονται σύμφωνα με μια συνάρτηση ταξινόμησης, η οποία δεν είναι άμεσα εκμεταλλεύσιμη στον αλγόριθμο ταξινόμησης προτιμήσεων των SVM. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα υβριδική προσέγγιση που συνδυάζει την κατάταξη προτιμήσεων που εφαρμόζεται σε ΤΚ και την σημειακή κατάταξη που εφαρμόζεται σε ΤΝ. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας παράγει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα σε δύο γνωστά και μάλλον διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων: WikiQA για την επιλογή προτάσεων απάντησης και SemEval cQA για την επιλογή σχολίων στην Απάντηση σε κοινοτικές ερωτήσεις.', 'it': "Recenti lavori hanno dimostrato che Tree Kernels (TK) e Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) ottengono lo stato dell'arte in risposta frase ri-ranking. Inoltre, la loro combinazione utilizzata in Support Vector Machines (SVM) è promettente in quanto può sfruttare sia i modelli sintattici catturati dai TK che gli incorporamenti appresi dalle CNN. Tuttavia, le incorporazioni sono costruite secondo una funzione di classificazione, che non è direttamente sfruttabile nell'algoritmo di classificazione delle preferenze degli SVM. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo approccio ibrido che combina il ranking delle preferenze applicato ai TK e il ranking puntuale applicato alle CNN. Mostriamo che il nostro approccio produce risultati migliori su due set di dati ben noti e piuttosto diversi: WikiQA per la selezione delle frasi di risposta e SemEval cQA per la selezione dei commenti nella risposta alle domande della comunità.", 'mk': 'Неодамнешната работа покажа дека дрвените јадра (ТК) и конволуционалните неурални мрежи (ЦНН) ја добиваат најсовршената технологија во повторното враќање на речениците. Покрај тоа, нивната комбинација која се користи во поддршка на векторните машини (СВМ) е ветувачка, бидејќи може да ги искористи и синтактичките шеми зафатени од ТК и вградувањата научени од ЦНН. Сепак, вградувањата се изградени според класификациска функција, која не е директно искористувачка во алгоритмот за рангирање на преференциите на SVMs. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нов хибриден пристап кој ги комбинира преферентните рангирања применети на ТК и точниот рангирање применети на ЦНН. Ние покажуваме дека нашиот пристап произведува подобри резултати на двата познати и доста различни податоци: WikiQA за избор на реченици и SemEval cQA за избор на коментари во одговорите на прашањата на заедницата.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы жұмыс Бұтақ көшелері (TKs) және Қосымшалық Невралдық желілер (CNNs) жауап сұраныстың күйін қайталау үшін алады. Қосымша, олардың "Support Vector Machines" (SVMs) комбинациясы қолданылатын синтактикалық үлгілерін жұмыс істеуге болады, себебі оның ТК және CNN бағытталған ендіру үлгілерін жұмыс істеуге болады. Бірақ, ендіру құрылады, SVMs диаграммасының алгоритміне тәртіпке қолдануға болмайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз жаңа гибридтік тәсілі, ТК және КН жүйесіне қолданылатын таңдау жолдарын біріктіруге жұмыс істейміз. Біз өзіміздің тәсіліміміз екі жақсы белгілі және әртүрлі деректер жиынында жақсы нәтижелерді жасайтын дегенді көрсетедік: WikiQA жауап сөйлемесін таңдау үшін және SemEval cQA жауап', 'lt': 'Neseniai atliktas darbas parodė, kad medžio branduoliai (TK) ir konvoliuciniai neurologiniai tinklai (CNN) įgyja naujausią pažangą atsakymo sakinio perskaičiavimo srityje. Be to, jų derinys, naudojamas paramos vektorinėse mašinose (SVM), yra žadantis, nes jis gali panaudoti tiek TK gautus sintaksinius modelius, tiek CNN įdėjimus. Tačiau įterpiamieji elementai konstruojami pagal klasifikavimo funkciją, kuri nėra tiesiogiai naudojama SVM pirmenybės nustatymo algoritme. Šiame darbe siūlome naują hibridinį metodą, derinantį pirmenybės klasifikavimą, taikomą TK ir tikslinį klasifikavimą, taikomą CNN. Mes rodome, kad mūsų požiūris duoda geresnių rezultatų dviejuose gerai žinomuose ir gana skirtinguose duomenų rinkiniuose: WikiQA atsakymų sakinių atrankos ir SemEval cQA atsakymų į Bendrijos klausimus atrankos.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് വാക്കിന്റെ വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടും വരുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ കെര്\u200dണലുകളും കോണ്\u200dവോള്\u200dഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ കൂടാതെ, അവരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d മെഷിനുകളില്\u200d (SVMs) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വാഗ്ദാനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ടിക്കികള്\u200d പിടിക്കുന്ന സ എന്നാലും എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d പ്രകാരം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്ക ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഹൈബ്രിഡിന്റെ മുന്\u200dഗണനത്തെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് ടിക്കികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരവാക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കു', 'ms': 'Kerja baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa Kernel Pohon (TKs) dan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNNs) mendapat kemajuan semasa menjawab kalimat semula. Lagipun, kombinasi mereka digunakan dalam Mesin Vektor Sokongan (SVMs) adalah berjanji kerana ia boleh mengeksploitasi kedua-dua corak sintaktik yang ditangkap oleh TK dan penyembedding yang belajar oleh CNN. Namun, penyembedding dibina mengikut fungsi klasifikasi, yang tidak boleh dieksploitasi secara langsung dalam algoritma pengukuran keutamaan SVMs. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan hibrid baru yang menggabungkan peringkat keutamaan yang dilaksanakan pada TK dan peringkat arah yang dilaksanakan pada CNN. Kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami menghasilkan keputusan yang lebih baik pada dua set data yang terkenal dan agak berbeza: WikiQA untuk pemilihan kalimat jawapan dan SemEval cQA untuk pemilihan komentar dalam Jawapan soalan Komuniti.', 'mn': 'Саяхан ажиллах нь Tree Kernels (TKs) болон Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) нь хариултын өгүүлбэрт урлагийн байдал авдаг гэдгийг харуулсан. Мөн тэдний "Support Vector Machines" (SVMs)-д ашиглаж байгаа нэгтгэл нь TKs болон CNNs-ээр сурсан синтактик загваруудыг ашиглаж чадна. Гэхдээ үүнийг ангилалын функцийн хувьд бий болгосон. Энэ нь SVMs-ийн ангилалын алгоритмын хувьд шууд ашиглах боломжгүй. Энэ ажил дээр бид TK-д хэрэглэгдсэн, CNN-д хэрэглэгдсэн сонирхолтой цэгийг нэгтгэх шинэ гибрид аргыг санал болгож байна. Бид харуулж байгаагаар бидний арга барилга нь хоёр сайн мэддэг, эсвэл өөр өөр өгөгдлийн санд илүү сайн үр дүнг бий болгодог. WikiQA нь хариултын өгөгдлийн сонголтын тулд, SemEval cQA нь Нийгмийн асуулт хариултын сонголтын', 'mt': 'Recent work has shown that Tree Kernels (TKs) and Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) obtain the state of the art in answer sentence reranking.  Barra minn hekk, il-kombinazzjoni tagħhom użata fil-Magni tal-Vetturi ta’ Appoġġ (SVMs) hija promettenti peress li tista’ tisfrutta kemm ix-xejriet sintetiċi maqbuda mit-TKs kif ukoll l-inkorporazzjonijiet imgħallma mis-CNNs. Madankollu, l-inkorporazzjonijiet huma mibnija skont funzjoni ta’ klassifikazzjoni, li ma tistax tiġi sfruttata direttament fl-algoritmu tal-klassifikazzjoni preferenzjali tal-SVMs. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu approċċ ibridu ġdid li jikkombina l-klassifikazzjoni preferenzjali applikata għat-TKs u l-klassifikazzjoni puntwali applikata għas-CNNs. Aħna nuru li l-approċċ tagħna jipproduċi riżultati aħjar fuq żewġ settijiet tad-dejta magħrufa sew u pjuttost differenti: WikiQA għall-għażla tas-sentenza tat-tweġiba u SemEval cQA għall-għażla tal-kummenti fit-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet tal-Komunità.', 'no': 'Nyleg har arbeidet vist at trekjerner (TKs) og konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk (CNNs) får tilstanden til kunsten i svarsetninga på nytt. Dei kombinasjonane som er brukt i støtte vektormaskiner (SVMs) er såleis som det kan bruka både syntaktiske mønsterene som er henta av TK og innbygginga som er lært av CNN. Innebyggane er imidlertid konstruert etter ein klassifikasjonsfunksjon, som ikkje er direkte brukbart i innstillingane for rangeringsalgoritmen av SVMs. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein ny hybridtilnærming med kombinasjon av preferensrankingar som vert brukt til TK og retningar som vert brukt til CNN. Vi viser at tilnærminga vårt produserer bedre resultat på to godt kjent og ganske ulike datasett: WikiQA for utval av svarsetningar og semiEval cQA for utval av kommentarar i svar på spørsmålet i fellesskapet.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie prace wykazały, że jądra drzew (TK) i sieci neuronowe (CNN) uzyskują najnowszy stan techniki w zakresie przestawiania zdań odpowiedzi. Dodatkowo ich kombinacja stosowana w maszynach wektorowych wsparcia (SVM) jest obiecująca, ponieważ może wykorzystać zarówno wzorce składni uchwycone przez TK, jak i osadzenia nauczone przez CNN. Jednak osadzenia są skonstruowane według funkcji klasyfikacji, która nie jest bezpośrednio wykorzystywana w algorytmie rankingu preferencji SVM. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowe podejście hybrydowe łączące ranking preferencji stosowany w TK i punktowy ranking stosowany w CNN. Pokazujemy, że nasze podejście daje lepsze wyniki na dwóch dobrze znanych i raczej różnych zbiorach danych: WikiQA do wyboru zdań odpowiedzi i SemEval cQA do wyboru komentarzy w Community Question Respwering.', 'ro': 'Lucrările recente au arătat că nucleele arborelor (TK) și rețelele neuronale convoluționale (CNN) obțin stadiul tehnologiei în rețeaua răspunsurilor. În plus, combinația lor utilizată în Suport Vector Machines (SVM) este promițătoare, deoarece poate exploata atât modelele sintactice capturate de TK, cât și încorporările învățate de CNN. Cu toate acestea, încorporările sunt construite conform unei funcții de clasificare, care nu este exploatabilă direct în algoritmul de clasificare a preferințelor SVM. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă abordare hibridă care combină clasificarea preferințelor aplicată TK-urilor și clasificarea punctuală aplicată CNN-urilor. Noi arătăm că abordarea noastră produce rezultate mai bune pe două seturi de date bine cunoscute și destul de diferite: WikiQA pentru selectarea propozițiilor de răspuns și SemEval cQA pentru selectarea comentariilor în Răspunsul la întrebări comunitare.', 'si': 'අලුත් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ ක්\u200dරීස් කර්නල් (TKs) සහ සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයුරාල ජාලය (CNNs) වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතික්\u200d ඒවගේම, ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් මැචින්ස් වලට භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා, ඒකෙන් TKs වලින් අල්ලගත්ත සංකේතික පෙන්වන්න පුළ නමුත්, සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණ වැඩසටහන් සඳහා ස්ථාපනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒක SVMs ගේ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වල ප්\u200dරයෝ මේ වැඩේ අපි අලුත් හයිබ්\u200dරිඩ් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, TK වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ CNN වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න හා වෙනස් දත්ත', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda arbeten har visat att trädkärnor (TK) och konvulutionella neurala nätverk (CNN) erhåller den senaste tekniken vid omräkning av svarsfrågor. Dessutom är deras kombination som används i Support Vector Machines (SVM) lovande eftersom den kan utnyttja både de syntaktiska mönster som fångats av TK och de inbäddningar som lärts av CNN. Inbäddningarna är dock konstruerade enligt en klassificeringsfunktion, som inte direkt kan utnyttjas i preferensrankningsalgoritmen för SVM. I detta arbete föreslår vi en ny hybrid metod som kombinerar preferensrankning tillämpad på TK och punktvis ranking tillämpad på CNN. Vi visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt ger bättre resultat på två välkända och ganska olika datauppsättningar: WikiQA för val av svarsfrågor och SemEval cQA för urval av kommentarer i Community Questions Answering.', 'sr': 'Skorašnji rad pokazuje da drveće kernele (TKs) i konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNNs) dobijaju stanje umjetnosti u preokretanju odgovorne rečenice. Osim toga, njihova kombinacija koja se koristi u podršku vektorskih mašina (SVMs) obećava jer može iskoristiti i sintaktičke obrasce koje su uhvatile TKs i ugrađenje koje su naučili CNN. Međutim, ugrađenje se konstruuje u skladu sa klasifikacijskom funkcijom, koja nije direktno iskoristljiva u preferenciji algoritma za ranking SVMs-a. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi hibridni pristup kojim se kombinira preferencijska ranking primjenjena na TKs i uputski pozitivni ranking primjenjena na CNN. Pokazujemo da naš pristup proizvodi bolji rezultat na dve poznate i prilično različite datasete: WikiQA za izbor odgovornih rečenica i SemEval cQA za izbor komentara u odgovoru na pitanje zajednice.', 'ur': 'اچھا کام دکھایا گیا ہے کہ درخت کرنل (TKs) اور کانرول نیورال نیٹورک (CNNs) کو جواب دینے کے لئے جواب دینے کے لئے آهنت کی حالت حاصل کرتے ہیں. اور اضافہ، ان کی ترکیب کے ساتھ ویکتور ماشینوں (SVMs) میں استعمال کی جاتی ہے، کیونکہ وہ TK کے ذریعے پکڑے ہوئے سینٹکتیک پٹرنے اور CNN کے ذریعے سینڈینگ کا استعمال کر سکتا ہے. However, embeddings are constructed according to a classification function, which is not directly usable in the preferences ranking algorithm of SVMs. اس کام میں ہم نے ایک نو ہیبریڈ طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جس میں ترجیح کا رنگ ٹی کیس کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے اور اس کے ذریعہ ذریعہ سے CNN کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ دو خوب جانے اور بہت مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر بہتر نتیجے پیدا کرتا ہے: ویکیکیکیا، جواب فیصلہ انتخاب کرنے کے لئے اور سیمیولی cQA، کمونٹی سوال جواب کرنے کے لئے کمونٹی انتخاب کرنے کے لئے۔', 'so': "Shaqo la soo dhowaaday waxay muuqatay in geed Kernels (TKs) iyo shabakadda neurada ee qasabka ah (CNNs) ay helaan xaaladda farshaxanka si loo jawaabo u soo celiyo. Sidoo kale waxaa ballan u ah in la isticmaalo qalabka kaalmada Vector (SVMs) ay u baahan karto labada qaab oo TKs qabsaday iyo meelaha lagu barto CNNs. However, the embeddings are constructed according to a classification function, which is not directly exploitable in the preference ranking algorithm of SVMs.  In this work, we propose a new hybrid approach combining preference ranking applied to TKs and pointwise ranking applied to CNNs.  Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu uu soo saaraa resultooyin ka wanaagsan labada sawir oo kala duduwan: WikiQA si loo doorto doorashada go'aanka iyo SemEval cQA si loo doorto doorashada jawaabta su'aalaha jamiimka.", 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் உள்ள வாக்கியத்திற்கு மீண்டும் வரிசையில் உள்ள கலைத்தின் நிலையை காட்டுகிறது. கூடுதலாக, அவர்களுடைய தொகுப்பு வெக்டார் இயந்திரங்களில் (SVMs) பயன்படுத்தப்படும் தொகுதி However, embeddings are constructed according to a classification function, which is not directly used in the preference ranking algorithm of SVMs. of the preference. In this work, we propose a new hybrid approach combining preference ranking applied to TKs and pointwise ranking applied to CNNs.  எங்கள் நெருங்குதல் இரண்டு நன்றாக அறியப்பட்ட மற்றும் வேறு வித்தியாசமான தரவுத்தளங்களில் சிறந்த முடிவுகளை உருவாக்குகிறது என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம', 'uz': "Yaqinda ishni tahrirlash imkoniyatlariga javob berish uchun saqlash holatini koʻrsatish. Qoʻshimcha, ular qoʻllanmalar (SVMs) dasturida ishlatilgan kombinasjonen ishlatiladi, chunki u TKs tomonidan olingan syntactik modellarini va CNNNs tomonidan oʻrganilgan hamma narsalarni ishlatish mumkin. Lekin, tugmalar birikmasi funksiyasi bilan yaratiladi, bu SVMs darajadagi algoritda direktoriya foydalanmaydi. Bu ishda, biz CNNS'ga qoʻllanilgan odamlarni birlashtirish uchun yangi hybrid usulini tahlil qilamiz. Biz murojaat qilayotganimizni ko'rsatdik, ikkita yaxshi va ko'proq maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi yaxshi natijalarini chiqaradi: WikiQA bir so'zni tanlash uchun va SemEval cQA Community savollarida izoh javob berish uchun SemEval cQA.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây cho thấy rằng ngũ cây (TK) và "Hệ thần kinh ôn hoà (CNN) đã đạt được trạng thái nghệ thuật được phát lại từ câu trả lời. Thêm vào đó, sự kết hợp của chúng trong Máy phát xít (SVM) cũng hứa hẹn vì nó có thể khai thác cả các mô hình cú pháp được máy TK ghi lại và sự gắn kết được các kênh CNN học. Tuy nhiên, sự nhúng vào được thiết kế theo một hàm phân loại, mà không trực tiếp được khai thác trong thuật to án ưu tiên của các SVMs. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp lai hợp giữa ưu tiên được áp dụng cho TK và ưu tiên tiên tiên cho đài CNN. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi có kết quả tốt hơn về hai tập tin nổi tiếng và khá khác nhau: WikiLQA để chọn câu trả lời và SemEvl CQA để chọn các câu trả lời trong câu hỏi của Cộng đồng.', 'bg': 'Последни работи показват, че Дървесните ядра (ТК) и Конволюционните неврални мрежи (CNN) получават най-съвременното в пренареждането на изреченията за отговор. Освен това комбинацията им, използвана в поддържащите векторни машини (SVMs), е обещаваща, тъй като може да използва както синтактичните модели, заловени от ТК, така и вгражданията, научени от CNN. Вградените елементи обаче са конструирани съгласно класификационна функция, която не може да бъде пряко експлоатирана в алгоритъма за предпочитане класиране на SVMs. В тази работа предлагаме нов хибриден подход, съчетаващ предпочитания, прилагани към ТК, и точково класиране, прилагано към НН. Показваме, че нашият подход дава по-добри резултати върху два добре познати и доста различни набора от данни: за избор на изречения за отговор и за избор на коментари в Отговаряне на въпроси на Общността.', 'nl': "Recent onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat Tree Kernels (TK's) en Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN's) de stand van de techniek krijgen in het rangschikken van antwoordzinnen. Bovendien is hun combinatie die wordt gebruikt in Support Vector Machines (SVM's) veelbelovend omdat het zowel de syntactische patronen die zijn vastgelegd door TK's als de embeddings die door CNN's zijn geleerd, kan benutten. De embeddings zijn echter geconstrueerd volgens een classificatiefunctie, die niet direct bruikbaar is in het voorkeursrankingsalgoritme van SVM's. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe hybride aanpak voor waarbij preference ranking toegepast wordt op TK's en point wise ranking toegepast op CNN's. We laten zien dat onze aanpak betere resultaten oplevert op twee bekende en vrij verschillende datasets: WikiQA voor de selectie van antwoordzinnen en SemEval cQA voor de selectie van commentaren in Community Questions Antwoorden.", 'da': "Nylige arbejder har vist, at Tree Kernels (TK) og Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) opnår den nyeste teknologi i ansøgningssætning omlægning. Derudover er deres kombination, der bruges i Support Vector Machines (SVM), lovende, da det kan udnytte både de syntaktiske mønstre fanget af TK'er og de indlejringer, der læres af CNN'er. Indlejringerne er imidlertid konstrueret i henhold til en klassificeringsfunktion, som ikke direkte kan udnyttes i præferencerangeringsalgoritmen for SVM'er. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny hybrid tilgang, der kombinerer præferenceranking anvendt på TK'er og punktvis ranking anvendt på CNN'er. Vi viser, at vores tilgang giver bedre resultater på to velkendte og temmelig forskellige datasæt: WikiQA til udvælgelse af svarsætninger og SemEval cQA til udvælgelse af kommentarer i Community Spørgsmål Besvarelse.", 'hr': 'Skorašnji rad pokazao je da drveće kernele (TKs) i konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNNs) dobijaju stanje umjetnosti u preokretanju odgovorne rečenice. Osim toga, njihova kombinacija koja se koristi u podršku vektorskih strojeva (SVMs) obećava jer može iskoristiti i sintaktičke obrasce koje su uhvatile TKs i ugrađenje koje su naučili CNN. Međutim, ugrađenje se konstruira u skladu s klasifikacijom funkcije, koja nije direktno iskoristljiva u preferencijskom algoritmu reda SVMs-a. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi hibridni pristup kojim se kombinira preferencijska reda primjenjena na TK-e i uputstveno redovanje primjenjene na CNN-e. Pokazujemo da naš pristup proizvodi bolje rezultate na dvije poznate i prilično različite datasete: WikiQA za odabire odgovornih rečenica i SemEval cQA za odabire komentara u odgovoru na pitanje zajednice.', 'de': 'Aktuelle Arbeiten haben gezeigt, dass Baumkerne (TKs) und Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) den Stand der Technik bei der Neurangierung von Antwortsätzen erhalten. Darüber hinaus ist ihre Kombination, die in Support Vector Machines (SVMs) verwendet wird, vielversprechend, da sie sowohl die syntaktischen Muster nutzen kann, die von TKs erfasst werden, als auch die Einbettungen, die von CNNs gelernt werden. Die Einbettungen werden jedoch nach einer Klassifizierungsfunktion konstruiert, die im Präferenzranking-Algorithmus von SVMs nicht direkt ausnutzbar ist. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen neuen hybriden Ansatz vor, der Präferenzranking für TKs und punktweises Ranking für CNNs kombiniert. Wir zeigen, dass unser Ansatz bessere Ergebnisse auf zwei bekannten und ziemlich unterschiedlichen Datensätzen liefert: WikiQA zur Auswahl von Antwortsätzen und SemEval cQA zur Kommentarauswahl in Community Question Answering.', 'fa': 'کارهای اخیرا نشان داده است که کرنل درخت (TKs) و شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (CNNs) به حالت هنری در مجدد بازگرداندن جواب می\u200cگیرند. به اضافه، ترکیب آنها در ماشین پشتیبانی ویکتور (SVMs) استفاده می\u200cشود، به عنوان آن می\u200cتواند هر دو الگوی سنتاکتیک که توسط TKs گرفته می\u200cشود و ترکیب\u200cها که توسط CNN یاد گرفته\u200cاند استفاده می\u200cکند. با این حال، پیوند\u200cبندی\u200cها بر اساس یک عملکرد مختصات ساخته می\u200cشوند، که مستقیماً در الگوریتم رشته\u200cبندی SVMs استفاده نمی\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک طریق جدید hybrid با ترکیب ترجیح\u200cها به TKs و درجه\u200cی نقطه\u200cای که به CNN می\u200cرسد. ما نشان می دهیم که دستور ما نتیجه\u200cهای بهتر در دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای معلوم و بسیار متفاوت تولید می\u200cکند: WikiQA برای انتخاب جواب جمله و SemEval cQA برای انتخاب توضیح در جواب سوال اجتماعی.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa Kernel Pohon (TK) dan Networks Neural Konvelusional (CNN) mendapatkan state of the art dalam menjawab kalimat ulang. Selain itu, kombinasi mereka yang digunakan dalam Support Vector Machines (SVMs) berjanji karena dapat mengeksploitasi pola sintaksi yang ditangkap oleh TK dan penerbangan yang belajar oleh CNN. Namun, pembangunan dibangun menurut fungsi klasifikasi, yang tidak dapat dieksploitasi secara langsung dalam algoritma pengukuran keutamaan SVMs. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan hibrid baru yang menggabungkan peringkat keutamaan yang diterapkan untuk TK dan peringkat yang diterapkan untuk CNN. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kami menghasilkan hasil yang lebih baik pada dua set data yang terkenal dan agak berbeda: WikiQA untuk seleksi kalimat jawaban dan SemEval cQA untuk seleksi komentar dalam Jawaban Pertanyaan Komunitas.', 'ko': '최근 연구에 따르면 트리핵(TK)과 볼륨신경망(CNN)은 복문 재배열 부문에서 가장 앞선 수준이다.또한 TKs가 포획한 문법 모델과 CNN 학습의 삽입을 활용할 수 있기 때문에 벡터기(SVM)를 지원하는 결합은 전망이 밝다.그러나 삽입은 분류 함수에 따라 구성되어 있으며 이는 벡터기를 지원하는 선호 정렬 알고리즘에서 직접 사용할 수 없다.이 작업에서 우리는 TKs에 적용되는 선호 정렬과 CNN에 적용되는 점별 정렬을 결합시키는 새로운 혼합 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 두 개의 유명하고 완전히 다른 데이터 집합에서 더 좋은 결과를 얻었다. 바로 문장 선택에 대한 답변을 위한 위키QA와 커뮤니티 퀴즈에서 논평을 위한 SemEval cQA이다.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya hivi karibuni imeonyesha kuwa mti wa Kernels (TKs) na mitandao ya kijamii ya kujitolea (CNNNs) yanaweza kupata hali ya sanaa katika kujibu hukumu hiyo ikiongezeka tena. Kwa nyongeza, muunganiko wao uliotumiwa katika mashine ya Kuunga mkono (SVMs) unaahidi kwa sababu inaweza kutumia mbinu za pamoja zilizochukuliwa na TKs na vifaa vya CNNN. Hata hivyo, mabango hayo yametengenezwa kwa mujibu wa shughuli za kutangaza, ambazo hazitumiki moja kwa moja kwa moja katika utaratibu wa utaratibu wa SVMs. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu mpya ya hebrid inayounganisha utaratibu uliotumiwa kwa TKs na vyeo chenye akili vilivyotumika kwa mashirika ya CNN. Tunaonyesha kuwa hatua yetu inaleta matokeo mazuri katika seti mbili maarufu na zaidi ya taarifa tofauti: WikiQA kwa ajili ya kuchaguliwa kwa hukumu na SemEval cQA kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa maoni katika swali la Jamii.', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky işleriň agaç Kernelleri (TKs) we Ewirlikli Näraller (CNNs) sözleriň ýene-täblimeginde sungatyň durumyny gazandygyny görkezildi. Beýleki, olaryň birleşigi "Support Vector Machines" (SVMs) üçin ullanylýan söz berýär çünki ol TK we CNN tarapyndan öwreneniň sintaktik nusgalaryny ulanyp biler. Ýöne, bu gizlemeler klasifikasyýa görä in şa edildi. Bu SVMs seçenekleri kategoriýasynda adaty ulanmaýar. Bu işde, TK we CNN\'e uygulanan saýlaw düzümlerini birleştirmek üçin täze bir hybrid approach teklip edýäris. Biz öz ýaryşymyzyň iki tanyş we beýleki veri setirlerinde gowy netijede etýändigini görkeýäris: WikiQA jogabat sözlerini saýlamak üçin we SemEval cQA jemgyýet soragynyň jogabynda terjime saýlamak üçin.', 'sq': 'Puna e fundit ka treguar se Njerëzat e Trees (TKs) dhe Rrjetet Neurale Konveolutive (CNNs) marrin gjendjen e avancuar në ripërlidhjen e fjalëve për përgjigje. Përveç kësaj, kombinimi i tyre i përdorur në Makinat e Vektorit të Mbështetjes (SVMs) është premtues pasi mund të shfrytëzojë si modelet sintaktike të kapura nga TK dhe përfshirjet e mësuara nga CNN. Megjithatë, përfshirjet janë ndërtuar sipas një funksioni klasifikimi, i cili nuk është drejtpërdrejt i shfrytëzueshëm në algoritmin e renditjes së preferuara të SVMs. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një qasje të re hibride që kombinon renditjen e preferimeve të aplikuar në TK dhe renditjen pikëpamëse të aplikuar në CNN. We show that our approach produces better results on two well-known and rather different datasets: WikiQA for answer sentence selection and SemEval cQA for comment selection in Community Question Answering.', 'af': "Onlangse werk het vertoon dat Boom Kernels (TK) en Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke (CNN) die staat van die kuns in antwoord seting herankering kry. Additionally, their combination used in Support Vector Machines (SVMs) is promising as it can exploit both the syntactic patterns captured by TK and the embedding learned by CNN. Maar, die inbêding is konstrukteer volgens 'n klasifikasie funksie, wat is nie direk uitgebruikbaar in die voorkeure ranking algoritme van SVMs. NAME OF TRANSLATORS In hierdie werk, voorstel ons 'n nuwe hibride toegang met die kombinasie van voorkeure ranging wat aan TK aangepas is en puntswys ranging wat aan CNN aangepas is. Ons wys dat ons toegang beter resultate produseer op twee goed bekende en eerder verskillende datastelle: WikiQA vir antwoord frasiekeuse en SemEval cQA vir kommentaar keuse in gemeenskapsvraag Antwoord.", 'am': 'የአሁኑ ሥራ የዛፍ ኬርኔሎስ (TKs) እና የነፃነት ኔural Network (CNNs) የመልስ አርእስት ግንኙነት እንዲያገኙ አሳይቷል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የድጋፍ ቦታ መኪኖች (SVMs) የሚጠቀሙት ግንኙነታቸው የTKs እና CNNs የተማሩትን የስንተታኪ ዓይነቶች እና የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነቶች በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን አካባቢዎቹ በSVMs ማረፊያ አሌጎርቲም በአቅራቢያ ላይ የማይጠቀሙ እንደተደረገ ትርጉም ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ አዲስ የኬብሪድ መግለጫ በTKs እና በCNNs ለመጠቀም የሚደረገውን የፊደል ምርጫዎችን ለመቀላቀል እናስባለን፡፡ እናሳየዋለን የሥርዓታችን ውጤት በሁለት የተታወቀ እና በተለየ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ ላይ የበለጠ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያሳየው፤ WikiQA ለፍርድ ምርጫ እና ለሴmEval cQA ለመታወቂያ ጥያቄ መልስ እንዲሆን ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Recent work has shown that Tree Kernels (TKs) and Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) obtain the state of the art in answer sentence reranking.  Additionally, their combination used in Support Vector Machines (SVMs) is promising as it can exploit both the syntactic patterns captured by TKs and the embeddings learned by CNNs.  Այնուամենայնիվ, ներդրումները կառուցվում են ըստ դասակարգման ֆունկցիայի, որը անմիջապես օգտագործելի չէ ՍՎՄ-ի նախընտրական դասակարգման ալգորիթմում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր հիբրիդային մոտեցում, որը համադրում է նախընտրական դասակարգումը, որը կիրառվում է տեխնոլոգիաների համար, և կենտրոնային դասակարգումը, որը կիրառվում է CNN-ների համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը ավելի լավ արդյունքներ է ստանում երկու հայտնի և բավականին տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա' WiKiQA պատասխանի նախադասությունների ընտրության համար և SEM-Եվալ CQA կոմենտացիայի ընտրության համար համայնքային հարցերի պատասխանների", 'az': 'Son işləri ağaç Kernelləri (TKs) və Konvolucional Nöral Netikləri (CNNs) şəklinin cavab sözlərinin yenidən dəyişməsi üçün sanatın durumunu alındığını göstərdi. Əksinə, onların birləşdirilməsi, TK və CNN tərəfindən öyrənmiş sintaktik örtükləri istifadə edə biləcəyi üçün və vəd edir. Ancaq, inbingləri klasifikasyon funksiyasına görə in şa edilir, ki, SVMs seçimlərinin səviyyəsi algoritmi istifadə edilməz. Bu işdə yeni hibrid approach təklif edirik ki, TK üçün istifadə edilən seçimlər səviyyəsini birləşdirir və CNN-lərə istifadə edilən məsələlər. Bizim tərzimizin bilinmiş və çox müxtəlif veri setlərinin daha xeyirli sonuçlarını göstəririk: WikiQA cavab sözlərini seçmək üçün və SemEval cQA Kompaniya Soruşu cavabında komentar seçmək üçün.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কাজ প্রদর্শন করেছে যে গাছ কের্নেল (টিকিসি) এবং কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) পুনরায় শিল্পের অবস্থা পেতে পারে। এছাড়াও, সমর্থন ভেক্টর মেশিন (এসভিএমএস) ব্যবহৃত তাদের সংযোগ প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে যেহেতু এটি টিকিস এবং সিএনএন-এর দ্বারা শিক্ষা প্রদান করা যা তবে বিভিন্ন ক্লাসাফিকেশন ফাংশন অনুসারে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন অ্যালগরিদমের প্রেমে সরাসরি ব্যবহৃত নয়। এই কাজে আমরা একটি নতুন হাইব্রিড প্রস্তাব করছি যেটি টিকিসের প্রেরণ করা হয়েছে এবং সিএনএন এর কাছে প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া দুটি পরিচিত এবং বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটের ভাল ফলাফল তৈরি করে: উইকিকিউএ উত্তরের বাক্য নির্বাচনের জন্য এবং সমাজের প্রশ্', 'bs': 'Skorašnji rad pokazuje da drveće kernele (TKs) i konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNNs) dobijaju stanje umjetnosti u preokretanju odgovorne rečenice. Osim toga, njihova kombinacija koja se koristi u podršku vektorskih mašina (SVMs) obećava jer može iskoristiti i sintaktičke obrasce koje su uhvatile TKs i ugrađenje koje su naučili CNN. Međutim, ugrađenje se konstruira u skladu sa klasifikacijom funkcijom, koja nije direktno iskoristljiva u preferenciji algoritma reda SVMs-a. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi hibridni pristup kojim se kombinira preferencijska reda primjenjena na TKs i uputstveno redovanje primjenjene na CNN-e. Pokazujemo da naš pristup proizvodi bolji rezultat na dvije poznate i prilično različite datasete: WikiQA za izbor odgovornih rečenica i semiEval cQA za izbor komentara u odgovoru na pitanje zajednice.', 'ca': "Traballs recents han demostrat que els núcles d'arbre (TK) i les xarxes neurals convolucionals (CNN) aconsegueixen l'avançat en la repetició de les frases de resposta. A més, la seva combinació utilitzada en Support Vector Machines (SVMs) és prometedora, com pot explotar tant els patrons sinàctics capturats pels TK com les incorporacions aprengutes pels CNN. Tot i així, les incorporacions es construeixen segons una funció de classificació, que no és explotable directament en l'algoritme de classificació preferencial dels SVMs. En aquest treball, proposem un nou enfocament híbrid que combini la classificació preferencial aplicada als TK i la puntualització aplicada als CNN. Mostrem que el nostre enfocament produeix millors resultats en dos conjunts de dades ben coneguts i bastant diferents: WikiQA per seleccionar frases de resposta i SemEval cQA per seleccionar comentaris en resposta a preguntes comunitaries.", 'cs': 'Nedávná práce ukázala, že stromová jádra (TK) a konveluční neuronové sítě (CNN) získávají nejmodernější umění v přerovnávání vět odpovědí. Navíc je jejich kombinace používaná v podporových vektorových strojích (SVM) slibná, protože může využít jak syntaktické vzorce zachycené TK, tak i vkládání naučené CNN. Vložení jsou však konstruovány podle klasifikační funkce, která není přímo využitelná v algoritmu hodnocení preferencí SVM. V této práci navrhujeme nový hybridní přístup kombinující hodnocení preferencí aplikované na TK a bodové hodnocení aplikované na CNN. Ukazujeme, že náš přístup přináší lepší výsledky na dvou známých a poněkud odlišných datových sadách: WikiQA pro výběr věty odpovědi a SemEval cQA pro výběr komentářů v komunitním odpovědi.', 'et': 'Hiljutised tööd on näidanud, et puutuumad (TKs) ja konvolutsioonilised neurovõrgud (CNN) saavutavad vastuselausete ümberjaotamise tehnika taseme. Lisaks on nende kombinatsioon, mida kasutatakse tugivektorimasinates (SVMs), paljulubav, kuna see võib ära kasutada nii TK-de poolt põhitud süntaktilisi mustreid kui ka CNN-ide poolt õppitud manustamisi. Põimimised ehitatakse aga klassifitseerimisfunktsiooni järgi, mida SVM-ide eelistuste järjestuse algoritmis otseselt ei saa ära kasutada. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue hübriidse lähenemisviisi, milles kombineeritakse TK-dele rakendatav eelistatud järjestus ja CNN-dele rakendatav punktinäieline järjestus. Näitame, et meie lähenemisviis annab paremaid tulemusi kahe tuntud ja üsna erineva andmekogumi puhul: WikiQA vastuselausete valimiseks ja SemEval cQA kommentaaride valimiseks ühenduse küsimustele vastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että puuytimet (TKs) ja konvolutional neural networks (CNN) saavuttavat viimeisintä tekniikkaa vastauslauseiden uudelleenjärjestelyssä. Lisäksi niiden yhdistelmä, jota käytetään tukivektorikoneissa (SVM), on lupaava, koska se voi hyödyntää sekä TK:n tallentamia syntaktisia kuvioita että CNN:n oppimia upotuksia. Upotukset rakennetaan kuitenkin luokittelufunktion mukaisesti, jota ei voida suoraan hyödyntää SVM:n preference ranking -algoritmissa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta hybridiajattelua, jossa yhdistyvät TK:iin sovellettava preference ranking ja CNN:iin sovellettava pistekohtainen ranking. Osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme tuottaa parempia tuloksia kahdella tunnetulla ja melko erilaisella aineistolla: WikiQA vastauslauseiden valinnassa ja SemEval cQA kommenttien valinnassa Community Question Answeringissä.', 'jv': 'Gujaring Mungkin digawe, Kombinksi wong liyane ing "supported vector engines" (SVM) sing dipoleh lan nganggep kuwi wis digawe seneng pisan seneng pisan kelompok nggawe politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nyong nggunakake iki, kita enyeste sawian sistem anyar wiir-wiir nggawe gerakan kanggo Kemerdekaan karo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe sistem tuanjakan kanggo Kemerdekaan Karo NPN. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno diangkat dhéwé éntuk akeh luwih gambar ditambah iki dadi wis ngerasakno karo dataset sing menehi diangkat dhéwé', 'he': 'העבודה האחרונה הראה שכרנלים עץ (TKs) ורשתות נוירוליות משתנות (CNNs) מקבלים את המצב המיוחד בתשובה לשיקום משפט מחדש. בנוסף, השילוב שלהם בשימוש במכונות ויקטורים של תמיכה (SVMs) מבטיח כיוון שהוא יכול לנצל את שני הדפוסים הסינטקטיים שנתפסו ע"י טק.קיי. ואת התכניות שנלמדו ע"י CNN. בכל אופן, ההערכות נבנות לפי פונקציה מסווג, שלא ניתן לנצל באופן ישיר באלגוריתם העדיף של SVMs. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים גישה היברידית חדשה שמשולבת את הדרגה העדיפות שמשתמשת לטק.טי.קיי. ולהדרגה הנקודה שמשתמשת ל-CNN. אנחנו מראים שהגישה שלנו יוצרת תוצאות טובות יותר על שני קבוצות נתונים ידועות ומשונות: WikiQA לבחורת משפט תשובה ו SemEval cQA לבחורת תגובה בתשובה לשאלות הקהילתית.', 'ha': "Ga aikin da aka yanzu ya nuna cewa Tree Kerns (TKs) da Networks na Neural (CNNs) za'a sami halin sanar da cewa ya sake re-tara. Additionally, their combination used in Support Vector Machines (SVMs) is promising as it can exploit both the syntactic patterns captured by TKs and the embeddings learned by CNNs.  An gina embargo da aka ƙayyade shi daidai da wani aikin fassarar, wanda bã ya iya amfani da shi dira gaba ɗaya a kan daraja mai daraja na SvM. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata hanyor kybrid da za'a haɗa zafi da daraja wanda aka yi amfani da TKs da shiryarwa mai shiryuwa da aka amfani da CNN. Tuna nũna cewa hanyoyinmu yana ƙarfafa mafiya kyau a kan matsalan biyu masu da aka sani, da waɗancan dabam-daban: WikiQA wa zaɓen maganar cire da Semeval cQA wa zaɓen maganar a cikin Jamii na tambayi.", 'sk': 'Nedavno delo je pokazalo, da drevesna jedra (TK) in konvolucijska živčna omrežja (CNN) pridobijo najsodobnejše razvrščanje odgovornih stavkov. Poleg tega je njihova kombinacija, ki se uporablja v podpornih vektorskih strojih (SVM), obetavna, saj lahko izkoristi tako sintaktične vzorce, ki jih zajemajo TK, kot tudi vdelave, ki jih naučijo CNN. Vendar pa so vdelave zgrajene v skladu s funkcijo klasifikacije, ki ni neposredno izkoriščljiva v algoritmu preferenčnega razvrščanja SVM. V tem delu predlagamo nov hibridni pristop, ki združuje preferenčno razvrščanje, ki se uporablja za TK, in točkovno razvrščanje, ki se uporablja za CNN. Pokazali smo, da naš pristop prinaša boljše rezultate na dveh znanih in precej različnih naborih podatkov: WikiQA za izbiro odgovornih stavkov in SemEval cQA za izbiro komentarjev v odgovarjanju na vprašanja Skupnosti.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་ཁམས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྟངས་ནི་Tree Kernels (TKs) དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་Neural Networks Additionally, their combination used in Support Vector Machines (SVMs)is promising as it can exploit both the syntactic patterns captured by TKs and the embeddings learned by CNNs. ཡིན་ནའང་། embedding is constructed according to a classification function, which is not directly exploiteable in the preferences ranking algorithm of SVMs. In this work, we propose a new hybrid approach combining preference ranking applied to TKs and pointwise ranking applied to CNNs. Name ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མི་ཤེས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ལས་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Recovering Question Answering Errors via Query Revision', 'ar': 'استعادة أخطاء إجابة السؤال عن طريق مراجعة الاستعلام', 'es': 'Recuperación de errores de respuesta a preguntas mediante revisión de consultas', 'fr': 'Récupération des erreurs de réponse aux questions via la révision', 'pt': 'Recuperando erros de resposta a perguntas por meio de revisão de consulta', 'ja': 'クエリリビジョンを介した質問応答エラーの復元', 'zh': '因询修复对误', 'hi': 'क्वेरी संशोधन के माध्यम से प्रश्न उत्तर त्रुटियों को पुनर्प्राप्त करना', 'ru': 'Восстановление ошибок при ответе на вопросы с помощью редакции запроса', 'ga': 'Earráidí Freagartha Ceist a Aisghabháil trí Athbhreithniú ar Cheisteanna', 'ka': 'კითხვის რევისუციის გამოყენება შეცდომები', 'el': 'Ανάκτηση σφαλμάτων απάντησης ερωτήσεων μέσω αναθεώρησης ερωτήματος', 'it': 'Recupero degli errori di risposta alle domande tramite revisione delle query', 'lt': 'Klausimų atsakymo klaidų atkūrimas peržiūrint klausimą', 'hu': 'Kérdésre válaszoló hibák helyreállítása lekérdezés felülvizsgálatával', 'ms': 'Memulihkan Ralat Jawapan Pertanyaan melalui Revisi Pertanyaan', 'mk': 'Отворање грешки во одговорот на прашањата преку ревизија на прашањата', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം റിവിസിഷന്\u200d മുഖേന ചോദ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു', 'mt': 'Irkupru żbalji fit-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet permezz tar-Reviżjoni tal-mistoqsijiet', 'mn': 'Судалгааны хариулт алдаа гарч ирж байна.', 'kk': 'Сұраныс редакциясы арқылы сұраныс жауап беру қатесін қайталау', 'ro': 'Recuperarea erorilor de răspuns la întrebări prin revizuirea interogării', 'pl': 'Odzyskiwanie błędów odpowiadania na pytania za pomocą wersji zapytania', 'sr': 'Повратење погрешка отговора на питање путем ревизије спитања', 'no': 'Hentar feil ved svaring av spørsmål gjennom spørsmål', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැරද', 'ur': 'سؤال جواب کی تخطاروں کو کوئر ریویزون کے ذریعہ دوبارہ حاصل کر رہا ہے', 'ta': 'கேள்வி மீள்நோக்கு வழியாக கேள்வி பதில் பிழைகள் மீட்டெடுக்கப்படுகிறது', 'so': "Ka bogsashada jawaabta su'aalaha", 'sv': 'Återställa frågesvarsfel via frågerevision', 'uz': 'Soʻrov Revision orqali javob berish xatosi', 'vi': 'Thu hồi các lỗi câu hỏi qua kiểm tra Query', 'bg': 'Възстановяване на грешки при отговор на въпроси чрез ревизия на заявка', 'nl': 'Fouten bij het beantwoorden van vragen herstellen via query revisie', 'hr': 'Prikupljanje grešaka odgovora na pitanja putem revizije pitanja', 'de': 'Wiederherstellen von Fragebeantwortern Fehlern über Query Revision', 'id': 'Memulihkan Galat Jawab Pertanyaan melalui Revisi Pertanyaan', 'fa': 'بازیابی خطاهای پاسخ سوال با توسط بازیابی سوال', 'tr': 'Sorag jogabat hatalaryny soraglamak üçin ýene al', 'af': 'Herhaal vraag antwoord Foute deur navraag hersiening', 'da': 'Gendannelse af spørgsmål Besvarelse af fejl via forespørgselsrevision', 'sq': 'Recovering Question Answering Errors via Query Revision', 'ko': '질의에 의한 개정을 통해 질의응답 오류 복구', 'sw': 'Kupata swali kupitia Mapinduzi ya Query', 'az': 'SoruŇü cavab x…ôtalarńĪ soruŇümaq sńĪrasńĪ vasit…ôsil…ô yenil…ônir', 'bs': 'Povraćanje grešaka odgovora na pitanje putem revizije pitanja', 'ca': 'Recuperar errors en resposta a preguntes a través de la revisió de preguntes', 'cs': 'Obnovení chyb zodpovězení otázek prostřednictvím revize dotazu', 'am': 'ጥያቄ በመስጠት ላይ', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamise vigade taastamine päringu läbivaatamise kaudu', 'fi': 'Kyselyn tarkistuksen avulla palautetaan kyselyihin vastaamiseen liittyviä virheitä', 'hy': 'Հարցը պատասխանելու սխալներ վերականգնելը հարցը վերանայման միջոցով', 'bn': 'জিজ্ঞাসা রিভিশনের মাধ্যমে প্রশ্নের উত্তর পুনরুদ্ধার করা হচ্ছে', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Pangung Nambah Eror Perkakas', 'he': 'מחזירה שגיבות תשובות לשאלות באמצעות שינוי השאלות', 'sk': 'Obnovitev napak pri odgovarjanju na vprašanja prek revizije poizvedbe', 'ha': 'QSystemSemaphore', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཞིབ་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལན་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལ་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'The existing factoid QA systems often lack a post-inspection component that can help models recover from their own mistakes. In this work, we propose to crosscheck the corresponding KB relations behind the predicted answers and identify potential inconsistencies. Instead of developing a new model that accepts evidences collected from these relations, we choose to plug them back to the original questions directly and check if the revised question makes sense or not. A bidirectional LSTM is applied to encode revised questions. We develop a scoring mechanism over the revised question encodings to refine the predictions of a base QA system. This approach can improve the F1 score of STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), one of the leading QA systems, from 52.5 % to 53.9 % on WEBQUESTIONS data.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تفتقر أنظمة ضمان الجودة الحالية إلى مكون ما بعد التفتيش الذي يمكن أن يساعد النماذج على التعافي من أخطائها. في هذا العمل ، نقترح التحقق من علاقات قاعدة المعارف المقابلة وراء الإجابات المتوقعة وتحديد التناقضات المحتملة. بدلاً من تطوير نموذج جديد يقبل الأدلة التي تم جمعها من هذه العلاقات ، نختار إعادة توصيلها بالأسئلة الأصلية مباشرةً والتحقق مما إذا كان السؤال المنقح منطقيًا أم لا. يتم تطبيق LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه لتشفير الأسئلة المنقحة. نقوم بتطوير آلية تسجيل النقاط على ترميزات الأسئلة المنقحة لتحسين تنبؤات نظام ضمان الجودة الأساسي. يمكن لهذا النهج تحسين درجة F1 لـ STAGG (Yih et al. ، 2015) ، أحد أنظمة ضمان الجودة الرائدة ، من 52.5٪ إلى 53.9٪ على بيانات WEBQUESTIONS.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de control de calidad factoide existentes a menudo carecen de un componente posterior a la inspección que pueda ayudar a los modelos a recuperarse de sus propios errores. En este trabajo, proponemos realizar una verificación cruzada de las relaciones de la base de conocimientos correspondientes detrás de las respuestas previstas e identificar posibles inconsistencias. En lugar de desarrollar un nuevo modelo que acepte las evidencias recopiladas de estas relaciones, optamos por volver a conectarlas directamente a las preguntas originales y comprobar si la pregunta revisada tiene sentido o no. Se aplica un LSTM bidireccional para codificar las preguntas revisadas. Desarrollamos un mecanismo de puntuación sobre las codificaciones de preguntas revisadas para refinar las predicciones de un sistema de control de calidad básico. Este enfoque puede mejorar la puntuación F1 de STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), uno de los principales sistemas de control de calidad, del 52,5% al 53,9% en los datos de WEBQUESTIONS.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de controle de qualidade factóides existentes geralmente não possuem um componente pós-inspeção que possa ajudar os modelos a se recuperarem de seus próprios erros. Neste trabalho, propomos cruzar as relações de KB correspondentes por trás das respostas previstas e identificar possíveis inconsistências. Em vez de desenvolver um novo modelo que aceite evidências coletadas dessas relações, optamos por reconectá-las diretamente às questões originais e verificar se a questão revisada faz sentido ou não. Um LSTM bidirecional é aplicado para codificar perguntas revisadas. Desenvolvemos um mecanismo de pontuação sobre as codificações de perguntas revisadas para refinar as previsões de um sistema de controle de qualidade básico. Essa abordagem pode melhorar a pontuação F1 do STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), um dos principais sistemas de controle de qualidade, de 52,5% para 53,9% nos dados do WEBQUESTIONS.', 'fr': "Les systèmes d'assurance qualité factoïde existants sont souvent dépourvus d'un composant post-inspection qui peut aider les modèles à se remettre de leurs propres erreurs. Dans ce travail, nous proposons de recouper les relations KB correspondantes derrière les réponses prédites et d'identifier les incohérences potentielles. Au lieu de développer un nouveau modèle qui accepte les preuves recueillies à partir de ces relations, nous choisissons de les relier directement aux questions d'origine et de vérifier si la question révisée a du sens ou non. Un LSTM bidirectionnel est appliqué pour coder les questions révisées. Nous développons un mécanisme de notation sur les encodages de questions révisés afin d'affiner les prévisions d'un système d'assurance qualité de base. Cette approche peut améliorer le score F1 de STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), l'un des principaux systèmes d'assurance qualité, de 52,5\xa0% à 53,9\xa0% sur les données WEBQUESTIONS.", 'ja': '既存の事実上のQAシステムには、検査後のコンポーネントが欠如していることが多く、これはモデルが自らのミスから回復するのに役立ちます。この作業では、予測された回答の背後にある対応するKB関係をクロスチェックし、潜在的な不一致を特定することを提案します。これらの関係から収集された証拠を受け入れる新しいモデルを開発する代わりに、それらを元の質問に直接挿入し、修正された質問に意味があるかどうかを確認することを選択します。双方向LSTMは、改訂された質問をエンコードするために適用される。私たちは、ベースQAシステムの予測を改善するために、改訂された質問エンコーディングにわたってスコアリングのメカニズムを開発します。このアプローチは、主要なQAシステムの1つであるSTAGG (Yih et al., 2015)のF 1スコアを、WEBQUESTIONSデータの52.5%から53.9%に向上させることができる。', 'zh': '今 factoid QA 统常阙检组件,可助模形从己过复之。 于是建议交检占对背之KB,并识潜异。 臣等未发一受证之新,择其直插原始问题,检改之义也。 双向 LSTM 以编码之。 修之编码发一评分机,以优化本 QA 之占。 此法可以先QA系统之一STAGG(Yih等,2015)之F1分数自WEBQUESTIONS数者52.5%至53.9%。', 'ru': 'Существующим фактоидным системам обеспечения качества часто не хватает пост-инспекционного компонента, который может помочь моделям оправиться от собственных ошибок. В этой работе мы предлагаем перекрестно проверить соответствующие отношения КБ за прогнозируемыми ответами и выявить потенциальные несоответствия. Вместо того, чтобы разрабатывать новую модель, которая принимает доказательства, собранные из этих отношений, мы выбираем, чтобы подключить их обратно к первоначальным вопросам непосредственно и проверить, имеет ли пересмотренный вопрос смысл или нет. Двунаправленный LSTM применяется для кодирования пересмотренных вопросов. Мы разрабатываем механизм оценки по пересмотренным кодировкам вопросов для уточнения прогнозов базовой системы обеспечения качества. Такой подход может улучшить оценку F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), одной из ведущих систем обеспечения качества, с 52,5% до 53,9% на данных WEBQUESTIONS.', 'hi': 'मौजूदा फैक्टोइड क्यूए सिस्टम में अक्सर एक पोस्ट-इंस्पेक्शन घटक की कमी होती है जो मॉडल को अपनी गलतियों से उबरने में मदद कर सकती है। इस काम में, हम अनुमानित उत्तरों के पीछे संबंधित KB संबंधों को क्रॉसचेक करने और संभावित विसंगतियों की पहचान करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक नया मॉडल विकसित करने के बजाय जो इन संबंधों से एकत्र किए गए सबूतों को स्वीकार करता है, हम उन्हें सीधे मूल प्रश्नों पर वापस प्लग करना चुनते हैं और जांचते हैं कि संशोधित प्रश्न समझ में आता है या नहीं। एक द्विदिश LSTM संशोधित प्रश्नों को एन्कोड करने के लिए लागू किया जाता है। हम एक आधार क्यूए प्रणाली की भविष्यवाणियों को परिष्कृत करने के लिए संशोधित प्रश्न एन्कोडिंग पर एक स्कोरिंग तंत्र विकसित करते हैं। यह दृष्टिकोण STAGG (Yih et al., 2015) के F1 स्कोर में सुधार कर सकता है, जो अग्रणी QA प्रणालियों में से एक है, WEBQUESTIONS डेटा पर 52.5% से 53.9% तक।', 'ga': 'Is minic nach mbíonn comhpháirt iar-iniúchta ag na córais QA factoid atá ann faoi láthair a chuidíonn le samhlacha teacht chucu féin óna gcuid botún féin. Sa obair seo, molaimid cros-seiceáil a dhéanamh ar an gcaidreamh KB comhfhreagrach taobh thiar de na freagraí tuartha agus neamhréireachtaí féideartha a shainaithint. In ionad múnla nua a fhorbairt a ghlacann le fianaise a bhailítear ón gcaidreamh seo, roghnaíonn muid iad a nascadh ar ais go dtí na buncheisteanna go díreach agus seiceáil an bhfuil ciall leis an gceist athbhreithnithe nó nach bhfuil. Cuirtear LSTM déthreoch i bhfeidhm chun ceisteanna athbhreithnithe a ionchódú. Forbraímid meicníocht scórála thar na hionchóduithe ceiste athbhreithnithe chun na réamh-mheastacháin ar bhunchóras QA a bheachtú. Is féidir leis an gcur chuige seo feabhas a chur ar scór F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ceann de na príomhchórais QA, ó 52.5% go 53.9% ar shonraí WEBQUESTIONS.', 'ka': 'QA სისტემების ფაქტიოდის სისტემები ძალიან არსებობს პოსტექტის კომპონენტი, რომელიც შესაძლებელია მოდელების შესაძლებლობა თავისი შეცდომების გადას ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ გვეძლევა გავაკეთოთ კომპორტირებული კომპორტირების შესახებ განსაზღვრებული პასუხების შემდეგ და განსაზღვრება პოცენტალური შემდეგ. ახალი მოდელის განვითარებას ადგილად, რომელიც ამ შესახებისგან კონკულაციას მიღებს, ჩვენ ამოირჩევთ, რომ ისინი დავყენოთ ორიგინალური კითხვებისთვის პირდაპირად და დავწეროთ თუ ორიდერექციონალური LSTM გამოყენება რედაქტირებული კითხვების კოდირებისთვის. ჩვენ განვითარებით კითხვის კოდირების კოდირების შესახებ სკოდირების მექანიზმის განვითარება. ეს პროგრამა შეიძლება გაუქმნა STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ერთი უნდა იყოს QA სისტემაში, 52,5% დან 53,9% დან WEBQUESTIONS მონაცემებზე.', 'hu': 'A meglévő tényleges minőségbiztosítási rendszerekben gyakran hiányzik az ellenőrzés utáni alkatrész, amely segíthet a modellek helyreállni saját hibáikból. Ebben a munkában azt javasoljuk, hogy keresztellenőrizzük a megfelelő KB kapcsolatokat a várható válaszok mögött, és azonosítsuk a potenciális következetlenségeket. Ahelyett, hogy olyan új modellt fejlesztenénk ki, amely elfogadja az ezekből a kapcsolatokból gyűjtött bizonyítékokat, úgy döntünk, hogy közvetlenül visszakötjük őket az eredeti kérdésekhez, és ellenőrizzük, hogy van-e értelme a felülvizsgált kérdésnek. A módosított kérdések kódolására kétirányú LSTM alkalmazásra kerül sor. A felülvizsgált kérdéskódolások felett pontszámítási mechanizmust dolgozunk ki, hogy finomítsuk az alap minőségbiztosítási rendszer előrejelzéseit. Ez a megközelítés javíthatja a STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), az egyik vezető minőségbiztosítási rendszer F1 pontszámát, 52,5%-ról 53,9%-ra a WEBBQUESTIONS adatok tekintetében.', 'el': 'Τα υπάρχοντα πραγματικά συστήματα QS συχνά δεν διαθέτουν ένα στοιχείο μετά την επιθεώρηση που μπορεί να βοηθήσει τα μοντέλα να ανακτήσουν από τα δικά τους λάθη. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε να διασταυρώσουμε τις αντίστοιχες σχέσεις ΚΒ πίσω από τις προβλεπόμενες απαντήσεις και να εντοπίσουμε πιθανές ασυνέπειες. Αντί να αναπτύξουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο που αποδέχεται αποδεικτικά στοιχεία που συλλέγονται από αυτές τις σχέσεις, επιλέγουμε να τα επαναφέρουμε απευθείας στις αρχικές ερωτήσεις και να ελέγξουμε αν η αναθεωρημένη ερώτηση έχει νόημα ή όχι. Μια αμφίδρομη LSTM εφαρμόζεται για την κωδικοποίηση αναθεωρημένων ερωτήσεων. Αναπτύσσουμε έναν μηχανισμό βαθμολόγησης πάνω από τις αναθεωρημένες κωδικοποιήσεις ερωτήσεων για να βελτιώσουμε τις προβλέψεις ενός βασικού συστήματος QS. Αυτή η προσέγγιση μπορεί να βελτιώσει την βαθμολογία F1 του STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ενός από τα κορυφαία συστήματα QS, από 52,5% έως 53,9% στα δεδομένα των διαδικτυακών ερωτήσεων.', 'mk': 'The existing factoid QA systems often lack a post-inspection component that can help models recover from their own mistakes.  In this work, we propose to crosscheck the corresponding KB relations behind the predicted answers and identify potential inconsistencies.  Instead of developing a new model that accepts evidences collected from these relations, we choose to plug them back to the original questions directly and check if the revised question makes sense or not.  Бидирекционална LSTM се применува за кодирање на ревидираните прашања. Развиваме механизам за оценка во врска со ревидираните кодирања на прашањата за подобрување на предвидувањата на базичкиот систем на QA. Овој пристап може да го подобри резултатот на Ф1 на STAGG (Yih и ал., 2015), еден од водечките системи за QA, од 52,5 отсто на 53,9 отсто на податоците на WEBQUESTIONS.', 'it': 'I sistemi di controllo qualità esistenti spesso mancano di un componente post-ispezione che può aiutare i modelli a recuperare dai propri errori. In questo lavoro, proponiamo di verificare le corrispondenti relazioni KB dietro le risposte previste e identificare potenziali incoerenze. Invece di sviluppare un nuovo modello che accetti le prove raccolte da queste relazioni, scegliamo di ricollegarle direttamente alle domande originali e verificare se la domanda rivista ha senso o meno. Viene applicato un LSTM bidirezionale per codificare le domande riviste. Sviluppiamo un meccanismo di punteggio sulle codifiche delle domande riviste per perfezionare le previsioni di un sistema di QA base. Questo approccio può migliorare il punteggio F1 di STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), uno dei sistemi QA leader, dal 52,5% al 53,9% sui dati WEBBQUESTIONS.', 'ms': 'The existing factoid QA systems often lack a post-inspection component that can help models recover from their own mistakes.  Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan untuk menyeberangi hubungan KB yang sepadan di belakang jawapan yang dijangka dan mengenalpasti kemungkinan ketidakkonsistensi. Instead of developing a new model that accepts evidences collected from these relations, we choose to plug them back to the original questions directly and check if the revised question makes sense or not.  A bidirectional LSTM is applied to encode revised questions.  Kami mengembangkan mekanisme skor atas pengekodan soalan yang diubah untuk menaikkan ramalan sistem QA asas. Pendekatan ini boleh meningkatkan skor F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), salah satu sistem QA yang memimpin, dari 52.5% kepada 53.9% pada data WEBQUESTIONS.', 'kk': 'Бар фактоид QA жүйелерінде өзінің қателерінен қалпына келтіруге көмектесуі мүмкін емес. Бұл жұмыстың артындағы КБ қатынасын тексеру және таңдалған жауаптардың артындағы мүмкін қатынасыздығын анықтау жұмыс істейміз. Бұл қатынастардан жинақталған мәліметтерді қабылдайтын жаңа үлгі құру орнына, біз оларды бастапқы сұрақтарына қайтару үшін таңдап, қайтарылған сұрақ маңызды емес пе дегенді тексеру үшін. Қайталанған сұрақтарды кодтау үшін екі- директивалық LSTM қолданылады. Біз QA негізгі жүйесінің бағдарламаларын жаңарту үшін қайталанатын сұрақ кодтамасының арқылы сұрақ механизмін құрамыз. Бұл тәсілі STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), QA жүйелерінің бастапқы бірі, 52, 5% мен 53, 9% дегенге жетілдіре алады.', 'lt': 'Esamoms faktoidinėms QA sistemoms dažnai trūksta po patikrinimo atliekamo komponento, kuris galėtų padėti modeliams atsigauti iš savo klaidų. Šiame darbe siūlome kryžminiai patikrinti atitinkamus KB santykius už numatytų atsakymų ir nustatyti galimus neatitikimus. Užuot sukūrę naują model į, kuriame būtų priimti iš šių santykių surinkti įrodymai, mes nusprendžiame juos tiesiogiai susieti su pradiniais klausimais ir patikrinti, ar persvarstytas klausimas yra prasmingas ar ne. A bidirectional LSTM is applied to encode revised questions.  Kuriame vertinimo mechanizmą peržiūrėtų klausimų kodavimų atžvilgiu, kad patobulintume bazinės QA sistemos prognozes. Šis požiūris gali pagerinti STAGG (Yih et al., 2015 m.), vienos iš svarbiausių QA sistemų, F1 rezultatą nuo 52,5 % iki 53,9 % pagal WEBQUESTIONS duomenis.', 'ml': 'The existing factoid QA systems often lack a post-inspection component that can help models recover from their own mistakes.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കെബിയുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായ ഉത്തരങ്ങളുടെ പിന്നില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുകയും സാധ് ഈ ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200d സ്വീകരിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d അത് സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നത്  പരിശോധിച്ച ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d എക്കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d പുനര്\u200dത്തിപ്പെടുത്താനായി മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ കോഡിങ്ങിനെ ഈ പ്രോഗ്രാം സ്റ്റാഗിന്റെ F1 സ്കോര്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരാള്\u200d, 52. 5% മുതല്\u200d 53. 9% മുതല്\u200d വ്യൂബ്ക്യൂഷന', 'no': 'Det eksisterande faktoid QA-systemet manglar ofte ein post-inspeksjonskomponent som kan hjelpa til modeller å gjenoppretta frå dei eige feilene sine. I denne arbeida foreslår vi å kryssa av tilsvarande KB-forholdet bak forventa svar og identifisera potensielle inkonsistensingar. I staden for å utvikla eit ny modell som aksepterer evidentitet samla frå desse forholdene, vel vi å tilkopla dei tilbake til dei opphavlege spørsmålene direkte og sjekka om det gjenopprette spørsmålet har mening eller ikkje. Name Vi utviklar ein skaleringsmekanisme over dei gjenopprette spørsmålskodingane for å refinera forhåndsvisingane av ein grunnleggjande QA-systemet. Denne tilnærminga kan forbetra F1- poeng av STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ein av dei første QA- systema, frå 52,5% til 53,9% på WEBQUESTIONS- data.', 'mn': 'Бас оршиж байгаа фактоид QA системүүд өөрсдийн алдаасаа гарах загваруудыг тусалж чадна. Энэ ажлын дараа бид КБ-ын харилцааны хамааралтай харилцааны хамааралтай харилцааныг шалгаж, боломжтой бус байдлыг тодорхойлж чадна. Эдгээр харилцаас цуглуулсан баталгааг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх шинэ загвар бүтээх оронд бид тэднийг эхний асуултуудад шууд холбогдохыг сонгож, шинэчлэгдсэн асуулт нь ойлгомжтой эсэхийг шалгаж байна. Шинэ асуултуудыг кодлохын тулд хоёр дахин ашигладаг LSTM. Бид QA суурь системийн тодорхойлолтыг сайжруулахын тулд шинэчлэгдсэн асуулт кодлогын хувьд сүлжээний механизм үүсгэдэг. Энэ арга нь STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), QA системийн эхний нэг нь 52.5% болон 53.9% WEBQUESTION өгөгдлийн хувьд нэмэгдүүлж чадна.', 'pl': 'Istniejące faktyczne systemy jakości często brakuje komponentu poinspekcyjnego, który może pomóc modelom odzyskać się po własnych błędach. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy porównanie odpowiednich relacji KB stojących za przewidywanymi odpowiedziami i zidentyfikowanie potencjalnych niespójności. Zamiast opracowywać nowy model, który akceptuje dowody zebrane z tych relacji, decydujemy się je bezpośrednio podłączyć do pierwotnych pytań i sprawdzić, czy zmienione pytanie ma sens, czy nie. Dwukierunkowy LSTM jest stosowany do kodowania zmienionych pytań. Opracowujemy mechanizm oceny nad zmienionymi kodowaniami pytań, aby udoskonalić przewidywania podstawowego systemu QA. Takie podejście może poprawić wynik F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), jednego z wiodących systemów jakości, z 52,5% do 53,9% na danych WEBQUESTIONS.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de asigurare a calității reale existente lipsesc adesea o componentă post-inspecție care poate ajuta modelele să se recupereze din propriile greșeli. În această lucrare, propunem verificarea încrucișată a relațiilor KB corespunzătoare din spatele răspunsurilor anticipate și identificarea potențialelor incoerențe. În loc să dezvoltăm un nou model care acceptă dovezile colectate din aceste relații, alegem să le conectăm direct la întrebările originale și să verificăm dacă întrebarea revizuită are sens sau nu. Se aplică un LSTM bidirecțional pentru codificarea întrebărilor revizuite. Dezvoltăm un mecanism de scoring asupra codărilor revizuite ale întrebărilor pentru a rafina previziunile unui sistem de calitate de bază. Această abordare poate îmbunătăți scorul F1 al STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), unul dintre cele mai importante sisteme de asigurare a calității, de la 52,5% la 53,9% din datele WEBBQUESTIONS.', 'sr': 'Postojeći faktoidni QA sistemi često nedostaje komponent nakon inspekcije koji može pomoći modelima da se oporavi od svojih grešaka. U ovom poslu predlažemo da pregledamo odgovarajuće odnose KB iza predviđenih odgovora i identifikujemo potencijalne nesklade. Umesto da razvijemo novi model koji prihvati dokaze prikupljene iz ovih odnosa, mi odlučimo da ih povežemo direktno na originalna pitanja i provjerimo da li pregledano pitanje ima smisla ili ne. Primjenjuje se dvodirektivni LSTM za kodiranje revidiranih pitanja. Razvijemo mehanizam izviđanja preko revidiranih kodiranja pitanja kako bi refinirali predviđanja baznog QA sistema. Ovaj pristup može poboljšati rezultat F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), jedan od vodećih QA sistema, od 52,5% do 53,9% podataka o WEBQUESTIONSkim podacima.', 'sv': 'De befintliga faktiska kvalitetss채kringssystemen saknar ofta en efterinspektionskomponent som kan hj채lpa modellerna att 책terh채mta sig fr책n sina egna misstag. I detta arbete f철resl책r vi att man korskontrollerar motsvarande KB-relationer bakom de f철rutsp책dda svaren och identifierar potentiella inkonsekvenser. Ist채llet f철r att utveckla en ny modell som accepterar bevis insamlade fr책n dessa relationer v채ljer vi att koppla tillbaka dem direkt till de ursprungliga fr책gorna och kontrollera om den reviderade fr책gan 채r vettig eller inte. En dubbelriktad LSTM anv채nds f철r att koda reviderade fr책gor. Vi utvecklar en po채ngmekanism 철ver de reviderade fr책gekodningarna f철r att f철rfina prognoserna f철r ett grundl채ggande QA-system. Detta tillv채gag책ngss채tt kan f철rb채ttra F1-po채ngen f철r STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ett av de ledande kvalitetss채kringssystemen, fr책n 52,5% till 53,9% p책 WEBBFR횇GONS data.', 'so': "nidaamka QA ee heysta inta badan waa u baahan yihiin qeyb ka dib baaritaanka, kaas oo ka caawinaya tusaalayaasha in laga soo bogsado khaladahooda. In this work, we propose to crosscheck the corresponding KB relations behind the predicted answers and identify potential inconsistencies.  Isku badalka horumarinta tusaale cusub oo aqbala calaamado laga soo ururiyey xiriirkaas, waxaynu dooranaynaa inaannu toos ugu soo bandhijinno su'aalaha asalka ah si aan u fiirinno in su'aalaha la soo beddelay ay ay waxyaabo ku filan tahay ama aysan ahayn. LSTM waxaa lagu codsadaa warqad la soo qoray. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa meymisyo qiimeysan oo ku qoran kooxda su'aalaha la cusboonaysiiyey si aan u hagaajinno wixii la sii sheegay nidaamka QA ee aasaasiga ah. Tan qaababkan wuxuu beddeli karaa kooxda STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), mid ka mid ah nidaamka QA ee hogaamiya, tan 52.5% ilaa 53.9% oo ku saabsan macluumaadka AQUESTIyada.", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන්ම QA පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා පස්සේ පරීක්ෂණ අවශ්\u200dය සකසනයක්, ඒකෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ වැරදිලියෙ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කිබී සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධය පිටිපස්සේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පස්සේ ප මේ සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අළුත් මොඩේල් එකක් විස්තර කරන්න බැරි වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ඔවුන්ව ආපහු ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් පිළිග ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංකේතනය කරන්න බිදිරික්ෂිත LSTM භාවිත කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න සංකේතනය සඳහා ස්කෝරින් මැකසින්ස් විස්තර කරනවා QA පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්න සංකේතනය සඳහා. මේ විදිහට STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ප්\u200dරධාන QA පද්ධතියෙන් එකක්, 52.5% වෙනුවෙන් 53.9% වෙනුවෙන්.', 'ur': 'موجود factoid QA سیستموں میں اغلب ایک پیس-inspection komponent نہیں ہے جو مدلکوں کو اپنی خطاؤں سے بچانے کی مدد کر سکتا ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے پیش بینی جواب کے پیچھے کب رابطہ کا کرسٹ چک کرنے کا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے اور امکانات غیر قابل تعبیر کا پہچان کرنا ہے. اس کے عوض ایک نئی موڈل کو پیدا کرنے کے بدلے جو ان رابطہ سے جمع ہوئے دلیلیں قبول کرتا ہے، ہم نے ان کو مستقیما پیدا کرنے کا انتخاب کرلیا ہے کہ ان کی اصلی سوالیوں میں پھیر لیں اور دیکھ لیں کہ کیا اصلی سوال منطقی ہے یا نہیں. ایک دوسری مسئلہ LSTM کی نسکوڈ سوال کے لئے لازم کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے ایک اسکورینگ مکانیسم پیدا کیا ہے کہ ایک بنسٹ کیا سیسٹم کی پیش بینی کو دفع کریں۔ This approach can improve the F1 score of STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), one of the leading QA systems, from 52.5% to 53.9% on WEBQUESTIONS data.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய காரணிகள் QA அமைப்புகள் பெரும்பாலும் ஒரு பின் கண்காணிப்பு பொருள் குறையாக இருக்கிறது அது தங்கள் சொந்த தவறுகளில இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட விடைகளுக்கு பின்னால் கேபி தொடர்புகளை சோதி இந்த தொடர்புகளிலிருந்து சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட தெளிவுகளை ஏற்றுக் கொள்ளும் புதிய மாதிரி உருவாக்குவதற்கு பதிலாக, நாம் அவற்றை முன்னிருந மீள்படுத்தப்பட்ட கேள்விகளை குறியீட்டிடுவதற்கு ஒரு பிடிகட்டி LSTM பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. We develop a scoring mechanism over the revised question encodings to refine the predictions of a base QA system.  இந்த செயல்பாடு STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), முதலில் QA அமைப்புகளில் ஒன்று, 52. 5% லிருந்து 53. 9% வரை விருப்பங்களின் தகவல்களை மேம்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi attwali ta’ QA fattojdi ta’ spiss jonqsu minn komponent ta’ wara l-ispezzjoni li jista’ jgħin lill-mudelli jirkupraw mill-iżbalji tagħhom stess. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu li nqasmu r-relazzjonijiet korrispondenti tal-KB wara t-tweġibiet imbassra u nidentifikaw inkonsistenzi potenzjali. Minflok niżviluppaw mudell ġdid li jaċċetta evidenzi miġbura minn dawn ir-relazzjonijiet, a ħna nagħżlu li ngħaqduhom lura għall-mistoqsijiet oriġinali direttament u niċċekkjaw jekk il-mistoqsija riveduta tagħtix sens jew le. A bidirectional LSTM is applied to encode revised questions.  We develop a scoring mechanism over the revised question encodings to refine the predictions of a base QA system.  This approach can improve the F1 score of STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), one of the leading QA systems, from 52.5% to 53.9% on WEBQUESTIONS data.', 'uz': "Name Bu ishda, biz kutilgan javoblarning ортida qisqaruvchi KB huquqlarini tekshirishni talab qilamiz va eng muhimi muvaffaqiyatlarni aniqlashni istaysizmi. @ info Name Biz tahrirlangan savol kodlash qoidalarini o'zgartirib chiqarish mechaniyasini yaratishmiz. QA tizimning asosiy kutilgan deb o'ylaymiz. Bu usul STAGG (Yih et al., 2015) birinchi QA tizimdan 52.5% dan 53.9% dan 53.9% bajariladigan.", 'vi': "Các hệ thống Factionless vốn có không có một thành phần sau khi kiểm tra có thể giúp các mô hình phục hồi sau lỗi lầm. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị kiểm tra chéo các mối quan hệ của KB đằng sau những câu trả lời dự đoán và tìm ra các mâu thuẫn tiềm năng. Thay vì phát triển một mô hình mới chấp nhận bằng chứng thu thập từ các mối quan hệ này, chúng tôi chọn nối chúng lại các câu hỏi gốc trực tiếp và kiểm tra xem câu hỏi đã sửa đổi có ý nghĩa hay không. Nó được áp dụng để mã hóa các câu hỏi. Chúng tôi phát triển một cơ chế đánh giá về các câu hỏi mới được sửa đổi để tính to án của hệ thống QA căn cứ. Cách tiếp cận này có thể cải thiện điểm F1 của STAGG (Yih et al., 205), một trong những hệ thống QA hàng đầu, từ 52.5=* đến 3n.9='trên dữ liệu WEBANS.", 'bg': 'Съществуващите фактически системи за контрол на качеството често нямат компонент за слединспекция, който да помогне на моделите да се възстановят от собствените си грешки. В тази работа предлагаме кръстосана проверка на съответните връзки на КБ зад прогнозираните отговори и идентифициране на потенциални несъответствия. Вместо да разработим нов модел, който приема доказателства, събрани от тези отношения, ние избираме да ги свържем директно към първоначалните въпроси и да проверим дали ревизираният въпрос има смисъл или не. За кодиране на ревизирани въпроси се прилага двупосочен ЛТМ. Разработваме механизъм за оценка на ревизираните кодировки на въпросите, за да усъвършенстваме прогнозите на базова система за контрол на качеството. Този подход може да подобри оценката на една от водещите системи за контрол на качеството, от 52,5% на 53,9% по данни за уеб въпроси.', 'da': 'De eksisterende faktiske QA-systemer mangler ofte en post-inspektionskomponent, der kan hjælpe modellerne med at komme sig fra deres egne fejl. I dette arbejde foreslår vi at krydstjekke de tilsvarende KB-relationer bag de forudsigede svar og identificere potentielle inkonsekvenser. I stedet for at udvikle en ny model, der accepterer beviser indsamlet fra disse relationer, vælger vi at sætte dem direkte tilbage til de oprindelige spørgsmål og kontrollere, om det reviderede spørgsmål giver mening eller ej. En tovejet LSTM anvendes til at kode reviderede spørgsmål. Vi udvikler en scoring mekanisme over de reviderede spørgsmål kodninger for at forbedre forudsigelserne af et base QA system. Denne tilgang kan forbedre F1 scoren for STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), et af de førende QA-systemer, fra 52,5% til 53,9% på WEBSQUESTIONS data.', 'nl': 'De bestaande factoïde QA systemen missen vaak een post-inspectie component die modellen kan helpen herstellen van hun eigen fouten. In dit werk stellen we voor om de corresponderende KB relaties achter de voorspelde antwoorden te vergelijken en potentiële inconsistenties te identificeren. In plaats van een nieuw model te ontwikkelen dat bewijsstukken uit deze relaties accepteert, kiezen we ervoor om ze direct terug te koppelen aan de oorspronkelijke vragen en te controleren of de herziene vraag zinvol is of niet. Een bidirectionele LSTM wordt toegepast om herziene vragen te coderen. We ontwikkelen een scoremechanisme over de herziene vragencoderingen om de voorspellingen van een basis QA systeem te verfijnen. Deze aanpak kan de F1 score van STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), een van de toonaangevende QA systemen, verbeteren van 52,5% naar 53,9% op WEBQUESTIONS data.', 'hr': 'Postojeći faktoidni QA sustavi često nedostaje komponent nakon inspekcije koji može pomoći modelima da se oporavi iz svojih grešaka. U ovom poslu predlažemo pregledati odgovarajuće odnose KB-a iza predviđenih odgovora i identificirati potencijalne nesklade. Umjesto razvijanja novog model a koji prihvaća dokaze prikupljene iz ovih odnosa, odaberemo ih natrag na originalna pitanja direktno i provjeriti ima li revizirano pitanje smisla ili ne. Za kodiranje revidiranih pitanja primjenjuje se dvodirektivna LSTM. Mi razvijamo mehanizam izvlačenja preko revidiranih kodiranja pitanja kako bi refinirali predviđanja baznog QA sustava. Ovaj pristup može poboljšati rezultat F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), jedan od vodećih QA sustava, od 52,5% do 53,9% podataka o WEBQUESTIONSkim podacima.', 'id': 'Sistem QA faktoid yang ada sering kekurangan komponen setelah inspeksi yang dapat membantu model pulih dari kesalahan mereka sendiri. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk memeriksa hubungan KB yang sesuai di balik jawaban yang diprediksi dan mengidentifikasi potensi ketidakkonsistensi. Daripada mengembangkan model baru yang menerima bukti yang dikumpulkan dari hubungan ini, kami memilih untuk mengikatnya kembali ke pertanyaan asli secara langsung dan memeriksa apakah pertanyaan yang diubah masuk akal atau tidak. LSTM bidireksi diaplikasikan untuk mengkode pertanyaan yang diubah. Kami mengembangkan mekanisme skor atas pengaturan pertanyaan yang diubah untuk memperbaiki prediksi sistem QA dasar. Pendekatan ini dapat meningkatkan skor F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), salah satu sistem QA yang memimpin, dari 52,5% ke 53,9% pada data WEBQUESTIONS.', 'de': 'In den bestehenden faktoiden QS-Systemen fehlt oft eine Post-Inspection-Komponente, die Modellen helfen kann, sich von ihren eigenen Fehlern zu erholen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, die entsprechenden KB-Beziehungen hinter den prognostizierten Antworten zu überprüfen und mögliche Inkonsistenzen zu identifizieren. Anstatt ein neues Modell zu entwickeln, das Beweise akzeptiert, die aus diesen Beziehungen gesammelt wurden, wählen wir es, sie direkt an die ursprünglichen Fragen zu koppeln und zu überprüfen, ob die überarbeitete Frage Sinn macht oder nicht. Ein bidirektionales LSTM wird angewendet, um revidierte Fragen zu kodieren. Wir entwickeln einen Scoring-Mechanismus über die überarbeiteten Fragenkodierungen, um die Vorhersagen eines Basis-QA-Systems zu verfeinern. Dieser Ansatz kann den F1-Score von STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), einem der führenden QS-Systeme, von 52,5% auf 53,9% auf WEBQUESTIONS-Daten verbessern.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa ukweli uliopo wa QA mara nyingi hauna vifaa vya kufuatilia baada ya kutazama ambavyo vinaweza kusaidia mifano kugundua kutokana na makosa yao wenyewe. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kuvuta mahusiano yanayojibu na KB nyuma ya majibu yaliyotabiriwa na kutambua uwezekano wa kukosekana. Badala ya kutengeneza muundo mpya unaokubali ushahidi uliokusanywa kutoka kwenye mahusiano haya, tunachagua kuwarudisha maswali ya asili moja kwa moja na kuangalia kama swali lililobadili lina maana au la. A bidirectional LSTM is applied to encode revised questions.  Tunaendeleza mfumo wa kuchukua kuhusu utaratibu wa swali lililobadiliwa ili kurekebisha utabiri wa mfumo wa msingi wa QA. Hatua hii inaweza kuboresha vipindi vya F1 vya STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), moja ya mifumo maarufu ya QA, kuanzia asilimia 52.5 hadi asilimia 53.9 kuhusiana na takwimu za WABUZI.', 'ko': '기존factoid QA 시스템에는 사후 검사 구성 요소가 부족합니다. 모델이 자신의 오류에서 복구하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있습니다.이 작업에서 우리는 예측 답안 뒤에 있는 상응하는 지식 라이브러리 관계를 교차 검사하고 잠재적인 불일치성을 확정하는 것을 권장한다.우리는 이러한 관계에서 수집된 증거를 받아들이기 위해 새로운 모델을 개발하지 않고 원시 문제에 직접 삽입하고 수정된 문제가 의미가 있는지 확인하는 것을 선택했다.수정된 문제를 양방향 LSTM으로 인코딩합니다.우리는 수정된 문제 인코딩에 대해 기본 QA 시스템의 예측을 개선하기 위해 채점 메커니즘을 개발했다.이런 방법은 선도적인 QA 시스템 중 하나인 STAGG(Yih et al., 2015)의 F1 점수를 52.5%에서 53.9%로 높일 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Öň bar faktoid QA sistemalary köplenç öz ýalñyşlaryndan çykarmaga kömek edip bilen nusgalardan soňra maslahat komponenti ýok. Bu işde biz KB ilişkilerini önlenen jogablaryň arkasynda geçirmegi we potansiyel döwletlerini tanamaga teklip edýäris. Şu baglaýyşlardan ýygnanan kanıtlary kabul eden täze bir nusga üýtgetmek ýerine biz olaryň başlangyç soraglaryna doğrudan goşulmagyny saýlýarys we çakylan soragyň mantygy bolup ýa-da barlamagyny barlaýarys. Geçerli soraglary kodlamak üçin ikinji görnöş LSTM ullanylar. Biz bu sistemiň üýtgewlerini taýýarlamak üçin tekrar eden soragy ködlemeleri üçin bir gözlemek mehanizmini geliştirdik. Bu metod STAGG (Yih et l., 2015), QA sistemleriniň ileri gidýän ýerinden 52.5% we 53.9% WEBKISTION maglumatlarynda.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای فکتوئید QA موجود اغلب یک بخش بعد از بازرسی کمک می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند مدل\u200cها را از اشتباهی خود بازیابی کند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که رابطه\u200cهای متفاوتی KB پشت پاسخ پیش\u200cبینی را رد کنیم و مشکلات پتانسیل را شناسایی کنیم. به جای توسعه مدل جدید که نشانه\u200cهای جمع شده از این رابطه را قبول می\u200cکند، انتخاب می\u200cکنیم آنها را به سؤال اصلی مستقیماً برگردانیم و بررسی کنیم که آیا سؤال اصلی منطقی است یا نه. Name ما یک مکانیسم تحقیر روی کوندیدن سوال تحقیر می\u200cکنیم تا پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای یک سیستم QA پایه را تغییر دهیم. این روش می\u200cتواند امتیاز F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015) را بهتر کند، یکی از سیستم\u200cهای رهبری QA، از 52.5% تا 53.9% در داده\u200cهای WEBQUESTIONS.', 'sq': "The existing factoid QA systems often lack a post-inspection component that can help models recover from their own mistakes.  Në këtë punë, propozojmë të kryqëzojmë marrëdhëniet korrespondente të KB pas përgjigjeve të parashikuara dhe të identifikojmë moskonsistencat potenciale. Në vend të zhvillimit të një modeli të ri që pranon provat e mbledhura nga këto marrëdhënie, ne zgjedhim t'i lidhim ato drejtpërdrejt në pyetjet origjinale dhe të kontrollojmë nëse pyetja e revizuar ka kuptim apo jo. Një LSTM dy drejtues aplikohet për të koduar pyetjet e revizuara. Ne zhvillojmë një mekanizëm pikërimi mbi kodifikimin e pyetjeve të revizuara për të rafinuar parashikimet e një sistemi bazë QA. Ky qasje mund të përmirësojë rezultatin F1 të STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), një nga sistemet kryesorë QA, nga 52.5% në 53.9% në të dhënat WEBQUESTIONS.", 'af': "Die bestaande faktoid QA stelsels het dikwels 'n post- inspeksie komponent ontbreek wat model kan help herstel van hul eie foute. In hierdie werk, ons voorstel om die ooreenstemmende Kb-relasies agter die voorskoude antwoorde te kruis en potensiele inkonsistensies te identifiseer. In plaas van die ontwikkeling van 'n nuwe model wat bevestigings aanvaar wat van hierdie verhouding versamel is, kies ons om hulle terug na die oorspronklike vrae te inplak direk en bevestig of die hervergroot vraag sin of nie. Name Ons ontwikkel 'n skoring mekanisme oor die hervergroot vraag kodering om die voorskoue van 'n basis QA stelsel te refineer. Hierdie toegang kan die F1 telling van STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), een van die ledige QA stelsels, van 52. 5% tot 53. 9% op WEBQUESTIONS data verbeter.", 'am': 'የአሁኑ የኩነቶች የQA ሲስተም ብዙ ጊዜ የፖስቲካ ክፍተቶችን ከራሳቸው ስሕተት እንዲመለሱ የሚችል የፖስቲካ ክፍተት አይጎድልም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የቀድሞው መለያቶች በኋላ የKB ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር እና የችሎታውን ስህተት ማረጋገጥን እናስባለን፡፡ ከዚህም ግንኙነት የተሰበሰቡትን ማስረጃዎችን በመቀበል ፋንታ አዲስ ሞዴል በመፍጠር እንመርጣለን፣ የተቀጠቀጠው ጥያቄ ማሰብ ወይም አይሆንም እንደሆነ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የተጠቃሚ LSTM ጥያቄዎችን ለማድረግ ይጠይቃል። የተቀጠቀጠውን ጥያቄ የQA ስርዓት ውይይት ለመፍጠር የሚደረገውን የንቀሳቅስ ስልጣን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይህ ጥያቄ የSTAGG (Yih et al., 2015)፣ ከመጀመሪያ የQA ስርዓቶች አንዱ፣ ከ52.5 በመቶ ወደ 53.9 በመቶ የሚደረገውን የF1 ነጥብ ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান ক্যাক্টোয়েড কিউএ সিস্টেম প্রায়শই পরীক্ষার পোস্ট পরীক্ষা কমান্টের অভাব রয়েছে যা মডেল তাদের নিজেদের ভু এই কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি ভবিষ্যতের উত্তরের পেছনে কেবি সম্পর্কের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্ক পরীক্ষা করতে এবং সম্ভাব্য অসম্ভুতির পরি নতুন মডেল তৈরি করার পরিবর্তে এই সম্পর্ক থেকে সংগ্রহের প্রমাণ গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে, আমরা সেগুলো সরাসরি প্রশ্নের কাছে প্লাগ করতে বেছে নিয়েছি এবং পরীক্ষ পরিবর্তন করা প্রশ্ন এনকোড করার জন্য একটি বাইডিয়ারেক্টিয়াল এলএসএম প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। আমরা সংশোধন করা প্রশ্নের কোডিং সম্পর্কে একটি স্কোরিং মেকেনিস্টেম তৈরি করি একটি বেস কিউ এ সিস্টেমের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী পু এই প্রযুক্তিটি স্ট্যাগেজের (ইহেট আল ২০১৫) স্কোর উন্নত করতে পারে, যার মধ্যে একটি প্রধান কিউএ সিস্টেম থেকে ৫. ৫% থেকে ৩৩.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող ֆակտոիդ QA համակարգերը հաճախ բացակայում են հետվերահսկողական բաղադրիչ, որը կարող է օգնել մոդելներին վերականգնվել իրենց սեփական սխալներից: In this work, we propose to crosscheck the corresponding KB relations behind the predicted answers and identify potential inconsistencies.  Այս հարաբերություններից հավաքված ապացույցներ ընդունելու նոր մոդելի զարգացման փոխարեն մենք որոշում ենք միացնել դրանք անմիջապես սկզբնական հարցերին և ստուգել, արդյոք վերափոխված հարցը իմաստալից է, թե ոչ: A bidirectional LSTM is applied to encode revised questions.  Մենք զարգանում ենք գնահատման մեխանիզմ վերափոխված հարցերի կոդավորման վերաբերյալ, որպեսզի բարելավենք հիմնական QA համակարգի կանխատեսումները: Այս մոտեցումը կարող է բարելավել STAGG (Yeh et al., 2015), առաջնորդների QA համակարգերից մեկը, 52.5 տոկոսից մինչև 53.9 տոկոսի WEBQUQUASTIS տվյալների վրա:', 'bs': 'Postojeći faktoidni QA sistemi često nedostaje komponent nakon inspekcije koji može pomoći modelima da se oporavi iz svojih grešaka. U ovom poslu predlažemo da pregledamo odgovarajuće odnose KB iza predviđenih odgovora i identificiramo potencijalne nesklade. Umjesto razvoja novog model a koji prihvaća dokaze prikupljene iz ovih odnosa, mi odlučimo da ih povežemo direktno na originalna pitanja i provjerimo da li pregledano pitanje ima smisla ili ne. Za kodiranje revidiranih pitanja se primjenjuje dvodirektivna LSTM. Mi razvijamo mehanizam izvlačenja preko revidiranih kodiranja pitanja kako bi se oslabili predviđanja baznog QA sistema. Ovaj pristup može poboljšati rezultat F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), jedan od vodećih QA sustava, od 52,5% do 53,9% podataka o WEBQUESTIONSkim podacima.', 'az': 'Mevcut faktoid QA sisteml…ôrin √ßox sńĪxńĪntńĪda modell…ôri √∂z hatalarńĪndan geri qaytarmańüa k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôc…ôk bir post-inspeksyon komponenti yoxdur. Bu iŇüd…ô, m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü cavablarńĪn arkasńĪndaki KB iliŇükilerini ke√ßm…ôk v…ô potensial inconsistencil…ôri tanńĪmmaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôklif edirik. Bu iliŇükil…ôrd…ôn toplanmńĪŇü d…ôlill…ôri q…ôbul ed…ôn yeni modeli t…ôhsil etm…ôk yerine, biz onlarńĪ orijinal suallara dońürudan bańülamańüńĪ se√ßdik v…ô yenil…ônmiŇü sual anlayńĪŇü v…ô ya yoxdur. N√∂vb…ôti suallarńĪ kodlamaq √ľ√ß√ľn iki-diqq…ôtli LSTM istifad…ô edilir. Biz QA sisteminin t…ôdbirl…ôrini d√ľz…ôltm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn yenil…ônmiŇü sual kodlamalarńĪ √ľz…ôrind…ô bir scoring mehanizmini t…ôhsil edirik. Bu t…ôrzim WEBQUESTIONS m…ôlumatlarńĪnda 52,5% il…ô 53,9% t…ôr…ôfind…ôn olan STAGG (Yih et al., 2015).', 'cs': 'Stávající faktické systémy QA často postrádají post-inspekční komponentu, která může pomoci modelům zotavit se z vlastních chyb. V této práci navrhujeme zkontrolovat odpovídající vztahy KB za předpokládanými odpověďmi a identifikovat potenciální nesrovnalosti. Místo vytvoření nového modelu, který přijímá důkazy shromážděné z těchto vztahů, se rozhodneme je připojit zpět k původním otázkám a zkontrolovat, zda revidovaná otázka dává smysl nebo ne. Pro kódování revidovaných otázek se používá obousměrný LSTM. Vyvíjíme bodovací mechanismus nad revidovaným kódováním otázek, abychom upřesnili predikce základního systému QA. Tento přístup může zlepšit F1 skóre STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), jednoho z předních systémů QA, z 52,5% na 53,9% na údajích WEBQUESTIONS.', 'et': 'Olemasolevates faktilistes kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemides puudub sageli järelkontrolli komponent, mis aitab mudelitel oma vigadest taastuda. Selles töös teeme ettepaneku kontrollida vastavaid KB suhteid prognoositud vastuste taga ning tuvastada võimalikud vastuolud. Selle asemel, et töötada välja uus mudel, mis aktsepteerib nendest suhetest kogutud tõendeid, otsustame need otse algküsimustega tagasi siduda ja kontrollida, kas muudetud küsimus on mõistlik või mitte. Uuendatud küsimuste kodeerimiseks rakendatakse kahesuunalist LSTM-i. Töötame välja hindamismehhanismi läbivaadatud küsimuskoodeeringute üle, et täpsustada baaskvaliteedi tagamise süsteemi prognoose. Selline lähenemine võib parandada STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), ühe juhtiva kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemi F1 skoori 52,5%-lt 53,9%-le veebiküsimuste andmetel.', 'fi': 'Nykyisistﾃ､ laadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmistﾃ､ puuttuu usein jﾃ､lkitarkastuskomponentti, joka voi auttaa malleja toipumaan omista virheistﾃ､ﾃ､n. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ ehdotamme ristiintarkistusta vastaavista KB-suhteista ennustettujen vastausten takana ja mahdollisten epﾃ､johdonmukaisuuksien tunnistamista. Sen sijaan, ettﾃ､ kehitﾃ､mme uuden mallin, joka hyvﾃ､ksyy nﾃ､istﾃ､ suhteista kerﾃ､tyt todisteet, pﾃ､ﾃ､tﾃ､mme liittﾃ､ﾃ､ ne suoraan alkuperﾃ､isiin kysymyksiin ja tarkistaa, onko tarkistettu kysymys jﾃ､rkevﾃ､ vai ei. Tarkistettujen kysymysten koodaamiseen kﾃ､ytetﾃ､ﾃ､n kaksisuuntaista LSTM-menetelmﾃ､ﾃ､. Kehitﾃ､mme pisteytysmekanismin tarkistettujen kysymyskoodatusten pﾃ､ﾃ､lle tarkentamaan peruslaadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n ennusteita. Tﾃ､mﾃ､ lﾃ､hestymistapa voi parantaa STAGG:n F1-pisteitﾃ､ (Yih et al., 2015), joka on yksi johtavista laadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmistﾃ､, 52,5 prosentista 53,9 prosenttiin WEB-KYSYMYSTEONS-tiedoista.', 'ca': "The existing factoid QA systems often lack a post-inspection component that can help models recover from their own mistakes.  En aquesta feina, proposem revisar les relacions correspondents de KB darrere de les respostes previstes i identificar les inconsistencies potencials. En lloc de desenvolupar un nou model que accepti les evidències recollides d'aquestes relacions, escollim connectar-les directament a les preguntes originals i comprobar si la pregunta revisada té sentit o no. S'aplica un LSTM bidireccional per codificar preguntes revisades. Desenvolvem un mecanisme de puntuació sobre les codificacions revisades de preguntes per refinar les prediccions d'un sistema QA de base. Aquest enfocament pot millorar la puntuació F1 d'STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), un dels principals sistemes QA, del 52,5% al 53,9% en les dades WEBQUESTIONS.", 'sk': 'Obstoječi dejanski sistemi za zagotavljanje kakovosti pogosto nimajo komponente po pregledu, ki bi lahko modelom pomagala okrevati od lastnih napak. V tem delu predlagamo navzkrižno preverjanje ustreznih odnosov KB za predvidenimi odgovori in ugotavljanje morebitnih neskladnosti. Namesto da bi razvili nov model, ki sprejema dokaze, zbrane iz teh odnosov, se odločimo, da jih neposredno povežemo nazaj na prvotna vprašanja in preverimo, ali je revidirano vprašanje smiselno ali ne. Za kodiranje revidiranih vprašanj se uporablja dvosmerna LSTM. Razvijamo mehanizem ocenjevanja nad revidiranimi kodiranji vprašanj za izboljšanje napovedi osnovnega sistema kakovosti. Ta pristop lahko izboljša rezultat F1 STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), enega vodilnih sistemov za zagotavljanje kakovosti, z 52,5% na 53,9% na podatkih o spletnih vprašanjih.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Daga wannan aikin, Munã kwaɗayin ka sami danganta na KB da mai daidai a bakin jibar da aka yi gargaɗi kuma mu gane mataimaki. Bai buɗe wata shedin da ke karɓi abũbuwan da aka haɗa daga wannan dangantaka, sai Mu zãɓe su zuwa masu tambayar farko dira ɗaya, ko kuma mu dũba idan tambayin da aka goya ana da amfani ko ba. An applies wani LTRM mai gabatar da kwamfyuta wa tambayar da aka sake kodi da. Tuna buɗe wani matsayi mai amfani da kodkogi na kure don ya gyãra gabanin wani na'urar QA. Wannan hanyarwa yana iya ƙara nau'in F1 na GG (Yih et al., 2015), ɗayan na'anar QA, daga 52.5% zuwa 53.9% kan data na ABUQUESTI.", 'jv': 'Kayané perbudhakan barang-barang Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo mrograh kanggo sabên nggawe barang-barêng sing nêmên karo Mbal sing sabên gerakan karo pawaran gambar ampuhé. Tanggal èh hal-hal ingkang model sing gawe nggawe pernik aplikasi sing beraksi winih sing iki, awak dhéwé pilihan bakal terus mbukaké kèng pangan sing isih tur dhéwé lan ujian sisa sing bisa nguasai perbudhakan sing apik dhéwé. Tung Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem anyar nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan kanggo nggawe ngerwih aturan tapi aturan. Ndoleh iki iso nglanggar populer F1 sing STAGG', 'he': 'מערכות QA עובדות קיימות לעתים קרובות חסרות מרכיב אחרי הבדיקה שיכול לעזור לדוגמנים להתאושש מהטעויות שלהם. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים לבדוק את יחסי KB המתאימים מאחורי התשובות צפויות ולזיהוי אי-תואמות פוטנציאליות. במקום לפתח מודל חדש שמקבל ראיות שנאספו מהמערכות יחסים האלה, אנחנו בוחרים להחזיר אותן לשאלות המקוריות ישירות ולבדוק אם השאלה המפורסמת הגיונית או לא. LSTM שני כיוונים מושתמש כדי לקוד שאלות משופעות. We develop a scoring mechanism over the revised question encodings to refine the predictions of a base QA system.  הגישה הזאת יכולה לשפר את נקודת F1 של STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), אחת מערכות QA הראשיות, מ-52.5% ל-53.9% על נתוני WEBQUESTIONS.', 'bo': 'གནས་ཡོད་པའི་factoid QA་རིགས་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག ང་ཚོས་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོས་མཐུན་པའི་KB་རིགས་དང་མཐུན་པའི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལྟར་དཔྱད་བྱེད་པར་བསམ་འཆར་ཡོད། འདི་ལས་མཐུན་པའི་རྟོགས་བཤད་ཆེན་དང་ལེན་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གསར་བ འཇུག་སྣེ་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་ཀྱི་LSTM་ཞིག་བསྐྱར་གསོ་ཡོད་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གསང་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྐབས་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་པ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་རྨང་གཞི་QA་མ་ལག་གི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་བཤེར་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། This approach can improve the F1 score of STAGG (Yih et al., 2015), one of the leading QA systems, from 52.5% to 53.9% on WEBQUESTIONS data.'}
{'en': 'An empirical study on the effectiveness of images in Multimodal Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'دراسة تجريبية عن فعالية الصور في الترجمة الآلية العصبية متعددة الوسائط', 'es': 'Un estudio empírico sobre la eficacia de las imágenes en la traducción automática neuronal multimodal', 'pt': 'Um estudo empírico sobre a eficácia de imagens na tradução automática neural multimodal', 'fr': "Une étude empirique sur l'efficacité des images dans la traduction automatique neuronale multimodale", 'ja': 'マルチモーダルニューラルマシン翻訳における画像の有効性に関する実証的研究', 'ru': 'Эмпирическое исследование эффективности изображений в мультимодальном нейронном машинном переводе', 'zh': '图像在多模态神经机器翻译中有效性实', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद में छवियों की प्रभावशीलता पर एक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन', 'ga': 'Staidéar eimpíreach ar Éifeachtúlacht na n-íomhánna in Aistriúchán Inneall Néarach Ilmhódúil', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια εμπειρική μελέτη για την αποτελεσματικότητα των εικόνων στην Πολυmodale Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση', 'hu': 'empirikus tanulmány a képek hatékonyságáról multimodális neurális fordításban', 'it': "Uno studio empirico sull'efficacia delle immagini nella traduzione automatica multimodale neurale", 'kk': 'КөпModal Neural Machine аудармасындағы кескіндердің эффективнігін империялық зерттеу', 'lt': 'empirinis vaizdų veiksmingumo daugiarūšio nervinių mašin ų vertimo metu tyrimas', 'mk': 'Емпирична студија за ефикасноста на сликите во мултимедалната неурална машинска транслекција', 'ms': 'An empirical study on the effectiveness of images in Multimodal Neural Machine Translation', 'ml': 'Multimodal Neural Machine പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d ചിത്രങ്ങളുടെ പ്രകൃതിയെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു ശാസ്ത്രീയ പഠി', 'mn': 'Олон моделийн мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлтийн үр дүнтэй тухай эзэмшигтэй судалгаа', 'mt': 'Studju empiriku dwar l-effikaċja tal-immaġni fit-Traduzzjoni Multimodali tal-Magni Newrali', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Badanie empiryczne nad skutecznością obrazów w multimodalnym neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'ro': 'Un studiu empiric privind eficacitatea imaginilor în traducerea automată multimodală neurală', 'sr': 'Empirička studija o učinkovitosti slika u multimodalnom neuronskom prevodu mašine', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Waxbarasho ku saabsan saameynta sawirada ee turjumidda machine badan', 'ta': 'Multimodal Neural Machine மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் படங்களின் விளைவு பற்றிய ஒரு முக்கியமான ஆய்வு', 'sv': 'En empirisk studie om effekten av bilder i multimodal neural maskinöversättning', 'ur': 'Multimodal Neural Machine Translation میں تصاویروں کے فعالیت کے بارے میں ایک مغربی تحقیق', 'vi': 'Một nghiên cứu thực tế về hiệu quả của ảnh trong việc dịch chuyển máy thần kinh đa phương', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Een empirische studie naar de effectiviteit van beelden in multimodale neurale machinevertaling', 'de': 'Eine empirische Studie zur Effektivität von Bildern in multimodaler neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung', 'bg': 'Емпирично изследване на ефективността на изображенията в мултимодалния неврален машинен превод', 'hr': 'Empiričko ispitivanje o učinkovitosti slika u multimodalnom neuronskom prevodu stroja', 'da': 'En empirisk undersøgelse af effektiviteten af billeder i multimodal neural maskinoversættelse', 'ko': '다중모드신경기계번역에서의 이미지 유효성 실증 연구', 'sw': 'An empirical study on the effectiveness of images in Multimodal Neural Machine Translation', 'tr': 'Çoklumodal Näral Maşynyň terjimesinde resimler etkinlik barada empirik öwrenmek', 'fa': 'یک مطالعه امپراتیک در مورد فعالیت تصاویر در ترجمه ماشین عصبی چندیmodal', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Պատկերների արդյունավետության էմպիրիկ ուսումնասիրությունը բազմամոդալ նյարդային մեքենաների թարգմանման մեջ', 'am': 'በMultimodal Neural Machine ትርጉም ላይ የምስልቶች ጥያቄ ላይ', 'id': 'An empirical study on the effectiveness of images in Multimodal Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Empiričko ispitivanje o učinkovitosti slika u multimodalnom neuronskom prevodu stroja', 'ca': "Un estudi empíric sobre l'eficacia de les imatges en la traducció multimodal de màquines neuronals", 'sq': 'Një studim empirik mbi efektshmërinë e imazheve në Translation Multimodal Neural Machine', 'et': 'Empiiriline uuring piltide efektiivsuse kohta multimodaalses neurotõlkes', 'az': 'Multimodal N칲ral Makinel톛rin T톛rc칲m칲nd톛 g칬r칲nt칲l톛rin efektivit톛ti haqq캼nda empirik t톛hsil', 'fi': 'Empiirinen tutkimus kuvien tehokkuudesta multimodaalisessa neurokäännöksessä', 'bn': 'An empirical study on the effectiveness of images in Multimodal Neural Machine Translation', 'cs': 'Empirická studie efektivity obrazů v multimodálním neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'jv': 'Workspace', 'ha': 'An jarraba littafin kewaye kan aikin zane cikin Tafsiri na Mai Motsi', 'sk': 'Empirična študija o učinkovitosti slik v multimodalnem živčnem strojnem prevajanju', 'he': 'מחקר אמפרי על היעילות של תמונות בתרגום מכונות נוירות רבות', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་གཞུང་གི་མ་དངུལ་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་བརྙན་རིས་ལ་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), an attention mechanism is used during decoding to enhance the translation. At every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to gather the most useful information before outputting its target word. Recently, the effectiveness of the attention mechanism has also been explored for multi-modal tasks, where it becomes possible to focus both on sentence parts and image regions that they describe. In this paper, we compare several attention mechanism on the multi-modal translation task (English, image   German) and evaluate the ability of the model to make use of images to improve translation. We surpass state-of-the-art scores on the Multi30k data set, we nevertheless identify and report different misbehavior of the machine while translating.', 'ar': 'في أحدث تقنيات الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ، يتم استخدام آلية الانتباه أثناء فك التشفير لتحسين الترجمة. في كل خطوة ، يستخدم مفكك الشفرة هذه الآلية للتركيز على أجزاء مختلفة من الجملة المصدر لجمع المعلومات الأكثر فائدة قبل إخراج الكلمة المستهدفة. في الآونة الأخيرة ، تم استكشاف فعالية آلية الانتباه أيضًا للمهام متعددة الوسائط ، حيث يصبح من الممكن التركيز على أجزاء الجملة ومناطق الصورة التي يصفونها. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بمقارنة العديد من آليات الانتباه حول مهمة الترجمة متعددة الوسائط (الإنجليزية ، الصورة ← الألمانية) وتقييم قدرة النموذج على الاستفادة من الصور لتحسين الترجمة. لقد تجاوزنا أحدث الدرجات في مجموعة بيانات Multi30k ، ومع ذلك فإننا نحدد ونبلغ عن سوء سلوك مختلف للآلة أثناء الترجمة.', 'es': 'En la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) de última generación, se utiliza un mecanismo de atención durante la decodificación para mejorar la traducción. En cada paso, el decodificador utiliza este mecanismo para centrarse en diferentes partes de la oración fuente para recopilar la información más útil antes de emitir su palabra objetivo. Recientemente, también se ha explorado la eficacia del mecanismo de atención para tareas multimodales, donde es posible centrarse tanto en las partes de la oración como en las regiones de la imagen que describen. En este artículo, comparamos varios mecanismos de atención en la tarea de traducción multimodal (inglés, imagen → alemán) y evaluamos la capacidad del modelo para utilizar imágenes para mejorar la traducción. Superamos los puntajes más avanzados en el conjunto de datos Multi30k, sin embargo, identificamos e informamos sobre diferentes comportamientos incorrectos de la máquina durante la traducción.', 'pt': 'Na tradução automática neural (NMT) de última geração, um mecanismo de atenção é usado durante a decodificação para aprimorar a tradução. Em cada etapa, o decodificador usa esse mecanismo para se concentrar em diferentes partes da frase de origem para reunir as informações mais úteis antes de emitir sua palavra-alvo. Recentemente, a eficácia do mecanismo de atenção também tem sido explorada para tarefas multimodais, onde se torna possível focar tanto nas partes da frase quanto nas regiões da imagem que elas descrevem. Neste artigo, comparamos vários mecanismos de atenção na tarefa de tradução multimodal (inglês, imagem → alemão) e avaliamos a capacidade do modelo de fazer uso de imagens para melhorar a tradução. Superamos pontuações de última geração no conjunto de dados Multi30k, mas identificamos e relatamos diferentes comportamentos incorretos da máquina durante a tradução.', 'ja': '最先端の神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）では、デコード中に注意メカニズムが翻訳を強化するために使用されます。すべてのステップで、デコーダは、このメカニズムを使用して、ソース文の異なる部分に焦点を当て、ターゲット単語を出力する前に最も有用な情報を収集する。最近では、マルチモーダルタスクについても注意メカニズムの有効性が検討されており、文章部分とそれらが記述する画像領域の両方に焦点を当てることが可能となっている。本稿では、マルチモーダル翻訳タスク（英語、イメージ→ドイツ語）のいくつかの注意メカニズムを比較し、画像を活用して翻訳を改善するモデルの能力を評価する。当社は、Multi 30 kデータセットの最先端のスコアを上回りますが、翻訳中に機械のさまざまな不正行為を特定して報告します。', 'fr': "Dans la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) de pointe, un mécanisme d'attention est utilisé pendant le décodage pour améliorer la traduction. À chaque étape, le décodeur utilise ce mécanisme pour se concentrer sur différentes parties de la phrase source afin de recueillir les informations les plus utiles avant de sortir son mot cible. Récemment, l'efficacité du mécanisme d'attention a également été explorée pour les tâches multimodales, où il devient possible de se concentrer à la fois sur les parties de phrases et les régions d'image qu'elles décrivent. Dans cet article, nous comparons plusieurs mécanismes d'attention sur la tâche de traduction multimodale (anglais, image → allemand) et évaluons la capacité du modèle à utiliser des images pour améliorer la traduction. Nous surpassons les scores les plus récents sur l'ensemble de données Multi30K, mais nous identifions et signalons néanmoins différents comportements erronés de la machine lors de la traduction.", 'hi': 'अत्याधुनिक न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) में, अनुवाद को बढ़ाने के लिए डिकोडिंग के दौरान एक ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग किया जाता है। हर कदम पर, डिकोडर अपने लक्ष्य शब्द को आउटपुट करने से पहले सबसे उपयोगी जानकारी इकट्ठा करने के लिए स्रोत वाक्य के विभिन्न हिस्सों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए इस तंत्र का उपयोग करता है। हाल ही में, ध्यान तंत्र की प्रभावशीलता को बहु-मोडल कार्यों के लिए भी खोजा गया है, जहां वाक्य भागों और छवि क्षेत्रों दोनों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना संभव हो जाता है जो वे वर्णन करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम बहु-मोडल अनुवाद कार्य (अंग्रेजी, छवि → जर्मन) पर कई ध्यान तंत्र की तुलना करते हैं और अनुवाद में सुधार करने के लिए छवियों का उपयोग करने के लिए मॉडल की क्षमता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम Multi30k डेटा सेट पर अत्याधुनिक स्कोर को पार करते हैं, फिर भी हम अनुवाद करते समय मशीन के विभिन्न दुर्व्यवहारों की पहचान और रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'zh': '先进之神经机器翻译(NMT),解码用意机以增译。 凡一步之中,解码器皆用此机以关句句之异,以先输其向单词收其最有用之信。 近求多式之有效性,兼注句与图象区域。 其在本文,较多模态译务(英语,图像→德语)上数种注意机制,并评模形改译之能。 Multi30k数集上越先进之分,而识报机器之不当。', 'ru': 'В современном нейронном машинном переводе (НМП) механизм внимания используется во время декодирования для улучшения перевода. На каждом шаге декодер использует этот механизм для фокусировки на различных частях исходного предложения, чтобы собрать наиболее полезную информацию перед выводом своего целевого слова. В последнее время была также изучена эффективность механизма внимания для мультимодальных задач, где становится возможным сосредоточиться как на частях предложения, так и на регионах изображений, которые они описывают. В этой статье мы сравниваем несколько механизмов внимания к задаче мультимодального перевода (английский, графический → немецкий) и оцениваем способность модели использовать изображения для улучшения перевода. Мы превосходим самые современные оценки по набору данных Multi30k, тем не менее, мы выявляем и сообщаем о различных случаях неправильного поведения машины при переводе.', 'ga': 'In Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach (NMT) úrscothach, úsáidtear meicníocht aird le linn díchódaithe chun an t-aistriúchán a fheabhsú. Ag gach céim, úsáideann an díchódóir an meicníocht seo chun díriú ar chodanna éagsúla den abairt fhoinseach chun an fhaisnéis is úsáidí a bhailiú sula n-aschuireann sé a spriocfhocal. Le déanaí, rinneadh iniúchadh freisin ar éifeachtúlacht an mheicníocht aire do thascanna ilmhódacha, nuair is féidir díriú ar chodanna abairte agus ar réigiúin íomhá a ndéanann siad cur síos orthu. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid comparáid idir meicníocht aird éagsúla ar an tasc aistriúcháin ilmhódúil (Béarla, íomhá → Gearmáinis) agus meastóireacht a dhéanamh ar chumas an mhúnla úsáid a bhaint as íomhánna chun an t-aistriúchán a fheabhsú. Sáraíonn muid scóir úrscothacha ar thacar sonraí Multi30k, mar sin féin sainaithnímid agus tuairiscímid mí-iompar difriúil ar an meaisín agus an t-aistriúchán á dhéanamh againn.', 'ka': 'სიცოცხლის ნეიროლური მაქსინის განსაგულაციაში (NMT) დაახლოების მექსინემი გამოყენება განახლოების განსაგულაციაში. ყოველ ნაგულისხმებში, დეკოდირები გამოყენება ამ მექანიზმის განსხვავებული ნაწილზე ფონსკურება, რომ ყველაზე საჭირო ინფორმაცია დაიყენებთ მისი მიზეზი სიტყ მხოლოდ მოდიალური დავალებებისთვის აფექტიურება, რომელიც შესაძლებელია გავაკეთოთ სიტყვების ნაწილზე და გამოსახულების რეგიონზე. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ მრავალური მონაცემების მექანემისთვის მრავალური მოცემების რაოდენობას (ანგლისური, გამოსახულები “ გერმანური”) და მოდელის შესაძლებლობა გამოყენება გამოყ ჩვენ მეტი30k მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის სტატის სტატის სტატიდან გადავიწყებთ და განვიცემოთ განსხვავებული შეცდომა მონაცემების განსხვავება მაქსინის შეცდომაში.', 'hu': 'A legkorszerűbb Neural Machine Translation (NMT) esetében a dekódolás során figyelemre méltó mechanizmust használnak a fordítás javítására. A dekóder minden lépésnél ezt a mechanizmust használja arra, hogy a forrás mondat különböző részeire összpontosítson, hogy összegyűjtse a leghasznosabb információkat, mielőtt kiadja a célszót. Az utóbbi időben a figyelemmechanizmus hatékonyságát a multimodális feladatok esetében is vizsgálták, ahol lehetővé válik mind a mondatrészekre, mind az általuk leírt képrégiókra összpontosítani. Ebben a tanulmányban összehasonlítjuk a multimodális fordítási feladatra vonatkozó több figyelemmechanizmust (angol, német kép) és értékeljük, hogy a modell képesek-e a fordítás javítására használni a képeket. Meghaladjuk a Multi30k adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb pontszámokat, azonban fordítás közben azonosítjuk és jelentjük a gép eltérő rossz viselkedését.', 'el': 'Στην υπερσύγχρονη Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT), χρησιμοποιείται ένας μηχανισμός προσοχής κατά την αποκωδικοποίηση για την ενίσχυση της μετάφρασης. Σε κάθε βήμα, ο αποκωδικοποιητής χρησιμοποιεί αυτόν τον μηχανισμό για να επικεντρωθεί σε διαφορετικά μέρη της πρότασης προέλευσης για να συγκεντρώσει τις πιο χρήσιμες πληροφορίες πριν από την εξαγωγή της λέξης στόχου του. Πρόσφατα, η αποτελεσματικότητα του μηχανισμού προσοχής έχει διερευνηθεί επίσης για εργασίες πολλαπλών τρόπων, όπου καθίσταται δυνατή η εστίαση τόσο σε τμήματα προτάσεων όσο και σε περιοχές εικόνας που περιγράφουν. Σε αυτή την εργασία, συγκρίνουμε διάφορους μηχανισμούς προσοχής στην εργασία πολυμορφικής μετάφρασης (αγγλικά, εικόνα γερμανικά) και αξιολογούμε την ικανότητα του μοντέλου να χρησιμοποιεί εικόνες για τη βελτίωση της μετάφρασης. Υπερτερούμε τις τελευταίες βαθμολογίες στο σύνολο δεδομένων Εντοπίζουμε και αναφέρουμε διαφορετική κακή συμπεριφορά του μηχανήματος κατά τη μετάφραση.', 'it': "Nella traduzione automatica neurale all'avanguardia (NMT), durante la decodifica viene utilizzato un meccanismo di attenzione per migliorare la traduzione. Ad ogni passo, il decoder utilizza questo meccanismo per concentrarsi su diverse parti della frase di origine per raccogliere le informazioni più utili prima di pubblicare la sua parola di destinazione. Recentemente, l'efficacia del meccanismo di attenzione è stata esplorata anche per i compiti multimodali, dove diventa possibile concentrarsi sia sulle parti di frase che sulle regioni di immagine che descrivono. In questo articolo, confrontiamo diversi meccanismi di attenzione sul compito di traduzione multimodale (inglese, immagine tedesca) e valutiamo la capacità del modello di utilizzare le immagini per migliorare la traduzione. Superiamo i punteggi all'avanguardia sul set di dati Multi30k, tuttavia identifichiamo e riportiamo diversi comportamenti scorretti della macchina durante la traduzione.", 'kk': 'Жұмыс күйінде нейрондық машинаның аудармасында (NMT) аудармасын көтеру үшін декодтау үшін қызықтық механизмі қолданылады. Әрбір қадамда декодер осы механизмті көзінің түрлі бөлшектеріне назар ауыстыру үшін мақсатты мәліметті жинау үшін қолданады. Соңғы уақытта, бірнеше модалдық тапсырмалардың механизмінің эффектілігі де зерттеді, олардың түсіндірген сөздер бөлшектеріне және кескін бөлшектеріне назар аударуға мүмкін болады. Бұл қағазда біз көп модалдық аудару тапсырмасын (ағылшын, кескіні, неміс) салыстырып, кескіндерді жақсарту үшін қолдану үшін үлгісін қолдану мүмкіндігін бағалаймыз. Біз көп 30k деректер жиынындағы суреттердің күй- жай нәтижелерін өзгертеміз, бірақ компьютердің аударып жатқанда бірнеше қате әрекеттерін анықтап және хабарлаймыз.', 'lt': 'Naujausią laiką vykdant neuroninių mašinų vertimą (NMT) dekoderuojant naudojamas dėmesio mechanizmas vertimui pagerinti. Kiekviename etape dekoderis naudoja šį mechanizmą, kad sutelktų dėmesį į skirtingas pradinio sakinio dalis, kad surinktų naudingiausią informaciją prieš išrašydamas tikslinį žodį. Pastaruoju metu taip pat buvo išnagrinėtas dėmesio mechanizmo veiksmingumas daugiarūšio transporto užduotims, kuriose būtų galima sutelkti dėmesį ir į juose aprašytas sakinių dalis, ir į vaizdo regionus. Šiame dokumente palyginame kelis dėmesio mechanizmus daugiarūšio vertimo užduotims (anglų, vaizdo „ vokiečių “) ir vertiname modelio gebėjimą naudoti vaizdus vertimui pagerinti. Mes viršijame moderniausius Multi30k duomenų rinkinio rezultatus, vis dėlto nustatome ir pranešame apie skirtingą netinkamą mašinos elgesį vertimo metu.', 'mk': 'Во најсовремената превод на неврална машина (НМТ) се користи механизам на внимание за време на декодирање за подобрување на преводот. At every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to gather the most useful information before outputting its target word.  Recently, the effectiveness of the attention mechanism has also been explored for multi-modal tasks, where it becomes possible to focus both on sentence parts and image regions that they describe.  In this paper, we compare several attention mechanism on the multi-modal translation task (English, image   German) and evaluate the ability of the model to make use of images to improve translation.  We surpass state-of-the-art scores on the Multi30k data set, we nevertheless identify and report different misbehavior of the machine while translating.', 'ms': 'Dalam terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT), mekanisme perhatian digunakan semasa penyahkodan untuk meningkatkan terjemahan. Pada setiap langkah, pengekod menggunakan mekanisme ini untuk fokus pada bahagian yang berbeza dari kalimat sumber untuk mengumpulkan maklumat yang paling berguna sebelum mengeluarkan kata sasarannya. Recently, the effectiveness of the attention mechanism has also been explored for multi-modal tasks, where it becomes possible to focus both on sentence parts and image regions that they describe.  Dalam kertas ini, kita membandingkan beberapa mekanisme perhatian pada tugas terjemahan multi modal (Inggeris, imej  Jerman) dan menilai kemampuan model untuk menggunakan imej untuk memperbaiki terjemahan. We surpass state-of-the-art scores on the Multi30k data set, we nevertheless identify and report different misbehavior of the machine while translating.', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- ആർട്ട് ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d (NMT), പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള സമയത്ത് ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ എല്ലാ പടിയിലും ഡെകോഡേര്\u200d ഈ മെക്കോഡിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സോര്\u200dസ് വാക്കിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത Recently, the effectiveness of the attention mechanism has also been explored for multi-modal tasks, where it becomes possible to focus both on sentence parts and image regions that they describe.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല മോഡാല്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്\u200dറെ (ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്\u200c, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്\u200c, ചിത്രം, ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ കഴ മിട്ടിട്ട്രിക് ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് സ്കോര്\u200dസ് കടന്നുപോകുന്നു. എങ്കിലും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d മ', 'mt': 'Fl-aħħar traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali (NMT), jintuża mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni waqt id-dekodifikazzjoni biex titjieb it-traduzzjoni. F’kull pass, id-dekoder juża dan il-mekkaniżmu biex jiffoka fuq partijiet differenti tas-sentenza tas-sors biex jiġbor l-aktar informazzjoni utli qabel ma joħroġ il-kelma fil-mira tiegħu. Dan l-aħħar, l-effettività tal-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni ġiet esplorata wkoll għal kompiti multimodali, fejn isir possibbli li wieħed jiffoka kemm fuq partijiet ta’ sentenza kif ukoll fuq reġjuni ta’ immaġni li jiddeskrivu. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nqabblu diversi mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni dwar il-kompitu tat-traduzzjoni multimodali (Ingliż, immaġni “ Ġermaniż”) u nvalutaw il-kapaċità tal-mudell li jagħmel użu minn immaġni biex itejjeb it-traduzzjoni. Aħna nqabżu l-punteġġi l-aktar avvanzati fis-sett tad-dejta Multi30k, madankollu nidentifikaw u nirrappurtaw imġiba ħażina differenti tal-magna waqt it-traduzzjoni.', 'no': 'I tilstanden av kunsten Neural Machine Translation (NMT) vert eit oppmerksmekanisme brukt under dekodering for å forbetra omsetjinga. På kvar steg brukar dekoderen denne mekanismen for å fokusera på ulike deler av kjeldesetninga for å samla den mest nyttige informasjonen før du skriv ut målordet. Nyleg har det også utforska effektiviteten av oppmerksmekanismen for fleire modal oppgåver, der det blir mogleg å fokusera både på setningsdelen og biletmenyen som dei beskriver. I denne papiret samanliknar vi fleire opplysningsmekanismen på fleire modal omsetjingsprogrammet (engelsk, bilete og tysk) og evaluerer kapasiteten for modellen å bruka bilete for å forbetra omsetjingsprogrammet. Vi overstyrer mellom kunstscorene på datasettet Multi30k, men vi identifiserer og rapporterer ulike feiloppførsel på maskinen mens du overstyrer.', 'pl': 'W najnowocześniejszym neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym (NMT) podczas dekodowania wykorzystywany jest mechanizm uwagi w celu poprawy tłumaczenia. Na każdym kroku dekoder wykorzystuje ten mechanizm, aby skupić się na różnych częściach zdania źródłowego, aby zebrać najbardziej użyteczne informacje przed wydaniem słowa docelowego. Ostatnio badano skuteczność mechanizmu uwagi również w przypadku zadań multimodalnych, w których możliwe jest skupienie się zarówno na częściach zdań, jak i regionach obrazu, które opisują. W artykule porównujemy kilka mechanizmów uwagi na zadanie tłumaczenia multimodalnego (angielski, obraz niemiecki) i oceniamy zdolność modelu do wykorzystania obrazów w celu poprawy tłumaczenia. Przewyższamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki na zbiorze danych Multi30k, jednak identyfikujemy i zgłaszamy różne nieprawidłowe zachowanie maszyny podczas tłumaczenia.', 'ro': 'În traducerea automată neurală de ultimă generație (NMT), un mecanism de atenție este utilizat în timpul decodării pentru a îmbunătăți traducerea. La fiecare pas, decodorul folosește acest mecanism pentru a se concentra pe diferite părți ale propoziției sursă pentru a colecta cele mai utile informații înainte de a afișa cuvântul țintă. Recent, eficiența mecanismului de atenție a fost explorată și pentru sarcinile multimodale, unde devine posibilă concentrarea atât asupra părților propoziției, cât și asupra regiunilor imaginii pe care le descriu. În această lucrare, comparăm mai multe mecanisme de atenție asupra sarcinii de traducere multimodală (engleză, germană imagine) și evaluăm capacitatea modelului de a utiliza imaginile pentru a îmbunătăți traducerea. Depășim scorurile de ultimă generație pe setul de date Multi30k, identificăm și raportăm totuși diferite comportamente eronate ale mașinii în timpul traducerii.', 'si': '@ info: whatsthis හැම පැත්තෙන්, ඩිකෝඩර් මෙම පද්ධතිය භාවිත කරනවා මුළු වාක්ෂාවේ වෙනස් පැත්තෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ  අවසානයෙන්, අවස්ථාවයේ අවස්ථාවයේ අවස්ථාවක් වගේම ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් වැඩක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් අවධානය පද්ධතිය සඳහා ගොඩක් අවධානය අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය කරන්න පින්තූර වර්තනය කරන්න පින්තූර වර්තනය කරන් අපි ගොඩක් 30k දත්ත සූද්ධානයේ ස්ථිතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා, ඒත් අපි පරික්ෂණයේ වෙනස් වැරදි වැරදි විදියට පරි', 'so': 'In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), an attention mechanism is used during decoding to enhance the translation.  Qoraadku wuxuu isticmaalaa mekaniisan si uu ugu kalsoonaado qayb kala duwan oo uu ugu soo ururiyo macluumaadka ugu faa’iidada badan intaan soo saarin ereygiisa goalka. Dhab ahaantii waxaa sidoo kale loo baaraandegay shaqaalaha dhaqaale badan, taas oo suurtagal ah in lagu focuseeyo qaybaha xukunka iyo meelaha sawirka ay ku qoran yihiin. In this paper, we compare several attention mechanism on the multi-modal translation task (English, image   German) and evaluate the ability of the model to make use of images to improve translation.  Sidoo kale waxaynu soo dhaafnaa kooxaha farshaxanka ee kooxda macluumaadka badan, laakiin waxaynu aqoonsannaa oo wargelinaynaa tababaro qalaad oo kala duduwan marka aan turjumno.', 'sv': 'I den senaste Neural Machine Translation (NMT) används en uppmärksamhetsmekanism vid avkodning för att förbättra översättningen. Vid varje steg använder avkodaren denna mekanism för att fokusera på olika delar av källmeningen för att samla in den mest användbara informationen innan dess målord skickas ut. På senare tid har uppmärksamhetsmekanismens effektivitet också undersökts för multimodala uppgifter, där det blir möjligt att fokusera både på meningsdelar och bildregioner som de beskriver. I denna uppsats jämför vi flera uppmärksamhetsmekanismer på den multimodala översättningsuppgiften (engelska, bildtyska) och utvärderar modellens förmåga att använda bilder för att förbättra översättningen. Vi överträffar toppmoderna poäng på Multi30k datauppsättningen, vi identifierar och rapporterar ändå olika fel på maskinen när vi översätter.', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) நிலையில், மொழிபெயர்ப்பை அதிகரிக்கும் போது ஒரு கவனம் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. ஒவ்வொரு படியிலும், குறியீட்டாளர் இந்த முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி மூலத்தின் வாக்கியத்தின் வேறு பகுதிகளில் கவனத்தை செலுத்துகி சமீபத்தில், கவனத்தின் முறைமையின் விளைவும் பல-மாதிரி பணிகளுக்கும் தேடியுள்ளது, அதில் அவர்கள் வரையறுக்கும் வாக்கிய பகுதிகள் மற்றும் பிம இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல மாற்று மொழிமாற்றும் பணியில் பல கவனம் முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் (ஆங்கிலம், பிம்பம் , ஜெர்மன்) மற்றும் மாதிரியின் பயன பல்30k தகவல் அமைப்பில் நாம் கலை மதிப்பெண்களின் நிலையை மாற்றுகிறோம், ஆனாலும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் மாறும் போது மாறுபட்ட இயந்திரத', 'mn': 'Урлагийн мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) дээр анхаарлын механизм хөгжүүлэх үед хэрэглэгддэг. Шагнал бүрт, шийдвэрлэгч нь энэ механизмийг эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрийн өөр хэсэг дээр анхаарлаа хандуулахын тулд хамгийн хэрэгтэй мэдээлэл цуглуулахын тулд ашигладаг. Саяхан анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмийн үр дүнтэй байдал мөн олон моделийн даалгавруудын тулд судалж, тэдний тайлбарлаж буй өгүүлбэр болон зураг бүс нутагт анхаарлаа хандуулах боломжтой болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон моделийн орчуулалтын ажлыг (Англи, зураг, Герман) харьцуулж, зураг хөгжүүлэхийн тулд загварын хэрэглэх чадварыг үнэлдэг. Бид Multi30k өгөгдлийн хэмжээний хувьд урлагийн үзүүлэлтийг илүү өндөртэй. Гэхдээ бид машины өөр буруу үйл явдлыг олж мэднэ.', 'ur': 'ایرٹ کی نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) میں ایک توجه مکانیسم ڈیکوڈ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ Every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to collect the most useful information before outputing its target word. اچھے سے، توجه کے مکانیسم کی تابعداری مکانیسم بھی بہت سی موڈال کاموں کے لئے تحقیق کی گئی ہے، جہاں یہ باتوں اور تصویر کے منطقه پر تمرکز کرنا ممکن ہوتا ہے جسے وہ بیان کرتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت سی موڈال ترجمہ کا کام (انگلیسی، تصویر ،جرمن) کے بارے میں بہت سی توجه کا مکانیسم مقایسہ کرتے ہیں اور مکانیسم کے قابلیت کو ترجمہ کے لئے استعمال کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ ہم Multi30k ڈیٹ سٹ کے موقعیت کے اسکور سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتے ہیں، مگر ہم نے ماشین کی مختلف غلط رفتار کو پہچان لیا اور راپورت کر لیا ہے جبکہ اس کا ترجمہ کرتا ہے.', 'sr': 'U state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), koristi se mehanizam pažnje tokom dekodiranja kako bi poboljšali prevod. Na svakom koraku, dekoder koristi ovaj mehanizam da se fokusira na različite dijelove izvorne rečenice da skupi najkorisniju informaciju pre nego što izvede svoju ciljnu reč. Nedavno je učinkovitost mehanizma pažnje istražena i za višemodalne zadatke, gdje je moguće fokusirati se na dijelove rečenica i regione slika koje opisuju. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo nekoliko mehanizma pažnje o multimodalnom prevodnom zadatku (engleski, slika i njemački) i procjenjujemo sposobnost modela da iskoristi slike kako bi poboljšali prevod. Prelazimo rezultate umetnosti na kompletu multi30k podataka, ipak identifikujemo i prijavljujemo različite pogrešne ponašanje mašine dok prevodimo.', 'uz': "@ info Har bir qadam, oddiy foydalanuvchi bu mechanisdan foydalanadi, manba soʻzning boshqa qismlariga foydalanadi. Yaqinda, ko'plab-modal vazifalar uchun foydalanuvchi mekaning effekti qidirildi. Bu yerda gapir qismlari va rasm qismlariga foydalanishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda biz ko'pchilik modal tarjima vazifani (Ingliz, rasm, Olmoncha) bir necha qiymatimiz va tarjima qilish uchun rasmlarni ishlatish imkoniyatini qiymatimiz. Biz Multi30k maʼlumotlar tarkibida saqlash holati holatini bajaramiz. Ammo, biz tarjima qilayotganda boshqa uskunalarni aniqlash va xabar beramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong phiên dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) được sử dụng một cơ chế tập trung trong thời gian giải mã để nâng cao dịch vụ. Ở mỗi bước, bộ giải mã dùng cơ chế này để tập trung vào các phần khác nhau của câu từ nguồn để thu thập những thông tin hữu ích nhất trước khi phát ra từ đích. Gần đây, cũng đã được nghiên cứu về hiệu quả của cơ chế tập trung cho các nhiệm vụ đa phương, nơi có thể tập trung cả vào các phần câu và các vùng hình ảnh mà họ mô tả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi so sánh nhiều cơ chế tập trung về nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển đa phương (Anh, ảnh Đức) và đánh giá khả năng của mô hình sử dụng ảnh để cải thiện dịch thuật. Chúng ta vượt qua điểm hiện đại trên bộ dữ liệu đa 30k, chúng ta không thể xác định và báo cáo sai lầm của cỗ máy trong khi dịch chuyển.', 'bg': 'В най-съвременния неврален машинен превод (НМТ) механизъм за внимание се използва по време на декодирането за подобряване на превода. На всяка стъпка декодерът използва този механизъм, за да се фокусира върху различни части от изречението на източника, за да събере най-полезната информация, преди да излезе целевата си дума. Наскоро е проучена ефективността на механизма за внимание и за мултимодални задачи, където става възможно да се съсредоточи както върху части от изречения, така и върху регионите на изображението, които те описват. В настоящата статия сравняваме няколко механизма на внимание върху задачата за мултимодален превод (английски, немски образ) и оценяваме способността на модела да използва изображения за подобряване на превода. Надминаваме най-съвременните резултати в набора от данни, въпреки това идентифицираме и докладваме за различно лошо поведение на машината по време на превод.', 'da': 'I state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) anvendes en opmærksomhedsmekanisme under afkodning for at forbedre oversættelsen. Ved hvert trin bruger dekoderen denne mekanisme til at fokusere på forskellige dele af kildesætningen for at indsamle de mest nyttige oplysninger, før den udsender sit målord. For nylig er opmærksomhedsmekanismens effektivitet også blevet undersøgt for multimodale opgaver, hvor det bliver muligt at fokusere både på sætningsdele og billedregioner, som de beskriver. I denne artikel sammenligner vi flere opmærksomhedsmekanismer på den multimodale oversættelsesopgave (engelsk, billedtysk) og evaluerer modellens evne til at gøre brug af billeder til at forbedre oversættelsen. Vi overgår state-of-the-art scores på Multi30k datasættet, vi identificerer og rapporterer ikke desto mindre forskellige fejladfærd af maskinen under oversættelsen.', 'de': 'In der modernen Neural Machine Translation (NMT) wird während der Dekodierung ein Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus verwendet, um die Übersetzung zu verbessern. Bei jedem Schritt nutzt der Decoder diesen Mechanismus, um sich auf verschiedene Teile des Quellsatzes zu konzentrieren, um die nützlichsten Informationen zu sammeln, bevor er sein Zielwort ausgibt. Kürzlich wurde die Wirksamkeit des Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus auch für multimodale Aufgaben untersucht, bei denen es möglich wird, sich sowohl auf Satzteile als auch auf Bildregionen zu konzentrieren, die sie beschreiben. In diesem Beitrag vergleichen wir verschiedene Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen auf die multimodale Übersetzungsaufgabe (Englisch, Bilddeutsch) und bewerten die Fähigkeit des Modells, Bilder zur Verbesserung der Übersetzung zu nutzen. Wir übertreffen State-of-the-Art Scores auf dem Multi30k Datensatz, dennoch identifizieren und melden wir unterschiedliche Fehlverhalten der Maschine während der Übersetzung.', 'id': 'Dalam penerjemah mesin saraf terbaik (NMT), mekanisme perhatian digunakan selama dekoding untuk meningkatkan penerjemah. At every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to gather the most useful information before outputting its target word.  Baru-baru ini, efektivitas mekanisme perhatian juga telah dieksplorasi untuk tugas multi modal, di mana menjadi mungkin fokus pada bagian kalimat dan daerah gambar yang mereka deskripsikan. Dalam kertas ini, kita membandingkan beberapa mekanisme perhatian pada tugas terjemahan multi modal (Inggris, gambar ) dan mengevaluasi kemampuan model untuk menggunakan gambar untuk memperbaiki terjemahan. Kita melebihi skor terbaik pada set data Multi30k, namun kita mengidentifikasi dan melaporkan kelakuan yang berbeda dari mesin saat menerjemahkan.', 'nl': 'Bij state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) wordt tijdens decodering een aandachtsmechanisme gebruikt om de vertaling te verbeteren. Bij elke stap gebruikt de decoder dit mechanisme om zich te concentreren op verschillende delen van de bronzin om de meest nuttige informatie te verzamelen voordat het doelwoord wordt uitgegeven. Onlangs is ook gekeken naar de effectiviteit van het aandachtsmechanisme voor multimodale taken, waarbij het mogelijk wordt om zowel zinsdelen als beeldgebieden die ze beschrijven te focussen. In dit artikel vergelijken we verschillende aandachtsmechanismen op de multimodale vertaaltaak (Engels, beeld Duits) en evalueren we het vermogen van het model om gebruik te maken van afbeeldingen om de vertaling te verbeteren. We overtreffen state-of-the-art scores op de Multi30k dataset, we identificeren en rapporteren desondanks afwijkend gedrag van de machine tijdens het vertalen.', 'hr': 'U state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) koristi se mehanizam pažnje tijekom dekodiranja kako bi poboljšao prevod. Na svakom koraku, dekoder koristi ovaj mehanizam kako bi se fokusirao na različite dijelove izvorne rečenice kako bi skupili najkorisnije informacije prije izlaganja ciljne riječi. Nedavno je učinkovitost mehanizma pažnje istražena i za višemodalne zadatke, gdje je moguće fokusirati se na dijelove kazne i regije slike koje opisuju. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo nekoliko mehanizma pažnje o multimodalnom prevodnom zadatku (engleski, slika i njemački) i procjenjujemo sposobnost modela koristiti slike kako bi poboljšali prevod. Prelazimo rezultate umjetnosti na setu podataka Multi30k, ipak identificiramo i prijavljamo različite pogrešne ponašanje stroja dok se prevodimo.', 'sw': 'In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), an attention mechanism is used during decoding to enhance the translation.  At every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to gather the most useful information before outputting its target word.  Hivi karibuni, ufanisi wa mfumo wa ufuatiliaji pia umekuwa ukitafuta kwa ajili ya kazi nyingi za utamaduni, ambapo inawezekana kuweka makini kwenye sehemu za hukumu na maeneo ya picha wanazoelezea. Katika karatasi hii, tunalinganisha mfumo kadhaa wa kutanganisha kazi ya kutafsiri kwa njia mbalimbali (Kiingereza, picha na Ujerumani) na kutathmini uwezo wa muundo wa kutengeneza picha ili kuboresha tafsiri. Tunapitia vipindi vya sanaa kwenye seti ya takwimu za takwimu zaidi ya 30, hata hivyo tunatambua na kuripoti tabia mbalimbali za mashine wakati tunatafsiri.', 'ko': '최첨단 신경기계번역(NMT)에서 디코딩 과정에서 주의 메커니즘을 사용하여 번역을 강화한다.모든 단계에서 디코더는 이러한 메커니즘을 사용하여 원시 문장의 다른 부분을 주목하여 목표 단어를 출력하기 전에 가장 유용한 정보를 수집하도록 한다.최근에 주의력 메커니즘이 다중모드 임무에서의 유효성도 탐색되었다. 다중모드 임무에서 사람들은 문장 부분과 그들이 묘사한 이미지 구역을 동시에 주목할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 다중모드적 번역 임무(영어, 이미지 독일어) 중의 몇 가지 주의 메커니즘을 비교하고 이 모델이 이미지를 이용하여 번역 능력을 향상시키는 것을 평가했다.우리는 Multi30k 데이터 세트에서 가장 선진적인 수준을 초과했지만, 번역할 때 기계의 서로 다른 오류 행위를 식별하고 보고했다.', 'fa': 'در ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) ایالت هنری یک مکانیسم توجه در زمان تغییرات برای افزایش ترجمه استفاده می\u200cشود. در هر قدم، dekoder از این مکانیسم استفاده می\u200cکند تا روی بخش\u200cهای مختلف از جمله منبع تمرکز کند تا اطلاعات مفید\u200cترین را قبل از خروج کلمه هدف خود جمع کند. اخیراً فعالیت مکانیسم توجه برای کار های بسیار متفاوت هم کشف شده است، جایی که ممکن است هر دو روی بخش\u200cهای جمله و منطقه\u200cهای تصویری که توصیف می\u200cکنند تمرکز کند. در این کاغذ، ما چندین مکانیسم توجه را بر روی تکلیف ترجمه\u200cهای چندین مدل (انگلیسی، تصویر \u200cآلمانی) مقایسه می\u200cکنیم و توانایی مدل برای استفاده از تصویر برای تغییر دادن ارزش می\u200cدهیم. ما در مجموعه داده های متعدد 30 کیلومتر از موقعیت هنری بیشتر از آن می گذریم، ولی ما در حال تغییر دادن به اشتباه های مختلف دستگاه شناسایی و گزارش گزارش می کنیم.', 'af': "In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), word 'n aandag mekanisme gebruik tydens dekodering om die vertaling te verbeter. Op elke stap gebruik die dekoder hierdie mekanisme om op verskillende dele van die bron seting te fokus om die mees bruikbare inligting te versamel voor die uitvoer van sy doelwoord. Onlangs is die effektiviteit van die aandagmekanisme ook uitgesoek vir multimodale opdragte, waar dit moontlik word om beide fokus te word op setelsdele en beeldregione wat hulle beskrywe. In hierdie papier vergelyk ons verskeie aandag mekanisme op die multimodale vertaling taak (Engels, beeld  Duits) en evalueer die moontlikheid van die model om beelde te gebruik om vertaling te verbeter. Ons verbygaan die state-of-the-art telling op die Multi30k data stel, ons identifiseer en rapporteer verskillende misgedrag van die masjien terwyl vertaling word.", 'tr': 'Surat taýýarlanan Neural Maşynyň terjimesinde (NMT) terjime etmek üçin bir üns mehanizmini açmak üçin ullanýar. Her adımda, kodçy bu mekanizamy çeşme sözleriniň beýleki bölgelerine fokus etmek üçin ullanýar. Soňky wagtda, üns meýdançasynyň etkinlik mekanizmasynyň hem birnäçe modal zady üçin gözlenýär. Bu ýerde hem sözler böleklerine hem surat bölgelerine üns bermek mümkin. Bu kagyzda, biz birnäçe modal terjime etmek üçin örän üns meýdançasyny (iňlis, surat  nemesçe) we suratlaryň terjime etmek üçin nusganyň ukypyny çykarýarys. Biz Multi30k veri düzeninde möhüm noktalary üstüne geçirip, ýöne maşynyň terjime edilýän başga bir ýalňyş hereketini tanap we bildirip bilýäris.', 'sq': 'Në përkthimin e makinës nervore (NMT), një mekanizëm vëmendjeje përdoret gjatë dekodimit për të përmirësuar përkthimin. Në çdo hap, dekoderi përdor këtë mekanizëm për të përqëndruar në pjesë të ndryshme të fjalës së burimit për të mbledhur informacionin më të dobishëm përpara se të nxjerrë fjalën e tij objektiv. Kohët e fundit, efektshmëria e mekanizmit të vëmendjes është eksploruar gjithashtu për detyrat multimodale, ku bëhet e mundur të përqëndrohet si në pjesët e fjalëve ashtu edhe në rajonet e imazhit që ato përshkruajnë. Në këtë letër, ne krahasojmë disa mekanizma vëmendjeje në detyrën e përkthimit multi modal (anglisht, imazh  gjerman) dhe vlerësojmë aftësinë e modelit për të përdorur imazhet për të përmirësuar përkthimin. Ne kapërcejmë rezultatet më të mira në grupin e të dhënave Multi30k, megjithatë identifikojmë dhe raportojmë sjellje të ndryshme të keqe të makinës ndërsa përkthejmë.', 'am': 'በሀገር-አርእስት የኔural machine ትርጓሜ (NMT), ትርጓሜውን ለማበርታት በመክፈት ድምፅ የተጠቃሚ ሚስኮት ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በሁሉም ደረጃዎች፣ አዲስ አካባቢ ይህንን መክፈት በተለዩ ክፍሎች ላይ ማስታወቂያ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በቅርብ ዘመን የጥያቄ አካባቢ አካባቢ ሥርዓት ለብዙዎች ሥርዓቶች ተፈጥሮአል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም በብዙ-ሞዴል ትርጉም ሥራ (እንግሊዝኛ፣ ምስል፣ ጀርመን) እና የምሳሌውን ምስሎች ለማሻሻል የሚችሉትን እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ በMulti30k ዳታዎች ላይ የልዩ ልዩ ጥያቄዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': 'Sanat nöral mašin tərcümündə (NMT) tərcümünü art ırmaq üçün dəyişiklik məktəbinə istifadə edilir. Hər adımda, dekoder bu mehānismu mənbə sözlərinin farklı parçalarına odaqlanmaq üçün məqsəd sözünü çıxartmadan əvvəl ən faydalı məlumatları toplamaq üçün istifadə edir. Son zamanlarda, gözləmə mehanizmisinin etkinliği də çoxlu modal işlər üçün keşfedildi. Bu cümlət parçalarına və surat bölgelerinə də odaklanması mümkün olar. Bu kağızda, çoxlu modal çeviriş işini (İngilizce, surat “ Alman ” məlumatı ) ilə müxtəlif məlumat mehanizmasını salırıq və çəkişmək üçün modelinin istifadə etmə bacarılığını değerləşdiririk. Biz Multi30 k veri qutusundakı sanat nöqtələrindən üstün gəlirik, amma biz maşının fərqli davranışlarını tərcümə edərkən tanıyırıq və bildiririk.', 'bn': 'রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) অনুবাদের বৃদ্ধি করার সময় একটি মনোযোগ মেকানিজ ব্যবহার করা হয়। প্রত্যেক ধাপে ডেকোডার এই মেকোডার ব্যবহার করে উৎসের বিভিন্ন অংশের দিকে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে তার লক্ষ্য শব্দ প্রদানের আগে সবচেয়ে  সম্প্রতি মোডাল কাজের জন্য মনোযোগ মাধ্যমের কার্যকর্মের কার্যক্রম অনুসন্ধান করা হয়েছে, যেখানে তারা বর্ণনা করেছে বাক্যের অংশ এবং ছবি অঞ্চলের দ In this paper, we compare several attention mechanism on the multi-modal translation task (English, image   German) and evaluate the ability of the model to make use of images to improve translation.  আমরা মাল্টি৩০ক ডাটা সেটে শিল্পের পরিস্থিতির স্কোর অতিক্রম করি, কিন্তু অনুবাদ করার সময়ে আমরা মেশিনের ভিন্ন ভুল আচরণ চিহ্নিত করি এবং', 'cs': 'V nejmodernějším neuronovém strojovém překladu (NMT) se při dekódování používá mechanismus pozornosti, který zlepšuje překlad. Při každém kroku dekodér používá tento mechanismus k zaměření se na různé části zdrojové věty, aby shromáždil nejužitečnější informace před výstupem cílového slova. V poslední době byla zkoumána účinnost mechanismu pozornosti i pro multimodální úkoly, kde je možné se zaměřit jak na části vět, tak na oblasti obrazu, které popisují. V tomto článku porovnáváme několik mechanismů pozornosti na multimodální překladatelskou úlohu (angličtina, obrazová němčina) a hodnotíme schopnost modelu využít obrazy ke zlepšení překladu. Překonáváme nejmodernější skóre na datové sadě Multi30k, nicméně identifikujeme a hlásíme různé nesprávné chování stroje při překladu.', 'et': 'Tipptasemel neuroaalses masintõlkes (NMT) kasutatakse dekodeerimisel tähelepanumehhanismi tõlke parandamiseks. Igal sammul kasutab dekooder seda mehhanismi, et keskenduda lähtelause erinevatele osadele, et koguda kõige kasulikumat teavet enne sihtsõna väljastamist. Hiljuti on uuritud tähelepanumehhanismi tõhusust ka mitmeliigiliste ülesannete puhul, kus on võimalik keskenduda nii lauseosadele kui ka nende kirjeldatud pildipiirkondadele. Käesolevas töös võrdleme mitmeid tähelepanumehhanisme multimodaalse tõlke ülesandel (inglise, saksa pildi) ja hindame mudeli võimet kasutada pilte tõlke parandamiseks. Me ületame Multi30k andmekogumi tipptasemel hinded, kuid sellegipoolest tuvastame ja teatame masina erinevast väärkäitumisest tõlkimise ajal.', 'bs': 'U state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT) se koristi mehanizam pažnje tijekom dekodiranja kako bi poboljšao prevod. Na svakom koraku, dekoder koristi ovaj mehanizam da se fokusira na različite dijelove izvorne rečenice kako bi skupili najkorisniju informaciju prije izlaganja ciljne riječi. Nedavno je učinkovitost mehanizma pažnje istražena i za multimodalne zadatke, gdje je moguće fokusirati se na dijelove rečenica i regione slika koje opisuju. U ovom papiru uspoređujemo nekoliko mehanizma pažnje o multimodalnom prevodnom zadatku (engleski, slika i njemački) i procjenjujemo sposobnost modela da se iskoristi slike kako bi poboljšali prevod. Prelazimo rezultate umjetnosti na setu multi30k podataka, ipak identificiramo i prijavljamo različite pogrešne ponašanje mašine dok prevodimo.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaisessa hermokonekäännöksessä (NMT) käytetään huomiomekanismia kääntämisen tehostamiseksi dekoodauksen aikana. Jokaisessa vaiheessa dekooderi käyttää tätä mekanismia keskittyäkseen lähdelauseen eri osiin kerätäkseen hyödyllisimmät tiedot ennen kohdesanan julkaisemista. Viime aikoina huomiomekanismin tehokkuutta on tutkittu myös multimodaalisissa tehtävissä, joissa on mahdollista keskittyä sekä lauseen osiin että kuvaalueisiin, joita ne kuvaavat. Tässä työssä vertaillaan useita multimodaalisen käännöksen huomiomekanismeja (englanti, kuva saksa) ja arvioidaan mallin kykyä hyödyntää kuvia kääntämisen parantamiseksi. Ylitämme huipputason pisteet Multi30k-aineistossa, mutta tunnistamme ja raportoimme koneen erilaisesta väärinkäytöksestä kääntämisen aikana.', 'hy': 'In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), an attention mechanism is used during decoding to enhance the translation.  At every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to gather the most useful information before outputting its target word.  Վերջերս ուշադրության մեխանիզմի արդյունավետությունը նաև ուսումնասիրել է բազմամոդալ խնդիրների համար, որտեղ հնարավոր է կենտրոնանալ նախադասությունների մասերի և նկարագրված պատկերների վրա: In this paper, we compare several attention mechanism on the multi-modal translation task (English, image   German) and evaluate the ability of the model to make use of images to improve translation.  Մենք գերազանցում ենք մեծա30k տվյալների համակարգի ամենաբարձր գնահատականները, այնուամենայնիվ մենք հայտնաբերում ենք և զեկում ենք մեքենայի տարբեր սխալ վարքագիծը թարգմանելու ժամանակ:', 'ca': "In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), an attention mechanism is used during decoding to enhance the translation.  At every step, the decoder uses this mechanism to focus on different parts of the source sentence to gather the most useful information before outputting its target word.  Recently, the effectiveness of the attention mechanism has also been explored for multi-modal tasks, where it becomes possible to focus both on sentence parts and image regions that they describe.  En aquest paper, comparem diversos mecanismes d'atenció sobre la tasca de traducció multi modal (anglès, imatge) i evaluem l'habilitat del model d'utilitzar imatges per millorar la traducció. Superem les puntuacions més modernes del conjunt de dades Multi30k, no obstant això, identificem i reportem diferents comportaments errònics de la màquina mentre traduem.", 'he': 'In state-of-the-art Neural Machine Translation (NMT), an attention mechanism is used during decoding to enhance the translation.  בכל צעד, המתקן משתמש במנגנון הזה כדי להתמקד בחלקים שונים של המשפט המקורי כדי לאסוף את המידע הכי שימושי לפני שיוציא את מילתו המטרה. לאחרונה, היעילות של מנגנון תשומת לב גם נחקרה עבור משימות רבות-מודליות, היכן שהופך אפשרי להתמקד גם בחלקים משפטיים וגם באזור התמונה שהם מתארים. בעיתון הזה, אנו שווים מספר מנגנון תשומת לב על משימת התרגום המולטר-מודלית (אנגלית, תמונה ). אנו מעליים את הציונים המאודניים ביותר על קבוצת נתונים Multi30k, בכל מקרה אנחנו מזהה ולדווח על התנהגות לא נכונה שונה של המכונה בזמן התרגום.', 'jv': 'Nang stad-karcis Mahine Terjamahan (NMT), kang dipunangkapan kanggo nggawe ngupakan urip nggawe tarjamahan. Awak dhéwé, dekompok usahaan mejane iki nggawe ngubah apakno sing dibutuhke dolanan kanggo nggawe informasi sing luwih apik dhéwé iso nggawe tarjamahan. Dijehan, efek karo mecanisasi nggunaké aturan tapi iki dadi multi-modal Nang mapir iki, kita komparasi sistem sing sampeyan karo akeh operasi kanggo nyebutaké itlanjut multi modal Learn Mode', 'sk': 'V najsodobnejšem nevralnem strojnem prevajanju (NMT) se med dekodiranjem uporablja mehanizem pozornosti za izboljšanje prevoda. Na vsakem koraku dekoder uporablja ta mehanizem, da se osredotoči na različne dele izvornega stavka, da zbere najbolj koristne informacije, preden izda ciljno besedo. V zadnjem času je bila raziskana tudi učinkovitost mehanizma pozornosti pri multimodalnih nalogah, kjer se je mogoče osredotočiti na dele stavkov in podobne regije, ki jih opisujejo. V prispevku primerjamo več mehanizmov pozornosti na nalogo multimodalnega prevajanja (angleščina, nemščina slike) in ocenimo sposobnost modela, da uporabi slike za izboljšanje prevajanja. Na podatkovnem naboru Multi30k presegamo najsodobnejše rezultate, kljub temu pa ugotavljamo in poročamo o različnih napačnih vedenjih stroja med prevajanjem.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Koda duk ƙõfõfi, koda ya yi amfani da wannan alama don ya fokus a kan rabo biyu na maganar source dõmin ya sami tsarin da mafi amfani da shi a gabãnin ya fito maganar goansa. A yanzu, an buɗe Effekt na masu aikin muhimmada masu yawa, inda za'a iya fokus a kan rabo-filin da zane-zane da su faɗa. Daga wannan takardan, muna samfanar da wasu masu aikin muhalli kan aikin fassarar-multi-modal (Ingiriya, zane , zane /jerin) kuma munã ƙaddara awon ayukan ayuka da za'a yi amfani da zanen don ya kyautata fassarar. Mu kiyaye halin-sanar kan tsarin multi-30, kuma amma, muna gane kuma munã warar da abun zane-zane ko da za'a fassara.", 'bo': 'དེ་ལ་གནས་སྟངས་དང་གནས་སྟངས་དང་དབུལ་གྱི་མིའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་པ(NMT)ནང་དུ་ཉར་ཚོད་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་འདི་སྒྲིག་གཏ གོང ཉེ་ཆར་བར་བྱུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། མ་འདྲ་བྱུང་བའི་ཚིག་སྒྲུང་ཚ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྣ་ཚོགས་འདྲ་བ་དང་སྦྱར་བ་སྟེ། ང་ཚོས་སྣང་ཚུལ་རག་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ཚོར་ཕར་ཆེན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Sound-Word2Vec : Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'ar': 'Sound-Word2Vec: تعلم تمثيلات الكلمات متأصلة في الأصوات', 'es': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Aprendizaje de representaciones de palabras basadas en sonidos', 'fr': 'Sound-Word2Vec\xa0: Apprentissage de représentations de mots fondées sur des sons', 'pt': 'Sound-Word2Vec: aprendendo representações de palavras fundamentadas em sons', 'ja': 'Sound - Word 2 Vec ：サウンドに基づいた単語表現の学習', 'ru': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Учебные представления слов, основанные на звуках', 'zh': 'Sound-Word2Vec:学基于声单词', 'hi': 'Sound-Word2Vec: सीखना वर्ड अभ्यावेदन ध्वनियों में आधारित', 'ga': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Ag Foghlaim Léiriúcháin Focal Bunaithe i bhFuaimeanna', 'ka': 'Sound- Word2Vec: Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'el': 'Ήχος-Word2Vec: Μάθηση των αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων με βάση τους ήχους', 'hu': 'Sound-Word2Vec: A hangokban alapozott szóreprezentációk tanulása', 'it': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Imparare le rappresentazioni delle parole basate sui suoni', 'lt': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'kk': 'Дыбыс- сөздер2Vec: Оқылған сөздерді таңдау', 'mk': 'Sound- Word2Vec: Претставувања на зборови за учење основани во звуки', 'ms': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Membelajar Perwakilan Kata Ditanamkan dalam Bunyi', 'ml': 'ശബ്ദം- വാര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്ക്: ശബ്ദങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വാക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem tat-tagħlim ibbażati fuq il-ħoss', 'mn': 'Дуу-Word2Vec: Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'no': 'Lyd- ord 2Vec: Læring av ord- representasjonar grunnlagt i lydar', 'pl': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Uczenie się reprezentacji słowa uziemione w dźwiękach', 'ro': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Învățarea reprezentărilor Word întemeiate în sunete', 'sr': 'Zvuk-Word2Vec: Učenje predstavljanja riječi podignuta u zvukovima', 'so': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'si': 'Phonon:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF:: MMF', 'sv': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Att lära sig ordrepresentationer grundade i ljud', 'ta': 'ஒலி- வார்த்தை2வெக்: ஒலிகளில் உள்ள வார்த்தை பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக்கொள்வது', 'ur': 'Sound- Word2Vec: Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'uz': 'Tovush', 'vi': 'Sound-Word2Veck: Learning Word Representation under Âm thanh', 'bg': 'Звук-Word2Vec: Учене на думи представяния, основани в звуци', 'nl': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Woordrepresentaties leren op basis van geluiden', 'da': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Læring af ordrepræsentationer bundet i lyde', 'hr': 'Zvuk- Word2Vec: učenje riječi predstavljanja pod zvukovima', 'id': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Learning Word Representation Grounded in Sounds', 'de': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Lernen von Wortrepräsentationen auf Basis von Sounds', 'fa': 'Sound- Word2Vec: Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds', 'ko': 'Sound-Word2Vec: 사운드 기반 단어 표현 학습', 'sw': 'Sauti-Word2Vec: Kufundisha Maandamano ya Kweli yaliyoongezeka katika Sauti', 'tr': 'Sesi Duruz', 'af': 'Klank- Word2Vec: Leer woord voorstellings Grounded in klanke', 'sq': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të fjalëve bazuar në tinguj', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ድምፅ', 'az': 'Ses', 'bn': 'শব্দ-ওয়ার্ড২ভেক: শব্দের প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি', 'bs': 'Zvuk-Word2Vec: učenje predstavljanja riječi podignuta u zvukovima', 'ca': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Aprendre representacions de paraules basades en sons', 'cs': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Učení se reprezentace slov uzemněné ve zvucích', 'et': 'Sound-Word2Vec: helides põhinevate sõnade esituste õppimine', 'fi': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Ääniin pohjautuvien sanaesitysten oppiminen', 'jv': '2vector-mode', 'he': 'Sound-Word2Vec: לימוד מייצגים מילים מבוססים בקולים', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Sound-Word2Vec: Učenje besednih predstavitev, ki temeljijo na zvokih', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་སྐད་-Word2Vec:Learning Word Representations Grounded in Sounds'}
{'en': 'To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound   a primary modality of human perception. Previous works have used sound to learn embeddings for improved generic semantic similarity assessment. In this work, we treat sound as a first-class citizen, studying downstream 6textual tasks which require aural grounding. To this end, we propose sound-word2vec   a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds. For example, we learn that two seemingly (semantically) unrelated concepts, like leaves and paper are similar due to the similar rustling sounds they make. Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies). Moreover, our embedding space captures interesting dependencies between words and onomatopoeia and outperforms prior work on aurally-relevant word relatedness datasets such as AMEN and ASLex.', 'ar': 'لتكون قادرًا على التفاعل بشكل أفضل مع البشر ، من الضروري للآلات أن تفهم الصوت - طريقة أساسية للإدراك البشري. استخدمت الأعمال السابقة الصوت لتعلم حفلات الزفاف لتحسين تقييم التشابه الدلالي العام. في هذا العمل ، نتعامل مع الصوت كمواطن من الدرجة الأولى ، ندرس 6 مهام نصية تتطلب أساسًا سمعيًا. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح sound-word2vec - مخطط تضمين جديد يتعلم تضمين الكلمات المتخصصة المتأصلة في الأصوات. على سبيل المثال ، نتعلم أن هناك مفهومين غير مرتبطين ظاهريًا (دلاليًا) ، مثل الأوراق والورق متشابهان بسبب أصوات الحفيف المماثلة التي يصدرونها. تثبت حفلات الزفاف لدينا أنها مفيدة في المهام النصية التي تتطلب التفكير السمعي مثل استرجاع الصوت المستند إلى النص واكتشاف مؤثرات Foley الصوتية (المستخدمة في الأفلام). علاوة على ذلك ، فإن مساحة التضمين لدينا تلتقط التبعيات المثيرة للاهتمام بين الكلمات والمحاكاة الصوتية وتتفوق على العمل السابق على مجموعات البيانات المرتبطة بالكلمات ذات الصلة السمعية مثل AMEN و ASLex.', 'fr': "Pour mieux interagir avec les humains, il est essentiel que les machines comprennent le son, une modalité fondamentale de la perception humaine. Des travaux antérieurs ont utilisé le son pour apprendre les intégrations afin d'améliorer l'évaluation de similarité sémantique générique. Dans ce travail, nous traitons le son comme un citoyen de première classe, étudiant 6 tâches textuelles en aval qui nécessitent une mise à la terre sonore. À cette fin, nous proposons sound-word2vec, un nouveau système d'intégration qui apprend les intégrations de mots spécialisés fondées sur des sons. Par exemple, nous apprenons que deux concepts apparemment (sémantiquement) indépendants, comme les feuilles et le papier, sont similaires en raison des bruits de bruissement similaires qu'ils émettent. Nos intégrations s'avèrent utiles dans les tâches textuelles nécessitant un raisonnement auditif, comme la récupération de sons textuels et la découverte d'effets sonores de Foley (utilisés dans les films). De plus, notre espace d'intégration capture les dépendances intéressantes entre les mots et les onomatopées et surpasse les travaux antérieurs sur des ensembles de données de parenté de mots pertinents sur le plan auditif tels que AMEN et ASLex.", 'es': 'Para poder interactuar mejor con los humanos, es fundamental que las máquinas entiendan el sonido, una modalidad principal de la percepción humana. Trabajos anteriores han utilizado el sonido para aprender incrustaciones para mejorar la evaluación de similitud semántica genérica. En este trabajo, tratamos el sonido como un ciudadano de primera clase, estudiando 6 tareas textuales posteriores que requieren una conexión a tierra auditiva. Con este fin, proponemos sound-word2vec, un nuevo esquema de incrustación que aprende incrustaciones de palabras especializadas basadas en sonidos. Por ejemplo, aprendemos que dos conceptos aparentemente (semánticamente) no relacionados, como las hojas y el papel, son similares debido a los crujidos que emiten. Nuestras incrustaciones resultan útiles en tareas textuales que requieren razonamiento auditivo, como la recuperación de sonido basada en texto y el descubrimiento de efectos de sonido Foley (utilizados en películas). Además, nuestro espacio de incrustación captura dependencias interesantes entre las palabras y la onomatopeya y supera el trabajo anterior en conjuntos de datos de relación verbal relevantes para el oído, como AMEN y ASLex.', 'pt': 'Para poder interagir melhor com os humanos, é crucial que as máquinas entendam o som – uma modalidade primária da percepção humana. Trabalhos anteriores usaram o som para aprender embeddings para melhorar a avaliação de similaridade semântica genérica. Neste trabalho, tratamos o som como um cidadão de primeira classe, estudando 6 tarefas textuais a jusante que requerem aterramento auditivo. Para isso, propomos sound-word2vec – um novo esquema de incorporação que aprende incorporações de palavras especializadas baseadas em sons. Por exemplo, aprendemos que dois conceitos aparentemente (semanticamente) não relacionados, como folhas e papel, são semelhantes devido aos sons semelhantes de farfalhar que fazem. Nossos embeddings são úteis em tarefas textuais que exigem raciocínio auditivo, como recuperação de som baseada em texto e descoberta de efeitos sonoros de Foley (usados em filmes). Além disso, nosso espaço de incorporação captura dependências interessantes entre palavras e onomatopeias e supera o trabalho anterior em conjuntos de dados de relacionamento de palavras relevantes, como AMEN e ASLex.', 'ja': '人間とより良く交流できるようにするには、機械が人間の知覚の主要なモダリティである音を理解することが重要です。これまでの著作は、一般的な意味論的類似性評価を改善するために、埋め込みを学習するためにサウンドを使用してきました。この作品では、音を一級市民として扱い、音響アースを必要とする下流の6つのテクストタスクを研究しています。この目的のために、私たちはsound – word 2 vecを提案します。これは、サウンドに基づいた特殊なワード埋め込みを学習する新しい埋め込みスキームです。たとえば、葉と紙のような、一見（意味的に）無関係な2つの概念が似ていることを学びます。当社の埋め込みは、テキストベースのサウンド検索やフォーリーサウンド効果（映画で使用）の発見など、音声推論を必要とするテキストタスクに役立つことが証明されています。さらに、私たちの埋め込みスペースは、単語とオノマトペアの間の興味深い依存関係を捉え、AMENやASLexなどの音響関連の単語関連性データセットの以前の研究を上回ります。', 'zh': '为善与人互动,机器知音至重-此感知之要也。 前事已用声学嵌,以改善通用语义相似性评估。 于此声为公民,下流须听6。 为sound-word2vec-一新嵌,可学声专词嵌。 如知两似(语义上)不相关,如叶与纸,声相似沙沙声相似。 臣等所以听理有用,如本声检索Foley声效(施于电影)。 此外嵌空获单词、拟声词间有趣,且优于前听相关者单词相关性数据集(如AMEN、ASLex)之事。', 'ru': 'Чтобы иметь возможность лучше взаимодействовать с людьми, важно, чтобы машины понимали звук – основной способ человеческого восприятия. Предыдущие работы использовали звук для изучения вложений для улучшения общей оценки семантического сходства. В этой работе мы относимся к звуку как к первоклассному гражданину, изучая нижележащие 6текстовые задачи, требующие слухового заземления. С этой целью мы предлагаем sound-word2vec - новую схему встраивания, которая изучает специализированные вкладыши слов, основанные на звуках. Например, мы узнаем, что два кажущихся (семантически) несвязанных понятия, такие как листья и бумага, похожи из-за похожих шелестящих звуков, которые они издают. Наши вложения оказываются полезными в текстовых задачах, требующих слуховых рассуждений, таких как извлечение звука на основе текста и обнаружение звуковых эффектов Фоули (используемых в фильмах). Кроме того, наше пространство вложений фиксирует интересные зависимости между словами и ономатопеей и превосходит предыдущую работу над наборами данных о связи слов, имеющими отношение к слуху, такими как AMEN и ASLex.', 'hi': 'मनुष्यों के साथ बेहतर बातचीत करने में सक्षम होने के लिए, मशीनों के लिए ध्वनि को समझना महत्वपूर्ण है - मानव धारणा का एक प्राथमिक तरीका। पिछले कार्यों ने बेहतर सामान्य शब्दार्थ समानता मूल्यांकन के लिए एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए ध्वनि का उपयोग किया है। इस काम में, हम ध्वनि को प्रथम श्रेणी के नागरिक के रूप में मानते हैं, डाउनस्ट्रीम 6टेक्स्टुअल कार्यों का अध्ययन करते हैं, जिनके लिए ऑरल ग्राउंडिंग की आवश्यकता होती है। इस अंत के लिए, हम ध्वनि-word2vec का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - एक नई एम्बेडिंग योजना जो ध्वनियों में आधारित विशेष शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखती है। उदाहरण के लिए, हम सीखते हैं कि दो प्रतीत होता है (शब्दार्थ) असंबंधित अवधारणाएं, जैसे कि पत्तियां और कागज समान सरसराहट ध्वनियों के कारण समान हैं। हमारे embeddings पाठ आधारित ध्वनि पुनर्प्राप्ति और Foley ध्वनि प्रभाव (फिल्मों में इस्तेमाल किया जाता है) की खोज की तरह aural तर्क की आवश्यकता होती है कि पाठ्य कार्यों में उपयोगी साबित होते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारा एम्बेडिंग स्पेस शब्दों और ओनोमेटोपोइया के बीच दिलचस्प निर्भरताओं को कैप्चर करता है और AMEN और ASLex जैसे aurally-प्रासंगिक शब्द संबंधितता डेटासेट पर पूर्व काम को बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Le bheith in ann idirghníomhú níos fearr le daoine, tá sé ríthábhachtach go dtuigeann meaisíní an fhuaim – príomh-mhódúlacht de mheon daonna. Bhain saothair roimhe seo úsáid as fuaim chun leabú a fhoghlaim do mheasúnú cosúlachta séimeantach cineálach feabhsaithe. Sa saothar seo, caithfimid le fuaim mar shaoránach den chéad scoth, ag déanamh staidéir ar thascanna iartheachtacha 6théacsúla a dteastaíonn bunús éisteachta leo. Chuige sin, molaimid sound-word2vec – scéim leabaithe nua a fhoghlaimíonn leabú focal speisialaithe bunaithe ar fhuaimeanna. Mar shampla, tuigimid go bhfuil dhá choincheap nach bhfuil gaolmhar (semantach) cosúil leo, cosúil le duilleoga agus páipéar cosúil le chéile mar gheall ar na fuaimeanna corracha cosúla a dhéanann siad. Bíonn ár n-leabaithe úsáideach i dtascanna téacs a éilíonn réasúnú éisteachta cosúil le haisghabháil fuaime bunaithe ar théacs agus maisíochtaí fuaime Foley a fháil amach (a úsáidtear i scannáin). Ina theannta sin, áiríonn ár spás neadaithe spleáchais spéisiúla idir focail agus onomatopoeia agus sáraíonn sé an obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar thacair sonraí a bhaineann le focail a bhaineann le clos ar nós AMEN agus ASLex.', 'el': 'Για να είναι σε θέση να αλληλεπιδρούν καλύτερα με τους ανθρώπους, είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για τις μηχανές να κατανοήσουν τον ήχο, μια κύρια μορφή ανθρώπινης αντίληψης. Προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν χρησιμοποιήσει ήχο για να μάθουν ενσωμάτωση για βελτιωμένη γενική εκτίμηση σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας. Σε αυτό το έργο, αντιμετωπίζουμε τον ήχο ως έναν πολίτη πρώτης τάξεως, μελετώντας μεταγενέστερα 6κειμενικά καθήκοντα που απαιτούν ακουστική γείωση. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε ένα νέο σχέδιο ενσωμάτωσης που μαθαίνει εξειδικευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων θεμελιωμένες σε ήχους. Για παράδειγμα, μαθαίνουμε ότι δύο φαινομενικά (σημασιολογικά) άσχετες έννοιες, όπως τα φύλλα και το χαρτί, είναι παρόμοιες λόγω των παρόμοιων ήχων που κάνουν. Οι ενσωματώσεις μας αποδεικνύονται χρήσιμες σε εργασίες κειμένου που απαιτούν ακουστικό συλλογισμό, όπως η ανάκτηση ήχου με βάση το κείμενο και η ανακάλυψη ηχητικών εφέ Foley (που χρησιμοποιούνται σε ταινίες). Επιπλέον, ο χώρος ενσωμάτωσης μας καταγράφει ενδιαφέρουσες εξαρτήσεις μεταξύ λέξεων και νοματοποιίας και ξεπερνά προηγούμενες εργασίες σε σύνολα δεδομένων σχετικά με την ακουστική σχέση λέξεων όπως το AMEN και το ASLex.', 'hu': 'Ahhoz, hogy jobban tudjanak interakcióba lépni az emberekkel, kulcsfontosságú, hogy a gépek megértsék a hangot - az emberi észlelés elsődleges módja. Korábbi munkák hangot használtak a beágyazások tanulására a jobb általános szemantikai hasonlóság értékeléséhez. Ebben a munkában első osztályú polgárként kezeljük a hangot, a lejáratban 6 olyan szöveges feladatokat tanulmányozva, amelyek hangföldelést igényelnek. Ebből a célból javasoljuk a sound-word2vec - egy új beágyazási séma, amely megtanulja a speciális szóbeágyazásokat hangokra alapozva. Például megtanuljuk, hogy két látszólag (szemantikailag) független fogalom, például a levelek és a papír hasonló zörgési hangok miatt hasonló. Beágyazásaink hasznosnak bizonyulnak olyan szöveges feladatokban, amelyek hangérvelést igényelnek, mint a szövegalapú hangvisszahívás és a Foley hangeffektusok felfedezése (filmekben). Ezenkívül beágyazási területünk érdekes függőségeket rögzít a szavak és az onomatopéia között, és felülmúlja a korábbi, hangjellegű szókapcsolatokkal kapcsolatos adatkészleteken végzett munkákat, mint például AMEN és ASLex.', 'it': "Per poter interagire meglio con gli esseri umani, è fondamentale che le macchine comprendano il suono - una modalità primaria di percezione umana. I lavori precedenti hanno utilizzato il suono per imparare le incorporazioni per migliorare la valutazione generica della somiglianza semantica. In questo lavoro, trattiamo il suono come un cittadino di prima classe, studiando a valle 6 compiti testuali che richiedono messa a terra sonora. A tal fine, proponiamo sound-word2vec - un nuovo schema di embedding che impara incorporazioni di parole specializzate basate sui suoni. Ad esempio, impariamo che due concetti apparentemente (semanticamente) non correlati, come foglie e carta, sono simili a causa del fruscio simile che emettono. Le nostre incorporazioni si rivelano utili in attività testuali che richiedono ragionamenti sonori come il recupero del suono basato sul testo e la scoperta degli effetti sonori Foley (utilizzati nei film). Inoltre, il nostro spazio di incorporazione cattura dipendenze interessanti tra parole e onomatopeia e supera il lavoro precedente su set di dati relativi alle parole rilevanti per l'audio come AMEN e ASLex.", 'kk': 'Адамдармен жақсы үйлесімді көмектесу үшін машиналардың дыбысты түсіну - адамдардың негізгі түсініктері үшін маңызды. Алдыңғы жұмыстар жалпы семантикалық ұқсас бағалау үшін ендіруді үйрену үшін дыбыс қолданылады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, бірінші класс ақпарат ретінде дыбыс сәйкес береміз, 6 мәтіндік тапсырмаларды оқу керек. Бұл үшін біз дыбыс сөздері2vec - дыбыстағы арнаулы сөздердің ендіру сұлбасын үйренеді. Мысалы, біз екі (semantically) қағаз және қағаз жақсы ұқсастырып жатқан ұқсастығын білеміз. Біздің ендіруіміз мәтін негіздеген дыбыс алу және Foley дыбыс эффекттерін (фильмдерде қолданылатын) тапсырмаларда пайдалы болады. Сонымен қатар, біздің ендіру кеңістігіміз сөздер мен ономатопоея арасындағы қызықты тәуелдіктерімізді түсіндіреді. Мысалы AMEN және ASLex секілді мәліметтеріңіздің алдыңғы сөздердің қатынас', 'lt': 'To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound - a primary modality of human perception.  Previous works have used sound to learn embeddings for improved generic semantic similarity assessment.  Šiame darbe mes vertiname garsą kaip pirmosios klasės piliečią, studijuodami tolesnes 6 tekstines užduotis, kurioms reikalingas garso pagrindas. Šiuo tikslu siūlome garso žodžių2vec - naują įterpimo sistemą, kuri moko specializuotus žodžių įterpimus, grindžiamus garsais. For example, we learn that two seemingly (semantically) unrelated concepts, like leaves and paper are similar due to the similar rustling sounds they make.  Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  Be to, mūsų įterpiama erdvė apima įdomias žodžių ir onomatopoezijos priklausomybes ir atlieka ankstesnį darbą dėl garsiai svarbių žodžių ryšio duomenų rinkinių, pvz., AMEN ir ASLex.', 'mk': 'За да може подобро да интерактира со луѓето, клучно е машините да го разберат звукот - примарна моделност на човечката перцепција. Претходните дела користеа звук за учење на вградувања за подобрена генерална семантична оценка на сличност. In this work, we treat sound as a first-class citizen, studying downstream 6textual tasks which require aural grounding.  To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds.  На пример, научивме дека двата изгледа (семантично) неповрзани концепти, како што се листата и хартијата се слични поради сличните звуци кои ги прават. Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  Moreover, our embedding space captures interesting dependencies between words and onomatopoeia and outperforms prior work on aurally-relevant word relatedness datasets such as AMEN and ASLex.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരോട് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d തമ്മില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നതാണ്, ശബ്ദം മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ശബ്ദം പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ സെമാന്\u200dറിക്ക് സമമായ വ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യ-ക്ലാസിന്റെ പൌരനാണെന്ന് കരുതുന്നു, ആദ്യത്തെ ക്ലാസില്\u200d നിന്ന് 6 ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d ജോലികള്\u200d പഠ ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശബ്ദത്തില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ അംഗീകരിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതി പഠിക്കുന്നു. For example, we learn that two seemingly (semantically) unrelated concepts, like leaves and paper are similar due to the similar rustling sounds they make.  Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ഒണോമാട്ടോപ്പോയിയ്ക്കും തമ്മില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ആശ്രയിതമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനു മുമ്പ് ബ്രാ', 'mt': "Biex ikunu jistgħu jinteraġixxu a ħjar mal-bnedmin, huwa kruċjali li l-magni jifhmu l-ħoss - modalità primarja tal-perċezzjoni tal-bniedem. Xogħlijiet preċedenti użaw ħoss biex jitgħallmu inkorporazzjonijiet għal valutazzjoni ġenerika ta’ similarità semantika mtejba. F’dan ix-xogħol, jittrattaw il-ħoss bħala ċittadin ta’ l-ewwel klassi, billi nistudjaw xogħlijiet testwali ‘l isfel li jeħtieġu bażi awrali. Għal dan il-għan, qed nipproponu sound-word2vec - skema ġdida ta' inkorporazzjoni li tagħlim l-inkorporazzjoni speċjalizzata tal-kliem ibbażata fuq il-ħoss. Pereżempju, nitgħallmu li żewġ kunċetti li jidhru (semantikament) mhux relatati, bħall-weraq u l-karta huma simili minħabba l-ħsejjes simili li jagħmlu. Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  Barra minn hekk, l-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni tagħna jaqbad dipendenzi interessanti bejn il-kliem u l-onomatopoeja u jwettaq ħidma preċedenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta dwar ir-relazzjoni tal-kliem auralment rilevanti bħall-AMEN u l-ASLex.", 'ms': 'To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound - a primary modality of human perception.  Kerja-kerja terdahulu telah menggunakan bunyi untuk belajar pelengkapan untuk penilaian kesempatan semantik yang lebih baik. In this work, we treat sound as a first-class citizen, studying downstream 6textual tasks which require aural grounding.  To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds.  Contohnya, kita belajar bahawa dua konsep yang kelihatan (semantik) tidak berkaitan, seperti daun dan kertas adalah sama kerana bunyi rustling yang sama mereka buat. Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  Moreover, our embedding space captures interesting dependencies between words and onomatopoeia and outperforms prior work on aurally-relevant word relatedness datasets such as AMEN and ASLex.', 'pl': 'Aby móc lepiej współdziałać z ludźmi, kluczowe jest, aby maszyny zrozumiały dźwięk będący podstawową modalnością ludzkiej percepcji. Poprzednie prace używały dźwięku do nauki osadzeń w celu ulepszenia ogólnej oceny podobieństwa semantycznego. W tej pracy traktujemy dźwięk jako obywatela pierwszej klasy, badając kolejne zadania 6tekstowe, które wymagają uziemienia słuchowego. W tym celu proponujemy sound-word2vec, nowy schemat osadzania, który uczy się specjalistycznych osadzeń słów opartych na dźwiękach. Na przykład dowiadujemy się, że dwa pozornie (semantycznie) niepowiązane pojęcia, takie jak liście i papier, są podobne ze względu na podobne szelest dźwięków, które wydają. Nasze osadzenia okazują się przydatne w zadaniach tekstowych wymagających rozumowania słuchowego, takich jak tekstowe odzyskiwanie dźwięku i odkrywanie efektów dźwiękowych Foley (używanych w filmach). Ponadto, nasza przestrzeń osadzania rejestruje interesujące zależności między słowami a onomatopeią i przewyższa poprzednie prace nad istotnymi dla słuchu zbiorami danych dotyczących powiązania słów, takimi jak AMEN i ASLex.', 'ro': 'Pentru a putea interacționa mai bine cu oamenii, este esențial ca mașinile să înțeleagă sunetul - o modalitate primară de percepție umană. Lucrările anterioare au folosit sunetul pentru a învăța încorporări pentru a îmbunătăți evaluarea semantică similară generică. În această lucrare, tratăm sunetul ca un cetățean de primă clasă, studiind în aval 6 sarcini textuale care necesită împământare audio. În acest scop, propunem sound-word2vec - o nouă schemă de încorporare care învață încorporarea specializată a cuvintelor bazate pe sunete. De exemplu, învățăm că două concepte aparent (semantic) fără legătură, cum ar fi frunzele și hârtia sunt similare datorită sunetelor similare pe care le fac. Încorporările noastre se dovedesc utile în sarcinile textuale care necesită raționament audio, cum ar fi recuperarea sunetului pe bază de text și descoperirea efectelor sonore Foley (utilizate în filme). Mai mult decât atât, spațiul nostru de încorporare capturează dependențe interesante între cuvinte și onomatopoeie și depășește lucrările anterioare pe seturi de date relevante pentru cuvinte, cum ar fi AMEN și ASLex.', 'no': 'For å vera i stand til å vera bedre saman med mennesker, er det viktig for maskiner å forstå lyd - ein primærmodalitet av menneske oppfatning. Førre arbeidar har brukt lyd for å læra innbygging for forbedra generiske semantisk liknande vurdering. I denne arbeiden behandler vi lyd som eit fyrstklassesbord, og studerer nedstrekk seks tekstoppgåver som krev aural bakgrunn. I denne slutten foreslår vi lydsord2vec - eit nytt innbyggingsoppsett som lærer spesialisert ordinnbygging basert på lydar. For eksempel lærer vi at to ulike (semantisk) ubelaterte konseptar, som blar og papir er liknande på grunn av dei liknande rustlingslydane dei lager. Innebyggane våre viser nyttig i tekstoppgåver som krev aural- rasjon som tekstbasert lyd- henting og oppdaging av Foley- lyd- effektar (brukt i filmar). Det innebygde mellomromet har også interessante avhengighet mellom ord og onomatopoeia og utfører førre arbeid på datasett av ordrelaterte som AMEN og ASLex.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүстэй илүү харилцаж чадахын тулд машинууд дуу ойлгох нь чухал. Хүмүүсийн ойлголтын анхны арга зам юм. Өмнөх үйл ажиллагаанууд дуу холбогдолтыг сайжруулахын тулд ашигладаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид дуу анхны хичээлийн иргэн мэт харьцуулж, зургаан суурилгах шаардлагатай 6textual tasks судлаж байна. Энэ төгсгөлд бид дуу-үг 2vec - сонсогдож байгаа мэргэжлийн үг нэвтрүүлэх схемийг суралцдаг. Жишээлбэл, бид хоёр харьцангуй харьцангуй ойлголтыг ойлгож суралцдаг. Яг л навь, цаас шиг харьцангуй дуу шиг. Бидний бичлэг нь текст ажиллагаанд хэрэглэгддэг. Текст суурилсан дуу авах болон Фоли дуу эффектүүдийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй. Мөн бидний нэвтрүүлэх орон зай нь үг болон номатопойа хоорондох сонирхолтой хамааралтай байдаг. МАНЭН болон АСЛекс зэрэг аль хэдийн хамааралтай үг өгөгдлийн сан дээр ажилладаг.', 'so': 'Waa muhiim in mashiinadaha la garto codka - qaabka ugu horeeya aragtida biniaadamka. Shuqullada hore waxay u isticmaaleen cod si ay u barto habka kordhiska qiimeynta isku mid ah. Shaqadan waxaa loola macaamiloonaa muwaadin u dhashay fasalka kowaad, waxaynu barannaa shaqooyinka hoose-hoose ee 6-qoraal ah oo u baahan qoraalka. Taas darteed waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qorshaha codka 2vec oo cusub oo ka barta hadal gaar ah oo cod ku qoran. Tusaale ahaan waxaynu barnaa in laba fikrada aan la jeedin sida caleemo iyo warqado ay u eg yihiin cod isku mid ah oo ay sameeyaan. Xiriiriyadayada ayaa faa’iido u leh shuqullada qoraalka oo loo baahan yahay sabab bur ah, sida dib u soo qaadashada codka qoraalka iyo sidoo kale la ogaanayo saamaynta codka Foley (filimada lagu isticmaalo). Moreover, our embedding space captures interesting dependencies between words and onomatopoeia and outperforms prior work on aurally-relevant word relatedness datasets such as AMEN and ASLex.', 'sr': 'Da bi se moglo bolje mijenjati sa ljudima, ključno je za mašine da razumeju zvuk - glavni modalitet ljudskog percepcije. Prethodni radovi su koristili zvuk kako bi naučili integraciju za poboljšanu generalnu semantičku procenu sličnosti. U ovom poslu, tretiramo zvuk kao građanin prve klase, proučavajući niz šest tekstualnih zadataka koji zahtevaju auralnu području. Za ovaj cilj predlažemo zvuk rečeni2vec - novu šemu ugrađenja koja uči specijalizovane rečenice ugrađene na zvukovima. Na primer, naučimo da su dve (semantički) nezavisne koncepte, poput lišća i papira slične zbog sličnih zvukova koje rade. Naše ugrađenje dokazuju korisno u tekstualnim zadacima koji zahtevaju auralnu razumnost kao što su povlačeni zvukovi na tekstu i otkrivanje zvukovih efekta Foley (korištenih u filmovima). Osim toga, naš ugrađeni prostor uhvati zanimljive zavisnosti između rijeèi i onomatopoeije i iznosi prethodni rad na podacima povezanosti sa auralno relevantnim riječima poput AMEN i ASLex.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු එක්ක හොඳයි සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, මෙහින්ස් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ  මුලින් වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්තික සාමාන්තික සාමාන්තික විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා සංවිධානය ඉගෙන ගන්න ශ මේ වැඩේදී, අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරධානයෙක් විදියට ශබ්ද විදියට ගන්නවා, පළමු ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරධානයෙක් විදියට 6text මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි ශබ්ද වචන2Vec - අලුත් සංවිධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වචනයක් සද්දේශයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන් උදාහරණයෙන්, අපි ඉගෙන ගන්නවා කියලා පේන විදිහට (සැමැන්තිකින්) සම්බන්ධ නැති අදහස් දෙකක් වගේ, පිට්ටු සහ පිට්ටු අපේ ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න තවත්, අපේ සම්බන්ධ අවස්ථානය අල්ලගන්නවා වචනය සහ නෝමාටෝපෝයියා අතර විශේෂ අවස්ථාවක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදි', 'ka': 'რომ ადამიანებისთვის უკეთესი შესაძლებლობა გაკეთება, მაქინებისთვის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სიტყვა - ადამიანებისთვის პირველი მოდეალობა. წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო გამოყენებულია სიმპანტიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის სამუშაო სიმპანტიკური განსაზღვრებისთვის. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ვარჯიდებით საუკუნო პირველი კლასის საზოგადო, რომელიც 6 ტექსტულ სამუშაო დავასწავლებით, რომელიც უნდა აორალური ფუნქცი ამ დასავლეთისთვის, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ სიტყვა2vec - ახალი სქემი, რომელიც სპეციალური სიტყვას სწავლის სპეციალური სიტყვას, რომელიც სიტყვაში ჩვენებულია. მაგალითად, ჩვენ ვისწავლით, რომ ორი (semantically) დაკავშირებული კონფექტები, როგორც წერტილები და წერტილები იგივეა, როგორც ისინი გავაკეთებენ სხვადასხვა სიტყვების გამოსა ჩვენი კონფიგურაციები გამოიყენებენ ტექსტულ დავალებში, რომლებიც ტექსტულ პარამენტის გამოსახულებაში მოჭირდება, როგორც ტექსტულ დაკავშირებული ხმების გამოსახულება და დამატებით, ჩვენი სამყარო სამყარო დააკვირდება ინტერესური დასახლოები სიტყვების და ანომატოპოეისის შორის და წინასწარმოდგინდება წინასწარმოდგინული სამყარო სიტყვების შესახებ,', 'sv': 'För att kunna interagera bättre med människor är det avgörande för maskiner att förstå ljud - en primär metod för mänsklig uppfattning. Tidigare arbeten har använt ljud för att lära sig inbäddningar för förbättrad generisk semantisk likhetsbedömning. I detta arbete behandlar vi ljud som en förstklassig medborgare och studerar nedströms 6textuppgifter som kräver ljudgrundning. För detta ändamål föreslår vi sound-word2vec - ett nytt inbäddningssystem som lär sig specialiserade ord inbäddade i ljud. Till exempel lär vi oss att två till synes (semantiskt) orelaterade begrepp, som löv och papper, är likadana på grund av de liknande russeljuden de gör. Våra inbäddningar visar sig vara användbara i textuppgifter som kräver ljudresonemang som textbaserad ljudhämtning och upptäckt Foley ljudeffekter (används i filmer). Dessutom fångar vårt inbäddningsutrymme intressanta beroenden mellan ord och onomatopei och överträffar tidigare arbete med ljudrelevanta ordrelaterade datauppsättningar som AMEN och ASLex.', 'ur': 'انسانوں کے ساتھ اچھا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا سامان سمجھنے کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ اگلے کام آواز استعمال کیے گئے ہیں جنریک سیمنٹی سیمنٹی مثالی ارزیابی کے لئے ایمبڈینگ سکھانے کے لئے۔ اس کام میں ہم آواز کو پہلی کلاس شهردار بناتے ہیں، نیچے سی ٹیکسٹیول کے کاموں کی تلاش کرتے ہیں جن کی آواز کی زمین کی ضرورت ہے. اس کے لئے، ہم آواز-ورڈ 2vec - ایک نوی انڈینگ طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو آواز میں رکھی ہوئی مخصوص لفظوں کو سکھاتا ہے. مثال یہ ہے کہ ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ دو ایسے غیر متعلق نظریں ہیں جیسے پیٹ اور کاغذ ان کے سامنے آوازوں کے سبب برابر ہیں ہمارے ایمبڈینگ ٹیکسٹل کے کاموں میں فائدہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں جو ٹیکسٹ بنیاد آواز حاصل کرنے اور فالی آواز اثرات (فیلم میں استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں)۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہماری مضبوط جگہ کلمات اور نومیٹوپوئیا کے درمیان دلچسپ اپنا معاملہ لیتا ہے اور اس سے پہلے کلمات کے معاملہ میں پہلے کام کرتا ہے جیسے AMEN اور ASLex.', 'ta': 'மனிதர்களுடன் சிறந்த தொடர்பு செய்ய முடியும், ஒலி புரிந்து கொள்ள இயந்திரங்களுக்கு முக்கியமானது - மனித உணர்வு முதன்மைய முந்தைய செயல்கள் உள்ளடக்கங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள ஒலி பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது பொதுவான பாதி ஒற்றைப் போன்ற மதிப்பி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு முதல் வகுப்பு கூட்டத்தாராக ஒலி சிகிச்சை செய்கிறோம், ஆறு நீர் தொழில்நுட்பம் 6 பணிகளை படிக்க இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாங்கள் ஒலி சொல்வத்தின் வார்த்தை2vec - ஒரு புதிய உள்ளடக்க முறைமையை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் சொல்லை பொருத்த எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, இரண்டு தெரியாத எண்ணங்கள், இல்கள் மற்றும் தாள் போன்ற ஒலிகள் செய்யும் அதே போன்ற ஒலிகள் ஆகும். Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  மேலும், எங்கள் உள்ளிடப்பட்ட வெளியீட்டில் சுவாரஸ்யமான சார்புகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்கிறது வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் onomatopoeia இடையேயும் மற்றும் வெள', 'vi': 'Để có thể tương tác tốt hơn với con người, điều quan trọng là máy móc hiểu được âm thanh... một dạng chính của nhận thức con người. Những tác phẩm trước đã sử dụng âm thanh để tìm hiểu sự gắn kết cho một đánh giá khác biệt cơ mẫu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi coi âm thanh như một công dân hạng nhất, nghiên cứu các công việc văn bản xuôi dòng, cần phải có động cơ. Vì vậy, chúng tôi đề nghị âm thanh-Từ-2vec- một kế hoạch tái ghép từ có thể học được sự nhúng từ đặc biệt Ví dụ, chúng ta học được rằng hai khái niệm dường như không liên quan đến nhau, như lá cây và giấy cũng giống nhau vì âm thanh rỉ sét tương tự chúng tạo ra. Sự nhúng tay của chúng ta có ích trong các công việc kết cấu cần phải có lý lẽ bằng hồn như việc lấy âm thanh bằng văn bản và khám phá âm thanh Foley (dùng trong phim). Hơn nữa, sự gắn ghép không gian thu được sự quan hệ thú vị giữa từ và onomatopoeia và hoàn thành việc việc việc thực thi trước đó về các dữ liệu liên quan đến từ có âm học như MEN và ASLex.', 'uz': "Inson bilan yaxshi aloqa qilishga ega bo'lish mumkin, tovushni tushunish muhim - inson fikrining asosiy usuli. Oldingi ishlarni o'rganish uchun tovushlarni o'rganish uchun o'zgartiradi. Bu ishda, biz birinchi sinfning birinchi shaxsiy muvaffaqiyatlariga o'rganamiz, 6 textblik vazifalarni o'rganamiz, va aural guruhini o'rganish kerak. Hozirgi, biz tovush soʻz2vec - yangi foydalanish qolipini o'rganamiz va tovushlar bilan bog'liq soʻzlar ichiga qo'llaniladi. Masalan, biz o'rganamiz, ko'plab va qogʻoz huddi ishlab chiqaradigan tovushlarga o'xshash ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Bizning tashkilotlarimiz matn vazifalarida foydalanishimiz mumkin, matn asosida tovush olish uchun darajaga ega bo'ladi va Foley tovush effektlarini aniqlash kerak. Ko'pchilik, bizning quyidagi romaniya so'zlar va onomatopiya orasidagi qiziqarli qo'llanganlarni qabul qiladi va birinchi so'zlarni AMEN va ASLex kabi murakkab bog'liq maʼlumotlar tarkibida ishlashni bajaradi.", 'bg': 'За да могат да взаимодействат по-добре с хората, е от решаващо значение машините да разберат звука - основен модал на човешкото възприятие. Предишни произведения са използвали звук, за да научат вграждания за подобрена обща семантична оценка на сходството. В тази работа разглеждаме звука като първокласен гражданин, изучаващ надолу по веригата 6 текстови задачи, които изискват озвучаване. За тази цел предлагаме нова вградена схема, която научава специализирани вграждания на думи, основани на звуци. Например научаваме, че две привидно (семантично) несвързани понятия, като листа и хартия, са сходни поради подобни шумолещи звуци, които издават. Нашите вграждания се оказват полезни при текстови задачи, изискващи звуково разсъждение като текстово извличане на звук и откриване на звукови ефекти от Фоли (използвани във филми). Нещо повече, нашето вградено пространство улавя интересни зависимости между думите и ономатопеята и превъзхожда предишната работа по аудио-значими набори от данни за свързаност на думи като AMEN и ASLex.', 'da': 'For at kunne interagere bedre med mennesker er det afgørende for maskiner at forstå lyd - en primær måde for menneskelig opfattelse. Tidligere værker har brugt lyd til at lære indlejringer til forbedret generisk semantisk lighedsvurdering. I dette arbejde behandler vi lyd som en førsteklasses borger, der studerer nedstrøms 6 tekstopgaver, der kræver lyd jordbundning. Til dette formål foreslår vi sound-word2vec - en ny indlejringsordning, der lærer specialiserede ord indlejringer baseret på lyde. For eksempel lærer vi, at to tilsyneladende (semantisk) uafhængige begreber, såsom blade og papir er ens på grund af de lignende raslende lyde, de laver. Vores indlejringer viser sig nyttige i tekstopgaver, der kræver lydbegrundelse som tekstbaseret lydhentning og opdagelse af Foley lydeffekter (brugt i film). Desuden indfanger vores indlejringsrum interessante afhængigheder mellem ord og onomatopoei og overgår tidligere arbejde på lydrelevante ordrelaterede datasæt som AMEN og ASLex.', 'nl': 'Om beter met mensen te kunnen communiceren, is het cruciaal dat machines geluid begrijpen, een primaire manier van menselijke waarneming. Eerdere werken hebben geluid gebruikt om embeddings te leren voor een verbeterde generieke semantische gelijkenisbeoordeling. In dit werk behandelen we geluid als een eersteklas burger en bestuderen we downstream 6tekstuele taken die gehooraarding vereisen. Hiervoor stellen we sound-word2vec voor, een nieuw inbeddingsschema dat gespecialiseerde woordinbeddingen leert gebaseerd op geluiden. Zo leren we dat twee schijnbaar (semantisch) niet-verwante concepten, zoals bladeren en papier, vergelijkbaar zijn door de gelijkaardige ruisende geluiden die ze maken. Onze embeddings blijken nuttig bij tekstuele taken die auditief redeneren vereisen, zoals tekst-based sound retrieval en het ontdekken van Foley geluidseffecten (gebruikt in films). Bovendien vangt onze insluitruimte interessante afhankelijkheden tussen woorden en onomatopoëa op en presteert deze beter dan eerder werk aan auditief relevante woordgerelateerde datasets zoals AMEN en ASLex.', 'hr': 'Da bi se moglo bolje mijenjati s ljudima, ključno je za strojeve razumjeti zvuk - glavni modalitet ljudskog percepcije. Prethodni radovi koristili su zvuk za učenje integracije za poboljšanje generalne semantičke procjene sličnosti. U ovom poslu, tretiramo zvuk kao građanin prve klase, proučavajući niz 6 tekstualnih zadataka koji zahtijevaju auralno područje. Za taj cilj, predlažemo zvuk-reč 2vec - novi ugrađeni plan koji uči specijalizirane riječi ugrađene na zvukovima. Na primjer, naučimo da su dvije (semantički) nezavisne koncepte, poput lišća i papira slične zbog sličnih zvukova koje čine. Naše ugrađenje dokazuju korisno u tekstualnim zadatkima koji zahtijevaju auralnu razumnost poput povlačenja zvuka na tekstu i otkrivanja zvukova Foley (korištenih u filmovima). Osim toga, naš ugrađeni prostor uhvati zanimljivu zavisnost između riječi i onomatopoeije i iznosi prije rada na podacima o povezanosti s riječima, kao što su AMEN i ASLex.', 'de': 'Um besser mit Menschen interagieren zu können, ist es für Maschinen von entscheidender Bedeutung, Klang als primäre Modalität der menschlichen Wahrnehmung zu verstehen. Frühere Arbeiten haben Sound verwendet, um Einbettungen für eine verbesserte generische semantische Ähnlichkeitsbewertung zu erlernen. In dieser Arbeit behandeln wir Klang als erstklassigen Bürger und untersuchen nachgelagerte 6textuelle Aufgaben, die eine akustische Erdung erfordern. Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir sound-word2vec vor, ein neues Einbettungsschema, das spezielle Worteinbettungen lernt, die auf Klängen basieren. Zum Beispiel lernen wir, dass zwei scheinbar (semantisch) nicht verwandte Konzepte, wie Blätter und Papier, sich aufgrund der ähnlichen Rascheln ähneln. Unsere Einbettungen erweisen sich als nützlich bei textuellen Aufgaben, die ein akustisches Denken erfordern, wie textbasiertes Sound Retrieval und das Entdecken von Foley Soundeffekten (verwendet in Filmen). Darüber hinaus erfasst unser Einbettungsraum interessante Abhängigkeiten zwischen Wörtern und Lautmaterialien und übertrifft frühere Arbeiten an akustisch relevanten Wortrelatedness-Datensätzen wie AMEN und ASLex.', 'id': 'To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound - a primary modality of human perception.  Pekerjaan sebelumnya telah menggunakan suara untuk belajar embedding untuk penilaian semantis generik yang lebih baik. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita memperlakukan suara sebagai warga negara kelas pertama, mempelajari langsung 6 tugas tekstual yang membutuhkan pendaratan aural. Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan suara-word2vec - skema penyembedding baru yang mempelajari penyembedding kata khusus berdasarkan suara. Contohnya, kita belajar bahwa dua konsep yang tampaknya (semantis) tidak terhubung, seperti daun dan kertas sama karena suara rustling yang sama mereka buat. Penampilan kami membuktikan berguna dalam tugas teks yang membutuhkan alasan aural seperti pengumpulan suara berdasarkan teks dan menemukan efek suara Foley (digunakan dalam film). Selain itu, ruang penerbangan kita menangkap keterlibatan menarik antara kata-kata dan onomatopoeia dan melakukan pekerjaan sebelumnya pada set data hubungan kata-kata yang sangat relevan seperti AMEN dan ASLex.', 'fa': 'برای اینکه بتوانیم با انسانها بهتر تعامل کنیم، این برای ماشین\u200cها بسیار مهم است که صدا را درک کنند - یک شکل اصلی از نظر انسانها. کارهای قبلی برای یاد گیرنده\u200cها برای ارزیابی شبیه\u200cسازی ژنتریکی بهتر شده از صدا استفاده می\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما صدا را به عنوان یک شهروند اولین کلاس درمان می\u200cکنیم، در حال مطالعه کردن کارهای پایین ۶ متری که نیاز به زمینه\u200cهای زرد است. برای این قسمت، ما به کلمه\u200cهای صوت ۲vec پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم - یک نقشه\u200cای جدید وارد کردن که کلمه\u200cهای مخصوص را در صدا یاد می\u200cگیرد. برای مثال، ما یاد می\u200cگیریم که دو مفهوم به نظر می\u200cرسد (به semantic) بی\u200cربط، مانند برگ و کاغذ، به دلیل صداهای مشابه\u200cای که می\u200cسازند شبیه\u200cاند. انجمن\u200cهای ما در کار\u200cهای متن مفید می\u200cشوند که نیاز به دلیل\u200cهای گوناگونی مانند بازیابی صدای متن و کشف اثرات صدای فولی (از فیلم\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشود). علاوه بر این، فضای پیدا کردن ما بستگی جالبی بین کلمات و نوماتوپوئیا را می گیرد و کارهای قبلی را بر مجموعه داده های ارتباط با کلمات ارتباط به عنوان AMEN و ASLex انجام می دهد.', 'ko': '인간과 더욱 잘 상호작용할 수 있도록 기계가 소리를 이해하는 것은 매우 중요하다. 소리는 인류가 감지하는 주요한 형식이다.이전의 작업은 통용되는 의미의 유사성 평가를 개선하기 위해 소리를 사용해서 삽입을 배웠다.이 업무에서 우리는 소리를 일등 공민으로 여기고 청각의 기초가 필요한 텍스트 임무를 연구할 것이다.이를 위해 우리는 sound-word2vec를 제기했는데 이것은 새로운 삽입 방안으로 소리를 바탕으로 하는 전문 단어의 삽입을 배울 수 있다.예를 들어 우리는 나뭇잎과 종이와 같은 서로 상관없는 두 가지 개념을 알게 되었다. 그것이 내는 부스럭거리는 소리가 비슷하기 때문에 그들은 비슷하다.청각 추리가 필요한 텍스트 작업에 우리의 삽입은 매우 유용하다. 예를 들어 텍스트 기반의 음성 검색과 복지 음향 효과 발견 (영화에 사용) 이다.또한 우리의 삽입 공간은 단어와 의성어 간의 흥미로운 의존 관계를 포착하고 이전에 청각과 관련된 단어 관련 데이터 세트(예를 들어 AMEN과 ASLex)에서 작업한 것보다 더욱 잘 표현했다.', 'tr': '캅nsanlarla daha iyi etkile힊im yapabilmek i챌in makineler ses anlamak i챌in 철nemli bir durum - insan d체힊체n체힊체n체n birinci modalitesi. 횜흫ki i힊lemler generiki semantik me흫ze힊liki de흫lemek 체챌in i챌ine giri힊imleri 철wrenmek 체챌in ses ullan첵arlar. Bu i힊de ses ilkinji synpdaky vatanda힊 h철km체nde gar힊y al첵arys. Bu y체zden ses kelimesini teklif ediyoruz. Mesela, biz iki g철r체n첵채n (semantik bilen) baglanma첵an d체힊체n첵채n d체힊체n첵채ni, 첵aprak we kagyz 첵aly g철r체n첵채n ses seb채bi me흫ze첵채ris. Bizim metin ta첵첵arlarymyz tekst t채bliklerinde pe첵daly seb채bi teks tabanly ses almak we Foley ses etkinlerini tapmak 체챌in gerekli ta첵첵arlar. Mundan so흫ra, bizi흫 da힊aryk 첵erimiz s철zler we onomatopo첵a arasynda gyzykly baglyklary 챌ek첵채r we 철흫ki i힊lerimiz AMEN we ASLex 첵aly s철zler baglany힊ygyny흫 체st체nde 챌yk첵ar.', 'sw': 'Ni muhimu kwa mashine kuelewa sauti - hali ya msingi ya mtazamo wa binadamu. Kazi zilizopita zimetumia sauti ya kujifunza mapambano kwa ajili ya kuboresha tathmini za kimapenzi kwa usawa. In this work, we treat sound as a first-class citizen, studying downstream 6textual tasks which require aural grounding.  Kwa mwisho huu, tunapendekeza maneno ya sauti ya 2vec - mpango mpya wa kujifunza maneno maalumu yaliyotumika kwa sauti. Kwa mfano, tunajifunza kuwa dhana mbili ambazo hazina maana, kama nyama na karatasi zinafanana na sauti hizo zinazozifanya. Kuingiliwa kwetu zinaonyesha kuwa na manufaa katika kazi za maandishi zinazohitaji sababu za madini kama vile kupata sauti kwa kutumia maandishi na kutambua athari za sauti za Foley (imetumiwa kwenye filamu). Zaidi ya hayo, anga letu linachukua kutegemea matumaini yanayovutia kati ya maneno na uchumi na kufanya kazi kabla ya kufanya kazi kwenye seti za taarifa zinazohusiana na maneno yanayohusiana na urahisi kama vile AMEN na ASLex.', 'af': "Om beter te interaksie met mense te wees, is dit cruciaal vir masjiene om klank te verstaan -  'n primêre modaliteit van menslike opstaan. Vorige werke het klank gebruik om inbettings te leer vir verbeterde generieke semantiese gelykenis-evaluering. In hierdie werk behandel ons klank as 'n eerste klas beburger, onderstreem 6tektuele taak wat auraal grond nodig het. Toe hierdie einde, voorstel ons klank- woord2vec -  'n nuwe inbêding skema wat leer spesialiseerde woord inbêding agtergrond in klanke. Byvoorbeeld, ons leer dat twee gelykbaar (semantiese) onverwante konsepte, soos blare en papier gelykbaar is vanweë die gelykbaar rustling klanke wat hulle maak. Ons inbêding bevestig gebruiklike in tektuele opdragte wat aurale redening vereis soos teksbaseerde klank ontvang en Foley klank effekte ontdek (gebruik in filme). Ook, ons inbêderspasie vervang interessante afhanklikhede tussen woorde en onomatopoeia en uitvoer vooraf werk op aurialiseerde woordverwantende datastel soos AMEN en ASLex.", 'sq': 'Për të qenë në gjendje të ndërveprojë më mirë me njerëzit, është vendimtare që makinat të kuptojnë tingullin - një modalitet kryesor i perceptimit njerëzor. Punët e mëparshme kanë përdorur tingull për të mësuar përfshirje për vlerësimin e ngjashmërisë semantike të përmirësuar. Në këtë punë, ne trajtojmë tingullin si një qytetar i klasës së parë, duke studiuar detyra tekstuale poshtë të cilat kërkojnë bazimin aural. Për këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë sound-word2vec - një skemë të re përfshirjeje që mëson përfshirje të fjalëve të specializuara bazuar në tinguj. Për shembull, ne mësojmë se dy koncepte që duken (semantikisht) jo të lidhura, si gjethet dhe letra janë të ngjashme për shkak të tingujve të ngjashëm që bëjnë. Mbledhjet tona janë të dobishme në detyrat tekstuale që kërkojnë arsyetimin aural si marrja e tingullit me bazë teksti dhe zbulimi i efekteve të tingullit Foley (të përdorura në filma). Përveç kësaj, hapësira jonë e përfshirë varësitë interesante midis fjalëve dhe onomatopoeisë dhe kryen punë të mëparshme mbi të dhënat e lidhjes me fjalë të rëndësishme, të tilla si AMEN dhe ASLex.', 'az': 'İnsanlarla daha yaxşı əlaqə edə bilmək üçün maşınların səsini anlaması - insan baxımının ilk modalitəsidir. Əvvəlki işlər çoxlu semantik oxumaq üçün səs öyrənmək üçün istifadə etdilər. Bu işdə, biz səsini ilk sınıf vatandaş kimi təhsil edirik, altındakı 6 textual işləri öyrənirik ki, aural yerləşməsi lazımdır. Bu səbəbdə səs sözlərini 2-vec təbliğ edirik - səslərdə yerləşdirilmiş xüsusiyyətli sözləri öyrənən yeni in şa taslağı. Misal olaraq, biz öyrənirik ki, iki görünüşlü (semantik olaraq) bağlı fikirlər kimi yarpaqlar və kağız bənzəyir, onlar yaratdıqları bənzər səslərə bənzəyirlər. Bizim in şallarımız tekst işlərində faydalı göstərir ki, metin-tabanlı səs almaq və Foley səs efektlərini (filmlərdə istifadə edilən) keşfetmək istəyirlər. Daha sonra, aramızda yazılmış alan sözlər və onomatopoeia arasında ilginç bağlılıqları alır və AMEN və ASLex kimi əvvəlki sözlərin bağlılıq verilənlər qurmaqlarında əvvəlki işi bitirir.', 'am': 'ከሰው ጋር መቀናቀል መቻል፣ ድምፅን ለማስተዋል መሳሪያዎች - የሰው አካባቢ መልክ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ ድምፅ ለመማር የgeneric semantic similarity ማስታወቂያውን ለመማር ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የፊተኛይቱ ክፍል ዜጎች ሆነን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds.  ለምሳሌ፣ ሁለት (አስተያየት) ያልተቃውሞ ሐሳብ፣ እንደ ቅጠልና እንደ ገጾች በሚያሳየው ድምፅ ብጤ ነው ብለን እናውቃለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ ድምፅ አቀማመጥ እና የፋሲ ድምፅ ውጤቶችን ለማግኘት የሚፈልገውን የጽሑፍ ስራዎችን በመጠቀም የሚጠቅሙት እና በፊልፎች ውስጥ የሚጠቅሙትን የፖሊስ ድምፅ ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ደግሞም አካባቢው ስፍራችን በአሜን እና ASLex በሚሉት የቃላት እና የኖሞቴዎያን መካከለኛ የሚጠያየቁ የአፍሪካ ቃላት እና የአፍሪካዊ ቃላት የዳታ ጥያቄዎችን አስቀድሞ ያሳርፋል፡፡', 'bn': 'মানুষের সাথে আরো ভালো যোগাযোগ করতে পারে, শব্দ বুঝতে মেশিনের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ - মানুষের ধারণার প্রধান মৌলিকতা। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের শব্দ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে সাধারণ সেমেন্টিক সমতুল্যের মান উন্নতির জন্য। এই কাজে আমরা প্রথম-শ্রেণীর নাগরিক হিসেবে শিক্ষা দেই, যেখানে বুরাল গ্রাউন্ডিং দরকার। To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds.  উদাহরণস্বরূপ, আমরা শিখতে পাচ্ছি যে দুটি বিচ্ছিন্ন ধারণা, যেমন পাতা এবং কাগজের মতো একই রকম রুশিং শব্দের কারণে। আমাদের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক শব্দ পুনরুদ্ধার এবং ফিলি শব্দের প্রভাব আবিষ্কার করা যায় (চলচ্চিত্রে ব্যবহার করা হয়) টেক্সচুয়াল কাজে আম এছাড়াও, আমাদের বিভিন্ন স্পেসের মধ্যে কৌতূহলিক নির্ভর করে শব্দ এবং অরোনোমাতোপিয়ার মধ্যে এবং ব্রুয়ালি সংক্রান্ত শব্দের সম্পর্কের তথ্যে', 'bs': 'Da bi se moglo bolje mijenjati s ljudima, ključno je za mašine da razumiju zvuk - glavna modaliteta ljudskog percepcije. Prethodni radovi su koristili zvuk za učenje integracije za poboljšanu generičku semantičku procjenu sličnosti. U ovom poslu, tretiramo zvuk kao građanin prvog razreda, proučavajući niz 6 tekstualnih zadataka koji zahtijevaju auralno područje. Za ovaj cilj, predlažemo zvuk-reč 2vec - novu šemu ugrađenja koja uči specijalizovane reči ugrađene na zvukovima. Na primjer, naučimo da su dvije (semantički) nezavisne koncepte, poput lišća i papira slične zbog sličnih zvukova koje čine. Naše ugrađenje dokazuju korisno u tekstualnim zadacima koji zahtijevaju auralnu razumnost kao što su otkrivanje zvuka na tekstu i otkrivanje zvukova Foley (korištenih u filmovima). Osim toga, naš ugrađeni prostor uhvati zanimljive zavisnosti između riječi i onomatopoeje i iznosi prije rada na podacima veze s auralno relevantnim riječima poput AMEN i ASLex.', 'ca': "Per poder interactuar millor amb els humans, és crucial que les màquines entenguin el so - una modalitat primària de percepció human a. Els treballs anteriors han utilitzat el so per aprendre incorporacions per millorar l'evaluació semàntica genèrica de la similitud. En aquesta feina, tractem el so com a ciutadà de primera classe, estudiant 6 tasques textuals avall que requereixen fundaments aurals. Per això, proposem paraules sonores 2vec - un nou esquema d'integració que aprenen paraules especialitzades basades en sons. Per exemple, aprenem que dos conceptes aparentment (semànticament) no relacionats, com les fulles i el paper, són similars a causa dels sons semblants que fan. Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  A més, el nostre espai d'incorporació captura interessants dependències entre paraules i onomatopoeia i supera la feina anterior en conjunts de dades de relació de paraules auralment rellevants com AMEN i ASLex.", 'cs': 'Pro lepší interakci s člověkem je důležité, aby stroje porozuměly zvuku, což je primární modalita lidského vnímání. Předchozí práce používaly zvuk k učení se vložení pro lepší generické hodnocení sémantické podobnosti. V této práci se zvukem zacházíme jako s prvotřídním občanem, který studuje následné 6textové úkoly, které vyžadují zvukové uzemnění. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme sound-word2vec, což je nové vkládací schéma, které se učí specializované vkládání slov založené na zvucích. Například se dozvíme, že dva zdánlivě (sémanticky) nesouvisející koncepty, jako jsou listy a papír, jsou podobné kvůli podobným šuměním, které vydávají. Naše vložení jsou užitečné při textových úkolech vyžadujících sluchové uvažování, jako je textové vyhledávání zvukových efektů a objevování Foley zvukových efektů (používaných ve filmech). Náš vkládací prostor navíc zachycuje zajímavé závislosti mezi slovy a onomatopeií a překonává předchozí práci na datových sadách souvisejících se sluchem, jako jsou AMEN a ASLex.', 'et': 'Et inimestega paremini suhelda, on oluline, et masinad mõistaksid heli - inimese tajumise esmane viis. Varasemad tööd on kasutanud heli, et õppida manustamist paremaks semantilise sarnasuse hindamiseks. Käesolevas töös käsitleme heli esmaklassilise kodanikuna, õppides allahindluse 6tekstualseid ülesandeid, mis nõuavad heli maandamist. Selleks pakume välja sound-word2vec - uus manustamisskeem, mis õpib spetsiaalseid sõnade manustamist, mis põhinevad helidel. Näiteks õpime, et kaks näiliselt (semantiliselt) mitteseotud kontseptsiooni, nagu lehed ja paber, on sarnaste helide tõttu sarnased. Meie manustamised osutuvad kasulikuks tekstiülesannetes, mis nõuavad helimõtlemist, nagu tekstipõhine heli taastamine ja Foley heliefektide avastamine (kasutatakse filmides). Lisaks sellele jäädvustab meie manustamisruum huvitavaid sõltuvusi sõnade ja onomatopeea vahel ning ületab eelnevaid tööd heliliselt oluliste sõnadega seotud andmekogumitega, nagu AMEN ja ASLex.', 'fi': 'Jotta kone pystyisi toimimaan paremmin ihmisten kanssa, on ratkaisevan tﾃ､rkeﾃ､ﾃ､ ymmﾃ､rtﾃ､ﾃ､ ﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､ - ihmisen havainnoinnin ensisijainen muoto. Aiemmat teokset ovat kﾃ､yttﾃ､neet ﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､ oppiakseen upotuksia yleiseen semanttisen samankaltaisuuden arviointiin. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ kﾃ､sittelemme ﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､ ensiluokkaisena kansalaisena, joka tutkii alajuoksun 6tekstuaalisia tehtﾃ､viﾃ､, jotka edellyttﾃ､vﾃ､t ﾃ､ﾃ､nipohjaa. Tﾃ､tﾃ､ varten ehdotamme sound-word2vec - uutta upotusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､, joka oppii ﾃ､ﾃ､niin pohjautuvia erikoissanaupotuksia. Opimme esimerkiksi, ettﾃ､ kaksi nﾃ､ennﾃ､isesti (semanttisesti) toisiinsa liittymﾃ､tﾃｶntﾃ､ kﾃ､sitettﾃ､, kuten lehdet ja paperi, ovat samankaltaisia, koska ne tuottavat samankaltaisia ﾃ､ﾃ､niﾃ､. Upotukset osoittautuvat hyﾃｶdyllisiksi ﾃ､ﾃ､nipﾃ､ﾃ､ttelyﾃ､ vaativissa tekstuaalisissa tehtﾃ､vissﾃ､, kuten tekstipohjaisessa ﾃ､ﾃ､nenhaussa ja Foley-ﾃ､ﾃ､nitehosteiden lﾃｶytﾃ､misessﾃ､ (joita kﾃ､ytetﾃ､ﾃ､n elokuvissa). Lisﾃ､ksi upotustilamme kerﾃ､ﾃ､ kiinnostavia riippuvuuksia sanojen ja onomatopeian vﾃ､lillﾃ､ ja pﾃ､ihittﾃ､ﾃ､ aiemmat tyﾃｶt kuulollisesti merkityksellisillﾃ､ sanasidonnaisuustiedoilla, kuten AMEN ja ASLex.', 'hy': 'To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound - a primary modality of human perception.  Previous works have used sound to learn embeddings for improved generic semantic similarity assessment.  In this work, we treat sound as a first-class citizen, studying downstream 6textual tasks which require aural grounding.  To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds.  Օրինակ, մենք սովորում ենք, որ երկու տեսք ունեցող (սեմանտիկ) անկապ հասկացություններ, ինչպիսիք են տերևերը և թղթին, նման են իրենց ստեղծվող նույն խզբզելու հնչյունների պատճառով: Our embeddings prove useful in textual tasks requiring aural reasoning like text-based sound retrieval and discovering Foley sound effects (used in movies).  Moreover, our embedding space captures interesting dependencies between words and onomatopoeia and outperforms prior work on aurally-relevant word relatedness datasets such as AMEN and ASLex.', 'jv': 'Kaya iso nggawe luwih tenan karo uwong, lan akeh lanu kanggo meh kuwi maur - modalité sing apik perbudhakan uwong. translation" means "shift" / "displacement Nang trabah iki, kita lagi sawar kelas pirsak terakhi sing perusahaan, lian banter 6 textual sing nyimpen To this end, we proposal sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that Learns special word embedding background in sound. Sampeyan, awak dhéwé ngerti ngerasakno iki luwih (sematik) nggawe gerakan gerakan gambaran karo peber lan nganggo kuwi cah sabané surat sing diranggawe. embedding Label', 'sk': 'Za boljše interakcije z ljudmi je ključnega pomena, da stroji razumejo zvok - primarno obliko človeškega zaznavanja. Prejšnja dela so uporabljala zvok za učenje vdelav za izboljšanje generične semantične podobnosti. V tem delu zvok obravnavamo kot prvovrstnega državljana, ki preučuje nadaljnje besedilne naloge, ki zahtevajo zvočno označevanje. V ta namen predlagamo sound-word2vec - novo vdelano shemo, ki se uči specializiranih vdelanih besed, temelječih na zvokih. Na primer, naučimo se, da sta dva navidezno (semantično) nepovezana koncepta, kot sta listi in papir, podobna zaradi podobnega šumenja, ki ga ustvarjata. Naše vdelave so koristne pri besedilnih nalogah, ki zahtevajo zvočno razmišljanje, kot je pridobivanje zvoka na podlagi besedila in odkrivanje zvočnih učinkov Foley (uporabljenih v filmih). Poleg tega naš prostor za vdelavo zajame zanimive odvisnosti med besedami in onomatopejo ter presega predhodno delo na zvočno relevantnih naborih podatkov o povezanosti besed, kot sta AMEN in ASLex.', 'ha': "To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound - a primary modality of human perception.  Yin aiki da ya gabata sun yi amfani da sauti dõmin su sanar da embedded don a kyautata ƙaddara wa kima na kasa. Daga wannan aikin, Munã karɓi sauti kamar rainin daraja na farko, kuma munã karatun aikin 6 na rubutu da ke buƙata kafin. To, zuwa wannan, muna goyyar da saurãre-2vc - wata na cikin shirin akwatin bayani wanda za'a sanar da kalmar da aka ƙayyade cikin saurãre. Misali, munã sanar cẽwa misãlan zato biyu ba su yi (na fassara) ba, kamar takarda da takarda misãlani na sami sautin da ke samu da sauri na rubutu. Bangonmu na gaskata wani amfani da cikin aikin littafin na rubutu wanda ke nufin mataimaki mai sauri kamar riƙo sauti a bakin rubutu da za'a gane fassarar sauti na daban (da ake amfani da cikin filayen). Furan, filinanmu da ke cikin kashi yana kãma masu kwaɗayi a tsakanin maganar da onomatopoyia kuma yana aiki a gabani kan samun da na sami-muhimmin magana masu husũma kamar AMEN da AsLex.", 'bo': 'འདི་ནི་མི་དང་ཅུང་བྱེད་པར་ལེགས་གཤིས་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་། ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱིས་སྒྲ་ལ་རྟོགས་ནོར་གལ་ཆེན་ཡོད། མི་ཤེས་ཚོར་ཚོགས་ སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲ་སྐད་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་འཛིན་གྱི་མི་སེར་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་སྒྲ་སྐད་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏུབ་པ་ཡིན། To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds. དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་མི་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་གནས་སྟངས་རྣམས་ཡིག་གི་ལས་ཀ་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཅིག་མཉམ་ལས་རླབས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཏེ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་བར་སྟོང་པར་བརྗོད་པར་དུ་གཏོང་བའི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲུང་ཕྱོགས་དང་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་རྗེས་བ་དག་', 'he': 'To be able to interact better with humans, it is crucial for machines to understand sound - a primary modality of human perception.  Previous works have used sound to learn embeddings for improved generic semantic similarity assessment.  בעבודה הזאת, אנו מתייחסים לקול כאזרח במעמד ראשון, לומדים 6 משימות טקסטיות שמדורשות קרקע אוליות. To this end, we propose sound-word2vec - a new embedding scheme that learns specialized word embeddings grounded in sounds.  לדוגמה, אנחנו לומדים ששני מושג לא קשורים (סמנטית) נראים, כמו עלים ומנייר דומים בגלל קולות שורשים דומים שהם יוצרים. ההכניסות שלנו מוכיחות שימושית במשימות טקסטליות שדורשות הגיון אולימי כמו חיפוש קול מבוסס בטקסט וגילוי תופעות קול פולי (משתמשים בסרטים). חוץ מזה, החלל הקבוע שלנו תופס תלויות מעניינות בין מילים ואונומוטופיה ומבצע עבודה קודמת על מסמכי מילים רלוונטיים באופן אורלי כמו AMEN ואסלקס.'}
{'en': 'The Promise of Premise : Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'ar': 'وعد المقدّمة: تسخير مقدمات الأسئلة في الإجابة المرئية للأسئلة', 'es': 'La promesa de la premisa: aprovechar las premisas de las preguntas en la respuesta visual a preguntas', 'pt': 'A Promessa da Premissa: Aproveitando as Premissas das Perguntas na Resposta Visual das Perguntas', 'fr': 'La promesse des prémisses\xa0: exploiter les prémisses des questions dans la réponse visuelle aux questions', 'ja': '前提の約束：視覚的な質問への回答における質問の前提の活用', 'zh': '前提的承诺:在视觉问答中', 'ru': 'Обещание предпосылки: использование предпосылок вопросов в визуальных ответах на вопросы', 'hi': 'आधार का वादा: दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर में प्रश्न परिसर का दोहन', 'ga': 'Gealltanas an Áitribh: Ag baint leasa as Áitreabh Ceisteanna i bhFreagrú Amharc-Cheisteanna', 'ka': 'პრომიზეციის მისაღება: კითხვის პრომიზეციები ვიზუალური კითხვების მისაღება', 'el': 'Η Υπόσχεση της Υποθεσης: Αξιοποίηση των Υποθέσεων Ερωτήσεων στην Οπτική Απάντηση Ερωτήσεων', 'hu': 'Az előzmények ígérete: a kérdések kihasználása a vizuális kérdések megválaszolásában', 'mk': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'lt': 'Premijos pažadas: klausimų patalpų naudojimas atsakant į vizualius klausimus', 'it': 'La promessa delle premesse: sfruttare le premesse delle domande nella risposta visiva alle domande', 'kk': 'Көрініс сұрақтардың жауап беру үшін сұрақтарды қолдану', 'ml': 'മുന്നറിയിപ്പുള്ള വാക്ക്: കാഴ്ച ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതില്\u200d ചോദ്യം കഠിനമാക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dഗണന', 'mn': 'Дараагийн амлалт: Хариултын хариултын асуулт дээр асуулт асуух', 'no': 'Promise for førehandsvising: Behandling av spørsmål førehandsvising i visuelle spørsmål', 'pl': 'Obietnica premise: Wykorzystanie premise pytań w wizualnym odpowiedzi na pytania', 'ms': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'ro': 'Promisiunea premiselor: valorificarea premiselor întrebărilor în răspunsul la întrebări vizuale', 'mt': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'sr': 'Obećanje predstave: korištenje predstava pitanja u odgovoru na vizualno pitanje', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න: ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'ta': 'வாக்குறுதி', 'so': "Ballanka ballanka ballanka: Jawaalka su'aalaha aad ku adagto waxay ka timaadaan jawaabta su'aalada aragga", 'sv': 'Löftet om premiser: Utnyttja frågepremiser i visuell frågeställning', 'ur': 'پیغام کا وعدہ یہ ہے کہ پوچھنے کی ضرورت ہے', 'uz': 'Buyruqning ballasi: Savol qiyin qoĘ»llanmagan soĘ»rov javob beradi', 'vi': 'Lời hứa của tòa án: Cung giải câu hỏi trong câu hỏi ảo', 'bg': 'Обещанието за предпоставка: оползотворяване на предпоставки за въпроси във визуалното отговаряне на въпроси', 'hr': 'Obećanje predstave: korištenje predstava pitanja u odgovoru na vizualno pitanje', 'nl': 'De belofte van premise: Vraag premises benutten in visueel antwoord op vragen', 'da': 'Løftet om præmisser: Udnyttelse af spørgsmål præmisser i visuel spørgsmål besvarelse', 'id': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'ko': '전제적 약속: 시각적 퀴즈를 이용한 문제 전제', 'de': 'Das Versprechen von Prämissen: Nutzung von Frageprämissen in visueller Fragebeantwortung', 'fa': 'وعده پيشنهاد: پيشنهاد سوال در جواب سوال بينايي', 'tr': 'Prelime sözü: Görsel soraglar cevaplarynda janlaşmak', 'sw': 'Miadi ya Tamko: Kushindwa na swali la Maswali', 'af': 'Die belofte van Premisie: Onderhouding van vraag voordeel in visuele vraag antwoord', 'am': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'hy': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'sq': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'az': 'Premise vədi: Görünür suallarında soruşmaq', 'bs': 'Obećanje predstave: korištenje predstava pitanja u odgovoru na vizualno pitanje', 'cs': 'Příslib předpokladu: Využití předpokladů otázek při vizuálním zodpovězení otázek', 'bn': 'প্রতিশ্রুতি প্রদান: দৃশ্যমান প্রশ্নের উত্তরে প্রশ্নের বিষয়টি কঠিন করা হয়েছে', 'ca': 'The Promise of Premise: Harnessing Question Premises in Visual Question Answering', 'et': 'Eelvaatluse lubadus: küsimuste rakendamine visuaalses küsimustele vastamises', 'fi': 'The Promise of Premise: Kyselytilojen hyödyntäminen visuaalisessa kysymysvastauksessa', 'ha': "Kuma wa'adin wa'adin Kayyar: Zaman Harsa da tambayi cikin Jaji na Gani", 'jv': 'Ora berlak kelangeni uwong: nggunakake prelimin Panguna Jagad', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆེད་དུ། མཐོང་སྣང་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཆར་མཐུན་པ།', 'sk': 'Obljuba premisa: izkoriščanje premij vprašanj v vizualnem odgovarjanju na vprašanja', 'he': 'הבטחה של התחנה: ניצל בתחנות שאלות בענות שאלות חזותיות'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we make a simple observation that questions about images often contain premises   objects and relationships implied by the question   and that reasoning about premises can help Visual Question Answering (VQA) models respond more intelligently to irrelevant or previously unseen questions. When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers. We note that a visual question is irrelevant to an image if at least one of its premises is false (i.e. not depicted in the image). We leverage this observation to construct a dataset for Question Relevance Prediction and Explanation (QRPE) by searching for false premises. We train novel question relevance detection models and show that models that reason about premises consistently outperform models that do not. We also find that forcing standard VQA models to reason about premises during training can lead to improvements on tasks requiring compositional reasoning.', 'es': 'En este artículo, hacemos una simple observación de que las preguntas sobre imágenes a menudo contienen premisas (objetos y relaciones implícitas en la pregunta) y que el razonamiento sobre las premisas puede ayudar a los modelos de respuesta visual a preguntas (VQA) a responder de manera más inteligente a preguntas irrelevantes o nunca vistas anteriormente. Cuando se les presenta una pregunta que es irrelevante para una imagen, los modelos de VQA de última generación seguirán respondiendo únicamente en función de los sesgos del lenguaje aprendido, lo que resulta en respuestas sin sentido o incluso engañosas. Observamos que una pregunta visual es irrelevante para una imagen si al menos una de sus premisas es falsa (es decir, no está representada en la imagen). Aprovechamos esta observación para construir un conjunto de datos para la predicción y explicación de la relevancia de las preguntas (QRPE) mediante la búsqueda de premisas falsas. Entrenamos modelos novedosos de detección de relevancia de preguntas y demostramos que los modelos que razonan sobre las premisas superan sistemáticamente a los modelos que no También descubrimos que obligar a los modelos de VQA estándar a razonar sobre las premisas durante la capacitación puede conducir a mejoras en las tareas que requieren razonamiento compositivo.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, fazemos uma simples observação de que perguntas sobre imagens geralmente contêm premissas – objetos e relacionamentos implícitos na pergunta – e que o raciocínio sobre premissas pode ajudar os modelos de Resposta a Perguntas Visuais (VQA) a responder de forma mais inteligente a perguntas irrelevantes ou não vistas anteriormente. Quando apresentados a uma pergunta que é irrelevante para uma imagem, os modelos VQA de última geração ainda responderão puramente com base em vieses de linguagem aprendida, resultando em respostas sem sentido ou até enganosas. Notamos que uma questão visual é irrelevante para uma imagem se pelo menos uma de suas premissas for falsa (ou seja, não representada na imagem). Aproveitamos essa observação para construir um conjunto de dados para Predição e Explicação de Relevância de Perguntas (QRPE) procurando por premissas falsas. Treinamos novos modelos de detecção de relevância de perguntas e mostramos que os modelos que raciocinam sobre premissas superam consistentemente os modelos que não o fazem. Também descobrimos que forçar modelos VQA padrão a raciocinar sobre premissas durante o treinamento pode levar a melhorias em tarefas que exigem raciocínio composicional.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نجري ملاحظة بسيطة مفادها أن الأسئلة المتعلقة بالصور غالبًا ما تحتوي على مقدمات - كائنات وعلاقات ضمنية من السؤال - وأن التفكير المنطقي حول المباني يمكن أن يساعد نماذج الإجابة المرئية للأسئلة (VQA) على الاستجابة بشكل أكثر ذكاءً للأسئلة غير ذات الصلة أو غير المرئية من قبل. عند تقديم سؤال لا صلة له بصورة ما ، ستظل نماذج VQA الحديثة تجيب تمامًا على أساس التحيزات اللغوية المكتسبة ، مما يؤدي إلى إجابات غير حساسة أو حتى مضللة. نلاحظ أن السؤال المرئي لا صلة له بالصورة إذا كان أحد مقدماتها على الأقل خاطئًا (أي غير موصوف في الصورة). نحن نستفيد من هذه الملاحظة لإنشاء مجموعة بيانات لتوقع وشرح ملاءمة السؤال (QRPE) من خلال البحث عن أماكن زائفة. نقوم بتدريب نماذج جديدة للكشف عن الأسئلة ذات الصلة ونوضح أن النماذج التي تفكر في المباني تتفوق باستمرار على النماذج التي لا تفعل ذلك. نجد أيضًا أن إجبار نماذج VQA القياسية على التفكير في أماكن العمل أثناء التدريب يمكن أن يؤدي إلى تحسينات في المهام التي تتطلب التفكير التركيبي.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous faisons une simple observation selon laquelle les questions sur les images contiennent souvent des prémisses — des objets et des relations sous-entendus par la question — et que le raisonnement sur les locaux peut aider les modèles de réponse visuelle aux questions (VQA) à répondre plus intelligemment à des questions non pertinentes ou inédites. Lorsqu'ils sont confrontés à une question qui n'est pas pertinente pour une image, les modèles VQA de pointe répondent toujours uniquement sur la base de biais linguistiques appris, ce qui donne des réponses absurdes, voire trompeuses. Nous notons qu'une question visuelle n'est pas pertinente pour une image si au moins une de ses prémisses est fausse (c'est-à-dire non représentée dans l'image). Nous tirons parti de cette observation pour construire un ensemble de données pour la prévision et l'explication de la pertinence des questions (QRPE) en recherchant de fausses prémisses. Nous formons de nouveaux modèles de détection de la pertinence des questions et montrons que les modèles qui raisonnent sur les locaux surpassent systématiquement les modèles qui ne le font pas Nous constatons également que le fait de forcer les modèles VQA standard à raisonner sur les locaux pendant la formation peut conduire à des améliorations des tâches nécessitant un raisonnement compositionnel.", 'zh': '夫本文之中,略而观之,图像之问,常含前 - 所示 - 而推理可以助视问答(VQA)智应不关前见。 当遇无关图画,先进VQA模,仍将纯粹语偏见以对,致无义至误导性对案。 若视少一前提为非(未画),则视与图不相关。 因此观之,搜索虚前相关性占解(QRPE)数集。 吾等练新相关性检模形,明推理之终始优于不推者也。 又见练中强制VQA前推理可改须推理。', 'ja': 'この論文では、画像に関する質問には、多くの場合、質問によって暗示される対象物や関係性が含まれているという単純な観察を行い、視覚的質問回答（ VQA ）モデルが、関連性のない、または以前は見られなかった質問によりインテリジェントに応答するのに役立つ可能性があることを示しています。 最先端のVQAモデルは、画像に関係のない質問を提示された場合でも、学習した言語の偏見に基づいて純粋に回答し、非感覚的または誤解を招くような回答をもたらします。 視覚的な質問は、少なくとも1つの前提条件が誤っている（つまり、画像に描写されていない）場合、画像には無関係であることに注意してください。 この観察結果を利用して、誤った前提を検索することにより、質問の関連性予測と説明（ QRPE ）のためのデータセットを構築します。 私たちは、新規の質問関連性検出モデルをトレーニングし、前提について推論するモデルが推論しないモデルよりも一貫して優れていることを示します。 また、トレーニング中に標準的なVQAモデルに前提についての推論を強制することは、構成的推論を必要とするタスクの改善につながる可能性があることもわかっています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक साधारण अवलोकन करते हैं कि छवियों के बारे में प्रश्नों में अक्सर परिसर होते हैं - प्रश्न द्वारा निहित वस्तुएं और संबंध - और परिसर के बारे में तर्क दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर (वीक्यूए) मॉडल को अप्रासंगिक या पहले से अनदेखी प्रश्नों के लिए अधिक बुद्धिमानी से जवाब देने में मदद कर सकता है। जब एक प्रश्न के साथ प्रस्तुत किया जाता है जो एक छवि के लिए अप्रासंगिक है, तो अत्याधुनिक वीक्यूए मॉडल अभी भी पूरी तरह से सीखी गई भाषा पूर्वाग्रहों के आधार पर जवाब देंगे, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप गैर-कामुक या यहां तक कि भ्रामक उत्तर होंगे। हम ध्यान देते हैं कि एक दृश्य प्रश्न एक छवि के लिए अप्रासंगिक है यदि इसके परिसर में से कम से कम एक गलत है (यानी छवि में चित्रित नहीं किया गया है)। हम झूठे परिसर की खोज करके प्रश्न प्रासंगिकता भविष्यवाणी और स्पष्टीकरण (QRPE) के लिए एक डेटासेट का निर्माण करने के लिए इस अवलोकन का लाभ उठाते हैं। हम उपन्यास प्रश्न प्रासंगिकता का पता लगाने के मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि परिसर के बारे में कारण वाले मॉडल लगातार उन मॉडलों को मात देते हैं जो नहीं करते हैं। हम यह भी पाते हैं कि प्रशिक्षण के दौरान परिसर के बारे में तर्क करने के लिए मानक वीक्यूए मॉडल को मजबूर करने से रचनात्मक तर्क की आवश्यकता वाले कार्यों में सुधार हो सकता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы делаем простое замечание, что вопросы об изображениях часто содержат предпосылки – объекты и отношения, подразумеваемые вопросом – и что рассуждения о предпосылках могут помочь моделям визуального ответа на вопросы (VQA) более разумно отвечать на нерелевантные или ранее невидимые вопросы. При постановке вопроса, который не имеет отношения к изображению, современные модели VQA по-прежнему будут отвечать исключительно на основе изученных языковых предубеждений, что приведет к нечувствительным или даже вводящим в заблуждение ответам. Отметим, что визуальный вопрос не имеет отношения к изображению, если хотя бы одно из его предпосылок является ложным (т.е. не изображенным на изображении). Мы используем это наблюдение для построения набора данных для прогнозирования и объяснения актуальности вопросов (QRPE) путем поиска ложных предпосылок. Мы обучаем новые модели обнаружения актуальности вопросов и показываем, что модели, которые рассуждают о предпосылках, постоянно превосходят модели, которые не превосходят их. Мы также обнаружили, что принуждение стандартных моделей VQA к рассуждению о помещениях во время обучения может привести к улучшению задач, требующих композиционного мышления.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid breathnóireacht shimplí gur minic a bhíonn áitribh i gceisteanna faoi íomhánna – rudaí agus gaolmhaireachtaí atá intuigthe sa cheist – agus gur féidir le réasúnaíocht faoi áitribh cabhrú le samhlacha Amharc-Fhreagraí Ceist (VQA) freagairt níos cliste a thabhairt do cheisteanna nach mbaineann le hábhar nó nach bhfacthas riamh cheana. Nuair a thugtar ceist nach mbaineann le hábhar d’íomhá, freagrófar samhlacha nua-aimseartha VQA go hiomlán bunaithe ar laofachtaí teanga foghlamtha, agus beidh freagraí neamhíogair nó fiú míthreorach mar thoradh orthu. Tugaimid faoi deara nach mbaineann ceist amhairc le híomhá má tá ceann amháin dá áitribh bréagach ar a laghad (i.e. nach bhfuil sé léirithe san íomhá). Déanaimid an bhreathnóireacht seo a ghiaráil chun tacar sonraí a chruthú le haghaidh Tuar agus Míniú ar Bhainteacht Cheisteanna (QRPE) trí áitribh bhréagacha a chuardach. Cuirimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí braite ábharthachta ceisteanna nua agus léirímid go n-éiríonn níos fearr go seasta le samhlacha a bhaineann le háitribh ná na samhlacha nach mbaineann. Faighimid amach freisin go bhféadfadh feabhsuithe ar thascanna óna dteastaíonn réasúnaíocht chomhdhéanaimh má chuirtear iachall ar mhúnlaí caighdeánacha VQA réasúnú a dhéanamh ar áitribh le linn na hoiliúna.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ერთადერთი მონაცემები, რომ სურათების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების კითხვების შესაძლებელია უფრო ინტელექტიურად გარე როდესაც კითხვა, რომელიც არ არის მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულისთვის, VQA მოდელების შესახებ მხოლოდ უბრალოდ განსწავლებული ენის წინასწორების დაბათებაში გაუპასუხოთ, რომელიც შემდეგ უცნსური ან უბრა ჩვენ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ვიზუალური კითხვა არ არის მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულისთვის თუ სანამ ერთი მისი სახულისთვის არ არის მარტივია (მაგალითად, არ არის გამოსახულებული გამოსა ჩვენ ამ მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომ კითხვების შესახებ და გამოსახულება (QRPE) საძებლოდ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას შექმნა. ჩვენ პრომენური კითხვების შესახებ მოდელების შესახებ და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მოდელები, რომელიც პრომენტების შესახებ არსებობს მოდელების შესახებ. ჩვენ ასევე აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სტანდარტური VQA მოდელების წარმოადგენების შესაძლებლობა პრომენტების განმავლობაში შეგვიძლია გაუკეთესოთ საქმედების შესაძლებლობა, რომე', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszerű megfigyelést teszünk, hogy a képekkel kapcsolatos kérdések gyakran tartalmaznak helyiségeket - a kérdés által feltüntetett objektumokat és kapcsolatokat -, és hogy a helyiségekkel kapcsolatos érvelés segíthet a vizuális kérdések megválaszolásában (VQA) modellek intelligensebben reagálnak irreleváns vagy korábban láthatatlan kérdésekre. Amikor egy kép szempontjából irreleváns kérdést tesznek elő, a legkorszerűbb VQA modellek továbbra is pusztán tanult nyelvi előítéletek alapján válaszolnak, ami nem érzékeny vagy akár félrevezető válaszokat eredményez. Megjegyezzük, hogy egy vizuális kérdés irreleváns egy kép számára, ha legalább az egyik helyisége hamis (azaz nem ábrázolja a képen). Ezt a megfigyelést arra használjuk, hogy hamis előírások keresésével készítsünk egy adatkészletet a Kérdések Relevancia Prediction and Explication (QRPE) számára. Új kérdésekre vonatkozó érzékelési modelleket képzünk, és megmutatjuk, hogy azok a modellek, amelyek a helyiségekről érvelnek, következetesen felülmúlják azokat a modelleket, amelyek nem. Azt is megállapítjuk, hogy a standard VQA modellek képzés során a helyiségekkel kapcsolatos érvelésre való kényszerítése a kompozíciós érvelést igénylő feladatok javításához vezethet.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, κάνουμε μια απλή παρατήρηση ότι οι ερωτήσεις σχετικά με τις εικόνες συχνά περιέχουν προϋποθέσεις αντικειμένων και σχέσεων που υπονοούνται από την ερώτηση και ότι η συλλογιστική σχετικά με τις προϋποθέσεις μπορεί να βοηθήσει τα μοντέλα οπτικής απάντησης ερωτήσεων να ανταποκριθούν πιο έξυπνα σε άσχετες ή προηγουμένως αθέατες ερωτήσεις. Όταν παρουσιαστούν με μια ερώτηση που είναι άσχετη με μια εικόνα, τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα θα απαντήσουν καθαρά βασισμένα σε μαθημένες γλωσσικές προκαταλήψεις, με αποτέλεσμα μη ευαίσθητες ή ακόμη και παραπλανητικές απαντήσεις. Σημειώνουμε ότι μια οπτική ερώτηση είναι άσχετη με μια εικόνα αν τουλάχιστον μία από τις υποθέσεις της είναι ψευδής (δηλαδή δεν απεικονίζεται στην εικόνα). Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτή την παρατήρηση για να κατασκευάσουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την πρόβλεψη και εξήγηση σχετικότητας ερωτήσεων (QRPE) αναζητώντας ψευδείς προϋποθέσεις. Εκπαιδεύουμε καινοτόμα μοντέλα ανίχνευσης σχετικότητας ερωτήσεων και δείχνουμε ότι τα μοντέλα που συλλογίζονται σχετικά με τις εγκαταστάσεις συνεχώς ξεπερνούν τα μοντέλα που δεν το κάνουν. Επίσης, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η επιβολή τυποποιημένων μοντέλων για λόγους σχετικά με τις εγκαταστάσεις κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε βελτιώσεις σε εργασίες που απαιτούν σύνθετη συλλογιστική.', 'lt': 'In this paper, we make a simple observation that questions about images often contain premises - objects and relationships implied by the question - and that reasoning about premises can help Visual Question Answering (VQA) models respond more intelligently to irrelevant or previously unseen questions.  When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers.  Mes pastebime, kad vizualinis klausimas nėra svarbus vaizdui, jei bent viena i š jo patalpų yra klaidinga (t. y. neparodyta vaizde). Mes naudojame šį stebėjimą siekiant sukurti klausimų svarbos prognozės ir paaiškinimo (QRPE) duomenų rinkinį ieškodami klaidingų patalpų. We train novel question relevance detection models and show that models that reason about premises consistently outperform models that do not.  Taip pat manome, kad įpareigojant standartinius VQA modelius apmokyti patalpas gali pagerinti užduotis, kurioms reikalingas sudėtinis pagrindimas.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, кескіндер туралы сұрақтардың көбінде помейлері - нысандар мен қатынастары - және помейлер туралы сұрақтардың көмегімен көрінетін сұрақтарды жауап беру үлгілеріне көмектесуі мүмкін емес немесе алдында көрінетін сұрақтарды көме Кескінде маңызды сұрақ бергенде, VQA үлгілерінің күй- жай моделдері білім тілдердің қарсылығына негізделген, сезімсіз немесе дауыс жауаптарына тұрады. Көріністі сұрақ кескінге қатынасыз емес, егер кемінде бір орындалық орындалығы дұрыс болса (мысалы, кескінде көрсетілмеген). Бұл наблюдение сұрақ қатынау мен түсініктеме (QRPE) деген деректер қорын құру үшін қолданып тұрамыз. Біз романдық сұрақтардың маңыздылығын анықтау үлгілерін үйренеміз және олардың маңыздылығын көрсету үлгілерін көрсетуіміз керек. Біз сондай-ақ стандартты VQA үлгілерін бақылау кезінде помейлер туралы тәжірибе үшін тапсырмаларды жақсартуға болады.', 'it': "In questo articolo, facciamo una semplice osservazione che le domande sulle immagini spesso contengono premesse - oggetti e relazioni impliciti dalla domanda - e che il ragionamento sulle premesse può aiutare i modelli di Visual Question Answering (VQA) a rispondere in modo più intelligente a domande irrilevanti o precedentemente non viste. Quando viene presentata una domanda che è irrilevante per un'immagine, i modelli VQA all'avanguardia risponderanno ancora esclusivamente sulla base di pregiudizi linguistici appresi, con conseguente risposta non sensibile o addirittura fuorviante. Notiamo che una domanda visiva è irrilevante per un'immagine se almeno una delle sue premesse è falsa (cioè non raffigurata nell'immagine). Facciamo leva su questa osservazione per costruire un set di dati per la previsione e la spiegazione della rilevanza delle domande (QRPE) cercando false premesse. Formiamo nuovi modelli di rilevamento della rilevanza delle domande e mostriamo che i modelli che ragionano sui locali superano costantemente i modelli che non lo fanno. Troviamo inoltre che forzare i modelli standard VQA a ragionare sui locali durante la formazione può portare a miglioramenti sui compiti che richiedono ragionamento compositivo.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник правиме едноставна набљудување дека прашањата за сликите честопати содржат простори - објекти и односи имплицирани од прашањето - и дека размислувањето за просториите може да помогне моделите на Визуелно одговорување на прашањата (VQA) да одговараат поинтелигентно на нерелевантни или претходно невидени прашања. Кога ќе се претстави прашање што е нерелевантно за слика, најновите модели на ВКА сé уште ќе одговараат чисто врз основа на научените јазички предрасуди, што резултираат со несензични или дури и измамни одговори. Забележуваме дека визуелното прашање не е важно за сликата ако барем една од нејзините простори е лажна (односно не е опишана на сликата). We leverage this observation to construct a dataset for Question Relevance Prediction and Explanation (QRPE) by searching for false premises.  Тренираме нови модели за детекција на релевантноста на прашањата и покажуваме дека моделите кои размислуваат за просториите постојано ги надминуваат моделите кои не. Исто така, сметаме дека принудувањето на стандардните модели на ВКА да размислуваат за просториите за време на обуката може да доведе до подобрувања во задачите кои бараат композициско размислување.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ചിത്രങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും മുന്നിലുണ്ട്- ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളും ബന്ധങ്ങളും ഉള്ള ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. പ്രദ ഒരു ചിത്രത്തിന് അപരിചിതമില്ലാത്ത ഒരു ചോദ്യം കൊണ്ട് വരുമ്പോള്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് വിക്യൂഎ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിച്ച ഭാഷ പിഴവുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഉത് കാഴ്ച ചോദ്യം ഒരു ചിത്രത്തിന് അപരിചിതമാണെന്ന് നമുക്ക് നോക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രദേശങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്ന് തെറ്റാണെങ്കില്\u200d ഒരു ചി ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളും വിവരങ്ങളും തെരയുന്നതിനായി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പരിശോധിയ്ക്കുന്നത് തെറ്റായ മ നമ്മള്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ മോഡലു പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d സ്ഥിരതയുള്ള വിക്യൂഎ മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид зурагнуудын тухай асуултууд ихэвчлэн асуулт нь асуултын тухай орон зай, объект, харилцаа дүүрэн байдаг гэдгийг энгийн анзаарлаа хийдэг. Орон зайдын талаар урьдчилан хариулт хариулт (VQA) загварууд илүү ухаантай эсвэл өмнө нь хар Шинэ зураг дээр хамаагүй асуулт өгсөн үед урлагийн VQA загвар нь суралцагдсан хэл загваруудын тухай зөвхөн хариулт өгөх болно. Бид харагдаж байгаа асуулт зураг дээр хамгийн багахан нэг орон нь худлаа биш гэдгийг анзаарч байна. Бид энэ ажиглалтыг буруу орон хайж асуулт хамаарч өгөгдлийн санг бүтээх боломжтой. Бид шинэ асуултуудын чухал олох загваруудыг суралцаж, загваруудын шалтгааныг үргэлж хийдэггүй загваруудын тухай загваруудыг харуулж байна. Бид мөн стандарт VQA загваруудыг сургалтын үед сургалтын талаар шалтгаан үзүүлэх шаардлагатай үйл явцуудыг сайжруулж чадна.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu osservazzjoni sempliċi li mistoqsijiet dwar l-immaġni ta’ spiss jinkludu postijiet - oġġetti u relazzjonijiet implikati mill-mistoqsija - u li r-raġunament dwar postijiet jista’ jgħin mudelli ta’ Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Viżwali (VQA) jirrispondu b’mod aktar intelliġenti għal mistoqsijiet irrelevanti jew li ma jkunux dehru qabel. When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers.  We note that a visual question is irrelevant to an image if at least one of its premises is false (i.e. not depicted in the image).  Aħna nagħmlu użu minn din l-osservazzjoni biex nibnu sett ta’ dejta għat-Tbassir u l-Ispjegar ta’ Relevanza għall-Mistoqsijiet (QRPE) billi nfittxu post foloz. Aħna nħarrġu mudelli ġodda ta’ rilevanza għall-individwazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet u nuru li mudelli li jirrigwardaw il-bini b’mod konsistenti jaqbżu mudelli li ma jagħmlux dan. Issibu wkoll li l-forza tal-mudelli standard tal-VQA biex jirrinunzjaw dwar il-bini waqt it-taħriġ tista’ twassal għal titjib fil-kompiti li jeħtieġu raġunament kompożizzjonali.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami membuat pengamatan sederhana bahawa soalan mengenai imej sering mengandungi ruang - objek dan hubungan yang dimaksudkan oleh soalan - dan bahawa alasan mengenai ruang boleh membantu model Perjawapan soalan Visual (VQA) menjawab dengan lebih bijak kepada soalan yang tidak relevan atau yang belum terlihat sebelumnya. Apabila ditampilkan soalan yang tidak berkaitan dengan imej, model VQA terkini akan tetap menjawab secara pura-pura berdasarkan biases bahasa belajar, yang menghasilkan jawapan yang tidak sensik atau bahkan menyesatkan. Kami perhatikan bahawa soalan visual tidak berkaitan dengan imej jika sekurang-kurangnya salah satu dari tempatnya adalah palsu (iaitu tidak ditampilkan dalam imej). Kami menggunakan pengamatan ini untuk membina set data untuk Prediksi dan Penjelasan Pertanyaan (QRPE) dengan mencari tempat palsu. Kami melatih model pengesan relevansi soalan baru dan menunjukkan bahawa model yang alasan tentang premis secara konsisten melebihi model yang tidak. Kami juga mendapati bahawa memaksa model VQA piawai untuk alasan mengenai premis semasa latihan boleh membawa kepada peningkatan pada tugas yang memerlukan alasan komposisi.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule dokonujemy prostej obserwacji, że pytania dotyczące obrazów często zawierają przesłanki obiektów i relacje sugerowane przez pytanie, a rozumowanie o przesłanki może pomóc modelom Visual Question Respwering (VQA) w inteligentniejszym odpowiedzi na nieistotne lub wcześniej niewidziane pytania. Gdy przedstawiono pytanie nieistotne dla obrazu, najnowocześniejsze modele VQA nadal będą odpowiadać wyłącznie w oparciu o nauczone uprzedzenia językowe, co powoduje niewrażliwe lub wręcz wprowadzające w błąd odpowiedzi. Zauważamy, że wizualne pytanie nie ma znaczenia dla obrazu, jeśli przynajmniej jedno z jego założeń jest fałszywe (tj. nie przedstawione na obrazie). Wykorzystujemy tę obserwację do skonstruowania zbioru danych dotyczących predykcji i wyjaśnienia istotności pytań (QRPE) poprzez wyszukiwanie fałszywych założeń. Szkolimy nowe modele wykrywania istotności pytań i pokazujemy, że modele, które rozumują o przesłankach konsekwentnie przewyższają modele, które nie mają. Odkrywamy również, że zmuszanie standardowych modeli VQA do rozumowania przesłanek podczas szkolenia może prowadzić do usprawnienia zadań wymagających rozumowania kompozycyjnego.', 'no': 'I denne papiret gjer vi ein enkel observasjon at spørsmål om bilete ofte inneheld premier - objekt og forholdet som er implisert av spørsmålet - og at rasjon om premier kan hjelpa på modeller Visuelle spørsmål svara (VQA) meir intelligent til ulike eller tidlegare ukjende spørsmål. Når det er presentert med eit spørsmål som ikkje er relevant til eit bilete, vil VQA-modeller fremdeles svara purt basert på lærte språkforsiktar, som fører til ikkje-sensiske eller til og med feil svar. Vi merker på at eit visuelt spørsmål er uavhengig for eit bilete dersom minst eitt av sitt område er falsk (dvs. ikkje vist i biletet). Vi leverer denne observasjonen for å konstruere eit dataset for spørsmålrelasjonsforhåndsvising og forklaring (QRPE) ved å søkja etter falske område. Vi treng romanske spørsmålmodeller for oppdaging av relevante spørsmål og viser at modeller at grunnen om premisar er konsistentt utfører modeller som ikkje gjer det. Vi finn også at å tvinga standardmodeller for å forstå mellomrom under opplæring kan føre til forbedringar på oppgåver som krev komposisjonsretting.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, facem o simplă observație că întrebările despre imagini conțin adesea premise - obiecte și relații implicate de întrebare - și că raționamentul despre premise poate ajuta modelele Visual Question Answering (VQA) să răspundă mai inteligent la întrebări irelevante sau nevăzute anterior. Atunci când este prezentată o întrebare irelevantă pentru o imagine, modelele VQA de ultimă generație vor răspunde în continuare exclusiv bazate pe părtiniri lingvistice învățate, rezultând în răspunsuri non-sensibile sau chiar înșelătoare. Observăm că o întrebare vizuală este irelevantă pentru o imagine dacă cel puțin una dintre premisele sale este falsă (adică nu este prezentată în imagine). Folosim această observație pentru a construi un set de date pentru predicția și explicația relevanței întrebărilor (QRPE) prin căutarea unor premise false. Instruim modele noi de detectare a relevanței întrebărilor și arătăm că modelele care raționează despre spații depășesc în mod constant modelele care nu o fac. De asemenea, constatăm că forțarea modelelor standard VQA să raționeze despre spații în timpul instruirii poate duce la îmbunătățiri ale sarcinilor care necesită raționament compozițional.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ka fiirinnaa wax fudud in ay su'aalo ku saabsan sawirada ay marar badan ku jiraan meelo ay ku haystaan, waxyaabaha iyo xiriirka ay su'aaluhu ka soo jeedaan - iyo in ka fikirida qalabka ay ka caawin karaan jawaabta su'aalaha aragga (VQA) in ay ka jawaabaan su'aalaha aan la garanayn ama ay horay u maqan yihiin. Markii la soo dhiibo su'aal a an sawir aheyn, noocyada dowladda ee farshaxanka VQA ayaa weli jawaabi kara si kali ah oo ku saleysan tababarada luuqada la bartay, taasoo sababto jawaabo aan caqli lahayn ama xataa khiyaanaynta. Waxaynu ogaanaynaa in su'aalo arag la arko aysan ahayn sawir, haddii ugu yaraan mid ka mid ah guryahiisa uu been yahay (tusaale ahaan sawirka). Waxaynu soo bandhignaa aragtidan si aan u sameyno sawir la xiriira QRPE oo raadinaya goobaha beenta ah. Waxaannu tababarinnaa tusaalaha la xiriira baaritaanka ee warqada warqada ah, waxaana tusnaynaa tusaalooyinkaas sababta ku saabsan dhismooyinka aan la samayn. Sidoo kale waxaynu heli karnaa in lagu qasbo tusaalaha standardka ee VQA sabab ku saabsan goobaha waxbarashada waqtiga lagu baranayo uu ka hor mari karo hagitaan shaqooyinka loo baahan yahay sabab kooxaha ah.", 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen gör vi en enkel observation att frågor om bilder ofta innehåller lokaler - objekt och relationer implicerade av frågan - och att resonemang om lokaler kan hjälpa Visual Question Answering (VQA) modeller att svara mer intelligent på irrelevanta eller tidigare osedda frågor. När de ställs inför en fråga som är irrelevant för en bild, kommer de senaste VQA-modellerna fortfarande att svara enbart baserat på lärda språkfördomar, vilket resulterar i icke-känsliga eller till och med vilseledande svar. Vi noterar att en visuell fråga är irrelevant för en bild om åtminstone en av dess lokaler är falsk (dvs. inte avbildad i bilden). Vi använder denna observation för att konstruera en dataset för frågerelevans Prediction and Explanation (QRPE) genom att söka efter falska premisser. Vi utbildar nya frågerelevanta detektionsmodeller och visar att modeller som resonerar om lokaler konsekvent överträffar modeller som inte gör det. Vi finner också att tvinga standardiserade VQA-modeller att resonera kring lokaler under utbildningen kan leda till förbättringar av uppgifter som kräver kompositionsresonemang.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு எளிய பார்வையை செய்கிறோம். பிம்பங்கள் பற்றி பிம்பங்கள் பற்றி பெரும்பாலாக முன்னோக்குகள் உள்ளன - கேள்விகள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகள் உள்ளன - விட ஒரு பிம்பத்துக்கு தகுதியில்லாத கேள்வியை கொண்டு கொடுக்கப்பட்டால், நிலைமை விக்யூஏ மாதிரிகள் இன்னும் கற்றப்பட்ட மொழி பிழைகளை அடிப்படையி ஒரு பார்வை கேள்வி பிம்பத்துக்கு மதிப்பில்லா என்பதை நாம் கவனிக்கிறோம். அதன் இடங்களில் ஒரு பொய் என்றால் (அதாவது, பிம்பத்தில் போ நாங்கள் பொய் புலங்களை தேடுவதற்காக கேள்வி தொடர்பு முன்னுரிமை மற்றும் வெளியீடு (QRPE) தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்க இந்த பார்வையை ந நாம் புதிய கேள்வி தொடர்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பு மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்து மாதிரிகளை காட்டுகிறோம் என்று மாதிரிகள் மு மேலும் நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் நிலையான VQA மாதிரிகளை பாதுகாக்க முடியும் பயிற்சியில் முன்னேற்றங்களை பற்றி காரணம', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ساده نظر کر رہے ہیں کہ تصاویروں کے بارے میں سوال اکثر پوچھتے ہیں - سوال کے ذریعے ذریعہ اورباہٹ - اور یہ منزل کے بارے میں ذریعہ بصیرت کے سوال جواب دینے کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں (VQA) نمڈلوں کے بارے میں زیادہ ذریعہ بصیرت یا پہلے غیبت کی سوال کے جواب دی جب ایک سوال کے ساتھ پیش کیے جاتے ہیں جو تصویر کے بارے میں غیر مسئلہ ہے، آرتی VQA موڈل ابھی بھی پوری جواب دیتے ہیں جو علم کی زبان کی مخالفت پر بنتی ہے، اور اس کے نتیجہ میں غیر سنسی یا حتی غلط جواب دیتے ہیں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک دیدھی سوال تصویر کے بارے میں کوئی برابر نہیں ہے اگر اس کی جگہ جھوٹی ہے۔ ہم اس نظارت کو سؤال کے بارے میں ایک ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے (QRPE) جھوٹی جگہ تلاش کریں۔ ہم نئی سؤال کے معاملہ کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ نمڈلوں کے معاملہ میں اس کی دلیل ہے کہ نمڈلوں کے معاملہ میں نمڈلوں سے کامل زیادہ کامل نہیں ہوتے۔ ہم نے بھی دیکھا ہے کہ استاندارڈ VQA موڈل کو ترکینس کے درمیان مکانیزوں کے بارے میں منصوبہ کرنے کے لئے مجبور کرنے کے لئے کاموں پر بہترین ترکیب کرنے کی ضرورت ہے۔', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි සරල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කියලා පින්තූර ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා - ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා - ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dර පින්තූරෙක්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වුනාම, ස්ථානය-of-the-art VQA මොඩේල් තාමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගත්ත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි දර්ශන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පින්තූරයකට අවශ්\u200dයයි කියලා අඩුම තරම් පින්තූරයක් වැරදි නම් (ඉතින් පින්තූරයේ පෙන්තූ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධතාව සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා දත්ත සෙට් හදන්න මේ බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය (QRPE) විස්තරය සඳහා වි අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා විශ්වාස සොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ඒ මොඩේ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණය VQA මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ස්ථානය කරන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru napravljamo jednostavno posmatranje da pitanja o slikama često sadrže prostora - objekte i odnose koje se impliciraju pitanje - i da razgovor o prostorijama može pomoći modelima odgovaranja vizuelnih pitanja (VQA) na neovisne ili prethodno nevidljive pitanja. Kada se predstavlja pitanje koje nije važno na sliku, modeli stanja umjetnosti VQA još uvijek će odgovoriti na temelju učenih jezičkih predrasuda, koji će rezultirati na neosensične ili čak i pogrešne odgovore. Primećujemo da je vizualno pitanje neovisno na sliku ako je barem jedna od njegovih prostora lažna (tj. ne ukazuje na sliku). Primjeravamo ovu promatranje da izgradimo set podataka za predviđanje i objašnjenje pitanja (QRPE) tražeći lažne prostore. Mi treniramo modele otkrivanja relevantnosti novog pitanja i pokazujemo da modeli koji razlog o prostorijama stalno nadmažu modele koji ne rade. Takoðe smatramo da prisiljavanje standardnih modela VQA da razume o prostorijama tokom treninga može dovesti do poboljšanja zadataka koji zahtevaju kompozicionalnu razumnost.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz oddiy tasavvur qilamiz, rasmlar haqida ko'pincha boshqaruv hozir bor - savol bilan obʼektlar va munosabatlar bor - va uyg'atlari haqida qiziqarish qo'shish imkoniyatlariga ko'proq savol javob berishi mumkin. Name Biz ko'rinadigan savol rasm emas, agar bizning birinchisi yolg'on emas, balki rasm emas. Biz bu taqdimot qoʻllanmagan xato prefiklarini qidirish uchun soʻrov boshqaruv va eksport qilish (QRPE) haqida yaratish uchun maʼlumotni yaratib boʻladi. Biz novel savollarini aniqlash modellarini o'rganamiz va modellarni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Bu modellarning hozir davomida butunlay ishga tushirilmagan modellarni ko'rsatamiz. Biz shunday o'ylaymiz: Andoza VQA modellarini qanday qilish uchun o'rganish vazifalarni o'rganish mumkin. Bu vazifalarni qo'shish uchun kompyuterga sabablar kerak bo'lgan vazifalar bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi quan sát đơn giản rằng các câu hỏi về ảnh thường chứa các cơ sở « đối tượng và các mối quan hệ ngụ ý từ câu hỏi.và rằng lý lẽ về cơ sở này có thể giúp các mô hình Trả lời Tầm Thủ (VQA) đáp ứng một cách khôn ngoan hơn với những câu hỏi không liên quan hoặc chưa từng thấy. Khi đưa ra một câu hỏi không liên quan đến hình ảnh, các mô hình VQA hiện đại vẫn sẽ trả lời dựa trên hiểu biết ngôn ngữ giả, dẫn đến câu trả lời không nhạy cảm hay thậm chí sai lầm. Chúng tôi lưu ý câu hỏi về hình ảnh không liên quan đến ảnh nếu ít nhất một cơ sở của nó là giả (không được mô tả trong ảnh). Chúng ta sử dụng quan sát này để xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu về dự đoán và giải thích câu hỏi (QRPE) bằng cách tìm kiếm cơ sở giả. Chúng tôi đào tạo các mô hình đáng chú ý mới về vấn đề và cho thấy các mô hình lý do về cơ sở hoàn toàn vượt trội các mẫu không làm. Chúng tôi cũng thấy rằng buộc các mô hình V.A tiêu chuẩn phải lý giải về các cơ sở trong khi huấn luyện có thể dẫn đến cải thiện các công việc cần lập trình phối hợp.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru, napravimo jednostavno promatranje da pitanja o slikama često sadrže prostora - objekte i odnose koje se impliciraju pitanje - i da razgovor o prostorijama može pomoći modelima odgovora na vizuelna pitanja (VQA) na neovisne ili prethodno nevidljive pitanja. Kada se predstavlja pitanje koje nije važno na sliku, modeli države umjetnosti VQA još uvijek će odgovoriti na temelju učenih jezičkih predrasuda, što bi rezultiralo neosensičnim ili čak pogrešnim odgovorima. Primećujemo da je vizualno pitanje neovisno na sliku ako je barem jedna od njegovih prostora lažna (tj. ne pokazana na sliki). Mi primjenjujemo ovu promatranje da izgradimo komplet podataka za predviđanje i objašnjenje pitanja (QRPE) tražeći lažne prostore. Vježbamo modele otkrivanja relevantnosti novog pitanja i pokazujemo da modeli koji razlog o prostorijama stalno nadmađuju modele koji ne rade. Također smatramo da prisiljavanje standardnih modela VQA-a na razum o prostorijama tijekom obuke može dovesti do poboljšanja zadataka koji zahtijevaju kompozicionalnu razumnost.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel maken we een eenvoudige observatie dat vragen over beelden vaak premises bevatten ten opzichte van objecten en relaties die door de vraag worden geïmpliceerd en dat redeneren over premises kan helpen Visual Question Answering (VQA) modellen slimmer te reageren op irrelevante of voorheen ongeziene vragen. Wanneer een vraag wordt gesteld die irrelevant is voor een beeld, zullen state-of-the-art VQA-modellen nog steeds antwoorden puur op geleerde taalvooroordelen, wat resulteert in niet-sensuele of zelfs misleidende antwoorden. We merken op dat een visuele vraag irrelevant is voor een beeld als ten minste één van zijn vooronderstellingen vals is (d.w.z. niet afgebeeld in de afbeelding). We gebruiken deze observatie om een dataset te maken voor Question Relevance Prediction and Exlaration (QRPE) door te zoeken naar valse premises. We trainen nieuwe detectiemodellen voor vraagrelevantie en laten zien dat modellen die redeneren over premises consistent beter presteren dan modellen die dat niet doen. We vinden ook dat het forceren van standaard VQA modellen om te redeneren over gebouwen tijdens de training kan leiden tot verbeteringen van taken die compositioneel redeneren vereisen.', 'bg': 'В тази статия правим просто наблюдение, че въпросите за изображенията често съдържат предпоставки - обекти и взаимоотношения, подразбиращи се от въпроса - и че разсъжденията за предпоставките могат да помогнат на моделите за визуално отговаряне на въпроси (ВКА) да отговорят по-интелигентно на неуместни или досега невиждани въпроси. Когато бъдат представени с въпрос, който не е от значение за дадено изображение, съвременните модели на ВКУ все още ще отговорят чисто въз основа на научен езиков отклонение, което води до нечувствителни или дори подвеждащи отговори. Отбелязваме, че визуалният въпрос е без значение за изображението, ако поне едно от неговите предпоставки е невярно (т.е. не е изобразено в изображението). Използваме това наблюдение, за да изградим набор от данни за прогнозиране и обяснение на релевантността на въпросите чрез търсене на фалшиви предпоставки. Обучаваме нови модели за откриване на релевантност на въпросите и показваме, че моделите, които разсъждават за помещенията, постоянно превъзхождат моделите, които не го правят. Също така откриваме, че принуждаването на стандартните модели за оценка на качеството да разсъждават за помещенията по време на обучението може да доведе до подобрения в задачите, изискващи композиционно разсъждаване.', 'da': 'I denne artikel gør vi en simpel observation af, at spørgsmål om billeder ofte indeholder lokaler - objekter og relationer antydet af spørgsmålet - og at ræsonnement om lokaler kan hjælpe Visual Question Answering (VQA) modeller med at reagere mere intelligent på irrelevante eller tidligere usete spørgsmål. Når de stilles med et spørgsmål, der er irrelevant for et billede, vil state-of-the-art VQA-modeller stadig svare udelukkende baseret på lærte sprogfordele, hvilket resulterer i ikke-følsomme eller endda vildledende svar. Vi bemærker, at et visuelt spørgsmål er irrelevant for et billede, hvis mindst ét af dets lokaler er falsk (dvs. ikke afbildet i billedet). Vi bruger denne observation til at konstruere et datasæt til spørgsmål relevans forudsigelse og forklaring (QRPE) ved at søge efter falske premisser. Vi træner nye spørgsmål relevans detektionsmodeller og viser, at modeller, der tænker om lokaler konsekvent overgår modeller, der ikke gør det. Vi finder også, at tvinge standard VQA modeller til at tænke over lokaler under træning kan føre til forbedringer af opgaver, der kræver sammensætningsmæssig ræsonnement.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag machen wir eine einfache Beobachtung, dass Fragen zu Bildern oft Prämissen von Objekten und Beziehungen enthalten, die von der Frage impliziert werden, und dass Argumentation über Prämissen helfen kann, Visual Question Answering (VQA)-Modelle intelligenter auf irrelevante oder bisher nicht gesehene Fragen zu reagieren. Bei einer Frage, die für ein Bild irrelevant ist, beantworten moderne VQA-Modelle immer noch rein auf erlernten Sprachvorurteilen, was zu unsensiblen oder gar irreführenden Antworten führt. Wir stellen fest, dass eine visuelle Frage für ein Bild irrelevant ist, wenn mindestens eine seiner Prämissen falsch ist (d.h. nicht im Bild dargestellt). Wir nutzen diese Beobachtung, um einen Datensatz für Question Relevance Prediction and Exlaration (QRPE) zu erstellen, indem wir nach falschen Prämissen suchen. Wir trainieren neuartige Fragenrelevanz-Erkennungsmodelle und zeigen, dass Modelle, die über Prämissen nachdenken, Modelle durchweg übertreffen, die dies nicht tun. Wir stellen auch fest, dass das Erzwingen von Standard-VQA-Modellen zur Vernunft über Räumlichkeiten während des Trainings zu Verbesserungen bei Aufgaben führen kann, die kompositorisches Denken erfordern.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami membuat pengamatan sederhana bahwa pertanyaan tentang gambar sering mengandung ruang - objek dan hubungan yang dimaksudkan oleh pertanyaan - dan bahwa alasan tentang ruang dapat membantu model Visual Question Answering (VQA) merespon dengan lebih cerdas kepada pertanyaan yang tidak relevan atau belum terlihat sebelumnya. When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers.  Kami memperhatikan bahwa pertanyaan visual tidak penting bagi gambar jika setidaknya salah satu ruang itu palsu (i.e. tidak ditampilkan di gambar). Kami menggunakan pengamatan ini untuk membangun set data untuk Pertanyaan Perdugaan dan Penjelasan (QRPE) dengan mencari ruang palsu. Kami melatih model deteksi relevansi pertanyaan baru dan menunjukkan bahwa model yang alasan tentang ruang secara konsisten melebihi model yang tidak. Kami juga menemukan bahwa memaksa model VQA standar untuk alasan tentang ruang selama latihan dapat membawa ke peningkatan dalam tugas yang membutuhkan alasan komposisi.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک مشاهده ساده انجام می دهیم که سوال در مورد تصاویر اغلب محل\u200cها - objekte و رابطه\u200cهایی که توسط سؤال مشخص می\u200cشوند - و این دلیل\u200cگیری در مورد محل\u200cها می\u200cتواند مدل\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cدادن سوال\u200cهای بینایی (VQA) به ذهن\u200cتر به سوال\u200cهای بی\u200cاثر یا وقتی با یک سوال پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که به یک تصویر بی\u200cاثری است، مدل\u200cهای ایالت VQA هنری هنری هنوز پاسخ می\u200cدهد که بر پایه\u200cهای جابجایی زبان یاد می\u200cگیرد، به نتیجه جواب\u200cهای غیر حسی یا حتی اشتباه می\u200cکند. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که سوال دیده\u200cای به یک تصویر بی\u200cاثر نیست اگر حداقل یکی از محل\u200cهای آن دروغ باشد (که در تصویر نمایش نشده است). ما این مشاهده را برای ساختن یک مجموعه داده برای پیشنهاد و توضیح نسبت به سوال (QRPE) با جستجوی جایگاه\u200cهای دروغ استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما مدلهای شناسایی مربوط به سوال رمانی را آموزش می\u200cدهیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدلها دلیل آن درباره\u200cی محل\u200cها همیشه مدلهای اجرایی بیشتر از آن نیستند. ما همچنین یافتیم که مجبور کردن مدلهای استاندارد VQA به دلیل درباره محل های تمرین می تواند به بهترین رسیدن به کار های لازم به دلیل ترکیب پیدا کنند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, suratlar hakynda köplenç soraglar soraglaryň alanlary - objekler we ilişkileri soragdan ylalaşýarlar - we alanlar hakynda düşünüp görsel sorag jogaplary (VQA) modellerine (görsel sorag jogaplary) kömek edip biler. Resim bilen wajyp ýok bir sorag berildiginde, sanat-taýýarlyk VQA nusgalary entägem öwrenmeli dil biaslaryna daýan jogap berer, sebäbi sensiýal ýa hatda ýalňyş jogaplar bolar. Görsel soragy suratda hiç hili wajyp däl, eger i ň azyndan bir alanyň ýalňyş bolsa (meselâ surada görkezilmedik). Biz bu gözlemeyi ýalňyş ýerleri gözlemek üçin sorag baglanyşygy we düşündirişi(QRPE) üçin bir dataset inşa etmek üçin etkinleýäris Biz novela soraglaryň wajyplygyny tanyş nusgalaryny öwredýäris we nusgalaryň bolmadyk nusgalaryň hemişe däldir. Biz hem bu şekilde standart VQA nusgalaryny okuw wagtynda alanlar hakynda sebäplere tertiblemek üçin kompozisyonal sebäplere gerek zadlaryň gelişmelerine ýok edip bileris.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunafanya maoni rahisi kwamba maswali yanayohusu picha mara nyingi yanahusu maeneo - vitu na mahusiano yanayohusishwa na swali - na kwamba kujadili maeneo yanaweza kusaidia kujibu swali la Visual Question (VQA) zinaweza kujibu vizuri zaidi kwa maswali yasiyoeleweka au yasiyoeleweka. Wakati utakapotolewa na swali ambalo halina maana ya picha, mitindo ya a in a ya sanaa ya VQA bado yatajibu kulingana na upendeleo wa lugha zilizojifunza, na kusababisha majibu yasiyo na hisia au hata kupoteza. Tunaona kwamba swali la kuona halina maana ya picha kama angalau moja ya maeneo yake ni ya uongo (yaani kwenye picha). Tunaitumia mtazamo huu wa kutengeneza seti ya data kwa ajili ya Utawala wa Tamko na Utafiti wa Maswali (QRPE) kwa kutafuta maeneo ya uongo. Tunafundisha maswali ya riwaya yanayohusiana na kutekeleza mifano na kuonyesha mifano ambayo ndiyo sababu ya maeneo yanayohusu mifano ambayo hayajafanya. Pia tunagundua kuwa kulazimisha mifano ya VQA ya kiwango cha kawaida ili kuelewa kuhusu maeneo ya maeneo wakati wa mafunzo yanaweza kusababisha maboresho katika kazi zinazohitaji sababu za pamoja.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne bëjmë një vëzhgim të thjeshtë se pyetjet rreth imazheve shpesh përmbajnë lokale - objekte dhe marrëdhënie të nënkuptuara nga pyetja - dhe se arsyetimi rreth lokaleve mund të ndihmojë modelet e përgjigjes për pyetje vizuale (VQA) të përgjigjen më inteligjentisht ndaj pyetjeve të panjohura ose të padukshme më parë. When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers.  We note that a visual question is irrelevant to an image if at least one of its premises is false (i.e. not depicted in the image).  Ne përdorim këtë vëzhgim për të ndërtuar një set të dhënash për parashikimin dhe shpjegimin e lidhjes me pyetjet (QRPE) duke kërkuar për lokale të rreme. We train novel question relevance detection models and show that models that reason about premises consistently outperform models that do not.  We also find that forcing standard VQA models to reason about premises during training can lead to improvements on tasks requiring compositional reasoning.', 'af': "In hierdie papier maak ons 'n eenvoudige observasie dat vrae oor beelde dikwels premisies bevat - voorwerpe en verhoudings wat deur die vraag geïmpliseer is - en dat redening oor premisies kan help om Visuele Vrag Antwoord (VQA) modele meer intelligent reageer na onbelangrik of voorheen onverskyn vrae. Wanneer voorgestel is met 'n vraag wat onbehoorlik is a an 'n beeld, sal staat-van-die-kuns VQA-modele nog net antwoord op geleerde taal voorskrifte, wat resultaat in nie-sensieële of selfs verkeerde antwoordes. Ons not a dat 'n visuele vraag onbehoorlik is a an 'n beeld as minste een van sy premisies is vals (bv. nie in die beeld vertoon nie). Ons verwyder hierdie opservasie om 'n datastel vir Vragantverwysing en Verwysing (QRPE) te konstrukteer deur soek na valse premisies. Ons oefen novele vraag relevante ontdekking modele en wys dat modele wat rede oor premisies konsistentlik uitvoer modele wat nie doen nie. Ons vind ook dat die verdrukking van standaard VQA-modele om rede oor premisies tydens optrekking kan lei na verbeteringe op opdragte wat compositionale redening nodig het.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ስለምዕራቦች ብዙ ጊዜ የሚጠይቁትን ግንኙነቶች እና ግንኙነቶችን በሚያሳየቁበት ቀላል ማሳየት እና ስለቤቶች ማሰናከል የራእይ ጥያቄ መልስ (VQA) ሞዴላዎችን በማስተዋል ወይም አስቀድሞ ያልታወቀ ጥያቄዎችን እንዲመልሱ ይችላል፡፡ ምስል በተደረገው ጥያቄ በተደረገ ጊዜ፣ የ-የ-የ-art VQA ሞዴላዎች ደግሞ በተማረ ቋንቋ እውቀት በተደረገ ጥያቄ ይመልሳሉ፡፡ የራእይ ጥያቄ ምሳሌ ከስፍራው አንዱ ሐሰት ቢሆን (ምናልባት ምስል ሳይታወቅ) እንደሆነ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የጥያቄ ግንኙነት እና መፍጠር (QRPE) የሐሰት ስፍራዎችን ለመፈለግ የዳታ ስርዓት መሠረት እና መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ We train novel question relevance detection models and show that models that reason about premises consistently outperform models that do not.  እናም ድጋፍ የVQA ሞዴላዎችን ለመጠቀም ሲያስፈልጋቸው ትክክል ምክንያት የሚያስፈልገውን ስራዎችን ለማሻሻል እናገኛለን፡፡', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 간단한 관찰을 했다. 이미지에 관한 문제는 일반적으로 전제-문제에 포함된 대상과 관계를 포함하고 전제에 대한 추리는 시각문답(VQA)모델이 관련되지 않거나 이전에 보이지 않았던 문제에 더욱 스마트하게 응답하도록 도와준다.이미지와 무관한 질문을 받을 때 가장 선진적인 VQA 모델은 순전히 습득한 언어 편견에 근거하여 대답하여 비감각적이고 심지어 오도적인 답을 얻는다.우리는 만약 하나의 시각적 문제가 최소한 하나의 전제가 틀렸다면, 그것은 이미지와 무관하다는 것을 알아차렸다.우리는 이 관찰 결과를 활용해 오류 검색 전제를 통해 문제 관련성 예측·해석(QRPE) 데이터 세트를 구축했다.우리는 새로운 문제 관련성 검측 모델을 훈련시켰고 전제 추리를 바탕으로 하는 모델이 전제 추리를 바탕으로 하지 않는 모델보다 시종 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.훈련 기간에 표준 VQA 모델을 강제로 전제에 대한 추리를 하면 조합 추리가 필요한 임무를 개선할 수 있다는 것도 발견했다.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, şəkillər haqqında soruşmalar çox çox məlumatlar içərir - soruşmaqdan olan objeklər və ilişkiler - və yer haqqında razılaşmalar Visual Question Response (VQA) modellerinə daha a ğıllı və daha əvvəl görmədiyimiz suallara cavab verə bilər. Görüntüyə heç bir fayda verməyən bir suala göstərildikdə, sanat VQA modellərinin durumu hələ də öyrəndiyi dil təsirlərinə görə təmiz cavab verəcəkdir. Bu, sensik olmayan və hətta yanlış cavab verəcəkdir. Görünüş sualı bir şəkillə heç bir fayda verməz, əgər onun yerindən biri yalan deyilsə. Biz bu gözləməyi haqsız yerlərdən axtarıb soruşma bağlılığı və Explosion (QRPE) üçün verilən qurmaq üçün yaradırıq. Biz yeni sual çoxluğunu keşfetmə modellərini təhsil edirik və bu modellərin səbəbi həmişə olmayan modellərin çoxluğunu göstəririk. Biz də görürük ki, təhsil sırasında standart VQA modellərini təhsil etmək üçün təhsil etmək kompozisyonal dəyişiklik istəyən işlərdə yaxşılıqları olar.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru napravljamo jednostavnu promatranje da pitanja o slikama često sadrže prostora - objekte i odnose koje se impliciraju pitanje - i da razgovor o prostorijama može pomoći modelima odgovaranja vizuelnih pitanja (VQA) na neobičnije ili prethodno nevidljivije pitanja. Kada se predstavlja pitanje koje nije važno na sliku, modeli države umjetnosti VQA još uvijek će odgovoriti na temelju učenih jezičkih predrasuda, što bi rezultiralo neosensičnim ili čak pogrešnim odgovorima. Primećujemo da je vizualno pitanje neovisno na sliku ako je barem jedna od njegovih prostora lažna (tj. nije na sliki). Mi primjenjujemo ovu promatranje da izgradimo set podataka za predviđanje i objašnjenje pitanja (QRPE) tražeći lažne prostore. Mi treniramo modele otkrivanja relevantnosti novog pitanja i pokazujemo da modeli koji razlog o prostorijama stalno nadmađuju modele koji ne rade. Također smatramo da prisiljavanje standardnih modela VQA-a da razume o prostorijama tijekom obuke može dovesti do poboljšanja zadataka koji zahtijevaju kompozicionalnu razumnost.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটা সাধারণ পর্যবেক্ষণ করি যে ছবিগুলো সম্পর্কে প্রায়শ প্রশ্নের মধ্যে প্রশ্ন রয়েছে - প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে প্রশ্নের বস্তু এবং সম্পর্ক রয়েছে- আর যে বিষয়টি ভিসিয়াল প্রশ্ন যখন একটি প্রশ্নের সাথে উপস্থাপন করা হয়, তখন স্টেট-অফ-শিল্প ভিকিউ-এর মডেল শুধুমাত্র শিক্ষিত ভাষার বৈষম্যের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে উত্তর দেব আমরা লক্ষ্য করি যে একটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিক প্রশ্ন একটি ছবির প্রতি অমান্য প্রশ্ন যদি অন্তত একটি গৃহগুলো মিথ্যা (যেমন ছবিতে দেখা যায় না)। প্রশ্নের সম্পর্ক এবং এক্সপ্ল্যানেশন (কিউআরপেরি) নির্মাণ করার জন্য আমরা এই পর্যবেক্ষণের সাহায্য করি মিথ্যা জায়গাগুলো খুঁজছি। আমরা উপন্যাসের প্রশ্নের প্রশ্ন প্রশ্ন প্রশ্ন করি আবিষ্কারের মোডেল প্রশ্ন প্রশ্ন করি এবং তা দেখাই যে মডেল যে মডেলের কারণ হচ্ We also find that forcing standard VQA models to reason about premises during training can lead to improvements on tasks requiring compositional reasoning.', 'ca': "En aquest article, fem una simple observació que les preguntes sobre imatges sovint contenen premis - objectes i relacions implicads per la pregunta - i que el raonament sobre premis pot ajudar els models de Responsa a Preguntes Visuals (VQA) a respondre de manera més intel·ligent a preguntes irrelevants o anteriorment invisibles. When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers.  Notem que una pregunta visual és irrelevant per a una imatge si almenys una de les seves premises és falsa (és a dir, no representada a la imatge). We leverage this observation to construct a dataset for Question Relevance Prediction and Explanation (QRPE) by searching for false premises.  Ensenyem models noves de detecció de la pertinença de preguntes i demostrem que els models que explicen sobre les instal·lacions superen constantment els models que no. També descobrim que forçar els models VQA estàndard a raonar sobre premis durant l'entrenament pot portar a millores en tasques que requereixen raonament compositiu.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös teeme lihtsa tähelepanu, et piltide küsimused sisaldavad sageli eeldusi - objekte ja suhteid, mida küsimus tähendab - ning et ruumide mõtlemine võib aidata visuaalse küsimustele vastamise mudelitel intelligentsemalt ebaolulistele või varem nähtamatutele küsimustele vastata. Kui esitatakse pildile ebaoluline küsimus, vastavad tipptasemel VQA mudelid siiski puhtalt õppitud keeleliste kallakute põhjal, mille tulemuseks on mittetundlikud või isegi eksitavad vastused. Märgime, et visuaalne küsimus ei ole pildi jaoks oluline, kui vähemalt üks selle eeldustest on vale (st pildil ei ole kujutatud). Me kasutame seda vaatlust, et luua andmekogum küsimuste olulisuse prognoosimiseks ja selgitamiseks (QRPE), otsides valeeeldusi. Me koolitame uudseid küsimuste asjakohasuse tuvastamise mudeleid ja näitame, et mudelid, mis mõtlevad ruumidest, on pidevalt paremad kui mudelid, mis seda ei tee. Samuti leiame, et standardsete VQA mudelite sundimine koolituse ajal ruumide üle arutlema võib viia kompositsioonilist arutlemist nõudvate ülesannete täiustamiseni.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa teemme yksinkertaisen havainnon, että kuviin liittyvät kysymykset sisältävät usein lähtökohtia - esineitä ja suhteita kysymyksessä - ja että lähtökohtia koskeva ajattelu voi auttaa visuaalisten kysymysten vastausmallien (VQA) vastaamisessa älykkäämmin epäolennaisiin tai aiemmin näkymättömiin kysymyksiin. Kun esitetään kuvan kannalta merkityksetön kysymys, uusimmat VQA-mallit vastaavat edelleen puhtaasti opittuihin kielivääristymiin perustuen, mikä johtaa epäherkkiin tai jopa harhaanjohtaviin vastauksiin. Huomaamme, että visuaalisella kysymyksellä ei ole merkitystä kuvaan, jos ainakin yksi sen lähtökohdista on väärä (eli sitä ei ole kuvattu kuvassa). Hyödynnämme tätä havaintoa luodaksemme datajoukon kysymyksen relevanssin ennustusta ja selittämistä varten (QRPE) etsimällä vääriä oletuksia. Koulutamme uusia kysymyksen relevanssin havaitsemismalleja ja osoitamme, että toimitiloista järkeilevät mallit ovat johdonmukaisesti parempia kuin ne, jotka eivät. Havaitsemme myös, että vakiomallien pakottaminen päättelemään tiloista koulutuksen aikana voi johtaa kompositiivista päättelyä vaativiin tehtäviin.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku provádíme jednoduchý poznamenání, že otázky o obrazech často obsahují předpoklady objektů a vztahy implikované otázkou a že uvažování o předpokladech může pomoci modelům zodpovězení vizuálních otázek inteligentněji reagovat na irelevantní nebo dříve neviděné otázky. Při předložení otázky, která je irelevantní pro obraz, budou moderní VQA modely stále odpovídat čistě na základě naučených jazykových předsudků, což vede k necitlivým nebo dokonce zavádějícím odpovědím. Všimneme si, že vizuální otázka je pro obraz irelevantní, pokud alespoň jeden z jeho předpokladů je falešný (tedy není na obrázku zobrazen). Toto pozorování využíváme k sestavení datové sady pro predikci a vysvětlení relevance otázek (QRPE) hledáním falešných předpokladů. Trénujeme nové modely detekce relevance otázek a ukazujeme, že modely, které uvažují o prostorách, konzistentně překonávají modely, které ne. Zjišťujeme také, že nutit standardní VQA modely uvažovat o prostorách během školení může vést ke zlepšení úkolů vyžadujících kompoziční uvažování.', 'hy': 'In this paper, we make a simple observation that questions about images often contain premises - objects and relationships implied by the question - and that reasoning about premises can help Visual Question Answering (VQA) models respond more intelligently to irrelevant or previously unseen questions.  When presented with a question that is irrelevant to an image, state-of-the-art VQA models will still answer purely based on learned language biases, resulting in non-sensical or even misleading answers.  Մենք նկատում ենք, որ տեսողական հարցը անկարևոր է պատկերի համար, եթե առնվազն նրա ենթակառություններից մեկը սխալ է (այսինքն, պատկերում չի ներկայացված): We leverage this observation to construct a dataset for Question Relevance Prediction and Explanation (QRPE) by searching for false premises.  We train novel question relevance detection models and show that models that reason about premises consistently outperform models that do not.  We also find that forcing standard VQA models to reason about premises during training can lead to improvements on tasks requiring compositional reasoning.', 'jv': 'Nang paper iki, kita lagi un kesempatan anyar kang dipunseraning surat banjur gambar aturan luwih dumaten - obèh lan ratio sing beraksi karo kesempatan - lan punika dipunseraning surat sing bisa bantuan winih sing bisa dianggap "Visual question responsal (VqA) Ora iso nambah karo perusahaan sing or a nggawe gambar penting, model state-of-the-arts VqA iso dianggap luwih dumadhi sing bisa dilanjure usual karo perusahaan anyar lengkang, dadi iso ketemul opo sing apik nek ketemul. Awak dhéwé ngerti apa winih lan kabèh dumadhi aceh gambar Awakdhéwé nggawe pernik-pernik kanggo nggawe dataset kanggo Kemerdekaan Relebance prediksion lan Gebongke Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan Rongane kuwi tindahan ujaran model neng ngono kuwi model sing apik dhéwé kuwi tindahan, ngono kuwi nggawe model sing bisa pasakno. Awak dhéwé éntuk nglanggar-sanggunaké model VqA padha mengko awak dhéwé sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi tindakan nggawe gerakan luwih apik dhéwé, mengko awak dhéwé, sing beraksi tambah.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã samar da masu sauƙi cẽwa masu tambayi masu tambaya na zane ta ƙunsa da misalin-abubuwan da mazaɓa da muhimman da aka faɗa da su -kuma masu kula da wajen muhimmada masu tambayi na bayani, za ta taimake misalin Sãshin Malã'in Gani (vQA) su karɓi wasu maswali na da ba'a sani ba. Idan an bãyar da wani tambayi wanda bai zama mai inganci ba ga zane, watau motdalun-state-of-art-the-art za'a bada karɓa, a kan banne-zane-zane da aka sanar da shi kawai, don ya ƙara karkaci masu saɓa ko kuma don ya ɓatar da jibar. We note that a visual question is irrelevant to an image if at least one of its premises is false (i.e. not depicted in the image).  @ info: tooltip Tuna kõre masu tambayi na yanzu masu muhimu ga misãlai na gane kuma Muke nuna misãlai da ke sakar da mismismiski daidai ta sami misãlai da ba. Kayya, Munã sãmu cewa a lazimtar da misãlai na QA ta zama masu hankali ga mismisalin a lokacin mafarin, yana iya ƙara wa gyarata ga aikin da ke da sabon da ke so.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מבצעים תצפיה פשוטה ששאלות על תמונות לעתים קרובות מכילות מקומות - אובייקטים ומערכות יחסים שמרמזים על ידי השאלה - ושההיגיון על מקומות יכול לעזור דוגמנים לענות על שאלות חזותיות כשיוציאו שאלה שלא רלוונטית לתמונה, דוגמני VQA המאוחרים עדיין יענו טהור מבוססים על חיזוקי שפה ללמודים, מה שהוביל לתשובות לא רגשיות או אפילו מטרידות. אנו מבחינים ששאלה חזותית אינה רלוונטית לתמונה אם לפחות אחת מהמקומות שלה שווא (כלומר לא מוצגת בתמונה). אנו מנצלים את ההצגה הזאת כדי לבנות קבוצת נתונים לקיום ולהסבר על קשר לשאלות (QRPE) על ידי חיפוש אחר מקומות שווא. אנו מאמן דוגמני גילוי שאלות חדשות ולהראות שדוגמנים שהסיבה לגבי מקומות באופן קבוע מתגברים על דוגמנים שלא. אנחנו גם מוצאים שאכריחת דוגמנים VQA סטנדרטיים להסביר על מקומות במהלך האימונים יכולה להוביל לשיפורים על משימות שדורשות הגיון מורכב.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku smo naredili preprosto ugotovitev, da vprašanja o slikah pogosto vsebujejo predmete - predmete in odnose, ki jih vprašanje implicira - in da lahko razmišljanje o prostorih pomaga modelom vizualnega odgovarjanja na vprašanja (VQA) bolj inteligentno odgovarjati na nepomembna ali prej nevidna vprašanja. Najsodobnejši modeli VQA še vedno odgovarjajo na vprašanje, ki ni pomembno za sliko, izključno na podlagi učenih jezikovnih pristranskosti, kar ima za posledico nečutljive ali celo zavajajoče odgovore. Ugotavljamo, da je vizualno vprašanje nepomembno za sliko, če je vsaj ena od njenih predlogov napačna (tj. ni prikazana na sliki). S tem opazovanjem izkoristimo nabor podatkov za napoved in pojasnjevanje relevantnosti vprašanj (QRPE) z iskanjem lažnih predpostavk. Usposabljamo nove modele za odkrivanje relevantnosti vprašanj in pokažemo, da modeli, ki razumejo o prostorih, dosledno presegajo modele, ki jih ne. Ugotavljamo tudi, da prisiljevanje standardnih modelov VQA k razmišljanju o prostorih med usposabljanjem lahko vodi do izboljšav nalog, ki zahtevajo kompozicijsko razmišljanje.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བརྙན་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་འདི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཁང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། དངོས་པོ་དང་འབྲེལ གཟུགས་རིས་ཅིག་ལ་གནད་དོན་དགོས་མིན་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་འདི་བྱུང་བའི་སྐབས་སུ་འཇུག་སྲིད། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གཅིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་མཐོང་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་ཡང་མེད་པར་ལྟ་བུ་འཇུག་ཡོད་པ། བརྙན་རིས་ནང་གི་ཉུང We leverage this observation to build a dataset for Question Relevance Prediction and Explanation (QRPE), by searching for false premises. ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་ཅིག་གི་དྲི་བ་དག་མཚམས་སྟོན་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྟོགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ལས། དཔེ་དབུས་གནས་ཀྱི་མིག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པའི་VQA རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་གིས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཕར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Guided Open Vocabulary Image Captioning with Constrained Beam Search', 'fr': "Sous-titrage d'image de vocabulaire ouvert guidé avec recherche de faisceau contrainte", 'es': 'Subtítulos de imágenes guiados de vocabulario abierto con búsqueda de haces restringidos', 'ar': 'إرشادية مفتوحة المفردات صورة توضيحية مع تقييد البحث شعاع', 'pt': 'Legendagem de imagem de vocabulário aberto guiado com pesquisa de feixe restrita', 'ja': '制約付きビーム検索によるガイド付きオープンボキャブラリ画像キャプション作成', 'zh': '有约束光束搜索导式开词汇图像字幕', 'ru': 'Управляемая открытая подпись словаря с ограниченным поиском по лучу', 'hi': 'निर्देशित खुला शब्दावली छवि सीमित बीम खोज के साथ कैप्शनिंग', 'ga': 'Fotheidealú Íomhánna Focal Oscailte Treoraithe le Cuardach Líoma Srianta', 'hu': 'Irányított nyitott szókincsek feliratozása kényszersugárral Keresés', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': "Didascalia dell'immagine aperta guidata del vocabolario con costrizione del fascio", 'el': 'Καθοδηγούμενη ανοικτή λεζάντα εικόνας λεξιλογίου με περιορισμένη αναζήτηση ακτίνων', 'lt': 'Gairūs atviro žodyno paveikslėlio pavadinimai su ribota šviesos paieška', 'ms': 'Pembukaan Imej Katalaluan Dipandang Dengan Carian Cerita Terhadir', 'mk': 'Наводено отворање на слика од речникот со пребарување на ограничен зрак', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлагдсан бөмбөгийн хайртай нээлттэй үгийн зураг зураг зураг', 'mt': 'Tkabbir ta’ Immaġni Gwida tal-Vokabularju Miftuħ b’Riżultat ta’ Riżultat', 'ml': 'പദ്ധതിയുള്ള ബീമിന്റെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d കാണിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുപയോഗിക്ക', 'kk': 'Сөздерді шектелген Beam іздеуімен ашық сөздер кескінін айдару', 'no': 'Hjelpetekst for opna ordbokstav- bilete med avgrensa beam- søk', 'pl': 'Przewodnik Otwarty słownik napisów obrazów z ograniczoną wiązką', 'ro': 'Captarea imaginii vocabulare deschise ghidate cu fascicul constrâns', 'so': 'Image capturing with Constrained Beam Search', 'sv': 'Bildtext för guidad öppen ordlista med begränsad stråle Sök', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பீம் தேடுதலுடன் வழிகாட்டப்பட்ட சொற்கோவை பிம்பம் பிடிப்பது', 'sr': 'Vođeno otvoreno rečničko slikanje slike sa ograničenim traženjem zraka', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tìm tia sáng khi đọc tập tin ảnh', 'hr': 'Vođeno otvoreno rečničko slikanje slike s ograničenim traženjem zraka', 'da': 'Guidet åbent ordforråd billedtekster med begrænset stråle Søgning', 'bg': 'Водено отворено речниково изображение с ограничено търсене на лъч', 'nl': 'Met geleide open woordenschat afbeeldingsbijschriften met beperkte straal zoeken', 'de': 'Geführte Bildbeschriftung mit offenem Vokabular mit eingeschränkter Strahlsuche', 'id': 'Pemandu Buka Gambar Vocabular Captioning dengan Pencarian Beam Terbatas', 'ko': '제약된 빔 검색을 위한 안내 개방 어휘 이미지 자막', 'fa': 'باز کردن تصویر سخنرانی راهنمایی با جستجوی بیم محدود', 'sw': 'Picha inayoongozwa Open Vocabulary Picha kwa Picha ya Utafiti wa Mafuriko', 'tr': 'Ýagtymly Beam Ahtarmasy bilen Aç Sözlük Resim Käpşenler', 'hy': 'Առաջարկված ճառագայթի որոնման միջոցով բաց բաց բառարանի պատկերների գլխավորումը', 'az': 'Q캼ymetli Beam Aramas캼 il톛 A칞캼q S칬zl칲 R톛sm Kapit톛si', 'bn': 'পরিচিত শব্দভাণ্ডারের ছবি প্রশিক্ষিত বীম অনুসন্ধানের সাথে গাইড করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Vođeno otvoreno rečničko slikanje slike sa ograničenim traženjem zraka', 'af': 'Gedraai Open Voorwoord Beeld Captioning met Beheinde Beam Soektog', 'sq': 'Duke u drejtuar për të hapur figurën e fjalorit me kërkim të kufizuar në rreze', 'am': 'የመስመር ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Captació guiada d'imatges de vocabulari obert amb cerca restringida de raigs", 'cs': 'Otevřená slovní slovní slovní zásoba s omezeným paprskem vyhledávání', 'fi': 'Ohjattu avoin sanasto Kuvatekstitys Rajoitettu säte Haku', 'et': 'Juhistatud avatud sõnavara pildi pealdis piiratud kiirte otsinguga', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'sk': 'Vodeno odprto besedišče slike z omejenim iskanjem žarka', 'he': 'תמונת מילים פתוחה מודרגת עם חיפוש בקרן מוגבל', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'bo': 'Guided Open Vocabulary Image Captioning with Constrained Beam Search'}
{'en': 'Existing image captioning models do not generalize well to out-of-domain images containing novel scenes or objects. This limitation severely hinders the use of these models in real world applications dealing with images in the wild. We address this problem using a flexible approach that enables existing deep captioning architectures to take advantage of image taggers at test time, without re-training. Our method uses constrained beam search to force the inclusion of selected tag words in the output, and fixed, pretrained word embeddings to facilitate vocabulary expansion to previously unseen tag words. Using this approach we achieve state of the art results for out-of-domain captioning on MSCOCO (and improved results for in-domain captioning). Perhaps surprisingly, our results significantly outperform approaches that incorporate the same tag predictions into the learning algorithm. We also show that we can significantly improve the quality of generated ImageNet captions by leveraging ground-truth labels.', 'ar': 'لا تُعمم نماذج التسمية التوضيحية الحالية للصور بشكل جيد على الصور خارج النطاق التي تحتوي على مشاهد أو كائنات جديدة. هذا القيد يعيق بشدة استخدام هذه النماذج في تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي التي تتعامل مع الصور في البرية. نعالج هذه المشكلة باستخدام نهج مرن يمكّن معماريات التسميات التوضيحية العميقة الحالية من الاستفادة من علامات تمييز الصور في وقت الاختبار ، دون إعادة التدريب. تستخدم طريقتنا البحث عن شعاع مقيد لفرض تضمين كلمات العلامات المحددة في المخرجات ، ودمج الكلمات الثابتة والمحددة مسبقًا لتسهيل توسيع المفردات إلى كلمات العلامات غير المرئية سابقًا. باستخدام هذا النهج ، نحقق أحدث النتائج للتسميات التوضيحية خارج المجال على MSCOCO (ونتائج محسّنة للتسميات التوضيحية في المجال). ربما من المدهش أن تتفوق نتائجنا بشكل كبير على الأساليب التي تدمج نفس تنبؤات العلامات في خوارزمية التعلم. نظهر أيضًا أنه يمكننا تحسين جودة تسميات ImageNet التي تم إنشاؤها بشكل كبير من خلال الاستفادة من تسميات الحقيقة الأساسية.', 'fr': "Les modèles de sous-titrage d'image existants ne se généralisent pas bien aux images hors domaine contenant des scènes ou des objets nouveaux. Cette limitation entrave sérieusement l'utilisation de ces modèles dans les applications du monde réel traitant des images dans la nature. Nous abordons ce problème à l'aide d'une approche flexible qui permet aux architectures de sous-titrage profond existantes de tirer parti des taggers d'images au moment du test, sans formation supplémentaire. Notre méthode utilise une recherche de faisceau contrainte pour forcer l'inclusion de mots d'étiquette sélectionnés dans la sortie, et des intégrations de mots préentraînés fixes pour faciliter l'extension du vocabulaire à des mots d'étiquette inédits. Grâce à cette approche, nous obtenons des résultats de pointe pour le sous-titrage hors domaine sur MSCOCO (et des résultats améliorés pour le sous-titrage dans le domaine). Étonnamment, nos résultats surpassent largement les approches qui intègrent les mêmes prédictions de balises dans l'algorithme d'apprentissage. Nous montrons également que nous pouvons améliorer de manière significative la qualité des légendes ImageNet générées en utilisant des étiquettes de vérité de terrain.", 'es': 'Los modelos de subtitulado de imágenes existentes no se generalizan bien en imágenes fuera del dominio que contienen escenas u objetos novedosos. Esta limitación dificulta gravemente el uso de estos modelos en aplicaciones del mundo real que se ocupan de imágenes en la naturaleza. Abordamos este problema mediante un enfoque flexible que permite que las arquitecturas de subtítulos profundos existentes aprovechen los etiquetadores de imágenes en el momento de la prueba, sin necesidad de volver a capacitarse. Nuestro método utiliza búsqueda de haz limitado para forzar la inclusión de palabras de etiqueta seleccionadas en la salida, e incrustaciones de palabras fijas y preentrenadas para facilitar la expansión del vocabulario a palabras de etiqueta nunca vistas anteriormente. Con este enfoque, logramos resultados de vanguardia para la subtitulación fuera del dominio en MSCOCO (y mejores resultados para la subtitulación dentro del dominio). Sorprendentemente, nuestros resultados superan significativamente a los enfoques que incorporan las mismas predicciones de etiquetas en el algoritmo de aprendizaje. También demostramos que podemos mejorar significativamente la calidad de los subtítulos de ImageNet generados mediante el uso de etiquetas de verdad sobre el terreno.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de legendagem de imagens existentes não generalizam bem para imagens fora do domínio contendo cenas ou objetos novos. Essa limitação dificulta severamente o uso desses modelos em aplicativos do mundo real que lidam com imagens em estado selvagem. Resolvemos esse problema usando uma abordagem flexível que permite que as arquiteturas de legendas profundas existentes aproveitem os marcadores de imagem no momento do teste, sem retreinamento. Nosso método usa a busca de feixe restrita para forçar a inclusão de palavras de marcação selecionadas na saída e incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas e fixas para facilitar a expansão do vocabulário para palavras de marcação não vistas anteriormente. Usando essa abordagem, alcançamos resultados de última geração para legendas fora do domínio no MSCOCO (e resultados aprimorados para legendas no domínio). Talvez surpreendentemente, nossos resultados superam significativamente as abordagens que incorporam as mesmas previsões de tag no algoritmo de aprendizado. Também mostramos que podemos melhorar significativamente a qualidade das legendas ImageNet geradas, aproveitando os rótulos de verdade.', 'ja': '既存の画像キャプションモデルは、斬新なシーンやオブジェクトを含むドメイン外の画像にうまく一般化しません。 この制限は、野生の画像を扱う現実世界のアプリケーションでのこれらのモデルの使用を深刻に妨げる。 既存のディープキャプションアーキテクチャが再トレーニングなしでテスト時にイメージタグを利用できるようにする柔軟なアプローチを使用して、この問題に対処します。 私たちの方法は、制約付きビーム検索を使用して、選択されたタグ単語を出力に含めることを強制し、固定された事前に訓練された単語埋め込みを使用して、これまで見られなかったタグ単語へのボキャブラリー拡張を容易にします。 このアプローチを使用して、ＭＳＣＯＣＯ上のドメイン外キャプションに関する最先端の結果（及びドメイン内キャプションに関する改善された結果）を達成する。 おそらく驚くべきことに、私たちの結果は、同じタグ予測を学習アルゴリズムに組み込むアプローチを大幅に上回っています。 また、グラウンドトゥルースラベルを活用することで、生成されたImageNetキャプションの品質を大幅に向上させることができます。', 'zh': '现在图像字幕模样不能很好地推广到包含新场景或地方。 此限甚碍此形于野外实用。 吾以便宜决之,使今之深度字幕架构得试以图象识器,而无所复培训。 吾法用约束波束搜索以强制于输出中包选定标签词,并用定者,预练词嵌而进之词汇扩至前所不见者。 用此法,可以 MSCOCO 字幕先进(而字幕入域)。 或可讶者,明优于并标算法也。 吾犹明之,因实标之,可以显成 ImageNet 字幕之量。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा छवि कैप्शनिंग मॉडल उपन्यास दृश्यों या वस्तुओं वाले आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन छवियों के लिए अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत नहीं करते हैं। यह सीमा जंगली में छवियों से निपटने वाले वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों में इन मॉडलों के उपयोग में गंभीर रूप से बाधा डालती है। हम एक लचीले दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके इस समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं जो मौजूदा गहरे कैप्शनिंग आर्किटेक्चर को फिर से प्रशिक्षण के बिना, परीक्षण समय पर छवि टैगर का लाभ उठाने में सक्षम बनाता है। हमारी विधि आउटपुट में चयनित टैग शब्दों को शामिल करने के लिए मजबूर करने के लिए विवश बीम खोज का उपयोग करती है, और पहले से अनदेखी टैग शब्दों के लिए शब्दावली विस्तार की सुविधा के लिए निश्चित, पूर्वप्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग। इस दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके हम MSCOCO पर आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन कैप्शनिंग के लिए अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं (और इन-डोमेन कैप्शनिंग के लिए बेहतर परिणाम)। शायद आश्चर्य की बात है, हमारे परिणाम काफी बेहतर दृष्टिकोण है कि सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म में एक ही टैग भविष्यवाणियों को शामिल. हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि हम ग्राउंड-ट्रुथ लेबल का लाभ उठाकर उत्पन्न ImageNet कैप्शन की गुणवत्ता में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Существующие модели подписей изображений плохо обобщают внедоменные изображения, содержащие новые сцены или объекты. Это ограничение серьезно препятствует использованию этих моделей в реальных приложениях, имеющих дело с изображениями в дикой природе. Мы решаем эту проблему, используя гибкий подход, который позволяет существующим архитектурам глубокого субтитров использовать преимущества тегеров изображений во время тестирования, без повторного обучения. Наш метод использует ограниченный поиск луча, чтобы принудительно включить выбранные слова тегов в вывод, и фиксированные, предварительно обученные вложения слов, чтобы облегчить расширение словарного запаса до ранее невидимых слов тегов. Используя этот подход, мы достигаем современных результатов для субтитров вне домена на MSCOCO (и улучшенных результатов для субтитров в домене). Возможно, удивительно, что наши результаты значительно превосходят подходы, которые включают одни и те же предсказания тегов в алгоритм обучения. Мы также показываем, что мы можем значительно улучшить качество создаваемых подписей ImageNet, используя метки «земля-правда».', 'ga': 'Ní ghineann samhlacha reatha fortheidealaithe íomhánna go maith d’íomhánna lasmuigh den fhearann ina bhfuil radhairc nó réada núíosacha. Cuireann an teorannú seo bac mór ar úsáid na samhlacha seo in iarratais sa saol fíor a dhéileálann le híomhánna san fhiáine. Tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb seo trí úsáid a bhaint as cur chuige solúbtha a chuireann ar chumas na n-ailtireachtaí domhainfhotheidealaithe atá ann cheana féin leas a bhaint as clibeálaithe íomhá ag am tástála, gan oiliúint a fháil arís. Úsáideann ár modh cuardaigh bíomaí srianta chun iallach a chur ar chuimsiú focail chlibe roghnaithe san aschur, agus leabaithe focal réamhthraenáilte seasta chun leathnú stór focal go focail chlibe nach bhfacthas cheana a éascú. Trí úsáid a bhaint as an gcur chuige seo bainimid torthaí den scoth amach as fotheidealú lasmuigh den fhearann ar MSCOCO (agus torthaí feabhsaithe maidir le fotheidealú in-fhearainn). B’fhéidir gur ionadh é, go sáraíonn ár dtorthaí cur chuige a ionchorpraíonn na réamh-mheastacháin chlibe céanna isteach san algartam foghlama. Léirímid freisin gur féidir linn cáilíocht na bhfotheideal ImageNet ginte a fheabhsú go suntasach trí lipéid fhírinneachta a ghiaráil.', 'hu': 'A meglévő feliratozó modellek nem általánosítják jól az új jeleneteket vagy tárgyakat tartalmazó, domain kívüli képekre. Ez a korlátozás súlyosan akadályozza ezen modellek használatát a vadon élő képekkel foglalkozó valós alkalmazásokban. Ezt a problémát rugalmas megközelítéssel kezeljük, amely lehetővé teszi a meglévő mélyfeliratozó architektúrák számára, hogy tesztidőben, újraképzés nélkül kihasználják a képcímkézőket. Módszerünk korlátozott sugárkeresést használ, hogy kényszerítse a kiválasztott címkeszavakat a kimenetbe, és rögzített, előkészített szóbeágyazásokat, hogy megkönnyítsék a szókincs kiterjesztését a korábban láthatatlan címszavakra. Ezzel a megközelítéssel a legkorszerűbb eredményeket érjük el az MSCOCO-n kívüli feliratozásban (és jobb eredményeket a domain belüli feliratozásban). Talán meglepő módon az eredményeink jelentősen felülmúlják azokat a megközelítéseket, amelyek ugyanazt a címkelőrejelzést tartalmazzák a tanulási algoritmusba. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy jelentősen javíthatjuk a generált ImageNet feliratok minőségét az alapvető igazság címkék használatával.', 'it': "I modelli esistenti di didascalia delle immagini non si generalizzano bene alle immagini fuori dominio contenenti scene o oggetti nuovi. Questa limitazione ostacola gravemente l'uso di questi modelli nelle applicazioni del mondo reale che trattano immagini in natura. Affrontiamo questo problema utilizzando un approccio flessibile che consente alle architetture di deep captioning esistenti di sfruttare i tag di immagini durante il test, senza alcun aggiornamento. Il nostro metodo utilizza la ricerca a fascio limitato per forzare l'inclusione di parole tag selezionate nell'output, e incorporazioni di parole fisse e pre-addestrate per facilitare l'espansione del vocabolario a parole tag precedentemente invisibili. Utilizzando questo approccio otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia per la didascalia fuori dominio su MSCOCO (e migliori risultati per la didascalia in-domain). Forse sorprendentemente, i nostri risultati superano significativamente gli approcci che incorporano le stesse previsioni di tag nell'algoritmo di apprendimento. Dimostriamo inoltre che possiamo migliorare significativamente la qualità delle didascalie generate da ImageNet sfruttando le etichette di base.", 'el': 'Τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα λεζάντας εικόνων δεν γενικεύουν καλά σε εικόνες εκτός πεδίου που περιέχουν νέες σκηνές ή αντικείμενα. Αυτός ο περιορισμός εμποδίζει σοβαρά τη χρήση αυτών των μοντέλων σε εφαρμογές πραγματικού κόσμου που ασχολούνται με εικόνες στην άγρια φύση. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα χρησιμοποιώντας μια ευέλικτη προσέγγιση που επιτρέπει στις υπάρχουσες αρχιτεκτονικές βαθιάς λεζάντας να εκμεταλλεύονται τις ετικέτες εικόνας κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής, χωρίς επανακατάρτιση. Η μέθοδος μας χρησιμοποιεί περιορισμένη αναζήτηση ακτίνων για να επιβάλει την συμπερίληψη επιλεγμένων λέξεων ετικετών στην έξοδο, και σταθερές, προκαθορισμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων για να διευκολύνει την επέκταση του λεξιλογίου σε προηγουμένως αόρατες λέξεις ετικετών. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτή την προσέγγιση επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για λεζάντες εκτός τομέα σε MSCOCO (και βελτιωμένα αποτελέσματα για λεζάντες εντός τομέα). Ίσως εκπληκτικά, τα αποτελέσματά μας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις προσεγγίσεις που ενσωματώνουν τις ίδιες προβλέψεις ετικετών στον αλγόριθμο μάθησης. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι μπορούμε να βελτιώσουμε σημαντικά την ποιότητα των δημιουργημένων λεζάντων χρησιμοποιώντας ετικέτες βασικής αλήθειας.', 'ka': 'Existing image caption models do not generalize well to out-of-domain images containing novel scenes or objects. ეს განზომილება ძალიან შეუძლებელია ამ მოდელების გამოყენებას რეალური მსოფლიოს პროგრამებში, რომლებიც სურათების გამოყენებას გაუკეთებული. ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას გადაწყენებთ, რომელიც გამოიყენება ძალიან ძალიან სარგებლო აქტიქტურების გამოყენებას, რომელიც გამოყენება სურათების ტესტის დროში, ახლა განა ჩვენი მეთოდი გამოყენება შესაძლებელი სიტყვების ძიება, რომ მონიშნული სიტყვების სიტყვების ჩატვირთვა გადატვირთვა, და დარწმუნებული სიტყვების ჩატვირთვა სიტყვების გაფართვა, რომ ამ პროგრამის გამოყენებაში ჩვენ მივიღეთ სურათის შედეგების სტატის შედეგების გარეშე დომინის შესახებ MSCOCO-ზე (და შემდეგებული შედეგები დომინის შესახებ). შეიძლება შესანიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ძალიან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომლებიც იგივე მაგრამის წარმოდგენების გადასწავლება ალგორიტიმში. ჩვენ ასევე აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ძალიან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'kk': 'Бар кескіндердің айдарының үлгілері романдық сценарлар не нысандар бар домен кескіндерінің сыртқы сценарларына жақсы әдеттегілемейді. Бұл шектеу үлгілерді шындық әлемдегі қолданбаларда кескіндердің қолданбаларының пайдалануын көмектеседі. Біз бұл мәселеді тексеру уақытында, қайта оқытуға мүмкіндік беру архитектураларды қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Біздің әдіміміз таңдалған тегтердің сөздерін шығысына ендіру үшін шектелген сұлбаны іздеу үшін және сөздердің ендіру үшін алдында таңдалмаған тегтердің сөздеріне көмектесу үшін шектелген сөзд Бұл тәсілді қолданғанда, MSCOCO (домендің айдарында жұмыс істеу үшін) домендің айдарының күйін жеткіземіз. Мүмкін, біздің нәтижелеріміз бір тегтердің алгоритма алгоритміне бір тегтердің алгоритміне ұсынатын алдындарды көп жасайды. Мұндай-ақ біз ImageNet жарлықтарының сапасын өзгерте аламыз.', 'mk': 'Постојаните модели за заглавување на слики не се генерализираат добро на слики надвор од доменот кои содржат нови сцени или објекти. Оваа ограничување сериозно го попречува употребата на овие модели во реалните апликации кои се однесуваат на слики во дивината. Ние го решаваме овој проблем користејќи флексибилен пристап кој овозможува постоечките длабоки архитектури да ги искористат означувачите на слики во време на тест, без реобука. Нашиот метод користи пребарување на ограничен прозорец за да ја принуди вклучувањето на избраните зборови на ознака во излезот, и фиксирани, преобучени вградувања на зборови за олеснување на проширувањето на речникот на претходно невидени зборови на ознака. Користејќи го овој пристап постигнуваме најдобри резултати за надвор од доменот на MSCOCO (и подобрени резултати за внатре од доменот). Можеби изненадувачки, нашите резултати значително ги надминуваат пристапите кои ги вклучуваат истите предвидувања на ознаките во алгоритмот за учење. Исто така покажуваме дека можеме значително да го подобриме квалитетот на генерираните наслови на ImageNet со искористување на ознаки на земја-вистина.', 'ms': 'Model captioning imej yang wujud tidak menyeluruhkan dengan baik kepada imej luar domain yang mengandungi adegan atau objek baru. Hadiran ini sangat menghalangi penggunaan model ini dalam aplikasi dunia nyata yang berurusan dengan imej di alam liar. Kami mengatasi masalah ini menggunakan pendekatan fleksibel yang membolehkan arkitektur pengepala dalam yang wujud untuk mengambil keuntungan dari tag imej pada masa ujian, tanpa melatih semula. Kaedah kami menggunakan carian cahaya terhalang untuk memaksa penyelesaian kata tag yang dipilih dalam output, dan penyelesaian perkataan yang ditetapkan, terlatih awal untuk memudahkan pengembangan vokbulari kepada perkataan tag yang belum terlihat sebelumnya. Using this approach we achieve state of the art results for out-of-domain captioning on MSCOCO (and improved results for in-domain captioning).  Mungkin yang mengejutkan, hasil kita jauh melebihi pendekatan yang memasukkan ramalan tag yang sama ke dalam algoritma pembelajaran. We also show that we can significantly improve the quality of generated ImageNet captions by leveraging ground-truth labels.', 'lt': 'Esami vaizdo antraštės modeliai nepakankamai plačiai paplitę ne domeno atvaizdams, kuriuose yra naujų scenų ar objektų. Šis apribojimas labai kliudo šių modelių naudojimui realiame pasaulyje taikomose programose, susijusiose su laukiniais vaizdais. Mes sprendžiame šią problem ą taikant lankstą metodą, kuris leidžia esamoms gilios antraštinės įrašos architektūroms pasinaudoti vaizdo žymekliais bandymo metu, neperduodant. Mūsų metodas naudoja apribotą šviesos paiešką, kad priverstų įtraukti pasirinktus žymenų žodžius į išėjimą, ir fiksuotus, iš anksto apmokytus žodžių įdėjimus palengvinti žodyno išplėtimą iki anksčiau nepastebimų žymenų žodžių. Naudodamiesi šiuo metodu, pasiekti pažangiausi rezultatai, susiję su MSCOCO antraštėmis ne srityse (ir geresni rezultatai, susiję su antraštėmis srityse). Galbūt nuostabu, kad mūsų rezultatai gerokai viršija metodus, kurie į mokymosi algoritmą įtraukia tas pačias ženklų prognozes. Taip pat parodome, kad galime gerokai pagerinti sukurtų ImageNet pavadinimų kokybę naudodami antžeminius tiesos ženklus.', 'mn': 'Existing image caption models do not generic to out-of-domain images containing new scenes or objects. Энэ хязгаар нь жинхэнэ дэлхийн хэрэглээнд эдгээр загваруудыг ашиглах нь маш их зовоож байна. Бид энэ асуудлыг шийдвэрлэхэд дахин сургалтын гүн гүнзгий загварын архитектуруудыг шалгах цаг үед, дахин сургалтын тулд ашиглах боломжтой болгодог. Бидний арга нь сонгогдсон тегт үгнүүдийг үр дүнд оруулахын тулд хязгаарлагдсан тэнгэрийн хайлтыг ашигладаг. Өмнө нь харагдаагүй тэнгэрийн үгнүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд тодорхойлогдсон, тодорхойлогдсон үгнүүдийг Энэ арга хэмжээгээр бид MSCOCO-ын хуулийн үр дүнг ашиглан (холбоотой хэлбэрээр сайжруулсан үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлэхэд) урлагийн үр дүнг гаргадаг. Магадгүй гайхалтай байж магадгүй бидний үр дүнд суралцах алгоритмын алгоритмын тухай ижил тэмдэгтийн таамаглалтуудыг нэмэгдүүлэх арга зам илүү чухал байж магадгүй. Мөн бид газар үнэндээ бий болгон бий болгосон ImageNet нэр тодорхойлолтын сайн чанарыг илүү сайжруулж чадна.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli eżistenti tal-intestatura tal-immaġni ma jiġġeneralizzawx tajjeb għal immaġni barra d-dominju li fihom xeni jew oġġetti ġodda. Din il-limitazzjoni tfixkel ħafna l-użu ta’ dawn il-mudelli f’applikazzjonijiet tad-dinja reali li jittrattaw immaġni fl-ambjent selvaġġ. Aħna nindirizzaw din il-problem a bl-użu ta’ approċċ flessibbli li jippermetti lill-arkitetturi eżistenti ta’ titolazzjoni profonda biex jieħdu vantaġġ mill-image taggers fil-ħin tat-test, mingħajr taħriġ mill-ġdid. Il-metodu tag ħna juża tfittxija tar-raġġ ristrett biex iġġiegħel l-inklużjoni ta’ kliem magħżul tat-tikketta fil-ħruġ, u inkorporazzjonijiet fissi u mħarrġa minn qabel tal-kliem biex jiffaċilitaw l-espansjoni vokabulari għal kliem tat-tikketta li ma dehrux qabel. Permezz ta’ dan l-approċċ inkisbu r-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati għall-intestatura barra d-dominju fuq MSCOCO (u riżultati mtejba għall-intestatura f’dominju). Forsi b’mod sorprendenti, ir-riżultati tag ħna jaqbżu b’mod sinifikanti l-approċċi li jinkorporaw l-istess tbassir tat-tikketti fl-algoritmu tat-tagħlim. We also show that we can significantly improve the quality of generated ImageNet captions by leveraging ground-truth labels.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande modeller for tittel av bilete generelliserer ikkje godt til utrykke domenebilete som inneheld novel scenar eller objekt. Denne grensesnittet hindrar bruk av desse modelane i verkeleg verdensprogram som handterar bilete i ølgja. Vi løyser denne problemen ved å bruka ein fleksibel tilnærming som gjer at dei eksisterande dype tittellarkitekturar kan bruka nyttig av biletmeggera ved testtid, utan å gjera opplæring på nytt. Metoden vårt bruker begrensede søk på strålen for å tvinge inkluderinga av valde merkelorde i utdata, og rette, pretrensede ordinnbygging for å gjera ordutvidinga til førre ukjende merkelorde. Bruk denne tilnærminga, oppnår vi tilstand til kunstresultatet for avdomenetittel på MSCOCO (og forbetra resultat for inndomenetittel). Kanskje overraska at resultatet våra er betydelig enn tilnærmingar som inkluderer samme tagg-foregåver i læringsalgoritmen. Vi viser også at vi kan forbetra kvaliteten på lagt ImageNet-tittel ved å levera bakgrunnsannene-etikettar.', 'pl': 'Istniejące modele napisów obrazów nie są dobrze uogólniane do obrazów poza domeną zawierających nowe sceny lub obiekty. Ograniczenie to poważnie utrudnia stosowanie tych modeli w realnych aplikacjach zajmujących się obrazami na wolności. Rozwiązujemy ten problem przy użyciu elastycznego podejścia, które umożliwia istniejącym architekturom głębokiego podpisywania korzystanie z tagerów obrazów w czasie testu, bez ponownego szkolenia. Nasza metoda wykorzystuje ograniczone wyszukiwanie wiązki, aby wymusić włączenie wybranych słów tagowych do wyjścia, oraz stałe, wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów, aby ułatwić rozszerzenie słownictwa do wcześniej niewidzianych słów tagowych. Używając tego podejścia osiągamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki w zakresie napisów poza domeną na MSCOCO (oraz poprawiamy wyniki podpisów w domenie). Być może zaskakujące, nasze wyniki znacznie przewyższają podejścia, które uwzględniają te same przewidywania tagów w algorytmie uczenia się. Pokazujemy również, że możemy znacznie poprawić jakość generowanych napisów ImageNet poprzez wykorzystanie etykiet podstawowych.', 'ro': 'Modelele existente de subtitrare a imaginilor nu generalizează bine imaginilor din afara domeniului care conțin scene sau obiecte noi. Această limitare împiedică grav utilizarea acestor modele în aplicații din lumea reală care se ocupă de imagini în sălbăticie. Rezolvăm această problemă utilizând o abordare flexibilă care permite arhitecturilor de subtitrare profundă existente să profite de etichetele de imagini în timpul testării, fără reeducare. Metoda noastră folosește căutarea cu fascicul constrâns pentru a forța includerea cuvintelor etichete selectate în ieșire și încorporările fixe, pre-instruite de cuvinte pentru a facilita expansiunea vocabularului la cuvinte etichete nevăzute anterior. Folosind această abordare, obținem rezultate de ultimă oră pentru subtitrarea în afara domeniului pe MSCOCO (și rezultate îmbunătățite pentru subtitrarea în domeniu). Poate surprinzător, rezultatele noastre depășesc semnificativ abordările care includ aceleași predicții de etichete în algoritmul de învățare. De asemenea, arătăm că putem îmbunătăți semnificativ calitatea subtitrărilor ImageNet generate prin utilizarea etichetelor de adevăr de bază.', 'so': 'Tusaalada sawirka ah oo ku qoran sawirro sawir ama sawirro sawir ah oo ku yaala sawirro sawir ama waxyaabo. Xubintan aad buu uga hor jeedaa isticmaalka modelladan ee codsiyada caalamiga ah ee ku saabsan sawirada lamadegaanka. Dhibaatadan waxaynu u isticmaalnaa qaab dhaqdhaqaale ah oo aad u awoodi karnaa meelaha aad ku jirto oo aad u baahan karto si ay u isticmaalaan sawirkan taggers waqtiga la imtixaamo, oo aan la’aan wax ku tababarin. Metalkeenu wuxuu isticmaalaa raadinta saxda ah si uu ugu qasbo ku qoro qoraalka alaabta la doortay oo soo baxay, oo uu u sawiray, si uu ugu fududeeyo boosaska hadalka warqada ah si uu ugu horeeyo hadalka warqadda la yidhaahdo ee hore u maqan. Using this approach we achieve state of the art results for out-of-domain captioning on MSCOCO (and improved results for in-domain captioning).  Waxaa laga yaabaa in la yaabo la yaabo, arimahayaga aad looga soo jeedo qaabab aad u weyn, taas oo ku qoraya wixii la sii sheegay calaamadda waxbarashada. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa inaannu si weyn u kordhin karno tijaabada sawirada laga sameeyo ee la soo diro alaabta runta ah ee dhulka.', 'sr': 'Postojeći modeli imenovanja slika ne generalizuju dobro na slike izvan domena koje sadrže nove scene ili objekte. Ova ograničenja teško ometa korištenje ovih modela u stvarnim svijetskim aplikacijama koji se bave slikama u divljini. Mi rješavamo ovaj problem sa fleksibilnim pristupom koji omogućava postojeću arhitekturu dubokog kapacije da iskoriste znakove slika u testu, bez ponovnog treninga. Naša metoda koristi ograničenu potragu za zrakom da bi prisilila uključivanje izraženih reèi oznake u izlaz, i fiksne, pretrešene reèi za olakšanje proširenja reèi o reèima oznake na prethodno nevidljive reèi. Koristeći ovaj pristup postižemo stanje rezultata umjetnosti za izvan domena naslov MSCOCO (i poboljšani rezultati za naslov u domenu). Možda iznenađujuće, naši rezultati značajno iznosi pristupe koje uključuju iste predviđanja etiketa u algoritam učenja. Također pokazujemo da možemo značajno poboljšati kvalitet napravljenih imidženetskih kapacija s uticajem etiketa zemlje istine.', 'si': 'පින්තූර පින්තූර කැප්ටමන් මොඩල් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙන්නේ නැහැ පින්තූර පින්තූර සම්බන්ධයෙන් නැහැ. මේ අවධානය ගොඩක් අවධානයෙන් මේ මොඩේල් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් වලින් පින්තූර වලින් පින්තූර වලි අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණ වෙලාවේ පින්තූර ටැග්ගර්ස් වල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණා වෙලාවේ පි අපේ විධානය භාවිත කරනවා සීමාවිත් බීම් හොයාගන්න, තෝරාගත් ටැග් වචන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශාල මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය භාවිතා කරනවා අපි MSCOCO වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙනවා. සමහර විශ්වාසයි, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වගේම අපිට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විශේෂය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා ඉන්න පිළිබඳි', 'ur': 'Existing image captioning models do not generalize well to out-of-domain images containing novel scenes or objects. یہ محدودیت ان موڈلوں کے استعمال کو حقیقی دنیاوی کاربریوں میں سخت روکا ہے جو جنگل میں تصاویروں کے ساتھ مشغول ہیں۔ ہم اس مسئلہ کو آزمائش زمانی کے بغیر ایک مضبوط طریقہ کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں جو موجود عمیق کاپٹینگ معماروں کو آزمائش زمانی میں تصاویر ٹاگروں کے فائدہ پہنچانے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ محدود ہوا جگہ استعمال کرتا ہے کہ انتخاب کئے ہوئے ٹاگ لغات کے شامل کرنا مجبور کرے اور پہلے غیب کئے ہوئے ٹاگ لغات کے لئے مہربانی کرے۔ اس طریقے سے ہم MSCOCO (اور دامین کاپٹینگ کے لئے بہترین نتیجے) کے لئے ایرٹ نتیجے کا موقع پہنچاتے ہیں۔ شاید ہمارے نتیجے بہت اچھے طریقے سے نکلتے ہیں جن کے ساتھ ایک ہی ٹاگ کی پیش بینی کو سیکھنے والی الگوریتم میں شامل ہوتی ہیں۔ ہم بھی نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہم نے ایمز نیٹ کے کاپٹوں کی کیفیت اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں کہ زمین-حقیقت لابلوں کے ذریعہ مزید اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'இருக்கும் பிம்பம் பிடிப்பு மாதிரிகள் புதிய காட்சிகள் அல்லது பொருட்களைக் கொண்டிருக்கும் போது பொருட்களை பொத இந்த கட்டமைப்பு காட்டில் பிம்பங்களை பொருத்தினால் இந்த மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துவதை கடுமையாக தடுக்கும். நாம் இந்த பிரச்சினையை பயன்படுத்தும் ஒரு flexible முறையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். அது தற்போது உள்ள ஆழமான பிடிப்பு அட்டவணைகளை பயன்படுத்தும்  நம் முறைமை இந்த முறையை பயன்படுத்தி நாம் எம்ச்சோகோவின் மீது வெளியேறும் களம் பிடிப்பிடிப்பதற்கான கலை முடிவுகளின் நிலையை நெருங்கு Perhaps surprisingly, our results significantly outperform approaches that incorporate the same tag predictions into the learning algorithm.  நாம் முதலில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பிம்பநெட்டு தலைப்புகளின் தரம் மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்று காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'sv': 'Befintliga bildtextningsmodeller generaliserar inte bra till bilder utanför domänen som innehåller nya scener eller objekt. Denna begränsning hindrar kraftigt användningen av dessa modeller i verkliga tillämpningar som handlar om bilder i naturen. Vi tar itu med detta problem med ett flexibelt tillvägagångssätt som gör det möjligt för befintliga djupbildsarkitekturer att dra nytta av bildtaggare vid testtillfället, utan att behöva vidareutbilda dem. Vår metod använder begränsad strålsökning för att tvinga inkluderandet av valda taggsord i utmatningen, och fasta, förkränade ordinbäddningar för att underlätta vokabulärexpansion till tidigare osynliga taggsord. Med detta tillvägagångssätt uppnår vi toppmoderna resultat för textning utanför domänen på MSCOCO (och förbättrade resultat för textning inom domänen). Kanske förvånande nog överträffar våra resultat betydligt metoder som införlivar samma taggprognoser i inlärningsalgoritmen. Vi visar också att vi avsevärt kan förbättra kvaliteten på genererade bildtexter genom att utnyttja marksanningsetiketter.', 'ml': 'നോവല്\u200d കാഴ്ചകളോ വസ്തുക്കളോ ഉള്ള ഡോമെയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ഇമേജ് പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണമാക്കുന്നി ഈ പരിധി മരുഭൂമിയിലെ ചിത്രങ്ങളുമായി സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉപയോഗിക് നിലവിലുള്ള ആഴത്തെ പിടികൂടുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പരീക്ഷ സമയത്ത് ഇമേജ് ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ ബീമ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടാഗ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടി ഈ നടപടി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് എംസ്കോയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഡോമെന്\u200d പിടിച്ച് പിടികൂടുന്നതിനുള്ള കലാകാര്യ ഫലങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ നമ്മള്\u200d എത്തുന്നു. (ഡൊമ ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d അത്ഭുതകരമായിരിക്കാം, നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വഴികളിലേക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതേ ട നമ്മളും കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d നമുക്ക് ഇമേജിനെറ്റിന്റെ ഗുണത്തിന്റെ ഗുണവും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയും എന', 'vi': 'Các mô hình ảnh đã có sử dụng không tổng hợp tốt cho ảnh ngoài miền chứa các cảnh hay vật thể mới. Sự giới hạn này ảnh hưởng nghiêm trọng đến việc sử dụng các mô hình này trong ứng dụng thế giới thực đối với ảnh trong hoang dã. Chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề này bằng một phương pháp linh hoạt giúp các kiến trúc có phần lớn có thể sử dụng ảnh ở thời điểm thử nghiệm, mà không được đào tạo lại. Phương pháp của chúng tôi sử dụng việc tìm tia giới hạn để ép chèn các từ thẻ đã chọn vào đầu ra, và sửa những từ nhúng vào để dễ mở rộng ngôn ngữ thành từ thẻ không thấy trước. Sử dụng phương pháp này, chúng ta đạt được kết quả nghệ thuật để đánh giá cao MSCOCO (và kết quả cải thiện cho phần khống chế trong miền). Có lẽ ngạc nhiên, kết quả của chúng ta vượt trội về các phương pháp có tác dụng tương tự trong thuật toán học. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy chúng tôi có thể cải thiện đáng kể chất lượng của những dòng chữ ImageNet bằng cách dùng nhãn mặt đất-chân thật.', 'uz': "Name Bu chegara balki rasmlar bilan boshqarish uchun bu modellarning foydalanishini katta qiladi. @ info @ info: whatsthis Ushbu usulni ishlatish uchun, MSCO'да ҳужжат natijalarini bajarish uchun sanam natijalarini bajaramiz (va domen sarlavhasini bajarish natijalarini bajaramiz). Perhaps surprisingly, our results significantly outperform approaches that incorporate the same tag predictions into the learning algorithm.  We also show that we can significantly improve the quality of generated ImageNet captions by leveraging ground-truth labels.", 'bg': 'Съществуващите модели за надпис на изображения не обобщават добре изображения извън домейна, съдържащи нови сцени или обекти. Това ограничение сериозно затруднява използването на тези модели в реални приложения, занимаващи се с изображения в дивата природа. Ние решаваме този проблем с помощта на гъвкав подход, който позволява на съществуващите архитекти за дълбоко улавяне да се възползват от маркиращите изображения по време на тестване, без повторно обучение. Нашият метод използва ограничено търсене на лъчи, за да принуди включването на избрани думи на маркери в изхода, както и фиксирани, предварително тренирани думи вграждания, за да улесни разширяването на речника до досега невиждани думи на маркери. С помощта на този подход постигаме най-съвременни резултати за надписване извън домейна върху и подобрени резултати за надписване в домейна. Може би изненадващо, нашите резултати значително превъзхождат подходите, които включват същите прогнози за маркери в алгоритъма за учене. Също така показваме, че можем значително да подобрим качеството на генерираните надписи чрез използване на етикети за истина.', 'nl': 'Bestaande beeldondertitelingsmodellen zijn niet goed veralgemeend voor afbeeldingen buiten het domein die nieuwe scènes of objecten bevatten. Deze beperking belemmert het gebruik van deze modellen in reële toepassingen die omgaan met beelden in het wild ernstig. We pakken dit probleem aan met een flexibele aanpak die bestaande Deep Captioning architecturen in staat stelt om tijdens de test gebruik te maken van image taggers, zonder herscholing. Onze methode maakt gebruik van beperkte beam search om de opname van geselecteerde tagwoorden in de uitvoer te forceren, en vaste, vooraf getrainde woordinsluitingen om woordenschat uit te breiden naar eerder onzichtbare tagwoorden. Met deze aanpak bereiken we state of the art resultaten voor out-of-domain ondertiteling op MSCOCO (en verbeterde resultaten voor in-domain ondertiteling). Misschien verrassend genoeg presteren onze resultaten aanzienlijk beter dan benaderingen die dezelfde tag voorspellingen verwerken in het leeralgoritme. We laten ook zien dat we de kwaliteit van gegenereerde ImageNet-ondertitels aanzienlijk kunnen verbeteren door gebruik te maken van ground-truth labels.', 'da': 'Eksisterende billedtekstmodeller generaliserer sig ikke godt til billeder uden for domænet, der indeholder nye scener eller objekter. Denne begrænsning hæmmer alvorligt brugen af disse modeller i virkelighedens applikationer, der beskæftiger sig med billeder i naturen. Vi løser dette problem ved hjælp af en fleksibel tilgang, der gør det muligt for eksisterende dybe billedteksterarkitekturer at drage fordel af billedtaggere på testtidspunktet uden omskoling. Vores metode bruger begrænset strålesøgning til at tvinge inddragelsen af udvalgte tagord i outputtet, og faste, forudtrænede ordindlejringer til at lette ordforråd udvidelse til tidligere usete tagord. Ved hjælp af denne tilgang opnår vi topmoderne resultater for billedtekster uden for domænet på MSCOCO (og forbedrede resultater for billedtekster inden for domænet). Måske overraskende overgår vores resultater betydeligt fremgangsmåder, der indarbejder de samme tagforudsigelser i læringsalgoritmen. Vi viser også, at vi kan forbedre kvaliteten af genererede ImageNet-billedtekster betydeligt ved at udnytte jordsandhedsmærker.', 'hr': 'Postojeći modeli imenovanja slika ne generaliziraju dobro na slike izvan domena koje sadrže nove scene ili objekte. Ova ograničenja teško sprječava uporabu tih modela u stvarnim svijetskim aplikacijama koji se bave slikama u divljini. Mi rješavamo ovaj problem s fleksibilnim pristupom koji omogućava postojećim dubokim građevinama područja iskoristiti oznake slika u testu bez ponovnog treninga. Naša metoda koristi ograničenu potragu za zrakom kako bi prisilila uključivanje odabranih označenih riječi u izlaz, i određene, pretvorene riječi uključivanje riječi za olakšanje proširenja riječi riječi o proširenju riječi označenih znakova. Koristeći ovaj pristup postićemo stanje rezultata umjetnosti za izvan domena naslov MSCOCO (i poboljšani rezultati za naslov u domenu). Možda iznenađujuće, naši rezultati značajno iznosi pristupe koje uključuju iste predviđanja oznake u algoritam učenja. Također pokazujemo da možemo značajno poboljšati kvalitet izrađenih poglavlja ImageNet s primjenom etiketa zemaljske istine.', 'id': 'Model captioning gambar yang ada tidak mendeneralisasi dengan baik untuk gambar luar domain yang mengandung adegan atau objek baru. This limitation severely hinders the use of these models in real world applications dealing with images in the wild.  Kami mengatasi masalah ini dengan menggunakan pendekatan fleksibel yang memungkinkan arsitektur captioning dalam yang ada untuk mengambil keuntungan dari tagger gambar pada waktu tes, tanpa melatih ulang. Metode kami menggunakan pencarian sinar terbatas untuk memaksa penyampilan kata tag yang dipilih dalam keluaran, dan penyampilan kata tertentu, yang dilatih-dilatih untuk memudahkan ekspansi vocabulari ke kata tag yang belum terlihat sebelumnya. Menggunakan pendekatan ini kami mencapai hasil terbaik untuk captioning luar domain pada MSCOCO (dan hasil terbaik untuk captioning dalam domain). Mungkin mengejutkan, hasil kita jauh melebihi pendekatan yang mengandung prediksi tag yang sama dalam algoritma belajar. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa kita dapat meningkatkan kualitas captions ImageNet yang dihasilkan dengan menggunakan label kebenaran tanah.', 'de': 'Bestehende Bildunterschriftsmodelle verallgemeinern sich nicht gut auf Bilder außerhalb der Domäne, die neue Szenen oder Objekte enthalten. Diese Einschränkung behindert den Einsatz dieser Modelle in realen Anwendungen, die sich mit Bildern in freier Wildbahn befassen. Wir adressieren dieses Problem mit einem flexiblen Ansatz, der es bestehenden Deep Captioning-Architekturen ermöglicht, die Vorteile von Image-Taggern zur Testzeit zu nutzen, ohne dass es erneut geschult werden muss. Unsere Methode verwendet eingeschränkte Balkensuche, um die Aufnahme ausgewählter Schlagworte in die Ausgabe zu erzwingen, und feste, vortrainierte Worteinbettungen, um die Erweiterung des Vokabulars auf zuvor nicht gesehene Schlagworte zu erleichtern. Mit diesem Ansatz erzielen wir State-of-Domain-Untertitelung auf MSCOCO (und verbesserte Ergebnisse für In-Domain-Untertitelung). Überraschenderweise übertreffen unsere Ergebnisse Ansätze, die dieselben Tag-Vorhersagen in den Lernalgorithmus integrieren. Wir zeigen auch, dass wir die Qualität generierter ImageNet-Bildunterschriften durch den Einsatz von Ground-Truth-Labels deutlich verbessern können.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa kuchora picha zinazopo hauwezi kutengeneza vizuri kwenda nje ya picha za ndani zinazobeba mitazamo ya riwaya au vitu. Uzuizi huu unazuia matumizi ya mifano haya katika matumizi ya dunia halisi yanayohusiana na picha za jangwa. Tunaongelea tatizo hili kwa kutumia mbinu nzuri ambazo inawezesha kuwepo kwenye majengo ya ndani ya kutangaza vifaa vya picha wakati wa jaribio, bila mafunzo ya upya. Utawala wetu unatumia utafutaji wa wima ulioharibiwa ili kuhamasisha kuingiza maneno ya viungo vinavyochaguliwa kwenye matokeo, na kutangazwa kwa maneno yanayotangazwa ili kusaidia kuongezeka kwa maneno yasiyofahamika. Kwa kutumia mbinu hii tunafanikiwa matokeo ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kutolewa kwa maeneo yasiyo na maeneo yaliyofanywa na MSCO (na matokeo maboresho ya kuchukuliwa kwa maeneo ya ndani). Pengine kwa kushangaza, matokeo yetu yanaweza kufanya mitazamo makubwa ambayo yanajumuisha utabiri huo katika utambuzi wa kujifunza. Tunaonyesha pia kwamba tunaweza kuboresha kiwango cha picha zilizotengenezwa kwa kutuma alama za kweli za ardhi.', 'af': "Bestaande beeldtitelsmodelle genereer nie goed na buite van domein beelde wat novele scene of objekte bevat nie. Hierdie beperking verhinder swaar die gebruik van hierdie modele in werklike wêreld toepassings wat met beelde in die wilde handel. Ons adres hierdie probleem met 'n fleksibel toegang wat toelaat dat bestaande diep titel-arkitektuur kan neem voordeel van beeldmerkers op toets tyd, sonder heroefening. Ons metode gebruik beheinde beam soektog om die inklusie van gekose etiket woorde in die uitvoer te forseer, en vaste, pretreënde woord inbettings om woord uitbreiding te eenvoudig na voorheen ongestelde etiket woorde. Gebruik ons hierdie toegang tot staat van die kuns resultate bereik ons vir uit-domein-kapsie op MSCOCO (en verbeterde resultate vir in-domein-kapsie). Miskien verwonderbaar is ons resultate betekeurig uitvoer toegang wat dieselfde etiket voorskoue in die leer algoritme inkorpreer. Ons wys ook dat ons kan betekeurig die kwaliteit van genereerde ImageNet titels verbeter deur grond-waarheid etikette te verwyder.", 'sq': 'Modelet ekzistuese të titullimit të imazheve nuk gjeneralizohen mirë për imazhet jashtë domenit që përmbajnë skena apo objekte të reja. Kjo kufizim pengon rëndë përdorimin e këtyre modeleve në aplikimet e botës reale që merren me imazhet në të egër. Ne e trajtojmë këtë problem duke përdorur një qasje fleksible që lejon arkitekturat ekzistuese të thella të titullimit të përfitojnë nga etiketat e imazheve në kohën e testit, pa ritrajnimin. Metoda jonë përdor kërkimin e rreze të kufizuar për të detyruar përfshirjen e fjalëve të zgjedhura të etiketave në dalje, dhe përfshirjen e fjalëve të fiksuara, të paratrajnuara për të lehtësuar zgjerimin e fjalorit në fjalë të padukshme më parë të etiketave. Duke përdorur këtë qasje ne arrijmë rezultatet më të larta për titullin jashtë domenit në MSCOCO (dhe rezultatet e përmirësuara për titullin në domeni). Ndoshta befasueshëm, rezultatet tona tejkalojnë ndjeshëm qasjet që përfshijnë të njëjtat parashikime të etiketave në algoritmin e mësimit. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se ne mund të përmirësojmë ndjeshëm cilësinë e titujve të gjeneruar ImageNet duke përdorur etiketat tokë-të vërtetës.', 'ko': '기존의 이미지 자막 모델은 새로운 장면이나 대상을 포함하는 역외 이미지로 잘 보급되지 못한다.이런 한계성은 이 모델들이 야외 이미지를 처리하는 실제 응용에서의 사용을 심각하게 방해한다.우리는 유연한 방법을 사용하여 이 문제를 해결한다. 이 방법은 기존의 깊이 있는 자막 체계 구조를 테스트할 때 이미지 표시기를 이용할 수 있고 다시 훈련할 필요가 없다.우리의 방법은 제약 묶음 검색을 사용하여 출력에 선택한 표기어를 강제로 포함하고, 고정적이고 미리 훈련된 단어를 삽입해서 이전에 보이지 않았던 표기어로 어휘를 확장하는 것이다.이런 방법을 사용하여 우리는 MSCOCO에서 가장 선진적인 역외 자막 효과(그리고 개선된 역내 자막 효과)를 실현하였다.아마도 놀랍게도, 우리의 결과는 같은 표기 예측을 학습 알고리즘에 포함시키는 방법보다 현저히 낫다.또한 지상 팩트 라벨을 활용함으로써 생성된 ImageNet 자막의 질을 현저히 높일 수 있음을 보여줍니다.', 'fa': 'مدلهای عنوان تصویر موجود در حال حاضر خیلی خوب به تصویر خارج از دامنی که شامل صحنه\u200cهای رمانی یا اشیاء وجود دارد متعادل نمی\u200cشوند. این محدودیت به شدت از استفاده از این مدلها در کاربردهای دنیای واقعی که با تصاویر در وحشی کار می کنند باز می کند. ما این مشکل را با استفاده از یک روش flexible حل می کنیم که به معماری های عمیق عنوان قانونی موجود اجازه می دهد که در زمان آزمایش، بدون دوباره آموزش کننده از نقاشی از نقاشی تصویر استفاده کنند. روش ما از جستجوی پرده محدود استفاده می\u200cکند تا مجبور کند شامل کردن کلمات برگزیده\u200cها در نتیجه، و جمع کردن کلمات محدود و محدود برای آسانی گسترش کلمات برگزیده\u200cها به کلمات برگزیده\u200cای که قبلاً ندیده\u200cاند. با استفاده از این روش، ما موقعیت نتیجه هنری برای عنوان غیر از دامنه در MSCOCO (و نتیجه\u200cهای بهتر برای عنوان تولید دامنه) را می\u200cرسانیم. شاید تعجب کننده است، نتیجه\u200cهایمان به طور کلی از نزدیک\u200cهایی که پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای مشابه\u200cای را در الگوریتم یادگیری شامل می\u200cکنند بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهند. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که ما می توانیم کیفیت عنوان ImageNet تولید کنیم با تأثیر نقاشی حقیقت زمینی.', 'az': "Əvvəlki surat başlıqları modelləri yeni sahələr və objektlər içərisində olan domena şəkillərinə yaxşı işləməz. Bu hədləri həqiqət dünya uyğulamalarında bu modellərin istifadəsinə çox çətin edir. Biz bu problemi sınama vaxtında, yenidən təhsil etmədən, müəyyən edilən fleksib bir tərzim vasitəsilə çəkiririk. Bizim metodumuz, seçilmiş etiket sözlərini çıxartmaq üçün müəyyən quruluş araştırmasını istifadə edir, və əvvəlcə görmədiyiniz etiket sözlərinə çox asanlaşdırmaq üçün sabit, qüvvətli sözlərimiz istifadə edir. Bu tərzim vasitəsilə, MSCOCO'nun (domain captioning üçün yaxşılaşdırılmış sonuçları) üçün sanat sonuçlarının durumunu başa çatdıq. Bəlkə də təəccüblü olaraq, sonuçlarımız öyrənmək algoritminin içində eyni etiket tədbirlərini daxil edən yaxınlıqlarını çox yaxşılaşdırır. Biz də göstəririk ki, ImageNet yaratdığı nöqtələrin keyfiyyətini təmizləndirək yerli-gerçək etiketlərini təmizləyə bilərik.", 'tr': 'Öň bar resim köpşenleme nusgalary novel sahypalar ýa zady içerilýän domeneň daşaryndan gowy bejermez. Bu çykyş çykyş hakyky dünýäde bu nusgalaryň ullanyşyny çykaryp barýar. Biz bu meseleni fleksibil bir ýazşy ulanyp çykarýarlar üçin bu meseleyi test wagtynda, ýene-okuw etmekden çykarýarlar üçin el aldyrýarys. Bizim yöntemimiz seçilen täg sözlerini çizgisinde dahil etmek üçin şartlanmış beam araştyrmasyny ulanýar we sabitlenmiş sözlerimizi sözlerimizi öňünden görmeden täg sözlerine aňsat etmek üçin şartlanmış sözlerimizi ulanýar. Using this approach we achieve the art results for out-of-domain captioning on MSCOCO (and improved results for in-domain captioning). Belki-de şaşırtýar, netijelerimiz öwrenmek algoritmyna bir täg öňünden gelenleri içerip meňzeş golaýlarymyzy çykarýar. Biz hem görünýärdik ki, topar-dogry etiketleri ulanarak ImageNet köpüjileriniň kalitesini gowurak bileris.', 'bn': 'বর্তমান ছবির ক্যাপ্টেশন মডেলে উপস্থিত নভেল দৃশ্য অথবা বস্তুর মধ্যে উপস্থিত ছবিগুলোর জন্য ভালো সাধারণ করে না। এই সীমাবদ্ধ বাস্তব বিশ্ব অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে এই মডেল ব্যবহারের ব্যাবহারের ব্যবস্থা গুরুতর বাধা দিয়েছে বন্যা আমরা এই সমস্যাটিকে একটি ফ্লিক্সিবল পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহার করি যা পুনরায় প্রশিক্ষণ ছাড়া বিদ্যমান গভীর ক্যাপ্টেক্টারের ক্ষেত্রে প আমাদের পদ্ধতি আউটপুটে নির্বাচিত ট্যাগ শব্দ অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার জন্য নিয়ন্ত্রণিত বীম অনুসন্ধান ব্যবহার করে এবং পূর্ববর্তী অদৃশ্য ট্যাগ শব্দের ব এই পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করে আমরা এমএসস্কোকোতে ক্যাপ্টেশন করার জন্য শিল্পের ফলাফলের পরিস্থিতি পেয়েছি (এবং ডোমেইনের শিরোনামের ফলাফল উন্নত হয় হয়তো বিস্ময়কর ভাবে, আমাদের ফলাফল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রতিক্রিয়া যেটা শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদমের মধ্যে একই ট্যাগের ভবিষ্যৎবাণ আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমরা তৈরি করা ইমেজেন্টের শিরোনামের মানে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নত করতে পারি ভূমি সত্য লেবেল প্রদা', 'am': 'የአሁኑን የምስል መጠን እና አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ይህ ግንኙነት በአደባባይ ላይ ምስሎችን በመጠቀም የእነዚህን ምሳሌዎች የሚጠቀም በመጀመሪያ ዓለም ፕሮግራሞች በጭንቀት ይከለክላል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ በጭብጥ ጥልቅ አካባቢ ማሳየት እናስቸጋለን፡፡ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች Using this approach we achieve state of the art results for out-of-domain captioning on MSCOCO (and improved results for in-domain captioning).  ምናልባት በተደነቀቀ፣ ፍሬዎቻችን ለትምህርት መምህርት አሌጎርቲም የሚያስፈልገውን የጦማር ውይይት የሚያሳልፈው ይደረጋል፡፡ የምድር-እውነትን ምልክቶች በመስጠት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող պատկերների վերնագրման մոդելները լավ չեն ընդհանրացնում արտաքին պատկերների համար, որոնք պարունակում են նոր բնապատկերներ կամ առարկաներ: Այս սահմանափակումները լուրջ խոչընդոտում են այս մոդելների օգտագործման իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերում, որոնք գործում են վայրի պատկերների հետ: Մենք լուծում ենք այս խնդիրը ճկուն մոտեցումների օգտագործման միջոցով, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս գոյություն ունեցող խորը վերնագրական ճարտարապետություններին օգտագործել պատկերի նշանները թեստերի ժամանակ, առանց վերադասավորման: Մեր մեթոդը օգտագործում է սահմանափակ ճառագայթի որոնումը, որպեսզի ստիպենք ներառել ընտրված բառերը արտադրության մեջ, և ֆիքսված, նախապատրաստված բառերի ներդրումը, որպեսզի հեշտացնենք բառարանի տարածումը մինչ առաջ անտեսված բառ Օգտագործելով այս մոտեցումը, մենք հասնում ենք MSCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOCOS-ի վերնագրման ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին: Միգուցե զարմանալի է, որ մեր արդյունքները նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում են մոտեցումները, որոնք ներառում են նույն թեգի կանխատեսումները ուսուցման ալգորիթմի մեջ: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մենք կարող ենք նշանակալի բարելավել պատրաստված պատմությունների որակը՝ օգտագործելով երկրի-ճշմարտության պիտակները:', 'et': 'Olemasolevad piltide pealdiste mudelid ei üldista hästi domeeniväliseid pilte, mis sisaldavad uudseid stseene või objekte. See piirang takistab tõsiselt nende mudelite kasutamist looduslike piltidega tegelevates reaalsetes rakendustes. Me lahendame selle probleemi paindliku lähenemisviisi abil, mis võimaldab olemasolevatel sügavjäädvustamise arhitektuuridel kasutada pildi sildistajaid testimise ajal ilma ümberõpetamata. Meie meetod kasutab piiratud kiirte otsingut, et sundida valitud sildisõnade lisamist väljundisse, ja fikseeritud, eeltreenitud sõna manustamist, et hõlbustada sõnavara laiendamist varem nähtamatutele sildisõnadele. Selle lähenemisviisi abil saavutame tipptasemel tulemusi MSCOCO domeenivälise pealdise jaoks (ja paremaid tulemusi domeenisisese pealdise jaoks). Võib-olla üllatavalt ületavad meie tulemused märkimisväärselt lähenemisviise, mis sisaldavad samu siltide ennustusi õppealgoritmis. Samuti näitame, et saame oluliselt parandada loodud ImageNeti pealdiste kvaliteeti, kasutades põhjalikke märgiseid.', 'bs': 'Postojeći modeli imenovanja slika ne generalizuju dobro na slike izvan domena koje sadrže nove scene ili objekte. Ova ograničenja teško sprječava korištenje ovih modela u stvarnim svijetskim aplikacijama koji se bave slikama u divljini. Mi rješavamo ovaj problem sa fleksibilnim pristupom koji omogućava postojeću arhitekturu dubokog kapacije da iskoriste oznake slika u testu bez ponovnog treninga. Naša metoda koristi ograničenu potragu za zrakom da bi prisilila uključivanje izraženih znakova riječi u izlaz, i određene, pretjerane riječi za uključivanje proširenja rečenica na prethodno nevidjene znakove. Koristeći ovaj pristup postićemo stanje rezultata umjetnosti za izvan domena naslov MSCOCO (i poboljšani rezultati za naslov u domenu). Možda iznenađujuće, naši rezultati značajno iznosi pristupe koje uključuju iste predviđanja oznake u algoritam učenja. Također pokazujemo da možemo značajno poboljšati kvalitet napravljenih poglavlja ImageNeta uz primjenu etiketa zemaljske istine.', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevat kuvatekstitysmallit eivät yleisty hyvin toimialueen ulkopuolisiin kuviin, jotka sisältävät uusia kohtauksia tai esineitä. Tämä rajoitus vaikeuttaa huomattavasti näiden mallien käyttöä luonnossa olevia kuvia käsittelevissä reaalimaailman sovelluksissa. Ratkaisemme ongelman joustavalla lähestymistavalla, jonka avulla olemassa olevat syväkaappausarkkitehtuurit voivat hyödyntää kuvatunnisteita testiaikana ilman uudelleenkoulutusta. Menetelmämme käyttää rajoitettua sädehakua pakottaakseen valittujen tagisasanojen sisällyttämisen tulosteeseen, ja kiinteitä, esiasennettuja sanoja helpottamaan sanaston laajentamista aiemmin näkymättömiin tagisanoihin. Tällä lähestymistavalla saavutamme viimeisimpiä tuloksia verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolisessa tekstityksessä MSCOCO:ssa (ja parempia tuloksia verkkotunnuksen sisäisessä tekstityksessä). Ehkä yllättävää, että tulokset ovat huomattavasti parempia kuin lähestymistavat, jotka sisältävät samat tagin ennustukset oppimisalgoritmiin. Osoitamme myös, että pystymme merkittävästi parantamaan luotujen ImageNet-kuvatekstien laatua hyödyntämällä ground-truth-tarroja.', 'ca': "Els models de capturació d'imatges existents no s'generalitzen bé a imatges fora de domini que contenen noves escenes o objectes. Aquesta limitació dificulta gravement l'ús d'aquests models en aplicacions del món real que tracten d'imatges en el salvatge. Ens ocupem d'aquest problem a fent servir un enfocament flexible que permet que les arquitectures de titularització profunda existents aprofitin els etiquets d'imatge al moment de la prova, sense reenvolupar. El nostre mètode utilitza una cerca de raig restringit per forçar l'inclusió de paraules etiquetades seleccionadas a la producció, i incorporacions de paraules fixes i pré-entrenades per facilitar l'expansió del vocabulari a paraules etiquetades anteriorment invisibles. Utilitzant aquest enfocament aconsegueixem resultats més avançats per a la titulació fora de domini en MSCOCO (i resultats millorats per a la titulació en domini). Potser sorprenentment, els nostres resultats superen significativament els enfocaments que incorporen les mateixes prediccions d'etiquetes en l'algoritme d'aprenentatge. També demostram que podem millorar significativament la qualitat dels títulos generats d'ImageNet utilitzant etiquetes de veritat terrestre.", 'cs': 'Stávající modely popisků obrázků se dobře nezobecňují na obrázky mimo doménu obsahující nové scény nebo objekty. Toto omezení vážně brání používání těchto modelů v reálném světě aplikací zabývajících se obrazy ve volné přírodě. Tento problém řešíme flexibilním přístupem, který umožňuje stávajícím architekturám hlubokých titulků využít značkovačů obrázků v době testování, aniž bychom museli přeškolit. Naše metoda využívá omezené vyhledávání paprsků k vynucení zahrnutí vybraných slov značek do výstupu a pevné, předem trénované vložení slov, aby usnadnila rozšíření slovní zásoby na dříve neviděná slova značek. Pomocí tohoto přístupu dosahujeme nejmodernějších výsledků pro titulky mimo doménu na MSCOCO (a zlepšených výsledků pro titulky v doméně). Možná překvapivě, že naše výsledky výrazně překonávají přístupy, které zahrnují stejné předpovědi tagů do učebního algoritmu. Také ukazujeme, že můžeme výrazně zlepšit kvalitu generovaných titulků ImageNet využitím štítků základní pravdy.', 'jv': 'Presentation limiting Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan iki nggawe ngubah akeh tur angel sing beraksi iki dadi wis nguasai nggawe barang nggawe gerakan ciptaaken sesilhan kanggo ngilangno sistêm kuwi ora ono mulai terus-terus. We method use stringed Using this method we success state of the arts output for out-of-domain captioning on SMC (and advanced output for in-domain captioning). text Awak dhéwé mengko nganggep kuwi awak dhéwé iso ngluwih akeh luwih nyong pada caption Imagenet nganggep kuwi etiket sing ngewehke true.', 'sk': 'Obstoječi modeli napisovanja slik se ne posplošujejo dobro na zunajdomenske slike, ki vsebujejo nove prizore ali predmete. Ta omejitev močno ovira uporabo teh modelov v realnih aplikacijah, ki se ukvarjajo s slikami v naravi. To težavo rešujemo s prilagodljivim pristopom, ki obstoječim arhitekturam globokega zajemanja omogoča, da izkoristijo označevalce slik v času preskusa, brez ponovnega usposabljanja. Naša metoda uporablja omejeno iskanje z žarkom, da prisili vključitev izbranih besed oznak v izhod, in fiksne, predtrenirane besedne vdelave, da olajša razširitev besedišča na prej nevidne besedilne besedilne besede. S tem pristopom dosegamo najsodobnejše rezultate za zunajdomensko napisovanje na MSCOCO (in izboljšane rezultate za napisovanje v domeni). Mogoče presenetljivo, da so naši rezultati bistveno boljši od pristopov, ki vključujejo iste napovedi oznak v učni algoritem. Pokazujemo tudi, da lahko bistveno izboljšamo kakovost ustvarjenih napisov ImageNet z uporabo oznak resnice.', 'he': 'דוגמני ציור תמונות קיימים לא מגנרלים היטב לתמונות מחוץ לתחום המכילים סצנות חדשות או חפצים. ההגבלה הזאת מפריעה ברצינות להשתמש בדוגמנים האלה בתוכניות בעולם האמיתי שמתמודדות עם תמונות בפרא. אנחנו מתמודדים עם הבעיה הזו באמצעות גישה גמישה שמאפשרת ארכיטקטורות עמוקות קיימות להשתמש בתגים של תמונות בזמן המבחן, בלי אימון מחדש. השיטה שלנו משתמשת בחיפוש קרן מוגבלת כדי להכריח את הכילוי של מילים תווית נבחרות בתוצאה, ומקצרות מילים מוגבלות מראש באמצעות הגישה הזו אנו משיגים תוצאות מצב האומנות עבור כתובת מחוץ לתחום על MSCOCO (ותוצאות משתפרות עבור כתובת בתחום). אולי באופן מפתיע, התוצאות שלנו מגיעות יותר משמעותית מהגישות שמכילות את אותו חיזוי תגים לאלגוריתם הלימודים. אנחנו גם מראים שאנחנו יכולים לשפר באופן משמעותי את איכות הכותבות של ImageNet שנוצרות על ידי השתמש בתוויות אמת-קרקע.', 'ha': "Modellun mai tsaron zanen da ke gaba, ba su motsa mai kyau zuwa zanen aiki waɗanda ke ƙunsa da tsarin kwanan kwanan ko abubuwa. Wannan kanana ana hana amfani da waɗannan misãlai cikin shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin dũniya da ke yi aiki da zane cikin jangwa. Mu wajabta wannan problemar da ke amfani da wata hanzara mai fleksibo wanda ke iya amfani da tsarin sarki masu kai yanzu, ko kuma za'a iya amfani da taggeri na zane-taggeri idan an yi jarraba, idan ba da re-tsari ba. @ info: whatsthis Yi amfani da wannan hanyarwa, za'a sami halin matsalar sananni wa tsari na-Domin da aka samu (kuma ya kyautata matsala wa tsarin-Domen). Perhaps surprisingly, our results significantly outperform approaches that incorporate the same tag predictions into the learning algorithm.  Kayya, Munã nuna cewa, za'a iya kyautata sifar sunayen da aka gina, Image Net da kuma za'a iya samar da alama-gaskiyar ƙasa.", 'bo': 'Existing image captioning models do not generalize well to out-of-domain images containing novel scenes or objects. ཚད་འདིས་འཛམ་གླིང་ནང་གི་མིག་རྩིས་འདི་དག་གི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩིས་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་དུ་གཏོང་བཅུག་ཡོད། We address this problem using a flexible approach that enables existing deep captioning architectures to take advantage of image taggers at test time, without re-training. Our method uses constrained beam search to force the inclusion of selected tag words in the output, and fixed, pretrained word embeddings to facilitate vocabulary expansion to previously unseen tag words. Using this approach we achieve state of the art results for out-of-domain captioning on MSCOCO (and improved results for in-domain captioning). མཐའ་མ་འཕགས་པའི་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་མཚུངས་པའི་ཁྲོད་རྟགས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག We also show that we can significantly improve the quality of generated ImageNet captions by leveraging ground-truth labels.'}
{'en': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'ar': 'التعرف على نشاط اللقطة الصفرية مع تحريض سمة الفعل', 'es': 'Reconocimiento de actividad de tiro cero con inducción de atributos verbales', 'fr': "Reconnaissance de l'activité Zero Shot avec induction d'attributs verbaux", 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de Atividade Zero-Shot com Indução de Atributos Verbais', 'ja': '動詞属性誘導によるゼロショット活動認識', 'zh': '有动词属性归纳之零次', 'hi': 'क्रिया विशेषता प्रेरण के साथ शून्य-शॉट गतिविधि पहचान', 'ru': 'Распознавание активности с нулевым выстрелом с введением атрибута глагола', 'ga': 'Aithint Ghníomhaíochta Zero-shot le Ionduchtú Tréithe Briathar', 'hu': 'Zero-Shot tevékenységfelismerés verb attribútum indukcióval', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση δραστηριότητας μηδενικού πυροβολισμού με επαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών ρήμων', 'it': "Riconoscimento dell'attività a colpo zero con induzione dell'attributo verbo", 'kk': 'Жергілікті аттрибуттың индукциясының Null- Shot белсенділігін анықтау', 'lt': 'Nulinio šaudymo veiklos pripažinimas su žodžio požymių indukcija', 'mk': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Aktiviti Semula-Tembak dengan Penginduksi Atribut Verb', 'ml': 'Verb Attribute Induction', 'mt': 'Rikonoxximent ta’ Attività Żro-Shot b’Induzzjoni ta’ Attributi tal-Verb', 'mn': 'Зуун-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie aktywności zerowej z indukcją atrybutów czasownika', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea activității zero-Shot cu inducția atributelor verbului', 'ka': 'Zero- Shot- Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'so': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'sv': 'Aktivitetsigenkänning utan skott med induktion av verbattribut', 'no': 'NullShot- aktivitetskjenning med Verb- attributtinduksjon', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje aktivnosti nulo-pucnjave sa indukcijom vlasničkih atributa', 'ta': 'வெர்ப் குணங்கள் காட்சியுடன் செயல்பாடு அடையாளம்', 'si': 'Zero- Shot ක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියාත්මක පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් සැකසුම් සමග', 'ur': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng hoạt động bằng Giao diện', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Разпознаване на активност с нулев изстрел с индукция на атрибут на глагола', 'da': 'Zero-Shot aktivitetsgenkendelse med Verb Attribute Induktion', 'nl': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition met Verb Attribute Inductie', 'de': 'Zero-Shot Aktivitätserkennung mit Verbattribut Induktion', 'ko': '제로 속성 Shot 동사 인식을 가진 귀납 활동', 'sw': 'Tambulisho la shughuli zisizo za risasi na Uonyesho wa Tamko', 'fa': 'شناسایی فعالیت صفر با تنظیم ویژه', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje aktivnosti nulo-pucnjave sa indukcijom pritiska Verb', 'sq': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'af': 'Nuwe- Shot Aktiviteit Herkenning met Verb Attribute Induksie', 'hy': 'Զերո-կրակի ակտիվության ճանաչելը բայի առատոնությունների ինդուկցիայի միջոցով', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'id': 'Pengenalan Aktivitas Zero-Shot dengan Induksi Atribut Verb', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje aktivnosti nula-pucnjave sa Indukcijom propisa', 'tr': 'Geditiň hili faýllary tanamak', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání aktivity nulového výstřelu s indukcí slovesníkových atributů', 'et': 'Nullvõtte aktiivsuse tuvastamine verbi atribuudi induktsiooniga', 'fi': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'bn': 'ভার্ব বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী নির্দেশনার সাথে শূন্য- শুট কার্যক্রম পরিচিতি', 'ca': "Recognició d'activitat zero-shot amb inducció d'atributs de verbs", 'az': 'Sıfır-Shot Etkinlik Tanıması', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje dejavnosti brez posnetka z indukcijo atributa glagola', 'he': 'זיהוי פעילות אפס-ירייה בעזרת תוכנית משמעות מילים', 'bo': 'Zero-Shot Activity Recognition with Verb Attribute Induction', 'jv': 'Perintah Atribute'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs. For example, the verb salute has several properties, such as being a light movement, a social act, and short in duration. We use these attributes as the internal mapping between visual and textual representations to reason about a previously unseen action. In contrast to much prior work that assumes access to gold standard attributes for zero-shot classes and focuses primarily on object attributes, our model uniquely learns to infer action attributes from dictionary definitions and distributed word representations. Experimental results confirm that action attributes inferred from language can provide a predictive signal for zero-shot prediction of previously unseen activities.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, investigamos o reconhecimento de atividade zero-shot em grande escala, modelando os atributos visuais e linguísticos dos verbos de ação. Por exemplo, o verbo “saudar” tem várias propriedades, como ser um movimento leve, um ato social e de curta duração. Usamos esses atributos como o mapeamento interno entre representações visuais e textuais para raciocinar sobre uma ação inédita. Em contraste com muitos trabalhos anteriores que assumem acesso a atributos padrão ouro para classes zero-shot e se concentra principalmente em atributos de objeto, nosso modelo aprende exclusivamente a inferir atributos de ação a partir de definições de dicionário e representações de palavras distribuídas. Os resultados experimentais confirmam que os atributos de ação inferidos da linguagem podem fornecer um sinal preditivo para a previsão de tiro zero de atividades anteriormente não vistas.', 'es': 'En este artículo, investigamos el reconocimiento de actividad cero a gran escala mediante el modelado de los atributos visuales y lingüísticos de los verbos de acción. Por ejemplo, el verbo «saludar» tiene varias propiedades, como ser un movimiento ligero, un acto social y una duración corta. Utilizamos estos atributos como el mapeo interno entre las representaciones visuales y textuales para razonar sobre una acción nunca antes vista. A diferencia de muchos trabajos anteriores que suponen el acceso a los atributos estándar de oro para las clases de tiro cero y se centran principalmente en los atributos de objetos, nuestro modelo aprende de forma única a inferir atributos de acción a partir de definiciones de diccionario y representaciones de palabras distribuidas. Los resultados experimentales confirman que los atributos de acción inferidos del lenguaje pueden proporcionar una señal predictiva para la predicción cero de actividades nunca vistas anteriormente.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نحقق في التعرف على نشاط الضربة الصفرية على نطاق واسع من خلال نمذجة السمات المرئية واللغوية لأفعال الحركة. على سبيل المثال ، الفعل "تحية" له عدة خصائص ، مثل كونه حركة خفيفة ، وفعل اجتماعي ، وقصير المدة. نستخدم هذه السمات كتخطيط داخلي بين التمثيلات المرئية والنصية للتفكير حول إجراء غير مرئي سابقًا. على عكس الكثير من العمل السابق الذي يفترض الوصول إلى السمات القياسية الذهبية لفئات اللقطة الصفرية ويركز بشكل أساسي على سمات الكائن ، يتعلم نموذجنا بشكل فريد استنتاج سمات الإجراء من تعريفات القاموس وتمثيلات الكلمات الموزعة. تؤكد النتائج التجريبية أن سمات الإجراء المستنبطة من اللغة يمكن أن توفر إشارة تنبؤية للتنبؤ بالرصاص الصفري للأنشطة غير المرئية سابقًا.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions la reconnaissance d'activité zéro à grande échelle en modélisant les attributs visuels et linguistiques des verbes d'action. Par exemple, le verbe «\xa0salute\xa0» possède plusieurs propriétés, comme être un mouvement léger, un acte social et une courte durée. Nous utilisons ces attributs comme mappage interne entre les représentations visuelles et textuelles afin de raisonner sur une action inédite. Contrairement à de nombreux travaux antérieurs qui supposent l'accès aux attributs de référence pour les classes zero-shot et se concentrent principalement sur les attributs d'objets, notre modèle apprend uniquement à déduire les attributs d'action à partir des définitions de dictionnaire et des représentations de mots distribuées. Les résultats expérimentaux confirment que les attributs d'action déduits du langage peuvent fournir un signal prédictif pour la prédiction zéro d'activités inédites.", 'ja': '本稿では、作用動詞の視覚的・言語的属性をモデル化して、大規模なゼロショット活動認識を検討する。例えば、動詞「敬礼」は、軽い動きである、社会的行為である、持続時間が短いなど、いくつかの特性を有する。これらの属性を、視覚的表現とテキスト表現の間の内部マッピングとして使用して、以前は見えていなかったアクションについて推論します。ゼロショットクラスのゴールド標準属性へのアクセスを前提とし、主にオブジェクト属性に焦点を当てた以前の多くの研究とは対照的に、私たちのモデルは、辞書定義と分散単語表現からアクション属性を推論することを一意に学習します。実験結果は、言語から推測されるアクション属性が、以前に見られなかった活動のゼロショット予測のための予測信号を提供することができることを確認する。', 'zh': '本文者,动词视言语之性建模以究大零镜头之知。 如动词敬礼多性,轻动行持续时间短。 以此属性为视文之内映,以推理前不见之动作。 比之黄金之准,唯字典义分布式单词。 实验实者,言推断出之动,可以为前不见之零镜头占也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम क्रिया क्रियाओं के दृश्य और भाषाई विशेषताओं को मॉडलिंग करके बड़े पैमाने पर शून्य-शॉट गतिविधि मान्यता की जांच करते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, क्रिया "सैल्यूट" में कई गुण हैं, जैसे कि एक प्रकाश आंदोलन, एक सामाजिक कार्य, और अवधि में कम होना। हम इन विशेषताओं का उपयोग पहले से अनदेखी कार्रवाई के बारे में तर्क करने के लिए दृश्य और पाठ्य अभ्यावेदन के बीच आंतरिक मानचित्रण के रूप में करते हैं। बहुत पहले के काम के विपरीत जो शून्य-शॉट वर्गों के लिए सोने के मानक विशेषताओं तक पहुंच को मानता है और मुख्य रूप से ऑब्जेक्ट विशेषताओं पर केंद्रित है, हमारा मॉडल विशिष्ट रूप से शब्दकोश परिभाषाओं और वितरित शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व से कार्रवाई विशेषताओं का अनुमान लगाना सीखता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम पुष्टि करते हैं कि भाषा से अनुमानित कार्रवाई विशेषताएं पहले अनदेखी गतिविधियों की शून्य-शॉट भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक भविष्यवाणी संकेत प्रदान कर सकती हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы исследуем широкомасштабное распознавание активности нулевого выстрела путем моделирования визуальных и лингвистических атрибутов глаголов действия. Например, глагол «салют» имеет несколько свойств, таких как легкое движение, социальный акт и короткая продолжительность. Мы используем эти атрибуты как внутреннее отображение между визуальными и текстовыми представлениями, чтобы рассуждать о ранее невидимом действии. В отличие от многих предыдущих работ, которые предполагают доступ к атрибутам золотого стандарта для классов с нулевым выстрелом и фокусируются в первую очередь на атрибутах объекта, наша модель уникально учится выводить атрибуты действия из определений словаря и распределенных представлений слов. Экспериментальные результаты подтверждают, что атрибуты действия, выведенные из языка, могут обеспечить прогностический сигнал для прогнозирования ранее невидимых видов деятельности с нулевым выстрелом.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar aithint ghníomhaíochta náid lámhaigh ar scála mór trí shaintréithe amhairc agus teanga na mbriathra gnímh a shamhaltú. Mar shampla, tá go leor airíonna ag an bhriathar “salute”, mar shampla a bheith ina ghluaiseacht éadrom, ina ghníomh sóisialta, agus ina ré gearr. Bainimid úsáid as na tréithe seo mar an léarscáiliú inmheánach idir léirithe amhairc agus téacsúla chun réasúnú a dhéanamh faoi ghníomh nach bhfacthas riamh cheana. I gcodarsnacht le go leor oibre roimhe seo a ghlacann le rochtain ar airíonna caighdeánacha óir le haghaidh ranganna náid lámhaigh agus a dhíríonn go príomha ar tréithe oibiachta, foghlaimíonn ár múnla go sainiúil tréithe gníomhaíochta a bhaint as sainmhínithe foclóir agus uiríll dáilte focal. Deimhníonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir le tréithe gníomhaíochta tátal a bhaint as teanga comhartha réamh-mheastacháin a sholáthar le haghaidh réamh-mheastacháin náid ar ghníomhaíochtaí nach bhfacthas riamh cheana.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban az akcióigék vizuális és nyelvi tulajdonságainak modellezésével vizsgáljuk a nagyszabású nulla-shot aktivitás felismerését. Például a "tisztelet" igének több tulajdonsága van, mint például könnyű mozgalom, társadalmi aktus és rövid időtartam. Ezeket az attribútumokat a vizuális és szöveges ábrázolások közötti belső leképezésként használjuk egy korábban láthatatlan műveletről való érveléshez. A sok korábbi munkával ellentétben, amelyek a nulla lövéses osztályok aranyszabású attribútumaihoz való hozzáférést feltételezik, és elsősorban az objektum attribútumokra összpontosítanak, modellünk egyedülállóan megtanulja a művelet attribútumokat a szótárdefiníciókból és az elosztott szóreprezentációkból. A kísérleti eredmények megerősítik, hogy a nyelvből következtetett műveleti attribútumok prediktív jelet adhatnak a korábban nem látott tevékenységek zéró lövéses előrejelzéséhez.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε μεγάλης κλίμακας αναγνώριση δραστηριότητας μηδενικού πυροβολισμού μοντελοποιώντας τα οπτικά και γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά των ρήμων δράσης. Για παράδειγμα, το ρήμα "χαιρετισμός" έχει αρκετές ιδιότητες, όπως είναι μια ελαφριά κίνηση, μια κοινωνική πράξη και σύντομη διάρκεια. Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά ως την εσωτερική αντιστοίχιση μεταξύ οπτικών και κειμένων αναπαραστάσεων για να συλλογιστούμε σχετικά με μια προηγουμένως αόρατη ενέργεια. Σε αντίθεση με πολλές προηγούμενες εργασίες που υποθέτουν πρόσβαση σε χρυσά τυποποιημένα χαρακτηριστικά για κατηγορίες μηδενικού πυροβολισμού και επικεντρώνονται κυρίως σε χαρακτηριστικά αντικειμένων, το μοντέλο μας μαθαίνει μοναδικά να συναγάγει χαρακτηριστικά δράσης από ορισμούς λεξικών και κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα επιβεβαιώνουν ότι τα χαρακτηριστικά δράσης που συνάγονται από τη γλώσσα μπορούν να παρέχουν ένα προληπτικό σήμα για την πρόβλεψη μηδενικής βολής των προηγουμένως αθέητων δραστηριοτήτων.', 'ka': "ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ დიდი სინამდვილეში ნულ სტატის აღმოჩენება, რომლებიც აქციების ვიზუალური და ლუნგურიური ატრიბუტების მოდელურებით. მაგალითად, გვერბა 'დასაბამისი' აქვს რამდენიმე მნიშვნელობები, როგორც სინამდვილე მოძრაობა, სოციალური მოქმედება და სინამდვილეობა. ჩვენ ამ ატრიბუტების გამოყენება ვიზუალური და ტექსტულური გამოსახულებების შორის ინტერქსტური მაპოვატირება, როგორც წინა არაჩვენებული მოქმედების მიზე ჩვენი მოდელი ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ მოქმედების ატრიბუტებები სიტყვანის განსაზღვრებებიდან და გაყოფილი სიტყვანის განსაზღვრებებიდან და გაყოფილი სიტყვანის განსაზღვრებებიდან. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები დარწმუნდება, რომ ენაზე დაკავშირებული ატრიბუტები შეუძლია გადაწყვეტილებელი სიგნალს ნულ-სტარტის წარმოდგენების წინ", 'kk': "Бұл қағазда, әрекеттердің визуалдық және лингвистикалық атрибуттарын моделдеу арқылы үлкен өлшемді нөл-шарттың белсенділігін зерттеп тұрамыз. Мысалы, 'сәлем' вербосының бірнеше қасиеттері бар, мысалы, жарық жылжыту, әлеуметтік әрекеті және ұзақтығы қысқа. Біз бұл атрибуттарды көрініс мен мәтін түсініктерінің арасындағы ішкі картасыз ретінде алдында көрсетілмеген әрекеттер туралы себептерге қолданамыз. Біздің үлгіміз сөздік анықтамаларынан әрекеттердің атрибуттарын жалғастыру мен үлестірілген сөздік таңдамаларынан алтын стандартты атрибуттарына қатынауға қарсы болып, негізінде нысандар атрибуттарына қатынауға болады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер тілден келтірілген әрекеттер атрибуттары алдыңғы көрсетілмеген әрекеттердің нөл- шофтың алдындағы әрекеттердің алдындағы белгілерін көрсету", 'it': "In questo articolo, esaminiamo il riconoscimento di attività zero-shot su larga scala modellando gli attributi visivi e linguistici dei verbi di azione. Ad esempio, il verbo 'saluto' ha diverse proprietà, come essere un movimento leggero, un atto sociale e breve di durata. Usiamo questi attributi come mappatura interna tra rappresentazioni visive e testuali per ragionare su un'azione precedentemente non vista. A differenza di molti lavori precedenti che assumono l'accesso agli attributi gold standard per le classi zero-shot e si concentra principalmente sugli attributi oggetto, il nostro modello impara unicamente a dedurre gli attributi di azione dalle definizioni del dizionario e dalle rappresentazioni distribuite di parole. I risultati sperimentali confermano che gli attributi di azione dedotti dal linguaggio possono fornire un segnale predittivo per la previsione zero-shot di attività precedentemente non viste.", 'ms': "In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs.  Contohnya, verb 'salute' mempunyai beberapa ciri, seperti pergerakan ringan, tindakan sosial, dan jangka pendek. Kami menggunakan atribut ini sebagai pemetaan dalaman diantara perwakilan visual dan teks untuk alasan mengenai tindakan yang belum terlihat sebelumnya. Berbeza-beza dengan banyak kerja sebelumnya yang menganggap akses kepada atribut piawai emas untuk kelas 0-shot dan fokus terutama pada atribut objek, model kita belajar untuk menyimpulkan atribut tindakan dari definisi kamus dan perwakilan perkataan yang disebarkan. Hasil eksperimental mengesahkan bahawa atribut tindakan yang dihimpunkan dari bahasa boleh menyediakan isyarat ramalan untuk ramalan tembakan sifar aktiviti yang belum terlihat sebelumnya.", 'lt': 'In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs.  Pavyzdžiui, žodis "sveikinimas" turi keletą savybių, pavyzdžiui, yra lengvas judėjimas, socialinis aktas ir trumpas laikotarpis. Šie požymiai naudojami kaip vidinis vizualinių ir tekstinių atvaizdų žemėlapis, kad būtų galima pagrįsti anksčiau nepastebimus veiksmus. Priešingai nei daug anksčiau atliktas darbas, kuriame numatyta galimybė naudotis aukso standartiniais požymiais nulinės nuotraukos klasėse ir daugiausia dėmesio skiriama objekto požymiams, mūsų modelis vieninteliai išmoko daryti veiksmų požymius iš žodyno apibrėžimų ir paskirstytų žodžių atspaudų. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai patvirtina, kad veiksmų požymiai, išvardyti iš kalbos, gali suteikti prognozuojamą signal ą nuliniam anksčiau nematomos veiklos prognozavimui.', 'mk': 'In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs.  На пример, јазикот „здраво“ има неколку сопствености, како што е светло движење, социјален акт и кратко траење. Ние ги користиме овие атрибути како внатрешно мапирање помеѓу визуелните и текстуалните претставувања за да размислуваме за претходно невидливата акција. За разлика од многу претходни работи кои претпоставуваат пристап до златни стандардни атрибути за класи со нула снимка и се фокусираат главно на објектни атрибути, нашиот модел единствено научи да ги инферира акционите атрибути од дефинициите на речникот и дистрибуираните претставувања на зб Експерименталните резултати потврдуваат дека акционите атрибути кои се деферирани од јазикот можат да обезбедат предвидлив сигнал за предвидување со нула снимка на претходно невидени активности.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw ir-rikonoxximent ta’ attività fuq skala kbira b’ritratti żero billi nimmudellaw l-attributi viżivi u lingwistiċi tal-verbs ta’ azzjoni. Pereżempju, il-verb 'salute' għandu diversi karatteristiċi, bħalma huma moviment ħafif, att soċjali, u tul qasir ta' żmien. Aħna nużaw dawn l-attributi bħala l-immappjar intern bejn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet viżivi u tessili biex nirraġunaw dwar azzjoni li ma ġietx osservata qabel. B’kuntrast max-xogħol ħafna preċedenti li jassumi aċċess għal attributi standard tad-deheb għall-klassijiet b’żero-shot u jiffoka primarjament fuq attributi ta’ oġġetti, il-mudell tagħna jitgħallem b’mod uniku li jindeduċi attributi ta’ azzjoni mid-definizzjonijiet tad-dikjaratur u rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ kliem distribwiti. Riżultati esperimentali jikkonfermaw li l-attributi ta’ azzjoni inferiti mil-lingwa jistgħu jipprovdu sinjal ta’ tbassir għal tbassir mingħajr skop ta’ attivitajiet li ma dehrux qabel.", 'no': 'I denne papiret undersøker vi stor skal gjenkjenne null-skjultaktivitet ved å modellere visuelle og lingviske attributtane for handlingsverber. For eksempel, verben « saluter » har fleire eigenskapar, slik som å vera ein lys bevegelse, ein sosialt handling og kort tid. Vi bruker desse attributtane som intern karting mellom visuelle og tekst- representasjonar for grunn om eit førre ukjend handling. I contrast to much prior work that assumes access to gold standard attributes for zero-shot classes and focuses primarily on object attributes, our model lears uniquely to infer action attributes from dictionary definitions and distributed word representations. Eksperimentale resultater stadfestar at handlinga-attributtar frå språk kan gje eit foregåande signal for forhåndsvising av null-bilete av førre ukjende aktivitet.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид том хэмжээний тэр шартын үйл ажиллагааг шалгаж, үйл ажиллагааны үзүүлэлтийн, хэлний харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны харилца Жишээлбэл, "Байралт" гэдэг үг нь гэрлийн хөдөлгөөн, нийгмийн үйл явц, урт хугацаанд богино байдаг. Бид эдгээр атрибутыг өмнө нь харагдахгүй үйл явдлын тухай шалтгаан үзүүлэлтийн болон текстур үзүүлэлтийн хоорондын дотоод газрын зураг болгон ашиглаж байна. Өмнөх ажлын эсрэг нь тэгш шат ангийнхаа алтын стандарт атрибутыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөж, ихэвчлэн объектын атрибутын тухай анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бидний загварын загвар нь бичил үгийн тодорхойлолт болон хуваарилсан үг илэрхий Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд хэлээс гарсан үйл явдал нь өмнө нь харагдаагүй үйл явдлын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлж чадна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy rozpoznawanie aktywności zerowych na dużą skalę poprzez modelowanie atrybutów wizualnych i językowych czasowników akcji. Na przykład czasownik "salute" ma kilka właściwości, takich jak lekki ruch, akt społeczny i krótki czas trwania. Używamy tych atrybutów jako wewnętrznego mapowania pomiędzy wizualnymi i tekstowymi reprezentacjami, aby uzasadnić wcześniej niewidzianą akcję. W przeciwieństwie do wielu wcześniejszych prac zakładających dostęp do atrybutów standardowych złota dla klas zero-shot i koncentrujących się przede wszystkim na atrybutach obiektów, nasz model unikalnie uczy się wnioskować atrybuty akcji z definicji słownika i rozproszonych reprezentacji słów. Wyniki eksperymentalne potwierdzają, że atrybuty działania wywnioskowane z języka mogą zapewnić sygnał predykcyjny do przewidywania zerowych strzałów dotychczas niewidzianych działań.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, investigăm recunoașterea activității la scară largă zero-shot prin modelarea atributelor vizuale și lingvistice ale verbelor de acțiune. De exemplu, verbul "salut" are mai multe proprietăți, cum ar fi o mișcare ușoară, un act social și scurtă în durată. Folosim aceste atribute ca mapare internă între reprezentările vizuale și textuale pentru a raționa despre o acțiune nevăzută anterior. Spre deosebire de multe lucrări anterioare care presupun accesul la atributele gold standard pentru clasele zero-shot și se concentrează în principal pe atributele obiectelor, modelul nostru învață în mod unic să deducă atributele de acțiune din definițiile dicționarului și reprezentările de cuvinte distribuite. Rezultatele experimentale confirmă faptul că atributele de acțiune deduse din limbaj pot furniza un semnal predictiv pentru predicția zero-shot a activităților nevăzute anterior.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu baaraynaa aqoonsashada waxqabadka nuurka ah oo aad u weyn, si aan u sameyno tusaale ahaan noocyada aragga iyo luuqadda ee shaqooyinka shaqaalaha. Tusaale ahaan xarafka 'salaanta' waxay leeyihiin hanti badan, tusaale ahaan dhaqdhaqaaq fudud, sharciga bulshada iyo waqtiga gaaban. We use these attributes as the internal mapping between visual and textual representations to reason about a previously unseen action.  Iska duwan shaqo badan oo horumar ah oo u leedahay isticmaalka kaararka dahabka ee fasalka zero-ganacsiga ah islamarkaasna si ugu horeysa u fiirsashada khaaska, modellkayagu wuxuu si gaar ah u baranayaa inuu ka fekero takhasuska falimaha ee qoraalka dictionaadda iyo qaybsan hadalka. Imtixaanka waxaa ku xaqiijin kara in qabashada luuqada laga sameeyo uu soo bandhigi karo calaamad la sii sheegayo oo lagu sii sheegayo waxqabadka hore oo aan la arkaynin.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പൂജ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ കാഴ്ചകളും ഭാഷ്ട്രീതിക വ്യവസ്ഥകളും മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാ ഉദാഹരണത്തിന് ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി 'സമാധാനം' എന്ന വാര്\u200dപ്പിന്റെ കൈയ്യില്\u200d പല വിശേഷങ്ങളുണ്ട്. ഒരു വെളുത്ത മാറ്റം, ഒരു സ കാഴ്ച്ചയും ടെക്സ്ചുല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളും തമ്മിലുള്ള ആന്തരിക മാപ്പിങ്ങ് എന്ന ആവശ്യമായി ഈ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന് പൂജ്യത്തിന്റെ സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്റ്റാര്\u200dട്ട് ക്ലാസുകള്\u200dക്ക് സമ്മാനിക്കുന്ന സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്റ്റേറ്റ് വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രാധാന്യം വേണ്ടിയും, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട Experimental results confirm that action attributes inferred from language can provide a predictive signal for zero-shot prediction of previously unseen activities.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats undersöker vi storskalig noll-skott aktivitetsigenkänning genom att modellera de visuella och språkliga attributen hos aktionsverb. Exempelvis har verbet "salut" flera egenskaper, såsom att vara en lätt rörelse, en social handling och kort varaktighet. Vi använder dessa attribut som intern mappning mellan visuella och textmässiga representationer för att resonera om en tidigare osedd åtgärd. I motsats till mycket tidigare arbete som förutsätter tillgång till guldstandardattribut för nollskottsklasser och fokuserar främst på objektattribut, lär vår modell sig unikt att härleda åtgärdsattribut från ordlistor definitioner och distribuerade ordrepresentationer. Experimentella resultat bekräftar att åtgärdsattribut som härleds från språk kan ge en prediktiv signal för noll-skott förutsägelse av tidigare osynliga aktiviteter.', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பெரிய அளவு பூஜ்ஜியமான செயல் அறிவிப்பை தேடுகிறோம் செயல் செயல்களின் பார்வை மற்றும் மொழிப்பு குணங எடுத்துக்காட்டாக 'வாழ்த்து' என்ற சொல்லில் பல பண்புகள் உள்ளன, அதாவது ஒரு ஒளி நகர்வு, ஒரு சமூக செயல், கால அளவில் குறைவான. நாம் இந்த குணங்களை உபயோகிக்கிறோம் பார்வையும் உரையாடலுக்கும் இடையே உள்ளார்ந்த வரைப்படமாக மாற்றுகிறது மு பூஜ்ஜியம் சுட்டு வகுப்புகளுக்கு தங்க இயல்பான குணங்களை அணுகும் பொருள் குணங்களை எடுத்துக் கொள்ளும் முன்னுரிய வேலைக்கு எதிராக முறையாகும் மற்றும் பொர மொழியிலிருந்து பாதிக்கப்பட்ட செயல் குணங்களை உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது முந்தைய மறைக்கப்படாத செயல்களின் பூஜ்ஜியத்திற்கான", 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں، ہم بڑی اسکیل صفر-شٹ کی فعالیت کی شناخت کی تحقیق کریں، کیسی باتوں کی تصویر اور زبان انگیزی اثباتوں کو مدل کر رہے ہیں۔ مثال یہ ہے کہ کلام 'سلام' کے لئے بہت سی خصوصی ہیں، جیسے روشنی حرکت، اجتماعی حرکت اور مدت میں کوتاہی ہے. ہم ان آبریٹوں کو اس سے پہلے غیر دیکھا ہوا کام کے بارے میں دلیل کے لئے بصیرت اور ٹکسٹیول کی نمایش کے درمیان داخلی نقشه کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں. بہت سے پہلے کاروں کے مقابلہ میں جو صفر-شٹ کلاس کے لئے سونے کے استاندارڈ آبریٹوں کی دسترسی قبول کرتا ہے اور سب سے زیادہ اشخاص آبریٹوں پر تمرکز کرتا ہے، ہمارا مدل ایک ہی طریقے سے بات کا علم دیتا ہے کہ لکھنے والی تعریف سے اقدام آبریٹوں کو نازل کرے Experimental results confirm that action attributes inferred from language can provide a predictive signal for zero-shot prediction of previously unseen activities.", 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය ශූන්ය වැඩක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ක්\u200dරියාවේ දිහා භාෂාවික වර්ගයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණය ස උදාහරණයෙන්, වාර්තාව 'සුභාවිත්' විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් තියෙනවා, හරියට ආලෝකු සැලසුම, සමාජික වැඩක් අපි මේ විශේෂතාව භාවිත කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරදේශය සහ පැත්තක් පෙන්වන්න අතර ඇතුළු සැකසුම් විදියට පස්සේ නොදන්න ක මුලින් කලින් කලින් වැඩට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා වෙනුවෙන් සුන්ධ විශේෂ වර්ගය සඳහා සුන්ධ විශේෂ වර්ගය සඳහා සුන්ධ විශේෂ වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිශ්නයක් තියාගන්නවා ක්\u200dරියාව භාෂාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ සංඥාවක් සුන", 'sr': "U ovom papiru istražujemo prepoznavanje velike skale nulotne aktivnosti modeliranjem vizuelnih i jezičkih atributa akcijskih verba. Na primer, verb 'pozdravljanje' ima nekoliko vlasništva, kao što je svjetlo kretanje, društveni čin i kratko u trajanju. Koristimo ove atribute kao unutrašnju mapiranje između vizuelnih i tekstualnih predstavljanja da razumemo o prethodno nevidljivim akcijama. Za suprotnost mnogim prethodnim poslovima koji preuzima pristup zlatnim standardnim atributima za klase nule pucnjave i fokusira se prvenstveno na atribute objekata, naš model se jedinstveno uči da inferira akcijske atribute iz definicija rečnika i raspodjele predstave riječi. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju da akcijska atributa infekcije sa jezika može pružiti predviđavajući signal za predviđanje nula pucnjave o prethodnim nevidljivim aktivnostima.", 'vi': "Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra khả năng nhận dạng hoạt động không bắn lớn bằng cách tượng trưng các yếu tố ngôn ngữ và hình ảnh của động từ. Ví dụ, động từ'chào'có nhiều tính chất, như là một chuyển động nhẹ, một hành động xã hội, và ngắn trong thời gian. Chúng tôi sử dụng những thuộc tính này như một bản đồ nội bộ giữa các biểu tượng hình ảnh và kết cấu để giải thích về một hành động chưa từng thấy. Trái với nhiều công việc trước đây giả sử truy cập vào các thuộc tính chuẩn vàng cho các lớp bắn không và tập trung chủ yếu vào các thuộc tính đối tượng, mô hình của chúng ta đặc biệt học cách luận các thuộc tính hành động từ các định nghĩa từ điển và các biểu tượng phát thanh từ. Kết quả thí nghiệm xác nhận rằng các thuộc tính hành động phụ thuộc từ ngôn ngữ có thể cung cấp tín hiệu dự đoán về các hoạt động chưa từng thấy.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz amal vazifalarning ko'rinishi va lingvistik attributlarini modellash orqali katta sifatida qo'llab qo'llanmiz. For example, the verb 'salute' has several properties, such as being a light movement, a social act, and short in duration.  Biz shu atributlarni oldingi nomaʼlum amal haqida ko'rinadigan ko'rinish va matn representalarning orasidagi ichki rasmlar sifatida foydalanamiz. Ikkinchi birinchi ishni o'zgartirib turib, zero-saqlangan sinfning yuqori стандарт atributlariga murojaat qiladigan va asosiy obʼekt atributlariga foydalanish mumkin, modelmiz lugʻatning taʼriflaridan qisqarish va soʻzni ajratishni o'rganadi. Name", 'hr': "U ovom papiru istražujemo priznanje velike skale nulotne aktivnosti modelirajući vizuelne i jezičke atribute djelovanja verba. Na primjer, verb 'pozdrav' ima nekoliko svojstava, kao što je svjetlo kretanje, društveni čin i kratko u trajanju. Koristimo te atribute kao unutarnje mapiranje između vizuelnih i tekstualnih predstavljanja da razumijemo o prethodno nevidljivim akcijama. Za suprotnost mnogim prethodnim radom koji prima pristup zlatnim standardnim atributima za klase nule pucnjave i fokusira se primarno na atribute objekata, naš model uči jedinstveno inferirati akcijske atribute iz definicija riječi i raspodjeljene riječi. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju da akcijske atribute navedene iz jezika mogu pružiti predviđavajući signal za predviđanje nula pogodaka prethodno nevidljivih aktivnosti.", 'nl': "In dit artikel onderzoeken we grootschalige zero-shot activity herkenning door de visuele en linguïstische kenmerken van actiewerkwoorden te modelleren. Het werkwoord 'groeten' heeft bijvoorbeeld verschillende eigenschappen, zoals een lichte beweging, een sociale handeling en korte duur. We gebruiken deze attributen als de interne toewijzing tussen visuele en tekstuele representaties om te redeneren over een eerder onzichtbare actie. In tegenstelling tot veel eerder werk dat toegang veronderstelt tot gouden standaardattributen voor zero-shot klassen en zich voornamelijk richt op objectattributen, leert ons model op unieke wijze actieattributen afleiden uit woordenboek definities en gedistribueerde woordrepresentaties. Experimentele resultaten bevestigen dat actieattributen die uit taal worden afgeleid, een voorspellend signaal kunnen leveren voor nul-shot voorspelling van eerder onzichtbare activiteiten.", 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir großskalige Zero-Shot Aktivitätserkennung durch Modellierung der visuellen und linguistischen Attribute von Aktionsverben. Zum Beispiel hat das Verb "Gruß" mehrere Eigenschaften, wie eine leichte Bewegung, ein sozialer Akt und eine kurze Dauer. Wir verwenden diese Attribute als interne Zuordnung zwischen visuellen und textuellen Darstellungen, um über eine zuvor nicht gesehene Aktion nachzudenken. Im Gegensatz zu vielen früheren Arbeiten, die den Zugriff auf Goldstandardattribute für Zero-Shot-Klassen voraussetzen und sich hauptsächlich auf Objektattribute konzentrieren, lernt unser Modell auf einzigartige Weise, Aktionsattribute aus Wörterbuchdefinitionen und verteilten Wortrepräsentationen abzuleiten. Experimentelle Ergebnisse bestätigen, dass aus Sprache abgeleitete Aktionsattribute ein prädiktives Signal für die Nullschuss-Vorhersage bisher nicht gesehener Aktivitäten liefern können.', 'id': "In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs.  Contohnya, verb 'salute' memiliki beberapa properti, seperti gerakan ringan, tindakan sosial, dan pendek dalam jangka waktu. Kami menggunakan atribut-atribut ini sebagai peta dalaman antara representation visual dan tekstual untuk alasan tentang tindakan yang belum terlihat sebelumnya. Berbeda dengan banyak pekerjaan sebelumnya yang menganggap akses ke atribut standar emas untuk kelas zero-shot dan fokus terutama pada atribut objek, model kita belajar unik untuk menyimpulkan atribut aksi dari definisi kamus dan representasi kata yang disebarkan. Experimental results confirm that action attributes inferred from language can provide a predictive signal for zero-shot prediction of previously unseen activities.", 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 동작 동사의 시각과 언어 속성을 모델링하여 대규모 렌즈 활동 식별을 연구했다.예를 들어 동사'sallet'은 몇 가지 속성이 있는데 예를 들면 가벼운 동작, 사교 행위와 짧은 지속 시간이다.우리는 이러한 속성을 시각과 텍스트 표시 사이의 내부영사로 사용하여 이전에 보이지 않았던 동작을 추리한다.이전의 많은 작업과 달리 우리의 모델은 영포류가 황금 표준 속성에 접근할 수 있다고 가정하고 주로 대상 속성을 주목한다. 우리의 모델은 사전 정의와 분포식 단어 표시에서 동작 속성을 추정하는 것을 유일하게 배운다.실험 결과 언어에서 추정된 동작 속성은 이전에 보이지 않았던 활동의 0박자 예측에 예측 신호를 제공할 수 있음을 증명하였다.", 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza utambulisho wa shughuli zilizopigwa sifuri kwa kutengeneza vifaa vya kuona na lugha za kazi za kazi. Kwa mfano, neno la 'salamu' lina utamaduni kadhaa, kama vile harakati za mwanga, kitendo cha kijamii, na muda mfupi. Tunatumia mifano haya kama ramani ya ndani kati ya uwakilishi wa kuona na kuandika kwa sababu ya hatua isiyojulikana hapo awali. Tofauti na kazi nyingi za kabla ambazo zinaweza kupata huduma za kiwango cha dhahabu kwa ajili ya darasa zenye risasi zisizo na lengo la msingi juu ya vifaa vya vitu, modeli yetu inajifunza kupunguza vifaa vya hatua kutoka kwenye maelezo ya kiimla na kuwakilisha maneno. Experimental results confirm that action attributes inferred from language can provide a predictive signal for zero-shot prediction of previously unseen activities.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz esasy çykyşlaryň görsel we lingwistiki wersiýalarynyň görsel we çykyş hasaplaryny örenýäris. Mesela, 'selamlar' sözleriniň birnäçe hasaplanyşy bar, ýagtylyk hereket, sosial hereket we soňky derejede. Biz bu özellikleri önceden görmedikleri bir eylem hakkında görsel ve metin gösterimleri arasındaki iç haritaları olarak kullanırız. 0-shot klaslary üçin altyn standart atributlaryna gollanmak we özellikle zadyň atributlaryna üns berýär, biziň modelimiz sözlük tanımlaryndan eyni atributlaryny azaltmak we sözlük täzeliklerini boşadyrmak üçin öwrenýär. Durmanyň netijesi dilden alyp giten eylemiň atributleri öňünden görmedikleri işlemleriň 0-aty öňünden öňünden a ýdyşy üçin önlenjek sinyal temin edip biler.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek groot-skaal nul-skoot-aktiviteit herken deur die visuele en lingwisiese eienskappe van aksie verbe te modelleer. Byvoorbeeld, het die verb 'salut' verskeie eienskappe, soos 'n lig beweging,  'n sosiale beweging en kort in duur. Ons gebruik hierdie eienskappe as die interne kaart tussen visuele en tekstuele voorstellings om rede oor 'n voorheen ongestelde aksie te reden. In contrast to much prior work that assumes access to gold standard attributes for zero- shot classes and focuses primarily on object attributes, our model lears uniquely to infer action attributes from dictionary definitions and distributed word representations. Eksperimentale resultate bevestig dat aksie eienskappe wat van taal uitgevoer word kan 'n voorskoulike sein vir nul-skoot voorskou van voorheen ongestelde aktiwiteite verskaf.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما با نمونه\u200cسازی ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای دیده و زبان\u200cشناسی فعالیت\u200cهای صفر بزرگ را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. برای مثال، کلمه "سلام" چندین ویژه دارد، مثل حرکت نور، عمل اجتماعی و کوتاه در طول مدت. ما از این ویژگی\u200cها به عنوان نقشه\u200cهای داخلی بین نمایش\u200cهای دیده\u200cای و متن استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا دلیل\u200cهایی در مورد یک عمل پیش غیب\u200cشده است. در مقابل کارهای زیادی پیش از این که دسترسی به ویژه\u200cهای استاندارد طلا برای کلاس\u200cهای صفر شلیک می\u200cکند و اصلاً روی ویژه\u200cهای شیء تمرکز می\u200cکند، مدل ما به تنهایی یاد می\u200cگیرد که ویژه\u200cهای اقدام را از تعریف\u200cهای ویژه\u200cنامه\u200cها و واضح\u200cهای کلمه نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه ثابت می\u200cکند که ویژگی\u200cهای حرکتی که از زبان آزاد شده\u200cاند می\u200cتواند سیگنال پیش\u200cبینی برای پیش\u200cبینی از فعالیت\u200cهای غیب\u200cبینی صفر را پیش\u200cبینی کند.', 'sq': "In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs.  For example, the verb 'salute' has several properties, such as being a light movement, a social act, and short in duration.  We use these attributes as the internal mapping between visual and textual representations to reason about a previously unseen action.  Në kundërshtim me punën e mëparshme që merr akses ndaj atributeve standarde të artë për klasat zero-shot dhe përqëndrohet kryesisht në atributet e objektit, modeli ynë mëson unikisht të përfshijë atributet e veprimit nga përcaktimet e fjalorit dhe përfaqësimet e shpërndara të fjalëve. Experimental results confirm that action attributes inferred from language can provide a predictive signal for zero-shot prediction of previously unseen activities.", 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք զրոյական ակտիվության ճանաչման մեծ մակարդակի միջոցով գործողության բայերի տեսողական և լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունները մոդելավորելով: For example, the verb 'salute' has several properties, such as being a light movement, a social act, and short in duration.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք այս առանձնահատկությունները որպես ներքին քարտեզագրություն տեսողական և տեքստալ ներկայացումների միջև, որպեսզի մտածենք նախկինում անտեսված գործողության մասին: Ի հակադրություն նախորդ շատ աշխատանքների, որոնք ենթադրում են ոսկու ստանդարտ առանձնահատկությունների հասանելիությունը զրո նկարների դասերի համար և կենտրոնանում են հիմնականում օբյեկտի առանձնահատկությունների վրա, մեր մոդելը միանգամայն սովորում է հանել գործողության առանձնահատ Փորձարկվող արդյունքները հաստատում են, որ լեզվից եզրակացած գործողության առանձնահատկությունները կարող են առաջացնել կանխատեսող ազդանշան նախկինում անտեսված գործողությունների զրոյի կանխատեսման համար:", 'bg': 'В тази статия изследваме широкомащабното разпознаване на активност с нулев изстрел чрез моделиране на визуалните и лингвистичните атрибути на глаголите за действие. Например глаголът има няколко свойства, като например леко движение, социален акт и кратка продължителност. Използваме тези атрибути като вътрешно картографиране между визуални и текстови изображения, за да разсъждаваме за едно досега невидимо действие. За разлика от много предишни работи, които предполагат достъп до атрибути от златен стандарт за нулеви класове и се фокусират предимно върху обектните атрибути, нашият модел уникално се научава да извежда атрибути на действие от дефинициите на речниците и разпространените думи. Експерименталните резултати потвърждават, че атрибутите на действие, извлечени от езика, могат да предоставят предсказуем сигнал за нулево прогнозиране на невиждани преди това дейности.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ትልቁ ቁመት የ0-ነጥብ ተግባር የሚያውቀውን የራእይ እና የቋንቋዊ ምሳሌዎችን በመግለጽ እናመርመራለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ ‘ሰላምታ’ የሚባለው ቃላት ብዙዎች የቅርብ መንቀሳቀስ፣ ማኅበራዊ ድርጊት፣ በጊዜው ጥቂት ነው፡፡ We use these attributes as the internal mapping between visual and textual representations to reason about a previously unseen action.  በክፍለ አካባቢ ክፍል ላይ የወርቅ የአካባቢ ምርጫዎችን ለመግኘት የሚችል የአካባቢ ምርጫዎችን ለመግኘት የሚችል የፊተኛውን ሥራ በተለየ፣ ሞዴሌያችን በአርንጀራዊ ግንኙነት እና ቃላትን ለመከላከል እና ለመከላከል ትክክለኛዎችን ማርካል፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች ከቋንቋ የተነሳ የሥርዓት ምርጫዎች አስቀድሞ ያልታወቀው ተግባሮች ለ0-shot ትንቢት እንዲሰጥ የሚችል ምስል እንዲያረጋግጣል፡፡', 'da': "I denne artikel undersøger vi genkendelse af aktiviteter i stor skala ved at modellere de visuelle og sproglige egenskaber af aktionsverber. For eksempel har udsagnsordet 'honnør' flere egenskaber, såsom at være en let bevægelse, en social handling og kort varighed. Vi bruger disse attributter som den interne kortlægning mellem visuelle og tekstlige repræsentationer til at tænke over en tidligere uset handling. I modsætning til meget tidligere arbejde, der forudsætter adgang til gold standard attributter for nul-shot klasser og fokuserer primært på objektattributter, lærer vores model entydigt at udlede handlingsattributter fra ordbogsdefinitioner og distribuerede ordrepræsentationer. Eksperimentelle resultater bekræfter, at handlingsattributter udledt af sprog kan give et forudsigende signal til nulskudsforudsigelse af tidligere usete aktiviteter.", 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিশাল স্কেল শুটের কার্যক্রমের স্বীকৃতি অনুসন্ধান করি কাজের দৃশ্য এবং ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী কার্যকলাপের For example, the verb 'salute' has several properties, such as being a light movement, a social act, and short in duration.  দৃশ্য এবং টেক্সচুয়াল প্রতিনিধিদের মধ্যে ভিতরের মানচিত্র হিসেবে আমরা এই বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করি আগের অদৃশ্য কাজে অনেক পূর্বের কাজের বিপরীতে যা শূন্য শ্রেণীর জন্য সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রবেশ করে এবং প্রধান বস্তুর বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান কর পরীক্ষার ফলাফল নিশ্চিত করেছে যে ভাষা থেকে আক্রান্ত কার্যক্রমের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য পূর্বে অদৃশ্য কার্যক্রমের", 'az': "Bu kağızda, biz böyük ölçüdə sıfır-vuruş fəaliyyətini təsdiqləyici olaraq, eyni verblərin görsel və dil özelliklərini modelleyib. Misal olaraq, verb 'salam' üçün bir neçə xüsusiyyət vardır, çünki ışıq hərəkəti, sosyal hərəkəti və uzunluğunda qısa. Biz bu xüsusiyyətləri əvvəl görmədiyimiz eylemlər haqqında səbəb olaraq görsel və tekst göstəricilərin arasındakı iç xəritə olaraq istifadə edirik. Əvvəlki işlərə baxmayaraq, sıfır-vuruş sınıflarının altın standart xüsusiyyətlərinə erişiklik almaq və ilk dəfə objek xüsusiyyətlərinə fokus edilmək üçün, modellərimiz sözlük tanımlarının və dağıtılan sözlərin təsirlərindən eyni təsirlərini azaltmaq öyrənir. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçları dildən təhrif edilmiş eyni tərzlərinin əvvəlcə görmədikləri fəaliyyətlərin 0-shot təcrübəsinin öndənməsi üçün bir sinyal olaraq təsdiqlənir.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime tegevusõnade visuaalsete ja keeleliste atribuutide modelleerimise abil laiaulatuslikku null-shot aktiivsuse tuvastamist. Näiteks on tegusõnal "tervitada" mitmeid omadusi, näiteks kerge liikumine, sotsiaalne tegu ja lühikese kestusega. Me kasutame neid atribuute visuaalse ja tekstilise esituse sisemise kaardistamisena, et mõelda varem nähtamatu tegevuse üle. Erinevalt paljudest varasematest töödest, mis eeldavad juurdepääsu kuldstandardi atribuutidele null-shot klassidele ja keskenduvad peamiselt objekti atribuutidele, õpib meie mudel unikaalselt tegevusatribuute järeldamist sõnaraamatute definitsioonidest ja hajutatud sõnade esitustest. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused kinnitavad, et keelest järeldatud toiminguatribuudid võivad anda prognoositava signaali eelnevalt nähtamatute tegevuste nullpildi ennustamiseks.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku zkoumáme rozsáhlé rozpoznávání aktivit nulového výstřelu modelováním vizuálních a jazykových atributů akčních slovesů. Například sloveso "salute" má několik vlastností, jako je lehký pohyb, sociální akt a krátké trvání. Tyto atributy používáme jako interní mapování mezi vizuálními a textovými reprezentacemi, abychom uvažovali o dříve neviděné akci. Na rozdíl od mnoha předchozích prací, které předpokládají přístup ke zlatým standardním atributům pro nulové třídy a zaměřují se primárně na atributy objektů, se náš model jedinečně učí odvozovat akční atributy ze slovníkových definicí a distribuovaných reprezentací slov. Experimentální výsledky potvrzují, že akční atributy odvozené z jazyka mohou poskytnout prediktivní signál pro nulovou predikci dříve neviděných aktivit.', 'bs': "U ovom papiru istražujemo prepoznavanje velike skale nulotne aktivnosti modeliranjem vizuelnih i jezičkih atributa akcijskih verba. Na primjer, verb 'pozdrav' ima nekoliko svojstava, kao što je lagano kretanje, društveni čin i kratko u trajanju. Koristimo te atribute kao unutrašnju mapiranje između vizuelnih i tekstualnih predstavljanja da razumijemo o prethodno nevidljivim akcijama. Za suprotnost mnogim prethodnim radom koji preduzima pristup zlatnim standardnim atributima za klase nule pucnjave i fokusira se prvenstveno na atribute objekata, naš model se jedinstveno uči da inferira akcijske atribute iz definicija rečnika i raspodjele predstave riječi. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju da akcijska atributa infekcije iz jezika mogu pružiti predviđavajući signal za predviđanje nula pogodaka prethodno nevidljivih aktivnosti.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme laajamittaista nolla-laukauksen aktiivisuuden tunnistusta mallintamalla toimintaverbien visuaalisia ja kielellisiä attribuutteja. Esimerkiksi verbillä tervehdys on useita ominaisuuksia, kuten kevyt liike, sosiaalinen teko ja lyhyt kesto. Käytämme näitä attribuutteja visuaalisten ja tekstuaalisten esitysten sisäisenä kartoituksena järkeistääksemme aiemmin näkemätöntä toimintaa. Toisin kuin monet aikaisemmat työt, joissa oletetaan pääsyn kultaisiin standardiattribuutteihin nollahaun luokissa ja keskitytään ensisijaisesti objektiattribuutteihin, mallimme oppii yksilöllisesti päättelemään toimintaattribuutteja sanakirjan määritelmistä ja hajautetuista sanaesityksistä. Kokeelliset tulokset vahvistavat, että kielestä johdetut toimintaattribuutit voivat antaa ennakoivan signaalin aiemmin näkemättömien toimintojen nollalaukauksen ennustamiseen.', 'ca': "In this paper, we investigate large-scale zero-shot activity recognition by modeling the visual and linguistic attributes of action verbs.  For example, the verb 'salute' has several properties, such as being a light movement, a social act, and short in duration.  Utilitzem aquests atributs com el mapatge intern entre representacions visuals i textuals per explicar una acció anteriorment invisible. In contrast to much prior work that assumes access to gold standard attributes for zero-shot classes and focuses primarily on object attributes, our model uniquely learns to infer action attributes from dictionary definitions and distributed word representations.  Els resultats experimentals confirmen que els atributs d'acció inferits del llenguatge poden proporcionar una senyal preditiva per a predir-se una fotografia zero d'activitats previament invisibles.", 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo obsežno prepoznavanje ničelne aktivnosti z modeliranjem vizualnih in jezikovnih atributov akcijskih glagolov. Na primer, glagol "pozdrav" ima več lastnosti, kot so lahko gibanje, družbeno dejanje in kratko trajanje. Te atribute uporabljamo kot notranje mapiranje med vizualnimi in besedilnimi reprezentacijami za razumevanje prej nevidnega dejanja. V nasprotju z mnogimi prejšnjimi deli, ki predvidevajo dostop do atributov zlatega standarda za razrede brez strela in se osredotočajo predvsem na atribute objekta, se naš model enolično nauči sklepati atribute dejanja iz definicij slovarja in porazdeljenih besednih predstavitev. Eksperimentalni rezultati potrjujejo, da lahko atributi akcije, sklenjeni iz jezika, zagotovijo napovedni signal za napovedovanje ničelnega strela predhodno nevidnih aktivnosti.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilih iki, kita yatêngguna aksi 0-pas kuwi nggawe dadi nggawe Atributi Visual karo nggambar barang "action verbs" Sampeyan nganggep, verb \'Ngubah\' lan akèh wong liyane, kaya nguasah langgar-langgar, aksi sothik lan ngawehi. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink singular Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྣམས་ལ་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐུད་ཆེན་ དཔེར་ན། བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་ 'བཀྲམ་སྤྲོ་སྣང'་ལ་ངོ་བོ་ཁ་ཤས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། འོད་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་ཀྱང་ ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་དག་སྔོན་མ་ཤེས་པའི་བྱ གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་དང་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་འདྲ་བ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལ་མཐོང་བ་དང་མི་དཔྱད་རྣམས་གཅིག་ སྐད་ཡིག་ནས་འགྱུར་བ་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྔོན་ལྟ་ཀློག་བྱེད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག", 'ha': "Ina cikin wannan takardan, Munã tambayi kunyar aikin da aka yi nufi-sifanci cikin babban takarda, ko kuma Muke motsar da misalin masu gani da linguistic cikin aikin aiki. Misali, maganar 'salãmi' yana da wasu properties kamar misãlan wata harama mai haske, aikin jamii da ɗan daɗi. We use these attributes as the internal mapping between visual and textual representations to reason about a previously unseen action.  Tsamman aiki mai yawa da ya sami amfani da matsayin tsari na nau'in zĩnãriya wa fassarar-sifiri na sifilati, kuma ya yi fokus a kan ƙanshi na abun, misalinmu yana sanar da musamman su ƙari masu aikin aiki daga fassarar takarda na dictionary kuma ya raba masu wakin magana. Matarin jarrabai sun gaskata cewa halin aikin da aka faɗa daga harshen, za'a iya bãyar da wata alama mai bastarwa wa'adi na sifo-shot da ke gabanin aikin da ba'a sani ba.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים זיהוי פעילות אפס בקנה מידה גדולה על ידי דוגמא של תכונות ויזואליות ולשוליות של פעולות אוברים. לדוגמה, למילה "שלום" יש כמה תכונות, כמו להיות תנועה קלה, מעשה חברתי, וקצר במשך זמן. אנו משתמשים בתכונות האלה כמפה פנימית בין מייצגות ויזואליות והטקסטיות כדי להסביר על פעולה בלתי נראית קודם לכן. בניגוד לעבודה רבה קודמת שמניחה גישה לכישורים סטנדרטיים זהב לשיעורים של צילומים אפס ומוקדמת בעיקר בכישורים של אובייקטים, המודל שלנו לומד היחיד להוציא תכונות פעולה מגדרות מילון ומפיצות מילים מפורסמות. תוצאות ניסיוניות מאשרות שהתכונות פעולה המתוצאות מהשפה יכולות לספק אות צפוי לציור אפס של פעילות בלתי נראות קודם לכן.'}
{'en': 'Deriving continous grounded meaning representations from referentially structured multimodal contexts', 'ar': 'اشتقاق تمثيلات المعنى المستمرة على أساس من سياقات متعددة الوسائط منظمة بشكل مرجعي', 'fr': 'Dériver des représentations de sens ancrées continues à partir de contextes multimodaux structurés référentiels', 'es': 'Derivación de representaciones de significado fundamentadas continuas a partir de contextos multimodales estructurados referencialmente', 'pt': 'Derivando representações de significado fundamentadas contínuas de contextos multimodais estruturados referencialmente', 'ja': '参照的に構造化されたマルチモーダルコンテキストから連続的に接地された意味表現を導き出す', 'zh': '参以结构之多模态上下文使生连接地之义', 'hi': 'संदर्भित संरचित बहुआयामी संदर्भों से निरंतर आधारित अर्थ निरूपण व्युत्पन्न करना', 'ru': 'Получение непрерывных представлений о смысловом значении из мультимодальных контекстов с референтной структурой', 'ga': 'Léirithe brí bonnbhunaithe leanúnacha a dhíorthú ó chomhthéacsanna ilmhódacha struchtúrtha tagartha', 'ka': 'მიიღება კონტენონიური მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვრებები რეფერენციურად სტრუქტურული მლიტმოდეალური კონტექსტიდან', 'el': 'Παράγοντας συνεχείς θεμελιωμένες αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών από αναφερτικά δομημένα πολυμορφικά πλαίσια', 'hu': 'Folyamatosan megalapozott jelentésreformációk származtatása referenciálisan strukturált multimodális kontextusokból', 'it': 'Derivare rappresentazioni continue di significato fondate da contesti multimodali strutturati referenzialmente', 'kk': 'Континолық негізгі мәліметтерді референциялық құрылған көпModal контекстерден көрсету', 'mk': 'Отворање континуирани засновани значења од референцијално структурирани мултимодилни контексти', 'ms': 'Menyirikan perwakilan makna berdasarkan berterusan dari konteks multimodal struktur referensional', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പല്ലിമോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Id-derivazzjoni ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet kontinwi ta’ tifsira bbażata fuq it-tifsira minn kuntesti multimodali strutturati b’mod referenzjali', 'no': 'Hentar kontinuær grunnleggjande betyr representasjonar frå referanselt strukturerte multimodal kontekstar', 'lt': 'Deriving continous grounded meaning representations from referentially structured multimodal contexts', 'pl': 'Wywodzenie ciągłych uziemionych reprezentacji znaczenia z referencyjnie ustrukturyzowanych kontekstów multimodalnych', 'ro': 'Derularea reprezentărilor de semnificații continuu întemeiate din contexte multimodale structurate referențial', 'mn': 'Эдгээр хүмүүс бүтээсэн олон моделийн нөхцөл байдлаас', 'so': 'Kuwaas waxaa loola jeedaa noocyo badan', 'sv': 'Att härleda sammanhängande grundade betydelserepresentationer från referensstrukturerade multimodala sammanhang', 'ta': 'குறிப்பாக உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பல்முறைகளிலிருந்து பிரதிநிதிகள் இருந்து', 'ur': 'منصفات کے مطابق منصفات کے مطابق منصفات کے مطابق منصفات کے مطابق', 'sr': 'Predstavljanje kontinoznih osnovanih značaja iz referencijski strukturiranih multimodalnih konteksta', 'si': 'Dering contineus underlined means repressions from references Strukturated Multi-Model Contexts', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hậu thuẫn liên tục có nghĩa là biểu hiện từ các liên quan đa phương khác', 'bg': 'Извличане на постоянни обосновани значения от референтно структурирани мултимодални контексти', 'hr': 'Dobivanje kontinualnog temeljnog značenja predstavljanja iz referencijski strukturiranih multimodalnih konteksta', 'da': 'Aflede kontinuerlige begrundede meningsrepræsentationer fra referencestrukturerede multimodale sammenhænge', 'nl': 'Voortdurende geaarde betekenisrepresentaties afleiden uit referentieel gestructureerde multimodale contexten', 'de': 'Ableitung fortlaufend fundierter BedeutungsreprĂ¤sentationen aus referenziell strukturierten multimodalen Kontexten', 'id': 'Deriving continous grounded meaning representations from referentially structured multimodal contexts', 'fa': 'دریافت معنی\u200cهای پایه\u200cای از موقعیت\u200cهای بسیاری ساخته شده', 'af': 'Ontvaar gegrond betekenis voorstellings van verwysing struktureerde multimodale kontekste', 'sq': 'Deriving continous grounded meaning representations from referentially structured multimodal contexts', 'ko': '지칭 구조의 다중모드적 언어 환경에서 연속적인 근거 있는 의미 표징을 추출하다', 'sw': 'Kutokana na maeneo yaliyosababishwa na maana yanayomaanisha wakiwakilisha kutoka katika miradi mbalimbali zilizotengenezwa', 'tr': 'Referans struktüredilen multimodal contextlerden gelen içerikli düşünjeler', 'hy': 'Անընդհատ հիմնված նշանակության ներկայացումները վերաբերյալ կառուցված բազմամոդալ կոնտեքստներից', 'az': '칂칲nki m칲xt톛lif m칲xt톛lif m칲xt톛lif m칲xt톛lif m톛s톛l톛l톛rd톛n m칲톛yy톛n edil톛n m칬vzular', 'am': 'የግንኙነት አካባቢ መሠረት ማድረግ የተመሳሳይ ብዙኃን ጥያቄዎች', 'cs': 'Odvození kontinuálních uzemněných reprezentací významů z referenčně strukturovaných multimodálních kontextů', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধিত্বের মানে গণতান্ত্রিক ভিত্তিক ক্ষেত্র থেকে প্রতিনিধিত্ব', 'fi': 'Jatkuvien pohjautuvien merkitysesitysten johtaminen viiterakenteisista multimodaalisista konteksteista', 'bs': 'Dobivanje kontinualnog osnovanog značenja predstavljanja iz referencijski strukturiranih multimodalnih konteksta', 'et': 'PĂŒsivate pĂ”hjendatud tĂ€hendusrepresentatsioonide tuletamine viitestruktureeritud multimodaalsetest kontekstidest', 'ca': 'Derint representacions de sentit continuament fundamentats de contextes multimodals estructurats referencialment', 'sk': 'Izpeljanje stalnih utemeljenih pomenskih predstavitev iz referenčno strukturiranih multimodalnih kontekstov', 'he': 'הוצאת מייצגים משמעותיים ממוקמים רבים מובנים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཕན་ཚུན་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་།', 'jv': 'text'}
{'en': 'Corpora of referring expressions paired with their visual referents are a good source for learning word meanings directly grounded in visual representations. Here, we explore additional ways of extracting from them word representations linked to multi-modal context : through expressions that refer to the same object, and through expressions that refer to different objects in the same scene. We show that continuous meaning representations derived from these contexts capture complementary aspects of similarity,, even if not outperforming textual embeddings trained on very large amounts of raw text when tested on standard similarity benchmarks. We propose a new task for evaluating grounded meaning representationsdetection of potentially co-referential phrasesand show that it requires precise denotational representations of attribute meanings, which our method provides.', 'ar': 'تعد مجموعة التعبيرات المرجعية المقترنة بمراجعها المرئية مصدرًا جيدًا لتعلم معاني الكلمات التي تستند مباشرة إلى التمثيلات المرئية. هنا ، نستكشف طرقًا إضافية لاستخراج تمثيلات الكلمات المرتبطة بسياق متعدد الوسائط: من خلال التعبيرات التي تشير إلى نفس الكائن ، ومن خلال التعبيرات التي تشير إلى كائنات مختلفة في نفس المشهد. نظهر أن تمثيلات المعنى المستمرة المشتقة من هذه السياقات تلتقط الجوانب التكميلية للتشابه ، حتى لو لم تتفوق في الأداء على التضمينات النصية المدربة على كميات كبيرة جدًا من النص الخام عند اختبارها وفقًا لمعايير التشابه القياسية. نقترح مهمة جديدة لتقييم تمثيلات المعنى المتأصلة - اكتشاف العبارات ذات المرجعية المشتركة المحتملة - ونوضح أنها تتطلب تمثيلات تعريفية دقيقة لمعاني السمة ، والتي توفرها طريقتنا.', 'fr': "Les corpus d'expressions référentes associés à leurs référents visuels sont une bonne source pour apprendre la signification des mots directement ancrée dans des représentations visuelles. Nous explorons ici d'autres moyens d'en extraire des représentations de mots liées à un contexte multimodal\xa0: par le biais d'expressions qui font référence au même objet et par des expressions qui font référence à différents objets dans la même scène. Nous montrons que les représentations de sens continues dérivées de ces contextes capturent des aspects complémentaires de similitude, même si elles ne surpassent pas les intégrations textuelles formées sur de très grandes quantités de texte brut lorsqu'elles sont testées sur des tests de similarité standard. Nous proposons une nouvelle tâche d'évaluation des représentations de signification fondées (détection de phrases potentiellement coréférentielles) et montrons qu'elle nécessite des représentations dénotationnelles précises des significations des attributs, ce que notre méthode fournit.", 'es': 'Los corpus de expresiones de referencia junto con sus referentes visuales son una buena fuente para aprender significados de palabras directamente basados en representaciones visuales. Aquí, exploramos formas adicionales de extraer de ellas representaciones de palabras vinculadas al contexto multimodal: a través de expresiones que hacen referencia al mismo objeto y a través de expresiones que hacen referencia a diferentes objetos en la misma escena. Demostramos que las representaciones de significado continuas derivadas de estos contextos capturan aspectos complementarios de similitud, incluso si no superan las incrustaciones textuales entrenadas en cantidades muy grandes de texto sin procesar cuando se prueban en puntos de referencia de similitud estándar. Proponemos una nueva tarea para evaluar las representaciones de significado fundamentadas (detección de frases potencialmente correferenciales) y demostrar que requiere representaciones denotacionales precisas de los significados de los atributos, que nuestro método proporciona.', 'pt': 'Corpora de expressões referenciais emparelhadas com seus referentes visuais são uma boa fonte para aprender significados de palavras diretamente fundamentados em representações visuais. Aqui, exploramos formas adicionais de extrair deles representações de palavras vinculadas ao contexto multimodal: por meio de expressões que se referem ao mesmo objeto e por meio de expressões que se referem a diferentes objetos na mesma cena. Mostramos que representações de significado contínuas derivadas desses contextos capturam aspectos complementares de similaridade, mesmo que não superem embeddings textuais treinados em grandes quantidades de texto bruto quando testados em benchmarks de similaridade padrão. Propomos uma nova tarefa para avaliar representações de significado fundamentadas – detecção de frases potencialmente co-referenciais – e mostramos que ela requer representações denotacionais precisas de significados de atributos, que nosso método fornece.', 'ja': '視覚的な参照と対になった参照表現のコーポラは、視覚的な表現に直接基づいて単語の意味を学習するための良いソースです。ここでは、マルチモーダルコンテキストにリンクされた単語表現を抽出する追加の方法を探ります。同じオブジェクトを参照する表現、同じシーン内の異なるオブジェクトを参照する表現です。これらの文脈から導き出された連続的な意味表現は、たとえ標準的な類似性ベンチマークでテストされたときに非常に大量の生テキストでトレーニングされたテキスト埋め込みを上回っていなくても、類似性の相補的な側面を捉えていることを示している。私たちは、接地された意味表現を評価するための新しいタスクを提案します-潜在的に共参照のフレーズの検出-そしてそれが属性意味の正確な表現を必要とすることを示し、それは私たちの方法が提供します。', 'zh': '指涉表达式之语料库,与其视涉词配对学直视也单词义之所由出也。 于是探其多模态上下文之单词,以引同表达式,与同场之表达式。 臣等以此上下文连义获相似性互补,虽当准相似性而试之,亦未尝优于大始文本也。 臣等条上新意 - 检潜同引短语 - 并明属性之精指,此吾法之供也。', 'hi': 'उनके दृश्य दिग्दर्शनों के साथ युग्मित अभिव्यक्तियों को संदर्भित करने का निगम सीधे दृश्य प्रतिनिधित्व में आधारित शब्द अर्थों को सीखने के लिए एक अच्छा स्रोत है। यहां, हम उनसे निकालने के अतिरिक्त तरीकों का पता लगाते हैं बहु-मोडल संदर्भ से जुड़े शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व: अभिव्यक्तियों के माध्यम से जो एक ही वस्तु को संदर्भित करते हैं, और अभिव्यक्तियों के माध्यम से जो एक ही दृश्य में विभिन्न वस्तुओं को संदर्भित करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि इन संदर्भों से व्युत्पन्न निरंतर अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व समानता के पूरक पहलुओं पर कब्जा करते हैं, भले ही मानक समानता बेंचमार्क पर परीक्षण किए जाने पर बहुत बड़ी मात्रा में कच्चे पाठ पर प्रशिक्षित पाठ्य एम्बेडिंग को मात न दें। हम ग्राउंडेड अर्थ अभ्यावेदन का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक नया कार्य प्रस्तावित करते हैं - संभावित रूप से सह-संदर्भित वाक्यांशों का पता लगाना - और दिखाते हैं कि इसके लिए विशेषता अर्थों के सटीक डिनोटेशनल प्रतिनिधित्व की आवश्यकता होती है, जो हमारी विधि प्रदान करती है।', 'ru': 'Корпуса ссылочных выражений в паре с их визуальными референтами являются хорошим источником для изучения значений слов, непосредственно основанных на визуальных представлениях. Здесь мы исследуем дополнительные способы извлечения из них словопрезентаций, связанных с мультимодальным контекстом: через выражения, которые относятся к одному и тому же объекту, и через выражения, которые относятся к разным объектам в одной и той же сцене. Мы показываем, что непрерывные смысловые представления, полученные из этих контекстов, охватывают взаимодополняющие аспекты сходства, даже если они не превосходят текстовые вложения, обученные на очень больших количествах необработанного текста при тестировании на стандартных критериях сходства. Предлагаем новую задачу оценки обоснованных смысловых представлений - обнаружение потенциально кореференциальных фраз - и показываем, что она требует точных денотационных представлений атрибутивных значений, которые обеспечивает наш метод.', 'ga': "Foinse mhaith chun bríonna focal a fhoghlaim atá bunaithe go díreach ar léiriúcháin amhairc is ea corpora na nathanna tagartha atá in éineacht lena dtagairtí amhairc. Anseo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar bhealaí breise chun léirithe focal atá nasctha le comhthéacs ilmhódach a bhaint astu: trí nathanna a thagraíonn don réad céanna, agus trí nathanna a thagraíonn do réada éagsúla sa radharc céanna. Léirímid go mbaineann léirithe brí leanúnacha a thagann ó na comhthéacsanna seo le gnéithe comhlántacha na cosúlachta, , fiú mura n-éiríonn leo níos fearr ná leabú téacsanna atá oilte ar mhéideanna an-mhóra de théacs amh nuair a dhéantar tástáil orthu ar thagarmharcanna caighdeánacha cosúlachta. Molaimid tasc nua chun léiriúcháin brí bunaithe a mheas - frásaí a d'fhéadfadh a bheith comhthagartha a bhrath - agus taispeánann muid go dteastaíonn léiriú sainchomhartha beachta ar bríonna tréithe, a sholáthraíonn ár modh.", 'el': 'Σώμα αναφερθέντων εκφράσεων σε συνδυασμό με τους οπτικούς παραπομπές τους είναι μια καλή πηγή για την εκμάθηση εννοιών λέξεων που βασίζονται άμεσα σε οπτικές αναπαραστάσεις. Εδώ, εξερευνούμε πρόσθετους τρόπους εξαγωγής από αυτές αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων που συνδέονται με πολυμορφικό πλαίσιο: μέσω εκφράσεων που αναφέρονται στο ίδιο αντικείμενο, και μέσω εκφράσεων που αναφέρονται σε διαφορετικά αντικείμενα στην ίδια σκηνή. Δείχνουμε ότι οι συνεχείς αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών που προέρχονται από αυτά τα πλαίσια συλλαμβάνουν συμπληρωματικές πτυχές της ομοιότητας, ακόμα και αν δεν ξεπερνούν τις ενσωμάτωση κειμένου που εκπαιδεύονται σε πολύ μεγάλες ποσότητες ακατέργαστου κειμένου όταν δοκιμάζονται σε τυποποιημένα κριτήρια αναφοράς ομοιότητας. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο έργο για την αξιολόγηση των θεμελιωμένων συμβολικών αναπαραστάσεων – ανίχνευση δυνητικά συν-αναφορητικών φράσεων – και δείχνουμε ότι απαιτεί ακριβείς ονομαστικές αναπαραστάσεις των εννοιών χαρακτηριστικών, τις οποίες παρέχει η μέθοδος μας.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი ვიზუალური რეფერენტებით გადასწავლა სიტყვების სანიშვნელობის კოპორა არის საკმაოდ გამოსახულებელი გამოსახულებელი სიტყვების სანიშვნელობისთვის. აქ, ჩვენ შევხედავთ დამატებული გზები, რომლებიც მათ განსხვავებული სიტყვების გამოსახულებები, რომლებიც მრავალ მოდეალური კონტექსტისთვის დაკავშირებულია: გამოსახულებებით, რომლებიც ერთი ობიექ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს კონტექსტიდან გამოიყენებული რესპერაციები კომპლენტური აპექტირებულობის აპექტირებულებს, თუ არც ტექსტური შებრუნებები, რომლებიც ძალიან დიდი მნიშვნელობით წყალ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი საქმე, რომელიც ატრიბუტის ნიშნავების განსაზღვრება და განსაზღვრება პოტენციალური სტრაზების განსაზღვრება და გამოჩვენება, რომ ის მოჭირდება ატრიბუტის ნიშნავების precise denotational', 'kk': 'Көрініс сілтемелерімен біріктірілген сөздердің корпорасы - көрініс сілтемелерінде тәртіпке негізделген сөздерді оқыту үшін жақсы көзі. Мұнда, біз олардан бірнеше модалдық контекстпен сілтейтін сөздерді тарқату үшін қосымша тәсілдерді зерттейміз: бір нысанға сілтейтін өрнектермен, бір сәйкесті нысандарға сілтейтін өрнектермен. Біз бұл контексттерден келесі мәліметтер ұқсас белгілерін қосымша бөліктердің қасиеттерін көрсетеді. Стандарттық ұқсас белгілерінде текстуалды ендірудің қасиеттері өте үлкен мәтіннің мөлшерлеріне ұқсас етілмеген Біз негізгі мәліметті бағалау үшін жаңа тапсырманы таңдаймыз. Пациентлік сәйкестік сөздерді таңдау үшін, және оның атрибуттық мәліметтердің дұрыс белгілеу керектігін көрсетеді.', 'hu': 'A vizuális referenciáikkal párosított hivatkozási kifejezések korpora jó forrás a vizuális reprezentációkban közvetlenül alapuló szójelentések tanulására. Itt további módokat vizsgálunk ki belőlük multimodális kontextushoz kapcsolódó szóreprezentációk kinyerésére: ugyanarra az objektumra utaló kifejezéseken keresztül, és ugyanazon jelenet különböző objektumaira utaló kifejezéseken keresztül. Megmutatjuk, hogy az ezekből a kontextusokból származó folyamatos jelentésreformációk a hasonlóság kiegészítő aspektusait rögzítik, még akkor is, ha nem is teljesítenek túl nagy mennyiségű nyers szövegre képzett szövegbeágyazásokat, amikor standard hasonlósági referenciaértékeken tesztelték. Új feladatot javaslunk a megalapozott jelentések ábrázolásának értékelésére – potenciálisan társreferenciális kifejezések felismerésére –, és megmutatjuk, hogy ez az attribútumjelentések pontos denotációs ábrázolására van szükség, amelyet módszerünk biztosít.', 'lt': 'Referencinių išraiškų korpora, susieta su jų vizualiniais referentais, yra geras šaltinis mokymuisi žodžių reikšmių, tiesiogiai pagrįstų vizualiniais atvaizdais. Čia mes tiriame papildomus būdus iš jų ištraukti žodžių atstovavimus, susijusius su daugiarūšiu kontekstu: išraiškais, kurie susiję su tuo pačiu objektu, ir išraiškais, kurie susiję su skirtingais objektais toje pačioje scenoje. Mes rodome, kad iš šių aplinkybių gautos nuolatinės reikšmės nuorodos apima papildomus panašumo aspektus, net jei jie nėra didesni nei tekstiniai įterpimai, apmokyti labai dideliais žaliavinio teksto kiekiais, kai bandomi pagal standartinius panašumo lyginamuosius rodiklius. Siūlome naują užduotį įvertinti pagrįstą reikšmę ir galimai koreferencinių frazių nustatymą ir parodyti, kad jai reikia tikslių požymių reikšmių denotacinių atspaudų, kaip numatyta mūsų metode.', 'it': 'Corpora di espressioni di riferimento abbinate ai loro referenti visivi sono una buona fonte per imparare i significati delle parole direttamente radicati nelle rappresentazioni visive. Qui esploriamo ulteriori modi per estrarre da esse rappresentazioni di parole legate al contesto multimodale: attraverso espressioni che si riferiscono allo stesso oggetto, e attraverso espressioni che si riferiscono a oggetti diversi nella stessa scena. Mostriamo che le rappresentazioni continue di significato derivate da questi contesti catturano aspetti complementari di somiglianza, anche se non superano le incorporazioni testuali addestrate su grandi quantità di testo grezzo quando testate su benchmark di somiglianza standard. Proponiamo un nuovo compito per valutare le rappresentazioni di significato a terra-rilevazione di frasi potenzialmente co-referenziali-e mostrare che richiede rappresentazioni denotazionali precise dei significati degli attributi, che il nostro metodo fornisce.', 'mt': 'Il-korpora ta’ espressjonijiet ta’ referenza flimkien mar-referenti viżivi tagħhom hija sors tajjeb għat-tagħlim ta’ tifsiriet ta’ kliem ibbażati direttament fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet viżivi. Hawnhekk, aħna nistudjaw modi addizzjonali kif nistruttaw minnhom rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem marbuta mal-kuntest multimodali: permezz ta’ espressjonijiet li jirreferu għall-istess oġġett, u permezz ta’ espressjonijiet li jirreferu għal oġġetti differenti fl-istess xena. Aħna nuru li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ tifsira kontinwa derivati minn dawn il-kuntesti jaqbdu aspetti kumplimentari ta’ similarità, anki jekk ma jkunux qed iwettqu inkorporazzjonijiet testwali mħarrġa fuq ammonti kbar ħafna ta’ test mhux ipproċessat meta ttestjati fuq punti ta’ riferiment standard ta’ similarità. Aħna nipproponu kompitu ġdid għall-evalwazzjoni tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ tifsira bbażata u l-individwazzjoni ta’ frażijiet potenzjalment koreferenzjali-u nuru li jeħtieġ rappreżentazzjonijiet denotazzjonali preċiżi ta’ tifsiriet ta’ attributi, li l-metodu tagħna jipprovdi.', 'mn': 'Дүрслэлийн тэмдэглэлтэй холбогдсон илэрхийллүүдийн бие маань дүрслэлийн илэрхийллүүдийг шууд харагдаж суралцах нь сайн эх үүсвэр юм. Энд бид тэднээс олон модал орчинд холбогдсон үгний илтгэлээр гаргах нэмэлт арга замыг судалж байна: ижил объект гэх илтгэлээр, мөн адил хувилбарт өөр объект гэх илтгэлээр илтгэлээр. Бид эдгээр нөхцөл байдлаас гарсан үргэлжлүүлэх утгыг харуулж байна. Стандарттай ижил хэмжээсүүд дээр шалгаж байхад мөн хэмжээний хэмжээний мөн хэмжээний мөн хэмжээний мөн хэмжээний хэмжээний мөн хэмжээсүүд нь тэнцүү байд Бид үндсэн утгатай утгыг үнэлэх шинэ ажиллагааг санал болгож, магадгүй нийлүүлэлтийн хэлбэрүүдийг олох боломжтой. Энэ нь бидний арга хэмжээний харилцааны тодорхой тодорхойлолт хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Corpora of referring expressions paired with their visual references are a good source for learning word meanings directly grounded in visual representations. Her utforskar vi fleire måtar å pakka ut frå dei ordrepresentasjonane lenke til fleire modal kontekst: gjennom uttrykk som refererer til det same objektet, og gjennom uttrykk som refererer til ulike objekt i det same scenen. Vi viser at kontinuerleg mening representasjonar utførte frå desse kontekstane får komplementære aspektar av likhet, sjølv om ikkje utfører tekstinnbyggingar trengte på svært stor mengdar råtekst når testa på standardvanlikningsbankar. Vi foreslår eit nytt oppgåve for å evaluera grunnleggjande betydning av representasjon-oppdaging av potensielt co-referensielle fraser og vise at det krev nøyaktige nøyaktige nøyaktige representasjonar av attributtbetydningar, som vår metode gjev.', 'ms': 'Korpora ungkapan rujukan sepasang dengan rujukan visual mereka adalah sumber yang baik untuk mempelajari makna perkataan secara langsung didasarkan dalam mewakili visual. Di sini, kita mengeksplorasi cara tambahan untuk mengekstrak daripada mereka perwakilan perkataan yang berkaitan dengan konteks multi modal: melalui ungkapan yang rujuk kepada objek yang sama, dan melalui ungkapan yang rujuk kepada objek yang berbeza dalam adegan yang sama. We show that continuous meaning representations derived from these contexts capture complementary aspects of similarity, even if not outperforming textual embeddings trained on very large amounts of raw text when tested on standard similarity benchmarks.  Kami cadangkan tugas baru untuk menilai perwakilan-pengesan makna berdasar bagi frasa yang berpotensi bersamaan-dan menunjukkan bahawa ia memerlukan perwakilan denotasi tepat makna atribut, yang kaedah kami menyediakan.', 'pl': 'Korpus odsyłających wyrażeń połączonych z ich wizualnymi referentami są dobrym źródłem do nauki znaczeń słowa bezpośrednio uziemionych w wizualnych reprezentacjach. Tutaj badamy dodatkowe sposoby wydobycia z nich reprezentacji słów powiązanych z kontekstem multimodalnym: poprzez wyrażenia odnoszące się do tego samego obiektu, oraz poprzez wyrażenia odnoszące się do różnych obiektów w tej samej scenie. Pokazujemy, że ciągłe reprezentacje znaczenia wywodzące się z tych kontekstów uwzględniają uzupełniające się aspekty podobieństwa, nawet jeśli nie przewyższają osadzeń tekstowych przeszkolonych na bardzo dużych ilościach surowego tekstu podczas testowania na standardowych wskaźnikach podobieństwa. Proponujemy nowe zadanie oceny uziemionych reprezentacji znaczeń – wykrywania potencjalnie współreferencyjnych fraz – i pokazujemy, że wymaga ona precyzyjnych denotacji znaczeń atrybutów, które dostarcza nasza metoda.', 'mk': 'Корпората на референтни изрази парирани со нивните визуелни референти се добар извор за учење на значење на зборовите директно основани на визуелни репрезентации. Овде, ние истражуваме дополнителни начини за извлекување од нив на зборови претставувања поврзани со мултимодален контекст: преку изрази кои се однесуваат на истиот објект, и преку изрази кои се однесуваат на различни објекти на истата сцена. Ние покажуваме дека континуираните претставувања на значење кои се извлечени од овие контексти заземаат комплементарни аспекти на сличноста, дури и ако не се надминуваат текстуалните вградувања тренирани на многу големи количини на суров текст кога се тестираат на стандардни споредби на сличноста. Предложуваме нова задача за проценка на основаните значења претставувања-детекција на потенцијално кореференцијални фрази и покажуваме дека бара прецизни денотациски претставувања на значења на атрибутите, кои нашиот метод ги обезбедува.', 'ro': 'Corpora expresiilor de referință asociate cu referenții lor vizuali sunt o sursă bună pentru învățarea semnificațiilor cuvintelor bazate direct pe reprezentări vizuale. Aici explorăm modalități suplimentare de extragere din ele a reprezentărilor de cuvinte legate de context multimodal: prin expresii care se referă la același obiect și prin expresii care se referă la diferite obiecte din aceeași scenă. Arătăm că reprezentările continue de semnificații derivate din aceste contexte capturează aspecte complementare ale similarității, chiar dacă nu depășesc încorporările textuale instruite pe cantități foarte mari de text brut atunci când sunt testate pe criterii standard de similaritate. Propunem o nouă sarcină pentru evaluarea reprezentărilor semnificației întemeiate - detectarea frazelor potențial co-referențiale - și arată că aceasta necesită reprezentări denotaționale precise ale semnificațiilor atributelor, pe care metoda noastră le oferă.', 'sr': 'Korpora predviđanja izraza povezanih sa njihovim vizualnim referentima je dobar izvor za učenje značenja riječi direktno osnovana na vizualnim predstavljanjima. Ovde istražujemo dodatne načine izvlačenja od njih riječi koje su povezane sa multimodalnim kontekstom: kroz izraze koje se odnose na isti objekt, i kroz izraze koje se odnose na različite objekte na istu scenu. Pokazujemo da neprestano značenje predstavljanja iz tih konteksta uključuju komplementne aspekte sličnosti, čak i ako ne nadmašuju tekstualne integracije obučene na veoma velikim količinama sirovog teksta kada se testiraju na standardnim sličnim kriterijama. Predlažemo novi zadatak za procjenu temeljnog značenja otkrivanja potencijalnih koreferencijskih fraza i pokazujemo da zahteva precizne denotacijske predstave značenja atributa, koje naš metod pruža.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നല്ല സ്രോതസ്സാണ്. കാഴ്ച പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നേരിട്ട് സ്ഥാപിക്കുന് ഇവിടെ നാം അവരുടെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു; പല-മോഡിയല്\u200d കെന്\u200dസ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറിനോ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഈ കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഒരുപോലെയുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളെ പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള അർത്ഥം പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മൾ ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലി പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ രീതിയി', 'so': 'Korporada ku qoran hadal lagu soo jeedo qofka aragtida la xiriira waa nooc wanaagsan oo lagu barto hadal macnaheedu si toos ah looga dhigay aragtida. Halkan, waxaynu baaraannaa wadooyin dheeraad ah oo ka soo bixinta macluumaadka hadalka oo ku xiran mukhtada kala duduwan: ku qoran hadalka ku saabsan isku wax la jeedo, iyo hadal ku saabsan waxyaabo kala duduwan isla qaab ah. Waxan tusnaynaa in macluumaadka joogtada ah ee laga soo jeedo ay ka qabsadaan dhinacyadan isku mid ah, xataa haddii aysan soo bandhignayn marxaladda qoraalka oo lagu baran karo qoraal aad u badan oo qurxoon marka lagu imtixaamo qoraalka kaamilka ah. Shaqo cusub oo aan qiimeynayno micneheeda aasaaska ah oo lagu xaqiijiyo aqoonta la xiriirayo, waxaynu tusnaynaa in loo baahan yahay noocyada rasmiga ah oo rasmiga ah, taas oo ah qaababkayaga.', 'ta': 'காட்சி குறிப்புகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்ட கூற்றுகளை குறிப்பிடும் கூட்டுக்கான கூற்றுக்கள் ஒரு நல்ல மூலம் தான் காட்சி பா இங்கே நாம் அதிலிருந்து வெளியேறும் வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் வழிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் பல- மாற்று சூழல் சூழல் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: அதே பொருள நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் இந்த நிலையிலிருந்து தொடர்ந்து பார்ப்புகளுக்கு ஒரே பகுதிகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்ளும், நிறைய நிலையான ஒற்றைப்படையான பாகங்களில நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய செயலை பரிந்து கொள்கிறோம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பிரதிநிதிகள் பார்க்கலாம் சாத்தியமான கூற்றுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க- மற்றும் அது குணங்கள', 'sv': 'Korpora av referensuttryck i kombination med deras visuella referenser är en bra källa för att lära sig ordbetydelser direkt grundade i visuella representationer. Här utforskar vi ytterligare sätt att extrahera ordrepresentationer kopplade till multimodal kontext från dem: genom uttryck som refererar till samma objekt, och genom uttryck som refererar till olika objekt i samma scen. Vi visar att kontinuerliga betydelserepresentationer härledda från dessa kontexter fångar kompletterande aspekter av likhet, även om de inte överträffar textinbäddningar som tränats på mycket stora mängder råtext när de testas på standardjämförelser. Vi föreslår en ny uppgift för att utvärdera grundade betydelserepresentationer – detektering av potentiellt samreferensmässiga fraser – och visa att det kräver exakta denotationella representationer av attributbetydelser, vilket vår metod tillhandahåller.', 'si': 'ඔවුන්ගේ දර්ශණ සංවේදනය සමග සම්බන්ධ කර්පෝරා වචන අදහස් සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ මෙතන, අපි ඔවුන්ගෙන් වෙනස් වචන ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක් පිළිගන්න විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා: එකම දෙයක් සම්බන්ධ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සංවේදනයෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් වලට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැත්නම් පුළුවන් ප අපි අළුත් වැඩයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න සමහර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමහර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ති', 'ur': 'ان کی تصویر ریفرنٹوں کے ساتھ جوڑے ہوئے منظورات کی کورپور ایک اچھا سورج ہے کہ کلمات کی معنی سیکھنے کے لئے سیدھے دکھائے جاتے ہیں۔ یہاں، ہم ان سے زیادہ طریقے پھیلاتے ہیں کہ ان سے کلمات کی تعلیمات مختلف موڈال کے ساتھ متصل ہوئی ہے: مثالیں کے ذریعہ جو ایک ہی چیز کی تعریف کرتے ہیں، اور مثالیں کے ذریعہ جو ایک ہی صحنه میں مختلف موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان کنٹکسٹوں سے اتارے ہوئے نمائش مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہیں، اگرچہ ان کی نمائش مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق نہیں ہوتے ہم نے ایک نئی تابع کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ بنیادی معنی کا مطلب مطلب پڑھنے کے لئے مطلب معلوم کرنے کے لئے ایک نئی تابع کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ اس کی ضرورت ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ کو دقیق دکھانے کے معلومات کا مطلب ہے۔', 'uz': "Ko'rinadigan ifodalar bilan bir xil ifodalar bilan bog'liqlangan ifodalarning ma'nosi o'rganish uchun juda yaxshi manba. Bu yerda biz ulardan bir necha modal muktadha bogʻ'liq so'zlarni chiqarish uchun qoʻshimcha usullarni ko'rganamiz: bir xil obʼekt bilan bir xil narsalarni anglatadigan ifodalar orqali va bitta bir xil narsalardan bir xil narsalarni hisoblash mumkin. Biz shu holatlardan davom etilgan ma'nosiyalarni ko'rsatganimiz, bir xil murakkablik qismlarini qabul qiladi, agar texnologiya embedonini o'rganilmaganda ko'p katta qisqa matn soni o'rganilmasa. Biz bir yangi vazifani o'ylaymiz, asboblar ma'nosini aniqlash mumkin va bir qanday qo'shimcha imkoniyatlarni aniqlash kerak va bu usulning imkoniyatlarimiz haqiqida tayyorli qisqatlash kerak.", 'vi': 'Xác minh của những biểu hiện liên kết với các chỉ dẫn thị của họ là một nguồn tốt để học về ý nghĩa từ trực tiếp được dựa trên biểu tượng trực tiếp. Ở đây, chúng ta sẽ tìm cách khai thác các biểu tượng từ ngữ liên quan đến nhiều phương tiện khác nhau: qua các biểu hiện liên quan đến cùng một vật thể, và qua các biểu hiện liên quan đến các vật khác nhau trong cùng cảnh. Chúng tôi cho thấy các biểu tượng ý nghĩa liên tục lấy được các khía cạnh khác nhau của nét giống, cho dù không vượt qua sự nhúng liền văn bản được đào tạo trên một lượng rất lớn chữ nguyên bản khi được thử nghiệm dựa trên tiêu chuẩn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một nhiệm vụ mới để đánh giá các biểu lộ có nghĩa có khả năng đồng dụ các cụm từ và cho thấy nó yêu cầu các biểu tượng chỉ định định rõ ràng về các tác phẩm thuộc quy, mà phương pháp của chúng tôi cung cấp.', 'nl': 'Korpora van verwijzende uitdrukkingen in combinatie met hun visuele referenties zijn een goede bron voor het leren van woordbetekenissen direct gegrond in visuele representaties. Hier onderzoeken we extra manieren om uit hen woordrepresentaties te extraheren die gekoppeld zijn aan multimodale context: door uitdrukkingen die verwijzen naar hetzelfde object, en door uitdrukkingen die verwijzen naar verschillende objecten in dezelfde scène. We laten zien dat continue betekenisrepresentaties afgeleid uit deze contexten complementaire aspecten van gelijkenis bevatten, zelfs als ze niet beter presteren dan tekstuele inbeddingen die getraind zijn op zeer grote hoeveelheden ruwe tekst wanneer ze getest worden op standaard vergelijkingsbenchmarks. We stellen een nieuwe taak voor voor het evalueren van geaarde betekenisrepresentaties – detectie van potentieel co-referentiële zinnen – en laten zien dat het nauwkeurige denotationele representaties van attribuutbetekenissen vereist, die onze methode biedt.', 'hr': 'Korporacija predstavljanja izraza povezanih s njihovim vizualnim referentima su dobar izvor za učenje značenja riječi direktno osnovana na vizualnim predstavljanjima. Ovdje istražujemo dodatne načine izvlačenja od njih riječi koje su povezani s multimodalnim kontekstom: kroz izraze koje se odnose na isti objekt, i kroz izraze koje se odnose na različite objekte na istu scenu. Pokazujemo da neprestano značenje predstavljanja iz tih konteksta uključuju komplementne aspekte sličnosti, čak i ako ne nadmašuju tekstualne integracije obučene na veoma velikim količinama sirovog teksta kada se testiraju na standardnim kriterijama sličnosti. Predlažemo novi zadatak za procjenu temeljnog značenja otkrivanja potencijalnih koreferencijskih fraza i pokazati da zahtijeva precizne denotacijske predstave značenja atributa, koje naš metod pruža.', 'de': 'Korpora von verweisenden Ausdrücken gepaart mit ihren visuellen Referenzen sind eine gute Quelle, um Wortbedeutungen zu lernen, die direkt in visuellen Darstellungen verankert sind. Hier untersuchen wir zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, aus ihnen Wortrepräsentationen zu extrahieren, die mit multimodalem Kontext verknüpft sind: durch Ausdrücke, die sich auf dasselbe Objekt beziehen, und durch Ausdrücke, die sich auf verschiedene Objekte in derselben Szene beziehen. Wir zeigen, dass kontinuierliche Bedeutungsrepräsentationen, die aus diesen Kontexten abgeleitet werden, komplementäre Aspekte der Ähnlichkeit erfassen, auch wenn sie textuelle Einbettungen, die auf sehr großen Mengen Rohtext trainiert wurden, nicht übertreffen, wenn sie auf Standard-Ähnlichkeits-Benchmarks getestet werden. Wir schlagen eine neue Aufgabe für die Evaluierung von geerdeten Bedeutungsrepräsentationen vor – Erkennung potenziell koreferenzieller Phrasen – und zeigen, dass sie präzise denotationsrepräsentationen von Attributbedeutungen erfordert, die unsere Methode bietet.', 'id': 'Korpora ekspresi yang merujuk sepasang dengan referen visual mereka adalah sumber yang baik untuk belajar arti kata secara langsung berdasarkan represisi visual. Di sini, kita mengeksplorasi cara tambahan untuk mengekstraksi dari mereka represisi kata yang terhubung dengan konteks multi modal: melalui ekspresi yang merujuk kepada objek yang sama, dan melalui ekspresi yang merujuk kepada objek yang berbeda di adegan yang sama. We show that continuous meaning representations derived from these contexts capture complementary aspects of similarity, even if not outperforming textual embeddings trained on very large amounts of raw text when tested on standard similarity benchmarks.  Kami mengusulkan tugas baru untuk mengevaluasi arti berdasarkan representation-deteksi dari frasa yang berpotensi koreferensi-dan menunjukkan bahwa itu membutuhkan representation denotasi tepat dari arti atribut, yang metode kami menyediakan.', 'bg': 'Корпората на препращащите изрази, съчетани с техните визуални референти, са добър източник за изучаване на значения на думи, пряко основани на визуални изображения. Тук изследваме допълнителни начини за извличане от тях на думи, свързани с мултимодален контекст: чрез изрази, отнасящи се до един и същ обект, и чрез изрази, отнасящи се до различни обекти в една и съща сцена. Показваме, че непрекъснатите представи на смисъла, получени от тези контексти, улавят допълващи аспекти на сходството, дори и да не превъзхождат текстови вграждания, обучени върху много големи количества суров текст, когато са тествани на стандартни показатели за сходство. Предлагаме нова задача за оценяване на обосновани значения – откриване на потенциално съпътстващи фрази – и показваме, че тя изисква точно денотационно представяне на значенията на атрибутите, което осигурява методът ни.', 'da': 'Korpora af henvisningsudtryk parret med deres visuelle referencer er en god kilde til at lære ordbetydninger direkte baseret på visuelle repræsentationer. Her undersøger vi yderligere måder at udtrække ordrepræsentationer knyttet til multimodal kontekst fra dem: gennem udtryk, der refererer til det samme objekt, og gennem udtryk, der refererer til forskellige objekter i samme scene. Vi viser, at kontinuerlige meningsrepræsentationer afledt af disse sammenhænge fanger komplementære aspekter af lighed, selv om de ikke overgår tekstindlejringer trænet på meget store mængder rå tekst, når de testes på standard lighedsbenchmarks. Vi foreslår en ny opgave til at evaluere begrundede meningsrepræsentationer – detektering af potentielt co-referentiale sætninger – og vise, at det kræver præcise denotationelle repræsentationer af attribut betydninger, som vores metode giver.', 'ko': '지칭 표현 자료 라이브러리와 그 시각적 지칭은 시각적 표징을 직접적으로 바탕으로 하는 의미를 학습하는 좋은 원천이다.여기서 우리는 다중모드적 상하문과 관련된 단어를 추출하여 표시하는 다른 방법을 모색했다. 같은 대상의 표현식을 인용하고 같은 장면에서 다른 대상을 인용하는 표현식이다.우리는 이러한 상하문에서 파생된 연속적인 의미는 유사성의 상호보완을 포착했다는 것을 나타낸다. 설령 표준 유사성 기준 테스트에서 대량의 원시 텍스트에 훈련된 텍스트의 삽입보다 그 표현이 좋지 않다고 해도 그렇다.우리는 잠재적 공지사구의 뿌리 깊은 의미 표징 검측을 평가하고 정확한 속성 의미 표징 검측이 필요하다는 새로운 임무를 제시했다. 우리의 방법은 이 점을 제공했다.', 'fa': 'شرکت\u200cهای تعریف\u200cهای ارائه\u200cای که با ارائه\u200cهای دیده\u200cاش جفت شده\u200cاند منبع خوبی برای یاد گرفتن معنی\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها مستقیماً در نمایش\u200cهای دیده\u200cاش است. در اینجا، ما روش\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای از اخراج کردن از آنها، نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای که مرتبط به موقعیت\u200cهای متعدد متعدد شده را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم: از طریق نمایش\u200cها که مرتبط به یک شیء می\u200cشود، و از طریق نمایش\u200cها که مرتبط به شیء متفاوت در ما نشان می دهیم که معنی دائمی که از این موضوع به وجود آورده می\u200cشود، نقطه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای از شباهت را می\u200cگیرند، حتی اگر نقطه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای از متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای بسیار بزرگ آموزش یافته نمی\u200cشود، وقتی روی نقطه\u200cهای شباهت استاندارد آزمایش می\u200c ما یک وظیفه جدید برای ارزیابی معنی بنیادی و شناسایی از جمله\u200cهای ممکن همراهی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن نیاز به نمایش\u200cهای دقیق جدایی از معنی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها است که روش ما می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Görsel referentleri bilen baglanýan suratlaryň bedeni görsel suratlarda edilen söz anlamlyklaryny öwrenmek üçin gowy çeşmelerdir. Burada, onlardan çoklu modal kontekste bağlı kelime ifadeleri çıkarmak için ek yollarla keşfettik: aynı nesne ifade eden ifadeler aracılığıyla ve aynı sahnede farklı nesne ifade eden ifadeler kullanarak keşfettik. Biz bu durumlardan gelen sürekli ifade etkileşimlerinin benzeri aspektlerini görüyoruz. Hatta standart benzeri benchmarklarda test edildiğinde eğitilmiş tekst içeriklerinden fazla büyük sayılarda çizgi metin eklenmesine rağmen değerlendirmemiz gerektiğini gösteriyoruz. Biz esasy çykyş möhümlerini golaýlaşdyrmak üçin täze bir täze täze täze täze täze teklip edip, potensial koreferensiýaly sözlerniň deňleşenlerini çykmak üçin, we munyň öz täze täze täze täze täze täzeliklerini saýlamak üçin', 'sq': 'Korpora e shprehjeve të referuara të palëvizuara me referentët e tyre vizualë janë një burim i mirë për mësimin e kuptimeve të fjalës drejtpërdrejt bazuar në përfaqësime vizuale. Këtu, ne eksplorojmë mënyra shtesë për të nxjerrë nga ato përfaqësime fjalësh të lidhura me kontekstin multi modal: nëpërmjet shprehjeve që referohen në të njëjtin objekt, dhe nëpërmjet shprehjeve që referohen në objekte të ndryshme në të njëjtin skenë. Ne tregojmë se përfaqësimet e vazhdueshme të kuptimeve të nxjerra nga këto kontekste kapin aspekte komplementare të ngjashmërisë, edhe nëse nuk mbivlerësojnë përfaqësimet tekstuale të stërvitura në sasi shumë të mëdha teksti të papërpunuar kur testohen në parametra standarde të ngjashmërisë. Ne propozojmë një detyrë të re për vlerësimin e përfaqësimeve-zbulimit të kuptimeve të bazuara të frazave potencialisht koreferenciale-dhe tregojmë se ajo kërkon përfaqësime të sakta denotacionale të kuptimeve të atributeve, që metoda jonë ofron.', 'sw': 'Kampuni ya kutangaza maoni yaliyochanganyika na maoni yao ni chanzo zuri cha kujifunza maneno yenye maana ya moja kwa moja katika uwakilishi wa maoni. Hapa, tunatafuta njia nyingine za kutengeneza kutoka kwao uwakilishi wa maneno yanayohusiana na muktadha wa aina mbalimbali: kwa hisia zinazomaanisha kitu hicho, na kwa hisia zinazomaanisha vitu tofauti katika eneo hilo hilo. Tunaonyesha kwamba maonesho yanayoendelea yanayotokana na matatizo haya yanachukua vipande muhimu vya usawa, hata kama kutokuwa na matumizi ya ujumbe wa mfumo uliofanywa kwa kiasi kikubwa cha ujumbe mfupi wakati ulipojaribiwa kwa bendera za usawa wa kawaida. Tunazipendekeza kazi mpya ya kutathmini maana ya uwakilishi-kutambua maneno yanayoweza kuwa yanashirikiana na pamoja na kuonyesha kwamba inahitaji uwakilishi sahihi wa maana ya hoja, ambayo njia yetu inatoa.', 'am': 'Corpora of referring expressions paired with their visual referents are a good source for learning word meanings directly grounded in visual representations.  Here, we explore additional ways of extracting from them word representations linked to multi-modal context: through expressions that refer to the same object, and through expressions that refer to different objects in the same scene.  እናሳየዋለን፡፡ አዲስ ስራ መቆጣጠርን እናስፈልጋለን፣ የሥርዓት አካላዊ ቃላትን ማረጋገጥ እና ማሳየትን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'তাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গীর সাথে যুক্ত প্রকাশের কথা উল্লেখ কর্পোরা তাদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গীদের সাথে যুক্ত হয়েছে তারা শব্দের এখানে আমরা তাদের কাছ থেকে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বের করার আরো উপায় খুঁজে বের করি যা বহুমাত্র মোডাল প্রেক্ষেত্রের সাথে যুক্ত: একই বস্তুর মাধ্যমে য আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই সমস্ত প্রতিনিধি থেকে প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করা হয়েছে তারা একই ধরনের প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রতিনিধিত্ব গ্রহণ করে, এমনকি যদিও স্ট্যান্ডার্ডারের সমতুল্য বেন আমরা একটি নতুন কাজের প্রস্তাব করছি যার মানে ভিত্তিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব-প্রতিনিধিত্ব-আবিষ্কার-সম্ভাব্য সহ-গণভাবে বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব-পরিচিতির', 'af': "Korpora van verwysing uitdrukkings met hulle visuele verwysings is 'n goeie bron vir die leer van woord betekening direk gegrond in visuele verwysings. Hier, ons ondersoek addisionele maniere van uitpakking van hulle woord voorstellings wat verbind is na multimodale konteks: deur uitdrukkings wat verwys na dieselfde voorwerp, en deur uitdrukkings wat verwys na verskillende voorwerpe in dieselfde persoon. Ons wys dat voortdurende betekenis voorstellings wat van hierdie kontekste afgelei is, opvang komplementare aspekte van gelykheid, selfs as nie uitgevoer tekstuele inbêdinge wat op baie groot hoeveelheid rooi teks gelei is nie wanneer toets word op standaard gelykenis benchmarke. Ons stel 'n nuwe taak voor die evaluering van gegrond betekening voorskrifte-opdekking van potensielle koeferensiele frase-en wys dat dit presies verteenwoordelings van eienskappe betekening benodig, wat ons metode verskaf.", 'bs': 'Korpora predviđanja izraza povezanih s njihovim vizualnim referentima je dobar izvor za učenje značenja riječi koje su direktno temeljene na vizualnim predstavljanjima. Ovdje istražujemo dodatne načine izvlačenja od njih riječi koje su povezane sa multimodalnim kontekstom: kroz izraze koje se odnose na isti objekt, i kroz izraze koje se odnose na različite objekte na istu scenu. Pokazujemo da neprestano značenje predstavljanja iz tih konteksta uhvate komplementne aspekte sličnosti, čak i ako ne nadmađuju tekstualne integracije obučene na veoma velikim količinama sirovog teksta kada se testiraju na standardnim kriterijama sličnosti. Predlažemo novi zadatak za procjenu temeljnog značenja otkrivanja potencijalnih koreferencijskih fraza i pokazujemo da zahtijeva precizne denotacijske predstave značenja atributa, koje naš metod pruža.', 'cs': 'Korpus odkazujících výrazů spojených s jejich vizuálními referenty je dobrým zdrojem pro učení se slovních významů přímo zakotvených ve vizuálních reprezentacích. Zde zkoumáme další způsoby extrahování z nich slovních reprezentací propojených s multimodálním kontextem: prostřednictvím výrazů, které odkazují na stejný objekt, a prostřednictvím výrazů, které odkazují na různé objekty ve stejné scéně. Ukazujeme, že kontinuální reprezentace významů odvozené z těchto kontextů zachycují doplňkové aspekty podobnosti, i když nepřekonávají textové vložení trénované na velmi velkém množství surového textu při testování na standardních benchmarkech podobnosti. Navrhujeme nový úkol pro hodnocení reprezentací uzemněných významů – detekci potenciálně koreferenčních frází – a ukazujeme, že vyžaduje přesné denotační reprezentace významů atributů, které naše metoda poskytuje.', 'et': 'Visuaalsete viidetega paaritud viitavate väljendite korpused on hea allikas visuaalsetel esitustel otseselt põhinevate sõnaliste tähenduste õppimiseks. Siin uurime täiendavaid võimalusi, kuidas neist ekstraheerida multimodaalse kontekstiga seotud sõnarepresentatsioone: väljendite kaudu, mis viitavad samale objektile, ja väljendite kaudu, mis viitavad samal stseenil erinevatele objektidele. Näitame, et nendest kontekstidest tuletatud pidevad tähendused hõlmavad sarnasuse vastastikku täiendavaid aspekte, isegi kui nad ei ületa standardsete sarnasuse võrdlusnäitajatega testitud väga suurel hulgal toorteksti koolitust. Pakume välja uue ülesande põhjalike tähendusrepresentatsioonide hindamiseks – potentsiaalselt kaasviidavate fraaside tuvastamiseks – ja näitame, et see nõuab täpseid atribuuditähenduste denotatsioonilisi representatsioone, mida meie meetod pakub.', 'fi': 'Viittaavien ilmaisujen korpus yhdistettynä visuaalisiin viittauksiin on hyvä lähde oppia sanallisia merkityksiä suoraan visuaalisiin esityksiin. Tutkimme myös muita tapoja erottaa niistä multimodaaliseen kontekstiin liittyviä sanaesityksiä: samaan kohteeseen viittaavien ilmaisujen ja saman kohtauksen eri objekteihin viittaavien ilmaisujen kautta. Osoitamme, että näistä konteksteista johdetut jatkuvat merkitykset kuvaavat toisiaan täydentäviä piirteitä samankaltaisuudesta, vaikka ne eivät ylittäisikään hyvin suuria määriä raakatekstiä koulutettuja tekstiupotuksia, kun niitä testataan standardivertailuarvoilla. Ehdotamme uutta tehtävää arvioitaessa pohjautuvia merkitysesityksiä – mahdollisesti rinnakkaisviittauslauseiden havaitsemista – ja osoitamme, että se vaatii tarkkoja attribuutin merkitysten denotaatioesityksiä, joita menetelmämme tarjoaa.', 'az': 'Görünül referentları ilə birlikdə birlikdə olan ifadələrin korporası görünül ifadələrdə tərəfindən temsil edilən söz anlamını öyrənmək üçün yaxşı mənbədir. Burada, biz onlardan çoxlu modal məlumatlara bağlı sözləri çıxartmaq üçün əlavə yolları keşfetirik: eyni objektə olan ifadələr vasitəsilə, eyni sahədə müxtəlif objektlərə danışan ifadələr vasitəsilə. Biz bu müxtəliflərdən gələn həmişəlik məlumatların istifadə edilən məlumatların istifadə edilməsində, bənzər məlumatların çox böyük məlumatlarından istifadə edilən məlumatların çox böyük dəyişdirilməsini göstəririk. Biz yeni bir işə təklif edirik ki, mövcud olaraq birləşdirilmiş ifadələrin təşkil edilməsini təşkil etmək üçün yeni bir işə təklif edirik, və göstəririk ki, metodumuzun təşkil etdiyi təşkil ifadəsi təşkil edilməsi lazımdır.', 'hy': "Corpora of referring expressions paired with their visual referents are a good source for learning word meanings directly grounded in visual representations.  Այստեղ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք դրանցից բառերի ներկայացումներ, որոնք կապված են բազմամոդալ կոնտեքստի հետ' արտահայտումների միջոցով, որոնք վերաբերում են նույն առարկանին, և արտահայտումների միջոցով, որոնք վերաբերում են նույն տեսարանում տարբեր առարկաներին: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս կոնտեքստներից ստացված անընդհատ նշանակալի ներկայացումները ներառում են նմանության բազմազան ասպեկտներ, նույնիսկ եթե դրանք չեն արտադրում շատ մեծ քանակությամբ աղբ տեքստի վրա, երբ փորձվում են ստանդարտ նմանության հարաբերականների վրա: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խնդիր, որպեսզի գնահատենք հիմնված նշանակության ներկայացումներ և հայտնաբերենք պոտենցիալ համառեֆերանցիալ արտահայտություններ, և ցույց տանք, որ այն պահանջում է ճշգրիտ նշանակության ներկայացումներ առանձնահատկությունների նշանակություններ", 'ca': "La corpora d'expressions de referència parellada amb els seus referents visuals és una bona font per aprendre significats de paraules basats directament en representacions visuals. Here, we explore additional ways of extracting from them word representations linked to multi-modal context: through expressions that refer to the same object, and through expressions that refer to different objects in the same scene.  Mostrem que les representacions de sentit continu derivades d'aquests contextos capturen aspectes complementars de la similitud, fins i tot si no superen les integracions textuals entrenades en grans quantitats de text brut quan es testen amb punts de referència de similitud estándar. Proposem una nova tasca per avaluar representacions fundamentades-detecció de frases potencialment co-referències-i demostrar que requereix representacions denotacionals precisas de significats d'atributs, que el nostre mètode proporciona.", 'jv': 'Tulung string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé éntukno daftar mèhaan kelompungan langgar sampeyan akeh kontext iki luwih apik dhéwé, nek ngono iso nggawe barang langgar sampeyan textual input sampeyan luwih dumateng liyane Monday', 'sk': 'Korpusi referenčnih izrazov v zvezi z njihovimi vizualnimi referencami so dober vir za učenje besednih pomenov, ki so neposredno osnovani v vizualnih reprezentacijah. Tukaj raziskujemo dodatne načine, kako iz njih izvlečemo besedne predstavitve, povezane z multimodalnim kontekstom: skozi izraze, ki se nanašajo na isti objekt, in skozi izraze, ki se nanašajo na različne predmete v istem prizoru. Pokazali smo, da kontinuirane pomenske reprezentacije, ki izhajajo iz teh kontekstov, zajemajo dopolnilne vidike podobnosti, čeprav ne presegajo besedilnih vdelav, usposobljenih na zelo velikih količinah surovega besedila, ko so testirane na standardnih referenčnih vrednostih podobnosti. Predlagamo novo nalogo ocenjevanja utemeljenih pomenskih reprezentacij – odkrivanja potencialno soonferencialnih stavkov – in pokažemo, da zahteva natančne denotacijske reprezentacije atributnih pomenov, ki jih zagotavlja naša metoda.', 'ha': "Companiya na gaya maganar da aka haɗa su da gannainsu, shi ne wani source mai kyau wa learning maganar da aka ƙayyade shi a bayani. Hali, munã nuna wasu hanyõyi masu fitarwa daga gare su, masu haɗi da mazaɓa masu multi-modal: cikin hisãbi wanda ke fahimta zuwa abun guda, da maganar da ke gaya wa abubuwa masu daban da ke cikin birane. Tuna nũna cewa, ma'anar muhimmada da ke ƙara daga wannan muhimmada, su riƙe masu kamfata masu daidaita, kuma kõ dã ba su iya aikin matsayin da aka yi wa amfani da wasu matsayi mai girma a lokacin da aka jarraba su da bangon daidaita na daidaita. Munã buɗa wani aikin da za'a evaluate muhimmada a bakwai-gane-misalin misalin-misalin mai yiwuwa da ake samu-mutane-kuma ke nuna cewa yana da muhimmada masu tsari ga misalin abubuwa, da hanyoyinmu na bã shi ba.", 'he': 'Corpora of referring expressions paired with their visual referents are a good source for learning word meanings directly grounded in visual representations.  כאן, אנו חוקרים דרכים נוספות להוציא מהם מילים מייצגות קשורות לקשר רב-מודיאלי: דרך ביטויים שמייחסים לאותו אובייקט, ובדרך ביטויים שמייחסים לאבייקטים שונים באותה סצנה. אנו מראים כי מייצגים משמעותיים ממשיכים שנוצאים מהקשרים האלה תופסים אפקטים משלאים של דמיון, אפילו אם לא מתגברים על מייצגים טקסטוליים מאומנים על כמויות גדולות מאוד של טקסט גרוע כאשר נבחנים על נקודות הדמיון סטנדרטיים. אנחנו מציעים משימה חדשה להערכה מייצגים-זיהוי של משמעות משמעותית מקורקת של משפטים פוטנציאליים קו-רפורנציאליים-ולהראות שזה דורש מייצגים מדויקים של משמעות תכונות, אשר השיטה שלנו מספקת.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་མཐོང་བའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ཐོག་དང་། འདིར་ན། ང་ཚོས་འདི་དག་གི་བརྗོད་འཚོལ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐོག་རིམ་ལ་སྟོན་གསོ ང་ཚོས་kontinuous meaning representations derived from these contexts capture complementary aspects of similarity, even if not outperforming textual embeddings trained on very large amounts of raw text when tested on standard similarity benchmarks. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྨན་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས'}
{'en': 'Video Highlight Prediction Using Audience Chat Reactions', 'ar': 'توقع تسليط الضوء على الفيديو باستخدام ردود فعل محادثة الجمهور', 'fr': "Prédiction des temps forts vidéo à l'aide des réactions", 'es': 'Predicción de vídeos destacados mediante reacciones de chat de audiencia', 'pt': 'Previsão de destaque de vídeo usando reações de bate-papo do público', 'ja': '視聴者チャットの反応を使用したビデオのハイライト予測', 'zh': '用受众反应视频精彩', 'hi': 'ऑडियंस चैट प्रतिक्रियाओं का उपयोग करके वीडियो हाइलाइट भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование выделения видео с использованием реакций в чате аудитории', 'ga': 'Tuar Aibhsithe Físeáin Ag Úsáid Frithghníomhartha Comhrá Lucht Féachana', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Videokiemelés előrejelzése a közönség csevegési reakcióinak használatával', 'el': 'Πρόβλεψη επισήμανσης βίντεο χρησιμοποιώντας αντιδράσεις συνομιλίας κοινού', 'it': "Predizione dell'evidenziazione video utilizzando le reazioni della chat del pubblico", 'kk': 'Видео бояулауын таңдау', 'lt': 'Video Highlight Prediction Using Audience Chat Reactions', 'mk': 'Предвидување на видео означување користејќи реакции на јавниот разговор', 'ms': 'Video Highlight Prediction Using Audience Chat Reactions', 'ml': 'വീഡിയോ എടുത്തുകാണിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Tbassir tal-Osservazzjoni tal-Vidjo bl-Użu tar-Reazzjonijiet taċ-Ċata tal-Awdituri', 'mn': 'Үзэгчийн ярианы урвал ашиглан бичлэгийн тодруулалт', 'no': 'Førehandsvising for videosyntaksmerking ved å bruka samtalereaksjonar til publikum', 'pl': 'Prognozowanie podświetlenia wideo za pomocą reakcji czatu odbiorców', 'ro': 'Predicția evidențierii video utilizând reacțiile chat de audiență', 'sr': 'Predviđanje video osvjetljenja korištenje reakcija publike', 'si': 'වීඩියෝ ආලෝකනය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Fiidiyowga Iswidishka Horumarka Iswidishka', 'sv': 'Förutsägelse av videomarkering med hjälp av publikchattreaktioner', 'ta': 'வீடியோ தனிப்படுத்தல் முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'ویڈیو ہیلایٹ کی پیش بینی', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Định vị chỗ sáng ảnh bằng phản ứng thoại', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af videofremhævning ved hjælp af Audience Chat-reaktioner', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на видео акцентите с помощта на реакциите на аудиторията в чата', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van videohoogtepunten met behulp van reacties op doelgroepen', 'hr': 'Predviđanje podsvjetljenja video koristeći reakcije publike', 'de': 'Vorhersage von Videohighlights mithilfe von Audience Chat Reaktionen', 'ko': '시청자의 채팅 반응을 이용하여 영상의 하이라이트를 예측하다', 'id': 'Prediksi Penandangan Video Menggunakan Reaksi Percakapan Penonton', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد برق ویدئو با استفاده از واکنش\u200cهای گفتگوی تماشاگران', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Video Highlighting Prediction using Audience Chat Reactions', 'tr': 'Sesini Ýagtylamak modi', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i vëzhgimit të Video duke përdorur reagimet e bisedës së publikut', 'am': 'Video Highlight Prediction Using Audience Chat Reactions', 'az': 'Video ńįŇül…ôndirici S…ôn…ôd R…ôsasńĪnńĪ ńįŇül…ôndirir', 'hy': 'Տեսագրություն բարձրացնելու կանխատեսումը՝ օգտագործելով լսարանի զրույցի արձագանքներ', 'bn': 'ভিডিও হাইলাইট পছন্দ করুন Audience Chat প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করে', 'ca': 'Predicció de ressaltar vídeos utilitzant reaccions de conversa pública', 'bs': 'Predviđanje za osvjetljenje video koristeći reakcije publike', 'cs': 'Předpověď zvýraznění videa pomocí reakcí v chatu publika', 'et': 'Video esiletõstmise prognoosimine publiku vestlusreaktsioonide abil', 'fi': 'Video Korostuksen Ennuste Yleisön Chat Reaktioiden avulla', 'jv': 'Video ngubungan kelalahan', 'he': 'שימוש בתגובות השיחה של הקהל', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'sk': 'Napoved poudarka videoposnetkov z uporabo odzivov klepeta občinstva', 'bo': 'བརྙན་རིས་ཁ་ཕྲང་སྟོན་པའི་སྒྲ་དབྱིབས་གླེང་མོལ་འགྱུར་སྐབས་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Sports channel video portals offer an exciting domain for research on multimodal, multilingual analysis. We present methods addressing the problem of automatic video highlight prediction based on joint visual features and textual analysis of the real-world audience discourse with complex slang, in both English and traditional Chinese. We present a novel dataset based on League of Legends championships recorded from North American and Taiwanese Twitch.tv channels (will be released for further research), and demonstrate strong results on these using multimodal, character-level CNN-RNN model architectures.', 'ar': 'تقدم بوابات فيديو القنوات الرياضية مجالًا مثيرًا للبحث في التحليل متعدد الوسائط ومتعدد اللغات. نقدم طرقًا لمعالجة مشكلة التنبؤ التلقائي لتسليط الضوء على الفيديو استنادًا إلى الميزات المرئية المشتركة والتحليل النصي لخطاب الجمهور في العالم الحقيقي بلغة عامية معقدة ، باللغتين الإنجليزية والصينية التقليدية. نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة تستند إلى بطولات League of Legends المسجلة من قنوات Twitch.tv في أمريكا الشمالية والتايوانية (سيتم إصدارها لمزيد من البحث) ، ونعرض نتائج قوية على هذه باستخدام بنى نموذجية متعددة الوسائط على مستوى الشخصيات CNN-RNN.', 'es': 'Los portales de vídeo de canales de deportes ofrecen un campo interesante para la investigación sobre el análisis multimodal y multilingüe. Presentamos métodos que abordan el problema de la predicción automática de momentos destacados de video basados en características visuales conjuntas y análisis textual del discurso de la audiencia del mundo real con jerga compleja, tanto en inglés como en chino tradicional. Presentamos un conjunto de datos novedoso basado en los campeonatos de League of Legends grabados en los canales de Twitch.tv de Norteamérica y Taiwán (se publicarán para más investigaciones), y demostramos resultados sólidos en estos mediante arquitecturas de modelos CNN-RNN multimodales a nivel de personajes.', 'pt': 'Os portais de vídeo de canais esportivos oferecem um domínio empolgante para pesquisa sobre análise multimodal e multilíngue. Apresentamos métodos que abordam o problema da previsão automática de destaque de vídeo com base em recursos visuais conjuntos e análise textual do discurso do público do mundo real com gírias complexas, tanto em inglês quanto em chinês tradicional. Apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados baseado em campeonatos de League of Legends gravados nos canais Twitch.tv norte-americanos e taiwaneses (será lançado para pesquisas adicionais) e demonstramos fortes resultados sobre eles usando arquiteturas de modelo CNN-RNN multimodais em nível de personagem.', 'fr': "Les portails vidéo des chaînes sportives offrent un domaine passionnant pour la recherche sur l'analyse multimodale et multilingue. Nous présentons des méthodes abordant le problème de la prédiction automatique des temps forts d'une vidéo basée sur des caractéristiques visuelles conjointes et une analyse textuelle du discours du public réel avec un argot complexe, à la fois en anglais et en chinois traditionnel. Nous présentons un nouveau jeu de données basé sur les championnats League of Legends enregistrés sur les chaînes Twitch.tv nord-américaines et taïwanaises (sera publié pour d'autres recherches), et démontrons de solides résultats sur ces derniers à l'aide d'architectures de modèles CNN-RNN multimodales au niveau des personnages.", 'ja': 'スポーツチャンネルビデオポータルは、マルチモーダル多言語分析のためのエキサイティングなドメインを提供します。英語と中国語の両方で、複雑なスラングを持つ現実世界の聴衆の話題の共同視覚特徴とテキスト分析に基づいて、自動ビデオハイライト予測の問題に対処する方法を提示します。北米および台湾のTwitch.tvチャンネルから録画されたLeague of Legendsのチャンピオンシップ（さらなる研究のためにリリースされます）に基づいた新規データセットを提示し、マルチモーダルで文字レベルのCNN - RNNモデルアーキテクチャを使用して強力な結果を実証します。', 'zh': '体育频道视频门户为多模样、多语言分析,供一令人兴奋领域。 发其自视频之术,基于英语、繁体中文受众世俗语俚语合目特征、文本分析。 展一基于北美、台湾 Twitch.tv 频道记英雄联盟之新数(将发而究),用多模态,角色级CNN-RNN模架构展其果。', 'hi': 'स्पोर्ट्स चैनल वीडियो पोर्टल बहुआयामी, बहुभाषी विश्लेषण पर शोध के लिए एक रोमांचक डोमेन प्रदान करते हैं। हम अंग्रेजी और पारंपरिक चीनी दोनों में जटिल स्लैंग के साथ संयुक्त दृश्य विशेषताओं और वास्तविक दुनिया के दर्शकों के प्रवचन के पाठ्य विश्लेषण के आधार पर स्वचालित वीडियो हाइलाइट भविष्यवाणी की समस्या को संबोधित करने के तरीके प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम उत्तरी अमेरिकी और ताइवानी Twitch.tv चैनलों से रिकॉर्ड किए गए लीग ऑफ लीजेंड्स चैंपियनशिप के आधार पर एक उपन्यास डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं (आगे के शोध के लिए जारी किया जाएगा), और बहुआयामी, चरित्र-स्तरीय सीएनएन-आरएनएन मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करके इन पर मजबूत परिणाम प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Видеопорталы спортивных каналов предлагают захватывающую область для исследований по мультимодальному, многоязычному анализу. Предложены методы решения задачи автоматического прогнозирования выделения видео на основе совместных визуальных особенностей и текстового анализа реального дискурса аудитории со сложным сленгом, как на английском, так и на традиционном китайском языке. Мы представляем новый набор данных, основанный на чемпионатах Лиги Легенд, записанных с североамериканских и тайваньских каналов Twitch.tv (будет выпущен для дальнейших исследований), и демонстрируем сильные результаты по ним с использованием мультимодальных архитектур моделей CNN-RNN на уровне персонажей.', 'ga': 'Tairgeann tairseacha físe cainéal spóirt fearann spreagúil le haghaidh taighde ar anailís ilmhódach, ilteangach. Cuirimid modhanna i láthair chun dul i ngleic le fadhb na réamh-mheastacháin uathoibríoch buaicphointí físe bunaithe ar ghnéithe amhairc comhpháirteacha agus anailís théacsúil ar dhioscúrsa an lucht féachana sa saol fíor le slang casta, i mBéarla agus i Sínis thraidisiúnta. Cuirimid tacar sonraí nua i láthair bunaithe ar chraobhchomórtais League of Legends a taifeadadh ó chainéil Twitch.tv Mheiriceá Thuaidh agus na Téaváine (a eiseofar le haghaidh tuilleadh taighde), agus léirímid torthaí láidre orthu seo ag baint úsáide as ailtireachtaí samhlacha CNN-RNN ilmhódacha, ar leibhéal carachtar.', 'ka': 'Name ჩვენ ვამხსენებთ პრობლემას, რომელიც ავტომატიკური ვიდეო გახსენების პრობლემას გადაწყენებას, რომელიც ერთადერთი ვიზუალური ფუნქციები და ტექსტური ანალიზაციების რეალური მსოფლიო ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნომალური მონაცემების საზოგადოება, რომელიც ლოგენდის ქამონიონტების ლიგიდან დავწერა ჩრდილო ამერიკანეთიდან და ტაივანეთიდან სა TV კანალები (უფრო მეტი პასუხისთვის გახსნა) და გამოყენება ძალიან წარმოდგენების შესახებ მულტიმოდეალური, სიმბოლოების დონე CNN-RNN მოდელური აქტიქტიქ', 'el': 'Οι τηλεοπτικές πύλες αθλητικών καναλιών προσφέρουν έναν συναρπαστικό τομέα για έρευνα σχετικά με την πολυμορφική, πολύγλωσση ανάλυση. Παρουσιάζουμε μεθόδους που αντιμετωπίζουν το πρόβλημα της αυτόματης πρόβλεψης στιγμιότητας βίντεο βασισμένες σε κοινά οπτικά χαρακτηριστικά και κειμενική ανάλυση του πραγματικού λόγου κοινού με σύνθετη αργκό, τόσο στα αγγλικά όσο και στα παραδοσιακά κινέζικα. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων βασισμένο σε πρωταθλήματα που καταγράφονται από το Twitch της Βόρειας Αμερικής και της Ταϊβάν. Τα τηλεοπτικά κανάλια (θα κυκλοφορήσουν για περαιτέρω έρευνα) και θα επιδείξουν ισχυρά αποτελέσματα σε αυτά χρησιμοποιώντας πολυμορφικές αρχιτεκτονικές μοντέλων επιπέδου CNN-RNN.', 'hu': 'A sportcsatornák videóportáljai izgalmas területet kínálnak a multimodális, többnyelvű elemzés kutatásához. Az automatikus videókiemelések előrejelzésének problémáját kezelő módszereket mutatjuk be, amelyek a valós közönség diskurzusának közös vizuális jellemzőire és szövegelemzésére épülnek komplex szlenggel angolul és hagyományos kínaiul egyaránt. Egy új adatkészletet mutatunk be az észak-amerikai és tajvani Twitch-ről rögzített League of Legends bajnokságok alapján. A televíziós csatornák (további kutatások céljából jelennek meg), és ezekkel kapcsolatban komoly eredményeket mutatnak be multimodális, karakterszintű CNN-RNN modell architektúrákkal.', 'it': "I portali video dei canali sportivi offrono un interessante dominio per la ricerca sull'analisi multimodale e multilingue. Presentiamo metodi che affrontano il problema della previsione automatica degli highlight video basati su caratteristiche visive congiunte e analisi testuali del discorso del pubblico reale con slang complesso, sia in inglese che in cinese tradizionale. Presentiamo un nuovo set di dati basato sui campionati League of Legends registrati da Twitch nordamericano e taiwanese. I canali televisivi (saranno pubblicati per ulteriori ricerche) e dimostrano risultati forti su questi utilizzando architetture multimodali di modello CNN-RNN a livello di carattere.", 'kk': 'Спорт арнасының видео порталары көптеген, көптеген тілдерді анализ туралы зерттеу үшін қызықтық доменін ұсынады. Біз автоматты видео бояулауының мәселесін шешу әдістерін таңдаймыз. Ағылшын және әдімгі қытайлық тілдерінің біріктірілген көрініс мүмкіндіктері мен мәтіндік анализиясынан негізделген кө Солтүстік Американың және Тайвандық Твиттерінен жазылған Лигендің шампионаттарына негізделген романдық деректер жинағын таңдаймыз. tv арнасы (қосымша зерттеу үшін шығарылады) және олардың көптеген, таңбалар деңгейі CNN-RNN үлгі архитектураларды қолдану үшін күшті нәтижелерін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Sportinių kanalų vaizdo portalai suteikia įdomią sritį daugiarūšio, daugiakalbės analizės moksliniams tyrimams. Mes pristatome metodus, kuriais sprendžiama automatinio vaizdo akcentavimo prognozės problema, grindžiama bendrais vizualiniais požymiais ir tikrojo pasaulio auditorijos diskurso tekstine analize su sudėtingu slangu anglų ir tradiciniais kinų kalbomis. Mes pristatome naują duomenų rinkinį, pagrįstą Legendų lygos čempionatais, užregistruotais iš Šiaurės Amerikos ir Taivano Twitch. televizijos kanalai (bus išleisti tolesniems moksliniams tyrimams) ir parodys tvirtus jų rezultatus naudojant daugiarūšio pobūdžio CNN-RNN modelių architektūras.', 'mk': 'Спортски канали видео портали нудат возбудлив домен за истражување на мултимодална, мултијазична анализа. Презентираме методи за решавање на проблемот со автоматското предвидување на видео истакнување врз основа на заеднички визуелни карактеристики и текстуална анализа на реалниот публички дискурс со комплексен сланг, на англиски и традиционален кинески јазик Презентираме нови податоци базирани на шампионатите на Лигата на Легендите снимени од Северна Америка и Тајвански Твитч. ТВ канали (ќе бидат објавени за понатамошно истражување) и ќе покажат силни резултати на овие со користење мултимодилни, карактерски моделни архитектури на CNN-RNN.', 'ms': 'Portal video saluran olahraga menawarkan domain yang menarik untuk kajian tentang analisis multimodal, berbilang bahasa. Kami mempersembahkan kaedah yang mengatasi masalah ramalan tampilan video secara automatik berdasarkan ciri-ciri visual bersama dan analisis teks penonton dunia nyata dengan slang kompleks, dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Cina tradisional. Kami memperkenalkan set data novel berdasarkan Kejuaraan Liga Legenda yang direkam dari Amerika Utara dan Taiwan Twitch. saluran tv (akan dilepaskan untuk kajian lanjut), dan menunjukkan keputusan yang kuat mengenai ini menggunakan arkitektur model CNN-RNN, tahap-aksara multimodal.', 'mt': "Il-portali tal-vidjo tal-kanali sportivi joffru dominju eċċitanti għar-riċerka dwar analiżi multimodali u multilingwi. Aħna nippreżentaw metodi li jindirizzaw il-problema tal-previżjoni awtomatika tal-vidjo li tenfasizza t-tbassir ibbażat fuq karatteristiċi viżivi konġunti u analiżi testwali tad-diskors tal-udjenza fid-dinja reali bi slang kumpless, kemm bl-Ingliż kif ukoll biċ-Ċiniż tradizzjonali. Aħna nippreżentaw sett ta' dejta ġdid ibbażat fuq kampjunati tal-Liga tal-Legendi rreġistrati minn Twitch tal-Amerika ta' Fuq u tat-Tajwan. kanali televiżivi (se jiġu rilaxxati għal aktar riċerka), u juru riżultati b’saħħithom fuq dawn bl-użu ta’ arkitetturi mudell CNN-RNN multimodali fil-livell tal-karattru.", 'ml': 'സ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചാനല്\u200d വീഡിയോ പോര്\u200dട്ടലുകള്\u200d പല്ലിങ്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു ആശ്വാസകരമായ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. സ്വയം വീഡിയോയുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും പാഠമായ ചൈനീസിലും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ക ക We present a novel dataset based on League of Legends championships recorded from North American and Taiwanese Twitch. ടിവി ചാനലുകള്\u200d (കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധനത്തിന് വേണ്ടി വിടുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതാണു്) ഇതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ശക്തിയുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യും.', 'no': 'Sportkanal-video-portalane tilbyr ein spennende domene for forskning på multimodal, multilingual analyse. Vi presenterer metodar for å handtere problemet med automatisk framheving av videosyntaks basert på felles visuelle funksjonar og tekstanalyser av diskursane frå verkelege publikum med komplekse slang, både engelsk og tradisjonell kinesisk. Vi presenterer eit roman dataset basert på League of Legends championships recorded from North American and Taiwanese Twitch. tv-kanalane (vert utgjeven for framtidige forskning) og viser sterke resultat på desse med multimodal, teiknrivå CNN-RNN-modellerarkitekturar.', 'pl': 'Portale wideo kanałów sportowych oferują ekscytującą domenę badań nad multimodalną, wielojęzyczną analizą. Przedstawiamy metody rozwiązywania problemu automatycznej predykcji podświetlenia wideo oparte na wspólnych cechach wizualnych i analizie tekstowej realnego dyskursu publiczności ze złożonym slangiem, zarówno w języku angielskim, jak i tradycyjnym chińskim. Przedstawiamy nowatorski zestaw danych oparty na mistrzostwach League of Legends zarejestrowanych z północnoamerykańskiego i tajwańskiego Twitcha. kanały telewizyjne (zostaną opublikowane do dalszych badań) i wykazać silne wyniki w tym zakresie przy użyciu multimodalnych, charakterystycznych architektur modeli CNN-RNN.', 'mn': 'Спорт каналын видео порталууд олон моделийн, олон хэл шинжилгээний судалгаанд сэтгэл хөдлөл өгдөг. Бид автоматически бичлэгийн тодорхойлолтын асуудлыг тайлбарлах арга замыг харуулж байна. Үнэндээ дэлхийн үзэгчид нарийн англи болон уламжлалтын Хятад хэлэлцээтэй ярилцдаг ярилцлагуудын нийлбэр харагдах хариу, текст шинжилгээ Бид Хойд Америк болон Тайваны Твитт-ээс бичигдсэн Лигенд шагналын багтаасан шинэ өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж байна. ТВ каналууд (дахиад шинэ судалгаанд гаргах боломжтой), олон моделийн, хариу дүрсийн CNN-RNN загварын архитектуруудыг ашиглан хүчтэй үр дүнг үзүүлнэ.', 'ro': 'Portalurile video ale canalelor sportive oferă un domeniu interesant pentru cercetarea analizei multimodale, multilingve. Prezentăm metode care abordează problema predicției automate a evidențierii video bazate pe caracteristici vizuale comune și analiza textuală a discursului publicului din lumea reală cu slang complex, atât în limba engleză, cât și în chineză tradițională. Vă prezentăm un nou set de date bazat pe campionatele League of Legends înregistrate de Twitch din America de Nord și Taiwan. Canalele TV (vor fi lansate pentru cercetări suplimentare) și demonstrează rezultate puternice pe acestea utilizând arhitecturi multimodale de model CNN-RNN la nivel de caracter.', 'sv': 'Sportkanals videoportaler erbjuder en spännande domän för forskning om multimodal, flerspråkig analys. Vi presenterar metoder för att lösa problemet med automatisk videohighlight prediktion baserat på gemensamma visuella egenskaper och textanalys av den verkliga publikdiskursen med komplext slang, på både engelska och traditionell kinesiska. Vi presenterar ett nytt dataset baserat på League of Legends mästerskap inspelade från nordamerikanska och taiwanesiska Twitch. TV-kanaler (kommer att släppas för vidare forskning) och visa starka resultat på dessa med hjälp av multimodala, karaktärsbaserade CNN-RNN-modellarkitekturer.', 'si': 'ස්පෝර්ම් චැනල් වීඩියෝ පෝර්ටල් වලින් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වි අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය වීඩියෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d අපි ලිගෙන්ඩ් චැම්පියෝන්ස් ලිග්න්ඩ් සැම්පියෝන්ස් එක අධාරිත දත්ත සූදානයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා උතුරු  tv චැනල් (වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරයි), ඒ වගේම මෙයාලට වඩා විශාල ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා', 'so': 'Sports channel video portals offer an exciting domain for research on multimodal, multilingual analysis.  Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaabab ku saabsan dhibaatada fiidiyowga ah oo ku saabsan basaaska aragtida wadajirka ah iyo baaritaanka qoraalka ah ee hadalka dadka dunida ee dhaqaalaha ah oo ku saabsan dhibaatada fiidiyowga, afka Ingiriiska iyo Shiinooyinka caadiga ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa macluumaad warqadeed oo ku saleysan League of Legends hips oo laga soo qoray Waqooyiga Amerika iyo Taiwanese Twitch. tele-channels (waxaa lagu sii daabacaa waxbarasho dheeraad ah), wuxuuna tusaa resultooyin xoog badan oo ku saabsan isticmaalka dhismaha modelka CNN-RNN.', 'sr': 'Video portali sportskih kanala nude uzbudljivu domenu za istraživanje o multimodalnoj, multijezičkoj analizi. Mi predstavljamo metode u rješavanju problema automatskog video osvjetljenja predviđanja na temelju zajedničkih vizualnih karakteristika i tekstualne analize diskursa o publiki u stvarnom svetu sa složenim slang, na engleskom i tradicionalnom kineskom jeziku. Predstavljamo novu kompaniju podataka na temelju prvenstva lige Legenda snimljene iz Severne Amerike i Taiwanese Twitch. Televizijski kanali (biće oslobođeni za daljnje istraživanje), i pokazuju jake rezultate na tim koristeći multimodalne, karakterne arhitekture CNN-RNN modela.', 'ta': 'விளையாட்டு வீடியோ துறைகள் பல மொழி ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கும் களம் வழங்குகிறது. நாம் தானாகவே வீடியோ பிரச்சனையைக் குறிப்பிடும் முறைகளைக் காண்பிக்கும் சிக்கலான சங்கை மூலம் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் மரபார்ந்த சீனாவில் இருந்து நாம் வடக்கு அமெரிக்காவில் இருந்து மற்றும் டையானேஸ் டுவிச் இருந்து பதிவு செய்யப்பட்ட லீக் ஆப்லிங் அடிப்படையில் ஒர டிவி வழிகள் (மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு வெளியேற்றப்படும்) மற்றும் பலமுறையான, எழுத்து நிலை CNN-RNN மாதிரி உருவாக்கியங்களை பயன்படுத்த', 'ur': 'اسپارٹ چنال ویڈیو پورٹل multimodal, multilingual analysis کے بارے میں تحقیق کے لئے ایک اثر انگیز ڈومین پیش کرتا ہے. ہم طریقے پیش آئیں گے جو آٹوٹی ویڈیو ہیلائیٹ کی مسئلہ کے بارے میں مشکل کی حفاظت کریں، انگلیسی اور سنتی چینی میں جو حقیقی دنیاوی اڈیونٹوں کی صحبت کرتی ہیں، ان کے متعلق مشکل کی تفسیر اور تفسیر کی تحلیل پر ہم نے نور امریکا اور تائیوانی ٹویچ سے ریکورد کیے ہوئے لیگ لگنڈ چمپینٹوں پر بنیاد رکھا ہے ایک نئی ڈیٹ سٹ کو پیش کیا ہے. ٹی وی چنال (اضافہ تحقیق کے لئے آزاد کیا جائے گا) اور ان پر مضبوط نتائج دکھائے جائیں گے جو multimodal, character-level CNN-RNN موڈل معماری استعمال کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Biz avtomatik video muammolarini boshqarish usullarini o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga ko'rinish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin va butunlay dunyo muammolari murakkab suhbat tilida, ingliz tilida va tabiiy Xitoycha tilida. Biz Shimoliy Amerika va Taiwanese Twitch tomonidan saqlangan qo'llanmalar asosida yaratilgan novel maʼlumotlar tarkibini hozirganimiz. tv kanallari (koʻproq taʼminlovchi uchun chiqaradi) va uning multimodal, character darajasi CNN-RNN modeli arxituvchilarini ishlatish uchun qulay natijalarini koʻrsatish.", 'vi': 'Các cổng video của kênh thể thao cung cấp một miền kích thích cho nghiên cứu về đa phương, phân tích đa dạng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu các phương pháp giải quyết vấn đề phát triển video tự động dựa trên các tính năng hình ảnh chung và kết cấu của thảo luận đối tượng khán giả ở thế giới thực với thuật ngữ phức tạp, cả tiếng Anh và truyền thống Trung Quốc. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mới dựa trên giải vô địch Huyền Thoại ghi lại từ Bắc Mỹ và Đài Loan. kênh truyền hình (sẽ được phát hành để nghiên cứu thêm) và hiển thị kết quả tích cực mạnh nhờ các kiến trúc mẫu CNN-RNN đa chiều.', 'nl': 'Sportkanaal videoportals bieden een spannend domein voor onderzoek naar multimodale, meertalige analyse. We presenteren methoden die het probleem van automatische video highlight voorspelling aanpakken op basis van gezamenlijke visuele kenmerken en tekstanalyse van het echte publiek discours met complexe slang, zowel in het Engels als traditioneel Chinees. We presenteren een nieuwe dataset gebaseerd op League of Legends kampioenschappen opgenomen uit Noord-Amerikaanse en Taiwanese Twitch. De televisiekanalen (zullen worden vrijgegeven voor verder onderzoek) en sterke resultaten tonen op deze met behulp van multimodale, karakterniveau CNN-RNN model architecturen.', 'bg': 'Видеопорталите за спортни канали предлагат вълнуващ домейн за изследване на мултимодалния, многоезичен анализ. Представяме методи, насочени към проблема с автоматичното прогнозиране на видео акцентите, базирани на съвместни визуални особености и текстов анализ на аудиторията от реалния свят със сложен жаргон, както на английски, така и на традиционния китайски език. Представяме нов набор от данни, базиран на шампионатите на Лигата на легендите, записани от Северна Америка и Тайван Туич. телевизионни канали (ще бъдат пуснати за по-нататъшни проучвания) и демонстрират силни резултати по тях, използвайки мултимодални модели на ниво символи.', 'hr': 'Video portali sportskih kanala nude uzbudljivu domenu za istraživanje o multimodalnoj, multijezičkoj analizi. Predstavljamo metode rješavanja problema automatskog predviđanja osvjetljenja video na temelju zajedničkih vizualnih karakteristika i tekstualne analize diskursa o publiku u stvarnom svijetu sa složenim slang, na engleskom i tradicionalnom kineskom jeziku. Predstavljamo novi set podataka na temelju prvenstva lige Legenda snimljenog iz Sjeverne Amerike i Taiwanese Twitch. Televizijski kanali (će se osloboditi za daljnje istraživanje) i pokazati jake rezultate na tim koristeći multimodalne, karakterne arhitekture CNN-RNN modela.', 'da': 'Sportskanaler videoportaler tilbyder et spændende domæne for forskning i multimodal, flersproget analyse. Vi præsenterer metoder, der løser problemet med automatisk video highlight forudsigelse baseret på fælles visuelle træk og tekstanalyse af den virkelige publikumsdiskurs med kompleks slang, på både engelsk og traditionelt kinesisk. Vi præsenterer et nyt datasæt baseret på League of Legends mesterskaber optaget fra nordamerikanske og taiwanske Twitch. tv-kanaler (vil blive frigivet til yderligere forskning), og demonstrere stærke resultater på disse ved hjælp af multimodale CNN-RNN modelarkitekturer på karakterniveau.', 'id': 'Portal video saluran olahraga menawarkan domain yang menarik untuk penelitian tentang analisis multimodal, multibahasa. We present methods addressing the problem of automatic video highlight prediction based on joint visual features and textual analysis of the real-world audience discourse with complex slang, in both English and traditional Chinese.  Kami mempersembahkan set data novel berdasarkan Kejuaraan Liga Legenda yang direkam dari Amerika Utara dan Taiwan Twitch. saluran tv (akan dibebaskan untuk penelitian lanjut), dan menunjukkan hasil yang kuat pada ini menggunakan arsitektur model CNN-RNN multimodal, karakter-level.', 'de': 'Sportkanal-Videoportale bieten eine spannende Domäne für die Erforschung multimodaler, mehrsprachiger Analysen. Wir präsentieren Methoden zur automatischen Vorhersage von Videohighlights basierend auf gemeinsamen visuellen Merkmalen und textueller Analyse des realen Publikumsdiskurses mit komplexem Slang, sowohl in Englisch als auch im traditionellen Chinesisch. Wir präsentieren einen neuartigen Datensatz basierend auf League of Legends Meisterschaften aus nordamerikanischem und taiwanesischem Twitch. TV-Sender (werden für weitere Forschung freigegeben) und zeigen starke Ergebnisse auf diesen mit multimodalen, character-level CNN-RNN-Modellarchitekturen.', 'tr': 'Sport kanallary multimodal, multilingual anal첵zy barada ara힊tyrmalar 체챌in heyecan veril첵채n bir domain teklip ed첵채r. Biz awtomatik wideo 첵agtylygyny흫 meselelerini 챌철zmekde 챌철zg체tlen첵채n 챌철z체mleri we d체n첵채d채ki publikalary흫, i흫lis챌e we d채pli 횉in 챌e dilinde gaty slang bilen 챌철zg체tlen첵채n 챌철z체mlerini 챌철zdiririk. Biz Demirgazy Amerika we Ta첵wany흫 Twit챌esinden 첵azylan Legenda 챌empionatyna da첵an첵an bir roman setirini g철rke첵채ris. tv kanallary (ba힊ga ara힊dyryma 체챌in seretsek), we bu multimodal, karakter-derejesi CNN-RNN nusgala arhitekturlaryny ulanarak g체첵챌li netijeleri g철rkez.', 'ko': '스포츠 채널 영상 포털 사이트는 다중모드, 다중언어 분석 연구에 흥미로운 분야를 제공했다.우리는 시각적 특징과 텍스트 분석을 결합한 방법을 바탕으로 영상 고광 자동 예측 문제를 해결했다. 이 방법은 영어와 번체 중국어에서 복잡한 속담의 진실한 관중 언어를 분석한다.우리는 북미와 대만 트위치 기록을 바탕으로 한 레전드 리그 챔피언십의 새로운 데이터 집합을 제시했다.텔레비전 채널(진일보한 연구를 위해 발표될 것)과 다중모드, 문자급 CNN-RNN 모델 구조를 사용하여 이 채널에서 강력한 결과를 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Picha za video za michezo zinatoa maeneo ya kusisimua ya utafiti kuhusu uchambuzi wa lugha mbalimbali. We present methods addressing the problem of automatic video highlight prediction based on joint visual features and textual analysis of the real-world audience discourse with complex slang, in both English and traditional Chinese.  Tunaweza kuweka taarifa za riwaya kwa msingi wa chama cha Chama cha Legends kilichorekodiwa kutoka Marekani Kaskazini na Taiwanese Twitch. Chaneli za televisheni (zitachapishwa kwa ajili ya utafiti zaidi), na kuonyesha matokeo makubwa kuhusu miundombinu ya modeli ya CNN-RNN kwa kutumia viwango vingi vya kibiashara.', 'af': "Sportkanaal video portale bied 'n opkomstige domein vir ondersoek op multimodaal, multitaal analisie. Ons stel metodes om die probleem van outomatiese video verligting voorskou te bespreek wat gebaseer is op joint visuele funksies en tekstuele analisie van die regte wêreld publiekers speletjie met kompleks slang, in engelse en tradisionele Sjinese. Ons stel 'n romaniese datastel gebaseer op Lig van Legende Championships wat opgeneem is van Noordamerikaanse en Taiwanese Twitch. tv-kanale (sal verlos word vir verdere ondersoek), en verskyn sterke resultate op hierdie gebruik van multimodaal, karaktervlak CNN-RNN-model architectures.", 'sq': 'Portalet video të kanalit sportiv ofrojnë një fushë emocionuese për kërkime mbi analizat multimodale dhe shumëgjuhëse. Ne paraqesim metoda që trajtojnë problem in e parashikimit automatik të shfaqjes së videove bazuar në karakteristikat e përbashkëta vizuale dhe analizën tekstuale të diskursit të publikut në botën reale me slang kompleks, si në anglisht ashtu edhe në kinezën tradicionale. Ne paraqesim një grup të dhënash të reja bazuar në kampionatet e Ligës së Legjendëve të regjistruar nga Twitch-i i Amerikës së Veriut dhe Taivanit. kanalet televizive (do të lirohen për kërkime të mëtejshme) dhe do të demonstrojnë rezultate të forta mbi këto duke përdorur arkitektura modeli CNN-RNN multimodale në nivelin e karakterit.', 'am': 'የፖርት ኮምፒታል የቪዲዮ ፖርቲካዎች በብዙ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ አስተያየት ላይ የሚያስደነግጠውን ዶሜን ያቀርባሉ፡፡ የራሳቸውን የቪዲዮን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል እና እውነተኛውን ዓለም-አዳማኞች ንግግር በተቃውሞ ግንኙነት በንግግሊዝና እና ባሕላዊ ቻይና በመስመር ላይ የተመሳሳይን ትንቢት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የሰሜን አሜሪካ እና ታይናስ ትዊትክ የተዘጋጀውን የLegends Championship መሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይን የዘላለም ዳታዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ የቴቪዥን ጣቢያዎች (ለሌላ ምርመራ ይፈታሉ) እና እነዚህን በብልሃት፣ የፊደል ደረጃዎች የCNN-RNN model መሠረቶች የተጠቃሚ ፍሬዎችን ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Sports kanalı video portalları çoxlu modal, çoxlu dil analizi barəsindəki araştırmalar üçün heyecan verici domena təklif edir. Biz həqiqət dünya auditorisinin müzakirə etdikləri müzakirə ilə, İngilizce və nəticəli Çincə danışmaqla birləşdirilmiş şəkildə və textual analizi ilə, avtomatik video işıqlandırmasının problemini çəkmək üçün metodlarını göstəririk. Biz Şimali Amerikalı və Tayvanlı Tövçdən kayıtlı Legender Şampiyonalıqlarına dayanan bir yeni veri setini göstəririk. Televizyon kanalları (daha çox araşdırma üçün yayınlanacaq), və bunların çoxlu modal, karakter-seviyyəti CNN-RNN modeli arhitektarlarını istifadə edirəcəklərini göstərəcəklər.', 'bn': 'স্পোর্ট চ্যানেল ভিডিও পোর্টাল বহুভাষী বিশ্লেষণের উপর গবেষণার জন্য একটি উত্তেজিত ডোমেইন প্রদান করেছে। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভিডিওর সমস্যার ব্যাপারে উপস্থাপন করি যুক্ত দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং পৃথিবীর বাস্তবতা শ্রবণকারীদের কথোপকথনে বিশ্লেষণের ভিত্তিতে বিশ্ আমরা উত্তর আমেরিকা এবং তাইওয়ানেস টুইট থেকে রেকর্ড করা লীগ অফ লেগেন্ড চ্যাম্পিয়ন শিপের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি উপন্যাসেট উপস্থাপন করি। টিভি চ্যানেল (আরো গবেষণার জন্য মুক্তি প্রদান করা হবে) এবং মাল্টিমোডাল, অক্ষর-স্তর সিএনএন-RNN মডেল কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে এই সমস্ত কার্যক্', 'hy': 'Սպորտային կանանցի տեսագրական պորտալները շատ հետաքրքիր ոլորտ են առաջարկում բազմաձև, բազլեզու վերլուծության ուսումնասիրության համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեթոդներ, որոնք լուծվում են ավտոմատիկ տեսագրության հնարավորության խնդիրը, հիմնված ընդհանուր տեսողական հատկանիշների և իրական աշխարհի հանդիսատեսի խոսակցության տեքստային վերլուծության վրա բարդ սլենգով, անգլերենով և ավանդա Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը հիմնված է Լեգենդների Լիգայի առաջնությունների վրա, որոնք ձայնագրվել են Հյուսիսային Ամերիկայի և Թայվանի Թվիչից: հեռուստահաղորդակցման կանանց (որոնք կհրապարակեն ապագայում ուսումնասիրությունների համար) և ցույց կտան դրանց վրա ուժեղ արդյունքներ, օգտագործելով բազմամոդալ, բնության մակարդակի CNN-ՌՆ մոդելի ճարտարապետություն', 'fa': 'پورتل\u200cهای ویدئویی\u200cهای ورزشی برای تحقیقات درباره\u200cی تحلیل\u200cهای متعدد، متعدد زبان، یک دامنه هیجان\u200cانگیز پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند. ما روش\u200cهایی را برای حل مشکل پیش\u200cبینی ویدئو اتوماتیک روشن می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس ویدئو\u200cهای دیده\u200cای مشترک و تحلیل متن\u200cهای صحبت کننده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی با اسلانگ پیچیده، در انگلیسی و چینی سنتی است. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای رمانی را بر اساس قهرمانان لیگ افسانه\u200cها از تویچ\u200cهای شمال آمریکایی و تایوانی نشان می\u200cدهیم. کانال\u200cهای تلویزیون (برای تحقیقات بیشتر آزاد می\u200cشود) و نتیجه\u200cهای قوی روی این\u200cها را با استفاده از معماری\u200cهای مدل\u200cهای متعدد، سطح شخصیت CNN-RNN نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'bs': 'Video portali sportskih kanala nude uzbudljivu domenu za istraživanje o multimodalnoj, multijezičkoj analizi. Predstavljamo metode u rješavanju problema automatskog predviđanja osvjetljenja video na temelju zajedničkih vizualnih karakteristika i tekstualne analize diskursa o publiki u stvarnom svijetu sa složenim slanjem, na engleskom i tradicionalnom kineskom jeziku. Predstavljamo novi set podataka na temelju prvenstva lige Legenda snimljenog iz Sjeverne Amerike i Tajvanske Twitch. Televizijski kanali (će se osloboditi za daljnje istraživanje), i pokazati jake rezultate na tim koristeći multimodalne, karakterne arhitekture CNN-RNN modela.', 'ca': "Els portals de vídeo dels canals esports ofereixen un domini emocionant per a la recerca sobre l'an àlisi multimodal i multilingüe. Presentam mètodes que aborden el problema de la predicció automàtica de la ressaltació de vídeos basada en característiques visuals conjuntes i en l'anàlisi textual del discurs públic del món real amb una barra complexa, tant en anglès com en xinès tradicional. Presentam un nou conjunt de dades basat en campionats de la Liga de Legendes gravads de Twitch nord-americana i taiwanesa. canals de televisió (es publicaran per investigar més), i demostraran forts resultats sobre aquests mitjançant arquitectures multimodals de nivell caràcter CNN-RNN.", 'fi': 'Urheilukanavavideoportaalit tarjoavat jännittävän verkkotunnuksen multimodaalisen, monikielisen analyysin tutkimukseen. Esittelemme menetelmiä, jotka käsittelevät automaattisen videokorostuksen ennustamisen ongelmaa, jotka perustuvat yhteisiin visuaalisiin ominaisuuksiin ja todellisen yleisön diskurssin tekstianalyysiin monimutkaisella slangilla sekä englanniksi että perinteiseksi kiinaksi. Esittelemme uuden aineiston, joka perustuu League of Legends -mestaruuskilpailuihin Pohjois-Amerikan ja Taiwanin Twitchistä. TV-kanavat (julkaistaan jatkotutkimusta varten), ja ne osoittavat vahvoja tuloksia multimodaalisilla, hahmotasoisilla CNN-RNN-malliarkkitehtuurilla.', 'cs': 'Sportovní kanály video portály nabízejí vzrušující doménu pro výzkum multimodální, vícejazyčné analýzy. Představujeme metody řešení problému automatické predikce zvýraznění videa založené na společných vizuálních rysech a textové analýze reálného diváckého diskurzu s komplexním slangem, v angličtině i tradiční čínštině. Představujeme nový datový soubor založený na mistrovstvích League of Legends zaznamenaných ze severoamerického a tchajwanského Twitche. televizní kanály (budou zveřejněny pro další výzkum) a demonstrovat silné výsledky na těchto kanálech pomocí multimodálních modelových architektur CNN-RNN na úrovni znaků.', 'et': 'Spordikanalite videoportaalid pakuvad põnevat domeeni mitmeliigilise mitmekeelse analüüsi uurimiseks. Tutvustame automaatse video esiletõstmise probleemi lahendamise meetodeid, mis põhinevad ühistel visuaalsetel omadustel ja reaalmaailma publiku diskursuse tekstianalüüsil keerulise slängiga nii inglise kui traditsioonilise hiina keeles. Esitleme uudse andmekogumi, mis põhineb League of Legends meistrivõistlustel, mis on salvestatud Põhja-Ameerika ja Taiwani Twitchist. Telekanalid (avaldatakse edasiseks uurimistööks) ja näitavad nende kohta tugevaid tulemusi, kasutades mitmeliigilisi CNN-RNN mudeliarhiteektuure.', 'jv': 'Name Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing ngomong nik nggawe perbudhakan karo perbudhakan video sing berarti supoyo karo hal-hal penjelajan anyar tentang kanggo nguasai perbudhakan karo perbudhakan sing komplikasi sing dirangkap, ning basa Inggris karo perusahaan Cine. Awak dhéwé éntuk dataset nganggo lijih perbudhakan langgar-perbudhakan liya kawit lagi dikenakno ning Nord-Amarik lan Tuwitch Tarawa kuwi. telegram', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa, bangon video na idãnun idãnun na idãnun firam sun nuna wani guda mai sha'awa wa yin fitina kan multi-multi-lingui. Tuna halatar da hanyoyin su zama masu husũma ga matabbatar video farat ɗaya, ko kuma mu nuna littafin bayani a kan haɗiya masu ganin gani da kuma anayyar littãfin da saurãren saurãren cikin duniya masu husũma da laƙaƙƙiya, da harshen Ingiriya da kawaici na China. Tuna halatar da wani danne na yanzu a kan Ligue of Legend Chapionshipts aka rubũta daga Taiwanese na Kaskazin. TV-kanalla (za'a saka wa yin fitina ga kodi), kuma ya nuna matsalar masu ƙaranci masu amfani da waɗannan da ke amfani da misalin zane-zane-daraja na CNN-RNN.", 'he': "פורטלים וידאו ערוץ ספורט מציעים תחום מרגש למחקר על ניתוח multimodal, multilingual. אנחנו מציגים שיטות מתייחסות לבעיה של חיזוי וידאו אוטומטי מבוסס על תכונות ויזואליות משותפות וניתוח טקסטלי של דיבור הקהל בעולם האמיתי עם סלנג מורכב, גם באנגלית, וגם בסינית מסורתית. אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים חדשה מבוססת על אליפות ליגת האגדות שנקלטו מצפון אמריקה וטויץ' טיוואנס. ערוצי טלוויזיה (ישוחררו למחקר נוסף), ותוכיחו תוצאות חזקות על אלה באמצעות ארכיטקטורות מודל CNN-RNN רבות-מודל ברמה אופיינית.", 'sk': 'Video portali športnih kanalov ponujajo zanimivo domeno za raziskave multimodalne, večjezične analize. Predstavljamo metode, ki obravnavajo problematiko avtomatičnega napovedovanja video poudarkov na podlagi skupnih vizualnih značilnosti in besedilne analize diskurza občinstva realnega sveta s kompleksnim slengom, tako v angleščini kot tradicionalni kitajščini. Predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov, ki temelji na prvenstvih League of Legends, posnetih iz severnoameriškega in tajvanskega Twitcha. televizijskih kanalov (bodo objavljeni za nadaljnje raziskave) in dokazujejo močne rezultate pri teh z uporabo multimodalnih modelnih arhitektur CNN-RNN na ravni znakov.', 'bo': 'Sports channel video portals offer an exciting domain for research on multimodal, multilingual analysis. We present methods addressing the problem of automatic video highlight prediction based on joint visual features and textual analysis of the real-world audience discourse with complex slang, in both English and traditional Chinese. ང་ཚོས་བྱང་ཆོག་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཆེན་དུ་རྟེན་ནས་བྲིས་བཀོད་པའི་གསར་གཏོད་གཞི་སྒྲིག tv རྒྱུ་ལམ་ཚུ(དཔར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་དགོས་པ་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ཆེན་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་དགོས། འདི་དག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་སྣ་མཐོང་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོ'}
{'en': 'Evaluating Hierarchies of Verb Argument Structure with Hierarchical Clustering', 'ar': 'تقييم التسلسلات الهرمية لبنية حجة الفعل مع التجميع الهرمي', 'es': 'Evaluación de jerarquías de la estructura de argumentos verbales con agrupación jerárqu', 'fr': 'Évaluation des hiérarchies de la structure des arguments des verbes avec le clustering hiérarchique', 'pt': 'Avaliando hierarquias de estrutura de argumentos verbais com agrupamento hierárquico', 'ja': '階層的クラスタリングを使用した動詞引数構造の階層の評価', 'zh': '以层聚类评估动词参数结构之层次结构', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित क्लस्टरिंग के साथ क्रिया तर्क संरचना के पदानुक्रमों का मूल्यांकन करना', 'ru': 'Оценка иерархий структуры аргументов глаголов с иерархической кластеризацией', 'ga': 'Ordlathais Struchtúr Argóint Briathar a Mheas le Cnuasú Ordlathach', 'hu': 'Az igék hierarchiáinak értékelése hierarchikus klaszterezéssel', 'ka': 'Verb Argument Structure', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση ιεραρχίας της δομής επιχειρημάτων ρήμων με ιεραρχική ομαδοποίηση', 'it': 'Valutazione delle gerarchie della struttura argomentativa dei verbi con raggruppamento gerarchico', 'lt': 'Žodžių argumentų struktūros hierarchijų vertinimas su hierarchiniu klasifikavimu', 'kk': 'Hierarchical Clustering- мен Verb аргумент құрылымының иерархиясын оқу', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на хиерархиите на структурата на аргументите за јазици со хиерархиско кластерирање', 'ms': 'Mengevaluasi Hierarki Struktur Argumen Verb dengan Pemkumpulan Hierarkik', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчдийн аргумент бүтцийн шинжлэх ухааны дүгнэлт', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni tal-Ġerarkiji tal-Istruttura tal-Argument tal-Verbi bi Klassifikazzjoni Ġerarkija', 'ml': 'Evaluating Hierarchies of Verb Argument Structure with Hierarchical Clustering', 'no': 'Evaluerer hierarkiter av Verb- argumentstruktur med hierarkisk klassering', 'ro': 'Evaluarea ierarhiilor structurii argumentelor verbului cu gruparea ierarhică', 'pl': 'Ocena hierarchii struktury argumentów czasowników za pomocą klastrowania hierarchicznego', 'sr': 'Evaluirajući hijerarhije Verb Argument strukture sa hijerarhijskim klasteriranjem', 'si': 'හියර්චිකාල් ක්ලොස්ටර් එක්ක විශ්වාස කරන්න හියර්චියාර්චියස් විදියට විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av hierarkier av verb argumentstruktur med hierarkisk klustring', 'so': 'Evaluating Hierarchies of Verb Argument Structure with Hierarchical Clustering', 'ta': 'வெர்ப் ஆரம்ப கட்டுப்பாட்டின் உயர்நிலை கூட்டத்துடன் மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'ہیرشیکل کلسٹرینگ کے ساتھ Verb Argument Structure کی تعلیم کی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá các khả năng sinh hoạt cấu trúc kết hợp với Các tập đoàn', 'da': 'Evaluering af hierarkier af verb argumentstruktur med hierarkisk klyngning', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje hijerarija Verb Argument strukture s hijerarhičkim skusterima', 'de': 'Bewertung von Hierarchien der Verbargumentstruktur mit hierarchischem Clustering', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Hierarki Struktur Argumen Verb dengan Klastering Hierarkis', 'bg': 'Оценка на йерархията на структурата на аргумента на глаголите с йерархично клъстериране', 'nl': 'Het evalueren van hiërarchieën van woordargumentstructuur met hiërarchische clustering', 'fa': 'ارزیابی مجموعه ساختار ارزیابی Verb با کلاسترینگ جراحی', 'sw': 'Kuthibitisha Miundombinu ya Makubaliano ya Uamuzi na Makundi ya Kimataifa', 'af': 'Evalueer Hierarchies van Verb Argument Struktuur met Hierarchical Clustering', 'tr': 'Hierarchical Clustering bilen Verb Argument strukturasynyň hiýerarhiýasyny çykýar', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'ko': '차원 집합법으로 동사 논원 구조의 차원성을 평가하다', 'bn': 'ভার্ব আর্গুমেন্ট ক্লাস্টারিং এর হিরেরাচিত্র পরিচালিত হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje hijerarhija Verb Argumentske strukture sa hijerarhičkim klusterima', 'sq': 'Evaluating Hierarchies of Verb Argument Structure with Hierarchical Clustering', 'hy': 'Հիերարխիկական խմբավորումների հիերարխիաների գնահատումը', 'ca': 'Evaluant Hierarquies of Verb Argument Structure with Hierarchical Clustering', 'az': 'Hierarchical Clustering vasitÉ™silÉ™ Verb Argument strukturasÄ±nÄ±n hierarhiyalarÄ±nÄ± deÄźerlendirmÉ™k', 'et': 'Verbi argumendi struktuuri hierarhiate hindamine hierarhilise klastritega', 'fi': 'Verbin argumenttirakenteen hierarkioiden arviointi hierarkisella klusteroinnilla', 'cs': 'Hodnocení hierarchie slovesné argumentové struktury s hierarchickým shlukováním', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'הערכה של הייררכיות של מבנה ארגון מילים עם הרכיבה הייררכית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vrednotenje hierarhij strukture argumenta glagolov z hierarhičnim združevanjem', 'bo': 'Evaluating Hierarchies of Verb Argument Structure with Hierarchical Clustering'}
{'en': 'Verbs can only be used with a few specific arrangements of their arguments (syntactic frames). Most theorists note that verbs can be organized into a hierarchy of verb classes based on the frames they admit. Here we show that such a hierarchy is objectively well-supported by the patterns of verbs and frames in English, since a systematic hierarchical clustering algorithm converges on the same structure as the handcrafted taxonomy of VerbNet, a broad-coverage verb lexicon. We also show that the hierarchies capture meaningful psychological dimensions of generalization by predicting novel verb coercions by human participants. We discuss limitations of a simple hierarchical representation and suggest similar approaches for identifying the representations underpinning verb argument structure.', 'ar': 'لا يمكن استخدام الأفعال إلا مع عدد قليل من الترتيبات المحددة لحججها (الإطارات النحوية). يلاحظ معظم المنظرين أنه يمكن تنظيم الأفعال في تسلسل هرمي لفئات الفعل بناءً على الإطارات التي يعترفون بها. نوضح هنا أن مثل هذا التسلسل الهرمي مدعوم بشكل موضوعي من خلال أنماط الأفعال والأطر باللغة الإنجليزية ، نظرًا لأن خوارزمية التجميع الهرمي المنتظم تتقارب على نفس البنية مثل التصنيف اليدوي لـ VerbNet ، وهو معجم فعل واسع التغطية. نظهر أيضًا أن التسلسلات الهرمية تلتقط أبعادًا نفسية ذات مغزى للتعميم من خلال التنبؤ بإكراه الأفعال الجديدة من قبل المشاركين البشريين. نناقش قيود التمثيل الهرمي البسيط ونقترح طرقًا مماثلة لتحديد التمثيلات التي تقوم عليها بنية حجة الفعل.', 'es': 'Los verbos solo se pueden usar con unos pocos arreglos específicos de sus argumentos (marcos sintácticos). La mayoría de los teóricos notan que los verbos se pueden organizar en una jerarquía de clases de verbos en función de los marcos que admiten. Aquí mostramos que tal jerarquía está objetivamente bien respaldada por los patrones de verbos y marcos en inglés, ya que un algoritmo de agrupamiento jerárquico sistemático converge en la misma estructura que la taxonomía artesanal de verbMAPNet, un léxico de verbos de amplia cobertura. También mostramos que las jerarquías capturan dimensiones psicológicas significativas de la generalización al predecir nuevas coerciones verbales por parte de participantes humanos. Discutimos las limitaciones de una representación jerárquica simple y sugerimos enfoques similares para identificar las representaciones que sustentan la estructura de los argumentos verbales.', 'pt': 'Os verbos só podem ser usados com alguns arranjos específicos de seus argumentos (quadros sintáticos). A maioria dos teóricos observa que os verbos podem ser organizados em uma hierarquia de classes verbais com base nos quadros que eles admitem. Aqui mostramos que tal hierarquia é objetivamente bem suportada pelos padrões de verbos e frames em inglês, uma vez que um algoritmo de agrupamento hierárquico sistemático converge na mesma estrutura da taxonomia artesanal do VerbNet, um léxico verbal de ampla cobertura. Também mostramos que as hierarquias capturam dimensões psicológicas significativas de generalização ao prever novas coerções verbais por participantes humanos. Discutimos as limitações de uma representação hierárquica simples e sugerimos abordagens semelhantes para identificar as representações que sustentam a estrutura argumentativa dos verbos.', 'fr': "Les verbes ne peuvent être utilisés qu'avec quelques arrangements spécifiques de leurs arguments (cadres syntaxiques). La plupart des théoriciens notent que les verbes peuvent être organisés en une hiérarchie de classes de verbes en fonction des cadres qu'ils admettent. Nous montrons ici qu'une telle hiérarchie est objectivement bien soutenue par les modèles de verbes et de cadres en anglais, puisqu'un algorithme de clustering hiérarchique systématique converge vers la même structure que la taxonomie artisanale de VerbNet, un lexique de verbes à large couverture. Nous montrons également que les hiérarchies saisissent les dimensions psychologiques significatives de la généralisation en prédisant de nouvelles coercitions verbales par des participants humains. Nous discutons des limites d'une représentation hiérarchique simple et suggérons des approches similaires pour identifier les représentations qui sous-tendent la structure des arguments verbaux.", 'ja': '動詞は、引数のいくつかの特定の配置（構文フレーム）でのみ使用できます。ほとんどの理論家は、動詞は認めるフレームに基づいて動詞クラスの階層に編成することができることを指摘している。ここでは、このような階層は、英語の動詞とフレームのパターンによって客観的に十分にサポートされていることを示します。なぜなら、体系的な階層クラスタリングアルゴリズムは、広範囲の動詞辞書であるVerbNetの手作り分類法と同じ構造に収束するからです。また、階層は、人間の参加者による新規動詞の強制を予測することによって、一般化の意味のある心理学的次元を捉えることを示している。私たちは、単純な階層的表現の限界について議論し、動詞の引数構造の基礎となる表現を識別するための同様のアプローチを提案します。', 'ru': 'Глаголы могут использоваться только с несколькими конкретными расположениями их аргументов (синтаксическими фреймами). Большинство теоретиков отмечают, что глаголы могут быть организованы в иерархию классов глаголов на основе принятых ими фреймов. Здесь мы показываем, что такая иерархия объективно хорошо подкреплена шаблонами глаголов и фреймов в английском языке, так как систематический алгоритм иерархической кластеризации сходится по той же структуре, что и ручная таксономия VerbNet, широкополосного глагольного лексикона. Мы также показываем, что иерархии захватывают значимые психологические измерения обобщения, предсказывая новые глагольные принуждения со стороны участников-человеков. Мы обсуждаем ограничения простого иерархического представления и предлагаем аналогичные подходы для идентификации представлений, лежащих в основе структуры аргументов глагола.', 'hi': 'क्रियाओं का उपयोग केवल उनके तर्कों (वाक्यात्मक फ्रेम) की कुछ विशिष्ट व्यवस्थाओं के साथ किया जा सकता है। अधिकांश सिद्धांतकार ध्यान दें कि क्रियाओं को उनके द्वारा स्वीकार किए जाने वाले फ्रेम के आधार पर क्रिया वर्गों के पदानुक्रम में व्यवस्थित किया जा सकता है। यहां हम दिखाते हैं कि इस तरह के पदानुक्रम को अंग्रेजी में क्रियाओं और फ्रेम के पैटर्न द्वारा निष्पक्ष रूप से अच्छी तरह से समर्थित किया जाता है, क्योंकि एक व्यवस्थित पदानुक्रमित क्लस्टरिंग एल्गोरिथ्म क्रियानेट के हस्तशिल्प वर्गीकरण के समान संरचना पर अभिसरण करता है, जो एक व्यापक कवरेज क्रिया शब्दकोश है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि पदानुक्रम मानव प्रतिभागियों द्वारा उपन्यास क्रिया जबरदस्ती की भविष्यवाणी करके सामान्यीकरण के सार्थक मनोवैज्ञानिक आयामों को कैप्चर करते हैं। हम एक सरल पदानुक्रमित प्रतिनिधित्व की सीमाओं पर चर्चा करते हैं और क्रिया तर्क संरचना को रेखांकित करने वाले प्रतिनिधित्व की पहचान करने के लिए समान दृष्टिकोण सुझाते हैं।', 'zh': '动词与其参数(句法框架)者特定列而用之。 大抵理论家指,动词可随其框架为动词类之层次结构。 以此言之,层次结构得英语中动词与框架式相扶持,盖系统之分聚类算法敛于VerbNet工分类法同构,VerbNet一覆盖之动词词典也。 又明层次结构以占人参与者之新动词胁而获其有义之心维度。 论简分之局限性,立象以识动词参数。', 'ga': 'Ní féidir briathra a úsáid ach le roinnt socruithe sonracha dá n-argóintí (frámaí comhréire). Tugann an chuid is mó de na teoiriceoirí faoi deara gur féidir briathra a eagrú ina n-ordlathas de ranganna briathar bunaithe ar na frámaí a admhaíonn siad. Léirímid anseo go dtacaítear go hoibiachtúil le hordlathas dá leithéid ó phatrúin na mbriathra agus na bhfrámaí sa Bhéarla, ós rud é go dtagann algartam cnuasaithe ordlathach córasach le chéile ar an struchtúr céanna le tacsanomaíocht lámhcheirde VerbNet, foclóir briathar a bhfuil clúdach leathan air. Léirímid freisin go sealbhaíonn na hordlathais gnéithe síceolaíochta bríonna den ghinearálú trí chomhéigean na mbriathra núíosacha ag rannpháirtithe daonna a thuar. Pléimid na teorainneacha a bhaineann le hionadaíocht ordlathach shimplí agus molaimid cineálacha cur chuige comhchosúla chun na huiríll atá mar bhonn agus thaca ag struchtúr argóint na mbriathra a shainaithint.', 'ka': 'გვერბები შეიძლება გამოყენება მხოლოდ მათი არგუმენტების რამდენიმე განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებით (სინტაქტიული ფრამებით). უფრო მეტი თეორიანტები იცის, რომ გერბები შეიძლება ორგანიზაცია ვერბის კლასების თეორაციაში, რომლებიც მიღებენ ფრამებზე დაბაზიან. აქ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი იერაქტია ვერბების და ფემების მონაცემებით ძალიან მხარდაჭერებული, რადგან სისტემატიკური იერაქტიკური კლასტერმის ალგორტიმმა იგივე სტრუქტურაზე, როგორც VerbNet-ის დაკავშირებული რაკონო ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ იერაქტიები გენერალიზაციის მნიშვნელოვანი ფსიკოლოგიური განზომილებების შესახებ, რომელიც ადამიანის სხვადასხველების პრომენტური გერბის და ჩვენ ვისაუბრობთ საუკეთესო ჰიერაქტიკური გამოსახულებების დასახულება და მისაუბრობთ განსახულებელი პროგრამეტრებების განსახულება, რომელიც გერბა არგორმენტის', 'hu': 'Az igék csak néhány konkrét elrendezéssel használhatók (szintaktikus keretek). A legtöbb teoretikus megjegyzi, hogy az igék az igék hierarchiájába rendezhetők, az általuk elismert keretek alapján. Itt megmutatjuk, hogy egy ilyen hierarchiát objektíven jól támogatják az angol igék és keretek mintázatai, mivel egy szisztematikus hierarchikus klaszterezési algoritmus ugyanarra a struktúrára konvergál, mint a VerbNet, egy széles körű ige lexikon kézműves taxonómiája. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy a hierarchiák az általánosítás jelentős pszichológiai dimenzióit az emberi résztvevők új igéinek kényszerítésével rögzítik. Megvitatjuk az egyszerű hierarchikus ábrázolás korlátait, és hasonló megközelítéseket javasolunk az ige argumentum struktúráját alátámasztó ábrázolások azonosítására.', 'el': 'Τα ρήματα μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν μόνο με μερικές συγκεκριμένες ρυθμίσεις των ορίων τους (συντακτικά πλαίσια). Οι περισσότεροι θεωρητικοί σημειώνουν ότι τα ρήματα μπορούν να οργανωθούν σε μια ιεραρχία τάξεων ρήματος με βάση τα πλαίσια που δέχονται. Εδώ δείχνουμε ότι μια τέτοια ιεραρχία υποστηρίζεται αντικειμενικά καλά από τα μοτίβα των ρήμων και των πλαισίων στα αγγλικά, δεδομένου ότι ένας συστηματικός ιεραρχικός αλγόριθμος ομαδοποίησης συγκλίνει στην ίδια δομή με την χειροποίητη ταξινομία του ενός λεξικού ρήματος ευρείας κάλυψης. Επίσης, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι ιεραρχίες αιχμαλωτίζουν σημαντικές ψυχολογικές διαστάσεις της γενικοποίησης προβλέποντας νέους εξαναγκασμούς ρήματος από τους ανθρώπους. Συζητούμε τους περιορισμούς μιας απλής ιεραρχικής αναπαράστασης και προτείνουμε παρόμοιες προσεγγίσεις για τον προσδιορισμό των αναπαραστάσεων που στηρίζουν τη δομή των επιχειρημάτων ρήματος.', 'lt': 'Žodžiai gali būti naudojami tik su keliomis konkrečiomis jų argumentų struktūromis (sintaksiniais rėmais). Dauguma teorijų pažymi, kad žodžiai gali būti organizuojami į žodžių klasių hierarchiją, grindžiamą jų pripažintais rėmais. Čia rodome, kad tokia hierarchija objektyviai gerai remiama žodžių ir rėmų pavyzdžiais anglų kalba, nes sistemingas hierarchinis klasterizavimo algoritmas konvergencija toje pačioje struktūroje kaip ir rankinė VerbNet taksonomija, plačiai aprėptų žodžių leksikonas. Taip pat rodome, kad hierarchijos apima prasmingus psichologinius generalizacijos aspektus prognozuodamos naujus žmonių dalyvių žodžius. Mes aptariame paprasto hierarchinio atstovavimo apribojimus ir siūlome panašius metodus, kaip nustatyti atstovavimus, kuriais grindžiama žodžių argument ų struktūra.', 'it': 'I verbi possono essere usati solo con alcune disposizioni specifiche dei loro argomenti (frame sintattici). La maggior parte dei teorici nota che i verbi possono essere organizzati in una gerarchia di classi di verbi in base ai fotogrammi che ammettono. Qui mostriamo che tale gerarchia è oggettivamente ben supportata dai modelli di verbi e frame in inglese, poiché un algoritmo di clustering gerarchico sistematico converge sulla stessa struttura della tassonomia artigianale di VerbNet, un lessico verbale ad ampia copertura. Mostriamo anche che le gerarchie catturano significative dimensioni psicologiche della generalizzazione predicendo nuove coercizioni verbali da parte dei partecipanti umani. Discutiamo le limitazioni di una semplice rappresentazione gerarchica e proponiamo approcci simili per identificare le rappresentazioni alla base della struttura degli argomenti verbali.', 'kk': 'Вербтер тек бірнеше аргументтері (синтактикалық фреймдер) аргументтерімен қолданылады. Теоретикалардың көпшілігі келтірілген фреймдеріне негізделген вербалардың иерархиясына құрылуға болады. Мұнда біз бұл иерархияны ағылшын тіліндегі вербалар мен фреймдер үлгілерінде жақсы қолданылатын көрсеткіземіз, себебі жүйелік иерархиялық кластерлік алгоритм VerbNet құрылған таксономиясының құрылымына бірдей құрылымына сәйкес келеді. Бұ Біз сондай-ақ иерархиялар жалпы психологиялық өлшемдерін түсіндіреді, адамдар қатысушыларының романдық верб тәжірибесін алдын алады. Біз қарапайым иерархиялық түсініктеменің шектеулерін талқылап, Верб аргументтің құрылғысының негіздеген түсініктерін анықтау үшін ұқсас жағдайларын таңдаймыз.', 'ml': 'അവയുടെ ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറുകളുടെ കുറച്ച് പ്രത്യേക സംഘടിപ്പുകള്\u200d മാത്രമേ വേര്\u200dവുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക് ഏറ്റവും പേരും തീവ്രവാദികള്\u200d കുറിച്ച് അറിയുന്നുണ്ട്, വാര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200d സ്വീകരിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വ ഇവിടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഇതുപോലുള്ള ഹിയേരാര്\u200dച്ചി ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ വാര്\u200dവര്\u200dത്തുകളുടെയും ഫ്രെയിമ്മുകളുടെയും രൂപങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു സിസ്റ്ററിക്കല്\u200d ഹിയേരാര മനുഷ്യരുടെ പങ്കാളികളാല്\u200d നോവല്\u200d വാര്\u200dബ് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കികള്\u200d ഉദാര്\u200dശ്യമായ സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d മാനസി ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ ഹീയറാര്\u200dക്കിക് പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പരിധികള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. അതുപോലുള്ള വഴികള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത്', 'ms': 'Verb hanya boleh digunakan dengan beberapa pengaturan khusus argumen mereka (bingkai sintaktik). Kebanyakan ahli teori menyadari bahawa verb boleh diatur ke dalam hierarki kelas verb berdasarkan bingkai yang mereka akui. Di sini kita menunjukkan bahawa hierarki seperti ini secara objektif disokong dengan baik oleh corak verb dan bingkai dalam bahasa Inggeris, kerana algoritma pengkumpulan hierarkis sistemik berkumpul pada struktur yang sama dengan taksonomi buatan tangan VerbNet, sebuah leksikon verb yang meliputi lebar. We also show that the hierarchies capture meaningful psychological dimensions of generalization by predicting novel verb coercions by human participants.  Kami bincang terhadap perkembangan hierarkis sederhana dan menyarankan pendekatan yang sama untuk mengenalpasti perkembangan yang mendasarkan struktur argumen verb.', 'mt': 'Il-verbs jistgħu jintużaw biss bi ftit arranġamenti speċifiċi tal-argumenti tagħhom (oqfsa sintetiċi). Il-biċċa l-kbira tat-teoristi jinnota li l-verbs jistgħu jiġu organizzati f’ġerarkija ta’ klassijiet ta’ verbs ibbażati fuq l-oqfsa li jammettu. Hawnhekk naraw li ġerarkija bħal din hija appoġġjata oġġettivament tajjeb mix-xejriet ta’ verbs u oqfsa bl-Ingliż, peress li algoritmu ta’ raggruppament ġerarkiku sistematiku jikkonverġi fuq l-istess struttura bħat-tassonomija maħduma bl-idejn ta’ VerbNet, lexicon ta’ verb b’kopertura wiesgħa. Aħna nuru wkoll li l-ġerarkiji jaqbdu dimensjonijiet psikoloġiċi sinifikanti tal-ġeneralizzazzjoni billi jipprevedu forzi ġodda ta’ verb minn parteċipanti umani. Aħna niddiskutu l-limitazzjonijiet ta’ rappreżentanza ġerarkika sempliċi u ssuġġerixxu approċċi simili għall-identifikazzjoni tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet li jsostnu l-istruttura tal-argument tal-verb.', 'mk': 'Верховите можат да се користат само со неколку специфични аранжмани на нивните аргументи (синтактички рамки). Повеќето теористи забележуваат дека јазиците можат да се организираат во хиерархија на класи на јазици базирани на рамките кои ги признаваат. Овде покажуваме дека ваквата хиерархија е објективно добро поддржана од шемите на јазички декларации и рамки, бидејќи систематичниот хиерархички алгоритм за групирање се конвергерира на истата структура како рачната таксономија на Вербенет, лексикон на широко покриени декларации. Исто така покажуваме дека хиерархиите заземаат значајни психолошки димензии на генерализацијата предвидувајќи нови присилувања од страна на човечките учесници. Разговараме за ограничувањата на едноставното хиерархиско претставување и предлагаме слични пристапи за идентификување на претставувањата на кои се поддржува структурата на јаголски аргумент.', 'mn': 'Зөвхөн аргументуудын хэд хэдэн тодорхой аргументууд (синтактик фрэймүүд) ашиглаж болно. Ихэнх теорикчууд хэлний хэлний хичээлд зохион байгуулж чадна гэдгийг анзаардаг. Энд бид иймэрхүү дүрслэл Англи хэлний хэлбэрээр сайн дэмжигддэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Учир нь систематикийн дүрслэлийн алгоритм VerbNet-ийн гар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй адилхан бүтэц дээр холбогддог. Бид мөн түүнд хүмүүсийн оролцогчдын шинэ үгийн хүчирхийллийг тодорхойлж, сэтгэл зүйн үнэ цэнэтэй хэмжээсүүдийг барьж авдаг. Бид энгийн дүрслэлийн хязгаарлалтыг ярьж, үгийн аргументын бүтцийг тодорхойлох төстэй арга замыг илэрхийлэх боломжтой арга замыг илэрхийлж байна.', 'pl': 'Czasowniki mogą być używane tylko z kilkoma specyficznymi aranżacjami ich argumentów (ramki składni). Większość teoretyków zauważa, że czasowniki mogą być zorganizowane w hierarchię klas czasowników w oparciu o przyjęte ramki. Tutaj pokazujemy, że taka hierarchia jest obiektywnie dobrze wspierana przez wzorce czasowników i ram w języku angielskim, ponieważ systematyczny algorytm klastrowania hierarchicznego zbiega się na tej samej strukturze co ręcznie wykonana taksonomia VerbNet, leksykonu czasowników o szerokim zasięgu. Pokazujemy również, że hierarchia uwzględnia znaczące psychologiczne wymiary uogólnienia poprzez przewidywanie nowych przymusów czasownikowych przez uczestników człowieka. Omówimy ograniczenia prostej reprezentacji hierarchicznej i proponujemy podobne podejścia do identyfikacji reprezentacji leżących u podstaw struktury argumentów czasownika.', 'no': 'Verb kan berre brukast med nokre spesifikke arrangeringar av argumentene sine (syntaktiske rammer). Dei fleste teoristane merker på at verbar kan organiserast i ein hierarki av verbklasser basert på ramma dei inngjev. Her viser vi at slike hierarki er objektivt godt støtta av mønsterene for verbar og rammer på engelsk, sidan ein systematisk hierarkisk klasseringsalgoritme konverrer på den same strukturen som den handkrevne taksonomien av VerbNet, eit breiddekkeverbleksikon. Vi viser også at hierarkitetene hentar betydelige psihologiske dimensjonar av generalisering ved å foregå novelle verb-forsikningar av menneske deltakarar. Vi diskuterer avgrensingar av ein enkel hierarkisk representasjon og foreslår liknande tilnærmingar for å identifisera representasjonane under verb argument-struktur.', 'ro': 'Verbele pot fi folosite doar cu câteva aranjamente specifice ale argumentelor lor (cadre sintactice). Majoritatea teoreticienilor observă că verbele pot fi organizate într-o ierarhie de clase de verbe bazate pe cadrele pe care le admit. Aici arătăm că o astfel de ierarhie este obiectiv bine susținută de modelele verbelor și cadrelor în limba engleză, deoarece un algoritm sistematic de clusterizare ierarhică converge pe aceeași structură ca taxonomia manuală a VerbNet, un lexicon verbal cu acoperire largă. De asemenea, arătăm că ierarhiile captează dimensiuni psihologice semnificative ale generalizării prin prezicerea unor noi constrângeri verbale de către participanții umani. Discutăm limitările unei reprezentări ierarhice simple și sugerăm abordări similare pentru identificarea reprezentărilor care stau la baza structurii argumentelor verbelor.', 'sr': 'Verbi se mogu koristiti samo sa nekoliko specifičnih aranžmana njihovih argumenata (sintaktičnih ramena). Većina teoretičara primećuje da se verbi mogu organizirati u hijerarhiju klasa verb a na osnovu okvira koje priznaju. Ovde pokazujemo da je takva hijerarhija objektivno dobro podržana obrascima verb a i okvira na engleskom jeziku, pošto sistematski hijerarhički algoritam skupljanja konverzuje na istoj strukturi kao što je ručna taksonomija VerbNeta, široko pokrivena verbalna leksikona. Takođe pokazujemo da hijerarhije uhvate značajne psihološke dimenzije generalizacije predviđajući nove verbske prisiljke ljudskih sudionika. Razgovaramo o ograničenjima jednostavnog hijerarhijskog predstavljanja i predlažemo slične pristupe za identifikaciju predstavljanja pod strukturom verbalnih argument a.', 'si': 'වර්බ්ස් විශේෂ විශේෂ සැකසුම් කිහිපයක් විතරයි ඔවුන්ගේ වාර්තාව (සැන්ටක්ටික් ෆ්\u200dරේම් ව ගොඩක් සාධාරණාත්මකාරයෝ දැනගන්නවා කියලා වාර්තාවක් පුළුවන් කියලා කියලා ඔවුන් පිළිගන්න පුළුව මෙතන අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ වර්ගයක් හා ෆ්\u200dරේම් වලින් හොඳින් සහයෙන් තියෙනවා කියලා, පද්ධතික අභ්\u200dයාගයක් අල්ගෝරිතම් සම්බන්ධ වෙ අපි වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ අයිරිකාශියෝ මිනිස්සු සාමාන්\u200dය අයිතිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා. අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ගැන සීමාවක් කතා කරනවා ඒ වගේම සමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික විශ්වාස කරන', 'so': 'Arimaha waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa hal qabsasho gaar ah oo ka mid ah arrimaha ay ku qoran yihiin (tababarada dhexe). Tiyaariyiinta badankoodu waxay fiiriyaan in hadallada lagu qabanqaabin karo fasalka warqadda oo ku saleysan tababarka ay qiimeeyaan. Halkan waxaynu tusnaynaa in hierarchi oo kale si khatar ah loogu kaalmeeyo qaababka afka Ingiriiska, sababtoo ah qoraalka hierarchical clustering algorithm wuxuu ku beddelaa isku dhismo oo la mid ah xisaabta gacanta lagu qabtay VerbNet, kaas oo ah warqad ballaadhan oo lexicon ah. We also show that the hierarchies capture meaningful psychological dimensions of generalization by predicting novel verb coercions by human participants.  Waxaannu kala sheekaynaa xadiiqooyin u sahlan muuqashada hierarkiisa, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qaabab la mid ah si aan u aqoonsanno noocyada dhismaha warqada ah ee ku qoran.', 'sv': 'Verb kan endast användas med ett fåtal specifika arrangemang av deras argument (syntaktiska ramar). De flesta teoretiker noterar att verb kan organiseras i en hierarki av verbklasser baserat på de ramar de erkänner. Här visar vi att en sådan hierarki objektivt stöds väl av mönster av verb och ramar på engelska, eftersom en systematisk hierarkisk klustringsalgoritm konvergerar mot samma struktur som den handgjorda taxonomin i VerbNet, ett verblexikon med bred täckning. Vi visar också att hierarkierna fångar meningsfulla psykologiska dimensioner av generalisering genom att förutsäga nya verbtvång av mänskliga deltagare. Vi diskuterar begränsningar av en enkel hierarkisk representation och föreslår liknande tillvägagångssätt för att identifiera representationer som ligger till grund för verbargumentsstrukturen.', 'ta': 'தங்கள் வார்ப்புருக்களின் சில குறிப்பிட்ட அமைப்புகளுடன் மட்டும் விருப்பங்கள் பயன்படுத்த முடியும் (ஒ Most theorists note that verbs can be organized into a hierarchy of verb classes based on the frames they admit.  இங்கே நாம் ஒரு போன்ற hierarchy என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம் வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் சட்டத்தின் வடிவங்களால் நன்றாக ஆதரிக்கப்படுகிறது, ஏனென்றால் ஒரு அமைப்பான hierarchical clustering algorithm மாறுகிறது வெர்ப்நெட மேலும் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அதாவது பொருத்தமான மனநிலையான பரிமாணங்களைப் பிடித்துக் கொண்டுள்ளது என்பதை மனித பங்குகிறவர்கள நாங்கள் ஒரு சுலபமான முதலீட்டு பிரதிநிதியின் எல்லைகளை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் அதே வழிகளை காண்பிக்க முடியும் என்ற', 'ur': 'Verbs can only be used with a few specific arrangements of their arguments (syntactic frames). اکثر تئوریس کرنے والوں نے یاد رکھا ہے کہ ویروں کو ویروں کلاس کے ایک حکومت میں سازما کر سکتے ہیں جو ان کی قبول کرتی ہیں. یہاں ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایسی آلگریٹی ویروں اور فرموں کے پٹرنے سے اچھی طرح مدد کی جاتی ہے، کیونکہ ایک سیستماتیک آلگریٹی الگوریٹم ایک ساختار پر VerbNet کے ہاتھ پیدا کئے ہوئے تاکسانومیٹ کے ساتھ ملتی ہے، ایک پھیلائی آلگریٹ ویروں کا لکسیکن. ہم نے بھی دکھایا ہے کہ افراد جنرال کی معنی روانشن اندازے کو انسان شرکت کرنے والوں کے ذریعے نئی کلام کی تحقیق کی پیش بینی کے ذریعے پکڑتے ہیں. ہم ایک ساده حیراتیکی نمایش کی محدودیتوں سے بحث کرتے ہیں اور مشابہ طریقوں کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے مشابہ کرتے ہیں کہ کلام حکومت کی سامان کے نیچے دکھائے جاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Verbs can only be used with a few specific arrangements of their arguments (syntactic frames).  Ko'pchilik theoristlar aytganda, so'zlarni ishlatadigan freymlar asosida yaratilgan verb sinfning bir darajaga tayyorlash mumkin. Bu yerda biz shunday hierarchiya ingliz tilidagi verb va freymlar shakllari bilan yaxshi qo'llaniladi, chunki tizim hierarchik klgoritning algorithi bir tuzuvda qo'llangan taxonomi VerbNet'ning bir qanchalik qo'llangan taxonoma, kichkina leksisiyoning qismlari. Biz shunday ko'rsatganimiz, hierarchalar inson participlarning novel tashkilotlarini tasavvur qilish orqali o'rganishga ma'lum psykologik shakllarini o'rganadi. Biz oddiy hierarchik tashkilotlarini talab qilamiz va bir xil usullarni aniqlash uchun bir xil usullarni talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Các chữ viết chỉ có thể sử dụng với vài cách sắp xếp cụ thể của các đối tượng (khung pháp thuật). Hầu hết các nhà lý luận chú ý rằng các động từ có thể được sắp xếp theo cấp bậc của các động từ dựa trên các khung mà họ thừa nhận. Ở đây chúng tôi cho thấy rằng một hệ thống cấp bậc như vậy được hỗ trợ khách quan bởi các mô hình của các động từ và khung bằng tiếng Anh, vì một thuật toán phân loại có hệ thống phân loại hội tụ cùng cấu trúc với các phân loại nhỏ của Verbit, một ngôn ngữ rộng rãi. Chúng ta cũng cho thấy rằng các cấp dưới nắm bắt những kích thước tâm lý có ý nghĩa của việc tổng hợp bằng cách dự đoán những ép buộc động từ mới của người. Chúng ta thảo luận các giới hạn của sự phân biệt cấp trên đơn giản và đề xuất các phương pháp tương tự để xác định các biểu hiện củng cố cấu trúc tranh cãi động từ.', 'da': 'Verber kan kun bruges med nogle få specifikke arrangementer af deres argumenter (syntaktiske rammer). De fleste teoretikere bemærker, at verber kan organiseres i et hierarki af verbeklasser baseret på de rammer, de indrømmer. Her viser vi, at et sådant hierarki objektivt er godt understøttet af mønstrene af verber og rammer på engelsk, da en systematisk hierarkisk klyngealgoritme konvergerer på samme struktur som den håndlavede taksonomi af VerbNet, et bredt dækkende ordleksikon. Vi viser også, at hierarkierne fanger meningsfulde psykologiske dimensioner af generalisering ved at forudsige nye verber tvang fra menneskelige deltagere. Vi diskuterer begrænsninger af en simpel hierarkisk repræsentation og foreslår lignende tilgange til at identificere de repræsentationer, der understøtter verbets argumentstruktur.', 'nl': 'Woorden kunnen alleen worden gebruikt met een paar specifieke arrangementen van hun argumenten (syntactische frames). De meeste theoretici merken op dat werkwoorden kunnen worden georganiseerd in een hiërarchie van werkwoordklassen op basis van de frames die ze toelaten. Hier laten we zien dat een dergelijke hiërarchie objectief goed ondersteund wordt door de patronen van werkwoorden en frames in het Engels, aangezien een systematisch hiërarchisch clusteringsalgoritme convergeert op dezelfde structuur als de handgemaakte taxonomie van VerbNet, een werkwoordenlexicon met een brede dekking. We laten ook zien dat de hiërarchieën betekenisvolle psychologische dimensies van generalisatie vastleggen door nieuwe werkwoordverdrukkingen door menselijke deelnemers te voorspellen. We bespreken beperkingen van een eenvoudige hiërarchische representatie en stellen vergelijkbare benaderingen voor voor het identificeren van de representaties die ten grondslag liggen aan de werkwoord argumentstructuur.', 'bg': 'Глаголите могат да се използват само с няколко специфични подреждания на техните аргументи (синтактични рамки). Повечето теоретици отбелязват, че глаголите могат да бъдат организирани в йерархия от класове глаголи въз основа на рамките, които приемат. Тук показваме, че такава йерархия е обективно добре подкрепена от моделите на глаголите и рамките на английски език, тъй като систематичният йерархичен алгоритъм за клъстериране се сближава в същата структура като ръчно изработената таксономия на глаголен лексикон с широко покритие. Показваме също, че йерархиите улавят смислени психологически измерения на обобщаването чрез предсказване на нови глаголни принуди от страна на участниците в човека. Обсъждаме ограниченията на простото йерархично представяне и предлагаме сходни подходи за идентифициране на представителствата в основата на структурата на аргументите на глаголите.', 'id': 'Verb hanya dapat digunakan dengan beberapa aturan spesifik dari argumen mereka (bingkai sintaks). Kebanyakan teori menyadari bahwa verb dapat diatur menjadi hierarki kelas verb berdasarkan bingkai yang mereka akui. Di sini kita menunjukkan bahwa hierarki seperti itu secara objektif didukung dengan pola verb dan bingkai dalam bahasa Inggris, karena algoritma berkumpul hierarkis sistematis berkumpul pada struktur yang sama dengan taksonomi buatan tangan VerbNet, sebuah leksikon verb lebar. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa hierarki menangkap dimensi psikologis yang berarti dari generalisasi dengan memprediksi paksa verb baru oleh peserta manusia. Kami mendiskusikan batasan dari representation hierarkis sederhana dan menyarankan pendekatan yang sama untuk mengidentifikasi representation yang mendasarkan struktur argumen verb.', 'de': 'Verben können nur mit wenigen spezifischen Anordnungen ihrer Argumente (syntaktische Frames) verwendet werden. Die meisten Theoretiker bemerken, dass Verben in eine Hierarchie von Verbklassen organisiert werden können, basierend auf den Frames, die sie zulassen. Hier zeigen wir, dass eine solche Hierarchie objektiv durch die Muster von Verben und Frames im Englischen unterstützt wird, da ein systematischer hierarchischer Clustering-Algorithmus auf der gleichen Struktur konvergiert wie die handgefertigte Taxonomie von VerbNet, einem Verblexikon mit breiter Abdeckung. Wir zeigen auch, dass die Hierarchien sinnvolle psychologische Dimensionen der Generalisierung erfassen, indem sie neuartige Verbzwange menschlicher Teilnehmer vorhersagen. Wir diskutieren Grenzen einer einfachen hierarchischen Repräsentation und schlagen ähnliche Ansätze vor, um die Repräsentationen zu identifizieren, die Verbargumentstruktur zugrunde liegen.', 'fa': 'ورزها فقط با چند تنظیمات خاصی از ارجمندهای آنها (فرم\u200cهای سنتاکتیک) استفاده می\u200cشوند. بیشتر تئوریست\u200cشناسان یاد می\u200cگیرند که کلاس\u200cها می\u200cتوانند در یک کلاس\u200cهای کلاس\u200cهای عبارت بر اساس چوکات\u200cهایی که اعتراف می\u200cکنند سازمان می\u200cشوند. در اینجا نشان می دهیم که این سیاراتیک از طریق الگوریتم\u200cها و فرم\u200cهای انگلیسی به طور موضوع خوب پشتیبانی می\u200cشود، از آنجا که الگوریتم سیستماتیک سیاراتیکی کلاس\u200cگریتم بر یک ساختار همان مانند تاکسونوم\u200cهای دستی\u200cساخته شده VerbNet، یک زبان گسترده\u200cای است. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که دایره\u200cهای معنی روانشناسی\u200cهای ژنرال را با پیش\u200cبینی کردن مجبور شدن کلمه\u200cهای نو توسط شرکتگران انسان می\u200cگیرند. ما در مورد محدودیت های یک نمایش معمولی ساده صحبت می کنیم و پیشنهاد می کنیم روش\u200cهای مشابه برای شناسایی نمایش\u200cهایی که بر اساس ساختار ارجمند اصطلاحی هستند.', 'sw': 'Vitabu vinaweza kutumika kwa mikutano machache maalumu ya mazungumzo yao (mfumo wa pamoja). Wananadharia wengi wanagundua kuwa maneno yanaweza kuandaliwa katika makundi ya darasa la maneno yanayotokana na mifumo wanayokubali. Hapa tunaonyesha kwamba utaratibu wa a in a hiyo unaungwa mkono vizuri na miundo ya maneno na mifumo ya Kiingereza, kwani utambulisho wa mifumo ya kifumo unabadilika kwenye muundo huo ule kama utawala wa VerbNet, uliofanywa na habari pana za lexico. Tunaonyesha pia kwamba vikosi vya upande wa kisaikolojia kinachomaanisha utoaji kwa kutabiri ushiriki wa riwaya wa kitabu. Tunajadili vizuizi vya uwakilishaji rahisi wa mijadala na tunapendekeza njia kama hizo kwa kutambua uwakilishi wanaotumia muundo wa mjadala mzuri.', 'hr': 'Verbe se mogu koristiti samo sa nekoliko specifičnih aranžmana njihovih argumentacija (sintaktičnih ramena). Većina teoretičara primjećuje da se verbi mogu organizirati u hijerarhiju klasa verb a na temelju okvira koje priznaju. Ovdje pokazujemo da je takva hijerarhija objektivno dobro podržana obrascima verb a i okvira na engleskom jeziku, pošto se sistematski hijerarhički algoritam skupljanja konverzuje na istoj strukturi kao što je ručna taksonomija VerbNet-a, široki pokrivački verb leksikon. Također pokazujemo da hijerarhije uhvate značajne psihološke dimenzije generalizacije predviđajući nove verbalne prisiljke ljudskih učesnika. Razgovaramo o ograničenjima jednostavnog hijerarhičkog predstavljanja i predlažemo slične pristupe za identifikaciju predstavljanja pod strukturom verbalnih argument a.', 'sq': 'Fjalët mund të përdoren vetëm me disa rregullime specifike të argumenteve të tyre (korniza sintaktike). Shumica e teoristëve vënë në dukje se verb ët mund të organizohen në një hierarki të klasave të verbëve bazuar në kornizat që pranojnë. Këtu ne tregojmë se një hierarki e tillë është objektivisht e mbështetur mirë nga modelet e verb ëve dhe kornizave në anglisht, pasi një algoritëm sistematik hierarkik i grupimit konvergon në të njëjtën strukturë si taksonomia me dorë e VerbNet, një lexikon verbi me mbulim të gjerë. We also show that the hierarchies capture meaningful psychological dimensions of generalization by predicting novel verb coercions by human participants.  Ne diskutojmë kufizimet e një përfaqësimi të thjeshtë hierarkik dhe sugjerojmë metoda të ngjashme për identifikimin e përfaqësimeve që mbështetin strukturën e argumentit të verb ëve.', 'af': "Bewerke kan slegs gebruik word met 'n paar spesifieke aanpassings van hul argumente (sintaktiewe rame). Die meeste teoriese nota dat verbe kan organiseer word in 'n hierarkie van verb klasse gebaseer op die rame wat hulle aanvaar. Hier wys ons dat soos 'n hierarkie is objektief goed ondersteun deur die patrone van verbe en rame in Engels, omdat 'n sistematiese hierarkies clustering algoritme konvergeer op dieselfde struktuur as die handgebruikte taksonomie van VerbNet, 'n breeddekkende verb lexikon. Ons wys ook dat die hierarkiete betekende psihologiese dimensies van generellisering vervang deur die voorskou van novele verb verhoegings deur menslike deelnaders. Ons bespreek beperkinge van 'n eenvoudige hierarkies voorstelling en voorstel soortgelyke toegange vir die identifiseer van die voorstellings onderstelling van verb argument struktuur.", 'ko': '동사는 단지 몇 개의 특정한 논점(문법 구조)과 조합하여 사용할 수 있다.대다수의 이론가들은 동사는 그들이 인정하는 틀에 따라 동사류의 차원 구조로 조직될 수 있다고 지적한다.여기서 우리는 이러한 차원 구조가 객관적으로 영어 동사와 구조 모델의 좋은 지원을 받았다는 것을 알 수 있다. 왜냐하면 하나의 체계적인 차원 분류 알고리즘과 범위가 광범위한 동사 어휘인 VerbNet의 수동 분류법이 같은 구조에서 수렴되기 때문이다.차원 구조는 인류 참여자의 새로운 동사를 예측함으로써 범화된 의미 있는 심리적 차원을 포착했다.우리는 간단한 차원 표현법의 한계성을 토론하고 동사 논원 구조를 지탱하는 표현법을 식별하는 유사한 방법을 제시했다.', 'am': 'የፊደል ውይይቶች በጥቂት በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች (Syntactic frames) ብቻ ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ ብዙዎቹ ተሳታፊዎች ቃላት በሚያስተማሩበት ፍሬም ላይ ወደምትመሳሰል የverb ክፍሎች መሠረት መሆኑን ያስተካክሉ፡፡ Here we show that such a hierarchy is objectively well-supported by the patterns of verbs and frames in English, since a systematic hierarchical clustering algorithm converges on the same structure as the handcrafted taxonomy of VerbNet, a broad-coverage verb lexicon.  እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ቀላል ተቃውሞ የማስተካከል ግንኙነቶችን እናሳውቃለን እና የመስመር ግንኙነቶችን ለመግለጽ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'az': "Verb yalnız bir neçə müəyyən dəyişiklikləri (sintaktik çerçimlər) ilə istifadə edilə bilər. Həqiqətən, çox teorisistlərin sözlərini təsdiqlədikləri fərqlərə dayanan verb sınıfların hierarhiyasına düzenlənabilir. Burada biz böyük hiyerarşin in İngilizce vergi və çerçimlərin örtüklərindən yaxşı dəstəkləndiyini göstəririk, sistematik hiyerarşik clustering algoritmi VerbNet'in əl qurulmuş taxonomiya ilə birləşdirir, geniş örtük verb leksikonu ilə birləşdirir. Biz də göstəririk ki, hiyerarhiyalar insan iştirakçıların yeni verb təsirlərini təmin edərək, generalizasiyanın anlamlı psikolojik ölçülərini alırlar. Biz sadəcə bir hiyerarşik göstəricisinin limitlərini mübahisə edirik və verb arqüd strukturunun altındakı göstəriciləri tanıtmaq üçün bənzər metodları təbliğ edirik.", 'tr': "Verplar öz argümlerinin (syntaktik çerçemeleri) birnäçe takyk düzenlemeleri bilen ullanılabilir. Köp teoristler kabul edilen çerçevelerine daýanýarlar we verb sınıplaryň hijerarhiýasyna düzenlenebilir diýipdir. Bu ýerde bir iýerarhiýanyň, verb we çerömler tarapyndan amasykly şekilde desteklenýändigini görkeýäris, sebäbi sistematik bir iýerarhiýaly çarpma algoritmi VerbNet'iň elimi ýaly çarpan taksonomiýasy bilen birleşýär. Biz hem iýerarhiýalaryň, adam iştirakçileriniň romanlary tarapyndan, generalizasyň wajyply psikolojik ölçülerini alyp barýandygyny görkeýäris. Biz basit bir hiyerarşik temsilinin sınırlarını tartıştırıp, verb argument yapısının altındaki temsilleri tanımlamak için benzer yaklaşmaları öneririz.", 'hy': "Բարտերը կարող են օգտագործվել միայն որոշ հատուկ կառուցվածքներով (սինտակտիկ շրջանակներով): Տեսաբանների մեծ մասը նկատում է, որ բայերը կարելի է կազմակերպել բայերի դասերի հիերարխիայի մեջ, հիմնված նրանց ընդունված շրջանների վրա: Այստեղ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այդպիսի հիերարխիան օբյեկտիվ լավ է աջակցում անգլերենի բայերի և շրջանների կաղապարներով, քանի որ սիստեմատիկ հիերարխիկական խմբավորող ալգորիթմը համընկնում է նույն կառուցվածքի վրա, ինչպիսին արտադրված է Վերբնետի դասակարգչային կաղապարը, բայի Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հիերարխիաները ընդհանրացման իմաստալից հոգեբանական հարթություններ են ընդունում' կանխատեսելով մարդկային մասնակիցների նոր բայերի ճնշումները: Մենք քննարկում ենք պարզ հիերարխիկական ներկայացման սահմանափակումները և առաջարկում ենք նման մոտեցումներ բայերի կառուցվածքի հիմնական ներկայացումների հայտնաբերման համար:", 'cs': 'Slovesa lze použít pouze s několika specifickými uspořádáními jejich argumentů (syntaktické rámce). Většina teoretiků poznamenává, že slovesa mohou být uspořádána do hierarchie tříd slovesa na základě přijatých rámců. Zde ukazujeme, že tato hierarchie je objektivně dobře podporována vzorci slovesa a rámců v angličtině, protože systematický hierarchický clusterovací algoritmus konverguje na stejné struktuře jako ručně vytvořená taxonomie VerbNet, širokoprýškového slovesového lexikonu. Dále ukazujeme, že hierarchie zachycují smysluplné psychologické dimenze zobecnění prostřednictvím předpovědi nových slovesových donucí lidskými účastníky. Diskutujeme omezení jednoduché hierarchické reprezentace a navrhujeme podobné přístupy pro identifikaci reprezentací, které jsou základem struktury argumentů slovesa.', 'bn': 'তাদের যুক্তির কয়েকটি নির্দিষ্ট সংক্রান্ত ব্যবহার করা যাবে (সিন্ট্যাক্টিক ফ্রেম)। বেশীর ভাগ থিওরিস্টরা লক্ষ্য করেছেন যে ভার্ব ক্লাসের হিয়ারার্কিতে তারা স্বীকার করে যে ফ্রেমের উপর ভিত্তিক ভ এখানে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই ধরনের হিয়ারেরার্কি ভালো সমর্থন করে ইংরেজী ভাষায় ভার্ভার্স এবং ফ্রেমের প্রান্ত, যেহেতু একটি সিস্টেমিক হিয়ারার্কিক্যাল ক্লাস্টারিং অ্যালগরিদম আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে হিয়ারার্কিরা মানুষের অংশগ্রহণকারীদের ধারণা দিয়ে মানসিক মানসিক মানসিক ভার্ব বাধ্যতার মাধ্ আমরা একটি সাধারণ হিয়েরার্কিল প্রতিনিধিত্বের সীমাবদ্ধ আলোচনা করি এবং প্রস্তাব করি যে প্রতিনিধিদের ভার্ব যুক্তি কাঠামো', 'bs': 'Verbe se mogu koristiti samo sa nekoliko specifičnih aranžmana njihovih argumenata (sintaktičnih ramena). Većina teoretičara primjećuje da se verbi mogu organizirati u hijerarhiju klasa verb a na temelju okvira koje priznaju. Ovdje pokazujemo da je takva hijerarhija objektivno dobro podržana obrascima verb a i okvira na engleskom jeziku, jer sistematski hijerarhički algoritam skupljanja se konverzuje na istoj strukturi kao i na ručnoj taksonomiji VerbNeta, široko pokrivajući verb leksikon. Također pokazujemo da hijerarhije uhvate značajne psihološke dimenzije generalizacije predviđajući nove verbske prisiljke ljudskih učesnika. Razgovaramo o ograničenjima jednostavnog hijerarhičkog predstavljanja i predlažemo slične pristupe za identifikaciju predstavljanja pod strukturom verbalnih argument a.', 'et': 'Verbe saab kasutada ainult mõne konkreetse argumendi korraldusega (süntaktilised raamid). Enamik teoreetikuid märgib, et tegusõnu saab organiseerida tegusõnade klasside hierarhiaks, lähtudes raamidest, mida nad tunnustavad. Siin näitame, et sellist hierarhiat toetavad objektiivselt hästi inglise keelsed tegusõnad ja raamid, kuna süstemaatiline hierarhiline klastrite algoritm läheneb samale struktuurile nagu käsitööna valmistatud taksonoomia VerbNet, laia katvusega verbileksikon. Samuti näitame, et hierarhiad hõlmavad üldistamise tähenduslikke psühholoogilisi mõõtmeid, ennustades inimosalejate uudseid tegusõnade sunne. Arutleme lihtsa hierarhilise esituse piiranguid ja soovitame sarnaseid lähenemisviise tegusõnade argumentide struktuuri aluseks olevate esituste tuvastamiseks.', 'ca': "Els verbs només poden ser utilitzats amb alguns arreglos específics dels seus arguments (marcs sinàtics). La majoria dels teòlegs observen que els verbs es poden organitzar en una jerarquia de classes de verbs basada en els marcs que admiten. Aquí demostram que aquesta jerarquia està objectivament ben sostenida pels patrons de verbs i quadres en anglès, ja que un algoritme de agrupament jerarquic sistemàtic convergeix en la mateixa estructura que la taxonomia artificial de VerbNet, un lexicó de verbs de gran cobertura. També demostram que les jerarquies capturen dimensions psicològiques significatives de la generalització predint noves coercions de verbs pels participants humans. Discutem sobre les limitacions d'una representació jeràrquica senzilla i suggerem abords similars per identificar les representacions sobre les quals es basa l'estructura dels arguments de verbs.", 'fi': 'Verbeja voidaan käyttää vain muutamilla argumenttien erityisjärjestelyillä (syntaktiset kehykset). Useimmat teoreetikot huomauttavat, että verbit voidaan järjestää verbiluokkien hierarkiaan niiden myöntämien kehysten perusteella. Tässä osoitamme, että tällaista hierarkiaa tukevat objektiivisesti hyvin verbien ja kehysten mallit englanniksi, koska systemaattinen hierarkkinen klusterointialgoritmi lähentyy samaan rakenteeseen kuin käsintehty taksonomia VerbNet, laaja-alainen verbileksikoni. Osoitamme myös, että hierarkiat vangitsevat yleistymisen mielekkäitä psykologisia ulottuvuuksia ennustamalla uusia verbivaihtoehtoja ihmisiltä. Keskustelemme yksinkertaisen hierarkkisen edustuksen rajoituksista ja ehdotamme samankaltaisia lähestymistapoja verbien argumenttirakenteen perustana olevien esitysten tunnistamiseksi.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Genjer-theoristé sing paling kelas kuwi, verb iso disenyungano karo kelas verb Punika, kita ngomong karo akeh sistem sing dadi bukane luwih aken langgar oleh \'verb\' lan nganggo dolanan ingkang dadi, sedhaya sistem sistem sistem sistem sistem kawasar Algorithm iso nggawe gerakan sampeyan liyane soko sistem sing gagasar podho kebudhakan Verbnet , bungku langgar-pakan verb luwih. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh-akeh luwih dumadhingan kelangenan luwih dumadhi sing ngerasakno ning basa sing dirampakan kelangen Awak dhéwé pisan dérangké kelangan sampeyan akeh yêrrêhku lan suggerungé barang langgar sampeyan kanggo nggoleki gambaran representasi sing dipun ciptaaken verb argument.', 'he': 'מילים יכולים להשתמש רק עם כמה סידורים ספציפיים של הטיעונים שלהם (מסגרות סינטאקטיות). רוב התיאוריסטים שמים לב שאיבות יכולות להיות מאורגנות לתוך הייררכיה של שיעורי אויבים מבוססים על המסגרות שהם מוכרים. כאן אנחנו מראים שכזו הייררכיה תומכת באופן אובייקטיבי היטב על ידי הדפוסים של verbs ומסגרות באנגלית, מאחר שאלגוריתם הייררכי סיסטמטי מתקבל באותו מבנה כמו טקסונומיה המבנית הידית של VerbNet, אלקסיקון של verb כיסוי רחב. אנחנו גם מראים שההייררכיות שולטות במימדים פסיכולוגיים משמעותיים של הגנרליזציה על ידי חיזוי כפישות אלברים חדשות על ידי משתתפים אנושיים. אנחנו מדברים על הגבלות של ייצוג היררכי פשוט ומציעים גישות דומות לזהות את הייצגות שמבוססים את מבנה התווכחות של אלברים.', 'sk': 'Glasgoli se lahko uporabljajo le z nekaj specifičnimi ureditvami njihovih argumentov (sintaktičnih okvirjev). Večina teoretikov ugotavlja, da se glagoli lahko organizirajo v hierarhijo razredov glagolov glede na okvire, ki jih sprejmejo. Tukaj pokažemo, da takšno hierarhijo objektivno dobro podpirajo vzorci glagolov in okvirjev v angleščini, saj se sistematični hierarhični algoritem grozdenja konvergira v isto strukturo kot ročno izdelana taksonomija VerbNet, široko pokritega glagolnega leksikona. Pokazali smo tudi, da hierarhije zajemajo pomembne psihološke dimenzije generalizacije s predvidevanjem novih glagolskih prisil človeških udeležencev. Razpravljamo o omejitvah preproste hierarhične reprezentacije in predlagamo podobne pristope za identifikacijo reprezentacij, ki temeljijo na strukturi argumentov glagolov.', 'ha': "Ana iya amfani da kima guda masu ƙayyade jujjuya masu husũma (firam masu syntactic). Babbansu na ƙididdige cewa za'a iya shirin karsa zuwa wani taƙaluman daraja na verb a kan firam da su gaskata. Hali Munã nũna cewa, wannan hierrrchi yana da amfani da misãlai na verbs da firam cikin Ingiriya, kamar wata na'urar hierorchical clusta algoritm na bada a kan salon da ke sami kamar da hannayen na hannayen VerbNet, wata gizo mai shimfiɗa na leksikon. Kayya da Muke nũna cewa hiirarki suna samun dimiyancin aikoloji mai muhimmi da ke cikin littafin da za'a yi bayani ga mataimaki masu riƙon yanzu na mutane. Munã jãyayya kanana masu sauƙi ga mai wakilishi na hiirarkiki kuma Munã shauri da shiryoyin misãlai kamar da za'a iya gane wa dukkan muhimmada wanda ke samar da salon sarki.", 'bo': 'Verbs can only be used with a few specific arrangements of their arguments (syntactic frames). སྔོན་སྟོན་པའི་དཔོན་རིག་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གྱི་དཔེ་རིགས་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། འདིར་འུ་ཅག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་དབུས་འཛིན་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་དེ་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པའི་ཕྲེང་རིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ We discuss limitations of a simple hierarchical representation and suggest similar approaches for identifying the representations underpinning verb argument structure.'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Global Visual Features into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation.', 'ar': 'دمج الميزات المرئية العالمية في الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الانتباه.', 'pt': 'Incorporando recursos visuais globais na tradução automática neural baseada na atenção.', 'es': 'Incorporación de funciones visuales globales en la traducción automática neuronal basada en la atención.', 'fr': "Incorporation de caractéristiques visuelles globales dans la traduction automatique neuronale basée sur l'attention.", 'ja': 'アテンションベースのニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションにグローバル・ビジュアル・フィーチャーを組み込む。', 'zh': '将全局视觉特徵整合到基于注意力的神经机器翻译中。', 'hi': 'ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में वैश्विक दृश्य सुविधाओं को शामिल करना।', 'ru': 'Включение глобальных визуальных характеристик в основанный на внимании нейронный машинный перевод.', 'ga': 'Gnéithe Amhairc Dhomhanda a Ionchorprú in Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-Bhunaithe Aird-Bhunaithe.', 'ka': 'გლობალური ვიზუალური განსაზღვრებების შეყვარება ნეიროლური მაქინის განსაზღვრებაში.', 'hu': 'Globális vizuális funkciók beépítése a figyelem alapú idegi gépi fordításba.', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση παγκόσμιων οπτικών χαρακτηριστικών στη βασισμένη στην προσοχή νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση.', 'lt': 'Įtraukti visuotines vizualines savybes į dėmesiu pagrįstą neurologinį mašinų vertimą.', 'it': "Incorporare funzionalità visive globali nella traduzione automatica neurale basata sull'attenzione.", 'kk': 'Жалпы көрінетін мүмкіндіктерді назардағы нейрондық машинаның аудармасына ендіру.', 'mk': 'Incorporating Global Visual Features into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation.', 'ml': 'ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d കാഴ്ചയുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Memasukkan Ciri-ciri Visual Global ke dalam Translation Mesin Neural Berasas Perhatian.', 'mt': 'Incorporating Global Visual Features into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн харагдах боломжуудыг анхаарлын үндсэн мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулах.', 'no': 'Innsamling av globale visuelle funksjonar i omsetjing av nøyralmaskinen som er basert på merksomsetjing.', 'pl': 'Włączenie globalnych funkcji wizualnych do tłumaczenia neuronowego opartego na uwadze.', 'ro': 'Incorporarea caracteristicilor vizuale globale în traducerea automată neurală bazată pe atenție.', 'sr': 'Uključujući globalne vizualne karakteristike u prevod neuroloških mašina na osnovu pažnje.', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha Global Visual waxay ku soo bandhigtaa tarjumaadda machine-neural-based.', 'sv': 'Integrera globala visuella funktioner i uppmärksamhetsbaserad Neural Machine Translation.', 'ta': 'Attention- based Neural Machine மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் பொதுவான காட்சி பண்புகளை ஒழுங்குகிறது.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවික විස්තර අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාසයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න.', 'ur': 'گلوبل ویسئل فوکتوروں کو توجه کی بنیادی نیورل ماشین ترجمہ میں شامل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình ảnh toàn cầu vào cấu trúc hình thức', 'bg': 'Включване на глобални визуални функции в базиран на вниманието неврален машинен превод.', 'nl': 'Het opnemen van wereldwijde visuele functies in attentie-based neural machine translation.', 'da': 'Integrering af globale visuelle funktioner i opmærksomhedsbaseret Neural Machine Translation.', 'hr': 'Uključujući globalne vizualne karakteristike u prijevod neuroloških strojeva na temelju pažnje.', 'de': 'Einbindung globaler visueller Merkmale in die aufmerksamkeitsbasierte neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung.', 'ko': '전체적인 시각적 특징을 주의력을 바탕으로 하는 신경 기계 번역에 융합시키다.', 'id': 'Menginkorporasi Features Visual Global dalam Perhatian-berdasarkan Translation Mesin Neural.', 'fa': 'تولید کردن ویژه\u200cهای بینایی جهانی به ترجمه ماشین عصبی بر روی توجه.', 'sw': 'Kuingiza Tamko za Kimataifa za Visual katika Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiurali yenye msingi wa Tafsiri.', 'tr': 'Garaşmaly Nural Maşynyň Terjimesine Döresel Görnüş özellikleri girdirilýär.', 'af': 'Vertrek Globale Visuele Features in Aansig-gebaseerde Neurale Masjien Vertaling.', 'sq': 'Duke përfshirë funksionet globale vizuale në përkthimin e makinave nervore me bazë në vëmendje.', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ ներառելով գլոբալ տեսողական առանձնահատկությունները:', 'az': 'X톛b톛rdarl캼q-tabanl캼 N칬ral Makina T톛rc칲m톛sin톛 Global G칬r칲n칲l Features Incorporating into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation.', 'bn': 'গ্লোবাল ভিসুয়েল বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ভিত্তিক নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের মধ্যে প্রবেশ করা হচ্ছে।', 'bs': 'Uključujući globalne vizualne karakteristike u prevod neuroloških strojeva na temelju pažnje.', 'ca': "Incorporar les característiques visuals globals en la traducció de màquines neuronals basada en l'atenció.", 'cs': 'Začlenění globálních vizuálních funkcí do pozornostního neuronového strojového překladu.', 'et': 'Ülemaailmsete visuaalsete funktsioonide lisamine tähelepanu-põhisesse neuromasintõlkesse.', 'fi': 'Globaalien visuaalisten ominaisuuksien sisällyttäminen huomiopohjaiseen neurokonekäännökseen.', 'jv': 'Ngubah Jejaring Global Visual Obèran kanggo Terjamahan Njuar kang Aténsi basa Jejaring.', 'ha': 'Incorporating Global Visual Features into Attention-based Neural Machine Translation.', 'he': 'מכיל תכונות חזותיות גלובליות לתרגום מכונת נוירות מבוססת על תשומת לב.', 'sk': 'Vključevanje globalnih vizualnih funkcij v pozornost temelječe nevronski strojni prevod.', 'bo': 'རྣམ་བརྟན་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་མཐོང་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'We introduce multi-modal, attention-based neural machine translation (NMT) models which incorporate visual features into different parts of both the encoder and the decoder. Global image features are extracted using a pre-trained convolutional neural network and are incorporated (i) as words in the source sentence, (ii) to initialise the encoder hidden state, and (iii) as additional data to initialise the decoder hidden state. In our experiments, we evaluate translations into English and German, how different strategies to incorporate global image features compare and which ones perform best. We also study the impact that adding synthetic multi-modal, multilingual data brings and find that the additional data have a positive impact on multi-modal NMT models. We report new state-of-the-art results and our best models also significantly improve on a comparable phrase-based Statistical MT (PBSMT) model trained on the Multi30k data set according to all metrics evaluated. To the best of our knowledge, it is the first time a purely neural model significantly improves over a PBSMT model on all metrics evaluated on this data set.', 'ar': 'نقدم نماذج ترجمة آلية عصبية متعددة الوسائط تعتمد على الانتباه (NMT) والتي تدمج الميزات المرئية في أجزاء مختلفة من كل من المشفر ووحدة فك التشفير. يتم استخراج ميزات الصورة العالمية باستخدام شبكة عصبية تلافيفية مُدرَّبة مسبقًا ويتم دمجها (1) ككلمات في الجملة المصدر ، (2) لتهيئة الحالة المخفية لبرنامج التشفير ، و (3) كبيانات إضافية لتهيئة الحالة المخفية لوحدة فك التشفير. في تجاربنا ، نقوم بتقييم الترجمات إلى الإنجليزية والألمانية ، وكيفية مقارنة الاستراتيجيات المختلفة لدمج ميزات الصورة العالمية وأيها أفضل أداء. ندرس أيضًا التأثير الذي تجلبه إضافة بيانات تركيبية متعددة الوسائط ومتعددة اللغات ووجدنا أن البيانات الإضافية لها تأثير إيجابي على نماذج NMT متعددة الوسائط. لقد أبلغنا عن أحدث النتائج ، كما أن أفضل النماذج لدينا تتحسن بشكل كبير على نموذج MT الإحصائي المستند إلى العبارات (PBSMT) القابل للمقارنة والمدرَّب على مجموعة بيانات Multi30k وفقًا لجميع المقاييس التي تم تقييمها. على حد علمنا ، هذه هي المرة الأولى التي يتحسن فيها نموذج عصبي بحت بشكل ملحوظ على نموذج PBSMT في جميع المقاييس التي تم تقييمها في مجموعة البيانات هذه.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons des modèles de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) multimodaux, basés sur l'attention, qui incorporent des caractéristiques visuelles dans différentes parties de l'encodeur et du décodeur. Les caractéristiques d'image globales sont extraites à l'aide d'un réseau neuronal convolutif pré-entraîné et sont incorporées (i) sous forme de mots dans la phrase source, (ii) pour initialiser l'état caché du codeur, et (iii) comme données supplémentaires pour initialiser l'état caché du décodeur. Dans le cadre de nos expériences, nous évaluons les traductions en anglais et en allemand, la comparaison des différentes stratégies pour intégrer des caractéristiques d'image globales et celles qui sont les plus performantes. Nous étudions également l'impact de l'ajout de données synthétiques multimodales et multilingues et constatons que les données supplémentaires ont un impact positif sur les modèles NMT multimodaux. Nous rapportons de nouveaux résultats de pointe et nos meilleurs modèles améliorent également de manière significative un modèle de MT statistique basé sur des phrases (PBSMT) comparable formé sur l'ensemble de données multi30K en fonction de toutes les métriques évaluées. À notre connaissance, c'est la première fois qu'un modèle purement neuronal s'améliore de manière significative par rapport à un modèle PBSMT sur toutes les métriques évaluées sur cet ensemble de données.", 'pt': 'Introduzimos modelos multimodais de tradução automática neural (NMT) baseados em atenção que incorporam recursos visuais em diferentes partes do codificador e do decodificador. Os recursos de imagem global são extraídos usando uma rede neural convolucional pré-treinada e são incorporados (i) como palavras na sentença fonte, (ii) para inicializar o estado oculto do codificador e (iii) como dados adicionais para inicializar o estado oculto do decodificador. Em nossos experimentos, avaliamos traduções para inglês e alemão, como diferentes estratégias para incorporar recursos de imagem global se comparam e quais têm melhor desempenho. Também estudamos o impacto que a adição de dados multimodais e multilíngues sintéticos traz e descobrimos que os dados adicionais têm um impacto positivo nos modelos NMT multimodais. Relatamos novos resultados de última geração e nossos melhores modelos também melhoram significativamente em um modelo MT estatístico baseado em frase (PBSMT) comparável treinado no conjunto de dados Multi30k de acordo com todas as métricas avaliadas. Até onde sabemos, é a primeira vez que um modelo puramente neural melhora significativamente em relação a um modelo PBSMT em todas as métricas avaliadas neste conjunto de dados.', 'es': 'Presentamos modelos multimodales de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) basados en la atención que incorporan características visuales en diferentes partes tanto del codificador como del decodificador. Las características globales de la imagen se extraen utilizando una red neuronal convolucional previamente entrenada y se incorporan (i) como palabras en la oración fuente, (ii) para inicializar el estado oculto del codificador, y (iii) como datos adicionales para inicializar el estado oculto del decodificador. En nuestros experimentos, evaluamos las traducciones al inglés y al alemán, cómo se comparan las diferentes estrategias para incorporar características de imagen globales y cuáles funcionan mejor. También estudiamos el impacto que trae la adición de datos sintéticos multimodales y multilingües y descubrimos que los datos adicionales tienen un impacto positivo en los modelos de NMT multimodales. Presentamos nuevos resultados de vanguardia y nuestros mejores modelos también mejoran significativamente en un modelo de MT estadístico basado en frases (PBSMT) comparable entrenado en el conjunto de datos Multi30k de acuerdo con todas las métricas evaluadas. Hasta donde sabemos, es la primera vez que un modelo puramente neuronal mejora significativamente con respecto a un modelo PBSMT en todas las métricas evaluadas en este conjunto de datos.', 'ja': '私たちは、エンコーダとデコーダの両方の異なる部分に視覚的特徴を組み込んだ、マルチモーダルで注意に基づくニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）モデルを導入します。 グローバル画像特徴は、事前に訓練された畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用して抽出され、（ ｉ ）ソース文章内の単語として、（ ｉ ｉ ）エンコーダ隠し状態を初期化するため、及び（ ｉｉｉ ）デコーダ隠し状態を初期化するための追加データとして組み込まれる。 私たちの実験では、英語とドイツ語への翻訳、グローバルなイメージ機能を組み込むためのさまざまな戦略がどのように比較され、どの戦略が最もパフォーマンスが良いかを評価します。 また、合成マルチモーダル、多言語データを追加することがもたらす影響を研究し、追加データがマルチモーダルNMTモデルにプラスの影響を与えることを発見しました。 当社は最新の結果を報告し、当社の最良のモデルは、評価されたすべての指標に従って、Multi 30 kデータセットでトレーニングされた比較可能なフレーズベースの統計MT （ PBSMT ）モデルを大幅に改善します。 私たちの知る限りでは、純粋なニューラルモデルは、このデータセットで評価されたすべての指標でPBSMTモデルよりも大幅に改善するのは初めてです。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим мультимодальные, основанные на внимании модели нейронного машинного перевода (НМП), которые включают визуальные функции в различные части как кодера, так и декодера. Глобальные признаки изображения извлекаются с использованием предварительно обученной сверточной нейронной сети и включаются (i) в качестве слов в исходном предложении, (ii) для инициализации скрытого состояния кодера и (iii) в качестве дополнительных данных для инициализации скрытого состояния декодера. В наших экспериментах мы оцениваем переводы на английский и немецкий языки, как сравниваются различные стратегии включения глобальных функций изображения и какие из них работают лучше всего. Мы также изучаем влияние, которое оказывает добавление синтетических мультимодальных многоязычных данных, и обнаруживаем, что дополнительные данные оказывают положительное влияние на мультимодальные модели НМП. Мы сообщаем о новых современных результатах, и наши лучшие модели также значительно улучшают сопоставимую фразеологическую статистическую модель MT (PBSMT), обученную на наборе данных Multi30k в соответствии со всеми оцененными показателями. Насколько нам известно, это первый случай, когда чисто нейронная модель значительно улучшается по сравнению с моделью PBSMT по всем метрикам, оцениваемым на этом наборе данных.', 'zh': '引入多模态、注意之神经机器翻译(NMT),整合之于编码器、解码器。 全局图像特徵用预练卷积神经网络提取,并为(i)为源句之单词,(ii)初始化编码器隐匿,及(iii)为附数以初解码器隐。 于我实验中,估英语德语译,整合全局图形异策,及何策最善。 又考添合成多模态、多言数,见额外数对多模态 NMT 模有积极。 吾言新之先进也,吾之至者指标以Multi30k数集上训练之基于短语者,显于计MT(PBSMT)。 以吾所知,此纯神经首于此集上估诸指标,显于PBSMT也。', 'hi': 'हम मल्टी-मोडल, ध्यान-आधारित न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मॉडल पेश करते हैं जो एनकोडर और डिकोडर दोनों के विभिन्न हिस्सों में दृश्य सुविधाओं को शामिल करते हैं। वैश्विक छवि सुविधाओं को एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित कनवल्शनल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके निकाला जाता है और (i) स्रोत वाक्य में शब्दों के रूप में शामिल किया जाता है, (ii) एन्कोडर छिपी हुई स्थिति को प्रारंभ करने के लिए, और (iii) डिकोडर छिपी हुई स्थिति को शुरू करने के लिए अतिरिक्त डेटा के रूप में। हमारे प्रयोगों में, हम अंग्रेजी और जर्मन में अनुवाद का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, वैश्विक छवि सुविधाओं को शामिल करने के लिए विभिन्न रणनीतियों की तुलना कैसे की जाती है और कौन से लोग सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम इस प्रभाव का भी अध्ययन करते हैं कि सिंथेटिक मल्टी-मोडल, बहुभाषी डेटा जोड़ने से आता है और पता चलता है कि अतिरिक्त डेटा का बहु-मॉडल एनएमटी मॉडल पर सकारात्मक प्रभाव पड़ता है। हम नए अत्याधुनिक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं और हमारे सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल भी मूल्यांकन किए गए सभी मैट्रिक्स के अनुसार मल्टी 30 के डेटा सेट पर प्रशिक्षित एक तुलनीय वाक्यांश-आधारित सांख्यिकीय एमटी (पीबीएसएमटी) मॉडल पर काफी सुधार करते हैं। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह पहली बार है जब एक विशुद्ध रूप से तंत्रिका मॉडल इस डेटा सेट पर मूल्यांकन किए गए सभी मैट्रिक्स पर पीबीएसएमटी मॉडल पर काफी सुधार करता है।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach samhlacha ilmhódacha, aird-bhunaithe meaisínaistriúcháin néarach (NMT) a ionchorpraíonn gnéithe amhairc i gcodanna éagsúla den ionchódóir agus den díchódóir araon. Baintear úsáid as gréasán néarúil comhthoilithe réamh-oilte agus baintear úsáid as gnéithe íomhá domhanda agus ionchorpraítear iad (i) mar fhocail san abairt fhoinseach, (ii) chun staid fholaithe an ionchódóra a thúsú, agus (iii) mar shonraí breise chun staid fholaithe an díchódóra a thúsú. Inár dturgnaimh, déanaimid measúnú ar aistriúcháin go Béarla agus Gearmáinis, conas a dhéantar comparáid idir straitéisí éagsúla chun gnéithe íomhá domhanda a ionchorprú agus cé na cinn is fearr a fheidhmíonn. Déanaimid staidéar freisin ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag sonraí ilmhódacha, ilteangacha sintéiseacha a chur leis agus feicimid go bhfuil tionchar dearfach ag na sonraí breise ar mhúnlaí ilmhódacha NMT. Tuairiscímid torthaí nua den scoth agus cuireann ár múnlaí is fearr feabhas suntasach freisin ar mhúnla MT Staitistiúil frása-bhunaithe (PBSMT) inchomparáide atá oilte ar thacar sonraí Multi30k de réir na méadrachta go léir a measúnaíodh. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é seo an chéad uair a tháinig feabhas suntasach ar shamhail néarúil amháin thar shamhail PBSMT ar gach méadracht a ndéantar meastóireacht uirthi ar an tacar sonraí seo.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε πολλαπλά μοντέλα νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης που ενσωματώνουν οπτικά χαρακτηριστικά σε διαφορετικά μέρη τόσο του κωδικοποιητή όσο και του αποκωδικοποιητή. Τα χαρακτηριστικά της παγκόσμιας εικόνας εξάγονται χρησιμοποιώντας ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο νευρωνικό δίκτυο και ενσωματώνονται (i) ως λέξεις στην πρόταση προέλευσης, (ii) για την αρχικοποίηση της κρυφής κατάστασης του κωδικοποιητή και (iii) ως πρόσθετα δεδομένα για την εκκίνηση της κρυφής κατάστασης αποκωδικοποιητή. Στα πειράματά μας αξιολογούμε μεταφράσεις στα αγγλικά και τα γερμανικά, πώς συγκρίνονται διαφορετικές στρατηγικές ενσωμάτωσης παγκόσμιων χαρακτηριστικών εικόνας και ποιες αποδίδουν καλύτερα. Μελετάμε επίσης τον αντίκτυπο που επιφέρει η προσθήκη συνθετικών πολυμορφικών, πολύγλωσσων δεδομένων και διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα πρόσθετα δεδομένα έχουν θετικό αντίκτυπο στα πολυμορφικά μοντέλα NMT. Αναφέρουμε νέα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και τα καλύτερα μοντέλα μας επίσης βελτιώνονται σημαντικά σε ένα συγκρίσιμο στατιστικό μοντέλο βασισμένο σε φράσεις, εκπαιδευμένο στο σύνολο δεδομένων σύμφωνα με όλες τις μετρήσεις που αξιολογήθηκαν. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, είναι η πρώτη φορά που ένα καθαρά νευρωνικό μοντέλο βελτιώνεται σημαντικά σε σχέση με ένα μοντέλο σε όλες τις μετρήσεις που αξιολογούνται σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Multimodális, figyelem-alapú neurális gépi fordítási (NMT) modelleket vezetünk be, amelyek vizuális jellemzőket tartalmaznak mind a kódoló, mind a dekódoló különböző részeibe. A globális képfunkciókat egy előre kiképzett convolucionális neurális hálózat használatával bontjuk ki, és (i) szavakként építik be a forráskódban, (ii) a kódoló rejtett állapotának inicializálására, és (iii) kiegészítő adatként a dekódoló rejtett állapotának inicializálására. Kísérleteink során értékeljük az angol és német fordításokat, hogyan hasonlítanak össze a globális képfunkciók integrálására irányuló különböző stratégiák és melyek teljesítenek a legjobban. Tanulmányozzuk továbbá a szintetikus multimodális, többnyelvű adatok hozzáadásának hatását, és megállapítjuk, hogy a kiegészítő adatok pozitív hatással vannak a multimodális NMT modellekre. Új, korszerű eredményeket jelentünk be, és legjobb modelleink szintén jelentősen javulnak egy hasonló kifejezésalapú statisztikai MT (PBSMT) modell, amelyet a Multi30k adatkészletre készítettünk, az összes értékelt mutató szerint. Legjobb tudásunk szerint ez az első alkalom, hogy egy tisztán neurális modell jelentősen javul egy PBSMT modellhez képest az ezen adatkészleten értékelt összes mutatónál.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მრავალური მოდიალური, აღმოჩენებული ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) მოდელები, რომლებიც ვიზუალური ფუნქციების განსხვავებული ნაწილში კოდერის და დეკოდერის განსხვავ Global image features are extracted using a pre-trained convolutional neural network and are incorporated (i) as words in the source sentence, (ii) to initialize the encoder hidden state, and (iii) as additional data to initialize the decoder hidden state. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტებში, ჩვენ ინგლისური და გერმანური ტრატიგურების შესახებ, როგორ განსხვავებული სტრატიგურების შესახებ გლობალური გამოსახულების შესახებ და ჩვენ ასევე ვისწავლეთ სინტეტიკური მრავალური მოდენეების დამატება და მრავალური მოდენეების დამატება და ვიღებთ, რომ დამატებული მოდენეები მრავალური მოდენეების პოტიფიკაციური შედეგებ ჩვენ ახალი წარმოდგენების შესახებ და ჩვენი ყველაზე საუკეთესო მოდელების შესაბამისი ფრაზების შესაბამისი სტატისტიკური MT (PBSMT) მოდელზე მრატი30k მონაცემების შესაბამისი ყველა მეტრიკის შესაბამი ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ეს არის პირველი ჯერ მხოლოდ ნეიროლური მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანია PBSMT მოდელზე ყველა მეტრიკაში, რომელიც ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში', 'it': "Introduciamo modelli NMT (neural machine translation) multimodali basati sull'attenzione che incorporano caratteristiche visive in diverse parti sia dell'encoder che del decoder. Le caratteristiche dell'immagine globale sono estratte utilizzando una rete neurale convoluzionale pre-addestrata e sono incorporate (i) come parole nella frase sorgente, (ii) per inizializzare lo stato nascosto dell'encoder, e (iii) come dati aggiuntivi per inizializzare lo stato nascosto del decoder. Nei nostri esperimenti valutiamo le traduzioni in inglese e tedesco, come si confrontano le diverse strategie per incorporare funzionalità di immagine globali e quali funzionano meglio. Studiamo anche l'impatto che l'aggiunta di dati sintetici multimodali e multilingui comporta e scopriamo che i dati aggiuntivi hanno un impatto positivo sui modelli multimodali NMT. Riportiamo nuovi risultati all'avanguardia e i nostri migliori modelli migliorano significativamente anche su un modello comparabile basato su frasi (PBSMT) formato sul set di dati Multi30k in base a tutte le metriche valutate. Per quanto ne sappiamo, è la prima volta che un modello puramente neurale migliora significativamente rispetto a un modello PBSMT su tutte le metriche valutate su questo set di dati.", 'kk': 'Біз көптеген модалдық, назардағы невралдық компьютердің аударуы (NMT) үлгілерін келтіреміз. Көрініс мүмкіндіктері кодердің және декодердің түрлі бөліктеріне қосылады. Жалпы кескіндің мүмкіндіктері алдын- ала оқылған невралдық желімен тарқатылады және (i) көзінің сөздері ретінде, ii) кодердің жасырылған күйін инициализациялау үшін, және (iii) декодердің жасырылған күйін инициализаци Біздің тәжірибемізде ағылшын және неміс тіліне аударып, әлемді кескіндердің қанша түрлі стратегияларын салыстырып, қанша ең жақсы жұмыс істейді. Біз сондай-ақ синтетикалық көптеген, көптеген тілдер деректерін қосу және қосымша деректердің көптеген модалдық NMT моделдеріне оң әсер ететін нәтижесін зерттейміз. Біз жаңа суреттің нәтижелерін және ең жақсы моделдерімізді және сөздердің негізінде салыстырылатын статистикалық MT (PBSMT) моделіне салыстырылатын Multi30k деректерді бағалау үлгісіне сәйкес келеді. Біздің біліміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, бірінші рет, бұл деректер жиынында бағалатын барлық метрикалар үшін PBSMT моделінің түсінікті жақсы жасайды.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame daugiarūšius, dėmesio pagrindu pagrįstus nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) modelius, kuriuose vizualinės savybės įtraukiamos į skirtingas kodavimo ir dekoderio dalis. Visuotinės vaizdo savybės i štraukiamos naudojant iš anksto parengtą konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą ir įtraukiamos i) kaip žodžiai pradiniame sakinyje, ii) koduotojo paslėptos būsenos inicializavimui ir iii) kaip papildomi duomenys koduotojo paslėptos būsenos inicializavimui. Mūsų eksperimentuose vertiname vertimus anglų ir vokiečių kalbomis, kaip palyginamos skirtingos strategijos, skirtos integruoti pasaulinius vaizdo požymius, ir kurios geriausiai veikia. Taip pat tiriame poveikį, kurį sukelia daugiarūšius sintetinius daugiakalbius duomenis, ir nustatome, kad papildomi duomenys turi teigiamą poveikį daugiarūšius NMT modelius. Pranešime apie naujus naujausius rezultatus ir geriausius mūsų modelius taip pat gerokai pagerina palyginamu frazėmis pagrįstu statistiniu MT (PBSMT) modeliu, parengtu Multi30k duomenų rinkiniu pagal visus įvertintus rodiklius. Mūsų žiniomis tai pirmas kartas, kai grynai nervinis model is gerokai pagerėja, palyginti su PBSMT modeliu, taikant visus šiame duomenų rinkinyje įvertintus metrinius rodiklius.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan model penerjemah mesin saraf berasaskan perhatian, multi modal (NMT) yang mengangkut ciri-ciri visual ke bahagian yang berbeza dari pengekod dan pengekod. Ciri-ciri imej global dikekstrak menggunakan rangkaian saraf konvolusi yang dilatih-dilatih dan disertakan (i) sebagai perkataan dalam kalimat sumber, (ii) untuk awalkan keadaan tersembunyi pengekod, dan (iii) sebagai data tambahan untuk awalkan keadaan tersembunyi pengekod. Dalam eksperimen kami, kami menilai terjemahan ke bahasa Inggeris dan Jerman, bagaimana strategi berbeza untuk menggabungkan ciri-ciri imej global dibandingkan dan yang mana yang lebih baik. Kami juga mempelajari kesan yang menambah data berbilang-modal, berbilang-bahasa sintetik membawa dan mencari bahawa data tambahan mempunyai kesan positif pada model NMT berbilang-modal. Kami melaporkan keputusan baru-state-of-the-art dan model terbaik kami juga meningkatkan secara signifikan pada model Statistical MT (PBSMT) berdasarkan frasa yang boleh dibandingkan dilatih pada set data Multi30k menurut semua metrik yang diteliti. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ia adalah pertama kalinya model yang murni saraf meningkat secara signifikan melalui model PBSMT pada semua metrik yang diteliti pada set data ini.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме мултимодилни, внимание-базирани невројални машински превод (НМТ) модели кои вклучуваат визуелни карактеристики во различни делови на кодерот и декодерот. Глобалните карактеристики на сликата се извлекуваат со користење на преобучена конволуционална невројална мрежа и се вклучени (i) како зборови во изворната реченица, (ii) за иницијализација на скриената состојба на кодерот, и (iii) како дополнителни податоци за иницијализација на скриен Во нашите експерименти, ги проценуваме преводите на англиски и германски, како различните стратегии за вклопување на глобални слики се споредуваат и кои се најдобрите. We also study the impact that adding synthetic multi-modal, multilingual data brings and find that the additional data have a positive impact on multi-modal NMT models.  Ние известуваме за новите најсовремени резултати и нашите најдобри модели исто така значително се подобруваат на споредлив модел на статистички MT (PBSMT) базиран на фрази, трениран на мнозинството податоци Мулти30k според сите проценети метрики. Според нашето знаење, ова е прв пат чисто нервен модел значително се подобрува преку модел ПБСМТ на сите метрики оценети на овој податок.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu mudelli multimodali tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni (NMT) li jinkorporaw karatteristiċi viżivi f’partijiet differenti kemm tal-kodifikatur kif ukoll tad-dekoder. Il-karatteristiċi tal-immaġni globali jiġu estratti bl-użu ta’ netwerk konvoluzzjonali newrali mħarreġ minn qabel u huma inkorporati (i) bħala kliem fis-sentenza tas-sors, (ii) biex jiġi inizjalizzat l-istat moħbi tal-kodifikatur, u (iii) bħala dejta addizzjonali biex jiġi inizjalizzat l-istat moħbi tad-dekoder. Fl-esperimenti tagħna, aħna jevalwaw it-traduzzjonijiet fl-Ingliż u l-Ġermaniż, kif l-istrateġiji differenti biex jiġu inkorporati karatteristiċi tal-immaġni globali jitqabblu u liema huma l-aħjar. Aħna nistudjaw ukoll l-impatt li ż-żieda ta’ dejta sintetika multimodali u multilingwi ġġib magħha u nsibu li d-dejta addizzjonali għandha impatt pożittiv fuq mudelli NMT multimodali. Aħna nirrappurtaw riżultati moderni ġodda u l-a ħjar mudelli tagħna jtejbu wkoll b’mod sinifikanti fuq mudell statistiku MT (PBSMT) ibbażat fuq frażi komparabbli mħarreġ fuq is-sett ta’ dejta Multi30k skont il-metriċi kollha evalwati. To the best of our knowledge, it is the first time a purely neural model significantly improves over a PBSMT model on all metrics evaluated on this data set.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer fleire modulske, oppmerksbaserte neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodular (NMT), som inkluderer visuelle funksjonar i ulike deler av både koderen og dekoderen. Globale biletfunksjonar blir ekstraherte med eit før- treng konvolusjonell neiralnettverk og er inkludert i i) som ord i kjeldesetninga, ii) for å starta skjulte tilstanden til koderen, og iii) som ekstra data for å starta skjulte tilstanden for dekoder. I eksperimentene våre evaluerer vi omsetjingar til engelsk og tysk, korleis ulike strategier for å inkludere globale biletfunksjonar sammenlignar og kva som utfører best. Vi studerer også effekten som legg til syntetiske fleire modular, fleire språk-data og finn at dei fleire data har positivt effekt på fleire modular NMT-modeller. Vi rapporterer nye kunstige resultat og våre beste modeller også betydelig forbedra på eit sammenlignbare frasebasert statistisk MT (PBSMT) modell som trengte på multi30-k datasettet etter alle metodane. Det er første gong ein reint neuralmodell betydelig forbedrar over ein PBSMT-modell på alle metrikar som er evaluert på denne datasettet.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d പല-മോഡോള്\u200d, ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളെ (NMT) മോഡലുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് കോഡോര്\u200dഡരിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമ ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d ഇമേജിന്റെ വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d ശൃംഖല ഉപയോഗിച്ച് എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സോര്\u200dസ് വാക്കില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങളെ ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലേക്കും വിവിധ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഗ്ല We also study the impact that adding synthetic multi-modal, multilingual data brings and find that the additional data have a positive impact on multi-modal NMT models.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പുതിയ രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡലുകളും തുല്യമായ വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള എംടി (PBSMT) മോഡലി നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചത്തില്\u200d, ആദ്യമാണ് ഈ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d വിലയിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന എല്ലാ മെട്രിക്കുകളിലും ഒരു പിബിഎസ്എ', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy multimodalne, oparte na uwadze modele neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT), które zawierają cechy wizualne w różnych częściach kodera i dekodera. Globalne cechy obrazu są ekstraktowane za pomocą wstępnie wytrenowanej konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej i są włączane (i) jako słowa w zdaniu źródłowym, (ii) do inicjalizacji ukrytego stanu kodera oraz (iii) jako dodatkowe dane do inicjalizacji ukrytego stanu dekodera. W naszych eksperymentach oceniamy tłumaczenia na język angielski i niemiecki, jak porównują się różne strategie uwzględniania globalnych cech obrazu i które z nich działają najlepiej. Badamy również wpływ dodawania syntetycznych multimodalnych, wielojęzycznych danych i stwierdzamy, że dodatkowe dane mają pozytywny wpływ na multimodalne modele NMT. Raportujemy nowe wyniki, a nasze najlepsze modele również znacząco poprawiają się w porównywalnym modelu statystycznego MT (PBSMT) opartego na frazach przeszkolonego na zbiorze danych Multi30k zgodnie ze wszystkimi ocenianymi wskaźnikami. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy po raz pierwszy model czysto neuronowy znacząco ulepsza się w porównaniu z modelem PBSMT we wszystkich miernikach ocenianych na tym zbiorze danych.', 'mn': 'Бид олон моделийн, анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн механикийн хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) загваруудыг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь кодер болон онгоцуудын өөр хэсэгт харагддаг. Дэлхийн зураг чадваруудыг өмнө сургалтын мэдрэлийн сүлжээ ашиглан хадгалагддаг. i) эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэр, (ii) кодчуудын нуугдсан байр суурь болон (iii) декодчуудын нуугдсан байр суурь шилжүүлэх үед нэмэлт өгөгдлийн хувьд нэмэ Бидний туршилтанд Англи болон Германы хэлбэрт орчуулагддаг, дэлхийн зураг дүрсийг хэрхэн харьцуулж, хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэх стратегийг үнэлдэг. Бид мөн олон моделийн, олон хэл өгөгдлийг нэмж, нэмэлт өгөгдлийн олон моделийн NMT загварын эерэг нөлөө үзүүлсэн. Бид шинэ урлагийн үр дүн болон хамгийн шилдэг загварууд мөн адилхан хэлбэрээр суурилсан статистикийн MT (PBSMT) загварын багшилдаг Multi30k өгөгдлийн багшилдаг. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь, энэ нь анхны удаа цэвэрхэн мэдрэлийн загвар нь PBSMT загварын хувьд энэ өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр үнэлгээгдсэн бүх метрик загвараас илүү сайжруулдаг.', 'ro': 'Introducem modele de traducere automată neurală (NMT) multimodale, bazate pe atenție, care încorporează caracteristici vizuale în diferite părți ale codificatorului și decodorului. Caracteristicile imaginii globale sunt extrase folosind o rețea neuronală convoluțională pre-antrenată și sunt încorporate (i) ca cuvinte în propoziția sursă, (ii) pentru inițializarea stării ascunse a encoderului și (iii) ca date suplimentare pentru inițializarea stării ascunse a decodorului. În experimentele noastre, evaluăm traducerile în engleză și germană, modul în care diferitele strategii de integrare a caracteristicilor imaginii globale se compară și care dintre ele funcționează cel mai bine. De asemenea, studiem impactul adus de adăugarea de date sintetice multimodale, multilingve și constatăm că datele suplimentare au un impact pozitiv asupra modelelor multimodale NMT. Raportăm noi rezultate de ultimă oră și cele mai bune modele ale noastre se îmbunătățesc semnificativ și pe baza unui model statistic MT (PBSMT) comparabil, instruit pe setul de date Multi30k, conform tuturor măsurătorilor evaluate. Din câte știm, este prima dată când un model pur neural se îmbunătățește semnificativ față de un model PBSMT pe toate măsurătorile evaluate pe acest set de date.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa tarjumaadka maskaxda kooxaha ah oo aad u taqaan (NMT), kaas oo ku qoraya qaabab kala duduwan oo muuqashada aragga ah iyo kooxda. Tawirada caalamiga ah waxaa lagu isticmaalaa shabakadda neurada ee horay loo tababaray, waxaana lagu soo qoraa (i) erayo ku qoran afka asalka ah, (ii) si uu u bilowdo xaaladda qarsoon, iyo (iii) macluumaad dheeraad ah si uu u bilowdo xaaladda qarsoonka ah. Imtixaanadeena, waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa turjumaanka Ingiriiska iyo Jarmalka, sida qorshaha kala duduwan oo loo soo bandhigi karo sawirada dunida oo la barbarbardhigo oo lagu sameeyo sawirada caalamiga ah. Waxaynu sidoo kale baranaynaa saamaynta ku saabsan in lagu daraa macluumaad kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, waxaynu helaynaa in macluumaadka dheeraadka ay saameyn positive ku leeyihiin modelalka NMT. Waxaannu wargelinaynaa arimaha cusub ee arimaha farshaxanka iyo qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan si aad u hagaajinnaa qaab u eg xarunta Statistical MT (PBSMT) modelka lagu baray macluumaadka badan ee loo qoray sida loo qiimeynayo dhammaan metric. Marka ugu wanaagsan aqoontayada, waa marka ugu horeysa model neurada ah oo si weyn u bedelaya model PBSMT oo ku qoran metriciyadan oo dhan lagu qiimeeyo.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo modele koji uključuju vizualne karakteristike u različite dijelove kodera i dekodera. Globalne karakteristike slika su izvučene koristeći predobučenu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu i uključene su i) kao reči u izvornoj rečenici, ii) za inicijaciju skrivenog stanja kodera, i iii) kao dodatne podatke za inicijaciju skrivenog stanja dekodera. U našim eksperimentima procjenjujemo prevode na engleski i nemački, kako različite strategije za uključenje globalnih karakteristika slike uspoređuju i koje najbolje izvode. Takođe proučavamo uticaj koji dodaje sintetičke multimodalne, multijezičke podatke i saznajemo da dodatni podaci imaju pozitivan uticaj na multimodalne NMT modele. Prijavljujemo nove rezultate umetnosti i naši najbolji modeli takođe značajno poboljšavaju na usporednom modelu statističkog MT (PBSMT) koji je obučen na setu podataka Multi30k prema svim ocjenjenim metrikama. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, to je prvi put čisti neuralni model značajno poboljšava preko model a PBSMT na svim metrikama koje su procjenjivale na ovom setu podataka.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar multimodala, uppm채rksamhetsbaserade neurala maskin철vers채ttningsmodeller (NMT) som inf철rlivar visuella funktioner i olika delar av b책de kodaren och avkodaren. Globala bildfunktioner extraheras med hj채lp av ett f철rintr채nat konvulutionellt neuralt n채tverk och inf철rlivas (i) som ord i k채llmeningen, (ii) f철r att initiera kodarens dolda tillst책nd, och (iii) som ytterligare data f철r att initiera dekodens dolda tillst책nd. I v책ra experiment utv채rderar vi 철vers채ttningar till engelska och tyska, hur olika strategier f철r att inf철rliva globala bildfunktioner j채mf철rs och vilka som presterar b채st. Vi studerar ocks책 effekten av att l채gga till syntetiska multimodala, flerspr책kiga data ger och konstaterar att ytterligare data har en positiv inverkan p책 multimodala NMT-modeller. Vi rapporterar nya toppmoderna resultat och v책ra b채sta modeller f철rb채ttrar ocks책 avsev채rt j채mf철rt med en j채mf철rbar frasbaserad statistisk MT-modell (PBSMT) utbildad p책 Multi30k-dataupps채ttningen enligt alla utv채rderade m채tv채rden. S책 vitt vi vet 채r det f철rsta g책ngen en rent neural modell f철rb채ttras avsev채rt j채mf철rt med en PBSMT-modell p책 alla m채tv채rden som utv채rderas p책 denna dataupps채ttning.', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් මෝඩාල්, අවධානය අධිකාරිත න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) මෝඩේල් එක්කම් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරදේශ අවශ්\u200dය ජාතික පින්තූර සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කළ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ (i) වචන වචන වගේ වචන අපේ පරීක්ෂණාවට, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජර්මන් වලට පරීක්ෂණය අවශ්\u200dයය කරනවා, ජාතික පින්තූර වලට කොහොමද වෙනස් ප අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වගේම සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූ අපි අළුත් ස්ථානය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ අපේ හොඳම මොඩේල් වලින් විශේෂයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා  අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දේවල්, ඒක පළමුවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් මේ දත්ත සූදානමේ ප්\u200dරමාණයේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණ', 'ur': 'ہم بہت سی موڈال، توجه پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) موڈل کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جن میں دکھانے والی ویزیوری ویزیوری ویزیوری کے مختلف ٹکڑوں میں شامل ہوتے ہیں۔ گلوبل تصویر فرضیات ایک پیش ترسین کی کنویرول نیورل نیٹورک کے مطابق اضافہ کیے جاتے ہیں اور (i) سورس مجلس میں لغوں کے مطابق (ii) کوڈر چھپا ہوا حالت کو آغاز کرنے کے لئے اور (iii) ڈیکوڈر چھپا ہوا حالت کو آغاز کرنے کے لئے اضافہ ڈیٹ ہمارے آزمائش میں، ہم انگلیسی اور جرمنی کی ترجمہ کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، کیسے مختلف استراتژیکوں کے ساتھ گروئیل تصویر کے فرضیوں کو ترجمہ کرنا اور کیسے بہترین عمل کرنا ہے. ہم نے بھی اس تأثیر کا تحقیق کرلیا ہے جو سینٹٹیسی multi modal، multilingual data اضافہ کرتا ہے اور دیکھتا ہے کہ اضافہ ڈیٹا multimodal NMT موڈل پر مثبت تأثیر ہے. ہم نئے ایٹیٹ کے نتائج اور ہمارے بہترین نمڈلوں کو بھی مثبت کے ساتھ مثبت کے ساتھ مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق سی ٹی (PBSMT) موڈل پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارے بہترین علم کے لئے یہ پہلی بار ہے کہ ایک صریح نئورل موڈل ایک PBSMT موڈل پر ہر متریک کا ارزش کیا گیا ہے۔', 'ta': 'பல வகையான, கவனம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள புதிய இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மாதிரிகளை குறியீட்டு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு மற்றும் வேறு பகுதிகளில் க முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட புதிய பிம்பத்தின் குணங்கள் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகின்றன மறைந்த நிலையை துவக்க (i) மூலவாக சொற் In our experiments, we evaluate translations into English and German, how different strategies to incorporate global image features compare and which ones perform best.  பல மாதிரி தரவை சேர்த்து கொண்டுவருகிறது மற்றும் கூடுதல் தகவல் பல மாதிரி NMT மாதிரிகளுக்கு நேர்மையான விளைவு உள்ளது என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்கி நாம் புதிய மாநிலை - கலை முடிவுகளை அறிவிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரிகள் ஒப்பிடும் சொற்றொடர் அடிப்படையான புள்ளிவிவரமான MT (PBSMT) மாதிரியில் ம எங்கள் அறிவின் மிக முதல் முறையாக இது ஒரு புதிய புதிய மாதிரி முறையாக மேம்படுத்துகிறது இந்த தரவு அமைப்பில் மதிப்பிடப்பட்ட அனைத்து மெட்', 'uz': "Biz bir necha modal, muhablik asosida ma'lumot tarjima qilish modellarini (NMT) bilan ko'rinish xususiyatlarini kodlash va kodlash usulining ikki qismlariga kiritish mumkin. Name Bizning tajribalarimizda, biz ingliz va Olmonchaga tarjimalarni qiymatimiz, dunyo rasmning xususiyatlarini birlashtirish va ularning eng yaxshi narsalarni bajarish uchun boshqa strategiyalar. Biz bir necha tilda bir necha tillar maʼlumotni qoʻshish natijasini o'rganamiz va qoʻshimcha maʼlumotlar bir necha modal NMT modellariga joylashtirish natijasini o'rganamiz. Biz yangi shaxsiy natijalar haqida xabar beramiz va bizning eng yaxshi modellarimiz esa hamma metrik qiymatiga ko'rsatilgan mulo30k maʼlumotga o'rnatilgan bir bir bir xil imkoniyatlar (PBSMT) modeliga o'rganish mumkin. Bizning eng yaxshi aniqligimizga, bu faqat neyron modeli birinchi marta bu maʼlumot tarkibida qiymatilgan hamma metriklarga PBSMT modeliga juda muhimiy yaxshi beradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu các mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh đa chiều, dựa vào sự chú ý (NMB) chứa các tính năng hình ảnh vào các phần khác nhau của bộ mã hóa và bộ giải. Các tính năng ảnh to àn cầu được lấy ra bằng một mạng thần kinh rối loạn được huấn luyện trước và được nhập vào (i) như các từ trong câu đầu (i) để khởi tạo trạng thái ẩn mã hóa, và (III) như dữ liệu bổ sung để khởi tạo trạng thái mật mã. Trong các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi, chúng tôi đánh giá dịch sang tiếng Anh và Đức, cách những chiến lược khác nhau để áp dụng các đặc điểm ảnh to àn cầu so sánh và cách nào thực hiện tốt nhất. Chúng tôi cũng nghiên cứu tác động mà việc thêm dữ liệu đa chiều, đa chiều, đa dạng, tổng hợp mang lại và thấy rằng dữ liệu bổ sung có ảnh hưởng tích cực cho mô hình NMB đa phương. Chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả hiện đại mới và các mẫu tốt nhất cũng cải thiện đáng kể mô hình thống kê cục bộ mô phỏng dựa trên các cụm từ, PBSMT được đào tạo dựa trên bộ dữ liệu đa 30k dựa trên tất cả các đo đo được đánh giá. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất của chúng ta, đây là lần đầu tiên một mô hình thần kinh thuần túy cải thiện đáng kể hơn một mô hình PBSMT trên tất cả các âm lượng được đánh giá trên bộ dữ liệu này.', 'bg': 'Представяме мултимодални, базирани на вниманието модели на невронен машинен превод (НМТ), които включват визуални характеристики в различни части както на кодера, така и на декодера. Характеристиките на глобалното изображение се извличат с помощта на предварително обучена конволюционна невронна мрежа и се включват (i) като думи в изходното изречение, (ii) за инициализиране на скритото състояние на кодера и (iii) като допълнителни данни за инициализиране на скритото състояние на декодера. В нашите експерименти оценяваме преводите на английски и немски език, как различните стратегии за включване на глобални изображения се сравняват и кои от тях се представят най-добре. Също така изследваме въздействието, което добавянето на синтетични мултимодални, многоезични данни носи и откриваме, че допълнителните данни имат положително въздействие върху мултимодалните модели на НМТ. Ние отчитаме нови най-съвременни резултати, а нашите най-добри модели също така значително се подобряват на сравним модел на базата на фрази, обучен на набор от данни според всички оценени показатели. Доколкото знаем, за първи път чисто невронният модел значително се подобрява спрямо модела на всички показатели, оценени на този набор от данни.', 'nl': 'We introduceren multimodale, attentie-based neural machine translation (NMT) modellen die visuele kenmerken integreren in verschillende delen van zowel de encoder als de decoder. Globale beeldkenmerken worden geëxtraheerd met behulp van een vooraf getraind convolutioneel neuraal netwerk en zijn opgenomen (i) als woorden in de bronzin, (ii) om de verborgen toestand van de encoder te initialiseren, en (iii) als aanvullende gegevens om de verborgen toestand van de decoder te initialiseren. In onze experimenten evalueren we vertalingen in het Engels en Duits, hoe verschillende strategieën om globale beeldkenmerken op te nemen vergelijken en welke het beste presteren. We bestuderen ook de impact van het toevoegen van synthetische multimodale, meertalige gegevens en constateren dat de aanvullende gegevens een positieve impact hebben op multimodale NMT modellen. We rapporteren nieuwe state-of-the-art resultaten en onze beste modellen verbeteren ook aanzienlijk ten opzichte van een vergelijkbaar phrase-based Statistical MT (PBSMT) model dat is getraind op de Multi30k dataset volgens alle geëvalueerde metrics. Voor zover wij weten, is het de eerste keer dat een zuiver neuraal model significant verbetert ten opzichte van een PBSMT model op alle statistieken die op deze gegevensset worden geëvalueerd.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer multimodale, opmærksomhedsbaserede neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller (NMT), som indarbejder visuelle funktioner i forskellige dele af både encoder og dekoder. Globale billedfunktioner udtrækkes ved hjælp af et præ-trænet convolutional neuralt netværk og indarbejdes (i) som ord i kildesætningen, (ii) for at initialisere encoder skjult tilstand, og (iii) som yderligere data for at initialisere dekoder skjult tilstand. I vores eksperimenter evaluerer vi oversættelser til engelsk og tysk, hvordan forskellige strategier til at indarbejde globale billedfunktioner sammenlignes, og hvilke der fungerer bedst. Vi undersøger også den effekt, som tilføjelse af syntetiske multimodale, flersprogede data giver, og finder ud af, at de supplerende data har en positiv indvirkning på multimodale NMT modeller. Vi rapporterer nye state-of-the-art resultater, og vores bedste modeller forbedrer også betydeligt i forhold til en sammenlignelig sætningsbaseret statistisk MT (PBSMT) model uddannet på Multi30k datasættet i henhold til alle evaluerede målinger. Så vidt vi ved, er det første gang, at en rent neural model forbedres betydeligt i forhold til en PBSMT model på alle målinger evalueret på dette datasæt.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo modele koji uključuju vizualne funkcije u različite dijelove kodera i dekodera. Globalne karakteristike slika izvlačene su koristeći predobučenu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu i uključene su i) kao riječi u izvornoj rečenici, ii) za pokretanje skrivenog stanja kodera i iii) kao dodatne podatke za pokretanje skrivenog stanja dekodera. U našim eksperimentima procjenjujemo prevode na engleski i njemački, kako se različite strategije uključivanja globalnih karakteristika slike uspoređuju i koje najbolje izvode. Također proučavamo učinak koji dodaju sintetičke multimodalne, multijezičke podatke i saznaju da dodatni podaci imaju pozitivan utjecaj na multimodalne NMT modele. Prijavljujemo novi rezultati umjetnosti i naši najbolji modeli također značajno poboljšavaju usporedbeni model statističkog MT (PBSMT) koji je obučen na multi30k podataka, prema cijeloj procjeni metrika. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, to je prvi put čisti neuralni model značajno poboljšava preko model a PBSMT na svim metrikama procjenjenim na ovom setu podataka.', 'de': 'Wir führen multimodale, aufmerksamkeitsbasierte NMT-Modelle (Neuronal Machine Translation) ein, die visuelle Merkmale in verschiedene Teile des Encoders und des Decoders integrieren. Globale Bildmerkmale werden mithilfe eines vortrainierten neuronalen Netzes extrahiert und (i) als Wörter im Quellsatz, (ii) zur Initialisierung des versteckten Zustands des Encoders und (iii) als zusätzliche Daten zur Initialisierung des versteckten Zustands des Decoders eingebunden. In unseren Experimenten evaluieren wir Übersetzungen ins Englische und Deutsche, wie sich verschiedene Strategien zur Einbindung globaler Bildmerkmale vergleichen und welche am besten funktionieren. Wir untersuchen auch die Auswirkungen, die das Hinzufügen synthetischer multimodaler, mehrsprachiger Daten mit sich bringt, und stellen fest, dass die zusätzlichen Daten einen positiven Einfluss auf multimodale NMT-Modelle haben. Wir berichten über neue State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse und unsere besten Modelle verbessern sich auch signifikant gegenüber einem vergleichbaren phrasenbasierten Statistical MT (PBSMT)-Modell, das auf dem Multi30k Datensatz trainiert wurde, gemäß allen ausgewerteten Metriken. Nach bestem Wissen ist es das erste Mal, dass sich ein rein neuronales Modell gegenüber einem PBSMT-Modell bei allen auf diesem Datensatz ausgewerteten Metriken signifikant verbessert.', 'fa': 'ما مدل\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cی ماشین\u200cهای عصبی (NMT) بسیاری از مدل\u200cهای متفاوت و توجه\u200cداری را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که ویژه\u200cهای دیده\u200cای را در بخش\u200cهای متفاوت از آن\u200cها متنوع می\u200cسازند و آن\u200cها هم متنوع می\u200cشوند. ویژگی\u200cهای تصویر جهانی با استفاده از شبکه عصبی پیش آموزش داده شده و (i) به عنوان کلمات در جمله منبع (ii) برای آغاز وضعیت پنهان رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی رمز\u200cکننده و (iii) به عنوان داده\u200cهای اضافه برای آغاز وضعیت پنهان\u200cشده\u200cی رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی رمز\u200c در آزمایشات ما، ما ترجمه\u200cها را به انگلیسی و آلمانی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، چگونه استراتژی\u200cهای متفاوتی برای جمع کردن ویژگی\u200cهای تصویر جهانی مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، و کدام بهترین انجام می\u200cدهند. ما همچنین تأثیری را مطالعه می کنیم که اضافه داده های متعدد مدل، متعدد زبان\u200cها و متعدد زبان\u200cها می\u200cآورند و می\u200cفهمیم که داده\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای اثر مثبتی بر مدل\u200cهای متعدد NMT دارند. ما گزارش دادیم نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری جدید و بهترین مدل\u200cهایمان در مورد یک مدل استاستاستیک MT (PBSMT) مقایسه\u200cای که بر روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای متریک\u200cسی متریک آموزش داده شده\u200cاند، معمولاً بهتر است. برای بهترین دانش ما، این اولین بار است که یک مدل عصبی کاملاً معمولاً بر روی یک مدل PBSMT بر روی تمام متریک\u200cها که در این مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها ارزیابی شده\u200cاند بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'ko': '우리는 다중모드, 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경기계번역(NMT) 모델을 소개했는데 이 모델은 시각적 특징을 인코더와 디코더의 다른 부분에 통합시켰다.미리 훈련된 볼륨 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 전역 이미지 특징을 추출하고 이를 원본 문장의 단어로 통합하고 (ii) 인코더 숨김 상태를 초기화하며 (iii) 추가 데이터로 인코더 숨김 상태를 초기화합니다.우리의 실험에서 우리는 영어와 독일어의 번역을 평가하고 어떻게 서로 다른 전략을 비교하여 전 세계 이미지 특징을 통합시키고 어떤 전략이 가장 잘 표현되는지 평가한다.우리는 또한 합성 다중모드, 다중언어 데이터의 첨가가 가져오는 영향을 연구했고 추가 데이터가 다중모드 NMT모델에 긍정적인 영향을 미치는 것을 발견했다.우리는 최근의 최신 결과를 보고했고, 우리의 가장 좋은 모델도 짧은 언어를 바탕으로 하는 통계기계번역(PBSMT) 모델을 현저하게 개선했다. 이 모델은 평가된 모든 지표에 따라 Multi30k 데이터 집합에서 훈련을 한다.이 데이터 세트에서 평가된 모든 지표에서 순수 신경 모델이 PBSMT 모델보다 현저하게 개선된 것은 이번이 처음인 것으로 알고 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha mifano ya utafsiri wa mashine ya kidini yenye msingi wa utangazaji wa aina mbalimbali (NMT) ambayo inajumuisha vipengele vya kuona katika sehemu mbalimbali za kodi na kodi. Tamko za picha za kimataifa zimetolewa kwa kutumia mtandao wa taratibu ya kikatili iliyoendelea na zinajumuishwa (i) kama maneno katika sentensi ya chanzo, (ii) kuanzisha hali ya siri, na (iii) kama taarifa za ziada ili kuanzisha hali ya kudhibiti ya kufikirika. Katika majaribio yetu, tunatathmini tafsiri katika lugha ya Kiingereza na Kijerumani, namna mbinu tofauti za kuingiza picha za duniani zinazolinganisha na vipi vinavyofanya vizuri zaidi. Kadhalika tunasoma madhara ambayo kuongeza taarifa za mfululizo wa aina mbalimbali za lugha zinaleta na kutambua kuwa taarifa za ziada zina athari chanya juu ya modeli za NMT. Tunatoa taarifa za matokeo mapya ya hali ya sanaa na mifano yetu bora pia inaboresha ubora mkubwa juu ya modeli inayofanana na maneno ya Takwimu ya MT (PBSMT) inayofundishwa kwa takwimu za takwimu za Multi30 kwa mujibu wa mitiriki yote iliyopitishwa. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, ni mara ya kwanza mfano wa neura pekee unaboresha kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya muundo wa PBSMT kwenye mitindo yote inayopitiwa kwenye seti ya data.', 'af': "Ons introduseer multimodale, aandag gebaseerde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) modele wat visuale funksies in verskillende dele van beide die enkoder en die dekoder inkorpreer. Globale beeldfunksies word uitgevoer deur te gebruik van 'n voorafoerende konvolusiele neuralnetwerk en word inkorporeer (i) as woorde in die bron seting, (ii) om die enkoder versteke staat te inisialiseer, en (iii) as addisionele data om die dekoder versteke staat te inisialiseer. In ons eksperimente evalueer ons vertalings in Engels en Duits, hoe verskillende strategies om globale beeldfunksies te vergelyk en wat hulle beste uitvoer. Ons studeer ook die effekt wat sintetiese multimodale, multitaalse data byvoeg en vind dat die addisionele data 'n positiewe effekt het op multimodale NMT modele. Ons rapporteer nuwe state-of-the-art resultate en ons beste modele ook betekeurig verbeter op 'n vergelykbare frase-gebaseerde Statistiese MT (PBSMT) model wat op die Multi30k data stel geonderwerp is volgens alle metries geevalueer. Op die beste van ons kennis is dit die eerste keer 'n suiwer neurale model betekenlik verbeter oor 'n PBSMT model op alle metries wat op hierdie data stel evalueer is.", 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe modal, üns tabanly näyral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) nusgalaryny tanyşdyrýarys. Ködler we dekoderiň farklı bölgelerinde görsel özellikleri bar. Umumy resim karakterleri öň-öňünde eğlenen neiral a ňla ullanýar we (i) çeşme sözleriň i çine girilýär, (ii) kodçy gizlenen durumyny başlatmak üçin, we (iii) dekoderçi gizlenen durumyny başlatmak üçin ullanylýar. Biziň deneylerimizde, Iňlisçe we nemesçe terjimeleri, dünýädäki surat üýtgetmek üçin nähili üýtgeşik we nähili gowy edip biljek stratejilerimizi deňleýäris. Biz de çoklu modal, çoklu dilli veriler eklenen etkisini öğrendik ve eklenen veriler çoklu modal NMT modellerine pozitif etkisi bar. Biz täze sanat netijelerini we iň gowy modellerimizi daýarlykly frazle daýarlykly Statistik MT (PBSMT) modelini Multi30k veri sistemine görkezilýän şekilde üýtgederis. Bilgimiziň iň gowy bolansa, bu ilkinji gezek, duýgun bir neural modeli bu maglumatyň düzümlenmesinde PBSMT modeliniň üstünde ähli metriklerde has gowy gelinýär.', 'am': 'ብዙዎች የሆኑት የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) ሞዴላዎችን እናስታውቃለን፤ የዓይነቶችን ጥናት ከኮድ እና የኮድ ክፍሎች በተለየ ክፍሎች ውስጥ እናስገባለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ምስል ምርጫዎች አስቀድሞ የተሰወረውን የነጥብ መረብ በመጠቀም እና (i) በመክፈት ክፍል ውስጥ ቃላት (i) ይዘጋጅተዋል፣ (ii) የሆኑት የሆኑን የሆኑትን ሁኔታ ለመጀመሪያ እና (iii) የተሰወረውን የክክፈት ሁኔታ ለመጀመሪያ የሚጨመር ዳታ ናቸው፡፡ በተፈተናችንን፣ እንግሊዘኛ እና ጀርመን ላይ ትርጓሜዎችን እናስተውላለን፣ እንዴት የተለየ የዓለሙን ምስል አቀማመጥ እና ምን ያህል ትርጓሜዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ብዙ-ዓይነት፣ በብዙ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን በመጨመር ላይ የሚያስጨምሩትን ጥቃት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ የ-አርእስት ውጤቶች እና መልካሙን ዓይነታችን በሚያሳየው የፊደል ተርታፊ MT (PBSMT) ሞዴል በሙሉ ሚትሪክ ሁሉ በሚያስተምርበት የብዙ30k ዳታ የተማረከውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ወደምናውቀታችን በተሻለ ጊዜ በመጀመሪያ ጊዜ በዚህ ዳታ መስመር ላይ በሚታየው በPBSMT ሞዴል ላይ በሙሉ የሚሻል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne futim modele multimodale, me bazë në vëmendje të përkthimit të makinave nervore (NMT) që përfshijnë karakteristika vizuale në pjesë të ndryshme të koduesit dhe dekoderit. Karakteristikat globale të imazhit nxirren duke përdorur një rrjet nervor konvolutiv të trajnuar para dhe janë përfshirë (i) si fjalë në fjalën e burimit, (ii) për të inicializuar gjendjen e fshehtë të koduesit dhe (iii) si të dhëna shtesë për të inicializuar gjendjen e fshehtë të koduesit. Në eksperimentet tona, ne vlerësojmë përkthimet në anglisht dhe gjerman, se si strategjitë e ndryshme për të përfshirë karakteristikat globale të imazhit krahasohen dhe cilat bëjnë më mirë. Ne studiojmë gjithashtu ndikimin që shtimi i të dhënave sintetike multimodale, multigjuhësore sjell dhe zbulojmë se të dhënat shtesë kanë një ndikim pozitiv në modelet multimodale NMT. Ne raportojmë rezultate të reja të state-of-the-art dhe modelet tona më të mira gjithashtu përmirësohen në mënyrë të konsiderueshme në një model Statistical MT (PBSMT) të krahasuar me fraza të trajnuar në grupin e të dhënave Multi30k sipas të gjitha metrikave të vlerësuara. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, është hera e parë që një model i thjeshtë neuronal përmirësohet ndjeshëm mbi një model PBSMT në të gjitha metrikat e vlerësuara në këtë set të dhënash.', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu modal, dikkat-tabanlı nöral maşın çevirimi modelləri təşkil edirik ki, göylü xüsusiyyətləri də kodlayıcının və dekoderin farklı parçalarına daxil edir. Qlobal surat xüsusiyyətləri əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş nürol a ğ vasitəsilə çıxarılır və (i) mənbə cümləsində sözlər olaraq, ii) kodlayıcı gizli durumu başlatmaq üçün, və (iii) dekoder gizli durumu başlatmaq üçün əlavə məlumatlar olaraq daxil edilir. Bizim təcrübələrimizdə İngilizce və Almanca çevirilənləri, küresel surat özelliklərini birləşdirmək üçün nə cür müxtəlif stratejilər yaradılır və nələr ən yaxşı işlər edirlər. Biz də sintetik çoxlu modal, çoxlu dil verilənlərin əlavə etdiyi təsiri və çoxlu modal NMT modellərinin çoxlu təsirlərinin pozitif təsiri olduğunu öyrənirik. Biz yeni məhsul sonuçlarını və ən yaxşı modellərimizi də müəyyən edilmiş metriklərə görə müəyyən edilən statistik MT (PBSMT) modeli ilə müəyyən edilən müəyyən edilə bilər. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına gəldikdə, bu məlumatlarda değerlendirilmiş bütün metriklərin PBSMT modeli üzərində ilk dəfə təmiz nöral modeli çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմամոդալ, ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդելներ, որոնք ներառում են տեսողական հատկանիշներ և կոդերի տարբեր մասերի: Գլոբալ պատկերի հատկությունները դուրս են գալիս նախապատրաստված կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի օգնությամբ և ներառվում են i) որպես բառեր աղբյուր նախադասության մեջ, II) կոդերի թաքնված վիճակի սկզբնավորման և III) որպես ավելացյալ տվյալներ՝ կոդերի թաքնված վիճակի Մեր փորձարկումներում մենք գնահատում ենք անգլերեն և գերմաներեն թարգմանությունները, թե ինչպես են համեմատում համաշխարհային պատկերի առանձնահատկություններ ներառելու տարբեր ռազմավարությունները և որոնք ամենալավ են: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք այն ազդեցությունը, որ ավելացնելով սինթետիկ բազմալեզու տվյալները բերում է և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ավելացված տվյալները դրական ազդեցություն ունեն բազմամոդալ NMT մոդելների վրա: We report new state-of-the-art results and our best models also significantly improve on a comparable phrase-based Statistical MT (PBSMT) model trained on the Multi30k data set according to all metrics evaluated.  Մեր գիտելիքներից լավագույն ասած, դա առաջին անգամ է, որ մաքուր նյարդային մոդելը նշանակալի բարելավվում է PBMMT մոդելի միջոցով այս տվյալների համակարգում գնահատված բոլոր մետրիկների վրա:', 'bn': 'আমরা বহুমোডাল, মনোযোগ ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) মডেলের পরিচিতি দেখাচ্ছি যা দেখা যাচ্ছে এই এনকোডার এবং ডেকোডারের বিভিন্ গ্লোবাল ছবির বৈশিষ্ট্য পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে বের করা হয়েছে এবং সোর্সের বাক্যে (i) শব্দ হিসেবে লুকিয়ে রাখা হয়েছে (ii) এনকোডার লুকিয়ে রাষ আমাদের পরীক্ষায় আমরা ইংরেজি এবং জার্মানে অনুবাদ মূল্যায়ন করি, বিশ্বব্যাপী ছবির বৈশিষ্ট্যের তুলনায় বিভিন্ন কৌশলগুলো যুক্ত আমরা একই সাথে গবেষণা করি যে সিন্টেটিক মাল্টিমোডাল, বহুভাষার তথ্য যোগ করা হয় এবং খুঁজে বের করি যে এই তথ্য বহুমোডাল এনএমটি মডেলে ইতিবাচক প্ আমরা নতুন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল সংবাদ প্রদান করি এবং আমাদের সেরা মডেলের সংখ্যা প্রদান করি যে সব মেট্রিক মূল্যায়ন করে মাল্টি৩০ক ডাটা নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে তার সাথ To the best of our knowledge, it is the first time a purely neural model significantly improves over a PBSMT model on all metrics evaluated on this data set.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan model multi-modal, berbasis perhatian mesin saraf terjemahan (NMT) yang mengangkut fitur visual ke bagian yang berbeda dari kedua koder dan dekoder. Karakteristik gambar global diekstraksi menggunakan jaringan saraf konvolusi yang terlatih sebelumnya dan didalam (i) sebagai kata dalam kalimat sumber, (ii) untuk menginisialisasi keadaan tersembunyi pengekode, dan (iii) sebagai data tambahan untuk menginisialisasi keadaan tersembunyi pengekode. Dalam eksperimen kami, kami mengevaluasi terjemahan ke bahasa Inggris dan Jerman, bagaimana strategi berbeda untuk mengikorporasi fitur gambar global dibandingkan dan yang mana yang lebih baik. Kami juga mempelajari dampak bahwa menambahkan data multi modal, multibahasa sintetis membawa dan menemukan bahwa data tambahan memiliki dampak positif pada model NMT multimodal. Kami melaporkan hasil terbaik baru dan model terbaik kami juga meningkatkan dengan signifikan pada model Statistical MT (PBSMT) berdasarkan frasa yang dibandingkan yang dilatih pada set data Multi30k menurut semua metrik yang diteliti. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah pertama kalinya model murni saraf meningkat dengan signifikan melalui model PBSMT pada semua metrik yang diteliti pada set data ini.', 'ca': "We introduce multi-modal, attention-based neural machine translation (NMT) models which incorporate visual features into different parts of both the encoder and the decoder.  Les característiques d'imatge globals s'extraeixen fent servir una xarxa neuronal convolucionada i s'incorporan (i) com paraules a la frase de font, (ii) per inicialitzar l'estat amagat del codificador, i (iii) com dades adicionals per inicialitzar l'estat amagat del codificador. En els nostres experiments, evaluem les traduccions en anglès i alemany, com comparen les diferents estratègies per incorporar característiques d'imatge mundial i quines millors. També estudiem l'impacte que afegir dades sintètiques multimodals i multilingües porta i descobrim que les dades adicionals tenen un impacte positiu en els models multimodals de MTN. Rapportem nous resultats més avançats i els nostres millors models també milloren significativament en un model de MT estadística (PBSMT) basat en frases comparable entrenat en el conjunt de dades Multi30k d'acord amb totes les mètriques evaluades. To the best of our knowledge, it is the first time a purely neural model significantly improves over a PBSMT model on all metrics evaluated on this data set.", 'cs': 'Představujeme multimodální, pozornostně založené neuronové strojové překlady (NMT), které zahrnují vizuální prvky do různých částí kodéru i dekodéru. Globální obrazové prvky jsou extrahovány pomocí předem trénované konvoluční neuronové sítě a jsou začleněny (i) jako slova ve zdrojové větě, (ii) pro inicializaci skrytého stavu kodéru a (iii) jako další data pro inicializaci skrytého stavu dekodéru. V našich experimentech hodnotíme překlady do angličtiny a němčiny, jak se porovnávají různé strategie začlenění globálních obrazových rysů a které z nich fungují nejlépe. Dále studujeme dopad přidání syntetických multimodálních, vícejazyčných dat a zjišťujeme, že doplňková data mají pozitivní dopad na multimodální NMT modely. Nahlásíme nové nejmodernější výsledky a naše nejlepší modely se také výrazně zlepšují ve srovnatelném frázovém modelu Statistical MT (PBSMT) trénovaném na datové sadě Multi30k podle všech hodnocených metrik. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí je to poprvé, co se čistě neuronový model výrazně zlepšuje oproti PBSMT modelu ve všech metrikách hodnocených na tomto datovém souboru.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo modele koji uključuju vizualne karakteristike u različite dijelove kodera i dekodera. Globalne karakteristike slika su izvučene koristeći predobučenu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu i uključene su i) kao riječi u izvornoj rečenici, ii) za inicijaciju skrivenog stanja kodera i iii) kao dodatne podatke za inicijaciju skrivenog stanja dekodera. U našim eksperimentima procjenjujemo prevode na engleski i njemački, kako različite strategije za uključenje globalnih karakteristika slika uspoređuju i koje najbolje izvode. Također proučavamo uticaj koji dodaje sintetičke multimodalne, multijezičke podatke i saznajemo da dodatni podaci imaju pozitivan uticaj na multimodalne NMT modele. Prijavljujemo novi rezultati umjetnosti i naši najbolji modeli također značajno poboljšavaju usporedbeni model statističkog MT (PBSMT) koji je obučen na setu podataka Multi30k prema cijeloj procjeni metrika. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, to je prvi put čisti neuralni model značajno poboljšava preko model a PBSMT na svim metrikama procjenama na ovom setu podataka.', 'et': 'Tutvustame multimodaalseid tähelepanupõhiseid neuro masintõlke (NMT) mudeleid, mis sisaldavad visuaalseid funktsioone nii kodeeri kui dekoodri erinevatesse osadesse. Globaalsed pildiomadused ekstraheeritakse eelnevalt väljaõpetatud konvolutsioonivõrgu abil ning need lisatakse i) sõnadena lähtelausesse, ii) kodeerija peidetud oleku initsialiseerimiseks ja iii) lisaandmetena dekooderi peidetud oleku initsialiseerimiseks. Oma eksperimentides hindame tõlkeid inglise ja saksa keelde, kuidas erinevaid strateegiaid globaalsete pildifunktsioonide kaasamiseks võrreldakse ja millised neist kõige paremini toimivad. Samuti uurime sünteetiliste mitmeliigiliste ja mitmekeelsete andmete lisamise mõju ja leiame, et täiendavad andmed avaldavad positiivset mõju mitmeliigilistele NMT mudelitele. Raporteerime uutest kaasaegsetest tulemustest ning meie parimad mudelid parandavad oluliselt võrreldavat fraasipõhist statistilist MT (PBSMT) mudelit, mis on koolitatud Multi30k andmekogumiga vastavalt kõigile hinnatud mõõdikutele. Meie teadmiste kohaselt paraneb puhtalt närvimudel esmakordselt PBSMT mudeliga võrreldes oluliselt kõikide sellel andmekogumil hinnatud mõõdikute osas.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme multimodaalisia, huomiopohjaisia neurokonekäännösmalleja (NMT), jotka yhdistävät visuaalisia ominaisuuksia sekä kooderin että dekooderin eri osiin. Globaalit kuvaominaisuudet puretaan käyttäen ennalta koulutettua konvolutionaalista neuroverkkoa ja ne sisällytetään (i) sanoina lähdelauseeseen, (ii) kooderin piilotetun tilan alustamiseen ja (iii) lisätietona dekooderin piilotetun tilan alustamiseen. Kokeissamme arvioimme käännöksiä englanniksi ja saksaksi, miten erilaisia strategioita globaalien kuvaominaisuuksien sisällyttämiseksi vertaillaan ja mitkä toimivat parhaiten. Tutkimme myös synteettisen multimodaalisen, monikielisen datan lisäämistä ja toteamme, että lisätiedoilla on myönteinen vaikutus multimodaalisiin NMT-malleihin. Raportoimme uusista huippuluokan tuloksista ja parhaat mallimme myös parantavat merkittävästi vertailukelpoista lausepohjaisea Statistical MT (PBSMT) -mallia, joka on koulutettu Multi30k-aineistoon kaikkien arvioitujen mittareiden mukaisesti. Tietojemme mukaan tämä on ensimmäinen kerta, kun puhtaasti neuromalli paranee merkittävästi PBSMT-malliin verrattuna kaikissa tässä aineistossa arvioiduissa mittareissa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunaké model multi modal, akèh basa nang titik-titik penting a sistem Neral (NMT) sing isinlangan perusahaan anyar neng sampek anyar karo koder karo decoder Global image settings Nang dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi kanggo ingkang karo alam lan alam, piye dadi kapan kanggo sampeyan ingkang sampeyan surat sing paling nggawe gerakan karo ingkang sampeyan karo cebo sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé mulai nggambar efek nambah sistem sing dadi multi-modal, dadi multi-luwih hayet nggawe dadi supaya karo model NMT multi-modal Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing bagian-de-the-arts dadi lan model sing luwih dumaten ngono nggawe barang nggawe gerarané karo perusahaan MT (PGSMT) Awakdhéwé karéné awakdhéwé, kuwi tanggal dhéwé, kuwi model Nyural sing berarti bisa supoyo supoyo model PGSMT kanggo kuwi nggawe meta-teka iki dadi iki.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙuyyar da misãlai masu fassarar kwamfyutan neural da aka bincike wa multi-moda, masu fassarar kwamfyuta (NMT), wanda ke shigar da masu tsari masu gani cikin rabo-daban kode da koden. An fiɗe tsaro na zanen Duniya da aka yi amfani da wani jerin neural na farko wanda aka tsare shi kuma aka shigar da shi (i) kamar magana cikin maganar source, (ii) dõmin ya fara halin kode da aka ɓõye, kuma (i) da wasu data dõmin ya farata halin bango. Daga majarinmu, munã qiimara fassarar zuwa Ingiriya da Jarmaya, ko da takwara masu sãɓãni ga za'a haɗa zanen duniya sami da kuma wanne masu sami da mafi kyau. Kayya, Munã karanta aikin da za'a ƙara data masu haɗi da multi-modal, da multi-lingui ke zo, kuma munã gane cewa data masu ƙaranci sunã da wani mai jida'a kan misãlai na NMT. Munã sanar da fassarar-al'amarin-sanar da misalinmu masu kyauta suna da mai girma a sami-misalin misalin MT (PBSMT) wanda aka yi wa shirin a kan multi-30 data set da aka ƙayyade duk metric. Ga mafi kyaun saninmu, shi ne na farkon farkon misalin neura mai kyau a kan wani misalin PBSMT mai girma a kan duk metric wanda aka ƙaddara kan wannan tsarin data.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo multimodalne modele nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT), ki vključujejo vizualne značilnosti v različne dele kodirja in dekoderja. Značilnosti globalne slike se ekstrahirajo z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenega konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja in so vključene (i) kot besede v izvorni stavek, (ii) za inicializacijo skritega stanja kodirja in (iii) kot dodatni podatki za inicializacijo skritega stanja dekoderja. V naših eksperimentih ocenjujemo prevode v angleščino in nemščino, kako se primerjajo različne strategije za vključitev globalnih slikovnih funkcij in katere so najbolj uspešne. Preučujemo tudi vpliv, ki ga prinaša dodajanje sintetičnih multimodalnih večjezičnih podatkov, in ugotovimo, da dodatni podatki pozitivno vplivajo na multimodalne modele NMT. Poročamo o novih najsodobnejših rezultatih, naši najboljši modeli pa tudi bistveno izboljšujejo primerljiv model statističnega MT na osnovi fraz (PBSMT), usposobljen na podatkovnem nizu Multi30k glede na vse ocenjene meritve. Kolikor vemo, je to prvič, da se popolnoma nevronski model v primerjavi z modelom PBSMT bistveno izboljša pri vseh meritvah, ocenjenih na tem naboru podatkov.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודלים של מכונות עצביות רבות-מודאליות ומבוססים על תשומת לב (NMT) שמכילים תכונות ויזואליות לחלקים שונים של המקודד וגם המקודד. אופייני התמונה הגלובליים מווצאים באמצעות רשת עצבית משתנה מאומנת מראש והם מורכבים (i) כמילים במשפט המקור, (ii) כדי לאתחיל את מצב הקודד המוסתר, ולiii) כנתונים נוספים כדי לאתחיל את מצב הקודד המוסתר. בניסויים שלנו, אנו מעריכים את התרגשות לאנגלית וגרמנית, איך אסטרטגיות שונות כדי להכיל תכונות תמונות גלובליות משוואות ואיזה מהם מצליחים הכי טוב. אנחנו גם לומדים את ההשפעה שההוספת נתונים סינטטיים multi-modal, multilingual מביאה ומגלה כי נתונים נוספים יש השפעה חיובית על דוגמנים NMT multi-modal. אנו מדווחים על תוצאות חדשות ומודלים הטובים ביותר שלנו גם משתפרים באופן משמעותי על מודל סטטיסטי MT (PBSMT) מבוסס על ביטויים שווים, מאומן על קבוצת נתונים Multi30k לפי כל המטריות המערכות. לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, זו הפעם הראשונה שמודל עצבי טהור משתפר באופן משמעותי על מודל PBSMT על כל מטריות שנערכה על קבוצת נתונים זו.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་བཟའ་བྱ་རིམ་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་ནུས་པའི་མིའུ་རྩོམ་འཁོར་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གསལ་ཆས་འདྲ་བ་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་བྱེ སྤྱི་ཁྱད་པར་གཟུགས་རིས ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཆོས་ནང་དུ་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ནང་འཇུག་སྲིད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དང ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དབྱིབས་སྦྱོར་མཐུན་བརྗོད་བྱས་པར་ཨ་རིས་བྱུང་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་མང་ཙམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་ནས་མཐུན་ཐུ We report new state-of-the-art results and our best models also significantly improve on a comparable phrase-based Statistical MT (PBSMT) model trained on the Multi30k data set according to all metrics evaluated. The first argument is "state-of-the-art results". To the best of our knowledge, it is the first time a purely neural model significantly improves over a PBSMT model on all metrics evaluated on this data set.'}
{'en': 'Mapping Instructions and Visual Observations to Actions with Reinforcement Learning', 'fr': "Mappage des instructions et des observations visuelles aux actions avec l'apprentissage par renforcement", 'pt': 'Mapeamento de instruções e observações visuais para ações com aprendizado por reforço', 'ja': '強化学習を伴う行動への指示と視覚的観察のマッピング', 'zh': '用强化学将指令和视觉观察映射到操作', 'ar': 'تعليمات رسم الخرائط والملاحظات المرئية للإجراءات مع التعلم المعزز', 'es': 'Mapeo de instrucciones y observaciones visuales a acciones con aprendizaje por refuerzo', 'ru': 'Сопоставление инструкций и визуальных наблюдений с действиями по обучению подкреплению', 'hi': 'सुदृढीकरण सीखने के साथ क्रियाओं के लिए निर्देशों और दृश्य अवलोकनों को मैप करना', 'ga': 'Treoracha Mapála agus Amharc-Bhreathnaithe ar Ghníomhartha le Foghlaim Neartaithe', 'ka': 'მარტიკური ინსტრუქციები და ვიზუალური მონაცემებები მოქმედებისთვის სწავლებისთვის', 'el': 'Χαρτογράφηση οδηγιών και οπτικών παρατηρήσεων σε δράσεις με ενισχυτική μάθηση', 'hu': 'Feltérképezési utasítások és vizuális megfigyelések a megerősített tanulással rendelkező intézkedésekhez', 'it': 'Istruzioni di mappatura e osservazioni visive alle azioni con apprendimento di rinforzo', 'lt': 'Mokymosi stiprinimu veiksmų žemėlapių nustatymo instrukcijos ir vizualinės stebėsenos', 'kk': 'Құрастыру оқыту арқылы әрекеттерге картаптау құқықтары мен көрінетін бақылаулар', 'mk': 'Инструкции за мапирање и визуелни набљудувања на дејствата со зајакнување на учењето', 'ms': 'Petakan Arahan dan Perhatian Visual ke Tindakan Dengan Pelajaran Pengesahan', 'ml': 'Mapping Instructions and Visual Observations to Actions with Reinforcement Learning', 'mn': 'Зөвлөх заавал болон харааны ажиллагаа суралцах үйл ажиллагаанд газрын зураг', 'mt': 'Struzzjonijiet ta’ Mappar u Osservazzjonijiet Viżwali għal Azzjonijiet b’Tagħlim ta’ Tisħiħ', 'no': 'Mapping instruksjonar og visuelle observasjonar til handlingar med forstørringar', 'pl': 'Mapowanie instrukcji i obserwacji wizualnych do działań z uczeniem się wzmacniającym', 'ro': 'Instrucțiuni de cartografiere și observații vizuale la acțiuni cu învățare consolidată', 'sr': 'Mapiranje instrukcija i vizualne promatranja akcijama sa učenjem pojačanja', 'si': 'Mapping Instructions and Visal Observation to Action with Strengforce Training', 'so': 'Mapping instructions and Visual Observations to Actions with Reinforcement Learning', 'sv': 'Kartläggning av instruktioner och visuella observationer till åtgärder med förstärkt lärande', 'ta': 'மீண்டும் கற்றுக்கொண்டு செயல்களுக்கு கட்டளைகள் மற்றும் காட்சி பார்வைகளை வரைபடம்', 'ur': 'سیکھنے کے ساتھ مکاپینگ ڈرستورٹ اور بینال آزمائش', 'uz': 'Mapping Instructions and Visual Observations to Actions with Reinforcement Learning', 'vi': 'Hướng dẫn vẽ thư mục và quan sát hình ảnh đối với những hành động sau khi học', 'bg': 'Инструкции за картографиране и визуални наблюдения към действия с подсилващо обучение', 'nl': 'Instructies en visuele observaties in kaart brengen op acties met versterking leren', 'hr': 'Mapiranje instrukcija i vizualne promatranja djelovanja s učenjem pojačanja', 'da': 'Kortlægning af instruktioner og visuelle observationer til handlinger med forstærket læring', 'de': 'Zuordnung von Anweisungen und visuellen Beobachtungen zu Maßnahmen mit Reinforcement Learning', 'id': 'Petakan Instruksi dan Observati Visual untuk Tindakan Dengan Pembelajaran Pengesahan', 'sw': 'Ramani za Mafunzo na Maonyesho ya Maonyesho kwa Shughuli za Kufundisha Maendeleo', 'tr': 'Hareketlar Instruktlar we Görsel Görniş Opşenler Küçlemek Öwrenmek bilen Görniş Opşenler', 'sq': 'hartimi i udhëzimeve dhe vëzhgimeve vizuale për veprimet me mësimin e forcimit', 'af': 'Mapping Instruksies en Visuele Observasies na Aksies met Verbevesting Leer', 'ko': '학습 강화를 통해 지령과 시각적 관찰을 행동에 비추다', 'am': 'መግለጫ እና የሳያዊ ምርጫዎች ወደ ትምህርት ትምህርት', 'hy': 'Կարտեզագրել Արժեքներ և տեսողական դիտարկումներ', 'fa': 'دستورات نقشه\u200cبندی و مراقبت دیدگانی به فعالیت با یادگیری بیشتری', 'bn': 'পুনঃসংস্কার শিক্ষা দ্বারা কার্যক্রমের জন্য নির্দেশ এবং দৃশ্য পর্যবেক্ষণ মানচিত্র মানচিত্র', 'az': 'Q칲vv톛tli 칬yr톛nm톛k il톛 eyleml톛r톛 r톛smi v톛 G칬r칲n칲l G칬zl톛ri', 'ca': 'Instruccions de mapa i observacions visuals a accions amb aprenentatge de reforç', 'et': 'Kaardistamisjuhised ja visuaalsed vaatlused tugevdava õppega meetmete kohta', 'cs': 'Mapování pokynů a vizuálních pozorování k akcím s posilovacím učením', 'fi': 'Kartoitusohjeet ja visuaaliset havainnot tehostetun oppimisen toimintoihin', 'bs': 'Mapiranje instrukcija i vizualne promatranja akcijama s učenjem pojačanja', 'jv': 'Mapping Instructions and Visual', 'he': 'המפה של הוראות ותצפיות חזותיות לפעולות עם לימוד חיבורי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Navodila za kartiranje in vizualna opazovanja ukrepov z okrepljenim učenjem', 'bo': 'Mapping Instructions and Visual Observations to Action with Reinforcement Learning'}
{'en': 'We propose to directly map raw visual observations and text input to actions for instruction execution. While existing approaches assume access to structured environment representations or use a pipeline of separately trained models, we learn a single model to jointly reason about linguistic and visual input. We use reinforcement learning in a contextual bandit setting to train a neural network agent. To guide the agent’s exploration, we use reward shaping with different forms of supervision. Our approach does not require intermediate representations, planning procedures, or training different models. We evaluate in a simulated environment, and show significant improvements over supervised learning and common reinforcement learning variants.', 'ar': 'نقترح تعيين الملاحظات المرئية الأولية وإدخال النص مباشرة على الإجراءات لتنفيذ التعليمات. بينما تفترض الأساليب الحالية الوصول إلى تمثيلات البيئة المهيكلة أو استخدام خط أنابيب من النماذج المدربة بشكل منفصل ، فإننا نتعلم نموذجًا واحدًا للتفكير المشترك حول المدخلات اللغوية والمرئية. نستخدم التعلم المعزز في إعداد ماكينات الحظ لتدريب وكيل الشبكة العصبية. لتوجيه استكشاف الوكيل ، نستخدم شكل المكافأة مع أشكال مختلفة من الإشراف. لا يتطلب نهجنا تمثيلات وسيطة أو إجراءات تخطيط أو تدريب نماذج مختلفة. نقوم بالتقييم في بيئة محاكاة ، ونظهر تحسينات كبيرة على التعلم الخاضع للإشراف ومتغيرات التعلم المعزز المشتركة.', 'es': 'Proponemos mapear directamente las observaciones visuales sin procesar y la entrada de texto a las acciones para la ejecución de instrucciones. Si bien los enfoques existentes suponen el acceso a representaciones de entornos estructurados o utilizan una canalización de modelos entrenados por separado, aprendemos un modelo único para razonar conjuntamente sobre las aportaciones lingüísticas y visuales. Utilizamos el aprendizaje por refuerzo en un entorno de bandido contextual para entrenar a un agente de red neuronal. Para guiar la exploración del agente, utilizamos la configuración de recompensas con diferentes formas de supervisión. Nuestro enfoque no requiere representaciones intermedias, procedimientos de planificación ni capacitación de diferentes modelos. Evaluamos en un entorno simulado y mostramos mejoras significativas con respecto al aprendizaje supervisado y las variantes comunes de aprendizaje por refuerzo.', 'pt': 'Propomos mapear diretamente observações visuais brutas e entrada de texto para ações para execução de instruções. Embora as abordagens existentes assumam o acesso a representações de ambiente estruturadas ou usem um pipeline de modelos treinados separadamente, aprendemos um único modelo para raciocinar em conjunto sobre entrada linguística e visual. Usamos o aprendizado de reforço em um cenário de bandido contextual para treinar um agente de rede neural. Para guiar a exploração do agente, usamos a modelagem de recompensas com diferentes formas de supervisão. Nossa abordagem não requer representações intermediárias, procedimentos de planejamento ou treinamento de modelos diferentes. Avaliamos em um ambiente simulado e mostramos melhorias significativas em relação ao aprendizado supervisionado e às variantes comuns de aprendizado por reforço.', 'fr': "Nous proposons de mapper directement les observations visuelles brutes et la saisie de texte aux actions pour l'exécution des instructions. Alors que les approches existantes supposent l'accès à des représentations d'environnement structurées ou utilisent un pipeline de modèles formés séparément, nous apprenons un modèle unique pour raisonner conjointement sur les entrées linguistiques et visuelles. Nous utilisons l'apprentissage par renforcement dans un contexte de bandit contextuel pour former un agent de réseau neuronal. Pour guider l'exploration de l'agent, nous utilisons la mise en forme des récompenses avec différentes formes de supervision. Notre approche ne nécessite pas de représentations intermédiaires, de procédures de planification ou de formation de différents modèles. Nous évaluons dans un environnement simulé et montrons des améliorations significatives par rapport à l'apprentissage supervisé et aux variantes d'apprentissage par renforcement courantes.", 'ja': '生の視覚的観察とテキスト入力を命令実行のためのアクションに直接マッピングすることを提案します。既存のアプローチは、構造化された環境表現へのアクセスを前提としているか、別々に訓練されたモデルのパイプラインを使用しているが、私たちは単一のモデルを学習して、言語的および視覚的入力について共同で推論する。私たちは、神経ネットワークエージェントを訓練するために、文脈的な盗賊の設定で強化学習を使用します。エージェントの調査を導くために、さまざまな監督形態の報酬形成を使用します。私たちのアプローチは、中間表現、計画手順、または異なるモデルのトレーニングを必要としません。私たちは模擬環境で評価し、監督学習と一般的な強化学習のバリアントよりも有意な改善を示します。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем напрямую сопоставлять необработанные визуальные наблюдения и ввод текста с действиями для выполнения команды. В то время как существующие подходы предполагают доступ к структурированным представлениям среды или использование конвейера отдельно обученных моделей, мы изучаем одну модель, чтобы совместно рассуждать о лингвистическом и визуальном вводе. Мы используем обучение подкреплению в контекстной обстановке бандитов, чтобы обучить агента нейронной сети. Чтобы направлять разведку агента, мы используем формирование награды с различными формами надзора. Наш подход не требует промежуточных представлений, процедур планирования или обучения различных моделей. Мы оцениваем в смоделированной среде и показываем значительные улучшения по сравнению с контролируемым обучением и общими вариантами обучения подкрепления.', 'ga': 'Tá sé beartaithe againn breathnuithe amhairc amh agus ionchur téacs a mhapáil go díreach chuig gníomhartha le haghaidh teagasc a chur i gcrích. Cé go nglactar le cuir chuige reatha rochtain ar léirithe struchtúrtha timpeallachta nó go n-úsáideann siad píblíne de mhúnlaí oilte ar leithligh, foghlaimímid samhail aonair chun comhréasú a dhéanamh faoi ionchur teanga agus amhairc. Bainimid úsáid as foghlaim atreisithe i suíomh meirleach comhthéacsúil chun oibreán néarlíonra a oiliúint. Chun taiscéalaíocht an ghníomhaire a threorú, bainimid úsáid as múnlú luach saothair le cineálacha éagsúla maoirseachta. Ní éilíonn ár gcur chuige uiríll idirmheánacha, nósanna imeachta pleanála, ná oiliúint ar mhúnlaí éagsúla. Déanaimid meastóireacht i dtimpeallacht ionsamhailte, agus léirímid feabhsuithe suntasacha ar an bhfoghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht agus ar na comhathróga foghlama treisithe.', 'zh': '我们建议直将原始视觉观察和文本输入指令行动中。 虽设访结构化境,示用独练之道,然吾学单模以共理言视觉输入。 吾于上下文盗设中用强化学以训神经网络摄。 为导代理人探索,吾曹用异文。 吾法不须中,规画程序练。 拟境评估,显示监督,常见强化变体显进。', 'hi': 'हम सीधे अनुदेश निष्पादन के लिए कार्यों के लिए कच्चे दृश्य टिप्पणियों और पाठ इनपुट को मैप करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। जबकि मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण संरचित पर्यावरण प्रतिनिधित्व तक पहुंच मानते हैं या अलग-अलग प्रशिक्षित मॉडल की पाइपलाइन का उपयोग करते हैं, हम भाषाई और दृश्य इनपुट के बारे में संयुक्त रूप से तर्क करने के लिए एक एकल मॉडल सीखते हैं। हम एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क एजेंट को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक प्रासंगिक डाकू सेटिंग में सुदृढीकरण सीखने का उपयोग करते हैं। एजेंट की खोज का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए, हम पर्यवेक्षण के विभिन्न रूपों के साथ इनाम को आकार देने का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे दृष्टिकोण को मध्यवर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व, योजना प्रक्रियाओं, या विभिन्न मॉडलों को प्रशिक्षित करने की आवश्यकता नहीं है। हम एक नकली वातावरण में मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और पर्यवेक्षित सीखने और सामान्य सुदृढीकरण सीखने के वेरिएंट पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'hu': 'Javasoljuk, hogy közvetlenül feltérképezzük a nyers vizuális megfigyeléseket és a szövegbevitelt az utasítások végrehajtásához szükséges műveletekhez. Míg a meglévő megközelítések strukturált környezeti reprezentációkhoz való hozzáférést feltételeznek, vagy külön képzett modelleket használnak, egyetlen modellt tanulunk meg a nyelvi és vizuális bemutatásokról. Megerősítő tanulást használunk egy kontextuális bandita beállításban, hogy kiképezzünk egy ideghálózati ügynököt. Az ügynök felfedezésének irányításához különböző felügyeleti formákkal használjuk a jutalomformálást. Megközelítésünk nem igényel közbenső reprezentációkat, tervezési eljárásokat vagy különböző modellek képzését. Szimulált környezetben értékeljük, és jelentős javulást mutatunk a felügyelt tanuláshoz és a közös erősítési tanuláshoz képest.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε να χαρτογραφήσουμε άμεσα ακατέργαστες οπτικές παρατηρήσεις και εισαγωγή κειμένου σε ενέργειες εκτέλεσης εντολών. Ενώ οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις προϋποθέτουν πρόσβαση σε δομημένες αναπαραστάσεις περιβάλλοντος ή χρησιμοποιούν μια σειρά από ξεχωριστά εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα, μαθαίνουμε ένα μόνο μοντέλο για να συλλογιστούμε από κοινού τη γλωσσική και οπτική εισαγωγή. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη μάθηση ενίσχυσης σε ένα πλαίσιο ληστών για να εκπαιδεύσουμε έναν πράκτορα νευρωνικού δικτύου. Για να καθοδηγήσουμε την εξερεύνηση του πράκτορα, χρησιμοποιούμε τη διαμόρφωση ανταμοιβών με διαφορετικές μορφές εποπτείας. Η προσέγγισή μας δεν απαιτεί ενδιάμεσες αναπαραστάσεις, διαδικασίες προγραμματισμού ή εκπαίδευση διαφορετικών μοντέλων. Αξιολογούμε σε ένα προσομοιωμένο περιβάλλον και εμφανίζουμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με την εποπτευόμενη μάθηση και τις κοινές μορφές μάθησης ενίσχυσης.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ დავწეროთ სურათი ვიზუალური მონაცემები და ტექსტის მონაცემებისთვის მოქმედებისთვის ინსტუქციის გამოყენებისთვის. მხოლოდ სტრუქტურებული გარემოსაზღვრებებისთვის შესაძლებლობა ან გამოყენება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად ჩვენ გამოყენებთ კონტექსტური ბანდიტის სწავლებას, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელის ადვნენტის გასწავლად. რომელიც ადვნენტის განსხვავებას მივიყენებთ, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ სამუშაო, რომელიც განსხვავებული ფორმებით მონახვა. ჩვენი პროგრამა არ იჭირდება განსხვავებული მოდელების განსაზღვრება, პროგრამები, ან განსხვავებული მოდელების განსაზღვრება. ჩვენ სიმულაციული გარემოსებაში გავუმუშავებთ და გაჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი გარემოსებების შესახებ სწავლების და საერთო გარემოსება სწავლების გარემოსებას.', 'it': "Proponiamo di mappare direttamente osservazioni visive grezze e input di testo alle azioni per l'esecuzione delle istruzioni. Mentre gli approcci esistenti presuppongono l'accesso a rappresentazioni ambientali strutturate o utilizzano una pipeline di modelli formati separatamente, impariamo un unico modello per ragionare congiuntamente sull'input linguistico e visivo. Usiamo l'apprendimento di rinforzo in un contesto bandito per addestrare un agente di rete neurale. Per guidare l'esplorazione dell'agente, usiamo la forma della ricompensa con diverse forme di supervisione. Il nostro approccio non richiede rappresentazioni intermedie, procedure di pianificazione o formazione di modelli diversi. Valutiamo in un ambiente simulato e mostriamo miglioramenti significativi rispetto all'apprendimento supervisionato e alle varianti comuni di apprendimento di rinforzo.", 'lt': 'Siūlome tiesiogiai žemėlapizuoti žaliavinius vizualinius stebėjimus ir teksto įrašus veiksmams, skirtiems instrukcijoms vykdyti. Nors esami metodai apima galimybę susipažinti su struktūrizuotais aplinkos atstovais arba naudoti atskirai parengtų modelių vamzdyną, mes išmokome vieną model į bendrai pagrįsti kalbinius ir vizualinius įvedimus. Mes naudojame sustiprintą mokymąsi kontekstiniame juostoje, kad mokytume nervų tinklo agent ą. Siekdami vadovauti agento tyrinėjimui, mes naudojame apdovanojimų formą su skirtingomis priežiūros formomis. Mūsų požiūris nereikalauja tarpinių atstovavimų, planavimo procedūrų ar skirtingų modelių mokymo. Vertiname simuliuojamoje aplinkoje ir parodomi reikšmingi pagerėjimai, palyginti su prižiūrimu mokymusi ir bendrais mokymosi stiprinimu variantais.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме директно да се мапираат сурови визуелни набљудувања и текстови внесувања во акциите за извршување на инструкциите. Иако постојните пристапи претпоставуваат пристап до структурирани претставувања на животната средина или користат гасовод од одделно обучени модели, научиме еден модел за заеднички размислување за јазичниот и визуелниот влог. We use reinforcement learning in a contextual bandit setting to train a neural network agent.  За да ја водиме експлоатацијата на агентот, користиме формирање на награди со различни форми на надзор. Нашиот пристап не бара меѓувремени претставувања, процедури на планирање или обука на различни модели. Оценуваме во симулирана средина и покажуваме значителни подобрувања во врска со надгледуваното учење и заедничките варијанти на зајакнување на учењето.', 'kk': 'Көрініс көріністер мен мәтін ендіру әрекеттеріне тікелей картасын қолданып тастаймыз. Бұл жерде бар жағдайлар құрылған ортасының түсініктеріне қатынауға немесе бөлек оқылған моделдерді қолдануға қатынауға қатынайды, біз лингвистикалық және визуалдық кіріс туралы бір үлгі үйрен Неврал желі агентін оқыту үшін контекстуалды бандиттің оқытуын қолданамыз. Агенттің зерттеулерін көмектесу үшін, біз басқа қарау түрлеріне сәйкес түрлерін қолданамыз. Біздің тәсіліміміздің орташа таңбалау, планировау процедурлері немесе басқа моделдерді оқыту керек емес. Біз ұқсас ортасында оқу және жалпы оқу үшін көбірек жасауларын көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan untuk memetakan secara langsung pengamatan visual mentah dan input teks ke tindakan untuk pelaksanaan arahan. Sementara pendekatan yang wujud menganggap akses ke perwakilan persekitaran struktur atau menggunakan saluran paip dari model terlatih secara terpisah, kita belajar model tunggal untuk bersama-sama alasan mengenai input bahasa dan visual. Kami menggunakan pembelajaran kuasa dalam tetapan bandit kontekstual untuk melatih ejen rangkaian saraf. Untuk memimpin eksplorasi ejen, kita menggunakan pembentukan hadiah dengan bentuk pengawasan yang berbeza. pendekatan kita tidak memerlukan perwakilan sementara, prosedur merancang, atau latihan model berbeza. Kami menilai dalam persekitaran simulasi, dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan atas pembelajaran yang diawasi dan variasi pembelajaran kuasa umum.', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നേരെ കാഴ്ച കാണാനും വായിച്ചുകൊടുക്കാനും നേരിട് നിലവിലുള്ള നടപടികള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട പരിസ്ഥിതിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് സമ്മതിക്കാനോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക പരിശീലന മോഡലുകളിലെ പൈപ്പ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഏജന്\u200dറിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ബാന്റിറ്റ് സെറ്റില്\u200d പ ഏജന്റിന്റെ പരിശോധന നടത്താന്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രതിഫലം ചെയ്യുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ നടപടികള്\u200dക്ക് തമ്മിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d, പ്ലാനിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡ പരിസ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിക്കുകയും, പഠനത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ചും സാധാരണ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചും മുന്\u200dഗണന മ', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu li nimmappjaw direttament l-osservazzjonijiet viżivi mhux ipproċessati u l-input tat-test għal azzjonijiet għall-eżekuzzjoni tal-istruzzjonijiet. Filwaqt li l-approċċi eżistenti jassumu a ċċess għal rappreżentazzjonijiet strutturati tal-ambjent jew jużaw ġabra ta’ mudelli mħarrġa separatament, nitgħallmu mudell wieħed biex b’mod konġunt nitgħallmu dwar l-input lingwistiku u viżiv. Aħna nużaw tagħlim ta' rinforz f'sett ta' bandit kuntestwali biex in ħarrġu a ġent tan-netwerk newrali. Biex niggwidaw l-esplorazzjoni tal-aġent, aħna nużaw it-tfassil tal-premjijiet b’forom differenti ta’ superviżjoni. L-approċċ tagħna ma jeħtieġx rappreżentazzjonijiet intermedji, proċeduri ta’ ppjanar, jew taħriġ ta’ mudelli differenti. Aħna jevalwaw f'ambjent simulat, u nuru titjib sinifikanti fuq it-tagħlim sorveljat u varjanti komuni ta' tagħlim ta' rinfurzar.", 'mn': 'Бид зөвхөн харагдаж буй ажиллагаануудыг шууд газрын зураг зураг хийх боломжтой. Хэдийгээр суурилсан арга барилгууд бүтээгдсэн орчин тойронд үзүүлэх эсвэл тусгаарлагдсан загваруудын хоолойн шугам ашиглах боломжтой байдаг ч бид хэлний болон үзүүлэлтийн оролцооны талаар нэг загвар суралцдаг. Бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний агентуудыг суралцахын тулд тохиромжтой бандитт суралцах сургалтыг ашигладаг. Агентын судалгааг удирдахын тулд бид шагналыг өөр өөр хэлбэртэй удирдах шагналыг ашигладаг. Бидний арга зам нь төлөвлөгөө, төлөвлөгөө, эсвэл өөр загваруудыг суралцах шаардлагагүй. Бид тодорхойлогдсон орчинд үнэлгээ үзүүлж, хариултын суралцах, нийтлэг нэмэгдүүлэх суралцах хувилбаруудыг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy bezpośrednio mapowanie surowych obserwacji wizualnych i wprowadzenia tekstu do działań do wykonywania instrukcji. Podczas gdy istniejące podejścia zakładają dostęp do ustrukturyzowanych reprezentacji środowiska lub korzystają z rurociągu oddzielnie przeszkolonych modeli, uczymy się jednego modelu, aby wspólnie rozumować o językowym i wizualnym wkładzie. Używamy uczenia wzmacniającego w kontekstowym ustawieniu bandytów do treningu agenta sieci neuronowej. Aby kierować poszukiwaniami agenta, stosujemy kształtowanie nagród z różnymi formami nadzoru. Nasze podejście nie wymaga pośrednich reprezentacji, procedur planowania czy szkolenia różnych modeli. Oceniamy w symulowanym środowisku i wykazujemy znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do nadzorowanego uczenia się i wspólnych wariantów uczenia się wzmacniającego.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår direkte å kartera råde visuelle observasjonar og tekstinndata til handlingar for instruksjonskøyring. Mens det eksisterande tilnærmingane gjer tilgang til strukturerte miljørepresentasjonar eller bruk ein røyrline av separe trengte modeller, lærer vi ein enkel modell for å kopla grunn om språk og visuell inndata. Vi brukar reinforcementlæring i ein kontekst bandit-innstilling for å trenja ein neuralnettverksagent. For å håndtere utforskinga av agent, bruker vi rekningsformasjon med ulike form av oversikt. Tilnærminga vårt krev ikkje mediane representasjonar, planleggingsprosedyrar eller trening av ulike modeller. Vi evaluerer i eit simulert miljø, og viser signifikante forbedringar over oversikte læring og vanlege forstørringsverdiar.', 'ro': 'Propunem cartografierea directă a observațiilor vizuale brute și introducerea textului la acțiunile de executare a instrucțiunilor. În timp ce abordările existente presupun accesul la reprezentări structurate ale mediului sau folosesc o conductă de modele instruite separat, învățăm un singur model pentru a argumenta împreună despre introducerea lingvistică și vizuală. Folosim învățarea de armare într-o setare de bandiți contextual pentru a instrui un agent de rețea neurală. Pentru a ghida explorarea agentului, folosim modelarea recompenselor cu diferite forme de supraveghere. Abordarea noastră nu necesită reprezentări intermediare, proceduri de planificare sau formare a diferitelor modele. Evaluăm într-un mediu simulat și prezentăm îmbunătățiri semnificative față de învățarea supravegheată și variantele comune de învățare de armare.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo direktno mapirati sirove vizuelne promatranja i tekstualne uloge akcijama za izvršavanje instrukcije. Iako postojeći pristupi pretpostavljaju pristup strukturiranim predstavljanjima okoliša ili koriste cijevi odvojenih modela, naučimo jedan model da zajedno razumemo o jezičkom i vizualnom ulazu. Koristimo učenje pojačanja u kontekstualnom banditu da obučimo neuralnu mrežu agent a. Da bismo vodili istraživanje agenta, koristimo nagradu u obliku različitih oblika nadzora. Naš pristup ne zahteva prosječne predstave, procedure za planiranje ili obuku različitih modela. Procjenjujemo u simuliranom okruženju i pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje nadzornog učenja i zajedničkog varianta učenja pojačanja.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට පිළිබඳ බලන්න සහ පාළිබඳ ඇතුළු ක්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරශ් ඉතින් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා නැත්නම් පෙනෙක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන පාය අපි සම්බන්ධ බැන්ඩිට් එක්ක පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ න්\u200dයුරාල් ජාලය නියෝජිතයෙක් කියලා. නියෝජිතයගේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න, අපි වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණාවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පාවිච්චි ක අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ වෙනස් මෝඩල් ප්\u200dරවේශනය, සැලසුම් සැලසුම් සැලසුම් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය උපදේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa inaad toos u soo karto aragtida aragtida khaas ah iyo injiilka qoraalka si loo sameeyo hagitaanka. Inta lagu jiro qaababka ay jiraan waxay qaadan karaan qaabilaadda deegaanka la dhisay ama isticmaali karo tusaale gaar ah, waxaynu barnaa tusaale keliya oo si wadajir ah u barnaa sabab ku saabsan input luqada iyo aragga. Waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa barashada kororsashada bandhigta joogtada ah si aan u tababarinno xarunta shabakadda neurada. Si aan u hagno baaritaanka dallaalka shaqaalaha, waxaynu isticmaalnaa mushaar ku baaraya noocyo kala duduwan oo ilaalinta. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga looma baahna wakiilada dhexe, koorsooyinka qorsheynta ama tababarida noocyo kala duduwan. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa deegaanka la mid ah, waxaana tusnaa horumarin aad u weyn oo ka sarraysa barashada la ilaaliyo iyo kordhinta barashada caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår att direkt kartlägga råa visuella observationer och textinmatning till åtgärder för instruktionsutveckling. Medan befintliga tillvägagångssätt förutsätter tillgång till strukturerade miljörepresentationer eller använder en pipeline av separat utbildade modeller, lär vi oss en enda modell för att gemensamt resonera om språklig och visuell input. Vi använder förstärkningsinlärning i en kontextuell banditinställning för att träna en neuralt nätverksagent. För att vägleda agentens utforskning använder vi belöningsformning med olika former av övervakning. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kräver inte mellanliggande representationer, planeringsprocedurer eller utbildning av olika modeller. Vi utvärderar i en simulerad miljö och visar signifikanta förbättringar jämfört med övervakad inlärning och gemensamma förstärkande inlärningsvarianter.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் நேரடியாக காட்சி பார்வைகள் மற்றும் உரை உள்ளீடுகளை நேரடியாக வரைபடத்திற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்.  இருக்கும் வழிகள் அமைப்பு சூழல் பிரதிநிதிகளை அணுகும் அல்லது தனியாக பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் பைப்பெல்லைனை பயன்படுத்தும் போது, மொழி நாம் ஒரு நரம்பு வலைப்பின்னல் முகவரியை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு தற்போதைய பாண்டிட் அமைப்பில் கற்றுக் கொள்ள வலுப்ப முகவரின் கண்டுபிடிப்பை நேர்வழி காட்டுவதற்கு, நாம் வேறு வித்தியாசமான கண்காணிப்பு வடிவங்கள் மூலம் சவ எங்கள் வழிமுறையில் நடுநிலை பிரதிநிதிகள், திட்டமிட்ட செயல்கள், அல்லது வேறு மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய வேண் நாம் ஒரு ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் சூழலில் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் கற்றல் மாறிகளை கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ள கற்றல் மற்றும் பொத', 'ur': 'ہم سیدھی تصویر نظر اندازے اور ٹیکسٹ اینپیٹ کے ذریعے سیدھی نقشه بنانے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. حاﻻنکہ موجود طریقے کی وجہ سے ساختہ محیط منطقه کی پیشوائی کے لئے پہنچنے کا اختیار رکھتے ہیں یا مختلف طریقے کی مدل کے پیپ لین کا استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم ایک مدل سکتے ہیں کہ زبان شناسی اور تصویب وروت کے بارے میں مشترک دلیل کریں. ہم ایک کنٹکسٹ بنڈیٹ میں استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک نیورل نیٹ ورک اگنٹ کی تطارین کریں. اہینٹ کی تحقیق کی راہ دکھانے کے لئے، ہم مختلف طریقوں کے مطابق مزدوری کا شکل استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری طریقہ کی تعلیم مدینہ کی تعلیم، نقشه پردازیوں، یا مختلف مدینل کی تعلیم نہیں کی ضرورت ہے. ہم ایک سیمولیٹ محیط میں ارزیابی کرتے ہیں اور نظارت کی تعلیم اور عمومی زیادتی کی تعلیم الفاظت کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرنے والی بہت اضافہ کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu amalni bajarish uchun ruxsat ko'rinishni va matn kiritishni to ʻgʻri ravishda qarashni talab qilamiz. Mavjud murakkablar o'zgarishga murojaat qiladigan muhit taʼminlovchilarga ega bo'lganda yoki alohida o'rganilgan modellarning pipelini ishlatish mumkin, biz tillarda va ko'rinadigan narsa haqida bir modelni o'rganamiz. Biz neyural tarmoq ajratuvchisini o'rganish uchun davom etishni foydalanamiz. Dasturlarning qidirishni ko'rsatish uchun biz boshqa shakllar ko'rinishni ishlatamiz. Bizning fikrimizga o'zgarishga o'xshash kerak emas, boshqa shakllarni, boshqa modellarni o'rganish kerak emas. Biz tahmilotda qiymatimiz, va o'rganish va o'rganish o'zgarishni o'rganish o'zgarishni ko'rganamiz juda katta o'zgarishlarni ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất bản vẽ trực tiếp các quan sát ảnh thô và nhập văn bản cho hành động thực hiện hướng dẫn. Trong khi các phương pháp tồn tại nắm bắt quyền sử dụng các biểu tượng môi trường cấu trúc hoặc sử dụng các mô hình được đào tạo riêng, chúng tôi học một mô hình duy nhất để hợp lý về ngôn ngữ và tư hình. Chúng tôi sử dụng việc học tiếp xúc trong các tình huống cướp để huấn luyện một nhân viên mạng thần kinh. Để hướng dẫn thám hiểm của đặc vụ, chúng tôi dùng hình dạng thưởng với các hình thức giám s át khác nhau. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta không cần trình diễn tạm thời, quy trình kế hoạch, hoặc huấn luyện các mô hình khác nhau. Chúng tôi đánh giá trong một môi trường mô phỏng, và cho thấy những cải tiến đáng kể về học tập giám sát và các biến học gia tăng chung.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo direktno mapirati sirove vizuelne promatranja i tekst uloge akcijama za izvršenje uputstva. Iako postojeći pristupi pretpostavljaju pristup strukturiranim predstavljanjima okoliša ili koriste cijevi odvojenih modela, naučimo jedan model zajedničkog razuma o jezičkom i vizualnom ulazu. Koristimo učenje pojačanja u kontekstualnom banditu kako bi obučili agent a neurone mreže. Da bismo vodili istraživanje agenta, koristimo nagradu u obliku različitih oblika nadzora. Naš pristup ne zahtijeva prosječne predstave, postupke planiranja ili obuku različitih modela. Procjenjujemo u simuliranom okruženju i pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje nadzornog učenja i zajedničkih varianta učenja pojačanja.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår direkte at kortlægge rå visuelle observationer og tekst input til handlinger til udførelse af instruktion. Mens eksisterende tilgange antager adgang til strukturerede miljørepræsentationer eller bruger en række separate uddannede modeller, lærer vi en enkelt model til i fællesskab at begrænse om sproglige og visuelle input. Vi bruger forstærkningslæring i en kontekstuel bandit indstilling til at træne en neural netværksagent. For at lede agentens udforskning bruger vi belønningsforming med forskellige former for overvågning. Vores tilgang kræver ikke mellemliggende repræsentationer, planlægningsprocedurer eller træning af forskellige modeller. Vi evaluerer i et simuleret miljø og viser betydelige forbedringer i forhold til overvåget læring og fælles forstærkning læringsvarianter.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме директно картографиране на сурови визуални наблюдения и въвеждане на текст към действия за изпълнение на инструкции. Докато съществуващите подходи приемат достъп до структурирани изображения на околната среда или използват тръбопровод от отделно обучени модели, ние научаваме един модел, който съвместно да разсъждава за лингвистичния и визуалния вход. Използваме обучение за подсилване в контекстуална бандитна обстановка, за да обучим агент на невронната мрежа. За да ръководим проучването на агента, използваме оформяне на награди с различни форми на надзор. Нашият подход не изисква междинни представителства, процедури за планиране или обучение на различни модели. Ние оценяваме в симулирана среда и показваме значителни подобрения в сравнение с обучението под надзор и общите варианти за подсилване на обучението.', 'nl': 'We stellen voor om ruwe visuele observaties en tekstinvoer direct in kaart te brengen aan acties voor het uitvoeren van instructies. Terwijl bestaande benaderingen toegang veronderstellen tot gestructureerde omgevingsrepresentaties of gebruik maken van een pijplijn van afzonderlijk getrainde modellen, leren we één model om gezamenlijk te redeneren over linguïstische en visuele input. We gebruiken versterking learning in een contextuele bandiet setting om een neuraal netwerk agent te trainen. Om de exploratie van de agent te begeleiden, gebruiken we beloningsvorming met verschillende vormen van toezicht. Onze aanpak vereist geen tussentijdse representaties, planningsprocedures of training van verschillende modellen. We evalueren in een gesimuleerde omgeving en laten significante verbeteringen zien ten opzichte van begeleid leren en gemeenschappelijke versterkingsleervarianten.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan untuk memetakan secara langsung pengamatan visual raw dan input teks ke aksi untuk eksekusi instruksi. Sementara pendekatan yang ada menganggap akses ke representation lingkungan struktur atau menggunakan saluran pipa dari model terlatih secara terpisah, kita belajar model tunggal untuk bersama-sama alasan tentang input bahasa dan visual. Kami menggunakan pembelajaran bantuan dalam pengaturan bandit kontekstual untuk melatih agen jaringan saraf. Untuk memimpin eksplorasi agen, kita menggunakan pembentukan hadiah dengan bentuk pengawasan yang berbeda. pendekatan kita tidak membutuhkan representation intermedi, prosedur rencana, atau latihan model yang berbeda. Kami mengevaluasi dalam lingkungan simulasi, dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan atas belajar yang diawasi dan variasi belajar yang sama.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen vor, rohe visuelle Beobachtungen und Texteingaben direkt auf Aktionen zur Ausführung von Anweisungen abzubilden. Während bestehende Ansätze den Zugang zu strukturierten Umgebungsrepräsentationen voraussetzen oder eine Pipeline von separat trainierten Modellen verwenden, lernen wir ein einziges Modell, um gemeinsam über linguistischen und visuellen Input zu diskutieren. Wir verwenden Verstärkungslernen in einer kontextuellen Banditeneinstellung, um einen neuronalen Netzwerkagenten zu trainieren. Um die Exploration des Agenten zu leiten, verwenden wir Belohnungen mit verschiedenen Formen der Überwachung. Unser Ansatz erfordert keine Zwischendarstellungen, Planungsverfahren oder Schulungen verschiedener Modelle. Wir evaluieren in einer simulierten Umgebung und zeigen signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber überwachtem Lernen und gängigen Reinforcement Learning Varianten.', 'ko': '우리는 원시 시각 관찰과 텍스트 입력을 명령이 실행하는 작업에 직접 비추는 것을 권장합니다.기존의 방법은 구조화된 환경에 접근하여 일련의 단독 훈련 모델을 표시하거나 사용할 수 있다고 가정하지만 우리는 하나의 단일한 모델을 배워서 추리 언어와 시각 입력을 결합시켰다.우리는 학습을 강화하는 배경을 이용하여 토비들이 교육 신경 네트워크 대리인을 설치한다.대리인의 탐색을 지도하기 위해 우리는 서로 다른 형식의 감독을 사용하여 장려를 형성한다.우리의 방법은 중간 표시, 기획 절차나 서로 다른 모델을 교육할 필요가 없다.우리는 시뮬레이션 환경에서 평가를 실시한 결과 감독 학습과 흔히 볼 수 있는 강화 학습 변체에 비해 개선 효과가 현저하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مستقیماً مشاهده\u200cهای دیده\u200cای و ورودی متن را به عمل\u200cهای اجرای دستورات نقشه\u200cبندی کنیم. در حالی که دسترسی موجود به نمایش\u200cهای محیط ساخته\u200cشده یا از لوله\u200cی لوله\u200cای از مدل\u200cهای آموزش جدا استفاده می\u200cکنند، یک مدل تنها را یاد می\u200cگیریم تا دلیل\u200cهای مشترک درباره ورودهای زبان\u200cشناسی و دیده\u200cای یاد بگیریم. ما از یادگیری پشتیبانی استفاده می کنیم در یک باندیت متوسط برای آموزش یک مامور شبکه عصبی. برای هدایت تحقیقات مامور، ما از طریق بررسی های مختلف استفاده می کنیم. دستور ما نیاز به نمایش\u200cهای بین\u200cالمللی، برنامه\u200cریزی یا مدل\u200cهای متفاوتی نیست. ما در یک محیط شبیه\u200cسازی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، و پیشرفت\u200cهای زیادی را بر روی یادگیری\u200cهای تحت نظر و تأثیر یادگیری مشترک نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Tunaendelea kutengeneza moja kwa moja ramani ya maoni mabaya na taarifa za maandishi kwa vitendo vya kutekelezwa kwa maelekezo. Wakati mbinu zilizopo zinachukua upatikanaji wa uwakilishi wa mazingira au kutumia pipeline ya mifano yenye mafunzo tofauti, tunajifunza modeli moja kwa sababu ya pamoja kuhusu input wa lugha na kuona. Tunatumia kuongeza kujifunza katika bandiko la sasa ili kufundisha mtumiaji wa mtandao wa neura. Ili kuongoza uchunguzi wa mtumiaji, tunatumia malipo kwa namna mbalimbali za ufuatiliaji. Hatua yetu haihitaji uwakilishi wa kati, utaratibu wa kupanga, au kufundisha mifano tofauti. Tunatathmini katika mazingira yanayofanana, na kuonyesha maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya kutangazwa kwa elimu na kuboresha mabadiliko ya kujifunza kwa kawaida.', 'tr': "Biz görkezilen suratlary we metin girişini görkezmek üçin ýönetmegi teklip berýäris. Öň bar ýakynlaşyklar strukturlary çevre temsillerine golaýlaşýar ýa-da ayrı-ayrı eğlenen nusgalaryň pipeline ullanýarlar. Biz lingwistiki we görsel girişi barada bir nusga öwrenip bilen bir nusga öwrenip bileris. Biz özümizi näral şebeke ajaýyny öwrenmek üçin taýýarlanmak öwrenmegi ulanýarys. Ajan'yň keşfedişini görkezmek üçin, üýtgetmeli zady başga bir supervisiň şeklinde üýtgetmegi üçin ullanýarys. Biziň golymyz çykyşymyz, planlama prosedürleri ýa-da farklı nusgalarymyz gerek däl. Biz simulatik bir ortamda deňleýäris we gözetli öwrenmek we umumy öwrenmek wariantlaryny üstünde möhüm gelişmeleri görkeýäris.", 'af': "Ons voorstel om direk kaart te maak rooi visuele opsommings en teks invoer na aksies vir instruksie uitvoering. Terwyl bestaande toegange aanvaar toegang tot struktureerde omgewing voorstellings of gebruik 'n pyplyn van skiedend opgelei modele, leer ons 'n enkele model om saamstige rede oor lingwisiese en visuele invoer te doen. Ons gebruik versterking leer in 'n contextual bandit instelling om 'n neural netwerk agent te trein. Om die agent se uitsoek te lei, gebruik ons loon skaping met verskillende vorms van supervisie. Ons toegang benodig nie middelste voorstellings, planeer prosedure of onderwerp verskillende modele nie. Ons evalueer in 'n simuleerde omgewing en wys betekende verbeteringe oor ondersoekte leer en gemeenskaplike versterking-ondersoeking variante.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë të hartojmë drejtpërdrejt vëzhgimet vizuale të papërpunuara dhe hyrjen e tekstit në veprimet për ekzekutimin e instruksioneve. Ndërsa metodat ekzistuese marrin akses në përfaqësimet e strukturuara të mjedisit apo përdorin një tubacion modelesh të trajnuar veçanërisht, ne mësojmë një model të vetëm për të arsyetuar së bashku rreth hyrjes gjuhësore dhe vizuale. Ne përdorim mësimin e forcimit në një grup bandit kontekstual për të trajnuar një agjent rrjeti nervor. Për të udhëzuar eksplorimin e agjentit, ne përdorim formimin e shpërblimit me forme të ndryshme mbikqyrjeje. Our approach does not require intermediate representations, planning procedures, or training different models.  Ne vlerësojmë në një mjedis të simuluar dhe tregojmë përmirësime të rëndësishme rreth mësimit të mbikqyrur dhe varianteve të përbashkëta të forcimit të mësimit.', 'am': 'አዲስ የዓይነቶች እና የጽሑፍ ጥያቄዎችን ለመግለጽ ለመፍጠር እናስቸጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የሆኑት የአካባቢ አካባቢ መልዕክቶችን ለመቀበል ወይም በተለየ የተማሩ ሞዴላዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን እና የቋንቋዊ እና የራእይ ጥያቄን በመጠቀም አንድ ሞዴል እናስተማራለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ባንደራዊ መረብ አካባቢውን ለማስተማር እናበረታለን፡፡ የሀገሪውን ምርመራ ለመመራት፣ በተለያዩ ዓይነቶች ላይ በመጠቀም ዋጋን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን በመካከለኛ መልዕክቶች፣ የፕሮጀክት ፕሮጀክቶች ወይም የተለያዩ ዓይነቶች ማስተካከል አያስፈልጋቸውም፡፡ We evaluate in a simulated environment, and show significant improvements over supervised learning and common reinforcement learning variants.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք անմիջապես քարտեզագրել կեղծ տեսողական հետազոտությունները և տեքստի ներմուծը դասավանդման գործողությունների համար: Մինչդեռ գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները ենթադրում են հնարավորություն հասնել կառուցվածքային միջավայրի ներկայացումներին կամ օգտագործել առանձին պատրաստված մոդելների խողովակաշար, մենք սովորում ենք մեկ մոդել լեզվաբանական և տեսողական ներմուծ Մենք օգտագործում ենք ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրությունը կոնտեքստալ բանդիտի ընթացքում նյարդային ցանցի գործակալի վարժեցնելու համար: Աբժիշկի ուսումնասիրության ուղղությամբ մենք օգտագործում ենք վարձի ձևավորումը վերահսկողության տարբեր ձևերով: Մեր մոտեցումը չի պահանջում միջին ներկայացումներ, պլանավորման գործընթացներ կամ տարբեր մոդելներ վարժեցնել: Մենք գնահատում ենք սիմուլյացված միջավայրում և ցույց ենք տալիս նշանակալի բարելավումներ վերահսկված ուսումնասիրության և ընդհանուր ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրության տարբերակների վերաբերյալ:', 'az': 'Biz həmçinin həmçinin görsel görüntüləri və mətn girişini təklif edirik. Yaxınlıqlar qurulmuş çevre göstəricilərinə yaxud ayrı-ayrı təhsil edilmiş modellərin boru çizgisini istifadə edərkən, dillərin və göylərin girişi barəsində təkcə bir modeli öyrənirik. Biz nöral a ğ ağ ağacını təhsil etmək üçün müxtəlif banditdə öyrənmək öyrənməyi istifadə edirik. Ajansının keşif yolunu göstərmək üçün, mükafatları müxtəlif tərzlərlə yaratmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız müxtəlif göstəricilər, planlama prosedürləri və ya müxtəlif modelləri təhsil etmək istəməz. Biz simulatlı bir ortamda değerlendiririk, və gözlənilmiş öyrənmə və ortaq qüvvətli öyrənmə variabları üzərində möhkəm uzlaşmaları göstəririk.', 'bn': "আমরা সরাসরি দৃশ্য পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং টেক্সট ইনপুটের মানচিত্রের প্রস্তাব করছি নির্দেশ প্রাপ্ত কাজের জন্য। বিদ্যমান প্রযুক্তিগুলোর প্রতিনিধিত্ব বা বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের পাইপেলাইন ব্যবহার করার ক্ষেত্রে বিভিন্ন পরিবেশের প্রতিনিধিত আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক এজেন্ট প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য একটি ব্যান্ডিট ব্যান্ডেটে শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করি। To guide the agent's exploration, we use reward shaping with different forms of supervision.  আমাদের পদক্ষেপ কোন মাঝামাঝি প্রতিনিধিত্ব, পরিকল্পনা প্রক্রিয়া, বা ভিন্ন মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ নেই। আমরা একটি সমতুল্য পরিবেশে মূল্যায়ন করি এবং শিক্ষা এবং সাধারণ শিক্ষা শিক্ষা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ও সাধারণ শক্তিশালী", 'bs': 'Predlažemo direktno mapirati sirove vizuelne promatranja i tekstualne uloge akcijama za izvršavanje instrukcije. Iako postojeći pristupi pretpostavljaju pristup strukturiranim predstavljanjima okoliša ili koriste cijevi odvojenih modela, naučimo jedan model da zajedno razume o jezičkom i vizualnom ulazu. Koristimo učenje pojačanja u kontekstualnom banditu kako bi obučili agent a neurone mreže. Da bi vodili istragu agenta, koristimo nagradu u obliku različitih oblika nadzora. Naš pristup ne zahtijeva prosječne predstave, procedure za planiranje ili obuku različitih modela. Procjenjujemo u simuliranom okruženju i pokazujemo značajne poboljšanje nadzornog učenja i zajedničkih varianta učenja pojačanja.', 'ca': "Proposem mapejar directament les observacions visuals brutes i les entrades de text a accions d'execució d'instruccions. Mentre que els enfocaments existents suposen accés a representacions ambientals estructurats o utilitzen un conjunt de models entrenats separadament, aprenem un únic model per a raonar conjuntament sobre la entrada lingüística i visual. Utilitzem l'aprenentatge de reforç en un bandit contextual per formar un agent de xarxa neural. Per guiar l'exploració de l'agent, utilitzem la forma de recompensa amb diferents formes de supervisió. El nostre enfocament no requereix representacions intermedies, procediments de planificació o formació de models diferents. Evaluam en un entorn simulat i mostram millores significatives sobre l'aprenentatge supervisat i variants comuns d'aprenentatge de reforç.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme přímo mapovat raw vizuální pozorování a textový vstup do akcí pro provedení instrukcí. Zatímco stávající přístupy předpokládají přístup ke strukturovaným reprezentacím prostředí nebo používají potrubí samostatně trénovaných modelů, naučíme se jediný model, abychom společně uvažovali o jazykovém a vizuálním vstupu. Používáme posilovací učení v kontextovém nastavení banditů k tréninku agenta neuronové sítě. Pro vedení průzkumu agenta používáme tvarování odměn s různými formami dohledu. Náš přístup nevyžaduje střední reprezentace, plánovací postupy nebo školení různých modelů. Hodnotíme v simulovaném prostředí a ukazujeme významná zlepšení oproti supervizorovanému učení a běžným variantám zesílení učení.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme, että raakaviivaiset havainnot ja tekstinsyöttö kartoitetaan suoraan ohjeiden suorittamiseen. Vaikka olemassa olevat lähestymistavat edellyttävät pääsyä strukturoituun ympäristöön tai käyttävät erikseen koulutettuja malleja, opimme yhden mallin pohtimaan yhdessä kielellistä ja visuaalista panosta. Käytämme vahvistuksen oppimista kontekstuaalisessa bandiitissa neuroverkon agentin kouluttamiseen. Agentin etsinnän ohjaamiseksi käytämme palkitsemisen muotoilua erilaisin valvontakeinoin. Lähestymistapamme ei vaadi väliesityksiä, suunnittelumenettelyjä tai erilaisten mallien koulutusta. Arvioimme simuloidussa ympäristössä ja osoitamme merkittäviä parannuksia ohjattuun oppimiseen ja yleisiin vahvistusoppimismenetelmiin verrattuna.', 'et': 'Teeme ettepaneku kaardistada otse töötlemata visuaalseid vaatlusi ja tekstisisestust juhiste täitmise toimingutesse. Kuigi olemasolevad lähenemisviisid eeldavad juurdepääsu struktureeritud keskkonna esitustele või kasutavad eraldi koolitatud mudelite hulka, õpime me ühte mudelit, et ühiselt arutada keelelist ja visuaalset sisendit. Me kasutame tugevdamisõpet kontekstis bandiitide seadistuses, et treenida neurovõrgu agenti. Agenti uurimistöö juhendamiseks kasutame tasu kujundamist erinevate järelevalvevormidega. Meie lähenemine ei nõua vahepealseid esindusi, planeerimismenetlusi ega erinevate mudelite koolitamist. Hindame simuleeritud keskkonnas ning näitame märkimisväärseid edusamme juhendatud õppe ja tavaliste tugevdusõppevariantide võrreldes.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים למפות ישירות צפיות ויזואליות ראשונות והכניסה טקסטית לפעולות להוציא הוראות. While existing approaches assume access to structured environment representations or use a pipeline of separately trained models, we learn a single model to jointly reason about linguistic and visual input.  אנחנו משתמשים בהלימוד תגבורה בתכנית שודד קונטקסטי כדי לאמן סוכן רשת עצבית. כדי להדריך את החקירה של הסוכן, אנחנו משתמשים בצורת פרסים עם צורות שונות של פיקוח. הגישה שלנו לא דורשת מייצגים בינויים, תהליכים תכנון, או אימון דוגמנים שונים. אנו מעריכים בסביבה סמיולרית, ולהראות שיפורים משמעותיים על הלימודים המבוטחים והשיפורים משותפים של הלימודים.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Along sampeyan mruput Awak dhéwé nggawe ngubah pengaturan tambah banter Ketoke nambah kebutuhan winih, kita ngubah dhéwé nggawe barang apik perbudhakan karo winih apakno. Rasané awak dhéwé ora nyatakake intermediate, akeh operasi layanan, ngono nggawe model sing apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing berarti, lan akeh nglanggar bantuan njaluk luwih apik lan ijol-ijol sing nggawe barang maning.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo neposredno kartiranje surovih vizualnih opazovanj in vnosa besedila v akcije za izvedbo navodil. Medtem ko obstoječi pristopi prevzemajo dostop do strukturiranih okoljskih predstavitev ali uporabljajo cev ločeno usposobljenih modelov, se naučimo enega samega modela za skupno razmišljanje o jezikovnem in vizualnem vnosu. Uporabljamo učenje ojačitve v kontekstni banditi za usposabljanje agenta nevronskega omrežja. Za vodenje raziskovanja agenta uporabljamo oblikovanje nagrad z različnimi oblikami nadzora. Naš pristop ne zahteva vmesnih predstavitev, postopkov načrtovanja ali usposabljanja različnih modelov. Ocenjujemo v simuliranem okolju in pokažemo pomembne izboljšave v primerjavi z nadzorovanim učenjem in skupnimi različicami ojačevanja učenja.', 'ha': "Munã kwaɗayin ka karta mazaɓa na gani da matsayin zuwa aikin aiki da za'a zartar da wa'azi. While existing approaches assume access to structured environment representations or use a pipeline of separately trained models, we learn a single model to jointly reason about linguistic and visual input.  Tuna amfani da ƙari da za'a karanta a cikin bandit da ke sami zuwa wani shirin tarakin neural. Yana amfani da ijãrar da ke shafi da wasu misalin na dabam. Tsarakanmu ba ta ƙayyade wasu mataimaka, masu shiryuwa da shiryoyin ayuka, ko kuma su yi kõri da misãlai dabam-daban. Tuna ƙaddara a cikin mazaɓa mai kama da shi, kuma Muke nũna mafiya kyauta masu kyau a kan tsari da lõkaci da ƙarami.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྟངས་དང་ཡིག་གེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་རྣམས་ཐད་ཀར་སྒྲིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། While existing approaches assume access to structured environment representations or use a pipeline of separately trained models, we learn a single model to jointly reason about linguistic and visual input. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་གི་མཐུད་སྣེ་ནས་དབུལ་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་ཡིན། མིག་བདུན་གྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་ན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་ལྟ་རྟོག ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབུས་གཞུང་དང་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་མི་འདྲ་བ་དགོས་མེད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྒྲིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གཅིག་ལ་བསྟར་ན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'An analysis of eye-movements during reading for the detection of mild cognitive impairment', 'ar': 'تحليل حركات العين أثناء القراءة للكشف عن ضعف الادراك الخفيف', 'es': 'Análisis de los movimientos oculares durante la lectura para la detección del deterioro cognitivo leve', 'pt': 'Uma análise dos movimentos oculares durante a leitura para a detecção de comprometimento cognitivo leve', 'fr': 'Une analyse des mouvements oculaires pendant la lecture pour la détection de troubles cognitifs légers', 'ja': '軽度の認知障害の検出のための読書中の目の動きの分析', 'zh': '读书之际,以检测轻认知障碍', 'hi': 'हल्के संज्ञानात्मक हानि का पता लगाने के लिए पढ़ने के दौरान आंखों के आंदोलनों का विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Анализ движений глаз во время чтения для выявления когнитивных нарушений легкой степени тяжести', 'ga': 'Anailís ar ghluaiseachtaí súl le linn léitheoireachta chun lagú cognaíoch éadrom a bhrath', 'ka': 'ძალიან კონგენტიგური დახმარების განახლებისთვის საკითხვისთვის მოძრაობის ანალიზი', 'hu': 'Olvasás közbeni szemmozgások elemzése enyhe kognitív károsodás kimutatására', 'el': 'Ανάλυση των κινήσεων των ματιών κατά την ανάγνωση για την ανίχνευση ήπιας γνωστικής δυσλειτουργίας', 'it': 'Analisi dei movimenti oculari durante la lettura per la rilevazione di lievi disturbi cognitivi', 'kk': 'Оқу кезінде көзді жылжытуларды анализ көзді конитивтік қауіпсіздігін анықтау үшін', 'mk': 'Анализа на движењата на очите за време на читањето за откривање на лесна когнитивна повреда', 'lt': 'Akių judesių analizė skaitymo metu, siekiant nustatyti lengvą pažintinį sutrikimą', 'ms': 'An analysis of eye-movements during reading for the detection of mild cognitive impairment', 'ml': 'എളുപ്പമുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി വായിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d കണ്ണുനീക്കങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം', 'mt': 'Analiżi tal-movimenti tal-għajnejn waqt il-qari għas-sejba ta’ indeboliment konjittiv ħafif', 'mn': 'Нүдний хөдөлгөөнүүдийн шинжилгээ бий болгох үед', 'pl': 'Analiza ruchów oczu podczas czytania w celu wykrycia łagodnych zaburzeń poznawczych', 'ro': 'O analiză a mișcărilor oculare în timpul citirii pentru detectarea deficiențelor cognitive ușoare', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Analiza kretanja oko tokom čitanja za otkrivanje blage kognitivne oštećenja', 'si': 'කියනකොට ඇස් හැරීම් විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් කියලා කියලා', 'so': 'baaritaanka dhaqdhaqaaqa indhaha marka la akhriyo suurtagalka', 'sv': 'En analys av ögonrörelser under läsning för upptäckt av mild kognitiv försämring', 'ta': 'குறைவான குறைவு குறைப்பிடுவதற்காக படிக்கும் போது கண் நகர்வுகளை ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کے موقع آنکھوں کی حرکتوں کی تحقیق کی ایک تحقیق ہے', 'uz': "Kogniv tashkilotlarini o'qishda ko'p harakatlarni aniqlash", 'vi': 'Phân tích chuyển động mắt khi đọc để phát hiện suy yếu nhận thức nhẹ.', 'da': 'En analyse af øjenbevægelser under læsning til påvisning af mild kognitiv nedsættelse', 'bg': 'Анализ на движенията на очите по време на четене за откриване на леко когнитивно увреждане', 'nl': 'Een analyse van oogbewegingen tijdens het lezen voor de detectie van lichte cognitieve stoornissen', 'de': 'Analyse der Augenbewegungen beim Lesen zum Nachweis leichter kognitiver Beeinträchtigungen', 'id': 'Analisi pergerakan mata selama membaca untuk deteksi cacat kognitif ringan', 'fa': 'یک تحلیل حرکت چشم در زمان خواندن برای کشف آسیب شناخته آسان', 'hr': 'Analiza pokreta očiju tijekom čitanja za otkrivanje blage kognitivne oštećenja', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa harakati za macho wakati wa kusoma kwa kutambua uwezekano wa uchunguzi mdogo', 'tr': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një analizë e lëvizjeve të syrit gjatë leximit për zbulimin e dëmtimit të lehtë kognitiv', 'ko': '읽기 과정 중의 눈동자 분석 검측 경도 인지장애', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የዓይን መንቀሳቀስ መፍታት ቀላል ማውጣት', 'hy': 'Աչքի շարժումների վերլուծությունը կարդալու ընթացքում թեթև ճանաչողական խնդիրների հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'Göz-hərəkətlərinin analizi oxumaq sırasında ağır bilikli zəiflik keçmək üçün', 'bn': 'সামান্য কনফিনিটিভ ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হওয়ার জন্য পড়তে চোখ-আন্দোলনের বিশ্লেষণ', 'ca': 'Una anàlisi dels moviments oculars durant la lectura per detectar una indemnització cognitiva leve', 'fi': 'Analyysi silmien liikkeistä lukemisen aikana lievän kognitiivisen vajaatoiminnan havaitsemiseksi', 'bs': 'Analiza pokreta očiju tijekom čitanja za otkrivanje blage kognitivne oštećenja', 'cs': 'Analýza pohybů očí během čtení pro detekci mírné kognitivní poruchy', 'et': 'Silmade liigutuste analüüs lugemise ajal kerge kognitiivse kahjustuse tuvastamiseks', 'jv': 'Genjer', 'he': 'ניתוח של תנועות עיניים בזמן הקריאה כדי לגלות פגיעה קוגניטיבית קלה', 'ha': 'Ana yi anadi ga haramtar idãnu a lokacin karatun wa gane kasar sauƙi', 'sk': 'Analiza gibanja oči med branjem za odkrivanje blage kognitivne okvare', 'bo': 'སྦྱོར་རིང་གི་རྟོགས་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐབས་ལྟ་ཀློག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a machine learning analysis of eye-tracking data for the detection of mild cognitive impairment, a decline in cognitive abilities that is associated with an increased risk of developing dementia. We compare two experimental configurations (reading aloud versus reading silently), as well as two methods of combining information from the two trials (concatenation and merging). Additionally, we annotate the words being read with information about their frequency and syntactic category, and use these annotations to generate new features. Ultimately, we are able to distinguish between participants with and without cognitive impairment with up to 86 % accuracy.', 'ar': 'نقدم تحليل التعلم الآلي لبيانات تتبع العين للكشف عن الضعف الإدراكي المعتدل ، وهو انخفاض في القدرات المعرفية يرتبط بزيادة خطر الإصابة بالخرف. قارنا بين تكوينين تجريبيين (القراءة بصوت عالٍ مقابل القراءة بصمت) ، بالإضافة إلى طريقتين لدمج المعلومات من التجربتين (التسلسل والدمج). بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بتعليق الكلمات التي تتم قراءتها بمعلومات حول تكرارها وفئتها النحوية ، ونستخدم هذه التعليقات التوضيحية لإنشاء ميزات جديدة. في النهاية ، نحن قادرون على التمييز بين المشاركين الذين يعانون من ضعف إدراكي أو لا يعانون منه بدقة تصل إلى 86٪.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma análise de aprendizado de máquina de dados de rastreamento ocular para a detecção de comprometimento cognitivo leve, um declínio nas habilidades cognitivas que está associado a um risco aumentado de desenvolver demência. Comparamos duas configurações experimentais (leitura em voz alta versus leitura silenciosa), bem como dois métodos de combinação de informações das duas tentativas (concatenação e fusão). Além disso, anotamos as palavras lidas com informações sobre sua frequência e categoria sintática e usamos essas anotações para gerar novos recursos. Em última análise, somos capazes de distinguir entre participantes com e sem deficiência cognitiva com até 86% de precisão.', 'es': 'Presentamos un análisis de aprendizaje automático de datos de seguimiento ocular para la detección de deterioro cognitivo leve, una disminución de las capacidades cognitivas que se asocia con un mayor riesgo de desarrollar demencia. Comparamos dos configuraciones experimentales (leer en voz alta versus leer en silencio), así como dos métodos para combinar la información de los dos ensayos (concatenación y fusión). Además, anotamos las palabras que se leen con información sobre su frecuencia y categoría sintáctica, y utilizamos estas anotaciones para generar nuevas características. En última instancia, podemos distinguir entre participantes con y sin deterioro cognitivo con una precisión de hasta un 86%.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une analyse par apprentissage automatique des données de suivi oculaire pour la détection de troubles cognitifs légers, un déclin des capacités cognitives associé à un risque accru de développer une démence. Nous comparons deux configurations expérimentales (lecture à haute voix versus lecture silencieuse), ainsi que deux méthodes de combinaison des informations issues des deux essais (concaténation et fusion). De plus, nous annotons les mots en cours de lecture avec des informations sur leur fréquence et leur catégorie syntaxique, et nous utilisons ces annotations pour générer de nouvelles fonctionnalités. En fin de compte, nous sommes en mesure de faire la distinction entre les participants avec et sans troubles cognitifs avec une précision allant jusqu'à 86\xa0%.", 'ja': '認知症の発症リスクの増加に伴う認知能力の低下である軽度の認知障害を検出するための目追跡データの機械学習分析を提示します。２つの実験構成（朗読と静かに朗読）と、２つの試験からの情報を組み合わせる２つの方法（連結と合流）を比較します。さらに、読み取られた単語に頻度と構文カテゴリに関する情報をアノテーションし、これらのアノテーションを使用して新しい機能を生成します。最終的に、私たちは最大86 ％の精度で認知障害のある参加者と認知障害のない参加者を区別することができます。', 'zh': '臣等立一眼动踪迹数机器学析,以检测轻度认知障碍,即与患痴呆症风险增相关者。 较二实验配置(大声诵静音读),并二试信息之法(连并)。 又用频率、句法类别信以注读单词,而用此注以成新功。 终能区别有无认知障碍之参与者,准确率达86%。', 'hi': 'हम हल्के संज्ञानात्मक हानि का पता लगाने के लिए आंखों पर नज़र रखने वाले डेटा का एक मशीन लर्निंग विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, संज्ञानात्मक क्षमताओं में गिरावट जो मनोभ्रंश के विकास के बढ़ते जोखिम से जुड़ी हुई है। हम दो प्रयोगात्मक विन्यासों की तुलना करते हैं (जोर से पढ़ना बनाम चुपचाप पढ़ना), साथ ही साथ दो परीक्षणों (संयोजन और विलय) से जानकारी के संयोजन के दो तरीके। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम उनकी आवृत्ति और वाक्यात्मक श्रेणी के बारे में जानकारी के साथ पढ़े जा रहे शब्दों को एनोटेट करते हैं, और नई सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए इन एनोटेशन का उपयोग करते हैं। आखिरकार, हम 86% सटीकता के साथ संज्ञानात्मक हानि के साथ और बिना प्रतिभागियों के बीच अंतर करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем анализ машинного обучения данных слежения за глазами для выявления легких когнитивных нарушений, снижения когнитивных способностей, что связано с повышенным риском развития деменции. Мы сравниваем две экспериментальные конфигурации (чтение вслух и чтение молча), а также два метода объединения информации из двух испытаний (слияние и слияние). Кроме того, мы аннотируем считываемые слова информацией об их частоте и синтаксической категории и используем эти аннотации для создания новых признаков. В конечном счете, мы можем различать участников с когнитивными нарушениями и без них с точностью до 86%.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair anailís mheaisínfhoghlama ar shonraí rianaithe súl chun lagú cognaíoch éadrom a bhrath, laghdú ar chumais chognaíoch a bhaineann le riosca méadaithe néaltrú a fhorbairt. Déanaimid comparáid idir dhá chumraíocht thurgnamhach (léamh os ard i gcoinne léamh go ciúin), chomh maith le dhá mhodh chun faisnéis ón dá thriail a chomhcheangal (comhcheangail agus cumasc). Ina theannta sin, déanaimid anótáil ar na focail atá á léamh le faisnéis faoina minicíocht agus faoina gcatagóir chomhréire, agus úsáidimid na nótaí seo chun gnéithe nua a ghiniúint. I ndeireadh na dála, táimid in ann idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir rannpháirtithe a bhfuil lagú cognaíoch acu agus nach bhfuil lagú cognaíocha acu le cruinneas suas le 86%.', 'hu': 'A szemkövető adatok gépi tanulási elemzését mutatjuk be enyhe kognitív károsodás kimutatására, a kognitív képességek csökkenésére, amely a demencia kialakulásának fokozott kockázatával jár. Két kísérleti konfigurációt hasonlítunk össze (hangos olvasás és csendes olvasás), valamint két módszert a két kísérlet információinak kombinálására (összefonódás és összefonódás). Ezenkívül az olvasott szavak gyakoriságáról és szintaktikus kategóriájáról szóló információkkal jegyzeteljük meg, és ezeket a jegyzeteléseket új funkciók létrehozására használjuk. Végül akár 86%-os pontossággal tudjuk megkülönböztetni a kognitív károsodással rendelkező és anélküli résztvevőket.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια ανάλυση μηχανικής μάθησης δεδομένων παρακολούθησης ματιών για την ανίχνευση ήπιας γνωστικής βλάβης, μια μείωση των γνωστικών ικανοτήτων που συνδέεται με αυξημένο κίνδυνο ανάπτυξης άνοιας. Συγκρίνουμε δύο πειραματικές διαμορφώσεις (ανάγνωση δυνατά έναντι ανάγνωσης σιωπηλά), καθώς και δύο μεθόδους συνδυασμού πληροφοριών από τις δύο δοκιμές (σύνδεση και συγχώνευση). Επιπλέον, σχολιάζουμε τις λέξεις που διαβάζονται με πληροφορίες σχετικά με τη συχνότητα και τη συντακτική κατηγορία τους και χρησιμοποιούμε αυτές τις σχολιάσεις για να δημιουργήσουμε νέες δυνατότητες. Τελικά, είμαστε σε θέση να διακρίνουμε μεταξύ συμμετεχόντων με και χωρίς γνωστική διαταραχή με ακρίβεια έως 86% .', 'it': "Presentiamo un'analisi di apprendimento automatico dei dati di eye-tracking per la rilevazione di lieve compromissione cognitiva, un declino delle capacità cognitive che è associato ad un aumentato rischio di sviluppare demenza. Confrontiamo due configurazioni sperimentali (lettura ad alta voce contro lettura silenziosa), così come due metodi di combinazione delle informazioni provenienti dai due studi (concatenazione e fusione). Inoltre, annotiamo le parole che vengono lette con informazioni sulla loro frequenza e categoria sintattica e usiamo queste annotazioni per generare nuove funzionalità. In definitiva, siamo in grado di distinguere tra partecipanti con e senza compromissione cognitiva con precisione fino all'86%.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame akių stebėjimo duomenų analizę, skirtą lengvai pažintiniam sutrikimui nustatyti, pažintinių gebėjimų sumažėjimui, susijusiam su padidėjusia demencijos išsivystymo rizika. Palyginame dvi eksperimentines konfigūracijas (skaitymą garsiai ir skaitymą tyliai), taip pat du dviejų bandymų informacijos derinimo metodus (sutrumpinimą ir susijungimą). Additionally, we annotate the words being read with information about their frequency and syntactic category, and use these annotations to generate new features.  Galiausiai mes galime iki 86 proc. tiksliai atskirti dalyvius su pažintiniu sutrikimu ir be jo.', 'kk': 'Біз көздерді қадағалау деректерінің машинаның оқыту анализациясын таңдаймыз, көздерді қадағалау қиындығын анықтау үшін, деменцияны өзгерту тәуелсіздігімен байланыстыру мүмкіндіктерінің көтеріл Біз екі тәжірибелі баптауларды (дыбыс оқу және тыбыс оқу және) салыстырып, екі сынақтан мәліметті біріктіру (біріктіру және біріктіру) әдістерін салыстырамыз. Сонымен қатар, олардың жиілігі мен синтактикалық санаттары туралы оқылған сөздерді жаңа мүмкіндіктерді құру үшін мәліметті түсіндіреміз. Соңында, біз қатысушылардың арасында 86% дегенге дейін дұрыс түсіндіре аламыз.', 'ms': 'Kami mempersembahkan analisis pembelajaran mesin data pengesan mata untuk pengesan cacat kognitif ringan, penurunan kemampuan kognitif yang berkaitan dengan risiko yang meningkat untuk mengembangkan demensi. Kami membandingkan dua konfigurasi percubaan (membaca dengan kuat dibanding membaca dengan senyap), serta dua kaedah untuk menggabungkan maklumat dari dua percubaan (persamaan dan gabungan). Lagipun, kita anotasi perkataan yang dibaca dengan maklumat mengenai frekuensi dan kategori sintaktik mereka, dan gunakan anotasi ini untuk menghasilkan ciri-ciri baru. Akhirnya, kita boleh membezakan antara peserta dengan dan tanpa kekurangan kognitif dengan keperluan hingga 86%.', 'mk': 'Презентираме анализа на машинско учење на податоците за следење на очите за детективирање на лесно когнитивно оштетување, намалување на когнитивните способности кои се поврзани со зголемен ризик за развој на деменција. Ние ги споредуваме двете експериментални конфигурации (читање на глас против читање тивко), како и два методи за комбинација на информациите од двата проба (концентрација и спојување). Покрај тоа, ги анотираме зборовите кои се читаат со информации за нивната фреквенција и синтактичка категорија, и ги користиме овие анотации за генерирање нови карактеристики. На крајот, можеме да разликуваме меѓу учесниците со и без когнитивно оштетување со до 86 отсто точност.', 'ml': 'We present a machine learning analysis of eye-tracking data for the detection of mild cognitive impairment, a decline in cognitive abilities that is associated with an increased risk of developing dementia.  രണ്ടു പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളെ (നിശബ്ദത വായിക്കുന്നതിനെതിരായി വായിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, രണ്ട് വിചാരണകളില്\u200d നി കൂടുതല്\u200d വായിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d അവരുടെ ഫ്രെയിനസ്സും സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക് വിഭാഗവും കൊണ്ട് വായിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റിയുള് അവസാനം, നമുക്ക് പങ്കാളികള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വേര്\u200dപെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയും, അറിവില്ലാത്ത പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താനും സാധിക്കുന്നത്', 'mn': 'Бид машин суралцах судалгааны талаар нүдний дагуулах өгөгдлийн шинжилгээ илэрхийлж байна. Хялбар ухааны эмгэгийг олж мэдэх, халдвар хөгжүүлэх эрсдэлтэй холбогдож байгаа cognitive abilities-ын багасгал. Бид хоёр туршилтын тодорхойлолтуудыг (чимээгүй уншиж, чимээгүй уншиж), хоёр судалгаанаас мэдээллийг нэгтгэх хоёр аргыг харьцуулдаг. Мөн бид тэдний давхар, синтактик хэлбэрийн тухай уншигдсан үгсийг анзаарч, шинэ чанарыг үүсгэхийн тулд эдгээр анзаарлаа ашиглаж байна. Эцэст нь бид оролцогчдын хоорондоо мэдээллийн эмзэг бус 86% зөв байдлаар ялгаж чадна.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw analiżi tat-tagħlim bil-magna tad-dejta dwar it-traċċar tal-għajnejn għas-sejba ta’ indeboliment konjittiv ħafif, tnaqqis fil-ħiliet konjittivi li huwa assoċjat ma’ riskju akbar ta’ żvilupp ta’ dimenzja. Aħna nqabblu żewġ konfigurazzjonijiet sperimentali (qari bil-vuċi kontra qari b’mod silenzjuż), kif ukoll żewġ metodi ta’ kombinazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni miż-żewġ provi (konġunazzjoni u amalgamazzjoni). Barra minn hekk, aħna nnotaw il-kliem li qed jinqraw b’informazzjoni dwar il-frekwenza u l-kategorija sintetika tagħhom, u nużaw dawn l-annotazzjonijiet biex jiġġeneraw karatteristiċi ġodda. Fl-aħħar mill-aħħar, nistgħu niddistingwu bejn il-parteċipanti b’indeboliment konjittiv u mingħajru b’eżattezza sa 86 %.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy analizę uczenia maszynowego danych eye-trackingowych w celu wykrycia łagodnych zaburzeń poznawczych, spadku zdolności poznawczych związanych ze zwiększonym ryzykiem rozwoju demencji. Porównujemy dwie konfiguracje eksperymentalne (czytanie na głos a czytanie po cichu), a także dwie metody łączenia informacji z dwóch badań (łączenie i łączenie). Dodatkowo adnotacja czytanych słów z informacją o ich częstotliwości i kategorii składni oraz używamy tych adnotacji do generowania nowych funkcji. Ostatecznie, jesteśmy w stanie rozróżnić uczestników z zaburzeniami poznawczymi i bez niego z dokładnością do 86% .', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o analiză de învățare automată a datelor de urmărire a ochilor pentru detectarea deficiențelor cognitive ușoare, un declin al abilităților cognitive asociat cu un risc crescut de dezvoltare a demenței. Comparăm două configurații experimentale (citirea cu voce tare versus citirea în tăcere), precum și două metode de combinare a informațiilor din cele două studii (concatenare și fuzionare). În plus, adnotăm cuvintele citite cu informații despre frecvența și categoria sintactică a acestora și folosim aceste adnotări pentru a genera caracteristici noi. În cele din urmă, suntem capabili să distingem între participanții cu și fără deficiențe cognitive cu o precizie de până la 86%.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein maskinelæringsanalyse av øysporingsdata for oppdaging av mild kognitiv uttrykk, ein nedgang i kognitiv kapasitet som er tilknytt med ein økt risiko for å utvikla dementia. Vi samanliknar to eksperimentelle oppsett (lesing lyd mot lesing stille), og to metodar for å kombinere informasjon frå dei to forsøka (samsvar og samsvar). I tillegg merker vi om ord som vert lesa med informasjon om frekvensen og syntaktiske kategori, og brukar desse merknadene for å laga nye funksjonar. I slutt kan vi forskjelle mellom deltakarar med og utan kognitiv uttrykk med opp til 86 % nøyaktig.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მანქანის სწავლების ანალიზია მონაცემების მონაცემების ძალიან ძალიან კონგენტიგური დახმარებისთვის, კონგენტიგური შესაძლებლობისთვის, რომელიც განვითარებული დემონტიის განვითარების ჩვენ ორი ექსპერიმენტიური კონფიგურაციების შემდგენება (სიტყვებით მეორე სიტყვებით) და ორი მეორე ინფორმაციის შემდგენება ორი პროცემენტიდან დამატებით, ჩვენ ამოხსენებთ სიტყვების ინფორმაციის შესახებ და სინტაქტიური კატეგორიის შესახებ და გამოყენებთ ეს ამოხსენების შესახებ ახალი ფუნქციების შექმნა. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია განსხვავოთ სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა და', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo analizu strojnog učenja podataka o praćenju očiju za otkrivanje blagih kognitivnih oštećenja, smanjenje kognitivnih sposobnosti povezanih sa povećanom rizikom razvoja demencije. Uspoređujemo dve eksperimentalne konfiguracije (čitanje glasno protiv čitanja tiho), kao i dve metode kombinacije informacija iz dva ispitivanja (potvrđenje i okupljanje). Osim toga, mi annotiramo reči koje se čitaju sa informacijama o njihovoj frekvenciji i sintaktičkoj kategoriji, i koristimo te annotacije da bi stvorili nove karakteristike. Na kraju smo u mogućnosti da razlikujemo među sudionicima i bez kognitivnog oštećenja sa to čnošću do 86%.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en maskininlärningsanalys av eyetracking data för upptäckt av mild kognitiv försämring, en minskning av kognitiva förmågor som är förknippad med en ökad risk för att utveckla demens. Vi jämför två experimentella konfigurationer (högläsning jämfört med tyst läsning), samt två metoder för att kombinera information från de två försöken (sammankoppling och sammanslagning). Dessutom kommenterar vi orden som läses med information om deras frekvens och syntaktiska kategori, och använder dessa kommentarer för att generera nya funktioner. I slutändan kan vi skilja mellan deltagare med och utan kognitiv funktionsnedsättning med upp till 86% noggrannhet.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaa baaritaanka wax barashada mashiinka oo ku saabsan macluumaadka soo socoshada indhaha, in la ogaado lafo'a an yar, in la soo gaado awoodda aqoonta oo la xiriira khatar kordhaya dhimirka. We compare two experimental configurations (reading aloud versus reading silently), as well as two methods of combining information from the two trials (concatenation and merging).  Sidoo kale waxaynu dhibaateynaa hadallada lagu akhriyo oo ku saabsan frequenckooda iyo qeybtooda syntactic, waxaana isticmaalaynaa macluumaadkaas si aan u sameyno tababaro cusub. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu kala sooci karnaa dadka ka qeyb-qaaday oo aan aqoonta aqoonta la'aanin ilaa 86% sax ah.", 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு இயந்திரத்தை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம் கண் தொடர்பு தரவுகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு, குறைவான குறைவுகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு, குறைவான திட்டத்தில் கு நாம் இரண்டு சோதனையின் வடிவமைப்புகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் (மெதுவாக படிக்கும் மூலம்) மற்றும் இரண்டு சோதனைகளில் இருந்து தகவலை ஒன்றிடும் ம கூடுதலாக, நாம் படிக்கப்படும் வார்த்தைகளை அவர்கள் வெளியீடு மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு வகையைப் பற்றிய தகவலுடன் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், புதி இறுதியில், நாம் பங்குத்தவர்களுக்கு மேல் 86% சரியாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் அறிவில்லாமல் பிரித்துக் கொள்ள முடியும்.', 'si': 'අපි ඇස් පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත ගැන පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න යන්ත්\u200dර පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක් අපි පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුම් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා (කියනවා නිශ්ශබ්ධයෙන් කියනවා), සහ පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් නිසා තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන් තවත්, අපි කියනවා වචනය ඔවුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය සහ සංකේතික වර්ගය ගැන තොරතුරු සඳහා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා ක අන්තිමේදි, අපිට පුළුවන් අංශ්\u200dය අංශාවක් අතර අංශාවක් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අංශ්\u200dය අංශ්\u200dය අ', 'ur': '蹃賲 賳蹝 丕蹖讴 賲丕卮蹖賳 爻蹖讴诰賳蹝 讴蹖 丌賳讴诰 鬲乇讴蹖賳诏 趫蹖俟蹝 讴蹖 鬲丨賱蹖賱 倬蹖卮 讴乇鬲丕 蹃蹝 讴蹃 丌蹃爻鬲蹃 卮賳丕禺鬲 讴蹖 囟乇賵乇鬲 讴蹖 卮賳丕爻丕蹖蹖 讴蹝 賱卅蹝貙 丕蹖讴 卮賳丕禺鬲 賯丕亘賱蹖鬲 讴蹝 匕乇蹖毓蹃 匕乇蹖毓蹃 蹃蹝 噩賵 丕賮夭丕蹖卮 讴蹝 禺胤乇蹝 讴蹝 爻丕鬲诰 蹃蹝蹟 蹃賲 丿賵 丕賲鬲丨丕賳 讴蹖 爻丕夭賵賳蹖 賲孬丕賱蹖诤 讴乇鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤 (亘賱賳丿 倬趹诰賳蹝 丕賵乇 趩倬讴蹝 倬趹诰賳蹝 讴蹝 禺賱丕賮) 丕賵乇 丿賵 胤乇蹖賯蹝 蹃蹖诤 噩賵 丿賵 丕賲鬲丨丕賳 爻蹝 丕胤賱丕毓丕鬲 噩賲毓 讴乇蹖诤 (賲孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬丕賱孬 丕賵乇 蹃賲 賳蹝 讴賱賲丕鬲 讴賵 丕賳 讴蹝 賮乇讴丕賳爻 丕賵乇 爻蹖賳俟讴鬲蹖讴 讴丕俟蹖 讴蹝 亘丕乇蹝 賲蹖诤 倬趹诰蹖 噩丕鬲蹖 蹃蹖诤貙 丕賵乇 丕賳 毓賱丕賲鬲賵诤 讴丕 丕爻鬲毓賲丕賱 讴乇鬲丕 蹃蹝 讴蹃 賳賵 賮乇讴丕賳爻 倬蹖丿丕 讴乇蹖诤. 亘丕賱丌禺乇貙 蹃賲 卮乇讴鬲 讴乇賳蹝 賵丕賱賵诤 讴蹝 爻丕鬲诰 丕賵乇 亘睾蹖乇 賲毓賱賵賲丕鬲 讴蹖 鬲氐丿蹖賯 86% 讴蹝 賲胤丕亘賯 丕禺鬲賱丕賮 讴乇 爻讴鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤.', 'uz': "Biz bir mashinani o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz, cheksiz kognitiv qobiliyatni aniqlash uchun qo'shimcha o'rganishni o'rganamiz, dementiya davomida qanchalik qobiliyatga bog'liq bo'lgan qobiliyatlarni ko'paymiz. Biz ikkita tajriba moslamalarini (o'qishdan ortiq o'qish bilan alohida o'qish va ikkita tizimni birlashtirish uchun ikkita usullarni (birlashtirish va birlashtirish). Qo'shimcha, biz frekvens va syntactik turlari haqida oʻqilgan so'zlarni tahrirlash va yangi imkoniyatlarni yaratish uchun shu taʼriflardan foydalanamiz. Ularning oxirida, biz bilan bilmagan tashkilotlar bilan 86% tashkilotga ega bo'lishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phân tích học thiết bị về dữ liệu định vị bằng mắt để phát hiện suy yếu nhận thức nhẹ, một sự giảm khả năng nhận thức liên quan đến một rủi ro tăng cao của chứng mất trí. Chúng tôi so sánh hai cấu hình thử nghiệm (đọc to với đọc thầm), cũng như hai phương pháp kết hợp thông tin từ hai thử nghiệm (kết nối và kết hợp). Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi ghi chú chú các từ được đọc bằng thông tin về tần số và hạng cú pháp, và sử dụng các chú thích này để tạo các tính năng mới. Cuối cùng, chúng ta có thể phân biệt được người tham dự với và không bị suy giảm nhận thức với độ chính xác 86.', 'bg': 'Представяме анализ на данни за проследяване на очите с машинно обучение за откриване на леко когнитивно увреждане, спад в когнитивните способности, който е свързан с повишен риск от развитие на деменция. Сравняваме две експериментални конфигурации (четене на глас срещу четене тихо), както и два метода за комбиниране на информация от двете изпитвания (конкатенация и сливане). Освен това анотираме четените думи с информация за тяхната честота и синтактична категория и използваме тези анотации, за да генерираме нови функции. В крайна сметка можем да разграничим участниците с и без когнитивни увреждания с до 86% точност.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een machine learning analyse van eye-tracking data voor de detectie van lichte cognitieve stoornissen, een afname in cognitieve vermogens die geassocieerd wordt met een verhoogd risico op het ontwikkelen van dementie. We vergelijken twee experimentele configuraties (hardop lezen versus stil lezen), evenals twee methoden om informatie uit de twee proeven te combineren (aaneensluiten en samenvoegen). Daarnaast maken we aantekeningen van de te lezen woorden met informatie over hun frequentie en syntactische categorie, en gebruiken we deze aantekeningen om nieuwe functies te genereren. Uiteindelijk kunnen we tot 86% nauwkeurig onderscheid maken tussen deelnemers met en zonder cognitieve stoornis.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo analizu strojnog učenja podataka o praćenju očiju za otkrivanje blagih kognitivnih oštećenja, smanjenje kognitivnih sposobnosti povezanih s povećanom rizikom razvoja demencije. Uspoređujemo dvije eksperimentalne konfiguracije (čitanje glasno protiv čitanja tiho), kao i dvije metode kombinacije informacija iz dva ispitivanja (potvrđenje i skupljanje). Osim toga, navodimo riječi koje se čitaju s informacijama o njihovoj frekvenciji i sintaktičkoj kategoriji, i koristimo te annotacije kako bi stvorili nove funkcije. Na kraju, možemo razlikovati učesnike s kognitivnim oštećenjem do 86% preciznosti.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en maskinlæringsanalyse af eyetracking data til påvisning af mild kognitiv svækkelse, et fald i kognitive evner, der er forbundet med en øget risiko for at udvikle demens. Vi sammenligner to eksperimentelle konfigurationer (højtlæsning versus lydløsning), samt to metoder til at kombinere oplysninger fra de to forsøg (sammenkædning og sammenlægning). Derudover noterer vi de ord, der læses, med oplysninger om deres hyppighed og syntaktiske kategori, og bruger disse noteringer til at generere nye funktioner. I sidste ende er vi i stand til at skelne mellem deltagere med og uden kognitiv nedsættelse med op til 86% nøjagtighed.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine maschinelle Lernanalyse von Eye-Tracking-Daten zum Nachweis einer leichten kognitiven Beeinträchtigung, einer Abnahme der kognitiven Fähigkeiten, die mit einem erhöhten Risiko für Demenz verbunden ist. Wir vergleichen zwei experimentelle Konfigurationen (laut lesen versus leise lesen) sowie zwei Methoden, Informationen aus den beiden Studien zu kombinieren (Verkettung und Zusammenführung). Zusätzlich kommentieren wir die zu lesenden Wörter mit Informationen über ihre Häufigkeit und syntaktische Kategorie und verwenden diese Anmerkungen, um neue Funktionen zu generieren. Letztlich sind wir in der Lage, Teilnehmer mit und ohne kognitive Beeinträchtigung mit bis zu 86% Genauigkeit zu unterscheiden.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan analisis pembelajaran mesin dari data pelacakan mata untuk deteksi cacat kognitif ringan, penurunan kemampuan kognitif yang berhubungan dengan risiko yang meningkat untuk mengembangkan demensi. Kami membandingkan dua konfigurasi percobaan (membaca dengan keras dibanding membaca dengan diam), dan dua metode untuk menggabungkan informasi dari dua percobaan (concatenation dan merging). Selain itu, kami menganotasi kata-kata yang dibaca dengan informasi tentang frekuensi dan kategori sintaksi mereka, dan menggunakan anotasi ini untuk menghasilkan fitur baru. Akhirnya, kita dapat membedakan antara peserta dengan dan tanpa cacat kognitif dengan akurasi sampai 86%.', 'ko': '우리는 안구 추적 데이터에 대해 기계 학습 분석을 실시하여 경도 인지 장애, 즉 인지 능력의 하락이 치매 위험 증가와 관련이 있음을 측정한다.우리는 두 가지 실험 설정(낭독과 묵독)과 두 가지 실험 정보를 결합시키는 방법(직렬과 합병)을 비교했다.또한 우리는 읽는 단어에 주파수와 문법 유형에 대한 정보를 사용하여 주석을 달고 이 주석을 사용하여 새로운 특징을 생성합니다.최종적으로 우리는 86%에 달하는 정확도로 인지장애와 무인지장애가 있는 참여자를 구분할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما یک تحلیل یادگیری ماشین از داده های ردیابی چشم برای شناسایی آسیب شناسی آسان، کاهش توانایی شناسی که ارتباط به خطر افزایش افزایش دیوانه است را نشان می دهیم. ما دو تنظیمات آزمایشی را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم (خواندن بلند و خواندن ساکت) و دو روش برای ترکیب اطلاعات از دو امتحان (هماهنگ و جمع کردن). به اضافه، ما کلمات را با اطلاعات درباره\u200cی فرکانس و مجموعه\u200cی آنها می\u200cخوانیم، و از این نوشته\u200cها برای تولید ویژه\u200cهای جدید استفاده می\u200cکنیم. بالاخره، ما می توانیم بین شرکتگران با و بدون تاثیر شناخته با حدود 86 درصد دقیق جدا کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunawesha uchambuzi wa mashine wa taarifa za kufuatilia macho kwa ajili ya kutambua uwezekano mdogo wa maarifa, kupungua kwa uwezo wa ujuzi ambao unahusiana na hatari kubwa ya kuendeleza uchunguzi. Tunawalinganisha vikwazo viwili vya majaribio (kusoma kwa sauti na kusoma ukimya), pamoja na njia mbili za kuunganisha taarifa kutoka kwenye mashitaka hayo mawili (kuunganisha na kuunganisha). Zaidi ya hayo, tunaeleza maneno yanayosomwa kwa taarifa kuhusu kiwango cha umeme na viungo vyao, na tunatumia matatizo haya ili kutengeneza vipengele vipya. Hatimaye, tunaweza kutofautisha kati ya washiriki na bila ya kushindwa kwa ujuzi na kufikia asilimia 86 ya uhakika.', 'tr': 'Biz öz gözlerimizi izlemek üçin maşynyň öwrenmegi analyzasyny tapýarys. ýuwaşlyk bilen pikirlenýän kynçylyklary öwrenmek üçin bir azalyşyk, demensiýa ösümäniň artyk töwekesinden çykaryp barýar. Biz iki deneysel yapılandyrmalary (sessiz okamak we sessiz okamak bilen) we iki synagdan malümaty birleştirmek üçin (birleşme we birleşme) görýäris. Ayrıca, frekans ve sintaktik kategori hakkında okunan kelimeleri şeklinde ifade ederiz ve bu duyurular yeni özellikler oluşturmak için kullanırız Iň soňunda, 86% dogry bilen hem işgärler arasynda tapawutlap bileris.', 'sq': 'We present a machine learning analysis of eye-tracking data for the detection of mild cognitive impairment, a decline in cognitive abilities that is associated with an increased risk of developing dementia.  Ne krahasojmë dy konfigurime eksperimentale (leximi me zë të lartë në krahasim me leximin me heshtje) si dhe dy metoda për kombinimin e informacionit nga dy provat (bashkimi dhe bashkimi). Përveç kësaj, ne anotojmë fjalët që janë lexuar me informacion rreth frekuencës së tyre dhe kategorisë sintaktike, dhe përdorim këto anotacione për të gjeneruar karakteristika të reja. Në fund, ne jemi në gjendje të dallojmë midis pjesëmarrësve me dhe pa dëmtim kognitiv me deri në 86% saktësi.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n masjien leer analiseer van oog-agtrekking data voor die opdekking van mild kognitiewe verdrukking, 'n verdrukking in kognitiewe kapasiteite wat geassosieer is met 'n grootgemaakte risiko van ontwikkeling van demensie. Ons vergelyk twee eksperimentale konfigurasies (lees hoog teen lees stilte), en twee metodes van kombinasie inligting van die twee probeers (samelewing en samelewing). In addition, we annotate the words being read with information about their frequency and syntactic category, and use these annotations to generate new features. Ons kan eindelik tussen deelnimmers met en sonder kognitiewe beperking met tot 86% waarskynlik afskei.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք աչքի հետևման տվյալների մեքենային ուսումնասիրության վերլուծություն թեթև ճանաչողական խնդիրների հայտնաբերման համար, ճանաչողական ունակությունների նվազում, որը կապված է դեմենցիայի զարգացման աճող ռիսկի հետ: Մենք համեմատում ենք երկու փորձարկվող կառուցվածքներ (բարձր կարդալը համեմատությամբ լռությամբ կարդալը), ինչպես նաև երկու մեթոդներ երկու փորձարկումների ինֆորմացիայի համադրելու (համեմատություն և համադր Ավելին, մենք նշում ենք բառերը, որոնք կարդում են իրենց հաճախականության և սինտակտիկ կատեգորիայի մասին տեղեկատվություն, և օգտագործում ենք այս նշումները նոր հատկությունների ստեղծելու համար: Վերջ ի վերջո, մենք կարողանում ենք տարբերակել մասնակիցների միջև, ովքեր ճանաչողական խնդիրներ ունեն և չունեն, մինչև 86 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը:', 'am': 'የዓይኖችን የመግለጫ ዳራዎችን ለማግኘት የመረጃ ትምህርት እናሳየዋለን፤ የድምፅ መፍታት በሚያነሳው አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሁለትን ፈተና ምሳሌዎች (በዝግታ በማነብ ላይ እናነበብ) እና ከሁለቱ ፈተናዎች መረጃዎችን ለመቀላቀል እናሳያታለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቁጥጥር እና የክፍለ ክፍላቸውን በተነበቡ ቃላትን እናሳውቃለን፣ እነዚህንም አዲስ ምርጫዎች ለመፍጠር እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም በአካባሪዎቹ መካከል እና በማያውቅ ጥቅምነት እስከ 86 በመቶ ያህል ልናለይ እንችላለን፡፡', 'az': 'Biz göz izləmə məlumatının məlumatının bir mašin öyrənməsi analizisini göstəririk, mild kognitiv zəiflik keşfetmək üçün, daha artırmaq riski olan kognitiv qabiliyyətlərin azalışını göstəririk. Biz iki təcrübə yapılandırmalarını (yüksək oxumaq və sessiz oxumaq) və iki təcrübədən məlumatları birləşdirmək yollarını salırıq. Əksinə, onların frekvenci və sintaktik kategoriyası haqqında oxunan sözləri ilə danışırıq və yeni xüsusiyyətlər yaratmaq üçün bu nöqtələri istifadə edirik. Sonunda, iştirakçıların arasında 86% dəqiqliyinə qədər müəyyən edilməsi ilə və bilikli təsiri olmadan ayıra bilərik.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি মেশিনের শিক্ষা শিক্ষা দেখাচ্ছি সামান্য ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ক্ষতির জন্য চোখ-ট্র্যাকিং ডাটার বিশ্লেষণ, যা ডেমেন্টির উন্নয়নের বেশী ঝু আমরা দুটি পরীক্ষার কনফিগারেশনের তুলনায় তুলনা করছি (চিৎকার করে নীরব পড়ার বিপরীত বিপরীতে), আর এই দুটি বিচারের তথ্য সংগ্রহের দুটি পদ্ধত এছাড়াও আমরা তাদের ফ্রাইভেন্স এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বিভাগ সম্পর্কে তথ্য পাঠ করা শব্দগুলোকে বিস্মিত করি এবং নতুন বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি  অবশেষে, আমরা অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন করতে পারি যারা কোন ক্ষতি ছাড়া আর ৮৬% সঠিকভাবে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হতে পারে।', 'ca': "Presentam una an àlisi d'aprenentatge màquina de dades de seguiment ocular per detectar una indemnització cognitiva leve, una disminució de les habilitats cognitives que està associada a un risc augmentat de desenvolupament de demència. We compare two experimental configurations (reading aloud versus reading silently), as well as two methods of combining information from the two trials (concatenation and merging).  A més, anotem les paraules llegint amb informació sobre la seva freqüència i categoria sinàctica, i utilitzem aquestes anotacions per generar noves característiques. Finalment, podem distingir entre participants amb o sense compromís cognitiu amb fins al 86% de precisió.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo analizu strojnog učenja podataka o praćenju očiju za otkrivanje blagih kognitivnih oštećenja, smanjenje kognitivnih sposobnosti povezanog sa povećanim rizikom razvoja demencije. Uspoređujemo dvije eksperimentalne konfiguracije (čitanje glasno protiv čitanja tiho), kao i dvije metode kombinacije informacija iz dva ispitivanja (potvrđenje i okupljanje). Osim toga, mi annotiramo riječi koje se čitaju sa informacijama o njihovoj frekvenciji i sintaktičkoj kategoriji, i koristimo te annotacije kako bi stvorili nove karakteristike. Na kraju, možemo razlikovati učesnike sa kognitivnim oštećenjem do 86% tačnosti.', 'cs': 'Představujeme analýzu strojového učení eye-trackingových dat pro detekci mírného kognitivního poruchy, poklesu kognitivních schopností spojeného se zvýšeným rizikem vzniku demence. Porovnáváme dvě experimentální konfigurace (čtení nahlas versus čtení tiše), stejně jako dvě metody kombinování informací z obou studií (řetězení a sloučení). Kromě toho anotujeme čtená slova s informacemi o jejich frekvenci a syntaktické kategorii a používáme tyto anotace k generování nových funkcí. V konečném důsledku jsme schopni rozlišit účastníky s a bez kognitivního poruchy až s 86% přesností.', 'fi': 'Esitämme koneoppimisanalyysin silmänseurantatiedoista lievän kognitiivisen vajaatoiminnan havaitsemiseksi, joka liittyy lisääntyneeseen dementian kehittymisen riskiin. Vertaamme kahta kokeellista konfiguraatiota (ääneen lukeminen ja äänettömästi lukeminen) sekä kahta menetelmää tiedon yhdistämiseksi kahdesta kokeesta (concatenation ja fuusio). Lisäksi merkitsemme luettaviin sanoihin tietoja niiden taajuudesta ja syntaktisesta luokasta ja käytämme näitä merkintöjä uusien ominaisuuksien luomiseen. Loppujen lopuksi pystymme erottamaan osallistujat, joilla on ja joilla ei ole kognitiivisia häiriöitä, jopa 86%:n tarkkuudella.', 'et': 'Esitame masinõppe analüüsi silmade jälgimise andmetest kerge kognitiivse kahjustuse tuvastamiseks, kognitiivsete võimete vähenemise, mis on seotud suurenenud dementsuse tekkeriskiga. Võrdleme kahte eksperimentaalset konfiguratsiooni (valjusti lugemine või vaikselt lugemine) ning kahte meetodit kahest katsest saadud teabe kombineerimiseks (konkateneerimine ja ühendamine). Lisaks märgistame loetavaid sõnu teabega nende sageduse ja süntaktilise kategooria kohta ning kasutame neid märkusteid uute funktsioonide loomiseks. Lõppkokkuvõttes suudame kuni 86% täpsusega eristada kognitiivsete kahjustustega ja ilma osalejaid.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo sistem akeh nyong nggawe dadi aturan luwih-luwih kanggo nggawe gerakan sing luwih hayo nggantawak dhéwé, kuwi nggawe kapanan saiki iki luwih apik sing ngedol kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé ngregani nduwé éntuk (basa gambar lan basa sawar), lan kabèh sistem sing dibutuhke informasi sing ujaran dhéwé (sampek-sampek lan tambah). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Lah, awak dhéwé iso ngbagian karo pawartos kenal karo pawarto iso nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan kowe wis rabi luwih dumadhi sing wis antara asai', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים ניתוח ללמוד מכונות של נתונים מעקב עיניים לגלות פגיעה קוגניטיבית קלה, ירידה בכישורים קוגניטיביים שקשור לסיכון גדול לפיתוח דמנציה. We compare two experimental configurations (reading aloud versus reading silently), as well as two methods of combining information from the two trials (concatenation and merging).  Additionally, we annotate the words being read with information about their frequency and syntactic category, and use these annotations to generate new features.  בסופו של דבר, אנחנו יכולים להבדיל בין משתתפים עם ובלי פגיעה קוגניטיבית עם מדויקה עד 86%.', 'ha': "We present a machine learning analysis of eye-tracking data for the detection of mild cognitive impairment, a decline in cognitive abilities that is associated with an increased risk of developing dementia.  Munã samfani misãlai biyu na jarrabi (karatun kodi versa karanta sauti), da kuma hanyoyin biyu da ke haɗa information daga jarrabai biyu (samã da haɗi). Ina ƙaranci, muna sarrafa maganar a karanta shi da maɓallin lãbãri game da nau'in da kuma tsohon sigarin su, kuma muna yi amfani da waɗannan taƙaitori dõmin ya ƙãga tsari masu sãbuwa. Hatimaki, za mu iya rarrabe tsakanin mãsu haɗuwa da kuma bã da wani hakki ba na sani kuma zuwa 86% tabbatacce.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo analizo strojnega učenja podatkov o sledenju oči za odkrivanje blage kognitivne okvare, zmanjšanja kognitivnih sposobnosti, ki je povezana s povečanim tveganjem za razvoj demence. Primerjamo dve eksperimentalni konfiguraciji (glasno branje in tiho branje) ter dve metodi kombiniranja informacij iz obeh poskusov (konatenacija in združevanje). Poleg tega besede, ki se berejo, označujemo z informacijami o njihovi frekvenci in sintaktični kategoriji ter uporabljamo te opombe za ustvarjanje novih funkcij. Nazadnje lahko z do 86% natančnostjo razlikujemo med udeleženci s kognitivnimi okvarami in brez njih.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ཤེས་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ལྟ་རྗེས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཕྱོགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་གཉིས་དང་བསྡུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་མཉམ་བཟོ(concatenation and merging) Additionally, we annotate the words being read with information about their frequency and syntactic category, and use these annotations to generate new features. མཐའ་མ་དེ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་མི་ཤེས་པའི་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། རྟོགས་པའི་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་མེད་པ་ལས་86%.'}
{'en': 'A Structured Learning Approach to Temporal Relation Extraction', 'fr': "Une approche d'apprentissage structurée pour l'extraction de relations temporelles", 'ar': 'نهج التعلم المنظم لاستخراج العلاقة الزمنية', 'pt': 'Uma Abordagem de Aprendizagem Estruturada para Extração de Relações Temporais', 'es': 'Un enfoque de aprendizaje estructurado para la extracción de relaciones temporales', 'ja': '時間関係抽出の構造化された学習アプローチ', 'zh': '一以时取结构化学也', 'hi': 'अस्थायी संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए एक संरचित सीखने का दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Структурированный подход к изучению извлечения временных связей', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Struchtúrtha Foghlama i leith Eastóscadh Caidrimh Ama', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια δομημένη μαθησιακή προσέγγιση στην εξαγωγή προσωρινών σχέσεων', 'hu': 'Strukturált tanulási megközelítés az időszaki kapcsolat kivonásához', 'it': "Un approccio strutturato di apprendimento all'estrazione delle relazioni temporali", 'lt': 'Struktūrinis mokymosi metodas laikinųjų santykių ekstrahavimui', 'kk': 'Температуралық қатынастарды тарқатуға құрылған оқу жағдайыName', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Approċċ Strutturat għat-Tagħlim għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Temporanja', 'ml': 'താല്\u200dപ്പരാല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള അടുത്തേക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നുName', 'mn': 'Үргэсэн суралцах ойлголт Температурын харилцааны татах', 'ro': 'O abordare structurată de învățare a extracției relațiilor temporale', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Strukturalni pristup učenju ekstrakciji temporalnih odnosa', 'pl': 'Podejście zorganizowanego uczenia się do ekstrakcji relacji czasowych', 'so': 'A structured Learning Approaroach to Urural Relations', 'sv': 'En strukturerad inlärningsmetod för extraktion av temporal relation', 'ta': 'தற்காலிக தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதலுக்கு ஒரு கட்டமைக்கப்பட்ட படிப்பு', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A A SectuBối cách học về tương lai thời gian chiết xuất', 'bg': 'Структуриран подход за учене към извличане на времеви отношения', 'hr': 'Strukturirani pristup učenju ekstrakciji temporalnih odnosa', 'nl': 'Een gestructureerde leerbenadering voor tijdelijke relatieontwikkeling', 'da': 'En struktureret læringsmetode til udvinding af tidsmæssige relationer', 'de': 'Ein strukturierter Lernansatz zur temporalen Beziehungsextraktion', 'id': 'A Structured Learning Approach to Temporal Relation Extraction', 'ko': '구조화 학습에 기초한 시간 관계 추출 방법', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'A Structured Learning Approach to Temporal Relation Extraction', 'tr': 'structural navigation', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'A Structured Learning Approach to Temporal Relation Extraction', 'am': 'Name', 'az': 'Müxtəlif İlişkilərin A çırmasına Yaxınlaşma Yaxınlığı', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Strukturirani pristup učenju ekstrakciji temporalnih odnosa', 'ca': 'A Structured Learning Approach to Temporal Relation Extraction', 'cs': 'Strukturovaný učební přístup k extrakci časových vztahů', 'et': 'Struktureeritud õppimise lähenemisviis ajaliste suhete väljavõtmisele', 'fi': 'Strukturoitu oppimistapa aikasuhteiden poimimiseen', 'jv': 'Njupuk Stributi kanggo Kebebasan Akses Tulung Gambar Relahan', 'he': 'גישה מובנת ללמוד לחיצת יחסים זמניים', 'sk': 'Strukturiran učni pristop k časovnemu odnosu', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཅན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཐད་ཀར་ལ་Approach'}
{'en': 'Identifying temporal relations between events is an essential step towards natural language understanding. However, the temporal relation between two events in a story depends on, and is often dictated by, relations among other events. Consequently, effectively identifying temporal relations between events is a challenging problem even for human annotators. This paper suggests that it is important to take these dependencies into account while learning to identify these relations and proposes a structured learning approach to address this challenge. As a byproduct, this provides a new perspective on handling missing relations, a known issue that hurts existing methods. As we show, the proposed approach results in significant improvements on the two commonly used data sets for this problem.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد العلاقات الزمنية بين الأحداث خطوة أساسية نحو فهم اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، فإن العلاقة الزمنية بين حدثين في قصة ما تعتمد على العلاقات بين الأحداث الأخرى ، وغالبًا ما تمليها. وبالتالي ، فإن التحديد الفعال للعلاقات الزمنية بين الأحداث يمثل مشكلة صعبة حتى بالنسبة للمعلقين من البشر. تقترح هذه الورقة أنه من المهم أخذ هذه التبعيات في الاعتبار أثناء تعلم تحديد هذه العلاقات وتقترح نهجًا تعليميًا منظمًا لمواجهة هذا التحدي. كمنتج ثانوي ، يوفر هذا منظورًا جديدًا للتعامل مع العلاقات المفقودة ، وهي مشكلة معروفة تضر بالأساليب الحالية. كما أوضحنا ، ينتج عن النهج المقترح تحسينات كبيرة على مجموعتي البيانات شائعة الاستخدام لهذه المشكلة.', 'pt': 'Identificar relações temporais entre eventos é um passo essencial para a compreensão da linguagem natural. No entanto, a relação temporal entre dois eventos em uma história depende, e muitas vezes é ditada por, relações entre outros eventos. Consequentemente, identificar efetivamente as relações temporais entre eventos é um problema desafiador, mesmo para anotadores humanos. Este artigo sugere que é importante levar em conta essas dependências ao aprender a identificar essas relações e propõe uma abordagem de aprendizagem estruturada para enfrentar esse desafio. Como subproduto, isso fornece uma nova perspectiva sobre como lidar com relações ausentes, um problema conhecido que prejudica os métodos existentes. Como mostramos, a abordagem proposta resulta em melhorias significativas nos dois conjuntos de dados comumente usados para este problema.', 'fr': "L'identification des relations temporelles entre les événements est une étape essentielle vers la compréhension du langage naturel. Cependant, la relation temporelle entre deux événements d'une histoire dépend des relations entre les autres événements et est souvent dictée par celles-ci. Par conséquent, l'identification efficace des relations temporelles entre les événements est un problème difficile, même pour les annotateurs humains. Cet article suggère qu'il est important de prendre en compte ces dépendances lors de l'apprentissage de l'identification de ces relations et propose une approche d'apprentissage structurée pour relever ce défi. En tant que sous-produit, cela fournit une nouvelle perspective sur la gestion des relations manquantes, un problème connu qui nuit aux méthodes existantes. Comme nous le montrons, l'approche proposée apporte des améliorations significatives aux deux ensembles de données couramment utilisés pour ce problème.", 'es': 'Identificar las relaciones temporales entre los eventos es un paso esencial hacia la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, la relación temporal entre dos eventos de una historia depende de las relaciones entre otros eventos, y a menudo está dictada por ellas. En consecuencia, la identificación eficaz de las relaciones temporales entre eventos es un problema difícil incluso para los anotadores humanos. Este documento sugiere que es importante tener en cuenta estas dependencias al aprender a identificar estas relaciones y propone un enfoque de aprendizaje estructurado para abordar este desafío. Como subproducto, esto proporciona una nueva perspectiva sobre el manejo de las relaciones faltantes, un problema conocido que perjudica a los métodos existentes. Como mostramos, el enfoque propuesto da como resultado mejoras significativas en los dos conjuntos de datos de uso común para este problema.', 'ja': '事象間の時間的関係を特定することは、自然言語を理解するための不可欠なステップである。しかし、物語中の2つの事象の時間的関係は、他の事象の中でも、関係に依存し、しばしば関係によって決定される。したがって、事象間の時間的関係を効果的に識別することは、人間の注釈者にとっても困難な問題である。この論文は、これらの関係を特定することを学ぶ際にこれらの依存関係を考慮に入れることが重要であることを示唆し、この課題に対処するための構造化された学習アプローチを提案している。副産物として、既存の方法を傷つける既知の問題である、欠落している関係の処理に関する新しい視点を提供します。示されているように、提案されたアプローチは、この問題のために一般的に使用されている2つのデータセットに大幅な改善をもたらす。', 'hi': 'घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंधों की पहचान करना प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ की दिशा में एक आवश्यक कदम है। हालांकि, एक कहानी में दो घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंध इस पर निर्भर करता है, और अक्सर अन्य घटनाओं के बीच संबंधों द्वारा निर्धारित किया जाता है। नतीजतन, घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंधों की प्रभावी ढंग से पहचान करना मानव एनोटेटरों के लिए भी एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या है। इस पेपर से पता चलता है कि इन संबंधों की पहचान करने के लिए सीखने के दौरान इन निर्भरताओं को ध्यान में रखना महत्वपूर्ण है और इस चुनौती को संबोधित करने के लिए एक संरचित सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव है। एक उपोत्पाद के रूप में, यह लापता संबंधों को संभालने पर एक नया परिप्रेक्ष्य प्रदान करता है, एक ज्ञात मुद्दा जो मौजूदा तरीकों को नुकसान पहुंचाता है। जैसा कि हम दिखाते हैं, प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण के परिणामस्वरूप इस समस्या के लिए आमतौर पर उपयोग किए जाने वाले दो डेटा सेट पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार होते हैं।', 'ru': 'Выявление временных связей между событиями является важным шагом на пути к пониманию естественного языка. Однако временная связь между двумя событиями в истории зависит и часто продиктована отношениями между другими событиями. Следовательно, эффективное выявление временных связей между событиями является сложной проблемой даже для человеческих аннотаторов. В настоящем документе высказывается мысль о важности учета этих зависимостей при обучении выявлению этих отношений и предлагается структурированный подход к обучению для решения этой проблемы. В качестве побочного продукта это открывает новую перспективу решения проблемы недостающих отношений, которая, как известно, наносит ущерб существующим методам. Как мы видим, предлагаемый подход приводит к значительному улучшению двух широко используемых наборов данных для этой проблемы.', 'ga': 'Is céim riachtanach i dtreo tuiscint nádúrtha teanga é caidreamh ama a aithint idir imeachtaí. Mar sin féin, braitheann an gaol ama idir dhá imeacht i scéal ar an gcaidreamh i measc imeachtaí eile, agus is minic a threoraíonn sé sin. Dá bhrí sin, is fadhb dhúshlánach fiú do na nótaíoirí daonna é caidreamh ama a aithint go héifeachtach idir imeachtaí. Molann an páipéar seo go bhfuil sé tábhachtach na spleáchais seo a chur san áireamh agus na caidrimh seo a aithint agus molann sé cur chuige struchtúrtha foghlama chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dúshlán seo. Mar fhotháirge, cuireann sé seo peirspictíocht nua ar fáil ar láimhseáil an chaidrimh atá ar iarraidh, saincheist aitheanta a ghortaíonn na modhanna atá ann cheana féin. Mar a léirímid, tá feabhsuithe suntasacha ar an dá thacar sonraí a úsáidtear go coitianta don fhadhb seo mar thoradh ar an gcur chuige atá beartaithe.', 'zh': '知事之时,自然语言知之要也。 然二事之间,决于他事,而常决于他事。 故虽于人之所注者,亦一挑战性也。 本文建议,于学识之际,虑其依赖甚重,并建一结构化之学以应之。 为副产品者,这为治阙一新视角,此损今术之已知也。 如吾所示,所发之法,两常用数集显改。', 'ka': 'მოვლენების საშუალო თავსოფლიო დაკავშირება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილი ენის გაგრძელება. მაგრამ, ისტორიაში ორი მოვლენების განმავლობა დაახლოდება და ხშირად დიქტიკურება, სხვა მოვლენების განმავლობაში. შემდეგ ეფექტიურად მოვლენების განსაზღვრებას განსაზღვრება ადამიანის ანტოტორიების განსაზღვრება უფრო ძალიან შესაძლებელი პრობლემა. ეს დოკუმენტი იტყვის, რომ გასანიშვნელოვანია, რომ ამ დასახლოების შესახებ აღმოჩნოთ ამ შესახებების განსახულებას და შესაძლებელია სტრუქტურული სწავლების მიღება ამ განსახულ როგორც ბიპროდისტი, ეს ახალი პერსპექტიკური პერსპექტიკური პერსპექტიკური დაკავშირება, ცნობილი პრობლემა, რომელიც მსგავსი როგორც ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ, ეს პრობლემა მნიშვნელოვანი დაახლოების შესაძლებელია ორ', 'hu': 'Az események közötti időbeli kapcsolatok azonosítása alapvető lépés a természetes nyelv megértéséhez. A történet két eseménye közötti időbeli kapcsolat azonban más események közötti kapcsolatoktól függ és gyakran diktálják. Következésképpen az események közötti időbeli kapcsolatok hatékony azonosítása még az emberi kommentátorok számára is kihívást jelent. Ez a tanulmány azt sugallja, hogy fontos figyelembe venni ezeket a függőségeket, miközben megtanulják azonosítani ezeket a kapcsolatokat, és strukturált tanulási megközelítést javasol ennek a kihívásnak a kezelésére. Melléktermékként ez új perspektívát nyújt a hiányzó kapcsolatok kezelésére, amely ismert probléma, amely sérti a meglévő módszereket. Amint azt mutattuk, a javasolt megközelítés jelentős javulást eredményez az e probléma két általánosan használt adathalmazánál.', 'el': 'Ο προσδιορισμός των χρονικών σχέσεων μεταξύ των γεγονότων αποτελεί ουσιαστικό βήμα προς την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, η χρονική σχέση μεταξύ δύο γεγονότων σε μια ιστορία εξαρτάται και συχνά υπαγορεύεται από σχέσεις μεταξύ άλλων γεγονότων. Κατά συνέπεια, ο αποτελεσματικός προσδιορισμός των χρονικών σχέσεων μεταξύ των γεγονότων αποτελεί ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα ακόμη και για τους ανθρώπινους σχολιαστές. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ότι είναι σημαντικό να ληφθούν υπόψη αυτές οι εξαρτήσεις ενώ μαθαίνουμε να εντοπίζουμε αυτές τις σχέσεις και προτείνει μια δομημένη προσέγγιση μάθησης για την αντιμετώπιση αυτής της πρόκλησης. Ως υποπροϊόν, αυτό παρέχει μια νέα προοπτική για τον χειρισμό των χαμένων σχέσεων, ένα γνωστό ζήτημα που πλήττει τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους. Όπως αποδεικνύουμε, η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση οδηγεί σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στα δύο κοινά χρησιμοποιούμενα σύνολα δεδομένων για το πρόβλημα αυτό.', 'it': "Identificare le relazioni temporali tra gli eventi è un passo essenziale verso la comprensione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, la relazione temporale tra due eventi in una storia dipende, ed è spesso dettata da, relazioni tra gli altri eventi. Di conseguenza, identificare efficacemente le relazioni temporali tra gli eventi è un problema impegnativo anche per gli annotatori umani. Questo articolo suggerisce che è importante tenere conto di queste dipendenze mentre si impara a identificare queste relazioni e propone un approccio di apprendimento strutturato per affrontare questa sfida. Come sottoprodotto, questo fornisce una nuova prospettiva sulla gestione delle relazioni mancanti, un problema noto che danneggia i metodi esistenti. Come abbiamo dimostrato, l'approccio proposto comporta miglioramenti significativi rispetto ai due set di dati comunemente utilizzati per questo problema.", 'lt': 'Laikinių ryšių tarp įvykių nustatymas yra esminis žingsnis link natūralaus kalbos supratimo. Tačiau laiko santykis tarp dviejų istorijos įvykių priklauso nuo kitų įvykių santykių ir dažnai juos diktuoja. Todėl veiksmingas laiko ryšių tarp įvykių nustatymas yra sudėtinga problem a net ir žmonių anotatorių atžvilgiu. Šiame dokumente teigiama, kad svarbu atsižvelgti į šias priklausomybes ir mokytis nustatyti šiuos santykius, taip pat siūlomas struktūrinis mokymosi metodas šiam iššūkiui spręsti. Tai, kaip šalutinis produktas, suteikia naują perspektyvą, kaip spręsti trūkstamus santykius, žinomą klausimą, kuris kenkia esamiems metodams. Kaip rodome, pasiūlytas požiūris lemia reikšmingus dviejų dažnai naudojamų duomenų rinkinių patobulinimus šioje problemoje.', 'kk': 'Оқиғалар арасындағы уақытша қатынасын анықтау - табиғи тілді түсініктемеге негізгі қадам. Бірақ, бір оқиғаның екі оқиғаның арасындағы уақытша қатынасы көбінесе басқа оқиғалар арасындағы қатынастарына тәуелді. Сондықтан оқиғалар арасындағы уақытша қатынасын анықтау - адамдардың жаңалықтаушыларына да әсер ететін мәселе. Бұл қағаз бұл тәуелсіздіктерді есептеу үшін оқылғанда және бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін құрылған оқыту тәсілігін ұсынады. Байпродукт ретінде, бұл жоқ қатынастарды қамтамасыз ету және барлық әдістерді ақылдыратын мәселеге жаңа перспектив береді. Біз көрсеткенде, ұсынылған тәсілі осы мәселе үшін көпшілік қолданылатын екі деректер жиындарының маңызды жақсартуларына көмектеседі.', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti hubungan sementara antara peristiwa adalah langkah penting menuju pemahaman bahasa alami. Namun, hubungan sementara antara dua peristiwa dalam cerita bergantung pada, dan sering didiktikan oleh, hubungan antara peristiwa lain. Oleh sebab itu, mengenalpasti hubungan sementara antara peristiwa adalah masalah yang mencabar walaupun untuk penganotator manusia. Kertas ini menyarankan bahawa penting untuk mempertimbangkan dependensi ini semasa belajar untuk mengenalpasti hubungan ini dan menyarankan pendekatan pembelajaran struktur untuk mengatasi cabaran ini. Sebagai produk sampingan, ini menyediakan perspektif baru untuk mengendalikan hubungan hilang, isu yang diketahui yang menyakiti kaedah yang ada. Seperti yang kita tunjukkan, pendekatan yang diusulkan mengakibatkan peningkatan yang signifikan pada dua set data yang biasanya digunakan untuk masalah ini.', 'mk': 'Идентификувањето на временските односи помеѓу настаните е суштински чекор кон природното разбирање на јазикот. However, the temporal relation between two events in a story depends on, and is often dictated by, relations among other events.  Поради тоа, ефикасната идентификација на временските односи помеѓу настаните е предизвикувачки проблем дури и за човечките анотатори. Овој документ покажува дека е важно да се земат во предвид овие зависности додека се научи да се идентификуваат овие односи и да се предложи структуриран пристап на учење за решавање на овој предизвик. Како потпроизвод, ова обезбедува нова перспектива за справување со исчезнатите односи, познато прашање кое ги повредува постојните методи. Како што покажуваме, предложениот пристап резултира со значителни подобрувања на двата заеднички употребени податоци за овој проблем.', 'ml': 'Identifying temporal relations between events is an essential step towards natural language understanding.  എന്നിട്ടും ഒരു കഥയില്\u200d രണ്ടു സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള സമയാവധി ബന്ധം ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ പലപ്പോഴും മറ്റു  അതുകൊണ്ട്, സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള സമയത്തിലെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് മനുഷ്യരുടെ അഭിപ്രായത്തിന് പോലും  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇത്തരം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് ഈ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്നും ഈ വ്യാല്\u200dവിലാസങ ഒരു ബൈപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ആയിക്കൊണ്ട് ഇത് നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളെ വേദനിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സമ്പ്രദായം ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് വേണ്ടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രണ്ട', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet temporali bejn l-avvenimenti hija pass essenzjali lejn il-fehim naturali tal-lingwa. Madankollu, ir-relazzjoni temporali bejn żewġ avvenimenti fi storja tiddependi fuq, u spiss tiġi ddittata minn, relazzjonijiet fost avvenimenti oħra. Konsegwentement, l-identifikazzjoni effettiva tar-relazzjonijiet temporali bejn l-avvenimenti hija problem a ta’ sfida anki għall-annotaturi umani. Dan id-dokument jissuġġerixxi li huwa importanti li jitqiesu dawn id-dipendenzi waqt li jitgħallmu jidentifikaw dawn ir-relazzjonijiet u jipproponi approċċ ta’ tagħlim strutturat biex tiġi indirizzata din l-isfida. Bħala prodott sekondarju, dan jipprovdi perspettiva ġdida dwar it-trattament tar-relazzjonijiet nieqsa, kwistjoni magħrufa li tagħmel ħsara lill-metodi eżistenti. As we show, the proposed approach results in significant improvements on the two commonly used data sets for this problem.', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja związków czasowych między wydarzeniami jest istotnym krokiem w kierunku zrozumienia języka naturalnego. Jednak czasowa relacja między dwoma wydarzeniami w historii zależy i jest często podyktowana relacjami między innymi wydarzeniami. W konsekwencji skuteczne identyfikowanie związków czasowych między zdarzeniami stanowi problem wyzwania nawet dla ludzkich anotatorów. Niniejszy artykuł sugeruje, że ważne jest uwzględnienie tych zależności przy uczeniu się identyfikowania tych relacji i proponuje ustrukturyzowane podejście uczenia się, aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu. Jako produkt uboczny daje to nową perspektywę na obsługę brakujących relacji, znany problem, który szkodzi istniejącym metodom. Jak pokazujemy, proponowane podejście skutkuje znaczną poprawą dwóch powszechnie stosowanych zbiorów danych dla tego problemu.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хоорондын хугацааны харилцааныг тайлбарлах нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд чухал алхам юм. Гэхдээ түүхэнд хоёр үйл явдал хоорондын хугацааны харилцаа нь хамааралтай, ихэвчлэн бусад үйл явдал хоорондын харилцаа зааж өгдөг. Үүний үр дүнд, үйл явдал хоорондын хугацааны харилцааны тодорхойлолт нь хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөлд хүртэл хэцүү асуудал юм. Энэ цаас нь эдгээр хамааралтай байдлыг тодорхойлж сурах үед эдгээр хамааралтай байдлыг тодорхойлох нь чухал гэдгийг сануулдаг. Биеийн бүтээгдэхүүний хувьд энэ нь алдагдсан харилцааны тухай шинэ хариу гаргаж байна. Мэдлэгдсэн асуудал нь орших арга замыг өвчиндөж байна. Бид харуулж байгаачлан, санал өгсөн арга нь энэ асуудлын тухай ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгдсэн 2 өгөгдлийн сангуудын чухал сайжруулалт гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av tidsstyrre forhold mellom hendingar er ein viktig steg mot naturspråk forståking. Den tidlegare relasjonen mellom to hendingar i ei historie er likevel avhengig av, og ofte er dictert av hendingar mellom andre hendingar. Derfor er det effektivt å identifisera tidsstyrre forhold mellom hendingar eit vanskeleg problem sjølv for menneske annotatorar. Denne papiret foreslår at det er viktig å ta denne avhengigheten på konto mens du lærer å identifisera desse forhold og foreslår ein strukturert læringstilnærming til å handtera denne utfordringen. Som byprodukt, gjev dette ei ny perspektiv på handtering av manglende forhold, eit kjent problem som skader eksisterande metodar. Som vi viser, første tilnærming resulterer i signifikante forbedringar på dei to vanleg brukte datasetta for dette problemet.', 'ro': 'Identificarea relațiilor temporale dintre evenimente este un pas esențial spre înțelegerea limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, relația temporală dintre două evenimente dintr-o poveste depinde și este adesea dictată de relațiile dintre celelalte evenimente. În consecință, identificarea eficientă a relațiilor temporale dintre evenimente este o problemă provocatoare chiar și pentru adnotatorii umani. Această lucrare sugerează că este important să luăm în considerare aceste dependențe în timp ce învățăm să identificăm aceste relații și propune o abordare structurată de învățare pentru a aborda această provocare. Ca produs secundar, acest lucru oferă o nouă perspectivă asupra gestionării relațiilor lipsă, o problemă cunoscută care afectează metodele existente. După cum arătăm, abordarea propusă duce la îmbunătățiri semnificative în ceea ce privește cele două seturi de date utilizate în mod obișnuit pentru această problemă.', 'si': 'සිද්ධ භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න අතර කාලකාලික සම්බන්ධයක් තේරුම්ගන්නේ ස්වභාවික භාෂා නමුත්, කතාවක් වලින් සිද්ධ වෙනස් දෙකක් අතර අතර සම්බන්ධයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනස් සි ඉතින්, අවස්ථාවක් අතර ඉක්මනික සම්බන්ධයක් හඳුනාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි මිනිස්සු අවස්ථාවකට වඩා  මේ පත්තු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මේ විශේෂතාවක් ගණුදෙනුවෙන් ගණුදෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න සහ මේ සම්බන්ධ ව බායිප්\u200dරදේශයක් විදිහට, මේක අතුරුදන් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අතුරුදන් වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ප්\u200dර අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් ග', 'sv': 'Att identifiera tidsmässiga relationer mellan händelser är ett viktigt steg mot förståelsen av naturligt språk. Men det tidsmässiga förhållandet mellan två händelser i en berättelse beror på, och dikteras ofta av, relationer mellan andra händelser. Att effektivt identifiera tidsmässiga relationer mellan händelser är därför ett utmanande problem även för mänskliga kommentatorer. Denna uppsats föreslår att det är viktigt att ta hänsyn till dessa beroenden när man lär sig att identifiera dessa relationer och föreslår en strukturerad inlärningsmetod för att hantera denna utmaning. Som biprodukt ger detta ett nytt perspektiv på hantering av saknade relationer, en känd fråga som skadar befintliga metoder. Som vi visar leder den föreslagna metoden till betydande förbättringar av de två allmänt använda datauppsättningarna för detta problem.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xiriirka wakhtiga ku meelgaarka ah ee dhacdooyinka waa tallaabo muhiim ah oo u jeeda garashada afka asalka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee xiriirka waqtiga ku meelgaarka ah ee u dhexeeya labada dhacdooyinku ay ku xiran yihiin, wuxuuna inta badan ku qoran yahay xiriirka dhacdooyinka kale. Sida darteed si faa’iido ah u caddeynta xiriirka waqtiga ah ee dhacdooyinka ku dhex yaala waa dhibaato adag xataa dhibaato u adag dadka dhibaatada ku saabsan. Qoraalkan waxaa loola jeedaa in muhiim ah in la xisaabiso xiriirkaas, marka la barto in la aqoonsado xiriiradan iyo in loo soo jeedo qaab waxbarasho oo la hagaajiyey in la qabsado dhibaatadan. Sida uu dhaqaale yahay, taasi waxay ka heleysaa aragti cusub oo ku saabsan xafiiska xiriirka la’aanta ah, arrin la yaqaan oo dhibaya qaababka joogta ah. Sidaan muujinno, dhaqdhaqaalaha la soo jeeday waxay sababtay horumarin aad u weyn oo ku saabsan labada sawirada ee caadiga ah ee la isticmaalay dhibaatadan.', 'sr': 'Identifikacija vremenskih odnosa između događaja je ključni korak ka razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Međutim, privremena veza između dva događaja u priči zavisi od toga, a često se diktira odnosi među drugim događajima. Zato je efektivno identificiranje vremenskih odnosa između događaja izazovan problem čak i za ljudske annotatore. Ovaj papir sugerira da je važno uzeti u obzir ove ovisnosti dok uči da identifikuje te odnose i predlaže strukturirani pristup učenja da se riješi ovaj izazov. Kao biprodukt, ovo pruža novu perspektivu za rješavanje nestalih odnosa, poznatog pitanja koji boli postojeće metode. Kao što pokazujemo, predloženi pristup rezultira značajnim poboljšanjima na dve često korištene sete podataka za ovaj problem.', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையில் காலாவதியான தொடர்புகளை அடையாளம் செய்வது இயல்பான மொழியை புரிந்து கொள்ளும ஆயினும், ஒரு கதையில் இரு நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையே தற்காலிக உறவு சார்ந்தது, மற்றும் பெரும்பாலும் வேறு நிகழ்வுகளுக்க ஆகையால், நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையே இடையேயுள்ள காலாவதியான தொடர்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிரச்சனையாகும் மனித வி இந்த தாள் இந்த சார்புகளை எடுத்துக் கொள்ள முக்கியமானது என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறது இந்த த தொடர்புகளை அடையாளம் படுத்தும் போது மற்றும ஒரு பைப் பொருளாக, இது காணவில்லை தொடர்புகளை கையாளும் புதிய பார்வையை கொடுக்கும், ஒரு தெரியும் பிரச்சனை ஏற்பட நாம் காண்பிக்கும் போது, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முன்னேற்றங்கள் இந்த பிரச்சனைக்கு பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட', 'ur': 'اتفاقات کے درمیان موقت رابطہ شناسایی کرنا طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کی طرف ایک ضروری قدم ہے. لیکن ایک کہانی میں دو اتفاقات کے درمیان موقت کا ارتباط ہے، اور اکثر دوسرے اتفاقات کے درمیان رابطہ ہے. لہٰذا، اثبات کے درمیان موقت رابطہ معلوم کرنا ایک مشکل ہے، اگرچہ انسان کے اذیت کرنے والوں کے لئے بھی. یہ کاغذ یہ سفارش دیتا ہے کہ یہ اعتباری کو اپنا حساب لینا ضروری ہے جبکہ یہ رابطے پہچان سکتے ہیں اور اس چال کے بارے میں ایک ساختہ سیکھنے کا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے. یہ ایک بائیپروڈکٹ کے طور پر ایک نئی نظریہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ گم ہونے والی رابطہ کے تحمل کرنا، ایک معلوم مسئلہ جو موجود طریقوں کو تکلیف دیتا ہے۔ جس طرح ہم نشان دیتے ہیں، پیشنهاد کی طریقہ اس مشکل کے لئے دو معمولاً استعمال ہوئے ڈیٹ سٹ پر بہت اضافہ ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, ikkita hodisa holatda vaqt munosabati o'sha holatda qo'llangan, va ko'pincha boshqa hodisalar orasidagi munosabatlar qo'shiladi. Shunday qilib, hodisalar orasidagi vaqt aloqalarini aniqlash uchun oddiy taʼminlovchi muammolar. Bu qogʻoz bu muammolarni aniqlashni o'rganishda shu murakkablarni o'rganishga muhimu bo'lishi mumkin va bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun quyidagi o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini anglatadi. @ info: whatsthis Koʻrsatganimizda, talab qilingan usul bu muammolar uchun ikkita odatda ishlatilgan maʼlumot satrlariga juda katta yaxshi bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc xác định mối quan hệ thời gian giữa các sự kiện là bước quan trọng để hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, mối liên hệ thời gian giữa hai sự kiện trong câu chuyện phụ thuộc vào, và thường được quyết định bởi, mối quan hệ giữa các sự kiện khác. Do đó, việc xác định mối quan hệ thời gian giữa các sự kiện là một vấn đề khó khăn ngay cả đối với người biên niên. Bài báo này cho thấy việc quan trọng là phải quan tâm đến mối quan hệ này trong khi học cách xác định các mối quan hệ này và đề xuất một phương pháp học tập cơ bản để giải quyết thử thách này. Như một sản phẩm phụ, nó tạo ra một viễn cảnh mới về việc xử lý các mối quan hệ mất tích, một vấn đề nổi tiếng làm hại các phương pháp tồn tại. Như chúng ta đã thấy, cách tiếp cận đã đề nghị sẽ có hiệu quả cải thiện đáng kể về hai nhóm dữ liệu thường sử dụng cho vấn đề này.', 'bg': 'Идентифицирането на времевите отношения между събитията е съществена стъпка към разбирането на естествения език. Времевата връзка между две събития в една история обаче зависи и често се диктува от връзките между други събития. Следователно ефективното идентифициране на времевите отношения между събитията е предизвикателен проблем дори за човешките анотатори. Настоящата статия предполага, че е важно да се вземат предвид тези зависимости, докато се научат да идентифицират тези взаимоотношения, и предлага структуриран подход на обучение за справяне с това предизвикателство. Като страничен продукт това дава нова перспектива за справяне с липсващите отношения, известен проблем, който наранява съществуващите методи. Както показахме, предложеният подход води до значителни подобрения на двата често използвани набора от данни за този проблем.', 'nl': 'Het identificeren van tijdelijke relaties tussen gebeurtenissen is een essentiële stap naar het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. De tijdelijke relatie tussen twee gebeurtenissen in een verhaal hangt echter af van, en wordt vaak gedicteerd door, relaties tussen andere gebeurtenissen. Bijgevolg is het effectief identificeren van tijdelijke relaties tussen gebeurtenissen een uitdagend probleem, zelfs voor menselijke annotatoren. Dit document suggereert dat het belangrijk is om rekening te houden met deze afhankelijkheden bij het leren identificeren van deze relaties en stelt een gestructureerde leeraanpak voor om deze uitdaging aan te pakken. Als bijproduct biedt dit een nieuw perspectief op het omgaan met ontbrekende relaties, een bekend probleem dat bestaande methoden schaadt. Zoals we laten zien, leidt de voorgestelde aanpak tot aanzienlijke verbeteringen van de twee veelgebruikte datasets voor dit probleem.', 'da': 'At identificere tidsmæssige relationer mellem begivenheder er et vigtigt skridt hen imod forståelse af naturligt sprog. Men det tidsmæssige forhold mellem to begivenheder i en historie afhænger af, og er ofte dikteret af, relationer blandt andre begivenheder. Derfor er en effektiv identifikation af tidsmæssige relationer mellem begivenheder et udfordrende problem selv for menneskelige kommentatorer. Denne artikel antyder, at det er vigtigt at tage højde for disse afhængigheder, mens man lærer at identificere disse relationer, og foreslår en struktureret læringstilgang til at tackle denne udfordring. Som biprodukt giver dette et nyt perspektiv på håndteringen af manglende relationer, et kendt problem, der skader eksisterende metoder. Som vi viser, resulterer den foreslåede fremgangsmåde i betydelige forbedringer af de to almindeligt anvendte datasæt til dette problem.', 'hr': 'Identifikacija privremenih odnosa između događaja je ključni korak prema razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Međutim, privremena veza između dva događaja u priči ovisi o tome, a često se diktira odnosi između drugih događaja. Stoga je učinkovito identificiranje vremenskih odnosa između događaja izazovan problem čak i za ljudske annotatore. Ovaj papir sugerira da je važno uzeti u obzir ove ovisnosti dok učite identificirati te odnose i predlaže strukturirani pristup učenja za rješavanje ovog izazova. Kao byproduct, to pruža novu perspektivu za rješavanje nestalih odnosa, poznatog pitanja koji boli postojeće metode. Kao što pokazujemo, predloženi pristup rezultira značajnim poboljšanjima na dvije često korištene sete podataka za ovaj problem.', 'de': 'Die Identifizierung zeitlicher Zusammenhänge zwischen Ereignissen ist ein wesentlicher Schritt zum Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. Die zeitliche Beziehung zwischen zwei Ereignissen in einer Geschichte hängt jedoch von Beziehungen zwischen anderen Ereignissen ab und wird oft von diesen diktiert. Folglich stellt die effektive Identifizierung zeitlicher Zusammenhänge zwischen Ereignissen selbst für menschliche Annotatoren ein herausforderndes Problem dar. Dieses Papier legt nahe, dass es wichtig ist, diese Abhängigkeiten zu berücksichtigen, während man lernt, diese Beziehungen zu identifizieren, und schlägt einen strukturierten Lernansatz vor, um diese Herausforderung anzugehen. Als Nebenprodukt bietet dies eine neue Perspektive auf den Umgang mit fehlenden Beziehungen, ein bekanntes Problem, das bestehende Methoden verletzt. Wie wir zeigen, führt der vorgeschlagene Ansatz zu signifikanten Verbesserungen bei den beiden häufig verwendeten Datensätzen für dieses Problem.', 'id': 'Identifikasi hubungan sementara antara peristiwa adalah langkah penting menuju pemahaman bahasa alam. Namun, hubungan sementara antara dua peristiwa dalam sebuah cerita tergantung, dan sering didiktasi oleh, hubungan antara peristiwa lain. Oleh karena itu, secara efektif mengidentifikasi hubungan sementara antara peristiwa adalah masalah yang menantang bahkan bagi anotator manusia. Kertas ini menunjukkan bahwa penting untuk mempertimbangkan keterlibatan-keterlibatan ini sementara belajar untuk mengidentifikasi hubungan ini dan melaporkan pendekatan belajar strukturasi untuk mengatasi tantangan ini. As a byproduct, this provides a new perspective on handling missing relations, a known issue that hurts existing methods.  Seperti yang kita tunjukkan, pendekatan yang diusulkan menghasilkan peningkatan yang signifikan pada dua set data yang biasanya digunakan untuk masalah ini.', 'ko': '사건 간의 시간 관계를 식별하는 것은 자연 언어 이해의 중요한 단계다.그러나 한 이야기에서 두 사건 간의 시간 관계는 다른 사건 간의 관계에 달려 있고 보통 다른 사건 간의 관계에 의해 결정된다.따라서 인류 주석자에게도 사건 간의 시간 관계를 효과적으로 식별하는 것은 도전적인 문제이다.본고는 이러한 관계를 식별할 때 이러한 의존 관계를 고려하는 것이 매우 중요하다고 생각하고 구조화된 학습 방법을 제시하여 이 도전에 대응하고자 한다.부산물로서, 이것은 부족한 관계를 처리하는 데 새로운 시각을 제공했고, 이것은 기존 방법을 손상시키는 이미 알고 있는 문제이다.우리가 보여준 바와 같이 제시한 방법은 이 문제를 해결하는 두 가지 상용 데이터 집합에서 현저한 개선을 얻었다.', 'tr': 'Vaqialaryň arasynda wagt baglaşyklary tanyşdyrmak tebigat dilleriniň düşünmesine örän wajyp adım. Ýöne, bir hekaýada iki çykyş arasyndaky wagt baglaşyk daşary bolar we köplenç başga çykyşlar arasynda diktilýär. Şol sebäpli, olar arasyndaky wagt baglaýyşyny tanyşdyrmak ynsan täsirçilerine hem kynçylyk meseledir. Bu kagyz bu bağlyklary tanyşdyrmak öwrenip bilmek we şu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin strukturly öwrenmek golaýyny maslahat berýär. Bir byprodukt bolsa, bu ýok ilişkileri gözlemek üçin täze bir perspektiv saýlaýar, bilinen mesele bolan yönlere agyrýar. Görkezilişimizde, teklip eden ýagdaýyň bu mesele üçin edilen 2 ýagdaýda ullanýan maglumat düzümleriniň has gowuraklary bardyr.', 'af': "Die identifiseer van tydelike verwantings tussen gebeurtenis is 'n nuwe stap tot natuurlike taal verstanding. Maar die tydelike verwanting tussen twee gebeurtenis in 'n storie afhang van, en is dikteer deur, verwante tussen ander gebeurtenis. Daarom is effektief die identifiseer van tydelike relasies tussen gebeurtenis 'n pragtige probleem selfs vir menslike annotators. Hierdie papier stel voorstel dat dit belangrik is om hierdie afhanklikhede in rekening te neem terwyl leer om hierdie relasies te identifiseer en voorstel 'n struktureerde leer toegang om hierdie uitdrukking te adres. As 'n byprodukt, hierdie verskaf 'n nuwe perspektief op die handvat van ontbrekende relasies, 'n bekende probleem wat beskikbaar metodes skandeer. Soos ons wys, die voorgestelde toegang resulteer in betekende verbeteringe op die twee gewoonlik gebruikte data stel vir hierdie probleem.", 'sw': 'Identifying temporal relations between events is an essential step towards natural language understanding.  Hata hivyo, mahusiano ya muda kati ya matukio mawili katika hadithi yanategemea, na mara nyingi yanatawaliwa na, uhusiano kati ya matukio mengine. Kwa hiyo, kutambua mahusiano ya muda kati ya matukio haya ni tatizo la changamoto hata kwa matatizo ya watu. Gazeti hili linapendekeza kwamba ni muhimu kuchukua matumaini haya wakati wakijifunza kutambua mahusiano haya na kupendekeza njia ya kujifunza ili kukabiliana na changamoto hili. Kama bidhaa, hii inatoa mtazamo mpya wa kudhibiti mahusiano yaliyopotea, suala linalofahamika linaloumia njia zilizopo. Kama tunavyoonyesha, mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinasababisha maendeleo makubwa kuhusu seti hizi mbili zilizotumiwa mara kwa mara kwa mara kwa ajili ya tatizo hili.', 'fa': 'شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای موقتی بین رویدادها یک قدم ضروری برای درک زبان طبیعی است. ولی ارتباط موقتی بین دو رویداد در یک داستان بستگی دارد و اغلب توسط ارتباط بین رویداد های دیگر دکتر می شود. به نتیجه، به طور تاثیر شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای موقتی بین حادثه\u200cها یک مشکل سخت است حتی برای آشنا کنندگان انسان. این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که مهم است که این وابستگی\u200cها را در حالی که یاد گرفتن برای شناسایی این رابطه\u200cها و پیشنهاد روش یادگیری ساخته\u200cشده برای حل این چالش به حساب بگیرید. به عنوان یک تولید سایر تولید، این یک نگاه جدید در مورد کنترل رابطه های ناپدید شده، یک مسئله شناخته که روش های موجود آسیب می دهد. همانطور که نشان می دهیم، این دستور پیشنهاد به نتیجه توسعه\u200cهای مهم در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای معمولی برای این مشکل استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i marrëdhënieve të përkohshme midis ngjarjeve është një hap thelbësor drejt kuptimit natyror të gjuhës. Megjithatë, marrëdhënia temporale midis dy ngjarjeve në një histori varet nga, dhe shpesh diktohet nga, marrëdhëniet midis ngjarjeve të tjera. Si pasojë, identifikimi efektiv i marrëdhënieve të përkohshme midis ngjarjeve është një problem sfidues edhe për anotatorët njerëzorë. Ky dokument sugjeron se është i rëndësishëm të marrim parasysh këto varësi ndërsa mësohet të identifikohet këto marrëdhënie dhe propozon një qasje të strukturuar mësimi për të trajtuar këtë sfidë. Si një subprodukt, kjo ofron një perspektivë të re mbi trajtimin e marrëdhënieve të munguara, një çështje të njohur që dëmton metodat ekzistuese. Siç tregojmë, qasja e propozuar rezulton në përmirësime të rëndësishme në dy grupet e të dhënave të përdorura zakonisht për këtë problem.', 'hy': 'Պատահությունների միջև եղած ժամանակական հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերումը հիմնական քայլ է բնական լեզվի հասկանալու ուղղությամբ: Այնուամենայնիվ, պատմության երկու իրադարձությունների միջև ժամանակական հարաբերությունը կախված է, և հաճախ կախված է, հարաբերություններից մյուս իրադարձությունների միջև: Հետևաբար, իրադարձությունների միջև ժամանակական հարաբերությունների արդյունավետ հայտնաբերումը դժվար խնդիր է նույնիսկ մարդկային նոտատորների համար: Այս փաստաթղթին առաջարկում է, որ կարևոր է հաշվի առնել այս կախվածությունները, մինչդեռ սովորել են այդ հարաբերությունները բացահայտելու և առաջարկում է կառուցվածքավորված ուսուցման մոտեցում այս մարտահրավերի լուծման համար: Որպես կողմնակի արտադրանք, սա նոր տեսանկյունից է տրամադրում բացակայած հարաբերությունների վերաբերյալ, մի հայտնի խնդիր, որը վնասում է գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները: Ինչպես ցույց ենք տալիս, առաջարկված մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է նշանակալի բարելավումներին այս խնդրի երկու սովորաբար օգտագործված տվյալների համակարգերի վրա:', 'am': 'በሁኔታ መካከል የጊዜው ግንኙነት ማረጋገጥ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል የሚያስፈልግ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በታሪክ ውስጥ በሁለት ሁኔታ መካከል የጊዜው ግንኙነት የታመነ ነው፣ ብዙ ጊዜም በሌላ ሁኔታ መካከል ግንኙነት የተገኘ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህ በሁኔታ መካከል የጊዜው ግንኙነት በሙሉ ማረጋገጥ ለሰው አዋቂዎች እንኳ የሚችል ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ እነዚህን ተሟጋቾችን ለመግኘት በተማረ ጊዜ ግንኙነትን ለመወሰድ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በጥያቄ፣ ይህ የጎደለውን ግንኙነት በመስጠት አዲስ ዓይነት ያሳያል፣ የአሁኑን ሥርዓት የሚጎዳ የሚታወቀው ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እንደምናሳየው ግንኙነት ለዚህ ጉዳይ የተጠቀሙት የዳታ ዘይት በሁለቱ ትክክለኛ ክፍተቶችን ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'bn': 'অনুষ্ঠানের মধ্যে সাময়িক সম্পর্ক পরিচিতি হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝার প্রতি একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ধাপ তবে একটি গল্পের দুই ঘটনার মধ্যে সাময়িক সম্পর্ক নির্ভর করে এবং প্রায়শই অন্যান্য ঘটনার মধ্যে সম্পর্ক নির্ভর করে। এর ফলে ঘটনার মধ্যে ঘড়িঘন্টার সম্পর্কের কার্যকর করে চিহ্নিত করা হচ্ছে, এমনকি মানুষের বিভিন্ন মন্তব্যকারীদের জন্য একটি  এই পত্রিকাটি পরামর্শ দেয় যে এই সমস্ত নির্ভর করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যখন এই সম্পর্ক চিহ্নিত করতে শিখা যায় এবং এই চ্যালেঞ্জের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন একটি বাইপটেম হিসেবে এটি নিখোঁজ সম্পর্ক হাতে নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করে, একটি পরিচিত বিষয় যা বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি ব্যথা করে। যেমনটা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি, প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি এই সমস্যার জন্য দুটি সাধারণত ব্যবহৃত তথ্য সেটের বিশাল উন্নতির ফলে প্রস্তা', 'az': 'Vaqialar arasındakı müxtəlif ilişkiləri təbii dil anlama tərəfindən tanıtmaq məqsədildir. Lakin, bir hekayədə iki olaraq arasındakı müddətli ilişki bağlıdır, və çox zaman digər olaraq ilişki ilə müəyyən edilir. Beləliklə, vaxtlar arasındakı müddətli ilişkiləri təşkil etmək insan annotatorları üçün də çətin bir problemdir. Bu kağıt bu bağlılıqları öyrənmək və bu çətinliklərdən çəkinmək üçün strukturlu öyrənmək fikrini təbliğ edir. Bütün müxtəlif məhsullar kimi, bu qeyb ilişkiləri idarə etmək üçün yeni bir perspektiv verir. Bütün məsələlər həmin metodlara bədbəxt edir. Gördüyümüz kimi, təbliğ edilmiş tərzim bu problem ə görə çox alınan verilən məlumat qurularında möhkəm düzəltmələrə nəticə edir.', 'bs': 'Identifikacija vremenskih odnosa između događaja je ključni korak ka razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Međutim, privremena veza između dva događaja u priči ovisi o tome, a često se diktira odnosi između drugih događaja. Stoga je efektivno identificiranje vremenskih odnosa između događaja izazovan problem čak i za ljudske annotatore. Ovaj papir sugerira da je važno uzeti u obzir ove ovisnosti dok učite identificirati te odnose i predlaže strukturirani pristup učenja za rješavanje ovog izazova. Kao byprodukt, ovo pruža novu perspektivu za rješavanje nestalih odnosa, poznatog pitanja koji boli postojeće metode. Kao što pokazujemo, predloženi pristup rezultira značajnim poboljšanjima na dvije često korištene sete podataka za ovaj problem.', 'ca': "Identificar les relacions temporals entre els esdeveniments és un pas essencial cap a la comprensió natural del llenguatge. No obstant això, la relació temporal entre dos esdeveniments d'una història depèn de, i sovint es dicta per, les relacions entre altres esdeveniments. En conseqüència, identificar efectivament les relacions temporals entre esdeveniments és un problem a difícil fins i tot per als anotators humans. This paper suggests that it is important to take these dependencies into account while learning to identify these relations and proposes a structured learning approach to address this challenge.  Com a subproducte, això proporciona una nova perspectiva sobre gestionar les relacions que falten, una qüestió coneguda que fa mal als mètodes existents. Com demostram, l'enfocament proposat provoca millores significatives en els dos conjunts de dades comunament utilitzats per aquest problema.", 'et': 'Sündmustevaheliste ajaliste suhete tuvastamine on oluline samm looduskeele mõistmise suunas. Siiski sõltub loo kahe sündmuse ajaline seos teiste sündmuste vahelistest suhetest ja seda sageli dikteerivad. Sellest tulenevalt on sündmustevaheliste ajaliste suhete tõhus tuvastamine keeruline probleem isegi inimmärkide jaoks. Käesolevas dokumendis soovitatakse, et neid sõltuvusi tuleb arvesse võtta, õppides neid suhteid kindlaks tegema, ning pakutakse välja struktureeritud õppimise lähenemisviis selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Kõrvalsaadusena annab see uue perspektiivi puuduvate suhete käsitlemisele, mis on teadaolev probleem, mis kahjustab olemasolevaid meetodeid. Nagu näitame, on kavandatud lähenemisviisi tulemuseks märkimisväärne parandus kahe selle probleemi jaoks tavaliselt kasutatava andmekogumi suhtes.', 'cs': 'Identifikace časových vztahů mezi událostmi je zásadním krokem k porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Časový vztah mezi dvěma událostmi v příběhu však závisí na vztazích mezi jinými událostmi a je často diktován vztahy mezi jinými událostmi. Efektivní identifikace časových vztahů mezi událostmi je proto náročným problémem i pro lidské anotátory. Tento článek naznačuje, že je důležité vzít v úvahu tyto závislosti při učení se identifikovat tyto vztahy a navrhuje strukturovaný přístup učení k řešení této výzvy. Jako vedlejší produkt to poskytuje nový pohled na řešení chybějících vztahů, známý problém, který poškozuje stávající metody. Jak ukazujeme, navrhovaný přístup vede k výraznému zlepšení dvou běžně používaných datových sad pro tento problém.', 'fi': 'Tapahtumien ajallisten suhteiden tunnistaminen on olennainen askel kohti luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämistä. Tarinan kahden tapahtuman ajallinen suhde riippuu kuitenkin muiden tapahtumien välisistä suhteista. Näin ollen tapahtumien välisten ajallisten suhteiden tehokas tunnistaminen on haastava ongelma jopa inhimillisille annotattoreille. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotetaan, että nämä riippuvuudet on tärkeää ottaa huomioon, kun opitaan tunnistamaan nämä suhteet, ja ehdotetaan jäsenneltyä oppimistapaa tämän haasteen ratkaisemiseksi. Sivutuotteena tämä tarjoaa uuden näkökulman puuttuvien suhteiden käsittelyyn, joka on tunnettu ongelma, joka vahingoittaa nykyisiä menetelmiä. Kuten olemme osoittaneet, ehdotettu lähestymistapa johtaa merkittäviin parannuksiin kahteen yleisesti käytettyyn tietoaineistoon tämän ongelman osalta.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Nanging, langgar-langgar resmi terusan langgar alih iki dadi nêmên ning pasar iki, lan dadi diketek dhéwé, babagan akèh seneng akèh wis ana. Er wigat-wigat, langgar-wigatining perkaraan sampeyan wigatining pasar iki nggawe perbudhakan kanggo nganggo Perintah sing gagal. Awak iki suggeruju kanggo kelas kuwi nggawe dipunahangi iki ning kontu sapa ngulinakake ingkang sampeyan perusahaan iki lan supoyo dar sampeyan sampek structural kanggo ujaran susahe iki. Nambah kelompok, iki bakal nggawe perspektur anyar tentang karo nganggo perkaranan sing wis ana, nganggo perkaran sing nganggo perkaraan sing wis ana. Nambah awak dhéwé ngerasakno, akeh onhal dadi nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno iki dadi iki dadi kanggo perbudhakan iki.', 'he': 'זיהוי יחסים זמניים בין אירועים הוא צעד חיוני לכיוון הבנה טבעית של שפה. עם זאת, מערכת היחסים הזמנית בין שני אירועים בסיפור תלויה, ולעתים קרובות, על מערכת היחסים בין אירועים אחרים. כתוצאה מכך, זיהוי יעיל יחסים זמניים בין אירועים הוא בעיה מאתגרת אפילו עבור ציונים אנושיים. העיתון הזה מציע שחשוב לקחת בחשבון את התלויות האלה בזמן ללמוד לזהות את היחסים האלה ומציע גישה למידה מבוססת כדי להתמודד עם האתגר הזה. כתוצר לוואי, זה מספק פרספקטיבה חדשה על טיפול יחסים חסרים, נושא ידוע שמפגע בשיטות קיימות. כפי שאנחנו מראים, הגישה המוצעת תוצאה בשיפורים משמעותיים על שני קבוצות נתונים משתמשים בדרך כלל לבעיה הזאת.', 'ha': "Ina gane da dangantarwa na lokaci a tsakanin ayukan ayuka, wata hango na muhimu zuwa fahimtar harshe na natura. Amma, mazaunin tsakanin biyu na cikin wani lãbãri yana dõgara, kuma ana karatun shi da yawa, da danganci na waɗansu abu. Saboda haka, ka gane danganta masu amfani da tsakanin abu da ake yi a tsakanin ayuka, yana da wata matsayi mai zartar da kuma kõ dã ma'anar mutane. Wannan takardan na gaya cewa, ana muhimu ka ɗauki waɗannan, a lokacin da za ka iya gane wa waɗannan mazaɓa, kuma yana buƙata wani hanyor da aka sassaƙa wa su yi addu'a ga wannan bango. As an gabatar da bayani, wannan yana samar da wata kalma na daban a kan managi danganta da ba'a ɓace ba, wata matsayi mai iya zartar da metoden da ke da. Kama da Muke nũna, hanyowa da aka buƙata, zai ƙara wa mafariko mai girma wa matsayin data masu amfani da ɗammãnin wannan mataimaki.", 'sk': 'Ugotavljanje časovnih odnosov med dogodki je bistven korak k razumevanju naravnega jezika. Vendar pa je časovna razmerja med dvema dogodkoma v zgodbi odvisna od odnosov med drugimi dogodki in jo pogosto narekujejo. Zato je učinkovito prepoznavanje časovnih odnosov med dogodki zahteven problem tudi za človeške označevalce. Ta dokument predlaga, da je pomembno upoštevati te odvisnosti pri učenju identifikacije teh odnosov, in predlaga strukturiran pristop učenja za reševanje tega izziva. To kot stranski proizvod zagotavlja novo perspektivo za obravnavanje manjkajočih odnosov, znano vprašanje, ki škodi obstoječim metodam. Kot kažemo, predlagani pristop prinaša znatne izboljšave glede dveh skupin podatkov, ki se pogosto uporabljata za to težavo.', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། གནད་དོན་ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་ནང་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བའི་དུས་མཚམས་དེ་depend་ན། དེར་བརྟེན། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དུས་ཚོད་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཆེས་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཁོང་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད། ཤོག དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་དང་མི་ཤེས་པའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་སྐྱུར་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པ་ལྟར། གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་ན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་དཀའ'}
{'en': 'Importance sampling for unbiased on-demand evaluation of knowledge base population', 'ar': 'أخذ العينات أهمية للتقييم غير المتحيز عند الطلب لمجتمع قاعدة المعرفة', 'es': 'Muestreo de importancia para una evaluación imparcial a pedido de la población de base', 'pt': 'Amostragem de importância para avaliação imparcial sob demanda da população da base de conhecimento', 'fr': "Échantillonnage de l'importance pour une évaluation impartiale à la demande de la population", 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの母集団の不偏オンデマンド評価のための重要性のサンプリング', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस आबादी के निष्पक्ष ऑन-डिमांड मूल्यांकन के लिए महत्व नमूनाकरण', 'zh': '知识库总体无偏倚,以质要抽样', 'ru': 'Важность выборки для объективной оценки популяции базы знаний по требованию', 'ga': 'Sampláil tábhachta le haghaidh meastóireachta neamhchlaonta ar éileamh ar dhaonra an bhonn eolais', 'el': 'Δειγματοληψία σημασίας για την αμερόληπτη αξιολόγηση κατά παραγγελία του πληθυσμού της βάσης γνώσεων', 'hu': 'Mintavétel jelentősége a tudásbázis populáció elfogulatlan igény szerinti értékeléséhez', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულება ცნობიერების ბაზის მოსახულების განსახულებელად', 'it': 'Campionamento di importanza per una valutazione imparziale su richiesta della popolazione di base di conoscenze', 'mk': 'Важно примерување на примероци за непристрасна проценка на барање на популацијата на базата на знаење', 'kk': 'Мәліметтердің негізгі мәліметтерді бағалау үшін маңызды мәліметтер', 'lt': 'Svarbus mėginių ėmimas nešališkam žinių bazės gyventojų paklausos vertinimui', 'ms': 'Pengambilan contoh penting untuk penilaian tidak bias pada permintaan populasi asas pengetahuan', 'ml': 'പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Importance sampling for unbiased on-demand evaluation of knowledge base population', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь хүн амын шалгалтын тулд өөрчлөгдсөн шалгалтын тулд', 'no': 'Prøveprøver av viktigheit for utveksleg etter etterspørselen av kunnskapsbasepopulasjon', 'pl': 'Znaczenie wyrywkowania próbek dla bezstronnej oceny populacji bazy wiedzy na żądanie', 'ro': 'Eșantionarea importanței pentru evaluarea imparțială la cerere a populației bazei de cunoștințe', 'sr': 'Važno uzorak uzorka za nepristrasnu procjenu stanovništva baze znanja', 'si': 'දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැම්පල් කරන්න', 'so': 'Tusaale muhiim ah oo aan caqaban karin qiimeynta aasaasiga aqoonta', 'sv': 'Provtagning av betydelse för opartisk utvärdering på begäran av kunskapsbaspopulationen', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை மக்களின் மதிப்பின் போது தேவையில்லாத முக்கியமான மாதிரி', 'ur': 'علم بنیاد جماعت کے مطابق غیر منصوبہ کے لئے اہم نمونے', 'uz': 'Maʼlumot asosiy sohasini qiymatlashni talab qilish uchun muhim misol', 'vi': 'Việc lấy mẫu quan trọng cho việc đánh giá đơn giản dựa trên yêu cầu', 'hr': 'Uzorak važnosti za nepristrasnu procjenu stanovništva baze znanja', 'bg': 'Вземане на проби от значение за безпристрастна оценка при поискване на популацията от базата на знания', 'nl': 'Belang van steekproeven voor een onpartijdige evaluatie op aanvraag van de kennisbasepopulatie', 'da': 'Betydning af stikprøveudtagning til upartisk on-demand evaluering af videnbasespopulationen', 'de': 'Bedeutung von Stichproben für die unvoreingenommene On-Demand-Bewertung der Wissensbasis-Population', 'fa': 'نمونه\u200cهای مهم برای ارزیابی از جمعیت پایه\u200cهای دانش\u200cها در مورد تحقیق غیرقابل توجه', 'sw': 'Mfano wa umuhimu wa kutokupendelea kwa kutathmini tathmini ya watu wa msingi wa maarifa', 'tr': 'Bilim ilatynyň sanlarynyň çykarmasynda nähili örän möhüm', 'id': 'Pengambilan contoh penting untuk evaluasi tidak bias pada permintaan populasi dasar pengetahuan', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 그룹은 수요에 따라 평가하는 중요성 표본 추출에 치우치지 않는다', 'af': 'Onbekende voorbeeld vir onbepaalde op-versoek evaluering van kennis basis bevolking', 'am': 'የእውቀት መቀመጫዎች አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለማሳየት የጠቃሚ ምሳሌ', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e rëndësishme për vlerësimin e pafajshëm në kërkesë të popullsisë bazë të njohurive', 'hy': 'Գիտելու հիմնական բնակչության անկողմնակի գնահատման համար նմուշների նշաններ վերցնելը', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের বেসের জনসংখ্যার মূল্যের চাহিদার বিরুদ্ধে অযোগ্য উদাহরণের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উদাহরণ', 'az': 'Bilim baz캼 n칲fusunun m칲nasib톛tli n칲mun톛l톛ri t톛l톛b edilm톛d톛n sonra t톛l톛b edilm톛y톛n', 'cs': 'Výběr vzorků pro nestranné hodnocení populace znalostní báze na vyžádání', 'ca': "Prendre mostres d'importància per a una evaluació imparcial a la demanda de la població basada en coneixements", 'bs': 'Uzorak važnosti za nepristrasnu procjenu stanovništva baze znanja', 'et': 'Valimi olulisus teadmistebaasi populatsiooni erapooletuks nõudmisel hindamiseks', 'fi': 'Näytteenoton merkitys tietopohjapopulaation puolueettomassa pyynnöstä tehtävässä arvioinnissa', 'jv': 'sample', 'sk': 'Vzorčenje pomembnosti za nepristransko vrednotenje populacije baze znanja na zahtevo', 'ha': "Kima mis칚lin da ba'a s칚톕a wa-fa톙i ba-daidai evaluation wa ma톕allin ilmi", 'he': 'דגימות חשובות עבור הערכה לא משותפת על דרישה של אוכלוסיית בסיס הידע', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མི་འབོར'}
{'en': 'Knowledge base population (KBP) systems take in a large document corpus and extract entities and their relations. Thus far, KBP evaluation has relied on judgements on the pooled predictions of existing systems. We show that this evaluation is problematic : when a new system predicts a previously unseen relation, it is penalized even if it is correct. This leads to significant bias against new systems, which counterproductively discourages innovation in the field. Our first contribution is a new importance-sampling based evaluation which corrects for this bias by annotating a new system’s predictions on-demand via crowdsourcing. We show this eliminates bias and reduces variance using data from the 2015 TAC KBP task. Our second contribution is an implementation of our method made publicly available as an online KBP evaluation service. We pilot the service by testing diverse state-of-the-art systems on the TAC KBP 2016 corpus and obtain accurate scores in a cost effective manner.', 'ar': 'تأخذ أنظمة مجتمع قاعدة المعرفة (KBP) مجموعة كبيرة من المستندات وتستخرج الكيانات وعلاقاتها. حتى الآن ، اعتمد تقييم KBP على الأحكام على التنبؤات المجمعة للأنظمة الحالية. نظهر أن هذا التقييم إشكالي: عندما يتوقع نظام جديد علاقة لم يسبق لها مثيل ، يعاقب عليها حتى لو كانت صحيحة. يؤدي هذا إلى تحيز كبير ضد الأنظمة الجديدة ، مما يؤدي إلى عدم تشجيع الابتكار في هذا المجال بنتائج عكسية. مساهمتنا الأولى هي تقييم جديد قائم على أخذ العينات يصحح هذا التحيز من خلال التعليق على تنبؤات النظام الجديد عند الطلب من خلال التعهيد الجماعي. نظهر أن هذا يزيل التحيز ويقلل التباين باستخدام البيانات من مهمة TAC KBP لعام 2015. مساهمتنا الثانية هي تنفيذ طريقتنا المتاحة للجمهور كخدمة تقييم KBP عبر الإنترنت. نقوم بتجربة الخدمة من خلال اختبار الأنظمة الحديثة المتنوعة على مجموعة TAC KBP 2016 والحصول على درجات دقيقة بطريقة فعالة من حيث التكلفة.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de population de base de connaissances (KBP) prennent en charge un vaste corpus de documents et extraient les entités et leurs relations. Jusqu'à présent, l'évaluation du KBP s'est appuyée sur des jugements sur les prévisions regroupées des systèmes existants. Nous montrons que cette évaluation est problématique\xa0: lorsqu'un nouveau système prédit une relation inédite, il est pénalisé même s'il est correct. Cela entraîne un biais important contre les nouveaux systèmes, ce qui décourage l'innovation dans ce domaine de manière contre-productive. Notre première contribution est une nouvelle évaluation basée sur l'échantillonnage d'importance qui corrige ce biais en annotant les prédictions d'un nouveau système à la demande via le crowdsourcing. Nous montrons que cela élimine les biais et réduit la variance en utilisant les données de la tâche KBP TAC 2015. Notre deuxième contribution est une mise en œuvre de notre méthode mise à la disposition du public en tant que service d'évaluation KBP en ligne. Nous testons le service en testant divers systèmes de pointe sur le corpus TAC KBP 2016 et obtenons des scores précis de manière rentable.", 'pt': 'Os sistemas de população de base de conhecimento (KBP) recebem um grande corpus de documentos e extraem entidades e suas relações. Até agora, a avaliação do KBP baseou-se em julgamentos sobre as previsões agrupadas dos sistemas existentes. Mostramos que essa avaliação é problemática: quando um novo sistema prevê uma relação inédita, ele é penalizado mesmo que esteja correto. Isso leva a um viés significativo contra novos sistemas, o que desencoraja de forma contraproducente a inovação no campo. Nossa primeira contribuição é uma nova avaliação baseada em amostragem de importância que corrige esse viés anotando as previsões de um novo sistema sob demanda via crowdsourcing. Mostramos que isso elimina o viés e reduz a variação usando dados da tarefa TAC KBP de 2015. Nossa segunda contribuição é uma implementação do nosso método disponibilizado publicamente como um serviço de avaliação KBP online. Nós testamos o serviço testando diversos sistemas de última geração no corpus TAC KBP 2016 e obtemos pontuações precisas de maneira econômica.', 'ja': 'ナレッジベース母集団（ KBP ）システムは、大きな文書コーパスを取り込み、エンティティとその関係を抽出します。これまでのところ、KBPの評価は、既存システムのプールされた予測に対する判断に依存しています。この評価には問題があることが示されています。新しいシステムが以前は見えていなかった関係を予測すると、それが正しいとしてもペナルティが課されます。これは、新しいシステムに対する大きな偏見につながり、その分野のイノベーションを逆生産的に阻害します。私たちの最初の貢献は、新しい重要性サンプリングに基づく評価であり、クラウドソーシングを介してオンデマンドで新しいシステムの予測に注釈を付けることによって、このバイアスを修正します。これは、2015年のTAC KBPタスクのデータを使用してバイアスを排除し、分散を低減することを示しています。2番目の貢献は、オンラインKBP評価サービスとして公開されているメソッドの実装です。TAC KBP 2016コーパスで多様な最先端システムをテストし、費用対効果の高い方法で正確なスコアを取得して、サービスをパイロットします。', 'es': 'Los sistemas de población de base de conocimiento (KBP) incluyen un gran corpus de documentos y extraen entidades y sus relaciones. Hasta ahora, la evaluación de KBP se ha basado en juicios sobre las predicciones agrupadas de los sistemas existentes. Demostramos que esta evaluación es problemática: cuando un nuevo sistema predice una relación nunca antes vista, se penaliza aunque sea correcta. Esto lleva a un sesgo significativo en contra de los nuevos sistemas, lo que desalienta de manera contraproducente la innovación en el campo. Nuestra primera contribución es una nueva evaluación basada en el muestreo de importancia que corrige este sesgo anotando las predicciones de un nuevo sistema a pedido a través de crowdsourcing. Demostramos que esto elimina el sesgo y reduce la varianza utilizando datos de la tarea TAC KBP 2015. Nuestra segunda contribución es la implementación de nuestro método que se pone a disposición del público como un servicio de evaluación de KBP en línea. Ponemos a prueba el servicio probando diversos sistemas de última generación en el corpus TAC KBP 2016 y obtenemos puntuaciones precisas de manera rentable.', 'ru': 'Системы заполнения базы знаний (kbp) объединяются в крупный корпус документов и извлекают сущности и их отношения. До сих пор ОЦЕНКА kbp основывалась на суждениях, основанных на объединенных прогнозах существующих систем. Мы показываем, что эта оценка проблематична: когда новая система предсказывает ранее невидимое отношение, она наказывается, даже если это правильно. Это приводит к значительной предвзятости в отношении новых систем, что контрпродуктивно препятствует инновациям в этой области. Нашим первым вкладом является новая оценка на основе выборки по важности, которая корректирует это смещение, аннотируя прогнозы новой системы по требованию с помощью краудсорсинга. Мы показываем, что это устраняет смещение и уменьшает дисперсию, используя данные из задачи 2015 TAC kbp. Наш второй вклад - реализация нашего метода, доступного для общественности в качестве онлайн-сервиса оценки kbp. Мы пилотируем сервис, тестируя различные современные системы на корпусе TAC kbp 2016 и получаем точные оценки экономически эффективным способом.', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस पॉपुलेशन (KBP) सिस्टम एक बड़े दस्तावेज़ कॉर्पस में लेते हैं और संस्थाओं और उनके संबंधों को निकालते हैं। इस प्रकार अब तक, KBP मूल्यांकन मौजूदा प्रणालियों की pooled भविष्यवाणियों पर निर्णयों पर भरोसा किया है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह मूल्यांकन समस्याग्रस्त है: जब एक नई प्रणाली पहले अनदेखी संबंध की भविष्यवाणी करती है, तो इसे दंडित किया जाता है, भले ही यह सही हो। यह नई प्रणालियों के खिलाफ महत्वपूर्ण पूर्वाग्रह की ओर जाता है, जो क्षेत्र में नवाचार को प्रतिकूल रूप से हतोत्साहित करता है। हमारा पहला योगदान एक नया महत्व-नमूना आधारित मूल्यांकन है जो क्राउडसोर्सिंग के माध्यम से एक नई प्रणाली की भविष्यवाणियों को ऑन-डिमांड एनोटेट करके इस पूर्वाग्रह के लिए सही करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह पूर्वाग्रह को समाप्त करता है और 2015 टीएसी केबीपी कार्य से डेटा का उपयोग करके विचरण को कम करता है। हमारा दूसरा योगदान हमारी विधि का एक कार्यान्वयन है जो सार्वजनिक रूप से एक ऑनलाइन केबीपी मूल्यांकन सेवा के रूप में उपलब्ध कराया गया है। हम टीएसी केबीपी 2016 कॉर्पस पर विभिन्न अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों का परीक्षण करके सेवा को पायलट करते हैं और लागत प्रभावी तरीके से सटीक स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'zh': '知识库总 (KBP) 统受大文档语料库而取其实体。 至目前为止,KBP之评赖于系统汇总占断。 此论有之:当一新统占一前不见之时,即其是,亦受其罚。 此则新统之偏见,而适其反地阻其创新也。 首贡惟新抽样,众包需注释正厥偏。 用自 2015 TAC KBP 数,去偏减方差。 第二贡成吾法,为在线KBP估服务公给。 试诸先进之统于TAC KBP 2016语料库上,以成本效益之分。', 'ga': 'Cuimsíonn córais bonn eolais daonra (KBP) corpas mór doiciméad agus aonáin eastósctha agus a gcaidreamh. Go dtí seo, bhí meastóireacht KBP ag brath ar bhreithiúnais ar thuar comhthiomsaithe na gcóras reatha. Léirímid go bhfuil fadhbanna ag baint leis an meastóireacht seo: nuair a dhéanann córas nua coibhneas nach bhfacthas riamh roimhe a thuar, gearrtar pionós air fiú má tá sé ceart. Mar thoradh air seo tá claonadh suntasach i gcoinne córais nua, rud a dhíspreagann nuálaíocht sa réimse go frith-tháirgiúil. Is é an chéad rannchuidiú atá againn ná meastóireacht nua bunaithe ar thábhacht-shampláil a cheartaíonn an claonadh seo trí thuar córais nua ar éileamh a nótáil trí sluafhoinsiú. Léirímid go gcuireann sé seo deireadh le laofacht agus laghdaítear éagsúlacht ag baint úsáide as sonraí ó thasc TAC KBP 2015. Is é an dara ranníocaíocht atá againn ná cur i bhfeidhm ár modh a chuirtear ar fáil go poiblí mar sheirbhís mheastóireachta KBP ar líne. Déanaimid an tseirbhís a phíolótú trí chórais éagsúla den scoth a thástáil ar chorpas TAC KBP 2016 agus faighimid scóir chruinne ar bhealach costéifeachtach.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα πληθυσμών βάσεων γνώσης (KBP) λαμβάνουν ένα μεγάλο σώμα εγγράφων και εξάγουν οντότητες και τις σχέσεις τους. Μέχρι στιγμής, η αξιολόγηση του KBP βασίστηκε σε εκτιμήσεις σχετικά με τις συγκεντρωτικές προβλέψεις των υφιστάμενων συστημάτων. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η αξιολόγηση είναι προβληματική: όταν ένα νέο σύστημα προβλέπει μια προηγουμένως αόρατη σχέση, τιμωρείται ακόμα και αν είναι σωστή. Αυτό οδηγεί σε σημαντική προκατάληψη έναντι νέων συστημάτων, η οποία αποθαρρύνει αντιπαραγωγικά την καινοτομία στον τομέα. Η πρώτη μας συνεισφορά είναι μια νέα αξιολόγηση βάσει δειγματοληψίας σημασίας που διορθώνει αυτή την προκατάληψη σχολιάζοντας τις προβλέψεις ενός νέου συστήματος κατά παραγγελία μέσω crowdsourcing. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτό εξαλείφει την προκατάληψη και μειώνει τη διακύμανση χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα από την εργασία 2015 TAC KBP. Η δεύτερη συνεισφορά μας είναι η εφαρμογή της μεθόδου μας που διατίθεται δημόσια ως υπηρεσία αξιολόγησης KBP. Ελέγχουμε την υπηρεσία δοκιμάζοντας διάφορα συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σώμα και επιτυγχάνουμε ακριβείς βαθμολογίες με οικονομικά αποδοτικό τρόπο.', 'ka': 'Name მიმდინარე, KBP განსაზღვრება გადარჩენა მსოფლიო სისტემის ერთადერთი განსაზღვრებაზე. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს განსაზღვრება პრობლემეტურია: როდესაც ახალი სისტემა წინასწარმოდგენა წინასწარმოდგენილი პრობლემენტი, ის დაბრუნდება, თუ მარ ეს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი სისტემების განმავლობაში, რომელიც კონტპროექტიურად ინონოციაციის განმავლობაში შეუძლებელია. ჩვენი პირველი დამატება არის ახალი გასანიშვნელოვანი გამოიყენება, რომელიც ამ წარმოდგენისთვის კეთებს, რომელიც ახალი სისტემის წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობით მუშაობის გამოყენებაში ჩვენ ამას ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ წარმოდგენება და გარიანციის გამოყენება 2015 TAC KBP დავალების მონაცემებით. ჩვენი მეორე დამატება არის ჩვენი პროცემის გამოყენება, რომელიც საშუალოდ იქნება KBP განსაზღვრების სერვისი. ჩვენ ვაპირებთ სერვისტის განსხვავებული სისტემების განსხვავებული სისტემებს TAC KBP 2016 კოპუსში და მივიღებთ სწორი მონაცემები ეფექტიურად.', 'hu': 'A tudásbázis-populáció (KBP) rendszerek nagy dokumentumkorpuszt foglalnak be, és kivonják az entitásokat és azok kapcsolataikat. A KBP értékelése eddig a meglévő rendszerek összesített előrejelzésein alapult. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez az értékelés problémás: amikor egy új rendszer előrejelzi a korábban láthatatlan kapcsolatot, akkor is büntetik, ha helyes. Ez jelentős elfogultsághoz vezet az új rendszerekkel szemben, amelyek termelékeny módon visszatartják az innovációt a területen. Első hozzájárulásunk egy új fontossági mintavételi alapú értékelés, amely korrigálja ezt az elfogultságot azáltal, hogy egy új rendszer igény szerinti előrejelzéseit a crowdsourcing segítségével jegyzeteli meg. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez kiküszöböli az elfogultságot és csökkenti a varianciát a 2015-ös TAC KBP feladat adataival. Második hozzájárulásunk az online KBP értékelési szolgáltatásként nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé tett módszerünk bevezetése. A szolgáltatást különböző korszerű rendszerek tesztelésével teszteljük a TAC KBP 2016 korpuszon, és pontos pontszámokat kapunk költséghatékony módon.', 'it': "I sistemi KBP (Knowledge Base Population) raccolgono un corpus di documenti di grandi dimensioni ed estraggono entità e le loro relazioni. Finora, la valutazione KBP si è basata su valutazioni basate sulle previsioni aggregate dei sistemi esistenti. Dimostriamo che questa valutazione è problematica: quando un nuovo sistema predice una relazione precedentemente invisibile, viene penalizzato anche se è corretto. Ciò porta a una tendenza significativa nei confronti dei nuovi sistemi, che scoraggia in modo controproducente l'innovazione nel settore. Il nostro primo contributo è una nuova valutazione basata sul campionamento di importanza che corregge questo bias annotando le previsioni di un nuovo sistema on-demand tramite crowdsourcing. Mostriamo che questo elimina il bias e riduce la varianza utilizzando i dati dell'attività TAC KBP 2015. Il nostro secondo contributo è l'implementazione del nostro metodo reso pubblico come servizio di valutazione KBP online. Pilotiamo il servizio testando diversi sistemi all'avanguardia sul corpus TAC KBP 2016 e otteniamo punteggi accurati in modo conveniente.", 'lt': 'Žinių bazės gyventojų (KBP) sistemos sudaro didelį dokumentų rinkinį ir ištraukimo subjektus bei jų santykius. Iki šiol KBP vertinimas grindžiamas bendromis esamų sistemų prognozėmis. Mes rodome, kad šis vertinimas yra probleminis: kai naujoje sistemoje numatomas anksčiau nematomas ryšys, jis baudžiamas net jei jis teisingas. Dėl to atsiranda didelis nukrypimas nuo naujų sistemų, kurios priešingai atgraso nuo inovacijų šioje srityje. Mūs ų pirmasis indėlis yra naujas svarbos mėginių ėmimo vertinimas, kuris ištaiso šią pusiausvyrą anotuojant naujos sistemos prognozes dėl paklausos naudojant visuomenės išteklius. Mes parodome, kad tai pašalina sąžiningumą ir mažina skirtumus naudojant 2015 m. TAC KBP užduoties duomenis. Antrasis mūsų indėlis yra mūsų viešai prieinamo KBP vertinimo paslaugos metodo įgyvendinimas. Bandome šią paslaugą išbandydami įvairias naujausias sistemas, taikomas TAC KBP 2016 korpusui, ir ekonomiškai efektyviai gauname tikslius rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Білім негізгі мәліметтер (KBP) жүйелері үлкен құжаттың корпусына алып, бірліктерді және қатынастарын тарқатып алып тастайды. Қазір КБП бағалауы бар жүйелердің біріктірілген таңдауларына көмектеседі. Бұл бағалауы мәселе деп көрсетіп тұрмыз: жаңа жүйе алдында көрсетілмеген қатынасын таңдағанда, бұл дұрыс болса да, бұл дұрыс болады. Бұл жаңа жүйелерде қарсы маңызды тәртіптерге көмектеседі. Бұл өрісте инновацияларды қарсы көмектеседі. Біздің бірінші қатынасыз - мәліметтерді баптауға негізделген оқиға. Бұл қатынасы жаңа жүйелік қатынасының алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- ала қатынасыз көмектесу арқы Бұл 2015 TAC KBP тапсырмасындағы деректерді қолдануды өшіру және айнымалылығын азайтады. Біздің екінші қатынасыз - онлайн KBP бағалау қызметі ретінде ашық жеткізетін әдіміздің іске асыру. Біз қызметті бағалап, TAC KBP 2016 корпус бойынша әртүрлі күй- жай жүйелерді тексеріп, дұрыс нәтижелерді дұрыс тәртібімен алдық.', 'mk': 'Knowledge base population (KBP) systems take in a large document corpus and extract entities and their relations.  Досега, проценката на КБП се потпира на пресудите на заедничките предвидувања на постојните системи. Ние покажуваме дека оваа проценка е проблематична: кога новиот систем предвидува претходно невидлива врска, таа е казнета дури и ако е точна. Ова води до значителна предрасуда против новите системи, кои контрапродуктивно ги отцепуваат иновациите на теренот. Нашиот прв придонес е нова проценка базирана на примероци на важност која ја коригира оваа предрасуда со анотација на предвидувањата на новиот систем на барање преку пулсорсирање. We show this eliminates bias and reduces variance using data from the 2015 TAC KBP task.  Нашиот втор придонес е спроведувањето на нашиот метод кој е јавно достапен како онлајн сервис за проценка на КБП. Ние ја пилотираме услугата со тестирање на различни најнови системи на корпусот на ТАЦ КБП 2016 и добиваме прецизни оценки на трошочно ефективен начин.', 'ms': 'Sistem populasi asas pengetahuan (KBP) mengambil dalam korpus dokumen besar dan mengekstrak entiti dan hubungan mereka. Sejauh ini, penilaian KBP telah bergantung pada penilaian pada ramalan berkumpul sistem sedia ada. Kami menunjukkan penilaian ini adalah masalah: apabila sistem baru meramalkan hubungan yang belum terlihat sebelumnya, ia dihukum walaupun ia betul. Ini menyebabkan bias yang signifikan terhadap sistem baru, yang secara kontraproduktif menghalang inovasi di medan. Kontribusi pertama kita ialah penilaian berdasarkan pengumpulan penting yang betul untuk bias ini dengan menyatakan ramalan sistem baru pada permintaan melalui crowdsourcing. Kita tunjukkan ini menghapuskan bias dan mengurangkan variasi menggunakan data dari tugas KBP TAC 2015. Kontribusi kedua kami adalah pelaksanaan kaedah kami yang diberikan secara awam sebagai perkhidmatan penilaian KBP online. Kami mengendalikan perkhidmatan dengan menguji sistem terbaik yang berbeza pada korpus TAC KBP 2016 dan mendapatkan skor yang tepat dengan cara yang efektif.', 'ml': 'അറിവ് ബേസ് സംഖ്യ (കെബിപി) സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ രേഖയുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിലും അവയുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങളും പുറത്തെടുക്കുക ഇപ്പോള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രവചനങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് കെബിപി വിലാസം വിശ്വസിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഈ വിലാസപ്രശ്നമാണെന്ന്: ഒരു പുതിയ സിസ്റ്റം മുമ്പ് അദൃശ്യമായ ബന്ധത്തെ പ്രവചിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അത് ശര ഇത് പുതിയ സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ബഹുദ്ധത്തിലേക്ക് നയിക്കുന്നു. പ്രദേശത്തെ പുതിയ പുതിയ നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ഭാഗമെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d 2015 ടാസിസി കെബിപി ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇത് നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നു എന്ന് നാം കാണിച്ച നമ്മുടെ രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഭാഗം നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ രീതിയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തിയത് ഒരു ഓണ ടാസി കെബിപി 2016 കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സേവനത്തെ പൈല്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. വ', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi tal-popolazzjoni bbażata fuq l-għarfien (KBP) jieħdu f’korpus ta’ dokument kbir u jestraw entitajiet u r-relazzjonijiet tagħhom. Sa issa, l-evalwazzjoni ta’ KBP kienet ibbażata fuq ġudizzji fuq il-previżjonijiet miġbura flimkien tas-sistemi eżistenti. Aħna nuru li din l-evalwazzjoni hija problematika: meta sistema ġdida tipprevedi relazzjoni li ma ġietx osservata qabel, hija penalizzata anki jekk hija korretta. Dan iwassal għal preġudizzju sinifikanti kontra sistemi ġodda, li b’mod kontroproduttiv jiskoraġġixxi l-innovazzjoni fil-qasam. L-ewwel kontribuzzjoni tagħna hija evalwazzjoni ġdida bbażata fuq it-teħid ta’ kampjuni ta’ importanza li tikkoreġi għal din il-preġudizzju billi tinnota t-tbassir ta’ sistema ġdida fuq talba permezz tal-crowdsourcing. Dan juri li jelimina l-preġudizzju u jnaqqas il-varjanza bl-użu tad-dejta mill-kompitu tat-TAC KBP tal-2015. It-tieni kontribuzzjoni tagħna hija implimentazzjoni tal-metodu tagħna li sar disponibbli għall-pubbliku bħala servizz ta’ evalwazzjoni tal-KBP onlajn. Aħna nibdew is-servizz billi ntestjaw sistemi varji ta’ l-aktar avvanzati fuq il-korpus tat-TAC KBP 2016 u niksbu punteġġi preċiżi b’mod kosteffettiv.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгтэй суурь хүн амын (КБП) системүүд том баримт корпус болон бүтэц болон харилцаа гаргадаг. Одоогоор КБП-ын үнэлгээ суурилсан системийн нийлүүлсэн таамаглал дээр үнэлдэг. Бид энэ үнэлгээ асуудалтай гэдгийг харуулж байна: шинэ систем өмнө нь харилцааны харилцааныг таамаглах үед энэ нь зөв ч гэсэн шаардлагатай. Энэ нь шинэ системийн эсрэг маш чухал нөлөөлдөг бөгөөд энэ нь салбарт шинэчлэлүүдийг зогсоож чаддаг. Бидний анхны нөлөө бол олон нийтийн асуудлын аргаар шинэ системийн талаарх хэрэгцээний талаарх таамаглалтыг зөвшөөрүүлж буй шинэ чухал нэг шалгалт юм. Бид үүнийг 2015 TAC KBP даалгаварын өгөгдлийг ашиглан алдагдлыг устгаж, өөрчлөлтийг багасгаж байна. Бидний хоёр дахь нөлөө бол бидний олон нийтийн KBP үнэлгээ үйлчилгээний үйл ажиллагаа юм. Бид үйлчилгээ ашиглаж, ТАК КБП 2016 корпус дээр олон төрлийн урлагийн системийг шалгаж, үнэтэй аргаар зөв тоонуудыг авч ирсэн.', 'no': 'Name Til dag har KBP-evalueringa reliert på sprøytebrukane på dei samlede forhåndsvising av eksisterande systemar. Vi viser at denne evalueringa er problematisk: når eit nytt system foregår eit førre ukjend relasjon, vert det straumført sjølv om det er rett. Dette fører til signifikante forvirkning mot nye systemar, som kontroproduktivt hindrar inovasjonar i feltet. Det første bidraga vår er ein ny utvalg basert på utvalet av viktige samlingar som korrigerer for denne utvalet ved å merke opp foregåver på eit nytt systemet på etterspørselen ved hjelp av crowdsourcing. Vi viser at dette eliminerer bias og reduserer variansen med data frå TAC KBP-oppgåva 2015. Det andre bidraga vårt er ein implementering av metoden vårt som er publisert tilgjengeleg som ein KBP- evalueringstenest på nettet. Vi piloter tenesten ved å testa ulike kunstsystemer på TAC KBP 2016-korpusen og få nøyaktige poeng på ein kostnadseffektiv måte.', 'pl': 'Systemy populacji bazy wiedzy (KBP) przyjmują duży korpus dokumentów i wyodrębniają jednostki i ich relacje. Dotychczas ocena KBP opierała się na ocenach zbiorowych prognoz istniejących systemów. Pokazujemy, że ta ocena jest problematyczna: gdy nowy system przewiduje wcześniej niewidzianą relację, jest karany nawet jeśli jest prawidłowa. Prowadzi to do znaczącego uprzedzenia wobec nowych systemów, co w sposób kontrproduktywny zniechęca do innowacji w tej dziedzinie. Naszym pierwszym wkładem jest nowa ocena oparta na próbkach ważności, która koryguje tę stronniczość poprzez adnotację prognoz nowego systemu na żądanie poprzez crowdsourcing. Pokazujemy, że eliminuje to uprzedzenia i zmniejsza wariancję wykorzystując dane z zadania TAC KBP 2015. Naszym drugim wkładem jest wdrożenie naszej metody udostępnionej publicznie w ramach usługi oceny KBP online. Pilotujemy usługę testując różnorodne najnowocześniejsze systemy na korpusie TAC KBP 2016 i uzyskujemy dokładne wyniki w opłacalny sposób.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de populație a bazei de cunoștințe (KBP) preiau un corpus mare de documente și extrag entitățile și relațiile acestora. Până în prezent, evaluarea KBP s-a bazat pe evaluările bazate pe previziunile cumulate ale sistemelor existente. Aratăm că această evaluare este problematică: atunci când un nou sistem prezice o relație nevăzută anterior, este penalizat chiar dacă este corect. Acest lucru duce la o părtinire semnificativă împotriva noilor sisteme, ceea ce descurajează în mod contraproductiv inovarea în domeniu. Prima noastră contribuție este o nouă evaluare bazată pe eșantionare de importanță, care corectează această părtinire prin adnotarea predicțiilor unui nou sistem la cerere prin intermediul crowdsourcing. Vă arătăm că acest lucru elimină distorsiunea și reduce variația utilizând datele din activitatea KBP TAC 2015. A doua contribuție a noastră este implementarea metodei noastre puse la dispoziție publicului ca serviciu online de evaluare KBP. Pilotăm serviciul prin testarea diverselor sisteme de ultimă generație pe corpul TAC KBP 2016 și obținem scoruri precise într-o manieră rentabilă.', 'sr': 'Sistemi poznavanja baze populacije (KBP) uzimaju veliki dokument korpus i izvlače entitate i njihove odnose. Do sada, procjena KBP se oslanjala na procjene o zajedničkim predviđanjima postojećih sustava. Pokazujemo da je ova procjena problematična: kada novi sistem predviđa prethodno nevidljivu vezu, kazna je čak i ako je tačno. To vodi do značajne predrasude protiv novih sustava, koji kontraproduktivno ometa inovaciju na terenu. Naš prvi doprinos je nova procjena osnovana na uzorku važnosti koja ispravlja ovu predrasude annotacijom predviđanja novog sistema na zahtevi putem crowdsourcing. Pokazujemo da eliminiše pristrasnost i smanjuje varijanse koristeći podatke iz zadatka TAC KBP 2015. Naš drugi doprinos je provedba naše metode koje je javno dostupno kao online KBP procjene usluga. Pilotiramo uslugu testiranjem različitih stanja umetničkih sustava na korpusu TAC KBP 2016 i dobijamo tačne rezultate na koštanom efikasnom naèinu.', 'si': 'Name මෙතනින් KBP විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ පද්ධතියේ සම්පූර්ණ විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියලා: අළුත් පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කලින් නැති සම්බන්ධයක් අනුවා මේක අළුත් පද්ධතිවල් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ප අපේ පළමු සම්පූර්ණය තමයි අලුත් වැදගත්-සැම්ප්ලීම් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්ලේෂණයක්. ඒක අලුත් පද්ධතියේ අලුත් සැකසුම් අන අපි මේක පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති කරනවා සහ 2015 TAC KBP වැඩයෙන් දත්ත භාවිත කරනවා. අපේ දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තමයි අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ KBP විශ් අපි සේවාව පරීක්ෂා කරනවා TAC KBP 2016 කොර්පස් වල විවිධ ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂා කරලා සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'nidaamka aqoonta ee kooxaha aqoonta (KBP) waxay ku qaadaan kooxda dukumentiyada oo waaweyn iyo alaabtooda iyo xiriirkooda. Tan iyo Muddo, qiimeynta KBP waxay ku xiran tahay xukun ku saabsan wixii la soo sheegay nidaamka jira. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qiimeyntu ay dhibaato tahay: marka nidaam cusub uu horay u sheegayo xiriir aan la arkayn, waxaa lagu ciqaabayaa in kastoo uu sax yahay. Taas waxay ku kacdaa khiyaano badan oo ka gees ah nidaam cusub, taas oo si kala duwan u burburinaya abuurista duurka. Kharashadanada ugu horeeya waa qiimeynta cusub oo qiimeynta muhiimka ah oo ku hagaajiya tartankan, kaas oo ku habboonaya horumarinta nidaamka cusub oo ku qoran baahida dadweynaha. Waxan tusinaynaa in uu dhameeyo tababarida islamarkaasna aan kala duwanaanayno isticmaalka macluumaadka xafiiska TAC KBP 2015. Dhaqaalaha labaad waa qaab lagu soo dejiyo qaababka lagu soo bandhigayo sida adeegga qiimeynta ee shabakadda KBP. Adeegga ayaannu ku baaraynaa imtixaanka nidaamka farshaxanka kala duduwan ee TAC KBP 2016, waxayna ku imaanaysaa qiimaha saxda ah oo faa’iido leh.', 'sv': 'KBP-system (Knowledge Base Population) tar in en stor dokumentkorpus och extraherar entiteter och deras relationer. Hittills har KBP-utvärderingen grundat sig på bedömningar av sammanslagna prognoser för befintliga system. Vi visar att denna utvärdering är problematisk: när ett nytt system förutspår ett tidigare osynligt förhållande straffas det även om det är korrekt. Detta leder till betydande bias mot nya system, vilket motverkar innovation på området. Vårt första bidrag är en ny viktig samplingsbaserad utvärdering som korrigerar denna bias genom att kommentera ett nytt systems förutsägelser på begäran via crowdsourcing. Vi visar att detta eliminerar bias och minskar variansen med hjälp av data från 2015 TAC KBP-aktiviteten. Vårt andra bidrag är en implementering av vår metod som görs offentligt tillgänglig som en online KBP utvärderingstjänst. Vi piloterar tjänsten genom att testa olika state-of-the-art system på TAC KBP 2016 corpus och få korrekta poäng på ett kostnadseffektivt sätt.', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை தொகுதி இப்போது, கேபிபி மதிப்பீடு ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் அமைப்புகளின் குறைந்த எதிர்பார்ப்புகளை மீது சார்ந்திருக்கி இந்த மதிப்பீடு சிக்கலானது என்பதை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம்: ஒரு புதிய கணினி முன்னால் மறைந்திருக்கும் தொடர்பை முற்படுத்து இது புதிய அமைப்புகளுக்கு எதிரான முக்கியமான பிரச்சனைகளை கொண்டு வருகிறது, அது புலத்தில் புதிய புதிய புதிய புத எங்கள் முதல் பங்கு ஒரு புதிய முக்கியமான மாதிரி மாதிரி மதிப்பு 2015 TAC KBP பணியில் இருந்து தரவுகளை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த வேறுபாட்டை நீக்கி காட்டுகிறோம். எங்கள் இரண்டாவது பங்கு என்னவென்றால் எங்கள் முறைமையை பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும் ஒரு இணைய KBP மதிப்பீடு சேவை TAC KBP 2016 குறும்பங்களில் நாம் பல்வேறு நிலைமை முறைமைகளைச் சோதித்து சரியான மதிப்பெண்களை வெளியீடு செய்து விலையான விலையில்', 'ur': 'علم base population (KBP) systems take a large document corpus and extract entities and their relations. یہاں تک، KBP ارزیابی موجود سیستموں کی جمع ہوئی پیش بینی پر قائم ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ارزیابی مشکل ہے: جب ایک نئی سیستم پہلے غیب کی نسبت کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے تو اسے سزا دی جاتی ہے اگرچہ وہ درست ہے۔ یہ نئی سیستموں کے مقابلہ میں اہم بحث کی طرف چلتا ہے، جو کھیتی میں نوآوری کی مخالفت کرتی ہے۔ ہمارا پہلا حصہ ایک نئی اہم اہم طریقے کی آزمائش ہے جو اس طریقے کے لئے درست کرتی ہے اور ایک نئی سیستم کی آزمائش پر جمعی سورسینگ کے ذریعے مطلع کرتی ہے۔ ہم اسے دکھاتے ہیں کہ تقویت کو ہٹاتے ہیں اور متفاوت کو 2015 TAC KBP کے کام سے کم کر دیتے ہیں. ہمارا دوسرا حصہ یہ ہے کہ ہمارے طریقے کی عملومات کی ایک عملومات ہے جو آلنی KBP ارزیابی کے طور پر موجود ہے. ہم نے اس خدمت کو TAC KBP 2016 کورپوس پر مختلف موقعیت کی آزمائش کے ذریعہ آزمائش کر لیا ہے اور دقیق اسکور کو مفید طریقے سے حاصل کر لیا ہے.', 'uz': "Maʼlumot bazasi jamoasi Bu yerda, KBP qiymatlari mavjud tizimlarning ko'pchilik oldini ishlatadi. Biz shu qiymatni muammolar deb tushunamiz: yangi tizim oldingi nomaʼlum aloqalarni ko'rsatganda, u toʻgʻri deb hisoblanadi. This leads to significant bias against new systems, which counterproductively discourages innovation in the field.  Bizning birinchi qanday qiymatimiz - yangi muhim misol, bu qiymatni jamoatlar orqali yangi tizimning tasavvurini tahrirlash mumkin. @ info Bizning ikkinchi qanday qandaydir, shaxsiy shaxsiy KBP qiymati xizmatlari sifatida qo'llaniladigan usulni ishga tushirish. Биз хизматни TAC KBP 2016 композиция системнинг турли ҳолатларини синаш билан бажаришимиз ва аниқ қизматга фойдаланиш учун бажаришга эга бўлишимиз мумкин.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống nhà khoa học hiểu biết (KBP) gồm cả một tập thể đầy đủ tài liệu và các tổ chức có liên quan. Cho đến nay, đánh giá của KBP dựa trên đánh giá dựa trên những dự đoán chung của hệ thống hiện tại. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc đánh giá này là một vấn đề. Khi một hệ thống mới dự đoán một mối quan hệ không ai nhìn thấy trước đây, nó sẽ bị phạt nặng kể cả khi nó đúng. Điều này dẫn đến khuynh hướng đáng kể đối với các hệ thống mới, trái ngược sản suất làm nản lòng mới trong lĩnh vực. Sự đóng góp đầu tiên của chúng ta là một đánh giá dựa trên giá trị quan trọng để s ửa chữa khuynh hướng này bằng cách ghi chú dự đoán tình dục của hệ thống mới qua đòn bẩy. Chúng tôi cho thấy loại bỏ khả năng thiên vị và giảm sự biến đổi nhờ dữ liệu từ nhiệm vụ CAP bây giờ. Sự đóng góp thứ hai của chúng tôi là một thực hiện phương pháp được công bố công khai như một dịch vụ đánh giá KBP trên mạng. Chúng tôi lái dịch vụ bằng cách thử nghiệm các hệ thống hiện đại khác nhau trên tập đoàn TAC KBP 2006 và đạt được điểm chính xác theo một cách có giá trị.', 'bg': 'Системите от съвкупност от бази знания (КБП) приемат голям корпус от документи и извличат субекти и техните взаимоотношения. Досега оценката на KBP разчита на преценки на обединените прогнози на съществуващите системи. Показваме, че тази оценка е проблематична: когато нова система прогнозира досега невиждана връзка, тя се наказва, дори и да е вярна. Това води до значителни пристрастия към новите системи, което противопродуктивно обезкуражава иновациите в областта. Първият ни принос е нова оценка, базирана на извадка от значение, която коригира този отклонение чрез анотиране на прогнозите на нова система при поискване чрез crowdsourcing. Показваме, че това елиминира отклоненията и намалява вариацията, използвайки данните от задачата за 2015 г. Вторият ни принос е внедряване на нашия метод, публично достъпен като онлайн услуга за оценка на КБП. Пилотираме услугата чрез тестване на разнообразни съвременни системи на корпуса и получаваме точни оценки по икономически ефективен начин.', 'da': 'KBP-systemer (Knowledge Base Population) optager et stort dokumentkorpus og udtrækker enheder og deres relationer. Indtil videre har KBP-evalueringen baseret sig på vurderinger af de samlede forudsigelser for eksisterende systemer. Vi viser, at denne evaluering er problematisk: Når et nyt system forudsiger et tidligere uset forhold, straffes det, selvom det er korrekt. Dette fører til en betydelig skævhed mod nye systemer, som modproduktivt afskrækker innovation på området. Vores første bidrag er en ny vigtig-sampling baseret evaluering, som korrigerer for denne bias ved at kommentere et nyt systems forudsigelser on-demand via crowdsourcing. Vi viser, at dette eliminerer bias og reducerer varians ved hjælp af data fra 2015 TAC KBP-opgaven. Vores andet bidrag er en implementering af vores metode, der er offentligt tilgængelig som en online KBP evalueringstjeneste. Vi piloter tjenesten ved at teste forskellige state-of-the-art systemer på TAC KBP 2016 corpus og opnå nøjagtige scores på en omkostningseffektiv måde.', 'nl': 'Kennisbankpopulatiesystemen (KBP) nemen een groot documentcorpus op en extraheren entiteiten en hun relaties. Tot dusver is KBP-evaluatie gebaseerd op beoordelingen op de gebundelde voorspellingen van bestaande systemen. We laten zien dat deze evaluatie problematisch is: wanneer een nieuw systeem een voorheen onzichtbare relatie voorspelt, wordt het bestraft, zelfs als het juist is. Dit leidt tot een aanzienlijke vooringenomenheid ten opzichte van nieuwe systemen, wat innovatie in het veld contraproductief ontmoedigt. Onze eerste bijdrage is een nieuwe evaluatie gebaseerd op belang-sampling die deze bias corrigeert door de voorspellingen van een nieuw systeem on-demand te annoteren via crowdsourcing. We tonen aan dat dit bias elimineert en afwijking vermindert met behulp van gegevens uit de 2015 TAC KBP-taak. Onze tweede bijdrage is een implementatie van onze methode die als online KBP-evaluatiedienst openbaar wordt gemaakt. We piloten de service door diverse state-of-the-art systemen te testen op het TAC KBP 2016 corpus en verkrijgen nauwkeurige scores op een kosteneffectieve manier.', 'id': 'Sistem populasi dasar pengetahuan (KBP) mengambil dalam dokumen besar corpus dan ekstrak entitas dan hubungan mereka. Thus far, KBP evaluation has relied on judgements on the pooled predictions of existing systems.  We show that this evaluation is problematic: when a new system predicts a previously unseen relation, it is penalized even if it is correct.  Ini menyebabkan bias yang signifikan terhadap sistem baru, yang secara kontroproduktif menghina inovasi di lapangan. Kontribusi pertama kami adalah evaluasi baru berdasarkan pengambilan contoh yang memperbaiki bias ini dengan menganotasi prediksi sistem baru pada permintaan melalui crowdsourcing. Kami menunjukkan ini menghapuskan bias dan mengurangi variasi menggunakan data dari tugas KBP TAC 2015. Kontribusi kedua kami adalah implementasi metode kami yang dibuat publik tersedia sebagai layanan evaluasi KBP online. Kami memimpin layanan dengan menguji sistem terbaik yang berbeda pada korpus TAC KBP 2016 dan mendapatkan skor akurat dengan cara yang efektif biaya.', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 인구(KBP) 시스템은 대형 문서 자료 라이브러리를 받아 실체와 그 관계를 추출한다.지금까지 KBP 평가는 기존 시스템에 대한 종합적인 예측 판단에 의존해 왔다.우리는 새로운 시스템이 이전에 볼 수 없었던 관계를 예측할 때, 설령 그것이 옳다 하더라도 처벌을 받는다는 데 문제가 있다는 것을 보여준다.이로 인해 새로운 시스템에 대한 심각한 편견이 생겨 반대로 이 분야의 혁신을 방해할 수 있다.우리의 첫 번째 공헌은 중요한 표본 추출에 기반한 새로운 평가이다. 이 편견을 시정하기 위해 하청업체가 필요에 따라 새로운 시스템의 예측을 주석하는 것이다.2015년 TAC KBP 임무의 데이터를 사용한 결과 편차를 없애고 차이를 줄였다.우리의 두 번째 공헌은 온라인 KBP 평가 서비스로 공개되는 우리의 방법을 실현한 것이다.우리는 TAC KBP 2016 자료 라이브러리에서 각종 가장 선진적인 시스템을 테스트함으로써 이 서비스를 시험하고 경제적이고 효율적인 방식으로 정확한 점수를 얻었다.', 'de': 'Knowledge Base Population (KBP)-Systeme nehmen einen großen Dokumentenkorpus auf und extrahieren Entitäten und ihre Beziehungen. Bisher stützte sich die KBP-Bewertung auf Bewertungen aus den gesammelten Vorhersagen bestehender Systeme. Wir zeigen, dass diese Bewertung problematisch ist: Wenn ein neues System eine bisher unsichtbare Beziehung vorhersagt, wird es bestraft, selbst wenn es richtig ist. Dies führt zu einer deutlichen Voreingenommenheit gegenüber neuen Systemen, die Innovation in diesem Bereich kontraproduktiv abschreckt. Unser erster Beitrag ist eine neue Bedeutung-Sampling-basierte Bewertung, die diesen Bias korrigiert, indem die Vorhersagen eines neuen Systems on-demand mittels Crowdsourcing kommentiert werden. Wir zeigen, dass dies Bias eliminiert und Varianz reduziert, indem Daten aus der 2015 TAC KBP-Aufgabe verwendet werden. Unser zweiter Beitrag ist eine Implementierung unserer Methode, die als Online-KBP-Bewertungsdienst öffentlich zugänglich gemacht wird. Wir testen den Service, indem wir verschiedene State-of-the-Art-Systeme auf dem Korpus TAC KBP 2016 testen und auf kostengünstige Weise genaue Scores erhalten.', 'hr': 'Sistemi stanovništva baze znanja (KBP) uzimaju veliki dokument korpus i izvlače entitate i njihove odnose. Do sada, procjena KBP se oslanjala na procjene o zajedničkim predviđanjima postojećih sustava. Pokazujemo da je ova procjena problematična: kada novi sustav predviđa prethodno nevidjenu vezu, kazni se čak i ako je ispravno. To vodi do značajne predrasude protiv novih sustava, koji kontraproduktivno ometa inovaciju na terenu. Naš prvi doprinos je nova procjena osnovana na uzorku važnosti koja ispravlja ovu pristrasnost annotirajući predviđanja novog sustava po zahtjevi putem crowdsourcing. Pokazujemo da eliminira pristrasnost i smanjuje varijanciju koristeći podatke iz zadatka TAC KBP 2015. Naš drugi doprinos je provedba naše metode javno dostupno kao online KBP procjene usluga. Pilotiramo uslugu testiranjem različitih stanja umjetnosti na TAC KBP 2016 korpusu i dobijamo precizne rezultate na koštani učinkovit način.', 'tr': 'Bilim sistemleri (KBP) uly bir sened korpusyny alýar we öz baglaýyşlaryny çykar. Şu wagt KBP çözümlenmesi bar sistemleriniň toplyk önümlerine ynanýardy. Biz bu çykyş problematik diýip görkezip otyrýarys: täze bir sistema öňünden görmän bir baglaýyşy öňünden geçirýän bolsa hem bu çykyş edildi. Bu täze sistemalar bilen täze sistemalara garşy örän wajyplygyna ýok edýär. Bu ýerde täzelikleri ýok edip ýok. Biziñ ilkinji täze täze täze möhüm hasaplamadyr. Bu durum üçin täze sistemiň talep edilen öngörümlerini çaklamak üçin täze täze täze täzeliklerdir. Biz bu durumy 2015-nji TAC KBP göretinden janlaýyşy ýitirýäris we üýtgeşikleri azaltýarys. Ikinji täsirimiz, halkara çykyş häsiýetimiz bolan KBP deňleme häsiýetimiz bolup geçirilýär. Biz häsiýeti TAC KBP 2016 korpusyndaky dürli möhüm sistemalary barlap testiň edip, we dürli sanlary etkinlik ýola mümkin edýäris.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای جمعیت بنیادی دانش (KBP) در یک قالب سند بزرگ می\u200cگیرند و entities and relations آنها را خارج می\u200cکنند. تا حالا، ارزیابی KBP بر قضاوت\u200cها بر پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای جمع سیستم\u200cهای موجود است. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که این ارزیابی مشکلی است: وقتی یک سیستم جدید ارتباطی پیش بینی می\u200cکند که پیش بینی نشده است، حتی اگر درست باشد، مجازات می\u200cشود. این باعث می\u200cشود به پیشرفت بزرگی در مقابل سیستم\u200cهای جدید، که با تغییر تولید تغییرات در زمینه را نابود می\u200cکند. اولین دسترسی ما یک ارزیابی جدید از نمونه\u200cهای مهمی است که برای این تغییرات درست می\u200cکند با توجه به پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای سیستم جدید بر روی درخواست از طریق سرمایه\u200cگذاری جمعیت. ما این را نشان می دهیم که تغییرات را از طریق داده ها از کار TAC KBP ۲۰۱۵ کاهش می دهد. دسترسی دوم ما یک عملکرد روش ما است که به طور عمومی به عنوان خدمت ارزیابی KBP آنلاین در دسترسی داده شده است. ما این خدمت را با آزمایش سیستم های مختلف موقعیت هنر در کورپوس TAC KBP ۲۰۰۶ خلبان می کنیم و به طریق مفید قیمت دریافت می کنیم.', 'sq': 'Sistemet e popullsisë bazë të njohurive (KBP) marrin një korpus të madh dokumenti dhe nxjerrin njësi dhe marrëdhëniet e tyre. Deri tani, vlerësimi i KBP ka mbështetur në gjykimet mbi parashikimet e bashkuara të sistemeve ekzistuese. We show that this evaluation is problematic: when a new system predicts a previously unseen relation, it is penalized even if it is correct.  This leads to significant bias against new systems, which counterproductively discourages innovation in the field.  Kontributi ynë i parë është një vlerësim i ri i bazuar në mbikqyrjen e rëndës is ë që korrekton për këtë paragjykim duke shënuar parashikimet e një sistemi të ri në kërkesë nëpërmjet crowdsourcing. Ne tregojmë se kjo eliminon paragjykimet dhe redukton variancën duke përdorur të dhënat nga detyra TAC KBP 2015. Kontributi ynë i dytë është një zbatim i metodës sonë të bërë publikisht në dispozicion si një shërbim i vlerësimit të KBP në internet. Ne pilotojmë shërbimin duke testuar sisteme të ndryshme të state-of-the-art në korpus TAC KBP 2016 dhe duke marrë rezultate të sakta në një mënyrë kosto-efektive.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa idadi ya maarifa (KBP) unachukua viungo vikubwa vya nyaraka na vitu vinavyotoa na mahusiano yao. Mpaka sasa, tathmini ya KBP imetegemea hukumu zinazohusu utabiri wa mifumo iliyopo. Tunaonyesha kwamba tathmini hizi ni tatizo: pale mfumo mpya unapotabiri uhusiano wa zamani usiofahamika, ni adhabu hata kama ni sahihi. Hii inapelekea upendeleo mkubwa dhidi ya mifumo mpya, ambazo kwa upande mwingine unazuia ubunifu wa msingi. Mchango wetu wa kwanza ni tathmini mpya inayotokana na umuhimu ambao unasahihisha kwa upendeleo huu kwa kutangaza utabiri wa mfumo mpya unaohitaji madai kupitia vyanzo vya umma. Tunaonyesha hii inaondoa upendeleo na kupunguza tofauti kwa kutumia taarifa kutoka kazi ya TAC KBP 2015. Mchango wetu wa pili ni utekelezaji wa mbinu zetu zilizotolewa hadharani kama huduma ya uchunguzi wa KBP mtandaoni. Tunaendesha huduma kwa kujaribu mifumo mbalimbali ya sanaa katika viungo vya TAC KBP 2016 na kupata vipimo sahihi kwa njia yenye ufanisi.', 'af': "Name Toe toe, Kb evaluasie het op oordelinge op die poolde voorskou van bestaande stelsels geloof. Ons wys dat hierdie evaluasie problematiek is: wanneer 'n nuwe stelsel voorskou 'n vorige ongesien verhouding, is dit gespesifiseer selfs as dit korrek is. Hierdie lei na betekende voorspoedige teen nuwe stelsels, wat kontrprodukteer inomasie in die veld afskakel. Ons eerste bydraai is 'n nuwe belangrikheid-sampling gebaseerde evaluering wat korrigeer vir hierdie voorskou deur 'n nuwe stelsel se voorskoue op-versoek te kennis deur crowdsourcing. Ons wys hierdie verwyder bias en verduur variasie met gebruik van data van die 2015 TAC Kb taak. Ons tweede bydraai is 'n implementering van ons metode wat openlik beskikbaar gemaak is as 'n online KBP evalueringsdiens. Ons pilot die diens deur verskeie state-of-the-art stelsels te probeer op die TAC Kbp 2016 korpus en beskikbaar aantal op 'n koste effektief manier te kry.", 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմնական բնակչության (ԿԲՊ) համակարգերը վերցնում են մի մեծ փաստաթղթի կորպոս և հանում են միավորներ և նրանց հարաբերություններ: Այս պահին, ԿԲՊ-ի գնահատումը հիմնված է գոյություն ունեցող համակարգերի համախմբված կանխատեսումների վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս գնահատումը խնդիր ունի. երբ նոր համակարգը կանխատեսում է նախկինում անտեսանելի հարաբերություն, այն դատապարտվում է նույնիսկ եթե ճիշտ է: Սա հանգեցնում է նշանակալի կողմնականության նոր համակարգերի դեմ, ինչը հակադրաբար արգելափակում է նորարարությունները այս ոլորտում: Մեր առաջին ներդրումը նոր կարևորության նմուշների ընդունման հիմնված գնահատականն է, որը ճիշտ է այս կողմնականության համար, նկարագրելով նոր համակարգի կանխատեսումները հարկադրության միջոցով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սա վերացնում է կողմնականությունը և նվազեցնում է տարբերությունը օգտագործելով 2015 թվականի ՏԱԿ ԿԲՊ խնդրի տվյալները: Մեր երկրորդ ներդրումը մեր մեթոդի կիրառումն է, որը հանրային հասանելի է որպես առցանց ՔԲՊ-ի գնահատման ծառայություն: Մենք փորձում ենք ծառայությունը ստուգելով տարբեր բարձրագույն համակարգեր 2016 թվականի ՏԱԿ ԿԲՊ կորպոսի վրա և ստանալով ճշգրիտ գնահատականորեն արդյունավետ գնահատականներով:', 'az': 'Bilim bazı nüfusu (KBP) sistemləri böyük bir döküm korpusu içində alır və nəticələrini və əlaqələrini çıxarır. Şimdiye qədər, KBP değerlendirməsi mövcuddur sistemlərin birləşdirilmiş tədbirlərə təvəkkül etmişdir. Biz bu değerlendirmə problematik olduğunu göstəririk: yeni sistem əvvəlcə görmədiyimiz bir bağlantı təmin edir, doğru olsa da cəzalandırılır. Bu, yeni sistemlərə qarşı çox möhkəm tədbir edir ki, bu sahədə yenilənmələri dəyişdirir. Bizim ilk qismətimiz yeni möhüm nümunələri ilə çəkilmək üçün düzəltmək üçün yeni sistemin tədbirlərini crowdsourcing vasitəsilə təsdiqləyib edir. Biz bunu göstəririk ki, 2015 TAC KBP işindən verilən məlumatları istifadə edir və variansını azaldırır. İkincisimiz həyatımız online KBP değerlendirmə hizməti olaraq yayınlaşdırılmış yolumuzun istifadəsidir. Təkcə KBP 2016 korpusu ilə müxtəlif vəziyyət sistemlərini imtahana çəkib düzgün nöqtələri istifadə edirik.', 'am': 'የእውቀት መቀመጫ ቁጥር (KBP) ስርዓቶች በታላቅ ሰነድ ኮፕስ እና አካባቢዎችን እና ግንኙነታቸውን የሚያወጣ ናቸው፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ የKBP ማስታወቂያ የአሁኑን ስርዓት ውይይት ላይ የተደገመ ፍርድ ነው፡፡ ይህ ማስታወቂያ የችግር መሆኑን እናሳያቸዋለን፤ አዲስ ስርዓት አስቀድሞ ያልታወቀ ግንኙነት ሲገለፅ እውነተኛ ቢሆን እንኳ ቢሆንም ቢቀጣ ይቀጣዋል፡፡ ይህም በአዲስ ስርዓቶች ላይ ብዙ ተቃውሞ ይሄዳል፣ በሜዳውም አዲስ ፍጥረትን ያቆርጣል፡፡ የመጀመሪያው አካባቢነታችን አዲስ አዲስ የስርዓት ውይይት በማድረግ የህዝብ ብዙኃን በመጠቀም አዲስ የስርዓት ውይይት የሚያሳውቅ አዲስ የውጤት ምሳሌ ነው፡፡ ይህንን የጥያቄን ጥያቄ እናሳየዋለን እና ከ2015 TAC KBP ስራ ዳታዎችን እናጎድልበታለን፡፡ ሁለተኛይቱ ድጋፍ የKBP አካላት ግልገሎት እንደሚገልጸው የሥርዓታችንን መጠቀም ነው፡፡ አገልግሎቱን በTAC KBP 2016 ካርፓስ በመፈተና በተለየ የዓላማ ሥርዓት ሥርዓት በመፈተን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': "জ্ঞানের বেসের জনসংখ্যা (কেবিপি) সিস্টেম বিশাল নথির কোর্পাস এবং বস্তুগুলো এবং তাদের সম্পর্ক বের করে আনে। এখন পর্যন্ত কেবিপি মূল্য বিচার বিভাগের উপর নির্ভর করেছে বিভাগের উপর। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই মূল্য সমস্যার ব্যাপার: যখন একটি নতুন সিস্টেম পূর্ববর্তী অদৃশ্য সম্পর্কের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে, তবুও এটা শাস্তি প এটি নতুন সিস্টেমের বিরুদ্ধে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈষম্যের কারণে যা ক্ষেত্রে আবিষ্কার বিরুদ্ধে বিরুদ্ধে বিরুদ Our first contribution is a new importance-sampling based evaluation which corrects for this bias by annotating a new system's predictions on-demand via crowdsourcing.  আমরা ২০১৫ সালের টাসি কেবিপি কাজ থেকে তথ্য ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রদর্শন করি। আমাদের দ্বিতীয় অবদান হচ্ছে একটি অনলাইন কেবিপি মূল্যায়ন সার্ভিস হিসেবে প্রকাশিত আমাদের পদ্ধতির বাস্তবায়ন। টাসি কেবিপি ২০১৬ সালের কোর্পাসে বিভিন্ন রাষ্ট্রের বিভিন্ন সিস্টেম পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা সেবা পাইলট করি এবং ব্যয়ের জন্য সঠি", 'ca': "Els sistemes de població de base de coneixements (KBP) agafen un gran corpus documental i extraeixen entitats i les seves relacions. Fins ara, l'evaluació de KBP s'ha basat en jutges sobre les prediccions agrupades dels sistemes existents. Mostrem que aquesta evaluació és problemàtica: quan un nou sistema prediu una relació previament invisible, es penalitza fins i tot si és correcte. This leads to significant bias against new systems, which counterproductively discourages innovation in the field.  La nostra primera contribució és una nova evaluació basada en la captació de mostres d'importància que corregeix aquest bias anotant les prediccions d'un nou sistema a demanda mitjançant crowdsourcing. Mostrem això elimina el bias i redueix la variança utilitzant les dades de la tasca TAC KBP del 2015. La segona contribució és una implementació del nostre mètode fet públicament disponible com a servei d'evaluació en línia de KBP. Pilotem el servei testant diversos sistemes d'última generació del corps TAC KBP 2016 i obtenint puntuacions exactes d'una manera cost-efectiva.", 'cs': 'Systémy populace znalostní báze (KBP) přijímají velký korpus dokumentů a extrahují entity a jejich vztahy. Hodnocení KBP se doposud opíralo o posouzení společných předpovědí stávajících systémů. Ukazujeme, že toto hodnocení je problematické: když nový systém předpovídá dříve neviděný vztah, je trestán, i když je správný. To vede k výraznému zaujatosti vůči novým systémům, což kontraproduktivně odrazuje inovace v této oblasti. Naším prvním příspěvkem je nové hodnocení založené na vzorkování důležitosti, které tuto zkreslenost opravuje anotováním predikcí nového systému na vyžádání prostřednictvím crowdsourcingu. Ukázali jsme, že to eliminuje předbiasy a snižuje rozptyl pomocí dat z úlohy 2015 TAC KBP. Druhým příspěvkem je implementace naší metody zpřístupněné veřejně jako online hodnotící služba KBP. Službu pilotujeme testováním nejmodernějších systémů na korpusu TAC KBP 2016 a získáváme přesné výsledky cenově efektivním způsobem.', 'bs': 'Sistemi stanovništva baze znanja (KBP) uzimaju veliki dokument korpus i izvlače entitate i njihove odnose. Do sada, procjena KBP se oslanjala na procjene o zajedničkim predviđanjima postojećih sustava. Pokazujemo da je ova procjena problematična: kada novi sistem predviđa prethodno nevidjenu vezu, kazna se čak i ako je tačno. To vodi do značajne predrasude protiv novih sustava, koji kontraproduktivno ometa inovaciju na terenu. Naš prvi doprinos je nova procjena bazirana na uzorku važnosti koja ispravlja ovu pristrasnost annotacijom predviđanja novog sistema na zahtjevu putem crowdsourcing. Pokazujemo da eliminiše pristrasnost i smanjuje varijanciju koristeći podatke iz zadatka TAC KBP 2015. Naš drugi doprinos je provedba naše metode koje je publicno dostupno kao online KBP procjene usluga. Mi pilotiramo uslugu testiranjem različitih stanja umjetnosti na korpusu TAC KBP 2016 i dobijemo precizne rezultate na koštani efikasni način.', 'fi': 'Knowledge Base Population (KBP) -järjestelmät keräävät suuren asiakirjakorpusen ja poimivat kokonaisuuksia ja niiden suhteita. Tähän mennessä KBP:n arviointi on perustunut arvioihin, jotka perustuvat olemassa olevien järjestelmien yhdistettyihin ennusteisiin. Osoitamme, että tämä arviointi on ongelmallinen: kun uusi järjestelmä ennustaa aiemmin näkymättömän suhteen, sitä rangaistaan, vaikka se olisi oikea. Tämä johtaa merkittäviin ennakkoluuloihin uusien järjestelmien suhteen, mikä vähentää alan innovointia haitallisesti. Ensimmäinen panostuksemme on uusi tärkeysjärjestykseen perustuva arviointi, joka korjaa tämän harhan merkitsemällä uuden järjestelmän ennusteita kysynnän mukaan joukkoistamisen kautta. Tämä poistaa vääristymät ja vähentää varianssia vuoden 2015 TAC KBP -tehtävän tietojen avulla. Toinen panoksemme on menetelmämme käyttöönotto, joka on julkisesti saatavilla KBP:n online-arviointipalveluna. Pilotoimme palvelua testaamalla erilaisia huippuluokan järjestelmiä TAC KBP 2016 -korpusella ja saamme tarkat pisteet kustannustehokkaasti.', 'et': 'Teadmistebaasi populatsiooni (KBP) süsteemid hõlmavad suurt dokumendikorpust ja ekstraheerivad üksusi ja nende suhteid. Seni on KBP hindamine tuginenud olemasolevate süsteemide koondatud prognoosidele. Näitame, et see hindamine on problemaatiline: kui uus süsteem ennustab varem nähtamatut suhet, karistatakse seda isegi siis, kui see on õige. See toob kaasa märkimisväärse erapooletuse uute süsteemide vastu, mis takistab innovatsiooni valdkonnas. Meie esimene panus on uus olulisusel põhinev valimipõhine hindamine, mis parandab seda eelarvamust, märkides uue süsteemi prognoose nõudmisel ühishankimise kaudu. Näitame, et see kõrvaldab erapooletuse ja vähendab dispersiooni 2015. aasta TAC KBP ülesande andmete abil. Meie teine panus on meie meetodi rakendamine, mis on avalikult kättesaadav KBP hindamisteenusena. Pilootime teenust, testides TAC KBP 2016 korpusel erinevaid kaasaegseid süsteeme ja saavutame täpsed hinded kulutõhusalt.', 'sk': 'Sistemi populacije zbirk znanja (KBP) vzamejo velik korpus dokumentov in izvlečejo subjekte in njihove odnose. Do zdaj se je ocena KBP opirala na presoje na združenih napovedih obstoječih sistemov. Pokazujemo, da je ta ocena problematična: ko nov sistem napoveduje prej nevidno razmerje, je kaznovan tudi če je pravilen. To vodi do znatne pristranskosti do novih sistemov, ki protiproduktivno odvračajo od inovacij na tem področju. Naš prvi prispevek je nova ocena na podlagi vzorčenja pomembnosti, ki popravi to pristranskost z označevanjem napovedi novega sistema na zahtevo prek množičnega sourcinga. To odpravlja pristranskost in zmanjšuje varianco s podatki iz opravila TAC KBP 2015. Drugi prispevek je uvedba naše metode, ki je javno dostopna kot spletna storitev za ocenjevanje KBP. Storitev pilotiramo s preizkušanjem različnih najsodobnejših sistemov na korpusu TAC KBP 2016 in na stroškovno učinkovit način pridobivamo točne ocene.', 'ha': "Systemi na'urar yawan jama'a na ilmi (KBP) sunã cikin wata takardar takardar aiki mai girma kuma sunã fitar da abubuwa da dangantarsu. Ga yanzu, evaluation na KBP yã dõgara a kan gareta masu basu'a bayani'ar da ke gaba. Muna nũna cewa wannan qiymati yana cikin matalauci: Idan wata na'ura na gaba wani shawara da ba'a sani ba, sai ya yi azãba kuma kõ da ya gaskata. Wannan yana ƙara wa'ura masu girma a kangara na'ura na'ura, don haka kuma yana tsuratar da tambuwa a cikin birnin. Bayanmu na farko, yana da tunkuɗe misãlai na muhimmi wanda ke daidaita zuwa wannan tabar-gaba, da ya sanar da bayani na'urar wani na'urar-tsari na sabo-daurin mutane. Tuna nũna wannan yana tafiyar da haske kuma yana ƙara variant da ake amfani da data daga aikin TAC KBP 2015. Bayanmu na ƙari da ba ta zama na amfani da metodenmu wanda aka samar da shi a bayani kamar wata huduma ta qiimar KBP. Yana tafiyar da shirin ayuka da za'a jarraba tsarin-halin-sanatarwa wa TAC KBP 2016 kuma za'a sami score masu inganci da kuma yana da matsayin mafiya amfani.", 'he': 'מערכות אוכלוסיית בסיס הידע (KBP) לוקחות את קורפוס מסמכים גדולים ומוציאות יחסים ומערכותיהם. Thus far, KBP evaluation has relied on judgements on the pooled predictions of existing systems.  אנו מראים שהעריכה הזו בעייתית: כאשר מערכת חדשה חושפה מערכת יחסים בלתי נראית קודם לכן, היא נענשת אפילו אם היא נכונה. זה מוביל למחיות משמעותיות נגד מערכות חדשות, אשר בניגוד לרעיון החדשות בשטח. התרומה הראשונה שלנו היא עריכה חדשה מבוססת על דגימות חשיבות שמתקנה עבור ההתמחות הזו על ידי הערות על חיזויים של מערכת חדשה על דרישה דרך crowdsourcing. אנחנו מראים את זה מחסל את ההתמחות ולפחות את ההתמחות באמצעות נתונים מהמשימה TAC KBP 2015. Our second contribution is an implementation of our method made publicly available as an online KBP evaluation service.  אנחנו מטיסים את השירות על ידי בדיקת מערכות מצוינות ביותר על הקורפוס TAC KBP 2016 ולקבל נקודות מדויקות באופן יעיל עלות.', 'bo': 'ཤེས་པའི་རིགས་ལྡན་གཞུང་གི་མི་འབོར་པ(KBP)དེ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་གཅིག་པུ་དང་ཁོ་ཚོའི་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ ད་ལྟ་མ་ཟད། KBP་རིག་དཔྱད་ནི་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་མཐོ་བསྡུས་པའི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱིས་གཏོང་རྟོགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པར་ལེན་འཇུག་སྟངས་འདི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅན་ཡོད་པ་ཤར་བ། མ་ལག་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་མ་ཤེས་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གི་ འདིས་མ་ལག་གསར་པ་ལ་གནད་གཤིས་འགྱུར་བའི་དབང་རྩའི་ནད་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྤྲོད་དང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་གལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བར་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་འདིར་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་བཏོན་གཏོང་བ་དང་འགྱུར་རིམ་འདྲ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གླེང་སྡུད་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིའི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་དྲ་རྒྱའི་KBP རྩིས ང་ཚོས་TAC KBP 2016 མཐུང་སྣེ་གསར་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་རེད།', 'jv': 'Daerah punika diangkat saben (kbP) sistem kuwi wis ana sakjane sakjane dumateng lan nganggo cah dumateng lan basa sing wis ana. Language Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi barêng-barêng. Sing sistem sing gak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan, dadi kapan kuwi ora bisa mbakdo. Ing iki lak ngelakop biasa anyar sistem sing gak buat, sing titimbal segala macem gak enyarno karo perusahaan anyar. Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke perusahaan dhéwé Monday Awak dhéwé tanggal sing dibutuhke nuné aplikasi ning perangkat sing ditambah nyeneng online Awak dhéwé pilot perusahaan ing nggawe sistem sing perusahaan-perusahaan karo hal-hal sing sampeyan ngono nggawe sawalik dhéwé, nik akeh sistem sing perusahaan karo perusahaan nyang liwat-sampeyan sing paling dhéwé.'}
{'en': 'PACRR : A Position-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'pt': 'PACRR: um modelo de IR neural com reconhecimento de posição para correspondência de relevância', 'fr': 'PACRR\xa0: un modèle infrarouge neuronal sensible à la position pour la correspondance de pertinence', 'es': 'PACRR: un modelo de IR neuronal consciente de la posición para la correspondencia de relevancia', 'ar': 'PACRR: نموذج الأشعة تحت الحمراء العصبية المدرك للموضع لمطابقة الصلة', 'zh': 'PACRR曰:以相关性配知神经IR', 'ru': 'PACRR: Позиционируемая нейронная ИК-модель для сопоставления релевантности', 'hi': 'PACRR: प्रासंगिकता मिलान के लिए एक स्थिति-जागरूक तंत्रिका आईआर मॉडल', 'ja': 'PACRR ：関連性マッチングのための位置認識神経IRモデル', 'ga': 'PACRR: Múnla IR Néarach Feasach ar Phost le haghaidh Meaitseáil Ábharthachta', 'ka': 'PACRR', 'el': 'Ένα Νευρικό μοντέλο υπέρυθρης ακτινοβολίας με επίγνωση θέσης για αντιστοίχιση σχετικότητας', 'hu': 'PACRR: Egy pozíciótudatos idegi IR modell a relevancia egyeztetéséhez', 'it': 'PACRR: Un modello IR neurale consapevole della posizione per la corrispondenza della pertinenza', 'lt': 'PACRR: Position-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'mk': 'ПАКР: Неурален модел за совпаѓање со релевантност кој е свесен за позицијата', 'kk': 'PACRR: Сәйкестік сәйкестігінің орналасуын байқау нейралы IR үлгісі', 'ms': 'PACRR: Model IR Neural Awal Kedudukan untuk Persamaan Relevansi', 'ml': 'PACRR: വിലാസപൂര്\u200dത്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്ഥിതി- അറിയുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d IR മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'PACRR: A Position-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'mn': 'PACRR: Хамааралтай холбоотой байрлалын мэдрэлийн IR загвар', 'pl': 'PACRR: Model neuronowego podczerwieni o świadomości pozycji dla dopasowania istotności', 'no': 'PACRR: Eit posisjonsvekk neurale IR- modell for tilsvaring', 'ro': 'PACRR: Un model IR neural conștient de poziție pentru potrivirea relevanței', 'sr': 'PACRR: Neuralni IR model pozornosti za odgovaranje povezanosti', 'si': 'PACRR: ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'PACRR: A Position-aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'sv': 'PACRR: En positionsmedveten neural IR-modell för relevansmatchning', 'ta': 'PACRR: A Position-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'ur': 'پاکرر: ایک موقعیت-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'vi': 'PAlương: mô hình thần kinh IR nhận vị trí cho kết quả liên quan.', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'PACRR: En positionsbevidst neural IR model til relevans matching', 'bg': 'Невроден инфрачервен модел за съвпадение на релевантността', 'hr': 'PACRR: Neuralni IR model pozornosti za odgovaranje povezanosti', 'nl': 'PACRR: Een Positiebewust Neural IR Model voor Relevantie Matching', 'de': 'PACRR: Ein positionsbewusstes neuronales IR-Modell für Relevanz Matching', 'id': 'PACRR: Model IR Neural Aware-Position for Relevance Matching', 'fa': 'PACRR: یک مدل عصبی IR برای هماهنگ نسبت به موقعیت آگاهی', 'sw': 'PACRR: Utawala wa IR wa msingi wa Kuhusiana na Matukio', 'tr': 'PACRR: Maýyklyglanma üçin ýerleşmek üçin bir näral IR nusgasy', 'sq': 'A Position-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'ko': 'PACRR: 일치하는 위치 감지 신경 적외선 모델', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'af': 'PACRR: A Position- Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Match', 'az': 'PACRR: İlişkinlik İşlənməsi üçün Position-Aware Neural IR Modeli', 'hy': 'ՊԱԿՌ. Պատկերացում գիտակցած նյարդային Ռ մոդել համապատասխանության համար', 'bs': 'PACRR: Neuralni IR model pozornosti za odgovaranje povezanosti', 'bn': 'প্যাক্রার: সংযোগ মিলের জন্য একটি অবস্থান- পরিচিত নিউরাল আইR মডেল', 'ca': 'PACRR: Un model IR neuronal conscient de posició', 'cs': 'PACRR: Neurální IR model pro odpovídání relevance', 'et': 'PACRR: Positsiooniteadlik neuraalne IR mudel asjakohasuse sobitamiseks', 'fi': 'PACRR: Position-Aware Neural IR Model for Relevance Matching', 'jv': 'PACIR: model Njuaral IR sing paling kelas-Awar', 'sk': 'PACRR: Živčni IR model, ki se zaveda položaja, za ujemanje pomembnosti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מודל IR נוירולי מודע לעמדה לתאמת רלוונטיות', 'bo': 'PACRR: མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གནས་ཡུལ་སྟོན་པའི་Neural IR རྣམ་གྲངས'}
{'en': 'In order to adopt deep learning for information retrieval, models are needed that can capture all relevant information required to assess the relevance of a document to a given user query. While previous works have successfully captured unigram term matches, how to fully employ position-dependent information such as proximity and term dependencies has been insufficiently explored. In this work, we propose a novel neural IR model named PACRR aiming at better modeling position-dependent interactions between a query and a document. Extensive experiments on six years’ TREC Web Track data confirm that the proposed model yields better results under multiple benchmarks.', 'ar': 'من أجل اعتماد التعلم العميق لاسترجاع المعلومات ، هناك حاجة إلى نماذج يمكنها التقاط جميع المعلومات ذات الصلة المطلوبة لتقييم مدى ملاءمة المستند لاستعلام مستخدم معين. في حين أن الأعمال السابقة نجحت في التقاط تطابق مصطلح unigram ، إلا أن كيفية استخدام المعلومات المعتمدة على الموضع بشكل كامل مثل القرب وتبعيات المصطلح لم يتم استكشافها بشكل كافٍ. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا للأشعة تحت الحمراء العصبية يسمى PACRR يهدف إلى نمذجة أفضل للتفاعلات المعتمدة على الموضع بين الاستعلام والمستند. تؤكد التجارب المكثفة على بيانات تتبع الويب TREC لمدة ست سنوات أن النموذج المقترح يعطي نتائج أفضل في ظل معايير متعددة.', 'fr': "Afin d'adopter le deep learning pour la récupération d'informations, des modèles capables de capturer toutes les informations pertinentes nécessaires pour évaluer la pertinence d'un document par rapport à une requête utilisateur donnée sont nécessaires. Alors que des travaux antérieurs ont réussi à saisir des correspondances de termes d'unigrammes, la façon d'utiliser pleinement les informations dépendantes du poste, telles que la proximité et les dépendances entre termes, n'a pas été suffisamment explorée. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un nouveau modèle IR neuronal appelé PACRR visant à mieux modéliser les interactions dépendantes de la position entre une requête et un document. Des expériences approfondies sur des données TREC Web Track de six ans confirment que le modèle proposé donne de meilleurs résultats avec de multiples points de référence.", 'pt': 'Para adotar o aprendizado profundo para recuperação de informações, são necessários modelos que possam capturar todas as informações relevantes necessárias para avaliar a relevância de um documento para uma determinada consulta do usuário. Embora trabalhos anteriores tenham capturado com sucesso correspondências de termos de unigrama, como empregar totalmente informações dependentes de posição, como proximidade e dependências de termos, não foi suficientemente explorado. Neste trabalho, propomos um novo modelo neural de IR chamado PACRR com o objetivo de modelar melhor as interações dependentes da posição entre uma consulta e um documento. Extensos experimentos em seis anos de dados do TREC Web Track confirmam que o modelo proposto produz melhores resultados em vários benchmarks.', 'es': 'Para adoptar el aprendizaje profundo para la recuperación de información, se necesitan modelos que puedan capturar toda la información relevante necesaria para evaluar la relevancia de un documento para una consulta de usuario determinada. Si bien trabajos anteriores han capturado con éxito las coincidencias de términos de unigramas, no se ha explorado suficientemente cómo emplear completamente la información dependiente de la posición, como la proximidad y las dependencias de términos. En este trabajo, proponemos un nuevo modelo de IR neuronal llamado PACRR con el objetivo de modelar mejor las interacciones dependientes de la posición entre una consulta y un documento. Los extensos experimentos sobre los datos de TREC Web Track de seis años confirman que el modelo propuesto produce mejores resultados en múltiples puntos de referencia.', 'zh': '以深学信息检索之,须得评估文档与给定用户相关性所须信息。 虽前事已获单字项匹,何以充位依赖性息,如邻性项依赖性,未尽其索。 于此之中,立PACRR新型神经IR形,指拟询文档之间。 六年TREC网络踪迹广证实验,所立模形,多所基准。', 'hi': 'सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति के लिए गहरी शिक्षा को अपनाने के लिए, मॉडल की आवश्यकता होती है जो किसी दिए गए उपयोगकर्ता क्वेरी के लिए दस्तावेज़ की प्रासंगिकता का आकलन करने के लिए आवश्यक सभी प्रासंगिक जानकारी को कैप्चर कर सकते हैं। जबकि पिछले कार्यों ने सफलतापूर्वक यूनिग्राम टर्म मैचों पर कब्जा कर लिया है, निकटता और शब्द निर्भरता जैसी स्थिति-निर्भर जानकारी को पूरी तरह से नियोजित करने के तरीके का अपर्याप्त रूप से पता लगाया गया है। इस काम में, हम PACRR नामक एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका आईआर मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य एक क्वेरी और दस्तावेज़ के बीच बेहतर मॉडलिंग स्थिति-निर्भर इंटरैक्शन है। छह साल के TREC वेब ट्रैक डेटा पर व्यापक प्रयोग इस बात की पुष्टि करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल कई बेंचमार्क के तहत बेहतर परिणाम देता है।', 'ja': '情報検索にディープラーニングを採用するためには、ドキュメントと特定のユーザークエリとの関連性を評価するために必要なすべての関連情報をキャプチャできるモデルが必要です。以前の研究では、単グラム項の一致をうまく捉えていましたが、近接性や項依存性などの位置依存情報を完全に利用する方法は不十分に探求されています。この研究では、クエリとドキュメントとの間の位置依存的相互作用のより良いモデリングを目指して、PACRRと名付けられた新規のニューラルIRモデルを提案します。6年間にわたるTREC Web Trackデータの広範な実験は、提案されたモデルが複数のベンチマークの下でより良い結果をもたらすことを確認しています。', 'ru': 'Для того чтобы внедрить глубокое обучение для поиска информации, необходимы модели, которые могут охватить всю соответствующую информацию, необходимую для оценки актуальности документа для данного запроса пользователя. В то время как предыдущие работы успешно фиксировали совпадения терминов в униграмме, вопрос о том, как в полной мере использовать информацию, зависящую от положения, такую как зависимости от близости и терминов, был изучен недостаточно. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую нейронную ИК-модель под названием PACRR, направленную на лучшее моделирование позиционно-зависимых взаимодействий между запросом и документом. Обширные эксперименты по шестилетним данным TREC Web Track подтверждают, что предлагаемая модель дает лучшие результаты по нескольким критериям.', 'ga': "D'fhonn foghlaim dhomhain a ghlacadh maidir le haisghabháil faisnéise, tá gá le samhlacha a fhéadfaidh an fhaisnéis ábhartha go léir a ghabháil a theastaíonn chun ábharthacht doiciméad d'fhiosrúchán úsáideora ar leith a mheas. Cé gur éirigh le hoibreacha roimhe seo meaitseáil téarma unigram a ghabháil, níor rinneadh dóthain iniúchta ar conas eolas a bhraitheann ar an bpost a úsáid go hiomlán, amhail gaireacht agus spleáchais téarma. San obair seo, molaimid samhail néar IR úr darb ainm PACRR a bheidh dírithe ar idirghníomhaíochtaí a bhraitheann ar shuíomh níos fearr a shamhaltú idir ceist agus doiciméad. Deimhníonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar shonraí sé bliana TREC Web Track go mbíonn torthaí níos fearr ar an tsamhail atá beartaithe faoi thagarmharcanna iolracha.", 'hu': 'Annak érdekében, hogy az információk lekérdezéséhez mélytanulást lehessen alkalmazni, olyan modellekre van szükség, amelyek minden olyan lényeges információt rögzítenek, amely egy dokumentum adott felhasználói lekérdezéshez szükséges relevanciájának felméréséhez szükséges. Míg a korábbi munkák sikeresen rögzítették az unigram kifejezések egyezését, nem vizsgálták meg elegendően, hogyan lehet teljes mértékben felhasználni a pozíciófüggő információkat, mint például a közelség és a kifejezések függőségeit. Ebben a munkában egy PACRR nevű neurális IR modellt javasolunk, amelynek célja a lekérdezés és a dokumentum közötti pozíciófüggő interakciók jobb modellezése. A hatéves TREC Web Track adatokon végzett kiterjedt kísérletek megerősítik, hogy a javasolt modell több referenciaérték mellett jobb eredményeket eredményez.', 'el': 'Προκειμένου να υιοθετηθεί η βαθιά μάθηση για την ανάκτηση πληροφοριών, απαιτούνται μοντέλα που μπορούν να συλλάβουν όλες τις σχετικές πληροφορίες που απαιτούνται για την αξιολόγηση της συνάφειας ενός εγγράφου με ένα συγκεκριμένο ερώτημα χρήστη. Ενώ προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν καταγράψει επιτυχώς αντιστοιχίσεις όρων μονογραμμάτων, ο τρόπος με τον οποίο μπορείτε να χρησιμοποιήσετε πλήρως πληροφορίες εξαρτώμενες από τη θέση, όπως η εγγύτητα και οι εξαρτήσεις όρων, δεν έχει διερευνηθεί επαρκώς. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό μοντέλο με το όνομα στοχεύοντας στην καλύτερη μοντελοποίηση αλληλεπιδράσεων μεταξύ ενός ερωτήματος και ενός εγγράφου που εξαρτώνται από τη θέση. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε εξαετή δεδομένα επιβεβαιώνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο αποδίδει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα κάτω από πολλαπλά κριτήρια αναφοράς.', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის მიღებისთვის ძალიან სწავლების მიღებად, მოდელები უნდა იყოს, რომლებიც შეუძლიათ ყველა შესაძლებელი ინფორმაცია, რომელიც შეუძლიათ გააკეთოთ, რომ დოკუმენტის თუმცა წინა სამუშაო მუშაო სუნიგრამის ტემისტის თანამდვილეობები წარმოადგენა, როგორ უფრო მუშაოდ გამოყენება ინფორმაციას, როგორც პროცენტის დასამხრებული ინ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პრომენტის ნეიროლური IR მოდელს PACRR სახელით, რომელიც უკეთესი მოდელურება პოზიციის განსახებული ინტერაქცია კითხვა და დოკუმენტის შორის. ექვსი წლის TREC Web Track მონაცემების განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები იტყვის, რომ მონაცემები მოდელის უკეთესი შედეგი მონაცემები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია', 'it': 'Per adottare il deep learning per il recupero delle informazioni, sono necessari modelli in grado di acquisire tutte le informazioni pertinenti necessarie per valutare la pertinenza di un documento per una determinata query utente. Mentre i lavori precedenti hanno catturato con successo le corrispondenze di termini unigram, come utilizzare pienamente informazioni dipendenti dalla posizione come prossimità e dipendenze di termini non è stato sufficientemente esplorato. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo modello IR neurale chiamato PACRR che mira a modellare meglio le interazioni position-dipendente tra una query e un documento. Esperimenti approfonditi sui dati TREC Web Track di sei anni confermano che il modello proposto offre risultati migliori sotto molteplici parametri di riferimento.', 'lt': 'Siekiant priimti išsamų mokymąsi informacijos gavimui, reikalingi modeliai, kuriais būtų galima surinkti visą reikiamą informaciją, reikalingą dokumento aktualumui konkrečiam vartotojo klausimui įvertinti. Nors ankstesniuose darbuose sėkmingai buvo surengti vienodų terminų deriniai, nepakankamai išnagrinėta, kaip visapusiškai naudoti nuo pozicijos priklausomą informaciją, pvz., artimumą ir terminų priklausomybę. Šiame darbe siūlome naują neurologinį IR model į PACRR, kuriuo siekiama geriau modeliuoti nuo padėties priklausomą klausimo ir dokumento sąveiką. Išsamūs šešerių metų TREC tinklavietės duomenų eksperimentai patvirtina, kad siūlomas modelis duoda geresnių rezultatų pagal kelis lyginamuosius rodiklius.', 'mk': 'За да се усвои длабоко учење за преземање информации, се потребни модели кои можат да ги заземат сите релевантни информации потребни за проценка на релевантноста на документот за одредено прашање на корисникот. И покрај тоа што претходните дела успешно ги зафатија униграмските термини, како целосно да се употребат позициски информации како што се близината и терминските зависности, не е доволно истражено. Во оваа работа предложуваме нов нервен ИР модел наречен ПАКР со цел подобро моделирање на позицијата зависни интеракции помеѓу прашањето и документот. Експериментите на шестгодишните податоци на ТРЕК Веб Трак потврдуваат дека предложениот модел дава подобри резултати под повеќето референтни оценки.', 'kk': 'Мәліметті алу үшін дұрыс оқыту үшін, келтірілген пайдаланушының сұраныстағы құжаттың маңыздылығын анықтау үшін барлық маңызды мәліметті алу үшін үлгілер керек. Алдыңғы жұмыстар униграмма терминінің сәйкестігін сәтті түсіндіріп тұрғанда, жақын тәуелдігі мен терминнің тәуелдігі сияқты мәліметтерді қалай толық қолдану мүмкін емес. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, PACRR деп аталатын романдық невралдық IR үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл сұраныс мен құжаттың арасындағы орналасуы тәуелді интерфейстерді жақсы моделдеу үшін. Алты жылдың TREC Веб- қадағалау деректерінің кеңейтілген тәжірибелері, келтірілген моделінің бірнеше параметрлерде жақсы нәтижелерді береді дегенді тексереді.', 'ms': 'Untuk mengadopsi pembelajaran dalam untuk mendapatkan maklumat, model diperlukan yang boleh menangkap semua maklumat berkaitan yang diperlukan untuk menilai relevansi dokumen kepada pertanyaan pengguna yang diberi. Sementara kerja terdahulu telah berjaya menangkap terma unigram sepadan, bagaimana untuk menggunakan sepenuhnya maklumat tergantung kedudukan seperti pendekatan dan dependensi terma belum cukup dikenaluri. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan model IR saraf baru bernama PACRR yang bertujuan untuk mendamalkan interaksi tergantung kedudukan yang lebih baik antara pertanyaan dan dokumen. Eksperimen panjang pada data Trek Web TREC enam tahun mengesahkan bahawa model yang diusulkan memberikan keputusan yang lebih baik di bawah benchmarks berbilang.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുവാന്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വിവരണത്തിന്റെ ആ മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലികള്\u200d യൂണിഗ്രാം മെയിന്\u200dറ് കളികള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചു പിടിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, സ്ഥാനത്തെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പൂര ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പാസ്സര്\u200d എന്ന പേരുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഐആര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദാന്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d മോഡലിങ് സ്ഥാ ആറു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളുടെ ട്രെയിസി വെബ് ട്രാക്ക് ഡാറ്റാ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തുന്നു, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മ', 'mt': 'Sabiex jiġi adottat tagħlim profond għall-ġbir tal-informazzjoni, huma meħtieġa mudelli li jistgħu jaqbdu l-informazzjoni rilevanti kollha meħtieġa biex tiġi vvalutata r-rilevanza ta’ dokument għal mistoqsija tal-utent partikolari. Filwaqt li xogħlijiet preċedenti qabdu b’suċċess tlaqqigħ tat-terminu unigrammu, kif tintuża kompletament informazzjoni dipendenti fuq il-pożizzjoni bħall-prossimità u d-dipendenzi fuq it-terminu ma ġietx esplorata biżżejjed. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ IR newrali msejjaħ PACRR bil-għan li jimmudellaw a ħjar interazzjonijiet dipendenti fuq il-pożizzjoni bejn mistoqsija u dokument. Esperimenti estensivi fuq dejta tat-TREC Web Track ta’ sitt snin jikkonfermaw li l-mudell propost jagħti riżultati aħjar taħt diversi punti ta’ riferiment.', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл авахын тулд гүн гүнзгий суралцах боломжтой болгохын тулд, хэрэглэгчдийн query-д баримт бичиг хэрэглэгчдийн хамааралтай байдлыг тодорхойлдохын тулд бүх хамааралтай мэдээллийг барих загвар Өмнөх ажлууд уникаграммын томъёог амжилттай баригдсан ч, яаж хамааралтай байр суурь мэдээллээс хамааралтай мэдээллийг хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэвэл ойролцоо, томъёог хамааралтай байдал нь хангалттай суд Энэ ажил дээр бид PACRR нэртэй шинэ мэдрэлийн IR загварын шинэ загварыг илүү загварчлах зорилго нь квадрат болон баримт хоорондын хамааралтай харилцаа холбоотой. 6 жилийн TREC Веб-трек өгөгдлийн маш олон туршилтууд санал өгсөн загвар нь олон салбарын доор илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргадаг гэдгийг тодорхойлдог.', 'no': 'For å godta dypt læring for informasjonshenting, treng modeller som kan henta alle relevant informasjon nødvendig for å vurdere viktigheten av eit dokument til eit gitt brukarspørjing. Mens tidlegare arbeidar har fått fullstendig treff på unigram-uttrykk, korleis det skal fullstendig bruka informasjon om posisjonsavhengig, slik som nærleiken og uttrykk avhengig, er ikkje tilstrekkeleg utforska. I denne arbeida foreslår vi eit nytruell IR-modell med namn PACRR som mål på bedre modellering av posisjonsavhengige interaksjonar mellom eit spørjing og eit dokument. Ekstra eksperimenter på seks år etter TREC- nettspordata stadfestar at den foreslåde modellen gjev bedre resultat under fleire benchmarker.', 'ro': 'Pentru a adopta învățarea profundă pentru recuperarea informațiilor, sunt necesare modele care să poată capta toate informațiile relevante necesare pentru a evalua relevanța unui document pentru o anumită interogare a utilizatorului. În timp ce lucrările anterioare au capturat cu succes potrivirile cu termeni unigrame, modul de a utiliza pe deplin informații dependente de poziție, cum ar fi proximitatea și dependențele de termeni nu a fost explorat suficient. În această lucrare, propunem un nou model IR neural numit PACRR care vizează o mai bună modelare a interacțiunilor dependente de poziție între o interogare și un document. Experimentele extinse pe datele TREC Web Track de șase ani confirmă faptul că modelul propus oferă rezultate mai bune în cadrul mai multor criterii de referință.', 'pl': 'Aby przyjąć głębokie uczenie się do pobierania informacji, potrzebne są modele, które mogą uchwycić wszystkie istotne informacje niezbędne do oceny znaczenia dokumentu dla danego zapytania użytkownika. Podczas gdy poprzednie prace pomyślnie przechwyciły dopasowania terminów unigramowych, sposób pełnego wykorzystania informacji zależnych od pozycji, takich jak bliskość i zależności terminów, nie został wystarczająco zbadany. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowy neuronowy model IR o nazwie PACRR mający na celu lepsze modelowanie interakcji zależnych od pozycji między zapytaniem a dokumentem. Obszerne eksperymenty na sześcioletnich danych TREC Web Track potwierdzają, że proponowany model przynosi lepsze wyniki w wielu punktach odniesienia.', 'sr': 'Da bi usvojili duboko učenje za prikupljanje informacija, potrebni su modeli koji mogu uhvatiti sve relevantne informacije potrebne za procjenu relevantnosti dokumenta na određeno pitanje korisnika. Iako su prethodni radovi uspešno uhvatili unigramne odgovore, kako da potpuno upotrebljavaju informacije ovisnike o poziciji poput bliskosti i terminalnih ovisnosti nisu dovoljno istražene. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi neuralni IR model koji se zove PACRR, cilj boljih modeliranja interakcija ovisnih o poziciji između pitanja i dokumenta. Eksperimenti na šestogodišnjim podacima TREC Web Track potvrđuju da predloženi model daje bolji rezultat pod višestrukim kriterijama.', 'si': 'තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, මොඩල් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඒකෙන් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයකට ලැබීම සම්බන්ධ තොරත මුලින් වැඩක් සමහරවිට යුනිග්\u200dරාම් වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට අල්ලගත්තොත්, කොහොමද ස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ විද මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ලිපිණියක් අතර හොඳ ස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර හොඳ ස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ ව අවුරුදු හයක් තියෙන තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අවුරුදු TREC Web Track දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'so': 'Si aad u qaadato waxbarasho aad u dheer oo aad u hesho helitaanka macluumaadka, waxaa loo baahan yahay tusaale, kuwaas oo qabsan kara macluumaad la xiriira oo dhan, si loo qiimeeyo muhiimka wargeyska wargeyska qoraalka isticmaalaha. Intii shaqadii hore ay ku liibaansadeen matchihii waqtiga unigram, sida si aan ugu filan loo baahan karo macluumaad ku xiran meel-dhigista, sida ku xiran xiliga iyo mudada ku xiran. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model neural IR oo la odhan jiray PACRR, kaas oo ku hagaya sameynta hagitaan meel-ku-xiran oo ku saabsan qoraal iyo dukumenti dhexdooda. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku qoran lix sano ee TREC data tracking waxaad xaqiijinaysaa in modelka la soo jeeday ay ay ka soo bixiso resulto ka wanaagsan oo ka hoosaysa bangiyo badan.', 'sv': 'För att införa djupinlärning för informationshämtning behövs modeller som kan fånga all relevant information som krävs för att bedöma relevansen av ett dokument för en viss användarfråga. Även om tidigare arbeten framgångsrikt har fångat unigram termmatchningar, har hur man fullt ut använder positionsberoende information som närhet och termberoenden inte undersökts tillräckligt. I detta arbete föreslår vi en ny neural IR-modell kallad PACRR som syftar till att bättre modellera positionsberoende interaktioner mellan en fråga och ett dokument. Omfattande experiment på sex års TREC Web Track-data bekräftar att den föreslagna modellen ger bättre resultat under flera riktmärken.', 'ta': "தகவல் மீட்டெடுப்பதற்கு ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொடு முந்தைய வேலைகள் வெற்றிகரமாக unigram term matches பிடித்துக் கொண்டிருக்கும் போது, நெருங்கி மற்றும் காலத்தின் சார்பு சார்ந்த தகவல் போன்ற நி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் PACRR பெயரிடப்பட்ட புதிய நெருக்கல் IR மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது சிறந்த மாதிரியான மாதிரியான மாதி Extensive experiments on six years' TREC Web Track data confirm that the proposed model yields better results under multiple benchmarks.", 'ur': 'اس لئے کہ معلومات پھیرنے کے لئے عمیق سیکھنے کے لئے مطالبہ کریں، موڈل کی ضرورت ہے جو تمام معاملات معلومات کو پکڑ سکتا ہے کہ ایک دفتر کے معاملات کو ایک معلومات کارساز کوئریہ کے لئے مطالبہ کرے۔ حالانکہ پہلے کے کام یونیگرام ٹریمیٹ مطابق مطابق پکڑے گئے ہیں، کیونکر مطابق موقعیت کے منتظر معلومات کا کامل استعمال کرنا ہے جیسے قریبی اور ٹریمیٹ منتظریت کے مطابق مطابق نہیں کی گئی ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک نور نئورل IR موڈل کی پیشنهاد کریں جس کا مطابق پاکرر کے نام سے بہتر موڈلینگ موقعیت-dependent اپنا اپنا اپنا معاملہ ہے۔ چھ سال کے تراک ویب ٹراک ڈیٹا پر اضافہ کی آزمائش تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل بہترین نتیجے ملتی ہیں', 'uz': 'Name Oldingi ishlar muvaffaqiyatli unigram term matchlarini qabul qilingan paytda, soʻzlik va muhim ishlatuvchilarga murojaat qiladigan maʼlumotni qanday ishlashtirish mumkin. In this work, we propose a novel neural IR model named PACRR aiming at better modeling position-dependent interactions between a query and a document.  Name', 'vi': 'Để thực hiện việc tìm kiếm thông tin sâu sắc, cần có những mẫu có thể thu thập tất cả thông tin cần thiết để đánh giá sự liên quan của tài liệu đối với một yêu cầu người dùng. Trong khi các công trình trước đã ghi thành công các khớp của kỳ hợp, chưa được tìm hiểu kỹ cách sử dụng đầy đủ các thông tin dựa vào vị trí như quan hệ gần gũi và hạn chế. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình hồng ngoại thần kinh mới tên là PAlương tâm nhằm hướng tới sự tương tác dựa vào vị trí giữa một câu hỏi và một tài liệu. Những thí nghiệm dài hạn trên sáu năm dữ liệu đường ray mạng (TREC) xác nhận rằng mô hình đã được đề nghị cung cấp kết quả tốt hơn dưới nhiều tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'За да се приеме задълбочено обучение за извличане на информация, са необходими модели, които могат да улавят цялата необходима информация, за да се оцени релевантността на даден документ към дадена потребителска заявка. Въпреки че предишните работи успешно улавят съвпадения с еднограмни термини, как да се използва напълно зависима от позицията информация като близост и зависимости от срокове не е достатъчно проучена. В тази работа предлагаме нов невронен инфрачервен модел, наречен с цел по-добро моделиране на зависимите от позицията взаимодействия между заявка и документ. Обширни експерименти с шестгодишни данни потвърждават, че предложеният модел дава по-добри резултати при множество показатели.', 'nl': 'Om deep learning voor informatieterugwinning te gebruiken, zijn modellen nodig die alle relevante informatie kunnen vastleggen die nodig is om de relevantie van een document voor een bepaalde gebruikersvraag te beoordelen. Hoewel eerdere werken met succes unigram term matches hebben vastgelegd, is onvoldoende onderzocht hoe positieafhankelijke informatie zoals nabijheid en termafhankelijkheden volledig kan worden gebruikt. In dit werk stellen we een nieuw neuraal IR model voor, genaamd PACRR, dat gericht is op het beter modelleren van positieafhankelijke interacties tussen een query en een document. Uitgebreide experimenten met zes jaar TREC Web Track gegevens bevestigen dat het voorgestelde model betere resultaten oplevert onder meerdere benchmarks.', 'hr': 'Kako bi se usvojilo duboko učenje za prikupljanje informacija, potrebni su modeli koji mogu uhvatiti sve relevantne informacije potrebne za procjenu relevantnosti dokumenta na određeno pitanje korisnika. Iako su prethodni radovi uspješno uhvatili odgovarajuće jednogram termina, kako se u potpunosti upotrebljavati informacije ovisnih o poziciji poput bliskosti i terminalne zavisnosti nisu dovoljno istražene. U ovom poslu predlažemo nov neuronski IR model po imenu PACRR koji cilja na bolje modeliranje interakcija ovisnog o poziciji između pitanja i dokumenta. Prošireni eksperimenti na podacima TREC-a o internetom praćenju šest godina potvrđuju da je predloženi model donio bolji rezultat pod višestrukim kriterijama.', 'da': 'For at indføre dyb læring til informationssøgning er der behov for modeller, der kan indsamle alle relevante oplysninger, der kræves for at vurdere relevansen af et dokument for en given brugerforespørgsel. Mens tidligere værker med succes har fanget unigram termmatches, er hvordan man fuldt ud anvender positionsafhængige oplysninger såsom nærhed og termafhængigheder ikke blevet tilstrækkeligt undersøgt. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny neural IR model kaldet PACRR, der sigter mod bedre modellering af positionsafhængige interaktioner mellem en forespørgsel og et dokument. Omfattende eksperimenter med seks års TREC Web Track data bekræfter, at den foreslåede model giver bedre resultater under flere benchmarks.', 'fa': 'برای پذیرفتن یادگیری عمیق برای پذیرش اطلاعات، مدلها نیاز دارند که می توانند تمام اطلاعات مربوط به ارزیابی مربوط به یک سوال کاربر داده باشند. در حالی که کارهای قبلی با موفقیت هماهنگ\u200cهای یونیگرام را گرفته\u200cاند، چگونه کاملاً از اطلاعات بستگی به موقعیت استفاده می\u200cکنند، مانند نزدیکی و بستگی\u200cهای term به اندازه کافی تحقیق نشده است. در این کار، ما یک مدل نوعی IR به نام PACRR پیشنهاد می کنیم که هدف دارد به بهترین تعاملات موقعیت بستگی به موقعیت بین یک سوال و یک سند باشد. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده در داده\u200cهای وب تراک شش سال تایید می\u200cکند که مدل پیشنهاد نتایج بهتری در زیر چندین برچسب\u200cهای زیادی می\u200cدهد.', 'id': 'Untuk mengadopsi belajar dalam untuk mendapatkan informasi, model diperlukan yang dapat menangkap semua informasi relevanti yang diperlukan untuk menilai relevansi dokumen untuk pertanyaan pengguna tertentu. Sementara pekerjaan sebelumnya telah berhasil menangkap persamaan istilah unigram, bagaimana untuk menggunakan sepenuhnya informasi tergantung posisi seperti kedekatan dan dependensi istilah belum cukup dikeksplorasi. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan model IR saraf yang baru bernama PACRR yang bertujuan untuk model lebih baik interaksi tergantung posisi antara pertanyaan dan dokumen. Eksperimen ekstensif pada data Trek Web TREC enam tahun mengkonfirmasi bahwa model yang diusulkan memberikan hasil yang lebih baik di bawah berbagai benchmark.', 'ko': '심도 있는 학습을 통해 정보 검색을 하기 위해서는 문서와 사용자 조회의 관련성을 평가하는 데 필요한 모든 관련 정보를 포착할 수 있는 모델이 필요하다.이전의 작업에서 단격어의 일치성을 성공적으로 포착했지만 위치 관련 정보, 예를 들어 인접성과 단어의 관련성을 어떻게 충분히 활용할 것인가는 아직 충분한 탐색을 얻지 못했다.이 작업에서 우리는 새로운 신경 IR 모델인 PACRR을 제기했는데 모델링 조회와 문서 간의 위치 관련 상호작용을 더욱 잘 하기 위한 것이다.6년간의 TREC 네트워크 추적 데이터에 대한 대량의 실험은 제시된 모델이 여러 기준에서 더욱 좋은 결과를 얻었다는 것을 증명했다.', 'tr': 'Maglumat almak 체챌in derin 철wrenmek 체챌in ullanmak 체챌in, ullan챌y soragy 체챌in bir senedi흫 n채hili m철h체m maglumatyny tapmak 체챌in nusgalary gerek. 횜흫ki 챌aplar 첵ene-de bir unigram termi me흫ze힊le첵채n bir 힊ekilde, 첵akynla힊yk we term ba휓lyklary 첵aly 첵eterlik 힊ekilde g철zlenmedi. Bu i힊de, biz PACRR adlanan t채ze bir nu첵ral IR modelini soragy we sened arasynda gowy modlenmek 체챌in teklip ed첵채ris. Alty 첵yly흫 TREC Web Trek maglumatynda 철r채n 챌arpy힊y teklip eden nusgany흫 birn채챌e benchmarklary흫 astynda has gowy netijesi gazandygyny tassykla첵ar.', 'sw': 'Ili kuchukua elimu ya kina kwa ajili ya upatikanaji wa taarifa, mifano inahitaji kupata taarifa zote zinazohitajika ili kutathmini umuhimu wa nyaraka kwa swali la mtumiaji. Wakati shughuli zilizopita zimekuwa na mafanikio ya mechi za ukomo wa kipindi cha kipindi hicho, jinsi ya kuajirisha taarifa zinazotegemea nafasi kama vile ukosefu wa karibu na kutegemea ukomo wa muhula umejadiliwa kutosha. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya kisasa ya IR yenye jina la PACRR kwa lengo la kutengeneza mazingira bora yanayotegemea katika utafiti na nyaraka. Majaribio mengi katika takwimu za Ufuatiliaji wa Mtandao wa TREC kwa miaka sita zinathibitisha kuwa mtindo huu unapendekezwa unatoa matokeo bora chini ya bendera nyingi.', 'af': "Om diep leer te aanvaar vir inligting ontvang, is modele benodig wat alle relevante inligting wat benodig is om die relevansie van 'n dokument na' n gegewe gebruiker navraag te besluit. Terwyl vorige werke suksesvol unigram term ooreenstemmende gevang het, hoe om posisie-afhanklike inligting volledig te gebruik soos proximity en term afhanklikhede te ondersoek is nie. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe neurale IR model genaamd PACRR wat doel om beter modeling van posisie-afhanklike interaksies tussen 'n navraag en 'n dokument te maak. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op ses jaar se TREC Web Snit data bevestig dat die voorgestelde model beter resultate verkry onder veelvuldige benchmarke.", 'de': 'Um Deep Learning für den Informationsabruf zu nutzen, werden Modelle benötigt, die alle relevanten Informationen erfassen können, die erforderlich sind, um die Relevanz eines Dokuments für eine bestimmte Benutzeranfrage zu bewerten. Während frühere Arbeiten erfolgreich Unigramm-Termübereinstimmungen erfasst haben, wurde bisher nicht ausreichend erforscht, wie positionsabhängige Informationen wie Nähe und Termabhängigkeiten vollständig genutzt werden können. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neuartiges neuronales IR-Modell namens PACRR vor, das auf eine bessere Modellierung positionsabhängiger Interaktionen zwischen einer Abfrage und einem Dokument abzielt. Umfangreiche Experimente mit sechs Jahren TREC Web Track Daten bestätigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell unter mehreren Benchmarks bessere Ergebnisse liefert.', 'am': 'ለመረጃ ማግኘት ጥልቅ ትምህርት ለመውሰድ፣ ሞዴላዎችን ለመያዝ የሚችሉትን የሰነዱን ጉዳይ ለመጠየቅ ለተሰጠው ተጠቃሚው ጠይቅ እንዲያስፈልጉ የሚችሉትን መረጃ ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራዎች የዩንግራም የሙሉ ተቃውሞ ሲያዙ፣ እንደቅርብ እና የጊዜው ተሟጋቾች እንዴት እንደሚጠቀሙ የመስመር ማህረቶችን እንዴት እንደሚያስፈልጉ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ በጠያቂው እና በሰነድ መካከል የሚታመን ግንኙነት በሚያሳየው የደረጃ የነጥብ የIR ሞዴል እና በመጠየቂያ እና የሰነድ ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልግ ነው፡፡ የስድስት ዓመታት TREC የዌብ መቅደሚያ ዳታዎች በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በብዙ benchmark በታች የበለጠ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያረጋግጥ ያረጋግጣል፡፡', 'sq': 'Me qëllim që të miratohet mësimi i thellë për marrjen e informacionit, janë të nevojshme modele që mund të kapin të gjitha informacionet e duhura për të vlerësuar rëndësinë e një dokumenti në një pyetje të caktuar të përdoruesit. Ndërsa punët e mëparshme kanë kapur me sukses ndeshjet e termave unigram, si të përdoret plotësisht informacioni i varur nga pozicioni të tillë si afërsia dhe varësia afatgjate nuk është eksploruar në mënyrë të mjaftueshme. In this work, we propose a novel neural IR model named PACRR aiming at better modeling position-dependent interactions between a query and a document.  Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në të dhënat e TREC Web Track të gjashtë vjetëve konfirmojnë se modeli i propozuar jep rezultate më të mira nën pika të shumta.', 'az': 'Malümatı almaq üçün derin öyrənmək üçün modellər lazımdır ki, bəzi istifadəçi soruşması üçün belə məlumatın məlumatını müəyyən etmək üçün bütün məlumatı alır. Əvvəlki işlər unigram termini uyğunlaşdırmağa müvəffəqiyyətli olaraq, yaxınlıq və term bağlılıqları kimi məlumatları tamamilə istifadə etmək kifayət qədər istifadə edilməmişdir. Bu işdə, PACRR adlı yeni nöral IR modeli təklif edirik ki, bir query və bir döküm arasında daha yaxşı modelləşdirmək məqsədilə mövzu bağlı interaksiyaları təklif edir. Altı il TREC Web Track verilənlərində geniş eksperimentlər təsdiqlədiyi modelin çoxlu benchmarklar altında daha yaxşı sonuçlar verir.', 'bn': 'তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য গভীর শিক্ষা গ্রহণ করার জন্য, মোডেলের প্রয়োজন যাতে প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য গ্রহণ করতে পারে একটি নির্দিষ্ট ব্যবহারকারীর পূর্ববর্তী কাজ সফলভাবে ইউনিগ্রাম মেয়াদের খেলা ধরা হয়েছে, কিভাবে পুরোপুরি অবস্থান-নির্ভরশীল তথ্য যেমন কাছাকাছি এবং মেয়াদের নির্ভর এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি পাসিআর নামের একটি নিউরেল আইআর মডেল, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে একটি অনুসন্ধান ও একটি নথির মধ্যে ভাল মডেলিং অবস্থান- ছয় বছরের ট্রাক ট্র্যাক ডাটাতে বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা নিশ্চিত করে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল অনেক বেনম্যাক্সের অধীনে ভাল ফলাফল প্রদা', 'hy': 'Ինֆորմացիայի վերադարձման համար խորը սովորելու համար անհրաժեշտ են մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են վերցնել բոլոր տեղեկությունները, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են փաստաթղթի կարևորության գնահատելու համար որոշ օգտագործողների հարցում: Մինչդեռ նախորդ աշխատանքները հաջողությամբ վերցրել են միագրամ տերմինների համապատասխանությունները, ինչպես լիովին օգտագործել դիրքի կախված տեղեկատվություն, ինչպիսիք են մոտավորությունը և տերմինային կախվածությունը, բավարար չափով ուսումնա Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր նյարդային ԻՌ մոդել, որը կոչվում է ՓԱԿՌ, որի նպատակն է ավելի լավ մոդելավորել դիրքի կախված փոխազդեցությունները հարցում և փաստաթղթի միջև: Վեց տարվա ՏՌԵՔ վեբ հետևի տվյալների ընդլայնված փորձարկումները հաստատում են, որ առաջարկած մոդելը ավելի լավ արդյունքներ է ստանում բազմաթիվ համեմատական նպատակների մեջ:', 'ca': "Per adonar-se d'aprenentatge profund per a obtenir informació, es necessiten models que puguin capturar tota la informació pertinentper avaluar la pertinencia d'un document a una consulta d'usuari dada. Mentre que treballs anteriors han capturat amb èxit coincidencies de termes unigram, la manera d'emplegar plenament informació dependent de la posició, com la proximitat i les dependencies de terme, s'ha explorat insuficientment. En aquest treball, proposem un nou model IR neuronal anomenat PACRR que vise a modelar millor les interaccions dependents de posició entre una consulta i un document. Els extensos experiments de sis anys de dades TREC Web Track confirmen que el model proposat produeix millors resultats sota múltiples punts de referència.", 'cs': 'Pro přijetí hlubokého učení pro vyhledávání informací jsou zapotřebí modely, které dokážou zachytit všechny relevantní informace potřebné k posouzení relevantnosti dokumentu pro daný uživatelský dotaz. Zatímco předchozí práce úspěšně zachytily unigramové shody termínů, jak plně využít informace závislé na poloze, jako jsou blízkost a termínové závislosti, nebylo dostatečně zkoumáno. V této práci navrhujeme nový neuronový IR model PACRR s cílem lépe modelovat interakce mezi dotazem a dokumentem závislé na poloze. Rozsáhlé experimenty na šestiletých údajích TREC Web Track potvrzují, že navrhovaný model přináší lepší výsledky při více referenčních hodnotách.', 'et': 'Sügavõppe kasutuselevõtmiseks teabe hankimiseks on vaja mudeleid, mis võimaldavad koguda asjakohast teavet, mis on vajalik dokumendi asjakohasuse hindamiseks antud kasutajapäringu jaoks. Kuigi varasemad tööd on edukalt tabanud ühegrammi terminite vasteid, ei ole piisavalt uuritud, kuidas täielikult kasutada positsioonist sõltuvat teavet, nagu lähedus ja terminisõltuvus. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue närvi IR mudeli nimega PACRR eesmärgiga paremini modelleerida positsioonist sõltuvaid interaktsioone päringu ja dokumendi vahel. Põhjalikud katsed kuueaastase TREC Web Track andmetega kinnitavad, et kavandatud mudel annab mitme võrdlusaluse alusel paremaid tulemusi.', 'bs': 'Da bi usvojili duboko učenje za prikupljanje informacija, potrebni su modeli koji mogu uhvatiti sve relevantne informacije potrebne za procjenu relevantnosti dokumenta na određeno pitanje korisnika. Iako su prethodni radovi uspješno uhvatili odgovarajuće jednogram termina, kako se u potpunosti upotrebljavati informacije ovisnih o poziciji poput bliskosti i terminalnih ovisnosti nisu dovoljno istražene. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi neuralni IR model po imenu PACRR koji cilja na bolje modeliranje interakcija ovisnosti o poziciji između pitanja i dokumenta. Prošireni eksperimenti na podacima TREC-a o internetom praćenju šest godina potvrđuju da predloženi model daje bolji rezultati pod višestrukim kriterijama.', 'fi': 'Syväoppimisen käyttöönotto tiedonhaussa edellyttää malleja, joilla voidaan kerätä kaikki olennaiset tiedot, joita tarvitaan asiakirjan merkityksellisyyden arvioimiseksi tiettyyn käyttäjäkyselyyn. Vaikka aikaisemmat teokset ovat onnistuneesti tallentaneet unigrammin termien vastaavuuksia, ei ole riittävästi tutkittu, miten täysin hyödyntää asemasta riippuvaa tietoa, kuten läheisyyttä ja termiriippuvuutta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta neuroinfrapunamallia nimeltä PACRR, jonka tavoitteena on mallintaa paremmin sijaintiriippuvaisia vuorovaikutuksia kyselyn ja asiakirjan välillä. Laajat kokeilut kuuden vuoden TREC Web Track -datalla vahvistavat, että ehdotettu malli tuottaa parempia tuloksia useilla vertailuarvoilla.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sampeyan ginar Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita supoyo model nêrasêl IR sing nêmên PACIR supoyo nggawe modêl sing luwih basa gambar kuwi wis dipatengan sing nêmêr terus kesempatan karo kesempatan lan dokumen. Ombudhakan ono wektu nggunggo data TRUE web track sing nggawe ngomongke tindakan model sing nyimpen dadi sing luwih apik bandakan', 'he': 'כדי לאמץ למידה עמוקה כדי להשיג מידע, דוגמנים נדרשים שיכולים לתפוס את כל מידע רלוונטי שנדרש כדי להעריך את הרלוונטיות של מסמך לשאול משתמש מסוים. While previous works have successfully captured unigram term matches, how to fully employ position-dependent information such as proximity and term dependencies has been insufficiently explored.  בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מודל IR עצבי חדש בשם PACRR המתכוון למדגם טוב יותר אינטראקציות תלויות במיקום בין שאלה למסמך. ניסויים רחבים על נתוני רשת TREC של שש שנים מאשר שהמודל המוצע מוביל תוצאות טובות יותר תחת מספר נקודות רמז.', 'ha': 'In order to adopt deep learning for information retrieval, models are needed that can capture all relevant information required to assess the relevance of a document to a given user query.  Waka da aikin da aka riga suka sami babban rabo na unigram-muhalli, an ƙididdige ka cika aikin baya ga ajir da masu inganci, kamar yadda an cire masu inganci ga matsayin kusantarwa da kuma ga muhimmanci ba da kuma ba an buƙata ba. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani motel na IR na takarda wata takarda na GNOME don ya yi amfani da yin amfani da masu motsi da ke ingancin interaction tsakanin wani tambayi da wata takarda. Fitarwa masu shimfiɗaɗãwa kan data na Track na TREC shekara 6, yana gaskata cewa shirin da aka buƙata, ya fitar da mafi alhẽri matsala a ƙarƙashin wasu bangon.', 'sk': 'Za sprejetje globokega učenja za pridobivanje informacij so potrebni modeli, ki lahko zajemajo vse pomembne informacije, potrebne za oceno ustreznosti dokumenta za določeno poizvedbo uporabnika. Čeprav so prejšnja dela uspešno zajela ujemanje enogramskih terminov, kako v celoti uporabiti informacije, odvisne od položaja, kot sta bližina in terminska odvisnost, ni bilo dovolj raziskano. V tem delu predlagamo nov nevronski IR model z imenom PACRR, katerega cilj je boljše modeliranje od položaja odvisnih interakcij med poizvedbo in dokumentom. Obsežni poskusi šestletnih podatkov TREC Web Track potrjujejo, da predlagani model prinaša boljše rezultate pri več referenčnih vrednostih.', 'bo': 'In order to adopt deep learning for information retrieval, models are needed that can capture all relevant information required to assess the relevance of a document to a given user query. སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་ཕན་ཚུན་བྲལ་བའི་ཚིག་རྩལ་འཛིན་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། ཇི་ལྟར་གནས་ཡུལ་རྟེན འོན་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་འདི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་སྒེར་གྱི་IR་རྣམ་གྲངས་མིང་PACRR་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཡུལ་རྟེན་དང་མཉམ རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་TREC དྲ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་སྟངས་བསྒྲགས་པའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚད་གཞི་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཀོད་ཡོད་པ། མ་དཔེ་ལྟ་བུའི་མིག་དཔེ་'}
{'en': 'Globally Normalized Reader', 'ar': 'قارئ عادي عالميًا', 'fr': "Lecteur normalisé à l'échelle mondiale", 'es': 'Lector normalizado globalmente', 'pt': 'Leitor globalmente normalizado', 'ja': 'グローバル標準化リーダー', 'zh': '一局规范化读取器', 'ru': 'Глобально нормализованный считыватель', 'hi': 'विश्व स्तर पर सामान्यीकृत रीडर', 'ga': 'Léitheoir Normalaithe Domhanda', 'ka': 'გლობალურად ნორმალიზებული კითხველი', 'hu': 'Globálisan normalizált olvasó', 'el': 'Καθολικά κανονικοποιημένος αναγνώστης', 'it': 'Lettore normalizzato a livello globale', 'lt': 'Globaliai normalizuotas skaitytojas', 'mk': 'Глобално нормализиран читател', 'kk': 'Жалпы қалыпты оқу', 'ms': 'Pembaca Normal Global', 'ml': 'ഗ്ലോബോളില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വായിക്കാരന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн нормал уншигч', 'mt': 'Qara Normalizzat Globalment', 'no': 'Globalt normalisert lesar', 'pl': 'Czytnik globalny znormalizowany', 'ro': 'Cititor normalizat la nivel mondial', 'sr': 'Globalno normalizirani čitač', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය කියවන්න', 'sv': 'Globalt normaliserad läsare', 'so': 'Horizontal Normalised', 'ta': 'பொதுவான சார்ந்த படிப்பான்', 'ur': 'گلوب طور پر عام ریڈر', 'uz': 'Oddiy oĘ»quvchi', 'vi': 'Bán giả toàn cục', 'bg': 'Глобално нормализиран четец', 'da': 'Globalt normaliseret læser', 'nl': 'Wereldwijd genormaliseerde lezer', 'hr': 'Globalno normalizirani čitač', 'id': 'Pembaca Normalisasi Global', 'de': 'Globaler normalisierter Reader', 'fa': 'خواننده\u200cی عادی جهانی', 'sw': 'Msomaji mwenye asili duniani', 'tr': 'Däpli Ullançy', 'af': 'Globaal Genormaliseerde Leser', 'sq': 'Lexues i Normalizuar Globalisht', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Qlobal Normal Okuyucu', 'bn': 'বিশ্বব্যাপী স্বাভাবিক পাঠক', 'bs': 'Globalno normalizirani čitač', 'ko': '전역 표준화 리더기', 'ca': 'Llegidor Normalitzat Globalment', 'cs': 'Globálně normalizovaná čtečka', 'et': 'Globaalselt normaliseeritud lugeja', 'fi': 'Maailmanlaajuisesti normalisoitu lukija', 'jv': 'Ngubah bener Normalisi', 'he': 'קורא נורמלי בעולם', 'sk': 'Globalno normaliziran bralnik', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་རུང་བའི་ལྟ་ཀློག་ཆས', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase'}
{'en': 'Rapid progress has been made towards question answering (QA) systems that can extract answers from text. Existing neural approaches make use of expensive bi-directional attention mechanisms or score all possible answer spans, limiting scalability. We propose instead to cast extractive QA as an iterative search problem : select the answer’s sentence, start word, and end word. This representation reduces the space of each search step and allows computation to be conditionally allocated to promising search paths. We show that globally normalizing the decision process and back-propagating through beam search makes this representation viable and learning efficient. We empirically demonstrate the benefits of this approach using our model, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), which achieves the second highest single model performance on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) and is 24.7x faster than bi-attention-flow. We also introduce a data-augmentation method to produce semantically valid examples by aligning named entities to a knowledge base and swapping them with new entities of the same type. This method improves the performance of all models considered in this work and is of independent interest for a variety of NLP tasks.', 'ar': 'تم إحراز تقدم سريع نحو أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) التي يمكنها استخراج الإجابات من النص. تستفيد الأساليب العصبية الحالية من آليات الانتباه ثنائية الاتجاه باهظة الثمن أو تسجل جميع نطاقات الإجابات الممكنة ، مما يحد من قابلية التوسع. نقترح بدلاً من ذلك اعتبار سؤال الجودة الاستخراجي مشكلة بحث تكرارية: حدد جملة الإجابة ، والكلمة الأولى ، والكلمة النهائية. يقلل هذا التمثيل من مساحة كل خطوة بحث ويسمح بتخصيص الحساب بشكل مشروط لمسارات بحث واعدة. نظهر أن تطبيع عملية اتخاذ القرار على الصعيد العالمي والانتشار الخلفي من خلال بحث الحزمة يجعل هذا التمثيل قابلاً للتطبيق والتعلم الفعال. لقد أظهرنا بشكل تجريبي فوائد هذا النهج باستخدام نموذجنا ، القارئ العادي عالميًا (GNR) ، الذي يحقق ثاني أعلى أداء للطراز الفردي في مجموعة بيانات الإجابة على الأسئلة في ستانفورد (68.4 EM ، 76.21 F1 dev) وهو أسرع بـ 24.7 مرة من الانتباه الثنائي -تدفق. نقدم أيضًا طريقة زيادة البيانات لإنتاج أمثلة صالحة لغويًا من خلال محاذاة الكيانات المسماة بقاعدة المعرفة وتبديلها بكيانات جديدة من نفس النوع. تعمل هذه الطريقة على تحسين أداء جميع النماذج التي تم النظر فيها في هذا العمل وهي ذات فائدة مستقلة لمجموعة متنوعة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية.', 'pt': 'Rápido progresso foi feito para sistemas de resposta a perguntas (QA) que podem extrair respostas do texto. As abordagens neurais existentes usam mecanismos caros de atenção bidirecional ou pontuam todos os intervalos de resposta possíveis, limitando a escalabilidade. Em vez disso, propomos lançar o controle de qualidade extrativo como um problema de busca iterativo: selecione a frase da resposta, a palavra inicial e a palavra final. Essa representação reduz o espaço de cada etapa de busca e permite que a computação seja alocada condicionalmente a caminhos de busca promissores. Mostramos que a normalização global do processo de decisão e a retropropagação por meio de busca de feixe torna essa representação viável e eficiente no aprendizado. Demonstramos empiricamente os benefícios dessa abordagem usando nosso modelo, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), que alcança o segundo maior desempenho de modelo único no conjunto de dados de resposta a perguntas de Stanford (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) e é 24,7 vezes mais rápido que bi-atenção -fluxo. Também introduzimos um método de aumento de dados para produzir exemplos semanticamente válidos, alinhando entidades nomeadas a uma base de conhecimento e trocando-as por novas entidades do mesmo tipo. Este método melhora o desempenho de todos os modelos considerados neste trabalho e é de interesse independente para uma variedade de tarefas de PNL.', 'fr': "Des progrès rapides ont été réalisés vers des systèmes de réponse aux questions (AQ) capables d'extraire des réponses à partir de texte. Les approches neuronales existantes utilisent des mécanismes d'attention bidirectionnels coûteux ou évaluent toutes les plages de réponse possibles, limitant ainsi l'évolutivité. Nous proposons plutôt de faire de l'assurance qualité extractive un problème de recherche itératif\xa0: sélectionnez la phrase, le mot de début et le mot de fin de la réponse. Cette représentation réduit l'espace de chaque étape de recherche et permet d'allouer conditionnellement le calcul à des chemins de recherche prometteurs. Nous montrons que la normalisation globale du processus de décision et la rétropropagation par recherche de faisceau rendent cette représentation viable et efficace pour l'apprentissage. Nous démontrons empiriquement les avantages de cette approche à l'aide de notre modèle, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), qui atteint la deuxième meilleure performance de modèle unique sur le jeu de données de réponse aux questions de Stanford (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) et est 24,7 fois plus rapide que le flux bi-attention. Nous introduisons également une méthode d'augmentation des données pour produire des exemples sémantiquement valides en alignant les entités nommées sur une base de connaissances et en les échangeant avec de nouvelles entités du même type. Cette méthode améliore les performances de tous les modèles considérés dans ce travail et présente un intérêt indépendant pour diverses tâches de PNL.", 'es': 'Se ha avanzado rápidamente hacia los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas (QA) que pueden extraer respuestas del texto. Los enfoques neuronales existentes utilizan costosos mecanismos de atención bidireccionales o califican todos los intervalos de respuesta posibles, lo que limita la escalabilidad. En cambio, proponemos convertir el control de calidad extractivo como un problema de búsqueda iterativa: seleccione la oración de la respuesta, la palabra inicial y la palabra final. Esta representación reduce el espacio de cada paso de búsqueda y permite que el cálculo se asigne condicionalmente a rutas de búsqueda prometedoras. Demostramos que la normalización global del proceso de decisión y la retropropagación a través de la búsqueda de haces hace que esta representación sea viable y el aprendizaje sea eficiente. Demostramos empíricamente los beneficios de este enfoque utilizando nuestro modelo, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), que logra el segundo rendimiento más alto de un solo modelo en el conjunto de datos de respuestas a preguntas de Stanford (68,4 EM, 76,21 desarrollo F1) y es 24,7 veces más rápido que el flujo de atención doble. También introducimos un método de aumento de datos para producir ejemplos semánticamente válidos alineando las entidades nombradas con una base de conocimientos e intercambiándolas con nuevas entidades del mismo tipo. Este método mejora el rendimiento de todos los modelos considerados en este trabajo y es de interés independiente para una variedad de tareas de PNL.', 'ja': 'テキストから答えを抽出できる質疑応答（ QA ）システムに向けて急速に進歩してきた。 既存のニューラルアプローチは、費用のかかる双方向の注意メカニズムを利用するか、可能なすべての回答スパンをスコアリングし、スケーラビリティを制限します。 代わりに、抽出QAを反復検索問題としてキャストすることを提案します。回答の文、開始単語、終了単語を選択します。 この表現は、各検索ステップのスペースを縮小し、計算を有望な検索パスに条件付きで割り当てることを可能にする。 私たちは、意思決定プロセスをグローバルに正規化し、ビーム検索を通じて逆伝播することで、この表現が実行可能で学習効率が高まることを示しています。 私たちは、このアプローチの利点を実証的に実証しています。このアプローチは、スタンフォードの質問回答データセット（ 68.4 EM、76.21 F 1 dev ）で2番目に高い単一モデルのパフォーマンスを達成し、バイアテンションフローよりも24.7倍速い、グローバル標準化リーダー（ GNR ）というモデルを使用しています。 また、データ拡張法を導入し、名前付きエンティティをナレッジベースに整列させ、同じタイプの新しいエンティティとスワップすることで、意味的に有効な例を生成します。 この方法は、この作業で検討されたすべてのモデルのパフォーマンスを向上させ、様々なNLPタスクに対して独立した関心を持っています。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) प्रणालियों की दिशा में तेजी से प्रगति की गई है जो पाठ से उत्तर निकाल सकते हैं। मौजूदा तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण महंगे द्वि-दिशात्मक ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग करते हैं या सभी संभव उत्तर स्पैन को स्कोर करते हैं, स्केलेबिलिटी को सीमित करते हैं। हम इसके बजाय एक पुनरावर्ती खोज समस्या के रूप में एक्सट्रैक्टिव क्यूए कास्ट करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: उत्तर के वाक्य का चयन करें, शब्द शुरू करें, और शब्द समाप्त करें। यह प्रतिनिधित्व प्रत्येक खोज चरण के स्थान को कम करता है और गणना को सशर्त रूप से आशाजनक खोज पथों के लिए आवंटित करने की अनुमति देता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि विश्व स्तर पर निर्णय प्रक्रिया को सामान्य बनाना और बीम खोज के माध्यम से बैक-प्रोपेगेटिंग इस प्रतिनिधित्व को व्यवहार्य और सीखने को कुशल बनाता है। हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से हमारे मॉडल, विश्व स्तर पर सामान्यीकृत रीडर (जीएनआर) का उपयोग करके इस दृष्टिकोण के लाभों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जो स्टैनफोर्ड प्रश्न उत्तर डेटासेट (68.4 ईएम, 76.21 एफ 1 देव) पर दूसरा उच्चतम एकल मॉडल प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है और द्वि-ध्यान-प्रवाह की तुलना में 24.7x तेज है। हम एक डेटा-संवर्धन विधि भी पेश करते हैं ताकि नामित संस्थाओं को एक ज्ञान आधार पर संरेखित करके और उन्हें एक ही प्रकार की नई संस्थाओं के साथ स्वैप करके शब्दार्थ रूप से मान्य उदाहरण ों का उत्पादन किया जा सके। यह विधि इस काम में विचार किए गए सभी मॉडलों के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करती है और विभिन्न प्रकार के एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए स्वतंत्र रुचि की है।', 'zh': '取对案于文本(QA)系统速进。 今神经用昂贵者双向注意机宜跨度评分之,以限可扩展性。 反是,请以提取性 QA 为迭代索:择对案之句、起词、终词。 减其步骤之间,许以计分给有望之路。 吾言全局规范化决策而波束索而反传之,使可行而学高效。 用我全局规范化阅读器(GNR)验此法之利,当于斯坦福问答数集(68.4 EM,76.21 F1 dev)上得第二高之单模,且倍于双注意力流24.7。 引入一法,因名与知识库齐而易之以语义示例。 此所以重其所以然者,而独立于百NLP也。', 'ru': 'Был достигнут быстрый прогресс в создании систем ответов на вопросы (QA), которые могут извлекать ответы из текста. Существующие нейронные подходы используют дорогостоящие двунаправленные механизмы внимания или оценивают все возможные диапазоны ответов, ограничивая масштабируемость. Вместо этого мы предлагаем отобразить экстрактивный QA как итеративную задачу поиска: выбрать предложение ответа, начальное слово и конечное слово. Это представление уменьшает пространство каждого шага поиска и позволяет условно распределить вычисления для перспективных путей поиска. Мы показываем, что глобальная нормализация процесса принятия решений и обратное распространение через поиск луча делает это представление жизнеспособным и эффективным для обучения. Мы эмпирически демонстрируем преимущества этого подхода, используя нашу модель, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), которая достигает второй наивысшей производительности одиночной модели в наборе данных для ответа на вопросы Стэнфордского университета (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) и в 24,7 раза быстрее, чем bi-attention-flow. Мы также вводим метод увеличения данных для получения семантически достоверных примеров путем выравнивания именованных сущностей к базе знаний и замены их новыми сущностями того же типа. Данный метод повышает производительность всех моделей, рассматриваемых в данной работе, и представляет независимый интерес для множества задач NLP.', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn tapa déanta i dtreo córais freagartha ceisteanna (QA) ar féidir freagraí a bhaint as téacs. Úsáideann cur chuige néarúil atá ann cheana meicníochtaí airde déthreocha costasacha nó scórálann siad gach réimse freagraí féideartha, rud a chuireann teorainn le hinscálaitheacht. Molaimid ina ionad sin QA eastóscach a chaitheamh mar fhadhb cuardaigh atriallach: roghnaigh abairt an fhreagra, an focal tosaigh agus an focal deiridh. Laghdaíonn an léiriú seo spás gach céim chuardaigh agus ceadaítear ríomh a leithdháileadh go coinníollach ar bhealaí cuardaigh geallta. Léirímid go bhfuil an léiriú seo inmharthana agus éifeachtach ó thaobh foghlama de de bharr normalú an phróisis chinnidh ar fud an domhain agus ais-iomadú trí chuardaigh bíomaí. Léirímid go heimpíreach na buntáistí a bhaineann leis an gcur chuige seo ag baint úsáide as ár múnla, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), a ghnóthaíonn an dara feidhmíocht samhail aonair is airde ar Thacar Sonraí Freagraí Ceist Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) agus atá 24.7x níos tapúla ná mar a dhéantar bith-aire. -sreabhadh. Tugaimid isteach freisin modh méadaithe sonraí chun samplaí bailí séimeantacha a tháirgeadh trí eintitis ainmnithe a ailíniú le bonn eolais agus iad a mhalartú le haonáin nua den chineál céanna. Feabhsaíonn an modh seo feidhmíocht na múnlaí go léir a bhreathnaítear orthu san obair seo agus is díol spéise neamhspleách é do thascanna éagsúla NLP.', 'ka': 'ტექსტიდან პასუხების გამოყენება (QA) სისტემისთვის წინასწარმოდგენა. Existing neural approaches make use of expensive two-directional attention mechanisms or score all possible answers spans, limiting scalability. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ გავაგრძელოთ ექსტრაქტიური QA როგორც ინტერეტიური ძიება პრობლემა: გაირჩიეთ პასუხის სიტყვა, დავიწყება სიტყვა და დასრულება ეს გამოსახულება ყველა ძიება მონაცემების სივრცე და შესაძლებელია, რომ კომპუტიკაცია შესაძლებელად გადავყენება საძიება მონაცემებისთვის. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ გლობალურად პროცესის ნორმალურად გადაწყვება და გამოწყვება სინამდვილეების შესაძლებლობით ეს გამოყენება უფრო ცხოვრებად და სწავლებ ჩვენ ემპერიკურად გამოყენებთ ჩვენი მოდელის, გლობალურად ნორმალიზებული კითხველი (GNR), რომელიც სტანფორდის მეორე უკეთესი ერთადერთი მოდელის გამოსახულება მონაცემების განსახულებაზე (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) და 24.7x უფრო სიჩქარე, ვიდრე ჩვენ ასევე მონაცემების აგეგენტირება მეტი, რომელიც სემონტიკურად მუშაობელი მაგალითების შემდეგ გამოყენება, რომელიც სახელი იგივე ტიპის ახალი ინტერტიებით გადავიცვლებთ. ამ პროცემის შესაძლებელობა ყველა მოდელს, რომელიც ამ სამუშაოში აღმოჩნდება და იყო განსაზღვრებული ინტერესტი NLP სამუშაოდ.', 'hu': 'Gyors előrelépés történt a kérdésre válaszoló rendszerek felé, amelyek képesek válaszokat kivonni a szövegből. A meglévő neurális megközelítések drága, kétirányú figyelem mechanizmusokat használnak, vagy pontoznak minden lehetséges választartományt, korlátozva a skálázhatóságot. Ehelyett azt javasoljuk, hogy az extraktív QA-t iteratív keresési problémáként használjuk: válasszuk ki a válasz mondatát, kezdőszót és végszót. Ez az ábrázolás csökkenti az egyes keresési lépések területét, és lehetővé teszi a számítások feltételes hozzárendelését ígéretes keresési útvonalakhoz. Megmutatjuk, hogy a döntési folyamat globális normalizálása és a sugárkeresés révén történő visszaterjedés ezt a reprezentációt életképes és hatékony tanulással teszi lehetővé. Ennek a megközelítésnek az előnyeit empirikusan bemutatjuk a Globally Normalized Reader (GNR) modellünk segítségével, amely a második legnagyobb egyedi modell teljesítményt éri el a Stanford Question Válaszoló Adatkészleten (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev), és 24,7-szer gyorsabb, mint a kettős figyelem-áramlás. Bevezetünk egy adatbővítési módszert is, amelynek segítségével szemantikailag érvényes példákat állítunk elő a nevezett entitások tudásbázishoz igazításával és új, azonos típusú entitásokkal történő cseréjével. Ez a módszer javítja az ebben a munkában figyelembe vett összes modell teljesítményét, és független érdeklődést számít a különböző NLP feladatok számára.', 'el': "Έχει σημειωθεί ταχεία πρόοδος προς τα συστήματα απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA), τα οποία μπορούν να εξάγουν απαντήσεις από κείμενο. Οι υπάρχουσες νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις χρησιμοποιούν ακριβούς αμφίδρομους μηχανισμούς προσοχής ή σκοράρουν όλα τα πιθανά διαστήματα απάντησης, περιορίζοντας την επεκτασιμότητα. Προτείνουμε αντ' αυτού να θέσουμε την αποσπαστική ερώτηση ως επαναλαμβανόμενο πρόβλημα αναζήτησης: επιλέξτε την πρόταση της απάντησης, τη λέξη έναρξης και τη λέξη τέλους. Αυτή η αναπαράσταση μειώνει το χώρο κάθε βήμα αναζήτησης και επιτρέπει τον υπολογισμό να κατανεμηθεί υπό όρους σε πολλά υποσχόμενες διαδρομές αναζήτησης. Δείχνουμε ότι η παγκόσμια ομαλοποίηση της διαδικασίας λήψης αποφάσεων και η αναδρομή μέσω της αναζήτησης ακτίνων καθιστά αυτή την αναπαράσταση βιώσιμη και αποδοτική. Επιδεικνύουμε εμπειρικά τα οφέλη αυτής της προσέγγισης χρησιμοποιώντας το μοντέλο μας, το οποίο επιτυγχάνει τη δεύτερη υψηλότερη απόδοση ενός μοντέλου στο σύνολο δεδομένων απάντησης ερωτήσεων του Στάνφορντ (68.4 και 76.21 και είναι 24.7ταχύτερη από τη ροή διπλής προσοχής. Επίσης εισάγουμε μια μέθοδο αύξησης δεδομένων για την παραγωγή σημασιολογικά έγκυρων παραδειγμάτων ευθυγραμμίζοντας ονομαστικές οντότητες σε μια βάση γνώσης και ανταλλάσσοντας τις με νέες οντότητες του ίδιου τύπου. Αυτή η μέθοδος βελτιώνει την απόδοση όλων των μοντέλων που εξετάζονται σε αυτή την εργασία και είναι ανεξάρτητου ενδιαφέροντος για μια ποικιλία εργασιών NLP.", 'it': "Sono stati compiuti rapidi progressi verso sistemi di risposta alle domande (QA) in grado di estrarre risposte dal testo. Gli approcci neurali esistenti utilizzano costosi meccanismi di attenzione bidirezionali o segnano tutte le possibili risposte, limitando la scalabilità. Proponiamo invece di lanciare QA estrattivo come problema di ricerca iterativo: selezionare la frase della risposta, la parola iniziale e la parola finale. Questa rappresentazione riduce lo spazio di ogni passaggio di ricerca e consente di assegnare il calcolo condizionalmente a percorsi di ricerca promettenti. Dimostriamo che normalizzare globalmente il processo decisionale e la retropropagazione attraverso la ricerca del fascio rende questa rappresentazione praticabile ed efficiente l'apprendimento. Dimostriamo empiricamente i vantaggi di questo approccio utilizzando il nostro modello Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), che raggiunge le prestazioni del secondo modello singolo più elevate nel set di dati di risposta alle domande di Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) ed è 24,7 volte più veloce del flusso bi-attenzione. Introducemo anche un metodo di data-augmentation per produrre esempi semanticamente validi allineando entità nominate a una base di conoscenza e scambiandole con nuove entità dello stesso tipo. Questo metodo migliora le prestazioni di tutti i modelli considerati in questo lavoro ed è di interesse indipendente per una varietà di compiti PNL.", 'mk': 'Брз напредок е постигнат кон системите за одговори на прашања (QA) кои можат да извлечат одговори од текстот. Постојаните нервни пристапи користат скапи двоупотребни механизми на внимание или ги оценуваат сите можни одговори, ограничувајќи ја скалабилноста. Наместо тоа предложуваме да се фрли извлекувачки QA како проблем со итеративно пребарување: изберете ја реченицата на одговорот, почетниот збор и крајот на зборот. Оваа претстава го намалува просторот на секој чекор на пребарување и овозможува пресметките да бидат условно доделени на ветувачките патишта на пребарување. Ние покажуваме дека глобалната нормализација на процесот на одлука и повторно пропагација преку пребарување по зрак ја прави оваа претстава остварлива и ефикасна. Емпирички ги демонстрираме бенефициите од овој пристап користејќи го нашиот модел, Глобално нормализиран читач (ГНР), кој ја постигнува втората највисока перформанса на еден модел на Стенфорд Dataset за одговори на прашањата (68,4 ЕМ, 76,21 Ф1 dev) и е 24,7x побрз од двојно внимание. Ние, исто така, воведуваме метод за зголемување на податоците за да произведуваме семантички валидни примери со прилагодување на именуваните ентитети на базата на знаење и замена со нови ентитети од истиот тип. Овој метод ја подобрува перформансата на сите модели кои се разгледуваат во оваа работа и е независен интерес за различни задачи на НЛП.', 'lt': 'Greita pažanga padaryta sprendžiant klausimų atsakymo sistemas, kurios gali gauti atsakymus iš teksto. Esami neurologiniai metodai naudojasi brangiais dvikryptiniais dėmesio mechanizmais arba vertina visus galimus atsako intervalus, ribojant skalingumą. Vietoj to siūlome paminėti ekstraktyvų QA kaip pakartotinę paieškos problem ą: pasirinkite atsakymo sakinį, pradinį žodį ir galutinį žodį. Šis paveikslas sumažina kiekvieno paieškos etapo erdvę ir leidžia skaičiavimus sąlygiškai paskirstyti žadančioms paieškos kelioms. Mes parodome, kad visuotinis sprendimų priėmimo proceso normalizavimas ir atgalinis dauginimasis per šviesos paiešką daro šį atstovavimą perspektyvų ir veiksmingą mokymąsi. Empiriškai įrodome šio metodo naudą naudojant mūsų model į „Globaliai normalizuotas skaitytojas“ (GNR), kuris pasiekia antrą aukščiausią vieno modelio rezultatą Stanfordo atsakymų į klausimus duomenų rinkinyje (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev.) ir yra 24,7x greitesnis nei dviejų dėmesio srautas. Taip pat įvedame duomenų didinimo metodą, kuriuo siekiama pateikti semantiškai pagrįstus pavyzdžius, suderindami pavadintus subjektus su žinių baze ir juos keičiant su naujomis tokio paties tipo subjektais. Šis metodas gerina visų modelių, kurie svarstomi šiame darbe, veiksmingumą ir yra nepriklausomai suinteresuotas įvairiomis NLP užduotimis.', 'kk': 'Жауаптарды мәтіннен шығару мүмкін сұрақ жауап беру (QA) жүйелеріне жылдам бар. Бар невралдық жағдайлары екі бағытты қарау механизмтерін қолданып, немесе барлық жауаптарды шектеу мүмкіндігін шектеу мүмкіндігін есептеп береді. Біз оның орнына QA- ды қайталау мәселесі ретінде жіберу үшін таңдаймыз: жауаптың сөзді, бастау сөзді және аяқтау сөзді таңдаңыз. Бұл таңдау әрбір іздеу қадамысының бос орын азайтады және есептеу жолдарына шарт бөліктеу мүмкіндігін береді. Біз шешім процесін жалпы түрде нормализациялау және қайта жұмыс іздеу арқылы қайта жұмыс істеу үшін бұл кескіндікті жақсы және оқыту мүмкін болады. Біз бұл тәртібінің үлгімізді, Глобалдық нормализацияланған оқушы (GNR) қолданып, Станфорд сұрақтарының жауап беру деректерінің екінші жоғары үлгісін жеткіземіз (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) және 24,7x екіншіден жылдам. Сонымен қатар, біз деректерді көптеу әдісін білім негізіне теңдеп, бір түрінің жаңа нысандарымен ауыстыру үшін семантикалық дұрыс мәселелерді жасап береміз. Бұл әдіс осы жұмыстың барлық үлгілерін жақсарту және әртүрлі NLP тапсырмаларының тәуелсіздігін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Kemajuan cepat telah dilakukan ke arah sistem menjawab soalan (QA) yang boleh mengekstrak jawapan dari teks. pendekatan saraf yang wujud menggunakan mekanisme perhatian dua arah yang mahal atau skor semua jangkauan jawapan yang mungkin, membatasi skalabiliti. Kami cadangkan untuk melemparkan QA ekstraktif sebagai masalah gelintar berulang: pilih kalimat jawapan, perkataan permulaan, dan perkataan akhir. Perwakilan ini mengurangkan ruang setiap langkah gelintar dan membenarkan pengiraan untuk dialokasi secara bersyarat ke laluan gelintar yang berjanji. Kami menunjukkan bahawa secara global normalisasi proses keputusan dan penyebaran-balik melalui carian cahaya menjadikan perwakilan ini hidup dan mempelajari efisien. Kami secara empirik menunjukkan keuntungan pendekatan ini menggunakan model kami, Pembaca Normal Global (GNR), yang mencapai prestasi model tunggal kedua tertinggi di Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) dan 24.7x lebih cepat daripada aliran-perhatian-dua. Kami juga memperkenalkan kaedah peningkatan data untuk menghasilkan contoh yang sah secara semantik dengan menyesuaikan entiti bernama ke pangkalan pengetahuan dan menukarnya dengan entiti baru jenis yang sama. Kaedah ini memperbaiki prestasi semua model yang dianggap dalam kerja ini dan berminat secara independen untuk pelbagai tugas NLP.', 'mt': 'Sar progress mgħaġġel lejn sistemi li jwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) li jistgħu jastreġu t-tweġibiet mit-test. L-approċċi newrali eżistenti jagħmlu użu minn mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni bidirezzjonali li jiswew ħafna jew jagħmlu punteġġ tal-firxiet kollha possibbli ta’ tweġibiet, u jillimitaw l-iskalabbiltà. Minflok, qed nipproponu li l-QA estrattiva titfa’ bħala problema ta’ tiftix iterattiva: agħżel is-sentenza tat-tweġiba, il-kelma tal-bidu, u l-kelma tat-tmiem. This representation reduces the space of each search step and allows computation to be conditionally allocated to promising search paths.  Aħna nuru li n-normalizzazzjoni globali tal-proċess tad-deċiżjoni u l-propagazzjoni lura permezz tat-tiftix bir-raġġ jagħmlu din ir-rappreżentanza vijabbli u effiċjenti fit-tagħlim. B’mod empiriku qed nippruvaw il-benefiċċji ta’ dan l-approċċ billi nużaw il-mudell tagħna, il-qarrej normalizzat globali (GNR), li jikseb it-tieni prestazzjoni tal-mudell uniku l-ogħla fuq is-Sett ta’ Dejta tat-Tweġibiet għall-Mistoqsijiet ta’ Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) u huwa 24.7x aktar mgħaġġel mill-fluss bi-attenzjoni. Aħna nintroduċu wkoll metodu ta’ żieda fid-dejta biex nipproduċu eżempji semantikament validi billi nallinjaw entitajiet imsemmija ma’ bażi ta’ għarfien u niskambjawhom ma’ entitajiet ġodda tal-istess tip. Dan il-metodu jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli kollha kkunsidrati f’dan ix-xogħol u huwa ta’ interess indipendenti għal varjetà ta’ kompiti NLP.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉത്തരം പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ (ക്യൂഎ) സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് പ നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d സാധ്യതകള്\u200d വിലയുള്ള രണ്ട് നേരിട്ടുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സാധ്യതകളു @ info @ info നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു തീരുമാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയയെ സാധാരണമാക്കുന്നതും ബീമിന്റെ തെരച്ചിലൂടെ പ്രകടനം നടത്തുന് സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡിലെ രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഉത്തരമായ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡ് ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധ (68. 4 എം, 76. 21 F1 ഒരു അറിവുള്ള ബേസിലേക്ക് പേരുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d ശരിയായ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു ഡേറ്റ ഈ രീതി ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d വിചാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ മോഡലുകളുടെയും പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്റെയും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ത താല', 'ro': 'S-au înregistrat progrese rapide către sistemele de răspuns la întrebări (QA) care pot extrage răspunsuri din text. Abordările neurale existente utilizează mecanisme de atenție bidirecționale costisitoare sau punctează toate intervalele de răspuns posibile, limitând scalabilitatea. Propunem în schimb să introducem QA extractiv ca o problemă de căutare iterativă: selectați propoziția răspunsului, cuvântul de început și cuvântul de sfârșit. Această reprezentare reduce spațiul fiecărui pas de căutare și permite alocarea condiționată calculului căilor de căutare promițătoare. Noi arătăm că normalizarea la nivel global a procesului decizional și propagarea înapoi prin căutarea fasciculului face ca această reprezentare să fie viabilă și eficientă învățarea. Demonstrăm empiric beneficiile acestei abordări folosind modelul nostru Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), care obține cea mai mare performanță a modelului unic în cadrul setului de date de răspuns la întrebări Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) și este de 24,7 ori mai rapid decât fluxul bi-atenție. De asemenea, introducem o metodă de augmentare a datelor pentru a produce exemple valide semantic prin alinierea entităților numite la o bază de cunoștințe și schimbul lor cu entități noi de același tip. Această metodă îmbunătățește performanța tuturor modelelor luate în considerare în această lucrare și este de interes independent pentru o varietate de sarcini PNL.', 'pl': 'Poczyniono szybkie postępy w kierunku systemów odpowiedzi na pytania (QA), które mogą wyodrębniać odpowiedzi z tekstu. Istniejące podejścia neuronowe wykorzystują kosztowne dwukierunkowe mechanizmy uwagi lub oceniają wszystkie możliwe rozpięcia odpowiedzi, ograniczając skalowalność. Proponujemy zamiast tego ująć wyciągające QA jako iteracyjny problem wyszukiwania: wybierz zdanie odpowiedzi, słowo początkowe i słowo końcowe. Reprezentacja ta zmniejsza przestrzeń każdego kroku wyszukiwania i umożliwia warunkowe przypisanie obliczeń do obiecujących ścieżek wyszukiwania. Pokazujemy, że globalna normalizacja procesu decyzji i wsteczne propagowanie poprzez poszukiwanie wiązki sprawia, że reprezentacja ta jest realna i efektywna w nauce. Empirycznie demonstrujemy zalety tego podejścia za pomocą naszego modelu Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), który osiąga drugą najwyższą wydajność pojedynczego modelu w zestawie danych odpowiedzi na pytania Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) i jest 24,7x szybszy niż przepływ dwuuwagi. Wprowadzamy również metodę powiększania danych służącą do tworzenia ważnych semantycznie przykładów poprzez dopasowanie nazwanych podmiotów do bazy wiedzy i zamienianie ich na nowe podmioty tego samego typu. Metoda ta poprawia wydajność wszystkich modeli rozważanych w niniejszej pracy i stanowi niezależne zainteresowanie dla różnych zadań NLP.', 'mn': 'Текст хариултыг гаргаж чадах асуулт (QA) систем дээр хурдан хөгжүүлсэн. Existen neural approaches use of expensive two-directional attention mechanisms or score all possible answers spans, limiting scalability. Хариултын өгүүлбэр, эхлэх үг, төгсгөл үг болгон QA-г дахин хайлтын асуудал болгоно. Энэ илэрхийлэл хайлтын алхам бүрт орон зайг багасгаж, тооцоолох нь хайлтын замыг амлах шаардлагатай шаардлагатай байдаг. Бид дэлхий дээр шийдвэр гаргах үйл явцыг нормал болгож, цацраг хайгуулах аргаар дахин шийдвэр гаргах үйл явцыг илэрхийлэх болон сурах үйл явцыг ашиглаж чадна. Бид энэ загварын ашиг дэлхийн нормализацийн Reader (GNR) ашиглаж байгааг харуулж байна. Энэ нь Стэнфордын асуулт асуух өгөгдлийн хандлага дээрх хоёр дахь хамгийн өндөр загварын үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Бид мөн мэдээллийн нэмэгдүүлэх арга зам бий болгож, нэг төрлийн шинэ бүтээлүүдтэй холбогдож, нэг төрлийн шинэ бүтээлүүдтэй холбогдож байна. Энэ арга нь энэ ажлын бүх загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж, NLP-ын олон төрлийн үйл ажиллагааны тухай хамааралтай сонирхолтой.', 'no': 'Snøggframgang er gjort mot spørsmålsystemet (QA) som kan pakka ut svarar frå tekst. Det eksisterande neuraltilnærmingane gjer bruk av dyppa to retningsmekanismenissar eller viser alle moglege svarmellomrom, avgrensa skalabilitet. Vi foreslår i staden for å kasta ekstraktivt QA som eit gjentaktiv s økjeproblem: Vel setninga til svaret, start ord og sluttord. Denne representasjonen reduserer mellomrom på kvar søkjetekst og tillater at datamaskina skal tilordnast med conditional for søkjetastar. Vi viser at globalt normalisering av beslutningsprosessen og tilbakepropagasjonen gjennom strålsøket gjer dette representasjonen leveraktig og læringseffektivt. Vi viser effekten av denne tilnærminga med modellen vår, globalt normalisert lesar (GNR), som når det andre høgste enkelte modellen gjer det andre utviklinga på Stanford spørsmålssvarande databasen (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) og er 24,7x raskere enn bi-oppmerksområde. Vi introduserer også ein data-augmentasjonsmetode for å produsera semantisk gyldig eksemplar ved å justera namnet entiteter til ein kunnskapsbase og byta dei med nye entiteter i same type. Denne metoden forbedrar utviklinga av alle modeller som er betre i denne arbeidet og er uavhengig interessert for mange NLP-oppgåver.', 'sr': 'Napravljen je brz napredak prema sistemima odgovora na pitanje (QA) koji mogu izvući odgovore iz teksta. Postoje neurološki pristupi koriste skupe dvosmjerne mehanizme pažnje ili rezultate svih mogućih odgovornih prostora, ograničavajući skalabilnost. Predlažemo umjesto toga da bacimo ekstraktivnu QA kao iterativni problem pretraživanja: odaberite rečenicu odgovora, započnite reč i završite reč. Ova predstava smanjuje prostor svakog koraka pretraživanja i omogućava da računalo bude uslovno određeno obećavajućim putevima pretraživanja. Pokazujemo da globalno normaliziranje procesa odluke i proširenje stražnje kroz pretragu zraka čini to predstavljanje životnom i učenjem efikasnom. Mi empirički pokazujemo korist ovog pristupa koristeći naš model, globalno normalizirani čitač (GNR), koji postiže drugu najvišu jedinstvenu modelu izvedbe na Stanfordskom pitanju odgovarajućem podacima (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) i 24,7x brže od dvostruke pažnje. Takođe predstavljamo metodu povećanja podataka kako bi proizveli semantički validni primjeri poravnajući imene entitate na bazu znanja i zamenili ih sa novim entitetima istog tipa. Ova metoda poboljšava učinkovitost svih modela koji su razmotrili u ovom radu i ima nezavisnog interesa za razne NLP zadatke.', 'so': "Rapid progress has been made towards question answering (QA) systems that can extract answers from text.  Dhaqdhaqaalaha neurada ee joogta waxay isticmaalaan meymisyo qaali ah oo si toos ah u socda ama waxay u isticmaalaan jacayl kasta oo suurtagal ah oo ay ka kooban yihiin cajiibta. Waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa in QA la soo saaro sida dhibaato raadinta ah: dooro hadalka jawaabta, bilowga hadal, dhamaadka hadalka. Xuquuqdan ayaa hoos u dhigi kara goob kasta oo raadinta, wuxuuna u ogolaan karaa in lagu xisaabiyo si sharci ah loo qaybiyo waddooyinka raadinta. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in si caadiga ah u sameynta jardiinada go’aanka caalamiga ah iyo dib-u-sii-faamulka baaxada ah ayaa faa’iido u yeelan kara qaababkan iyo waxbarashada. Waxaan si fiican ugu muujinnaa faa'iidada qaababkan isticmaalka modellka caadiga ah (GNR), kaas oo gaadha sameynta labaad ee ugu sarreeya qaababka jawaabta su'aalaha Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) iyo 24.7x oo dhaqso u dhaqsaha biyo-attention-flow. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab ku koritaanka macluumaadka si aan u sameyno tusaalooyin ay u shaqeeyaan sida loo magacaabay macluumaadyo ku qorayo saldhig aqoonta, waxaana lagu beddelaynaa macluumaad cusub oo isku mid ah. Tan qaababkan ayaa hagaajiya sameynta noocyada oo dhan ee lagu fiiriyey shaqadan, wuxuuna u baahan yahay xiisaha xor ah oo u gaar ah shaqooyinka NLP oo kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Snabba framsteg har gjorts mot frågesvarssystem som kan extrahera svar från text. Befintliga neurala metoder använder sig av dyra tvåriktade uppmärksamhetsmekanismer eller gör poäng på alla möjliga svarspann, vilket begränsar skalbarheten. Vi föreslår istället att använda extraktiv QA som ett iterativt sökproblem: välj svarets mening, startord och slutord. Denna representation minskar utrymmet för varje söksteg och gör det möjligt att villkorligt tilldela beräkningar till lovande sökvägar. Vi visar att en global normalisering av beslutsprocessen och bakåtspridning genom strålsökning gör denna representation livskraftig och lärande effektiv. Vi visar empiriskt fördelarna med detta tillvägagångssätt genom att använda vår modell Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), som uppnår den näst högsta enskilda modellen prestanda på Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) och är 24,7 gånger snabbare än bi-uppmärksamhet-flöde. Vi introducerar också en dataförstärkningsmetod för att producera semantiskt giltiga exempel genom att anpassa namngivna entiteter till en kunskapsbas och byta dem med nya entiteter av samma typ. Denna metod förbättrar prestandan för alla modeller som beaktas i detta arbete och är av självständigt intresse för en mängd olika NLP-uppgifter.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය (QA) පද්ධතියට ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ඉතින් ඉතින් න්\u200dයූරාල් අවස්ථාවන් විශාල දෙක ප්\u200dරමාණය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් හැම ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ත මේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය හැම පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තේ තියෙන්නේ හැම පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තේ තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරත අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට තීරණය සහ ආපහු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ඉගෙනීම අපි ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරය අපි තොරතුරු විශාල විදියට දත්ත ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ සැමැන්තික විශාල උදාහරණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, නම් අයිතිය අයිතිය අ මේ විධානය මේ වැඩේ හැම මොඩල් එක්ක සැලසුම් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම NLP වැඩක් වගේම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියා', 'ta': 'உரையிலிருந்து விடைகளை வெளியேற்ற முடியும் கேள்வி பதில் (QA) அமைப்புகளுக்கு ராபிட் முன்னேற்றம் செய் இருக்கும் புதிய அணுகுகள் விலையான இரு திசையாக கவனம் முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது அல்லது எல்லா சாத்தியமான விடை ஸ்பென்ஸ் வரையற நாங்கள் QA வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு பதிலாக பிரச்சனையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு: பதிலின் வாக்கியத்தை தேர்ந்தெடு @ info தீர்ப்பு செயலை உலகளவில் இயல்பாக்கும் மற்றும் பின் தேடும் மூலம் திரும்ப பரப்பும் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்பதை நா We empirically demonstrate the benefits of this approach using our model, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), which achieves the second highest single model performance on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) and is 24.7x faster than bi-attention-flow.  பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள்களை அறிவு அடிப்படையில் பெயரிடப்படுத்தி புதிய பொருள் இந்த முறைமை இந்த வேலையில் கருத்தப்பட்ட அனைத்து மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் பல்வேறு NLP பணி', 'ur': 'سوال جواب دینے (QA) سیسٹموں کے لئے تیز پیشرفت کی گئی ہے جو متن سے جواب اٹھا سکتے ہیں۔ Existing neural approaches use of expensive two-directional attention mechanisms or score all possible answers spans, limiting scalability. ہم اس کے بدلے اضافہ QA کو ایک دوبارہ تلاش مشکل کے طور پر ڈال دیتے ہیں: جواب کا فیصلہ انتخاب کریں، کلام شروع کریں، اور آخر کلم کا فیصلہ کریں۔ یہ تصویر ہر تلاش سٹم کی جگہ کم کر دیتا ہے اور کمپیوٹر کی اجازت دیتا ہے کہ جگہ راستوں کا وعدہ کرتا ہے اس کے لئے محدودیت کے ساتھ تقسیم کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ فیصلہ کے پیدائش اور پیچھے پھیر پھیر جانے کے ذریعہ یہ نمایش قابل ہے اور سیکھنے کے مطابق قابل کامیابی ہے ہم اس طریقے کا فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں جو ہمارے موڈل کے مطابق، Globally Normalized Reader (GNR) کے ذریعہ سے پہنچ رہے ہیں، جسے استنفورد سوال جواب دینے کے سوال کے دوسرے سے زیادہ بالاترین موڈل کا فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے (68.4 EM، 76.21 F1 dev) اور اس سے 24.7x دوسرے سے زیادہ سریع ہے۔ ہم نے بھی ایک ڈیٹا-افزایش طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ اس کے ذریعہ سے سیمنٹی طور پر قابل مثالیں پیدا کریں جن کے ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذ یہ طریقہ اس کام میں غور کیا گیا ہے کہ تمام نمڈلوں کی عملکرد بہتر کر دیتی ہے اور NLP کے مختلف کاموں کے لئے بے نیاز علاقه ہے.', 'uz': "Name Mavjud neyrolik usullari qiymati ikkita xil paydo qo'shish mechanislaridan foydalanadi yoki hamma imkoniyatli javob qo'shish imkoniyatlarini qo'yish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Biz buni dunyo yo yo'l jarayoni o'rnatish va qismni qidirish orqali qayta tadbirlikni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Bu tashkilotni o'rganish qobiliyatiga ishlatadi. Biz bu usulning foydalanuvchilarimizni imkoniyat qilamiz, global oddiy oʻquvchi (GNR) yordamida ko'rsatdik. Bu Stanford savol javob berish (68.4 EM, 76. 21 F1 dev) bilan ikkinchi eng eng yuqori model bajarish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi, va ikkinchi paydo bo'lgan soʻrov soʻzlaridan 24.7x tez keladi. Биз ҳам маълумотларни маълумот манзилга номланган маълумот қўшилиш усулини кўрсатамиз ва у турли турли объеклар билан ўзгартириш. Bu usul shu vazifaning hamma modellarning bajarishini bajaradi va har xil qanchalik NLP vazifalar uchun juda qiziqarli.", 'vi': 'Đã có tiến triển nhanh về hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi (QA) có thể lấy câu trả lời từ văn bản. Các phương pháp thần kinh tồn tại sử dụng máy chú ý hai hướng đắt tiền hoặc ghi tất cả các nút đáp, hạn chế khả năng phóng đại. Thay vào đó, chúng tôi đề nghị trích dẫn QA như một phương tiện tìm kiếm: hãy chọn câu trả lời, bắt đầu từ, và kết thúc từ. Sự đại diện này làm giảm khoảng trống của mỗi bước tìm kiếm và cho phép tính to án được phân bổ vào các đường dẫn tìm kiếm hứa hẹn. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc phục hồi quy trình quyết định và truyền tải lại bằng cách tìm tia sáng làm cho vai diễn này trở nên khả thi và hiệu quả. Chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm chứng minh những lợi ích của phương pháp này bằng cách sử dụng thiết bị này, bộ trình đọc liên tục hoá toàn cầu (GNR), để đạt được hiệu quả mô hình duy nhất thứ hai trong bộ dữ liệu Trả lời câu hỏi của Stanford (Bộ dữ liệu đối tượng trả lời 94, Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra một phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu để tạo ra các ví dụ về ngữ pháp hợp lệ bằng cách nhập các thực thể tên vào một căn cứ kiến thức và trao đổi chúng với các thực thể mới cùng loại. Phương pháp này cải thiện hiệu quả của tất cả các mẫu được xem xét trong công việc này và là một sở thích độc lập cho một loạt các công việc.', 'bg': 'Постигнат е бърз напредък по отношение на системите за отговор на въпроси, които могат да извличат отговори от текст. Съществуващите невронни подходи използват скъпи двупосочни механизми за внимание или оценяват всички възможни интервали на отговор, ограничавайки мащабируемостта. Предлагаме вместо това да се хвърли екстрактивна информация за качеството като итеративна задача за търсене: изберете изречението на отговора, началната дума и крайната дума. Това представяне намалява пространството на всяка стъпка за търсене и позволява изчисленията да бъдат условно разпределени към обещаващи пътища за търсене. Показваме, че глобалното нормализиране на процеса на вземане на решения и обратно разпространение чрез търсене на лъчи прави това представяне жизнеспособно и ефективно учене. Емпирично демонстрираме ползите от този подход, използвайки нашия модел, който постига второто най-високо представяне на единичния модел в Станфордския набор от данни за отговор на въпроси (68.4 ЕМ, 76.21 Разработване на Формула 1) и е 24.7 пъти по-бърз от потока на двувниманието. Също така въвеждаме метод за увеличаване на данните за създаване на семантично валидни примери чрез привеждане на имената към база от знания и размяна с нови обекти от същия тип. Този метод подобрява ефективността на всички модели, разглеждани в тази работа и е от независим интерес за различни задачи на НЛО.', 'hr': 'Brzi napredak je postignut prema sustavima odgovora na pitanje (QA) koji mogu izvući odgovore iz teksta. Postoje neurološki pristupi koriste skupe dvosmjerne mehanizme pažnje ili rezultate svih mogućih mjera odgovora, ograničavajući skalabilnost. Predlažemo umjesto toga da postavimo ekstraktivni QA kao iterativni problem pretraživanja: odaberite rečenicu odgovora, započnite riječ i završite riječ. Ova predstava smanjuje prostor svakog koraka pretraživanja i omogućava da računalo bude uslovno određeno obećavajućim putevima pretraživanja. Pokazujemo da globalno normaliziranje procesa odluke i proširenje stražnje kroz pretraživanje zraka čini to zastupanje održivom i učenjem učinkovitom. Mi empirički pokazujemo koristi ovog pristupa koristeći našeg modela, globalno normaliziranog čitača (GNR), koji postigne drugu najvišu jedinstvenu modelu učinka na Stanford pitanju odgovarajući podacima (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) i 24,7x brže od dvostrukog toka pažnje. Također predstavljamo metodu povećanja podataka kako bi proizveli semantički validni primjeri prilagođenjem imenovanih entitata bazi znanja i zamijenili ih sa novim entitetima istog tipa. Ovaj metod poboljšava učinkovitost svih modela koji su razmotrili u ovom radu i ima nezavisnog interesa za razne zadatke NLP-a.', 'nl': 'Er is snelle vooruitgang geboekt in de richting van vragenantwoordsystemen (QA) die antwoorden uit tekst kunnen halen. Bestaande neurale benaderingen maken gebruik van dure bi-directionele aandachtsmechanismen of scoren alle mogelijke antwoordspannen, waardoor schaalbaarheid wordt beperkt. In plaats daarvan stellen we voor om extractieve QA als een iteratief zoekprobleem te beschouwen: selecteer de zin, het startwoord en het eindwoord van het antwoord. Deze weergave verkleint de ruimte van elke zoekstap en maakt het mogelijk om berekeningen voorwaardelijk toe te wijzen aan veelbelovende zoekpaden. We laten zien dat het wereldwijd normaliseren van het beslissingsproces en terugpropagatie door middel van beam search deze representatie levensvatbaar en leerefficiënt maakt. We demonstreren empirisch de voordelen van deze aanpak met behulp van ons model, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), dat de op een na hoogste single model prestaties behaalt op de Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) en 24.7x sneller is dan bi-attentie-flow. We introduceren ook een data-augmentatie methode om semantisch geldige voorbeelden te produceren door benoemde entiteiten uit te lijnen aan een kennisbank en ze te ruilen met nieuwe entiteiten van hetzelfde type. Deze methode verbetert de prestaties van alle modellen die in dit werk worden overwogen en is van onafhankelijk belang voor een verscheidenheid aan NLP-taken.', 'da': 'Der er gjort hurtige fremskridt i retning af spørgsmålsbesvarelsessystemer, der kan udtrække svar fra tekst. Eksisterende neurale tilgange gør brug af dyre todejede opmærksomhedsmekanismer eller score alle mulige svar spænder, hvilket begrænser skalerbarheden. Vi foreslår i stedet at kaste ekstraktiv QA som et iterativt søgeproblem: vælg svarets sætning, start ord og slutord. Denne repræsentation reducerer pladsen for hvert søgetrin og gør det muligt at tildele beregninger betinget til lovende søgetier. Vi viser, at global normalisering af beslutningsprocessen og back-formering gennem strålesøgning gør denne repræsentation levedygtig og læringseffektiv. Vi demonstrerer empirisk fordelene ved denne tilgang ved hjælp af vores model Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), som opnår den næststørste enkeltmodel ydeevne på Stanford Spørgsmål Besvarelse Datasæt (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) og er 24,7 x hurtigere end bi-opmærksomhed-flow. Vi introducerer også en data-augmentation metode til at producere semantisk gyldige eksempler ved at tilpasse navngivne enheder til en vidensbase og bytte dem med nye enheder af samme type. Denne metode forbedrer ydeevnen for alle modeller, der behandles i dette arbejde, og er af uafhængig interesse for en række NLP-opgaver.', 'de': 'Schnelle Fortschritte wurden bei Fragebeantworterungssystemen erzielt, die Antworten aus Texten extrahieren können. Bestehende neuronale Ansätze nutzen teure bidirektionale Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen oder erzielen alle möglichen Antwortspannen, was die Skalierbarkeit einschränkt. Stattdessen schlagen wir vor, extraktive QA als iteratives Suchproblem zu betrachten: Wählen Sie den Satz, das Startwort und das Endwort der Antwort aus. Diese Darstellung reduziert den Raum für jeden Suchschritt und ermöglicht die bedingte Zuordnung von Berechnungen zu vielversprechenden Suchpfaden. Wir zeigen, dass die globale Normalisierung des Entscheidungsprozesses und die Rückpropagation durch Strahlsuche diese Darstellung lebensfähig und lernfähig macht. Wir demonstrieren die Vorteile dieses Ansatzes empirisch mit unserem Modell Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), das die zweithöchste Einzelmodellleistung auf dem Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) erreicht und 24,7x schneller als Bi-Attention-Flow ist. Wir führen auch eine Data-Augmentation Methode ein, um semantisch valide Beispiele zu erzeugen, indem benannte Entitäten an einer Wissensdatenbank ausgerichtet und mit neuen Entitäten desselben Typs ausgetauscht werden. Diese Methode verbessert die Leistung aller in dieser Arbeit betrachteten Modelle und ist von unabhängigem Interesse für eine Vielzahl von NLP-Aufgaben.', 'ko': '텍스트에서 답을 추출할 수 있는 퀴즈(QA) 시스템에서 빠른 진전을 거두었다.기존의 신경 방법은 비싼 양방향 주의 메커니즘을 이용하거나 모든 가능한 답안 범위에 대해 점수를 매겨 확장성을 제한한다.추출식 QA를 답안을 선택한 문장, 시작어, 끝말로 바꾸는 것을 권장합니다.이러한 표시는 모든 검색 절차의 공간을 줄이고, 계산을 희망적인 검색 경로에 조건부로 분배할 수 있도록 한다.우리는 전체적인 규범화 정책 결정 과정과 빔 검색을 통한 역방향 전파가 이런 표현을 실행할 수 있고 학습 효율이 높다는 것을 증명했다.우리는 스탠퍼드 퀴즈 데이터 세트(68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev)에서 두 번째로 높은 단일 모델 성능을 구현한 스탠포드 표준화 독자(GNR) 실증을 사용하여 이러한 방법의 장점을 입증했다.명명 실체와 지식 라이브러리를 맞추고 같은 유형의 새로운 실체와 교환함으로써 의미의 효과적인 예시를 만드는 데이터 확장 방법도 소개했다.이 방법은 본 연구에서 고려된 모든 모델의 성능을 향상시키고 각종 NLP 임무에 독립적인 의미를 가진다.', 'id': 'Kemajuan cepat telah dilakukan menuju sistem menjawab pertanyaan (QA) yang dapat mengekstrak jawaban dari teks. Pendekatan saraf yang ada menggunakan mekanisme perhatian bidireksi yang mahal atau skor semua jangkauan jawaban yang mungkin, membatasi skalabilitas. Kami mengusulkan untuk melemparkan ekstraktif QA sebagai masalah pencarian iteratif: pilih kalimat jawaban, kata awal, dan kata akhir. Perwakilan ini mengurangi ruang setiap langkah pencarian dan memungkinkan komputasi untuk dialokasi secara kondisional ke jalur pencarian yang berjanji. Kami menunjukkan bahwa secara global normalisasi proses keputusan dan kembali-propagasi melalui pencarian beam membuat representation ini rental dan mempelajari efisien. Kami secara empiris menunjukkan keuntungan pendekatan ini menggunakan model kami, Pembaca Normalisasi Global (GNR), yang mencapai prestasi model tunggal kedua tertinggi di Dataset Penjawaban Pertanyaan Stanford (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) dan 24,7x lebih cepat dari aliran perhatian-dua. Kami juga memperkenalkan metode peningkatan data untuk menghasilkan contoh yang valid secara semantis dengan menyesuaikan entitas bernama ke dasar pengetahuan dan menukarnya dengan entitas baru jenis yang sama. Metode ini memperbaiki prestasi semua model yang dipertimbangkan dalam pekerjaan ini dan memiliki minat independen untuk berbagai tugas NLP.', 'fa': 'پیشرفت سریع به سوی سیستم پاسخ سوال (QA) رسیده شده که می\u200cتواند جواب\u200cها را از متن خارج کند. نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی وجود دارد از مکانیسم توجه دو طریق گران استفاده می\u200cکند یا تمام فضای جواب\u200cهای ممکن را امتیاز می\u200cدهد، مقداری را محدود می\u200cکند. ما به جای این پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که QA خارجی را به عنوان یک مشکل جستجوی تکرار کنیم: جمله جواب را انتخاب کنیم، کلمه آغاز کنیم و کلمه پایان را انتخاب کنیم. این نمایش فضای هر قدم جستجو را کاهش می\u200cدهد و اجازه می\u200cدهد محاسبات را به صورت شرایط به مسیرهای جستجوی وعده داده شود. ما نشان می دهیم که در جهانی فرآیند تصمیم\u200cگیری و پشتیبانی از طریق جستجوی سیاه این نمایش را قابل توجه و موثر یادگیری می\u200cکند. ما با استفاده از مدل Globally Normalized Reader (GNR) منافع این روش را نشان می\u200cدهیم که دومین بالاترین نمونه\u200cای بر روی سؤال پاسخ داده\u200cهای استنفورد (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) می\u200cرسد و 24.7x سریعتر از دو جریان توجه است. ما همچنین روش افزایش داده\u200cها را برای تولید مثال\u200cهای معتبری با تنظیم کردن عنوان\u200cهای نامیده به پایگاه دانش و تبدیل کردن آنها با عنوان\u200cهای جدیدی از یک نوع معتبر می\u200cکنیم. این روش عملکرد تمام مدل\u200cها که در این کار توجه می\u200cکنند را بهتر می\u200cکند و علاقه\u200cای مستقل برای کارهای مختلف NLP است.', 'tr': "Cevaplary tekstden çykaryp biljek soraglaryň (QA) sistemlerine çalt ilerlemek boldy. Existen neural yaklaşyklar iki görnöş üns meýdançalaryny ulanýar ýa-da mümkin jogaplaryň gapysyny çykar, ölçekleýänlik derejesini çykar. Munuň ýerine, ekstra QA'y ýene bir iteratif gözlemek meselesi hökman maslahat berýäris: jogabynyň s özlerini saýla, başla sözlerini we soňky sözlerini saýla. Bu reprezentasyon her arama adımıň ýerini azaltýar we hesaplamak üçin şartly wezip edilsin. Biz küresel olarak karar sürecini normalleştirmek ve ışık araştırması üzerinden uzaklaştırmak bu şekilde faydalı ve öğrenmek yaratır. Biz bu ýagdaýyň nusgalarymyzy dünýä Normalizat Reader (GNR) ullanýarys, Stanford Soragyndaky 2-nji iň ýokary nusgalarynyň bardygyny görkez. Biz hem berüvleri ýetişdirmek üçin semantik ýagdaýda geçerli örnekleri bilen üýtgetmek we olaryň täze bir hili bilen üýtgetmek üçin daşyrdyk. Bu yöntem bu işde düşünlenen ähli nusgalaryň täsirini geliştirir we NLP işleriniň birnäçe görnüşleri üçin täsirli gyzyklanýar.", 'af': "Rapid vordering is gemaak na vraag antwoord (QA) stelsels wat antwoorde van teks kan uitpak. Bestaande neurale toegange maak gebruik van koste twee-rigting aandag mekanisme of tel alle moontlike antwoordespans, beperk skalabiliteit. Ons voorstel in plaas om ekstraktiewe QA as 'n iteratiewe soektog probleem te gooi: kies die antwoord se seting, begin woord en einde woord. Hierdie voorstelling verduur die ruimte van elke soektog stap en laat toe rekenaar na wees voorwaardig toegewys na beloftende soektog pad. Ons wys dat globale normalisering van die besluit proses en terug-propagasie deur beam soek hierdie voorstelling beskikbaar en leer effektief maak. Ons wys die voordele van hierdie toegang met ons model, Globaal Normaliseerde Leser (GNR), wat die tweede hoogste enkele model prestasie bereik op die Stanford Vrag Antwoord Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) en is 24.7x vinniger as bi-aandag-vloei. Ons introduseer ook 'n data-augmentasie metode om semantiese geldige voorbeelde te produseer deur die belyning van naamde entiteite na 'n kennisbasis te aligneer en hulle met nuwe entiteite van dieselfde tipe te verander. Hierdie metode verbeter die prestasie van alle modele wat in hierdie werk aangesien is en is van onveilige belang vir 'n verskillende NLP taak.", 'sq': 'Përparim i shpejtë është bërë drejt sistemeve që përgjigjen pyetjeve (QA) që mund të nxjerrin përgjigjet nga teksti. Përqasjet neurale ekzistuese përdorin mekanizmat e shtrenjta të vëmendjes dy-drejtuese apo shënojnë të gjitha fushat e mundshme të përgjigjeve, duke kufizuar shkallëzimin. Ne propozojmë në vend të kësaj të hedhim QA ekstraktiv si një problem kërkimi iterativ: zgjedh fjalën e përgjigjes, fjalën filluese dhe fjalën përfundimtare. Ky përfaqësim redukton hapësirën e çdo hapi kërkimi dhe lejon llogaritjen të caktohet kushtueshëm në rrugët e kërkimit premtuese. Ne tregojmë se normalizimi globalë i procesit të vendimit dhe përhapja prapa nëpërmjet kërkimit me rreze e bën këtë përfaqësim të jetueshëm dhe të mësueshëm të efektshëm. Ne empirikisht demonstrojmë përfitimet e kësaj qasje duke përdorur modelin tonë, Global Normalized Reader (GNR), i cili arrin shfaqjen e dytë më të lartë të modelit të vetëm në bazën e të dhënave për përgjigjet e pyetjeve të Stanfordit (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) dhe është 24.7x më e shpejtë se fluksi i dy-vëmendjes. Ne gjithashtu futim një metodë rritjeje të të dhënave për të prodhuar shembuj semantikisht të vlefshëm duke përshtatur njësitë e emëruara me një bazë njohurie dhe duke i ndërruar a to me njësi të reja të të njëjtit lloj. Kjo metodë përmirëson performancën e të gjitha modeleve të konsideruar në këtë punë dhe është e interesuar për një shumëllojshmëri detyrash NLP.', 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya mabadiliko yametengenezwa kwa ajili ya majibu ya maswali (QA) ambayo yanaweza kuondoa majibu kutoka kwenye maandishi. Matokeo ya kisasa yanayopo yanatumia mfumo wa gharama wa mawasiliano au kupunguza majibu yote yanayowezekana, ukiukwaji wa uvumilivu. Tunazipendekeza badala ya kutoa QA kama tatizo la kutafuta vizuri: kuchagua hukumu ya jibu, kuanza neno, na mwisho wa neno. Hali hii inapunguza nafasi ya kila hatua ya kutafuta na inaruhusu hisabu kuwa imegawanywa kwa mazingira ya kutafuta njia. Tunaonyesha kwamba kuanzisha mchakato wa uamuzi ulimwenguni na kutangaza upande mwingine kupitia kutafuta wima unafanya uwakilishi huu uwezekano na ufanisi wa kujifunza. We empirically demonstrate the benefits of this approach using our model, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), which achieves the second highest single model performance on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) and is 24.7x faster than bi-attention-flow.  Pia tunaonyesha mbinu ya kuongeza taarifa za kutengeneza mifano yenye uhakika kwa kutangaza vifaa vinavyoitwa kwenye msingi wa maarifa na kubadilisha vifaa vipya vinavyofanana. Utawala huu unaboresha ufanisi wa mifano yote unaoangaliwa katika kazi hii na ni wa maslahi huru kwa kazi mbalimbali za NLP.', 'az': "Mətndən cavab verə bilən sual cevapları (QA) sistemlərinə tələsik ilerliyi gəldi. Bütün mümkün cavab alanlarını müəyyən edir, ölçüdə müəyyən edirlər. Əvəzində ekstraktif QA'yi yenidən arama problemi olaraq təklif edirik: cavabın s özlərini seç, başlat sözlərini və sona sözlərini seç. Bu göstəricisi hər axtarma adımının boşluğunu azaltır və hesaplamağa müəyyən edilən arama yollarına müəyyən edilir. Biz dünya həyatında karar sürətini və qabağ araştırması ilə geri propagasyonun bu göstəricisinin faydalı və öyrənməsi faydalı olduğunu göstəririk. Biz bu metodların mənfəətlərini, Cənnətdəki Normalized Reader (GNR) vasitəsilə göstəririk ki, Stanford Soruşu cavab verən Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) ilə ikinci ən yüksək modeli performansını başa çatdırır və 24.7x daha hızlı olar. Biz həmçinin semantik olaraq mümkün məsəllər yaratmaq üçün məlumatları məlumatları elm üssünə çəkirik və onları bir türlə yeni məlumatlarla dəyişdiririk. Bu metod bu işdə düşünülən bütün modellərin performansını yaxşılaşdırır və NLP işlərinin müxtəlif tərzlərinə bağımsızlıq edir.", 'am': "የጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ሲስተም ከጽሑፍ መልስ ሊያወጣ የሚችል የውይይት ግንኙነት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ የአገኘው የውጤት ደረጃዎች የከበረ የሁለት-ቀጥተኛ የጥያቄ አካላትን ወይም የቻለ መልስ ስፋቶችን፣ የስክስሎት ግንኙነትን አቃራቢ ያደርጋሉ፡፡ We propose instead to cast extractive QA as an iterative search problem: select the answer's sentence, start word, and end word.  ይህ መልዕክት የሁሉንም የፈልግ ደረጃዎች ቦታ ያጎድላል እና በተስፋ የፈልግ መንገዶች እንዲያሳስብ በተግባር ይቆጥራል። በዓለምአቀፍ የፍርድን ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እና በብረት ፈለጋት ላይ አካባቢ እና ይህንን መልዕክት ማስተማርና ፍቃድ እንዲቻል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዚህን ሥርዓት ጥቅሞችን በሞዴላዊ Normalized አነባቢ (GNR) በመጠቀም እናሳያቸዋለን፤ ይህ የስቴንፎርድ ጥያቄ የመጠየቅ ጥያቄ ድምፅ ላይ ሁለተኛውን የፊደል ሞዴል ድምፅ ማግኘት ነው፡፡ እና አካባቢዎችን እውቀት መቀመጫቸውን በማሳመር እናስቀራለን እና በአንድ ዓይነት አዲስ አካላትን በመለወጥ አዲስ አካል እናስቀራለን፡፡ ይህ ሥርዓት የዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የተመለከቱትን የሞዴላዎችን ድምፅ ያሳድጋል እናም ለልዩ ልዩ የNLP ስራዎችን ነፃ ውዴታ ነው፡፡", 'hy': "Շատ արագ առաջընթաց է կատարվել հարցերին պատասխանելու (QA) համակարգերի վրա, որոնք կարող են ստանալ պատասխաններ տեքստից: Գոյություն ունեցող նյարդային մոտեցումները օգտագործում են թանկ երկուղղային ուշադրության մեխանիզմներ կամ գնահատում բոլոր հնարավոր պատասխանների ընթացքում, սահմանափակում են սահմանափակումը: Փոխարենը մենք առաջարկում ենք հանել QA-ը որպես կրկնվող որոնման խնդիր. ընտրեք պատասխանի նախադասությունը, սկզբնական բառը և վերջնական բառը: Այս ներկայացումը նվազեցնում է յուրաքանչյուր որոնման քայլի տարածքը և թույլ է տալիս հաշվարկները պայմանափակ հաշվարկել խոստացող որոնման ճանապարհներին: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ գլոբալ առումով նորմալ որոշումների ընթացքը և ճառագայթային որոնման միջոցով տարածվելը դարձնում է այս ներկայացումը կենսական և արդյունավետ: Մենք էմպրիկապես ցույց ենք տալիս այս մոտեցումների առավելությունները օգտագործելով մեր մոդելը, Համաշխարհային Նորմալիզացված կարդացողը (ՀՆԱ), որը հասնում է երկրորդ ամենաբարձր մոդելի արտադրողության Ստենֆորդի հարցերի պատասխանների տվյալների համակարգում (68.4 ԷՄ, 76.21 Ֆ1 դեվ) և 24.7x ավելի արագ է, քան երկ Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք տվյալների բարձրացման մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք սեմանտիկապես ճշգրիտ օրինակներ' համապատասխանելով անվանված կազմակերպությունները գիտելիքի հիմքի հետ և փոխանակելով դրանք նույն տեսակի նոր կազմակերպ Այս մեթոդը բարելավում է այս աշխատանքի մեջ ընդունված բոլոր մոդելների արտադրողականությունը և անկախ հետաքրքրություն ունի ՆԼՊ-ի բազմաթիվ խնդիրների համար:", 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের (কিউএ) সিস্টেমের প্রতি রাপিড অগ্রগতি করা হয়েছে যা টেক্সট থেকে উত্তর বের করতে পারে। বিদ্যমান নিউরেল পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করে দামী বাই-সরাসরি মনোযোগ ব্যবস্থা বা সকল সম্ভাব্য উত্তরের স্কোর ব্যবহার করে, যা সীমাবদ্ধতা  আমরা এক্সট্রেটিভ কিউ-এ বিদেশী অনুসন্ধানের সমস্যা হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করি: উত্তরের বাক্য নির্বাচন করুন, শুরু করুন শব্দ এবং শ @ info আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সিদ্ধান্ত প্রক্রিয়া স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিক করে এবং বীম অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে পুনরাবৃত্তি প্রচা আমাদের মডেল ব্যবহার করে গ্লোবাল স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক পাঠক (জিএনআর), যা স্ট্যানফোর্ড প্রশ্নের উত্তর তথ্যের প্রদর্শনের দ্বিতীয় সর্বোচ্চ মডেল প্রদর্শন করে (৬৮. ৪ এম, ৭৬. ২১ এছাড়াও আমরা একটি তথ্য যোগাযোগ মাধ্যমে উপস্থাপন করি যাতে সামান্যিক বৈধ উদাহরণ তৈরি করা হয়েছে একটি জ্ঞানের বেসে নামের বস্তুকে সাজানোর মাধ্ এই পদ্ধতি এই কাজে বিভিন্ন ধরনের এনএলপি কাজের জন্য স্বাধীন স্বাধীন আগ্রহের প্রভাব উন্নত করে।', 'ca': "S'ha fet un ràpid progrés cap a sistemes de resposta a preguntes (QA) que poden extrair respostes del text. Els enfocaments neuronals existents utilitzen mecanismes d'atenció bidireccionals costosos o puntuen totes les possibilitats d'ampliació de resposta, limitant l'escalabilitat. En comptes d'això proposem que el QA extractiu sigui un problema de cerca iteratiu: seleccioni la frase de la resposta, paraula inicial i paraula final. Aquesta representació redueix l'espai de cada pas de cerca i permet que el càlcul sigui asignat condicionalment a camins de cerca prometedors. Mostrem que normalitzar el procés de decisió a escala mundial i reproduir-se a través de la recerca al raig fa que aquesta representació sigui viable i eficient en aprendre. Empiricament demostram els beneficis d'aquest enfocament fent servir el nostre model, Llegidor Normalitzat Globalment (GNR), que aconsegueix el segon rendiment més alt del model únic del sistema de resposta a preguntes de Stanford (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) i és 24,7x més ràpid que el flux de bi-atenció. També introduim un mètode d'augmentació de dades per a produir exemples semànticament válids alliniant entitats anomenades a una base de coneixement i intercanviant-les amb noves entitats del mateix tipus. This method improves the performance of all models considered in this work and is of independent interest for a variety of NLP tasks.", 'cs': 'Bylo dosaženo rychlého pokroku směrem k systémům odpovědí na otázky (QA), které dokážou extrahovat odpovědi z textu. Stávající neuronové přístupy využívají drahých obousměrných mechanismů pozornosti nebo skórují všechny možné rozpětí odpovědí, což omezuje škálovatelnost. Místo toho navrhujeme uvést extraktivní QA jako iterativní vyhledávací problém: vyberte větu odpovědi, začáteční slovo a koncové slovo. Tato reprezentace snižuje prostor každého kroku vyhledávání a umožňuje podmíněné přiřazení výpočtu slibným vyhledávacím cestám. Ukazujeme, že globální normalizace rozhodovacího procesu a zpětné šíření prostřednictvím vyhledávání paprsku činí tuto reprezentaci životaschopnou a efektivní učení. Empiricky demonstrujeme výhody tohoto přístupu pomocí našeho modelu Global Normalized Reader (GNR), který dosahuje druhého nejvyššího výkonu jednotlivých modelů na Stanfordské sadě odpovědí na otázky (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) a je 24,7x rychlejší než tok dvou pozorností. Dále představujeme metodu rozšíření dat pro tvorbu sémanticky platných příkladů zarovnáním pojmenovaných entit na znalostní bázi a jejich výměnou za nové entity stejného typu. Tato metoda zlepšuje výkon všech modelů uvažovaných v této práci a je nezávislým zájmem pro různé úlohy NLP.', 'et': 'Kiiresti on tehtud edusamme küsimustele vastamise süsteemide suunas, millega saab tekstist vastuseid välja võtta. Olemasolevad närvilähenemised kasutavad kulukaid kahesuunalisi tähelepanumehhanisme või annavad kogu võimaliku vastuse ulatuse, piirates skaleeritavust. Selle asemel teeme ettepaneku kasutada ekstraktiv QA iteratiivse otsinguprobleemina: valige vastuse lause, algsõna ja lõppsõna. See esitus vähendab iga otsingu etapi ruumi ja võimaldab arvutusi tingimuslikult jaotada paljutõotavatele otsinguteedele. Näitame, et ülemaailmne otsustamisprotsessi normaliseerimine ja tagasilevimine läbi kiirte otsingu muudab selle esindamise elujõuliseks ja õppimise efektiivseks. Me demonstreerime empiiriliselt selle lähenemisviisi eeliseid, kasutades oma mudelit Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), mis saavutab Stanfordi küsimustele vastamise andmekogumi (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) teise suurima jõudluse ja on 24,7 korda kiirem kui kahe tähelepanu voog. Lisaks tutvustame andmete suurendamise meetodit semantiliselt kehtivate näidete tootmiseks, viies nimetatud olemid teadmistebaasiga ja vahetades need uute sama tüüpi olemitega. See meetod parandab kõigi käesolevas töös käsitletud mudelite tulemuslikkust ja pakub sõltumatut huvi mitmesuguste uue tööprogrammi ülesannete puhul.', 'fi': 'Nopeasti on edistytty kysymyksissä, joilla voidaan poimia vastauksia tekstistä. Nykyiset neuromenetelmät hyödyntävät kalliita kaksisuuntaisia huomiomekanismeja tai pistettävät kaikki mahdolliset vastausalueet, mikä rajoittaa skaalautuvuutta. Ehdotamme sen sijaan ekstraktiven laadunvarmistuksen käyttämistä iteratiiviseksi hakuongelmaksi: valitse vastauksen lause, aloitussana ja loppusana. Tämä esitys vähentää kunkin hakuvaiheen tilaa ja mahdollistaa laskennan ehdollisen kohdentamisen lupaaville hakupoluille. Osoitamme, että päätöksentekoprosessin globaali normalisointi ja takaisinleviäminen säteen haun avulla tekee esityksestä elinkelpoisen ja oppimisen tehokkaan. Esittelemme empiirisesti tämän lähestymistavan edut käyttämällä Globally Normalized Reader (GNR) -mallia, joka saavuttaa toiseksi korkeimman yksittäisen mallin suorituskyvyn Stanfordin kyselyvastausdatassa (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) ja on 24,7 kertaa nopeampi kuin kaksiosainen huomiovirta. Otamme käyttöön myös datan lisäämisen menetelmän semanttisesti pätevien esimerkkien tuottamiseksi kohdistamalla nimetyt entiteetit tietokantaan ja vaihtamalla ne uusiin samantyyppisiin entiteetteihin. Menetelmä parantaa kaikkien tässä työssä käsiteltyjen mallien suorituskykyä ja on itsenäinen etu erilaisissa NLP-tehtävissä.', 'bs': 'Napravljen je ubrzan napredak prema sistemima odgovora na pitanje (QA) koji mogu izvući odgovore iz teksta. Postoje neurološki pristupi koriste skupe dvosmjerne mehanizme pažnje ili rezultate svih mogućih mjera odgovora, ograničavajući skalabilnost. Predlažemo umjesto toga da postavimo ekstraktivnu QA kao iterativni problem pretraživanja: odaberite rečenicu odgovora, započnite riječ i završite riječ. Ova predstava smanjuje prostor svakog koraka pretraživanja i omogućava da računalo bude uslovno određeno obećavajućim putevima pretraživanja. Mi pokazujemo da globalno normalizanje procesa odluke i proširenje stražnje kroz pretragu zraka čini to predstavljanje održivim i učenjem efikasnim. Mi empirički pokazujemo koristi ovog pristupa koristeći našeg modela, globalno Normaliziranog čitača (GNR), koji postigne drugu najvišu jedinstvenu modelu izvedbe na Stanfordskom datoteku odgovarajućeg pitanja (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 dev) i 24,7x brže od dvostrukog toka pažnje. Također predstavljamo metodu povećanja podataka kako bi proizveli semantički validni primjeri poravnajući imene entitate na bazu znanja i zamijenili ih sa novim entitetima istog tipa. Ova metoda poboljšava učinkovitost svih modela koji su razmotrili u ovom radu i ima nezavisnog interesa za razne zadatke NLP-a.', 'sk': 'Hiter napredek je bil dosežen pri sistemih odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA), ki lahko izvlečejo odgovore iz besedila. Obstoječi nevronski pristopi uporabljajo drage dvosmerne mehanizme pozornosti ali ocenjujejo vse možne razpone odgovorov, kar omejuje razširljivost. Namesto tega predlagamo, da se ekstraktivno vprašanje vključuje kot iterativno težavo iskanja: izberite stavek odgovora, začetno besedo in končno besedo. Ta predstavitev zmanjšuje prostor vsakega iskalnega koraka in omogoča pogojno dodelitev izračuna obetavnim iskalnim potem. Pokazali smo, da globalna normalizacija procesa odločanja in širjenje nazaj skozi iskanje žarkov omogoča, da je ta predstavitev uspešna in učinkovita. Empirično dokazujemo prednosti tega pristopa z uporabo našega modela Globalno normaliziranega bralnika (GNR), ki dosega drugo najvišjo zmogljivost posameznega modela na Stanfordovem naboru podatkov za odgovarjanje na vprašanja (68,4 EM, 76,21 F1 razvoj) in je 24,7-krat hitrejši od dvojnega toka pozornosti. Predstavljamo tudi metodo povečanja podatkov za izdelavo semantično veljavnih primerov z uskladitvijo imenovanih entitet z bazo znanja in njihovo zamenjavo z novimi entitetami iste vrste. Ta metoda izboljšuje učinkovitost vseh modelov, obravnavanih v tem delu, in je neodvisna za različne naloge NLP.', 'ha': "An sami mafarin rapid zuwa mai tambaya na'ura (QA) mai iya iya samun mayarwa daga matsayi. Tsarin hanyor neura da ke gaba sai su yi amfani da ma'anaikin masu nau'i biyu masu shiryarwa ko ko yana ƙara kowace duk matsalan da ake iya amfani da matsayin sauri, mai ƙayyade skala. @ action: button Wannan mai gauraya yana ƙara filin duk ƙõfõfi na lõdi kuma yana yarda a raba lissafa da sharri zuwa da ake yi wa'adi da shiryoyin lõdi. Tuna nũna cewa, a tsaye a kimataifa na zartar da takardar hukuncin da za'a yi bayani-bayani, ko kuma za'a sanar da wannan rubutu mai da amfani. Tuna nũna amfani da wannan hanyarwa da ke amfani da misalinmu, mai karãtun na farko na GR, wanda ke sãmu na ƙarami na biyu na ƙaranci motel guda a kan Jaji-Majorin Stanford (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 daidai) kuma yana da 24.7x kashi kafin kashi ko-tafiyar-sauri. Kayya, Muke ƙara wata hanyor ƙaramako da data zuwa ka sami misãlai masu inganci da kuma ana sami abun da aka sune su zuwa wani sali na ilmi kuma ka canza su da abun-daban da ke daidaita. This method improves the performance of all models considered in this work and is of independent interest for a variety of NLP tasks.", 'he': 'התקדמות מהירה נעשתה לכיוון מערכות תשובות לשאלות (QA) שיכולות להוציא תשובות מהטקסט. גישות עצביות קיימות משתמשות במנגנונים יקרים של תשומת לב שתיים כיוונים או קווים את כל אורך התשובה האפשרי, מגביל את אפשרות השימוש. אנו מציעים במקום לזרוק QA חולץ כבעיה חיפוש חוזרת: לבחור את המשפט של התשובה, מילה התחלה, ומילה הסופית. ההצגה הזאת מפחידה את המרחב של כל צעד חיפוש ומאפשרת לחישוב להוסיף בתנאי למסלולי חיפוש מבטיחים. אנחנו מראים שלנורמליזם גלובלי את תהליך ההחלטה ולהתרבות בחזרה באמצעות חיפוש קרן הופך את היציגה הזאת להיות קיימת וללמד יעילה. We empirically demonstrate the benefits of this approach using our model, Globally Normalized Reader (GNR), which achieves the second highest single model performance on the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (68.4 EM, 76.21 F1 dev) and is 24.7x faster than bi-attention-flow.  אנחנו גם מציגים שיטת גידול נתונים כדי לייצר דוגמאות סמנטית מתאימות על ידי הציוד של יחידות בשם לבסיס ידע ולהחליף אותן עם יחידות חדשות של אותו סוג. השיטה הזאת משפר את ההפעלה של כל הדוגמנים שנחשבו בעבודה הזו והיא מעוניינת עצמאית במגוון של משימות NLP.', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing dikarepakke extract Subtraction Awak dhéwé ngomong nik kabèh perusahaan nggawe sapa-perusahaan lan ngubah-ngubah Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nganggo perusahaan ning diangkat iki ning model, Global Normalizer Awak dhéwé nambah data-ampungasi sistem sing dadi sematik ngejer-sistem sing berarti data-ampungasi sistem sing gak bener tentang kanggo ngubah dhéwé sistem sing gak dhéwé karo sistem sing berartil. Metèd iki bakal nglanggar ngerti tindahan ning gawe model sing paling nggawe ning trabah iki bakal sing wis dipunahang kanggo kalagayaan akèh NLP.', 'bo': 'ཐིག་གི་མཐུན་པར་མགོང་འཕེལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་རིམ་པ(QA)དུས་མཚམས་མཐུན་པར་བཟོ་ཚར་བ Existing neural approaches make use of expensive two-directional attention mechanisms or score all possible answer spans, limiting scalability. འུ་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚབ་ལ་ཁྱད་དུ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས་པའི་བསམ་འཆར། འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་གྲངས་རེ་རེར ང་ཚོས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱིས་མི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱ་རིམ་དང་བསྐྱར་རྗེས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བཞིན་པའི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་བ་སྐྱེ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡུལ་རྒྱུན་མེད་པའི་ཀློག་ཆས་པ་གཉིས་པོ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དབྱིབས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་བྱས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ལ། དངོས་འབྲེལ་འདིས་ལས་ཀ་འདིས་བསམ་བྱས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་། NLP་ལས་ཀ་སྣ་ཚོ'}
{'en': 'Speech segmentation with a neural encoder model of working memory', 'fr': 'Segmentation de la parole avec un modèle de codage neuronal de mémoire de travail', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلام باستخدام نموذج مشفر عصبي للذاكرة العاملة', 'es': 'Segmentación de voz con un modelo de codificador neuronal de memoria de trabajo', 'pt': 'Segmentação de fala com um modelo de codificador neural de memória de trabalho', 'ja': 'ワーキングメモリのニューラルエンコーダモデルによる音声セグメンテーション', 'zh': '用工记忆神经编码器模形语音分', 'ru': 'Сегментация речи с помощью модели нейронного кодера рабочей памяти', 'hi': 'कार्यशील स्मृति के तंत्रिका एन्कोडर मॉडल के साथ वाक् विभाजन', 'ga': 'Deighilt cainte le samhail ionchódóra néarúil de chuimhne oibre', 'hu': 'Beszédszegmentáció a munkamemória neurális kódoló modelljével', 'ka': 'სამუშაო მეხსიერების ნეიროლური კოდირების მოდელი', 'el': 'Κατάτμηση ομιλίας με ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού κωδικοποιητή της μνήμης εργασίας', 'lt': 'Kalbos segmentacija su neurologinio kodavimo darbo atminties modeliu', 'it': 'Segmentazione vocale con un modello di encoder neurale della memoria di lavoro', 'kk': 'Жұмыс жады невралдық кодер үлгісімен сөйлеу сегменті', 'mk': 'Сегментација на говорот со модел на нервен кодер на работна меморија', 'ms': 'Segmen ucapan dengan model pengekod saraf memori kerja', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന മെമ്മറിയുടെ നെയൂറല്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗം', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tal-kelma b’mudell ta’ kodifikatur newrali tal-memorja tax-xogħol', 'mn': 'Ажиллах санамжийн мэдрэлийн кодер загвартай ярианы сегмент', 'pl': 'Segmentacja mowy z modelem kodera neuronowego pamięci roboczej', 'ro': 'Segmentarea vorbirii cu un model codificator neural al memoriei de lucru', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka hadalka oo ku sameynaya modelka kooxda xiliga ah ee xasuusta shaqada', 'sv': 'Talsegmentering med en neural encoder modell av arbetsminne', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'عملکرد یاد کے نیورل اکڈر موڈل کے ساتھ بات سگرمیٹ', 'sr': 'Govorska segmentacija sa modelom neuralnog kodera radnog pamćenja', 'no': 'Språk- segmentasjon med eit neuralkodingsmodell for arbeidsmerke', 'si': 'වැඩ කරන මතකයේ න්\u200dයූරල් කෝඩාර් මොඩල් එක්ක කතා කරපු සෙගෙම්ටර් එක්ක', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát ngôn với mô hình mã hóa thần kinh của bộ nhớ hoạt động', 'bg': 'Сегментация на речта с невронен кодер модел на работна памет', 'da': 'Talesegmentering med en neural encoder model af arbejdshukommelse', 'hr': 'Govorska segmentacija sa modelom neuralnog kodera radnog sjećanja', 'nl': 'Spraaksegmentatie met een neuraal encodermodel van het werkgeheugen', 'de': 'Sprachsegmentierung mit einem neuronalen Encoder-Modell des Arbeitsgedächtnisses', 'id': 'Segmentasi pidato dengan model pengekoder saraf memori kerja', 'fa': 'بخش سخنرانی با یک مدل رمزگر عصبی حافظه کار', 'tr': 'Sözlemek üçin bir näyral ködleme modi ullan', 'af': "Spraak segmentasie met 'n neural enkoder model van werk geheue", 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i fjalimit me një model kodues nervor të kujtesës së punës', 'ko': '작업 기억 신경 인코딩 모델 기반 음성 분할', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'sw': 'Mgawanyo wa kujieleza na modeli ya kodi ya neura ya kumbukumbu ya kazi', 'hy': 'Խոսքի սեգմետրացիան աշխատանքային հիշողության նյարդային կոդավորման մոդելի հետ', 'bn': 'কাজের স্মৃতির নিউরেল এনকোডার মডেলের সাথে কথা বলুন', 'az': 'Çalışma yadının nöral kodlayıcı modeli ilə söz segmentasiyası', 'bs': 'Segmentacija govora sa modelom neuralnog kodera radnog sjećanja', 'fi': 'Puhesegmentointi työmuistin neurokooderimallin avulla', 'cs': 'Segmentace řeči s neuronovým kodérovým modelem pracovní paměti', 'et': 'Kõne segmenteerimine töömälu närvikodeerija mudeliga', 'ca': 'Segmentació del discurs amb un model de codificador neural de memòria operativa', 'ha': 'Socket error code ConnectionTimeout', 'sk': 'Segmentacija govora z nevronskim kodirnikom delovnega pomnilnika', 'jv': 'OptionGroup', 'he': 'Speech segmentation with a neural encoder model of working memory', 'bo': 'Speech segmentation with a neural encoder model of working memory'}
{'en': 'We present the first unsupervised LSTM speech segmenter as a cognitive model of the acquisition of words from unsegmented input. Cognitive biases toward phonological and syntactic predictability in speech are rooted in the limitations of human memory (Baddeley et al., 1998) ; compressed representations are easier to acquire and retain in memory. To model the biases introduced by these memory limitations, our system uses an LSTM-based encoder-decoder with a small number of hidden units, then searches for a segmentation that minimizes autoencoding loss. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner discovers these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics. To our knowledge, ours is the first fully unsupervised system to be able to segment both symbolic and acoustic representations of speech.', 'ar': 'نقدم أول مقسم خطاب LSTM غير خاضع للإشراف كنموذج معرفي لاكتساب الكلمات من المدخلات غير المقسمة. التحيزات المعرفية تجاه القدرة على التنبؤ الصوتي والنحوي في الكلام متجذرة في قيود الذاكرة البشرية (Baddeley et al. ، 1998) ؛ التمثيلات المضغوطة أسهل في الحصول عليها والاحتفاظ بها في الذاكرة. لنمذجة التحيزات التي أدخلتها قيود الذاكرة هذه ، يستخدم نظامنا وحدة فك ترميز تعتمد على LSTM مع عدد صغير من الوحدات المخفية ، ثم يبحث عن تجزئة تقلل من فقدان التشفير التلقائي. يجب أن تشترك المقاطع ذات المعنى اللغوي (مثل الكلمات) في أنماط منتظمة من الميزات التي تسهل أداء وحدة فك التشفير مقارنة بالتقسيمات العشوائية ، ونبين أن متعلمنا يكتشف هذه الأنماط عند تدريبه على تسلسلات صوتية أو صوتيات خام. على حد علمنا ، فإن نظامنا هو أول نظام غير خاضع للإشراف بالكامل قادر على تجزئة التمثيلات الرمزية والصوتية للكلام.', 'fr': "Nous présentons le premier segmenteur vocal LSTM non supervisé en tant que modèle cognitif de l'acquisition de mots à partir d'entrées non segmentées. Les biais cognitifs favorisant la prévisibilité phonologique et syntaxique de la parole trouvent leur origine dans les limites de la mémoire humaine (Baddeley et al., 1998)\xa0; les représentations compressées sont plus faciles à acquérir et à conserver en mémoire. Pour modéliser les biais introduits par ces limitations de mémoire, notre système utilise un encodeur-décodeur basé sur LSTM avec un petit nombre d'unités cachées, puis recherche une segmentation qui minimise la perte de codage automatique. Les segments significatifs sur le plan linguistique (par exemple, les mots) doivent partager des modèles réguliers de caractéristiques qui facilitent les performances du décodeur par rapport aux segmentations aléatoires, et nous montrons que notre apprenant découvre ces modèles lorsqu'il est entraîné sur des séquences de phonèmes ou sur l'acoustique brute. À notre connaissance, notre système est le premier système entièrement non supervisé capable de segmenter à la fois les représentations symboliques et acoustiques de la parole.", 'es': 'Presentamos el primer segmentador de voz LSTM no supervisado como modelo cognitivo de la adquisición de palabras a partir de entradas no segmentadas. Los sesgos cognitivos hacia la previsibilidad fonológica y sintáctica en el habla tienen su origen en las limitaciones de la memoria humana (Baddeley et al., 1998); las representaciones comprimidas son más fáciles de adquirir y retener en la memoria. Para modelar los sesgos introducidos por estas limitaciones de memoria, nuestro sistema utiliza un codificador-decodificador basado en LSTM con un pequeño número de unidades ocultas, y luego busca una segmentación que minimice la pérdida de codificación automática. Los segmentos lingüísticamente significativos (por ejemplo, palabras) deben compartir patrones regulares de características que faciliten el rendimiento del decodificador en comparación con las segmentaciones aleatorias, y demostramos que nuestro alumno descubre estos patrones cuando se entrena en secuencias de fonemas o en acústica sin procesar. Hasta donde sabemos, el nuestro es el primer sistema totalmente sin supervisión que puede segmentar representaciones del habla tanto simbólicas como acústicas.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o primeiro segmentador de fala LSTM não supervisionado como um modelo cognitivo da aquisição de palavras de entrada não segmentada. Os vieses cognitivos para a previsibilidade fonológica e sintática na fala estão enraizados nas limitações da memória humana (Baddeley et al., 1998); representações compactadas são mais fáceis de adquirir e reter na memória. Para modelar os desvios introduzidos por essas limitações de memória, nosso sistema usa um codificador-decodificador baseado em LSTM com um pequeno número de unidades ocultas e, em seguida, procura uma segmentação que minimize a perda de codificação automática. Segmentos linguísticamente significativos (por exemplo, palavras) devem compartilhar padrões regulares de recursos que facilitam o desempenho do decodificador em comparação com segmentações aleatórias, e mostramos que nosso aluno descobre esses padrões quando treinado em sequências de fonemas ou acústica bruta. Até onde sabemos, o nosso é o primeiro sistema totalmente não supervisionado capaz de segmentar representações simbólicas e acústicas da fala.', 'ja': 'セグメント化されていない入力からの単語の取得の認知モデルとして、最初の無監督LSTMスピーチセグメンテーターを提示します。音声における音声学的および構文的予測可能性への認知バイアスは、人間の記憶の限界に根ざしている（ Baddeley et al., 1998 ）。圧縮された表現は、記憶の中で取得および保持することがより容易である。これらのメモリ制限によって導入されたバイアスをモデル化するために、当社のシステムは、少数の非表示ユニットを持つLSTMベースのエンコーダデコーダを使用し、自動エンコード損失を最小限に抑えるセグメンテーションを検索します。言語学的に意味のあるセグメント（例えば、単語）は、ランダムなセグメントと比較してデコーダーのパフォーマンスを促進する機能の規則的なパターンを共有する必要があり、私たちは、音素シーケンスまたは生の音響学のトレーニングを受けたときに、学習者がこれらのパターンを発見することを示します。私たちの知る限りでは、私たちのシステムは、音声の記号的表現と音響的表現の両方をセグメント化することができる最初の完全に監督されていないシステムです。', 'zh': '以第一无监LSTM语音分段器为未尝分段输中取单词识模形。 语音句法可预测性识植根于人局限性(Baddeley等1998); 压缩易取而内存之。 所以内存限偏差建模,系统用基于LSTM编码器解码器少隐单元,然后搜索可大减自编码之分。 比之随机分割,有言义者片段(如单词)宜共进解码器性之常式,且吾等学者于音素序、原始声学上训练见之。 以吾所知,一能分音之声学,全无监督之统也。', 'hi': 'हम unsegmented इनपुट से शब्दों के अधिग्रहण के एक संज्ञानात्मक मॉडल के रूप में पहले unsupervised LSTM भाषण सेगमेंटर प्रस्तुत करते हैं। भाषण में ध्वन्यात्मक और वाक्यात्मक भविष्यवाणी की ओर संज्ञानात्मक पूर्वाग्रह मानव स्मृति की सीमाओं में निहित हैं (Baddeley et al., 1998); संपीड़ित अभ्यावेदन को प्राप्त करना और स्मृति में बनाए रखना आसान होता है। इन स्मृति सीमाओं द्वारा पेश किए गए पूर्वाग्रहों को मॉडल करने के लिए, हमारा सिस्टम छिपी हुई इकाइयों की एक छोटी संख्या के साथ एक एलएसटीएम-आधारित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर का उपयोग करता है, फिर एक विभाजन की खोज करता है जो ऑटोएनकोडिंग हानि को कम करता है। भाषाई रूप से सार्थक खंडों (जैसे शब्दों) को उन विशेषताओं के नियमित पैटर्न साझा करना चाहिए जो यादृच्छिक विभाजन की तुलना में डिकोडर प्रदर्शन की सुविधा प्रदान करते हैं, और हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारे शिक्षार्थी इन पैटर्नों की खोज करते हैं जब या तो फोनम अनुक्रमों या कच्चे ध्वनिक पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। हमारे ज्ञान के लिए, हमारा पहला पूरी तरह से असुरक्षित प्रणाली है जो भाषण के प्रतीकात्मक और ध्वनिक प्रतिनिधित्व दोनों को विभाजित करने में सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'Представляем первый неконтролируемый сегментатор речи LSTM в качестве когнитивной модели получения слов из несегментированного ввода. Когнитивные предрассудки в отношении фонологической и синтаксической предсказуемости в речи коренится в ограничениях человеческой памяти (Baddeley et al., 1998); сжатые представления легче получить и сохранить в памяти. Для моделирования смещений, вызванных этими ограничениями памяти, наша система использует кодер-декодер на основе LSTM с небольшим количеством скрытых единиц, а затем ищет сегментацию, которая минимизирует потерю автокодирования. Лингвистически значимые сегменты (например, слова) должны иметь регулярные шаблоны функций, которые облегчают работу декодера по сравнению со случайными сегментами, и мы показываем, что наш ученик обнаруживает эти шаблоны, обучаясь либо на фонемных последовательностях, либо на необработанной акустике. Насколько нам известно, наша система является первой полностью неконтролируемой системой, которая способна сегментировать как символические, так и акустические представления речи.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair an chéad deighleoir cainte LSTM gan mhaoirseacht mar shamhail chognaíoch d’fháil focal ó ionchur neamhdheighilte. Tá laofachtaí cognaíocha i dtreo intuarthacht fhóineolaíoch agus chomhréire sa chaint fréamhaithe i srianta cuimhne an duine (Baddeley et al., 1998); is fusa léiriúcháin chomhbhrúite a fháil agus a choinneáil sa chuimhne. Chun na laofachtaí a thugann na teorainneacha cuimhne seo a shamhaltú, úsáideann ár gcóras ionchódóir LSTM-bhunaithe le líon beag aonad folaithe, ansin déanann sé cuardach ar dheighilt a íoslaghdaíonn caillteanas uathchódaithe. Ba cheart go mbeadh pátrúin rialta de ghnéithe a éascaíonn feidhmíocht díchódóra i gcomparáid le deighiltí randamacha i míreanna a bhfuil brí teanga leo, agus léirímid go n-aimsíonn ár bhfoghlaimeoir na patrúin seo nuair a chuirtear oiliúint orthu ar sheichimh fóinéime nó ar fhuaimíocht amh. Go bhfios dúinn, is é ár gcóras féin an chéad chóras gan mhaoirseacht a bheidh in ann léirithe siombalacha agus fuaimiúla cainte a dheighilt.', 'el': "Παρουσιάζουμε το πρώτο χωρίς επίβλεψη τμήμα ομιλίας ως γνωστικό μοντέλο απόκτησης λέξεων από μη καθορισμένη εισαγωγή. Οι γνωστικές προκαταλήψεις προς τη φωνολογική και συντακτική προβλεψιμότητα στην ομιλία έχουν ρίζες στους περιορισμούς της ανθρώπινης μνήμης (κ.α., 1998). Οι συμπιεσμένες αναπαραστάσεις είναι ευκολότερες να αποκτηθούν και να διατηρηθούν στη μνήμη. Για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τις προκατάληψη που εισάγονται από αυτούς τους περιορισμούς μνήμης, το σύστημά μας χρησιμοποιεί έναν κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή με έναν μικρό αριθμό κρυφών μονάδων και στη συνέχεια αναζητά μια τμηματοποίηση που ελαχιστοποιεί την απώλεια αυτόματης κωδικοποίησης. Γλωσσικά σημαντικά τμήματα (π.χ. λέξεις) θα πρέπει να μοιράζονται τακτικά μοτίβα χαρακτηριστικών που διευκολύνουν την απόδοση αποκωδικοποιητή σε σύγκριση με τυχαίες τμηματοποιήσεις, και δείχνουμε ότι ο μαθητής μας ανακαλύπτει αυτά τα μοτίβα όταν εκπαιδεύεται είτε σε φωνητικές ακολουθίες είτε σε ακατέργαστη ακουστική. Απ' όσο γνωρίζουμε, το δικό μας είναι το πρώτο πλήρως ανεξέλεγκτο σύστημα που είναι σε θέση να διαχωρίσει τόσο συμβολικές όσο και ακουστικές αναπαραστάσεις του λόγου.", 'hu': 'Az első felügyelet nélküli LSTM beszédszegmentőt mutatjuk be, mint a szavak megmentetlen bemenetből történő elsajátításának kognitív modelljét. A beszéd fonológiai és szintaktikus kiszámíthatóságára irányuló kognitív előítéletek az emberi emlékezet korlátaiban gyökereznek (Baddeley et al., 1998); A tömörített reprezentációk könnyebben megszerezhetők és megőrizhetők a memóriában. A memóriakorlátozások által bevezetett előírások modellezéséhez rendszerünk egy LSTM alapú kódoló-dekódolót használ kis számú rejtett egységgel, majd olyan szegmentációt keres, amely minimalizálja az automatikus kódolási veszteséget. A nyelvi szempontból jelentős szegmenseknek (például a szavaknak) olyan funkciók rendszeres mintázatait kell megosztaniuk, amelyek megkönnyítik a dekódolás teljesítményét a véletlenszerű szegmentációkhoz képest, és megmutatjuk, hogy tanulónk ezeket a mintákat akár telefonszekvenciákra, akár nyers akusztikára képzett képzés során fedezi fel. Tudomásunk szerint a miénk az első teljesen felügyelet nélküli rendszer, amely képes szegmensezálni a beszéd szimbolikus és akusztikus reprezentációit.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მხოლოდ LSTM სიტყვების კონციგური მოდელის პირველი არაფერიზებული სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების წარმოადგენა. ფონოლოგიური და სინტაქტიური წინასწარმატების კონგენტიური წინასწარმატებით ადამიანის მეხსიერების (Baddeley et al., 1998); კომპრესტირებული გამოსახულებები უფრო მარტივია შეიძლება მეხსიერებაში დაიყენოთ და დაიყენოთ. ჩვენი სისტემა გამოყენება LSTM-ის ფორმების კოდექტორის მარტივი რაოდენობით დახმარებული ერთეულებით, და შემდეგ სეგმენტაციის ძებნა, რომელიც ავტოკოდირების დაკავშირებას მინუსიზებს. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner discovers these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics. ჩვენი ცნობილებისთვის, ჩვენი პირველი ყველაფერად არ განსხვავებული სისტემა, რომელიც შეუძლებელია სიმბოლოგიური და აკუსტიური გამოსახულებების შესაძლებლობა.', 'it': "Presentiamo il primo segmentatore vocale LSTM non supervisionato come modello cognitivo dell'acquisizione di parole da input non gmented. I pregiudizi cognitivi verso la prevedibilità fonologica e sintattica della parola sono radicati nei limiti della memoria umana (Baddeley et al., 1998); Le rappresentazioni compressi sono più facili da acquisire e conservare in memoria. Per modellare i bias introdotti da queste limitazioni di memoria, il nostro sistema utilizza un encoder-decoder basato su LSTM con un piccolo numero di unità nascoste, quindi cerca una segmentazione che minimizza la perdita di codifica automatica. Segmenti linguistici significativi (ad esempio parole) dovrebbero condividere schemi regolari di funzionalità che facilitano le prestazioni del decoder rispetto alle segmentazioni casuali, e mostriamo che il nostro studente scopre questi modelli quando è addestrato su sequenze fonemiche o acustica grezza. Per quanto ne sappiamo, il nostro è il primo sistema completamente non supervisionato in grado di segmentare sia rappresentazioni simboliche che acustiche del discorso.", 'lt': 'Mes pristatome pirmąjį nepastebimą LSTM kalbos segmentatorių kaip pažintinį žodžių įsigijimo iš neišskiriamų įrašų model į. Žmogaus atminties apribojimai (Baddeley et al., 1998 m.). spausdintus atvaizdus lengviau įgyti ir laikyti atmintyje. Siekdama modeliuoti šiuos atminties apribojimus įdiegtus nukrypimus, mūsų sistema naudoja LSTM pagrįstą kodatorių dekoderį su nedideliu slepiamų vienetų skaičiumi, tada ieško segmentacijos, kuri sumažintų autokodavimo praradimą. Linguistiniu požiūriu reikšmingi segmentai (pvz., žodžiai) turėtų dalytis reguliariais požymių modeliais, kurie palengvina dekoderių veiksmingumą, palyginti su atsitiktinėmis segmentacijomis, ir mes parodome, kad mūsų mokytojas aptinka šiuos modelius, kai jis mokomas arba foneminėmis sekomis, arba žalia akustika. Mūsų žiniomis, mūsų sistema yra pirmoji visiškai nepastebima sistema, galinti suskirstyti simbolines ir akustines kalbos nuotraukas.', 'mk': 'Го претставуваме првиот ненадгледуван говорен сегментер на LSTM како когнитивен модел на купување зборови од неодделен внес. Cognitive biases toward phonological and syntactic predictability in speech are rooted in the limitations of human memory (Baddeley et al., 1998);  компресираните претставувања се полесни за набавување и задржување во сеќавањето. За да ги моделираме предрасудите воведени од овие мемориски ограничувања, нашиот систем користи кодер-декодер базиран на LSTM со мал број скриени единици, а потоа бара сегментација која минимизира загуба на автокодерање. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner discovers these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics.  Според нашето знаење, нашиот е првиот целосно ненадгледуван систем кој може да сегментира симболични и акустички претставувања на говорот.', 'ms': 'We present the first unsupervised LSTM speech segmenter as a cognitive model of the acquisition of words from unsegmented input.  Kebiasaan pengetahuan terhadap ramalan fonologi dan sintaktik dalam ucapan adalah punca dalam sempadan memori manusia (Baddeley et al., 1998); perwakilan termampat lebih mudah untuk diperoleh dan disimpan dalam ingatan. Untuk model biases yang diperkenalkan oleh keterangan memori ini, sistem kami menggunakan pengekod-dekoder berasaskan LSTM dengan sejumlah kecil unit tersembunyi, kemudian mencari segmen yang mengurangi kehilangan pengekodan automatik. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner discovers these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics.  Menurut pengetahuan kita, sistem kita adalah sistem pertama yang tidak diawasi sepenuhnya untuk mampu segmen kedua-dua perwakilan simbolik dan akustik ucapan.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത LSTM സംസാരത്തിന്റെ സംഘത്തിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക് Cognitive biases toward phonological and syntactic predictability in speech are rooted in the limitations of human memory (Baddeley et al., 1998);  ചുരുക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഓര്\u200dമ്മയില്\u200d നിന്നും എളുപ്പമാണ്. ഈ മെമ്മറിയുടെ പരിധികള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന തെറ്റുകള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുവാന്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു LSTM-അടിസ്ഥാനമായി എക്ഡോര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d  ലിന്\u200dഗ്വിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d അര്\u200dഥിക്കുന്ന വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d (ഉദാഹരണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d) സാധാരണമായ പ്രമാണങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുകൊടുക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. അത് കുറ്റമില്ലാത്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളോട് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന് നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സിസ്റ്റമാണ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെയും പിരിച', 'mt': 'We present the first unsupervised LSTM speech segmenter as a cognitive model of the acquisition of words from unsegmented input.  Il-preġudizzji konoxxittivi lejn prevedibbiltà fonoloġika u sintattika fid-diskors huma għeruq fil-limitazzjonijiet tal-memorja umana (Baddeley et al., 1998); rappreżentazzjonijiet kompressati huma aktar faċli biex jinkisbu u jinżammu fil-memorja. Biex timmudella l-preġudizzji introdotti minn dawn il-limitazzjonijiet tal-memorja, is-sistema tagħna tuża kodifikatur-dekoder ibbażat fuq LSTM b’numru żgħir ta’ unitajiet moħbija, imbagħad tfittex segmentazzjoni li timminimizza t-telf tal-awtokoder. Segmenti lingwistikament sinifikanti (pereżempju kliem) g ħandhom jaqsmu mudelli regolari ta’ karatteristiċi li jiffaċilitaw il-prestazzjoni tad-dekoder meta mqabbla ma’ segmentazzjonijiet każwali, u nagħmlu evidenza li l-istudent tagħna jiskopri dawn ix-xejriet meta jkun imħarreġ jew fuq sekwenzi ta’ fonema jew akustika mhux ipproċessata. Għall-għarfien tagħna, tagħna hija l-ewwel sistema kompletament mhux sorveljata li tkun kapaċi taqsam kemm ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet simboliċi kif ukoll dawk akustiċi tad-diskors.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy pierwszy nienadzorowany segmenter mowy LSTM jako model poznawczy pozyskiwania słów z niesegmentowanego wejścia. Uprzedzenia poznawcze wobec przewidywalności fonologicznej i składniowej w mowie są zakorzenione w ograniczeniach pamięci ludzkiej (Baddeley et al., 1998); Skompresowane reprezentacje są łatwiejsze do pozyskania i zachowania w pamięci. Aby modelować uprzedzenia wprowadzane przez te ograniczenia pamięci, nasz system używa kodera-dekodera opartego na LSTM z niewielką liczbą ukrytych jednostek, a następnie wyszukuje segmentację minimalizującą straty autokodowania. Znaczące językowo segmenty (np. słowa) powinny mieć regularne wzorce cech ułatwiających wydajność dekodera w porównaniu z losowymi segmentacjami, a my pokazujemy, że nasz uczeń odkrywa te wzorce podczas trenowania sekwencji fonemów lub surowej akustyki. Z naszej wiedzy, nasz system jest pierwszym w pełni bez nadzoru, który jest w stanie segmentować zarówno symboliczne, jak i akustyczne reprezentacje mowy.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm primul segmentator de vorbire LSTM nesupravegheat ca model cognitiv de achiziționare a cuvintelor din input nesemmentat. Prejudecățile cognitive față de predictibilitatea fonologică și sintactică în vorbire sunt înrădăcinate în limitele memoriei umane (Baddeley et al., 1998); Reprezentările comprimate sunt mai ușor de dobândit și păstrat în memorie. Pentru a modela prejudecățile introduse de aceste limitări de memorie, sistemul nostru utilizează un encoder-decoder bazat pe LSTM cu un număr mic de unități ascunse, apoi caută o segmentare care minimizează pierderile de codare automată. Segmentele semnificative din punct de vedere lingvistic (de exemplu cuvintele) ar trebui să împărtășească modele regulate de caracteristici care facilitează performanța decodorului în comparație cu segmentările aleatorii și arătăm că elevul nostru descoperă aceste modele atunci când este instruit fie pe secvențe foneme, fie pe acustica brută. Din câte ştim, al nostru este primul sistem complet nesupravegheat care poate segmenta atât reprezentări simbolice, cât şi acustice ale vorbirii.', 'no': 'Vi viser den første uskytta LSTM-talesegmenteren som ein kognitiv modell for å henta ord frå utgått inndata. Kognitiv forskyvingar mot fonologiske og syntaktiske forhåndsvisingar i tale er rotert i begrensningar av menneske minne (Baddeley et al., 1998); komprimerte representasjonar er lettere å henta og lagra i minne. For å modellere forskyvingane som er introduserte av desse minningsgrensene, brukar systemet vårt ein LSTM-basert koder med ein liten tal skjulte einingar, og søker etter eit segmentasjon som minimerer tapt av automatisk koding. Lingstydelige segmentar (f.eks. ord) bør dele regulære mønsterelement for funksjonar som gjeld dekoder i sammenligning med tilfeldige segmentasjonar, og vi viser at læraren vårt oppdager desse mønsterene når det er trent på anten fonesekvensjonar eller råakustikk. For våre kunnskap er våre den første fullstendig usikkerte systemet som kan segmentera både symbolske og akustiske representasjonar av tale.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo prvi neodređeni LSTM govorni segmenter kao kognitivni model prikupljanja riječi iz neodređenog ulaza. Kognitivne predrasude prema fonološkoj i sintaktičkoj predvidljivosti govora korijenjene su u ograničenjima ljudskog pamćenja (Baddeley et al., 1998); kompresirane predstave su lakše za usvajanje i zadržavanje pamćenja. Da bismo modelili predrasude uvedene ovim ograničenjima pamćenja, naš sistem koristi koder na LSTM-u sa malim brojem skrivenih jedinica, a zatim traži segmentaciju koja minimizira gubitak autokodiranja. Lingistički značajni segmenti (npr. reči) trebaju podijeliti redovne obrasce karakteristika koje olakšavaju učinkovitost dekodera u usporedbi sa nasumičnim segmentacijama, i pokazujemo da naš učenik otkriva te obrasce kada je obučeno na bilo kojoj telefonskoj sekvenci ili sirovoj akustici. Za naše znanje, naš je prvi potpuno neodređeni sistem koji bi mogao da segmentiše simboličke i akustičke predstave govora.', 'mn': 'Бид анхны дэмжигдэхгүй LSTM ярианы сегментерийг мэдэх загвар болгож өгдөг. Хүмүүсийн санамж (Baddeley et al., 1998) хэлэхэд фонологик болон синтактикийн тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтууд нь хүний санамжийн хязгаарлалтад үндсэн байдаг. цуглуулагдсан илтгэл санамжтайгаар авч, хадгалах нь амархан. Эдгээр санамжийн хязгаарлалтыг загварчлахын тулд бидний систем LSTM-ын үндсэн кодер-декодерийг жижиг хэмжээний нуугдсан нэгжүүдтэй ашигладаг. Тэгээд автокодлох алдагдлыг багасгах хэмжээсүүдийг хайж байна. Linguistically meaningful segments (example words) should share regular features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner finds these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics. Бидний мэдлэгтэй бидний анхны хувьд илтгэлийн символ болон акустик илтгэлийг хувааж чадна.', 'si': 'අපි පළමුවෙනි LSTM කතාව සෙගෙම්ටර් විදියට පෙන්වන්නේ නැහැ වචන් අල්ලගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදියට. සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සහ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ කතාවට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරනවා මිනිස්සු මතකයේ සීමාවට (Baddeliy et සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිනිදර්ශනයක් මතකයේ අල්ලගන්න සහ තියාගන්න ලේසියි. අපේ පද්ධතිය LSTM-ආධාරිත සංකේතකය සමග පොඩි සංකේතයක් තියෙනවා මෙම මතක සීමාවෙන් සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා, පස්සේ ස්වයංකේතනය නැති වෙ Name අපේ දන්නවට, අපේ පලවෙනි පුරුද්ගලික විශ්වාස කරලා නැති පද්ධතිය, සංකේතික සහ සාක්ෂික විශ්වාස කරන්න බෑ.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qofkii ugu horreeyey oo aan la ilaalinayn LSTM-ka sida qaab aqoon ah oo sameynta hadalka laga soo qaadanayo input aan la mid ahayn. Waxyaabaha aqoonta ah oo u jeeda awoodda phonolojiga iyo la-hor-dhigidda hadalka waxaa lagu rooriyey xadhigga xubnaha biniaadamka (Baddeley et al., 1998). noocyada kooxa waa fudud in la helo iyo ku haysto xasuusta. Tusaale ahaan tababarada xubnaha xusuusta lagu soo bandhigay, nidaamkayagu wuxuu isticmaalaa koodeynta ku saleysan LSTM, waxayna leedahay tiro yar oo qarsoon, kadibna wuxuu raadinaa qeyb, kaasoo hoos u dhigi kara khasaarada kooxda. Xiriikhda afka (tusaale ahaan hadalka) waa inay qaybsadaan noocyada caadiga ah oo u sawiraa tababarka deynta si barbarka ah, waxaana tusnaa in barbaarintayada uu soo ogaado qaababkan marka lagu tababariyo qaababka telefoonka ama qalabka sawir ah. Aqoontayada aawadeed, waxaynu nahay nidaamka ugu horreeya ee aan la ilaalin karin si uu u kala qeybiyo sawirada hadalka.', 'kk': 'Біз бірінші LSTM сөздерді сұрау сегментшісін келтіріп, келтірілмеген сөздерді қабылдау үлгісі болып тастадық. Фонологиялық және синтактикалық бағдарламалардың көзі адамдардың жады шектерінде (Baddeley et al., 1998); сығылған кескіндер жадында алу және сақтау оңай. Бұл жады шектеуден келтірілген бөлшектерді үлгілеу үшін, жүйеміз LSTM негізінде жасырылған бірліктердің кішкентай саны жасырылған кодтамасын қолданады, содан кейін автокодтамасын жоғалу үшін сегментін іздейд Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular features that facilitate decoder performance compared to random segmentations, and we show that our learner finds these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics. Біздің білімімізге, бірінші жүйесіміз символдық және акустық сөйлеудің бірінші ретінде бөліктірілмеген жүйесі.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar den första obevakade LSTM-talssegmentaren som en kognitiv modell för förvärv av ord från osegmenterad input. Kognitiva fördomar mot fonologisk och syntaktisk förutsägbarhet i tal är rotade i begränsningarna av mänskligt minne (Baddeley et al., 1998). komprimerade representationer är lättare att förvärva och behålla i minnet. För att modellera de fördomar som införs av dessa minnesbegränsningar använder vårt system en LSTM-baserad encoder-avkodare med ett litet antal dolda enheter, och söker sedan efter en segmentering som minimerar autokodningsförlusten. Språkmässigt meningsfulla segment (t.ex. ord) bör dela regelbundna mönster av funktioner som underlättar avkodare prestanda jämfört med slumpmässiga segmenteringar, och vi visar att vår elev upptäcker dessa mönster när de tränas på antingen fonemsekvenser eller råakustik. Såvitt vi vet är vårt första helt obevakade system som kan segmentera både symboliska och akustiska representationer av tal.', 'ta': 'நாம் முதல் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத LSTM பேச்சு பிரிவாக்கி கொண்டு வருகிறோம் எதிர்பாராத உள்ளீடு பேச்சில் தொழில்நுட்ப மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு முற்றிலும் குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனைகள் மனித நினைவகத்தின் எல்லைகளில் வெளியே சுருக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்புகள் நினைவு இந்த நினைவகத்தின் எல்லைகளால் குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனைகளை மாற்ற, எங்கள் கணினி LSTM- அடிப்படையில் உள்ள குறியீட்டாளரை பயன்படுத்தும் சிறிய மறைந்த அலகுகளு குறிப்பில்லா துண்டுகளுக்கு ஒப்பிடும் குறியீட்டு செயலை பயன்படுத்தும் குணங்களின் வழக்கமான துண்டுகள் (உதாரணமாக வார்த்தைகள்) பங்கீடுகளை பங்கிட வேண்டும். குறிப்பிட் எங்கள் அறிவிற்கு, எங்கள் முதல் முழு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத அமைப்பு பேச்சின் குறியீடு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு பிரிக்க மு', 'ur': 'ہم پہلی غیر محفوظ LSTM سخنرانی سنگٹر کو ایک معلوم موڈل بناتے ہیں کہ کلمات کو غیر محفوظ وروت سے حاصل کرنا ہے. فانولوژیکی اور سینٹیکیسی پیش بینی کی طرف متوجہ ہونے کی غرض انسان یاد کے مقداروں میں (Baddeley et al., 1998) ہے۔ مضبوط نمونات یاد حاصل کرنے اور حفظ کرنے کے لئے آسان ہیں. یہ مہمانی محدودیت کے ذریعے معلوم ہونے کے لئے ہماری سیستم ایک LSTM-بنیاد encoding-decoder کو ایک چھوٹی تعداد مخفی یونیٹوں کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے، پھر ایک سیگنٹ کے لئے تلاش کرتا ہے جو اتوکوڈینگ خسارہ کو کم کرتا ہے. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner finds these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics. ہمارے علم کے لئے ہمارا پہلا کامل غیر قابل تھا کہ کلام کی نشانیاں اور آہستی نشانیاں جدائی کرسکیں۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu phát triển ngôn ngữ LSTM đầu tiên như một mô hình nhận thức của việc lấy từ từ ngữ không được khai. Khả năng dự đoán từ ngôn ngữ và pháp thuật trong ngôn ngữ là gốc rễ trong giới hạn của bộ nhớ con người (Badguey et al., 1999; Các biểu tượng bị nén dễ dàng lấy và lưu lại trong bộ nhớ. Để mô tả các tật xấu được tạo ra bởi những giới hạn của bộ nhớ này, hệ thống của chúng ta dùng bộ mã hóa dựa trên LSTM với một số đơn vị ẩn, rồi tìm kiếm một phân đoạn ít nhất để giảm tổn thất tự động. Đoạn có ý nghĩa về ngôn ngữ (v.d. từ) nên chia sẻ các mô hình thường xuyên của các tính năng giúp khả năng giải mã so với phân biệt ngẫu nhiên, và chúng tôi cho thấy người học trò sẽ phát hiện ra các mô hình này khi được rèn luyện trên các chuỗi ngữ hoặc âm nguyên tử. Theo chúng tôi biết, chúng tôi là hệ thống chưa được giám sát đầu tiên có khả năng phân tích cả biểu tượng và âm thanh của ngôn ngữ.', 'uz': "Biz birinchi tomonidan xavfsizlanmagan LSTM gapiruvchisi, notoʻgʻri kiritilmagan so'zlarni olish modeli deb hisoblanamiz. Talab qilingan fonologik va syntactik kutilgan chegaralari inson xotirasi chegaralari (Baddeley et al., 1998). kompyuterlar xotira olish va davomida ishlab chiqarish oson. To model the biases introduced by these memory limitations, our system uses an LSTM-based encoder-decoder with a small number of hidden units, then searches for a segmentation that minimizes autoencoding loss.  Lingvistika ma'lumot qismlari (m. g. soʻzlar) qoiday xususiyatlar shakllarini birlashtirish kerak. Tasodifiy qismlarga qodlash imkoniyatlariga foydalanish imkoniyatlariga foydalanishini foydalanishimiz mumkin. va biz o'qituvchimiz bu tugmalarni o'rganamiz, telefon seksiyatlarida yoki raqqamli acoustika o'rganish Bizning bilimizga bizning birinchi muvaffaqiyatli saqlab qolmagan tizimimiz gapiradigan symbol va aqlli tashkilotni ajratish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Представяме първия ненадзорен сегментатор на речта като когнитивен модел за придобиване на думи от несегментиран вход. Когнитивните пристрастия към фонологичната и синтактичната предсказуемост в речта се коренят в ограниченията на човешката памет (Baddeley et al., 1998); компресираните изображения са по-лесни за придобиване и задържане в паметта. За да моделираме отклоненията, въведени от тези ограничения на паметта, нашата система използва базиран кодер-декодер с малък брой скрити единици, след което търси сегментация, която минимизира загубата на автоматично кодиране. Лингвистично значимите сегменти (например думи) трябва да споделят редовни модели на функции, които улесняват изпълнението на декодирането в сравнение с случайни сегментации, и ние показваме, че нашият учащ открива тези модели, когато е обучен или върху фонетични последователности, или върху сурова акустика. Доколкото знаем, нашата е първата напълно неконтролирана система, способна да сегментира както символични, така и акустични изображения на речта.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer den første uopvågede LSTM talesegmenter som en kognitiv model for erhvervelse af ord fra usegmenteret input. Kognitive fordomme mod fonologisk og syntaktisk forudsigelighed i tale er rodfæstet i begrænsningerne i menneskelig hukommelse (Baddeley et al., 1998); komprimerede repræsentationer er lettere at erhverve og bevare i hukommelsen. For at modellere de fordele, der indføres af disse hukommelsesbegrænsninger, bruger vores system en LSTM-baseret encoder-dekoder med et lille antal skjulte enheder, derefter søger efter en segmentering, der minimerer autokodning tab. Lingvistisk meningsfulde segmenter (f.eks. ord) bør dele regelmæssige mønstre af funktioner, der letter dekoder ydeevne i forhold til tilfældige segmenteringer, og vi viser, at vores elever opdager disse mønstre, når de træner i enten fonemsekvenser eller rå akustik. Så vidt vi ved, er vores system det første helt uautoriserede system, der kan segmentere både symbolske og akustiske repræsentationer af tale.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de eerste LSTM spraaksegmenter zonder toezicht als een cognitief model van de verwerving van woorden uit ongesegmenteerde input. Cognitieve vooroordelen ten opzichte van fonologische en syntactische voorspelbaarheid in spraak zijn geworteld in de beperkingen van het menselijk geheugen (Baddeley et al., 1998); Gecomprimeerde representaties zijn gemakkelijker te verwerven en te bewaren in het geheugen. Om de biases die door deze geheugenbeperkingen worden geïntroduceerd te modelleren, gebruikt ons systeem een LSTM-gebaseerde encoder-decoder met een klein aantal verborgen eenheden en zoekt vervolgens naar een segmentatie die autocoderingsverlies minimaliseert. Taalkundig zinvolle segmenten (bijvoorbeeld woorden) moeten regelmatige patronen van functies delen die decoderprestaties vergemakkelijken in vergelijking met willekeurige segmentaties, en we laten zien dat onze leerling deze patronen ontdekt wanneer hij getraind wordt op foneemsequenties of ruwe akoestiek. Voor zover wij weten is ons systeem het eerste volledig onbeheerde systeem dat zowel symbolische als akoestische representaties van spraak kan segmenteren.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren den ersten unüberwachten LSTM Sprachsegmenter als kognitives Modell zur Erfassung von Wörtern aus unsegmentierter Eingabe. Kognitive Vorurteile in Bezug auf phonologische und syntaktische Vorhersagbarkeit in der Sprache wurzeln in den Grenzen des menschlichen Gedächtnisses (Baddeley et al., 1998); Komprimierte Darstellungen sind einfacher zu erfassen und im Speicher zu behalten. Um die durch diese Speicherbeschränkungen verursachten Verzerrungen zu modellieren, verwendet unser System einen LSTM-basierten Encoder-Decoder mit einer kleinen Anzahl von versteckten Einheiten und sucht dann nach einer Segmentierung, die Autokodierungsverluste minimiert. Sprachlich bedeutsame Segmente (z.B. Wörter) sollten regelmäßige Muster von Merkmalen teilen, die die Decoderleistung im Vergleich zu zufälligen Segmentierungen erleichtern, und wir zeigen, dass unsere Lernenden diese Muster entdecken, wenn sie entweder an Phonem-Sequenzen oder Rohakustik trainiert werden. Unserem Wissen nach ist unser System das erste völlig unbeaufsichtigte System, das sowohl symbolische als auch akustische Repräsentationen von Sprache segmentieren kann.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan segmenter pidato LSTM yang pertama yang tidak diawasi sebagai model kognitif untuk memperoleh kata-kata dari input yang tidak terpisah. Kebiasaan pengetahuan terhadap prediksibilitas fonologi dan sintaksi dalam pidato adalah puncak dalam batasan ingatan manusia (Baddeley et al., 1998); representation kompresi lebih mudah untuk diperoleh dan disimpan dalam ingatan. Untuk model biases yang diperkenalkan oleh batasan memori ini, sistem kita menggunakan koder-dekoder berdasarkan LSTM dengan sejumlah kecil unit tersembunyi, kemudian mencari segmen yang mengurangi kehilangan pengekodan otomatis. Segmen yang bermakna secara lingwistik (contohnya kata-kata) harus berbagi pola biasa fitur yang memudahkan prestasi dekoder dibandingkan dengan segmen acak, dan kami menunjukkan bahwa pelajar kami menemukan pola ini ketika dilatih dalam urutan phoneme atau akustik mentah. Menurut pengetahuan kita, kita adalah sistem pertama yang tidak diawasi sepenuhnya untuk mampu segmen kedua-duanya representation simbolik dan akustik dari pidato.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo prvi neodređeni LSTM govorni segmenter kao kognitivni model prikupljanja riječi iz neodređenog ulaza. Kognitivne predrasude prema fonološkoj i sintaktičkoj predvidljivosti govora korijenjene su u ograničenjima ljudskog pamćenja (Baddeley et al., 1998.); kompresirane predstave su lakše prikupiti i zadržati pamćenje. Da bi modelirali predrasude uvedene ovim ograničenjima pamćenja, naš sustav koristi koder-koder na LSTM-u sa malim brojem skrivenih jedinica, a zatim traži segmentaciju koja minimizira gubitak autokodiranja. Lingistički značajni segmenti (npr. riječi) trebaju podijeliti redovne obrasce karakteristika koje olakšavaju učinkovitost dekodera u usporedbi s nasumičnim segmentacijama, i pokazujemo da naš učitelj otkriva te obrasce kada je obučena na bilo telefonske sekvence ili sirove akustike. Za naše znanje, naš je prvi potpuno neodređeni sustav koji će moći dijeliti simboličke i akustičke predstave govora.', 'fa': 'ما اولین بخش سخنرانی LSTM را به عنوان مدل شناخته\u200cای از خریدن کلمات از ورودی غیرقابل توجه می\u200cکنیم. در محدودیت حافظه انسان (Baddeley et al., 1998) پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای شناخته\u200cکننده به سوی پیش\u200cبینی تلفن\u200cشناسی و سنتاکتیک در صحبت ریشه می\u200cشوند. نمایش\u200cهای مجبور شده برای خریدن و نگه داشتن در حافظه آسانتر است. برای مدل سابقه\u200cهایی که توسط این محدودیت حافظه معرفی شده\u200cاند، سیستم ما از یک رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cدهنده\u200cکننده\u200cی LSTM با تعداد اندکی از واحدهای مخفی استفاده می\u200cکند، سپس دنبال یک بخش\u200cبندی که از دست دادن رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار کمترین می\u200cکن بخش\u200cهای معنی لینگ\u200cاساسی (مثال کلمات) باید الگوهای معمولی از ویژه\u200cهای معمولی را در مقایسه با بخش\u200cهای تصادفی به اشتراک بگذاریم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که دانش\u200cآموز ما این الگوها را در حالی که روی either رده\u200cهای تلفنی یا آکوستیک\u200cهای خالی آموزش می\u200cشود کشف می\u200cکند. برای دانش ما، اولین سیستم کاملا غیرقابل توجه است که می تواند هر دو نمایش\u200cهای نمایش\u200cشناسی و آکوستیک سخنرانی را قطع کند.', 'af': "Ons stel die eerste onverondersteunde LSTM spraak segmenteerder as 'n kognitiewe model van die aanvang van woorde van onbekende invoer. Kognitiewe voorskou teen fonologiese en sintaktiese voorskoubaarheid in spreek word wortel in die beperkings van menslike geheue (Baddeley et al., 1998); Gekomprimeerde voorstellings is makliker om in geheue te kry en hou. Om die voorskrifte te model deur hierdie geheue beperkings, gebruik ons stelsel 'n LSTM-gebaseerde enkoder-dekoder met' n klein nommer van verborge eenhede, soek dan na 'n segmentasie wat minimiseer outokondering verlies. Linguistically betekende segmente (bv. woorde) moet gewone patrone van funksies deel wat dekoder prestasie in vergelyking met willekeurige segmentasies moet maak, en ons wys dat ons leerder hierdie patrone ontdek wanneer opgelei word op óf foneme sekwensies of raai akusties. Op ons kennis is ons die eerste volledig onverwerp stelsel om simboliese en akustiese voorstellings van spreek te segmenteer.", 'ko': '우리는 단락 입력에서 단어를 얻지 못한 최초의 인지 모델로 감시가 없는 LSTM 음성 절분기를 제시했다.음성과 문법에 대한 예측 가능한 인지적 편견은 인류 기억의 한계성에 뿌리를 둔다(Baddeley 등, 1998).압축은 메모리에 쉽게 가져오고 저장할 수 있음을 나타낸다.이러한 메모리 제한이 가져오는 편차를 모의하기 위해, 우리 시스템은 LSTM 기반 인코더 - 디코더를 사용하고, 소량의 숨겨진 단원을 가지고 있으며, 자동 인코딩 손실을 최소화하는 세그먼트를 검색합니다.무작위 분사에 비해 언어적 의미를 가진 분사(예를 들어 단어)는 디코더의 성능을 촉진하는 규칙적 특징 모델을 가져야 한다. 우리는 우리의 학습자가 음소 서열이나 원시 성학에서 훈련을 할 때 이러한 모델을 발견할 수 있음을 나타낸다.우리가 아는 바에 의하면 우리의 시스템은 음성의 기호와 성학적 표시를 분할할 수 있는 최초의 완전 무감독 시스템이다.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim segmenterin e parë të fjalimit të LSTM-së pa mbikqyrje si një model kognitiv i blerjes së fjalëve nga input të pashpejtuar. Paragjykimet e njohura drejt parashikueshmërisë fonologjike dhe sintaktike në fjalim janë të rrënjës në kufizimet e kujtesës njerëzore (Baddeley et al., 1998); përfaqësimet e shtypura janë më të lehta për të fituar dhe mbajtur në kujtim. Për të modeluar paragjykimet e futura nga këto kufizime të kujtesës, sistemi ynë përdor një kodues-dekoder bazuar në LSTM me një numër të vogël njësive të fshehura, pastaj kërkon për një segmentim që minimizon humbjen e autokodimit. Segmentet me kuptim gjuhësor (për shembull fjalët) duhet të ndajnë modele të rregullta të karakteristikave që lehtësojnë performancën e dekoderit në krahasim me segmentimet e rastësishme dhe ne tregojmë se mësuesi ynë zbulon këto modele kur trajnohet ose në sekuenca telefonike ose akustikë të papërpunuar. Për njohurinë tonë, e jona është sistemi i parë plotësisht i pazgjidhur që mund të segmentojë si përfaqësimet simbolike ashtu edhe akustike të fjalës.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha mtangazaji wa kwanza wa hotuba ya LSTM usio na uhakika kama mtindo wa ujuzi wa kupata maneno kutoka kwenye input usio na uhakika. Upendeleo wa kitambulisho dhidi ya uwezekano wa utabiri wa kifolojia na ushirikiano katika hotuba umejikita kwenye vizuizi vya kumbukumbu ya binadamu (Baddeley et al., 1998); uwakilishaji walio na umuhimu ni rahisi kupata na kubaki kumbukumbu. Ili kuweka mfano wa upendeleo ulioanzishwa na vizuizi hivi vya kumbukumbu, mfumo wetu unatumia kodi-decodi yenye msingi wa LSTM yenye idadi ndogo ya vifaa vilivyofichikwa, na kisha kutafuta sehemu ambazo hupunguza hasara ya kujikodi. Sehemu zenye maana ya lugha (kwa mfano maneno) inapaswa kusambaza miundo ya mara kwa mara ambazo zinasaidia utendaji wa decodi ukilinganisha na vipengele vya urahisi, na tunaonyesha kuwa mwanafunzi wetu hugundua mifano haya pale alipofundishwa katika mfumo wa simu au vifua vya vifaa vya vibaya. Kwa ufahamu wetu, ni mfumo wa kwanza usio na uhakika wa kulingana na uwezo wa kugawanya wawakilisho wa ishara na maarufu wa hotuba.', 'am': 'የመጀመሪያውን ያልጠበቀው LSTM ንግግር ማውጣት ቃላትን ከሀይፋ ውስጥ ለማግኘት ምሳሌ እናቀርባለን፡፡ በንግግር ላይ የፎሎጂ እና የስናታዊ ትንቢት ለመቀበል የሚቃወሙት ውጤቶች የሰው ማስታወስ ግንኙነት (Baddeley et al., 1998)፤ ተጨማሪ መልዕክቶች ማስታወስን ማግኘት ማቅረብ ቀላል ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህን ማስታወሻ ግንኙነት ለመምረጥ፣ ስርዓታችን የተሰወረ ጥቂት የክፍል ክፍል ሆኖ LSTM-based የሆኑት የሆኑት የኮድ ኮድዶር ይጠቅማል፡፡ Linguistic meaningful segments (e.g. ቃላት) የተመሳሳይ የድምፅ አካባቢ ምርጫዎችን በተቃራኒ እውቀት እንዲያበረክቱ ያስፈልጋል፤ እናም ተማሪዎቻችን በፎልክ sequences ወይም ቀይ ስኮት በተማረ ጊዜ እነዚህ ዓይነቶችን እንደማግኘት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ለእውቀታችን የመጀመሪያው ያልጠበቀው ስርዓት የንግግር መልዕክትንና አካባቢ መልዕክቶችን ለመለየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք առաջին անվերահսկված LSMT խոսքի սեգմետրը որպես ճանաչողական մոդել բառերի ստանալու անբացատրված ներմուծից: Խոսքի ֆոնոլոգիական և սինտակտիկ կանխատեսելիության հանդեպ ճանաչողական կողմնականությունները հիմնված են մարդկային հիշողության սահմանափակումներում (Բադդելի և այլն., 1998 թ.), ընկճված պատկերացումները ավելի հեշտ են հիշողության մեջ ձեռք բերելու և պահելու: Այս հիշողության սահմանափակումների միջոցով ներկայացված կողմնականությունների մոդելավորման համար մեր համակարգը օգտագործում է LSMT-ի հիմնված կոդեր-կոդեր, որը ունի մի փոքր քանակությամբ թաքնված միավորներ, հետո փնտրում է սեգրեմացիա, որը նվազեց Լեզվաբանական իմաստալից սեգմերները (օրինակ բառերը) պետք է կիսվեն առանձնահատկությունների սովորական կաղապարներով, որոնք օգնում են դեկոդերի արտադրողականությունը համեմատած պատահական սեգմերացիաների հետ, և մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր ուսանողը հայտնաբերում է այս կաղապարները, երբ ուսուցանում է կամ հե Ինչպես գիտենք, մեր առաջին ամբողջովին անվերահսկված համակարգը է, որը կարող է բաժանել խոսքի սիմվոլիկ և ձայնային ներկայացումները:', 'tr': "Biz ilkinji garşylanmadyk LSTM söz segmenteri goýulmadyk girişden sözleri alan tanyş nusgasy hökmünde görkeýäris Fonolojik we sintaktik çaklama öňünde bilinç terjesi adamyň yadynyň muglarynda (Baddeley et al., 1998); sıkıştırılmış örnekler hafıza elde etmek ve saklamak kolaydır. Bu hatlar üçin girişmiş faýllary nusgala etmek üçin, sistemimiz LSTM'e tabanly kodlemek üçin kiçi bir sany gizlenen birimler bilen ullanýar, soňra awtomatik kodlemek ýitilmegini azaltýan bir segmentasiýa gözleýär. Çizgisel wajyply bölekler (mysal sözler) howply bir bölüme karşılaştyrmak üçin düzgün hatlary paylaşdyrmaly we öwrenişimiz phonem dizinlerinde ya da çizgi akustiklerde bu nusgalary öwrenip otyrýandygyny g örkezýäris. Bilişimize göre, bizim ilk tamamlanmamış sistemimiz hem simbolik hem aktik ifadelerini bölüşebilir.", 'az': 'Biz ilk müəyyən edilməmiş LSTM sözlər segmentçisini müəyyən edilməmiş sözlərin alınmasının bilikli modeli olaraq göstəririk. Fonolojik və sintaktik tədbirliklərə qarşı bilikli tədbirlər insan yadına salmağının sınırlarında (Baddeley et al., 1998). sıkıştırılmış göstəricilər yadına almaq və saxlamaq daha asandır. Bu hafıza sınırları ilə təşkil edilən tədbirləri modelləşdirmək üçün sistemimiz LSTM tabanlı kodlayıcı-kodlayıcını gizli bir sayı ilə istifadə edir, sonra avtomatik kodlayıcı zəifləyici segmentasyonu axtarır. Linguistik anlamlı segmentlər (məsələn sözlər) müxtəlif segmentlərlə karşılaşdırmaq üçün dekoder performansını asanlaşdıran düzgün fərqli örtükləri paylaşmalıdır. Biz öyrənənənimiz bu örtükləri fonem seçmələrində və ya sərt akustiklərdə təhsil edildiyi zaman keçmişdir. Bilməyimiz üçün, bizim ilk tamamlanmamış sistemimiz sözlərin simbolik və akustik ifadələrini bölüşdürə bilər.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo prvi neodređeni LSTM govorni segmenter kao kognitivni model prikupljanja riječi iz neodređenog ulaza. Kognitivne predrasude prema fonološkoj i sintaktičkoj predvidljivosti govora korijenjene su u ograničenjima ljudskog pamćenja (Baddeley et al., 1998); kompresirane predstave su lakše za usvajanje i zadržavanje pamćenja. Da bismo modelili predrasude uvedene ovim ograničenjima pamćenja, naš sistem koristi koder na LSTM-u sa malim brojem skrivenih jedinica, a zatim traži segmentaciju koja minimizira gubitak autokodiranja. Lingistički značajni segmenti (npr. riječi) trebaju podijeliti redovne obrasce karakteristika koje olakšavaju učinkovitost dekodera u usporedbi sa nasumičnim segmentacijama, i pokazujemo da naš učitelj otkriva te obrasce kada je obučeno na ili na telefonske sekvence ili sirovoj akustici. Za naše znanje, naš je prvi potpuno neodređeni sistem koji bi mogao da segmentira simboličke i akustičke predstave govora.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রথম অরক্ষিত এলস্টিম ভাষণের বিভাগ বিভাগের সামনে উপস্থিত করছি অসমর্থিত ইনপুট থেকে শব্দ পাওয়া যাবার এক অজ্ঞাত মডেল হিস ভাষণের প্রতি প্রযুক্তিগত এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক ভবিষ্যতের বিরুদ্ধে চিন্তিত বিরোধীতা মানুষের স্মৃতির সীমাবদ্ধ (বাদ্দ সম্পূর্ণ প্রতিনিধিগুলো স্মৃতি পেতে এবং রাখতে সহজ। এই স্মৃতি সীমাবদ্ধতা দ্বারা প্রকাশিত বৈষম্যগুলোকে মডেল করার জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেম একটি এলসিএম-ভিত্তিক এনকোডার-ডিকোডার ব্যবহার করে সংখ্যা লুকিয় লিঙ্গিতিকভাবে অর্থহীন অংশ (উদাহরণস্বরূপ শব্দ) নিয়মিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য শেয়ার করা উচিত যেগুলো নির্দিষ্ট বিভাগের তুলনায় ডিকোডারের প্রদর্শনের সুযোগ দেয়, আর আমরা দ আমাদের জ্ঞানের জন্য, আমাদের প্রথম অরক্ষিত সিস্টেম, যারা বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিভক্ত করতে পারে।', 'cs': 'Představujeme první bez dozoru LSTM řečový segmenter jako kognitivní model získávání slov z nesegmentovaného vstupu. Kognitivní zaujatosti vůči fonologické a syntaktické předvídatelnosti řeči jsou zakořeněny v omezeních lidské paměti (Baddeley et al., 1998); komprimované reprezentace jsou snadnější získat a uchovávat v paměti. Pro modelování zkreslení zavedených těmito omezeními paměti používá náš systém kodér-dekodér založený na LSTM s malým počtem skrytých jednotek a pak hledá segmentaci, která minimalizuje ztrátu autokódování. Jazykově smysluplné segmenty (např. slova) by měly sdílet pravidelné vzorce funkcí, které usnadňují výkon dekódování ve srovnání s náhodnými segmentacemi, a ukazujeme, že náš žák objeví tyto vzorce, když trénuje buď na fonémových sekvencích nebo na surové akustice. Podle našeho vědomí je náš systém první plně bez dohledu, který dokáže segmentovat symbolické i akustické reprezentace řeči.', 'et': 'Esitleme esimest järelevalveta LSTM kõnesigmenteerijat kui kognitiivset mudelit sõnade omandamiseks segmenteerimata sisendist. Kognitiivsed eelarvamused fonoloogilise ja süntaktilise prognoositavuse poole kõnes on seotud inimmälu piirangutega (Baddeley et al., 1998); tihendatud esitusi on lihtsam omandada ja mälus hoida. Nende mälupiirangutega kaasnevate kallakute modelleerimiseks kasutab meie süsteem LSTM-põhist kodeerijat-dekoodrit, millel on väike arv peidetud ühikuid, seejärel otsib segmenteerimist, mis minimeerib automaatkodeerimise kadu. Keeleliselt tähenduslikud segmendid (nt sõnad) peaksid jagama regulaarseid funktsioonide mustreid, mis hõlbustavad dekodeerimist võrreldes juhuslike segmenteerimistega, ja me näitame, et meie õppija avastab need mustrid kas foneemide järjestuste või toore akustika koolitamisel. Meie teada on meie esimene täielikult järelevalveta süsteem, mis suudab segmenteerida nii sümboolseid kui ka akustilisi kõnerepresentatsioone.', 'fi': 'Esitämme ensimmäisen valvomattoman LSTM-puhesegmentorin kognitiivisena mallina sanojen hankkimiseen segmentoimattomasta syötteestä. Kognitiiviset ennakkoluulot puheen fonologiseen ja syntaktiseen ennustettavuuteen perustuvat ihmisen muistin rajoituksiin (Baddeley et al., 1998). pakatut esitykset on helpompi hankkia ja säilyttää muistissa. Näiden muistirajoitusten aiheuttamien vääristymien mallintamiseen järjestelmämme käyttää LSTM-pohjaista kooderi-dekooderia, jossa on pieni määrä piilotettuja yksiköitä, ja etsii sitten segmentointia, joka minimoi automaattisen koodauksen menetyksen. Kielellisesti merkityksellisten segmenttien (esim. sanojen) tulisi jakaa säännöllisiä piirteitä, jotka helpottavat dekooderin suorituskykyä satunnaisiin segmentointiin verrattuna, ja osoitamme, että oppijamme löytää nämä kuviot, kun hän on koulutettu joko foneemiseksvensseihin tai raakakustiikkaan. Tietojemme mukaan meidän järjestelmämme on ensimmäinen täysin valvomaton järjestelmä, joka pystyy segmentoimaan sekä symbolisia että akustisia puheesityksiä.', 'ca': "Presentam el primer segmentador de discurs LSTM sense supervisió com un model cognitiu de l'adquisició de paraules a partir d'entrada no segmentada. Els prejudicis cognitius cap a la previsibilitat fonològica i sinàctica del discurs estan arrelats en les limitacions de la memòria humana (Baddeley et al., 1998); compressed representations are easier to acquire and retain in memory.  Per modelar les tendències introduïdes per aquestes limitacions de memòria, el nostre sistema utilitza un codificador basat en LSTM amb un petit nombre d'unitats amagades i busca una segmentació que minimitzi la pèrdua d'autocodificació. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner discovers these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics.  Segons el nostre coneixement, el nostre és el primer sistema sense supervisió que pot segmentar les representacions simbòlicas i acústiques de la paraula.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo prvi nenadzorovan segmentator govora LSTM kot kognitivni model pridobivanja besed iz nesegmentiranega vnosa. Kognitivne pristranskosti k fonološki in sintaktični predvidljivosti govora izvirajo iz omejitev človeškega spomina (Baddeley et al., 1998); stisnjene predstavitve so lažje pridobiti in ohraniti v spominu. Za modeliranje pristranskosti, ki jih prinašajo te omejitve pomnilnika, naš sistem uporablja kodirnik-dekoder na osnovi LSTM z majhnim številom skritih enot, nato išče segmentacijo, ki zmanjšuje izgubo samokodiranja. Jezikovno pomembni segmenti (npr. besede) bi morali imeti redne vzorce funkcij, ki olajšajo delovanje dekodiranja v primerjavi z naključnimi segmenti, in pokažemo, da naš učenec te vzorce odkrije, ko se uči bodisi na fonemskih sekvencah bodisi na surovi akustiki. Po našem znanju je naš prvi popolnoma nenadzorovan sistem, ki lahko segmentira simbolične in akustične reprezentacije govora.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da farkon da ba'a tsare LSM da aka yi shi ba kamar misalin kognitive na samo da za'a sami maganar daga injistan da ba'a tsare ba. Kognitive aspects against folojical and syntactic can prophesy in magana are sarated in the time of memory of man (badbadbadly et al., 1998). compressed representations are easier to acquire and retain in memory.  To, don ka motsa surar da aka farata wannan tsarin hukar tuna, na'urarmu yana amfani da koda-kode-na LSSM a kan kwamfyuta ƙarami kaɗan da aka ɓõye, sa'an nan kuma ana neman wani segment da ke ƙara hasara farat-kodi. KCharselect unicode block name Ga saninmu, kanmu ne na farkon na'urar da ba'a tsare shi ba, yana iya iya raba misalin ayuka da haske.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk tanggal pergambar uwong Bilih tanggal metu ana karo perbudhakan kelas nang sesorahan lan pakan sengatik (BadDeley et al, 1997). representation Digawe Linguistically means segments (e.g. words) should share Regular patterns of parameters that help decoder Awakdhéwé, awak dhéwé iki kabèh saben nggawe sistem sing ora bisa seperakan karo hal-hal sing dikarolan simbol lan akustik dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את סגמנר הנאום הראשון ללא השגחה של LSTM כדוגמנית קוגניטיבית של הרכישה של מילים מהכניסה בלתי מוחלטת. היחידות הכירתיות כלפי צפוי פונולוגי וסינטקטי בנאום שורשים בגבלות הזיכרון האנושי (Baddeley et al., 1998); מייצגים מודחפים קלים יותר להשיג ולשמור בזיכרון. כדי לדוגמא את ההתמחות המוציאות על ידי הגבלות הזיכרון הללו, המערכת שלנו משתמשת בקודר-קידוד מבוסס על LSTM עם מספר קטן של יחידות חבויות, ואז מחפשת סגמנציה שמפחית את אובדן הקוד האוטומטי. חלקים משמעותיים בלשונית (למשל מילים) צריכים לחלוק דפוסים רגילים של תכונות שמקלים ביצועי הפיתוח בהשוואה לחלקים אקראיים, ואנחנו מראים שללמדנו מגלה את הדפוסים האלה כאשר מאומנים על רצפי טלפונים או אקוסטיקה ראויה. לדעתנו, שלנו היא המערכת הראשונה ללא השגחה, שיכולה לחלק את מייצגות הדיבור הסימבוליות והאקוסטיות.', 'bo': 'We present the first unsupervised LSTM speech segmenter as a cognitive model of the acquisition of words from unsegmented input. Cognitive biases toward phonological and syntactic predictability in speech are rooted in the limitations of human memory (Baddeley et al., 1998);  མཇུག་བསྡུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྟོན་བཤད་ནི་དྲན་འཛིན་ནང་དུ་ཉར་འཇོག་བྱེད་ན་ལས་སླ་ངམ་ཞིག To model the biases introduced by these memory limitations, our system uses an LSTM-based encoder-decoder with a small number of hidden units, then searches for a segmentation that minimizes autoencoding loss. Linguistically meaningful segments (e.g. words) should share regular patterns of features that facilitate decoder performance in comparison to random segmentations, and we show that our learner discovers these patterns when trained on either phoneme sequences or raw acoustics. ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་ཤེས་དུ་ང་ཚོ་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'Speaking, Seeing, Understanding : Correlating semantic models with conceptual representation in the brain', 'ar': 'التحدث ، الرؤية ، الفهم: ربط النماذج الدلالية مع التمثيل المفاهيمي في الدماغ', 'fr': 'Parler, voir, comprendre\xa0: corréler les modèles sémantiques avec la représentation conceptuelle dans le cerveau', 'es': 'Hablar, ver, entender: correlacionar los modelos semánticos con la representación conceptual en el cerebro', 'pt': 'Falando, vendo, entendendo: correlacionando modelos semânticos com representação conceitual no cérebro', 'ja': '話す、見る、理解：意味モデルと脳内の概念的表現との相関', 'zh': '言,视语义,与大脑之大略相关也', 'hi': 'बोलना, देखना, समझना: मस्तिष्क में वैचारिक प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ शब्दार्थ मॉडल को सहसंबद्ध करना', 'ru': 'Говорить, видеть, понимать: корреляция семантических моделей с концептуальным представлением в мозге', 'ga': 'Labhairt, Breathnú, Tuiscint: Samhlacha shéimeantacha a chomhghaolú le hionadaíocht choincheapúil san inchinn', 'hu': 'Beszélés, látás, megértés: Szemantikai modellek összefüggése az agyban a fogalmi ábrázolással', 'el': 'Μιλώντας, βλέποντας, κατανοώντας: συσχέτιση σημασιολογικών μοντέλων με εννοιολογική αναπαράσταση στον εγκέφαλο', 'ka': 'დჲგჲპსგაŒვ, გთევŒვ, პაჱბთპაŒვ: ჟვმანრთფნთ მჲევლთ კჲპვკრთპაŒვ ჟჲ კჲნუვკრსუთალნთ ოპვეჟრაგაŒვ გჲ მჲჱყკა', 'kk': 'Сөйлесу, көру, түсіну: мидындағы концептуалды түсіну үлгілерін түзету', 'it': 'Parlare, Vedere, Capire: Correlare modelli semantici con rappresentazione concettuale nel cervello', 'ms': 'Bercakap, Melihat, Memahami: Berkaitan model semantik dengan perwakilan konseptual dalam otak', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നത്, കാണുന്നത്, മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു:', 'mk': 'Зборувајќи, гледајќи, разбирајќи: Корелација семантични модели со концептуална претстава во мозокот', 'mt': 'Il-kelma, il-vista, il-fehim: Il-korrelazzjoni ta’ mudelli semantiċi mar-rappreżentanza kunċettwali fil-moħħ', 'lt': 'Kalbėjimas, matymas, supratimas: susiję semantiniai modeliai su koncepciniu atstovavimu smegenyse', 'mn': 'Болоод, харах, ойлгох: тархинд ойлголттой загварыг засах', 'pl': 'Mówienie, widzenie, zrozumienie: Korelacja modeli semantycznych z reprezentacją koncepcyjną w mózgu', 'no': 'Snøk, ser, forståking: Korrigerer semantiske modeller med konseptuelle representasjon i hjernen', 'ro': 'Vorbire, văzure, înțelegere: Corelarea modelelor semantice cu reprezentarea conceptuală în creier', 'sr': 'Govoreći, videti, razumeti: koriđivanje semantičkih modela sa konceptualnim predstavljanjem u mozgu', 'si': 'කතා කරන්න, දකින්න, තේරුම් ගන්න: සෙමැන්ටික් මෝඩල් එක්ක සාමාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය සමග සංවේදනය', 'so': 'Hadaynta, aragshada, waxgarashada: Isku xiriirta noocyada semantika ee ku saabsan aragtida maanka', 'sv': 'Tala, se, förstå: Korrigera semantiska modeller med konceptuell representation i hjärnan', 'ta': 'பேசுவது, பார்த்தல், புரிந்து கொள்வது: மூளையில் உள்ள நினைவுக்குறிப்புரைய மாதிரிகளை இணைக்கிறது', 'ur': 'بولنے، دیکھنے، سمجھنے: مغز میں مضبوط نمونے کے ساتھ سیمانٹی نمونے درست کرنا', 'uz': 'Speaking, Seeing, Understanding: Correlating semantic models with conceptual representation in the brain', 'vi': 'Nói chuyện, Thấy, Hiểu biết: Chuyển đổi ngữ pháp với trình bày khái niệm trong não', 'bg': 'Говорене, виждане, разбиране: Съответствие на семантични модели с концептуално представяне в мозъка', 'da': 'Taler, ser, forståelse: Korrelation semantiske modeller med konceptuel repræsentation i hjernen', 'nl': 'Spreken, zien, begrijpen: semantische modellen correleren met conceptuele representatie in de hersenen', 'hr': 'Govoreći, vidjeti, razumijeti: koriđivanje semantičkih modela sa konceptualnom predstavljanjem u mozgu', 'ko': '말, 보기, 이해: 의미 모델을 대뇌의 개념 표징과 연결시킨다', 'de': 'Sprechen, Sehen, Verstehen: Korrelation semantischer Modelle mit konzeptueller Repräsentation im Gehirn', 'id': 'Berbicara, Melihat, Memahami: Berkait dengan model semantis dengan representation konseptual di otak', 'fa': 'صحبت کردن، دیدن، درک کردن: اصلاح مدلهای سیمانتیک با نمایش نظریه در مغز', 'tr': 'Konuşmak, Görümek, anlamak:', 'sw': 'Akizungumza, Kuona, Kuelewa: Kuhusiana na mifano ya kishindano na uwakilishi wa dhana katika ubongo', 'af': 'Praat, sien, verstaan: Korrigeer semantiese modele met konseptieële voorstelling in die brein', 'sq': 'Duke folur, parë, kuptuar: lidhje me modelet semantike me përfaqësimin konceptual në tru', 'hy': 'Speaking, Seeing, Understanding: Correlating semantic models with conceptual representation in the brain', 'az': 'Konuşmaq, Görünmək, Anlaşılmak: beyninin fikirləşməsi ilə semantik modelləri düzəltmək', 'am': 'ሲናገር፣ እያየሁ፣ ማስተዋል፣ በአእምሮ ውስጥ የስሜንቲካ ምሳሌዎችን በመቀላቀል', 'bn': 'কথা বলছি, দেখছি, বুঝতে পারছি: মস্তিষ্কের ধারণার প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট মডেল', 'bs': 'Govoreći, vidjeti, razumijeti: koriđivanje semantičkih modela sa konceptualnim predstavljanjem u mozgu', 'ca': 'Parlant, veure, entendre: Correlacionar models semàntics amb representació conceptual al cervell', 'cs': 'Mluvení, vidění, porozumění: Korelace sémantických modelů s konceptuální reprezentací v mozku', 'et': 'Rääkimine, nägemine, mõistmine: semantiliste mudelite korrelatsioon kontseptuaalse esitusega ajus', 'fi': 'Puhuminen, näkeminen, ymmärtäminen: semanttisten mallien korrelointi käsitteelliseen esitykseen aivoissa', 'jv': 'Jucah, Dahun, Tulung: Dahun model semanti sing gagal batasan kelangan', 'he': 'מדברים, רואים, מבינים: קשר מודלים סמנטיים עם מייצג מושג במוח', 'ha': 'Inayi magana, Ana gani, Ana fahimta: Akwai na yi husũma motsi na semantiki da mai mai kyau ga mataimaki a cikin ubũcin', 'sk': 'Govorjenje, videnje, razumevanje: Korelacija semantičnih modelov s konceptualno reprezentacijo v možganih', 'bo': 'སྐད་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་མཐོང་ན། ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་གྱི་མིང་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་འཕགས་རིས་མཐོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Research in computational semantics is increasingly guided by our understanding of human semantic processing. However, semantic models are typically studied in the context of natural language processing system performance. In this paper, we present a systematic evaluation and comparison of a range of widely-used, state-of-the-art semantic models in their ability to predict patterns of conceptual representation in the human brain. Our results provide new insights both for the design of computational semantic models and for further research in cognitive neuroscience.', 'ar': 'يسترشد البحث في الدلالات الحسابية بشكل متزايد من خلال فهمنا للمعالجة الدلالية للإنسان. ومع ذلك ، عادة ما يتم دراسة النماذج الدلالية في سياق أداء نظام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم تقييمًا منهجيًا ومقارنة لمجموعة من النماذج الدلالية الأكثر استخدامًا والحديثة في قدرتها على التنبؤ بأنماط التمثيل المفاهيمي في الدماغ البشري. تقدم نتائجنا رؤى جديدة لتصميم النماذج الدلالية الحسابية ولإجراء مزيد من البحث في علم الأعصاب الإدراكي.', 'es': 'La investigación en semántica computacional se guía cada vez más por nuestra comprensión del procesamiento semántico humano. Sin embargo, los modelos semánticos se estudian normalmente en el contexto del rendimiento del sistema de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, presentamos una evaluación y comparación sistemáticas de una gama de modelos semánticos de vanguardia ampliamente utilizados en su capacidad para predecir patrones de representación conceptual en el cerebro humano. Nuestros resultados proporcionan nuevos conocimientos tanto para el diseño de modelos semánticos computacionales como para futuras investigaciones en neurociencia cognitiva.', 'pt': 'A pesquisa em semântica computacional é cada vez mais guiada por nossa compreensão do processamento semântico humano. No entanto, os modelos semânticos são tipicamente estudados no contexto do desempenho do sistema de processamento de linguagem natural. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma avaliação sistemática e comparação de uma série de modelos semânticos de última geração amplamente utilizados em sua capacidade de prever padrões de representação conceitual no cérebro humano. Nossos resultados fornecem novos insights tanto para o design de modelos semânticos computacionais quanto para novas pesquisas em neurociência cognitiva.', 'fr': "La recherche en sémantique computationnelle est de plus en plus guidée par notre compréhension du traitement sémantique humain. Cependant, les modèles sémantiques sont généralement étudiés dans le contexte des performances du système de traitement du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous présentons une évaluation et une comparaison systématiques d'une gamme de modèles sémantiques de pointe largement utilisés dans leur capacité à prédire des modèles de représentation conceptuelle dans le cerveau humain. Nos résultats fournissent de nouvelles informations à la fois pour la conception de modèles sémantiques computationnels et pour des recherches plus poussées en neurosciences cognitives.", 'ja': '計算意味論の研究は、人間の意味論的処理の理解によってますます導かれています。しかしながら、意味モデルは、典型的には、自然言語処理システムのパフォーマンスの文脈で研究される。本論文では、ヒトの脳における概念表現のパターンを予測する能力において、幅広く使用されている最先端の意味モデルの範囲の体系的な評価と比較を提示する。私たちの結果は、計算意味モデルの設計と認知神経科学のさらなる研究の両方に新しい洞察を提供します。', 'hi': 'कम्प्यूटेशनल शब्दार्थ में अनुसंधान तेजी से मानव शब्दार्थ प्रसंस्करण की हमारी समझ से निर्देशित है। हालांकि, शब्दार्थ मॉडल आमतौर पर प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण प्रणाली के प्रदर्शन के संदर्भ में अध्ययन किया जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम मानव मस्तिष्क में वैचारिक प्रतिनिधित्व के पैटर्न की भविष्यवाणी करने की उनकी क्षमता में व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले, अत्याधुनिक शब्दार्थ मॉडल की एक श्रृंखला का एक व्यवस्थित मूल्यांकन और तुलना प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम कम्प्यूटेशनल शब्दार्थ मॉडल के डिजाइन के लिए और संज्ञानात्मक तंत्रिका विज्ञान में आगे के शोध के लिए दोनों नई अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं।', 'zh': '计语义学之治益多,而受语义于人。 然语义模常于自然语言上下文中研究之。 其在本文,系统地估较广用、先进语义模,以占人脑之大概。 臣等考为算语义模范之设,神经科学者更究新见。', 'ru': 'Исследования в области вычислительной семантики все больше опираются на наше понимание человеческой семантической обработки. Однако семантические модели обычно изучаются в контексте производительности системы обработки естественного языка. В данной работе мы представляем систематическую оценку и сравнение ряда широко используемых, современных семантических моделей в их способности прогнозировать закономерности концептуального представления в мозге человека. Наши результаты предоставляют новые идеи как для разработки вычислительных семантических моделей, так и для дальнейших исследований в когнитивной нейробиологии.', 'ga': 'Tá taighde sa tséimeantaic ríomhaireachtúil á threorú níos mó ag ár dtuiscint ar phróiseáil shéimeantach dhaonna. Mar sin féin, déantar staidéar ar shamhlacha shéimeantacha de ghnáth i gcomhthéacs fheidhmíocht an chórais phróiseála teanga nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair meastóireacht agus comparáid chórasach ar raon de shamhlacha shéimeantacha úrscothacha a úsáidtear go forleathan ina gcumas patrúin ionadaíochta coincheapa san inchinn dhaonna a thuar. Soláthraíonn ár dtorthaí léargais nua maidir le dearadh samhlacha ríomha shéimeantacha agus le haghaidh tuilleadh taighde ar néareolaíocht chognaíoch.', 'el': 'Η έρευνα στην υπολογιστική σημασιολογία καθοδηγείται όλο και περισσότερο από την κατανόηση της ανθρώπινης σημασιολογικής επεξεργασίας. Ωστόσο, τα σημασιολογικά μοντέλα μελετώνται συνήθως στο πλαίσιο της απόδοσης του συστήματος επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια συστηματική αξιολόγηση και σύγκριση μιας σειράς ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενων, σύγχρονων σημασιολογικών μοντέλων στην ικανότητά τους να προβλέπουν πρότυπα εννοιολογικής αναπαράστασης στον ανθρώπινο εγκέφαλο. Τα αποτελέσματά μας παρέχουν νέες γνώσεις τόσο για τον σχεδιασμό υπολογιστικών σημασιολογικών μοντέλων όσο και για περαιτέρω έρευνα στη γνωστική νευροεπιστήμη.', 'hu': 'A számítástechnikai szemantika kutatását egyre inkább az emberi szemantikai feldolgozás megértése irányítja. A szemantikai modelleket azonban jellemzően a természetes nyelvfeldolgozó rendszer teljesítményének kontextusában tanulmányozzák. Ebben a tanulmányban széles körben használt, korszerű szemantikai modellek szisztematikus értékelését és összehasonlítását mutatjuk be az emberi agy konceptuális reprezentációs mintáinak előrejelzésében. Eredményeink új betekintéseket nyújtanak mind a számítástechnikai szemantikai modellek tervezéséhez, mind a kognitív idegtudomány további kutatásához.', 'ka': 'კომპუტაციალური სმენტიკის შესაძლებლობა უფრო დიდება ჩვენი ადამიანის სმენტიკური პროცესის შესახებ. მაგრამ, სიმენტიკური მოდელები ტიპოლურად აკეთებულიან სახელსაწინო ენის პროცესის სისტემის კონტექსტში. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში სისტემატიური განსაზღვრება და შემდგომარება მსოფლიოდ გამოიყენებული, სიმენტიკური მოდელების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ადამიანის ტვინიში კონცესტულ განსაზღვრებას შესაძლებ ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ ახალი შესახებ, რომელიც კომპუტაციალური სიმენტიკური მოდელების შესახებ და კონციონიტური ნეირომეცნიერების შესახებ.', 'it': "La ricerca nella semantica computazionale è sempre più guidata dalla nostra comprensione dell'elaborazione semantica umana. Tuttavia, i modelli semantici sono tipicamente studiati nel contesto delle prestazioni del sistema di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, presentiamo una valutazione sistematica e un confronto di una gamma di modelli semantici ampiamente utilizzati e all'avanguardia nella loro capacità di prevedere modelli di rappresentazione concettuale nel cervello umano. I nostri risultati forniscono nuove intuizioni sia per la progettazione di modelli semantici computazionali che per ulteriori ricerche nelle neuroscienze cognitive.", 'kk': 'Компьютерлік семантикалық зерттеулердің зерттеулері адамдардың семантикалық процесстерін түсініміздің көбірек көмегімен бастайды. Бірақ семантикалық үлгілер қалыпты табиғи тілдерді өңдеу жүйесінің істемінде зерттеді. Бұл қағазда, адамдардың мидындағы концептуалды түсіндіру үлгілерін көрсету үшін жүйелік оқу және салыстыруға болады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз компьютерлік семантикалық моделдерді жасау үшін жаңа түсініктерді және конифициялық неврологиялық зерттеу үшін.', 'lt': 'Kompiuterinės semantikos moksliniai tyrimai vis labiau grindžiami mūsų supratimu apie žmogaus semantinį apdorojimą. Tačiau semantiniai modeliai paprastai tiriami atsižvelgiant į gamtos kalbų apdorojimo sistemos veiksmingumą. Šiame dokumente sistemingai vertiname ir palyginame įvairius plačiai naudojamus, pažangiausius semantinius modelius jų gebėjime prognozuoti koncepcinio atstovavimo žmogaus smegenyse modelius. Mūsų rezultatai suteikia naujų įžvalgų tiek kompiuterinių semantinių modelių kūrimui, tiek tolesniems kognityvinių neuromokslų moksliniams tyrimams.', 'ms': 'Penelitian dalam semantik komputasi semakin dipandu oleh pemahaman kita tentang proses semantik manusia. Namun, model semantik biasanya belajar dalam konteks prestasi sistem pemprosesan bahasa alam. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan penilaian sistemik dan perbandingan dari julat model semantik yang digunakan secara luas, state-of-the-art dalam kemampuan mereka untuk meramalkan corak perwakilan konseptual dalam otak manusia. Hasil kita memberikan pandangan baru untuk desain model semantik komputasi dan untuk kajian lanjutan dalam sains neurologi kognitif.', 'mk': 'Истражувањето во компјутатичката семантика е сé повеќе водено од нашето разбирање на човечкото семантично процесирање. Сепак, семантичните модели се обично проучуваат во контекст на природната резултат на системот за процес на јазик. Во овој весник, претставуваме систематска проценка и споредба на голем број широко употребени, најнови семантични модели во нивната способност да предвидат шеми на концептуална претстава во човечкиот мозок. Нашите резултати обезбедуваат нови информации за дизајнот на компјутатичките семантични модели и за понатамошно истражување во когнитивната невронаука.', 'ml': 'കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക്സിലെ ഗവേഷണം കൂടുതല്\u200d നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലാകുന്നു മനുഷ്യന്റെ സെമാന്റിക് പ്ര എങ്കിലും സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്രകൃതിയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സാധ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമിക്കക്കാരില്\u200d വ്യാപ്തമായ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതും, വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്\u200dറിക് മോഡലുകളുടെ താല്\u200dപര്യമായ ഒരു പരി നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകളുടെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനും കൂടുതല്\u200d ന്യൂറസിന്റെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d വേണ', 'mt': 'Ir-riċerka fis-semantika komputattiva hija dejjem aktar iggwidata mill-fehim tagħna tal-ipproċessar semantiku uman. Madankollu, mudelli semantiċi huma tipikament studjati fil-kuntest tal-prestazzjoni tas-sistema tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw evalwazzjoni sistematika u tqabbil ta’ firxa ta’ mudelli semantiċi usa’ u avvanzati fil-ħila tagħhom li jipprevedu mudelli ta’ rappreżentanza kunċettwali fil-moħħ uman. Ir-riżultati tagħna jipprovdu għarfien ġdid kemm għad-disinn ta’ mudelli semantiċi komputattivi kif ukoll għal aktar riċerka fin-newroxjenza konjittiva.', 'mn': 'Компьютерийн семантикийн судалгаа хүн төрөлхтний семантик үйлдвэрлэлийн тухай ойлголтын тухай ихэвчлэн удирдаж байна. Гэвч семантик загварууд нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх системийн үйлдвэрлэлд ихэвчлэн судалдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүний тархинд ойлголтын төлөвлөлтийг таамаглах чадвартай олон шинжлэх ухаан, урлагийн төлөвлөлтийн төлөвлөлтийн систематик дүгнэлт болон харьцуулж байна. Бидний үр дүнд компьютерийн семантик загварын загвар болон мэдрэлийн мэдрэлийн шинжлэх ухааны шинэ судалгаа гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Badania w zakresie semantyki obliczeniowej coraz częściej kierują się naszym zrozumieniem ludzkiego przetwarzania semantycznego. Jednak modele semantyczne są zazwyczaj badane w kontekście wydajności systemu przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W artykule przedstawiono systematyczną ocenę i porównanie szeregu szeroko stosowanych, najnowocześniejszych modeli semantycznych w zakresie ich zdolności do przewidywania wzorców reprezentacji koncepcyjnej w ludzkim mózgu. Nasze wyniki dostarczają nowych spostrzeżeń zarówno dla projektowania obliczeniowych modeli semantycznych, jak i dla dalszych badań w zakresie neuronauki poznawczej.', 'no': 'Forskning i computational semantics er større håndtere av vårt forståelse av menneskelsemantiske prosessering. Men semantiske modeller vert vanlegvis studerte i konteksten av naturspråksbehandlingssystemet. I denne papiret presenterer vi eit systematisk evaluering og sammenligning av eit rekkjefølgje av breidde brukte semantiske modeller i kunsten deres å foregå mønsterelement for konseptuelle representasjon i menneskehjernen. Resultatet våre gjev nye innsyningar både for utforminga av datasemantiske modeller og for framtidige forskning i kognitivt neurovitenskap.', 'ro': 'Cercetarea în semantica computațională este din ce în ce mai ghidată de înțelegerea noastră a procesării semantice umane. Cu toate acestea, modelele semantice sunt de obicei studiate în contextul performanței sistemului de procesare a limbajului natural. În această lucrare, prezentăm o evaluare sistematică și o comparație a unei game de modele semantice utilizate pe scară largă, de ultimă generație în capacitatea lor de a prezice modele de reprezentare conceptuală în creierul uman. Rezultatele noastre oferă noi perspective atât pentru proiectarea modelelor semantice computaționale, cât și pentru cercetarea ulterioară în neuroștiința cognitivă.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka xisaabinta waxaa ku hagaya waxyaabaha aan garanayno ka baaraandegista dadka semantika ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalaha semantika waxaa sida caadiga ah lagu baraa sameynta nidaamka baaraandegista afka dabiicadda ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo bandhignaa qiimeynta nidaamka ah oo isbarbardhiga noocyo kala duduwan oo lagu isticmaalay, noocyada farshaxanka ah ee ay awoodaan in ay horumariyo noocyo ka mid ah muuqashada maanka dadka. Abaalkayaga waxay keentaa aragtida cusub ee ku saabsan qaababka xisaabta iyo cilmiga neuro-cilmi dheeraad ah.', 'sr': 'Istraživanje u kompjuterskom semantiku sve više vodi našim razumijevanjem o ljudskom semantičkom procesu. Međutim, semantički modeli se obično proučavaju u kontekstu izvođenja prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistematsku procjenu i usporedbu široko korištenih semantičkih modela u njihovoj sposobnosti da predvidimo obrazac konceptualnog predstavljanja u ljudskom mozgu. Naši rezultati pružaju nove uvide i za dizajn kompjuterskih semantičkih modela i za daljnje istraživanje kognitivne neuronauke.', 'sv': 'Forskning inom computational semantik styrs alltmer av vår förståelse för mänsklig semantisk bearbetning. Emellertid studeras semantiska modeller vanligtvis i samband med naturlig språkbehandling system prestanda. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en systematisk utvärdering och jämförelse av en rad allmänt använda, state-of-the-art semantiska modeller i deras förmåga att förutsäga mönster för konceptuell representation i den mänskliga hjärnan. Våra resultat ger nya insikter både för utformningen av beräkningsemantiska modeller och för vidare forskning inom kognitiv neurovetenskap.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණාත්මක සෙමාන්ටික්ස් වල පරීක්ෂණය අපේ මිනිස්සු සෙමාන්ටික් පරීක්ෂණය ගැන තේරුම් ගන්න ප නමුත්, සෙමාන්ටික් මොඩේල් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතියේ පද්ධ මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dයාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශේෂ කරනවා මිනිස්සු මොළුවේ සාමාන්තික ප්\u200d අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය අළුත් අදහස් දෙන්නේ පරිගණික සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල් සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාප', 'ta': 'கணக்கிடும் பெமான்டிக்களில் ஆராய்ச்சி மனிதன் பெம்மான்டிக் செயல்பாட்டை புரிந்து கொண்டு நேர்வழியில ஆனால் பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தும் முறைமையின் செயல்பாட்டின் மூலம் இயல்பான மொழி  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பான பரிசோதனையையும் ஒப்பிடுவதையும் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் மற்றும் மனித மூளையில் இருக்கும் கருத்து பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகளை ம முடிவு', 'ur': 'کمپیوٹریشن سیمانٹیکس کی تحقیق ہمارے انسان سیمانٹیکس پردازی کی سمجھ سے زیادہ راہ دکھائی جاتی ہے۔ However, semantic models are typically studied in the context of natural language processing system performance. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک سیستماتیک ارزیابی اور مقایسہ کی نشانی دیتے ہیں کہ انسان کے مغز میں مضبوط نمونوں کی بصیرت کی تصدیق کرنے کے قابل ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے کامپیوٹریشن سیمنٹی موڈل کی طراحی کے لئے اور اضافہ تحقیق کے لئے نئی نظریں پیش کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Kombinatsiya semantika tahrirchi inson semantik jarayonlarini o'rganish orqali ko'proq qo'shiladi. Ammo, semantik modellari oddiy o'qindilar asl tilni boshqarish tizimi bajarishni taʼminlaydi. Bu qogʻozda biz qo'shilgan tizim qiymatni ko'rib chiqaramiz va o'zgarishni qo'shish mumkin, shaxsiy semantik modellarini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz kompyuterning semantik modellari dizayni va kognitiv neyron fani davomiy qilish uchun yangi ko'rini beradi.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu về ngữ pháp tính toán ngày càng được dẫn dắt bởi sự hiểu biết về cách xử lý ngữ pháp nhân tạo. Tuy nhiên, mô hình ngữ pháp thường được nghiên cứu trong ngữ cảnh của hệ thống xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đưa ra một đánh giá và so sánh mô hình ngữ pháp phổ biến, hiện đại của các mô hình ngữ pháp trong khả năng dự đoán các mô hình về sự đại diện tưởng tượng trong não người. Kết quả của chúng tôi cung cấp kiến thức mới về thiết kế các mô hình ngữ pháp tính toán và nghiên cứu về khoa học thần kinh nhận thức.', 'hr': 'Istraživanje u računalnom semantiku sve više vodi našim razumijevanjem ljudskog semantičkog procesa. Međutim, semantički modeli se obično ispitivaju u kontekstu učinkovitosti prirodnog jezika obrađivanja sustava. U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistematsku procjenu i usporedbu raspona široko korištenih semantičkih modela u njihovoj sposobnosti predvidjeti obrasce konceptualnog predstavljanja u ljudskom mozgu. Naši rezultati pružaju nove uvide i za dizajn računalnih semantičkih modela i daljnje istraživanje kognitivne neuronauke.', 'bg': 'Изследванията в компютърната семантика все повече се ръководят от нашето разбиране за човешката семантична обработка. Въпреки това, семантичните модели обикновено се изучават в контекста на производителността на системата за обработка на естествен език. В настоящата статия представяме систематична оценка и сравнение на редица широко използвани, най-съвременни семантични модели в способността им да предвиждат модели на концептуално представяне в човешкия мозък. Нашите резултати предоставят нови прозрения както за проектирането на изчислителни семантични модели, така и за по-нататъшни изследвания в познавателната неврология.', 'nl': 'Onderzoek in computationele semantiek wordt steeds meer geleid door ons begrip van menselijke semantische verwerking. Semantische modellen worden echter meestal bestudeerd in de context van de prestaties van het systeem voor natuurlijke taalverwerking. In dit artikel presenteren we een systematische evaluatie en vergelijking van een reeks wijd gebruikte, state-of-the-art semantische modellen in hun vermogen om patronen van conceptuele representatie in de menselijke hersenen te voorspellen. Onze resultaten bieden nieuwe inzichten voor zowel het ontwerp van computationele semantische modellen als voor verder onderzoek in cognitieve neurowetenschappen.', 'da': 'Forskning i beregningsmæssig semantik styres i stigende grad af vores forståelse af menneskelig semantisk behandling. Imidlertid undersøges semantiske modeller typisk i forbindelse med naturlig sprogbehandling systemets ydeevne. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en systematisk evaluering og sammenligning af en række udbredte, state-of-the-art semantiske modeller i deres evne til at forudsige mønstre for konceptuel repræsentation i den menneskelige hjerne. Vores resultater giver ny indsigt både til design af beregningsmæssige semantiske modeller og til yderligere forskning i kognitiv neurovidenskab.', 'de': 'Die Forschung in der computergestützten Semantik orientiert sich zunehmend an unserem Verständnis der menschlichen semantischen Verarbeitung. Allerdings werden semantische Modelle typischerweise im Kontext der Leistung natürlicher Sprachverarbeitungssysteme untersucht. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine systematische Bewertung und Vergleich einer Reihe von weit verbreiteten, state-of-the-art semantischen Modellen in ihrer Fähigkeit vor, Muster der konzeptuellen Repräsentation im menschlichen Gehirn vorherzusagen. Unsere Ergebnisse liefern neue Erkenntnisse sowohl für den Entwurf computergestützter semantischer Modelle als auch für die weitere Forschung in der kognitiven Neurowissenschaft.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات سیمانتیک محاسبات بیشتر توسط درک ما درباره پرداخت سیمانتیک انسان هدایت می\u200cشود. ولی مدلهای سیمانتیک معمولا در محیط کاربرد سیستم پرداخت زبان طبیعی تحقیق می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک ارزیابی و مقایسه سیستماتی از مدل\u200cهای semantic استفاده از وسیع استفاده شده، وضعیت هنری را در توانایی آنها برای پیش بینی الگوهای نمایش نظریه\u200cای در مغز انسان نشان می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما برای طراحی مدل\u200cهای سیمانتیک کامپیوتری و تحقیقات بیشتری در علم عصبی شناخته می\u200cکنند.', 'id': 'Penelitian dalam semantik komputasi semakin didorong oleh pemahaman kita tentang proses semantik manusia. Namun, model semantis biasanya dipelajari dalam konteks proses bahasa alam sistem prestasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan evaluasi sistematis dan perbandingan dari jangkauan model semantis yang sangat digunakan, state-of-the-art dalam kemampuan mereka untuk memprediksi pola representation konseptual di otak manusia. Hasil kami menyediakan pandangan baru untuk desain model semantis komputasi dan penelitian lanjut dalam ilmu saraf kognitif.', 'sw': 'Utafiti katika semantika ya kompyuta unaongozwa zaidi na uelewa wetu wa uchunguzi wa kimapenzi wa binadamu. Hata hivyo, mifano ya kishindani husomwa kawaida katika muktadha wa utendaji wa mfumo wa utaratibu wa lugha asilia. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka tathmini za mfumo na kulinganisha a in a mbalimbali zilizotumika sana, mitindo ya sanaa ya aina ya mifano ya uwakilishi wa dhana katika ubongo wa binadamu. Matokeo yetu yanatoa mitazamo mpya kwa ajili ya ubunifu wa mifano ya sekundi na kwa ajili ya utafiti zaidi katika sayansi ya ubunifu wa neuro.', 'af': "Ons verstanding van menslike semantieke is vergroot deur ons verstanding van menslike semantiese verwerking. Maar semantiese modelles word tipies in die konteks van natuurlike taal verwerking stelsel prestasie ondersoek. In hierdie papier voorsien ons 'n sistematiese evaluering en vergelyking van 'n reek van vaste gebruikte, staat-van-kuns semantiese modele in hul moontlik om patrone van konseptieële verteenwoordigheid in die menslike brein te voorskou. Ons resultate verskaf nuwe insigte beide vir die ontwerp van rekenasielike semantiese modele en vir verdere ondersoek in kognitiewe neurosciensie.", 'tr': 'Kalkular semantiklerinde ara힊tyrmalar, adamlary흫 semantik i힊lemlerini d체힊체n첵채nimiz tarapyndan k철pr채k gurnalan첵ar. 횦철ne sematik nusgalar adat챌a tebigy dil i힊le첵채n sistemasy흫 ba힊arylygynda oka첵arlar. Bu kagyzda sistematik 챌yky힊 we ullan첵an, ynsan beyninde d체힊체n첵채n 챌yky힊 힊eklinde 체첵tgetmek 체챌in sistematik 챌yky힊 we 챌yky힊lygyny g철r체n첵채rdik. netijelerimiz hem komp첵uter semantik modelleri tasarlamak 체챌in t채ze d체힊체njeleri sa첵la첵arlar, hem biliktiwny n채urulimi첵asynda ba힊ga bir ara힊tyrma 체챌in.', 'sq': 'Kërkimi në semantikën kompjuterike drejtohet gjithnjë e më shumë nga kuptimi ynë i procesit semantik njerëzor. Megjithatë, modelet semantike janë tipikisht studiuar në kontekstin e performancës natyrore të sistemit të procesimit të gjuhës. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një vlerësim sistematik dhe krahasim të një game modelesh semantike të përdorur gjerësisht dhe të gjerë në aftësinë e tyre për të parashikuar modelet e përfaqësimit konceptual në trurin njerëzor. Rezultatet tona ofrojnë pamje të reja si për dizajnin e modeleve kompjuterike semantike si dhe për kërkime të mëtejshme në neuroshkencën kognitive.', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային սեմանտիկայի ուսումնասիրությունը ավելի ու ավելի ուղղություն է հանդիսանում մարդկային սեմանտիկայի վերաբերյալ մեր հասկանալու միջոցով: However, semantic models are typically studied in the context of natural language processing system performance.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք համակարգչային գնահատում և համեմատություն մարդկային ուղեղում լայնորեն օգտագործվող, ամենաբարձր սեմանտիկ մոդելների հետ, որոնք կարողանում են կանխատեսել մարդկային ուղեղի գաղափարական ներկայացման կաղապարները: Մեր արդյունքները նոր ընկալումներ են տալիս հաշվարկների սեմանտիկ մոդելների նախագծման և ճանաչողական նյարդաբանության հետազոտության համար:', 'az': 'İnsan semantik işlətməsini anlamaq üçün hesaplama semantik araştırmaları daha da artırar. Halbuki, semantik modellər təbiətli dil işləmə sistemi performansından təhsil edilir. Bu kağızda, insan beynində konseptik nümunələrinin nümunələrini öyrənmək bacarıqlarında sistematik değerlendirmək və müqayisədə istifadə edilən, sanat semantik modellerinin bir səviyyəsini göstəririk. Bizim sonuçlarımız bilgisayar semantik modellərin tasarımı və kognitiv nörobylümünün daha çox araştırması üçün yeni nəticələri təmin edir.', 'am': 'ምርመራ በሰው የsemantic ፕሮጀክት በማስተዋል እየጨመረ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የsemantic models በተለየ የቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት ስርዓት ድምፅ ውስጥ በተማርከዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሰው ብሔራዊ አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን የሥርዓት አስተያየት እናስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን አዲስ ዓይነቶች ለቁጥጥር የሴሜንቲካ ዓይነቶች እና ለዳግመኛ የሆኑት የነዌብ እውቀት ፍጥረት ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'গবেষণা সেমান্টিক্সে আমাদের মানুষের সেম্যান্টিক প্রক্রিয়ার বুঝতে বেশি পরিচালিত হচ্ছে। তবে সেমেন্টিক মডেল প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া সিস্টেমের প্রক্রিয়ার প্রেক্ষাপটে সাধারণত গবেষণা কর এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সিস্টেমিক মূল্যায়ন এবং তুলনায় দেখাচ্ছি ব্যাপক ব্যবহৃত, রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের সেমেন্টিক মডেলের সাথে তাদের মানুষের মস্তিষ্কের ধা আমাদের ফলাফল নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করেছে গণনাত্রিক সেমান্টিক মডেলের ডিজাইনের জন্য এবং কোন ক্ষমতাবিজ্ঞানের আরো গব', 'ca': "La recerca en la semàntica computacional està cada cop més guiada per la nostra comprensió del processament semàntic humà. Tot i així, els models semàntics es estudien típicament en el context del rendiment del sistema de processament natural de llenguatges. En aquest paper, presentem una evaluació sistemàtica i comparació d'una gama de models semàntics generalment utilitzats i més avançats en la seva habilitat de predir patrons de representació conceptual al cervell humà. Els nostres resultats proporcionen noves idees tant per al disseny de models semàntics computacionals com per a més recerca en neurociència cognitiva.", 'bs': 'Istraživanje u računalnom semantiku sve više vodi našim razumijevanjem ljudskog semantičkog procesa. Međutim, semantički modeli se obično proučavaju u kontekstu izvođenja prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistematsku procjenu i usporedbu opsega široko korištenih semantičkih modela u njihovoj sposobnosti predvidjeti obrasce konceptualnog predstavljanja u ljudskom mozgu. Naši rezultati pružaju nove uvide i za dizajn kompjuterskih semantičkih modela i za daljnje istraživanje kognitivne neuronauke.', 'ko': '계산어의학에 대한 연구는 점점 더 우리가 인류의 의미 처리에 대한 이해의 지도를 받고 있다.그러나 의미 모델은 보통 자연 언어 처리 시스템의 성능 배경에서 연구된다.본고에서 우리는 일련의 광범위하게 사용되고 가장 선진적인 의미 모델에 대해 체계적인 평가와 비교를 실시하여 인간의 뇌에서 개념 표징 모델을 예측하는 능력을 확정했다.우리의 연구 결과는 어의 모델을 계산하는 디자인과 인지신경과학의 진일보한 연구에 새로운 견해를 제공했다.', 'cs': 'Výzkum výpočetní sémantiky se stále více řídí naším chápáním lidského sémantického zpracování. Nicméně, sémantické modely jsou obvykle studovány v kontextu výkonu systému zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku představujeme systematické vyhodnocení a srovnání řady široce používaných, nejmodernějších sémantických modelů v jejich schopnosti předpovídat vzorce konceptuální reprezentace v lidském mozku. Naše výsledky poskytují nové poznatky jak pro návrh výpočetních sémantických modelů, tak pro další výzkum v kognitivní neurovědě.', 'fi': 'Laskennallisen semantiikan tutkimusta ohjaa yhä enemmän ymmärryksemme ihmisen semanttisesta prosessoinnista. Semanttisia malleja tutkitaan kuitenkin tyypillisesti luonnollisen kielen prosessointijärjestelmän suorituskyvyn kontekstissa. Tässä työssä esitellään systemaattinen arviointi ja vertailu laajasti käytetyistä, viimeisimpistä semanttisista malleista niiden kyvyssä ennustaa käsitteellisen edustuksen malleja ihmisaivoissa. Tuloksemme tarjoavat uusia oivalluksia sekä laskennallisten semanttisten mallien suunnitteluun että kognitiivisen neurotieteen jatkotutkimukseen.', 'et': 'Arvutusliku semantika uuringuid juhib üha enam meie arusaam inimese semantilisest töötlemisest. Samas uuritakse semantilisi mudeleid tavaliselt looduskeele töötlemise süsteemi toimimise kontekstis. Käesolevas töös tutvustame süstemaatilist hindamist ja võrdlust laialdaselt kasutatavate kaasaegsete semantiliste mudelite võimest ennustada kontseptuaalse esinduse mustreid inimajus. Meie tulemused annavad uusi teadmisi nii arvutuslike semantiliste mudelite kujundamiseks kui ka kognitiivse neuroteaduse edasiseks uurimiseks.', 'jv': 'Rasané semanti sing kelangan kelangan sampeyan luwih akeh medhayan ning awakdhéwé semanti sing nggawe barang uwong. Nanging, model semanti kuwi mesthi dadi sakjane sujih dumateng kapan banggu dadi. Nang mapaké iki, kita sistematik kuwi nggawe sistematik éntuk karo perusahaan gambar, gambar-sistematik sing model sing kalah basa gambar nggawe sistematik dhéwé. Rejecting', 'he': 'מחקר בסמנטיקה מחשבית מונח יותר ויותר על ידי הבנה שלנו על עיבוד סמנטי אנושי. בכל אופן, דוגמנים סמנטיים בדרך כלל נלמדים בקשר לתפקיד מערכת עיבוד שפה טבעית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים עריכה מערכתית ושוואה של מגוון של מודלים סמנטיים משתמשים רחב, מצב המיוחד ביותר ביכולתם לחזות דפוסים של מייצג מושג במוח האנושי. התוצאות שלנו מספקות תובנות חדשות גם לעיצוב של דוגמנים סמנטיים מחשביים וגם למחקר נוסף בנוירומדע קוגניטיבי.', 'ha': "Research in computational semantics is increasingly guided by our understanding of human semantic processing.  A lokacin da, an karanta misalin semantic a bayani, a cikin mazaɓa na tsarin muhimman aiki na fassarar harshen na'ura. Daga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wani abu na ƙayyade ko da misãlai mai amfani da shi mai fassarawa, mai fassarar-na-sanawa, a cikin awon su yi bayani ga misãlai na jinkiri cikin miyar mutum. MataimakinMu na bãyar da gannai sãbuwa zuwa misalin misãlai na lissafa da kuma dõmin ƙarami karatun cikin littãfin neuro na kognitive.", 'sk': 'Raziskave računalniške semantike vedno bolj vodijo naše razumevanje človeške semantične obdelave. Vendar pa se semantični modeli običajno proučujejo v kontekstu delovanja sistema za obdelavo naravnega jezika. V prispevku predstavljamo sistematično ocenjevanje in primerjavo vrste široko uporabljenih, najsodobnejših semantičnih modelov v njihovi sposobnosti napovedovanja vzorcev konceptualne reprezentacije v človeških možganih. Naši rezultati prinašajo nove vpoglede tako za oblikovanje računalniških semantičnih modelov kot za nadaljnje raziskave kognitivne nevroznanosti.', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐྱེལ་རིས་ནང་གི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀློག་པའི་ནང་དུ་ ཡིན་ནའང་། རི་མོ་ལྟ་བ་དག་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་རིམ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཁྲོད་ཅིག་བསླབ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སུ་ཡིག་ལག་ལེན་པའི་མིག ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཅིག་སྦྲེལ་རྩིས་ཅན་གྱི་སྔོན་རྩིས་ཅན་གྱི་མིག་རྩལ་སྒྲིག་དང་། སྒེར་སྦྱོར་དངུལ་སྐྱེན་'}
{'en': 'Multi-modal Summarization for Asynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Video', 'ar': 'تلخيص متعدد الوسائط لمجموعة غير متزامنة من النص والصورة والصوت والفيديو', 'fr': "Synthèse multimodale pour la collecte asynchrone de texte, d'image, d'audio et de vidéo", 'pt': 'Resumo multimodal para coleção assíncrona de texto, imagem, áudio e vídeo', 'es': 'Resumen multimodal para la recopilación asíncrona de texto, imagen, audio y vídeo', 'ja': 'テキスト、画像、オーディオ、ビデオの非同期コレクションのマルチモーダルサマリ', 'zh': '文本、图像、音频、视频异步所集多模汇之', 'hi': 'पाठ, छवि, ऑडियो और वीडियो के अतुल्यकालिक संग्रह के लिए बहु-मोडल सारांशीकरण', 'ru': 'Мультимодальное суммирование для асинхронного сбора текста, изображения, аудио и видео', 'ga': 'Achoimre Ilmhódúil maidir le Bailiúchán Asincrónach Téacs, Íomhá, Fuaime agus Fís', 'ka': 'ტექსტის, გამოსახულების, ავდიო და ვიდეოის მრავალური კოლექციაციაName', 'hu': 'Multimodális összefoglalás szöveg-, kép-, hang- és videógyűjteményekhez', 'el': 'Πολυδιάστατη περίληψη για ασύγχρονη συλλογή κειμένου, εικόνας, ήχου και βίντεο', 'it': 'Sintesi multimodale per la raccolta asincrona di testo, immagini, audio e video', 'kk': 'Мәтін, кескіні, аудио және видеоның бірнеше модельді жинақтау', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšis teksto, vaizdo, garso ir vaizdo derinio derinys', 'mk': 'Мултимодална резервација за асинхронична колекција на текст, слика, аудио и видео', 'ms': 'Multi-modal Summarization for Asynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Video', 'ml': 'പദാവലി, ചിത്രം, ഓഡിയോ വീഡിയോ എന്നിവയുടെ സംഘത്തിനുള്ള ഒരുപാട് മോഡല്\u200d ചുരുക്കം', 'mt': 'Sommarju Multimodali għall-Ġbir Asinkroniku tat-Test, l-Immaġni, l-Awdjo u l-Vidjo', 'mn': 'Мөн олон моделийн хэмжээний цуглуулга, зураг, аудио болон видео', 'no': 'Multi modal samandring for aksynkrone samling av tekst, bilete, lyd og video', 'ro': 'Rezumat multimodal pentru colectarea asincronă de text, imagini, audio și video', 'pl': 'Multimodalne podsumowanie asynchronicznego zbioru tekstu, obrazu, audio i wideo', 'sr': 'Višemodalna sažetka za sinhronsku kolekciju teksta, slike, audio i video', 'si': 'පෙළ, පින්තූර, ඔඩියෝ හා විඩියෝ සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් සංවිධානය', 'sv': 'Multi-modal sammanfattning för asynkron samling av text, bild, ljud och video', 'so': 'Summary badan oo modal ah ee Asynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Fiidiyow', 'ta': 'உரை, பிம்பத்து, ஒலி மற்றும் வீடியோ தொகுப்பிற்கான பல- மாதிரி சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'متن، تصویر، آڈیو اور ویڈیو کے لئے بہت سی موڈال جمع کرنا', 'vi': 'Mô tả đa phương cho bộ sưu tập văn bản, ảnh, ảnh, ảnh, ảnh và ảnh động', 'uz': 'Multi-modal Summarization for Asynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Video', 'bg': 'Многомодално обобщаване за асинхронно събиране на текст, изображение, аудио и видео', 'nl': 'Multimodale samenvatting voor asynchrone verzameling van tekst, afbeelding, audio en video', 'hr': 'Višemodalna sažetka za sinhronsku kolekciju teksta, slike, audio i video', 'da': 'Multi-modal opsummering for asynkron samling af tekst, billede, lyd og video', 'ko': '텍스트, 이미지, 오디오, 동영상 비동기 채집에 사용되는 다중 모드 요약', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری چندین مدل برای جمع\u200cآوری متن، تصویر، صدا و ویدئو', 'id': 'Ringkasan multimodal untuk Koleksi Teks, Gambar, Audio dan Video Asynchronous', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa aina nyingi kwa ajili ya Mkusanyiko wa Maandishi, Picha, Sauti na Video', 'tr': 'Metin, Resim, Ses we Video üçin köp modal Toplaýyşy', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Multi-modal Summarization for Asynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Video', 'am': 'የአስsynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Video', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'প্রজাতন্ত্র, ছবি, অডিও এবং ভিডিও সংগ্রহের জন্য বহুমোডাল সামার্মিজেশন', 'az': 'Metin, Rəsm, Audio və Video üçün çoxlu modal Toplaşdırma', 'bs': 'Višemodalna sažetka za asinkronsku kolekciju teksta, slike, audio i video', 'de': 'Multimodale Zusammenfassung für die asynchrone Sammlung von Text, Bild, Audio und Video', 'cs': 'Multimodální shrnutí pro asynchronní sbírku textu, obrazu, audio a videa', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen yhteenveto epäsynkroniselle tekstin, kuvan, äänen ja videon kokoelmalle', 'ca': 'Resumen multimodal de la col·lecció asincrònica de text, imatge, so i vídeo', 'et': 'Mitmeliigiline kokkuvõte asünkroonse teksti, pildi, heli ja video kogumise jaoks', 'jv': 'Samurasi Multi modal', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Multi-modal Summarization for Asynchronous Collection of Text, Image, Audio and Video', 'sk': 'Multimodalno povzetek za asinhronsko zbirko besedila, slike, avdio in video', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་དང་བརྙན་རིས། སྒྲ་དབྱངས་དང་བརྙན་རིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་མཚུངས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་མཛོད་ཁྲམ'}
{'en': 'The rapid increase of the multimedia data over the Internet necessitates multi-modal summarization from collections of text, image, audio and video. In this work, we propose an extractive Multi-modal Summarization (MMS) method which can automatically generate a textual summary given a set of documents, images, audios and videos related to a specific topic. The key idea is to bridge the semantic gaps between multi-modal contents. For audio information, we design an approach to selectively use its transcription. For vision information, we learn joint representations of texts and images using a neural network. Finally, all the multi-modal aspects are considered to generate the textural summary by maximizing the salience, non-redundancy, readability and coverage through budgeted optimization of submodular functions. We further introduce an MMS corpus in English and Chinese. The experimental results on this dataset demonstrate that our method outperforms other competitive baseline methods.', 'ar': 'تتطلب الزيادة السريعة في بيانات الوسائط المتعددة عبر الإنترنت تلخيصًا متعدد الوسائط من مجموعات النصوص والصور والصوت والفيديو. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة تلخيص متعددة الوسائط (MMS) استخلاصية يمكنها إنشاء ملخص نصي تلقائيًا في ضوء مجموعة من المستندات والصور والتسجيلات الصوتية ومقاطع الفيديو المتعلقة بموضوع معين. الفكرة الأساسية هي سد الفجوات الدلالية بين المحتويات متعددة الوسائط. للحصول على المعلومات الصوتية ، نقوم بتصميم نهج لاستخدام النسخ بشكل انتقائي. للحصول على معلومات حول الرؤية ، نتعلم تمثيلات مشتركة للنصوص والصور باستخدام شبكة عصبية. أخيرًا ، يتم النظر في جميع الجوانب متعددة الوسائط لإنشاء ملخص نصي من خلال تعظيم البروز وعدم التكرار وقابلية القراءة والتغطية من خلال تحسين الميزانية للوظائف الفرعية. كما نقدم مجموعة MMS باللغتين الإنجليزية والصينية. توضح النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة البيانات هذه أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على أساليب خط الأساس التنافسية الأخرى.', 'es': 'El rápido aumento de los datos multimedia a través de Internet exige la sumarización multimodal de las colecciones de texto, imagen, audio y vídeo. En este trabajo, proponemos un método extractivo de Resúmenes Multimodales (MMS) que puede generar automáticamente un resumen textual dado un conjunto de documentos, imágenes, audios y vídeos relacionados con un tema específico. La idea clave es cerrar las brechas semánticas entre los contenidos multimodales. Para la información de audio, diseñamos un enfoque para usar selectivamente su transcripción. Para obtener información sobre la visión, aprendemos representaciones conjuntas de textos e imágenes mediante una red neuronal. Finalmente, se consideran todos los aspectos multimodales para generar el resumen textural al maximizar la prominencia, la no redundancia, la legibilidad y la cobertura a través de la optimización presupuestada de las funciones submodulares. Además, introducimos un corpus de MMS en inglés y chino. Los resultados experimentales de este conjunto de datos demuestran que nuestro método supera a otros métodos de referencia competitivos.', 'pt': 'O rápido aumento dos dados multimídia na Internet exige sumarização multimodal de coleções de texto, imagem, áudio e vídeo. Neste trabalho, propomos um método extrativo de sumarização multimodal (MMS) que pode gerar automaticamente um resumo textual a partir de um conjunto de documentos, imagens, áudios e vídeos relacionados a um tema específico. A ideia-chave é preencher as lacunas semânticas entre os conteúdos multimodais. Para informações de áudio, projetamos uma abordagem para usar seletivamente sua transcrição. Para informações de visão, aprendemos representações conjuntas de textos e imagens usando uma rede neural. Finalmente, todos os aspectos multimodais são considerados para gerar o resumo textural maximizando a saliência, não redundância, legibilidade e cobertura através da otimização orçada de funções submodulares. Apresentamos ainda um corpus MMS em inglês e chinês. Os resultados experimentais neste conjunto de dados demonstram que nosso método supera outros métodos de linha de base competitivos.', 'fr': "L'augmentation rapide des données multimédias sur Internet nécessite une synthèse multimodale à partir de collections de texte, d'images, d'audio et de vidéo. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode extractive de synthèse multimodale (MMS) qui peut générer automatiquement un résumé textuel à partir d'un ensemble de documents, d'images, d'audios et de vidéos liés à un sujet spécifique. L'idée clé est de combler les écarts sémantiques entre les contenus multimodaux. Pour les informations audio, nous concevons une approche d'utilisation sélective de leur transcription. Pour obtenir des informations sur la vision, nous apprenons les représentations conjointes de textes et d'images à l'aide d'un réseau Enfin, tous les aspects multimodaux sont pris en compte pour générer le résumé de la texture en maximisant la prépondérance, la non-redondance, la lisibilité et la couverture grâce à une optimisation budgétisée des fonctions sous-modulaires. Nous introduisons également un corpus MMS en anglais et en chinois. Les résultats expérimentaux de cet ensemble de données démontrent que notre méthode surpasse les autres méthodes de référence compétitives.", 'ja': 'インターネットを介したマルチメディアデータの急速な増加は、テキスト、画像、オーディオ、ビデオのコレクションからのマルチモーダルサマリを必要とする。この研究では、抽出マルチモーダルサマリゼーション（ MMS ）法を提案しています。この方法は、特定のトピックに関連する一連の文書、画像、オーディオ、ビデオを使用して、テキストのサマリを自動的に生成することができます。重要なアイデアは、マルチモーダルコンテンツ間の意味的ギャップを埋めることです。オーディオ情報については、そのトランスクリプションを選択的に使用するアプローチを設計します。視覚情報については、ニューラルネットワークを使用してテキストと画像の共同表現を学習します。最後に、すべてのマルチモーダルの側面は、サブモジュール機能の予算化された最適化を通じて、顕著性、非冗長性、可読性、およびカバレッジを最大化することによって、テクスチャ要約を生成すると考えられる。さらに、英語と中国語のMMSコーパスを導入します。このデータセットの実験結果は、当社の方法が他の競合するベースライン法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '互联网上多媒体数之速增,须于文本、图像、音频、视频之集为多模式汇总。 于此等事,取式多模态摘要(MMS),自生一组特定题之文档,图像音频视频之摘要。 要心弥合多模样语义差。 其于音频信息,设有择地用其转录之法。 其于视听信息,吾以神经网络学文本与图像合。 最后虑多模态,因子模块以算优化,极而益显著性,非冗余性可读性覆盖范围,以成文理摘要。 更说英文及中文MMS语料库。 数集之实验结果表明,吾道优于争基线。', 'ru': 'Быстрое увеличение объема мультимедийных данных через Интернет обусловливает необходимость обобщения информации по различным видам транспорта из подборок текстовых, графических, аудио- и видеоматериалов. В этой работе мы предлагаем метод экстрактивного мультимодального суммирования (MMS), который может автоматически генерировать текстовое резюме, учитывая набор документов, изображений, аудио и видео, связанных с конкретной темой. Ключевая идея заключается в том, чтобы преодолеть семантические разрывы между мультимодальным контентом. Для аудиоинформации мы разрабатываем подход к выборочному использованию ее транскрипции. Для информации о зрении мы изучаем совместные представления текстов и изображений с помощью нейронной сети. Наконец, считается, что все мультимодальные аспекты генерируют текстовое резюме путем максимизации значимости, нерезервирования, читаемости и охвата посредством бюджетной оптимизации субмодульных функций. Кроме того, мы вводим корпус MMS на английском и китайском языках. Экспериментальные результаты для этого набора данных показывают, что наш метод превосходит другие конкурентные базовые методы.', 'hi': 'इंटरनेट पर मल्टीमीडिया डेटा की तेजी से वृद्धि के लिए पाठ, छवि, ऑडियो और वीडियो के संग्रह से बहु-मोडल सारांशीकरण की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम एक निष्कर्षण बहु-मोडल सारांशीकरण (एमएमएस) विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो स्वचालित रूप से एक विशिष्ट विषय से संबंधित दस्तावेजों, छवियों, ऑडियो और वीडियो के एक सेट को देखते हुए एक पाठ्य सारांश उत्पन्न कर सकता है। मुख्य विचार बहु-मोडल सामग्री के बीच शब्दार्थ अंतराल को पुल करना है। ऑडियो जानकारी के लिए, हम इसके प्रतिलेखन का चुनिंदा उपयोग करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण डिज़ाइन करते हैं। दृष्टि जानकारी के लिए, हम एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके ग्रंथों और छवियों के संयुक्त प्रतिनिधित्व सीखते हैं। अंत में, सभी बहु-मोडल पहलुओं को सबमॉड्युलर कार्यों के बजटीय अनुकूलन के माध्यम से लचीलापन, गैर-अतिरेक, पठनीयता और कवरेज को अधिकतम करके टेक्स्टुरल सारांश उत्पन्न करने के लिए माना जाता है। हम आगे अंग्रेजी और चीनी में एक एमएमएस कॉर्पस पेश करते हैं। इस डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारी विधि अन्य प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखा विधियों को मात देती है।', 'ga': 'Teastaíonn achoimre ilmhódach ó bhailiúcháin téacs, íomhá, fuaime agus físe mar gheall ar mhéadú tapa na sonraí ilmheán ar an Idirlíon. Sa obair seo, molaimid modh Achoimrithe Ilmhódúil eastóscach (MMS) lenar féidir achoimre téacs a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch nuair a thugtar sraith doiciméad, íomhánna, clostaifid agus físeáin a bhaineann le topaic ar leith. Is é an príomhsmaoineamh ná na bearnaí shéimeantacha idir ábhair ilmhódacha a líonadh. Mar eolas fuaime, déanaimid cur chuige a dhearadh chun a thrascríobh a úsáid go roghnach. Ar mhaithe le faisnéis fís, foghlaimímid comhléirithe téacsanna agus íomhánna ag baint úsáide as líonra néarúil. Ar deireadh, meastar go ngintear na gnéithe ilmhódacha go léir chun an achoimre uigeachta a ghiniúint trí shuntas, neamhiomarcaíocht, inléiteacht agus clúdach a uasmhéadú trí bharrfheabhsú buiséadaithe a dhéanamh ar fheidhmeanna fomhodúla. Tugaimid isteach freisin corpas MMS i mBéarla agus i Sínis. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar an tacar sonraí seo go sáraíonn ár modh modhanna bonnlíne iomaíocha eile.', 'ka': 'მლიტიმედია მონაცემების ძალიან გაზრდილობა ინტერნეტში უნდა მრავალური მოდიალური გაზრდილობა ტექსტის, გამოსახულების, აუდიო და ვიდეოს კოლექციებიდან უნ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდა ექსტრაქტიური მრავალური კომპანიზაცია (MMS) მეტი, რომელიც შეუძლია ავტომატურად წარმოიქმნა ტექსტულური კომპანიზაცია, რომელიც განსაზღვრული დოკუმენტების,  გასაკუთარი იდეა, რომ მრავალური მოდიალური შემდგომარების შორის სემონტიკური განსხვავებები გახსნა. აუდიო ინფორმაციისთვის, ჩვენ შევცვალობთ მისი ტრანქრიპტის გამოყენებას. ვიდეო ინფორმაციის შესახებ, ჩვენ ვისწავლით ერთადერთი ტექსტის და გამოსახულების გამოყენება ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენებაში. საბოლოოდ, ყველა მრავალ მოდიალური აპექტირები იქნება, რომ ტექსტურალური რეზიუმენტის შექმნა, მაქსიმიზეციით სუბმოდილური ფუნქციების გარეშე, უკეთესი, უკეთესი და გარეშე. ჩვენ უფრო მეტად მოვიყენებთ MMS კორპუსს ინგლისური და ჩინეთიური. ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემები ამ მონაცემების შესახებ გამოწვება, რომ ჩვენი მეტი სხვა კონპექციური ფექციური მეტივები გავაკეთებს.', 'el': 'Η ραγδαία αύξηση των πολυμέσων δεδομένων μέσω του διαδικτύου απαιτεί πολυπροπική σύνοψη από συλλογές κειμένου, εικόνας, ήχου και βίντεο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο που μπορεί να δημιουργήσει αυτόματα μια περίληψη κειμένου με ένα σύνολο εγγράφων, εικόνων, ήχου και βίντεο που σχετίζονται με ένα συγκεκριμένο θέμα. Η βασική ιδέα είναι η γεφύρωση των σημασιολογικών κενών μεταξύ πολυμορφικών περιεχομένων. Για πληροφορίες ήχου, σχεδιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την επιλεκτική χρήση της μεταγραφής της. Για πληροφορίες όρασης, μαθαίνουμε κοινές αναπαραστάσεις κειμένων και εικόνων χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο. Τέλος, όλες οι πολυμορφικές πτυχές εξετάζονται για να δημιουργήσουν την περίληψη της υφής, μεγιστοποιώντας τη σημασία, τη μη πλεονασματικότητα, την αναγνωσιμότητα και την κάλυψη μέσω της δημοσιονομικής βελτιστοποίησης των υποδομικών λειτουργιών. Επίσης εισάγουμε ένα σώμα στα αγγλικά και τα κινέζικα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά άλλες ανταγωνιστικές μεθόδους βάσης.', 'hu': 'Az interneten keresztüli multimédiás adatok gyors növekedése szükségessé teszi a szöveg-, kép-, hang- és videógyűjtemények multimodális összefoglalását. Ebben a munkában egy extraktív multimodális összefoglaló (MMS) módszert javasolunk, amely automatikusan képes létrehozni egy szöveges összefoglalót egy adott témához kapcsolódó dokumentumok, képek, hangfelvételek és videók sorozatával. A legfontosabb ötlet a multimodális tartalmak közötti szemantikai rések áthidalása. Hanginformációkhoz olyan megközelítést tervezünk, amely szelektív módon használja az átiratot. A látásinformációhoz neurális hálózat segítségével megtanuljuk a szövegek és képek közös reprezentációját. Végezetül az összes multimodális aspektus figyelembe veszi a szövegösszefoglaló létrehozását a szubmoduláris függvények költségvetési optimalizálása révén a kiemelkedő, a redundancia, az olvashatóság és a lefedettség maximalizálásával. Továbbá bemutatunk egy MMS korpuszt angol és kínai nyelven. Az adatkészlet kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk más versenyképes alapvető módszereket felülmúlja.', 'it': "Il rapido aumento dei dati multimediali su Internet richiede una sintesi multimodale da raccolte di testi, immagini, audio e video. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un metodo estrattivo Multi-modal Summarization (MMS) che può generare automaticamente un riepilogo testuale dato un insieme di documenti, immagini, audio e video relativi a un argomento specifico. L'idea chiave è quella di colmare le lacune semantiche tra contenuti multimodali. Per informazioni audio, progettiamo un approccio per utilizzare selettivamente la sua trascrizione. Per informazioni sulla visione, impariamo rappresentazioni congiunte di testi e immagini utilizzando una rete neurale. Infine, tutti gli aspetti multimodali sono considerati per generare il riepilogo testuale massimizzando la salienza, la non ridondanza, la leggibilità e la copertura attraverso l'ottimizzazione budgetizzata delle funzioni submoduli. Introducemo inoltre un corpus MMS in inglese e cinese. I risultati sperimentali su questo set di dati dimostrano che il nostro metodo supera altri metodi di base competitivi.", 'kk': 'Интернеттегі мультимедиа деректерінің тез көтерілуі мәтін, сурет, аудио және видео жинақтарынан көп модельді жазылу керек. Бұл жұмыста біз көп модел тұжырымдастыру (MMS) әдісін автоматты түрде құжаттар, кескіндер, аудио және видео тізіміне сәйкес келген мәтіннің тұжырымдамасын құруға мүмкін болады. Көп модалдық мазмұның арасындағы семантикалық кеңістіктерді көшірмелеу идеясы. Аудио мәліметі үшін, біз оның транскриптерін таңдау үшін қасиетін құрамыз. Көрініс мәліметі үшін біз невралды желімен мәтін мен кескіндердің біріктірімізді үйренеміз. Соңында, бүкіл көп модалдық аспекттер текстуралық тұжырымдамасын құру үшін бөлшектелген ішкі модульдер функцияларының оптимизациясын көтеріп, қайталанбаған, оқу мүмкіндігін және мәтіндігін көтері Біз ағылшын және қытайша MMS корпусын таңдаймыз. Бұл деректер жиынының тәжірибелі нәтижелері біздің әдіміміз басқа тәжірибелі негізгі тәжірибелі тәжірибелі тәжірибелі', 'lt': 'The rapid increase of the multimedia data over the Internet necessitates multi-modal summarization from collections of text, image, audio and video.  Šiame darbe siūlome ekstraktyvų daugiarūšio apibendrinimo (MMS) metodą, kuris automatiškai gali sukaupti tekstinę santrauką su konkrečia tema susijusių dokumentų, vaizdų, garso ir vaizdo įrašų rinkiniu. Pagrindinė idėja – užkirsti kelią semantinei įvairiarūšio turinio spragai. Garso informacijai mes parengiame metodą, kad pasirinktinai panaudotume jo transkripciją. Informacijai apie regėjimą mes mokome bendras tekstų ir vaizdų atspaudas naudojant nervinį tinklą. Galiausiai manoma, kad visi daugiarūšio transporto aspektai sukuria tekstūrinę santrauką, maksimaliai padidinant rūgštingumą, atleidimą nuo darbo, skaitomumą ir aprėptį, optimizuojant submodulines funkcijas pagal biudžetą. Mes taip pat pristatysime MMS korpus anglų ir kinų kalbomis. Eksperimentiniai šio duomenų rinkinio rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas yra didesnis už kitus konkurencinius bazinius metodus.', 'mk': 'Брзото зголемување на мултимедијалните податоци преку Интернет бара мултимодијална резултатација од колекциите на текст, слика, аудио и видео. Во оваа работа, предложуваме метод на екстрактивна мултимодијална резултатација (ММС), кој може автоматски да генерира текстуална резултата со оглед на множина документи, слики, аудио и видеа поврзани со специфична тема. Клучната идеја е да ги преминеме семантичните празнини помеѓу мултимодилните содржини. За аудио информации, дизајнираме пристап за селективно користење на неговата транскрипција. За информации за визија, научиме заеднички претставувања на текстови и слики користејќи нервна мрежа. Finally, all the multi-modal aspects are considered to generate the textural summary by maximizing the salience, non-redundancy, readability and coverage through budgeted optimization of submodular functions.  Понатаму претставуваме ММС корпус на англиски и кинески. Експерименталните резултати на овој податок покажуваат дека нашиот метод ги надминува другите конкурентни основни методи.', 'mn': 'Интернет дээрх олон медиа өгөгдлийн хурдан нэмэгдэх нь текст, зураг, аудио болон видео цуглуулалтын олон модул цуглуулалт хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид олон моделийн жинхэнэ хэвлэл (MMS) аргыг автоматаар бичсэн баримт, зураг, аудио, бичлэгүүд болон тодорхой сэдвээс холбогдсон бүтээгдэхүүний жинхэнэ хэвлэлийг бий болгож чадна. Үндсэн санаа бол олон моделийн бүтээгдэхүүн хоорондын semantic ялгааг дамжуулах юм. Аудио мэдээллийн тулд бид сонголтой хэлбэрийг ашиглах арга загварыг бүтээж байна. Дэлхийн мэдээллийн тулд бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж texts болон зурагнуудын нийлбэр илэрхийллийг суралцдаг. Эцэст нь, бүх олон модуль асуудлууд нь субмодуль функцуудын хамгийн сайн сайжруулах боломжтой багасгах болон багасгах боломжтой болгон бүтээгдэхүүний жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийг бий болгодог. Бид дахиад Англи, Хятад хэлний MMS корпус илтгэнэ. Энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь бусад өрсөлдөг суурь шугам арга зэрэг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'The rapid increase of the multimedia data over the Internet necessitates multi-modal summarization from collections of text, image, audio and video.  F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu metodu estrattiv ta’ Sommarju Multimodali (MMS) li jista’ awtomatikament jiġġenera sommarju testwali mogħti sett ta’ dokumenti, immaġni, awdjo u vidjows relatati ma’ suġġett speċifiku. L-idea ewlenija hija li jitnaqqsu d-distakki semantiċi bejn il-kontenut multimodali. Għal informazzjoni awdjo, aħna niddisinjaw approċċ biex nużaw b’mod selettiv it-traskrizzjoni tiegħu. Għal informazzjoni dwar il-viżjoni, nitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet konġunti ta’ testi u immaġni bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali. Fl-aħħar nett, l-aspetti multimodali kollha huma kkunsidrati li jiġġeneraw is-sommarju testurali billi jimmassimizzaw is-salienza, in-nuqqas ta’ sensja, il-leġibbiltà u l-kopertura permezz tal-ottimizzazzjoni baġitjata tal-funzjonijiet sottomodulari. Aħna jintroduċu wkoll korpus MMS bl-Ingliż u ċ-Ċiniż. The experimental results on this dataset demonstrate that our method outperforms other competitive baseline methods.', 'ms': 'Peningkatan cepat data multimedia melalui Internet memerlukan ringkasan multi modal dari koleksi teks, imej, audio dan video. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan kaedah Penapisan Multi modal (MMS) ekstraktif yang boleh secara automatik menghasilkan ringkasan teks diberikan set dokumen, imej, audio dan video yang berkaitan dengan topik tertentu. Idea utama adalah untuk menyembunyikan ruang semantik antara kandungan multi modal. Untuk maklumat audio, kita merancang pendekatan untuk menggunakan transkripsinya secara selektif. Untuk maklumat penglihatan, kita belajar perwakilan bersama teks dan imej menggunakan rangkaian saraf. Akhirnya, semua aspek berbilang-modal dianggap untuk menghasilkan ringkasan tekstural dengan maksimumkan salience, non-redundancy, readability dan penyamaran melalui optimizasi dibuang fungsi submodular. Kami memperkenalkan MMS corpus dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Cina. Hasil percubaan pada set data ini menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melebihi kaedah asas kompetitif lain.', 'ml': 'ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റിലെ multimedia ഡേറ്റായുള്ള വേഗത കൂടുതല്\u200d വേഗത കൂടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ടെക്സ്റ്റ്, ചിത്രം, ഓഡിയോ വീഡിയോ സംഘത ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രായോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രാദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല-മോഡല്\u200d ചുരുക്കത്തിന്\u200dറെ (MMS) രീതി കൂടുതല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉള്ളടക്കങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് തമ്മിലുള്ള വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രധാന ആശയമാ ഓഡിയോ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാഴ്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് പുരുഷന്\u200d നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പദ അവസാനം, എല്ലാ പല മോഡലിന്റെയും ഭാഗങ്ങളും സബ്മോഡുള്\u200d ഫങ്ഷനുകളുടെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടത്തിലൂടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശേഷ ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ചൈനീസും എംഎസ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ കൂടി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മറ്റു മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പി', 'no': 'Den raske økninga av multimediadataene over Internett må ha fleire modal samansering frå samlingar av tekst, bilete, lyd og video. I denne arbeida foreslår vi eit ekstraktivt multimodal samandrag (MMS) metode som kan automatisk laga eit tekstsamandrag gjeve eit sett av dokument, bilete, audio og videoar som er relatert til eit spesifikke emne. Nøkkelideen er å bryta semantiske mellom fleire modal innhald. For lydinformasjon designerer vi ein tilnærming til å velje bruka transkripta. For visingsinformasjon lærer vi saman representasjonar av tekst og bilete med ein neuralnettverk. Til slutt vert alle fleire modale aspektane kalla til å laga teksturelle sammendrag ved å maksimere saliensjonen, ikkje- redundansjonen, lesabilitet og dekking gjennom budgetoptimalisering av undermodular funksjonar. Vi introduserer meir ein MMS-korpus på engelsk og kinesisk. Eksperimentale resultatene på denne dataset viser at metoden vårt utfører andre konkurentære baseline-metodar.', 'pl': 'Szybki wzrost danych multimedialnych w Internecie wymaga multimodalnego podsumowania ze zbiorów tekstu, obrazu, audio i wideo. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy wyciągającą metodę multimodalnego podsumowania (MMS), która może automatycznie generować podsumowanie tekstowe pod kątem zestawu dokumentów, obrazów, audio i filmów związanych z konkretnym tematem. Kluczową ideą jest wypełnienie luk semantycznych pomiędzy treściami multimodalnymi. Dla informacji audio projektujemy podejście do selektywnego wykorzystania jej transkrypcji. Dla informacji wzrokowych uczymy się wspólnych reprezentacji tekstów i obrazów za pomocą sieci neuronowej. Wreszcie, wszystkie aspekty multimodalne są uwzględniane w celu generowania podsumowania teksturowego poprzez maksymalizację znaczenia, nieredundancji, czytelności i zasięgu poprzez budżetowaną optymalizację funkcji submodułowych. Ponadto wprowadzamy korpus MMS w języku angielskim i chińskim. Wyniki eksperymentalne na tym zbiorze danych pokazują, że nasza metoda przewyższa inne konkurencyjne metody bazowe.', 'ro': 'Creșterea rapidă a datelor multimedia pe Internet necesită rezumarea multimodală din colecții de text, imagini, audio și video. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă extractivă Multi-modală Summarizare (MMS) care poate genera automat un rezumat textual dat fiind un set de documente, imagini, audio și videoclipuri legate de un anumit subiect. Ideea cheie este de a elimina decalajele semantice dintre conținutul multimodal. Pentru informații audio, proiectăm o abordare pentru a utiliza selectiv transcrierea acesteia. Pentru informații vizuale, învățăm reprezentări comune ale textelor și imaginilor folosind o rețea neurală. În cele din urmă, toate aspectele multimodale sunt considerate pentru a genera rezumatul textual prin maximizarea salienței, neredundanței, lizibilității și acoperirii prin optimizarea bugetară a funcțiilor submodulare. Mai mult introducem un corpus MMS în limba engleză și chineză. Rezultatele experimentale ale acestui set de date demonstrează că metoda noastră depășește alte metode de bază competitive.', 'so': 'Si dhaqso ah u kordhinta macluumaadka badan ee Internetka waxaa loo baahan yahay summarin kala duduwan oo laga soo ururiyo qoraal, sawir, audio iyo fiidiyo. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab aad u soo saari karto soo saarista (MMS), kaas oo si automatic ah u sameyn kara summar qoraal ah oo la qoray dukumenti, sawirro, audio iyo fiidiyo la xiriira mada gaar ah. Fikirada muhiimka ah waa in la isqabsado isbedelka kala duduwan waxyaabaha kala duduwan. Macluumaadka codsiga, waxaynu u qornaa qaab aan si gaar ah u isticmaalno qoraalkiisa. Macluumaadka muuqashada waxaynu barnaa noocyo wadajir ah oo ku qoran qoraal iyo sawirro isticmaalaya shabakadda cawinaad. Ugu dambaysta, dhamaan dhinacyada kala duduwan waxaa looga xisaabiyaa in ay soo kordhaan dhamaan dhamaadka dhaqanka qoraalka, si aad u sii kordhisid saliidda, wax-hoosaysiinta, awoodda akhriska iyo daboolka, si loo beddelo booqashada shuqullada submodulka ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa xaraf MMS oo ku qoran Ingiriis iyo Shiino. Imtixaanka ku saabsan tartixaankan waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayagu uu ka soo baxo qaabab kale oo iskutallaabta ah.', 'sr': 'Brzo povećanje multimedijskih podataka na internetu potrebno je multimodalno sažetanje od kolekcija teksta, slika, audio i video. U ovom poslu predlažemo ekstraktivnu metodu multimodalne samarizacije (MMS), koja može automatski stvoriti tekstualni sažetak s obzirom na skup dokumenta, slika, audija i video povezanog sa specifičnom temom. Ključna ideja je da se premostimo semantičke praznine između multimodalnog sadržaja. Za audio informacije, dizajniramo pristup selektivnom korištenju prepisanja. Za informacije o viziji, naučimo zajedničke predstave teksta i slika koristeći neuralnu mrežu. Konačno, svi multimodalni aspekti se smatraju generiranjem teksturalnog sažetka maksimaliziranjem salijencije, ne-redundancije, čitljivosti i pokrivanja kroz budžetnu optimizaciju podmodularnih funkcija. Dalje predstavljamo MMS korpus na engleskom i kineskom. Eksperimentalni rezultati ovog seta podataka pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi druge konkurentne osnovne metode.', 'si': 'ඉන්තර්ජාලයේ ඉන්තර්ජාලයේ මාල්ටිමිඩියා දත්තේ වේගවත් වැඩියාව අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා පාළුව, පින්තූර, ශ්\u200dරමාණ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, පින්තූර, ඔඩියෝස් හා විඩියෝස් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පැත්ත මුළු අදහසය තමයි විශේෂ මොඩාල් සාමාන්ත්\u200dරිය අතර සිමාන්ත්\u200dරික අවශ්\u200dයය පැත්ත කරන්න. අඩියෝ තොරතුරු සඳහා, අපි ඒකේ වාර්තාව භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා. දර්ශනය තොරතුරු සඳහා, අපි පිළිතුරු සහ පිළිතුරු සම්බන්ධ පිළිතුරු ඉගෙන ගන්නවා න්\u200dයුරාල ජ අන්තිමේදි, සියලුම් විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය හැම විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය හැම විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය හැම විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ අපි තව ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ චීනි වල MMS කොර්පස් එකක් පෙනුම් කරනවා. මේ තොරතුරු සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ පද්ධති', 'sv': 'Den snabba ökningen av multimediadata över Internet kräver multimodal sammanfattning från samlingar av text, bild, ljud och video. I detta arbete föreslår vi en extraktiv Multi-modal Summarisation (MMS) metod som automatiskt kan generera en textsammanfattning med en uppsättning dokument, bilder, ljud och videor relaterade till ett specifikt ämne. Nyckelidén är att överbrygga de semantiska klyftorna mellan multimodalt innehåll. För ljudinformation utformar vi ett tillvägagångssätt för att selektivt använda dess transkription. För syninformation lär vi oss gemensamma representationer av texter och bilder med hjälp av ett neuralt nätverk. Slutligen anses alla multimodala aspekter generera textsammanfattningen genom att maximera saliens, icke-redundans, läsbarhet och täckning genom budgeterad optimering av submodulära funktioner. Vi introducerar vidare en MMS korpus på engelska och kinesiska. De experimentella resultaten på denna datauppsättning visar att vår metod överträffar andra konkurrenskraftiga baslinjemetoder.', 'ta': 'இணையத்தில் உள்ள பல்வேறு தரவுகளின் விரைவாக அதிகரி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு வெளியேற்றும் பல- மாதிரி சுருக்கம் (MMS) முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது தானாகவே ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட தலைப்புகளுடன் தொடர்புடைய ஒரு கூ பல- மோடம் உள்ளடக்கங்களுக்கிடையே பென்மான்டிக் குறிப்புகளை பார்க்க வேண்டும். ஒலி தகவலுக்கு, நாம் தேர்ந்தெடுத்து அதன் எழுத்துதலை பயன்படுத்த ஒரு வழியை வடிவமைக்கிறோம். For vision information, we learn joint representations of texts and images using a neural network.  இறுதியில், அனைத்து பல- மாற்று பகுதிகளும் துணை செயல்பாடுகளின் மூலம் உப மாற்றத்தை பெரிதாக்குவதற்காக கருதப்படுகிறது. நாம் மேலும் ஒரு MMS கார்ப்ஸை ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் சீன மொழியில் அறிமுகப்படுத்துகிறோம். இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தின் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் நமது முறையில் மற்ற போராட்டியான அடிப்படை முறைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறத', 'ur': 'انٹرنیٹ پر ملٹیمیڈیا ڈیٹا کی سرعت بڑھنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ متن، تصویر، آڈیو اور ویڈیو کے مجموعہ سے بہت سی موڈال جمع کریں۔ اس کام میں ہم ایک اخلاقی Multi modal Summarization (MMS) طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں جو ایک خاص موضوع کے ساتھ رابطہ رکھی ہوئی سند، تصاویر، اوڈیو اور ویڈیو کے ساتھ ایک تدبیر کے ساتھ تدبیر کرسکتا ہے۔ کلی ایڈیون یہ ہے کہ multi modal contents کے درمیان سیمانٹیکی فاصلہ برابر کرنا ہے. آڈیو معلومات کے لئے ہم ایک طریقہ طراحی کرتے ہیں اس کے ترنسکریپٹ کا استعمال کرنا۔ بینا معلومات کے لئے، ہم ایک نئورل نیٹورک کے مطابق پیغام اور تصاویروں کے ساتھ ملک کی تصاویرات سکھاتے ہیں. بالآخر، تمام متعدد موڈال الگوں کو متعدد نظر کیا جاتا ہے کہ متعدد ساری ساری پیدائش کریں، غیر ردundancy، پڑھنے کی طاقت اور کاوپٹ کے ذریعہ سے زیر موڈولر فعالیتوں کی عمدگی کے ذریعہ۔ ہم اس کے بعد انگلیسی اور چینی میں MMS کورپوس کو معرفی کرتے ہیں۔ اس ڈیٹا سٹ کے آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ دوسرے مسابقات بیس لین طریقے سے کام لیتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Internetdagi multimedia maʼlumotning tez koʻpayishi, matn, rasm, audio ва видео жамиятlaridan multi- modal hisoblash kerak. Bu ishda, biz bir necha modal umumiy hisoblash usulini tahrirlashni talab qilamiz. Bu mavzu bilan bogʻliq mavzu boʻlgan bir necha hujjatlar, rasm, audio va video yaratish mumkin. Bir necha modal tarkibi orasidagi semantik gaplarni birlashtirish mumkin. Audio maʼlumoti uchun biz uni tanlangan yozuvdan foydalanishga qaramamiz. Koʻrinish haqida, biz textlar va rasmlarning bir nechta taʼminlovchilarini neyrol tarmoq bilan o'rganamiz. Oxirida, hamma ko'plab modal qismlari, tub modulyasi funksiyatlarni ko'paytirish orqali sotuvchi, kamaytirish, oʻqib boʻlmaydi va kodlash natijasida hisoblanadi. Biz ingliz tilida va Xitoycha MMS corpusini ko'rganamiz. Ushbu maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari esa bizning usuli boshqa kompetitiv baseline usullarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Sự gia tăng nhanh chóng của dữ liệu truyền nhân trên Internet đòi hỏi sự tổng hợp đa phương từ các bộ sưu tập văn bản, ảnh, âm thanh và video. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp khai thác các phương trình đa phương thần khai thác (MMS) khai thác tự động một bản tóm tắt có kèm theo một bộ tài liệu, ảnh, tiếng audio và đoạn video liên quan đến một chủ đề cụ thể. Quan trọng là phải vượt qua khoảng trống ngữ pháp giữa nội dung đa phương. Để thông tin âm thanh, chúng tôi thiết kế một phương pháp có thể chọn lựa ghi chép. Để tìm thông tin về tầm nhìn, chúng tôi học các biểu tượng liên kết các văn bản và hình ảnh bằng mạng thần kinh. Cuối cùng, tất cả các yếu tố đa phương được cho là tạo ra tổng kết bằng cách tăng tối đa khả năng gây nổi bật, không thừa thải, dễ đọc và bao quát qua khả năng tối ưu tiên các chức năng phụ. Chúng tôi còn giới thiệu một tập đoàn MMS ở Anh và Trung Quốc. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu này chứng minh phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội các phương pháp cơ bản cạnh tranh.', 'nl': "De snelle toename van multimediagegevens via internet vereist multimodale samenvattingen van verzamelingen tekst, beeld, audio en video. In dit werk stellen we een extractieve multimodale summarization (MMS) methode voor die automatisch een tekstuele samenvatting kan genereren met een reeks documenten, afbeeldingen, audio en video's gerelateerd aan een specifiek onderwerp. Het belangrijkste idee is om de semantische kloof tussen multimodale inhoud te overbruggen. Voor audio-informatie ontwerpen we een aanpak om de transcriptie selectief te gebruiken. Voor visuele informatie leren we gezamenlijke representaties van teksten en beelden met behulp van een neuraal netwerk. Ten slotte worden alle multimodale aspecten overwogen om de structurele samenvatting te genereren door de salience, non-redundantie, leesbaarheid en dekking te maximaliseren door middel van begrotingsoptimatie van submodulaire functies. Verder introduceren we een MMS corpus in het Engels en Chinees. De experimentele resultaten op deze dataset tonen aan dat onze methode beter presteert dan andere concurrerende baseline methoden.", 'bg': 'Бързото увеличаване на мултимедийните данни в интернет налага мултимодално обобщаване от колекции от текст, изображения, аудио и видео. В тази работа предлагаме екстрактивен метод за мултимодално обобщаване (ММС), който може автоматично да генерира текстово резюме, като се дава набор от документи, изображения, аудио и видеоклипове, свързани с конкретна тема. Ключовата идея е да се преодолеят семантичните празнини между мултимодалното съдържание. За аудио информация ние проектираме подход за селективно използване на нейната транскрипция. За визуална информация научаваме съвместни представяния на текстове и изображения чрез невронна мрежа. И накрая, всички мултимодални аспекти се считат за генериране на текстурното резюме чрез максимално увеличаване на видимостта, нередукцията, четливостта и покритието чрез бюджетна оптимизация на субмодулните функции. Въвеждаме и корпус на ММС на английски и китайски език. Експерименталните резултати на този набор от данни показват, че нашият метод надминава други конкурентни базови методи.', 'id': 'The rapid increase of the multimedia data over the Internet necessitates multi-modal summarization from collections of text, image, audio and video.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode ekstraktif Multi modal Summarization (MMS) yang dapat secara otomatis menghasilkan ringkasan tekstual diberikan set dokumen, gambar, audio dan video yang berhubungan dengan topik spesifik. Ide kunci adalah untuk menyembunyikan ruang semantis antara isi multi modal. Untuk informasi audio, kami merancang pendekatan untuk menggunakan transkripsinya secara selektif. For vision information, we learn joint representations of texts and images using a neural network.  Akhirnya, semua aspek multi modal dianggap untuk menghasilkan ringkasan tekstural dengan memaksimalkan salinsi, non-redundancy, readability dan penutupan melalui optimisasi anggaran fungsi submodular. Kami lebih lanjut memperkenalkan MMS corpus dalam bahasa Inggris dan Cina. Hasil percobaan pada set data ini menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi metode dasar kompetitif lainnya.', 'de': 'Die rasante Zunahme der multimedialen Daten über das Internet erfordert eine multimodale Zusammenfassung von Text-, Bild-, Audio- und Video-Sammlungen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine extraktive Multi-Modal Summarization (MMS) Methode vor, die automatisch eine textuelle Zusammenfassung mit einer Reihe von Dokumenten, Bildern, Audios und Videos zu einem bestimmten Thema generieren kann. Dabei geht es darum, die semantischen Lücken zwischen multimodalen Inhalten zu überbrücken. Für Audioinformationen entwerfen wir einen Ansatz, deren Transkription selektiv zu nutzen. Für Sehinformationen lernen wir gemeinsame Darstellungen von Texten und Bildern mithilfe eines neuronalen Netzes. Schließlich werden alle multimodalen Aspekte berücksichtigt, um die strukturelle Zusammenfassung zu generieren, indem die Salienz, Nicht-Redundanz, Lesbarkeit und Abdeckung durch budgetierte Optimierung submodulärer Funktionen maximiert wird. Weiterhin führen wir ein MMS-Korpus in Englisch und Chinesisch ein. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse dieses Datensatzes zeigen, dass unsere Methode andere wettbewerbsfähige Basismethoden übertrifft.', 'hr': 'Brzo povećanje multimedijskih podataka na internetu potrebno je multimodalno sažetanje od kolekcija teksta, slika, audio i video. U ovom poslu predlažemo ekstraktivnu metodu multimodalne sažetke (MMS), koja može automatski stvoriti tekstualni sažetak s obzirom na skup dokumenta, slika, audija i video povezanog s specifičnom temom. Ključna ideja je premostiti semantičke praznine između multimodalnog sadržaja. Za audio informacije, dizajniramo pristup selektivnom korištenju prepisanja. Za informacije o viziji, učimo zajedničke predstave teksta i slika koristeći neuralnu mrežu. Konačno se smatra da su svi multimodalni aspekti proizveli teksturalni sažetak maksimaliziranjem salijencije, neoredundancije, čitljivosti i pokrivanja putem budžetne optimizacije podmodularnih funkcija. Dalje predstavljamo MMS korpus na engleskom i kineskom. Eksperimentalni rezultati ovog seta podataka pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi druge konkurentne osnovne metode.', 'da': 'Den hurtige stigning i multimediedata over internettet kræver multimodal opsummering fra samlinger af tekst, billede, lyd og video. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ekstraktiv Multi-modal Summarization (MMS) metode, der automatisk kan generere et tekstresumé givet et sæt dokumenter, billeder, lydbånd og videoer relateret til et bestemt emne. Nøgleideen er at bygge bro over de semantiske kløfter mellem multimodalt indhold. Til lydinformation designer vi en tilgang til selektivt at bruge dens transskription. Til visionsoplysninger lærer vi fælles repræsentationer af tekster og billeder ved hjælp af et neuralt netværk. Endelig anses alle de multimodale aspekter for at generere den tekstuelle resumé ved at maksimere fremhævelse, ikke-redundans, læsbarhed og dækning gennem budgetteret optimering af submodulære funktioner. Vi introducerer endvidere et MMS korpus på engelsk og kinesisk. De eksperimentelle resultater på dette datasæt viser, at vores metode overgår andre konkurrencedygtige basismetoder.', 'fa': 'افزایش سریع داده های multimedia روی اینترنت نیاز به جمع\u200cآوری متن، تصویر، صدا و ویدئو چندین مدال است. در این کار، ما یک روش جمع\u200cسازی Multi modal (MMS) خارجی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند خودکار یک جمع متن را تولید کند که مجموعه\u200cای از سند، تصاویر، آدیو\u200cها و ویدئو مربوط به یک موضوع خاص است. ایده کلید این است که فاصله\u200cهای semantic بین محتویات multi modal را برابر کنیم. برای اطلاعات صوتی، ما یک روش برای انتخاب از ترجمه\u200cاش طراحی می\u200cکنیم. برای اطلاعات دید، ما نمایش\u200cهای متن و تصاویر مشترک را با استفاده از شبکه عصبی یاد می\u200cگیریم. بالاخره، تمام نقطه\u200cهای متعدد متعدد به تولید جمعیت متعدد با maximizing the salience, non-redundancy, readability and coverage through budgeted optimization of submodular functions فکر می\u200cشود. ما بیشتر یک کورپوس MMS را به انگلیسی و چینی معرفی می کنیم. نتایج آزمایشی روی این مجموعه داده ها نشان می دهند که روش ما روش های پایین مسابقه\u200cای دیگر را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Uongezeko wa haraka wa takwimu za mtandao wa intaneti unahitaji muhtasari wa muhtasari kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko wa maandishi, picha, sauti na video. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa Ujumbe wa Mitandao (MMS) ambao unaweza kutengeneza muhtasari wa mfululizo wa maandishi uliotolewa na mfululizo wa nyaraka, picha, audio na video zinazohusiana na mada maalum. Wazo muhimu ni kuingia mapambano ya kimapenzi kati ya vifaa vingi. Kwa taarifa za sauti, tunatengeneza njia ya kutumia uandishi wake kwa uchaguzi. Kwa taarifa za maoni, tunajifunza uwakilishi wa pamoja wa maandishi na picha kwa kutumia mtandao wa kisasa. Mwisho, mambo yote mengi yanachukuliwa kutengeneza muhtasari wa mfululizo kwa kuongeza uzalishaji, hakuna uchunguzi, uwezekano wa kusoma na habari kupitia uwezekano wa bajeti zilizotengenezwa kwa kazi za kidini. Tunaonyesha makampuni ya MMS kwa lugha ya Kiingereza na Kichina. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti hii ya takwimu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inatoa njia nyingine za msingi za ushindani.', 'tr': 'Internet üstündeki multimediýa maglumatyň tiz köprüsü metin, surat, ses we wideo jemgyýetlerinden birnäçe modal tertiblemesi gerek. Bu işde, biz esasy bir näçe modal Toplaýyş (MMS) yöntemi otomatik bilen metin toparyny bejermek üçin bir topar sened, surat, audio we wideo täblisa teklip edip biler. Anahtar ideýa, köp modal mazmunlar arasynda semantik gaplary köçürmekdir. Ses maglumaty üçin, biz öz terjimesini saýlamak üçin bir ýazşy tasarlýarys. Görünen bilgileri için, tekstler ve suratların birleşmiş temsillerini nöral a ğ kullanarak öğreniyoruz. Soňunda, tüm multi modal aspektler çykyş, süýşirlik, gaýtalançylyk bolmadyk we çykyş şeklinde budgetedilen submodular fonksiyonlaryň optimizasy bilen janlaşdyrmak üçin pikir edilýär. Biz indi Iňlisçe we hyt dilinde MMS korpusyny tanyşdyrýarys. Bu dataýa düzümlerindeki denetim netijesi biziň yöntemimiziň başga döwletli baseline yönleriň üstüne çykýandygyny görkezýär.', 'am': 'በИнтернет ላይ የብዙ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን ፈጥኖ የሚጨምረው የጽሑፍ፣ ምስል፣ ድምፅ እና ቪዲዮ ከመሰብሰብ የተለየ ብዙ-modal ማሳተሚያ ያስፈልጋል። በዚህ ስራ፣ የብዙ-modal ማጠቃለያ (MMS) ማቀናጃ እናስጀምር፤ በተለየ ጉዳዩ ላይ የተጠቃሚ ሰነድ፣ ምስሎች፣ ድምጽ እና ቪዲዮችን እና የጽሑፍ ማጠቃለያ ይችላል፡፡ የኩነቱ አሳብ በብዙ-ሞዴል ውስጥ የሚኖረውን የsemantic መለያየት ለመቀላቀል ነው፡፡ ለድምጽ መረጃ፣ ጽሑፉን በመምረጥ ለመምረጥ የሥርዓት መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለራእይ መረጃ፣ የጽሑፎች እና ምስሎችን የናውሮል መረብ በመጠቀም እናስተማራለን፡፡ Finally, all the multi-modal aspects are considered to generate the textural summary by maximizing the salience, non-redundancy, readability and coverage through budgeted optimization of submodular functions.  እንግዲህ በንግግሊዝና ቻይናዊ የኤሜስል ኮፕስ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዚህ ዳታተርሰት ፈተና ፍሬዎች ልማድ ሌሎችን ተቃዋሚን የደረጃ መሳሪያ ሥርዓት እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Die vinnige verhoog van die multimedia data oor die Internet benodig multimodaal opsomming van versameling van teks, beeld, oudio en video. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n ekstraktiewe Multimodale Opsomming (MMS) metode wat kan outomaties genereer 'n teks opsomming wat gegee is 'n stel van dokumente, beelde, audios en videos met 'n spesifieke onderwerp. Die sleutel idee is om die semantiese spasies tussen multimodale inhoud te brui. Vir oudio inligting, ontwerp ons 'n toegang om te kies sy transkripteer te gebruik. Vir gesigte inligting leer ons joint representations of texts and images using a neural network. Eindelik word al die multimodale aspekte aangeneem om die teksturale opsomming te genereer deur die maksimalisering van die salienskap, nie-herhaaldelikheid, leesbaarheid en dekking deur budgeteerde optimizasie van submodulare funksies te maksimaliseer. Ons introduiseer nog 'n MMS korpus in Engels en Sjinees. Die eksperimentale resultate op hierdie datastel vertoon dat ons metode ander mededingstekeningsmetodes uitvoer.", 'ko': '인터넷상에서 멀티미디어 데이터가 급속히 증가함에 따라 텍스트, 이미지, 오디오와 영상 집합에서 다중모드 요약을 해야 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 특정 주제와 관련된 문서, 이미지, 오디오, 동영상 그룹을 지정한 상황에서 텍스트 요약을 자동으로 생성할 수 있는 다중모드 요약 (MMS) 방법을 제시했다.그 관건적인 사상은 다중모드적 내용 간의 의미 갭을 메우는 것이다.오디오 정보에 대해 우리는 선택적으로 그 기록을 사용하는 방법을 설계했다.시각 정보에 대해 우리는 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 텍스트와 이미지의 결합 표현을 배운다.마지막으로 서브모듈 함수에 대한 예산 최적화를 통해 현저성, 비冗余성, 읽기 가능성과 커버율을 최대한 높이고 모든 다중모드를 고려하여 무늬 요약을 생성한다.우리는 영어와 중국어의 채신어 자료 라이브러리를 한층 더 소개했다.이 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 다른 경쟁력 있는 기선 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'hy': "Միլիմեդիայի տվյալների արագ աճը ինտերնետի միջոցով անհրաժեշտ է բազմամոդալ համառոտագրություն տեքստի, պատկերի, ձայնի և տեսահոլովակի հավաքածուներից: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմամոդային համառոտագրման (ՄՄՍ) մեթոդ, որը կարող է ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծել տեքստային համառոտագրություն, որը կտա մի շարք փաստաթղթեր, պատկերներ, ձայներ և տեսանյութեր, որոնք կապված են որոշակի թեմայի հետ Հիմնական գաղափարն այն է, որ բազմամոդային պարունակությունների միջև սեմանտիկ տարբերությունները հաղթահարենք: For audio information, we design an approach to selectively use its transcription.  For vision information, we learn joint representations of texts and images using a neural network.  Վերջապես, բոլոր բազմամոդալ ասպեկտները համարվում են ստեղծելու տեքստորական համառոտագրություն' մեծացնելով արտաքին, ոչ ավելորդ, կարդալիությունը և ծածկումը բյուջեցված օպտիմացման միջոցով ենթամոդուլային ֆունկցիաների: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք ՄՄՍ կորպուս անգլերենով և չինարենով: Այս տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը գերազանցում է այլ մրցակցության հիմնական մեթոդներ:", 'az': 'İnternet üzərində multimedia məlumatının tez artması məktub, surat, audio və video koleksiyonlarından çoxlu modal təmizləməsi lazımdır. Bu işdə, biz müəyyən bir məsələyə bağlı məsələlər, suratlar, audio və videolar ilə birlikdə təkrar-təkrar bir çoxlu modal Toplaşdırma (MMS) metodlarını təklif edirik. Anahtar fikri çoxlu modal məzmunların arasındakı semantik boşluqlarını köçürməkdir. Ses məlumatı üçün, seçilmək üçün onun transkriptini istifadə edirik. Görüş məlumatı üçün, nöral şəbəkəsini istifadə edərək mətnlərin və şəkillərin birləşdirilməsini öyrənirik. Sonunda, bütün çoxlu modal aspektlər, süslənməsi, qırmızlığı olmayan, oxuyabiləni və pərdə-pərdə altmodular fonksiyonlarının optimizasyonu vasitəsilə təhsil edilməsi üçün təhsil olaraq təhsil edilir. Biz daha sonra İngilizce və Çincə MMS korpusu tanıyırıq. Bu verilən qutusundakı eksperimentli sonuçlar təsdiqləyir ki, metodumuzun başqa müəllif səviyyə metodlarını başa düşər.', 'ca': "El ràpid augment de les dades multimèdia a través d'Internet necessita una resumen multi modal de les col·leccions de text, imatge, àudio i vídeo. En aquesta feina, proposem un mètode extractiu de Resumen Multi modal (MMS) que pot generar automàticament un resum textual dada un conjunt de documents, imatges, audios i vídeos relacionats amb un tema específic. La idea clau és superar les diferències semàntiques entre continguts multimodals. Per a la informació d'àudio, dissenyem un enfocament per utilitzar selectivament la seva transcripció. Per a la informació visual, aprenem representacions conjuntes de textos i imatges fent servir una xarxa neural. Finalment, tots els aspectes multimodals es considera generar el resum textual maximitzant la saliència, la no redundancia, la llegibilitat i la cobertura a través de l'optimització presupuestada de funcions submodulares. Anem a introduir un corpus MMS en anglès i xinès. Els resultats experimentals d'aquest conjunt de dades demostren que el nostre mètode supera altres mètodes de base competitius.", 'cs': 'Rychlý nárůst multimediálních dat po internetu vyžaduje multimodální shrnutí ze sbírek textu, obrazu, audio a videa. V této práci navrhujeme extraktivní metodu multimodální shrnutí (MMS), která může automaticky generovat textové shrnutí podle sady dokumentů, obrázků, audio a videí souvisejících s konkrétním tématem. Klíčovou myšlenkou je překlenout sémantické mezery mezi multimodálním obsahem. Pro audio informace navrhujeme přístup k selektivnímu využití jeho přepisu. Pro zrakové informace se naučíme společné reprezentace textů a obrazů pomocí neuronové sítě. V závěru jsou veškeré multimodální aspekty zvažovány za účelem generování strukturálního shrnutí maximalizací významnosti, non-redundance, čitelnosti a pokrytí prostřednictvím rozpočtové optimalizace submodulárních funkcí. Dále představujeme korpus MMS v angličtině a čínštině. Experimentální výsledky tohoto datového souboru ukazují, že naše metoda překonává ostatní konkurenční základní metody.', 'sq': 'Rritja e shpejtë e të dhënave multimedia nëpër internet kërkon përmbledhje multimodale nga koleksionet e tekstit, imazhit, audio dhe video. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një metodë ekstraktive Multi modal Summarization (MMS) që mund të gjenerojë automatikisht një përmbledhje tekstuale të dhënë një sërë dokumentesh, imazhesh, audio dhe videosh lidhur me një temë të veçantë. The key idea is to bridge the semantic gaps between multi-modal contents.  Për informacion audio, ne dizajnojmë një qasje për të përdorur selektivisht transkriptimin e saj. Për informacionin e vizionit, ne mësojmë përfaqësime të përbashkëta të teksteve dhe imazheve duke përdorur një rrjet nervor. Më së fundi, të gjitha aspektet multimodale konsiderohen të gjenerojnë përmbledhjen teksturale duke maksimizuar pikërimin, mosredundancën, lexueshmërinë dhe mbulimin nëpërmjet optimizimit të buxhetizuar të funksioneve nënmodulare. Ne prezantojmë më tej një korpus MMS në anglisht dhe kinez. Rezultatet eksperimentale në këtë grup të dhënash demonstrojnë se metoda jonë mbizotëron metoda të tjera konkurruese bazë.', 'et': 'Multimeediaandmete kiire kasv Internetis nõuab multimeediaandmete kokkuvõtlikkust teksti-, pildi-, heli- ja videokogudest. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ekstraktiivse multimodaalse kokkuvõtte (MMS) meetodi, mis võib automaatselt genereerida tekstikokkuvõtte konkreetse teemaga seotud dokumentide, piltide, audiode ja videote kogumi. Põhieesmärk on ületada semantilised lüngad multimodaalse sisu vahel. Heliinformatsiooni jaoks kavandame lähenemisviisi selle transkriptsiooni valikuliseks kasutamiseks. Nägemisteabe saamiseks õpime tekstide ja kujutiste ühiseid esitusi neurovõrgu abil. Lõpuks loetakse kõiki multimodaalseid aspekte tekstuurse kokkuvõtte loomiseks, maksimeerides silmapaistvust, mitteredundantsust, loetavust ja katvust submodulaarsete funktsioonide eelarvestatud optimeerimise kaudu. Lisaks tutvustame MMS korpust inglise ja hiina keeles. Selle andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod ületab muid konkurentsivõimelisi baasmeetodeid.', 'fi': 'Multimediadatan nopea lisääntyminen Internetissä edellyttää multimodaalisia yhteenvetoja teksti-, kuva-, ääni- ja videokokoelmista. Tässä työssä ehdotamme ekstraktivista multimodaalisista yhteenvedoista (MMS), joka voi automaattisesti luoda tekstitiivistelmän, joka antaa joukon tiettyyn aiheeseen liittyviä asiakirjoja, kuvia, ääniä ja videoita. Keskeisenä ajatuksena on kuroa umpeen semanttiset kuilut multimodaalisten sisältöjen välillä. Äänitietoa varten suunnittelemme tavan käyttää valikoivasti sen transkriptiota. Näkötietoa varten opimme yhteisiä esityksiä teksteistä ja kuvista neuroverkon avulla. Lopuksi, kaikkien multimodaalisten näkökohtien katsotaan tuottavan tekstuaalisen yhteenvedon maksimoimalla näkyvyys, ei-redundanssi, luettavuus ja kattavuus budjetoidulla optimoinnilla alimodulaariset toiminnot. Lisäksi esittelemme MMS-korpusen englanniksi ja kiinaksi. Tämän aineiston kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme on muita kilpailukykyisiä perusmenetelmiä parempi.', 'bn': 'ইন্টারনেটের মাল্টিমিডিয়া তথ্যের দ্রুত বৃদ্ধি প্রয়োজনীয় টেক্সট, ছবি, অডিও এবং ভিডিও সংগ্রহের সংক্ষেপের প্রয়োজন। এই কাজে আমরা এক্সটেকটিভ মাল্টিমোডাল সামার্মিজেশন (এমএমএস) পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি কিছু নথি, ছবি, অডিও এবং ভিডিও নির্দিষ্ট বিষয়ের সাথে সম্পর মূল ধারণা হচ্ছে বহুমোডালের বিষয়বস্তুর মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক বিভ্রান্তিগুলো ব্রিজ করা। অডিও তথ্যের জন্য, আমরা নির্বাচনের জন্য এটি ট্রান্সপ্রিন্ট ব্যবহার করার একটি উপায় নকশা করি। দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তথ্যের জন্য আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে লেখা এবং ছবির প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখি। পরিশেষে, বাজেটের বাজেট অপ্রাপ্ত বাজেজেটের মাধ্যমে বাজেটের বাজেজেটের অপ্রাসঙ্গিকরণের মাধ্যমে বিশেষ করে বিজ্ঞান, কমান্ডেন্সি, পাঠকতা এবং কা আমরা আরও একটি এমএমএমএস কোর্পাসের সাথে ইংরেজি এবং চীনা ভাষায় পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। এই ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য প্রতিযোগিতার বেসালাইন পদ্ধতিকে প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Brzo povećanje multimedijskih podataka na internetu potrebno je multimodalno sažetanje od kolekcija teksta, slika, audio i video. U ovom poslu predlažemo ekstraktivnu metodu multimodalne samarizacije (MMS), koja može automatski stvoriti tekstualni sažetak s obzirom na skup dokumenta, slika, audija i video povezanih s specifičnom temom. Ključna ideja je da mostite semantičke praznine između multimodalnog sadržaja. Za audio informacije, dizajniramo pristup selektivnom korištenju transkripta. Za informacije o viziji, naučimo zajedničke predstave teksta i slika koristeći neuralnu mrežu. Konačno, svi multimodalni aspekti se smatraju da proizvode teksturalni sažetak maksimalizirajući salijenciju, ne-redundanciju, čitljivost i pokrivanje kroz budžetnu optimizaciju podmodularnih funkcija. Dalje predstavljamo MMS korpus na engleskom i kineskom. Eksperimentalni rezultati ovog seta podataka pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi druge konkurentne osnovne metode.', 'jv': 'Kowe langgar banter data sing multimedia ning Internet kudu nggawe akeh modal sing kudu nggawe teks, gambar, lian lan video. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gunakake sistem Multi-modal Cumarisasi (mm S) sing iso nggawe automaneh nggawe hasar textual sing nyimpen mrêt dokumen, gambar, video lan video sing gambar nggawe gerakan akeh tema sing apik. Layout kanggo kedhuné informasi kanggo kelas, kéné disebarke dadine kang dilapit kanggo nggawe tarjamahan. Terus Informasi Panjenengan, kita gambar nggambar kelas kotak tentang karo gambar tekan lan gambar nggambar netwisan liyane Awak dhéwé nglanggar banter SMS karo Perancis lan Kiyuan Ndoleh sing paling-paling ngentambah dataset iki dadi wis ngerasakno banget nggawe modho sing wis ngerasai basa sing perusahaan.', 'sk': 'Hitro povečanje multimedijskih podatkov prek interneta zahteva multimodalno povzetek iz zbirk besedila, slike, avdio in video. V tem delu predlagamo metodo ekstraktivnega multimodalnega povzetka (MMS), ki lahko samodejno ustvari besedilni povzetek z naborom dokumentov, slik, avdio in videoposnetkov, povezanih z določeno temo. Ključna ideja je premostiti semantične vrzeli med multimodalnimi vsebinami. Za zvočne informacije oblikujemo pristop k selektivni uporabi njene transkripcije. Za informacije o vidu se učimo skupnih predstavitvah besedil in slik z uporabo nevronskega omrežja. Nazadnje, vsi multimodalni vidiki se štejejo za ustvarjanje teksturalnega povzetka z maksimiranjem izpostavljenosti, neredundance, berljivosti in pokritosti s proračunsko optimizacijo podmodularnih funkcij. Predstavljamo tudi korpus MMS v angleščini in kitajščini. Eksperimentalni rezultati tega nabora podatkov kažejo, da naša metoda presega druge konkurenčne osnovne metode.', 'ha': "Rufuwa na ƙãra data na multi-media kan Intanet na ƙayyade kurarin multi-modal daga mai haɗa matsayin, zane, sauti da video. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗar da wata shirin Jummar-Motsi mai yawa (MMM) wanda ke iya ƙiƙiro wani matsayi farat ɗaya da aka ƙayyade wasu takardar takardun, zane, zane, sauti da video da ke husũna da wani maɓalli wanda aka ƙayyade. Maɓalli yana sami gaura na semanti tsakanin cikin tsari masu yawa. Ga bayan maɓallin sauti, za mu ƙayyade wani matsayi ya yi amfani da shi don ka iya amfani da rubutunsa. Agar information na gannai, za'a sanar da mu komai masu gayi wa mistakardar da zanen aiki da wani shirin neural. Haƙĩƙa, ana gane duk masu multi-modal da ke ƙara muhimmin littãfin da aka faɗaɗa sali, kuma ba-rabo, karatun da coverin a bakin da aka buɗa wa aikin na submodulun. Ko ƙara da Muke nuna wata MMM cikin Ingiriya da Kikiniya. Matarin jarraba kan wannan dataset sun nuna cewa metodenmu yana samar da wasu hanyõyi masu bastarwa.", 'he': 'הגידול המהיר של מידע המולטימדיה דרך האינטרנט דורש סדרה מולטימודלית מאוספי טקסט, תמונה, אודיו וידאו. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים שיטת סאמריזציה רבה-מודלית (MMS) יצירה שאפשר ליצור באופן אוטומטי סאמר טקסטלי שנתן קבוצה של מסמכים, תמונות, אודיו וידאו שקשורים לנושא מסוים. הרעיון המרכזי הוא לגשר את הפערים הסמנטיים בין תוכן רב-מודלי. עבור מידע אודיו, אנחנו מעצבים גישה כדי להשתמש בחרותית בתכתיבה שלה. בשביל מידע חזון, אנחנו לומדים מייצגים משותפים של טקסטים ותמונות באמצעות רשת עצבית. Finally, all the multi-modal aspects are considered to generate the textural summary by maximizing the salience, non-redundancy, readability and coverage through budgeted optimization of submodular functions.  We further introduce an MMS corpus in English and Chinese.  התוצאות הניסיונייות על קבוצת המידע הזו מראות ששיטתנו מעלית שיטות תחרותיות אחרות.', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱའི་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྣ་མང་གསོག་སྡེབ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་ན་ཡིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་བརྙན་སྡེར་དང་། སྒྲ་དབྱངས། བར འདི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་བསྡུར་བའི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐིག་གི་མཛོད་ཁུངས་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཐུབ་པའི་མཛོད་རིས གལ་ཆེན་འདི་ནི་རྣམ་པ་མང་བོའི་ནང་དོན་དབར་གྱི་སྔོན་རིང་གི་བར་སྟོང་དག་རྦྲེལ་བ་བཟོ་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད། སྒྲ་དབྱངས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་འདྲི་ཞིག་གདམ་ཁ་གཏད་ཀྱིས་འདྲ་བ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས། མཐོང་སྣང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གེ་དང་བརྙན་རིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་རུང་ངོས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཇུག་རྫོགས་ན། སྣ་མཐུན་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་བ་འདི་དག་གིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་ཡི་གེ་ཆེད་ཤུགས་སུ་བཅུག་པ་མེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་དང་རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་གི་མི་དང་མི་དང་འབྲེལ་པོ་ཞིག་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གནད་སྡུད་འདིའི་ནང་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྐྱེས་པའི་རྨས་གཞི་ལམ་གཞན་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'شبكة Tensor Fusion لتحليل المشاعر متعددة الوسائط', 'pt': 'Rede Tensor Fusion para Análise Multimodal de Sentimentos', 'es': 'Tensor Fusion Network para el análisis de sentimiento multimodal', 'fr': "Réseau Tensor Fusion pour l'analyse des sentiments multimodaux", 'ja': 'マルチモーダルセンチメント分析のためのテンソル融合ネットワーク', 'hi': 'बहुआयामी भावना विश्लेषण के लिए टेंसर संलयन नेटवर्क', 'zh': '以多模态情析者张量融网络', 'ru': 'Tensor Fusion Network для мультимодального анализа настроений', 'ga': 'Líonra Comhleá Tensor le haghaidh Anailís Ilmhódúil Mothúchán', 'el': 'Δίκτυο σύντηξης Tensor για την ανάλυση πολυμέσων συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'Tensor Fusion hálózat multimodális érzelmek elemzéséhez', 'kk': 'КөпModal Sentiment анализиясы үшін тенсор Fusion желі', 'lt': 'Tenzorių sintezės tinklas daugiarūšio jutimo analizei', 'it': "Tensor Fusion Network per l'analisi dei sentimenti multimodali", 'ka': 'Multimodal Sentiment ანალიზაციისთვის ტენსორის ფუზის ქსელი', 'mk': 'Тензорска фузиска мрежа за анализа на мултимодилните чувства', 'ml': 'Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'mt': 'Netwerk tal-Fużjoni tat-Tensor għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment Multimodali', 'mn': 'Multimodal Sentiment Analysis for Tensor Fusion Network', 'no': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Fusi Tensor untuk Analisis Sensan Multimodal', 'pl': 'Sieć Tensor Fusion dla multimodalnej analizy sentymentów', 'ro': 'Rețeaua Tensor Fusion pentru analiza sentimentelor multimodale', 'sr': 'Tensor Fusion Network za multimodalnu analizu sentimenta', 'sv': 'Tensor Fusion Network för multimodal känselanalys', 'so': 'Shabakadda fusion ee Tensor for analysis wakhti badan', 'si': 'ගොඩමෝඩාල් සංවේදනය විශාලනය සඳහා ටෙන්සර් ෆුසියෝන් ජාලය', 'ur': 'Multimodal Sentiment Analysis کے لئے تنسور فوزین نیٹ ورک', 'ta': 'Multimodal Sentiment Analysis for Tensor Fusion Network', 'vi': 'Mạng lưới kích hoạt đa năng', 'uz': 'Multimodal Sentiment Analysi uchun tensor fusion tarmoq', 'bg': 'Тензорна синтезираща мрежа за мултимодален анализ на сентимента', 'da': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'nl': 'Tensor Fusion Network voor multimodale sentimentanalyse', 'de': 'Tensor Fusion Network für multimodale Stimmungsanalyse', 'id': 'Jaringan Fusi Tensor untuk Analisi Sentimen Multimodal', 'ko': '다중모드적 감정 분석에 사용되는 장량 융합 네트워크', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa mfululizo wa Tensor kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa Seneti nyingine', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Multimodal Sentiment Taýýarlamak üçin Tensor Fusion Network', 'af': 'Tensor Fusion Netwerk vir Multimodal Sentiment Analyseer', 'sq': 'Rrjeti i Fuzionit Tensor për Analizën e Sentimenteve Multimodale', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hr': 'Tensor Fusion Network za multimodalnu analizu osjećaja', 'az': 'Multimodal Sentiment Analizi üçün Tensor Fusion Network', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Tensor Fusion Network za multimodalnu analizu sentimenta', 'bn': 'Multimodal Sentiment বিশ্লেষণের জন্য টেনসর ফাশন নেটওয়ার্ক', 'cs': 'Tensor Fusion Network pro multimodální analýzu sentimentů', 'et': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'fi': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'ca': "Rede de fusió de tensió per a l'anàlisi de sentiments multimodals", 'jv': 'Tenor Ftion Network kanggo Multimodal Sentiment Test', 'ha': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'he': 'רשת מיזון טנסור לניתוח רגשות רבים', 'sk': 'Tensor Fusion Network for Multimodal Sentiment Analysis', 'bo': 'Multimodal Sentiment དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་Fusion དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'Multimodal sentiment analysis is an increasingly popular research area, which extends the conventional language-based definition of sentiment analysis to a multimodal setup where other relevant modalities accompany language. In this paper, we pose the problem of multimodal sentiment analysis as modeling intra-modality and inter-modality dynamics. We introduce a novel model, termed Tensor Fusion Networks, which learns both such dynamics end-to-end. The proposed approach is tailored for the volatile nature of spoken language in online videos as well as accompanying gestures and voice. In the experiments, our model outperforms state-of-the-art approaches for both multimodal and unimodal sentiment analysis.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل المشاعر متعددة الوسائط مجال بحث شائعًا بشكل متزايد ، والذي يوسع التعريف التقليدي القائم على اللغة لتحليل المشاعر إلى إعداد متعدد الوسائط حيث تصاحب الطرائق الأخرى ذات الصلة اللغة. في هذه الورقة ، نطرح مشكلة تحليل المشاعر متعددة الوسائط كنمذجة للديناميات البينية والوسائط المتعددة. نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا ، يُطلق عليه Tensor Fusion Networks ، والذي يتعلم كلتا الديناميكيات من البداية إلى النهاية. تم تصميم النهج المقترح ليناسب الطبيعة المتقلبة للغة المنطوقة في مقاطع الفيديو عبر الإنترنت بالإضافة إلى الإيماءات والصوت المصاحبة. في التجارب ، تفوق نموذجنا في الأداء على أحدث الأساليب لتحليل المشاعر متعددة الوسائط وأحادية الوسائط.', 'fr': "L'analyse multimodale des sentiments est un domaine de recherche de plus en plus populaire, qui étend la définition linguistique conventionnelle de l'analyse des sentiments à une configuration multimodale où d'autres modalités pertinentes accompagnent la langue. Dans cet article, nous posons le problème de l'analyse de sentiment multimodale comme la modélisation de la dynamique intra-modalité et intermodalité. Nous présentons un nouveau modèle, appelé Tensor Fusion Networks, qui apprend ces deux dynamiques de bout en bout. L'approche proposée est adaptée à la nature volatile du langage parlé dans les vidéos en ligne ainsi qu'aux gestes et à la voix qui les accompagnent. Dans les expériences, notre modèle surpasse les approches de pointe pour l'analyse des sentiments multimodale et unimodale.", 'pt': 'A análise de sentimento multimodal é uma área de pesquisa cada vez mais popular, que estende a definição convencional de análise de sentimento baseada em linguagem para uma configuração multimodal onde outras modalidades relevantes acompanham a linguagem. Neste artigo, colocamos o problema da análise multimodal de sentimentos como modelagem da dinâmica intramodal e intermodal. Apresentamos um novo modelo, denominado Tensor Fusion Networks, que aprende essas duas dinâmicas de ponta a ponta. A abordagem proposta é adaptada para a natureza volátil da linguagem falada em vídeos online, bem como gestos e voz que o acompanham. Nos experimentos, nosso modelo supera as abordagens de última geração para análise de sentimento multimodal e unimodal.', 'es': 'El análisis de sentimientos multimodal es un área de investigación cada vez más popular, que extiende la definición convencional del análisis de sentimientos basada en el lenguaje a una configuración multimodal en la que otras modalidades relevantes acompañan al lenguaje. En este artículo, planteamos el problema del análisis de sentimiento multimodal como modelo de dinámicas intramodales e intermodales. Presentamos un modelo novedoso, denominado Tensor Fusion Networks, que aprende ambas dinámicas de extremo a extremo. El enfoque propuesto se adapta a la naturaleza volátil del lenguaje hablado en los vídeos en línea, así como a los gestos y la voz que lo acompañan. En los experimentos, nuestro modelo supera los enfoques más avanzados para el análisis de sentimiento multimodal y unimodal.', 'ja': 'マルチモーダルセンチメント分析はますます人気のある研究領域であり、従来の言語ベースのセンチメント分析の定義を、他の関連するモダリティが言語を伴うマルチモーダル設定に拡張する。本論文では、モデリングのモーダリティ内およびモーダリティ間のダイナミクスとして、マルチモーダルセンチメント分析の問題を提起している。このようなダイナミクスの両方をエンドツーエンドで学習する、テンソル融合ネットワークと呼ばれる新規モデルを導入しました。提案されたアプローチは、オンラインビデオで使用される口語の不安定な性質と、付随するジェスチャーと音声に合わせて調整されています。実験では、当社のモデルは、マルチモーダルおよび単一モーダルセンチメント分析の両方で最先端のアプローチを上回ります。', 'zh': '多情析为日行之域,将基于言情析义于多式,其他相关随语。 本文多模态情析,以为模态内模态间动力学之建模。 引入Tensor Fusion Networks新模,端到端学此动力学。 议曰:在线视频口语之不稳定性,手势语音而量身制也。 实验之中,模态情多模态,皆优于先进。', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल भावना विश्लेषण एक तेजी से लोकप्रिय अनुसंधान क्षेत्र है, जो भावना विश्लेषण की पारंपरिक भाषा-आधारित परिभाषा को एक बहुआयामी सेटअप तक बढ़ाता है जहां अन्य प्रासंगिक तौर-तरीके भाषा के साथ होते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम मॉडलिंग इंट्रा-मोडलिटी और इंटर-मोडलिटी डायनामिक्स के रूप में मल्टीमॉडल भावना विश्लेषण की समस्या पैदा करते हैं। हम एक उपन्यास मॉडल पेश करते हैं, जिसे टेंसर फ्यूजन नेटवर्क कहा जाता है, जो इस तरह की गतिशीलता को एंड-टू-एंड दोनों सीखता है। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण ऑनलाइन वीडियो में बोली जाने वाली भाषा की अस्थिर प्रकृति के साथ-साथ इशारों और आवाज के लिए तैयार किया गया है। प्रयोगों में, हमारा मॉडल बहुआयामी और यूनिमोडल भावना विश्लेषण दोनों के लिए अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Анализ мультимодальных настроений становится все более популярной областью исследований, которая распространяет традиционное языковое определение анализа настроений на мультимодальные установки, где другие соответствующие способы сопровождают язык. В данной работе поставлена задача мультимодального анализа настроений как моделирования внутримодальной и интермодальной динамики. Мы вводим романную модель, называемую Tensor Fusion Networks, которая изучает и такую динамику сквозь конец. Предлагаемый подход адаптирован к изменчивому характеру разговорного языка в онлайн-видео, а также к сопутствующим жестам и голосу. В экспериментах наша модель превосходит современные подходы как для мультимодального, так и для унимодального анализа настроений.', 'ga': 'Réimse taighde atá ag éirí níos coitianta is ea anailís dhearcadh ilmhódach, a leathnaíonn an gnáth-sainmhíniú teanga-bhunaithe ar anailís dhearcadh chuig socrú ilmhódach ina mbíonn modhanna ábhartha eile ag gabháil le teanga. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid fadhb na hanailíse ilmhódúla ar mheon mar shamhaltú dinimic inmhódúlachta agus idirmhódúlachta. Tugaimid isteach samhail nua, ar a dtugtar Tensor Fusion Networks, a fhoghlaimíonn an dá dhinimic sin ó cheann ceann go ceann. Tá an cur chuige atá beartaithe sainoiriúnaithe do nádúr luaineach na teanga labhartha i bhfíseáin ar líne chomh maith le gothaí agus gutha a théann leis. Sna turgnaimh, sáraíonn ár samhail cur chuige úrscothach maidir le hanailís ilmhódach agus aonmhódúil ar dhearcadh.', 'hu': 'A multimodális érzelmek elemzése egyre népszerűbb kutatási terület, amely kiterjeszti az érzelmek elemzésének hagyományos nyelvi meghatározását egy multimodális rendszerre, ahol más releváns módszerek kísérik a nyelvet. Jelen tanulmányban a multimodális hangulatelemzés problémáját vetjük fel, mint az intramodális és az intermodalitás dinamikájának modellezését. Bemutatunk egy új modellt, a Tensor Fusion Networks nevű modellt, amely mindkét ilyen dinamikát végtől-végig tanulja. A javasolt megközelítés az online videók beszélt nyelvének ingadozó jellegére, valamint a kísérő gesztusokra és hangokra szabott. A kísérletek során modellünk felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb megközelítéseket mind multimodális, mind unimodális hangulatelemzésben.', 'el': 'Η πολυμοπική ανάλυση συναισθημάτων είναι ένας ολοένα και πιο δημοφιλής ερευνητικός τομέας, ο οποίος επεκτείνει τον συμβατικό γλωσσικό ορισμό της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων σε μια πολυμοπική οργάνωση όπου άλλες σχετικές λεπτομέρειες συνοδεύουν τη γλώσσα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, θέτουμε το πρόβλημα της ανάλυσης των πολυμορφικών συναισθημάτων ως μοντελοποίηση της ενδοmodality και της διαπmodality δυναμικής. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο, που ονομάζεται Δίκτυα Σύνδεσης Tensor, το οποίο μαθαίνει και τις δύο αυτές δυναμικές από το τέλος προς το τέλος. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση είναι προσαρμοσμένη στην πτητική φύση της προφορικής γλώσσας στα διαδικτυακά βίντεο καθώς και στις συνοδευτικές χειρονομίες και φωνές. Στα πειράματα, το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις τόσο για την πολυπροπική όσο και για την μονοmodale ανάλυση συναισθημάτων.', 'it': "L'analisi del sentiment multimodale è un'area di ricerca sempre più popolare, che estende la definizione linguistica convenzionale dell'analisi del sentiment a un setup multimodale in cui altre modalità pertinenti accompagnano il linguaggio. In questo articolo, poniamo il problema dell'analisi del sentiment multimodale come modellazione delle dinamiche intramodali e intermodali. Introducemo un nuovo modello, chiamato Tensor Fusion Networks, che impara entrambe queste dinamiche end-to-end. L'approccio proposto è adattato alla natura volatile della lingua parlata nei video online, nonché ai gesti e alla voce di accompagnamento. Negli esperimenti, il nostro modello supera gli approcci all'avanguardia sia per l'analisi multimodale che unimodale del sentiment.", 'kk': 'Көптеген көптеген сезімдерді анализ - көптеген зерттеулер аумағы. Бұл кәдімгі тілдегі сезімдерді анализ анықтамасын көптеген көптеген баптауға көптеген. Бұл қағазда біз көптеген сезімдік анализ мәселесін интермодалдық және модалдық динамиканы моделдеу үшін көрсетеді. Біз романдық үлгісін келтіреміз. Тенсор Фузион желілері деп аталады. Бұл динамиканың соңына дейін екеуін оқып береді. Келтірілген арқылы, онлайн видеодағы сөйлейтін тілдердің қайталанбатын қасиеттері және қосымша жұмыс және дыбыс қасиеттері үшін өзгертіледі. Тәжірибелерде, біздің моделіміз көп модель және бір модель сезімдерді анализ үшін көпшілік күйінің жағдайын жасайды.', 'ka': 'Multimodal sentiment analysis is an increasingly popular research area, which extends the conventional language-based definition of sentiment analysis to a multimodal setup where other relevant modalities accompany language. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მულტიმოდიალური სენტიმენტის ანალიზის პრობლემა დავყენებთ, როგორც მოდელიცია ინტრე მოდელიცია და ინტრემოდელიციის დინამიკის მოდელიცია. ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ პრომენტის მოდელი, სახელი Tensor Fusion Networks, რომელიც ორივე ასეთი დინამიკის ბოლოდან დასწავლის. პროგრამების მიზეზი იქნება ინტერნეტიური ვიდეოში, რომელსაც დაკავშირებული გესტები და დოსტი. ექსპერიმენტებში ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება მულტიმოდიალური და უნიმოდიალური სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის.', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšių jausmų analizė yra vis populiaresnė mokslinių tyrimų sritis, pagal kurią paprastai grindžiama jausmų analizės apibrėžimo apibrėžtis išplečiama ir apima daugiarūšio jausmų analizę, kai kalba papildoma kitomis atitinkamomis sąlygomis. Šiame dokumente iškeliame daugiarūšio požiūrio analizės problem ą, kaip modeliavimą transporto rūšies viduje ir transporto rūšių tarpusavio dinamiką. Pateikiame naują model į, vadinamą „Tensorių sintezės tinklais“, kuris moko tiek tokių dinamiškų dalykų. Siūlomas požiūris pritaikytas netinkamam kalbos pobūdžiui internetiniuose vaizdo įrašuose, taip pat prie jo pridedamiems gestams ir balsui. Eksperimentuose mūsų modelis teikia pažangiausius metodus tiek daugiarūšio, tiek vienmodalinio jausmo analizei.', 'mk': 'Мултимодалната анализа на чувствата е сé популарна област на истражување, која ја проширува конвенционалната јазична дефиниција на анализа на чувствата на мултимодално поставување каде што другите релевантни моделности го придружуваат јазикот. Во овој документ, го претставуваме проблемот со мултимодалната анализа на чувствата како моделирање на интермодалната и интермодалната динамика. Ние претставуваме нов модел, наречен Тензорски фузионски мрежи, кој ги научи двете такви динамики од крај до крај. Предложениот пристап е прилагоден за нестабилната природа на говорниот јазик во онлајн видеата, како и за придружувачките гести и глас. Во експериментите, нашиот модел ги надминува најсовремените пристапи за мултимодална и унимодална анализа на чувствата.', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan berbilang modal adalah kawasan kajian yang semakin populer, yang mengeluarkan definisi penganalisis perasaan berdasarkan bahasa konvensional ke seting berbilang modal di mana modaliti lain yang relevan mengawal bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kita menghasilkan masalah analisis perasaan multimodal sebagai model intra-modaliti dan dinamik inter-modaliti. Kami memperkenalkan model baru, bernama Rangkaian Fusi Tensor, yang mempelajari kedua-dua dinamik seperti akhir-akhir. pendekatan yang direncanakan disesuaikan untuk sifat yang tidak stabil bahasa bercakap dalam video online serta gerakan dan suara yang menyertai. Dalam percubaan ini, model kita melampaui cara terbaik untuk analisis sentimen multimodal dan unimodal.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരിശോധന സ്ഥലത്തിന്റെ മള്\u200dമോഡല്\u200d അനുഭവപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വിശദ In this paper, we pose the problem of multimodal sentiment analysis as modeling intra-modality and inter-modality dynamics.  ടെന്\u200dസോര്\u200d ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d എന്ന നിലയില്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് രണ്ടും അവസാനം പഠിക്കുന് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വീഡിയോയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ പ്രകൃതിയുടെ പ്രകൃതിയാണ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായ പ്രകൃതിയില്\u200d പിന്തുടര്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d അധികാരത്തിന്റെ രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. മുള്\u200dട്ടിമോഡില്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sentimenti multimodali hija qasam ta’ riċerka dejjem aktar popolari, li testendi d-definizzjoni konvenzjonali bbażata fuq il-lingwa tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti għal struttura multimodali fejn modalitajiet rilevanti oħra jakkumpanjaw il-lingwa. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw il-problema tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti multimodali bħala mudell tad-dinamika intramodali u intermodali. Aħna nintroduċu mudell ġdid, imsejjaħ Netwerks tal-Fużjoni tat-Tensor, li jitgħallmu t-tnejn dinamiċi minn tarf għal tarf. L-approċċ propost huwa mfassal apposta għan-natura volatili tal-lingwa mitkellma fil-vidjows onlajn kif ukoll għall-ġesti u l-vuċi li jakkumpanjawhom. Fl-esperimenti, il-mudell tagħna jwassal għal approċċi avvanzati kemm għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti multimodali kif ukoll unimodali.', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн мэдрэмжүүдийн шинжилгээ нь илүү олон хүндрэлтэй судалгааны талбар юм. Энэ нь мэдрэмжүүдийн үндсэн хэлний шинжилгээг олон төрлийн байгууллага рүү нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бусад өөр харилцааны арга баримтууд хэл дээр ха Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон моделийн мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний асуудлыг интро-модель болон интро-модель динамик болгох болно. Бид шинэ загварыг танилцуулж, Тенсор Фусион Чернеттерүүд гэдэг. Энэ нь хоёулаа шинэ динамикийн төгсгөлд суралцдаг. Тайлбарласан арга барилга нь онлайн бичлэгүүд болон хөдөлгөөн, дуу хөдөлгөөн дээр ярилцаж буй хэлний амьдралын төвөгтэй байдлын тулд зогсогдож байна. Энэ туршилтууд бидний загвар нь олон моделийн болон нэгэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ хоёуланг дамжуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Multimodalna analiza sentymentów jest coraz bardziej popularnym obszarem badawczym, który rozszerza konwencjonalną definicję analizy sentymentów opartą na języku o konfigurację multimodalną, w której językowi towarzyszą inne istotne modyfikacje. W artykule poruszamy problem analizy sentymentów multimodalnych jako modelowania dynamiki intramodalnej i intermodalnej. Wprowadzamy nowatorski model, zwany Tensor Fusion Networks, który uczy się obu takich dynamik end-to-end. Proponowane podejście jest dostosowane do zmiennego charakteru języka mówionego w filmach online oraz towarzyszących im gestom i głosowi. W eksperymentach nasz model przewyższa najnowocześniejsze podejścia do analizy sentymentów multimodalnych i unimodalnych.', 'no': 'Multimodal sentimentanalyse er ein større populært forskningsområde, som utvidar den konvensjonelle språk-baserte definisjonen av sentimentanalysen til eit multimodal oppsett der andre relevante modaliteter kommer til språk. I denne papiret poserer vi problemet med multimodal sentimentanalyse som modellering av intra-modalitet og intermodalitetsdynamikk. Vi introduserer eit romanmodell, kalla Tensor Fusion Nettverk, som lærer begge slike dynamikk slutt til slutt. Dette første tilnærminga er tilpassa for den volatile naturen av talespråket i online videoar, og tilleggende gestar og stemme. I eksperimentene utfører modellen vårt tilnærmingar for både multimodal og unimodal sentimentanalyse.', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor multimodale este un domeniu de cercetare din ce în ce mai popular, care extinde definiția limbajului convențional bazată pe analiza sentimentelor la o configurație multimodală în care alte modalități relevante însoțesc limbajul. În această lucrare, punem problema analizei sentimentului multimodal ca modelare a dinamicii intramodalității și intermodalității. Introducem un model nou, denumit Tensor Fusion Networks, care învață atât aceste dinamici end-to-end. Abordarea propusă este adaptată pentru natura volatilă a limbii vorbite în videoclipurile online, precum și pentru gesturile și vocea însoțitoare. În experimente, modelul nostru depășește abordările de ultimă generație atât pentru analiza sentimentului multimodal, cât și unimodal.', 'si': 'ගොඩමෝඩාල් සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරදේශයක්, ඒකෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවට අධාරිත භාෂාව මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්නේ ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හා අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ අපි නියම විද්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ටෙන්සර් ෆුසියෝන් නැට්වෙක්ස් කියලා, ඒක දෙන්නම ඉගෙන ගන්නවා අවසාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අන්ලයින් වීඩියෝ වලින් කතා කරපු භාෂාවගේ ස්වභාවිතය සමග සමග සමග සම්බන්ධ විද පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපේ මොඩල් විශ්ලේෂණය නිර්මාණය කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණය සමහර විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා.', 'sv': 'Multimodal sentimental analys är ett allt populärare forskningsområde som utvidgar den konventionella språkbaserade definitionen av sentimental analys till en multimodal setup där andra relevanta modaliteter åtföljer språket. I denna uppsats tar vi upp problemet med multimodal sentimental analys som modellering av intramodalitet och intermodalitet dynamik. Vi introducerar en ny modell, kallad Tensor Fusion Networks, som lär sig båda dessa dynamiker från början till slut. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet är skräddarsytt för den instabila karaktären av talat språk i onlinevideor samt medföljande gester och röst. I experimenten överträffar vår modell de senaste metoderna för både multimodal och unimodal sentimental analys.', 'sr': 'Multimodalna analiza sentiment a je sve popularnija istraživanja područja, koja proširi konvencionalnu definiciju analize sentimenta na jeziku do multimodalnog uspostavljanja gde su drugi relevantni modaliteti pratili jezik. U ovom papiru predstavljamo problem multimodalne analize sentimenta kao modeliranje intrmodalne i intermodalne dinamike. Predstavljamo novi model, nazvan Tensor Fusion Networks, koji nauèi obe takve dinamike do kraja. Predloženi pristup je prilagođen za nestabilnu prirodu govornog jezika u online snimkama, kao i praćenje gesta i glasa. U eksperimentima, naš model iznosi pristupe stanju umjetnosti i multimodalnoj i unimodalnoj analizi sentimenta.', 'ur': 'Multimodal sentiment analysis is an increasingly popular research area, which extends the conventional language-based definition of sentiment analysis to a multimodal setup where other relevant modalities accompany language. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ملتی موڈال احساسات تحلیل کے مسئلہ کو مدل کے طور پر رکھتے ہیں، درمیان موڈلی ڈینامیک اور درمیان موڈلی ڈینامیک کے طور پر. ہم نے ایک نئی موڈل کو معرفی کریں، جس کا نام تنسور فوسین نیٹورک ہے، جو دونوں ایسی ڈینمانیک آخر تک سیکھتا ہے۔ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا آنلاین ویڈیوں میں بات کی زبان کی ناپسند طبیعت کے لئے تدبیر کی گئی ہے اور اس کے ساتھ بھی جستجو اور آواز کے ساتھ بھی۔ آزمائش میں، ہمارا نمادل ملٹ موڈال اور غیر موڈال احساسات تحلیل کے لئے زیادہ مطابق ہے.', 'so': 'Analyska xisaabta farsamada badan waxay ka fidisaa qeybta waxbarashada oo aad u maamulan, kaas oo ku fidiya sawirida aqoonsiga afka caadiga ah oo ku qoran sawir badan oo ku qoran qaabab kale oo ku saabsan luqada. Qoraalkan waxaynu dhibaatada baaritaanka xisaabta kala duduwan u leennahay sida tusaale u sameynta dabeecada iyo dabeecada kala duduwan. Tusaale warqad ah oo lagu magacaabaa shabakadda Tensor Fusion, kaas oo baranaya dhammaadka cilmiga oo kale. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeedo waxaa lagu soo qoraa dabiicadda afka lagu hadlo ee internetka iyo fiidiyowyada la xiriira qalabka iyo codka. Imtixaanka waxaa sameynaya qaababkayaga xaaladda farshaxanka ee kala duduwan iyo baaritaanka fikrada kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'பல்முறையான உணர்வு ஆய்வு ஒரு அதிகமாக மக்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி பகுதியை ஆய்வு செய்கிறது, அது உணர்வு மொழியின் சார்ந்த அறிவிப்பை வழக்கமான மொழியின் அறிவிப்ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல்மடங்கு உணர்வு ஆய்வு பிரச்சினையைக் கொண்டு இருக்கிறோம் முறைமையை மாதிரியும் மற்றும் இடைம நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை அறிவிக்கிறோம், டென்சார் ஃபிஷன் நெட்வர்கள் நிறுவப்பட்டது, அது இவ்விதமான முடிவில் இருந்து கற பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு ஆன்லைன் காணொளிகளில் பேசும் மொழியின் இயற்கைக்கும் போதும் ஒலிக்குறிப்புகளும்  பரிசோதனைகளில், எங்கள் மாதிரி பல முறையான மற்றும் ஒற்றைப்படையான உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கும் நிலையை வெளியேற்றுகிறது.', 'uz': "Multimodal sentiment analyzeri juda katta popular taf-qidirish maydonini aniqlaydi, bu o'z o'ylab o'anaviy o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi va boshqa bog'liq usullar tilda bog'liq boʻlgan multimodal moslamalarga ko'paytirish. Bu qogʻozda, biz multimodal hisob-aniqlarining muammolari, intra-modatlik va inter-modatlik dynamika modelini modellash mumkin. Biz bir novel modelini o'rganimiz, tensor Fusion Network (Terminal Fusion Network) bilan nomlangan. Bu ikkita dynamika oxiriga o'rganadi. Koʻrsatilgan usul Online video'da gapiradigan tilning tabiiy tabiiy turlari va vositalar bilan bog'liqdir. Imtibor qilayotganda, modelimiz multimodal va unimodal sentimel analyzeri holatning holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phân tích đa chiều tình cảm là một khu vực nghiên cứu phổ biến, mà mở rộng định nghĩa đa cảm cảm theo ngôn ngữ thông thường thành một cài đặt đa phương tiện khác phù hợp với ngôn ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đặt vấn đề phân tích đa chiều tình cảm để tạo ra tính cách nội bộ và tính nội động. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mới, được gọi là mạng khí cầu, hai môn đều học hết động lực. Cách tiếp cận được đề nghị được phù hợp với tính bất thường của ngôn ngữ được nói trong các video trực tuyến cũng như những cử chỉ và giọng nói tham gia. Trong các thí nghiệm, mẫu của chúng ta hoàn thành các phương pháp hiện đại cho cả phân tích tình cảm đa phương và đô thị.', 'bg': 'Мултимодалният анализ на сантименталните чувства е все по-популярна изследователска област, която разширява конвенционалното езиково-базирано определение за анализ на сантименталните чувства до мултимодална настройка, където други подходящи модали придружават езика. В настоящата статия поставяме проблема с мултимодалния анализ на сентименталността като моделиране на динамиката на интрамодалността и интермодалността. Представяме нов модел, наречен Тензорни синтезионни мрежи, който изучава и двете динамики от край до край. Предложеният подход е съобразен с нестабилния характер на говоримия език в онлайн видеоклипове, както и съпътстващите жестове и глас. В експериментите нашият модел превъзхожда най-съвременните подходи както за мултимодален, така и за унимодален анализ на сентименталността.', 'da': 'Multimodal sentimental analyse er et stadig mere populært forskningsområde, som udvider den konventionelle sprogbaserede definition af sentimental analyse til et multimodalt setup, hvor andre relevante modaliteter ledsager sproget. I denne artikel stiller vi problemet med multimodal sentimental analyse som modellering af intramodalitet og intermodalitet dynamik. Vi introducerer en ny model, kaldet Tensor Fusion Networks, som lærer både sådanne dynamikker end-to-end. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde er skræddersyet til talesprogets ustabile karakter i onlinevideoer samt ledsagende bevægelser og stemme. I eksperimenterne overgår vores model state-of-the-art tilgange til både multimodal og unimodal sentiment analyse.', 'nl': "Multimodale sentimentanalyse is een steeds populairder onderzoeksgebied, dat de conventionele taalgebaseerde definitie van sentimentanalyse uitbreidt naar een multimodale setup waar andere relevante modaliteiten de taal begeleiden. In dit artikel stellen we het probleem van multimodale sentimentanalyse voor als het modelleren van intramodale en intermodale dynamiek. We introduceren een nieuw model, genaamd Tensor Fusion Networks, dat beide dynamieken end-to-end leert. De voorgestelde aanpak is afgestemd op de vluchtige aard van gesproken taal in online video's, evenals begeleidende gebaren en stem. In de experimenten presteert ons model beter dan state-of-the-art benaderingen voor zowel multimodale als unimodale sentimentanalyse.", 'de': 'Multimodale Stimmungsanalyse ist ein zunehmend beliebtes Forschungsgebiet, das die herkömmliche sprachbasierte Definition der Stimmungsanalyse auf ein multimodales Setup erweitert, bei dem andere relevante Modalitäten die Sprache begleiten. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir das Problem der multimodalen Stimmungsanalyse als Modellierung der intramodalen und intermodalen Dynamik auf. Wir führen ein neuartiges Modell namens Tensor Fusion Networks ein, das beide Dynamiken Ende-zu-Ende erlernt. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz ist auf die Volatilität der gesprochenen Sprache in Online-Videos sowie begleitende Gesten und Stimme zugeschnitten. In den Experimenten übertrifft unser Modell modernste Ansätze für multimodale und unimodale Stimmungsanalysen.', 'id': 'Analisis sentimen multimodal adalah daerah penelitian yang semakin populer, yang memperluas definisi berbasis bahasa konvensional dari analisis sentimen ke seting multimodal dimana modalitas relevanti lainnya menyertai bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kita menghasilkan masalah dari analisis sentimen multimodal sebagai model intra-modalitas dan dinamik inter-modalitas. Kami memperkenalkan model baru, bernama Tensor Fusion Networks, yang mempelajari kedua dinamik seperti akhir-akhir. pendekatan yang diusulkan disesuaikan untuk sifat volatil bahasa berbicara dalam video online serta gestur dan suara yang menyertai. Dalam eksperimen, model kami melampaui tindakan terbaik untuk analisis sentimen multimodal dan unimodal.', 'ko': '다중모드적 감정 분석은 갈수록 환영받는 연구 분야로 전통적인 언어 기반의 감정 분석 정의를 다중모드적 구조로 확대했고 그 중에서 다른 관련 모드는 언어와 수반된다.본고에서 우리는 다중모드적 정서 분석의 문제, 즉 모드적 내부와 모드 간의 동력학을 제기했다.우리는 장량 융합 네트워크라고 불리는 새로운 모델을 소개했는데, 이 두 가지 동력학을 처음부터 끝까지 배울 수 있다.제시한 방법은 온라인 동영상에서 구어의 변동성과 수반되는 제스처와 소리에 맞추어 맞춤형으로 제작한 것이다.실험에서 우리의 모델은 다중모드와 단모드의 감정 분석 방면에서 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa hisia mbalimbali unaongezea eneo la utafiti maarufu, ambalo linaongezea ufafanuzi wa lugha ya kawaida wa uchambuzi wa hisia kwa taasisi mbalimbali ambapo njia nyingine zinazohusiana na lugha. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka tatizo la uchambuzi wa hisia za kidunia kama kuonyesha mifano ya aina ya aina na tabia za kati. Tunawasilisha mtindo wa riwaya, unaoitwa Mtandao wa Tensor Fusion, ambao unajifunza mwisho wa namna hiyo. Mtandao huu unapendekezwa unafuatiliwa na asili ya lugha inayozungumzwa katika video za mtandaoni pamoja na kuongezeka na sauti. Katika majaribio hayo, mifano yetu inaonyesha mbinu za hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa hisia za kidunia na za kiutamaduni.', 'tr': 'Köp modal duýgular analyzasy (modal) uly adamlarda tanyş araştyrma bölegidir. Bu duýgular (modal) dilinde daýan ýan duýgular analyzasyny bir multimodal düzümlere golaýlaýar. Bu kağıtda, multimodal duygusal analizinin problemini modalitet ve modalitet dinamik olarak örneklendiriyoruz. Biz roman nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys, Tensor Fusion Networks diýip atlanýan dinamiklary soňra öwrenýär. Görevlenen ýagdaý internet wideoda gürleýän dillerin ýüze taýýarlykly bolup geçirilýär. Deneylerde, biziň modelimiz multimodal we unimodal duýgym analyzasynda ýagdaýynyň durumyny çykarýar.', 'af': "Multimodaal sentimentanalisie is 'n grootmaak populêre resekinggebied, wat die konvensionele taal-gebaseerde definisie van sentimentanalisie uitbrei na 'n multimodaal opstelling waar ander relevante modaliteite a an taal aangaan word. In hierdie papier stel ons die probleem van multimodale sentimentanalisie as modeling intra-modaliteit en intermodaliteit-dinamike. Ons introduseer 'n roman model, genaamd Tensor Fusion Netwerke, wat leer beide sodanige dynamics end-to-end. Die voorgestelde toegang is vir die ongelukkige natuur van gepraat taal in onlinese videos en ook aangevoeg gesture en stem. In die eksperimente, ons model uitvoer staat van die kunstenaar toegang vir beide multimodaal en unimodaal sentimentanalisie.", 'hr': 'Analiza multimodalnih osjećaja je sve popularnije istraživanje područje, koja proširi konvencionalnu definiciju analize osjećaja na jeziku do multimodalnog uspostavljanja gdje su drugi relevantni načini praćeni jezik. U ovom papiru predstavljamo problem multimodalne analize osjećanja kao modeliranje intrmodalne i međumodalne dinamike. Predstavljamo novi model, nazvan Tensor Fusion Networks, koji nauči oba takve dinamike do kraja. Predloženi pristup je prilagođen za nestabilnu prirodu govornog jezika u online snimkama, kao i praćenje gesta i glasa. U eksperimentima, naš model iznosi pristupe stanju umjetnosti i multimodalnoj i unimodalnoj analizi osjećaja.', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave multimodale është një fushë kërkimore gjithnjë e më popullore, e cila zgjeron përcaktimin konvencional bazuar në gjuhë të analizës së ndjenjave në një strukturë multimodale ku modalitetet e tjera të rëndësishme shoqërojnë gjuhën. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim problemin e analizës së ndjenjave multimodale si modelimin e dinamikës brenda-modalitetit dhe ndërmodalitetit. Ne prezantojmë një model të ri, të quajtur Rrjetet e Fuzionit Tensor, që mëson të dy dinamikat e tilla nga fundi në fund. Përqasja e propozuar është e përshtatshme për natyrën e paqëndrueshme të gjuhës së folur në videot online si dhe për gjeste dhe zë shoqëruese. Në eksperimentet, modeli ynë ekziston në mënyrë më të lartë për analizën e ndjenjave të shumëmodale dhe të njëmodale.', 'am': 'ብዙአዊ ስሜት አስተያየት፣ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ተመሳሳይ የተመሳሳይ የስሜት ትምህርት ትርጉም ወደቋንቋ በተጠቃሚ ሌላ ተቃዋሚ ሥርዓቶች ለመሰነጠል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የብዙ አዳማዊ አስተያየት እና የግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት አካባቢ ሚዲናሲዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቴንስር ፊሶን ኔትርክ የሚባልን የዘላለም ጥያቄዎችን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና ድምፅ በተጨማሪው ድምፅ እና በመስመር ቪዲዮዎች ላይ የተናገረውን እና በተጨማሪው የድምፅ ግንኙነት ለመጠየቅ ነው፡፡ በተፈተና ውስጥ ሞዴሌያችን የዐርድ ሥርዓት እና የብልሃዊ እና የብሔራዊ አስተያየት እንዲያሳየው አካባቢዎችን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Բազմամոդալ զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը ավելի հանրահայտ հետազոտության ոլորտ է, որը ընդլայնում է զգացմունքների վերլուծության ավանդական լեզվով հիմնված սահմանումը մինչև բազմամոդալ կառուցվածք, որտեղ լեզվին ուղեկցնում են այլ Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմամոդալ զգացմունքների վերլուծության խնդիրը, որպես ներկա-մոդելավորում և ներկա-մոդելավորում դինամիկա: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր մոդել, որը կոչվում է տենսոր ֆուզիոն ցանցեր, որը սովորում է երկուսն այսպիսի դինամիկ վերջ-վերջ: Առաջարկված մոտեցումը պատրաստված է առցանց տեսահոլովակներում խոսվող լեզուների անճկուն բնույթի համար, ինչպես նաև ուղեկցող ժեստերի և ձայնի համար: In the experiments, our model outperforms state-of-the-art approaches for both multimodal and unimodal sentiment analysis.', 'bn': 'মাল্টিমোডাল অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণ বেশী জনপ্রিয় গবেষণা এলাকা বিশ্লেষণ করে, যা কনশনিয়াল ভাষার ভিত্তিক সংশ্লিষ্ট ভিত্তিক বিশ্লেষণ বিশ্লেষণের সাথে  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মাল্টিমোডাল অনুভূতির বিশ্লেষণের সমস্যা প্রকাশ করি যেটা নির্ধারিত মডেল এবং মোডেলিয়াল ডায়ান্ডিয়াম। আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যার মাধ্যমে টেন্সার ফুশন নেটওয়ার্কের নাম দেয়া হয়েছে, যারা এই ধরনের ডায়ান্ডামিক The proposed approach is tailored for the volatile nature of spoken language in online videos as well as accompanying gestures and voice.  পরীক্ষার মধ্যে আমাদের মডেল মাল্টিমোডাল এবং ইউনিমোডিয়াল অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ শিল্পের প্রতিক্রিয়া প', 'az': 'Multimodal sentiment analizi daha məşhur bir araştırma bölgesidir ki, bu cümlət analizi ilə cümlətli dil analizi ilə çoxlu modal qurğulamasına uzatır, başqa məlumatlar dili ilə birlikdə istifadə edir. Bu kağızda, çoxlu modal sentiment analizinin problemini intra modalitat və intermodalitat dinamikini modelleşdirmək olaraq göstəririk. Biz yeni modeli təşkil edirik ki, Tensor Fusion Networks adlı, bu da hər ikisini dinamik sona qədər öyrənir. Bu təbliğ edilən tərzim onlayn videolarda danışan dillərin istifadə edilməsi və həmçin in istifadə edən hərəkətlər və səslər üçün təmizlənir. İşlemlərdə, modellərimiz çoxlu modal və unumodal hisslər analizi üçün müxtəlif bir şəkildə tətbiq edir.', 'bs': 'Analiza multimodalnih osjećanja je sve popularnije istraživačke područje, koja proširi konvencionalnu definiciju analize osjećanja na jeziku do multimodalnog uspostavljanja gdje su drugi relevantni načini praćeni jezik. U ovom papiru predstavljamo problem multimodalne analize sentimenta kao modeliranje intrmodalne i intermodalne dinamike. Predstavljamo novi model, nazvan Tensor Fusion Networks, koji nauči oba takve dinamike do kraja. Predloženi pristup je prilagođen za nestabilnu prirodu govornog jezika u online snimkama, kao i praćenje gesta i glasa. U eksperimentima, naš model je nadmašio pristupe države umjetnosti i multimodalnoj i unimodalnoj analizi sentimenta.', 'ca': "L'an àlisi del sentiment multimodal és una àrea de recerca cada cop més popular, que estendra la definició convencional basada en el llenguatge de l'anàlisi del sentiment a una configuració multimodal on altres modalitats pertinents acompanyen el llenguatge. In this paper, we pose the problem of multimodal sentiment analysis as modeling intra-modality and inter-modality dynamics.  Introduïm un nou model, anomenat Tensor Fusion Networks, que aprenen tant dinàmica d'un final a l'altre. L'enfocament proposat està adaptat al caràcter volàtil de la llengua parlada en vídeos on-line, també als gestos i la veu que acompanyen. En els experiments, el nostre model supera l'anàlisi dels sentiments multimodals i unimodals.", 'cs': 'Multimodální sentimentní analýza je stále populárnější oblastí výzkumu, která rozšiřuje konvenční jazykovou definici sentimentní analýzy na multimodální nastavení, kde jazyk doprovází další relevantní modality. V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou multimodální sentimentové analýzy jako modelováním intramodální a intermodální dynamiky. Představujeme nový model nazvaný Tensor Fusion Networks, který se naučí obě takové dynamiky end-to-end. Navržený přístup je přizpůsoben nestabilní povaze mluveného jazyka v online videích, stejně jako doprovodná gesta a hlas. V experimentech náš model překonává nejmodernější přístupy pro multimodální i unimodální analýzu sentimentů.', 'et': 'Multimodaalne sentimentaalüüs on üha populaarsem uurimisvaldkond, mis laiendab tavapärast keelepõhist sentimentaalüüsi määratlust multimodaalsele seadistusele, kus keelega kaasnevad muud asjakohased viisid. Käesolevas töös esitame multimodaalse sentimentaalüüsi probleemi modaalsusesisese ja intermodaalsuse dünaamika modelleerimisena. Tutvustame uudset mudelit, mida nimetatakse Tensor Fusion Networks, mis õpib nii sellist dünaamikat otsast otsani. Kavandatud lähenemisviis on kohandatud võrguvideotes esineva räägitava keele volatiilsuse ning sellega kaasnevate žestide ja hääle arvestamiseks. Eksperimentides ületab meie mudel kaasaegseid lähenemisviise nii multimodaalse kui ka unimodaalse sentimentaalüüsi jaoks.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات بیشتری یک منطقه تحقیقات محبوب\u200cتر است که تعریف زبان معمولی از تحلیل احساسات را به یک تنظیم متعددی گسترش می\u200cدهد که دیگر روش\u200cهای مربوط به زبان همراه می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل تحلیل احساسات چندین مدل را به عنوان مدل\u200cسازی داخل modality و دینامیک بین modality قرار می\u200cدهیم. ما یک مدل رمانی را معرفی می کنیم، به عنوان شبکه های تنسور فوسیون، که هر دو از این دینامیک به پایان یاد می گیرد. این دستور پیشنهاد برای طبیعت ناپذیر زبان صحبت شده در ویدئو\u200cهای آنلاین و همراه با جستجو و صدا تغییر داده می\u200cشود. در آزمایشات، مدل ما برای تحلیل احساسات multimodal و unimodal انجام می دهد.', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen tuntemusanalyysi on yhä suositumpi tutkimusalue, joka laajentaa perinteisen kielipohjaisen tuntemusanalyysin määritelmän multimodaaliseen kokoonpanoon, jossa kieleen liittyy muita merkityksellisiä menetelmiä. Tässä artikkelissa esitämme multimodaalisen sentimentaalianalyysin ongelman modaalisuuden ja intermodaalisuuden dynamiikan mallinnuksena. Esittelemme uuden mallin nimeltä Tensor Fusion Networks, joka oppii molemmat dynamiikan päästä päähän. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa on räätälöity verkkovideoissa esiintyvän puhutun kielen volatiliteettiin sekä niihin liittyviin eleihin ja ääniin. Kokeissa mallimme päihittää uusimmat lähestymistavat sekä multimodaalisissa että unimodaalisissa tunteiden analyyseissä.', 'jv': 'Name Nan pepulan iki, kita mulai perbudhakan penting multimodal Sensitif karo model kuwi modalité karo dynamics inter-modalité. Awak dhéwé ngewehi model sing nyumbang, nganggo Tenor Fusion netwark, sing nyimpen kuwi dynamics sampeyan ngono mulai. Rasané sing dipunanggé kuwi ngêlêmên kanggo ngerasakno gerakan kanggo langgar tarjamahan ning video ing tambah lan gayet ngêmên gerakan lan sesuk. Nang ujaran-ujaran, model nambarang nggawe barang-ujaran kanggo ngerasahan seneng dadi multimodal karo unimodal.', 'ha': "Ana rarraba kalma na ɗabi'a da aka ƙãra wani fili na ci, wanda yana shimfiɗa zane-zane ga fassarar harshe na ɗabi'a zuwa wani tsari na multi-multi da wasu masu husũma sunã sami da harshe. Ina cikin wannan takardan, Munã ƙara masu cikin anayyar kalma na multi-mutane kamar misalin masu motsi ga-tsari da baka-durada. Tuna ƙara wani motsi na nowaya, ana ƙara jerin Fusion Networks, wanda yana sanar da su ƙari ga wannan. Tsarin da aka yi niyyar a ƙara wa halin harshen da aka yi wa magana cikin video masu da sami da saurãre. Daga jarrabai, misalinmu yana samar da halin-sanannin zuwa ga rabon multi-multi da wanda ba'a sani ba.", 'he': 'ניתוח רגשות רב-מודלית הוא אזור מחקר פופולרי יותר ויותר, שמרחב את ההגדרה המבוססת בשפה הקונסיונלית של ניתוח רגשות למרכז רב-מודלית שבו מודליות רלוונטיות אחרות ללוות לשפה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מעמידים את הבעיה של ניתוח רגשות multimodal כדוגמנית בתוך מודיאליות ודינמיקה בין מודיאליות. אנחנו מציגים מודל חדש, שנקרא רשתות פוזיוני טנסור, שלמדה את שניהם דינמיקה כזו סוף-סוף. הגישה המוצעת מתאימה לטבע השפת המפורסמת בסרטים באינטרנט, כמו גם למחאות והקול. בניסויים, הדוגמא שלנו מובילה גישות חדשות ביותר עבור ניתוח רגשות רב-מודלית וגם חד-מודלית.', 'sk': 'Multimodalna analiza čustva je vedno bolj priljubljeno raziskovalno področje, ki razširi konvencionalno jezikovno opredelitev analize čustva na multimodalno postavitev, kjer jezik spremljajo druge ustrezne modalitete. V prispevku predstavljamo problem multimodalne analize sentimenta kot modeliranje intramodalnosti in intermodalne dinamike. Predstavljamo nov model, imenovan Tensor Fusion Networks, ki se takšno dinamiko nauči od konca do konca. Predlagani pristop je prilagojen nestabilnosti govorjenega jezika v spletnih videoposnetkih ter spremljajočim kretnjam in glasu. V eksperimentih naš model presega najsodobnejše pristope za multimodalno in unimodalno analizo sentimenta.', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མང་ཆེ་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་གཏོང་འབྲེ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་སྣང་དང་མཐུན་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པ་མི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་ལ། གློག་ཡུལ་བརྙན་ཐུང་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་རང་བཞིན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་མངོན་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་ནང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་འཐབ་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'ConStance : Modeling Annotation Contexts to Improve Stance Classification', 'ar': 'ConStance: نمذجة سياقات الشرح لتحسين تصنيف الموقف', 'pt': 'Constance: Modelando Contextos de Anotação para Melhorar a Classificação de Posturas', 'fr': "ConStance\xa0: Modélisation des contextes d'annotation pour améliorer la classification des", 'es': 'ConStance: modelado de contextos de anotación para mejorar la clasificación de posturas', 'ja': 'コンスタンス：スタンス分類を改善するためのモデリングアノテーションコンテキスト', 'zh': 'ConStance曰:上下文建模改立场', 'hi': 'ConStance: मॉडलिंग एनोटेशन संदर्भों रुख वर्गीकरण में सुधार करने के लिए', 'ru': 'ConStance: Моделирование контекстов аннотаций для улучшения классификации позиций', 'ga': 'ConStance: Samhaltú Comhthéacsanna Anótála chun Aicmiú Seasaimh a Fheabhsú', 'hu': 'ConStance: Jegyzetelési kontextusok modellezése a helyzet osztályozásának javítása érdekében', 'ka': 'კონსტანსი: მოდელირება კონტექსტები Stance კლასიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Σύσταση: Μοντελοποίηση πλαισίων σχολιασμού για τη βελτίωση της ταξινόμησης στάσεων', 'it': 'ConStance: modellare i contesti di annotazione per migliorare la classificazione delle posizioni', 'lt': 'Konstancija: Annotacijos kontekstų modeliavimas siekiant pagerinti pozicijos klasifikavimą', 'kk': 'Констанция: Станс классификациясын жақсарту үшін мәліметтер контекстерін үлгілеу', 'mk': 'Контастанс: Моделирање на контекстите на анатацијата за подобрување на класификацијата на статусот', 'ms': 'ConStance: Model Konteks Annotasi untuk meningkatkan Klasifikasi Stance', 'mt': 'ConStance: Modeling Annotation Contexts to Improve Stance Classification', 'no': 'Konstans: Modelering av merkingskontekstar for å forbetra stadsklassifikasjon', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റെയിന്\u200dസ്: മോഡിലിങ്ങ് ആനോട്ടേഷന്\u200d ഉള്ളടക്കം', 'mn': 'Констанс: Стэнц классификацийг сайжруулахын тулд', 'sr': 'Konstans: Modeliranje konteksta za annotaciju za poboljšanje klasifikacije stanica', 'si': 'ස්ථානය: ස්ටැන්ස් ක්ලාසිෆිකේටන් විස්තර කරන්න මොඩේල් කිරීම් සම්බන්ධතාවය', 'pl': 'ConStance: Modelowanie kontekstów adnotacji w celu poprawy klasyfikacji stanu', 'ro': 'ConStance: Modelarea contextelor de adnotare pentru a îmbunătăți clasificarea stării', 'so': 'Xarunta: Modeling Annotation Contents to Improve Stance Classification', 'sv': 'ConStance: Modellera anteckningskontexter för att förbättra Stance Klassificering', 'ta': 'மாற்று', 'ur': 'ConStance: Modeling Annotation Contexts to Improve Stance Classification', 'uz': 'Boshqa shaklga almashtirish', 'vi': 'ConnStance: Thời báo cáo mẫu lồng để cải tạo mật độ Stance', 'nl': 'ConStance: Het modelleren van annotatiecontexten om de standclassificatie te verbeteren', 'da': 'ConStance: Modellering Annotationskontekster for at forbedre Stance Klassificering', 'hr': 'Konstancija: Modeliranje konteksta oznake za poboljšanje klasifikacije stanica', 'bg': 'КонСтанция: Моделиране на контексти за анотация за подобряване на класификацията на позицията', 'de': 'ConStance: Modellierung von Annotationskontexten zur Verbesserung der Stanzklassifizierung', 'id': 'ConStance: Modeling Conteks Annotasi untuk meningkatkan Klasifikasi Stance', 'fa': 'کنستنس: مدل\u200cسازی محتویات یادآوری برای توسعه کلاس استنس', 'ko': 'ConStance: 주석 컨텍스트 모델링을 위한 자세 분류 개선', 'sw': 'ConStance: Mitandao ya Tamko ya Modeling Annotation to Improve Classification', 'tr': 'Durum', 'af': 'Stensil: Modelering Annotasie Konteks na Verbeter Stensil Klassifikasie', 'sq': 'Konstance: Modelimi i konteksteve të anotacionit për të përmirësuar klasifikimin e qëndrimit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Konstans: Stans KlasifiklÉ™rini Improved etmÉ™k Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n Model Annotation Contexts', 'am': 'Stance: Modeling Annotation Contexts to Improve Stance Classification', 'bn': 'কনস্ট্যান্স: মোডেলিং অ্যানোটেশন বিষয়বস্তু উন্নতি করার জন্য', 'bs': 'Konstans: Modeliranje konteksta za annotaciju za poboljšanje klasifikacije stanica', 'cs': 'ConStance: Modelování anotací kontextů pro zlepšení klasifikace postojů', 'et': 'KonStance: Annotatsiooni kontekstide modelleerimine Stance klassifikatsiooni parandamiseks', 'ca': "Constance: Modelar Contexts d'Anotació per millorar la classificació de la posició", 'fi': 'ConStance: Annotointikontekstien mallintaminen Stance-luokituksen parantamiseksi', 'jv': 'Duration', 'sk': 'ConStance: modeliranje opombalnih kontekstov za izboljšanje klasifikacije stanja', 'he': 'התנגדות: דוגמנית תקשורת הערות כדי לשפר את שיעור העמדה', 'ha': 'Stance: Modelling Annonation Content to improve Stance Classification', 'bo': 'བརྒྱུད་རིས། མ་དབྱིབས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཁོར་ཡུག'}
{'en': 'Manual annotations are a prerequisite for many applications of machine learning. However, weaknesses in the annotation process itself are easy to overlook. In particular, scholars often choose what information to give to annotators without examining these decisions empirically. For subjective tasks such as sentiment analysis, sarcasm, and stance detection, such choices can impact results. Here, for the task of political stance detection on Twitter, we show that providing too little context can result in noisy and uncertain annotations, whereas providing too strong a context may cause it to outweigh other signals. To characterize and reduce these biases, we develop ConStance, a general model for reasoning about annotations across information conditions. Given conflicting labels produced by multiple annotators seeing the same instances with different contexts, ConStance simultaneously estimates gold standard labels and also learns a classifier for new instances. We show that the classifier learned by ConStance outperforms a variety of baselines at predicting political stance, while the model’s interpretable parameters shed light on the effects of each context.', 'pt': 'As anotações manuais são um pré-requisito para muitas aplicações de aprendizado de máquina. No entanto, as fraquezas no próprio processo de anotação são fáceis de ignorar. Em particular, os estudiosos geralmente escolhem quais informações fornecer aos anotadores sem examinar essas decisões empiricamente. Para tarefas subjetivas, como análise de sentimentos, sarcasmo e detecção de postura, essas escolhas podem afetar os resultados. Aqui, para a tarefa de detecção de posição política no Twitter, mostramos que fornecer pouco contexto pode resultar em anotações barulhentas e incertas, enquanto fornecer um contexto muito forte pode fazer com que ele supere outros sinais. Para caracterizar e reduzir esses vieses, desenvolvemos o ConStance, um modelo geral para raciocinar sobre anotações em condições de informação. Dados os rótulos conflitantes produzidos por vários anotadores vendo as mesmas instâncias com contextos diferentes, o ConStance estima simultaneamente os rótulos padrão ouro e também aprende um classificador para novas instâncias. Mostramos que o classificador aprendido pelo ConStance supera uma variedade de linhas de base na previsão de postura política, enquanto os parâmetros interpretáveis do modelo esclarecem os efeitos de cada contexto.', 'ar': 'التعليقات التوضيحية اليدوية هي شرط أساسي للعديد من تطبيقات التعلم الآلي. ومع ذلك ، من السهل التغاضي عن نقاط الضعف في عملية التعليقات التوضيحية نفسها. على وجه الخصوص ، غالبًا ما يختار العلماء المعلومات التي يجب تقديمها للمعلقين دون فحص هذه القرارات تجريبيًا. بالنسبة للمهام الذاتية مثل تحليل المشاعر والسخرية واكتشاف الموقف ، يمكن أن تؤثر هذه الاختيارات على النتائج. هنا ، بالنسبة لمهمة اكتشاف الموقف السياسي على تويتر ، نوضح أن توفير سياق ضئيل جدًا يمكن أن يؤدي إلى تعليقات توضيحية مشوشة وغير مؤكدة ، في حين أن توفير سياق قوي جدًا قد يتسبب في تفوقه على الإشارات الأخرى. لتوصيف وتقليل هذه التحيزات ، نقوم بتطوير ConStance ، وهو نموذج عام للتفكير حول التعليقات التوضيحية عبر شروط المعلومات. نظرًا للتسميات المتضاربة التي ينتجها العديد من المعلقين الذين يرون نفس الحالات مع سياقات مختلفة ، يقوم ConStance في نفس الوقت بتقدير التسميات القياسية الذهبية ويتعلم أيضًا المصنف للحالات الجديدة. نظهر أن المصنف الذي تعلمه ConStance يتفوق في الأداء على مجموعة متنوعة من خطوط الأساس في توقع الموقف السياسي ، بينما تسلط معلمات النموذج القابلة للتفسير الضوء على تأثيرات كل سياق.', 'fr': "Les annotations manuelles sont indispensables à de nombreuses applications de l'apprentissage automatique. Cependant, il est facile d'ignorer les faiblesses du processus d'annotation lui-même. En particulier, les chercheurs choisissent souvent les informations à donner aux annotateurs sans examiner ces décisions de manière empirique. Pour les tâches subjectives telles que l'analyse des sentiments, le sarcasme et la détection de position, de tels choix peuvent avoir une incidence sur les résultats. Ici, pour la tâche de détection des positions politiques sur Twitter, nous montrons que fournir trop peu de contexte peut entraîner des annotations bruyantes et incertaines, alors que fournir un contexte trop fort peut l'amener à l'emporter sur d'autres signaux. Pour caractériser et réduire ces biais, nous développons ConStance, un modèle général de raisonnement sur les annotations selon les conditions d'information. Étant donné les étiquettes conflictuelles produites par plusieurs annotateurs qui voient les mêmes instances dans des contextes différents, ConStance estime simultanément les étiquettes de référence et apprend également un classificateur pour les nouvelles instances. Nous montrons que le classificateur appris par ConStance surpasse plusieurs niveaux de référence pour prédire la position politique, tandis que les paramètres interprétables du modèle éclairent les effets de chaque contexte.", 'es': 'Las anotaciones manuales son un requisito previo para muchas aplicaciones de aprendizaje automático. Sin embargo, es fácil pasar por alto las debilidades en el propio proceso de anotación. En particular, los estudiosos suelen elegir qué información dar a los anotadores sin examinar estas decisiones empíricamente. Para tareas subjetivas como el análisis de sentimientos, el sarcasmo y la detección de posturas, estas elecciones pueden afectar los resultados. Aquí, para la tarea de detección de posturas políticas en Twitter, mostramos que proporcionar muy poco contexto puede dar lugar a anotaciones ruidosas e inciertas, mientras que proporcionar un contexto demasiado fuerte puede hacer que supere a otras señales. Para caracterizar y reducir estos sesgos, desarrollamos ConStance, un modelo general para razonar sobre las anotaciones en todas las condiciones de información. Dadas las etiquetas conflictivas producidas por varios anotadores que ven las mismas instancias con diferentes contextos, ConStance estima simultáneamente las etiquetas estándar de oro y también aprende un clasificador para nuevas instancias. Mostramos que el clasificador aprendido por ConStance supera a una variedad de líneas de base en la predicción de la postura política, mientras que los parámetros interpretables del modelo arrojan luz sobre los efectos de cada contexto.', 'zh': '手动注多机器学之先决也。 然注事之弱易被忽视。 学者常择所给注者,而不以经验验之。 情析刺立,此类或可及也。 此Twitter之政治立场检也,吾示以太少之上下文,嘈杂不定之注,而太强者上下文或过之也。 为表减偏差,开ConStance,推理跨信之通用也。 给定数注器上下文见同类冲突,ConStance 可兼度黄金标准标签,并习新例之分。 吾明ConStance学之分器政治立场优于众基线,而模形之说参数见其境内。', 'ja': 'マニュアルアノテーションは、機械学習の多くのアプリケーションの前提条件です。 しかし、注釈プロセス自体の弱点は見落としやすい。 特に、学者は、これらの決定を経験的に検討することなく、注釈者にどのような情報を与えるかを選択することが多い。 感情分析、皮肉、スタンス検出などの主観的なタスクでは、そのような選択は結果に影響を与える可能性があります。 ここでは、Twitterで政治的スタンスを検出するタスクのために、コンテキストをあまり提供しないと、騒々しく不確実な注釈を生じる可能性がある一方で、コンテキストを強力に提供しすぎると、他のシグナルを上回る可能性があることを示しています。 これらのバイアスを特徴づけ、低減するために、私たちは情報条件を横断してアノテーションを推論するための一般的なモデルであるConStanceを開発します。 異なるコンテキストで同じインスタンスを表示する複数のアノテーターによって生成された競合するラベルを考慮すると、ConStanceは同時に金の標準ラベルを推定し、新しいインスタンスの分類子も学習します。 私たちは、ConStanceによって学習された分類子が、政治的スタンスを予測する際の様々なベースラインを上回ることを示し、モデルの解釈可能なパラメータは、各コンテキストの効果を明らかにします。', 'hi': 'मैन्युअल एनोटेशन मशीन सीखने के कई अनुप्रयोगों के लिए एक शर्त हैं। हालांकि, एनोटेशन प्रक्रिया में कमजोरियों को अनदेखा करना आसान है। विशेष रूप से, विद्वान अक्सर चुनते हैं कि इन निर्णयों की अनुभवजन्य रूप से जांच किए बिना एनोटेटरों को कौन सी जानकारी देनी है। भावना विश्लेषण, व्यंग्य और रुख का पता लगाने जैसे व्यक्तिपरक कार्यों के लिए, ऐसे विकल्प परिणामों को प्रभावित कर सकते हैं। यहां, ट्विटर पर राजनीतिक रुख का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए, हम दिखाते हैं कि बहुत कम संदर्भ प्रदान करने के परिणामस्वरूप शोर और अनिश्चित एनोटेशन हो सकते हैं, जबकि बहुत मजबूत संदर्भ प्रदान करने से यह अन्य संकेतों से आगे निकल सकता है। इन पूर्वाग्रहों को चिह्नित करने और कम करने के लिए, हम ConStance विकसित करते हैं, जो सूचना स्थितियों में एनोटेशन के बारे में तर्क के लिए एक सामान्य मॉडल है। विभिन्न संदर्भों के साथ एक ही उदाहरण को देखते हुए कई एनोटेटरों द्वारा उत्पादित परस्पर विरोधी लेबल को देखते हुए, कॉन्स्टेंस एक साथ सोने के मानक लेबल का अनुमान लगाता है और नए उदाहरणों के लिए एक क्लासिफायर भी सीखता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि ConStance द्वारा सीखा क्लासिफायर राजनीतिक रुख की भविष्यवाणी करने में विभिन्न आधार रेखाओं को मात देता है, जबकि मॉडल के व्याख्यायोग्य पैरामीटर प्रत्येक संदर्भ के प्रभावों पर प्रकाश डालते हैं।', 'ru': 'Ручные аннотации являются необходимым условием для многих приложений машинного обучения. Однако недостатки самого процесса подготовки аннотаций легко упустить из виду. В частности, ученые часто выбирают, какую информацию давать аннотаторам, не изучая эти решения эмпирически. Для субъективных задач, таких как анализ настроений, сарказм и определение положения, такой выбор может повлиять на результаты. Здесь, для задачи обнаружения политической позиции в Twitter, мы показываем, что слишком слабый контекст может привести к шумным и неопределенным аннотациям, в то время как слишком сильный контекст может привести к перевешиванию других сигналов. Чтобы охарактеризовать и уменьшить эти погрешности, мы разрабатываем ConStance, общую модель для рассуждения об аннотациях по информационным условиям. Учитывая конфликтующие метки, созданные несколькими аннотаторами, которые видят одни и те же экземпляры с разными контекстами, ConStance одновременно оценивает метки золотого стандарта, а также изучает классификатор для новых экземпляров. Мы показываем, что классификатор, изученный ConStance, превосходит различные базовые линии при прогнозировании политической позиции, в то время как интерпретируемые параметры модели проливают свет на эффекты каждого контекста.', 'ga': 'Is réamhriachtanas iad nótaí láimhe le go leor feidhmeanna na meaisínfhoghlama. Mar sin féin, is furasta laigí sa phróiseas anótála féin a neamhaird. Go háirithe, is minic a roghnaíonn scoláirí cén fhaisnéis atá le tabhairt do naótálaithe gan na cinntí seo a scrúdú go heimpíreach. I gcás tascanna suibiachtúla amhail anailís aireachtála, searbhas, agus braite seasaimh, féadfaidh roghanna den sórt sin tionchar a imirt ar thorthaí. Anseo, chun seasamh polaitiúil a bhrath ar Twitter, léirímid go bhféadfadh nótaí callánacha agus neamhchinnte a bheith mar thoradh ar róbheag de chomhthéacs a chur ar fáil, ach d’fhéadfadh go mbeadh sé níos airde ná comharthaí eile má chuirtear comhthéacs ró-láidir ar fáil. Chun na laofachtaí seo a thréithriú agus a laghdú, forbraímid ConStance, samhail ghinearálta le haghaidh réasúnaíochta faoi nótaí trasna coinníollacha faisnéise. I bhfianaise lipéid chontrártha arna dtáirgeadh ag anótálaithe iolracha a fheiceann na cásanna céanna le comhthéacsanna éagsúla, déanann ConStance meastachán ar lipéid chaighdeán óir ag an am céanna agus foghlaimíonn sé aicmitheoir le haghaidh cásanna nua freisin. Léirímid go sáraíonn an t-aicmitheoir a d’fhoghlaim ConStance bonnlínte éagsúla maidir le seasamh polaitiúil a thuar, agus cuireann paraiméadair inmhínithe na samhla solas ar éifeachtaí gach comhthéacs.', 'hu': 'A kézi megjegyzések a gépi tanulás számos alkalmazásának előfeltétele. A jegyzetelési folyamat gyengeségeit azonban könnyű figyelmen kívül hagyni. Különösen a tudósok gyakran választják ki, hogy milyen információkat adjanak a kommentátoroknak anélkül, hogy empirikusan megvizsgálnák ezeket a döntéseket. Szubjektív feladatok, mint például az érzelmek elemzése, a szarkazmus és az álláspont felismerése, az ilyen választások befolyásolhatják az eredményeket. Itt a Twitteren történő politikai álláspont felismeréséhez megmutatjuk, hogy a túl kevés kontextus zajos és bizonytalan megjegyzésekhez vezethet, míg a túl erős kontextus meghaladja a többi jelet. Ezen előítéletek jellemzése és csökkentése érdekében kifejlesztjük a ConStance-t, amely egy általános modellt alkalmaz az információs körülmények közötti megjegyzésekkel kapcsolatos érvelésekre. Mivel több megjegyző által létrehozott, különböző kontextusokban ugyanazokat a példányokat látja, a ConStance egyidejűleg becsüli az aranyszabású címkéket, és megtanulja az új példányok osztályozóját. Megmutatjuk, hogy a ConStance által tanult osztályozó a politikai álláspont előrejelzésében különböző alapvető értékeket felülmúlja, míg a modell értelmezhető paraméterei fényt adnak az egyes kontextusok hatásaira.', 'el': 'Οι χειροκίνητες σημειώσεις αποτελούν προϋπόθεση για πολλές εφαρμογές μηχανικής μάθησης. Ωστόσο, οι αδυναμίες της ίδιας της διαδικασίας σχολιασμού είναι εύκολο να παραβλεφθούν. Ειδικότερα, οι μελετητές συχνά επιλέγουν ποιες πληροφορίες θα δώσουν στους σχολιαστές χωρίς να εξετάσουν εμπειρικά αυτές τις αποφάσεις. Για υποκειμενικές εργασίες όπως ανάλυση συναισθημάτων, σαρκασμός και ανίχνευση στάσεων, τέτοιες επιλογές μπορούν να επηρεάσουν τα αποτελέσματα. Εδώ, για το καθήκον της ανίχνευσης πολιτικής στάσης στο Twitter, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η παροχή υπερβολικά περιορισμένου πλαισίου μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε θορυβώδεις και αβέβαιες σχολιασμούς, ενώ η παροχή ενός υπερβολικά ισχυρού πλαισίου μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε υπεροχή άλλων σημάτων. Για να χαρακτηρίσουμε και να μειώσουμε αυτές τις προκαταλήψεις, αναπτύσσουμε ένα γενικό μοντέλο συλλογισμού σχετικά με τις σχολιάσεις σε συνθήκες πληροφόρησης. Δεδομένου αντικρουόμενων ετικετών που παράγονται από πολλούς σχολιαστές που βλέπουν τις ίδιες περιπτώσεις με διαφορετικά πλαίσια, η ConStance εκτιμά ταυτόχρονα τις χρυσές τυποποιημένες ετικέτες και μαθαίνει επίσης έναν ταξινομητή για νέες περιπτώσεις. Δείχνουμε ότι ο ταξινομητής που έμαθε ο Κόνστανς ξεπερνά μια ποικιλία βασικών γραμμών στην πρόβλεψη πολιτικής στάσης, ενώ οι ερμηνευτές παράμετροι του μοντέλου ρίχνουν φως στις επιπτώσεις κάθε πλαισίου.', 'ka': 'ხელსაწყოთა ანოტაციები მაქინის სწავლების მრავალი პროგრამებისთვის უნდა იყოს. მაგრამ, შეუძლებელები თავიდან მონიტაციის პროცესში უფრო მარტივია. განსაკუთრებით, სტუდენტები ძალიან ამოირჩევენ რას ინფორმაცია, რომლებიც ამოტოტორორებელთვის მოეცემს, ამ წესების ემპერიკურად არ შე სუბექტიური საქმებისთვის, როგორც სენტიმენტის ანალიზი, საპკაზმი და სტანტიური განახლებისთვის, ასეთი არჩევები შეიძლება გააკეთება შესაძლებელია გა აქ, პოლიტიკური სტანტისტის განვიცნობისთვის სამუშაოდ Twitter-ში, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ძალიან პატარა კონტექსტის შესაძლებელია ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან კონტექსტის განვიცნობისთვის, როგორც რომელიც ამ წარმოდგენების განსაკუთრებით და გამოკლებისთვის, ჩვენ კონსტანსის განვითარებით, სხვა მოდელი ინფორმაციის შესახებ წარმოდგენისთვის. კონფლიქციური ლაბეტები, რომელიც მრავალ ანტოტორიების გამოყენებულია, რომელიც განსხვავებული კონტექსტებით იგივე შემთხვევაში იხედავთ, ConStance ერთადერთად აღმოჩენა Goldstandard etiquettes და ასევე ახა ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კონსტანსის სწავლილი კლასიფიკაცია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია პოლიტიკური სტანციაში, როცა მოდელის განსხვავებელი პარამეტრები ყველა კონტექსტის ეფექტე', 'lt': 'Rankinės anotacijos yra būtina sąlyga daugeliui mašininio mokymosi programų. Tačiau lengva pamiršti pačio anotacijos proceso trūkumus. Visų pirma mokslininkai dažnai pasirinka, kokią informaciją teikti anotatoriams, neatsižvelgdami į šiuos sprendimus empiriškai. For subjective tasks such as sentiment analysis, sarcasm, and stance detection, such choices can impact results.  Čia, siekiant nustatyti politinę poziciją Twitter, parodome, kad pernelyg mažos aplinkybės gali sukelti triukšmingas ir neapibrėžtas anotacijas, o pernelyg stiprus kontekstas gali paskatinti ją viršyti kitus signalus. Kad apibūdintume ir sumažintume šiuos nukrypimus, sukuriame ConStance, bendrą pagrindimo apie anotacijas model į informacinėse sąlygose. Atsižvelgiant į tai, kad daugelis annotatorių gamina prieštaringas etiketes, kuriose yra tokie patys atvejai su skirtingais kontekstais, ConStance tuo pačiu metu įvertina aukso standartines etiketes ir taip pat išmoko klasifikatorių naujiems atvejams. Mes parodome, kad „ConStance“ išmokęs klasifikatorius viršija įvairias bazes prognozuojant politinę poziciją, o modelio aiškinamieji parametrai atskleidžia kiekvieno konteksto poveikį.', 'it': "Le annotazioni manuali sono un prerequisito per molte applicazioni del machine learning. Tuttavia, le debolezze nel processo di annotazione stesso sono facili da trascurare. In particolare, gli studiosi scelgono spesso quali informazioni dare agli annotatori senza esaminare empiricamente queste decisioni. Per compiti soggettivi come l'analisi del sentiment, il sarcasmo e il rilevamento della posizione, tali scelte possono avere un impatto sui risultati. Qui, per il compito di rilevare le posizioni politiche su Twitter, mostriamo che fornire un contesto troppo limitato può portare a annotazioni rumorose e incerte, mentre fornire un contesto troppo forte può farlo superare altri segnali. Per caratterizzare e ridurre questi pregiudizi, sviluppiamo ConStance, un modello generale per ragionare sulle annotazioni attraverso le condizioni di informazione. Date le etichette contrastanti prodotte da più annotatori che vedono le stesse istanze con contesti diversi, ConStance stima simultaneamente le etichette standard oro e impara anche un classificatore per le nuove istanze. Mostriamo che il classificatore appreso da ConStance supera una varietà di linee di base nella previsione della posizione politica, mentre i parametri interpretabili del modello fanno luce sugli effetti di ogni contesto.", 'kk': 'Қолмен жазбалар - машинаны оқыту үшін бірнеше қолданбалардың алдындағы қажет. Бірақ мәліметтер процесіндегі ақшалық өзінің өзінің қарағандары оңай. Әсіресе, білімдер бұл шешімдерді эмпирикалық түрде тексермей қалай мәліметті қалай ақпарат беретінін таңдайды. Сөздік анализ, сарказм және таңдау үшін таңдау нәтижелеріне әсер етеді. Мұнда, Твиттердегі саяси жағдайларды анықтау тапсырмасы үшін біз тым қысқа контексті тапсырмаларды қолдануға болады, бірақ оның басқа сигналдарына көмектесуі мүмкін. Бұл өзгерістерді таңдау және қысқарту үшін, біз Констанс, мәлімет шарттарындағы мәліметтер туралы түсініктемелер үшін жалпы үлгі құрамыз. Көптеген жазбалар бірнеше жазбалар бірнеше жазбалармен бірнеше жазбаларды көргенде, ConStance бірден алтын стандартты жазбаларды бағалады және жаңа жазбалар үшін классификаторын оқыды. Біз Констанс оқылған классификациясы саяси жағдайын таңдау үшін түрлі негізгі сызықтарды өзгертеді дегенді көрсету үшін, моделінің түсінікті параметрлері әрбір контекстің эффекттеріне жарықтық', 'ms': 'Anotasi manual adalah prerekwiżit untuk banyak aplikasi pembelajaran mesin. Namun, kelemahan dalam proses anotasi sendiri mudah diabaikan. Secara khusus, ahli sains sering memilih maklumat apa yang perlu diberikan kepada pengembara tanpa memeriksa keputusan-keputusan ini secara empirik. Untuk tugas subjektif seperti analisis perasaan, sarkasme, dan pengesan kedudukan, pilihan tersebut boleh mempengaruhi keputusan. Here, for the task of political stance detection on Twitter, we show that providing too little context can result in noisy and uncertain annotations, whereas providing too strong a context may cause it to outweigh other signals.  Untuk mengurangi dan mengurangi biases ini, kita mengembangkan ConStance, model umum untuk alasan mengenai anotasi melalui syarat maklumat. Mengingat label berkonflik yang dihasilkan oleh pelbagai annotator yang melihat kejadian yang sama dengan konteks yang berbeza, ConStance secara bersamaan menghargai label piawai emas dan juga belajar pengklasifikasi untuk kejadian baru. Kami menunjukkan bahawa pengklasifikasi yang dipelajari oleh ConStance melampaui berbagai garis dasar dalam meramalkan kedudukan politik, sementara parameter yang boleh diterangkan model memberi cahaya kepada kesan setiap konteks.', 'mk': 'Рачните анотации се предуслов за многу апликации на машинско учење. Сепак, слабостите во самиот процес на анотација се лесно да се прегледаат. In particular, scholars often choose what information to give to annotators without examining these decisions empirically.  За субјективни задачи како што се анализа на чувствата, сарказмот и детекција на ставови, ваквите избори можат да влијаат на резултатите. Тука, за задачата на детекција на политички ставови на Твитер, покажуваме дека обезбедувањето премногу мал контекст може да резултира со бучни и несигурни анотации, додека обезбедувањето премногу силен контекст може да го предизвика тоа да ги надмине другите сигнали. За да ги карактеризираме и намалиме овие предрасуди, развиваме Констанс, генерален модел за размислување за анотациите во информациските услови. Со оглед на конфликтните етикети произведени од многуте анотатори кои ги гледаат истите случаи со различни контексти, Констанс истовремено проценува златни стандардни етикети и, исто така, научи класификатор за нови случаи. Ние покажуваме дека класификаторот што го научи Констанс ги надминува различните основни линии во предвидувањето на политичкиот став, додека параметрите на моделот кои се интерпретираат ги објаснуваат ефектите на секој контекст.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പല പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും കൈയ്യിലുള്ള അംഗീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമാണ്. എന്നാലും പ്രക്രിയയിലെ ദുര്\u200dബലങ്ങള്\u200d തന്നെയാണ് ഉപേക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ളത്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നു ഈ തീരുമാനങ്ങള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രീകരമായ വിശേഷപൂര്\u200dവ്വ ജോലികള്\u200d ഇവിടെ, ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീയ സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു, വളരെ കുറച്ചു കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂട ഈ തെറ്റുകളെ സ്വഭാവിക്കുകയും കുറവ് വരുത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റാന്\u200dസ്, വിവരങ്ങളുടെ നിലപാടുകളെക്കുറി കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റേന്\u200dസ് ഒരേ സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ലേബലുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ അവസ്ഥകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക് കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റാന്\u200dസ് പഠിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള ക്ലാസ്റ്റേഷര്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീയ സ്ഥിതിയെ പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തലകള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക', 'mt': 'L-annotazzjonijiet manwali huma prerekwiżit għal ħafna applikazzjonijiet tat-tagħlim tal-magni. Madankollu, nuqqasijiet fil-proċess ta’ annotazzjoni nnifsu huma faċli li jiġu injorati. B’mod partikolari, l-istudenti spiss jagħżlu liema informazzjoni għandhom jingħataw lill-annotaturi mingħajr ma jeżaminaw dawn id-deċiżjonijiet b’mod empiriku. Għall-kompiti soġġettivi bħall-analiżi tas-sentimenti, is-sarkasmu, u l-identifikazzjoni tal-pożizzjoni, dawn l-għażliet jistgħu jkollhom impatt fuq ir-riżultati. Hawnhekk, għall-kompitu tad-detezzjoni ta’ pożizzjonijiet politiċi fuq Twitter, nagħmlu evidenza li l-għoti ta’ kuntest żgħir wisq jista’ jirriżulta f’annotazzjonijiet storbjużi u in ċerti, filwaqt li l-għoti ta’ kuntest b’saħħtu wisq jista’ jikkawża li jisboq sinjali oħra. To characterize and reduce these biases, we develop ConStance, a general model for reasoning about annotations across information conditions.  Minħabba tikketti konfliġġenti prodotti minn annotaturi multipli li jaraw l-istess każijiet b’kuntesti differenti, ConStance fl-istess ħin jistma tikketti standard tad-deheb u jitgħallem ukoll klassifikatur għal każijiet ġodda. Aħna nuru li l-klassifikatur imgħallem minn ConStance jaqbeż varjetà ta’ linji bażi fit-tbassir tal-pożizzjoni politika, filwaqt li l-parametri interpretabbli tal-mudell jagħtu dawl fuq l-effetti ta’ kull kuntest.', 'no': 'Manuelle notasjonar er eit førekrevståande for mange program med maskinelæring. Men tyrke i annotasjonsprosessen er sjølv lett å oversjå. Sjølvsagt vel forskere ofte kva informasjon skal gi til annotatorar utan å undersøke desse avgjøringane empirisk. For subjektiv oppgåver som sentimentanalyser, sarkasm og oppdaging av stasjon kan slike vala påvirke resultatet. Her, for oppgåva av politiske oppdaging på Twitter, viser vi at tilgjengeleg for lite kontekst kan føre til støy og usikkerte notasjonar, mens tilgjengeleg for sterk eit kontekst kan føre til at det vil overvekke andre signaler. For å karakterisera og redusera desse følgjande, utviklar vi ConStance, eit generell modell for å rasjona om merkingar i informasjonsvilkåra. Given konfliktlige merkelappar produsert av fleire merkelappar som ser dei same instansene med ulike kontekstar, vurder ConStance samtidig gull standard merkelappar og lærer også ein klassifiserer for nye instansar. Vi viser at klassifiseringen lært av ConStance utfører fleire baselinjer ved å foregå politiske stasjon, mens modellen har tolkbare parametrar lagt lys på effektane av kvar kontekst.', 'mn': 'Машин суралцах хэрэгжүүлэлтийн аль хэдийн шаардлагатай. Гэвч тэмдэглэх үйл явцдаа сул байдал өөрийгөө харах нь амархан. Ялангуяа, эрдэмтэд эдгээр шийдвэрийг эзэмшигч байдлаар шалгахгүй юу мэдээлэл өгөх вэ гэдгийг сонгож байна. Жишээлбэл сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээ, сэтгэл хөдлөл, нөхцөл байдлыг олох мэт сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үйл ажиллагаанд ийм сонголт нөлөөлж чадна. Энд, Твиттерт улс төрийн байр сургалтын ажлын тухай бид хэтэрхий жижиг нөхцөл байдлаар чимээгүй, тодорхойгүй байдлаар нөлөөлж чадна. Гэхдээ хэтэрхий хүчтэй нөхцөл байдлын тухай нөхцөл байдлыг нь бу Эдгээр урвалыг тодорхойлох, багасгах үед бид Констанс, мэдээллийн нөхцөл байдлын тухай илтгэл тайлбарлах ерөнхий загвар болгож байна. Ихэнх анзаарагчид бүтээсэн зөрчилдөөнтэй маркилгууд нь өөр нөхцөлтэй адилхан нөхцөл байдлыг харж байгаа учраас Констанс алтын стандарт маркилгуудыг тооцоолж, мөн шинэ нөхцөл байдлыг судладаг. Бид Констанс-ын сурсан ангилагч улс төрийн байр суурь байдлыг таамаглахдаа олон төрлийн суурь шугам гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Загварын тодорхойлж болох параметрын тодорхойлж буй орчин бүрийн нөлөөлөлд гэрэл', 'pl': 'Ręczne adnotacje są warunkiem wstępnym wielu zastosowań uczenia maszynowego. Jednak słabości w samym procesie adnotacji są łatwe do przeoczenia. W szczególności naukowcy często wybierają, jakie informacje mają przekazać adnotatorom, nie analizując tych decyzji empirycznie. W przypadku zadań subiektywnych, takich jak analiza sentymentów, sarkazm i wykrywanie stanowiska, takie wybory mogą mieć wpływ na wyniki. W tym kontekście, na zadanie wykrywania stanowiska politycznego na Twitterze, pokazujemy, że zapewnienie zbyt małej ilości kontekstu może skutkować hałaśliwymi i niepewnymi adnotacjami, podczas gdy zapewnienie zbyt silnego kontekstu może spowodować, że przeważa ono inne sygnały. Aby charakteryzować i zmniejszyć te uprzedzenia, opracowujemy ConStance, ogólny model rozumowania o adnotacjach w warunkach informacyjnych. Biorąc pod uwagę sprzeczne etykiety produkowane przez wiele adnotatorów widzących te same instancje w różnych kontekstach, ConStance jednocześnie szacuje złote standardy etykiet, a także uczy się klasyfikatora dla nowych instancji. Pokazujemy, że klasyfikator nauczony przez ConStance przewyższa różne linie podstawowe w przewidywaniu stanowiska politycznego, podczas gdy interpretowalne parametry modelu rzucają światło na efekty każdego kontekstu.', 'ro': 'Adnotările manuale sunt o condiție prealabilă pentru multe aplicații ale învățării automate. Cu toate acestea, punctele slabe ale procesului de adnotare în sine sunt ușor de trecut cu vederea. În special, oamenii de știință aleg adesea ce informații să dea adnotatorilor fără a examina aceste decizii empiric. Pentru sarcini subiective, cum ar fi analiza sentimentelor, sarcasmul și detectarea poziției, astfel de opțiuni pot influența rezultatele. Aici, în scopul detectării poziției politice pe Twitter, arătăm că furnizarea unui context prea puțin poate duce la adnotări zgomotoase și nesigure, în timp ce furnizarea unui context prea puternic poate determina depășirea altor semnale. Pentru a caracteriza și reduce aceste prejudecăți, dezvoltăm ConStance, un model general de raționament despre adnotări în condițiile de informare. Având în vedere etichetele conflictuale produse de mai mulți adnotatori care văd aceleași instanțe cu contexte diferite, ConStance estimează simultan etichetele standard aur și, de asemenea, învață un clasificator pentru noi instanțe. Noi arătăm că clasificatorul învățat de ConStance depășește o varietate de linii de bază la predicția poziției politice, în timp ce parametrii interpretabili ai modelului fac lumină asupra efectelor fiecărui context.', 'so': "Waxbarashada machadka waxaa loo baahan yahay mid aad u baahan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee itaaldarrada xiliga caafimaadku waa fudud tahay in la dhaafo. Waxbarashada waxey marar badan doortaan macluumaadka ay u dhiibaan macluumaadka ay ogeysiiyaan go'aankaas si xor ah. Shaqooyinka muhiimka ah, sida baaritaanka xisaabta, qasarka iyo suurtooyinka, waxay saameyn ku yeelan karaan arimaha. Halkan, shaqada siyaasadeedka ee Twitterka, waxaynu tusnaynaa in dhaqdhaqaaqa yaru uu ka sameyn karo qaylo iyo xanaaq aan la garanayn, sababtoo ah in aad u qallafsan tahay, waxay ka dhigi kartaa in ay ka miisaami karto calaamado kale. Si aan u gaarno iyo hoos u dhigno tababaradan, waxaynu u horumarinnaa dabool caadi ah oo ku saabsan dhibaatooyinka xaaladaha macluumaadka. Sida lagu sameeyo alaabta dagaalka ah oo ay soo saareen alaabta dhibaatada kala duduwan oo ay arkaan isla marka lagu jiro xaaladaha kala duduwan, Konstans wuxuu ku qiimeeyaa alaabta kaararka ah oo dahabka ah iyo sidoo kale wuxuu baraa fasax tusaalooyin cusub. Waxaynu muujinnaa in fasax ku bartay KonStance wuxuu soo bandhigaa saldhigyo kala duduwan si ay wax u sii sheegto xaalad siyaasadeed ah, isla markaasna qaababka turjumaadda ee midowga ayaa iftiimiya saamaynta ku saabsan xiliga.", 'sr': 'Ručne annotacije su predviđenje za mnoge aplikacije učenja mašine. Međutim, slabosti u samom procesu annotacije su lako pregledati. Posebno, naučnici često biraju kakve informacije daju annotatorima bez empiričkog pregledanja tih odluka. Za subjektivne zadatke poput analize sentimenta, sarkazma i otkrivanja stanja, takvi izbori mogu utjecati na rezultate. Ovde, za zadatak otkrivanja političkog stava na Twitter, pokazujemo da pružanje previše malo konteksta može rezultirati bukama i nesigurnim annotacijama, dok pružanje previše jakog konteksta može uzrokovati da preveže druge signale. Da bismo karakterizirali i smanjili te predrasude, razvijamo Konstansa, općeg model a razmišljanja o annotacijama u području informacija. S obzirom na sukobne etikete proizvode višestruki annotatori koji vide isti slučajevi sa različitim kontekstima, ConStance istovremeno procjenjuje zlatne standardne etikete i uči klasifikator za nove instance. Pokazujemo da klasifikator koji je naučio ConStance iznosi različite osnovne linije predviđajući političko stanje, dok su modeli interpretabilni parametri svjetlo na efekte svakog konteksta.', 'si': 'මනුස්සල ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණයක්. නමුත්, ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ දුර්වල් ප්\u200dරවේශනය තමයි පැහැදිලි වෙන්න ලේසියි. විශේෂයෙන්, විද්\u200dයාඥයෝ හැමවෙලාවෙම තොරතුරු තෝරාගන්නවා මේ තීර්ණාවක් අධික විශ්වාස කරන්න බැ විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය, සර්කාස්ම් සහ ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වගේ විශේෂ වැඩක් වගේ මෙතන, ට්විටර් වල රජාත්\u200dරික ස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා පොඩි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් විශ මේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ අඩු කරන්න, අපි ConStance විශ්වාස කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩේලයක් තොරතුරු ස්ථානයක විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සමග විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරපු ලේබල් වලින්, ConStance එක්කෙනෙක් සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ලේබ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොන්ස්ටැන්ස් වලින් ඉගෙන ගත්ත විශේෂකයා රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක ස්ථානයක් අනතුරු කරනවා කියලා, මොඩේල්ගේ අභිවාදකය', 'sv': 'Manuella anteckningar är en förutsättning för många tillämpningar av maskininlärning. Men svagheter i själva kommenteringsprocessen är lätta att förbise. Framför allt väljer forskare ofta vilken information som ska ges till kommentatorer utan att undersöka dessa beslut empiriskt. För subjektiva uppgifter som sentimentalanalys, sarkasm och inställning detektering kan sådana val påverka resultaten. För uppgiften att upptäcka politiska ståndpunkter på Twitter visar vi här att om du ger för lite sammanhang kan det leda till bullriga och osäkra kommentarer, medan om du ger ett alltför starkt sammanhang kan det leda till att det väger tyngre än andra signaler. För att karakterisera och minska dessa fördomar utvecklar vi ConStance, en allmän modell för resonemang kring anteckningar över informationsförhållanden. Med tanke på motstridiga etiketter som produceras av flera kommentatorer som ser samma instanser med olika sammanhang, uppskattar ConStance samtidigt guldstandardetiketter och lär sig även en klassificerare för nya instanser. Vi visar att den klassificerare som ConStance lärt sig överträffar en mängd olika baslinjer när det gäller att förutsäga politisk hållning, medan modellens tolkningsbara parametrar belyser effekterna av varje kontext.', 'ta': 'கைமுறை அறிவிப்பு இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பல பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு முன்னுரிமையாகும். ஆனால், அறிவிப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் பலஹீனம் தன்னை விட்டு விட எளிதாக இருக்கிறது. மாணவர் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சி, சுழற்சி மற்றும் நிலையான கண்டுபிடிப்பு போன்ற பொருள் பணிகளுக்கு, இவ்வாறு தேர்வுகள் முடிவுகள இங்கே நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மிகவும் சிறிய சூழல் வழங்குவது சப்தம் மற்றும் அறியாத குறிப்புகளை கொண்டு வரும், ஆனால் மிகவும் வலிமையான ஒரு சூழல்  இந்த பிரச்சினைகளை எழுத்து குறைக்க, நாம் கான்ஸ்டேன்ஸ், தகவல் நிலைமைகளைப் பற்றி குறைப்பிடும் பொது மாதிரியை உர பல அறிவிப்பாளர்களால் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ள குழப்பமான சிட்டைகளுக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அதே நிகழ்வுகளைப் பார்த்தால், கான்ஸ்டேன்ஸ் அதே நேரத்தில நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் கான்ஸ்டேன்ஸ் கற்ற வகுப்பாளர் பல்வேறு அடிப்படைகளை முன்னோடிக்கொண்டிருக்கிறது, மாதிரியின் விளக்கமான அளபுரு', 'ur': 'ماشین تعلیم کی بہت سی کاربرد کے لئے اپنا اظہار ہے۔ لیکن اظہار کے مطابق ضعیفوں کے ذریعے خود چھوڑنے کے لئے آسان ہیں۔ مخصوصاً علماء اکثر کس معلومات کا انتخاب کرتے ہیں کہ ان فیصلے کو مضبوط طور پر تحقیق نہ کریں۔ ایسے موجود کاموں کے لئے جیسے احساسات تحلیل، سارکاسم، اور موقعیت شناسایی، یہ انتخاب نتائج اثر سکتے ہیں. یہاں، ٹویٹر پر سیاسی موقعیت کا اظہار کرنا کے لئے، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ بہت کم موقعیت حاصل کرنے کے نتیجہ میں آواز اور غیر قطعی اظہار کا نتیجہ ہے، حالانکہ بہت قوی ایک موقعیت حاصل کرنے کے لئے اس کو دوسرے سیگنالوں سے زیادہ بو ہم نے ConStance کو معلوم کرنے اور کمزور کرنے کے لئے، معلومات شرایطوں کے بارے میں مطلع کرنے کے لئے ایک عمومی موڈل بنایا ہے. اور بہت سی اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ا ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کانسٹنس کے ذریعہ سے سیاسی موقعیت کی پیش بینی کے لئے کلاسپیر کی تعریف سے بہت مختلف بنسٹ لینوں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے، حالانکہ مدل کی تعریف قابل پارامتروں نے ہر کنٹنس کے اثرات پر روشنی کی۔', 'uz': "Name Lekin, tashkilotning jarayonini o'zgartirish oddiy narsalari. Hullas, o'quvchilar oddiy o'qituvchilarni o'zgarishga qanday maʼlumotni tanlangan va bu xabarlarni o'rganishni tasavvur qilmaydi. For subjective tasks such as sentiment analysis, sarcasm, and stance detection, such choices can impact results.  Bu yerda, xavfsiz stansiyalarni aniqlash vazifasi bilan biz buni ko'rsamiz, ma'anaviy tartib berish juda kichkina narsa va haqiqatgina tajriba qilishi mumkin, ammo juda katta tartib berish mumkin bu boshqa signallarni ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu tablarni tahrirlash va kamaytirish uchun KonStance, ma'lumot holatlari haqida tajriba qilish uchun umumiy modelni tugatamiz. Koʻproq taʼminlovchilar bilan bir nechta taʼminlovchi tugmalar yaratganda, Konstans bir xil holatlar bilan bir xil xususiyatlarni ko'rib turadi, va bu paytda gul standard lab yorlarni qiymaydi va yangi masalan uchun bir darajalikni o'rganadi. Biz KonStance o'rganilgan fasifiyatni ko'rsatganimiz, political stansiyasiga ko'pchilik asboblarni ko'rsatadi, va modelning turli parametrlari har bir xil muhit effektini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Ghi chú bằng tay là điều cần thiết cho nhiều ứng dụng của việc học máy. Tuy nhiên, sự yếu đuối trong quá trình ghi chú cũng dễ bỏ qua. Cụ thể, các học giả thường chọn thông tin gì để trao cho nhà biên học mà không kiểm tra các quyết định này bằng kinh nghiệm. Đối với các việc chủ quan như phân tích cảm xúc, châm biếm và phát hiện lập trường, các lựa chọn này có thể ảnh hưởng đến kết quả. Ở đây, với nhiệm vụ phát hiện lập trường chính trị trên Twitter, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng cung cấp quá ít ngữ cảnh có thể dẫn tới chú thích ồn ào và không chắc chắn, trong khi cung cấp một ngữ cảnh quá mạnh có thể làm cho nó vượt trội hơn các tín hiệu khác. Để mô tả và giảm các thói giả lập này, chúng tôi phát triển ConStance, một mô hình chung cho việc lập luận về biên bản thông tin. Dựa vào các chú thích xung đột sản xuất bởi nhiều nhà cầm các trường hợp giống nhau, ConStance đánh giá đồng thời các nhãn chuẩn vàng và cũng học một phân loại cho các trường hợp mới. Chúng tôi cho thấy người phân loại được kết luận bởi ConStance s ử dụng nhiều bản lề để dự đoán quan điểm chính trị, trong khi các thông số giải thích của mô-đun đã làm sáng tỏ tác động của mỗi ngữ cảnh.', 'bg': 'Ръчните анотации са предпоставка за много приложения на машинното обучение. Въпреки това слабостите в самия процес на анотация са лесни за пренебрегване. По-специално учените често избират каква информация да дадат на анотаторите, без да разглеждат тези решения емпирично. За субективни задачи като анализ на сентимента, сарказъм и откриване на позиции, такива избори могат да повлияят на резултатите. Тук, за задачата за откриване на политическа позиция в Туитър, ние показваме, че предоставянето на твърде малък контекст може да доведе до шумни и несигурни анотации, докато предоставянето на твърде силен контекст може да доведе до това, че той надвишава другите сигнали. За да характеризираме и намалим тези пристрастия, разработваме общ модел за разсъждаване на анотациите в условията на информацията. Предвид конфликтните етикети, произведени от множество анотатори, които виждат едни и същи екземпляри с различен контекст, едновременно оценява етикетите със златен стандарт и също така научава класификатор за нови екземпляри. Показваме, че класификаторът, научен от КонСтанс, превъзхожда различни базови линии при предвиждането на политическа позиция, докато интерпретираните параметри на модела хвърлят светлина върху ефектите на всеки контекст.', 'da': 'Manuelle noteringer er en forudsætning for mange anvendelser af maskinlæring. Men svagheder i selve annotationsprocessen er let at overse. Især vælger forskere ofte, hvilke oplysninger de skal give til kommentatorer uden at undersøge disse beslutninger empirisk. For subjektive opgaver som følelsesanalyse, sarkasme og holdningsdetektion kan sådanne valg påvirke resultaterne. Her viser vi til opgaven med at afsløre politiske holdninger på Twitter, at hvis der gives for lidt kontekst, kan det resultere i støjende og usikre noteringer, mens hvis der gives for stærk kontekst, kan det få den til at opveje andre signaler. For at karakterisere og reducere disse fordomme udvikler vi ConStance, en generel model til ræsonnement om annotationer på tværs af informationsforhold. I betragtning af modstridende etiketter produceret af flere kommentatorer, der ser de samme forekomster med forskellige sammenhænge, vurderer ConStance samtidig guldstandardetiketter og lærer også en klassificering for nye forekomster. Vi viser, at den klassificering, ConStance har lært, overgår en række basislinjer, når det gælder at forudsige politisk holdning, mens modellens fortolkelige parametre kaster lys over virkningerne af hver kontekst.', 'nl': 'Handmatige annotaties zijn een vereiste voor veel toepassingen van machine learning. De zwakke punten in het annotatieproces zelf zijn echter gemakkelijk over het hoofd te zien. In het bijzonder kiezen wetenschappers vaak welke informatie ze moeten geven aan annotatoren zonder deze beslissingen empirisch te onderzoeken. Voor subjectieve taken zoals sentimentanalyse, sarcasme en standdetectie kunnen dergelijke keuzes de resultaten beïnvloeden. Voor het opsporen van politieke standpunten op Twitter laten we hier zien dat te weinig context kan leiden tot luidruchtige en onzekere annotaties, terwijl een te sterke context ervoor kan zorgen dat deze zwaarder wegen dan andere signalen. Om deze vooroordelen te karakteriseren en te verminderen, ontwikkelen we ConStance, een algemeen model voor redeneren over annotaties in informatiecondities. Gezien conflicterende labels geproduceerd door meerdere annotatoren die dezelfde instanties met verschillende contexten zien, schat ConStance tegelijkertijd gouden standaardlabels in en leert ook een classificator voor nieuwe instanties. We laten zien dat de classificator die ConStance heeft geleerd beter presteert dan verschillende basislijnen bij het voorspellen van politieke standpunten, terwijl de interpreteerbare parameters van het model licht werpen op de effecten van elke context.', 'hr': 'Ručne annotacije su predviđenje za mnoge primjene učenja strojeva. Međutim, slabosti u procesu oznake su lako pregledati. Posebno, učenici često biraju koje informacije daju annotatorima bez empiričkog pregledanja tih odluka. Za subjektivne zadatke poput analize osjećaja, sarkazma i otkrivanja stanja, takvi izbori mogu utjecati na rezultate. Ovdje, za zadatak otkrivanja političkog stava na Twitteru, pokazujemo da pružanje previše malo konteksta može rezultirati bukovim i nesvjesnim annotacijama, dok pružanje previše jakog konteksta može uzrokovati pretežak drugih signala. Da bi karakterizirali i smanjili te predrasude, razvijamo ConStance, općeg model a razmišljanja o annotacijama u području informacija. S obzirom na sukobne etikete proizvođene od višestrukih annotatora koji su vidjeli isti slučajevi s različitim kontekstima, ConStance istovremeno procjenjuje zlatne standardne etikete i uči klasifikator za nove slučajeve. Pokazujemo da klasifikator koji je naučio ConStance iznosi različite osnovne linije u predviđanju političkog stava, dok su modelovi parametri koji su interpretirali svjetlo na učinak svakog konteksta.', 'de': 'Manuelle Anmerkungen sind Voraussetzung für viele Anwendungen des maschinellen Lernens. Schwachstellen im Annotationsprozess selbst sind jedoch leicht zu übersehen. Insbesondere wählen Wissenschaftler oft, welche Informationen sie Annotatoren geben sollen, ohne diese Entscheidungen empirisch zu untersuchen. Für subjektive Aufgaben wie Stimmungsanalyse, Sarkasmus und Haltungserkennung können solche Entscheidungen Auswirkungen auf die Ergebnisse haben. Für die Aufgabe der politischen Positionserkennung auf Twitter zeigen wir hier, dass zu wenig Kontext zu lauten und unsicheren Anmerkungen führen kann, während ein zu starker Kontext dazu führen kann, dass er andere Signale überwiegt. Um diese Verzerrungen zu charakterisieren und zu reduzieren, entwickeln wir ConStance, ein allgemeines Modell zur Begründung von Annotationen über Informationsbedingungen hinweg. Angesichts widersprüchlicher Beschriftungen, die von mehreren Annotatoren erzeugt werden, die dieselben Instanzen mit unterschiedlichen Kontexten sehen, schätzt ConStance gleichzeitig Gold-Standard-Beschriftungen und lernt auch einen Klassifikator für neue Instanzen. Wir zeigen, dass der von ConStance erlernte Klassifikator eine Vielzahl von Basislinien bei der Vorhersage politischer Positionen übertrifft, während die interpretierbaren Parameter des Modells Licht auf die Auswirkungen jedes Kontextes werfen.', 'id': 'Anotasi manual adalah syarat-syarat untuk banyak aplikasi belajar mesin. Namun, kelemahan dalam proses anotasi sendiri mudah diabaikan. Terutama, para ilmuwan sering memilih informasi apa yang harus diberikan kepada anotator tanpa memeriksa keputusan ini secara empiris. Untuk tugas subyektif seperti analisis perasaan, sarkasme, dan deteksi posisi, pilihan tersebut dapat mempengaruhi hasil. Di sini, untuk tugas deteksi posisi politik di Twitter, kami menunjukkan bahwa menyediakan konteks terlalu sedikit dapat menghasilkan anotasi yang berisik dan tidak pasti, sementara menyediakan konteks yang terlalu kuat dapat menyebabkannya melebihi sinyal lain. Untuk mengkaraterisasi dan mengurangi biases ini, kami mengembangkan ConStance, model umum untuk alasan tentang anotasi melalui kondisi informasi. Mengingat label konflik yang diproduksi oleh beberapa annotator melihat kejadian yang sama dengan konteks yang berbeda, ConStance secara bersamaan memperkirakan label standar emas dan juga belajar klasifikasi untuk kejadian baru. Kami menunjukkan bahwa klasifikasi yang belajar oleh ConStance melampaui berbagai garis dasar dalam memprediksi posisi politik, sementara parameter yang dapat diterjemahkan model memberikan cahaya pada efek setiap konteks.', 'ko': '수공 표시는 기계 학습의 많은 응용을 위한 선결 조건이다.그러나 주석 과정 자체의 약점은 무시되기 쉽다.특히 학자들은 주석자에게 어떤 정보를 제공할지 선택하지만 이런 결정에 대해 실증 연구를 하지 않는다.정서 분석, 풍자, 자세 측정 등 주관적인 임무에 대해 이런 선택은 결과에 영향을 미칠 수 있다.여기서 트위터의 정치적 입장 검출 임무에 대해 우리는 너무 적은 상하문을 제공하면 시끄럽고 불확실한 주석을 초래할 수 있고, 너무 강한 상하문을 제공하면 다른 신호를 초과할 수 있다고 밝혔다.이러한 편견을 묘사하고 줄이기 위해 ConStance를 개발했는데 이것은 정보 조건을 뛰어넘어 주석을 추리하는 데 사용되는 유니버설 모델이다.여러 주석자가 서로 다른 상하문에서 같은 실례를 볼 때 발생하는 충돌 라벨을 고려하여 ConStance는 동시에 금 표준 라벨을 추정하고 새로운 실례의 분류기를 배운다.우리는 콘스탄트 학습의 분류기가 정치적 입장을 예측하는 데 있어서 각종 기선보다 낫고 모델의 해석 가능한 매개 변수는 각 언어 환경의 영향을 보여주는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Manual annotations are a prerequisite for many applications of machine learning.  Hata hivyo, udhaifu katika mchakato wa matatizo yenyewe ni rahisi kuyasamehe. Kwa hakika, wanazuoni mara nyingi wanachagua taarifa za kuwapa wachochezi bila kuchunguza maamuzi haya kwa makini. Kwa kazi za mada kama uchambuzi wa hisia, kejeli na utambuzi wa msimamo, chaguo kama hizi zinaweza athiri matokeo. Hapa, kwa jukumu la kutambua msimamo wa kisiasa kwenye mtandao wa Twita, tunaonyesha kwamba kutoa mazingira machache yanaweza kusababisha kelele na matatizo yasiyo na uhakika, wakati kutoa muktadha wa nguvu unaweza kusababisha kuongezeka kwa ishara nyingine. Ili kuweka sifa na kupunguza upendeleo huu, tunaendelea KonStance, mtindo wa jumla wa kujadili hali mbaya ya taarifa. Kutokana na mabango ya migogoro yaliyotengenezwa na wataalamu kadhaa wakiona matukio hayo yanayofanana na mikutano tofauti, Konstance inakadiria alama za dhahabu pamoja na pia hujifunza sifa kwa matukio mapya. Tunaonyesha kwamba mwandishi aliyejifunza na ConStance anaonyesha misingi mbalimbali katika kutabiri msimamo wa kisiasa, wakati vipimo vya tafsiri vinavyotafsiriwa vimeangaza madhara ya kila muktadha.', 'fa': 'اظهار دستی برای تعلیم بسیاری از کاربردهای دستگاه پیش\u200cنیاز است. با این حال، ضعیفی در فرایند اظهار کردن خودش آسان است. مخصوصا، دانشمندان اغلب از آنچه اطلاعات را به ناراحتکنندگان بدون تحقیق این تصمیمات به صورت امپراتوری انتخاب می کنند. برای وظیفه\u200cهای موجود مثل تحلیل احساسات، سارکاسم و شناسایی وضعیت، این انتخاب\u200cها می\u200cتوانند نتیجه\u200cها را تأثیر دهند. در اینجا، برای کشف موقعیت سیاسی در توئیتر نشان می دهیم که موقعیت زیادی کوچک می تواند به اخطار صدا و غیرمطمئنی نتیجه دهد، در حالی که پیشنهاد یک موقعیت زیادی قوی می تواند باعث شود که آن را به وزن دیگر سیگنالها بزرگتر کند. برای تعریف و کاهش این پیشرفت\u200cها، ما یک مدل عمومی برای توضیح در مورد توضیح\u200cها در شرایط اطلاعات توسعه می\u200cکنیم. با توجه به برچسب\u200cهای مخالفت توسط چندین آهنگ\u200cکننده\u200cها تولید شده\u200cاند که همان موقعیت\u200cها با موقعیت\u200cهای مختلف می\u200cبینند، ConStance همزمان برچسب\u200cهای استاندارد طلا را ارزیابی می\u200cکند و همچنین یک برچسب\u200cکننده برای موقعیت\u200cهای ما نشان می دهیم که راهنمایی که توسط کنستنس یاد گرفته\u200cاند، مختلف خط\u200cهای بنیادی را در پیش\u200cبینی موقعیت سیاسی انجام می\u200cدهد، در حالی که پارامترهای قابل تعبیر مدل روشنی بر اثرات هر موقعیت می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': "Anotacionet manuale janë një parakusht për shumë aplikime të mësimit të makinave. Megjithatë, dobësitë në vetë procesin e anotacionit janë të lehta të harrohen. Në veçanti, shkencëtarët shpesh zgjedhin çfarë informacioni t'u japin anotatorëve pa shqyrtuar këto vendime empirikisht. Për detyra subjektive të tilla si analiza e ndjenjave, sarkazmi dhe zbulimi i qëndrimeve, zgjedhjet e tilla mund të ndikojnë në rezultate. Këtu, për detyrën e zbulimit të qëndrimeve politike në Twitter, ne tregojmë se ofrimi i kontekstit të vogël mund të rezultojë në anotacione zhurmëshme dhe të pasigurta, ndërsa ofrimi i një konteksti të fortë mund të shkaktojë atë të kalojë sinjale të tjerë. Për të karakterizuar dhe reduktuar këto paragjykime, ne zhvillojmë ConStance, një model i përgjithshëm për arsyetimin rreth anotacioneve nëpër kushtet e informacionit. Duke pasur parasysh etiketat konfliktuese të prodhuara nga shumë anotatorë që shohin të njëjtat raste me kontekste të ndryshme, ConStance përllogarit njëkohësisht etiketat e standardeve të artë dhe mëson gjithashtu një klasifikues për raste të reja. Ne tregojmë se klasifikuesi i mësuar nga ConStance kryeson një shumicë linjash bazë në parashikimin e qëndrimit politik, ndërsa parametrat e interpretueshëm të modelit ndriçojnë efektet e çdo konteksti.", 'am': 'በዕቅድ ማስታወቂያው በብዙ የሜክስሎችን ፕሮግራሞች መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የደካማው ድካም ራሱ ሊተወው ቀላል ነው፡፡ በተለይም ተማሪዎቹ ብዙ ጊዜ እነዚህን ፍርድ በጥቅምት ሳይመረምሩ የሚሰጡትን መረጃ ይመርጣሉ፡፡ እንደነዚህ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች ፍሬዎችን ያካክሉ ዘንድ የሚችሉትን አካባቢ ስርዓት፣ ስርቆስ እና ጥረት ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ወደዚህ፣ ለፖለቲካ ሁኔታ ለማግኘት ስራ በትዊተር ላይ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ የጥቂት ጉዳይ ማሰናከል ድምፅ እና የማይታወቅ ድምፅ እንዲያገኛል፡፡ እነዚህን ሁኔታዎችን ለማስተካከል እና ለማጎድል፣ መረጃ አካባቢዎች ላይ የሚያስጨንቁበትን የኮንስቴንስ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአንድ ሁኔታ በተለያዩ ሁኔታዎች ላይ የተደረገው የግጭት ምልክቶች በተደረገ ጊዜ፣ ኮንስቴንስ በአንድ ሰዓት የወርቅ የአድራሻ ምልክቶች ይቆጥራል፡፡ በኮንስቴንስ የተማረ ክፍላፊው የፖለቲካ ሁኔታ ለመቀበል የፖለቲካ ሁኔታ ላይ የተለያየ መሠረቶች እንዲያሳየው እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'tr': "El ýagşyrymlar maşyny öwrenmek üçin birnäçe guram taýýarlanmasydir. Ýöne, ýazgyt prosesindeki zayıflatlyklar özini boýun gaýtalamak aňsat. Adatça, bilim adamlar köplenç bu kararyny empirik bilen maslahat etmeýän tatorlara nähili maglumatlary bermelidigini saýlaýarlar. Duýgular analyzasy, kynçylyk we gorkunç tanyşy ýaly subjektiv zadalar üçin şeýle bir seçenekler netijelere täsirleýär. Bu ýerde, Twitter'da syýasy taýýarlaryň esasy üçin örän kiçi bir kontekst üýtgetmek üçin gürrüň we kesinliksiz duýdurmalaryň netijesi bolup biler diýip görkezilýäris. Bir näçe güýçli bir kontekst üýtgetmek üçin muny başga işaretlerden çykaryp biler. Bu biaslaryň karakterifikasyny we azaltmak üçin, biz ConStans'i, informasiýa şertleri bilen duýdurmak üçin umumy nusgasyny çykarýarys. Çoklu sözleşici tarafından üretilen mücadele etiketlere görä, Konstans aynı durumları farklı durumlar ile değerlendirir ve yeni örnekler için klasifikatörü öğrenir. Biz Konstans tarapyndan öwrenen klassifikanyň syýasy durumyny öňünde näçe topar çyzygyny ýok edip bilýäris we nusgalaryň her kontekstyň etkisine ýagtylygy ýok edip bilýäris.", 'af': "Hand notasies is 'n voorspoediging vir baie toepassings van masjien leer. Maar swakhede in die annotasie proses self is maklik om te oorskou. Spesifieke, onderwysers kies dikwels wat inligting aan annotators moet gee sonder om hierdie besluite empiries te ondersoek. Vir subjektiewe opdragte soos sentimentanalisie, sarkasme en staatsopdekking, sodanige keuses kan effekteer resultate. Hier, vir die opdrag van politieke staatsonderskrywing op Twitter, wys ons dat die verskaffing te klein konteks kan resultaat in geluid en onverseker notasies, terwyl die verskaffing te sterk 'n konteks kan veroorsaak dat dit te klein konteks kan oorweeg ander signale. Om hierdie voorspoedies te karakteriseer en te verminder, ontwikkel ons ConStance, 'n algemene model vir redening oor annotasies oor inligting voorwaardes. Gien verskillende etikette wat deur veelvuldige annotators geproduseer word, sien dieselfde voorbeelde voorbeelde met verskillende kontekste, ConStance bereken altyd goud standaard etikette en leer ook 'n klassifiseerder vir nuwe voorbeelde. Ons wys dat die klassifiseerder wat deur ConStance geleer het, uitvoer 'n verskillende basisline by die voorskou van politieke staatskap, terwyl die model se uittelbare parameters lig op die effekte van elke konteks gesluit het.", 'az': "Əlavələr maşın öyrənməsinin çoxlu uyğulamalarının əvvəlcə müəyyən edilməsidir. Halbuki, təkrarlama sürətində zəiflik özünün təkrarlanması kolaydır. Özellikle, bilim adamları bu kararları imkansız olaraq nəyə məlumat vermək istəyirlər. Duyarlıq analizi, sarkasm və mövzuların keşfetməsi kimi subjektiv işlər üçün, bu seçimlər sonuçlarına təsir edə bilər. Burada, Twitter'da siyasi durumların keşfetməsi üçün, çox az bir məlumat verilənlərin səs və təhlükəsizlərin sonuçlarını göstərdik. Halbuki çox güclü bir məlumat verilənlərin başqa sinyallərin a ğırlığını artırabilir. Bu tədbirləri tanımlamaq və azaltmaq üçün, ConStance, məlumat şartları arasında danışmaq üçün genel modeli tədbirləşdiririk. Bir çox annotator tarafından ürəkləndirilən müxtəlif etiketlərə görə, ConStance bir-birinə altın standart etiketlərini təmin edir və yeni nöqtələr üçün klasifikatoru öyrənir. Biz KonStance tərəfindən öyrəndiyi klasifikatçının siyasi mövzunun tədbir edilməsi üçün müxtəlif tədbir s əhifələrindən daha çox yüksək olduğunu göstəririk. Modelin təfsil edilebilir parametrləri hər tərəflərin təsirlərinə ışıq göstərir.", 'bn': 'মেশিন শিক্ষা প্রাপ্ত অনেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য নিয়মিত বিষয়গুলো প্রযোজনীয়। যাইহোক, এই বিষয়টির দুর্বলতা নিজেই উপেক্ষা করা সহজ। বিশেষ করে শিক্ষার্থীরা প্রায়শই এই সিদ্ধান্তের পরীক্ষা ছাড়া কি তথ্য প্রদান করে তাদের কাছে প্রদান করার জন্ বিশেষ কাজের জন্য যেমন মন মনোভাব বিশ্লেষণ, বিদ্রোহ এবং স্থায়ী আবিষ্কারের জন্য, এই ধরনের পছন্দের ফলাফল প্রভাব ফেলতে পারে। Here, for the task of political stance detection on Twitter, we show that providing too little context can result in noisy and uncertain annotations, whereas providing too strong a context may cause it to outweigh other signals.  এই বৈষম্যগুলোকে চরিত্রান্ত এবং কমানোর জন্য, আমরা কনস্ট্যান্সের একটি সাধারণ মডেল উন্নয়ন করি, যা তথ্যের বিষয়গুলোর বিষয় বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতার সাথে একই ধরনের ঘটনা দেখে বেশ কিছু বিভিন্ন সংঘর্ষের লেবেল তৈরি করা হয়েছে, কনস্ট্যান্স একই সাথে সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার্ড লেব আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কনস্ট্যান্সের শিক্ষাপনকারীরা রাজনৈতিক অবস্থান ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে প্রকাশ করেছে, আর মডেলের ব্', 'hy': 'Ձեռքի annoտացիաները մեքենային ուսումնասիրության շատ ծրագրերի նախապայման են: Այնուամենայնիվ, annoտացիայի գործընթացի թույլատրությունները հեշտ է անտեսել: Հատկապես, գիտնականները հաճախ ընտրում են, թե ինչ ինֆորմացիա պետք է տան annoտորներին առանց այս որոշումները էմպրիկապես ուսումնասիրելու: Սubյեկտիվ առաջադրանքների, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը, սարկազմը և դիրքի հայտնաբերումը, նման ընտրությունները կարող են ազդել արդյունքներին: Այստեղ, Թվիթերի քաղաքական դիրքի հայտնաբերման խնդրի համար, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ չափազանց քիչ կոնտեքստ տրամադրելը կարող է հանգեցնել աղմկոտ և անորոշ նշումների, մինչդեռ չափազանց ուժեղ կոնտեքստ տրամադրելը կարող է ստիպել, որ այն Այս կողմնականությունները բնորոշելու և նվազեցնելու համար մենք զարգացնում ենք ConSTANCE-ը, մի ընդհանուր մոդել, որը օգտագործում է տեղեկատվական պայմաններում գտնվող մոտեցումների մասին մտածելու համար: Քանի որ բազմաթիվ նոտատորների կողմից ստեղծված հակամարտություն ունեցող պիտակները տեսնում են նույն դեպքերը տարբեր կոնտեքստներով, ConSTANCE միաժամանակ գնահատում է ոսկու ստանդարտ պիտակները և նաև սովորում է դասակարգում նոր դեպքերի համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ԿոնՍթենսի կողմից սովորված դասակարգիչը գերազանցում է քաղաքական դիրքի կանխատեսման բազմաթիվ հիմքերը, մինչդեռ մոդելի մեկնաբանելի պարամետրերը լուսավորում են յուրաքանչյուր կոնտեքստի ազդեցությունները:', 'ca': "Manual annotations are a prerequisite for many applications of machine learning.  Però les debilitats del procés d'anotació són fàcils de ignorar. En particular, els estudiants sovint escollen quina informació donar als anotators sense examinar aquestes decisions empíricament. Per a tasques subjectives com l'anàlisi del sentiment, el sarcasme i la detecció de posicions, aquestes opcions poden influir en els resultats. Aquí, per la tasca de la detecció de posicions polítiques a Twitter, demostram que proporcionar massa poc context pot resultar en anotacions sorolloses i incertes, mentre proporcionar un context massa fort pot fer que superi altres senyals. Per caracteritzar i reduir aquests prejudicis, desenvolupem ConStance, un model general de raonament sobre anotacions en condicions d'informació. Tenint en compte les etiquetes conflictes produïdes per múltiples anotators que veuen les mateixes instances amb diferents contextos, ConStance estima simultàneament les etiquetes d'or standard i també aprene un classificador per noves instances. Mostrem que el classificador aprengut per ConStance supera una varietat de línies de base en predir la posició política, mentre que els paràmetres interpretable s del model brillen sobre els efectes de cada context.", 'cs': 'Manuální anotace jsou předpokladem pro mnoho aplikací strojového učení. Nicméně slabé stránky v samotném anotaci lze snadno přehlédnout. Zejména vědci často volí, jaké informace mají dát anotátorům, aniž by tyto rozhodnutí empiricky zkoumali. U subjektivních úkolů, jako je analýza sentimentů, sarkasmus a detekce postojů, mohou tyto volby ovlivnit výsledky. Zde ukazujeme, že poskytnutí příliš malého kontextu může vést k hlučným a nejistým anotacím, zatímco poskytnutí příliš silného kontextu může způsobit, že převažuje ostatní signály. Abychom tyto předsudky charakterizovali a snížili, vyvinuli jsme ConStance, obecný model pro uvažování o anotacích napříč informačními podmínkami. Vzhledem k konfliktním štítkům vytvořeným několika anotátory, které vidí stejné instance v různých kontextech, ConStance současně odhaduje zlaté standardní štítky a také se učí klasifikátor pro nové instance. Ukazujeme, že klasifikátor naučený ConStancem překonává různé základní linie při předpovídání politického postoje, zatímco interpretovatelné parametry modelu vrhají světlo na účinky jednotlivých kontextů.', 'bs': 'Ručne annotacije su predviđenje za mnoge aplikacije učenja strojeva. Međutim, slabosti u procesu oznake su lako pregledati. Posebno, naučnici često biraju kakve informacije daju annotatorima bez empiričkog pregledanja tih odluka. Za subjektivne zadatke poput analize osjećaja, sarkazma i otkrivanja stanja, takvi izbori mogu utjecati na rezultate. Ovdje, za zadatak otkrivanja političkog stava na Twitter, pokazujemo da pružanje previše malo konteksta može rezultirati buknim i neodređenim annotacijama, dok pružanje previše jakog konteksta može uzrokovati da preteži druge signale. Da bi karakterizirali i smanjili te predrasude, razvijamo ConStance, općeg model a razmišljanja o annotacijama u području informacija. S obzirom na sukobne etikete proizvođene od višestrukih annotatora koji vide isti slučajevi sa različitim kontekstima, ConStance istovremeno procjenjuje zlatne standardne etikete i uči klasifikator za nove slučajeve. Pokazujemo da klasifikator koji je naučio ConStance iznosi različite osnovne linije u predviđanju političkog stava, dok su modelovi parametri koji su interpretirali svjetlo na efekte svakog konteksta.', 'et': "Manuaalsed märkused on masinõppe paljude rakenduste eeltingimuseks. Kuid märgistusprotsessi nõrkusi on lihtne unustada. Eelkõige valivad teadlased sageli, millist teavet anda annotatoritele, uurimata neid otsuseid empiiriliselt. Subjektiivsete ülesannete puhul, nagu sentimentaalüüs, sarkasm ja hoiaku tuvastamine, võivad sellised valikud tulemusi mõjutada. Siinkohal näitame poliitilise seisukoha tuvastamise ülesandeks Twitteris, et liiga vähe konteksti võib põhjustada mürakaid ja ebakindlaid märkmeid, samas kui liiga tugeva konteksti pakkumine võib põhjustada selle kaalumist üles teiste signaalide. Nende eelarvamuste iseloomustamiseks ja vähendamiseks töötame välja ConStance, üldise mudeli, mille abil arutleda annotatsioone infotingimustes. Arvestades vastuolulisi silte, mille tekitavad mitmed annotaatorid, kes näevad samu eksemplare erinevate kontekstidega, hindab ConStance samaaegselt kuldstandardi silte ja õpib ka uute eksemplaride klassifitseerijat. Näitame, et ConStance'i poolt õppitud klassifitseerija on poliitilise seisukoha prognoosimisel üle erinevate lähtejoonte, samas kui mudeli tõlgendatavad parameetrid valgustavad iga konteksti mõju.", 'fi': 'Manuaaliset merkinnät ovat edellytys monille koneoppimisen sovelluksille. Huomautusprosessin heikkoudet on kuitenkin helppo unohtaa. Erityisesti tutkijat valitsevat usein, mitä tietoja antaa huomautuksille tutkimatta näitä päätöksiä empiirisesti. Subjektiivisissa tehtävissä, kuten tunteiden analysoinnissa, sarkasmissa ja asennon havaitsemisessa, tällaiset valinnat voivat vaikuttaa tuloksiin. Tässä yhteydessä osoitamme, että liian vähän kontekstia voi aiheuttaa meluisia ja epävarmoja huomautuksia, kun taas liian vahvan kontekstin tarjoaminen voi aiheuttaa muita signaaleja suuremman painoarvon. Näiden vääristymien karakterisoimiseksi ja vähentämiseksi kehitämme ConStance-mallin, joka on yleinen malli huomautusten päättelyyn tietoolosuhteissa. Koska useat selittäjät ovat tuottaneet ristiriitaisia tunnisteita, jotka näkevät samat esiintymät eri konteksteissa, ConStance arvioi samanaikaisesti kultaisia standardeja ja oppii myös luokittelijan uusille esiintymille. Osoitamme, että ConStancen oppima luokittelija ylittää erilaiset lähtökohdat poliittisen kannan ennustamisessa, kun taas mallin tulkittavat parametrit valaisevat kunkin kontekstin vaikutuksia.', 'jv': 'yes Nanging, kaleh-kaleh kapan ning pancene kuwi susah-susahe Juara-Juara, awak-awak dhéwé ngerasakno piye informasi kanggo nyelaraké lan nganggo mulasakno kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perbudhakan sing dikarepaké duwé, sarkasmo lan ngono cah-malah sing beraksi kuwi, ngono cah-cah sing bisa nguasahan seneng dadi. Saiki, nggawe nggawe sistem politik kang dipunasaben Google, awak dhéwé ngomong nik akeh kontinus sing apik dhéwé kuwi kapan kanggo nganggo cah-cah dumadhi lan ora kejahatan, merakake sing nyimpen kontinus sing apik dhéwé, iso nggawe isih beraksi sing gak dhéwé. Ngawe kang cara-cara ngono kuwi biasane iki, kita disebarke KonSTAnce, model model genel kanggo bisalahan seneng cara-seneng pisan mulasar perasaan informasi. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo condense seneng nggawe barang pengguna sampek karang langkung sampek winih kanggo ngerasakno politik, sampek modèl karo perusahaan parameters sing bisa nguasakno ngono sak kontèks.', 'sk': 'Ročne opombe so predpogoj za številne aplikacije strojnega učenja. Vendar pa je slabosti v samem postopku označevanja enostavno spregledati. Zlasti znanstveniki pogosto izberejo, katere informacije bodo dali označevalcem, ne da bi jih empirično preučili. Pri subjektivnih opravilih, kot so analiza čustva, sarkazem in zaznavanje položaja, lahko takšne izbire vplivajo na rezultate. V zvezi z nalogo zaznavanja politične stališče na Twitterju kažemo, da lahko premalo konteksta povzroči hrupne in negotove opombe, medtem ko lahko zagotavljanje premočnega konteksta povzroči, da ta prevlada nad drugimi signali. Za karakterizacijo in zmanjšanje teh pristranskosti razvijamo ConStance, splošni model razmišljanja o opombah v informacijskih pogojih. Glede na nasprotujoče si oznake, ki jih proizvaja več opozorilcev, ki vidijo iste primere z različnimi konteksti, ConStance hkrati ocenjuje oznake zlatih standardov in se nauči tudi klasifikatorja za nove primerke. Pokazali smo, da klasifikator, ki ga je naučil ConStance, presega različne osnovne linije pri napovedovanju politične stališče, medtem ko razložljivi parametri modela osvetljujejo učinke vsakega konteksta.', 'he': 'Manual annotations are a prerequisite for many applications of machine learning.  עם זאת, חולשות בתהליך הערות עצמה קלות להתעלם. במיוחד, מדענים לעתים קרובות בוחרים איזה מידע לתת למכתבים מבלי לבדוק את ההחלטות האלה באמפריות. עבור משימות סוביקטיביות כמו ניתוח רגשות, סרקזם, וגילוי עמדה, בחירות כאלה יכולות להשפיע על תוצאות. כאן, עבור המשימה של גילוי עמדה פוליטית בטוויטר, אנחנו מראים שהאספקת קשר קטן מדי יכולה לגרום להציעות רעשות ולא בטוחות, בזמן שהאספקת קשר חזק מדי יכולה לגרום לו להתגבר על סימנים אחרים. כדי לתייצב ולפחות את ההתמחות האלה, אנחנו מפתחים קונסטנס, מודל כללי להסביר על הערות בתנאי מידע. בהתחשב בתוויות מתנגדות שנוצרות על ידי מספר ציונים שרואים אותם מקרים עם קשרים שונים, קונסטנס באותו הזמן מעריכה תוויות סטנדרטיות זהב וגם לומד מסווג למקרים חדשים. אנו מראים שהקלאסיפר שלמד על ידי קונסטנס מוביל מגוון של קווים בסיסיים בחזוי עמדה פוליטית, בעוד הפרמטרים הנפשרים של המודל משפיעים אור על השפעות של כל הקשר.', 'ha': "Ka buga sunana da hannun dãma don ya ƙayyade wa shiryoyin ayuka masu ƙaranci. A lokacin da, maras rauni a cikin jarrabin zartar da shi yana da sauƙi da za'a sami. Kuma a cikin ƙayyade, masu sani ko da yawa suke zãɓi yanda information za su bai wa matalauta ba idan an hakaƙa waɗannan karkacin da ake ba. Ko cikin aikin masu da ƙanƙanci kamar anayyar hisia, sarki da kuma canza kwanza, zaɓallin wannan zaɓen za'a shagala matsalar. Hali, zuwa ga aikin shaidar a kisa, munã nuna cewa ga gajiya muhimmada kaɗan zai iya ƙara ga haske da haske da ba'a sani ba, kuma a sami muhimmada mai ƙarfi yana iya ƙaranci sauti na dabam. To, dõmin ka ƙayyade, kuma ka ƙara wa waɗannan taƙaitãwa, muna developer ConStance, wata misali mai girma wa ka yi jãyayya a kan cũtarwa a kan muhimmai. Gida aka samar da alama masu husũma da wasu matalauta masu yawa sunã ganin misãlai masu daidai, Konstance yana ƙaddara alama na zĩnãriya a lokacin da aka ƙidida shi, kuma yana sami wani mai rarraba wa misãlai na daban. Tuna nuna cewa mai fassara da ConStance na samar da wasu bakwai masu bastarwa a kan birnin hayan kisa, kuma a lokacin da misalin misalin misãlai ke fassarar haske kan mai amfani da kõwane muhalli.", 'bo': "ལག་བཟོས་གྱི་སྙན་སྲིད་དག་ནི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དུས་ཚོད་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་གི་ཞན་པོ་དག་དེ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གསལ་བལྟ་ཞིག་མིན་པ་རེད། དབྱེ་རིག་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནས་སྙན་སྣོད་པ་ཚོར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ག་རེ་བ་ཞིག་གདམ་པ་ཡིན། སེམས་ཚོར་ལུགས་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་པའི་བྱ་བ་དག་བརྗོད་པར། ཐད་ཚོར་བ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་ཐབས་བྱས་ཏེ། འདིར་ཌིས་ཌིས་ཌིར་གྱི་ཆབ་སྲིད་གནས་སྟངས་རྟོགས་པའི་ལས་འགན་ནི། ང་ཚོས་ཁ་ཡུལ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཉར་མེད་པའི་སྟོ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གདོང་རིས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ཚད་དམའ་རུ་གཏོང་དགོས་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་མེ Given conflicting labels produced by multiple annotators seeing the same instances with different contexts, ConStance simultaneously estimates gold standard labels and also learns a classifier for new instances. We show that the classifier learned by ConStance outperforms a variety of baselines at predicting political stance, while the model's interpretable parameters shed light on the effects of each context."}
{'en': 'Deeper Attention to Abusive User Content Moderation', 'ar': 'اهتمام أعمق بالإشراف على محتوى المستخدم المسيء', 'es': 'Mayor atención a la moderación de contenido de usuario abusivo', 'fr': 'Attention accrue à la modération abusive du contenu utilisateur', 'pt': 'Atenção mais profunda à moderação de conteúdo abusivo do usuário', 'ja': '不正なユーザーコンテンツのモデレーションへのより深い注意', 'zh': '更深注滥用用户理', 'hi': 'अपमानजनक उपयोगकर्ता सामग्री मॉडरेशन के लिए गहरा ध्यान', 'ru': 'Более глубокое внимание к оскорбительному модерированию пользовательского контента', 'ga': 'Aird Níos doimhne ar Mhodhnóireacht Ábhair Úsáideoirí Mhú-úsáide', 'ka': 'უფრო ძალიან დარწმუნება მომხმარებელი მოდულის მოდირებაზე', 'el': 'Βαθύτερη προσοχή στη μετριοπάθεια καταχρηστικού περιεχομένου χρήστη', 'hu': 'Mélyebb figyelem a visszaélő felhasználói tartalom moderálására', 'it': 'Approfondita attenzione alla moderazione abusiva dei contenuti degli utenti', 'kk': 'Пайдаланушының мазмұнын өзгерту үшін тұрақтығы', 'lt': 'Didesnis dėmesys piktnaudžiaujančio vartotojo turinio moderacijai', 'mt': 'Attenzjoni aktar profonda għall-Moderazzjoni tal-Kontenut Abużiv tal-Utent', 'mk': 'Подлабоко внимание на модерација на злоупотребната содржина на корисникот', 'ms': 'Perhatian Dalam Moderasi Kandungan Pengguna Abusif', 'ml': 'അബുസിവ് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഉള്ളടക്കം', 'pl': 'Głębsza uwaga na nadużywanie treści użytkownika', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн дунд суурь хэмжээсүүдийг илүү гүнзгий анхаарал', 'sr': 'Dublje pažnje na moderaciju zaštite korisnika', 'si': 'භාවිත පාවිච්චි සම්බන්ධතාවට ගොඩක් අවධානය', 'ro': 'Atenție profundă la moderarea conținutului abuziv al utilizatorilor', 'no': 'Dørgare merking på Abusive User Content Moderation', 'ur': 'زیادہ اظہار کارساز منزل موڈریس کے لئے', 'so': 'Deep Attention to Abusive User Content Moderation', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கவனிப்பு', 'sv': 'Djupare uppmärksamhet på missbruk av användarinnehåll Moderering', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chú ý cẩn thận giúp đỡ nội dung của người dùng', 'hr': 'Dublje pažnje na moderaciju zaštite korisnika', 'bg': 'По-задълбочено внимание към моделирането на злоупотребяващото потребителско съдържание', 'da': 'Dybere opmærksomhed på moderation af misbrugerindhold', 'nl': 'Diepere aandacht voor misbruikende gebruikerscontent moderatie', 'ko': '사용자 콘텐츠 남용의 절제에 더욱 깊이 관심을 가지다', 'de': 'Intensivere Aufmerksamkeit für die Moderation missbräuchlicher Nutzerinhalte', 'fa': 'توجه عمیق به مدیریت محتوای کاربر مفسد', 'id': 'Perhatian Lebih Dalam Moderasi Konten Pengguna Abusif', 'sw': 'Tazama za kina kwa Utumiaji Wasio na Ubaguzi', 'tr': 'Ullançy Mazmunlar Modyna Derjesi Unsur', 'af': 'Deeper Aansig na Abusive Gebruiker Inhoud Modering', 'sq': 'Vëmendje më thellë për moderimin e përmbajtjes abuzive të përdoruesit', 'hy': 'Լավ ուշադրություն դարձրել օգտագործողի չարաշահույթի պարունակության մոդերացիային', 'az': '칖st칲nl칲k istifad톛칞i M톛zmunlar캼 Moderasyonu', 'am': 'የመጠቀሚያ ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারীর বিষয়বস্তু মোডেশনের জন্য গভীর মনোযোগ', 'ca': 'Una atenció més profunda a la moderació del contingut abusiv dels usuaris', 'cs': 'Hlubší pozornost k moderaci zneužívaného uživatelského obsahu', 'bs': 'Dublje pažnje na moderaciju zaštite korisnika', 'fi': 'Syvempi huomio väärinkäyttävän käyttäjän sisällön moderointiin', 'et': 'Sügavam tähelepanu kuritarvitava kasutaja sisu modereerimisele', 'jv': 'deep', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Poglobljena pozornost zmernosti zlorabe uporabniške vsebine', 'he': 'תשומת לב עמוקה יותר למדידור תוכן משתמש מועלל', 'bo': 'དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ནང་དོན་དབྱིབས་ལ་སྐྱོང་པོ།'}
{'en': 'Experimenting with a new dataset of 1.6 M user comments from a news portal and an existing dataset of 115 K Wikipedia talk page comments, we show that an RNN operating on word embeddings outpeforms the previous state of the art in moderation, which used logistic regression or an MLP classifier with character or word n-grams. We also compare against a CNN operating on word embeddings, and a word-list baseline. A novel, deep, classificationspecific attention mechanism improves the performance of the RNN further, and can also highlight suspicious words for free, without including highlighted words in the training data. We consider both fully automatic and semi-automatic moderation.', 'ar': 'بتجربة مجموعة بيانات جديدة من 1.6 مليون تعليق مستخدم من بوابة أخبار ومجموعة بيانات حالية من 115 ألف تعليق على صفحة نقاش ويكيبيديا ، نظهر أن RNN التي تعمل على تضمين الكلمات تتفوق على حالة الفن السابقة في الاعتدال ، والتي تستخدم الانحدار اللوجستي أو مصنف MLP مع حرف أو كلمة n-grams. نقارن أيضًا مع شبكة CNN التي تعمل على تضمين الكلمات ، وخط أساس قائمة الكلمات. تعمل آلية الانتباه الجديدة والعميقة والخاصة بالتصنيفات على تحسين أداء RNN بشكل أكبر ، ويمكنها أيضًا إبراز الكلمات المشبوهة مجانًا ، دون تضمين الكلمات المميزة في بيانات التدريب. نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار كلاً من الاعتدال التلقائي بالكامل وشبه التلقائي.', 'es': 'Experimentando con un nuevo conjunto de datos de 1,6 millones de comentarios de usuarios de un portal de noticias y un conjunto de datos existente de 115 000 comentarios de páginas de discusión de Wikipedia, mostramos que una RNN que opera con incrustaciones de palabras supera al estado de la técnica anterior con moderación, que utilizaba regresión logística o un clasificador MLP con carácter o n-gramas de palabras. También nos comparamos con una CNN que opera con incrustaciones de palabras y una línea de base de lista de palabras. Un mecanismo de atención novedoso, profundo y específico de clasificación mejora aún más el rendimiento de la RNN y también puede resaltar palabras sospechosas de forma gratuita, sin incluir palabras resaltadas en los datos de entrenamiento. Consideramos la moderación totalmente automática y semiautomática.', 'fr': "En expérimentant un nouvel ensemble de données de 1,6 million de commentaires d'utilisateurs provenant d'un portail d'actualités et un ensemble de données existant de 115 000 commentaires de pages de discussion Wikipédia, nous montrons qu'un RNN fonctionnant sur l'intégration de mots surpasse l'état de l'art antérieur en termes de modération, qui utilisait une régression logistique ou un classificateur MLP avec caractère ou n-grammes de mots. Nous comparons également avec un CNN fonctionnant sur des intégrations de mots et une base de liste de mots. Un nouveau mécanisme d'attention spécifique à la classification, approfondi, améliore encore les performances du RNN et peut également mettre en évidence des mots suspects gratuitement, sans inclure de mots surlignés dans les données d'entraînement. Nous considérons à la fois la modération entièrement automatique et la modération semi-automatique.", 'pt': 'Experimentando um novo conjunto de dados de 1,6 milhão de comentários de usuários de um portal de notícias e um conjunto de dados existente de 115 mil comentários da página de discussão da Wikipedia, mostramos que uma RNN operando em incorporações de palavras supera o estado da arte anterior com moderação, que usava regressão logística ou um Classificador MLP com n-gramas de caracteres ou palavras. Também comparamos com uma CNN operando em incorporação de palavras e uma linha de base de lista de palavras. Um mecanismo de atenção novo, profundo e específico de classificação melhora ainda mais o desempenho do RNN e também pode destacar palavras suspeitas gratuitamente, sem incluir palavras destacadas nos dados de treinamento. Consideramos a moderação totalmente automática e semiautomática.', 'ja': 'ニュースポータルからの1.6Mユーザーコメントの新しいデータセットと、115 K Wikipediaトークページコメントの既存のデータセットを実験した結果、ワード埋め込みで動作するRNNが、ロジスティック回帰または文字またはワードnグラムを含むMLP分類子を使用している従来の最先端をモデレートで上回っていることが示されました。また、ワード埋め込みで動作するCNNとワードリストのベースラインを比較します。新規の、深い、分類に特化した注目メカニズムは、RNNのパフォーマンスをさらに向上させ、トレーニングデータに強調表示された単語を含めることなく、疑わしい単語を無料で強調することもできます。全自動と半自動の両方のモデレーションを考慮しています。', 'zh': '试自新闻门户者160万条用户论新数集与115K维基百科论者今有数集,吾等明于词销上行者RNN优于前技术水平,后者用逻辑归或带字符或单词n-gramMLP类器。 与基于词CNN与单词列表基线较之。 一新、深入、分类特异性注意机进一步提高RNN之性,而免费显疑单词,无待练数含单词。 同时虑全自动与半自动勘。', 'ru': 'Экспериментируя с новым набором данных из 1.6M пользовательских комментариев с новостного портала и существующим набором данных из 115K комментариев на странице разговора Википедии, мы показываем, что RNN, работающий на вложениях слов, превосходит предыдущее состояние техники в модерации, в котором использовалась логистическая регрессия или классификатор MLP с символом или словом n-грамм. Мы также сравниваем с CNN, работающим на встраиваниях слов, и базовой линией списка слов. Новый, глубокий, специфический для классификаций механизм внимания дополнительно улучшает производительность RNN, а также может бесплатно выделять подозрительные слова, не включая выделенные слова в данные обучения. Мы рассматриваем как полностью автоматическую, так и полуавтоматическую модерацию.', 'hi': 'एक समाचार पोर्टल से 1.6M उपयोगकर्ता टिप्पणियों के एक नए डेटासेट और 115K विकिपीडिया वार्ता पृष्ठ टिप्पणियों के मौजूदा डेटासेट के साथ प्रयोग करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर काम करने वाला एक आरएनएन मॉडरेशन में कला की पिछली स्थिति से आगे निकल जाता है, जिसमें लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन या चरित्र या शब्द एन-ग्राम के साथ एक एमएलपी क्लासिफायर का उपयोग किया जाता था। हम शब्द एम्बेडिंग पर काम करने वाले सीएनएन और एक शब्द-सूची आधार रेखा के खिलाफ भी तुलना करते हैं। एक उपन्यास, गहरा, वर्गीकरण विशिष्ट ध्यान तंत्र आरएनएन के प्रदर्शन में और सुधार करता है, और प्रशिक्षण डेटा में हाइलाइट किए गए शब्दों को शामिल किए बिना, मुफ्त में संदिग्ध शब्दों को भी उजागर कर सकता है। हम पूरी तरह से स्वचालित और अर्ध-स्वचालित मॉडरेशन दोनों पर विचार करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Agus sinn ag tástáil le tacar sonraí nua de 1.6M de thuairimí úsáideoirí ó thairseach nuachta agus tacar sonraí reatha de 115K tuairimí leathanach cainte Vicipéid, léirímid go sáraíonn RNN atá ag feidhmiú ar leabaithe focal an úrscothacht roimhe sin go measartha, a d’úsáid aischéimnithí lóistíochta nó Aicmitheoir MLP le carachtar nó focal n-gram. Déanaimid comparáid freisin le CNN atá ag feidhmiú ar leabú focal, agus bunlíne liosta focal. Feabhsaítear feidhmíocht an RNN trí mheicníocht núíosach, dhomhain, a bhaineann go sonrach le haicmiú, agus féadann sé freisin béim a chur ar fhocail amhrasacha saor in aisce, gan focail aibhsithe a áireamh sna sonraí oiliúna. Breathnaímid ar mhodhnóireacht iomlán uathoibríoch agus leath-uathoibríoch.', 'hu': 'Egy hírportálból származó 1,6 millió felhasználói hozzászólást tartalmazó új adatkészlettel és egy 115K Wikipédia vitaoldal megjegyzéseiből álló adatkészlettel kísérletezve azt mutatjuk, hogy egy szóbeágyazáson működő RNN mérsékelten felülmúlja a korábbi technológia állapotát, amely logisztikai regressziót vagy MLP osztályozót használt karakterekkel vagy szóval n-grammokkal. Összehasonlítjuk a szóbeágyazásokon működő CNN-t és a szólista alapját is. Egy új, mélyreható, osztályozási mechanizmus tovább javítja az RNN teljesítményét, és ingyenesen kiemelheti a gyanús szavakat, anélkül, hogy kiemelt szavakat szerepelne az edzési adatokba. Mind a teljesen automatikus, mind a félautomata moderációt tekintjük.', 'el': 'Πειραματιζόμενοι με ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων σχολίων χρηστών 1.6από μια πύλη ειδήσεων και ένα υπάρχον σύνολο δεδομένων σχολίων σελίδας συζήτησης 115Κ της Βικιπαίδειας, καταδεικνύουμε ότι ένα RNN που λειτουργεί σε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων ξεπερνά την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας με μέτρο, η οποία χρησιμοποίησε λογιστική παλινδρόμηση ή έναν ταξινομητή με χαρακτήρα ή λέξεις n-γραμμάρια. Συγκρίνουμε επίσης με ένα CNN που λειτουργεί με ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και μια γραμμή βάσης λίστας λέξεων. Ένας νέος, βαθύς, ταξινομήσεςειδικός μηχανισμός προσοχής βελτιώνει περαιτέρω την απόδοση του και μπορεί επίσης να επισημάνει ύποπτες λέξεις δωρεάν, χωρίς να περιλαμβάνει επισημασμένες λέξεις στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Θεωρούμε τόσο τον πλήρως αυτόματο όσο και τον ημιαυτόματο μετριασμό.', 'lt': 'Eksperimentuojant su nauju 1,6M naudotojų komentarų rinkiniu iš naujienų portalo ir esamu 115K Vikipedijos kalbos puslapio komentarų rinkiniu, mes parodome, kad RNN, veikiantis žodžių įterpimuose, formuoja ankstesnę moderacinę pažangą, kuri naudojo logistinę regresiją arba MLP klasifikatorių su simboliu ar žodžiu n-gramai. Mes taip pat palyginame su CNN, veikiančiu žodžių įterpimu, ir žodžių sąrašo pradiniu lygiu. Naujas, giliai klasifikuojamasis ypatingo dėmesio mechanizmas toliau gerina RNN veiksmingumą ir taip pat gali nemokamai pabrėžti įtartinus žodžius, neįtraukiant pabrėžtų žodžių į mokymo duomenis. We consider both fully automatic and semi-automatic moderation.', 'mk': 'Експериментирајќи со нов набор на податоци од 1,6M корисници коментари од новински портал и постојан набор на податоци од 115K говорни страници на Википедија, покажуваме дека РНН кој оперира на зборови вградени ја формира претходната техничка состојба во модерација, која користеше логистичка регресија или MLP класификатор со знак или збор n-грам. Ние, исто така, се споредуваме со CNN кој работи на зборови внатрешни, и основа на зборови-листата. Роман, длабоко, класификациониран механизам на посебно внимание понатаму ја подобрува резултатот на РНН и може, исто така, да ги истакне сомнителните зборови бесплатно, без вклучување на истакнатите зборови во податоците за обука. We consider both fully automatic and semi-automatic moderation.', 'ka': 'Name ჩვენ ასევე CNN-ს დავწყებთ, რომელიც სიტყვების შესაბამისად და სიტყვების სიტყვების დასაბამისად. პრომენტი, ძალიან, კლასიფიკაციის განსაკუთრებული აღმოჩენების მექანიზმი უფრო უფრო აღმოჩენა პრომენტის მუშაობას და შეიძლება ასევე გააღწეროთ შემდეგი სიტყვები თავიდან,  ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ყველაფერად ავტომატური და ნახევატომატური მოდერაცია.', 'ml': 'Experimenting with a new dataset of 1.6M user comments from a news portal and an existing dataset of 115K Wikipedia talk page comments, we show that an RNN operating on word embeddings outpeforms the previous state of the art in moderation, which used logistic regression or an MLP classifier with character or word n-grams.  വാക്ക് അകത്തേക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചും വാക്ക്-ലിസ്റ്റ് ബെസ്ലൈനിനെക്കുറിച്ചും നമ്മള്\u200d താ ഒരു നോവല്\u200d, ആഴത്തില്\u200d, ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d RNN പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിന് കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരെയും സ്വയം സ്വയമായി കാണുന്നു.', 'kk': 'Жаңа 1.6M пайдаланушының жаңа порталынан және 115K Wikipedia сөйлеу парақтың түсініктемелерінің жаңа деректер жиынының түсініктемелерімен эксперимент жасау кезінде, біз RNN сөздерді ендіру кезінде өзінің алдыңғы модерациялық кезінде орындалады. Бұл логистикалық регрессияс Сөздерді ендіру және сөздер тізімінің негізгі жолында CNN операциясына салыстырып тұрмыз. Роман, тереңдік, классификациялық қызметтердің механизмі RNN жұмысын жақсы жасайды, сондай-ақ күтпейтін сөздерді бос болып, оқыту деректерінде бос сөздерді таңдау мүмкін емес. Біз автоматты түрде және жарты автоматты түрде жаңартуды қарастырмыз.', 'it': "Sperimentando un nuovo dataset di 1,6 milioni di commenti degli utenti provenienti da un portale di notizie e un dataset esistente di 115K commenti delle pagine di discussione di Wikipedia, mostriamo che un RNN che opera sulle incorporazioni di parole supera con moderazione lo stato dell'arte precedente, che utilizza regressione logistica o un classificatore MLP con caratteri o parole n-grammi. Confrontiamo anche una CNN che opera sulle incorporazioni di parole e una linea di base delle liste di parole. Un nuovo, profondo, meccanismo di attenzione specifico migliora ulteriormente le prestazioni del RNN e può anche evidenziare parole sospette gratuitamente, senza includere parole evidenziate nei dati di allenamento. Consideriamo sia la moderazione completamente automatica che semi-automatica.", 'mt': 'L-esperimentazzjoni b’sett ta’ dejta ġdid ta’ kummenti tal-utent ta’ 1.6M minn portal tal-a ħbarijiet u sett ta’ dejta eżistenti ta’ kummenti tal-paġn a ta’ diskors tal-115K tal-Wikipedia, nuru li RNN li jopera fuq l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem jikkostitwixxi l-aħħar avvanz fil-moderazzjoni, li uża rigressjoni loġistika jew klassifikatur MLP b’karattru jew kelma n-grammi. Aħna nqabblu wkoll ma’ CNN li topera fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, u linja bażi tal-list a tal-kliem. Mekkaniżmu ġdid ta’ attenzjoni speċifika għall-klassifikazzjonijiet profondi jtejjeb aktar il-prestazzjoni tal-RNN, u jista’ jenfasizza wkoll kliem suspettuż mingħajr ħlas, mingħajr ma jinkludi kliem enfasizzat fid-dejta tat-taħriġ. We consider both fully automatic and semi-automatic moderation.', 'ms': 'Mencoba dengan set data baru bagi ulasan pengguna 1.6M dari portal berita dan set data yang wujud bagi ulasan halaman bercakap Wikipedia 115K, kami menunjukkan bahawa RNN yang berfungsi pada penyembedding perkataan outpeforms keadaan seni terdahulu dalam moderasi, yang menggunakan regresi logistik atau klasifikasi MLP dengan aksara atau perkataan n-gram. Kita juga membandingkan dengan CNN yang beroperasi pada penyembedding perkataan, dan dasar senarai perkataan. Mekanisme perhatian tertentu untuk klasifikasi novel, mendalam meningkatkan prestasi RNN lebih lanjut, dan juga dapat menyatakan perkataan yang mencurigakan secara percuma, tanpa termasuk perkataan yang ditandai dalam data latihan. Kami mempertimbangkan keseluruhan automatik dan setengah automatik moderasi.', 'mn': '1.6M хэрэглэгчдийн шинэ өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр судалж, 115K Wikipedia-ын ярианы хуудас дээр байгаа өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр дүгнэлт хийж байгаа шинэ өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр бид харуулж байна. ДНХ нь хэлбэрээр ажиллаж буй урлагийн өмнөх хэлбэрээр нөлөөлдөг байдлыг харуулж байна. Бид мөн CNN-тэй харьцуулсан үг нэмж, үг жагсаалтын суурь шугам дээр ажилладаг. Шинэ, гүн гүнзгий, анхны анхаарлын механизм нь ДНХ-ын үйл ажиллагааг илүү сайжруулж, мөн үнэгүй санамсаргүй үгсийг тодорхойлж чадна. Бид хоёулаа автоматик болон хагас автоматик завсарлага гэж боддог.', 'no': 'Eksperimentert med eit nytt datasett med 1,6M-brukarar-kommentarar frå ein nyhetsprort og eit eksisterande datasett med 115K Wikipedia-talsidekommentarar, viser vi at eit RNN som operasjonar på ord innebygger utformar den førre tilstanden til kunsten i moderasjon, som bruka logistiske regresjon eller ein MLP-klassifisering med teikn eller ord n-gramar. Vi sammenliknar også med ein CNN-operasjon på ord-innebygging, og ein ordlistebaseline. Eit roman, dyp, klassifisert oppmerksmekanisme forbedrar utviklinga av RNN framover, og kan også markere dårlige ord for fri, utan å inkludere markerte ord i opplæringsdata. Vi ser både automatisk og halvautomatisk moderering.', 'pl': 'Eksperymentując z nowym zestawem danych komentarzy użytkowników 1.6M z portalu informacyjnego i istniejącym zbiorem danych komentarzy stron dyskusyjnych 115K Wikipedii, pokazujemy, że RNN działający na osadzeniach słów z umiarem przewyższa poprzedni stan techniki, który wykorzystał regresję logistyczną lub klasyfikator MLP z znakiem lub n-gramami słowa. Porównujemy również z CNN działającym na osadzeniach słów i bazą bazową listy słów. Nowatorski, głęboki, klasyfikacySpecyficzny mechanizm uwagi poprawia wydajność RNN jeszcze bardziej, a także może podkreślać podejrzane słowa za darmo, bez umieszczania podświetlonych słów w danych treningowych. Rozważamy zarówno moderację w pełni automatyczną, jak i półautomatyczną.', 'si': '1.6M භාවිතා ප්\u200dරවේශකය සමග අළුත් දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් සහ 115K විකිපිඩියා කතා ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේ අපි CNN එක්ක වචන සම්පූර්ණය සහ වචන ලැයිස්තුවක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා. නොවැඩක්, ගොඩක්, විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ අවධාන පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියෙන් RNN විසින් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්, සමහරවිශ්වාසික වචන් නිදහ අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩි', 'ro': 'Experimentând un nou set de date de 1,6 milioane de comentarii ale utilizatorilor dintr-un portal de știri și un set de date existent de 115K comentarii ale paginii de discuții Wikipedia, arătăm că un RNN care operează pe încorporarea cuvintelor depășește starea anterioară a tehnicii cu moderație, care a folosit regresia logistică sau un clasificator MLP cu caracter sau cuvânt n-grame. De asemenea, comparăm cu o CNN care operează pe încorporări de cuvinte și cu o listă de cuvinte de referință. Un nou, profund, clasificărimecanism de atenție specific îmbunătățește performanța RNN și poate evidenția gratuit cuvinte suspecte, fără a include cuvinte evidențiate în datele de antrenament. Considerăm atât moderarea complet automată, cât și semi-automată.', 'sr': 'Eksperimentujući sa novim kompletom podataka od 1.6M korisnika komentara iz novinskog portal a i postojećeg kompleta podataka od 115K Wikipedia-ja komentara za razgovor stranica, pokazujemo da RNN koji radi na rečima ugrađuje prethodno stanje umjetnosti u moderaciji, koji je koristio logističku regresiju ili MLP klasifikatoru sa karakterom ili rečima n-gramom. Takoðe uspoređujemo sa CNN-om koji radi na reèima, i početnoj liniji listi reèi. Novi, duboki, klasifikacijski mehanizam pažnje dodatno poboljšava funkciju RNN-a, a takođe može naglasiti sumnjive reči besplatno, bez uključujući istaknute reči u podatke o obuci. Smatramo potpuno automatsku i polu-automatsku moderaciju.', 'so': 'Imtixaamo la sameeyo macluumaad cusub oo 1.6M user comments from a news portal and a n existing dataset of 115K Wikipedia talk page comments, waxaannu tusaynaa RNN operating on word embeddings outpeforms the previous state of the art in moderation, which used logistic regression or an MLP classifier with character or word n-grams. Sidoo kale waxaynu isbarbardhignaa CNN oo ka shaqeeya hadal embedding, iyo qoraal-list-baseline. Qoraal, hoos u dheer, fasax gaar ah ayaa kordhin kara sameynta RNN, wuxuuna sidoo kale ku iftiimi karaa hadal shaki leh oo lacag la’aan ah, iyadoon ku jirin erayo lagu qoray macluumaadka waxbarashada. Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa si rasmi ah oo iskumar ah iyo hoos-horumar ah.', 'sv': 'Genom att experimentera med en ny datauppsättning med 1,6 miljoner användarkommentarer från en nyhetsportal och en befintlig datauppsättning med 115K Wikipedias diskussionssidakommentarer visar vi att ett RNN som arbetar med ordinbäddningar överträffar det tidigare teknikläget med måttlighet, vilket använde logistisk regression eller en MLP-klassificerare med tecken eller ord n-gram. Vi jämför också med en CNN som arbetar på ordinbäddningar och en ordlista baslinje. En ny, djup, klassificeringsspecifik uppmärksamhetsmekanism förbättrar RNN:s prestanda ytterligare, och kan också markera misstänkta ord gratis, utan att inkludera markerade ord i träningsdata. Vi betraktar både helautomatisk och halvautomatisk moderering.', 'ta': 'Name We also compare against a CNN operating on word embeddings, and a word-list baseline.  ஒரு புதிய, ஆழம், வகுப்பிடும் குறிப்பிட்ட கவனத்தின் முறைமை RNN இன் செயலை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும் பயிற்சியில் குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்த நாங்கள் இருவரும் தானாகவே மற்றும் பாதி தானாகவே புதுப்பித்துக் கொள்கிறோம்.', 'ur': '1.6M یوسٹر کی نیویس پورٹل سے اور 115K ویکیپیڈیا کی بات پیغام کی مثالیں کی ایک نئی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتا ہے، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک RNN ایسی بات پر عمل کرتا ہے جو مدرساتی میں آرتی کی پہلی موقعیت کو اضافہ کرتا ہے، جس نے لوجیسی ریگرس یا ایک MLP کلیسٹر کو کارٹر یا کلیسٹر n-گرم کے سات ہم نے بھی ایک سی ان ان کے بارے میں لفظ ایمبڈینگ اور ایک لفظ لیسٹ بیس لین کے بارے میں عمل کرنے کے ساتھ مقایسہ کیا ہے. ایک روانی، عمیق، کلاسپیٹ، مخصوص توجه مکانیسم RNN کی عملکرد اضافہ کرتی ہے، اور آزاد کے لئے بھی شک کرنے والی کلمات کو اضافہ کر سکتی ہے، بغیر اس کے کہ ٹرینیٹ ڈیٹوں میں اشارہ کی کلمات شامل ہوتی ہیں. ہم ان دونوں کو پوری طور پر اتوماٹی اور نصف اتوماٹی مدرسی سمجھتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Biz so'zlar ichida ishlayotgan CNN va so'zlar roʻyxat asosiy bazasini kamaytirimiz. Name Biz ikkita avtomatik va avtomatik avtomatik taqdim qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Thí nghiệm với một tập tin mới của người dùng 1 Chúng tôi cũng so sánh với một CNN điều hành về việc nhập từ, và một từ danh sách cơ bản. Một cơ chế tập trung đặc biệt mới, sâu sắc, có thể cải thiện hiệu quả của RNN, và cũng có thể nhấn mạnh những từ đáng ngờ miễn phí, mà không có những từ được đánh dấu trong dữ liệu huấn luyện. Chúng tôi xem xét sự điều chế hoàn toàn tự động và bán tự động.', 'bg': 'Експериментирайки с нов набор от данни от 1,6 млн потребителски коментари от новинарски портал и съществуващ набор от данни от 115К коментари на разговорните страници в Уикипедия, ние показваме, че РНН, работещ върху вграждане на думи, превъзхожда предишното състояние на изкуството в умереност, което използва логистична регресия или класификатор с символ или дума н-грама. Също така сравняваме с CNN, работещ върху вграждането на думи, и базова линия на списък с думи. Нов, дълбок, класификацияспецифичен механизъм за внимание подобрява допълнително ефективността на РНН и може да подчертае подозрителни думи безплатно, без да включва подчертани думи в данните за обучение. Ние разглеждаме както напълно автоматична, така и полуавтоматична модерация.', 'da': 'Ved at eksperimentere med et nyt datasæt af 1,6 millioner brugerkommentarer fra en nyhedsportal og et eksisterende datasæt af 115K Wikipedia diskussionsside kommentarer, viser vi, at et RNN, der opererer på ordindlejringer, overgår den tidligere state of te art med moderation, som brugte logistisk regression eller en MLP klassificering med tegn eller ord n-grams. Vi sammenligner også med en CNN, der opererer på ordindlejringer, og en oprindelig ordliste. En ny, dyb, klassifikationsspecifik opmærksomhedsmekanisme forbedrer RNN yderligere, og kan også fremhæve mistænkelige ord gratis, uden at inkludere fremhævede ord i træningsdataene. Vi overvejer både fuldautomatisk og halvautomatisk moderering.', 'nl': 'Door te experimenteren met een nieuwe dataset van 1.6M gebruikerscommentaren van een nieuwsportaal en een bestaande dataset van 115K Wikipedia talkpagina commentaren, laten we zien dat een RNN die werkt op woord embeddingen overtreft de vorige stand van de techniek met mate, die gebruikmaakte van logistieke regressie of een MLP classificator met teken of woord n-grammen. We vergelijken ook met een CNN dat werkt op woord embeddings, en een woordlijst baseline. Een nieuw, diep, classificatiespecifiek aandachtsmechanisme verbetert de prestaties van de RNN verder, en kan ook verdachte woorden gratis markeren, zonder gemarkeerde woorden in de trainingsgegevens op te nemen. We beschouwen zowel volautomatische als semi-automatische moderatie.', 'hr': 'Eksperimentirajući s novim kompletom podataka od 1,6M korisnika komentara iz novinskog portal a i postojećeg kompleta podataka od 115K Wikipedia komentara za razgovor stranica, pokazujemo da RNN koji djeluje na riječima ugrađuje prethodno stanje umjetnosti u moderaciji, koji je koristio logističku regresiju ili MLP klasifikaciju s karakterom ili riječima n-gramom. Također uspoređujemo i s CNN-om koji radi na riječima, i početnoj liniji listi riječi. Novi, duboki, klasifikacijski mehanizam pažnje dodatno poboljšava učinkovitost RNN-a, a također može istaknuti sumnjive riječi besplatno, bez uključujući istaknute riječi u podatke o obuci. Smatramo potpuno automatsku i polu-automatsku moderaciju.', 'id': 'Eksperimensi dengan set data baru dari komentar pengguna 1,6M dari portal berita dan set data yang ada dari komentar halaman pembicaraan 115K Wikipedia, kami menunjukkan bahwa RNN yang beroperasi pada penyembedding kata outpeforms keadaan seni sebelumnya dalam moderasi, yang menggunakan regresi logistik atau klasifikasi MLP dengan karakter atau kata n-gram. We also compare against a CNN operating on word embeddings, and a word-list baseline.  Sebuah novel, klasifikasi dalam, mekanisme perhatian spesifik meningkatkan prestasi RNN lebih lanjut, dan juga dapat menyatakan kata-kata yang mencurigakan secara gratis, tanpa termasuk kata-kata yang terkenal dalam data latihan. We consider both fully automatic and semi-automatic moderation.', 'de': 'Durch Experimente mit einem neuen Datensatz von 1.6M Benutzerkommentaren aus einem Nachrichtenportal und einem vorhandenen Datensatz von 115K Wikipedia Diskussionsseitenkommentaren zeigen wir, dass ein RNN, der auf Worteinbettungen arbeitet, moderiert den bisherigen Stand der Technik übertrifft, der logistische Regression oder einen MLP-Klassifikator mit Zeichen oder Wort n-Gramm verwendete. Wir vergleichen auch mit einem CNN, das auf Worteinbettungen arbeitet, und einer Wortlisten-Baseline. Ein neuartiger, tiefer, klassifizierungsspezifischer Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus verbessert die Leistung des RNN weiter und kann auch verdächtige Wörter kostenlos hervorheben, ohne hervorgehobene Wörter in die Trainingsdaten aufzunehmen. Wir betrachten sowohl vollautomatische als auch halbautomatische Moderation.', 'tr': '1.6M Ullançylaryň täze maglumatlarynyň täze terjimeleri bilen döredilen täze bir ýagdaý portal we 115K Wikipedia gürrüň sahypalarynyň täze terjimeleri bilen, sözleriň içine işlenýän RNN sözleriň moderasyýanyň öňki durumyny terjime edip bilýäris we ol oglog regresiýasyny ýa-da MLP klassifikatçisiniň karakter ýa-da n-gramler bile Biz hem CNN-iň sözleriň içinde işleýän işleriň we sözleriň üýtgeýän çyzgylygyna karşılaşýarys. Bir roman, derin, klasifikasiýa spesifik üns meýdançasynda RNN ukypynyň üstünligini gowurap biler we üýtgetmek üçin şübheli sözleri şöhret edip biler. Biz hem tamamen awtomatik hem ýarym-awtomatik moderasyny düşünýäris.', 'ko': '뉴스 포털의 사용자 리뷰 160만 건에 대한 새로운 데이터 세트와 115K 위키백과 토크 페이지 리뷰의 기존 데이터 세트를 실험한 결과, 단어에 삽입된 RNN이 이전의 기술 수준을 적절히 뛰어넘어 논리적 회귀나 문자나 단어 n-grams가 들어간 MLP 분류기를 사용하는 것으로 나타났다.우리는 또한 CNN이 단어에 삽입된 조작과 단어 목록의 기선을 비교했다.새롭고 깊이가 있으며 특정한 주의 메커니즘을 분류하여 RNN의 성능을 더욱 향상시켰고 의심스러운 단어를 무료로 돋보이게 할 수 있으며 훈련 데이터에 돋보이는 단어를 포함하지 않아도 된다.우리는 전자동과 반자동 조절을 고려한다.', 'sw': 'Kujaribu n a seti mpya ya taarifa za mtumiaji 1.6M kutoka kwenye tovuti ya habari na seti ya taarifa zinazopo kwenye ukurasa wa mazungumzo 115K Wikipedia, tunaonyesha kuwa RNN inayofanya kazi kwa maneno yanayoendelea inatengeneza hali ya sanaa iliyopita katika hali ya kisasa, ambayo ilitumia ukandamizaji wa kiutamaduni au mfanyakazi wa MLP akiwa na mhusika au maneno n n-gram. Pia tunalinganisha na CNN inayofanya kazi kwa maneno, na msingi wa orodha ya maneno. Mfumo wa kutangaza kwa kiwango kikubwa, tofauti maalum unaboresha ufanisi wa chama cha RNN zaidi, na pia unaweza kuonyesha maneno yenye mashaka kwa uhuru, bila kuwa na maneno yaliyoonyesha katika takwimu za mafunzo. Tunafikiri zote kuwa ni za kujitegemea na kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'fa': 'تجربه با مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید از ۱.۶M کاربر از یک دروازه اخبار و مجموعه داده\u200cهای موجود از صفحه\u200cهای سخنرانی ۱۶K ویکیپیدیا، نشان می\u200cدهیم که یک RNN عملیات روی کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکند که وضعیت قبلی هنر در مدرسه\u200cای را بیرون می\u200cسازد، که از گروههای لوژیک استفاده می\u200cکند یا یک کلمه\u200c ما همچنین در مقایسه با یک سین\u200cان\u200cای که عملیات روی استفاده\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها و یک خط پایین\u200cلیست کلمه\u200cها را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. یک مکانیسم توجه ویژه\u200cای از رمان، عمیق، مخفی و مخفی، عملکرد RNN را بیشتر بهتر می\u200cکند و می\u200cتواند کلمات مظنونی را برای آزاد تشکیل دهد، بدون شامل کلمات مشخص شده در داده\u200cهای آموزش. ما هر دو را به طور کامل خودکار و نیمه اتوماتیک فکر می کنیم.', 'am': 'በ1.6M ተጠቃሚዎች የዜና ፖርት እና የአሁኑን ዳታ ማተሚያ ጽሑፍ 115K Wikipedia የንግግር ገጽ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳየዋለን። RNN በንግግር ግንኙነት ላይ የሚያስፈልገውን አዲስ አዲስ አርእስት አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በንግግር እና በንግግር n-gram ላይ የሚሠራውን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ እናም ቃላት አቀማመጥ እና የቃላት ዝርዝር መሠረት ላይ ከCNN ጋር እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ መኖሪያው፣ ጥልቅ፣ ለጥልቅ፣ የተለያየ የRNN ማስታወቂያውን እንዲያሳድግ እና በተከታተኑት ቃላት፣ በተስተማሪው ዳታዎች ውስጥ ሳይኖሩ በተጠራጠሩ ቃላትን እንዲያሳርፍ ይችላል፡፡ ሁለንተና በራሱ እና የsemi-automatic ማቀናቀል እናስባለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Duke eksperimentuar me një sërë të dhënash të reja të komenteve të përdoruesve 1.6M nga një portal lajmesh dhe një sërë të dhënash ekzistuese të komenteve të faqes së bisedës 115K Wikipedia, ne tregojmë se një RNN që funksionon n ë përfshirjet e fjalëve formon gjendjen e mëparshme të artit në moderim, e cila përdori regresionin logjistik apo një klasifikues MLP me karakter apo fjalë n-gram. Ne krahasojmë gjithashtu me një CNN që punon në përfshirjen e fjalëve, dhe një bazë të list ës së fjalëve. Një mekanizëm i ri, i thellë, klasifikimi i vëmendjes specifike përmirëson më tej performancën e RNN dhe mund të theksojë gjithashtu fjalët e dyshimta falas, pa përfshirë fjalët e theksuara në të dhënat e stërvitjes. Ne konsiderojmë si moderimin plotësisht automatik dhe gjysmë-automatik.', 'af': "Eksperimenteering met 'n nuwe datastel van 1.6M gebruiker kommentaar van 'n nuusportaal en 'n bestaande datastel van 115K Wikipedia praat bladsy kommentaar, wys ons dat 'n RNN wat op woord inbettings werk uitformeer die vorige staat van die kuns in moderasie, wat logistike regresie of 'n MLP klassifiseerder gebruik het met karakter of woord n- grame. Ons vergelyk ook teen 'n CNN operasie op woord inbettings, en 'n woorde-lys baselyn. 'n novel, diep, klasifikasie spesifieke aandag mekanisme verbeter die prestasie van die RNN verder, en kan ook verlig suspicious woorde vir vry, sonder insluitend verligte woorde in die onderwerp data. Ons beskou beide volledig automaties en semiautomatiese moderasie.", 'az': 'İstifadəçilərin yeni veri quruluğu 1.6M istifadəçilərinin məlumatlarından və 115K Wikipedia danışma sayfasın ın məlumatlarından olan veri quruluğu ilə təcrübə edirik ki, RNN, sözlərdə işlədiyimiz məlumatlardan əvvəlki sanatın məlumatlarının məlumatlarını öyrəndiyini göstərir, bu da loģistiki regresiya və ya n-gramları ilə MLP klasifikatçısı isti Biz də CNN səhifələrinə və sözlərin səhifələrində işlədiyimiz sözlərlə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bir roman, derin, klasifikasyon məqsədilə ünsiyyət mehānismi RNN performansını daha da artırar və təhsil məlumatlarında işıqlı sözləri də boş təhsil edə bilər. Biz hər ikisini tamamilə avtomatik və yarı-avtomatik moderasyonu düşünürük.', 'bs': 'Eksperimentirajući s novim kompletom podataka od 1.6M korisnika komentara iz novinskog portal a i postojećeg kompleta podataka od 115K Wikipedia komentara za razgovor stranica, pokazujemo da RNN koji radi na riječima ugrađuje prethodno stanje umjetnosti u moderaciji, koji je koristio logističku regresiju ili MLP klasifikaciju s karakterom ili riječima n-gramom. Također uspoređujemo sa CNN-om koji radi na uključenju riječi i početnoj liniji listi riječi. Novin, duboki, klasifikacijski mehanizam pažnje poboljšava učinkovitost RNN-a dalje, a također može istaknuti sumnjive riječi besplatno, bez uključujući istaknute riječi u podatke o obuci. Smatramo potpuno automatsku i polu-automatsku moderaciju.', 'cs': 'Experimentováním s novou datovou sadou 1.6M uživatelských komentářů ze zpravodajského portálu a existující datovou sadou 115K komentářů Wikipedie ukazujeme, že RNN pracující na vložení slov moderovaně vylepšuje předchozí stav techniky, který používal logistickou regresi nebo klasifikátor MLP se znakem nebo slovem n-gramy. Porovnáváme také s CNN operující na vkládání slov a základní linií seznamu slov. Nový, hluboký, klasifikačněspecifický mechanismus pozornosti dále zlepšuje výkon RNN a může také zdarma zdůraznit podezřelá slova, aniž by do tréninkových dat zahrnoval zvýrazněná slova. Zvažujeme jak plně automatickou, tak poloautomatickou moderaci.', 'bn': '১. ৬এম ব্যবহারকারীর একটি সংবাদ পোর্টাল থেকে একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট পরীক্ষা করছে এবং ১১৫০০০ উইকিপিডিয়া কথোপকথন পাতা মন্তব্যের একটি বিদ্যমান ডাটাটা সেট পরীক্ষা করছে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে একটি RNN শব্দের প্রবেশ করা হচ্ছে য আমরা একটি সিএনএন অপারেশনের বিরুদ্ধে তুলনা করি শব্দ বিভাগ এবং একটি শব্দ-তালিকার বেসালাইন। একটি উপন্যাস, গভীর, গ্রাস্ফিকেশনের বিশেষ মনোযোগের মাধ্যম আরএনএন এর প্রভাব আরো উন্নত করে এবং এই প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যে উল্লেখিত শব্দ ছাড়াও সন্দেহের কথা  আমরা দুজনেই স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে আধুনিকভাবে বিবেচনা করি।', 'ca': "Experimentant amb un nou conjunt de dades de comentaris d'un usuari de 1,6M d'un portal de notícies i un conjunt de dades existents de comentaris de la pàgina de conversa de la Wikipedia 115K, demostram que un RNN que opera en incorporacions de paraules representa l'estat d'art anterior en moderació, que va utilitzar la regressió logística o un classificador MLP amb caràcter o paraula n-grams. També comparem amb un CNN que funciona amb l'incorporació de paraules i una llista de paraules basal. Un mecanisme d'atenció específica de classificacions nova i profunda millora encara més el rendiment del RNN, i també pot destacar paraules sospitoses gratuitament, sense incloure paraules destacades a les dades d'entrenament. Considerem la moderació totalment automàtica i semiautomàtica.", 'hy': 'Փորձելով 1.6M օգտագործողի նոր տվյալների համակարգով նոր մեկնաբանություններ նորությունների պորտալ և գոյություն ունեցող Վիքիփեդիայի պատմության էջի մեկնաբանությունների տվյալների համակարգով, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ բառերի ներդրման վրա գործող ՌՆՆ-ը ձևավորում է մոդերացիայի ժամանակ առաջին տեխնոլոգիական ռեգրեսիան կամ MLP դասակարգչային Մենք նաև համեմատում ենք մի CNN-ի հետ, որը աշխատում է բառերի ներդրման վրա և բառերի ցուցակի հիմքում: Նոր, խորը, դասակարգում հատուկ ուշադրության մեխանիզմն ավելի բարելավում է ՌՆԹ-ի արտադրողականությունը և կարող է անվճար նշել կասկածելի բառերը, առանց ներառելու նշված բառերը ուսուցման տվյալներում: Մենք համարում ենք ամբողջովին ավտոմատիկ և կիսա-ավտոմատիկ չափման:', 'et': 'Uudisportaali uue 1,6 miljoni kasutaja kommentaaride andmekogumi ja olemasoleva 115K Vikipeedia vestluslehekülje kommentaaride andmekogumiga eksperimenteerides näitame, et sõna manustamisel tegutsev RNN ületab eelmise tehnika taseme mõõdukus, mis kasutas logistilist regressiooni või MLP klassifitseerijat märgi või sõna n-grammidega. Samuti võrdleme CNN-iga, mis töötab sõnade manustamisel ja sõnade nimekirja baasil. Uuenduslik, sügav, klassifikatsioonispetsiifiline tähelepanu mehhanism parandab RNNi jõudlust veelgi ja võib ka tasuta esile tõsta kahtlaseid sõnu, lisamata koolitusandmetesse esiletõstetud sõnu. Me kaalume nii täisautomaatset kui ka poolautomaatset moderatsiooni.', 'fi': 'Kokeilemalla uutta 1,6 miljoonan käyttäjäkommentin aineistoa uutisportaalista ja olemassaolevaa 115K Wikipedian keskustelusivukommenttien aineistoa osoitamme, että sanaupotuksilla toimiva RNN on moderaatiossa parempi kuin edellinen moderaatio, jossa käytettiin logistista regressiota tai MLP-luokitusta, jossa on kirjain tai sana n-grammi. Vertaamme myös sanaupotuksilla toimivaan CNN:ään ja sanaluettelon perusaikatauluun. Uusi, syvä, luokitteluspesifinen huomiomekanismi parantaa RNN:n suorituskykyä entisestään ja voi myös korostaa epäilyttäviä sanoja ilmaiseksi sisällyttämättä korostettuja sanoja koulutustietoihin. Käsittelemme sekä täysin automaattista että puoliautomaattista moderointia.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), instead of "politeness Awak dhéwé mungko karo MTS mengko nggawe barang-pakan lan basa-pakan Nari, nganggo-nggo, dadi, ingkang dipepot kanggo ngwalikno karo perusahaan kanggo nggawe kanggo ngilanggar kuwi dumadhi kanggo ngilanggar kuwi kesempatan kanggo kebebasan, ora iso nguasai gambarang langgar kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem sing otomatik lan semester-otomatik.', 'ha': "Experimenting with a new set of 1.6M user states from a news Portal and a n existing data set of 115K WiKiedia chat page Commons, we show that an RNN operated on word embeddings outpeforms the previous state of the art in moderation, which used logistic regression or an MLP classifiser with character or word n-gram. Munã samfane da wani CNN mai aiki a kan maganar da ke shiga, da wani layin-jerin. Wata bango, mai cikakken, mai fassara, na canza aikin muhimmanci masu ƙara da RNN, kuma yana iya ƙayyade magana masu shakka da za'a buɗa, kuma bã da kamfanin da aka ƙayyade maganar a cikin data na shirin. Munã ƙaddara dukansu a kan shirin farat ɗaya da na fara ɗaya.", 'he': 'בניסויים עם קבוצת נתונים חדשה של 1.6M תגובות משתמש משער חדשות ומקבוצת נתונים קיימת של 115K תגובות דף דיבור ויקיפדיה, אנו מראים ש RNN פועל על קישור מילים outpeforms את המצב הקודם של האמנות במדידות, אשר השתמש בגדרסיה לוגיסטית או קלאסיפור MLP עם אופי או מילה n-גרם. אנחנו משווה גם נגד סי.אן.אן פועל על קישור מילים, וברשימת מילים. מנגנון תשומת לב ספציפי רומן, עמוק, מסוים משפר את ההופעה של RNN עוד יותר, וגם יכול להדגיש מילים חשודות בחינם, מבלי לשלול מילים מסוימות במידע האימונים. אנו שוקלים את התמוטטות האוטומטית לחלוטין וחצי אוטומטית.', 'sk': 'Z eksperimentiranjem novega nabora podatkov 1,6 milijona uporabniških komentarjev z novičarskega portala in obstoječega nabora podatkov 115K komentarjev na Wikipediji pokažemo, da RNN, ki deluje na vgradnji besed, presega prejšnje stanje tehnike v zmernosti, ki je uporabljala logistično regresijo ali MLP klasifikator z znakom ali besedo n-grami. Primerjamo tudi s CNN, ki deluje na vdelavah besed, in osnovnim seznamom besed. Nov, globok, klasifikacijspecifični mehanizem pozornosti še naprej izboljša učinkovitost RNN in lahko tudi brezplačno poudari sumljive besede, ne da bi v podatke o usposabljanju vključili poudarjene besede. Upoštevamo popolnoma avtomatsko in polavtomatsko moderacijo.', 'bo': 'Experimenting with a new dataset of 1.6M user comments from a news portal and a n existing dataset of 115K Wikipedia talk page comments, we show that an RNN operating on word embeddings outpeforms the previous state of the art in moderation, which used logistic regression or an MLP classifier with a character or word n-grams. ང་ཚོས་CNN་ཡི་གེ་གནས་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བྱེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཚིག་དང་ཐོ་ཡིག་གི་རྨང A novel, deep, classificationspecific attention mechanism improves the performance of the RNN further, and can also highlight suspicious words for free, without including highlighted words in the training data. ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཇུག་རིམ་གང་ཡང་ཡོད་པ་ཚོར་བསམ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Outta Control : Laws of Semantic Change and Inherent Biases in Word Representation Models', 'ar': 'التحكم في Outta: قوانين التغيير الدلالي والتحيزات المتأصلة في نماذج تمثيل الكلمات', 'fr': 'Outta Control\xa0: lois du changement sémantique et biais inhérents dans les modèles de représentation textuelle', 'pt': 'Fora de controle: leis de mudança semântica e vieses inerentes em modelos de representação de palavras', 'es': 'Fuera de control: leyes del cambio semántico y sesgos inherentes en los modelos de representación de palabras', 'ja': 'アウトタコントロール：単語表現モデルにおける意味変化と固有のバイアスの法則', 'zh': 'Outta Control曰:语义变律单词中之固差也', 'ru': 'Outta Control: Законы семантических изменений и присущих им предрассудков в моделях представления слов', 'hi': 'Outta नियंत्रण: शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल में शब्दार्थ परिवर्तन और अंतर्निहित पूर्वाग्रहों के कानून', 'ga': 'Rialú Outta: Dlíthe an Athraithe Shéimeantaigh agus Laofachtaí Bunúsacha i Múnlaí Léirithe Focal', 'ka': 'გარეშე კონტროლეცია: სემანტიკური ცვლილების და შემდეგ სიტყვების გამოსახულება მოდელში', 'el': 'Έλεγχος εξόδου: Νόμοι της Σημματικής Αλλαγής και των έμφυτων προκαταλήψεων στα μοντέλα αναπαράστασης λέξεων', 'hu': 'Kimeneti ellenőrzés: A szemantikus változás törvényei és az eredendő hiányosságok a szóreprezentációs modellekben', 'it': "Controllo dell'uscita: leggi del cambiamento semantico e dei biasimi intrinseci nei modelli di rappresentazione delle parole", 'kk': 'Шығыс контроль: Semantic Change and Internal Increases in Word Representation Models', 'lt': 'Išorės kontrolė: Semantinių pokyčių ir nesusijusių triukšmų teisės aktai žodžių atstovavimo modeliuose', 'mk': 'Контрола надвор: Закони за семантична промена и внатрешни навреди во моделите на претставување на зборови', 'ms': 'Kawalan Luar: Hukum Perubahan Semantik dan Bias Dalam Model Perwakilan Perkataan', 'ml': 'പുറത്തുള്ള നിയന്ത്രണം: വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ നിയമം', 'mt': 'Kontroll ta’ barra: Liġijiet ta’ Bidla Semantika u Bidliet Inherenti fil-Mudelli ta’ Rappreżentazzjoni tal-Kliem', 'no': 'Outta kontroll: Laws of Semantic Change and Inherent Increases in Word Representation Models', 'mn': 'Шинэ Холбооны Холбооны Холбооны Холбооны Холбоонууд', 'pl': 'Kontrola wyjściowa: Prawa zmian semantycznych i wrodzone uprzedzenia w modelach reprezentacji słowa', 'ro': 'Controlul ieșirii: Legile schimbării semantice și a biazelor inerente în modelele de reprezentare a cuvintelor', 'si': 'Outta Control: Laws of semantic Changing and Inherent Biasas in Word Expression Models', 'so': 'Outer Control: Laws of Semantic Change and Inherent Biases in Word Representation Models', 'sr': 'Kontrola izvana: Zakoni semantičkih promjena i unutrašnjih razvoja u modelima predstavljanja reči', 'sv': 'Utgångskontroll: Lagar om semantisk förändring och inneboende missförhållanden i ordrepresentationsmodeller', 'ta': 'வெளியீட்டு கட்டுப்பாடு', 'ur': 'Outta Control: Semantic Change and Inherent Biases in Word Representation Models', 'uz': 'Tashqi boshqaruvi:', 'vi': 'Kiểm soát người ngoài: Luật của biến đổi thành thói quen và lề thói quen trong chế độ Diễn tả từ ngữ', 'bg': 'Извън контрол: Закони за семантична промяна и присъщи предразсъдъци в моделите за представяне на думи', 'hr': 'Kontrola izvana: Zakoni semantičkih promjena i unutrašnjih poremećaja u modelima predstavljanja riječi', 'da': 'Outta Control: Lov om semantisk forandring og indførte fordrejninger i ordrepræsentationsmodeller', 'de': 'Outta Control: Gesetze der semantischen Veränderung und inhärente Vorurteile in Wortdarstellungsmodellen', 'id': 'Kontrol luar: Hukum Perubahan Semantik dan Bias Inherent dalam Model Perwakilan Perkataan', 'ko': '통제불능: 어휘 표징 모델에서 의미 변화 규칙과 고유의 편견', 'fa': 'کنترل بیرون: قانون تغییر سیمانتیک و افزایش داخلی در مدل نمایش کلمات', 'tr': 'Hata Kontrol:', 'nl': 'Outta Control: Wetten van semantische verandering en inherente vooroordelen in woordvertegenwoordigingsmodellen', 'sw': 'Uthibiti wa Taifa: Sheria za Mabadiliko ya Kisemantiki na Mabadiliko yaliyotokana katika Modeli ya Mahakilisho ya neno', 'af': 'Outta Kontrole: Wesse van Semantiese Verandering en Inbinneste Uitbreidings in Woord Voorstelling Modelle', 'sq': 'Kontrolli jashtë: Ligjet e ndryshimeve Semantike dhe dëmtimet e brendshme në modelet e përfaqësimit të fjalëve', 'am': 'የውጤት Control: Laws of Semantic Change and Inherent Biases in Word Representation Models', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներկայացման մոդելներում', 'az': 'D…ôrgahlńĪ Kontrol: Semantik DeńüiŇüiklik v…ô ńį√ßind…ô Kelimi ńįzl…ôm…ô Modell…ôri', 'bs': 'Kontrola izvana: Zakoni semantičkih promjena i unutrašnjih pojačanja u modelima predstavljanja riječi', 'cs': 'Výstupní kontrola: Zákony sémantické změny a inherentní předsudky v modelech reprezentace slov', 'bn': 'আউটপুট নিয়ন্ত্রণ: শব্দ প্রতিনিধিত্ব মোডেলে সেম্যান্টিক পরিবর্তন এবং অভ্যন্ত বায়েসের আইন', 'ca': 'Outta Control: Llei del canvi semàntic i els biaixos inerents en models de representació de paraules', 'fi': 'Outta Control: Semanttisen muutoksen lait ja luontaiset harhaluulot sanaesitysmalleissa', 'et': 'Väljakontroll: Semantiliste muutuste seadused ja sisemised kallakud sõnade esitamise mudelites', 'jv': 'Layout', 'sk': 'Outta Control: Zakoni semantičnih sprememb in naravne pristranskosti v modelih predstavitve besed', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'שליטה מחוץ: חוקים של שינוי סמנטי ובזכויות בתוך מודלים מייצג מילים', 'bo': 'Outta Control: Semantic Change and Inherent Biases in Word Representation Models'}
{'en': 'This article evaluates three proposed laws of semantic change. Our claim is that in order to validate a putative law of semantic change, the effect should be observed in the genuine condition but absent or reduced in a suitably matched control condition, in which no change can possibly have taken place. Our analysis shows that the effects reported in recent literature must be substantially revised : (i) the proposed negative correlation between meaning change and word frequency is shown to be largely an artefact of the models of word representation used ; (ii) the proposed negative correlation between meaning change and prototypicality is shown to be much weaker than what has been claimed in prior art ; and (iii) the proposed positive correlation between meaning change and polysemy is largely an artefact of word frequency. These empirical observations are corroborated by analytical proofs that show that count representations introduce an inherent dependence on word frequency, and thus word frequency can not be evaluated as an independent factor with these representations.', 'ar': 'تقيم هذه المقالة ثلاثة قوانين مقترحة للتغيير الدلالي. ادعائنا هو أنه من أجل التحقق من صحة قانون مفترض للتغيير الدلالي ، يجب ملاحظة التأثير في الحالة الحقيقية ولكنه غائب أو مخفض في حالة تحكم مطابقة بشكل مناسب ، حيث لا يمكن أن يحدث أي تغيير. يوضح تحليلنا أن الآثار التي تم الإبلاغ عنها في الأدبيات الحديثة يجب أن يتم مراجعتها بشكل كبير: (1) يظهر الارتباط السلبي المقترح بين تغيير المعنى وتكرار الكلمات إلى حد كبير من صنع نماذج تمثيل الكلمات المستخدمة ؛ (2) تبين أن الارتباط السلبي المقترح بين تغيير المعنى والنمذجة أضعف بكثير مما قيل في حالة التقنية الصناعية السابقة ؛ و (3) الارتباط الإيجابي المقترح بين تغيير المعنى وتعدد المعاني هو إلى حد كبير نتيجة لتكرار الكلمات. يتم دعم هذه الملاحظات التجريبية من خلال البراهين التحليلية التي تظهر أن تمثيلات العد تقدم اعتمادًا متأصلًا على تكرار الكلمات ، وبالتالي لا يمكن تقييم تكرار الكلمات كعامل مستقل مع هذه التمثيلات.', 'pt': 'Este artigo avalia três propostas de leis de mudança semântica. Nossa alegação é que, para validar uma suposta lei de mudança semântica, o efeito deve ser observado na condição genuína, mas ausente ou reduzido em uma condição de controle adequada, na qual nenhuma mudança pode ter ocorrido. Nossa análise mostra que os efeitos relatados na literatura recente devem ser substancialmente revisados: (i) a correlação negativa proposta entre mudança de significado e frequência de palavras se mostra em grande parte um artefato dos modelos de representação de palavras utilizados; (ii) a correlação negativa proposta entre mudança de significado e prototipidade se mostra muito mais fraca do que o que foi reivindicado na técnica anterior; e (iii) a correlação positiva proposta entre mudança de significado e polissemia é em grande parte um artefato da frequência das palavras. Essas observações empíricas são corroboradas por provas analíticas que mostram que as representações de contagem introduzem uma dependência inerente à frequência das palavras e, portanto, a frequência das palavras não pode ser avaliada como um fator independente com essas representações.', 'es': 'Este artículo evalúa tres leyes propuestas de cambio semántico. Nuestra afirmación es que para validar una ley putativa de cambio semántico, el efecto debe observarse en la condición genuina, pero ausente o reducido en una condición de control adecuadamente coincidente, en la que posiblemente no haya tenido lugar ningún cambio. Nuestro análisis muestra que los efectos reportados en la literatura reciente deben revisarse sustancialmente: (i) se demuestra que la correlación negativa propuesta entre el cambio de significado y la frecuencia de las palabras es en gran medida un artefacto de los modelos de representación de palabras utilizados; (ii) la correlación negativa propuesta entre el significado se demuestra que el cambio y la prototipicidad son mucho más débiles que lo que se ha reivindicado en la técnica anterior; y (iii) la correlación positiva propuesta entre el cambio de significado y la polisemia es en gran medida un artefacto de la frecuencia de palabras. Estas observaciones empíricas están corroboradas por pruebas analíticas que muestran que las representaciones de recuento introducen una dependencia inherente de la frecuencia de las palabras y, por lo tanto, la frecuencia de las palabras no se puede evaluar como un factor independiente con estas representaciones.', 'fr': "Cet article évalue trois lois proposées pour le changement sémantique. Notre affirmation est que pour valider une loi putative de changement sémantique, l'effet devrait être observé dans la condition authentique, mais absent ou réduit dans une condition de contrôle convenablement adaptée, dans laquelle aucun changement ne peut avoir eu lieu. Notre analyse montre que les effets rapportés dans la littérature récente doivent être considérablement révisés\xa0: (i) la corrélation négative proposée entre le changement de signification et la fréquence des mots est largement un artefact des modèles de représentation des mots utilisés\xa0; (ii) la corrélation négative proposée entre la signification le changement et la prototypicalité sont beaucoup plus faibles que ce qui a été revendiqué dans l'état de la technique\xa0; et iii) la corrélation positive proposée entre le changement de sens et la polysémie est en grande partie un artefact de la fréquence des mots. Ces observations empiriques sont corroborées par des preuves analytiques qui montrent que les représentations de dénombrement introduisent une dépendance inhérente à la fréquence des mots, et que la fréquence des mots ne peut donc pas être évaluée en tant que facteur indépendant avec ces représentations.", 'ja': 'この記事では、意味変化の3つの法則を評価しています。 我々の主張は、意味変化の推定法則を検証するために、効果は真の条件で観察されるべきであるが、適切に一致する制御条件では存在しないか、または減少し、その条件では変化が起こらない可能性があるというものである。 我々の分析は、最近の文献で報告された効果が実質的に改訂されなければならないことを示している： （ ｉ ）意味変化と単語頻度との間の提案された負の相関は、使用された単語表現のモデルのアーティファクトであることがほとんど示されている； （ ｉ ｉ ）意味変化とプロトタイプ性との間の提案された負の相関は、先行技術で主張されているものよりもはるかに弱いことが示されている；及び（ ｉｉｉｉ ）意味変化と多義性との間の提案された正の相関は、ほとんどの場合、単語頻度のアーティファクトである。 これらの経験的観察は、カウント表現が単語頻度への固有の依存性を導入することを示す分析的証明によって裏付けられており、したがって、単語頻度は、これらの表現を伴う独立した要因として評価することはできない。', 'zh': '本文评语义变三议定律。 吾道者,所以验语义变化之推定律,宜观效于真,而制御无损,不可得而变也。 臣等之分析表明,必于近文大改:(一)所议变化与词频之间负相关系于大者为用词人工制品;(二)所建义变与词频之间者负相关大者为用词;(二)所建者为词频间。 二)之义,变词频之负相关也;二)之义,词频之大也;(二)之义,词频之负相关也;二)之义,词频之负相关也;二)之义,变词频之负也 (ii)所议变化,与原型性之负相关,验于今术之称弱多矣。 (iii)所建义变化与多义之际,其为词频伪影多矣。 验而得之,明于对词频率之固依赖性,故频率不得以为独因也。', 'hi': 'यह लेख शब्दार्थ परिवर्तन के तीन प्रस्तावित कानूनों का मूल्यांकन करता है। हमारा दावा यह है कि शब्दार्थ परिवर्तन के एक परिष्कृत कानून को मान्य करने के लिए, प्रभाव को वास्तविक स्थिति में देखा जाना चाहिए, लेकिन उचित रूप से मिलान की गई नियंत्रण स्थिति में अनुपस्थित या कम हो गया है, जिसमें संभवतः कोई बदलाव नहीं हो सकता है। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हाल के साहित्य में रिपोर्ट किए गए प्रभावों को काफी हद तक संशोधित किया जाना चाहिए: (i) अर्थ परिवर्तन और शब्द आवृत्ति के बीच प्रस्तावित नकारात्मक सहसंबंध को काफी हद तक उपयोग किए गए शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के मॉडल की एक कलाकृति के रूप में दिखाया गया है; (ii) अर्थ परिवर्तन और प्रोटोटाइपिटी के बीच प्रस्तावित नकारात्मक सहसंबंध को पूर्व कला में दावा किए गए दावों की तुलना में बहुत कमजोर दिखाया गया है; और (iii) अर्थ परिवर्तन और पॉलीसेमी के बीच प्रस्तावित सकारात्मक सहसंबंध काफी हद तक शब्द आवृत्ति की एक कलाकृति है। इन अनुभवजन्य टिप्पणियों को विश्लेषणात्मक प्रमाणों द्वारा पुष्टि की जाती है जो दिखाते हैं कि गिनती के प्रतिनिधित्व शब्द आवृत्ति पर एक अंतर्निहित निर्भरता का परिचय देते हैं, और इस प्रकार शब्द आवृत्ति का मूल्यांकन इन प्रतिनिधित्वों के साथ एक स्वतंत्र कारक के रूप में नहीं किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье оцениваются три предлагаемых закона семантических изменений. Наше утверждение заключается в том, что для подтверждения предполагаемого закона семантических изменений, эффект должен наблюдаться в подлинном состоянии, но отсутствует или уменьшен в надлежащим образом подобранном состоянии управления, в котором никакие изменения не могли произойти. Наш анализ показывает, что эффекты, описанные в недавней литературе, должны быть существенно пересмотрены: (i) предлагаемая отрицательная корреляция между изменением значения и частотой слов, как показано, в значительной степени является артефактом используемых моделей представления слов; (ii) предлагаемая отрицательная корреляция между изменением значения и прототипичностью, как показано, гораздо слабее, чем то, что заявлено в предшествующем уровне техники; и (iii) предлагаемая положительная корреляция между изменением значения и полисемией, как правило, является артефактом частоты слов. Эти эмпирические наблюдения подтверждаются аналитическими доказательствами, которые показывают, что количественные представления вводят неотъемлемую зависимость от частоты слов, и, таким образом, частота слов не может быть оценена как независимый фактор с этими представлениями.', 'ga': 'Déanann an t-alt seo measúnú ar thrí dhlí atá beartaithe maidir le hathrú shéimeantach. Is é an t-éileamh atá againn, chun dlí toimhdiúil an athraithe shéimeantaigh a bhailíochtú, gur cheart an éifeacht a urramú sa fhíorbhail ach nach bhfuil nó go laghdófaí é i riocht rialaithe atá comhoiriúnaithe go cuí, nach féidir aon athrú a bheith déanta air. Léiríonn ár n-anailís nach mór athbhreithniú substaintiúil a dhéanamh ar na héifeachtaí a tuairiscíodh sa litríocht le déanaí: (i) taispeántar gur déantúsán den chuid is mó de na múnlaí léiriú focal a úsáidtear an comhghaol diúltach atá beartaithe idir athrú brí agus minicíocht focal; (ii) go léirítear go bhfuil an comhghaol diúltach atá beartaithe idir athrú brí agus fréamhshamhla i bhfad níos laige ná mar a dúradh san ealaín roimhe seo; agus (iii) gur déantán minicíochta focal den chuid is mó atá sa chomhghaolmhaireacht dhearfach a mholtar idir athrú brí agus ilseimi. Tá cruthúnais anailíse mar thaca leis na breathnuithe eimpíreacha seo a thaispeánann go dtugann léirithe comhairimh spleáchas bunúsach ar mhinicíocht focal, agus mar sin ní féidir minicíocht focal a mheas mar fhachtóir neamhspleách leis na léirithe seo.', 'el': 'Το άρθρο αυτό αξιολογεί τρεις προτεινόμενους νόμους της σημασιολογικής αλλαγής. Ο ισχυρισμός μας είναι ότι για να επικυρωθεί ένας υποτιθέμενος νόμος σημασιολογικής αλλαγής, η επίδραση θα πρέπει να παρατηρείται στην πραγματική κατάσταση αλλά να απουσιάζει ή να μειώνεται σε μια κατάλληλα αντιστοιχισμένη κατάσταση ελέγχου, στην οποία δεν μπορεί ενδεχομένως να έχει πραγματοποιηθεί καμία αλλαγή. Η ανάλυσή μας δείχνει ότι οι επιπτώσεις που αναφέρονται στην πρόσφατη βιβλιογραφία πρέπει να αναθεωρηθούν ουσιαστικά: (i) η προτεινόμενη αρνητική συσχέτιση μεταξύ μεταβολής της έννοιας και συχνότητας λέξεων αποδεικνύεται ότι αποτελεί σε μεγάλο βαθμό ένα τεχνούργημα των χρησιμοποιούμενων μοντέλων αναπαράστασης λέξεων. (ii) η προτεινόμενη αρνητική συσχέτιση μεταξύ της μεταβολής της έννοιας και της πρωτοτυπικότητας αποδεικνύεται πολύ ασθενέστερη από ό,τι ισχυρίζεται στην προηγούμενη τεχνική· και iii) η προτεινόμενη θετική συσχέτιση μεταξύ της μεταβολής της έννοιας και της πολυσημίας είναι σε μεγάλο βαθμό ένα τεχνούργημα της συχνότητας των λέξεων. Αυτές οι εμπειρικές παρατηρήσεις επιβεβαιώνονται από αναλυτικές αποδείξεις που δείχνουν ότι οι αριθμητικές αναπαραστάσεις εισάγουν μια εγγενή εξάρτηση από τη συχνότητα των λέξεων, και επομένως η συχνότητα των λέξεων δεν μπορεί να αξιολογηθεί ως ανεξάρτητος παράγοντας με αυτές τις αναπαραστάσεις.', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk a szemantikai változás három javasolt törvényét értékeli. Állításunk szerint a szemantikai változás feltételezhető törvényének érvényesítése érdekében a hatást a valódi állapotban kell figyelni, de hiányzik vagy csökkenteni kell egy megfelelően illeszkedő kontrollállapotban, amelyben nem történhetett változás. Elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy a közelmúltbeli szakirodalomban jelentett hatásokat jelentősen át kell vizsgálni: (i) a jelentésváltozás és a szógyakoriság közötti javasolt negatív korreláció nagyrészt az alkalmazott szóreprezentációs modellek műtárgyának bizonyul; ii. a jelentésváltozás és a prototípus közötti javasolt negatív összefüggés sokkal gyengébbnek bizonyul, mint amit korábbi művészetben állítottak; és iii. a jelentésváltozás és a poliszemia közötti javasolt pozitív korreláció nagyrészt a szógyakoriság tárgya. Ezeket az empirikus megfigyeléseket analitikai bizonyítékok alátámasztják, amelyek azt mutatják, hogy a számlálási reprezentációk eredendő függést vezetnek be a szófrekvenciától, így a szófrekvenciát ezeknél a reprezentációknál nem lehet önálló tényezőként értékelni.', 'ka': 'ეს წესტია სამი წესტილი სემონტიკური ცვლილების წესტის შესახებ. ჩვენი წარმოდგენა, რომ სემონტიკური ცვლილების კონტაქტიური წარმოდგენისთვის, ეფექტის შესახებ უნდა იყოს ნამდვილად შესახებ, მაგრამ არსებობს ან შემცირებულია სწორად მსგავსი კონტროლური ჩვენი ანალიზაციაში გამოჩვენება, რომ ახალი ლიტურაციაში შეტყობინებული ეფექტები უნდა იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი რედაქტირება: ii) წარმოიდგინეთ მინიშვნელოვანი ცვლილება და პროტიპიფიკატის შორის მინიშვნელოვანი უფრო ცოტა იქნება, ვიდრე რაც წინა წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთში; და iii) პროგრამეტური კოლექცია ცვლილება და პოლისემის შორის შორის უფრო მეტი სიტყვების სიტყვების არტეფექტია. ეს ემპერიკური მონაცემები იქნება ანალიტიკური წარმოდგენებით, რომელიც გამოჩვენება, რომ წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების შესახებ სიტყვების წარმოდგენების შესახებ, და ამიტომ სიტყვების წარმოდგენები ვერ', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje vertinami trys siūlomi semantinių pokyčių įstatymai. Mūsų teiginys yra tas, kad siekiant patvirtinti tariamą semantinio pokyčio teisę, poveikis turėtų būti pastebimas tikroje būklėje, tačiau nėra arba sumažintas tinkamai suderintoje kontrolės būklėje, kurioje jokių pokyčių nebuvo galima padaryti. Mūsų analizė rodo, kad pastarojoje literatūroje pastebėtas poveikis turi būti i š esmės peržiūrėtas: i) pasiūlyta neigiama reikšmės pokyčio ir žodžių dažnio koreliacija iš esmės yra naudojamų žodžių atstovavimo modelių objektas; ii) pasiūlyta neigiama reikšmės pokyčio ir prototipiškumo koreliacija yra daug silpnesnė nei anksčiau buvo teigiama; ir iii) siūloma teigiama reikšmės pokyčio ir polisemijos koreliacija iš esmės yra žodžių dažnio objektas. Šie empiriniai stebėjimai patvirtinami analiziniais įrodymais, kurie rodo, kad skaičiaus atvaizdai turi būdingą priklausomybę nuo žodžių dažnio, todėl žodžių dažnis negali būti vertinamas kaip nepriklausomas veiksnys su šiais atvaizdais.', 'it': "Questo articolo valuta tre leggi proposte di cambiamento semantico. La nostra affermazione è che al fine di convalidare una presunta legge del cambiamento semantico, l'effetto dovrebbe essere osservato nella condizione reale ma assente o ridotto in una condizione di controllo adeguatamente abbinata, in cui non può essere stato possibile alcun cambiamento. La nostra analisi mostra che gli effetti riportati nella letteratura recente devono essere sostanzialmente rivisti: (i) la correlazione negativa proposta tra cambiamento di significato e frequenza delle parole è risultata essere in gran parte un artefatto dei modelli di rappresentazione delle parole utilizzati; ii) la correlazione negativa proposta tra cambiamento di significato e prototipicità è risultata molto più debole di quanto affermato nell'art precedente; e (iii) la correlazione positiva proposta tra cambiamento di significato e polisemia è in gran parte un artefatto della frequenza delle parole. Queste osservazioni empiriche sono corroborate da prove analitiche che dimostrano che le rappresentazioni dei conteggi introducono una dipendenza intrinseca dalla frequenza delle parole, e quindi la frequenza delle parole non può essere valutata come un fattore indipendente con queste rappresentazioni.", 'kk': 'Бұл мақала семантикалық өзгертулердің үш ұсынылған законы бағалады. Біздің жарияламыз, семантикалық өзгерістерді тексеру үшін, эффекті дұрыс жағдайда қарау керек, бірақ жоқ немесе дұрыс сәйкес келетін контрол жағдайда төмендету керек, бұл жағдайда өзгерістер болмайды. Біздің анализациямыз жаңа әдебиетке жазылған эффекттердің көпшілігін қайта қайта қарау керек дегенді көрсетеді: i) мәліметтің өзгерістері мен сөздің жиілігі арасындағы негативті корреляция көпшілігін ii) мәліметті өзгерту мен прототипиталық арасындағы негативті корреляция алдыңғы өзгертілген әртүрліктерден артық деп көрсетіледі; iii) мәліметтің өзгерту мен полицемия арасындағы оң жақсы корелекциясы үлкен сөздер жиілігінің артефакты. Бұл эмпирикалық байқаулары сөздің жиілігіне тәуелдік тәуелдігін көрсетейтін аналитикалық мәліметтер бойынша бапталған, сондықтан сөздің жиілігі осы келтірімдермен тәуелдік фактор ретінде бапталмайды.', 'mk': 'This article evaluates three proposed laws of semantic change.  Нашето тврдење е дека за да го потврдиме законот за семантична промена, ефектот треба да се набљудува во вистинска состојба, но отсутен или намален во соодветно соодветна контролна состојба, во која не може да се случи промена. Нашата анализа покажува дека ефектите известени во неодамнешната литература мора да бидат значително ревидирани: (i) предложената негативна корелација помеѓу значењето промена и фреквенцијата на зборовите се покажа дека е во голема мера артефакт на моделите на употребена ре (ii) предложената негативна корелација помеѓу значењето промена и прототипичноста се покажува дека е многу послабна од она што се тврди во претходната уметност; и (iii) предложената позитивна корелација помеѓу значењето промена и полисемија е во голема мера артефакт на фреквенција на зборови. Овие емпирички набљудувања се потврдени со аналитички докази кои покажуваат дека бројните претставувања воведуваат inerente зависност од фреквенцијата на зборовите, и така фреквенцијата на зборовите не може да се оценува како независен фактор со овие претставувања.', 'ml': 'ഈ ലേഖനത്തിന്റെ മൂന്നു പ്രാദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ആവശ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നാണ് സെമാന്റിക് മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നതെന്ന്, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d പ്രഭാവം കാണുന്നതാണ്. പക്ഷ അടുത്ത സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിക്കും മാറ്റം വരുത്തണമെന്ന് നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു: (i) അര (ii) മുമ്പുള്ള കലാകാരത്തില്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളും പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള നേരി (ഐ) ഉദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പോളിസിമിയ്ക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള സാധാരണ ബന്ധമാണ് വാക്കിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ വാക്കിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ ശാസ്ത്രീയാലുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഈ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт 3 төлөвлөгдсөн шинэчлэлийн хуулийг үнэлдэг. Бидний хүлээн зөвшөөрөлтийг баталахын тулд зөв нөхцөлд нөлөө үзүүлэх хэрэгтэй, гэхдээ зөв нөхцөл байдалд байхгүй, эсвэл багасгах хэрэгтэй хяналтын нөхцөл байдалд ямар ч өөрчлөлт хийж чадахгүй. Бидний шинжилгээнд саяхан уран зохиолынхаа зарцуулагдсан нөлөөлүүдийг олон дахин шинэчлэх хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна: ii) гэсэн утгатай өөрчлөлт болон прототипийн хооронд санал өгсөн сөрөг харилцаа нь өмнө урлагийн хувьд хэлэгдсэн зүйлээс илүү бага байдаг. iii) утгатай өөрчлөлт болон полицемийн хоорондын эерэг харилцаа гэдэг нь ихэнхдээ үгний давтамжтай артефакт юм. Эдгээр эмперикийн ажиглалтууд нь илтгэлийн тоо хэмжээнд хамааралтай байдлыг харуулж байгаа шинжилгээний баталгаагаар дүгнэж байна. Тиймээс илтгэлийн хэмжээсүүд нь хамааралтай хүчин зүйл гэдгийг харуулж чадахгүй.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini menilai tiga undang-undang diusulkan perubahan semantik. Menurut pendapat kami, untuk mengesahkan undang-undang putative perubahan semantik, kesan patut diperhatikan dalam keadaan sebenar tetapi tidak ada atau dikurangkan dalam keadaan kawalan yang sepadan dengan yang sepadan, di mana tiada perubahan mungkin telah berlaku. Our analysis shows that the effects reported in recent literature must be substantially revised: (i) the proposed negative correlation between meaning change and word frequency is shown to be largely an artefact of the models of word representation used;  (ii) korelasi negatif yang diusulkan diantara perubahan makna dan prototipikaliti menunjukkan menjadi jauh lebih lemah daripada apa yang telah dikatakan dalam seni terdahulu; dan (iii) korelasi positif yang diusulkan antara perubahan makna dan polisemi adalah sebahagian besar artefakta frekuensi perkataan. Perhatian empirik ini disahkan oleh bukti analitik yang menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan kiraan memperkenalkan dependensi yang terkandung pada frekuensi perkataan, dan oleh itu frekuensi perkataan tidak boleh diandalkan sebagai faktor independen dengan perwakilan ini.', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jevalwa tliet liġijiet proposti ta’ bidla semantika. L-istqarrija tagħna hija li sabiex tiġi vvalidata liġi putattiva ta’ bidla semantika, l-effett għandu jiġi osservat fil-kundizzjoni ġenwina iżda assenti jew imnaqqas f’kundizzjoni ta’ kontroll imqabbla b’mod xieraq, li fiha possibilment ma setgħet isseħħ l-ebda bidla. L-analiżi tagħna turi li l-effetti rrappurtati fil-letteratura reċenti jridu jiġu riveduti sostanzjalment: (i) il-korrelazzjoni negattiva proposta bejn it-tibdil fit-tifsira u l-frekwenza tal-kliem tintwera li hija fil-biċċa l-kbira artefatt tal-mudelli tar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-kliem użati; (ii) il-korrelazzjoni negattiva proposta bejn it-tibdil fit-tifsira u l-prototipikità tintwera li hija ħafna aktar dgħajfa minn dik li kienet iddikjarata fl-arti preċedenti; u (iii) il-korrelazzjoni pożittiva proposta bejn it-tibdil fit-tifsira u l-polisimja hija fil-biċċa l-kbira artefatt tal-frekwenza tal-kliem. Dawn l-osservazzjonijiet empiriċi huma kkonfermati minn provi analitiċi li juru li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-għadd jintroduċu dipendenza inerenti fuq il-frekwenza tal-kliem, u għalhekk il-frekwenza tal-kliem ma tistax tiġi evalwata bħala fattur indipendenti b’dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet.', 'pl': 'W artykule dokonano oceny trzech proponowanych praw zmiany semantycznej. Naszym twierdzeniem jest, że w celu zatwierdzenia domniemanego prawa zmiany semantycznej efekt ten powinien być obserwowany w stanie rzeczywistym, ale nieobecny lub zmniejszony w odpowiednio dopasowanym stanie kontrolnym, w którym nie mogła mieć miejsca żadna zmiana. Z naszej analizy wynika, że efekty opisane w ostatniej literaturze muszą zostać istotnie zmienione: (i) proponowana negatywna korelacja między zmianą znaczenia a częstotliwością słów okazuje się w dużej mierze artefaktem stosowanych modeli reprezentacji słów; (ii) proponowana negatywna korelacja między zmianą znaczenia a prototypowością okazuje się znacznie słabsza niż twierdzona w postaci techniki; oraz (iii) proponowana pozytywna korelacja między zmianą znaczenia a polisemią jest w dużej mierze artefaktem częstotliwości słów. Te empiryczne obserwacje potwierdzają analityczne dowody, które pokazują, że reprezentacje liczbowe wprowadzają nieodłączną zależność od częstotliwości słów, a zatem częstotliwość słów nie może być oceniana jako niezależny czynnik z tymi reprezentacjami.', 'ro': 'Acest articol evaluează trei legi propuse de schimbare semantică. Susținerea noastră este că, pentru a valida o posibilă lege a schimbării semantice, efectul ar trebui observat în starea reală, dar absent sau redus într-o condiție de control corespunzător, în care nici o modificare nu ar fi putut avea loc. Analiza noastră arată că efectele raportate în literatura de specialitate recentă trebuie revizuite substanțial: (i) corelația negativă propusă între schimbarea semnificației și frecvența cuvântului se dovedește a fi în mare măsură un artefact al modelelor de reprezentare a cuvintelor utilizate; (ii) corelația negativă propusă între schimbarea semnificației și prototipicitatea se dovedește a fi mult mai slabă decât cea susținută în art anterior; și (iii) corelația pozitivă propusă între schimbarea semnificației și polisemie este în mare măsură un artefact al frecvenței cuvintelor. Aceste observații empirice sunt coroborate de dovezi analitice care arată că reprezentările numărătoare introduc o dependență inerentă de frecvența cuvântului, și astfel frecvența cuvântului nu poate fi evaluată ca un factor independent cu aceste reprezentări.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen evaluerer tre foreslått semantiske endringar. Vårt søknad er at for å validera ein positiv lov om semantiske endringar, bør effekten bli observert i det trule vilkåret, men ikkje finst eller redusert i eit passende kontrollsvilkåret, der ingen endring kan truleg ha skjedd. Analysen vårt viser at effektane rapporterte i nyleg literatur må vera vanleg gjennomsett: i) den foreslåde negativ korrelasjonen mellom meningsendringar og ordfrekvensen vert vist som stort ein artefakt av modelane av ordrepresentasjonen brukt. ii) den foreslåde negativ korrelasjonen mellom meningsendringar og prototypitet vert vist til å vera mykje svakere enn det som er tvrd i førre kunst; og iii) den første positiv korrelasjonen mellom endringar og polysemet er stort ein artefakt av ordfrekvensen. Desse empiriske observasjonane er korriberte av analytiske beviser som viser at tale representasjonar introduserer ein inherent avhengig av ordfrekvenset, og derfor kan ordfrekvensen ikkje evaluerast som ein uavhengig faktor med desse representasjonane.', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak procjenjuje tri predložene zakona semantičkih promjena. Naša tvrdnja je da bi u potvrđivanju pozitivnog zakona semantičkih promjena, efekt bi trebao biti posmatran u istinskom stanju, ali odsutan ili smanjen u odgovarajućem podudaranom stanju kontrole, u kojem se ne može dogoditi nikakva promjena. Naša analiza pokazuje da se efekti koji su prijavljeni u nedavnoj literaturi moraju znatno pregledati: i) predložena negativna korelacija između značenja promjene i frekvencije riječi pokazuje da su u velikoj meri artefakt modela korištenog predstavljanja riječi; ii) predložena negativna korelacija između promjene značenja i prototipičnosti pokazuje se da je mnogo slaba od onoga što je navedeno u prethodnoj umjetnosti; i iii) predložena pozitivna korelacija između promjene značenja i polizemije je uglavnom artefakt frekvencije riječi. Ove empiričke promatranja potvrđuju analitički dokazi koji pokazuju da broj predstavljanja predstavlja neovisnu zavisnost od frekvencije riječi, a tako se frekvencija riječi ne može proceniti kao nezavisni faktor sa ovim predstavljanjima.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය සමාන්\u200dය වෙනස් නීතිය තුනක් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි සෙමාන්තික වෙනස් නීතියක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇත්ත අවස්ථාවයේ බලන්න ඕනි නමුත් නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නියෝ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අලුත් සාක්ෂිත්\u200dරයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාර ප්\u200dරතිකාර පරීක්ෂණය වෙන්න ඕන: (i) ප්\u200dරතිකාරිත වෙනස් සහ වචන සාක්ෂිත්\u200dරය අතර (2) අදහස් වෙනස් සහ ප්\u200dරොටෝප්\u200dරොටෝප්\u200dරියෝජනය අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ඒ වගේම (Ii) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් වෙනස් සහ පොලිසිමිය අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වචන විශ් මේ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණ සාක්ෂිකයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්නෙ ගණන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේ', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa qiimeynaya saddex sharciyadood oo la soo jeeday beddelka mida. Dacwadeena waa in, in loo xaqiijiyo sharciga isbedelka ah, saamaynta waa in la arki karo xaalada runta ah, laakiin la maqnaado ama lagama gaabin karo xaalad u eg xaaladda kontrollka, taas oo aan beddelin karin. Analyskayagu wuxuu muujiyaa in saameyaasha la soo sheegay ee ugu dambeeyey ay tahay in loo soo beddelo si weyn: (i) xiriirka la soo jeeday wax diidmo ah oo u dhexeeya beddelka maanka iyo frequencka hadalka waxaa looga muujiyaa in aad u badan muuqata muuqashada qaababka loo soo bandhigayo hadalka; (ii) xiriirka la soo jeeday wax diidmo ah oo u dhexeeya isbedelka iyo tusaale ahaan, waxay u muuqataa inay ka itaal yar tahay wixii lagu sheegay farshaxanta hore; (iii) xiriirka wanaagsanaa ee la soo jeedo isbedelka iyo isbedelka waxaa ugu badan xarunta isbedelka hadalka. aragtidan faa'iidada ah waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa calaamado baaritaanka ah oo muujiya in tirada tiraduhu ay ka dhigaan mid ku hoos-xiran freymada hadalka, oo sidaas darteed frequencada hadalka laguma qiimeyn karo sabab xor ah oo ay ku shaqeeyaan.", 'sv': 'Denna artikel utvärderar tre föreslagna lagar för semantisk förändring. Vårt påstående är att för att validera en förmodad lag om semantisk förändring, bör effekten observeras i det verkliga tillståndet men frånvarande eller reducerad i ett lämpligt matchat kontrolltillstånd, där ingen förändring möjligen kan ha skett. Vår analys visar att de effekter som rapporterats i den senaste litteraturen måste revideras väsentligt: (i) den föreslagna negativa korrelationen mellan betydelseförändring och ordfrekvens har visat sig vara till stor del en artefakt av de modeller för ordrepresentation som används; ii) Det föreslagna negativa sambandet mellan meningsförändring och prototypisk karaktär har visat sig vara mycket svagare än vad som hävdats i tidigare artikel. och (iii) den föreslagna positiva korrelationen mellan betydelseförändring och polysemi är till stor del ett artefakt av ordfrekvens. Dessa empiriska observationer bekräftas av analytiska bevis som visar att nummerrepresentationer medför ett inneboende beroende av ordfrekvens, och därför kan ordfrekvensen inte utvärderas som en oberoende faktor med dessa representationer.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை மூன்று பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாற்றத்தின் சட்டங்களை மதிப்பிடுகிறது. எங்கள் கூறுதல் என்னவென்றால் பெம்பிண்டிக் மாற்றத்தை சரிபார்ப்பதற்கு, உண்மையான நிலையில் விளைவு பார்க்கப்பட வேண்டும் ஆனால் மறைந்து அல்லது பொருத அண்மையில் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட விளைவுகள் கண்டிப்பாக மாற்ற வேண்டும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது: (i) உபயோகிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரியின் மாத (ii) முன்னால் கலைகளில் கூறியதை விட மிகவும் பலஹீனமாக இருக்கும் என்று காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பது அர்த்தமான மாற்றம் மற்றும் ந (i) பொருள் மாற்றம் மற்றும் பாலிசீமிக்கும் இடையே தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட நேர்ம இணைப்பு பெரும்பாலானது வார்த்த இந்த முக்கியமான பார்வைகள் ஆராய்ச்சியல் தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. எண்ணிக்கைகள் சொல்லு வெளியீட்டின் மீது உள்ளமையான சார்ந்த சார்ந்திருக்கும், அதனால', 'ur': 'یہ لکھی تین پیشنهاد کی قوانین سیمنٹی بدلنے کی ارزش کرتی ہے. ہماری دعوت یہ ہے کہ اس لیے کہ ایک قانون کی تصدیق کرنے کے لیے سچی شرط میں اثر نظر آئیں لیکن غیب یا کم ہو جائیں ایک مناسب کنٹرول شرط میں جس میں کوئی تبدیلی نہیں ہو سکتی۔ ہماری تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ اچھی ادبیات میں گزاری ہوئی اثرات بہت زیادہ تغییر کرنا چاہیے: (i) پیشنهاد کی منفی تغییر اور کلمات فرکانس کے درمیان تغییر کا ارتباط معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ اکثر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کلمات کی نمونڈل کی مو (ii) پیشنهاد منفی تغییر اور پیٹوٹیپٹیپٹیپٹیپٹی کے درمیان تغییر کی نسبت بہت کمزور کی بات دکھائی جاتی ہے۔ اور (iii) مقرر کیا گیا مثبت تغییر اور پلیسمی کے درمیان مثبت تعلق ہے، اکثر کلمات کی فرکانس کا ایک حصہ ہے۔ یہ امپریکل نظارت تحقیقات کے ذریعہ تحقیقات کے ذریعہ ثابت ہوتے ہیں جو دکھاتے ہیں کہ نمونات کا شمار کلمات فرکانس پر ایک سردار اعتماد ہے، اور اسی طرح کلمات فرکانس کو ان نمونات کے ساتھ مستقل فاکتور کے طور پر مقرر نہیں کیا جاتا۔', 'uz': "Bu maqola semantik o'zgarishni uchta davomida qiymatlaydi. Bizning davomida, semantik o'zgarishni to ʻgʻri qilish uchun shu amalni haqiqiqiy holatda ko'rsatish kerak, ammo o o'zgarishlar hech qachon holatda yetishmaydi. Analytikizni koʻrsatish: Yaqinda hisoblangan matnning effektlari butunlay o'zgartirilishi kerak: (i) ma'nosidagi oʻzgarishlar va soʻzning freymi orasidagi negativ aloqani ko'rsatish mumkin, bu soʻzning freymi ishlatilgan so'zni tashkilotlarining modellarining eng katta qiymatligi mumkin; (ii) Birinchi sanada davomida o'zgarishlar va prototypliklik orasidagi negativ bog'liq o'zgarishlar va o'zgarishlar orasidagi bog'liq ko'rinadi; (iii) iloji qilingan yaxshi bog'liq o'zgarishlar va polysemi orasidagi o'zgarishlar juda katta so'zning freymi. Ushbu imkoniyatlar analytik hujjatlari bilan bog'liqlangan narsalarni koʻrsatish mumkin, bu soʻzning freymlarini so'zning tarkibi imkoniyatlariga ishlatish mumkin, va shunday qilib so'zning freymi bu tashkilotlari bilan boshqa faktor sifatida qiymatib boʻlmaydi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này đánh giá ba dự luật thay đổi ngữ pháp. Theo chúng tôi thì, để xác định một quy luật về sự biến đổi theo ngữ pháp, hiệu quả phải được ghi nhận trong tình trạng thực tế nhưng không có hay giảm trong một điều kiện kiểm soát tương xứng, mà không có sự thay đổi nào có thể xảy ra. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy các tác động được báo cáo trong văn học gần đây cần phải được chỉnh sửa đáng kể: i) Sự tương quan âm tính giữa sự thay đổi ý nghĩa và tần số từ được cho thấy hầu như là động vật của các mô hình miêu tả từ được dùng; Sự tương quan âm tính giữa sự thay đổi ý nghĩa và sự thiên nhiên đã được đề nghị trở nên yếu hơn nhiều so với những gì đã được tuyên bố trong nghệ thuật trước. Và III, việc tương đối với sự tương đối nhận của sự thay đổi trí ý và đổi động động đại. Những nhận xét này được xác thực bằng các bằng chứng phân tích cho thấy các biểu hiện đếm giới sẽ tự phụ thuộc vào tần số từ, và do đó tần số từ không thể được đánh giá là nhân tố độc lập với các biểu hiện này.', 'bg': 'Тази статия оценява три предложени закона за семантична промяна. Нашето твърдение е, че за да се валидира предполагаем закон за семантична промяна, ефектът трябва да се наблюдава в истинското състояние, но отсъства или намалява в подходящо съответстващо състояние на контрол, при което промяна не може да е настъпила. Анализът ни показва, че ефектите, докладвани в последната литература, трябва да бъдат съществено преразгледани: (i) предложената отрицателна корелация между промяната на значението и честотата на думата е доказана като до голяма степен артефакт на използваните модели за представяне на думата; (ii) предложената отрицателна корелация между промяната на смисъла и прототипичността е показана като много по-слаба от твърдението в предишния чл. и (iii) предложената положителна корелация между промяната на значението и полисемията е до голяма степен артефакт на честотата на думите. Тези емпирични наблюдения са потвърдени от аналитични доказателства, които показват, че представленията на бройката въвеждат присъща зависимост от честотата на словото и следователно честотата на словото не може да бъде оценена като независим фактор с тези представления.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel evalueert drie voorgestelde wetten van semantische verandering. Onze bewering is dat, om een vermoedelijke wet van semantische verandering te valideren, het effect moet worden waargenomen in de werkelijke toestand, maar afwezig of verminderd in een passende controletoestand, waarin geen verandering mogelijk kan zijn geweest. Uit onze analyse blijkt dat de in recente literatuur gerapporteerde effecten grondig moeten worden herzien: (i) de voorgestelde negatieve correlatie tussen betekenisverandering en woordfrequentie blijkt grotendeels een artefact te zijn van de gebruikte modellen voor woordrepresentatie; ii) de voorgestelde negatieve correlatie tussen betekenisverandering en prototypaliteit blijkt veel zwakker te zijn dan wat in de stand van de techniek wordt beweerd; en iii) de voorgestelde positieve correlatie tussen betekenisverandering en polysemie is grotendeels een artefact van woordfrequentie. Deze empirische waarnemingen worden bevestigd door analytische bewijzen die aantonen dat telrepresentaties een inherente afhankelijkheid van woordfrequentie introduceren, en dus woordfrequentie niet als onafhankelijke factor met deze representaties kan worden beoordeeld.', 'id': 'Artikel ini mengevaluasi tiga hukum yang diusulkan untuk perubahan semantis. Klaim kami adalah untuk mengkvalifikasi hukum putatif perubahan semantis, efek harus diawasi dalam kondisi asli tetapi tidak ada atau dikurangi dalam kondisi kontrol yang cocok, di mana tidak ada perubahan yang mungkin terjadi. Our analysis shows that the effects reported in recent literature must be substantially revised: (i) the proposed negative correlation between meaning change and word frequency is shown to be largely an artefact of the models of word representation used;  (ii) korelasi negatif yang diusulkan antara perubahan arti dan prototipikitas terbukti jauh lebih lemah dari apa yang telah diklaim dalam seni sebelumnya; dan iii) korelasi positif yang diusulkan antara perubahan arti dan polisemi adalah sebagian besar artefakta frekuensi kata. Perhatian empirik ini dikoreksi oleh bukti analitis yang menunjukkan bahwa representation hitungan memperkenalkan ketergantuan pada frekuensi kata, dan oleh itu frekuensi kata tidak dapat diukur sebagai faktor independen dengan representation ini.', 'ko': '본고는 세 가지 제시된 의미 변화 규칙을 평가했다.우리의 주장은 가정의 의미 변화 규칙을 검증하기 위해서는 진실한 조건에서 이런 효과를 관찰해야 하지만 적절하게 일치하는 통제 조건에서 이런 효과는 존재하지 않거나 감소하며 이런 조건에서 변화가 발생할 수 없다는 것이다.우리의 분석에 의하면 최근 문헌에서 보도된 효과는 반드시 실질적인 수정을 해야 한다. (i) 제기된 의미 변화와 단어 주파수 간의 마이너스 관계는 어느 정도에 사용된 단어 표징 모델의 산물이다.(ii) 제시된 의미 변화와 원형성 간의 마이너스 관련성은 기존 기술에서 주장한 것보다 훨씬 약하다는 것이 증명되었다.(iii)가 제기한 의미 변화와 다의어 간의 상관관계는 어느 정도에 단어의 빈도수의 허상이다.이러한 경험적 관찰은 분석적 증명을 통해 증명 계수는 단어의 주파수에 대한 고유한 의존을 도입했기 때문에 단어의 주파수는 이런 표현의 독립적인 요소로 평가할 수 없다.', 'da': 'Denne artikel evaluerer tre foreslåede love for semantisk ændring. Vores påstand er, at for at validere en formodet lov om semantisk ændring bør virkningen observeres i den egentlige tilstand, men fravære eller reduceres i en passende matchet kontroltilstand, hvor ingen ændring muligvis kan have fundet sted. Vores analyse viser, at de virkninger, der er rapporteret i nyere litteratur, skal revideres væsentligt: (i) den foreslåede negative sammenhæng mellem betydningsændring og ordhyppighed viser sig i vid udstrækning at være en artefakt af de anvendte modeller for ordrepræsentation; ii) den foreslåede negative sammenhæng mellem betydningsændring og prototypisk karakter vises at være meget svagere end det, der er hævdet i tidligere kunst og iii) den foreslåede positive sammenhæng mellem betydningsændring og polysemi er stort set et artefakt af ordfrekvens. Disse empiriske observationer bekræftes af analytiske beviser, der viser, at tællerepræsentationer indfører en iboende afhængighed af ordfrekvens, og derfor kan ordfrekvensen ikke vurderes som en uafhængig faktor med disse repræsentationer.', 'de': 'In diesem Artikel werden drei vorgeschlagene Gesetze des semantischen Wandels evaluiert. Unsere Behauptung ist, dass, um ein vermeintliches Gesetz der semantischen Veränderung zu validieren, der Effekt in der echten Bedingung beobachtet werden sollte, aber in einer angemessen abgestimmten Kontrollbedingung fehlt oder reduziert werden sollte, in der möglicherweise keine Änderung stattgefunden haben kann. Unsere Analyse zeigt, dass die in der neueren Literatur berichteten Effekte grundlegend überarbeitet werden müssen: (i) die vorgeschlagene negative Korrelation zwischen Bedeutungsänderung und Wortfrequenz wird gezeigt, dass sie weitgehend ein Artefakt der verwendeten Modelle der Wortdarstellung ist; ii) die vorgeschlagene negative Korrelation zwischen Bedeutungsänderung und Prototypalität erweist sich als viel schwächer als im Stand der Technik behauptet; und iii) die vorgeschlagene positive Korrelation zwischen Bedeutungsänderung und Polysemie ist weitgehend ein Artefakt der Wortfrequenz. Diese empirischen Beobachtungen werden durch analytische Beweise untermauert, die zeigen, dass Zählrepräsentationen eine inhärente Abhängigkeit von der Wortfrequenz darstellen und daher Wortfrequenz nicht als unabhängiger Faktor mit diesen Repräsentationen bewertet werden kann.', 'fa': 'این مقاله سه قانون پیشنهاد تغییر semantic را ارزیابی می کند. اثر ما این است که برای تایید کردن قانون قانون قابل تغییر semantic، اثر باید در شرایط حقیقی مشاهده شود، ولی در شرایط کنترل قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قرار گرفته باشد، ولی در شرایط تحلیل ما نشان می دهد که اثرات گزارش داده شده در ادبیات اخیر باید عمیقاً تغییر داده شود: (i) ارتباط منفی پیشنهاد بین معنی تغییر و فرکانس کلمه را نشان می دهد که بیشتر یک آرتفاق از مدل نمایش کلمه استفاده شده است. (ii) ارتباط منفی پیشنهاد بین تغییر معنی و پیش\u200cنویسی به نظر می\u200cرسد بسیار ضعیف\u200cتر از آنچه در هنر پیش فرض شده است. و iii) ارتباط مثبت پیشنهاد بین تغییر معنی و پلیسمی بیشتر یک آرتفات فرکانس کلمه است. این مشاهده\u200cهای امپراتیک توسط مدرک\u200cهای تحلیل تایید می\u200cشوند که نشان می\u200cدهند که نمایش\u200cدهندگان به فرکانس\u200cهای کلمه بستگی خاص را معرفی می\u200cکنند، و بنابراین فرکانس کلمه\u200cها نمی\u200cتوانند به عنوان یک faktor مستقل با این نمایش\u200cدهندگان ارزیابی شود', 'tr': 'Bu makala semantik üýtgeşikleriniň üç teklip eden kanunlaryny deňleýär. Bizim iddialerimiz, semantik üýtgeşimlerinin takyklamak üçin, etkisi gerçek şartlarda gözlenmeli, ýöne ýok veya düşürilmeli bir kontrol şartsında, bu durumda hiç bir üýtgeşim bolmaz. Biziň analýusymyz soňky edebiýatynda rapor eden eserleriň esasy uly bir şekilde üýtgedilmelidigini görkezýär: (i) ullanylýan sözlerin üýtgedilişi diýip sözlerin frekansiýasynyň esasy bilen täsirlenen eserleriň artefakty bolup görkezilýär; (ii) Iň öňki sanatdaky işleýänlerden hem prototiplik arasynda täsirli täsirli täsirli baglaşyk görkezilýär; we iii) möhüm üýtgewler we polysemiýa arasyndaky positif ködleşiklik büyük ölçüde söz frekanslaryň artefaktidir. Bu empirik gözlemler, sanlaryň ifadeleri söz frekwensiýasynda daşary baglanýandygyny görkezýän analitik kanıtlar tarapyndan tätiblendirilýär we şonuň üçin söz frekwensiýasynyň bu täzelikleri bilen bağımsız faktor hökmünde deňlenemez.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull vlerëson tre ligje të propozuara të ndryshimit semantik. pretendimi ynë është se për të vlerësuar një ligj putativ të ndryshimit semantik, efekti duhet të vëzhgohet në gjendjen e vërtetë por mungesë apo reduktuar në një gjendje të përshtatshme kontrolli, në të cilën asnjë ndryshim nuk mund të ketë ndodhur. Analiza jonë tregon se efektet e raportuara në letërsinë e kohëve të fundit duhet të rishikohen në mënyrë thelbësore: (i) korrelacioni negativ i propozuar midis ndryshimit të kuptimit dhe frekuencës së fjalës tregohet se është kryesisht një objekt i modeleve të përfaqësimit të fjalës të përdorur; (ii) korrelacioni negativ i propozuar midis ndryshimit të kuptimit dhe prototipikalitetit tregohet shumë më i dobët se ajo që është pretenduar në art in e mëparshëm; dhe iii) korrelacioni pozitiv i propozuar midis ndryshimit të kuptimit dhe polizimit është kryesisht një artefakt i frekuencës së fjalës. Këto vëzhgime empirike janë të vërtetuara nga provat analitike që tregojnë se përfaqësimet e numrit futin një varësi të përbashkët nga frekuenca e fjalës dhe kështu frekuenca e fjalës nuk mund të vlerësohet si një faktor i pavarur me këto përfaqësime.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inatathmini sheria tatu zilizopendekezwa za mabadiliko ya kimapenzi. Madai yetu ni kuwa ili kuthibitisha sheria ya mabadiliko ya kimapenzi, madhara yanapaswa kuonekana katika hali halisi lakini kutokuwepo au kupungua katika hali inayofanana na udhibiti, ambapo hakuna mabadiliko yanaweza kutokea. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kwamba madhara yaliyoripotiwa katika fasihi ya hivi karibuni ni lazima yanabadilishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa: (i) uhusiano uliopendekezwa hasi kati ya mabadiliko ya maana na kiwango cha maneno yanaonyesha kuwa ni ukweli wa mifano ya uwakilishi wa neno uliotumika; (ii) uhusiano unaopendekezwa hasi kati ya mabadiliko ya maana na utaratibu unaonekana kuwa dhaifu zaidi ya kile kinachodai katika sanaa ya kabla; na (iii) uhusiano chanya kati ya mabadiliko na utambulisho wa dini ni aina ya kiwango cha umeme wa maneno. Maoni haya ya msisimu yanachapishwa na ushahidi wa uchambuzi unaoonyesha kuwa idadi ya idadi hiyo inaleta kutegemea kwa kiwango kikubwa cha maneno, na kwa hiyo kiwango cha maneno kinachoweza kuchunguzwa kama sababu huru kwa uwakilishi hawa.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel evalueer drie voorgestelde wette van semantiese verandering. Ons aandrukking is dat om 'n positiewe wet van semantiese verandering te bevestig, die effek moet in die waarheid voorwaardes aanhou word, maar absent of verduur in 'n geskikte ooreenstemmende beheer voorwaardes waarin geen verandering moontlik kon plek gegee het nie. Ons analisie wys dat die effekte wat in onlangse literasie berig is moet substantieel hersien word: i) die voorgestelde negatiewe korrelasie tussen betekening verander en woord frekwensie vertoon word om groot 'n artefakte te wees van die model van gebruikte woord verteenwoording; (ii) die voorgestelde negatiewe korrelasie tussen betekening verandering en prototipieteit is vertoon om baie swakker te wees as wat in vorige kuns aanbeveel is; en iii) die voorgestelde positiewe korrelasie tussen betekening verander en polisemie is grootste 'n artefaktie van woord frekwensie. Hierdie empiriese opmerkinge is corroborateer deur analitiese bevestings wat wys dat tel voorstellings 'n inherende afhanklikheid op woord frekwensie introduseer, en daarom word frekwensie kan nie as 'n onafhanklike faktor met hierdie voorstellings evalueer word nie.", 'hr': 'Ovaj članak procjenjuje tri predložena zakona semantičkih promjena. Naša tvrdnja je da bi u potvrđivanju pozitivnog zakona semantičkih promjena učinak trebao biti primijećen u istinskom stanju, ali odsutan ili smanjen u odgovarajućem stanju kontrole, u kojem se vjerojatno nije mogla promijeniti. Naša analiza pokazuje da se učinkovi prijavljeni u nedavnoj literaturi moraju znatno pregledati: i) predložena negativna korelacija između promjene značenja i učestalost riječi pokazuje se da su u velikoj mjeri artefakt modela upotrebe predstave riječi; ii) pokazuje se da je predložena negativna korelacija između promjene značenja i prototipičnosti mnogo slabija nego što je navedeno u prethodnoj umjetnosti; i iii) predložena pozitivna korelacija između promjene značenja i polizemije je u velikoj mjeri artefakt frekvencije riječi. Ove empiričke promatranja potvrđuju analitički dokazi koji pokazuju da broj predstavljanja predstavljaju neovisnu zavisnost od frekvencije riječi, te stoga frekvencija riječi ne mogu procijeniti kao nezavisni faktor s ovim predstavljanjima.', 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ ሦስት የተፈቀደ የሴሜኒካ ለውጥ ሕግ ያስተካክላል፡፡ የአስተናክል ለውጥ ሕግ ማረጋገጥ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ Analysያችን በአሁኑ የጽሕፈት ውስጥ የተዘጋጀው ውጤቶች በኩል ማሰናከል ያስፈልጋል:(i) በአእምሮው ለውጥ እና በንግግር ፍትሕት መካከል የnegative ግንኙነት የቃላት ግንኙነት በተጠቃሚ የቃላት መልዕክት ምሳሌ መሆኑን ያሳያል፡፡ (ii) ከአሁን በፊት በዐርብ ውስጥ ካለው ነገር ይልቅ በጣም ደካማ እንደሆነ በተገኘው የnegative ግንኙነት እና በሥርዓት መካከል ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ (iii) በተዘጋጀው የፖሊስቲካ መተላለፍ እና የፖሊሲም ግንኙነት በቁጥጥር የቃላት ቁጥጥር ነው፡፡ እነዚህም የአምላካዊ ግንኙነት በተመሳሳይ ማስረጃዎች የቁጥጥር ቁጥር በንግግር ፍጥረት ላይ የሚታመን እና የቃላት ቁጥጥር ነፃነት እንደምታረጋግጥ እና እንደዚህ በአምላካዊ ምክንያት ይታያል፡፡', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি সেমেন্টিক পরিবর্তনের তিনটি প্রস্তাবিত আইনের মূল্যায়ন করে। আমাদের দাবি হচ্ছে যে সেম্পেন্টিক পরিবর্তনের একটি পুটিভিট আইন পরিচালিত করার জন্য, সত্যিকার পরিস্থিতিতে প্রভাব দেখা উচিত, কিন্তু অনুপস্থিতি অথবা অনুপস Our analysis shows that the effects reported in recent literature must be substantially revised: (i) the proposed negative correlation between meaning change and word frequency is shown to be largely an artefact of the models of word representation used;  (ii) প্রস্তাবিত নেতিবাচক সম্পর্কের মানে পরিবর্তন এবং প্রোটোটোটিপিকিস্টেমের মধ্যে প্রস্তাবিত নেতিবাচক সম্পর্ক প্রকাশ করা  (ই) মানে পরিবর্তন এবং বহুসংখ্যার মাঝে প্রস্তাবিত ইতিবাচক সম্পর্ক বেশীরভাগ শব্দের ফ্রেঞ্জের একটি আর্টিবাস্তবতা। বিশ্লেষণের প্রমাণ দ্বারা এই প্রাকৃতিক পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রকাশ করা হয়েছে যা দেখাচ্ছে যে সংখ্যার প্রতিনিধিরা শব্দের ফ্রেইসেন্সের উপর বিভিন্ন নির্ভর করে, আর তা', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը գնահատում է սեմանտիկ փոփոխության երեք կանոն: Մեր փաստարկը նրանում է, որ սեմանտիկ փոփոխության ենթադրական օրենքի հավասարման համար, ազդեցությունը պետք է հետևի իրական վիճակում, բայց բացակայում է կամ նվազեցվում է համապատասխանաբար համապատասխան վերահսկողական վիճակում, որտեղ փոփոխություն հնարավոր չէր լինի: Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ վերջին գրականության մեջ հայտարարված ազդեցությունները պետք է հիմնականում վերափոխվեն. i) նշանակության փոփոխության և բառի հաճախականության միջև առաջարկված բացասական հարաբերակցությունը հիմնականում օգտագործված բառերի ներկայացման մոդելների (II) նշանակության փոփոխության և նախատիպիկականության միջև առաջարկված բացասական հաղորդակցվածությունը շատ ավելի թույլ է դառնում, քան նախորդ արվեստում հայտարարվել է: և (ի) նշանակության փոփոխության և պոլիզեմիայի միջև առաջարկված դրական կապը բառերի հաճախականության արտահայտություն է: Այս էմպրիկական հետազոտությունները հաստատում են վերլուծության ապացույցներով, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ հաշվարկի ներկայացումները ներկայացնում են սեփական կախվածություն բառի հաճախականության վրա, և այսպես բառի հաճախականությունը չի կարող գնահատվել որպես անկախ գործոն', 'az': 'Bu məktub semantik dəyişikliklərin üç təbliğ edilmiş qanunlarını değerləşdirir. Bizim iddiamız, semantik dəyişiklik qanunlarını təsdiqləmək üçün, təsiri həqiqət şərtdə gözləməlidir, amma yoxdur ya da düşürülməsi mümkün olmayan və düşürülməsi mümkün olaraq müəyyən edilməyən bir kontrol şartında. Bizim analizimiz son dəftərdə bildirilən təsirlərin çox dəyişdirilməsi lazımdır: i) təklif edilən negatif dəyişiklik və söz frekansı arasındakı dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərin çox yüksək dəyişiklik göstərilən söz göstəricisinin modellərinin artefaktu olduğunu göstərir. ii) əvvəlki sanatda iddia edilənlərdən daha zəif olduğuna görə təklif edilən negativ dəyişiklik və prototipik arasındakı bağlantı göstərilir; və iii təbliğ edilmiş pozitif dəyişiklik və polizm arasındakı bağlantı çox böyüklükdə söz frekanlığının artefaktudur. Bu empirik gözləmələri analitik kanıtlar tarafından təsdiqlənir ki, təsdiqlərin sayı sözlərin frekansiyasına təsdiqlənməsini göstərər, buna görə də sözlərin frekansiyası bu təsdiqlənmələr ilə bağımsız faktor olaraq təsdiqlənmir.', 'ca': "Aquest article evalua tres lleis proposades de canvi semàntic. La nostra afirmació és que per validar una llei putativa del canvi semàntic, l'efecte hauria de ser observat en la condició autèntica però ausent o reduït en una condició de control adequadament ajustada, en la qual no pot haver estat cap canvi. La nostra an àlisi mostra que els efectes reportats en la literatura recent han de ser revisats sustancialment: (i) la correlació negativa proposada entre el canvi de significat i la freqüència de paraules es mostra que és en gran part un artefacte dels models de representació de paraules utilitzats; ii) es demostra que la correlació negativa proposada entre el canvi de significat i la prototipikalitat és molt més dèbil que el que s'ha afirmat en l'art anterior; i iii) la correlació positiva proposada entre el canvi de significat i la polissima és en gran part un artefacte de freqüència de paraules. Aquestes observacions empíriques estan corroboradas per provas analítiques que demostren que les representacions del nombre introdueixen una dependencia inherent de la freqüència de paraules, i així la freqüència de paraules no pot ser avaluada com un factor independent amb aquestes representacions.", 'cs': 'Tento článek hodnotí tři navrhované zákony sémantické změny. Naším tvrzením je, že za účelem ověření domnělého zákona sémantické změny by měl být tento účinek sledován v reálném stavu, ale chybějící nebo snížený ve vhodně odpovídajícím kontrolním stavu, ve kterém nemůže dojít k žádné změně. Naše analýza ukazuje, že účinky uvedené v nedávné literatuře musí být podstatně revidovány: (i) navrhovaná negativní korelace mezi změnou významu a frekvencí slova je z velké části artefaktem použitých modelů reprezentace slov; ii) navrhovaná negativní korelace mezi změnou významu a prototypikou je prokázána jako mnohem slabší než ta, která byla tvrzena v souladu s předpisy techniky; a iii) navrhovaná pozitivní korelace mezi změnou významu a polysémií je z velké části artefaktem frekvence slov. Tato empirická pozorování jsou potvrzena analytickými důkazy, které ukazují, že reprezentace počtu představují inherentní závislost na frekvenci slova, a proto nelze s těmito reprezentacemi hodnotit frekvenci slova jako nezávislý faktor.', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak procjenjuje tri predložena zakona semantičkih promjena. Naša tvrdnja je da bi u potvrđivanju pozitivnog zakona semantičkih promjena, efekt bi trebao biti posmatran u istinskom stanju, ali odsutan ili smanjen u odgovarajućem stanju kontrole, u kojem se vjerojatno nije mogla promijeniti. Naša analiza pokazuje da su učinkovi prijavljeni u nedavnoj literaturi trebali biti značajno revidirani: i) predložena negativna korelacija između značenja promjene i frekvencije riječi pokazuje se da su u velikoj mjeri artefakt modela korištenog predstavljanja riječi; ii) predložena negativna korelacija između promjene značenja i prototipičnosti pokazuje se da je mnogo slabija od onoga što je navedeno u prethodnoj umjetnosti; i iii) predložena pozitivna korelacija između promjene značenja i polizemije je u velikoj mjeri artefakt frekvencije riječi. Ove empiričke promatranja potvrđuju analitički dokazi koji pokazuju da broj predstavljanja predstavlja neovisnu zavisnost od frekvencije riječi, a tako se frekvencija riječi ne može procijeniti kao nezavisni faktor s ovim predstavljanjima.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis hinnatakse kolme semantilise muutuse seadust. Meie väide on, et oletatava semantilise muutuse seaduse valideerimiseks tuleks mõju jälgida tegelikus seisundis, kuid puudub või väheneb sobivalt sobivas kontrolltingimuses, kus muutusi ei ole võimalik toimuda. Meie analüüs näitab, et hiljutises kirjanduses kirjeldatud mõjud tuleb oluliselt läbi vaadata: i) kavandatud negatiivne korrelatsioon tähendusmuutuse ja sõnasageduse vahel on suures osas kasutatud sõnasageduse mudelite artefakt; ii) kavandatud negatiivne seos tähendusmuutuse ja prototüüpilisuse vahel on näidatud olevat palju nõrgem kui eelmises artiklis väidetud; ja iii) kavandatud positiivne korrelatsioon tähendusmuutuse ja polüseemia vahel on suures osas sõnasageduse artefakt. Neid empiirilisi vaatlusi kinnitavad analüütilised tõendid, mis näitavad, et loenduslikud esindused tekitavad loomuliku sõltuvuse sõnasagedusest, mistõttu ei saa sõnasagedust nende esindustega hinnata sõnasagedusena.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa arvioidaan kolmea semanttisen muutoksen lakiehdotusta. Väitteemme on, että oletetun semanttisen muutoksen lain validoimiseksi vaikutus tulisi havaita todellisessa tilassa, mutta se olisi poissaoleva tai pienennettävä sopivasti sovitetussa kontrolli-tilassa, jossa muutosta ei ole mahdollista tapahtua. Analyysimme osoittaa, että viimeaikaisessa kirjallisuudessa raportoituja vaikutuksia on tarkistettava perusteellisesti: (i) ehdotetun merkityksenmuutoksen ja sanataajuuden negatiivisen korrelaation osoitetaan olevan suurelta osin käytettyjen sanaesitysmallien esine; ii) ehdotettu negatiivinen korrelaatio merkityksenmuutoksen ja prototyypillisyyden välillä on osoittautunut paljon heikommaksi kuin mitä on väitetty aikaisemmassa artiklassa; ja (iii) ehdotettu positiivinen korrelaatio merkityksenmuutoksen ja polysemian välillä on pitkälti sanataajuuden esine. Näitä empiirisiä havaintoja vahvistavat analyyttiset todisteet, jotka osoittavat, että count-representaatiot aiheuttavat luontaisen riippuvuuden sanataajuudesta, joten sanataajuutta ei voida arvioida itsenäisenä tekijänä näillä representaatioilla.', 'jv': 'Artik iki dadi kanggo kelas telu hukum kanggo kelas sematik. Awak dhéwé punika dipunangé kuwi, ngdipunangé aturan sing beraksi perusahaan winih sematik dhéwé, efek dhéwé iso nguasai nêmên ngerasaé perusahaan winih sing beraksi yo ngono mbok dhéwé, sing wis dipunangé perusahaan winih sing gak dhéwé. Genjer arahilé awak dhéwé menehi, efek barang ngéwé urip nyebuturan kanggo nyebuturan ketahanan nyebuturan.: (ii) Perintah langkung wigatinipun meluran gar sanes turuné karo prototipik neng akeh langkung gawe kudu nggawe winih, akeh apik dhéwé Kasunyatan ingkang sampek cara diantesik winih; (iii) nggawe geraksi perusahaan Where langgar', 'ha': "Wannan makala na ƙaddara sharciyar uku da aka buƙata musanyawa na semantic. Dakatanmu ne cẽwa, dõmin a gaskata wata sharci na canza mutane, sai an canza Effekt a cikin halin da gaskiyar, kuma a fake ko kuma da ƙara a cikin wani sharri mai daidai da adadi, wanda ba za ya iya iya musanyãwa ba. AnayyarMu ya nũna cewa an canza halin da aka faɗa a cikin littafan nan a yanzu ana ƙayyade shi mai girma:(i) An nuna muhallin negative da aka buƙata tsakanin musanyawa da ma'anar maganar da kuma an nuna misalin da misalin misalin maganar da aka yi amfani da; (ii) An nuna muhallin negative a tsakanin musanyawa da matsayin ya zama mafi rauni daga abin da aka riga aka faɗa; and (iii) the proposed positive correlation between meaning change and polysemy is largely an artefact of word frequency.  Wannan kewaye na amfani da haske masu anaƙaita sun nuna cewa masu ƙidãya suna shiga a kan sauri na guda, kuma don a iya ƙaddara Frequency ga maganar ta zama fakta wanda ba'a daidaita ba da waɗannan wakilishi.", 'sk': 'V tem članku so ocenjeni trije predlagani zakoni semantične spremembe. Naša trditev je, da je treba za potrditev domnevnega zakona semantične spremembe učinek opazovati v resničnem stanju, vendar odsoten ali zmanjšan v ustrezno usklajenem kontrolnem stanju, v katerem ni mogoče priti do spremembe. Naša analiza kaže, da je treba učinke, o katerih so poročali v novejši literaturi, bistveno revidirati: (i) predlagana negativna korelacija med spremembo pomena in pogostostjo besed je dokazano, da je predvsem artefakt uporabljenih modelov predstavitve besed; (ii) predlagana negativna korelacija med spremembo pomena in prototipičnostjo se izkaže za mnogo šibkejša, kot je bilo navedeno v prejšnjem členu; in (iii) predlagana pozitivna korelacija med spremembo pomena in polisemijo je večinoma artefakt besedne frekvence. Ta empirična opazovanja potrjujejo analitični dokazi, ki kažejo, da predstavitve števila prinašajo neločljivo odvisnost od frekvence besed, zato frekvence besed ni mogoče oceniti kot neodvisni faktor s temi predstavitvami.', 'he': 'This article evaluates three proposed laws of semantic change.  הטענה שלנו היא שבמנת לאשר חוק פוטטיבי של שינוי סמנטי, ההשפעה צריכה להתבונן במצב האמיתי אבל נעדר או מופחה במצב שליטה מתאים, שבה שום שינוי לא יכול לקרות. הניתוח שלנו מראה שההשפעות שנדווחות בספרות האחרונה חייבות להיות משופעות באופן משמעותי: (i) התשובה השלילית המוצעת בין שינוי המשמעות לתדירות המילים (ii) התשובה השלילית המוצעת בין שינוי המשמעות לבין הפרוטוטיפיות מוכיחה להיות הרבה יותר חלשה ממה שנטען באמנות הקודמת; (iii) הקשר החיובי המוצע בין שינוי המשמעות ופוליסמיה הוא בעיקר אצבע של תדר מילים. These empirical observations are corroborated by analytical proofs that show that count representations introduce an inherent dependence on word frequency, and thus word frequency cannot be evaluated as an independent factor with these representations.', 'bo': 'འདིས་གྲངས་འདིས་ཟེར་བ་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དུས་ཀྱི་སྲོལ་ཆེན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ཉེན་ཁ་གཟུགས་ ང་ཚོའི་བཤད་ཀྱིས་semantic བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཀྱི་ནུས་པ་ཞིག་བདེན་འཐབ་རྩོལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྲོལ་རིམ། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཅིག་གིས་གསར་ཟིན་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་གི་གོ་བ་དག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་བསྐྱར་ཞིབ་འབད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། (ii) གསལ་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་མི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་སྐྱེན་རིས་བྱས་པར་མཐུན་སྒྲིག (iii) གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དང་སྡུད་རིས་དབར་གྱི་དབར་གྱི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་འདི་ཆེས་ཤིག་སྟེ། These empirical observations are corroborated by analytical proofs that show that count representations introduce an inherent dependence on word frequency, and thus word frequency cannot be evaluated as an independent factor with these representations.'}
{'en': 'Human Centered NLP with User-Factor Adaptation', 'ar': 'البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التي تتمحور حول الإنسان مع تكييف عامل المستخدم', 'pt': 'PNL Centrada no Homem com Adaptação Fator de Usuário', 'es': 'PNL centrada en el ser humano con adaptación al factor usuario', 'fr': "PNL centré sur l'humain avec adaptation au facteur utilisateur", 'ja': 'ユーザーファクターアダプテーションを備えた人間中心のNLP', 'zh': '以人为本之NLP,有用户素适应性', 'hi': 'उपयोगकर्ता-कारक अनुकूलन के साथ मानव केंद्रित एनएलपी', 'ru': 'Человекоцентрированная НЛП с адаптацией пользовательского фактора', 'ga': 'NLP Daonnalárnach le hoiriúnú Úsáideora-Fachtóra', 'ka': 'ადამიანის ცენტრული NLP მომხმარებელი ფაქტორის ადაპტიფიკაციაName', 'el': 'Ανθρώπινο κεντρικό NLP με προσαρμογή του παράγοντα χρήστη', 'it': "PNL centrato sull'uomo con adattamento utente-fattore", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушы факторының адаптациясы менің ортасындағы NLP', 'hu': 'Emberközpontú NLP felhasználói tényező adaptációval', 'lt': 'Žmogaus centrinis NLP su naudotojo faktoriaus pritaikymu', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'NLP Ditengah Manusia dengan Penyesuaian Faktor Pengguna', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവ്- ഫാക്ടറ്\u200d ആഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിനുമായി മനുഷ്യന്റെ നടുവില്\u200d NLP', 'pl': 'NLP skoncentrowany na człowieku z dostosowaniem czynnika użytkownika', 'mn': 'Хүн төв NLP хэрэглэгч-факторын адаптер', 'no': 'Menneskesentrert NLP med brukfaktoreadaptasjon', 'ro': 'PNL centrat pe om cu adaptare utilizator-factor', 'sr': 'Ljudski centar NLP sa adaptacijom korisnika', 'so': 'Human Centred NLP with User-Factor Adaptation', 'sv': 'Mänskligt centrerat NLP med anpassning av användarfaktorer', 'mt': 'Human Centered NLP with User-Factor Adaptation', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු කෙන්ද්\u200dරිය NLP පාවිච්චි කාර්යාකාරිකාරය සමග', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'ngôn ngữ đa dạng:', 'bg': 'НЛП с адаптация към потребителския фактор', 'da': 'Menneskecentreret NLP med bruger-faktor tilpasning', 'nl': 'Menselijk gecentreerd NLP met aanpassing aan de gebruikersfactor', 'de': 'Human Centered NLP mit Benutzerfaktor Anpassung', 'id': 'Human Centered NLP dengan Pengguna-Factor Adaptation', 'ko': '사용자 중심 적응형 NLP', 'sw': 'Kituo cha NLP cha binadamu kinachohusiana na Adaptation-Factor', 'hr': 'Ljudski centrirani NLP sa adaptacijom korisnika', 'af': 'Mens Sentreerde NLP met gebruiker- faktor aanpassing', 'tr': 'Ullançy Faýl Adyny bilen Merkezi NLP', 'sq': 'Human Centered NLP with User-Factor Adaptation', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'image-action', 'az': '캻stifad톛칞i Fakt칬r칲 Adland캼rmas캼 il톛 캻nsan Merkezi NLP', 'bs': 'Ljudski centar NLP sa adaptacijom korisnika', 'bn': 'ব্যবহারকারী - ফ্যাক্টরের সাথে মানুষ কেন্দ্রীয় NLP', 'ca': "NLP centrat en l'humà amb adaptació al factor d'usuari", 'fi': 'Ihmislähtöinen NLP, jossa käyttäjän tekijä mukautuu', 'cs': 'NLP zaměřené na člověka s přizpůsobením uživatelského faktoru', 'et': 'Inimesele keskendunud NLP koos kasutaja faktori kohandamisega', 'fa': 'Name', 'jv': 'Human centered NLP with User-Effect Adjustment', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་མིན་པའི་NLP', 'sk': 'NLP, osredotočen na človeka, s prilagoditvijo uporabniškega faktorja', 'ha': '@ action'}
{'en': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation   adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood within the context of the user that wrote it. We introduce a continuous adaptation technique, suited for real-valued user factors that are common in social science and bringing us closer to personalized NLP, adapting to each user uniquely. We apply this technique with known user factors including age, gender, and personality traits, as well as latent factors, evaluating over five tasks : POS tagging, PP-attachment, sentiment analysis, sarcasm detection, and stance detection. Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks : up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.', 'ar': 'نحن نضع المهمة العامة للتكيف مع عامل المستخدم - تكييف نماذج التعلم الخاضع للإشراف مع عوامل المستخدم ذات القيمة الحقيقية المستنبطة من خلفية لغتهم ، مما يعكس فكرة أنه يجب فهم جزء من النص في سياق المستخدم الذي كتبه. نقدم تقنية تكيف مستمرة ، مناسبة لعوامل المستخدم ذات القيمة الحقيقية الشائعة في العلوم الاجتماعية وتقربنا من البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المخصصة ، والتكيف مع كل مستخدم بشكل فريد. نقوم بتطبيق هذه التقنية مع عوامل المستخدم المعروفة بما في ذلك العمر والجنس وسمات الشخصية ، بالإضافة إلى العوامل الكامنة ، وتقييم أكثر من خمس مهام: وضع علامات POS ، ومرفق PP ، وتحليل المشاعر ، واكتشاف السخرية ، واكتشاف الموقف. يوفر التكيف مزايا ذات دلالة إحصائية لـ 3 من 5 مهام: حتى +1.2 نقطة لمرفق PP و +3.4 نقطة للسخرية و +3.0 نقطة للوقوف.', 'es': 'Planteamos la tarea general de la adaptación del factor de usuario: adaptar los modelos de aprendizaje supervisado a factores de usuario de valor real inferidos de un entorno de su idioma, reflejando la idea de que un fragmento de texto debe entenderse dentro del contexto del usuario que lo escribió. Introducimos una técnica de adaptación continua, adecuada para factores de usuario de valor real que son comunes en las ciencias sociales y que nos acerca a la PNL personalizada, adaptándonos a cada usuario de forma única. Aplicamos esta técnica con factores de usuario conocidos, incluidos la edad, el género y los rasgos de personalidad, así como factores latentes, evaluando más de cinco tareas: etiquetado POS, apego a PP, análisis de sentimientos, detección de sarcasmo y detección de postura. La adaptación proporciona beneficios estadísticamente significativos para 3 de las 5 tareas: hasta +1.2 puntos por apego a PP, +3.4 puntos por sarcasmo y +3.0 puntos por postura.', 'fr': "Nous posons la tâche générale de l'adaptation au facteur utilisateur\xa0: adapter les modèles d'apprentissage supervisé à des facteurs utilisateur réels déduits d'un contexte linguistique, reflétant l'idée qu'un texte doit être compris dans le contexte de l'utilisateur qui l'a écrit. Nous introduisons une technique d'adaptation continue, adaptée aux facteurs utilisateur réels courants dans les sciences sociales et nous rapprochons de la PNL personnalisée, en nous adaptant à chaque utilisateur de manière unique. Nous appliquons cette technique à des facteurs utilisateur connus tels que l'âge, le sexe et les traits de personnalité, ainsi qu'à des facteurs latents, en évaluant plus de cinq tâches\xa0: marquage POS, attachement à un PP, analyse des sentiments, détection des sarcasmes et détection de position. L'adaptation apporte des avantages statistiquement significatifs pour 3 des 5 tâches\xa0: jusqu'à +1,2 point pour l'attachement PP, +3,4 points pour le sarcasme et +3,0 points pour la posture.", 'pt': 'Colocamos a tarefa geral de adaptação do fator de usuário – adaptando modelos de aprendizado supervisionado a fatores de usuário de valor real inferidos a partir de um histórico de sua linguagem, refletindo a ideia de que um pedaço de texto deve ser entendido dentro do contexto do usuário que o escreveu. Introduzimos uma técnica de adaptação contínua, adequada para fatores de usuário de valor real que são comuns nas ciências sociais e nos aproximando da PNL personalizada, adaptando-se a cada usuário de forma única. Aplicamos essa técnica com fatores conhecidos do usuário, incluindo idade, gênero e traços de personalidade, bem como fatores latentes, avaliando mais de cinco tarefas: marcação POS, anexo PP, análise de sentimentos, detecção de sarcasmo e detecção de postura. A adaptação fornece benefícios estatisticamente significativos para 3 das 5 tarefas: até +1,2 pontos para fixação PP, +3,4 pontos para sarcasmo e +3,0 pontos para postura.', 'ja': '私たちは、ユーザーファクター適応の一般的な課題を提起します。監督下の学習モデルを、その言語の背景から推測される実際の価値のあるユーザーファクターに適応させ、テキストの一部をそれを書いたユーザーの文脈内で理解すべきであるという考えを反映させます。私たちは、社会科学で一般的な実価値のあるユーザーファクターに適し、パーソナライズされたNLPに近づけ、各ユーザーに独自に適応する継続的な適応テクニックを導入します。私たちは、POSタグ付け、PP添付、感情分析、皮肉検出、およびスタンス検出の5つのタスクにわたって評価するために、年齢、性別、性格特性、および潜在的な要因を含む既知のユーザー要因にこの手法を適用します。適応は、5つのタスクのうちの3つに統計的に有意な利点を提供します。PPアタッチメントでは最大+1.2ポイント、皮肉では+3.4ポイント、スタンスでは+3.0ポイントです。', 'zh': '建用户以便宜 - 使督学以应其言背景推断出用户素,一段文本,当于用户上下文中解之。 引入一术,适用社会科学中常见真用户,使我辈更近个性化NLP,特应每用户。 宜用于已知之用户,年齿之别,个性特征潜于素,评估五务:POS标记,PP恋情析,刺检立场。 适5之3,计上显之利:PP附达+1.2分,刺达+3.4分,势+3.0分。', 'ru': 'Мы ставим общую задачу адаптации пользовательского фактора – адаптации моделей контролируемого обучения к реальным ценным пользовательским факторам, вытекающим из фона их языка, отражая идею о том, что фрагмент текста следует понимать в контексте пользователя, который его написал. Мы внедряем методику непрерывной адаптации, подходящую для реально значимых пользовательских факторов, которые распространены в социальной науке и приближают нас к персонализированной NLP, адаптируясь к каждому пользователю уникально. Мы применяем этот метод с известными пользовательскими факторами, включая возраст, пол и черты личности, а также скрытые факторы, оценивая пять задач: маркировка POS, PP-привязанность, анализ настроений, обнаружение сарказма и определение положения. Адаптация обеспечивает статистически значимые преимущества для 3 из 5 задач: до +1,2 балла для PP-прикрепления, +3,4 балла для сарказма и +3,0 балла для положения.', 'hi': 'हम उपयोगकर्ता-कारक अनुकूलन के सामान्य कार्य को प्रस्तुत करते हैं - पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के मॉडल को उनकी भाषा की पृष्ठभूमि से अनुमानित वास्तविक-मूल्यवान उपयोगकर्ता कारकों के अनुकूल बनाना, इस विचार को दर्शाता है कि पाठ का एक टुकड़ा उस उपयोगकर्ता के संदर्भ में समझा जाना चाहिए जिसने इसे लिखा था। हम एक निरंतर अनुकूलन तकनीक पेश करते हैं, जो वास्तविक-मूल्यवान उपयोगकर्ता कारकों के लिए उपयुक्त है जो सामाजिक विज्ञान में आम हैं और हमें व्यक्तिगत एनएलपी के करीब लाते हैं, प्रत्येक उपयोगकर्ता को विशिष्ट रूप से अनुकूलित करते हैं। हम इस तकनीक को ज्ञात उपयोगकर्ता कारकों के साथ लागू करते हैं, जिसमें उम्र, लिंग और व्यक्तित्व लक्षण, साथ ही साथ अव्यक्त कारक शामिल हैं, जो पांच से अधिक कार्यों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: पीओएस टैगिंग, पीपी-अनुलग्नक, भावना विश्लेषण, व्यंग्य का पता लगाना, और रुख का पता लगाना। अनुकूलन 5 कार्यों में से 3 के लिए सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण लाभ प्रदान करता है: पीपी-अनुलग्नक के लिए +1.2 अंक तक, व्यंग्य के लिए +3.4 अंक, और रुख के लिए +3.0 अंक।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid an tasc ginearálta a bhaineann le hoiriúnú fachtóirí úsáideora – samhlacha foghlama maoirsithe a oiriúnú do fhachtóirí fíorluacha úsáideora tátal a bhaint as cúlra a dteanga, ag léiriú an smaoineamh gur cheart píosa téacs a thuiscint laistigh de chomhthéacs an úsáideora a scríobh é. Tugaimid isteach teicníocht oiriúnaithe leanúnach, a oireann do fhachtóirí úsáideoirí fíor-luacha atá coitianta san eolaíocht shóisialta agus a thugann níos gaire dúinn do NLP pearsantaithe, ag oiriúnú do gach úsáideoir go uathúil. Cuirimid an teicníc seo i bhfeidhm le fachtóirí aitheanta úsáideoirí lena n-áirítear aois, inscne, agus tréithe pearsantachta, chomh maith le fachtóirí folaigh, ag déanamh meastóireachta ar níos mó ná cúig thasc: clibeáil POS, ceangaltán PP, anailís meon, braite searbhas, agus braite seasaimh. Soláthraíonn an t-oiriúnú tairbhí atá suntasach go staitistiúil le haghaidh 3 cinn de na 5 thasc: suas le +1.2 pointe do cheangaltán PP, +3.4 pointe don searbhas, agus +3.0 pointe don seasamh.', 'hu': 'A felhasználói tényezők adaptációjának általános feladata: a felügyelt tanulási modellek hozzáigazítása a nyelvük hátteréből levont valós értékű felhasználói tényezőkhöz, tükrözve azt a gondolatot, hogy egy darab szöveget az író felhasználó kontextusában kell megérteni. Folyamatos adaptációs technikát vezetünk be, amely a társadalomtudományban gyakori, valódi értékű felhasználói tényezőkre alkalmas, és közelebb hoz minket a személyre szabott NLP-hez, egyedileg alkalmazkodva minden felhasználóhoz. Ezt a technikát ismert felhasználói tényezőkkel alkalmazzuk, beleértve az életkor, a nem és a személyiség tulajdonságait, valamint a látens tényezőket, öt feladatot értékelve: POS címkézés, PP-kötődés, érzelmi elemzés, szarkazmus felismerés és álláspont felismerés. Az adaptáció statisztikailag szignifikáns előnyöket biztosít az 5 feladat közül háromnál: akár +1,2 pont PP-rögzítés esetén, +3,4 pont szarkazmus esetén, és +3,0 pont állás esetén.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მომხმარებელი ფაქტორის ადაპტიფიკაციის საერთო რაოდენობა დავყენებთ - მომხმარებული სწავლებელი მოდელების ადაპტიფიკაცია რეალურად მნიშვნელოვანი მომხმარებელი ფაქტორისთვის, რომლებიც ისინი ენის ფონდონიდა ჩვენ შევცვალობთ მუშაობელი ადაპტიკაციის ტექნოგია, რომელიც რეალურად მნიშვნელოვანი მომხმარებელი ფაქტორებისთვის, რომელიც სოციალური მეცნიერებაში ერთადერთიან და ჩვენ პირადერთიზებული N ჩვენ ამ ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც უცნობილი მომხმარებელი ფაქტორებით, გენდერი და პირადილური ფაქტორებით, რომელიც ლეტენტი ფაქტორებით, ხუთ დავამუშავებთ: POS-მართლა, PP-მართლა, სენტიმე ადაპტიფიკაცია განსაზღვრებულია სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი გამოიყენება 5 დავალების 3-ზე: PP-დაკავშირებისთვის +1.2 წერტილი, +3.4 წერტილი საპკასმისთვის და +3.0 წერტილი სტატი', 'it': "Ci poniamo il compito generale di adattamento user-factor - adattare i modelli di apprendimento supervisionato a fattori utente realmente valutati dedotti da uno sfondo della loro lingua, riflettendo l'idea che un pezzo di testo dovrebbe essere compreso nel contesto dell'utente che lo ha scritto. Introduciamo una tecnica di adattamento continuo, adatta a fattori utente di valore reale che sono comuni nelle scienze sociali e ci avviciniamo alla PNL personalizzata, adattandoci ad ogni utente in modo univoco. Applichiamo questa tecnica con fattori utente noti, tra cui età, sesso e tratti della personalità, nonché fattori latenti, valutando oltre cinque attività: tag POS, PP-attachment analysis, rilevamento sarcasmo e rilevamento della posizione. L'adattamento fornisce benefici statisticamente significativi per 3 delle 5 attività: fino a +1,2 punti per l'attacco PP, +3,4 punti per il sarcasmo e +3,0 punti per la posizione.", 'lt': 'Mes atliekame bendrą vartotojo ir veiksnių prisitaikymo užduotį - prižiūrimų mokymosi modelių pritaikymą realiai vertinamiems naudotojų veiksniams, išvardytiems iš jų kalbos fono, atspindinčią idėją, kad tekstas turėtų būti suprantamas jo rašytojo kontekste. Įdiegiame nuolatinį prisitaikymo metodą, pritaikytą realiai vertinamiems naudotojų veiksniams, kurie yra bendri socialiniuose moksluose ir priartina mus prie individualizuoto NLP, pritaikant kiekvienam naudotojui unikaliai. We apply this technique with known user factors including age, gender, and personality traits, as well as latent factors, evaluating over five tasks: POS tagging, PP-attachment, sentiment analysis, sarcasm detection, and stance detection.  Prisitaikymas teikia statistiškai reikšmingą naudą 3 iš 5 užduočių: iki +1,2 punkto PP prisijungimui, +3,4 punkto sarkazmui ir +3,0 punkto pozicijai.', 'kk': 'Біз пайдаланушылардың факторлық адаптациясының жалпы тапсырмасын таңдаймыз - бақылаған оқыту үлгілерін тілдің аясынан келтірілген пайдаланушылардың қалыпты факторларына адаптациялау, мәтін бөлігін жазу пайдаланушының кон Біз әрбір пайдаланушыға жалпы мәнді пайдаланушылардың факторларына қолданылатын әрқашан адаптациялау техникасын таңдап, әрбір пайдаланушыға бірге адаптацияланған NLP-ге жақын келтіреміз. Біз бұл техниканы бес тапсырмалардың артындағы бес тапсырмаларды бағалау үшін белгілі пайдаланушылардың факторларымен қолдануға болады: POS тегтері, PP- тіркесімі, сезімдік анализ, саркассмді анықтау және станцияны анықтау үші Адаптация 5 тапсырманың 3-інде статистикалық маңызды пайдалануларды жеткізеді: PP-тіркемесіне +1,2 нүктелеу, +3,4 нүктелеу сарказм және +3,0 нүктелеу үшін.', 'el': 'Θέτουμε το γενικό καθήκον της προσαρμογής του παράγοντα χρήστη στην προσαρμογή των μοντέλων εποπτευόμενης μάθησης σε πραγματικούς παράγοντες χρηστών που συνάγονται από το υπόβαθρο της γλώσσας τους, αντανακλώντας την ιδέα ότι ένα κομμάτι κειμένου πρέπει να κατανοηθεί στο πλαίσιο του χρήστη που το έγραψε. Εισάγουμε μια τεχνική συνεχούς προσαρμογής, κατάλληλη για πραγματικούς παράγοντες χρηστών που είναι κοινοί στην κοινωνική επιστήμη και μας φέρνουν πιο κοντά στην εξατομικευμένη προσαρμογή προσαρμόζοντας μοναδικά σε κάθε χρήστη. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτή την τεχνική με γνωστούς παράγοντες χρήστη, συμπεριλαμβανομένων της ηλικίας, του φύλου και των χαρακτηριστικών προσωπικότητας, καθώς και λανθάνοντες παράγοντες, αξιολογώντας πάνω από πέντε εργασίες: επισήμανση, ανάλυση συναισθημάτων, ανίχνευση σαρκασμού και ανίχνευση στάσεων. Η προσαρμογή παρέχει στατιστικά σημαντικά οφέλη για τρία από τα πέντε καθήκοντα: έως +1.2 σημεία για προσάρτηση PP, +3.4 σημεία για σαρκασμό και +3.0 σημεία για στάση.', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഫാക്ടറിന്റെ പൊതുവായ ജോലിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത്- നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d അവരുടെ ഭാഷയുടെ പശ്ചാത്തലത്തില We introduce a continuous adaptation technique, suited for real-valued user factors that are common in social science and bringing us closer to personalized NLP, adapting to each user uniquely.  പരിചയപ്പെട്ട ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഫാക്ടറുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ടെക്നിക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പ്രായത്തില്\u200d, പ്രായത്തിലുള്ള സ്വകാര്യത്തിലുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d, പ അഞ്ച് ജോലികളില്\u200d 3 പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉപകാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d പ്രാധാന്യം നല്\u200dകുന്നു; പിപി- എച്ചെന്\u200dറിന് മുകളില്\u200d +1. 2 പോയിന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്ക്, +', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw il-kompitu ġenerali tal-adattament tal-fattur tal-utent - l-adattament tal-mudelli ta’ tagħlim sorveljati għal fatturi tal-utent ta’ valur reali inferiti minn sfond tal-lingwa tagħhom, li jirriflettu l-idea li biċċa test għandha tinftiehem fil-kuntest tal-utent li kitbu. Aħna nintroduċu teknika kontinwa ta’ adattament, adattata għal fatturi ta’ utent ta’ valur reali li huma komuni fix-xjenza soċjali u li nġibu eqreb lejn NLP personalizzat, li tadatta għal kull utent unikament. Aħna napplikaw din it-teknika b’fatturi magħrufa tal-utent inklużi l-età, is-sess, u l-karatteristiċi tal-personalità, kif ukoll fatturi moħbija, li jevalwaw aktar minn ħames kompiti: tikkettar POS, twaħħil PP, analiżi tas-sensazzjoni, detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu, u detezzjoni tal-pożizzjoni. L-adattament jipprovdi benefiċċji statistikament sinifikanti għal 3 mill-5 kompiti: sa +1.2 punti għat-twaħħil ta’ PP, +3.4 punti għas-sarkasmu, u +3.0 punti għall-pożizzjoni.', 'mn': 'Бид хэрэглэгчийн хүчин зүйлийн адилтгалын ерөнхий даалгаварыг тавьдаг. Үндсэн суралцах загваруудыг үнэндээ үнэ цэнэтэй хэрэглэгчийн хүчин зүйлсийг тэдний хэл хэлээс халдвар авсан, мөн хэсгийг бичсэн хэрэглэгчийн тухай ойлгох хэрэгтэй Бид нийгмийн шинжлэх ухааны үнэ цэнэтэй хэрэглэгчдийн хүчин зүйлсийг үргэлжлүүлэх загварын технологийг танилцуулж, биднийг хувийн NLP-д ойртуулж, хэрэглэгч бүрт ганц хэлбэртэй адаптацийг хийдэг. Бид энэ техникийг хэрэглэгчийн хүчин зүйлсийн хувьд нас, гендер, хувьд хүн төрөлхтний хувьд, мөн соронзон хүчин зүйлсийн хувьд, таван ажлын хувьд үнэлгээ хийдэг: POS tagging, PP-attachment, feeling analysis, sarcasm detection, stance detection. Дасгал зохицуулалт нь 5 даалгаварын 3-нд статистикийн чухал ашиг гаргадаг: PP-холбоотой +1.2 цэгээс хүртэл, +3.4 цэгүүд саркассмын хувьд болон +3.0 цэгүүд байдаг.', 'mk': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation - adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood within the context of the user that wrote it.  We introduce a continuous adaptation technique, suited for real-valued user factors that are common in social science and bringing us closer to personalized NLP, adapting to each user uniquely.  Ја применуваме оваа техника со познати кориснички фактори вклучувајќи возраст, пол и карактеристички знаци, како и лантни фактори, оценувајќи над пет задачи: означување на POS, приклучување на PP, анализа на чувствата, детекција на сарказам и детекција на ставови. Адаптацијата обезбедува статистички значајни бенефиции за 3 од 5 задачи: до +1,2 поени за приклучување на ПП, +3,4 поени за сарказам и +3,0 поени за став.', 'ms': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation - adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood within the context of the user that wrote it.  Kami memperkenalkan teknik penyesuaian terus menerus, sesuai untuk faktor pengguna yang bernilai sebenar yang biasa dalam sains sosial dan membawa kita lebih dekat dengan NLP pribadi, menyesuaikan kepada setiap pengguna unik. Kami melaksanakan teknik ini dengan faktor pengguna yang diketahui termasuk usia, jenis, dan ciri-ciri kepribadian, serta faktor tersembunyi, menilai lebih dari lima tugas: tag POS, PP-attachment, analisis perasaan, pengesan sarkasm, dan pengesan kedudukan. Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.', 'no': 'Vi plasserer den generelle oppgåva til brukfaktoreadaptasjonen – å tilpassa oversikte læringsmodeller til faktorer som er verkeleg verdiar frå ein bakgrunn av språket sine, og reflekserer ideen at ein tekststykke bør forstårast i konteksten av brukaren som skrev han. Vi introduserer ein kontinuerleg adaptasjonssteknik, som passar til faktorer som er vanleg i sosiale vitenskap, og fører oss nærmere til personaliserte NLP, og tilpassar kvar brukar enkelt. Vi bruker denne teknikken med kjende brukaraktøyfaktorer, inkludert alder, seks og personalitetsfunksjonar, og latente faktorer, som evaluerer over fem oppgåver: POS-merking, PP-vedlegg, sentimentanalyse, oppdaging av sarkasm og oppdaging av stasjonar. Adaptasjonen gjev statistisk signifikante fordel for 3 av 5 oppgåva: opp til +1,2 punkt for PP-vedlegg, +3,4 punkt for sarkasm og +3,0 punkt for stasjon.', 'ro': 'Ne propunem sarcina generală de adaptare user-factor - adaptarea modelelor de învățare supravegheate la factorii utilizatori valoroși reali deduși dintr-un fundal al limbii lor, reflectând ideea că o bucată de text ar trebui să fie înțeleasă în contextul utilizatorului care l-a scris. Introducem o tehnică de adaptare continuă, potrivită pentru factorii utilizatori valoroși care sunt comuni în știința socială și aducându-ne mai aproape de PNL personalizat, adaptându-ne unic fiecărui utilizator. Aplicăm această tehnică cu factori cunoscuți de utilizator, inclusiv trăsăturile de vârstă, sex și personalitate, precum și factori latenți, evaluând peste cinci sarcini: etichetarea POS, atașamentul PP, analiza sentimentului, detectarea sarcasmului și detectarea poziției. Adaptarea oferă beneficii semnificative statistic pentru 3 din cele 5 sarcini: până la +1,2 puncte pentru fixarea PP, +3,4 puncte pentru sarcasm și +3,0 puncte pentru poziție.', 'pl': 'Ogólnym zadaniem adaptacji czynnika użytkownika jest dostosowanie modeli uczenia się nadzorowanego do rzeczywistych czynników użytkownika wywnioskowanych z tła ich języka, odzwierciedlając ideę, że kawałek tekstu powinien być rozumiany w kontekście użytkownika, który go napisał. Wprowadzamy technikę ciągłej adaptacji, dostosowaną do rzeczywistych wartościowych czynników użytkowników, które są powszechne w naukach społecznych i przybliżają nas do spersonalizowanego NLP, dostosowując się do każdego użytkownika w wyjątkowy sposób. Stosujemy tę technikę ze znanymi czynnikami użytkownika, w tym wiek, płeć i cechy osobowości, a także czynnikami utajonymi, oceniając ponad pięć zadań: tagowanie POS, PP-attachment, analiza sentymentów, wykrywanie sarkazmu i wykrywanie stanowiska. Adaptacja zapewnia statystycznie istotne korzyści dla trzech z pięciu zadań: do +1.2 punktów dla przymocowania PP, +3.4 punktów dla sarkazmu i +3.0 punktów dla stanowiska.', 'sr': 'Postavljamo opći zadatak adaptacije korisnika-faktora - prilagođavanje nadzornih modela učenja faktorima korisnika kojima je stvarno vrijedno povezano iz pozadine njihovog jezika, određujući ideju da bi dio teksta trebalo razumjeti u kontekstu korisnika koji ga je napisao. Predstavljamo neprestano adaptacijsku tehniku, odgovarajuću faktorima korisnika koji su zajednički u socijalnoj nauci i približavajući nas ličnom NLP-u, prilagođavajući svakom korisniku jedinstveno. Primjenjujemo ovu tehniku sa poznatim faktorima korisnika uključujući starost, spol i ličnost, kao i latentne faktore, procjenjujući preko pet zadataka: označavanje POS-a, priključenje PP-a, analiziranje osjećanja, detekcija sarkazma i detekcija stanja. Adaptacija pruža statistički značajne koristi za 3 od 5 zadataka: do +1,2 bodova za priključenje PP-a, +3,4 bodova za sarkazam i +3,0 bodova za stanje.', 'si': 'අපි පාවිච්චි කාරණාකාරණය සමාන්\u200dයයේ සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් තියාගන්නේ - පාවිච්චි විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ඇත්ත-විශ්වාසිත භාෂකයේ  අපි සාමාජික විද්\u200dයානයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයානයෙන් සමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරීත විද්\u200dයාවක් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයානයෙන් ප්\u200dරත අපි මේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමග දන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අවධානය, ජීවිත, සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂතාවක් සමග ලටෙන්ට් විශේෂතාවක් සමග අවධානය කරනවා, අවධානය පහක් විශේ සැකසුම් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ලැබෙනවා: PP-සම්බන්ධ විදිහට +1.2 පින්තුවට +3.4 පින්තුවක් සම්', 'sv': 'Vi ställer upp den allmänna uppgiften att anpassa användarfaktorn – anpassa övervakade inlärningsmodeller till verkliga användarfaktorer som härleds från en bakgrund av deras språk, vilket återspeglar idén att en text ska förstås inom ramen för användaren som skrev den. Vi introducerar en kontinuerlig anpassningsteknik, lämplig för verkliga användarfaktorer som är vanliga inom samhällsvetenskap och för oss närmare personlig NLP, anpassar oss till varje användare unikt. Vi tillämpar denna teknik med kända användarfaktorer, inklusive ålder, kön och personlighetsdrag, samt latenta faktorer, och utvärderar över fem uppgifter: POS-taggning, PP-attachment, sentimental analys, sarkasm detektering och ställningsdetektering. Anpassning ger statistiskt signifikanta fördelar för 3 av de 5 uppgifterna: upp till +1,2 poäng för PP-fäste, +3,4 poäng för sarkasm och +3,0 poäng för ställning.', 'so': "Shaqo caadiga ah oo u beddelaya qaababka waxbarashada ee la ilaaliyey, si loo beddelo tusaalaha isticmaalayaasha oo ay u leedahay sababaha qiimaha ah oo laga soo saaray afkooda, waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa fikrada in qeyb warqad ah laga garanayo gudaha uu qoray. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa tekniko isbedelka ah oo ku haboon waxyaabaha isticmaalka ee qiimaha ah ee caadiga ah ee cilmiga bulshada iyo noogu soo dhoweeya NLP oo si gaar ah u bedela isticmaalaha. Waxaynu isticmaalaynaa teknikadan oo lagu yaqaan, kuwaas oo ah da'da, jinsiga, iyo dhaqdhaqaaqa shakhsiga, iyo waxyaabaha ugu dambeeya, qiimeynaya shanta shaqaalaha: POS tagging, PP-attachment, analysis xisaabta xisaabta, baaritaanka sarcasm iyo qiimeynta. Shaqoyinka 5-ka mid ah 3 manfacyo muhiim ah waxaa ka hela sawir badan: sawirka PP-xiriirka ugu badnaan +1.2 barxad, +3.4 goor sarkasm ah iyo +3.0 goor aad u istaagto.", 'ta': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation - adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood within the context of the user that wrote it.  நாம் ஒரு தொடர்ந்து தொடர்ந்து ஒதுக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பம், உண்மையான மதிப்பு பயனர் காரணிகளுக்கு பொருத்தமானது, சமூக அறிவியல் பொதுவான மற்றும் நம்மை தன நாம் இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் வயது, பெண், மற்றும் தனிப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for the 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1. 2 points for PP- attachment, +3. 4 points for sarcasm, and +3. 0 points for stance.', 'ur': 'ہم یوسٹر-فکتور اڈیٹیٹ کے عمومی کام کو ڈال رہے ہیں - سچے ارزش کے قابل کارساز فکتوروں کے ذریعہ مطابق سمجھ رہے ہیں جو ان کی زبان کے پیچھے سے نازل ہوئے ہیں، اور یہ سمجھ رہے ہیں کہ ایک ٹکڑا ٹکڑا متوجہ ہونا چاہیے کہ اسے لکھنے والے کارسا ہم ایک ہمیشہ تدبیر تکنیک کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو حقیقی قدرت رکھنے والی کارساز فکتوروں کے لئے مناسب ہے جو سوسیل سائنس میں مشترک ہیں اور ہمیں شخصی NLP کے قریب لے جاتے ہیں، ہر کارساز کے لئے ایک ہی طرح مناسب ہوتے ہیں۔ ہم اس تکنیک کو پہچان رکھے ہوئے کارساز فکتوروں کے ساتھ لکھ رہے ہیں جیسے عمر، جنس، اور شخصیت کے علاوہ، اور لٹینٹ فکتوروں کے ساتھ، پانچ کاموں پر مطالعہ کررہے ہیں: POS ٹاگ، PP-attachment, sentiment analysis, sarcasm detection, and stance detection. اڈپٹیٹ نے پانچ کاموں میں سے 3 کے لئے اہم فائدہ دے رکھا ہے: PP-attachment کے لئے +1.2 نقطے تک +3.4 نقطے sarcasm کے لئے اور +3.0 نقطے کے لئے.', 'uz': "Biz foydalanuvchi- faktor adapterining umumiy vazifasi - o'rganish modellarini o'z tilning orqa fonida o'zgartirilgan qiymati foydalanuvchiga o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Bu g'oyani yozuvchi foydalanuvchiga bir qismni o'rganish kerak. Biz haqiqiqiy foydalanuvchiga bog'liq foydalanuvchilar uchun davom etishni anglatamiz va bizni shaxsiy NLP'ga яқинlashtiramiz va har bir foydalanuvchiga o'xshash kerak. Biz bu texnologiyani aniqlangan foydalanuvchilar soni, jinsiya va shaxsiy shaklning tartiblari bilan qo'llayapmiz va yangi paytda 5 ta vazifani qiymatlashtiramiz: POS tegning, PP ilovalari, hissiyotni aniqlash, sarkasm aniqlash, va tajriba aniqlash. Adaptasiya 5 vazifalar uchun 3 muhim imkoniyatlarini yaratadi: PP- attachment uchun yuqori + 1. 2 nuqta, sarkasm uchun 3. 4 nuqta va 3. 0 nuqta.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi đặt ra nhiệm vụ chung của việc sửa chữa nhân tố người dùng... thích ứng mô hình học giám sát với các yếu tố người dùng có giá trị thực có được ngụ ý từ nền văn bản của họ, phản ánh ý tưởng rằng một phần văn bản nên được hiểu trong ngữ cảnh người dùng đã viết nó. Chúng tôi tạo ra một kỹ thuật sửa đổi liên tục, phù hợp với những yếu tố người dùng được giá trị thực sự phổ biến trong khoa học xã hội và đưa chúng tôi gần hơn đến đỉnh đĩa tư cá nhân, thích nghi với mỗi người dùng một cách độc đáo. Chúng tôi áp dụng kỹ thuật này với những yếu tố người dùng đã biết, bao gồm tuổi tác, giới tính, và tính cách cá nhân, cũng như những yếu tố tiềm ẩn, đánh giá hơn năm nhiệm vụ: gài vị trí, kết nối PPD, phân tích cảm xúc, phát hiện mỉa mai, và phát hiện lập trường. Sự thích nghi cung cấp tính số hiệu ứng cho 3 của năm nhiệm vụ: cho đến phút đầu giá trị dẫn đến phút phụ dẫn dẫn dẫn dẫn dẫn dẫn'3-4'cho điểm mỉa mai, và'3.0 dành cho lập trường.", 'hr': 'Postavljamo opći zadatak adaptacije korisnika - prilagođavanje nadziranih modela učenja faktorima korisnika koji su vrijedni uvlačeni iz pozadine njihovog jezika, odražavajući ideju da dio teksta treba razumjeti u kontekstu korisnika koji ga je napisao. Predstavljamo neprestano adaptacijsku tehniku, odgovarajuću faktorima korisnika koji su uobičajeni u socijalnoj nauci i približavajući nas ličnom NLP-u, prilagođavajući svakom korisniku jedinstveno. Primjenjujemo ovu tehniku s poznatim faktorima korisnika uključujući starost, spol i osobnost, kao i latentne faktore, procjenjujući preko pet zadataka: označavanje POS-a, priključenje PP-a, analiziranje osjećanja, otkrivanje sarkazma i otkrivanje stanja. Adaptacija pruža statistički značajne koristi za 3 od 5 zadataka: do +1,2 bodova za priključenje PP-a, +3,4 bodova za sarkazam i +3,0 bodova za stanje.', 'nl': 'We stellen de algemene taak van de aanpassing van de gebruikersfactor voor: het aanpassen van begeleide leermodellen aan reële gebruikersfactoren die worden afgeleid uit een achtergrond van hun taal, weerspiegelen het idee dat een stuk tekst moet worden begrepen binnen de context van de gebruiker die het heeft geschreven. We introduceren een continue adaptatietechniek, geschikt voor reële gebruikersfactoren die gebruikelijk zijn in de sociale wetenschap en brengt ons dichter bij gepersonaliseerde NLP, die zich op unieke wijze aanpast aan elke gebruiker. We passen deze techniek toe met bekende gebruikersfactoren zoals leeftijd, geslacht en persoonlijkheidskenmerken, evenals latente factoren, waarbij we meer dan vijf taken evalueren: POS tagging, PP-attachment, sentimentanalyse, sarcasme detectie en standdetectie. Adaptatie biedt statistisch significante voordelen voor drie van de vijf taken: tot +1.2 punten voor PP-bevestiging, +3.4 punten voor sarcasme en +3.0 punten voor stand.', 'bg': 'Поставяме общата задача за адаптация към потребителския фактор - адаптиране на моделите на контролирано обучение към реални потребителски фактори, извлечени от фона на техния език, отразявайки идеята, че даден текст трябва да бъде разбран в контекста на потребителя, който го е написал. Въвеждаме непрекъсната адаптационна техника, подходяща за реални потребителски фактори, които са често срещани в социалните науки и ни доближава до персонализиран НЛП, адаптирайки се уникално към всеки потребител. Ние прилагаме тази техника с известни потребителски фактори, включително възраст, пол и личностни черти, както и латентни фактори, оценявайки над пет задачи: маркиране на ПОС, привързаност, анализ на сентимента, откриване на сарказъм и откриване на стойка. Адаптацията осигурява статистически значими ползи за 3 от 5-те задачи: до +1.2 точки за ПП-закрепване, +3.4 точки за сарказъм и +3.0 точки за стойка.', 'da': 'Vi stiller den generelle opgave med bruger-faktor tilpasning - at tilpasse overvågede læringsmodeller til reelle værdifulde brugerfaktorer udledt ud fra baggrunden for deres sprog, der afspejler tanken om, at et stykke tekst skal forstås inden for rammerne af den bruger, der skrev det. Vi introducerer en kontinuerlig tilpasningsteknik, der er velegnet til reelt værdsatte brugerfaktorer, der er almindelige i samfundsvidenskab, og bringer os tættere på personlig NLP, der tilpasser sig hver bruger unikt. Vi anvender denne teknik med kendte brugerfaktorer, herunder alder, køn og personlighedstræk, såvel som latente faktorer, og evaluerer over fem opgaver: POS tagging, PP-vedhæftelse, sentimentalanalyse, sarkasme detektion og standdetektion. Tilpasning giver statistisk signifikante fordele for 3 af de 5 opgaver: op til +1,2 point for PP-fastgørelse, +3,4 point for sarkasme og +3,0 point for stilling.', 'ko': '우리는 사용자 요소에 적응하는 일반적인 임무를 제시했다. 감독이 있는 학습 모델이 언어 배경에서 추정되는 진정한 가치 있는 사용자 요소에 적응하도록 하고 텍스트가 사용자의 상하문에서 이해되어야 한다는 생각을 반영했다.우리는 사회 과학에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 실가 사용자 요소에 대한 지속적인 적응 기술을 도입하여 개성화된 NLP에 더욱 가까워지고 모든 사용자에게 독특한 적응을 하도록 했다.우리는 이 기술을 이미 알고 있는 사용자 요인, 연령, 성별, 개성 특징과 잠재적 요인을 포함하여 다섯 가지 임무를 평가한다. 그것이 바로 단어성 표시, PP애틋함, 정서 분석, 풍자 검측과 입장 검측이다.5가지 임무 중 적응성은 3가지에 통계적으로 현저한 장점을 제공했다. PP애착은 +1.2점, 풍자는 +3.4점, 서 있는 자세는 +3.0점이다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza jukumu la jumla la la kubadilisha vifaa vya watumiaji –kubadilisha mifano ya kujifunza kwa sababu zenye thamani halisi zilizoathirika kutoka nyuma ya lugha yao, tukizingatia wazo kwamba sehemu ya maandishi inapaswa kuelewa ndani ya muktadha wa mtumiaji aliyeandika. Tunaonyesha teknolojia ya kuboresha kwa muda mrefu, yenye vigezo vya watumiaji wenye thamani halisi ambavyo vinatoa kawaida katika sayansi ya kijamii na kutupeleka karibu na NLP binafsi, ikilinganisha na kila mtumiaji wa kipekee. Tunatumia teknolojia hii kwa sababu za watumiaji wanaojulikana ikiwa ni pamoja na umri, jinsia, na misukosuko ya kibinafsi, pamoja na sababu za hivi karibuni, kutathmini zaidi ya kazi tano: ujumbe wa POS, uangalizi wa PP, uchambuzi wa hisia, utambuzi wa kejeli, na kutambua hali ya mambo. Upatikanaji unatoa faida muhimu kwa 3 ya kazi hizo 5: hadi +1.2 pointi kwa ajili ya kuunganishwa kwa PP, +3.4 pointi kwa kejeli, na +3.0 pointi kwa ajili ya msimamo.', 'de': 'Wir stellen die allgemeine Aufgabe der Benutzerfaktoranpassung vor, überwachte Lernmodelle an reale Benutzerfaktoren anzupassen, die aus dem Hintergrund ihrer Sprache abgeleitet werden und die Idee widerspiegeln, dass ein Textstück im Kontext des Benutzers verstanden werden sollte, der es geschrieben hat. Wir führen eine kontinuierliche Anpassungstechnik ein, die für reale Benutzerfaktoren geeignet ist, die in der Sozialwissenschaft üblich sind und uns dem personalisierten NLP näher bringt und sich individuell an jeden Benutzer anpasst. Wir wenden diese Technik mit bekannten Benutzerfaktoren wie Alter, Geschlecht und Persönlichkeitsmerkmalen sowie latenten Faktoren an und bewerten über fünf Aufgaben: POS-Tagging, PP-Attachment, Sentiment-Analyse, Sarkasmus-Erkennung und Haltungserkennung. Die Anpassung bietet statistisch signifikante Vorteile für drei der fünf Aufgaben: bis zu +1,2 Punkte für PP-Befestigung, +3,4 Punkte für Sarkasmus und +3,0 Punkte für Haltung.', 'fa': 'ما وظیفه عمومی از تغییرات کاربران- مدل\u200cهای یادگیری را تحت نظر قرار می\u200cدهیم به faktورهای کاربران واقعی ارزش دارند که از پشتیبانی زبانشان آزاد شده\u200cاند، تغییر می\u200cدهیم که یک قطعه متن باید در محیط کاربران که آن را نوشته\u200cاند درک شود. ما یک تکنیک سازونی دائمی را معرفی می کنیم که برای faktورهای کاربر واقعی ارزش دارد که در علم اجتماعی مشترک هستند و ما را به NLP شخصی نزدیک می کنیم، و به هر کاربر متفاوت می کنیم. ما این تکنیک را با کاربران شناخته می\u200cکنیم که شامل سن، جنس و شخصیت ویژه\u200cهای سن و شخصیت، همچنین عوامل\u200cهای latent، ارزیابی بیش از پنج وظیفه\u200cای: نقاشی POS، نقاشی PP، تحلیل احساسات، شناسایی سارکاسم و شناسایی موقعیت. تغییر دادن سودهایی با استاندارسی معنی برای ۳ از ۵ وظیفه را می\u200cدهد: تا +۱.۲ نقطه برای پیوند PP +۳.۴ نقطه برای سارکاسم و +۳.۰ نقطه برای وضعیت.', 'af': "Ons stel die algemene taak van gebruiker-faktor aanpassing - aanpassing van ondersoekte leer modele aan reël waardeerde gebruiker faktore wat uit 'n agtergrond van hul taal geïnformeerd is, wat die idee dat 'n stuk teks verstaan moet word binne die konteks van die gebruiker wat dit geskryf het. Ons introduseer 'n voortdurende adaptasie-tekniks wat geskik is vir reël waardeerde gebruikerfaktore wat gemeenskap is in sosiale wetenskap en ons naby aan persoonlike NLP bring en aan elke gebruiker eenkennig aanpas. Ons het hierdie tekniks aanwend met bekende gebruiker faktore, insluitend ouderdom, geneem en persoonlike eienskappe, asook latente faktore, evalueer oor vyf opdragte: POS-merking, Pp-aanhegsel, sentimentanalisie, sarkasme-opdekking en staanse-opdekking. Aanpassing verskaf statistiese betekende voordele vir 3 van die 5 taak: tot by +1.2 punte vir Pp-aanhegsel, +3.4 punte vir sarkasm en +3.0 punte vir staanse.", 'am': 'በቋንቋቸው ጀምሮ የተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ ክፍል በተጻፈው ተጠቃሚው ውጤት እንዲያስተውል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በማኅበራዊ እውቀት የተጠቃሚ የሆኑትን አካባቢዎችን እናቀርበናለን እና ለሁሉም ተጠቃሚዎችን በተለየ የነፃነት NLP እናቀርበናለን፡፡ ይህ ቴክኖክን በአምስት ስራቶች ላይ በሚያስታውቁ፣ ዘመን፣ ሴት እና የራሳቸውን ጉዳይ እና የአሁኑን ጉዳዮች እና እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.', 'tr': "Biz ullan챌y-faktor adaptasi첵asyny흫 umumy zadyny g철r첵채ris - 체stlenen 철wrenme nusgalaryny dillerini흫 arkasyndan s체첵tgeden ullan챌y fakt철rlere 체첵tge첵채ris, we muny 첵az첵an ulan챌y흫 kontekstinde d체힊체nmelidigini d체힊체n첵채ris. Biz sosyal bilimi i챌inde ortakly ulananlar 체챌in adalatma teknikesini tany힊dyr첵arys we bizi 힇ahsy NLP'a 첵akynla힊dyr첵arys we her 첵체z체ni흫 첵eke 철z체ne adalat첵arys. Biz bu tekniki uly 첵a힊y, jena첵at we ki힊ilikli hasaplaryla birlikde bilinen ulan챌ylar fakt철rleri bilen uygula첵arys, be힊 i힊i흫 체st체nde de흫len첵채ris: POS tagging, PP-attachment, du첵gular analizi, sarkasm tany힊y we 첵eterlik tany힊y bilen oka첵arys. G철rni힊 Op힊enler 5 zady흫 3 체챌in statistik m철h체m faydalaryny sa첵la첵ar: PP-attachasy 체챌in +1.2 pu챌 we sarkasm 체챌in +3.4 pu챌 we +3.0 pu챌 we durum 체챌in pu챌", 'az': 'Biz istifadəçi-faktor uyğunlamasının genel görevi təyin edirik - təmin edilmiş öyrənmə modellərini dillərinin arxa planından çıxarılan istifadəçi faktörlərinə uyğunlaşdırmaq, yazan istifadəçinin məlumatın bir parçasının anlanmasını düşünürük. Biz sosyal elmdə ortaq olan istifadəçilər faktörlərinə uyğun sürəkli uyğunlama teknikini təşkil edirik və bizi indikatli NLP-ə yaxınlaşdırır, hər istifadəçin in tək olaraq uyğunlaşdırır. Biz bu tekniki yaş, cins və kişilik özellikləri ilə bilinmiş istifadəçilərin faktörləri ilə istifadə edirik, lakin latent faktörlər ilə, beş işin üstündə değerləşdiririk: POS etiketi, PP-attachment, sentiment analizi, sarkasm deteksiyonu və stansiyyəti deteksiyonu. Adjustasyon 5 işin 3-si üçün statistik olaraq mövcud faydalar verir: PP-attachment üçün +1.2 noktalar, +3.4 noktalar sarkasm üçün və +3.0 noktalar mövcud olur.', 'bn': 'আমরা ব্যবহারকারী ফ্যাক্টরের অ্যাডাপেটশনের সাধারণ কাজের মাধ্যমে প্রতিষ্ঠান করি- নির্দেশিত শিক্ষা মডেলের মাধ্যমে তাদের ভাষার পটভূমি থেকে আক্রান্ত ব্যবহা আমরা একটি অবাধ্যতামূল্যবান ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রযুক্তি পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, যা সামাজিক বিজ্ঞানে সাধারণ মানুষ এবং আমাদের ব্যক্তিগত এনএলপির কাছে নিয়ে  আমরা পরিচিত ব্যবহারকারীদের কারণে এই প্রযুক্তিটি প্রয়োগ করি যার মধ্যে বয়স, লিঙ্গ এবং ব্যক্তিগত ব্যাপার, এবং সাম্প্রতিক ক কার্যক্রম, পোএস ট্যাগিং, পিপি-সংযুক্ত, মনের বি পিপি- সংযুক্তির জন্য প্রায় ১. ২ পয়েন্ট, বিদ্রোহের জন্য ৩. ৪ পয়েন্ট এবং ৩.', 'bs': 'Postavljamo opći zadatak adaptacije korisnika-faktora - prilagođavanje nadziranih modela učenja faktorima korisnika kojima je stvarno vrijedno povezano iz pozadine njihovog jezika, odražavajući ideju da bi dio teksta trebalo razumjeti u kontekstu korisnika koji ga je napisao. Predstavljamo neprestano adaptacijsku tehniku, odgovarajuću faktorima korisnika koji su zajednički u socijalnoj nauci i privlačimo nas bliže ličnom NLP-u, prilagođavajući svakom korisniku jedinstveno. Primjenjujemo ovu tehniku sa poznatim faktorima korisnika, uključujući starost, spol i ličnost, kao i latentne faktore, procjenjujući preko pet zadataka: označavanje POS-a, priključenje PP-a, analiziranje osjećanja, otkrivanje sarkazma i otkrivanje stanja. Adaptacija pruža statistički značajne koristi za 3 od 5 zadataka: do +1,2 bodova za priključenje PP-a, +3,4 bodova za sarkazam i +3,0 bodova za stanje.', 'sq': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation - adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood within the context of the user that wrote it.  We introduce a continuous adaptation technique, suited for real-valued user factors that are common in social science and bringing us closer to personalized NLP, adapting to each user uniquely.  We apply this technique with known user factors including age, gender, and personality traits, as well as latent factors, evaluating over five tasks: POS tagging, PP-attachment, sentiment analysis, sarcasm detection, and stance detection.  Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.', 'cs': 'Obecným úkolem adaptace uživatelského faktoru je adaptace modelů supervizovaného učení na skutečně hodnotné uživatelské faktory odvozené z pozadí jejich jazyka, odrážející myšlenku, že kus textu by měl být chápán v kontextu uživatele, který ho napsal. Představujeme techniku kontinuální adaptace, která je vhodná pro skutečně hodnocené uživatelské faktory, které jsou běžné v sociálních vědách a přináší nás blíže personalizovanému NLP, přizpůsobení se každému uživateli jedinečně. Tuto techniku aplikujeme se známými uživatelskými faktory včetně věku, pohlaví a osobnostních rysů, stejně jako latentními faktory, hodnotíme přes pět úkolů: POS tagování, PP-attachment, analýza sentimentů, detekce sarkasmu a detekce postojů. Adaptace poskytuje statisticky významné výhody pro tři z pěti úkolů: až +1,2 body pro PP-upevnění, +3,4 body pro sarkasmus a +3,0 body pro postoj.', 'et': 'Esitame üldise ülesande kasutaja-faktori kohanemisel - kohandame juhendatud õppemudeleid nende keele taustast tuletatud reaalväärtuslike kasutajateguritega, peegeldades ideed, et teksti tuleks mõista selle kirjutanud kasutaja kontekstis. Tutvustame pidevat kohanemistehnikat, mis sobib reaalselt väärtustatud kasutajateguritele, mis on ühiskonnateadustes tavalised ja toob meid lähemale personaalsele NLP-le, kohandades igale kasutajale unikaalselt. Me rakendame seda tehnikat teadaolevate kasutajateguritega, sealhulgas vanuse, sugu ja isiksusjooned, samuti latentsete teguritega, hinnates üle viie ülesande: POS sildistamine, PP-kinnitus, sentimentaalüüs, sarkasmi tuvastamine ja hoiaku tuvastamine. Kohanemine annab statistiliselt olulist kasu kolmele viiest ülesandest: kuni +1,2 punkti PP kinnituse puhul, +3,4 punkti sarkasmi puhul ja +3,0 punkti asendi puhul.', 'id': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation - adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood within the context of the user that wrote it.  We introduce a continuous adaptation technique, suited for real-valued user factors that are common in social science and bringing us closer to personalized NLP, adapting to each user uniquely.  Kami menerapkan teknik ini dengan faktor pengguna yang dikenal termasuk usia, jenis, dan ciri-ciri pribadi, serta faktor latent, mengevaluasi lebih dari lima tugas: POS tagging, PP-attachment, analisis sentimen, deteksi sarkasme, dan deteksi posisi. Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք օգտագործողի-գործոնի ադապտացիայի ընդհանուր խնդիրը՝ վերահսկված ուսումնական մոդելների ադապտացիան իրական արժեքավոր օգտագործողի գործոններին, որոնք հանգեցվում են իրենց լեզվի ետնամասից, արտացոլում են այն գաղափարը, որ տեքստի մասը պետք է հաս Մենք ներկայացնում ենք անընդհատ ադապտացիոն տեխնիկան, որը համապատասխանում է սոցիալական գիտության մեջ սոցիալական արժեքավոր օգտագործողների գործոններին և մեզ մոտենում է անձնական ՆԼՊ-ին, միանգամայն յուրաքանչյուր օգտագործողի համար: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս տեխնիկան հայտնի օգտագործողական գործոնների հետ, ներառյալ տարիքը, գենդերն ու անհատականության առանձնահատկությունները, ինչպես նաև թաքնված գործոնները, որոնք գնահատում են հինգ խնդիրների ընթացքում' POS-ի նշաններ, PP-ի կապվածություն, զգացմունքների վերլուծություն Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.", 'fi': 'Esitämme käyttäjäkohtaisen sopeutumisen yleistehtäväksi: ohjatun oppimisen mallien mukauttaminen kielen taustasta pääteltyihin todellisiin käyttäjätekijöihin heijastaen ajatusta siitä, että teksti tulisi ymmärtää kirjoittajan kontekstissa. Esittelemme jatkuvan sopeutumistekniikan, joka soveltuu yhteiskuntatieteissä yleisiin todellisiin käyttäjätekijöihin ja tuo meidät lähemmäksi yksilöllistä NLP:tä, mukautuen yksilöllisesti jokaiseen käyttäjään. Sovellamme tätä tekniikkaa tunnettujen käyttäjätekijöiden, kuten iän, sukupuolen ja persoonallisuuden piirteiden, sekä piilevien tekijöiden kanssa, arvioimalla yli viisi tehtävää: POS-tagging, PP-attachment, tunteiden analyysi, sarkasmin tunnistus ja asennon tunnistus. Sopeutuminen tuottaa tilastollisesti merkitseviä hyötyjä kolmessa viidestä tehtävästä: enintään +1,2 pistettä PP-kiinnityksellä, +3,4 pistettä sarkasmilla ja +3,0 pistettä asennolla.', 'ca': "Posem la tasca general de l'adaptació del factor d'usuari - adaptar els models d'aprenentatge supervisads a factors d'usuari valorats reals inferits d'un fons de la seva llengua, reflexionant la idea de que un tros de text hauria d'ser entendut en el context de l'usuari que l'escrivia. Introduïm una tècnica d'adaptació continua, adaptada a factors d'usuari de valor real que són comuns en la ciència social i ens apropen a NLP personalitzat, adaptant-nos únicament a cada usuari. Aplicam aquesta tècnica amb factors d'usuari coneguts, com ara l'edat, el gènere i els trets de la personalitat, així com els factors latents, evaluant més de cinc tasques: etiqueta POS, PP-attachment, anàlisi de sentiments, detecció de sarcasme i detecció de postura. Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo splošno nalogo prilagajanja uporabniškega faktorja - prilagajanje modelov nadzorovanega učenja realno vrednotenim uporabniškim faktorjem, ki jih sklepajo iz ozadja njihovega jezika in odražajo idejo, da je treba del besedila razumeti v kontekstu uporabnika, ki ga je napisal. Predstavljamo tehniko stalnega prilagajanja, primerno za resnično vrednotene uporabniške dejavnike, ki so pogosti v družboslovju in nas približuje personaliziranemu NLP, prilagajanju vsakemu uporabniku edinstveno. To tehniko uporabljamo z znanimi uporabniškimi dejavniki, vključno s starostjo, spolom in osebnostnimi lastnostmi, kot tudi latentnimi dejavniki, pri čemer ocenjujemo več kot pet nalog: označevanje POS, PP-navezanost, analiza sentimenta, zaznavanje sarkazma in zaznavanje drže. Prilagajanje zagotavlja statistično značilne koristi pri treh od petih nalog: do +1,2 točke za pritrditev PP, +3,4 točke za sarkazem in +3,0 točke za držo.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngetokake nggunaké karo nggawe modèl-karo nggawe bener - iso nggawe modèl kuwi nggunaké sistem anyar-barang nggawe nguasai bener seneng luwih apik karo alêng, ngregani uwis sistem sing paling kelangan seneng pisan seneng nggawe barang nggawe barang pengguna kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé nambah teknik adalah sampeyan luwih dumadhi, nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang pengguna kuwi kesempalahan kanggo awak dhéwé uga NLP iki dadi sak sebelah, iso nggawe ngubah akeh bener. Awak dhéwé aplikasi teknik iki karo akeh pernik nggambar obang-ajeng, luwih karo kalem ntaha cara-layang, lan kabèh ngêftar bukanêr, iso disenyongno limo cara sing: politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'We pose the general task of user-factor adaptation - adapting supervised learning models to real-valued user factors inferred from a background of their language, reflecting the idea that a piece of text should be understood in the context of the user that wrote it. འུ་ཅག་གིས་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཐུན་ཐང་ཡོད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་རིག་དང་། དེ་འདྲ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་ཉེ་བ་མཁ We apply this technique with known user factors including age, gender, and personality traits, as well as latent factors, evaluating over five tasks: POS tagging, PP-attachment, sentiment analysis, sarcasm detection, and stance detection. Adaptation provides statistically significant benefits for 3 of the 5 tasks: up to +1.2 points for PP-attachment, +3.4 points for sarcasm, and +3.0 points for stance.', 'he': 'אנו מעמידים את המשימה הכללית של התאמה משתמש-גורם - להסתגל מודלים למידע שמבוטחים לגורמים משתמשים בערכים אמיתיים המתוצאים מרקע השפה שלהם, משקפים את הרעיון שחלק טקסט צריך להבין בתוך הקונקסט של המשתמש שכתב אותו. אנחנו מציגים טכניקת שימוש ממשיכה, מתאימה לפורקטורים משתמשים בערך אמיתי שהם נפוצים במדע החברתי והובילים אותנו קרובים יותר ל NLP אישי, מתאימים לכל משתמש באופן מיוחד. אנחנו משתמשים בטכניקה זו עם גורמים משתמשים ידועים כוללים גיל, מין, וכמויות אישיות, כמו גם גורמים מוסתרים, הערכה מעל חמישה משימות: תווים POS, חיבור PP, ניתוח רגשות, זיהוי סרקזם, זיהוי עמדה. התאמה מספקת תועלת סטטיסטית משמעותית עבור 3 משימות: עד +1.2 נקודות עבור קישור PP, +3.4 נקודות עבור סרקזם, ו +3.0 נקודות עבור עמדה.', 'ha': "Mu ƙayyade aikin mai adapta masu amfani da shi - mai adapta shiryoyin ayuka da aka tsare su zuwa masu inganci masu amfani da inganci wanda aka yi wa zartar da shi daga bangon harshen su, kuma, ana yi tunãni, ya kamata a fahimta wani abu na matsayi cikin mazaunin mai amfani da ya rubuta shi. Tuna fara tamko na adadi mai daidai, mai daidai ga masu amfani da masu inganci da masu amfani da shi masu amfani da matsayin sami da kuma ke kusantar da mu zuwa NLP, yana daidaita zuwa duk mai amfani da shi wanda ba'a sani ba. Tuna amfani da wannan tekinci wanda ake sani kamar tsohon, jini, da mutane, da masu ƙarani, da masu ƙidãya masu amfani da matsayin bayani shan: Shiryarwa na samar da amfani masu ƙayyade wa 3 daga aikin 5: up to+1.2 points wa PP-attach, +3.4 points wa sarcasm, kuma+3.0 points for stance."}
{'en': 'Neural Sequence Learning Models for Word Sense Disambiguation', 'ar': 'نماذج تعلم التسلسل العصبي لتوضيح معنى الكلمات', 'pt': 'Modelos de Aprendizado de Sequência Neural para Desambiguação do Sentido de Palavras', 'fr': "Modèles d'apprentissage de séquences neuronales pour la désambiguïsation", 'es': 'Modelos de aprendizaje de secuencias neuronales para desambiguación del sentido de palabras', 'ja': 'ワードセンス曖昧化のためのニューラルシーケンス学習モデル', 'zh': '词义消歧者神经序学模样', 'ru': 'Модели обучения нейропоследовательности для размывания смысла слова', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका अनुक्रम सीखने के मॉडल वर्ड सेंस बहुविकल्पी के लिए', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Foghlama le Seicheamh Néarach le haghaidh Dídhébhríocht ar chiall na bhFocal', 'ka': 'სიტყვების სიტყვების განსხვავება', 'el': 'Μοντέλα εκμάθησης νευρωνικών ακολουθιών για την αποσαφήνιση της αίσθησης λέξεων', 'hu': 'Neurális szekvencia tanulási modellek a Word Sense szétbontásához', 'it': 'Modelli di apprendimento delle sequenze neurali per la disambiguazione del senso della parola', 'kk': 'Сөздің сезімін өшіру үшін нейрондық реттеу оқыту үлгілері', 'lt': 'Nervų sekos mokymosi modeliai žodžių jausmų neišvengimui', 'mk': 'Модели за учење на неврални секвенции за раздвојување на зборовите', 'ms': 'Neural Sequence Learning Models for Word Sense Disambiguation', 'mt': 'Mudelli ta’ Tagħlim tas-Sekwenza Newrali għad-Diżambigwazzjoni tas-Sens tal-Kliem', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് സെന്\u200dസിന്റെ അസംഭാഷണത്തിനായി പഠിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'pl': 'Modele uczenia się sekwencji neuronowej dla rozjasnienia zmysłu słowa', 'ro': 'Modele de învățare a secvențelor neurale pentru dezambiguizarea sensului Word', 'mn': 'Үүний мэдрэмжтэй халдварлах мэдрэлийн дараагийн суралцах загвар', 'no': 'Neuralsekvenslæringsmodeller for å slå av ord', 'si': 'වචන සැකසුම් අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් න්\u200dයූරාල ක්\u200dරමාවිකය ඉගෙනීම් මොඩේල්ස්', 'sr': 'Modeli učenja neuroloških sekvencija za disambiguaciju osjeæaja reèi', 'sv': 'Neural Sequence Learning Modeller för Word Sense Disambiguation', 'so': 'Modeller for Word Sense Disambition', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை அலட்சியமாக்குவதற்கான புதிய வரிசை கற்றல் மாதிரிகள்', 'ur': 'Word Sense Disambiguation for Neural Sequence Learning Models', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ học cảm xúc thần kinh', 'bg': 'Модели за изучаване на неврални последователности за дисамбигуация на чувството на думи', 'hr': 'Modeli učenja neurološke sekvence za disambigaciju osjećaja riječi', 'da': 'Neural Sequence Learning Models for Word Sense Disambiguation', 'nl': 'Neural Sequence Learning Modellen voor Word Sense Disambiguation', 'de': 'Lernmodelle für neuronale Sequenzen für Word Sense Disambiguation', 'id': 'Model Belajar Sekuensi Neural untuk Pengambiguasi Sensi Perkataan', 'fa': 'Models Learning Neural sequence for Word Sense Disambiguation', 'tr': 'Sened Gaýşartmaky üçin Nural Hatlary öwrenmek Modeli', 'ko': '어의 변조의 신경 서열 학습 모형', 'af': 'Nurale sekwensie leer model vir Woord Sense Ontbreking', 'sw': 'Modela za Kufunza kwa Msimamo wa Ndani kwa Kuzungumzia Sensi', 'sq': 'Modelet e mësimit të sekuencës neurone për zhdukjen e kuptimit të fjalëve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'শব্দের সেন্স ডিসপিগুয়েশনের জন্য নিউরেল সেকেন্স শিক্ষা মোডেল', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հաջորդականության սովորելու մոդելները բառերի զգացմունքի անբացատրության համար', 'bs': 'Modeli učenja neurološke sekvence za disambigaciju osjećaja riječi', 'ca': "Models d'aprenentatge de seqüències neuronalsper desambiguar el sentit de les paraules", 'et': 'Närvijadade õppemudelid sõnatunne disambiguatsiooni jaoks', 'cs': 'Modely učení neurálních sekvencí pro disambiguaci slovního smyslu', 'fi': 'Neurosekvenssien oppimismallit sanaaistin hajottamiseen', 'az': 'Sözlü Sözlük İşlənməsi üçün Nüral Sequence Öyrənmə Modelləri', 'jv': 'Tatanan Sense Desmbiguation', 'sk': 'Modeli za učenje živčnih zaporedij za razočaranje besednega smisla', 'he': 'Neural Sequence Learning Models for Word Sense Disambiguation', 'ha': 'Models for Disseminar Size', 'bo': 'Word Sense Disambiguation'}
{'en': 'Word Sense Disambiguation models exist in many flavors. Even though supervised ones tend to perform best in terms of accuracy, they often lose ground to more flexible knowledge-based solutions, which do not require training by a word expert for every disambiguation target. To bridge this gap we adopt a different perspective and rely on sequence learning to frame the disambiguation problem : we propose and study in depth a series of end-to-end neural architectures directly tailored to the task, from bidirectional Long Short-Term Memory to encoder-decoder models. Our extensive evaluation over standard benchmarks and in multiple languages shows that sequence learning enables more versatile all-words models that consistently lead to state-of-the-art results, even against word experts with engineered features.', 'ar': 'توجد نماذج إزالة الغموض في Word Sense في العديد من النكهات. على الرغم من أن الأشخاص الخاضعين للإشراف يميلون إلى الأداء الأفضل من حيث الدقة ، إلا أنهم غالبًا ما يفقدون الأرض أمام حلول أكثر مرونة قائمة على المعرفة ، والتي لا تتطلب تدريبًا من قبل خبير كلمات لكل هدف من أهداف توضيح الغموض. لسد هذه الفجوة ، نعتمد منظورًا مختلفًا ونعتمد على التعلم المتسلسل لتأطير مشكلة إزالة الغموض: نقترح وندرس بعمق سلسلة من البنى العصبية الشاملة المصممة مباشرة للمهمة ، من الذاكرة ثنائية الاتجاه طويلة المدى إلى نماذج التشفير وفك التشفير. يُظهر تقييمنا الشامل للمعايير القياسية وبلغات متعددة أن التعلم المتسلسل يتيح نماذج أكثر تنوعًا لكل الكلمات تؤدي باستمرار إلى أحدث النتائج ، حتى مقابل خبراء الكلمات مع الميزات الهندسية.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de desambiguação do Word Sense existem em muitos sabores. Embora os supervisionados tendam a ter melhor desempenho em termos de precisão, eles geralmente perdem terreno para soluções baseadas em conhecimento mais flexíveis, que não exigem treinamento de um especialista em palavras para cada alvo de desambiguação. Para preencher essa lacuna, adotamos uma perspectiva diferente e contamos com o aprendizado de sequência para enquadrar o problema de desambiguação: propomos e estudamos em profundidade uma série de arquiteturas neurais de ponta a ponta diretamente adaptadas à tarefa, desde memória de longo prazo bidirecional até modelos de codificador-decodificador. Nossa extensa avaliação sobre benchmarks padrão e em vários idiomas mostra que o aprendizado de sequência permite modelos de palavras mais versáteis que levam consistentemente a resultados de última geração, mesmo contra especialistas em palavras com recursos projetados.', 'fr': "Les modèles de désambiguïsation Word Sense existent dans de nombreuses variantes Même si les solutions supervisées ont tendance à donner les meilleurs résultats en termes de précision, elles perdent souvent du terrain au profit de solutions plus flexibles basées sur la connaissance, qui ne nécessitent pas de formation d'un expert en mots pour chaque objectif de désambiguïsation. Pour combler cette lacune, nous adoptons une perspective différente et nous nous appuyons sur l'apprentissage séquentiel pour cerner le problème de la désambiguïsation\xa0: nous proposons et étudions en profondeur une série d'architectures neuronales de bout en bout directement adaptées à la tâche, allant de la mémoire longue à court terme bidirectionnelle aux modèles encodeur-décodeur. Notre évaluation approfondie par rapport à des tests de référence standard et dans plusieurs langues montre que l'apprentissage séquentiel permet d'obtenir des modèles tous mots plus polyvalents qui conduisent systématiquement à des résultats de pointe, même pour des experts en mots dotés de fonctionnalités techniques.", 'es': 'Los modelos de desambiguación de Word Sense existen en muchos sabores. A pesar de que los supervisados tienden a rendir mejor en términos de precisión, a menudo pierden terreno ante soluciones basadas en el conocimiento más flexibles, que no requieren la capacitación de un experto en palabras para cada objetivo de desambiguación. Para cerrar esta brecha, adoptamos una perspectiva diferente y nos basamos en el aprendizaje de secuencias para enmarcar el problema de la desambiguación: proponemos y estudiamos en profundidad una serie de arquitecturas neuronales de extremo a extremo directamente adaptadas a la tarea, desde modelos bidireccionales de memoria a corto plazo a largo plazo hasta modelos de codificador-decodificador. Nuestra amplia evaluación sobre puntos de referencia estándar y en varios idiomas demuestra que el aprendizaje secuencial permite modelos de palabras más versátiles que conducen consistentemente a resultados de última generación, incluso en comparación con expertos en palabras con funciones diseñadas.', 'ja': 'ワードセンスの曖昧さ解消モデルは、多くのフレーバーに存在します。監督下にあるものは、正確さの観点で最も優れたパフォーマンスを発揮する傾向があるにもかかわらず、より柔軟な知識ベースのソリューションに敗北することがよくあります。これらのソリューションは、あらゆる曖昧さ解消のターゲットに対して単語の専門家によるトレーニングを必要としません。このギャップを埋めるために、私たちは異なる視点を採用し、シーケンス学習に依存して曖昧さ解消の問題をフレームワークします。双方向の長期記憶からエンコーダデコーダモデルまで、タスクに直接合わせた一連のエンドツーエンドのニューラルアーキテクチャを提案し、深く研究します。標準的なベンチマークと複数の言語での当社の広範な評価によると、シーケンス学習は、エンジニアリングされた機能を持つワードエキスパートに対してさえ、一貫して最先端の結果をもたらす、より汎用性の高いすべてのワードモデルを可能にすることが示されています。', 'zh': 'Word Sense 消歧义模形以多风。 虽监者在准确性为上,输之于解决方案,解决方案不待单词家为消歧义培训。 为弥合之差,各用异端,因序学以构消歧义,深究一系直指之端量身至于端神经架构,自双向长短期记至编码器 - 解码器模。 准的基准,多种语言之广评,序学可以成单词体,虽与功能之单词家,始终如一。', 'hi': 'Word Sense Disambiguation मॉडल कई जायकों में मौजूद हैं। भले ही पर्यवेक्षित लोग सटीकता के मामले में सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करते हैं, वे अक्सर अधिक लचीले ज्ञान-आधारित समाधानों के लिए जमीन खो देते हैं, जिन्हें प्रत्येक बहुविकल्पीय लक्ष्य के लिए एक शब्द विशेषज्ञ द्वारा प्रशिक्षण की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। इस अंतर को पाटने के लिए हम एक अलग परिप्रेक्ष्य को अपनाते हैं और बहुविकल्पीय समस्या को फ्रेम करने के लिए अनुक्रम सीखने पर भरोसा करते हैं: हम अंत-से-अंत तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर की एक श्रृंखला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और गहराई से अध्ययन करते हैं जो सीधे कार्य के अनुरूप होता है, द्विदिशात्मक दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक मेमोरी से एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल तक। मानक बेंचमार्क और कई भाषाओं में हमारे व्यापक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि अनुक्रम सीखने से अधिक बहुमुखी सभी-शब्द मॉडल सक्षम होते हैं जो लगातार अत्याधुनिक परिणामों का नेतृत्व करते हैं, यहां तक कि इंजीनियर सुविधाओं के साथ शब्द विशेषज्ञों के खिलाफ भी।', 'ru': 'Модели Word Sense Disambiguation существуют во многих вариантах. Хотя контролируемые, как правило, работают лучше с точки зрения точности, они часто теряют почву для более гибких решений, основанных на знаниях, которые не требуют обучения эксперта слова для каждой цели дезагрегирования. Чтобы преодолеть этот разрыв, мы принимаем другую перспективу и полагаемся на обучение последовательности, чтобы оформить проблему расплывчатости: мы предлагаем и глубоко изучаем ряд сквозных нейронных архитектур, непосредственно адаптированных к задаче, от двунаправленной долгосрочной краткосрочной памяти до моделей кодировщик-декодер. Наша обширная оценка по сравнению со стандартными эталонами и на нескольких языках показывает, что обучение последовательностям обеспечивает более универсальные модели из всех слов, которые последовательно приводят к самым современным результатам, даже по сравнению со специалистами по словам с инженерными функциями.', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha Word Sense Disambiguation i go leor blasanna. Cé gur gnách go bhfeidhmíonn na cinn atá faoi mhaoirseacht is fearr ó thaobh cruinnis de, is minic a chailleann siad talamh ar réitigh eolasbhunaithe níos solúbtha, nach mbíonn oiliúint ó shaineolaí focal ag teastáil uathu le haghaidh gach sprice dí-athbhrí. Chun an bhearna seo a líonadh glacaimid le peirspictíocht éagsúil agus braithimid ar fhoghlaim seichimh chun fadhb an dí-athbhrí a fhrámú: molaimid agus déanaimid staidéar domhain ar shraith ailtireachtaí néaracha ceann go ceann atá sainoiriúnaithe go díreach don tasc, ó Chuimhne Fadtéarmach Dhéthreoch go Cuimhne Gearrthéarmach déthreoch go samhlacha ionchódóra-díchódóra. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht fhairsing ar thagarmharcanna caighdeánacha agus i dteangacha iolracha go gcumasaíonn foghlaim seichimh samhlacha uile-focal níos ilúsáide a mbíonn torthaí den scoth mar thoradh orthu go comhsheasmhach, fiú i gcoinne saineolaithe focal a bhfuil gnéithe innealtóireachta acu.', 'hu': 'A Word Sense szétbontó modellek sok ízben léteznek. Annak ellenére, hogy a felügyelt személyek általában a pontosság szempontjából a legjobban teljesítenek, gyakran elveszítik a területüket a rugalmasabb tudásalapú megoldások miatt, amelyek nem igényelnek szószakértő képzést minden egyértelmű célhoz. A szakadék áthidalása érdekében más perspektívát alkalmazunk, és a szekvencia tanulásra támaszkodunk, hogy keretezzük az egyértelműsítési problémát: a feladathoz közvetlenül igazított end-to-end neurális architektúrákat javasoljuk és mélyrehatóan tanulmányozzuk, a kétirányú hosszú rövid távú memóriától a kódoló-dekódoló modellekig. Szabványos referenciaértékek és több nyelven végzett kiterjedt értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy a szekvencia tanulás sokoldalúbb, minden szót tartalmazó modelleket tesz lehetővé, amelyek következetesen korszerű eredményekhez vezetnek, még a tervezett funkciókkal rendelkező szószakértők ellen is.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα αποσαφήνισης υπάρχουν σε πολλές γεύσεις. Παρόλο που οι εποπτευόμενες τείνουν να αποδίδουν καλύτερα από άποψη ακρίβειας, συχνά χάνουν έδαφος σε πιο ευέλικτες λύσεις βασισμένες στη γνώση, οι οποίες δεν απαιτούν εκπαίδευση από έναν ειδικό λέξεων για κάθε στόχο διασφάλισης. Για να γεφυρώσουμε αυτό το χάσμα υιοθετούμε μια διαφορετική προοπτική και βασιζόμαστε στη μάθηση αλληλουχιών για να πλαισιώσουμε το πρόβλημα διασφάλισης: προτείνουμε και μελετούμε σε βάθος μια σειρά από ολοκληρωμένες νευρωνικές αρχιτεκτονικές προσαρμοσμένες άμεσα στην εργασία, από την αμφίδρομη μακροπρόθεσμη μνήμη έως τα μοντέλα κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή. Η εκτενής αξιολόγησή μας σε τυποποιημένα κριτήρια αναφοράς και σε πολλές γλώσσες δείχνει ότι η εκμάθηση ακολουθιών επιτρέπει πιο ευέλικτα μοντέλα όλων των λέξεων που οδηγούν σταθερά σε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, ακόμη και έναντι ειδικών λέξεων με μηχανικά χαρακτηριστικά.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების სიტყვების განსხვავება მოდელები მრავალში არსებობს. მაგრამ მართლაც მართლაც უკეთესი გავაკეთებენ, ისინი ხშირად უკეთესი ცნობიერების გასაკეთებლად დასრულებენ, რომლებიც ყველა განაკეთებული მისამართლად არ მოჭირდება სიტყვა ექსპერტი ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებული პერსპექტიფიკაცია და განსხვავებული პრობლემების განსხვავებაზე დავიწყებთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებას: ჩვენ განსხვავებთ და განსხვავებთ განსხვავებული ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტიკაციების სიერეში, მხოლოდ განსხვავებული მოდელზე,  ჩვენი განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრება სტანდარტური ბენქმარკებით და მრავალ ენაში ჩვენი განსაზღვრება მოჩვენებს, რომ სწავლება უფრო სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სიტყვების მოდე', 'it': "I modelli di disambiguazione di Word Sense esistono in molti gusti. Anche se quelli supervisionati tendono a dare i migliori risultati in termini di precisione, spesso perdono terreno a soluzioni basate sulla conoscenza più flessibili, che non richiedono formazione da parte di un esperto di parole per ogni obiettivo di disambiguazione. Per colmare questo divario adottiamo una prospettiva diversa e ci affidiamo all'apprendimento sequenziale per inquadrare il problema della disambiguazione: proponiamo e studiamo in profondità una serie di architetture neurali end-to-end direttamente adattate al compito, dalla memoria bidirezionale Long Short-Term ai modelli encoder-decoder. La nostra ampia valutazione su benchmark standard e in più lingue dimostra che l'apprendimento sequenziale consente modelli di tutte le parole più versatili che portano costantemente a risultati all'avanguardia, anche contro esperti di parole con funzionalità ingegnerizzate.", 'kk': 'Сөздің сезімін бұғаттау үлгілері көптеген түстерде бар. Бірақ бақылаулары дұрыс жағдайда ең жақсы жұмыс істеуге болады, олар көбінесе білім негіздеген шешімдерге көбірек жерді жоғалуға болады. Бұл сөз эксперттерінің әрбір белсендіру мақсатына көме Бұл аралықты көшірмелеу үшін біз басқа перспективті қолданып, осындай қысқарту мәселесін құру үшін реттеу оқытуға сенеміз: біз тапсырмаға тұратын невралдық архитектуралардың бірнеше сериясын түсіндіру және зерттеу үшін қолданып, оны кодтау үлгі Стандартты бағдарламалардың және бірнеше тілдерінде кеңейтілген оқу үлгілерімізді көрсетеді. Бұл бағдарламаларды оқу үлгілері инженерлік мүмкіндіктеріне қарсы болатын әртүрлі сөздер үлгілерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Žodų jausmų nedviprasmiškumo modeliai egzistuoja daugeliu skonių. Nors prižiūrimi asmenys dažnai geriausiai vertina tikslumą, jie dažnai netenka pagrindo lankstesniems žiniomis pagrįstiems sprendimams, kuriems nereikia, kad žodis ekspertas mokytų kiekvieną nedviprasmišką tikslą. Siekdami užkirsti kelią šiam atotrūkiui, mes priimame kitą perspektyvą ir pasikliaujame sekos mokymu, kad išskirtume problem ą dėl nedviprasmiškumo: mes siūlome ir nuodugniai tiriame įvairias galutines ir galutines neurologines architektūras, tiesiogiai pritaikytas užduotims, nuo dvikryptinės ilgalaikės atminties iki kodavimo modelių. Mūsų išsamus standartinių lyginamųjų rodiklių ir kelių kalbų vertinimas rodo, kad sekos mokymasis suteikia galimybę įvairesniems visų žodžių modeliams, kurie nuosekliai duoda pažangiausius rezultatus, net ir žodžių ekspertams, turintiems in žinerinių savybių.', 'mk': 'Моделите за раздвојување на чувството на зборовите постојат во многу вкуси. Иако надгледуваните имаат тенденција да извршат најдобро во поглед на прецизноста, честопати губат терен за пофлексибилни решенија базирани на знаење, кои не бараат обука од еден збор експерт за секоја цел за дејамбигуација. За да ја преминеме оваа празнина усвојуваме различна перспектива и се потпираме на училиште на секвенца за да го рамкуваме проблемот со дебабигуацијата: предложуваме и студираме во длабочина серија нервни архитектури од крај до крај директно прилагодени на задачата, од движење на долгорочна меморија до модели на кодер-декодер. Нашата екстремна проценка во однос на стандардните резултати и на повеќе јазици покажува дека учењето на секвенца овозможува пошироки модели на сите зборови кои константно водат до најсовремени резултати, дури и против зборовите експерти со инженерски карактеристики.', 'ms': 'Model Nyahambiguasi Sensi Perkataan wujud dalam banyak rasa. Walaupun yang diawasi cenderung untuk melakukan yang terbaik dalam terma akurat, mereka sering kehilangan tanah untuk solusi yang lebih fleksibel berdasarkan pengetahuan, yang tidak memerlukan latihan oleh pakar kata untuk setiap sasaran tidak ambiguasi. Untuk menyelesaikan ruang ini, kami mengadopsi perspektif yang berbeza dan bergantung pada pelajaran urutan untuk bingkai masalah penyelesaian: kami melanjutkan dan belajar dalam siri arkitektur saraf akhir-akhir yang disesuaikan secara langsung untuk tugas, dari ingatan jangka pendek bidireksi ke model pengekod-dekoder. Evaluasi luas kita terhadap tanda referensi piawai dan dalam berbilang bahasa menunjukkan bahawa pembelajaran urutan membolehkan model-perkataan-semua yang lebih beragam yang secara konsisten membawa kepada keputusan-keputusan-state-of-the-art, walaupun terhadap pakar perkataan dengan ciri-ciri rekayasa.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ diżambiguazzjoni tas-Sens tal-kliem jeżistu f’ħafna togħmiet. Minkejja li dawk sorveljati għandhom it-tendenza li jwettqu l-a ħjar f’termini ta’ preċiżjoni, spiss jitilfu t-triq għal soluzzjonijiet aktar flessibbli bbażati fuq l-għarfien, li ma jeħtieġux taħriġ minn kelma esperta għal kull mira ta’ diżambigwazzjoni. Biex nindirizzaw din id-distakk, niddottaw perspettiva differenti u niddependi fuq it-tagħlim tas-sekwenzi biex inqasmu l-problem a tad-diżambigwazzjoni: nipproponu u nistudjaw fil-fond serje ta’ arkitetturi newrali minn tarf sa tarf imfassla direttament għall-kompitu, minn Memorja bidirezzjonali fuq medda twila ta’ żmien sa mudelli ta’ kodifikazzjoni-dekodifikazzjoni. L-evalwazzjoni estensiva tagħna dwar il-punti ta’ riferiment standard u f’diversi lingwi turi li t-tagħlim tas-sekwenza jippermetti mudelli ta’ kliem kollu aktar versatili li b’mod konsistenti jwasslu għal riżultati avvanzati, anke kontra esperti tal-kliem b’karatteristiċi in ġinerizzati.', 'mn': 'Үүний мэдрэмжийн буруутгах загварууд олон амттай байдаг. Хэдийгээр удирдлагатай хүмүүс зөв байдалд хамгийн сайн ажилладаг ч, ихэвчлэн мэдлэг суурилсан шийдэлүүдэд газар алдагддаг. Энэ нь эвдэмжлэх зорилго бүрийн үг мэргэжилтнүүдийн сургалтын шаардлагагүй. Энэ ялгааг олохын тулд бид өөр ойлголтыг ашиглаж буй дарааллаар суралцах суралцах боломжтой. Бид үүнийг шууд зохион байгуулсан мэдрэлийн архитектуруудыг санал, гүн гүнзгий судалж байна. Бидний стандарт багаж, олон хэлний талаар дүгнэлт нь дарааллын суралцах нь инженерийн чадвартай бүх үг үлгэрүүлэх арга загваруудыг ихэвчлэн харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് സെന്\u200dസിന്റെ അസംഭാഷണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പലതും സ്വാദങ്ങളില്\u200d നിലവിലുണ്ട്. നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടവര്\u200d സത്യത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും അവര്\u200d പ്രാവശ്യം പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പരിഹാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക ഈ വേര്\u200dപെട്ടത്തില്\u200d നാം വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു വേറെ സെക്കന്റ് പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നത്: നമ്മുടെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിരസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് അവസാന സാധാരണ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ വിശാലമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു സെക്കന്\u200dസ് വിദ്യാഭ്യസിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d വാക്കു', 'no': 'Det finst i mange flakkar modular for å slå av ordførsel. Selv om oversiktane tenderer å utføre best i nøyaktighet, mistar dei ofte bakgrunnen til fleksibele kunnskapsbaserte løysingar, som ikkje krev opplæring av eit ordekspertet for kvar mål for disambiguasjon. For å bryta dette mellomrommet, bruker vi ein annan perspektiv og rely på sekvenslæring for å ramme på disambiguasjonsproblemet: vi foreslår og studerer i dybde ei serie av end- to- end neuralarkitekturar direkte tilpassa oppgåva, frå bidireksjonal lang- termisk minne til koderingsmodeller. Vårt utvida evalueringa over standardbanker og på fleire språk viser at sekvenslæring gjer meir versatibelt alle ord-modeller som konsistent fører til kunsten-resultat, selv mot ordekspertar med ingeniare funksjonar.', 'pl': 'Model rozjasnienia Word Sense istnieją w wielu smakach. Mimo że nadzorowane osoby mają tendencję do najlepszych osiągnięć pod względem dokładności, często tracą podstawę do bardziej elastycznych rozwiązań opartych na wiedzy, które nie wymagają szkolenia przez eksperta słowa dla każdego celu dyjednoznacznego. Aby wypełnić tę lukę, przyjmujemy inną perspektywę i opieramy się na uczeniu się sekwencji, aby opracować problem dyjednoznaczności: proponujemy i dogłębnie badamy serię kompleksowych architektur neuronowych dostosowanych bezpośrednio do danego zadania, od dwukierunkowej długoterminowej pamięci krótkoterminowej po modele kodera-dekodera. Nasza obszerna ocena standardowych wskaźników odniesienia i w wielu językach pokazuje, że uczenie się sekwencji umożliwia bardziej wszechstronne modele wszystkich słów, które konsekwentnie prowadzą do najnowocześniejszych wyników, nawet w stosunku do ekspertów słów z zaprojektowanymi funkcjami.', 'sr': 'U mnogim ukusima postoje modeli disambiguacije reči. Iako nadzornici uopšte čine najbolje u smislu tačnosti, često gube zemlju na fleksibilnije rješenje na temelju znanja, koje ne zahtevaju obuku od strane reči stručnjaka za svaku cilj disambigacije. Da bismo predmetnuli ovu prazninu, usvojili smo drugu perspektivu i oslanjali se na učenje sekvence da okrenemo problem disambiguacije: predlažemo i proučavamo duboko niz neuralnih arhitektura koji su direktno pripremljeni zadatku, od dvorične dugoročne uspomene do modela kodera-dekodera. Naša široka procjena standardnih kriterija i na višestrukim jezicima pokazuje da učenje sekvence omogućava više versativnih modela svih reèi koje konsekventno vode do rezultata umetnosti, čak i protiv reèi stručnjaka sa in ženjerskim karakteristikama.', 'ro': 'Modelele de dezambiguizare există în multe variante. Chiar dacă cele supravegheate tind să performeze cel mai bine în ceea ce privește acuratețea, adesea pierd teren în fața soluțiilor mai flexibile bazate pe cunoaștere, care nu necesită instruire de către un expert de cuvinte pentru fiecare țintă de dezambiguizare. Pentru a elimina acest decalaj adoptăm o perspectivă diferită și ne bazăm pe învățarea secvențelor pentru a încadra problema dezambiguizării: propunem și studiem în profunzime o serie de arhitecturi neurale end-to-end adaptate direct sarcinii, de la memorie bidirecțională pe termen scurt până la modele codificator-decodor. Evaluarea noastră extinsă asupra criteriilor de referință standard și în mai multe limbi arată că învățarea secvențială permite modele mai versatile pentru toate cuvintele, care duc în mod constant la rezultate de ultimă oră, chiar și împotriva experților cu caracteristici proiectate.', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධය අක්\u200dරියාත්මක නිර්මාණය විශ්වාස කරන්න බොහොම වස්තුවක් තියෙනවා. බලාපොරොත්තු විදිහට හොඳම විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් නමුත්, ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වචන විශේෂ අපි වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි: අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අන අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වලින් අපේ විශාල විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා ක්\u200dරමාණය ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් හැම වචන මෝඩේල්ස් වලින් වලට', 'so': 'Isticmaalka qalabka Sense waxaa ku jira noocyo badan. In kastoo ay ilaaliyayaashu inta badan sameeyaan si saxda ah, sida badan dhul bay u lumiyaan xalalka aqoonta oo ka faa’iido badan, taasoo aan u baahnayn in loo baahdo khabiir aqoon ah oo dhan loo baahnayo waxbarasho. Si aan u qabsado gafkan, waxaynu qaadanaynaa arag kala duwan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa waxbarashada xilliga si aan u qabsado dhibaatada kala duduwan: waxaynu horumarinaynaa oo ku baranaynaa meelo aad u dhamaataysan dhammaadka dhismaha neurada ee si toos ah u qoran shaqada, xafiiska dheer-mudada, si aan u qorno modellada codcododer. Qiimeyntayada dheer oo ku saabsan qiimeynta kaararka ah iyo luuqado kala duduwan waxay muuqataa in waxbarashada soo socodku ay ka dhigtaa mid ka sii siman qaabilsan hadalka oo dhan, kaas oo ku hoggaamiya resultinta dowladda farshaxanka, xataa xitaa khabiir aqoonta leh oo ku qoran waxyaabo la qoray.', 'sv': 'Word Sense Disambiguation modeller finns i många smaker. Även om de övervakade tenderar att prestera bäst när det gäller noggrannhet förlorar de ofta mark till mer flexibla kunskapsbaserade lösningar, som inte kräver utbildning av en ordexpert för varje otvetydigt mål. För att överbrygga denna klyfta antar vi ett annat perspektiv och förlitar oss på sekvensinlärning för att rama in missförståndsproblemet: vi föreslår och studerar ingående en serie end-to-end neurala arkitekturer direkt anpassade till uppgiften, från dubbelriktad långtidsminne till kodare-dekoder modeller. Vår omfattande utvärdering över standardriktmärken och på flera språk visar att sekvensinlärning möjliggör mer mångsidiga allordsmodeller som konsekvent leder till toppmoderna resultat, även mot ordexperter med avancerade funktioner.', 'ta': 'Word Sense Disambiguation models exist in many flavors.  கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டவர்கள் சரியான விஷயத்தில் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்துகிறார்கள் என்றாலும், அவர்கள் பெரும்பாலும் flexible அறிவு அடிப்படையில் தீர்வுகளுக்க இந்த வேறு இடைவெளியை பிரித்து நாம் வேறு பார்வையை எடுத்துக் கொண்டு பிரிவு பிரச்சனையை சட்டத்தில் கற்றல் மீது நம்பிக்கை கொள்கிறோம்: நாம் ஆழத்தில் நேராக முடியாத புதிய அமைப்புகளை  நிலையான பெங்குருக்கள் மற்றும் பல மொழிகளில் எங்கள் விரிவான மதிப்பெண்களை காட்டுகிறது பின்வரும் கற்றல் மாற்றத்தை மாற்றும் அனைத்து வார்த்தைகளும் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Models in many flavors exist. اگرچہ نظارت کرنے والوں کو دقیق کے مطابق اچھی طرح عمل کرنا چاہتے ہیں، انہوں نے بہت اچھی طرح زیادہ مطابق علم کی راه حلوں کے لئے زمین کو خسارہ میں ڈال دیا ہے، جو ہر مختلف مقصد کے لئے کسی کلم کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ نہیں کی ضرورت ہے. ہم ایک مختلف نظر نظر کے مطابق مطابق کریں گے اور ایک مختلف نظر نظر کے مطابق مختلف نظر کی تعلیم پر اعتماد کریں گے: ہم ایک سری اندھیرے سے اندھیرے سے نیورال معماری کی تعلیم کریں گے جو کام کی طرف مستقیم تدبیر کی گئی تھی، دوسری لامٹر میموری سے کوڈر-ڈکور-ڈکور موڈل تک۔ ہمارا استاندارڈ بنچم مارک اور بہت سی زبانوں میں اضافہ کا ارزش دکھاتا ہے کہ سفارش کی تعلیم زیادہ مختلف تمام کلمات کی مدل کو قابل کرتا ہے جو ہمیشہ استاندارٹ کے نتیجے تک پہنچاتے ہیں، اگرچہ کلمات کے متعلق انجینر کے متعلق استثناء', 'uz': "Boʻsh joy Ko'pchilikni tasavvur qilishni istasangiz kerak bo'lsa, ular ko'p doim aqllik asosida o'zini yo'qotadi, va u har bir taklif qilish uchun so'z ekspert'ining haqida o'rganish kerak emas. Bu gapni birlashtirish uchun biz boshqa ko'rinishni boshqa qo'shish uchun o'rganamiz va o'rganish muammolarini o'rganish uchun ishni boshqaramiz va o'rganamiz. Bu vazifani ishga tayyorlash uchun boshqa bir necha muddat xotiradan kodlash modellaridan foydalanamiz. Andoza benchmalar va bir necha tillar orqali qiymatlarimizning kengaytirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi. Ko'pchilik o'rganish imkoniyatlarini bir necha so'zlar bilan bir necha so'z modellarini ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Cách chế biến cảm xúc từ có nhiều vị lắm. Mặc dù người được giám sát có xu hướng tiến bộ tốt nhất về độ chính xác, nhưng họ thường mất phương hướng tìm ra những giải pháp dựa trên kiến thức linh hoạt hơn, không cần một chuyên gia từ để xác định các mục tiêu. Để vượt qua khoảng trống này, chúng ta chọn một quan điểm khác nhau và dựa trên việc học trình tự phân phối vấn đề. Chúng ta đề xuất và nghiên cứu sâu hơn một loạt các kiến trúc thần kinh kết thúc-kết thúc trực tiếp phù hợp với nhiệm vụ, từ bộ nhớ ngắn hạn cùng nhau đến mô hình mã hóa. Sự đánh giá rộng rãi trên tiêu chuẩn và nhiều ngôn ngữ cho thấy việc học trình tự động cho phép mô hình to àn từ nhiều khả năng đa dạng, luôn dẫn đến kết quả hiện đại, thậm chí chống lại các chuyên gia từ ngữ có tính năng khéo léo.', 'bg': 'Моделите за разграничаване съществуват в много вкусове. Въпреки че надзорните са склонни да се представят най-добре по отношение на точността, те често губят място за по-гъвкави решения, основани на знанието, които не изискват обучение от експерт по думите за всяка цел за изясняване. За да преодолеем тази пропаст, ние възприемаме различна перспектива и разчитаме на последователното учене, за да оформим проблема с разграничаването: предлагаме и изучаваме в дълбочина серия от нервни архитектури от край до край, директно адаптирани към задачата, от двупосочни дългосрочни краткосрочни памети до модели кодер-декодер. Нашата обширна оценка на стандартните показатели и на няколко езика показва, че последователното обучение позволява по-гъвкави модели с всички думи, които последователно водят до най-съвременни резултати, дори срещу експерти по думи с инженерни функции.', 'da': 'Word Sense Disambiguation modeller findes i mange varianter. Selv om overvågede løsninger har tendens til at klare sig bedst med hensyn til nøjagtighed, mister de ofte terræn til mere fleksible videnbaserede løsninger, som ikke kræver uddannelse af en ordekspert for hvert eneste forståelsesmål. For at bygge bro over denne kløft anvender vi et andet perspektiv og er afhængige af sekvenslæring til at ramme forskelsbehandlingsproblemet: Vi foreslår og undersøger dybdegående en række end-to-end neurale arkitekturer, der er direkte skræddersyet til opgaven, fra tovejet lang korttidshukommelse til encoder-dekoder modeller. Vores omfattende evaluering over standard benchmarks og på flere sprog viser, at sekvenslæring muliggør mere alsidige all-word modeller, der konsekvent fører til state-of-the-art resultater, selv mod ordeksperter med konstruerede funktioner.', 'nl': 'Word Sense Disambiguation modellen bestaan in vele smaken. Hoewel begeleide mensen meestal het beste presteren op het gebied van nauwkeurigheid, verliezen ze vaak terrein aan flexibelere kennisgebaseerde oplossingen, die geen training vereisen door een woordexpert voor elk verduidelijkingstoel. Om deze kloof te overbruggen nemen we een ander perspectief in en vertrouwen we op sequence learning om het onderscheidingsprobleem te kaderen: we stellen en bestuderen een reeks end-to-end neurale architecturen voor die taak, van bidirectioneel Long Short Term Memory tot encoder-decoder modellen. Onze uitgebreide evaluatie van standaard benchmarks en in meerdere talen toont aan dat sequence learning veelzijdigere modellen mogelijk maakt die consistent leiden tot state-of-the-art resultaten, zelfs tegen woordexperts met technische functies.', 'hr': 'Modeli disambigacije riječi postoje u mnogim ukusima. Iako nadzirani čine najbolje u smislu tačnosti, često gube zemlju na fleksibilnije rješenje na temelju znanja, koje ne zahtijevaju obuku od strane riječi stručnjaka za svaku cilj disambigacije. Da bismo preusvojili tu prazninu, usvojili smo drugačiju perspektivu i oslanjali se na učenje sekvencije kako bi okrenuli problem disambigacije: predlažemo i proučavamo duboko niz neurografskih arhitektura koji su direktno prilagođeni zadatku, od dvorične dugoročne uspomene do modela kodera-dekodera. Naša široka procjena standardnih kriterija i na višestrukim jezicima pokazuje da učenje sekvencije omogućava više versativnih modela svih riječi koje konsekventno vode do rezultata umjetnosti, čak i protiv stručnjaka riječi s in ženjerskim karakteristikama.', 'de': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Modelle gibt es in vielen Geschmacksrichtungen. Auch wenn beaufsichtigte Personen in Bezug auf Genauigkeit meist am besten abschneiden, verlieren sie oft Boden für flexiblere wissensbasierte Lösungen, die nicht für jedes Begriffsziel eine Schulung durch einen Wortexperten erfordern. Um diese Lücke zu schließen, nehmen wir eine andere Perspektive ein und setzen auf Sequenzlernen, um das Disambiguationsproblem zu umrahmen: Wir schlagen eine Reihe von End-to-End neuronalen Architekturen vor, die direkt auf die Aufgabe zugeschnitten sind, vom bidirektionalen Long-Short-Term Memory bis hin zu Encoder-Decoder-Modellen. Unsere umfangreiche Auswertung über Standard-Benchmarks und in mehreren Sprachen zeigt, dass Sequenz-Lernen vielseitigere All-Word-Modelle ermöglicht, die konsistent zu State-of-the-Art-Ergebnissen führen, selbst gegen Wortexperten mit technischen Funktionen.', 'fa': 'مدلهای ناپدید کردن کلمه در مزه های زیادی وجود دارد. اگرچه بررسی\u200cشده\u200cها به بهترین توجه به دقیق انجام می\u200cدهند، اغلب به راه\u200cحل\u200cهای بیشتری بر اساس علم از زمین می\u200cبرند، که توسط یک کلمه متخصص برای هر هدف ناپدید شدن نیاز ندارند. برای تغییر دادن این فاصله، ما یک دیدگاه متفاوتی را قبول می کنیم و بر روی یادگیری از طریقه\u200cای که مشکل غیرقابل تغییر دادن را قائل می\u200cکنیم، استفاده می\u200cکنیم و در عمیق تحقیق می\u200cکنیم: ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و درس می\u200cکنیم یک سری مجموعه\u200cهای معماری عصبی که مستقیماً به این کار تغی ارزیابی گسترده\u200cی ما بر روی برچسب\u200cهای استاندارد و در زبان\u200cهای متعدد نشان می\u200cدهد که برچسب\u200cهای یادگیری به مدل\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت\u200cتر می\u200cتواند به نتیجه\u200cهای هنری رهبری کند، حتی بر خلاف متخصص\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها با ویژه\u200cهای مهند', 'id': 'Word Sense Disambiguation model ada dalam banyak rasa. Meskipun yang diawasi cenderung untuk melakukan yang terbaik dalam terma akurasi, mereka sering kehilangan tanah untuk solusi yang lebih fleksibel berdasarkan pengetahuan, yang tidak membutuhkan pelatihan oleh seorang ahli kata untuk setiap sasaran tidak ambiguasi. Untuk menyelesaikan ruang ini kami mengadopsi perspektif yang berbeda dan bergantung pada urutan belajar untuk mengarahkan masalah penyesalan: kami melanjutkan dan mempelajari secara mendalam seri arsitektur saraf akhir-akhir langsung disesuaikan untuk tugas, dari memori bidireksi jangka pendek jangka pendek hingga model pengekoder-dekoder. Evaluasi ekstensif kita terhadap benchmarks standar dan dalam berbagai bahasa menunjukkan bahwa pelajaran urutan memungkinkan model-kata-semua yang lebih beragam yang konsisten membawa ke hasil terbaik, bahkan terhadap pakar kata dengan ciri-ciri rekayasa.', 'ko': '단어의 의미 변조 모델은 여러 가지가 있다.비록 감독을 받는 해결 방안은 종종 정확성 면에서 가장 좋지만, 그들은 더욱 유연한 지식 기반 해결 방안으로 대체되고, 이러한 해결 방안들은 모든 잘못된 목표에 대해 어휘 전문가가 교육할 필요가 없다.이러한 차이를 보완하기 위해 우리는 서로 다른 시각을 채택하고 서열 학습에 의존하여 분기 문제를 구축했다. 우리는 임무에 대한 직접적인 맞춤형 끝에서 끝까지의 신경 구조를 제기하고 깊이 있게 연구했다. 양방향의 장단점에서 코딩 모델까지 기억했다.표준 기준과 다양한 언어에 대한 광범위한 평가에 따르면 서열 학습은 더욱 통용되는 모든 단어 모델을 실현하고 공학적 특징을 가진 단어 전문가를 대상으로 하는 최첨단 결과를 지속적으로 나타낼 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa kudanganyikiwa kwa maneno yanakuwepo katika matumizi mengi. Hata kama wategemewa wanafanya vizuri kwa ukweli, mara nyingi hupoteza ardhi kwa suluhisho zenye ufahamu wenye ujasiri, ambazo hazihitaji mafunzo na mtaalam wa neno kwa kila lengo la kutokuwepo na ubaguzi. Kupambana na upande huu, tunachukua mtazamo tofauti na tunategemea kufuatia kujifunza kwa kutangaza tatizo la ubaguzi: tunapendekeza na kusoma kwa kina mfululizo wa majengo ya kisasa yanayoishia mwishoni mwa mwisho, moja kwa moja kwenye kazi hiyo, kutoka kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu wa muda mfupi ili kuweka kodi. Utafiti wetu wa kina juu ya misingi ya msingi na katika lugha mbalimbali unaonyesha kuwa elimu ya mfululizo inawezesha kuongezeka zaidi na mifano ya maneno yote ambayo kwa ujumla unapelekea matokeo ya serikali ya sanaa, hata dhidi ya wataalam wa maneno yenye tabia zilizotengenezwa.', 'af': "Woord Sense Ontbrekingsmodele bestaan in baie geflamme. Selfs al die ondersoekte mense het gevolg om die beste te doen in terms van presisiteit, verloor hulle dikwels grond na meer fleksibele kennis-gebaseerde oplossings, wat nie nodig ondersoek deur 'n woord-eksperteer vir elke ondersoekte doel nie. Om hierdie gap te brui, aanneem ons 'n ander perspektief en vertrou op sekwensies leer om die ontsammingsproblem te raam: ons voorstel en onderwerp in diepte 'n reeks van einde-tot-einde neurale arkitektuure direkte na die taak gewys, van tweede-direkte Lang-Term Geheue na enkoder-dekodermodelle. Ons uitbreiding evaluering oor standaard benchmarke en in veelvuldige tale wys dat sekvens leer maklik meer versatiewe alle woorde-modele wat konsistentlik lei na staat-van-kuns-resultate, selfs teen woord eksperte met in ženiere funksies.", 'sq': 'Modelet e zhdukjes së kuptimit të fjalëve ekzistojnë në shumë shije. Edhe pse ata të mbikqyrur kanë tendencë të bëjnë më të mirën në lidhje me saktësinë, ata shpesh humbin terren për zgjidhje më fleksible të bazuara në njohuri, të cilat nuk kërkojnë trajnimin nga një fjalë ekspert për çdo objektiv mosqartësimi. Për të përmbysur këtë boshllëk ne miratojmë një perspektivë të ndryshme dhe mbështetemi në mësimin e sekuencës për të përcaktuar problem in e çambiguacionit: ne propozojmë dhe studiojmë në thellësi një seri arkitekturash nervore nga fundi në fund të përshtatur drejtpërdrejt për detyrën, nga kujtesa dy-drejtore e afatit të gjatë deri në modelet kodues-dekoder. Vlerësimi ynë i gjerë lidhur me normat standarde dhe në gjuhë të shumta tregon se mësimi i sekuencës lejon modele më të shumta të të gjitha fjalëve që në mënyrë të vazhdueshme çojnë në rezultate më të larta, edhe kundër fjalëekspertëve me karakteristika inxhinierike.', 'tr': 'Kelemek Senedi Mazmunlar nusgalary köp leýdançalarda bar. Gözlendirilen adalat şeklinde iň gowy iş etmekde hem, köplenç bilim taýýarlanan çözümleri ýitirýärler. Bu şekilde her täsirleşme maksady üçin bir söz eksperti tarapyndan okuwçylyga gerek däldir. Bu boşluky köplitmek üçin biz farklı bir perspektiva üýtgedik we çykarmak meselesini önlemek üçin dinamly öwrenmegi üçin: biz bu işe doğrudan geçirilýän we çykarmak üçin bir näyral arhitekturlaryň sanyny teklip edip, ikinji gezek Uzun Ýagtyň ýagdaýyndan ködleme hasaplamagyna çevrilýäris. Biziň standart benchmarklaryň we köp dillerden çykyşymyz görkezilýän çykyşymyz bu sanat öwrenmesiniň enjiniýaly hasaplarylar bilen täze üýtgeşik eden ähli sözler nusgalaryna mümkin edýär.', 'am': 'ንግግር ተሟጋቾች ምንም እንኳ በተለየ እርግጠኛ ማድረግ ይኖራሉ፣ ብዙ ጊዜም በአውቀት መሠረቶች ላይ መሬት ይጠፋሉ፡፡ ይህንን ክፍል ለመቀላቀል የተለየ ልዩ ዓይነት እና የግጭት ጉዳይ ለመፍጠር በተመሳሰል እናምናለን፤ ወደ ስራቱ ቀጥተኛ የረጅም የረጅም ዘመናት ማስታወሻ ለencoder-decoder ሞዴላዎችን ለመፍጠር እናስተምራለን፡፡ የአስተዳዳደር የውይይት መድረክ እና በብዛት ቋንቋዎች ላይ የስፋት ማስተማር በተጨማሪው የንግግር ቃላት ሁሉ ምሳሌዎችን እንዲያሳየው እና በንግግር-የዓርት ውጤቶች ላይ የሚመሳሰል እና በተመሳሳይ እውቀት የንግግር አስተማሪዎች ላይ የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի զգացողության բացատրության մոդելները գոյություն ունեն բազմաթիվ համեմունքներում: Չնայած, որ վերահսկվողները հակված են լավագույնը կատարել ճշգրտության տեսանկյունից, նրանք հաճախ կորցնում են տարածք ավելի ճկուն գիտելիքի հիմնված լուծումների համար, որոնք չեն պահանջում յուրաքանչյուր բառի մասնագետի կրթություն բոլոր բացատրության ն Այս բացը հաղթահարելու համար մենք տարբեր տեսանկյունից ենք ընդունում և հիմնված ենք հաջորդականության ուսումնասիրության վրա, որպեսզի բացատրենք բացատրության խնդիրը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք և խորապես ուսումնասիրում մի շարք վերջ-վերջ նյարդային ճարտարապետություններ, որոնք ուղղակի համապատասխանում են խնդրին, երկու ուղղությամբ Մեր էքսպանցիոնալ գնահատումը ստանդարտ հարաբերականների և բազմաթիվ լեզվով ցույց է տալիս, որ հաջորդականության սովորելը հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի տարբեր բոլոր բառերի մոդելներ, որոնք մշտապես հանգեցնում են նորագույն արդյունքների, նույնիսկ ճարտարագիտական հա', 'az': 'Kelimi Sense İsmarışlıq modelləri çoxlu ləzzətlərdə mövcuddur. Gözləşdirilmiş olanlar do ğruluqla ən yaxşı işlər görməyə çalışırlar da, çox çox fleksibil bilgi tabanlı çətinliklərə yerdən ziyana uğrayarlar ki, hər cür təhsil məqsədilə təhsil etmək istəmirlər. Bu boşluğu körpüşdürmək üçün biz farklı bir perspektiv qəbul edir və disambiguasyon problemini çəkmək üçün seçmə öyrənməyə təvəkkül edirik: biz bu işə doğru düzəldilən bir nizi sona qədər nəyral arhitektarları təklif edirik, ikidiktiv Uzun Qısqa Yadından kodlayıcı modellərə qədər kodlayıcı modellərə qədər. Standardlı benchmarklar və çoxlu dillərdə çox değerlendirmək göstərir ki, seçmə öyrənməsi mühendisliyi təhsil etdiyi hər söz modellərini daha çox versatibil edər.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন স্বাদে শব্দ সেন্সের ডিসপ্যামেগুয়েশন মডেল রয়েছে। যদিও পর্যবেক্ষণকারীরা সঠিকভাবে পরিচালনা করে, তারা প্রায়শই জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক সমাধান হারিয়ে যায়, যা প্রত্যেক বিভ্রান্ত লক্ষ্যের জন্য একটি শব্ এই বিভ্রান্তিকে ব্রিজ করার জন্য আমরা বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি গ্রহণ করি এবং বিভ্রান্তিক সমস্যার ক্ষেত্রে নির্ভর করি বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি নিয়ে বিভিন্ন ক্ষেত্রে নির্ভর করি: আমরা প্রস্তাব করি এবং  স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বেনমার্ক এবং বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষায় আমাদের বিস্তারিত মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সেকেন্ড শিক্ষা শিক্ষা বিভিন্ন সমস্ত শব্দের মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে আর', 'cs': 'Word Sense Disambiguation modely existují v mnoha příchutích. I když dohlížené osoby mají tendenci nejlepší výkon z hlediska přesnosti, často ztrácejí půdu k flexibilnějším řešením založeným na znalostech, která nevyžadují školení slovního experta pro každý rozjasňovací cíl. Abychom tuto mezeru překonali, přijali jsme jinou perspektivu a spoléhali na sekvenční učení, abychom rámovali problém rozjasňování: navrhujeme a studujeme do hloubky řadu end-to-end neuronových architektur přímo přizpůsobených danému úkolu, od obousměrné dlouhodobé paměti až po kodér-dekódové modely. Naše rozsáhlé hodnocení standardních referenčních hodnot a ve více jazycích ukazuje, že sekvenční učení umožňuje univerzálnější modely všech slov, které důsledně vedou k nejmodernějším výsledkům, a to i proti slovním expertům s technickými funkcemi.', 'ca': "Els models de desambiguació del sentit de paraules existeixen en molts gusts. Encara que els supervisats tendeixen a fer el millor en termes de precisió, sovint perden terreny a solucions més flexibles basades en el coneixement, que no requereixen formació d'un expert per cada objectiu de desambiguació. Per superar aquest buit adoptem una perspectiva diferent i confiem en l'aprenentatge de seqüències per a estructurar el problema de desambiguació: proposem i estudiem en profunditat una sèrie d'arquitectures neurals de final a final adaptades directament a la tasca, des de la memòria bidireccional a curt termini fins a models de codificador-decoder. La nostra extensa avaluació sobre els punts de referència estándar i en múltiples llengües mostra que l'aprenentatge de seqüència permet models més versàtil de totes les paraules que condueixen a resultats més avançats, fins i tot amb experts de paraules amb característiques enginyeries.", 'bs': 'Modeli disambigacije riječi postoje u mnogim ukusima. Iako nadzornici čine najbolje u smislu tačnosti, često gube zemlju na fleksibilnije rješenje na temelju znanja, koje ne zahtijevaju obuku od strane riječi stručnjaka za svaku cilj disambigacije. Da bismo predmetnuli ovu prazninu, usvojili smo drugu perspektivu i oslanjali se na učenje sekvencije da bi se okrenuli problem disambiguacije: predlažemo i proučavamo duboko niz neuralnih arhitektura koji su direktno pripremljeni zadatku, od dvorične dugoročne uspomene do modela kodera-dekodera. Naša široka procjena o standardnim kriterijama i na višestrukim jezicima pokazuje da učenje sekvencije omogućava više versativnih modela svih riječi koje konsekventno vode do rezultata umjetnosti, čak i protiv riječi stručnjaka sa in ženjerskim karakteristikama.', 'fi': 'Word Sense Disambiguation malleja on olemassa monissa eri muodoissa. Vaikka valvotut henkilöt yleensä suoriutuvat parhaiten tarkkuuden suhteen, he menettävät usein tilaa joustavammille tietopohjaisille ratkaisuille, jotka eivät edellytä sanaasiantuntijan koulutusta jokaista erottelutavoitetta varten. Tämän aukon korjaamiseksi otamme erilaisen näkökulman ja luotamme sekvenssiooppimiseen määriteltäessä ongelman: ehdotamme ja tutkimme perusteellisesti sarjan päästä päähän -neuroarkkitehtuuria, jotka on räätälöity suoraan tehtävään, kaksisuuntaisesta pitkän aikavälin muistista kooderi-dekooderimalleihin. Laaja arviointimme vakiovertailuarvoista ja useilla kielillä osoittaa, että sekvenssiooppiminen mahdollistaa monipuolisemmat sanamallit, jotka johtavat johdonmukaisesti uusimpiin tuloksiin jopa sanaasiantuntijoihin, joilla on suunnitteluominaisuuksia.', 'et': 'Word Sense Disambiguatsiooni mudelid on olemas paljudes maitsetes. Kuigi järelevalve all olevad inimesed kipuvad täpsuse poolest kõige paremini tulema, kaotavad nad sageli ruumi paindlikumatele teadmistepõhistele lahendustele, mis ei nõua sõnaeksperdi koolitust iga selgituse eesmärgi jaoks. Selle lõhe ületamiseks võtame kasutusele teistsuguse perspektiivi ja tugineme jadaõppele, et kujundada selgitusprobleem: pakume välja ja uurime põhjalikult rida otsast otsani neuroarhitektuure, mis on otseselt kohandatud ülesandele, alates kahesuunalisest pikaajalisest lühiajalisest mälust kuni kodeerija-dekooderi mudelini. Meie põhjalik hindamine standardsetele võrdlusnäitajatele ja mitmes keeles näitab, et jadaõpe võimaldab mitmekülgsemaid kõigi sõnadega mudeleid, mis viivad järjepidevalt kaasaegsete tulemusteni isegi disainitud funktsioonidega sõnaekspertide vastu.', 'jv': 'Name Gak bener y챔n akeh y챔n dipunang챕 awak dh챕w챕 ngomong nik akeh sing luwih apik, nik awak dh챔w챔k챕 kuwi mau ngewehke awak dh챔w챔k챕 beraksi supoyo awak dh챔w챔k챕, awak dh챔w챔k챕 kuwi mesthi a angak dh챔w챔k챕 awak dh챔w챔k챕 petani uwong. Ngawe nggunakake gap iki unyangno wektu nggunakake sistem samihan karo sekondirno sekondirno urip nggawe ngupakan negoro nggunakake dipungot: k챕n챕 ngerasa lan ijol-urip dipumuhayo sak sistem end-to-end bu Neral seneng dipumuhay sekondirno urip nggawe lan sampek tanggal nggawe winih (long-Terminal) Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk sistem sing beraksi saben bench karo akeh lan luwih-luwih bener', 'he': 'דוגמני ניתוח משמעות מילים קיימים בטעמים רבים. למרות שאלה ששולטים נוטים לבצע את הטוב ביותר במונחים של מדויקת, הם לעתים קרובות מאבדים מקום לפתרונות גמישים יותר מבוססים על ידע, שלא דורשים אימון על ידי מומחה מילה לכל מטרה לא-סבירה. כדי לשבור את הפער הזה אנו מאמצים פרספקטיבה שונה וסמוכים על לימוד רצף כדי להסגר את בעיית הפרעת הבטחה: אנו מציעים וללמד בעמוק סדרה של ארכיטקטורות עצביות סוף-סוף שמתאימות ישירות למשימה, מ זיכרון ארוך-דרך זמן קצר-קצר למודלים קודם-קודם. הערכה הרחבה שלנו על נקודות רמז סטנדרטיות ובשפות רבות מראה שלמדת הרצף מאפשרת מודלים של כל מילים רבות יותר שמובילים באופן קבוע לתוצאות מוקדמות, אפילו נגד מומחים מילים עם תכונות הנדסה.', 'ha': "@ item: inmenu Text Completion Even though supervised ones tend to perform best in terms of accuracy, they often lose ground to more flexible knowledge-based solutions, which do not require training by a word expert for every disambiguation target.  To, dõmin mu kiyaye wannan gaura, za mu ɗauki wata kalma na dabam kuma munã dõgara a kan karanta matsayin da za'a danne masu yin gaura: Munã ƙarfafa da mu, kuma munã karatun cikin depth wasu matsakan baka-bakin-dawwama na rubutu wanda aka taimaki zuwa aikin, daga lokacin Long-Long-Long-Long-Dure zuwa motoder-kode. Ana ƙaddara bayani a kan bangon-bangon na daidaita da wasu harshe masu yawa, yana nũna cẽwa, wa'anar matsayi masu ƙaranci yana iya amfani da wasu misãlai masu daidaita duk-faɗi wanda ke gabatar da matsalar-na-kungiya, kõ kuwa don don masu motsa masu cikin tsarin da aka nuna.", 'sk': 'Modeli razočaranja Word Sense obstajajo v številnih okusih. Čeprav so nadzorovani najboljši v smislu natančnosti, pogosto izgubijo prostor za bolj prožne rešitve, ki temeljijo na znanju, za katere ni potrebno usposabljanje strokovnjaka za besedo za vsak cilj razločitve. Za premostitev te vrzeli sprejemamo drugačno perspektivo in se zanašamo na učenje zaporedja za okvir problema razločitve: predlagamo in poglobljeno preučujemo vrsto nevralnih arhitektur od konca do konca, ki so neposredno prilagojene nalogi, od dvosmernega dolgoročnega pomnilnika do modelov kodirnika-dekoderja. Naše obsežno ocenjevanje standardnih referenčnih vrednosti in v več jezikih kaže, da učenje zaporedja omogoča vsestranskejše modele vseh besed, ki dosledno vodijo do najsodobnejših rezultatov, tudi v primerjavi z besednimi strokovnjaki z zasnovanimi funkcijami.', 'bo': 'གསལ་བརྗོད་Sense Disambiguation མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ནང་དུ་སྐྱོན་རུང་མང་པོ་ཡོད། ལྟ་རྟོག་པ་ཚོས་དོ་དམ་པ་དེ་དག་ཚད་དང་འགྲིག་པ་སུ་བཏོན་པ་ཡིན། To bridge this gap we adopt a different perspective and rely on sequence learning to frame the disambiguation problem: we propose and study in depth a series of end-to-end neural architectures directly tailored to the task, from bidirectional Long-Term Memory to encoder-decoder models. ང་ཚོའི་རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཁག་ཅིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་སྐད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐོང་ནི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་པོ་ཡོད་པའི་མིག་རྩལ་བ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་ཁག'}
{'en': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'ar': 'تعلم ارتباط الكلمات بمرور الوقت', 'fr': 'Apprendre la parenté des mots au fil du temps', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a relação de palavras ao longo do tempo', 'es': 'Aprendiendo la relación entre palabras a lo largo del tiempo', 'ja': '時間の経過とともに単語の関連性を学ぶ', 'zh': '随时推学单词相关性', 'ru': 'Связанность слов с течением времени', 'hi': 'समय के साथ शब्द संबंधितता सीखना', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Gaolmhaireacht Focal thar Am', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შესაბამისი გასწავლა', 'hu': 'A szótanulás kapcsolata az idővel', 'it': 'Relazione di apprendimento delle parole nel tempo', 'el': 'Μάθηση της σχέσης λέξεων με την πάροδο του χρόνου', 'mk': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'ml': 'സമയത്തിനുമുമ്പ് വാക്കിന്റെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'kk': 'Сөздің қатынасы уақытта үйрену', 'lt': 'Išmokyti žodžių santykius laikui bėgant', 'ms': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'mt': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'ro': 'Relația cuvintelor de învățare în timp', 'no': 'Læring av ordrelasjon over tid', 'mn': 'Хугацаанд үг харилцааныг сурах', 'sr': 'Naučenje reèi povezanosti u vreme', 'pl': 'Uczenie się związku ze słowami w czasie', 'so': 'Baritaanka hadalka xiriirka wakhtiga', 'ur': 'وقت پر کلمات کی نسبت سکھائی', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'ta': 'நேரத்திற்கு மேல் வார்த்தை தொடர்புகளை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறது', 'sv': 'Lära ord Relation över tid', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học nói chuyện theo thời gian', 'bg': 'Научаване на връзката между думите във времето', 'nl': 'Woordverwantschap leren na verloop van tijd', 'de': 'Wortbezug im Laufe der Zeit lernen', 'id': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'ko': '시간의 추이에 따라 단어의 관련성을 학습하다', 'hr': 'Naučenje riječi o odnosu na vrijeme', 'da': 'Læring af ord relateret over tid', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Neno Kuhusiana na Muda uliopita', 'af': 'Leer Woord Relatiteit oor Tyd', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نسبت به کلمات در زمان', 'sq': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'hy': 'Learning Word Relatedness over Time', 'tr': 'Sözleriň ýagdaýyny zamandan öwrenmek', 'az': 'Sözlərin bağlılığı Öyrənməsi', 'bn': 'সময়ের মধ্যে শব্দ সম্পর্ক শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Učení se slovní souvislosti v průběhu času', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'et': 'Sõnadega seotud õppimine aja jooksul', 'fi': 'Sanan yhteyden oppiminen ajan mittaan', 'ca': 'Aprendre la relació de paraules amb el temps', 'bs': 'Naučenje riječi povezanosti tijekom vremena', 'jv': 'tips-locale:de', 'he': 'ללמוד מילים יחסים עם הזמן', 'sk': 'Učenje povezanosti besed skozi čas', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ཆ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་དུས་ལ་ཤེས་འཇུག་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Search systems are often focused on providing relevant results for the now, assuming both corpora and user needs that focus on the present. However, many corpora today reflect significant longitudinal collections ranging from 20 years of the Web to hundreds of years of digitized newspapers and books. Understanding the temporal intent of the user and retrieving the most relevant historical content has become a significant challenge. Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but can not function well across all times when relationships vary temporally. In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections. The model supports the task of identifying, given two words, when they relate to each other. We present an algorithmic framework for this task and show its application for the task of query expansion, achieving high gain.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تركز أنظمة البحث على تقديم نتائج ذات صلة بـ "الآن" ، بافتراض احتياجات كل من الشركة والمستخدم التي تركز على الحاضر. ومع ذلك ، فإن العديد من المجلات اليوم تعكس مجموعات طولية كبيرة تتراوح من 20 عامًا على الويب إلى مئات السنين من الصحف والكتب الرقمية. أصبح فهم الهدف الزمني للمستخدم واسترداد المحتوى التاريخي الأكثر صلة تحديًا كبيرًا. تعمل ميزات البحث الشائعة ، مثل توسيع الاستعلام ، على تعزيز العلاقة بين المصطلحات ولكن لا يمكن أن تعمل بشكل جيد عبر جميع الأوقات عندما تختلف العلاقات مؤقتًا. في هذا العمل ، نقدم نموذج علاقة زمنية يتم استخراجه من مجموعات البيانات الطولية. يدعم النموذج مهمة تحديد كلمتين عندما يتعلقان ببعضهما البعض. نقدم إطارًا خوارزميًا لهذه المهمة ونعرض تطبيقه لمهمة توسيع الاستعلام ، وتحقيق مكاسب عالية.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de recherche sont souvent axés sur la fourniture de résultats pertinents pour le «\xa0présent\xa0», en supposant à la fois des corpus et des besoins des utilisateurs qui se concentrent sur le présent. Cependant, de nombreux corpus reflètent aujourd'hui d'importantes collections longitudinales allant de 20 ans d'existence sur le Web à des centaines d'années de journaux et de livres numérisés. Comprendre l'intention temporelle de l'utilisateur et récupérer le contenu historique le plus pertinent est devenu un défi de taille. Les fonctionnalités de recherche courantes, telles que le développement des requêtes, tirent parti de la relation entre les termes mais ne peuvent pas fonctionner correctement à tout moment lorsque les relations varient dans le temps. Dans ce travail, nous introduisons un modèle de relation temporelle extrait de collectes de données longitudinales. Le modèle prend en charge la tâche d'identifier, à partir de deux mots, quand ils se rapportent l'un à l'autre. Nous présentons un cadre algorithmique pour cette tâche et montrons son application pour la tâche d'expansion des requêtes, en obtenant un gain élevé.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de búsqueda a menudo se centran en proporcionar resultados relevantes para el «ahora», asumiendo que tanto los cuerpos como las necesidades de los usuarios se centran en el presente. Sin embargo, muchos corpus hoy en día reflejan importantes colecciones longitudinales que van desde 20 años de la Web hasta cientos de años de periódicos y libros digitalizados. Comprender la intención temporal del usuario y recuperar el contenido histórico más relevante se ha convertido en un desafío importante. Las funciones de búsqueda comunes, como la expansión de consultas, aprovechan la relación entre términos, pero no pueden funcionar bien en todos los momentos en que las relaciones varían temporalmente. En este trabajo, presentamos un modelo de relación temporal que se extrae de las recopilaciones de datos longitudinales. El modelo apoya la tarea de identificar, dadas dos palabras, cuando se relacionan entre sí. Presentamos un marco algorítmico para esta tarea y mostramos su aplicación para la tarea de expansión de consultas, logrando una alta ganancia.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de busca são muitas vezes focados em fornecer resultados relevantes para o “agora”, assumindo tanto corpora quanto necessidades de usuários que focam no presente. No entanto, muitos corpora hoje refletem coleções longitudinais significativas que variam de 20 anos da Web a centenas de anos de jornais e livros digitalizados. Compreender a intenção temporal do usuário e recuperar o conteúdo histórico mais relevante tornou-se um desafio significativo. Recursos de pesquisa comuns, como expansão de consulta, aproveitam o relacionamento entre os termos, mas não podem funcionar bem em todos os momentos em que os relacionamentos variam temporalmente. Neste trabalho, apresentamos um modelo de relacionamento temporal que é extraído de coletas longitudinais de dados. O modelo suporta a tarefa de identificar, dadas duas palavras, quando elas se relacionam. Apresentamos um framework algorítmico para esta tarefa e mostramos sua aplicação para a tarefa de expansão de consultas, obtendo alto ganho.', 'ja': '検索システムは、多くの場合、現在に焦点を当てたコーポラとユーザーのニーズの両方を想定して、「今」に関連する結果を提供することに焦点を当てています。しかし、今日のコーポラの多くは、20年間のウェブから数百年間のデジタル化された新聞や書籍まで、大きな縦断的コレクションを反映しています。ユーザーの時間的意図を理解し、最も関連性の高い履歴コンテンツを取得することは、大きな課題となっている。クエリ拡張などの一般的な検索機能は、用語間の関係を活用しますが、関係が時間的に変化するすべての時間でうまく機能することはできません。本作では，縦断的なデータ収集から抽出した時間関係モデルを紹介する。このモデルは、2つの単語が互いに関連しているときに識別するタスクをサポートします。このタスクのアルゴリズムフレームワークを提示し、クエリ拡張のタスクへの適用を示し、高い利得を実現します。', 'hi': 'खोज प्रणाली अक्सर "अब" के लिए प्रासंगिक परिणाम प्रदान करने पर केंद्रित होती है, यह मानते हुए कि कॉर्पोरेट और उपयोगकर्ता दोनों की जरूरतें वर्तमान पर ध्यान केंद्रित करती हैं। हालांकि, कई कॉर्पोरेट आज वेब के 20 वर्षों से लेकर डिजिटलीकृत समाचार पत्रों और पुस्तकों के सैकड़ों वर्षों तक के महत्वपूर्ण अनुदैर्ध्य संग्रह को दर्शाते हैं। उपयोगकर्ता के अस्थायी इरादे को समझना और सबसे प्रासंगिक ऐतिहासिक सामग्री को पुनर्प्राप्त करना एक महत्वपूर्ण चुनौती बन गई है। सामान्य खोज सुविधाएँ, जैसे कि क्वेरी विस्तार, शब्दों के बीच संबंध का लाभ उठाते हैं, लेकिन जब रिश्ते अस्थायी रूप से भिन्न होते हैं तो सभी समय में अच्छी तरह से कार्य नहीं कर सकते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक अस्थायी संबंध मॉडल पेश करते हैं जो अनुदैर्ध्य डेटा संग्रह से निकाला जाता है। मॉडल पहचानने के कार्य का समर्थन करता है, दो शब्दों को दिया जाता है, जब वे एक दूसरे से संबंधित होते हैं। हम इस कार्य के लिए एक एल्गोरिथम रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं और क्वेरी विस्तार के कार्य के लिए इसके आवेदन को दिखाते हैं, उच्च लाभ प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Поисковые системы часто ориентированы на предоставление соответствующих результатов для «сейчас», предполагая потребности как корпораций, так и пользователей, которые сосредоточены на настоящем. Тем не менее, многие корпорации сегодня отражают значительные продольные коллекции от 20 лет Интернета до сотен лет оцифрованных газет и книг. Понимание временных намерений пользователя и извлечение наиболее релевантного исторического контента стали серьезной проблемой. Общие функции поиска, такие как расширение запросов, используют взаимосвязь между терминами, но не могут хорошо функционировать в любое время, когда отношения меняются во времени. В этой работе мы вводим временную модель отношений, которая извлекается из продольных сборов данных. Модель поддерживает задачу идентификации, с учетом двух слов, когда они относятся друг к другу. Представляем алгоритмический каркас для данной задачи и показываем ее применение для задачи расширения запроса, достижения высокого коэффициента усиления.', 'zh': '搜索系统常专注"今",设语料库与用户需皆集当下。 然今之语料库,多见要馆藏,自20年Web至数百年数字化报纸书。 知用户之时,检其最关者,已为一大挑战。 常见搜求(若询而广之)因术语之际,时变之时,不能终始。 我们引入了一个从数收拾的时候。 其在给定两单词,识其何时相关。 建一算法框架,展其询广之用,遂其高益。', 'ga': 'Is minic a bhíonn córais chuardaigh dírithe ar thorthaí ábhartha a sholáthar don “anois”, ag glacadh leis na riachtanais chorparáideacha agus úsáideoirí a dhíríonn ar an lá inniu. Mar sin féin, léiríonn go leor corpora inniu bailiúcháin shuntasacha fhadtéarmacha ó 20 bliain den Ghréasán go dtí na céadta bliain de nuachtáin agus leabhair dhigitithe. Dúshlán suntasach anois is ea rún ama an úsáideora a thuiscint agus an t-ábhar stairiúil is ábhartha a fháil. Déanann gnéithe coitianta cuardaigh, mar leathnú fiosrúcháin, an gaol idir téarmaí a ghiaráil ach ní féidir leo feidhmiú go maith i ngach tráth nuair a athraíonn gaolmhaireachtaí ó thaobh ama de. Sa saothar seo, tugaimid isteach samhail caidrimh ama a bhaintear as bailiúcháin fadaimseartha sonraí. Tacaíonn an tsamhail leis an tasc chun dhá fhocal a aithint, nuair a bhaineann siad lena chéile. Cuirimid creat algartamaíoch i láthair don tasc seo agus léirímid a fheidhm atá leis an tasc a bhaineann le leathnú fiosrúcháin, ag baint amach gnóthachan ard.', 'hu': 'A keresési rendszerek gyakran arra összpontosítanak, hogy releváns eredményeket nyújtsanak a "most" számára, feltételezve, hogy mind a corpora, mind a felhasználói igények a jelenre összpontosítanak. Ma azonban számos corpora jelentős hosszanti gyűjteményt tükröz, amelyek a háló 20 évétől a több száz évig digitalizált újságokig és könyvekig terjednek. Jelentős kihívást jelent a felhasználó időbeli szándékának megértése és a legrelevánsabb történelmi tartalom lekérése. A gyakori keresési funkciók, mint például a lekérdezések bővítése, kihasználják a kifejezések közötti kapcsolatot, de nem működnek jól minden időben, amikor a kapcsolatok ideiglenesen eltérnek. Ebben a munkában egy hosszirányú adatgyűjtésekből kinyert időkapcsolati modellt mutatunk be. A modell támogatja azt a feladatot, hogy azonosítsa két szót, amikor azok kapcsolódnak egymáshoz. Bemutatunk egy algoritmikus keretet ehhez a feladathoz, és megmutatjuk annak alkalmazását a lekérdezés bővítésére, nagy nyereséget elérve.', 'ka': 'ძიება სისტემები ზოგიერთად იყენება შესაბამისი შედეგების შესაბამისი შედეგების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამი მაგრამ ბევრი კოპორაცია დღეს გააჩვენებს მნიშვნელოვანი სიგრძნელი კოლექციები 20 წლის განმავლობით საბეჭის ასობით წლის ციფრალიზებული გვერდილები და წიგნი. მომხმარებლის თავსონალური მისამართი და ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანი ისტორიის შემდგომარების გაგრძელება იყო მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილება. საერთო ძიება ფუნქციები, როგორც კითხვის გაფართვა, სიტყვების შესახებ, მაგრამ არ შეუძლებელია ყველა გერძებას, როდესაც გერძებები ცოტაციულად განს ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ დავიყენებთ ტემპალური დაკავშირების მოდელი, რომელიც ძირითადი მონაცემების კოლექციებიდან გამოყენებულია. მოდელეც იდენტიფიკაციის მოქმედებას, ორი სიტყვის, როდესაც ერთმანეთს შესახებ. ჩვენ ამ დავალებისთვის ალგორტიმური ფრამეტრის ჩვენებთ და ჩვენ ჩვენებთ მისი პროგრამეტს კითხვის გაფარდების დავალებისთვის, რომელიც უფრო დიდი მიღება.', 'it': "I sistemi di ricerca sono spesso focalizzati sul fornire risultati rilevanti per l'ora, assumendo sia le esigenze corporali che degli utenti che si concentrano sul presente. Tuttavia, molti corpora oggi riflettono significative collezioni longitudinali che vanno dai 20 anni del Web a centinaia di anni di giornali e libri digitalizzati. Comprendere l'intento temporale dell'utente e recuperare i contenuti storici più rilevanti è diventata una sfida significativa. Le funzioni di ricerca comuni, come l'espansione delle query, sfruttano la relazione tra termini ma non possono funzionare bene in tutti i momenti in cui le relazioni variano temporalmente. In questo lavoro introduciamo un modello di relazione temporale che viene estratto dalle raccolte longitudinali di dati. Il modello supporta il compito di identificare, date due parole, quando si relazionano tra loro. Presentiamo un framework algoritmico per questo compito e mostriamo la sua applicazione per il compito di espansione query, ottenendo alto guadagno.", 'el': 'Τα συστήματα αναζήτησης συχνά επικεντρώνονται στην παροχή σχετικών αποτελεσμάτων για το "τώρα", υποθέτοντας ότι τόσο τα σώματα όσο και οι ανάγκες των χρηστών εστιάζονται στο παρόν. Ωστόσο, πολλά σώματα σήμερα αντικατοπτρίζουν σημαντικές διαμήκη συλλογές που κυμαίνονται από είκοσι χρόνια του Ιστού έως εκατοντάδες χρόνια ψηφιοποιημένων εφημερίδων και βιβλίων. Η κατανόηση της χρονικής πρόθεσης του χρήστη και η ανάκτηση του πιο σχετικού ιστορικού περιεχομένου έχει γίνει σημαντική πρόκληση. Κοινά χαρακτηριστικά αναζήτησης, όπως η επέκταση ερωτήματος, αξιοποιούν τη σχέση μεταξύ όρων, αλλά δεν μπορούν να λειτουργήσουν καλά σε όλες τις περιπτώσεις όταν οι σχέσεις διαφέρουν χρονικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα μοντέλο χρονικής σχέσης που εξάγεται από διαμήκη συλλογή δεδομένων. Το μοντέλο υποστηρίζει το έργο του εντοπισμού, με δύο λέξεις, όταν σχετίζονται μεταξύ τους. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα αλγοριθμικό πλαίσιο για αυτό το έργο και παρουσιάζουμε την εφαρμογή του για το έργο της επέκτασης ερωτήματος, επιτυγχάνοντας υψηλό κέρδος.', 'lt': 'Paieškos sistemos dažnai sutelkiamos į atitinkamų rezultatų „dabar“ teikimą, darant prielaidą, kad tiek korporas, tiek naudotojas poreikius, kurie sutelkiami į dabartinę padėtį. Tačiau daugelis korporų šiandien atspindi reikšmingas išilgines kolekcijas nuo 20 metų interneto iki šimtų metų skaitmeninių laikraščių ir knygų. Svarbus iššūkis tapo suprasti laikinąjį naudotojo ketinimą ir gauti svarbiausią istorinį turinį. Bendros paieškos savybės, pavyzdžiui, paieškos išplėtimas, sverto santykius tarp terminų, bet negali gerai veikti visais laikais, kai santykiai laiko atžvilgiu skiriasi. Šiame darbe įvedame laikinųjų santykių model į, kuris gaunamas iš išilginių duomenų rinkimų. Šis modelis remia užduotį nustatyti, kai šie žodžiai susiję vienas su kitu. Pateikiame šios užduoties algoritminę sistemą ir parodysime, kaip ji taikoma užduotims išplėsti klausimus ir pasiekti didelį pelną.', 'mk': "Search systems are often focused on providing relevant results for the 'now', assuming both corpora and user needs that focus on the present.  However, many corpora today reflect significant longitudinal collections ranging from 20 years of the Web to hundreds of years of digitized newspapers and books.  Understanding the temporal intent of the user and retrieving the most relevant historical content has become a significant challenge.  Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but cannot function well across all times when relationships vary temporally.  In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections.  The model supports the task of identifying, given two words, when they relate to each other.  We present an algorithmic framework for this task and show its application for the task of query expansion, achieving high gain.", 'kk': "Іздеу жүйелері көбінде 'қазір' үшін маңызды нәтижелерді беру үшін көмектеседі. Корпора мен пайдаланушының қазіргі нәтижелерін көмектеседі. Бірақ қазіргі көп корпора 20 жылдан және жүздеген жыл цифрлық журнал және кітаптар көп ұзындық жинақтарын көрсетеді. Пайдаланушының уақытша мақсатын түсіну және ең мақсатты тарихый мазмұнын алу үшін маңызды мәселе болды. Сұраныс кеңейтуі секілді жалпы іздеу мүмкіндіктері, шарттар арасындағы қатынасын көтеру, бірақ қатынас уақытша өзгертілген кезде барлық уақытта функцияланбайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, ұзындық деректер жинақтарынан шығарылған уақытша қатынас үлгісін келтіреміз. Бұл үлгі бір-біріне қатынау кезінде екі сөзді анықтау тапсырмасын қолдайды. Бұл тапсырманың алгоритмдік фреймін таңдап, сұраныс кеңейту тапсырмасының қолданбасын көрсету, жоғары жеткізу үшін.", 'ms': "Sistem gelintar sering fokus pada menyediakan keputusan yang relevan untuk 'sekarang', menganggap kedua-dua korpra dan pengguna memerlukan fokus pada masa kini. Bagaimanapun, banyak korpra hari ini menyatakan koleksi panjang yang signifikan yang berlangsung dari 20 tahun dalam Web hingga ratusan tahun dalam surat khabar dan buku digitalisasi. Memahami niat sementara pengguna dan memperoleh kandungan sejarah yang paling relevan telah menjadi cabaran yang signifikan. Ciri-ciri gelintar umum, seperti pengembangan permintaan, mengaktifkan hubungan antara terma tetapi tidak dapat berfungsi dengan baik sepanjang masa apabila hubungan berubah sementara. In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections.  The model supports the task of identifying, given two words, when they relate to each other.  Kami memperkenalkan kerangka algoritmi untuk tugas ini dan menunjukkan aplikasinya untuk tugas pengembangan pertanyaan, mencapai keuntungan yang tinggi.", 'ml': "'ഇപ്പോള്\u200d എന്നാലും ഇന്ന് പല കോർപ്പോർണയും വെബ്ബിലെ 20 വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നൂറുകണക്കിന് ഡിജിറ്റിക്കേറ്റ് പത്രങ്ങളിലേക്കും പുസ്തകങ്ങള Understanding the temporal intent of the user and retrieving the most relevant historical content has become a significant challenge.  സാധാരണ തെരച്ചിലുള്ള ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d, ചോദ്യം വികസിപ്പിക്കുക, വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കുക, പക ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നീണ്ടുനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഡേറ്റാ സംഘത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഒരു കാലാവധി ബന്ധമായ മ മോഡല്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലിയെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു, രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്കുന്നു, അവ ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിക്ക് ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ചോദ്യം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രയോ", 'mn': 'Хайлтын систем ихэвчлэн "одоо" болон "хэрэглэгч" хоёуланг хоёуланг хэрэглэгчдийн төвлөрөх хэрэгтэй гэсэн үг юм. Гэвч өнөөдөр олон корпора Веб-ээс 20 жилээс зуун жилийн цифрик сонин, ном хүртэл маш их урт хугацааны цуглуулга үзүүлдэг. Хэрэглэгчийн хугацааны зорилго ойлгох, хамгийн чухал түүхийн тодорхойлолтуудыг авах нь чухал сорилго болсон. Хэрэглэгчийн нэмэгдүүлэлт шиг ихэвчлэн хайлтын харилцааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой боловч харилцаа хугацааны хугацаанд өөрчлөгдөхөд бүх удаа ажиллаж чадахгүй. Энэ ажил дээр бид урт хугацааны өгөгдлийн цуглуулалтаас гаргасан хугацааны харилцааны загварыг танилцуулдаг. Загвар нь хоёр үг өгсөн, хоорондоо хоорондоо холбогдоход танихын тулд дэмжиж байна. Бид энэ ажлын алгоритмын хэмжээсүүдийг тайлбарлаж, квадрат нэмэгдүүлэх үйлдлийг ашиглаж, өндөр нэмэгдүүлэх үйлдлийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi ta’ tiftix ta’ spiss huma ffukati fuq il-forniment ta’ riżultati rilevanti għall-“issa”, jekk wieħed jassumi kemm il-korpora kif ukoll il-ħtiġijiet tal-utent li jiffukaw fuq il-preżent. Madankollu, ħafna korpuri llum jirriflettu kollezzjonijiet lonġitudinali sinifikanti li jvarjaw minn 20 sena tal-Web sa mijiet ta’ snin ta’ gazzetti u kotba diġitalizzati. Understanding the temporal intent of the user and retrieving the most relevant historical content has become a significant challenge.  Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but cannot function well across all times when relationships vary temporally.  In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections.  The model supports the task of identifying, given two words, when they relate to each other.  We present an algorithmic framework for this task and show its application for the task of query expansion, achieving high gain.', 'pl': 'Systemy wyszukiwania często koncentrują się na dostarczaniu istotnych wyników dla "teraz", zakładając zarówno korpusy, jak i potrzeby użytkowników, które koncentrują się na teraźniejszości. Jednak wiele korpusów obecnie odzwierciedla znaczące zbiory wzdłużne, począwszy od 20-letniej sieci do setek lat digitalizowanych gazet i książek. Zrozumienie zamiaru czasowego użytkownika i odzyskanie najbardziej istotnych treści historycznych stało się istotnym wyzwaniem. Wspólne funkcje wyszukiwania, takie jak rozszerzenie zapytań, wykorzystują relacje między terminami, ale nie mogą działać dobrze we wszystkich przypadkach, gdy relacje różnią się tymczasowo. W niniejszej pracy wprowadzamy model relacji czasowej, który jest ekstraktowany z podłużnych zbiorów danych. Model wspiera zadanie identyfikacji, podając dwa słowa, kiedy odnoszą się one do siebie. Przedstawiamy ramy algorytmiczne dla tego zadania i pokazujemy jego zastosowanie do zadania rozszerzania zapytań, osiągając wysoki zysk.', 'no': 'Søkjesystemet er ofte fokusert på å gje relevant resultat for « no », dersom både korpora og brukaren treng å fokusera på det gjeldande. Men mange korporane i dag reflekserer signifikante langtidsskoleksjonar frå 20 år av nettet til hundre år av digitaliserte dagar og bøkar. For å forstå tidsstyrken av brukaren og henta den mest relevante historiske innhaldet har blitt eit viktig utfordring. Vanlege søkjefunksjonar, som spørjingstigning, gjer forholdet mellom vilkåra, men kan ikkje funksjonare godt i alle tida når forholdet varierer tidlegare. I denne arbeiden introduserer vi ein midlertidsstyrkemodell for forbindelse som er ekstrahert frå longitudinalne datasamlingar. Modellen støttar oppgåva for identifisering, gitt to ord når dei relaterte med kvarandre. Vi presenterer ein algoritmisk rammeverk for denne oppgåva og viser programmet sin for oppgåva for spørjingstigning, og når det gjer høg forståelse.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de căutare sunt adesea concentrate pe furnizarea de rezultate relevante pentru "acum", presupunând atât corporale, cât și nevoile utilizatorilor care se concentrează pe prezent. Cu toate acestea, multe corpore reflectă astăzi colecții longitudinale semnificative, variind de la 20 de ani de Web la sute de ani de ziare și cărți digitalizate. Înțelegerea intenției temporale a utilizatorului și recuperarea celui mai relevant conținut istoric a devenit o provocare semnificativă. Caracteristicile comune de căutare, cum ar fi extinderea interogării, utilizează relația dintre termeni, dar nu pot funcționa bine în toate timpurile când relațiile variază temporal. În această lucrare, introducem un model de relație temporală extras din colecțiile longitudinale de date. Modelul susține sarcina identificării, date două cuvinte, atunci când acestea se raportează unul cu celălalt. Prezentăm un cadru algoritmic pentru această sarcină și prezentăm aplicația sa pentru sarcina de extindere a interogării, obținând un câștig ridicat.', 'sr': "Sistemi pretraživanja često se fokusiraju na pružanje relevantnih rezultata za 'sada', prema pretpostavku korporacije i korisnika koji se fokusiraju na trenutno. Međutim, mnoge korporacije danas odražavaju značajne dugoročne kolekcije od 20 godina Web-a do stotina godina digitaliziranih novina i knjiga. Razumevanje privremene namjere korisnika i povratka najvažnijih istorijskih sadržaja postalo je značajan izazov. Obične funkcije pretraživanja, poput proširenja pretraživanja, utiču na odnos između uvjeta, ali ne mogu dobro funkcionisati sve vreme kada se odnosi privremeno razlikuju. U ovom poslu predstavljamo model privremenih odnosa koji je izvučen iz kolekcije dugotrajnih podataka. Model podržava zadatak identifikacije, dajući dve reči, kada se odnose jedno prema drugom. Predstavljamo algoritmiski okvir za ovaj zadatak i pokazujemo njegovu prijavu za zadatak proširenja zahteva, ostvarivši visok dobitak.", 'sv': 'Söksystem fokuserar ofta på att ge relevanta resultat för "nuet", förutsatt att både corpora och användarbehov fokuserar på nuet. Men många corpora speglar idag betydande longitudinella samlingar som sträcker sig från 20 år av webben till hundratals år av digitaliserade tidningar och böcker. Att förstå användarens tidsmässiga avsikt och hämta det mest relevanta historiska innehållet har blivit en stor utmaning. Vanliga sökfunktioner, till exempel frågeexpansion, utnyttjar relationen mellan termer men kan inte fungera bra i alla tider när relationerna varierar temporärt. I detta arbete introducerar vi en tidsrelationsmodell som utvinns från longitudinella datainsamlingar. Modellen stöder uppgiften att identifiera, med två ord, när de relaterar till varandra. Vi presenterar ett algoritmiskt ramverk för denna uppgift och visar dess tillämpning för uppgiften att fråga expansion, uppnå hög vinst.', 'si': "පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට 'දැන්' වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර නමුත්, අද ගොඩක් කොර්පෝරා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්නේ වෙබ් අවුරුදු 20 වලින් අවුරුදු සියළුම් අවුරුදු සියළුම් පත්තුර ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ අවස්ථාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න සහ ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ අතිත්\u200dයාත්මක අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් ව සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණ අවශ්\u200dය, ප්\u200dරශ්න විස්තර, පරීක්ෂණය අතර සම්බන්ධය සම්බන්ධය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න, ඒත් සම්බන මේ වැඩේ අපි කාලය සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒක ගොඩක් ලොකු දත්ත සම්බන්ධයක් නිසා. මොඩේල් එක්කෙනෙක්ට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන්, වචන දෙකක් දෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි මේ වැඩ සඳහා ඇල්ගෝරිත්මික ප්\u200dරකාරයක් පෙන්වන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විසින් වැඩ කරන වැඩ සඳහා එයාගේ අන", 'ta': "தேடும் அமைப்புகள் பெரும்பாலாக 'இப்போது' தேவைப்படும் முடிவுகளை வழங்கும் பொருளாக கவனம் செலுத்தப்படுகிறது, தற்போது  ஆயினும், இன்று பல நிறுவனங்கள் முக்கியமான நீண்ட தொகுப்புகளை பிரித்துக் கொள்கிறார்கள், அந்த வலைப்பின் 20 வருடங்களில் இருந்து நூ பயனரின் தற்காலிக நேரத்தை புரிந்து மற்றும் மிகவும் பொருத்தமான வரலாற்று உள்ளடக்கங்களை மீட்டெடுக்கும் பொருட்ட பொதுவான தேடல் குணங்கள், கேள்வி விரிவாக்கம், விரிவாக்கத்திற்கு இடையேயுள்ள தொடர்பை வைத்து, ஆனால் எல்லா முறைகளும் செயல இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு தற்காலிக உறவு மாதிரியை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது நீண்ட தரவு தொகுப்பிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப The model supports the task of identifying, given two words, when they relate to each other.  நாம் இந்த செயலுக்கான ஒரு algorithmic சட்டத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் கேள்வி விரிவாக்கத்தின் பணிக்கு அதன் பயன்பாட்ட", 'so': 'Inta badan nidaamka raadinta waxaa ku kalsoonaadaa inay soo fidiyaan resultooyin muhiimka ah, iyagoo u malaynaya in shirkadaha iyo isticmaalayaashuba ay u baahan yihiin kuwa hadda ku focus. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, shirkado badan maanta waxay fiiriyaan urur dhaadheer oo dhaadheer ah, waxayna ka soo wareegsanaayeen 20 sano Webi-ka ilaa boqol sano oo jaraa’idyo iyo buugaag. Marka la garanayo goobta waqtiga ku meelgaarka ah ee isticmaalaha iyo soo celinta waxyaabaha taariikhda ugu muhiimsan waxay noqotay dhibaato weyn. Xiriikhda raadinta ee caadiga ah, tusaale ahaan boosaska, waxay sameyn karaan xiriirka u dhexeeya xiriirka, laakiin si wanaagsan uma shaqeyn karo marwalba marka xiriirku si ku meel gaar ah u bedelaan. Shaqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa model xiriirka waqtiga ah oo laga soo saaray ururada macluumaadka dheer. Tusaale wuxuu kaalmeeyaa shaqada aqoonsiga, kaasoo la siiyey laba eray, marka ay isku xiraan. We present an algorithmic framework for this task and show its application for the task of query expansion, achieving high gain.', 'ur': "جگہ سیسٹم اکثر 'اب' کے لئے مواظب نتیجے پیش کرنے پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے، یہ سمجھتا ہے کہ کورپورا اور یوسٹر دونوں کی ضرورت ہے جو اس میں موجود ہے۔ لیکن آج بہت سی کورپوراں نے ویب کے بیس سال سے سنوں سالوں سے ڈیجیٹ کاغذوں اور کتابوں کی بڑی طویل جماعتیں دکھائی ہیں۔ کارساز کے ذمہ معلوم ہونے اور سب سے اہم تاریخی منصوبات کو پکڑنے کے لئے ایک اہم چال ہو گیا ہے۔ آسانی تلاش ویژگی، جیسے کیوری گھسیٹ، شرمے کے درمیان رابطہ لائوٹ کر دیتے ہیں لیکن جب رابطہ موقتی طرح تغییر کر رہے ہیں تو ہر طرح کا کام نہیں کرسکتا۔ اس کام میں ہم ایک موقت رابطہ موڈل کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو طویل ڈیٹی جماعتوں سے نکالی جاتی ہے۔ مدل ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ رابطہ کرنے کے لئے پہچان کرنے کے کام کی مدد کرتا ہے۔ ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک الگوریٹمیک فرمیک پیش کرتے ہیں اور اس کے کاروبار کو سؤال کے گھیرنے کے کام کے لئے دکھاتے ہیں، بڑے فائدہ پہنچانے کے لئے۔", 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Hozir, bugun ko'pchilik kompaniyalar Web yildan 20 yil va 100 yil raqamli gazeti va kitoblar tarkibini ko'rsatadi. Name @ info: whatsthis In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections.  Name Biz shu vazifa uchun algorithik freymini yetdik va soʻrov vazifani ko'paytirish uchun dasturni koʻrsatimiz.", 'vi': "Các hệ thống tìm kiếm thường được tập trung vào việc cung cấp kết quả thích hợp cho'hiện tại', giả sử cả cơ thể lẫn người dùng đều cần tập trung vào hiện tại. Tuy nhiên, nhiều hạ sĩ hôm nay phản ánh các bộ sưu tập theo chiều dọc đáng kể, từ 20 năm trên mạng cho tới hàng trăm năm lưu số báo và sách. Hiểu được mục đích thời gian của người dùng và lấy lại nội dung lịch sử quan trọng nhất đã trở thành một thách thức quan trọng. Các tính năng tìm kiếm chung, như việc mở rộng các câu hỏi, điều khiển mối quan hệ giữa các điều khoản nhưng không thể hoạt động tốt trong mọi thời điểm khi các mối quan hệ thay đổi tạm thời. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mối quan hệ thời gian được chiết xuất từ các bộ sưu tập dữ liệu. Mô hình này hỗ trợ việc xác định, chỉ với hai từ, khi chúng liên kết với nhau. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống thuật toán cho nhiệm vụ này và cho thấy ứng dụng của nó cho nhiệm vụ mở rộng truy vấn, đạt được nhiều lợi nhuận.", 'bg': 'Системите за търсене често са фокусирани върху предоставянето на подходящи резултати за "сега", като се приема както корпоративните, така и потребностите на потребителите, които се фокусират върху настоящето. Въпреки това, много корпуси днес отразяват значителни надлъжни колекции, вариращи от 20 години на уеб до стотици години дигитализирани вестници и книги. Разбирането на времевите намерения на потребителя и извличането на най-подходящото историческо съдържание се превърна в значително предизвикателство. Общите функции за търсене, като разширяване на заявката, използват връзката между термините, но не могат да функционират добре във всички времена, когато връзките варират временно. В тази работа въвеждаме модел на времеви взаимоотношения, извлечен от надлъжни събирания на данни. Моделът поддържа задачата за идентифициране, дадени две думи, когато те се отнасят помежду си. Представяме алгоритмична рамка за тази задача и показваме нейното приложение за задачата за разширяване на заявката, постигайки висока печалба.', 'hr': "Potraživački sustavi često se fokusiraju na pružanje relevantnih rezultata za 'sada', s obzirom na potrebu korporacije i korisnika koji se fokusiraju na sadašnje vrijeme. Međutim, mnogi korporaci danas odražavaju značajne dugoročne kolekcije od 20 godina interneta do stotina godina digitaliziranih novina i knjiga. Razumijevanje privremene namjere korisnika i prikupljanje najvažnijih istorijskih sadržaja postalo je značajan izazov. Obične funkcije pretraživanja, poput proširenja pitanja, utjecaju na odnos između uvjeta, ali ne mogu funkcionirati dobro tijekom svih vremena kada se odnosi privremeno razlikuju. U ovom poslu predstavljamo model privremenih odnosa koji je izvučen iz dužinskih kolekcija podataka. Model podržava zadatak identifikacije, dajući dvije riječi, kada se odnose jedno prema drugom. Predstavljamo algoritmski okvir za ovaj zadatak i pokazujemo njegovu prijavu za zadatak proširenja zahtjeva, ostvarenje visoke dobitke.", 'da': 'Søgesystemer er ofte fokuseret på at give relevante resultater for "nu", hvis både corpora og brugerbehov fokuserer på nuet. Men mange corpora afspejler i dag betydelige langsgående samlinger, der spænder fra 20 år af internettet til hundredvis af år med digitaliserede aviser og bøger. At forstå brugerens tidsmæssige hensigt og hente det mest relevante historiske indhold er blevet en væsentlig udfordring. Almindelige søgefunktioner, såsom forespørgselsudvidelse, udnytter forholdet mellem udtryk, men kan ikke fungere godt på tværs af alle tidspunkter, hvor relationer varierer midlertidigt. I dette arbejde introducerer vi en tidsmæssig relationsmodel, der udvindes fra langsgående datasamlinger. Modellen understøtter opgaven med at identificere, givet to ord, når de relaterer til hinanden. Vi præsenterer en algoritmisk ramme for denne opgave og viser dens anvendelse til opgaven med forespørgselsudvidelse, der opnår høj gevinst.', 'nl': "Zoeksystemen zijn vaak gericht op het leveren van relevante resultaten voor het 'nu', uitgaande van zowel corpora als gebruikersbehoeften die gericht zijn op het heden. Echter, veel corpora vandaag weerspiegelen significante longitudinale collecties variërend van twintig jaar van het web tot honderden jaren gedigitaliseerde kranten en boeken. Het begrijpen van de temporele intentie van de gebruiker en het ophalen van de meest relevante historische inhoud is een belangrijke uitdaging geworden. Veelgebruikte zoekfuncties, zoals query-uitbreiding, maken gebruik van de relatie tussen termen, maar kunnen niet altijd goed functioneren wanneer relaties tijdelijk variëren. In dit werk introduceren we een tijdsrelatiemodel dat wordt geëxtraheerd uit longitudinale gegevensverzamelingen. Het model ondersteunt de taak om, gegeven twee woorden, te identificeren wanneer ze zich tot elkaar verhouden. We presenteren een algoritmisch kader voor deze taak en tonen de toepassing ervan voor de taak van query uitbreiding, het bereiken van een hoge winst.", 'de': 'Suchsysteme konzentrieren sich oft darauf, relevante Ergebnisse für das "Jetzt" zu liefern, wobei sowohl Korpora als auch Nutzerbedürfnisse vorausgesetzt werden, die sich auf die Gegenwart konzentrieren. Viele Korpora spiegeln jedoch heute bedeutende Längsschnittssammlungen wider, die von zwanzig Jahren Web bis zu Hunderten von Jahren digitalisierter Zeitungen und Bücher reichen. Die zeitliche Intention des Nutzers zu verstehen und die relevantesten historischen Inhalte abzurufen, ist zu einer großen Herausforderung geworden. Häufige Suchfunktionen wie Abfrageerweiterung nutzen die Beziehung zwischen Begriffen, können aber nicht immer gut funktionieren, wenn Beziehungen zeitlich variieren. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir ein zeitliches Beziehungsmodell vor, das aus longitudinalen Datensammlungen extrahiert wird. Das Modell unterstützt die Aufgabe, mit zwei Wörtern zu identifizieren, wann sie zueinander in Beziehung stehen. Wir präsentieren ein algorithmisches Framework für diese Aufgabe und zeigen seine Anwendung für die Aufgabe der Abfrageerweiterung, die einen hohen Gewinn erzielt.', 'ko': "검색 시스템은 일반적으로'현재'에 대한 결과를 제공하는 데 전념하고 어료 라이브러리와 사용자의 수요가 모두 현재에 주목한다고 가정한다.그러나 오늘날의 많은 어료 라이브러리는 20년 동안 인터넷에서 수백 년 동안 디지털화된 신문과 서적까지 중요한 수직 소장품을 반영하고 있다.사용자의 시간 의도를 이해하고 가장 관련된 역사 내용을 검색하는 것은 이미 중대한 도전이 되었다.일반적인 검색 기능(예를 들어 검색 확장)은 용어 간의 관계를 이용하지만, 관계가 시간에 따라 바뀔 때 모든 시간에 정상적으로 작동하지 못한다.이 작업에서 우리는 세로 데이터 수집에서 추출한 시제 관계 모델을 도입했다.두 단어가 서로 연결될 때, 이 모델은 그것들을 식별할 수 있다.우리는 이 임무를 위해 알고리즘 프레임워크를 제시했고 검색 확장 임무에서의 응용을 보여주며 높은 이익을 실현했다.", 'id': "Sistem pencarian sering fokus pada memberikan hasil relevan untuk 'sekarang', asumsikan baik korpra maupun pengguna membutuhkan fokus pada saat ini. However, many corpora today reflect significant longitudinal collections ranging from 20 years of the Web to hundreds of years of digitized newspapers and books.  Understanding the temporal intent of the user and retrieving the most relevant historical content has become a significant challenge.  Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but cannot function well across all times when relationships vary temporally.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memperkenalkan model hubungan sementara yang diekstraksi dari koleksi data panjang. Model mendukung tugas untuk mengidentifikasi, diberikan dua kata, ketika mereka berhubungan satu sama lain. We present an algorithmic framework for this task and show its application for the task of query expansion, achieving high gain.", 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای جستجو اغلب روی اجازه دادن نتایج مربوط به «الان» تمرکز می\u200cشوند، با فرض اینکه هر دو شرکت و کاربر نیاز دارند که روی حال تمرکز کنند. ولی بسیاری از شرکت\u200cهای امروز جمع\u200cآوری طولانی بزرگی از ۲۰ سال وب تا صدها سال روزنامه\u200cها و کتاب\u200cهای دیجیتال را نشان می\u200cدهند. فهمیدن هدف موقتی کاربر و بازیابی محتوای تاریخی مهمترین یک چالش بزرگی شده است. ویژگی\u200cهای جستجو معمولی، مثل گسترش پرسیدن، ارتباط بین شرایط را تأثیر دهد، ولی نمی\u200cتواند در تمام مدت کامل کند، زمانی که ارتباط موقتی تغییر می\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما یک مدل رابطه موقتی را معرفی می کنیم که از جمع داده های طولانی خارج شده است. مدل کار شناسایی را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند، دو کلمه داده می\u200cشود، وقتی با یکدیگر ارتباط دارند. ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها', 'tr': "Arama sistemalary köplenç 'häzir' üçin wajyp netijeleri berilýäne üns berilýär, özüne de korpora we ullanyşyň şu wagtda fokus berilýändigini düşünýär. Ýöne bu gün köp korpora web 20 ýyldan bäri ýüz ýyldan digital gazete we kitaplar bilen wajyp görünýär. Ullançynyň wagtyň maksadyny düşünmek we iň möhüm taryh mazmunlaryny almak wajyp kynçylyk bolup geçdi. Arama özellikleri, query ösüşiji ýaly, sözler aralygynda baglaýyşy etkinleýär ýöne baglaýyşy wagtyň çalyşy çalyşyp bilmeýär. Bu işde, uzun zamanly maglumatlardan çekilmiş bir wagt baglaşma nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys. Bu nusga bir-biri bilen baglanýan wagtlary tanyşdyrmak üçin täze zadyny destekleýär. Biz bu zadyň bir algoritmi framyny görkezip we bu programyny soraglama täblisasi üçin görkez, ýokary gazanlygy başarmak üçin bariz.", 'sw': "Mfumo wa kutafuta mara nyingi hujikita kwenye kutoa matokeo muhimu kwa 'sasa', kwa kudhani kuwa kampuni na watumiaji wanahitaji kuwa na lengo la sasa. Hata hivyo, makampuni mengi leo yanatafakari makusanyiko makubwa ya muda mrefu yanayotoka miaka 20 ya Web hadi mamia ya miaka ya magazeti na vitabu vya kidijitali. Kuelewa nia ya muda ya mtumiaji na kupata maudhui yanayohusika zaidi ya kihistoria imekuwa changamoto kubwa. Tamko za utafutaji wa kawaida, kama vile utafiti wa kuongezeka, hutumia uhusiano kati ya maneno lakini hauwezi kufanya kazi vizuri kila wakati wakati ambapo mahusiano yanabadilika kwa muda. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha muundo wa uhusiano wa muda wa muda ambao umetolewa kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko wa takwimu za muda mrefu. Mfano huu unaunga mkono jukumu la kutambua, kwa maneno mawili, pale wanapoangana na wao. Tunaweza kutengeneza mfumo wa utaratibu wa kazi hii na kuonyesha matumizi yake kwa ajili ya kazi ya kutafuta kuongezeka, kupata faa kubwa.", 'af': 'Soektog stelsels word dikwels gefokus op die verskaffing van relevante resultate vir die "nou", aangeneem dat beide korpora en gebruiker benodig wat fokus op die huidige. Maar baie korpora vandag reflekteer betekende lengte versameling vanaf 20 jaar van die Web tot honderd jaar van digitaliseerde koerante en boeke. Om die tydelike doel van die gebruiker te verstaan en die mees relevante historiese inhoud te ontvang het \'n betekende uitdaging geword. Gewone soektog funksies, soos navraag uitbreiding, verwyder die verwanting tussen terms maar kan nie funksieer goed oor alle tye wanneer verwantings tydelik verander. In hierdie werk, introduseer ons \'n tydelike verhouding model wat uitgevoer word van lengte data versameling. Die model ondersteun die taak van identifiseer, gegee twee woorde, wanneer hulle met mekaar verhou. Ons stel \'n algoritme raamwerk voor hierdie taak en wys sy toepassing vir die taak van navraag uitbreiding, tot hoog verkry.', 'sq': "Search systems are often focused on providing relevant results for the 'now', assuming both corpora and user needs that focus on the present.  However, many corpora today reflect significant longitudinal collections ranging from 20 years of the Web to hundreds of years of digitized newspapers and books.  Duke kuptuar qëllimin temporal të përdoruesit dhe duke marrë përmbajtjen më të rëndësishme historike është bërë një sfidë e rëndësishme. Karakteristikat e përbashkëta të kërkimit, të tilla si zgjerimi i kërkimeve, nxisin marrëdhëniet midis termave por nuk mund të funksionojnë mirë gjatë të gjithë kohëve kur marrëdhëniet ndryshojnë përkohësisht. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një model të marrëdhënieve të përkohshme që nxirret nga koleksionet e të dhënave të gjata. Modeli mbështet detyrën e identifikimit, duke dhënë dy fjalë, kur ato lidhen me njëri-tjetrin. Ne paraqesim një kuadër algoritmik për këtë detyrë dhe tregojmë aplikimin e saj për detyrën e zgjerimit të pyetjeve, duke arritur fitim të lartë.", 'am': 'የፍላጎት ስርዓቶች በጊዜው በአሁኑ ጊዜ የተጠቃሚ ፍሬዎችን ለማስጠጋት ይታሰቃሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን ዛሬ ብዙ ኮርፖርት ከ20 ዓመታት ጀምሮ እስከ መቶ ዓመታት የዲጂክትሪክ ወፎች እና መጻሕፍት የሚቆጠሩ የረጅም ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ላይ ይመለከታሉ፡፡ የተጠቃሚውን የጊዜው አሳብ በማስተዋል እና የተጠቃሚ ታሪካዊ ተግባር ማግኘት ትልቅ ጥቃት ሆኖአል፡፡ Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but cannot function well across all times when relationships vary temporally.  በዚህ ሥራ ከረጅም ዳታ ክፍል የተለየውን የጊዜው ግንኙነት ሞዴል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴል እርስ በርሳቸው ሲታወቁ ሁለት ቃላት የሚሰጠውን ስራ ይደግዳል፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ አሌጎሪካዊ ፍሬም እናሳየዋለን ለመጠየቂያውም ስራ እናደርጋለን ከፍተኛ ትርፍን ለማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': "Search systems are often focused on providing relevant results for the 'now', assuming both corpora and user needs that focus on the present.  However, many corpora today reflect significant longitudinal collections ranging from 20 years of the Web to hundreds of years of digitized newspapers and books.  Օգտագործողի ժամանակական մտադրությունը հասկանալը և ամենակարևոր պատմական պարունակությունը վերցնելը դարձավ նշանակալի մարտահրավեր: Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but cannot function well across all times when relationships vary temporally.  In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections.  The model supports the task of identifying, given two words, when they relate to each other.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս խնդրի համար ալգորիթմային շրջանակը և ցույց ենք տալիս դրա կիրառումը հարցերի ընդլայնման խնդրի համար, հասնելով բարձր շահույթ:", 'bn': "অনুসন্ধান সিস্টেম প্রায়শই এই 'এখন' এর জন্য প্রযুক্ত ফলাফল প্রদান করার প্রতি মনোযোগ দেয়া হচ্ছে, অনুমান করা হচ্ছে যে কোর্পোরা এবং ব তবে আজকের অনেক কর্পোরা বিশাল দীর্ঘদিনের সংগ্রহের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিফলিত করেছে, যার ফলে ওয়েব থেকে ২০ বছর থেকে শত বছর ডিজিটিকেট সংবাদপত ব্যবহারকারীর সাময়িক উদ্দেশ্য বুঝতে এবং সবচেয়ে সাধারণত ঐতিহাসিক বিষয়বস্তু পুনরুদ্ধার করতে পারে বিশাল চ্যালেঞ সাধারণ অনুসন্ধানের বৈশিষ্ট্য, যেমন অনুসন্ধানের বিস্তারিত বৈশিষ্ট্য, শব্দের মধ্যে সম্পর্কের সংশ্লিষ্ট প্রতিরোধ করে  এই কাজে আমরা একটি সাময়িক সম্পর্কের মডেল পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা দীর্ঘ তথ্য সংগ্রহ থেকে বের করা হয়েছে। মডেলটি চিহ্নিত করার কাজ সমর্থন করে, দুই শব্দ দিয়েছে, যখন তারা একে অপরের সাথে যোগাযোগ করে। আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি অ্যালগরিদমিক ফ্রেম উপস্থাপন করি এবং অনুসন্ধানের বিস্তারিত কাজের জন্য তার অ্যাপ্লিকেশন দেখাই,", 'az': 'Qıdırma sistemləri çox vaxt "indi" üçün mövcud sonuçlar verməyə odaqlanır, korpora və istifadəçinin həmin tərzdə odaqlanması lazımdır. Ancaq bu günün çoxlu korpora, İnternet 20 il ilə yüzlərlə illərlə dizital gazeteler və kitablar arasındakı möhkəm uzunluğun koleksiyonlarını göstərir. İstifadəçinin müəyyən vaxtlı niyyətini anlamaq və ən möhüm hekayət məlumatını almaq möhüm bir çətinlik oldu. Qeyd genişlənməsi kimi, şəkillərin arasındakı ilişkiləri istifadə edə bilər, amma ilişkilər müxtəlif vaxt dəyişə bilərlər. Bu işdə, uzun müddətli məlumat koleksiyonlarından çıxarılan temporal ilişki modelini tanıdırıq. Model bir-birinə bağlı olduğu zaman, iki söz verilmiş təşkil etmə işini dəstəkləyir. Biz bu işin algoritmi framework ünü göstərdik və onun istifadəsini query genişləməsi üçün göstərdik, yüksək fayda verənə qədər.', 'ca': "Search systems are often focused on providing relevant results for the 'now', assuming both corpora and user needs that focus on the present.  However, many corpora today reflect significant longitudinal collections ranging from 20 years of the Web to hundreds of years of digitized newspapers and books.  Entendre la intenció temporal del usuari i recuperar el contingut històric més rellevant s'ha convertit en un repte significatiu. Common search features, such as query expansion, leverage the relationship between terms but cannot function well across all times when relationships vary temporally.  In this work, we introduce a temporal relationship model that is extracted from longitudinal data collections.  El model suporta la tasca d'identificar, donant dues paraules, quan es relacionan entre elles. We present an algorithmic framework for this task and show its application for the task of query expansion, achieving high gain.", 'et': 'Otsingusüsteemid keskenduvad sageli asjakohaste tulemuste pakkumisele praeguse hetke jaoks, eeldades nii korporatsioonide kui ka kasutajate vajadusi, mis keskenduvad praegusele hetkele. Kuid paljud korpused peegeldavad tänapäeval märkimisväärseid pikisuunalisi kogusid alates 20-aastast veebi kasutamisest sajade aastateni digiteeritud ajalehtede ja raamatuteni. Kasutaja ajalise kavatsuse mõistmine ja kõige asjakohasema ajaloolise sisu hankimine on muutunud oluliseks väljakutseks. Tavalised otsingufunktsioonid, näiteks päringu laiendamine, kasutavad terminitevahelist seost, kuid ei saa toimida hästi kõigil aegadel, kui seosed on ajutiselt erinevad. Käesolevas töös tutvustame ajalise seose mudelit, mis on ekstraheeritud pikisuunalistest andmekogudest. Mudel toetab ülesannet tuvastada kahe sõna alusel, kui need on omavahel seotud. Esitame algoritmilise raamistiku selle ülesande jaoks ja näitame selle rakendust päringu laiendamise ülesande jaoks, saavutades suure kasu.', 'cs': 'Vyhledávací systémy se často zaměřují na poskytování relevantních výsledků pro "nyní", předpokládají, že korpusy i uživatelské potřeby, které se zaměřují na současnost. Nicméně, mnoho korpusů dnes odráží významné podélné sbírky sahající od dvacetiletého webu až po stovky let digitalizovaných novin a knih. Pochopení časového záměru uživatele a získání nejdůležitějšího historického obsahu se stalo významnou výzvou. Běžné funkce vyhledávání, jako je rozšíření dotazu, využívají vztah mezi výrazy, ale nemohou fungovat dobře ve všech případech, kdy se vztahy časově liší. V této práci představujeme model časového vztahu, který je extrahován z podélných sběrů dat. Model podporuje úkol identifikovat dvě slova, kdy se vztahují k sobě. Představujeme algoritmický rámec pro tento úkol a ukážeme jeho aplikaci pro úkol rozšíření dotazů, dosahující vysokého zisku.', 'fi': 'Hakujärjestelmät keskittyvät usein tuottamaan relevantteja tuloksia "nyt" varten olettaen sekä corporan että käyttäjien tarpeet, jotka keskittyvät nykyhetkeen. Nykyään monet korpuset heijastavat kuitenkin merkittäviä pitkittäiskokoelmia, jotka vaihtelevat 20-vuotisesta internetistä satojen vuosien digitoiduihin sanomalehtiin ja kirjoihin. Käyttäjän ajallisen tarkoituksen ymmärtäminen ja merkityksellisimmän historiallisen sisällön löytäminen on noussut merkittäväksi haasteeksi. Yleiset hakuominaisuudet, kuten kyselyn laajennus, hyödyntävät termien välistä suhdetta, mutta eivät voi toimia hyvin kaikissa tilanteissa, kun suhteet vaihtelevat ajallisesti. Tässä työssä esitellään aikasuhdemalli, joka on poimittu pitkittäisistä tiedonkeruuista. Malli tukee tehtävää tunnistaa kahden sanan perusteella, kun ne liittyvät toisiinsa. Esitämme algoritmisen kehyksen tälle tehtävälle ja näytämme sen sovelluksen kyselyn laajennustehtävään saavuttaen suuren voiton.', 'bs': "Sistemi pretraživanja često se fokusiraju na pružanje relevantnih rezultata za 'sada', prema pretpostavku kako korpora i korisnika trebaju potrebe koje se fokusiraju na trenutno. Međutim, mnogi korporaci danas odražavaju značajne dugoročne kolekcije od 20 godina interneta do stotina godina digitaliziranih novina i knjiga. Razumijevanje privremene namjere korisnika i povratak najvažnijih istorijskih sadržaja postalo je značajan izazov. Obične funkcije pretraživanja, poput proširenja pitanja, utjecaju na odnos između uvjeta, ali ne mogu funkcionirati dobro u svako vrijeme kada se odnosi privremeno razlikuju. U ovom poslu predstavljamo model privremenih odnosa koji je izvučen iz kolekcije dugotrajnih podataka. Model podržava zadatak identifikacije, dajući dvije riječi, kada se odnose jedno prema drugom. Predstavljamo algoritmski okvir za ovaj zadatak i pokazujemo njegovu prijavu za zadatak proširenja zahteva, ostvarivši visok dobitak.", 'jv': "Ndoleh sistem sing dipun ngomong dipun ngomong barang nggawe 'saiki' nggo mbatalé sampeyan karo akeh dumadhi iki dadi seneng bongkar nggo ndelok. Nanging, akeh sing sampeyan mruput kuwi matngono kuwi alam-alam sing paling awak dhéwé, nalika sing katêpakan karo web sampek atusan akeh sing paling apik lan buku. Ngawe ngerasai nggawe perintah dumadhing sampeyan nguasai iki bakal ngewehke nggawe barang dadi nggawe tarjamahan sing dumadhi mau AllProgressBar Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita nambah model diuntingi tanggal kuwi tanggal kuwi nggawe dataGeneralMenu item. model Kita nyebute Algorithm akeh sistem kanggo nggawe nggawe aplikasi kanggo ngubah pangan kanggo ngilangno bukani, iso nggolakake sing wis ana.", 'sk': 'Iskalni sistemi so pogosto osredotočeni na zagotavljanje ustreznih rezultatov za "zdaj", pri čemer predpostavljajo potrebe korpusov in uporabnikov, ki se osredotočajo na sedanjost. Vendar pa mnogi korpusi danes odražajo pomembne vzdolžne zbirke, ki segajo od 20 let spleta do sto let digitaliziranih časopisov in knjig. Razumevanje časovnega namena uporabnika in pridobivanje najpomembnejše zgodovinske vsebine sta postala pomemben izziv. Pogoste funkcije iskanja, kot je razširitev poizvedbe, izkoristijo odnos med izrazoma, vendar ne morejo dobro delovati v vseh časih, ko se odnosi začasno razlikujejo. V tem delu predstavljamo model časovnih relacij, ki je pridobljen iz vzdolžnih zbirk podatkov. Model podpira nalogo identifikacije, podane dve besedi, ko sta povezani med seboj. Predstavljamo algoritmski okvir za to nalogo in prikazujemo njegovo aplikacijo za nalogo razširitve poizvedbe, ki dosega visok dobiček.', 'he': 'מערכות חיפוש מתמקדות לעתים קרובות בהספקה תוצאות רלוונטיות עבור "עכשיו", בהנחה שכל גופרה וגם משתמש זקוקים כי להתמקד על הנוכחי. עם זאת, הרבה גופרות היום משקפים אוסף ארוך משמעותי מתרחש מ-20 שנה מהרשת עד מאות שנים של עיתונים וספרים דיגיטליים. להבין את הכוונה הזמנית של המשתמש ולהשיג את התוכן היסטורי הרלוונטי ביותר הפך לאתגר משמעותי. תכונות חיפוש משותפים, כמו פיתוח חיפוש, משפיעים את מערכת היחסים בין תנאים אבל לא יכולים להתפקד טוב בכל הזמנים כאשר מערכות יחסים שונות זמנית. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מכירים מודל מערכת יחסים זמנית שמוציא מאספי נתונים ארוכים. הדוגמנית תומכת במשימה לזהות, נתנה שתי מילים, כאשר הן קשורות זה לזה. אנו מציגים סגרת אלגוריתמית למשימה הזאת ולהראות את היישום שלה למשימה של פיתוח חקירות, להשיג רווח גבוה.', 'ha': "Search systems are often focused on providing relevant results for the 'now', assuming both corpora and user needs that focus on the present.  Haƙĩƙa, da yawa daga makampuni a yau, sun yi fasihi masu muhimmi na haɗuwa da matabbata mai tsawo daga Web na shekarar 20 zuwa dubu shẽkaru da takardar da littattafai na diƙaita. Ana fahimta umarnin da ake amfani da shi, da kuma a sami tsarin da ke da muhimmi na historiki, ya kasance wata muhimmi mai girma. @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan aikin, Munã ƙara wani misali da ke samun mutane da ke samun data masu tsawo. @ info: whatsthis Munã nuna wani firam na algoritci wa wannan aikin, kuma Munã nuna shiryoyinsa wa aikin yin faɗaɗawa, da za'a sami amfani da mai girma.", 'bo': "'ད་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་ལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་མ་ལག་ལེན་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གནད་དོན་བསྡུས་ན་མཚམས་མཐོང་ནུས། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལོ་ངོ་༢༠ལས་ཨང་གྲངས་རྩིས་ཡོད་དེབ་དང་དེབ་ཁྲི་ཚིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བཤ སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྐབས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལ་རྟོགས་བཞག་ཞིང་དང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ནང་དོན་ལ་བསྐྱར་དུ་གཏོ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་། བརྡ་བཀོད་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་མི་འདུག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བརྒྱུད་རིམ་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མ་དབུགས་འདིས་བདེན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བྱིན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་ས algorithmic framework་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་འདི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དང་མཐུན་སྣ"}
{'en': 'Inter-Weighted Alignment Network for Sentence Pair Modeling', 'ar': 'شبكة المحاذاة الموزونة لنمذجة زوج الجمل', 'fr': "Réseau d'alignement interpondéré pour la modélisation de paires de phrases", 'es': 'Red de alineación interponderada para modelado de pares de oraciones', 'pt': 'Rede de Alinhamento Interponderado para Modelagem de Pares de Sentenças', 'hi': 'वाक्य जोड़ी मॉडलिंग के लिए अंतर-भारित संरेखण नेटवर्क', 'zh': '句对建模加权间对齐网络', 'ja': '文章ペアモデリングのための加重間アライメントネットワーク', 'ru': 'Межвзвешенная сеть выравнивания для моделирования пар предложений', 'ga': 'Líonra Ailínithe Idir-Meáite do Shamhaltú Péire Pianbhreithe', 'ka': 'სიტყვის მეორე მოდელირებისთვის ინტერფექტური განზომილების ქსელი', 'el': 'Δίκτυο ευθυγράμμισης μεταξύ σταθμών για τη μοντελοποίηση ζευγαριού ποινών', 'hu': 'Súlyozott igazítási hálózat az mondatpár modellezéséhez', 'it': 'Rete di allineamento tra pesi per la modellazione della coppia di frasi', 'lt': 'Nuobaudų poros modeliavimo svertinis derinimo tinklas', 'kk': 'Сөздің екі үлгісінің аралығындағы тегістеу желі', 'mk': 'Меѓутежирана мрежа за израмнување за моделирање на пар реченици', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Jajaran Bertimbangan Antara-Bertimbangan untuk Modelan Pasangan Hukuman', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Allinjament bejn Piżijiet għall-Immodellar ta’ Par ta’ Sentenzi', 'ml': 'ശിക്ഷ പീര്\u200d മോഡോളിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200d വൈറ്റ് മാന്ത്രിമേന്റ് ശൃംഖലം', 'mn': 'Үйлдлийн хоёр загварын интернэт хэмжээний Төмбөг', 'no': 'Intervekt justeringsnettverk for uttrykk', 'pl': 'Sieć dostosowania międzywyważonych do modelowania par zdań', 'ro': 'Rețea de aliniere inter-ponderată pentru modelarea perechilor de sentințe', 'sr': 'Межвежана мрежа за моделију пара приказа', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධය සඳහා අන්තර්භාවිත සම්බන්ධය ජාලය', 'sv': 'Interviktad justeringsnätverk för meningsparmodellering', 'so': 'Inter-Weighted Alignment Network for Sentence Pair Modeling', 'ta': 'வாக்கியத்திற்கான இடைவெளிப்படையான ஒழுங்கு பிணையத்தின் பிணையம்', 'ur': 'سنٹنس جوڑی نمڈلینگ کے لئے اندر وزن الیزانگ نیٹ ورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sắp xếp đường dẫn đường cân bằng giữa', 'hr': 'Inter-Weighted Alignment Network for Sentence Pair Modeling', 'bg': 'Междупретеглена мрежа за подравняване за моделиране на двойки присъди', 'nl': 'Inter-gewogen uitlijningsnetwerk voor modellering van zinsparen', 'de': 'Inter-Weighted Alignment Network für die Modellierung von Satzpaaren', 'id': 'Jaringan Penjajaran Bertimbangan Antara-Bertimbangan untuk Modeling Pasangan Sentence', 'ko': '문장 모형에 대한 가중 정렬 네트워크', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Şahsy Çykyş Modeli üçin gollanmış', 'da': 'Interweighted Alignment Network for Sentence Pair Modeling', 'af': 'Intergewigte Oplyn Netwerk vir Sentence Pair Modelering', 'sq': 'Rrjeti i Përcaktimit Ndërpeshuar për Modelimin e Dyve të Dënimeve', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Միջնույն կենտրոնացման ցանցը դատաստական զույգ մոդելավորման համար', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Usalama wa Kipande kwa ajili ya Utawala wa Hukumu', 'az': 'Sözüm İçi Modeli üçün Ölçülü Tərfləmə Ağığı', 'bn': 'Inter-Weighted Alignment Network for Sentence Pair Modeling', 'ca': "Rede d'allinjament entre pes per a modelar parelles de sentences", 'bs': 'Intervežena mreža ispravljanja za Modeliranje pare kazne', 'et': 'Kaalutud joondusvõrk lausepaari modelleerimiseks', 'cs': 'Síť meziváženého zarovnání pro modelování větových párů', 'fi': 'Painotettu tasausverkko lauseparin mallintamista varten', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'רשת התאמה בין משקלים למדליגת זוג משפטים', 'ha': 'Inter-Weighted Alignment Network for Sentence Pair Modeling', 'sk': 'Medtehtano omrežje poravnave za modeliranje parov kazni', 'bo': 'གཏན་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་མ་དབྱིབས་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'Sentence pair modeling is a crucial problem in the field of natural language processing. In this paper, we propose a model to measure the similarity of a sentence pair focusing on the interaction information. We utilize the word level similarity matrix to discover fine-grained alignment of two sentences. It should be emphasized that each word in a sentence has a different importance from the perspective of semantic composition, so we exploit two novel and efficient strategies to explicitly calculate a weight for each word. Although the proposed model only use a sequential LSTM for sentence modeling without any external resource such as syntactic parser tree and additional lexicon features, experimental results show that our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on three datasets of two tasks.', 'ar': 'تعد نمذجة زوج الجمل مشكلة حاسمة في مجال معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا لقياس تشابه زوج من الجمل مع التركيز على معلومات التفاعل. نحن نستخدم مصفوفة تشابه مستوى الكلمات لاكتشاف محاذاة دقيقة لجملتين. يجب التأكيد على أن كل كلمة في الجملة لها أهمية مختلفة من منظور التركيب الدلالي ، لذلك فإننا نستغل استراتيجيتين جديدتين وفعالة لحساب وزن كل كلمة بشكل صريح. على الرغم من أن النموذج المقترح يستخدم فقط LSTM المتسلسل لنمذجة الجملة دون أي مورد خارجي مثل شجرة المحلل النحوي وميزات المعجم الإضافية ، تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يحقق أداءً متطورًا على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات من مهمتين.', 'pt': 'A modelagem de pares de sentenças é um problema crucial no campo do processamento de linguagem natural. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo para medir a similaridade de um par de frases com foco na informação de interação. Utilizamos a matriz de similaridade de nível de palavra para descobrir o alinhamento refinado de duas sentenças. Deve-se enfatizar que cada palavra em uma frase tem uma importância diferente do ponto de vista da composição semântica, então exploramos duas estratégias novas e eficientes para calcular explicitamente um peso para cada palavra. Embora o modelo proposto use apenas um LSTM sequencial para modelagem de sentenças sem nenhum recurso externo, como árvore sintática de análise sintática e recursos de léxico adicionais, resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo atinge desempenho de última geração em três conjuntos de dados de duas tarefas.', 'fr': "La modélisation de paires de phrases est un problème crucial dans le domaine du traitement du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle pour mesurer la similitude d'une paire de phrases en se concentrant sur les informations d'interaction. Nous utilisons la matrice de similarité au niveau des mots pour découvrir un alignement fin de deux phrases. Il convient de souligner que chaque mot d'une phrase a une importance différente du point de vue de la composition sémantique. Nous exploitons donc deux stratégies novatrices et efficaces pour calculer explicitement un poids pour chaque mot. Bien que le modèle proposé utilise uniquement un LSTM séquentiel pour la modélisation de phrases sans aucune ressource externe telle qu'un arbre syntaxique d'analyseur syntaxique et des fonctionnalités de lexique supplémentaires, les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle atteint des performances de pointe sur trois ensembles de données de deux tâches.", 'es': 'El modelado de pares de oraciones es un problema crucial en el campo del procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo para medir la similitud de un par de oraciones centrándose en la información de interacción. Utilizamos la matriz de similitud a nivel de palabras para descubrir la alineación fina de dos oraciones. Debe enfatizarse que cada palabra de una oración tiene una importancia diferente desde la perspectiva de la composición semántica, por lo que explotamos dos estrategias novedosas y eficientes para calcular explícitamente un peso para cada palabra. Aunque el modelo propuesto solo utiliza un LSTM secuencial para el modelado de oraciones sin ningún recurso externo, como el árbol del analizador sintáctico y funciones de léxico adicionales, los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en tres conjuntos de datos de dos tareas.', 'zh': '句者,建模自然语言理域之一关键问题也。 于本文中,立一模形以测交信之相似性。 以单词级相似性矩阵见两句细粒度齐。 所以然者,以语义观之,句中单词各有重要,故因二新之策以明计单词之权重。 虽以次LSTM句建模,无所资于外,句法解析器树与诸词典功能,实验结果表明于二事三数集上先进之性也。', 'ja': '文のペアモデリングは、自然言語処理の分野における重要な問題です。本稿では、相互作用情報に着目して、文のペアの類似性を測定するモデルを提案する。ワードレベル類似性マトリックスを使用して、2つの文の細かい整列を発見します。文の各単語は、意味構成の観点から異なる重要性を持つことを強調すべきである。したがって、2つの新規かつ効率的な戦略を活用して、各単語の重みを明示的に計算する。提案されたモデルは、構文解析器ツリーや追加の辞書機能などの外部リソースなしで、文章モデリングにシーケンシャルLSTMのみを使用していますが、実験結果は、私たちのモデルが2つのタスクの3つのデータセットで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しています。', 'hi': 'वाक्य जोड़ी मॉडलिंग प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के क्षेत्र में एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या है। इस पेपर में, हम इंटरैक्शन जानकारी पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने वाले वाक्य जोड़ी की समानता को मापने के लिए एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम दो वाक्यों के ठीक दानेदार संरेखण की खोज करने के लिए शब्द स्तर समानता मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग करते हैं। इस बात पर जोर दिया जाना चाहिए कि एक वाक्य में प्रत्येक शब्द का शब्दार्थ रचना के परिप्रेक्ष्य से एक अलग महत्व है, इसलिए हम प्रत्येक शब्द के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से वजन की गणना करने के लिए दो उपन्यास और कुशल रणनीतियों का शोषण करते हैं। यद्यपि प्रस्तावित मॉडल केवल वाक्यात्मक पार्सर पेड़ और अतिरिक्त शब्दकोश सुविधाओं जैसे किसी भी बाहरी संसाधन के बिना वाक्य मॉडलिंग के लिए एक अनुक्रमिक एलएसटीएम का उपयोग करता है, प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल दो कार्यों के तीन डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Моделирование пары предложений является ключевой проблемой в области обработки естественного языка. В этой статье мы предлагаем модель для измерения сходства пары предложений, фокусирующихся на информации о взаимодействии. Мы используем матрицу сходства уровней слов, чтобы обнаружить тонкое выравнивание двух предложений. Следует подчеркнуть, что каждое слово в предложении имеет различную значимость с точки зрения семантической композиции, поэтому мы используем две новые и эффективные стратегии для явного расчета веса для каждого слова. Хотя предлагаемая модель использует только последовательное LSTM для моделирования предложений без какого-либо внешнего ресурса, такого как синтаксическое дерево парсеров и дополнительные особенности лексики, экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель достигает самой современной производительности на трех наборах данных из двух задач.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb ríthábhachtach í samhaltú péire abairtí i réimse na próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla chun cosúlacht péire abairte a thomhas ag díriú ar an bhfaisnéis idirghníomhaíochta. Bainimid úsáid as an maitrís cosúlachta leibhéal na bhfocal chun ailíniú míne ar dhá abairt a fháil amach. Ba cheart a aibhsiú go bhfuil tábhacht dhifriúil ag gach focal in abairt ó pheirspictíocht na cumadóireachta séimeanaí, mar sin bainimid leas as dhá straitéis éifeachtacha nua chun meáchan gach focal a ríomh go sainráite. Cé nach n-úsáideann an tsamhail mholta ach LSTM seicheamhach do shamhaltú abairtí gan aon acmhainn sheachtrach ar nós crann parsálaí comhréire agus gnéithe breise foclóireachta, léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár múnla feidhmíocht den scoth amach ar thrí thacar sonraí de dhá thasc.', 'ka': 'სტუმენტის ორი მოდელირება არის ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა, რომელიც სახური ენის პროცესის პანელში. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ მოვეხსნა მოდელს, რომელიც კონკუნტაქციის ინფორმაციისთვის მნიშვნელობის განსხვავება. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სიტყვის სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების მარტიკი, რომელიც ორი სიმბოლოების სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა. უნდა აღწეროთ, რომ ყოველ სიტყვაში სემონტიკური კომპოზიციის პერსპექტიკის განსხვავებული მნიშვნელობა აქვს, რადგან ჩვენ ეკომპოზიციას ორი პრომენტიკი და ეფექტიკური სტრატე მაგრამ მინდომის მოდელი მხოლოდ სკენტიური LSTM გამოყენება სინტაქტიური პანელექსიკონის ხელი და დამატებული ლექსიკონის ფუნქციების მონაცემებისთვის, ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი გამოყენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი', 'hu': 'A mondatpár modellezése kulcsfontosságú probléma a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás területén. Ebben a tanulmányban egy mondatpár hasonlóságának mérésére szolgáló modellt javasolunk, amely az interakciós információkra összpontosít. A szószintű hasonlósági mátrixot használjuk, hogy felfedezzük két mondat finomszemcsés igazítását. Hangsúlyozni kell, hogy egy mondat minden szavának különböző jelentősége van a szemantikai kompozíció szempontjából, ezért két új és hatékony stratégiát használunk ki, hogy kifejezetten kiszámítsuk az egyes szavak súlyát. Bár a javasolt modell csak egy szekvenciális LSTM-t használ a mondatmodellezéshez külső erőforrás nélkül, mint például a szintaktikus elemző fa és további lexikon funkciók, a kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk két feladatból álló három adathalmazon ér el korszerű teljesítményt.', 'el': "Η μοντελοποίηση ζεύγους προτάσεων είναι ένα κρίσιμο πρόβλημα στον τομέα της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο για τη μέτρηση της ομοιότητας ενός ζευγαριού προτάσεων εστιάζοντας στις πληροφορίες αλληλεπίδρασης. Χρησιμοποιούμε τον πίνακα ομοιότητας επιπέδου λέξεων για να ανακαλύψουμε τη λεπτή ευθυγράμμιση δύο προτάσεων. Πρέπει να τονιστεί ότι κάθε λέξη σε μια πρόταση έχει διαφορετική σημασία από τη σκοπιά της σημασιολογικής σύνθεσης, γι' αυτό εκμεταλλευόμαστε δύο νέες και αποτελεσματικές στρατηγικές για να υπολογίσουμε ρητά ένα βάρος για κάθε λέξη. Αν και το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί μόνο ένα διαδοχικό για τη μοντελοποίηση προτάσεων χωρίς κανέναν εξωτερικό πόρο, όπως το δέντρο συντακτικού αναλυτή και πρόσθετα χαρακτηριστικά λεξικού, τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων δύο εργασιών.", 'it': "La modellazione delle coppie di frasi è un problema cruciale nel campo dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello per misurare la somiglianza di una coppia di frasi concentrandosi sulle informazioni di interazione. Usiamo la matrice di somiglianza a livello di parola per scoprire l'allineamento fine di due frasi. Va sottolineato che ogni parola in una frase ha un'importanza diversa dal punto di vista della composizione semantica, quindi sfruttiamo due strategie innovative ed efficienti per calcolare esplicitamente un peso per ogni parola. Anche se il modello proposto utilizza solo un LSTM sequenziale per la modellazione di frasi senza alcuna risorsa esterna come albero sintattico parser e funzionalità lessicali aggiuntive, i risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia su tre set di dati di due attività.", 'kk': 'Сөздің екі моделі - табиғи тіл өңдеу өрісінде маңызды мәселе. Бұл қағазда, біз мәліметтің арасындағы мәліметіне көздейтін сөйлеменің ұқсастығын өлшеу үшін үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біз сөздің деңгейіндегі ұқсас матрицасын екі сөздерді табу үшін қолданамыз. Бұл сөздің әрбір сөздері симантикалық құрылғының қарауынан бірнеше маңызды болады, сондықтан біз әрбір сөз үшін қатты есептеу үшін екі романдық және эффективні стратегияларды қолданамыз. Келтірілген үлгі тек сыртқы ресурстар синтактикалық талдау бұтағы және қосымша лексикалық мүмкіндіктері синтактикалық талдау мәліметтері болмаса да, мәліметтің нәтижелері біздің үш деректер қорының үш тапсырманың күй-', 'mk': 'Моделирањето на пар реченици е клучен проблем во областа на природното обработување јазик. Во овој весник предложуваме модел за мерење на сличноста на пар реченици фокусирани на информациите за интеракција. We utilize the word level similarity matrix to discover fine-grained alignment of two sentences.  It should be emphasized that each word in a sentence has a different importance from the perspective of semantic composition, so we exploit two novel and efficient strategies to explicitly calculate a weight for each word.  Иако предложениот модел користи секвенцијален LSTM само за моделирање на реченици без никаков надворешен ресурс како што се синтактичкото дрво на анализатор и дополнителните лексиконски карактеристики, експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел постигнува најнова резултат на три податоци од две', 'lt': 'Sentencijų poros modeliavimas yra labai svarbi gamtos kalbų apdorojimo problem a. Šiame dokumente siūlome model į, skirtą įvertinti sakinių poros panašumą, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant sąveikos informacijai. Mes naudojame žodžio lygio panašumo matricą, kad rastume smulkiai išgrūdintą dviejų sakinių suderinimą. Reikėtų pabrėžti, kad kiekvieno sakinio žodžio svarba skiriasi nuo semantinės sudėties perspektyvos, todėl mes naudojame dvi naujas ir veiksmingas strategijas aiškiai apskaičiuojant kiekvieno žodžio svorį. Nors siūlomas modelis naudoja tik sekacinį LSTM frazių modeliavimui be jokių išorinių išteklių, pvz., sintetinio analizatoriaus medžio ir papildomų lexikonų savybių, eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekia naujausius rezultatus trijuose dviejų užduočių duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'ms': 'Modelan pasangan hukuman adalah masalah penting dalam medan pemprosesan bahasa alami. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model untuk mengukur persamaan pasangan kalimat yang fokus pada maklumat interaksi. Kita gunakan matriks persamaan aras perkataan untuk mencari garisan yang sempurna dua kalimat. Ia perlu ditandakan bahawa setiap perkataan dalam satu kalimat mempunyai kepentingan yang berbeza dari perspektif komposisi semantik, jadi kita mengeksploitasi dua strategi baru dan efisien untuk mengira secara eksplicit berat untuk setiap perkataan. Walaupun model yang diusulkan hanya menggunakan LSTM jujukan untuk pemodelan kalimat tanpa mana-mana sumber luaran seperti pepohon penghurai sintaktik dan ciri-ciri leksikon tambahan, keputusan eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kita mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada tiga set data dari dua tugas.', 'ml': 'ശിക്ഷ ജോട്ടി മോഡലിംഗ് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രദേശത്ത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നമാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ രണ്ട് ജോട്ടുകാരുടെ തുല്യത്തിന്റെ പോലെയാണ്  We utilize the word level similarity matrix to discover fine-grained alignment of two sentences.  ഒരു വാക്കിലുള്ള ഓരോ വാക്കും സെമാന്റിക് സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ കാഴ്ചപ്പാടില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഓരോ വാക്കിനും വ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d മാത്രമേ വാക്കിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു വാക്ക് മാത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ സിന്റാക്ടിക', 'pl': 'Modelowanie pary zdań jest kluczowym problemem w dziedzinie przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model pomiaru podobieństwa pary zdań skupiający się na informacjach interakcyjnych. Wykorzystujemy matrycę podobieństwa poziomu słów, aby odkryć drobne wyrównanie dwóch zdań. Należy podkreślić, że każde słowo w zdaniu ma inne znaczenie z punktu widzenia kompozycji semantycznej, dlatego wykorzystujemy dwie nowe i skuteczne strategie, aby wyraźnie obliczyć wagę dla każdego słowa. Chociaż proponowany model używa tylko sekwencyjnego LSTM do modelowania zdań bez żadnych zewnętrznych zasobów, takich jak drzewo parsera składni i dodatkowe funkcje leksykonu, wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność na trzech zbiorach danych dwóch zadań.', 'mt': 'Sentence pair modeling is a crucial problem in the field of natural language processing.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell li jkejjel is-similarità ta’ par ta’ sentenzi li jiffoka fuq l-informazzjoni dwar l-interazzjoni. Aħna nużaw il-matriċi ta’ similarità tal-livell tal-kelma biex niskopru allinjament fin-grained ta’ żewġ sentenzi. Għandu jiġi enfasizzat li kull kelma f’sentenza għandha importanza differenti mill-perspettiva tal-kompożizzjoni semantika, għalhekk nistruttaw żewġ strateġiji ġodda u effiċjenti biex nikkalkulaw b’mod espliċitu piż għal kull kelma. Għalkemm il-mudell propost juża biss LSTM sekwenzjali għall-immudellar tas-sentenzi mingħajr kwalunkwe riżorsa esterna bħalma huma s-siġar tal-analizzatur sintetiku u karatteristiċi tal-lexicon addizzjonali, ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ żewġ kompiti.', 'mn': 'Хоёр үгийн модель нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн талаар чухал асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид харилцааны мэдээлэл дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлэх үеийн загварыг хэмжүүлэхэд загвар өгсөн. Бид хоёр өгүүлбэрийн тохиромжтой тохиромжтой тохиромжтой хэмжээсүүдийг олохын тулд хэмжээний төвшин тохиромжтой матриц хэрэглэдэг. Үүний үг бүр semantic бүтээгдэхүүнээс өөр чухал гэдгийг батлах хэрэгтэй. Тиймээс бид үг бүрт жин тодорхойлох хоёр шинэ, үр дүнтэй стратегийг ашиглаж байна. Хэдийгээр санал өгсөн загвар нь зөвхөн дараагийн LSTM-г шинжлэх ухааны мод болон нэмэлт хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж байгаа ч, туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь хоёр даалгаварын гурван өгөгдлийн сангийн даалгавартай ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Modelling av tekstpar er eit viktig problem i feltet for naturspråkshandtering. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit modell for å måle likheten til eit setningspar som fokuserer på interaksjonsinformasjonen. Vi bruker matrisen for ordnivå similaritet for å oppdaga fine-grained justering av to setningar. Det bør undersøkast at kvar ord i eit setning har ein annan viktig frå perspektivet av semantisk samansetting, slik at vi ekspluaterer to romanske og effektive strategiar for å eksplisisera ein vekt for kvar ord. Selv om den foreslåde modellen brukar berre ein sekvensiell LSTM for setningsmoduling utan eksterne ressurs, som syntaksisk tolkar tre og ekstra leksikonsfunksjonar, viser eksperimentelt resultat at modellen vår når det gjer tilstanden til kunsten på tre datasett med to oppgåver.', 'ro': 'Modelarea perechilor de sentințe este o problemă crucială în domeniul procesării limbajului natural. În această lucrare, propunem un model pentru a măsura similaritatea unei perechi de propoziții concentrându-se pe informațiile de interacțiune. Utilizăm matricea similarității nivelului de cuvânt pentru a descoperi alinierea fină a două propoziții. Trebuie subliniat faptul că fiecare cuvânt dintr-o propoziție are o importanță diferită din perspectiva compoziției semantice, astfel încât exploatăm două strategii noi și eficiente pentru a calcula explicit o greutate pentru fiecare cuvânt. Deși modelul propus utilizează doar un LSTM secvențial pentru modelarea propozițiilor fără resurse externe, cum ar fi arborele de parser sintactic și caracteristicile lexiconice suplimentare, rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru obține performanțe de ultimă generație pe trei seturi de date de două sarcini.', 'so': 'Tusaale ahaan ciqaabku waa dhibaato muhiim ah marka lagu jiro baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa tusaale si aan u qiyaasno siman labada labo oo isku mid ah ee ku kalsoonaan macluumaadka iskaashatada. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa heerka hadalka oo isku mid ah si aan u ogaano isbedelka labada hadal. Waxaa haboon in qof kasta oo hadal ku qoran ay muhiim ka leedahay aragtida qaybinta, sidaas darteed waxaynu isticmaalnaa laba qoraal oo saxda ah oo faa’iido ah si caddaan ugu xisaabno miisaan kasta. In kastoo uu tilmaamayo tusaale ahaan LSTM oo keliya u isticmaalaya tusaale ahaan qalabka dibadda ah, tusaale ahaan geed syntactic Parser iyo faahfaahin kale oo lexicon ah, waxaa muuqata tijaabada in modellkayagu uu sameynayo sameynta xaaladda-farshaxanka saddex samooyin oo shaqooyin ah.', 'sv': 'Modeling av meningspar är ett avgörande problem inom bearbetningen av naturligt språk. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en modell för att mäta likheten mellan ett meningspar med fokus på interaktionsinformationen. Vi använder ordnivåens likhetsmatris för att upptäcka finkornig justering av två meningar. Det bör betonas att varje ord i en mening har en annan betydelse ur semantisk sammansättning, så vi utnyttjar två nya och effektiva strategier för att uttryckligen beräkna en vikt för varje ord. Även om den föreslagna modellen endast använder en sekventiell LSTM för meningsmodellering utan någon extern resurs såsom syntaktiskt parserträd och ytterligare lexikonfunktioner, visar experimentella resultat att vår modell uppnår state-of-the-art prestanda på tre datauppsättningar med två uppgifter.', 'sr': 'Modeliranje par rečenica je ključni problem u oblasti prirodnog obrade jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo model za mjerenje sličnosti parova rečenica koji se fokusira na informacije o interakciji. Koristimo matricu sliènosti reèi kako bi otkrili fino zrno poravnanje dve reèi. Trebalo bi da se naglasi da svaka reč u rečenici ima drugačiju važnost od perspektive semantičkog sastanka, tako da iskoristimo dve nove i efikasne strategije da bismo izračunali težinu za svaku reč. Iako predloženi model koristi samo sekvencijalnu LSTM za modeliranje rečenica bez bilo kakvih vanjskih resursa poput sintaktičkog analizatora drveta i dodatnih leksičkih karakteristika, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postiže izvršnost stanja umjetnosti na tri seta podataka od dva zadataka.', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம் ஜோடி மாதிரி இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் புலத்தில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பிரச்சனை. In this paper, we propose a model to measure the similarity of a sentence pair focusing on the interaction information.  இரண்டு வாக்கியங்களின் சரியான ஒழுங்குபடுத்தலை கண்டுபிடி ஒவ்வொரு வாக்கிலுள்ள ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தையும் பெம்மான்டிக் கூட்டத்தின் பார்வையிலிருந்து வேறு முக்கியம் இருக்கிறது எனவே ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தைக்கு முந்திருக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மட்டும் வாக்கு மாதிரி மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் எனினும் வெளி மூலங்கள் இல்லாமல், அதாவது ஒத்திசைவு பார்வை மரம் மற்றும் கூடுதல் லெக்சிகான்', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වාක්ෂාවක් සම්බන්ධතා තොරතුරු ගැන බලන්න. අපි වාක්ය දෙකක් ගැන හොයාගන්න වචන සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් මැට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක භාවිත කරනවා. ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ඕනේ වාක්යෙක් වල හැම වචනයක්ම වෙනස් විශේෂයක් තියෙනවා සෙමැන්ටික් සංවිධානයට, ඉතින් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක හැබැයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි LSTM විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතර', 'ur': 'سنت جوڑی موڈلینگ طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کھیلے میں ایک اہم مشکل ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک جماعت جوڑے کی مثالی کا اندازہ کرے جو تخلیق معلومات پر تمرکز کرتی ہے۔ ہم کلمات سطح مثالی ماٹریکس کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ دو کلمات کی پاکیزہ دانے مثالی کو آگاہ کریں اس کی تسبیح کرنا چاہیے کہ ہر کلمہ میں ایک کلمہ سیمنٹی پیدائش کی نظر سے مختلف اہم ہے، تو ہم دونوں کائنات اور مفید استراتژی استراتژی استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ہر کلمہ کے لئے ایک وزن کا مطلق صاف شمار کریں۔ اگرچہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل صرف فیصلہ موڈلینگ کے بغیر کسی خارجی منبع کے لئے لکھی ہوئی LSTM کا استعمال کرتا ہے، جیسے سینٹکتیک پارچسون درخت اور اضافہ لکسیون کے متعلق، آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری موڈل تین ڈیٹسٹ کے لئے تین دنیا', 'vi': 'Lựa chọn cặp câu là vấn đề quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình để đo sự giống nhau của một cặp án tập trung vào thông tin giao tiếp. Chúng tôi sử dụng ma trận giống nhau ở mức chữ để tìm ra sự sắp xếp ổn định của hai câu. Nên được nhấn mạnh rằng mỗi từ trong một câu có một tầm quan trọng khác với quan điểm về cấu trúc văn hóa, nên chúng tôi sử dụng hai chiến lược mới và hiệu quả để tính rõ ràng một trọng lượng cho mỗi từ. Mặc dù mẫu đề xuất chỉ sử dụng một LSTM theo kế tiếp để tạo bản án mà không có nguồn tài nguyên nào bên ngoài, như cây cha phân tách cấu tạo pháp thuật và tính năng ngôn ngữ thêm, kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tuyệt vời trên ba tập tin gồm hai nhiệm vụ.', 'uz': "Hujjatning ikki xil modeli tabiiy tilni boshqarish davrida muhim muammolar. Bu hujjatda, biz bir tugma bir so'zning bir ikki xil tilini o'zgartirish uchun modelni talab qilamiz. Biz ikki so'zlar to ʻgʻriligini aniqlash uchun so'zning oʻxshash matrix bilan foydalanamiz. It should be emphasized that each word in a sentence has a different importance from the perspective of semantic composition, so we exploit two novel and efficient strategies to explicitly calculate a weight for each word.  Koʻrsatilgan modeli faqat keyingi kelajakdagi LSTM tugmasining bir terminal modeliga foydalanadi, huddi tashqi manbalar, syntactic parameter va qoʻshimcha leksision imkoniyatlarini qoʻshish mumkin, tajriba natijalarimiz bu modelmiz ikki vazifalar uchun uchta maʼlumot bajarishni bajaradi.", 'bg': 'Моделирането на двойки изречения е решаващ проблем в областта на обработката на естествения език. В настоящата статия предлагаме модел за измерване на приликата на двойка изречения с фокус върху информацията за взаимодействието. Използваме матрицата за сходство на ниво думата, за да открием фино подравняване на две изречения. Трябва да се подчертае, че всяка дума в изречение има различно значение от гледна точка на семантичния състав, така че използваме две нови и ефективни стратегии за изрично изчисляване на теглото за всяка дума. Въпреки че предложеният модел използва само последователен ЛСТМ за моделиране на изречения без външен ресурс като синтактичен анализатор и допълнителни лексиконови функции, експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел постига най-съвременно представяне на три набора от данни от две задачи.', 'nl': 'Het modelleren van zinnenparen is een cruciaal probleem op het gebied van natuurlijke taalverwerking. In dit artikel stellen we een model voor om de gelijkenis van een zinnenpaar te meten, gericht op de interactie informatie. We gebruiken de gelijkenismatrix op woordniveau om de fijnkorrelige uitlijning van twee zinnen te ontdekken. Er moet worden benadrukt dat elk woord in een zin een ander belang heeft vanuit het perspectief van semantische samenstelling, dus we gebruiken twee nieuwe en efficiënte strategieën om expliciet een gewicht voor elk woord te berekenen. Hoewel het voorgestelde model alleen een sequentiële LSTM gebruikt voor zinsmodellering zonder enige externe bron zoals syntactische parserboom en aanvullende lexicon functies, tonen experimentele resultaten aan dat ons model state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt op drie datasets van twee taken.', 'da': 'Sætningsparmodellering er et afgørende problem inden for bearbejdning af naturligt sprog. I denne artikel foreslår vi en model til at måle ligheden af et sætningspar med fokus på interaktionsinformationen. Vi bruger ordniveau lighedsmatrix til at opdage finkornet justering af to sætninger. Det skal understreges, at hvert ord i en sætning har en forskellig betydning set fra et semantisk sammensætningsperspektiv, så vi udnytter to nye og effektive strategier til eksplicit at beregne en vægt for hvert ord. Selvom den foreslåede model kun bruger en sekventiel LSTM til sætningsmodellering uden nogen ekstern ressource såsom syntaktisk fortolkertræ og yderligere leksikonfunktioner, viser eksperimentelle resultater, at vores model opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne på tre datasæt af to opgaver.', 'hr': 'Modeliranje par kazna je ključni problem u području prirodnog obrazovanja jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo model za mjerenje sličnosti par rečenica fokusiranog na informacije o interakciji. Koristimo matricu sličnosti riječi razine kako bi otkrili fino zrno poravnanje dvije rečenice. Trebalo bi biti istaknuto da svaka riječ u rečenici ima drugačiju važnost od perspektive semantičkog sastojaka, tako da iskoristimo dvije nove i učinkovite strategije kako bismo izračunali težinu za svaku riječ. Iako predloženi model koristi samo sekvencijsku LSTM za modeliranje rečenica bez bilo kakvih vanjskih resursa poput sintaktičkog analizatora drveta i dodatnih leksičkih karakteristika, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti na tri seta podataka od dva zadataka.', 'de': 'Die Modellierung von Satzpaaren ist ein entscheidendes Problem im Bereich der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein Modell vor, um die Ähnlichkeit eines Satzpaares zu messen, wobei der Fokus auf die Interaktionsinformationen liegt. Wir verwenden die Ähnlichkeitsmatrix auf Wortebene, um die feinkörnige Ausrichtung zweier Sätze zu entdecken. Es sollte betont werden, dass jedes Wort in einem Satz eine andere Bedeutung aus der Perspektive der semantischen Zusammensetzung hat, daher nutzen wir zwei neuartige und effiziente Strategien, um explizit ein Gewicht für jedes Wort zu berechnen. Obwohl das vorgeschlagene Modell nur ein sequenzielles LSTM für die Satzmodellierung verwendet, ohne externe Ressourcen wie syntaktischen Parser-Baum und zusätzliche Lexikon-Funktionen, zeigen experimentelle Ergebnisse, dass unser Modell State-of-the-Art Leistung für drei Datensätze von zwei Aufgaben erreicht.', 'id': 'Modeling pasangan hukuman adalah masalah penting dalam bidang proses bahasa alami. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model untuk mengukur persamaan dari pasangan kalimat yang fokus pada informasi interaksi. Kami menggunakan matriks persamaan tingkat kata untuk menemukan penyesuaian gandum dari dua kalimat. Seharusnya diperingatkan bahwa setiap kata dalam kalimat memiliki penting yang berbeda dari perspektif komposisi semantis, jadi kita mengeksploitasi dua strategi baru dan efisien untuk mengira secara eksplicit berat untuk setiap kata. Meskipun model yang diusulkan hanya menggunakan LSTM sekuensial untuk model kalimat tanpa sumber daya luar apapun seperti pohon parser sintaktik dan karakteristik lexikon tambahan, hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita mencapai prestasi terbaik pada tiga set data dari dua tugas.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa adhabu mbili ni tatizo muhimu katika eneo la utaratibu wa lugha asili. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza muundo wa kupima mfano wa neno linalofanana na wawili wawili wenye lengo la taarifa za kati. Tunatumia kiwango cha neno kinachofanana na kinachofanana ili kugundua uwezekano mzuri wa hukumu mbili. It should be emphasized that each word in a sentence has a different importance from the perspective of semantic composition, so we exploit two novel and efficient strategies to explicitly calculate a weight for each word.  Ingawa modeli iliypendekezwa inatumia LSTM tu kwa ajili ya kuonyesha hukumu bila rasilimali yoyote ya nje kama vile mti wa mchanganyiko wa syntactic na vipengele vya lexico, matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unatokea utendaji wa hali ya sanaa katika seti tatu za takwimu mbili.', 'tr': 'Sözler çift modelleri tebigy dil işlemegi sahypasynda örän möhüm mesele. Bu kagyzda, bir sözlem çiňiniň meňzeşliklerini etkileşim maglumatyna üns bermek üçin bir nusga teklip edýäris. Biz kelime düzeydeki benzetim matrisini iki sözlerin ince çizginini keşfetmek için kullanırız Sözlerde her sözüň semantik ýygnagynyň perspektive üýtgeşiginden başga bir möhüm bar diýip, şonuň üçin her söz üçin iki roman we etkinlik strategiýany ulanýarys. Eýöne teklip eden nusga diňe sözlem modelleýäni çykarmak üçin sözlem üçin bir daşary ressurssyz bolsa bir LSTM ullanyşsa hem sintaktik tansçylar agajy we ýene-de bir leksikon möhümlerini, deneysel netijesi biziň modelimiz iki zadyň üç sanat setirinde tapylýandygyny görkez.', 'fa': 'نمونه\u200cسازی جفت جمله یک مشکل مهم در زمینه پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل پیشنهاد می کنیم تا شبیه یک جفت جمله را اندازه گیری کند که روی اطلاعات تعامل تمرکز می کند. ما ماتریکس شبیه\u200cسازی کلمه را برای کشف کردن تنظیم دو جمله استفاده می\u200cکنیم. باید تأثیر بده که هر کلمه در یک جمله اهمیت متفاوتی از دیدگاه ترکیب سنتی دارد، بنابراین ما دو استراتژی نویس و موثر را استفاده می کنیم تا به طور کامل یک وزن برای هر کلمه محاسبه کنیم. اگرچه مدل پیشنهاد تنها از LSTM برای مدل کردن مجوز بدون هیچ منابع خارجی مثل درخت ویرایشگری و ویرایشگری دیگری استفاده می\u200cکند، نتایج آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما بر سه مجموعه داده\u200cای از دو کار رسیده است.', 'sq': 'Modelimi i çifteve të dënimeve është një problem vendimtar në fushën e procesimit natyror të gjuhës. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model për të matur ngjashmërinë e një çifti fjalësh që përqëndrohet në informacionin e ndërveprimit. We utilize the word level similarity matrix to discover fine-grained alignment of two sentences.  Duhet të theksohet se çdo fjalë në një fjalë ka një rëndësi të ndryshme nga perspektiva e përbërjes semantike, kështu që ne shfrytëzojmë dy strategji të reja dhe të efektshme për të llogaritur eksplicitisht një peshë për çdo fjalë. Megjithëse modeli i propozuar përdorë vetëm një LSTM sekuencial për modelimin e fjalëve pa ndonjë burim të jashtëm të tillë si pema sintaktike analizuese dhe karakteristikat shtesë të lexikonëve, rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë arrin performancën më të lartë në tre grupe të dhënash të dy detyrave.', 'am': 'የፍርድ ሁለት ዓይነቶች ምሳሌ ፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል መከራ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቁጥጥር ሁለትን የሚመስል ምሳሌ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የቃላትን ደረጃን በሚያሳየው ማትሪክስ እናስቀምጣለን የሁለት ቃላት ክፍሎች ማቀናቀል እናደርጋለን፡፡ It should be emphasized that each word in a sentence has a different importance from the perspective of semantic composition, so we exploit two novel and efficient strategies to explicitly calculate a weight for each word.  በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ምንም እንኳ የውጭው ክፍል ምሳሌ፣ የሲንተርክ ምርጫዎች ዛፍ እና ጨማሪ ሌክሲኮን ምርጫዎች፣ ሞዴላታችን በሦስት ዳታ-የ-art ሥርዓት በሁለት ስርዓቶች ላይ የሚደረገውን እንደምታደርግ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Sentence paar modellering is 'n kruipende probleem in die veld van natuurlike taal verwerking. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n model om die gelykenis van 'n sin paar te maak wat fokuseer op die interaksie inligting. Ons gebruik die woord vlak vergelykbaarheid matriks om die fyn-graad oplyn van twee teikens te ontdek. Dit moet bepaal word dat elke woord in 'n seting 'n ander belangrikheid het van die perspektief van semantiese opstelling, sodat ons twee novele en effektiewe strategies uitbreek om 'n gewig vir elke woord te bereken. Alhoewel die voorgestelde model slegs 'n volgende LSTM gebruik vir setingsmodellering sonder enige eksterne hulpbron soos sintakteel analyseerder boom en addisionele leksikone funksies, eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons model bereik status-of-the-art-prestasie op drie datastel van twee taak.", 'hy': 'Պատասխանների զույգ մոդելը շատ կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերլուծության ոլորտում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որպեսզի չափենք նախադասությունների զույգի նմանությունը, կենտրոնացնելով փոխազդեցության ինֆորմացիայի վրա: Մենք օգտագործում ենք բառի մատրիքսը նմանության մատրիքսը, որպեսզի բացահայտենք երկու նախադասությունների գեղեցիկ հավասարումը: Պետք է նշել, որ նախադասության յուրաքանչյուր բառ տարբեր կարևորություն ունի սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքի տեսանկյունից, ուստի մենք օգտագործում ենք երկու նոր և արդյունավետ ռազմավարություններ յուրաքանչյուր բառի համար բացատրական հաշվարկելու համար: Չնայած, որ առաջարկած մոդելը օգտագործում է միայն հաջորդական LSMT-ը նախադասությունների մոդելավորման համար առանց արտաքին ռեսուրսների, ինչպիսիք են սինտակտիկ վերլուծումների ծառերը և ավելացյալ լեքսիկոնի հատկությունները, փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը հասնում է ամենա', 'az': 'Söz çift modelləri təbiətli dil işləməsi sahəsində çox çətin bir problemdir. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif məlumatlarına odaqlanan cümlənin bənzərini ölçürmək üçün modeli təklif edirik. İki cümlənin gözəl çəkilməsini keçmək üçün sözlərin səviyyəsi kimilik matrisini istifadə edirik. Sözünün hər kəlməsinin semantik kompozisyonun perspektivindən fərqli bir vaxt olduğunu təsdiqlənməsi lazımdır. Biz hər kəlmə üçün a ğırlığı açıq hesablamaq üçün iki roman və etkili strateji istifadə edirik. Lakin təbliğ edilmiş modellər sintaktik ayırıcı a ğacı və əlavə leksikon özellikləri kimi cümlələrin modelləri olmadan təkrar cümlələrin LSTM üçün istifadə edirlər, təminatı sonuçları göstərirlər ki, modellərimizin üç veri qutusu ilə iki işin eyni olduğunu göstərirlər.', 'bn': 'শাস্তি জোড়া মডেলিং হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সমস্যা। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে একটি বাক্য জোড়ার মতো মাপ দিতে পারি, যারা ইন্টারনেশন তথ্যের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়ে দ আমরা শব্দের স্তরের সমতুল্য ম্যাট্রিক্স ব্যবহার করি দুটি শাস্তির সুন্দর সাজানোর জন্য। It should be emphasized that each word in a sentence has a different importance from the perspective of semantic composition, so we exploit two novel and efficient strategies to explicitly calculate a weight for each word.  যদিও প্রস্তাবিত মডেল শুধুমাত্র বাইরের কোনো উৎস ছাড়া কোনো বাইরের মূল্যের মডেল ব্যবহার করে যেমন সিন্ট্যাকটিক্সিক্সিকোর বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং অতিরিক্ত লেক্সিকোন বৈশিষ্ট্যে', 'bs': 'Modeliranje par kazna je ključni problem u oblasti prirodnog obrade jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo model za mjerenje sličnosti par rečenica fokusiranog na informacije o interakciji. Koristimo matricu sličnosti riječi kako bi otkrili fino zrno poravnanje dvije rečenice. Trebalo bi biti istaknuto da svaka riječ u rečenici ima drugačiju važnost od perspektive semantičkog sastanka, tako da iskoristimo dve romanske i efikasne strategije da bismo izračunali težinu za svaku riječ. Iako predloženi model koristi samo sekvencijalnu LSTM za modeliranje rečenica bez bilo kakvih vanjskih resursa poput sintaktičkog analizatora drveta i dodatnih leksičkih karakteristika, eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti na tri seta podataka od dva zadataka.', 'ko': '문장의 모델링은 자연 언어 처리 분야의 관건적인 문제이다.본고에서 우리는 상호작용 정보를 바탕으로 하는 문장 대 유사성 도량 모델을 제시했다.우리는 어급 유사 행렬을 이용하여 두 문장의 세립도 정렬을 발견했다.강조해야 할 것은 의미 구성의 측면에서 볼 때 문장의 모든 단어는 서로 다른 중요성을 가지기 때문에 우리는 두 가지 참신하고 효과적인 전략을 채택하여 모든 단어의 중요성을 명확하게 계산했다.제시된 모델은 순서 LSTM을 사용하여 문장 모델링을 하고 문법 분석기 트리와 추가 어휘 특징 등 외부 자원이 없지만 실험 결과 우리의 모델은 두 임무의 세 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다.', 'ca': "La modelació de parelles de sentences és un problem a crucial en el camp del processament natural de llenguatges. En aquest paper, proposem un model per mesurar la similitud d'un parell de frases centrat en la informació d'interacció. Utilitzem la matriu de similitud del nivell de paraules per descobrir l'alliniament fins de dues frases. Hauria de ressaltar que cada paraula d'una frase té una importància diferent de la perspectiva de la composició semàntica, així que explotam dues estratègies noves i eficients per calcular explícitament un pes per cada paraula. Encara que el model proposat només utilitza un LSTM seqüencial per a modelar frases sense cap recurso extern com l'arbre sinàctic d'analitzadors i característiques adicionals de lexicòns, els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat en tres conjunts de dades de dues tasques.", 'cs': 'Modelování páru vět je klíčovým problémem v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku navrhujeme model pro měření podobnosti větového páru se zaměřením na interakční informace. Používáme matici podobnosti na úrovni slova k objevení jemnozrnného zarovnání dvou vět. Je třeba zdůraznit, že každé slovo ve větě má z hlediska sémantického složení jiný význam, proto využíváme dvě nové a efektivní strategie pro explicitní výpočet váhy pro každé slovo. Ačkoli navržený model používá pouze sekvenční LSTM pro modelování vět bez externích zdrojů, jako je syntaktický parser strom a další slovníkové funkce, experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu na třech datových sadách dvou úloh.', 'et': 'Lausepaari modelleerimine on looduskeele töötlemise valdkonnas otsustav probleem. Käesolevas töös pakume välja mudeli lausepaari sarnasuse mõõtmiseks, keskendudes interaktsiooni infole. Me kasutame sõnataseme sarnasuse maatriksi, et avastada kahe lause peene joondus. Tuleb rõhutada, et iga lause sõna on semantilise kompositsiooni vaatenurgast erinev tähtsus, seega kasutame kahte uut ja tõhusat strateegiat, et selgesõnaliselt arvutada iga sõna kaal. Kuigi kavandatud mudelis kasutatakse lausemodelleerimiseks ainult järjestikust LSTM-i ilma välisressurssideta, nagu süntaktiline parser puu ja täiendavad leksikoni funktsioonid, näitavad eksperimentaalsed tulemused, et meie mudel saavutab kaasaegse jõudluse kolmel andmekogumil kahest ülesandest.', 'fi': 'Lausekeparin mallinnus on keskeinen ongelma luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme mallia lauseparin samankaltaisuuden mittaamiseksi vuorovaikutustietoihin keskittyen. Käytämme sanatason samankaltaisuusmatriisia löytääksemme kahden lauseen hienorakeisen linjauksen. On syytä korostaa, että jokaisella lauseen sanalla on erilainen merkitys semanttisen koostumuksen näkökulmasta, joten hyödynnämme kahta uutta ja tehokasta strategiaa laskeaksemme nimenomaisesti painoa jokaiselle sanalle. Vaikka ehdotetussa mallissa käytetään vain sekvenssiaalista LSTM:ää lausemallinnukseen ilman ulkoisia resursseja, kuten syntaktista jäsennyspuuta ja muita sanastoominaisuuksia, kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn kolmella kahden tehtävän tietojoukolla.', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Nang pemilih iki, kita supoyo model kanggo meh nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasar seneng pisan winih sing nyong nggawe informasi interaksi. Align to: Kowe kudu emphasis mengko awak dhéwé ing watahan ning kapan kuwi wis dipulangan kelas nang sampek semantar, dadi awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem awak dhéwé lan alam sing beraksi kanggo kalkulanan luwih saben kelas. Display boxes', 'he': 'דוגמנית זוג גזרים היא בעיה קריטית בתחום עיבוד שפה טבעי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל כדי למדוד את הדמיון של זוג משפטים שמתמקד במידע האינטראקציה. אנו משתמשים במטריקס דמיון ברמה המילים כדי לגלות התאמה של שני משפטים. צריך להדגיש שכל מילה במשפט יש חשיבות שונה מהמבט של ריכוב סמנטי, כך שאנחנו מנצלים שני אסטרטגיות חדשות ויעילות כדי לחשב באופן ברור משקל לכל מילה. Although the proposed model only use a sequential LSTM for sentence modeling without any external resource such as syntactic parser tree and additional lexicon features, experimental results show that our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on three datasets of two tasks.', 'sk': 'Modeliranje stavkovnih parov je ključni problem na področju obdelave naravnega jezika. V prispevku predlagamo model za merjenje podobnosti stavkov, ki se osredotoča na informacije o interakciji. Za odkrivanje drobnozrnate poravnave dveh stavkov uporabljamo matriko podobnosti na ravni besed. Poudariti je treba, da ima vsaka beseda v stavku drugačen pomen z vidika semantične sestave, zato izkoristimo dve novi in učinkoviti strategiji za izrecno izračun teže za vsako besedo. Čeprav predlagani model uporablja samo zaporedni LSTM za modeliranje stavkov brez kakršnih koli zunanjih virov, kot so sintaktično razčlenjevalno drevo in dodatne leksikonske funkcije, eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš model dosega najsodobnejše delovanje pri treh naborih podatkov dveh nalog.', 'ha': "Mataimin zartar da sauri biyu ne mai muhimu a cikin shirin karkacin lugha na natura. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani misali da za'a iya ƙayyade misãlin maganar biyu duk biyu, sunã kallo a kan takardar aiki. Tuna amfani da maganar daraja kamar matriki da ke daidaita zuwa ka gano juyi mai kyau na sauri biyu. Ina kamata a zura ƙayyade cewa kõwane magana a cikin maganar, yana da muhimmi mai dabam daga kalma mai haɗi na semantiki, sabõda haka, za mu yi amfani da masu sauran biyu da kuma masu Effecti dõmin ya ƙayyade nau'i ga kowace magana. Ingawa da aka goyyade shi kawai, ya yi amfani da wani misalin LTRM wanda ke gabatar da shi don ya sami wani resource na ƙarƙashin, kamar itãci ya yi fasalin syntactic da wasu fassarar leksikon, ƙarami na nuna cewa misalinmu ya sami tsarin-da-sanar a sakan aiki uku.", 'bo': 'བྱ་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་ཆེན་དག་གི་ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྒྲིག་གི་གྲལ་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་ཚིག་ཚིག་ཚང་ནང་གི་ཚིག་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་semantic composition་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པར་གལ་ཆེན་གཅིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསར་གཏོད་དང་སྐྱོན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་стра Although the proposed model only use a sequential LSTM for sentence modeling without any external resource such as syntactic parser tree and additional lexicon features, experimental results show that our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on three datasets of two tasks.'}
{'en': 'A Short Survey on Taxonomy Learning from Text Corpora : Issues, Resources and Recent Advances', 'ar': 'مسح قصير حول تعلم التصنيف من Text Corpora: القضايا والموارد والتطورات الحديثة', 'fr': "Une brève enquête sur l'apprentissage de la taxonomie à partir de corpus textuels\xa0: questions, ressources et avancées récentes", 'pt': 'Uma Breve Pesquisa sobre Aprendizagem de Taxonomia com Corpora de Texto: Problemas, Recursos e Avanços Recentes', 'es': 'Una breve encuesta sobre el aprendizaje de taxonomías de los cuerpos de texto: problemas, recursos y avances recientes', 'zh': '从文本语料库中学分类学简短:资源最新进展', 'ru': 'Краткий опрос по изучению таксономии в текстовых корпусах: проблемы, ресурсы и последние достижения', 'ja': 'テキストコーラからの分類学学習に関する簡単な調査：課題、リソース、および最近の進歩', 'hi': 'टैक्सोनॉमी लर्निंग पर एक लघु सर्वेक्षण पाठ निगम से सीखना: मुद्दे, संसाधन और हाल ही में प्रगति', 'ga': 'Suirbhé gairid ar Thacsanomaíocht ag Foghlaim ó Chorpóra Téacs: Saincheisteanna, Acmhainní agus Dul chun Cinn le Déanaí', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კოპორადან კონტაქტის შესწავლების შესახებ: პრობლემები, რესურსი და ახალი ახალი ახალგაზრულებები', 'el': 'Μια σύντομη έρευνα για τη μάθηση της Ταξινομίας από το Σώμα Κειμένων: Θέματα, Πόροι και Πρόσφατες Προόδους', 'hu': 'Rövid felmérés a szövegkormából származó taxonómiai tanulásról: problémák, erőforrások és legutóbbi előrehaladások', 'it': "Una breve indagine sull'apprendimento tassonomico dal corpo testuale: problemi, risorse e progressi recenti", 'kk': 'Тексония оқытуы мәтін корпорасынан қысқа зерттеу: маңызды, ресурстар және жаңа алдындар', 'lt': 'Trumpa mokesčių mokymosi iš teksto korporacijos apžvalga: klausimai, ištekliai ir naujausi avansai', 'mk': 'Кратко истражување за таксономското учење од текст корпора: прашања, ресурси и неодамнешни напредоци', 'ms': 'Survey pendek tentang Belajar Taxonomi dari Korpora Teks: Persediaan, Sumber dan Kemajuan Baru-baru ini', 'ml': 'പദാവലി കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന ടാക്സോനോമിയില്\u200d ഒരു ചെറുതായ പരിശോധന: വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d, വിഭവങ്ങളും അടുത്തു', 'mt': 'Stħarriġ Qasir dwar it-Tagħlim tat-Tassonomija minn Text Corpora: Kwistjonijiet, Riżorsi u Avvanzi Reċenti', 'mn': 'Таксономийн суралцах хэмжээний богино судалгаа: асуудлууд, нөөц болон сүүлийн даалгавар', 'no': 'Ein kort undersøking om taksonomilæring frå tekstkorpora: Utgåver, ressursar og nyleg avansert', 'pl': 'Krótkie badanie dotyczące taksonomii uczenia się z korpusu tekstowego: zagadnienia, zasoby i ostatnie postępy', 'sr': 'Kratko istraživanje taksonomijskog učenja iz tekstske korpore: pitanja, resursi i nedavni avansi', 'ro': 'Un scurt studiu privind învățarea taxonomică din Corpora de text: probleme, resurse și progrese recente', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Short Survey on Taxonomy Learning from Text Corpora: Issues, Resources and Recent Advances', 'sv': 'En kort undersökning om taxonomi lärande från textkorpora: frågor, resurser och senaste framsteg', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ٹاکسونومی کی تعلیم کے بارے میں ایک کوتاہ تحقیق: اضافہ، سرمایہ اور اخیر اضافہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Short Survey on Taxonomy Learning from Văn bản Corpus: vấn, Resources and recent advance', 'bg': 'Кратко проучване на таксономията от текстови корпуси: проблеми, ресурси и скорошни напредъци', 'hr': 'Kratko ispitivanje o učenju taksonomije iz teksta korpore: pitanja, resursi i nedavni napredak', 'nl': 'Een korte enquête over taxonomie leren van tekstcorpora: kwesties, bronnen en recente vooruitgang', 'da': 'En kort undersøgelse af taxonomi læring fra tekstkorpora: problemer, ressourcer og seneste fremskridt', 'ko': '텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 분류법 배우기: 문제, 자원과 최신 진전', 'id': 'A Short Survey on Taxonomy Learning from Text Corpora: Issues, Resources and Recent Advances', 'de': 'Eine kurze Umfrage zum Taxonomie Lernen aus Textkorpora: Probleme, Ressourcen und jüngste Fortschritte', 'sw': 'Tafiti fupi kuhusu Ufunzi wa Taxonomy kutoka Kampuni ya Mataifa: Masuala, rasilimali na Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'یک تحقیق کوتاه در مورد یادگیری تاکسونوم از شرکت متن: مشکلات، منابع و پیشرفتهای اخیر', 'sq': 'Një sondazh i shkurtër mbi mësimin e taksonomisë nga Korpora Tekstike: Çështje, burime dhe përparime të fundit', 'tr': 'Mesele, Resuller we Ýakyndaky Ullanmalar', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ኮርፖራ ትምህርት በሚያስተምሩ ላይ የአጭር ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Տաքսոնամիայի ուսումնասիրության կարճ հետազոտություն տեքստի կորպորայից. հարցեր, ռեսուրսներ և վերջին առաջընթացներ', 'az': 'M톛tn korporas캼ndan 칬yr톛nm톛k haqq캼nda q캼sa bir m톛lumat: M톛lumat, Resull톛r v톛 Son Yax캼nl캼qlar', 'bn': 'টেক্সোনোমি কোর্পোরা থেকে শিক্ষা শিক্ষা নিয়ে একটি সংক্ষিপ্ত তদন্ত: বিষয়, সম্পদ এবং সম্প্রতি উন্নয়ন', 'ca': "Una Curta Encuesta sobre l'Aprendiment de la Taxonomia de la Corporació de Texto: Problemes, Recursos i Avances Recents", 'bs': 'Kratko istraživanje taksonomijskog učenja iz tekstske korpore: pitanja, resursi i nedavni napredak', 'cs': 'Krátký průzkum o učení taxonomie z textového korpusu: problémy, zdroje a nedávné pokroky', 'fi': 'Lyhyt tutkimus taksonomian oppimisesta teksticorporasta: kysymyksiä, resursseja ja viimeaikaisia edistysaskelia', 'et': 'Lühike uuring taksonoomia õppimise kohta tekstikorpusest: probleemid, ressursid ja hiljutised edusammud', 'jv': 'A shortResolution on TaXOmy Learning from Text Source: Subjects, Resolutions and recent Advance', 'sk': 'Kratka raziskava o učenju taksonomije iz besedilnih korpusov: vprašanja, viri in nedavni napredki', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'A Short Survey on Taxonomy Learning from Text Corpora: Issues, Resources and Recent Advances', 'bo': 'A Short Survey on Taxonomy Learning from Text Corpora: Issues, Resources and Recent Advances'}
{'en': 'A taxonomy is a semantic hierarchy, consisting of concepts linked by is-a relations. While a large number of taxonomies have been constructed from human-compiled resources (e.g., Wikipedia), learning taxonomies from text corpora has received a growing interest and is essential for long-tailed and domain-specific knowledge acquisition. In this paper, we overview recent advances on taxonomy construction from free texts, reorganizing relevant subtasks into a complete framework. We also overview resources for evaluation and discuss challenges for future research.', 'ar': 'التصنيف هو تسلسل هرمي دلالي ، يتكون من مفاهيم مرتبطة بعلاقات is-a. في حين تم إنشاء عدد كبير من التصنيفات من موارد قام بتجميعها الإنسان (على سبيل المثال ، ويكيبيديا) ، فقد حظيت تصنيفات التعلم من نصوص corpora باهتمام متزايد وهي ضرورية لاكتساب المعرفة طويلة الذيل والخاصة بالمجال. في هذه الورقة ، نلقي نظرة عامة على التطورات الحديثة في بناء التصنيف من النصوص الحرة ، وإعادة تنظيم المهام الفرعية ذات الصلة في إطار عمل كامل. نقوم أيضًا باستعراض موارد التقييم ومناقشة تحديات البحث المستقبلي.', 'es': 'Una taxonomía es una jerarquía semántica, que consiste en conceptos vinculados por relaciones is-a. Si bien se ha construido un gran número de taxonomías a partir de recursos compilados por humanos (por ejemplo, Wikipedia), el aprendizaje de taxonomías de los cuerpos de texto ha recibido un interés creciente y es esencial para la adquisición de conocimientos específicos de dominio y de cola larga. En este artículo, analizamos los avances recientes en la construcción de taxonomías a partir de textos libres, reorganizando las subtareas relevantes en un marco completo. También analizamos los recursos para la evaluación y discutimos los desafíos para la investigación futura.', 'pt': 'Uma taxonomia é uma hierarquia semântica, consistindo de conceitos ligados por relações é-um. Embora um grande número de taxonomias tenha sido construído a partir de recursos compilados por humanos (por exemplo, Wikipedia), o aprendizado de taxonomias de corpora de texto tem recebido um interesse crescente e é essencial para a aquisição de conhecimento de cauda longa e específico de domínio. Neste artigo, revisamos os avanços recentes na construção de taxonomia a partir de textos livres, reorganizando subtarefas relevantes em uma estrutura completa. Também analisamos recursos para avaliação e discutimos desafios para pesquisas futuras.', 'fr': "Une taxonomie est une hiérarchie sémantique constituée de concepts liés par des relations is-a. Alors qu'un grand nombre de taxonomies ont été construites à partir de ressources humaines (par exemple, Wikipédia), l'apprentissage des taxonomies à partir de corpus textuels suscite un intérêt croissant et est essentiel pour l'acquisition de connaissances à long terme et spécifiques à un domaine. Dans cet article, nous passons en revue les récentes avancées en matière de construction de taxonomie à partir de textes libres, en réorganisant les sous-tâches pertinentes en un cadre complet. Nous passons également en revue les ressources pour l'évaluation et discutons des défis pour la recherche", 'ja': 'タクソノミーは、is - a関係によってリンクされた概念からなる意味論的階層である。多数のタクソノミーが人間のコンパイルされたリソース（例えば、ウィキペディア）から構築されているが、テキストコーラからタクソノミーを学習することは、ますます関心を集めており、長いテールとドメイン固有の知識の獲得に不可欠である。本稿では、フリーテキストからの分類構築の最近の進歩を概観し、関連するサブタスクを完全なフレームワークに再編成する。また、評価のためのリソースの概要を説明し、今後の研究の課題について話し合います。', 'zh': '分类法者, 语义层次结构也, is-a 链接之名也。 虽自人伦所资(如维基百科)构大分类法,而从文本语料库学分类法日益关注,而于长尾、特定领域之知为重。 本文之中,概述自由之最新进展,更结于一框架之中。 又概述估资源,并论未来挑战。', 'hi': 'एक वर्गीकरण एक शब्दार्थ पदानुक्रम है, जिसमें एक संबंध से जुड़ी अवधारणाएं शामिल हैं। जबकि मानव-संकलित संसाधनों (उदाहरण के लिए, विकिपीडिया) से बड़ी संख्या में वर्गीकरण का निर्माण किया गया है, पाठ निगम से वर्गीकरण सीखने में बढ़ती रुचि प्राप्त हुई है और लंबी पूंछ वाले और डोमेन-विशिष्ट ज्ञान अधिग्रहण के लिए आवश्यक है। इस पेपर में, हम मुक्त ग्रंथों से वर्गीकरण निर्माण पर हाल ही में प्रगति का अवलोकन करते हैं, प्रासंगिक उप-कार्यों को एक पूर्ण ढांचे में पुनर्गठित करते हैं। हम मूल्यांकन के लिए संसाधनों का अवलोकन भी करते हैं और भविष्य के शोध के लिए चुनौतियों पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Таксономия - это семантическая иерархия, состоящая из понятий, связанных отношениями is-a. В то время как большое количество таксономий было построено из человеческих ресурсов (например, Википедии), изучение таксономий из текстовых корпусов вызывает все больший интерес и имеет важное значение для накопления знаний с длинным сроком действия и специфических для конкретной области. В этой статье мы рассмотрим последние достижения в построении таксономии из свободных текстов, реорганизуя соответствующие подзадачи в полную структуру. Мы также проводим обзор ресурсов для оценки и обсуждаем проблемы для будущих исследований.', 'ga': 'Is ordlathas shéimeantach é tacsanomaíocht, comhdhéanta de choincheapa atá nasctha le caidreamh is-a. Cé gur tógadh líon mór tacsanomaíochtaí as acmhainní arna dtiomsú ag an duine (m.sh., Vicipéid), tá suim mhéadaitheach ag baint le foghlaim tacsanomaíochtaí ó chorpora téacs agus tá sé ríthábhachtach chun eolas a fháil ar earr fhada agus a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid forbhreathnú ar dhul chun cinn le déanaí maidir le tógáil tacsanomaíochta ó shaorthéacsanna, ag atheagrú na bhfothascanna ábhartha go creat iomlán. Déanaimid forbhreathnú freisin ar acmhainní le haghaidh meastóireachta agus pléimid dúshláin le haghaidh taighde amach anseo.', 'el': 'Μια ταξινομία είναι μια σημασιολογική ιεραρχία, που αποτελείται από έννοιες που συνδέονται με σχέσεις είναι-α. Ενώ ένας μεγάλος αριθμός ταξινομιών έχει κατασκευαστεί από ανθρώπινους πόρους (π.χ. Βικιπαίδεια), η εκμάθηση ταξινομιών από σώματα κειμένου έχει λάβει αυξανόμενο ενδιαφέρον και είναι απαραίτητη για τη μακρόχρονη και εξειδικευμένη απόκτηση γνώσεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε τις πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην κατασκευή της ταξινομίας από ελεύθερα κείμενα, αναδιοργανώνοντας τις σχετικές δευτερεύουσες εργασίες σε ένα πλήρες πλαίσιο. Επίσης, εξετάζουμε τους πόρους για αξιολόγηση και συζητάμε τις προκλήσεις για τη μελλοντική έρευνα.', 'ka': 'რაკონომია არის სემონტიკი იერაქტია, რომელიც კონფექტებით დაკავშირებულია, არის შესახებ. თუმცა ადამიანის კომპიოლირებისგან დიდი რაქტონომიები შექმნა (მაგალითად ვიკიპედია), ტექსტის კომპორადან რაქტონომიების შესწავლობა მიიღეთ უფრო მეტი ინტერესტი და იყო მნიშვნელოვანი ძალ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ახლა ახალგაზრდება ტაკონომიის კონფიგურაციაზე თავისუფალი ტექსტიდან, შესაბამისი სტაკონტურების რეორგიზაციას ყველა ფრამეტ ჩვენ ასევე გავამუშავოთ რესურსები განსაზღვრებისთვის და განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის.', 'hu': 'A taxonómia egy szemantikai hierarchia, amely az is-a kapcsolatok által összekapcsolt fogalmakból áll. Míg számos taxonómiát építettek fel ember által összeállított erőforrásokból (például a Wikipédia), a taxonómiák tanulása a szöveges korpuszokból egyre nagyobb érdeklődést kapott, és elengedhetetlen a hosszú farkú és tartományspecifikus tudásszerzéshez. Ebben a tanulmányban áttekintjük a taxonómiai konstrukció legutóbbi előrehaladásait szabad szövegekből, a releváns részfeladatok teljes keretrendszerbe történő átszervezésével. Áttekintjük az értékeléshez szükséges forrásokat és megvitatjuk a jövőbeli kutatások kihívásait.', 'it': "Una tassonomia è una gerarchia semantica, costituita da concetti collegati da relazioni is-a. Mentre un gran numero di tassonomie sono state costruite con risorse compilate dall'uomo (ad esempio Wikipedia), l'apprendimento delle tassonomie da corpora di testo ha ricevuto un interesse crescente ed è essenziale per l'acquisizione di conoscenze a coda lunga e specifica del dominio. In questo articolo, analizziamo i recenti progressi sulla costruzione tassonomica da testi liberi, riorganizzando le sottoattività pertinenti in un quadro completo. Analizziamo anche le risorse per la valutazione e discutiamo le sfide per la ricerca futura.", 'kk': 'Таксономия - семантикалық иерархия. Бұл қатынастармен байланысты концепциялардан тұрады. Адамды компиляцияланған ресурстар (мысалы Википедия) деген көп таксономиялар құрылған болса да, мәтін корпорасынан таксономияларды үйрену көптеген көптеген затты көптеген және ұзындық және доменге арнаулы білім алу ү Бұл қағазда, таксономиялық құрылғылар бос мәтіндерден жаңа жағдайларды қарастырып, мәліметтерді толық бағдарламаға қайта орындау. Біз сондай-ақ оқу және болашақ зерттеулер үшін мәселелерді талқылаймыз.', 'lt': 'Taksonomija yra semantinė hierarchija, kurią sudaro sąvokos, susijusios su santykiais. Nors daug taksonomijų buvo sukurta iš žmogiškųjų išteklių (pvz., Wikipedia), mokytis taksonomijų iš teksto korporas gavo vis didesnį susidomėjimą ir yra labai svarbus ilgalaikiam ir konkrečiai srities žinių įgijimui. Šiame dokumente apžvelgiame pastaruoju metu padarytą pažangą taksonomijos statybos srityje iš nemokamų tekstų, reorganizuojant atitinkamas paklausas į išsamią sistemą. Taip pat apžvelgiame vertinimo išteklius ir aptariame būsimų mokslinių tyrimų uždavinius.', 'ms': 'Taksonomi adalah hierarki semantik, yang terdiri dari konsep yang terhubung oleh is-a hubungan. Walaupun sejumlah besar taksonomi telah dibina dari sumber yang dikumpil oleh manusia (contohnya Wikipedia), belajar taksonomi dari korpora teks telah menerima kepentingan yang semakin meningkat dan penting untuk peningkatan pengetahuan yang berkaitan dengan ekor panjang dan domain-spesifik. Dalam kertas ini, kita melihatkan kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pembangunan taksonomi dari teks bebas, mengatur semula subtasks berkaitan ke dalam kerangka lengkap. Kami juga memandang sumber untuk penilaian dan membincangkan cabaran untuk kajian masa depan.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ടാക്സോനോമി ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിയാണ്, ഒരു ബന്ധമാണ് ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നത്. മനുഷ്യന്\u200d സമ്പാദിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരുപാട് ടാക്സോണികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, ടെക്സ്കോപ്പോരിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന ടാക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വതന്ത്ര രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ടാക്സോനോമി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d നോക്കുന്നു, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാവിയുടെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാനും വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാനും വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മ', 'mk': 'Таксономијата е семантичка хиерархија, која се состои од концепти поврзани со е-е односи. И покрај тоа што голем број таксономии се изградени од човечки ресурси (на пример Википедија), учењето таксономии од текст корпора доби растечки интерес и е суштинско за набавување на знаење со долг опах и специфично домен. Во овој весник, ги прегледуваме неодамнешните напредоци во изградбата на таксономијата од бесплатни тексти, реорганизирајќи ги релевантните потпрашања во целосна рамка. Исто така, ги прегледуваме ресурсите за проценка и разговараме за предизвиците за идното истражување.', 'mt': 'A taxonomy is a semantic hierarchy, consisting of concepts linked by is-a relations.  Filwaqt li numru kbir ta’ tassonomiji ġew mibnija minn riżorsi miġbura mill-bniedem (pereżempju Wikipedia), it-tagħlim tat-tassonomiji minn text corpora rċieva interess dejjem jikber u huwa essenzjali g ħall-akkwist ta’ għarfien b’denb twil u speċifiku għad-dominju. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nħarsu lejn l-avvanzi reċenti dwar il-kostruzzjoni tat-tassonomija minn testi ħielsa, li jorganizzaw is-sottomistoqsijiet rilevanti f’qafas komplut. Aħna nħarsu wkoll lejn ir-riżorsi għall-evalwazzjoni u niddiskutu sfidi għar-riċerka futura.', 'mn': 'Таксономик нь семантик дүгнэлт, харилцааны холбоотой ойлголттой байдаг. Хүн төрөлхтний бүтээгдэхүүнээс маш олон татварын эдийн засаг (жишээлбэл Википедиа) бүтээсэн ч мөн Текст Корпоратын татварын эдийн засаг суралцах нь урт хугацааны сонирхолтой болсон ба урт хугацааны болон тодорхой мэдлэгтэй худалдан Энэ цаасан дээр бид үнэгүй текстүүдийн таксономийн барилгын саяхан хөгжлийг харж, холбоотой суурь зүйлсийг бүрэн хэмжээнд нь дахин зохион байгуулж байна. Бид мөн ирээдүйн судалгааны сорилтуудыг үнэлэх болон талаар ярилцах боломжтой баялаг үзүүлсэн.', 'pl': 'Taksonomia to hierarchia semantyczna, składająca się z pojęć połączonych relacjami jest-a. Podczas gdy duża liczba taksonomii została skonstruowana z zasobów skompilowanych przez ludzi (np. Wikipedia), nauka taksonomii z korpusów tekstowych cieszy się coraz większym zainteresowaniem i jest niezbędna dla długotrwałego i specyficznego zdobywania wiedzy. W niniejszym artykule przeglądamy ostatnie postępy w budowie taksonomii z wolnych tekstów, reorganizując istotne podzadania w kompletne ramy. Przeglądamy również zasoby do oceny i omawiamy wyzwania dla przyszłych badań.', 'no': 'Ein taksonomie er ein semantisk hierarki, som inneheld av konseptar som er lenke av er ein relasjon. Selv om mange taksonomiar er konstruert frå menneskelige ressursar (f.eks. Wikipedia), læring av taksonomiar frå tekstkorpora har fått ein økende interesse og er viktig for langtidig og domenespesifikke kunnskap. I denne papiret ser vi over nyleg avansert for taxonomiske konstruksjon frå fri tekstar, og organiserer relevante underoppgaver i eit komplett rammeverk. Vi oversjår også ressursar for evaluering og diskuterer utfordringar for framtidige forskning.', 'ro': 'O taxonomie este o ierarhie semantică, constând din concepte legate de relații este-a. În timp ce un număr mare de taxonomii au fost construite din resurse compilate de om (de exemplu, Wikipedia), învățarea taxonomiilor de la corpuri text a primit un interes tot mai mare și este esențială pentru achiziționarea de cunoștințe cu coadă lungă și specifică domeniului. În această lucrare, prezentăm progresele recente privind construcția taxonomică din texte libere, reorganizând subactivitățile relevante într-un cadru complet. De asemenea, prezentăm o prezentare generală a resurselor pentru evaluare și discutăm provocările pentru cercetarea viitoare.', 'sr': 'Taksonomija je semantička hijerarhija, koja se sastoji od koncepta povezanih sa odnosima. Iako je veći broj taksonomija izgrađen iz ljudskih resursa (npr. Wikipedia), naučenje taksonomija tekstnog korporacije dobilo je rastući interes i važno je za dugoropratnu i specifičnu domenu prikupljanje znanja. U ovom papiru, pregledali smo nedavne napredke o izgradnji taksonomije iz besplatnih tekstova, reorganizirali relevantne podatake u potpuni okvir. Takođe pregledamo resurse za procjenu i razgovaramo o izazovima za buduće istraživanje.', 'si': 'ටැක්සිනෝමියා තමයි සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂයෙක්, සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා. මිනිස්සු සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම මේ පත්තරේ අපි අලුත් ප්\u200dරධානයක් බලන්නේ නිදහස් පත්තර නිර්මාණය ගැන, සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරධානයක් වලට සම්පූර්ණ අපි අනාගත විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ අභ්\u200dයාගත විශ්වාස සඳහා අභ්\u200dයාගත විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'so': 'Taxamadu waa hierarkii semantik, kaas oo ka mid ah fikrada ay isku xiran yihiin xiriir. Inta lagu sameynayo macluumaadyo badan oo la soo qoray dadka (tusaale ahaan Wikipedia), waxbarashada canshuuraha waxaa laga helay kordhinta kordhinta iyo waxaa muhiim ah in la helo aqoonta gaarka ah oo gudaha. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka fiirinaynaa horumarinta ugu dambeysa ee dhismaha canshuuraha laga sameeyo qoraal xor ah oo lacag la’aan ah, si aan u cusboonayno qasnadaha la xidhiidha oo dhan. Sidoo kale waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa hantida qiimeynta iyo baaritaanka cilmiga mustaqbalka ah.', 'sv': 'En taxonomi är en semantisk hierarki, bestående av begrepp kopplade av is-a relationer. Medan ett stort antal taxonomier har konstruerats från mänskliga resurser (t.ex. Wikipedia), har lärandet av taxonomier från textkorpor fått ett växande intresse och är avgörande för långsvansad och domänspecifik kunskapsinhämtning. I denna uppsats sammanfattar vi de senaste framstegen inom taxonomisk konstruktion från fria texter och omorganiserar relevanta underuppgifter till ett komplett ramverk. Vi överblickar också resurser för utvärdering och diskuterar utmaningar för framtida forskning.', 'ta': 'A taxonomy is a semantic hierarchy, consisting of concepts linked to by a relationship. மனித த தொகுக்கப்பட்ட வளங்களிலிருந்து பெரிய வர்க்ஸோனிகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன (உதாரணமாக விகிபிடியா), உரை நிறுவனத்திலிருந்து வரிசைகள் கற்றுக்கொள்ள வரிசையில் உள இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சமீபத்திய முன்னேற்றங்களை பார்க்க வேண்டும் இலவச உரைகளிலிருந்து உருவாக்கத்தில், தொடர்புள்ள உப பண நாம் எதிர்காலத்தின் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கான சவால்பங்களை பார்க்க முடியும்.', 'ur': 'ایک تاکسونومیٹی ایک سیمانٹی حکومت ہے جس میں ایک رابطہ ہے۔ اگرچہ بہت سی تاکسونومیوں کو انسان کے ساتھ کامپیل کیا گیا ہے (جیسے ویکیپیڈیا) کے ذریعہ سے بنایا گیا ہے، تاکسونومیوں کی تعلیم متکس کورپورا سے ایک بڑی سود حاصل کی گئی ہے اور اس کے لئے طویل اندازہ اور ڈمین کے خاص علم حاصل کرنے کے لئے ضرورت ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے تاکسونومیی بنانے کے لئے اچھی پیشرفت کو بے نیاز ٹکسٹس سے دیکھا ہے، ایک کامل فرم میں معاملہ دار سپٹس کو دوبارہ تغییر بنایا ہے. ہم نے بھی مطالعہ کے لئے منبع اور مستقبل تحقیقات کے لئے چالوں کی بحث کی۔', 'uz': "Taksonom - semantik hierarchi, bir g'oyalar bilan bog'langan fikrlar. Ko'pchilik taxonomlar inson kompyuterga (m.g. Wikipedia) yaratilayotganda, matn kompaniyasidan taxonomlarni o'rganish qismini ko'payadi va uzoq va domen-muhim maʼlumot olish uchun muhim. Bu qogʻozda, biz eng yaqinda taxonom qurilashning eng yaxshi darajalarini boshqaramiz, bilan boshqa textlarni o'zgartirish, muhim vazifalarni butun freymga qaytadi. Biz kelajak tafoviy qidirish uchun qidirish va murakkablarini ko'rib chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Mỗi loại một phân loại là một phân cấp ngữ pháp, gồm các khái niệm được liên kết bởi quan là-a. Trong khi một số lượng lớn các loại taxonomies đã được xây dựng từ các nguồn tài nguyên tập hợp bằng người (v.d., Wikipedia), việc học toán từ cơ bản đã nhận được một sự chú ý ngày càng lớn và là điều cần thiết cho việc kiếm hiểu biết lâu dài và miền-đặc biệt. Trong tờ báo này, chúng tôi tổng hợp những tiến bộ gần đây về việc sửa thuế từ các văn bản miễn phí, sắp xếp lại các quy tắc liên quan. Chúng tôi cũng tổng hợp các nguồn lực để đánh giá và thảo luận các thử thách cho nghiên cứu tương lai.', 'bg': 'Таксономията е семантична йерархия, състояща се от понятия, свързани с е-а отношения. Въпреки че голям брой таксономии са изградени от човешки ресурси (например Уикипедия), изучаването на таксономии от текстови корпуси е получило нарастващ интерес и е от съществено значение за придобиването на знания с дългоопашата и специфична област. В настоящата статия разглеждаме последните постижения в таксономичното строителство от свободни текстове, реорганизирайки съответните подзадачи в цялостна рамка. Също така преглеждаме ресурсите за оценка и обсъждаме предизвикателствата за бъдещи изследвания.', 'hr': 'Taksonomija je semantička hijerarhija, koja se sastoji od koncepta povezanih s odnosima. Iako je veliki broj taksonomija izgrađen iz ljudskih resursa (npr. Wikipedia), učenje taksonomija iz tekstnog korporacije dobilo je rastući interes i ključno je za dugoropratnu i specifičnu domenu prikupljanje znanja. U ovom papiru predviđamo nedavni napredak na izgradnji taksonomije iz slobodnih tekstova, reorganizirajući relevantne podatake u potpuni okvir. Također pregledamo resurse za procjenu i razgovaramo o izazovima za buduće istraživanje.', 'da': 'En taksonomi er et semantisk hierarki, der består af begreber forbundet med is-a relationer. Mens et stort antal taksonomier er konstrueret ud fra menneskelige kompilerede ressourcer (f.eks. Wikipedia), har læring af taksonomier fra tekstkorpora fået en stigende interesse og er afgørende for langhalet og domænespecifik viden erhvervelse. I denne artikel overblikker vi de seneste fremskridt inden for taksonomikonstruktion fra frie tekster og omorganiserer relevante underopgaver i en komplet ramme. Vi overblikker også ressourcer til evaluering og diskuterer udfordringer for fremtidig forskning.', 'nl': 'Een taxonomie is een semantische hiërarchie, bestaande uit concepten die verbonden zijn door is-a relaties. Hoewel een groot aantal taxonomieën is opgebouwd uit menselijke bronnen (bijvoorbeeld Wikipedia), heeft het leren van taxonomieën uit tekstcorpora een groeiende belangstelling gekregen en is essentieel voor langlopende en domeinspecifieke kennisverwerving. In dit artikel geven we een overzicht van recente vooruitgang op het gebied van taxonomieconstructie vanuit vrije teksten, waarbij relevante subtaken worden reorganiseerd tot een compleet raamwerk. We bekijken ook bronnen voor evaluatie en bespreken uitdagingen voor toekomstig onderzoek.', 'de': 'Eine Taxonomie ist eine semantische Hierarchie, die aus Konzepten besteht, die durch Ist-A-Beziehungen miteinander verknüpft sind. Während eine große Anzahl von Taxonomien aus human kompilierten Ressourcen (z.B. Wikipedia) konstruiert wurde, stieß das Lernen von Taxonomien aus Textkorpora auf ein wachsendes Interesse und ist für den langfristigen und domänenspezifischen Wissenserwerb unerlässlich. In diesem Beitrag geben wir einen Überblick über aktuelle Fortschritte bei der Taxonomie-Konstruktion aus freien Texten und ordnen relevante Teilaufgaben in ein vollständiges Framework um. Darüber hinaus geben wir einen Überblick über Ressourcen zur Evaluation und diskutieren Herausforderungen für die zukünftige Forschung.', 'ko': '분류법은 의미의 차원 구조로 is-A 관계가 연결된 개념으로 구성된다.대량의 분류법은 인류가 번역한 자원(예를 들어 위키백과)에서 구축되었지만 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 분류법을 배우는 것은 점점 더 많은 관심을 받고 있으며 긴 꼬리와 특정 분야의 지식을 얻는 데 매우 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 자유 텍스트에서 분류법을 구축하는 최신 진전을 개괄하고 관련 하위 임무를 완전한 틀로 재구성했다.또한 평가에 사용되는 리소스를 개괄적으로 설명하고 향후 연구에 대한 당면 과제를 논의했습니다.', 'fa': 'یک تاکسونومی یک دایرهٔ طبیعی است که از نظریه\u200cهای ارتباط با یک رابطه است. در حالی که تعداد زیادی از مالیاتی از منابع ساخته شده\u200cاند (مثال ویکیپدیا) که از شرکت متن آموزش مالیاتی را دریافت کرده\u200cاند، سود افزایش را دریافت کرده\u200cاند و برای دریافت دانش\u200cهای طولانی و ویکیپدیا مهم است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشرفت های اخیر در ساختن تاکسونومی از متن های آزاد را نگاه می کنیم، با تغییر ساختن زیر کاغذهای مربوط به یک چهارچوب کامل تغییر می دهیم. ما همچنین منابع برای ارزیابی و درباره چالش های تحقیقات آینده را در نظر می گیریم.', 'tr': 'Taksonomiýa semantik hijerarhiýatdyr, bir baglaşyk bilen baglanýan düşünjeler. Adamlar bilen birleştirilen resurslardan köp taksat onomi (meselâ, Wikipedia) inşa edildi. Metin korporatyndan taksat sistemalary öwrenmek üçin uly bir gyzyklandyrylýar we uzaklaşdyrylýan we domena takyk bilim almak üçin örän möhüm. Bu kagyzda, soňky taksowomiýanyň inşawlarynyň boş tekstlerden öňki gelişmelerini we möhüm çözümleri tamamlama çerýäge düzenleýäris. Ýüze deňleşmek üçin çeşmeleri we gelejek ylmy üçin kynçylyklary taryşdyrýarys.', 'af': "'n Taksonomie is 'n semantiese hierarkie, wat bestaan van konsepte wat deur 'n verhouding verbind is. Alhoewel 'n groot aantal taksonomies is gebou van menslike gemaakte hulpbronne (bv. Wikipedia), leer taksonomies van teks korpora het 'n groei belang ontvang en is nuutsaaklik vir lank-sterkte en domein-spesifieke kennis ontvang. In hierdie papier, ons oorskou onlangse vorderings op taksonomie konstruksie van vry teks, om relevante subtaske te reorganiseer in 'n volledige raamwerk. Ons oorskou ook hulpbronne vir evaluering en bespreek uitdagings vir toekomstige ondersoek.", 'id': 'Taksonomi adalah hierarki semantis, terdiri dari konsep yang terhubung oleh adalah-hubungan. Sementara jumlah besar taksonomi telah dibangun dari sumber daya yang dikompilasi oleh manusia (misalnya Wikipedia), belajar taksonomi dari korpora teks telah menerima kepentingan yang meningkat dan penting untuk memperoleh pengetahuan spesifik dari ekor panjang dan domain. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperlihatkan kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pembangunan taksonomi dari teks gratis, mengatur ulang subtasks relevan menjadi rangka lengkap. Kami juga memperlihatkan sumber daya untuk evaluasi dan mendiskusikan tantangan untuk penelitian masa depan.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa taxonoma ni utawala wa sekunde, ukijumuisha mawazo yanayounganishwa na mahusiano. Wakati idadi kubwa ya koxonomi imejengwa kutoka rasilimali zilizokusanyika kwa binadamu (kwa mfano Wikipedia), kujifunza kosonomi kutoka kampuni ya maandishi imepata maslahi yanayoendelea na ni muhimu kwa kupata maarifa maalum ya ndani. Katika karatasi hii, tunaangalia maendeleo ya hivi karibuni kuhusu ujenzi wa taxonomy kutoka kwenye ujumbe huru wa maandishi, kurekebisha juhudi zinazohusiana katika mfumo kamili. Pia tunafuatilia rasilimali za kutathmini na kujadili changamoto za utafiti wa baadaye.', 'sq': 'Një taksonomi është një hierarki semantike, e përbërë nga koncepte të lidhura nga një marrëdhënie. Ndërsa një numër i madh taksonomish janë ndërtuar nga burimet e kompiliuara nga njerëzit (për shembull Wikipedia), mësimi taksonomish nga korpora teksti ka marrë një interes në rritje dhe është thelbësor për fitimin e njohurive të gjata dhe specifike në domeni. Në këtë letër, ne shohim përparimet e fundit në ndërtimin e taksonomisë nga tekstet e lira, duke riorganizuar nëndetyrat e duhura në një kuadër të plotë. Ne gjithashtu shqyrtojmë burimet për vlerësimin dhe diskutojmë sfidat për kërkimet e ardhshme.', 'am': 'ብሔርኮኖም የsemantic hierarchy ነው፡፡ ብዙዎች የካክስኖም ብዛት ከሰው ሰብስብ ሀብት (ምሳሌ Wikipedia) የተመሠረቱ፣ የጽሑፍ ኮፖርት መማር ጥቅምናን እየጨመረ ውቀትን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቀድሞው የስኮኖሚ ግንኙነት ከነፃ ጽሑፎች እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ለኋለኛይቱ ትምህርት ግንኙነቶችን ለማስተዋል እናዋርዳለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Տաքսոնոմիան սեմանտիկ հիերարխիա է, որը կազմված է կապերի միջոցով կապված գաղափարներից: Մինչդեռ շատ տաքսոնոմիաներ կառուցվել են մարդկային կառուցվածքով կազմված ռեսուրսներից (օրինակ Վիքիփեդիայից), տեքստի կառուցվածքից սովորելը տաքսոնոմիաներ աճող հետաքրքրություն է ստացել և կարևոր է երկար պոչյունից և բնագավառի մասնավոր Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նայում ենք տաքսոնոմիայի կառուցվածքի վերջին զարգացումներին անվճար տեքստներից, վերադասավորելով հարմար ենթախնդիրները ամբողջական շրջանակի: Մենք նաև գերակշռում ենք գնահատման ռեսուրսները և քննարկում ենք ապագա հետազոտությունների մարտահրավերները:', 'az': 'Taksonomiya semantik hierarhiyadır, bir əlaqədar ilə bağlı fikirlərdən olub. İnsanların birləşdirilmiş kaynaqlarından bir çox taksionomiya inşa edilməsi üçün, məktəb korporasından taxonomiya öyrənməsi artırmaq üçün çox mövcuddur və uzun sürəkli və domain-specific bilgi alması üçün mövcuddur. Bu kağızda, müəyyən mətnlərdən taxonomiya inşaatı barəsindəki yeni öyüd-nəsihətləri təmin edirik, müəyyən bir qurğuya düzəldirik. Biz də müəyyən etmək və gələcək araştırmalar üçün çətinliklərə mübahisə edirik.', 'bn': 'একটি ট্যাক্সোনোমি হচ্ছে সেমেন্টিক হিয়ারার্কি, যার মধ্যে এক সম্পর্কের সাথে যুক্ত ধারণা রয়েছে। যদিও মানুষের সংগ্রহ সম্পদ (যেমন উইকিপিডিয়া) থেকে বেশ কিছু ট্যাক্সোনোমি নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে, টেক্সোনোমির শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধির আগ্রহ পেয়েছে এবং দীর্ঘমেয়াদ এবং দেশের In this paper, we overview recent advances on taxonomy construction from free texts, reorganizing relevant subtasks into a complete framework.  আমরা ভবিষ্যত গবেষণার জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জের মূল্য এবং আলোচনার জন্য সম্পদ পর্যবেক্ষণ করি।', 'bs': 'Taksonomija je semantička hijerarhija, koja se sastoji od koncepta povezanih s odnosima. Iako je veći broj taksonomija izgrađen iz ljudskih resursa (npr. Wikipedia), učenje taksonomija iz tekstnog korporacije dobilo je rastući interes i važno je za dugoropratnu i posebnu prikupnju znanja. U ovom papiru pregledamo nedavne napredke o izgradnji taksonomije iz besplatnih tekstova, reorganizirajući relevantne podatke u potpuni okvir. Također pregledamo resurse za procjenu i razgovaramo o izazovima za buduće istraživanje.', 'ca': "Una taxonomia és una jerarquia semàntica, composta de conceptes vinculats per una relació. Mentre que un gran nombre de taxonomies han estat construïdes a partir de recursos humans compilads (per exemple Wikipedia), l'aprenentatge de taxonomies a partir de text corpora ha rebut un interès creixent i és essencial per adquirir coneixements de llarga cola i de domini específic. En aquest article, veiem els avanços recents en la construcció de la taxonomia a partir de textos lliures, reorganitzant les subtaskes pertinents en un marc complet. We also overview resources for evaluation and discuss challenges for future research.", 'cs': 'Taxonomie je sémantická hierarchie, sestávající z pojmů propojených vztahy je-a. Zatímco velké množství taxonomií bylo vytvořeno z lidských zdrojů (např. Wikipedie), učení se taxonomií z textových korpusů získalo rostoucí zájem a je nezbytné pro dlouhodobé a doménově specifické získávání znalostí. V tomto článku představujeme přehled nedávných pokroků ve stavbě taxonomie z volných textů a reorganizujeme relevantní dílčí úkoly do kompletního rámce. Dále přehled zdrojů pro hodnocení a diskutujeme o výzvách pro budoucí výzkum.', 'fi': 'Taksonomia on semanttinen hierarkia, joka koostuu käsitteistä, jotka liittyvät is-a-suhteisiin. Vaikka suuri määrä taksonomiaa on rakennettu inhimillisistä resursseista (esim. Wikipediasta), taksonomian oppiminen tekstikorpusista on herättänyt kasvavaa kiinnostusta ja se on olennaisen tärkeää pitkähäntäiselle ja toimialoittakohtaiselle tiedonhankinnalle. Tässä artikkelissa tarkastelemme taksonomian rakentamisen viimeaikaisia edistysaskelia vapaista teksteistä ja järjestelemme asiaankuuluvat alitehtävät täydelliseksi viitekehykseksi. Lisäksi tarkastelemme arviointiresursseja ja keskustelemme tulevaisuuden tutkimuksen haasteista.', 'et': 'Taksonoomia on semantiline hierarhia, mis koosneb mõistetest, mis on seotud on-a suhtega. Kuigi suur hulk taksonoomiaid on ehitatud inimressurssidest (nt Vikipeedia), on taksonoomiate õppimine tekstikorpustest kasvanud huvi ning see on oluline pikasabalise ja valdkonnaspetsiifilise teadmiste omandamiseks. Käesolevas töös anname ülevaate hiljutistest edusammudest taksonoomika ehitamisel vabadest tekstidest, reorganiseerides asjakohased alamülesanded terviklikuks raamistikuks. Samuti anname ülevaate hindamise ressurssidest ja arutame tulevaste teadusuuringute väljakutseid.', 'jv': 'Daftar perangkat sabên kelas semanti, sing isih perusahaan seneng pisan kelas liyane karo perusahaan-perusahaan. Hèwèké kabèh akeh pisan n winih hayo nggawe dengané sampeyan liyané karo ingkang sampeyan winih (SMS). Nang pemilih iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nggawe kotak tentang karo perusahaan, lan nguasakno mulasakno sing wis ana luwih apik lan tambah. Awak dhéwé éntuk nglebok perusahaan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo urèhku kanggo urèhku kanggo ingkang sampek.', 'ha': "Taksomi ne a semantic hierrchy, mai ƙunsa da zato masu haɗi da shi na-a. A lokacin da aka gina masu yawa na taxomi daga manyan kayan samãri (misali Wikimedia), an karɓi taxomi daga makampuni na ma'anar marubuci na ƙara, kuma yana da muhimu wa intake na daban-daban da aka ƙayyade na ilmi. In a cikin wannan takarda, Munã sami mafariko na farko a kan yin mazaɓa na taxnomi daga matsayin da ba'a koma ba, yana mai ƙididdigewa masu husũma zuwa cikakken firam. Kayya, Munã sarrafa manyan dũkiyõyi dõmin an evaluate kuma mu yi jayayya masu kansalari ga littafan nan gaba ɗaya.", 'sk': 'Taksonomija je semantična hierarhija, ki jo sestavljajo koncepti, povezani z relacijami is-a. Medtem ko je bilo veliko število taksonomij zgrajeno iz človeških virov (npr. Wikipedija), učenje taksonomij iz besedilnih korpusov postaja vedno bolj zanimivo in je bistvenega pomena za pridobivanje dolgorepnega in domenskega znanja. V prispevku pregledamo nedavne napredeke pri gradnji taksonomije iz prostih besedil in reorganiziramo relevantne podnaloge v celoten okvir. Pregledujemo tudi vire za ocenjevanje in razpravljamo o izzivih za prihodnje raziskave.', 'he': 'טקסנומיה היא הייררכיה סמנטית, שמתכתבת במחשבות שקשורות ע"י יחסים. בעוד מספר גדול של טקסנומיות נבנו משאבים מסופים אנושיים (למשל ויקיפדיה), למידת טקסנומיות מקופורה טקסט קיבלה עניין גדול והוא חיוני להשיג ידע מסוים לתחום. בעיתון הזה, אנו מסתכלים על התקדמות האחרונות בניית מונית מסמכים חינם, מאורגנים מחדש את השאלות הרלוונטיות למסגרת מלאה. We also overview resources for evaluation and discuss challenges for future research.', 'bo': 'དུ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཅིག་ནི་semantic hierarchy་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། While a lot of taxonomies are constructed from human-compiled resources (e.g. Wikipedia), learning taxonomies from text corporation has received a growing interest and is essential for long-tailed and domain-specific knowledge acquisition. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་དབང་ཡི་གེའི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་མང་ཙམ་སྐྱེད་པའི་མཐོ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་པར་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀློག་པར་དང་གདོང་ལེན་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་ཆ་ཡང་བསྟུན་ནས།'}
{'en': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'ar': 'دلالات موزعة تركيبية مدركة للغة الاصطلاحية', 'es': 'Semántica distribuida composicional consciente de la expresión idiomática', 'pt': 'Semântica distribuída composicional com reconhecimento de idioma', 'fr': 'Sémantique distribuée compositionnelle consciente des idiomes', 'ja': '成語意識構成分散セマンティクス', 'ru': 'Композиционная распределенная семантика, основанная на идиоме', 'zh': '成语感知合分布式语义', 'hi': 'मुहावरा-जागरूक Compositional वितरित शब्दार्थ', 'ga': 'Séimeantaic Dáilte Comhdhéanta Idiom-Aware', 'ka': 'Idiom- Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'hu': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Elosztott Szemantika', 'el': 'Συνειδητοποιημένη συνθηματική κατανεμημένη σημασιολογία', 'it': 'Semantici compositivi distribuiti Idiom-Aware', 'kk': 'Idiom- Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'lt': '„Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics“', 'mk': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'ml': 'ഐഡിയോ- അറിയുന്ന കോമ്പോണ്\u200dടിഷന്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്ത സെമാന്റിക്സുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Semanti Distribwiti Kompożittivi Konxji mill-Idjom', 'ms': 'Comment', 'no': 'Idiom-Aware-Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'pl': 'Idiom-świadoma kompozycyjna rozproszona semantyka', 'ro': 'Semantică compusă distribuită idiom-conștientă', 'mn': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'sr': 'Kompozicionalna kompozicija idioma-Aware Distributed Semantics', 'so': 'Ismantics', 'sv': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'si': '喽膏窉喽┼窉喽亨窛喽膏穵 喽呧穩喾佮穵鈥嵿逗 喾冟陡喾娻洞喾栢痘喾娻东 喾冟窓喽膏窂喽编穵喽о窉喽氞穵', 'ta': 'Idiom- aware Composition Distributed Semantics', 'ur': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Идиомно-осъзната композиционна разпределена семантика', 'da': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'nl': 'Idiom-bewuste compositionele gedistribueerde semantiek', 'hr': 'Kompozicionalna kompozicija idiom-Aware Distributed Semantics', 'ko': '성어 감지의 조합 분포식 의미', 'de': 'Idiom-bewusste Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'fa': 'سامانتیک\u200cهای متفرق\u200cشده\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی آگاهی احمق', 'id': 'Semantik Didistribusikan Komposisi Awal-Idiom', 'tr': 'Saçmalyk Zolaklaşyk', 'af': 'Idiom- Aware Komposisie Verspreidige Semantieke', 'sq': 'Semantikë të shpërndarë kompozitive të njohur me Idiom', 'sw': 'Maandamano yaliyosambazwa', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Idiom- Known Composition distributed Semandics', 'bs': 'Kompozicionalna kompozicija idiom-Aware Distributed Semantics', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'cs': 'Idiom-vědomá kompoziční distribuovaná sémantika', 'az': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics', 'fi': 'Idioottitietoinen komposiittinen hajautettu semantiikka', 'ca': "Semàtics distribuïts de composició conscients d'idiomes", 'et': 'Idioomisteadlik kompositsiooniline jaotatud semantika', 'jv': 'Sampeyan idium-Awar Sampeyan Distributed semanti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razširjena semantika, ki se zaveda idioma', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'Idiom-Aware Compositional Distributed Semantics'}
{'en': 'Idioms are peculiar linguistic constructions that impose great challenges for representing the semantics of language, especially in current prevailing end-to-end neural models, which assume that the semantics of a phrase or sentence can be literally composed from its constitutive words. In this paper, we propose an idiom-aware distributed semantic model to build representation of sentences on the basis of understanding their contained idioms. Our models are grounded in the literal-first psycholinguistic hypothesis, which can adaptively learn semantic compositionality of a phrase literally or idiomatically. To better evaluate our models, we also construct an idiom-enriched sentiment classification dataset with considerable scale and abundant peculiarities of idioms. The qualitative and quantitative experimental analyses demonstrate the efficacy of our models.', 'ar': 'التعبيرات الاصطلاحية هي تركيبات لغوية غريبة تفرض تحديات كبيرة على تمثيل دلالات اللغة ، لا سيما في النماذج العصبية السائدة الحالية من طرف إلى طرف ، والتي تفترض أن دلالات الجملة أو الجملة يمكن أن تتكون حرفيًا من كلماتها التأسيسية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا دلاليًا موزعًا مدركًا للاصطلاحات لبناء تمثيل للجمل على أساس فهم التعابير الواردة. ترتكز نماذجنا على الفرضية النفسية اللغوية الأولى الحرفية ، والتي يمكن أن تتعلم بشكل تكيفي التركيب الدلالي لعبارة ما حرفيًا أو اصطلاحيًا. لتقييم نماذجنا بشكل أفضل ، نقوم أيضًا ببناء مجموعة بيانات لتصنيف المشاعر غنية بالمصطلحات ذات نطاق كبير وخصائص وفيرة للتعابير. توضح التحليلات التجريبية النوعية والكمية فعالية نماذجنا.', 'es': 'Los modismos son construcciones lingüísticas peculiares que imponen grandes desafíos para representar la semántica del lenguaje, especialmente en los actuales modelos neuronales de extremo a extremo predominantes, que suponen que la semántica de una frase u oración puede estar compuesta literalmente a partir de sus palabras constitutivas. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo semántico distribuido con conciencia idiomática para construir la representación de oraciones sobre la base de la comprensión de sus modismos contenidos. Nuestros modelos se basan en la hipótesis psicolingüística primero literal, que puede aprender adaptativamente la composicionalidad semántica de una frase literal o idiomáticamente. Para evaluar mejor nuestros modelos, también construimos un conjunto de datos de clasificación de sentimientos enriquecido con modismos con una escala considerable y abundantes peculiaridades de los modismos. Los análisis experimentales cualitativos y cuantitativos demuestran la eficacia de nuestros modelos.', 'pt': 'As expressões idiomáticas são construções linguísticas peculiares que impõem grandes desafios para a representação da semântica da linguagem, especialmente nos atuais modelos neurais fim-a-fim predominantes, que pressupõem que a semântica de uma frase ou sentença pode ser composta literalmente a partir de suas palavras constitutivas. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo semântico distribuído com reconhecimento de idioma para construir a representação de sentenças com base na compreensão de seus idiomas contidos. Nossos modelos são fundamentados na hipótese psicolinguística literal-primeiro, que pode aprender de forma adaptativa a composicionalidade semântica de uma frase literal ou idiomaticamente. Para avaliar melhor nossos modelos, também construímos um conjunto de dados de classificação de sentimentos enriquecidos por idiomas com escala considerável e peculiaridades abundantes de idiomas. As análises experimentais qualitativas e quantitativas demonstram a eficácia de nossos modelos.', 'fr': "Les idiomes sont des constructions linguistiques particulières qui posent de grands défis pour représenter la sémantique du langage, en particulier dans les modèles neuronaux de bout en bout actuels, qui supposent que la sémantique d'une phrase ou d'une phrase peut être littéralement composée à partir de ses mots constitutifs. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle sémantique distribué sensible à l'idiome pour construire la représentation des phrases sur la base de la compréhension des idiomes qu'elles contiennent. Nos modèles sont fondés sur l'hypothèse psycholinguistique littérale d'abord, qui permet d'apprendre de manière adaptative la composition sémantique d'une phrase littéralement ou idiomatiquement. Pour mieux évaluer nos modèles, nous construisons également un jeu de données de classification des sentiments enrichi d'idiomes avec une échelle considérable et de nombreuses particularités idiomatiques. Les analyses expérimentales qualitatives et quantitatives démontrent l'efficacité de nos modèles.", 'ja': '成語は、言語の意味論を表現するために大きな課題を課す特異な言語構造であり、特に現在主流のエンドツーエンドのニューラルモデルでは、フレーズまたは文の意味論がその構成単語から文字通り構成され得ると仮定している。本稿では，成語を認識した分散意味論モデルを提案し，成語に含まれる表現を理解した上で文の表現を構築する．私たちのモデルは、文字通り第一の心理言語学的仮説に基づいています。これは、フレーズの意味的構成性を文字通りまたは造語的に適応的に学習することができます。私たちのモデルをより良く評価するために、私たちはまた、かなりの規模と豊富な特異性の成語を備えた成語に富んだ感情分類データセットを構築します。定性的及び定量的実験分析は、我々のモデルの有効性を実証する。', 'ru': 'Идиомы - это своеобразные лингвистические конструкции, которые создают большие проблемы для представления семантики языка, особенно в современных преобладающих сквозных нейронных моделях, которые предполагают, что семантика фразы или предложения может быть буквально составлена из ее составляющих слов. В данной работе мы предлагаем идиомопонимаемую распределенную семантическую модель для построения представления предложений на основе понимания их содержащихся идиом. Наши модели основаны на буквально-первой психолингвистической гипотезе, которая может адаптивно изучать семантическую композиционность фразы буквально или идиоматически. Для лучшей оценки наших моделей мы также строим набор данных классификации идиоматических настроений со значительным масштабом и обильными особенностями идиомы. Качественные и количественные экспериментальные анализы демонстрируют эффективность наших моделей.', 'zh': '成语奇言构,语义大挑战,尤在流行端到端神经中,假令短语句语义从字面上成之。 于本文中,设一种习惯用语感知分布式语义模样,以结句之习语。 吾道字面先心语言学设,宜假言适应性学短语之语义成,从字面上惯用。 为更评吾模,构一相当规模丰习语习语情类数集。 定性与定量实验析证吾形之有效性。', 'hi': 'मुहावरे अजीब भाषाई निर्माण हैं जो भाषा के शब्दार्थ का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए बड़ी चुनौतियों को लागू करते हैं, विशेष रूप से वर्तमान प्रचलित एंड-टू-एंड तंत्रिका मॉडल में, जो मानते हैं कि एक वाक्यांश या वाक्य के शब्दार्थ को सचमुच इसके संवैधानिक शब्दों से बनाया जा सकता है। इस पत्र में, हम एक मुहावरे-जागरूक वितरित शब्दार्थ मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि वाक्यों के प्रतिनिधित्व को उनके निहित मुहावरों को समझने के आधार पर बनाया जा सके। हमारे मॉडल शाब्दिक-पहले मनोवैज्ञानिक परिकल्पना में आधारित हैं, जो एक वाक्यांश की शाब्दिक या मुहावरेदार रूप से शब्दार्थ रचनात्मकता सीख सकते हैं। हमारे मॉडल का बेहतर मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, हम मुहावरों के काफी पैमाने और प्रचुर मात्रा में विशिष्टताओं के साथ एक मुहावरे-समृद्ध भावना वर्गीकरण डेटासेट का भी निर्माण करते हैं। गुणात्मक और मात्रात्मक प्रयोगात्मक विश्लेषण हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावकारिता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is tógálacha teangeolaíocha uathúla iad nathanna cainte a chuireann dúshláin mhóra roimh shéimeantaic teanga a léiriú, go háirithe sna múnlaí néarúla ceann go ceann atá i réim faoi láthair, a ghlacann leis gur féidir le séimeantaic frása nó abairte a bheith comhdhéanta go litriúil óna focail chomhshuite. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla dáilte shéimeantach atá feasach ar na gnásanna chun léiriú abairtí a thógáil ar bhonn tuiscint a fháil ar a gcuid cainte. Tá ár samhlacha bunaithe ar an hipitéis liteartha-an chéad shíctheangeolaíoch, ar féidir léi comhdhéanamh shéimeantach frása a fhoghlaim go hoiriúnaitheach go litriúil nó go gnásúil. Chun ár múnlaí a mheas níos fearr, tógaimid freisin tacar sonraí aicmithe meon saibhrithe idiom a bhfuil scála suntasach agus go leor sainiúlachtaí nathanna cainte aige. Léiríonn na hanailísí trialacha cáilíochtúla agus cainníochtúla éifeachtúlacht ár múnlaí.', 'hu': 'Az idiómák olyan sajátos nyelvi konstrukciók, amelyek nagy kihívásokat jelentenek a nyelv szemantikájának megjelenítésére, különösen a jelenlegi uralkodó end-to-end neurális modellekben, amelyek feltételezik, hogy egy kifejezés vagy mondat szemantikája szó szerint összeállítható az alkotó szavakból. Ebben a tanulmányban egy nyelvtudatos elosztott szemantikai modellt javasolunk a mondatok reprezentációjának megértése alapján. Modelljeink a szó szerinti-első pszicholingvistikai hipotézisen alapulnak, amely adaptívan tanulhatja egy kifejezés szemantikai kompozícióját szó szerint vagy idiomatikusan. Modelljeink jobb értékelése érdekében egy jelentős méretű és bőséges kifejezési sajátosságokkal rendelkező, nyelvtanulással gazdagított hangulatosztályozási adatkészletet is készítünk. A minőségi és kvantitatív kísérleti elemzések bizonyítják modelleink hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Τα ιδίωμα είναι ιδιόμορφες γλωσσικές κατασκευές που θέτουν μεγάλες προκλήσεις για την αναπαράσταση της σημασιολογίας της γλώσσας, ειδικά στα σημερινά κυρίαρχα νευρωνικά μοντέλα, τα οποία υποθέτουν ότι η σημασιολογία μιας φράσης ή πρότασης μπορεί κυριολεκτικά να συνταχθεί από τις συνταγματικές λέξεις της. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα διανεμημένο σημασιολογικό μοντέλο με επίγνωση του ιδίωματος για την οικοδόμηση αναπαράστασης των προτάσεων με βάση την κατανόηση των περιεχομένων ιδιωμάτων τους. Τα μοντέλα μας στηρίζονται στην κυριολεκτικά πρώτη ψυχογλωσσική υπόθεση, η οποία μπορεί να μάθει προσαρμοστικά τη σημασιολογική σύνθεση μιας φράσης κυριολεκτικά ή ιδιωματικά. Για να αξιολογήσουμε καλύτερα τα μοντέλα μας, κατασκευάζουμε επίσης ένα σύνολο δεδομένων ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων εμπλουτισμένο με ιδίωμα με σημαντική κλίμακα και άφθονες ιδιαιτερότητες των ιδιωμάτων. Οι ποιοτικές και ποσοτικές πειραματικές αναλύσεις αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα των μοντέλων μας.', 'ka': 'იდეომები არიან განსაკუთრებული ენგუნისტიკური კონტრუქციები, რომლებიც ძალიან განსაკუთრებულების გამოსახულებლად ენის სმენტიკის გამოსახულებლად, განსაკუთრებით მიმდინარებული ნეიროლური მოდელში, რომელიც წარმოიდგინს რომ ფრაზ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდა იდეომის შესახებ სემონტიკური მოდელს, რომელიც გავამუშავებთ სიტყვების გამოსახულება მათი იდეომის შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელები ლიტრალური პირველი ფსიკოლინგურისტიკური ჰიპოტეზაში იყენება, რომელიც შეუძლია აეპტიგურად ვისწავლოთ სემონტიკური კომპოციაციალობა ფრაზაზე ბულო ჩვენი მოდელების უკეთესი შესაბამისთვის, ჩვენ ასევე ინდიომის უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ კალგატიტური და კოლგატიტური ექსპერიმენტიური ანალიზები გამოჩვენებენ ჩვენი მოდელების ეფექტიურობა.', 'lt': 'Idijai yra ypatingos kalbos konstrukcijos, kurios kelia didelių iššūkių kalbos semantikos atstovavimui, ypač dabartiniuose vyraujančiuose nuo galo iki galo neuraliniuose modeliuose, kurie daro prielaidą, kad frazės ar sakinio semantiką galima sudaryti iš jos konstitucinių žodžių. Šiame dokumente siūlome, kad būtų sukurtas idiomiškai suprantamas paskirstytas semantinis modelis, kuriame būtų kuriamas sakinių atstovavimas, remiantis jų turinčių idiom ų supratimu. Mūsų modeliai grindžiami literali pirmąja psicholinguistine hipoteze, kuri gali adaptyviai išmokti semantinę frazės sudėtingumą literaliai arba idiomatiškai. Siekdami geriau įvertinti savo modelius, taip pat sukuriame idiomais praturtintą jausmų klasifikavimo duomenų rinkinį su dideliu mastu ir dideliais idiom ų ypatumais. The qualitative and quantitative experimental analyses demonstrate the efficacy of our models.', 'kk': 'Идеомдар тілдің семантикасын көрсету үшін үлкен тілдерді өзгертетін лингвистикалық құрылымдар, осымен қазір қазіргі невралдық соңындағы үлгілерде, бұл сөз не сөздің семантикасын негізгі сөздерден құрылады деп ойлайды. Бұл қағазда, біз идиомды түсініп тұрған идиомдарды түсініп тұратын семантикалық үлгісін құру үшін ұсындық. Біздің үлгілеріміз әдімгі психолингвистикалық гипотезасына негізделген. Бұл сөздің семантикалық композициялығын әдімгі не идеоматикалық түрде үйрене алады. Өзіміздің үлгілерімізді жақсы оқу үшін, біз сондай-ақ идиомды бағалайтын сезімдердің көп масштабы және идиомдардың көп бөліктерін құрамыз. Квалитативті және санативті тәжірибелі анализ үлгілеріміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді.', 'it': "Gli idiomi sono costruzioni linguistiche peculiari che impongono grandi sfide per rappresentare la semantica del linguaggio, specialmente nei modelli neurali end-to-end prevalenti attuali, che presuppongono che la semantica di una frase o frase possa essere letteralmente composta dalle sue parole costitutive. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello semantico distribuito consapevole dell'idioma per costruire la rappresentazione delle frasi sulla base della comprensione dei loro idiomi contenuti. I nostri modelli sono fondati sull'ipotesi psicolinguistica letterale-first, che può imparare adattivamente la compositività semantica di una frase letteralmente o idiomaticamente. Per valutare meglio i nostri modelli, costruiamo anche un set di dati di classificazione del sentiment arricchito da idiomi con una notevole scala e abbondanti peculiarità di idiomi. Le analisi sperimentali qualitative e quantitative dimostrano l'efficacia dei nostri modelli.", 'mk': 'Идиомите се чудни јазички конструкции кои наметнуваат големи предизвици за претставување на семантиката на јазикот, особено во моменталните владејачки нервни модели од крај до крај, кои претпоставуваат дека семантиката на фраза или реченица може буквално да се составува од нејзините конститутивни зборови. Во овој весник, предложуваме дистрибуиран семантичен модел кој е свесен за идиоми за да изгради претставување на речениците врз основа на разбирање на нивните содржани идиоми. Нашите модели се засновани на буквалната прва психолингвистичка хипотеза, која може да научи семантична композицијалност на фраза буквално или идиоматски. За подобро да ги процениме нашите модели, ние исто така конструираме податоци за класификација на чувства богати со идиоми со значителна маса и доста особини идиоми. Квалитативните и квантитативните експериментални анализи ја покажуваат ефикасноста на нашите модели.', 'ml': 'ഐഡിയോമുകള്\u200d വിചിത്രമായ ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി വലിയ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട അവസാനം മ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിഡ്ഢിത്ത വിതരണ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായസ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു. അവരുടെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വിഡ്ഢികളെ മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d വാ നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ സൈക്കോലിനിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസ്റ്റില്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് വാക്കില്\u200d സാധാരണമായ To better evaluate our models, we also construct an idiom-enriched sentiment classification dataset with considerable scale and abundant peculiarities of idioms.  നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണവും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс хэлний семантикийг илэрхийлж чадах гайхалтай хэлний бүтээлүүд юм. Ялангуяа одоогийн төгсгөл-төгсгөл сэтгэл зүйн загваруудын төгсгөл загварууд юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид тэдний тусламжтайгаа ойлгохын тулд хэлэлцэх хэлбэрийн загвар бүтээхийг санал болгож байна. Бидний загварууд бичил санааны анхны психоязгаар суралцаж байгаа юм. Энэ нь юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ гэхээр юу вэ Өөрсдийн загварыг илүү үнэлэхэд бид тэнэг сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцах өгөгдлийн санааг илүү их хэмжээтэй, олон ялангуудтай бүтээж байна. Маш чадвартай, хэмжээний туршилтын шинжилгээ нь бидний загварын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Idiom adalah konstruksi bahasa yang pelik yang mengakibatkan cabaran besar untuk mewakili semantik bahasa, terutama dalam model saraf akhir-akhir yang berkuasa semasa, yang menganggap semantik frasa atau kalimat boleh secara harfiah dikomposisikan dari kata-kata konstitusi. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model semantik yang disebarkan sedar-sedar idiom untuk membina perwakilan kalimat berdasarkan memahami idiom yang terkandung mereka. Model kita berdasarkan hipotesis psikologis pertama, yang boleh belajar secara beradaptasi komposisi semantik frasa secara literal atau idiomatik. Untuk menilai lebih baik model kita, kita juga membina set data klasifikasi sentimen yang kaya-idiom dengan skala yang besar dan peculiariti yang banyak idiom. Analisis eksperimen kualitatif dan kuantitatif menunjukkan kegunaan model kita.', 'mt': 'L-idjomi huma kostruzzjonijiet lingwistiċi speċjali li jimponu sfidi kbar għar-rappreżentazzjoni tas-semantika tal-lingwa, speċjalment fil-mudelli newrali minn tarf sa tarf attwali, li jassumu li s-semantika ta’ frażi jew sentenza tista’ tkun letteralment komposta mill-kliem kostitwenti tagħha. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell semantiku distribwit b’għarfien idjomiku biex nibnu rappreżentanza tas-sentenzi fuq il-bażi tal-fehim tal-idjomi kontenuti tagħhom. Il-mudelli tagħna huma bbażati fuq l-ipoteżi psikoloġika litterali-ewwel, li tista’ titgħallem b’mod adattiv il-kompożizzjoni semantika ta’ frażi litteralment jew idjomatikament. Biex nivvalutaw aħjar il-mudelli tagħna, nibnu wkoll sett ta’ dejta dwar il-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti arrikkiti bl-idjomi b’skala konsiderevoli u partikolaritajiet abbundanti ta’ idjomi. The qualitative and quantitative experimental analyses demonstrate the efficacy of our models.', 'no': 'Språk er spesielle språk-konstruksjonar som legg inn store utfordringar for å representera semantikkane av språk, spesielt i gjeldande ende-til-slutt neuralmodeller, som antar at semantikkane av ein frase eller setning kan bokstavelig lagrast frå sin konstitusjonsordet. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein idiomvist distribuert semantisk modell for å bygge representasjon av setningar på grunn av forståelse av dei inneheld idiomar. Modellene våre er grunnlagte i den bokstavelige første psikoplingviske hipotesen, som kan tilpassa semantiske komposisjonalitet av ein frase bokstavelig eller idiomatisk. For å bedre evaluera modellen våre, konstruerer vi også ein idiomrøyd sentimentklassifikasjonsdata med mykje skala og mykje eigenskapar av idiom. Den kvalitativne og kvantitativne eksperimentalne analysene viser effektiviteten av våre modeller.', 'pl': 'Idiomy to specyficzne konstrukcje językowe, które stawiają duże wyzwania dla reprezentowania semantyki języka, zwłaszcza w obecnie panujących modelach neuronowych, które zakładają, że semantyka frazy lub zdania może być dosłownie złożona z jego konstytucyjnych słów. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy rozproszony model semantyczny świadomy idiomów do budowania reprezentacji zdań na podstawie zrozumienia ich zawartych idiomów. Nasze modele opierają się na dosłownie-pierwszej hipotezie psycholingwistycznej, która może adaptacyjnie nauczyć się semantycznej kompozycjonalności frazy dosłownie lub idiomatycznie. Aby lepiej ocenić nasze modele, budujemy również zbiór danych klasyfikacji sentymentów wzbogaconych o wzbogacone idiomy o znaczną skalę i bogatą specyfikę idiomów. Jakościowe i ilościowe analizy eksperymentalne pokazują skuteczność naszych modeli.', 'so': 'Fiidiyadu waa dhismaha luqada ee khaas ah oo dhibaatooyin badan ku saabsan in la represento semantika afka, khusuusan marka la joogo tusaalaha ugu horraysa dhammaadka neurada ee ugu dambeeya, taas oo u malaynaya in qeybta qofka afka ama hadalka waxaa laga sameyn karaa erayadiisa sababiyada ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale qaybsan oo caqli ah oo caqli ah si aan u dhisno xukunka garsoorida hadallada sababtoo ah waxyaabaha ay ku jiraan idimyada. Tusaalooyinkayada waxaa lagu aasaasay fikrada maskaxda ee ugu horraysa, taasoo si adag u baran kara isbedelka kaleba, si rasmi ah ama si caqli ah. Si aan ugu fiican u qiimeyno modelalkayaga, waxaynu sameynaa macluumaad kalluumeysan oo caqli ah oo caqli badan iyo waxyaabo badan oo caqli ah. Shahaadada baaritaanka ee tijaabada iyo qiyaas ah waxay muujiyaan saamaynta modelalkayaga.', 'ro': 'Idiomele sunt construcții lingvistice specifice care impun mari provocări pentru reprezentarea semanticii limbajului, în special în modelele neurale end-to-end predominante actuale, care presupun că semantica unei fraze sau propoziții poate fi compusă literalmente din cuvintele sale constitutive. În această lucrare, propunem un model semantic distribuit conștient de idiom pentru a construi reprezentarea propozițiilor pe baza înțelegerii expresiilor lor conținute. Modelele noastre se bazează pe ipoteza psiholingvistică literală-întâi, care poate învăța adaptiv compoziționalitatea semantică a unei fraze literalmente sau idiomatical. Pentru a evalua mai bine modelele noastre, construim, de asemenea, un set de date de clasificare a sentimentelor îmbogățit cu expresii, cu o scară considerabilă și particularități abundente ale expresiilor. Analizele experimentale calitative si cantitative demonstreaza eficacitatea modelelor noastre.', 'sv': 'Idiomer är egendomliga språkliga konstruktioner som ställer stora utmaningar för att representera språkets semantik, särskilt i nuvarande rådande end-to-end neurala modeller, som förutsätter att semantiken i en fras eller mening bokstavligen kan komponeras av dess konstituerande ord. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en idiom-medveten distribuerad semantisk modell för att bygga representation av meningar utifrån förståelse av deras inneboende idiom. Våra modeller bygger på den bokstavliga-första psykolingvistiska hypotesen, som adaptivt kan lära sig semantisk kompositionalitet av en fras bokstavligt eller idiomatiskt. För att bättre kunna utvärdera våra modeller konstruerar vi också ett idiom-berikat sentimentklassificeringsdataset med betydande skala och rikliga särdrag i idiom. De kvalitativa och kvantitativa experimentella analyserna visar hur effektiva våra modeller är.', 'sr': 'Idiovi su posebne jezičke konstrukcije koje nameću velike izazove za predstavljanje semantike jezika, posebno u trenutnim prevladajućim neuralnim modelima na kraju do kraja, koje pretpostavljaju da semantika fraze ili rečenice može biti bukvalno sastavljena iz njegovih ustavnih reči. U ovom papiru predlažemo idejski svestan semantički model da izgradi predstavljanje rečenica na osnovu razumevanja njihovih sadrženih idioma. Naši modeli su temeljeni na bukvalnoj prvoj psihologističkoj hipotezi, koja može prilagoditi semantičku kompozicionalnost fraze bukvalno ili idiomatski. Da bismo bolje procenili naše modele, takođe izgradili i podatke o klasifikaciji idioma bogatih sentimenta sa značajnom skalom i mnogim posebnostima idiota. Kvalitativne i kvantitativne eksperimentalne analize pokazuju efikasnost naših modela.', 'si': 'මෝඩියෝම් තමයි විශේෂ භාෂාවික විශ්වාසයෙන් විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරන්න ලොකු අභ්\u200dයාසයක් වෙනුවෙන් භාෂාව සෙමැන්ටික් වලින්, විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි මෝඩයෙක්ගේ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල් එකක් විතරයි කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියල අපේ මොඩේල්ස් ඉන්නේ ප්\u200dරථම මනුස්සික භාෂාවික විශ්වාසයෙන්, ඒක පුළුවන් විශ්වාසයෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් සංයෝජනය ඉගෙන අපේ මෝඩේල් වලට හොඳ විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි මෝඩියෝ වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ මෝඩියෝ වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය.', 'ta': 'மொழியின் பாதுகாப்பினை குறிப்பிடுவதற்கான பெரிய சவால்பங்களை ஏற்படுத்துகிறது, தற்போது முடிவு முடிவு புதிய புதிய மாதிரிகளில், ஒரு சொற்றொடர் அல்லது வாக்கியத்தின் பாதி இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முட்டாள் அறிந்து கொள்ள முட்டாள்கள் புரிந்து கொண்டுள்ள முட்டாள்களை புரிந்து கொள்ள ஒர நம்முடைய மாதிரிகள் முதல் மொழி மொழிமாற்றத்திற்கு குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது ஒழுங்குபடுத்த முடியும் ஒரு சொற்றொடரின் அரைத்திர கூட்ட எங்கள் மாதிரிகளை சிறந்த மதிப்பீடு செய்ய, நாங்கள் முட்டாள்களின் மூலம் செலுத்தப்பட்ட உணர்வு வகுப்பு தகவல்களை உருவாக்குகிறோம். குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட பரிசோதனையின் விளைவு எங்கள் மாதிரிகளின் விளைவை காண்பிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'زبانیں مخصوص زبان کی ساختاری ہیں جو زبان کی سیمانٹیکوں کی تصویر کرنے کے لئے بہت بڑی چالیں لگاتے ہیں، مخصوصاً موجود ہونے والی نائرول مدل میں، جو سمجھتے ہیں کہ ایک فرض یا جماعت کی سیمانٹیکوں کو اس کی ساختار کلمات سے بنا سکتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک احمق جاننے والی سیمانٹی موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کا نمونہ بنانے کے لئے ان کے احمقوں کو سمجھنے کے باعث۔ ہمارے مدلکوں کو ذبح سے پہلے روانی زبان کی فرضی میں بنیاد رکھا گیا ہے، جو ایک فرضی کی سیمنٹی پیدائش کو دکھائے جا سکتا ہے اسے ذبح یا مغرور سے سیکھ سکتا ہے۔ ہمارے مدلکوں کا اچھا ارزش کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے بھی ایک احمق ثروت والی احساسات کا کلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا ہے جو بہت سی مقدار اور بہت سی احساسات سے ہے۔ کیلوٹیٹی اور مقداری آزمائش تحقیقات ہمارے نمڈلوں کی عمدگی دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu g'oyalar oddiy tillar ichki qiziqarli muammolar, bu tilning semantikkeni represent qilish uchun juda qiziqarli muammolar, hususan ҳозирги замон энг oxirigi neyural modellarida, bu bir so'zning semantika yoki so'zlarning qismlarini kattitiyatli so'zlaridan yaratish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz o'z ichida o'zgaruvchining semantik modelini o'rganish uchun so'zlarni tashkilotga ega qilish mumkin. Bizning modellarimiz birinchi psykologik hypothetika asoslangan edi. Bu so'zlarning semantik kompaniyalarini o'rganishi mumkin, biz o'z so'zlarning semantik kompaniyalarini o'rganadi. Biz modellarimizni yaxshi qiymatlashimiz uchun biz o'ylab o'ylab o'ylab, o'ylab o'ylab o'xshash o'smirlar darajasining maʼlumotlarini o'rganamiz va juda ko'proq o'smirlarning ko'plab tadbirligi bilan ko'paytuvchimiz. Mualliflik va qiymatik tajriba analyzerlarimizning modellarining effektini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Thần tượng là những kiến trúc ngôn ngữ kỳ lạ đặt ra những thử thách lớn cho việc đại diện ngữ pháp, đặc biệt là trong các mô hình thần kinh phổ biến từ kết thúc đến kết thúc, mà cho rằng ngữ pháp của một câu nói hay câu chữ có thể được hình thành từ những từ thiết lập. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình chữ nghĩa phân bổ theo cách phân biệt đần độn để xây dựng các lời phạt dựa trên cách diễn đạt của họ. Các mô hình của chúng tôi được căn cứ vào giả thuyết tâm lý thứ nhất, có thể thích nghi học về độ hợp tác theo nghĩa đen hoặc theo phân biệt. Để đánh giá tốt hơn các mô hình của chúng tôi, chúng tôi cũng xây dựng một tập tin mật độ đa cảm được tưởng nhiều đặc trưng đáng kể. Các phân tích thử nghiệm về chất lượng và chất lượng cho thấy hiệu quả của các mẫu.', 'bg': 'Идиомите са особени лингвистични конструкции, които налагат големи предизвикателства за представяне на семантиката на езика, особено в настоящите преобладаващи от край до край невронни модели, които предполагат, че семантиката на фраза или изречение може буквално да бъде съставена от нейните конституционни думи. В настоящата статия предлагаме разпределен семантичен модел, който да изгради представяне на изречения въз основа на разбирането на съдържащите се в тях идиоми. Нашите модели са основани на буквално-първа психолингвистична хипотеза, която може адаптивно да научи семантичната композиция на фразата буквално или идиоматично. За да оценим по-добре нашите модели, конструираме и обогатен с идиоми набор от данни за класификация на сентимента със значителен мащаб и изобилни особености на идиомите. Качествените и количествени експериментални анализи демонстрират ефикасността на нашите модели.', 'da': 'Idiomer er ejendommelige sproglige konstruktioner, der stiller store udfordringer til at repræsentere sprogets semantik, især i nuværende fremherskende end-to-end neurale modeller, der antager, at semantikken af en sætning eller sætning bogstaveligt talt kan sammensættes af dens konstituerende ord. I denne artikel foreslår vi en formsprogsbevidst distribueret semantisk model til at opbygge repræsentation af sætninger ud fra forståelsen af deres indeholdte formsprog. Vores modeller er baseret på den bogstavelige-første psykolingvistiske hypotese, som adaptivt kan lære semantisk kompositionalitet af en sætning bogstaveligt eller idiomatisk. For bedre at evaluere vores modeller konstruerer vi også et idiom-beriget sentiment klassificering datasæt med betydelig skala og rigelige særegenheder i idiomer. De kvalitative og kvantitative eksperimentelle analyser viser effektiviteten af vores modeller.', 'hr': 'Idiomi su posebne jezičke konstrukcije koje nameću velike izazove za predstavljanje semantike jezika, posebno u trenutnim prevladajućim neuralnim modelima kraja do kraja, koji pretpostavljaju da semantike fraze ili rečenice mogu biti bukvalno sastavljene iz ustavnih riječi. U ovom papiru predlažemo raspodijeljeni semantički model koji zna idiom da izgradi zastupanje rečenica na temelju razumijevanja njihovih sadrženih idioma. Naši modeli su temeljeni na bukvalnoj prvoj psihologističkoj hipotezi, koja može prilagoditi semantičku kompoziciju fraze bukvalno ili idiomatski. Da bismo bolje procijenili naše modele, također izgradili i podatke o klasifikaciji idioma bogatih osjećaja sa značajnom skalom i mnogim posebnostima idioma. Kvalitativne i kvantitativne eksperimentalne analize pokazuju učinkovitost naših modela.', 'nl': 'Idiomen zijn eigenaardige linguïstische constructies die grote uitdagingen stellen voor het representeren van de semantiek van taal, vooral in de huidige heersende end-to-end neurale modellen, die veronderstellen dat de semantiek van een frase of zin letterlijk kan worden samengesteld uit zijn constitutieve woorden. In dit artikel stellen we een idioom-bewust gedistribueerd semantisch model voor om representatie van zinnen op te bouwen op basis van het begrijpen van hun ingesloten idiomen. Onze modellen zijn gebaseerd op de letterlijk-eerste psycholinguïstische hypothese, die de semantische compositionaliteit van een zin letterlijk of idiomatisch kan leren. Om onze modellen beter te evalueren, bouwen we ook een idioom verrijkte sentiment classificatie dataset met aanzienlijke schaal en overvloedige eigenaardigheden van idiomen. De kwalitatieve en kwantitatieve experimentele analyses tonen de effectiviteit van onze modellen aan.', 'de': 'Idiome sind eigentümliche linguistische Konstruktionen, die große Herausforderungen an die Darstellung der Semantik der Sprache stellen, insbesondere in den derzeit vorherrschenden end-to-end neuronalen Modellen, die davon ausgehen, dass die Semantik einer Phrase oder eines Satzes buchstäblich aus ihren konstitutiven Wörtern zusammengesetzt werden kann. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein idiom-bewusstes verteiltes semantisches Modell vor, um die Repräsentation von Sätzen auf der Grundlage des Verständnisses ihrer enthaltenen Idiome aufzubauen. Unsere Modelle basieren auf der literal-first psycholinguistischen Hypothese, die die semantische Kompositionalität einer Phrase wörtlich oder idiomatisch adaptiv erlernen kann. Um unsere Modelle besser zu bewerten, konstruieren wir auch einen idiom-angereicherten Sentiment-Klassifizierungsdatensatz mit beträchtlicher Skala und zahlreichen Eigenheiten von Idiomen. Die qualitativen und quantitativen experimentellen Analysen belegen die Wirksamkeit unserer Modelle.', 'fa': 'زبانها ساختار زبانی خاصی هستند که چالش های بزرگی را برای نمایش نمایش شناسایی زبان قرار می دهند، مخصوصا در مدل\u200cهای عصبی\u200cهای پایان و پایان فعلی که تصور می\u200cکند که سیمانتیک یک جمله یا جمله می\u200cتواند به طور کلمه از کلمات قانونی خود ساخته شود. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل طبیعی که با احساس احمقانه توزیع شده است برای ساختن نمایش جمله\u200cها بر اساس درک احمقانه\u200cهایشان. مدل\u200cهای ما در فرضیه\u200cهای روانی زبان\u200cشناسی که می\u200cتوانند به طور اضافه\u200cای از ترکیب\u200cهای سیمانی از یک جمله\u200cی عبارت بطور کلمه یا زبان\u200cشناسی یاد بگیرند. برای بهتر ارزیابی مدلهای ما، ما همچنین یک مجموعهٔ اطلاعات شناسایی احساسات با مقیاس زیادی و تعریف بسیاری از احساسات را ساختیم. تحلیل\u200cهای گوناگونی و اندازه\u200cگیری آزمایش\u200cها موثرت مدل\u200cهای ما را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'id': 'Idiom adalah konstruksi bahasa yang aneh yang mengakibatkan tantangan besar untuk mewakili semantik bahasa, terutama dalam model saraf akhir-akhir yang berkuasa saat ini, yang mengasumsikan bahwa semantik frasa atau kalimat dapat secara harfiah terbuat dari kata-kata konstitutifnya. In this paper, we propose an idiom-aware distributed semantic model to build representation of sentences on the basis of understanding their contained idioms.  Model kita berdasarkan hipotesis psikologis pertama, yang dapat mempelajari secara adaptif komposisionalitas semantis dari frasa secara harfiah atau idiomatis. Untuk mengevaluasi model kita lebih baik, kita juga membangun dataset klasifikasi sentimen yang kaya-idiom dengan skala yang besar dan peculiaritas yang banyak idiom. Analisis eksperimen kualitatif dan kuantitatif menunjukkan efektivitas model kita.', 'ko': '습어는 특수한 언어 구조로 언어의 의미 표현에 커다란 도전을 제기했다. 특히 현재 유행하는 끝에서 끝까지의 신경 모델에서 이 모델은 짧은 말이나 문장의 의미가 그 구성어로 직접 구성될 수 있다고 가정한다.본고에서 우리는 성어 감지의 분포식 의미 모델을 제시하여 문장에 포함된 성어를 이해하는 토대에서 문장의 표현을 구축했다.우리의 모델은 서면 제1심리언어학 가설을 토대로 이 가설은 서면이나 습관적인 용법에서 단어의 의미 성분을 적응적으로 배울 수 있다.우리의 모델을 더욱 잘 평가하기 위해 우리는 성어가 풍부한 감정 분류 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 이 데이터 집합은 상당히 큰 규모와 풍부한 성어 특성을 가지고 있다.정성과 정량 실험 분석은 우리 모델의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'tr': 'Diller dillerin semantiklerini temel etmek üçin uly kynçylyklar döretýär, ýöne häzirki iň üstüne gelen neiral modellerde, sözlerin semantikleri özüniň esasy sözlerinden ýazylýar diýip pikir edýärler. Bu kagyzda, samsyklyk bilen bölünen semantik nusga sözlerini bardyklaryny düşünmek üçin tassyklandyrýarys. Biziň modellerimiz kellämiz-ilkinji psikoplingwistiki hypoteziýada taýýarlanýar. Bu senediň semantik ýagdaýyny a ňsat ýa-da dil dilinde öwrenip biler. Munuň modellerimizi gowy deňleşdirmek üçin, biz hem samsyklyk baglanýan duýgular klasifikasynda möhüm derejle we çözümlerde samsyklyk hasaplanjak düzenini düzenleyeriz. Görnüş we quantitaty synaglamalar nusgalarymyzyň täsirini görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Mawazo ni ujenzi wa lugha ya ajabu ambao unaweka changamoto kubwa kwa kuwakilisha mifano ya lugha, hususani katika mifano inayoendelea mwishoni mwa mwisho wa taratibu, ambayo inadhani mifano ya neno au hukumu inaweza kuungwa kwa maneno yake ya katiba. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza muundo wa mpumbavu uliofanywa na ufahamu wa kijinga ili kujenga uwakilishi wa hukumu kwa sababu ya kuelewa vipumbavu vyao. Mifano yetu imejikita kwenye dhana ya kwanza ya kisaikolojia, ambayo inaweza kujifunza muungano wa kimapenzi wa neno la kisasa au kwa upumbavu. Ili kutathmini mifano yetu vizuri, pia tunajenga taarifa za usambazaji wa hisia za kijinga wenye kiwango kikubwa na utamaduni mkubwa wa ujinga. The qualitative and quantitative experimental analyses demonstrate the efficacy of our models.', 'sq': 'Idiomet janë ndërtesa gjuhësore të veçanta që imponojnë sfida të mëdha për përfaqësimin e semantikës së gjuhës, veçanërisht në modelet neurale të tanishme që mbizotërojnë nga fundi në fund, të cilat supozojnë se semantikën e një fraze apo fjale mund të përbëhet me fjalët e saj përbërëse. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model semantik të shpërndarë në dijeni të idiomave për të ndërtuar përfaqësimin e fjalëve në bazë të kuptimit të idiomave të tyre të përmbajtura. Modelet tona janë bazuar në hipotezën psikologjike të parë, e cila mund të mësojë përshtatshmërinë semantike të një fraze në mënyrë literale apo idiomatike. To better evaluate our models, we also construct an idiom-enriched sentiment classification dataset with considerable scale and abundant peculiarities of idioms.  Analizat kualitative dhe kuantitative eksperimentale tregojnë efektshmërinë e modeleve tona.', 'af': "Idiomes is eienskaplike lingwisiese konstruksies wat groot uitdagings vir die semantieke van taal voorstel, veral in die huidige oorvloedige end-to-end neurale modele, wat aanvaar dat die semantieke van 'n frase of seting literaal van sy konstitusiewoorde kan word. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n idiom-bewyse verspreidige semantiese model om voorstelling van teikens te bou op die basis van verstaan van hulle bevat idioms. Ons modele is gegrond in die leeteraal-eerste psihologiese hipotees, wat kan aanpasmaak semantiese komponibiliteit van 'n frase leer litteraal of idiomaties. Om ons modele beter te evalueer, het ons ook 'n idiom-ryk sentimente-klasifikasie-datastel opgestel met aansienlike skaal en groot eienskappe van idioms. Die kwaliteit en kvantitatiewe eksperimentale analiserings vertoon die effektiviteit van ons modele.", 'hy': 'Իդիոմները տարօրինակ լեզվաբանական կառուցվածքներ են, որոնք առաջարկում են մեծ մարտահրավեր լեզվի սեմանտիկայի ներկայացման համար, հատկապես ներկայիս գոյություն ունեցող վերջ-վերջ նյարդային մոդելներում, որոնք ենթադրում են, որ արտահայտության կամ նախադասության սեմանտիկան բառացիորեն կարող է բառացի Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք իբրև իմաստով տարածված սեմանտիկ մոդել, որպեսզի կառուցենք նախադասությունների ներկայացումը նրանց պարունակված լեզուների հասկանալու հիմքում: Մեր մոդելները հիմնված են բառացիորեն առաջին հոգեբանական հիպոթեզի վրա, որը կարող է ադապտիվ սովորել մի արտահայտության սեմանտիկ բաղադրությունը բառացիորեն կամ իդոմատիորեն: Որպեսզի ավելի լավ գնահատենք մեր մոդելները, մենք նաև կառուցում ենք անձնական հարուստ զգացմունքների դասակարգման տվյալներ, որոնք ունեն խոշոր չափսեր և բազմաթիվ տարօրինակություններ: Կորակային և քանակական փորձարկման վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոդելների արդյունավետությունը:', 'bn': 'আইডিয়াম হচ্ছে অদ্ভুত ভাষার নির্মাণ যা ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য বিশাল চ্যালেঞ্জ প্রদান করেছে, বিশেষ করে বর্তমান বিশাল প্রধান শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল মডেলের মধ্যে, যা ধারণা করে য এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি বোকা সচেতনতা প্রস্তাব করছি সেম্পেন্টিক মডেল বিতরণ করা হয়েছে যাতে তাদের অন্তর্ভুক্ত বোকা বুঝতে পারে যে ব আমাদের মডেল সাহিত্যের প্রথম মানসিক ভাষার হিসেবে গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে, যারা সাধারণ ভাবে একটি বাক্যের সামান্যিক বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখতে পারে অথবা বোকা আমাদের মডেলের চেয়ে ভালোভাবে মূল্যায়ন করার জন্য, আমরা বোকামি সমৃদ্ধ অনুভূতির সমৃদ্ধ তথ্য নির্মাণ করি যেখানে বেশী মাত্রা এবং বেশী অদ পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার বিশ্লেষণ আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে।', 'az': 'Dillər dillərin semantikalarını göstərmək üçün böyük çətinlikləri təyin edirlər, özellikle hökmünün sona-sona gələn nöral modellərdə olan, sözlərin semantikalarını və sözlərinin əsl yazılı sözlərindən oluşa bilər. Bu kağızda, idi-bilən, dağıtılmış semantik modeli, sözlərin ifadəsini anlamaq üçün təklif edirik. Bizim modellərimiz yazılı-ilk psixolingvistiki hipotezi içində tətbiq edilir ki, bu da bir frazanın semantik kompoziciyasını əsasən və ya idiomatik olaraq öyrənə bilər. Bizim modellərimizi daha yaxşı değerləşdirmək üçün idim-dövlətli hisslər klasifikasiyası verilənləri də idimlərin çox qiymətli və müxtəlif özellikləri ilə inşa edirik. Görünüşlü və kvantitatlı eksperimental analizi modellərin etkinliğini göstərir.', 'bs': 'Idiovi su posebne jezičke konstrukcije koje nameću velike izazove za predstavljanje semantike jezika, posebno u trenutnim prevladajućim neuralnim modelima na kraju do kraja, koji pretpostavlja da semantike fraze ili rečenice mogu biti bukvalno sastavljene iz ustavnih riječi. U ovom papiru predlažemo raspodijeljeni semantički model koji zna idioma da izgradi predstavu kazni na temelju razumijevanja njihovih sadrženih idiota. Naši modeli su temeljeni na bukvalnoj prvoj psihologističkoj hipotezi, koja može prilagoditi semantičku kompozicionalnost fraze bukvalno ili idiomatski. Da bismo bolje procenili naše modele, također izgradili i podatke o klasifikaciji idioma bogatih sentimenta sa značajnom skalom i mnogim posebnostima idiota. Kvalitativni i kvantitativni eksperimentalni analizi pokazuju učinkovitost naših modela.', 'ca': "Els idiomes són construccions lingüístices peculiars que imponen grans reptes per representar la semàntica del llenguatge, especialment en els models neurals de final a final, que suponen que la semàntica d'una frase o frase pot ser literalment composta de les seves paraules constitutives. En aquest article, proposem un model semàntic distribuït conscient dels idiomes per a construir representació de les frases basant-se en entendre els idiomes contenuts. Els nostres models estan basats en la hipòtesi psicològica literal-primera, que poden aprendre adaptadament la composicionalitat semàntica d'una frase literalment o idiomàticament. Per tal d'evaluar millor els nostres models, també construïm un conjunt de dades de classificació de sentiments enriquegut amb idiomes amb una gran escala i peculiaritats abundants d'idiomes. Les anàlisis experimentals qualitatives i quantitatives demostren l'eficacia dels nostres models.", 'cs': 'Idiomy jsou zvláštní lingvistické konstrukce, které kladou velké výzvy pro reprezentaci sémantiky jazyka, zejména v současných převládajících end-to-end neuronových modelech, které předpokládají, že sémantika fráze nebo věty může být doslova složena z jejích konstitučních slov. V tomto článku navrhujeme distribuovaný sémantický model uvědomělý idiom, který buduje reprezentaci vět na základě porozumění jejich obsaženým idiomům. Naše modely jsou založeny na doslovně-první psycholingvistické hypotéze, která se adaptivně naučí sémantickou kompozicionalitu fráze doslova nebo idiomaticky. Pro lepší zhodnocení našich modelů vytváříme také datový soubor klasifikace sentimentů obohacený idiomem se značným rozsahem a bohatými zvláštnostmi idiomů. Kvalitativní a kvantitativní experimentální analýzy demonstrují účinnost našich modelů.', 'am': 'Idioms are peculiar linguistic constructions that impose great challenges for representing the semantics of language, especially in current prevailing end-to-end neural models, which assume that the semantics of a phrase or sentence can be literally composed from its constitutive words.  በዚህ ገጽ፣ የሞኝነት እናውቀው የፍርድ መልዕክት መሥራት እናስባለን፡፡ ሞዴላዎቻችን በመጀመሪያው የpsycholinguistic hypothesis የተመሠረቱ ናቸው፡፡ ምሳሌዎቻችንን ለመሻል፣ እና የሞኝነት ባለጠጋ የስሜት ክፍል ዳታዎችን እና ብዙ ብዛት የሞኝነት ብዛት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሞክራዊ እና የሞክራዊ ምርጫዎች የሞዴሎችንን ጥቃት ያሳያል፡፡', 'et': 'Idioomid on omapärased keelelised konstruktsioonid, mis panevad keele semantika esindamisele suuri väljakutseid, eriti praegustes valitsevates otsast otsani neuromudelites, mis eeldavad, et fraasi või lause semantika saab sõna otseses mõttes koosneda selle konstitutsioonisõnadest. Käesolevas töös pakume välja idioomiteadliku hajutatud semantilise mudeli, et ehitada lausete esindamine nende sisalduvate idioomide mõistmise alusel. Meie mudelid põhinevad sõna-esimesel psühholingvistilisel hüpoteesil, mis võib adaptiivselt õppida fraasi semantilist kompositsiooni sõna-otseses või idiomaatilises mõttes. Oma mudelite paremaks hindamiseks ehitame ka idioomiga rikastatud sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni andmekogumi, millel on märkimisväärne mastaapsus ja rikkalikud idioomide eripärad. Kvalitatiivsed ja kvantitatiivsed eksperimentaalsed analüüsid näitavad meie mudelite efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Idioomit ovat omalaatuisia kielellisiä rakenteita, jotka asettavat suuria haasteita kielen semantiikan esittämiselle, erityisesti nykyisissä vallitsevissa end-to-end neuromalleissa, joissa oletetaan, että lauseen tai lauseen semantiikka voidaan kirjaimellisesti koostua sen constitutiivisista sanoista. Tässä työssä ehdotamme idiomitietoista hajautettua semanttista mallia lauseiden esittämiseksi niiden sisältämien idiomien ymmärtämisen pohjalta. Mallimme pohjautuvat kirjaimellisesti ensimmäiseen psykolingvistiseen hypoteesiin, joka voi adaptiivisesti oppia lauseen semanttista kompositiivisuutta kirjaimellisesti tai idiomaattisesti. Mallien parempaa arviointia varten rakennamme myös idiomilla rikastetun sentimentaaliluokitusaineiston, jossa on huomattava mittakaava ja runsaasti idiomien erityispiirteitä. Laadulliset ja kvantitatiiviset kokeelliset analyysit osoittavat malliemme tehokkuuden.', 'jv': 'Lingué kuwi nggawe Lingué sing paling dhéwé kuwi nggawe perbudhakan sing apik kanggo limun sematik ning limun, ngomong kuwi nggawe modèl Nyural sing gawe nguasai sematik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi, ngêpêrungke tindakan sawar-awak iki dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi modèl kuwi nggawe barang awak dhéwé modelus dhéwé kuwi basa-basa sing grubutaké kelas kuwi basa-perusahaan, sing bisa suputeksi yen sampek semanti karo perusahaan seneng pisan kelas tuasaben uwong idiomatik. Rasané awakdhéwé ngéngake modellé awak dhéwé, kéné lagi nggawe barang langgar-barêng seneng pisan seneng barang dumadhi. Daftar kene dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang langgar-barêng lan alam sing paling dhéwé. Awak dhéwé kaliwatiré karo akeh pisan neng éntuk éntuk panembang nggawe modèl.', 'he': 'אידיומים הם בניינים שפתיים מוזרים שמכריחים אתגרים גדולים למייצג הסמנטיקה של השפה, במיוחד במודלים עצביים הנוכחים בסוף לסוף, שמניחים שהסמנטיקה של ביטוי או משפט יכולה להיות מורכבת מילים המרכיבות שלה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל סמנטי מופיע על ידי אידיומים כדי לבנות מייצג של משפטים על בסיס הבנה של אידיומים המכילים שלהם. הדוגמנים שלנו מבוססים בהיפתוזיה פסיכולוגית המילית הראשונה, שיכולה ללמוד באופן מתאים את המרכיבות הסמנטית של ביטוי באופן מילולי או אידיומטי. כדי להעריך טוב יותר את הדוגמנים שלנו, אנחנו גם בונים קבוצת מידע מסווג רגשות עשירה באדיומים עם מידה גדולה ומיוחדים רבים של אידיומים. ניתוחים ניסויים איכותיים וקוונטיביים מראים את היעילות של הדוגמנים שלנו.', 'sk': 'Idiomi so posebne jezikovne konstrukcije, ki predstavljajo velike izzive za predstavitev semantike jezika, zlasti v sedanjih prevladujočih nevronskih modelih od konca do konca, ki predpostavljajo, da je semantika fraze ali stavka dobesedno sestavljena iz njenih sestavnih besed. V prispevku predlagamo porazdeljen semantični model, ki se zaveda idiomov, za gradnjo reprezentacije stavkov na osnovi razumevanja njihovih vsebovanih idiomov. Naši modeli temeljijo na dobesedno-prvi psiholingvistični hipotezi, ki se lahko prilagodljivo nauči semantične kompozicionalnosti fraze dobesedno ali idiomatično. Za boljšo oceno naših modelov izdelamo tudi z idiomom obogaten nabor podatkov o klasifikaciji sentimentalnih izrazov z velikim obsegom in obilnimi posebnostmi idiomov. Kvalitativne in kvantitativne eksperimentalne analize dokazujejo učinkovitost naših modelov.', 'ha': "Idiyoyi ne masu kami cikin linguin da ke ƙara wa masu muhimmada ga wakilishi semantikki na harshen, hususan a cikin misãlai masu ƙaranci da ke ƙara zuwa ƙari, wanda ke yi zato, za'a iya samun semantikken kalma ko kalma daga maganar katiba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlai da aka raba shi da jãhilci, dõmin ya gina mai halayyar da gargaɗin ayuka da aka sami fahimta da idãnun da suka ƙunsa. Our models are grounded in the literal-first psycholinguistic hypothesis, which can adaptively learn semantic compositionality of a phrase literally or idiomatically.  To, domin ka ƙaddara misalinmu, ko kuma za mu sami danne na tababar da ke rikitacce da idãnun da ke da gwargwadon sami da masu kamid na jãhilai. Ana cikin jarrabai masu iya lissafa da gwargwadon, sun nuna aikin misalinmu.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཅན་ཅིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་semantics་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་དགོས་པའི་བརྗོད་རིགས། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཅིག་སྟོན་བྱེད ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཞུང་དག་གིས་གཞི་རྩོམ་པ་ལྷག་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་པམ་ཡིག་གི་གྲངས་སུ་འཇུག ང་ཚོའི་མིག གྲངས་སུ་འབོར་བ་དང་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Efficient Semantic Parsing', 'ar': 'القواعد النحوية الكلية والتحفيز الشامل للتحليل الدلالي الفعال', 'es': 'Macro gramáticas y activación holística para un análisis semántico eficiente', 'fr': 'Macro grammaires et déclenchement holistique pour une analyse sémantique efficace', 'pt': 'Macrogramáticas e acionamento holístico para análise semântica eficiente', 'ja': '効率的なセマンティック構文解析のためのマクロ文法とホリスティックトリガー', 'zh': '宏语法体触发,遂高效之语义解析', 'ru': 'Макрограматика и целостный триггер для эффективного семантического анализа', 'hi': 'मैक्रो व्याकरण और कुशल शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के लिए समग्र ट्रिगरिंग', 'ga': 'Macra-Ghramadach agus Spreagadh Iomlánaíoch le haghaidh Parsáil Shéimeantach Éifeachtúil', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μακρογραμματικές και ολιστική ενεργοποίηση για αποτελεσματική σημειακή ανάλυση', 'kk': 'Макро грамматтары және холистикалық талдау үшін эффективті семантикалық талдау', 'hu': 'Makró nyelvtanfolyamok és holisztikus indítás a hatékony szemantikus értelmezéshez', 'mk': 'Макро грамари и холистички пребарувања за ефикасна семантична анализа', 'it': "Grammatica macro e trigger olistico per un'analisi semantica efficiente", 'lt': 'Makrogramos ir holistinis triukšmas veiksmingam semantiniam analizavimui', 'ms': 'Makro Grammar dan Pemindahan Holistik untuk Menghurai Semantik Efisien', 'mt': 'Makro Grammars u Triggering Olistiku għall-Analiżi Semantika Effiċjenti', 'mn': 'Макро дамжуулагчид болон холистик дамжуулагч', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന് വേണ്ടി മാക്രോ ഗ്രാമാറ്റരും ഹോളിസ്റ്റിക് ട്രിഗ്രിഗ്രിങ്ങ്', 'no': 'Makro- grammar og holistisk uttrykking for effektiv semantisk tolking', 'pl': 'Gramatyka makro i całościowe wyzwalanie dla efektywnego parowania semantycznego', 'ro': 'Macrogramatice și declanșare holistică pentru o analiză semantică eficientă', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Makrogrammar och holistisk triggning för effektiv semantisk tolkning', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Efficient Semantic Parsing', 'sr': 'Makro Grammars i Holistički Triggering za učinkovito semantičko razmatranje', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cải cách vĩ đại và khả năng kích thích tinh thần hiệu quả.', 'bg': 'Макрограми и холистично задействане за ефективно семантично анализиране', 'hr': 'Makro Grammars i Holistički Triggering za učinkovito semantičko razmatranje', 'nl': "Macro grammatica's en holistische triggering voor efficiënte semantische parsing", 'da': 'Makrogrammer og holistisk udløsning for effektiv semantisk fortolkning', 'id': 'Macro Grammars dan Triggering Holistic untuk Penganalisis Semantik Efisien', 'fa': 'ماکروگرم\u200cها و تلاش\u200cکننده\u200cهای هولیستیکی برای پرداخت سامانتیک فعالی', 'de': 'Makrogrammatiken und ganzheitliche Triggerung für effizientes semantisches Parsing', 'ko': '매크로 문법과 전체 트리거는 효율적인 의미 분석에 사용된다', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Macro na Uchaguzi wa Kiholistic kwa ajili ya Kucheza Kitendo cha Semantic', 'tr': 'unit-format', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Efficient Semantic Parsing', 'hy': 'Մաքրոգրամարներ և հոլիստիկ խթանիչներ էֆեկտիկ սեմանտիկ վերլուծության համար', 'bn': 'কার্যকর সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য ম্যাক্রো গ্রামার এবং হোলিস্টিক ট্রাইগার', 'az': 'Makro Grammar və Holistik İşkin Semantik İşləməsi üçün Dönüş', 'cs': 'Makro gramatiky a holistické spouštění pro efektivní sémantické analýzy', 'ca': 'Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Efficient Semantic Parsing', 'bs': 'Makro Grammars i Holistički trčanje za učinkovito semantičko razmatranje', 'fi': 'Makrogrammit ja holistinen laukaisu tehokkaaseen semanttiseen parsaukseen', 'et': 'Makrogrammid ja holistilised käivitused tõhusaks semantiliseks parsimiseks', 'am': 'Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Effective Semantic Parsing', 'jv': '(c) 2007-2007, Kemerdekaan Karo SVG', 'he': 'מאקרו גראמארס והוליסטית לניתוח סמנטי יעיל', 'sk': 'Makro grammatike in holistično sprožanje za učinkovito semantično razčlenjevanje', 'ha': 'Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Efficient Semantic Parsing', 'bo': 'Efficient Semantic Parsing for Macro Grammars and Holistic Triggering for Efficient Semantic Parsing'}
{'en': 'To learn a semantic parser from denotations, a learning algorithm must search over a combinatorially large space of logical forms for ones consistent with the annotated denotations. We propose a new online learning algorithm that searches faster as training progresses. The two key ideas are using macro grammars to cache the abstract patterns of useful logical forms found thus far, and holistic triggering to efficiently retrieve the most relevant patterns based on sentence similarity. On the WikiTableQuestions dataset, we first expand the search space of an existing model to improve the state-of-the-art accuracy from 38.7 % to 42.7 %, and then use macro grammars and holistic triggering to achieve an 11x speedup and an accuracy of 43.7 %.', 'ar': 'لتعلم محلل دلالي من الدلالات ، يجب أن تبحث خوارزمية التعلم على مساحة كبيرة اندماجيًا من الأشكال المنطقية للأشكال المتوافقة مع الدلالات المشروحة. نقترح خوارزمية جديدة للتعلم عبر الإنترنت تبحث بشكل أسرع مع تقدم التدريب. تستخدم الفكرتان الأساسيتان القواعد النحوية الكلية للتخزين المؤقت للأنماط المجردة للأشكال المنطقية المفيدة التي تم العثور عليها حتى الآن ، والتحفيز الشامل لاسترداد الأنماط الأكثر صلة بكفاءة بناءً على تشابه الجملة. في مجموعة بيانات WikiTableQuestions ، نقوم أولاً بتوسيع مساحة البحث الخاصة بنموذج موجود لتحسين الدقة الحديثة من 38.7٪ إلى 42.7٪ ، ثم استخدام القواعد النحوية الكلية والتشغيل الشامل لتحقيق تسريع 11x ودقة تبلغ 43.7٪.', 'fr': "Pour apprendre un analyseur sémantique à partir de dénotations, un algorithme d'apprentissage doit rechercher dans un espace combinatoire de formes logiques cohérentes avec les dénotations annotées. Nous proposons un nouvel algorithme d'apprentissage en ligne qui accélère les recherches au fur et à mesure que l'entraînement progresse Les deux idées clés sont l'utilisation de macrogrammaires pour mettre en cache les modèles abstraits des formes logiques utiles trouvées jusqu'à présent, et le déclenchement holistique pour récupérer efficacement les modèles les plus pertinents en fonction de la similitude des phrases. Sur l'ensemble de données WikiTableQuestions, nous élargissons d'abord l'espace de recherche d'un modèle existant afin d'améliorer la précision de pointe de 38,7\xa0% à 42,7\xa0%, puis nous utilisons des macrogrammaires et un déclenchement holistique pour atteindre une accélération 11 fois et une précision de 43,7\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Para aprender um analisador semântico a partir de denotações, um algoritmo de aprendizado deve procurar em um grande espaço combinatório de formas lógicas aquelas consistentes com as denotações anotadas. Propomos um novo algoritmo de aprendizado online que pesquisa mais rapidamente à medida que o treinamento avança. As duas ideias-chave são o uso de macrogramáticas para armazenar em cache os padrões abstratos de formas lógicas úteis encontradas até agora e o acionamento holístico para recuperar com eficiência os padrões mais relevantes com base na similaridade de frases. No conjunto de dados WikiTableQuestions, primeiro expandimos o espaço de pesquisa de um modelo existente para melhorar a precisão de última geração de 38,7% para 42,7% e, em seguida, usamos gramáticas macro e acionamento holístico para obter uma aceleração de 11x e uma precisão de 43,7%.', 'es': 'Para aprender un analizador semántico a partir de las denotaciones, un algoritmo de aprendizaje debe buscar en un espacio combinatoriamente grande de formas lógicas las que sean consistentes con las denotaciones anotadas. Proponemos un nuevo algoritmo de aprendizaje en línea que busca más rápido a medida que avanza la formación. Las dos ideas clave son el uso de macrogramáticas para almacenar en caché los patrones abstractos de formas lógicas útiles encontradas hasta ahora, y la activación holística para recuperar de manera eficiente los patrones más relevantes en función de la similitud de las oraciones. En el conjunto de datos de WikiTableQuestions, primero ampliamos el espacio de búsqueda de un modelo existente para mejorar la precisión más avanzada del 38,7% al 42,7%, y luego utilizamos macrogramáticas y activación holística para lograr una aceleración de 11 veces y una precisión del 43,7%.', 'ja': '記号からセマンティック構文解析器を学習するために、学習アルゴリズムは、注釈された記号と一致する論理形式の組み合わせの大きな空間を検索しなければならない。トレーニングが進むにつれて、検索が速くなる新しいオンライン学習アルゴリズムを提案します。2つの主要なアイデアは、マクロ文法を使用して、これまでに見つかった有用な論理形式の抽象的なパターンをキャッシュし、文の類似性に基づいて最も関連性の高いパターンを効率的に取得するための全体的なトリガーです。WikiTableQuestionsデータセットでは、最初に既存のモデルの検索スペースを拡張して、最先端の精度を38.7%から42.7%に向上させ、次にマクロ文法とホリスティックトリガーを使用して11倍のスピードアップと43.7%の精度を実現します。', 'ru': 'Чтобы выучить семантический парсер из денотаций, обучающий алгоритм должен искать в комбинаторно большом пространстве логических форм те, которые согласуются с аннотированными денотациями. Мы предлагаем новый алгоритм онлайн-обучения, который быстрее ищет по ходу обучения. Двумя ключевыми идеями являются использование макрограмм для кэширования абстрактных паттернов полезных логических форм, найденных до сих пор, и целостный триггер для эффективного извлечения наиболее релевантных паттернов на основе сходства предложений. В наборе данных WikiTableQuestions мы сначала расширяем пространство поиска существующей модели, чтобы улучшить современную точность с 38,7% до 42,7%, а затем используем макрограматику и целостный триггер для достижения 11-кратного ускорения и точности 43,7%.', 'hi': 'denotations से एक शब्दार्थ पार्सर सीखने के लिए, एक सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म को एनोटेट किए गए डिनोटेशन के अनुरूप लोगों के लिए तार्किक रूपों के एक संयोजनात्मक रूप से बड़े स्थान पर खोज करनी चाहिए। हम एक नया ऑनलाइन लर्निंग एल्गोरिथ्म प्रस्तावित करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण की प्रगति के रूप में तेजी से खोज करता है। दो प्रमुख विचार इस प्रकार अब तक पाए गए उपयोगी तार्किक रूपों के अमूर्त पैटर्न को कैश करने के लिए मैक्रो व्याकरण का उपयोग कर रहे हैं, और वाक्य समानता के आधार पर सबसे प्रासंगिक पैटर्न को कुशलतापूर्वक पुनः प्राप्त करने के लिए समग्र ट्रिगरिंग कर रहे हैं। WikiTableQuestions डेटासेट पर, हम पहले 38.7% से 42.7% तक अत्याधुनिक सटीकता में सुधार करने के लिए एक मौजूदा मॉडल के खोज स्थान का विस्तार करते हैं, और फिर 11x स्पीडअप और 43.7% की सटीकता प्राप्त करने के लिए मैक्रो व्याकरण और समग्र ट्रिगरिंग का उपयोग करते हैं।', 'zh': '学语义解析器于记号,学算法必于逻辑空中搜索与注同。 新在线学算法,随所习,搜索愈速。 二要用宏语法缓存迄今为止有用逻辑抽象模式,及全体触发以有效地检索相似性最相关者。 WikiTableQuestions之数集上,先广其形,先其最先进者准确性自38.7%至于42.7%,然后以宏语法体发之11倍43.7%之准确性。', 'ga': "Chun parsálaí shéimeantach a fhoghlaim ó shainchomharthaí, ní mór d'algartam foghlama cuardach a dhéanamh thar spás mór de fhoirmeacha loighciúla le haghaidh foirmeacha atá comhsheasmhach leis na sainchomharthaí anótáilte. Molaimid algartam foghlama ar líne nua a chuardaíonn níos tapúla de réir mar a théann oiliúint ar aghaidh. Tá an dá phríomhsmaoineamh ag baint úsáide as macra-ghramadach chun patrúin teibí na bhfoirmeacha úsáideacha loighciúla a aimsíodh go dtí seo a thaisceadh, agus spreagtha iomlánaíoch chun na patrúin is ábhartha a aisghabháil bunaithe ar chosúlacht abairtí. Ar thacar sonraí WikiTableQuestions, leathnóimid ar dtús spás cuardaigh samhail atá ann cheana féin chun an cruinneas úrscothach a fheabhsú ó 38.7% go 42.7%, agus ansin úsáidimid macra-ghramadach agus truicear iomlánaíoch chun luasghéarú 11x a bhaint amach agus cruinneas na 43.7%.", 'el': 'Για να μάθει έναν σημασιολογικό αναλυτή από τις υποδείξεις, ένας μαθησιακός αλγόριθμος πρέπει να αναζητήσει πάνω από ένα συνδυαστικά μεγάλο χώρο λογικών μορφών για αυτές που συνάδουν με τις υποδείξεις. Προτείνουμε έναν νέο αλγόριθμο εκμάθησης που αναζητά ταχύτερα καθώς προχωρά η εκπαίδευση. Οι δύο βασικές ιδέες είναι η χρήση μακρογραμματικών για να κρύψουν τα αφηρημένα μοτίβα χρήσιμων λογικών μορφών που βρέθηκαν μέχρι τώρα, και η ολιστική ενεργοποίηση για την αποτελεσματική ανάκτηση των πιο συναφών προτύπων βασισμένων στην ομοιότητα των προτάσεων. Στο σύνολο δεδομένων επεκτείνουμε πρώτα τον χώρο αναζήτησης ενός υπάρχοντος μοντέλου για να βελτιώσουμε την ακρίβεια τελευταίας τεχνολογίας από 38,7% σε 42,7%, και στη συνέχεια χρησιμοποιούμε μακρογραμματικές και ολιστική ενεργοποίηση για να επιτύχουμε 11επιτάχυνση και ακρίβεια 43,7%.', 'hu': 'A jelölésekből való szemantikai elemző tanulásához a tanulási algoritmusnak kombinációsan nagy logikai formák között kell keresnie azokat, amelyek megfelelnek a jegyzetelt jelöléseknek. Javasolunk egy új online tanulási algoritmust, amely a képzés előrehaladásával gyorsabban keres. A két kulcsfontosságú ötlet makrónyelveket használ az eddig talált hasznos logikai formák absztrakt mintázatainak gyorsítótárazására, és holisztikus indítás a mondatok hasonlóságán alapuló legrelevánsabb minták hatékony visszaszerezésére. A WikiTableQuestions adatkészleten először egy meglévő modell keresési területét bővítjük, hogy a legkorszerűbb pontosságot 38,7%-ról 42,7%-ra növeljük, majd makrónyomtatványokat és holisztikus triggereket használjunk, hogy 11x sebességet és 43,7%-os pontosságot érjünk el.', 'it': "Per imparare un parser semantico dalle denotazioni, un algoritmo di apprendimento deve cercare su uno spazio combinativamente grande di forme logiche quelle coerenti con le denotazioni annotate. Proponiamo un nuovo algoritmo di apprendimento online che cerca più velocemente man mano che la formazione progredisce. Le due idee chiave sono l'utilizzo di macro grammatiche per nascondere i modelli astratti di forme logiche utili finora trovati, e l'innesco olistico per recuperare in modo efficiente i modelli più rilevanti basati sulla somiglianza delle frasi. Sul set di dati WikiTableQuestions, prima espandiamo lo spazio di ricerca di un modello esistente per migliorare l'accuratezza all'avanguardia dal 38,7% al 42,7%, poi usiamo macro grammatiche e trigger olistici per raggiungere una velocità 11x e una precisione del 43,7%.", 'kk': 'Белгілерден семантикалық талдаушы оқыту үшін, оқыту алгоритмі жазылған белгілерде сәйкес келетін логикалық пішімдердің комбинациялық үлкен орын іздеу керек. Біз онлайн оқыту алгоритмін жаңа жұмыс істеу алгоритмін ұсынамыз. Екі негізгі идеяның макро граммаларын кэштеу үшін пайдалы логикалық пішімдердің абстракты үлгілерін қолданып, сөздердің ұқсастығына негізделген ең маңызды үлгілерін кэштеу үшін қолданылады. WikiTableQuestions деректер жинағында, біріншіден бар моделінің іздеу орынын 38,7% дегеннен 42,7% дегенге жақсарту үшін кеңейту үшін, біріншіден макро грамматтарды және толық жегілу үшін 11x жылдамдығын және 43,7% деген дұрыстығын қолданамыз.', 'lt': 'Siekiant išmokti semantinio analizatoriaus iš denotacijų, mokymosi algoritmas turi paieškoti per kombinatoriškai didelę loginių formų erdvę toms, kurios atitinka anotuotas denotacijas. Siūlome naują mokymosi internetu algoritmą, kuris greičiau ieško mokymo pažangos metu. The two key ideas are using macro grammars to cache the abstract patterns of useful logical forms found thus far, and holistic triggering to efficiently retrieve the most relevant patterns based on sentence similarity.  WikiTableQuestions duomenų rinkinyje pirmiausia išplėsime esamo modelio paieškos erdvę, kad pagerintume naujausią tikslumą nuo 38,7 % iki 42,7 %, o paskui naudosime makrogrammas ir holistinį paleidimą 11x greičio didinimui ir 43,7 % tikslumui pasiekti.', 'ka': 'სემონტიკური პანსერტის შესაძლებელად, სწავლის ალგორტიმმა უნდა ძებნა ლოგიკური ფორმების კომბინონიტურად დიდი სივრცე, რომლებიც არსებობს ამონიტურებული განსაზღვრებით. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი ინტერნეტური სწავლების ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც უფრო სწრაფად საძებნა, როდესაც სწრაფად სწრაფად სწავლება. ორი მნიშვნელოვანი იდეები მაკრო გრამიმარების გამოყენება გამოყენებული მაკრო გრამიმარების გამოყენება გამოსახულებელი ლოგიკური ფორმების აბსტრაკური ნაგულები, რომელიც აღმოჩენა ახლა, და WikiTableQuestions მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენ პირველად გავაკეთებთ მსოფლიო მოდელის საძიებო სივრცე, რომელიც 38,7%-დან 42,7%-დან გავაკეთებთ, და შემდეგ გამოყენებთ მაკრო გრამეტრები და ჰოლისტიკური გავაკეთება 11x სიჩქარე და 43,7%-ის', 'ml': 'ഡെനോറ്റേഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു സെമെമാന്റിക് പരിശോധന പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഒരു കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dന്നിട്ടുള്ള വലിയ ലോഗ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200d ഈ രണ്ടു പ്രധാന ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d മാക്രോ ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഇതുവരെ കണ്ടെത്തിയ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഉപ വിക്കിട്ടേബിളില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള ഒരു മോഡലിന്റെ തിരച്ചില്\u200d സ്ഥലം നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. 38. 7% മുതല്\u200d 42. 7%, പിന്നെ മാക്രോ ഗ്രാമാരും ഹ', 'mn': 'Хувааллаас семантик хуваарч сурахын тулд суралцах алгоритм нь тодорхойлогдсон хуваарьтай харьцуулагддаг логик хэлбэрүүдийн нэг том орон зайг хайх хэрэгтэй. Бид онлайн суралцах алгоритмыг илүү хурдан хайж байгаа шинэ суралцах алгоритмыг санал болгож байна. Эдгээр хоёр чухал санаанууд макро грамм хэрэглэж байна. Энэ үед ашигтай логик хэлбэрийн абстракт хэлбэрүүдийг хадгалахын тулд хамгийн чухал хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж байна. WikiTableQuestion өгөгдлийн сан дээр эхлээд бид сургуулийн загварын хайх орон зайг 38.7% ээс 42.7% руу шинэчлэхэд нэмэгдүүлж, дараа нь макро грамм болон хамгийн бага зэрэг нэмэгдүүлэхэд 11x хурдтай, 43.7% тохиромжтой.', 'no': 'For å lære eit semantisk tolkar frå denosjonar må ein læringsalgoritme søkja over eit kombinasjonelt stor plass av logiske skjemar for dei som er samsvarande med notasjonane. Vi foreslår ein ny online læringsalgoritme som søker raskare når opplæring framgår. Dei to nøkkelideane brukar makro-grammar for å lagra inn abstrakte mønsterene av nyttige logiske formar som er funne til dag, og holistiske utløysing for å henta dei mest relevante mønsterene basert på setningslimykje. På datasettet WikiTableQuestions, utvida vi først søkjemodellen til eit eksisterande modell for å forbedra nøyaktighet for kunsten frå 38,7% til 42,7%, og så bruka makrogrammer og holistisk utløysing for å oppnå ein 11x raskaren og ein nøyaktighet på 43,7%.', 'pl': 'Aby nauczyć się parsera semantycznego z denotacji, algorytm uczenia się musi przeszukiwać w kombinatorowo dużej przestrzeni form logicznych w poszukiwaniu tych zgodnych z adnotacjami. Proponujemy nowy algorytm nauki online, który szybciej wyszukuje w miarę postępu treningu. Dwa kluczowe pomysły to wykorzystanie makro gramatyki do buforowania abstrakcyjnych wzorców użytecznych form logicznych znalezionych dotychczas, oraz holistyczne wyzwalanie, aby skutecznie odzyskać najbardziej istotne wzorce oparte na podobieństwie zdań. W zestawie danych WikiTableQuestions najpierw rozszerzamy przestrzeń wyszukiwania istniejącego modelu, aby poprawić najnowocześniejszą dokładność z 38,7% do 42,7%, a następnie używamy gramatyki makro i całościowego wyzwalania, aby osiągnąć 11x przyspieszenie i dokładność 43,7%.', 'ms': 'Untuk belajar penghurai semantik dari denotasi, algoritma pembelajaran mesti mencari di atas ruang besar kombinatorial bentuk logik untuk bentuk yang konsisten dengan denotasi yang dicatat. Kami cadangkan algoritma pembelajaran online baru yang mencari lebih cepat semasa latihan berjalan. Dua idea kunci menggunakan grammar makro untuk menyimpan corak abstrak bentuk logik berguna yang ditemui sejauh ini, dan pemicu holistik untuk mengambil semula corak yang paling berkaitan berdasarkan persamaan kalimat. Dalam set data WikiTableQuestions, kita pertama-tama mengembangkan ruang gelintar model yang ada untuk meningkatkan ketepatan-state-of-the-art dari 38.7% kepada 42.7%, dan kemudian menggunakan makrograma dan pemicu holistik untuk mencapai kecepatan 11x dan ketepatan 43.7%.', 'mk': 'За да се научи семантичен анализатор од денотациите, алгоритмот за учење мора да пребарува преку комбинаторно голем простор на логични форми за оние кои се совпаѓаат со анотираните денотации. Предложуваме нов онлајн алгоритм за учење кој побрзо бара додека обуката напредува. Двете клучни идеи се користат макрограми за да ги скријат апстрактните шеми на корисни логични форми кои се најдени досега, и холистички поттикнувања за ефикасно да се вратат најрелевантните шеми врз основа на сличноста на речениците. На податоците на WikiTableQuestions прво го прошируваме просторот за пребарување на постоечкиот модел за подобрување на најсовремената точност од 38,7 отсто на 42,7 отсто, а потоа користиме макрограми и холистичко активирање за да постигнеме 11x брзина и 43,7 отсто точност.', 'ro': 'Pentru a învăța un parser semantic din denotări, un algoritm de învățare trebuie să caute peste un spațiu combinator mare de forme logice pentru cele coerente cu denotările adnotate. Propunem un nou algoritm de învățare online care caută mai repede pe măsură ce antrenamentul progresează. Cele două idei cheie sunt utilizarea macro gramaticilor pentru a cache modelele abstracte ale formelor logice utile găsite până în prezent, și declanșarea holistică pentru a recupera în mod eficient cele mai relevante modele bazate pe similitudinea propozițiilor. În setul de date WikiTableQuestions, extindem mai întâi spațiul de căutare al unui model existent pentru a îmbunătăți acuratețea de ultimă generație de la 38,7% la 42,7%, apoi folosim macro gramatici și declanșarea holistică pentru a obține o viteză de 11x și o acuratețe de 43,7%.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් විශාලකයක් පිළිබඳින් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ඉගෙන ගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විශාල විශාල ප්\u200dරතික අපි අළුත් අන්තර්ජාලයේ ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධා කරන්න පුළුවන් වේගයෙන් හොයා මැක්රෝ ග්\u200dරාමාර්මාර් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ලෝකික වර්ගයක් හොයාගෙන ඉන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා මෙතනට හොයාගෙන ඉන්න ප්\u200dර විකිටේබ්ල් ප්\u200dරශ්න දත්ත සැටුමේ අපි මුලින්ම තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන සොයාගැන අවස්ථාවක් විස්තර කරනවා, 38.7% වල 42.7% වලින්, ඊට පස්සේ මැක්රෝ ග්\u200dරාමාර්ස් ස', 'so': 'Si aad u barato baaritaanka semantiga ah, waa in algoritka waxbarashada looga baaraandegaa noocyo faro badan oo la xiriira noocyada caadiga ah. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qoraal cusub oo barashada shabakadda ah, kaas oo si dhaqso u raadinaya horumarinta waxbarashada. Labada fikrada ee muhiimka ah waxay isticmaalayaan macro grammar, si ay u cajiidaan noocyada waxyaabaha leh oo faa’iidada ah oo ay u helaan tan iyo hada, iyo tusaalaha ugu muhiimsan in aad si fiican u hesho qaababka ugu saabsan ee ugu habboon xafiiska garsoorida. On the WikiTableQuestions Dataset, we first expand search space of an existing model to improve the state-art accuracy from 38.7% to 42.7%, and then use macro grammars and holistic triggering to achieve 11x speed and accuracy of 43.7%.', 'mt': "Biex jitgħallem analizzatur semantiku mid-denotazzjonijiet, algoritmu ta’ tagħlim għandu jfittex fuq spazju kombinatorju kbir ta’ forom loġiċi għal dawk konsistenti mad-denotazzjonijiet annotati. Aħna nipproponu algoritmu ġdid ta' tagħlim onlajn li jfittex aktar malajr hekk kif it-taħriġ jimxi 'l quddiem. Iż-żewġ ideat ewlenin huma l-użu ta’ makrogrammi biex jinħażnu l-mudelli astratti ta’ forom loġiċi utli li nstabu s’issa, u li jiskattaw olistikament biex jinkisbu b’mod effiċjenti l-mudelli l-aktar rilevanti bbażati fuq is-similarità tas-sentenza. On the WikiTableQuestions dataset, we first expand the search space of an existing model to improve the state-of-the-art accuracy from 38.7% to 42.7%, and then use macro grammars and holistic triggering to achieve an 11x speedup and an accuracy of 43.7%.", 'sr': 'Da bi naučio semantički analitičar iz denotacija, algoritam učenja mora pretražiti kombinacionalno veliki prostor logičkih oblika za one koji su u skladu sa annotacijskim denotacijom. Predlažemo novi online naučni algoritam koji traži brže dok napreduje trening. Dvije ključne ideje koriste makro gramare kako bi sačuvali abstraktne obrasce korisnih logičkih oblika koje su do sada pronađene, i holističke aktiviranje da bi efikasno osvojili najvažnije obrasce na temelju sličnosti rečenica. Na podacima WikiTableQuestions, prvo smo proširili prostor pretraživanja postojećeg modela kako bi poboljšali tačnost stanja umjetnosti od 38,7% do 42,7%, a zatim koristili makro gramare i holističke aktivacije kako bi postigli 11x brzinu i tačnost od 43,7%.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட தொகுதிகளிலிருந்து ஒரு பெம்பான்டிக் பரிசோதனையை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு, கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் படிப்பியல் முறைமையாக ஒரு கூட்ட We propose a new online learning algorithm that searches faster as training progresses.  இந்த இரண்டு விசையான கருத்துக்கள் மேக்ரோ கிராமார்களை பயன்படுத்தி தற்போது கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட பயனுள்ள துணை வடிவங்களை நினைவில் கொள்கிறார்கள். மற்றும் வாக் விக்கிதத்தில் கேள்விகள் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில், நாம் முதலில் உள்ள ஒரு மாதிரியின் தேடும் இடைவெளியை விரிவாக்கி 38. 7% லிருந்து 42. 7%, பின்னர் மாக்ரோ கிராமார்கள் மற்றும் புதியச்செ', 'sv': 'För att lära sig en semantisk parser från beteckningar måste en inlärningsalgoritm söka över ett kombinatoriskt stort utrymme av logiska former efter sådana som överensstämmer med de kommenterade beteckningarna. Vi föreslår en ny online inlärningsalgoritm som söker snabbare när träningen fortskrider. De två nyckelidéerna är att använda makrogrammar för att cachelagra abstrakta mönster av användbara logiska former som hittats hittills, och holistisk trigger för att effektivt hämta de mest relevanta mönster baserade på meningsskillnader. I WikiTableQuestions datauppsättningen utökar vi först sökutrymmet för en befintlig modell för att förbättra den senaste noggrannheten från 38,7% till 42,7%, och använder sedan makrogrammar och holistisk triggning för att uppnå en 11x hastighet och en noggrannhet på 43,7%.', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی پارٹر کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک سیمنٹی پارٹر سیکھنا چاہیے کہ ایک سیکھنے الگوریٹم کو ایک کمینٹری طور پر بہت بڑی منطقی فرموں کی جگہ تلاش کرنا چاہیے ان کے لئے جن کی تعلیم یادہانی دکھانے کے ساتھ مطابق ہے. ہم ایک نئی آنلاین کی تعلیم الگوریتم کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس کی تعلیم پیشرفت کی حالت میں بہت سریع تلاش کرتی ہے۔ دو کلیز ایڈیوں مکرو گرامر کا استعمال کر رہے ہیں کہ یہاں تک فائدہ منطقی فرموں کی مثبت پٹروں کو کاسک کر سکیں، اور وہاں تک فائدہ اٹھایا گیا ہے کہ کلیزوں کی مثبت کے ذریعہ سے بہترین معتبر پٹروں کو اٹھ ویکیٹیبل سؤال ڈاٹ سٹ پر ہم پہلے ایک موجود موڈل کی تلاش کی جگہ پھیلاتے ہیں کہ 38.7% سے 42.7% تک موجود ہو سکتا ہے اور پھر مکرو گرامر اور holistic triggering کا استعمال کریں کہ 11x سرعت اور 43.7% کی دقیق پہنچ سکتے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Để học một phân tích ngữ pháp từ các thuật toán, thuật toán học phải tìm kiếm một khoảng trống rộng theo hợp lệ của các dạng logic cho những dạng được ghi chú. Chúng tôi đề xuất thuật toán học trực tuyến mới tìm kiếm nhanh hơn khi đào tạo tiến triển. Hai ý tưởng chủ chốt là sử dụng lời vĩ đại để che dấu các mô hình trừu tượng của những dạng logic hữu dụng được tìm thấy đến nay, và kích hoạt tổng thể để lấy được những mô hình liên quan nhất dựa trên nét giống câu. Trên tập tin WikiLTablelescâu, trước tiên chúng tôi mở rộng vùng tìm kiếm của một mô hình đã có để cải thiện độ chính xác thời đại từ 38.7. v. và sau đó sử dụng macro gramars và cài khởi động tổng thể để đạt được độ cao 11x và độ chính xác của 43.7.', 'uz': "Name Biz yangi tarmoq o'rganish algoritni tajriba qilish davomida tez qidirish. Ikkita tugma fikrlarini makro grammatika foydalanadi, bu yerda topilgan foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi shakllarni eslab qolish uchun, va holatning asosida eng muhim shakllarni o'zgartirish mumkin. WikiTable maʼlumotlar tarkibida, biz birinchi marta mavjud modelning qidirish joyini tezlashtiramiz 38.7% dan 42.7%, va keyin macro grammatika va holisticni ishlatish uchun 11x tezlik va 43.7%'ning imkoniyatini oshirish uchun foydalanamiz.", 'nl': "Om een semantische parser te leren van denotaties, moet een leeralgoritme zoeken over een combinatorisch grote ruimte van logische vormen naar degenen die overeenkomen met de annotaties. We stellen een nieuw online leeralgoritme voor dat sneller zoekt naarmate de training vordert. De twee belangrijkste ideeën zijn het gebruik van macro grammatica's om de abstracte patronen van nuttige logische vormen die tot nu toe zijn gevonden te cachen, en holistische triggers om efficiënt de meest relevante patronen op basis van zinsgelijkenis te vinden. Op de WikiTableQuestions dataset breiden we eerst de zoekruimte van een bestaand model uit om de state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid te verbeteren van 38,7% naar 42,7%, en gebruiken we vervolgens macro grammatica's en holistische triggering om een 11x versnelling en een nauwkeurigheid van 43,7%.", 'bg': 'За да научи семантичен анализатор от обозначения, алгоритъмът за учене трябва да търси в комбинаторно голямо пространство от логически форми такива, съответстващи на анотираните обозначения. Предлагаме нов алгоритъм за онлайн обучение, който търси по-бързо с напредването на обучението. Двете ключови идеи са използването на макро граматики за кеширане на абстрактните модели на полезни логически форми, открити досега, и холистичното задействане за ефективно извличане на най-релевантните модели въз основа на сходството на изреченията. В набора от данни първо разширяваме пространството за търсене на съществуващ модел, за да подобрим най-съвременната точност от 38,7% на 42,7%, а след това използваме макрограматика и холистично задействане, за да постигнем 11х ускорение и точност от 43,7%.', 'da': 'For at lære en semantisk fortolker fra denotationer, skal en læringsalgoritme søge over et kombineret stort rum af logiske former for dem, der er i overensstemmelse med de annoterede betegnelser. Vi foreslår en ny online læringsalgoritme, der søger hurtigere efterhånden som træningen skrider frem. De to nøgleideer bruger makrogrammer til at gemme de abstrakte mønstre af nyttige logiske former fundet indtil videre, og holistisk udløsning til effektivt at hente de mest relevante mønstre baseret på sætningens lighed. På WikiTableQuestions datasættet udvider vi først søgeområdet i en eksisterende model for at forbedre den nyeste nøjagtighed fra 38,7% til 42,7%, og derefter bruger vi makrogrammer og holistisk udløsning for at opnå en 11x hastighed og en nøjagtighed på 43,7%.', 'hr': 'Da bi naučio semantički analitičar iz denotacija, algoritam učenja mora pretražiti kombinacionalno veliki prostor logičkih oblika za one koji su u skladu s navedenim denotacijom. Predlažemo novi online učenjski algoritam koji brže traži dok napreduje trening. Dvije ključne ideje koriste makro gramare kako bi sklonili apstraktne obrasce korisnih logičkih oblika koje su do sada pronađene, i holističke aktiviranje kako bi učinkovito dobili najvažnije obrasce na temelju sličnosti rečenica. Na podacima WikiTableQuestions, prvo smo proširili prostor pretrage postojećeg modela kako bi poboljšali preciznost stanja umjetnosti od 38,7% do 42,7%, a zatim koristili makro gramare i holistički pokretač kako bi postigli 11x brzinu i preciznost od 43,7%.', 'de': 'Um einen semantischen Parser aus Denotationen zu lernen, muss ein Lernalgorithmus über einen kombinatorisch großen Raum logischer Formen nach solchen suchen, die mit den annotaierten Denotationen übereinstimmen. Wir schlagen einen neuen Online-Lernalgorithmus vor, der mit fortschreitendem Training schneller sucht. Die beiden Schlüsselideen sind die Verwendung von Makrogrammaren, um die abstrakten Muster der bisher gefundenen nützlichen logischen Formen zu cachen, und holistische Triggerung, um effizient die relevantesten Muster basierend auf Satzähnlichkeit abzurufen. Auf dem WikiTableQuestions-Datensatz erweitern wir zunächst den Suchraum eines vorhandenen Modells, um die aktuelle Genauigkeit von 38,7% auf 42,7% zu verbessern. Anschließend verwenden wir Makrogrammatiken und ganzheitliche Triggerung, um eine 11x Beschleunigung und eine Genauigkeit von 43,7%.', 'id': 'To learn a semantic parser from denotations, a learning algorithm must search over a combinatorially large space of logical forms for ones consistent with the annotated denotations.  Kami mengusulkan algoritma belajar online baru yang mencari lebih cepat saat latihan maju. Dua ide kunci menggunakan gramatika makro untuk menyimpan pola abstrak dari bentuk logis berguna yang ditemukan sejauh ini, dan pemicu holistik untuk mengambil pola yang paling relevan berdasarkan persamaan kalimat. Dalam set data WikiTableQuestions, kita pertama-tama memperluas ruang pencarian model yang ada untuk meningkatkan akurasi state-of-the-art dari 38,7% ke 42,7%, dan kemudian menggunakan gramatika makro dan pemicu holistik untuk mencapai kecepatan 11x dan akurasi 43,7%.', 'ko': '지칭에서 의미 해석기를 배우기 위해서는 학습 알고리즘이 조합된 큰 논리 형식 공간에서 주석 지칭과 일치하는 논리 형식을 검색해야 한다.우리는 훈련에 따라 더 빨리 검색할 수 있는 새로운 온라인 학습 알고리즘을 제시했다.이 두 가지 관건적인 사상은 지금까지 발견된 논리적 형식의 추상적 모델을 매크로 문법으로 캐시하고 문장의 유사성을 바탕으로 효율적인 검색과 가장 관련된 모델의 전체적인 촉발을 바탕으로 하는 것이다.WikiTableQuestions 데이터 세트에서 우리는 먼저 기존 모델의 검색 공간을 확장하여 가장 선진적인 정확도를 38.7%에서 42.7%로 높인 다음에 매크로 문법과 전체 트리거를 사용하여 11배의 가속비와 43.7%의 정확도를 실현한다.', 'fa': 'برای یاد گرفتن یک تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی semantic از تجزیه\u200cها، الگوریتم یادگیری باید در یک فضای بزرگ ترکیب از فرم\u200cهای منطقی برای فرم\u200cهای متناسب با تجزیه\u200cهای نوشته\u200cشده جستجو کند. ما یک الگوریتم یادگیری جدید آنلاین را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در حال پیشرفت آموزش سریع\u200cتر جستجو می\u200cکند. دو ایده کلیدی از مکرو گرامبر استفاده می کنند تا الگوهای مثبتی از فرم های منطقی مفید را تا هنوز یافته باشد، و کلیستی که تاثیر انگیز می کنند تا بطور موثرت الگوهای مربوط به شباهت جمله را برگیرد. در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ویکیتابل سوال، اول فضای جستجوی یک مدل موجود را گسترش دادیم تا دقیقات موجود هنر را از 38.7% به 42.7%، و سپس از گرامبر ماکرو و تاثیر جستجوی holistic برای رسیدن به سرعت 11x و دقیقات 43.7% استفاده کنیم.', 'sw': 'Ili kujifunza mchambuzi wa kimapenzi kutoka kwenye viwanja vya habari, algorithi ya kujifunza lazima kutafuta maeneo makubwa ya kiunganisha kwa ajili ya zile zinazohusiana na vigezo vinavyochapishwa. Tunapendekeza utaratibu mpya wa kujifunza mtandaoni unaotafuta haraka kama maendeleo ya mafunzo. Wazo mbili muhimu wanatumia gramma za makro kwa ajili ya kukumbuka mitindo ya kutetea mifano yenye matumizi ya kisasa yanayopatikana mpaka sasa, na utaratibu wa kutosha kwa ufanisi wa kupata mitindo yanayohusiana zaidi kwenye hukumu inayofanana na usawa. Katika seti ya taarifa za Maulizo ya WikiTable, tunapanua kwanza kutafuta nafasi ya muundo uliopo ili kuboresha uhakika wa hali ya sanaa kutoka asilimia 38.7 hadi asilimia 42.7, na kisha kutumia vipiga vifaa vya vifaa na utaratibu wa kutafuta kasi ya 11x na uhakika wa asilimia 43.7.', 'tr': 'Ziraatlardan bir semantik tanyörü öwrenmek üçin bir öğrenme algoritmi ifade edilen bölümlerle uyumlu, birleşmiş şeklinde logik biçimleri üzerinde büyük bir alan aramalıdır. Biz internetde çalt öwrenmek algoritmi teklip edip, okuw öwrenmesi üçin çalt gözleýär. İki önemli fikir macro grammalarını şu anda bulunan kullanıcı lojik biçimlerin abstrakt örneklerini tasarruf etmek için kullanarak, ve holistik şekilleri sözler benzerine dayanan en önemli örnekleri elde etmek için kullanıyor. WikiTableSoraglar sahypasynda, ilkinji gezek bar bir nusganyň arasynda 38,7% we 42,7% durumyny düzeltmek üçin mekdeplerde hat çykyp, soňra makro gramlaryny we holistik hereket edip 11x we 43,7% derejesini artmak üçin ullanyň.', 'sq': 'To learn a semantic parser from denotations, a learning algorithm must search over a combinatorially large space of logical forms for ones consistent with the annotated denotations.  Ne propozojmë një algoritëm të ri të mësimit online që kërkon më shpejt ndërsa stërvitja përparon. The two key ideas are using macro grammars to cache the abstract patterns of useful logical forms found thus far, and holistic triggering to efficiently retrieve the most relevant patterns based on sentence similarity.  Në kompletin e të dhënave WikiTableQuestions, ne së pari zgjerojmë hapësirën e kërkimit të një modeli ekzistues për të përmirësuar saktësinë e state-of-the-art nga 38.7% në 42.7%, dhe pastaj përdorim makrogrammat dhe shkaktimin holistik për të arritur një shpejtësi 11x dhe një saktësi prej 43.7%.', 'af': "Om 'n semantiese ontleerder van belangrike te leer, 'n leer algoritme moet deursoek oor' n kombinasie groot ruimte van logiese vorms vir een wat ooreenstemmende met die notasies is. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe online leer algoritme wat vinniger soek as onderwerp voortgaan. Die twee sleutel idee gebruik makro gramme om die abstrakte patrone van nuttige logiese vorms te cache wat tot nou gevind het, en holistiese uitleier om die mees relevante patrone te ontvang wat op setgelykheid gebaseer is. Op die WikiTableQuestions-datastel, het ons eerste die soektog ruimte van 'n bestaande model uitbrei om die staat-van-kuns-presies van 38.7% tot 42.7%, en dan gebruik makro gramme en holistiese uitbreiding om 'n 11x-speedspeedspeedspeedtoe en 'n presisie van 43.7%.", 'am': 'የተማረ አሌጎርቲም በተቃውሞ በተቃውሞ የሎጂካዊ ፎቶችን ለመማር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ አዲስ የኢንተርኔት ትምህርት መግለጫ ፍለጋን እንደሚፈልግ አዲስ መፍጠርን እናስጀጋለን፡፡ የሁለቱ የቁልፎች አእምሮዎች ማክሮ ግራማር ሲጠይቁ፣ እስከ አሁን ድረስ የተጠቃሚ የሎጂ ፎርማቶችን ለማሳየት እና በተግባራዊ ሥርዓት ላይ የተጠቃሚ ሥርዓቶችን ለማስጠንቀቅ እና በቁጥጥር ላይ የተጠቃሚ ሥርዓቶችን ለማስጠንቀቅ እና በተጨማሪነት ለመስጠት የሚችሉትን አካሄ በWikiTableQuestions Dataset, first expanding the search space of an existing model to improve the state of-art accuracy from 38.7% to 42.7%, and then macro grammars and holistic triggers to achieve 11x speed and accuracy of 43.7%.', 'hy': 'Դանոտացիաներից սեմանտիկ վերլուծում սովորելու համար սովորելու ալգորիթմը պետք է գտներ գտնվող լոգիական ձևերի համադրական մեծ տարածքը նշումների հետ համապատասխանող ձևերի համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր առցանց ուսուցման ալգորիթմ, որը ավելի արագ է փնտրում ուսուցման առաջընթացքում: Երկու կարևոր գաղափարներն այն են, որ օգտագործում են մակրոգրամատիպ գրամատիպ, որպեսզի պահպանեն մինչ այժմ գտնվող օգտակար տրամաբանական ձևերի վերացական կաղապարները, և ամբողջական գործընթացը, որպեսզի արդյունավետ վերադարձնեն ամենա WiKiTableQ-ի տվյալների համակարգում մենք սկզբում ընդլայնում ենք գոյություն ունեցող մոդելի որոնման տարածքը, որպեսզի բարելավենք լավագույն ճշգրտությունը 38.7 տոկոսից 42.7 տոկոսին, հետո օգտագործում ենք մակրոգրամատիկ և ամբողջական խթանիչներ 11x արագության և 43.7 տոկոսի ճշգրտության հասնելու համար:', 'bn': 'ডেনোটেশন থেকে একটি সেমেন্টিক প্যালেজার শিখার জন্য, একটি শিক্ষার অ্যালগরিদম ক্ষেত্রে একটি বিশাল বিশাল জায়গায় অনুসন্ধান করতে হবে যেগুলো আমরা একটি নতুন অনলাইন শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদম প্রস্তাব করছি যা প্রশিক্ষণের উন্নয়ন হিসেবে দ্রুত অনুসন্ধান করে। এই দুই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চিন্তা ম্যাক্রো গ্রামার ব্যবহার করছে যাতে এখন পর্যন্ত ব্যবহারকারী লোগিক্যাল ফর্মের প্রান্ত ক্যাশ করা হয়েছে এবং এই বাক্যের ভিত্তিতে সব উইকিটিট্যাবেলে প্রশ্নের তথ্য সেটে, আমরা প্রথমে বিদ্যমান একটি মডেলের সন্ধানের স্থান বৃদ্ধি করি যাতে ৩৮. ৭% থেকে ৪২.', 'bs': 'Da bi naučio semantički analitičar iz denotacija, algoritam učenja mora pretražiti kombinacionalno veliki prostor logičkih oblika za one koji se uključuju s annotiranim denotacijom. Predlažemo novi online naučni algoritam koji traži brže dok napreduje trening. Dvije ključne ideje koriste makro gramare kako bi sklonili abstraktne obrasce korisnih logičkih oblika koje su do sada pronađene, i holističke aktiviranje da bi efikasno osvojili najvažnije obrasce na temelju sličnosti rečenica. Na podacima WikiTableQuestions, prvo smo proširili prostor pretraživanja postojećeg modela kako bi poboljšali tačnost stanja umjetnosti od 38,7% do 42,7%, a zatim koristili makro gramme i holističke pokretanje kako bi postigli 11x brzinu i tačnost od 43,7%.', 'ca': "Per aprendre un analitzador semàntic a partir de denotacions, un algoritme d'aprenentatge ha de buscar un espai combinatoriament gran de formes lògiques per a aquells que siguin compatibles amb les denotacions anotates. Proposem un nou algoritme d'aprenentatge en línia que busque més ràpid mentre l'entrenament progressa. Les dues idees clau estan utilitzant macrogramàtiques per emmagatzemar els patrons abstracts de formes lògiques útils que s'han trobat fins ara, i el desencadenament holístic per recuperar eficientment els patrons més rellevants basats en la similitud de frases. En el conjunt de dades WikiTableQuestions, primer estem l'espai de cerca d'un model existent per millorar la precisió d'última generació del 38,7% al 42,7%, i després utilitzem macrogramàtiques i desencadenament holístic per aconseguir una velocitat de 11x i una precisió de 43,7%.", 'az': 'Ziyarətlərdən semantik ayırıcı öyrənmək üçün, öyrənmə algoritmi müəyyən edilənlərlə uyğun şəkildə uyğun şəkildə olan şəkildə çox çox lojik formlar arasında araması lazımdır. Biz online öyrənmə algoritmi təklif edirik ki, təhsil sürətindən daha hızlı axtarır. İki nöqtəli fikir, şimdiye qədər tapılmış faydalı logik formların abstraktlı nümunələrini keçirmək üçün makro qrammalarını istifadə edir, və cümlələrin bənzərinə dayanan ən münasibətli nümunələri təşkil etmək üçün holistik təşkil edir. WikiTableQuestions verilər qutusunda, ilk dəfə mövcud bir modelin arama alanını 38,7%-dən 42,7%-ə düzəltmək üçün art ırdıq, sonra makro grammalarını və holistik tələb etmək üçün 11x hızlandırma və 43,7%-ə düzəltmək üçün istifadə edirik.', 'cs': 'Chcete-li se naučit sémantický parser z denotací, musí učební algoritmus hledat v kombinatorně velkém prostoru logických forem ty, které odpovídají anotovaným denotacím. Navrhujeme nový online učební algoritmus, který vyhledává rychleji s postupem tréninku. Dvě klíčové myšlenky jsou použití makrogramatiky k ukládání abstraktních vzorů užitečných logických forem nalezených dosud, a holistické spouštění k efektivnímu získání nejvýznamnějších vzorů založených na podobnosti vět. V datové sadě WikiTableQuestions nejprve rozšiřujeme vyhledávací prostor existujícího modelu, abychom zlepšili nejmodernější přesnost od 38,7% na 42,7%, a pak používáme makrogramatiky a holistické spouštění k dosažení 11x zrychlení a přesnosti 43,7%.', 'fi': 'Oppiakseen semanttisen jäsentäjän denotaatioista oppimisalgoritmin on etsittävä yhdistelmällisesti suuresta loogisista muodoista sellaisia, jotka ovat sopusoinnussa annotoitujen denotaatioiden kanssa. Ehdotamme uutta online-oppimisalgoritmia, joka hakee nopeammin koulutuksen edetessä. Kaksi keskeistä ideaa ovat makrogrammojen käyttäminen tähän mennessä löydettyjen hyödyllisten loogisten muotojen abstraktien kuvioiden välimuistiin ja holistinen triggeri lauseidensamankaltaisuuteen perustuvien olennaisimpien kuvioiden tehokkaaseen hakemiseen. WikiTableQuestions-aineistossa laajennamme ensin olemassa olevan mallin hakutilaa parantaaksemme viimeisintä tarkkuutta 38,7 prosentista 42,7 prosenttiin ja sitten käytämme makrogrammoja ja kokonaisvaltaista triggeriä 11-kertaisen nopeutumisen ja 43,7 prosentin tarkkuuden saavuttamiseksi.', 'et': 'Et õppida semantilist parserit denotatsioonidest, peab õppealgoritm otsima kombinatsiooniliselt suurest loogiliste vormide ruumist annotatsioonidega kooskõlas olevaid vorme. Pakume välja uue online-õppe algoritmi, mis otsib kiiremini koolituse edenemisel. Kaks peamist ideed on makrogrammatika kasutamine seni leitud kasulike loogiliste vormide abstraktsete mustrite vahemällu salvestamiseks ja terviklik käivitamine lausete sarnasusel põhinevate kõige asjakohasemate mustrite tõhusaks hankimiseks. WikiTableQuestions andmekogumis laiendame kõigepealt olemasoleva mudeli otsinguruumi, et parandada kaasaegset täpsust 38,7%-lt 42,7%-le, ning seejärel kasutame makrogrammatikat ja terviklikku triggerit 11-kordse kiirenduse ja 43,7% täpsuse saavutamiseks.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan Awak dh챕w챕 ngerasah Algoritmi sing nggawe online Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk Nang dataset WiTableResolution', 'ha': "Kuskure ya sanar da parse na semantic daga sunotes, sai an buƙata algoritm mai amfani da shi kan wani fili mai girma na kima da ɗabi'a, don su sami da saurin da aka taɓa. Munã goyyar da wani algoriti na karanta na Online, wanda ke nẽman kashfiya mafarako kamar mafarako. Maɓallin mawadãta biyu sunã amfani da grammar macro dõmin ka cafe tsarin tsaro na tsaro masu amfani da shiryoyin logical na amfani yanzu har a yanzu, kuma masu ƙarawi ya yi amfani da shiryoyin da ke da inganci a kan maganar. On the WikiTable", 'sk': 'Za učenje semantičnega razčlenjevalnika iz denotacij mora učni algoritem prek kombinatorsko velikega prostora logičnih oblik iskati tiste, ki so skladne z označenimi denotacijami. Predlagamo nov algoritem spletnega učenja, ki išče hitreje z napredovanjem usposabljanja. Dve ključni zamisli sta uporaba makroslovničnih slovnic za predpomnjenje abstraktnih vzorcev uporabnih logičnih oblik, ki so jih našli doslej, in holistično sprožitev za učinkovito pridobivanje najpomembnejših vzorcev, ki temeljijo na podobnosti stavkov. V naboru podatkov WikiTableQuestions najprej razširimo iskalni prostor obstoječega modela, da bi izboljšali najsodobnejšo natančnost z 38,7% na 42,7%, nato pa uporabimo makroslovnične slovnice in celostno sprožitev, da dosežemo 11-kratno pospešitev in natančnost 43,7%.', 'he': 'To learn a semantic parser from denotations, a learning algorithm must search over a combinatorially large space of logical forms for ones consistent with the annotated denotations.  אנחנו מציעים אלגוריתם חדש ללמוד באינטרנט שמחפש מהר יותר כשהאימונים מתקדמים. שני הרעיונות המפתחות משתמשים בגרמטיקות מקרו כדי להחביא את הדפוסים המתוקפים של צורות הגיוניות שימושיות שמצאו עד כה, והוליסטית מתחילה להשיג באופן יעיל את הדפוסים הרלוונטיים ביותר בהתבסס על דומות משפטים. על קבוצת מידע WikiTableQuestions, אנו קודם מרחיבים את מרחב החיפוש של דוגמא קיימת כדי לשפר את הדיוקת המצב המיוחד מ-38.7% ל-42.7%, ולאחר מכן להשתמש בגרמטיקות מקרו והליסטית להפעיל כדי להשיג 11x מהירות ודיוקת של 43.7%.', 'bo': 'གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་སློབ་གླེང་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གསརཔ་ཞིག་ལ་མགོ་སྐབས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གཙོ་ཆེ་བའི་བསམ་བློ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མ་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་རྣམ ཝིག་ཤོག་བྱང་འདྲི་ཚིག'}
{'en': 'A Continuously Growing Dataset of Sentential Paraphrases', 'ar': 'مجموعة بيانات متزايدة باستمرار من إعادة صياغة الجملة', 'es': 'Un conjunto de datos de paráfrasis de oraciones en continuo crecimiento', 'pt': 'Um conjunto de dados de paráfrases sentenciais em crescimento contínuo', 'fr': 'Un ensemble de données de paraphrases sententielles en constante évolution', 'ja': 'センテンシャル・パラフレーズの継続的な成長データセット', 'zh': '增长之感释义数据集', 'hi': 'Sentential Paraphrases का एक लगातार बढ़ता डेटासेट', 'ru': 'Непрерывно растущий набор данных о сентенциальных парафразах', 'ga': "Tacar Sonraí d'Athróga Pianbhreithe atá ag Fás go Leanúnach", 'ka': 'შეტყობინებული პარაფრაზების მონაცემების მონაცემები', 'hu': 'Az ítéletparafrázisok folyamatosan növekvő adatkészlete', 'el': 'Ένα συνεχώς αυξανόμενο σύνολο δεδομένων συναισθηματικών παραφράσεων', 'it': 'Un set di dati in continua crescita di parafrasi sentimentali', 'kk': 'Жіберуші парафралардың деректер бағдарламасы', 'lt': 'Nuolatiškai augantis Sentencinių parafrazių duomenų rinkinys', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Set Data Bertumbuh Terterus bagi Parafrasa Sentensial', 'mt': 'Sett ta’ Dejta li qed jikber b’mod kontinwu ta’ Parafrażijiet Sentenzjali', 'mn': 'Үүний сэтгэл санааны парафразын өгөгдлийн санаа үргэлжлүүлэхэд', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Ciągle rosnący zestaw danych parafraz sentencjalnych', 'ro': 'Un set de date în continuă creștere de parafraze sentințiale', 'sr': 'Neprestano rastući podatak poslanih parafraza', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Ett ständigt växande dataset av meningsparafraser', 'so': 'A Continuous Growing Dataset of Sentential Paraphrases', 'ta': 'Name', 'ml': 'സെന്\u200dറെന്\u200dറിയല്\u200d പാരാഫ്രാസുകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നുName', 'ur': 'Sentential Paraphrases کے دائمی بڑھنے والی ڈاٹیسٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ nhớ các cụm từ có gốc liên tục', 'nl': 'Een voortdurend groeiende dataset van zinsparafrases', 'de': 'Ein stetig wachsender Datensatz von Sentenzparaphrasen', 'id': 'Sebuah Set Data yang berkembang terus menerus dari Parafrasa Sentensial', 'bg': 'Непрекъснато нарастващ набор от данни от сетивни парафрази', 'da': 'Et kontinuerligt voksende datasæt af sætningsparafraser', 'hr': 'Neprestano rastući podaci o poslovnim parafrazama', 'ko': '끊임없이 증가하는 문장 해석 데이터 집합', 'fa': 'یک اطلاعات رشد دائمی از پارافریزهای سنتی', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Takwimu unaoendelea Kuongezeka', 'tr': 'Sensiýal paraphrazýasynyň daýagdaýy ösýär', 'sq': 'Një bazë të dhënash në rritje të vazhdueshme të parafrazave të ndjeshme', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'A Continuously Growing Dataset of Sentential Paraphrases', 'hy': 'Անընդհատ աճող արտահայտությունների տվյալների համակարգը', 'az': 'Sentsiyal Parafrazl…ôrin daƒüƒ±tƒ±lmasƒ±', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Neprestano rastući datum poslanih parafraza', 'ca': 'Un conjunt de dades constantment creixent de parafrases sentimentals', 'cs': 'Neustále rostoucí datová sada sentenciálních parafrází', 'et': 'Tunnelike parafraaside pidevalt kasvav andmekogum', 'fi': 'Jatkuvasti kasvava tietojoukko tunnelauseita', 'jv': 'Daftar kang daftar luwih dumateng Sentental', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Stalno rastoči podatkovni niz čustvenih parafraz', 'he': 'קבוצת נתונים גדולה ממשיכה של פראפרזיות רגשיות', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་མྱུར་བའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་ཡིག་འཕྲིན།'}
{'en': 'A major challenge in paraphrase research is the lack of parallel corpora. In this paper, we present a new method to collect large-scale sentential paraphrases from Twitter by linking tweets through shared URLs. The main advantage of our method is its simplicity, as it gets rid of the classifier or human in the loop needed to select data before annotation and subsequent application of paraphrase identification algorithms in the previous work. We present the largest human-labeled paraphrase corpus to date of 51,524 sentence pairs and the first cross-domain benchmarking for automatic paraphrase identification. In addition, we show that more than 30,000 new sentential paraphrases can be easily and continuously captured every month at ~70 % precision, and demonstrate their utility for downstream NLP tasks through phrasal paraphrase extraction. We make our code and data freely available.', 'ar': 'التحدي الرئيسي في إعادة صياغة البحث هو عدم وجود مجموعات موازية. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم طريقة جديدة لتجميع إعادة صياغة حسية واسعة النطاق من Twitter عن طريق ربط التغريدات عبر عناوين URL المشتركة. الميزة الرئيسية لطريقتنا هي بساطتها ، حيث إنها تتخلص من المصنف أو الإنسان في الحلقة اللازمة لتحديد البيانات قبل التعليق التوضيحي والتطبيق اللاحق لخوارزميات تحديد إعادة الصياغة في العمل السابق. نقدم أكبر مجموعة إعادة صياغة تحمل علامة بشريًا حتى الآن تتكون من 51.524 زوجًا من الجمل وأول قياس مرجعي عبر النطاق لتحديد إعادة الصياغة تلقائيًا. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نظهر أنه يمكن التقاط أكثر من 30000 عبارة جديدة بسهولة وباستمرار كل شهر بدقة تصل إلى 70٪ ، وإظهار فائدتها لمهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية من خلال استخراج العبارات. نجعل الكود والبيانات الخاصة بنا متاحة مجانًا.', 'pt': 'Um grande desafio na pesquisa de paráfrase é a falta de corpora paralelos. Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo método para coletar paráfrases sentenciais em larga escala do Twitter, vinculando tweets por meio de URLs compartilhados. A principal vantagem do nosso método é sua simplicidade, pois elimina o classificador ou humano no loop necessário para selecionar os dados antes da anotação e posterior aplicação de algoritmos de identificação de paráfrases no trabalho anterior. Apresentamos o maior corpus de paráfrases rotulados por humanos até o momento de 51.524 pares de frases e o primeiro benchmarking de domínio cruzado para identificação automática de paráfrases. Além disso, mostramos que mais de 30.000 novas paráfrases sentenciais podem ser capturadas de maneira fácil e contínua todos os meses com precisão de ~70% e demonstramos sua utilidade para tarefas de PNL downstream por meio da extração de paráfrases frasais. Disponibilizamos nosso código e dados gratuitamente.', 'es': 'Un desafío importante en la investigación parafraseada es la falta de cuerpos paralelos. En este artículo, presentamos un nuevo método para recopilar paráfrasis de oraciones a gran escala de Twitter mediante la vinculación de tuits a través de URL compartidas. La principal ventaja de nuestro método es su simplicidad, ya que elimina el clasificador o humano en el bucle necesario para seleccionar los datos antes de la anotación y la posterior aplicación de algoritmos de identificación de paráfrasis en el trabajo anterior. Presentamos el corpus de paráfrasis marcado por humanos más grande hasta la fecha de 51.524 pares de oraciones y la primera evaluación comparativa entre dominios para la identificación automática de paráfrasis. Además, demostramos que cada mes se pueden capturar más de 30.000 nuevas paráfrasis de oraciones de forma fácil y continua con una precisión de ~ 70%, y demostramos su utilidad para las tareas posteriores de la PNL mediante la extracción de paráfrasis frasales. Ponemos nuestro código y datos a disposición de forma gratuita.', 'fr': "L'un des principaux défis de la recherche en paraphrase est l'absence de corpus parallèles. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle méthode pour collecter des paraphrases sententielles à grande échelle à partir de Twitter en liant des tweets via des URL partagées. Le principal avantage de notre méthode est sa simplicité, car elle élimine le classificateur ou l'humain dans la boucle nécessaire pour sélectionner les données avant l'annotation et l'application ultérieure des algorithmes d'identification de paraphrase dans le travail précédent. Nous présentons le plus grand corpus de paraphrases étiquetées par des humains à ce jour avec 51 524 paires de phrases et le premier étalonnage interdomaine pour l'identification automatique de paraphrase. En outre, nous montrons que plus de 30 000 nouvelles paraphrases sententielles peuvent être saisies facilement et en continu chaque mois avec une précision d'environ 70\xa0%, et démontrons leur utilité pour les tâches de PNL en aval grâce à l'extraction de paraphrase phrasale. Nous mettons gratuitement notre code et nos données à disposition.", 'ja': 'パラフレーズ研究における大きな課題は、並列体の欠如である。本稿では、共有URLを通じてツイートをリンクさせることで、Twitterから大規模な意味論的パラフレーズを収集する新しい方法を提示する。私たちの方法の主な利点は、アノテーションの前にデータを選択し、前作でパラフレーズ識別アルゴリズムをその後適用するために必要なループ内の分類子または人間を排除するため、その単純さです。我々は、51,524の文のペアのこれまでで最大のヒト標識パラフレーズコーパスと、自動パラフレーズ識別のための最初のクロスドメインベンチマークを提示する。さらに、約70 ％の精度で毎月30,000を超える新しい意味のパラフレーズを簡単かつ継続的にキャプチャすることができ、フレーズのパラフレーズ抽出を通じてダウンストリームNLPタスクの有用性を実証することが示されています。当社はコードとデータを自由に利用できるようにしています。', 'zh': '释义一者,无平行语料库。 本文中,设共享URL链接推文以集Twitter大感知释义新法。 吾道之大要,其简性也,以其脱于注数之分人,及随于前事以释义识算法也。 展迄今为止之大者标释义语料库,凡 51,524 句对,而首用于自释义之识跨域略试之。 又明月可以缓连70%之精过30,000新句释义,因短语释义取证其下流NLP实用性也。 吾免费供吾代码数。', 'ru': 'Серьезной проблемой в исследованиях по перефразированию является отсутствие параллельных тел. В этой статье мы представляем новый метод сбора крупномасштабных перефразов из Twitter, связывая твиты через общие URL-адреса. Основным преимуществом нашего метода является его простота, поскольку он избавляется от классификатора или человека в цикле, необходимом для отбора данных до аннотации и последующего применения алгоритмов идентификации парафраз в предыдущей работе. Мы представляем крупнейший на сегодняшний день корпус из 51 524 пар предложений, помеченных человеком, и первый междоменный бенчмаркинг для автоматической идентификации парафраз. Кроме того, мы показываем, что каждый месяц можно легко и непрерывно захватывать более 30 000 новых строчных перефразов с точностью ~70%, и демонстрируем их полезность для последующих задач NLP посредством извлечения фразовых перефразов. Мы делаем наш код и данные свободными.', 'hi': 'व्याख्या अनुसंधान में एक बड़ी चुनौती समानांतर निगम की कमी है। इस पेपर में, हम साझा यूआरएल के माध्यम से ट्वीट्स को जोड़कर ट्विटर से बड़े पैमाने पर भेजे गए पैराफ्रेज़ को इकट्ठा करने के लिए एक नई विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारी विधि का मुख्य लाभ इसकी सादगी है, क्योंकि यह एनोटेशन से पहले डेटा का चयन करने के लिए आवश्यक लूप में क्लासिफायर या मानव से छुटकारा पा लेता है और पिछले काम में व्याख्या पहचान एल्गोरिदम के बाद के आवेदन। हम 51,524 वाक्य जोड़े की तारीख तक का सबसे बड़ा मानव-लेबल वाला पैराफ्रेज कॉर्पस और स्वचालित व्याख्या पहचान के लिए पहला क्रॉस-डोमेन बेंचमार्किंग प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि 30,000 से अधिक नए सेंडेंशियल पैराफ्रेज़ को आसानी से और लगातार हर महीने ~ 70% परिशुद्धता पर कब्जा कर लिया जा सकता है, और phrasal paraphrase निष्कर्षण के माध्यम से डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए उनकी उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन किया जा सकता है। हम अपने कोड और डेटा को स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं।', 'ga': 'Dúshlán mór i dtaighde athfhrása is ea an easpa corpora comhthreomhar. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair modh nua chun athróga mórscála dearcthaí a bhailiú ó Twitter trí thvuíteanna a nascadh trí URLanna comhroinnte. Is é príomhbhuntáiste ár modh ná a simplíocht, toisc go bhfaigheann sé réidh leis an aicmitheoir nó an duine sa lúb is gá chun sonraí a roghnú roimh anótáil agus cur i bhfeidhm halgartaim aitheantais athfhrása ina dhiaidh sin san obair roimhe seo. Cuirimid i láthair an corpas athinsinte is mó atá lipéadaithe ag an duine go dtí seo, de 51,524 péire abairte agus an chéad tagarmharcáil tras-fearainn le haghaidh aithint uathoibríoch athinsinte. Ina theannta sin, léirímid gur féidir níos mó ná 30,000 paraphrasaí sentantacha nua a ghabháil go héasca agus go leanúnach gach mí ag ~70% beachtas, agus léiríonn siad a n-áisiúlacht le haghaidh tascanna NLP iartheachtacha trí eastóscadh paraphrase frásaí. Cuirimid ár gcód agus ár sonraí ar fáil saor in aisce.', 'ka': 'პარაფრაზეზის კვლევაში მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილება არის პარალელური კოპორაზე არსებობა. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ახალი მეთოდი გამოყენებთ, რომ Twitter-დან დიდი სენტიალური პარაფრაზები შეიყენებთ, რომლებიც გაყოფილი URLs-ის გამოყენებით. ჩვენი მეთოდის მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულება არის ის სიმართლეობა, რადგან ის კლასიფიკაციის ან ადამიანის გამოყენება, რომელიც უნდა მონიშნოთ მონაცემების წინ მონიშნული მონაცემებისთვის და შემდეგ მონიშ ჩვენ უფრო დიდი ადამიანის მარტივი პარაფრეზის კორპუსს 51 524 წესების ზოგის და პირველი კრისტრომინის ბენმარკური ავტომატიკური პარაფრეზის განსაზღვრება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ 30 000-ზე მეტი ახალი სენტიალური პარაფრაზები შეიძლება ადვილად და მუშაობით ყოველ თვის ~70% წესიერებაში დააკვირდება, და გამოწვება მათი სენტილურობა NLP დავალებების გა ჩვენ ჩვენი კოდის და მონაცემების თავისუფალურად ხელხსნავთ.', 'hu': 'A parafráziskutatás egyik legnagyobb kihívása a párhuzamos corporák hiánya. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új módszert, amelynek segítségével nagyszabású jelentőségi parafrázist gyűjthetünk Twitterről a tweetek megosztott URL-eken keresztül történő összekapcsolásával. Módszerünk fő előnye annak egyszerűsége, mivel megszabadul az adatok kiválasztásához szükséges ciklusban lévő osztályozótól vagy embertől a jegyzetelés előtt, illetve parafráz azonosító algoritmusok későbbi alkalmazásától az előző munkában. Bemutatjuk az eddigi legnagyobb emberi jelölésű parafrázis korpuszt, 51 524 mondatpárból, valamint az automatikus parafrázis azonosításhoz szükséges első cross-domain benchmarking-t. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy havonta több mint 30 000 új érzéki parafrázist lehet könnyen és folyamatosan rögzíteni ~70%-os pontossággal, és bemutatjuk, hogy hasznosak a downstream NLP feladatokhoz a frazális parafrázis extrakció segítségével. Kódunkat és adatainkat szabadon hozzáférhetővé tesszük.', 'el': 'Μια σημαντική πρόκληση στην έρευνα παραφράσεων είναι η έλλειψη παράλληλων σωμάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για τη συλλογή μεγάλης κλίμακας νοητικών παραφράσεων από το Twitter συνδέοντας tweets μέσω κοινών διευθύνσεων. Το κύριο πλεονέκτημα της μεθόδου μας είναι η απλότητά της, καθώς ξεφορτώνεται τον ταξινομητή ή τον άνθρωπο στο βρόχο που απαιτείται για την επιλογή δεδομένων πριν από την σχολιασμό και την επακόλουθη εφαρμογή αλγορίθμων αναγνώρισης παραφράσεων στην προηγούμενη εργασία. Παρουσιάζουμε το μεγαλύτερο σώμα παραφράσεων με ανθρώπινη σήμανση μέχρι σήμερα από ζεύγη προτάσεων 51,524 και την πρώτη συγκριτική αξιολόγηση για αυτόματη ταυτοποίηση παραφράσεων. Επιπλέον, δείχνουμε ότι περισσότερες από 30.000 νέες sentential παραφράσεις μπορούν εύκολα και συνεχώς να συλληφθούν κάθε μήνα με ακρίβεια ~70% και να επιδείξουν τη χρησιμότητά τους για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες μέσω της εκχύλισης φράσεων. Κάνουμε τον κώδικα και τα δεδομένα μας ελεύθερα διαθέσιμα.', 'it': "Una grande sfida nella ricerca parafrasica è la mancanza di corpi paralleli. In questo articolo, presentiamo un nuovo metodo per raccogliere parafrasi sentimentali su larga scala da Twitter collegando tweet attraverso URL condivisi. Il vantaggio principale del nostro metodo è la sua semplicità, in quanto elimina il classificatore o umano nel loop necessario per selezionare i dati prima dell'annotazione e successiva applicazione di algoritmi di identificazione parafrasi nel lavoro precedente. Presentiamo il più grande corpus di parafrasi con etichetta umana fino ad oggi di 51.524 coppie di frasi e il primo benchmarking cross-domain per l'identificazione automatica della parafrasi. Inoltre, mostriamo che più di 30.000 nuove parafrase sentimentali possono essere catturate facilmente e continuamente ogni mese con una precisione del 70% e dimostriamo la loro utilità per le attività NLP a valle attraverso l'estrazione di parafrase frasali. Mettiamo a disposizione liberamente il nostro codice e i nostri dati.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinis iššūkis parafrazių moksliniuose tyrimuose yra lygiagrečių korprų trūkumas. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują būdą rinkti didelės apimties baudžiamąsias parafrazes iš Twitter, sujungdami tweetus per bendrus URL. Pagrindinis mūsų metodo pranašumas yra jo paprastumas, nes jis atsikrato klasifikatoriaus arba žmogaus, esančio cikle, reikalingo duomenų parinkimui prieš užrašymą ir vėlesnį parafrazės identifikavimo algoritmų taikymą ankstesniame darbe. Iki šiol pristatome didžiausią žmogaus pažymėtą parafrazės korpusą, sudarytą iš 51 524 sakinių poros, ir pirmą tarpdomeninį lyginamąjį vertinimą automatiniam parafrazės identifikavimui. Be to, mes rodome, kad daugiau kaip 30 000 naujų sakinių parafrazių galima lengvai ir nuolat surinkti kiekvieną mėnesį tiksliai apie 70 proc., ir parodyti, kad jos naudingos tolesnėms NLP užduotims ištraukiant frazių parafrazes. Mes laisvai prieiname savo kodą ir duomenis.', 'mk': 'Големиот предизвик во истражувањето на парафразите е недостатокот на паралелна корпора. Во овој весник, претставуваме нов метод за собирање на големи реченици парафрази од Твитер преку поврзување на твитови преку споделени URLs. The main advantage of our method is its simplicity, as it gets rid of the classifier or human in the loop needed to select data before annotation and subsequent application of paraphrase identification algorithms in the previous work.  Ние го претставуваме најголемиот човечки парафразен труп до денес од 51.524 пара реченици и првиот крстодомен реченици за автоматска идентификација на парафраза. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека повеќе од 30.000 нови реченици можат лесно и континуирано да се фатат секој месец со прецизност од ~70 отсто, и да ја покажат нивната корисност за понатамошните NLP задачи преку извлекување на реченици. We make our code and data freely available.', 'kk': 'Парафразды зерттеу үшін маңызды мәселе - параллел корпора жоқ. Бұл қағаздың жаңа әдісін Твиттерден үлкен масштабы парафраттарды қосу үшін жаңа әдісін таңдаймыз. Әдіміздің негізгі артықшылығы - оның қарапайымдылығы, себебі оның алдыңғы жұмысындағы парафраз идентификациялау алгоритмдерін таңдау үшін классификациялық не адамды таңдауға қажет болады. Біз 51 524 сөздің екі және бірінші парафраз белгісін автоматты парафраз идентификациясының бірінші көтерілген парафраз корпусын таңдаймыз. Қосымша, 30.000 жаңа сөз парафраттарынан артық және әрбір ай сайын ~70% деңгейінде түсіріп, NLP тапсырмаларын төмендету үшін өзінің утилитасын көрсетуге болады. Біз кодымыз мен деректерімізді жеткізу үшін қол жеткіземіз.', 'ms': 'Satu cabaran utama dalam kajian parafrasa adalah kekurangan corpora selari. Dalam kertas ini, kami perkenalkan kaedah baru untuk mengumpulkan parafrasa kalimat skala besar dari Twitter dengan menghubungkan tweet melalui URL berkongsi. Keuntungan utama kaedah kita ialah kesederhanaannya, kerana ia menyingkirkan pengklasifikasi atau manusia dalam loop yang diperlukan untuk memilih data sebelum anotasi dan aplikasi berikutnya algoritma pengenalan parafrasa dalam kerja sebelumnya. Kami memperkenalkan mayat parafrasa terbesar yang ditandai manusia sehari-hari 51,524 pasangan kalimat dan benchmarking cross-domain pertama untuk pengenalpasti parafrasa automatik. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahawa lebih dari 30,000 parafrasa kalimat baru boleh mudah dan terus ditangkap setiap bulan dengan tepatnya ~70%, dan menunjukkan utiliti mereka untuk tugas NLP turun melalui ekstraksi parafrasa. Kami membuat kod dan data kami tersedia secara bebas.', 'mt': 'Sfida ewlenija fir-riċerka tal-parafrażi hija n-nuqqas ta’ korpora parallela. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw metodu ġdid għall-ġbir ta’ parafrażijiet sentenzjali fuq skala kbira minn Twitter billi nikkollegaw tweets permezz ta’ URLs kondiviżi. Il-vantaġġ ewlieni tal-metodu tagħna huwa s-sempliċit à tiegħu, peress li jitneħħa mill-klassifikatur jew mill-bniedem fil-loop meħtieġ biex tintgħażel id-dejta qabel l-annotazzjoni u l-applikazzjoni sussegwenti ta’ algoritmi ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-parafrażi fix-xogħol preċedenti. Aħna nippreżentaw l-akbar korp ta’ parafrażi ttikkettat mill-bniedem sal-lum ta’ 51 524 par ta’ sentenza u l-ewwel punt ta’ riferiment bejn id-dominji għall-identifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-parafrażi. Barra minn hekk, naraw li aktar minn 30,000 parafrażi sentenzjali ġodda jistgħu jinqabdu faċilment u kontinwament kull xahar bi preċiżjoni ta’ ~70%, u juru l-utilità tagħhom għall-kompiti downstream NLP permezz tal-estrazzjoni tal-parafrażi frażili. Aħna nagħmlu l-kodiċi u d-dejta tagħna disponibbli liberament.', 'ml': 'പാരാഫ്രെയിസ് ഗവേഷണത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വ്യാല്\u200dക്കെല്ലാം പാരാളില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയുടെ കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ടൂട നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉപകാരമാണ് അതിന്റെ എളുപ്പത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും അതിനെ നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നത് കാരണം മുമ്പ് ജോലിയിലെ പാരാഫ്രേസ് തിരിച് 51,524 വാക്കിന്റെ ജോടികളുടെ തീയതി വരെ നമ്മള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഏറ്റവും വലിയ പാരാഫ്രേസ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ ക്രിസ്റ്റോമെന കൂടാതെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് 30,000 കൂടുതല്\u200d പുതിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d എളുപ്പമായി പിടിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതും എല്ലാ മാസത്തിലും 70% പ്രിസിഷനില്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്ന് പിടിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതും അവര We make our code and data freely available.', 'mn': 'Судалгааны судалгаанд хамгийн чухал асуудал бол параллел корпора байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Твиттерээс том хэмжээний өгүүлбэрийг цуглуулахын тулд шинэ арга зам өгсөн. Бидний арга замын гол давуу тал нь түүний энгийн байдал юм. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь өмнөх ажлын парафразын тодорхойлолтын алгоритмын алгоритмыг сонгохын өмнө хэрэгтэй мэдээллийг сонгох хэрэгтэй холбоотой. Бид 51.524 өгүүлбэр хоёрын хамгийн том хүний нэрлэгдсэн парафраз корпус болон автоматик парафразын тодорхойлолтын анхны хэмжээсүүдийг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бид 30,000 гаруй шинэ өгүүлбэрүүдийн параграл нь сар бүр ~70% тодорхой байдлаар амархан, үргэлж баригдаж болно гэдгийг харуулж, NLP ажиллагааг доошлох хэрэгтэй болно. Бид өөрсдийн код, өгөгдлийг чөлөөтэй ашиглаж чадна.', 'ro': 'O provocare majoră în cercetarea parafrazei este lipsa corpurilor paralele. În această lucrare, prezentăm o nouă metodă de colectare a parafrazelor sentimentale la scară largă de pe Twitter prin conectarea tweet-urilor prin intermediul URL-urilor partajate. Principalul avantaj al metodei noastre este simplitatea acesteia, deoarece scapă de clasificator sau uman în bucla necesară selectării datelor înainte de adnotare și aplicarea ulterioară a algoritmilor de identificare parafrază în lucrarea anterioară. Vă prezentăm cel mai mare corpus de parafrază etichetat uman până în prezent de 51.524 de perechi de propoziții și primul benchmarking cross-domeniu pentru identificarea automată a parafrază. În plus, arătăm că mai mult de 30.000 de parafraze sentimentale noi pot fi capturate cu ușurință și continuu în fiecare lună la o precizie de ~70%, și demonstrăm utilitatea lor pentru sarcinile din aval NLP prin extracția parafrazei frazale. Punem la dispoziție gratuit codul și datele noastre.', 'pl': 'Głównym wyzwaniem w badaniach parafrazy jest brak równoległych korpusów. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nową metodę gromadzenia dużych parafraz sentencjalnych z Twittera poprzez łączenie tweetów za pośrednictwem udostępnionych adresów URL. Główną zaletą naszej metody jest jej prostota, ponieważ pozbywa się klasyfikatora lub człowieka w pętli potrzebnej do wyboru danych przed adnotacją i późniejszym zastosowaniem algorytmów identyfikacji parafraz w poprzedniej pracy. Przedstawiamy największy dotychczasowy korpus parafrazy oznaczony człowiekiem par zdań 51,524 oraz pierwszy cross-domain benchmarking do automatycznej identyfikacji parafraz. Ponadto pokazujemy, że ponad 30.000 nowych parafraz sentencjalnych można łatwo i ciągle rejestrować co miesiąc z dokładnością ~70% i demonstrować ich użyteczność do dalszych zadań NLP poprzez ekstrakcję parafraz frazowych. Nasz kod i dane udostępniamy bezpłatnie.', 'no': 'Ein stor utfordring i parafrase-forskning er mangling av parallelle korpora. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein ny metode for å samla store sentensielle parafrasar frå Twitter ved å kopla tweets gjennom delte adresser. Den viktigste fordelen av metoden vår er enkeltet, sidan den blir kvitt av klassifiseringen eller menneske i løypet som treng for å velja data før annotasjon og etterpå bruk av parafrase-identifikasjonsgoritme i forrige arbeidet. Vi presenterer den største menneskelige parafrase-korpusen til datoen av 51,524 setningspropar og den første kryssdomerken for automatisk parafrase-identifisering. I tillegg viser vi at meir enn 30.000 nye sentensielle parafrasar kan enkelt og kontinuerleg henta kvar månad ved ~70% nøyaktig, og demonstrerer verktøyet for nedstreking av NLP-oppgåver gjennom frasalparafrase-utpakking. Vi gjer våre kode og data fritt tilgjengeleg.', 'sr': 'Veliki izazov u istraživanju parafraze je nedostatak paralelne korpore. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodu da sakupimo velike sentencijalne parafraze iz Twitter povežeći tweete kroz zajedničke URLs. Glavna prednost našeg metoda je njegova jednostavnost, jer se otarasi klasifikatora ili čoveka u petlju potrebne za izabranje podataka prije annotacije i poslednje primjene algoritma identifikacije parafraze u prethodnom poslu. Predstavljamo najveći korpus parafraze na ljudsku etiketu do sada sa 51.524 parovima rečenica i prvim kriterijom preko domena za automatsku identifikaciju parafraze. Osim toga, pokazujemo da više od 30.000 novih sentencijalnih parafraza može biti lako i stalno uhvaćena svakog meseca na preciznosti ~70%, i pokazuju njihovu korisnost za spuštanje NLP zadataka preko ekstrakcije frazalnih parafraza. Slobodno dostavljamo naš kod i podatke.', 'so': "dhibaato muhiim ah ee baaritaanka baaraandegista waa baahida shirkadaha lambarka ah. Warqaddan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa qaab cusub oo aan ka soo ururiyo aragtida maandooriyaha oo waaweyn oo Twitterka ah si aan ugu xidhiidhinno tweetka bogagga URLyada saabsan. Faahfaahin ugu muhiimsan metoorkeena waa fudud, sababtoo ah in looga rido fasalka ama dadka looga baahan yahay in loo doorto macluumaad ka hor inta aan la ogeysiin iyo ka dambeysan codsiga aqoonsiga baaritaanka ee shaqadii hore. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qofka ugu weyn ee qofka lagu magacaabay ee dadka ilaa waqtiga 51,524 labada xabsi ah iyo qofkii ugu horreeyey ee lagu qoray aqoonsiga rasmiga ah. Intaas waxaa dheer waxaan tusnaa in wax ka badan 30,000 oo qof oo cusub oo maandooriyaha ah ay si fudud ugu qaadan karaan bil walba si saxda ~70 boqolkiiba iyo si joogto ah loo qabsan karo, waxaana tusi karnaa faa'iidadooda loo isticmaali karo shaqada NLP ee hoose u socda, si loo isticmaalo qayb ka soo baxo. Aqoonta iyo macluumaadyadayada waxaan si xor ah u heli karnaa.", 'sv': 'En stor utmaning inom parafrasforskningen är bristen på parallella korpora. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en ny metod för att samla in storskaliga sentimental parafraser från Twitter genom att länka tweets via delade webbadresser. Den största fördelen med vår metod är dess enkelhet, eftersom den gör sig av med klassificeraren eller människan i slingan som behövs för att välja data före notering och efterföljande tillämpning av parafrasidentifikationsalgoritmer i föregående arbete. Vi presenterar den största människomärkta parafraskorpusen hittills med 51 524 meningspar och den första jämförelsen över domäner för automatisk parafrasidentifiering. Dessutom visar vi att mer än 30 000 nya sentimentala parafraser enkelt och kontinuerligt kan fångas varje månad med ~70% precision, och visar deras användbarhet för nedströms NLP-uppgifter genom frasal parafrasextraktion. Vi gör vår kod och data fritt tillgängliga.', 'ta': 'அளபுரு ஆராய்ச்சியில் ஒரு மிகப்பெரிய சவால் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய முறைமையை கொண்டுவருகிறோம், பங்கிடப்பட்ட யுஆர்எல்கள் மூலம் தொடர்புகளை இணைப்பதற்காக தொடர்பு இர எங்கள் முறையின் முக்கிய பயன்பாடு எளிதாகும், ஏனென்றால் அது வகைப்படுத்தி அல்லது மனிதனை விட்டு வெளியேற்றப்படும் முன்னால் அறிவிப்பு மற்றும் பின்னர் ப We present the largest human-labeled paraphrase corpus to date of 51,524 sentence pairs and the first cross-domain benchmarking for automatic paraphrase identification.  மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் ~70% துல்லியத்தில் ஒவ்வொரு மாதத்திற்கும் எளிதாகவும் தொடராகவும் பிடிக்கப்பட முடியும் என்று 30,000 க்கும் புதிய உணர்வு கூற் நாங்கள் எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் தகவல் இலவசமாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි සාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පෝරා අවශ්\u200dය. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් විදිහයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ට්විටර් වලින් විශේෂ පැරප්\u200dරේස් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න බොහොම විදිහක් තිය අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තමයි එයාගේ සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය, මෙයා පසුගින් වැඩේ දත්ත තෝරාගන්න අවශ්\u200dය විදියට පසුගින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අල්ග අපි ලොකු මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ලෙබ්රේජ් කර්ප්\u200dරේස් කොර්පුස් වෙනුවෙන් 51,524 වාක්ෂා ජාතිය සහ පළමු ක්\u200dරිස් ඩොමේන් බෙන්ච ඒ වගේම, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අළුත් වාර්තාවක් 30000 වඩා වඩා අලුත් වාර්තාවක් ලේසියෙන් හැම මාසෙම ~70% විශේෂයෙන් අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒ වගේ අපි අපේ කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ur': 'پارافریز تحقیقات میں ایک بڑا چال ہے پارالٹی کورپورا کی ناکامی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے کہ توئیٹر سے بڑی سنتی پارافریزز جمع کریں اور ٹویٹوں کو مشترک URLs کے ذریعہ تہہ کر دیں۔ ہمارے طریقے کی اصلی فائدہ یہ ہے کہ اس کی سادگی ہے، جیسے یہ پہلے کام میں ڈاٹا انتخاب کرنے کے لئے لازم ہے کہ کلاسپیر یا انسان سے دور ہو جاتا ہے۔ ہم نے 51,524 جماعت جوڑے اور اولین کروس ڈمین بانچمٹ کینٹ کینٹ کینٹ کینٹ کر دیا ہے اس کے علاوہ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ 30,000 سے زیادہ نئی سنتی پارافریز آسان اور ہمیشہ ~70% مہینے پر پکڑ سکتے ہیں اور ان کے کاموں کے لئے ان کا فائدہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں جو NLP کائنات کے ذریعہ مہینے کے ذریعہ سے دکھائے جاتے ہیں. ہم اپنے کوڈ اور ڈیٹا کو آزاد طور پر موجود بناتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Parphras tahrirchisida katta qiyin bu parametrlar kompaniyasi yo'q. Bu qogʻozda biz Twitterdan katta sentensial paraphraslarni birlashtirish uchun yangi usulni koʻrsatish mumkin. The main advantage of our method is its simplicity, as it gets rid of the classifier or human in the loop needed to select data before annotation and subsequent application of paraphrase identification algorithms in the previous work.  Biz 51,524 so'zning birinchi qo'l va avtomatik birinchi cross-domen paraphrasing identification uchun eng katta qo'llangan paraphras corpusini hozir qilamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz 30 000 dan ortiq yangi sentensial paraphraslarni oddiy va har oy ~70 % davomida qabul qilish mumkin va ularning asboblarni NLP ishlarini chiqish orqali yordam beradi. Biz kodlash va maʼlumotlarimizni xohlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một thách thức lớn theo cách diễn giải của luận văn là thiếu hạ sĩ song. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để thu thập các bản tóm tắt từ Twitter bằng cách kết nối Twitter qua các URL chung. Nhân cơ chính của phương pháp này là đơn giản, vì nó loại bỏ được người phân loại trong vòng thời gian cần thiết để chọn dữ liệu trước khi ghi chú và sau đó áp dụng các thuật to án nhận diện liệt giải trong công trình trước. Chúng tôi giới thiệu hình ảnh cao nhất của tập thể hình nhân được đánh dấu cho đến nay của các cặp đủ loại 51,52 Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng nhiều hơn 30,000 những bản liệt niên mới có thể được chụp hàng tháng một cách dễ dàng và liên tục với độ chính xác cao 7070, và giải thích kỹ năng của chúng cho các công việc xuôi dòng Njala bằng cách trích từ dàn âm. Chúng tôi cung cấp mã và dữ liệu tự do.', 'bg': 'Основно предизвикателство в изследванията на парафразите е липсата на паралелни корпуси. В тази статия представяме нов метод за събиране на широкомащабни парафрази от Туитър чрез свързване на туитове чрез споделени адреси. Основното предимство на нашия метод е неговата простота, тъй като се отървава от класификатора или човека в цикъла, необходим за избор на данни преди анотация и последващо прилагане на парафразни идентификационни алгоритми в предишната работа. Представяме най-големия парафразен корпус, обозначен с човешки етикети, до момента от 51 524 двойки изречения и първия междудомейнен сравнителен анализ за автоматична идентификация на парафразите. В допълнение, ние показваме, че повече от 30 000 нови сентенциални парафрази могат лесно и непрекъснато да бъдат заснети всеки месец с точност ~ 70%, и демонстрираме тяхната полезност за задачи надолу по веригата чрез извличане на фразови парафрази. Ние правим нашия код и данни свободно достъпни.', 'nl': "Een grote uitdaging in parafraseonderzoek is het ontbreken van parallelle corpora. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe methode om grootschalige sententiële parafrases van Twitter te verzamelen door tweets te koppelen via gedeelde URL's. Het belangrijkste voordeel van onze methode is de eenvoud, omdat het ontdoet van de classificator of mens in de lus die nodig is om gegevens te selecteren voordat annotatie en de daaropvolgende toepassing van parafrase identificatiealgoritmes in het vorige werk. We presenteren het grootste human-labeled parafrase corpus tot nu toe van 51,524 zinnenparen en de eerste cross-domein benchmarking voor automatische parafrase identificatie. Bovendien laten we zien dat meer dan 30.000 nieuwe sententiale parafrases gemakkelijk en continu elke maand met ~70% precisie kunnen worden vastgelegd, en demonstreren hun nut voor downstream NLP taken door frasatale parafrase extractie. Wij stellen onze code en gegevens vrij beschikbaar.", 'da': 'En stor udfordring i parafraseforskning er manglen på parallelle korpora. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny metode til at indsamle storstilede sentimental parafraser fra Twitter ved at linke tweets gennem delte webadresser. Den største fordel ved vores metode er dens enkelhed, da det slipper af med klassificereren eller menneske i sløjfen, der er nødvendig for at vælge data før annotation og efterfølgende anvendelse af parafrase identifikationsalgoritmer i det tidligere arbejde. Vi præsenterer det største menneskeligt mærkede parafrasekorpus til dato med 51.524 sætningspar og den første cross-domain benchmarking til automatisk parafraseidentifikation. Derudover viser vi, at mere end 30.000 nye sentimental parafraser nemt og kontinuerligt kan fanges hver måned med ~70% præcision, og demonstrerer deres nytte til downstream NLP opgaver gennem frasal parafrase ekstraktion. Vi stiller vores kode og data frit tilgængelige.', 'de': 'Eine große Herausforderung in der Paraphrasenforschung ist das Fehlen paralleler Korpora. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine neue Methode vor, um großflächige sententiale Paraphrasen von Twitter zu sammeln, indem Tweets über geteilte URLs verknüpft werden. Der Hauptvorteil unserer Methode ist ihre Einfachheit, da sie den Klassifikator oder Mensch in der Schleife beseitigt, der benötigt wird, um Daten vor Annotation und anschließender Anwendung von Paraphrasen-Identifikationsalgorithmen in der vorherigen Arbeit auszuwählen. Wir präsentieren das bisher größte human-labeled Paraphrasen-Korpus von 51,524 Satzpaaren und das erste domänenübergreifende Benchmarking zur automatischen Paraphrasen-Identifikation. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass mehr als 30.000 neue sententiale Paraphrasen jeden Monat mit ~70% Präzision einfach und kontinuierlich erfasst werden können, und demonstrieren ihren Nutzen für nachgeschaltete NLP-Aufgaben durch Phrasal Paraphrasen Extraktion. Wir stellen unseren Code und unsere Daten frei zur Verfügung.', 'id': 'Sebuah tantangan utama dalam penelitian parafrasa adalah kekurangan corpora paralel. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan metode baru untuk mengumpulkan parafrasa kalimat skala besar dari Twitter dengan menghubungkan tweet melalui URL-URL yang sama. Keuntungan utama dari metode kita adalah kesederhanaannya, karena itu menyingkirkan klasifikasi atau manusia dalam loop yang dibutuhkan untuk memilih data sebelum anotasi dan aplikasi berikutnya algoritma identifikasi parafrasa dalam pekerjaan sebelumnya. Kami mempersembahkan mayat parafrasa terbesar yang ditandai manusia sampai tanggal 51.524 pasangan kalimat dan benchmarking cross-domain pertama untuk identifikasi parafrasa otomatis. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa lebih dari 30.000 parafrasa kalimat baru dapat mudah dan terus ditangkap setiap bulan dengan presisi ~70%, dan menunjukkan utilitas mereka untuk tugas NLP turun melalui ekstraksi parafrasa. Kita membuat kode dan data kita tersedia dengan bebas.', 'ko': '석의 연구의 주요 도전은 평행 어료 라이브러리의 결핍이다.본문에서 URL을 공유해 트위터를 링크하고, 트위터에서 대규모 문장 해석을 수집하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법의 주요 장점은 간단성이다. 주석을 달기 전에 데이터를 선택하는 데 필요한 분류기나 사람이 회로에서, 그리고 이전 작업에서 해석된 식별 알고리즘의 후속 응용을 없애기 때문이다.우리는 지금까지 가장 큰 인공 주석 의미 자료 라이브러리인 51524개의 문장 대조와 자동 해석 식별에 사용되는 첫 번째 크로스 기준 테스트를 보여 주었다.또한 매달 약 70%의 정밀도로 3만여 개의 새로운 문장 해석을 쉽고 연속적으로 포획할 수 있으며, 짧은 문장 해석 추출을 통해 후속 NLP 임무에서의 실용성을 증명할 수 있음을 밝혔다.우리는 우리의 코드와 데이터를 무료로 제공한다.', 'hr': 'Veliki izazov u istraživanju parafraze je nedostatak paralelne korpore. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodu za skupljanje velike sentencijalne parafraze iz Twitter povezivanjem tweeta kroz zajedničke URL-e. Glavna prednost našeg metode je njegova jednostavnost, jer se otarasi klasifikatora ili čovjeka u petlju potrebne za izabranje podataka prije annotacije i posljednje primjene algoritma identifikacije parafraza u prethodnom poslu. Predstavljamo najveću parafrazu korpusa s ljudskim etiketama do današnje vrijeme od 51 524 parova rečenica i prvu kritičnu kritiku preko domena za automatsku identifikaciju parafraze. Osim toga, pokazujemo da preko 30.000 novih sentencijalnih parafraza može biti lako i stalno uhvaćena svakog mjeseca na preciznosti ~70%, i pokazuju njihovu korisnost za snižene NLP zadatke kroz ekstrakciju frazalne parafraze. Slobodno dostavljamo naš kod i podatke.', 'sw': 'Changamoto kubwa katika utafiti wa misingi ni ukosefu wa kampuni ya usambazaji. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu mpya ya kukusanya vipengele vya hisia vikubwa kutoka Twita kwa kuunganisha twiti kupitia URL zilizosambazwa. Utawala mkuu wa njia yetu ni urahisi wake, kwa sababu inaondoa idadi au binadamu katika orodha hiyo inahitajika kuchagua data kabla ya kutangaza na baadae matumizi ya utambulisho wa mazingira katika kazi iliyopita. Tunaonyesha viungo vikubwa vinavyotambuliwa na binadamu hadi siku ya kuhusiana na wanandoa 51,524 hukumu pamoja na bendera ya kwanza ya kutambuliwa kwa njia ya kujitegemea. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa zaidi ya misingi 30,000 za hisia zinaweza kuwa rahisi na kuendelea kukamatwa kila mwezi kwa takribani asilimia 70, na kuonyesha matumizi yao kwa kazi za NLP za chini kwa kupitia utoaji wa maneno. We make our code and data freely available.', 'tr': 'Parafrazlyk barlamasynda esasy kynçylyk parallel korpora ýok bolýar. Bu kagyzda tweets we paylaşyk URLlary bilen uluy ölçekli sözleri toplamak üçin täze bir täze yöntemi görkeýäris Metiniň esasy ýeterlikidir, çünki bu loopda klasifikatçy ýa-da adamlaryň üstünde maglumatlary söňlemekden öň we soňky işiň üstünde parafraz tanyhmasynyň algoritmalaryny saýlamak üçin ýüze çykar. Biz 51,524 sözlük çiftleri we otomatik parafraz kimligi üçin ilkinji çarpaz sahypalaryny tanýýarys. Munuň üçin, 30.000 täze söz sözleriň aňsatlyk bolup biler we her aý ~70% dogrylyk bilen laňarlap biler we olaryň NLP täzeliklerini sözleriň sözleriň açylygyndan görkezilişini görkez. Biz öz kodymyzy we maglumatlarymyzy boş edip bilýäris.', 'af': "'n Hoogte uitdaging in parafrase ondersoek is die ontbreek van parallele korpora. In hierdie papier stel ons 'n nuwe metode om groot-skaal sentensiele parafrase van Twitter te samel deur tweete te koppel deur gedeelde URLs. Die hoofvoordeel van ons metode is sy eenvoudigheid, omdat dit kry weg van die klassifiseerder of mens in die loop wat benodig is om data te kies voor annotasie en volgende aansoek van parafrase identifikasie algoritme in die vorige werk. Ons stel die grootste mens-etiketeerde parafrase korpus tot datum van 51,524 setpaar en die eerste kruisdomein benchmarking vir outomatiese parafrase identifikasie. In addition, we show that more than 30,000 new sentential paraphrases can be easily and continuously captured every month at ~70% precision, and demonstrate their utility for downstream NLP tasks through phrasal paraphrase extraction. Ons maak ons kode en data vry beskikbaar.", 'sq': 'Një sfidë e madhe në kërkimin e parafrazave është mungesa e korprës paralele. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë të re për të mbledhur parafraza dënimi në shkallë të madhe nga Twitter duke lidhur tweetet nëpërmjet URL të përbashkëta. Përfitimi kryesor i metodës sonë është thjeshtësia e saj, pasi heq qafe klasifikuesin apo njeriun në loop të nevojshëm për të zgjedhur të dhënat përpara anotacionit dhe aplikimit më pas të algoritmave të identifikimit të parafrazës në punën e mëparshme. Ne prezantojmë kufomën më të madhe të parafrazës me etiketë njerëzore deri më sot prej 51,524 çifteve të fjalëve dhe parafrazës së parë për identifikimin automatik të parafrazës. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se më shumë se 30,000 parafraza të reja dënimi mund të kapen lehtë dhe vazhdimisht çdo muaj me ~70% saktësi dhe të demonstrojnë shërbimin e tyre për detyrat e NLP-së në vazhdim nëpërmjet nxjerrjes së parafrazës. Ne e bëjmë kodin dhe të dhënat tona të disponueshme lirisht.', 'am': 'በፓራፊር ትምህርት ውስጥ የዋነኛ ግጭት የፓርቲካ ኮርፖር ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ፣ ትዊተሮችን በመጠቀም በተካፈሉ URLs በመጠቀም ትዊተሮችን ለመሰብሰብ አዲስ ዓይነት እናቀርባለን፡፡ The main advantage of our method is its simplicity, as it gets rid of the classifier or human in the loop needed to select data before annotation and subsequent application of paraphrase identification algorithms in the previous work.  የ51,524 የፍርድ ግንኙነቶች እና የመጀመሪያውን የክፍለ ሥርዓት የክፍለ መልዕክት የክፍለ ገጽ የራሳቸውን የግልጽ ግንኙነት ማረጋገጫ እናቀርባለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ከ30,000 የሚበልጡ አዲስ የስሜትናዊ ተርጓሚዎች በየወርው ~70 በመቶ ማግኘት ይቀልጣሉ፡፡ እናም የNLP ስርዓት ማድረግ በሚያሳየው ግንኙነት እና በጽሑፍ አካባቢ ግንኙነት ማሳየት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የኮድራችንን እና ዳራችንን ነፃ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Պարաֆրեսի ուսումնասիրության մեծ մարտահրավերը զուգահեռ մարմնի բացակայությունն է: In this paper, we present a new method to collect large-scale sentential paraphrases from Twitter by linking tweets through shared URLs.  Մեր մեթոդի հիմնական առավելությունը նրա պարզությունն է, քանի որ այն ազատվում է դասակարգչից կամ մարդկային շրջանակում, որը անհրաժեշտ է տվյալների ընտրելու համար նախքան annoտացիան և հետագայում պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերման ալգորիթմների կիրառման նախորդ աշխատանքի Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մարդկային նշաններով ամենամեծ պարաֆրեզի մարմինը մինչև օրս 51,524 նախադասությունների զույգ և առաջին խաչբնագավառի հարաբերակցությունը ավտոմատիկ պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերման համար: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ավելի քան 30,000 նոր նախադասությունների պարաֆրեզ ամեն ամիս հեշտությամբ և շարունակաբար կարող են գրանցվել ընդհամենը 70 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ, և ցույց են տալիս, թե ինչպես են նրանք օգտակար ՆԼՊ-ի հետագա խնդիրների համար արտահայտվելով նախա Մենք ազատ հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր կոդը և տվյալները:', 'az': 'Parafraz araştırmalarında böyük bir çətinlik paralel korpora yoxdur. Bu kağızda, Twitter-dən böyük ölçülü sentencial parafrazləri toplamaq üçün yeni bir yol göstəririk, paylaşılmış URLlər vasitəsilə tweetləri bağlayıb. Bizim metodumuzun ən böyük mənfəəti onun basitlığıdır, çünki bu, əvvəlki işlərdə parafraz tanımlama algoritminin məlumatlarını seçməsindən əvvəl və sonrakı istifadə etməsindən əvvəlki işlərdə ehtiyacı olan klassifik və ya insandan uzaqlaşdırılır. Biz ən böyük insan etiketli parafraz korpusu 51.524 cümlət çift və otomatik parafraz identifikassiyası üçün ilk keçmiş sütun etiketini göstəririk. Biz də göstəririk ki, 30.000 yeni cümləli parafrazlərin hər ay ~70% dəqiqliyində asanlıqla və sürəklə aparıla bilər və onların NLP işlərinin yaradılışını frazlərin parafrazlərini çıxartmaqla göstərir. Biz kodumuz və məlumatlarımızı özgür olaraq faydalandırırıq.', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রেস গবেষণায় একটি প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে প্যারালেল কর্পোরার অভাব। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করছি যাতে টুইটার থেকে বিশাল পরিমাণ অনুভূতি সংগ্রহ করে টুইটারে শেয়ার করা ইউআরএলের মাধ্যমে ট আমাদের পদ্ধতির প্রধান সুবিধা হচ্ছে সুবিধা, কারণ এটি পূর্ববর্তী কাজে প্যারাফ্রেস চিহ্নিত অ্যালাগোরিদমের প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য নির্বাচনের পূর্বে বি আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্যারাফ্রেস পরিচিতির জন্য বৃহত্তম মানুষের চিহ্নিত প্যারাফ্রেস কোর্পাসের দিন পর্যন্ত উপস্থাপন করি ৫১,৫২৪ জো তাছাড়াও আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রতি মাসে ৩০,০০০ বেশী নতুন প্যারাফেন্টিলের ব্যাপার সহজ এবং সাধারণত ~৭০% সমালোচনায় তাদের গ্রেফতার করা যাবে এবং তাদের ব্যবহার প্ আমরা আমাদের কোড এবং তথ্য মুক্তি পাই।', 'ca': "Un gran repte en la recerca en parafrases és la falta de corpora paral·lela. En aquest article, presentem un nou mètode per recollir parafrases sentencials a gran escala de Twitter enllaçant tweets a través d'URL compartits. L'avantatge principal del nostre mètode és la seva simplicitat, com se desfer del classificador o humà del bucle que necessita per seleccionar les dades abans d'anotar i aplicar posteriorment algoritmes d'identificació de parafrases en el treball anterior. Presentam el cos de parafrases amb etiqueta humana més gran fins ara de 51.524 parells de frases i el primer paràmetre de referència entre dominis per identificar parafrases automàticament. A més, demostram que més de 30.000 parafrases sentencials poden ser capturades fàcilment i continuament cada mes amb una precisió de ~70%, i demostrar la seva utilitat per a les tasques de NLP avall a través de l'extracció de parafrases. Fem lliurament disponible el nostre codi i les dades.", 'cs': 'Hlavní výzvou parafrázového výzkumu je nedostatek paralelních korpusů. V tomto článku představujeme novou metodu shromažďování rozsáhlých sententiálních parafrází z Twitteru propojením tweetů prostřednictvím sdílených URL adres. Hlavní výhodou naší metody je její jednoduchost, protože se zbavuje klasifikátoru či člověka ve smyčce potřebného k výběru dat před anotací a následnou aplikací parafrázových identifikačních algoritmů v předchozí práci. Představujeme dosud největší parafrázový korpus značený člověkem z 51,524 větových párů a první cross-domain benchmarking pro automatickou identifikaci parafráze. Kromě toho ukazujeme, že více než 30.000 nových sententiálních parafrází lze snadno a nepřetržitě zachytit každý měsíc s přesností ~70% a demonstrovat jejich užitečnost pro následné NLP úlohy prostřednictvím extrakce frazálních parafrází. Náš kód a data zpřístupníme volně.', 'bs': 'Veliki izazov u istraživanju parafraze je nedostatak paralelne korpore. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu metodu da skupimo velike sentencijalne parafraze iz Twitter povežeći tweete kroz zajedničke URLs. Glavna prednost našeg metoda je njegova jednostavnost, jer se otarasi klasifikatora ili čovjeka u petlju potrebne za izabranje podataka prije annotacije i poslednje primjene algoritma identifikacije parafraza u prethodnom poslu. Predstavljamo najveći parafrazu korpusa s ljudskim etiketama do sada od 51.524 parova rečenica i prvi pregled preko domena za automatsku identifikaciju parafraze. Osim toga, pokazujemo da preko 30.000 novih sentencijalnih parafraza može biti lako i stalno uhvaćena svakog mjeseca na preciznosti ~70%, i pokazuju njihovu korisnost za snižene NLP zadatke kroz ekstrakciju frazalne parafraze. Slobodno dostavljamo naš kod i podatke.', 'fa': 'یک چالش بزرگی در تحقیقات پاراфрیژ کمبود شرکت پارالی است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش جدید برای جمع کردن پارافریز\u200cهای سنتی بزرگ از توئیتر با ارتباط توئیت\u200cها از طریق URLهای مشترک پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. سودهای اصلی از روش ما ساده\u200cی آن است، همان\u200cطور که از کلی\u200cکننده یا انسان در لوله\u200cای که نیاز دارد برای انتخاب داده\u200cها پیش از نویسندگی و کاربرد بعدی از الگوریتم\u200cهای شناسایی پاراجمله\u200cها در کار گذشته خلاص می\u200cشود. ما بزرگترین پارافریزه\u200cهای انسان را برای شناسایی پارافریزه\u200cهای خودکار برای جفت\u200cهای جمله ۱۵٬۲۵۴ و اولین نقشه\u200cهای مختلف دامنه را برای شناسایی پارافریزه\u200cهای خودکار نشان می\u200cدهیم. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که بیش از ۳۰٫۰۰۰ عبارت جدید احساسات می توانند به آسانی و همیشه در هر ماه با دقیق ~۷۰ درصد دستگیر شوند، و استفاده ایشان را برای کارهای NLP پایین از طریق استخراج عبارت عبارت نشان می دهند. ما کد و داده\u200cهایمان را آزاد در دسترس می\u200cدهیم.', 'et': 'Parafraasiuuringute peamine väljakutse on paralleelsete korpuste puudumine. Käesolevas artiklis tutvustame uut meetodit Twitteri suuremahuliste sentimentaalsete parafraaside kogumiseks, linkides säutsud jagatud URL-ide kaudu. Meie meetodi peamine eelis on selle lihtsus, kuna see vabaneb klassifitseerijast või inimesest silmuses, mis on vajalik andmete valimiseks enne annoteerimist ja parafraasi identifitseerimise algoritmide hilisemat rakendamist eelmises töös. Esitleme seni suurimat inimmärgistatud parafraasikorpust 51 524 lausepaari ning esimest domeenidevahelist võrdlusanalüüsi parafraaside automaatseks identifitseerimiseks. Lisaks näitame, et igal kuul on võimalik hõlpsasti ja pidevalt jäädvustada üle 30 000 uue sentimentaalse parafraasi täpsusega, ning näitame nende kasulikkust järgnevate NLP ülesannete jaoks fraasaalse parafraasi ekstraheerimise kaudu. Me teeme oma koodi ja andmed vabalt kättesaadavaks.', 'fi': 'Suurin haaste parafraasitutkimuksessa on rinnakkaisten korpusten puute. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uuden menetelmän kerätä Twitteristä laajamittaisia sententiaalisia lauseita linkittämällä twiittejä jaettujen URL-osoitteiden kautta. Menetelmämme tärkein etu on sen yksinkertaisuus, sillä se poistaa luokittelijan tai ihmisen silmukassa, jota tarvitaan tietojen valintaan ennen merkintöjä ja myöhempää parafraasitunnistusalgoritmien soveltamista edellisessä työssä. Esittelemme tähän mennessä suurimman ihmisen merkitsemän parafraasikorpusen, 51 524 lauseparia, sekä ensimmäisen monialaisen vertailuanalyysin automaattista parafraasitunnistusta varten. Lisäksi osoitamme, että yli 30 000 uutta tunnistusmerkkiä voidaan tallentaa helposti ja jatkuvasti kuukaudessa noin 70% tarkkuudella, ja osoitamme niiden hyödyllisyyden jatkojalostuksen tehtävissä fraasinmuutoksen avulla. Annamme koodimme ja tietomme vapaasti saataville.', 'jv': 'Aswih akeh langkung wih-wih akeh dumadhi kawit perusahaan kuwi ora tau karo perusahaan. Nang pebuk iki, kita nyibagi method sing bagian kanggo ngregani paraFrase yang dipunangka dipunangka dipunangka maneh nang Google Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing perusahaan kanggo sampeyan sampeyan, dadi iki dadi gegangasar winih dhéwé basa sing bersatu bakal dhéwé dadi sabên tanggal dhéwé karo iso dianggap sampeyan karo akeh sing berarti dhéwé. We present the first man-label paratext corus to date of 31,584 word paras and the first krus-domain bench marking for automatically paratext ID. This is the first character in a column header displaying group names. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive"), and when there is a change ("assertive"),  Awak dhéwé mengko kode karo data freekas.', 'sk': 'Glavni izziv pri raziskavah parafraze je pomanjkanje vzporednih korpusov. V tem prispevku predstavljamo novo metodo zbiranja obsežnih sententialnih parafraz iz Twitterja s povezovanjem tweetov prek spletnih mest v skupni rabi. Glavna prednost naše metode je njena preprostost, saj se znebi klasifikatorja oziroma človeka v zanki, potrebnega za izbiro podatkov pred označevanjem in kasnejšo uporabo parafraznih identifikacijskih algoritmov v prejšnjem delu. Predstavljamo največji parafrazni korpus z oznako človeka do danes 51.524 parov stavkov in prvo meddomensko primerjalno analizo za avtomatsko identifikacijo parafraz. Poleg tega pokažemo, da je več kot 30.000 novih sencialnih parafraz mogoče enostavno in neprekinjeno zajeti vsak mesec z ~70% natančnostjo, in dokazujemo njihovo uporabnost pri opravilih nadaljnjega NLP z ekstrakcijo frazalnih parafraz. Našo kodo in podatke dajemo na voljo brezplačno.', 'ha': "Babu wani muhimu a cikin karatun na fassarar mafaransa yana da ƙaranci ga makampuni. Ga wannan takardan, munã zo da wani hanyoyi na samun fassarar masu girma daga Twitter, kuma munã sami mutane da suka yi amfani da URLs wanda aka samu. Babbar amfani da metoden mu ne masu sauƙi, kamar yadda za'a rida shi mai fasalin ko mutane cikin shirin zura da aka buƙata don a zãɓi data gaba ga zane da kuma a bayan shirin ayuka na shaidar algoritori na fassarar cikin aikin da ya gabata. Tuna halatar da mafi girma da aka rubũta parameter ga mutum a yanzu ta danne 51,524 da kuma farkon rubutu na rubutu na rubutun rubutun farat ɗaya. Ina bayan haka, Munã nũna wa misalin mutane 30,000 zafi a iya sauƙi da ana kãma daidai a shekara daidai a /70% na daidai, kuma za mu nuna amfani da su ga aikin NLP na ƙarami a bayani na fassarar. Munã samar da kodinmu da takwiranmu buɗaɗe.", 'he': 'A major challenge in paraphrase research is the lack of parallel corpora.  In this paper, we present a new method to collect large-scale sentential paraphrases from Twitter by linking tweets through shared URLs.  היתרון העיקרי של השיטה שלנו הוא הפשוטיות שלה, כיוון שהיא נפטרת מהמסווג או מהאנושי במעגל הנדרש כדי לבחור נתונים לפני הערות והשימוש אחר כך של אלגוריתם זיהוי פראפרזיה בעבודה הקודמת. אנו מציגים את גופת הפרפסים הגדולה ביותר עם תווים אנושיים עד היום של 51,524 זוגות משפטים והרפסים הראשונים של התחום הצלב לזהות הפרפסים אוטומטית. בנוסף, אנו מראים כי יותר מ-30,000 פרסמות משפטיות חדשות יכולות להיתפס בקלות וממשיך בכל חודש בדיוק ~70%, ולהראות את שימושיהם למשימות NLP מתקדמות דרך חיפוש פרסמות פרסמות. אנחנו פועלים את הקוד והנתונים שלנו פנויים בחינם.', 'bo': 'དབུས་གཞུང་ལ་བརྟན་དཔྱད་འཚོལ་ལས་གདོང་ལེན་པ་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་ནི་སྦུང་མཐུན་མེད་པ་རེད། In this paper, we present a new method to collect large-scale sentential paraphrases from Twitter by linking tweets through shared URLs. The main advantage of our method is its simplicity, as it gets rid of the classifier or human in the loop needed to select data before annotation and subsequent application of paraphrase identification algorithms in the previous work. We present the largest human-labeled paraphrase corpus to date of 51,524 sentence pairs and the first cross-domain benchmarking for automatic paraphrase identification. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཨང་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྟོང་པར་བྱིན་པ།'}
{'en': 'A Joint Sequential and Relational Model for Frame-Semantic Parsing', 'ar': 'نموذج متسلسل وعلائقي مشترك لتحليل الإطار الدلالي', 'fr': "Un modèle séquentiel et relationnel conjoint pour l'analyse sémantique des trames", 'pt': 'Um Modelo Sequencial e Relacional Conjunto para Análise Semântica de Quadros', 'es': 'Un modelo secuencial y relacional conjunto para el análisis semántico de marcos', 'ja': 'フレーム-セマンティック構文解析のためのジョイントシーケンシャルおよびリレーショナルモデル', 'zh': '一以帻语义解析合次', 'hi': 'फ़्रेम-सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग के लिए एक संयुक्त अनुक्रमिक और संबंधपरक मॉडल', 'ru': 'Совместная последовательная и реляционная модель для фрейм-семантического анализа', 'ga': 'Comhshamhail Sheicheamhach agus Choibhneasta le haghaidh Parsáil Fráma-Shéimeantach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Közös szekvenciális és relatív modell a keretszemantikus értelmezéshez', 'el': 'Ένα κοινό διαδοχικό και σχεσιακό μοντέλο για τη σημειακή ανάλυση πλαισίων', 'it': "Un modello sequenziale e relazionale congiunto per l'analisi frame-semantica", 'kk': 'Фрейм- семантикалық талдау үшін біріктірілген және қатынастық модель', 'lt': 'Bendras sekacinis ir santykinis pagrindų semintinio analizavimo modelis', 'mk': 'Здружен секвенцијален и релативен модел за семантично анализирање на рамките', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയി- സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഒരു യൂണ്ടിന്റ് സെക്കന്റിലും ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന മോഡല്\u200dName', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell Sekwenzjali u Relattiv Konġunt għall-Analiżi Semantika tal-Qafas', 'pl': 'Wspólny model sekwencyjny i relacyjny dla analizy ramowo-semantycznej', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Фрейм-Semantic шинжилгээний холбоотой, холбоотой загвар', 'ro': 'Un model secvențial și relațional comun pentru analizarea cadrului-semantic', 'sr': 'Zajednički sekvencijski i odnosni model za okvirni semantički razmatranje', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Joint Sequential and Relational Model for Frame-Semantic Parsing', 'sv': 'En gemensam sekvensell och relationell modell för ramsemantisk tolkning', 'ta': 'சட்டம்- செமாண்டிக் பாசிங்குக்கான ஒரு இணைய பின்னணி மற்றும் தொடர்பு மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình lặp quan hệ và tương đối đồng cho chế độ truyền hình', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Съвместен последователен и относителен модел за рамково-семантично анализиране', 'da': 'En fælles sekvens- og relationsmodel for rammesemantisk fortolkning', 'nl': 'Een gezamenlijk sequentieel en relationeel model voor frame-semantische parsing', 'hr': 'Zajednički sekvencijski i odnosni model okvirnog semantičkog razmatranja', 'id': 'Model Sekuensial dan Relatif Berkongsi untuk Analisasi Semantik-Bingkai', 'de': 'Ein gemeinsames sequentielles und relationales Modell für Frame-Semantische Parsing', 'ko': '프레임 의미 분석의 결합 순서 관계 모델', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Uunganishaji wa Uchaguzi wa Uchaguzi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një Model i Përbashkët Sekuencial dhe Relacional për analizimin Semantik të Kuadrave', 'tr': 'Frame-Semantik Taýýarlama üçin bir gabdaly we Relatik Modeli', 'az': 'Frame-Semantik Parsing üçün birləşdirilmiş Sequential və Relative Model', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'ফ্রেম- সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য একটি যুক্তিগত এবং সম্পর্কিত মোডেল', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'ca': 'A Joint Sequential and Relational Model for Frame-Semantic Parsing', 'cs': 'Společný sekvenční a vztahový model pro rámcové sémantické analýzy', 'bs': 'Zajednički sekvencijski i odnosni model za okvirni semantički razmatranje', 'et': 'Ühine järjestikune ja suhteline mudel raamsemantilise parsimise jaoks', 'fi': 'Yhteinen sekvenssi- ja suhteellinen malli kehyssemanttiselle analysoinnille', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'A Joint Sequential and Relational Model for Frame-Semantic Parsing', 'sk': 'Skupni zaporedni in relacijski model za okvirno-semantično razpravljanje', 'he': 'דוגמא רצפית ומערכת יחסית משותפת עבור מערכת מערכת סמנטית', 'bo': 'Frame-Semantic Parsing'}
{'en': 'We introduce a new method for frame-semantic parsing that significantly improves the prior state of the art. Our model leverages the advantages of a deep bidirectional LSTM network which predicts semantic role labels word by word and a relational network which predicts semantic roles for individual text expressions in relation to a predicate. The two networks are integrated into a single model via knowledge distillation, and a unified graphical model is employed to jointly decode frames and semantic roles during inference. Experiments on the standard FrameNet data show that our model significantly outperforms existing neural and non-neural approaches, achieving a 5.7 F1 gain over the current state of the art, for full frame structure extraction.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة جديدة للتحليل الدلالي للإطار الذي يحسن بشكل كبير الحالة السابقة للفن. يستفيد نموذجنا من مزايا شبكة LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه العميقة التي تتنبأ بتسميات الأدوار الدلالية كلمة بكلمة والشبكة العلائقية التي تتنبأ بالأدوار الدلالية لتعبيرات النص الفردية فيما يتعلق بالمسند. تم دمج الشبكتين في نموذج واحد عبر تقطير المعرفة ، ويتم استخدام نموذج رسومي موحد لفك تشفير الإطارات والأدوار الدلالية بشكل مشترك أثناء الاستدلال. تُظهر التجارب على بيانات FrameNet القياسية أن نموذجنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب العصبية وغير العصبية الحالية ، محققًا ربحًا قدره 5.7 F1 على الحالة الحالية للفن ، لاستخراج بنية الإطار الكامل.', 'es': 'Presentamos un nuevo método para el análisis semántico de fotogramas que mejora significativamente el estado de la técnica anterior. Nuestro modelo aprovecha las ventajas de una red LSTM bidireccional profunda que predice etiquetas de roles semánticos palabra por palabra y una red relacional que predice roles semánticos para expresiones de texto individuales en relación con un predicado. Las dos redes se integran en un solo modelo a través de la destilación del conocimiento, y se emplea un modelo gráfico unificado para decodificar conjuntamente marcos y roles semánticos durante la inferencia. Los experimentos con los datos estándar de FrameNet muestran que nuestro modelo supera significativamente los enfoques neuronales y no neuronales existentes, logrando una ganancia de 5,7 F1 sobre el estado actual de la técnica, para la extracción de la estructura de fotograma completo.', 'pt': 'Introduzimos um novo método para análise semântica de quadros que melhora significativamente o estado da arte anterior. Nosso modelo aproveita as vantagens de uma rede LSTM bidirecional profunda que prevê rótulos de papéis semânticos palavra por palavra e uma rede relacional que prevê papéis semânticos para expressões de texto individuais em relação a um predicado. As duas redes são integradas em um único modelo via destilação de conhecimento, e um modelo gráfico unificado é empregado para decodificar quadros e papéis semânticos em conjunto durante a inferência. Experimentos nos dados padrão do FrameNet mostram que nosso modelo supera significativamente as abordagens neurais e não neurais existentes, alcançando um ganho de 5,7 F1 sobre o estado da arte atual, para extração de estrutura de quadro completo.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une nouvelle méthode d'analyse sémantique des trames qui améliore considérablement l'état antérieur de la technique. Notre modèle tire parti des avantages d'un réseau LSTM bidirectionnel profond qui prédit les étiquettes de rôle sémantiques mot par mot et d'un réseau relationnel qui prédit les rôles sémantiques pour des expressions textuelles individuelles en relation avec un prédicat. Les deux réseaux sont intégrés dans un modèle unique par distillation des connaissances, et un modèle graphique unifié est utilisé pour décoder conjointement des trames et des rôles sémantiques pendant l'inférence. Des expériences sur les données FrameNet standard montrent que notre modèle surpasse de manière significative les approches neuronales et non neuronales existantes, obtenant un gain F1 de 5,7 par rapport à l'état actuel de la technique, pour l'extraction de structure de trame complète.", 'ja': 'フレーム-セマンティック構文解析のための新しい方法を導入し、先行技術を大幅に向上させました。我々のモデルは、単語ごとに意味役割ラベルを予測する深い双方向LSTMネットワークと、述語に関連する個々のテキスト表現の意味役割を予測する関係ネットワークの利点を利用する。2つのネットワークは、知識蒸留を介して単一のモデルに統合され、推論中にフレームと意味的役割を共同でデコードするために統一されたグラフィカルモデルが採用される。標準的なFrameNetデータの実験では、当社のモデルが既存のニューラルおよび非ニューラルアプローチを大幅に上回り、フルフレーム構造抽出のために現在の最先端を超える5.7F1ゲインを達成していることが示されています。', 'zh': '引入新框架语义解析,显改前技术水平。 吾形用深双向 LSTM 网络之势,网络可逐字占语义角,网络可占谓词者,文本表达式语义角也。 因知识提炼将两个网络集成一个模形,并用一个图形,推理中共同解码帻和语义角色。 FrameNet数之实验,明优神经非神经,全帧构取之,益于前5.7 F1。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим новый метод фрейм-семантического синтаксического анализа, который значительно улучшает уровень техники. Наша модель использует преимущества глубокой двунаправленной LSTM-сети, которая предсказывает семантические ролевые метки слово за словом, и реляционной сети, которая предсказывает семантические роли для отдельных текстовых выражений по отношению к предикату. Две сети интегрированы в одну модель посредством дистилляции знаний, и для совместного декодирования кадров и семантических ролей во время вывода используется унифицированная графическая модель. Эксперименты со стандартными данными FrameNet показывают, что наша модель значительно превосходит существующие нейронные и ненейронные подходы, достигая 5,7 F1 усиления по сравнению с текущим уровнем техники для полного извлечения структуры кадра.', 'hi': 'हम फ्रेम-सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग के लिए एक नई विधि पेश करते हैं जो कला की पूर्व स्थिति में काफी सुधार करती है। हमारा मॉडल एक गहरी द्विदिश एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क के फायदों का लाभ उठाता है जो शब्द द्वारा शब्द लेबल शब्द और एक संबंधपरक नेटवर्क की भविष्यवाणी करता है जो एक विधेय के संबंध में व्यक्तिगत पाठ अभिव्यक्तियों के लिए शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं की भविष्यवाणी करता है। दोनों नेटवर्क को ज्ञान आसवन के माध्यम से एक एकल मॉडल में एकीकृत किया जाता है, और एक एकीकृत ग्राफिकल मॉडल को अनुमान के दौरान संयुक्त रूप से फ्रेम और शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं को डीकोड करने के लिए नियोजित किया जाता है। मानक फ़्रेमनेट डेटा पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल मौजूदा तंत्रिका और गैर-तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोणों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है, पूर्ण फ्रेम संरचना निष्कर्षण के लिए कला की वर्तमान स्थिति पर 5.7 एफ 1 लाभ प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach modh nua do pharsáil fráma-shéimeantach a fheabhsaíonn go mór an úrscothacht roimhe seo. Baineann ár samhail leas as na buntáistí a bhaineann le líonra LSTM domhain déthreoch a dhéanann tuar ar róil shéimeantach lipéid focal ar fhocal agus líonra gaolmhar a thuar róil shéimeantacha do shloinnte téacs aonair i ndáil le tuar. Comhtháthaítear an dá líonra i múnla amháin trí dhriogadh eolais, agus úsáidtear múnla grafach aontaithe chun frámaí agus róil shéimeantacha a dhíchódú i gcomhpháirt le linn tátail. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar shonraí caighdeánacha FrameNet go sáraíonn ár samhail cur chuige néarúil agus neamhnéarach atá ann cheana féin go mór, ag baint amach gnóthachan 5.7 F1 thar an úrscothacht, le haghaidh eastóscadh struchtúr iomlán fráma.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ახალი მეტი, რომელიც სურათის წინასწარმოდგენებაში მნიშვნელოვანია. ჩვენი მოდელმა გამოიყენება სიტყვებით და რედაციონალური ქსელით, რომელიც განსაზღვრება სიმმანტიკური პროლის სიტყვებით და რედაციონალური ქსელით, რომელიც განსაზღვრება სმენტიკური პროლის ინდიველური ორი ქსელი ერთადერთი მოდელში ინტერგურაცია ცნობიერების განსხვავებაზე, და ერთადერთი გრაფიკალური მოდელი გამოყენებულია ერთადერთად გამოყენებული ფრამების და სენმანტიკური პროლის განსხვავება სტანდარტური FrameNet მონაცემების გამოცდილებები ჩვენი მოდელი ძალიან უფრო გავაკეთებს მსგავსი ნეიროლური და უნეიროლური მიღებები, რომლებიც 5.7 F1 მიიღება სურათის მიმდინარე სურათის განმავლობ', 'hu': 'Bevezetünk egy új módszert a frame-semantikus elemzésre, amely jelentősen javítja a korábbi technika állapotát. Modellünk kihasználja egy mély kétirányú LSTM hálózat előnyeit, amely szóról szóra előrejelzi a szemantikus szerepkörcímkéket, valamint egy olyan relációs hálózatot, amely előrejelzi az egyes szövegkifejezések szemantikai szerepét egy predikátumhoz viszonyítva. A két hálózat egyetlen modellbe integrálódik a tudás desztillációval, és egy egységes grafikus modellt alkalmaznak a keretek és a szemantikai szerepek közös dekódolására a következtetés során. A szabványos FrameNet adatokon végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a meglévő neurális és nem neurális megközelítéseket, elérve a jelenlegi technológia állapotához képest 5,7 F1 nyereséget, a teljes képszerkezet kivonásához.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση πλαισίων που βελτιώνει σημαντικά την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Το μοντέλο μας αξιοποιεί τα πλεονεκτήματα ενός μεγάλου αμφίδρομου δικτύου που προβλέπει σημασιολογικές ετικέτες ρόλων λέξη προς λέξη και ενός σχετικού δικτύου που προβλέπει σημασιολογικούς ρόλους για μεμονωμένες εκφράσεις κειμένου σε σχέση με μια πρόβλεψη. Τα δύο δίκτυα ενσωματώνονται σε ένα μόνο μοντέλο μέσω απόσταξης γνώσης, και ένα ενοποιημένο γραφικό μοντέλο χρησιμοποιείται για να αποκωδικοποιήσει από κοινού τα πλαίσια και τους σημασιολογικούς ρόλους κατά τη διάρκεια της συναγωγής. Τα πειράματα στα τυποποιημένα δεδομένα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις υπάρχουσες νευρωνικές και μη-νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις, επιτυγχάνοντας ένα κέρδος 5.7 έναντι της τρέχουσας κατάστασης της τεχνολογίας, για πλήρη εξαγωγή δομών πλαισίων.', 'it': "Introducemo un nuovo metodo per il parsing frame-semantic che migliora significativamente lo stato precedente dell'arte. Il nostro modello sfrutta i vantaggi di una rete LSTM bidirezionale profonda che predice etichette di ruolo semantiche parola per parola e di una rete relazionale che predice ruoli semantici per singole espressioni testuali in relazione a un predicato. Le due reti sono integrate in un unico modello tramite distillazione della conoscenza, e un modello grafico unificato è utilizzato per decodificare congiuntamente frame e ruoli semantici durante l'inferenza. Esperimenti sui dati standard FrameNet mostrano che il nostro modello supera significativamente gli approcci neurali e non neurali esistenti, raggiungendo un guadagno di 5,7 F1 rispetto allo stato attuale dell'arte, per l'estrazione di strutture full frame.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame naują sistemų semantinio analizavimo metodą, kuris gerokai pagerins ankstesnę pažangą. Mūsų modelis sutelkia gilaus dvikryptinio LSTM tinklo pranašumus, kurie numato semantinio vaidmens ženklinimą žodžiu po žodžiu ir santykinį tinklą, kuris numato semantinius vaidmenis atskiroms teksto išraiškoms, palyginti su predikatu. Abu tinklai integruojami į vieną model į distiliuojant žinias, o suvienodintas grafinis model is naudojamas bendrai dekoderuojant rėmus ir semantinius vaidmenis išvados metu. Eksperimentai su standartiniais FrameNet duomenimis rodo, kad mūsų modelis gerokai viršija esamus neuralinius ir ne neuralinius metodus, siekdamas 5,7 F1 pelno, palyginti su dabartine pažangiąja pažanga, kad būtų galima ištraukti visą sistemos struktūrą.', 'kk': 'Біз фрейм- семантикалық талдау үшін жаңа әдісін келтіреміз. Бұл өзінің алдыңғы күйін жақсы жасайды. Біздің үлгіміз сөздердің симантикалық роль жарлықтарын сөздердің және қатынасызды желіміздің әрбір мәтін өрнектерінің семантикалық рольдерін көрсетеді. Екі желі бір үлгі білім дистилациясы арқылы біріктірілген, біріктірілген графикалық модель біріктірілген фреймдерді және семантикалық рольдерді біріктіру үшін қолданылады. Стандартты FrameNet деректерінің тәжірибелері біздің моделіміз бар невралдық және невралдық емес жағдайларына көмектеседі. 5.7 F1 құрылғының қазіргі күйінде, толық фрейм құрылғысын тарқату үшін, біздің мо', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме нов метод за рамка-семантично анализирање кој значително ја подобрува претходната техничка состојба. Нашиот модел ги искористува предностите на длабока дворечна мрежа на ЛСТМ која предвидува семантична улога означува збор по збор и односна мрежа која предвидува семантична улога за индивидуални текстови изрази во однос на предикат. Двете мрежи се интегрирани во еден модел преку дистилација на знаење, а за заеднички декодирање на рамките и семантичните улоги се користи унифициран графички модел за време на конференцијата. Експериментите на стандардните податоци на FrameNet покажуваат дека нашиот модел значително ги надминува постоечките неурални и неурални пристапи, достигнувајќи 5,7 F1 добивка над сегашната техничка состојба, за целосна структурна екстракција на рамките.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kaedah baru untuk penghuraian bingkai-semantik yang meningkatkan keadaan seni terdahulu secara signifikan. Model kami menggunakan keuntungan rangkaian LSTM bidireksi yang mendalam yang meramalkan label peranan semantik perkataan demi perkataan dan rangkaian relatif yang meramalkan peranan semantik bagi ungkapan teks individu berkaitan dengan predikat. Dua rangkaian tersebut disertai ke dalam model tunggal melalui pengusiran pengetahuan, dan model grafik bersatu digunakan untuk menyahkod bingkai dan peranan semantik bersama-sama semasa kesimpulan. Experiments on the standard FrameNet data show that our model significantly outperforms existing neural and non-neural approaches, achieving a 5.7 F1 gain over the current state of the art, for full frame structure extraction.', 'mn': 'Бид фрэйм-semantic хуваалцааны шинэ арга замыг тайлбарлаж, урлагийн өмнөх байдлыг сайжруулдаг. Бидний загварын загвар нь хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр, харилцааны сүлжээний хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэлбэрээр зэрэг хэ Эдгээр хоёр сүлжээний хувьд мэдлэгтэй хуваалцах аргаар нэг загвар руу нэгтгэгддэг. Нэгдсэн график загвар нь халдварын үед фрейм болон семантик хөрөнгө хуваалцах хэрэгтэй. Стандарт FrameNet өгөгдлийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний загвар нь суурь мэдрэлийн болон мэдрэлийн бус ойлголтын тулд 5.7 F1 урлагийн орчин үеийн хувьд бүрэн хэмжээний бүтээгдэхүүний хувьд хүргэж байгааг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu metodu ġdid għall-analiżi semantika ta’ qafas li jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-istat ta’ l-a ħħar. Il-mudell tagħna jinbena l-vantaġġi ta’ netwerk LSTM bidirezzjonali profond li jipprevedi rwol semantiku tikketta kelma b’kelma u netwerk relattiv li jipprevedi rwoli semantiċi għal espressjonijiet tat-test individwali b’rabta ma’ predikat. Iż-żewġ netwerks huma integrati f’mudell wieħed permezz tad-distillazzjoni tal-għarfien, u mudell grafiku unifikat jintuża biex b’mod konġunt jiddekodifika l-oqfsa u r-rwoli semantiċi matul l-inferenza. Experiments on the standard FrameNet data show that our model significantly outperforms existing neural and non-neural approaches, achieving a 5.7 F1 gain over the current state of the art, for full frame structure extraction.', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയിമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിന്റെ പുതിയ രീതിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് കലാകാര്യത്തിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപി Our model leverages the advantages of a deep bidirectional LSTM network which predicts semantic role labels word by word and a relational network which predicts semantic roles for individual text expressions in relation to a predicate.  ഈ രണ്ട് ശൃംഖലങ്ങള്\u200d അറിവ് വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ ഒരേ മോഡലിലേക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു യൂണിക്കൂട്ടിയ ഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയ സാധാരണ ഫ്രെമ്നെറ്റ് ഡേറ്റായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നിലവിലുള്ള നെയൂറലിലും നെയൂറലില്ലാത്ത സാധ്യതകളിലും നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy nową metodę parsowania semantycznego ramki, która znacząco poprawia dotychczasowy stan techniki. Nasz model wykorzystuje zalety głębokiej dwukierunkowej sieci LSTM, która przewiduje semantyczne etykiety roli słowo po słowie oraz sieci relacyjnej, która przewiduje role semantyczne dla poszczególnych wyrażeń tekstowych w stosunku do predykatu. Obie sieci są zintegrowane w jeden model poprzez destylację wiedzy, a ujednolicony model graficzny jest stosowany do wspólnego dekodowania ram i ról semantycznych podczas wnioskowania. Eksperymenty na standardowych danych FrameNet pokazują, że nasz model znacznie przewyższa istniejące podejścia neuronowe i nieneuronowe, osiągając zysk 5,7 F1 w porównaniu z aktualnym stanem techniki, w celu ekstrakcji pełnej struktury klatek.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein ny metode for å tolka ramme-semantisk som betydelig forbedrar tidlegare tilstanden til kunsten. Modellen vårt leverer fordelene til ein dyp bidireksjonal LSTM- nettverk som foregår semantisk rolletikettar ord etter ord og ei relasjonell nettverk som foregår semantiske roller for individuelle tekstuttrykk i forhold til ei predikat. Dei to nettverkene er integrerte i eit enkelt modell via kunnskapsdistillasjon, og ein uniformert grafisk modell vert arbeidt for å dekode rammer og semantiske rolar saman under infeksjon. Eksperimentar på standardintdata for FrameNet viser at modellen vårt utfører signifikante ut eksisterande neuralnærmingar og ikkje-neuralnærmingar, og når det gjer ein 5,7 F1 får over den gjeldande tilstanden til kunsten, for fullstendig framstrukturextraksjon.', 'ro': 'Introducem o nouă metodă de analizare semantică a cadrelor care îmbunătățește semnificativ starea anterioară a tehnicii. Modelul nostru valorifică avantajele unei rețele LSTM bidirecționale profunde care prezice etichetele de rol semantice cu cuvânt și o rețea relațională care prezice roluri semantice pentru expresiile text individuale în raport cu un predict. Cele două rețele sunt integrate într-un singur model prin distilarea cunoștințelor, iar un model grafic unificat este utilizat pentru a decoda împreună cadrele și rolurile semantice în timpul inferenței. Experimentele pe datele standard FrameNet arată că modelul nostru depășește semnificativ abordările neurale și non-neurale existente, obținând un câștig F1 de 5,7 față de starea actuală a tehnologiei, pentru extragerea structurii full frame.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu metodu za razmatranje okvira semantičkog analiza koja značajno poboljšava prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Naš model utiče na prednost duboke dvorične mreže LSTM-a koja predviđa semantičke uloge oznake reči po reči i vezanoj mreži koja predviđa semantičke uloge za pojedinačne tekstske izraze u odnosu na predikat. Dva mreža su integrisana u jednog modela putem destilacije znanja, a ujedinjeni grafički model je zaposlen za zajedničku dekodiranje ramova i semantičkih uloga tokom infekcije. Eksperimenti o standardnim podacima FrameNet pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi postojeće neuralne i ne-neuralne pristupe, ostvarivši 5,7 F1 dobitak nad trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti, za potpunu strukturu strukture.', 'si': 'අපි අලුත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරන්නේ ක්\u200dරීම-සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා අලුත් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කර අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ගොඩක් බිදිරික්ෂිත LSTM ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා සෙමැන්ටික් භාවිත ලේබල් වචන වචන සහ සම්බන්ධ ජාලය ජාලය දෙන්නෙක් දැනගන්නේ දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වලින් එක්ක මොඩල් එක්කෙන් එක්කෙන් එකතු ග්\u200dරාෆික් මොඩල් එක්කෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක ස්ථානික ෆ්\u200dරේම්නෙට් දත්තේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් ඉතින් න්\u200dයූරාල් සහ නොන්යූරාල් අවස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab cusub oo ku qoran jardiinada sawirka ah, taasoo si weyn u hagaajiya xaaladda hore ee farshaxanka. Tusaalkayaga ayaa kordhiya faa'iidada shabakadda LSTM oo aad u dheer, taasoo ka sii sheegaya qofka semantika ah oo ku qoran hadalka iyo shabakadda xiriirka ah, kaas oo horay u sheegaya qayb-qayb ah oo ku saabsan hadalka qoraalka ee gaarka ah. Labada shabakadooda waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa qaab keliya oo lagu kala soocay aqoonta, waxaana loo isticmaalaa tusaale xaraf ah si uu ugu wada dexeeyo firaaqada iyo qaybaha semantika marka lagu jiro. Imtixaanka ku saabsan danbiyada caadiga FrameNet waxay muuqataa in modelkayagu aad buu u muujiyaa habbooyinka ku jirta neurada iyo neurada, si uu u helo faa'iido 5.7 F1 oo ka kordha xaaladda farshaxanka oo dhan.", 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en ny metod för ramsemantisk tolkning som avsevärt förbättrar den tidigare tekniken. Vår modell utnyttjar fördelarna med ett djupt dubbelriktat LSTM-nätverk som förutspår semantiska rolletiketter ord för ord och ett relationellt nätverk som förutspår semantiska roller för enskilda textuttryck i förhållande till ett predikat. De två nätverken integreras i en enda modell genom kunskapsdestillation, och en enhetlig grafisk modell används för att gemensamt avkoda ramar och semantiska roller under inferensen. Experiment på standard FrameNet data visar att vår modell avsevärt överträffar befintliga neurala och icke-neurala tillvägagångssätt, vilket uppnår en 5,7 F1 vinst jämfört med nuvarande state of the art, för full frame structure extraction.', 'ta': 'நாம் சட்டத்தின் பாடல் புதிய முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது கலையின் முன்னோட்ட நிலையை மேம்படுத்துகிறது. Our model leverages the advantages of a deep bidirectional LSTM network which predicts semantic role labels word by word and a relational network which predicts semantic roles for individual text expressions in relation to a predicate.  இந்த இரண்டு வலைப்பின்னல்கள் அறிவு பிரிப்பு மூலம் ஒரு மாதிரியாக ஒன்றாக சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளன, மற்றும் ஒரு unified வரைப்படம் மாதிரியாக பயன்படுத்தப் நிலையான சட்டத்தின் தரவுகளின் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது நம் மாதிரி தற்போதைய நிலையில் இருக்கும் புதிய நெருக்கல் மற்றும் புதிய அணுகல்களை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, தற்', 'ur': 'ہم نے فرم-semantic parsing کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جسے آهنگ کی پہلے موقعیت بہتر ہوتی ہے. ہماری مدل ایک عمیق بیڈیرسیٹن LSTM نیٹ ورک کی فائدہ اضافہ کرتا ہے جو سیمانٹی رول لابل کلمات کے ذریعہ کلمات اور رابطہ نیٹ ورک کے ذریعے لکھ رہا ہے جو ایک فرد کے متن اضافہ کے لئے سیمانٹی رول کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے۔ دو نیٹورک ایک مدل میں ایک علم جدائی کے ذریعہ متصل کئے جاتے ہیں، اور ایک متصل گرافیکل مدل کے ذریعے فرموں اور سیمانٹی رول کے ساتھ ڈکوڈ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. استاندارڈ فارمنٹ ڈیٹا پر تلاش کرتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ موجود نیورال اور غیر نیورال کے قریبوں سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، 5.7 F1 کو هنر کی موجود حالت پر فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے، پورا فرم ساختہ اضافہ کے لئے۔', 'uz': 'Biz rasm soniyalarning oldingi holatini o\'zgartirib chiqarish uchun yangi usulni anglatamiz. Bizning modelimizning eng yuqori LSTM tarmoqning foydalanishini yordam beradi. Bu so\'z so\'z va bog\'liq tarmoqning so\'zlari bilan "semantik role" tugmalarini bajaradi. Ikkita tarmoqlar taʼrifni ajratish orqali bir modelga birlashtirilgan, va bir birlashtirilgan grafik modeli birlashtirilgan freymlar va semantik raqamlarini kodlash uchun ishlatiladi. Name', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một phương pháp mới để phân tích khung chữ nghĩa, nó sẽ cải thiện quan điểm hiện đại của nghệ thuật. Người mẫu của chúng ta sử dụng lợi thế của một mạng lưới LSD hai trực tiếp sâu dẫn, nó dự đoán các nhãn hiệu tác động theo chữ từ và một mạng lưới liên quan, nó dự đoán các vai trò theo ngữ pháp của các chữ biểu đối với một dạng khó. Hai mạng lưới được hòa nhập vào một mô hình duy nhất qua việc chưng cất tri thức, và một mô hình đồ họa thống nhất được dùng để giải mã các khung và các vai thì ngữ pháp trong suốt nhận biết. Thí nghiệm trên dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn của Khung lưới cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta khả năng vượt trội khả năng tồn tại các tiếp cận thần kinh và không-thần kinh, đạt được lợi nhuận 57 F1 trên trạng thái hiện thời của nghệ thuật, để chiết xuất toàn bộ khung.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме нов метод за рамково-семантично анализиране, който значително подобрява предишното състояние на изкуството. Нашият модел използва предимствата на дълбока двупосочна мрежа, която прогнозира семантични ролеви етикети дума по дума и релационна мрежа, която прогнозира семантични роли за отделни текстови изрази във връзка с прогнозата. Двете мрежи са интегрирани в един модел чрез дестилация на знанието и унифициран графичен модел се използва за съвместно декодиране на рамки и семантични роли по време на заключението. Експериментите на стандартните данни показват, че нашият модел значително превъзхожда съществуващите невронни и неневронни подходи, постигайки 5.7 печалба спрямо сегашното състояние на изкуството, за екстракция на цялостна структура.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu metodu za razmatranje okvira semantičkog analiza koja značajno poboljšava prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Naš model utječe na prednost duboke dvorične mreže LSTM-a koja predviđa semantičke uloge oznake riječi po riječi i vezne mreže koja predviđa semantičke uloge za pojedinačne tekstske izraze u odnosu na predikat. Dvije mreže su integrirane u jednom modelu putem destilacije znanja, a ujedinjeni grafički model je zaposleni za zajedničku dekodiranje okvira i semantičkih uloga tijekom infekcije. Eksperimenti o standardnim podacima FrameNet pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi postojeće neuralne i ne-neuralne pristupe, ostvarivši 5,7 F1 dobitak nad trenutnom stanju umjetnosti, za potpunu strukturu strukture.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een nieuwe methode voor frame-semantische parsing die de huidige stand van de techniek aanzienlijk verbetert. Ons model maakt gebruik van de voordelen van een diep bidirectioneel LSTM-netwerk dat semantische rollabels woord voor woord voorspelt en een relationeel netwerk dat semantische rollen voorspelt voor individuele tekstexpressies in relatie tot een voorspelling. De twee netwerken worden geïntegreerd in één model via kennisdestillatie, en een uniform grafisch model wordt gebruikt om gezamenlijk frames en semantische rollen te decoderen tijdens inferentie. Experimenten op de standaard FrameNet gegevens tonen aan dat ons model significant beter presteert dan bestaande neurale en niet-neurale benaderingen, waardoor een 5,7 F1 winst wordt bereikt ten opzichte van de huidige stand van de techniek, voor volledige framestructurextractie.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en ny metode til frame-semantisk parsing, der markant forbedrer den tidligere state of te art. Vores model udnytter fordelene ved et dybt bidirektionelt LSTM-netværk, der forudsiger semantiske rollemærker ord for ord og et relationelt netværk, der forudsiger semantiske roller for individuelle tekstudtryk i forhold til et prædikat. De to netværk er integreret i en enkelt model via videndedestillation, og en samlet grafisk model anvendes til i fællesskab at afkode rammer og semantiske roller under inferensen. Eksperimenter med standard FrameNet data viser, at vores model betydeligt overgår eksisterende neurale og ikke-neurale tilgange, hvilket opnår en 5,7 F1 gevinst i forhold til den nuværende state of te art, for fuld frame struktur ekstraktion.', 'de': 'Wir führen eine neue Methode für Frame-Semantic Parsing ein, die den Stand der Technik deutlich verbessert. Unser Modell nutzt die Vorteile eines tiefen bidirektionalen LSTM-Netzwerks, das semantische Rollenbeschriftungen Wort für Wort vorhersagt, und eines relationalen Netzwerks, das semantische Rollen für einzelne Textausdrücke in Bezug auf ein Prädikat vorhersagt. Die beiden Netzwerke werden mittels Wissensdestillation in ein einziges Modell integriert, und ein einheitliches grafisches Modell wird verwendet, um Frames und semantische Rollen während der Inferenz gemeinsam zu dekodieren. Experimente an den Standard-FrameNet-Daten zeigen, dass unser Modell bestehende neuronale und nicht-neuronale Ansätze deutlich übertrifft und einen 5,7 F1-Gewinn gegenüber dem aktuellen Stand der Technik für die Extraktion von Full-Frame-Strukturen erzielt.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan metode baru untuk pemeriksaan frame-semantis yang signifikan meningkatkan keadaan seni sebelumnya. Model kami menggunakan keuntungan dari jaringan LSTM bidireksi dalam yang memprediksi peran semantis label kata demi kata dan jaringan relatif yang memprediksi peran semantis untuk ekspresi teks individu berkaitan dengan predikat. Dua jaringan ini terintegrasi dalam model tunggal melalui distillasi pengetahuan, dan model grafis bersatu digunakan untuk bersama-sama mendekode bingkai dan peran semantis selama kesimpulan. Eksperimen pada data standar FrameNet menunjukkan bahwa model kita secara signifikan melebihi pendekatan saraf dan bukan saraf yang ada, mencapai keuntungan 5.7 F1 atas keadaan seni saat ini, untuk ekstraksi struktur frame lengkap.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش جدید برای تجزیه کردن فرم-semantic را معرفی می کنیم که به طور معنی وضعیت پیشینیان هنر را بهتر می کند. مدل ما فایده\u200cهای شبکه LSTM عمیق را تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهد که نقشه\u200cهای semantic را با کلمه و شبکه ارتباطی پیش بینی می\u200cدهد که نقشه\u200cهای semantic برای استفاده\u200cهای متن شخصی در ارتباط با یک پیش بینی می\u200cکند. این دو شبکه در یک مدل با وسیله جدایی علم متصل می شوند و یک مدل گرافیک متصل برای جدایی فرم\u200cها و نقش\u200cهای semantic در طول آلودگی استخدام می\u200cشود. تجربه\u200cهایی روی داده\u200cهای FrameNet استاندارد نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما به طور معنی نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی و غیرعصبی موجود بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد، با رسیدن یک 5.7 F1 در حالت فعلی هنر، برای استخراج ساختاری کامل فرام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Biz frame-semantik analyzasy üçin täze bir yöntem tanyşdyrýarys we bu sungatyň öňki durumyny has gowurar. Biziň modelimiz gaty döwürelik LSTM şebekesiniň önümlerini çykarýar. Bu semantik nämeleri söz bilen söz bilen we baglaýyşyk şebekesine görä semantik nämelerini täsir edip bilýär. Bu iki a ňlar bilgi taýýarlanmasy bilen bir nusga içine birleştirilýär we ýerleşdirilýän grafik nusga çykarmak üçin bir nusga we semantik nusga çykarmak üçin işledilýär. Standart FrameNet maglumatyndaky örnekler biziň modelimiz bolan neural we neural ýagdaýynyň golaýyny a şdyrmak üçin 5.7 F1 sanat durumynyň üstünde gazanýandygyny görkez.', 'sw': 'We introduce a new method for frame-semantic parsing that significantly improves the prior state of the art.  Mfano wetu unatumia faida za mtandao wa LSTM uliokuwa na mstari mkubwa ambao unabashiri maambukizi ya kimapenzi kwa neno na mtandao wa mahusiano yanayoonyesha nafasi za kimapenzi kwa hisia za maandishi binafsi kuhusiana na utabiri. Mitandao haya mawili yanaunganishwa katika muundo mmoja kwa kupitia utofauti wa maarifa, na muundo wa pamoja wa picha unatumiwa kwa pamoja kupunguza mfumo na nafasi za sekunde wakati wa maambukizi. Tatizo la taarifa za mfumo wa Mtandao unaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa unaofanywa na mbinu zisizo na neura, kutekeleza mafanikio ya F1 5.7 kwa hali ya sasa ya sanaa, kwa ajili ya kutengenezwa kwa miundombinu kamili.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 틀의 의미 분석 방법을 도입하여 기존 기술을 현저하게 개선했다.우리의 모델은 심층 양방향 LSTM 네트워크와 관계 네트워크의 장점을 이용하여 전자는 한 글자씩 의미 역할 라벨을 예측하고 후자는 단일 텍스트 표현식이 술어에 대한 의미 역할을 예측한다.지식 추출을 통해 두 네트워크를 하나의 모델에 통합시키고 추리 과정에서 통일된 도형 모델을 이용하여 디코딩 프레임워크와 의미 역할을 결합시킨다.표준 FrameNet 데이터에서의 실험에 따르면 우리의 모델은 기존의 신경과 비신경 방법보다 현저히 우수하며, 전체 프레임 구조 추출에 있어 현재의 기술 수준에 비해 5.7 F1 이득을 얻었다.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n nuwe metode vir raam-semantiese verwerking wat betekenlik die voorree staat van die kuns verbeter. Ons model verwyder die voordele van 'n diep bidireksjonale LSTM netwerk wat semantiese roletikette voorskou word deur woord en 'n relatiewe netwerk wat semantiese roles voorskou vir individuele teks uitdrukkings in relatie met 'n predikaat. Die twee netwerke is integreer in 'n enkele model deur kennis-destilasie, en 'n eenvoudige grafiese model is gebruik om rame en semantiese role te dekodeer tydens inferensie. Experiments on the standard FrameNet data show that our model significantly outperforms existing neural and non-neural approaches, aching a 5.7 F1 gain over the current state of the art, for full frame structure extraction.", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një metodë të re për analizimin frame-semantic që përmirëson ndjeshëm gjendjen e mëparshme të artit. Modeli ynë nxjerr përfitimet e një rrjeti LSTM të thellë dy-drejtues që parashikon rolin semantik etiketon fjalë me fjalë dhe një rrjeti marrëdhënies që parashikon rolin semantik për shprehjet individuale të tekstit në lidhje me një predikatë. Të dy rrjetet janë të integruar në një model të vetëm nëpërmjet distillacionit të njohurive dhe një model grafik i unifikuar përdoret për të dekodifikuar së bashku kornizat dhe rolet semantike gjatë përfundimit. Eksperimentet në të dhënat standarte të FrameNet tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron ndjeshëm qasjet ekzistuese neuronale dhe jo-neuronale, duke arritur një fitim 5.7 F1 mbi gjendjen aktuale të teknologjisë, për nxjerrjen e strukturës së plotë të kuadrit.', 'am': 'አዲስ የፍሬም-semantic ማኅበረሰብ አዲስ ልማድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን ለጥልቅ የLSTM መረብ ጥቅሞችን ያሳርፋል፤ በንግግር እና በተገኘው የግንኙነት መረብ ቃላትን እና የግንኙነት መረብ በጉዳዩ የጽሑፍ ትክክለቶችን በሚያሳየው የsemantic ትክክል ይደረጋል፡፡ ሁለቱ መረብ እውቀት በተለየ አንዲት ሞዴል ሆነዋል፡፡ የአሁኑን የፍሬሜኔት ዳታ መክፈት የሞላው ሞዴላታችን የአሁኑን የኔural እና የneural ደረጃዎች በሙሉ የፍሬም አካባቢ ግንኙነት 5.7 F1 እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր մեթոդ շրջանակի սեմանտիկ վերլուծության համար, որը նշանակալի բարելավում է նախկին արվեստի վիճակը: Մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է խորը երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT ցանցի առավելությունները, որոնք կանխագուշակում են սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակները բառ առ բառ և հարաբերական ցանց, որոնք կանխագուշակում են սեմանտիկ դերերը առանձին տեքստի արտահայտումների հարաբերության մեջ: Երկու ցանցերը ինտեգրված են մեկ մոդելի մեջ գիտելիքի դիսլիլացիայի միջոցով, և միավորված գրաֆիկ մոդելը օգտագործվում է միասին բաժանելու շրջաններ և սեմանտիկ դերեր հետեւանքների ընթացքում: Ստանդարտ Ֆրամենեթ տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող նյարդային և ոչ նյարդային մոտեցումները, որոնք հասնում են 5.7 F1 շահույթին ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիայի վերաբերյալ', 'bn': 'ফ্রেম-সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা শিল্পের পূর্ববর্তী পরিস্থিতির উন্নতি  আমাদের মডেল একটি গভীর বিদ্যমান LSTM নেটওয়ার্কের সুবিধা প্রদান করে, যা শব্দ এবং একটি সম্পর্ক নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেলের প্রতি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে  জ্ঞান বিচ্ছিন্ন করার মাধ্যমে এই দুই নেটওয়ার্ক একটি মডেলে একত্রিত হয়েছে এবং একটি একত্রিত গ্রাফিক্যাল মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে সংগঠনের সময় সং স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ফ্রেমেন্ট ডাটা সম্পর্কে পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল বিদ্যমান নিউরেল এবং নিউরেলিয়াল উপায়ের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করে দেখাচ্ছে, যা বর্', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu metodu za razmatranje okvira semantičkog analiza koja značajno poboljšava prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Naš model utiče na prednost duboke dvorične mreže LSTM-a koja predviđa semantičku ulogu označava riječ po riječi i veznu mrežu koja predviđa semantične uloge za pojedinačne tekstske izraze u vezi sa predikatom. Dvije mreže su integrisane u jednog model a putem destilacije znanja, a ujedinjeni grafički model je zaposleni za zajedničku dekodiranje okvira i semantičkih uloga tijekom infekcije. Eksperimenti o standardnim podacima FrameNet pokazuju da naš model značajno iznosi postojeće neuralne i ne-neuralne pristupe, ostvarivši 5,7 F1 dobitak nad trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti, za potpunu strukturu strukture.', 'ca': "Introduïm un nou mètode d'analització semàntica que millora significativament l'estat d'art anterior. El nostre model aprofita les avantatges d'una xarxa LSTM bidireccional profunda que prediu etiquetes de paper semàntic paraula a paraula i una xarxa relacional que prediu funcions semàntiques per expressions de text individuals en relació a un predicat. The two networks are integrated into a single model via knowledge distillation, and a unified graphical model is employed to jointly decode frames and semantic roles during inference.  Els experiments de les dades estandards de FrameNet mostren que el nostre model supera significativament els enfocaments neurals i no neurals existents, aconseguint un guany de 5,7 F1 sobre l'estat actual de l'art, per a l'extracció completa de l'estructura del marc.", 'az': 'Biz frame-semantik analizi üçün yeni bir metod tanışırıq ki, sanatın əvvəlki durumunu çox yaxşılaşdırır. Bizim modellərimiz, sözlərlə semantik rol etiketlərinin sözlərini və bəzi metin ifadələrinin semantik rollərini təmin edir. Bu iki a ğ bilgi destilasyonu vasitəsilə birlikdə bir modellə birlikdə birlikdə bir grafik modellə birlikdə çərçikləri və semantik rollərini kodlamaq üçün istifadə edilir. Standart FrameNet verilənlərin təcrübələri göstərir ki, modellərimiz mövcuddur nöral və nöral olmayan təcrübələrini, sanatın a ğıllı durumu üzərində 5.7 F1 qəbul edərək, tam fram yapısını çıxartmaq üçün mövcuddur.', 'cs': 'Představujeme novou metodu sémantického parsování rámců, která výrazně zlepšuje současný stav techniky. Náš model využívá výhod hluboké obousměrné LSTM sítě, která předpovídá sémantické popisky rolí slovo po slovu, a relační sítě, která předpovídá sémantické role pro jednotlivé textové výrazy ve vztahu k predikátu. Obě sítě jsou integrovány do jednoho modelu prostřednictvím destilace znalostí a jednotný grafický model je použit pro společné dekódování rámců a sémantických rolí během inference. Experimenty na standardních datech FrameNet ukazují, že náš model výrazně překonává stávající neuronové a neurální přístupy a dosahuje zisku 5,7 F1 ve srovnání se současným stavem techniky pro extrakci struktury plného rámce.', 'et': 'Tutvustame uut raamsemantilise parsimise meetodit, mis parandab oluliselt varasemat tehnika taset. Meie mudel kasutab sügava kahesuunalise LSTM-võrgu eeliseid, mis ennustab sõna-sõnalt semantilisi rollisildisi, ja relatsioonivõrgu, mis ennustab semantilisi rolle üksikute tekstiavaldiste suhtes prognoosiga. Kaks võrgustikku integreeritakse ühte mudelisse teadmiste destilleerimise kaudu ning ühtset graafilist mudelit kasutatakse raamide ja semantiliste rollide dekodeerimiseks järelduste ajal. Standardsete FrameNeti andmetega tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et meie mudel ületab oluliselt olemasolevaid neuraalseid ja mittenneuraalseid lähenemisviise, saavutades täiskaadrilise struktuuri ekstraheerimiseks 5,7 F1 kasu praeguse tehnika tasemega võrreldes.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden framesemanttisen jäsennysmenetelmän, joka parantaa merkittävästi aikaisempaa nykytilaa. Mallimme hyödyntää syvän kaksisuuntaisen LSTM-verkoston etuja, joka ennustaa semanttisia roolimerkintöjä sana kerrallaan, sekä relaatioverkon, joka ennustaa semanttisia rooleja yksittäisille tekstilausekkeille suhteessa ennusteeseen. Nämä kaksi verkostoa integroidaan yhteen malliin tiedon tislauksen avulla, ja yhtenäistä graafista mallia käytetään kehysten ja semanttisten roolien purkamiseen yhdessä päättelyn aikana. FrameNet-standardidatalla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi olemassa olevista neuro- ja ei-neuraalisista lähestymistavoista, saavuttaen 5,7 F1-vahvistuksen nykytekniikan tasoon verrattuna täyden kennon rakenteeseen.', 'jv': 'frame-semanti Monday Awak dhéwé éntuk Getama karo Standard frame Network dadi songan ngomong nik model kita bener tentang nggawe gerakan oleh dumateng liyane', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani hanyoyi wa parse na firam-semanti, da mai kyau mai gabatar halin sanatarwa. MisalinMu na ƙara amfani ga jerin LTRM mai ƙaranci da ke cikin shirin LSSM mai ƙaranci, wanda ke yi bayani ga alama ma ma'anar mutane da maganar da kuma wani shirin da ke danganta, mai bastarwa na yi amfani da aikin semanti kan ajiyyar magana masu cikin sha'anin mutane da ke danganta. Suna haɗi biyu zuwa wata motel guda, a yi amfani da zane-rarraba zane, kuma an yi amfani da wani motel mai daidaita grafi dõmin ya kodi firam da aikin semantiki a lokacin da za'a yi sura. Tajararin da ke daidaita data na FrameNet za'a nuna cewa misalinmu yana mai significant outdo wasu hanyoyin neural da bã-neural, kuma yana sãmun babban amfani da 5.7 F1 kan halin da ke kai yanzu, wa zartar da cikakken firam.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo novo metodo za semantično razčlenjevanje okvirjev, ki bistveno izboljša prejšnje stanje tehnike. Naš model izkorišča prednosti globokega dvosmernega LSTM omrežja, ki napoveduje semantične oznake vlog besede za besedo, in relacijskega omrežja, ki napoveduje semantične vloge za posamezne besedilne izraze v odnosu do napovedi. Obe mreži sta integrirani v en model prek destilacije znanja, uporabljen pa je enoten grafični model za skupno dekodiranje okvirjev in semantičnih vlog med sklepanjem. Eksperimenti na standardnih FrameNet podatkih kažejo, da naš model bistveno presega obstoječe nevronske in nevronske pristope ter doseže 5,7 F1 pridobivanje v primerjavi s trenutnim stanjem tehnike, za ekstrakcijo strukture polnega formata.', 'he': 'We introduce a new method for frame-semantic parsing that significantly improves the prior state of the art.  Our model leverages the advantages of a deep bidirectional LSTM network which predicts semantic role labels word by word and a relational network which predicts semantic roles for individual text expressions in relation to a predicate.  שני הרשתות מושלמות לדוגמא אחת באמצעות דסטיל ידע, ומודל גרפי מאוחד משמש כדי לפענח מבנים משותפים ולתפקידים סמנטיים במהלך ההסקנה. ניסויים על נתונים סטנדרטיים של FrameNet מראים שהמודל שלנו משפיע בצורה משמעותית על גישות עצביות ולא עצביות קיימות, להשיג רווח 5.7 F1 מעל המצב הנוכחי של האמנות, עבור חיפוש ממבנה מלא.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གཞི་semantic(frame)ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྟངས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་བཤད་ནས་གནད་དོན་པའི་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད། Our model leverages the advantages of a deep bidirectional LSTM network which predicts semantic role labels word by word and a relational network which predicts semantic roles for individual text expressions in relation to a predicate. དྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུད་སྣེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྲིད་འདུག། Experiments on the standard FrameNet data show that our model significantly outperforms existing neural and non-neural approaches, achieving a 5.7 F1 gain over the current state of the art, for full frame structure extraction.'}
{'en': 'Getting the Most out of AMR Parsing', 'ar': 'الحصول على أقصى استفادة من تحليل AMR', 'es': 'Cómo aprovechar al máximo el análisis de AMR', 'pt': 'Obtendo o máximo da análise AMR', 'fr': "Tirer le meilleur parti de l'analyse AMR", 'zh': '充用 AMR 解析', 'ja': 'AMRパーシングを最大限に活用する', 'hi': 'AMR पार्सिंग से बाहर सबसे अधिक हो रही है', 'ru': 'Получение максимальной отдачи от анализа AMR', 'ga': 'An Bhaint is Fearr a Bhaint as Parsáil AMR', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση στο έπακρο της ανάλυσης AMR', 'hu': 'A legtöbbet hozza ki az AMR értelmezésből', 'it': "Ottenere il massimo dall'analisi AMR", 'kk': 'AMR талдаудың ең көп шегін алу', 'mk': 'Најмногу се извлекува од анализирањето на AMR', 'ms': 'Mendapatkan Kebanyakan Dari Menghurai AMR', 'ml': 'എഎംആര്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങില്\u200d നിന്നും ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പാട് കിട്ടുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Ħruġ l-Aktar mill-Analiżi tal-AMR', 'mn': 'АМР шинжилгээний хамгийн олон', 'no': 'Hentar det meste ut av AMR- tolking', 'pl': 'Jak najlepiej wykorzystać AMR Parsing', 'ro': 'Profitați la maximum de analizarea AMR', 'lt': 'Ištraukti kuo daugiau iš AMR analizavimo', 'sr': 'Najviše od AMR analize', 'si': 'AMR විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් වැඩිම විශාලයක් නැති වෙනවා', 'so': 'Ka soo bixinta jardiinada AMR', 'sv': 'Få ut det mesta av AMR-tolkning', 'ta': 'AMR பாசிங்கில் இருந்து மிகவும் பெறுகிறது', 'ur': 'AMR پارچینگ میں سب سے زیادہ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Lấy được nhiều thông tin nhất từ AMR Parsons đang phân tích.', 'bg': 'Възползвайте се максимално от анализирането на АМР', 'da': 'Få mest muligt ud af AMR-analyse', 'nl': 'Het meeste uit AMR Parsing halen', 'hr': 'Najviše od AMR analize', 'de': 'AMR Parsing optimal nutzen', 'id': 'Mendapatkan Yang Paling Dari Penganalisis AMR', 'fa': 'برداشتن بیشترین از تحلیل AMR', 'sw': 'Kutokea Uchaguzi wa AMR', 'ko': 'AMR 분석 활용', 'af': 'Kry die mees uit AMR verwerking', 'sq': 'Duke marrë më shumë nga analizimi AMR', 'tr': 'Iň Kop Hata Çykarmak', 'az': 'Ən çox AMR oxuması', 'bs': 'Najviše od AMR razmatranja', 'ca': "Obtenir el màxim de l'analisi AMR", 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'et': 'AMR analüüsimisest maksimaalselt kasu saamine', 'bn': 'এমআর পার্সিং থেকে সবচেয়ে বের করা হচ্ছে', 'fi': 'AMR-analyysin hyödyntäminen parhaalla mahdollisella tavalla', 'hy': 'ԱՄՌ-ի վերլուծության ամենաշատն ստանալը', 'cs': 'Získání maximálního využití AMR Parsing', 'he': 'להוציא את הכי הרבה מחקר AMR', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'bo': 'AMR་གི་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ནས་ཡོངས་ཤོག་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ', 'ha': 'Fitarwa daga Tsarawa na AMR', 'sk': 'Čim bolj izkoristite analizo AMR'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes to tackle the AMR parsing bottleneck by improving two components of an AMR parser : concept identification and alignment. We first build a Bidirectional LSTM based concept identifier that is able to incorporate richer contextual information to learn sparse AMR concept labels. We then extend an HMM-based word-to-concept alignment model with graph distance distortion and a rescoring method during decoding to incorporate the structural information in the AMR graph. We show integrating the two components into an existing AMR parser results in consistently better performance over the state of the art on various datasets.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة معالجة عنق الزجاجة لتحليل AMR من خلال تحسين مكونين من محلل AMR: تحديد المفهوم والمواءمة. نقوم أولاً ببناء معرف مفهوم قائم على LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه قادر على دمج معلومات سياقية أكثر ثراءً لتعلم تسميات مفهوم AMR المتفرقة. نقوم بعد ذلك بتوسيع نموذج محاذاة الكلمة إلى المفهوم المستند إلى HMM مع تشويه مسافة الرسم البياني وطريقة الإنقاذ أثناء فك التشفير لدمج المعلومات الهيكلية في الرسم البياني AMR. نظهر أن دمج المكونين في محلل AMR الحالي يؤدي إلى أداء أفضل باستمرار على أحدث التقنيات في مجموعات البيانات المختلفة.', 'fr': "Cet article propose de s'attaquer au goulot d'étranglement de l'analyse AMR en améliorant deux composants d'un analyseur AMR\xa0: l'identification et l'alignement des concepts. Nous créons d'abord un identifiant de concept basé sur LSTM bidirectionnel qui est capable d'intégrer des informations contextuelles plus riches pour apprendre des étiquettes conceptuelles AMR clairsemées. Nous développons ensuite un modèle d'alignement mot-concept basé sur HMM avec distorsion de distance du graphe et une méthode de recopie pendant le décodage pour intégrer les informations structurelles dans le graphe AMR. Nous montrons que l'intégration des deux composants dans un analyseur AMR existant entraîne une amélioration constante des performances par rapport à l'état de l'art sur divers ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe lidar com o gargalo da análise AMR melhorando dois componentes de um analisador AMR: identificação de conceito e alinhamento. Primeiro, criamos um identificador de conceito bidirecional baseado em LSTM que é capaz de incorporar informações contextuais mais ricas para aprender rótulos de conceito AMR esparsos. Em seguida, estendemos um modelo de alinhamento palavra-conceito baseado em HMM com distorção de distância do gráfico e um método de rescoring durante a decodificação para incorporar as informações estruturais no gráfico AMR. Mostramos que a integração dos dois componentes em um analisador AMR existente resulta em um desempenho consistentemente melhor em relação ao estado da arte em vários conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'Este documento propone abordar el cuello de botella del análisis de AMR mediante la mejora de dos componentes de un analizador de AMR: la identificación y alineación de conceptos. Primero creamos un identificador de concepto basado en LSTM bidireccional que es capaz de incorporar información contextual más rica para aprender etiquetas conceptuales de AMR dispersas. Luego ampliamos un modelo de alineación palabra a concepto basado en HMM con distorsión de la distancia del gráfico y un método de recuperación durante la decodificación para incorporar la información estructural en el gráfico AMR. Demostramos que la integración de los dos componentes en un analizador AMR existente da como resultado un rendimiento consistentemente mejor que el estado del arte en varios conjuntos de datos.', 'ja': '本稿では、AMR構文解析器のコンセプト識別とアライメントという2つのコンポーネントを改善することで、AMR構文解析のボトルネックに取り組むことを提案する。まず、より豊富なコンテキスト情報を組み込んで、まばらなAMRコンセプトラベルを学習できる、双方向LSTMベースのコンセプト識別子を構築します。次に、グラフ距離の歪みを伴うＨＭＭベースのワードツーコンセプトアライメントモデルを拡張し、デコード中に再スコアリング方法を使用して、ＡＭＲグラフに構造情報を組み込む。既存のAMRパーサーに2つのコンポーネントを統合すると、さまざまなデータセットで最先端のパフォーマンスを一貫して向上させることができます。', 'zh': '本文议改AMR解析器二组件以决AMR解析瓶颈:其概识齐。 先立一于LSTM双向名标识符,合而富之上下文以学疏AMR。 然后广HMM词到名,离真解码复评分,以合AMR图。 展此二组件,集于AMR解析器中,可以数集上,终始如一。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एएमआर पार्सर के दो घटकों में सुधार करके एएमआर पार्सिंग बाधा से निपटने का प्रस्ताव करता है: अवधारणा पहचान और संरेखण। हम पहले एक द्विदिश एलएसटीएम आधारित अवधारणा पहचानकर्ता का निर्माण करते हैं जो विरल एएमआर अवधारणा लेबल सीखने के लिए समृद्ध प्रासंगिक जानकारी को शामिल करने में सक्षम है। फिर हम ग्राफ दूरी विरूपण के साथ एक एचएमएम-आधारित शब्द-से-अवधारणा संरेखण मॉडल का विस्तार करते हैं और एएमआर ग्राफ में संरचनात्मक जानकारी को शामिल करने के लिए डिकोडिंग के दौरान एक रीस्कोरिंग विधि का विस्तार करते हैं। हम एक मौजूदा एएमआर पार्सर में दो घटकों को एकीकृत करने के परिणामस्वरूप विभिन्न डेटासेट पर कला की स्थिति पर लगातार बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье предлагается устранить узкое место анализа АМР путем улучшения двух компонентов анализатора АМР: идентификация концепции и согласование. Сначала мы создаем двунаправленный идентификатор концепции на основе LSTM, который способен включать более богатую контекстуальную информацию для изучения разрозненных концептуальных меток AMR. Затем мы расширяем основанную на HMM модель выравнивания слов с искажением расстояния графа и метод оценки во время декодирования для включения структурной информации в график AMR. Мы показываем, что интеграция двух компонентов в существующий парсер AMR приводит к стабильно лучшей производительности по сравнению с современным уровнем на различных наборах данных.', 'ga': 'Tá sé beartaithe sa pháipéar seo dul i ngleic leis an tranglam parsála AMR trí dhá chomhpháirt de pharsálaí AMR a fheabhsú: sainaithint agus ailíniú coincheapa. Tógaimid ar dtús aitheantóir coincheap déthreorach bunaithe ar LSTM atá in ann faisnéis chomhthéacsúil níos saibhre a ionchorprú chun lipéid choincheapa AMR gann a fhoghlaim. Síneann muid ansin samhail ailínithe focal-go-choincheap bunaithe ar HMM le saobhadh fad graif agus modh athscóirithe le linn díchódaithe chun an fhaisnéis struchtúrach a ionchorprú sa ghraf AMR. Léirímid má dhéantar an dá chomhpháirt a chomhtháthú i bparsálaí AMR atá ann cheana féin go mbíonn feidhmíocht níos fearr go seasta ar thacair sonraí éagsúla ar an gcaighdeán is nua-aimseartha.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესაძლებელია AMR პარალიზაციის ბრძანების გასაკეთება AMR პარალიზაციის ორი კომპონენტების გასაკეთება: კონცენტიფიკაცია და განზომილება. ჩვენ პირველი შევქმნით ორედირექციონალური LSTM დაბათებული კონცექტური ინდენტიფიკაცია, რომელიც შეუძლია უფრო დიდი კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის შეყვარება, რომ და შემდეგ ჩვენ HMM-დაბათებული სიტყვების კონცექტურის განტოლების მოდელს გადავიტანოთ გრაფიკური განტოლება და განტოლების განტოლება და განტოლების მეტი განტოლების განტოლების განტოლების განტოლების განტოლების განტოლება AMR ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ ორი კომპონენტების ინტერგურაციას მსგავსი AMR პასუტერის შემდეგ უფრო მკეთესი გამოყენება განსხვავებული მონაცემების სტატუს', 'hu': 'A tanulmány az AMR elemzésének szűk keresztmetszetének kezelését javasolja egy AMR elemző két komponensének javításával: a koncepció azonosításával és összehangolásával. Először egy kétirányú LSTM alapú koncepcióazonosítót építünk, amely képes gazdagabb kontextuális információkat beépíteni a ritka AMR koncepciós címkék megtanulásához. Ezután kiterjesztünk egy HMM-alapú szó-koncepciós igazítási modellt gráf távolságtorzítással, valamint egy átkódolási módszert a dekódolás során, hogy beépítsük a strukturális információkat az AMR grafikonba. Bemutatjuk, hogy a két komponens egy meglévő AMR elemzőbe történő integrálása következetesen jobb teljesítményt eredményez a különböző adatkészletek korszerű teljesítményével szemben.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει να αντιμετωπιστεί το εμπόδιο ανάλυσης AMR βελτιώνοντας δύο συστατικά ενός αναλυτή AMR: τον προσδιορισμό της έννοιας και την ευθυγράμμιση. Αρχικά κατασκευάζουμε ένα αναγνωριστικό έννοιας βασισμένο σε αμφίδρομη κατεύθυνση που είναι σε θέση να ενσωματώσει πλουσιότερες πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος για να μάθει ελάχιστες ετικέτες εννοιών ΑΜR. Στη συνέχεια επεκτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο ευθυγράμμισης λέξης προς έννοιας με παραμόρφωση απόστασης γραφήματος και μια μέθοδο επανααποκωδικοποίησης κατά την αποκωδικοποίηση για να ενσωματώσουμε τις δομικές πληροφορίες στο γράφημα ΑΜR. Δείχνουμε ότι η ενσωμάτωση των δύο συστατικών σε έναν υπάρχον αναλυτή έχει ως αποτέλεσμα σταθερά καλύτερη απόδοση σε σχέση με την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "Questo documento propone di affrontare il collo di bottiglia dell'analisi AMR migliorando due componenti di un parser AMR: l'identificazione del concetto e l'allineamento. Per prima cosa costruiamo un identificatore di concetto bidirezionale basato su LSTM che è in grado di incorporare informazioni contestuali più ricche per imparare etichette di concetto AMR sparse. Estendiamo quindi un modello di allineamento word-to-concept basato su HMM con distorsione della distanza del grafico e un metodo di rescoring durante la decodifica per incorporare le informazioni strutturali nel grafico AMR. Mostriamo che l'integrazione dei due componenti in un parser AMR esistente si traduce in prestazioni costantemente migliori rispetto allo stato dell'arte su vari set di dati.", 'mk': 'Овој документ предлага решавање на пречката во анализирањето на АМР со подобрување на двата компоненти на анализирач на АМР: идентификација на концептот и израмнување. Прво изградивме идентификатор на концепт базиран на дворечни LSTM кој може да вклучи побогати контекстни информации за да научиме мали етикети на концептот AMR. Потоа го продолжуваме моделот на зборови концепт-зборови на ХММ со дистрибуција на графичната дистанца и метод на рескрирање за време на декодирање за да ги вклучиме структурните информации во графикот АМР. Ние покажуваме интеграција на двата компоненти во постоечкиот АМР анализатор резултира со константно подобра резултат во однос на најсовремената состојба на различни податоци.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūloma pašalinti AMR analizavimo kliūtis gerinant du AMR analizatoriaus komponentus: koncepcijos nustatymą ir suderinimą. Pirmiausia sukuriame dvikryptį LSTM pagrįstą koncepcijos identifikatorių, kuris gali įtraukti turtingesnę kontekstinę informaciją, kad būtų galima išmokti mažai AMR koncepcijos etiketės. Tuomet išplėsime HMM pagrįstą žodžio ir koncepcijos derinimo model į, kuriame būtų iškraipytas grafinio atstumas ir kodavimo metu naudojamas įrašymo metodas, įtraukiant struktūrinę informaciją į AMR grafiką. Mes parodome, kad šių dviejų komponentų integravimas į esamą AMR analizatorių lemia nuosekliai geresnius įvairių duomenų rinkinių pažangiausius rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз AMR талдау үшін екі компонентті AMR талдау: концепциялық идентификациясы мен түрлендіруді жақсартуға арналған. Біз біріншіден LSTM негіздеген екі бағытты концепциялық идентификаторын құрамыз. Бұл AMR концепциялық жарлықтарын үйрену үшін бағытты контексті мәліметті қоса алады. Содан кейін, біз HMM- негіздеген сөздерді концепциялық түрлендіру үлгісін графикалық қашықтығының қашықтығымен, AMR графикасында структуралық мәліметті қосу үшін қайта түрлендіру әдісін ке Біз екі компонентті мұндай AMR талдаушысына ендіру үшін әртүрлі деректер жиындарындағы суреттің күйінде жақсы жұмыс істеу нәтижесін көрсетедік.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d AMR പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ബോട്ട്ലെങ്കിനെ നോക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. AMR പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രണ്ട് ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു ബൈദിഡയലില്\u200d LSTM അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള കണ്ടിട്ടറി ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത് AMR കണ്ടിന്റെ ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d സമ്പന് പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d എംഎംഎം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു വാക്ക് മാതൃകയിലേക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാതൃകയിലേക്കുള്ള ഒരു മാതൃകയിലേക്ക് വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ദൂ നിലവിലുള്ള AMR പരാജയത്തിലേക്ക് രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കലാ', 'mt': 'This paper proposes to tackle the AMR parsing bottleneck by improving two components of an AMR parser: concept identification and alignment.  L-ewwel a ħna nibnu identifikatur ta’ kunċett ibbażat fuq LSTM Bidirezzjonali li jkun jista’ jinkorpora informazzjoni kuntestwali aktar rikka biex jitgħallmu tikketti ta’ kunċett ta’ AMR baxxi. Imbagħad nistennew mudell ta’ allinjament bejn il-kliem u l-kunċett ibbażat fuq l-HMM b’distorsjoni fid-distanza tal-graff u metodu ta’ skambju mill-ġdid matul id-dekodifikazzjoni biex tinkorpora l-informazzjoni strutturali fil-graff AMR. Aħna nuru li nintegraw iż-żewġ komponenti f’analizzatur tal-AMR eżistenti jirriżultaw f’prestazzjoni konsistentement aħjar fuq l-aktar livell avvanzat fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan untuk menangani pengendalian hurai AMR dengan memperbaiki dua komponen hurai AMR: pengenalan konsep dan penyesuaian. Kami pertama-tama membina pengenalpasti konsep berdasarkan LSTM dua arah yang mampu memasukkan maklumat kontekstual yang lebih kaya untuk belajar label konsep AMR yang sedikit. Kemudian, kita tambahkan model penyesuaian perkataan-kepada-konsep berdasarkan HMM dengan penyelesaian jarak graf dan kaedah penyegerakan semula semasa penyesuaian untuk memasukkan maklumat struktur dalam graf AMR. Kami menunjukkan penyelesaian kedua-dua komponen ke dalam penghurai AMR yang wujud mengakibatkan prestasi yang lebih baik secara konsisten atas kemajuan pada pelbagai set data.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас AMR-ын хуваалцлын хоёр компонентийг сайжруулахаар AMR-ын хуваалцлыг шийдвэрлэх боломжтой санал болгодог. Эхлээд бид АМР ойлголтын жагсаалтыг сурахад баян орчин үеийн мэдээллийг нэгтгэх боломжтой хоёр шугамын LSTM-ын үндсэн ойлголтын идентификатор бүтээж байна. Харин дараа нь бид HMM-ээр суурилсан үг-концепцийн тэгшитгэлийн загварыг график зай холбогдолтой, мөн АМР графикийн бүтэц мэдээллийг нэгтгэх үед дахин сэргээх арга загварыг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Бид эдгээр хоёр компонентийг суурилсан AMR хуваарьчилгаанд нэгтгэх нь олон өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд урлагийн нөхцөл байдлын тухай илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår å løysa AMR- tolkinga ved å forbedra to komponentar av ein AMR- tolkar: konseptidentifisering og justering. Vi bygger først ein Bidirectional LSTM-basert konseptidentifikator som kan inkludere rikre kontekstinformasjon for å lære sparse AMR-konseptetikettar. Vi utvidar så eit HMM-basert ordjusteringsmodell med distortering av grafikkavstanden og ein reforsjonsmetode ved dekodering for å inkludere strukturinformasjonen i AMR-grafen. Vi viser å integrere dei to komponentane i ein eksisterande AMR- tolkar resultatet i konsistent bedre utvikling over kunsten i ulike datasett.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł proponuje rozwiązanie wąskiego gardła parsowania AMR poprzez poprawę dwóch komponentów parsera AMR: identyfikacji koncepcji i dostosowania. Najpierw zbudujemy dwukierunkowy identyfikator koncepcji oparty na LSTM, który jest w stanie włączyć bogatsze informacje kontekstowe, aby nauczyć się rzadkich etykiet koncepcji AMR. Następnie rozszerzamy oparty na HMM model wyrównania słowa do koncepcji o zniekształcenie odległości wykresu i metodę rekordowania podczas dekodowania, aby uwzględnić informacje strukturalne w wykresie AMR. Pokazujemy, że integracja dwóch komponentów z istniejącym parserem AMR skutkuje konsekwentnie lepszą wydajnością w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych technologii na różnych zbiorach danych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune abordarea blocajului analizării AMR prin îmbunătățirea a două componente ale unui analizor AMR: identificarea conceptului și alinierea. Mai întâi construim un identificator de concept bazat pe LSTM bidirecțional care este capabil să încorporeze informații contextuale mai bogate pentru a învăța etichetele conceptului AMR rar. Apoi extindem un model de aliniere cuvânt-la-concept bazat pe HMM cu distorsiunea distanței graficului și o metodă de rescoring în timpul decodării pentru a încorpora informațiile structurale în graficul AMR. Vă arătăm că integrarea celor două componente într-un analizor AMR existent rezultă în mod constant o performanță mai bună decât cea mai modernă tehnologie pe diferite seturi de date.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ AMR විශේෂකය සඳහා බොත්තල් බොත්තල් බොත්තල් විශේෂකය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා AMR විශේෂකයෙක් ගැන අංශ අපි මුලින්ම දෙපාර්ථික LSTM අධික පරීක්ෂක පරීක්ෂකයෙක් හදන්න පුළුවන් විශාල තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න AMR පරීක්ෂ අපි පස්සේ HMM-ආධාරිත වචන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් දුරස්ථානය සහ ආපහු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අංකය දෙකක් අංකය අංකය AMR විශේෂකයෙක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ දත්ත සේට් වල ඉන්න විදිහට වඩා', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ka soo jeedaa inuu tackleeyo baaritaanka AMR, si uu u kordhiso labo qeybood oo ka mid ah AMR Parser: aqoonsiga iyo isbedelka. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu dhisnaa fikrada LSTM oo ku saleysan Bidir ah oo aqoonsan kara macluumaadka joogtada ah oo hodantinimada ah si aan u barno calaamada sawirka AMR. Markaas waxaynu fidinnaa model sawirid oo ku saleysan HMM oo ku qoran karta qalabka fog iyo qaab beddelista marka loo qorayo si a an ugu qorno macluumaadka dhismaha ee AMR. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in labada kooxood la isku qabsiga u dhigno baaritaanka AMR ee joogta ah, waxayna sababtaa si kamid ah u fiican sameynta xaaladda farshaxanka ee ku qoran sawirada kala duduwan.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže da se riješi AMR analizacijskog vrata poboljšavajući dve komponente AMR analizatora: identifikacija koncepta i prilagodba. Prvo smo izgradili dvosmjernu identifikator koncepta osnovanog na LSTM-u koji može uključiti bogate kontekstske informacije kako bi naučili rezervne etikete koncepta AMR-a. Zatim proširimo model poravnanja reči na koncept na HMM-u sa distancijom grafika i metodom prekorištenja tokom dekodiranja da uključimo strukturne informacije u graf AMR-a. Pokazujemo integraciju dve komponente u postojeći AMR analizator rezultate u konsekvenciji boljoj izvršnosti nad stanjem umjetnosti na različitim podacima.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår att man ska ta itu med flaskhalsen för AMR-parsning genom att förbättra två komponenter i en AMR-parser: konceptidentifiering och anpassning. Vi bygger först en dubbelriktad LSTM-baserad konceptidentifierare som kan införliva rikare kontextuell information för att lära sig glesa AMR-konceptetiketter. Vi utökar sedan en HMM-baserad ord-till-koncept justeringsmodell med grafavstånd förvrängning och en omkoringsmetod under avkodning för att införliva strukturell information i AMR-grafen. Vi visar att integrationen av de två komponenterna i en befintlig AMR-parser resulterar i konsekvent bättre prestanda än den senaste tekniken på olika datauppsättningar.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் AMR பாட்டில் பாட்டில் பாட்டில் பொருளை பொருத்துவதற்கு மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு தொடர்பு செய்ய இந்த காகிதத்தை ஏஎம்ஆர நாம் முதலில் ஒரு இருதிசையாக LSTM அடிப்படையான கண்டுபிடிப்பானை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அது AMR கருத்து குறியீட்டு சிட்டைகளை கற்றலாம AMR வரைபடத்தில் உள்ள கட்டுப்பாட்டு தகவலை சேர்க்கும் போது HMM-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள சொல்லும் வரைகலை ஒழுங்கும் மாதிரியை நாம் விரிவாக்குவோம். நாம் இந்த இரண்டு பகுதிகளை ஒரு இருக்கும் AMR பகுதியில் ஒன்றாக்குவதை காட்டுகிறோம். இது முடிவில் உள்ள கலைப்புகளின் நிலையில்', 'ur': 'This paper proposes to tackle the AMR parsing bottleneck by improving an AMR parser: concept identification and alignment. ہم پہلی بار ایک دوسری دقیق LSTM بنیاد کی تصدیق کرنے والے بناتے ہیں جو بہت ثروت منظم کی معلومات میں شامل کرسکتا ہے کہ AMR منظم لیبل سکھائے۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایک HMM-بنیاد لغات-پر-منظم الکترونیٹ موڈل کو گراف فاصلہ کے اندازے سے پھیلاتے ہیں اور اس طرح پھیلاتے ہیں کہ AMR گراف میں ساخترکی معلومات شامل کریں۔ ہم دو قسمتوں کو ایک موجود AMR پارچر میں اکٹھا کرنا دکھاتے ہیں کہ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر هنر کی حالت پر بہترین فعالیت کا نتیجہ ہے.', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа AMR параметри икки қисмини афзал қилиш билан AMR параметрлашиш аъзоларини мувофиқлаштириш тавсия қилмоқда: concept аниқлаш ва аниқлаш. Biz birinchi oddiy LSTM asosida bir bizga qanday qo'yilgan concept aniqligini yaratib, bu AMR concept tegnlarini o'rganish mumkin bo'lishi mumkin. Keyin biz AMR grafikdagi struktura maʼlumotini birlashtirish uchun HMM asosida bir so'zni kamaytirish modelini uzamiz. Biz bu ikkita komponentlarni mavjud AMR parametrlariga birlashtirishni ko'rsatamiz va turli maʼlumot sahifadagi sanadagi holatda yaxshi bajarish natijasida bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Dự án này đề nghị xử lý rắc rối phân tích AMR bằng cách cải thiện hai thành phần của một phân tích AMR: xác định và định vị trí. Đầu tiên chúng ta xây dựng một trình nhận diện khái niệm dựa trên giao tiếp LSD có thể nhập thêm các thông tin ngữ cảnh giàu có để tìm hiểu các nhãn khái niệm AMR. Sau đó chúng ta sẽ mở rộng mô hình cấu hình lời-tới-khái niệm của thao tác cấu trúc với sự méo mó của đồ thị và một phương pháp chỉnh lại trong thời gian giải mã để nhập thông tin cấu trúc vào đồ thị AMR. Chúng tôi cho rằng tất cả các này được giải nhập vào một bộ tinh thần AMR đã có thể hiện một sự tốt đẹp hơn trong các bộ vị trí bản dữ liệu khá', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže rješavati AMR analiziranje bočice poboljšavajući dvije komponente AMR analizatora: identifikaciju koncepta i prilagodbu. Prvo smo izgradili dvosmjernu identifikator koncepta osnovanog na LSTM-u koji može uključiti bogate contextualne informacije kako bi naučili rezervne etikete koncepta AMR-a. Zatim proširimo model usklađivanja riječi na koncept na HMM-u s distancijom grafika i metodom usklađivanja tijekom dekodiranja kako bi uključili strukturne informacije u graf AMR-a. Mi pokazujemo integraciju dva komponenta u postojeći AMR analizator rezultat u konsekvenciji bolji učinkovit tijekom stanja umjetnosti na raznim podacima.', 'bg': 'Тази статия предлага да се справи с проблема с анализа на АМР чрез подобряване на два компонента на АМР анализатор: идентификация на концепцията и привеждане в съответствие. Първо изграждаме двупосочен идентификатор на концепцията, който е в състояние да включи по-богата контекстна информация, за да научи редки концептуални етикети за АМР. След това разширяваме модела на подравняване от дума до концепция с изкривяване на разстоянието на графиката и метод за преоцветяване по време на декодиране, за да включим структурната информация в графиката. Показваме, че интегрирането на двата компонента в съществуващ анализатор води до последователно по-добро представяне в сравнение с най-съвременните технологии на различни набори от данни.', 'nl': 'Dit document stelt voor om de AMR parsing bottleneck aan te pakken door twee componenten van een AMR parser te verbeteren: conceptidentificatie en alignment. We bouwen eerst een Bidirectionele LSTM gebaseerde concept identifier die rijkere contextuele informatie kan opnemen om schaarse AMR concept labels te leren. Vervolgens breiden we een HMM-gebaseerd woord-tot-concept uitlijningsmodel uit met grafiekdistorsie en een rescoring methode tijdens decodering om de structurele informatie in de AMR grafiek op te nemen. We laten zien dat het integreren van de twee componenten in een bestaande AMR parser resulteert in consistente betere prestaties over de stand van de techniek op verschillende datasets.', 'da': 'Dette dokument foreslår at tackle flaskehalsen ved at forbedre to komponenter i en AMR-fortolker: konceptidentifikation og justering. Vi bygger først en Bidirectional LSTM baseret konceptidentifikator, der er i stand til at indarbejde rigere kontekstuelle oplysninger for at lære sparsomme AMR konceptetiketter. Vi udvider derefter en HMM-baseret ord-til-koncept justeringsmodel med grafafstandsforvrængning og en rescoring metode under afkodning for at indarbejde strukturelle oplysninger i AMR grafen. Vi viser, at integrationen af de to komponenter i en eksisterende AMR parser resulterer i konsekvent bedre ydeevne i forhold til den nyeste teknologi på forskellige datasæt.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan untuk mengatasi pengendalian botol AMR dengan meningkatkan dua komponen dari pengendali AMR: identifikasi konsep dan penyesuaian. Kita pertama-tama membangun pengenal konsep berdasarkan LSTM bidireksi yang mampu memasukkan informasi kontekstual yang lebih kaya untuk belajar label konsep AMR yang sedikit. Kemudian kita memperluas model penyesuaian kata-konsep berdasarkan HMM dengan distorsi jarak grafik dan metode penyulitan selama dekoding untuk mengikorporasi informasi struktur dalam grafik AMR. Kami menunjukkan mengintegrasi dua komponen ke dalam penyelesaian AMR yang ada hasilnya dalam prestasi yang konsisten lebih baik atas state of the art pada berbagai set data.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier schlägt vor, den AMR-Parsing-Engpass anzugehen, indem zwei Komponenten eines AMR-Parsers verbessert werden: Konzeptidentifikation und Ausrichtung. Zunächst erstellen wir einen bidirektionalen LSTM basierten Konzeptidentifier, der in der Lage ist, umfangreichere kontextbezogene Informationen zu integrieren, um spärliche AMR-Konzeptetiketten zu lernen. Anschließend erweitern wir ein HMM-basiertes Wort-zu-Konzept-Ausrichtungsmodell mit Graphendistanzverzerrung und einer Rescoring-Methode während der Dekodierung, um die strukturellen Informationen in den AMR-Graph einzubeziehen. Wir zeigen, dass die Integration der beiden Komponenten in einen bestehenden AMR-Parser zu einer durchgängig besseren Performance auf verschiedenen Datensätzen führt.', 'ko': '본고는 AMR 해석기의 두 가지 구성 요소인 개념 식별과 대조를 개선함으로써 AMR 해석 병목을 해결하고자 한다.우리는 먼저 쌍방향 LSTM을 바탕으로 하는 개념 표지부를 구축했다. 이 표지부는 더욱 풍부한 상하문 정보를 결합시켜 희소한 AMR 개념 라벨을 배울 수 있다.그 다음에 우리는 구조 정보를 AMR 그림에 통합하기 위해 그림 거리 오류와 디코딩 과정 중의 정렬 방법을 가진 HMM 기반 단어부터 개념 정렬 모델을 확장했다.이 두 구성 요소를 기존 AMR 파서에 통합하여 다양한 데이터 세트에서 최신 기술보다 성능이 우수하다는 것을 보여줍니다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که با توجه به دو قسمتی از یک بازشنگر AMR: شناسایی و تنظیم نظریه را حل کند. اولین بار یک شناسایی مفهوم بنیاد LSTM را ساختیم که می تواند اطلاعات محیط ثروتمند را برای یاد گرفتن نقاشی مفهوم AMR کمی را جمع کند. سپس ما یک مدل تنظیم کلمه به مفهوم بر اساس HMM با تغییر فاصله گراف و یک روش بازسازی در زمان تغییر دادن تا اطلاعات ساختاری را در گراف AMR شامل کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این دو عنصر را به یک تجزیه\u200cکننده AMR موجود به نتیجه\u200cهای عملکرد بهتر در حالت هنر در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف تغییر دهیم.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza kukabiliana na bendera ya Uchaguzi wa AMR kwa kuboresha vifaa viwili vya chama cha AMR: kutambua dhana na kujitengeneza. Kwanza tunajenga dhana yenye msingi wa LSTM inayoonyesha kuwa inaweza kuingiza taarifa za kitajiri za sasa ili kujifunza chache za dhana ya AMR. Kisha tunaongeza muundo wa usambazaji wa maneno na dhana ya HMM wenye umbali wa mbali na mbinu za upya wakati wa kupanua upya habari za ujenzi katika ramani ya AMR. Tunaonyesha kuunganisha vipengele viwili katika mchambuzi wa AMR ulioendelea matokeo yake ni bora zaidi katika hali ya sanaa kwenye seti mbalimbali za taarifa.', 'tr': 'Bu kağıt AMR tanımlayıcısının iki parçasını geliştirmek üzere AMR boşluğunu çözmek için teklif ediyor: düşünce tanımlama ve çözümleme. Biz ilkinji gezek iki görnöşim LSTM tabanly bir düşünjä tanyşçysyny gurdyrys. Bu da baýlyk contextual maglumatlary AMR düşünjä etiketleri öwrenmek üçin bardyr. Sonra, HMM tabanlı kelime-konsepte çizginin modelini grafik uzaktan ayırmak ve sistem bilgileri AMR grafiğine dahil etmek için tekrarlama yöntemi uzatıyoruz. Biz bu iki komponenti bar bir AMR täzeleçisi içine üýtgetmegi mümkin edip biljek sanat düzümleriniň durumynda has gowy hereket edip bilýäris.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel voorstel om die AMR verwerking van botnek te verbeter deur twee komponente van 'n AMR verwerker te verbeter: konsepte identifikasie en oplyn. Ons bou eerste 'n Bidireksionale LSTM-gebaseerde konsept-identifiseerder wat kan inkorpreer ryker konteksual inligting om sparse AMR-konsepte etikette te te leer. Ons uitbrei dan 'n HMM-gebaseerde woord-na-koncepte-belyning model met graafafstand distortering en 'n herkoring metode tydens dekodering om die strukturele inligting in die AMR graaf te inkorporeer. Ons wys integrering van die twee komponente in 'n bestaande AMR-ontleerder resultate in konsistentlik beter prestasie oor die staat van die kuns op verskillende datastelle.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon të trajtojë pengesën e analizimit të AMR duke përmirësuar dy komponente të një analizuesi AMR: identifikimin e konceptit dhe përshtatjen. Së pari ne ndërtojmë një identifikues koncepti të bazuar në LSTM në dy drejtime që është në gjendje të përfshijë informacion më të pasur kontekstual për të mësuar etiketa të pakta koncepti AMR. We then extend an HMM-based word-to-concept alignment model with graph distance distortion and a rescoring method during decoding to incorporate the structural information in the AMR graph.  Ne tregojmë integrimin e të dy komponenteve në një analizues ekzistues AMR rezultatet në performancë më të mirë në mënyrë të vazhdueshme lidhur me gjendjen e fundit në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የAMR አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢውን በመጠቀም ያጋልማል፡፡ መግለጫ እና መተካከል ነው፡፡ መጀመሪያ የምንሠራው የኤሜር አካባቢ ጽሑፍ ማሳየትን ለመማር የሚችል የሀብትን መረጃ ማሳየት የሚችል የልዩ አቀፍ LSTM መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በኋላም የHMM ቃላት-ወደ-አካልም መተላለፊያ እና የራቀ ግንኙነት እና የአሜሪካዊ መረጃዎችን በአካባቢው ላይ ለማግባት እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የሁለቱን አካውንቶች በተገኘው AMR ተቃውሞ በማሳየት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է լուծել AMR-ի վերլուծության խճճճը AMR-ի վերլուծության երկու բաղադրիչների բարելավման միջոցով՝ հասկացության հայտնաբերման և հարմարեցման միջոցով: We first build a Bidirectional LSTM based concept identifier that is able to incorporate richer contextual information to learn sparse AMR concept labels.  Այնուհետև մենք ընդլայնում ենք Hmm-ի հիմնված բառի-գաղափարի հարմարեցման մոդելը գծագրի հեռավորության շեղումներով և վերագրելու մեթոդով դեկոդեգի ժամանակ, որպեսզի կառուցվածքային տեղեկատվությունը ներառվի AMR-ի գծագրում Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս երկու բաղադրիչները ներգրավված են գոյություն ունեցող AMR-ի վերլուծողի մեջ, որն արդյունքում է մշտապես ավելի լավ արդյունք տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վերաբերյալ:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি এক এমআর পার্সিং বোতলেনেকের মাধ্যমে এক এমআর পার্সিং এর দুটি অংশ উন্নত করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করে: ধারণা পরিচিতি এবং স্থির আমরা প্রথমে একটি বাইডেডিয়াল এলএসএমএস ভিত্তিক ধারণা পরিচিতি তৈরি করি যা এমআর ধারণার লেবেল শিখতে পারে সমৃদ্ধ তথ্য যুক্ত করতে পারে। এরপর আমরা একটি এইচএমএম-ভিত্তিক শব্দ-থেকে ধারণা মোডেল প্রসারিত করি দূরত্ব বিভ্রান্ত এবং এএমআর গ্রাফের কাঠামো তথ্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার সময়ে একটি পুনরায় সংস্ক আমরা বিদ্যমান এক এমআর সার্ভারের মধ্যে দুটি অংশগুলোকে একত্রিত করে দেখাচ্ছি যার ফলে বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটের শিল্পের অবস্থায় ভাল', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje řešit úzké místo analýzy AMR zlepšením dvou složek AMR parseru: identifikace konceptu a zarovnání. Nejprve vytvoříme obousměrný identifikátor konceptu založený na LSTM, který je schopen začlenit bohatší kontextové informace a naučit se řídké popisky konceptů AMR. Následně rozšíříme HMM založený slovo-koncept zarovnávací model o zkreslení vzdálenosti grafu a metodu rescoringu během dekódování, abychom začlenili strukturální informace do AMR grafu. Ukázali jsme, že integrace obou komponent do existujícího AMR parseru vede k trvale lepšímu výkonu na různých datových sadách.', 'ca': "Aquest paper propon abordar l'obstacle de l'analització AMR millorant dos components d'un analitzador AMR: identificació de concepte i alliniament. Primer construïm un identificador de concepte basat en LSTM bidireccional capaç d'incorporar informació contextual més riquesa per aprendre etiquetes pocs de concepte AMR. Llavors estendem un model d'alliniament de paraules a conceptes basat en HMM amb distorsió de distància del gràfic i un mètode de rescor durant la descodificació per incorporar la informació estructural al gràfic AMR. Mostrem que integrar els dos components en un analitzador AMR existent resulta en un rendiment constantment millor en relació amb l'estat d'última generació en diversos conjunts de dades.", 'fi': 'Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotetaan, että AMR:n jäsentämisen pullonkaula korjataan parantamalla AMR:n jäsentäjän kahta komponenttia: konseptin tunnistamista ja yhdenmukaistamista. Rakennamme ensin kaksisuuntaisen LSTM-konseptitunnistimen, joka pystyy sisällyttämään monipuolisempaa kontekstitietoa ja oppimaan harvoja AMR-konseptitunnistuksia. Tämän jälkeen laajennamme HMM-pohjaista word-to-concept -linjausmallia graafisen etäisyyden vääristymisellä ja uudelleenkoristemenetelmällä dekoodauksen aikana rakenteellisen tiedon sisällyttämiseksi AMR-kuvaan. Osoitamme kahden komponentin integroinnin olemassa olevaan AMR-jäsentäjään johtavan johdonmukaisesti parempaan suorituskykyyn verrattuna nykytekniikkaan eri tietoaineistoissa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tehakse ettepanek võidelda AMRi analüüsimise kitsaskohaga, parandades AMRi parseri kahte komponenti: kontseptsiooni identifitseerimist ja ühtlustamist. Esmalt ehitame kahesuunalise LSTM-põhise kontseptsiooni identifikaatori, mis suudab lisada rikkalikumat kontekstiteavet, et õppida haruldasi AMR-kontseptsiooni silte. Seejärel laiendame HMM-põhist sõna-kontseptsiooni joondusmudelit graafiku kauguse moonutamise ja dekodeerimise ajal ümberkorraldamise meetodit, et lisada struktuuriinfo AMR-graafikusse. Näitame, et kahe komponendi integreerimine olemasolevasse AMR parserisse annab erinevate andmekogumite puhul pidevalt parema jõudluse.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže rješavanje AMR-a za analiziranje slabosti poboljšanjem dva komponenta analizatora AMR-a: identifikacija koncepta i prilagodba. Prvo izgradimo identifikator koncepta baziranog na LSTM-u koji može uključiti bogatije contextualne informacije kako bi naučili rezervne etikete koncepta AMR-a. Zatim proširimo model usklađivanja riječi na koncept na HMM-u sa distancijom grafika i metodom usklađivanja tijekom dekodiranja kako bi uključili strukturne informacije u graf AMR-a. Mi pokazujemo integraciju dva komponenta u postojeći AMR analizator rezultat u konsekvenciji bolji učinkovit nad stanjem umjetnosti na različitim podacima.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt AMR körpüsünü təşkil etmək üçün AMR analizi təşkil edir. AMR analizicisinin iki komponenti yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün: concept identification and alignment. Biz ilk dəfə iki yönəlik LSTM tabanlı konsept identifikatörünü inşa edirik ki, AMR konsepti etiketlərini öyrənmək üçün daha çox dövlətli müxtəlif məlumatları birləşdirə bilər. Sonra, HMM tabanlı söz-konseptə tərəflənmə modelini grafik uzaq distortsiyası ilə və AMR grafındakı strukturlu məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün yenidən kodlama metodu ilə genişləyirik. Biz iki komponenti mövcud bir AMR ayırıcısı ilə birləşdirmək müxtəlif veri setlərində sanatın durumu üstündə daha xeyirli performans olaraq göstəririk.', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS Awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan Seneng Bidirective Speaking Awak dhéwé ngerasakno akeh sing sampeyan akeh sing sampeyan sampeyan ambem nang panelusuran AM sing dumadhi iki, akeh sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi duluran kanggo sampeyan operasi sing berarti dadi sampeyan dataset sing berarti.', 'sk': 'Ta dokument predlaga reševanje ozkega grla za razčlenitev AMR z izboljšanjem dveh komponent razčlenitve AMR: identifikacijo koncepta in uskladitev. Najprej izdelamo dvosmerni identifikator koncepta LSTM, ki lahko vključi bogatejše kontekstne informacije in se nauči redkih konceptnih etiket AMR. Nato razširimo HMM-osnovan model poravnave besed-koncept s popačenjem razdalje grafov in metodo preoblikovanja med dekodiranjem, da vključimo strukturne informacije v graf AMR. Prikazujemo, da integriranje obeh komponent v obstoječi razčlenjevalnik AMR dosledno boljša učinkovitost v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi različnimi nabori podatkov.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar ɗin yana bukãtar wa ka yi motsi ga parse na AMR da kuma ya kyautata composhi biyu na AMR Parser: Shaidar na zafi da daidaita. Kayyar da farko, za'a samar da wata na'urar LSSM wanda ke iya iya iya iya samun matalauci da takardar da za'a sanar da alama masu ƙaranci na AMR. We then extend an HMM-based word-to-concept alignment model with graph distance distortion and a rescoring method during decoding to incorporate the structural information in the AMR graph.  Tuna nũna haɗin compocompocomponi biyu zuwa wani AMR mai gabatar da shi yana ƙara mafiya kyauta a kan halin sanar da masu saka.", 'he': 'המסמך הזה מציע להתמודד עם המחסום של AMR על ידי שיפור שני רכיבים של המחסום AMR: זיהוי מושג ומתאים. אנחנו קודם בונים זיהוי מושג מבוסס על LSTM שתי כיוונים שיכול להכיל מידע קונטקסטי עשיר יותר כדי ללמוד תוויות מושג AMR נמוכות. ואז אנו ממשיכים מודל התאמה מילה לתוך מושג מבוסס על HMM עם עיווי מרחק הגרף ושיטה מחדש במהלך הפיתוח כדי לשתלב את המידע המבני בגרף AMR. We show integrating the two components into an existing AMR parser results in consistently better performance over the state of the art on various datasets.', 'bo': 'This paper proposes to tackle the AMR parsing bottleneck by improving two components of an AMR parser: concept identification and alignment. We first build a Bidirectional LSTM based concept identifier that is able to incorporate richer contextual information to learn sparse AMR concept labels. We then extend an HMM-based word-to-concept alignment model with graph distance distortion and a rescoring method during decoding to incorporate the structural information in the AMR graph. ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་AMR དབྱེ་སྟངས་ནང་གི་ཆ་ཤས་གཉིས་ཆ་རྣམས་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་བཤད་ཆེན'}
{'en': 'An End-to-End Deep Framework for Answer Triggering with a Novel Group-Level Objective', 'ar': 'إطار عمل عميق شامل لبدء الإجابة بهدف جديد على مستوى المجموعة', 'pt': 'Uma estrutura profunda de ponta a ponta para acionamento de respostas com um novo objetivo em nível de grupo', 'es': 'Un marco profundo de principio a fin para la activación de respuestas con un objetivo novedoso a nivel de grupo', 'fr': 'Un cadre approfondi de bout en bout pour le déclenchement de réponses avec un objectif novateur au niveau du groupe', 'ja': '新規グループレベルの目標で回答をトリガーするためのエンドツーエンドの深いフレームワーク', 'zh': '有新组级之端,深对发框架', 'hi': 'एक उपन्यास समूह-स्तरीय उद्देश्य के साथ उत्तर ट्रिगरिंग के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड डीप फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'Сквозная глубокая структура для запуска ответа с целью нового группового уровня', 'ga': 'Creat domhain ó cheann go ceann le haghaidh Spreagadh Freagraí le Cuspóir ar Leibhéal Grúpa Úrscéalta', 'ka': 'პასუხისთვის დასასრულებელი დასასრულებელი კონფიგურაციაName', 'el': 'Ένα ολοκληρωμένο βαθύ πλαίσιο για την ενεργοποίηση απαντήσεων με ένα νέο στόχο ομαδικού επιπέδου', 'it': "Un quadro completo end-to-end per l'attivazione delle risposte con un nuovo obiettivo a livello di gruppo", 'hu': 'Végtől végig mély keretrendszer a válaszok indítására egy új csoportszintű célkitűzéssel', 'kk': 'Жауап беру үшін жауап аяқтау- аяқтау қалыпты фрейміName', 'mk': 'An End-to-End Deep Framework for Answer Triggering with a Novel Group-Level Objective', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഉത്തരം തുടങ്ങുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉത്തരം', 'mn': 'Хариултын төгсгөл-төгсгөл гүнзгий хэлбэр Novel Group-Level Objective', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Qafas profond ta’ tmiem sa tmiem għat-tfittxija ta’ tweġibiet b’Objettiv Ġdid ta’ Livell ta’ Grupp', 'pl': 'End-to-End Deep Framework do wyzwalania odpowiedzi z nowym celem na poziomie grupy', 'lt': 'Išsami atsakymų nagrinėjimo sistema, kuria siekiama naujo grupės lygmens tikslo', 'sr': 'Kraj do kraja duboki okvir za odgovor koji se trudi sa ciljem nivoa Novel a grupe', 'ro': 'Un cadru complet pentru declanșarea răspunsurilor cu un nou obiectiv la nivel de grup', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'An End-to-End Deep Framework for answers Triggering with a Novel Group-Level Objective', 'sv': 'En heltäckande ram för svarsuttriggning med ett nytt mål på gruppnivå', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'جواب کے لئے ایک نوئل گروپ-سطح واژوئیٹ کے ساتھ ترجیح کرنے کے لئے ایک اندھیرے سے اندھیرے اندھیرے فارمورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ khung phản ứng sâu kết thúc với một mục tiêu cấp thấp tiểu thuyết', 'da': 'En dyb end-to-end-ramme til svarudløsning med et nyt gruppeniveau mål', 'bg': 'Дълбока рамка от край до край за задействане на отговори с нова цел на ниво група', 'nl': 'Een end-to-end diep framework voor antwoordtriggering met een nieuwe doelstelling op groepsniveau', 'hr': 'Kraj do kraja duboki okvir za odgovor koji pokušava s ciljem novog nivoa grupe', 'de': 'Ein End-to-End Deep Framework für das Auslösen von Antworten mit einem neuartigen Ziel auf Gruppenebene', 'id': 'Sebuah Ruang Jauh Akhir-Akhir untuk Jawaban Penyebab dengan Objektif Tingkat Kelompok Novel', 'ko': '새로운 단체 목표로 답을 촉발하는 데 사용되는 단도직입적인 심층 구조', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Cevap üçin bir nusga derejesi bilen üçin Ahyrky Derjesi Frame', 'sw': 'Miundombi ya Mwisho wa Kusini kwa Jibu Kuanzisha kwa lengo la Kiwango cha Eneo', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një kuadër i thellë nga fundi në fund për përgjigjet e kërkuara me një objektiv të ri në nivelin e grupit', 'hy': 'Վերջ մինչև վերջ խորը համակարգ պատասխանների լուծման համար նոր խմբի մակարդակի նպատակով', 'az': 'Cevap vermək üçün Novel Grup-Sevirə Görünüşlüyü ilə Səviyyəsi ilə Səviyyəsi Görünüşlüyü son-to-son Deep Framework', 'am': 'undo-type', 'bn': 'একটি নোভেল গ্রুপ- স্তরের বস্তুর সাথে উত্তরের জন্য একটি শেষ- থেকে শেষ- থেকে গভীর ফ্রেম', 'cs': 'End-to-End hluboký rámec pro spouštění odpovědí s novým cílem skupinové úrovně', 'ca': 'Un marc profund de final a final per respondre amb un nou objectiu a nivell de grup', 'et': 'Täielik sügav raamistik vastuste käivitamiseks uue rühmatasandi eesmärgiga', 'bs': 'Krajnji do kraja duboki okvir za odgovor koji se pokreće s ciljem nivoa Novel grupe', 'fi': 'Kattava syväkehys vastausten laukaisuun uudella ryhmätason tavoitteella', 'jv': 'Text editor', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Celovit globlji okvir za sprožitev odgovorov z novim ciljem na ravni skupine', 'he': 'מסגרת עמוקה מסוף-לסוף לטיפול תשובות עם מטרה ברמה קבוצתית חדשה', 'bo': 'Answer Triggering with a Novel Group-Level Objective'}
{'en': 'Given a question and a set of answer candidates, answer triggering determines whether the candidate set contains any correct answers. If yes, it then outputs a correct one. In contrast to existing pipeline methods which first consider individual candidate answers separately and then make a prediction based on a threshold, we propose an end-to-end deep neural network framework, which is trained by a novel group-level objective function that directly optimizes the answer triggering performance. Our objective function penalizes three potential types of error and allows training the framework in an end-to-end manner. Experimental results on the WikiQA benchmark show that our framework outperforms the state of the arts by a 6.6 % absolute gain under F1 measure.', 'ar': 'بالنظر إلى سؤال ومجموعة من المرشحين للإجابة ، تحدد الإجابة المحفزة ما إذا كانت مجموعة المرشحين تحتوي على أي إجابات صحيحة. إذا كانت الإجابة بنعم ، فإنه يقوم بإخراج واحد صحيح. على النقيض من طرق خطوط الأنابيب الحالية التي تنظر أولاً في إجابات المرشحين الفردية بشكل منفصل ثم نقوم بالتنبؤ بناءً على عتبة ، نقترح إطار عمل شبكة عصبية عميقة من طرف إلى طرف ، يتم تدريبه بواسطة وظيفة موضوعية جديدة على مستوى المجموعة تعمل على التحسين المباشر الجواب يؤدي إلى الأداء. وظيفتنا الموضوعية تعاقب ثلاثة أنواع محتملة من الأخطاء وتسمح بتدريب إطار العمل بطريقة شاملة. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مقياس WikiQA أن إطار عملنا يتفوق على حالة الفنون بنسبة 6.6٪ ربح مطلق وفقًا لمقياس F1.', 'es': 'Dada una pregunta y un conjunto de candidatos de respuesta, la activación de respuestas determina si el conjunto de candidatos contiene respuestas correctas. En caso afirmativo, entonces genera uno correcto. A diferencia de los métodos de canalización existentes, que primero consideran las respuestas individuales de los candidatos por separado y luego hacen una predicción basada en un umbral, proponemos un marco de red neuronal profunda de extremo a extremo, que se entrena mediante una función objetivo novedosa a nivel de grupo que optimiza directamente la activación de respuestas. rendimiento. Nuestra función objetivo penaliza tres posibles tipos de error y permite entrenar el marco de manera integral. Los resultados experimentales en el punto de referencia de WikiQa muestran que nuestro marco supera al estado de las artes en una ganancia absoluta del 6,6% bajo la medida F1.', 'fr': "En fonction d'une question et d'un ensemble de réponses candidates, le déclenchement de réponse détermine si l'ensemble de candidats contient des réponses correctes. Si c'est le cas, il en sort un bon. Contrairement aux méthodes de pipeline existantes qui considèrent d'abord les réponses individuelles des candidats séparément, puis effectuent une prédiction basée sur un seuil, nous proposons un cadre de réseau neuronal profond de bout en bout, qui est entraîné par une nouvelle fonction d'objectif au niveau du groupe qui optimise directement le déclenchement de la réponse performance. Notre fonction objective pénalise trois types d'erreurs potentiels et permet de former le framework de bout en bout. Les résultats expérimentaux sur le benchmark WikiQA montrent que notre framework surpasse l'état de l'art par un gain absolu de 6,6\xa0% selon la mesure F1.", 'pt': 'Dada uma pergunta e um conjunto de candidatos a resposta, o acionamento de resposta determina se o conjunto de candidatos contém respostas corretas. Se sim, ele então produz um correto. Em contraste com os métodos de pipeline existentes que primeiro consideram as respostas individuais dos candidatos separadamente e, em seguida, fazem uma previsão com base em um limite, propomos uma estrutura de rede neural profunda de ponta a ponta, que é treinada por uma nova função objetivo em nível de grupo que otimiza diretamente a resposta que desencadeia o desempenho. Nossa função objetivo penaliza três tipos potenciais de erro e permite treinar o framework de maneira ponta a ponta. Resultados experimentais no benchmark WikiQA mostram que nossa estrutura supera o estado da arte em um ganho absoluto de 6,6% na medida da F1.', 'ja': '質問と回答候補のセットが与えられた場合、回答をトリガーすることで、候補のセットに正しい回答が含まれているかどうかが判断されます。「はい」の場合は、正しい値を出力します。最初に個々の候補者の回答を別々に検討し、次にしきい値に基づいて予測を行う既存のパイプライン手法とは対照的に、私たちはエンドツーエンドの深いニューラルネットワークフレームワークを提案します。これは、回答のトリガーパフォーマンスを直接最適化する新規のグループレベルの目標関数によってトレーニングされます。当社の目的関数は、3つの潜在的なタイプのエラーを罰し、フレームワークをエンドツーエンドの方法でトレーニングすることができます。WikiQAベンチマークの実験結果によると、当社のフレームワークは、F 1メジャーでは6.6 ％の絶対利得で最先端の技術を上回っています。', 'hi': 'एक प्रश्न और उत्तर उम्मीदवारों के एक सेट को देखते हुए, उत्तर ट्रिगरिंग यह निर्धारित करता है कि उम्मीदवार सेट में कोई सही उत्तर है या नहीं। यदि हां, तो यह एक सही आउटपुट करता है। मौजूदा पाइपलाइन विधियों के विपरीत जो पहले व्यक्तिगत उम्मीदवार उत्तरों पर अलग से विचार करते हैं और फिर एक सीमा के आधार पर भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, हम एक एंड-टू-एंड गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे एक उपन्यास समूह-स्तरीय उद्देश्य फ़ंक्शन द्वारा प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है जो सीधे उत्तर को ट्रिगर करने वाले प्रदर्शन को अनुकूलित करता है। हमारा उद्देश्य फ़ंक्शन तीन संभावित प्रकार की त्रुटि को दंडित करता है और फ्रेमवर्क को एंड-टू-एंड तरीके से प्रशिक्षण देने की अनुमति देता है। WikiQA बेंचमार्क पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा ढांचा F1 माप के तहत 6.6% पूर्ण लाभ से कला की स्थिति को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'При заданном вопросе и наборе ответов соискатели, срабатывание ответа определяет, содержит ли набор соискателей какие-либо правильные ответы. Если да, то он выводит правильный. В отличие от существующих методов конвейера, которые сначала рассматривают индивидуальные ответы кандидатов отдельно, а затем делают прогноз на основе порога, мы предлагаем сквозной фреймворк глубокой нейронной сети, который обучается с помощью новой целевой функции группового уровня, которая непосредственно оптимизирует производительность запуска ответа. Наша целевая функция наказывает три потенциальных типа ошибок и позволяет обучать фреймворк сквозным образом. Экспериментальные результаты по эталону WikiQA показывают, что наша структура превосходит состояние искусства на 6,6% абсолютного прироста по показателю F1.', 'zh': '给定一问及对案候选者,对案触发定选集是否。 若是,则输正一。 比之管道,先独思单选对案,然后基于阈值占,发端到端之深神经网络框架,当框架新组级函数训练,函数直优化之。 吾之所适函数罚三潜之非,而许以端到端之教框架。 WikiQA准试之实验结果表明,于F1测之,吾框架以6.6%益优于今。', 'ga': 'Nuair a chuirtear ceist agus sraith freagraí ar fáil d’iarrthóirí, cinneann truicear freagraí an bhfuil freagraí cearta ar bith sa tacar iarrthóirí. Má tá, aschuireann sé ceann ceart. I gcodarsnacht leis na modhanna píblíne atá ann cheana féin a bhreithníonn freagraí iarrthóra aonair ar leithligh ar dtús agus a dhéanann réamh-mheastachán bunaithe ar thairseach ansin, molaimid creat líonra néarúil domhain deireadh go deireadh, atá oilte ag feidhm oibiachtúil nua ar leibhéal grúpa a uasmhéadaíonn go díreach. an freagra a spreagann feidhmíocht. Déanann ár bhfeidhm oibiachtúil pionós a ghearradh ar thrí chineál earráide a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann agus ceadaíonn sé an creat a oiliúint ar bhealach ceann go ceann. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thagarmharcáil WikiQA go bhfuil gnóthachan iomlán 6.6% níos fearr ag ár gcreat faoi bheart F1 ná staid na n-ealaíon.', 'ka': 'კითხვა და პასუხის კონდიდენტების კონდიდენტების შესახებ, პასუხი დაწყენება განსაზღვრდება თუ არა კონდიდენტების კონდიდენტის კონდიდენტის კ აკჲ ეა, რჲდაგა ვ ოპაგთლნჲ. არსებობს პირველ კანდიდენტის პასუხების განმავლობაში, რომელიც პირველად აღმოჩნდება ინდიველ კანდიდენტის პასუხების განმავლობაში და შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ პირველზე განმავლობაში, ჩვენ გვეძლევთ გავაკეთებთ ნეიროლური ქსელის ფრამეტური ჩვენი მიზეზი ფუნქცია სამი პროცენტური შეცდომის პროცენტურები დაბრუნდება და შეუძლებელია კონფიგურაციას დაბრუნდეთ. სკეპერიმენტიური შედეგები WikiQA ბენქმარკის გამოსახულებაში გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი ფემპერიმენტი სურათების სურათის სურათების სურათების სურათების სურათების ს', 'el': 'Δεδομένου μιας ερώτησης και ενός συνόλου υποψηφίων απάντησης, η ενεργοποίηση απάντησης καθορίζει αν το σύνολο υποψηφίων περιέχει σωστές απαντήσεις. Εάν ναι, τότε παράγει ένα σωστό. Σε αντίθεση με τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους σωληνώσεων που πρώτα εξετάζουν μεμονωμένες υποψήφιες απαντήσεις ξεχωριστά και στη συνέχεια κάνουν μια πρόβλεψη βασισμένη σε ένα κατώτατο όριο, προτείνουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο πλαίσιο βαθύυ νευρικού δικτύου, το οποίο εκπαιδεύεται από μια νέα αντικειμενική λειτουργία σε ομαδικό επίπεδο που βελτιστοποιεί άμεσα την απόδοση ενεργοποίησης της απάντησης. Η αντικειμενική λειτουργία μας τιμωρεί τρεις πιθανούς τύπους σφαλμάτων και επιτρέπει την εκπαίδευση του πλαισίου με έναν ολοκληρωμένο τρόπο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο σημείο αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας ξεπερνά την κατάσταση των τεχνών κατά ένα 6,6% απόλυτο κέρδος κάτω από το μέτρο F1.', 'hu': 'Egy kérdés és egy sor válaszjelölt esetében a válasz aktiválása határozza meg, hogy a jelöltkészlet tartalmaz-e helyes válaszokat. Ha igen, akkor megfelelő eredményt ad ki. A meglévő pipeline módszerekkel ellentétben, amelyek először az egyes jelöltek válaszait külön vizsgálják, majd egy küszöbértéken alapuló előrejelzést készítenek, egy end-to-end mélyneurális hálózati keretrendszert javasolunk, amelyet egy új csoportszintű objektív függvény képez, amely közvetlenül optimalizálja a választ aktiváló teljesítményt. Objektív funkciónk három lehetséges hibatípust büntetnek, és lehetővé teszi a keretrendszer teljes körű képzését. A WikiQA benchmark kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a keretrendszerünk 6,6%-os abszolút nyereséggel felülmúlja a művészetek állapotát F1 mérés alatt.', 'it': "Data una domanda e una serie di candidati alla risposta, l'attivazione della risposta determina se il set di candidati contiene risposte corrette. Se sì, ne esce uno corretto. In contrasto con i metodi di pipeline esistenti che prima considerano le risposte individuali dei candidati separatamente e poi fanno una previsione basata su una soglia, proponiamo un framework di rete neurale profonda end-to-end, addestrato da una nuova funzione obiettivo a livello di gruppo che ottimizza direttamente la risposta innescando le prestazioni. La nostra funzione oggettiva penalizza tre potenziali tipi di errore e permette di formare il framework in modo end-to-end. I risultati sperimentali sul benchmark WikiQA mostrano che il nostro framework supera lo stato delle arti con un guadagno assoluto del 6,6% sotto la misura F1.", 'kk': 'Сұрақ және жауап кандидаттарының жиыны көрсету үшін, жауап жеткізу кезінде кандидаттардың жауаптары бар ма екенін анықтайды. Егер жоқ болса, ол дұрыс болады. Бірінші кандидаттардың жауаптарын бір-бірінен айырмашылып, содан кейін шегіне негізделген таңдау тәсілдеріне қарсы, біз соңындағы терең невралдық желінің қоршауын таңдаймыз. Бұл жауапты бастайтын жауапты оқиға көмектесетін романдық топ де Мақсатты функциясыз үш мүмкіндік қатенің түрін шектеп, бағдарламаны аяқтау тәртібімен оқытуға мүмкіндік береді. WikiQA бағдарламасының эксперименталдық нәтижелері, біздің бағдарламамыздың суреттердің күйін F1 өлшемінде 6,6% абсолюттік жетістіктері жоқ деп көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ചോദ്യം കൊണ്ടും ഒരു ഉത്തരം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നവരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരം ത്രിഗ്രിഗ്രിങ്ങ് തീരുമാനിക്കുന If yes, it then outputs a correct one.  നിലവിലുള്ള പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമായി ആദ്യം വ്യക്തിപരമായി പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന മറുപടികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വിചാരിക്കുകയും, പിന്നീട് ഒരു പ്രവചനം നടത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. അവസ നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d മൂന്നു സാധ്യതയുള്ള തെറ്റുകളെ ശിക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. ഫ്രെയിമ്പിനെ അവസാനിപ്പി വിക്കിക്ക്യൂഎ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ കലാ', 'lt': 'Given a question and a set of answer candidates, answer triggering determines whether the candidate set contains any correct answers.  Jei taip, tai išreiškia teisingą. Priešingai nei esami vamzdynų metodai, kurie pirmiausia atskirai vertina atskirus kandidatų atsakymus ir vėliau numato pagal ribą pagrįstą prognozę, mes siūlome nuo galo iki galo gilaus nervinio tinklo sistemą, kurią moko nauja grupės lygmens objektyvi funkcija, kuri tiesiogiai optimizuoja atsakymą sukeliančius rezultatus. Mūsų objektyvi funkcija baudžia tris galimas klaidų rūšis ir suteikia galimybę mokyti sistemą visada. Eksperimentiniai WikiQA lyginamojo rodiklio rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema viršija meno pažangą 6,6 proc. absoliučiu pelnu pagal F1 priemonę.', 'ms': 'Berikan soalan dan set calon jawapan, pemicu jawapan menentukan sama ada set calon mengandungi jawapan yang betul. Jika ya, ia akan mengeluarkan yang betul. In contrast to existing pipeline methods which first consider individual candidate answers separately and then make a prediction based on a threshold, we propose an end-to-end deep neural network framework, which is trained by a novel group-level objective function that directly optimizes the answer triggering performance.  Our objective function penalizes three potential types of error and allows training the framework in an end-to-end manner.  Hasil percubaan pada tanda referensi WikiQA menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kita melebihi keadaan seni dengan 6.6% keuntungan mutlak di bawah ukuran F1.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на прашањето и групата кандидати за одговор, предизвикувањето на одговорот одредува дали наборот на кандидати содржи некои правилни одговори. If yes, it then outputs a correct one.  In contrast to existing pipeline methods which first consider individual candidate answers separately and then make a prediction based on a threshold, we propose an end-to-end deep neural network framework, which is trained by a novel group-level objective function that directly optimizes the answer triggering performance.  Нашата објективна функција кривизира три потенцијални видови грешки и овозможува обука на рамката на крај до крај. Експерименталните резултати на benchmark WikiQA покажуваат дека нашата рамка ја надминува состојбата на уметностите со апсолутна добивка од 6,6 отсто под мерката F1.', 'no': 'Gjennomsikt eit spørsmål og eit set av svarkandidatar, vil svaret utløysa bestemme om kandidatset inneheld nokon rett svar. Dersom ja, utgår det eit rett. I contrast to existing pipeline methods which first consider individual candidate answers separately and then make a prediction based on a threshold, we propose an end-to-end deep neural network framework, which is trained by a novel group-level objective function that directly optimizes the answer triggering performance. Målfunksjonen vårt påpenaliserer tre potensielle typar feil og tillater opplæring av rammeverket på ein sluttmodus. Eksperimentale resultat på WikiQA-benchmarket viser at rammeverket vårt utfører tilstanden til kunsten med 6,6 % absolutt forståking under F1-mål.', 'pl': 'Biorąc pod uwagę pytanie i zestaw kandydatów na odpowiedź, uruchamianie odpowiedzi określa, czy zestaw kandydatów zawiera poprawne odpowiedzi. Jeśli tak, to wydaje poprawny. W przeciwieństwie do istniejących metod pipeline, które najpierw uwzględniają indywidualne odpowiedzi kandydatów, a następnie dokonują przewidywania oparte na progu, proponujemy kompleksowy framework głębokiej sieci neuronowej, który jest trenowany przez nową funkcję obiektywną na poziomie grupy, która bezpośrednio optymalizuje wydajność wyzwalającą odpowiedź. Nasza obiektywna funkcja kara trzy potencjalne rodzaje błędów i pozwala szkolić ramy w sposób end-to-end. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące referencji WikiQA pokazują, że nasz framework przewyższa stan sztuki o 6,6% bezwzględnego zysku w miarę F1.', 'mn': 'Олон асуулт болон хариултын захирагчид хариулт үүсгэдэг нь захирагчид ямар ч зөв хариулт байдаг эсэхийг тодорхойлдог. Хэрвээ тийм гэвэл энэ нь зөв нэгийг гаргадаг. Нэг захирагчийн хариултыг түрүүнд анх бодож буй хоолойн шулууны аргын эсрэг, дараа нь хязгаар дээр үндсэн таамаглал гаргаж, бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний гүнзгий гүнзгий хэлбэрийн сүлжээний системийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь шинэ бүлгийн төвшин зорилготой функцын дас Бидний зорилготой функц гурван боломжтой алдаа төрөлхтний төрлийг шалтгаалдаг. Эцэст нь төгсгөл хэлбэрээр багшлах боломжтой. WikiQA багц дээрх туршилтын үр дүнд бидний багц нь урлагийн байдал дээр F1 хэмжээнд 6.6% абсолютт ашиг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Având în vedere o întrebare și un set de candidați de răspuns, declanșarea răspunsurilor determină dacă setul de candidați conține răspunsuri corecte. Dacă da, atunci iese una corectă. Spre deosebire de metodele existente de pipeline care analizează mai întâi răspunsurile individuale ale candidatului separat și apoi fac o predicție bazată pe un prag, propunem un cadru de rețea neurală profundă end-to-end, care este instruit de o funcție obiectivă nouă la nivel de grup care optimizează direct răspunsul declanșând performanța. Funcția noastră obiectivă penalizează trei tipuri potențiale de eroare și permite instruirea cadrului într-un mod end-to-end. Rezultatele experimentale ale referinței WikiQA arată că cadrul nostru depășește starea artelor cu un câștig absolut de 6,6% sub măsura F1.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ උත්තර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා කියල ඔව්, ඒක හරියට පිළිගන්නවා. ඉතින් පායිප්ලායින් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයක් පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් වෙනුවෙන් පටන් ගන්න, ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් වි අපේ අරමුණ වැඩසටහන් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට අවශ්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා ඒ වගේම අවශ්\u200dය විකික්යා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ පරීක්ෂණයක් විදිහට 6.6% වි', 'so': "Sida aad wax weydiinayso iyo koox ka mid ah mid ka jawaabaya, jawaabta iskudhurista ayaa go’aanka go’aanka ka gaaraya in uu ku jiro jawaabo sax ah. Hadii haa, kadibna waxay bixisaa mid saxda ah. Iska duwan qaababka ay jiraan, taasoo marka hore ka fikiraya jawaabaha qof oo gaar ah, kadibna waxaynu horumarinaynaa wax ku sii sheegi karnaa qoraalka kooxda, taasoo lagu baranayo koox-koox oo si toos ah u bedela sameynta sameynta sameynta. Shaqooyinkayada la jeedo waxay dhibaataysaa saddex noocyo oo khalad ah, waxayna u ogolaan karaan in lagu tababariyo qorshaha ugu dhammaadka ugu dambaysta. Imtixaanka ku saabsan bangiga WikiQA waxay muuqataa in firaaqadeenu ay ka muuqato xaalada farshaxanka oo ay ka hoosaysaa 6.6% faa'iido kamid ah oo ka hoosaysa F1.", 'sr': 'S obzirom na pitanje i skup kandidata odgovora, odgovor koji pokreće određuje da li set kandidata sadrži bilo kakve ispravne odgovore. Ako jeste, onda izlazi ispravno. Za suprotnost postojećim metodama naftne linije koje prvo smatraju odgovorima individualnih kandidata odvojenim, a zatim predviđamo na osnovu praga, predlažemo okvir duboke neuralne mreže na kraju do kraja, koji je obučen od strane nove objektivne funkcije na nivou grupe koja direktno optimizuje odgovor koji izaziva funkciju. Naša objektivna funkcija kazni tri potencijalna vrsta greške i omogućava obuku okvira na kraj do kraja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referenciji WikiQA pokazuju da naš okvir iznosi stanje umjetnosti od 6,6% apsolutnog dobitka pod mjerom F1.', 'sv': 'Med en fråga och en uppsättning svarssökande avgör svaret om kandidatuppsättningen innehåller korrekta svar. Om ja, så ger den en korrekt. Till skillnad från befintliga pipeline-metoder som först beaktar enskilda kandidatsvar separat och sedan gör en förutsägelse baserad på en tröskel, föreslår vi ett end-to-end djupt neuralt nätverk ramverk, som utbildas av en ny gruppnivå objektiv funktion som direkt optimerar svaret utlösande prestanda. Vår objektiva funktion straffar tre potentiella typer av fel och möjliggör träning av ramverket på ett heltäckande sätt. Experimentella resultat på WikiQA-riktmärket visar att vårt ramverk presterar bättre än det senaste med en absolut vinst på 6,6% under F1-måttet.', 'ta': 'Given a question and a set of answer candidates, answer triggering determines whether the candidate set contains any correct answers.  ஆமாமானால், அது சரியான ஒன்றை வெளியிடும். இருக்கும் பைப்லைன் முறைமைகளை முதலில் தனிப்பட்ட தேர்வாளர் விடைகளை பார்க்கும் மற்றும் ஒரு முன்வெளிப்பாட்டை அடிப்படையில் முடியும் ஆழமான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் சட்டத்தை பரிந்த எங்கள் இலக்க செயல்கூறு மூன்று சாத்தியமான பிழையின் வகைகளை தண்டனை செய்கிறது மற்றும் முடிவிலிருந்து முடிவில Name', 'ur': 'ایک سؤال اور ایک سٹی جواب کے کنڈیٹوں کے ذریعے جواب دینے کی وجہ سے، جواب کی تاریک کرنے کی تصدیق کرتا ہے کہ کیونڈیٹ سٹ میں کوئی درست جواب ہے. اگر ہاں تو یہ ایک ٹھیک بات نکالتا ہے۔ موجود پائپ لین طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں جو پہلی بار شخصی کاندینٹ کی جواب مختلف سمجھتے ہیں اور پھر ایک ٹریش لیٹ پر بنیاد ایک پیش بینی بناتے ہیں، ہم ایک عمیق نیورل نیورل نیورل فلم کی پیش بینی کرتے ہیں، جو ایک نو گروپ لیٹ موجود فعالیت کے ذریعہ تطابق کی جاتی ہے جو مستقیماً جواب کی ترتی ہماری مقررہ فعالیت تین امکانات غلطی کی طرح سزا دیتی ہے اور فرمود کو آخری طرح تعلیم دیتی ہے۔ ویکیکیا بینچم مارک پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے فرمود آهنگ کی حالت کو 6.6% فائدہ کے ذریعہ F1 اندازے سے کامل فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے.', 'mt': 'Minħabba mistoqsija u sett ta’ kandidati għat-tweġibiet, it-tweġiba li tiskatta tiddetermina jekk is-sett ta’ kandidati fihx tweġibiet korretti. Jekk iva, imbagħad toħroġ waħda korretta. B’kuntrast mal-metodi eżistenti tal-pipeline li l-ewwel jikkunsidraw it-tweġibiet individwali tal-kandidati separatament u mbagħad jagħmlu tbassir ibbażat fuq limitu, qed nipproponu qafas tan-netwerk newrali fond minn tarf sa tarf, li huwa mħarreġ minn funzjoni oġġettiva ġdida fil-livell tal-grupp li ottimizza direttament il-prestazzjoni li tiskatta r-risposta. Our objective function penalizes three potential types of error and allows training the framework in an end-to-end manner.  Riżultati esperimentali dwar il-punt ta’ riferiment WikiQA juru li l-qafas tagħna huwa ogħla mill-istat tal-arti b’qligħ assolut ta’ 6.6% taħt il-miżura F1.', 'vi': 'Với một câu hỏi và một nhóm ứng cử viên trả lời, việc khởi động câu trả lời quyết định liệu trường hợp ứng cử viên chứa câu trả lời đúng hay không. Nếu đúng, nó sẽ xuất ra một đoạn đúng. Trái với các phương pháp dẫn đường tồn tại đầu tiên xem xét từng ứng viên một giải đáp riêng và sau đó đưa ra dự đoán dựa trên ngưỡng, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống mạng thần kinh sâu hơn, được huấn luyện bởi một hàm hiệu mới của nhóm, điều khiển khả năng kích hoạt đáp án trực tiếp. Nhiệm vụ của chúng ta trừng phạt ba dạng lỗi tiềm năng và cho phép huấn luyện khung thời gian hoàn to àn. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên tiêu chuẩn WikiLQA cho thấy cơ chế của chúng tôi đạt được trạng thái nghệ thuật cao hơn 6.6.6.', 'uz': "Name If yes, it then outputs a correct one.  Name Bizning obʼekt funksiyatlarimiz uch ta'siri turlarini ko'rsatadi va freymni oxiriga o'rganishga ruxsat beradi. Comment", 'bg': 'При даден въпрос и набор от отговори кандидати, задействащият отговор определя дали наборът кандидат съдържа правилни отговори. Ако отговорът е "да", тогава той извежда правилния. За разлика от съществуващите методи на тръбопровода, които първо разглеждат индивидуалните отговори на кандидатите отделно и след това правят прогноза въз основа на праг, ние предлагаме рамка от дълбока невронна мрежа от край до край, която се обучава от нова обективна функция на ниво група, която директно оптимизира изпълнението на отговора, задействащ отговор. Нашата обективна функция санкционира три потенциални типа грешки и позволява обучение на рамката от край до край. Експерименталните резултати на показателя показват, че нашата рамка надминава състоянието на изкуствата с 6,6% абсолютна печалба по мярка Формула 1.', 'nl': 'Bij een vraag en een reeks antwoordkandidaten bepaalt antwoordtriggering of de kandidaatset correcte antwoorden bevat. Zo ja, dan geeft het een correcte uit. In tegenstelling tot bestaande pipeline methodes die eerst individuele kandidaat antwoorden afzonderlijk bekijken en vervolgens een voorspelling maken op basis van een drempel, stellen we een end-to-end diep neuraal netwerk framework voor, dat wordt getraind door een nieuwe objectieve functie op groepsniveau die direct de respons triggering prestaties optimaliseert. Onze objectieve functie bestraft drie mogelijke soorten fouten en maakt het mogelijk om het framework op een end-to-end manier te trainen. Experimentele resultaten op de WikiQA benchmark tonen aan dat ons framework de state of the art overtreft met een 6,6% absolute winst onder F1 maat.', 'da': 'Med et spørgsmål og et sæt svarkandidater afgør udløsende svar, om kandidatsættet indeholder korrekte svar. Hvis ja, så udsender den en korrekt en. I modsætning til eksisterende pipeline metoder, der først overvejer individuelle kandidatsvar separat og derefter laver en forudsigelse baseret på en tærskel, foreslår vi en end-to-end dyb neurale netværk ramme, som er trænet af en ny gruppe-niveau objektiv funktion, der direkte optimerer svaret udløsende ydeevne. Vores objektive funktion straffer tre potentielle fejltyper og giver mulighed for at træne rammerne på en end-to-end måde. Eksperimentelle resultater på WikiQA benchmark viser, at vores framework overgår kunstens tilstand med en absolut gevinst på 6,6% under F1 måling.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na pitanje i skup kandidata odgovora, odgovor koji izaziva utvrđuje da li skup kandidata sadrži ispravne odgovore. Ako jeste, onda izlazi ispravno. Za suprotnost postojećim metodama cjevovoda koje prvo smatraju odgovorima individualnih kandidata odvojenim, a zatim predviđamo na osnovu praga, predlažemo okvir duboke neuralne mreže kraja do kraja, koji je obučen novim objektivnim funkcijama razine grupe koji izravno optimizira učinkovitost odgovora. Naša objektivna funkcija kazni tri potencijalna vrsta greške i omogućava obuku okvira na kraj do kraja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referenciji WikiQA pokazuju da naš okvir iznosi stanje umjetnosti od 6,6% apsolutnog dobitka pod mjerom F1.', 'fa': 'با توجه به یک سؤال و مجموعه از کاندیده\u200cهای پاسخ، پاسخ\u200cگیری که باعث می\u200cشود تعریف می\u200cکند که آیا مجموعه کاندیده\u200cها جواب درستی دارند. اگر بله، آن\u200cگاه یکی درست را انجام می\u200cدهد. در مقابل روش\u200cهای لوله\u200cهای موجود که اول جواب\u200cهای کاندیداتی\u200cها را جداً به نظر می\u200cگیرند و سپس یک پیش\u200cبینی بر اساس یک سطح انجام می\u200cدهیم، ما یک چهارچوب شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق به پایان نهایت پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که توسط یک عملکرد هدف\u200cهای سطح گروه\u200cهای نو آموزش می\u200cشود که عملکرد هدف ما سه نوع خطای محتمل را مجازات می کند و اجازه می دهد چهارچوب را به طریق پایان و پایان آموزش دهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی سنجیره\u200cی ویکیکیا نشان می\u200cدهد که چهارچوب ما در حالت هنر با یک سود کامل 6.6 درصد زیر اندازه\u200cی F1 بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'de': 'Bei einer Frage und einer Reihe von Antwortkandidaten bestimmt die Antwortauslösung, ob der Kandidatensatz korrekte Antworten enthält. Wenn ja, gibt es dann eine korrekte aus. Im Gegensatz zu bestehenden Pipeline-Methoden, die zunächst einzelne Kandidatenangaben separat betrachten und dann eine Vorhersage basierend auf einem Schwellenwert machen, schlagen wir ein End-to-End Deep Neuronal Network Framework vor, das durch eine neuartige Gruppenebene objektive Funktion trainiert wird, die die Antwort auslösende Leistung direkt optimiert. Unsere objektive Funktion bestraft drei mögliche Fehlerarten und ermöglicht eine durchgängige Schulung des Frameworks. Experimentelle Ergebnisse des WikiQA Benchmarks zeigen, dass unser Framework den Stand der Technik um einen 6,6% absoluten Gewinn unter F1 Maß übertrifft.', 'id': 'Memberikan pertanyaan dan set calon jawaban, pemicu jawaban menentukan apakah set calon mengandung jawaban yang benar. Jika iya, maka hasilnya benar. Berbeda dengan metode pipeline yang ada yang pertama mempertimbangkan jawaban kandidat individu secara terpisah dan kemudian membuat prediksi berdasarkan batas, kami melaporkan rangkaian jaringan saraf dalam akhir-akhir, yang dilatih oleh fungsi objektif kelompok-level baru yang secara langsung optimisasi prestasi pemicu jawaban. Fungsi objektif kita menghukum tiga tipe kesalahan potensial dan memungkinkan latihan kerangka dengan cara akhir-akhir. Hasil eksperimen pada benchmark WikiQA menunjukkan bahwa rangka kita melebihi keadaan seni dengan 6,6% keuntungan mutlak di bawah ukuran F1.', 'ko': '한 문제와 한 그룹의 후보 답안을 정하고 답안을 터치하면 후보 답안집에 어떤 정답이 포함되어 있는지 확인합니다.만약 그렇다면, 출력이 정확합니다.기존의 단일 후보 답안을 단독으로 고려한 다음에 한도값에 따라 예측하는 유수선 방법과 달리 우리는 끝에서 끝까지의 깊이 신경 네트워크 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 새로운 그룹급 목표 함수로 훈련하여 답안의 촉발 성능을 직접 최적화시킨다.우리의 목표 함수는 세 가지 잠재적인 오류 유형을 징벌하고, 프레임워크에 대한 교육을 철저하게 허용한다.WikiQA 기준 테스트의 실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 프레임은 F1 기준에서 절대적인 이득이 최신 수준보다 6.6% 높았다.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na swali na mfululizo wa majibu ya wagombea, jibu la upasuaji linaamua ikiwa kituo cha mgombea kina majibu sahihi. Kama ndio, basi inaleta sahihi moja. Tofauti na mbinu za pipeline zilizopo ambazo kwa mara ya kwanza hufikiria majibu ya mgombea binafsi tofauti na kisha kutengeneza kutabiri based on a threshold, tunapendekeza kusitisha mfumo wa mitandao ya kijamii wa mwisho wa mwisho wa mwisho, ambao unafundishwa na kazi ya lengo la kiwango cha kiwango cha kitaifa ambacho kwa moja inawezesha ufanisi wa jibu linaloendelea. Lengo letu linadhibiti aina tatu ya makosa na inaruhusu mafunzo ya mfumo kwa njia ya mwisho. Matokeo ya majaribio juu ya bendera ya WikiQA yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu unaonyesha hali ya sanaa kwa asilimia 6.6 asilimia kamili ya faida chini ya kipimo cha F1.', 'af': "As 'n vraag en 'n stel van antwoord kandidate gegee word, antwoord ontvang bepaal of die kandidatiesstel enige korrekte antwoorde bevat. As ja, dan uitvoer dit 'n korrekte een. In contrast to existing pipeline methods which first consider individual candidate answers separately and then make a prediction based on a threshold, we propose an end-to-end deep neural network framework, which is trained by a novel group-level objective function that directly optimises the answer triggering performance. Ons objektiewe funksie penaliseer drie potensiele tipes fout en laat toe die raamwerk op 'n einde-na-einde manier optrek. Eksperimentale resultate op die WikiQA benchmark wys dat ons raamwerk die staat van die kunste uitvoer deur 'n 6.6% absolute verkry onder F1 maat.", 'am': 'Given a question and a set of answer candidates, answer triggering determines whether the candidate set contains any correct answers.  አዎን፣ ያን ጊዜ እውነተኛውን ያስወግዳል፡፡ የአሁኑ የፖሊስ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ በመጀመሪያ የተለየ የአካባቢው መልስ በተለየ፣ ከዚያም በኋላ በመድረክ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ትንቢት እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካባቢነታችን የሦስት የስህተት ዓይነት እንዲያሰናክል እና ፍሬማዱን በመጨረሻ እንዲፈጸም ይችላል፡፡ በWikiQA benchmark ላይ የፈተና ውጤቶች የፍሬማችን ሥርዓት ከF1 በታች በ6.6 በመቶ ሙሉ ትርፍ እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bir sorag we bir kop cevap kandidatlary görkezildik, cevap şok edip kabul edip bilmeýäni bejerýär. Eger howa, ol dogry ýagdaýa getirir. Birinji kandidyň jogaplaryny a ýratyn düşünýän pipeline yöntemlerine görä we soňra bir süzgeňe daýan ýan bir tahmin edip, biz iň üstüne bir nuýral şebeke çerçevesini teklip edip, bu nuýumyň düýbündeki maksady funksiýasy tarapyndan öwrenmegi täzeden bejermek üçin jogapy etkinleýän zady bejerjekdir. Biziň maksadamyz funksiýamyz üç potensial ýalňyşyň türüni syýahat edýär we soňra-soňra çerýäni bilip berýär. WikiQA çekilişkiniň ýüzüniň netijesi bolan çykyşlaryň çarpyşymyzyň durumyny F1 ölçüsi altynda 6.6% absolut gazanlygyna ýok edendigini görkezýär.', 'hy': 'Հարց առնելով և մի շարք պատասխաններ թեկնածուների, պատասխանի ազդանշան որոշում է, արդյոք թեկնածուների շարքը պարունակում է ճիշտ պատասխաններ: Եթե այո, ապա այն ճիշտ է: Հակառակը գոյություն ունեցող խողովակաշարի մեթոդներին, որոնք նախ առանձին հաշվի են առնում անհատական թեկնածուների պատասխանները և հետո կանխատեսում են, որը հիմնված է փոքրի վրա, մենք առաջարկում ենք վերջ-վերջ խորը նյարդային ցանցի շրջանակներ, որոնք վարժեցվում են նոր խմբի մակարդակի օբ Մեր օբյեկտիվ ֆունկցիան դատապարտում է երեք պոտենցիալ սխալների տեսակ և հնարավորություն է տալիս շրջանակը վերջ-վերջ սովորեցնել: WiKiQA-ի հարաբերականի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր շրջանակը գերազանցում է արվեստի վիճակը 6.6 տոկոսով F1 չափով բացարձակ շահույթ:', 'az': 'Bir sual və bir qədər cevap kandidātlarına görə, cevap başlayıcısı müəyyən edir ki, kandidātın qurduğu doğru cevaplar barəsində yoxdur. Əgər evet, bu doğru bir işi çıxarır. Birinci kandidát cavablarını ilk dəfə təşkil edir və sonra sütun üstündə bir təşkil edərik, biz yeni qrup səviyyəsi təşkil edən yeni təşkil fəaliyyəti ilə təhsil edilən nürol şəbəkə çerçivesini təklif edirik. Bizim məqsədil funksiyamız üç potensial xəta türünü cəzalandırır və səviyyəni sona qədər təhsil edir. WikiQA benchmark ının təcrübəsi sonuçlarının F1 ölçüsünün altındakı 6.6% mütləq qəniməti artıqların durumunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'একটি প্রশ্ন এবং কিছু উত্তর প্রার্থী দিয়ে প্রার্থীর উত্তর ত্রিগ্রাহ্য করার সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়েছেন প্রার্থী সেটের মধ্ যদি হ্যাঁ, তাহলে এটা সঠিক একটা বানায়। বিদ্যমান পাইপেলাইন পদ্ধতির বিপরীতে যা প্রথম ব্যক্তিগত প্রার্থীর উত্তর আলাদা বিবেচনা করে এবং তারপর একটি ত্রিশোল্ডের ভিত্তিতে একটি ভবিষ্যৎবাণী করে, আমরা একটি শেষ পর্যন্ত গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক আমাদের উদ্দেশ্য ফাংশন তিনটি সম্ভাব্য ভুল ধরনের শাস্তি প্রদান করে এবং শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণের সুযোগ দেয়। উইকিকিউএ বেনম্যার্কের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রমের পরিস্থিতি শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি ছয়. ৬% এফ১ এর', 'bs': 'S obzirom na pitanje i skup kandidata odgovora, odgovor koji pokreće utvrđuje da li skup kandidata sadrži ispravne odgovore. Ako jeste, onda izlazi ispravno. Za suprotnost postojećim metodama cjevovoda koje prvo smatraju odgovorima individualnih kandidata odvojenim, a zatim predviđamo na pragu, predlažemo okvir duboke neuralne mreže na kraju do kraja, koji je obučen od strane nove objektivne funkcije na nivou grupe koja izravno optimizira izvođenje odgovora. Naša objektivna funkcija kazni tri potencijalna vrsta greške i omogućava obuku okvira na kraj do kraja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referenciji WikiQA pokazuju da naš okvir iznosi stanje umjetnosti od 6,6% apsolutnog dobitka pod mjerom F1.', 'ca': "Dant una pregunta i un conjunt de candidats a resposta, el desencadenament de resposta determina si el conjunt de candidats conté respostes correctes. Si sí, llavors produeix una correct a. En contrast amb els mètodes existents de tubacions que primer consideren les respostes individuals per separat i després fan una predicció basada en un umbre, proposem un marc de xarxa neuronal profunda de final a final, que està entrenat per una nova funció objectiva a nivell de grup que optimitza directament el desempeny de desencadenament de resposta. La nostra funció objectiva penalitza tres tipus potencials d'errors i permet formar el marc d'una manera final a final. Experimental results on the WikiQA benchmark show that our framework outperforms the state of the arts by a 6.6% absolute gain under F1 measure.", 'sq': 'Given a question and a set of answer candidates, answer triggering determines whether the candidate set contains any correct answers.  Nëse po, atëherë nxjerr një të saktë. Në kundërshtim me metodat ekzistuese të tubacionit që së pari konsiderojnë përgjigjet individuale të kandidatëve veçan ërisht dhe pastaj bëjnë një parashikim bazuar në një prag, ne propozojmë një kuadër të rrjetit nervor të thellë nga fundi në fund, i cili është trajnuar nga një funksion objektiv i ri në nivelin e grupit që optimizon drejtpërdrejt rezultatin që shkakton përgjigjen. Funksioni ynë objektiv penalizon tre lloje të mundshme gabimi dhe lejon trajnimin e kuadrit në një mënyrë nga fundi në fund. Rezultatet eksperimentale në pikën referenciale të WikiQA tregojnë se kuadri ynë mbizotëron gjendjen e artit me një fitim absolut prej 6.6% nën masën F1.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k otázce a sadě kandidátů na odpověď určuje spouštění odpovědi, zda sada kandidátů obsahuje správné odpovědi. Pokud ano, pak vyjde správný. Na rozdíl od existujících metod pipeline, které nejprve uvažují o jednotlivých kandidátech odděleně a poté provádějí predikci na základě prahové hodnoty, navrhujeme end-to-end hluboké neuronové sítě framework, který je trénován novou objektivní funkcí na úrovni skupiny, která přímo optimalizuje výkon spouštěcí odpověď. Naše objektivní funkce penalizuje tři potenciální typy chyb a umožňuje školení frameworku end-to-end způsobem. Experimentální výsledky na benchmarku WikiQA ukazují, že náš framework překonává stav umění o 6,6% absolutní zisk pod mírou F1.', 'fi': 'Kun otetaan huomioon kysymys ja vastausjoukko ehdokkaita, vastauslaukaisija mУЄУЄrittУЄУЄ, sisУЄltУЄУЄkУЖ ehdokasjoukko oikeita vastauksia. Jos kyllУЄ, se tuottaa oikean. Toisin kuin olemassa olevat putkistomenetelmУЄt, joissa ensin tarkastellaan yksittУЄisiУЄ ehdokkaita erikseen ja sitten tehdУЄУЄn kynnysarvoon perustuva ennuste, ehdotamme pУЄУЄstУЄ pУЄУЄhУЄn syvУЄhermoverkon viitekehystУЄ, jota kouluttaa uusi ryhmУЄtason objektiivitoiminto, joka suoraan optimoi vastauksen laukaisevan suorituskyvyn. Objektiivinen tehtУЄvУЄmme rankaisee kolmea mahdollista virhetyyppiУЄ ja mahdollistaa kehyksen kokonaisvaltaisen koulutuksen. Kokeelliset tulokset WikiQA-vertailuindeksistУЄ osoittavat, ettУЄ viitekehyksemme suoriutuu nykytaiteen tilasta 6,6%:lla absoluuttisella voitolla F1-mittakaavassa.', 'et': 'Küsimuse ja vastuste kandidaatide komplekti korral määrab vastuse käivitaja, kas kandidaadikomplekt sisaldab õigeid vastuseid. Kui jah, siis väljastab see õige. Erinevalt olemasolevatest torujuhtme meetoditest, mis esmalt kaaluvad individuaalseid kandidaadi vastuseid eraldi ja seejärel prognoosivad läve põhjal, pakume välja otsast otsani sügava närvivõrgu raamistiku, mida koolitatakse uudse rühmatasandi objektiivse funktsiooni abil, mis optimeerib otseselt vastuse käivitamise jõudlust. Meie objektiivne funktsioon karistab kolme võimalikku veatüüpi ja võimaldab raamistikku täielikult koolitada. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused WikiQA võrdlusalusel näitavad, et meie raamistik ületab kunstide taseme 6,6% absoluutse kasu F1 mõõtme puhul.', 'he': 'בהתחשב בשאלה ובקבוצה של מועמדים לתשובה, ההפעלה של תשובה קובעת אם קבוצת המועמדים מכילה תשובות נכונות. אם כן, זה יוציא אחד נכון. בניגוד לשיטות צינורות קיימות אשר קודם שוקלים את התשובות של המועמדים בודדים בנפרד ואז עושים חיזוי מבוסס על גג, אנו מציעים סגרת רשת עצבית עמוקה סוף-סוף התפקיד האובייקטיבי שלנו מעניש שלושה סוגים פוטנציאליים של טעות ומאפשר לאמן את המסגרת בדרך סוף-סוף. תוצאות ניסיוניות על נקודת הדרך WikiQA מראות כי המסגרת שלנו עולה על מצב האומנויות על ידי 6.6% רווח מוחלט תחת מדידת F1.', 'sk': 'Glede na vprašanje in nabor kandidatov za odgovore sprožitev odgovorov določi, ali nabor kandidatov vsebuje pravilne odgovore. Če da, potem izda pravilno. V nasprotju z obstoječimi cevovodnimi metodami, ki najprej obravnavajo odgovore posameznih kandidatov ločeno in nato napovedujejo na podlagi praga, predlagamo okvir globokega živčnega omrežja od konca do konca, ki ga usposablja nova objektivna funkcija na ravni skupine, ki neposredno optimizira učinkovitost sprožitve odgovora. Naša objektivna funkcija kaznuje tri možne vrste napak in omogoča usposabljanje okvira na celoten način. Eksperimentalni rezultati referenčne vrednosti WikiQA kažejo, da naš okvir presega stanje umetnosti za 6,6% absolutni dobiček pri merilu F1.', 'ha': "Gida wani tambaya da wani daidaita matsayin kirãyi, sai mai amfani da matsayin ya ƙayyade idan an daidaita wani matsala na daidaita. Na'am, sai ta faɗa gaskiya. Tsarin da metoden pipe wanda ke samu a farkon ka yi tunãni ga masu motsi guda a rarraba, sa'an nan kuma Mu sanya wani bastarwa a kan wani tsohon, muna buɗa'a wata firam mai ƙara zuwa-ƙari na jerin neural, wanda aka sanar da shi na wani aikin mai nuna-jama'a na yanzu-jama'a wanda ke shirya ajin mai amfani da shi dira ɗaya. Aiki na kiyiyinmu na zartar da nau'i uku masu yiwuwa na ɓata kuma yana yarda in karanta firam cikin shida ta ƙari-dawo. Tajararin matsala na WikiQA", 'jv': 'Tanggal ngetèh question karo setung pangan respong, gambar nggabungi mau Nek wis, njuk metu coro Dewis wis wis ngaweh sistem sing perusahaan pengguna sing sampeyan nggawe barang kebebasan karo nganggo perusahaan dumadhi sing sekolah sekolah, kita supoyata sistem end-to-end deep netwark sistem netwark, sing uwis cara nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas obyeku nggawe barang nggawe barang dumadhi Kita goal punika diputara perusahaan anyar sampeyan 3 Perintah sing dipindekso maneh ning kelas tok sing ngendalikne ning acara tentang kita nguasai perusahaan winih sing katya kalah 6.6% sing perusahaan sing dipindekso F1.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་ཞིག་དང་ཁ་སྐོང་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་སྒྲིག་གི་གནད་དོན་དག་གནང་བ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྒྲབ་ན། གལ་སྲིད། ཡིན་ན་ཏན་ཏན་ཞིག་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་ན། In contrast to existing pipeline methods which first consider individual candidate answers separately and then make a prediction based on a threshold, we propose an end-to-end deep neural network framework, which is trained by a novel group-level objective function that directly optimizes the answer triggering performance. ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འབེབས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་གསུམ་ཤིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། WikiQA བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་བརྟག་འཕྲུལ་གྱི་གནད་ཟུར་བ་དག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞུང་གིས་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞི་6.6% དང་ཡང་མ་'}
{'en': 'Predicting Word Association Strengths', 'ar': 'توقع قوة رابطة الكلمات', 'fr': 'Prédire les forces des associations de mots', 'es': 'Predecir las fortalezas de la asociación', 'pt': 'Prevendo os pontos fortes da associação de palavras', 'ja': '単語の関連性の強みを予測する', 'zh': '占单词联优势', 'hi': 'Word Association Strengths की भविष्यवाणी करना', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование сильных сторон ассоциации слов', 'ga': 'Neartanna Comhlachas Focal a Thuar', 'ka': 'სიტყვების აზოციაციის ძალადობა', 'el': 'Προβλέποντας τις δυνάμεις της σύνδεσης λέξεων', 'hu': 'A szótársulás erősségeinek előrejelzése', 'it': 'Prevedere i punti di forza delle associazioni di parole', 'lt': 'žodžių asociacijos stiprumo prognozavimas', 'mk': 'Предвидување на силите на зборовите асоцијации', 'kk': 'Сөздерді қосымша күштері', 'ms': 'Menimbas Kekuatan Asosiasi Perkataan', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് സംഘത്തിന്റെ മുന്\u200dഗണന ശക്തികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Tbassir tas-Saħħa tal-Assoċjazzjoni tal-Kliem', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хэмжээний хүчтэй байдал', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie sił stowarzyszenia słowa', 'ro': 'Prezicerea punctelor forte ale asocierii cuvintelor', 'sr': 'Predviðavajuæa snaga pridruživanja reèi', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධ ශක්තිය', 'so': 'Horumarinta xoogga ururka hadalka', 'sv': 'Att förutse ordassociationsstyrkor', 'ur': 'Word Association قوت کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை இணைப்பு வலிமைகளை முன்னேற்றுகிறது', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av ord- tilknytingsstyrker', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mong manh mối liên kết từ', 'hr': 'Predviđavajuća snaga pridruživanja riječi', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af ordforeningens styrker', 'bg': 'Предвиждане на силата на асоциацията на думите', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van de sterktes van woordassociatie', 'de': 'Vorhersage der Stärke der Wortassoziation', 'ko': '단어 연상 강도 예측', 'id': 'Memprediksi Kekuatan Asosiasi Kata', 'sw': 'Kiungo cha Chama cha Maneno', 'tr': 'Sözler Durumy Görkezilýän güçleri', 'af': 'Voorskou Woord Assosiasie Kragte', 'fa': 'تأثیر ارتباط کلمات پیش\u200cبینی', 'sq': 'Predicting Word Association Strengths', 'am': 'የቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Բառերի կապվածության ուժերի կանխատեսումը', 'az': 'S칬zl칲k Asociasyonu G칲칞l톛ri', 'bn': 'শব্দ সংস্থার পূর্ববর্তী শক্তি', 'bs': 'Predviđavajuća snaga pridruživanja riječi', 'ca': 'Predicting Word Association Strengths', 'fi': 'Sanaassosiaation vahvuuksien ennustaminen', 'cs': 'Předpovídání síly sdružení slov', 'et': 'Sõnade ühendamise tugevuste prognoosimine', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje moči združevanja besed', 'he': 'מנחש כוחות איגוד מילים', 'ha': 'Predicting Word Association Strengths', 'bo': 'གསལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་'}
{'en': 'This paper looks at the task of predicting word association strengths across three datasets ; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). We achieve results of r=0.357 and p=0.379, r=0.344 and p=0.300, and r=0.292 and p=0.363, respectively. We find Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) and GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) cosine similarities, as well as vector offsets, to be the highest performing features. Furthermore, we examine the usefulness of Gaussian embeddings (Vilnis and McCallum, 2014) for predicting word association strength, the first work to do so.', 'ar': 'تبحث هذه الورقة في مهمة التنبؤ بقوة ارتباط الكلمات عبر ثلاث مجموعات بيانات ؛ استحضار WordNet (Boyd-Graber et al. ، 2006) ، ومعايير الرابطة الحرة لجامعة جنوب فلوريدا (نيلسون وآخرون ، 2004) ، ومكنز إدنبرة التعاوني (كيس وآخرون ، 1973). نحقق نتائج r = 0.357 و p = 0.379 و r = 0.344 و p = 0.300 و r = 0.292 و p = 0.363 على التوالي. نجد أن Word2Vec (Mikolov et al.، 2013) و GloVe (Pennington et al.، 2014) متشابهات في جيب التمام ، بالإضافة إلى إزاحات المتجهات ، لتكون أفضل الميزات أداءً. علاوة على ذلك ، قمنا بفحص فائدة حفلات الزفاف الغوسية (Vilnis and McCallum ، 2014) للتنبؤ بقوة ارتباط الكلمات ، وهو أول عمل يقوم بذلك.', 'es': 'Este artículo analiza la tarea de predecir las fortalezas de la asociación de palabras en tres conjuntos de datos; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), las normas de la Asociación Libre de la Universidad del Sur de Florida (Nelson et al., 2004) y Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Logramos resultados de r=0.357 y p=0.379, r=0.344 y p=0.300, y r=0.292 y p=0.363, respectivamente. Encontramos que las similitudes de coseno de Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) y GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014), así como las compensaciones de vectores, son las características de mayor rendimiento. Además, examinamos la utilidad de las incrustaciones gaussianas (Vilnis y McCallum, 2014) para predecir la fuerza de asociación de palabras, el primer trabajo en hacerlo.', 'fr': "Cet article examine la tâche de prédiction des forces d'association de mots dans trois ensembles de données\xa0: WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), les normes de l'Association libre de l'Université de Floride du Sud (Nelson et al., 2004) et Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Nous obtenons des résultats de r = 0,357 et p = 0,379, r = 0,344 et p = 0,300, et r = 0,292 et p = 0,363, respectivement. Nous trouvons que les similitudes en cosinus Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) et GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014), ainsi que les décalages vectoriels, sont les caractéristiques les plus performantes. En outre, nous examinons l'utilité des intégrations gaussiennes (Vilnis et McCallum, 2014) pour prédire la force des associations de mots, ce qui constitue le premier travail à le faire.", 'pt': 'Este artigo analisa a tarefa de prever a força da associação de palavras em três conjuntos de dados; Evocação WordNet (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), normas da Associação Livre da Universidade do Sul da Flórida (Nelson et al., 2004) e Thesaurus Associativo de Edimburgo (Kiss et al., 1973). Obtemos resultados de r=0,357 ep=0,379, r=0,344 ep=0,300, er=0,292 ep=0,363, respectivamente. Encontramos semelhanças de cosseno Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) e GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014), bem como deslocamentos de vetor, como os recursos de melhor desempenho. Além disso, examinamos a utilidade das incorporações gaussianas (Vilnis e McCallum, 2014) para prever a força da associação de palavras, o primeiro trabalho a fazê-lo.', 'ru': 'В этой статье рассматривается задача прогнозирования сильных сторон ассоциации слов в трех наборах данных; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), нормы свободной ассоциации Университета Южной Флориды (Nelson et al., 2004) и Эдинбургский ассоциативный тезаурус (Kiss et al., 1973). Мы достигаем результатов r=0,357 и p=0,379, r=0,344 и p=0,300, и r=0,292 и p=0,363 соответственно. Мы считаем, что сходства косинусов Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) и GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014), а также векторные смещения, являются самыми эффективными характеристиками. Кроме того, мы изучаем полезность гауссовых вложений (Vilnis and McCallum, 2014) для прогнозирования силы ассоциации слов, первая работа, чтобы сделать это.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर तीन डेटासेट में शब्द संघ की ताकत की भविष्यवाणी करने के कार्य को देखता है; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), और Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973)। हम क्रमशः r = 0.357 और p = 0.379, r = 0.344 और p = 0.300, और r = 0.292 और p = 0.363 के परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। हम Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) और GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) कोसाइन समानताएं, साथ ही वेक्टर ऑफसेट, उच्चतम प्रदर्शन करने वाली विशेषताएं हैं। इसके अलावा, हम शब्द संघ की ताकत की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए गॉसियन एम्बेडिंग (विलनिस और मैककैलम, 2014) की उपयोगिता की जांच करते हैं, ऐसा करने के लिए पहला काम।', 'ja': '本論文は、WordNet Evocation (Boyd - Graber et al., 2006 )、University of Southern Florida Free Association norm (Nelson et al., 2004 )、およびEdinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973)の3つのデータセットにわたる単語会合の強みを予測するタスクを考察する。r = 0.357、p = 0.379、r = 0.344、p = 0.300、r = 0.292、p = 0.363の結果をそれぞれ達成した。Word 2 Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013)およびGloVe (Pennington et al., 2014)の余弦類似性、ならびにベクトルオフセットは、最もパフォーマンスの高い特徴であることがわかります。さらに、ガウスの埋め込み（ Vilnis and McCallum, 2014 ）が言葉の関連性の強さを予測するための有用性を検討し、そのための最初の作業を行った。', 'zh': '本文著眼于占候三数单词集优势之任。 WordNet Evocation(Boyd-Graber等,2006),南佛罗里达大学自由协会规模(Nelson等,2004)与Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus(Kiss等,1973)。 各得 r=0.357 、 p=0.379、r=0.344 、 p=0.300 及 r=0.292 、 p=0.363 也。 见Word2Vec(Mikolov等,2013)与GloVe(Pennington等,2014)余弦相似性及矢量偏移量,性能最高。 又论斯嵌(Vilnis、McCallum,2014)有用于占单词,一也。', 'ga': 'Féachann an páipéar seo ar an tasc a bhaineann le láidreachtaí comhcheangail focal thar thrí thacar sonraí a thuar; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), noirm Chomhlachas Saor in Aisce Ollscoil Florida Theas (Nelson et al., 2004), agus Teasáras Comhlach Dhún Éideann (Kiss et al., 1973). Bainimid amach torthaí r=0.357 agus p=0.379, r=0.344 agus p=0.300, agus r=0.292 agus p=0.363, faoi seach. Feictear dúinn gurb iad Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) agus GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) cosúlachtaí cosine, chomh maith le fritháirimh veicteora, na gnéithe is airde feidhmíochta. Ina theannta sin, scrúdaímid cé chomh húsáideach is atá sé leabú Gaussach (Vilnis agus McCallum, 2014) chun neart comhlachais na bhfocal a thuar, an chéad obair a dhéanfar amhlaidh.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a szóasszociációs erősségek előrejelzését vizsgálja három adatkészleten; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association normák (Nelson et al., 2004), és Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Az eredmények r=0,357 és p=0,379, r=0,344 és p=0,300, valamint r=0,292 és p=0,363. A Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) és GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) koszinusz hasonlóságokat, valamint vektoros eltolódásokat találunk a legmagasabb teljesítményű tulajdonságoknak. Ezenkívül megvizsgáljuk a Gauss beágyazások (Vilnis és McCallum, 2014) hasznosságát a szó asszociációs erősségének előrejelzésére, ez az első munka.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εξετάζει το καθήκον της πρόβλεψης δυνατοτήτων συσχέτισης λέξεων σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), πρότυπα Ελεύθερης Ένωσης του Πανεπιστημίου της Νότιας Φλόριντα (Nelson et al., 2004), και Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα των ρ=0.357 και p=0.379, r=0.344 και p=0.300, και r=0.292 και p=0.363 αντίστοιχα. Βρίσκουμε ότι οι ομοιότητες του συνημίου Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) και GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) είναι οι υψηλότερες επιδόσεις χαρακτηριστικών. Επιπλέον, εξετάζουμε τη χρησιμότητα των Γκαουσιανών ενσωμάτωσης (Βίλνις και ΜακΚάλουμ, 2014) για την πρόβλεψη της δύναμης συσχέτισης λέξεων, η πρώτη εργασία που το έκανε αυτό.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama užduotis prognozuoti žodžių asociacijos stiprumą trijuose duomenų rinkiniuose; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of South Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004) ir Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Pasiekėme atitinkamai r=0,357 ir p=0,379, r=0,344 ir p=0,300 ir r=0,292 ir p=0,363 rezultatus. Mes manome, kad Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) ir GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) kosino panašumai, taip pat vektorių kompensacijos, yra geriausiai veikiančios savybės. Furthermore, we examine the usefulness of Gaussian embeddings (Vilnis and McCallum, 2014) for predicting word association strength, the first work to do so.', 'it': "Questo articolo esamina il compito di prevedere i punti di forza delle associazioni di parole attraverso tre set di dati; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Raggiungiamo risultati rispettivamente di r=0,357 e p=0,379, r=0,344 e p=0,300, e r=0,292 e p=0,363. Troviamo che Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) e GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) somiglianze coseno, così come offset vettoriali, siano le caratteristiche più performanti. Inoltre, esaminiamo l'utilità delle incorporazioni gaussiane (Vilnis e McCallum, 2014) per predire la forza delle associazioni di parole, il primo lavoro a farlo.", 'mk': 'Овој документ ја разгледува задачата да се предвидат силите на зборовите на асоцијацијата во трите податоци; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber и други, 2006), University of South Florida Free Association norms (Nelson и други, 2004), и Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss и други, 1973). Ние постигнуваме резултати од r=0,357 и p=0,379, r=0,344 и p=0,300, односно r=0,292 и p=0,363. We find Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) and GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) cosine similarities, as well as vector offsets, to be the highest performing features.  Покрај тоа, ја испитуваме корисноста на гаусските внесувања (Вилис и Мекалум, 2014) за предвидување на силата на зборовите асоцијации, првата работа што го направи тоа.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini melihat tugas meramalkan kekuatan persatuan perkataan melalui tiga set data; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Kita mencapai keputusan r=0.357 dan p=0.379, r=0.344 dan p=0.300, dan r=0.292 dan p=0.363, respectively. Kita jumpa Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) dan GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) persamaan kosin, serta ofset vektor, menjadi ciri-ciri yang paling berkesan. Selain itu, kami memeriksa kebaikan penerbangan Gaussia (Vilnis dan McCallum, 2014) untuk meramalkan kekuatan persatuan kata, kerja pertama untuk melakukannya.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d മൂന്ന് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വാക്ക് സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ശക്തികള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനെ  വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ് എവ്വോക്യൂഷന്\u200d (ബോയിഡ്- ഗ്രാബര്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d., 2006), തെക്കന്\u200d ഫ്ലോറിഡ ഫ്രീ സ്വതന്ത്ര സോസിയേഷന്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d (നെല്\u200dസണ്\u200d എല്\u200d., 2004), എഡിന്\u200dബര്\u200dഗ്  R=0. 357, p=0. 379, r=0. 344, p=0. 300, r=0. 292, p=0. 363. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വോര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്ക് (മിക്കോളോവ് et al., 2013) ഗ്ലോവെ (പെന്നിങ്ടണ്\u200d അല്\u200d., 2014) കോസിനെയും വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഓഫെറ്റുകളെയും കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. അത്യുന്നതമായ പ്രദര്\u200dശ അതിനുശേഷം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഗസ്സിയന്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു (വില്\u200dനിസും മക്കാലുമും 2014) വാക്ക് സംഘത്തിന്\u200dറെ ശക്തി പ്രവചി', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument iħares lejn il-kompitu li jipprevedi l-qawwiet tal-assoċjazzjoni tal-kliem fi tliet settijiet ta’ dejta; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), u Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). We achieve results of r=0.357 and p=0.379, r=0.344 and p=0.300, and r=0.292 and p=0.363, respectively.  Issibu li Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) u GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) similaritajiet kożini, kif ukoll kumpens tal-vetturi, huma l-karatteristiċi tal-ogħla prestazzjoni. Barra minn hekk, jeżaminaw l-utilità tal-inkorporazzjonijiet Gaussjani (Vilnis u McCallum, 2014) għat-tbassir tas-saħħa tal-assoċjazzjoni tal-kelma, l-ewwel xogħol li sar dan.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები სამი მონაცემების შესახებ სიტყვების შესახებ სიტყვების შესახებ. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). ჩვენ მივიღეთ r=0,357 და p=0,379, r=0,344 და p=0,300, და r=0,292 და p=0,363. Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) და Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) კოსინური სინამდვილეობები, როგორც გვქტორის ჲფფესტი, იყოს უფრო დიდი გამოყენებელი ფუნქციები. დამატებით, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ დაუსიანური ინბედინდების გამოსაყენებელობა (Vilnis და McCallum, 2014) სიტყვების შესახებ, პირველი სამუშაო დავაკეთება.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь хэлний холбоотой хүчтэй байдлыг гурван өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр таамаглах даалгаварыг харж байна. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), South Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Бид r=0.357, p=0.379, r=0.344, p=0.300, r=0.292, p=0.363 үр дүн гаргадаг. Бид Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) болон Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) косины төстэй, вектор оффектүүд нь хамгийн өндөр үйл ажиллагааны чадвар гэж олж байна. Мөн бид Гауссийн нэвтрүүлэлтийн хэрэглээ (2014 оны Вилинис, Маккеллум) гэх үг холбоотой хүч чадварыг таамаглах, эхний хийх ажил юм.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз үш деректер жинақтарында сөздерді байланыстыру үшін тапсырманы көрсетеді. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), South Florida Free Association norms University (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Біз r=0, 357 және p=0, 379, r=0, 344 және p=0, 300 және r=0, 292 және p=0, 363 нәтижесін жеткіземіз. Біз Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) және Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) косиннің ұқсастықтары мен вектор офсеттері ең жоғары орындау мүмкіндіктері болып таптық. Сонымен қатар, біз Гауссияның интеграцияларының пайдалығын (Vilnis және McCallum, 2014), сөздерді қосымша күшін таңдау үшін, бірінші жұмыс істеу үшін тексереміз.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł analizuje zadanie przewidywania siły skojarzeń słowowych w trzech zbiorach danych; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), normy wolnego stowarzyszenia Uniwersytetu Południowej Florydy (Nelson et al., 2004) i tezaurus stowarzyszenia w Edynburgu (Kiss et al., 1973). Osiągamy wyniki odpowiednio r=0.357 i p=0.379, r=0.344 i p=0.300 oraz r=0.292 i p=0.363. Najwyżej wydajnymi cechami są podobieństwa cosinusów Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014), jak również przesunięcia wektorów. Ponadto badamy przydatność osadzeń Gaussowskich (Vilnis i McCallum, 2014) do przewidywania siły skojarzeń słowowych, pierwszej pracy, która to zrobiła.', 'no': 'Denne papiret ser på oppgåva for å foregå styrken på ordsamlinga på tre datasett. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Vi oppnår resultat av r=0,357 og p=0,379, r=0,344 og p=0,300, og r=0,292 og p=0,363. Vi finn Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) og Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) kosinuslinjer, og vektoroffsets, for å vera dei høgste utføringsfunksjonane. I tillegg undersøker vi korleis Gaussianske innbygging (Vilnis og McCallum, 2014) er nyttig for å foregå styrken på ordsamordningar, det første arbeidet som skal gjøre det.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare analizează sarcina de a prezice punctele forte ale asocierii cuvintelor în trei seturi de date; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association normes (Nelson et al., 2004) and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Obţinem rezultate de r=0,357 şi p=0,379, r=0,344 şi p=0,300 şi r=0,292 şi respectiv p=0,363. Considerăm că Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) și GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) asemănările cosine, precum și offseturile vectoriale, sunt cele mai performante caracteristici. Mai mult, examinăm utilitatea încorporărilor gaussiene (Vilnis și McCallum, 2014) pentru a prezice puterea asocierii cuvintelor, prima lucrare care face acest lucru.', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu ka fiiriyaa shaqada ka sii sheegidda ururka hadalka oo ku xoogaysan saddex kamid ah; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Jaamacadda Koonfureed Florida Free Association (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Waxaynu helaynaa resultada r=0.357 iyo p=0.379, r=0.344 iyo p=0.300, r=0.292 iyo p=0.363 Waxaynu helaynaa Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) iyo GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) oo isku mid ah, sidoo kale waxyaabaha aad u samaysan karto. Furthermore, waxaynu baaritaynaa faa'iidada guud ee Gaussian (Vilnis iyo McCallum, 2014) si loo sii sheegayo xoogga ururka, kaas oo ah shaqada ugu horeeya ee la sameeyo.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar uppgiften att förutsäga ordassociationsstyrkor över tre datauppsättningar. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association normer (Nelson et al., 2004), och Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Vi uppnår resultat på r=0,357 och p=0,379, r=0,344 och p=0,300, och r=0,292 respektive p=0,363. Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) och GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) cosinus likheter, liksom vektoroffset, är de mest presterande funktionerna. Vidare undersöker vi nyttan av Gaussiska inbäddningar (Vilnis och McCallum, 2014) för att förutsäga ordassociationsstyrka, det första arbetet att göra det.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ බලන්නේ වචන සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් තුනක් තියෙන දත්ත සෙට් වලින් විශ්වාස කරන වැඩක්; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of South Florida Free Alliance Norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Oxford Associate Thesauros (Kiss et al., 1973). අපි r=0.357 සහ p=0.379, r=0.344 සහ p=0.300, සහ r=0.292 සහ p=0.363, ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණයෙන්. අපි Word2Vec (mikolov et al., 2013) සහ Glove (Penington et al., 2014) කෝසින් සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් හොයාගත්තා, සහ වෙක්ටර් අෆ්සෙට්ස් වලින්, උපසුම් ප්\u200dරකාරීය අවශ්\u200dයතා තවත්, අපි ගෝසියාන් සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා (විල්නිස් සහ මැක්කොල්ලුම්, 2014) වචන සංවිධානය ශක්තිය අන', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் மூன்று தரவு அமைப்புகள் முழுவதும் வார்த்தை இணைப்பு வலிமைகளை முன்வாக்கிய செயலை பார்க்கி WordNet Evocation (Boyd- Graber et al., 2006), தென் ஃப்லோரிடா இலவச சமூகத்தின் கலைஞர் (நெல்சன் et al., 2004), மற்றும் Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al, 1973). R=0. 357 மற்றும் p=0. 379, r=0. 344 மற்றும் p=0. 300 மற்றும் r=0. 292 மற்றும் p=0. 363 நாம் Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) மற்றும் GloVe (பென்னிங்டன் அல்., 2014) கோசைன் ஒப்பாக காணலாம், மற்றும் வெக்டார் ஒப்பெட்டுகளும் அதிகபட்ச ச செயல்பாட்டு பண்ப அதற்கும், நாங்கள் காஸ்சியன் உள்ளடக்கங்களின் பயன்பாட்டை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் (வில்னிஸ் மற்றும் மெக்கால்லும், 2014) வார்த்தை இணைப்பு சக்தி ம', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ تین ڈیٹ سٹ کے اندر کلمات کے اتصال کی پیش بینی کی کوشش کی طرف دیکھتا ہے۔ WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). ہم ر=0.357 اور p=0.379، r=0.344 اور p=0.300، اور r=0.292 اور p=0.363 کا نتیجہ پائیں گے۔ ہم Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) اور Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) کاسین برابریتیں اور ویکتور اوفسٹ پاتے ہیں، سب سے بلند performing features ہیں. اس کے علاوہ، ہم گاوسی ایمبڈینگ (Vilnis and McCallum, 2014) کی استعمال کے مطابق تحقیق کر رہے ہیں، کلمات اتصال قوت کی پیش بینی کے لئے، پہلی کام جو یہ کرنا چاہتا ہے۔', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir pogleda zadatak predviđanja snage pridruživanja reèi preko tri seta podataka; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Univerzitet Južne Floride Free Association norme (Nelson et al., 2004), i Edinburg Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Postignemo rezultate r=0,357 i p=0,379, r=0,344 i p=0,300, i r=0,292 i p=0,363. Nalazimo Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) kosinske sličnosti, kao i vector offsets, da budu najveći izvođači. Osim toga, pregledamo korisnost Gausijskih ugrađenja (Vilnis i McCallum, 2014) za predviđanje snage pridruživanja reči, prvi rad koji bi to uradio.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz uchta maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi so'z aloqalarini oldingan vazifani ko'rsatadi; WordNet Evocation (Boyd Graber et al., 2006), Janubiy Florida Free Association Universitet (Nelson et, 2004), va Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et, 1973). @ info: credit Biz Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) va GloVe (Pennington et, 2014) kosine va vektor ofetilarning eng eng eng eng bajarish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'ladi. Ko'rsatganda, biz Gaussian foydalanishni (Vilnis va MakCallum 2014) so'zning birinchi ishni o'rganish uchun o'z birinchi ishni ko'raymiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này xem xét nhiệm vụ dự đoán các điểm mạnh liên kết từ trong ba bộ dữ liệu; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 200), University of Southern Florida Free Association Normals (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Assurative Thessalus (Kiss et al., 1973). Chúng tôi đạt được kết quả là r=0.357 và p=0.39, r=0.344 và p=0.300, và r=0.292 và p=0.36, Chúng tôi thấy Word2Veck (Mikolo et al., bây giờ) và GloVe (Pennington et al., 204) cosin tương tự, cũng như các véc- tơ khác, là tính năng hiệu suất cao nhất. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi xem xét sự hữu dụng của sự nhúng tay kiểu Gauss (Vilnis và McCallum, thậm chí bây giờ, bây giờ) để dự đoán sức mạnh hội từ, thử nghiệm đầu tiên làm điều đó.', 'bg': 'Тази статия разглежда задачата за прогнозиране на силните страни на асоциацията на думи в три набора от данни; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004) and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Получаваме резултати съответно r=0, 357 и p=0, 379, r=0, 344 и p=0, 300 и r=0, 292 и p=0, 363. Намираме косинусовите прилики на Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) и GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014), както и векторните компенсации, за да бъдат най-ефективните характеристики. Освен това изследваме полезността на гаусските вграждания (Вилнис и Макалум, 2014) за предсказване на силата на асоциацията на думи, първата работа, която прави това.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir pogleda zadatak predviđanja snage pridruživanja riječi u tri podataka; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Univerzitet Južne Floride Free Association norme (Nelson et al., 2004) i Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Postigli smo rezultate r=0,357 i p=0,379, r=0,344 i p=0,300, i r=0,292 i p=0,363. Nalazimo da su Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) sličnosti kosina, kao i vektorskih kompleksa najvećih izvođača. Nadalje, pregledamo korisnost Gausijskih ugrađenja (Vilnis i McCallum, 2014) za predviđanje snage pridruživanja riječi, prvi rad koji će to učiniti.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel wordt gekeken naar de taak van het voorspellen van sterktes van woordassociaties in drie datasets; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association normen (Nelson et al., 2004), en Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). We bereiken resultaten van respectievelijk r=0.357 en p=0.379, r=0.344 en p=0.300, en r=0.292 en p=0.363. We vinden Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) en GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) cosinus overeenkomsten, evenals vectoroffsets, als de hoogst presterende eigenschappen. Verder onderzoeken we het nut van Gaussiaanse embeddings (Vilnis en McCallum, 2014) voor het voorspellen van woordassociatiesterkte, het eerste werk dat dit deed.', 'id': 'Kertas ini melihat tugas untuk memprediksi kekuatan asosiasi kata dalam tiga set data; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973).  Kita mencapai hasil r=0,357 dan p=0,379, r=0,344 dan p=0,300, dan r=0,292 dan p=0,363, respectively. Kami menemukan Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) dan GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) persamaan kosin, serta ofset vektor, menjadi fitur yang paling penting. Selain itu, kami memeriksa kebaikan penerbangan Gaussia (Vilnis dan McCallum, 2014) untuk memprediksi kekuatan asosiasi kata, pekerjaan pertama untuk melakukannya.', 'da': 'Dette dokument ser på opgaven med at forudsige ordassociationsstyrker på tværs af tre datasæt; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association normer (Nelson et al., 2004) og Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Vi opnår resultater på henholdsvis r=0,357 og p=0,379, r=0,344 og p=0,300 og r=0,292 og p=0,363. Vi finder Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) og GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) cosinus ligheder, såvel som vektorforskydninger, for at være de højest ydende funktioner. Desuden undersøger vi nytten af gaussiske indlejringer (Vilnis og McCallum, 2014) til at forudsige ordassociationsstyrke, det første arbejde, der gør det.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ به وظیفه پیش بینی کردن قدرت اتصال کلمات در سه مجموعه داده است. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). ما نتیجه\u200cهای r=0.357 و p=0.379، r=0.344 و p=0.300، و r=0.292 و p=0.363 را می\u200cرسانیم. ما شبیه\u200cهای کاسین Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) و Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) را پیدا می\u200cکنیم، همچنین ویکتوری\u200cهای بزرگترین ویژگی\u200cهای اجرایی باشند. به علاوه، ما برای پیش بینی قوت اتصال کلمات، اولین کاری که باید انجام دهیم، کاری استفاده از انجمن گاوسی (Vilnis and McCallum, 2014) را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit befasst sich mit der Aufgabe, Wortassoziationsstärken über drei Datensätze vorherzusagen; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association Normen (Nelson et al., 2004) und Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Wir erzielen Ergebnisse von r=0.357 und p=0.379, r=0.344 und p=0.300 sowie r=0.292 und p=0.363. Wir finden, dass Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) und GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) Kosinusgleichheiten sowie Vektoroffsets die leistungsstärksten Eigenschaften sind. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir die Nützlichkeit von Gaußschen Einbettungen (Vilnis und McCallum, 2014) für die Vorhersage der Wortassoziationsstärke, die erste Arbeit, die dies getan hat.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaangalia jukumu la kutabiri jumuiya ya neno linaongezeka katika seti tatu za data; Utetezi wa WordNet (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), utamaduni wa Chuo Kikuu cha Florida Kusini (Nelson et al., 2004), na Muswada wa Chama cha Edinburgh (Kiss et al, 1973). Tumepata matokeo ya r=0.357 na p=0.379, r=0.344 na p=0.300, na r=0.292 na p=0.363. Tunapata Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) na GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) vifanana hivyo, pamoja na utofauti wa vector, ili kuwa vipengele vya juu vya kufanya kazi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachunguza matumizi ya mabango ya Gaussia (Vilnis na McCallum, 2014) kwa kutabiri nguvu ya neno la ushirikiano, kazi ya kwanza ya kufanya hivyo.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sözlerin birleşiginiň üç sany düzümlerinde güýçli güýçlerini täze etmek üçin täzegine seredýär. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Günorta Florida Özgür Asociasyon norms (Nelson et al., 2004), we Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Biz r=0,357 we p=0,379, r=0,344 we p=0,300 we r=0,292 we p=0,363 netijelerini ýetirdik. Biz Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) we GloVe Munuň üçin biz Gausyýanyň düzmekleriniň (Vilnis we McCallum, 2014).', 'ko': '본고는 세 가지 데이터에서 단어의 연상 강도를 집중적으로 예측하는 임무에 착안한다.워드넷 이보케이션(Boyd Graber 등, 2006년), 남부 플로리다대 자유협회 규범(Nelson 등, 2004년)과 에든버러 연합사전(Kiss 등, 1973년).우리가 얻은 결과는 각각 r=0.357과 p=0.379, r=0.344와 p=0.300, r=0.292와 p=0.363이다.Word2Vec(Mikolov 등, 2013년)와 GloVe(Pennington 등, 2014년)의 여현 유사성과 벡터 편이가 성능이 가장 높은 기능임을 발견했다.그 밖에 우리는 고스 삽입(Vilnis와 McCallum, 2014)이 단어의 연상 강도를 예측하는 데 유용성을 연구했는데 이것은 처음으로 이렇게 한 작업이다.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier kyk na die taak van voorskou van woord assosiasie sterkte oor drie datastel; en WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Ons bereik resultate van r=0, 357 en p=0, 379, r=0, 344 en p=0, 300, en r=0, 292 en p=0, 363, respectively. Ons vind Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) en Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) kosinus gelykenisse, asook vektoroffset, om die hoogste uitvoerde funksies te wees. Ons ondersoek ook die gebruiklikheid van Gaussianse inbêdings (Vilnis en McCallum, 2014) vir voorskou van woord-assosiasie krag, die eerste werk om dit te doen.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument shqyrton detyrën e parashikimit të forcave të shoqërimit të fjalëve në tre grupe të dhënash; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004) dhe Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Ne arrijmë rezultate të r=0.357 dhe p=0.379, r=0.344 dhe p=0.300 dhe r=0.292 dhe p=0.363 respektivisht. Ne gjejmë Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) dhe GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) ngjashmëri kosine, si dhe offset vektori, të jenë karakteristikat më të larta performuese. Përveç kësaj, ne e shqyrtojmë dobinë e përfshirjeve gauze (Vilnis dhe McCallum, 2014) për parashikimin e forcës së shoqërimit të fjalës, puna e parë që e bën këtë.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին նայում է բառերի կապվածության կանխատեսման խնդիրը երեք տվյալների համակարգերում: WordNet-ը (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Հարավային Ֆլորիդայի Ազատ Ազգացման Նորմները (Նելսոն et al., 2004), և Էդինբուրգի Ազացիացիվ թեզավրուսը (Kiss et al., 1973). Մենք հասնում ենք r=0.357 և p=0.379 արդյունքներին, r=0.344 և p=0.300, և r=0.222 և p=0.363: Մենք գտնում ենք Word2vec-ը (Միկոլով և այլն., 2013) և Global-ը (Պենինգտոն և այլն., 2014) կոզինային նմանությունները, ինչպես նաև վեկտորի օֆեյտները, որպես ամենաբարձր արտադրողական հատկություններ: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք գաուսական ներդրումների օգտակարությունը (Վիլինիս և Մակալյում, 2014), բառերի կապվածության ուժը կանխատեսելու համար, դա առաջին աշխատանքը:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি তিনটি ডাটাসেটের বিভিন্ন ভাষায় শব্দ সংগঠনের প্রতিষ্ঠানের কাজের দিকে তাকিয়ে আছে; ওয়ার্ডনেট ইভুকেশন (বোয়েড-গ্রাবারের এন্টাল ২০০৬), দক্ষিণ ফ্লোরিডা মুক্ত সংস্থার বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় (নেলসনে এল, ২০০৪), এবং এডিনবার্গ সোসিয়েটিভ থিউ আমরা পরিমাণ R=0. 357 এবং p=0. 379, r=0. 344 এবং p=0. 300 এবং r=0. 292 এবং p=0. 363 এর ফলাফল অর্জন করি। আমরা ওয়ার্ড২ভেক (মিকোলোভ এন্ট আল, ২০১৩) এবং গ্লোভি (পেনিংটন আল, ২০১৪) কোসিনের সমতুল্য পেয়েছি এবং একই সাথে ভেক্টর অফসেট, যারা সর্বোচ্চ প্রদর্শনীর বৈ এছাড়াও, আমরা গাউসিয়ার বিভিন্ন এবং ম্যাক্যালাম (২০১৪ সালে) শব্দ সংগঠনের শক্তি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার প্রথম কাজ পরীক্ষা করি।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt üç verilənlər arasında sözlərin birlikdə güclüyünü təmin etmək məqsədilə baxır. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), South Florida Free Association norms University (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Biz r=0,357, p=0,379, r=0,344, p=0,300, r=0,292 və p=0,363 nəticələrini başa düşür ük. Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) və Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) kosinun bənzərini, vector offsets də ən yüksək performancı olaraq tapırıq. Daha sonra, biz Gaussian inbadinglərinin (Vilnis və McCallum, 2014, Vilnis və McCallum), sözlərin birlikdə gücünü təmin etmək üçün ilk işin faydalanılığını incidirik.', 'ca': "Aquest paper analitza la tasca de predir el fort de l'associació de paraules en tres conjunts de dades; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004) i Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Obtenim resultats de r=0,357 i p=0,379, r=0,344 i p=0,300, i r=0,292 i p=0,363, respectivament. Trobem que Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) són les característiques més performants, com a compensacions de vectors. A més, examinem l'utilitat d'incorporacions gaussies (Vilnis i McCallum, 2014) per predir la for ça de l'associació de paraules, la primera feina a fer-ho.", 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá úkolem predikce síly asociace slov napříč třemi datovými sadami; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association normy (Nelson et al., 2004) a Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Dosahujeme výsledků r=0,357 a p=0,379, r=0,344 a p=0,300 a r=0,292 a p=0,363. Zjišťujeme, že cosinusové podobnosti Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) a GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) jsou nejvýkonnějšími funkcemi. Dále zkoumáme užitečnost Gaussovských vložení (Vilnis a McCallum, 2014) pro predikci síly asociace slov, což je první práce, která tak učinila.', 'am': 'ይህች ገጽ በሦስት ዳታተሮች ላይ የቃላት ማኅበረሰቢያ አካባቢ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973).  የr=0.357 እና p=0.379, r=0.344 እና p=0.300 እና r=0.292 እና p=0.363 የWord2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) እና GloVe (Pennington et., 2014) ኮሲን እና የዌctor ጥያቄዎችን ከፍተኛ የጥያቄ ምርጫዎች እንዲሆኑ እናገኛለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የጋውስሲን አካባቢዎች (Vilnis እና ማክካሊም 2014) የቃላትን ማኅበረሰብ ኃይል ለመቀበል የመጀመሪያውን ሥራ ለመጠየቅ እንመርምራለን፡፡', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis käsitletakse sõnaseoste tugevuse prognoosimise ülesannet kolme andmekogumi puhul; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber jt., 2006), Lõuna-Florida Ülikooli Vabaühenduse normid (Nelson jt., 2004) ja Edinburghi Assotsiatiivne Tesaurus (Kiss jt., 1973). Saavutame tulemused vastavalt r=0,357 ja p=0,379, r=0,344 ja p=0,300 ning r=0,292 ja p=0,363. Me leiame, et Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) ja GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) koosinuse sarnasused, samuti vektorite tasakaalustamised, on kõige tulemuslikumad omadused. Lisaks uurime Gaussi manustamiste (Vilnis ja McCallum, 2014) kasulikkust sõnasuhte tugevuse prognoosimisel, mis on esimene selleks tehtud töö.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir gleda zadatak predviđanja snage pridruživanja riječi u tri dataseta; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Univerzitet Južne Floride Free Association norme (Nelson et al., 2004), i Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Dobićemo rezultate r=0,357 i p=0,379, r=0,344 i p=0,300, i r=0,292 i p=0,363. Nalazimo da su Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i Glove (Pennington et al., 2014) sličnosti kosina, kao i vektorskih kompleksa, najviši izvođači. Osim toga, pregledamo korisnost ugrađenja Gausije (Vilnis i McCallum, 2014) za predviđanje snage pridruživanja riječi, prvi rad koji će to učiniti.', 'fi': 'Tässä asiakirjassa tarkastellaan tehtävää ennustaa sanayhteyksien vahvuuksia kolmessa aineistossa. WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004) ja Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Tulokset olivat r=0,357 ja p=0,379, r=0,344 ja p=0,300 ja r=0,292 ja p=0,363. Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) ja GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) kosinuksen samankaltaisuudet sekä vektorin siirtymät ovat tehokkaimpia ominaisuuksia. Lisäksi tutkimme gaussilaisten upotusten (Vilnis ja McCallum, 2014) hyödyllisyyttä sanasidonnan voimakkuuden ennustamisessa, joka oli ensimmäinen tähän tehty työ.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki bakal kelompok nglanggar aturan pangan ing ngregani pawar kuwi cadang dataset; akeh Word net ETOCtion We success of r=0. Awak dhéwé ngêkaké Word 2vecc (mikolv et al, 2013) lan Ngerti tambah, awak dhéwé isih perusahaan gambar gambar neng inbêng-gambar Gales (Wilis lan Makkelum, 2013) kanggo uréhadaké nggalakno perusahaan pawar, awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan akeh dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek obravnava nalogo napovedovanja moči povezovanja besed v treh naborih podatkov; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), Norma Univerze v južni Floridi za svobodno združenje (Nelson et al., 2004) in Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). Dosežemo rezultate r=0,357 oziroma p=0,379, r=0,344 oziroma p=0,300 oziroma r=0,292 oziroma p=0,363. Ugotavljamo, da so Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) in GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) podobnosti kosinusa, kot tudi vektorska zamenjava, najbolj uspešne lastnosti. Poleg tega preučujemo uporabnost gaussijskih vgradnj (Vilnis in McCallum, 2014) za napovedovanje moči povezovanja besed, prvo delo, ki je to storilo.', 'ha': "@ info @ label: listbox Mu sami fassarar r r=0.35 7 da p=0.379, r=0.344 da p=0.300, and r=0.292 da p=0.363. Tuna sãmun kosin na word2V (Miolvo et al., 2013) da GloV (Pennington et al., 2014) kamar da ke sami masu iya kyauta masu iya baƙata. Furan haka, munã jarraba amfani da masu iya amfani da Gaussian masu fitarwa (Winlnis da MacCallum, 2014) wa'adin maganar association, na farkon aikin da za'a aikata.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מסתכלת על המשימה של לחזות כוחות איגוד מילים בשלושה קבוצות נתונים; WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). אנחנו משיגים תוצאות של r=0,357 ופ=0,379, r=0,344 ופ=0,300, ו r=0,292 ופ=0,363, בהתאם. אנו מוצאים את דומות קוסינוס Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) וגלוב (Pennington et al., 2014), כמו גם פרסוטי ווקטורים, להיות המאפיינים הגבוהים ביותר בהופעה. בנוסף, אנו בודקים את השימוש של תוכניות גאוסיות (ויליס ומקאלם, 2014) לחזות כוח האיגוד מילים, העבודה הראשונה לעשות זאת.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསལ་བཤད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་གནས་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་བལྟ་ཡོད། WordNet Evocation (Boyd-Graber et al., 2006), University of Southern Florida Free Association norms (Nelson et al., 2004), and Edinburgh Associative Thesaurus (Kiss et al., 1973). We achieve results of r=0.357 and p=0.379, r=0.344 and p=0.300, and r=0.292 and p=0.363, respectively. ང་ཚོས་Word2Vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) དང་GloVe (Pennington et al., 2014) ས Kosinis similarities ། ཨ་རའི་ཕྱོགས་ཚུན་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གླེང་སྡོད་ཁང་གི་བརྗོད་སྟོན་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་དེའི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Learning Contextually Informed Representations for Linear-Time Discourse Parsing', 'ar': 'تعلم التمثيلات المستنيرة للسياق لتحليل الخطاب في الوقت الخطي', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de representaciones contextualmente informadas para el análisis del discurso en tiempo lineal', 'pt': 'Aprendendo Representações Informadas Contextualmente para Análise de Discurso em Tempo Linear', 'fr': "Apprentissage de représentations informées contextuellement pour l'analyse du discours linéaire en temps", 'ja': 'リニアタイムディスコース解析のための文脈に基づいた表現の学習', 'zh': '学线性时语解析者上下文通', 'hi': 'रैखिक-समय प्रवचन पार्सिंग के लिए प्रासंगिक रूप से सूचित अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'ru': 'Контекстно-информированные представления для разбора дискурса в линейном времени', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Léiriúcháin Eolas Comhthéacsúla le haghaidh Parsáil Líneach Dioscúrsa', 'el': 'Μάθηση περιεκτικά ενημερωμένων αναπαραστάσεων για ανάλυση λόγου γραμμικού χρόνου', 'hu': 'Tanulás Kontextuálisan tájékoztatott reprezentációk a lineáris idő diskurzus értelmezéséhez', 'ka': 'კონტექსტურად ინფორმაციული გამოსახულებების შესწავლება', 'it': "Rappresentazioni contestualmente informate per l'analisi del discorso in tempo lineare", 'kk': 'Сызық- уақыт дискурстарды талдау үшін мәліметті талдау', 'lt': 'Mokymasis iš konteksto informuotų atstovybių, susijusių su linijinio laiko diskurso analizavimu', 'mk': 'Научи контекстно информирани претставувања за анализирање на дискурсот на линијарно време', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ലൈനില്\u200d- സമയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Rappreżentazzjonijiet Informati Kuntest għall-Analiżi tad-Diskors fil-Ħin Linjari', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үеийн мэдээллийн төлөөлөл нь шугам-цаг ярилцлагын талаар суралцах', 'pl': 'Uczenie się kontekstowo informowanych reprezentacji dla analizy dyskursów liniowo-czasowych', 'ro': 'Reprezentări informate contextual pentru analizarea discursului în timp liniar', 'sr': 'Naučenje u kontekstu informativnih predstavljanja za analizu diskusija o linearnom vremenu', 'no': 'Læring av samanformerte representasjonar for tolking av linjertidspunkt', 'si': 'ලිනියර්- වෙලාව සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේදනය සඳහා තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Learning Contextually Informed Representations for Linear-Time Discourse Parsing', 'ta': 'Linear- Time Discourse Parsing', 'sv': 'Inlärning av kontextuellt informerade representationer för tolkning av linjär tid', 'ur': 'سیکھ رہی ہے لینیر-ٹیمے ڈرسکورس پارسینگ کے لئے متوسط معلومات کی روشنی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học Diễn viên mặc định cho kiểm tra dòng thời gian', 'bg': 'Учене на контекстно информирани представи за линейно-времево дискурсно анализиране', 'nl': 'Leren contextueel geïnformeerde representaties voor lineair-time discoursparsing', 'hr': 'Naučenje kontekstno obaviještenih predstavljanja za analizu diskusija o linearnom vremenu', 'da': 'Læring kontekstuelt informerede repræsentationer for lineær tid diskursfortolkning', 'de': 'Lernen kontextbezogen informierter Repräsentationen für lineare Zeitdiskursparsing', 'id': 'Mempelajari Perwakilan Diinformasikan Konteksual untuk Penganalisan Perilaku Waktu-Linear', 'ko': '선형 시간 문장 분석 중 언어 환경 정보 표징의 학습', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای اطلاعات متوسط برای تحلیل سخنرانی\u200cهای زمان خط', 'sw': 'Kujifunza maoni ya Taarifa kwa ajili ya Kuchapisha Msimamo-Time', 'tr': 'Hat-zamany Gezgi Görkezilişi Görkezilen Mazmunlar öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer Konteks Inligte Voorstellings vir Linear- Tyd Ontvaring', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Përfaqësuesve të Informuara Kontekstualisht për analizimin e diskutimit në kohën lineare', 'az': 'S톛tirli-Vaxtl캼 Diskusiya S톛fl톛m톛si 칲칞칲n m톛lumatlar캼 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'hy': 'Գիտել կոնտեքստում տեղեկացված ներկայացումներ գծային ժամանակի քննարկման համար', 'am': 'Learning Contextually Informed Representations for Linear-Time Discourse Parsing', 'bs': 'Naučenje kontekstno informiranih predstavljanja za analizu diskusija o linearnom vremenu', 'ca': "Aprendre representacions informades de manera contextual per l'analització del discurs en temps linear", 'bn': 'লাইনলাইন- টাইম ডিসার্স পার্সিং এর জন্য বিভিন্ন তথ্য প্রতিনিধি শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'et': 'Õppimine kontekstaalselt informeeritud esindused lineaarse aja diskursuse parsimiseks', 'cs': 'Učení kontextově informovaných reprezentací pro analýzu lineárně časového diskursu', 'fi': 'Oppiminen kontekstuaalisesti informoituja representaatioita lineaarisen ajan diskurssin jäsentämiseen', 'jv': 'Ngerti Gambar Keterangan Info Kontexter', 'he': 'ללמוד מייצגים מיודעים בתוכנית עבור מערכת דיסקורס בזמן הקו', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje kontekstualno informiranih predstavitev za linearno-časovno razporejanje diskurza', 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བསྟུན་ནས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་Representations for Linear-Time Discourse Parsing'}
{'en': 'Recent advances in RST discourse parsing have focused on two modeling paradigms : (a) high order parsers which jointly predict the tree structure of the discourse and the relations it encodes ; or (b) linear-time parsers which are efficient but mostly based on local features. In this work, we propose a linear-time parser with a novel way of representing discourse constituents based on neural networks which takes into account global contextual information and is able to capture long-distance dependencies. Experimental results show that our parser obtains state-of-the art performance on benchmark datasets, while being efficient (with time complexity linear in the number of sentences in the document) and requiring minimal feature engineering.', 'ar': 'ركزت التطورات الحديثة في تحليل خطاب RST على نموذجين للنمذجة: (أ) محللون ذوو رتبة عالية يتنبأون بشكل مشترك بالبنية الشجرية للخطاب والعلاقات التي يشفرها ؛ أو (ب) محللات الوقت الخطي التي تتسم بالكفاءة ولكنها تعتمد في الغالب على السمات المحلية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح محللًا للوقت الخطي بطريقة جديدة لتمثيل مكونات الخطاب بناءً على الشبكات العصبية التي تأخذ في الاعتبار المعلومات السياقية العالمية وتكون قادرة على التقاط التبعيات بعيدة المدى. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن المحلل اللغوي لدينا يحصل على أحدث أداء على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية ، مع كونه فعالاً (مع تعقيد زمني خطي في عدد الجمل في المستند) ويتطلب الحد الأدنى من هندسة الميزات.', 'fr': "Les récents progrès de l'analyse du discours RST se sont concentrés sur deux paradigmes de modélisation\xa0: (a) des analyseurs d'ordre élevé qui prédisent conjointement la structure arborescente du discours et les relations qu'il code\xa0; ou (b) des analyseurs temporels linéaires qui sont efficaces mais principalement basés sur des caractéristiques locales. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un analyseur temporel linéaire avec une nouvelle façon de représenter les constituants du discours à partir de réseaux de neurones qui prend en compte les informations contextuelles globales et est capable de capturer des dépendances à distance. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre analyseur obtient des performances de pointe sur des ensembles de données de référence, tout en étant efficace (avec une complexité temporelle linéaire dans le nombre de phrases dans le document) et en nécessitant une ingénierie de caractéristiques minimale.", 'es': 'Los avances recientes en el análisis del discurso RST se han centrado en dos paradigmas de modelado: (a) analizadores de alto orden que predicen conjuntamente la estructura de árbol del discurso y las relaciones que codifica; o (b) analizadores de tiempo lineal que son eficientes pero que se basan principalmente en características locales. En este trabajo, proponemos un analizador de tiempo lineal con una forma novedosa de representar los constituyentes del discurso basado en redes neuronales que tiene en cuenta la información contextual global y es capaz de capturar dependencias de larga distancia. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro analizador obtiene un rendimiento de vanguardia en los conjuntos de datos de referencia, a la vez que es eficiente (con una complejidad temporal lineal en el número de oraciones del documento) y requiere una ingeniería de características mínima.', 'pt': 'Avanços recentes na análise sintática do discurso RST têm se concentrado em dois paradigmas de modelagem: (a) analisadores sintáticos de alta ordem que preveem conjuntamente a estrutura em árvore do discurso e as relações que ele codifica; ou (b) analisadores de tempo linear que são eficientes, mas principalmente baseados em recursos locais. Neste trabalho, propomos um analisador de tempo linear com uma nova maneira de representar os constituintes do discurso baseado em redes neurais que leva em conta informações contextuais globais e é capaz de capturar dependências de longa distância. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso parser obtém desempenho de última geração em conjuntos de dados de referência, sendo eficiente (com complexidade de tempo linear no número de sentenças no documento) e exigindo o mínimo de engenharia de recursos.', 'ja': 'RSTトークス解析の最近の進歩は、2つのモデリングパラダイムに焦点を当てています： （ a ）トークスのツリー構造とそれがコードする関係を共同で予測する高次構文解析器；または（ b ）効率的であるが主にローカル特徴に基づいている線形時間構文解析器。この研究では、グローバルな文脈情報を考慮し、長距離の依存関係を取り込むことができる、ニューラルネットワークに基づいて話題構成要素を表す新たな方法を備えた線形時間構文解析器を提案します。実験結果によると、当社のパーサーはベンチマークデータセットの最先端のパフォーマンスを取得し、効率的でありながら（ドキュメント内の文の数に時間の複雑さが直線的である）、最小限のフィーチャーエンジニアリングを必要とします。', 'zh': 'RST语解析者最新进展集二范式:(a)高阶解析器,共占语树结构及编码; 或(b)线性时解析器,其效率高也,而要在于此。 此一线性时解析器,有一于神经网络,当思全局上下文信息而获长距离赖。 实验结果表明,吾解析器于基准集上得最先进之性,兼效率高(文档中句数之时复杂度为线性之),且须最少之工。', 'ru': 'Недавние достижения в области синтаксического анализа дискурса RST сосредоточены на двух парадигмах моделирования: (a) синтаксические анализаторы высокого порядка, которые совместно предсказывают структуру дерева дискурса и отношения, которые он кодирует; или (b) синтаксические анализаторы линейного времени, которые эффективны, но в основном основаны на местных особенностях. В этой работе мы предлагаем линейно-временной парсер с новым способом представления составляющих дискурса на основе нейронных сетей, который учитывает глобальную контекстуальную информацию и способен захватывать зависимости на большие расстояния. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш синтаксический анализатор получает современную производительность на базовых наборах данных, при этом он эффективен (с линейной по времени сложностью в количестве предложений в документе) и требует минимального проектирования функций.', 'hi': 'आरएसटी प्रवचन पार्सिंग में हाल की प्रगति ने दो मॉडलिंग प्रतिमानों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है: (ए) उच्च क्रम पार्सर जो संयुक्त रूप से प्रवचन की पेड़ संरचना और संबंधों की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं; या (बी) रैखिक-समय पार्सर जो कुशल हैं लेकिन ज्यादातर स्थानीय विशेषताओं पर आधारित हैं। इस काम में, हम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर प्रवचन घटकों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के एक उपन्यास तरीके के साथ एक रैखिक-समय पार्सर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो वैश्विक प्रासंगिक जानकारी को ध्यान में रखता है और लंबी दूरी की निर्भरताओं को पकड़ने में सक्षम है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा पार्सर बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जबकि कुशल (दस्तावेज़ में वाक्यों की संख्या में समय की जटिलता रैखिक के साथ) और न्यूनतम सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ga': 'Dhírigh dul chun cinn le déanaí i bparsáil dioscúrsa RST ar dhá pharaidím samhaltaithe: (a) parsálaithe ard-ord a dhéanann comhthuar struchtúr crann an dioscúrsa agus an gaol a ionchódaíonn sé; nó (b) parsálaithe ama líneacha atá éifeachtach ach atá bunaithe go príomha ar ghnéithe áitiúla. Sa obair seo, molaimid parsálaí líneach ama le bealach nua chun comhábhair dioscúrsa a léiriú bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha a chuireann faisnéis chomhthéacsúil dhomhanda san áireamh agus atá in ann spleáchais fadraoin a ghabháil. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfaigheann ár parsálaí feidhmíocht den scoth ar thacair sonraí tagarmharcála, agus é a bheith éifeachtach (le castacht ama líneach i líon na n-abairtí sa doiciméad) agus a éilíonn gné-innealtóireacht íosta.', 'hu': 'Az RST diskurzus elemzésének közelmúltbeli előrelépései két modellezési paradigmára összpontosítottak: (a) nagy rendű elemzők, amelyek együttesen jósolják meg a diskurzus faszerkezetét és az általa kódolt kapcsolatokat; vagy b) lineáris idejű elemzők, amelyek hatékonyak, de leginkább helyi jellemzőkön alapulnak. Ebben a munkában egy lineáris idő elemzőt javasolunk, amely egy új módon reprezentálja a diskurzus alkotóelemeket neurális hálózatokon alapuló diskurzust, amely figyelembe veszi a globális kontextuális információkat és képes rögzíteni a távolsági függőségeket. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy elemzőnk korszerű teljesítményt ér el benchmark adathalmazokon, miközben hatékony (időkomplexitással lineáris a dokumentumban szereplő mondatok számában), és minimális funkciótervezést igényel.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην ανάλυση λόγου έχουν επικεντρωθεί σε δύο παραδείγματα μοντελοποίησης: (α) αναλυτές υψηλής τάξης που από κοινού προβλέπουν τη δομή δέντρου του λόγου και τις σχέσεις που κωδικοποιεί. ή β) αναλυτές γραμμικού χρόνου που είναι αποτελεσματικοί αλλά βασίζονται κυρίως σε τοπικά χαρακτηριστικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν αναλυτή γραμμικού χρόνου με έναν νέο τρόπο αναπαράστασης των συστατικών του λόγου βασισμένων σε νευρωνικά δίκτυα, ο οποίος λαμβάνει υπόψη τις παγκόσμιες πληροφορίες του περιβάλλοντος και είναι σε θέση να συλλάβει τις μακρινές εξαρτήσεις. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι ο αναλυτής μας επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, ενώ είναι αποδοτικός (με την πολυπλοκότητα χρόνου γραμμική στον αριθμό των προτάσεων στο έγγραφο) και απαιτεί ελάχιστη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών.', 'ka': 'RST დისკურსების პანუზაციაში აღმოჩენა ორი მოდელური პარადიგმებზე: a) მაღალი პერაზერები, რომელიც ერთადერთად წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინა ან b) ლინური დროის პარასერები, რომლებიც ეფექტიურია, მაგრამ უფრო მეტი ლოკალური ფუნქციებიდან ბაზიან. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მინდომებით ლეინერი დროის პანუზერი როგორც პროგრამეტური გამოსახულების კონსტუტენტების შესახებ, რომელიც გლობალური კონტექსტური ინფორმაციას აღმოჩენა და შეუძლი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი პანსერილის შესაძლებლობა მონაცემების შესაძლებლობაზე, როცა ეფექტიურია (დოკულექტიური კომპლექტიურება დოკუმენტში წარმოდგენების რაოდენობ', 'lt': 'Neseniai RST diskursų analizės pažanga buvo sutelkta į du modeliavimo paradigmus: a) aukštos eilės analizatorius, kurie kartu numato diskurso medžio struktūrą ir jo koduojamus santykius; arba b) linijiniai laiko analizatoriai, kurie yra veiksmingi, bet daugiausia pagrįsti vietos savybėmis. In this work, we propose a linear-time parser with a novel way of representing discourse constituents based on neural networks which takes into account global contextual information and is able to capture long-distance dependencies.  Experimental results show that our parser obtains state-of-the art performance on benchmark datasets, while being efficient (with time complexity linear in the number of sentences in the document) and requiring minimal feature engineering.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните напредоци во анализирањето на дискурсот на РСТ се фокусираа на два парадигми на моделирање: (a) анализирачи со висок ред кои заедно ја предвидуваат структурата на дрвото на дискурсот и односите кои ги кодира; или (b) линијарно-временски анализатори кои се ефикасни, но претежно базирани на локални карактеристики. Во оваа работа, предложуваме линијарно-временски анализатор со нов начин на претставување на дискурсните компоненти базирани на нервните мрежи кои ги земаат во предвид глобалните контекстуални информации и можат да зафатат зависности на долги растојанија. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот анализатор постигнува најсовршена резултат на наборот на податоци за benchmark, истовремено бидејќи е ефикасен (со временска комплексност линијарна во бројот на реченици во документот) и бара минимална инженерија на карактеристики.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы RST дискурстарды талдау жағдайлары екі модель парадигментіне назар ауыстырылды: a) дискурстардың ағаш құрылғысын біріктіріп, оның кодтамасының қасиеттеріне біріктіріп көрген жоғары реттік талдаушыл немесе (b) жергілікті қасиеттерге негізделген сызық уақыт талдаушылары. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз сызық уақыт талдаушысын, невралдық желілерде негізделген дискурстардың тәуелдігін көрсету ретінде, жалпы тәуелдік мәліметтерді есептеп, ұзақ тәуелдіктерді алу мүмкіндігін тү Эксперименталдық нәтижелер бағытталған деректер жиындарында, бағытталған (құжаттағы сөздердің саны бойынша уақытты сызықты сызықты болып) және минимал мүмкіндіктердің инженерлігін талап етеді дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam penghuraian percakapan RST telah fokus pada dua paradigm pemodelan: (a) penghuraian tertinggi yang bersama-sama meramalkan struktur pokok percakapan dan hubungan yang ia kodkan; atau (b) penghurai masa linear yang efisien tetapi kebanyakan berdasarkan ciri-ciri setempat. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan penghurai masa linear dengan cara baru untuk mewakili komponen diskors berdasarkan rangkaian saraf yang mempertimbangkan maklumat kontekstual global dan mampu menangkap dependensi jarak jauh. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa penghurai kami mendapatkan prestasi terbaik pada set data benchmark, sementara menjadi efisien (dengan kompleksiti masa linear dalam bilangan kalimat dalam dokumen) dan memerlukan teknik fitur minimal.', 'it': "I recenti progressi nell'analisi del discorso RST si sono concentrati su due paradigmi di modellazione: (a) parser di alto ordine che predicono congiuntamente la struttura ad albero del discorso e le relazioni che codifica; o (b) parser lineari-time efficienti ma soprattutto basati su caratteristiche locali. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un parser lineare-tempo con un modo nuovo di rappresentare i costituenti del discorso basato su reti neurali che tiene conto delle informazioni contestuali globali ed è in grado di catturare le dipendenze a lunga distanza. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro parser ottiene prestazioni all'avanguardia su set di dati benchmark, pur essendo efficiente (con complessità temporale lineare nel numero di frasi nel documento) e richiedendo funzionalità ingegneristiche minime.", 'ml': 'RST സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിലെ അടുത്തുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു മാതൃകയുടെ പാര്\u200dഡിഡിമേല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു: (a) സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷത്തി അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d (b) ലൈനര്\u200d സമയത്തെ പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ളവരാണ്, പക്ഷെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രാദേശിക വിശേഷതകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്ററുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വഴ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഞങ്ങളുടെ പരാജയപ്രകാരം ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d കലാകാരുടെ സ്ഥിതിയുടെ അവസ്ഥ ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. അത', 'mt': 'L-avvanzi reċenti fl-analiżi tad-diskors RST iffukaw fuq żewġ paradigmi ta’ mudell: (a) analizzaturi ta’ ordni għolja li b’mod konġunt jipprevedu l-istruttura tas-siġar tad-diskors u r-relazzjonijiet li jikkodifika; jew (b) analizzaturi b’ħin lineari li huma effiċjenti iżda l-aktar ibbażati fuq karatteristiċi lokali. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu analizzatur lineari ta’ ħin b’mod ġdid ta’ rappreżentazzjoni ta’ kostitwenti ta’ diskors ibbażati fuq netwerks newrali li jqis l-informazzjoni kuntestwali globali u li kapaċi jinqabdu dipendenzi fuq distanzi twal. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-analizzatur tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji, filwaqt li jkun effiċjenti (b’kumplessità ta’ żmien lineari fin-numru ta’ sentenzi fid-dokument) u jeħtieġ in ġinerija b’karatteristiċi minimi.', 'no': 'Nyleg foregåver i RST- diskursanalisering har fokusert på to modelleringsparadigmar: a) høg rekkefølgjer som kopla foregår tre- strukturen av diskursen og forholdene han kodar. eller b) lineærtidsstolkar som er effektiv, men hovudsakelig basert på lokale funksjonar. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein lineær tidsamerker med ein novel måte å representera diskurskomponentar basert på neiralnettverk som tar inn i bruk av globale kontekstinformasjon og kan henta langavstand avhengighet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at analysen vår får kunsthandlinga på benchmarkdatasett, mens det er effektivt (med tidspluksiteten linear i antall setningar i dokumentet) og krev minimal funksjonsengineering.', 'mn': 'RST ярианы талаар саяхан хөгжлийн хөгжлийн талаар хоёр моделийн парадигм дээр анхаарлаа хандуулсан: a) ярианы модны бүтэц болон шинэ холбоотой харилцааныг нийлүүлдэг өндөр дарааллын талаар ажилладаг. эсвэл (b) бүтээмжтэй шугам хугацааны ажиллаачид ихэнхдээ орон нутгийн боломжууд дээр суурилсан. Энэ ажлын тухай бид шугам хугацааны хуваагч нарыг шинэ арга зам бий болгож, дэлхийн орчин үеийн мэдээллийг тооцоолж, урт зай хамааралтай байдлыг авах боломжтой ярианы загваруудыг илэрхийлж чадна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний ажиллагчид банкмарк өгөгдлийн санд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг авч чадна. Энэ нь үр дүнтэй (баримт өгөгдлийн тоо хэмжээний цаг цогцолтой шугам хэмжээтэй) болон хамгийн бага техникийн инженерийн хэрэгтэй.', 'ro': 'Progresele recente în analizarea discursului RST s-au concentrat pe două paradigme de modelare: (a) analizători de ordine înaltă care prezic împreună structura arborească a discursului și relațiile pe care le codează; sau (b) analizoare de timp liniar care sunt eficiente, dar în principal bazate pe caracteristici locale. În această lucrare, propunem un parser liniar-timp cu un mod nou de a reprezenta constituenții discursului bazat pe rețele neurale care ia în considerare informațiile contextuale globale și este capabil să capteze dependențele la distanțe lungi. Rezultatele experimentale arată că parserul nostru obține performanțe de ultimă generație pe seturile de date de referință, fiind în același timp eficient (complexitatea timpului liniară în numărul de propoziții din document) și necesitând inginerie minimă a caracteristicilor.', 'sr': 'Nedavno napredak razmatranja diskursa RST-a fokusirao se na dve paradigme modeliranja: a) visoki parseri koji zajedno predviđaju strukturu drveta diskursa i odnose koje kodira; ili b) linearni vremenski parseri koji su efikasni ali uglavnom zasnovani na lokalnim karakteristikama. U ovom poslu predlažemo linearnog vremenskog analizatora sa novim načinom predstavljanja sastavnika diskusija baziranih na neuralnim mrežama koja uzima u obzir globalne kontekstualne informacije i može da uhvati daljinske zavisnosti. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš analizator dobija postupak umjetnosti na bazama podataka, dok je efikasno (sa vremenskom kompleksnošću linearnim brojem rečenica u dokumentu) i zahteva minimalnu in ženjeriju.', 'so': 'Dhacdooyinkii u dhowayd ee baaritaanka RST waxay ku kalsoonaaday laba lambaro oo tusaale ah: (a) baarlamayaasha sare oo si wada jir ah u sii sheegaya dhismaha geedka hadalka iyo xiriirka uu ku qorayo; ama jardiinada xilliga ah ee ay tayo u leeyihiin laakiin ugu badan waxay ku saleysan yihiin tayo-gaar ah. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa baaritaanka qoriga-xilliga ah oo ku qoran qaab saxda ah oo ku representaya doorashada hadalka oo ku saleysan shabakado neurada ah oo ku xisaabta macluumaadka joogtada ah ee caalamiga ah iyo awoodi karnaa inuu qabsado xiriirka fog. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in baaritaankeenu uu helo xaaladda farshaxanka oo ku saabsan taariikhda bangiga, iyadoo ay ku shaqeeyaan (xilliga complex ku qoran tirada xukunka dukumentiga) iyo in uu u baahan yahay injiilka waxyaabaha ugu yaraan.', 'sv': 'De senaste framstegen inom RST diskurstolkning har fokuserat på två modelleringsparadigmer: (a) högordertolkare som gemensamt förutsäger diskursens trädstruktur och de relationer den kodar; eller b) linjära tidstolkare som är effektiva men mest baserade på lokala funktioner. I detta arbete föreslår vi en linjär-tidsparser med ett nytt sätt att representera diskursbeståndsdelar baserat på neurala nätverk som tar hänsyn till global kontextuell information och kan fånga fjärrberoenden. Experimentella resultat visar att vår parser uppnår toppmodern prestanda på benchmarkdatauppsättningar, samtidigt som den är effektiv (med tidskomplexitet linjär i antalet meningar i dokumentet) och kräver minimal funktionsteknik.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie postępy w analizowaniu dyskursu RST skupiają się na dwóch paradygmatach modelowania: (a) parserach wysokiego rzędu, które wspólnie przewidują strukturę drzewa dyskursu i relacje, które koduje; lub b) analizatory czasu liniowego, które są wydajne, ale głównie oparte na lokalnych cechach. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy parser czasu liniowego o nowatorskim sposobie reprezentowania składników dyskursu opartym na sieciach neuronowych, który uwzględnia globalne informacje kontekstowe i jest w stanie uchwycić zależności na odległość. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz parser uzyskuje najnowocześniejszą wydajność w odniesieniu do zbiorów danych referencyjnych, jednocześnie jest wydajny (ze złożonością czasu liniową w liczbie zdań w dokumencie) i wymagający minimalnej inżynierii funkcji.', 'si': 'RST කතාව පරීක්ෂණයේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ මොඩලින් පැරැඩිග්ම් දෙකක් ගැන ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ: a) උ නැත්තම් (b) ලේනියාර් කාලය පරීක්ෂකයෝ වගේම ස්ථානික විශේෂකයෝ පරීක්ෂකයි. මේ වැඩේ අපි ලේනියාර් කාලයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයුරාල් ජාතික ජාතික තොරතුරු ගැන ගණන් කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිදේශය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂකය බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ state-of-the art Perfection ගත්තා කියලා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්', 'ta': 'RST பேச்சில் சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றம் இரண்டு மாதிரியான அளபுருக்களின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது: (a) உயர்ந்த வரிசைப்படுத்தும் பேச்சி or (b) linear-time parsers which are efficient but mostly based on local features.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு வரிசை- நேரம் பரிசோதிக்கையை புதிய வழியில் பேச்சு நிரல் வலைப்பின்னல்களை குறிப்பிட வேண்டும். அது உலகத்தில் உள்ள நிலையான தகவல பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தின் நிலையில் கலை செயல்பாட்டின் நிலையை பெறுகிறது, செயல்படுத்தும் போது (ஆவணத்தின்', 'ur': 'RST صحبت میں اچھی پیشرفت دو موڈلینگ پارادینگوں پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے: a) بلند سطح پاراس کرنے والے جو باتوں کے درخت کی ساختاری اور رابطہ کے متعلق اس کے قائم ہوتے ہیں۔ یا (b) linear-time parsers جو فائدہ اٹھانے والے ہیں لیکن اکثریت سے محلی فائدہ پر بنیاد ہیں. اس کام میں ہم ایک لائن ٹیمٹ پارٹر کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جو نئورل نیٹ ورک پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے، ایک نو طریقہ کے ساتھ صحبت کی تصویر کرتی ہے، جو گلوبی کنٹکسٹ معلومات کا حساب لیتا ہے اور دور دور کی تعلقات کو پکڑ سکتا ہے. Experimental results show that our parser obtains state-of-the-art performance on benchmark datasets, while efficient (with time complexity linear in the number of sentences in the document) and requiring minimal feature engineering.', 'uz': "Recent advances in RST discourse parsing have focused on two modeling paradigms: (a) high order parsers which jointly predict the tree structure of the discourse and the relations it encodes;  yoki liner- vaqt parserlari juda foydali, ammo lokal xususiyatlar asosida. Bu vazida, biz neyrol tarmoqlari asosida gapiruvchi tarmoqni tahrirlash va dunyo tarmoqni hisoblash va uzun masofadan ishlatish mumkin. Tekshirish natijalari aytadi, balbalar maʼlumot bazasining holatini o'zgartiradi, va dokumatning soʻzlarining soni bilan murakkab boʻlganda, va minimal imkoniyatlar muhandiya kerak.", 'vi': 'Những tiến bộ gần đây trong bài phân tích RST đã tập trung vào hai mô hình mô hình: a) các nhà phân tích hạng cao dự đoán cấu trúc cây của cuộc đối thoại và các mối quan hệ nó mã hóa; hoặc B) phân tích thời gian tuyến, hiệu quả nhưng chủ yếu dựa trên tính năng địa phương. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một nhà phân tích thời gian tuyến tính với một cách mới để đại diện các cử tri của các biểu tượng dựa trên mạng thần kinh, nắm giữ các thông tin ngữ chung trên to àn cầu và nắm bắt các quan hệ phụ thuộc xa xôi. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy rằng cha phân tích đạt được hiệu quả mỹ thuật trên các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, trong khi hiệu quả (với tính phức tạp thời gian trong số các câu trong tài liệu) và yêu cầu thiết kế đặc trưng tối thiểu.', 'bg': 'Последните постижения в анализа на дискурса са фокусирани върху две моделни парадигми: (а) анализатори от висок ред, които заедно предсказват дървесната структура на дискурса и връзките, които той кодира; или б) линейно-времеви анализатори, които са ефективни, но най-вече базирани на локални характеристики. В тази работа предлагаме линейно-времеви анализатор с нов начин за представяне на дискурсните компоненти въз основа на невронни мрежи, който отчита глобалната контекстуална информация и е в състояние да улавя зависимости от дълги разстояния. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият анализатор получава най-съвременно представяне на сравнителни набори от данни, като същевременно е ефективен (с линейна времева сложност в броя на изреченията в документа) и изисква минимално инженерство на функциите.', 'hr': 'Nedavno napredak razmatranja RST diskursa usredotočili su se na dvije paradigme modeliranja: a) visoki razmatrači reda koji zajedno predviđaju strukturu drveta diskursa i odnose koje kodira; ili b) linearni vremenski parseri koji su učinkoviti ali uglavnom zasnovani na lokalnim karakteristikama. U ovom poslu predlažemo linearnog vremenskog analizatora s novim načinom predstavljanja sastavnika diskusija na temelju neuralnih mreža koja uzima u obzir globalne kontekstualne informacije i može uhvatiti daleku zavisnost. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš analizator dobija postupak umjetnosti na bazama podataka, dok je učinkovit (s vremenskom kompleksnošću linearnim brojem rečenica u dokumentu) i zahtijeva minimalno in ženjerstvo.', 'nl': "Recente vooruitgang in RST discours parsing heeft zich gericht op twee modelparadigma's: (a) high order parsers die gezamenlijk de boomstructuur van het discours voorspellen en de relaties die het codeert; of b) lineaire-time parsers die efficiënt zijn maar meestal gebaseerd zijn op lokale kenmerken. In dit werk stellen we een lineaire-time parser voor met een nieuwe manier om discourscomponenten op basis van neurale netwerken weer te geven die rekening houdt met wereldwijde contextuele informatie en in staat is om langeafstandsafhankelijkheden vast te leggen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze parser state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt op benchmark datasets, terwijl hij efficiënt is (met tijdcomplexiteit lineair in het aantal zinnen in het document) en minimale feature engineering vereist.", 'da': 'De seneste fremskridt i RST diskursanalyse har fokuseret på to modelleringsparagmer: (a) høj ordens fortolkere, der i fællesskab forudsiger diskursens træstruktur og de relationer, den koder; eller b) lineær tidsfortolkere, som er effektive, men mest baseret på lokale funktioner. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en lineær-tidsfortolker med en ny måde at repræsentere diskursbestanddele baseret på neurale netværk, der tager højde for global kontekstuel information og er i stand til at fange langdistanceafhængigheder. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores parser opnår topmoderne ydeevne på benchmark datasæt, samtidig med at den er effektiv (med tidskompleksitet lineær i antallet af sætninger i dokumentet) og kræver minimal feature engineering.', 'de': 'Neuere Fortschritte im RST-Diskursparsing haben sich auf zwei Modellierungsparadigmen konzentriert: (a) Parser hoher Ordnung, die gemeinsam die Baumstruktur des Diskurses und die damit kodierten Beziehungen vorhersagen; oder (b) lineare Zeit Parser, die effizient sind, aber hauptsächlich auf lokalen Merkmalen basieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen Linear-Time Parser vor, der auf neuronalen Netzen basierende Diskursbestandteile auf neuartige Weise darstellt, der globale Kontextinformationen berücksichtigt und in der Lage ist, Abhängigkeiten über lange Distanzen zu erfassen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Parser State-of-the-Art Performance auf Benchmark-Datensätzen erzielt, gleichzeitig effizient ist (mit Zeitkomplexität linear in der Anzahl der Sätze im Dokument) und minimales Feature Engineering erfordert.', 'ko': 'RST 문장 분석의 최신 진전은 두 가지 모델링 모델에 집중된다. (a) 문장 트리 구조와 인코딩 관계를 연합하여 예측하는 고급 해석기;또는 (b)선형 시간 분석기는 효율이 높지만 주로 국부적 특징을 바탕으로 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 선형 시간 해석기를 제기했는데 전체적인 상하문 정보를 고려하여 장거리의 의존 관계를 포착할 수 있다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 해석기는 기준 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었고 효율이 높았으며 (시간 복잡도와 문서의 문장수와 선형 관계가 있음) 가장 적은 특징 공정이 필요하다고 한다.', 'id': 'Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam penghuraian pidato RST telah fokus pada dua paradigma model: (a) penghuraian tertinggi yang bersama-sama memprediksi struktur pohon pidato dan hubungan yang dikodeksi; atau (b) parser waktu linear yang efisien tetapi kebanyakan berdasarkan ciri-ciri lokal. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan parser waktu linear dengan cara baru untuk mewakili kostituen diskors berdasarkan jaringan saraf yang mempertimbangkan informasi kontekstual global dan mampu menangkap dependensi jarak jauh. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa parser kami mendapatkan prestasi terbaik pada set data benchmark, sementara menjadi efisien (dengan kompleksitas waktu linear dalam jumlah kalimat dalam dokumen) dan memerlukan teknik fitur minimal.', 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika mazungumzo ya RST yamekuwa yakijazama vifaa viwili vya mifano: a) mabunge yenye amri ya juu ambayo kwa pamoja inatabiri muundo wa mti wa mazungumzo hayo na mahusiano yanayozidi; au wabunge wa muda wa msingi ambao wana ufanisi lakini wengi wao wanategemea vipengele vya ndani. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mchambuzi wa muda wa msingi na njia ya kitabu ya kuwakilisha wapiga mazungumzo kwa kutumia mitandao ya neura ambayo inachukua taarifa za kimataifa za kisasa na inaweza kukuta kutegemea mbali. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mchambuzi wetu anapata hali ya sanaa kwenye seti za taarifa za bendera, wakati akiwa na ufanisi (kwa muda mgumu katika idadi ya hukumu katika nyaraka) na kuhitaji ubunifu wa kidogo.', 'fa': 'پیشرفت های اخیر در پارش گفتگوهای RST روی دو پارادیگ مدل تمرکز کردند: a) پارشارهای سطح بالا که با همدیگر ساختار درخت سخنرانی را پیش بینی می کنند و رابطه\u200cهایی که آن قانون می\u200cدهد را پیش بینی می\u200cکنند. یا (b) بازرسان زمان خطی که موثر هستند ولی بیشتر بر ویژه های محلی بنیاد دارند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک بازیگر زمان خطی با یک روش نویسی برای نمایش نمایندگان صحبت بر روی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی که اطلاعات موضوع جهانی را به حساب می\u200cگیرد و می\u200cتواند بستگی\u200cهای طولانی را بگیرد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که کاربرد هنری در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی می\u200cگیرد، در حالی که کاربرد می\u200cباشد (با تعداد جمله\u200cها در سند) و نیاز به مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای نقاشی است.', 'tr': 'RST diskusiýasynda öňki öňki gelişmeler iki modelleşdirýän paradigma üçin üns berildi: a) ýokary düzlemçiler diskusiýanyň agaç struktuny we onuň ködleýän relasiýasyny kop öňündirýärler. (b) Saýlaw zamany tansçylar faýlly ýöne ýerli tansçylara daýanýar. Bu işde, dünýädäki kontekst maglumaty kabul eden çyzgyş taýýarlaryny täze bir roman şeklinde çyzgyş wagtlary çykarmak üçin teklip edip, uzak dur baglançlygy çekebilir. Experimental netijelerimiz çözümleriň benchmark veri setirlerinde ýagtylyk taýýarlançylygyny kabul edip, oňa etkinlik bolup (senediň sözleriň sanynda wagt kompleksitet çyzgylygy bilen) we minimal hasaplanyň enjiniýetini isleýändigini görkezýär.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የRST ንግግር ማነጋገር ግንኙነት በሁለቱ ምሳሌዎች ላይ ተማክሮአል:(a) የንግግሩን ዛፍ ሥርዓት እና የኮድ ግንኙነትን በመቀበል የሚጠይቁ ከፍተኛ ተዘጋጅት ፓርራርማሮች ነው፡፡ ወይም (b) የመስመር ሰዓት ፍላጎች ግን አብዛኛውን በተገኘ ባሕላዊ ምርጫዎች ላይ የሚቀመጡ ፓርራሮች፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የረጅም ተሟጋቾችን ለመያሰብ የሚችሉትን የናውሬል መረብ በመሠረት የንግግር መረጃዎችን በመቀበል የመረጃ መንገድ እናስቸጋጅላለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች፣ ተማሪዎቻችን የየአርድ ድረ-አርእስት አካባቢ ዳታዎችን እንዲያገኙ እና በጥያቄ (ሰነዱ ውስጥ የጊዜው ሙግት ግንኙነት በመቆጣጠር) እና የተናነሰ የፍትሕት እስኪንጂንግር እንዲያስፈልጋቸው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին առաջընթացները ՌՍԹ խոսքի վերլուծության մեջ կենտրոնացել են երկու մոդելների վրա. a) բարձր կարգչային վերլուծումների վրա, որոնք միասին կանխատեսում են խոսքի ծառի կառուցվածքը և այն կոդավորվող հարաբերությունները: or (b) linear-time parsers which are efficient but mostly based on local features.  Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք գծային ժամանակային խմբագրիչ, որը նոր ձևով ներկայացնում է խոսակցության բաղադրիչները, հիմնված նյարդային ցանցերի վրա, որոնք հաշվի առնում են գլոբալ կոնտեքստոլային ինֆորմացիան և կարող են վերցնել երկար հեռա Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր խմբագրիչը ստանում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, մինչդեռ այն արդյունավետ է (ժամանակի բարդությունը գծային է փաստաթղթի նախադասությունների քանակի մեջ) և պահանջում է միմինալ հատկու', 'af': "Onlangse vorderings in RST diskursie verwerking het gefokus op twee modeling paradigme: (a) hoë volgorde verwerkers wat jointly voorskou die boom struktuur van die diskursie en die relasies wat dit kodeer; en of (b) lineêre tyd verwerkers wat effektief is, maar meeste gebaseer op plaaslike funksies. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n lineêre tyd-ontwerker met 'n nuwe manier om diskursiefasiliteite te verteenwoordig wat op neurale netwerke gebaseer word wat in rekening neem globale contextual inligting en is in staat om langafstand afhanklikhede te vang. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons ontwerker staat-van-die kuns-prestasie op benchmarkdatastelle verkry, terwyl dit effektief is (met tyd kompleksiteit linear in die aantal setinge in die dokument) en wat minimale funksie in ženiering vereis.", 'sq': 'Përparimet e fundit në analizimin e diskurseve RST janë përqëndruar në dy paradigma modelimi: (a) analizuesit me rend të lartë që parashikojnë së bashku strukturën e pemës së diskursit dhe marrëdhëniet që kodon; ose (b) analizuesit linear-time që janë të efektshëm por kryesisht të bazuar në karakteristikat lokale. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një analizues linear-kohë me një mënyrë të re për përfaqësimin e përbërësve të diskursit bazuar në rrjetet nervore që merr parasysh informacionin kontekstual global dhe është në gjendje të kapë varësitë e distancave të gjata. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se analizuesi ynë merr shfaqjen më të avancuar në bazat e të dhënave, ndërsa është i efektshëm (me kompleksitet kohor linear në numrin e fjalëve në dokument) dhe kërkon inxhinieri minimal të funksioneve.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক আরস্টি কথোপকথন পার্সিং এর উন্নয়ন দুটি মডেলিং প্যারাডিমের দিকে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে: (a) উচ্চ আদেশ পার্সার যারা একত্রিত ভাবে কথোপকথন অথবা (b) লাইনিয়ার-সময় পার্সার যারা কার্যকর কিন্তু বেশীরভাগ স্থানীয় বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর ভিত্তিক। এই কাজে আমরা একটি লাইনার-টাইম প্যালেজার প্রস্তাব করি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাবে কথোপকথন প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার একটি উপযোগী উপায় যা বিশ্বের ব পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্যালেজার বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি পাওয়া যাচ্ছে, যখন তারা কার্যকর থাকে (নথির সংখ্যায় সময়ের সময় জটি', 'az': 'RST söhbətlərində son dəyişiklik analizi iki modellik paradigmi üzərində odaqlandı: a) yüksək sıralar analizi, söhbətlərin a ğacı quruluşunu və kodladığı bağlantıları birlikdə tədbir edirlər. və ya (b) müvəffəqiyyətli, lakin çox yerli mövcuddur. Bu işdə, dünya müxtəlif məlumatlarını hesablayan və uzaq uzaq bağlılıqlarını almaq üçün müəyyən edilən nürol a ğlarına dayanan diskurs komponentlərini yeni bir yolla təklif edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçlarımız belə göstərir ki, analizacımız benchmark verilənlər qurularında sanat performansını alır, həmçin in faydalı olaraq (belədəki cümlələr sayısında vaxt kompleksitəsi linear olaraq) və minimal fərqli in ženjeri ehtiyacını istəyir.', 'bs': 'Nedavno napredak razmatranja RST diskursa usredotočili su se na dvije paradigme modeliranja: a) visoki parseri koji zajedno predviđaju strukturu drveta diskursa i odnose koje kodira; ili b) linearni vremenski parseri koji su efikasni ali uglavnom zasnovani na lokalnim karakteristikama. U ovom poslu predlažemo linearnog vremenskog analizatora sa novim načinom predstavljanja sastavnika diskusija baziranih na neuralnim mrežama koja uzima u obzir globalne kontekstualne informacije i može uhvatiti daleku zavisnost. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš analizator dobija stanje umjetnosti na bazama podataka, dok je učinkovit (s vremenskom kompleksnošću linearnim brojem rečenica u dokumentu) i zahtijeva minimalnu in ženjerstvu.', 'ca': "Els avanços recents en l'analització del discurs RST s'han centrat en dos paradigmes de modelació: a) analitzadors d'alta ordre que predien conjuntament l'estructura arbre del discurs i les relacions que codifica; o b) analitzadors de temps linear que són eficients però principalment basats en característiques locals. En aquesta feina, proposem un analitzador de temps linear amb una nova manera de representar els components del discurs basats en xarxes neurals que tenen en compte la informació contextual mundial i són capaços de capturar dependencies a llargues distàncies. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre analitzador obté un rendiment més avançat en els conjunts de dades de referència, mentre que és eficient (amb complexitat temporal linear en el nombre de frases del document) i requereix enginyeria de característiques mínimas.", 'cs': 'Nedávné pokroky v analýze diskurzu RST se zaměřily na dva modelovací paradigmata: (a) parsery vysokého řádu, které společně předpovídají strukturu stromu diskurzu a vztahy, které kóduje; nebo b) lineárně časové parsery, které jsou efektivní, ale většinou založené na lokálních vlastnostech. V této práci navrhujeme lineární časový parser s novým způsobem reprezentace diskurzních složek založených na neuronových sítích, který bere v úvahu globální kontextové informace a je schopen zachytit dálkové závislosti. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš parser získává nejmodernější výkon na benchmarkových datových sadách, přičemž je efektivní (s časovou složitostí lineární v počtu vět v dokumentu) a vyžaduje minimální inženýrství funkcí.', 'et': 'Hiljutised arengud RST diskursuse parsimisel on keskendunud kahele modelleerimisparagmile: a) kõrge järjekorraga parserid, mis ühiselt ennustavad diskursuse puustruktuuri ja selle kodeerivaid suhteid; või b) lineaarse aja parserid, mis on tõhusad, kuid põhinevad peamiselt kohalikel omadustel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja lineaarse aja parser uudse viisiga diskursuse komponentide esindamiseks neurovõrkudel, mis võtab arvesse globaalset kontekstiteavet ja suudab jäädvustada kaugsõltuvusi. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie parser saavutab võrdlusandmekogumite tipptasemel jõudluse, olles samal ajal tõhus (ajakeerukus on lineaarne dokumendi lausete arvu osas) ja nõudes minimaalset funktsioonide projekteerimist.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset edistysaskeleet RST-diskurssin jäsentämisessä ovat keskittyneet kahteen mallinnusparadigmaan: (a) korkean järjestyksen jäsentäjiin, jotka yhdessä ennustavat diskurssin puurakennetta ja sen koodaamia suhteita; tai b) lineaariset aikaparserit, jotka ovat tehokkaita, mutta perustuvat enimmäkseen paikallisiin ominaisuuksiin. Tässä työssä ehdotamme lineaarista aikaparseria, jolla on uusi tapa esittää diskurssin osatekijöitä neuroverkkoihin perustuen, joka ottaa huomioon globaalin kontekstuaalisen tiedon ja pystyy vangitsemaan pitkän matkan riippuvuuksia. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että jäsentäjämme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn vertailuaineistoissa, mutta se on tehokas (aikamonimutkaisuus lineaarinen asiakirjan lauseiden lukumäärässä) ja vaatii minimaalista ominaisuuksien suunnittelua.', 'jv': 'Advancis (b) linear-time Nang gunggo iki, kita supoyata sistem linear-tan karo perusahaan Rong kuwi bagian nggawe nguasai komputasi layanan liyane kuwi tindakan Neral netahan sing isin uli mulasai informasi kontextual karo iso nggawe nguasai langkung sampek bantuan. R', 'he': 'התקדמות האחרונות בהעברת דיבורים RST התמקדו בשני פרדיגמים דוגמנים: (a) חוקרי סדר גבוה שמחזיקים ביחד את מבנה העץ של דיבורים והיחסים שהוא קוד; or (b) linear-time parsers which are efficient but mostly based on local features.  בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מעבד זמן לינרי עם דרך חדשה לייצג קובעים דיבורים מבוססים על רשתות עצביות שמשקלים מידע קונטקסטי גלובלי ויכול לתפוס תלויות במרחק ארוך. תוצאות ניסויים מראות כי המחקר שלנו מקבל ביצועים מוקדמים במערכת נתונים של רמזים, בזמן שהיא יעילה (עם מורכבות הזמן לינרית במספר המשפטים במסמך) ולדרוש הנדסה מינימלית של תכונות.', 'ha': "Bayani da aka yanzu a cikin mazaɓa na RSS sun fokus a kan paradigm biyu masu motsi:(a) parparser masu sarrafa da tarakin sarrafa wanda ke yi bayani da musamman it ãciyar da mazaɓa masu kodi da shi; ko parsari mai lokaci da ke da inganci, masu da inganci kuma mafiya yawa a kan fancy masu lokacin. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani fassarar-da-lokaci na ƙari da wani hani na yanzu ya iya gaya masu cikin magana a kan zane-zanen neural da za'a lissafa da akan labarai na cikin duniya da kuma yana iya iya kãma masu da inganci masu tsawo. Matarin jarrabãwa na nuna cewa Paramer yana sami halin-sanar kan tsarin bangon-bangon, da kuma yana da mai amfani da (da lissafar lokaci mai lissafa cikin kwanan kwanan sonar cikin takarda) kuma yana tambaya muhalli masu ƙaranci na ƙayyade.", 'sk': 'Nedavni napredek pri razčlenjevanju diskurza RST se je osredotočil na dve modelirani paradigmi: (a) razčlenjevalniki visokega reda, ki skupaj napovedujejo drevesno strukturo diskurza in odnose, ki jih kodira; ali (b) linearni časovni razčlenjevalniki, ki so učinkoviti, vendar večinoma temeljijo na lokalnih značilnostih. V tem delu predlagamo linearni časovni razčlenjevalnik z novim načinom predstavljanja diskurznih komponent, ki temelji na nevronskih omrežjih, ki upošteva globalne kontekstualne informacije in je sposoben zajeti odvisnosti na dolge razdalje. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš razčlenjevalnik dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti na referenčnih naborih podatkov, hkrati pa je učinkovit (s časovno zapletenostjo linearno v številu stavkov v dokumentu) in zahteva minimalno inženiring funkcij.', 'bo': 'RST མ་འོངས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་མཐོ་རིམ་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱུང་། ཡང་ན་(b)འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་མིན་འདུག In this work, we propose a linear-time parser with a novel way of representing discourse constituents based on neural networks which takes into account global contextual information and is able to capture long-distance dependencies. Experimental results show that our parser obtains state-of-the art performance on benchmark datasets, while being efficient (with time complexity linear in the number of sentences in the document) and requiring minimal feature engineering.'}
{'en': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'ar': 'شبكات عصبية متعددة المهام قائمة على الانتباه من أجل تمثيل وتحديد علاقة الخطاب الضمني', 'fr': "Réseaux de neurones multitâches basés sur l'attention pour la représentation et l'identification implicites des relations de discours", 'es': 'Redes neuronales multitarea basadas en la atención para la representación e identificación de relaciones discursales implícitas', 'pt': 'Redes neurais baseadas em atenção multitarefa para representação e identificação de relações discursivas implícitas', 'ja': '暗黙の話題関係の表現と識別のためのマルチタスクの注意に基づくニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': '向隐式言语,示识多任务神经网络', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध प्रतिनिधित्व और पहचान के लिए बहु-कार्य ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Многозадачные нейронные сети на основе внимания для неявного представления и идентификации отношений дискурса', 'ga': 'Líonraí Néaracha Iltasc Aire-Bhunaithe le haghaidh Léiriú agus Sainaithint an Chaidrimh Impleachta', 'el': 'Νευρικά Δίκτυα με βάση την προσοχή για την έμμεση αναπαράσταση και τον προσδιορισμό της σχέσης συζήτησης', 'ka': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'hu': 'Többfeladatos figyelem-alapú neurorális hálózatok az Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification érdekében', 'it': "Reti neurali multi-task basate sull'attenzione per la rappresentazione e l'identificazione delle relazioni di discorso implicite", 'kk': 'Көп тапсырмалар негіздеген нейрондық желіComment', 'mk': 'Неурални мрежи базирани на внимание на повеќе задачи за имплицитна дискурсна врска претставување и идентификација', 'lt': 'Daugiaužduočių dėmesiu grindžiami nerviniai tinklai implicitiniam diskurso ryšiui atstovauti ir identifikuoti', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Netwerks Newrali bbażati fuq ħafna kompiti għall-Attenzjoni għar-Rappreżentanza u l-Identifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni ta’ Diskussjoni Impliċita', 'mn': 'Олон-үйл ажиллагааны санааны сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний ажиллагаа', 'no': 'Multioppgåve Attention-basert neiralnettverk for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'pl': 'Wielozadaniowe sieci neuronowe oparte na uwadze dla dorozumianej reprezentacji i identyfikacji relacji dyskusyjnych', 'ro': 'Rețele neurale bazate pe atenție multiple pentru reprezentarea și identificarea relațiilor de discurs implicit', 'sr': 'Većina zadataka osnovana na pažnji neuronske mreže za predstavljanje i identifikaciju implicitnih diskurskih odnosa', 'si': 'ගොඩක් වැඩක් අවධානය සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණ ජාලය', 'so': 'Shabakada Neural Network ee loogu talagalay Implicit Discrimination Representation and Identification', 'sv': 'Uppmärksamhet-baserade neurala nätverk för implicit diskursrelation representation och identifiering', 'ta': 'செயல்படுத்தும் விஷயத்தின் தொடர்பு பாதிப்பு மற்றும் அடையாளத்திற்கான பல செயல் கவனம் அடிப்படையிலான நெயுரல் வலைப்ப', 'ur': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mạng thần kinh chú ý theo nhiều nhiệm vụ cho sự sụp đổ và nhận diện mối quan hệ', 'bg': 'Многозадачи Базирани на вниманието неврални мрежи за имплицитно дискурсно представяне и идентификация на взаимоотношенията', 'nl': 'Multi-task Aandacht-gebaseerde Neurale Netwerken voor Implicite Discourse Relatie Representatie en Identificatie', 'hr': 'Većina zadataka na temelju pažnje na neuronskim mrežama za predstavljanje i identifikaciju veza s Implicitnim diskusijama', 'da': 'Multi-task opmærksomhedsbaserede neurale netværk til implicit diskursrelationer repræsentation og identifikation', 'id': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'de': 'Aufmerksamkeitsbasierte neuronale Netzwerke zur impliziten Repräsentation und Identifikation von Diskursbeziehungen', 'ko': '다중 임무 주의를 바탕으로 하는 내은어편 관계 표징과 식별 신경 네트워크', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی بسیار زیادی روی توجه برای نمایش و شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای مشکل', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa kijamii anayeishi kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya Kutambuliwa na Kutambuliwa', 'tr': 'Çoklu-görev Attention-tabanlı Näral Ağları Implicit Gezgi İlişkiler Temsilcisi we Kimlik', 'af': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Netwerke vir Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'sq': 'Rrjetet neuronale të bazuara në vëmendje me shumë detyra për përfaqësimin dhe identifikimin e marrëdhënieve të diskutimit implicit', 'am': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Network for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'az': 'Çox-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'hy': 'Ուշադրության վրա հիմնված բազմախնդիրներ ունեցող նյարդային ցանցեր', 'bn': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'bs': 'Većina zadataka osnovana na pažnji neuronske mreže za predstavljanje i identifikaciju implicitnih diskurskih odnosa', 'ca': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'cs': 'Víceúkolové neuronové sítě založené na pozornosti pro implicitní reprezentaci a identifikaci diskursních vztahů', 'et': 'Mitme ülesandega Tähelepanu-põhised neuraalsed võrgud kaudseks diskursussuhte esindamiseks ja identifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Monitehtävät Huomioon perustuvat hermoverkot implisiittisen diskurssisuhteen edustamiseen ja tunnistamiseen', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Večnaloge Pozornost temelječe nevronske mreže za implicitno predstavljanje in identifikacijo diskurznih odnosov', 'he': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification', 'jv': 'Multi-task Attribution-basa Neral Network Workspaces kanggo Bukakipun Refresan karo ID', 'bo': 'Multi-task Attention-based Neural Networks for Implicit Discourse Relationship Representation and Identification'}
{'en': 'We present a novel multi-task attention based neural network model to address implicit discourse relationship representation and identification through two types of representation learning, an attention based neural network for learning discourse relationship representation with two arguments and a multi-task framework for learning knowledge from annotated and unannotated corpora. The extensive experiments have been performed on two benchmark corpora (i.e., PDTB and CoNLL-2016 datasets). Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms the state-of-the-art systems on benchmark corpora.', 'es': 'Presentamos un novedoso modelo de red neuronal multitarea basado en la atención para abordar la representación e identificación de la relación discursiva implícita a través de dos tipos de aprendizaje de representación, una red neuronal basada en la atención para el aprendizaje de la representación de la relación discursiva con dos argumentos y una multitarea marco para el aprendizaje de conocimientos de corpus anotados y no anotados. Los extensos experimentos se han realizado en dos cuerpos de referencia (es decir, los conjuntos de datos PDTB y ConLL-2016). Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto supera a los sistemas de última generación en los corpus de referencia.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا للشبكة العصبية قائم على الانتباه متعدد المهام لمعالجة تمثيل وتحديد علاقة الخطاب الضمني من خلال نوعين من التعلم التمثيلي ، وشبكة عصبية قائمة على الانتباه لتعلم تمثيل علاقة الخطاب بحجتين وإطار عمل متعدد المهام لتعلم المعرفة من نصوص مشروحة وغير مشروحة. تم إجراء تجارب مكثفة على مجموعتين معياريتين (أي مجموعتي بيانات PDTB و CoNLL-2016). تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا المقترح يتفوق على أحدث الأنظمة في المؤسسات المعيارية.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo modelo de rede neural baseado em atenção multitarefa para abordar a representação e identificação de relacionamento de discurso implícito através de dois tipos de aprendizagem de representação, uma rede neural baseada em atenção para aprender representação de relacionamento de discurso com dois argumentos e uma estrutura multitarefa para aprender conhecimento de corpora anotados e não anotados. Os extensos experimentos foram realizados em dois corpora de referência (ou seja, conjuntos de dados PDTB e CoNLL-2016). Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo proposto supera os sistemas de última geração em corpora de referência.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un nouveau modèle de réseau neuronal multitâche basé sur l'attention pour traiter la représentation et l'identification implicites de relations de discours par deux types d'apprentissage de représentation, un réseau de neurones basé sur l'attention pour l'apprentissage de la représentation de la relation de discours avec deux arguments et un modèle multitâche cadre d'apprentissage des connaissances à partir de corpus annotés et non annotés. Les expériences approfondies ont été réalisées sur deux corpus de référence (c'est-à-dire les ensembles de données PDTB et ConLL-2016). Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle proposé surpasse les systèmes de pointe sur les corpus de référence.", 'ja': '私たちは、2種類の表現学習を通じて暗黙の話題関係の表現と識別に対処するための新規のマルチタスクアテンションベースのニューラルネットワークモデル、2つの引数で話題関係の表現を学習するためのアテンションベースのニューラルネットワーク、および注釈付きおよび注釈なしのコーラから知識を学習するためのマルチタスクフレームワークを提示する。広範な実験は、２つのベンチマーク体（すなわち、ＰＤＴＢ及びＣｏＮＬＬ － ２ ０ １ ６データセット）上で実施されている。実験結果は、当社の提案するモデルがベンチマーク法人の最先端システムを上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '立多任务意之神经网络,以二学决之隐式言语表识,一曰意神经网络,二曰言语,一曰多任务框架,二曰语料库。 博实验已于两准语料库(即PDTB、CoNLL-2016数集)上矣。 实验结果表明,所陈模形于基准语料库上优于先进之统。', 'hi': 'हम दो प्रकार के प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के माध्यम से अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध प्रतिनिधित्व और पहचान को संबोधित करने के लिए एक उपन्यास बहु-कार्य ध्यान आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं, दो तर्कों के साथ प्रवचन संबंध प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक ध्यान आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और एनोटेट और अघोषित कॉर्पोरेट से ज्ञान सीखने के लिए एक बहु-कार्य ढांचा। व्यापक प्रयोगों को दो बेंचमार्क कॉर्पोरेट (यानी, पीडीटीबी और सीओएनएलएल -2016 डेटासेट) पर किया गया है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल बेंचमार्क कॉर्पोरेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем новую многозадачную модель нейронной сети, основанную на внимании, для решения неявного представления и идентификации отношений дискурса с помощью двух типов обучения представления, нейронную сеть, основанную на внимании, для обучения представлению отношений дискурса с двумя аргументами и многозадачную структуру для обучения знаниям из аннотированных и не аннотированных корпусов. Обширные эксперименты были проведены на двух эталонных телах (т.е. наборах данных PDTB и CoNLL-2016). Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша предлагаемая модель превосходит современные системы на контрольных телах.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair samhail líonra néarúil il-tasc aird-bhunaithe úrscéal chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar léiriú caidrimh dioscúrsa intuigthe agus a aithint trí dhá chineál foghlama ionadaíochta, líonra néarchóras aird-bhunaithe le haghaidh foghlama ionadaíocht caidrimh dioscúrsa le dhá argóint agus creat il-tasc chun eolas a fhoghlaim ó. corpora anótáilte agus neamhótáilte. Rinneadh na turgnaimh fhairsing ar dhá chorparáid tagarmhairc (i.e. tacair sonraí PDTB agus CoNLL-2016). Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn ár múnla molta na córais úrscothacha ar chorparáidí tagarmhairc.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy új, többfeladatos figyelem alapú neurális hálózati modellt, amely kétféle reprezentációs tanulás segítségével foglalkozik az implicit diskurzus kapcsolatok reprezentációjával és azonosításával, egy figyelem alapú neurális hálózatot a diskurzus kapcsolatok két argumentummal történő tanulásához, valamint egy többfeladatos keretrendszert a jegyzetelt és nem jelölt corporákból történő tudás tanulásához. A kiterjedt kísérleteket két benchmark korpuszon végeztük (PDTB és CoNLL-2016 adatkészleten). Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk felülmúlja a benchmark corporák legkorszerűbb rendszereit.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου βασισμένου στην προσοχή πολλών εργασιών για την αντιμετώπιση της σιωπηρής αναπαράστασης και ταυτοποίησης της σχέσης συζήτησης μέσω δύο τύπων μάθησης αναπαράστασης, ενός νευρωνικού δικτύου βασισμένου στην προσοχή για την αναπαράσταση της σχέσης συζήτησης με δύο επιχειρήματα και ενός πλαισίου πολλαπλών εργασιών για την εκμάθηση γνώσης από σχολιασμένα και μη σημειωμένα σώματα. Τα εκτεταμένα πειράματα έχουν πραγματοποιηθεί σε δύο σώματα αναφοράς (δηλαδή, σύνολα δεδομένων PDTB και CoNLL-2016). Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα σε σώματα αναφοράς.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტი მრავალური საქაღალური მოდელს, რომელიც დავიწყებთ ინფლიციტური საქაღალური საქაღალური მოდელს, რომელიც ორი ტიპის განსწავლების გამოსახულება და ინდიდინტიფიკაციის გამოსახულება, ინფორმაციის განსწავლების ნეიროლური ქსელი,  ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტური კოპორაში (ანუ PDTB და CoNLL-2016 მონაცემები). ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაქთწრ ოპველადან მჲევლ ნვ თჱოპაგთ ჟთჟრვმარა ნა თჱკლძფვნთწ ჟთჟრვმ ნა ბვნფმაპკთრვ კჲპოჲპა', 'it': "Presentiamo un nuovo modello di rete neurale multi-task basato sull'attenzione per affrontare la rappresentazione e l'identificazione implicite della relazione del discorso attraverso due tipi di apprendimento della rappresentazione, una rete neurale basata sull'attenzione per l'apprendimento della rappresentazione delle relazioni del discorso con due argomenti e un framework multi-task per l'apprendimento della conoscenza da corpora annotati e non notati. Gli esperimenti estesi sono stati eseguiti su due corpora di riferimento (cioè PDTB e CoNLL-2016 dataset). I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello proposto supera i sistemi all'avanguardia sui corpora di riferimento.", 'kk': 'Біз романдық көп тапсырманың негіздеген невраллық желінің үлгісін көрсету және екі түрлі негіздеген оқыту үшін, екі аргумент мен білім беру үшін көп тапсырманың білімін оқыту үшін негіздеген невраллық желісін таңдаймыз. Екі банкмарк корпорада (яғни PDTB және CoNLL-2016 деректер жинақтарында) кеңейтілген тәжірибелер орындалды. Эксперименталдық нәтижелеріміздің келтірілген моделіміз банкмаркеттер корпорасының күйін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome naują daugiafunkcinio dėmesio grįsto nervinio tinklo model į, kuriuo siekiama spręsti netiesioginį diskursinių santykių atstovavimą ir identifikavimą dviejų rūšių atstovavimo mokymosi būdu, dėmesio grįstą nervinį tinklą mokymosi diskursinių santykių atstovavimui su dviem argumentais ir daugiafunkcinę mokymosi sistemą iš anotuotos ir nenotiruotos korporacijos. Išsamūs eksperimentai buvo atlikti su dviem lyginamosiomis korporais (t. y. PDTB ir CoNLL-2016 duomenų rinkiniais). Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis viršija naujausias lyginamosios korporacijos sistemas.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов модел на нервна мрежа со базирано внимание на мултизадачи за решавање на имплицитното претставување и идентификација на дискурсните односи преку два вида на претставување учење, нервна мрежа со базирано внимание за учење дискурсни односи претставување со два аргументи и мултизадачна рамка за Експериментите беа спроведени на две референтни корпора (т.е., PDTB и CoNLL-2016 податоци). Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел ги надминува најсовремените системи на референтната корпора.', 'ml': 'രണ്ടു തരം പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, സംസാര ബന്ധം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും അറിവ് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന രണ്ടു തരം പ്രധാനപ്രകാരം പഠി രണ്ടു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു (ഉദാഹരണമായ പിഡിറ്റിബിയും കോ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില', 'mn': 'Бид олон ажлын анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг хоёр төрлийн илэрхийлэл суралцах болон танихын тулд хоёр төрлийн илэрхийлэл суралцах болон хоёр аргументаар суралцах мэдлэг суралцах болон олон ажлын үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагаа илэрхийлэх, анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэли Хоёр банкмарк корпора (яг PDTB болон CoNLL-2016 өгөгдлийн сангууд) дээр шинэ туршилтууд хийгдсэн. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь салбарын корпора дээрх урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны төвшин ажилладаг.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowy wielozadaniowy model sieci neuronowej oparty na uwadze, który zajmuje się dorozumianą reprezentacją relacji dyskursu i identyfikacją poprzez dwa rodzaje uczenia się reprezentacji, sieć neuronową opartą na uwadze do uczenia się relacji dyskursu z dwoma argumentami oraz wielozadaniowy framework do uczenia się wiedzy z adnotacji i nienotacji korpusów. Obszerne eksperymenty zostały przeprowadzone na dwóch korporach referencyjnych (tj. PDTB i CoNLL-2016 zbiorach danych). Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowany model przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy na korpusach benchmarkowych.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model rangkaian saraf berasaskan perhatian berbilang-tugas yang baru untuk mengatasi perwakilan hubungan pembicaraan dan pengenalan secara implicit melalui dua jenis pembicaraan mewakili, rangkaian saraf berasaskan perhatian untuk mempelajari perwakilan hubungan pembicaraan dengan dua argumen dan rangkaian berbilang-tugas untuk mempelajari pengetahuan dari korpra yang dicatat dan tidak dicatat. Eksperimen yang luas telah dilakukan pada dua corpora benchmark (iaitu, set data PDTB dan CoNLL-2016). Keputusan eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kami yang diusulkan melampaui batas sistem-sistem terbaik pada tanda referensi corpora.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit romant fleire oppgåver oppmerksomhet basert på neiralnettverksmodell for å adressa over implisitt diskursrelasjon representasjon og identifikasjon gjennom to typar representasjonslæring, eit oppmerksomhet basert på neiralnettverk for å lære diskursrelasjon representasjon med to argumenter og eit fleire oppgåver-rammeverk for å lære kunnskap frå annoterarte og ukjente korpora. Eksperimentane er utførte på to benchmarkkorpora (t.d. PDTB og CoNLL-2016 datasett). Eksperimentale resultat viser at vår foreslått modell utfører tilstanden til kunstsystemet på benchmarkkorpora.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un nou model de rețea neurală bazat pe atenție multi-sarcină pentru a aborda reprezentarea și identificarea relațiilor discursului implicit prin două tipuri de învățare a reprezentării reprezentării, o rețea neurală bazată pe atenție pentru învățarea relațiilor discursului cu două argumente și un cadru multi-sarcină pentru învățarea cunoștințelor de la corpore adnotate și neanotate. Experimentele extinse au fost efectuate pe două corpuri de referință (și anume, PDTB și CoNLL-2016 seturi de date). Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru propus depășește sistemele de ultimă generație pe corpore de referință.', 'mt': 'We present a novel multi-task attention based neural network model to address implicit discourse relationship representation and identification through two types of representation learning, an attention based neural network for learning discourse relationship representation with two arguments and a multi-task framework for learning knowledge from annotated and unannotated corpora.  L-esperimenti estensivi twettqu fuq żewġ korpi ta’ referenza (jiġifieri, settijiet ta’ dejta PDTB u CoNLL-2016). Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-mudell propost tagħna huwa aktar avvanzat mis-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati dwar il-korpora ta’ referenza.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu multizadatkovnu pažnju baziranu na neuralnoj mreži kako bi se obratili predstavljanjem i identifikacijom implicitnih diskurskih odnosa kroz dva vrsta učenja predstavljanja, pažnju baziranu na neuralnoj mreži za učenje predstavljanja diskurskih odnosa sa dva argumenta i višezadatkovnog okvira za učenje znanja iz annotiranog i nepoznatog korporacije. Eksperimenti su provedeni na dva korporacija (tj. PDTB i CoNLL-2016 podaci). Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model iznosi državne umjetne sustave na benchmarku korpora.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලොකු වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් අධාරිත නිර්මාණ ජාලය මොඩල් විදිහට ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා අධාරිත න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කොර්පෝරා දෙකක් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත මොඩල් එක බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් කොර්පෝරා වලින', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa noocyo shabakada neurada ah oo lagu saleysan karo noocyo kala duduwan oo xiriirka kala duduwan, taas oo lagu aqoonsan karo laba nooc oo ka mid ah waxbarashada, shabakadda neurada ee barashada xiriirka hadalka oo ku saabsan labo dood iyo firaaqad faro badan oo waxbarashada aqoonta ka yimaada shirkadda a an la aqoonsan iyo aan la aqoonsan. Imtixaan dheeraad ah waxaa lagu sameeyay laba shirkad oo bangiga (tusaale ahaan PDTB iyo CoNLL-2016). Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms the state-of-the-art systems on benchmark corpora.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny multi-task uppmärksamhetsbaserad neural nätverksmodell för att adressera implicit diskursrelationsrepresentation och identifiering genom två typer av representationslärande, ett uppmärksamhetsbaserat neuralt nätverk för lärande diskursrelationsrepresentation med två argument och ett multi-task ramverk för lärande av kunskap från kommenterade och oannoterade korpora. De omfattande experimenten har utförts på två benchmark corpora (dvs PDTB och CoNLL-2016 datauppsättningar). Experimentella resultat visar att vår föreslagna modell överträffar de senaste systemen på benchmark corpora.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய பல பணியின் கவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பேச்சு இணைப்பு மாதிரி முறைமையை முகவரிப்போம் மற்றும் அறிவிக்கப்படாத நிறுவனத்திலிருந்து அறிவை கற்றுக் கொள்ள, பேச்சு தொடர்பு பிரதிநி இரண்டு பென்க்மார்க் நிறுவனத்தில் உள்ள விரிவான சோதனைகள் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது (அதாவது, PDTB மற்றும் CoNLL- 2016 தரவு அமைப்புகள்) பரிசோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی مثالی ٹاکس کی توجه کی بنیادی نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کو دکھانے اور پہچان کرنے کے لئے دو نوع طریقوں کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ، ایک توجه کی نیورل نیٹ ورک کو دکھانے کے لئے دکھانے کی نسبت دکھانے کی نسبت اور ایک متعدد ٹاکس فرم کے ذریعہ سے علم سکھانے کے لئے دکھانے کی نسبت ہے۔ دو بنچم مارک کورپورا (یعنی PDTB اور CoNLL-2016 ڈیٹ سٹ) پر بڑی آزمائش کی گئی ہے۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی موڈل بنچم مارک کورپورا کے موقعیت کی نظام کو کامل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz bir necha tashkilotni nazar tarmoqning asosida yangi tarmoq modeli hozir qilamiz, ma'lumotni tahrirlash va ikki turli taqdimot o'rganish orqali o'rganish uchun o'rganish, ikki hodisa bilan bog'liq taʼminlovchi nazar tarmoq va ko'plab vazifaning ta'limni o'rganish uchun muloqat tarmoq modeli. Ikki benchmark kompaniyasida kengaytirilgan imtiyozlar bajarildi (m. n. PDTB va CoNLL-2016 maʼlumot moslamalari). Tajriba natijalari esa, taʼminlovchi modelmiz benchmark corporiyasidagi holatning holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mạng thần kinh dựa trên nhiều nhiệm vụ mới nhằm giải quyết mối quan hệ của ngôn luận ngầm và nhận dạng qua hai dạng học về đại diện. Một mạng thần kinh dựa vào sự chú ý để học cách đại diện ngôn luận với hai đối tượng. Và một cơ sở đa nhiệm để học kiến thức từ vật thể được ghi chú và không chú ý. Các thí nghiệm lớn đã được thực hiện trên hai tập đoàn chuẩn chuẩn (tức là: PDTB và Codll-thẩm 6). Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu thử của chúng ta vượt trội hơn những hệ thống hiện đại trên tiêu chuẩn.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuw multi-task attention based neural network model om impliciete discoursrelatie representatie en identificatie aan te pakken door middel van twee soorten representatie leren, een attentie based neural network voor het leren van discoursrelatie representatie met twee argumenten en een multi-task framework voor het leren van kennis van geannoteerde en ongenoteerde corpora. De uitgebreide experimenten zijn uitgevoerd op twee benchmark corpora (PDTB en CoNLL-2016 datasets). Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model beter presteert dan de state-of-the-art systemen op benchmark corpora.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny multi-task opmærksomhedsbaseret neural netværksmodel til at adressere implicit diskursrelationsrepræsentation og identifikation gennem to typer repræsentation læring, et opmærksomhedsbaseret neural netværk til læring diskursrelationsrepræsentation med to argumenter og en multi-task framework til læring af viden fra annoterede og uannoterede korpora. De omfattende eksperimenter er blevet udført på to benchmark corpora (dvs. PDTB og CoNLL-2016 datasæt). Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores foreslåede model overgår de avancerede systemer på benchmark corpora.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов модел на невронна мрежа, базиран на многозадачи на вниманието, за да се обърне към имплицитното представяне и идентификация на дискурсните взаимоотношения чрез два вида обучение на представяне, невронна мрежа, базирана на вниманието за учене на дискурсните взаимоотношения с два аргумента и мултизадачична рамка за учене на знания от анотирани и неонотирани корпори. Обширните експерименти са проведени върху два референтни корпуса (т.е. данни от PDTB и CoNLL-2016). Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният ни модел надминава най-съвременните системи при бенчмаркови корпуси.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein neuartiges, aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes neuronales Netzwerkmodell, das implizite Repräsentation und Identifikation von Diskursbeziehungen durch zwei Arten des Repräsentationslernens adressiert, ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes neuronales Netzwerk für das Lernen von Diskursbeziehungen mit zwei Argumenten und ein Multi-Task Framework zum Lernen von Wissen aus annotierten und nicht notierten Korpora. Die umfangreichen Experimente wurden an zwei Benchmark-Korpora (PDTB und CoNLL-2016 Datensätze) durchgeführt. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell die modernsten Systeme auf Benchmark-Korpora übertrifft.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model jaringan saraf berbasis perhatian multi-tugas yang baru untuk mengatasi representation dan identifikasi implicit hubungan diskors melalui dua jenis pembelajaran representation, jaringan saraf berbasis perhatian untuk mempelajari representation hubungan diskors dengan dua argumen dan rangkaian multi-tugas untuk mempelajari pengetahuan dari korpora yang dicatat dan tidak dicatat. Eksperimen ekstensif telah dilakukan pada dua corpora benchmark (i.e., PDTB dan CoNLL-2016 dataset). Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan lebih berharga dari sistem state-of-the-art pada benchmark corpora.', 'ko': '우리는 다중 임무 주의를 바탕으로 하는 새로운 신경 네트워크 모델을 제시했다. 두 가지 유형의 표징 학습을 통해 내은어 문장 관계 표징과 식별 문제를 해결하고, 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경 네트워크는 두 가지 파라미터를 가진 문장 관계 표징을 학습하는 데 사용되며, 하나의 다중 업무 구조는 주석과 주석이 없는 어료 라이브러리에서 지식을 배우는 데 사용된다.두 개의 기준 자료 라이브러리(즉 PDTB와CoNLL-2016 데이터 집합)에서 광범위한 실험을 진행하였다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 모델은 기준 어료 라이브러리에서의 성능이 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل شبکه عصبی بر اساس توجه بسیار زیادی از دنبال مطالعه می\u200cکنیم تا از طریق دو نوع یادگیری معرفی و شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای عصبی با دو دلیل و یک چهارچوب بسیار زیادی برای یادگیری علم از شرکت ناشناخته و ناشناخته، توجه به شبکه عصبی بر اساس یادگیری رابطه\u200cهای عصبی برای یاد آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده در دو شرکت\u200cهای سنگ\u200cمارک (یعنی PDTB و CoNLL-2016) انجام شده\u200cاند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما سیستم\u200cهای هنری را در شرکت سنجیره\u200cای انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuunganisha mtindo wa mitandao ya kijamii inayohusiana na mahusiano yanayohusiana na kutambua kupitia aina mbili za uwakilishi, mtandao wa kijamii wa kujifunza uhusiano wa mazungumzo na mijadala miwili na mfumo wa kujifunza maarifa kutoka kwa makampuni yasiyotarajiwa na yasiyoeleweka. Majaribio mengi yametekelezwa kwenye kampuni mbili za bendera (yaani PDTB na CoNLL-2016). Experimental results show that our proposed model outperforms the state-of-the-art systems on benchmark corpora.', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe-täblik baglanşyk nuýral şebeke modelini iňleýän gürrüňleri temsillemek we tanyş etmek üçin iki çeşit temsil öwrenmesi bilen, diskurs baglanşyklaryny öwrenmek üçin üns berilýäris we bilim öwrenmek üçin birnäçe-täblik çerçevesini çykarýarys. Bu golaý deneyler iki benchmark korporasynda (diýp PDTB we CoNLL-2016 veri setirlerinde) edildi. Aramanyň netijeleri biziň teklip eden nusgymyzyň benchmark korporasynda sungat sistemalaryň durumyny çykaryp ýok bolandygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model të ri të rrjetit nervor të bazuar në vëmendje shumëdetyrore për të trajtuar përfaqësimin dhe identifikimin implicit të marrëdhënieve diskursore nëpërmjet dy llojeve të mësimit përfaqësimi, një rrjeti nervor të bazuar në vëmendje për të mësuar përfaqësimin e marrëdhënieve diskursore me dy argumente dhe një kuadër shumëdetyrore për të mësuar njohuri nga korpra të anotuar dhe Eksperimentet e zgjeruara janë kryer në dy grupe të dhënash (pra, PDTB dhe CoNLL-2016). Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar është më i lartë se sistemi më i avancuar në bazë të korprës.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n nuwe multi-taak aandag gebaseerde neuralnetwerk model om inplisite diskursie verhouding voorstel en identifikasie te adres deur twee tipes voorstelling leer, â\x80\x99n aandag gebaseerde neuralnetwerk vir die leer van diskurse verhouding voorstel met twee argumente en â\x80\x99n multi-taak raamwerk vir die leer van kennis van annotateerde en onbekende korpora. Die uitbreidige eksperimente is uitgevoer op twee benchmark korpora (i.e. PDTB en CoNLL-2016 datastelle). Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons voorgestelde model uitvoer die staat van die kunstenstelsels op benchmark korpora.", 'am': 'በሁለት ዓይነት የንግግር ግንኙነት መልዕክት እና ማወቅ እና ማረጋገጥን እና በሁለት ዓይነቶች የቆጣጠር ትምህርት እና የብዙዎችን የሥራ ትኩረት ማድረግ እና በሁለት አዋራጆች እና ከክሮፓርቲ እና ያልታወቀውን እውቀትን ለመማር የደብዳቤ መረብ እና በብዙ ስራ ክፍተት አካውንት ለመማር ነው፡፡ በሁለት የbenchmark ኮርፖራ (ምናልባት PDTB እና CoNLL-2016 ዳታ-settings) የተፈጸመ ተፈተና ነው፡፡ ከፈተናው ውጤቶች የሞክራችን ሞዴል በቢንምርክ ኮርፖር ላይ የሀገርን የዓላማ ሥርዓት እንዲወጣ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր, բազմախնդիրների վրա հիմնված նյարդային ցանցի մոդել, որպեսզի վերաբերվենք աննշանակական խոսակցական հարաբերությունների ներկայացմանը և հայտնաբերումը ներկայացման ուսումնասիրության երկու տեսակի միջոցով, ուշադրության վրա հիմնված նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի սովորենք խոսակցական հարաբեր Էքստենսիվ փորձարկումները կատարվել են երկու համեմատական կոպորա վրա (այսինքն PDTB և CONSL-2016 տվյալների համակարգերի վրա): Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը գերազանցում է վերջին զարգացած համակարգերը համեմատական կորպորայի վերաբերյալ:', 'az': 'Biz yeni çoxlu işlər məlumatlarına dayanan nöral şəbəkə modeli ilə imkansız söhbət məlumatlarını təsdiqləmək və təsdiqləmək üçün iki nəfər təsdiqləmək öyrənmək üçün yeni bir nöral şəbəkəsi təsdiqləyirik, iki argumenti öyrənmək üçün nöral şəbəkəsi təsdiqlənmək üçün nöral şəbəkəsi təsdiqləyirik və çoxlu işlər framework Dərgahlı eksperimentlər iki benchmark korporasında (i.e. PDTB və CoNLL-2016 veri qurularında) i şlədilər. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif etdiyimiz modellərin benchmark korporasında sanat sistemlərinin eyni olduğunu göstərir.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu multizadatačnu pažnju baziranu na modelu neuralne mreže kako bi se obratili predstavljanjem i identifikacijom implicitnih diskurskih odnosa kroz dva vrsta učenja predstavljanja, pažnju baziranu na neuralnoj mreži za učenje predstavljanja diskurskih odnosa s dvije argumentacije i višezadatačnim okvirom učenja znanja iz annotiranog i nepoznatog tijela. Eksperimenti su provedeni na dva stanovnička korpora (tj. PDTB i CoNLL-2016 podaci). Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava na korporaciji.', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধিত্বের দুটি ধরনের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা দ্বারা প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং চিহ্নিত করার জন্য আমরা একটি মাল্টি কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক উপস্থাপন করেছি, যা দুটি তর্কের দুই বেনম্যার্ক কর্পোরায় ব্যাপক পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে (যেমন পিডিটিবি এবং কনএল-২০১৬ ডাটাসেট)। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বেনম্যার্ক কোর্পোরায় রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প সিস্টেমের বেশি', 'ca': "Presentam un nou model de xarxa neural basat en atenció multitasca per abordar la representació implícita de la relació discursiva i l'identificació mitjançant dos tipus d'aprenentatge de representació, una xarxa neural basada en atenció per representar la relació discursiva amb dos arguments i un marc multitasca per aprendre coneixements de corpora anotata i no anotata. Els extensos experiments han estat fets en dos grups de dades de referència (PDTB i CoNLL-2016). Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model proposat supera els sistemes més avançats en el marc de referència corporal.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu multizadatkovnu pažnju baziranu na neuralnoj mreži model kako bi se obratili predstavljanjem i identifikacijom implicitnih diskurskih odnosa kroz dva vrsta učenja predstavljanja, pažnju baziranu na neuralnoj mreži za učenje predstavljanja diskurskih odnosa sa dva argumenta i višezadatkovnog okvira učenja znanja iz annotiranog i nepoznatog korporacije. Eksperimenti su provedeni na dva korporacija (tj. PDTB i CoNLL-2016 dataseta). Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model iznosi stanje umjetničkih sustava na korporaciji.', 'cs': 'Představujeme nový multi-úlohový model neuronové sítě založený na pozornosti, který řeší implicitní reprezentaci a identifikaci diskurzních vztahů prostřednictvím dvou typů reprezentačního učení, pozornost založená neuronová síť pro učení diskurzních vztahů se dvěma argumenty a multi-úlohový rámec pro učení se znalostí z anotovaných a nenotovaných korpusů. Rozsáhlé experimenty byly provedeny na dvou benchmarkových korpusech (PDTB a CoNLL-2016 datových sadách). Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš navržený model předčí nejmodernější systémy na benchmarkových korpusech.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudset mitme ülesandega tähelepanu põhinevat neurovõrgumudelit, mis käsitleb kaudset diskursussuhete esindamist ja identifitseerimist kahte tüüpi esindusõppe kaudu, tähelepanu põhinevat neurovõrku diskursussuhete esindamiseks kahe argumendiga ning mitme ülesandega raamistikku teadmiste õppimiseks annoteeritud ja märkimata korpustest. Laiaulatuslikud katsed on tehtud kahe võrdluskorpusega (PDTB ja CoNLL-2016 andmekogumid). Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud mudel ületab võrdluskorpuste puhul kaasaegseid süsteeme.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden monitehtävään keskittyvän neuroverkkomallin, joka käsittelee implisiittistä diskurssisuhdetta ja tunnistamista kahdentyyppisen representaatiooppimisen avulla, huomiopohjaisen neuroverkon diskurssisuhdeedustuksen oppimiseen kahdella argumentilla ja monitehtäväkehyksen tiedon oppimiseen annotoiduista ja merkitsemättömistä korpusista. Laajat kokeet on tehty kahdella vertailukorpusella (PDTB ja CoNLL-2016). Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetun mallin suorituskyky vertailukorpusissa on huippuluokkaa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk un bener multi-task atensi sing basa tanggal netwark sistem sing nganggep nggawe barang nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan kelas dhéwé Name Perintah sing paling nggambar uwong ngomong nik akeh model sing gawe nggawe barang-sistem sing ngawe barang nggawe barang dumadhi.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל רשת עצבית מובסס תשומת לב רבה משימות חדשה כדי להתייחס לייצג יחסי דיבור מילוי ומזיהוי דרך שני סוגים של לימוד מייצג, רשת עצבית מובססת תשומת לב לימוד מייצג יחסי דיבור עם שני טיעונים ומסגרת משימות רבות ללמוד ידע ממשרד מוסר ומלא מוסר. הניסויים הרחבים נעשו על שתי קבוצות מידע (פי.די.טי.בי. וקונלדל-2016). התוצאות הניסוייות מראות שהמודל המוצע שלנו עולה על מערכות המיוחדות ביותר בקופורה.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov model nevronskega omrežja, ki temelji na večopravilni pozornosti, ki obravnava implicitno reprezentacijo diskurznih odnosov in identifikacijo prek dveh vrst reprezentacijskega učenja, nevronskega omrežja, ki temelji na pozornosti za učenje diskurznih odnosov z dvema argumentoma in večopravilnega okvira za učenje znanja iz označenih in neopisovanih korpusov. Obsežni eksperimenti so bili izvedeni na dveh referenčnih korpusih (tj. PDTB in CoNLL-2016 podatkovni nizi). Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš predlagani model presega najsodobnejše sisteme na referenčnih korpusih.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani misali na-aikin multi-aikin da ke dõgara a jerin neural dõmin su yi addu'a ga masu husũma ma ma'abũcin mazaɓa da shaidar su da kuma a bayan shaidar su da irin biyu na halartarwa, wani zango na muhalli a kan karatun maganar da mazaɓa da lissafi biyu da kuma a samun firam masu amfani da ilmi daga makampuni wanda ba'a sanar da shi ba. An cika jarrabin faɗi kan bangon biyu (misali, PDTB da CoNLL-2016). Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa misalinmu da aka buƙata, yana samar da halin-na-sanar kan bangon-bangon.", 'bo': 'We present a novel multi-task attention based neural network model to address implicit discourse relationship representation and identification through two types of representation learning, an attention based neural network for learning discourse relationship representation with two arguments and a multi-task framework for learning knowledge from annotated and unannotated corpora.[citation needit] གསལ་བརྗོད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་དག་གིས་མཁའ་དབུགས་གཙང་བཟོས་བྱུང་། Experimental Results show that our proposed model outperforms the state-of-the-art systems on benchmark corpora.'}
{'en': 'Chinese Zero Pronoun Resolution with Deep Memory Network', 'es': 'Resolución china de pronombres cero con Deep Memory Network', 'ar': 'دقة الضمائر الصفرية الصينية مع شبكة الذاكرة العميقة', 'pt': 'Resolução de pronome zero chinês com rede de memória profunda', 'fr': 'Résolution du pronom zéro chinois avec Deep Memory Network', 'ja': 'ディープメモリーネットワークを使用した中国語のゼロ代名詞の解像度', 'hi': 'गहरी स्मृति नेटवर्क के साथ चीनी शून्य सर्वनाम संकल्प', 'zh': '有深记网络中文零代词解析', 'ru': 'Разрешение китайского нулевого местоимения с глубокой сетью памяти', 'ga': 'Taifeach Forainm Nialasach Sínise le Líonra Cuimhne Dhaimhneach', 'ka': 'ჩინეთიური ნუ პროცენტური რეზოციონი ძალიან მეხსიერების ქსელით', 'hu': 'Kínai nulla névmásik felbontás mély memória hálózattal', 'el': 'Κινέζικη μηδενική ανάλυση προφορών με το βαθύ δίκτυο μνήμης', 'it': 'Risoluzione del pronome zero cinese con Deep Memory Network', 'kk': 'Қытайша нөл белгілі жады желімен айырымдылығы', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Chinese Zero Pronoun Resolution with Deep Memory Network', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ മെമ്മറിയുടെ ശൃംഖലയോടൊപ്പം ചൈനീസ് പ്രോനോണ്\u200d വിശദീകരണം', 'mt': 'Chinese Zero Pronoun Resolution with Deep Memory Network', 'mn': 'Хятад Нөлөө нэр тодорхойлсон шийдвэрлэл', 'no': 'Kinesisk nulløsningsoppløysing med dørmt minnetverk', 'pl': 'Chińska zerowa rozdzielczość zamówień z siecią głębokiej pamięci', 'ro': 'Rezoluția pronumelor zero chinezești cu rețeaua de memorie profundă', 'sr': 'Kineska nula proizvodnja rezolucija sa dubokom mrežom pamćenja', 'lt': 'Name', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මතක ජාලය සමග චීනි සීරෝ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශේෂණය', 'so': 'Xiino Zero Pronoun Resolution with Deg Memory Network', 'sv': 'Kinesiska noll pronomen upplösning med djupt minne nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سیپ میموری نیٹورک کے ساتھ چینی صفر پرون روشنی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trạng thái Không danh từ Trung Quốc với mạng nhớ sâu', 'bg': 'Китайски нулева резолюция на местоименията с дълбока памет мрежа', 'nl': 'Chinese Zero Pronoun Resolutie met Diep Geheugen Netwerk', 'da': 'Kinesisk nul pronomen opløsning med dyb hukommelse netværk', 'de': 'Chinesische Null Pronomen Auflösung mit Deep Memory Network', 'id': 'Resolusi Pronoun Zero Cina dengan Jaringan Memori Dalam', 'ko': '심도 있는 기억 네트워크를 바탕으로 한 중국어 제로 대명사 해소', 'hr': 'Kineska nula proizvodnja rezolucija s dubokom mrežom pamćenja', 'fa': 'راه حل صفر معروف چینی با شبکه حافظه عمیق', 'sq': 'Rezoluta Kineze zero me rrjetin e kujtesës së thellë', 'sw': 'Hudumu ya Kichina Zero yenye Mtandao wa Kumbukumbu', 'tr': 'Haýyp Hata Aýry bilen Çinçe', 'af': 'Sjinees Nuwe Pronoun Resolusie met Deep Geheue Netwerk', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի զրո նախագծի լուծումն խորը հիշողության ցանցով', 'bn': 'গভীর মেমরি নেটওয়ার্ক সহযোগে চীনা জিরো প্রোগ্রোনো রিপশন', 'bs': 'Kineska nula proizvodnja rezolucija sa dubokom mrežom pamćenja', 'am': 'ቻይንኛ', 'ca': 'Resolució xinesa del Pronom Zero amb una xarxa de memòria profunda', 'az': '칂inc톛 S톛f톛r 캻stifadl캼 칂칬z칲n칲rl칲k Deep Memory Network', 'cs': 'Čínské nulové rozlišení zájmenů s hlubokou paměťovou sítí', 'et': 'Hiina null pronoun resolutsioon süvamälu võrguga', 'fi': 'Kiinan nollapronominin resoluutio syvämuistiverkossa', 'jv': 'Chinese nulo Pronon Resolution nganggo deep', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Kitajska ničelna ločljivost zaimka z globokim pomnilniškim omrežjem', 'he': 'פיתרון אפס סיני עם רשת זיכרון עמוקה', 'bo': '嘟⑧緬嗑编紜嘟撪絺嗉嬥綉嗑侧紜嘟栢紜嘟｀紜嘟氞綉嗉嬥綘嘟囙綐嗉嬥舰嘟侧溅嗉嬥綐嘟侧絼嗉嬥絺嘟權絼嗉嬥綒嘟戉紜嘟傕綖嘟侧紜嘟︵緬嗑侧讲嘟傕紜嘟栢颈嘟亨綉嗉嬥綌'}
{'en': 'Existing approaches for Chinese zero pronoun resolution typically utilize only syntactical and lexical features while ignoring semantic information. The fundamental reason is that zero pronouns have no descriptive information, which brings difficulty in explicitly capturing their semantic similarities with antecedents. Meanwhile, representing zero pronouns is challenging since they are merely gaps that convey no actual content. In this paper, we address this issue by building a deep memory network that is capable of encoding zero pronouns into vector representations with information obtained from their contexts and potential antecedents. Consequently, our resolver takes advantage of semantic information by using these continuous distributed representations. Experiments on the OntoNotes 5.0 dataset show that the proposed memory network could substantially outperform the state-of-the-art systems in various experimental settings.', 'ar': 'تستخدم الأساليب الحالية لتحليل ضمير الصفر الصيني عادةً السمات النحوية والمعجمية فقط مع تجاهل المعلومات الدلالية. السبب الأساسي هو أن الضمائر الصفرية لا تحتوي على معلومات وصفية ، مما يجلب صعوبة في التقاط أوجه التشابه الدلالي بشكل صريح مع السوابق. وفي الوقت نفسه ، يمثل تمثيل صفر ضمائرًا تحديًا نظرًا لأنها مجرد فجوات لا تنقل أي محتوى فعلي. في هذه الورقة ، نعالج هذه المشكلة من خلال بناء شبكة ذاكرة عميقة قادرة على ترميز صفر ضمائر في تمثيلات متجهية مع المعلومات التي تم الحصول عليها من سياقاتها وسوابقها المحتملة. وبالتالي ، فإن محللنا يستفيد من المعلومات الدلالية باستخدام هذه التمثيلات الموزعة المستمرة. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعة بيانات OntoNotes 5.0 أن شبكة الذاكرة المقترحة يمكن أن تتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث الأنظمة في مختلف الإعدادات التجريبية.', 'fr': "Les approches existantes pour la résolution zéro du pronom chinois n'utilisent généralement que des caractéristiques syntaxiques et lexicales tout en ignorant les informations sémantiques. La raison fondamentale est que les pronoms zéro ne contiennent aucune information descriptive, ce qui rend difficile la capture explicite de leurs similitudes sémantiques avec les antécédents. Pendant ce temps, représenter des pronoms zéro est un défi, car ce ne sont que des lacunes qui ne transmettent aucun contenu réel. Dans cet article, nous abordons ce problème en construisant un réseau de mémoire profonde capable de coder des pronoms zéro dans des représentations vectorielles avec des informations obtenues à partir de leurs contextes et de leurs antécédents potentiels. Par conséquent, notre résolveur tire parti des informations sémantiques en utilisant ces représentations distribuées continues. Des expériences sur le jeu de données OnToNotes 5.0 montrent que le réseau de mémoire proposé pourrait largement surpasser les systèmes de pointe dans divers contextes expérimentaux.", 'es': 'Los enfoques existentes para la resolución china de pronombres cero generalmente utilizan solo características sintácticas y léxicas, ignorando la información semántica. La razón fundamental es que los pronombres cero no tienen información descriptiva, lo que dificulta la captura explícita de sus similitudes semánticas con los antecedentes. Mientras tanto, representar los pronombres cero es un desafío, ya que son simplemente brechas que no transmiten contenido real. En este artículo, abordamos este tema mediante la construcción de una red de memoria profunda que es capaz de codificar pronombres cero en representaciones vectoriales con información obtenida de sus contextos y posibles antecedentes. En consecuencia, nuestro solucionador aprovecha la información semántica mediante el uso de estas representaciones distribuidas continuas. Los experimentos en el conjunto de datos OntoNotes 5.0 muestran que la red de memoria propuesta podría superar sustancialmente a los sistemas de última generación en varios entornos experimentales.', 'pt': 'As abordagens existentes para a resolução do pronome zero chinês normalmente utilizam apenas recursos sintáticos e lexicais, ignorando informações semânticas. A razão fundamental é que os pronomes zero não possuem informação descritiva, o que traz dificuldade em capturar explicitamente suas semelhanças semânticas com os antecedentes. Enquanto isso, representar zero pronomes é um desafio, pois são apenas lacunas que não transmitem conteúdo real. Neste artigo, abordamos essa questão construindo uma rede de memória profunda capaz de codificar pronomes zero em representações vetoriais com informações obtidas de seus contextos e potenciais antecedentes. Consequentemente, nosso resolvedor aproveita as informações semânticas usando essas representações distribuídas contínuas. Experimentos no conjunto de dados OntoNotes 5.0 mostram que a rede de memória proposta pode superar substancialmente os sistemas de última geração em várias configurações experimentais.', 'ja': '中国語のゼロ代名詞解決のための既存のアプローチは、典型的には、意味情報を無視しながら、構文的および語彙的特徴のみを利用する。根本的な理由は、ゼロ代名詞には記述情報がないため、前置詞との意味的な類似性を明示的に捉えることが困難であるためです。また、代名詞ゼロを表すのは、実際の内容を伝えるギャップに過ぎないため、困難である。本稿では，コンテキストや潜在的な先行物から得られた情報をベクトル表現にゼロ代名詞を符号化することができるディープメモリネットワークを構築することにより，この問題に対処する．したがって、私たちの解決者は、これらの連続分散表現を使用することによって意味情報を利用します。OntoNotes 5.0データセットの実験では、提案されたメモリネットワークが様々な実験環境で最先端のシステムを実質的に上回る可能性があることが示されています。', 'zh': '今之中文零代词解析法常用句法词汇,而略语义信息。 本以零代词无描述性信,明得与前置词语义相似性为难也。 且示零代词有挑战性,无间也。 于本文中,构一深记网络以决之,当网络示零代词编码为向量,并从其上下文潜前身得息。 故吾解析器因而用之分布式以语义信也。 OToNotes 5.0数集之实验,内存网络在诸实验,可以大优先进之统。', 'hi': 'चीनी शून्य सर्वनाम संकल्प के लिए मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण आमतौर पर शब्दार्थ जानकारी को अनदेखा करते हुए केवल वाक्यात्मक और लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं का उपयोग करते हैं। मूल कारण यह है कि शून्य सर्वनामों में कोई वर्णनात्मक जानकारी नहीं होती है, जो पूर्ववर्तियों के साथ उनकी शब्दार्थ समानताओं को स्पष्ट रूप से कैप्चर करने में कठिनाई लाती है। इस बीच, शून्य सर्वनाम का प्रतिनिधित्व करना चुनौतीपूर्ण है क्योंकि वे केवल अंतराल हैं जो कोई वास्तविक सामग्री व्यक्त नहीं करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक गहरी मेमोरी नेटवर्क का निर्माण करके इस मुद्दे को संबोधित करते हैं जो शून्य सर्वनाम को उनके संदर्भों और संभावित पूर्ववर्तियों से प्राप्त जानकारी के साथ वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोडिंग करने में सक्षम है। नतीजतन, हमारा रिज़ॉल्वर इन निरंतर वितरित अभ्यावेदनों का उपयोग करके शब्दार्थ जानकारी का लाभ उठाता है। OntoNotes 5.0 डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मेमोरी नेटवर्क विभिन्न प्रयोगात्मक सेटिंग्स में अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बना सकता है।', 'ru': 'Существующие подходы к китайскому разрешению нулевого местоимения обычно используют только синтаксические и лексические признаки, игнорируя семантическую информацию. Фундаментальная причина заключается в том, что нулевые местоимения не имеют описательной информации, что создает трудности в явном отражении их семантического сходства с антецедентами. Между тем, представление нулевых местоимений является сложной задачей, поскольку это просто пробелы, которые не передают фактического содержания. В этой статье мы рассматриваем этот вопрос, создавая сеть глубокой памяти, которая способна кодировать нулевые местоимения в векторные представления с информацией, полученной из их контекстов и потенциальных предшественников. Следовательно, наш решатель использует семантическую информацию, используя эти непрерывные распределенные представления. Эксперименты с набором данных OntoNotes 5.0 показывают, что предлагаемая сеть памяти может существенно превосходить современные системы в различных экспериментальных условиях.', 'ga': 'Go hiondúil ní úsáideann cuir chuige reatha do réiteach forainm nialasach na Síne ach gnéithe comhréire agus foclóireachta agus neamhaird á dhéanamh ar fhaisnéis shéimeantach. Is í an bhunchúis nach bhfuil aon fhaisnéis thuairisciúil ag forainmneacha nialais, rud a chruthaíonn deacracht a gcuid cosúlachtaí shéimeantacha le réamhfhocail a ghabháil go sainráite. Idir an dá linn, tá sé dúshlánach forainmneacha nialais a léiriú mar níl iontu ach bearnaí nach gcuireann aon ábhar iarbhír in iúl. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an tsaincheist seo trí líonra cuimhne domhain a thógáil atá in ann forainmneacha nialais a ionchódú i léiriúcháin veicteora le faisnéis a fhaightear óna gcomhthéacsanna agus óna réamhinsintí féideartha. Dá bhrí sin, baineann ár réititheoir leas as faisnéis shéimeantach trí úsáid a bhaint as na huiríll dáilte leanúnacha seo. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí OntoNotes 5.0 go bhféadfadh an líonra cuimhne molta dul i bhfeidhm go mór ar na córais úrscothacha i suíomhanna turgnamhacha éagsúla.', 'ka': "ჩინეთი ნულ პრონუმენტის რეზოციონისთვის მხოლოდ სინტაქტიური და ლექსიკალური ფუნქციების გამოყენება, როდესაც სენმანტიური ინფორმაციას ინგორმაციას ი ფუნდამენტიური მიზეზი არის, რომ ნულ გამოსახულებები არ აქვს განახულებული ინფორმაცია, რომელიც განსახულებელად გამოყენებს სიმენტიური განსხვავება ანტეცენტებით. Meanwhile, representing zero pronouns is challenging since they are just gaps that don't deliver actual content. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას გადაწყენებთ, რომელიც საშუალო მეხსიერების ქსელის შესაძლებელია, რომელიც ნულ გამოსახულების კოდინტაციაში გვეკტორის გამოსახულებაში ინფორმაცი შემდეგ ჩვენი გადაწყვეტილებელი სემონტიკური ინფორმაციის გამოყენებაში გამოყენება ამ მუშაობელი გადაწყვეტილი გამოყენებების გამოყენებით. Name", 'hu': 'A kínai nulla névmások felbontásának meglévő megközelítései általában csak szintaktikai és lexikai jellemzőket használnak, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyják a szemantikai információkat. Az alapvető ok az, hogy a nulla névmásnak nincs leíró információja, ami nehezen tudja kifejezetten rögzíteni az előzményekkel való szemantikai hasonlóságukat. Eközben a nulla névmások megjelenítése kihívást jelent, mivel azok pusztán hiányosságok, amelyek nem közvetítenek tényleges tartalmat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan mély memóriahálózat építésével foglalkozunk ezzel a kérdéssel, amely képes a nulla névmásokat vektoros reprezentációkba kódolni a kontextusokból és potenciális előzményekből származó információkkal. Következésképpen a szemantikai információk előnyeit a folyamatos elosztott reprezentációk használatával használjuk fel. Az OntoNotes 5.0 adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt memóriahálózat lényegesen felülmúlhatja a korszerű rendszereket különböző kísérleti környezetekben.', 'it': "Gli approcci esistenti per la risoluzione del pronome zero cinese tipicamente utilizzano solo caratteristiche sintattiche e lessicali ignorando le informazioni semantiche. La ragione fondamentale è che i pronomi zero non hanno informazioni descrittive, il che porta difficoltà a catturare esplicitamente le loro somiglianze semantiche con gli antecedenti. Nel frattempo, rappresentare zero pronomi è difficile poiché sono semplicemente lacune che non trasmettono alcun contenuto reale. In questo articolo, affrontiamo questo problema costruendo una rete di memoria profonda in grado di codificare pronomi zero in rappresentazioni vettoriali con informazioni ottenute dai loro contesti e potenziali antecedenti. Di conseguenza, il nostro resolver sfrutta le informazioni semantiche utilizzando queste rappresentazioni distribuite continue. Esperimenti sul dataset OntoNotes 5.0 mostrano che la rete di memoria proposta potrebbe sostanzialmente superare i sistemi all'avanguardia in varie impostazioni sperimentali.", 'kk': 'Қытайша нөл мәліметтің айырмашылығының барлық арқылы тек синтактикалық және лексикалық қасиеттерді білмейді. Негізгі себебі нөл таңбаларының түсінікті мәліметі жоқ. Бұл семантикалық ұқсастықтарын антеседенттермен түсініп алу қиын болады. Осы уақытта, нөл белгілерін көрсету көмектеседі, өйткені олар тек шындық мазмұнын бермейтін бос орындар болып тұрады. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл мәселеді терең жады желі құрамыз. Бұл мәселе, олардың контексттерінен және потенциаллық антеседенттерінен алған мәліметтерді вектор түрінде кодтамыз мүмкін. Сондықтан бұл үлкен үлестірілген мәліметтерді қолдану арқылы біздің шешушіміз семантикалық мәліметті қолданады. OntoNotes 5. 0 деректер жиынындағы тәжірибелер жады желінің әртүрлі тәжірибелі параметрлерінде орындалуы мүмкін.', 'lt': 'Dabartiniai Kinijos nulinės išreikštos rezoliucijos metodai paprastai naudojami tik sintaksinėmis ir leksinėmis savybėmis ignoruojant semantinę informaciją. Pagrindinė priežastis yra ta, kad nulinis išraiškas neturi aprašomos informacijos, todėl sunku aiškiai nustatyti savo semantinius panašumus į ankstesnius. Tuo tarpu nulinio išraiško atstovavimas yra sudėtingas, nes tai tik trūkumai, dėl kurių faktinio turinio nėra. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame šį klausimą sukuriant gilią atminties tinklą, kuris gali koduoti nulinius išreiškimus vektorių atvaizdais su informacija, gauta iš jų kontekstų ir galimų precedentų. Todėl mūsų sprendimą priimantis asmuo naudojasi semantine informacija, naudodamas šias nuolat paskirstytas atstovavimas. Experiments on the OntoNotes 5.0 dataset show that the proposed memory network could substantially outperform the state-of-the-art systems in various experimental settings.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την ανάλυση των κινεζικών μηδενικών αντωνυμίων συνήθως χρησιμοποιούν μόνο συντακτικά και λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά ενώ αγνοούν σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες. Ο βασικός λόγος είναι ότι οι μηδενικές αντωνυμίες δεν έχουν περιγραφικές πληροφορίες, γεγονός που προκαλεί δυσκολία στην ρητή καταγραφή των σημασιολογικών ομοιοτήτων τους με προηγούμενες. Εν τω μεταξύ, η εκπροσώπηση μηδενικών αντωνυμίων είναι πρόκληση δεδομένου ότι είναι απλά κενά που δεν μεταφέρουν πραγματικό περιεχόμενο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτό το ζήτημα δημιουργώντας ένα δίκτυο βαθιάς μνήμης που είναι ικανό να κωδικοποιήσει μηδενικές αντωνυμίες σε διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις με πληροφορίες που λαμβάνονται από τα πλαίσια και τις πιθανές προηγουμένες τους. Κατά συνέπεια, ο επιλυτής μας εκμεταλλεύεται τις σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες χρησιμοποιώντας αυτές τις συνεχείς κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις. Τα πειράματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο δίκτυο μνήμης θα μπορούσε να ξεπεράσει σημαντικά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα σε διάφορες πειραματικές ρυθμίσεις.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ചൈനീസ് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ റിസ്റ്റലിന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dവ്വികര്\u200dക്ക് വിശദീകരണവിവരങ്ങളൊന്നുമില്ലാത്തതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d കാരണമാണ് പൂര്\u200dവ്വികര്\u200dത്താക്കളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് സമഭാ അതുകൊണ്ട്, പൂജ്യത്തെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നത് പൂജ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d വിലപിക്കുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ആഴത്തിലെ മെമ്മറിയുടെ നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, പൂ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ തീരുമാനിക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഈ വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി ഓണ്\u200dടോയുടെ 5. 0 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മെമ്മറിയുടെ ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പരീക്ഷണസജ്ജ', 'mt': 'L-approċċi eżistenti għar-riżoluzzjoni żero pronoun Ċiniża tipikament jużaw biss karatteristiċi sintetiċi u lexiċi filwaqt li jinjoraw l-informazzjoni semantika. Ir-raġuni fundamentali hija li żero pronouns m’għandhom l-ebda informazzjoni deskrittiva, li ġġib diffikultà biex jinqabdu b’mod espliċitu s-similaritajiet semantiċi tagħhom ma’ anteċedenti. Sadanittant, ir-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ żero pronouns hija ta’ sfida peress li huma sempliċement lakuni li ma jgħaddu l-ebda kontenut reali. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni billi nibnu netwerk ta’ memorja profonda li jkun kapaċi jikkodifika żero pronomi fir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi b’informazzjoni miksuba mill-kuntesti u l-anteċedenti potenzjali tagħhom. Konsegwentement, ir-riżolutur tagħna jieħu vantaġġ mill-informazzjoni semantika billi juża dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti kontinwi. L-esperimenti fuq is-sett tad-dejta OntoNotes 5.0 juru li n-netwerk tal-memorja propost jista’ jkun sostanzjalment ogħla mis-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati f’diversi ambjenti sperimentali.', 'mn': 'Хятад 0 хэлбэрийн шийдвэрлэлд орших арга барилга зөвхөн синтактик болон лексик хэлбэрүүдийг шийдвэрлэхэд зөвхөн шийдвэрлэгддэг. Үндсэн шалтгаан нь тэгш утгын тодорхойлолтой мэдээлэл байхгүй. Энэ нь тодорхойлолтой хэцүү зүйлсийг тодорхойлох хэцүү. Тэр үед тэгш утгаг илэрхийлэх нь зөвхөн үнэндээ хэзээ ч байхгүй зай юм. Энэ цаасанд бид энэ асуудлыг гүн гүнзгий санамжийн сүлжээ бүтээж, тэгш утгыг вектор илтгэл болгох боломжтой мэдээлэл болон боломжтой хэмжээсүүдээс авсан мэдээлэл бий болгож тайлбарлаж байна. Үүний дараа бидний шийдвэрлэгч эдгээр үргэлжлүүлэгдсэн үзүүлэлтийг ашиглан семантик мэдээллийг ашигладаг. OntoNotes 5.0 өгөгдлийн сан дээрх туршилтын туршилтууд санамжийн сүлжээ олон төрлийн туршилтын тухай урлагийн тогтолцооны байдлыг үнэхээр илүү ашиглаж чадна.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande tilnærmingar for kinesisk null-oppløysing brukar vanlegvis berre syntaktiske og leksiske funksjonar mens du ignorerer semantiske informasjon. Det grunnleggjande grunnen er at nulle uttrykk har ingen skildring av informasjon, som fører til vanskelighet i å henta sine semantiske likningar med antesentane. Med mellomtida er det vanskeleg å representera null-uttrykk sidan dei er berre mellomrom som fører ingen faktisk innhald. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta dette problemet ved å bygge eit dyp minnet nettverk som kan koda null uttrykk i vektorrepresentasjonar med informasjon som er henta frå kontekstane og potensielle antecedentene sine. Det er derfor vårt oppløysar bruk av semantiske informasjon ved å bruka desse kontinuerlege distribuerte representasjonane. Eksperimentar på datasettet OntoNotes 5.0 viser at den foreslåde minnettverket kunne utføra ståande kunstsystemet i ulike eksperimentelle innstillingar.', 'mk': 'Постојаните пристапи за кинеска нуларна резолуција обично користат само синтактички и лексички карактеристики и игнорираат семантични информации. Фундаменталната причина е дека нула изрази немаат опишувачки информации, што доведува до тешкотии во експлицитно прифаќање на нивните семантични сличности со претходните. Во меѓувреме, претставувањето на нула изрази е предизвикувачки бидејќи тие се само празнини кои не пренесуваат вистинска содржина. In this paper, we address this issue by building a deep memory network that is capable of encoding zero pronouns into vector representations with information obtained from their contexts and potential antecedents.  Поради тоа, нашиот решител ја искористува семантичната информација со користење на овие континуирани дистрибуирани претставувања. Експериментите на податоците на OntoNotes 5.0 покажуваат дека предложената мемориска мрежа може значително да ги надмине најсовремените системи во различни експериментални поставувања.', 'pl': 'Istniejące podejścia do rozdzielczości zaimków zerowych chińskich zazwyczaj wykorzystują tylko funkcje składniowe i leksykalne, ignorując informacje semantyczne. Podstawowym powodem jest to, że zaimki zero nie mają informacji opisowych, co przynosi trudności w wyraźnym uchwyceniu ich semantycznych podobieństw z poprzednimi. Tymczasem reprezentowanie zaimków zerowych jest wyzwaniem, ponieważ są one jedynie lukami, które nie przekazują rzeczywistej treści. W niniejszym artykule zajmujemy się tym zagadnieniem budując sieć głębokiej pamięci, która jest zdolna do kodowania zaimków zerowych do reprezentacji wektorowych z informacjami uzyskanymi z ich kontekstów i potencjalnych poprzednich. W konsekwencji nasz resolver wykorzystuje informacje semantyczne, wykorzystując te ciągłe rozproszone reprezentacje. Eksperymenty na zbiorze danych OntoNotes 5.0 pokazują, że proponowana sieć pamięci może znacznie przewyższyć najnowocześniejsze systemy w różnych warunkach eksperymentalnych.', 'ro': 'Abordările existente pentru rezoluția pronumelor zero chinezești utilizează de obicei doar caracteristici sintactice și lexicale, ignorând în același timp informațiile semantice. Motivul fundamental este că pronumele zero nu au informații descriptive, ceea ce aduce dificultăți în captarea explicită a asemănărilor lor semantice cu antecedentele. Între timp, reprezentarea pronumelor zero este o provocare deoarece acestea sunt pur și simplu goluri care nu transmit conținut real. În această lucrare, abordăm această problemă prin construirea unei rețele de memorie profundă care este capabilă să codeze pronume zero în reprezentări vectoriale cu informații obținute din contextele și potențialele antecedente ale acestora. În consecință, rezolvatorul nostru profită de informațiile semantice folosind aceste reprezentări distribuite continue. Experimentele efectuate pe setul de date OntoNotes 5.0 arată că rețeaua de memorie propusă ar putea depăși substanțial sistemele de ultimă generație în diferite setări experimentale.', 'ms': 'pendekatan yang wujud untuk resolusi pronon sifar Cina biasanya menggunakan hanya ciri sintaktik dan leksikal semasa mengabaikan maklumat semantik. Alasan asas ialah bahawa sifar pronun tidak mempunyai maklumat deskriptif, yang membawa kesulitan dalam menangkap secara eksplicit persamaan semantik mereka dengan anteceden. Sementara itu, mewakili nilai sifar adalah menantang kerana mereka hanyalah kosong yang menyampaikan tiada kandungan sebenar. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi isu ini dengan membina rangkaian memori yang dalam yang mampu mengekodkan pronun sifar ke dalam perwakilan vektor dengan maklumat yang diperoleh dari konteks dan anteceden potensi mereka. Oleh sebab itu, penyelesaian kita mengambil keuntungan dari maklumat semantik dengan menggunakan perwakilan terus menerus tersebut. Eksperimen pada set data OntoNotes 5.0 menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian memori yang diusulkan boleh melampaui batas sistem state-of-the-art dalam berbagai tetapan percubaan.', 'so': "Waxyaabaha ay ku jiraan oo ay ku jiraan go’aanka nuurka ah ee Shiinaha sida caadiga ah waxay isticmaalaan tusaale ahaan xarumaha syntactika iyo leksikal marka uu ka tago macluumaadka semantika. Sababta aasaasiga ah waa in qof aan tiro aheyn macluumaad faa'iido ah, taas oo si cad ugu dhibaataysa in la qabto tusaale u eg dareemaha. Inta waqtiga la jeedo nooca magacyadu waa dhibaato, sababtoo ah waxay tahay burbur oo kaliya, taasoo aan soo muujinayn waxyaabaha rasmiga ah. In this paper, we address this issue by building a deep memory network that is capable of encoding zero pronouns into vector representations with information obtained from their contexts and potential antecedents.  Sababtaas darteed, go'aankeenu wuxuu isticmaalaa macluumaad qaybsan oo kala duduwan. Imtixaan ku saabsan OntoNotes 5.0 dataset waxay muuqan karaan in shabakadda xusuusta la soo jeeday ay ay si badan uga muuqan karaan nidaamka-qoriga ee tijaabada kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Befintliga metoder för upplösning av kinesiska nollpronomen använder vanligtvis endast syntaktiska och lexikala funktioner samtidigt som man ignorerar semantisk information. Den grundläggande anledningen är att nollpronomen inte har någon beskrivande information, vilket gör det svårt att uttryckligen fånga deras semantiska likheter med föregångarna. Samtidigt är det svårt att representera nollpronomen eftersom de bara är luckor som inte förmedlar något verkligt innehåll. I denna uppsats behandlar vi denna fråga genom att bygga ett djupt minnesnätverk som kan koda nollpronomen till vektorrepresentationer med information som erhållits från deras kontexter och potentiella föregångare. Följaktligen utnyttjar vår resolver semantisk information genom att använda dessa kontinuerliga distribuerade representationer. Experiment på OntoNotes 5.0 datauppsättningen visar att det föreslagna minnesnätverket avsevärt kan överträffa de senaste systemen i olika experimentella miljöer.', 'sr': 'Postoje pristupi kineskoj rezoluciji nule pronouna obično koriste samo sintaktične i leksičke karakteristike dok ignorišu semantičke informacije. Osnovni razlog je da nula proglašavanja nema opisivne informacije, što dovodi teškoće u objašnjenje njihovih semantičkih sličnosti sa predsednicima. U međuvremenu, predstavljanje nule izraze je izazovno jer su samo praznine koje ne donose stvarni sadržaj. U ovom papiru rješavamo ovo pitanje izgradnjem duboke mreže pamćenja koja je sposobna za kodiranje nule izraze u predstave vektora sa informacijama koje su dobile iz njihovih konteksta i potencijalnih predsednika. Stoga, naš rezolutor koristi semantičke informacije koristeći te kontinualne raspodjeljene predstave. Eksperimenti na setu podataka OntoNotes 5.0 pokazuju da bi predložena mreža pamćenja mogla značajno izvršiti stanje umjetničkih sistema u različitim eksperimentalnim nastavama.', 'si': 'චීනිය ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සංවේශනය සහ ලෙක්සිකල් අවශ්\u200dය විතරයි ප්\u200d මූලික හේතුව තමයි ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර තොරතුරු නෑ, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තරයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ සැමැන්තික වගේ අ ඒ වගේම, ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන් ඇත්තටම සාමාන්ය නොපිළ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් මතක ජාලයක් හදන්න පුළුවන් වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන් ඉතින්, අපේ විශ්වාස කරුණාකරුවෙන් සෙමාන්ටික් තොරතුරු ගැන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මේ සාමාන්\u200dය විතරයි ව ඔන්ටෝනොට්ස් 5.0 දත්ත සෙට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහටම මතක ජාලය පුළුවන් වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුම', 'ta': 'சீனா பூஜ்ஜிய தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கு தற்போதைய நெருக்கங்கள் வழக்கமாக ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் குணங்களை மட்டும் பயன்பட அடிப்படை காரணம் பூஜ்ஜியங்களுக்கு விவரிப்பு தகவல் இல்லை, அது வெளிப்படையாக பிடிக்கும் பொழுது அவர்களுடைய பாதிப்பு ஒப்புபோன்றத்தை பெர அதில் பூஜ்ஜியத்தை குறிப்பிடுவது சவால் இருக்கிறது ஏனெனில் அவர்கள் உண்மையான உள்ளடக்கத்தை கூறுவது மட்டுமே வேறு இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சினையை நினைவு வலைப்பின்னலை உருவாக்கி வைத்திருக்கிறோம். அது பூஜ்ஜியத்தை குறியீட்டு பூஜ்ஜியமாக அதனால், எங்கள் தீர்வு தீர்வு எடுத்து இந்த தொடர்ந்து பங்கிடப்பட்ட பிரதிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி அரைத்திய தகவல் பயன்படு OntoNotes 5. 0 தரவுத்தளத்தில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட நினைவகத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல் பெரிய முறைமையாக சோதனைப்படுத்தும', 'ur': 'چین کی صفر ریزیونٹ کے لئے موجود موجود طریقے ہیں، جتنے سامنٹی معلومات کو نادانی کرتے ہیں، صرف سینٹکسیٹیک اور لکسیکلی ویژگی استعمال کرتے ہیں. بنیادی دلیل یہ ہے کہ صفر کی تعبیر کے پاس کوئی واضح معلومات نہیں ہے، جو ان کی سیمانٹی مثالیوں کو پہلے سے پکڑنے میں مشکل ہے۔ یہاں تک کہ صفر کی تعریف کرنا مشکل ہے کیونکہ وہ صرف فاصلے ہیں جو اصل موجود نہیں پہنچاتے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم اس مسئلہ کو سمجھتے ہیں ایک عمیق مہمانی نیٹ ورک بناتے ہیں جو ان کے کنٹکسٹوں اور امکانات آنٹسڈینٹوں سے حاصل ہونے والی معلومات کے ساتھ ویکتور نمایش میں صفر کا اکنوڈ کرنا قادر ہے. لہٰذا ہمارے حل کرنے والے نے ان ہمیشہ تقسیم ہوئے نمونات کے استعمال سے سیمانتی معلومات کا فائدہ اٹھایا ہے. OntoNotes 5.0 ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی مہمانی نیٹورک مختلف آزمائش سٹم میں بہت زیادہ استعمال کرسکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Asosiy sababi, hech narsa taʼrif yoʻq, bu esa ularning semantik huddi bir narsa bilan birlashtirishga qiyin beradi. O'sha paytda, hech narsa tashkilotlarini tashkilotga ega bo'ladi chunki ular faqat narsa hech qanday narsa yoʻq emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz bu muammolarni xotira tarmoqni yaratish bilan boshqaramiz. Ularning murakkablarining taxminan va muhimkoniyatlaridan olingan maʼlumotlar bilan vektor representariga kodlash mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz o'zgarishga qayta tarqatish tashkilotlari bilan semantik maʼlumotni foydalanadi. Name", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp hiện có cho giải quyết đại từ không Trung Quốc thường sử dụng chỉ các tính năng sync và từ vựng khi lờ đi các thông tin ngữ pháp. Lý do cơ bản là không có các từ không có các thông tin mô tả, mà mang lại khó khăn để rõ ràng thu được những điểm tương đồng theo ngữ pháp với trước. Tuy nhiên, đại diện từ không là thách thức vì chúng chỉ là những khoảng trống không mang lại nội dung thực sự. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách xây dựng một mạng bộ nhớ sâu rộng có khả năng cài đặt các đại từ không vào các biểu đồ vector với thông tin từ ngữ cảnh và khả năng trước mắt của họ. Do đó, người quyết định sẽ lợi dụng thông tin ngữ pháp bằng cách sử dụng các biểu tượng liên tục được chia sẻ. Các thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu OntoNotes 5.0 đã cho thấy rằng hệ thống bộ nhớ đã được đề nghị có thể vượt qua hoàn cảnh hiện đại của các hệ thống thí nghiệm khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите подходи за нулева резолюция на китайските местоимения обикновено използват само синтактични и лексикални функции, като същевременно игнорират семантичната информация. Основната причина е, че нулевите местоимения нямат описателна информация, което затруднява изричното улавяне на семантичните им прилики с предшествениците. Междувременно представянето на нулеви местоимения е предизвикателство, тъй като те са просто празнини, които не предават реално съдържание. В настоящата статия разглеждаме този проблем чрез изграждане на мрежа с дълбока памет, която е способна да кодира нулеви местоимения във векторни изображения с информация, получена от техните контексти и потенциални предшественици. Следователно нашият разрешител се възползва от семантичната информация, като използва тези непрекъснати разпределени представи. Експериментите с набора от данни показват, че предложената мрежа памет може значително да надмине най-съвременните системи в различни експериментални настройки.', 'da': 'Eksisterende tilgange til opløsning af kinesisk nul pronomen bruger typisk kun syntaktiske og leksikske funktioner, mens man ignorerer semantisk information. Den grundlæggende årsag er, at nul pronomen ikke har nogen beskrivende information, hvilket giver vanskeligheder med eksplicit at fange deres semantiske ligheder med tidligere. I mellemtiden er det udfordrende at repræsentere nul stedord, da de blot er huller, der ikke formidler noget faktisk indhold. I denne artikel behandler vi dette problem ved at opbygge et dybt hukommelsesnetværk, der er i stand til at kode nul pronomen i vektorrepræsentationer med oplysninger indhentet fra deres sammenhænge og potentielle forudgående. Derfor udnytter vores resolver semantisk information ved at bruge disse kontinuerlige distribuerede repræsentationer. Eksperimenter med OntoNotes 5.0 datasættet viser, at det foreslåede hukommelsesnetværk i væsentlig grad kan overgå de avancerede systemer i forskellige eksperimentelle indstillinger.', 'nl': 'Bestaande benaderingen voor Chinese nul voornaamwoorden resolutie gebruiken meestal alleen syntactische en lexicale kenmerken terwijl semantische informatie wordt genegeerd. De fundamentele reden is dat zero voornaamwoorden geen beschrijvende informatie hebben, wat moeilijkheden oplevert om hun semantische overeenkomsten met antecedenten expliciet vast te leggen. Ondertussen is het representeren van nul voornaamwoorden een uitdaging omdat ze slechts hiaten zijn die geen werkelijke inhoud overbrengen. In dit artikel behandelen we dit probleem door een diep geheugennetwerk te bouwen dat in staat is om nul voornaamwoorden te coderen in vectorrepresentaties met informatie verkregen uit hun contexten en potentiële antecedenten. Daarom maakt onze resolver gebruik van semantische informatie door gebruik te maken van deze continue gedistribueerde representaties. Experimenten op de OntoNotes 5.0 dataset tonen aan dat het voorgestelde geheugennetwerk de state-of-the-art systemen in verschillende experimentele omgevingen aanzienlijk kan overtreffen.', 'de': 'Bestehende Ansätze zur Auflösung von chinesischen Nullpronomen verwenden typischerweise nur syntaktische und lexikalische Merkmale, während semantische Informationen ignoriert werden. Der grundlegende Grund ist, dass Nullpronomen keine beschreibenden Informationen haben, was Schwierigkeiten bereitet, ihre semantischen Ähnlichkeiten mit Vorgängern explizit zu erfassen. Unterdessen ist die Darstellung von Nullpronomen eine Herausforderung, da sie lediglich Lücken sind, die keinen tatsächlichen Inhalt vermitteln. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir dieses Problem, indem wir ein Deep Memory Netzwerk aufbauen, das in der Lage ist, Nullpronomen in Vektorrepräsentationen mit Informationen aus ihren Kontexten und potenziellen Vorgängern zu kodieren. Folglich nutzt unser Resolver semantische Informationen, indem er diese kontinuierlich verteilten Repräsentationen verwendet. Experimente am OntoNotes 5.0 Datensatz zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Speichernetzwerk die modernsten Systeme in verschiedenen experimentellen Settings deutlich übertreffen könnte.', 'id': 'Pendekatan yang ada untuk resolusi pronon nol Cina biasanya menggunakan hanya karakteristik sintaksik dan leksik sementara mengabaikan informasi semantik. Alasan dasar adalah bahwa nol pronon tidak memiliki informasi deskriptif, yang membawa kesulitan dalam menangkap secara eksplicit persamaan semantis mereka dengan anteceden. Sementara itu, mewakili nol pronon adalah tantangan karena mereka hanyalah kosong yang menyampaikan tidak ada isi sebenarnya. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah ini dengan membangun jaringan memori dalam yang mampu mengekodikan nol pronon ke dalam representation vektor dengan informasi yang diperoleh dari konteks mereka dan potensi anteceden. Oleh karena itu, penyelesaian kita mengambil keuntungan dari informasi semantis dengan menggunakan represisi yang terus menerus tersebar. Eksperimen pada set data OntoNotes 5.0 menunjukkan bahwa jaringan memori yang diusulkan dapat secara substansial melebihi sistem state-of-the-art dalam berbagai pengaturan percobaan.', 'ko': '기존의 중국어 영대어 해소 방법은 일반적으로 문법과 어휘 특징만 이용하고 의미 정보를 소홀히 한다.근본적인 원인은 제로대사에 묘사적인 정보가 없기 때문에 선행어와 의미의 유사성을 명확하게 얻는 데 어려움을 가져왔다.또한 제로 대명사를 나타내는 것은 도전이다. 왜냐하면 그들은 실제 내용이 없는 틈을 나타낼 뿐이기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 깊이 있는 기억 네트워크를 구축함으로써 이 문제를 해결할 수 있다. 이 네트워크는 상하문과 잠재적인 원인에서 얻은 정보를 이용하여 0대명사를 벡터로 인코딩할 수 있다.따라서 우리의 해석기는 이러한 연속적인 분포식 표시를 사용하여 의미 정보를 이용한다.OntoNotes 5.0 데이터 세트에서의 실험은 다양한 실험 환경에서 제시된 저장 네트워크가 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'hr': 'Postojeći pristupi kineskoj rezoluciji nule pronoun obično koriste samo sintaktičke i leksičke karakteristike dok ignoriraju semantičke informacije. Osnovni razlog je da nula proglašavanja nemaju opisivne informacije, što dovodi teškoće u objašnjenje njihovih semantičkih sličnosti s anticedentima. U međuvremenu, predstavljanje nule izraze je izazovno jer su samo praznine koje ne donose pravog sadržaja. U ovom papiru rješavamo ovo pitanje izgradnjem duboke mreže sjećanja koja je sposobna kodiranjem nule pronoune u predstave vektora sa informacijama koje su dobile iz njihovih konteksta i potencijalnih predstavnika. Stoga, naš rješavač koristi semantičke informacije koristeći te kontinualne raspodjeljene predstave. Eksperimenti na setu podataka OntoNotes 5.0 pokazuju da bi predložena mreža pamćenja mogla znatno iznijeti stanje umjetničkih sustava u različitim eksperimentalnim nastavama.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای موجود برای حل\u200cسازی صفر چینی معمولاً تنها ویژگی\u200cهای سنتاکتیک و زبان\u200cشناسی در حالی که اطلاعات semantic را نادیده بگیرد استفاده می\u200cکند. دلیل بنیادی این است که هیچ اطلاعاتی توصیف ندارند، که مشکلی در دستگیر کردن شبیه\u200cهای semantic خود با پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. در ضمن، نمایش دادن تعریف صفر سخت است چون فقط فاصله\u200cهایی هستند که هیچ محتوای واقعی را نمی\u200cرسانند. در این کاغذ، ما این مسئله را با ساختن یک شبکه حافظه عمیقی که قادر به رمزگذاری صفر به نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور است با اطلاعات که از موقعیت\u200cهایشان و پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای پتانسیل یافته می\u200cشوند، درباره\u200cی این مسئله حل می\u200cکنیم بنابراین، حل کننده\u200cی ما از اطلاعات semantic استفاده می\u200cکند با استفاده از این نمایش\u200cهای دائمی توزیع شده. تجربه\u200cهای مجموعه داده\u200cهای OntoNotes 5.0 نشان می\u200cدهد که شبکه حافظه پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند سیستم\u200cهای هنری را در تنظیمات آزمایشی مختلف بیشتر انجام دهد.', 'tr': 'Çinçe nul pronoun çözümleri üçin bar golaýarlar semantik maglumaty ýok edip diňe syntaktik we lektik karakterlerden ullanýar. Esasy sebäbi bolmagy şol 0 aýlamaklaryň tassyklanmadyk maglumaty ýok, bu sebäbi semantik ýaly görnüşleri bilen kynlaşdyrýar. Bu arada, sıfır ifadeleri temsil etmek zordur çünkü onlar sadece içeriğini anlayan boşluklardır. Bu kağıtda, biz bu meseleyi derin bir hafıza a ğlasına çözerek çöküp soruyoruz. Bu da vektör ifadelerini vektör ifadelerinden ve olası önlemlerinden alınan bilgiler ile kodlayabilir. Şonuň üçin çözgüçimiz semantik maglumatyny daşary daşary suratlaryny ulanarak ulanýar. OntoNotlar 5.0 sany gabdalyndaky denetimler hatyň netijesi düzümlerden çykyp biljekdigini görkez.', 'af': "Bestaande toegang vir Sjinees nul pronoun oplossing tipies gebruik slegs sintaktika en leksiese funksies terwyl semantiese inligting ignoreer word. Die fundamentele rede is dat nul voorskrifte geen beskrywende inligting het nie, wat moeilikheid bring in eksplisiese hul semantiese gelykenisse met antecedentes. Tussen tyd, die verteenwoordigheid van nul voorskrifte is aanvaardig omdat hulle net spasies is wat geen werklike inhoud verkondig nie. In hierdie papier, ons adres hierdie probleem deur 'n diep geheue netwerk te bou wat moontlik is om kodering nul voordekens in vektor voorstellings in inligting ontvang van hul kontekste en potensiele antecedente te bou. Ons oplosser neem dan voordeel van semantiese inligting deur hierdie voortdurende verspreiding te gebruik. Eksperimente op die OntoNotes 5.0 datastel vertoon dat die voorgestelde geheue netwerk kan substantief die state-of-the-art stelsels in verskillende eksperimentale instellings uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Përqasjet ekzistuese për zgjidhjen kineze zero pronoun zakonisht përdorin vetëm karakteristika sintaktike dhe lexike duke injoruar informacionin semantik. Arsyeja thelbësore është se asnjë shprehje nuk ka informacion përshkrimtar, i cili sjell vështirësi në kapjen e shprehur të ngjashmërive semantike të tyre me antecedente. Ndërkohë, përfaqësimi i zero pronumeve është sfidues pasi ato janë thjesht boshllëk që nuk transmetojnë përmbajtje reale. Në këtë letër, ne e trajtojmë këtë çështje duke ndërtuar një rrjet kujtese të thellë që është në gjendje të kodojë zero pronume në përfaqësime vektorësh me informacion të marrë nga kontekstet e tyre dhe antecedente të mundshme. Si pasojë, zgjidhësi ynë përfiton nga informacioni semantik duke përdorur këto përfaqësime të përhapura të vazhdueshme. Eksperimentet në grupin e të dhënave OntoNotes 5.0 tregojnë se rrjeti i propozuar i kujtesës mund të kalonte në mënyrë të konsiderueshme sistemet më të moderne në rregullime eksperimentale të ndryshme.', 'sw': 'Matokeo yanayopo kwa ajili ya suluhisho sifuri la China kwa kawaida hutumia vipengele vya ushirikiano na vilexico wakati wakisahau taarifa za kimapenzi. Sababu ya msingi ni kwamba watu wasio na sifa hawana taarifa za kuelezea, ambazo zinaleta vigumu kwa kuonekana kwa wazi kama ilivyofanana na machafuko yao. Wakati huo huo, kuwawakilisha mashindano sifa ni changamoto kwani ni tofauti tu ambazo hazitangaza maudhui halisi. Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia suala hili kwa kutengeneza mtandao wa kumbukumbu yenye uwezo wa kuweka kumbukumbu sifa za watu katika uwakilishi wa vector na taarifa zinazopatikana kutoka katika matatizo yao na matukio yanayowezekana. Kwa hiyo, suluhisho letu linatumia taarifa za kimapenzi kwa kutumia uwakilishi huu unaoendelea kusambazwa. Majaribio kwenye seti ya takwimu ya OntoNotes 5.0 yanaonyesha kuwa Mtandao wa kumbukumbu unapendekezwa kunaweza kutengeneza mifumo ya sanaa katika mazingira mbalimbali ya majaribio.', 'hy': "Չինաստանի զրոյի արտահայտության գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները սովորաբար օգտագործում են միայն սինտակտիկ և լեքսիկական առանձնահատկություններ' անտեսելով սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվությունը: Հիմնական պատճառը նրանում է, որ զրո արտահայտությունները չունեն նկարագրական տեղեկատվություն, ինչը դժվարությամբ է հանդիսանում բացահայտորեն վերցնել իրենց սեմանտիկ նմանությունները նախկինում: Միևնույն ժամանակ, զրո արտահայտությունը մարտահրավեր է, քանի որ դրանք պարզապես բազմունքներ են, որոնք իրական պարունակություն չունեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք այս խնդիրը ստեղծելով խորը հիշողության ցանց, որը կարողանում է կոդավորել զրո արտահայտություններ վեկտորների ներկայացումների մեջ իրենց կոնտեքստից և պոտենցիալ նախկինում ստացված տեղեկատվությունով: Հետևաբար, մեր լուծողը օգտագործում է սեմանտիկ ինֆորմացիան, օգտագործելով այս շարունակական տարածված ներկայացումները: Օնտոնոտեսի 5.0 տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած հիշողության ցանցը կարող է նշանակալի չափազանց բարձր համակարգերը կատարել տարբեր փորձարկման միջոցներում:", 'am': 'የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የቻይና አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን በመጠቀም በተቃውሞ የሲንቲካዊ እና የሊክሲካዊ ምርጫዎችን ብቻ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ምክንያት፣ በዝግጅት የሚኖሩት የዝግጅት መረጃዎች የላቸውም፣ የግልፅ ተሳሳትኖቻቸውን በጥቅልቅ ማስታወቂያውን የሚያስፈልግ ጉት ነው፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም በቁጥር አካባቢዎች ማሳየት የክፍለ ውጤቶች ብቻ ሲሆኑ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ የጥልቅ የማስታወሻ መረብ በመሥራት እናስታወቃለን፤ የክፍለ ክፍልፍሎች ክፍተቶችን የዌctor መልዕክቶች ማቀናቀል የሚችሉትን እና ምናልባት አካባቢ እና የስልጣናዊ ጉዳይ የሆኑት መረጃ ማቀናቀል፡፡ ስለዚህም፣ ፍላጎታችን በተለያዩ መልዕክቶች በመጠቀም የsemantic መረጃዎችን ይጠቅማል፡፡ በOntoNotes 5.0 ዳታ setup ላይ ፈተናዎች የተዘጋጀው ማስታወሻ መረብ በተለያዩ ፈተና ጠቃሚ ስርዓቶች የሥርዓቱን ሥርዓት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Çincə sıfır pronoun çözünürlüyü üçün həmişəlik əlaqələr semantik məlumatları görmədikdə yalnız sintaktik və leksik özellikləri istifadə edir. İlk səbəbi is ə, sıfır tərzlərinin heç bir tanımlama məlumatı yoxdur. Bu, semantik məlumatlarını gözləyir. Bu arada, sıfır sözləri göstərmək çətin idi, çünki onlar sadəcə istisna olmayan məlumatlar deyil. Bu kağızda, biz bu məsələni çəkirik, sıfır ifadəsi kodlama qabiliyyətindən alınan məlumatlardan və potensial öndəliklərdən alınan məlumatlarla vektor ifadəsi olaraq çəkirik. Beləliklə, çözümlərimiz həmişəlik dağıtılmış göstərimləri istifadə edərək semantik məlumatlarından faydalanır. OntoNotes 5.0 veri qutusundakı təcrübələr təcrübə etdiyi yaddaş ağının müxtəlif təcrübə qutusundakı müxtəlif təcrübələrdə mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'চীনা শূন্য প্রকাশিত সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য বিদ্যমান প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে সেম্পেন্টিক তথ্য উপেক্ষা করার সময়। মৌলিক কারণ হলো শুধু প্রকাশীদের কোন বিস্তারিত তথ্য নেই, যা স্পষ্ট ভাবে তাদের সেমেন্টিক সমতুল্যের সাথে দেখা যাচ্ছে। এদিকে শুধুমাত্র প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে যেহেতু তারা শুধুমাত্র প্রত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই বিষয়টিকে আলোচনা করি একটি গভীর স্মৃতির নেটওয়ার্ক তৈরি করে যা ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে শূন্য প্রকাশ করার ক্ষমতা আছ Consequently, our resolver takes advantage of semantic information by using these continuous distributed representations.  অনটনোট ৫. ০ ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মেমরি নেটওয়ার্ক বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষার বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প', 'bs': 'Postojeći pristupi kineskoj rezoluciji nule pronouna obično koriste samo sintaktičke i leksičke karakteristike dok ignorišu semantičke informacije. Osnovni razlog je da nula proglašavanja nema opisivne informacije, što dovodi teškoće u objašnjenje njihovih semantičkih sličnosti sa predsednicima. U međuvremenu, predstavljanje nule izraze je izazovno jer su to samo praznine koje ne donose pravog sadržaja. U ovom papiru rješavamo ovaj problem izgradnjem duboke mreže pamćenja koja je sposobna za kodiranje nule izraze u predstave vektora sa informacijama koje su dobile iz njihovih konteksta i potencijalnih predstavnika. Stoga, naš rješavač koristi semantičke informacije koristeći te stalne raspodjeljene predstave. Eksperimenti na setu podataka OntoNotes 5.0 pokazuju da bi predložena mreža pamćenja mogla znatno nadmašiti stanje umjetničkih sustava u različitim eksperimentalnim nastavama.', 'ca': "Els enfocaments existents per a la resolució de zero pronons xinesa normalment només utilitzen característiques sinàctiques i lècsiques mentre ignoren la informació semàntica. La raó fonamental és que zero pronons no tenen informació descriptiva, que porta dificultat en capturar explícitament les seves similituds semàntiques amb antecedents. Mentrestant, representar zero pronons és desafiant perquè són només buits que no transmetren contingut real. En aquest paper, ens ocupem d'aquest tema construint una xarxa de memòria profunda capaç de codificar noms zero en representacions de vectors amb informació obtenida dels seus contextos i antecedents potencials. En conseqüència, el nostre resoldor aprofita la informació semàntica utilitzant aquestes representacions distribuïdes contínues. Els experiments del conjunt de dades OntoNotes 5.0 mostren que la xarxa de memòria proposada podria superar substancialment els sistemes més moderns en diversos entorns experimentals.", 'et': 'Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid hiina nullpronoomi resolutsioonile kasutavad tavaliselt ainult süntaktilisi ja leksikaalseid funktsioone, ignoreerides semantilist teavet. Põhiline põhjus on see, et null-pronounidel puudub kirjeldav informatsioon, mis tekitab raskusi selgesõnaliselt tuvastada nende semantilisi sarnasusi eelkäijatega. Samal ajal on null-asenimede esindamine keeruline, sest need on lihtsalt lüngad, mis ei edasta tegelikku sisu. Käesolevas töös käsitleme seda probleemi, ehitades süvamälu võrgustiku, mis on võimeline kodeerima null-pronomeid vektoriesitusteks nende kontekstist ja potentsiaalsetest eelnevatest saadud teabega. Järelikult kasutab meie lahendaja semantilist teavet, kasutades neid pidevaid hajutatud esitusi. Katsed OntoNotes 5.0 andmekogumiga näitavad, et kavandatud mäluvõrk võib erinevates katseseadetes oluliselt ületada kaasaegseid süsteeme.', 'cs': 'Stávající přístupy pro rozlišení čínských nulových zájmen obvykle využívají pouze syntaktické a lexikální rysy a ignorují sémantické informace. Základním důvodem je, že nulová zájmena nemají žádné popisné informace, což přináší obtíže explicitně zachytit jejich sémantické podobnosti s předchůdci. Zatímco reprezentování nulových zájmen je náročné, protože jsou pouze mezery, které nepředávají žádný skutečný obsah. V tomto článku se zabýváme tímto problémem vybudováním sítě hluboké paměti, která je schopna kódovat nulová zájmena do vektorových reprezentací s informacemi získanými z jejich kontextů a potenciálních předchůdců. Náš resolver tedy využívá sémantických informací pomocí těchto kontinuálních distribuovaných reprezentací. Experimenty na datové sadě OntoNotes 5.0 ukazují, že navrhovaná paměťová síť by mohla v různých experimentálních prostředích podstatně překonat nejmodernější systémy.', 'fi': 'Nykyiset lähestymistavat kiinalaisen nollapronominin resoluutiolle käyttävät tyypillisesti vain syntaktisia ja leksikaalisia ominaisuuksia sivuuttaen semanttisen tiedon. Perussyy on se, että nollapronomineilla ei ole kuvailevaa tietoa, mikä vaikeuttaa niiden semanttisten yhtäläisyyksien kuvaamista edeltäjien kanssa. Sillä välin nollapronominien esittäminen on haastavaa, koska ne ovat vain aukkoja, jotka eivät välitä todellista sisältöä. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme tätä kysymystä rakentamalla syvämuistiverkon, joka kykenee koodaamaan nollapronomineja vektoriesityksiksi niiden konteksteista ja mahdollisista edeltäjistä saadulla tiedolla. Näin ollen ratkaisijamme hyödyntää semanttista tietoa käyttämällä näitä jatkuvia hajautettuja esityksiä. OntoNotes 5.0 -aineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu muistiverkko voisi merkittävästi suoriutua huippuluokan järjestelmistä erilaisissa kokeellisissa olosuhteissa.', 'jv': 'Sayensi Pamalahan punika dipunangé punika dipunangé awak dhéwé, lan akeh basa sing beraksikno karo perusahaan sematik lan tambahan. Bali, negori gambar null In this paper, we Address this question by rebuking a deep memberspace network that is able to kode null Pronuns to vector representations with information available from their contexts and potansitial antacedants. Laih, akeh sampeyan ingkang dipunangé perusahaan semantar informasi dipunangé iki dadi sing dikarolan tambah. layer-mode-effects', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Sababu na bincike shine, ba da wani mace ya bayyana, wannan da ke zo da tsanani in ka sami misalin mutane da bakwai. A lokacin da ake wakilisha nufi yana tsõratar, kwani sũ ne gaura kawai da bã su gaurar da maɓallin gaskiya. Daga wannan takardan, Munã wajabta wannan masu taimako da za'a samar da wani zanen hukuru mai girma, wanda yana iya iya iya samun kodi-nufi zuwa mataimaki masu cikin kashfa da maɓalli da za'a samu da matabbata. Saboda haka, masu buwãye kanmu yana amfani da data na semanti da za'a yi amfani da waɗannan maɓallin tara. Tajararin da ke kan tsarin bayani na OntoNotes 5.0 ya nuna cewa, shirin hukarin tunar da aka buƙata, yana iya ƙaranci cikin halin-the-art cikin tsari masu buƙata.", 'sk': 'Obstoječi pristopi za kitajsko ničelno ločljivost zaimkov običajno uporabljajo samo sintaktične in leksikalne značilnosti, medtem ko ignorirajo semantične informacije. Temeljni razlog je, da ničelni zaimki nimajo opisnih informacij, kar otežuje izrecno zajemanje njihovih semantičnih podobnosti s predhodniki. Medtem pa je predstavljanje ničelnih zaimkov izziv, saj so le vrzeli, ki ne prenašajo dejanske vsebine. V prispevku obravnavamo to vprašanje z gradnjo globokega pomnilniškega omrežja, ki je sposobna kodirati ničelne zaimke v vektorske reprezentacije z informacijami, pridobljenimi iz njihovih kontekstov in potencialnih predhodnikov. Zato naš reševalec izkoristi semantične informacije z uporabo teh stalnih porazdeljenih predstavitev. Poskusi v zbirki podatkov OntoNotes 5.0 kažejo, da bi predlagano pomnilniško omrežje lahko bistveno preseglo najsodobnejše sisteme v različnih eksperimentalnih okoljih.', 'he': 'גישות קיימות לרזולוציה אפס סינית משתמשות בדרך כלל רק בתחומים סינטקטיים ולקסיים בזמן להתעלם ממידע סמנטי. הסיבה הבסיסית היא שאין לאפס מידע תיאור, מה שמביא קשה לתפוס באופן ברור את הדמיון הסמנטי שלהם עם קודמות. בינתיים, מייצג אפס פרנומים הוא מאתגר מאחר שהם רק פערים שלא מעבירים תוכן אמיתי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמודדים עם הנושא הזה על ידי בניית רשת זיכרון עמוקה שיכולה לקוד אפס מילים לתוך מיצוגי ווקטורים עם מידע שנקבל מהקשרים שלהם וקודמים פוטנציאליים. כתוצאה מכך, המפתח שלנו מנצל מידע סמנטי על ידי השימוש ביצועים המפורסמים הללו. ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים OntoNotes 5.0 מראים שהרשת הזיכרון המוצעת יכולה להתגבר באופן משמעותי על מערכות המיוחדות במצבים ניסויים שונים.', 'bo': 'Existing approaches for Chinese zero pronoun resolution typically use syntactical and lexical features only while ignoring semantic information. རྨན་གཞུང་གི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་མིང་ཚིག་ཀྱང་གསལ དེར་བརྟེན། མིང་རྟགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་ངོ་མ་ནང་དོན་མིན་པའི་བར་སྟོང In this paper, we address this issue by building a deep memory network that is capable of encoding zero pronouns into vector representations with information obtained from their contexts and potential antecedents. གནད་དོན། མིས་མཐུན་རྩོལ་བ་དེ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། OntoNotes 5.0 ཡི་སྤྱོད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པའི་དྲ་བ་དྲ་ས་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པར་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'How much progress have we made on RST discourse parsing? A replication study of recent results on the RST-DT', 'ar': 'ما مقدار التقدم الذي أحرزناه في تحليل خطاب RST؟ دراسة تكرار النتائج الحديثة على RST-DT', 'fr': "Quels progrès avons-nous réalisés en matière d'analyse du discours RST\xa0? Une étude de réplication des résultats récents sur le RST-DT", 'es': '¿Cuánto hemos avanzado en el análisis del discurso de RST? Un estudio de replicación de los resultados recientes del RST-DT', 'pt': 'Quanto progresso fizemos na análise do discurso RST? Um estudo de replicação de resultados recentes sobre o RST-DT', 'ja': 'RSTの話題解析はどれくらい進歩していますか？ RST - DTに関する最近の結果の複製研究', 'zh': 'RST语解析多进? RST-DT最新卒复制究', 'ru': 'Какой прогресс мы достигли в разборе дискурса RST? Исследование репликации последних результатов RST-DT', 'hi': 'RST प्रवचन पार्सिंग पर हमने कितनी प्रगति की है? RST-DT पर हाल के परिणामों का एक प्रतिकृति अध्ययन', 'ga': 'Cé mhéad dul chun cinn atá déanta againn ar pharsáil dioscúrsa RST? Staidéar macasamhlú ar thorthaí le déanaí ar an RST-DT', 'hu': 'Mennyi előrelépést értünk el az RST diskurzus elemzésében? Az RST-DT legutóbbi eredményeinek replikációs tanulmánya', 'el': 'Πόσο πρόοδο έχουμε σημειώσει στην ανάλυση λόγου RST; Μελέτη αντιγραφής των πρόσφατων αποτελεσμάτων του RST-DT', 'ka': 'რამდენი პროგრესი გავაკეთეთ RST დისკურსების პარასტის შესახებ? RST', 'it': "Quanti progressi abbiamo fatto nell'analisi del discorso RST? Uno studio di replica dei risultati recenti sull'RST-DT", 'kk': 'RST дискурстарды талдау үшін қанша жұмыс істедік? RST-DT жуырдағы нәтижелердің репликациясы', 'lt': 'Kiek pažangos padarėme RST diskursų analizavimo srityje? Naujausių RST-DT rezultatų pakartotinis tyrimas', 'mk': 'How much progress have we made on RST discourse parsing?  Студија за репликација на неодамнешните резултати на RST- DT', 'ms': 'Berapa banyak kemajuan yang telah kita buat pada penghuraian percakapan RST? A replication study of recent results on the RST-DT', 'ml': 'RST സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d എത്ര പുരോഗമുണ്ടാക്കി? RST-DT-ലുള്ള അടുത്ത ഫലങ്ങളുടെ റിപ്പിക്കേഷന്\u200d പഠനം', 'mt': 'Kemm għamilna progress fl-analiżi tad-diskors RST? Studju ta’ replikazzjoni ta’ riżultati riċenti dwar l-RST-DT', 'mn': 'RST ярианы талаар хэр их хөгжлийг хийсэн бэ? RST-DT дээрх саяхан үр дүнг дахин давтах судалгаа', 'no': 'Kor mykje framgang har vi gjort ved tolking av RST- diskursar? Name', 'pl': 'Jak duży postęp poczyniliśmy w analizie dyskursów RST? Badanie replikacji ostatnich wyników na RST-DT', 'ro': 'Cât de multe progrese am făcut în analiza discursului RST? Un studiu de replicare a rezultatelor recente privind RST-DT', 'sr': 'Koliko smo napredovali na razmatranju RST diskursa? Proučavanje replikacije nedavnih rezultata na RST-DT-u', 'si': 'RST කතාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා අපි කොච්චර ප්\u200dරභාව කරලා තියෙන්නේ? Name', 'sv': 'Hur mycket har vi gjort när det gäller tolkning av RST-diskurser? En replikationsstudie av de senaste resultaten på RST-DT', 'so': 'Intee horumar ah ayaannu ku sameynay baarkiisa RST-da? Waxbarashada lifaaqyada ee ugu dambeeyay ee ku saabsan RST-DT', 'ur': 'ہم نے RST صحبت کے بارے میں کس قدر پیشرفت کی ہے؟ RST-DT پر اچھے نتیجے کا ایک مطالعہ', 'ta': 'நாம் RST பேச்சு பாடலில் எவ்வளவு முன்னேற்றம் செய்திருக்கிறோம்? Name', 'uz': 'Biz RST talab qilishda qancha darajaga harakat qildik? Name', 'vi': 'Chúng ta đã làm được bao nhiêu tiến triển trong việc phân tích RST? Nghiên cứu nhân bản về kết quả gần đây của RST-DT', 'bg': 'Колко напредък сме постигнали в анализа на дискусиите? Проучване за репликация на последните резултати на RST-DT', 'da': 'Hvor store fremskridt har vi gjort med RST diskursanalyse? En replikationsundersøgelse af de seneste resultater på RST-DT', 'nl': 'Hoeveel vooruitgang hebben we geboekt met RST discours parsing? Een replicatiestudie van recente resultaten op het RST-DT', 'hr': 'Koliko smo napredovali na razmatranju RST diskursa? Proučavanje replikacije nedavnih rezultata na RST-DT-u', 'de': 'Wie viel Fortschritt haben wir beim RST Diskurs Parsing gemacht? Eine Replikationsstudie aktueller Ergebnisse auf dem RST-DT', 'ko': 'RST 문장 분석 분야에서 얼마나 진전되었습니까?RST-DT 최신 결과 복제 연구', 'id': 'Berapa banyak kemajuan yang telah kita lakukan dalam penghuraian pidato RST? Studi replikasi hasil baru-baru ini tentang RST-DT', 'fa': 'چقدر پیشرفت در تجزیه سخنرانی RST انجام دادیم؟ مطالعه تکرار نتایج اخیر روی RST-DT', 'tr': 'RST diskusiýasynda näçe ilerlemek boldy? RST-DT barada soňky netijeler üçin ýerleşdirilip studiýasy', 'af': "Hoeveel vordering het ons op RST diskursie verwerking gemaak? 'n Replikasie studie van onlangse resultate op die RST-DT", 'sq': 'How much progress have we made on RST discourse parsing?  Një studim replikimi i rezultateve të fundit në RST-DT', 'sw': 'How much progress have we made on RST discourse parsing?  Utafiti wa matokeo ya hivi karibuni kuhusu RST-DT', 'am': 'RST ንግግር ማኅበረሰብ ምን ያህል ዕድል አደረግነው? A replication study of recent results on the RST-DT', 'az': 'RST diskursu ay캼rmaq 칲칞칲n n톛 q톛d톛r t톛dbir etdik? RST-DT 칲st칲nd톛 son n톛tic톛l톛rin replikasyonu', 'hy': 'Ինչքա՞ն առաջընթաց ենք մենք արել ՌՍԹ խոսքի վերլուծության մեջ: Վերջին արդյունքների վերարտադրման հետազոտությունը', 'bn': 'আমরা RST কথোপকথন পার্জিং এ কত অগ্রগতি করেছি? RST-DT সম্প্রতি সম্প্রতি ফলাফলের একটি প্রতিক্রিয়া গবেষণা', 'bs': 'Koliko smo napredovali na razmatranju RST diskursa? Proučavanje replikacije nedavnih rezultata na RST-DT-u', 'ca': "Quant progrés hem fet en l'analització de discurs RST? Un estudi de replicació dels resultats recents sobre el RST-DT", 'cs': 'Jaký pokrok jsme dosáhli v analýze diskurzu RST? Replikační studie nedávných výsledků na RST-DT', 'et': 'Kui palju edusamme oleme teinud RST diskursuse parsimisel? RST-DT hiljutiste tulemuste replikatsiooniuuring', 'fi': 'Kuinka paljon olemme edistyneet RST:n diskurssien analysoinnissa? Uusien RST-DT:n tulosten replikaatiotutkimus', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello worldkey echo Transform handle tip', 'he': 'How much progress have we made on RST discourse parsing?  מחקר השכפול של התוצאות האחרונות על RST-DT', 'sk': 'Kakšen napredek smo dosegli pri analizi diskurza RST? Študija replikacije nedavnih rezultatov RST-DT', 'ha': 'Yãya gaura da muka yi samun mazaɓa da RSA? Wani surname', 'bo': 'RST མ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔྱད་ནང་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གང་ཞིག་འབྱུང་ཡིན་ནམ RST-DT ནང་གི་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚབ་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་སྒྲུབ་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'This article evaluates purported progress over the past years in RST discourse parsing. Several studies report a relative error reduction of 24 to 51 % on all metrics that authors attribute to the introduction of distributed representations of discourse units. We replicate the standard evaluation of 9 parsers, 5 of which use distributed representations, from 8 studies published between 2013 and 2017, using their predictions on the test set of the RST-DT. Our main finding is that most recently reported increases in RST discourse parser performance are an artefact of differences in implementations of the evaluation procedure. We evaluate all these parsers with the standard Parseval procedure to provide a more accurate picture of the actual RST discourse parsers performance in standard evaluation settings. Under this more stringent procedure, the gains attributable to distributed representations represent at most a 16 % relative error reduction on fully-labelled structures.', 'pt': 'Este artigo avalia o suposto progresso ao longo dos últimos anos na análise do discurso RST. Vários estudos relatam uma redução relativa do erro de 24 a 51% em todas as métricas que os autores atribuem à introdução de representações distribuídas de unidades de discurso. Replicamos a avaliação padrão de 9 analisadores, 5 dos quais usam representações distribuídas, de 8 estudos publicados entre 2013 e 2017, usando suas previsões no conjunto de teste do RST-DT. Nossa principal descoberta é que os aumentos relatados mais recentemente no desempenho do analisador de discurso RST são um artefato de diferenças nas implementações do procedimento de avaliação. Avaliamos todos esses analisadores com o procedimento padrão Parseval para fornecer uma imagem mais precisa do desempenho real dos analisadores de discurso RST em configurações de avaliação padrão. Sob este procedimento mais rigoroso, os ganhos atribuíveis às representações distribuídas representam, no máximo, uma redução de erro relativo de 16% em estruturas totalmente rotuladas.', 'ar': 'تقيم هذه المقالة التقدم المزعوم خلال السنوات الماضية في تحليل خطاب RST. تشير العديد من الدراسات إلى انخفاض نسبي في الخطأ بنسبة 24 إلى 51٪ على جميع المقاييس التي يعزوها المؤلفون إلى تقديم التمثيلات الموزعة لوحدات الخطاب. نحن نكرر التقييم القياسي لـ 9 موزعين ، 5 منها تستخدم التمثيلات الموزعة ، من 8 دراسات نُشرت بين 2013 و 2017 ، باستخدام تنبؤاتهم على مجموعة اختبار RST-DT. النتيجة الرئيسية التي توصلنا إليها هي أن الزيادات التي تم الإبلاغ عنها مؤخرًا في أداء محلل خطاب RST هي نتاج الاختلافات في تطبيقات إجراء التقييم. نقوم بتقييم كل هؤلاء المحللين باستخدام إجراء Parseval القياسي لتوفير صورة أكثر دقة لأداء محللي خطاب RST الفعلي في إعدادات التقييم القياسية. بموجب هذا الإجراء الأكثر صرامة ، فإن المكاسب التي تُعزى إلى التمثيلات الموزعة تمثل على الأكثر انخفاضًا بنسبة 16 ٪ في الخطأ النسبي على الهياكل ذات العلامات الكاملة.', 'fr': "Cet article évalue les prétendus progrès réalisés au cours des dernières années dans l'analyse du discours RST. Plusieurs études font état d'une réduction relative de l'erreur de 24 à 51\xa0% sur toutes les mesures que les auteurs attribuent à l'introduction de représentations distribuées des unités de discours. Nous reproduisons l'évaluation standard de 9 analyseurs, dont 5 utilisent des représentations distribuées, provenant de 8 études publiées entre 2013 et 2017, en utilisant leurs prévisions sur l'ensemble de test du RST-DT. Notre principale constatation est que les augmentations les plus récentes des performances de l'analyseur de discours RST sont un artefact des différences dans les implémentations de la procédure d'évaluation. Nous évaluons tous ces analyseurs avec la procédure standard Parseval afin de fournir une image plus précise des performances réelles des analyseurs de discours RST dans les paramètres d'évaluation standard. Dans le cadre de cette procédure plus stricte, les gains attribuables aux représentations distribuées représentent au plus une réduction d'erreur relative de 16\xa0% sur les structures entièrement étiquetées.", 'es': 'Este artículo evalúa el supuesto progreso en los últimos años en el análisis del discurso de RST. Varios estudios informan de una reducción relativa del error del 24 al 51% en todas las métricas que los autores atribuyen a la introducción de representaciones distribuidas de unidades de discurso. Replicamos la evaluación estándar de 9 analizadores, 5 de los cuales utilizan representaciones distribuidas, de 8 estudios publicados entre 2013 y 2017, utilizando sus predicciones en el conjunto de pruebas del RST-DT. Nuestro principal hallazgo es que los aumentos informados más recientemente en el rendimiento del analizador del discurso de RST son un artefacto de las diferencias en las implementaciones del procedimiento de evaluación. Evaluamos todos estos analizadores con el procedimiento Parseval estándar para proporcionar una imagen más precisa del rendimiento real de los analizadores de discurso RST en entornos de evaluación estándar. Bajo este procedimiento más estricto, las ganancias atribuibles a las representaciones distribuidas representan como máximo una reducción del error relativo del 16% en estructuras totalmente etiquetadas.', 'ja': 'この記事では、過去数年間のRSTディスカッション構文解析の進捗状況を評価しています。いくつかの研究では、著者が論述単位の分散表現の導入に起因するすべての指標の相対的誤差が24 ～ 51%低減されたと報告されている。2013年から2017年にかけて発表された8つの研究から、RST - DTのテストセット上の予測を使用して、9つの構文解析器（うち5つは分散表現を使用）の標準評価を複製します。我々の主な発見は、最近報告されたRSTディスカッション構文解析器のパフォーマンスの増加が、評価手順の実装における差異のアーチファクトであることである。これらの構文解析器はすべて、標準的な構文解析手順を使用して評価し、標準的な評価設定での実際のRSTトークス構文解析器のパフォーマンスのより正確な画像を提供します。このより厳密な手順では、分散表現に起因するゲインは、完全にラベル付けされた構造体上で最大16 ％の相対誤差低減を表す。', 'zh': '本文评估了往年在 RST 语解析所得所谓进展。 几项研言,归因于入语单元分布式诸指标差减24%至51%。 臣等复制9解析器之准,其5用分布式,自2013至2017发表之8,用之RST-DT试集上之占。 大抵近报RST语解析器性能增益,评事差异之物也。 吾以 Parseval 质诸解析器,以供其实 RST 语解析器性之正图片。 其严程之下,分布式收益最多,全标减16%。', 'ru': 'В этой статье оценивается предполагаемый прогресс за последние годы в разборе дискурса RST. В нескольких исследованиях сообщается об относительном снижении погрешности на 24-51% по всем метрикам, которые авторы приписывают внедрению распределенных представлений единиц дискурса. Мы воспроизводим стандартную оценку 9 парсеров, 5 из которых используют распределенные представления, из 8 исследований, опубликованных в период с 2013 по 2017 год, используя их прогнозы на тестовом наборе RST-DT. Наш основной вывод заключается в том, что последние сообщения об увеличении производительности RST-анализатора дискурса являются артефактом различий в реализации процедуры оценки. Мы оцениваем все эти парсеры с помощью стандартной процедуры парсевализации, чтобы обеспечить более точную картину фактической производительности парсеров RST-дискурсов в стандартных настройках оценки. В соответствии с этой более строгой процедурой прирост, связанный с распределенными представлениями, представляет собой уменьшение относительной погрешности на 16% для полностью меченых структур.', 'hi': 'यह लेख आरएसटी प्रवचन पार्सिंग में पिछले वर्षों में कथित प्रगति का मूल्यांकन करता है। कई अध्ययनों ने सभी मैट्रिक्स पर 24 से 51% की सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी की रिपोर्ट की है जो लेखक प्रवचन इकाइयों के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व की शुरुआत के लिए विशेषता देते हैं। हम 9 पार्सर के मानक मूल्यांकन को दोहराते हैं, जिनमें से 5 वितरित अभ्यावेदन का उपयोग करते हैं, 2013 और 2017 के बीच प्रकाशित 8 अध्ययनों से, आरएसटी-डीटी के परीक्षण सेट पर उनकी भविष्यवाणियों का उपयोग करके। हमारी मुख्य खोज यह है कि हाल ही में आरएसटी प्रवचन पार्सर प्रदर्शन में वृद्धि की सूचना दी गई है, मूल्यांकन प्रक्रिया के कार्यान्वयन में अंतर की एक कलाकृति है। हम मानक मूल्यांकन सेटिंग्स में वास्तविक RST प्रवचन पार्सर प्रदर्शन की अधिक सटीक तस्वीर प्रदान करने के लिए मानक पार्सवल प्रक्रिया के साथ इन सभी पार्सर का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। इस अधिक कठोर प्रक्रिया के तहत, वितरित अभ्यावेदन के लिए जिम्मेदार लाभ पूरी तरह से लेबल की गई संरचनाओं पर अधिक से अधिक 16% सापेक्ष त्रुटि में कमी का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Déanann an t-alt seo measúnú ar dhul chun cinn airbheartaithe le blianta beaga anuas i bparsáil dioscúrsa RST. Tuairiscíonn roinnt staidéar laghdú coibhneasta 24 go 51% ar earráidí ar gach méadracht a chuireann údair i leith tabhairt isteach léirithe dáilte na n-aonad dioscúrsa. Déanaimid an mheastóireacht chaighdeánach ar 9 parsálaí a mhacasamhlú, a úsáideann 5 cinn acu uiríll dáilte, ó 8 staidéar a foilsíodh idir 2013 agus 2017, ag baint úsáide as a gcuid tuar ar thacar tástála an RST-DT. Is é an príomhthoradh atá againn ná go bhfuil na méaduithe is déanaí a tuairiscíodh ar fheidhmíocht parsálaí dioscúrsa RST ina ndéantán de dhifríochtaí i gcur i bhfeidhm an nós imeachta meastóireachta. Déanaimid measúnú ar na parsálaithe seo go léir leis an ngnáthnós imeachta Parseval chun pictiúr níos cruinne a sholáthar ar fheidhmíocht iarbhír parsálaí dioscúrsa RST i suíomhanna caighdeánacha meastóireachta. Faoin nós imeachta níos déine seo, is ionann na gnóthachain atá inchurtha i leith uiríll dáilte agus laghdú earráide coibhneasta 16% ar a mhéad ar struchtúir lán-lipéadaithe.', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk értékeli az RST diskurzus elemzésének állítólagos előrehaladását az elmúlt években. Több tanulmány szerint 24-51%-os relatív hibacsökkenést jelentett minden olyan mutatónál, amelyet a szerzők a diskurzusi egységek elosztott reprezentációinak bevezetéséhez tulajdonítanak. A 2013 és 2017 között megjelent 8 tanulmányból származó 9 elemző standard értékelését replikáljuk, melyek közül 5 elosztott reprezentációt használ, az RST-DT tesztkészletén előrejelzéseik felhasználásával. Fő megállapításunk, hogy az RST diskurzus elemző teljesítményének legutóbbi növekedése az értékelési eljárás megvalósításában tapasztalható különbségek tárgya. Mindezeket az elemzőket a szabványos Parseval eljárással értékeljük, hogy pontosabb képet adjunk az RST diskurzus elemzők aktuális teljesítményéről standard értékelési beállításokban. E szigorúbb eljárás keretében az elosztott reprezentációknak tulajdonítható nyereség legfeljebb 16%-os relatív hibacsökkenést jelent a teljes körűen jelölt struktúrák esetében.', 'el': 'Αυτό το άρθρο αξιολογεί την υποτιθέμενη πρόοδο τα τελευταία χρόνια στην ανάλυση λόγου RST. Αρκετές μελέτες αναφέρουν σχετική μείωση σφαλμάτων 24 έως 51% σε όλες τις μετρήσεις που αποδίδουν οι συγγραφείς στην εισαγωγή κατανεμημένων αναπαραστάσεων των μονάδων λόγου. Αντιγραφούμε την τυπική αξιολόγηση των 9 αναλυτών, 5 εκ των οποίων χρησιμοποιούν κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις, από 8 μελέτες που δημοσιεύτηκαν μεταξύ 2013 και 2017, χρησιμοποιώντας τις προβλέψεις τους για το σύνολο δοκιμών του RST-DT. Το κύριο συμπέρασμα μας είναι ότι οι πιο πρόσφατες αυξήσεις στην απόδοση του αναλυτή λόγου είναι ένα τεχνούργημα διαφορών στις εφαρμογές της διαδικασίας αξιολόγησης. Αξιολογούμε όλους αυτούς τους αναλυτές με την τυποποιημένη διαδικασία για να παρέχουμε μια πιο ακριβή εικόνα της πραγματικής απόδοσης των αναλυτών λόγου σε τυποποιημένες ρυθμίσεις αξιολόγησης. Στο πλαίσιο αυτής της αυστηρότερης διαδικασίας, τα κέρδη που αποδίδονται στις κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις αντιπροσωπεύουν το πολύ 16% σχετική μείωση σφαλμάτων στις πλήρως επισημασμένες δομές.', 'ka': 'ეს არექტი გაუმუშავებს შემდეგ წლის შემდეგ პროგრესი RST დისკურსის პარასტის შემდეგ. რამდენიმე სწავლის შეცდომა 24-51%-ის შემცირების შემცირება, რომელიც ყველა მეტრიკის შემცირებით ატრიბუტირებულია, რომელიც ატრიბუტირებულია განსაზღვრებული ჩვენ განვიყენებთ სტანდარტური განსაზღვრებას, რომელიც ხუთი გამოყენება გაყოფილი განსაზღვრებების გამოყენება, 2013-2017 შორის 8 განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებების გამოყენება, რომელიც RST-DT-ის ტეს ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი აღმოჩენა, რომ ბოლო აღმოჩენა RST დისკურსების პანსერტის გამოსახულებაში გაზრდება არტეფექტის განსხვავებების განსხვავებაში. ჩვენ ყველა ამ პარასერებს სტანდარტული პარასგალის პროცექტურით გავუმუშავებთ, რომ უფრო მარტივი RST დისკურსის პარასერების გამოსახულება სტანდარტური განსახულება ამ უფრო ძალიან ძალიან სტრუქტური პროცექტურის შესახებ, გაყოფილი გამოსახულებებისთვის მიღება 16% დასაბამისი შეცდომის შეცდომის გამოსახულება.', 'it': "Questo articolo valuta i presunti progressi negli ultimi anni nell'analisi del discorso RST. Diversi studi riportano una riduzione relativa degli errori dal 24 al 51% su tutte le metriche che gli autori attribuiscono all'introduzione di rappresentazioni distribuite delle unità di discorso. Riproduciamo la valutazione standard di 9 parser, 5 dei quali utilizzano rappresentazioni distribuite, da 8 studi pubblicati tra il 2013 e il 2017, utilizzando le loro previsioni sul set di test dell'RST-DT. La nostra principale scoperta è che gli aumenti più recenti riportati nelle prestazioni del parser di discorso RST sono un artefatto delle differenze nelle implementazioni della procedura di valutazione. Valutiamo tutti questi parser con la procedura Parseval standard per fornire un quadro più accurato delle effettive prestazioni dei parser di discorso RST nelle impostazioni di valutazione standard. In base a questa procedura più rigorosa, i guadagni attribuibili alle rappresentazioni distribuite rappresentano al massimo una riduzione relativa degli errori del 16% su strutture completamente etichettate.", 'mk': 'Оваа статија го оценува наводниот напредок во текот на изминатите години во анализирањето на RST дискурсот. Неколку студии известуваат релативно намалување на грешките од 24 до 51 отсто на сите метрики кои авторите ги припишуваат на воведувањето на дистрибуираните претставувања на дискурсните единици. Ние ја репликираме стандардната оценка на 9 анализатори, од кои 5 користат дистрибуирани претставувања, од 8 студии објавени меѓу 2013 и 2017 година, користејќи ги нивните предвидувања за тестот на RST-DT. Нашиот главен заклучок е дека неодамна објавените зголемувања на резултатите на RST дискурсниот анализатор се артефакт на разлики во имплементацијата на процедурата на проценка. Ги проценуваме сите овие анализатори со стандардната процедура на Parseval за да обезбедиме попрецизна слика на реалната реална резултат на анализаторите на RST дискурс во стандардните поставувања на проценка. Според оваа посилна процедура, добивките кои се припишуваат на дистрибуираните претставници претставуваат најмалку 16 отсто релативно намалување на грешките на целосно обележаните структури.', 'kk': 'Бұл мақала RST дискурстарды талдау үшін соңғы жылдар бойы келтірілген жағдайды бағалады. Кейбір зерттеулерде, авторлар таратылған дискурстардың бірліктеріне қатынау үшін 24- 51% деген қатенің салыстырылығын есептеп береді. Біз 9 талдаушылардың стандартты бағалауын қайта жасап, бұлардың 5 таратылған таңбаларын, 2013 және 2017 жылдардың арасында шығарылған 8 зерттеулерден, RST-DT сынақтарының бағалауын қолданатын. Біздің негізгі табуымыз - RST дискурстарды талдау жұмысындағы ең жаңа хабарламалардың көтерілуі - бағалау процедурының орындауындағы әртефакттарының артефакты. Біз бұл талдаушыларды стандартты талдау процедурымен, стандартты баптау параметрлерінің шындық RST дискурстарының дұрыс суретін көрсету үшін бағалаймыз. Бұл жеткілікті процедур арқылы, таратылған кескіндерге қатынау көпшілігі толық жарлық құрылғылардың 16% қатесін шектеу үшін болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje vertinama tariama pažanga per pastaruosius metus atliekant RST diskursų analizę. Keliuose tyrimuose teigiama, kad palyginti klaidų sumažėjimas 24–51 proc. visų rodiklių, kuriuos autoriai priskiria pasiskirstytiems diskursinių vienetų atstovams, atžvilgiu. Iš 8 2013–2017 m. paskelbtų tyrimų, naudojant RST-DT bandymų rinkinio prognozes, pakartojame standartinį 9 analizatorių, iš kurių 5 naudojamos paskirstytos reprezentacijos, vertinimą. Pagrindinė išvada yra ta, kad neseniai praneštas RST diskurso analizatoriaus veiklos padidėjimas yra vertinimo procedūros įgyvendinimo skirtumų faktas. Mes vertiname visus šiuos analizatorius taikant standartinę Parseval procedūrą, kad būtų tikslesnis faktinių RST diskursų analizatorių rezultatų vaizdas standartinėse vertinimo aplinkybėse. Under this more stringent procedure, the gains attributable to distributed representations represent at most a 16% relative error reduction on fully-labelled structures.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini menilai kemajuan yang diduga selama bertahun-tahun terakhir dalam penghuraian percakapan RST. Beberapa kajian melaporkan pengurangan ralat relatif 24 hingga 51% pada semua metrik yang penulis atribut kepada perkenalan perwakilan yang disebarkan bagi unit diskors. Kami mereplikasikan penilaian piawai 9 penghurai, 5 daripada mereka menggunakan perwakilan yang disebarkan, dari 8 kajian yang diterbitkan antara 2013 dan 2017, menggunakan ramalan mereka pada set ujian RST-DT. Kesimpulan utama kami ialah yang baru-baru ini dilaporkan meningkat prestasi penghurai diskors RST adalah fakta perbezaan dalam implementasi prosedur penilaian. Kami menilai semua penghurai ini dengan prosedur Parseval piawai untuk menyediakan gambar yang lebih tepat dari prestasi penghurai percakapan RST sebenar dalam tetapan penilaian piawai. Dalam prosedur yang lebih ketat ini, keuntungan yang boleh ditakrif kepada perwakilan yang disebarkan mewakili sekurang-kurangnya 16% pengurangan ralat relatif pada struktur yang ditabel sepenuhnya.', 'ml': 'This article evaluates purported progress over the past years in RST discourse parsing.  ഒരുപാട് പഠനം അറിയിക്കുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്ന യൂണിറ്റുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി രേഖപ്പെടുത്തു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 9 പാര്\u200dസറുകളുടെ സാധാരണ വിലയ്ക്ക് പകര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d 5 പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് RST സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തിട്ടുള്ള പ്ര ഈ പാര്\u200dസറുകളെല്ലാം നമ്മള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സാധാരണ വിലാസപ്രക്രിയകളില്\u200d ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ചിത്രം RST സംസാരിക ഈ കൂടുതല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രക്രിയയുടെ കീഴില്\u200d, പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വിതരണം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള സമ്പാദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d 16% കൂടുതല്\u200d പിശക', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jevalwa l-progress allegat matul l-aħħar snin fl-analiżi tad-diskors RST. Diversi studji jirrappurtaw tnaqqis relattiv ta’ żball ta’ 24 sa 51% fuq il-metriċi kollha li l-awturi jattribwixxu għall-introduzzjoni ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti ta’ unitajiet ta’ diskors. Nirreplikaw l-evalwazzjoni standard ta’ 9 analizzaturi, 5 minnhom jużaw rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti, minn 8 studji ppubblikati bejn l-2013 u l-2017, bl-użu tat-tbassir tagħhom fuq is-sett tat-test tal-RST-DT. Is-sejba ewlenija tagħna hija li l-aktar żidiet irrappurtati reċentement fil-prestazzjoni tal-analizzatur ta’ diskors RST huma artefatt ta’ differenzi fl-implimentazzjoni tal-proċedura ta’ evalwazzjoni. Nivvalutaw dawn il-analizzaturi kollha bil-proċedura standard Parseval biex nipprovdu stampa aktar preċiża tal-prestazzjoni attwali tal-analizzaturi ta’ diskors RST f’ambjenti standard ta’ evalwazzjoni. Taħt din il-proċedura aktar stretta, il-qligħ attribwibbli għar-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti jirrappreżenta mill-inqas tnaqqis relattiv ta’ żball ta’ 16 % fuq strutturi ttikkettati bis-sħiħ.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen evaluerer utrytta framgang i løpet av tidlegare år i lesing av RST- diskursar. Fleire studier rapporterer om relativt feilreduksjon av 24 til 51% på alle metrikar som utviklarane attributtar til innføring av distribuerte representasjonar av diskurseiningar. Vi kopierer standard evalueringa av 9 tolkar, 5 av dei som brukar distribuerte representasjonar, frå 8 studier utgjeven mellom 2013 og 2017, ved å bruka dei foregåva på testsettet av RST-DT. Høvudsfinning vårt er at det mest nyeste rapporterte økningar i RST-diskursuttaler er ein artefakt av ulike forskjeller i implementasjonar av evalueringsprosedyren. Vi evaluerer alle desse tolkarane med standardvaleringsprosedyren for å gje eit meir nøyaktig bilete av den aktuelle RST diskurseringstiltak i standardvaleringsinnstillingane. Med denne meir strengjende prosedyren er det tilgjengelege å distribuera representasjonar som representerer mest eit relativt feilreduksjon på fullstendige struktur.', 'pl': 'Artykuł ten ocenia rzekome postępy w ostatnich latach w analizie dyskursu RST. Kilka badań opisuje względną redukcję błędów od 24 do 51% we wszystkich wskaźnikach, które autorzy przypisują wprowadzeniu rozproszonych reprezentacji jednostek dyskursu. Replikujemy standardową ocenę 9 parserów, z których 5 wykorzystują reprezentacje rozproszone, z ośmiu badań opublikowanych od 2013 do 2017, wykorzystując ich przewidywania na zestawie testowym RST-DT. Nasze główne ustalenie jest takie, że ostatnio zgłaszane wzrosty wydajności analizatora dyskursu RST są artefaktem różnic w implementacjach procedury oceny. Oceniamy wszystkie te parsery za pomocą standardowej procedury Parseval, aby zapewnić dokładniejszy obraz rzeczywistej wydajności parserów dyskursu RST w standardowych ustawieniach oceny. W ramach tej bardziej rygorystycznej procedury zyski związane z reprezentacjami rozproszonymi stanowią co najwyżej 16% względnej redukcji błędów w pełni oznaczonych struktur.', 'ro': 'Acest articol evaluează presupusele progrese în ultimii ani în analizarea discursurilor RST. Mai multe studii raportează o reducere relativă a erorilor de 24 până la 51% pe toate măsurătorile pe care autorii le atribuie introducerii reprezentărilor distribuite ale unităților de discurs. Reproducem evaluarea standard a 9 parsere, dintre care 5 utilizează reprezentări distribuite, din 8 studii publicate în perioada 2013-2017, folosind previziunile lor pe setul de teste al RST-DT. Principala noastră descoperire este că cele mai recente creșteri raportate în performanța parserului discursului RST reprezintă un artefact al diferențelor în implementarea procedurii de evaluare. Evaluăm toate aceste parsere cu procedura Parseval standard pentru a oferi o imagine mai exactă a performanței actuale a parserelor de discurs RST în setările standard de evaluare. În cadrul acestei proceduri mai stricte, câștigurile atribuite reprezentărilor distribuite reprezintă cel mult o reducere relativă a erorilor de 16% la structurile complet etichetate.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт RST ярианы талаар өнгөрсөн жилийн турш цэвэрхэн хөгжлийг үнэлдэг. Зарим олон судалгаанууд ярианы нэгжүүдийн хуваарилагдсан үзүүлэлтийг харьцуулж буй бүх метрик дээр 24-51%-аас харьцуулсан алдаа багасгаж байна. Бид 9 хуваарилагчийн стандарт дүгнэлтийг дахин хуваалцаж, 5 нь хуваарилагдсан үзүүлэлтийг ашиглаж, 2013-2017 оны хооронд хэвлэгдсэн 8 судалгаанаас хуваалцаж, RST-DT шинжлэх ухааны хуваалцааныг ашиглаж байна. Бидний хамгийн сүүлийн үеийн мэдээлэл нь RST ярианы хуваалцлагын үйл ажиллагааны нэмэлт нь үнэлгээний процессийн үйл ажиллагаанд ялгаатай артефакт юм. Бид эдгээр ажиллаачидыг стандарт ажиллах процесс дээр үнэндээ RST ярианы ажиллаачидын үйл ажиллагааг стандарт дүгнэх тохиолдолд илүү тодорхой зураг өгөх болно. Энэ илүү хатуу үйл явц дээр хуваарилцах үзүүлэлтийн тулд нэмэгдүүлэлт нь ихэнхдээ 16%-ын харьцаатай алдааны багасгал бүтээгдэхүүний бүтэц юм.', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak procjenjuje èisti napredak u proteklih godina u razmatranju diskusija RST-a. Nekoliko ispitivanja prijavljuje relativno smanjenje greške od 24 do 51% na svim metrikama koje autori pripisuju uvođenju raspodjeljenih predstavljanja jedinica diskursa. Mi kopiramo standardnu procjenu 9 parsera, od kojih 5 koristi raspodjeljene predstave, iz 8 ispitivanja objavljenih između 2013. i 2017. koristeći njihove predviđanja na test setu RST-DT-a. Naše glavno otkriće je da je najnedavnije prijavljeno povećanje učinka razmatranja diskursa RST-a artefakt razlika u provedbi procedure procjene. Procjenjujemo sve ove analizatore standardnim procedurom za razmatranje kako bi omogućili tačniju sliku stvarnih analizatora RST diskursa u standardnim nastavama procjene. U skladu s ovim strogim postupkom, dobiti koji se približavaju raspodjeljenim predstavljanjima predstavljaju najviše relativno smanjenje greške u odnosu na 16% na potpuno označene strukture.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය RST කතාවක් විශ්ලේෂනයේ අතින් අවුරුද්දු වලින් ප්\u200dරධානයක් විශ්ලේෂනය කරනවා. ගොඩක් අභ්\u200dයාසය සම්බන්ධ වැරැද්ධ විශේෂයක් 24-51% වෙනුවෙන් සියළු මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත විශේෂ විදිහ අපි පරීක්ෂක 9 ගැන ස්ථානය විශ්වාස කරනවා, 5 කින් පරීක්ෂක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් භාවිත කරනවා, 2013 සහ 2017 අතර අතර පරීක්ෂක 8 ගැන, RST-DT පරීක අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය තමයි RST කතාවක් විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විදියට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරධානයේ විවිධ අපි මේ සියළුම පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ප්\u200dරමාණික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂක ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරමයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඇත්තටම RST කතාවක් පරීක්ෂ මේ වැඩි ස්ට්\u200dරින්ට් විධානය සඳහා, ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය 16% ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ වැරදිලි විධානය සම්පූර්ණ', 'so': "Warqadan ayaa qiimeynaya horumarinta horumarinta ee sannadihii hore ee baaritaanka RST. Waxbarashada qaarkood waxay u soo sheegayaan in khalad saameyn u yar 24-51 boqolkiiba oo ku saabsan dhammaan metriciyada ay qoraal u leeyihiin soo bandhigista noocyada hadalka. Waxaannu bedelaynaa qiimeynta caadiga ah ee 9 baarlamaraar, kuwaas oo 5 ka mid ah ayaa lagu isticmaalaa wakiilaha kala soocay, 8 waxbarasho oo laga soo daabacay sanadkii 2013-2017, waxaana lagu isticmaalaa wixii loo sii sheegay tijaabinta RST-DT. Helitaankayada ugu horeeyay waa in ugu dhowaad la soo sheegay kordhiska hadalka kala duwan ee RST waa qoraal kala duwan oo lagu sameeyo baaritaanka qiimeynta. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa baarlamahaas oo dhan si aan u helno sawir rasmi ah oo ay u sawiraan bandhigyada qiimeynta caadiga ah. Waxyaabahaas ka hooseeya xiligan adag, waxa ka soo baxa faa'iidada lagu kala qaybiyo wakiilayaashu waxay represent a a ugu badnaan 16% oo khaladda u dhow ka kooban dhismaha aad u baahday.", 'sv': 'Denna artikel utvärderar påstådda framsteg under de senaste åren inom RST diskurstolkning. Flera studier rapporterar en relativ felreduktion på 24 till 51% på alla mätvärden som författarna tillskriver införandet av distribuerade representationer av diskursenheter. Vi replikerar standardutvärderingen av 9 parsrar, varav 5 använder distribuerade representationer, från 8 studier publicerade mellan 2013 och 2017, med hjälp av deras förutsägelser på testuppsättningen av RST-DT. Vårt huvudsakliga resultat är att de senaste rapporterade ökningarna i RST diskursparsers prestanda är ett artefakt av skillnader i implementering av utvärderingsprocessen. Vi utvärderar alla dessa parsers med Parseval-proceduren för att ge en mer exakt bild av den faktiska RST diskursparsers prestanda i standardutvärderingsinställningar. Enligt detta strängare förfarande innebär de vinster som kan hänföras till distribuerade representationer högst en relativ felminskning på 16% på helt märkta strukturer.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை முன்னேற்றம் கடந்த ஆண்டுகளில் RST பேச்சு பாடலில் மதிப்பிடுகிறது. பல ஆராய்ச்சிகள் 24-51% க்கு சார்ந்த பிழை குறைக்கும் அனைத்து முறைகளிலும் ஆசிரியர்கள் குறிப்பிட்ட பேச்சு அலகுகளின் பிர நாம் 9 பார்சர்களின் நிலையான மதிப்பீட்டை மாற்றுகிறோம், அதில் 5 பங்கிடப்பட்ட பிரதிநிதிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், 2013 மற்றும் 2017 க்கு இடையே வெளியிடப எங்கள் முக்கிய கண்டுபிடிப்பு என்னவென்றால் சமீபத்தில் RST பேச்சு பரிசோதனை செயல்பாடு அதிகரிக்கப்பட்டது மதிப்பு செயல்பாட்டி நாம் இந்த அனைத்து பார்சர்களையும் நிலையான பார்வை செயல்முறையைக் கொண்டு மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். நிலையான பார்வை அமைப்புகளில் சரியான ஒரு புக இந்த மிகவும் கடினமான செயல்கூறுக்கு கீழே பங்கிடப்பட்ட பங்கீடுகளுக்கு கூடிய வெற்றிகள் குறிப்பிடுவது 16% சார்ந்த பிழை குறைவ', 'ur': 'یہ لکھ RST گفتگو پارسینگ میں اگلوں سالوں میں پاک پورٹی پیشرفت کا ارزش کرتا ہے. بہت سی مطالعہ گزارے ہیں کہ تمام متریک پر 24-51% کی نسبت خطا کم کی گئی ہے جو لکھنے والوں کو تقسیم ہوئی دکھائی یونیٹوں کی معلومات کے ذریعہ آشنا کرتی ہیں. ہم نے نو پارسر کی استاندارڈ ارزیابی کا مطالعہ دوبارہ کرلیا ہے، ان میں سے ۵ فرقہ کے مطالعہ استعمال کرتے ہیں، ۲۰۱۳ اور ۲۰۱۷ کے درمیان منتشر ہوئے 8 مطالعہ سے، ان کی پیش بینی کے مطالعہ سے RST-DT کے ت ہماری اصلی پیدا کرنا یہ ہے کہ RST ڈیکورس پارچر کی عملکرد میں بہت اضافہ کی گھڑی ہے اور اس کا ارتفاع پردازی کے مطابق تفاوت کا فرق ہے۔ ہم ان پارسوں کو استاندارڈ پارسویل پردازی کے ساتھ مطابق مطابق تصویر دینے کے لئے استاندارڈ مطابق مطابق RST ڈرسوکرس پارس کے عمل کے ذریعہ مطابق کریں۔ اس زیادہ مضبوط طریقہ کے مطابق، تقسیم ہونے کے لئے قابل غنیمتیں بہت سے 16% نسبت خطا کاٹنے کے ذریعہ پوری لابلیٹ کی ساختوں پر ہے.', 'uz': "This article evaluates purported progress over the past years in RST discourse parsing.  Koʻp ta'qituvlar davom etishni 24-51% dan ko'p xato roʻy beradi. Mualliflarning tashkilotlarini ajratishga amalga oshirish mumkin. Biz 9 parserning standard qiymatlarini almashtiramiz, унда 5 ta ta ta-tashkilgan representations ishlatamiz, 2013-2017-yilda publiclangan 8 ta ta ta'limdan foydalanadi, RST-DT tizimini tasdiqlashdan foydalanish mumkin. Bizning asosiy muvaffaqiyatlarimiz: Yaqinda hisoblangan RST talab qiluvchi chegarasining ko'payishi, qiymatni amalga oshirishda o'zgarishlarning qiymatlarining qiymati jarayonini bajarishga ega. Biz buni hamma парламент стандарт парламент вазияти билан қиймат қиламиз. Andoza qiymatlar moslamalarida, oddiy RST суҳбат парламент аъзолари бажаришига аниқ расм бериш учун. Bu ko'proq darajada, ajratilgan tashkilotlarni ajratish natijalariga ega bo'lgan natijalar to ʻliq tuzilgan structurlarga qisqa 16% bogʻliq xato kamaytirish.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này phân tích được cho là đã có tiến triển trong suốt những năm qua trong thuyết giáo RST. Một số nghiên cứu báo cáo một sự giảm bớt lỗi tương đối của 24h đến 51=..về tất cả âm lượng mà các nhà văn quy định cho việc giới thiệu các biểu tượng phổ biến của các đơn vị. Chúng tôi tái lập trình đánh giá tiêu chuẩn của 9 phân tách, trong đó sử dụng các biểu tượng được phân phối, từ tám nghiên cứu được xuất bản từ giá bây giờ và bây giờ tại tê-7, bằng những dự đoán của họ về bộ thử nghiệm của RST-DT. Những phát hiện chính của chúng tôi là các tăng vọt trong các bài kiểm tra của RST gần đây là nguyên tố của sự khác biệt trong cách thực thi của thủ tục đánh giá. Chúng tôi đánh giá tất cả các phân viên này bằng thủ tục Parseval... để cung cấp một hình ảnh chính xác hơn về hoạt động của các bài phân giải RST trong thiết lập đánh giá chuẩn. Theo thủ tục khắt khe hơn này, lợi nhuận được áp dụng bởi các biểu hiện được chia ra đại diện đại diện cho sự giảm lỗi tương đối trên các cấu trúc được đánh giá đầy đủ.', 'bg': 'Тази статия оценява предполагаемия напредък през последните години в анализирането на дискурсите. Няколко проучвания отчитат относително намаляване на грешките от 24 до 51% при всички показатели, които авторите приписват на въвеждането на разпределени представи на дискурсните единици. Репликираме стандартната оценка на 9 анализатора, 5 от които използват разпределени представяния, от 8 проучвания, публикувани между 2013 и 2017 г., като използваме техните прогнози за тестовия набор на RST-DT. Основната ни констатация е, че най-наскоро отчетените увеличения в представянето на дискурсния анализатор са артефакт на разликите в внедряването на процедурата за оценка. Ние оценяваме всички тези анализатори със стандартната процедура за осигуряване на по-точна картина на действителното представяне на анализаторите на дискурса в стандартни настройки за оценка. При тази по-строга процедура печалбите, които се дължат на разпределените представи, представляват най-много 16% намаление на относителните грешки при напълно обозначени структури.', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak procjenjuje potvrđeni napredak u proteklih godina u razmatranju diskusija RST-a. Nekoliko ispitivanja prijavljuju relativno smanjenje greške od 24 do 51% na svim metrikama koje autori prikazuju uvođenju raspodjeljenih predstavljanja jedinica diskursa. Mi kopiramo standardnu procjenu 9 parsera, od kojih 5 koristi raspodjeljene predstave, iz 8 ispitivanja objavljenih između 2013. i 2017. koristeći njihove predviđanja na setu ispitivanja RST-DT-a. Naše glavno otkriće je da je najnedavnije prijavljenije povećanje učinka razmatrača diskursa RST-a artefakt razlika u provedbi procjene procjene. Procjenjujemo sve te analizatore standardnim procedurom za razmatranje kako bi omogućili precizniju sliku stvarnih analizatora razgovora RST-a u standardnim nastavama procjene. U skladu s ovim strogim postupkom, dobiti koji se približavaju raspodjeljenim predstavljanjima predstavljaju najviše relativno smanjenje greške u odnosu na 16% na potpuno označene strukture.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel evalueert vermeende vooruitgang in de afgelopen jaren in RST discours parsing. Verschillende studies rapporteren een relatieve foutreductie van 24 tot 51% op alle metrics die auteurs toeschrijven aan de introductie van gedistribueerde representaties van discourseenheden. We repliceren de standaard evaluatie van 9 parsers, waarvan 5 gebruik maken van gedistribueerde representaties, uit 8 studies gepubliceerd tussen 2013 en 2017, met behulp van hun voorspellingen op de testset van de RST-DT. Onze belangrijkste bevinding is dat de meest recent gemelde toename van de prestaties van RST discoursparser een artefact is van verschillen in implementaties van de evaluatieprocedure. We evalueren al deze parsers met de standaard Parseval procedure om een nauwkeuriger beeld te geven van de werkelijke prestaties van RST discoursparsers in standaard evaluatieinstellingen. Volgens deze strengere procedure vertegenwoordigen de winsten die te wijten zijn aan gedistribueerde representaties hoogstens een relatieve foutreductie van 16% op volledig gelabelde structuren.', 'da': 'Denne artikel evaluerer påståede fremskridt i de seneste år inden for RST diskurs parsing. Flere undersøgelser rapporterer en relativ fejlreduktion på 24 til 51% på alle metrics, som forfattere tillægger introduktionen af distribuerede repræsentationer af diskursenheder. Vi replikerer standardevalueringen af 9 parsere, hvoraf 5 bruger distribuerede repræsentationer, fra 8 undersøgelser offentliggjort mellem 2013 og 2017, ved hjælp af deres forudsigelser på testsættet af RST-DT. Vores primære konklusion er, at de senest rapporterede stigninger i RST diskursfortolker ydeevne er et artefakt af forskelle i implementeringer af evalueringsproceduren. Vi evaluerer alle disse parsere med standard Parseval procedure for at give et mere præcist billede af den faktiske RST diskursparsers ydeevne i standard evalueringsindstillinger. I henhold til denne strengere procedure udgør de gevinster, der kan tilskrives distribuerede repræsentationer, højst en relativ fejlreduktion på 16% på fuldt mærkede strukturer.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel bewertet angebliche Fortschritte in den letzten Jahren im RST Diskursparsing. Mehrere Studien berichten von einer relativen Fehlerreduktion von 24 bis 51% bei allen Metriken, die Autoren der Einführung verteilter Repräsentationen von Diskurseinheiten zuschreiben. Wir replizieren die Standardbewertung von 9-Parsern, von denen 5 verteilte Repräsentationen verwenden, aus 8-Studien, die zwischen 2013 und 2017 veröffentlicht wurden, anhand ihrer Vorhersagen auf dem Testsatz des RST-DT. Unsere wichtigste Erkenntnis ist, dass die zuletzt berichteten Erhöhungen der RST-Diskursparser-Leistung ein Artefakt von Unterschieden in der Implementierung des Evaluationsverfahrens sind. Wir evaluieren alle diese Parser mit dem Standard-Parseval-Verfahren, um ein genaueres Bild der tatsächlichen Leistung des RST-Diskursparsers in Standardauswertungseinstellungen zu erhalten. Bei diesem strengeren Verfahren stellen die auf verteilte Repräsentationen zurückzuführenden Gewinne höchstens eine 16% relative Fehlerreduktion bei vollständig markierten Strukturen dar.', 'ko': '본고는 RST 문장 분석이 지난 몇 년 동안 얻은 진전을 평가한다.몇 가지 연구 보고서에서 저자는 모든 지표의 상대적인 오차를 24%에서 51%로 낮추었는데 이것은 언어 단원의 분포식 표현법의 도입 때문이다.우리는 RST-DT 테스트 세트의 예측을 사용하여 2013년부터 2017년까지 발표된 8개 연구에서 9개의 해석기의 표준 평가를 복제했는데 그 중 5개는 분포식 표시를 사용했다.우리의 주요 발견은 최근 보고된 RST 언어 해석기의 성능 향상은 평가 과정의 차이를 실현하는 결과물이라는 것이다.표준 Parseval 프로그램을 사용하여 이러한 모든 파서를 평가하여 표준 평가 설정에서 실제 RST 언어 파서의 성능을 보다 정확하게 보여줍니다.이 더욱 엄격한 프로그램에서 분포식 표시가 가져오는 이득은 완전 표기 구조의 16%의 상대적인 오차가 감소하는 것을 대표한다.', 'id': 'Artikel ini mengevaluasi kemajuan yang diduga selama bertahun-tahun terakhir dalam penghuraian diskors RST. Beberapa studi melaporkan pengurangan kesalahan relatif dari 24 hingga 51% pada semua metrik yang para penulis atribut untuk penemuan represisi distribusi dari unit diskors. Kami mereplikasikan evaluasi standar 9 parser, 5 dari mereka menggunakan representation yang disebarkan, dari 8 studi yang diterbitkan antara 2013 dan 2017, menggunakan prediksi mereka pada set tes RST-DT. Penemuan utama kami adalah bahwa akhir-akhir ini dilaporkan meningkat prestasi analisis diskors RST adalah artefakta perbedaan dalam implementasi prosedur evaluasi. Kami mengevaluasi semua parser ini dengan prosedur Parseval standar untuk menyediakan gambar yang lebih akurat dari prestasi parser diskors RST sebenarnya dalam pengaturan evaluasi standar. Under this more stringent procedure, the gains attributable to distributed representations represent at most a 16% relative error reduction on fully-labelled structures.', 'fa': 'این مقاله در سالهای گذشته در پارش گفتگوهای RST، پیشرفت ثابت شده را ارزیابی می کند. تعدادی از مطالعات گزارش می\u200cدهند که کاهش خطاهای نسبتی از ۲۴ تا ۱۵ درصد در تمام متریک که نویسندگان به معرفی نمایش\u200cهای تقسیم\u200cشده واحدهای صحبت می\u200cکنند. ما ارزیابی استاندارد ۹ بازرس را تکرار می\u200cکنیم، ۵ از آنها از نمایش\u200cهای پراکنده\u200cشده استفاده می\u200cکنند، از ۸ مطالعه\u200cهای منتشر شده بین ۲۰۰۳ و ۲۰۰۷، با استفاده از پیش بینی\u200cهایشان در مجموعه آزمایش RST- یادآوری اصلی ما این است که اخیراً افزایش\u200cهای گزارش داده شده\u200cاند در عملکرد گفتگو\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی RST فرق\u200cهای تفاوت در عملکرد روش ارزیابی است. ما تمام این بازرسان را با روش بازرسی استاندارد ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم تا تصویر دقیق\u200cتری از کاربرد بازرسان واقعی RST در تنظیمات ارزیابی استاندارد پیشنهاد دهیم. تحت این روش سخت\u200cتری، پیروزی که برای توزیع نمایش\u200cهای تقسیم می\u200cشود بیشتر از حد ۱۶ درصد کاهش خطای نسبت به ساختمان\u200cهای کامل برچسب می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inapitia maendeleo yanayokusudiwa kwa miaka iliyopita katika mazungumzo ya RST. Tafiti kadhaa zinaripoti kupunguza kwa asilimia 24 hadi 51 kwa njia zote ambazo waandishi wanaelezea kuanzishwa kwa uwakilishi wa vitengo vya mazungumzo. We replicate the standard evaluation of 9 parsers, 5 of which use distributed representations, from 8 studies published between 2013 and 2017, using their predictions on the test set of the RST-DT.  Ugunduzi wetu mkuu ni kuwa, hivi karibuni unaripotiwa kuongezeka kwa mazungumzo ya RST ni aina ya tofauti katika kutekeleza utaratibu wa uchunguzi. Tutathmini wabunge hawa wote kwa mchakato wa kawaida wa kuandika uchaguzi ili kutoa picha sahihi zaidi ya mazungumzo ya kweli ya wabunge wa RST katika mazingira ya utafiti wa kawaida. Kwa chini ya mchakato huu mkali zaidi, mafanikio yanayosababishwa na kuwagawanya wakiwakiwakilisha takribani asilimia 16 ya makosa yanayohusiana na kupunguza miundombinu yenye maambulizi.', 'tr': 'Bu makala RST diskusiýasynda geçen ýyldan bäri bellenýän ilerjäni çykýar. Birnäçe öwrenmeler çykyş edip oturan çykyş birimleriniň girişine tanyş eden metriklerde 24-51%-den relativ hata azalyşygyny bildirýärler. Biz 9 parsçynyň standart deňlemesini kopyalapdyk we olaryň 5-si paýlaşylýan temsilleri, 2013 we 2017-nji ýyllar arasynda basylýan 8 studiden, RST-DT synagynda olaryň öngörümlerini ullanýarys. Biziň esasy tapylşymyz şudyr ki, iň soňky rapor edilen RST diskusiýa tansçylaryň eserleriniň ýokary çykyş procedesiniň implementasynda üýtgeşikleriniň artefaktdyr. Biz bu analyzçylaryň hemmesini standart analyz prosedüsi bilen çykarýarys. Şu RST diskleri analyzçylaryň ön bellenen çykyş düzümlerinde dogry bir suraty temin etmek üçin deňleýäris. Bu ýigrenç prosedürler bilen, daýlamak üçin gazançlar doly etitlenýän gurallaryň iň köp bölegi 16% hasaplanýan hata azalyşyny a ňladýar.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel evalueer uitgevee vordering in die verlede jaar in RST diskursie verwerking. Verskeie studie rapporteer 'n relatiewe fout reduksie van 24 tot 51% op alle metries wat outeurs eienskap tot die inligting van verspreidige voorstellings van diskurse eenhede. Ons kopieer die standaard evaluering van 9 verwerkers, 5 waarvan gebruik verspreidige voorstellings, van 8 studies wat tussen 2013 en 2017 gepubliseer is, deur hulle voorskou te gebruik op die toets stel van die RST-DT. Ons hoofgevinding is dat die mees onlangs rapporteerde vergroot in RST-diskurse ontwerkingsprogram is 'n artefakte van verskille in implementasies van die evalueringsprosedure. Ons evalueer al hierdie verwerkers met die standaard verwerking prosedure om 'n meer presies prent van die werklike RST diskursie verwerker prestasie in standaard evaluering instellings te verskaf. Onder hierdie meer stringende prosedure is die verskaffings veroorsaakbaar om verspreiding te verteenwoordig by die meeste van 'n 16% relatiewe fout reduksie op volledige etiketeerde strukture.", 'sq': 'Ky artikull vlerëson përparimin e deklaruar gjatë viteve të fundit në analizimin e diskurseve RST. Disa studime raportojnë një reduktim të gabimeve relativë prej 24 deri në 51% në të gjitha metrikat që autorët atribuojnë futjes së përfaqësimeve të shpërndara të njësive diskursore. Ne përsërisim vlerësimin standard të 9 analizuesve, 5 prej të cilëve përdorin përfaqësime të shpërndara, nga 8 studime të botuara midis 2013 dhe 2017, duke përdorur parashikimet e tyre në grupin e testimeve të RST-DT. Gjetja jonë kryesore është se rritjet më të fundit të raportuara në shfaqjen e analizuesit të diskursit RST janë një fakt i ndryshimeve në zbatimin e procedurës së vlerësimit. Ne vlerësojmë të gjithë këto analizues me procedurën standard të Parseval për të siguruar një fotografi më të saktë të performancës aktuale të analizuesve të diskursit RST në rregullimet standarde të vlerësimit. Sipas kësaj procedure më të rreptë, fitimet e atribueshme përfaqësimeve të shpërndara përfaqësojnë më së shumti një reduktim të gabimeve relativë 16% në strukturat plotësisht të etiketuara.', 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ ባለፉት ዓመታት የRST ንግግር ማኅበረሰብ ያሳያል፡፡ ብዙ ምርጫዎች የንግግር ብሔራዎችን ለመግለጥ የሚታወቁ ተሟጋቾች 24 እስከ 51 በመቶ የሚጎድለውን የስህተት ጉዳይ ያሳስፋሉ፡፡ ከ2013 ጀምሮ እስከ 2017 ድረስ በተለየው 8 ትምህርት ላይ የተለየውን የ9 ፓርራር አካውንት እናደርጋለን፡፡ መጀመሪያው ግንኙነታችን፣ የቀድሞው የRST ንግግር ተቃውሞ የሚጨመር የልዩነት ግንኙነት በአካባቢ ፕሮግራሙን ለመፈለግ የልዩነት ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ እነዚህንም ፓርራር ሁሉ በተቃውሞ ማስታወቂያ ውስጥ የRST የንግግር ፓርስቲ ፍትሕርት ማድረግ እንዲያረጋግጥ የአዳላማዊ አስተያየት ማድረጊያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የበረታች ሥርዓት በታች፣ የተካፈሉት መልዕክቶች በሚያካፍሉት ስህተት በሙሉ ተደግሞው የተሳሳተ መሠረቶች ላይ በሚያሳየው 16 በመቶ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu məktub RST diskusiyası ayırılmasında son illərdə təmizlənən tədbir tərzini değerləşdirir. Bir neçə təhsil müəyyən edir ki, yazıcıların dağıtılan söhbət təhsilələrinin girişməsinə təsdiqlənən bütün metriklərdə 24-51%-lik xəta azalır. Biz, 2013-2017 arasında yayınlanan 8 təcrübələrdən, RST-DT təcrübələrini istifadə edərək, 9 təcrübəcülərin standart təcrübəsini dəyişdiririk. Ən çox xəbərdar edilənlərimiz RST diskursu ayırıcı performansının artırılması, değerlendirmə prosedüsinin uygulamalarında fərqli fərqlənmələrin artefaktudur. Biz bütün bu analizacıları standart Parseval prosedüsü ilə standart değerlendirmə qurğularının əsl RST diskursu analizacıların performansını göstərmək üçün daha doğru şəkildə təmin edirik. Bu daha sərt prosedürlərə görə, dağıtılmış göstəricilərə verilən qənimətlər tam etiketli yapılar üzərində ən çox 16% haqqında xəta düşürməsini göstərir.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি গত বছর ধরে রাস্টির কথোপকথন পার্জিং-এ প্রযুক্তির উদ্দেশ্যে অগ্রগতির মূল্যায়ন করেছে। বেশ কয়েকটি গবেষণা সংবাদ প্রদান করেছে যে সকল মেট্রিকে ২৪ থেকে ৫১% কমিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে, যেগুলো লেখক আলোচনা ইউনিটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ২০১৩ থেকে ২০১৭ সাল থেকে ২০১৭ সালের মধ্যে প্রকাশিত ৮টি গবেষণা থেকে আমরা ৯ পার্সারের ন্যান্ডার মূল্য প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব ব্যবহ আমাদের প্রধান আবিষ্কার হচ্ছে যে সম্প্রতি সাম্প্রতিক সংবাদ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যে RST কথোপকথন প্রক্রিয়ার বৃদ্ধি পাওয়া যাচ্ছে ত আমরা এই সকল পার্সারের মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার প্যারেভেল প্রক্রিয়ার মাধ্যমে স্বাভাবিক মূল্যায়নের বৈশিষ্ট্যে প্রকৃত R এই প্রক্রিয়ার অধীনে পুরোপুরি চিহ্নিত কাঠামো নিয়ে প্রতিনিধিদের বিতরণের যোগ্য অর্জনের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়েছে।', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը գնահատում է ենթադրված առաջընթացը վերջին տարիների ընթացքում Շատ ուսումնասիրություններ ցույց են տալիս, որ սխալների հարաբերական կրճատմանը 24-51 տոկոսով է բոլոր մետրիկների վրա, որոնք հեղինակները հատկացնում են խոսակցության միավորների բաշխված ներկայացումներին: Մենք կրկնօրինակում ենք 9 վերլուծողների ստանդարտ գնահատումը, 5-ը օգտագործում են տարածված ներկայացումներ 2013-2017 թվականի 8 հետազոտություններից, օգտագործելով իրենց կանխատեսումները ՌՍԹ-ԴԹ-ի փորձարկումների մասին: Մեր հիմնական եզրակացությունն այն է, որ վերջերս հայտարարվել է, որ ՌՍԹ-ի խոսակցության վերլուծության արդյունքների աճը գնահատման գործընթացի իրականացման տարբերությունների արտահայտությունն է: We evaluate all these parsers with the standard Parseval procedure to provide a more accurate picture of the actual RST discourse parsers performance in standard evaluation settings.  Այս ավելի խիստ գործընթացի ընթացքում, բաշխված ներկայացումների պատասխանատվող շահույթները ներկայացնում են առավելագույն 16 տոկոսով համեմատական սխալների կրճատում ամբողջովին նշանակված կառուցվածքներում:', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak procjenjuje potvrđeni napredak u proteklih godina u razmatranju diskusija RST-a. Nekoliko ispitivanja prijavljuju relativno smanjenje greške od 24 do 51% na svim metrikama koje autori pripisuju uvođenju raspodjeljenih predstavljanja jedinica diskursa. Mi kopiramo standardnu procjenu 9 parsera, od kojih 5 koristi raspodjeljene predstave, iz 8 ispitivanja objavljenih između 2013. i 2017. koristeći njihove predviđanja na test setu RST-DT-a. Naše glavno otkriće je da su najnedavnije prijavljenije povećanje učinka analizatora RST diskursa artefakt razlika u provedbi procjene procjene. Procjenjujemo sve te analizatore standardnim procedurom za razmatranje kako bi omogućili precizniju sliku stvarnih analizatora razgovora RST-a u standardnim nastavama procjene. U skladu s ovom strogim postupkom, dobiti koji se približavaju raspodjeljenim predstavljanjima predstavljaju najviše relativno smanjenje greške u odnosu na 16% na potpuno označene strukture.', 'ca': "Aquest article evalua el progrés suposat en els últims anys en l'analització del discurs RST. Divers estudis reporten una reducció d'errors relativs del 24 al 51% en totes les mètriques que els autors atribueixen a l'introducció de representacions distribuïdes d'unitats de discurs. Reproduim l'evaluació estándar de 9 analitzadors, 5 dels quals utilitzen representacions distribuïdes, de 8 estudis publicats entre 2013 i 2017, utilitzant les seves prediccions en el conjunt de proves del RST-DT. El nostre descobriment principal és que els increments més recentment reportats en el rendiment del analizador de discurs RST són un artefacte de diferències en la implementació del procediment d'evaluació. Evaluam tots aquests analitzadors amb el procediment estàndard Parseval per proporcionar una imatge més precisa del rendiment real dels analitzadors de discurs RST en configuracions estàndard d'evaluació. Sobre aquest procediment més estricte, els guanys atribuïbles a representacions distribuïdes representan una reducció relativa d'errors del 16% en estructures etiquetades plenament.", 'cs': 'Tento článek hodnotí údajný pokrok v posledních letech v analýze diskurzu RST. Několik studií uvádí relativní snížení chyb o 24 až 51% u všech metrik, které autoři přisuzují k zavedení distribuovaných reprezentací diskurzních jednotek. Replikujeme standardní hodnocení 9 parserů, z nichž 5 využívají distribuované reprezentace, z osmi studií publikovaných mezi 2013 a 2017, pomocí jejich predikcí na testovací sadě RST-DT. Naším hlavním zjištěním je, že poslední hlášené zvýšení výkonnosti RST diskurzního parseru jsou artefaktem rozdílů v implementacích hodnotícího postupu. Všechny tyto parsery vyhodnocujeme standardní Parsevalovou procedurou, abychom poskytli přesnější obraz o skutečném výkonu RST diskurzních parserů ve standardních hodnotících nastaveních. Při tomto přísnějším postupu představují zisky přičitatelné distribuovaným reprezentacím maximálně 16% relativní snížení chyb u plně označených struktur.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis hinnatakse eeldatavaid edusamme RST diskursuse parsimisel viimastel aastatel. Mitmed uuringud näitavad, et kõigi mõõdikute suhteline vigade vähenemine, mida autorid omistavad diskursusüksuste hajutatud esituste kasutuselevõtule, on vähenenud 24–51%. Ajavahemikul 2013–2017 avaldatud kaheksast uuringust, millest 5 kasutavad hajutatud esitusi, võtame üheksa parseri standardhindamise, kasutades nende prognoose RST-DT testikomplekti kohta. Meie peamine järeldus on, et viimati teatatud RST diskursuse parseri tulemuslikkuse suurenemine on hindamismenetluse rakendamise erinevuste artefakt. Me hindame kõiki neid parseriid standardse Parsevali protseduuriga, et anda täpsem pilt RST diskursuse parserite tegelikust jõudlusest standardsetes hindamisseadmetes. Selle rangema menetluse kohaselt tähendab hajutatud esitustest tulenev kasu kõige rohkem 16% suhtelise vea vähenemist täielikult märgistatud struktuuride puhul.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa arvioidaan RST-diskurssin jäsentämisen oletettua edistymistä viime vuosina. Useat tutkimukset raportoivat, että kaikissa mittareissa, jotka kirjoittajat pitävät diskurssiyksiköiden hajautettujen esitysten käyttöönoton yhteydessä, virhe väheni suhteellisesti 24–51%. Toistimme standardiarvioinnin yhdeksästä parserista, joista viisi käyttää hajautettuja esityksiä, kahdeksasta vuosina 2013–2017 julkaistusta tutkimuksesta käyttäen niiden ennusteita RST-DT:n testisarjasta. Päähavaintomme on, että viimeksi raportoitu RST diskurssiparserin suorituskyvyn nousu on seurausta arviointiprosessin toteutuksen eroista. Arvioimme kaikkia näitä jäsentäjiä standardimenetelmällä, jotta saadaan tarkempi kuva RST-diskurssijäsentäjien todellisesta suorituskyvystä vakioarviointiasetuksissa. Tässä tiukemmassa menettelyssä hajautetuista esityksistä saatavat hyödyt merkitsevät enintään 16 prosentin suhteellista virhevähennystä täysin merkityissä rakenteissa.', 'jv': 'Global politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We duplicate the Standard assertion of 9 parameters, 5 of that use Distributed representations, from 8 tutorial Publied (2013) and 2013, Using their preambons on the test set of the rsT-DT. FindOK We assertive Andong ngomong akeh operasi sing dibalakno iki, akeh iso nggawe gerakan kelangan anyar tentang kanggo ngilangno cara sing kotak 16% uwong kesempatan kanggo ndelok structural navigation', 'ha': "Wannan makala na ƙaddara kokaci da aka yi amfani da shi a cikin mazaɓa na RTR. Babu'a cikin tafiti, suna bãyar da rabo da ɓata mai kusantar da 24 zuwa 51% a kan duk metric wanda marubuci na ƙayyade wa introduta da shiryuwar da aka raba su cikin magana. Tuna musanya ƙaddara ga parser 9, 5 daga cikinsu ke amfani da wakilain su da aka rarraba su, daga 8 karatun wanda aka yi bayani a tsakanin 2013 da 2017, kuma tuna bayanin su a kan jarrabar-DT. Our main finding is that most recently reported increases in RST discourse parser performance are an artefact of differences in implementations of the evaluation procedure.  Tuna ƙaddara duk wannan parser da aiki na daidaita Parsewal dõmin a bãyar da wata sura mafi daidaita wa mazaɓa na mazaɓa da mazaunin rubutun da bakwai na RTR cikin keɓall in ƙaddara na daidaita. Under wannan aikin da ke ƙaranci mafi tsanani, tarin da aka halatta wa maɓallin su raba shi, yana da a tsakanin a tsakanin kasancẽwa ga ɓarna a cikakki da aka rubuta.", 'sk': 'Ta članek ocenjuje domnevni napredek v zadnjih letih pri razčlenitvi diskurza RST. Številne študije poročajo o relativnem zmanjšanju napak za 24 do 51% pri vseh meritvah, ki jih avtorji pripisujejo uvedbi porazdeljenih reprezentacij diskurznih enot. Ponovili smo standardno vrednotenje 9 razčlenjevalnikov, od katerih 5 uporabljajo porazdeljene reprezentacije, iz 8 študij, objavljenih med letoma 2013 in 2017, z uporabo njihovih napovedi na testnem naboru RST-DT. Naša glavna ugotovitev je, da je zadnje poročano povečanje uspešnosti razčlenjevalnika diskurza RST artefakt razlik pri implementacijah postopka ocenjevanja. Vse te razčlenjevalnike ocenimo s standardnim postopkom Parseval, da bi zagotovili natančnejšo sliko dejanske učinkovitosti razčlenjevalnikov diskurza RST v standardnih nastavitvah ocenjevanja. V okviru tega strožjega postopka koristi, ki jih je mogoče pripisati porazdeljenim predstavitvam, pomenijo največ 16-odstotno zmanjšanje relativne napake pri popolnoma označenih strukturah.', 'he': 'המאמר הזה מעריך התקדמות הנודעה במהלך השנים האחרונות בהעברת דיבורים RST. מספר מחקרים מדווחים על שינוי שגיאות יחסית של 24 ל-51% על כל המטריקות שהסופרים מכתיבים להציגה של מייצגים מפורסמים של יחידות דיבורס. אנו משכפלים את הערכה הסטנדרטית של 9 פרסמים, 5 מהם משתמשים באמצעות מייצגים מפורסמים, מ-8 מחקרים שפורסמו בין 2013 ל-2017, בשימוש בחזויות שלהם על קבוצת הבדיקות של RST-DT. המצאה העיקרית שלנו היא שאחרונה דיווחו על עליות בהפעלת הפרסם של דיבורים RST הם עובדה של הבדלים בהפעלה של הליך הערכה. אנו מעריכים את כל המעבדים האלה עם הליך הפרסוול הסטנדרטי כדי לספק תמונה מדויקת יותר של ההפעלות של המעבדים RST בהערכה הסטנדרטית. תחת הליך החזק יותר הזה, הרווחים שיכולים להסביר מייצגים מפורסמים מייצגים לפחות 16% פחית שגיאות יחסית במבנים עם תווים מלאים.', 'bo': 'RST discourse parsing Several studies report a relative error reduction of 24 to 51% on all metrics that authors attribute to the introduction of distributed representations of discourse units. ང་ཚོའི་རིགས་པ་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་བ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ ༥་ཕྱི་ཁའི་ནང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད། དེ་ལས་ སྤྱི་ཚོ ང་ཚོའི་རྩ་བའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ནི་RST མ་མང་ཟིན་བྲིས་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཉེ་ཆར We evaluate all these parsers with the standard Parseval procedure to provide a more accurate picture of the actual RST discourse parsers performance in standard evaluation settings. གནད་དོན་མེད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདི་ལས་ཕར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཆོས་ཤིག་གི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ་མང་ཤོས་འཇུག་'}
{'en': 'What is it? Disambiguating the different readings of the pronoun ‘it’', 'ar': 'ما هذا؟ توضيح القراءات المختلفة للضمير "هو"', 'fr': "Qu'est-ce que c'est\xa0? Désambiguïsation des différentes lectures du pronom «\xa0it\xa0»", 'pt': "O que é isso? Desambiguando as diferentes leituras do pronome 'it'", 'es': "¿Qué es? Desambiguación de las diferentes lecturas del pronombre `it'", 'ja': 'それは何ですか？代名詞「それ」のさまざまな読みを曖昧にします', 'zh': '何也? 除代词"it"之异读法歧义', 'hi': "यह क्या है? सर्वनाम 'यह' के विभिन्न रीडिंग disambiguating", 'ru': "Что это? Разъяснение различных чтений местоимения `it'", 'ga': "Cad é sin? Ag dídhébhriú léithe difriúla an fhorainm `it'", 'ka': 'კაკგჲ ვ? განსხვავებული წაკითხვების განსხვავება', 'el': "Τι είναι αυτό; Διασφαλίζοντας τις διαφορετικές αναγνώσεις της αντωνυμίας 'it'", 'hu': "Mi az? Az `it' névmásnak különböző értelmezéseinek egyértelműsítése", 'it': "Che cos'è? Disambiguare le diverse letture del pronome `it'", 'kk': 'Бұл не? "it" деген әртүрлі оқытуларды өшіру', 'lt': 'Kas čia? Išaiškinti skirtingus žodžio "it" skaitymus', 'mk': "Што е? Размислувањето на различните читања на реченицата `it'", 'ms': "Ada apa? Nyahambiguasi pembacaan berbeza bagi pronun `it'", 'ml': "എന്താണിത്? 'അതിന്\u200dറെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വായിച്ചുകേള്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു'", 'mn': 'Юу вэ? "it" гэдэг нэртэй өөр уншилтуудыг', 'mt': "X'inhu? Id-diżambigwar tal-qari differenti tal-pronoun `it'", 'ro': "Ce este? Deambiguizarea diferitelor lecturi ale pronumelui `it'", 'no': 'Kva er det? Slå av dei ulike lesinga av uttrykket « it »', 'sr': "Šta je to? Disambiguje različite èitanje pronouna 'it'", 'pl': "Co to jest? Rozjasnianie różnych odczytów zaimku `it'", 'si': "මොකක්ද? වෙනස් කියවන්නේ කියවන්න 'it' කියලා", 'so': 'waa maxay? ka baaraandegista akhriyada kala duduwan ee warqada', 'sv': "Vad är det? Disambiguation av olika avläsningar av pronomen `it'", 'ta': "அது என்ன? 'அது வெவ்வேறு வாசிப்புகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது'", 'ur': 'یہ کیا ہے؟ "it" کے مختلف پڑھنے کو ناکام کر رہا ہے', 'uz': "Bu nima? Buning turli o'qituvlarini o'zgartirish", 'vi': 'Cái gì đây? Phân tích âm tính của đại từ', 'bg': 'Какво има? Разясняване на различните четения на местоимението "то"', 'hr': "Što je to? Disambiguje različite čitanje pronouna 'it'", 'nl': "Wat is het? Het verduidelijken van de verschillende lezingen van het voornaamwoord 'it'", 'da': "Hvad er det? Disambiguation af de forskellige aflæsninger af stedordet `it'", 'de': "Was ist das? Die verschiedenen Lesungen des Pronomen `it'", 'ko': '이게 어떻게 된 일입니까?대명사 "it" 의 다른 도서의 잘못된 뜻을 없애다', 'sw': "Ni nini? Kuzungumzia kusoma tofauti za utangazaji `ni'", 'af': "Wat is dit? Skakel die verskillende lesings van die pronoun `it' af", 'fa': 'چي شده؟ ناپدید کردن خواندن مختلف از اسم "آن"', 'id': "Ada apa? Disambiguating the different readings of the pronoun `it'", 'hy': 'Ի՞նչ է դա: Դա արտահայտում է «այն» բառի տարբեր կարդալը', 'am': 'ምንድር ነው? የ ‹ይሄ› የተለዩትን አንብቶች በማሳወቅ', 'tr': 'Bu näme? Adynyň farklı okamalaryny üýtget', 'az': 'Nedir? "it" sözünün müxtəlif oxunmalarını dəyişdirir.', 'bn': 'এটা কি? প্রজাতন্ত্রের বিভিন্ন পাঠগুলোকে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন পাঠগুলো বিভ্রান্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'sq': "Çfarë ka? Duke zhdukur leximet e ndryshme të pronumit `it'", 'et': 'Mis see on? Asenime "it" erinevate lugemite eristamine', 'bs': "Šta je to? Disambiguje različite čitanje pronouna 'it'", 'ca': 'Què és això? Desambiguant les diferents lectures del pronòmen "it"', 'fi': 'Mikä se on? Pronominin "it" eri lukemien erottaminen toisistaan', 'cs': "Co je to? Rozluštění různých čtení zájména `it'", 'jv': "Apane ? Ngubah urip nggambar deweke nggo kelas`it'", 'sk': 'Kaj je to? Razjasnitev različnih odčitkov zaimka "it"', 'he': 'מה קרה? לפרק את הקריאות השונים של המילה "זה"', 'ha': "Mẽne ne? Akwai karatun daban-dabam na `%s'", 'bo': 'འདི་ཅི་རེད། མིང་རྐྱང་འདིའི་ཀློག་འཇུག་མི་འདྲ་བ་ནི་སྒྱུར་མེད་བཟོ་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we address the problem of predicting one of three functions for the English pronoun ‘it’ : anaphoric, event reference or pleonastic. This disambiguation is valuable in the context of machine translation and coreference resolution. We present experiments using a MAXENT classifier trained on gold-standard data and self-training experiments of an RNN trained on silver-standard data, annotated using the MAXENT classifier. Lastly, we report on an analysis of the strengths of these two models.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نتناول مشكلة التنبؤ بواحدة من ثلاث وظائف للضمير الإنجليزي "it": anaphoric أو Event reference أو pleonastic. هذا التوضيح مهم في سياق الترجمة الآلية والقرار المرجعي. نقدم تجارب باستخدام مصنف MAXENT المدرب على البيانات ذات المعيار الذهبي وتجارب التدريب الذاتي لشبكة RNN المدربة على بيانات قياسية فضية ، مشروحة باستخدام المصنف MAXENT. أخيرًا ، نقدم تقريرًا عن تحليل نقاط القوة في هذين النموذجين.', 'es': 'En este artículo, abordamos el problema de predecir una de las tres funciones del pronombre inglés «it»: anafórica, referencia de evento o pleonástica. Esta desambiguación es valiosa en el contexto de la traducción automática y la resolución de correferencias. Presentamos experimentos con un clasificador MAXENT entrenado en datos de referencia y experimentos de autoentrenamiento de una RNN entrenada en datos estándar de plata, anotados con el clasificador MAXENT. Por último, informamos sobre un análisis de los puntos fuertes de estos dos modelos.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de la prédiction de l'une des trois fonctions du pronom anglais «\xa0it\xa0»\xa0: anaphorique, référence d'événement ou pléonastique. Cette désambiguïsation est précieuse dans le contexte de la traduction automatique et de la résolution de coréférence. Nous présentons des expériences utilisant un classificateur MAXENT entraîné sur des données de référence et des expériences d'auto-apprentissage d'un RNN formé sur des données de référence, annotées à l'aide du classificateur MAXENT. Enfin, nous présentons une analyse des points forts de ces deux modèles.", 'pt': "Neste artigo, abordamos o problema de prever uma das três funções para o pronome inglês `it': anafórico, referência de evento ou pleonástico. Essa desambiguação é valiosa no contexto de tradução automática e resolução de correferência. Apresentamos experimentos usando um classificador MAXENT treinado em dados padrão ouro e experimentos de autotreinamento de uma RNN treinada em dados padrão prata, anotados usando o classificador MAXENT. Por fim, relatamos uma análise dos pontos fortes desses dois modelos.", 'ja': 'この論文では、英語の代名詞「it」の3つの関数のいずれかを予測する問題に取り組んでいます。アナフォリック関数、イベントリファレンス関数、または倍音関数です。この曖昧さ解消は、機械翻訳およびコアリファレンス解決の文脈において価値がある。金標準データで訓練されたMaxent分類子を使用した実験と、銀標準データで訓練されたRNNの自己訓練実験を、Maxent分類子を使用して注釈を付けて提示する。最後に、これら2つのモデルの強みの分析を報告します。', 'zh': '本文英语代词"it"三函数之一:anaphoric,event referencepleonastic。 此消歧义在机器翻译共指上下文中颇有价值。 臣等展用黄金标准数之MAXENT分类器实验,及银格数之RNN自练实验,并用MAXENT分类器注释。 最后,我们告诉了这两样。', 'hi': "इस पेपर में, हम अंग्रेजी सर्वनाम 'यह' के लिए तीन कार्यों में से एक की भविष्यवाणी करने की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं: एनाफोरिक, घटना संदर्भ या प्लीओनेस्टिक। यह disambiguation मशीन अनुवाद और coreference संकल्प के संदर्भ में मूल्यवान है. हम सोने के मानक डेटा और चांदी-मानक डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित एक आरएनएन के आत्म-प्रशिक्षण प्रयोगों पर प्रशिक्षित एक मैक्सेंट क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करके प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो मैक्सेंट क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करके एनोटेट किया गया है। अंत में, हम इन दो मॉडलों की ताकत के विश्लेषण पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं।", 'ru': 'В данной работе мы рассмотрим проблему предсказания одной из трех функций английского местоимения «it»: анафорической, эталонной или плеонастической. Это расплывчатость ценна в контексте машинного перевода и разрешения сердечника. Представляем эксперименты с использованием классификатора Maxent, обученного по данным золотого стандарта, и эксперименты по самообучению РНН, обученного по данным серебряного стандарта, аннотированные с использованием КЛАССИФИКАТОРА Maxent. Наконец, мы сообщаем об анализе сильных сторон этих двух моделей.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le ceann de thrí fheidhm a thuar don fhorainm Béarla `it': anaphoric, tagairt imeachta nó pleonastic. Tá an t-idirdhealú seo luachmhar i gcomhthéacs an aistriúcháin mheaisín agus réiteach na croí-chomhdhála. Cuirimid turgnaimh i láthair ag baint úsáide as aicmitheoir MAXENT atá oilte ar shonraí de chaighdeán óir agus turgnaimh féin-oiliúna de chuid RNN atá oilte ar shonraí de chaighdeán airgid, agus anótáilte ag baint úsáide as an aicmitheoir MAXENT. Ar deireadh, tuairiscímid ar anailís ar láidreachtaí an dá mhúnla seo.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a három függvény egyikének előrejelzésével foglalkozunk az angol névmáshoz: anafórikus, eseményreferencia vagy pleonasztikus. Ez az egyértelműsítés értékes a gépi fordítás és a coreferencia felbontás kontextusában. Kísérleteket mutatunk be egy aranyszabású adatokra képzett MAXENT osztályozóval és egy ezüstszabású adatokra képzett RNN önképző kísérleteivel, amelyeket a MAXENT osztályozóval jegyzett meg. Végezetül beszámolunk e két modell erősségének elemzéséről.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ დავწყენებთ პრობლემა, რომელიც სამი ფუნქციების განსაზღვრება ანგორიკური, მოვლენების განსაზღვრება ან პლანოსტიკური. ეს განსხვავება მნიშვნელოვანია მანქანის განსხვავება და წარმოდგენების კონტექსტში. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენებთ MAXENT კლასიფიკაციერის გამოყენება, რომელიც მოსწავლა მონაცემებით და მოსწავლა ექსპერიმენტებით, რომელიც მაXENT კლასიფიკაციერის გამოყენებულია. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ შევხედავთ ამ ორი მოდელის ძალიან ძალიან ანალიზი.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της πρόβλεψης μιας από τις τρεις συναρτήσεις για την αγγλική προφορά: αναφορική, αναφορά γεγονότος ή πληρωνητική. Αυτή η αποσαφήνιση είναι πολύτιμη στο πλαίσιο της μηχανικής μετάφρασης και της επίλυσης της συγχορήγησης. Παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα που χρησιμοποιούν έναν ταξινομητή εκπαιδευμένο σε δεδομένα χρυσού προτύπου και πειράματα αυτοκατάρτισης ενός εκπαιδευμένου σε δεδομένα ασημένιου προτύπου, σχολιασμένα χρησιμοποιώντας τον ταξινομητή ΜΑΧΙΝΤ. Τέλος, αναφέρουμε μια ανάλυση των δυνατοτήτων αυτών των δύο μοντέλων.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз ағылшын тілінің "it" деген үш функциясының біріншісін алдын алатын мәселесін түсіндіреміз: анафориялық, оқиғалардың сілтемесі не плеонастикалық. Бұл бағдарлама машинаны аудару мен қасиеттердің айырмашылығында мәні болады. Біз MAXENT классификациясын алтын- стандартты деректер мен өзіңізді оқыту эксперименттерін қолданатын MAXENT классификациясынан келтіріп, MAXENT классификациясынан оқыту үшін келтіріп тұрған RNN- ге қала Соңында, біз бұл екі үлгілердің күштерін анализ туралы хабарлаймыз.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го решаваме проблемот со предвидувањето на една од трите функции за англискиот прогноз „ it “: анафорски, референциски настани или плонастички. Оваа дејамбигуација е вредна во контекст на машински превод и резолуција на соодветност. Презентираме експерименти користејќи класификатор MAXENT трениран на златни стандардни податоци и експерименти за самообука на РНН трениран на сребрени стандардни податоци, анотиран користејќи го класификаторот MAXENT. На крајот, известуваме за анализа на силите на овие два модели.', 'it': "In questo articolo, affrontiamo il problema di predire una delle tre funzioni per il pronome inglese `it': anaforico, evento di riferimento o pleonastico. Questa disambiguazione è preziosa nel contesto della traduzione automatica e della risoluzione della coreferenza. Presentiamo esperimenti utilizzando un classificatore MAXENT addestrato su dati gold-standard e esperimenti di auto-allenamento di un RNN addestrato su dati silver-standard, annotato utilizzando il classificatore MAXENT. Infine, riportiamo un'analisi dei punti di forza di questi due modelli.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente sprendžiame problem ą prognozuoti vieną iš trijų funkcijų anglų žodžiui "it": anaforišką, įvykio nuorodą arba pleonastinę. Šis nedviprasmiškumas yra vertingas vertimo mašinomis ir koreferencinės rezoliucijos kontekste. Pateikiame eksperimentus naudojant MAXENT klasifikatorių, apmokytų pagal aukso standartinius duomenis ir savarankiškai apmokytų RNN eksperimentus, apmokytų pagal sidabro standartinius duomenis, anotuotus naudojant MAXENT klasifikatorių. Lastly, we report on an analysis of the strengths of these two models.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah meramalkan salah satu dari tiga fungsi untuk pronun Inggeris `it': anaforik, rujukan peristiwa atau pleonastik. Penjelasan ini berharga dalam konteks terjemahan mesin dan resolusi koreferensi. Kami perkenalkan eksperimen menggunakan pengendali MAXENT dilatih pada data piawai emas dan eksperimen latihan diri RNN dilatih pada data piawai perak, dicatat menggunakan pengendali MAXENT. Lastly, we report on an analysis of the strengths of these two models.", 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw il-problema tat-tbassir ta’ waħda mit-tliet funzjonijiet għall-pronoun Ingliż `it': anaforiku, referenza għall-avvenimenti jew pleonastiku. Din id-diżambigwazzjoni hija ta’ valur fil-kuntest tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni u r-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza. Aħna nippreżentaw esperimenti bl-użu ta’ klassifikatur MAXENT imħarreġ fuq dejta standard tad-deheb u esperimenti ta’ awto-taħriġ ta’ RNN imħarreġ fuq dejta standard tal-fidda, annotat bl-użu tal-klassifikatur MAXENT. Fl-aħħar nett, nirrappurtaw dwar analiżi tal-qawwiet ta’ dawn iż-żewġ mudelli.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മൂന്ന് ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രശ്നം പറഞ്ഞുകൊടുക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷവും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ റിസ്റ്റലിന്\u200dറെയും കൂട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെയും കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഈ വി MAXENT ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ഡേറ്റായിട്ടും സ്വയം പരിശീലനങ്ങളില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു RNN പരീക്ഷണത്തിനും ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ടുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ന അവസാനം, ഈ രണ്ട് മോഡലുകളുടെ ശക്തികളെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Англи хэлний утгын гурван функцын нэгийг таамаглах асуудлыг бодож үзнэ. Энэ багасгал нь машины хөрөнгө оруулалт болон тайвны шийдвэрлэлийн тухай үнэ цэнэтэй. Бид алт-стандарт өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын MAXENT хуваалцагч болон өөртөө сургалтын туршилтуудыг ашиглаж, нүдний стандарт өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын РНХ-ын туршилтуудыг ашиглаж, MAXENT хуваалцагч ашиг Эцэст нь бид эдгээр хоёр загварын хүчирхэг чадварын талаар судалгаа өгсөн.', 'pl': "W niniejszym artykule poruszamy problem przewidywania jednej z trzech funkcji dla angielskiego zaimku `it': anaforycznego, odniesienia do zdarzeń lub pleonastycznego. Ta dyjednoznaczność jest cenna w kontekście tłumaczenia maszynowego i rozwiązywania koreferencji. Przedstawiamy eksperymenty z wykorzystaniem klasyfikatora MAXENT przeszkolonego na danych złotych standardów oraz eksperymenty samoprzyszkoleniowe RNN przeszkolonego na danych srebrnych standardów, adnotowane przy użyciu klasyfikatora MAXENT. Na koniec przedstawiamy analizę mocnych stron tych dwóch modeli.", 'no': 'I denne papiret adresserer vi problemet med å foregå ein av tre funksjonar for engelsk pronoun « it »: anaforisk, hendingsreferanse eller pleonastisk. Denne disambiguasjonen er verdileg i konteksten av maskinsomsetjing og oppløysing av koreferansen. Vi presenterer eksperimenter med ein MAXENT- klassifiserer som treng på gull- standard- data og selvøvingseksperimenter av ein RNN som treng på silverstandard- data, merkt med MAXENT- klassifisering. I slutt rapporterer vi om ein analyse av styrkene av desse to modelane.', 'ro': "În această lucrare, abordăm problema predicției uneia dintre cele trei funcții pentru pronumele englez `it': anaforic, referință la evenimente sau pleonastic. Această dezambiguizare este valoroasă în contextul traducerii automate și al rezoluției coreferenței. Vă prezentăm experimente folosind un clasificator MAXENT instruit pe date standard aur și experimente de auto-antrenament ale unui RNN instruit pe date standard argint, adnotat folosind clasificatorul MAXENT. În cele din urmă, prezentăm o analiză a punctelor forte ale acestor două modele.", 'sr': "U ovom papiru rješavamo problem predviđanja jedne od tri funkcije za engleski pronoun `it': anaforična, referencija događaja ili pleonastička. Ova disambiguacija je vrijedna u kontekstu prevoda mašine i rješenja pristojnosti. Predstavljamo eksperimente koristeći MAXENT klasifikatora obučenog na zlatnim standardnim podacima i eksperimentima samobučavanja RNN obučenih na srebrnim standardnim podacima, annotirane koristeći MAXENT klasifikator. Na kraju, prijavljamo analizu snage ovih dva modela.", 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හිතන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය ප්\u200dරශ්න මෙයාන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තනය සහ කෝරෙෆෙරෙන්ස් රිසෝල්යුස් වලින් මෙයාන්ත්\u200dර අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය අපි පරීක්ෂණාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා MAXENT විශේෂකයෙක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා රත්තර-ප්\u200dරමාණික දත්ත සහ ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරේෂනය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සිල අන්තිමට, අපි මේ මොඩේල් දෙකක්ගේ ශක්තිමත් විශ්ලේෂණයක් ගැන විවේශනය කරනවා.', 'sv': "I denna uppsats behandlar vi problemet med att förutsäga en av tre funktioner för det engelska pronomen `it': anaforisk, händelsereferens eller pleonastisk. Denna otvetydighet är värdefull i samband med maskinöversättning och coreference upplösning. Vi presenterar experiment med hjälp av en MAXENT klassificerare utbildad på guld-standard data och självträning experiment av en RNN utbildad på silver-standard data, kommenterad med hjälp av MAXENT klassificerare. Slutligen redogör vi för en analys av styrkorna hos dessa två modeller.", 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மூன்று செயல்பாடுகளில் ஒரு பிரச்சினையை முன்வாக்கிக் கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் 'அது' என்று ஆங்கிலத்திற்க கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் மூலம் இந்த பிரிவு மதிப்புள்ளது. நாம் ஒரு MAXENT வகுப்பாளரை பயன்படுத்தி பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம் ஒரு RNN தானாகவே பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, வெள்ளி நிலையான தரவுகள் மீது, MAXENT வகு கடைசியாக, நாம் இந்த இரண்டு மாதிரிகளின் வலுப்பத்தைப் பற்றி அறிவிக்கிறோம்.", 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے انگلیسی تعلیم کے لئے تین فنکروں میں سے ایک کی پیش بینی کے مسئلہ میں مشکل کا تحقیق کرلیا ہے: نافوریک، ایڈیونٹ ریفنسٹ یا پلوناتیک. یہ غیرقابل غیرقابل تعلیم ماشین کی ترجمہ اور مہربانی رخصت کے منزل میں ہے. ہم ایک MAXENT کلاسیر کے استعمال سے آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں جو سونے-استاندارد ڈاٹ اور خود ترینس کی آزمائش پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے ایک RNN کی چاندی-استاندارد ڈاٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے، MAXENT کلاسیر کے مطابق اظہار کی جاتی ہے. بالآخر، ہم ان دو نمڈلوں کی طاقت کی تحلیل کے بارے میں گزارتے ہیں.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa dhibaatada ka hor dhigidda saddex functions oo afka ingiriisiga lagu magacaabay `taas': sawiraan, aragtida dhacdooyinka ama pleonastic. Kanu waa mid qiimo leh marka lagu jiro turjumista machine iyo go’aanka kaararka. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa imtixaanka ku qoran MAXENT fasax lagu tababaray data-standard dahab iyo imtixaanka iskuulka ah ee RNN lagu baray macluumaadka lacagta-standard, taasoo lagu dhibaataystay isticmaalka MAXENT fasax-tababarida. ugu dambeyso waxaynu wargelinaynaa baaritaanka xoogga labadaas tusaale ah.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz ingliz tilidagi uchta funksiyatlarning biri oldinga muammolarni ko'rib turamiz: anaphorik, event reference or pleonastic. This disambiguation is valuable in the context of machine translation and coreference resolution.  Biz ma'lumotlarni MAXENT klassifisiyasi bilan o'rganamiz, va MAXENT klassifisiyasi bilan bir RNN sohasida o'rganilgan xavf-standard maʼlumotlarida o'rganish imtiyozlar bilan o'rganamiz. Oxirgi, biz bu ikkita modelning xoogligini aniqlash haqida xabar beramiz.", 'vi': "Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề dự đoán một trong ba chức năng của đại từ tiếng Anh'it': Anaphoric, sự kiện tham khảo hay pleonastic. Sự thất bại này rất có giá trị trong việc dịch chuyển máy và giải quyết hạn hẹp. Chúng tôi có thí nghiệm sử dụng một chuyên gia cấp bậc MAliên bang được đào tạo về dữ liệu mẫu vàng và thử nghiệm tự đào tạo RNN được đào tạo trên dữ liệu mẫu mực bạc, được ghi chú bằng các phân loại MAV. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi báo cáo về một cuộc phân tích điểm mạnh của hai mẫu này.", 'da': "I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med at forudsige en af tre funktioner for det engelske stedord `it': anaforisk, hændelsesreference eller pleonastisk. Denne forståelse er værdifuld i forbindelse med maskinoversættelse og coreferenceopløsning. Vi præsenterer eksperimenter ved hjælp af en MAXENT klassificering trænet på guld-standard data og selvtræning eksperimenter af en RNN trænet på sølv-standard data, annoteret ved hjælp af MAXENT klassificering. Endelig rapporterer vi om en analyse af styrkerne ved disse to modeller.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru rješavamo problem predviđanja jedne od tri funkcije za engleski pronoun `it': anaforična, referencija događaja ili pleonastička. Ova disambiguacija je vrijedna u kontekstu prevoda i rješenja pristojnosti strojeva. Predstavljamo eksperimente koristeći MAXENT klasifikatora obučenog na zlatnim standardnim podacima i eksperimentima samobučenja RNN obučenih na srebrnim standardnim podacima, navodno korištenim MAXENT klasifikatorom. Na kraju, izvještavamo analizu snage ovih dva modela.", 'bg': 'В тази статия разглеждаме проблема с предсказването на една от трите функции за английското местоимение: анафорична, референтна или плеонастична. Това разграничение е ценно в контекста на машинния превод и резолюцията на кореференцията. Представяме експерименти с помощта на класификатор МАКСЕНТ обучен върху златни стандарти данни и експерименти с самообучение на РНН обучен върху сребърни стандарти данни, анотиран с помощта на класификатора МАКСЕНТ. И накрая, докладваме за анализ на силните страни на тези два модела.', 'nl': "In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van het voorspellen van een van de drie functies voor het Engelse voornaamwoord 'it': anaforisch, gebeurtenisreferentie of pleonastisch. Deze verduidelijking is waardevol in de context van machinevertaling en coreferentie resolutie. We presenteren experimenten met behulp van een MAXENT classificator getraind op goud-standaard data en zelftraining experimenten van een RNN getraind op zilver-standaard data, geannoteerd met behulp van de MAXENT classificator. Ten slotte rapporteren we over een analyse van de sterke punten van deze twee modellen.", 'de': "In dieser Arbeit behandeln wir das Problem der Vorhersage einer von drei Funktionen für das englische Pronomen `it': anaphorisch, Ereignisreferenz oder pleonastisch. Diese Begriffsklärung ist im Zusammenhang mit maschineller Übersetzung und Coreferenz Resolution wertvoll. Wir präsentieren Experimente mit einem MAXENT-Klassifikator, der auf Goldstandarddaten trainiert wurde, und Selbsttrainingsexperimente eines RNN, das auf Silberstandarddaten trainiert wurde und mit dem MAXENT-Klassifikator kommentiert wurde. Abschließend berichten wir über eine Analyse der Stärken dieser beiden Modelle.", 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah memprediksi salah satu dari tiga fungsi untuk pronun Inggris `it': anafora, referensi peristiwa atau pleonastik. Pengambiguasi ini berharga dalam konteks terjemahan mesin dan resolusi koreferensi. Kami mempersembahkan eksperimen menggunakan klasifikasi MAXENT dilatih pada data standar emas dan eksperimen latihan diri RNN dilatih pada data standar perak, annotasi menggunakan klasifikasi MAXENT. Akhirnya, kami melaporkan analisis kekuatan dua model ini.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia tatizo la kutabiri moja ya kazi tatu kwa Kiingereza kinachotangazwa ‘hilo’: utambulisho, maoni ya tukio au utambulisho. Kutofautiana na hali hii ina thamani katika muktadha wa kutafsiri mashine na suluhisho la mafanikio. Tunaonyesha majaribio kwa kutumia mwandishi wa MAXENT aliyefundishwa kwa taarifa za dhahabu za kiwango cha kawaida na majaribio ya mafunzo ya kibinafsi ya RNN yaliyofundishwa kwa takwimu za fedha, yaliyodhihirishwa kwa kutumia mwandishi wa MAXENT. Mwisho, tunaripoti kuhusu uchambuzi wa nguvu za mifano hizi mbili.', 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 영어 대명사인'it'를 예측하는 세 가지 기능 중 하나인 반지, 사건 지섭 또는 다음을 논의했다.기계 번역과 공통적으로 해소를 가리키는 배경에서 이런 해소는 가치가 있다.금 표준 데이터 기반의 맥스앤티 분류기를 사용해 훈련하는 실험과 맥스앤티 분류기 주석을 사용한 은 표준 데이터 기반의 RNN의 자체 훈련 실험을 소개했다.마지막으로 우리는 이 두 모델의 장점을 분석했다.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons adres die probleem van die voorskou van een van drie funksies vir die Engelske pronoun `it': anafories, gebeurtenis verwysing of pleonastieke. Hierdie ontwikkeling is waardelik in die konteks van masjien vertaling en koreferensie oplossing. Ons voorsien eksperimente met 'n MAXENT klassifiseerder wat op goud-standaard data en self-oefening eksperimente van' n RNN wat op silwer-standaard data opgelei is, wat aangekies word deur die MAXENT klassifiseerder te gebruik. Las, ons rapporteer op 'n analiseer van die sterkte van hierdie twee modele.", 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë problemin e parashikimit të një nga tre funksionet për pronumin anglez `it': anaforik, referim ngjarjesh apo pleonastik. Kjo çambiguacion është i vlefshëm në kontekstin e përkthimit të makinave dhe zgjidhjes së korreferencës. Ne prezantojmë eksperimente duke përdorur një klasifikues MAXENT të stërvitur në të dhëna të standartit të arit dhe eksperimente vetë-stërvitjeje të një RNN të stërvitur në të dhëna të standartit të argjendit, të shënuar duke përdorur klasifikuesin MAXENT. Më në fund, ne raportojmë mbi një analizë të fortësive të këtyre dy modeleve.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل پیش\u200cبینی یکی از سه تابع\u200cهای انگلیسی را درباره\u200cی پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنیم: « آن »: نافوریک، مرتبط رویداد یا پلوناتیک. این ناآزمایش در محیط ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و حل\u200cسازی قابل ارزش است. ما آزمایشات را با استفاده از یک راهنمایی MAXENT که روی داده های استاندارد طلا و آزمایشات خودآموزش آموزش داده شده از RNN که روی داده های استاندارد نقره آموزش داده شده، با استفاده از راهنمایی MAXENT آموزش داده می کنیم، پیشنهاد می کنیم. بالاخره، ما در مورد تحلیل قدرت این دو مدل گزارش می دهیم.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ከሦስት የኢንጂልዩን ሥራ አንዱን ለመቀበል እናስቸግራለን፡፡ አናፎክሪክ፣ የጉዳዩ መልዕክት ወይም ፕሎናስቲክ፡፡ ይህ አካባቢ በመሳዊ ትርጉም እና የቆርፍ ትርጉም ውስጥ ጥሩ ነው፡፡ MAXENT በተመሳሳይ የብር-standard ዳታ እና የራሳቸውን ትምህርት ፈተና በመጠቀም MAXENT ክፍተቶችን በሚያስተማሩ የብር-ድጋፍ ዳታዎችን በሚያስተማሩበት የRNN ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም የሁለቱን ምሳሌዎች ኃይልን በማስተዋል እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, İngilizə sözləri üçün üç fəaliyyətdən birini təxmin etmək problemini çəkirik: anaforik, vaxt referans və pleonastik. Bu dəyişiklik maşın çevirilməsi və mərhəmət çözünürlüyünün məlumatında qiymətlidir. Biz qızıl-standart verilər və özü-təhsil edilən RNN təhsil edilmiş gümüş-standart verilərdə təhsil edilmiş, MAXENT klasifikatı ilə təhsil edilmiş MAXENT klasifikatının istifadəsində təhsil edilən təcrübələrini göstəririk. Sonunda, bu iki modelin gücünün analizi barəsində xəbər veririk.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք անգլերենի «it»-ի երեք ֆունկցիաներից մեկի կանխատեսման խնդիրը՝ անաֆորիկ, իրադարձությունների հաղորդակցման կամ պլեոնատիկ: Այս բացատրությունը արժեքավոր է մեքենայի թարգմանման և կորֆերենսի լուծումների կոնտեքստում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք փորձարկումներ, օգտագործելով MAXENT դասակարգիչը, որը վարժեցվել է ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալների և ինքնավարժեցման փորձարկումների վրա, որը վարժեցվել է արծաթ ստանդարտ տվյալների վրա, որոնք գրված են MAXENT դասակարգիչը օգ Վերջապես, մենք զեկուցում ենք այս երկու մոդելների ուժեղությունների վերլուծության մասին:', 'bn': "In this paper, we address the problem of predicting one of three functions for the English pronoun `it': anaphoric, event reference or pleonastic.  মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং কোরেফেন্সের সিদ্ধান্তের প্রেক্ষাপটে এই বিভ্রান্তিগুলো মূল্যবান। আমরা একটি ম্যাক্সেন্ট পরীক্ষা ব্যবহার করে সোনা স্ট্যান্ডার্ড ড ডাটা এবং স্বেচ্ছাস্থ্য প্রশিক্ষণের পরীক্ষায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছি, যা ম্যাক্সে শেষে, আমরা এই দুই মডেলের শক্তির বিশ্লেষণের ব্যাপারে রিপোর্ট করি।", 'bs': "U ovom papiru rješavamo problem predviđanja jedne od tri funkcije za engleski pronoun `it': anaforična, referencija događaja ili pleonastička. Ova disambiguacija je vrijedna u kontekstu prevoda strojeva i rješenja pristojnosti. Predstavljamo eksperimente koristeći MAXENT klasifikatora obučenog na zlatnim standardnim podacima i eksperimentima samobučenja RNN obučenih na srebrnim standardnim podacima, annotirane koristeći MAXENT klasifikator. Na kraju, izvještavamo analizu snage ovih dva modela.", 'ca': 'En aquest article, abordem el problema de predir una de les tres funcions del pronòmen anglès "it": anafòric, referència a eventos o pleonastic. Aquesta desambiguació és valiosa en el contexte de la traducció automàtica i la resolució de coreferència. Presentam experiments utilitzant un classificador MAXENT entrenat en dades d\'or standard i experiments d\'autoentrenament d\'un RNN entrenat en dades d\'argent standard, anotats utilitzant el classificador MAXENT. Finalment, informem d\'una an àlisi de les forces d\'aquests dos models.', 'cs': "V tomto článku se zabýváme problémem predikce jedné ze tří funkcí pro anglické zájmeno `it': anaforické, událostní reference nebo pleonastické. Toto rozcestnění je cenné v kontextu strojového překladu a koreferenčního řešení. Představujeme experimenty s využitím klasifikátoru MAXENT trénovaného na zlatých standardních datech a samotného tréninku RNN trénovaného na stříbrných datech anotovaných klasifikátorem MAXENT. Nakonec zprávu o analýze silných stránek těchto dvou modelů.", 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme ongelmaa ennustaa yksi kolmesta englanninkielisen pronominin `it': anaforinen, tapahtumaviittaus tai pleonastinen funktio. Tämä erottelu on arvokasta konekäännöksen ja koreferenssin resoluution kannalta. Esitämme kokeita käyttäen kultaiseen dataan koulutettua MAXENT-luokituslaitetta sekä hopeastandardiin perustuvaan dataan koulutettua RNN:ää, johon on merkitty MAXENT-luokituslaitetta. Lopuksi raportoimme analyysistä näiden kahden mallin vahvuuksista.", 'et': "Käesolevas töös käsitleme probleemi ennustada üks kolmest funktsioonist inglise asesõna `it': anafooriline, sündmuse viide või pleonastiline. Selline selgitus on väärtuslik masintõlke ja kortereferentsi lahenduse kontekstis. Esitleme eksperimente kuldstandardi andmetel koolitatud MAXENT klassifikaatori ja hõbedase andmetel koolitatud RNNi enesetreeningkatseid, mis on märgitud MAXENT klassifikaatori abil. Lõpuks anname aru nende kahe mudeli tugevate külgede analüüsi kohta.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz Iňlis dilinde 'it' üç funksiýanyň birini täze etmek üçin mesele çözýäris: anaforik, evet derejesi ýa-da pleonastik. Bu çykyş maşynyň terjime we çykyş çykyşynyň kontekstinde mykdarly. Biz MAXENT klasifikatyny altyn standart maglumaty we özü-okuwçy barlamasynda bilinmeli bir RNN deneylerini golüm-standart maglumaty üçin ulanýarys. MAXENT klasifikatynda bilinmeli deneyler bar. Soňunda biz bu iki nusganyň güýçleriniň ýüzüni çözümleşdirdik.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מתייחסים לבעיה של צפוי אחד משלושה תפקידים למילה אנגלית "it": אנפורית, התייחסות לאירועים או פלאונסטית. הפרעה הזאת חשובה בקשר לתרגום מכונות ולפתרון התאמה. אנחנו מציגים ניסויים באמצעות מסגר מקסינט מאומן על נתונים סטנדרטיים זהב וניסויים לאימון עצמי של RNN מאומן על נתונים סטנדרטים כסף, מוצב באמצעות מסגר מקסינט. סוף סוף, אנחנו מדווחים על ניתוח של כוחות של שני הדוגמנים האלה.', 'jv': 'Where am I Ngubah Karo Ngubah Name Y챔n챕 dh챕w챕 pisan nganggo samsul kanggo nggawe sistem sing bisa model iki.', 'sk': "V prispevku obravnavamo problem napovedovanja ene od treh funkcij za angleški zaimek `it': anaforična, dogodkovna referenca ali pleonastična. Ta razločitev je dragocena v kontekstu strojnega prevajanja in koreferenčne ločljivosti. Predstavljamo eksperimente z uporabo MAXENT klasifikatorja, usposobljenega na zlatih standardnih podatkih, in eksperimente samousposabljanja RNN, usposobljenega na srebrnih standardnih podatkih, označene z uporabo MAXENT klasifikatorja. Na koncu poročamo o analizi prednosti teh dveh modelov.", 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya masu gabatar da ɗayan abu uku wa Ingiriya da aka faɗa `it': anaforiki, fassarar event ko la'anastic. @ info: tooltip Tuna halatar da jarrabai da MAXENT mai tsaro a kan data-na-daidaita na zĩnãriya da jarrabãwa masu yin amfani da RNN wanda aka yi wa shirin da shi a kan data-na-kiityuta, da aka sanar da shi misalin mai MAXENT. Laƙari, Munã bãyar da lãbãri a kan anayyar masu ƙarfin waɗannan misãlai biyu.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་རིམ་སྒྲིག རྩ་མེད་བཟོ་བྱེད་འདི་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་གདོང་རིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་རིན་ཐང་ཡིན། We present experiments using a MAXENT classifier trained on gold-standard data and self-training experiments of an RNN trained on silver-standard data, annotated using the MAXENT classifier. Name མཐའ་མར་དུ། འུ་ཚོས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་འདིའི་ནུས་པ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Revisiting Selectional Preferences for Coreference Resolution', 'ar': 'إعادة النظر في التفضيلات الاختيارية لقرار Coreference', 'es': 'Revisión de las preferencias de selección para la resolución de correferencias', 'pt': 'Revisitando preferências de seleção para resolução de correferência', 'fr': 'Revoir les préférences de sélection pour la résolution de coréférence', 'ja': 'コアリファレンス解決のための選択環境設定の再検討', 'zh': '重访共推理解析选首选项', 'hi': 'Coreference संकल्प के लिए चयन प्राथमिकताओं revisiting', 'ru': 'Повторный просмотр выборочных предпочтений по разрешению ядра', 'ga': 'Ag Athfhéachaint ar Roghanna Roghnacha le haghaidh Taifeach Croítheachta', 'el': 'Επανεξέταση των προτιμήσεων επιλογής για την επίλυση της Coreferenz', 'ka': 'მონიშნული პარამეტრების რეზიუციაცია', 'hu': 'A kiválasztási beállítások felülvizsgálata a Coreferencia-feloldáshoz', 'it': 'Revisione delle preferenze selettive per la risoluzione di Coreference', 'kk': 'Таңдау параметрлерін қайталау', 'lt': 'Peržiūrėti atrankos prioritetus, taikomus koreferenciniam sprendimui', 'mk': 'Revisiting Selectional Preferences for Coreference Resolution', 'ms': 'Mengubah Keutamaan Pemilihan untuk Resolusi Kesuaian', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റലിനുള്ള തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dഗണനകള്\u200d വീണ്ടും മാറ്റുന്നു', 'mn': 'Шинэ сонголтын сонголтуудыг шийдвэрлэх', 'mt': 'Reviżjoni tal-Preferenzi Selettivi għar-Riżoluzzjoni tal-Koreferenza', 'no': 'Gjenopprettar val-innstillingar for oppløysing av hovudforvalet', 'pl': 'Przegląd preferencji wyboru dla rozwiązywania Coreference', 'ro': 'Revizuirea preferințelor selecționale pentru rezoluția Coreferenței', 'sr': 'Revizija izbornih preferencija za rezoluciju korisnosti', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂණය සඳහා තෝරාගන්න තෝරාගන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista doorashooyinka la doortay', 'sv': 'Revidering av valinställningar för Coreference-upplösning', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்ற திரைத்திறனுக்கான தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு விருப்பங்களை மீள்நோக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'غوراوی رخصوص کے لئے انتخاب غوراوی دوباره سنائی جاتی ہیں', 'uz': 'Toò£gò£ri burchak', 'vi': 'Chỉnh lại mục ưa thích ứng trước Giải quyết', 'bg': 'Преразглеждане на селекционните предпочитания за резолюция на Coreference', 'da': 'Revidering af valgpræferencer for Coreference-opløsning', 'hr': 'Revizija izbornih preferencija za rezoluciju korisnosti', 'nl': 'Herziening van selectievoorkeuren voor Coreference Resolutie', 'fa': 'بازگرداندن گزینه\u200cهای انتخاب برای حل\u200cسازی پیشنهاد', 'id': 'Mengubah Preferensi Pemilihan untuk Resolusi Koreferensi', 'de': 'Überarbeitung der Selektionseinstellungen für die Coreference-Auflösung', 'ko': '공지소해의 선택 선호를 재검토하다', 'sw': 'Kubadili Tayarisho la Uchaguzi', 'tr': 'Seçenekler Çaşyrymy üçin Däşer Seçenekleri', 'af': 'Hersiening van Keuse Voorkeure vir Voorkeure Oplossing', 'sq': 'Duke revizuar preferimet zgjedhore për zgjidhjen e Koreferencës', 'az': 'Se칞ili Se칞iml톛r Se칞iml톛ri', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Կորեֆերնսի լուծումների ընտրական նախագծերը վերանայելը', 'bn': 'নির্বাচিত পছন্দসমূহ পরিবর্তন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Revizija izbornih preferencija za rezoluciju korisnosti', 'cs': 'Revize výběrových předvoleb pro řešení Coreference', 'ca': 'Revisió de Preferencies Seleccionals per a la Resolució de Coreferència', 'et': "Coreference'i resolutsiooni valikuliste eelistuste läbivaatamine", 'fi': 'Coreference-resoluution valinnaisten asetusten tarkistaminen', 'sk': 'Pregled izbirnih nastavitev za ločljivost Coreference', 'he': 'Revisiting Selectional Preferences for Coreference Resolution', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'གདམ་ཁ་ཡུལ་ལ་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ་བསྐྱར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Selectional preferences have long been claimed to be essential for coreference resolution. However, they are modeled only implicitly by current coreference resolvers. We propose a dependency-based embedding model of selectional preferences which allows fine-grained compatibility judgments with high coverage. Incorporating our model improves performance, matching state-of-the-art results of a more complex system. However, it comes with a cost that makes it debatable how worthwhile are such improvements.', 'ar': 'لطالما زُعم أن التفضيلات الانتقائية ضرورية لتحليل المرجع. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم تصميمها بشكل ضمني فقط بواسطة أدوات حل المرجع المرجعي الحالية. نقترح نموذج التضمين القائم على التبعية للتفضيلات الانتقائية والذي يسمح بأحكام توافق دقيقة مع تغطية عالية. يؤدي دمج نموذجنا إلى تحسين الأداء ، ومطابقة أحدث النتائج لنظام أكثر تعقيدًا. ومع ذلك ، فإنه يأتي بتكلفة تجعلها قابلة للنقاش حول مدى جدارة هذه التحسينات.', 'es': 'Durante mucho tiempo se ha afirmado que las preferencias seleccionales son esenciales para la resolución de correferencias. Sin embargo, solo se modelan implícitamente mediante los solucionadores de correferencias actuales. Proponemos un modelo de incrustación de preferencias de selección basado en la dependencia que permite juicios de compatibilidad detallados con una alta cobertura. La incorporación de nuestro modelo mejora el rendimiento, al igualar los resultados de vanguardia de un sistema más complejo. Sin embargo, tiene un costo que hace discutible cuán valiosas son esas mejoras.', 'pt': 'As preferências de seleção há muito são consideradas essenciais para a resolução de correferência. No entanto, eles são modelados apenas implicitamente pelos resolvedores de correferência atuais. Propomos um modelo de incorporação de preferências seletivas baseado em dependências que permite julgamentos de compatibilidade refinados com alta cobertura. Incorporar nosso modelo melhora o desempenho, combinando resultados de última geração de um sistema mais complexo. No entanto, ele vem com um custo que torna discutível o quanto essas melhorias valem a pena.', 'fr': "Les préférences de sélection ont longtemps été considérées comme essentielles pour la résolution de coréférence. Cependant, ils ne sont modélisés qu'implicitement par les résolveurs de coréférence actuels. Nous proposons un modèle d'intégration des préférences sélectives basé sur la dépendance qui permet des jugements de compatibilité précis avec une couverture élevée. L'intégration de notre modèle améliore les performances, ce qui correspond aux résultats de pointe d'un système plus complexe. Cependant, cela a un coût qui rend discutable la valeur de telles améliorations.", 'ja': '選択的嗜好は、コアリファレンス解決に不可欠であると長い間主張されてきた。ただし、それらは現在のコア参照リゾルバによって暗黙的にモデリングされるだけである。選択嗜好の依存性ベースの埋め込みモデルを提案し、高いカバレッジで細かい互換性の判断を可能にします。当社のモデルを組み込むことで、パフォーマンスが向上し、より複雑なシステムの最先端の結果にマッチします。しかし、そのような改善がいかに価値があるかを議論することができるコストが付属しています。', 'zh': '久之,人称择偏好于共指征为重。 然止于当今共引解析器隐式建模。 吾举一以偏善销之,许以高覆盖率之细粒度兼容性。 合吾形以崇性,配吾统之先进。 然其所致成本,使此改进之直可商榷也。', 'hi': 'चयन प्राथमिकताओं को लंबे समय से कोरफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए आवश्यक होने का दावा किया गया है। हालांकि, वे केवल वर्तमान कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्वर द्वारा अंतर्निहित रूप से मॉडलिंग कर रहे हैं। हम चयनात्मक वरीयताओं के एक निर्भरता-आधारित एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो उच्च कवरेज के साथ ठीक-ठीक संगतता निर्णय की अनुमति देता है। हमारे मॉडल को शामिल करने से प्रदर्शन में सुधार होता है, जो अधिक जटिल प्रणाली के अत्याधुनिक परिणामों से मेल खाता है। हालांकि, यह एक लागत के साथ आता है जो इसे बहस योग्य बनाता है कि इस तरह के सुधार कितने सार्थक हैं।', 'ru': 'Селективные предпочтения уже давно заявлены как необходимые для разрешения основной ориентации. Тем не менее, они моделируются только неявно с помощью текущих распознавателей ядра. Мы предлагаем модель встраивания выборочных предпочтений на основе зависимостей, которая позволяет оценивать мелкозернистую совместимость с высоким охватом. Внедрение нашей модели улучшает производительность, сопоставляя самые современные результаты более сложной системы. Однако это сопряжено с расходами, которые делают спорным вопрос о том, насколько ценными являются такие улучшения.', 'ga': 'Táthar ag maíomh le fada go bhfuil roghanna roghnacha bunriachtanach le haghaidh réiteach croí-chomhdhála. Mar sin féin, ní mhúnlaítear iad ach go hintuigthe ag réiteoirí croí-chomhdhála reatha. Molaimid samhail leabú bunaithe ar spleáchas de roghanna roghnaithe a cheadaíonn breithiúnais chomhoiriúnachta mhionsonraithe le clúdach ard. Feabhsaítear an fheidhmíocht trí ár múnla a ionchorprú, ag teacht le torthaí úrscothacha ó chóras níos casta. Mar sin féin, baineann costas leis a chuireann in iúl cé chomh fiúntach atá feabhsuithe den sórt sin.', 'hu': 'A szelekciós preferenciák már régóta alapvetőek a coreferencia feloldásához. Ugyanakkor ezeket csak implicit módon modellezik a jelenlegi coreferencia resolverek. Javasoljuk a szelekciós preferenciák függőségi alapú beágyazási modelljét, amely lehetővé teszi a finom szemű kompatibilitási ítéletek magas lefedettséggel. Modellünk beépítése javítja a teljesítményt, összehangolva egy összetettebb rendszer korszerű eredményeit. Mindazonáltal olyan költségekkel jár, amelyek vitathatóvá teszik, mennyire érdemesek az ilyen fejlesztések.', 'el': 'Οι επιλεκτικές προτιμήσεις έχουν εδώ και καιρό ισχυριστεί ότι είναι απαραίτητες για την επίλυση της συναπόφασης. Ωστόσο, μοντελοποιούνται μόνο έμμεσα από τους τρέχοντες επιλυτές συναφειρέσεων. Προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης επιλεκτικών προτιμήσεων βασισμένο στην εξάρτηση που επιτρέπει λεπτόκοκκες εκτιμήσεις συμβατότητας με υψηλή κάλυψη. Η ενσωμάτωση του μοντέλου μας βελτιώνει την απόδοση, ταιριάζοντας με τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας ενός πιο σύνθετου συστήματος. Ωστόσο, έρχεται με ένα κόστος που καθιστά αμφίβολο πόσο αξίζουν τέτοιες βελτιώσεις.', 'ka': 'მონიშნული პარამეტრები ძალიან წარმოდგენა, რომ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელია. მაგრამ, ისინი მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მიმდინარე წარმოადგილების მოდელირებულია. ჩვენ მივეღებთ მონიშნული პროფილექციების მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო დიდი კომპექცირებულობის შესაძლებლობად გავაკეთება. ჩვენი მოდელის შექმნა უფრო კომპლექსიკური სისტემის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი მაგრამ, ეს იქნება, რომელიც უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, როგორ უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია.', 'it': "Le preferenze di selezione sono state a lungo ritenute essenziali per la risoluzione della coreferenza. Tuttavia, sono modellati solo implicitamente dai resolver di coreferenza attuali. Proponiamo un modello di incorporazione basato sulla dipendenza delle preferenze selettive che consente giudizi di compatibilità a grana fine con alta copertura. Incorporare il nostro modello migliora le prestazioni, abbinando risultati all'avanguardia di un sistema più complesso. Tuttavia, ha un costo che rende discutibile quanto valgano la pena di tali miglioramenti.", 'kk': 'Таңдау параметрлері сәйкестіктердің айырмашылығы үшін көп уақытта қажетті деп сұралады. Бірақ оларды тек қазіргі сәйкестік шешушілер үшін үлгіледі. Біз таңдалған параметрлердің тәуелдік негізделген ендіру үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл үлгілерді жоғары мәтіндіктердің тәуелдіктік түсініктеріне мүмкінді Өзіміздің үлгімізді құру үшін әрекеттерді жақсарту, кәдімгі жүйеңіздің күйіне сәйкес келетін нәтижелерін жақсарту. Бірақ бұл мәселелерді жақсарту үшін қанша мәселелерді өзгертуге болады.', 'lt': 'Jau seniai teigiama, kad atrankos lengvatos yra labai svarbios norint išspręsti koreferencijas. Tačiau jos modeliuojamos tik netiesiogiai pagal dabartinius koreferencinius sprendimus. Siūlome priklausomybės pagrindu pagrįstą atrankinių preferencijų įtraukimo model į, kuris leidžia priimti griežtai apdorotus sprendimus dėl suderinamumo su didele apimtimi. Mūsų modelio įtraukimas gerina našumą ir atitinka sudėtingesnės sistemos naujausius rezultatus. However, it comes with a cost that makes it debatable how worthwhile are such improvements.', 'mk': 'Селекционалните преференции долго време се тврдат дека се суштински за решавање на соодветноста. Сепак, тие се моделирани само имплицитно од актуелните решители на современост. Предложуваме модел на селективни преференции, заснован на зависност, кој овозможува одлуки за компатибилност со високо покривање. Вклучувањето на нашиот модел ја подобрува перформансата, споредувајќи се со најдобрите резултати на покомплексен систем. However, it comes with a cost that makes it debatable how worthwhile are such improvements.', 'ms': 'Keutamaan pemilihan telah lama dikatakan penting untuk resolusi rujukan. Namun, mereka dimodelkan secara implicit hanya oleh penyelesaikan koreferensi semasa. Kami mencadangkan model penyembedding berdasarkan dependensi keutamaan pemilihan yang membolehkan penghakiman kompatibilitas dengan bentuk tertinggi. Memasukkan model kita meningkatkan prestasi, sepadan dengan hasil-state-of-the-art sistem yang lebih kompleks. Namun, ia datang dengan biaya yang membuat ia boleh dibahas betapa berharganya perbaikan seperti itu.', 'ml': 'തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dഗണനകള്\u200d കോര്\u200dഫനെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റലിന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്ന് വിചാരിക എന്നാലും, ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ തീരുമാനം മാത്രമേ അവയെ മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ. നമ്മള്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന മാതൃകയാണെന്ന് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് നല്ല കൈക്ക നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സംവ എന്നാലും ഇതിന്റെ വില കൊണ്ട് വരുന്നത് ഇത്രയും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്', 'mt': "Il-preferenzi selettivi ilhom jitolbu li huma essenzjali għar-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza. Madankollu, huma mmudellati biss impliċitament minn riżolturi ta’ koreferenza attwali. Aħna qed nipproponu mudell ta' inkorporazzjoni bbażat fuq id-dipendenza ta' preferenzi selettivi li jippermetti sentenzi ta' kompatibbiltà b'għamla fina b'kopertura għolja. L-inkorporazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna ttejjeb il-prestazzjoni u tqabbel ir-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati ta’ sistema aktar kumplessa. Madankollu, dan jirriżulta minn spejjeż li jagħmluha diskussibbli kemm jiswew tali titjib.", 'mn': 'Шинэ сонголтын сонголтууд зөвхөн зөвшөөрөлт шийдвэрлэх шаардлагатай гэсэн үг. Гэхдээ эдгээрийг одоогийн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн зөвхөн заавал шийдвэрлэгчдийн ар Бид хамааралтай байдлын үндсэн сонголтын сонголтуудын загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь өндөр дүгнэлттэй холбоотой байдлын шийдвэр болох юм. Бидний загварын нэгдэл нь илүү нарийн системийн үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг, илүү нарийн урлагийн үр дүнг тогтоох. Гэхдээ энэ үнэ цэнэтэй хувьд хэрхэн үнэ цэнэтэй вэ гэдгийг хэлэх зардалтай болдог.', 'ro': 'Preferințele selecționale au fost susținute de mult timp ca fiind esențiale pentru rezolvarea corefenței. Cu toate acestea, ele sunt modelate doar implicit de rezolvătoarele de corefență actuale. Propunem un model de încorporare bazat pe dependență a preferințelor selecționale, care permite judecăți fine de compatibilitate cu o acoperire ridicată. Integrarea modelului nostru îmbunătățește performanța, potrivind rezultatele de ultimă generație ale unui sistem mai complex. Cu toate acestea, vine cu un cost care face discutabil cât de valoroase sunt astfel de îmbunătățiri.', 'pl': 'Preferencje selekcyjne od dawna uważa się za istotne dla rozwiązywania współdziałalności. Są one jednak modelowane tylko domyślnie przez obecne rozwiązania współreferencyjne. Proponujemy model osadzania preferencji selekcyjnych oparty na zależności, który umożliwia precyzyjne oceny zgodności z dużym zasięgiem. Włączenie naszego modelu poprawia wydajność, dopasowując najnowocześniejsze wyniki bardziej złożonego systemu. Wiąże się jednak z kosztami, które sprawiają, że warto dyskutować, jak warto takie ulepszenia są.', 'no': 'Veljarval har langt tvrd at det er viktig for oppløysing av koreferansen. Dei er likevel modelte berre implisitt av gjeldande koreferanse-oppløysar. Vi foreslår ein modell for innbygging av utvalleg innstillingar basert på avhengighet som tillater sprøytebrukar for kompatibilitet med høg dekking. Inkorporasjon av modellen vårt forbetrar utviklinga, samsvarende tilstand av kunsten til eit meir kompleks system. Det kommer imidlertid med ein kostnad som gjer det debattbar korleis verdien er slike forbedringar.', 'sr': 'Odborne preferencije su dugo tvrdene da su ključne za rješenje pristojnosti. Međutim, oni su modelirani samo implicitno od strane trenutnih rezolutora ljubaznosti. Mi predlažemo model ugrađenog na osnovu zavisnosti selektivnih preferencija koji omogućava odluke o kompatibilnosti sa visokim pokrivanjem. Uključujući naš model, poboljšava performancu, odgovarajući rezultati stanja umjetnosti kompleksnijeg sistema. Međutim, to dolazi sa troškovima koji čini raspravu koliko je vredno tako poboljšanja.', 'sv': 'Selektionspreferenser har länge hävdats vara nödvändiga för coreference upplösning. De modelleras dock endast implicit av nuvarande coreference resolvers. Vi föreslår en beroendebaserad inbäddningsmodell av selektiva preferenser som möjliggör finkorniga kompatibilitetsbedömningar med hög täckning. Att införliva vår modell förbättrar prestandan och matchar toppmoderna resultat från ett mer komplext system. Det kommer dock med en kostnad som gör det diskutabelt hur värdefulla sådana förbättringar är.', 'so': 'Selectional preferences have long been claimed to be essential for coreference resolution.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxaa loo sameynayaa wax aan saamayn ahayn oo ay sameynayaan xafiiska shaqada. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa tusaale ka mid ah howlaha doorashada oo ku xiran ku saabsan, kaasoo u ogolaada xukummada isku qiimo-qabsashada oo aad u dheer. Tilmaankeenna horumarinta horumarinta horumarinta, si u eg arimaha farshaxanka ee nidaamka ka adag. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa ku imaanaya kharash, taasoo ka dhigaya debaasho inta ay qiimo u tahay horumarinta.', 'ta': 'தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட முன்னுரிமைகள் குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கு முக்கியமாக இருக்கும் என்று  ஆனால், தற்போதைய குறிப்பு முடிவுகள் மூலம் மட்டும் தெரியாத மாதிரியாக உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. நாம் சார்பு அடிப்படையில் உள்ளடக்க மாதிரி தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட முன்னுரிமைகளின் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது  எங்கள் மாதிரியை அதிகரிக்கும் சிக்கலான அமைப்பின் நிலையில்- கலை முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துகிறது. எனினும், அது ஒரு செலவுடன் வருகிறது அது எவ்வளவு மதிப்பு என்று விவாதமாக்குகிறது.', 'si': 'තෝරාගන්න තෝරාගන්න ගොඩක් වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා. නමුත්, ඔවුන් මොඩල් කරලා තියෙන්නේ පුළුවන් කෝරෙෆෙරෙෆෙන්සර් වලින් විතරයි. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධිර්භාවිත විශ්වාසයෙන් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ  අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් වැඩි කරනවා, වඩා සංකුර්ණ පද්ධතියක් ගැන සම්පූර ඒත්, ඒකෙන් විශේෂයක් තියෙනවා ඒකෙන් විශේෂය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'ur': 'انتخاب کی ترجیح بہت سی مدت گزر گئی ہے کہ مہربانی رخصت کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ لیکن ان کی نمونش صرف وہاں کے مطابق مطابق فیصلہ کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ ہے ہم ایک انتخابات ترجیح کے مطابق اپنا ڈیمڈینڈ موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو بہترین دانے کے مطابق قابلیت کے مطابق بہترین قابلیت کے مطابق فیصلہ کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے موڈل میں شامل ہونے کے باعث عملکرد کو بہتر کر دیتا ہے، اس سے زیادہ پیچیدہ سیسٹم کا موافق ہو جاتا ہے۔ لیکن یہ ایک قیمت کے ساتھ آتا ہے جو اسے جھگڑا دیتا ہے کہ کس طرح یہ اصلاح کا ارزش ہے', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, ularni faqat joriy coreference murojaatlari tomonidan foydalanadi. Biz tashkilotni tanlash parametrlarining asosida qo'llanmalar modelini tahlil qilamiz. Bu juda yuqori qo'llanmalar qo'llaniladi. Bizning modelimizni ko'payishimiz murakkab tizimning holatiga o'xshash natijalarini bajaradi. Lekin, bu narsa qanday yaxshi o'zgarishlar qanday qiymatlarini ajratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tự chọn lựa luôn là điều cần thiết cho giải quyết hạn hẹp. Tuy nhiên, theo kiểu đó chỉ có tiềm năng ứng biến bằng các tài liệu hiện thời. Chúng tôi đề nghị một kiểu nhúng nhúng trường dựa vào sự phụ thuộc của thích ứng lựa chọn, cho phép phán quyết thích ứng chi tiết với mức độ cao. Kết hợp mô hình của chúng tôi cải thiện hiệu suất, kết quả hiện đại của một hệ thống phức tạp hơn. Tuy nhiên, nó đi kèm với một cái giá khiến nó không thể xem xét giá trị của những cải tiến như vậy.', 'bg': 'Отдавна се твърди, че селекционните предпочитания са от съществено значение за резолюцията на съвместната референция. Въпреки това, те са моделирани само имплицитно от текущите резолюции на кореференцията. Предлагаме базиран на зависимост модел за вграждане на селекционни предпочитания, който позволява преценки за съвместимост с високо покритие. Включването на нашия модел подобрява производителността, съчетавайки най-съвременните резултати на по-сложна система. Той обаче идва с цена, която прави спорно колко си струват тези подобрения.', 'da': 'Valgpræferencer har længe været hævdet at være afgørende for coreferenceopløsning. De modelleres imidlertid kun implicit af nuværende coreference resolvere. Vi foreslår en afhængighedsbaseret indlejringsmodel for selektive præferencer, som muliggør finkornede kompatibilitetsvurderinger med høj dækning. Ved at indarbejde vores model forbedres ydeevnen og matche topmoderne resultater fra et mere komplekst system. Men det kommer med en omkostning, der gør det diskutereligt, hvor nyttige sådanne forbedringer er.', 'nl': 'Er wordt al lang beweerd dat selectiepreferenties essentieel zijn voor de oplossing van de medeferentie. Ze worden echter alleen impliciet gemodelleerd door huidige coreference resolvers. We stellen een op afhankelijkheid gebaseerd embedmodel voor van selectieve voorkeuren dat fijnkorrelige compatibiliteitsoordelen met een hoge dekking mogelijk maakt. Het integreren van ons model verbetert de prestaties en matcht state-of-the-art resultaten van een complexer systeem. Het brengt echter kosten met zich mee die het twijfelachtig maken hoe waardevol dergelijke verbeteringen zijn.', 'hr': 'Odborne preferencije dugo su tvrdene da su ključne za rješenje pristojnosti. Međutim, oni se modeliraju samo implicitno od strane trenutnih rezolutora liječenja. Predlažemo model ugrađenog na osnovu zavisnosti selektivnih preferencija koji omogućava suđenje za kompatibilnost s visokim pokrivanjem. Uključujući naš model poboljšava učinkovitost, odgovarajući rezultati stanja umjetnosti kompleksnijeg sustava. Međutim, to dolazi sa troškovima koji čini raspravu koliko je vrijedno tako poboljšanja.', 'de': 'Selektionspräferenzen gelten seit langem als unerlässlich für die Lösung von Zusammentreffen. Sie werden jedoch nur implizit von aktuellen Coreferenz Resolvern modelliert. Wir schlagen ein abhängigkeitsbasiertes Einbettungsmodell selektiver Präferenzen vor, das feinkörnige Kompatibilitätsbeurteile mit hoher Abdeckung ermöglicht. Die Einbeziehung unseres Modells verbessert die Leistung und entspricht den neuesten Ergebnissen eines komplexeren Systems. Sie bringt jedoch Kosten mit sich, die es fraglich machen, wie wertvoll solche Verbesserungen sind.', 'id': 'Keutamaan seleksi sudah lama diklaim penting untuk resolusi koreferensi. Namun, mereka hanya dimodelkan secara implisitas oleh penyelesair koreferensi saat ini. Kami mengusulkan model embedding berdasarkan dependensi preferensi selektif yang memungkinkan penghakiman kompatibilitas fine grained dengan penutupan tinggi. Memasukkan model kita memperbaiki prestasi, cocok dengan hasil state-of-the-art dari sistem yang lebih kompleks. Namun, itu datang dengan biaya yang membuatnya dapat dibahas betapa layaknya perbaikan tersebut.', 'fa': 'گزینه\u200cهای انتخاب خیلی وقته به عنوان کشف\u200cسازی از قبیلش ضروری دارند. با این حال، آنها فقط از طریق حل کننده\u200cهای مهربانی فعلی مدل می\u200cشوند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل بستگی بر پایه بستگی از ترجیح\u200cهای انتخاب\u200cگیری که اجازه می\u200cدهد قضاوت\u200cهای پیوند\u200cگیری با پوشش بالا را بدهد. تولید کردن مدل ما عملکرد را بهتر می کند، نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنر را با یک سیستم پیچیده\u200cتر متفاوت می\u200cکند. با این حال، با هزینه\u200cای می\u200cرسد که آن را بحث می\u200cکند که چقدر ارزش این بهترین\u200cها است.', 'ko': '오랫동안 선택의 선호는 공지의 해소에 매우 중요하다고 여겨져 왔다.그러나 현재 공지 해석기에서만 암시적으로 모델링됩니다.우리는 의존 관계를 바탕으로 하는 선택 선호 삽입 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 높은 범위의 세립도 호환성 판단을 허용한다.우리의 모델을 결합하면 성능을 향상시키고 더욱 복잡한 시스템의 최신 결과와 일치시킬 수 있다.그러나 그것이 가져온 비용은 개선의 가치에 대해 논쟁을 일으켰다.', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi umedai kuwa muhimu kwa ajili ya suluhisho la msingi. Hata hivyo, wanatengenezwa bila uhakika tu na suluhisho la msimamo wa sasa. Tunazipendekeza muundo wa kutegemea na kutegemea upendeleo wa uchaguzi ambao unaruhusu maamuzi yanayofanana vizuri kwa habari za juu. Kuongeza mifano yetu inaboresha utendaji, ukilinganisha matokeo ya hali ya sanaa ya mfumo mzito zaidi. Hata hivyo, inakuja na gharama ambazo inafanya kuwa na mjadala wa jinsi gani inavyofaa na maendeleo hayo.', 'af': "Kies voorkeure is lank aangevra om nodig te wees vir koreferensieresolusie. Maar hulle is slegs inplisiteit modelleer deur huidige koreferensie oplosserers. Ons voorstel 'n afhanklikheid-gebaseerde inbetering model van seleksjonele voorkeure wat toelaat fyn-graad kompatibiliteitsverordeninge met hoë dekking. Om ons model te inkorporeer, verbeter prestasie, ooreenstemmende status-of-kuns resultate van 'n meer kompleks stelsel. Maar dit kom met 'n koste wat dit beskikbaar maak hoe waarde so verbeteringe is.", 'tr': 'Se챌meli tercihler kyn챌ylyk 체챌in 철r채n k철p sanady. 횦철ne, olar di흫e h채zirki h채zirki 첵체regi 챌철zg체챌iler tarapyndan 철rneklendiril첵채rler. Biz sa첵law tercihleri ta첵첵arlanan da힊arylyk nusgasyna teklip edip g철r첵채ris. Bu n채me 체챌in 첵okary 챌yky힊lyk bilen a 첵raty힊lyk tercihleri 체챌in 체첵tget. Bizi흫 nusgymyzy da힊ary edip ukyplarymyzy gowla첵ar, has karma힊캇k sistemi흫 체st체ne e힊le첵채r. 횦철ne, 힊e첵le bir gowulygy n채hili gowulygy n채hili gowulygy di첵ip 챌yk첵an bir t철legi bilen me첵ille힊dir첵채r.', 'sq': 'Preferimet zgjedhore janë pretenduar shumë kohë të jenë thelbësore për zgjidhjen e koreferencës. Megjithatë, ato janë modeluar vetëm implicitisht nga zgjidhësit e tanishëm të koreferencës. Ne propozojmë një model përfshirjeje të preferimeve zgjedhore të bazuar në varësi që lejon gjykime të mirëkuptueshme kompatibiliteti me mbulim të lartë. Incorporating our model improves performance, matching state-of-the-art results of a more complex system.  Megjithatë, vjen me një kosto që e bën të debatueshme se sa vlefshme janë përmirësime të tilla.', 'am': 'ምርጫ የረጅም ምርጫዎች ለኮርፖርቲካ ማስታወሻ እንዲያስፈልጋሉ ረጅም ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ አሁን የኮርፖርቲካ መፍትሄ ብቻውን ብቻ ይሞክራሉ፡፡ በተደጋገመ የመረጃ ምርጫዎች የፊደል አካባቢ ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ሞዴላማችንን በማሳደግ፣ የሥርዓቱን ግንኙነት እና በተጨማሪው ውጤት እየጨመረ ውጤቶች በማሳመር አሻራጭ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እንደዚህ ብዛት ጥቅም እንዴት እንደሚሆን ይነግረዋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ընտրական նախընտրությունները երկար ժամանակ կարևոր են կորֆերենսի լուծման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, դրանք մոդելներ են կազմում միայն ներկայիս կորֆերենսի լուծողների կողմից: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ընտրական նախընտրությունների կախվածությամբ ներառվող մոդել, որը թույլ է տալիս բարձր ծածկությամբ համատեղելի դատողությունները: Մեր մոդելի ներառումը բարելավում է արտադրողությունը, համապատասխանում է բարդ համակարգի ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին: Այնուամենայնիվ, այն հանգեցնում է արժեքի, որը ստիպում է քննարկել, թե ինչքան արժեքավոր են այս բարելավումները:', 'bn': 'নির্বাচনের পছন্দ অনেক দীর্ঘ দাবি করা হয়েছে যে কোরেফারেন্স সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। তবে বর্তমান কোরেফেন্স সমাধানের মাধ্যমে তাদের মডেল করা হয়েছে। আমরা একটি নির্ভরিত ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক প্রযোজ্য মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা উচ্চ কাভারেজের সাথে সুনির্ভর করা  আমাদের মডেল বাড়িয়ে দেয়া হচ্ছে আরো জটিল সিস্টেমের ফলাফলের সাথে যুক্ত হয়েছে। তবে এটি একটি খরচ দিয়ে এসেছে যা বিতর্ক করে যে কিভাবে এই উন্নয়নের মূল্যবান।', 'az': 'Seçim seçimləri uzun zamandır mərhəmətli çözünürlük üçün vacib olduğunu iddia edilmişdir. Halbuki, onlar yalnız müəyyən edilən mərhəmət çətinlikləri ilə modelləyirlər. Biz seçici seçimlər üçün bağımlılıq tabanlı bir modeli təklif edirik ki, böyük örtülük ilə müəyyən edilən uyğunluq hökmlərinə müvəffəq edər. Modelimizi birləşdirmək daha kompleks bir sistemin sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırır. Ancaq bu sərvətin nə qədər faydalı olduğuna görə mübahisə edir.', 'ca': "Fa molt de temps que s'ha afirmat que les preferències seleccionals són essencials per a resoldre les correferencies. Tot i així, només són modelats implícitamentpels resoldors de coreferencia actuals. Proposem un model d'integració basat en la dependència de preferències selectives que permet judicis de compatibilitat fins grans amb alta cobertura. Incorporating our model improves performance, matching state-of-the-art results of a more complex system.  Tot i així, té un cost que fa debatable la valoració d'aquestes millores.", 'bs': 'Odborne preferencije su dugo tvrde da su ključne za rješenje pristojnosti. Međutim, oni se modeliraju samo implicitno od strane trenutnih rezolutora ljubaznosti. Predlažemo model ugrađenog na osnovu zavisnosti selektivnih preferencija koji omogućava suđenja za kompatibilnost sa visokom pokrivanjem. Uključujući naš model, poboljšava učinkovitost, odgovarajući rezultati umjetnosti kompleksnijeg sistema. Međutim, to dolazi sa troškovima koji čini raspravu koliko je vrijedno tako poboljšanja.', 'cs': 'Výběrové preference se dlouho tvrdí, že jsou nezbytné pro řešení společných referencí. Jsou však modelovány pouze implicitně současnými koreferenčními řešiteli. Navrhujeme model vkládání selektivních preferencí založený na závislosti, který umožňuje jemně zpracované hodnocení kompatibility s vysokým pokrytím. Začlenění našeho modelu zlepšuje výkon a odpovídá nejmodernějším výsledkům složitějšího systému. Přichází však s náklady, díky nimž je diskutabilní, jak stojí tato zlepšení za to.', 'et': 'Valikulisi eelistusi on juba ammu väidetud, et need on kaasviidete lahendamiseks olulised. Kuid neid modelleerivad vaid kaudselt praegused kordferentsilahendajad. Pakume välja valikuliste eelistuste sõltuvusel põhineva manustamismudeli, mis võimaldab kõrge katvusega täpseid ühilduvusotsusi. Meie mudeli kaasamine parandab jõudlust, sobitades keerukama süsteemi tipptasemel tulemusi. Sellega kaasnevad aga kulud, mis muudavad arutlikuks, kui väärtuslikud on sellised parandused.', 'fi': 'Valinnaisten mieltymysten on jo pitkään väitetty olevan olennaisia yhteisferenssin resoluution kannalta. Ne on kuitenkin mallinnettu vain implisiittisesti nykyisten koreferenssiratkaisujen avulla. Ehdotamme riippuvuuteen perustuvaa valikoivien mieltymysten upotusmallia, joka mahdollistaa hienojakoiset yhteensopivuusarviot suurella kattavuudella. Mallimme integrointi parantaa suorituskykyä ja vastaa monimutkaisemman järjestelmän viimeisimpiä tuloksia. Sillä on kuitenkin kustannukset, joiden vuoksi on kyseenalaista, kuinka hyödyllisiä tällaiset parannukset ovat.', 'ha': "An riga zaﾉ殿 zaﾉ殿ﾉ兎n kwanan da aka ﾆ兮yyade shi yana da muhimu wa buﾆ兮tan sarrafiya. A lokacin da aka samo su, ba da amfani ba fﾃ｣ce da masu samun mataimaki na yanzu. Tuna goyya da wata misali mai zura-baka da ke samar da zaﾉ兎n zaﾉ殿ta, wanda yana yarda da hukuncin masu daidaita da kuma masu rufe. Yana ﾆ兮ra shirin ayukanmu, yana ﾆ兮ranci performance, mai daidaita matsalar-state-the-art na wata na'urar da ya fi tsanani. A lokacin da yana da kyauta wanda zai yi ta jﾃ｣yayya ko da kyauta suke da waﾉ預nnan gyﾃ｣ra.", 'he': 'העדיפות הבחירה כבר הרבה זמן טוענות שהן חיוניות לפתרון התאמה. בכל אופן, הם מודלים רק באופן ישירותי על ידי פותרי התאמה הנוכחי. אנו מציעים מודל קישום מבוסס על תלויות של עדיפות בחרותיות שמאפשר שיפוטים מתאימים מוצקים עם כיסוי גבוה. הכילוי של המודל שלנו משפר את ההופעה, מתאים לתוצאות מצב האומנות של מערכת מורכבת יותר. בכל אופן, זה בא עם מחיר שגורם לזה לדון כמה שווים שיפורים כאלה.', 'sk': 'Izbirne preference so že dolgo trdile, da so bistvene za ločljivost koreference. Vendar pa jih modelirajo samo implicitno trenutni reševalci koreference. Predlagamo model vgradnje selekcijskih preferenc, ki temelji na odvisnosti, ki omogoča natančne sodbe o združljivosti z visoko pokritostjo. Vključitev našega modela izboljšuje zmogljivost in ujema najsodobnejše rezultate bolj kompleksnega sistema. Vendar pa ima strošek, zaradi katerega je razpravljivo, kako koristne so te izboljšave.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Yo, yo wis dipoleh ditambah liyo perusahaan nek wis dipoleh nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan nggawe Awak dhéwé ngerasah akeh basa gambar ditambah akeh perusahaan anyar tentang karo iso nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerakan sing apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé Mampak ingkang model sing bisa ngerasai nggawe becuran, iso dianggap mulalah sistem sing komplikasi sing apik. Nanging, njuk saiki wae dadi sing paling apik dadi, ngono kapan layang kelas ngono ngono.', 'bo': 'གདམ་ཁ་ཡུལ་གྱི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དེ་གདམ་ཁ་ཡུལ་གྱི་མ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟར་ད་ལྟོའི་གདོང་རིས་མེད་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་ཚོར་བ་དག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཡོད་པའི་མཛོད་ཁང་ཅིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་འདིས་སྒྲིག་ཀྱིས་གྲུབ་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་པ་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ནི་ཇི་ལྟར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རེ་བ་སྐྱེན་ཚད་གང་ཞིག་ཡིན་རྒྱུ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Learning to Rank Semantic Coherence for Topic Segmentation', 'ar': 'تعلم ترتيب التماسك الدلالي لتجزئة الموضوع', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a classificar a coerência semântica para segmentação de tópicos', 'fr': 'Apprendre à classer la cohérence sémantique pour la segmentation des sujets', 'es': 'Aprender a clasificar la coherencia semántica para la segmentación de temas', 'ru': 'Обучение ранжированию семантической согласованности для сегментации тем', 'ja': 'トピックセグメンテーションのセマンティックコヒーレンスをランク付けするための学習', 'hi': 'विषय विभाजन के लिए शब्दार्थ सुसंगतता रैंक करने के लिए सीखना', 'zh': '学排名于主题分语义一致性', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim conas Comhleanúnachas Séimeantach a Rangú le haghaidh Deighilte Ábhair', 'ka': 'სწავლობა სემენტიკური კოდენცია ტემიკური სეგმენტიკური', 'el': 'Μάθηση να βαθμολογήσετε τη σημασιολογική συνοχή για την τμηματοποίηση θεμάτων', 'it': 'Imparare a classificare la coerenza semantica per la segmentazione degli argomenti', 'hu': 'A szemantikus koherencia rangsorolásának tanulása a témaszegmentációban', 'kk': 'Нақыштар сегментациясының семантикалық согластығын оқыту', 'mk': 'Learning to Rank Semantic Coherence for Topic Segmentation', 'ml': 'വിഭാഗത്തിനുള്ള വിഭാഗത്തിനുള്ള റാങ്ക് സെമാന്റിക് കോഹെറന്\u200dസിലേക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Learning to Rank Semantic Coherence for Topic Segmentation', 'lt': 'Learning to Rank Semantic Coherence for Topic Segmentation', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл загварын төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөө суралцах нь', 'no': 'Læring til semiantisk samansetting for temasegmentasjon', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a clasa coerența semantică pentru segmentarea subiectelor', 'sr': 'Naučenje semantičke koherencije za temsku segmentaciju', 'pl': 'Uczenie się rankingu spójności semantycznej dla segmentacji tematów', 'so': 'Learning to Rank Semantic Coherence for Topic Segmentation', 'sv': 'Att lära sig rangordna semantisk samstämmighet för ämnessegmentering', 'ta': 'பொருள் பிரிப்புக்கான குறிப்புகளுக்கான வரிசையில் குறிப்பு', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex tinkiseb il-Koerenza Semantika għas-Segmentazzjoni Topika', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න සෙමාන්තික සංවේදනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න සෙමාන්තික සංවේදනය ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'ur': 'موضوع سیگنٹمنٹ کے لئے Rank Semantic Coherence کی سیکھ رہی ہے', 'vi': 'Học hỏi phù hợp giữa kỳ với các tiết mục', 'uz': 'Name', 'hr': 'Naučenje za semantičku koherenciju temske segmentacije', 'da': 'At lære at rangere semantisk sammenhæng for emnesegmentering', 'bg': 'Научете се да класирате семантична съгласуваност за сегментация на темите', 'id': 'Learning to Rank Semantic Coherence for Topic Segmentation', 'de': 'Lernen, Semantische Kohärenz für die Themensegmentierung zu bewerten', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Uunganishaji wa Kigaidi wa Kuhusiana na Maudhui', 'nl': 'Semantische coherentie leren rangschikken voor topic segmentatie', 'ko': '주제에 대한 절분된 의미의 일관성을 학습하여 정렬하다', 'sq': 'Mësimi për të renditur koherencën Semantike për segmentimin tematik', 'af': 'Onderleer na Rank Semantiese Sagtigheid vir Tema Segmentasie', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن با هماهنگی سیمانتیک برای جدایی موضوع', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Mevzu Segmentasiyas캼 칲칞칲n Semantik 캻laq톛 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'বিষয় বিভাগের জন্য র\u200d্যাঙ্ক সেম্যান্টিক কোরেন্স শিখানো', 'hy': 'Սովորել դասավորել թեմային սեմենտիկ կորենսը', 'ca': 'Aprendre a classificar la coerència Semàtica per la Segmentació Tépica', 'cs': 'Naučení se hodnotit sémantickou koherenci pro segmentaci témat', 'et': 'Teema segmenteerimise semantilise sidususe hindamise õppimine', 'fi': 'Aiheen segmentoinnin semanttisen johdonmukaisuuden määrittäminen', 'bs': 'Naučenje semantičke koherencije za temsku segmentaciju', 'tr': 'Tema Segmentation üçin Semantik Mazmunlygy öwrenmek', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje uvrstitve semantične skladnosti za segmentacijo teme', 'he': 'ללמוד לצוות תואם סמנטי למחלקת נושאים', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་བསྡུར་ན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུན་ལ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval. Due to the absence of training data, previous work mainly adopts unsupervised methods to rank semantic coherence between paragraphs for topic segmentation. In this paper, we present an intuitive and simple idea to automatically create a quasi training dataset, which includes a large amount of text pairs from the same or different documents with different semantic coherence. With the training corpus, we design a symmetric CNN neural network to model text pairs and rank the semantic coherence within the learning to rank framework. Experiments show that our algorithm is able to achieve competitive performance over strong baselines on several real-world datasets.', 'ar': 'يلعب تجزئة الموضوع دورًا مهمًا في تحليل الخطاب واسترجاع المعلومات. نظرًا لغياب بيانات التدريب ، يعتمد العمل السابق بشكل أساسي طرقًا غير خاضعة للإشراف لتصنيف التماسك الدلالي بين الفقرات لتجزئة الموضوع. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم فكرة بديهية وبسيطة لإنشاء مجموعة بيانات تدريب "شبه" تلقائيًا ، والتي تتضمن قدرًا كبيرًا من أزواج النص من نفس المستندات أو مستندات مختلفة ذات تماسك دلالي مختلف. من خلال مجموعة التدريب ، نقوم بتصميم شبكة CNN العصبية المتماثلة لنمذجة أزواج النص وترتيب التماسك الدلالي في إطار تعلم الترتيب. تُظهر التجارب أن الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا قادرة على تحقيق أداء تنافسي على أساس خطوط أساسية قوية في العديد من مجموعات البيانات في العالم الحقيقي.', 'pt': 'A segmentação de tópicos desempenha um papel importante na análise do discurso e na recuperação de informações. Devido à ausência de dados de treinamento, trabalhos anteriores adotam principalmente métodos não supervisionados para classificar a coerência semântica entre parágrafos para segmentação de tópicos. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma ideia intuitiva e simples de criar automaticamente um conjunto de dados “quase” de treinamento, que inclui uma grande quantidade de pares de texto do mesmo ou de documentos diferentes com coerência semântica diferente. Com o corpus de treinamento, projetamos uma rede neural CNN simétrica para modelar pares de texto e classificar a coerência semântica dentro da estrutura de aprendizado para classificação. Experimentos mostram que nosso algoritmo é capaz de alcançar desempenho competitivo em linhas de base fortes em vários conjuntos de dados do mundo real.', 'es': 'La segmentación de temas desempeña un papel importante en el análisis del discurso y la recuperación de información. Debido a la ausencia de datos de entrenamiento, el trabajo anterior adopta principalmente métodos no supervisados para clasificar la coherencia semántica entre los párrafos para la segmentación de temas. En este artículo, presentamos una idea intuitiva y simple para crear automáticamente un conjunto de datos de entrenamiento «cuasi», que incluye una gran cantidad de pares de texto del mismo documento o de documentos diferentes con diferente coherencia semántica. Con el corpus de entrenamiento, diseñamos una red neuronal CNN simétrica para modelar pares de texto y clasificar la coherencia semántica dentro del marco de aprender a clasificar. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro algoritmo es capaz de lograr un rendimiento competitivo sobre bases de referencia sólidas en varios conjuntos de datos del mundo real.', 'fr': "La segmentation des sujets joue un rôle important pour l'analyse du discours et la récupération d'informations. En raison de l'absence de données de formation, les travaux précédents adoptent principalement des méthodes non supervisées pour classer la cohérence sémantique entre les paragraphes pour la segmentation des sujets. Dans cet article, nous présentons une idée simple et intuitive pour créer automatiquement un jeu de données d'apprentissage «\xa0quasi\xa0», qui inclut un grand nombre de paires de textes provenant d'un même document ou de documents différents avec une cohérence sémantique différente. Avec le corpus de formation, nous concevons un réseau de neurones CNN symétrique pour modéliser des paires de textes et classer la cohérence sémantique dans le cadre de l'apprentissage du classement. Les expériences montrent que notre algorithme est capable d'atteindre des performances compétitives sur des bases de référence solides sur plusieurs ensembles de données du monde réel.", 'ja': 'トピックセグメンテーションは、話題の解析と情報の検索に重要な役割を果たします。トレーニングデータがないため、これまでの研究では主に、トピックセグメンテーションのためにパラグラフ間の意味的な一貫性をランク付けするための監督されていない方法を採用しています。本稿では、「準」トレーニングデータセットを自動的に作成する直感的でシンプルなアイデアを提示します。これには、異なる意味論的一貫性を持つ同じまたは異なるドキュメントからの大量のテキストペアが含まれます。トレーニングコーパスを使用して、対称的なCNNニューラルネットワークを設計して、テキストペアをモデル化し、学習のランク付けフレームワーク内の意味論的一貫性をランク付けします。実験によると、当社のアルゴリズムは、いくつかの現実のデータセットで強力なベースラインを超えて競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成することができます。', 'ru': 'Сегментация тем играет важную роль в разборе дискурса и извлечении информации. Из-за отсутствия обучающих данных предыдущая работа в основном использует неконтролируемые методы для ранжирования семантической согласованности между параграфами для сегментации тем. В данной работе мы представляем интуитивно понятную и простую идею автоматического создания «квази» обучающего набора данных, включающего большое количество текстовых пар из одних и тех же или разных документов с разной семантической когерентностью. С помощью обучающего корпуса мы создаем симметричную нейронную сеть CNN для моделирования текстовых пар и ранжирования семантической когерентности в рамках обучения для ранжирования. Эксперименты показывают, что наш алгоритм способен достичь конкурентной производительности над сильными базовыми линиями на нескольких реальных наборах данных.', 'zh': '言割于言解析与信息检索中起为重。 以训练数据,前事要用无监督之法段落间语义一致性排名,以主题分割。 于本文中,发一直观而简意,即自创一准训练数集,其有不同语义一致性同异文档者是也。 用练语料库,设对称CNN神经网络以建模文本,列名于学框架语义一致性。 实验明,吾算法得数世数集上成强基线之竞。', 'hi': 'विषय विभाजन प्रवचन पार्सिंग और सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। प्रशिक्षण डेटा की अनुपस्थिति के कारण, पिछला काम मुख्य रूप से विषय विभाजन के लिए पैराग्राफ के बीच शब्दार्थ सामंजस्य को रैंक करने के लिए असुरक्षित तरीकों को अपनाता है। इस पेपर में, हम स्वचालित रूप से एक "अर्ध" प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट बनाने के लिए एक सहज और सरल विचार प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसमें अलग-अलग शब्दार्थ सुसंगतता के साथ समान या विभिन्न दस्तावेजों से बड़ी मात्रा में पाठ जोड़े शामिल हैं। प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस के साथ, हम पाठ जोड़े को मॉडल करने के लिए एक सममित सीएनएन तंत्रिका नेटवर्क डिजाइन करते हैं और फ्रेमवर्क को रैंक करने के लिए सीखने के भीतर शब्दार्थ सुसंगतता को रैंक करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म कई वास्तविक दुनिया के डेटासेट पर मजबूत बेसलाइन पर प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में सक्षम है।', 'ga': 'Tá ról tábhachtach ag deighilt topaicí maidir le parsáil dioscúrsa agus aisghabháil faisnéise. De bharr nach bhfuil sonraí oiliúna ann, glacann obair roimhe seo go príomha le modhanna gan mhaoirseacht chun comhleanúnachas shéimeantach a rangú idir na hailt le haghaidh deighilt topaicí. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair smaoineamh iomasach simplí chun tacar sonraí oiliúna “quasi” a chruthú go huathoibríoch, lena n-áirítear líon mór péirí téacs ó na doiciméid chéanna nó doiciméid éagsúla le comhleanúnachas shéimeantach éagsúil. Leis an gcorpas oiliúna, déanaimid líonra néarúil CNN siméadrach a dhearadh chun péirí téacs a shamhaltú agus chun an chomhleanúnachas shéimeantach a rangú laistigh den chreat foghlama chun rangú. Léiríonn turgnaimh go bhfuil ár n-algartam in ann feidhmíocht iomaíoch a bhaint amach thar bonnlínte láidre ar roinnt tacar sonraí den saol fíor.', 'ka': "ტემიკური სეგმენტაცია იყო მნიშვნელოვანი პროლის განაწერისთვის და ინფორმაციის მიღებისთვის. სამუშაო მონაცემების არსებობით, სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მონაცემების გარეშე სმენტიკური შესაწყვება ტემიკური სეგმენტიკური შესაწყვე ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ინტუტიური და განსაკუთრებული იდეა, რომ ავტომატურად შექმნა 'კვასი' მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც აქვს ერთი ან განსხვავებული დოკუმენტიკური კონფიგ შესწავლობის კორპუსით, ჩვენ CNN ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება ტექსტის ზოგების მოდელისთვის და სწავლობის შორის სწავლისთვის სწავლისთვის კონფიგურაცია. ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი ალგორიტიმი შეუძლია კონკენტებური გამოსახულება ძალიან ბაზის ხაზებით რამდენიმე რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესაძლებელ", 'el': 'Η κατακερματισμός θεμάτων παίζει σημαντικό ρόλο για την ανάλυση λόγου και την ανάκτηση πληροφοριών. Λόγω της απουσίας δεδομένων κατάρτισης, η προηγούμενη εργασία υιοθετεί κυρίως μεθόδους χωρίς επίβλεψη για την ταξινόμηση της σημασιολογικής συνοχής μεταξύ παραγράφων για την τμηματοποίηση θεμάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια διαισθητική και απλή ιδέα για την αυτόματη δημιουργία ενός συνόλου δεδομένων κατάρτισης, το οποίο περιλαμβάνει μεγάλο αριθμό ζευγαριών κειμένου από τα ίδια ή διαφορετικά έγγραφα με διαφορετική σημασιολογική συνοχή. Με το εκπαιδευτικό σώμα σχεδιάζουμε ένα συμμετρικό νευρωνικό δίκτυο για να μοντελοποιήσουμε ζεύγη κειμένου και να ταξινομήσουμε τη σημασιολογική συνοχή μέσα στο πλαίσιο εκμάθησης κατάταξης. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι ο αλγόριθμος μας είναι σε θέση να επιτύχει ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις σε ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης σε πολλά σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου.', 'it': "La segmentazione degli argomenti svolge un ruolo importante per l'analisi del discorso e il recupero delle informazioni. A causa dell'assenza di dati formativi, il lavoro precedente adotta principalmente metodi non supervisionati per classificare la coerenza semantica tra i paragrafi per la segmentazione tematica. In questo articolo, presentiamo un'idea intuitiva e semplice per creare automaticamente un dataset di formazione 'quasi', che include una grande quantità di coppie di testi provenienti da documenti uguali o diversi con coerenza semantica diversa. Con il corpus formativo, progettiamo una rete neurale CNN simmetrica per modellare coppie di testo e classificare la coerenza semantica all'interno del framework learning to rank. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro algoritmo è in grado di ottenere prestazioni competitive su linee di base forti su diversi set di dati reali.", 'hu': 'A témaszegmentáció fontos szerepet játszik a diskurzus elemzésében és az információk visszakeresésében. A képzési adatok hiánya miatt a korábbi munkák elsősorban felügyelet nélküli módszereket alkalmaznak a bekezdések közötti szemantikai koherencia rangsorolására a témaszegmentáció szempontjából. Ebben a tanulmányban egy intuitív és egyszerű ötletet mutatunk be arra, hogy automatikusan létrehozzunk egy kvázi képzési adatkészletet, amely nagy mennyiségű szövegpárt tartalmaz ugyanazokból vagy különböző dokumentumokból, különböző szemantikai koherenciával. A képzési korpusz segítségével egy szimmetrikus CNN neurális hálózatot tervezünk a szövegpárok modellezésére és a szemantikai koherencia rangsorolására a tanulási keretrendszerben. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy algoritmusunk képes versenyképes teljesítményt elérni erős alapvonalakon számos valós adatkészleten.', 'kk': 'Нақышты сегментация дискурстарды талдау және мәліметті алу үшін маңызды роль ойнатады. Оқыту деректері жоқ сияқты, алдыңғы жұмыс негізінде тақырыпты сегментациялық бөлшектердің арасындағы семантикалық согластығын келтіреді. Бұл қағазда, біз бір немесе басқа құжаттардан бірнеше семантикалық координациялық мәтін жиілігін автоматты түрде құру үшін интуитивті және қарапайым идеяны таңдаймыз. Корпус оқыту үшін CNN неврал желінің симметриялық түрін құрамыз, мәтін екеуін үлгілеу үшін және мәтін екеуі үлгілеу үшін, семантикалық бағдарламалық бағдарламалығын ба Тәжірибелер біздің алгоритміздің бірнеше шын әлемдегі деректер жиындарындағы күшті негізгі жолдарда тәжірибесізді жеткізуге болады.', 'ms': "Segmen topik bermain peran penting untuk penghuraian diskors dan pemulihan maklumat. Due to the absence of training data, previous work mainly adopts unsupervised methods to rank semantic coherence between paragraphs for topic segmentation.  In this paper, we present an intuitive and simple idea to automatically create a 'quasi' training dataset, which includes a large amount of text pairs from the same or different documents with different semantic coherence.  With the training corpus, we design a symmetric CNN neural network to model text pairs and rank the semantic coherence within the learning to rank framework.  Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa algoritma kita mampu mencapai prestasi kompetitif melalui garis dasar yang kuat pada beberapa set data dunia nyata.", 'ml': "സംസാരം പാര്\u200dക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നതിനും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പങ്ക് പാടു പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിട്ട് പ്ര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d 'ക്വാസി' പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയും ലളിതമായ ഐഡിയയും കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരേ  പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിമമ്രിക്ക് സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഡിസൈനര്\u200d ചെയ്യു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം കൂടുതല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പെടു", 'mk': 'Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval.  Due to the absence of training data, previous work mainly adopts unsupervised methods to rank semantic coherence between paragraphs for topic segmentation.  Во овој весник, претставуваме интуитивна и едноставна идеја за автоматски создавање на „квази“ набор на податоци за обука, кој вклучува голема количина на парови текст од истите или различни документи со различна семантична кохеренција. Со тренингот, дизајнираме симетрична CNN нервна мрежа за да моделираме текстови парови и да ја рангираме семантичката кохеренција во рамките на учењето за рангирање. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот алгоритм е способен да постигне конкурентна резултатност преку силни бази на неколку реални податоци.', 'lt': 'Temos segmentavimas atlieka svarbų vaidmenį analizuojant diskursus ir gaunant informaciją. Atsižvelgiant į tai, kad trūksta mokymo duomenų, ankstesniame darbe daugiausia taikomi nepastebimi metodai, kuriais siekiama nustatyti semantinę temų segmentacijos dalių nuoseklumą. Šiame dokumente pristatome intuityvią ir paprastą idėją automatiškai sukurti „kvazi“ mokymo duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra daug tekstų poros iš tų pačių ar skirtingų dokumentų, turinčių skirtingą semantinį nuoseklumą. Su mokymo korpusu sukuriame simetrinį CNN nervų tinklą, kad modeliuotume teksto poros ir klasifikuojame semantinę nuoseklumą mokymosi ir klasifikavimo sistemoje. Experiments show that our algorithm is able to achieve competitive performance over strong baselines on several real-world datasets.', 'mt': "Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval.  Due to the absence of training data, previous work mainly adopts unsupervised methods to rank semantic coherence between paragraphs for topic segmentation.  In this paper, we present an intuitive and simple idea to automatically create a 'quasi' training dataset, which includes a large amount of text pairs from the same or different documents with different semantic coherence.  With the training corpus, we design a symmetric CNN neural network to model text pairs and rank the semantic coherence within the learning to rank framework.  L-esperimenti juru li l-algoritmu tagħna huwa kapaċi jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva fuq linji bażi b’saħħithom fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali.", 'pl': 'Segmentacja tematów odgrywa ważną rolę w parsowaniu dyskursu i odzyskiwaniu informacji. Ze względu na brak danych szkoleniowych poprzednie prace przyjmują głównie metody bez nadzoru oceniające spójność semantyczną między akapitami segmentacji tematycznej. W artykule przedstawiamy intuicyjny i prosty pomysł automatycznego tworzenia "quasi" zbioru danych treningowych, który zawiera dużą ilość par tekstowych z tego samego lub różnych dokumentów o różnej spójności semantycznej. Dzięki korpusowi treningowemu projektujemy symetryczną sieć neuronową CNN, aby modelować pary tekstowe i klasyfikować spójność semantyczną w ramach ramy uczenia się rankingu. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz algorytm jest w stanie osiągnąć konkurencyjną wydajność na silnych liniach bazowych na kilku rzeczywistych zbiorach danych.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн загвар хэвлэх нь ярианы хуваалцах болон мэдээллийг авах үед чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Сургуулийн өгөгдлийн байхгүй учраас, өмнөх ажлын тулд сэдвийн загварын хоорондох хэсгүүдийн хоорондох семантик хоорондох арга загварыг дамжуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид "квази" сургалтын өгөгдлийн санааг автоматаар бүтээх боломжтой энгийн санааг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь ижил эсвэл өөр өөр бичсэн баримтуудаас маш олон хэмжээний текст хоёр байдаг. Сургуулийн корпус дээр бид СНБ-ын мэдрэлийн сүлжээг загварчлахын тулд ижил хэмжээтэй зохион байгуулж, хэмжээний сүлжээний сургалтын дотор суралцах хэмжээний холбоотой холбоотой. Эмчилгээний туршилт бидний алгоритм олон бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн санд хүчтэй суурь шугам дээр өрсөлдөг үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Emne-segmentasjon spelar ein viktig rolle for tolking av diskursar og henting av informasjon. På grunn av manglar opplæringsdata, førre arbeid gjev hovudsakelig ikkje oppretta metoder for å rankera semantisk koherens mellom avsnitt for temasegmentering. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein intuitiv og enkel idee for å automatisk oppretta ein «quasi» treningsdataset, som inneheld stor mengd tekstpar frå same eller ulike dokument med ulike semantiske koherens. Med øvingskorpusen designerer vi eit symmetrisk CNN-neuralnettverk for å modellere tekstpar og rankerer semantisk koherens i læring til å rankera rammeverket. Eksperimentar viser at algoritmen vårt kan oppnå konkurentivt utvikling over sterke baselinjer på fleire verdsdatasett.', 'ro': 'Segmentarea subiectelor joacă un rol important pentru analizarea discursurilor și recuperarea informațiilor. Datorită absenței datelor de formare, lucrările anterioare adoptă în principal metode nesupravegheate pentru clasificarea coerenței semantice între paragrafe pentru segmentarea subiectelor. În această lucrare, prezentăm o idee intuitivă și simplă de a crea automat un set de date de formare "cvasi", care include o cantitate mare de perechi de text din aceleași sau diferite documente cu coerență semantică diferită. Cu corpul de instruire, proiectăm o rețea neuronală simetrică CNN pentru a modela perechile de text și clasifica coerența semantică în cadrul cadrului de învățare a rangului. Experimentele arată că algoritmul nostru este capabil să obțină performanțe competitive peste linii de bază puternice pe mai multe seturi de date din lumea reală.', 'sr': 'Temska segmentacija igra važnu ulogu za analizu diskusija i prikupljanje informacija. Zbog nedostatka podataka o obuci, prethodni rad uglavnom usvaja neodređene metode da bi se rasporedila semantička konsekvencija između paragrafa za segmentaciju teme. U ovom papiru predstavljamo intuitivnu i jednostavnu ideju da automatski stvorimo set podataka za obuku kvasi, koja uključuje veliku količinu tekstnih parova iz istih ili različitih dokumenta sa različitim semantičkom saskaņošću. Uz trening korpus, dizajniramo simetričnu CNN neuralnu mrežu da modeliramo tekstualne pare i da odredimo semantičku koherenciju unutar učenja da rankiramo okvir. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš algoritam u mogućnosti da postigne konkurentne funkcije nad jakim baznim linijama na nekoliko realnih podataka na svijetu.', 'so': 'Heshiiska arrimaha la xiriira waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka hadalka iyo helitaanka macluumaadka. Sababta la’aanta macluumaadka waxbarashada darteed shaqada hore wuxuu qaataa habab aan la ilaalinayn si ay u hagaajiyaan qaybaha isugu dhexeeya meelaha la isku xiriiro. Qoraalkan waxaynu keenaynaa fikrad aad u sahlan oo sahlan, si a an automatic u abuurno macluumaad waxbarasho ah, kaas oo ku jira noocyo badan oo qoraal ah oo ka mid ah isku ama dukumentiyada kala duduwan oo ay leeyihiin isku xiriir kala duduwan. Sida uu ku qoro koorasyada waxbarashada, waxaynu qoraynaa shabakadda neurada ee CNN, si aan u sameyno noocyada qoraalka oo labo ah, oo aynu u sameynaa halka kooxaha waxbarashada si aad u fasaxo. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in algorityadeenu awoodo in ay sameyn karto tababar adag oo ka sareeya saldhigyo adag oo ku qoran sawirada caalamiga ah.', 'si': "ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශේෂ විශේෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් විශේෂය සහ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරාප්ත කරන්න විශේෂ භාවිතාව ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත නැති නිසා විසින්, ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩේ ප්\u200dරධාන විධාන විධානය නැති විධානයක් ප්\u200dරධාන විධානය කරනවා විධා මේ පැත්තට, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට 'quasi' ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දත්ත සූදානම් කරන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය අදහසක් පෙන්වන්න, ඒකෙන් එකම නැත ප්\u200dරධාන කොර්පුස් එක්ක, අපි සිමිත්\u200dරිය CNN න්යුරෝල් ජාලයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා පාළු ජාලයක් මොඩල් කරනවා සහ සිමාන්තික සම පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක තර්ජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සැට් වලින් ශක්", 'ta': "பேச்சு பாடல் மற்றும் தகவல் மீட்டுதலுக்கான முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது. பயிற்சி தரவு இல்லாததால், முந்தைய வேலை முக்கியமாக காப்பாற்றப்படாத முறைமையில் தலைப்பு பிரிவு பிரிவுக்கு இடையே இருக்கும் பொ இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் தானாகவே ஒரு 'குவாசி' பயிற்சி தரவு அமைப்பை உருவாக்கும் சுலபமான மற்றும் எளிய ய யோசனை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது ஒரே அல்லது  பயிற்சி குறியீடுகளுடன், நாம் ஒரு சிம்டம்டிரி சிஎன்என் நெய்யூல வலைப்பின்னலை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் உரை ஜோடிகளை மாதிரிக்க மற்றும் வரிசை ச முயற்சிகள் எங்கள் ஆல்பரிதம் பல உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் வலிமையான அடிப்படைகளை மேல் போராடியான செயல்பாட்டை பெற முட", 'sv': "Ämnessegmentering spelar en viktig roll för diskurstolkning och informationssökning. På grund av avsaknad av utbildningsdata tillämpar tidigare arbeten huvudsakligen icke övervakade metoder för att rangordna semantisk samstämmighet mellan stycken för ämnessegmentering. I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi en intuitiv och enkel idé att automatiskt skapa ett 'kvasi' utbildningsdataset, som innehåller en stor mängd textpar från samma eller olika dokument med olika semantisk samstämmighet. Med utbildningskorpusen utformar vi ett symmetriskt CNN neuralt nätverk för att modellera textpar och rangordna den semantiska samstämmigheten inom lärandet att rangordna ramverket. Experiment visar att vår algoritm kan uppnå konkurrenskraftig prestanda över starka baslinjer på flera verkliga datauppsättningar.", 'ur': "موضوع سکیٹمنٹ ایک اہم رئوٹ لگا رہا ہے ڈیکورس پارسینٹ اور معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے۔ ڈیٹا کی آموزش نہیں کی وجہ سے پہلے کی عملیات اصلی طور پر غیر متفاوت طریقے قبول کرتی ہیں کہ ٹیٹ سکیٹ کے لئے پاراگراف کے درمیان سیمنٹی اتصال کریں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نظریہ اور ساده ایڈیوں کو اپنے ساتھ ایک 'quasi' ترینسی ڈیٹ سٹ بنانے کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں جس میں ایک اور یا مختلف سند سے بہت زیادہ پیغام جوڑے لگتے ہیں جو مختلف سمantic coherence کے ساتھ ہے. تدریس کورپوس کے ساتھ ہم ایک سیمیٹریک سین نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک طراحی کرتے ہیں تاکسٹ جوڑوں کو مدل کرنے کے لئے اور سیمیٹریک اتصال کے ساتھ رینگ ڈال دیتے ہیں۔ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا الگوریتم بہت سی حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر مضبوط بنسٹ لینوں پر مسابقات کی عملکرد حاصل کرسکتا ہے.", 'vi': 'Phân loại chuột có vai trò quan trọng trong việc phân tích và thu thập thông tin. Do không có dữ liệu về huấn luyện, công việc trước đây chủ yếu chọn phương pháp không giám sát để xếp xếp quan điểm về độ đồng nghĩa phân biệt đối tượng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một ý tưởng giản dị và dễ dàng để tự động tạo ra một bộ dữ liệu "gần như" huấn luyện, gồm một lượng lớn các chữ ghép từ một hoặc những tài liệu khác nhau với một sự đồng nghĩa về mặt ngữ pháp khác nhau. Với tập đoàn huấn luyện, chúng tôi thiết kế một mạng thần kinh của CNN đối xứng để mô hình chữ hai cặp và xếp hạng một sự liên quan theo ngữ pháp trong việc học xếp hạng. Thí nghiệm cho thấy thuật to án của chúng ta có khả năng đạt được hiệu suất cạnh tranh trên các nền tảng vững chắc trên nhiều nhà dữ liệu thế giới thực.', 'uz': "Name Taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yoʻq sababi, oldingi ish asosida mavzu ajratish uchun semantik birlashtirish usullarini ishga tushirish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz avtomatik 'kvsi' taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni yaratish uchun juda foydalanuvchi va oddiy g'oyalarni hozir qilamiz. Bu yerda bir necha ko'plab matn parchalari va har xil hujjatlardan boshqa semantik koʻpayligi bor. Taʼminlovchi kopus bilan biz CNN neyrol tarmoqni yaratib, matn ikkita qo'llanmalarni modellash uchun semantik koʻpayligini o'rganish uchun darajada o'rganish. Tajribalar ko'rsatadi, algorithimizning ko'pchilik dunyodagi ko'pchilik maʼlumotlar sohasidagi ko'pchilik asosiy asboblarga rivojlanishimiz mumkin.", 'nl': "Topic segmentatie speelt een belangrijke rol bij discours parsing en informatie retrieval. Vanwege het ontbreken van opleidingsgegevens worden in het vorige werk voornamelijk methoden gebruikt zonder toezicht om semantische samenhang tussen alinea's te rangschikken voor topic segmentatie. In dit artikel presenteren we een intuïtief en eenvoudig idee om automatisch een 'quasi' trainingsdataset te creëren, die een grote hoeveelheid tekstparen uit dezelfde of verschillende documenten met verschillende semantische samenhang bevat. Met het trainingscorpus ontwerpen we een symmetrisch CNN neuraal netwerk om tekstparen te modelleren en de semantische samenhang binnen het learning to rank framework te rangschikken. Experimenten tonen aan dat ons algoritme concurrerende prestaties kan behalen over sterke baselines op verschillende real-world datasets.", 'da': "Emnesegmentering spiller en vigtig rolle for diskursanalyse og informationssøgning. På grund af manglende uddannelsesdata anvender tidligere arbejde hovedsagelig ikke-overvågede metoder til at rangere semantisk sammenhæng mellem afsnit for emneområdesegmentering. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en intuitiv og enkel idé til automatisk at skabe et 'kvasi' træningsdatasæt, som indeholder en stor mængde tekstpar fra samme eller forskellige dokumenter med forskellig semantisk sammenhæng. Med træningskorpus designer vi et symmetrisk CNN neuralt netværk til at modellere tekstpar og rangere den semantiske sammenhæng inden for rammerne af læring til rangering. Eksperimenter viser, at vores algoritme er i stand til at opnå konkurrencedygtig ydeevne over stærke baselines på flere virkelige datasæt.", 'bg': 'Сегментацията на темата играе важна роля за анализирането на дискурса и извличането на информация. Поради липсата на данни за обучение, предишната работа използва предимно ненадзорни методи за класиране на семантичната съгласуваност между параграфите за сегментация на темата. В настоящата статия представяме интуитивна и проста идея за автоматично създаване на "квази" набор от данни за обучение, който включва голямо количество текстови двойки от едни и същи или различни документи с различна семантична съгласуваност. С тренировъчния корпус проектираме симетрична невронна мрежа за моделиране на текстови двойки и класиране на семантичната съгласуваност в рамките на рамката за учене на ранг. Експериментите показват, че нашият алгоритъм е в състояние да постигне конкурентна производителност над силни базови линии на няколко набора от данни от реалния свят.', 'hr': 'Temska segmentacija igra važnu ulogu za analizu diskusija i prikupljanje informacija. Zbog nedostatka podataka o obuci, prethodni rad primarno usvojava neodređene metode za raspoređivanje semantičke konsekvencije između odstavaka za segmentaciju teme. U ovom papiru predstavljamo intuitivnu i jednostavnu ideju kako bi automatski stvorili komplet podataka o obuci kvasi, koji uključuje veliku količinu tekstskih parova iz istih ili različitih dokumenta s različitim semantičkom koherencijom. S obzirom na trening korpus, dizajniramo simetričnu CNN neuralnu mrežu da modeliramo tekstualne pare i odredimo semantičku koherenciju unutar učenja za ranking okvira. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš algoritam u mogućnosti ostvariti konkurentnu učinku nad jakim osnovnim linijama na nekoliko podataka o stvarnom svijetu.', 'id': "Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval.  Karena tidak ada data pelatihan, pekerjaan sebelumnya terutama mengadopsi metode tidak diawasi untuk mengatur konsistensi semantis antara paragraf untuk segmentasi topik. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan ide sederhana dan intuitif untuk secara otomatis menciptakan dataset pelatihan 'quasi', yang termasuk jumlah besar pasangan teks dari dokumen yang sama atau berbeda dengan koerensi semantis berbeda. Dengan korpus latihan, kami merancang jaringan neural CNN simetrik untuk model pasangan teks dan mengatur konsistensi semantis dalam belajar untuk mengatur rangka. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa algoritma kita mampu mencapai prestasi kompetitif melalui garis dasar yang kuat pada beberapa set data dunia nyata.", 'de': 'Themensegmentierung spielt eine wichtige Rolle für Diskursparsing und Information Retrieval. Aufgrund des Fehlens von Trainingsdaten werden in früheren Arbeiten hauptsächlich unbeaufsichtigte Methoden verwendet, um die semantische Kohärenz zwischen Absätzen für die Themensegmentierung zu rangieren. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine intuitive und einfache Idee vor, automatisch einen quasi-Trainingsdatensatz zu erstellen, der eine große Anzahl von Textpaaren aus denselben oder verschiedenen Dokumenten mit unterschiedlicher semantischer Kohärenz enthält. Mit dem Trainingskorpus entwerfen wir ein symmetrisches CNN neuronales Netzwerk, um Textpaare zu modellieren und die semantische Kohärenz innerhalb des Learning to Rank Frameworks zu rangieren. Experimente zeigen, dass unser Algorithmus in der Lage ist, wettbewerbsfähige Leistung über starke Baselines auf mehreren realen Datensätzen zu erzielen.', 'sw': "Kugawanywa kwa mada inacheza jukumu muhimu la kubadilisha mazungumzo na upatikanaji wa habari. Kutokana na kutokuwepo kwa takwimu za mafunzo, kazi iliyopita huchukua mbinu zisizo na uhakika ili kuweka mshikamano wa kimapenzi kati ya vipengele vya kugawanywa mada. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka wazo rahisi na rahisi kutengeneza seti ya mafunzo ya 'quasi', ambalo linajumuisha kiasi kikubwa cha ndoa za maandishi kutoka katika nyaraka hizo au tofauti tofauti na ushirikiano wa kimapenzi. Kwa makampuni ya mafunzo, tunatengeneza mtandao wa neura wa CNN ili kutengeneza wanandoa wa maandishi na kuweka msinganyiko wa kimapenzi ndani ya kujifunza ili kupata nafasi. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa utaratibu wetu unaweza kufikia utendaji wa ushindani wa misingi yenye nguvu katika seti kadhaa za taarifa za dunia halisi.", 'tr': "Tema segmentasiýasy çykyş we maglumat almak üçin wajyp roli oýnaýar. Maglumaty okuw etmeginiň ýok bolmagynyň sebäbi öňki işiň esasynda tema segmentasiýasy üçin semantik paragraflaryň arasynda bir ýerleşmeligini üýtgedýär. Bu kagyzda, biz özümizden çykyş we basit bir ideýa 'quasi' okuw sanatyny otomatik bilen bejermek üçin meňzeş ýa-da farklı senediň kän bir toparyny meňzeş senediň we beýleki senediň birleşigini bar. Okuw köpüsi bilen simetrik CNN neural a ýry düzenledik we metin çizgilerini düzenlemek üçin semantik bir birleşigi düzenledik. Denminatlar biziň algoritmimiz birnäçe dünýäde birnäçe sanat datajyklaryň üstünde konkursiýa eserleşmegi başarap bilýär.", 'af': "Tema segmentasie speel 'n belangrike rol vir speletjies ontleed en inligting ontvang. Dus die absence van onderwerp data, aanvaar die vorige werk hoofsaaklik ononderwerp metodes om semantiese koherens tussen paragraaf vir onderwerp segmentasie te rank. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n intuitief en eenvoudige idee om outomaties 'n 'quasi' onderwerp datastel te skep, wat 'n groot hoeveelheid teks paar van dieselfde of verskillende dokumente met verskillende semantiese koherens insluit. Met die oefening korpus ontwerp ons 'n simetriese CNN neuralnetwerk om teks paar te model en die semantiese koherens in die leer te rank raamwerk. Eksperimente wys dat ons algoritme is in staat om rekenaardige prestasie te bereik oor sterke basisline op verskeie regte wêreld datastelle.", 'am': "የጉዳዩ ግንኙነት ለመንግግር ማጋራት እና መረጃ ማቅረብ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ባስተማሪው ዳታ ስላልነበረበት ምክንያት የቀድሞው ስራ በመጀመሪያው ስራ በክፍሎች መካከል ለገጽ ማቀናቀል የsemantic coherence እንዲያቀበል ያልተጠበቅ ሥርዓት ይይዛል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የ'ቁሲ' አስተማሪ ዳታተር ማድረግ ማድረግ እናስቀራለን፡፡ በተስተማሪው ኮርፓስ፣ የCNN ኔural መረብ መፍጠር እናደርጋለን የጽሑፍ ሁለቶች እና ትምህርት ውስጥ የsemantic ድጋፍ ለመማር ትክክል ፍሬማር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች አሌጎርቲማችን በብዙ እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የበረታች መደገፊያዎችን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡", 'sq': "Segmentimi i temave luan një rol të rëndësishëm për analizimin e diskurseve dhe marrjen e informacionit. Due to the absence of training data, previous work mainly adopts unsupervised methods to rank semantic coherence between paragraphs for topic segmentation.  In this paper, we present an intuitive and simple idea to automatically create a 'quasi' training dataset, which includes a large amount of text pairs from the same or different documents with different semantic coherence.  With the training corpus, we design a symmetric CNN neural network to model text pairs and rank the semantic coherence within the learning to rank framework.  Eksperimentet tregojnë se algoritmi ynë është në gjendje të arrijë performancë konkurruese mbi linjat bazë të forta në disa grupe të dhënash të botës reale.", 'fa': 'بخش\u200cبندی موضوع نقش مهم برای بازرسی و بازرسی اطلاعات را بازی می\u200cکند. بخاطر اینکه داده های آموزش وجود ندارد، کار قبلی در اصل روش\u200cهای غیرقابل تحریک برای تعلق تعلق سنتی بین نقطه\u200cها برای بخش\u200cبندی موضوع را قبول می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما ایده\u200cی بی\u200cنظیر و ساده را برای خودکار یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای آموزش «quasi» نشان می\u200cدهیم، که شامل یک مقدار زیادی از جفت\u200cهای متن از یک یا متفاوت سند\u200cهای متفاوتی با هماهنگی semantic متفاوتی است. با کورپوس تمرین، شبکه عصبی CNN را طراحی می کنیم تا جفت متن را مدل کنیم و هماهنگی semantic را در درون یادگیری که چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که الگوریتم ما می\u200cتواند اجرای مسابقه بر خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای قوی در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای جهانی واقعی برسد.', 'ko': "화제의 구분은 문장 분석과 정보 검색에서 중요한 역할을 한다.훈련 데이터가 부족하기 때문에 이전의 업무는 주로 감독이 없는 방법으로 단락 간의 의미의 일관성을 정렬하여 주제를 구분했다.본고에서 우리는 직관적이고 간단한 방법을 제시하여'준'훈련 데이터 집합을 자동으로 만들었다. 그 중에서 같은 문서나 다른 문서에서 온 대량의 텍스트 쌍을 포함하고 서로 다른 의미의 일관성을 가진다.훈련 자료 라이브러리를 이용하여 우리는 대칭적인 CNN 신경 네트워크를 설계하여 텍스트 대조를 모델링하고 학습 정렬 구조 안에서 의미의 일관성을 정렬했다.실험에 의하면 여러 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서 우리의 알고리즘은 강한 기선에서 경쟁력 있는 성능을 얻을 수 있다.", 'hy': "Տեմային սեգմետրացիան կարևոր դեր է խաղում խոսակցության վերլուծության և տեղեկատվության վերադարձման համար: Քանի որ ոչ մի ուսուցման տվյալներ չկա, նախորդ աշխատանքը հիմնականում օգտագործում է անվերահսկված մեթոդներ, որպեսզի դասավորի սեմանտիկ կապվածությունը թեմայի սեգրեգացիայի պարագաների միջև: In this paper, we present an intuitive and simple idea to automatically create a 'quasi' training dataset, which includes a large amount of text pairs from the same or different documents with different semantic coherence.  Օգտագործելով մարմինը, մենք ստեղծում ենք սիմետրիկ CNN նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք տեքստի զույգեր և դասավորենք սեմանտիկ կոնցենսը սովորելու մեջ դասավորելու համար: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր ալգորիթմը կարողանում է հասնել մրցակցության արդյունքներին մի քանի իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա:", 'az': 'Mevzu segmentasiyası diskusiyaları ayırmaq və məlumat almaq üçün vacib bir rol oynayır. Əvvəlki işlər məlumatlar yoxduğuna görə, məlumatlar segmentasiyonu üçün semantik məlumatlar arasındakı müəyyən edilməmiş metodları qəbul edər. Bu kağızda, özünüzə "quasi" təhsil veri setini yaratmaq üçün istifadə edən və sadəcə olaraq bir fikir göstəririk ki, aynı və ya müxtəlif belələrdən çox mətn çift, müxtəlif semantik birləşməsi ilə birləşdirilir. Öyrənmək korpusu ilə simetrik CNN nöral a ğını mətn çiftlərini modelləşdirmək və öyrənmək üçün semantik coherenciyə dəyişdiririk. Həqiqətən, əlverişlər bizim algoritmimiz bir neçə reallı dünya veri setlərində qüvvətli baz çətinlərin üstündə münafiqli performansını başa çata bilər.', 'cs': 'Segmentace témat hraje důležitou roli při analýze diskurzu a vyhledávání informací. Vzhledem k absenci tréninkových dat předchozí práce přijímá zejména bez dohledu metody pro hodnocení sémantické koherence mezi odstavci pro segmentaci témat. V tomto článku představujeme intuitivní a jednoduchou myšlenku automatického vytvoření "kvazi" tréninkové datové sady, která obsahuje velké množství textových párů ze stejných nebo různých dokumentů s různou sémantickou koherencí. S tréninkovým korpusem navrhujeme symetrickou CNN neuronovou síť pro modelování textových párů a hodnocení sémantické koherence v rámci rámce učení hodnocení. Experimenty ukazují, že náš algoritmus je schopen dosáhnout konkurenčního výkonu na silných základních liniích na několika skutečných datových sadách.', 'ca': "Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval.  Due to the absence of training data, previous work mainly adopts unsupervised methods to rank semantic coherence between paragraphs for topic segmentation.  In this paper, we present an intuitive and simple idea to automatically create a 'quasi' training dataset, which includes a large amount of text pairs from the same or different documents with different semantic coherence.  With the training corpus, we design a symmetric CNN neural network to model text pairs and rank the semantic coherence within the learning to rank framework.  Experiments show that our algorithm is able to achieve competitive performance over strong baselines on several real-world datasets.", 'bn': "বিষয়ের বিভাগ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করে কথোপকথন পার্সিং এবং তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য। প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য অনুপস্থিতির কারণে, পূর্ববর্তী কাজ মূলত বিষয়বস্তুর বিভিন্ন অংশগ্রহণের জন্য প্যারাফেক্টগুলোর মধ্যে সেমেন্টি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি 'কোয়াসি' ট্রেনিং ডাটাসেট তৈরি করার জন্য একটি বুদ্ধিমান এবং সহজ ধারণা উপস্থাপন করি, যার মধ্যে একই বা বিভিন্ন ক প্রশিক্ষণ কোর্পাসের মাধ্যমে আমরা সিএনএন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ডিজাইন করি টেক্সট জোড়া মডেল করার জন্য এবং সেমেন্টিক ক কোর্পাসের মধ্যে যে কো পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম বেশ কয়েকটি বাস্তবতা ডেটাসেটে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা করতে পারে।", 'et': 'Teema segmenteerimine mängib olulist rolli diskursuse parsimisel ja teabe hankimisel. Koolitusandmete puudumise tõttu kasutatakse varasemates töödes peamiselt järelevalveta meetodeid teemade segmenteerimise jaoks paragrahvide semantilise sidususe järjestamiseks. Käesolevas töös esitame intuitiivse ja lihtsa idee luua automaatselt kvaasikoolituse andmekogum, mis sisaldab suurt hulka tekstipaare samadest või erinevatest dokumentidest erineva semantilise sidususega. Koolituskorpusega kujundame sümmeetrilise CNN neuravõrgu tekstipaaride modelleerimiseks ja semantilise sidususe järjestamiseks õppimise raamistikus. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie algoritm suudab saavutada konkurentsivõimelise jõudluse tugevate alusjoonte kaudu mitmetes reaalmaailma andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Aihesegmentoinnilla on tärkeä rooli diskurssin jäsentämisessä ja tiedonhaussa. Koulutustietojen puuttumisen vuoksi aikaisemmassa työssä käytetään pääasiassa valvomattomia menetelmiä semanttisen johdonmukaisuuden määrittämiseksi aiheiden segmentoinnin kappaleiden välillä. Tässä työssä esittelemme intuitiivisen ja yksinkertaisen idean luoda automaattisesti "kvasi"-koulutusaineisto, joka sisältää suuren määrän tekstipareja samoista tai eri dokumenteista, joilla on erilainen semanttinen johdonmukaisuus. Harjoituskorpuksen avulla suunnittelemme symmetrisen CNN-neuroverkon tekstiparien mallintamiseen ja semanttisen koherenssin sijoittumiseen oppimiskehyksessä. Kokeet osoittavat, että algoritmimme pystyy saavuttamaan kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn vahvoilla lähtölinjoilla useilla reaalimaailman datajoukoilla.', 'bs': 'Temska segmentacija igra važnu ulogu za analizu diskusija i prikupljanje informacija. Zbog nedostatka podataka o obuci, prethodni rad usvojava uglavnom neodređene metode da bi se rasporedila semantička saskašnost između paragrafa za segmentaciju teme. U ovom papiru predstavljamo intuitivnu i jednostavnu ideju da automatski stvorimo set podataka o obuci kvasi, koja uključuje veliku količinu tekstnih parova iz istih ili različitih dokumenta sa različitim semantičkom koherencijom. Uz trening korpus, dizajniramo simetričnu CNN neuralnu mrežu da modeliramo tekstualne pare i odredimo semantičku koherenciju unutar učenja za ranking okvira. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je naš algoritam u mogućnosti ostvariti konkurentnu funkciju nad jakim baznim linijama na nekoliko realnih podataka na svijetu.', 'jv': "section Tanggal ngenggo data yang dipunanggap Nang pepulan iki, kita mulai sistem entwisik lan sampeyan sampeyan nggawe dataset kejahatan 'question' Dhewe nganggo coro kuwi tindang cara-cara, kita sampek sistem sematik lan alam kuwi tindang nggawe layar seneng pisan kelas kuwi tindang. Algorithm menehi wong kuwi, Algorithmu kuwi iso dianggap akeh perusahaan anyar iki dadi sing paling maneh", 'sk': 'Segmentacija teme igra pomembno vlogo pri razčlenjevanju diskurza in pridobivanju informacij. Zaradi pomanjkanja podatkov o usposabljanju predhodno delo uporablja predvsem nenadzorovane metode za razvrščanje semantične skladnosti med odstavki za segmentacijo teme. V prispevku predstavljamo intuitivno in preprosto idejo za samodejno ustvarjanje "kvazi" nabora podatkov o usposabljanju, ki vključuje veliko število besedilnih parov iz istih ali različnih dokumentov z različno semantično koherenco. S korpusom usposabljanja oblikujemo simetrično nevronsko omrežje CNN za modeliranje besedilnih parov in razvrstitev semantične koherence znotraj okvira učenja rankiranja. Eksperimenti kažejo, da je naš algoritem sposoben doseči konkurenčno zmogljivost preko močnih osnovnih linij na več resničnih naborih podatkov.', 'he': "Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval.  בגלל הנעדרת נתוני אימון, העבודה הקודמת מאמצת בעיקר שיטות לא מעוקבות לשורג הקיונציה סמנטית בין פרגסטים למחלקת נושאים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים רעיון אינטואיטיבי ופשוט ליצור אוטומטית קבוצת נתונים של אימון 'quasi', שכוללת כמות גדולה של זוגות טקסט מאותם מסמכים או מסמכים שונים עם תואם סמנטי שונה. עם הקורפוס האימוני, אנחנו מעצבים רשת עצבית סימטרית CNN כדי לדוגמא זוגות טקסט ולדרגות את הקיונציה הסמנטית בתוך הלימוד לדרג מסגרת. ניסויים מראים שהאלגוריתם שלנו מסוגל להשיג ביצועים תחרותיים מעל קווי בסיס חזקים על מספר קווי נתונים בעולם האמיתי.", 'ha': "QXml Due da ba'a kasa tsari da data, aikin farko yana zãɓi shiryoyin da ba'a tsare su ba, mainli, ya yi amfani da hanyoyin rangi na semantic kotsence a tsakanin sãɓanin wa segment wa madaidaici. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade wani idãnar da ke da gane da sauƙi zuwa ka sami tsarin tsarin 'Qusi' farat ɗaya, wanda ke ƙunsa da nau'in rubutu masu yawa daga dukkan takardar kwamfyuta ko daban-dabam, da wani na'ura na haɗi. Haƙĩƙa, ana sami da umarni, za'a design wata shirin neural na CNN ya samu'a zuwa misalin matsayin mazaɓa, kuma Mu sarrafa koshi na semantic guda idan an karanta zuwa karatun firam. Tajarakin na nuna cewa algorityinmu yana iya iya kai ga aikin mai gaura a kan rundanka masu ƙarfi a kan wasu danne-danne-duniya masu gaskiya.", 'bo': 'Topic segmentation plays an important role for discourse parsing and information retrieval. གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དག་རྒྱུ་ལས་བརྟེན་ནས། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཡང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་མེད་པའི་ཚོར་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཐད་ཚོར་བ་དང་སླ་བའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཞིན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་ ང་ཚོས་དབུགས་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་པའི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experiments show that our algorithm is able to achieve competitive performance over strong baselines on several real-world datasets.'}
{'en': 'GRASP : Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'ar': 'GRASP: أنماط غنية للتعدين الجدلي', 'es': 'GRASP: patrones ricos para la minería de la argumentación', 'fr': "GRASP\xa0: Des modèles riches pour l'exploration d'argumentation", 'pt': 'GRASP: padrões avançados para mineração de argumentação', 'ja': '把握：弁論術マイニングのための豊富なパターン', 'hi': 'GRASP: तर्क खनन के लिए रिच पैटर्न', 'ru': 'ЗАХВАТ: богатые шаблоны для майнинга аргументации', 'zh': 'GRASP曰:论掘之丰式也', 'ga': 'GRASP: Patrúin Saibhir do Mhianadóireacht Argóint', 'el': 'GRASP: Πλούσια πρότυπα για την εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων', 'hu': 'GRASP: Gazdag minták az érvelési bányászathoz', 'ka': 'Comment', 'kk': 'GRASP: Argumentation Mining үшін бағалау үлгілері', 'it': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാസ്പി: അര്\u200dഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d മിനിങ്ങിനുള്ള സമ്പന്നരായ പാത്റെര്\u200dമാര്\u200d', 'mk': 'Богати шаблони за рудање на аргументација', 'lt': 'GRASP: Rimti argumentų gavybos šablonai', 'ms': 'GRASP: Corak Kaya untuk Menyembah Argumentasi', 'mt': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'ro': 'GRASP: Modele bogate pentru mineritul de argumentare', 'sr': 'GRASP: bogati uzorci za rudarstvo argumentacije', 'mn': 'ГРАСП: Аргументацийн багасгалын баян загвар', 'no': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'pl': 'GRASP: Bogate wzorce dla górnictwa argumentacji', 'sv': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'ur': 'GRASP: Argumentation Mining کے لئے ریچ پٹرنے', 'si': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'so': 'GRASP: Midowyada hodanka ah ee heshiiska', 'ta': 'GRASP: தேவைப்படுத்தும் கருத்துப் பாதுகாப்புகள்', 'uz': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'vi': 'Màu sắc phong phú cho chương trình nghiên cứu khai thác', 'bg': 'ГРАСП: Богати модели за аргументационно минно дело', 'da': 'GRASP: Rige mønstre for argumentation minedrift', 'hr': 'GRASP: bogati uzorci za rudarstvo argumentacije', 'nl': 'GRASP: Rijke patronen voor argumentatie mijnbouw', 'de': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'id': 'GRASP: Pattern Rich for Argumentation Mining', 'fa': 'GRASP: الگوهای ثروتمند برای ذخیره آرژومات', 'sw': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'tr': '%1$s', 'af': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns vir Argumentasie Mining', 'sq': 'GRASP: Patronat e pasura për Argumentation Mining', 'am': 'patterns-action', 'hy': 'ԳՌԱՍՊ. Արգեմենտացիայի հանքարդյունահանման հարուստ մոդելներ', 'az': 'GRASP: Argumentasyon Mining üçün Zengin Şablonlar', 'bn': 'GRASP: আর্গুমেন্টেশন মিনিং এর জন্য ধনী প্যাটার্ন', 'bs': 'GRASP: bogati uzorci za rudarstvo argumentacije', 'ca': "GRASP: Patrons rics per a la mineria d'argumentació", 'ko': 'GRAP: 논증 발굴의 풍부한 모델', 'et': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'cs': 'GRASP: Bohaté vzorce pro argumentační těžbu', 'fi': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining', 'jv': 'name of the hash table', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'GRASP: Bogati vzorci za rudarjenje argumentacij', 'he': 'גראספ: דפוסים עשירים למכרת התווכחות', 'bo': 'GRASP: Rich Patterns for Argumentation Mining'}
{'en': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is an algorithm for automatically extracting patterns that characterize subtle linguistic phenomena. To that end, GRASP augments each term of input text with multiple layers of linguistic information. These different facets of the text terms are systematically combined to reveal rich patterns. We report highly promising experimental results in several challenging text analysis tasks within the field of Argumentation Mining. We believe that GRASP is general enough to be useful for other domains too. For example, each of the following sentences includes a claim for a [ topic ] : 1. Opponents often argue that the open primary is unconstitutional. [ Open Primaries ] 2. Prof. Smith suggested that affirmative action devalues the accomplishments of the chosen. [ Affirmative Action ] 3. The majority stated that the First Amendment does not guarantee the right to offend others. [ Freedom of Speech ] These sentences share almost no words in common, however, they are similar at a more abstract level. A human observer may notice the following underlying common structure, or pattern : [ someone][argue / suggest / state][that][topic term][sentiment term ]. GRASP aims to automatically capture such underlying structures of the given data. For the above examples it finds the pattern [ noun][express][that][noun, topic][sentiment ], where [ express ] stands for all its (in)direct hyponyms, and [ noun, topic ] means a noun which is also related to the topic.', 'ar': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) هي خوارزمية لاستخراج الأنماط التي تميز الظواهر اللغوية الدقيقة تلقائيًا. ولتحقيق هذه الغاية ، تعزز GRASP كل مصطلح من نصوص الإدخال بطبقات متعددة من المعلومات اللغوية. يتم الجمع بين هذه الأوجه المختلفة لمصطلحات النص بشكل منهجي للكشف عن أنماط غنية. لقد أبلغنا عن نتائج تجريبية واعدة للغاية في العديد من مهام تحليل النص الصعبة في مجال تعدين الحجج. نعتقد أن GRASP عام بما يكفي ليكون مفيدًا للمجالات الأخرى أيضًا. على سبيل المثال ، تتضمن كل جملة من الجمل التالية مطالبة بشأن [موضوع]: 1. غالبًا ما يجادل المعارضون بأن الابتدائية المفتوحة غير دستورية. [الانتخابات التمهيدية المفتوحة] 2. اقترح الأستاذ سميث أن العمل الإيجابي يقلل من إنجازات المختارين. [إجراء إيجابي] 3. صرحت الأغلبية بأن التعديل الأول لا يضمن الحق في الإساءة للآخرين. [حرية الكلام] لا تشترك هذه الجمل تقريبًا في الكلمات ، ومع ذلك ، فهي متشابهة على مستوى أكثر تجريدًا. قد يلاحظ المراقب البشري الهيكل أو النمط المشترك الأساسي التالي: [شخص ما] [يجادل / يقترح / دولة] [ذلك] [مصطلح الموضوع] [مصطلح المشاعر]. يهدف GRASP إلى التقاط مثل هذه الهياكل الأساسية للبيانات المعطاة تلقائيًا. بالنسبة للأمثلة المذكورة أعلاه ، تجد النمط [اسم] [صريح] [ذلك] [اسم ، موضوع] [شعور] ، حيث تشير كلمة [express] إلى جميع المراجع المباشرة (في) ، و [اسم ، موضوع] تعني اسمًا يرتبط أيضًا بالموضوع.', 'fr': "GRASP (Greedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) est un algorithme permettant d'extraire automatiquement des motifs qui caractérisent des phénomènes linguistiques subtils. À cette fin, le GRASP ajoute à chaque terme du texte d'entrée plusieurs couches d'informations linguistiques. Ces différentes facettes des termes textuels sont systématiquement combinées pour révéler des motifs riches. Nous présentons des résultats expérimentaux très prometteurs dans plusieurs tâches d'analyse de texte complexes dans le domaine de l'exploration d'argumentation. Nous pensons que le GRASP est suffisamment général pour être utile dans d'autres domaines également. Par exemple, chacune des phrases suivantes inclut une revendication pour un [sujet]\xa0: 1. Les opposants soutiennent souvent que la primaire ouverte est inconstitutionnelle. [Primaires ouvertes] 2. Le professeur Smith a suggéré que l'action positive dévalorise les réalisations des élus. [Action positive] 3. La majorité a déclaré que le premier amendement ne garantit pas le droit d'offenser les autres. [Liberté d'expression] Ces phrases n'ont presque aucun mot en commun, mais elles sont similaires à un niveau plus abstrait. Un observateur humain peut remarquer la structure ou le modèle commun sous-jacent suivant\xa0: [quelqu'un] [argumenter/suggèrer/énoncer] [ce] [terme du sujet] [terme de sentiment]. GRASP vise à capturer automatiquement ces structures sous-jacentes des données données. Pour les exemples ci-dessus, il trouve le motif [nom] [express] [que] [nom, sujet] [sentiment], où [express] représente tous ses hyponymes (in) directs, et [nom, sujet] signifie un nom qui est également lié au sujet.", 'pt': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) é um algoritmo para extrair automaticamente padrões que caracterizam fenômenos linguísticos sutis. Para esse fim, o GRASP aumenta cada termo do texto de entrada com várias camadas de informações linguísticas. Essas diferentes facetas dos termos do texto são sistematicamente combinadas para revelar padrões ricos. Relatamos resultados experimentais altamente promissores em várias tarefas desafiadoras de análise de texto no campo da Mineração de Argumentação. Acreditamos que o GRASP é geral o suficiente para ser útil para outros domínios também. Por exemplo, cada uma das seguintes sentenças inclui uma reivindicação para um [tópico]: 1. Os oponentes frequentemente argumentam que a primária aberta é inconstitucional. [Primárias Abertas] 2. O Prof. Smith sugeriu que a ação afirmativa desvaloriza as realizações dos escolhidos. [Ação Afirmativa] 3. A maioria afirmou que a Primeira Emenda não garante o direito de ofender os outros. [Liberdade de Expressão] Essas frases quase não compartilham palavras em comum, no entanto, são semelhantes em um nível mais abstrato. Um observador humano pode notar a seguinte estrutura ou padrão comum subjacente: [alguém][argumentar/sugerir/declarar][que][termo de tópico][termo de sentimento]. O GRASP visa capturar automaticamente essas estruturas subjacentes dos dados fornecidos. Para os exemplos acima, ele encontra o padrão [substantivo][express][that][noun,topic][sentiment], onde [express] representa todos os seus hipônimos (in)diretos, e [noun,topic] significa um substantivo que também está relacionado ao tema.', 'es': 'GRASP (GreeDy Augmented Sequential Patterns) es un algoritmo para extraer automáticamente patrones que caracterizan los fenómenos lingüísticos sutiles. Con ese fin, GRASP amplía cada término del texto de entrada con múltiples capas de información lingüística. Estas diferentes facetas de los términos del texto se combinan sistemáticamente para revelar patrones ricos. Presentamos resultados experimentales altamente prometedores en varias tareas desafiantes de análisis de textos dentro del campo de la minería de la argumentación. Creemos que GRASP es lo suficientemente general como para ser útil también en otros dominios. Por ejemplo, cada una de las siguientes oraciones incluye un reclamo para un [tema]: 1. Los opositores a menudo argumentan que las primarias abiertas son inconstitucionales. [Primarias abiertas] 2. El profesor Smith sugirió que la acción afirmativa devalúa los logros de los elegidos. [Acción afirmativa] 3. La mayoría declaró que la Primera Enmienda no garantiza el derecho a ofender a los demás. [Libertad de expresión] Estas frases casi no tienen palabras en común, sin embargo, son similares en un nivel más abstracto. Un observador humano puede notar la siguiente estructura o patrón común subyacente: [alguien] [argumenta/sugiere/declara] [ese] [término temático] [término de sentimiento]. GRASP tiene como objetivo capturar automáticamente las estructuras subyacentes de los datos dados. Para los ejemplos anteriores, encuentra el patrón [sustantivo] [expreso] [ese] [sustantivo, tema] [sentimiento], donde [express] significa todos sus hipónimos (in) directos, y [sustantivo, tema] significa un sustantivo que también está relacionado con el tema.', 'ja': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns)は、微妙な言語現象を特徴付けるパターンを自動的に抽出するためのアルゴリズムです。 そのために、入力テキストの各用語を複数の言語情報層で把握し、拡張する。 テキスト用語のこれらの異なる側面は、体系的に組み合わされ、豊富なパターンを明らかにする。 私たちは、弁論術マイニングの分野内のいくつかの挑戦的なテキスト分析タスクで、非常に有望な実験結果を報告しています。 GRASPは、他のドメインにも役立つような一般的なものであると考えています。 たとえば、次の各文には、[topic]に対するクレームが含まれています。1. 反対派はしばしばオープン予備選挙は憲法違反であると主張する。 [オープンプライマリ] 2.スミス教授は、肯定的行動は選択された人の達成を低下させることを示唆しました。 【積極的行動】3.多数派は、第一次改正は他人を不快にさせる権利を保障しないと述べた。 [言論の自由]これらの文はほとんど共通の単語はありませんが、より抽象的なレベルで類似しています。 人間の観察者は、次の基本的な共通の構造またはパターンに気付くかもしれません。[誰か] [議論/提案/状態] [その] [トピック用語] [感情用語]。 GRASPは、与えられたデータのそのような基礎構造を自動的に取り込むことを目的としています。 上記の例では、パターン[名詞][表現][その][名詞、トピック][感情]を見つけます。ここで、[表現]はそのすべての直接的なハイポニムを表し、[名詞、トピック]はトピックにも関連する名詞を意味します。', 'zh': 'GRASP(GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns)者,算法也,所以自取微言也。 于是巨猿生方案以重言广文本术语。 文本术语者,系统地合而示之丰式。 论掘领内数挑战性文本析职以闻实验。 臣愚以为巨猿生方足普遍性,有用于他域。 如下句含[主题]之说:1.反对者常争明初选违宪。 [明初选] 2. 史密斯教授以为平权行贬选中者成。 [扶持] 3. 多言,第一修正案不保犯人之权利。 [言论自由] 此句殆无同单词,然其于更象之层面相似也。 人观察者或注意于下潜结构式:[某人][争/建言/陈][则][主题术语][情术语]。 巨猿存方旨自获给定数据此底结构。 其于上也,得式[名词][表][其][名词,主题][情],其中[表]代所有(直下称于),[名词,题]意相关也。', 'ru': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) - алгоритм автоматического извлечения шаблонов, характеризующих тонкие лингвистические явления. С этой целью, ЗАХВАТ дополняет каждый термин входного текста несколькими слоями лингвистической информации. Эти различные грани текстовых терминов систематически объединяются, чтобы выявить богатые закономерности. Мы сообщаем очень многообещающие экспериментальные результаты в нескольких сложных задачах анализа текста в области Argumentation Mining. Мы считаем, что GRASP является достаточно общим, чтобы быть полезным и для других областей. Например, каждое из следующих предложений включает в себя утверждение для [topic]: 1. Оппоненты часто утверждают, что открытые первичные выборы неконституционны. 2. Профессор Смит предположил, что позитивные действия обесценивают достижения избранных. 3. Большинство членов Комитета заявили, что первая поправка не гарантирует права на оскорбление других лиц. [Свобода слова] Эти предложения почти не имеют общих слов, однако они схожи на более абстрактном уровне. Человеческий наблюдатель может заметить следующую лежащую в основе общую структуру или модель: [кто-то][аргументирует/предлагает/заявляет][что][тематический термин][термин настроения]. GRASP стремится автоматически фиксировать такие лежащие в основе структуры данных. Для приведенных выше примеров он находит шаблон [существительное][выражение][что][существительное,тема][настроение], где [выражение] означает все его (в)прямые гипонимы, а [существительное,тема] означает существительное, которое также связано с темой.', 'hi': 'GRASP (GReedy संवर्धित अनुक्रमिक पैटर्न) स्वचालित रूप से पैटर्न निकालने के लिए एक एल्गोरिथ्म है जो सूक्ष्म भाषाई घटनाओं की विशेषता है। उस अंत तक, GRASP भाषाई जानकारी की कई परतों के साथ इनपुट टेक्स्ट के प्रत्येक शब्द को बढ़ाता है। पाठ शब्दों के इन विभिन्न पहलुओं को व्यवस्थित रूप से समृद्ध पैटर्न को प्रकट करने के लिए जोड़ा जाता है। हम तर्क खनन के क्षेत्र में कई चुनौतीपूर्ण पाठ विश्लेषण कार्यों में अत्यधिक आशाजनक प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। हमारा मानना है कि GRASP अन्य डोमेन के लिए भी उपयोगी होने के लिए पर्याप्त सामान्य है। उदाहरण के लिए, निम्नलिखित वाक्यों में से प्रत्येक में एक [विषय] के लिए एक दावा शामिल है: 1. विरोधियों का अक्सर तर्क होता है कि खुला प्राथमिक असंवैधानिक है। [ओपन प्राइमरी] 2. प्रोफेसर स्मिथ ने सुझाव दिया कि सकारात्मक कार्रवाई चुने हुए की उपलब्धियों को अवमूल्यन करती है। [सकारात्मक कार्रवाई] 3. बहुमत ने कहा कि पहला संशोधन दूसरों को अपमानित करने के अधिकार की गारंटी नहीं देता है। [अभिव्यक्ति की स्वतंत्रता] ये वाक्य आम में लगभग कोई शब्द साझा नहीं करते हैं, हालांकि, वे अधिक अमूर्त स्तर पर समान हैं। एक मानव पर्यवेक्षक निम्नलिखित अंतर्निहित सामान्य संरचना, या पैटर्न को नोटिस कर सकता है: [कोई व्यक्ति][बहस / सुझाव / राज्य]] वह [विषय शब्द] [भावना शब्द]। GRASP का उद्देश्य दिए गए डेटा की ऐसी अंतर्निहित संरचनाओं को स्वचालित रूप से कैप्चर करना है। उपर्युक्त उदाहरणों के लिए यह पैटर्न [संज्ञा][व्यक्त][वह][संज्ञा, विषय][भावना] पाता है, जहां [व्यक्त] अपने सभी (में) प्रत्यक्ष हाइपोनिम्स के लिए खड़ा है, और [संज्ञा, विषय] का अर्थ एक संज्ञा है जो विषय से भी संबंधित है।', 'ga': 'Is algartam é GRASP (Greedy Méadaithe Seicheamhach Patrúin) chun patrúin a bhaint amach go huathoibríoch arb iad is sainairíonna iad feiniméin theangeolaíocha subtle. Chuige sin, cuireann GRASP le gach téarma den téacs ionchuir le sraitheanna iolracha faisnéise teanga. Déantar na gnéithe éagsúla seo de théarmaí an téacs a chomhcheangal go córasach chun patrúin saibhre a nochtadh. Tuairiscímid torthaí turgnamhacha a bhfuil gealladh fúthu i roinnt tascanna dúshlánacha anailíse téacs laistigh de réimse na Mianadóireachta Argóinteachta. Creidimid go bhfuil GRASP ginearálta go leor le bheith úsáideach le haghaidh fearainn eile freisin. Mar shampla, cuimsíonn gach ceann de na habairtí seo a leanas éileamh ar [ábhar]: 1. Is minic a áitíonn lucht freasúra go bhfuil an bhunscoil oscailte míbhunreachtúil. [Príomhscoileanna Oscailte] 2. Mhol an tOllamh Smith go ndéanann gníomh dearfach díluacháil ar éachtaí an té a roghnaítear. [Gníomh dearfach] 3. Dúirt an tromlach nach ráthaíonn an Chéad Leasú an ceart chun daoine eile a chiontú. [Saoirse Cainte] Níl beagnach aon fhocal i gcoiteann ag na habairtí seo, ach tá siad cosúil ag leibhéal níos teibí. Féadfaidh breathnóir daonna an bunstruchtúr nó an patrún coiteann seo a leanas a thabhairt faoi deara: [duine][argóint/mol/luaigh][go][téarma topaice][téarma meon]. Tá sé mar aidhm ag GRASP struchtúir bhunúsacha dá leithéid de na sonraí a thugtar a ghabháil go huathoibríoch. I gcás na samplaí thuas, aimsíonn sé an patrún [ainmfhocal][sainráite][go][noun,topic][sentiment], áit a seasann [sloinn] dá chuid comhainm díreach (i), agus ciallaíonn [ainmfhocal,topaic] ainmfhocal a a bhaineann leis an topaic freisin.', 'hu': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) egy algoritmus a finom nyelvi jelenségeket jellemző minták automatikus kivonására. Ennek érdekében a GRASP a beviteli szöveg minden kifejezését több rétegű nyelvi információval bővíti. A szövegkifejezések ezek a különböző aspektusai rendszeresen kombinálódnak, hogy gazdag mintákat fedjenek fel. Rendkívül ígéretes kísérleti eredményekről számoltunk be számos kihívást jelentő szövegelemzési feladatban az Argumentation Mining területén. Úgy gondoljuk, hogy a GRASP elég általános ahhoz, hogy más területeken is hasznos lehessen. Például az alábbi mondatok mindegyike tartalmaz egy [téma] igényt: 1. Az ellenfelek gyakran azzal érvelnek, hogy a nyílt elsődleges alkotmányellenes. [Open Primaries] 2. Smith professzor azt javasolta, hogy a megerősítő cselekvés leértékeli a kiválasztottak eredményeit. [Megerősítő intézkedés] 3. A többség kijelentette, hogy az Első Módosítás nem garantálja a mások megsértésének jogát. [Szólásszabadság] Ezek a mondatok szinte nincsenek közös szavak, azonban absztrakt szinten hasonlóak. Egy emberi megfigyelő észreveheti a következő mögöttes közös struktúrát, vagy mintát: [valaki][argumente/suggest/state][that][topic kifejezés][sentiment kifejezés]. A GRASP célja, hogy automatikusan rögzítse az adott adatok ilyen mögöttes struktúráit. A fenti példák esetében megtalálja a mintát [főnév][expressz][that][főnév,topic][sentiment], ahol [expressz] az összes (in)közvetlen hiponymát jelenti, és [főnév,topic] egy olyan főnévet jelent, amely szintén kapcsolódik a témához.', 'el': 'Το είναι ένας αλγόριθμος για την αυτόματη εξαγωγή μοτίβων που χαρακτηρίζουν λεπτά γλωσσικά φαινόμενα. Για το σκοπό αυτό, το πρόγραμμα προσθέτει κάθε όρο κειμένου εισαγωγής με πολλαπλά επίπεδα γλωσσικών πληροφοριών. Αυτές οι διαφορετικές πτυχές των όρων κειμένου συνδυάζονται συστηματικά για να αποκαλύψουν πλούσια μοτίβα. Αναφέρουμε πολλά υποσχόμενα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε αρκετά απαιτητικά καθήκοντα ανάλυσης κειμένου στον τομέα της εξόρυξης επιχειρημάτων. Πιστεύουμε ότι το GRASP είναι αρκετά γενικό ώστε να είναι χρήσιμο και για άλλους τομείς. Για παράδειγμα, κάθε μία από τις ακόλουθες προτάσεις περιλαμβάνει μια αξίωση για ένα [θέμα]: 1. Οι αντίπαλοι συχνά υποστηρίζουν ότι η ανοικτή πρωτοβάθμια είναι αντισυνταγματική. [Ανοιχτά Πρωταθλήματα] 2. Ο καθηγητής Σμιθ πρότεινε ότι η θετική δράση υποτιμά τα επιτεύγματα των εκλεκτόν. [Επιβεβαίωση Δράσης] 3. Η πλειοψηφία δήλωσε ότι η Πρώτη Τροπολογία δεν εγγυάται το δικαίωμα προσβολής άλλων. [Ελευθερία του λόγου] Αυτές οι προτάσεις δεν έχουν σχεδόν καμία κοινή λέξη, ωστόσο, είναι παρόμοιες σε ένα πιο αφηρημένο επίπεδο. Ένας ανθρώπινος παρατηρητής μπορεί να παρατηρήσει την ακόλουθη υποκείμενη κοινή δομή ή μοτίβο: [κάποιος][επιχειρηματολογία/πρόταση/δήλωση][αυτός][θεματικός όρος][όρος συναισθημάτων]. Στόχος του είναι να συλλάβει αυτόματα τέτοιες υποκείμενες δομές των δεδομένων. Για τα παραπάνω παραδείγματα βρίσκει το μοτίβο [ουσιαστικό][έκφραση][εκείνο][ουσιαστικό,θέμα][συναίσθημα], όπου [ουσιαστικό] αντιπροσωπεύει όλα τα (μη)άμεσα υπόνυμά του, και [ουσιαστικό,θέμα] σημαίνει ένα ουσιαστικό που σχετίζεται επίσης με το θέμα.', 'ka': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) არის ალგორიტიმ ავტომატურად ექსტრაქტირების შაბლონებისთვის, რომლებიც საკუთარი ლენგურისტიკური ფენომენების გამოსახულება. ამ შემთხვევაში, GRASP ყველა ტექსტის შეტყობინება, რამდენიმე სიგრძე ინფორმაციის სიგრძე. ტექსტის სიტყვების განსხვავებული ფესტები სისტემატიკურად დაკავშირებულია ბედნიერი შაბლოების გაჩვენება. ჩვენ აღწერეთ ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი რამდენიმე შესაძლებელი ტექსტის ანალიზაციის რაოდენობაში არგუმენტირების მინუსაცი ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ GRASP უფრო სხვა დომენეებისთვის უფრო სარგებელია. მაგალითად, ყველა შემდეგი სიტყვების შესახებ აქვს [თემა]: 1. პოპონტენტები უფრო მეტად აღწერენ, რომ გახსნა პრიმენტიური პრიმენტიური არსებობა. Comment პროფექტი სმიტი მინდომა, რომ დარწმუნებული მოქმედება გამოყენებული მოქმედების გადასრულება. 3. ოჲლთუთწრა კაჱა, ფვ ოყპგთწრ ოპჲმვნ ნვ гаранრთპა ოპაგჲ ეა ნაოპაგთ ეპსდთრვ. [სიტყვის თავისუფალი] ეს სიტყვები უფრო არ იყოს საერთო სიტყვები, მაგრამ ისინი უფრო აბსტრაკური დონეში არიან. ადამიანის მონაცემებელი შეიძლება დააჩვენოთ შემდეგი საერთო სტრუქტურა, ან სტრუქტურა: [ვინმე][არგუქტურა/გაჩვენოთ/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP მინდა ავტომატურად დაატვირთოთ მონაცემების ასეთი ქვემოთ სტრუქტურები. მაგალითად მაგალითად მაგალითად მაგალითად მაგალითად შეიძლება შაბლონი, რომელიც [გამოსახულება] ყველა მისი მიერ მიერ ჰიპონიმებს, და [სახელი,ტექმია] ნიშნავს სახელი, რომელიც ასევე მიერ ტექმის შესახებ.', 'it': "GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) è un algoritmo per estrarre automaticamente modelli che caratterizzano fenomeni linguistici sottili. A tal fine, GRASP aumenta ogni termine di testo di input con più livelli di informazioni linguistiche. Queste diverse sfaccettature dei termini testuali sono sistematicamente combinate per rivelare modelli ricchi. Riportiamo risultati sperimentali altamente promettenti in diversi impegnativi compiti di analisi del testo nel campo dell'Argumentation Mining. Crediamo che GRASP sia abbastanza generale da essere utile anche per altri domini. Ad esempio, ciascuna delle seguenti frasi include un reclamo per un [argomento]: 1. Gli oppositori spesso sostengono che il primario aperto è incostituzionale. [Open Primaries] 2. Il Prof. Smith suggerì che l'azione affermativa svaluta i risultati degli eletti. [Azione affermativa] 3. La maggioranza ha dichiarato che il Primo Emendamento non garantisce il diritto di offendere gli altri. [Libertà di parola] Queste frasi non condividono quasi nessuna parola in comune, tuttavia sono simili a un livello più astratto. Un osservatore umano può notare la seguente struttura comune sottostante, o modello: [qualcuno][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP mira a catturare automaticamente tali strutture sottostanti dei dati forniti. Per gli esempi sopra riportati trova il modello [sostantivo][espresso][sostantivo,topic][sentiment], dove [express] sta per tutti i suoi iponimi (in)diretti, e [sostantivo,topic] significa un sostantivo che è anche correlato all'argomento.", 'kk': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) лингвистикалық панелдерді автоматты түрде тарқату үшін алгоритм. Бұл соңында, GRASP лингвистикалық мәліметтің бірнеше қабатты қабаттары бар келтірілген мәтіннің терминін көтереді. Бұл мәтін терминдерінің әртүрлі белгілері баяны үлгілерді көрсету үшін жүйелік түрде біріктіріледі. Біз аргументациялық бағыттау өрісінде бірнеше мәтін анализ тапсырмаларын көп әсер ететін эксперименттік нәтижелерді есептеп береміз. Біз GRASP басқа домен үшін пайдалы болатынын сенеміз. Мысалы, келесі сөйлемелердің әрбірі [тақырыбы] үшін сұрақ бар: 1. Орнаулықтар көбінде ашылған негізгі негізгі орнатылмаған деп айтылады. @ info/ plain bug resolution Профессор Смит таңдалған жетістіктерді құптау әрекетінің көмектесуін ұсынады. [Құпты әрекет] 3. Көпшілігі бірінші өзгертімі басқаларға қарсы құқығын қамтамасыз етпейді. Бұл сөздер жалпы сөздерді бөліп отырмайды, бірақ бұл сөздердің көптеген абстракты деңгейінде ұқсас болады. Адам бақылаушысы келесі жалпы құрылымды, немесе үлгі түсініп бере алады: [кім] [argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP келтірілген деректердің астындағы құрылымдарын автоматты түрде түсіруге мақсат береді. Жоғардағы мысалдар үшін оның барлық гипонимдеріне қатынау үлгісін табылады, және [атау, тақырыптар, нақыштар] [сезімі] деген нақышта қатынау үлгісін табылады.', 'mk': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) е алгоритм за автоматско екстракција на шеми кои карактеризираат суптилни лингвистички феномени. За тоа, GRASP го зголемува секој термин на внесен текст со повеќе слоеви на јазички информации. Овие различни аспекти на текстовите термини се систематски комбинирани за да се откријат богати шеми. Ние известуваме високо ветувачки експериментални резултати во неколку предизвикувачки текст анализи задачи во полето на Аргументација минирање. Веруваме дека GRASP е доволно генерален за да биде корисен и за други домени. На пример, секоја од следните реченици вклучува барање за [тема]: 1. Според противниците честопати тврдат дека отворениот примарен е неуставен. [Open Primaries] 2.  Професорот Смит предложи дека потврдната акција ги деценира остварувањата на избраните. 3. Повеќето изјавија дека Првиот амандман не гарантира право да ги навреди другите. [Freedom of Speech] These sentences share almost no words in common, however, they are similar at a more abstract level.  Човечкиот набљудувач може да ја забележи следната основна заедничка структура, или шема: [некој][расправа/предложи/состојба][тоа][темски термин][чувствителен термин]. GRASP има за цел автоматски да ги зафати ваквите основни структури на дадените податоци. За наведените примери тој го наоѓа шаблонот [името][експрес][тоа][името,тема][чувство], каде [експрес] значи сите нејзини (во)директни хипоними, и [името,тема] значи името кое исто така е поврзано со темата.', 'lt': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) yra algoritmas, skirtas automatiškai išgauti modelius, būdingus subtle linguistic phenomenas. Tuo tikslu GRASP papildo kiekvieną įvestą tekstą daugiais kalbinės informacijos sluoksniais. Šie skirtingi teksto sąvokų aspektai sistemingai derinami siekiant atskleisti turtingus modelius. Mes pranešame apie labai perspektyvius eksperimentinius rezultatus keliose sudėtingose tekstų analizės užduotyse Argumentavimo kasybos srityje. Manome, kad GRASP yra pakankamai bendras, kad būtų naudingas ir kitoms sritims. Pavyzdžiui, kiekviename iš šių sakinių pateikiamas prašymas dėl [temos]: 1. Priešininkai dažnai teigia, kad atvira pirminė dalis nėra konstitucinė. [Atverti pirminius elementus] 2. Prof. Smith pasiūlė, kad teigiami veiksmai nuvertina pasirinktų asmenų pasiekimus. [Patvirtinamieji veiksmai] 3. Dauguma teigė, kad pirmuoju pakeitimu neužtikrinama teisė pažeisti kitus. [Freedom of Speech] These sentences share almost no words in common, however, they are similar at a more abstract level.  Žmogaus stebėtojas gali pastebėti šią pagrindinę bendrą struktūrą arba modelį: [kas nors][teigia/siūlo/teigia][kad][teminis terminas][jausmas]. GRASP tikslas – automatiškai surinkti tokias duomenų pagrindines struktūras. Pirmiau išvardytiems pavyzdžiams jis nustato modelį [vardas][išraiškas][tas][vardas,tema][jausmas], kuriame [išraiškas] reiškia visus jo (tiesioginius) hiponimus, ir [vardas,tema] reiškia vardą, kuris taip pat yra susijęs su tema.', 'ms': 'GRASP (Corak Sekuensial Ditambah GReedy) ialah algoritma untuk mengekstrak corak secara automatik yang mengukur fenomena bahasa halus. Untuk itu, GRASP menambah setiap terma teks input dengan berbilang lapisan maklumat bahasa. Halaman berbeza ini bagi terma teks digabungkan secara sistematik untuk mengungkapkan corak kaya. Kami melaporkan hasil percubaan yang sangat berjanji dalam beberapa tugas analisis teks yang menantang dalam medan Perlombongan Argumentasi. Kami percaya bahawa GRASP cukup umum untuk berguna untuk domain lain juga. Contohnya, setiap kalimat berikut termasuk klaim untuk [topik]: 1. Pelanggan sering menyangka bahawa utama terbuka adalah tidak konstitusional. [Buka Primari] 2. Prof. Smith menyarankan bahawa tindakan positif menghancurkan kemajuan yang dipilih. [Tindakan Mengesahkan] 3. Kebanyakan menyatakan bahawa Amandemen Pertama tidak menjamin hak untuk melanggar orang lain. [Freedom of Speech] Kalimat ini hampir tidak berkongsi perkataan yang sama, bagaimanapun, mereka sama pada tahap yang lebih abstrak. Seorang pemerhati manusia mungkin memperhatikan struktur atau corak biasa yang berikut: [seseorang][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP bermaksud untuk menangkap secara automatik struktur dasar bagi data yang diberi. Untuk contoh-contoh di atas ia mendapati corak [nama][ekspresi][bahawa][nama,topik][perasaan], di mana [ekspresi] berdiri untuk semua hiponym langsung, dan [nama,topik] bermakna nama yang juga berkaitan dengan topik.', 'mt': "GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) huwa algoritmu għall-estrazzjoni awtomatika ta’ mudelli li jikkaratterizzaw fenomeni lingwistiċi subtili. Għal dak il-għan, il-GRASP iżid kull terminu ta’ test ta’ input b’diversi saffi ta’ informazzjoni lingwistika. Dawn l-aspetti differenti tat-termini tat-test huma kkombinati sistematikament biex jiżvelaw xejriet rikki. Aħna nirrappurtaw riżultati sperimentali promettenti ħafna f'diversi kompiti ta' analiżi tat-test sfidanti fil-qasam tal-Argumentazzjoni Mining. Aħna nemmnu li GRASP huwa ġenerali biżżejjed biex ikun utli wkoll għal oqsma oħra. Pereżempju, kull waħda mis-sentenzi li ġejjin tinkludi talba għal [suġġett]: 1. L-opponenti spiss jargumentaw li l-primarja miftuħa mhijiex kostituzzjonali. [Primarji Miftuħa] 2. Il-Prof. Smith issuġġerixxa li azzjoni affirmattiva tiddevalwa l-kisbiet tal-għażliet. [Azzjoni Affirmattiva] 3. Il-maġġoranza ddikjarat li l-Ewwel Emenda ma tiggarantixxix id-dritt ta’ ksur ta’ oħrajn. [Freedom of Speech] These sentences share almost no words in common, however, they are similar at a more abstract level.  Osservatur uman jista’ jinnota l-istruttura jew mudell komuni sottostanti li ġejjin: [xi ħadd][jargumenta/jissuġġerixxi/jiddikjara][li][terminu suġġett][terminu ta’ sensazzjoni]. Il-GRASP għandu l-għan li jaqbad awtomatikament dawn l-istrutturi sottostanti tad-dejta mogħtija. Għall-eżempji ta’ hawn fuq huwa jsib ix-xejra [n-nom][espress][dak][n-nom,is-suġġett][sentiment], fejn [espress] ifisser l-iponimi diretti kollha tiegħu, u [n-nom,is-suġġett] ifisser n-nom li huwa wkoll relatat mas-suġġett.", 'ml': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) സ്വയം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയമായി പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ആണു്. അതിന്റെ അവസാനത്തിനായി ഗ്രാസ്പി ഓരോ വാക്കിലും ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളുമായി  പദാവലികളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത മുഖങ്ങള്\u200d സമ്പത്തുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമായി കൂട്ടിയി ആർഗമെന്റേഷന്റ് മൈനിംങ്ങിന്റെ പ്രദേശത്തിലെ പല വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ പദാവലിയുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നത് ഗ്രാസ്പി മറ്റുള്ള ഡൊമീനുകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രയോജനമാണെന്നാണ്. ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, താഴെയുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ഓരോ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു [പ്രമേയത്തിന്]: 1 ഉള്ള ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. എതിര്\u200dക്കുന്നവര്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും വാദിക്കുന്നത് തുറന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സംവിധാനം ആണെന്നാണ്. [മൂല്യം തുറക്കുക] 2. പ്രൊഫസർ സ്മിത്ത് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ടതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളെ തെറ്റിച്ചുകളയുന്നു എന്ന് ഉറപ്പുവരുത്തുന് [പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം] 3. അധികപേരും പറഞ്ഞിട്ടുണ്ട് ആദ്യത്തെ മാറ്റം മറ്റുള്ളവരെ കുറ്റം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള അവകാശമില്ല എന്ന്. [സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം] ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നില്ല, എങ്കിലും അത് കൂ ഒരു മനുഷ്യന്\u200d നോക്കിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സാധാരണ ഘടനയില്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നോക്കിയേക്കാം: [ആര GRASP aims to automatically capture such underlying structures of the given data.  മുകളിലുള്ള ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് [noun][express][that][noun,topic][sentiment], അതിന്റെ രീതിയെ കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു [noun][noun,theme][sentiment], അതിന്റെ എല്ലാ നേരിട്ടുള്ള ഹൈപ്പിന്നികള്\u200dക്കും നില്\u200d', 'mn': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) нь суурь хэлний явдлыг харуулж буй загваруудыг автоматжуулах алгоритм юм. Ийм төгсгөлд GRASP нь хэлний мэдээллийн олон давхар өгөгдлийн текст бүр нэмэгдүүлдэг. Текст хэлбэрийн өөр хэлбэрүүд нь баян загваруудыг харуулахын тулд систематик холбогдож байна. Бид аргументацийн салбарын доторх хэд хэдэн шаардлагатай текст шинжилгээний ажил дээр маш их амлалтай туршилтын үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид GRASP бусад орон нутагт ч хэрэглэх хангалттай ерөнхийлөгч гэж итгэдэг. Жишээлбэл, дараагийн өгүүлбэр бүр [сэдэв]: Эрэгтэй хүмүүс ихэвчлэн нээлттэй анхны байгууллага бус байгууллага гэдгийг хэлдэг. [Нэгдсэн нээлт] 2. Профессор Смит танилцуулсан хүмүүсийн амжилтыг багасгаж буй гэдгийг сануулсан. 3. Ихэнх нь анхны шинэчлэл бусад хүмүүст зөрчилдөөн байх эрхийг баталгаагүй гэдгийг хэлж байсан. Эдгээр өгүүлбэр ойролцоогоор ямар ч үг хуваалцахгүй. Гэхдээ тэд илүү абстракт түвшинд төстэй. Хүмүүсийн ажиглаач дараагийн нийтлэг бүтэц, эсвэл дүрслэлийг анзаарч болно: [хэн нэгэн][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP нь өгөгдсөн өгөгдлийн үндсэн байгууллагуудыг автоматжуулах зорилго юм. Жишээлбэл дээрх жишээлүүдийн хувьд энэ жишээлүүдийг олж мэднэ. Энэ жишээлүүд нь бүх жишээлүүдийг шууд гипонимууд болон сэдвээс холбогдсон нэр гэсэн үг.', 'pl': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) to algorytm automatycznego wydobywania wzorców charakteryzujących subtelne zjawiska językowe. W tym celu GRASP rozszerza każdy termin tekstu wejściowego o wiele warstw informacji językowych. Te różne aspekty terminów tekstowych są systematycznie łączone, aby ujawnić bogate wzory. Raportujemy wysoce obiecujące wyniki eksperymentalne w kilku trudnych zadaniach analizy tekstów w zakresie wydobycia argumentacji. Uważamy, że GRASP jest wystarczająco ogólny, aby być użyteczny również w innych domenach. Na przykład każde z poniższych zdań zawiera roszczenie dotyczące [temat]: 1. Przeciwnicy często twierdzą, że otwarty podstawowy jest niekonstytucyjny. [Otwarte pierwotne] 2. Prof. Smith zasugerował, że akcja afirmatywna dewaluje osiągnięcia wybranych. [Akcja potwierdzająca] 3. Większość stwierdziła, że Pierwsza Poprawka nie gwarantuje prawa do obrażania innych. [Wolność słowa] Zdania te nie łączą prawie żadnych wspólnych słów, jednak są podobne na bardziej abstrakcyjnym poziomie. Obserwator ludzki może zauważyć następującą wspólną strukturę lub wzór: [ktoś][argumentuje/sugeruje/stwierdza][że][termin tematyczny][termin sentyment]. GRASP ma na celu automatyczne uchwycenie takich struktur podstawowych danych. W przypadku powyższych przykładów znajduje się wzór [rzeczownik][ekspres][ten][rzeczownik,temat][sentyment], gdzie [express] oznacza wszystkie swoje (in)bezpośrednie hiponimy, a [rzeczownik,temat] oznacza rzeczownik, który jest również związany z tematem.', 'ro': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) este un algoritm pentru extragerea automată a modelelor care caracterizează fenomene lingvistice subtile. În acest scop, GRASP extinde fiecare termen de text introdus cu mai multe straturi de informații lingvistice. Aceste fațete diferite ale termenilor de text sunt combinate sistematic pentru a dezvălui modele bogate. Raportăm rezultate experimentale extrem de promițătoare în mai multe sarcini dificile de analiză a textului în domeniul Argumentation Mining. Considerăm că GRASP este suficient de general pentru a fi util și pentru alte domenii. De exemplu, fiecare dintre următoarele propoziții include o revendicare pentru un [topic]: 1. Oponenții susțin adesea că primarul deschis este neconstituțional. [Open Primaries] 2. Profesorul Smith a sugerat că acţiunea afirmativă devalorizează realizările aleşilor. [Acțiune afirmativă] 3. Majoritatea a declarat că Primul Amendament nu garantează dreptul de a ofensa pe alții. [Libertatea de exprimare] Aceste propoziții nu au aproape niciun cuvânt în comun, cu toate acestea, ele sunt similare la un nivel mai abstract. Un observator uman poate observa următoarea structură comună de bază, sau model: [cineva][argumentează/sugerează/stat][acel][termen subiect][termen sentiment]. GRASP își propune să capteze automat astfel de structuri subiacente ale datelor date. Pentru exemplele de mai sus se găsește modelul [substantiv][expres][că][substantiv,topic][sentiment], unde [expres] reprezintă toate hiponimele sale (in)directe, iar [substantiv,topic] înseamnă un substantiv care este, de asemenea, legat de subiect.', 'no': 'GRASP er ein algoritme for automatisk utpakking av mønsterelement som karakteriserer subtillingviske fenomenar. Til denne slutten vil GRASP auka kvar uttrykk av inndatateksten med fleire lag med lingviske informasjon. Desse ulike ansiktane av tekstvilkårene er systematisk kombinerte for å opna rike mønsterelement. Vi rapporterer veldig promiserende eksperimentelle resultat i fleire vanskeleg tekstanalyseringsoppgåver i feltet for argument-mining. Vi tror at GRASP er generell nok for å vera nyttig for andre domene også. For eksempel, kvar av følgjande setningar inneheld eit etterspørsel for eit [emne]: 1. Opponentar argumenterer ofte at den opna primæren er ikkje installert. [Opna primærar] 2. Prof. Smith foreslår at stadfestingshandlinga avviklar fullføringane av dei valde. [Affirmativ handling] 3. Dei fleste vart avtalet at den første endringen ikkje garanterer rettigheten til å gjera offent til andre. Dette setningane deler nesten ingen ord i felles, men dei er likevel på ein mer abstrakt nivå. Ein menneskelig observator kan merke på følgjande felles struktur, eller mønster: [noen][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP mål automatisk å henta slike underliggande strukturar av dei oppgjevne data. For dei øvste eksemplane finn det mønsteret [noun][express][that][noun,topic][sentiment], der [express] står for alle sine direkte hyponymmer, og [noun,topic] betyr eit namn som også er relatert til emnet.', 'sv': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) är en algoritm för att automatiskt extrahera mönster som karaktäriserar subtila språkliga fenomen. GRASP utökar därför varje inmatningstext med flera lager språklig information. Dessa olika aspekter av texttermerna kombineras systematiskt för att avslöja rika mönster. Vi rapporterar mycket lovande experimentella resultat i flera utmanande textanalysuppgifter inom området Argumentation Mining. Vi tror att GRASP är tillräckligt generellt för att vara användbart även för andra domäner. Till exempel innehåller var och en av följande meningar ett anspråk på ett [ämne]: 1. Motståndarna hävdar ofta att den öppna primära är konstitutionell. [Öppna primära] 2. Professor Smith föreslog att bekräftande åtgärder devalverar de utvaldes prestationer. [Bekräftande åtgärd] 3. Majoriteten hävdade att det första tillägget inte garanterar rätten att kränka andra. [Yttrandefrihet] Dessa meningar delar nästan inga ord gemensamt, men de liknar varandra på en mer abstrakt nivå. En mänsklig observatör kan märka följande underliggande gemensamma struktur, eller mönster: [någon][argumentera/föreslå/ange][det][ämne term][sentiment term]. GRASP syftar till att automatiskt fånga sådana underliggande strukturer av givna data. För ovanstående exempel finner den mönstret [substantiv][expressz][substantiv,ämne][sentiment], där [expressz] står för alla dess (in)direkta hyponymer, och [substantiv,ämne] betyder ett substantiv som också är relaterat till ämnet.', 'so': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) waa algoritm for automatically extra patterns that characterize subtle linguistic phenomena. Taas darteed GRASP wuxuu ku dardaarmaa macluumaad luuqad kala duduwan. These different facets of the text terms are systematically combined to reveal rich patterns.  Waxaannu wargelinaynaa arimaha imtixaanka ee aad u ballan badan oo ku saabsan baaritaanka qoraalka baaraandegista ee gudaha beerta heshiiska. Waxaynu aaminsanahay in GRASP uu yahay mid caadi ah oo uu faa’iido u leeyahay meelaha kale. Tusaale ahaan qeyb kasta oo soo socda waxaa ku jira codsiga [mada]: 1. Cadaawayaashu inta badan waxay ka doodaan in aasaasiga furan uu yahay mid aan qasab lahayn. [Open Prize] 2. Prof. Smith wuxuu muujiyay in shaqo xaqiijinta uu kharribaa dhamaadka kuwa la doortay. [Affirmative Action] 3. Inta badan waxay sheegeen in beddelka hore ma ahan xuquuqda uu dadka kale xumeeyo. [xorriyadda hadalka] Erayadaas si dhowr ah uma qeybeeyaan hadal caadi ah, habase yeeshee waa mid ka mid ah heer ka fog. Qordiyuhu wuxuu ogaan karaa dhismaha hoose ee caadiga ah ama muuqashada:[qof][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term] GRASP waxey ku qoran tahay in ay automatic qabsadaan dhismaha hoose ee macluumaadka la siiyey. Maxaa yeelay tusaalaha sare waxay ka heleysaa nooca [noun][express][noun,mada][mada], meesha ay ku taagan tahay dhammaantood (si toos ah) labawejimo iyo [noun,mada] waxay micnaheedu tahay wax la xiriira mada.', 'sr': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) je algoritam za automatski izvlačenje obrazaca koje karakteriziraju suptilne jezičke fenomene. Za taj cilj, GRASP povećava svaki pojam ulaznog teksta sa višestrukim slojevima jezičkih informacija. Ove različite lica teksta su sistematski kombinovane kako bi otkrili bogate obrasce. Prijavljujemo vrlo obećavajuće eksperimentalne rezultate u nekoliko izazovnih zadataka za analizu teksta u oblasti rudarstva argumentacija. Vjerujemo da je GRASP dovoljno opšte da bude korisna i za druge domene. Na primer, svaka od sljedećih rečenica uključuje tvrdnju za [temu]: 1. Suprotnici često tvrde da je otvorena primarna neonstitucionalna. 2. Prof. Smith je predložio da potvrđena akcija uništava postignuće odabranih. 3. Većina je izjavila da prvi amandman ne garantuje pravo da uvredi druge. [Sloboda govora] Ova rečenica deli skoro nikakve riječi zajedničke, međutim, oni su slične na apstraktniji nivo. Ljudski promatrač može primijetiti sljedeću temeljnu zajedničku strukturu, ili obrazac: [neko][argumentira/predloži/država][taj][temački termin][osjećaj termin]. GRASP je cilj da automatski uhvati takve temeljne strukture određenih podataka. Za iznad primjera nalazi se obrazac [imena][ekspresija][ta][imena,tema][sentiment], gde [ekspresija] znači sve svoje (u) direktne hiponime, i [imena,tema] znači imena koja je takođe povezana sa temom.', 'ta': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is an algorithm for automatically extracting patterns that characterize subtle language phenomena. இந்த முடிவிற்கு, GRASP ஒவ்வொரு முறையிலும் உள்ளீட்டு உரையில் பல அடுக்குகள் மொழி தகவலுடன் கூடுதல். உரைகளின் வேறு முகங்கள் அமைப்பிலாக சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பணக்கான வடிவங்களை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு. நாங்கள் மிகவும் வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை அறிவிக்கிறோம் பல சவாலிக்கும் உரை ஆராய்வு பணிகளின் புலத GRASP பொதுவான என நம்புகிறோம் மற்ற தளங்களுக்கும் பயனுள்ளது என்று. உதாரணத்திற்கு, பின்வரும் ஒவ்வொரு வாக்கியங்களுக்கும் ஒரு [தலைப்பு]: 1 கூறுதல் உள்ளது. எதிரிகள் பெரும்பாலாகவே திறந்த முதல் கட்டுப்பாடு ஆகும் என்று வாக்குகிறார்கள். [முன்னுரிமைகளை திற] 2. Prof. ஸ்மித் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை நீக்குகிறது என்று உறுதிப்படுத்தும் செயல் [உறுதிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்] 3. The majority stated that the First Amendment does not guarantee the right to offend others.  [பேச்சு சுதந்திரம்] இந்த வாக்குகள் பொதுவான வார்த்தைகளை பிரித்துக் கொள்ள முடியாது, ஆனாலும் அவை அதிகமாக வெற ஒரு மனித பார்வையாளர் பின்வரும் பொது கட்டுப்பாட்டின் அடிப்படையில் அல்லது வடிவமைப்பை கவனிக்கலாம்: [யார்][தர்க்க/பரிந்துரைக்க/ GRASP கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தரவுகளின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள அடிப்படைகளை தானாகவே பிடிக்கும் செயல்படுகிறது. மேலேயுள்ள உதாரணங்களுக்காக அது மாதிரியை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் [noun][noun,theme][உணர்வு, அங்கு [express] நேரடி hyponyms, மற்றும் [noun,theme] தலைப்புக்கும் இணைக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு உணர்வு என்ற', 'si': 'GRASP ඒ අවසානයෙන්, GRASP විශාලනය කරනවා හැම භාෂාත්මක තොරතුරු සඳහා ඇතුළු පාළුවේ වර්තනය. මේ වෙනස් මුහුණු පාළුවේ පාළුවන් වර්තනයේ පද්ධතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ. අපි ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ අපි විශ්වාස කරනවා GRASP අනිත් ඩෝමේන් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා. උදාහරණයෙන්, පස්සෙන් ඉන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙක්ම [විදේශ]: 1. ප්\u200dරතිකාරියෝ හැමවෙලේම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා. [ප්\u200dරාධිපති විවෘත කරන්න] 2. ප්\u200dරොෆ්ටර් ස්මිත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කළා විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා තෝරාගත්ත අවස්ථාවක 3. බොහෝම කිව්වා පළමු වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් අනිත් අපරාධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාර කරනවා කියලා. [කියන්නේ නිදහස්] මේ වචන සාමාන්\u200dය වචනයක් නැති වචනයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒත්, ඔවුන් වඩා සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථානයක් වග මිනිස්සු බලන්න පුළුවන් පසුගින් සාමාන්\u200dය සංවිධානය, නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දැනගන්න: [කවුරු හරි][ප්\u200dරමාණය/ප්\u200dර GRASP අදහස් කරනවා දෙන්න තොරතුරු ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් අල්ලගන්න. උපරිම උදාහරණ සඳහා ඒක හොයාගන්නවා ප්\u200dරමාණය [නම්][express][that][නම්,ප්\u200dරමාණ,ප්\u200dරමාණ][ප්\u200dරමාණ], [express] ඔක්කොම සියළු ප්\u200dරමාණ සඳහා තියෙනවා, සහ [නම්,ප්\u200dරමාණ', 'ur': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) اپنا الگوریتم ہے جو اپنے ساتھ پٹرنے کے لئے الگوریتم ہے جو کمزور زبان پڑھنے کے مطابق دکھائے جاتے ہیں. اس کے لئے GRASP ہر گزارش متن کو زبان شناسی معلومات کے مطابق بہت سی لائر کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے. یہ مختلف چہرے لکھنے کے لئے سیستماتیک طریقے سے ملے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم بہت وعدہ دینے والی آزمائش کے نتائج کے مطابق بہت مشکل ٹیکسٹ تحلیل کے کاموں میں گزارتے ہیں۔ ہم یقین رکھتے ہیں کہ GRASP دوسرے دامنوں کے لئے بھی فائدہ اٹھانے کے لئے کافی عمومی ہے۔ مثال یہ ہے کہ ان دونوں کلمات میں سے ہر ایک نے ایک [موضوع] کے لئے ایک معاوضہ شامل کیا ہے: 1. مقابلہ کرنے والے اکثر جھگڑتے ہیں کہ کھولا ہوا اوپر غیر قانون ہے۔ 2. پروفسور اسمیت نے کہا کہ تصدیق کرنے والی عمل منتخب کرنے والوں کے کاموں کو دھوکا دیتا ہے۔ 3. اکثریت نے کہا کہ پہلی اصلاح دوسروں پر ظلم کرنے کا حق نہیں ہے یہ جماعت تقریباً کوئی کلمہ مشترک نہیں ہے، لیکن وہ اس سے زیادہ مطلق سطح پر مشترک ہیں. ایک انسان نظارت کرنے والا اس کے نیچے آسان ساختار یا نمونہ کو دیکھ سکتا ہے: [کسی][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ دکھائے ہوئے ڈاکٹوں کی اس طرح کی نیچے ساختار کو اپنا پکڑنا چاہے۔ اوپر کے مثالوں کے لئے یہ نمونہ پاتا ہے، جہاں (express) اس کے تمام (مستقیم) ہیپونیموں کے لئے ہے، اور (نام,topic) ایک نام کا مطلب ہے جو اس کے متعلق بھی تعلق ہے.', 'vi': 'Các biểu tượng tần số phức tạp (GROANING tần số Patton) là một thuật toán để tự động khai thác các mô hình đặc trưng cho những hiện tượng ngôn ngữ tinh vi. Để đạt được mục đích đó, GROAP nâng cấp từng chữ nhập với nhiều lớp thông tin ngôn ngữ. Những mặt khác nhau của các thuật ngữ văn bản được kết hợp một cách thường xuyên để bộc lộ những mô hình giàu có. Chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả thí nghiệm đầy hứa hẹn trong nhiều nhiệm vụ phân tích văn bản đầy thử thách trong lĩnh vực nghiên cứu. Chúng tôi tin rằng graSP đủ chung để cũng bổ ích cho những lĩnh vực khác nữa. Ví dụ như, mỗi câu sau bao gồm một yêu cầu cho một "tài liệu" 1. Các đối thủ thường nói rằng bản chính mở là vi hiến. (Mở Primatech) 2. Giáo sư Smith cho rằng làm tích cực sẽ đánh giá thấp thành tựu của người được chọn. (Xác nhận) 3. Đa số phán quyết rằng Tu chính án Thứ nhất không đảm bảo quyền xúc phạm người khác. Những câu này gần như không có từ nào chung, tuy nhiên, chúng giống nhau ở một mức độ trừu tượng hơn. Một người quan sát có thể chú ý cấu trúc hay mẫu phổ biến bên dưới: trốn tìm các cấu trúc cơ bản của dữ liệu được đưa ra. Đối với những ví dụ trên đây, nó tìm thấy mô hình (danh từ/danh từ)[that]danh từ,chủ đề] nơi [chi tiết] tượng trưng cho tất cả các âm thanh (trong) trực tiếp, và (danh từ,chủ đề) nghĩa danh từ là một danh từ cũng liên quan đến chủ đề.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Matn so'zlarining har xil tarkibi shakllarini tizim bilan bog'liq. @ info: status Biz GRASP huddi boshqa domene uchun foydalanish uchun umumiy bo'lganligini ishonamiz. Masalan, quyidagi bir so'zlar ichida [mavzu]: 1 soʻzni qoʻshish mumkin. Ko'pchiliklar odatda ochiq asosiy katta emas deb murakkab qiladi. @ info: whatsthis Prof. Smith tasdiqlash amalni tanlangan amalning natijalarini bajaradi. [Affirmative Action] 3.  Ko'pchilik aytganda, birinchi oʻzgarishlar boshqalarni ko'rsatish uchun qoʻllanmagan. [Bu so'zlar so'zlari umumiy so'zlardan hech qachon bir so'zlar yoʻq, ammo ularning eng o'xshash darajada. Bir inson taʼminlovchi quyidagi umumiy tuzuvni ko'rib turishi mumkin: [kim][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. Name Yuqori misollar uchun u ma'lumotni [noun][express][noun,theme][sentiment][sentiment] aniqlanadi. Bu yerda hamma ma ma'lumotlarning ko'rinishi mumkin.", 'da': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) er en algoritme til automatisk udtrækning af mønstre, der karakteriserer subtile sproglige fænomener. Med henblik herpå udvider GRASP hvert udtryk af input tekst med flere lag af sproglig information. Disse forskellige facetter af tekstbegreberne kombineres systematisk for at afsløre rige mønstre. Vi rapporterer meget lovende eksperimentelle resultater i flere udfordrende tekstanalyseopgaver inden for Argumentation Mining. Vi mener, at GRASP er generel nok til at være nyttig for andre domæner også. For eksempel indeholder hver af følgende sætninger et krav på et [emne]: 1. Modstandere hævder ofte, at den åbne primære er forfatningsmæssig. [Open Primaries] 2. Professor Smith foreslog, at bekræftende handling devaluerer de udvalgtes resultater. [Bekræftende handling] 3. Flertallet erklærede, at Første Ændringsforslag ikke garanterer retten til at krænke andre. [ytringsfrihed] Disse sætninger deler næsten ingen ord til fælles, men de ligner på et mere abstrakt niveau. En menneskelig observatør kan bemærke følgende underliggende fælles struktur, eller mønster: [nogen][argumentere/foreslå/stat][at][emne term][sentiment term]. GRASP sigter mod automatisk at indfange sådanne underliggende strukturer af de givne data. For ovenstående eksempler finder den mønsteret [navneord][udtryk][navneord,emne][sentiment], hvor [udtryk] står for alle sine (i)direkte hyponymer, og [navneord,emne] betyder et navneord, der også er relateret til emnet.', 'bg': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) е алгоритъм за автоматично извличане на модели, които характеризират фини лингвистични явления. За тази цел разширява всеки термин входящ текст с множество слоеве езикова информация. Тези различни аспекти на текстовите термини систематично се комбинират, за да се разкрият богати модели. Докладваме високо обещаващи експериментални резултати в няколко предизвикателни задачи за анализ на текста в областта на аргументирането. Ние вярваме, че е достатъчно общ, за да бъде полезен и за други домейни. Например всяко от следните изречения включва претенция за [тема]: 1. Противниците често твърдят, че откритите първични избори са противоконституционни. 2. Проф. Смит предложи, че утвърдителното действие обезценява постиженията на избрания. [Потвърдено действие] 3. Мнозинството заяви, че Първата поправка не гарантира правото на обиждане на другите. Тези изречения не споделят почти никакви общи думи, но те са подобни на по-абстрактно ниво. Човешки наблюдател може да забележи следната основна обща структура или модел: [някой][аргументира/предлага/заявява][този][тематичен термин][термин на сантименталност]. ГРАСП има за цел автоматично улавяне на такива основни структури на дадените данни. За горните примери тя намира модела [съществително][израз][това][съществително,тема][сантимент], където [израз] означава всички негови (в)преки хипоними, а [съществително,тема] означава съществително, което също е свързано с темата.', 'nl': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is een algoritme voor het automatisch extraheren van patronen die subtiele linguïstische fenomenen karakteriseren. Daartoe voegt GRASP elke term van invoertekst toe met meerdere lagen taalkundige informatie. Deze verschillende facetten van de teksttermen worden systematisch gecombineerd om rijke patronen te onthullen. We rapporteren veelbelovende experimentele resultaten in verschillende uitdagende tekstanalysetaken op het gebied van Argumentation Mining. Wij geloven dat GRASP algemeen genoeg is om ook voor andere domeinen nuttig te zijn. Elk van de volgende zinnen bevat bijvoorbeeld een claim voor een [onderwerp]: 1. Tegenstanders beweren vaak dat de open primary niet constitutioneel is. [Open Primaries] 2. Prof. Smith stelde voor dat positieve actie de prestaties van de uitverkorenen devalueert. [Bevestigende actie] 3. De meerderheid verklaarde dat het Eerste Amendement niet het recht garandeert anderen te beledigen. [Vrijheid van meningsuiting] Deze zinnen hebben bijna geen woorden gemeen, maar ze lijken op een meer abstract niveau op elkaar. Een menselijke waarnemer kan de volgende onderliggende gemeenschappelijke structuur of patroon opmerken: [iemand][argumenteren/suggereren/stellen][dat][onderwerp term][sentiment term]. GRASP streeft ernaar om dergelijke onderliggende structuren van de gegeven data automatisch vast te leggen. Voor de bovenstaande voorbeelden vindt het het patroon [zelfstandig naamwoord][express][dat][zelfstandig naamwoord,onderwerp][sentiment], waarbij [express] staat voor al zijn (in)directe hyponiemen, en [zelfstandig naamwoord,onderwerp] betekent een zelfstandig naamwoord dat ook gerelateerd is aan het onderwerp.', 'hr': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) je algoritam za automatski izvlačenje obrazaca koje karakteriziraju suptilne jezičke fenomene. Za taj cilj, GRASP povećava svaki pojam teksta s višestrukim slojevima jezičkih informacija. Ove različite lica teksta su sistematski kombinirane kako bi otkrili bogate obrasce. Prijavljujemo vrlo obećavajuće eksperimentalne rezultate u nekoliko izazovnih zadataka analize teksta u području rudarstva argumentacija. Vjerujemo da je GRASP dovoljno općenito da bude korisna i za druge domene. Na primjer, svaka od sljedećih rečenica uključuje zahtjev za [temu]: 1. Suprotnici često tvrde da je otvorena primarna neonstitucionalna. 2. Prof. Smith je predložio da potvrđena akcija razvija postignuće odabranih. 3. Većina je izjavila da prvi amandman ne garantuje pravo na uvrijeđenje drugih. [Sloboda govora] Ove rečenice ne dijele skoro nikakve riječi zajedničke, međutim, oni su slične na apstraktnijoj razini. Ljudski promatrač može primijetiti sljedeću temeljnu zajedničku strukturu ili obrazac: [neko][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP se cilja automatski uhvatiti takve temeljne strukture određenih podataka. Za iznad primjera nalazi se obrazac [imena][ekspresija][to][imena,tema][osjećaj], gdje [ekspresija] predstavlja sve svoje izravne hiponime, a [imena,tema] znači imena koja je također povezana s temom.', 'de': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) ist ein Algorithmus zur automatischen Extraktion von Mustern, die subtile linguistische Phänomene charakterisieren. Zu diesem Zweck erweitert GRASP jeden Begriff des Eingabetextes um mehrere Ebenen sprachlicher Informationen. Diese unterschiedlichen Facetten der Textbegriffe werden systematisch zu reichhaltigen Mustern kombiniert. Wir berichten über vielversprechende experimentelle Ergebnisse in mehreren anspruchsvollen Textanalyseaufgaben im Bereich Argumentation Mining. Wir glauben, dass GRASP allgemein genug ist, um auch für andere Domains nützlich zu sein. Beispielsweise enthält jeder der folgenden Sätze einen Anspruch für ein [Thema]: 1. Gegner argumentieren oft, dass der offene Primär verfassungswidrig ist. [Offene Primaries] 2. Prof. Smith schlug vor, dass affirmatives Handeln die Leistungen der Auserwählten abwertet. [Bestätigende Aktion] 3. Die Mehrheit erklärte, dass der Erste Zusatz nicht das Recht garantiert, andere zu beleidigen. [Meinungsfreiheit] Diese Sätze haben fast keine gemeinsamen Worte, aber sie ähneln sich auf abstrakterer Ebene. Ein menschlicher Beobachter kann die folgende zugrunde liegende gemeinsame Struktur oder Muster bemerken: [jemand][argumentieren/suggerieren/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP zielt darauf ab, solche zugrunde liegenden Strukturen der gegebenen Daten automatisch zu erfassen. Für die obigen Beispiele findet es das Muster [Substantiv][express][that][Substantiv,topic][sentiment], wobei [express] für all seine (in)direkten Hyponyme steht, und [Substantiv,topic] bedeutet ein Substantiv, das auch mit dem Thema verwandt ist.', 'id': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is an algorithm for automatically extracting patterns that characterize subtle linguistic phenomena.  Untuk itu, GRASP menambah setiap istilah teks input dengan beberapa lapisan informasi bahasa. Hal-hal berbeda dari istilah teks secara sistematis dikombinasikan untuk mengungkapkan pola kaya. Kami melaporkan hasil percobaan yang sangat berjanji dalam beberapa tugas analisis teks yang menantang dalam bidang Argumentation Mining. Kami percaya bahwa GRASP cukup umum untuk berguna untuk domain lain juga. Contohnya, setiap kalimat berikut termasuk klaim untuk [topik]: 1. Opponent sering berdebat bahwa primar terbuka tidak konstitusional. [Buka Primary] 2. Prof. Smith menyarankan bahwa tindakan affirmatif menghancurkan pencapaian yang dipilih. [Affirmative Action] 3.  Kebanyakan menyatakan bahwa Amandemen Pertama tidak menjamin hak untuk melanggar orang lain. [Kebebasan Bicara] Kalimat ini hampir tidak berbagi kata-kata yang sama, bagaimanapun, mereka mirip pada tingkat yang lebih abstrak. Seorang pengamati manusia dapat memperhatikan struktur atau pola umum yang berikut: [seseorang][argumen/sarankan/keadaan][bahwa][istilah topik][istilah perasaan]. GRASP bermaksud untuk secara otomatis menangkap struktur dasar seperti data yang diberikan. Untuk contoh-contoh di atas ia menemukan pola [nama][ekspresi][bahwa][nama,topik][perasaan], di mana [ekspresi] berdiri untuk semua hiponyma langsung, dan [nama,topik] berarti nama yang juga berhubungan dengan topik.', 'fa': 'GRASP یک الگوریتم برای استخراج الگوریتم\u200cهای خودکار است که نشانه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی\u200cهای زیر تعریف می\u200cکنند. به این نتیجه، GRASP هر کلمه از متن ورودی با لایه\u200cهای متعدد از اطلاعات زبان افزایش می\u200cدهد. این چهره\u200cهای متفاوت از شرایط متن سیستماتیک برای نشان دادن الگوهای ثروتمند پیوند می\u200cشوند. ما گزارش دادیم که نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشی بسیار قول\u200cدهنده به تعدادی از کارهای تحلیل متن سخت\u200cکننده در زمینه\u200cی ذخیره\u200cی آرژانس\u200cها گزارش می\u200cدهیم. ما باور می\u200cکنیم که GRASP به اندازه کافی عمومی است که برای دیگر دامنه\u200cهای مفید باشد. برای مثال، هر یک از این جمله\u200cها شامل یک ادعا برای یک [موضوع]: ۱ است. مقاومت\u200cها اغلب می\u200cگویند که اصلی باز ناقانونی است. 2. پروفسور اسمیت پیشنهاد کرد که اقدام تصدیق کننده کارهای انتخاب را نابود می کند. 3. اکثریت گفتند که اصلاح اول حق به دیگران را تضمین نمی\u200cدهد. [آزادی سخنرانی] این جمله تقریباً هیچ کلمه مشترک را شریک نمی کنند، ولی آنها در سطح مثبت\u200cتر شبیه هستند. یک نگاهبان انسان ممکن است این ساختار مشترک را متوجه کند، یا الگو: [کسی][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP را هدف می\u200cدهد که این ساختارهای پایه\u200cای از داده\u200cهای داده شده را به طور خودکار دستگیر کند. برای مثالهای بالا این الگو را می یابد که [عنوان، عنوان، عنوان، احساس و احساس و احساس] برای تمام الگوهای مستقیم آن است، و [عنوان، عنوان، عنوان، عنوان] معنی یک اسم است که همچنین با این موضوع ارتباط دارد.', 'ko': 'GRASP는 미묘한 언어 현상을 설명하는 패턴을 자동으로 추출하는 알고리즘이다.이를 위해 GRASP는 다중 언어 정보를 사용하여 가져온 텍스트의 각 용어를 확장합니다.텍스트 용어의 이러한 서로 다른 측면은 체계적으로 결합하여 풍부한 모델을 제시한다.우리는 변론 발굴 분야의 몇 가지 도전적인 텍스트 분석 임무에서 매우 희망적인 실험 결과를 보고했다.GRAP의 공통성은 다른 분야에 도움이 될 수 있다고 믿습니다.예를 들어 다음 문장마다 [주제]:1이 포함되어 있다.반대자들은 자주 공개 초선이 위헌이라고 생각한다.[공개 초선] 2.스미스 교수는 평권행동이 당선자의 성과를 폄하했다고 생각한다.[평등권 행동]대다수 사람들은 제1개정안이 타인의 권리를 침해하는 것을 보장하지 않는다고 말한다.[언론자유] 이 문장들은 거의 공통점이 없지만 더욱 추상적인 차원에서 비슷하다.인류 관찰자는 다음과 같은 잠재적인 공동 구조나 모델을 주목할 수 있다. [누군가][논쟁/건의/진술][주제 용어][정서 용어].GRASP는 지정된 데이터의 이러한 하위 구조를 자동으로 캡처하도록 설계되었습니다.위의 예에서 [noun] [express] [that] [noun, topic] [topic] 모드를 찾았는데 그 중에서 [express]는 모든 (in)를 대표하고 [noun, topic]는 주제와 관련된 명사를 나타낸다.', 'sw': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Patterns Sehemu) ni algorithi kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mitindo yenye utaratibu wa lugha ndogo. Kwa mwisho huo, GRASP inaongeza kila muhula wa maandishi ya input na vipande kadhaa vya habari vya lugha. Nyuso hizi tofauti za maneno yanaunganishwa kwa mfumo ili kuonyesha mitindo matajiri. Tunatoa taarifa za matokeo makubwa ya majaribio yanayopaswa kutokana na baadhi ya uchambuzi wa maandishi yanayochanganya kazi za uchambuzi wa maandishi ndani ya uwanja wa Mining of Arguments. Tunaamini kuwa GRASP ni mkuu wa kutosha kutumika kwa ajili ya maeneo mengine pia. Kwa mfano, kila hukumu ifuatayo inajumuisha madai ya [mada]: 1. Wapinzani mara nyingi wanadai kuwa msingi wa wazi ni ukomo wa katiba. [Open Prize] 2. Prof. Smith alipendekeza kwamba hatua za kuthibitisha zinavuta mafanikio ya wale waliochaguliwa. [Hatua ya Afya] 3. Wengi wao walisema kwamba marekebisho ya kwanza haikuhakikisha haki ya kuwadhalilisha wengine. [Uhuru wa Hotuba] hukumu hizi hazina maneno ya kawaida, hata hivyo, ni sawa na kiwango kikubwa cha uongozi. Mwangalizi wa binadamu anaweza kugundua msingi wa msingi wa kawaida, au mtindo wa: [mtu][hoja/pendekezo/taifa][muhula wa mada][muhula wa hisia] GRASP ina lengo la kujikamata miundombinu kama hii ya taarifa zilizopewa. Kwa mifano ya hapo juu inagundua mtindo [noun][express][that][noun,theme][sentiment], ambapo [expression] inasimama kwa wote (in)directly hyponyms, na [noun, mada] inamaanisha jambo ambalo pia linahusiana na mada hiyo.', 'tr': 'GRASP Bu şekilde, GRASP dil bilgileri ile her giriş metinin tümüni arttırır. Metin sözleriniň bu üýtgeşikleri sistematik bilen baý nusgalary görkezmek üçin birleşýärler. Biz özümize örän wajyp berýän deneyler netijelerini Argumentasyon Küçünji sahypasynda gaty kynçylyk metin analyzasynda bildirip bilýäris. GRASP başga alanlar üçin ýeterlik ýeterlikde ýüzedir diýip pikir edýäris. Mesela, bu sözleriň her biri [meýdança] üçin bir iddia bar. Ragapçylar köplenç açyk başlangyçy guruldygyny aýdýarlar. [Open Primaries] 2. Profesýr Smith saýlanan başaryşlaryň netijesini boýunça alýandygyny maslahat berdi. [Affirmative Action] 3. Köp bölegi Birinji üýtgetmek başgalaryna gaýtgetmek hakyny garantyrmaýar. [Sözgürlük sözleriň özgürlügini] Bu sözleriň orta sözleri diýen ýaly orta sözleri ýok, ýöne olar biraz abstrakt derejede meňzeýärler. İnsan gözetleyicisi aşağıdaki orta strukturyň, ýa-da öräni üns berip biler: [someone][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP berilen maglumatyň aşaky düzümlerini otomatik almak maksady edýär. Ýakyndaky mysal üçin munyň nusgasyny tapýar [Ady][ifade][şol][Ady,tema][duygy],bu nusgasy hemme(ifade) diýip kabul edilýän nusgasyna görýär.', 'sq': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) është një algoritëm për nxjerrjen automatike të modeleve që karakterizojnë fenomene gjuhësore subtle. Për këtë qëllim, GRASP shton çdo term ë të tekstit të hyrjes me shumë shtresa informacioni gjuhësor. Këto aspekte të ndryshme të termave të tekstit kombinohen sistematikisht për të zbuluar modele të pasura. Ne raportojmë rezultate eksperimentale shumë premtuese në disa detyra sfiduese të analizës së tekstit brenda fushës së Argumentation Mining. Ne besojmë se GRASP është mjaft i përgjithshëm për të qenë i dobishëm edhe për fusha të tjera. Për shembull, secila nga fjalët e ardhshme përfshin një kërkesë për një [temë]: 1. Kundërshtarët shpesh argumentojnë se primarja e hapur është jo kushtetuese. 2. Prof. Smith sugjeroi se veprimi afirmativ shkatërron arritjet e të zgjedhurve. [Veprim konfirmues] 3. Shumica deklaroi se Emendamenti i Parë nuk garanton të drejtën për të ofenduar të tjerët. Këto fjalë pothuajse nuk kanë asnjë fjalë të përbashkët, megjithatë, ato janë të ngjashme në një nivel më abstrakt. Një vëzhgues njerëzor mund të vërë në dukje strukturën apo modelin e përbashkët të mëparshëm: [dikush][argumenton/sugjeron/gjendje][se][term tematik][term sentiment]. GRASP synon të kapë automatikisht struktura të tilla bazë të të dhënave të dhëna. Për shembujt më të lartë ajo gjen modelin [emër][shpreh][atë][emër,temë][ndjenjë], ku [shpreh] përfshin të gjitha hiponimet e tij (në)drejtpërdrejt, dhe [emër,temë] do të thotë një emër që është gjithashtu lidhur me temën.', 'af': "GRASP (groei Augmenteerde Sequential Patterns) is 'n algoritme vir outomaties uitpak patrone wat ondersteunde lingwisiese fenomene karakteriseer. Na daardie einde, GRASP vergroot elke term van invoer teks met veelvuldige laag van lingwisiese inligting. Hierdie verskillende aangesigte van die teks terme is sistematies gekombineer om ryk patrone te vertoon. Ons rapporteer baie beloftende eksperimentale resultate in verskeie aangelykende teks analiseerde taak binne die veld van Argumentasie Mining. Ons glo dat GRASP algemeen genoeg is om gebruik te wees vir ander domeine ook. Byvoorbeeld, elke van die volgende setinge inkluit 'n aanvrag vir 'n [onderwerp]: 1. Opstanders argumenteer dikwels dat die oop primêre is ongenstitusieel. [Open Primêres] 2. Prof. Smith het voorgestel dat bevestig aksie die volledighede van die gekies verdwyn. [Affirmative Aksie] 3. Die meeste het gesê dat die eerste wysiging nie die reg om ander te skakel nie. [Vryheid van spraak] Hierdie setings deel amper geen woorde in gemeenskap nie, maar hulle is gelyk op 'n meer abstrakte vlak. 'n Mense observer kan aanmerk die volgende ondersteunde gemeenskaplike struktuur of patroon: [iemand][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP doel doen om sodanige onderstelling strukture van die gegewe data outomaties te vang. Vir die bo-voorbeelde vind dit die patroon [noun][express][that][noun,topic][sentiment], waar [express] staan vir al sy (in)direkte hyponyms, en [noun,topic] beteken 'n noun wat ook verwante is met die onderwerp.", 'hy': 'GRASP (Գրեդի աճեցված հաջորդական բաղադրիչներ) ալգորիթմ է, որը օգտագործում է ինքնաբերաբար հանել կաղապարներ, որոնք բնորոշում են նրբագեղ լեզվաբանական երևույթներ: Այսպիսով, GRASP-ն ավելացնում է ներմուծի տեքստի յուրաքանչյուր տերմինը լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիայի բազմաթիվ շերտերով: Տեքստի տերմինների այս տարբեր հատվածները սիստեմատիկ համադրվում են, որպեսզի բացահայտեն հարուստ կաղապարները: Մենք հայտարարում ենք շատ խոստացնող փորձարկման արդյունքներ տեքստի վերլուծության բազմաթիվ մարտահրավերներ բանավեճի հանքային ոլորտում: We believe that GRASP is general enough to be useful for other domains too.  Օրինակ, հետևյալ նախադասություններից յուրաքանչյուրը ներառում է [թեմա]: 1: Հակառակորդները հաճախ պնդում են, որ բաց սկզբունքը անսահմանադրական է: 2: Պրոֆ Սմիթը առաջարկեց, որ դրական գործողությունը քանդում է ընտրված մարդկանց հաջողությունները: 3: The majority stated that the First Amendment does not guarantee the right to offend others.  Այս նախադասությունները գրեթե ընդհանուր բառեր չունեն, սակայն դրանք ավելի վերացական մակարդակում նման են: Մարդկային դիտողը կարող է նկատել հետևյալ ընդհանուր կառուցվածքը, կամ կաղապարը: [ինչ-որ մեկը][բանավեճում, առաջարկում, վիճակ][որ][թեմային տերմին][զգացմունքային տերմին]: GRASP-ը նպատակն է ավտոմատ վերցնել տվյալ տվյալների հիմնական կառուցվածքները: Առաջին օրինակների համար այն գտնում է կաղապարը [անուն][արտահայտություն][այն][անուն,թեմա][զգացմունքը] որտեղ [արտահայտությունը] նշանակում է իր բոլոր ուղղակի հիպոնիմները, և [անուն,թեմա] նշանակում է անուն, որը նաև կապված է թեմայի հետ:', 'am': 'መግለጫ To that end, GRASP augments each term of input text with multiple layers of linguistic information.  የጽሑፍ ጽሑፎች እነዚህ የተለያዩ ፊቶች የሀብታም ዓይነቶች ለመግለጥ በተስማማማሚ ተደጋፊዎች ናቸው፡፡ በአርማሹ አካባቢ እርሻ ውስጥ ያሉትን የጽሑፍ ትምህርት ማረፊያ ስራዎችን በሚያሳየው መፈተኛ ውጤቶች እናስታውቃለን፡፡ GRASP ደግሞ ለሌሎች ድሆች ጥቅም እንዲሆን እናምናለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ እያንዳንዱ ቃላት ለ [ ጉዳዩ]: 1 ተቃዋሚዎች ብዙ ጊዜ የተከፈተ መጀመሪያ ክፍል ነው ብለው ይዋጋሉ፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች Prof. Smith የሚያረጋግጥ ትግባር የተመረጡትን ፍለጋቸውን የሚያሳውስ መሆኑን ያስባል፡፡ ምርጫዎች አብዛኞቹም የመጀመሪያው ለውጦ ሌሎችን ለማሰናከል መብት አያስፈልግም፡፡ [የንግግር ነጻነት] እነዚህ ቃላት በአካባቢነት ቃል አይካፈሉም፥ ነገር ግን በክፍለ አካባቢ ክፍል ነው፡፡ የሰው ጠባቂዎች የሚከተሉትን የአሁኑን መሠረት ወይም ምሳሌ ማሳየት ይችላል:[ሰው][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term] . ላይኛው ምሳሌ ምሳሌ [[noun][express][noun,topic][sentiment], ለሁሉም (ራእይ)ቀጥተኛ hyponyms እና [noun,topic] የሚቆመው ምሳሌ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) algoritimdir ki, altı dil parçalarını özlərinə tanıyır. Bu təqdirdə, GRASP hər giriş mətnin sözünü dil məlumatlarının çoxlu katı ilə artırar. Bu mətn şartları sistematik olaraq zəngin şartları göstərmək üçün birləşdirilmiş. Biz Argumentasyon Mining sahəsində çox çətin mətn analizi işlərində çox vəd verici təcrübə sonuçlarını bildiririk. Bizim inanırıq GRASP başqa domenalar üçün də faydalı olaraq qədər genel idi. Misal olaraq, bu cümlələrdən hər biri [məsələn] üçün bir iddiası var: 1. Müəlliflər çox zaman açıq ilk başlangıç müəyyən edilməmişdir. [Əlavələri Aç] 2. Profesör Smith təsdiqləyici işlər seçilənlərin başarılarını dəyişdirir. 3. Birinci dəyişiklik başqalarına günah etmək haqqını garantirmir. Bu cümlələr az qala ortaq sözləri paylaşırlar, amma onlar daha abstraktlı bir seviyedə eyni ola bilərlər. İnsan gözətçisi aşağıdaki orta quruluşu, ya da örtünü öyrənə bilər: [biri][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP verilən məlumatların altındakı qurularını avtomatik almaq istəyir. Yuxarıdaki məsəllərə görə örnek tapılır. Bu örnek bütün örneklərinin doğru hiponymlarına bənzəyir.', 'ca': "GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is an algorithm for automatically extracting patterns that characterize subtle linguistic phenomena.  Per això, el GRASP augmenta cada terme de text d'entrada amb múltiples capes d'informació lingüística. Aquestes diferents aspectes dels termes de text es combinan sistemàticament per revelar patrons rics. Informem resultats experimentals molt prometedors en diverses tasques desafiantes d'anàlisi de textos en el camp de l'Argumentation Mining. Creiem que el GRASP és prou general per ser útil per altres dominis també. Per exemple, cada una de les frases següents inclou una reclamació per un tema: 1. Els oponents sovint argumenten que el primari obert és inconstitucional. [Primaris oberts] 2. El prof. Smith va suggerir que l'acció afirmativa devalueix els èxits dels escollits. [Affirmative Action] 3.  La majoria afirmava que la Primera Emenda no garantia el dret a ofendre altres. Aquestes frases no comparteixen gairebé cap paraula en comú, però són similars a un nivell més abstract. Un observador humà pot notar la següent estructura o patró comuns subjacents: [algú][argumentar/suggerir/estat][que][terme de tema][terme de sentiment]. El GRASP intenta capturar automàticament aquestes estructures subjacents de les dades dadas. Per als exemples anteriors troba el patró [nom][expressió][nom,tema][sentiment], on [expressió] representa tots els seus hipònims directs, i [nom,tema] significa un nom que també està relacionat amb el tema.", 'bn': 'GRASP (GRED Augmented Sevenial Patterns) একটি অ্যালগরিদম যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সাবটিল ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর চরিত্রান্ত করে। এই শেষ পর্যন্ত GRASP প্রত্যেক মেয়াদের ইনপুট টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষাগত তথ্য দিয়ে যোগ দেয়। টেক্সট শর্তের এই বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন মুখোমুখি স্থায়ীভাবে সমৃদ্ধ প্যানেট প্রকাশ করার জন্য একত্রিত। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি চ্যালেঞ্জালেঞ্জ টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণের ফলাফল প্রতিবেদন করছি আর্গুমেন্টেশন মিনিং এর ক্ষেত্রে। আমরা বিশ্বাস করি যে গ্রাসপি অন্যান্য ডোমেইনের জন্য যথেষ্ট উপযুক্ত। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, নিম্নলিখিত বাক্যের মধ্যে প্রত্যেকটি দাবী রয়েছে [বিষয়]: ১। প্রায়শই বিরোধীরা যুক্তি প্রদান করে যে উন্মুক্ত প্রাথমিক সাংবিধানিক। [মূল্যবান খোলো] ২. প্রফেক্ট স্মিথ পরামর্শ দিয়েছেন যে নিশ্চিত কার্যকলাপ নির্বাচিত কাজের সমাপ্তি ধ্বংস করে। [অবিশ্বাস্য কাজ] ৩. বেশীরভাগ সংখ্যাগরিষ্ঠ বলেছেন যে প্রথম সংশোধন অন্যদের অপব্যবহারের অধিকার নিশ্চিত করে না। [ভাষণের স্বাধীনতা] এই বাণীগুলো প্রায় সাধারণ কোন শব্দ ভাগাভাগি করে না, তবে তারা আরো অনেক স্তরে একই রকম। একজন মানুষ পর্যবেক্ষক নিম্নলিখিত সাধারণ কাঠামো অথবা প্যাটারেন্ট: [কেউ][যুক্তি/পরামর্শ/রাষ্ট্র][যে][বিষয়ের মেয়াদ][অনুভূ GRASP উদ্দেশ্য প্রদান করা তথ্যের অন্তর্ভুক্ত কাঠামো স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে গ্রহণ করার জন্য। উপরের উদাহরণের জন্য এটি প্যানেট খুঁজে পাচ্ছে [নেন][প্রকাশিত][নেন, বিষয়][অনুভূতি] যেখানে [এক্সপ্রেক্সটের জন্য দাঁড়িয়ে আছে [সরাসরি হিপাইনিম এবং [নেন, বিষয়] এর মানে একটি ন', 'bs': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) je algoritam za automatski izvlačenje obrazaca koje karakteriziraju suptilne jezičke fenomene. Za taj cilj, GRASP povećava svaki pojam teksta s višestrukim slojevima jezičkih informacija. Ove različite lica tekstskih uvjeta su sistematski kombinovane kako bi otkrili bogate obrasce. Prijavljujemo vrlo obećavajuće eksperimentalne rezultate u nekoliko izazovnih zadataka analize teksta u oblasti rudarstva argumentacija. Vjerujemo da je GRASP dovoljno općenito da bude korisna i za druge domene. Na primjer, svaka od sljedećih rečenica uključuje tvrdnju za [temu]: 1. Suprotnici često tvrde da je otvorena primarna neonstitucionalna. 2. Prof. Smith je predložio da potvrđena akcija uništava postignuće odabranih. 3. Većina je izjavila da prvi amandman ne garantuje pravo da uvrijedi druge. [Sloboda govora] Ove rečenice ne dijele skoro nikakve riječi zajedničke, međutim, oni su slične na apstraktniji nivo. Ljudski promatrač može primijetiti sljedeću temeljnu zajedničku strukturu ili obrazac: [neko][argue/suggest/state][that][topic term][sentiment term]. GRASP je cilj da automatski uhvati takve temeljne strukture određenih podataka. Za iznad primjera nalazi se obrazac [imena][ekspresija][ta][imena,tema][osjećaj], gdje [ekspresija] predstavlja sve svoje izravne hiponime, i [imena,tema] znači imena koja je također povezana sa temom.', 'cs': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) je algoritmus pro automatickou extrakci vzorů charakterizujících jemné jazykové jevy. Za tímto účelem GRASP rozšíří každý termín vstupního textu o více vrstev jazykových informací. Tyto různé aspekty textových termínů jsou systematicky kombinovány, aby odhalily bohaté vzory. Předkládáme vysoce slibné experimentální výsledky v několika náročných textových analýzách v oblasti Argumentation Mining. Věříme, že GRASP je dostatečně obecný na to, aby byl užitečný i pro jiné domény. Například každá z následujících vět obsahuje nárok na [téma]: 1. Odpůrci často tvrdí, že otevřený primární bod je protiústavní. [Otevřené primáry] 2. Profesor Smith navrhl, že kladná akce devalvuje úspěchy vyvolených. [Potvrzující akce] 3. Většina uvedla, že První dodatek nezaručuje právo urážet ostatní. [Svoboda projevu] Tyto věty nesdílejí téměř žádná společná slova, nicméně jsou podobné na abstraktnější úrovni. Lidský pozorovatel si může všimnout následující společné struktury nebo vzoru: [někdo][argumentovat/navrhnout/uvádět][že][tématický termín][sentiment termín]. GRASP si klade za cíl automaticky zachytit tyto základní struktury daných dat. U výše uvedených příkladů najde vzor [podstatné jméno][express][that][podstatné jméno,téma][sentiment], kde [express] znamená všechny jeho (in)přímé hyponymy, a [podstatné jméno,téma] znamená podstatné jméno, které je také související s tématem.', 'et': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) on algoritm, mis võimaldab automaatselt ekstraheerida mustreid, mis iseloomustavad peeneid keelelisi nähtusi. Selleks täiendab GRASP iga sisendteksti terminit mitme keelelise teabega. Need tekstiterminite erinevad tahud on süstemaatiliselt kombineeritud, et paljastada rikkalikke mustreid. Raporteerime väga paljulubavatest eksperimentaalsetest tulemustest mitmetes keerulistes tekstianalüüsi ülesannetes Argumentatsiooni kaevandamise valdkonnas. Usume, et GRASP on piisavalt üldine, et olla kasulik ka teistele domeenidele. Näiteks sisaldab iga järgmine lause [teema] nõuet: 1. Vastupooled väidavad sageli, et avatud esmased on põhiseadusevastased. 2. Prof Smith soovitas, et positiivne tegevus devalveerib valitud saavutusi. [Kinnitav tegevus] 3. Enamus väitis, et esimene muudatusettepanek ei taga õigust teisi solvata. Need laused ei jaga peaaegu ühiseid sõnu, kuid abstraktsemal tasandil on nad sarnased. Inimvaatleja võib märgata järgmist ühist struktuuri või mustrit: [keegi][väidab/soovitab/väidab][et][teematermin][sentimentaalne termin]. GRASP-i eesmärk on automaatselt koguda antud andmete aluseks olevaid struktuure. Ülaltoodud näidete puhul leiab ta mustri [substantiiv][express][that][substantiiv,teema][sentiment], kus [express] tähendab kõiki selle (in)otseseid hüponüüme ja [substantiiv,teema] tähendab substantiiv, mis on samuti teemaga seotud.', 'fi': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) on algoritmi, jonka avulla voidaan automaattisesti poimia kuvioita, jotka luonnehtivat hienovaraisia kielellisiä ilmiöitä. Tätä varten GRASP täydentää jokaista syötetyn tekstin termiä useilla kielitiedoilla. Nämä tekstitermien eri puolet yhdistetään systemaattisesti paljastamaan rikkaita kuvioita. Raportoimme erittäin lupaavia kokeellisia tuloksia useissa haastavissa tekstianalyysitehtävissä Argumentaatiolouhinnan alalla. Uskomme, että GRASP on riittävän yleinen ollakseen hyödyllinen myös muille toimialoille. Esimerkiksi jokainen seuraavista lauseista sisältää vaatimuksen [aihe]: 1. Vastaväittäjät väittävät usein, että avoimet vaalit ovat perustuslain vastaisia. 2. Prof. Smith ehdotti, että myönteinen toiminta alentaa valittujen saavutuksia. [Vahvistava toiminta] 3. Enemmistö totesi, että ensimmäinen tarkistus ei takaa oikeutta loukata muita. [Sananvapaus] Näillä lauseilla ei ole mitään yhteistä, mutta ne ovat samankaltaisia abstraktimmalla tasolla. Ihmisen tarkkailija saattaa huomata seuraavan taustalla olevan yhteisen rakenteen tai kuvion: [joku][argumentoi/ehdottaa/totea][tuo][aihetermi][tunteetermi]. GRASP pyrkii automaattisesti kaappaamaan kyseiset perusrakenteet annetusta datasta. Edellä mainituista esimerkeistä se löytää kaavan [substantiivi][express][that][substantiivi,aihe][tunne], jossa [express] tarkoittaa kaikkia sen (in)suoria hyponyymejä, ja [substantiivi,aihe] tarkoittaa substantiivia, joka liittyy myös aiheeseen.', 'he': "GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is an algorithm for automatically extracting patterns that characterize subtle linguistic phenomena.  למטרה זו, GRASP מגדיל כל מונח של טקסט הכניסה עם שכבות רבות של מידע שפתי. הפינקטים השונים האלה של מונחי הטקסט משולבים באופן שיטתי כדי לחשוף דפוסים עשירים. אנחנו מדווחים על תוצאות ניסויים מבטיחות רבות במספר משימות ניתוח טקסט מאתגרות בתוך שדה המכרות. אנחנו מאמינים שGRASP הוא גנרלי מספיק כדי להיות שימושי גם לתחומים אחרים. לדוגמה, כל משפט הבא כולל תביעה על [נושא]: 1. התנגדים לעתים קרובות טוענים שהראשון הפתוח הוא בלתי חוקי. 2. פרופ' סמית הציע כי פעולה חיובית משמידה את השיגועים של הנבחרים. 3. רוב הצביעו שהתוקן הראשון לא מבטיח זכות לפגוע באחרים. [חופש הדיבור] המשפטים האלה חולקים כמעט שום מילים במשותף, עם זאת, הם דומים ברמה יותר אסטרקטית. צופה אנושית יכולה לשים לב למבנה או דפוס משותף הבא: [מישהו][טוען/מציע/מצב][זה][מונח נושאי][מונח רגשות]. GRASP aims to automatically capture such underlying structures of the given data.  לדוגמאות העליונה היא מוצאת את הדפוס [שם][ביטוי][ש][שם, נושא][רגש], שבו [ביטוי] מתייחס לכל היפנימים (ישירים) שלה, ו [שם, נושא] מתכוון שם שקשור גם לנושא.", 'ha': "GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) is an algorithm for automatically extracting patterns that characterize subtle linguistic phenomena.  Ga dawwama, GANSP na ƙarfafa kowace takardar cikin matsayin ayuka da zane-zane-zane masu yawa. An haɗa waɗannan fuskõkin alƙaluman matsayin da aka nuna zaɓen hanyõyi masu riki. Munã bãyar da rabo masu yiwuwa da ake yi wa'adi da matsayin jarrabãwa mai girma a cikin birnin Argument Mining. Tuna amince cẽwa GGANSP yana da amfani da wasu madam. Misali, kõwane abu daga maganar da ke ƙara yana da wata zato ga [madaidaici]: 1. Wasu'ani da yawa sunã jãyayya cẽwa makarantin bayani ne da wata katiba. @ action: button @ info: whatsthis [Tafiyar da Aiki] 3. Babbansu sun ce cewa, Gaskiya na farko bã ya yagara da daman ya zartar da wasu. Waɗannan magana bã zã su yi daidai ba a cikin magana kõ kuwa su yi daidai a kan daraja. Wani mai gani kan mutum yana iya gane da abin da ke ƙara a ƙarƙashin bangon ɗabi'a ko wata tsari: [wani][argument/buƙata/state][that][topic maganar][centament dictionary]. GANSP na yi amfani da yin fanget farat ɗaya ga wannan tsarin da aka ba da data. Ko da misãlai da ke samansa yana gane wata na[na][nun][no,topic][cene][domin, inda yana tsaye wa dukkan misãlai (na'ura,topi) na gane wani na'ani da kuma yana da ma'anar da madaidaita.", 'sk': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns) je algoritem za samodejno ekstrakcijo vzorcev, ki označujejo subtilne jezikovne pojave. V ta namen GRASP dopolnjuje vsak izraz vhodnega besedila z več plastmi jezikovnih informacij. Te različne vidike besedilnih izrazov sistematično združujemo, da razkrijemo bogate vzorce. Poročamo visoko obetavne eksperimentalne rezultate pri več zahtevnih nalogah analize besedila na področju Argumentacijskega rudarstva. Verjamemo, da je GRASP dovolj splošno, da je uporaben tudi za druge domene. Vsak od naslednjih stavkov na primer vključuje zahtevek za [temo]: 1. Nasprotniki pogosto trdijo, da je odprta primarna vrsta protiustavna. 2. Prof. Smith je predlagal, da pritrdilno delovanje devalvera dosežke izbranih. [Potrjeno dejanje] 3. Večina je navedla, da Prvi amandma ne zagotavlja pravice do užalitve drugih. [Svoboda govora] Ti stavki nimajo skoraj nobenih skupnih besed, vendar so podobni na bolj abstraktni ravni. Človeški opazovalec lahko opazi naslednjo osnovno skupno strukturo ali vzorec: [nekdo][trdi/predlaga/navedi][ta][tematski izraz][čustveni izraz]. Cilj programa GRASP je samodejno zajemati takšne osnovne strukture danih podatkov. Za zgoraj navedene primere najde vzorec [samostalnik][izrazi][to][samostalnik,tema][sentiment], kjer [express] pomeni vse njegove (v)neposredne hiponime, samostalnik,tema] pa pomeni samostalnik, ki je tudi povezan s temo.', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS text-tool-action Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh sing nggawe praksi dadi akeh operasi luwih nggawe barang kelas karo nggawe seneng pisan kelas nang kelas argument Ming. Awak dhéwé ngrusak, ARGASP kuwi nggawe barang pengguna kanggo oleh dumadhin maneh. checked Gak Iso sapa sawetara karo hal-hal bo sampeyan bukun primary kuwi ora disinstitusi. [Open primary] 2. deep [Afforative Action] 3. Piyambak kanggo ngerasai perusahaan kanggo Keamanan Nalika ora ngerasai kanggo ngerasai iki banget. [Kemerdekaan Winih] Kemerdekaan iki dadi mesthi ora kelas nang pangan komen, mengko iso dadi luwih apik ya larang langgar. Ombudhakan lichakan langgar nganggo usul dumadhining akeh dumadhi nggawe sapa, opo dumadhi: [someone] [argument/suggere/state] [that] [tema terms] [Sensitive terms]: Language Coverage', 'bo': 'GRASP (GReedy Augmented Sequential Patterns)ནི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐེབས་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་རེད། To that end, GRASP augments each term of input text with multiple layers of linguistic information. ཡི་གེའི་གདོང་རིས་འདི་མ་འདྲ་བ་ནི་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བརྟན་པར་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ཁས་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་བྱ་བ་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ ང་ཚོས་GRASP་ཡིན་ཆེས་གནས་ཁོངས་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཡིན་པའི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རེད། དཔེར་ན། འོག་གི་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་ཚིག་རེ་རེ་ངོས་པར་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད། རྟོག་པ་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་དུ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གཙོ་རིམ་དེ་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་མ་གཞུང་བར་གཏོང་། [Open Primary] 2. Prof. Smith གིས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱིས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་རྗེས་སུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་། [Affirmative Action] 3. ཡིན་ཡང་མང་ཆེ་བས་ཀྱིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་པོ་དེ་ཉེན་ཁ་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཆོག་འཆན་སྤྲོད་མེད་པར། [སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་གྱི་རང་དབང་ཆ།] ཚིག་རྐང་འདི་ཚོ་མཉམ་དུ་འཕགས་རིང་མཐོང་མི་མཚུངས་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ཚོ་ཡང་ལམ་ལུ མིའི་ལྟ་ཀློག་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གཤམ་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་བཀོད་སྲིད་མིན་འདུག：[someone][argue/suggest/state][that][topic][sentiment term]. GRASP་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ དཔེར་བརྗོད་འདི་དག་གི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་དོན་དག་ནི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་བ་དང་མིན་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Patterns of Argumentation Strategies across Topics', 'ar': 'أنماط استراتيجيات الجدال عبر المواضيع', 'es': 'Patrones de estrategias de argumentación en todos los temas', 'pt': 'Padrões de Estratégias de Argumentação entre os Tópicos', 'fr': "Modèles de stratégies d'argumentation à travers les sujets", 'ja': 'トピック間の議論戦略のパターン', 'zh': '跨主题论策模式', 'ru': 'Паттерны стратегий аргументации по всем темам', 'hi': 'विषयों में तर्क रणनीतियों के पैटर्न', 'ga': 'Patrúin Straitéisí Argóint thar Topaicí', 'ka': 'აპდუმენტაციის სტრატიგიების მონაცემები', 'el': 'Πρότυπα στρατηγικών επιχειρηματολογίας σε διάφορα θέματα', 'hu': 'Az érvelési stratégiák mintái a témák között', 'it': 'Modelli di strategie di argomentazione tra gli argomenti', 'lt': 'Argumentavimo strategijų modeliai įvairiose temose', 'mk': 'Шаблони на стратегиите за аргументација на сите теми', 'kk': 'Нақыштардың аргументациялық стратегияларының үлгілері', 'mn': 'Загварын аргументын стратеги', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli tal-Istrateġiji ta’ Argumentazzjoni madwar is-Suġġetti', 'ml': 'വിഷയങ്ങളില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ആര്\u200dഗുമെന്റേഷന്\u200d സ്ട്രേറ്റേജികളുടെ പാത്റെര്\u200dമാര്\u200d', 'ms': 'Corak Strategi Argumentasi melintasi Topik', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Wzorce strategii argumentacyjnych w różnych tematach', 'ro': 'Modele strategiilor de argumentare pe toate subiectele', 'sr': 'Uzorci Argumentacijske strategije preko tema', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaasha arimaha arrimaha', 'sv': 'Mönster för argumentationsstrategier mellan olika ämnen', 'ta': 'தலைப்புகள் முழுவதும் தேர்வுகளின் பாதைகள்', 'ur': 'موضوع کے درمیان آرژومنٹ کے استراتژی پٹرنے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Các mẫu của chiến thuật khắp các chủ đề', 'da': 'Mønstre for argumentationsstrategier på tværs af emner', 'nl': 'Patronen van argumentatiestrategieën over onderwerpen heen', 'hr': 'Uzorci Argumentacijske strategije na temama', 'bg': 'Модели на стратегии за аргументиране в различните теми', 'de': 'Muster von Argumentationsstrategien über Themen hinweg', 'fa': 'الگوهای استراتژی ارجمند در موضوع', 'id': 'Pattern Strategi Argumentasi Melalui Topik', 'sw': 'Wazalendo wa Mipango ya Ujadala', 'tr': 'Temalar arasynda Argumentasyň Strateýgisi', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Արգենտացիայի ռազմավարությունների պատկերները թեմաների միջև', 'sq': 'Patronat e Strategjive të Argumentimit nëpërmjet Temave', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'az': 'Toplar arasƒ±nda Argumentasyon Stratexikl…ôrinin √∂rn…ôkl…ôri', 'bs': 'Uzorci Argumentacijske strategije u raznim temama', 'bn': 'বিষয়গুলোর সারা বিষয়ে আর্গুমেন্টেশন স্ট্যাটেজি', 'ca': 'Patrons of Argumentation Strategies across Topics', 'cs': 'Vzorce argumentačních strategií napříč tématy', 'et': 'Argumenteerimisstrateegiate mustrid teemade lõikes', 'fi': 'Argumentointistrategioiden mallit eri aiheiden välillä', 'ko': '주제를 뛰어넘는 변론 전략 모델', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'דפוסים של אסטרטגיות טיעון ברחבי נושאים', 'sk': 'Vzorci strategij argumentacije po vseh temah', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་མཁན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས།'}
{'en': 'This paper presents an analysis of argumentation strategies in news editorials within and across topics. Given nearly 29,000 argumentative editorials from the New York Times, we develop two machine learning models, one for determining an editorial’s topic, and one for identifying evidence types in the editorial. Based on the distribution and structure of the identified types, we analyze the usage patterns of argumentation strategies among 12 different topics. We detect several common patterns that provide insights into the manifestation of argumentation strategies. Also, our experiments reveal clear correlations between the topics and the detected patterns.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تحليلاً لاستراتيجيات الجدل في المقالات الافتتاحية للأخبار داخل الموضوعات وعبرها. بالنظر إلى ما يقرب من 29000 افتتاحية جدلية من New York Times ، قمنا بتطوير نموذجين للتعلم الآلي ، أحدهما لتحديد موضوع التحرير والآخر لتحديد أنواع الأدلة في الافتتاحية. استنادًا إلى توزيع وهيكل الأنواع المحددة ، نقوم بتحليل أنماط استخدام استراتيجيات المناقشة بين 12 موضوعًا مختلفًا. نكتشف العديد من الأنماط الشائعة التي توفر نظرة ثاقبة لإظهار استراتيجيات الجدال. كما تكشف تجاربنا عن ارتباطات واضحة بين الموضوعات والأنماط المكتشفة.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une analyse des stratégies d'argumentation dans les éditoriaux d'actualité dans et entre les sujets. Avec près de 29 000 éditoriaux argumentatifs du New York Times, nous développons deux modèles d'apprentissage automatique, l'un pour déterminer le sujet d'un éditorial et l'autre pour identifier les types de preuves dans l'éditorial. Sur la base de la distribution et de la structure des types identifiés, nous analysons les modèles d'utilisation des stratégies d'argumentation parmi 12 sujets différents. Nous détectons plusieurs modèles courants qui fournissent un aperçu de la manifestation des stratégies d'argumentation. De plus, nos expériences révèlent des corrélations claires entre les sujets et les modèles détectés.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un análisis de las estrategias de argumentación en editoriales de noticias dentro y entre temas. Teniendo en cuenta casi 29 000 editoriales argumentativos del New York Times, desarrollamos dos modelos de aprendizaje automático, uno para determinar el tema de un editorial y otro para identificar los tipos de evidencia en el editorial. Con base en la distribución y estructura de los tipos identificados, analizamos los patrones de uso de las estrategias de argumentación entre 12 temas diferentes. Detectamos varios patrones comunes que proporcionan información sobre la manifestación de las estrategias de argumentación. Además, nuestros experimentos revelan correlaciones claras entre los temas y los patrones detectados.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma análise das estratégias de argumentação em editoriais de notícias dentro e entre tópicos. Com cerca de 29.000 editoriais argumentativos do New York Times, desenvolvemos dois modelos de aprendizado de máquina, um para determinar o tópico de um editorial e outro para identificar tipos de evidências no editorial. Com base na distribuição e estrutura dos tipos identificados, analisamos os padrões de uso das estratégias de argumentação entre 12 tópicos diferentes. Detectamos vários padrões comuns que fornecem insights sobre a manifestação de estratégias de argumentação. Além disso, nossos experimentos revelam correlações claras entre os tópicos e os padrões detectados.', 'ja': '本稿では、トピック内およびトピック間のニュース社説における議論戦略の分析を紹介する。ニューヨーク・タイムズの29,000近くの議論的な社説を考慮して、私たちは2つの機械学習モデルを開発しています。1つは社説のトピックを決定するためのものであり、もう1つは社説で証拠の種類を特定するためのものです。識別されたタイプの分布と構造に基づいて、12の異なるトピック間の議論戦略の使用パターンを分析します。私たちは、議論戦略の現れに関する洞察を提供するいくつかの一般的なパターンを検出します。また、私たちの実験は、トピックと検出されたパターンとの間の明確な相関関係を明らかにします。', 'zh': '本文析新闻社论中主题内及跨主题论。 鉴《纽约时报》近29,000篇议论文,发二机器以模形,一以定社论之题,一以别社论之证。 以所识之分布结构,论12异端之用式。 我们检测到几种常见的模式,这样模式给了对论证的见解。 此外,实验揭主题检测之明相关性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर विषयों के भीतर और सभी समाचार संपादकीय में तर्क रणनीतियों का विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करता है। न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स के लगभग 29,000 तर्कसंगत संपादकीय को देखते हुए, हम दो मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल विकसित करते हैं, एक संपादकीय के विषय को निर्धारित करने के लिए, और एक संपादकीय में साक्ष्य प्रकारों की पहचान करने के लिए। पहचाने गए प्रकारों के वितरण और संरचना के आधार पर, हम 12 अलग-अलग विषयों के बीच तर्क रणनीतियों के उपयोग पैटर्न का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम कई सामान्य पैटर्न का पता लगाते हैं जो तर्क रणनीतियों की अभिव्यक्ति में अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारे प्रयोगों से विषयों और पता लगाए गए पैटर्न के बीच स्पष्ट सहसंबंध प्रकट होते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен анализ стратегий аргументации в редакционных статьях в рамках и между темами. Учитывая почти 29 000 аргументативных редакционных статей из Нью-Йорк Таймс, мы разрабатываем две модели машинного обучения, одна для определения темы редакции, а другая для определения типов доказательств в редакции. Основываясь на распределении и структуре выявленных типов, мы анализируем закономерности использования стратегий аргументации среди 12 различных тем. Мы обнаруживаем несколько общих закономерностей, которые дают представление о проявлении стратегий аргументации. Также наши эксперименты выявляют четкую корреляцию между темами и выявленными закономерностями.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair anailís ar straitéisí argóinte in eagarthóireachta nuachta laistigh de agus trasna topaicí. I bhfianaise nach mór 29,000 eagarthóireacht argóinteach ón New York Times, forbraímid dhá mhúnla meaisínfhoghlama, ceann amháin chun topaic eagarthóireachta a chinneadh, agus ceann eile chun cineálacha fianaise a aithint san eagarfhocal. Bunaithe ar dháileadh agus ar struchtúr na gcineálacha aitheanta, déanaimid anailís ar phatrúin úsáide straitéisí argóinte i measc 12 ábhar éagsúla. Aithnímid roinnt patrún coitianta a thugann léargas ar léiriú straitéisí argóinte. Chomh maith leis sin, léiríonn ár dturgnaimh comhghaolta soiléire idir na topaicí agus na patrúin braite.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια ανάλυση στρατηγικών επιχειρηματολογίας σε άρθρα ειδήσεων εντός και μεταξύ θεμάτων. Με βάση σχεδόν 29.000 επιχειρηματολογικά άρθρα από τους New York Times, αναπτύσσουμε δύο μοντέλα μηχανικής μάθησης, ένα για τον προσδιορισμό του θέματος ενός συντάκτη και ένα για τον προσδιορισμό των τύπων αποδεικτικών στοιχείων στο άρθρο. Με βάση την κατανομή και τη δομή των προσδιορισμένων τύπων, αναλύουμε τα μοτίβα χρήσης στρατηγικών επιχειρηματολογίας μεταξύ δώδεκα διαφορετικών θεμάτων. Εντοπίζουμε διάφορα κοινά μοτίβα που παρέχουν πληροφορίες σχετικά με την εκδήλωση στρατηγικών επιχειρηματολογίας. Επίσης, τα πειράματά μας αποκαλύπτουν σαφείς συσχετισμούς μεταξύ των θεμάτων και των ανιχνευμένων μοτίβων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az érvelési stratégiák elemzését a témákon belüli és különböző témákban. A New York Times közel 29.000 érvelő szerkesztője alapján két gépi tanulási modellt dolgozunk ki, az egyik a szerkesztőség témájának meghatározására, a másikat pedig a bizonyítéktípusok azonosítására a szerkesztőségben. Az azonosított típusok eloszlása és struktúrája alapján 12 különböző téma között elemezzük az érvelési stratégiák használati mintáit. Számos közös mintát észlelünk, amelyek betekintést nyújtanak az érvelési stratégiák megnyilvánulásába. Kísérleteink egyértelmű összefüggéseket mutatnak a témák és a kimutatott minták között.', 'ka': 'ეს დომენტი ახალგაზრდება ახალგაზრდების რედაქტორიაში და განსაზღვრებით ახალგაზრდების ანალიზი. New York Times-ის პირდაპირად 29,000 არგუმენტიური რედაქტორიების შესახებ, ჩვენ განვითარებთ ორი მაქსინური სწავლების მოდელი, ერთი რედაქტორიის ტემეტის განსაზღვრებისთვის, ერთი რედაქტორიის ტიპის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებული ტიპების გაყოფილი და სტრუქტურაზე, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული ტიპების გამოყენება არგუმენტის სტრატიგიების გამოყენება 12 განსხვავებული ტემების შორის ანალი ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ რამდენიმე საერთო მონაცემები, რომელიც აღმოჩნეთ აპროგმენტის სტრატიგიების მონაცემების შესახებ. ასევე, ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აღმოჩნდება წარმოადგილი კოლექციები ტემების და განაკვირდებული შაბლონების შორის.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un'analisi delle strategie di argomentazione in editoriali di notizie all'interno e tra argomenti. Considerando quasi 29.000 editoriali argomentativi del New York Times, sviluppiamo due modelli di machine learning, uno per determinare l'argomento di un editoriale e uno per identificare i tipi di evidenza nell'editoriale. Sulla base della distribuzione e della struttura dei tipi identificati, analizziamo i modelli di utilizzo delle strategie di argomentazione tra 12 diversi argomenti. Rileviamo diversi modelli comuni che forniscono approfondimenti sulla manifestazione delle strategie di argomentazione. Inoltre, i nostri esperimenti rivelano chiare correlazioni tra gli argomenti e i modelli rilevati.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз жаңалық редакторларда және нақыштардың арасында аргументациялық стратегияларды анализ береді. Нью Йорк Таймсқа жақын 29.000 аргументалдық редакторлар болса, біз екі машиналық оқыту үлгілерін, біріншісін редакторлық нақышын анықтау үшін, біріншісін редакторлық түрлерін анықтау үшін. Таңдалған түрлердің үлестірімі мен құрылымына негізделген, 12 түрлі нақыштардың аргументациялық стратегиялардың пайдалану үлгілерін анализирақ. Біз аргументациялық стратегияларды көрсету үшін бірнеше жалпы үлгілерді анықтаймыз. Мұндай-ақ, біздің тәжірибеміз тақырыптар мен табылған үлгілер арасындағы таңдалған байланыстарды көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama diskusijų strategijų analizė naujienų redakciniuose leidiniuose ir įvairiose temose. Atsižvelgdami į beveik 29 000 argumentacinių New York Times redakcinių leidinių, mes kuriame du mašin ų mokymosi modelius, vieną nustatant redakcinio leidinio temą ir vieną nustatant įrodymų tipus redakciniame leidinyje. Remiantis nustatytų tipų paskirstymu ir struktūra, mes analizuojame argumentavimo strategijų naudojimo modelius tarp 12 skirtingų temų. Nustatome keletą bendrų modelių, kurie suteikia supratimą apie argumentavimo strategijų manifestavimą. Be to, mūsų eksperimentai atskleidžia aiškias temų ir aptiktų modelių koreliacijas.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува анализа на стратегиите за аргументација во новинските уредници во и низ темите. Со оглед на скоро 29.000 аргументативни уредници од Њујорк Тајмс, развиваме два модели за машинско учење, еден за одредување на темата на уредникот и еден за идентификација на видови на докази во уредникот. На основа на дистрибуцијата и структурата на идентификуваните типови, ги анализираме шемите на користење на стратегиите за аргументација меѓу 12 различни теми. We detect several common patterns that provide insights into the manifestation of argumentation strategies.  Исто така, нашите експерименти откриваат јасни корелации меѓу темите и детектираните шеми.', 'ms': "Kertas ini memperkenalkan analisis strategi argumen dalam editorial berita dalam dan melalui topik. Given nearly 29,000 argumentative editorials from the New York Times, we develop two machine learning models, one for determining an editorial's topic, and one for identifying evidence types in the editorial.  Berdasarkan distribusi dan struktur jenis yang dikenali, kami menganalisis corak penggunaan strategi argumen diantara 12 topik yang berbeza. Kami mengesan beberapa corak umum yang memberikan pandangan ke dalam manifestasi strategi argumen. Juga, eksperimen kita mengungkapkan korelasi yang jelas antara topik dan corak yang dikesan.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു.  ന്യൂ യോര്\u200dക്ക് ടൈസില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറച്ച് 29,000 വാദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ എഡിറ്ററിയലുകള്\u200d കൊടുത്തിട്ടുണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു യന്ത്ര പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെട്ട തരത്തിന്റെ വിതരണ വ്യവസ്ഥയും സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 12 വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗത്തിലുള്ള വ്യവസാന പ കുറച്ചു സാധാരണ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു. വാദിക്കുന്ന യുദ്ധത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തില്\u200d കാണുന്ന പിന്നെ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പ്രമേയങ്ങളും കണ്ടെത്തിയ രീതികള', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jippreżenta analiżi tal-istrateġiji ta’ argumentazzjoni fl-editorjali tal-aħbarijiet fi ħdan u fost is-suġġetti. Minħabba kważi 29,000 editorjal argumentattiv mill-New York Times, qed niżviluppaw żewġ mudelli ta' tagħlim bil-magni, wieħed għad-determinazzjoni tas-suġġett ta' editorjal, u wieħed għall-identifikazzjoni tat-tipi ta' evidenza fl-editorjal. Ibbażat fuq id-distribuzzjoni u l-istruttura tat-tipi identifikati, nagħmlu analiżi tax-xejriet ta’ użu ta’ strateġiji ta’ argumentazzjoni fost 12-il suġġett differenti. Aħna niskopru diversi mudelli komuni li jipprovdu għarfien dwar il-manifestazzjoni ta’ strateġiji ta’ argumentazzjoni. Barra minn hekk, l-esperimenti tagħna juru korrelazzjonijiet ċari bejn is-suġġetti u x-xejriet misjuba.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас сэдвийн дотор болон олон сэдвийн дотор аргументын стратегийг шинжилгээ гаргадаг. Нью Йорк Таймс дахь бараг 29.000 аргументын захирагчийн захирагчийн тухай бид хоёр машин сурагчийн загварыг хөгжүүлж, нэгийг захирагчийн сэдвийг тодорхойлох, нэгийг захирагчийн загварыг тодорхойлох, нэгийг захирагчийн загвар Одоо тодорхойлогдсон төрлийн хуваарилалт болон бүтэц дээр бид 12 өөр сэдвийн дотор аргументын стратегийг ашиглах загварыг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид аргументын стратегийг илэрхийлдэг олон нийтийн загварыг олж мэддэг. Мөн бидний туршилтууд сэдэв болон олон загварын хоорондох тодорхой холбоотой байдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein analyse av argumentstrategiar i nyhetsredigeringar inne og gjennom emne. Given nesten 29.000 argumentativ redigeringar frå New York Times, utviklar vi to maskinelæringsmodeller, ein for å bestemme eit redigeringsemne, og ein for å identifisera evidentypar i redigeringsemnet. Basert på distribusjonen og strukturen av dei identifiserte typane, analyserer vi bruksmønsteret for argumentstrategiar blant 12 ulike emne. Vi oppdagar fleire felles mønster som gjev innsikt i manifestasjonen av argumentstrategiar. Eksperimentane våre viser også klare korrelasjonar mellom emnene og dei oppdagte mønsterene.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono analizę strategii argumentacyjnych w artykułach wiadomościowych w ramach i między nimi. Biorąc pod uwagę prawie 29.000 argumentatywnych artykułów redakcyjnych New York Times, opracowujemy dwa modele uczenia maszynowego, jeden do określenia tematu redakcji, a jeden do identyfikacji typów dowodów w redakcji. Na podstawie rozkładu i struktury zidentyfikowanych typów analizujemy wzorce wykorzystania strategii argumentacyjnych wśród 12-ciu różnych tematów. Wykrywamy kilka powszechnych wzorców, które dają wgląd w manifestację strategii argumentacyjnych. Ponadto nasze eksperymenty ujawniają wyraźne korelacje między tematami a wykrytymi wzorcami.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o analiză a strategiilor de argumentare în editorialele de știri din cadrul și dintre subiecte. Având în vedere aproape 29.000 de editoriale argumentative de la New York Times, dezvoltăm două modele de machine learning, unul pentru determinarea subiectului unui editorial și unul pentru identificarea tipurilor de probe în editorial. Pe baza distribuției și structurii tipurilor identificate, analizăm modelele de utilizare a strategiilor de argumentare pe 12 subiecte diferite. Detectăm mai multe modele comune care oferă perspective asupra manifestării strategiilor de argumentare. De asemenea, experimentele noastre dezvăluie corelații clare între subiecte și modelele detectate.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja analizu argumentacije u novinskim editorijama unutar i preko tema. S obzirom na gotovo 29.000 argumentativnih editora iz Njujorka Tajmsa, razvijamo dva modela za učenje mašine, jedan za određivanje tema editora, i jedan za identifikaciju tipa dokaza u editoriji. Na osnovu distribucije i strukture identificiranih tipova, analiziramo obrazac korištenja argumentacije između 12 različitih tema. Otkrivamo nekoliko zajedničkih obrazaca koji pružaju uvid u manifestaciju strategija argumentacije. Takođe, naši eksperimenti otkrivaju jasnu korelaciju između teme i otkrivenih obrazaca.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙනවා වාර්තාව සංපාදනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. නිව්යෝක් ටායිම්ස් වලින් වාර්තාවක් 29,000 වලින්, අපි පද්ධතිය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙකක් විස්තර කරනවා, එක පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සැකසුම පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරකාරයේ විතරය සහ සංවිධානය අධිරූපයෙන්, අපි වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරකාරය 12 අතර ප්\u200dරක අපි හොයාගන්නවා සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විතරයි, ඒ වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ. ඒවගේම, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පැහැදිලි විදිහට සහ පරීක්ෂා විදිහට සම්බන්ධතාව පැහැදිලි කරනවා.', 'so': 'This paper presents an analysis of argumentation strategies in news editorials within and across topics.  Dhab ahaan 29,000 oo hagitaanka oo ka yimid New York Times, waxaan horumarinaa laba model oo wax barashada machine, mid u baahan karo maamulka sawirida, mid u yaqaan sawirida noocyada sawirida. Sida lagu saleynayo qaybinta iyo dhismaha noocyada la aqoonsaday, waxaynu baaraynaa noocyada isticmaalka qoraalka dooda ee noocyada kala duduwan. Waxaynu ogaannaa noocyo badan oo caadiga ah oo muuqata qalabka hadalka. Imtixaanadeena waxaa sidoo kale muujiya xiriir cad oo ku saabsan mada iyo qaababka la gartay.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en analys av argumentationsstrategier i nyhetsredaktörer inom och mellan ämnen. Med närmare 29 000 argumenterande redaktörer från New York Times utvecklar vi två maskininlärningsmodeller, en för att bestämma en redaktionens ämne och en för att identifiera evidenstyper i redaktionen. Utifrån fördelningen och strukturen av de identifierade typerna analyserar vi användningsmönstren för argumentationsstrategier bland 12 olika ämnen. Vi upptäcker flera gemensamma mönster som ger insikter i manifestationen av argumentationsstrategier. Våra experiment avslöjar också tydliga samband mellan ämnena och de upptäckta mönstren.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் வாக்குறுப்பு திட்டத்தில் மற்றும் தலைப்புகளில் உள்ள மற்றும் முழுவதும் செய்தி திருத நியூயார்க் டைஸ்ஸில் இருந்து கிட்டத்தட்ட 29,000 வார்ப்பு திருத்தியாளர்கள் கொடுக்கப்பட்டால், நாம் இரண்டு இயந்திர கற்பிக்கும் மாதிரிகளை உருவாக் குறிப்பிட்ட வகைகளின் பங்கீடு மற்றும் அமைப்பு அடிப்படையில், நாம் 12 வேறு வித்தியாசமான தலைப்புகளில் பயன்படுத்தும் வார்த் நாம் பல பொதுவான முறைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் வார்த்தை தெளிவாக்கும் விஷயங்களின் தெளிவாக்குதல்  மேலும், எங்கள் சோதனைகள் தலைப்புகள் மற்றும் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட உருவங்களுக்கிடையே தெளிவான இணைப்புகளை வ', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک تحلیل کے ذریعہ سے نویس سمجھانے کے اندر اور موضوعوں کے اندر اور مختلف موضوعوں میں جھگڑنے کا استراتژی ہے. نیویورک تایمز سے تقریباً 29 ہزار دلیل اداریٹوریال کی وجہ سے، ہم دو ماشین سیکھنے کے نمونے ڈال دیتے ہیں، ایک اداریٹوریل کے موضوع کا فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے، اور ایک اداریٹوریل میں گواہی کی طرح پہچان کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم 12 مختلف موضوع کے درمیان بحث اور ساختار کی بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، ہم نے بہت سی مشترک الگوں کو پہچان لیا ہے جو بحث استراتژیکوں کی ظاہر میں نظر دیتے ہیں۔ اور ہماری آزمائش موضوع اور معلوم پٹرنوں کے درمیان صریح تعلقات ظاہر کرتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này phân tích các chiến lược tranh luận trong các tạp chí tin tức nội và nội dung các chủ đề. Dựa vào gần 29,000 các tạp chí tranh luận từ tờ New York Times, chúng tôi đã phát triển hai mô hình học máy, một trong những mô hình để quyết định chủ đề bài xã hội, một trong việc xác định dạng bằng chứng trong bài xã luận. Dựa trên phân phối và cấu trúc của các loại xác định, chúng tôi phân tích các mô hình sử dụng các chiến lược nghiên cứu giữa 12: Chúng tôi tìm ra một số một số một số một số một số một số một cách cung cấp cảm giác vào sự biến biểu biết Các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cũng tiết lộ mối liên hệ rõ ràng giữa các chủ đề và các mô hình được phát hiện.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz mavzular ichida va hamma mavzularda argumentlar strategiyasini aniqlaydi. Yaqinda 29,000 argumentative tahrirchalar bilan, biz ikkita mashinalar o'rganish modellarini tahrirlash uchun biri tahrirchalik mavzusini aniqlash uchun va birinchi tahrirchalik turlarini aniqlash uchun. Koʻrsatilgan turlar tarkibini ajratish va structuriyasi asosida, biz 12 boshqa mavzular orasidagi argumentlar asosida foydalanish tugmasini analyzeriz. Biz bir necha ko'p umumiy shakllarni aniqlashimiz mumkin, bu argumentlar strategiyaning ko'rinishiga ko'rinishi mumkin. Bizning tajribalarimiz mavzular va aniqlangan shakllar орасида очиқ-ойдин алоқалар кўрсатади.", 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een analyse van argumentatiestrategieën in nieuwsberichten binnen en tussen onderwerpen. Gezien bijna 29.000 argumentatieve editorials van de New York Times, ontwikkelen we twee machine learning modellen, één voor het bepalen van het onderwerp van een editorial, en één voor het identificeren van bewijstypes in de editorial. Op basis van de verdeling en structuur van de geïdentificeerde types analyseren we de gebruikspatronen van argumentatiestrategieën onder twaalf verschillende onderwerpen. We detecteren verschillende gangbare patronen die inzicht geven in de manifestatie van argumentatiestrategieën. Ook onthullen onze experimenten duidelijke verbanden tussen de onderwerpen en de gedetecteerde patronen.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя анализ на аргументационните стратегии в редакториите на новините в и между темите. Предвид близо 29 000 аргументативни редакториали от Ню Йорк Таймс, ние разработваме два модела за машинно обучение, един за определяне на темата на редакцията и един за идентифициране на типовете доказателства в редакцията. Въз основа на разпределението и структурата на идентифицираните типове анализираме моделите на използване на аргументационни стратегии между 12 различни теми. Ние откриваме няколко общи модели, които осигуряват прозрения за проявата на аргументационни стратегии. Също така, нашите експерименти разкриват ясни корелации между темите и откритите модели.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja analizu strategija argumentacije u novinskim editorijama unutar i preko tema. S obzirom na gotovo 29.000 argumentativnih urednika iz New York Timesa, razvijamo dva modela učenja strojeva, jedan za određivanje teme urednika, i jedan za identifikaciju tipa dokaza u uredniku. Na temelju distribucije i strukture identificiranih vrsta, analiziramo obrasce korištenja argumentacije između 12 različitih tema. Otkrivamo nekoliko zajedničkih obrazaca koje pružaju uvid u manifestaciju strategija argumentacije. Također, naši eksperimenti otkrivaju jasnu korelaciju između teme i otkrivenih obrazaca.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en analyse af argumentationsstrategier i nyhedsreditorier inden for og på tværs af emner. I betragtning af næsten 29.000 argumenterende redaktører fra New York Times, udvikler vi to maskinlæringsmodeller, en til bestemmelse af en redaktørs emne, og en til identificering af evidenstyper i redaktionen. Baseret på fordelingen og strukturen af de identificerede typer analyserer vi brugsmønstrene for argumentationsstrategier blandt 12 forskellige emner. Vi opdager flere fælles mønstre, der giver indsigt i manifestationen af argumentationsstrategier. Vores eksperimenter afslører også klare sammenhænge mellem emnerne og de opdagede mønstre.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag präsentiert eine Analyse von Argumentationsstrategien in Nachrichtenartikeln innerhalb und über Themen hinweg. Mit fast 29.000 argumentativen Editorials der New York Times entwickeln wir zwei Machine Learning Modelle, eines zur Bestimmung des Themas eines Editorials und eines zur Identifizierung von Evidenztypen im Editorial. Ausgehend von der Verteilung und Struktur der identifizierten Typen analysieren wir die Nutzungsmuster von Argumentationsstrategien unter zwölf verschiedenen Themen. Wir erkennen mehrere gängige Muster, die Einblicke in die Manifestation von Argumentationsstrategien geben. Auch zeigen unsere Experimente klare Zusammenhänge zwischen den Themen und den detektierten Mustern.', 'id': 'This paper presents an analysis of argumentation strategies in news editorials within and across topics.  Mengingat hampir 29.000 editorial argumensif dari New York Times, kami mengembangkan dua model belajar mesin, satu untuk menentukan topik editorial, dan satu untuk mengidentifikasi tipe bukti di editorial. Berdasarkan distribusi dan struktur dari tipe yang dikenal, kami menganalisis pola penggunaan strategi argumen di antara 12 topik yang berbeda. Kami mendeteksi beberapa pola umum yang menyediakan penglihatan dalam manifestasi strategi argumen. Juga, eksperimen kami mengungkapkan korelasi jelas antara topik dan pola yang terdeteksi.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha uchambuzi wa mkakati wa mazungumzo katika wahariri wa habari ndani na katika mada mbalimbali. Kutokana na takribani wahariri 29,000 wa hoja kutoka New York Times, tunaendelea mifano miwili ya kujifunza mashine, moja kwa ajili ya kuamua mada ya wahariri, na moja kwa ajili ya kutambua aina za ushahidi katika uhariri. Kutokana na usambazaji na muundo wa aina zilizotambuliwa, tunachambua miundo ya matumizi ya mikakati ya mazungumzo kati ya mada 12 tofauti. Tunagundua namna kadhaa za kawaida zinazotoa maoni katika kuonyesha mkakati wa mazungumzo. Pia, majaribio yetu yanaonyesha uhusiano wa wazi kati ya mada na mitindo yaliyogunduliwa.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک تحلیل از استراتژی\u200cهای بحث در ویرایشگاه\u200cهای خبری درون و در سراسر موضوع نشان می\u200cدهد. با توجه به تقریباً ۲۹ هزار تغییر دهنده\u200cای از نیویورک تایمز، دو مدل یادگیری ماشین توسعه می\u200cکنیم، یکی برای تعیین موضوع ویدئاتوری، و یکی برای شناسایی نوع مدرک در ویدئاتوری. بر اساس توزیع و ساختار نوع شناسایی، ما الگوهای استفاده از استراتژی\u200cهای اختلاف بین 12 موضوع مختلف تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. ما چندین الگوهای مشترک را شناسایی می کنیم که به توضیح استراتژی اختلاف مشترک مشاهده می کنند. همچنین، آزمایشات ما ارتباطات روشنی بین موضوع و الگوهای شناسایی را نشان می دهند.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz täzelikler editorialarynda we meýdançalaryň içinde tartışma strategiýalaryny analyzlaýar. New York Times'dan ýakyn 29,000 argenti düzenleyicilerine görä, biz iki maşynyň öwrenme nusgasyny bejermek üçin, bir düzenleyiciniň temasyny bejermek üçin, we bir düzenleyiciniň kanıtlaryny tanamak üçin. Bellenen türleriň daýratma we strukturasyna dayanan, 12 farklı mesele arasynda argümat stratejiýasynyň ullanyşyny çözümleýäris. Biz bir näçe orta nusgalary tarapyndan pikir eden taryşma stratejiýasynyň manifestasyna göz ýetirjek nusgalary tanyýarys. Munuň üçin biziň deneylerimiz temalaryň we gözlenen nusgalaryň arasynda düşündirişi.", 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n analiseer van argumentasie strategies in nuusredigeerders binne en oor onderwerpe. Gien byna 29,000 argumentatiewe redigeerders van die New York Times, ontwikkel ons twee masjien leer modele, een vir die bepaal van 'n redigeerder se onderwerp, en een vir die identifiseer van bevestige tipes in die redigeerder. Op die verspreiding en struktuur van die identifiseerde tipes, ons analyseer die gebruik patrone van argumentasie strategies tussen 12 verskillende onderwerpe. Ons vind verskeie gemeenskaplike patrone wat inligting verskaf in die manifestasie van argumentasie strategies. Ook, ons eksperimente openbaar duidelike korrelasies tussen die onderwerpe en die gevinde patrone.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የውይይት የውይይት አካባቢዎች ውስጥ እና በጉዳዮች ውስጥ ያሉትን የውይይት ግንኙነትን አስተያይቷል፡፡ ከኒው ዮርክ ተሜሪክ ጀምሮ 29,000 የአጋራጆች ተርታፊዎች በተሰጠ ጊዜ አንደኛቸው የቴክታሪል ጉዳይ እና አንደኛውም በአካሪታዊው ምስክር ዓይነቶችን ለማረጋገጥ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች መካከል የጥያቄ ዘዴዎችን እና የመግለጫውን ሥርዓት እናስተምር፡፡ የውይይት ግንኙነትን ለመገልጽ የሚችሉትን ብዙዎችን የተለያዩ ምሳሌዎች እናውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን በጭራሽ ጉዳዮች እና በተገኘው ሥርዓቶች መካከል ግንኙነት ይገልጣል፡፡', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një analizë të strategjive argumentuese në editorialet e lajmeve brenda dhe mes temave. Duke pasur parasysh gati 29,000 editoriale argumentuese nga New York Times, ne zhvillojmë dy modele mësimi makinash, një për përcaktimin e një temë editoriale dhe një për identifikimin e llojeve të provave në editoriale. Bazuar në shpërndarjen dhe strukturën e llojeve të identifikuara, ne analizojmë modelet e përdorimit të strategjive argumentuese midis 12 temave të ndryshme. Ne zbulojmë disa modele të përbashkëta që ofrojnë pamje në manifestimin e strategjive argumentuese. Also, our experiments reveal clear correlations between the topics and the detected patterns.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է բանավեճման ռազմավարությունների վերլուծություն նորությունների խմբագիրներում թեմաների մեջ և տարբեր թեմաներում: Նյու Յորք Թայմսից գրեթե 29,000 բանավեճող խմբագիր հաշվի առնելով, մենք զարգանում ենք երկու մեքենային ուսուցման մոդել, մեկը խմբագիր թեման որոշումների համար, մյուսը՝ խմբագիր ապացույցների տեսակների հայտնաբերման համար: Հիմնված բաշխման և կառուցվածքի վրա, մենք վերլուծում ենք բանավեճերի ռազմավարման կաղապարները 12 տարբեր թեմաների մեջ: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք մի քանի ընդհանուր կաղապարներ, որոնք ներկայացնում են բանավեճման ռազմավարությունների բացահայտումը: Նաև մեր փորձերը բացահայտում են պարզ կապ թեմաների և հայտնաբերված կաղապարների միջև:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt məsələlərin və məsələlərin içində haqq edicilərdə arqümatlandırma stratejilərinin analizi göstərir. New York Times tərəfindən yaklaşık 29.000 argumentativ editorial sayəsində, biz iki maşın öyrənmə modeli, birini editorial məs ələsini təyin etmək üçün və birini editorial tərəfindən dəlillər təyin etmək üçün təyin edirik. Beləliklə tanınmış növlərin dağıtımı və quruluğuna dayanan, 12 müxtəlif məsələlər arasında argumentasyon stratejilərinin istifadəsini analiz edirik. Biz bir neçə ortaq modelləri keşfetirik ki, argumentasyon stratejilərinin açılmasına nəzər verər. Həmçinin təcrübələrimiz məsələlər və tanınmış modellər arasında açıq bir bağlantı göstərir.', 'ko': '본고는 뉴스 사설에서 화제 내와 화제 간의 논변 전략을 분석하였다.뉴욕타임스의 29000편에 가까운 변론적 사설을 감안하여 우리는 두 개의 기계 학습 모델을 개발했다. 하나는 사설의 주제를 확정하는 데 사용되고, 다른 하나는 사설의 증거 유형을 확정하는 데 사용된다.식별된 유형의 분포와 구조에 따라 우리는 12개의 서로 다른 주제의 변론 전략 사용 모델을 분석했다.우리는 몇 가지 흔히 볼 수 있는 모델을 발견하여 논증 전략의 표현에 견해를 제공하였다.그 밖에 우리의 실험은 주제와 검출된 모델 간의 뚜렷한 관련성을 보여 주었다.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি সংবাদ সম্পাদকদের ভিতরে এবং পার্শ্ব বিষয়ে যুক্তিগত কৌশলের বিশ্লেষণের বিশ্লেষণ করেছে। নিউ ইয়র্ক টাইমস থেকে প্রায় ২৯,০০০ যুক্তিভাবে সম্পাদক সম্পাদকদের দিয়ে আমরা দুই মেশিন শিক্ষা মডেল উন্নয়ন করি, একটি সম্পাদকীয় বিষয় নির্ধারণের জন্য, আর চিহ্নিত ধরনের বিতরণ এবং কাঠামোর ভিত্তিতে আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করি বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের মধ্যে ১২ বিভিন্ন বিষয়ের মধ্যে যুক্তি প্রযুক্ত আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি সাধারণ প্রতিনিধি আবিষ্কার করি যেগুলো যুক্তি প্রকাশের কৌশলে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো বিষয়গুলোর মধ্যে পরিষ্কার সম্পর্ক প্রকাশ করে দেয় এবং সনাক্ত প্রান্তের মধ্', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta una an àlisi d'estratègies d'argumentació en editorials de notícies dins i entre temes. Dant gairebé 29.000 editorial s argumentatius del New York Times, desenvolupem dos models d'aprenentatge màquinari, un per determinar el tema d'un editorial, i un per identificar els tipus d'evidència a l'editorial. Sobre la base de la distribució i estructura dels tipus identificats, analitzem els patrons d'ús d'estratègies d'argumentació entre 12 temes diferents. We detect several common patterns that provide insights into the manifestation of argumentation strategies.  També, els nostres experiments revelen correlacions clares entre els temes i els patrons detectats.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje analýzu argumentačních strategií ve zpravodajských editorialech v rámci a napříč tématy. Vzhledem k téměř 29.tisíci argumentativních editoriálů New York Times vyvíjíme dva modely strojového učení, jeden pro určení tématu redakce a jeden pro identifikaci typů důkazů v redakci. Na základě distribuce a struktury identifikovaných typů analyzujeme vzorce využití argumentačních strategií mezi dvanácti různými tématy. Detekujeme několik běžných vzorců, které poskytují pohled na manifestaci argumentačních strategií. Naše experimenty také odhalují jasnou souvislost mezi tématy a detekovanými vzorci.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja analizu strategija argumentacije u novinskim editorijama unutar i kroz teme. S obzirom na gotovo 29.000 argumentativnih editora iz New York Timesa, razvijamo dva modela za učenje mašina, jedan za određivanje tema editora, i jedan za identifikaciju tipa dokaza u editoriji. Na temelju distribucije i strukture identificiranih tipova, analiziramo uzorke argumentacije između 12 različitih tema. Otkrivamo nekoliko zajedničkih obrazaca koji pružaju uvid u manifestaciju strategija argumentacije. Takođe, naši eksperimenti otkrivaju jasnu korelaciju između teme i otkrivenih obrazaca.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse argumenteerimisstrateegiate analüüs uudiste ajakirjades teemade sees ja nende vahel. Arvestades ligi 29 000 New York Timesi argumentatiivset kirjastust, töötame välja kaks masinõppe mudelit, üks toimetuse teema kindlaksmääramiseks ja teine toimetuse tõendite tüüpide kindlaksmääramiseks. Tuginedes tuvastatud tüüpide jaotusele ja struktuurile, analüüsime argumenteerimisstrateegiate kasutusmustreid 12 erineva teema vahel. Me tuvastame mitmeid tavalisi mustreid, mis annavad ülevaate argumenteerimisstrateegiate avaldumisest. Samuti näitavad meie katsed selgeid seoseid teemade ja tuvastatud mustrite vahel.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittää analyysin argumentointistrategioista uutislehtien sisällä ja eri aiheiden välillä. Ottaen huomioon lähes 29 000 argumentoivaa julkaisua New York Times, kehitämme kaksi koneoppimismallia, yhden pääkirjoituksen aiheen määrittämiseen ja toisen näyttötyyppien tunnistamiseen pääkirjoituksessa. Määritettyjen tyyppien jakauman ja rakenteen perusteella analysoimme argumentointistrategioiden käyttötapoja 12 eri aiheessa. Havaitsemme useita yleisiä malleja, jotka antavat oivalluksia argumentointistrategioiden ilmenemisestä. Kokeet paljastavat myös selkeitä korrelaatioita aiheiden ja havaittujen kuvioiden välillä.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki menehi karo pancening pancening spikening pancening alat nang editorial balêh lan karo tema. Nyong ngolesi nambah 30.000 sing dirampakan sing dumalah sing nganggo New Yok Time, awake dhéwé nggawe sistem sing sampeyan duwé, éwé kanggo nambah perusahaan sing perusahaan, lan saben kanggo nambah perusahaan sing entuk perusahaan seneng pisan kang didalahaan Ngawe ngupakan seng Distribusi lan sak structural karo hal-hal didasai, kita dadi ngejarian sistem sing dadi sing diranggunak bab 12 sing paling Awak dhéwé éntuk akèh sing sampeyan luwih dumadhi iki nggawe barang nggawe gerakan ingkang sampeyan winih. Kamulyan ingkang dipun-ingkang dipun nggawe barang kelas nang tema karo ingkang dipun', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljena analiza argumentacijskih strategij v novinarskih urednikih znotraj in med temi. Glede na skoraj 29.000 argumentativnih urednikov iz New York Timesa razvijamo dva modela strojnega učenja, enega za določanje teme uredništva in enega za identifikacijo vrst dokazov v uredništvu. Na podlagi porazdelitve in strukture identificiranih tipov analiziramo vzorce uporabe argumentacijskih strategij med 12 različnimi temami. Zaznavamo več skupnih vzorcev, ki zagotavljajo vpogled v manifestacijo argumentacijskih strategij. Naši eksperimenti razkrivajo tudi jasne povezave med temami in zaznanimi vzorci.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג ניתוח של אסטרטגיות ויכוח בעורקים חדשות בתוך ונושאים. בהתחשב בסביבות 29,000 עורכי דיון מניו יורק טיימס, אנחנו מפתחים שני דוגמנים ללמוד מכונות, אחד לקבוע נושא עורכי דיון, ואחד לזהות סוגי ראיות בעורך דיון. בהתבסס על ההפצה והמבנה של הטיפוסים המזוודים, אנו מנתחים את דפוסי השימוש של אסטרטגיות טיעון בין 12 נושאים שונים. אנחנו מגלים כמה דפוסים משותפים שמספקים תובנות לתגלה של אסטרטגיות ויכוח. בנוסף, הניסויים שלנו חושפים קשרים ברורים בין הנושאים לבין הדפוסים המוגלים.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da anayyari ga tundiyori masu yin husũma a cikin na-bayan madaidaita. Given nearly 29,000 argumentative editorials from the New York Times, we develop two machine learning models, one for determining an editorial's topic, and one for identifying evidence types in the editorial.  Basan da aka raba da salon nau'in da aka sani, za mu yi anaƙayyade misãlai na amfani da shiryoyin taki masu yin husũma a cikin madaidaita 12 dabam-daban. Tuna gane wasu misãlai masu jama'a da ke samar da gannai cikin bayan takwai masu husũma. Da haka, jarrabõyinmu ke bayyana linki bayyananne tsakanin madaidaita da misãlai da aka gane.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསར་བ་ཞུགས་པ་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་གི་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཉིག་ཡོག་ཏུ་དྲ་བ་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་སྒྲུབ་རྗེས་སུ་༢༠༠༠་ཙམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ལག་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་འཛིན་པའི་རིགས་ཚོའི་བགོ་སྤྱད་ནས་གྲངས་སུ་དང་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་གཞུང་བྱས་པ་དེ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་གནད་དོན་མ ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་མཐུན་མཁན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་གནད་དོན་དང་རྙེད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་མངོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Using Argument-based Features to Predict and Analyse Review Helpfulness', 'ar': 'استخدام الميزات المستندة إلى الوسيطة لتوقع وتحليل فائدة المراجعة', 'fr': "Utilisation de fonctionnalités basées sur des arguments pour prédire et analyser l'utilité des avis", 'es': 'Uso de funciones basadas en argumentos para predecir y analizar la utilidad de las revisiones', 'pt': 'Usando recursos baseados em argumentos para prever e analisar a utilidade da revisão', 'ja': '引数ベースの機能を使用してレビューの有用性を予測および分析する', 'zh': '用参数之功,以占察有用性', 'hi': 'भविष्यवाणी और विश्लेषण करने के लिए तर्क-आधारित सुविधाओं का उपयोग करना सहायकता की समीक्षा करें', 'ru': 'Использование аргументированных функций для прогнозирования и анализа полезности обзора', 'ga': 'Gnéithe atá Bunaithe ar Argóintí a Úsáid chun Cuiditheacht Athbhreithnithe a Thuar agus a Anailísiú', 'ka': 'აპდუმენტის ბაზეული ფექტურების გამოყენება დაწყენება და ანალიზება', 'el': 'Χρήση χαρακτηριστικών βασισμένων σε επιχειρήματα για να προβλέψει και να αναλύσει τη χρησιμότητα αναθεώρησης', 'hu': 'Argumentalapú funkciók használata az értékelés előrejelzésére és elemzésére', 'it': 'Utilizzo di funzionalità basate su argomenti per prevedere e analizzare le recensioni', 'mk': 'Користејќи аргументи за предвидување и анализа на помошта во прегледот', 'lt': 'Argumentais pagrįstų savybių naudojimas siekiant prognozuoti ir analizuoti pagalbos peržiūrai', 'kk': 'Аргументтің негіздеген мүмкіндіктерін алдын- ала қарау және анализдеу', 'ms': 'Mengguna Ciri-ciri Berasas Argumen untuk Menyegerakkan dan Analisis Bantuan Paparan Semula', 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പ്രിന്\u200dഡിക്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും പരിശോധിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Using Argument-based Features to Predict and Analyse Review Helpfulness', 'mn': 'Аргумент дээр суурилсан өөрчлөлт ашиглан Шинэ судалгааны тусламж', 'no': 'Bruk argumentbaserte funksjonar for å foregå og analysera gjennomgang hjelp', 'pl': 'Korzystanie z funkcji opartych na argumentach do przewidywania i analizy pomocności przeglądu', 'ro': 'Utilizarea caracteristicilor bazate pe argumente pentru a anticipa și analiza recenziile', 'sr': 'Koristeći karakteristike na temelju argumenta za predviđanje i analizu pomoći preglede', 'so': 'Isticmaalka qalabka aragtida ee ku saleysan takhasuska', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අධාරිත විශේෂතාවය ප්\u200dරභාවිත කරන්න සහ විශේෂ කරන්න', 'sv': 'Använda argumentbaserade funktioner för att förutsäga och analysera granskning', 'ta': 'முன்னிருப்பு மற்றும் பார்வை முழுமையாக ஆராய்வு உதவியை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'Argument-based Features used to Predict and Analyze Review helpfulness', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dùng các chức năng dựa trên Argumentt để dự đoán và phân tích Hữu ích cho kiểm tra', 'bg': 'Използване на функциите, базирани на аргументи, за да прогнозирате и анализирате полезността на прегледа', 'da': 'Brug af argumentbaserede funktioner til at forudsige og analysere anmeldelser', 'nl': 'Gebruik van argumentgebaseerde functies om de hulpvaardigheid van beoordelingen te voorspellen en te analyseren', 'ko': '논점에 기초한 특징 예측과 분석 복습의 도움성 사용', 'de': 'Verwenden argumentbasierter Features zur Vorhersage und Analyse der Hilfestellung bei Überprüfungen', 'id': 'Using Argument-based Features to Predict and Analyse Review Helpfulness', 'fa': 'استفاده از ویژگی\u200cهای بنیاد آرگوم برای پیش\u200cبینی و تحلیل کمک', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Tamko zilizoko na Uzazi wa Utawala wa Udhibiti na Uchambuzi Usaidizi', 'tr': 'Argument tabanly hymsallary önden çykmak we çözümlenmek üçin ullanýar', 'af': 'Gebruik van Argument-gebaseerde eienskappe na voorskryf en Analiseer Hersiening Helpbaarheid', 'hr': 'Koristeći karakteristike na temelju Argumenta za predviđanje i analiziranje pomoći revizije', 'am': 'Using Argument-based Features to Predict and Analyse Review Helpfulness', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i funksioneve bazuar në argumente për të parashikuar dhe analizuar ndihmën e shqyrtimit', 'hy': "Օգտագործելով բանավեճի հիմնված առանձնահատկություններ' նախատեսելու և վերլուծելու օգնությունը", 'az': 'Argument-tabanlı Özellikləri Ön-nəsihət və Analiz Yardımcılığı üçün istifadə edərək', 'bn': 'আর্গামেন্ট ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রেসিডেক্ট এবং বিশ্লেষণ করা সাহায্য পূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে', 'ca': "Utilitzant característiques basades en arguments per predir i analitzar l'ajuda", 'cs': 'Použití funkcí založených na argumentech k predikci a analýze užitečnosti přezkumů', 'fi': 'Argumenttipohjaisten ominaisuuksien käyttäminen arvioinnin ennustamiseen ja analysointiin', 'bs': 'Koristeći karakteristike na temelju Argumenta za predviđanje i analizu pomoći revizije', 'et': 'Argumentipõhiste funktsioonide kasutamine ülevaate prognoosimiseks ja analüüsimiseks', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah pengguna sing basa argument dumadhi Obèran kanggo Kebebasan Karo Validity', 'ha': 'Yi amfani da KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Uporaba funkcij, ki temeljijo na argumentih, za predvidevanje in analizo pregleda', 'he': 'שימוש בציונים מבוססים על טיעון כדי לקרוא ולניתוח עזרת שידור', 'bo': 'སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ངོ་བོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་དང་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རོགས་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'We study the helpful product reviews identification problem in this paper. We observe that the evidence-conclusion discourse relations, also known as arguments, often appear in product reviews, and we hypothesise that some argument-based features, e.g. the percentage of argumentative sentences, the evidences-conclusions ratios, are good indicators of helpful reviews. To validate this hypothesis, we manually annotate arguments in 110 hotel reviews, and investigate the effectiveness of several combinations of argument-based features. Experiments suggest that, when being used together with the argument-based features, the state-of-the-art baseline features can enjoy a performance boost (in terms of F1) of 11.01 % in average.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el útil problema de identificación de revisiones de productos en este artículo. Observamos que las relaciones entre el discurso evidencia-conclusión, también conocidas como argumentos, a menudo aparecen en las reseñas de productos, y planteamos la hipótesis de que algunas características basadas en argumentos, por ejemplo, el porcentaje de oraciones argumentativas, las proporciones evidencias-conclusiones, son buenos indicadores de revisiones útiles. Para validar esta hipótesis, anotamos manualmente los argumentos en 110 reseñas de hoteles e investigamos la eficacia de varias combinaciones de características basadas en argumentos. Los experimentos sugieren que, cuando se utilizan junto con las funciones basadas en argumentos, las funciones de referencia de última generación pueden disfrutar de un aumento del rendimiento (en términos de F1) del 11,01% en promedio.', 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة تحديد مراجعات المنتجات المفيدة في هذه الورقة. نلاحظ أن علاقات خطاب استنتاج الأدلة ، والمعروفة أيضًا باسم الحجج ، تظهر غالبًا في مراجعات المنتج ، ونفترض أن بعض الميزات القائمة على الجدل ، على سبيل المثال النسبة المئوية للجمل الجدلية ، ونسب الأدلة والاستنتاجات ، هي مؤشرات جيدة للمراجعات المفيدة. للتحقق من صحة هذه الفرضية ، نقوم يدويًا بتعليق الحجج في 110 تقييمًا للفنادق ، والتحقيق في فعالية عدة مجموعات من الميزات المستندة إلى الحجج. تشير التجارب إلى أنه عند استخدامها جنبًا إلى جنب مع الميزات القائمة على الوسيطة ، يمكن أن تتمتع ميزات خط الأساس الحديثة بتعزيز الأداء (من حيث F1) بنسبة 11.01٪ في المتوسط.', 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema de identificação de revisões de produtos úteis neste artigo. Observamos que as relações de discurso evidência-conclusão, também conhecidas como argumentos, geralmente aparecem em análises de produtos, e levantamos a hipótese de que alguns recursos baseados em argumentos, por exemplo, a porcentagem de sentenças argumentativas, as relações evidências-conclusões, são bons indicadores de revisões úteis. Para validar essa hipótese, anotamos manualmente os argumentos em 110 avaliações de hotéis e investigamos a eficácia de várias combinações de recursos baseados em argumentos. Experimentos sugerem que, ao serem usados em conjunto com os recursos baseados em argumentos, os recursos de linha de base de última geração podem obter um aumento de desempenho (em termos de F1) de 11,01% em média.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème d'identification des avis produits utiles. Nous observons que les relations de discours factures-conclusions, également appelées arguments, apparaissent souvent dans les évaluations de produits, et nous émettons l'hypothèse que certaines caractéristiques basées sur des arguments, par exemple le pourcentage de phrases argumentatives, les ratios preuves-conclusions, sont de bons indicateurs d'évaluations utiles. Pour valider cette hypothèse, nous annotons manuellement les arguments dans 110 avis d'hôtels et nous étudions l'efficacité de plusieurs combinaisons de caractéristiques basées sur des arguments. Les expériences suggèrent que, lorsqu'elles sont utilisées avec les fonctionnalités basées sur des arguments, les fonctionnalités de base de pointe peuvent bénéficier d'une amélioration des performances (en termes de F1) de 11,01\xa0% en moyenne.", 'ja': '本稿では、製品レビューの識別に役立つ問題について検討する。私たちは、議論としても知られる証拠結論の議論関係がしばしば製品レビューに現れることを観察し、議論に基づくいくつかの特徴、例えば、議論的文章のパーセンテージ、証拠結論の比率は、有用なレビューの良い指標であると仮定します。この仮説を検証するために、110件のホテルのレビューで議論を手動で注釈付けし、議論ベースの機能のいくつかの組み合わせの有効性を調査します。実験では、引数ベースの機能と共に使用される場合、最先端のベースライン機能は、平均11.01 ％のパフォーマンスブースト（ F 1の観点から）を享受できることが示唆されています。', 'zh': '本文治有用之物论识。 臣等观之,证-结言,亦曰论证,常见产品论中,假设基于论证之征,如论句之百分比,证 - 结论比率,有益论之良指标。 验其伪设,于110条酒店点评中手动注论点,并勘其特征组有效性。 实验明与参数俱用,先进之基线可以均11.01%升(F1言)。', 'hi': 'हम इस पेपर में सहायक उत्पाद समीक्षा पहचान समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम देखते हैं कि साक्ष्य-निष्कर्ष प्रवचन संबंध, जिन्हें तर्क के रूप में भी जाना जाता है, अक्सर उत्पाद समीक्षाओं में दिखाई देते हैं, और हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि कुछ तर्क-आधारित विशेषताएं, उदाहरण के लिए तर्कसंगत वाक्यों का प्रतिशत, साक्ष्य-निष्कर्ष अनुपात, सहायक समीक्षाओं के अच्छे संकेतक हैं। इस परिकल्पना को मान्य करने के लिए, हम मैन्युअल रूप से 110 होटल समीक्षाओं में तर्कों को एनोटेट करते हैं, और तर्क-आधारित सुविधाओं के कई संयोजनों की प्रभावशीलता की जांच करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि, जब तर्क-आधारित सुविधाओं के साथ एक साथ उपयोग किया जा रहा है, तो अत्याधुनिक बेसलाइन विशेषताएं औसत में 11.01% के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने (एफ 1 के संदर्भ में) का आनंद ले सकती हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы изучаем проблему идентификации полезных обзоров продуктов. Мы отмечаем, что в обзорах продуктов часто появляются отношения «доказательства - заключение», также известные как аргументы, и мы предполагаем, что некоторые характеристики, основанные на аргументах, например, процент аргументативных предложений, соотношение «доказательства - выводы», являются хорошими показателями полезных обзоров. Чтобы подтвердить эту гипотезу, мы вручную аннотируем аргументы в 110 обзорах гостиниц и исследуем эффективность нескольких комбинаций признаков, основанных на аргументах. Эксперименты показывают, что при использовании вместе с аргументированными функциями современные базовые характеристики могут в среднем увеличивать производительность (в терминах F1) на 11,01%.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb aitheantais athbhreithnithe táirge cabhrach sa pháipéar seo. Tugaimid faoi deara go bhfeictear an caidreamh dioscúrsa fianaise-conclúid, ar a dtugtar argóintí freisin, go minic in athbhreithnithe táirge, agus tugaimid hipitéis go bhfuil roinnt gnéithe argóint-bhunaithe, m.sh. Is táscairí maithe iad céatadán na n-abairtí argóinteacha, na cóimheasa fianaise-chonclúidí, ar athbhreithnithe cuiditheacha. Chun an hipitéis seo a bhailíochtú, déanaimid argóintí a anótáil de láimh i 110 léirmheas óstán, agus déanaimid imscrúdú ar éifeachtacht roinnt meascán de ghnéithe argóint-bhunaithe. Tugann turgnaimh le fios, agus iad á n-úsáid in éineacht leis na gnéithe argóint-bhunaithe, gur féidir leis na gnéithe bunlíne úrscothacha taitneamh a bhaint as treisiú feidhmíochta (i dtéarmaí F1) de 11.01% ar an meán.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მოხმარებული პროდისტის გამოცდილება ამ დომენტში ინდიდინტიფიკაციის პრობლემა. ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ წარმოდგენების გადასრულებული განსაზღვრებები, რომელიც აპროდუმენტებით, ზოგიერთად პროდუმენტის განსაზღვრებში ჩვენ წარმოდგენებთ, რომ რაღაც აპროდუმენტიური წარმოდგენების პროცენტი, წარმოდგენების გადასრულებ ამ ჰიპოტეზეზის გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ 110 ჰოტელური გადაწყვეტისთვის არგუმენტების ხელსაწყვეტით და აკეთებთ რამდენიმე არგუმენტების კომბიზაციების ეფექტი ექსპერიმენტები იტყვის, რომ, როდესაც აპრიმენტების განსაზღვრებით გამოყენებულია, აპრიმენტების განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით შესაძლებელია 11,01% განსაზღვრებით.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το χρήσιμο πρόβλημα αναγνώρισης κριτικών προϊόντων σε αυτή την εργασία. Παρατηρούμε ότι οι σχέσεις λόγου αποδεικτικών στοιχείων-συμπερασμάτων, γνωστές και ως επιχειρήματα, εμφανίζονται συχνά στις αναθεωρήσεις προϊόντων και υποθέτουμε ότι ορισμένα χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται σε επιχειρήματα, π.χ. το ποσοστό των επιχειρηματικών προτάσεων, οι αναλογίες αποδεικτικών συμπερασμάτων, είναι καλοί δείκτες χρήσιμων αναθεωρήσεων. Για να επικυρώσουμε αυτή την υπόθεση, σχολιάζουμε χειροκίνητα επιχειρήματα σε 110 κριτικές ξενοδοχείων και διερευνούμε την αποτελεσματικότητα αρκετών συνδυασμών χαρακτηριστικών βασισμένων σε επιχειρήματα. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι, όταν χρησιμοποιούνται μαζί με τα χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται στα επιχειρήματα, τα σύγχρονα χαρακτηριστικά βάσης μπορούν να απολαύσουν αύξηση απόδοσης (από την άποψη F1) κατά μέσο όρο 11,01% .', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban tanulmányozzuk a hasznos termék értékelések azonosítási problémáját. Megfigyeljük, hogy a bizonyíték-következtetés diskurzus kapcsolatok, más néven argumentumok, gyakran megjelennek a termék értékelésekben, és feltételezzük, hogy néhány érvelésen alapuló jellemző, például az érvelő mondatok százalékos aránya, a bizonyíték-következtetések aránya jó mutatók a hasznos értékeléseknek. Ennek a hipotézisnek a validálásához 110 szállodaértékelésben manuálisan jegyzeteljük meg az argumentumokat, és vizsgáljuk az argumentumokon alapuló funkciók több kombinációjának hatékonyságát. A kísérletek azt sugallják, hogy ha az argumentumokon alapuló funkciókkal együtt használják, a legkorszerűbb alapfunkciók átlagosan 11,01%-os teljesítménynövelést élvezhetnek (F1 tekintetében).', 'it': "Studiamo l'utile problema di identificazione delle recensioni dei prodotti in questo documento. Osserviamo che le relazioni tra evidenza e conclusione del discorso, note anche come argomenti, appaiono spesso nelle recensioni dei prodotti, e ipotizziamo che alcune caratteristiche basate su argomenti, ad esempio la percentuale di frasi argomentative, il rapporto evidenza-conclusioni, siano buoni indicatori di recensioni utili. Per convalidare questa ipotesi, annotiamo manualmente gli argomenti in 110 recensioni degli hotel e analizziamo l'efficacia di diverse combinazioni di funzionalità basate su argomenti. Gli esperimenti suggeriscono che, quando vengono utilizzati insieme alle funzionalità basate su argomenti, le funzionalità di base all'avanguardia possono godere di un aumento delle prestazioni (in termini di F1) dell'11,01% in media.", 'kk': 'Біз бұл қағаздың идентификациялау мәселесін тексеруді зерттейміз. Біз дәлемдердің соңындағы дискурстардың қатынасы, сондай-ақ аргументтер ретінде белгіленген, көбірек продуктты қарау ретінде көрсетіледі, және біз аргументтің негізінде кейбір мүмкіндіктер, мысалы, аргументтік сөздердің пайызы, дәлемдердің соңындағы қаты Бұл гипотезаны тексеру үшін 110 хотел редакциясындағы аргументтерді қолмен жазып, аргументтің негізінде бірнеше тәжірибесінің тәжірибесін зерттеп көреміз. Тәжірибелер аргументті негіздеген мүмкіндіктермен бірге қолданылатын кезде суреттің негізгі қасиеттері орташа 11,01% деп (F1 қасиетінде) жылдамдығын көтеруге болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame naudingą produktų peržiūros identifikavimo problem ą. We observe that the evidence-conclusion discourse relations, also known as arguments, often appear in product reviews, and we hypothesise that some argument-based features, e.g. the percentage of argumentative sentences, the evidences-conclusions ratios, are good indicators of helpful reviews.  Norėdami patvirtinti šią hipotezę, rankiniu būdu komentuojame argumentus 110 viešbučių apžvalgų metu ir tiriame kelių argumentais pagrįstų savybių derinių veiksmingumą. Eksperimentai rodo, kad kartu su argumentais pagrįstomis savybėmis naujausios pradinės savybės gali vidutiniškai padidinti veikimą (F1 atžvilgiu) 11,01 %.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്ന പ്രൊജറിനെ പഠിക്കുന്നു. തെളിവുകളുടെ സംസാര ബന്ധങ്ങളും വ്യവസാനത്തിലും പരിചയപ്പെടുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുമായി നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു. പ്രാവശ്യം ഉല്\u200dബോധനത്തില്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന്നു. ചില വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വ ഈ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റസിയെ ശരിയാക്കാന്\u200d, 110 ഹോട്ടല്\u200d പരിശോധിയ്ക്കുന്ന വാദ്യാഭ്യാസം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും, കുറച്ച് വാ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിശേഷങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d- ആര്\u200dട്ട് ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari masalah pengenalan produk yang berguna dalam kertas ini. Kami memperhatikan bahawa hubungan percakapan bukti-kesimpulan, juga dikenali sebagai argumen, sering muncul dalam ulasan produk, dan kami hipotesis bahawa beberapa ciri-ciri berdasarkan argumen, misalnya peratus kalimat argumen, nisbah bukti-kesimpulan, adalah indikator yang baik untuk ulasan berguna. Untuk sahkan hipotesis ini, kami secara manual anotasi argumen dalam 110 ulasan hotel, dan menyelidiki kegunaan beberapa kombinasi ciri-ciri berdasarkan argumen. Experiments suggest that, when being used together with the argument-based features, the state-of-the-art baseline features can enjoy a performance boost (in terms of F1) of 11.01% in average.', 'mt': 'We study the helpful product reviews identification problem in this paper.  Aħna ninservaw li r-relazzjonijiet diskorsi evidenza-konklużjoni, magħrufa wkoll bħala argumenti, spiss jidhru fir-reviżjonijiet tal-prodotti, u aħna nistipotizzaw li xi karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-argumenti, pereżempju l-perċentwal ta’ sentenzi argumentattivi, il-proporzjonijiet evidenza-konklużjonijiet, huma indikaturi tajbin ta’ reviżjonijiet utli. Biex tivvalida din l-ipoteżi, aħna nnutaw b’mod manwali l-argumenti f’110 reviżjoni tal-lukandi, u ninvestigaw l-effettività ta’ diversi kombinazzjonijiet ta’ karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-argumenti. Experiments suggest that, when being used together with the argument-based features, the state-of-the-art baseline features can enjoy a performance boost (in terms of F1) of 11.01% in average.', 'mn': 'Бид энэ цаасан дээрх тодорхойлолтын асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид баталгааны дараагийн харилцааны харилцаа, мөн аргумент гэж нэрлэдэг, ихэвчлэн бүтээгдэхүүний шинжилгээнд харагдаж байна. Бид зарим аргументын үндсэн харилцаа, жишээ нь аргументын өгүүлбөрийн хувь, харилцааны дарааллын харилцаа, тусламжтай шинжилгээний сайн харилцаа гэж боддог. Энэ утгыг шалгахын тулд бид 110 отелейн шалгалтын аргументуудыг гараар анзаарч, аргумент дээр суурилсан олон зүйлийн үр дүнг судалж байна. Түүнчлэл аргументын үндсэн дүрсийг ашиглах үед урлагийн үндсэн дүрсийн дүрсийг дундаж 11.01%-аар ашиглах боломжтой гэж үздэг.', 'no': 'Vi studerer den hjelpelige produkten gjennom identifiseringsproblemet i denne papiret. Vi observerer at diskusjonane med beviser-konklusjon, også kjent som argumenter, ofte dukkar opp i produktrevisjonar, og vi hypotiserer at nokre argument-baserte funksjonar, f.eks. prosentdel av argumentativ setningar, forholdet med evident-konklusjonar, er gode indikatorer av hjelpegjennomgang. For å validera denne hipotesen, blir vi manuelt annoterar argumenter i 110 hotelreviewer, og undersøker effektiviteten av fleire kombinasjonar av argumentbaserte funksjonar. Eksperimentar tyder på at når det vert brukt saman med argumentbaserte funksjonane, kunsten-baserte funksjonane kan gjennomsnittlig bruka ein utviklingstyrke (under F1) på 11,01 % i gjennomsnittlig.', 'pl': 'Badamy pomocny problem identyfikacji recenzji produktów w niniejszym artykule. Obserwujemy, że relacje dyskursowe dowody-konkluzje, znane również jako argumenty, często pojawiają się w recenzjach produktów i hipotezujemy, że niektóre cechy oparte na argumentach, np. procent zdań argumentatywnych, wskaźnik dowodów-wniosków, są dobrymi wskaźnikami pomocnych recenzji. Aby zweryfikować tę hipotezę, ręcznie anomentujemy argumenty w 110 recenzjach hotelowych i badamy skuteczność kilku kombinacji funkcji opartych na argumentach. Eksperymenty sugerują, że podczas stosowania w połączeniu z funkcjami opartymi na argumentach, najnowocześniejsze funkcje bazowe mogą cieszyć się zwiększeniem wydajności (pod względem F1) średnio 11,01% .', 'ro': 'Studiem problema de identificare a recenziilor utile ale produselor în această lucrare. Observăm că relațiile discursului evidență-concluzie, cunoscute și sub numele de argumente, apar adesea în recenziile produselor și presupunem că unele caracteristici bazate pe argumente, cum ar fi procentul propozițiilor argumentative, raportul dovezi-concluzii, sunt indicatori buni ai recenziilor utile. Pentru a valida această ipoteză, adnotăm manual argumentele în 110 recenzii hoteliere și investigăm eficacitatea mai multor combinații de caracteristici bazate pe argumente. Experimentele sugerează că, atunci când sunt utilizate împreună cu caracteristicile bazate pe argumente, caracteristicile de bază de ultimă generație se pot bucura de o creștere a performanței (în termeni de F1) de 11,01% în medie.', 'si': 'අපි මේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් උදව් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙන්නෙ සාක්ෂික-සංකේතන කතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක්, සමහර විදිහට පෙනෙනවා ප්\u200dරදේශ පරීක්ෂණය, සමහර විදිහට අපි හිතාවෙන්නේ සමහර විදිහට සම්බන්ධතාව මේ අභිවාදයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි හෝටල් 110 පරීක්ෂණයේදී ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක අධිරූපයේ  පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත විශේෂතාවක් සමඟ භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ස්ථානය-අධාරිත ව', 'so': 'Waxaan warqaddan ka baranaynaa dhibaatada aqoonsiga ee alaabta caawinta ah. Waxaynu fiirinaynaa in xiriirka arrimaha dhamaadka, kaas oo loo yaqaan muran, marar badan waxaa ka muuqata baaritaanka midhaha, waxaynu u malaynaynaa in qaar ka mid ah waxyaabaha ku saabsan arrimaha ka dooda, tusaale ahaan boqolkiiba xiriirka arrimaha, qiimaha heshiiska, waa waxyaabaha wanaagsan e e kaalmeeya baaritaanka. Si aan u xaqiijino fikirkan, waxaynu si rasmi ah ugu baaraandegaa warqadaha hoteelka 110, waxaana baaritaannaa waxyaabaha ku saabsan kooxo kala duduwan waxyaabaha ku saabsan hadalka. Imtixaanka waxaa loola jeedaa in marka lagu isticmaalo iskuul xiriir ku saleysan arrimaha qoraalka ah ee dowladda farshaxanku waxay ku raadsan karaan koritaanka firaaqada (xiliga F1) qiyaastii 11.01 boqolkiiba.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo pomoćni proizvod da pregleda problem identifikacije u ovom papiru. Primišljamo da su veze sa dokazima i zaključavanjem, takođe poznate kao argumenti, često se pojavljuju u pregledima proizvoda, i pretpostavljamo da su neke karakteristike na temelju argumentativnih rečenica, npr. procenat argumentativnih rečenica, procenata dokaza i zaključavanja, dobri indikatori korisnih pregledi. Da bismo potvrdili ovu hipotezu, manuelno annotirali argumente u 110 hotelskih pregleda i istražili efikasnost nekoliko kombinacija karakteristika na temelju argumenta. Eksperimenti sugeriraju da, kada se koriste zajedno sa karakteristikama na temelju argument a, osnovne karakteristike umjetnosti mogu uživati u prosjeku povećanje učinka (u smislu F1) od 11,01%.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar de användbara produktrecensioner identifieringsproblemet i detta dokument. Vi observerar att evidens-slutsats diskursrelationerna, även kallade argument, ofta förekommer i produktrecensioner, och vi hypoteser att vissa argumentbaserade egenskaper, t.ex. procentandelen argumenterande meningar, evidens-slutsatser-förhållandet, är bra indikatorer på användbara recensioner. För att validera denna hypotes kommenterar vi argument manuellt i 110 hotellrecensioner och undersöker effektiviteten av flera kombinationer av argumentbaserade funktioner. Experiment tyder på att när de används tillsammans med argumentbaserade funktionerna kan de senaste baslinjefunktionerna åtnjuta en prestandaförbättring (i form av F1) på 11,01% i genomsnitt.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் கண்டுபிடிப்பு பிரச்சனையை நாம் உதவியுள்ள பொருளை படிக்கிறோம். நாங்கள் பார்க்கிறோம் அத்தாட்சி முடிவு பேச்சு தொடர்புகள், வார்த்தைகள் என்றும் அறியப்படும், பெரும்பாலாக பொருள் முடிவுகளில் தெரியும், சில வார்த்தைகளின் விகிதம், தெள To validate this hypothesis, we manually annotate arguments in 110 hotel reviews, and investigate the effectiveness of several combinations of argument-based features.  பரிசோதனைகள் தெரிவிக்கிறது, வார்ப்பு அடிப்படையில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட குணங்களுடன் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் போது, நிலை- கலை அடிப்படையின் குணங்கள் சராசரியான 11. 01%', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں مددگار محصولات کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ دلیل کے نتیجے کے معاملات کی نسبت، معاملات کے ساتھ بھی معلوم ہوتے ہیں، اکثر محصولات کی رسانیوں میں ظاہر ہوتے ہیں، اور ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ بعض دلیل کے متعلق معاملات کی نسبت، مثال دلیل کے فیصد، معلومات کے نتیجے کی نسبت، بہترین رسانیوں کی نشانیاں ہیں. ہم 110 ہٹل روئیزوں میں مجموعہ کریں گے اور بہت سی مجموعہ کی تعلیمات کے مطابق تحقیق کریں گے۔ آزمائش کی توصیف کرتی ہے کہ جب ارتباط پر بنیاد ہونے کے ساتھ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، آرت کی بنیاد لین کے متعلق 11.01% کی عملکرد کے اضافہ سے فائدہ حاصل کر سکتے ہیں.', 'mk': 'Ги проучуваме корисните производи за преглед на идентификацискиот проблем во овој весник. Ние забележуваме дека дискурсните односи докази-заклучоци, познати како аргументи, честопати се појавуваат во прегледот на производите, и ние хипотезираме дека некои карактеристики базирани на аргументи, како што е процентот на аргументативните реченици, процентот на докази-заклучоци, се добри индикатори на кор To validate this hypothesis, we manually annotate arguments in 110 hotel reviews, and investigate the effectiveness of several combinations of argument-based features.  Експериментите покажуваат дека, кога се користат заедно со карактеристиките базирани на аргументи, најновите основни карактеристики можат да уживаат во процентот зголемување на перформансата (во поглед на Ф1) од 11,01 отсто.', 'uz': "Biz yordam produktini bu qogʻozdagi identification muammolarini o'rganamiz. Biz murakkab talabatlarni ko'rib chiqqamiz, qismlar deb nomlanishi mumkin, ko'pincha produktlar tahrirlarida ko'rinadi va biz bir qiymatlar asosiy imkoniyatlar, masalan argumentlar foizlarining foiz, murakkab qilish qiymatlarining foydalanishi haqida yaxshi indikaslaridir. Bu hypothesis haqiqiyligini tekshirish uchun 110 hotel davomida argumentlarni qoʻlbola tahlil qilamiz, va bir necha bir qismlarning tashkilotlari imkoniyatlarining effektini aniqlamiz. Tajribalar bilan argumentlar bilan birga ishlatilganda, xossa asosiy sonlar xossalari oddiy soʻzni 11.01% dan foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề xác định hàng hóa có ích trong tờ giấy này. Chúng tôi quan sát rằng các quan hệ về kết luận bằng chứng, cũng được g ọi là lý luận, thường xuất hiện trong các bài bình luận hàng hóa, và chúng tôi giả thiết rằng một số tính năng dựa trên lập luận, ví dụ như tỉ lệ các lời khai, tỉ số bằng chứng và kết luận, là những dấu hiệu tốt của những bài bình luận hữu ích. Để xác nhận giả thuyết này, chúng tôi sẽ ghi âm bằng tay trong bài kiểm tra khách sạn 110, và điều tra tính hiệu quả của một số kết hợp các tính năng lập luận. Các thử nghiệm cho thấy, khi được sử dụng cùng với các tính năng dựa trên các lập luận, các tính năng cơ bản thời đại có thể tăng cường hiệu suất (theo dạng F1) của 11.04. trên trung bình.', 'bg': 'Проучваме проблема с идентифицирането на полезните прегледи на продуктите в тази статия. Наблюдаваме, че дискурсните отношения доказателство-заключение, известни още като аргументи, често се появяват в продуктовите прегледи и хипотезираме, че някои аргументирани характеристики, например процентът на аргументативните изречения, съотношението доказателства-заключения, са добри показатели за полезни прегледи. За да потвърдим тази хипотеза, ръчно анотираме аргументи в 110 хотелски прегледа и изследваме ефективността на няколко комбинации от аргументирани функции. Експериментите показват, че когато се използват заедно с функциите, базирани на аргументи, най-съвременните базови функции могат да се радват на повишение на производителността (по отношение на Формула 1) средно от 11,01%.', 'da': 'Vi studerer de nyttige produktanmeldelser identifikationsproblem i dette papir. Vi observerer, at evidens-konklusion diskursrelationerne, også kendt som argumenter, ofte optræder i produktanmeldelser, og vi antager, at nogle argumentbaserede træk, f.eks. procentdelen af argumenterende sætninger, evidens-konklusion ratio, er gode indikatorer for nyttige anmeldelser. For at validere denne hypotese noterer vi manuelt argumenter i 110 hotelanmeldelser og undersøger effektiviteten af flere kombinationer af argumentbaserede funktioner. Eksperimenter tyder på, at når de bruges sammen med argumentbaserede funktioner, kan de avancerede basisfunktioner nyde et ydelsesforøgelse (i form af F1) på 11,01% i gennemsnit.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo pomoćni proizvod pregleda problem identifikacije u ovom papiru. Primjećujemo da se odnosi o zaključavanju dokaza, također poznati kao argumenti, često pojavljuju u pregledima proizvoda, i pretpostavljamo da su neke karakteristike na temelju argumentativnih rečenica, npr. procenat argumentativnih rečenica, procenata dokaza i zaključaka, dobri pokazivači korisnih pregledi. Da bismo potvrdili ovu hipotezu, manuelno annotirali argumente u 110 hotelskih pregledi i istražili učinkovitost nekoliko kombinacija karakteristika na temelju argumenta. Eksperimenti sugeriraju da, kada se koriste zajedno s karakteristikama na temelju argument a, početne karakteristike umjetnosti mogu imati povećanje učinka (u smislu F1) od 11,01% u prosjeku.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die hilfreichen Produktbewertungen Identifikationsprobleme in diesem Papier. Wir beobachten, dass die Evidenz-Schlussfolgerungs-Diskursbeziehungen, auch Argumente genannt, häufig in Produktbewertungen auftauchen, und wir vermuten, dass einige argumentbasierte Merkmale, wie z.B. der Prozentsatz argumentativer Sätze, die Evidenz-Schlussfolgerungs-Verhältnisse, gute Indikatoren für hilfreiche Reviews sind. Um diese Hypothese zu validieren, kommentieren wir Argumente manuell in 110-Hotelbewertungen und untersuchen die Wirksamkeit mehrerer Kombinationen argumentbasierter Merkmale. Experimente deuten darauf hin, dass die hochmodernen Baseline-Features, wenn sie zusammen mit den argumentbasierten Features verwendet werden, eine Leistungssteigerung (in Bezug auf F1) von durchschnittlich 11,01% genießen können.', 'nl': "We bestuderen het nuttige identificatieprobleem van productbeoordelingen in dit artikel. We constateren dat de evidence-conclusion discours relations, ook wel argumenten genoemd, vaak voorkomen in productreviews, en we veronderstellen dat sommige argumentgebaseerde kenmerken, zoals het percentage argumentatieve zinnen, de evidence-conclusion ratio's, goede indicatoren zijn van nuttige reviews. Om deze hypothese te valideren, maken we handmatig aantekeningen in 110 hotelbeoordelingen en onderzoeken we de effectiviteit van verschillende combinaties van argumentgebaseerde functies. Experimenten suggereren dat de state-of-the-art basislijnfuncties, wanneer ze samen met de argumentgebaseerde functies worden gebruikt, gemiddeld een prestatieboost (in termen van F1) van 11,01% kunnen genieten.", 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah pengenalan produk yang berguna di koran ini. Kami memperhatikan bahwa hubungan diskors bukti-kesimpulan, juga dikenal sebagai argumen, sering muncul dalam penelitian produk, dan kami hipotesis bahwa beberapa fitur berdasarkan argumen, misalnya persentase kalimat argumensif, nisbah bukti-kesimpulan, adalah indikator yang baik dari penelitian berguna. Untuk mengkvalifikasi hipotesis ini, kami secara manual menganoterasi argumen dalam 110 resensi hotel, dan menyelidiki efektif beberapa kombinasi karakteristik berdasarkan argumen. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa, ketika digunakan bersama dengan ciri-ciri berdasarkan argumen, ciri-ciri dasar state-of-the-art dapat menikmati peningkatan prestasi (dalam termasuk F1) dari 11,01% rata-rata.', 'ko': '본고는 유용한 제품 평론 식별 문제를 연구하였다.우리가 관찰한 바에 의하면 증거-결론-말관계는 논점이라고도 하는데 제품 평론에 자주 나타난다. 우리는 논점을 바탕으로 하는 특징, 예를 들어 변론문의 백분율, 증거-결론비율을 가정하면 평론에 유용한 좋은 지표이다.이 가설을 검증하기 위해 우리는 110편의 호텔 평론에서 수동으로 논점을 주석하고 논점을 바탕으로 하는 특징 조합의 유효성을 연구했다.실험에 따르면 파라미터 기반 기능과 함께 사용할 때 가장 선진적인 기선 기능은 평균 11.01%의 성능 향상을 누릴 수 있다(F1의 경우).', 'tr': 'Biz bu häzirki ýagdaýda kömek eden täsir meseläni çykarýarys. Biz özümiz kanun-çykyş çykyş g ürrüňlerini, özümiz taryşmalar diýip bilinýän, köplenç önüm çykyşlarynda görünýär, we özümiz argumentyň käbir möhümlerini, mysal bolan sözlerin procenti, çykyşlaryň netijesi, kömek eden çykyşlaryň gowy görkezmeleri diýip pikir edýäris. Bu höwesi takyklamak üçin, 110 hotel derjesinde argymlary elimizden duýdurýarys we argumentleriň birnäçe birleşişmeleriniň täsirini barlaýarys. Denminatlar argüment tabanly özellikler bilen birlikte ullanýanda sungat çykyşlaryň durumynda ortalama 11', 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë problem in e identifikimit të prodhimit të dobishëm në këtë letër. Ne vëzhgojmë se marrëdhëniet diskursore prova-përfundimi, të njohur gjithashtu si argument e, shpesh shfaqen në shqyrtimet e prodhimeve dhe hipotezimet se disa karakteristika bazuar në argumente, për shembull përqindja e fjalëve argumentuese, përqindja e provave-përfundimeve, janë tregues të mirë të shqyrtimeve të dobishme. Për të vlerësuar këtë hipotezë, ne me dorë anotojmë argumentet në 110 shqyrtime të hotelit dhe hetojmë efektshmërinë e disa kombinimeve të karakteristikave të bazuara në argumente. Eksperimentet sugjerojnë se kur përdoren së bashku me karakteristikat bazuar në argumente, karakteristikat bazë më të larta mund të gëzojnë një rritje performance (në terma të F1) prej 11.01% në mesatare.', 'sw': 'Tunafundisha bidhaa inayosaidia kutazama tatizo la kutambua katika gazeti hili. Tunaona kuwa mazungumzo ya mahusiano ya hitimisho, yanayojulikana pia kama hoja, mara nyingi huonekana kwenye mtazamo wa bidhaa, na tunadhani kuwa baadhi ya vipengele vya hoja, kwa mfano asilimia ya hukumu za hoja, ratiba ya hitimisho, ni ishara nzuri ya kusaidia tafiti. Ili kuthibitisha nadharia hii, tunaelezea hoja kwa mikononi katika tafiti ya hoteli 110, na kuchunguza ufanisi wa miungano kadhaa ya vipengele vya hoja. Majaribio yanapendekeza kuwa, wakati wanatumiwa pamoja na vipengele vya hoja, vipengele vya hali ya msingi vya sanaa vinaweza kufurahia ukuaji wa utendaji (kwa kiwango cha F1) wa asilimia 11.01 kwa wastani.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die helpbare produksie hersien identifikasie probleem in hierdie papier. Ons aanhou dat die getuienis-konklusie diskursie relasies, ook bekend as argument e, dikwels verskyn in produktoorskoue, en ons hipotesis dat sommige argumentatiewe funksies, bv. die persentasie van argumentatiewe setinge, die getuienisse-konklusieverhoudings, goeie indikators van hulpbrukbare hersienings is. Om hierdie hipotesis te bevestig, moet ons handmatig argumente in 110 hoteloorskoue aanspoor en die effektiviteit van verskeie kombinasies van argument-gebaseerde funksies ondersoek. Eksperimente voorstel dat wanneer saam met die argument-gebaseerde funksies gebruik word, kan die state-of-the-art baseline funksies 'n prestasie booster (in terms of F1) van 11.01% in gemiddelde hê.", 'az': 'Biz bu kağızda faydalı proqramın kimlik problemini incidir. Biz həmçin in dəlillərin sonuna g ələn müzakirələrin, həmçinin argumentlər kimi də tanındıqları müzakirələr, çox zaman ürəklərin müzakirələrində görünür və bəzi argumenti təsdiqləyici cümlələrin procenti, təsdiqlərin nəticəsi, faydalı təsdiqlərin yaxşı göstəricisidir. Bu hipotezi təsdiqləmək üçün 110 otel tərzlərində arqumları təsdiqləyirik və bir neçə arqument-tabanlı fəaliyyətlərin etkinliğini təsdiqləyirik. Həqiqətən, təcrübələr argumenti tərəfindən istifadə edildiyi təcrübələrin təcrübəsi təcrübələrinin ortalaması 11,01%-dən istifadə edə bilər.', 'am': 'የረቂቃውን የፍትወት ጉዳይ በዚህ ገጽ ላይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የአስረጅ ግንኙነት እና አጋራጆች እንደተታወቀው እናስባለን፣ ብዙ ጊዜም የፍሬት ግንኙነት እንዲታይ እናስባለን፣ አንዳንዶችም የአውራይነት ግንኙነት፣ የመረጃ ግንኙነት፣ ማስረጃ ግንኙነት የሚጠቅመው ጥያቄዎች ናቸው ብለን እናስባለን፡፡ ይህንን hypothesis ለማረጋገጥ በ110 ሄቴል ግንኙነቶችን እናሳውቃለን፣ እናም የአካላት ግንኙነቶችን ለመጠየቅ እና የአካላት ግንኙነት አካባቢዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች በተጨማሪው አካባቢ በተጠቀም ጊዜ የ-የ-የ-አርእስት መደገፊያ የአድራሻ ደረጃ አካባቢ (F1) በመተካከለኛ 11.01 በመቶ ይደሰታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք օգտակար արտադրանքի վերանայման խնդիրը այս թղթի մեջ: Մենք նկատում ենք, որ ապացույցների և եզրակացությունների խոսակցական հարաբերությունները, որոնք նաև հայտնի են որպես բանավեճեր, հաճախ հայտնվում են արտադրանքի վերանայման մեջ, և ենթադրում ենք, որ որոշ բանավեճերի հիմքում հիմնված հատկություններ, օրինակ բանավեճերի տոկոսը, ապացույցների և եզրակա Այս հիպոթեզը ստուգելու համար մենք ձեռքով գրում ենք բանավեճերը 110 հյուրանոցի վերլուծություններում և ուսումնասիրում ենք բանավեճի հիմնված հատկությունների մի քանի համակցությունների արդյունավետությունը: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ երբ օգտագործվում են միասին բանավեճի հիմնական հատկանիշների հետ, ամենաբարձր հիմնական հատկանիշները կարող են ունենալ արդյունավետության բարձրացում (F1-ի տեսանկյունից) միջինում 11.01 տոկոսով:', 'bn': 'আমরা সাহায্য প্রযুক্তির পরিচিতির সমস্যা পড়ি। আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে প্রমাণ সমাপ্তি যুক্তি হিসেবে পরিচিত, প্রায়শই পণ্য পর্যবেক্ষণে দেখা যায়, আর আমরা মনে করি যে কিছু যুক্তিভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্য, যেমন যু এই হাইপাইটসিসের বৈধ করার জন্য আমরা ১১০ হোটেল পর্যবেক্ষণে যুক্তি ব্যাখ্যা করি এবং বেশ কয়েকটি যুক্তি ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের কার্যক্ পরীক্ষাগুলো পরামর্শ দেয় যে, যখন যুক্তিভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে ব্যবহার করা হয়, তখন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বেসালাইনের বৈশিষ্ট্য গড়ে ১১. 01% বৃদ্ধ', 'bs': 'Proučavamo pomoćni proizvod da pregleda problem identifikacije u ovom papiru. Primijetimo da su odnosi o zaključavanju dokaza, također poznati kao argumenti, često se pojavljuju u pregledima proizvoda, i pretpostavljamo da su neke karakteristike na temelju argumentativnih rečenica, npr. procenat argumentativnih rečenica, procenata dokaza i zaključaka, dobri indikatori pomoćnih pregledi. Da bismo potvrdili ovu hipotezu, manuelno annotirali argumente u 110 hotelskih pregleda i istražili učinkovitost nekoliko kombinacija karakteristika na temelju argumenta. Eksperimenti sugeriraju da, kada se koriste zajedno sa karakteristikama na temelju argument a, početne karakteristike umjetnosti mogu imati povećanje učinka (u smislu F1) od 11,01% u prosjeku.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku studujeme užitečný problém identifikace recenzí produktů. Pozorujeme, že diskurzní vztahy důkazů a závěrů, známé také jako argumenty, se často objevují v recenzích produktů a hypotézujeme, že některé argumenty založené na vlastnostech, např. procento argumentativních vět, poměry důkazů a závěrů, jsou dobrými ukazateli užitečných recenzí. Pro ověření této hypotézy ručně anotujeme argumenty v 110 hotelových recenzích a zkoumáme efektivitu několika kombinací argumentů založených na argumentech. Experimenty naznačují, že pokud jsou použity společně s funkcemi založenými na argumentech, mohou nejmodernější funkce základního základního plánu využít zvýšení výkonu (z hlediska F1) v průměru 11,01% .', 'fa': 'ما در این کاغذ مشکل شناسایی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که رابطه\u200cهای مدرک و نتیجه\u200cی شواهد، همچنین به عنوان حجت شناخته می\u200cشوند، اغلب در تحقیقات محصولات ظاهر می\u200cشوند، و ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که بعضی ویژه\u200cهای بر اساس حجت، مثال درصد جمله\u200cهای حجت\u200cکننده، مقدار نتیجه\u200cهای ثابت\u200cکننده، نشان\u200cده برای تایید کردن این فرضیه، ما در ۱۱۰ امتحان هتل با دستی ارائه می\u200cکنیم و تحقیق فعالیت تعدادی از ترکیب\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای بر اساس حجت\u200cها را انجام می\u200cدهیم. تجربه\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که هنگامی که با ویژه\u200cهای متعلق به حجت استفاده می\u200cشود، ویژه\u200cهای بنیادی هنر می\u200cتوانند از افزایش عملکرد (به عنوان F1) در متوسط ۱۱.۰۱ درصد لذت ببرند.', 'et': 'Me uurime kasulikke tooteülevaateid identifitseerimise probleemi selles artiklis. Me täheldame, et tõendite-järelduste diskursussuhted, mida tuntakse ka argumentidena, esinevad sageli tooteülevaates ning oletame, et mõned argumentidel põhinevad omadused, nt argumentide lausete protsent, tõendite-järelduste suhe, on head kasulike ülevaatete näitajad. Selle hüpoteesi kinnitamiseks märgistame käsitsi argumente 110 hotelliarvustuses ja uurime argumentidel põhinevate funktsioonide mitme kombinatsiooni efektiivsust. Eksperimentid näitavad, et kui neid kasutatakse koos argumentidel põhinevate funktsioonidega, võivad tipptasemel algfunktsioonid saavutada jõudluse tõusu (F1 osas) keskmiselt 11,01%.', 'ca': "Estudem el problema d'identificació d'un producte útil en aquest article. Observem que les relacions de discurs evident-conclusió, també conegudes com arguments, sovint apareixen en revisions de productes, i hipòtesim que algunes característiques basades en arguments, per exemple el percentatge de frases argumentatives, les proporcions evident-conclusió, són bons indicadors de revisions útils. Per validar aquesta hipòtesi, anotem manualment arguments en 110 revisions d'hotel i investigam l'eficacia de diverses combinacions de característiques basades en arguments. Els experiments suggereixen que, quan s'utilitzen juntament amb les característiques basades en arguments, les característiques basales més avançades poden gaudir d'un augment de rendiment (en termes de F1) d'un 11,01% en mitjana.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme tässä artikkelissa hyödyllisten tuotekatsausten tunnistusongelmaa. Havaitsemme, että todisteiden ja johtopäätösten diskurssisuhteet, jotka tunnetaan myös argumentteina, esiintyvät usein tuotearvioinneissa, ja otaksumme, että jotkin argumentteihin perustuvat ominaisuudet, kuten argumentoivien lauseiden prosenttiosuus, todisteiden ja johtopäätösten suhde, ovat hyviä indikaattoreita hyödyllisistä arvosteluista. Tämän hypoteesin validoimiseksi kommentoimme argumentteja manuaalisesti 110 hotelliarvostelussa ja tutkimme useiden argumentteihin perustuvien ominaisuuksien yhdistelmän tehokkuutta. Kokeet viittaavat siihen, että kun niitä käytetään yhdessä argumentteihin perustuvien ominaisuuksien kanssa, huippuluokan perusominaisuuksien suorituskyky paranee keskimäärin 11,01 prosenttia (F1:n suhteen).', 'sk': 'V tem članku preučujemo koristne preglede izdelkov identifikacijske težave. Ugotavljamo, da se diskurzna razmerja med dokazi in zaključki, znana tudi kot argumenti, pogosto pojavljajo v pregledih izdelkov, in hipotetiziramo, da so nekatere argumenti temelječe lastnosti, npr. odstotek argumentativnih stavkov, razmerje med dokazi in zaključki, dobri kazalniki koristnih pregledov. Za potrditev te hipoteze ročno navedemo argumente v 110 hotelskih pregledih in raziskujemo učinkovitost več kombinacij argumentov temelječih funkcij. Poskusi kažejo, da se lahko najsodobnejše osnovne funkcije, če se uporabljajo skupaj s funkcijami, ki temeljijo na argumentih, povprečno poveča zmogljivost (v smislu F1) za 11,01%.', 'ha': "Munã karatun abun da ke amfani da matsayin bayani cikin wannan takarda. Tuna ganin kuwa mazaɓa da mazaɓa da bayani, da kuma aka sani kamar jãyayya, ko da yawa za su iya cikin karatun mafarinta, kuma muna yi zaton, ko misali, fomat masu da baka-rubutu, da fassarar maganar murammani, da rabon fassarar da fassarar bayani, sune shiryoyin ayukan mataimaki da ke amfani. To, in gaskata wannan zato, muna buga bayani da hannayen hotel guda 110, kuma munã ƙidãya masu amfani da wasu komai na danganta masu husũma. Cijarakin yana son, idan an yi amfani da shi da wasu fasafai masu banga argument, halin-rubutun-art-za'a iya ci da rabo ga gyaranta (da aka raba F1) da kuma a tsakanin 11.01%.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasah luwih nggawe barang-luwih kanggo ngerasah seneng pisan iki. Awak dhéwé éntukno karégané perusahaan-conclusun ngéwé, mengko iso dianggawe karégané perusahaan winih, lan kéné sumusun karégané perusahaan karégané argument-basa, p.esb. saké perusahaan karéganéh sing dibutuhé, ngéntukno-conclusun ratios, lan uwong sing beraksi luwih dumadhi. Ngawe Perintah hal-hal ngerti apakno iki, awake dhéwé manut manut neng pulan sing beraksi kapan kotak tentang, lan ujian akeh efekat karo akeh sampek karo perusahaan sing isiné karo argument-basa. Name', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את בעיית זיהוי המוצרים המיועילות בעיתון הזה. אנו שומרים על כך שמערכות הדיור הראיות-מסקנות, הידועות גם בתור טיעונים, מופיעות לעתים קרובות בבדיקות מוצרים, ואנחנו מניחים שמספר תכונות מבוססות על טיעונים, למשל אחוז משפטים טוענים, יחסי הראיות-מסקנות, הם מדריכים טובים לבדיקות מועילות. כדי לאשר את ההיפתוזה הזאת, אנו מציינים בידיים טיעונים ב-110 ביקורות מלון, וחקירים את היעילות של מספר שילובים של תכונות מבוססים על טיעונים. ניסויים מציעים שכאשר משתמשים ביחד עם המאפיינים המבוססים על הטיעונים, המאפיינים הבסיסיים המאוחרים ביותר יכולים ליהנות מגבירת ביצועים (במונחים של F1) של 11.01% בממוצע.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་ཆེན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད We observe that the evidence-conclusion discourse relations, also known as arguments, often appear in product reviews, and we hypothesise that some argument-based features, e.g. the percentage of argumentative sentences, the evidences-conclusions ratios, are good indicators of helpful reviews. The examples are good indicators of helpful reviews. To validate this hypothesis, we manually annotate arguments in 110 hotel reviews, and investigate the effectiveness of several combinations of argument-based features. Experiments suggest that when being used together with the argument-based features, the state-of-the-art baseline features can enjoy a performance boost (in terms of F1) of 11.01% in average.'}
{'en': 'Here’s My Point : Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'es': 'Este es mi punto: arquitectura conjunta de punteros para la minería de argumentos', 'ar': 'ها هي وجهة نظري: بنية المؤشر المشتركة لتعدين الحجج', 'fr': "Voici mon point de vue\xa0: Architecture de pointeur conjointe pour l'exploration d'arguments", 'pt': 'Aqui está o meu ponto: arquitetura de ponteiro conjunto para mineração de argumentos', 'ja': 'ポイントはこちら：論点マイニングのためのジョイントポインタアーキテクチャ', 'hi': 'यहाँ मेरी बात है: तर्क खनन के लिए संयुक्त सूचक वास्तुकला', 'zh': '余论:以参数掘合指针架构', 'ru': 'Вот моя точка зрения: совместная архитектура указателей для майнинга аргументов', 'ga': 'Seo Mo Phointe: Ailtireacht Chomhthreomhara do Mhianadóireacht Argóint', 'ka': 'აქ ჩემი წერტილი: ერთადერთი პონტერს აქტიქტურა აპდუმენტის მინდომისთვის', 'hu': 'Itt van a pontom: Közös mutató architektúra az argumentbányászathoz', 'el': 'Εδώ είναι το επιχείρημά μου: Αρχιτεκτονική Κοινού Δείκτη για την εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων', 'it': 'Ecco il mio punto: Joint Pointer Architecture per Argument Mining', 'mk': 'Еве ја мојата поента: Архитектура на заеднички точки за рудање аргументи', 'lt': 'Štai mano pastaba: Argument ų kasybos jungtinė taškų architektūra', 'kk': 'Мұнда Менің нүктесім: Аргументтік балау үшін біріктірілген меңзер архитектурасы', 'ms': 'Inilah titik saya: Arkitektur Pointer Perkongsian untuk Mencari Argumen', 'mn': 'Энд миний цэг байна: Аргументийн салбарын холбоотой загварын архитектур', 'ml': 'ഇതാ എന്\u200dറെ പോയിന്റ്: ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് മൈനിംഗിന് യൂണ്ട് പോയിന്റര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കെക്റ്റര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Hawn huwa l-Punt tiegħi: Arkitettura Konġunta tal-Puntaturi għall-Minjieri tal-Argumenti', 'no': 'Her er min punkt: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'pl': 'Oto mój punkt: Architektura wskaźnika Joint Pointer dla górnictwa argumentów', 'ro': 'Iată punctul meu de vedere: arhitectura comună a indicatorului pentru mineritul Argumentelor', 'sr': 'Evo moje tačke: zajednička arhitektura pokazatelja za rudarstvo argumenta', 'si': 'මෙන්න මගේ පින්තූර: සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාපනය වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාපනය', 'so': 'Halkan waa Point My: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'sv': 'Här är min poäng: Joint Pointer Architecture för Argument Mining', 'ta': 'இங்கே என் புள்ளி', 'ur': "Here's my Point: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining", 'vi': 'Điểm của tôi đây: Đồng kiến trúc Pointer for Argument Mining.', 'uz': 'Bu mening nuqtim: Argumentning qiymatiga birlashtirish', 'bg': 'Ето какво искам да кажа: Съвместна архитектура за аргументно минно дело', 'hr': 'Evo moje točke: zajednička arhitektura pokazatelja za rudarstvo argumenta', 'nl': 'Hier is mijn punt: Joint Pointer Architecture voor Argument Mining', 'da': 'Her er min pointe: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'de': 'Hier ist mein Punkt: Joint Pointer Architecture für Argument Mining', 'id': "Here's My Point: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining", 'ko': '나의 관점은 매개 변수 발굴에 사용되는 연합 지침 체계 구조이다', 'fa': 'این نقطه من است: معماری مشترک برای آرژومند', 'tr': 'Bu ýerde meniň nokadym: Argument Köçürmek üçin Koplaýyn Belirteç arhitegi', 'sq': 'Ja ku është pika ime: Arkitektura e Punëtorëve të Përbashkët për Minierën Argumente', 'af': 'Hier is My Punt: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'sw': "Here's My Point: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining", 'am': 'እዚህ አዲስ ነጥብ', 'az': 'İşte mənim nöqtəm: Argument Mining üçün Joint Pointer Architecture', 'bn': 'এখানে আমার পয়েন্ট: আর্গুমেন্ট মাইনিং এর জন্য যুক্ত পয়েন্টার আর্কিটেক্টার', 'ca': 'Aquí teniu el meu punt: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'cs': 'Tady je můj bod: Architektura společného ukazatele pro těžbu argumentů', 'et': 'Siin on minu mõte: Argumentide kaevandamise ühine punktide arhitektuur', 'hy': 'Ահա Իմ կետը. Ահա Արվեստական հանքարդյունահանման միավոր կետերի կառուցվածքը', 'bs': 'Evo moje tačke: zajednička arhitektura pokazatelja za rudarstvo argumenta', 'fi': 'Tässä on pointtini: Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'jv': 'Punt here My Point: Joint Point architecture for argument Minng', 'he': 'הנה הנקודה שלי:', 'sk': 'Tukaj je moje stališče: Skupna arhitektura kazalcev za rudarjenje argumentov', 'ha': '@ action: inmenu Join Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining', 'bo': 'འདི་ནི་ངའི་ཆ་ཚང：Joint Pointer Architecture for Argument Mining'}
{'en': 'In order to determine argument structure in text, one must understand how individual components of the overall argument are linked. This work presents the first neural network-based approach to link extraction in argument mining. Specifically, we propose a novel architecture that applies Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence attention modeling to structural prediction in discourse parsing tasks. We then develop a joint model that extends this architecture to simultaneously address the link extraction task and the classification of argument components. The proposed joint model achieves state-of-the-art results on two separate evaluation corpora, showing far superior performance than the previously proposed corpus-specific and heavily feature-engineered models. Furthermore, our results demonstrate that jointly optimizing for both tasks is crucial for high performance.', 'ar': 'من أجل تحديد هيكل الحجة في النص ، يجب على المرء أن يفهم كيف ترتبط المكونات الفردية للحجة الكلية. يقدم هذا العمل أول نهج قائم على الشبكة العصبية لربط الاستخراج في تعدين الحجج. على وجه التحديد ، نقترح بنية جديدة تطبق نمذجة الانتباه من تسلسل إلى تسلسل لشبكة المؤشر على التنبؤ الهيكلي في مهام تحليل الخطاب. نقوم بعد ذلك بتطوير نموذج مشترك يوسع هذه البنية لمعالجة مهمة استخراج الارتباط وتصنيف مكونات الوسيطة في وقت واحد. يحقق النموذج المشترك المقترح نتائج متطورة على مجموعتين منفصلتين للتقييم ، مما يُظهر أداءً أفضل بكثير من النماذج المُقترحة سابقًا والمخصصة للمجموعة والمميزة بشكل كبير. علاوة على ذلك ، توضح نتائجنا أن التحسين المشترك لكلتا المهمتين أمر بالغ الأهمية لتحقيق الأداء العالي.', 'fr': "Afin de déterminer la structure d'un argument dans un texte, il faut comprendre comment les composants individuels de l'argument global sont liés. Ce travail présente la première approche basée sur un réseau de neurones pour l'extraction de liens dans l'exploration d'arguments. Plus précisément, nous proposons une nouvelle architecture qui applique la modélisation de l'attention séquence à séquence de Pointer Network à la prédiction structurelle dans les tâches d'analyse discursive. Nous développons ensuite un modèle conjoint qui étend cette architecture pour traiter simultanément la tâche d'extraction de liens et la classification des composants d'arguments. Le modèle conjoint proposé permet d'obtenir des résultats de pointe sur deux corpus d'évaluation distincts, montrant des performances bien supérieures aux modèles spécifiques au corpus et fortement conçus par les fonctionnalités précédemment proposés. De plus, nos résultats démontrent qu'une optimisation conjointe pour les deux tâches est cruciale pour des performances élevées.", 'pt': 'Para determinar a estrutura do argumento no texto, é preciso entender como os componentes individuais do argumento geral estão ligados. Este trabalho apresenta a primeira abordagem baseada em redes neurais para extração de links em mineração de argumentos. Especificamente, propomos uma nova arquitetura que aplica modelagem de atenção sequência-a-sequência de redes de ponteiros para predição estrutural em tarefas de análise de discurso. Em seguida, desenvolvemos um modelo conjunto que estende essa arquitetura para abordar simultaneamente a tarefa de extração de links e a classificação de componentes de argumentos. O modelo conjunto proposto alcança resultados de última geração em dois corpora de avaliação separados, mostrando um desempenho muito superior ao dos modelos propostos anteriormente específicos de corpus e fortemente projetados por recursos. Além disso, nossos resultados demonstram que a otimização conjunta para ambas as tarefas é crucial para o alto desempenho.', 'es': 'Para determinar la estructura de los argumentos en el texto, hay que entender cómo se vinculan los componentes individuales del argumento general. Este trabajo presenta el primer enfoque basado en redes neuronales para la extracción de enlaces en la minería de argumentos. Específicamente, proponemos una arquitectura novedosa que aplica el modelado de atención secuencia a secuencia de Pointer Network a la predicción estructural en las tareas de análisis del discurso. Luego desarrollamos un modelo conjunto que amplía esta arquitectura para abordar simultáneamente la tarea de extracción de enlaces y la clasificación de los componentes del argumento. El modelo conjunto propuesto logra resultados de última generación en dos cuerpos de evaluación separados, que muestran un rendimiento muy superior al de los modelos específicos del cuerpo propuestos anteriormente y altamente diseñados para funciones. Además, nuestros resultados demuestran que la optimización conjunta de ambas tareas es crucial para lograr un alto rendimiento.', 'ja': 'テキストの引数構造を決定するには、引数全体の個々のコンポーネントがどのようにリンクされているかを理解する必要があります。この作品は、引数マイニングにおけるリンク抽出の最初のニューラルネットワークベースのアプローチを提示している。具体的には、ポインタネットワークのシーケンス間注目モデリングをディスカッション構文解析タスクの構造予測に適用する新規アーキテクチャを提案する。次に、このアーキテクチャを拡張して、リンク抽出タスクと引数コンポーネントの分類に同時に対処する共同モデルを開発します。提案されたジョイントモデルは、2つの別々の評価組織で最先端の結果を達成し、以前に提案されたコーパス固有の重度の機能設計モデルよりもはるかに優れたパフォーマンスを示します。さらに、両方のタスクを共同で最適化することが、高いパフォーマンスにとって重要であることを実証しました。', 'zh': '文本之参数结构,须知全参数诸组成部分所以链接也。 首建神经网络法以取参数掘中之链接。 具体来说有新架构,针网络序建模宜在解析言。 然后开合模形,广其体系结构,以同时处理链接取任参数组件之类。 所建合模形于两独评语料库最先进者,示出比前特定于语料库、高度特征工之性善也。 此外,臣等考结果表明,共优化此二者,于高性能至重。', 'hi': 'पाठ में तर्क संरचना निर्धारित करने के लिए, किसी को यह समझना चाहिए कि समग्र तर्क के अलग-अलग घटक कैसे जुड़े हुए हैं। यह काम तर्क खनन में निष्कर्षण को लिंक करने के लिए पहला तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम एक उपन्यास वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो पॉइंटर नेटवर्क अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ध्यान मॉडलिंग को प्रवचन पार्सिंग कार्यों में संरचनात्मक भविष्यवाणी के लिए लागू करता है। फिर हम एक संयुक्त मॉडल विकसित करते हैं जो इस वास्तुकला को एक साथ लिंक निष्कर्षण कार्य और तर्क घटकों के वर्गीकरण को संबोधित करने के लिए विस्तारित करता है। प्रस्तावित संयुक्त मॉडल दो अलग-अलग मूल्यांकन निगम पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है, जो पहले से प्रस्तावित कॉर्पस-विशिष्ट और भारी फीचर-इंजीनियर मॉडल की तुलना में कहीं बेहतर प्रदर्शन दिखाता है। इसके अलावा, हमारे परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि दोनों कार्यों के लिए संयुक्त रूप से अनुकूलन उच्च प्रदर्शन के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है।', 'ru': 'Чтобы определить структуру аргумента в тексте, необходимо понять, как связаны отдельные компоненты общего аргумента. В этой работе представлен первый нейросетевой подход к извлечению связей в аргументации. В частности, мы предлагаем новую архитектуру, которая применяет моделирование внимания от последовательности к последовательности сети указателей к структурному прогнозированию в задачах синтаксического анализа дискурса. Затем мы разрабатываем совместную модель, которая расширяет эту архитектуру для одновременного решения задачи извлечения ссылок и классификации компонентов аргументов. Предлагаемая совместная модель обеспечивает самые современные результаты в двух отдельных оценочных корпорациях, демонстрируя гораздо более высокую эффективность, чем ранее предложенные модели, разработанные с учетом конкретных особенностей и с большим объемом конструктивных особенностей. Кроме того, наши результаты показывают, что совместная оптимизация для обеих задач имеет решающее значение для высокой производительности.', 'ga': "D'fhonn struchtúr argóinte sa téacs a chinneadh, ní mór tuiscint a fháil ar an gcaoi a bhfuil comhpháirteanna aonair den argóint iomlán nasctha. Cuireann an saothar seo i láthair an chéad chur chuige néarbhunaithe líonra-bhunaithe chun nasc a bhaint as mianadóireacht argóinte. Go sonrach, molaimid ailtireacht nua a chuireann samhaltú aird seicheamh-go-seicheamh Pointer Network i bhfeidhm ar thuar struchtúrach i dtascanna parsála dioscúrsa. Déanaimid comhshamhail a fhorbairt ansin a leathnaíonn an ailtireacht seo chun dul i ngleic go comhuaineach leis an tasc asbhainte nasc agus le haicmiú comhpháirteanna argóinte. Baineann an tsamhail chomhpháirteach atá beartaithe torthaí den scoth amach ar dhá chorpas meastóireachta ar leith, a léiríonn feidhmíocht i bhfad níos fearr ná na samhlacha corpas-shonracha a moladh roimhe seo agus a ndearnadh innealtóireacht mhór orthu. Ina theannta sin, léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil sé ríthábhachtach d'ardfheidhmíocht a optamú le chéile don dá thasc.", 'ka': 'ტექსტის არგუმენტის სტრუქტურაციის განსაზღვრებისთვის, ერთი უნდა პასუხოთ როგორ განსაზღვრებული არგუმენტის განსაზღვრება. ეს სამუშაო პირველი ნეიროლური ქსელის დაფართებული პროგრამის გამოყენება არგუმენტის მინექციაში გამოყენება. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ მინდა პრომენტური აქტიქტიქტურა, რომელიც პონტერური ქსელის წერტილების მოდულების მოდულების მოდელირებას სტრუქტური წინასწარმოდულებისთვის, რომელი შემდეგ ჩვენ განვითარებთ ერთადერთი მოდელ, რომელიც ამ აქტიქტიქტურის გაფართებას ერთადერთად გავამუშავებთ აქტიქტურაციის ექსტრექციის რაოდენტის და აპორმინ საერთო მოდელის შესაძლებელი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა იქნება ორი განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებული მოდელის შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც მხოლოდ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა, ვიდ დამატებით, ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ერთადერთად ორივე საქმედებისთვის ოპტიმიზაცია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია დიდი საქმედებისთვის.', 'el': 'Για να καθοριστεί η δομή των ορίων στο κείμενο, πρέπει να κατανοηθεί κανείς πώς συνδέονται μεμονωμένα συστατικά του συνολικού ορίσματος. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την πρώτη προσέγγιση που βασίζεται σε νευρωνικό δίκτυο για την εξαγωγή συνδέσεων στην εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων. Συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική που εφαρμόζει τη μοντελοποίηση προσοχής αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία σε δομικές προβλέψεις σε εργασίες ανάλυσης λόγου. Στη συνέχεια αναπτύσσουμε ένα κοινό μοντέλο που επεκτείνει αυτή την αρχιτεκτονική για να αντιμετωπίσει ταυτόχρονα την εργασία εξαγωγής συνδέσμων και την ταξινόμηση των στοιχείων των ορίων. Το προτεινόμενο κοινό μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε δύο ξεχωριστά σώματα αξιολόγησης, εμφανίζοντας πολύ ανώτερη απόδοση από τα προηγουμένως προτεινόμενα μοντέλα ειδικά για το σώμα και βαριά σχεδιασμένα χαρακτηριστικά. Επιπλέον, τα αποτελέσματα μας δείχνουν ότι η κοινή βελτιστοποίηση και για τις δύο εργασίες είναι κρίσιμη για την υψηλή απόδοση.', 'hu': 'Annak érdekében, hogy meghatározzuk az argumentumstruktúrát a szövegben, meg kell értenünk, hogy az általános argumentum egyes összetevői hogyan kapcsolódnak össze. Ez a munka bemutatja az első neurális hálózati alapú megközelítést az argumentbányászat kapcsolatkivonására. Konkrétan olyan új architektúrát javasolunk, amely a Pointer Network szekvencia-szekvencia figyelemmodellezését alkalmazza a diskurzus elemzési feladatok strukturális előrejelzésére. Ezután kidolgozunk egy olyan közös modellt, amely kiterjeszti ezt az architektúrát, hogy egyidejűleg kezelje a link extraction feladatot és az argumentum komponensek osztályozását. A javasolt közös modell két különböző értékelő korpuszon is korszerű eredményeket ér el, ami sokkal jobb teljesítményt mutat, mint a korábban javasolt korpuspecifikus és erősen funkcionális modellek. Továbbá eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy mindkét feladat közös optimalizálása kulcsfontosságú a nagy teljesítmény szempontjából.', 'it': "Per determinare la struttura dell'argomento nel testo, si deve capire come i singoli componenti dell'argomento generale sono collegati. Questo lavoro presenta il primo approccio basato sulla rete neurale per l'estrazione di link nel mining degli argomenti. Nello specifico, proponiamo una nuova architettura che applica la modellazione dell'attenzione sequenza-sequenza di Pointer Network alla previsione strutturale nelle attività di analisi del discorso. Sviluppiamo quindi un modello congiunto che estende questa architettura per affrontare contemporaneamente l'attività di estrazione link e la classificazione dei componenti degli argomenti. Il modello congiunto proposto raggiunge risultati all'avanguardia su due corpi di valutazione separati, mostrando prestazioni di gran lunga superiori rispetto ai modelli precedentemente proposti specifici per il corpo e fortemente feature-engineered. Inoltre, i nostri risultati dimostrano che l'ottimizzazione congiunta per entrambe le attività è fondamentale per prestazioni elevate.", 'kk': 'Мәтінде аргументтің құрылымын анықтау үшін, жалпы аргументтің әрбір компоненттері қалай сілтемелерін түсіну керек. Бұл жұмыс аргументтің бағыттауында тарқатуды сілтемелеу үшін бірінші неврал желінің негіздеген тәсілін көрсетеді. Ескерту үшін, меңзер желінің реттеу- мен реттеу үлгісін дискурстарды талдау тапсырмалардың структуралық алдын- алау үлгісіне қолданылатын романдық архитектурасын ұсынамыз. Содан кейін біз бұл архитектураны бір-біріне шешу тапсырмасын және аргументтің компоненттерін шешу үшін жалпы моделін құрамыз. Бірлескен үлгі жалпы үлгі екі бөлек оқу корпорасының күйінің нәтижесін жеткізеді. Біріншіден корпус арқылы және қатты инженерлікті үлгілер үлгілерінен артық оқу үлгісін көрсете Сонымен қатар, біздің нәтижелеріміз екі тапсырманың оптимизациясы жоғары істеу үшін маңызды.', 'mk': 'In order to determine argument structure in text, one must understand how individual components of the overall argument are linked.  Оваа работа го претставува првиот пристап базиран на нервната мрежа за поврзување на екстракцијата во рударството на аргументи. Специфично, предложуваме нова архитектура која применува внимание од секвенца до секвенца на Pointer Network моделирање на структурните предвидувања во дискурсните анализирачки задачи. Потоа развиваме заеднички модел кој ја проширува оваа архитектура за истовремено да се реши задачата за извлекување на врските и класификацијата на компонентите на аргументите. Предложениот заеднички модел постигнува најдобри резултати за две одделни проценки, покажувајќи значително надворешни резултати од претходно предложените модели специфични за корпус и тешко инженерирани со карактеристики. Покрај тоа, нашите резултати покажуваат дека заедничкото оптимизирање на двете задачи е клучно за висока резултатност.', 'lt': 'Siekiant nustatyti argument ų struktūrą tekste, reikia suprasti, kaip yra susietos atskiros bendro argumento sudedamosios dalys. Šiame darbe pristatomas pirmasis nervų tinklu grindžiamas metodas, skirtas susieti ekstrahavimą argument ų gavybos srityje. Specifically, we propose a novel architecture that applies Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence attention modeling to structural prediction in discourse parsing tasks.  Tada parengiame bendrą model į, kuris išplėstų šią architektūrą ir tuo pačiu metu spręstų sąsajų gavybos užduotį ir argument ų komponentų klasifikavimą. Siūlomas bendras modelis duoda pažangiausių dviejų atskirų vertinimo korpūrų rezultatų, kurie rodo gerokai geresnius rezultatus nei anksčiau pasiūlyti korpusui būdingi ir didelių savybių modeliai. Be to, mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad bendras abiejų užduočių optimizavimas yra labai svarbus norint pasiekti aukštus rezultatus.', 'ms': 'In order to determine argument structure in text, one must understand how individual components of the overall argument are linked.  Kerja ini memperkenalkan pendekatan pertama berasaskan rangkaian saraf untuk paut ekstraksi dalam penambangan argumen. Secara khusus, kami cadangkan arkitektur baru yang melaksanakan pengamatan urutan-ke-urutan Rangkaian Pointer kepada ramalan struktur dalam tugas huraian diskursus. Kemudian kita mengembangkan model bersama yang memperluas arkitektur ini untuk mengatasi tugas ekstraksi pautan secara bersamaan dan klasifikasi komponen argumen. Model kongsi yang diusulkan mencapai keputusan state-of-the-art pada dua korpra penilaian terpisah, menunjukkan prestasi yang jauh lebih baik daripada model yang diusulkan sebelumnya corpus-spesifik dan kuasa-reka. Selain itu, hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa optimasi bersama-sama untuk kedua-dua tugas adalah penting untuk prestasi tinggi.', 'mt': 'In order to determine argument structure in text, one must understand how individual components of the overall argument are linked.  Din il-ħidma tippreżenta l-ewwel approċċ ibbażat fuq in-netwerk newrali li jorbot l-estrazzjoni fil-minjieri tal-argumenti. B’mod speċifiku, qed nipproponu arkitettura ġdida li tapplika l-immudellar ta’ attenzjoni minn sekwenza għal sekwenza tan-Netwerk Pointer għat-tbassir strutturali fil-kompiti ta’ analiżi diskors. Imbagħad niżviluppaw mudell konġunt li jestendi din l-arkitettura biex jindirizza simultanjament il-kompitu tal-estrazzjoni tal-konnessjonijiet u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-komponenti tal-argument. Il-mudell konġunt propost jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fuq żewġ korpi separati ta’ evalwazzjoni, li juru prestazzjoni ferm superjuri mill-mudelli proposti preċedentement speċifiċi għall-korpus u mfassla b’karatteristiċi kbar. Barra minn hekk, ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-ottimizzazzjoni konġunta għaż-żewġ kompiti hija kruċjali għal prestazzjoni għolja.', 'pl': 'Aby określić strukturę argumentów w tekście, należy zrozumieć, w jaki sposób połączone są poszczególne elementy ogólnego argumentu. W pracy przedstawiono pierwsze podejście oparte na sieci neuronowej do ekstrakcji linków w wydobywaniu argumentów. W szczególności proponujemy nową architekturę, która stosuje modelowanie uwagi sekwencji do sekwencji Pointer Network do przewidywania struktury w zadaniach parsowania dyskursu. Następnie opracowujemy wspólny model, który rozszerza tę architekturę, aby jednocześnie zająć się zadaniem ekstrakcji linków i klasyfikacją składników argumentów. Proponowany wspólny model osiąga najnowocześniejsze wyniki na dwóch oddzielnych korpusach oceniających, wykazując znacznie lepszą wydajność niż wcześniej proponowane modele specyficzne dla korpusu i silnie zaprojektowane cechy. Ponadto nasze wyniki pokazują, że wspólna optymalizacja dla obu zadań ma kluczowe znaczenie dla wysokiej wydajności.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയില്\u200d ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്\u200dറ് സ്ഥാനം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരാള്\u200dക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ടായിരിക്കുന്നു മൊത ഈ ജോലി ആദ്യത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പ്രവൃത്തിയെ കാണിക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d പോയിന്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കിന്റെ സെക്കന്റ് സെക്കന്റ് സെക്കന്റ് മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു യൂട്ട് മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിനെ വിശാലമാക്കുന്നു. ഒരേ സമയത്ത് ലിങ്ക് പുറത്തു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട യൂട്ട് മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിലാസവിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് പ്രോദേശിപ്പിച്ച കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളില അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു രണ്ട് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും ഒരുമിച്ച് മാന്യം ചെയ്യുന്നത് വളര', 'mn': 'Текст дахь аргументын бүтцийг тодорхойлохын тулд, нэг нь ерөнхий аргументын бүтцийн бүтцийг хэрхэн холбоотой талаар ойлгох хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажил аргументын хөрөнгө оруулалт холбогдохын тулд анхны мэдрэлийн сүлжээний суурь ойлголт гаргадаг. Ялангуяа, бид Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх шинэ архитектурыг зааж өгдөг. Тэгээд бид энэ архитектурыг нэмэгдүүлэх загварыг холбоотой, аргументын компонентын хуваарилалтыг холбоотой холбоотой нэг загвар бүтээж байна. Энэ санал нийлүүлсэн загвар нь хоёр ялгаатай дүгнэлтийн үр дүнг гаргаж, өмнө нь корпус-тодорхой болон маш хүндрэлтэй инженерийн загвараас илүү өндөр үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг. Мөн бидний үр дүн нь хоёр даалгаварыг хамтдаа сайжруулах нь өндөр ажиллагаанд чухал гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'For å bestemme argumentstrukturen i teksten må ein forstå korleis individuelle komponentar av den generelle argument er lenke. Dette arbeidet viser den første neuralnettverksbaserte tilnærminga til å lenka ekstraksjon i argument-mining. Spesielt, vi foreslår eit nytt arkitektur som brukar peikaren nettverkssekvens-til-sekvens oppmerking til strukturforegåve i diskursar med tolking av oppgåver. Vi utviklar så eit kopla modell som utvidar denne arkitekturen til å samtidig adressa til lenkekstraheringsoppgåva og klassifikasjonen av argumentkomponentar. Den foreslåde kople modellen oppnår tilstanden av kunsten på to separate evalueringskorpora, viser mykje høgare utviklingar enn dei førre foreslåde korpusspesifikke og sterkt funksjonsengineererte modelane. I tillegg kan resultatet våre vise at kopla optimalisering for begge oppgåver er viktig for høg utvikling.', 'ro': 'Pentru a determina structura argumentului în text, trebuie să înțelegem cum sunt legate componentele individuale ale argumentului general. Această lucrare prezintă prima abordare bazată pe rețele neurale pentru extragerea legăturilor în mineritul argumentelor. Mai exact, propunem o arhitectură nouă care aplică modelarea atenției secvență la secvență a rețelei Pointer la predicția structurală în sarcinile de analizare a discursului. Apoi dezvoltăm un model comun care extinde această arhitectură pentru a aborda simultan sarcina de extragere a legăturilor și clasificarea componentelor argumentului. Modelul comun propus obține rezultate de ultimă oră pe două corpuri de evaluare separate, arătând performanțe mult superioare decât modelele propuse anterior specifice corpului și puternic ingineriate. În plus, rezultatele noastre demonstrează că optimizarea în comun pentru ambele sarcini este esențială pentru performanțe ridicate.', 'sr': 'Da bi se odredila struktura argumenta u tekstu, mora razumeti kako su individualne komponente ukupnog argumenta povezani. Ovaj rad predstavlja prvi pristup na neuralnoj mreži povezivanja ekstrakcije u rudarstvu argumenata. Posebno, predlažemo novu arhitekturu koja primjenjuje sekvenciju mreže pokazatelja za sekvenciju pažnje na strukturnu predviđanje u vezi razmatranja zadataka. Zatim razvijamo zajednički model koji proširi ovu arhitekturu da istovremeno obradi izvlačenje veze i klasifikaciju komponenta argument a. Predloženi zajednički model postiže rezultate stanja umjetnosti na dve odvojene procjene korpore, pokazujući daleko superiornu funkciju nego prethodno predložene modele korpora specifične i teške inženjere. Nadalje, naši rezultati pokazuju da je zajedno optimiziranje oba zadatka ključno za visoke funkcije.', 'so': 'Si aad u go’aanto tusaale ahaan qoraal ku qoran, waa in la gartaa sida ay u xidhiidhaan qayb gaar ah oo ka mid ah wadanka guud. Shaqadaasu wuxuu soo bandhigaa habka ugu horeysa ee ku saleysan shabakadda neurada, in la xiriiro ka soo bixinta guriga. Si gaar ah, waxaynu horumarinaynaa dhismo saxda ah oo ku habboonaya shabakadda Pointer-Network-sequence-to-sequence, tusaale ahaan horumarinta dhismaha oo ku qoran shaqooyinka baaritaanka. Markaas waxaynu horumarinaa model wadajir ah oo dhismahan u fidinaya si isla markaasna loogu talagalay shuqulka ka soo bixinta iyo qaybinta qaybaha argument. Tusaale wadajirka ah ee la soo jeeday wuxuu soo gaadhaa midhaha dowladda farshaxanta labada shirkad oo gaar ah, kaasoo muujiyaya shaqo aad u sarreeya sameynta sameynta horay loo soo jeeday tusaalooyin gaar ah oo aad u adag. Furthermore, resultimahayagu waxay muujiyaan in labada shaqadooda si wadajir ah u faa’iido badan waa muhiim.', 'ta': 'உரையில் தருமதிப்பு அமைப்பை தீர்வு செய்ய வேண்டுமானால், மொத்த அளபுருவின் தனிப்பட்ட பகுதிகள் எவ்வாறு இணைக்கப @ info குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய உருவாக்கத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பேச்சு பாடல் பணிகளில் சுட்டிக்காட்டி பிணைப்பு பிணையத்தின் வரிச பிறகு நாம் ஒரு இணைய மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம். அது ஒரே நேரத்தில் இணைப்பு பிரித்தல் செயலை மற்றும் வார்ப்பு பொருளின் வகைப்பை வ பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட இணைய மாதிரி இரண்டு தனிப்பட்ட மதிப்பீட்டு நிலையின் முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறது, முன்னோர்வு செய்யப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட மற மேலும், எங்கள் முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது இரண்டு பணிகளுக்கும் ஒன்றாக அதிகப்படுத்தல் முக்கியமானது.', 'si': 'පාළුවේ තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සිද්ධ කරන්න, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන්. මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරථම න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ අධාරිත ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලයේ අධ විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන අපි ඊට පස්සේ සම්බන්ධ මොඩේලයක් විස්තර කරනවා මේ විස්තාරය සම්බන්ධ විස්තර කරනවා සහ සම්බන්ධ විස්තර සම්බන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණය සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත් තවත්, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නයි කියලා දෙන්නම් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට වැඩිය හොඳයි.', 'sv': 'För att bestämma argumentstruktur i text måste man förstå hur enskilda komponenter i det övergripande argumentet är kopplade. Detta arbete presenterar det första neurala nätverksbaserade tillvägagångssättet för länksextraktion i argumentmining. Specifikt föreslår vi en ny arkitektur som tillämpar Pointer Network sekvens-till-sekvens uppmärksamhet modellering för strukturell förutsägelse i diskurstolkningsuppgifter. Vi utvecklar sedan en gemensam modell som utökar denna arkitektur för att samtidigt hantera länksextraktionsuppgiften och klassificeringen av argumentkomponenter. Den föreslagna gemensamma modellen uppnår state-of-the-art resultat på två separata utvärderingskorpor, vilket visar mycket bättre prestanda än de tidigare föreslagna korpuspecifika och kraftigt funktionskonstruerade modellerna. Dessutom visar våra resultat att en gemensam optimering för båda uppgifterna är avgörande för hög prestanda.', 'ur': 'تاکسٹ میں حکومت ساختہ مقرر کرنے کے لئے، ایک کو سمجھنا چاہیے کہ کل حکومت کے فرقے کس طرح متصل ہیں۔ یہ کام ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیادی طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو ارجмент مٹینگ میں لینکٹ کرتی ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم ایک نوی معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence توجه کی موڈلینگ کو دکھانے کے بارے میں پارسینگ کے کاموں میں استعمال کرتا ہے. اس کے بعد ہم ایک جوڑ موڈل ایجاد کریں جو اس معماری کو ایک دفعہ کے ساتھ لینک اٹھانے کے کام اور دلیل رقم رقم کا کلیسی کرے۔ پیشنهاد کی ملک موڈل دو مختلف ارتفاع کی کورپور پر موجود ہوتی ہے، جو پہلے سے پیشنهاد کی کورپوس مخصوص اور سخت طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کی موڈل سے بہت زیادہ اچھی فعالیت دکھاتی ہے. اور ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ دونوں کاموں کے لئے ایک دوسرے سے اچھی طرح کرنا بہت اچھی طرح ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name Ko'rsatilgan, biz quyidagi novel arxituvchilarga qo'llab chiqarish mumkin. Name Keyin biz bu arxituvni bir bir bir birlashtirish modelini yaratib, bir xil bilan bogʻ'lash vazifasini va argumentlar komponentlarini ajratish uchun. Name Ko'rsatganda, bizning natijalarimiz ikkita vazifalarni birlashtirish uchun eng muhim.", 'vi': 'Để xác định cấu trúc tranh luận trong văn bản, người ta phải hiểu cách liên kết các thành phần của chủ đề luận chung. Đây là cách tiếp cận mạng thần kinh đầu tiên để kết nối các loại khai thác các cuộc tranh luận. Cụ thể, chúng tôi đề xuất một kiến trúc mới áp dụng việc làm mẫu việc chú ý của Pointer Network tới dãy số khác để dự đoán cấu trúc trong các nhiệm vụ phân tích. Sau đó chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình chung có thể mở rộng cấu trúc này để giải quyết đồng thời nhiệm vụ khai thác liên kết và phân loại các thành phần lập tranh luận. The proposed joint model đạt được kết quả tối tân về hai nhóm đánh giá riêng biệt, showing wide vượt trội so với những mô hình thể cụ thể và đặc trưng được đưa ra trước đây. Hơn nữa, kết quả của chúng ta cho thấy khả năng tối đa cho cả hai nhiệm vụ đều quan trọng.', 'da': 'For at bestemme argumentstruktur i tekst, skal man forstå, hvordan individuelle komponenter i det samlede argument er forbundet. Dette arbejde præsenterer den første neurale netværksbaserede tilgang til link ekstraktion i argument mining. Specielt foreslår vi en ny arkitektur, der anvender Pointer Network sekvens-til-sekvens opmærksomhedsmodellering til strukturel forudsigelse i diskursanalyseopgaver. Vi udvikler derefter en fælles model, der udvider denne arkitektur til samtidig at adressere linkekstraktionsopgaven og klassificeringen af argumentkomponenter. Den foreslåede fælles model opnår state-of-the-art resultater på to separate evalueringskorpora, der viser langt bedre ydeevne end de tidligere foreslåede korpusspecifikke og stærkt feature-konstruerede modeller. Desuden viser vores resultater, at optimering til begge opgaver i fællesskab er afgørende for høj ydeevne.', 'bg': 'За да се определи структурата на аргументите в текста, трябва да се разбере как отделните компоненти на цялостния аргумент са свързани. Тази работа представя първия невронно базиран подход за извличане на връзки в аргументите. По-конкретно, ние предлагаме нова архитектура, която прилага моделиране на вниманието последователност към последователност към структурно прогнозиране в задачи за анализиране на дискурса. След това разработваме съвместен модел, който разширява тази архитектура, за да адресира едновременно задачата за извличане на връзки и класификацията на компонентите на аргументите. Предложеният съвместен модел постига най-съвременни резултати върху два отделни корпуса за оценка, показвайки далеч по-високо представяне от предложените по-рано специфични за корпуса модели и силно проектирани с функции модели. Освен това нашите резултати показват, че съвместното оптимизиране на двете задачи е от решаващо значение за високата производителност.', 'hr': 'Da bi se utvrdila struktura argumenta u tekstu, mora razumjeti kako su individualne komponente ukupnog argumenta povezani. Ovaj rad predstavlja prvi pristup na neuralnoj mreži povezivanja ekstrakcije u rudarstvu argumenata. Posebno, predlažemo novu arhitekturu koja se primjenjuje sekvenciji mreže pokazatelja za sekvenciji pažnje na strukturnu predviđanje u vezi razmatranja zadataka. Zatim razvijamo zajednički model koji proširi ovu arhitekturu na istodobno rješavanje zadatka izvlačenja veze i klasifikacije komponenta argument a. Predloženi zajednički model postiže rezultate stanja umjetnosti na dvije odvojene procjene korpore, pokazujući daleko nadmoćniju učinku nego prethodno predložene modele za korpus specifične i teške inženjere. Nadalje, naši rezultati pokazuju da je zajedno optimiziranje oba zadatka ključno za visoke funkcije.', 'id': 'Untuk menentukan struktur argumen dalam teks, seseorang harus mengerti bagaimana komponen individu dari argumen keseluruhan terhubung. Pekerjaan ini memperlihatkan pendekatan saraf pertama berdasarkan jaringan untuk menghubungkan ekstraksi dalam pertambangan argumen. Secara spesifik, kami mengusulkan arsitektur baru yang menerapkan urutan jaringan Pointer-ke-urutan perhatian model untuk prediksi struktur dalam tugas penghuraian diskors. Kemudian kita mengembangkan model bersama yang memperluas arsitektur ini untuk secara bersamaan mengatasi tugas ekstraksi link dan klasifikasi komponen argumen. Model kongsi yang diusulkan mencapai hasil state-of-the-art pada dua korpora evaluasi terpisah, menunjukkan prestasi jauh lebih baik dari model yang diusulkan sebelumnya corpus-spesifik dan kuat-teknik model. Selain itu, hasil kita menunjukkan bahwa optimisasi bersama untuk kedua tugas adalah penting untuk prestasi tinggi.', 'de': 'Um die Argumentstruktur im Text zu bestimmen, muss man verstehen, wie einzelne Komponenten des Gesamtarguments miteinander verknüpft sind. Diese Arbeit stellt den ersten neuronalen Netzwerk-basierten Ansatz zur Link-Extraktion im Argument Mining vor. Insbesondere schlagen wir eine neuartige Architektur vor, die Pointer Network Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Aufmerksamkeitsmodelle auf strukturelle Vorhersagen in Diskursparsing-Aufgaben anwendet. Anschließend entwickeln wir ein gemeinsames Modell, das diese Architektur erweitert, um gleichzeitig die Linkextraktionsaufgabe und die Klassifizierung von Argumentkomponenten anzugehen. Das vorgeschlagene Joint-Modell erzielt State-of-the-Art-Ergebnisse auf zwei separaten Evaluationskorpora und zeigt eine weit bessere Leistung als die zuvor vorgeschlagenen korpusspezifischen und stark feature-engineered Modelle. Darüber hinaus zeigen unsere Ergebnisse, dass die gemeinsame Optimierung für beide Aufgaben entscheidend für eine hohe Leistung ist.', 'sw': 'Ili kuelezea muundo wa hoja katika maandishi, mtu lazima kuelewa jinsi vifaa binafsi vya hoja jumla vinavyounganishwa. Kazi hii inaonyesha mbinu ya kwanza za ya mtandao wa neura inayotumika kuunganisha utoaji katika uchimbaji wa hoja. Kwa ujumla, tunapendekeza ujenzi wa riwaya unaotumia mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa Mtandao wa Uwekezaji wa Mtandao unaoonyesha utabiri wa ujenzi katika majukumu ya mazungumzo. Kisha tunatengeneza muundo wa pamoja unaosambaza ujenzi huu kwa wakati mmoja kuongeza kazi ya utekelezaji wa kiungo na usambazaji wa vipengele vya hoja. Mradi huu wa pamoja unapendekezwa unafanikiwa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye kampuni mbili tofauti ya uchunguzi, ukionyesha utendaji mkubwa zaidi kuliko mifano maalum na yenye ubunifu mkubwa. Zaidi ya hayo, matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa kuimarisha kazi zote ni muhimu kwa ajili ya utendaji wa juu.', 'nl': "Om de argumentstructuur in tekst te bepalen, moet men begrijpen hoe afzonderlijke componenten van het algehele argument zijn gekoppeld. Dit werk presenteert de eerste neurale netwerkgebaseerde benadering voor linkextractie in argument mining. Specifiek stellen we een nieuwe architectuur voor die Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence attentie modellering toepast op structurele voorspellingen in discours parsing taken. Vervolgens ontwikkelen we een gezamenlijk model dat deze architectuur uitbreidt om tegelijkertijd de link extractie taak en de classificatie van argumentcomponenten aan te pakken. Het voorgestelde gezamenlijke model behaalt state-of-the-art resultaten op twee afzonderlijke evaluatiecorpora's, die veel betere prestaties tonen dan de eerder voorgestelde corpusspecifieke en sterk op feature-engineering modellen. Bovendien tonen onze resultaten aan dat gezamenlijk optimaliseren voor beide taken cruciaal is voor hoge prestaties.", 'fa': 'برای تعیین ساختار ارتباط در متن، یک نفر باید بفهمه که بخش\u200cهای فردی از ارتباط عمومی چگونه ارتباط دارند. این کار اولین روش روزنامه\u200cی شبکه عصبی را برای ارتباط استخراج در ذخیره\u200cی ارتباط نشان می\u200cدهد. به طور خاص، ما یک معماری نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به مدل توجه شبکه نقاشی نقاشی به رده\u200cای برای پیش\u200cبینی ساختاری در مورد مشخص کردن وظیفه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند. سپس ما یک مدل مشترک را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که این معماری را برای همزمان درباره\u200cی کار خارج کردن ارتباط و گروه\u200cبندی رقم\u200cهای ارتباط گسترش می\u200cدهد. این مدل مشترک پیشنهاد به نتیجه ایالت هنری در دو شرکت ارزیابی جدا رسیده است، که عملکرد بزرگتر از مدل های مخصوص و مهندسی بسیار مهندسی پیشنهاد شده است. علاوه بر این، نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که همراه optimizing for both tasks برای عملکرد بالا مهم است.', 'tr': 'Metin içinde argüm strukturyny takyklamak üçin, bir adam bütin argümniň aýratynyň nähili baglaýyşyny düşünmeli. Bu işe argüm köçürmeginde açmaky üçin birinji näyral şebeke tabanly nuýruky görkezýär. Adatça, biz indir çykyş görevlerini ayırmak üçin strukturly öňünden örnek arhitekturuny teklip edip görýäris Sonra bu arhitekturuny bir zamanda çykyş täblisasyny we argum a ýratynyň klasifikasyny çykarýan bir nusga düzenledik. Toparlaşan nusga iki aýratyndaky deňleme korporatynyň durumyny ýetip barýar, öňki täze korpus spesifikaly we ağır hasaplanýan nusgalaryndan örän gowurak täsirini görkez. Munuň üçin netijelerimiz hem iş üçin biraz optimizlemek ýokary ukyplarymyz üçin örän möhüm.', 'af': "Om argument struktuur in teks te bepaal, moet een verstaan hoe individuele komponente van die hele argument gekoppel is. Hierdie werk stel die eerste neural netwerk-gebaseerde toegang om uitvoer te skakel in argument-mining. Spesifieke, ons voorstel 'n nuwe arkitektuur wat aanwend wyser netwerk sekvensie-na-sekvensie aandag modellering na strukturele voorskou in diskursie verwerking opdragte. Ons ontwikkel dan 'n gemeenskap model wat hierdie arkitektuur uitbrei na sameleentheid adres die skakel uittrekking taak en die klasifikasie van argument komponente. Die voorgestelde joint model bereik die state-of-the-art resultate op twee aparte evalueringskorpora en wys baie superior effektiviteit as die voorheen voorgestelde korporus-spesifieke en swaar funksie-ingenieëre modele. Ons resultate verduidelik ook dat saamstig optimaliseering vir beide werke is crucial vir hoë prestasie.", 'sq': 'Për të përcaktuar strukturën e argumentit në tekst, duhet të kuptohet se si janë lidhur komponentet individuale të argumentit të përgjithshëm. Ky punë paraqet qasjen e parë të rrjetit nervor për të lidhur nxjerrjen në minierën e argumenteve. Veçanërisht, ne propozojmë një arkitekturë të re që aplikon sekuencën në sekuencë të vëmendjes Pointer Network modelimin e vëmendjes ndaj parashikimit strukturor në detyrat e analizimit diskursor. Pastaj zhvillojmë një model të përbashkët që zgjeron këtë arkitekturë për të trajtuar njëkohësisht detyrën e nxjerrjes së lidhjeve dhe klasifikimin e komponenteve të argumentit. The proposed joint model achieves state-of-the-art results on two separate evaluation corpora, showing far superior performance than the previously proposed corpus-specific and heavily feature-engineered models.  Përveç kësaj, rezultatet tona demonstrojnë se optimizimi i përbashkët për të dy detyrat është vendimtar për performancën e lartë.', 'hy': 'Տեքստի բանավեճի կառուցվածքը որոշելու համար պետք է հասկանանք, թե ինչպես են ընդհանուր բանավեճի անհատական բաղադրիչները կապված: Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է առաջին նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոտեցումը, որը կապում է բանավեճերի հանման մեջ արտահանումը: Մասնավորապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ճարտարապետություն, որը կիրառում է Փոյտեր ցանցի հաջորդականությունը հաջորդականության ուշադրության մոդելներ կառուցվածքային կանխատեսումների վրա խոսակցական վերլուծության խնդիրներում: Այնուհետև մենք ստեղծում ենք մի միավոր մոդել, որը ընդլայնում է այս ճարտարապետությունը, միաժամանակ վերաբերվում է կապերի վերացման խնդիրներին և բանավեճի բաղադրիչների դասակարգումներին: Ընդհանուր մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին երկու առանձին գնահատման մարմնի վրա, որոնք ցույց են տալիս ավելի լավ արդյունքներ, քան նախկինում առաջարկված մարմնի կոնկրետ և ծանր հատկանիշներ ստեղծված մոդելները: Ավելին, մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ երկու խնդիրների համար միասին օպտիմացման կարևոր է բարձր արդյունքների համար:', 'az': 'Mətndə arqüd strukturasını təyin etmək üçün, insanlar bütün argument in individual komponentlərinin necə bağlandığını anlamalıdır. Bu işlər arqümət maddiyinə əlaqə etmək üçün ilk nöral ağ tabanlı tərzini göstərir. Beləliklə, biz bir yeni arhitektura təklif edirik ki, Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence məlumatlarını müzakirə etmək üçün strukturlu tədbirlə məlumatlara uyğunlayır. Sonra bu arhitekturunu bir-birinə uzatmaq üçün birlikdə birlikdə bir modeli təşkil edirik ki, bağlantı çıxartma işini və argument komponentlərin klasifikasyonu təşkil edir. Mərhəmətli birləşdirilmiş modellər iki ayrı değerlendirmə korporasının eyni müddətin sonuçlarına yetişir, əvvəlcə təklif edilmiş korpus müəyyənləşdirilmiş və ağır mühendisliyi modellərdən daha üstün performans göstərir. Daha sonra, sonuçlarımız hər iki iş üçün birlikdə optimizlənmək yüksək performans üçün çox vacib olduğunu göstərir.', 'ko': '텍스트 중의 논점 구조를 확정하기 위해서 우리는 전체 논점의 각 구성 부분이 어떻게 한데 연결되는지 이해해야 한다.이 작업은 처음으로 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 파라미터 발굴 중의 링크를 추출하는 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 새로운 구조를 제시했다. 지침 네트워크의 서열을 서열에 옮기고 모델링을 문장 분석 임무에 응용하는 구조 예측에 주의한다.그리고 우리는 링크 추출 작업과 파라미터 구성 요소의 분류를 동시에 처리하기 위해 연합 모델을 개발했다.제시된 연합모델은 두 개의 독립된 평가 자료 라이브러리에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 실현했고 이전에 제시된 특정한 자료 라이브러리와 대량의 특징 공학 모델보다 더욱 우수한 성능을 나타냈다.그 밖에 우리의 결과에 의하면 두 임무의 연합 최적화는 고성능에 매우 중요하다고 한다.', 'bn': 'টেক্সটে যুক্তি কাঠামো নির্ধারণ করার জন্য, কেউ অবশ্যই বুঝতে পারে সাধারণ যুক্তি কিভাবে লিঙ্ক করা হয়। এই কাজের প্রথম নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক উপায়ের উপস্থাপন করে যাচ্ছে যুক্তি মিনিঙ্গে লিঙ্ক করার জন্য বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি উপন্যাস স্থাপনের প্রস্তাব করছি যা পয়েন্টার নেটওয়ার্কের সেকেন্ড-ব্যবহার করে কথোপকথন পার্গিং করার কাজে কাঠামোর ভবিষ্যৎ তারপর আমরা একটি যৌথ মডেল তৈরি করি যা এই আর্কিটেক্টার বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে একই সাথে লিঙ্ক বিনিময়ের কাজ এবং আর্গুমেন্ট কম্পোনেন্টের বি প্রস্তাবিত যৌথ মডেল দুটি বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন মূল্যের ফলাফল অর্জন করে, যেখানে পূর্বের প্রস্তাবিত কোর্পাস-নির্দিষ্ট এছাড়াও, আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে দুটো কাজের জন্য যুক্তিভাবে সম্ভাবনা করা হচ্ছে উচ্চকর্মের জন্য।', 'ca': "Per determinar l'estructura d'arguments en text, s'ha d'entendre com estan vinculats els components individuals de l'argument global. Aquesta obra presenta el primer enfocament neuronal basat en la xarxa per connectar l'extracció en la mineria d'arguments. Concretament, proposem una arquitectura nova que aplica la seqüència a seqüència d'atenció de Pointer Network a la predicció estructural en tasques d'analització de discurs. Després desenvolupem un model conjunt que estendra aquesta arquitectura a abordar simultàniament la tasca d'extracció de enllaços i la classificació de components d'arguments. El model conjunt proposat aconsegueix resultats més avançats en dos corpores d'evaluació separats, mostrant rendiment molt superior que els models anteriorment proposats específics al corpus i molt enginyerats. Furthermore, our results demonstrate that jointly optimizing for both tasks is crucial for high performance.", 'am': 'በጽሑፍ አካባቢ መግለጫ ለመፍጠር፣ አንድ ሰው የግል ጉዳዩ አካባቢው እንዴት እንደተያያያይደለ ያስተውላል፡፡ ይህ ሥራ የመጀመሪያውን የኔural network-based ጥያቄ ለመግጠም በአውራሲ ግንኙነት ላይ ለመግጠም ያሳያል፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ የአሁኑን የመዝገብ አካውንት፣ የፖነቲካ መረብ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናም ይህንን የመዝገብ መሠረት ማሳየት እና የግንኙነትን ስራ እና የአጋራጆችን መክፈት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው የብሔራዊ ሞዴል የልዩ አካል ፍጥረቶችን በሁለት በተለየ አስተዋይ ኮርፖር ላይ ያገኛል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ፍሬዎቻችን ለሁለቱ ስራዎች አብረው ማሻሻለል ለከፍተኛ ስርዓት ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'bs': 'Da bi se utvrdila struktura argumenta u tekstu, mora razumjeti kako su individualne komponente ukupnog argumenta povezani. Ovaj rad predstavlja prvi pristup na neuralnoj mreži za povezivanje ekstrakcije u rudarstvu argumenata. Posebno, predlažemo novu arhitekturu koja se primjenjuje sekvenciji mreže Pointer-to-sequence pažnje modelima strukturne predviđanja u vezi razmatranja zadataka. Zatim razvijamo zajednički model koji proširi ovu arhitekturu da se istovremeno riješi zadatak izvlačenja veze i klasifikacija komponenta argument a. Predloženi zajednički model postiže rezultate države umjetnosti na dvije odvojene procjene korpore, pokazujući daleko nadmoćne funkcije nego prethodno predložene modele za korpus specifične i teške inženjere. Nadalje, naši rezultati pokazuju da je zajedno optimiziranje oba zadatka ključno za visoke funkcije.', 'cs': 'Pro určení struktury argumentů v textu je třeba pochopit, jak jsou jednotlivé složky celkového argumentu propojeny. Tato práce představuje první přístup založený na neuronové síti k extrakci linků v argument miningu. Konkrétně navrhujeme novou architekturu, která aplikuje modelování pozornosti sekvence k sekvenci Pointer Network na strukturální predikci v úlohách analýzy diskurzu. Následně vyvíjíme společný model, který tuto architekturu rozšiřuje tak, aby současně řešil úlohu extrakce linků a klasifikaci komponent argumentů. Navržený společný model dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků na dvou samostatných hodnotících korpusech, které vykazují mnohem lepší výkon než dříve navržené korpusově specifické a silně funkčně inženýrované modely. Dále naše výsledky ukazují, že společná optimalizace pro obě úkoly je klíčová pro vysoký výkon.', 'et': 'Argumenti struktuuri määramiseks tekstis tuleb mõista, kuidas on seotud üldise argumendi üksikud komponendid. Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse esimest närvivõrgupõhist lähenemisviisi seoste ekstraheerimiseks argumentide kaevandamisel. Konkreetselt pakume välja uudse arhitektuuri, mis rakendab Pointer Network järjestusest järjestuseni tähelepanu modelleerimist struktuuriprognoosimisele diskursuse parsimise ülesannetes. Seejärel töötame välja ühismudeli, mis laiendab seda arhitektuuri, et tegeleda samaaegselt lingi ekstraheerimise ülesandega ja argumentide komponentide klassifitseerimisega. Kavandatud ühismudel saavutab tehnoloogilised tulemused kahe eraldi hindamiskorpora puhul, mis näitavad palju paremat tulemust kui varem kavandatud korpusspetsiifilised ja tugevalt funktsioonidega projekteeritud mudelid. Lisaks näitavad meie tulemused, et mõlema ülesande ühine optimeerimine on kõrge jõudluse tagamiseks ülioluline.', 'fi': 'Jotta argumentin rakenne voidaan määrittää tekstissä, on ymmärrettävä, miten argumentin yksittäiset komponentit linkitetään. Tässä työssä esitellään ensimmäinen neuroverkkopohjainen lähestymistapa linkkien uuttamiseen argumenttien louhintaan. Erityisesti ehdotamme uutta arkkitehtuuria, joka soveltaa Pointer Network sekvenssistä sekvenssiin -huomiomallinnusta rakenteelliseen ennustukseen diskurssin jäsennystehtävissä. Tämän jälkeen kehitämme yhteisen mallin, joka laajentaa tätä arkkitehtuuria käsittelemään samanaikaisesti linkin uuttamistehtävää ja argumenttikomponenttien luokittelua. Ehdotetulla yhteismallilla saavutetaan huippuluokan tulokset kahdella erillisellä arviointikorpusella, jotka osoittavat paljon parempaa suorituskykyä kuin aiemmin ehdotetut korpuskohtaiset ja voimakkaasti ominaisuuksiltaan suunnitellut mallit. Lisäksi tulokset osoittavat, että molempien tehtävien yhteinen optimointi on erittäin tärkeää korkean suorituskyvyn kannalta.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ombuddy CURRENTCURRENT, we proposal a rom architecture that aplies Point Point Network order-to-order responses modeing to structural preview in Diskusion sharing tasks. Define Joint model Label', 'sk': 'Da bi določili strukturo argumentov v besedilu, je treba razumeti, kako so posamezne komponente celotnega argumenta povezane. V tem delu je predstavljen prvi pristop, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju za ekstrakcijo povezav v rudarjenju argumentov. Natančneje predlagamo novo arhitekturo, ki uporablja modeliranje pozornosti od zaporedja do zaporedja kazalcev pri strukturnih napovedih v opravilih razčlenjanja diskurza. Nato razvijamo skupni model, ki razširi to arhitekturo in hkrati obravnava nalogo ekstrakcije povezav in klasifikacijo komponent argumenta. Predlagani skupni model dosega najsodobnejše rezultate na dveh ločenih vrednotenjskih korpusih, ki kažejo veliko boljšo učinkovitost od predhodno predlaganih modelov, specifičnih za korpus in močno oblikovanih funkcij. Poleg tega naši rezultati kažejo, da je skupna optimizacija obeh nalog ključnega pomena za visoko zmogljivost.', 'ha': "To, dõmin ka ƙayyade tsarin argument cikin matsayin, sai wani ya fahimta yadda aka haɗa ƙanshi guda na da jumla. Wannan aikin na nuna hanyar farkon shirin neural-na'ura zuwa zuwa shirin cire-cire da aka samu zuwa abun cikin minimis argument. A ƙayyade, Munã buɗa wani matsayin safa wanda ke amfani da shiryoyin muhalli-zuwa-sequence na Shirin Tagan na Nuna zuwa-sequence da ya yi motsi ga littafin kultur da ke cikin aikin yin mazaɓa. Sa'an nan kuma muna buɗe wani shirin haɗi wanda ke shimfiɗa wannan layin da za'a yi amfani da shi sami ɗaya ga aikin cire-go da kuma sifilafin ƙanshi na ƙanshi. Shirin da aka goyya da shirin haɗi ya sami matsalar-sararin-sananni a kan makampuni biyu daban, yana nuna mafi kyauta mai girma daga da aka buɗa shi a gabani da aka buɗa-bayani na-rubutu da misãlai masu inganci mai nau'i. Furan haka, matsaranmu sun nuna cewa, mafiya kyauta ga aikin dukansu na da muhimu ne ga mafarinsa.", 'he': 'כדי לקבוע מבנה טיעון בטקסט, עלינו להבין איך רכיבים בודדים של הטעון הכללי קשורים. העבודה הזו מציגה את הגישה הראשונה שמבוססת על רשת עצבית כדי לקשור חיפוש במכריית טיעונים. במיוחד, אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה חדשה שמשתמשת ברשת פוינטר רצף-רצף תשומת לב דוגמנית לחזוי מבנה במשימות בדיקת דיבורים. ואז אנחנו מפתחים מודל משותף שמאריך את הארכיטקטורה הזאת כדי להתייחס באותו הזמן למשימת החילוץ הקשר והקליפורה של רכיבי טיעון. המודל המשותף המוצע משיג תוצאות מוקדמות על שתי גופות עריכה נפרדות, מראות ביצועים הרבה יותר טובים מהמודלים המוצעים קודם, ספציפיים לקורפוס ומונדסים בכבדות. חוץ מזה, התוצאות שלנו מראות כי אופטימיזם משותף לשני המשימות הוא קריטי עבור ביצועים גבוהים.', 'bo': 'In order to determine argument structure in text, one must understand how individual components of the overall argument are linked. This work presents the first neural network-based approach to link extraction in argument mining. Specifically, we propose a new architecture that applies Pointer Network sequence-to-sequence attention modeling to structural prediction in discourse parsing tasks. We then develop a joint model that extends this architecture to simultaneously address the link extraction task and the classification of argument components. The proposed joint model achieves state-of-the-art results on two separate evaluation corpora, showing far superior performance than the previously proposed corpus-specific and heavily feature-engineered models. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐོག་འབྲས་གེ་དུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་ཆེན་པོ་ཡིན་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Identifying attack and support argumentative relations using deep learning', 'ar': 'تحديد الهجوم ودعم العلاقات الجدلية باستخدام التعلم العميق', 'pt': 'Identificando ataques e apoiando relações argumentativas usando aprendizado profundo', 'fr': "Identifier les attaques et soutenir les relations argumentatives à l'aide du deep learning", 'es': 'Identificar el ataque y apoyar las relaciones argumentativas mediante el aprendizaje profundo', 'ja': 'ディープラーニングを使用して、攻撃を特定し、議論関係をサポートする', 'zh': '以深学别攻助论证关系', 'hi': 'हमले की पहचान करना और गहरी शिक्षा का उपयोग करके तर्कसंगत संबंधों का समर्थन करना', 'ru': 'Выявление атаки и поддержка аргументативных отношений с использованием глубокого обучения', 'ga': 'Ionsaí a aithint agus tacú le caidreamh argóinteach trí úsáid a bhaint as foghlaim dhomhain', 'ka': 'ატრაქტის განსაზღვრება და აპორმენტიური შესახებ ძალიან სწავლების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A támadás azonosítása és az érvelő kapcsolatok támogatása mélytanulás segítségével', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός επίθεσης και υποστήριξη διαφωνικών σχέσεων χρησιμοποιώντας βαθιά μάθηση', 'it': 'Identificare attacchi e sostenere relazioni argomentative utilizzando il deep learning', 'kk': 'Тіпті оқытуды қолданатын аргументтік қатынастарды анықтау және қолдау', 'mk': 'Идентификување на нападот и поддршка на аргументативните односи користејќи длабоко учење', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ആക്രമണത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വാദിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങളെ പ', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ attakki u l-appoġġ ta’ relazzjonijiet argumentattivi permezz ta’ tagħlim profond', 'mn': 'Гүн гүнзгий суралцах аргументын харилцааныг тодорхойлж,', 'lt': 'Atakų nustatymas ir argumentacinių santykių palaikymas naudojant gilų mokymąsi', 'no': 'Identifiserer attack og støttar argumentative forhold med dyp læring', 'pl': 'Identyfikowanie ataków i wspieranie relacji argumentacyjnych przy użyciu głębokiego uczenia', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti serangan dan menyokong hubungan argumensif menggunakan belajar dalam', 'sr': 'Identifikacija napada i podrška argumentativnih odnosa koristeći duboko učenje', 'ro': 'Identificarea atacului și sprijinirea relațiilor argumentative folosind învățarea profundă', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න', 'so': 'aqoonsashada weerarka iyo kaalmeynta xiriirka arrimaha ka dooda ee isticmaalka waxbarashada aad u dheer', 'sv': 'Identifiera angrepp och stödja argumentativa relationer med hjälp av djupinlärning', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கற்றத்தை பயன்படுத்தி தர்க்கமான உறவுகளை அடையாளம் மற்றும் ஆதரவும்', 'ur': 'حملہ کا پہچان کرنا اور دلیل کی تعلیم کے مطابق مدد کرنا', 'uz': 'Identifying attack and support argumentative relations using deep learning', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng tấn công và hỗ trợ các quan hệ tranh luận', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на атаки и подкрепа на аргументативни отношения с помощта на дълбоко обучение', 'da': 'Identificere angreb og støtte argumentative relationer ved hjælp af dyb læring', 'nl': 'Identificeren van aanvallen en ondersteunen van argumentatieve relaties met behulp van deep learning', 'hr': 'Identificiranje napada i podrške argumentativnih odnosa koristeći duboko učenje', 'de': 'Erkennung von Angriffen und Unterstützung argumentativer Beziehungen durch Deep Learning', 'fa': 'با استفاده از یادگیری عمیق حمله و پشتیبانی رابطه\u200cهای ارتباطی', 'id': 'Identifikasi serangan dan mendukung hubungan argumensif menggunakan belajar dalam', 'sw': 'Kutambua shambulio na kuunga mkono mahusiano ya hoja kwa kutumia elimu ya kina', 'tr': 'Atyry tanyşdyrmak we tartışma baglaýyşlaryny derin öwrenmek üçin arkalanmak', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i sulmit dhe mbështetja e marrëdhënieve argumentuese duke përdorur mësimin e thellë', 'hy': 'Հաձակումը հայտնաբերելը և աջակցելը բանավեճող հարաբերությունների օգնությամբ խորը սովորելը', 'am': 'Identifying attack and support argumentative relations using deep learning', 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে আক্রমণ এবং যুক্তিগত সম্পর্ক পরিচয় এবং সমর্থন করুন', 'bs': 'Identificiranje napada i podrške argumentativnih odnosa koristeći duboko učenje', 'ko': '심도 있는 학습을 이용하여 공격을 식별하고 변론 관계를 지지하다', 'ca': "Identificar l'atac i sostenir les relacions argumentatives fent servir l'aprenentatge profund", 'cs': 'Identifikace útoků a podpora argumentativních vztahů pomocí hlubokého učení', 'et': 'Rünnakute tuvastamine ja argumentatiivsete suhete toetamine sügavõppe abil', 'fi': 'Hyökkäysten tunnistaminen ja argumentoivien suhteiden tukeminen syväoppimisen avulla', 'az': 'Sald캼r캼y캼 tan캼d캼rmaq v톛 d톛rin 칬yr톛nm톛k vasit톛sil톛 argumenti 톛laq톛l톛rini d톛st톛kl톛m톛k', 'he': 'מזהה תקיפה ותמיכה מערכות יחסים טיעונים באמצעות לימוד עמוק', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'sk': 'Identifikacija napada in podpora argumentativnim odnosom z uporabo globokega učenja', 'ha': 'Ina gane shawara da kuma ka ƙarfafa danganta masu yin husũma da amfani da amfani da barbara masu ƙaranci', 'bo': 'འཆར་བརྗོད་དང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྦྲེལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'We propose a deep learning architecture to capture argumentative relations of attack and support from one piece of text to another, of the kind that naturally occur in a debate. The architecture uses two (unidirectional or bidirectional) Long Short-Term Memory networks and (trained or non-trained) word embeddings, and allows to considerably improve upon existing techniques that use syntactic features and supervised classifiers for the same form of (relation-based) argument mining.', 'ar': 'نقترح بنية تعلم عميقة لالتقاط العلاقات الجدلية للهجوم والدعم من جزء من النص إلى آخر ، من النوع الذي يحدث بشكل طبيعي في المناظرة. تستخدم الهندسة المعمارية شبكتين (أحادي الاتجاه أو ثنائي الاتجاه) للذاكرة طويلة المدى و (مدربة أو غير مدربة) لتضمين الكلمات ، وتسمح بتحسين التقنيات الحالية التي تستخدم الميزات النحوية والمصنفات الخاضعة للإشراف لنفس الشكل من (القائمة على العلاقة ) تعدين الحجة.', 'es': 'Proponemos una arquitectura de aprendizaje profundo para capturar las relaciones argumentativas de ataque y apoyo de un texto a otro, del tipo que ocurre naturalmente en un debate. La arquitectura utiliza dos redes de memoria a corto plazo (unidireccionales o bidireccionales) e incrustaciones de palabras (entrenadas o no capacitadas), y permite mejorar considerablemente las técnicas existentes que utilizan características sintácticas y clasificadores supervisados para la misma forma de minería de argumentos (basada en relaciones).', 'fr': "Nous proposons une architecture d'apprentissage profond pour saisir les relations argumentatives d'attaque et de soutien d'un texte à l'autre, du type de celles qui se produisent naturellement dans un débat. L'architecture utilise deux réseaux de mémoire longue à court terme (unidirectionnels ou bidirectionnels) et des intégrations de mots (entraînés ou non), et permet d'améliorer considérablement les techniques existantes qui utilisent des caractéristiques syntaxiques et des classificateurs supervisés pour la même forme d'exploration d'arguments (basée sur les relations).", 'pt': 'Propomos uma arquitetura de deep learning para capturar relações argumentativas de ataque e apoio de um texto a outro, do tipo que ocorre naturalmente em um debate. A arquitetura usa duas redes de Long Short-Term Memory (unidirecionais ou bidirecionais) e incorporações de palavras (treinadas ou não treinadas), e permite melhorar consideravelmente as técnicas existentes que usam recursos sintáticos e classificadores supervisionados para a mesma forma de (relação-baseada ) mineração de argumentos.', 'ja': 'ディープラーニングのアーキテクチャを提案し、議論の中で自然に発生するような、あるテキストから別のテキストへの攻撃とサポートの議論的関係を取り込む。このアーキテクチャは、2つの（一方向または双方向の）長い短期メモリネットワークと（トレーニング済みまたは非トレーニング済みの）単語埋め込みを使用し、同じ形式の（リレーションシップベースの）引数マイニングに構文機能と監視された分類子を使用する既存のテクニックを大幅に改善することができる。', 'zh': '吾言深学架构,以得一文本至于攻助之论,自然之理也。 其架构用二(单向或双向)长短期记网络与(经教、未练者)词嵌之,并许大改用语法特徵与督分类器同文者(基于)参数掘见术。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем архитектуру глубокого обучения для захвата аргументативных отношений атаки и поддержки от одного фрагмента текста к другому, таких, которые естественно происходят в дебатах. Архитектура использует две (однонаправленные или двунаправленные) сети длинной краткосрочной памяти и (обученные или не обученные) вложения слов, и позволяет значительно улучшить существующие методы, которые используют синтаксические признаки и контролируемые классификаторы для той же формы (основанной на соотношении) интеллектуального анализа аргументов.', 'hi': 'हम हमले के तर्कसंगत संबंधों को पकड़ने के लिए एक गहरी सीखने की वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और पाठ के एक टुकड़े से दूसरे में समर्थन करते हैं, उस तरह का जो स्वाभाविक रूप से बहस में होता है। आर्किटेक्चर दो (यूनिडायरेक्शनल या द्विदिश) लॉन्ग-शॉर्ट-टर्म मेमोरी नेटवर्क और (प्रशिक्षित या गैर-प्रशिक्षित) शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है, और मौजूदा तकनीकों पर काफी सुधार करने की अनुमति देता है जो वाक्यात्मक सुविधाओं का उपयोग करते हैं और (संबंध-आधारित) तर्क खनन के एक ही रूप के लिए पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid ailtireacht dhomhainfhoghlama chun caidreamh argóinteach ionsaithe agus tacaíochta a ghabháil ó phíosa téacs amháin go píosa eile, den chineál a tharlaíonn go nádúrtha i ndíospóireacht. Úsáideann an ailtireacht dhá ghréasán Cuimhne Fadtéarmach (aontreoch nó déthreorach) agus leabaithe focal (oilte nó neamhoilte), agus ceadaíonn sé feabhas mór a chur ar theicnící atá ann cheana a úsáideann gnéithe comhréire agus aicmitheoirí maoirsithe don fhoirm chéanna de (coibhneas-bhunaithe). ) mianadóireacht argóint.', 'hu': 'Olyan mélytanulási architektúrát javasolunk, amely megragadja a támadás és a támogatás érvelő viszonyát egyik szövegről a másikra, olyan típust, amely természetesen előfordul egy vita során. Az architektúra két (egyirányú vagy kétirányú) hosszú rövid távú memória hálózatot és (képzett vagy nem képzett) szóbeágyazást használ, és lehetővé teszi, hogy jelentősen fejlessze a meglévő technikákat, amelyek szintaktikus funkciókat és felügyelt osztályozókat használnak ugyanazon formájú (kapcsolat alapú) argumentumbányászat.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική βαθιάς μάθησης για να αποτυπώσουμε διαφωνικές σχέσεις επίθεσης και υποστήριξης από το ένα κομμάτι κειμένου στο άλλο, του είδους που συμβαίνει φυσικά σε μια συζήτηση. Η αρχιτεκτονική χρησιμοποιεί δύο (μονοκατευθυνόμενα ή αμφίδρομη) δίκτυα Μακροπρόθεσμης Μνήμης και (εκπαιδευμένα ή μη εκπαιδευμένα) ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, και επιτρέπει τη σημαντική βελτίωση των υφιστάμενων τεχνικών που χρησιμοποιούν συντακτικά χαρακτηριστικά και εποπτευόμενους ταξινομητές για την ίδια μορφή εξόρυξης ορίων (βασισμένης σε σχέση).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მუშაობთ ძალიან სწავლის არქტიქტიკური აღმოჩენების არქტიქტური შესახებ და აღმოჩენების ერთი ტექსტის ნაწილიდან მეორედ, რომელიც ჩემი განსახულებაში მოხდება. არქტიქტიკური გამოყენება ორი (ერთეთრექციონალური ან ორიეთრექციონალური) ძირითადი მეხსიერების ქსელები და (შემწავლობული ან არ შემწავლობული) სიტყვების ინტერქტიკურები, და შესაძლებელია ძალიან უფრო მეტივად გააკეთება, რომელიც სინტ', 'it': "Proponiamo un'architettura di deep learning per catturare relazioni argomentative di attacco e sostegno da un pezzo di testo all'altro, del tipo che si verificano naturalmente in un dibattito. L'architettura utilizza due reti di memoria a breve termine lunghe (unidirezionali o bidirezionali) e incorporazioni di parole (addestrate o non) e consente di migliorare notevolmente le tecniche esistenti che utilizzano funzioni sintattiche e classificatori supervisionati per la stessa forma di argument mining (basato sulle relazioni).", 'kk': 'Біз бір мәтіннің бір бөлігінен басқа бөлігіне қолдауын аргументалдық қатынастарын түсіруге және бір бөлігінен басқа бөлігіне қатынау архитектурасын ұсынамыз. Архитектура екі (бірбағытты немесе бірбағытты) қысқа уақыт жады желілерін және (оқылған немесе оқылмаған) сөздерді ендіру және синтактикалық мүмкіндіктерді және басқару классификацияларын бір (қатынас негізделген) аргументтің бағыттауының түріне қолд', 'lt': 'Mes siūlome gilaus mokymosi architektūrą, kurioje būtų aptariami argumentaciniai santykiai dėl išpuolių ir paramos iš vieno teksto į kitą, tokie, kurie, žinoma, vyksta diskusijose. Arhitektūra naudoja du (vienakrypčius arba dvikrypčius) ilgalaikio trumpalaikio atminties tinklus ir (apmokytus arba neplanuotus) žodžių įdėjimus ir leidžia gerokai pagerinti esamus metodus, kuriais naudojami sintetiniai požymiai ir prižiūrimi klasifikatoriai tos pačios formos (santykiais pagrįstos) argument ų gavybai.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കാര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, ആക്രമണത്തിന്റെ വാദ്യാഭ്യാസ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പിടിക The architecture uses two (unidirectional or bidirectional) Long Short-Term Memory networks and (trained or non-trained) word embeddings, and allows to considerably improve upon existing techniques that use syntactic features and supervised classifiers for the same form of (relation-based) argument mining.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan arkitektur belajar dalam untuk menangkap hubungan argumentatif serangan dan sokongan dari satu bahagian teks ke yang lain, jenis yang secara alami berlaku dalam perdebatan. Arkitektur menggunakan dua rangkaian ingatan jangka pendek panjang (satu arah atau dua arah) dan (dilatih atau tidak dilatih) pelengkapan perkataan, dan membenarkan untuk meningkatkan secara konsideratif pada teknik yang wujud yang menggunakan ciri-ciri sintaktik dan pengendali yang diawasi untuk bentuk (berdasarkan hubungan) pelengkapan argumen yang sama.', 'mt': "Aħna qed nipproponu arkitettura ta' tagħlim profond biex jinqabdu relazzjonijiet argumentattivi ta' attakk u appoġġ minn biċċa test għal oħra, tat-tip li naturalment iseħħ f'dibattitu. The architecture uses two (unidirectional or bidirectional) Long Short-Term Memory networks and (trained or non-trained) word embeddings, and allows to considerably improve upon existing techniques that use syntactic features and supervised classifiers for the same form of (relation-based) argument mining.", 'mn': 'Бид суралцах архитектур гэх мэт санал өгдөг. Яг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг нэг хэсгийг дэмжих боломжтой. Архитектур нь хоёр (нэг зэрэгцээ, хоёр зэрэгцээ, хоёр зэрэгцээ) урт хугацааны Memory networks болон (сургалтын, сургалтын болон сургалтын) үгнүүдийг ашиглаж, синтактик чанар болон удирдлагатай классификатор ашигладаг (харилцааны сургалтын) аргументын хөрөнгө ору', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein dyp læringsarkitektur for å ta opp argumentativ forhold til attack og støtte frå ein tekst til ein annan, av den typen som naturleg skjer i ein debatt. Arkitekturen brukar to (unidireksjonale eller bidireksjonale) lang kortmannnettverk og (trengte eller ikkje trengte) ord-innbygging, og tillet deg godt forbedra på eksisterande teknikkar som brukar syntaktiske funksjonar og oversikte klassifikatorar for same form av (relasjonsbasert) argument-minning.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy architekturę głębokiego uczenia, aby uchwycić argumentacyjne relacje ataku i wsparcia z jednego fragmentu tekstu do drugiego, takie jakie naturalnie występują w debacie. Architektura wykorzystuje dwie (jednokierunkowe lub dwukierunkowe) sieci pamięci długoterminowej oraz (przeszkolone lub nieprzeszkolone) osadzenia słów i pozwala znacznie ulepszyć istniejące techniki, które wykorzystują funkcje składni i nadzorowane klasyfikatory dla tej samej formy (relacje oparte) eksploracji argumentów.', 'ro': 'Propunem o arhitectură de învățare profundă pentru a surprinde relațiile argumentative de atac și sprijin de la o bucată de text la alta, de genul care apar în mod natural într-o dezbatere. Arhitectura utilizează două rețele de memorie pe termen scurt lung (unidirecționale sau bidirecționale) și încorporări de cuvinte (instruite sau non-instruite) și permite îmbunătățirea considerabilă a tehnicilor existente care utilizează caracteristici sintactice și clasificatori supravegheați pentru aceeași formă de mining de argumente (bazate pe relații).', 'sr': 'Predlažemo duboku arhitekturu učenja da uhvati argumentativne odnose napada i podrške od jednog komada teksta na drugu, kao što se prirodno događa u debati. Arhitektura koristi dve (jednodirektivne ili dvodirektivne) dugoročne mreže uspomene i (obučene ili ne obučene) uključenje riječi i omogućava značajno poboljšati postojeće tehnike koje koriste sintaktične funkcije i nadzorne klasifikacije za isti oblik rudarstva argumenata (na osnovu odnosa).', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa dhismo aad u dheer oo waxbarasho si aan u qabno xiriirka arrimaha arrimaha ka dooda iyo kaalmeynta ka qaadno qeyb ka mid ah warqad kale, nooca dabiicadda ka soo baxa debaar. Arkturku wuxuu isticmaalaa laba shabakado xubnaha dheer ee waqtiga dheer iyo (tababarida ama aan wax baranayn) oo ku qoran hadal, wuxuuna si aad ah u hagaajin karaa qalabka heysta oo isticmaalaya taynuunnada syntactika iyo kooxaha la ilaaliyo si isku foom ah oo qiimaha ah (xiriirka).', 'si': 'අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බිද්ධිපත්තියක් ප්\u200dරශ්න සම්බන්ධයක් අල්ලගන්න සහ පරික්ෂණ සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා වගේ පාළ ස්ථාපනය දෙකක් භාවිතා කරනවා (නිර්ධාරණය නැත්තම් නැත්තම්) ලොකු කොට්ටර්ම් මතක ජාලය සහ (ස්ථාපනය නැත්තම් නැත්තම්) වචනය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, සහ සම්බන්ධ විශ', 'sv': 'Vi f철resl책r en djupinl채rningsarkitektur f철r att f책nga argumentativa relationer av attack och st철d fr책n en text till en annan, av det slag som naturligt f철rekommer i en debatt. Arkitekturen anv채nder tv책 (enkelriktade eller tv책riktade) Long Short-Term Memory n채tverk och (utbildade eller icke-utbildade) ord inb채ddningar, och g철r det m철jligt att avsev채rt f철rb채ttra befintliga tekniker som anv채nder syntaktiska funktioner och 철vervakade klassificerare f철r samma form av (relationsbaserad) argumentmining.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме длабоко учење архитектура за заземање аргументативни односи на напад и поддршка од еден дел на текст до друг, такви што природно се случуваат во дебата. Архитектурата користи две (еднонасочни или двонасочни) долгорочни мрежи на краткорочен меморија и (обучени или необучени) вградувања на зборови, и овозможува значително подобрување на постоечките техники кои користат синтактички карактеристики и надгледувани класификатори за истата форма на (врска-базирано) рудање на аргумент', 'ur': 'ہم ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ حملہ کے ارتباط اور ایک ٹکڑے سے دوسرے سے مدد کریں، اس طرح کی جو طبیعی طور پر ایک بحث میں اتر رہی ہے۔ یہ معماری دو (غیر دقیق یا غیر دقیق) لانگ ترمیم میموری نیٹورک اور (تعلیم یا غیر تعلیم) کلمات ابڈینگ استعمال کرتا ہے، اور موجود تکنیکیوں پر بہت اچھی طرح استعمال کرتا ہے جو سینٹکتیک ویژگی اور تحت نظر کی کلاسیر استعمال کرتی ہیں (رابطہ پر بنیاد رکھنے والی) ارتباط مینگ کے', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் கட்டுப்பாட்டு தேவையான தொடர்புகளை பிடித்து மற்றும் ஒரு உரை துண்டிலிருந்து மற்றொரு துண்டு,  நீண்ட நினைவு வலைப்பின்னல்கள் மற்றும் (பயிற்சி அல்லது பயிற்சி செய்யப்படாத) வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுகிறது, தற்போதைய தொழில்நுட்பங்களை பயன்படுத்தும் ஒத்திசைவு பண்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும் வகுப்பாளர்கள', 'uz': "Biz o'rganish muammolarini tasavvur qilamiz va bir matnning bir qismdan boshqa qismga qo'llash uchun o'rganish muammolarni o'rganamiz va oddiy javob davomida bo'ladi. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một kiến trúc văn học sâu sắc để nắm bắt các quan hệ khủng khiếp về tấn công và hỗ trợ từ một phần văn bản sang một phần khác, cũng giống như trong cuộc tranh luận. Kiến trúc sử dụng hai mạng lưới bộ nhớ ngắn ngủi (theo hướng trực tiếp) dài hạn và (huấn luyện hay chưa được huấn luyện) từ ngữ, và cho phép cải thiện đáng kể kỹ thuật tồn tại sử dụng các tính năng cú pháp và các phân loại giám sát cho cùng một dạng (tương quan) khai thác tranh luận.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме архитектура за дълбоко учене, която улавя аргументативните отношения на атака и подкрепа от едно парче текст в друго, от вида, който естествено се появява в дебат. Архитектурата използва две (еднопосочни или двупосочни) мрежи за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет и (обучени или необучени) вграждания на думи и позволява значително подобряване на съществуващите техники, които използват синтактични характеристики и контролирани класификатори за една и съща форма на (базирано на релации) аргументиране.', 'nl': 'We stellen een deep learning architectuur voor om argumentatieve relaties van aanval en steun van het ene stuk tekst naar het andere vast te leggen, zoals die natuurlijk voorkomen in een debat. De architectuur maakt gebruik van twee (unidirectionele of bidirectionele) Long-Term Memory netwerken en (getrainde of niet-getrainde) woord embeddings, en maakt het mogelijk om bestaande technieken aanzienlijk te verbeteren die syntactische functies en begeleide classificatoren gebruiken voor dezelfde vorm van (relatie-based) argument mining.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en dyb læring arkitektur til at fange argumenterende relationer af angreb og støtte fra det ene stykke tekst til det andet, af den slags, der naturligt forekommer i en debat. Arkitekturen bruger to (ensrettede eller tovejede) korttidshukommelsesnetværk og (uddannede eller ikke-uddannede) ord indlejringer, og gør det muligt at forbedre eksisterende teknikker, der bruger syntaktiske funktioner og overvågede klassificeringer til samme form for (relationsbaseret) argumentmining.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo duboku arhitekturu učenja da uhvati argumentativne odnose napada i podrške od jednog dijela teksta na drugo, kao što se prirodno događa u debati. Arhitektura koristi dvije (jednodirektivne ili dvodirektivne) dugoročne mreže uspomene i (obučene ili ne obučene) uključene riječi i omogućava značajno poboljšati postojeće tehnike koje koriste sintaktične funkcije i nadzorne klasifikacije za isti oblik rudarstva argumenata (na osnovu odnosa).', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine Deep Learning Architektur vor, um argumentative Beziehungen von Angriff und Unterstützung von einem Stück Text zum anderen festzuhalten, wie sie natürlich in einer Debatte auftreten. Die Architektur verwendet zwei (unidirektionale oder bidirektionale) Long-Term-Memory-Netzwerke und (trainierte oder nicht trainierte) Wort-Einbettungen und ermöglicht es, bestehende Techniken, die syntaktische Features und überwachte Klassifikatoren für die gleiche Form des (relationsbasierten) Argument Mining verwenden, erheblich zu verbessern.', 'id': 'We propose a deep learning architecture to capture argumentative relations of attack and support from one piece of text to another, of the kind that naturally occur in a debate.  Arsitektur menggunakan dua jaringan (unidireksi atau bidireksi) Memori Jarak Panjang Jarak Sederhana dan (dilatih atau tidak dilatih) pembangunan kata, dan memungkinkan untuk meningkatkan secara konsideratif pada teknik yang ada yang menggunakan fitur sintaksi dan klasifikasi yang diawasi untuk bentuk (berdasarkan hubungan) argumen tambang yang sama.', 'fa': 'ما یک معماری عمیق یادگیری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا رابطه\u200cهای دلایل حمله و پشتیبانی از یک قطعه از متن به دیگر بگیرد، از طریق طبیعی که در یک بحث اتفاق می\u200cافتد. این معماری از شبکه\u200cهای حافظه کوتاه\u200cی طولانی و (آموزش یا غیر آموزش) کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکند، و اجازه می\u200cدهد به زیادی بر تکنیک\u200cهای موجود بهتر شود که از ویژه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک استفاده می\u200cکنند و مخلوقات\u200cهای مخلوقات\u200cشده برای یک شکل مصنوعی (بر روی ارتباط) استفاده کنند.', 'ko': '우리는 한 편의 텍스트에서 다른 한 편의 텍스트로의 공격과 지지의 변론 관계를 포착하기 위해 깊이 있는 학습 구조를 제시했는데 이런 관계는 변론에서 자연히 발생한다.이 시스템 구조는 두 개(단방향 또는 양방향)의 장-단기 기억 네트워크와 (훈련을 거치거나 훈련을 거치지 않은) 단어를 삽입하고 문법 특징과 감독 분류기를 사용하여 같은 형식(관계 기반) 파라미터를 발굴하는 기존 기술을 현저하게 개선할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza ujenzi wa kina wa kujifunza ili kushambulia mahusiano ya hoja ya shambulio na kuunga mkono kutoka kwenye kipande cha ujumbe mmoja hadi mwingine, a in a inayotokea kwa asili katika mjadala. Ujengo huo unatumia mitandao miwili (ya muda mrefu au wa kiungo) ya kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu na maneno (yanayofundishwa au yasiyo na mafunzo) na yanaruhusu kuboresha sana kwa mbinu zilizopo zinazotumia vipengele vya ushirikiano na kuwafuatilia vifaa hivyo kwa ajili ya uchimbaji wa mijadala (inayohusiana na mahusiano).', 'tr': 'Biz çykyş bilen özümize golaý öwrenme arhitekturlygyny çykarmak we özümize bir metin bölüminden bir arhitekturlygyny golaýlamak üçin teklip berýäris. Bu taryşmalarda dogry bolan ýaly. Arhitektura iki (sany gabdaly ýa-da abjermek üçin) Uzun-Term Haýraty Aýraty Aýraty we (eğlenmiş ýa-da eğlenmedik) söz gabdalyklaryny ulanýar we ol ýerde syntaktik karakterlerden we üstlenýän klassiflerden bir şekilde ullanjak üçin ullanýar.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n diep leer arkitektuur om argumentatiewe verhouding van atak en ondersteun te vang van een stuk teks na 'n ander, van die soort wat natuurlik in 'n debat voorkom. Die arkitektuur gebruik twee (unidireksionale of bidireksionale) lang-Terminaal Geheue netwerke en (onderwerp of nie-onderwerp) woord inbettings, en toelaat om betydelik te verbeter op bestaande teknike wat sintaktika funksies en onderwerp klassifiseerders gebruik vir dieselfde vorm van (relation-based) argument-minning.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një arkitekturë mësimi të thellë për të kapur marrëdhëniet argumentuese të sulmit dhe mbështetjes nga një copë teksti në tjetrën, të llojit që natyrisht ndodhin në një debat. Arkitektura përdor dy rrjete të kujtesës afat-gjatë (njëdrejtuese apo dy drejtuese) dhe (të stërvitura apo jo të stërvitura) fjalësh të përbashkëta dhe lejon të përmirësohet konsiderueshëm mbi teknikat ekzistuese që përdorin karakteristika sintaktike dhe klasifikuesit e mbikqyrur për të njëjtin form ë (bazuar në marrëdhënie) të minierës së argumenteve.', 'am': 'የጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለመያዝ እና ከጽሑፍ አንደኛ ክፍል ወደ ሌላው ለመደገፍ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት ሁለት (unidirectional ወይም ጣራ) የረጅም የረጅም የቆራጭ ማስታወሻ መረብ እና (ተማሪ ወይም ያልtrained) ቃላት የሚጠቀሙትን እና (ተማሪዎች ወይም ያልተማረሩ) ቃላትን የሚጠቅሙትን እና ለዚህ ዓይነት (ግንኙነት-based) መግለጫ የሚጠቀሙትን እና የተጠበቀውን መግለጫ በሚጠቅሙት ስልጣናዎች ላይ እጅግ ያበጅላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք խորը ուսումնասիրության ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի վերցնենք հարձակումների և աջակցության բանավեճող հարաբերությունները մեկ տեքստի կտորից մյուսին, այնպիսի բանավեճի ժամանակ, որը բնական է տեղի ունենում: The architecture uses two (unidirectional or bidirectional) Long Short-Term Memory networks and (trained or non-trained) word embeddings, and allows to considerably improve upon existing techniques that use syntactic features and supervised classifiers for the same form of (relation-based) argument mining.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষা কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করছি যে আক্রমণের যুক্তিগত সম্পর্ক গ্রহণ করে এবং একটি টেক্সট থেকে অন্যের সমর্থন পাওয়া যায়, যা স্বাভাবি আর্কিকেটার ব্যবহার করে দুটি (একইনডিয়েশনাল অথবা বিদ্যমান) লম্বা সংক্ষিপ্ত মেমোরি নেটওয়ার্ক এবং (প্রশিক্ষিত অথবা অট্রেনিশ্চিত) শব্দ ব্যবহার করে, আর বিদ্যমান প্রযুক্তির ব্যাপারে বিশেষ উন্নতি', 'ca': "Proposem una arquitectura d'aprenentatge profund per capturar relacions argumentatives d'atac i suport d'una peça de text a l'altra, del tipus que ocurreix naturalment en un debat. L'arquitectura utilitza dues (unidireccionals o bidireccionals) xarxes de memòria a curt termini i (entrenats o no entrenats) incorporacions de paraules, i permet millorar considerablement les tècniques existents que utilitzen característiques sinàctiques i classificadors supervisats per la mateixa forma de mineria d'arguments (basada en relacions).", 'bs': 'Predlažemo duboku arhitekturu učenja da uhvati argumentativne odnose napada i podrške od jednog komada teksta na drugu, kao što se prirodno događa u debati. Arhitektura koristi dvije (jednodirektivne ili dvodirektivne) dugoročne mreže uspomene i (obučene ili ne obučene) uključene riječi i omogućava znatno poboljšati postojeće tehnike koje koriste sintaktične funkcije i nadzorne klasifikacije za isti oblik rudarstva argumenta (na osnovu odnosa).', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme architekturu hlubokého učení, která zachytí argumentativní vztahy útoku a podpory z jednoho kusu textu k druhému, takového druhu, který se přirozeně vyskytuje v debatě. Architektura využívá dvě (jednosměrné nebo obousměrné) sítě dlouhodobé krátkodobé paměti a (trénované nebo netrénované) vložení slov a umožňuje výrazně zlepšit stávající techniky využívající syntaktické prvky a dohledované klasifikátory pro stejnou formu (relace-based) dolování argumentů.', 'et': 'Me pakume välja sügavõppe arhitektuuri, et jäädvustada argumentatiivsed rünnaku- ja toetussuhted ühest tekstitükist teise, sellised, mis loomulikult esinevad arutelus. Arhitektuur kasutab kahte (ühesuunalist või kahesuunalist) pikaajalist mälu võrku ja (koolitatud või koolitamata) sõna manustamist ning võimaldab märkimisväärselt täiustada olemasolevaid tehnikaid, mis kasutavad süntaktilisi funktsioone ja järelevalve all olevaid klassifitseerijaid sama vormi (seospõhise) argumentide kaevandamiseks.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme syv瓣oppimisarkkitehtuuria, joka vangitsee argumentoivat hy繹kk瓣yksen ja tuen suhteet tekstist瓣 toiseen, jollaisia luonnollisesti esiintyy keskustelussa. Arkkitehtuuri k瓣ytt瓣瓣 kahta (yksisuuntaista tai kaksisuuntaista) pitk瓣n aikav瓣lin muistiverkkoa ja (koulutettua tai kouluttamatonta) sanaupotusta, ja sen avulla voidaan merkitt瓣v瓣sti parantaa olemassa olevia tekniikoita, jotka k瓣ytt瓣v瓣t syntaktisia ominaisuuksia ja valvottuja luokittelijoita samantyyppiseen (suhteeseen perustuvaan) argumenttien louhintaan.', 'az': 'Biz bir mətn parçasından bir-birinə dəstək vermək üçün dərin öyrənmək arhitektarını təklif edirik ki, bu tartışmalarda doğal olar. Arhitektura iki (tərəfli və ya iki tərəfli) Uzun Qısqa-Term Memory ağlarını və (təhsil edilmiş və ya təhsil edilməmiş) söz inşallarını istifadə edir və sintaktik özellikləri və təhsil edilmiş klassifikatlarını aynı (bağlı) argument minik məlumatının şəkilində istifadə edən mevcut tekniklərə çox yaxşılaşdırmağa imkan verir.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasai arquitur sakjane nggawe gerakno perkaraan pangan ning awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang seneng pisan sampek kanggo mbatalé, iki dadi sakjane perkaraan sakjane kanggo debatara. architecture', 'ha': 'Tuna goyya da matsayin sarki mai zura da za mu kãma danganta masu husũma na shawara kuma mu ƙarfafa daga wani takarda matsayi zuwa wani na daban, irin da ke iya cikin jayaya. Ana amfani da zanen aikin shaidar Naurar-Lokaci na Long-Short-Cire da kuma (an sanar da shi ko kuwa ba da tsari ba), kuma yana yarda da yin kyauta mai girma a kan kunnuwanta wanda ke amfani da tayammatin syntactic da kuma an tsare fassarai masu cikin misalin maganar da ke samu.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo arhitekturo globokega učenja za zajemanje argumentativnih odnosov napada in podpore iz enega dela besedila v drugega, takšnih, ki se naravno pojavljajo v razpravi. Arhitektura uporablja dve (enosmerni ali dvosmerni) mreži dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilnika in (usposobljeni ali neusposobljeni) vgradnje besed ter omogoča znatno izboljšanje obstoječih tehnik, ki uporabljajo sintaktične značilnosti in nadzorovane klasifikatorje za isto obliko (na osnovi relacij) rudarjenja argumentov.', 'he': 'אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה למידה עמוקה כדי לתפוס יחסים מתווכחים של התקפה ותמיכה מקטע טקסט אחד לאחר, מהסוג שמתרחש באופן טבעי בתוך דיון. הארכיטקטורה משתמשת בשני רשתות זיכרון ארוכות לטווח קצר (חד-כיוון או שתיים-כיוון) ובמילים (מאומנות או לא מאומנות), ומאפשרת לשפר באופן משמעותי על טכניקות קיימות אשר משתמשות בכישורים סינטקטיים וקlassifikatורים מפקחים לאותה צורה של מכירת טיעונים (מבוססת על יחסים).', 'bo': 'We propose a deep learning architecture to capture argumentative relations of attack and support from one of text to another, of the kind that naturally occurs in a debate. The architecture uses two (unidirectional or bidirectional) Long Short-Term Memory networks and (trained or non-trained) word embeddings, and allows to considerably improve upon existing techniques that use syntactic features and supervised classifiers for the same form of (relation-based) argument mining.'}
{'en': 'Memory-augmented Neural Machine Translation', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal aumentada con memoria', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية المعززة بالذاكرة', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale augmentée par la mémoire', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural com memória aumentada', 'zh': '记增神经机器译', 'hi': 'स्मृति संवर्धित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ja': '記憶拡張ニューラル機械翻訳', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод с расширением памяти', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-mhéadaithe Cuimhne', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Memóriaerősített neurális fordítás', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση με ενισχυμένη μνήμη', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale aumentata della memoria', 'kk': 'Жады өзгертілген нейрал машинаның аудармасыName', 'lt': 'Atminties didinimo neurologinės mašinos vertimas', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural Ditambah Memori', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali miżjuda bil-Memorja', 'ml': 'മെമ്മറി- ആഗ്രഹിച്ച നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mn': 'Цаг санамж нэмэгдсэн сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт', 'no': 'Omsetjing av minne-økt neuralmaskin', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie maszynowe z rozszerzoną pamięcią', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală augmentată cu memorie', 'sr': 'Povećanje pamćenja Neuralnog prevoda mašine', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Turjumista maskinenka neurada ee xasuusta lagu daray', 'sv': 'Minnesförstärkad neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'நினைவகம் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'مہمانی-افزایش کی نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy thần kinh tăng', 'bg': 'Машинен превод с увеличена памет', 'hr': 'Povećanje pamćenja Neuralnog prevoda stroja', 'nl': 'Geheugen-augmented neuronale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Hukommelsesforøget neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Memory-Augmented Neurol Machine Translation', 'id': 'Memory-augmented Machine Neural Translation', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی با افزایش حافظه', 'ko': '기억 증강형 신경', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'tr': 'Hata Maglumat', 'af': 'Geheue- vergroot neurale masjien vertaling', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinës nervore të rritur nga kujtesa', 'az': 'Yadın artırılmış nöral maşın çevirimi', 'bn': 'মেমোরি- অতিরিক্ত নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Povećanje pamćenja Neuralnog prevoda stroja', 'ca': 'La traducció de la màquina neuronal augmentada per la memòria', 'cs': 'Strojový překlad s rozšířením paměti', 'et': 'Mälu suurendatud neuraalne masintõlge', 'fi': 'Muistia lisätty neurokonekäännös', 'hy': 'Հիշողությամբ բարձրացված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'sk': 'Strojno prevajanje živcev z povečanim pomnilnikom', 'ha': 'translation', 'he': 'תורגם על ידי זיכרון', 'bo': 'Memory-augmented Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) has achieved notable success in recent times, however it is also widely recognized that this approach has limitations with handling infrequent words and word pairs. This paper presents a novel memory-augmented NMT (M-NMT) architecture, which stores knowledge about how words (usually infrequently encountered ones) should be translated in a memory and then utilizes them to assist the neural model. We use this memory mechanism to combine the knowledge learned from a conventional statistical machine translation system and the rules learned by an NMT system, and also propose a solution for out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words based on this framework. Our experiments on two Chinese-English translation tasks demonstrated that the M-NMT architecture outperformed the NMT baseline by 9.0 and 2.7 BLEU points on the two tasks, respectively. Additionally, we found this architecture resulted in a much more effective OOV treatment compared to competitive methods.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) a connu un succès notable ces derniers temps, mais il est également largement reconnu que cette approche présente des limites dans la gestion des mots et des paires de mots peu fréquents. Cet article présente une nouvelle architecture NMT augmentée en mémoire (M-NMT), qui stocke les connaissances sur la façon dont les mots (généralement ceux qui sont rarement rencontrés) doivent être traduits dans une mémoire, puis les utilise pour aider le modèle neuronal. Nous utilisons ce mécanisme de mémoire pour combiner les connaissances acquises à partir d'un système de traduction automatique statistique classique et les règles apprises par un système NMT, et proposons également une solution pour les mots hors vocabulaire (OOV) basée sur ce cadre. Nos expériences sur deux tâches de traduction chinois-anglais ont démontré que l'architecture M-NMT surpassait la référence NMT de 9,0 et 2,7 points BLEU sur les deux tâches, respectivement. De plus, nous avons constaté que cette architecture permettait d'obtenir un traitement par voie orale beaucoup plus efficace que les méthodes concurrentes.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural (NMT) alcançou um sucesso notável nos últimos tempos, no entanto, também é amplamente reconhecido que essa abordagem tem limitações ao lidar com palavras e pares de palavras pouco frequentes. Este artigo apresenta uma nova arquitetura NMT aumentada de memória (M-NMT), que armazena o conhecimento sobre como as palavras (geralmente encontradas com pouca frequência) devem ser traduzidas em uma memória e as utiliza para auxiliar o modelo neural. Usamos esse mecanismo de memória para combinar o conhecimento aprendido de um sistema convencional de tradução automática estatística e as regras aprendidas por um sistema NMT, e também propomos uma solução para palavras fora do vocabulário (OOV) com base nesse framework. Nossos experimentos em duas tarefas de tradução chinês-inglês demonstraram que a arquitetura M-NMT superou a linha de base NMT em 9,0 e 2,7 pontos BLEU nas duas tarefas, respectivamente. Além disso, descobrimos que essa arquitetura resultou em um tratamento OOV muito mais eficaz em comparação com os métodos concorrentes.', 'ar': 'حققت الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) نجاحًا ملحوظًا في الآونة الأخيرة ، ولكن من المعروف أيضًا أن هذا النهج له قيود في التعامل مع الكلمات النادرة وأزواج الكلمات. تقدم هذه الورقة بنية NMT (M-NMT) جديدة مدعمة بالذاكرة ، والتي تخزن المعرفة حول كيفية ترجمة الكلمات (التي نادرًا ما يتم مواجهتها) في الذاكرة ثم استخدامها لمساعدة النموذج العصبي. نستخدم آلية الذاكرة هذه للجمع بين المعرفة المستفادة من نظام الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية التقليدية والقواعد التي تعلمها نظام NMT ، وكذلك نقترح حلًا للكلمات خارج المفردات (OOV) بناءً على هذا الإطار. أظهرت تجاربنا في مهمتين للترجمة الصينية-الإنجليزية أن بنية M-NMT تفوقت على خط الأساس NMT بمقدار 9.0 و 2.7 نقطة BLEU في المهمتين ، على التوالي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، وجدنا أن هذه البنية أدت إلى علاج OOV أكثر فاعلية مقارنة بالطرق التنافسية.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal (NMT) ha logrado un éxito notable en los últimos tiempos, sin embargo, también se reconoce ampliamente que este enfoque tiene limitaciones en el manejo de palabras y pares de palabras poco frecuentes. Este artículo presenta una novedosa arquitectura NMT de memoria aumentada (M-NMT), que almacena el conocimiento sobre cómo las palabras (generalmente las que se encuentran con poca frecuencia) deben traducirse en una memoria y luego las utiliza para ayudar al modelo neuronal. Utilizamos este mecanismo de memoria para combinar el conocimiento aprendido de un sistema de traducción automática estadística convencional y las reglas aprendidas por un sistema NMT, y también proponemos una solución para palabras fuera de vocabulario (OOV) basada en este marco. Nuestros experimentos en dos tareas de traducción chino-inglés demostraron que la arquitectura M-NMT superó la línea base de NMT en 9,0 y 2,7 puntos BLEU en las dos tareas, respectivamente. Además, descubrimos que esta arquitectura dio como resultado un tratamiento de OOV mucho más eficaz en comparación con los métodos de la competencia.', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）は、近年顕著な成功を収めているが、このアプローチは、頻度の低い単語と単語ペアを扱うことに限界があることも広く認識されている。この論文では、メモリ拡張NMT （ M - NMT ）アーキテクチャを紹介しています。このアーキテクチャは、単語（通常は頻繁に遭遇する単語）がメモリにどのように翻訳されるべきかに関する知識を格納し、それらを利用してニューラルモデルを支援します。従来の統計的機械翻訳システムから学んだ知識とNMTシステムから学んだルールを組み合わせるためにこのメモリメカニズムを使用し、このフレームワークに基づいた語彙外（ OOV ）単語のソリューションも提案します。私たちの2つの中国語-英語翻訳タスクの実験は、M - NMTアーキテクチャが、2つのタスクでNMTベースラインをそれぞれ9.0ポイント、2.7ポイント上回っていることを示しました。さらに、このアーキテクチャは、競合法と比較して、はるかに効果的なOOV治療をもたらしたことがわかりました。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)近得显成,而人亦普识其非常之单词,与单词有局限性。 本文有新记增NMT(M-NMT)架构,当架构存记译单词(常不常遇之单词),然后以助神经模形。 用此以合古计机器翻译统中学知NMT系统学之则,盖出于当框架词汇外(OOV)单词之解决方案。 两中英译实验,M-NMT架构于两任,各高NMT基线9.02.7 BLEU。 此外,见与争方相比,架构有效者OOV治之。', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) в последнее время добился заметного успеха, однако также широко признается, что этот подход имеет ограничения при обработке редких слов и пар слов. В этой статье представлена новая архитектура NMT (M-NMT) с расширением памяти, которая хранит знания о том, как слова (обычно редко встречающиеся) должны переводиться в памяти, а затем использует их для помощи нейронной модели. Мы используем этот механизм памяти, чтобы объединить знания, полученные из обычной статистической системы машинного перевода, и правила, изученные системой НМТ, а также предлагаем решение для внесловных слов (OOV), основанное на этой структуре. Наши эксперименты по двум задачам китайско-английского перевода показали, что архитектура M-NMT превосходит базовую линию NMT на 9,0 и 2,7 балла BLEU по двум задачам, соответственно. Кроме того, мы обнаружили, что эта архитектура привела к гораздо более эффективной обработке OOV по сравнению с конкурентными методами.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) ने हाल के दिनों में उल्लेखनीय सफलता हासिल की है, हालांकि यह भी व्यापक रूप से मान्यता प्राप्त है कि इस दृष्टिकोण में अक्सर शब्दों और शब्द जोड़े को संभालने के साथ सीमाएं हैं। यह पेपर एक उपन्यास मेमोरी-संवर्धित एनएमटी (एम-एनएमटी) आर्किटेक्चर प्रस्तुत करता है, जो इस बारे में ज्ञान संग्रहीत करता है कि शब्दों (आमतौर पर अक्सर सामना करने वाले) को स्मृति में अनुवाद ति किया जाना चाहिए और फिर तंत्रिका मॉडल की सहायता के लिए उनका उपयोग करता है। हम इस स्मृति तंत्र का उपयोग एक पारंपरिक सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली और एनएमटी सिस्टम द्वारा सीखे गए नियमों से सीखे गए ज्ञान को संयोजित करने के लिए करते हैं, और इस ढांचे के आधार पर आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली (ओओवी) शब्दों के लिए एक समाधान भी प्रस्तावित करते हैं। दो चीनी-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद कार्यों पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चला है कि एम-एनएमटी आर्किटेक्चर ने एनएमटी बेसलाइन को क्रमशः दो कार्यों पर 9.0 और 2.7 BLEU अंकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया। इसके अतिरिक्त, हमने पाया कि इस वास्तुकला के परिणामस्वरूप प्रतिस्पर्धी तरीकों की तुलना में बहुत अधिक प्रभावी ओओवी उपचार हुआ।', 'ga': "Tá an-rath ar an néaraistriúchán (NMT) le blianta beaga anuas, ach aithnítear go forleathan freisin go bhfuil srianta ag baint leis an gcur chuige seo maidir le láimhseáil focail agus péirí focal neamhchoitianta. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair ailtireacht NMT (M-NMT) nua cuimhne-mhéadaithe, a stórálann eolas ar conas ba chóir focail (go hiondúil cinn nach minic a bhíonn orthu) a aistriú i gcuimhne agus ansin a úsáideann iad chun cabhrú leis an múnla néaraíoch. Bainimid úsáid as an meicníocht chuimhne seo chun an t-eolas a foghlaimíodh ó ghnáthchóras aistriúcháin meaisín staidrimh agus na rialacha a d'fhoghlaim an córas NMT a chomhcheangal, agus molaimid freisin réiteach d'fhocail as-foclóra (OOV) bunaithe ar an gcreat seo. Léirigh ár dturgnaimh ar dhá thasc aistriúcháin Sínis-Béarla gur sháraigh ailtireacht M-NMT bonnlíne an NMT le 9.0 agus 2.7 pointe BLEU ar an dá thasc, faoi seach. Ina theannta sin, fuaireamar amach go raibh cóireáil OOV i bhfad níos éifeachtaí mar thoradh ar an ailtireacht seo i gcomparáid le modhanna iomaíocha.", 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) jelentős sikert ért el az utóbbi időkben, de széles körben elismert, hogy ennek a megközelítésnek korlátai vannak a ritka szavak és szópárok kezelésében. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja egy új memória-kiterjesztett NMT (M-NMT) architektúrát, amely tárolja a tudást arról, hogy a szavakat (általában ritkán találkoznak) miként kell lefordítani egy memóriába, majd felhasználja őket az idegi modell segítésére. Ezzel a memóriamechanizmussal kombináljuk a hagyományos statisztikai gépi fordító rendszerből származó ismereteket és az NMT rendszerből származó szabályokat, valamint javaslatot teszünk a szókincsen kívüli (OOV) szavakra is. Két kínai-angol fordítási feladaton végzett kísérleteink azt mutatták, hogy az M-NMT architektúra 9,0, illetve 2,7 BLEU ponttal túllépte a két feladatot. Továbbá azt találtuk, hogy ez az architektúra sokkal hatékonyabb OOV kezelést eredményezett a versenyképes módszerekhez képest.', 'el': 'Η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση έχει επιτύχει αξιοσημείωτη επιτυχία τον τελευταίο καιρό, ωστόσο αναγνωρίζεται ευρέως ότι αυτή η προσέγγιση έχει περιορισμούς στον χειρισμό σπάνιων λέξεων και ζευγαριών λέξεων. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική ενισχυμένης μνήμης, η οποία αποθηκεύει γνώσεις σχετικά με το πώς οι λέξεις (συνήθως σπάνια συναντώνται) πρέπει να μεταφραστούν σε μια μνήμη και στη συνέχεια τις χρησιμοποιεί για να βοηθήσει το νευρικό μοντέλο. Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτόν τον μηχανισμό μνήμης για να συνδυάσουμε τη γνώση που αποκτάται από ένα συμβατικό στατιστικό σύστημα μηχανικής μετάφρασης και τους κανόνες που μαθαίνονται από ένα σύστημα και επίσης να προτείνουμε μια λύση για λέξεις εκτός λεξιλογίου (ΟΟV) βασισμένες σε αυτό το πλαίσιο. Τα πειράματά μας σε δύο κινεζικά-αγγλικά μεταφραστικές εργασίες έδειξαν ότι η αρχιτεκτονική M-NMT ξεπερνούσε τη βάση NMT κατά τα σημεία 9.0 και 2.7 BLEU στις δύο εργασίες αντίστοιχα. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώσαμε ότι αυτή η αρχιτεκτονική είχε ως αποτέλεσμα μια πολύ πιο αποτελεσματική θεραπεία σε σύγκριση με τις ανταγωνιστικές μεθόδους.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) ახლა შემდეგ წარმატებული წარმატებით მიიღეთ, მაგრამ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ უცნობილია, რომ ეს პროგრამა აქვს ზომილებები, რომლებიც შე ამ კაურაში პრომენტური მეხსიერებული NMT (M-NMT) აქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც საკუთარი სიტყვების შესახებ მუშაობას (უბრალოდ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ) აღწერა მეხსიერებში და შემდეგ გამოყენება მათი ნე ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ეს მეხსიერების მექანსიმი, რომ კონტრაციონალური სტატისტიკური მაქანის გადაგრძელების სისტემიდან და NMT სისტემიდან ვისწავლილი წესების შესაძლებლობა, და ასევე გამოყენებთ სიტყვებულების გა ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ჩინგლისური-ანგლისური გადაწყვეტილების ორი საქმების შესახებ გამოჩენა, რომ M-NMT აქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტია NMT-ის გადაწყვეტილება 9.0 და 2.7 BLEU-ის შესახე დამატებით, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ ეს აქტიქტურაცია, რომლებიც უფრო ეფექტიური OOV-ს მეტად შემდეგ შემდეგ კონკურექტიური მეტადებებით.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық компьютердің аудармасы (NMT) соңғы уақытта өзгертілген сәтті жеткізді, бірақ сондай-ақ бұл жағдайда әдеттегі сөздерді мен сөздерді қолдану үшін шектелген шектері бар. Бұл қағаз NMT (M- NMT) архитектурасын жадында аударып, невралдық моделіне көмектесу үшін оларды қолдануға болады. Бұл жады механизмін кәдімгі статистикалық компьютердің аудару жүйесінен үйренген білімдерді және NMT жүйесінің үйренген ережелерді біріктіру үшін қолданып, сондай-ақ бұл фрейміне негізделген сөздердің тыс сөздерінің ше Біздің екі қытайша-ағылшын аудармалардың тәжірибелеріміз M-NMT архитектурасы NMT негізгі жолын 9,0 және 2,7 BLEU деген екі тапсырмаларда орындалды деп көрсетті. Қосымша, біз бұл архитектура бақылау әдістерімен салыстырып көп эффективті ОOV лекциясы болды.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) ha ottenuto un notevole successo negli ultimi tempi, tuttavia è anche ampiamente riconosciuto che questo approccio ha limitazioni nella gestione di parole e coppie di parole rare. Questo articolo presenta una nuova architettura NMT (M-NMT), che memorizza le conoscenze su come le parole (di solito incontrate raramente) dovrebbero essere tradotte in una memoria e poi le utilizza per aiutare il modello neurale. Utilizziamo questo meccanismo di memoria per combinare le conoscenze apprese da un sistema di traduzione automatica statistica convenzionale e le regole apprese da un sistema NMT, e proponiamo anche una soluzione per parole fuori vocabolario (OOV) basata su questo framework. I nostri esperimenti su due compiti di traduzione cinese-inglese hanno dimostrato che l'architettura M-NMT ha superato la linea di base NMT rispettivamente di 9,0 e 2,7 punti BLEU sui due compiti. Inoltre, abbiamo scoperto che questa architettura ha portato ad un trattamento OOV molto più efficace rispetto ai metodi competitivi.", 'ml': 'അടുത്ത സമയങ്ങളില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഈ നടപടിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളും വാക്കുകളും ജോടികള ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മെമ്മറി- കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dത്ത NMT (M-NMT) ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അറിവ് സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തേണ്ടതെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മെമ്മറി മെന്\u200dജിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സാധാരണ സ്റ്റാസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണവിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു NMT സിസ്റ്റം പഠിച്ച നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട രണ്ടു ചൈനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, എംഎംഎംടി ബെസ്റ്റിലേക്ക് എംഎംടി ബെ അതുകൂടാതെ, ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d മത്സരിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമുള്ള ഓവി ചികിത്', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) kisbet suċċess notevoli f’dawn l-aħħar żminijiet, madankollu huwa rikonoxxut ukoll b’mod wiesa’ li dan l-approċċ għandu limitazzjonijiet fl-immaniġġjar ta’ kliem mhux frekwenti u pari ta’ kliem. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta arkitettura NMT (M-NMT) ġdida miżjuda bil-memorja, li taħżen l-għarfien dwar kif il-kliem (ġeneralment dawk li jiltaqgħu ma’ spiss) għandhom jiġu tradotti f’memorja u mbagħad tużahom biex jassistu l-mudell newrali. Aħna nużaw dan il-mekkaniżmu tal-memorja biex nikkombinaw l-għarfien miksub minn sistema konvenzjonali tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni tal-istatistika u r-regoli miksuba minn sistema NMT, u nipproponu wkoll soluzzjoni għal kliem barra mill-vokabulari (OOV) ibbażat fuq dan il-qafas. Our experiments on two Chinese-English translation tasks demonstrated that the M-NMT architecture outperformed the NMT baseline by 9.0 and 2.7 BLEU points on the two tasks, respectively.  Barra minn hekk, sabu li din l-arkitettura rriżultat f’trattament OOV ferm aktar effettiv meta mqabbel ma’ metodi kompetittivi.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) ихэвчлэн амжилттай болсон. Гэхдээ энэ арга нь ойролцоогоор үг болон үг хоёрыг удирдах хязгаар байдаг. Энэ цаас NMT (M-NMT) архитектурыг шинэ санамж нэмэгдүүлсэн зохиол бий болгодог. Энэ цаас үгийг (ихэвчлэн ойролцоогоор тулгардаг хүмүүс) санамж дээр хэрхэн хөгжүүлэх ёстой талаар мэдлэг хадгалдаг. Бид энэ санамжийн механизмийг ашиглаж, энгийн статистикийн машины хөгжлийн системээс сурсан мэдлэг болон NMT системээс сурсан дүрмийг нэгтгэхэд, мөн энэ хэлбэрээр үндсэн үгсийн гадаад хэсгийг шийдвэрлэх боломжтой. Бидний хоёр Хятад-Англи хэлний орчуулалтын туршилтын туршилт нь M-NMT архитектур нь NMT-ийн суурь шугам дээр 9.0 болон 2.7 BLEU хоёр даалгавар дээр тулгарсан юм. Мөн бид эдгээр барилгууд нь өрсөлдөөний аргаас харьцуулахад илүү үр дүнтэй ООВ эмчилгээ болсон.', 'no': 'NMT-omsetjinga i nyleg tid har oppnådd merkelig suksess, men det er også veldig gjenkjent at denne tilnærminga har begrensningar med handling av frekvenste ord og ordpar. Denne papiret viser eit nytt minne-augert arkitektur NMT (M-NMT), som lagrar kunnskap om korleis ord (vanlegvis motteken) skal verta omsett i ein minne og så brukar dei for å hjelpa den neuralmodellen. Vi bruker denne minningsmekanismenyen for å kombinere kunnskapen lært frå eit konvensjonell statistisk omsetjingssystem og reglane lært av eit NMT- systemet, og foreslår også ein løysing for ord som er utanfor ordet (OOV) basert på dette rammeverket. Våre eksperimenter på to kinesisk-engelsk oversettelsesoppgåver demonstrerte at M-NMT-arkitekturen utførte NMT-baseline med 9,0 og 2,7 BLEU-punkt på to oppgåver. I tillegg fann vi denne arkitekturen resulterte i ein mykje meir effektiv OOV-behandling samanlikna med konkurentære metodar.', 'mk': 'Неуралниот машински превод (НМТ) постигна значителен успех во последните времиња, но исто така е широко признаено дека овој пристап има ограничувања со управувањето со ретки зборови и зборови парови. This paper presents a novel memory-augmented NMT (M-NMT) architecture, which stores knowledge about how words (usually infrequently encountered ones) should be translated in a memory and then utilizes them to assist the neural model.  We use this memory mechanism to combine the knowledge learned from a conventional statistical machine translation system and the rules learned by an NMT system, and also propose a solution for out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words based on this framework.  Нашите експерименти на две кинеско-англиски преведувачки задачи покажаа дека архитектурата на М-НМТ ја надмина базата на НМТ за 9,0 и 2,7 БЛЕ поени на двете задачи, односно. Покрај тоа, откривме дека оваа архитектура резултираше со многу поефикасен третман на ООВ во споредба со конкурентните методи.', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) osiągnęło w ostatnich czasach znaczący sukces, jednak powszechnie uznaje się również, że takie podejście ma ograniczenia w obsłudze rzadkich słów i par słów. W artykule przedstawiono nową architekturę NMT (M-NMT), która przechowuje wiedzę o tym, jak słowa (zwykle rzadko spotykane) powinny być tłumaczone w pamięci, a następnie wykorzystuje je do wspomagania modelu neuronowego. Wykorzystujemy ten mechanizm pamięci do połączenia wiedzy zdobytej z konwencjonalnego statystycznego systemu tłumaczenia maszynowego z regułami nauczonymi przez system NMT, a także proponujemy rozwiązanie dla słów poza słownictwem (OOV) opartych na tym frameworku. Nasze eksperymenty na dwóch chińsko-angielskich zadaniach tłumaczeniowych wykazały, że architektura M-NMT przewyższyła odpowiednio punkty bazowe NMT o 9.0 i 2.7 BLEU dla tych dwóch zadań. Dodatkowo okazało się, że architektura ta zaowocowała znacznie skuteczniejszym leczeniem OOV w porównaniu z metodami konkurencyjnymi.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) telah mencapai kejayaan yang luar biasa pada masa-masa akhir ini, bagaimanapun ia juga dikenali secara luas bahawa pendekatan ini mempunyai keterangan dengan mengendalikan perkataan dan pasangan perkataan yang jarang. Kertas ini menghasilkan arkitektur NMT (M-NMT) yang menambah ingatan baru, yang menyimpan pengetahuan mengenai bagaimana perkataan (biasanya tidak sering ditemui) patut diterjemahkan dalam ingatan dan kemudian menggunakannya untuk membantu model saraf. We use this memory mechanism to combine the knowledge learned from a conventional statistical machine translation system and the rules learned by an NMT system, and also propose a solution for out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words based on this framework.  Eksperimen kami pada dua tugas terjemahan bahasa Cina-Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa arkitektur M-NMT melampaui dasar NMT dengan 9.0 dan 2.7 titik BLEU pada kedua-dua tugas, berdasarkan. Selain itu, kami jumpa arkitektur ini mengakibatkan rawatan OOV yang lebih efektif dibandingkan dengan kaedah kompetitif.', 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu neurologinis mašin ų vertimas (NMT) pasiekė didelę sėkmę, tačiau taip pat plačiai pripažįstama, kad šis metodas turi apribojimų, susijusių su nedažnų žodžių ir žodžių poros tvarkymu. Šiame dokumente pristatoma nauja atminties stiprinta NMT (M-NMT) architektūra, kurioje saugomos žinios apie tai, kaip žodžiai (paprastai dažnai susiduriami) turėtų būti vertami į atminties sistemą ir tada naudojami jais padėti nerviniam modeliui. We use this memory mechanism to combine the knowledge learned from a conventional statistical machine translation system and the rules learned by an NMT system, and also propose a solution for out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words based on this framework.  M ūsų eksperimentai su dviem Kinijos ir anglų vertimo užduotimis parodė, kad M-NMT architektūra viršijo NMT bazinę vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vert Be to, nustatėme, kad ši architektūra, palyginti su konkurenciniais metodais, sukėlė daug veiksmingesnį OOV gydymą.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală (NMT) a obținut un succes notabil în ultima vreme, cu toate acestea, este, de asemenea, recunoscut pe scară largă că această abordare are limitări în ceea ce privește manipularea cuvintelor și perechilor de cuvinte rare. Această lucrare prezintă o nouă arhitectură NMT augmentată cu memorie (M-NMT), care stochează cunoștințe despre modul în care cuvintele (de obicei întâlnite rar) ar trebui traduse într-o memorie și apoi le utilizează pentru a ajuta modelul neural. Folosim acest mecanism de memorie pentru a combina cunoștințele învățate dintr-un sistem convențional de traducere automată statistică și regulile învățate de un sistem NMT și, de asemenea, propunem o soluție pentru cuvinte out-of-vocabular (OOV) bazate pe acest cadru. Experimentele noastre asupra a două sarcini de traducere chineză-engleză au demonstrat că arhitectura M-NMT a depășit nivelul de referință NMT cu 9,0 și respectiv 2,7 puncte BLEU pe cele două sarcini. În plus, am descoperit că această arhitectură a dus la un tratament mult mai eficient OOV comparativ cu metodele competitive.', 'so': "Turjumista maskinada (NMT) ayaa guulaystay liibaanka ugu dambeeyey, habase yeeshee waxaa sidoo kale loo xaqiijiyey in dhaqdhaqaalahan ay leedahay xadooyin ay ku shaqeeyaan hadal caadiga ah iyo hadal labo ah. Qoraalkan wuxuu soo bandhigaa dhismaha qoyska oo la kordhiyey NMT (M-NMT), kaas oo lagu kaydiyey aqoonta ku saabsan hadallada (sida caadiga ah inta badan la kulmay) in lagu turjumo xasuusta kadibna wuxuu isticmaalaa in uu caawiyo modelka neurada. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa mekaniisan xusuusta si a an aqoonta looga barto nidaamka tarjumaadka ee caadiga ah iyo sharciyada lagu barto nidaamka NMT, waxaana sidoo kale u soo jeedinayaa xal aan qoraalka-la'aanta (OOV) oo ku saleysan asalkan. Imtixaanadayada ku qoran labada shaqada turjumista ee Shiino-Ingiriis waxay muujinayeen in dhismaha M-NMT ay ka samaysay qoraalka NMT ee ugu horeeyay 9.0 iyo 2.7 BLEU goobaha labada shaqooyin. Sidoo kale waxaan helnay dhismahan, taasoo sababtay daryeel aad u faa’iido badan oo ka mid ah OOV, iyadoo la barbardhiga qaababka tartanka.", 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning (NMT) har uppnått betydande framgång på senare tid, men det är också allmänt erkänt att detta tillvägagångssätt har begränsningar när det gäller hantering av ovanliga ord och ordpar. Denna uppsats presenterar en ny minnesförstärkt NMT (M-NMT) arkitektur, som lagrar kunskap om hur ord (vanligtvis sällan förekommande) ska översättas i ett minne och sedan använder dem för att hjälpa den neurala modellen. Vi använder denna minnesmekanism för att kombinera den kunskap som lärts från ett konventionellt statistiskt maskinöversättningssystem och de regler som lärts av ett NMT-system, och föreslår också en lösning för out-of-vokabulär (OOV) ord baserat på detta ramverk. Våra experiment med två kinesisk-engelska översättningsuppgifter visade att M-NMT-arkitekturen överträffade NMT-baseline med 9,0 respektive 2,7 BLEU-poäng på de två uppgifterna. Dessutom fann vi att denna arkitektur resulterade i en mycket effektivare OOV-behandling jämfört med konkurrenskraftiga metoder.', 'sr': 'Neuralni prevod mašine (NMT) u poslednjih vremena postigao je značajan uspjeh, međutim, takođe se široko prepoznaje da taj pristup ima ograničenja sa rješavanjem riječi i parova riječi. Ovaj papir predstavlja novu arhitekturu NMT (M-NMT), povećanu pamćenju, koja čuva znanje o tome kako se riječi (obično rijetko susreću sa onima) treba prevesti u pamćenje i onda ih iskoristiti kako bi pomogli neuronskom modelu. Koristimo ovaj mehanizam pamćenja kako bi kombinirali znanje naučene iz konvencionalnog sustava prevoda statističkih mašina i pravila koje je naučio NMT sistem, i takođe predložili rešenje za riječi izvan rečenika (OOV) na temelju ovog okvira. Naši eksperimenti na dva kineskog-engleskog prevodnog zadatka pokazali su da je arhitektura M-NMT nadmašila početnu liniju NMT sa 9,0 i 2,7 BLEU bodova na dva zadatka. Osim toga, našli smo ovu arhitekturu rezultirali mnogo efikasnijim liječenjem OOV u usporedbi sa konkurentnim metodama.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් යන්ත්\u200dරය අවවාදය (NMT) අලුත් වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුණා, ඒත් ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුණා විතරයි, ඒ වගේම මේ අවවාද මේ පැත්ත පෙනුවෙන් නියම මතකය- වැඩිය NMT (M- NMT) විද්\u200dයාපෘතියක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් වචනය (සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම මුණු විදිහට) කොහොමද මතකයේ භාවිත කරලා  අපි මේ මතක පද්ධතිය භාවිතා කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා දන්නය සහ NMT පද්ධතියෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත නීතිය, සහ මේ පද්ධතියෙන් අයිත අපේ පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාවිතාවක් දෙකට ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ M-NMT ස්ථාපනය NMT පරීක්ෂණය 9.0 සහ 2.7 BLUE වැඩ තවත්, අපිට මේ ස්ථාපනය හොයාගත්තා විදියට වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට OOOv විදියට සම', 'ta': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) has achieved notable success in recent times, however it is also widely recognized that this approach has limitations with handling infrequent words and word pairs.  இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய நினைவகம் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட NMT (M- NMT) உருவாக்கியத்தை கொடுக்கிறது, அது எவ்வாறு வார்த்தைகளை மொழிமாற்ற வேண்டும் என்பதைப் பற்றி அறிவை சேமிக்கிறது ( நாம் இந்த நினைவக முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு வழக்கமான புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்றும் அமைப்பிலிருந்து கற்ற அறிவை ஒன்று சேர்க்க பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்ற இரண்டு சீன- ஆங்கிலத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணிகளில் எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பித்தது M NMT அமைப்பு நிறுவனம் 9. 0 மற்றும் 2. 7 பிலியு இரண்டு பணிகளில் உள்ளது என்பதை  மேலும், நாங்கள் இந்த பூமியை கண்டுபிடித்தோம் போராட்டும் முறைகளை ஒப்பிடும் OOV சிகிச்சை முறையில் மிக பயனுள்', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) اگلے وقت میں مشخص موفقیت پہنچ چکی ہے، لیکن اس طرح بہت زیادہ پہچان لیا گیا ہے کہ اس طریقہ کے پاس غیر عادت کلمات اور کلمات جوڑوں کے ساتھ محدودیت ہیں. This paper presents a new memory-augmented NMT (M-NMT) architecture, which stores knowledge about how words (usually encountered ones) should be translated in a memory and then uses them to help the neural model. ہم نے اس یادگاری مکانیسم کا استعمال کیا ہے کہ اس علم کو ایک معمولی سیستم سے سکھایا گیا ہے اور NMT سیسٹم سے سکھایا گیا ہے اور اس طرح اس فرم پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے واحد بیرونی (OOV) کلمات کے لئے حل کی پیشنهاد کریں۔ ہماری آزمائش دو چین-انگلیسی ترجمہ کے کاموں میں دکھائی گئی ہے کہ M-NMT معماری NMT بیس لین کو 9.0 اور 2.7 بلیوس کے ذریعہ دو کاموں پر نازل کیا گیا ہے۔ اور ہم نے اس معماری کو پایا تھا کہ اس طریقہ کے مقابلے میں بہت اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر اثر ا', 'uz': "Yaqinda muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli (NMT) topildi, ammo bu usulning ko'proq soʻzlar va soʻzni qoʻllash uchun chegaralar bor. Bu hujjat xotira qoʻshilgan NMT (M-NMT) архивни кўрсатади. Bu yerda soʻzlar qanday tarjima qilishi kerak boʻlganligini xotiraga saqlaydi va keyin uy modelga yordam berish uchun ularni foydalanadi. Biz bu xotira mekanismedan foydalanamiz, oddiy statistik tarjima tizimdan o'rganilgan ma'lumot va NMT tizimi orqali o'rganilgan qoidalarni birlashtirish uchun, va bu frameda asosida o'z soʻzlarni o'zgartirib chiqarishni davom etish uchun. Икки Xitoycha-Ingliz tarjima vazifalarining tajribalarimiz M-NMT architektori 9.0 va 2.7 BLEU ikkita vazifalar bilan 9.0 va 2.7 BLEU bilan boshqaradi. Ko'pchilik, bu arxituvni o'rganishga o'xshagan OOV tizimga ko'proq ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Bản dịch máy thần kinh (NMB) đã đạt được một thành công đáng chú ý trong những thời gian gần đây, nhưng cũng được công nhận rộng rãi là nó có giới hạn với việc sử dụng những từ hiếm có và cặp từ. Tờ giấy này cung cấp một cấu trúc NMT mới tăng trí nhớ (M-NMB) mà lưu giữ kiến thức về cách mà từ ngữ (thường gặp hiếm hoi) nên được dịch thành ký ức và sử dụng để hỗ trợ người mẫu thần kinh. Chúng tôi sử dụng cơ chế trí nhớ này để kết hợp kiến thức được học từ một hệ thống dịch thuật máy thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống kê và cũng đưa ra một giải pháp cho từ ngữ ngoài từ vựng (OOOV) dựa trên khung cảnh này. Các thí nghiệm về hai công việc dịch chuyển kiểu Trung Quốc-Anh đã chứng minh kiến kiến kiến trúc M-NMT đã hoàn thành cơ sở cơ bản NMT bởi 9.0 và 2.7 liên quan đến hai nhiệm vụ. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi tìm thấy kiến trúc này dẫn đến một phương pháp OOOV hiệu quả hơn nhiều so với phương pháp cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Невровият машинен превод (НМТ) постигна забележителен успех в последно време, но също така е широко признато, че този подход има ограничения при обработката на редки думи и думични двойки. Тази статия представя нова архитектура с разширена памет НМТ (М-НМТ), която съхранява знания за това как думите (обикновено рядко срещани такива) трябва да бъдат преведени в паметта и след това ги използва за подпомагане на невронния модел. Използваме този механизъм на паметта, за да съчетаем знанията, придобити от конвенционалната система за статистически машинен превод и правилата, придобити от системата на НМТ, както и да предложим решение за думи извън речника (ООВ), базирани на тази рамка. Нашите експерименти с две китайско-английски преводни задачи показаха, че архитектурата на М-НМТ надминава базовата линия на НМТ съответно с 9.0 и 2.7 точки по двете задачи. Освен това открихме, че тази архитектура води до много по-ефективно лечение на ОВ в сравнение с конкурентните методи.', 'nl': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) heeft de laatste tijd opmerkelijk succes geboekt, maar het wordt ook algemeen erkend dat deze aanpak beperkingen heeft bij het hanteren van zeldzame woorden en woordparen. Dit artikel presenteert een nieuwe memory-augmented NMT (M-NMT) architectuur, die kennis opslaat over hoe woorden (meestal zelden tegengekomen) vertaald moeten worden in een geheugen en deze vervolgens gebruikt om het neurale model te ondersteunen. We gebruiken dit geheugenmechanisme om de kennis van een conventioneel statistisch machinevertaalsysteem te combineren met de regels die door een NMT-systeem zijn geleerd, en stellen ook een oplossing voor woorden buiten woordenschat (OOV) voor op basis van dit framework. Onze experimenten met twee Chinees-Engels vertaaltaken toonden aan dat de M-NMT architectuur de NMT baseline overtrof met respectievelijk 9.0 en 2.7 BLEU punten op de twee taken. Bovendien vonden we dat deze architectuur resulteerde in een veel effectievere OOV behandeling in vergelijking met concurrerende methoden.', 'hr': 'Neuralni prijevod stroja (NMT) u posljednjih vremena postigao je značajan uspjeh, međutim, također se široko prepoznaje da taj pristup ima ograničenja s rješavanjem riječi i riječnih parova. Ovaj papir predstavlja novu arhitekturu NMT (M-NMT), povećanu pamćenju, koja čuva znanje o tome kako se riječi (obično rijetko susreću s onima) trebaju prevoditi u pamćenju i onda ih koristi kako bi pomogli neuronskom modelu. Koristimo ovaj mehanizam pamćenja kako bi kombinirali znanja naučene iz konvencionalnog sustava prevoda statističkih strojeva i pravila naučenih od sustava NMT-a, te također predlažemo rješenje riječi izvan riječi riječi (OOV) na temelju ovog okvira. Naši eksperimenti na dva prevodnog zadatka kineskog-engleskog prevoda pokazali su da je arhitektura M-NMT nadmašila početnu liniju NMT-a 9,0 i 2,7 BLEU bodova na dva zadatka. Osim toga, našli smo ovu arhitekturu rezultirali mnogo učinkovitijim liječenjem OOV u usporedbi s konkurentnim metodama.', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) har opnået bemærkelsesværdig succes i den seneste tid, men det er også bredt anerkendt, at denne tilgang har begrænsninger med håndtering af sjældne ord og ordpar. Denne artikel præsenterer en ny hukommelse-augmented NMT (M-NMT) arkitektur, som gemmer viden om, hvordan ord (normalt sjældent stødte ord) skal oversættes i en hukommelse og derefter bruger dem til at hjælpe den neurale model. Vi bruger denne hukommelsesmekanisme til at kombinere den viden, der er lært fra et konventionelt statistisk maskinoversættelsessystem, og de regler, der er lært af et NMT-system, og foreslår også en løsning for out-of-vocabulary (OOV) ord baseret på denne ramme. Vores eksperimenter med to kinesisk-engelsk oversættelsesopgaver viste, at M-NMT-arkitekturen oversteg NMT baseline med henholdsvis 9,0 og 2,7 BLEU point på de to opgaver. Derudover fandt vi, at denne arkitektur resulterede i en langt mere effektiv OOV behandling sammenlignet med konkurrencedygtige metoder.', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) hat in letzter Zeit bemerkenswerte Erfolge erzielt, aber es wird auch allgemein anerkannt, dass dieser Ansatz Einschränkungen bei der Handhabung seltener Wörter und Wortpaare aufweist. Diese Arbeit stellt eine neuartige memory-augmented NMT (M-NMT)-Architektur vor, die Wissen darüber speichert, wie Wörter (normalerweise selten vorkommende) in einem Speicher übersetzt werden sollten und diese dann zur Unterstützung des neuronalen Modells verwendet. Wir verwenden diesen Speichermechanismus, um das Wissen aus einem herkömmlichen statistischen maschinellen Übersetzungssystem und die Regeln, die von einem NMT-System gelernt werden, zu kombinieren und eine Lösung für Wörter außerhalb des Vokabulars (OOV) basierend auf diesem Framework vorzuschlagen. Unsere Experimente an zwei chinesisch-englischen Übersetzungsaufgaben zeigten, dass die M-NMT Architektur die NMT Baseline um 9.0 und 2.7 BLEU Punkte für die beiden Aufgaben übertraf. Darüber hinaus fanden wir heraus, dass diese Architektur zu einer viel effektiveren OOV-Behandlung im Vergleich zu wettbewerbsfähigen Methoden führte.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) در زمان اخیر موفقیت مشخصی به دست آورده است، ولی به طور وسیع شناخته می\u200cشود که این دستور محدودیت با استفاده از کلمات و جفت کلمات غیرعادی دارد. این کاغذ یک معماری NMT (M-NMT) افزایش حافظه نویسی را نشان می\u200cدهد که علم درباره\u200cی چگونه کلمات (معمولاً با افرادی معلوم شده) در حافظه ترجمه می\u200cشود و سپس آنها را برای کمک به مدل عصبی استفاده می\u200cکند. ما از این مکانیسم حافظه استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا علمی که از یک سیستم ترجمه ماشین آماری سنتی یاد گرفته شده را ترجمه کنیم و قوانین که توسط یک سیستم NMT یاد گرفته\u200cاند، و همچنین راه حلی برای کلمات خارجی (OOV) بر اساس این چهارخه پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در دو تابع ترجمه\u200cهای چینی-انگلیسی نشان دادند که معماری M-NMT با 9.0 و 2.7 نقطه\u200cهای BLEU بر این دو تابع بیشتر از پایگاه NMT انجام داده است. به علاوه، ما این معماری را پیدا کردیم که در مقایسه با روش های مسابقه، درمان OOV بسیار موثر تر بود.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) telah mencapai sukses yang luar biasa pada waktu-waktu terakhir, namun juga dikenal secara luas bahwa pendekatan ini memiliki batasan dengan menangani kata-kata dan pasangan kata yang tidak sering. Kertas ini mempersembahkan arkitektur NMT (M-NMT) yang menambah ingatan baru, yang menyimpan pengetahuan tentang bagaimana kata (biasanya tidak sering ditemui) harus diterjemahkan dalam memori dan kemudian menggunakannya untuk membantu model saraf. Kami menggunakan mekanisme memori ini untuk menggabungkan pengetahuan yang dipelajari dari sistem tradukti mesin statistik konvensional dan peraturan yang dipelajari oleh sistem NMT, dan juga mengusulkan solusi untuk kata-kata luar vocabulari (OOV) berdasarkan rangkaian ini. Eksperimen kami pada dua tugas terjemahan bahasa Cina-Inggris menunjukkan bahwa arsitektur M-NMT melebihi dasar NMT dengan 9,0 dan 2,7 poin BLEU pada kedua tugas, respectively. Selain itu, kami menemukan arsitektur ini menyebabkan perawatan OOV jauh lebih efektif dibandingkan dengan metode kompetitif.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 신경기계번역(NMT)은 현저한 성공을 거두었지만, 사람들은 이런 방법이 빈번하지 않은 단어와 단어를 처리하는 데 한계가 있다는 것을 보편적으로 인식하고 있다.본고는 새로운 기억증강 NMT(M-NMT) 체계 구조를 제시했다. 이 체계 구조는 단어(일반적으로 자주 만나지 않는 단어)가 메모리에서 어떻게 번역되는지에 대한 지식을 저장하고 이를 이용하여 신경모델을 보조한다.우리는 이러한 기억 메커니즘을 이용하여 전통적인 통계 기계 번역 시스템에서 배운 지식과 NMT 시스템에서 배운 규칙을 결합시키고 이 구조를 바탕으로 하는 어휘표 밖(OOV) 어휘 해결 방안을 제시했다.우리가 두 개의 한영 번역 임무에서의 실험에 의하면 M-NMT 체계 구조는 두 임무에서 각각 NMT 기선보다 9.0과 2.7개의 BLEU점이 높다는 것을 알 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 경쟁적인 방법에 비해 이런 체계 구조가 더욱 효과적인 OOV 치료를 초래했다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine ya kijamii (NMT) imefanikiwa mafanikio makubwa katika nyakati za hivi karibuni, hata hivyo pia inagunduliwa kuwa mbinu hii ina vizuizi kwa kutumia maneno yanayoendelea na maneno mawili. Gazeti hili linaonyesha jengo la kisasa la NMT (M-NMT), ambalo linabeba maarifa ya jinsi maneno (mara nyingi yanavyokutana) yanavyotafsiriwa katika kumbukumbu na kisha inatumia kusaidia muundo wa neurali. Tunatumia mfumo huu wa kumbukumbu kuunganisha maarifa yanayofunzwa kutoka mfumo wa utafsiri wa mashine ya kawaida na sheria zilizojifunzwa na mfumo wa NMT, na pia tunapendekeza ufumbuzi wa maneno yasiyo ya lugha (OOV) kwa msingi wa mfumo huu. Majaribio yetu kwenye kazi mbili za kutafsiri Kiingereza za za Kichina na Kiingereza yalionyesha kwamba ujenzi wa M-NMT ulifanya msingi wa NMT kwa asilimia 9.0 na 2.7 BLEU anaonyesha kazi hizo mbili. Kwa nyongeza, tuligundua ujenzi huu ulisababisha matibabu yenye ufanisi zaidi ya OOV ukilinganisha na njia za ushindani.', 'af': "Neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) het notabele sukses in onlangse tyde bereik, maar dit is ook baie herkend dat hierdie toegang beperking het met die handling van onvolgende woorde en woorde paar. Hierdie papier stel 'n roman geheue-vergroot NMT (M-NMT) arkitektuur, wat bewaar kennis oor hoe woorde (gewoonlik onverwag ontmoet word) in 'n geheue vertaal moet word en dan gebruik hulle om die neurale model te help. Ons gebruik hierdie geheue mekanisme om die kennis geleer van 'n konvensionele statistiese masjien vertaling stelsel en die reëls geleer deur 'n NMT stelsel te kombinerer, en ook voorstel 'n oplossing vir buitekant woordeboek (OOV) woorde gebaseer op hierdie raamwerk. Ons eksperimente op twee Sjinese-Engels vertaling opdragte het bevestig dat die M-NMT-arkitektuur die NMT-basislien met 9.0 en 2.7 BLEU punte op die twee opdragte, respektief, uitgevoer het. In addition, we found this architecture resulted in a much more effective OOV treatment compared to competitive methods.", 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinave nervore (NMT) ka arritur sukses të shquar në kohët e fundit, megjithatë është gjithashtu i njohur gjerësisht se ky qasje ka kufizime me trajtimin e fjalëve të pakufakta dhe çifteve fjalësh. Ky artikull paraqet një arkitekturë të re NMT (M-NMT) të rritur me kujtesë, e cila ruan njohuri rreth mënyrës se si fjalët (zakonisht të takuara shpesh) duhet të përkthehen në një kujtesë dhe pastaj i përdorin për të ndihmuar model in nervor. Ne përdorim këtë mekanizëm kujtese për të kombinuar njohuritë e mësuara nga një sistem tradicional të përkthimit të makinave statistike dhe rregullat e mësuara nga një sistem NMT, dhe gjithashtu propozojmë një zgjidhje për fjalët jashtë fjalorit (OOV) bazuar në këtë kuadër. Our experiments on two Chinese-English translation tasks demonstrated that the M-NMT architecture outperformed the NMT baseline by 9.0 and 2.7 BLEU points on the two tasks, respectively.  Përveç kësaj, gjetëm se kjo arkitekturë rezultoi në një trajtim shumë më efektiv OOV krahasuar me metodat konkurruese.', 'tr': 'NMT-iň soňky wagtlarda möhüm başarnyga ýetdi, ýöne bu ýagdaýyň nadir sözleri we söz çiftleri ýoldan çykarmak bilen çykarmagyny hem tanalýar. Bu kagyz NMT (M-NMT) arhitektura baglanýan nowadan bir nusga görkezýär. Bu sözler nähili ýagdaýda terjime edilmelidir we olaryň neural modelini kömek etmek üçin ullanýar. Biz bu hafıza mekanizmasını standart bir istatistik makine çevirim sisteminden öğrendikleri bilgileri ve NMT sisteminden öğrendikleri kuralları birleştirmek için kullanırız ve bu çerçevesinde basit bir çözüm teklif ediyoruz. Biziň iki Çinçe-Iňlisçe terjime etmek zadynyň deneylerimiz M-NMT arhitekteriýasynyň NMT üssünden 9.0 we 2.7 BLEU iki işiň üstüne çykyp gitdigini görkezildi. Mundan soňra, bu arhitektura bir nusgasy OOV ýagdaýynyň döwletlere görä has efekt ýola getirdi.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki vaxtlarda nöral maşın tərcüməsi (NMT) mümkün başarılı oldu, amma bu metodların sonrakı sözlər və söz cütləri ilə müəyyən edilməsi də çox böyük tanınmışdır. Bu kağıt yeni yaddaşlardan artırılmış NMT (M-NMT) arhitektarını göstərir ki, sözləri (çox sıradan görüşmüş şəkildə) yaddaşlarda necə çeviriləcəyini bilər və sonra onları nöral modelini kömək etmək üçün istifadə edir. Biz bu hafıza mehanizmisini konvencional statistik maşın tercümə sistemindən öyrəndiyi bilgiləri və NMT sistemindən öyrəndiyi kuralları birləşdirmək üçün istifadə edirik və bu framework ə dayanan kəlmələr üçün çözüm təklif edirik. İki Çin-İngilizə çevirilməsi işlərində olan təcrübələrimiz M-NMT arhitektarının NMT səviyyəsini 9.0 və 2.7 BLEU ilə müqayisədə iki işin üstündə tutduğunu göstərdi. Əksinə, bu arhitektura daha etkili OOV tedavisi ilə müqayisədə daha çox etkili olduğunu gördük.', 'am': 'የነዌብ መሳሳይ ትርጉም (NMT) በቅርቢቱ ዘመን የክብር ዕድል አግኝቷል፣ ነገር ግን ይህ ሥርዓት በጥያቄ ቃላት እና ቃላት ሁለትን በመስጠት ግንኙነት እንዳደረገ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም የጠቅላላ ማስታወሻ የNMT (M-NMT) መሠረት ማድረግ ያሳያል፤ ይህ ቃላት እንዴት እንደገና የተገኘ ቃላት እንዲትረጉም በማስታወስ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህንን ማስታወስ ማሰናክል እውቀትን ከመቀናቀል የተማረውን የstatistical machine ትርጉም ስርዓት እና ከNMT ስርዓት የተማረውን ሥርዓቶች እና በዚህ ፍሬም ላይ ለመፍታት ለውጭ ባለ ቋንቋ (OOV) ቃላትን ለመፍታት እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ሥራ ላይ ፈተናዎቻችን የM-NMT የመሠረታዊው የNMT መሠረታዊ ግንኙነት በሁለት ስራ ላይ 9.0 እና 2.7 BLEU ጥያቄ እንዳደረገ አሳይቷል፡፡ Additionally, we found this architecture resulted in a much more effective OOV treatment compared to competitive methods.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) վերջին ժամանակներում նշանակալի հաջողություն է հասել, սակայն լայնորեն գիտակցում է, որ այս մոտեցումը սահմանափակումներ ունի անհաճախ բառերի և բառերի զույգերի վերաբերյալ: Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է հիշողությամբ բարձրացված ՆՄԹ (M-NMT) ճարտարապետություն, որը պահում է գիտելիքներ այն մասին, թե ինչպես բառերը (սովորաբար հազվադեպ հանդիպված բառերը) պետք է թարգմանվեն հիշողության մեջ և հետո օգտագործում են դրանք նյարդային մոդելի Մենք օգտագործում ենք այս հիշողության մեխանիզմը համադրելու այն գիտելիքները, որոնք սովորել են ավանդական վիճակագրական մեխանիզմի թարգմանման համակարգում, և կանոնները, որոնք սովորել են NMT համակարգում, և նաև առաջարկում ենք լուծում բառերի համար, որոնք հիմնված են այս համակարգում: Մեր փորձարկումները երկու չինական-անգլերեն թարգմանման առաջադրանքների վրա ցույց տվեցին, որ M-NMT ճարտարապետությունը գերազանցել է NMT-ի հիմքը 9.0 և 2.7 միավորով ԲԼԵՎ-ի երկու առաջադրանքների վրա: Ավելին, մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ այս ճարտարապետությունը հանգեցրեց շատ ավելի արդյունավետ OOO բուժման, համեմատած մրցակցության մեթոդների հետ:', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক সময়ের মধ্যে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) ব্যাপক সফলতা অর্জন করেছে, তবে এটি ব্যাপক স্বীকার করা হয়েছে যে এই পদক্ষেপের সীমাবদ্ধ এবং  এই পত্রিকাটি একটি উপন্যাস স্মৃতির স্মৃতির স্মৃতিকান্ত উপস্থাপন করেছে এমএমটি (এমএমটি) আর্কিটারেক্টার, যা জ্ঞান সংরক্ষণ করেছে কিভাবে শব্দ অনুবাদ করা উচিত (সাধারণত স আমরা এই স্মৃতির মেশিনগুলো ব্যবহার করি কনভেন্টিকাল পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদ ব্যবস্থা থেকে শিক্ষিত জ্ঞান এবং এনএমটি সিস্টেম দ্বারা শিক্ষিত নিয়ম সমাবেশ কর চীনা-ইংরেজী অনুবাদ কাজের উপর আমাদের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে এমএমটি স্থাপত্য নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে এনএমটি বেসালাইনের মাধ্যমে ৯. ০ এবং ২. এছাড়াও আমরা এই আর্কিটেক্টার পেয়েছি যার ফলে প্রতিযোগিতার পদ্ধতির তুলনায় ওভির চিকিৎসা বেশী কার্যকর হয়েছে।', 'ca': "La traducció neuromàquina (NMT) ha aconseguit un èxit notable en els últims temps, però també es reconeix ampliament que aquest enfocament té limitacions en manejar paraules i parelles de paraules poc freqüents. Aquest article presenta una nova arquitectura NMT (M-NMT) augmentada per la memòria, que emmagatzema coneixement sobre com les paraules (normalment descobertes poc sovint) haurien de ser traduïdes a una memòria i les utilitza per ajudar el model neuronal. Utilitzem aquest mecanisme de memòria per combinar els coneixements aprenguts d'un sistema convencional de traducció estadística de màquines i les regles aprenguts d'un sistema NMT, i també proposem una solució per paraules for a de vocabulari basades en aquest marc. Els nostres experiments en dues tasques de traducció xinesa-anglesa van demostrar que l'arquitectura M-NMT va superar la base de NMT en 9,0 i 2,7 punts BLEU en les dues tasques, respectivament. A més, vam descobrir que aquesta arquitectura va resultar en un tractament d'OOV molt més efectiu en comparació amb mètodes competitius.", 'bs': 'Neuralni prevod strojeva (NMT) u poslednje vrijeme postigao je značajan uspjeh, međutim, također se široko prepoznaje da taj pristup ima ograničenja s rješavanjem riječi i parova riječi. Ovaj papir predstavlja novu arhitekturu NMT (M-NMT), povećanu pamćenju, koja čuva znanje o tome kako se riječi (obično rijetko susreću s onima) trebaju prevoditi u pamćenju i onda ih koristi kako bi pomogli neuronskom modelu. Koristimo ovaj mehanizam pamćenja kako bi kombinirali znanja naučene iz konvencionalnog sustava prevoda statističkih strojeva i pravila naučenih od sustava NMT-a, te također predlažemo rješenje riječima izvan riječima riječi (OOV) na temelju ovog okvira. Naši eksperimenti na dva kineskog-engleskog prevodnog zadatka pokazali su da je arhitektura M-NMT nadmašila početnu liniju NMT sa 9,0 i 2,7 BLEU bodova na dva zadatka. Osim toga, našli smo ovu arhitekturu rezultirali mnogo efikasnijim liječenjem OOV u usporedbi s konkurentnim metodama.', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad (NMT) dosáhl v poslední době pozoruhodných úspěchů, ale je také široce uznáváno, že tento přístup má omezení při manipulaci se vzácnými slovy a slovními páry. Tento článek představuje novou architekturu NMT (M-NMT), která ukládá znalosti o tom, jak by slova (obvykle zřídka se setkávající) měla být přeložena do paměti a následně je využívá k pomoci neuronovému modelu. Tento paměťový mechanismus využíváme k kombinaci znalostí získaných z konvenčního statistického strojového překladu a pravidel naučených NMT systémem a navrhujeme také řešení pro slova mimo slovní zásobu (OOV) založená na tomto rámci. Naše experimenty na dvou čínsko-anglických překladatelských úlohách ukázaly, že architektura M-NMT předčila NMT základní linii o 9.0 a 2.7 BLEU body na obou úlohách. Navíc jsme zjistili, že tato architektura vedla k mnohem efektivnější OOV léčbě oproti konkurenčním metodám.', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge (NMT) on viimastel aegadel saavutanud märkimisväärset edu, kuid on laialdaselt tunnustatud, et sellisel lähenemisviisil on piirangud harvade sõnade ja sõnapaaride käsitlemisel. Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse uudset mälu suurendatud NMT (M-NMT) arhitektuuri, mis salvestab teadmisi sellest, kuidas sõnu (tavaliselt harva esinevaid) tuleks mälus tõlkida ja seejärel kasutab neid neuromudeli abistamiseks. Seda mälumehhanismi kasutame tavapärasest statistilisest masintõlkesüsteemist saadud teadmiste ja NMT-süsteemist saadud reeglite kombineerimiseks ning pakume välja lahenduse sõnavara välistele sõnadele, mis põhinevad sellel raamistikul. Meie eksperimendid kahe hiina-inglise tõlketööga näitasid, et M-NMT arhitektuur ületas NMT baasi vastavalt 9,0 ja 2,7 BLEU punkti võrra kahe ülesande puhul. Lisaks leidsime, et selle arhitektuuri tulemuseks oli palju efektiivsem OOV ravi võrreldes konkurentsivõimeliste meetoditega.', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konek채채nn철s (NMT) on saavuttanut huomattavaa menestyst채 viime aikoina, mutta on my철s yleisesti tunnustettu, ett채 t채m채 l채hestymistapa on rajoitettu k채sittelem채채n harvoja sanoja ja sanapareja. T채ss채 ty철ss채 esitell채채n uusi muistilla lis채tty NMT (M-NMT) -arkkitehtuuri, joka tallentaa tietoa siit채, miten sanat (yleens채 harvoin kohdatut) tulisi k채채nt채채 muistiin ja k채ytt채채 niit채 neuromallin apuna. T채m채n muistimekanismin avulla yhdist채mme perinteisest채 tilastollisesta konek채채nn철sj채rjestelm채st채 saadun tiedon ja NMT-j채rjestelm채n oppimat s채채nn철t sek채 ehdotamme ratkaisua sanaston ulkopuolisille sanoille (OOV). Kokeemme kahdesta kiina-englanti k채채nn철steht채v채st채 osoittivat, ett채 M-NMT-arkkitehtuuri ylitti NMT-l채ht철tilanteen 9,0 ja 2,7 BLEU-pistett채 n채iss채 kahdessa teht채v채ss채. Lis채ksi huomasimme t채m채n arkkitehtuurin johtavan paljon tehokkaampaan OOV-hoitoon verrattuna kilpailukykyisiin menetelmiin.', 'jv': 'section Perintah iki mudheng architecture NMT (M-NMT) sing rumangsa kapan pangan (dhéwé isih lan alam kuwi tindakan) ingkang diputungan kelangan kuwi kapan kelangan (usual isih saben tarjamahan) iso terjamahan ning memperbudhakan lan nguasai iki dadi wis dianggap bantuan ing model Nyural. Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing memperbudhakan iki nggawe ngerasakno karo sistem dadi kanggo tarjamahan karo sistem NMT, lan uga ngerasakno perusahaan kanggo kelas-kelas (OOOC) kuwi bisa basa sing iki dadi. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo nganggo urip sing dibuturéng cara-ingles sing bisa mbelangno karo architecture M-NMT sing nyenggawe barang NMT sampek kanggo 9.0 lan 2.7 B luwih sing dipun dadi iki dadi. Mungkin aksi, awak dhéwé ngerti architecture iki dadi wis gagalé dadi luwih operasan OOOOC nggawe gerarané karo pergambar maneh sing sampeyan.', 'he': 'התרגום של מכונות נוירות (NMT) השיג הצלחה משמעותית בזמנים האחרונים, אך גם מוכר באופן רחב שיש הגישה הזאת מגבלות בטיפול במילים נדירות וזוגי מילים. העבודה הזו מציגה ארכיטקטורה NMT (M-NMT) מחוספת זיכרון חדשה, שמחסנת ידע על איך מילים (בדרך כלל אלה שנפגשו באופן נדיר) צריכות להתרגם לזכרון ואז משתמשות בהן כדי לסייע למודל העצבי. אנו משתמשים במנגנון הזיכרון הזה כדי לשלב את הידע שנלמד ממערכת התרגום של מכונת סטטיסטיקה קונבנציונלית ואת החוקים שנלמד על ידי מערכת NMT, וגם להציע פתרון למילים מחוץ לאומיות (OOV) מבוססות על המסגרת הזאת. הניסויים שלנו על שתי משימות התרגום סיני-אנגלית הראו שהארכיטקטורה M-NMT ביצעה את מראש NMT ב-9.0 ו-2.7 נקודות BLEU על שתי המשימות, בהתאם. בנוסף, מצאנו שהארכיטקטורה הזו הובילה לטיפול OOV הרבה יותר יעיל בהשוואה לשיטות תחרותיות.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani bakar aikin da aka samar da yanzu-ƙaranci na NMT (M-NMT), wanda ke adana wani ilmi game da jinsi words (ɗadi da suka haɗi sauri) za'a fassara su cikin wata kumbar kuma ya yi amfani da su ga taimakon misalin neural. Tuna amfani da wannan aikin memory, dõmin mu haɗa ilmin wanda aka sanar daga tsarin fassarar masu ƙidãya na ƙidãya da masu fassari na shirin ayukan na NMT, kuma masu buƙata masu yin amfani da maganar da ba'a-maganar (OOV) a kan wannan firam. MijarrabyinMu kan aikin fassarar biyu na China-Ingiriya sun nũna cẽwa the M-NMT architecture outperformed the NMT base line by henhold 9.0 and 2.7 BLEU points on both tasks. Da haka, muka gane wannan arkin ya sami wata cutarwa mai amfani da OOV sammeni da metodi masu yin ta'awa.", 'sk': 'Živčni strojni prevod (NMT) je v zadnjem času dosegel precejšen uspeh, vendar je tudi splošno priznano, da ima ta pristop omejitve pri ravnanju z redkimi besedami in parom besed. V prispevku je predstavljena nova arhitektura NMT (M-NMT), ki shranjuje znanje o tem, kako je treba besede (običajno redko srečane) prevesti v spomin in jih nato uporabiti za pomoč nevronskemu modelu. Ta pomnilniški mehanizem uporabljamo za združevanje znanja, pridobljenega iz običajnega statističnega strojnega prevajanja, in pravil, pridobljenih s sistemom NMT, ter tudi za rešitev izven besedišča (OOV) na podlagi tega okvira. Naši eksperimenti na dveh prevajalskih nalogah kitajsko-angleščini so pokazali, da je arhitektura M-NMT pri obeh nalogah presegla osnovno vrednost NMT za 9,0 točke oziroma 2,7 točke BLEU. Poleg tega smo ugotovili, da je ta arhitektura prinesla veliko bolj učinkovito zdravljenje OOV v primerjavi s konkurenčnimi metodami.', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མིག་འཁོར་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཕྲུལ་མཐུད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་ཚིག་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ཆ་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསར་གཏོང་དང་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་NMT (M-NMT)སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། We use this memory mechanism to combine the knowledge learned from a conventional statistical machine translation system and the rules learned by an NMT system, and also propose a solution for out-of-vocabulary (OOV) words based on this framework. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་རྒྱ་ནག་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་ནི། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བཟོ་བརྩིས་འདི་དག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྦྱར'}
{'en': 'Dynamic Data Selection for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'اختيار البيانات الديناميكية لترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'pt': 'Seleção de dados dinâmicos para tradução automática neural', 'fr': 'Sélection dynamique des données pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'Selección dinámica de datos para la traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のための動的データ選択', 'zh': '以神经机器翻译之动态数据择', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए गतिशील डेटा चयन', 'ru': 'Выбор динамических данных для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Roghnú Dinimiciúla Sonraí le haghaidh Aistriú Meaisín Néarach', 'hu': 'Dinamikus adatválasztás idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Δυναμική επιλογή δεδομένων για νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару үшін динамикалық деректерді таңдау', 'it': 'Selezione dinamica dei dati per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'lt': 'Dinaminių duomenų atranka neurologiniam mašinų vertimui', 'mk': 'Динамички избор на податоци за преведување на неврални машини', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുക', 'ms': 'Pemilihan Data Dinamik untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mt': 'Dynamic Data Selection for Neural Machine Translation', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины хөгжлийн динамик өгөгдлийн сонголт', 'sr': 'Избор динамичnih дана за превод невралног машина', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Selectarea dinamică a datelor pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'sv': 'Dynamiskt dataval för neural maskinöversättning', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය දත්ත තෝරණය', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے داینامیک ڈاٹ انتخاب', 'so': 'Dalbashada daneyda ee neural machine turjumista', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான Dynamic Data Selection', 'pl': 'Dynamiczny wybór danych dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish vositasiName', 'vi': 'Chọn dữ liệu động cho phiên dịch máy thần kinh', 'hr': 'Dinamički izbor podataka za prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'da': 'Dynamisk datavalg til neural maskinoversættelse', 'bg': 'Динамичен избор на данни за неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Dynamische gegevensselectie voor neuronale machinevertaling', 'fa': 'انتخاب داده\u200cهای دینامیک برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa Data za Kidynamic kwa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani', 'tr': 'Nural Mazmunlar terjime üçin dinamik Maglumat Saýlawy', 'de': 'Dynamische Datenauswahl für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Pemilihan Data Dinamik untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'ko': '신경 기계 번역 중의 동적 데이터 선택', 'am': 'Dynamic Data Selection for Neural Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Dynamic Data Selection for Neural Machine Translation', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ডায়ানিমিক ডাটা নির্বাচন', 'sq': 'Dynamic Data Selection for Neural Machine Translation', 'az': 'Nöral Makin Çeviri üçün Dinamik Veri Seçimi', 'cs': 'Dynamický výběr dat pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'af': 'Dinamiese Data Keuse vir Nural Masjien Vertaling', 'et': 'Dünaamiline andmete valik neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'bs': 'Dinamički izbor podataka za prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'ca': 'Dynamic Data Selection for Neural Machine Translation', 'fi': 'Dynaaminen tietojen valinta neurokonekäännöstä varten', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_string', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Dinamična izbira podatkov za strojno prevajanje nevronov', 'he': 'בחירת נתונים דינמיים לתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྤྲོད་པར་དབྱིབས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གདམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Intelligent selection of training data has proven a successful technique to simultaneously increase training efficiency and translation performance for phrase-based machine translation (PBMT). With the recent increase in popularity of neural machine translation (NMT), we explore in this paper to what extent and how NMT can also benefit from data selection. While state-of-the-art data selection (Axelrod et al., 2011) consistently performs well for PBMT, we show that gains are substantially lower for NMT. Next, we introduce ‘dynamic data selection’ for NMT, a method in which we vary the selected subset of training data between different training epochs. Our experiments show that the best results are achieved when applying a technique we call ‘gradual fine-tuning’, with improvements up to +2.6 BLEU over the original data selection approach and up to +3.1 BLEU over a general baseline.', 'ar': 'أثبت الاختيار الذكي لبيانات التدريب أنه أسلوب ناجح لزيادة كفاءة التدريب وأداء الترجمة في نفس الوقت للترجمة الآلية القائمة على العبارات (PBMT). مع الزيادة الأخيرة في شعبية الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ، نستكشف في هذه الورقة إلى أي مدى وكيف يمكن أن تستفيد NMT أيضًا من اختيار البيانات. في حين أن أحدث اختيار للبيانات (Axelrod et al. ، 2011) يعمل بشكل جيد باستمرار لـ PBMT ، فإننا نظهر أن المكاسب أقل بكثير بالنسبة لـ NMT. بعد ذلك ، نقدم "اختيار البيانات الديناميكي" لـ NMT ، وهي طريقة ننوّع فيها المجموعة الفرعية المختارة من بيانات التدريب بين فترات التدريب المختلفة. تُظهر تجاربنا أنه يتم تحقيق أفضل النتائج عند تطبيق تقنية نسميها "الضبط الدقيق التدريجي" ، مع تحسينات تصل إلى +2.6 BLEU على نهج اختيار البيانات الأصلي وما يصل إلى +3.1 BLEU عبر خط أساس عام.', 'fr': "La sélection intelligente des données de formation s'est révélée être une technique efficace pour augmenter simultanément l'efficacité de la formation et les performances de traduction pour la traduction automatique basée sur des phrases (PBMT). Avec l'augmentation récente de la popularité de la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT), nous explorons dans cet article dans quelle mesure et comment la NMT peut également bénéficier de la sélection des données. Alors que la sélection de données de pointe (Axelrod et al., 2011) donne toujours de bons résultats pour le PBMT, nous montrons que les gains sont nettement inférieurs pour le NMT. Ensuite, nous introduisons la «\xa0sélection dynamique des données\xa0» pour la NMT, une méthode dans laquelle nous varions le sous-ensemble sélectionné de données d'entraînement entre différentes époques d'entraînement. Nos expériences montrent que les meilleurs résultats sont obtenus en appliquant une technique que nous appelons «\xa0réglage fin progressif\xa0», avec des améliorations allant jusqu'à +2,6 UEBL par rapport à l'approche de sélection des données d'origine et jusqu'à +3,1 UEBL par rapport à une base de référence générale.", 'es': 'La selección inteligente de datos de capacitación ha demostrado ser una técnica exitosa para aumentar simultáneamente la eficiencia de la capacitación y el rendimiento de la traducción para la traducción automática basada en frases (PBMT). Con el reciente aumento de la popularidad de la traducción automática neuronal (NMT), analizamos en este documento hasta qué punto y cómo la NMT también puede beneficiarse de la selección de datos. Si bien la selección de datos de última generación (Axelrod et al., 2011) siempre funciona bien para el PBMT, demostramos que las ganancias son sustancialmente menores para el NMT. A continuación, introducimos la «selección dinámica de datos» para NMT, un método en el que variamos el subconjunto seleccionado de datos de entrenamiento entre diferentes épocas de entrenamiento. Nuestros experimentos muestran que los mejores resultados se obtienen al aplicar una técnica que llamamos «ajuste gradual», con mejoras de hasta +2,6 BLEU con respecto al enfoque de selección de datos original y hasta +3,1 BLEU con respecto a una línea de base general.', 'pt': "A seleção inteligente de dados de treinamento provou ser uma técnica bem-sucedida para aumentar simultaneamente a eficiência do treinamento e o desempenho da tradução para tradução automática baseada em frases (PBMT). Com o recente aumento na popularidade da tradução automática neural (NMT), exploramos neste artigo até que ponto e como a NMT também pode se beneficiar da seleção de dados. Embora a seleção de dados de última geração (Axelrod et al., 2011) tenha um bom desempenho consistente para PBMT, mostramos que os ganhos são substancialmente menores para NMT. Em seguida, apresentamos a 'seleção dinâmica de dados' para NMT, um método no qual variamos o subconjunto selecionado de dados de treinamento entre diferentes épocas de treinamento. Nossos experimentos mostram que os melhores resultados são alcançados ao aplicar uma técnica que chamamos de 'ajuste fino gradual', com melhorias de até +2,6 BLEU sobre a abordagem de seleção de dados original e até +3,1 BLEU sobre uma linha de base geral.", 'ja': 'トレーニングデータのインテリジェントな選択は、フレーズベースの機械翻訳（ PBMT ）のトレーニング効率と翻訳パフォーマンスを同時に向上させるための成功したテクニックであることが証明されています。最近の神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）の人気の高まりに伴い、本稿では、NMTがデータ選択からどの程度、どのように利益を得ることができるかを探求する。最先端のデータ選択（ Ａｘｅｌｒｏｄ ｅ ｔ ａ ｌ ． ， ２ ０ １ １ ）はＰＢＭＴに関して一貫して良好であるが、ＮＭＴに関してはゲインが実質的に低いことが示されている。次に、NMTの「動的データ選択」を紹介します。これは、選択されたトレーニングデータのサブセットを異なるトレーニング時代間で変化させる方法です。私たちの実験では、「徐々に微調整」と呼ばれる技術を適用すると最高の結果が得られ、元のデータ選択アプローチよりも最大+2.6 BLEU、一般的なベースラインよりも最大+3.1 BLEUの改善が見られます。', 'zh': '事实证明知练数成功之术,可以兼长于短语机器翻译 (PBMT) 之教效率译性也。 随近神经机器翻译(NMT)普及,讨论本文NMT于多大程度及数据选择受益。 虽先进之数据选择(Axelrod,2011)见善于PBMT,明NMT之增益也。 接下来,我们介绍NMT的"动态数据选择",这是一种在不同训练时期之间改变所选训练数据子集的方法。 吾实验明当用吾所谓"渐微"者,可以获得最佳终,比原始数据择法,更进高+2.6 BLEU,增于凡基线+3.1 BLEU。', 'hi': "प्रशिक्षण डेटा के बुद्धिमान चयन ने वाक्यांश-आधारित मशीन अनुवाद (PBMT) के लिए प्रशिक्षण दक्षता और अनुवाद प्रदर्शन को एक साथ बढ़ाने के लिए एक सफल तकनीक साबित की है। तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) की लोकप्रियता में हाल ही में वृद्धि के साथ, हम इस पेपर में यह पता लगाते हैं कि किस हद तक और कैसे एनएमटी डेटा चयन से भी लाभान्वित हो सकता है। जबकि अत्याधुनिक डेटा चयन (एक्सेलरोड एट अल. 2011) लगातार पीबीएमटी के लिए अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है, हम दिखाते हैं कि एनएमटी के लिए लाभ काफी कम हैं। अगला, हम एनएमटी के लिए 'गतिशील डेटा चयन' पेश करते हैं, एक ऐसी विधि जिसमें हम विभिन्न प्रशिक्षण युगों के बीच प्रशिक्षण डेटा के चयनित सबसेट को अलग-अलग करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एक तकनीक को लागू करते समय सबसे अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त किए जाते हैं जिसे हम 'क्रमिक ठीक-ट्यूनिंग' कहते हैं, मूल डेटा चयन दृष्टिकोण पर +2.6 BLEU तक सुधार के साथ और एक सामान्य आधार रेखा पर +3.1 BLEU तक।", 'ru': 'Интеллектуальный выбор обучающих данных зарекомендовал себя как успешный метод одновременного повышения эффективности обучения и производительности перевода для машинного перевода на основе фраз (PBMT). С недавним ростом популярности нейронного машинного перевода (НМП), мы исследуем в этой работе, в какой степени и как НМП может также извлечь выгоду из отбора данных. Несмотря на то, что современный отбор данных (Axelrod et al., 2011) последовательно демонстрирует хорошие результаты для PBMT, мы показываем, что прирост существенно ниже для NMT. Далее мы вводим «динамический выбор данных» для НБП, метод, при котором мы варьируем выбранное подмножество обучающих данных между различными обучающими эпохами. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наилучшие результаты достигаются при применении методики, которую мы называем «постепенной точной настройкой», с улучшениями до +2,6 БЛЮ по сравнению с исходным подходом к выбору данных и до +3,1 БЛЮ по сравнению с общей базовой линией.', 'ga': "Is teicníocht rathúil é roghnú cliste sonraí oiliúna chun éifeachtúlacht oiliúna agus feidhmíocht aistriúcháin d’aistriúchán meaisín frása-bhunaithe (PBMT) a mhéadú ag an am céanna. Leis an méadú le déanaí ar an éileamh atá ar néaraistriúchán meaisín (NMT), déanaimid iniúchadh sa pháipéar seo ar cé chomh mór agus is féidir le NMT leas a bhaint as roghnú sonraí freisin. Cé go n-éiríonn go maith le roghnú sonraí den scoth (Axelrod et al., 2011) go seasta do PBMT, léirímid go bhfuil gnóthachain i bhfad níos ísle do NMT. Ansin, tugaimid isteach `roghnú sonraí dinimiciúil' don NMT, modh ina n-athraímid an fo-thacar roghnaithe de shonraí oiliúna idir tréimhsí oiliúna éagsúla. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go mbaintear na torthaí is fearr amach agus teicníc ar a dtugaimid 'mionchoigeartú de réir a chéile' á cur i bhfeidhm, le feabhsuithe suas go +2.6 BLEU thar an mbunchur chuige um roghnú sonraí agus suas le +3.1 BLEU thar bhunlíne ghinearálta.", 'el': 'Η έξυπνη επιλογή των δεδομένων κατάρτισης έχει αποδειχθεί μια επιτυχημένη τεχνική για την ταυτόχρονη αύξηση της αποδοτικότητας της εκπαίδευσης και της απόδοσης της μετάφρασης για τη μηχανική μετάφραση με βάση φράσεις (PBMT). Με την πρόσφατη αύξηση της δημοτικότητας της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης, διερευνούμε σε αυτή την εργασία σε ποιο βαθμό και πώς μπορεί επίσης να ωφεληθεί από την επιλογή δεδομένων. Ενώ η επιλογή δεδομένων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας (Axelrod et al., 2011) αποδίδει σταθερά καλά για το PBMT, αποδεικνύουμε ότι τα κέρδη είναι σημαντικά χαμηλότερα για το NMT. Στη συνέχεια, εισάγουμε την "δυναμική επιλογή δεδομένων" για την NMT, μια μέθοδο στην οποία διαφοροποιούμε το επιλεγμένο υποσύνολο δεδομένων κατάρτισης μεταξύ διαφορετικών εποχών εκπαίδευσης. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα επιτυγχάνονται με την εφαρμογή μιας τεχνικής που ονομάζουμε "σταδιακή τελειοποίηση", με βελτιώσεις μέχρι +2.6 σε σχέση με την αρχική προσέγγιση επιλογής δεδομένων και έως +3.1 σε σχέση με μια γενική βάση.', 'hu': 'Az oktatási adatok intelligens kiválasztása sikeres technikának bizonyult, amely egyidejűleg növeli az oktatási hatékonyságot és a fordítási teljesítményt a kifejezésalapú gépi fordítás (PBMT) esetében. A neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) népszerűségének közelmúltbeli növekedésével ebben a tanulmányban azt vizsgáljuk, hogy az NMT milyen mértékben és hogyan használhatja az adatszelesztést. Bár a legkorszerűbb adatválasztás (Axelrod et al., 2011) következetesen jól teljesít a PBMT esetében, azt mutatjuk, hogy a nyereség lényegesen alacsonyabb az NMT esetében. Ezt követően bemutatjuk a "dinamikus adatok kiválasztását" az NMT esetében, egy olyan módszert, amelyben a képzési adatok kiválasztott részhalmazát különböző képzési korszakok között változtatjuk. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a legjobb eredményeket egy olyan technika alkalmazásával érjük el, amelyet "fokozatos finomhangolásnak" nevezünk, az eredeti adatválasztási megközelítéshez képest akár +2,6 BLEU, az általános alapközelítéshez képest pedig +3,1 BLEU-ig.', 'ka': "ინტელექტური მონაცემების ინტელექტური მონაცემების გამოყენება წარმატებულია ტექნექტიკა, რომელიც ერთადერთად უფრო მეტადებული განახლების ეფექტურის ეფექტურ ნეიროლური მანქანის გარგულისხმების პოლუგარიტებით (NMT) გავაკეთებთ ამ კავონში რამდენიმე განმავლობაში და როგორ NMT შეუძლებელია მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა. მონაცემების მონიშნულება (Axelrod et al., 2011) მუშაობელად PBMT-ზე მუშაობელია, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მონაცემები NMT-ზე მნიშვნელოვანია. შემდეგ, ჩვენ NMT-ს `დინამიკური მონაცემების არჩევა', რომელიც ჩვენ განსხვავებული მონაცემების სპესტი განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავება. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ საუკეთესო შედეგები მიიღება, როდესაც გამოყენება ტექნოგია, როდესაც ჩვენ ვუხედავთ `gradual fine-tuning', როდესაც უფრო მეტადება +2.6 BLEU-ზე მიიღება პირველ მონიშნ", 'lt': 'Pažangai atrinkti mokymo duomenis įrodė sėkmingą mokymo efektyvumo ir vertimo raštu veiksmingumo didinimo metodą frazėmis grindžiamam mašinų vertimui (PBMT). Neseniai didėjant nervinių mašin ų vertimo populiarumui (NMT), šiame dokumente nagrinėjame, kokiu mastu ir kaip NMT taip pat gali pasinaudoti duomenų atranka. Nors naujausia duomenų atranka (Axelrod et al., 2011 m.) nuosekliai gerai veikia PBMT, mes rodome, kad NMT pelnas gerokai mažesnis. Toliau įvedame „dinamišką duomenų atranką“ NMT, metodą, pagal kurį mes skiriamės pasirinktą mokymo duomenų pogrupį tarp skirtingų mokymo epokų. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad geriausi rezultatai pasiekti taikant metodą, kurį vadiname laipsnišku patobulinimu, pagerinus iki +2,6 BLEU pagal pradinį duomenų atrankos metodą ir iki +3,1 BLEU pagal bendrą pradinį metodą.', 'it': 'La selezione intelligente dei dati di allenamento si è dimostrata una tecnica di successo per aumentare contemporaneamente l\'efficienza dell\'allenamento e le prestazioni di traduzione per la traduzione automatica basata sulle frasi (PBMT). Con il recente aumento della popolarità della traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), esploriamo in questo articolo in che misura e come NMT può anche beneficiare della selezione dei dati. Mentre la selezione dei dati allo stato dell\'arte (Axelrod et al., 2011) ha costantemente buoni risultati per PBMT, mostriamo che i guadagni sono sostanzialmente inferiori per NMT. Successivamente, introduciamo "selezione dinamica dei dati" per NMT, un metodo in cui variamo il sottoinsieme selezionato di dati di allenamento tra diverse epoche di allenamento. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che i migliori risultati si ottengono applicando una tecnica chiamata "gradual fine tuning", con miglioramenti fino a +2,6 BLEU rispetto all\'approccio originale di selezione dei dati e fino a +3,1 BLEU rispetto ad una linea di base generale.', 'mk': 'Интелигентен избор на податоци за обука докажа успешна техника за истовремено зголемување на ефикасноста на обуката и преведувањето за машински превод на фрази (PBMT). Со неодамнешното зголемување на популарноста на преводот на невропските машини (НМТ), во овој весник истражуваме во каков степен и како НМТ може, исто така, да користи од изборот на податоци. Иако најновата селекција на податоци (Axelrod и други, 2011) постојано оди добро за ПБМТ, покажуваме дека добивките се значително пониски за НМТ. Потоа, воведуваме „динамичен избор на податоци“ за НМТ, метод во кој го разменуваме избраниот подгруп податоци за обука помеѓу различните епохи на обука. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека најдобрите резултати се постигнати при апликацијата на техниката која ја нарекуваме „постепено финетизирање“, со подобрувања до +2,6 БЛЕУ во однос на оригиналниот пристап за селекција на податоци и до +3,1 БЛЕУ во однос на генералната ос', 'kk': "Бірақ оқыту деректерін бақылау тәртібін таңдау (PBMT) үшін оқыту эффективнігін және аудару әрекеттерін бірден көтеру және аудару мүмкіндігін өзгерту техникасының Невралдық компьютердің аудармаларының (NMT) ең жаңа аудармаларының көтерілігін өзгертіп, бұл қағазда NMT деректерді таңдау үшін қаншалықты және қаншалықты қалай пайдалану Жұмыс деректерді таңдау күйінде (Axelrod et al., 2011) PBMT үшін дұрыс жақсы жұмыс істейді, біз NMT үшін жетістіктерді көп төмен деп көрсетедік. Келесіден, NMT үшін 'динамикалық деректерді таңдау' әдісін таңдап береміз. Бұл әдісімен біз басқа оқыту әдістері арасында таңдалған бағдарламалық деректерді өзгертіп көрем Біздің тәжірибеміздің ең жақсы нәтижелеріміз, бағдарламаның бастапқы деректерді таңдау арқылы +2,6 BLEU деп аталатын техниканы қолданғанда, ең жақсы нәтижелері жеткізіледі, және +3,1 BLEU деп аталатын жалп", 'ml': "പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് ഒരു വിജയകരമായ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരേ സമയത്ത് ട്ര ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതിനാല്\u200d, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഡേറ്റാ  സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- ആര്\u200dട്ട് ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d( Axelrod et al., 2011) പിബിഎംടിയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു പിന്നീട്, നമ്മള്\u200d NMT-ന്റെ ഡേറ്റാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d 'ഗ്രീഗ്രീല്\u200d ഫിന്\u200dറിംഗ്' പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എത്തിച്ചേ", 'mn': 'Боловсролын өгөгдлийн ухаантай сонголт нь дасгал хөгжлийн үр дүнтэй болон хөгжлийн дасгал хөгжлийн үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэх технологийг баталсан. Сүүлийн үеийн мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн нэр хүндрэл (NMT) нь бид энэ цаасан дээр хэр хэмжээтэй болон NMT-ийн хэр ашигтай вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Хэдийгээр урлагийн мэдээллийн сонголт (Axelrod et al., 2011) PBMT-д үргэлж сайн ажилладаг ч бид NMT-д ашиг бага байдаг. Дараа нь бид NMT-ийн "динамик өгөгдлийн сонголт"-г танилцуулна. Энэ арга нь бид өөр сургалтын туршилтын хооронд сонгогдсон сургалтын өгөгдлийг өөрчлөгдөж байна. Бидний туршилтууд хамгийн сайн үр дүн гарч ирдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний нэртэй техник "хурдан сайжруулах" гэж нэрлэдэг.', 'no': 'Inteligt utval av opplæringsdata har bevist ein suksessfull teknikk for å auka opplæringseffektivitet og omsetjingsprogrammet for å omsetja fråsetjende maskinen (PBMT). Med den siste økninga i populariteten av neuralmaskinsomsetjinga (NMT), utforskar vi i denne papiret kva storleik og korleis NMT også kan bruka frå datautvalet. Mens det er tilstanden for kunstvalet (Axelrod et al., 2011) gjer det godt for PBMT, viser vi at vann er vanskeleg lavere for NMT. Neste introduserer vi « dynamisk datautval » for NMT, eit metode som varierer vi den valde undergruppa av opplæringsdata mellom ulike opplæringsperiodar. Eksperimentane våre viser at dei beste resultatene blir oppnådd når vi brukar ein teknikk, kallar vi « gradusfinning », med forbedringar opp til +2,6 BLEU over den opprinnelige datautvalstilnærminga og opp til +3,1 BLEU over ein generell baseline.', 'pl': 'Inteligentny dobór danych szkoleniowych okazał się skuteczną techniką jednocześnie zwiększającą efektywność szkolenia i wydajność tłumaczenia dla tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na frazach (PBMT). Wraz ze wzrostem popularności neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) badamy w niniejszym artykule, w jakim stopniu i w jaki sposób NMT może również skorzystać z selekcji danych. Podczas gdy najnowocześniejsza selekcja danych (Axelrod et al., 2011) konsekwentnie sprawdza się dobrze dla PBMT, pokazujemy, że zyski są znacznie niższe w przypadku NMT. Następnie przedstawiamy "dynamiczny wybór danych" dla NMT, metodę, w której zmieniamy wybrany podzbiór danych treningowych między różnymi epokami treningowymi. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że najlepsze rezultaty osiąga się przy zastosowaniu techniki, którą nazywamy "stopniowym dostrajaniem", z ulepszeniami do +2.6 BLEU w porównaniu z oryginalnym podejściem do selekcji danych i do +3.1 BLEU w stosunku do ogólnej bazy.', 'sr': 'Inteligentni izbor podataka o obuci dokazao je uspešnu tehniku da istovremeno povećava učinkovitost obuke i provedbu prevoda za prevod mašine na frazi (PBMT). Sa nedavnim povećanjem popularnosti prevoda neuralnih mašina (NMT), istražujemo u ovom papiru koliku mjeru i kako NMT može koristiti i od selekcije podataka. Iako izbor podataka iz stanja umjetnosti (Axelrod et al., 2011) stalno dobro izvodi za PBMT, pokazujemo da je dobitak značajno niži za NMT. Sledeće, predstavljamo „dinamični izbor podataka“ za NMT, metodu u kojoj se razlikujemo odabrani podatak obuke između različitih epoka obuke. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su najbolji rezultati postignuti kada primjenjujemo tehniku koju nazivamo „postupno finaliziranje“, sa poboljšanjem do +2,6 BLEU zbog originalnog pristupa selekcije podataka i do +3,1 BLEU na osnovnoj liniji.', 'ms': "Pemilihan cerdas data latihan telah membuktikan teknik berjaya untuk meningkatkan efisiensi latihan dan prestasi terjemahan secara bersamaan untuk terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa (PBMT). Dengan peningkatan popularitas terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) yang baru-baru ini, kami mengeksplorasi dalam kertas ini ke mana dan bagaimana NMT juga boleh berguna dari pemilihan data. Sementara pemilihan data state-of-the-art (Axelrod et al., 2011) secara konsisten berjalan dengan baik untuk PBMT, kami menunjukkan keuntungan adalah jauh lebih rendah untuk NMT. Seterusnya, kami perkenalkan pemilihan data `dinamik' untuk NMT, kaedah yang mana kami ubah-ubah subset data latihan yang dipilih antara epok latihan yang berbeza. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa keputusan terbaik dicapai apabila melaksanakan teknik yang kami panggil 'penyesuaian perlahan-lahan', dengan peningkatan sehingga +2.6 BLEU atas pendekatan pemilihan data asal dan sehingga +3.1 BLEU atas dasar umum.", 'ro': 'Selectarea inteligentă a datelor de instruire s-a dovedit a fi o tehnică de succes pentru a crește simultan eficiența instruirii și performanța traducerii pentru traducerea automată bazată pe fraze (PBMT). Odată cu creșterea recentă a popularității traducerii automate neurale (NMT), explorăm în această lucrare în ce măsură și cum NMT poate beneficia, de asemenea, de selecția datelor. În timp ce selecția de date de ultimă generație (Axelrod et al., 2011) performează în mod constant bine pentru PBMT, demonstrăm că câștigurile sunt substanțial mai mici pentru NMT. Apoi, introducem "selecția dinamică a datelor" pentru NMT, o metodă în care variazăm subsetul selectat de date de formare între diferite epoci de formare. Experimentele noastre arată că cele mai bune rezultate sunt obținute atunci când aplicăm o tehnică pe care o numim "reglare fină treptată", cu îmbunătățiri de până la +2.6 BLEU față de abordarea inițială de selecție a datelor și până la +3.1 BLEU față de o bază generală.', 'so': "Waxbarashada macluumaadka waxbarashada waxaa lagu xaqiijiyey tekniko liibaan ah oo isla markaasna lagu kordhiyo faa’iidada waxbarashada iyo fasaxda turjumista oo ku qoran qoraalka machine-based (PBMT). Hadii ugu dambeysay koritaanka turjumidda neural machine (NMT), waxaynu ka baaraynaa warqadan si aad iyo siduu NMT uga faa’iido karo doorashada data. While state-of-the-art data selection (Axelrod et al., 2011) consistently performs well for PBMT, we show that gains are substantially lower for NMT.  Meel dambe waxaan u soo bandhignaa `doorashada data dynamic' ee NMT, taas oo ah qaab aan ku kala duduwanno kooxa la doortay waxbarashada ee u dhexeeya kooxaha waxbarashada kala duduwan. Imtixaankayada waxaa muuqda in arimaha ugu wanaagsan la gaadho marka loo codsado teknikada aan ugu magacaabno `tababar-wanaag', iyadoo lagu hagaajiyo ilaa +2.6 BLEU ka kordhay qaababka ugu horeeya doorashada macluumaadka oo asalka ah +3.1 BLEU si gaar ah.", 'sv': 'Intelligent val av träningsdata har visat sig vara en framgångsrik teknik för att samtidigt öka utbildningseffektiviteten och översättningsprestandan för frasbaserad maskinöversättning (PBMT). Med den senaste tidens ökande popularitet av neural maskinöversättning (NMT), undersöker vi i denna uppsats i vilken utsträckning och hur NMT också kan dra nytta av dataval. Även om toppmoderna dataval (Axelrod m.fl., 2011) konsekvent presterar bra för PBMT, visar vi att vinsterna är betydligt lägre för NMT. Därefter introducerar vi `dynamisk dataval\' för NMT, en metod där vi varierar den valda delmängden träningsdata mellan olika träningsepoker. Våra experiment visar att de bästa resultaten uppnås vid tillämpning av en teknik som vi kallar "gradvis finjustering", med förbättringar upp till +2,6 BLEU jämfört med den ursprungliga dataurvalsmetoden och upp till +3,1 BLEU över en allmän baslinje.', 'ta': "பயிற்சி தகவல் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு ஒரு வெற்றிகரமான தொழில்நுட்பம் அதிகரித்து பயிற்சி விளைவுகளையும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயல்பாட்டையு புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றியின் மகிழ்ச்சியின் சமீபத்தில் நாம் இந்த காகிதத்தில் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் என்ன அளவில் மற்றும் என்எம் மாநிலை - கலை தகவல் தேர்வு அடுத்து, நாம் NMT க்கு 'இயங்கும் தரவு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு' குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது ஒரு முறையாகும், அதில் நாம் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் சிறந்த முடிவுகள் அடையப்பட்டுள்ளது ஒரு தொழில்நுட்பத்தை நாம் செயல்படுத்தும் போது, மூல தரவு தேர்வு செய்யும் முறையில் முன்னேற்றம் +2.6 பிலி", 'si': "ප්\u200dරධාන දත්තේ තොරතුරු විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන පරිවර්තනය සහ පරිවර්තනය වැඩ න්\u200dයුරෝල් යන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තනය (NMT) ගැන අලුත් විශාල විශාලය සමග, අපි මේ පත්තියේ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මොන විශාලයක්ද සහ NMT තත්වයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක දත්ත තෝරණය (AxelRod et al., 2011) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් PBMT වෙනුවෙන් හොඳ වැඩ කරනවා, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අභ්\u200dයාසය NMT ඊළඟට, අපි NMT වෙනුවෙන් 'සාධාරණික දත්ත තෝරණය' කිරීමට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක්, අපි වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් වෙනුවෙන් තෝරණය කර අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයක් අවස්ථානය කරන්න, අපි කියන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිචාර +2.6 BLUE වලට +2.6 BLUE වලට පරීක්", 'ur': "ٹرینگ ڈیٹا کے ذریعہ ذریعہ انتخاب نے ایک موفق تکنیک کو ثابت کر دیا ہے کہ ایک دفعہ تکنیک کی تدریس کے مطابق اور ترجمہ کے مطابق فعالیت کو افزایش کرے۔ نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کی اخیر زیادتی کے ساتھ ہم اس کاغذ میں کس طرح اور کس طرح NMT ڈیٹا انتخاب سے فائدہ پہنچا سکتے ہیں۔ حالانکہ اکسلروڈ اور الٹ، 2011 کی حالت میں اچھی طرح عمل کرتی ہے، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ غالب NMT کے لئے بہت کم ہے. بعد، ہم NMT کے لئے 'dynamic data selection' کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک طریقہ جس میں ہم مختلف ٹرینگ ایپوچ کے درمیان انتخاب کئے ہوئے دکھانے کے سپسٹ کو تغییر دیتے ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ بہترین نتیجے حاصل کئے جاتے ہیں جب ہم ایک ٹیکنیک کاری کرتے ہیں جسے ہم نے +2.6 بلیوس کے ساتھ +3.1 بلیوس کے ذریعے ایک عمومی بنسلین پر +3.1 بلیوس کے ساتھ +3.1 بلیوس کا نام لیتے ہیں۔", 'mt': 'L-għa żla intelliġenti tad-dejta tat-taħriġ uriet teknika ta’ suċċess biex fl-istess ħin tiżdied l-effiċjenza tat-taħriġ u l-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna bbażata fuq il-frażi (PBMT). With the recent increase in popularity of neural machine translation (NMT), we explore in this paper to what extent and how NMT can also benefit from data selection.  Filwaqt li l-għażla tad-dejta l-aktar avvanzata (Axelrod et al., 2011) hija konsistentement tajba għall-PBMT, nagħmlu evidenza li l-qligħ huwa sostanzjalment aktar baxx għall-NMT. Imbagħad, a ħna nintroduċu “għażla dinamika tad-dejta” għall-NMT, metodu li fih ivarjaw is-sottosett magħżul ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ bejn epoki differenti ta’ taħriġ. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-a ħjar riżultati jinkisbu meta tiġi applikata teknika li jissejħu “rfinar gradwali”, b’titjib sa +2.6 BLEU fuq l-approċċ oriġinali tal-għażla tad-dejta u sa +3.1 BLEU fuq linja bażi ġenerali.', 'uz': "@ info With the recent increase in popularity of neural machine translation (NMT), we explore in this paper to what extent and how NMT can also benefit from data selection.  Sana haqida maʼlumotni tanlash (Axelrod et al., 2011) davomida PBMT uchun yaxshi bajarayotganda, biz NMT uchun muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatganmiz. Keyingi, biz NMT uchun `dynamik maʼlumotni tanlash mumkin. Bu usuli, biz har xil taʼminlovchi vazifalar orasidagi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni ajratib turamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz esa, tugmalar birikmasini `darajada yaxshi yaxshi natijalar olib tashlanadi va asl maʼlumot tanlash usulini boshlab, + 2.6 BLEU' deb ataymiz, asl maʼlumot tanlash usulini va bir umumiy asosiy tugmasini + 3.1 BLEU kabi.", 'vi': 'Sự lựa chọn thông minh của dữ liệu đào tạo đã chứng minh một kỹ thuật thành công nhằm đồng thời tăng hiệu quả đào tạo và hiệu suất dịch chuyển bằng từ cơ bản. Với sự gia tăng gần đây của tiếng dịch biến máy thần kinh (NMB) chúng tôi đã khám phá trong tờ giấy này bao nhiêu điểm và làm thế nào mà NMB cũng có thể hưởng từ việc chọn dữ liệu. Trong khi sự chọn dữ liệu hiện đại (Axelrod et., 2011) hoàn toàn làm việc tốt cho PBMTV, chúng tôi cho thấy kiếm lợi dưới đáng kể cho NMB. Tiếp theo, chúng tôi giới thiệu\'Sự chọn dữ liệu động động tĩnh\'cho công ty NMT, một phương pháp mà chúng tôi thay đổi nhóm đã chọn giữa các giai đoạn huấn luyện khác nhau. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả tốt nhất khi áp dụng một phương pháp mà chúng tôi gọi là "độ cẩn thận" với những cải tiến đến "2.6 bleU" trên phương pháp tự chọn dữ liệu ban đầu và đến "3.1 nguyên tắc."', 'da': 'Intelligent udvælgelse af træningsdata har vist sig at være en succesfuld teknik til samtidig at øge træningseffektiviteten og oversættelseseffektiviteten for sætningsbaseret maskinoversættelse (PBMT). Med den seneste stigning i popularitet af neural maskinoversættelse (NMT), undersøger vi i denne artikel, i hvilket omfang og hvordan NMT også kan drage fordel af dataudvælgelse. Mens topmoderne dataudvælgelse (Axelrod et al., 2011) konsekvent klarer sig godt for PBMT, viser vi, at gevinsterne er betydeligt lavere for NMT. Dernæst introducerer vi `dynamisk datavalg\' for NMT, en metode, hvor vi varierer den valgte delmængde af træningsdata mellem forskellige træningsperioder. Vores eksperimenter viser, at de bedste resultater opnås ved anvendelse af en teknik, vi kalder "gradvis finjustering", med forbedringer op til +2,6 BLEU i forhold til den oprindelige dataudvælgelsesmetode og op til +3,1 BLEU i forhold til en generel baseline.', 'hr': 'Inteligentni izbor podataka o obuci dokazao je uspješnu tehniku za istovremeno povećanje učinkovitosti obuke i učinkovitosti prevoda za prevod strojeva na frazi (PBMT). S nedavnim povećanjem popularnosti prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT), istražujemo u ovom papiru koliku mjeru i kako NMT također može koristiti od selekcije podataka. Iako izbor podataka o stanju umjetnosti (Axelrod et al., 2011) stalno dobro izvodi za PBMT, pokazujemo da su dobiti značajno niži za NMT. Sljedeće, predstavljamo „dinamični izbor podataka“ za NMT-a, metodu u kojoj se razlikujemo odabrani podatak obuke između različitih epoka obuke. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su najbolji rezultati postignuti kada se primjenjujemo tehnike koju nazivamo „postupno finaliziranje“, s poboljšanjem do +2,6 BLEU zbog originalnog pristupa izbora podataka i do +3,1 BLEU na općem početku.', 'de': 'Die intelligente Auswahl von Trainingsdaten hat sich als erfolgreiches Verfahren erwiesen, um die Trainingseffizienz und Übersetzungsleistung für phrasenbasierte maschinelle Übersetzung (PBMT) gleichzeitig zu steigern. Mit der jüngsten Zunahme der Popularität der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) untersuchen wir in diesem Beitrag, inwieweit und wie NMT auch von der Datenauswahl profitieren kann. Während die moderne Datenauswahl (Axelrod et al., 2011) für PBMT durchweg gut abschneidet, zeigen wir, dass die Gewinne für NMT deutlich geringer sind. Als nächstes stellen wir die dynamische Datenauswahl für NMT vor, eine Methode, bei der wir die ausgewählte Teilmenge von Trainingsdaten zwischen verschiedenen Trainingsepochen variieren. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die besten Ergebnisse erzielt werden, wenn man eine Technik anwendet, die wir "graduale Feinabstimmung" nennen, mit Verbesserungen bis zu +2.6 BLEU gegenüber dem ursprünglichen Datenauswahl-Ansatz und bis zu +3.1 BLEU gegenüber einer allgemeinen Baseline.', 'ko': "짧은 말 기반의 기계번역(PBMT)에서 훈련 데이터의 스마트 선택은 훈련 효율과 번역 성능을 동시에 향상시키는 성공적인 기술로 증명되었다.최근 신경기계번역(NMT)이 보급됨에 따라 우리는 본고에서 NMT가 어느 정도, 그리고 데이터 선택에서 어떻게 이익을 얻는지 연구했다.최첨단 데이터 선택(Axelrod 등, 2011년)은 PBMT에서 시종일관 양호했지만 NMT의 수익은 훨씬 낮다는 것을 보여준다.다음에 우리는 NMT를 위해'동적 데이터 선택'을 도입할 것이다. 이런 방법에서 우리는 서로 다른 훈련 시간 사이에 훈련 데이터의 선택자 집합을 바꿀 것이다.우리의 실험은 우리가'점진적 미세조정'이라고 부르는 기술을 적용할 때 원시 데이터 선택 방법보다 +2.6 BLEU, 일반 기준선보다 +3.1 BLEU 향상된 최상의 효과를 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.", 'bg': 'Интелигентният подбор на данни за обучение доказа успешна техника за едновременно повишаване на ефективността на обучението и ефективността на превода за машинен превод на фраза. С неотдавнашното увеличаване на популярността на невронния машинен превод (НМТ), ние изследваме в тази статия до каква степен и как НМТ също може да се възползва от избора на данни. Докато най-съвременният подбор на данни (Axelrod et al., 2011 г.) последователно се представя добре за PBMT, ние показваме, че печалбите са значително по-ниски за NMT. След това въвеждаме "динамичен подбор на данни" за НМТ, метод, при който варираме избрания поднабор от данни за обучение между различните епохи на обучение. Нашите експерименти показват, че най-добрите резултати се постигат при прилагане на техника, която наричаме "постепенно фино настройване", с подобрения до +2.6 спрямо първоначалния подход за подбор на данни и до +3.1 спрямо обща база.', 'sw': "Uchaguzi wa taarifa za mafunzo umethibitisha mbinu yenye mafanikio kwa wakati mmoja kuongeza ufanisi wa mafunzo na ufanisi wa tafsiri kwa tafsiri ya mashine yenye msingi wa maneno (PBMT). Kwa kuongezeka kwa umaarufu wa tafsiri ya mashine ya neura (NMT), tunachunguza katika karatasi hii kwa kiasi gani na jinsi NMT inavyoweza kufaidika na uchaguzi wa data. Wakati uchaguzi wa takwimu za sanaa (Axelrod et al., 2011) unafanya kazi nzuri kwa PBMT, tunaonyesha kwamba mafanikio yamepungua sana kwa NMT. Baadae, tunaonyesha 'uchaguzi wa taarifa za kibiashara' kwa NMT, njia ambayo tunatofautiana na kandanda ya taarifa za mafunzo kati ya maendeleo tofauti. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba matokeo mazuri zaidi yamefanishwa pale tunavyotumia teknolojia tunaloiita ‘mafunzo mazuri ya kwanza’, ikiwa na maboresho ya kufikia +2.6 BLEU juu ya mbinu za rasmi za uchaguzi wa taarifa na kufikia +3.1 BLEU juu ya msingi wa jumla.", 'nl': "Intelligente selectie van trainingsgegevens heeft bewezen een succesvolle techniek om tegelijkertijd de trainingsefficiëntie en vertaalprestaties voor frase-based machine translation (PBMT) te verhogen. Met de recente toename van populariteit van neural machine translation (NMT), onderzoeken we in dit artikel in hoeverre en hoe NMT ook kan profiteren van dataselectie. Hoewel state-of-the-art dataselectie (Axelrod et al., 2011) consequent goed presteert voor PBMT, laten we zien dat de winsten aanzienlijk lager zijn voor NMT. Vervolgens introduceren we 'dynamische gegevensselectie' voor NMT, een methode waarbij we de geselecteerde deelverzameling trainingsgegevens variëren tussen verschillende trainingstijdperken. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de beste resultaten worden bereikt bij het toepassen van een techniek die we 'graduale finetuning' noemen, met verbeteringen tot +2.6 BLEU ten opzichte van de oorspronkelijke dataselectie benadering en tot +3.1 BLEU ten opzichte van een algemene baseline.", 'tr': "Akylly terjime maglumatlaryň akylly saýlamagy, fraz tabanly makina terjime etmäge (PBMT) üçin üstünlikli tekniki bejermek üçin üstünlikli bir tekniki tassyklady. NMT'iň ýakynda näyral maşynyň terjimesiniň ünüň döwletlerinde, bu kagyzda nähili kadara we NMT-iň nähili maglumatlary saýlamakdan fayda ýetirebilir? Bu suçsuz möhüm data saýlawy (Axelrod et al., 2011) PBMT üçin gowy işleýän bolsa biz NMT üçin gazanç düşükligini görkeýäris Indiki, NMT üçin 'dynamik maglumat saýlamagyny' tanyşdyrýarys, bu nusgasynda saýlanan sahypalaryň farklı eğitim zamanlarynyň arasynda üýtgeştirilýäris. Biziň deneylerimiz munuň iň gowy netijesi başarmagyny görkezýär. Munuň özüniň data saýlawyň golaýynda +2.6 BLEU-a gelişmeleri we +3.1 BLEU-a çenli orta çyzgylyga çenli üýtgeşmelerden berilýär.", 'af': "Inteligente keuse van onderwerp data het 'n suksesvolle teknike bevestig om onderwerp effektief en vertaling te verhoog vir frase-gebaseerde masjien vertaling (PBMT). Met die onlangse vergroot vergroot in populariteit van neurale masjien vertaling (NMT), ons ondersoek in hierdie papier tot wat uitbreiding en hoe NMT ook kan voordeel van data keuse. Terwyl staat-van-die-kunstens data keuse (Axelrod et al., 2011) bestaande goed vir PBMT uitvoer, wys ons dat verkrywings betekens onder is vir NMT. Volgende, ons introduseer 'dinamiese data keuse' vir NMT, 'n metode waarin ons die gekose subartikel van onderwerp data tussen verskillende onderwerp epochs verander. Ons eksperimente wys dat die beste resultate bereik word wanneer ons 'n teknikkie aanwend word, noem ons 'graduul fin-tuning', met verbeteringe tot +2.6 BLES oor die oorspronklike data-keuse toegang en tot +3.1 BLEU oor 'n algemene basilyn.", 'id': "Seleksi intelijen data pelatihan telah membuktikan teknik sukses untuk bersamaan meningkatkan efisiensi pelatihan dan prestasi terjemahan untuk terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa (PBMT). Dengan peningkatan popularitas terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) yang baru-baru ini, kami mengeksplorasi di kertas ini hingga ke mana dan bagaimana NMT juga dapat berguna dari seleksi data. Sementara seleksi data terbaik (Axelrod et al., 2011) secara konsisten berjalan dengan baik untuk PBMT, kami menunjukkan bahwa keuntungan adalah jauh lebih rendah untuk NMT. Next, we introduce `dynamic data selection' for NMT, a method in which we vary the selected subset of training data between different training epochs.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa hasil terbaik dicapai ketika menerapkan teknik yang kami sebut `peringkat-peringkat secara bertahap', dengan peningkatan sampai +2.6 BLEU atas pendekatan pemilihan data asli dan sampai +3.1 BLEU atas dasar umum.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja inteligjente e të dhënave të trainimit ka provuar një teknikë të suksesshme për të rritur njëkohësisht efikasitetin e trainimit dhe performancën e përkthimit për përkthimin e makinës me bazë në fraza (PBMT). With the recent increase in popularity of neural machine translation (NMT), we explore in this paper to what extent and how NMT can also benefit from data selection.  Ndërsa zgjedhja e të dhënave më e moderne (Axelrod et al., 2011) funksionon vazhdimisht mirë për PBMT, ne tregojmë se fitimet janë thelbësisht më të ulta për NMT. Pastaj, ne prezantojmë `zgjedhjen dinamike të të dhënave\' për NMT, një metodë në të cilën ndryshojmë nëngrupin e zgjedhur të të dhënave të trainimit midis epokëve të ndryshme të trainimit. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se rezultatet më të mira arrihen kur zbatohet një teknikë që ne e quajmë "rregullim gradual", me përmirësime deri në +2.6 BLEU lidhur me qasjen origjinale të zgjedhjes së të dhënave dhe deri në +3.1 BLEU lidhur me një bazë të përgjithshme.', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ዳታ ምርጫ በንግግር-based machine ትርጓሜ (PBMT) የተመሳሳይን እና ትርጉም ድምፅን ለመጨመር ስህተት አቅኝቷል፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የናውሬል መኪን ትርጉም (NMT) በሚያሳየው አካባቢ፣ ከዳታ ምርጫው እንዴት እናስጠቅመው እንደሆነ እናፈቅዳለን፡፡ የ-አርእስት ዳታ ምርጫ (Axelrod et al., 2011) በተጨማሪው ለPBMT ጥሩ ሲያደርግ እናሳየዋለን፤ የግዛት ግንኙነት ለNMT በጣም ታናሽ እንደሆነ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የሚቀጥለውን `አዲስ ዳታ መምረጡ› ለNMT እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የፊደል ፍሬዎች `ቀላል ጥሩ-ጥያቄን በመጠቀም ጊዜ `መግለጫ ጥሩ› የሚለውጥ መሆኑን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Պարզվեց, որ ուսուցման տվյալների խելացի ընտրությունը հաջողակ տեխնիկան է, որպեսզի միաժամանակ բարձրացնենք ուսուցման արդյունավետությունը և թարգմանման արդյունավետությունը արտահայտությամբ հիմնված մեքենայի թարգ Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) բնակչության վերջերս աճի արդյունքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով և ինչպես է NMT-ը կարող օգտագործել տվյալների ընտրությունը: Մինչդեռ ամենահետաքրքիր տվյալների ընտրությունը (AXLEROD և այլն., 2011) հետևաբար լավ է աշխատում PBMT-ի համար, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ շահույթը նշանակաբար ավելի ցածր է NMT-ի համար: Հաջորդ, մենք ներկայացնում ենք NMT-ի «դինամիկ տվյալների ընտրությունը», մի մեթոդ, որի միջոցով մենք տարբերվում ենք ուսուցման տվյալների ընտրված ենթախումբը տարբեր ուսուցման ժամանակաշրջանների միջև: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ լավագույն արդյունքները հասնում են այն տեխնիկայի օգտագործման ժամանակ, որը մենք անվանում ենք «աստիճանաբար բարելավում», որի արդյունքում կատարվում է մինչև +2.6 ԲԼԵՎ սկզբնական տվյալների ընտրության մոտեցում և մինչև +3.1 ԲԼԵՎ', 'bn': "Intelligent selection of training data has proven a successful technique to simultaneously increase training efficiency and translation performance for phrase-based machine translation (PBMT).  নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সম্প্রতি জনপ্রিয় জনপ্রিয়তা বৃদ্ধির সাথে আমরা এই কাগজটিতে খুঁজে বের করি তথ্য নির্বাচন থেকে কি পর্যা যখন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের তথ্য নির্বাচন (এক্সেলর্ড এন্টাল ২০১১) সবসময় পিবিএমটির জন্য ভালো কাজ করছে, তখন আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে অর্জন বেশী কম এনএমটির জন্ Next, we introduce `dynamic data selection' for NMT, a method in which we vary the selected subset of training data between different training epochs.  আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমরা একটি প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করার সময় সেরা ফলাফল অর্জন করা হয়েছে ‘গ্রীগ্রীয় ভালোভাবে সংশোধন করা’, যেখানে প্রাথমিক তথ্য নির্বাচনের ক্ষেত", 'az': "Eğitim məlumatlarının a ğıllı seçimləri bir-birinə təhsil etkinlik və təhsil etkinlik göstərməsi üçün təhsil etmək üçün başarılı bir tekniki təsdiqlədi. NMT-nin yeni məşhurluğu ilə bu kağızda nə qədər və NMT-nin məlumatların seçməsindən fayda verə biləcəyini keşfetmişik. Axelrod et al., 2011-ci ildə PBMT üçün yaxşı işlər görən məlumatlar seçilməsini göstəririk ki, qələbə NMT üçün çox düşük olduğunu göstəririk. Sonra NMT üçün 'dinamik məlumat seçimi' vasitəsilə tanıdırıq, bu vasitəsilə seçilmiş təhsil məlumatları müxtəlif təhsil məlumatları arasında dəyişdiririk. Bizim təcrübələrimiz təcrübələrimizin ən yaxşı sonuçları təcrübə edərkən +2.6 BLEU ilə başlangıcı məlumat seçmə tərzində və +3.1 BLEU ilə genel təcrübə səhifəsində +3.1 BLEU adlandırıldığını göstərər.", 'cs': 'Inteligentní výběr tréninkových dat se osvědčil jako úspěšná technika současně zvyšující efektivitu tréninku a výkonnost překladu pro frázový strojový překlad (PBMT). S nedávným nárůstem popularity neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) zkoumáme v tomto článku, do jaké míry a jak může NMT těžit také z výběru dat. Zatímco moderní výběr dat (Axelrod et al., 2011) konzistentně vede pro PBMT dobře, ukazujeme, že zisky jsou u NMT podstatně nižší. Dále představujeme `dynamický výběr dat\' pro NMT, metodu, ve které měníme vybranou podmnožinu tréninkových dat mezi různými tréninkovými epochami. Naše experimenty ukazují, že nejlepších výsledků jsou dosaženy při aplikaci techniky, které nazýváme "postupné jemné ladění", se zlepšením až do +2.6 BLEU oproti původnímu přístupu k výběru dat a až do +3.1 BLEU nad obecným základním principem.', 'et': 'Koolitusandmete intelligentne valik on osutunud edukaks tehnikaks, mis suurendab samaaegselt väljenduspõhise masintõlke (PBMT) koolituse efektiivsust ja tõlkimisjõudlust. Hiljutise neuromasintõlke populaarsuse suurenemisega uurime käesolevas artiklis, mil määral ja kuidas NMT saab andmete valikust kasu. Kuigi tipptasemel andmete valik (Axelrod et al., 2011) on PBMT puhul järjepidevalt hea, näitame, et NMT puhul on kasu oluliselt väiksem. Järgmisena tutvustame NMT dünaamilist andmevalikut, meetodit, mille abil erinevate koolitusperioodide vahel erinevaid koolitusandmeid. Meie katsed näitavad, et parimad tulemused saavutatakse tehnika rakendamisel, mida nimetame "järkjärguliseks peenhäälestuseks", parandades kuni +2,6 BLEU võrreldes esialgse andmevaliku meetodiga ja kuni +3,1 BLEU võrreldes üldise lähtetasemega.', 'fi': 'Älykäs harjoitustietojen valinta on osoittautunut onnistuneeksi tekniikaksi, jolla lisätään samanaikaisesti harjoitustehokkuutta ja käännöstehokkuutta lausepohjaisessa konekäännöksessä (PBMT). Neuronen konekäännöksen (NMT) suosion viimeaikaisen kasvun myötä tutkimme tässä artikkelissa, missä määrin ja miten NMT voi myös hyötyä datan valinnasta. Vaikka viimeisintä tekniikkaa edustava tietojen valinta (Axelrod et al., 2011) suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti hyvin PBMT:n osalta, osoitamme, että NMT:n voitot ovat huomattavasti pienemmät. Seuraavaksi esittelemme NMT:n dynaamisen datan valinnan, menetelmän, jossa valitaan koulutusdatan osajoukko eri koulutuskausien välillä. Kokeemme osoittavat, että parhaat tulokset saavutetaan soveltamalla tekniikkaa, jota kutsumme "asteittaiseksi hienosäätöksi", jossa parannuksia on jopa +2,6 BLEU verrattuna alkuperäiseen tiedonvalintamenettelyyn ja enintään +3,1 BLEU verrattuna yleiseen lähtötasoon.', 'fa': 'انتخاب هوشمند اطلاعات آموزش یک تکنیک موفقیت برای افزایش فعالیت آموزش و ترجمه برای ترجمه دستگاه بر اساس عبارت (PBMT) ثابت کرده است. با افزایش اخیر شهرت ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) در این کاغذ به چه اندازه و چگونه NMT می\u200cتواند از انتخاب داده\u200cها سود ببرد. در حالی که انتخاب داده های ایالت هنری (Axelrod et al., 2011) همیشه برای PBMT خوب انجام می\u200cدهد، نشان می\u200cدهیم که پیروزی برای NMT بسیار کمتر است. بعدش، ما «انتخاب داده\u200cهای dinamikی» را برای NMT معرفی می\u200cکنیم، روش\u200cای که در آن می\u200cتوانیم بخش\u200cهای انتخاب داده\u200cهای آموزش بین افتخار آموزش متفاوتی تغییر دهیم. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که بهترین نتایج در زمان کاربرد تکنیکی که ما به عنوان «تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغ', 'ca': 'La selecció intel·ligent de dades d\'entrenament ha demostrat una tècnica d\'èxit per augmentar simultàniament l\'eficiència d\'entrenament i el rendiment de traducció de la traducció automàtica basada en frases (PBMT). With the recent increase in popularity of neural machine translation (NMT), we explore in this paper to what extent and how NMT can also benefit from data selection.  Mentre que la selecció de dades més avançada (Axelrod et al., 2011) funciona consistentment bé per a PBMT, demostram que els guanys són substancialment més baixos per a NMT. Després, introduïm la selecció dinàmica de dades per a la NMT, un mètode en el qual variam el subconjunt seleccionat de dades d\'entrenament entre diferents èpoces d\'entrenament. Els nostres experiments demostren que els millors resultats s\'aconsegueixen aplicant una tècnica que anomenem "ajustament gradual", amb millores fins a +2,6 BLEU sobre l\'enfocament original de selecció de dades i fins a +3,1 BLUE sobre una base general.', 'bs': 'Inteligentni izbor podataka o obuci dokazao je uspješnu tehniku da istovremeno povećava učinkovitost obuke i učinkovitost prevoda za prevod strojeva na frazi (PBMT). S nedavnim povećanjem popularnosti prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT), istražujemo u ovom papiru koliku mjeru i kako NMT može koristiti i od selekcije podataka. Iako izbor podataka iz stanja umjetnosti (Axelrod et al., 2011) stalno dobro izvodi za PBMT, pokazujemo da su dobiti značajno niži za NMT. Sljedeće, predstavljamo „dinamični izbor podataka” za NMT, metodu u kojoj se razlikujemo odabrani podatak obuke između različitih epoka obuke. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su najbolji rezultati postignuti kada primjenjujemo tehniku koju nazivamo „postupno finaliziranje“, s poboljšanjem do +2,6 BLEU zbog originalnog pristupa selekcije podataka i do +3,1 BLEU na osnovnoj liniji.', 'sk': "Inteligentna izbira podatkov o usposabljanju se je izkazala za uspešno tehniko, ki hkrati povečuje učinkovitost usposabljanja in prevajanje za strojno prevajanje fraz (PBMT). Z nedavnim povečanjem priljubljenosti nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) raziskujemo, v kakšni meri in kako lahko NMT koristi tudi od izbire podatkov. Medtem ko je najsodobnejša izbira podatkov (Axelrod et al., 2011) dosledno uspešna za PBMT, dokazujemo, da so dobički za NMT bistveno nižji. Nato predstavimo `dinamično izbiro podatkov' za NMT, metodo, pri kateri razlikujemo izbran podnabor podatkov o usposabljanju med različnimi obdobji usposabljanja. Naši poskusi kažejo, da so najboljši rezultati doseženi pri uporabi tehnike, ki jo imenujemo ‚postopno fino uravnavanje', z izboljšavami do +2,6 BLEU v primerjavi s prvotnim pristopom izbire podatkov in do +3,1 BLEU v primerjavi s splošnim osnovnim izhodiščem.", 'ha': "@ info: tooltip @ info: whatsthis A lõkacin da state-of-the-art data select (AxelRo et al., 2011) yana tafiyar da amfani da PBMT, munã nuna cewa kashi masu ƙaranci ga NMT. Dakata, za'a nuna `zaɓen bayani na'a' wa NMT, shirin da Muke rarraba danne-danne da aka zãɓa a tsakanin mafarin-danne daban. Ciryoyinmu na nũna cewa mafiya kyau za'a sami matsala idan za'a yi amfani da tufãfin da za'a yi `danne-tunning' kuma a sami mafiya kyau zuwa+2.6 BLEU kan hanyor farko na zaɓen data kuma up to+3.1 BLEU a kan jama'a.", 'he': 'בחירה נבונה של נתוני האימונים הוכיחה טכניקה מצליחה לגדל באותו הזמן יעילות האימונים וביצועות התרגום לתרגום מכונת מבוססת ביטויים (PBMT). עם הגידול האחרון בפופולריות של התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT), אנו חוקרים בעיתון הזה באיזה מידה ואיך NMT יכול גם להשתמש בבחירת נתונים. בעוד הבחירה של נתונים חדשים (Axelrod et al., 2011) מתבצעת באופן קבוע טוב עבור PBMT, אנחנו מראים שהרווחים נמוכים יותר באופן משמעותי עבור NMT. לאחר מכן, אנחנו מציגים "בחירת נתונים דינמיים" עבור NMT, שיטה שבה אנו משנים את תחתון הנבחר של נתונים אימונים בין תקופות אימונים שונות. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהתוצאות הטובות ביותר נעשות בהשתמשת טכניקה שאנחנו קוראים לה "התאימון מדרגי", עם שיפורים עד +2.6 BLEU על גישת הבחירה המקורית של נתונים ועל +3.1 BLEU על בסיס כללי.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé ning datang nggawe cara-cara sak wis nguasai tékno sing beraksi kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngubah ujaran itoleng maneh (PPM T). uban kapan popularno kanggo kalagayaan karo penting ing kapan pangan de manut (NMT), kita sak yata kakipun ing kapan iki karo ngon kapan kanggo sampek kapan karo NMT iso nguasai kapan mulasar dadi. Mungkin akses-kamuh data yang dipileksi (axielroot et al, 2011) dadi ngono sing dibenakake kanggo PPM, kita ngomongke bakal kelas barang kanggo NMT Next, we present 'dynamics data select' for NMT, a method that we change the selected podcast from a Learning Mode Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno pertama nggawe aksi tékno sing nyebutaké 'coral-ntinal' kanggo nyebutaké + 2.6", 'bo': "དྲན་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཉེན་བརྟན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་སྔར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྩིས་བརྗོད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་NMT འི་རྩིས་བརྗོད་དང་། ཇི་ལྟར་རང་ དེ་འབདཝ་ད། ສະຖານ་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གདམ་པ(Axelrod et al., 2011)ཡིས་PBMT་ལ་ལས་སྟངས་དང་ལྡན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁ་ཐོག་ཚེ་N འོན་ཀྱང་། NMT ལ་རང་ཉིད་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བའི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྲོད་ནས། Our experiments show that the best results are achieved when applying a technique we call 'gradual fine-tuning', with improvements up to +2.6 BLEU over the original data selection approach and up to +3.1 BLEU over a general baseline."}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation Leveraging Phrase-based Models in a Hybrid Search', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية تستفيد من النماذج المبنية على العبارات في البحث الهجين', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal que aprovecha los modelos basados en frases en una búsqueda híbrida', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural aproveitando modelos baseados em frases em uma pesquisa híbrida', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale utilisant des modèles basés sur des phrases dans une recherche hybride', 'ja': 'ハイブリッド検索でフレーズベースのモデルを活用するニューラルマシン翻訳', 'zh': '混合搜索,利用短语神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद एक हाइब्रिड खोज में वाक्यांश-आधारित मॉडल का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод с использованием моделей на основе фраз в гибридном поиске', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach Samhlacha Frás-bhunaithe a Ghiaráil i gCuardach Hibrideach', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Sfruttare i modelli basati su frasi in una ricerca ibrida', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση Αξιοποίηση μοντέλων βασισμένων σε φράσεις σε μια υβριδική αναζήτηση', 'kk': 'Хибридті іздеу үлгілерінде нейрондық машинаның аудару үлгілері', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašin ų vertimo spartinimo frazėmis modeliai hibridinėje paieškoje', 'mk': 'Модели базирани на фраза за преведување на неврални машини во хибридно пребарување', 'ms': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás A kifejezésalapú modellek kihasználása hibrid keresésben', 'mn': 'Хибрид хайлтын мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт', 'ml': 'ഹൈബ്രിഡ് തെരയുന്നതില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudelli bbażati fuq il-Frażi tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali f’Riċerka Ibrida', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală utilizând modele bazate pe fraze într-o căutare hibridă', 'sr': 'Neuralna mašin a prevoda na osnovu fraze baziranih modela u hibridnom pretraživanju', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Turjumidda qoraalka ku saleysan Phrase-based Models in a Hybrid Search', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning Utnyttja frasbaserade modeller i en hybridsökning', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe Wykorzystanie modeli opartych na frazach w wyszukiwaniu hybrydowym', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phiên bản dịch thần kinh của máy tạo thần kinh', 'nl': 'Neuronale Machine Translation Gebruik maken van op zinnen gebaseerde modellen in een hybride zoekopdracht', 'bg': 'Невроден машинен превод Използване на модели базирани на фрази в хибридно търсене', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse Udnyttelse af sætningsbaserede modeller i en hybridsøgning', 'hr': 'Neuralno uređajno prevodenje podsticajući modele na formuli u hibridnom pretraživanju', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung: Nutzung phrasebasierter Modelle in einer Hybridsuche', 'id': 'Model Berdasarkan Frasa Translation Mesin Neural dalam Pencarian Hybrid', 'ko': '혼합 검색에서 단어 모형을 이용한 신경기계 번역', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Hybrid Araştyrmanyň içinde näral Makina terjime edilen Fraz tabanly nusgalar', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kijerumani', 'sq': 'Modelet e përkthimit të Makinës Neurale me bazë në fraza në një kërkim hibridë', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'bn': 'হাইব্রিড অনুসন্ধানে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ লেভারেজিং ফার্স ভিত্তিক মডেল', 'hy': 'Հիբրիդային որոնման մեջ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը բարձրացնում է արտահայտությամբ հիմնված մոդելները', 'az': 'Hibrid Araştırmasında nöral Makin Çeviri', 'bs': 'Neuralna mašin a prevoda podsticajući model na frazi u hibridnom pretraživanju', 'ca': 'Models basats en frases de traducció de màquines neuronals en una recerca híbrida', 'cs': 'Využití modelů založených na frázích v hybridním vyhledávání', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge, mis kasutab fraasipõhiseid mudeleid hübriidotsingus', 'fi': 'Neuroiden konekäännösten hyödyntäminen lauseisiin perustuvissa malleissa hybridihausussa', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Živčni strojni prevod, ki temelji na frazah v hibridnem iskanju', 'he': 'מודלים מבוססים על פרזיות של מכונות נוירות בחיפוש היברידי', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་མཚོན་པའི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནང་འཁོར་གཞུང་གི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we introduce a hybrid search for attention-based neural machine translation (NMT). A target phrase learned with statistical MT models extends a hypothesis in the NMT beam search when the attention of the NMT model focuses on the source words translated by this phrase. Phrases added in this way are scored with the NMT model, but also with SMT features including phrase-level translation probabilities and a target language model. Experimental results on German-to-English news domain and English-to-Russian e-commerce domain translation tasks show that using phrase-based models in NMT search improves MT quality by up to 2.3 % BLEU absolute as compared to a strong NMT baseline.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم بحثًا هجينًا عن الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الانتباه (NMT). توسع العبارة المستهدفة التي تم تعلمها باستخدام نماذج MT الإحصائية الفرضية في بحث حزمة NMT عندما يركز انتباه نموذج NMT على الكلمات المصدر المترجمة بواسطة هذه العبارة. يتم تسجيل العبارات المضافة بهذه الطريقة باستخدام نموذج NMT ، ولكن أيضًا مع ميزات SMT بما في ذلك احتمالات الترجمة على مستوى العبارة ونموذج اللغة الهدف. تظهر النتائج التجريبية في مجال الأخبار من الألمانية إلى الإنجليزية ومهام ترجمة مجال التجارة الإلكترونية من الإنجليزية إلى الروسية أن استخدام النماذج القائمة على العبارات في بحث NMT يحسن جودة MT بنسبة تصل إلى 2.3٪ BLEU مطلقًا مقارنة بخط أساس NMT قوي.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos una búsqueda híbrida de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) basada en la atención. Una frase objetivo aprendida con modelos estadísticos de MT amplía una hipótesis en la búsqueda de haces de NMT cuando la atención del modelo de NMT se centra en las palabras fuente traducidas por esta frase. Las frases agregadas de esta manera se puntúan con el modelo NMT, pero también con funciones SMT que incluyen probabilidades de traducción a nivel de frase y un modelo de idioma de destino. Los resultados experimentales de las tareas de traducción de dominio de noticias de alemán a inglés y dominio de comercio electrónico de inglés a ruso muestran que el uso de modelos basados en frases en la búsqueda de NMT mejora la calidad de MT hasta en un 2,3% absoluto BLEU en comparación con una base de referencia sólida de NMT.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une recherche hybride pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) basée sur l'attention. Une phrase cible apprise avec des modèles de MT statistiques étend une hypothèse dans la recherche de faisceau NMT lorsque l'attention du modèle NMT se concentre sur les mots sources traduits par cette phrase. Les phrases ajoutées de cette manière sont notées avec le modèle NMT, mais également avec des fonctionnalités SMT, notamment des probabilités de traduction au niveau de la phrase et un modèle de langue cible. Les résultats expérimentaux sur les tâches de traduction de domaines d'actualités de l'allemand vers l'anglais et de l'anglais vers le russe montrent que l'utilisation de modèles basés sur des phrases dans la recherche NMT améliore la qualité de la MT jusqu'à 2,3\xa0% en valeur absolue de l'UEBL par rapport à une base de référence NMT solide.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma pesquisa híbrida para tradução automática neural baseada em atenção (NMT). Uma frase alvo aprendida com modelos estatísticos de MT estende uma hipótese na busca do feixe NMT quando a atenção do modelo NMT se concentra nas palavras de origem traduzidas por essa frase. As frases adicionadas dessa maneira são pontuadas com o modelo NMT, mas também com recursos SMT, incluindo probabilidades de tradução em nível de frase e um modelo de idioma de destino. Resultados experimentais no domínio de notícias de alemão para inglês e tarefas de tradução de domínio de comércio eletrônico de inglês para russo mostram que o uso de modelos baseados em frases na pesquisa NMT melhora a qualidade do MT em até 2,3% BLEU absoluto em comparação com uma linha de base NMT forte.', 'ja': '注目に基づくニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）のハイブリッド検索を紹介します。統計的ＭＴモデルで学習されたターゲットフレーズは、ＮＭＴモデルの注目がこのフレーズによって翻訳されたソースワードに焦点を当てるとき、ＮＭＴビーム検索における仮説を拡張する。このようにして追加されたフレーズは、NMTモデルで採点されますが、フレーズレベルの翻訳確率とターゲット言語モデルを含むSMT機能でも採点されます。ドイツ語から英語へのニュースドメインおよび英語からロシア語へのeコマースドメイン翻訳タスクの実験結果は、NMT検索でフレーズベースのモデルを使用すると、強力なNMTベースラインと比較して最大2.3 ％のBLEU絶対的なMT品質が改善されることを示しています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) के लिए एक हाइब्रिड खोज पेश करते हैं। सांख्यिकीय एमटी मॉडल के साथ सीखा गया एक लक्ष्य वाक्यांश एनएमटी बीम खोज में एक परिकल्पना का विस्तार करता है जब एनएमटी मॉडल का ध्यान इस वाक्यांश द्वारा अनुवादित स्रोत शब्दों पर केंद्रित होता है। इस तरह से जोड़े गए वाक्यांशों को एनएमटी मॉडल के साथ स्कोर किया जाता है, लेकिन वाक्यांश-स्तर की अनुवाद संभावनाओं और एक लक्ष्य भाषा मॉडल सहित एसएमटी सुविधाओं के साथ भी। जर्मन-से-अंग्रेजी समाचार डोमेन और अंग्रेजी-से-रूसी ई-कॉमर्स डोमेन अनुवाद कार्यों पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि एनएमटी खोज में वाक्यांश-आधारित मॉडल का उपयोग करने से एमटी गुणवत्ता में एक मजबूत एनएमटी बेसलाइन की तुलना में 2.3% BLEU निरपेक्ष तक सुधार होता है।', 'zh': '本文,我们说了基于注意的神经机器翻译(NMT)混合搜索。 当 NMT 之意,集于短语译之源词,以计 MT 之学短语广 NMT 波束搜索之设。 以其所加短语用 NMT 评分,然亦用 SMT 特徵(及短语译概率与语言)评分。 夫德语英语新闻域、英语俄语电子商务译之实验结果表明,比于强 NMT 基线,于 NMT 搜索之中,用於短语, MT 高 2.3%,BLEU绝对值。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы вводим гибридный поиск основанного на внимании нейронного машинного перевода (НМП). Целевая фраза, изученная с помощью статистических моделей MT, расширяет гипотезу при поиске пучка НБ, когда внимание модели НБ сосредоточено на исходных словах, переведенных этой фразой. Фразы, добавленные таким образом, оцениваются с помощью модели NMT, а также с помощью функций SMT, включая вероятности перевода на уровне фраз и целевую языковую модель. Экспериментальные результаты по задачам перевода новостей с немецкого на английский и с английского на русский языки показывают, что использование фразеологических моделей в поиске NMT улучшает качество MT до 2,3% абсолютного BLEU по сравнению с сильным базовым уровнем NMT.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach cuardach hibrideach le haghaidh aistriúchán meaisín néarbhunaithe aird-bhunaithe (NMT). Leathnaíonn spriocfhrása a foghlaimíodh le samhlacha MT staitistiúla hipitéis i gcuardach bhíoma NMT nuair a dhíríonn aird an tsamhail NMT ar na focail fhoinse a aistrítear leis an frása seo. Scóráiltear frásaí a chuirtear leis ar an mbealach seo le múnla an NMT, ach freisin le gnéithe SMT lena n-áirítear dóchúlachtaí aistriúcháin ag leibhéal frása agus samhail sprioctheanga. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar fhearann nuachta Gearmáinis-go-Béarla agus tascanna aistriúcháin fearainn ríomhthráchtála Béarla-go-Rúisis go bhfeabhsaítear cáilíocht MT trí mhúnlaí frása-bhunaithe a úsáid i gcuardach NMT suas le 2.3% BLEU iomlán i gcomparáid le bunlíne láidir NMT.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a figyelem-alapú neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) hibrid keresését. A statisztikai MT modellek segítségével tanult célkifejezés kiterjeszti az NMT sugárkeresés hipotézisét, amikor az NMT modell figyelme a kifejezés által lefordított forrásszavakra összpontosít. Az így hozzáadott kifejezéseket az NMT modellel értékelik, de SMT funkciókkal is, beleértve a kifejezésszintű fordítási valószínűségeket és a célnyelvi modellt. A német-angol híradomány és az angol-orosz e-kereskedelmi domain fordítási feladatok kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a kifejezésalapú modellek használata az NMT keresésben akár 2,3%-kal javítja az MT minőségét az erős NMT alaphelyzethez képest.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια υβριδική αναζήτηση για τη βασισμένη στην προσοχή νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT). Μια φράση-στόχος που μαθαίνεται με στατιστικά μοντέλα επεκτείνει μια υπόθεση στην αναζήτηση ακτίνων όταν η προσοχή του μοντέλου επικεντρώνεται στις λέξεις προέλευσης που μεταφράζονται από αυτή τη φράση. Οι φράσεις που προστίθενται με αυτόν τον τρόπο βαθμολογούνται με το μοντέλο αλλά και με χαρακτηριστικά που περιλαμβάνουν πιθανότητες μετάφρασης σε επίπεδο φράσεων και ένα μοντέλο γλώσσας στόχου. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε γερμανικό-αγγλικό τομέα ειδήσεων και αγγλικό-ρωσικό τομέα μετάφρασης τομέων ηλεκτρονικού εμπορίου δείχνουν ότι η χρήση μοντέλων βασισμένων σε φράσεις στην αναζήτηση βελτιώνει την ποιότητα των ΜΤ έως 2,3% απόλυτου σε σύγκριση με μια ισχυρή βάση NMT.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз назардағы невралдық компьютердің аудармасының (NMT) гибридті іздеуді таңдаймыз. Статистикалық MT үлгілерімен үйренген мақсат сөздері NMT сұлбаның іздеу үшін NMT үлгісінің мақсаттары осы сөздер аударылған көзінің сөздеріне көздейді. Бұл түрде қосылған фразалар NMT үлгісімен, сондай-ақ SMT мүмкіндіктері, сөз деңгейінің аудару мүмкіндігін және мақсатты тіл үлгісін қоса алады. Неміс-ағылшын жаңалық доменіне және ағылшын-руссия эл-торгоз доменіне аудару тапсырмаларындағы эксперименталдық нәтижелері NMT іздеу үлгілерін қолдану үлгілерінде MT сапасының сапасы 2,3% дегенге дейін BLEU абсолюттігін', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes pristatome hibridinę paiešką dėmesiu pagrįsto neurologinio vertimo mašina (NMT). Tikslinė frazė, išmokta naudojant statistinius MT modelius, išplečia NMT spindulių paieškos hipotezę, kai NMT modelio dėmesys sutelkiamas į šios frazės vertamus šaltinius žodžius. Phrases added in this way are scored with the NMT model, but also with SMT features including phrase-level translation probabilities and a target language model.  Eksperimentiniai Vokietijos–Anglijos naujienų domeno ir anglų–Rusijos e. prekybos domeno vertimo užduočių rezultatai rodo, kad naudojant frazėmis pagrįstus modelius NMT paieškoje MT kokybė pagerėja iki 2,3 % BLEU absoliučiu lyginant su stipria NMT pradine verte.', 'it': "In questo articolo, introduciamo una ricerca ibrida per la traduzione automatica neurale basata sull'attenzione (NMT). Una frase target appresa con modelli MT statistici estende un'ipotesi nella ricerca del fascio NMT quando l'attenzione del modello NMT si concentra sulle parole sorgente tradotte da questa frase. Le frasi aggiunte in questo modo vengono valutate con il modello NMT, ma anche con funzionalità SMT, tra cui probabilità di traduzione a livello di frase e un modello di lingua di destinazione. I risultati sperimentali sul dominio di notizie tedesco-inglese e sulle attività di traduzione del dominio e-commerce inglese-russo mostrano che l'utilizzo di modelli basati su frasi nella ricerca NMT migliora la qualità MT fino al 2,3% assoluta BLEU rispetto a una solida base NMT.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме хибридна потрага по нервен превод (НМТ) базиран на внимание. Целна фраза научена со статистичките модели на MT ја продолжува хипотезата во пребарувањето на NMT прозорецот кога вниманието на NMT моделот се фокусира на изворните зборови преведени од оваа фраза. Фразите додадени на овој начин се оценувани со моделот НМТ, но исто така и со СМТ карактеристики вклучувајќи веројатности на превод на ниво на фрази и модел на јазик на цел. Експерименталните резултати на германското-англиското новинско домен и на англиско-руско-електронско-трговско домен превод покажуваат дека употребата на фрази-базирани модели во пребарувањето на НМТ го подобрува квалитетот на МТ за до 2,3 отсто БЛЕ апсолутно во споредба со силната', 'ms': 'In this paper, we introduce a hybrid search for attention-based neural machine translation (NMT).  A target phrase learned with statistical MT models extends a hypothesis in the NMT beam search when the attention of the NMT model focuses on the source words translated by this phrase.  Frasa ditambah dengan cara ini dicatat dengan model NMT, tetapi juga dengan ciri SMT termasuk kemungkinan terjemahan aras frasa dan model bahasa sasaran. Experimental results on German-to-English news domain and English-to-Russian e-commerce domain translation tasks show that using phrase-based models in NMT search improves MT quality by up to 2.3% BLEU absolute as compared to a strong NMT baseline.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu tiftix ibridu għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni (NMT). Frażi fil-mira li titgħallem bil-mudelli MT statistiċi testendi ipoteżi fit-tiftix tar-raġġ NMT meta l-attenzjoni tal-mudell NMT tiffoka fuq il-kliem tas-sors tradotti minn din il-frażi. Il-frażijiet miżjuda b’dan il-mod huma kklassifikati bil-mudell NMT, iżda wkoll b’karatteristiċi SMT inklużi l-probabbiltà tat-traduzzjoni fil-livell tal-frażi u mudell tal-lingwa fil-mira. Experimental results on German-to-English news domain and English-to-Russian e-commerce domain translation tasks show that using phrase-based models in NMT search improves MT quality by up to 2.3% BLEU absolute as compared to a strong NMT baseline.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഹൈബ്രിഡ് തെരയുന എംഎംടി മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യം എംടി ബീമില്\u200d തെരയുമ്പോള്\u200d NMT മോഡലിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയ സോര ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d NMT മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ട് സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യപ്പെടുന്നു, പക്ഷെ എസ്എംടി വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകളും വാക് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d - മുതല്\u200d - ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡോമെയിനും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മുതല്\u200d - ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മുതല്\u200d - റഷ്യന്\u200d ഇ- കമ്പനിസ് ഡോംബര്\u200dസ് പരിഭാഷകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു NMT തെരയുന്നത', 'no': 'I denne papiret introduserer vi ein hybridsøk etter omsetjing av oppmerksomhet basert på neuralmaskinen (NMT). Ein målfrase lært med statistiske MT-modeller utvidar eit hipotese i NMT-søket når oppmerksomheten til NMT-modellen fokuserer på kjeldeord omsett av denne frasen. Fraser som er lagt til på denne måten blir poeng med NMT- modellen, men også med SMT- funksjonar, inkludert sannsynlighetane for oversettelse av frånivå og målmamodel. Eksperimentale resultat på tysk-til-English news domain og English-to-Russian e-commerce domain translation oppgåver viser at ved bruk av frasebaserte modeller i NMT-søk forbetrar MT-kvalitet med opp til 2,3% BLEU absolutt samanlikna med e in sterk NMT baseline.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy hybrydowe wyszukiwanie neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na uwadze (NMT). Zdanie docelowe nauczone za pomocą statystycznych modeli MT rozszerza hipotezę w wyszukiwaniu wiązki NMT, gdy uwaga modelu NMT skupia się na słowach źródłowych przetłumaczonych tą frazą. Dodane w ten sposób frazy są oceniane za pomocą modelu NMT, ale także funkcjami SMT, w tym prawdopodobieństwem tłumaczenia na poziomie fraz i modelu języka docelowego. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące zadań tłumaczenia domen wiadomości z niemieckiego na angielski i angielsko-rosyjskiego e-commerce pokazują, że zastosowanie modeli opartych na frazach w wyszukiwaniu NMT poprawia jakość MT o maksymalnie 2,3% BLU absolutnego w porównaniu z silną bazą NMT.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ჰიბრიტური ძებნა ნეიროლური მაქანის გაგრძელება (NMT). სტატისტიკური MT მოდელთან სწავლილი მინიშვნელი ფრაზა NMT სინამდვილეში ჰიპოტეზას გაზრუნდება, როდესაც NMT მოდელის მონიშვნელობა იქნება ამ ფრაზაზე გადაწყვეტილი სიტყვე ამას დამატებული ფრაზები NMT მოდელისთვის დამატებულია, მაგრამ SMT ფრაზებისთვის შესაბამისი ფრაზების დონეზე დამატებული შესაბამისი და მიმდინარე ენის მოდელისთვის. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები გერმანეთის-ანგლისური ნუტაციის დემომინი და პროსური e-commerce დემომინის გაგრძელება დაახლოებით, რომ გამოყენება ფრაზების მოდელების გამოყენება NMT ძიებაში MT-კვალეტის გასაკეთება 2,3', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, introducem o căutare hibridă pentru traducerea automată neurală bazată pe atenție (NMT). O frază țintă învățată cu modele MT statistice extinde o ipoteză în căutarea fasciculului NMT atunci când atenția modelului NMT se concentrează pe cuvintele sursă traduse de această frază. Frazele adăugate în acest fel sunt marcate cu modelul NMT, dar și cu caracteristicile SMT, inclusiv probabilitățile traducerii la nivel de fraze și un model de limbă țintă. Rezultatele experimentale asupra domeniului de știri german-engleză și a sarcinilor de traducere a domeniului de comerț electronic din engleză în rusă arată că utilizarea modelelor bazate pe fraze în căutarea NMT îmbunătățește calitatea MT cu până la 2,3% absolut BLEU comparativ cu o bază puternică NMT.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo hibridnu potragu za prevodom na pažnji na neuralnoj mašini (NMT). Meta fraza naučena sa statističkim modelima MT proširi hipotezu u potrazi za zrakom NMT kada pažnja model a NMT fokusira se na izvorne reči prevedene ovim frazom. Izrazi dodani na taj naèin su rezultati s modelom NMT, ali takoðer i sa funkcijama SMT ukljuèujuæi verovatnost prevoda na nivou fraza i modelom ciljnog jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati na njemačkoj-engleskoj vijesti domenu i na engleskoj-ruskoj prevodnoj domenu e-komercije pokazuju da korištenje modela baziranih na frazi u potrazi NMT poboljšava kvalitet MT do 2,3% absolutnog BLEU u usporedbi sa jakom početnom linijom NMT-a.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් හොයාගන්නේ අවධානය අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) ගැන. Name මේ විදියට සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය NMT මොඩල් එක්ක ස්කෝර් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒත් SMT විශේෂතාවය සමග ප්\u200dරවාක්ෂිත වාක්ය භා ජර්මාන්ත් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වාර්තාව සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් රුසියාන් වලින් විකාශ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, NMT පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචා', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கவனத்தை அடிப்படையான புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். Name இந்த வழியில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட சொற்றொடர்கள் NMT மாதிரியால் மதிப்பெடுக்கப்படும், ஆனால் SMT குணங்களுடனும் சொற்றொடர்- level மொழிபெயர்ப்பு  Name', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک ہیبراڈ تلاش کریں گے جو توجه پر بنیاد ہے نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے۔ ایک موقعیت فرض ایسٹیسٹیکل ٹی موڈل کے ساتھ سکھایا گیا ہے جب NMT موڈل کی توجه اس فرض کے ذریعہ سے ترجمہ کیا گیا ہے اس کے سورج کلمات پر تمرکز کرتی ہے۔ اس طرح اضافہ کئے گئے مثالیں NMT موڈل کے ساتھ سکونٹ کیے جاتے ہیں، لیکن مثالیں مثالیں مثالیں مثالیں مثالیں مثالیں مثالیں منظور ترجمہ سطح کے شامل ہوتے ہیں اور موجود زبان موڈل جرمن سے انگلیسی خبریں ڈومین اور انگلیسی سے روسی کے e-commerce ڈومین ٹومین ٹومین ٹومین ٹومین ٹوکینٹوں پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ NMT جہاز میں فریز بنیادی نمونڈل استعمال کرتا ہے MT کی کیفیت 2.3% زیادہ مطلوب BLEU کی مطل', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн механикийн хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) гэсэн гибрид хайлтыг танилцуулдаг. Статистикийн MT загвартай сурсан зорилготой өгүүлбэр NMT загварын анхаарал нь энэ өгүүлбэрээр орчуулсан эх үүсвэрийн үгийг анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ арга хэлбэрээр нэмэгдсэн үгийг NMT загвартай тооцоолж, мөн хэлбэрээр хөрөнгө оруулах магадлал болон зориулагдсан хэл загвартай мөн SMT боломжтой. Герман болон Англи хэлний мэдээллийн тухай туршилтын үр дүнд, Англи болон Орос хэлний электрон худалдааны хөгжүүлэлтийн даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын төлөө NMT хайгуулын загвар ашиглах нь MT-ын сайн сайн сайн сайн сайн сайн сайн', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats introducerar vi en hybridsökning av uppmärksamhetsbaserad neural maskinöversättning (NMT). En målfras som lärts med statistiska MT-modeller utökar en hypotes i NMT-strålsökningen när uppmärksamheten hos NMT-modellen fokuserar på källorden som översatts av denna fras. Fraser som läggs till på detta sätt får poäng med NMT-modellen, men också med SMT-funktioner inklusive frasnivå översättnings sannolikhet och en målspråksmodell. Experimentella resultat på tysk-engelsk nyhetsdomän och engelsk-ryska e-handelsdomänöversättningsuppgifter visar att användningen av frasbaserade modeller i NMT-sökning förbättrar MT-kvaliteten med upp till 2,3% BLEU-absolut jämfört med en stark NMT-baslinje.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa qoraal aad u raadineyso qoraal ah oo aad ka raadineyso qoraalka maskaxda neurada ah (NMT). Hadalkii la bartay oo ku qoran samooyinka statistical MT ayaa kor u qaada hypothesis ku qoran raadinta NMT xiliga nuurka NMT marka loo eego modelka NMT uu focus on the source words translated by this phras. Sidan waxaa lagu qoraa hadal ku qoran qaababka NMT, laakiin waxaa kaloo lagu qoraa xog SMT, kuwaas oo ku jira suurtagal turjumista afka-level iyo model afka goal ah. Imtixaanka ku saabsan jarmal-to-Ingiriis-news domain iyo hawlaha Ingiriis-to-Ruush e-commerce domain turjumaadda waxay muujinayaan in isticmaalka muusikada ku saleysan afka NMT raadinta waxaa bedela qiimaha MT ilaa 2.3% BLEU absiif u ah sida loo barbarto qoraalka xoogga badan ee NMT.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻozda, biz taqdimot asosiy neyrolik tarjimasini (NMT) qidirishni anglatamiz. Name @ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một cuộc tìm kiếm khác về dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh (NMB). Một từ đích được học với các mô hình MTV thống kê mở rộng một giả thuyết trong việc tìm kiếm chùm tia NMB trong khi sự quan tâm của mô hình NMB tập trung vào các từ nguồn được dịch bởi câu này. Những chữ thêm vào theo cách này được ghi bằng kiểu NMB, nhưng cũng có các tính năng SMT bao gồm cơ sở dịch chuyển qua đường dài và một mô hình ngôn ngữ đích. Kết quả thử nghiệm về lĩnh vực tin tức Đức-Anh-Anh-Anh-Anh-Anh-gọi-Nga Việc dịch-thương-tên- buôn- miền cho thấy rằng sử dụng các mô hình dựa trên các từ điển điển hình trong việc tìm kiếm NMT cải thiện chất lượng MT cho đến 2.3=.* nguyên vẹn so với một cơ sở cơ bản NMT mạnh.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме хибридно търсене на невронен машинен превод, базиран на вниманието. Целева фраза, научена със статистически модели, разширява хипотезата в търсенето на лъчи, когато вниманието на модела се фокусира върху изходните думи, преведени от тази фраза. Добавените по този начин фрази се оценяват с модела на НМТ, но също така и с функции на СМТ, включително вероятности за превод на ниво фраза и модел на целевия език. Експерименталните резултати по задачите за превод на домейни от немски към английски език показват, че използването на фразови модели в търсенето на МТ подобрява качеството на МТ с до 2,3% абсолютно в сравнение със силната база на МТ.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel introduceren we een hybride zoektocht naar attention-based neural machine translation (NMT). Een doelzin geleerd met statistische MT-modellen breidt een hypothese uit in de NMT-straalzoekopdracht wanneer de aandacht van het NMT-model zich richt op de bronwoorden die door deze zin worden vertaald. Op deze manier toegevoegde zinnen worden gescoord met het NMT-model, maar ook met SMT-functies waaronder vertaalkansen op frase-niveau en een doeltaalmodel. Experimentele resultaten op Duits-naar-Engels nieuwsdomein en Engels-naar-Russisch e-commerce domeinvertaaltaken tonen aan dat het gebruik van zinnen gebaseerde modellen in NMT zoeken MT kwaliteit verbetert met maximaal 2,3% BLEU absolute in vergelijking met een sterke NMT baseline.', 'da': 'I denne artikel introducerer vi en hybrid søgning efter opmærksomhedsbaseret neural maskinoversættelse (NMT). En målsætning lært med statistiske MT-modeller udvider en hypotese i NMT-strålesøgningen, når NMT-modellens opmærksomhed fokuserer på kildeordene oversat af denne sætning. Sætninger tilføjet på denne måde scores med NMT modellen, men også med SMT funktioner, herunder sandsynligheder for oversættelse på sætningsniveau og en målsprogsmodel. Eksperimentelle resultater på tysk-til-engelsk nyhedsdomæne og engelsk-til-russisk e-handelsdomæne-oversættelsesopgaver viser, at brugen af sætningsbaserede modeller i NMT-søgning forbedrer MT-kvaliteten med op til 2,3% BLEU absolut sammenlignet med en stærk NMT baseline.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo hibridnu potragu za prevodom na pažnji na neuralnom stroju (NMT). Meta fraza naučena s statističkim modelima MT proširi hipotezu u potrazi za zrakom NMT-a kada se pažnja modela NMT-a fokusira na izvorne riječi prevedene ovim frazom. Izrazi dodani na taj način su rezultati s modelom NMT-a, ali i s SMT-om, uključujući vjerojatnost prevoda na razini fraza i model ciljnog jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati na njemačkoj i engleskoj vijesti domenu i na prevodu domena e-trgovine na engleskoj i ruskoj pokazuju da koristeći modele na frazi u pretraživanju NMT-a poboljšava kvalitet MT-a do 2,3% BLEU-a u usporedbi s jakom početnom linijom NMT-a.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine hybride Suche nach aufmerksamkeitsbasierter neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung (NMT) vor. Eine mit statistischen MT-Modellen erlernte Zielphrase erweitert eine Hypothese in der NMT-Strahlsuche, wenn sich die Aufmerksamkeit des NMT-Modells auf die mit diesem Satz übersetzten Quellwörter konzentriert. Auf diese Weise hinzugefügte Phrasen werden mit dem NMT-Modell bewertet, aber auch mit SMT-Funktionen einschließlich Übersetzungswahrscheinlichkeiten auf Phrasenebene und einem Zielsprachenmodell. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zu Deutsch-Englisch Nachrichtendomänen und Englisch-Russisch E-Commerce Domänenübersetzungsaufgaben zeigen, dass die Verwendung phrasenbasierter Modelle in der NMT-Suche die MT-Qualität um bis zu 2,3% BLEU absolute im Vergleich zu einer starken NMT-Baseline verbessert.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pencarian hibrid untuk terjemahan mesin saraf berdasarkan perhatian (NMT). Sebuah frasa sasaran yang belajar dengan model MT statistik memperluas hipotesis dalam pencarian beam NMT ketika perhatian model NMT fokus pada kata sumber terjemahan oleh frasa ini. Frasa ditambah dengan cara ini dicatat dengan model NMT, tetapi juga dengan fitur SMT termasuk kemungkinan terjemahan tingkat frasa dan model bahasa sasaran. Hasil eksperimental pada domain berita Jerman-Inggris dan tugas terjemahan domain perdagangan e-Inggris-Rusia menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan model berdasarkan frasa dalam pencarian NMT meningkatkan kualitas MT dengan sampai 2,3% BLEU absolut dibandingkan dengan dasar NMT yang kuat.', 'ko': '본고는 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경기계번역(NMT)의 혼합 검색 알고리즘을 소개한다.통계 기계 번역 모델을 사용하여 학습하는 목표 단어는 NMT beam 검색에서의 가설을 확장시켰다. 이때 NMT 모델의 주의력은 이 단어 번역의 원어에 집중된다.이런 식으로 추가된 구문은 NMT 모델을 사용해 점수를 매기지만, 구문급 번역 확률과 대상 언어 모델을 포함한 SMT 기능도 사용한다.독일어부터 영어까지의 뉴스 분야와 영어부터 러시아어까지의 전자상거래 분야 번역 임무에 대한 실험 결과, 강력한 NMT 기선에 비해 NMT 검색에서 짧은 말 기반 모델을 사용해 기계 번역의 질을 2.3% 향상시켰다.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaonyesha utafutaji wa huduma kwa ajili ya kutafuta tafsiri ya mashine yenye msingi wa kisasa (NMT). Neno la lengo lililojifunza kwa mifano ya takwimu ya MT inaongezea nadharia katika kutafuta wima wa NMT wakati mtazamo wa Mradi wa NMT unajikita kwenye maneno yanayotafsiriwa na msemo huu. Neno zinazoongezwa kwa namna hii zimesahiwa na modeli ya NMT, lakini pia kwa vipengele vya SMT ikiwa ni pamoja na uwezekano wa kutafsiri lugha-ngazi na modeli ya lugha ya lengo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na maeneo ya habari ya Ujerumani-hadi Kiingereza na kazi za kutafsiri domain ya kibiashara-kwa-Urusi yanaonyesha kwamba kwa kutumia miundo yenye msingi wa maneno katika kutafuta NMT yanaboresha kiwango cha MT kwa kufikia asilimia 2.3 BLEU yenye uhakika kama ilivyolinganisha na msingi wa NMT.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک جستجوی هیبرید برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) بر روی توجه معرفی می\u200cکنیم. یک عبارت هدف که با مدل MT آموزش یاد گرفته شده، فرضیه\u200cای در جستجوی پرده NMT را گسترش می\u200cدهد وقتی توجه مدل NMT بر کلمات منبع توسط این عبارت تمرکز می\u200cکند. جمله\u200cهای اضافه به این طریق با مدل NMT امتیاز می\u200cشوند، اما همچنین با ویژگی\u200cهای SMT شامل احتمال ترجمه\u200cهای سطح جمله\u200cها و یک مدل زبان هدف است. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی دامین خبری آلمان و انگلیسی و برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cهای برنامه', 'af': "In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n hybrid soek vir aandag gebaseerde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT). Name Phrases by hierdie manier bygevoeg word met die NMT-model, maar ook met SMT-funksies insluitend frase-vlak-vertaling waarskynlikheite en 'n doel taal-model. Eksperimentele resultate op Duits-na-Engels nuusdomein en Engels-na-Russe e-commerce-domein vertaling opdragte vertoon dat gebruik van frase-gebaseerde modele in NMT soek MT-kwaliteit verbeter tot 2.3% BLEU absoluut soos vergelyk met 'n sterk NMT basislien.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, üns berilen näral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) bilen hybrid gözleýäni tanyşdyrýarys. Statistik MT modelleri ile öğrenmiş bir hedef frazi NMT beam araştırmasında bir hipotezi uzatır. NMT model in in dikkati bu fraze tarafından çevirilen kelimelere odaklandırır. Bu şekilde eklenýän fräzeler NMT modeli bilen ثبتlenýär, ýöne SMT karakterleriň içinde fraz derejesi terjime etmek mümkinçilikleri we maksady dil modeli bilen tapylýar. NMT araştırmalarynda fraz tabanly nusgalary ulanmak MT kaliwatyny 2.3% diýp ýagdaýda 2.3% BLEU-nyň güýçli NMT baseliniň derejesine görä üýtgedýändigini görkez.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት ውስጥ የናቡሬል መኪና ማተርጓሜን (NMT) ለመፈለግ የኬብሪድን መረጃ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በstatistical MT model የተማረ የዕቅድ ቃላት የNMT ሞዴል ትኩረት በተዘጋጀው ጊዜ በዚህ ቃላት በተዘጋጀው የsource ቃላት ላይ ትክክል በሚያሳየው በNMT beam መረጃ ውስጥ hypothesis ይዘረጋል፡፡ እንደዚህ ይጨመር ያሉት ቃላት በNMT ሞዴል ላይ ተጨማሪ ሆኗል፥ ነገር ግን በSMT ምርጫዎች ደግሞ በንግግር-level ትርጉም ምናልባት እና የተቃውሞ ቋንቋ ሞዴል እና ነው፡፡ የጀርመን-ወደ እንግሊዝኛ ዜና ዶሜን እና እንግሊዝኛ-ወደ-ሮሽኛ-የንግድ-ድጋፍ-ዶሜን ትርጉም ማድረግ ፍጻሜዎች በNMT ፈለግ ላይ የቃላት ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም ከ2.3 በመቶ BLEU በታላቅ ከNMT baseline ጋር እንዲያበዛ ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ուշադրության վրա հիբրիդ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) որոնումը: Ստատիկական MT մոդելների միջոցով սովորված նպատակային արտահայտությունը ընդլայնում է հիպոթեզը NMT ճառագայթի որոնման ժամանակ, երբ NMT մոդելի ուշադրությունը կենտրոնանում է այս արտահայտությամբ թարգմանվող աղբյուր բառերի վրա: Այսպիսով ավելացված արտահայտությունները գնահատվում են NMT մոդելի միջոցով, բայց նաև SMT հատկություններով, ներառյալ արտահայտության մակարդակի թարգմանման հավանականությունները և նպատակային լեզվի մոդելը: Գերմանական-անգլերեն նորությունների ոլորտի և անգլերեն-ռուս-էլեկտրոնային առևտրի ոլորտի թարգմանման խնդիրների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ NMT որոնման ժամանակ արտահայտված արտահայտությամբ հիմնված մոդելների օգտագործումը MT-ի որակը բարելավում է մինչև 2,3', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një kërkim hibridik për përkthimin e makinave nervore të bazuar në vëmendje (NMT). Një frazë objektive e mësuar me modelet MT statistikë zgjeron një hipotezë në kërkimin e rreze NMT kur vëmendja e modelit NMT përqëndrohet në fjalët burimi të përkthyera nga kjo frazë. Frazat e shtuara në këtë mënyrë janë shënuar me model in NMT, por gjithashtu me funksione SMT duke përfshirë probabilitetet e përkthimit të nivelit të frazës dhe një model gjuhës objektiv. Rezultatet eksperimentale në domenin e lajmeve gjermane-angleze dhe detyrat e përkthimit të domenit e tregtisë-angleze-ruse tregojnë se përdorimi i modeleve bazuar në fraza në kërkimin NMT përmirëson cilësinë e MT me deri në 2.3% absolute BLEU krahasuar me një bazë të fortë NMT.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মনোযোগ প্রদানের ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য একটি হাইব্রিড অনুসন্ধানের পরিচয় প্রদান করি। এনএমটি মডেলের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি যখন এনএমটি মডেলের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এই বাক্যের অনুবাদ করা উৎসের শব্দের দিকে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। এনএমটি মডেল দিয়ে এই ভাবে যোগ করা শব্দগুলো স্কোর করা হয়, কিন্তু এসএমটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে এসএমটি বৈশিষ্ট্য, যার মধ্যে বাক্য-স্ জার্মান-থেকে ইংরেজি সংবাদ ডোমেইন এবং ইংরেজী থেকে রুশ-কমার্স ডোমেইন অনুবাদের কাজের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এনএমটি অনুসন্ধানে ভিত্তিক মডেল ব্যবহার করে এমটি মানের ম', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo hibridnu potragu za prevodom na pažnji na neuromašini (NMT). Meta fraza naučena s statističkim modelima MT proširi hipotezu u pretraživanju zraka NMT-a kada se pažnja modela NMT-a fokusira na izvorne riječi prevedene ovim frazom. Izrazi dodani na taj način su rezultati s modelom NMT-a, ali i s karakteristikama SMT-a uključujući vjerojatnost prevoda na nivou fraza i modelom ciljnog jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati na njemačkoj i engleskoj vijesti domenu i na prevodu domena e-komercije na engleskoj i ruskoj pokazuju da korištenje modela baziranih na frazi u potrazi NMT-a poboljšava kvalitet MT-a do 2,3% BLEU-a u usporedbi s jakom početnom linijom NMT-a.', 'ca': "En aquest article introduïm una búsqueda híbrida de traducció neural basada en l'atenció (NMT). A target phrase learned with statistical MT models extends a hypothesis in the NMT beam search when the attention of the NMT model focuses on the source words translated by this phrase.  Les frases afegides d'aquesta manera es puntueixen amb el model NMT, però també amb característiques SMT incloent probabilitats de traducció a nivell de frases i un model de llenguatge alvo. Els resultats experimentals en el domini de notícies alemanya a anglès i en les tasques de traducció del domini de comerç electrònic anglès a rus mostren que utilitzar models basats en frases en la búsqueda en NMT millora la qualitat de MT fins al 2,3% absoluta de BLEU en comparació amb un fort nivell de referència en NMT.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, dikkati-tabanlı nöral maşına çevirilməsi (NMT) üçün hibrid axtarışını tanıyırıq. İstatistik MT modelləri ilə öyrəndiyi məqsəd frazi NMT nümunələrinin gözləməsi NMT modeli ilə çevirilən mənbə sözlərinə odaqlanır. Bu yolla birləşdirilmiş frazlar NMT modeli ilə müəyyən edilir, həmçin in fraz seviyyəti tərcümə ehtimalları və məqsəd dil modeli ilə birləşdirilmiş SMT xüsusiyyətləri ilə birləşdirilmişdir. Almanca-İngilizə haqq domeinlərinin və İngilizə-Rusya e-ticarət domeinlərinin çevirilməsi işləri NMT araştırmasında fraz tabanlı modellərin istifadəsi MT keyfiyyətini 2,3% ilə daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame hübriidset otsingut tähelepanupõhise neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) jaoks. Statistiliste MT mudelitega õppitud sihtfraas laiendab NMT kiirte otsingu hüpoteesi, kui NMT mudeli tähelepanu keskendub selle fraasi tõlgitud lähtesõnadele. Sel viisil lisatud fraasid hinnatakse NMT mudeliga, kuid ka SMT funktsioonidega, sealhulgas fraasitasemel tõlke tõenäosused ja sihtkeele mudel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused saksa-inglise uudiste domeeni ja inglise-vene e-kaubanduse domeeni tõlkimise ülesannete kohta näitavad, et fraasipõhiste mudelite kasutamine NMT otsingus parandab MT kvaliteeti kuni 2,3% BLEU absoluutsuse võrreldes tugeva NMT lähtetasemega.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään hybridihaku huomiopohjaiselle neurokonekäännökselle (NMT). Tilastollisilla MT-malleilla opittu kohdelause laajentaa hypoteesia NMT-säteen haussa, kun NMT-mallin huomio keskittyy tämän lauseen kääntämiin lähdesanoihin. Tällä tavoin lisätyt lauseet pisteytetään NMT-mallilla, mutta myös SMT-ominaisuuksilla, kuten lausetason käännösmahdollisuuksilla ja kohdekielimallilla. Kokeelliset tulokset saksa-englanti uutisverkkotunnuksesta ja englanti-venäjä verkkokaupan käännöstehtävistä osoittavat, että fraasipohjaisten mallien käyttö NMT-haussa parantaa MT:n laatua jopa 2,3% BLEU-absoluuttisesti verrattuna vahvaan NMT-lähtötilanteeseen.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme hybridní vyhledávání neuronového strojového překladu založeného na pozornosti (NMT). Cílová fráze naučená statistickými MT modely rozšiřuje hypotézu v NMT paprsku vyhledávání, když se pozornost NMT modelu zaměřuje na zdrojová slova přeložená touto frází. Tímto způsobem přidané fráze jsou hodnoceny pomocí NMT modelu, ale také SMT funkcí včetně pravděpodobnosti překladu na úrovni fráze a cílového jazykového modelu. Experimentální výsledky na úlohách překladu domén z německa do angličtiny a z angličtiny do ruského e-commerce ukazují, že použití frázových modelů v NMT vyhledávání zlepšuje kvalitu MT až o 2,3% BLEU absolutní oproti silné NMT základně.', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, kita nganggep nglanggar wibrat kanggo tarjamahan, kiye basa nang ingkang alam-alam sing basa gambar (NMT). Algorithm Wuraning Export data on German-to-englian media domain and French-to-Ruse e e-komersie domain translation tasks show that use text-supported modes in NMT Search', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo hibridno iskanje pozornosti temelječega nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT). Ciljna fraza, ki se je naučila s statističnimi modeli MT, razširi hipotezo pri iskanju snopa NMT, ko se pozornost modela NMT osredotoča na izvorne besede, prevedene s to frazo. Tako dodane fraze so ocenjene z modelom NMT, pa tudi s funkcijami SMT, vključno z verjetnostmi prevajanja na ravni fraze in modelom ciljnega jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati o prevajanju domen novic iz nemščine v angleščino in prevajanju domen angleščine v ruščino kažejo, da uporaba fraznih modelov pri iskanju NMT izboljša kakovost MT za do 2,3% absolutnega BLEU v primerjavi z močno osnovno izhodišče NMT.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים חיפוש היברידי לתרגום מכונת עצבית מבוססת על תשומת לב (NMT). משפט מטרה ללמוד עם מודלים MT סטטיסטיים ממשיך היפותזה בחיפוש בקרן NMT כאשר תשומת הלב של מודל NMT מתמקדת במילים המקורית התרגמות על ידי המשפט הזה. הפרזים המווספות בדרך הזאת נקודות עם מודל NMT, אך גם עם תכונות SMT כולל סבירות תרגום רמת ביטויים ומודל שפה מטרה. תוצאות ניסויים בתחום חדשות גרמנית לאנגלית ומשימות התרגום בתחום מסחר אלקטרוני אנגלית לרוסית מראות ששימוש במודלים מבוססים על ביטויים בחיפוש NMT משפר את איכות MT עד 2.3% BLEU מוחלט בהשוואה לבסיס NMT חזק.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã nuna wata tamko na Hybrid da za'a iya fassarar zane-zanen neural wanda aka samar da zura bincike (NMT). An faɗi wani magana wanda aka sanar da shi da misalin MT na statistical, yana shimfiɗa wani teori cikin filin NMT idan muhalli wa motel na NMT ya fokusa kan maganar source da aka fassar da shi. @ action: button Experimental results on German-to-English news domain and English-to-Russian e-commerce domain translation tasks show that using phrase-based models in NMT search improves MT quality by up to 2.3% BLEU absolute as compared to a strong NMT baseline.", 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་བ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། A target phrase learned with statistical MT models extends a hypothesis in the NMT beam search when the attention of the NMT model focuses on the source words translated by this phrase. A target phrase learned with statistical MT models extends a hypothesis in the NMT beam search when the attention of the NMT model focuses on the source words translated by this phrase. Phrases added in this way are scored with the NMT model, but also with SMT features including phrase-level translation probabilities and a target language model. Experimental results on German-to-English news domain and English-to-Russian e-commerce domain translation tasks show that using phrase-based models in NMT search improves MT quality by up to 2.3% BLEU absolute as compared to a strong NMT baseline.'}
{'en': 'Translating Phrases in Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'ترجمة العبارات في الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'es': 'Traducción de frases en traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Traduzindo frases na tradução automática neural', 'fr': 'Traduire des phrases en traduction automatique neuronale', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳におけるフレーズの翻訳', 'zh': '神经机器翻译中译短语', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद में वाक्यांशों का अनुवाद', 'ru': 'Перевод фраз в нейронном машинном переводе', 'ga': 'Frásaí a Aistriú i Néar-Aistriúchán Meaisín', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Kifejezések fordítása Neural Machine Translation', 'el': 'Μετάφραση φράσεων σε νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасында фразтарды аудару', 'lt': 'Vertimo žodžiai neuroninėmis mašinomis vertimo žodžiais', 'it': 'Tradurre frasi in traduzione automatica neurale', 'mk': 'Превод на фрази во превод на неврална машина', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീനിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mt': 'Frażijiet ta’ Traduzzjoni fi Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Frasa dalam Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mn': 'Үүнийг мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт орлуулах', 'ro': 'Traducerea frazelor în traducere automată neurală', 'no': 'Omsetjing av frasar i nøyrale maskinsomsetjing', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie fraz w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym', 'sr': 'Превод фраза у невралном преводу машине', 'so': 'Translating Phrases in Neural Machine Translation', 'sv': 'Översätta fraser i neural maskinöversättning', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාවිතයෙන් වාර්තාව', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ میں عبارت ترجمہ کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch các cụm từ theo chế độ thần kinh', 'bg': 'Превод на фрази в неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Woorden vertalen in neuronale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Oversættelse af sætninger i neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Prevod izraza u Neuralnom prevodu stroja', 'id': 'Translating Phrases in Neural Machine Translation', 'fa': 'ترجمه عبارت در ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'de': 'Übersetzung von Phrasen in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'sw': 'Tafsiri Neural Tafsiri', 'ko': '신경 번역', 'sq': 'Translating Phrases in Neural Machine Translation', 'af': 'Vertaling Frase in Nural Masjien Vertaling', 'tr': 'Senedlerni Neural Maşynyň terjimesinde terjime edýär', 'az': 'Nöral Makina Çeviri', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման արտահայտությունները', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিনের অনুবাদ অনুবাদ', 'ca': 'Translating Phrases in Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Prevodeći izraze u neurološkom prevodu mašine', 'cs': 'Překlad frází v neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'et': 'Väljade tõlkimine neuroaalses masintõlkes', 'fi': 'Kääntäminen lauseita kielellä hermo Konekäännös', 'jv': 'Wurung Wurung kanggo Terjamahan Jejaral', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תורגם ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'sk': 'Prevajanje fraz v nevralni strojni prevod', 'bo': 'ཡིག་སྒྲུང་མིའི་ནང་གི་ཚིག་རྐང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་'}
{'en': 'Phrases play an important role in natural language understanding and machine translation (Sag et al., 2002 ; Villavicencio et al., 2005). However, it is difficult to integrate them into current neural machine translation (NMT) which reads and generates sentences word by word. In this work, we propose a method to translate phrases in NMT by integrating a phrase memory storing target phrases from a phrase-based statistical machine translation (SMT) system into the encoder-decoder architecture of NMT. At each decoding step, the phrase memory is first re-written by the SMT model, which dynamically generates relevant target phrases with contextual information provided by the NMT model. Then the proposed model reads the phrase memory to make probability estimations for all phrases in the phrase memory. If phrase generation is carried on, the NMT decoder selects an appropriate phrase from the memory to perform phrase translation and updates its decoding state by consuming the words in the selected phrase. Otherwise, the NMT decoder generates a word from the vocabulary as the general NMT decoder does. Experiment results on the Chinese to English translation show that the proposed model achieves significant improvements over the baseline on various test sets.', 'ar': 'تلعب العبارات دورًا مهمًا في فهم اللغة الطبيعية والترجمة الآلية (Sag et al. ، 2002 ؛ Villavicencio et al. ، 2005). ومع ذلك ، من الصعب دمجها في الترجمة الآلية العصبية الحالية (NMT) التي تقرأ وتولد الجمل كلمة بكلمة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة لترجمة العبارات في NMT من خلال دمج ذاكرة العبارة التي تخزن العبارات المستهدفة من نظام الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية القائم على العبارة (SMT) في بنية وحدة فك التشفير في NMT. في كل خطوة من خطوات فك التشفير ، تتم إعادة كتابة ذاكرة العبارة أولاً بواسطة نموذج SMT ، والذي يولد ديناميكيًا العبارات المستهدفة ذات الصلة مع المعلومات السياقية التي يوفرها نموذج NMT. ثم يقرأ النموذج المقترح عبارة ذاكرة لعمل تقديرات احتمالية لجميع العبارات في ذاكرة العبارة. في حالة استمرار إنشاء العبارة ، يقوم مفكك الشفرة NMT بتحديد عبارة مناسبة من الذاكرة لإجراء ترجمة العبارة وتحديث حالة فك التشفير الخاصة بها عن طريق استهلاك الكلمات في العبارة المحددة. خلافًا لذلك ، يولد مفكك الشفرة NMT كلمة من المفردات كما يفعل مفكك التشفير NMT العام. تظهر نتائج التجربة على الترجمة من الصينية إلى الإنجليزية أن النموذج المقترح يحقق تحسينات كبيرة على خط الأساس في مجموعات اختبار مختلفة.', 'fr': "Les phrases jouent un rôle important dans la compréhension du langage naturel et la traduction automatique (Sag et al., 2002\xa0; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Cependant, il est difficile de les intégrer dans la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) actuelle qui lit et génère des phrases mot par mot. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode pour traduire des phrases en NMT en intégrant une mémoire de phrases stockant des phrases cibles provenant d'un système de traduction automatique statistique basée sur des phrases (SMT) dans l'architecture codeur-décodeur de NMT. À chaque étape de décodage, la mémoire de phrases est d'abord réécrite par le modèle SMT, qui génère dynamiquement des phrases cibles pertinentes avec des informations contextuelles fournies par le modèle NMT. Ensuite, le modèle proposé lit la mémoire de phrases afin d'effectuer des estimations de probabilité pour toutes les phrases de la mémoire de phrases. Si la génération de phrase se poursuit, le décodeur NMT sélectionne une phrase appropriée dans la mémoire pour effectuer une traduction de phrase et met à jour son état de décodage en consommant les mots de la phrase sélectionnée. Sinon, le décodeur NMT génère un mot à partir du vocabulaire comme le fait le décodeur NMT général. Les résultats de l'expérience sur la traduction du chinois vers l'anglais montrent que le modèle proposé apporte des améliorations significatives par rapport à la base sur divers ensembles de tests.", 'es': 'Las frases desempeñan un papel importante en la comprensión del lenguaje natural y la traducción automática (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Sin embargo, es difícil integrarlos en la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) actual que lee y genera oraciones palabra por palabra. En este trabajo, proponemos un método para traducir frases en NMT mediante la integración de una memoria de frases que almacena frases objetivo de un sistema de traducción automática estadística (SMT) basado en frases en la arquitectura codificador-decodificador de NMT. En cada etapa de decodificación, la memoria de frases es reescrita primero por el modelo SMT, que genera dinámicamente frases objetivo relevantes con información contextual proporcionada por el modelo NMT. Luego, el modelo propuesto lee la memoria de frases para hacer estimaciones de probabilidad para todas las frases de la memoria de frases. Si se lleva a cabo la generación de frases, el decodificador NMT selecciona una frase apropiada de la memoria para realizar la traducción de frases y actualiza su estado de decodificación consumiendo las palabras de la frase seleccionada. De lo contrario, el decodificador de NMT genera una palabra a partir del vocabulario como lo hace el decodificador de NMT general. Los resultados del experimento en la traducción del chino al inglés muestran que el modelo propuesto logra mejoras significativas con respecto a la línea de base en varios conjuntos de pruebas.', 'pt': 'As frases desempenham um papel importante na compreensão da linguagem natural e na tradução automática (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). No entanto, é difícil integrá-los na atual tradução automática neural (NMT), que lê e gera frases palavra por palavra. Neste trabalho, propomos um método para traduzir frases em NMT integrando uma memória de frases armazenando frases alvo de um sistema de tradução automática estatística baseada em frases (SMT) na arquitetura codificadora-decodificadora da NMT. Em cada etapa de decodificação, a memória de frases é primeiro reescrita pelo modelo SMT, que gera dinamicamente frases-alvo relevantes com informações contextuais fornecidas pelo modelo NMT. Em seguida, o modelo proposto lê a memória de frases para fazer estimativas de probabilidade para todas as frases na memória de frases. Se a geração de frase for realizada, o decodificador NMT seleciona uma frase apropriada da memória para realizar a tradução de frase e atualiza seu estado de decodificação consumindo as palavras na frase selecionada. Caso contrário, o decodificador NMT gera uma palavra do vocabulário como o decodificador NMT geral faz. Os resultados do experimento na tradução do chinês para o inglês mostram que o modelo proposto alcança melhorias significativas em relação à linha de base em vários conjuntos de testes.', 'ja': 'フレーズは、自然言語理解及び機械翻訳において重要な役割を果たす（ Ｓａｇ ｅ ｔ ａ ｌ ． ， ２ ０ ０ ２ ； Ｖｉｌｌａｖｉｃｅｎｃｉｏ ｅ ｔ ａ ｌ ． ， ２ ０ ０ ５ ）。 しかし、それらを現在のニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）に統合することは困難であり、ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションは単語ごとに文章を読み取り、生成する。 この研究では、フレーズベースの統計機械翻訳（ ＳＭＴ ）システムからのターゲットフレーズを格納するフレーズメモリをＮＭＴのエンコーダデコーダアーキテクチャに統合することによって、ＮＭＴにおけるフレーズを翻訳する方法を提案する。 各復号化ステップにおいて、フレーズメモリは、まず、ＳＭＴモデルによって書き換えられ、ＳＭＴモデルは、ＮＭＴモデルによって提供されるコンテキスト情報を用いて、関連するターゲットフレーズを動的に生成する。 次に、提案されたモデルは、フレーズメモリを読み取って、フレーズメモリ内のすべてのフレーズの確率推定を行う。 フレーズ生成が行われる場合、ＮＭＴデコーダは、フレーズ変換を実行するためにメモリから適切なフレーズを選択し、選択されたフレーズ内の単語を消費することによってそのデコード状態を更新する。 それ以外の場合、ＮＭＴデコーダは、一般的なＮＭＴデコーダが行うように、語彙から単語を生成する。 中国語から英語への翻訳に関する実験結果は、提案されたモデルが様々なテストセットのベースラインを大幅に改善することを示している。', 'zh': '短语于自然语言解机器翻译中起重用(Sag等,2002。 比亚维森西奥等,2005年)。 然难集为神经机器翻译(NMT)中,当译可逐字逐句读取成句。 于是发NMT中译短语之法,法将储自短语计机器翻译(SMT)所系短语记集NMT编码器 - 解码器架构中。 凡解码步驿,短语存储器先SMT重写,SMT用NMT上下文信动成短语。 然后建议读取短语记,所有短语概率度短语。 若续成短语,NMT 解码器将择内存中短语以行短语转,因其选短语之单词以新其解码。 不然,NMT解码器会如NMT解码器从词汇表中生一单词。 中英译实验结果表明,所提模形于诸试集上皆有较基线著。', 'hi': 'वाक्यांश प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ और मशीन अनुवाद में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005)। हालांकि, उन्हें वर्तमान न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) में एकीकृत करना मुश्किल है जो शब्द-दर-शब्द वाक्यों को पढ़ता और उत्पन्न करता है। इस काम में, हम एनएमटी में वाक्यांशों का अनुवाद करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक वाक्यांश-आधारित सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद (एसएमटी) सिस्टम से एनएमटी के एनकोडर-डिकोडर आर्किटेक्चर में एक वाक्यांश मेमोरी संग्रहीत लक्ष्य वाक्यांशों को एकीकृत करता है। प्रत्येक डिकोडिंग चरण में, वाक्यांश स्मृति को पहले एसएमटी मॉडल द्वारा फिर से लिखा जाता है, जो गतिशील रूप से एनएमटी मॉडल द्वारा प्रदान की गई प्रासंगिक जानकारी के साथ प्रासंगिक लक्ष्य वाक्यांश उत्पन्न करता है। फिर प्रस्तावित मॉडल वाक्यांश स्मृति में सभी वाक्यांशों के लिए संभावना अनुमान लगाने के लिए वाक्यांश स्मृति को पढ़ता है। यदि वाक्यांश पीढ़ी पर किया जाता है, तो NMT डिकोडर वाक्यांश अनुवाद करने के लिए स्मृति से एक उपयुक्त वाक्यांश का चयन करता है और चयनित वाक्यांश में शब्दों का उपभोग करके अपनी डिकोडिंग स्थिति को अपडेट करता है। अन्यथा, NMT डिकोडर शब्दावली से एक शब्द उत्पन्न करता है जैसा कि सामान्य NMT विकोडक करता है। चीनी से अंग्रेजी अनुवाद पर प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल विभिन्न परीक्षण सेटों पर आधार रेखा पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Фразы играют важную роль в понимании естественного языка и машинном переводе (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Однако их трудно интегрировать в текущий нейронный машинный перевод (НМП), который считывает и генерирует предложения слово за словом. В данной работе мы предлагаем метод перевода фраз в НМТ путем интеграции памяти фраз, хранящей целевые фразы из системы статистического машинного перевода (SMT) на основе фраз, в архитектуру кодировщик-декодер НМТ. На каждом этапе декодирования память фраз сначала переписывается моделью SMT, которая динамически генерирует соответствующие целевые фразы с контекстной информацией, предоставленной моделью NMT. Затем предлагаемая модель считывает память фраз для выполнения оценок вероятности для всех фраз в памяти фраз. Если генерация фразы продолжается, декодер NMT выбирает соответствующую фразу из памяти для выполнения перевода фразы и обновляет ее состояние декодирования, потребляя слова в выбранной фразе. В противном случае декодер NMT генерирует слово из словаря, как это делает общий декодер NMT. Результаты эксперимента по переводу с китайского языка на английский показывают, что предлагаемая модель позволяет добиться значительных улучшений по сравнению с базовой линией на различных тестовых наборах.', 'ga': 'Tá ról tábhachtach ag frásaí i dtuiscint teanga nádúrtha agus in aistriúchán meaisín (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair iad a chomhtháthú le haistriúchán meaisín nóral reatha (NMT) a léann agus a ghineann abairtí focal ar fhocal. Sa obair seo, molaimid modh chun frásaí a aistriú in NMT trí chuimhne frásaí a chomhtháthú a stórálann frásaí sprice ó chóras aistriúcháin meaisín staidrimh (SMT) atá bunaithe ar fhrásaí isteach in ailtireacht ionchódóra-díchódóra NMT. Ag gach céim díchódaithe, déantar an chuimhne frásaí a athscríobh ar dtús leis an tsamhail SMT, a ghineann go dinimiciúil spriocfhrásaí ábhartha le faisnéis chomhthéacsúil a sholáthraíonn an tsamhail NMT. Ansin léann an tsamhail mholta an frása cuimhne chun meastacháin dóchúlachta a dhéanamh do gach frása sa chuimhne frása. Má leantar ar aghaidh le giniúint frása, roghnaíonn an díchódóir NMT frása cuí ón gcuimhne chun aistriúchán frása a dhéanamh agus nuashonraíonn sé a staid díchódaithe trí na focail san abairt roghnaithe a ithe. Seachas sin, gineann an díchódóir NMT focal ón bhfoclóir mar a dhéanann an díchódóir ginearálta NMT. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh ar an aistriúchán Síneach go Béarla go bhfuil feabhsuithe suntasacha bainte amach ag an tsamhail mholta thar an mbunlíne ar thacair tástála éagsúla.', 'ka': 'ფრაზები იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია თავისუფალური ენის გაგრძნობაში და მაქინის გაგრძნობაში (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). მაგრამ ისინი ძალიან რთულია მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაში ინტერგურაცია (NMT) რომელიც სიტყვებით კითხვა და შექმნა სიტყვები. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ NMT-ში ფრაზების გასაგრძელება გამოყენება ფრაზების მეხსიერების ინტერგურაციაზე, რომელიც ფრაზების გასაგრძელებული სტატისტიკალური მაქსინის გასაგრძელება (SMT) სისტემიდან NMT ყოველ დიკოდირების ნაწილში, ფრაზის მეხსიერება SMT მოდელზე პირველად გადაწერა, რომელიც დინამიკურად შექმნის შესახებ მინიშვნელოვანი ფრაზების შესახებ, რომელიც NMT მოდელზე მო შემდეგ მინდა მოდელს ფრაზის მეხსიერება, რომ ყველა ფრაზის მეხსიერებაში ყველა ფრაზებისთვის შესაძლებლობა დააწყება. თუ ფრაზების განვითარება გააკეთებულია, NMT დეკოდერი მონიშნეთ სწორი ფრაზის მეხსიერიდან გამოყენება ფრაზების განვითარება და განახლება თავის დეკოდირება სტაციაში სიტყ ანუ, NMT დეკოდერი სიტყვებლიდან ერთი სიტყვების შექმნა, როგორც საერთო NMT დეკოდერის შექმნა. ჩინეთების ანგლისური წარმოდგენების გამოცდილების შედეგი გამოცდილება იქნება, რომ მოდგენილი მოდელის გასაკეთებელი გასაკეთება განსხვავებულ ტესტის კონფიგურ', 'hu': 'A kifejezések fontos szerepet játszanak a természetes nyelv megértésében és a gépi fordításban (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Azonban nehéz ezeket integrálni a jelenlegi neurális gépi fordításba (NMT), amely szóról szóra olvassa és generálja mondatokat. Ebben a munkában egy olyan módszert javasolunk, amely a kifejezések NMT-ben történő lefordítására irányul, hogy egy kifejezésalapú statisztikai gépi fordítási rendszerből (SMT) származó célkifejezéseket tároló kifejezésmóriát integráljuk az NMT kódoló-dekóder architektúrájába. Minden dekódolási lépésnél a kifejezés memóriáját először az SMT modell írja újra, amely dinamikusan generálja a releváns célkifejezéseket az NMT modell által biztosított kontextuális információkkal. Ezután a javasolt modell felolvassa a kifejezés memóriáját, hogy valószínűségi becsléseket készítsen a kifejezés memóriájában található összes kifejezésre. Ha a kifejezések generálása folytatódik, az NMT dekódoló kiválaszt egy megfelelő kifejezést a memóriából a kifejezések fordításához, és frissíti a dekódolási állapotát a kijelölt kifejezés szavainak felhasználásával. Ellenkező esetben az NMT dekódoló generál egy szót a szókincsből, mint az általános NMT dekódoló. A kínai-angol fordítással kapcsolatos kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell jelentős javulást ér el a különböző tesztkészletek alapjához képest.', 'el': 'Οι φράσεις διαδραματίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο στην κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας και στη μηχανική μετάφραση (2002, κ.α., 2005). Ωστόσο, είναι δύσκολο να ενσωματωθούν στην τρέχουσα νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT), η οποία διαβάζει και παράγει προτάσεις λέξη προς λέξη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για τη μετάφραση φράσεων στο NMT ενσωματώνοντας μια μνήμη φράσεων που αποθηκεύει φράσεις-στόχους από ένα σύστημα στατιστικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (SMT) βασισμένο σε φράσεις στην αρχιτεκτονική κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή του NMT. Σε κάθε βήμα αποκωδικοποίησης, η μνήμη φράσεων επαναγράφεται πρώτα από το μοντέλο το οποίο δημιουργεί δυναμικά σχετικές φράσεις-στόχους με πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος που παρέχονται από το μοντέλο NMT. Στη συνέχεια, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο διαβάζει τη μνήμη φράσεων για να κάνει εκτιμήσεις πιθανοτήτων για όλες τις φράσεις στη μνήμη φράσεων. Εάν συνεχιστεί η παραγωγή φράσεων, ο αποκωδικοποιητής επιλέγει μια κατάλληλη φράση από τη μνήμη για να εκτελέσει τη μετάφραση φράσεων και ενημερώνει την κατάσταση αποκωδικοποίησης καταναλώνοντας τις λέξεις στην επιλεγμένη φράση. Διαφορετικά, ο αποκωδικοποιητής παράγει μια λέξη από το λεξιλόγιο όπως κάνει ο γενικός αποκωδικοποιητής NMT. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων στην κινεζική προς αγγλική μετάφραση δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις έναντι της βάσης σε διάφορα σύνολα δοκιμών.', 'it': "Le frasi svolgono un ruolo importante nella comprensione del linguaggio naturale e nella traduzione automatica (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Tuttavia, è difficile integrarli nella traduzione automatica neurale corrente (NMT) che legge e genera frasi parola per parola. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un metodo per tradurre frasi in NMT integrando una memoria di frase che memorizza frasi target da un sistema di traduzione automatica statistica basata sulle frasi (SMT) nell'architettura encoder-decoder di NMT. Ad ogni passaggio di decodifica, la memoria delle frasi viene prima riscritta dal modello SMT, che genera dinamicamente frasi target rilevanti con informazioni contestuali fornite dal modello NMT. Quindi il modello proposto legge la memoria della frase per fare stime di probabilità per tutte le frasi nella memoria della frase. Se viene eseguita la generazione di frasi, il decoder NMT seleziona una frase appropriata dalla memoria per eseguire la traduzione della frase e aggiorna il suo stato di decodifica consumando le parole nella frase selezionata. Altrimenti, il decoder NMT genera una parola dal vocabolario come fa il decoder NMT generale. I risultati degli esperimenti sulla traduzione cinese-inglese mostrano che il modello proposto raggiunge miglioramenti significativi rispetto alla base di base su vari set di test.", 'mk': 'Фразите играат важна улога во природното разбирање на јазикот и машинскиот превод (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Сепак, тешко е да се интегрираат во тековниот превод на невралната машина (НМТ), кој чита и генерира реченици збор по збор. Во оваа работа, предлагаме метод за преведување на фрази во НМТ со интеграција на фраза меморија за зачувување на метни фрази од систем на статистички машински превод (СМТ) базиран на фрази во архитектурата на кодерот-декодерот на НМТ. Во секој чекор на декодирање, меморијата на фразата првпат е повторно напишана од моделот СМТ, кој динамично генерира релевантни метни фрази со контекстни информации обезбедени од моделот НМТ. Потоа предложениот модел го чита сеќавањето на фразата за да направи проценки на веројатноста за сите фрази во сеќавањето на фразата. Ако се продолжи генерацијата на фрази, декодерот NMT избира соодветна фраза од меморијата за да изврши превод на фрази и ја оновремени нејзината состојба на декодирање со конзумирање на зборовите во избраната фраза. Инаку, декодерот НМТ генерира збор од речникот како што прави генералниот декодер НМТ. Резултатите од експериментите на кинескиот на англискиот превод покажуваат дека предложениот модел постигнува значителни подобрувања во однос на базата на различните тестови.', 'lt': 'Pranešimai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį suprantant natūralią kalbą ir vertant mašinomis (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Tačiau sunku juos integruoti į dabartinį neurologinį vertimą (NMT), kuris skaito ir sukuria sakinius žodžiu po žodžiu. Šiame darbe siūlome metodą, kuriuo frazės būtų išverstos į NMT, integruojant frazę atminties saugojimo tikslines frazes iš frazėmis pagrįstos statistikos mašin ų vertimo (SMT) sistemos į NMT kodavimo dekoderio architektūrą. Kiekviename dekodiavimo etape frazės atmintis pirmą kartą iš naujo rašomas SMT modeliu, kuris dinamiškai sukuria atitinkamas tikslines frazes su kontekstine informacija, kurią teikia NMT model is. Tada siūlomas modelis skaito frazės atmintį, kad būtų galima įvertinti visų frazės atmintyje esančių frazių tikimybę. Jei frazės generuojamos, NMT dekoderis pasirinka atitinkamą frazę iš atminties, kad būtų atliktas frazės vertimas, ir atnaujina jos dekoderavimo būklę naudojant pasirinktoje frazėje esančius žodžius. Priešingu atveju NMT dekoderis iš žodyno generuoja žodį, kaip ir bendrasis NMT dekoderis. Eksperimentų, susijusių su kinų ir anglų vertimais, rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomu modeliu įvairių bandymų rinkinių pradinės vertės gerokai pagerėja.', 'kk': 'Фрейстер табиғи тілдерді түсіндіру мен машинаны аудару үшін маңызды роль орындалады (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Бірақ, оларды назардағы невралдық компьютердің аудармасына (NMT) түрінде біріктіру және сөздерді сөз бойынша құру қиын. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, NMT дегенде сөздерді аудару әдісін NMT деген кодер- декодер архитектурасынан мақсатты сөздерді сақтау үшін мәтін жады сақтау әдісін қолданамыз. Әрбір декодтау қадамында, мәтін жады SMT үлгісінде бірінші жазылады. Бұл NMT үлгісінде келтірілген контексті мәлімет арқылы динамикалық мақсатты сөздерді құрады. Содан кейін келтірілген үлгі сөздің жадындағы барлық сөздер үшін маңызды оқу үшін сөздер жадын оқу. Егер сөздерді құру орындалса, NMT декодторы жадынан сәйкес сөздерді аударып, таңдалған сөздерді қолдану үшін сөздерді жаңарту күйін жаңарту үшін таңдайды. Әйтпесе, NMT декодері NMT декодері жалпы сөздерден сөз жасайды. Қытай тілдеріне ағылшын тілдеріне аударатын тәжірибенің нәтижесі, келтірілген үлгісінің түрлі сынақтардың негізгі жолында маңызды жақсартылығын көрсете', 'ms': 'Frasa bermain peran penting dalam pemahaman bahasa alam dan terjemahan mesin (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Namun, sukar untuk mengintegrasikan mereka ke dalam terjemahan mesin saraf semasa (NMT) yang membaca dan menghasilkan kalimat perkataan demi perkataan. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan kaedah untuk menerjemahkan frasa dalam NMT dengan mengintegrasikan frasa memori menyimpan frasa sasaran dari sistem terjemahan mesin statistik berdasarkan frasa (SMT) ke dalam arkitektur pengekod-dekoder NMT. Pada setiap langkah penyahkodan, memori frasa ditulis semula pertama kali oleh model SMT, yang secara dinamik menghasilkan frasa sasaran yang berkaitan dengan maklumat kontekstual yang diberikan oleh model NMT. Then the proposed model reads the phrase memory to make probability estimations for all phrases in the phrase memory.  Jika generasi frasa dilanjutkan, penyahkod NMT memilih frasa yang sesuai dari memori untuk melaksanakan terjemahan frasa dan kemaskini keadaan penyahkodannya dengan mengkonsumsi perkataan dalam frasa yang dipilih. Jika tidak, penyahkod NMT menghasilkan perkataan dari kamus seperti penyahkod NMT umum. Hasil eksperimen pada terjemahan Cina ke Inggeris menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan terhadap asas pada set ujian berbeza.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടും മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളിലും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പങ്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തിലേക്ക് അവരെ ഒന്നിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് പ്രയാസകരമാണ്. വാക്കുകള്\u200d വായിച് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, NMT-ല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് ലക്ഷ്യം സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഒരു വാ എല്ലാ കോഡിങ്ങ് പടിയിലും എസ്എംടി മോഡല്\u200d ആദ്യം എഴുതിയ വാക്ക് മെമ്മറി ആദ്യം എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ലക്ഷ്യം വാക്കു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ മെമ്മറി വായിച്ചുകേള്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക് If phrase generation is carried on, the NMT decoder selects an appropriate phrase from the memory to perform phrase translation and updates its decoding state by consuming the words in the selected phrase.  അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, NMT ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d സാധാരണ NMT ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് പോലെ പദവി ചൈനീസിലേക്ക് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്ക് പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പരീക്ഷണ', 'no': 'Fraser speler ein viktig rolle i naturspråksforståelse og maskinsomsetjing (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Det er likevel vanskeleg å integrere dei i gjeldande neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT), som lesar og lagar setningar etter ord. I denne arbeida foreslår vi ein metode for å oversette frasar i NMT ved å integrera eit frase med minne som lagrar målsfrasar frå eit frasebasert statistisk maskinsomsetjing (SMT) i koderingsarkitekturen av NMT. På kvar dekoderingssteg er minnet frasen først skriven på nytt av SMT-modellen, som dynamisk lagar relevante målfrasar med kontekstinformasjon som er oppgjeven av NMT-modellen. Deretter den foreslåde modellen leser minnet på frasen for å gjera sannsynlighetsverdi for alle frasar i minnet på frasen. Dersom frasergenereringa er fortsett, vil NMT- dekoderen velja eit passande frase frå minnet for å utføra omsetjinga av frasa og oppdatera dekodingstilstanden ved å bruka ord i den valde frasen. Elles, NMT- dekoderen lagar eit ord frå ordlista som den generelle NMT- dekoderen gjer. Eksperimentresultat på kinesiske til engelsk omsetjingar viser at den foreslåde modellen gjer signifikante forbedringar over baselinja på ulike testsett.', 'mt': 'Il-frażijiet għandhom rwol importanti fil-fehim tal-lingwa naturali u fit-traduzzjoni bil-magni (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Madankollu, huwa diffiċli li jiġu integrati fit-traduzzjoni kurrenti tal-magna newrali (NMT) li taqra u tiġġenera sentenzi kelma b’kelma. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu metodu għat-traduzzjoni tal-frażijiet fl-NMT billi nintegraw frażi tal-memorja li taħżen il-frażijiet fil-mira minn sistema tat-traduzzjoni tal-magna statistika bbażata fuq il-frażijiet (SMT) fl-arkitettura tal-kodifikatur-dekoder tal-NMT. F’kull stadju ta’ dekodifikazzjoni, il-memorja tal-frażi għall-ewwel darba tiġi miktuba mill-ġdid mill-mudell SMT, li b’mod dinamiku jiġġenera frażijiet fil-mira rilevanti b’informazzjoni kuntestwali pprovduta mill-mudell NMT. Imbagħad il-mudell propost jaqra l-memorja tal-frażi biex jagħmel stimi tal-probabbiltà għall-frażijiet kollha fil-memorja tal-frażi. Jekk titwettaq il-ġenerazzjoni tal-frażi, id-dekoder NMT jagħżel frażi xierqa mill-memorja biex iwettaq it-traduzzjoni tal-frażi u jaġġorna l-istat tad-dekodifikazzjoni tiegħu billi jikkonsma l-kliem fil-frażi magħżula. Inkella, id-dekoder NMT jiġġenera kelma mill-vokabulari kif jagħmel id-dekoder ġenerali NMT. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti dwar it-traduzzjoni Ċiniża għall-Ingliż juru li l-mudell propost jikseb titjib sinifikanti fuq il-linja bażi fuq diversi settijiet tat-testijiet.', 'pl': 'Zwroty odgrywają ważną rolę w rozumieniu języka naturalnego i tłumaczeniu maszynowym (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Trudno jednak zintegrować je z obecnym neuronowym tłumaczeniem maszynowym (NMT), które czyta i generuje zdania słowo po słowie. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy metodę tłumaczenia fraz w NMT poprzez integrację pamięci fraz przechowującej frazy docelowe z systemu fraz-based statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego (SMT) do architektury kodera-dekodera NMT. Na każdym kroku dekodowania pamięć fraz jest najpierw ponownie pisana przez model SMT, który dynamicznie generuje odpowiednie frazy docelowe z informacjami kontekstowymi dostarczanymi przez model NMT. Następnie proponowany model odczytuje pamięć fraz, aby dokonać oszacowania prawdopodobieństwa dla wszystkich fraz w pamięci fraz. Jeśli generowanie fraz jest kontynuowane, dekoder NMT wybiera odpowiednią frazę z pamięci, aby wykonać tłumaczenie frazy i aktualizuje swój stan dekodowania poprzez konsumpcję słów w wybranej frazie. W przeciwnym razie dekoder NMT generuje słowo ze słownictwa, jak to robi ogólny dekoder NMT. Wyniki eksperymentu na temat tłumaczenia chińskiego na angielski pokazują, że proponowany model osiąga znaczną poprawę w stosunku do bazy danych na różnych zestawach testowych.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэлний ойлголт болон машины хөрөнгө оруулалт нь чухал үүрэг тоглодог (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Гэхдээ эдгээрийг орчин үеийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) руу нэгтгэх нь хэцүү. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид NMT-д хэллэгүүдийг хөгжүүлэх аргыг санах санааны санамж хэллэгүүдийг NMT-ийн кодлогч-декодер архитектурд нэгтгэх аргыг санаж байна. Үйлдүүлэх алхам тутамд хэлэлцээний санамж нь анхны SMT загвараар дахин бичигдсэн юм. Энэ нь NMT загвараар өгсөн орчин үеийн мэдээллээс хамааралтай зорилготой хэлэлцээг хөгжүүлдэг. Дараа нь санал өгсөн загвар нь бүх үгийг санах магадлалын тооцоолох үгийг уншиж байна. Хэрвээ өгүүлбэр үүсгэх байвал, NMT декодер нь санамжтаас зөвхөн өгүүлбэрийг орлуулахын тулд өгүүлбэрийг шинэчлэх болон сонгогдсон үгийг хэрэглэж байдаг. Эсвэл NMT кодлогч нь NMT кодлогчийн ерөнхий хэлбэрээс нэг үг бий болгодог. Хятад болон Англи хэлний орчуулалтын туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн загвар нь олон шалгалтын суурь шугам дээр үндсэн сайжруулалт гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Frazele joacă un rol important în înțelegerea limbii naturale și traducerea automată (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Cu toate acestea, este dificil să le integrezi în traducerea automată neurală curentă (NMT), care citește și generează propoziții cuvânt cu cuvânt. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă de traducere a frazelor în NMT prin integrarea unei memorii de fraze care stochează frazele țintă dintr-un sistem de traducere automată statistică bazată pe fraze (SMT) în arhitectura encoder-decoder a NMT. La fiecare pas de decodare, memoria frazelor este mai întâi rescrisă de modelul SMT, care generează dinamic fraze țintă relevante cu informații contextuale furnizate de modelul NMT. Apoi modelul propus citește memoria frazei pentru a face estimări de probabilitate pentru toate frazele din memoria frazei. Dacă generarea de fraze este continuată, decodorul NMT selectează o frază corespunzătoare din memorie pentru a efectua traducerea frazelor și actualizează starea de decodare consumând cuvintele din fraza selectată. În caz contrar, decodorul NMT generează un cuvânt din vocabular ca decodorul NMT general face. Rezultatele experimentelor privind traducerea din chineză în engleză arată că modelul propus obține îmbunătățiri semnificative față de bază pe diferite seturi de teste.', 'sr': 'Fraze imaju važnu ulogu u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika i prevodu mašine (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Međutim, teško je da ih integrišemo u trenutni prevod neuralnih mašina (NMT), koji čita i proizvodi reč rečenica po rečenici. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu da prevedemo fraze u NMT integracijom fraze memorije koja čuva ciljne fraze iz sustava prevoda statističkih mašin a (SMT) na fraze u arhitekturu kodera-dekodera NMT-a. Na svakom koraku za dekodiranje, sećanje fraze je prvo ponovno napisano od modela SMT-a, koji dinamično stvara relevantne ciljne fraze sa kontekstualnim informacijama koje je pružio model NMT-a. Onda predloženi model pročita sećanje fraze kako bi procenila verovatnost za sve rečenice u sećanju fraze. Ako se nastavlja generacija fraza, NMT dekoder odabere odgovarajuću frazu iz pamćenja da izvede prevod fraza i aktualizuje svoj stav dekodiranja potrošeći reči u odabranoj frazi. Inače, NMT dekoder proizvodi reč iz rečnika kao i generalni NMT dekoder. Rezultati eksperimenta na kineskom na engleskom prevodu pokazuju da predloženi model postiže značajne poboljšanje na početnoj liniji na različitim testovima.', 'so': 'Erayadu waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku qoran waxgarashada afka dabiicadda ah iyo tarjumaadda machine (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Si kastaba ha ahaatee waa adag in ay u wada qabsato turjuma qoraalka neurada ah (NMT), kaas oo akhriya oo soo saara eray ku qoran. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qaab aan ku turjumno hadallada NMT by integrating a phrase memory storing phrases aimed from a phrase-based statistical machine translation (SMT) system in to the encoder-decoder architecture of NMT. At each decoding step, the phrase memory is first re-written by the SMT model, which dynamically generates relevant target phrases with contextual information provided by the NMT model.  Markaas waxaa akhriyaa muusikada la soo jeeday xubnaha, si uu u sameeyo qiimeynta suurtagal ah dhammaan hadallada xubnaha ku qoran. Haddii qarniga luqada la qaadanayo, NMT ayaa xafiiska ka dooranaya luqad ku haboon si uu u sameeyo turjumista luqada, wuxuuna u cusboonaysiiyaa xaaladda deynta, si uu ugu dhamaado erayada ku qoran hadalka la doortay. Haddii kale, qodolka NMT ayaa ka soo bandhigaa hadal afka ka soo baxa sida guud NMT codsigiisa u sameeyo. Imtixaanka ku saabsan turjumista ingiriiska ee Shiinaha iyo Ingiriiska waxay muujiyaan in modelka la soo jeeday uu ku guulaysto kororooyin muhiim ah oo ku qoran samooyinka imtixaanka kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Fraser spelar en viktig roll för förståelsen av naturligt språk och maskinöversättning (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Det är dock svårt att integrera dem i aktuell neural maskinöversättning (NMT) som läser och genererar meningar ord för ord. I detta arbete föreslår vi en metod för att översätta fraser i NMT genom att integrera ett frasminne som lagrar målfraser från ett frasbaserat statistiskt maskinöversättningssystem (SMT) i NMT:s encoder-dekoder arkitektur. Vid varje avkodningssteg skrivs frasminnet först om av SMT-modellen, som dynamiskt genererar relevanta målfraser med kontextuell information från NMT-modellen. Sedan läser den föreslagna modellen frasminnet för att göra sannolikhetsberäkningar för alla fraser i frasminnet. Om frasgenerering fortsätter väljer NMT-avkodaren en lämplig fras från minnet för att utföra frasöversättning och uppdaterar dess avkodningstillstånd genom att konsumera orden i den markerade frasen. Annars genererar NMT-avkodaren ett ord från ordförrådet som den allmänna NMT-avkodaren gör. Experimentsresultat på den kinesiska till engelska översättningen visar att den föreslagna modellen uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med baslinjen på olika testuppsättningar.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න සහ පණිවිඩයේ වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. නමුත්, ඔවුන්ව වචනයෙන් කියනවා වචනයෙන් වචනය කරන්න අමාරුයි. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් NMT වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරවේශයක් මතකයේ ඉලක්ෂ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් අධාරිත පද්ධතියේ ඉ හැම පැත්තේ ඩිකෝඩින් පැත්තට, පැත්තක් මතකය පළමු SMT මොඩල් එක්ක ආපහු ලියලා තියෙනවා, ඒක නිර්මාණයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වාක්ෂාව ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මතකය කියනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මතකයේ සියලුම ප ප්\u200dරකාශ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවනම්, NMT ඩිකොඩර් මතකයෙන් ප්\u200dරකාශයක් තෝරාගන්නවා ප්\u200dරකාශ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වා නැත්තම්, NMT ඩිකොඩර් වචනයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය NMT ඩිකොඩර් වගේ වචනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. චීනියාව ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ සැට', 'ur': 'مثالیں طبیعی زبان سمجھنے اور ماشین ترجمہ میں اہم رغم لگاتے ہیں (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). لیکن ان کو موجود نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) میں جمع کرنے کا مشکل ہے جو کلمات کے ذریعے پڑھتا ہے اور کلمات کا پیدا کرتا ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم نے NMT میں فریزوں کا ترجمہ کرنے کا ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ ایک فریزوں کی مہمانی کے ذریعہ ایک فریزوں کا ذخیره کرے جو ایک فریزوں پر بنیاد آمیستیکل ماشین ترجمہ (SMT) سیسٹم سے NMT کے اکڈر-ڈیکوڈر معماری میں داخل کریں۔ Each decoding step, the phrase memory is first re-written by the SMT model, which dynamically generates relevant target phrases with contextual information provided by the NMT model. اس کے بعد پیش فرض کی مدل فرض یاد کرتا ہے کہ تمام فرشتوں کے لئے احتمال کا ارزش کرے۔ اگر فریز پیدائش ادھر کر دی جاتی ہے تو NMT ڈیکوڈر مہمانی سے ایک مناسب فریز انتخاب کرتا ہے کہ فریز ترجمہ کرے اور اس کی ڈیکوڈنگ حالت کو انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے Otherwise, the NMT decoder generates a word from the vocabulary as the general NMT decoder does. انگلیسی ترجمہ پر چین کی آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل مختلف تست سٹوں پر بنسلین پر بہت اضافہ ہوتی ہے.', 'ta': 'இயற்கையான மொழி புரிவு மற்றும் இயந்திரம் மொழிமாற்ற மொழிமாற்றியில் முக்கியமான வாக்கியங்கள் விளையாடுகிறது (சாக்  ஆனால், தற்போதைய புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிமாற்றிக்கு அவர்களை ஒன்றாக்குவது கடினமாக உள்ளது. அது வார்த்தைக் கொண்டு படித்த இந்த வேலையில், நாம் NMT ல் உள்ள சொற்றொடர்களை மொழிபெயர்ப்பதற்கான முறைமையை ஒரு சொற்றொடர் நினைவகம் சேமி @ info பின்னர் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி சொற்றொடர் நினைவகத்தை படிக்கிறது சாத்தியமான அனைத்து சொற்றொடர்களுக்கும் மதிப்ப @ info: whatsthis இல்லையென்றால், NMT குறியீட்டாளர் பொதுவான NMT குறியீட்டாளர் சொல்லிலிருந்து ஒரு வார்த்தையை உருவாக்குக சீனா மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி பல சோதனை அமைப்புகளில் அடிப்படை', 'uz': "(Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005) so'zlar tabiiy tilni o'rganish va mashinaning tarjimasida muhim rollen oʻynaladi. Lekin ularni joriy neyron tarjima (NMT) tilidan birlashtirish qiyin, so'zlarni o'qish va so'zlar so'zlarini yaratish mumkin. In this work, we propose a method to translate phrases in NMT by integrating a phrase memory storing target phrases from a phrase-based statistical machine translation (SMT) system into the encoder-decoder architecture of NMT.  @ info Keyin talab qilingan modeli bir maxfiy soʻzlarni xotira o'qish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Aks holda, NMT kodlash usulini maxfiy soʻzdan foydalanadi. Name", 'vi': 'Các cụm từ đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong việc hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và dịch thuật cỗ máy (hiền một al., lảng 2; Villavicencio et al., rồ). Tuy nhiên, khó có thể hòa nhập chúng vào bộ dịch máy thần kinh hiện tại (NMB) mà đọc và tạo ra câu truyện từng chữ một. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp để dịch đoạn văn trong công ty NMT bằng cách nhập một từ điển thành ngữ để lưu các cụm từ từ từ trong hệ thống dịch vụ máy nghe từ SMT vào cấu trúc mã hóa của NMT. Mỗi bước giải, từ điển được viết lại lần đầu bởi mẫu SMT, nó tạo ra các cụm từ đích liên quan với các thông tin ngữ cảnh được cung cấp bởi mẫu NMT. Sau đó, mẫu đã đề nghị đọc từ ký ức để thực hiện ước đoán xác suất cho tất cả các cụm từ trong bộ nhớ cụm từ. Nếu tiếp tục sản xuất đoạn văn, bộ giải mã NMT chọn một đoạn thích hợp từ trong trí nhớ để thực hiện dịch đoạn văn và cập nhật trạng thái giải mã của nó bằng cách dùng từ trong đoạn đã chọn. Nếu không, bộ giải mã NMB tạo ra một từ trong từ vựng, như bộ giải mã NMB thường làm. Kết quả thí nghiệm dịch của Trung Quốc với Tiếng Anh cho thấy mẫu đề xuất đạt được những cải tiến đáng kể trên cơ sở cơ bản của nhiều bộ thử nghiệm.', 'bg': 'Фразите играят важна роля в разбирането на естествения език и машинния превод (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Въпреки това е трудно да се интегрират в текущия невронен машинен превод (НМТ), който чете и генерира изречения дума по дума. В тази работа предлагаме метод за превод на фрази в НМТ чрез интегриране на фразова памет, съхраняваща целеви фрази от фразова базирана система за машинен превод (СМТ) в кодер-декодерната архитектура на НМТ. При всяка стъпка на декодиране паметта на фразата първо се преписва от модела който динамично генерира съответните целеви фрази с контекстуална информация, предоставена от модела. След това предложеният модел чете паметта на фразата, за да направи оценка на вероятността за всички фрази в паметта на фразата. Ако се извършва генериране на фраза, декодерът избира подходяща фраза от паметта, за да извърши превод на фраза и актуализира състоянието си на декодиране, като консумира думите в избраната фраза. В противен случай декодерът генерира дума от речника, както прави общият декодер. Резултатите от експеримента на превода от китайски на английски показват, че предложеният модел постига значителни подобрения спрямо базовата база при различни тестови комплекти.', 'da': "Sætninger spiller en vigtig rolle i forståelsen af naturligt sprog og maskinoversættelse (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Det er dog svært at integrere dem i nuværende neurale maskinoversættelse (NMT), som læser og genererer sætninger ord for ord. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en metode til at oversætte sætninger i NMT ved at integrere en sætningshukommelse, der lagrer målsætninger fra et sætningsbaseret statistisk maskinoversættelsessystem (SMT) i NMT's encoder-dekoder arkitektur. Ved hvert afkodningstrin omskrives sætningshukommelsen først af SMT-modellen, som dynamisk genererer relevante målsætninger med kontekstuelle oplysninger leveret af NMT-modellen. Derefter læser den foreslåede model sætningshukommelsen for at foretage sandsynlighedskøn for alle sætninger i sætningshukommelsen. Hvis sætningsgenerering fortsættes, vælger NMT-dekoderen en passende sætning fra hukommelsen til at udføre sætningsoversættelse og opdaterer dens afkodningstilstand ved at bruge ordene i den valgte sætning. Ellers genererer NMT-dekoder et ord fra ordforrådet som den generelle NMT-dekoder gør. Eksperimentelle resultater på kinesisk til engelsk oversættelse viser, at den foreslåede model opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til baseline på forskellige testsæt.", 'nl': 'Woorden spelen een belangrijke rol in het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal en machinevertaling (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Het is echter moeilijk om ze te integreren in de huidige neurale machinevertaling (NMT), die zinnen woord voor woord leest en genereert. In dit werk stellen we een methode voor om zinnen in NMT te vertalen door een zinnengeheugen dat doelzinnen van een zinnengebaseerd statistisch machinevertaalsysteem (SMT) opslaat te integreren in de encoder-decoder architectuur van NMT. Bij elke decoderingsstap wordt het zinnengeheugen eerst herschreven door het SMT-model, dat dynamisch relevante doelzinnen genereert met contextuele informatie die door het NMT-model wordt verstrekt. Vervolgens leest het voorgestelde model het zinnengeheugen om waarschijnlijkheidsschattingen te maken voor alle zinnen in het zinnengeheugen. Als het genereren van zinnen wordt voortgezet, selecteert de NMT-decoder een geschikte zin uit het geheugen om zinnen te vertalen en werkt de decoderingsstatus bij door de woorden in de geselecteerde zin te consumeren. Anders genereert de NMT decoder een woord uit de woordenschat zoals de algemene NMT decoder doet. Uit experimenten met de Chinese naar Engelse vertaling blijkt dat het voorgestelde model significante verbeteringen behaalt ten opzichte van de baseline op verschillende testsets.', 'hr': 'Fraze imaju važnu ulogu u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika i prevodu strojeva (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Međutim, teško je ih uključiti u trenutni prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT), koji čita i proizvodi riječ rečenica po riječi. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu prevoditi fraze u NMT integracijom fraze memorije čuvanja ciljnih fraza iz sustava prevoda statističkih strojeva (SMT) na frazi u arhitekturu kodera-dekodera NMT-a. Na svakom koraku za dekodiranje, sjećanje fraze je prvo ponovno napisano modelom SMT-a, koji dinamički stvara relevantne ciljne fraze s kontekstualnim informacijama koje je pružio model NMT-a. Zatim predloženi model čita memoriju fraze kako bi procijenili vjerojatnost za sve rečenice u sjećanju fraze. Ako se nastavi generacija fraza, NMT dekoder odabere odgovarajuću frazu iz sjećanja kako bi izvršio prevod fraza i aktualizirao svoj stav dekodiranja potrošeći riječi u odabranoj frazi. Inače, NMT dekoder proizvodi riječ iz rečnika kao i generalni dekoder NMT-a. Rezultati iskustva na kineskom i engleskom prevodu pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao značajne poboljšanje na početnoj liniji na različitim testovima.', 'de': 'Phrasen spielen eine wichtige Rolle beim Verständnis natürlicher Sprache und maschineller Übersetzung (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Es ist jedoch schwierig, sie in die aktuelle neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) zu integrieren, die Sätze Wort für Wort liest und generiert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine Methode vor, Phrasen in NMT zu übersetzen, indem ein Phrasenspeicher, der Zielphrasen aus einem phrasenbasierten statistischen maschinellen Übersetzungssystem (SMT) in die Encoder-Decoder-Architektur von NMT integriert. Bei jedem Dekodierungsschritt wird der Phrasenspeicher zunächst vom SMT-Modell neu geschrieben, das dynamisch relevante Zielphrasen mit Kontextinformationen generiert, die vom NMT-Modell bereitgestellt werden. Dann liest das vorgeschlagene Modell den Phrasenspeicher, um Wahrscheinlichkeitsschätzungen für alle Phrasen im Phrasenspeicher zu machen. Wenn die Generierung von Phrasen fortgesetzt wird, wählt der NMT-Decoder eine geeignete Phrase aus dem Speicher aus, um Phrasenübersetzung durchzuführen und aktualisiert ihren Dekodierungszustand, indem er die Wörter in der ausgewählten Phrase konsumiert. Andernfalls erzeugt der NMT-Decoder ein Wort aus dem Vokabular, wie es der allgemeine NMT-Decoder tut. Experimente zur Chinesisch-Englisch-Übersetzung zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber der Baseline auf verschiedenen Testsets erzielt.', 'id': 'Phrases play an important role in natural language understanding and machine translation (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005).  Namun, sulit untuk mengintegrasikan mereka ke dalam terjemahan mesin saraf saat ini (NMT) yang membaca dan menghasilkan kalimat kata demi kata. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode untuk menerjemahkan frasa dalam NMT dengan mengintegrasikan frasa memori menyimpan frasa sasaran dari sistem terjemahan mesin statistik berdasarkan frasa (SMT) ke arkitektur pengekode-dekoder NMT. Pada setiap langkah dekoding, memori frasa pertama ditulis kembali oleh model SMT, yang secara dinamik menghasilkan frasa sasaran relevan dengan informasi kontekstual yang diberikan oleh model NMT. Kemudian model yang diusulkan membaca memori frasa untuk membuat penilaian kemungkinan untuk semua frasa dalam memori frasa. Jika generasi frasa dilanjutkan, dekoder NMT memilih frasa yang sesuai dari memori untuk melakukan terjemahan frasa dan memperbaharui keadaan dekodennya dengan mengkonsumsi kata-kata dalam frasa yang dipilih. Jika tidak, dekoder NMT menghasilkan kata dari vokabular seperti dekoder NMT umum. Hasil eksperimen pada terjemahan bahasa Cina ke bahasa Inggris menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas dasar pada berbagai set tes.', 'sw': 'Neno zinacheza jukumu muhimu katika uelewa wa lugha ya asili na tafsiri ya mashine (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Hata hivyo, ni vigumu kuwaunganisha katika tafsiri ya mashine ya kisasa (NMT) ambayo inasoma na kutengeneza maneno kwa neno. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya kutafsiri maneno katika NMT kwa kuunganisha msemo wa kumbukumbu inayobeba maneno ya lengo kutoka tafsiri ya mashine yenye msingi wa maneno (SMT) katika mfumo wa ujenzi wa koder-decoder wa NMT. Katika hatua ya kila kupanua decodi, kumbukumbu ya msemo imeandikwa mara ya kwanza na modeli ya SMT, ambayo kwa nguvu inatengeneza maneno yanayohusiana na taarifa za kisasa zinazotolewa na modeli ya NMT. Kisha muundo wa pendekezo unasoma kumbukumbu ya msemo ili kufanya uwezekano wa kuchaguliwa kwa maneno yote katika kumbukumbu ya msemo. Kama kizazi cha maneno kinaendelea, NMT anachagua msemo sahihi kutoka kumbukumbu ili kutekeleza tafsiri ya msemo na kurekebisha hali yake ya kupunguza kwa kutumia maneno katika msemo uliopaguliwa. Wengine, taarifa ya NMT inatengeneza neno kutoka kwenye lugha hiyo kama ambavyo mtaalamu mkuu wa NMT unavyofanya. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayohusu tafsiri ya Kichina hadi Kiingereza yanaonyesha kuwa muundo huo wa pendekezo unaweza kupata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya msingi katika seti mbalimbali za majaribio.', 'fa': 'جمله\u200cها نقش مهم در درک زبان طبیعی و ترجمه ماشین (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005) بازی می\u200cکنند. با این حال، آن\u200cها را به ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی فعلی (NMT) می\u200cخواند و کلمه\u200cهای عبارت را به کلمه تولید می\u200cکند، مشکل است. در این کار، ما یک روش برای ترجمه کردن عبارت در NMT پیشنهاد می کنیم با جمع کردن یک عبارت حافظه ذخیره کردن عبارت هدف از یک سیستم ترجمه دستگاه آمارسی (SMT) بر اساس عبارت ذخیره کردن یک عبارت به معماری رمز\u200cدهنده NMT. در هر قدم دکوندی، حافظه\u200cی عبارت اولین بار توسط مدل SMT نوشته می\u200cشود، که به طور طبیعی عبارت هدف مربوط به عنوان اطلاعات متوسط توسط مدل NMT تولید می\u200cشود. بعدش مدل پیشنهاد حافظه\u200cی عبارت را می\u200cخواند تا ارزیابی احتمال برای تمام عبارت در حافظه\u200cی عبارت انجام دهد. اگر تولید عبارت ادامه داده شود، Dekoder NMT یک عبارت مناسب از حافظه انتخاب می\u200cکند تا تولید عبارت را انجام دهد و وضعیت decoding خود را با استفاده از کلمات در عبارت انتخاب کند. در غیر این صورت، دکوردر NMT یک کلمه از کلمات را به عنوان دکوردر ژنرال NMT ایجاد می کند. نتیجه تجربه\u200cهای چینی به ترجمه انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل پیشنهاد بر اساس خط بنیادی بر مجموعه\u200cهای آزمایش\u200cهای مختلف بهترین رسیده است.', 'af': "Frase speel 'n belangrike rol in natuurlike taal verstanding en masjien vertaling (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Maar dit is moeilik om hulle in die huidige neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) te integreer wat sê woord deur woord lees en genereer. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n metode om frase in NMT te vertaal deur 'n frase geheue te integreer wat doel frase stoor van' n frase-gebaseerde statistiese masjien vertaling (SMT) stelsel binne in die enkoder-dekoder-architecture van NMT. By elke dekodering stap, is die frase geheue eerste herskryf deur die SMT model, wat dinamies genereer relevante doel frase met kontekslike inligting wat deur die NMT model verskaf word. Daarop lees die voorgestelde model die frase geheue om waarskynlikheidsgetasies vir alle frase in die frase geheue te maak. As frase generasie aangevoer word, kies die NMT dekoder 'n geskikte frase van die geheue om frase vertaling te doen en sy dekoderingstoestand opdateer deur die woorde in die gekose frase te consumit. Andersins, die NMT dekoder genereer 'n woord van die woordeboek soos die algemene NMT dekoder doen. Eksperimentresultate van die Sjinese na Engelse vertaling vertoon dat die voorgestelde model betaling verbeteringe oor die basisline op verskeie toets stelle bereik word.", 'sq': "Frazat luajnë një rol të rëndësishëm në kuptimin natyror të gjuhës dhe përkthimin e makinave (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Megjithatë, është e vështirë t'i integrosh ato në përkthimin aktual të makinës nervore (NMT) që lexon dhe gjeneron fjalë me fjalë fjalë. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një metodë për të përkthyer frazat në NMT duke integruar një frazë memorie duke ruajtur frazat objektive nga një sistem përkthimi i makinave statistike (SMT) bazuar në frazë në arkitekturën e koduesit-dekoderit të NMT. Në çdo hap dekodimi, kujtesa e frazës rishkruhet së pari nga modeli SMT, i cili dinamikisht gjeneron fraza objektive të rëndësishme me informacion kontekstual të ofruar nga modeli NMT. Pastaj modeli i propozuar lexon kujtesën e frazës për të bërë vlerësime të probabilitetit për të gjitha frazat në kujtesën e frazës. Në qoftë se gjenerimi i frazëve vazhdon, dekoderi NMT zgjedh një frazë të përshtatshme nga kujtesa për të kryer përkthimin e frazëve dhe përditëson gjendjen e dekodimit duke konsumuar fjalët në frazën e zgjedhur. Përndryshe, dekoderi NMT gjeneron një fjalë nga fjalorin si dekoderi i përgjithshëm NMT. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve mbi përkthimin kinez në anglisht tregojnë se modeli i propozuar arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme lidhur me bazën në grupe të ndryshme testimi.", 'tr': "Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005. Ýöne olary häzirki näyral maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) goşulmak kyn. Bu sözleriň sözlerini söz bilen okap döreýär. Bu işde, NMT'da frazleri terjime etmek üçin bir täze teklif edip, NMT'yň koder-dekoder arhitektegine bir fraz goýduň. Her faýl açylyk adında, sözlemde SMT nusgasynda ilkinji gezek ýazylýar. Bu şekilde NMT nusgasyna tarapyndan berilen metin sözlemleri döredir. Soňra teklif eden nusgasy frazliň hatyny hatda möhüm bir hasaplanjak üçin okaýar. Eger fraz döredişi ýagdaýda, NMT faýlyň bejerilişi faýlyň terjimesini pozmak üçin ýene bir fraz saýlarsa we saýlanan sözleriň içine kodlemesini terjime etmek üçin ýene bir fraz bejerilýär. Yoksa, NMT dekoderi sözlerden bir söz üreýär NMT dekoderi ýaly. Çinçe we Iňlisçe terjime edilen örän netijesi görkezýär. Görkezilen nusga görkezilen çykyş düzümlerinde esasy gowurak gazanýar.", 'am': 'የፊደል ቃላት በፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል እና መሳሪያን ትርጉም የሚያስፈልጋል (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). ነገር ግን ቃላትን በሚያነብብ እና ቃላትን በመፍጠር በሚያስተካክለው ወደ አሁን የናውሬው የሆኑት መኪና ትርጉም ማቅረብ ችግር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ ቃላትን በNMT መተርጉም እናስጀምራለን፤ የቃላት ቃላትን ከንግግር-based statistical machine ትርጉም (SMT) ስርዓት ወደ encoder-decoder architecture of NMT. በየቀድሞው አካባቢ፣ የንግግሩ ማስታወሻ በመጀመሪያ በSMT ሞዴል የተጻፈ ነው፡፡ ይህም አካባቢ የግንኙነት የአካላቢ ቃላት በNMT ሞዴል በተሰጠው የግንኙነት መረጃ የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡ በኋላም በተፈጻገው ሞዴል የቃላትን ማስታወሻ የሚያነብብ የቃላትን ቃላት በንግግሩ ማስታወስ ሁሉ የሚያስፈልገውን ማስታወሻ ነው፡፡ የንግግር ትውልድ ተጨማሪ ከሆነ የNMT መክፈት መክፈቻን ለመፈለግ ማሳሰቢያ መክፈቻን ይምረጣል፤ የቃላትን መክፈት በመጠቀም በአካባቢው ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና የክክድለቱ ሁኔታ ማሻሻል። ባይሆንም የNMT ቀለሞች የጠቅላላ NMT ቀለሞች እንዳደረገ ቃላትን መፍጠር ነው፡፡ የቻይና ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ውጤቶች በተፈተናው ሞዴል በተለያዩ ፈተናዎች ላይ በመስመር ላይ የበለጠ ጥናት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ֆրանսները կարևոր դեր են խաղում բնական լեզվի հասկացության և մեքենային թարգմանման մեջ (Sag et al., 2002; VIլավիցենցիո et al., 2005). Այնուամենայնիվ, դժվար է ինտեգրել դրանք ներկայիս նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մեջ, որը կարդում է և ստեղծում է նախադասություններ բառ առ բառ: In this work, we propose a method to translate phrases in NMT by integrating a phrase memory storing target phrases from a phrase-based statistical machine translation (SMT) system into the encoder-decoder architecture of NMT.  Յուրաքանչյուր քայլի ընթացքում արտահայտության հիշողությունը առաջին անգամ կրկին գրվում է SMT մոդելի կողմից, որը դինամիկ կերպով ստեղծում է նշանակալի նպատակային արտահայտություններ NMT մոդելի կոնտեքստալ տեղեկատվությունով: Հետո նախագծված մոդելը կարդում է արտահայտության հիշողությունը, որպեսզի արտահայտության հիշողության բոլոր արտահայտությունների հավանականության գնահատումները անեն: Եթե արտահայտություններ են ստեղծվում, NMT-ի դեկոդերը ընտրում է համապատասխան արտահայտություն հիշողությունից արտահայտության թարգմանելու համար և վերականգնում է արտահայտությունների բառերը ընտրված արտահայտության մեջ: Այլ դեպքում, NMT-ի դեկոդերը բառ է ստեղծում բառերից, ինչպես անում է NMT-ի ընդհանուր դեկոդերը: Չինաստանի և անգլերենի թարգմանման փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը տարբեր փորձարկումների ընթացքում կարևոր բարելավումներ է հասնում:', 'az': 'Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Lakin, bu sözləri sözlərlə oxuyan və təşkil edən nöral maşına çevirilməsi (NMT) ilə birləşdirmək çətin. Bu işdə, NMT içində sözləri tercümə etmək üçün bir metodu təklif edirik, NMT kodlayıcı-dekoder arhitektüsünün kodlama sistemindən məqsəd sözləri qoruyaraq. Hər dəyişiklik adımda, fraz yaddaşı ilk dəfə SMT modeli ilə yenidən yazılır, ki, dinamik olaraq NMT modeli ilə müxtəlif məlumatları ilə məqsədilə məqsədil sözləri yaradır. Sonra təbliğ edilən modeli fraz yadına oxuyar ki, fraz yadına gələn bütün frazlərin mümkünlüyü hesablaması üçün. Əgər fraz nəzəriyyəti sürüklənirsə, NMT dekoderi seçilmiş sözləri istifadə edərək fərz çevirilməsi üçün yaddaşdan uyğun bir frazi seçir. Əgər olmasa, NMT dekoderi sözlərin genel NMT dekoderi kimi bir söz yaradır. Çincə ilə İngilizə çevirilən təcrübələrin sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərin müxtəlif sınaqlar setlərində baz çətinliklərdə möhkəm düzəltmələri başa düşər.', 'bn': 'বাক্ষতি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে এবং মেশিন অনুবাদে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে (সাগ এন্ট আল, ২০০২; ভিলাভিকেন্সিও et তবে বর্তমান নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) অনুবাদে তাদেরকে একত্রিত করা কঠিন যা শব্দের মাধ্যমে পাঠ করে এবং তৈরি করে। এই কাজে আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি এনএমটিতে বাক্ষর অনুবাদ করার মাধ্যমে একটি বাক্য সংরক্ষণের মেমরি সংযোগ করে একটি শব্দের ভিত্তিক পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদ (SMT) সিস্টেম থেক প্রত্যেক ডিকোডিং পদক্ষেপে, এসএমটি মডেল দ্বারা বাক্যের মেমরি প্রথম পুনরায় লিখেছে, যা ডাইমাইভাবে এনএমটি মডেল দ্বারা প্রযুক্ত তথ্যের তারপর প্রস্তাবিত মডেল পাঠ করেছে বাক্যের মেমরি যাতে এই শব্দের সকল বাক্যের মেমরির জন্য সম্ভবত হিসেবে বানানোর জন্য। যদি বাক্ষর প্রজন্ম চলতে চায়, নির্বাচিত বাক্যের ভাষায় শব্দ ব্যবহার করার জন্য NMT ডেকোডার মেমরি থেকে একটি যথাযথ বাক্য নির্বাচন করে তার বাক্য অনুবা না হলে এনএমটি ডেকোডার শব্দভাণ্ডার থেকে একটি শব্দ তৈরি করে যেমন জেনারেল এনএমটি ডেকোডার করে। চীনা থেকে ইংরেজি অনুবাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বিভিন্ন পরীক্ষা সেটে বেসাইলের ব্যাপারে গু', 'ca': "Phrases play an important role in natural language understanding and machine translation (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005).  No obstant això, és difícil integrar-los en la traducció actual de màquines neurals (NMT), que llegeix i genera frases paraula a paraula. En aquesta feina, proposem un mètode de traducció de frases en NMT integrant una frase de memòria que emmagatzema frases destinatàries d'un sistema de traducció de màquines estadístices basats en frases (SMT) a l'arquitectura del codificador-decodificador de NMT. En cada pas de decodificació, la memòria de frases es reescriu per primer cop pel model SMT, que dinàmicament genera frases d'objectiu rellevants amb informació contextual proporcionada pel model NMT. Llavors el model proposat llegeix la memòria de frases per fer estimacions de probabilitat de totes les frases de la memòria de frases. Si es produeix frases, el decodificador NMT selecciona una frase apropiada de la memòria per a fer traducció de frases i actualitza el seu estat de decodificació consumint les paraules de la frase seleccionada. Si no, el descodificador NMT genera una paraula del vocabulari com el descodificador general NMT. Els resultats d'experiments en la traducció xinesa a anglès mostran que el model proposat aconsegueix millores significatives en relació amb el basal en diversos grups de prova.", 'bs': 'Fraze imaju važnu ulogu u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika i prevodu strojeva (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Međutim, teško je da ih integrišemo u trenutni prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT), koji čita i proizvodi reč rečenica po riječi. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu prevode fraze u NMT integracijom fraze memorije čuvanja ciljnih fraza iz sustava prevoda statističkih mašin a (SMT) na frazi u arhitekturu kodera-dekodera NMT-a. Na svakom koraku za dekodiranje, sjećanje fraze je prvo ponovno napisano od modela SMT-a, koji dinamično stvara relevantne ciljne fraze sa kontekstualnim informacijama koje je pružio model NMT-a. Zatim predloženi model čita sećanje fraze kako bi procenila vjerojatnost za sve rečenice u sećanju fraze. Ako se nastavi generacija fraza, NMT dekoder odabere odgovarajuću frazu iz sjećanja da bi izvršio prevod fraza i aktualizirao svoj stav dekodiranja potrošeći riječi u odabranoj frazi. Inače, dekoder NMT proizvodi riječ iz rečnika kao i generalni dekoder NMT-a. Rezultati iskustva na kineskom prevodu na engleski jezik pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao značajne poboljšanje na početnoj liniji na različitim testovima.', 'ko': '짧은 말은 자연 언어의 이해와 기계 번역에 중요한 역할을 한다(Sag 등, 2002년, Villavicencio 등, 2005년).그러나 현재 한 글자씩 문장을 읽고 생성하는 신경기계번역(NMT)에 통합하기는 어렵다.이 작업에서 우리는 NMT에서 단어를 번역하는 방법을 제시했다. 방법은 단어를 바탕으로 하는 통계기계번역(SMT) 시스템의 목표 단어를 저장하는 단어 메모리를 NMT의 코딩기 체계 구조에 통합시키는 것이다.각 디코딩 단계에서 단어 기억은 먼저 SMT 모델에 의해 다시 쓰이고 SMT 모델은 NMT 모델이 제공하는 상하문 정보를 이용하여 관련 목표 단어를 동태적으로 생성한다.그리고 이 모델은 단어 기억을 읽고 단어 기억 속의 모든 단어를 확률적으로 추정한다.구문을 생성하는 경우 NMT 디코더는 스토리지에서 구문 번역을 수행하는 데 적합한 구문을 선택하고 선택한 구문의 단어를 사용하여 구문 디코딩 상태를 업데이트합니다.그렇지 않으면 NMT 디코더는 일반 NMT 디코더처럼 용어표에서 단어를 생성합니다.한영 번역에서의 실험 결과에 따르면 이 모델은 각종 테스트 집합에서 기선보다 현저하게 개선되었다.', 'cs': 'Věty hrají důležitou roli v porozumění přirozenému jazyce a strojovém překladu (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Je však obtížné je integrovat do současného neuronového strojového překladu (NMT), který čte a generuje věty slovo po slovu. V této práci navrhujeme metodu překladu frází v NMT integrací frázové paměti ukládající cílové fráze ze systému frázového statistického strojového překladu (SMT) do architektury kodéru-dekódu NMT. Při každém dekódování je paměť frází nejprve přepsána SMT modelem, který dynamicky generuje relevantní cílové fráze s kontextovými informacemi poskytovanými NMT modelem. Následně navržený model čte frázovou paměť a provede odhad pravděpodobnosti pro všechny fráze v frázové paměti. Pokud je generování fráze pokračováno, NMT dekodér vybere vhodnou frázi z paměti pro provedení překladu fráze a aktualizuje svůj dekódovací stav spotřebováním slov ve vybrané frázi. V opačném případě NMT dekodér generuje slovo ze slovní zásoby jako obecný NMT dekodér. Výsledky experimentů na čínsko-anglickém překladu ukazují, že navrhovaný model dosahuje významných zlepšení oproti základnímu principu u různých testovacích sad.', 'et': 'Väljendid mängivad olulist rolli looduskeele mõistmisel ja masintõlkel (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Siiski on neid raske integreerida praegusesse neuromasintõlkesse (NMT), mis loeb ja genereerib lauseid sõna-sõnalt. Käesolevas töös pakume välja meetodi fraaside tõlkimiseks NMT-s, integreerides fraasimälu, mis salvestab sihtfraase fraasipõhisest statistilisest masintõlke (SMT) süsteemist NMT kodeerija-dekooderi arhitektuuri. Igal dekodeerimise etapil kirjutatakse fraasimälu esmalt uuesti SMT mudeli abil, mis dünaamiliselt genereerib asjakohased sihtlaused NMT mudeli kontekstiteabe abil. Seejärel loeb väljapakutud mudel fraasimälu, et teha tõenäosuslikke hinnanguid kõigile fraasimälus olevatele fraasidele. Kui fraasi genereerimine jätkub, valib NMT dekooder mälust fraasi tõlkimiseks ja uuendab dekodeerimise olekut, tarbides valitud fraasi sõnu. Vastasel juhul genereerib NMT dekooder sõnavarast sõna nagu üldine NMT dekooder. Katsetulemused hiina-inglise keele tõlke kohta näitavad, et kavandatud mudel saavutab erinevate katsekomplektide puhul olulisi parandusi võrreldes lähtetasemega.', 'fi': 'Lauseilla on tärkeä rooli luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisessä ja konekäännöksessä (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Niitä on kuitenkin vaikea integroida nykyiseen neurokonekäännökseen (NMT), joka lukee ja luo lauseita sanalta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme menetelmää lauseiden kääntämiseen NMT:ssä integroimalla lausemuisti, joka tallentaa kohdelauseita lausepohjaisesta tilastollisesta konekäännösjärjestelmästä (SMT) NMT:n kooderi-dekooderiarkkitehtuuriin. Jokaisessa dekoodausvaiheessa fraasimuisti kirjoitetaan ensin uudelleen SMT-mallilla, joka luo dynaamisesti merkityksellisiä kohdelauseita NMT-mallin tarjoamalla asiayhteydellisellä tiedolla. Sitten ehdotettu malli lukee lausemuistin tehdäkseen todennäköisyysestimaatteja kaikille lausemuistin lauseille. Jos lauseen luontia jatketaan, NMT-dekooderi valitsee muistista sopivan lauseen lauseen kääntämiseen ja päivittää dekoodatustilan kuluttamalla valitun lauseen sanat. Muussa tapauksessa NMT-dekooderi luo sanastosta sanan kuten yleinen NMT-dekooderi. Kiinasta englanninkieliseen käännökseen tehtyjen kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli saavuttaa merkittäviä parannuksia lähtötilanteeseen verrattuna eri testisarjoissa.', 'jv': 'Wurung mengko cara-cara sing dikarepaké ning luwih dumadhi sak karo terjamahan sak butuhan (Sag et al, 2002an; Bijelanicencio et al, 2000an). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita supoyo nggawe yênêmên kanggo terjamaha kapan kanggo ngilangno nggunakake kapan kuwi kapan kanggo nggawe bukanêr terjamahan (SMT) sistem sing basa gambar na terjamahan karo NMT. Tenge UnknownMonitor vendor politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngubah wih-wih, dekorator NMT mbukake kelas kelas nang dikondasar NMT jenenge Menu item', 'ha': "@ action: button Ina ƙunci a haɗe su zuwa fassarar birnin neural da ke yanzu (NMT) wanda yana karatun kuma yana zaɓi magana da maganar. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani hanyoyi wa translate magana cikin NMT by integrated a memory na tsare maganar da ake yiwuwa daga wani fassarar-based statistical mashine translation (SMT) cikin the encoder-coder architecture of NMT. At each decoding step, the phrase memory is first re-written by the SMT model, which dynamically generates relevant target phrases with contextual information provided by the NMT model.  Sa'an nan da aka goyyade shi yana karanta kumbar magana zuwa ya sanya ƙidãya wa masu yiwuwa wa'anar gaske cikin kumbar maganar. Idan an ɗauki kizaɓen magana, NMT na zãɓe wata kalma mai daidai daga kumbar don ya cika fassarar magana kuma ya yanyanke halinsa na kodi da ya ci magana cikin magana wanda aka zãɓe. Idan ba haka ba, shirin NMT yana ƙara wata magana daga maganar, kamar yadda jama'ar NMT na koda. Matarin jarrabãwa na kan Tsandaya zuwa Ingiriya ya nuna cewa, shirin da aka buƙata, ya sami mafiya kyau a kanzu salin da aka sami tsarin jarraba daban-daban.", 'he': 'Phrases play an important role in natural language understanding and machine translation (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005).  עם זאת, קשה להשתלב אותם לתרגום המכונה העצבית הנוכחית (NMT) שקורא ומוצר משפטים מילה במילה. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים שיטה לתרגם ביטויים בני-אם-טי באמצעות השיקום ביטוי זיכרון שמחסן ביטויים מטרה מערכת התרגום של מכונות סטטיסטיות (SMT) מבוססת ביטויים לארכיטקטורת הקודר-קידור של אן-אם-טי. בכל צעד הפענוח, הזיכרון של המשפטים נכתב לראשונה מחדש על ידי מודל SMT, אשר מייצר דינמית משפטים מטרה רלוונטיים עם מידע קונטקטואלי שנספק על ידי מודל NMT. ואז המודל המוצע קורא את הזיכרון של המשפטים כדי לעשות הערכות סבירות לכל המשפטים בזיכרון המשפטים. אם יוצר ביטויים נמשך, מפענח NMT בוחר ביטוי מתאים מהזיכרון כדי לבצע תרגום ביטויים ומעדכן את מצבו של הפענוח על ידי השתמש במילים שבביטוי הנבחר. אחרת, מפענח NMT יוצר מילה מהמילים כפי שהמפענח הכללי NMT עושה. תוצאות הניסויים על התרגום הסיני לאנגלית מראות שהמודל המוצע משיג שיפורים משמעותיים על הבסיס על קבוצות מבחנים שונות.', 'sk': 'Fraze imajo pomembno vlogo pri razumevanju naravnega jezika in strojnem prevajanju (Sag et al., 2002; Villavicencio et al., 2005). Vendar jih je težko vključiti v trenutno nevronsko strojno prevajanje (NMT), ki bere in ustvarja stavke besedo za besedo. V tem delu predlagamo metodo prevajanja fraz v NMT z vključitvijo fraznega pomnilnika, ki shranjuje ciljne fraze iz fraznega sistema statističnega strojnega prevajanja (SMT) v kodirni-dekodirni arhitekturi NMT. V vsakem koraku dekodiranja se frazni pomnilnik najprej ponovno napiše s pomočjo modela SMT, ki dinamično ustvarja ustrezne ciljne fraze z kontekstualnimi informacijami, ki jih zagotavlja model NMT. Nato predlagani model prebere frazni pomnilnik, da naredi ocene verjetnosti za vse fraze v fraznem pomnilniku. Če se izvaja generiranje fraze, dekodirnik NMT izbere ustrezno frazo iz pomnilnika za izvedbo prevajanja fraze in posodobi stanje dekodiranja tako, da porabi besede v izbrani frazi. V nasprotnem primeru NMT dekoder ustvari besedo iz besedišča kot splošni NMT dekoder. Rezultati eksperimentov v kitajsko-angleškem prevodu kažejo, da predlagani model dosega znatne izboljšave glede na osnovno vrednost pri različnih skupinah preskusov.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཚིག་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གནོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་ཐ་སྙད་འདྲེན་ནང་ལ་བྱ་ཚུལ་གལ་ཆེན་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དེ་ཚོ་ད་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྟངས་པར་ད་ལྟོའི་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཅུག་པ་རེད། In this work, we propose a method to translate phrases in NMT by integrating a phrase memory storing target phrases from a phrase-based statistical machine translation (SMT) system into the encoder-decoder architecture of NMT. At each decoding step, the phrase memory is first re-written by the SMT model, which dynamically generates relevant target phrases with contextual information provided by the NMT model. དེ་ནས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔར་སྒྲིག་གིས་དྲན་འཛིན་གྱི་ཚིག་ཚན་ཡོངས་ལ་ཆོག་འཛིན་སྟོན་པ། If phrase generation is carried on, the NMT decoder selects an appropriate phrase from the memory to perform phrase translation and updates its decoding state by consuming the words in the selected phrase. Otherwise, the NMT decoder generates a word from the vocabulary as the general NMT decoder does. རྒྱ་ནག'}
{'en': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'ar': 'استكشاف هائل لهياكل الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'pt': 'Exploração massiva de arquiteturas de tradução automática neural', 'es': 'Exploración masiva de arquitecturas neuronales de traducción automática', 'fr': 'Exploration massive des architectures de traduction automatique neuronale', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳アーキテクチャの大規模な探求', 'ru': 'Массовое исследование архитектур нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Taiscéalaíocht Ollmhór ar Ailtirí Néar-Aistriúcháin Meaisín', 'zh': '大探神经机器翻译架构', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद आर्किटेक्चर के बड़े पैमाने पर अन्वेषण', 'el': 'Τεράστια εξερεύνηση των Αρχιτεκτόνων Νευρικής Μηχανικής Μετάφρασης', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქინის გადატყვების აქტიქტურების მასტივი გამოყენება', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару архитектураларының массовы зерттеу', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo architektūrų masinis tyrimas', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítási architektúrák nagymértékű feltárása', 'mk': 'Масивно истражување на архитектурите за преведување на невралните машини', 'it': 'Esplorazione massiccia delle architetture neurali di traduzione automatica', 'ms': 'Penjelasan Massif bagi Arkitektur Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mt': 'Esplorazzjoni Massiva tal-Arkitetturi tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машин хөгжүүлэх архитектуруудын шинэ судалгаа', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശോധന', 'pl': 'Masywne badania architektur neuronowych tłumaczeń maszynowych', 'no': 'Massiv utforsk av neuralmaskineomsetjingssarkitektur', 'ro': 'Explorarea masivă a arhitecturilor neuronale de traducere automată', 'so': 'Massive Exploration of Neural machine Translation Architectures', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන සංවිධානය', 'sr': 'Masivna istraživanja neuroloških mašinskih prevodnih arhitektura', 'sv': 'Massiv utforskning av neurala maskin√∂vers√§ttningsarkitekturer', 'ta': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ آرکیٹریس کی عمده تحقیق', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish uchun kattalashtirish', 'vi': 'Thăm dò sâu về cấu trúc cấu trúc về máy thần kinh', 'hr': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'nl': 'Enorme verkenning van neuronale machinevertaalarchitecturen', 'bg': 'Масивно изследване на архитектурите на невралния машинен превод', 'da': 'Massiv udforskning af neurale maskinoversættelsesarkitekturer', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 체계 구조의 대규모 탐색', 'de': 'Massive Erforschung neuronaler maschineller ├ťbersetzungsarchitekturen', 'fa': 'تحقیق عمومی از معمارهای ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'id': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'tr': 'Neural Maşynyň Çevirme Arapçysynyň Ýygymy', 'sw': 'Utafiti mkubwa wa Tafsiri za Mashine ya Njerumani', 'af': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'sq': 'Zbulimi masiv i arkitekturave të përkthimit të makinave nervore', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենաների թարգմանման արխեկտուրների զանգվածային ուսումնասիրությունը', 'bs': 'Masivna istraživanja neuroloških uređaja za prevod', 'ca': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'et': 'Massiivne neuroaalse masintõlke arhitektuuride uurimine', 'cs': 'Masivní průzkum neuronových strojových překladů architektur', 'az': 'Nöral mašin Çeviri Arhitektürlərinin Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ আর্কিটেক্টরের ব্যাপক এক্সপ্লোরেশন', 'fi': 'Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures', 'jv': 'Masibé Kembotasan karo Pak Manejer Arkturanan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Masivno raziskovanje arhitekture nevralnega strojnega prevajanja', 'he': 'חקירה מסיבית של ארכיטקטורות התרגום של מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation Architectures(Massive Exploration of Neural Machine Translation Architectures)ཡི་ཆེས་ཤིག་བྱས་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has shown remarkable progress over the past few years, with production systems now being deployed to end-users. As the field is moving rapidly, it has become unclear which elements of NMT architectures have a significant impact on translation quality. In this work, we present a large-scale analysis of the sensitivity of NMT architectures to common hyperparameters. We report empirical results and variance numbers for several hundred experimental runs, corresponding to over 250,000 GPU hours on a WMT English to German translation task. Our experiments provide practical insights into the relative importance of factors such as embedding size, network depth, RNN cell type, residual connections, attention mechanism, and decoding heuristics. As part of this contribution, we also release an open-source NMT framework in TensorFlow to make it easy for others to reproduce our results and perform their own experiments.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) a connu des progrès remarquables au cours des dernières années, les systèmes de production étant désormais déployés auprès des utilisateurs finaux. Au fur et à mesure que le domaine évolue rapidement, il est devenu difficile de savoir quels éléments des architectures NMT ont un impact significatif sur la qualité de la traduction. Dans ce travail, nous présentons une analyse à grande échelle de la sensibilité des architectures NMT aux hyperparamètres courants. Nous présentons des résultats empiriques et des nombres de variance pour plusieurs centaines d'essais expérimentaux, correspondant à plus de 250 000 heures GPU sur une tâche de traduction WMT anglais-allemand. Nos expériences fournissent des informations pratiques sur l'importance relative de facteurs tels que la taille de l'intégration, la profondeur du réseau, le type de cellule RNN, les connexions résiduelles, le mécanisme d'attention et les heuristiques de décodage. Dans le cadre de cette contribution, nous publions également un framework NMT open source dans TensorFlow afin de permettre aux autres de reproduire facilement nos résultats et de réaliser leurs propres expériences.", 'ar': 'أظهرت الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) تقدمًا ملحوظًا على مدار السنوات القليلة الماضية ، حيث يتم الآن نشر أنظمة الإنتاج للمستخدمين النهائيين. نظرًا لأن المجال يتحرك بسرعة ، فقد أصبح من غير الواضح أي عناصر من بنى NMT لها تأثير كبير على جودة الترجمة. في هذا العمل ، نقدم تحليلًا واسع النطاق لحساسية هياكل NMT للمعلمات الفائقة الشائعة. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن النتائج التجريبية وأرقام التباين لعدة مئات من العمليات التجريبية ، والتي تقابل أكثر من 250.000 ساعة من GPU في مهمة ترجمة WMT من الإنجليزية إلى الألمانية. توفر تجاربنا رؤى عملية حول الأهمية النسبية لعوامل مثل حجم التضمين ، وعمق الشبكة ، ونوع خلية RNN ، والوصلات المتبقية ، وآلية الانتباه ، واستدلال فك التشفير. كجزء من هذه المساهمة ، قمنا أيضًا بإصدار إطار عمل NMT مفتوح المصدر في TensorFlow ليسهل على الآخرين إعادة إنتاج نتائجنا وإجراء تجاربهم الخاصة.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal (NMT) ha mostrado un progreso notable en los últimos años, con sistemas de producción que ahora se están implementando para los usuarios finales. A medida que el campo avanza rápidamente, no está claro qué elementos de las arquitecturas NMT tienen un impacto significativo en la calidad de la traducción. En este trabajo, presentamos un análisis a gran escala de la sensibilidad de las arquitecturas NMT a los hiperparámetros comunes. Presentamos los resultados empíricos y los números de varianza de varios cientos de ejecuciones experimentales, lo que corresponde a más de 250 000 horas de GPU en una tarea de traducción del inglés al alemán del WMT. Nuestros experimentos proporcionan información práctica sobre la importancia relativa de factores como el tamaño de la incrustación, la profundidad de la red, el tipo de célula RNN, las conexiones residuales, el mecanismo de atención y la heurística de decodificación. Como parte de esta contribución, también publicamos un marco de NMT de código abierto en TensorFlow para facilitar que otros reproduzcan nuestros resultados y realicen sus propios experimentos.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural (NMT) mostrou um progresso notável nos últimos anos, com sistemas de produção agora sendo implantados para usuários finais. Como o campo está se movendo rapidamente, ficou claro quais elementos das arquiteturas NMT têm um impacto significativo na qualidade da tradução. Neste trabalho, apresentamos uma análise em larga escala da sensibilidade de arquiteturas NMT a hiperparâmetros comuns. Relatamos resultados empíricos e números de variação para várias centenas de execuções experimentais, correspondendo a mais de 250.000 horas de GPU em uma tarefa de tradução WMT de inglês para alemão. Nossos experimentos fornecem insights práticos sobre a importância relativa de fatores como tamanho de incorporação, profundidade da rede, tipo de célula RNN, conexões residuais, mecanismo de atenção e heurística de decodificação. Como parte dessa contribuição, também lançamos uma estrutura NMT de código aberto no TensorFlow para facilitar a reprodução de nossos resultados e a realização de seus próprios experimentos.', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）は過去数年間で顕著な進歩を見せ、現在では生産システムがエンドユーザーに展開されています。この分野が急速に進むにつれて、NMTアーキテクチャのどの要素が翻訳品質に大きな影響を与えるかが不明瞭になってきた。本研究では、一般的なハイパーパラメータに対するNMTアーキテクチャの感度の大規模な分析を提示する。私たちは、WMT英語からドイツ語への翻訳タスクで25万GPU時間以上に対応する、数百の実験実行の経験的結果と分散数を報告します。当社の実験は、埋め込みサイズ、ネットワークの深さ、RNNセルの種類、残留接続、注意メカニズム、デコードヒューリスティクスなどの要因の相対的な重要性に関する実用的な洞察を提供します。この貢献の一環として、私たちはTensorFlowでオープンソースのNMTフレームワークをリリースし、他の人が私たちの結果を簡単に再現し、独自の実験を実行できるようにします。', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) показал значительный прогресс за последние несколько лет, и в настоящее время производственные системы внедряются у конечных пользователей. По Мере Того Как поле движет быстро, стало неясно какие элементы архитектур NMT имеют значительно влияние на качество перевода. В данной работе представлен масштабный анализ чувствительности архитектур НМТ к общим гиперпараметрам. Мы сообщаем эмпирические результаты и дисперсионные числа для нескольких сотен экспериментальных прогонов, соответствующих более 250 000 часов работы GPU в задаче перевода с английского на немецкий язык WMT. Наши эксперименты обеспечивают практическое понимание относительной важности таких факторов, как размер встраивания, глубина сети, тип клетки RNN, остаточные соединения, механизм внимания и эвристика декодирования. Как часть этого вклада, мы также выпускаем открытый фреймворк NMT в TensorFlow для того чтобы облегчить для других воспроизвести наши результаты и выполнить их собственные эксперименты.', 'ga': "Tá dul chun cinn suntasach léirithe ag Neural Machine Translation (NMT) le blianta beaga anuas, agus córais táirgthe á n-imscaradh anois chuig úsáideoirí deiridh. Agus an réimse ag gluaiseacht go tapa, ní léir cé na gnéithe d'ailtireacht an NMT a bhfuil tionchar suntasach acu ar cháilíocht an aistriúcháin. San obair seo, cuirimid i láthair anailís ar scála mór ar íogaireacht ailtireachtaí NMT do hipearpharaiméadair choitianta. Tuairiscímid torthaí eimpíreacha agus uimhreacha athraithis do na céadta rith turgnamhach, a fhreagraíonn do níos mó ná 250,000 uair an chloig GPU ar thasc aistriúcháin WMT Béarla go Gearmáinis. Soláthraíonn ár dturgnaimh léargais phraiticiúla ar thábhacht choibhneasta fachtóirí cosúil le méid leabú, doimhneacht líonra, cineál cille RNN, naisc iarmharacha, meicníocht aird, agus heuristics díchódaithe. Mar chuid den ranníocaíocht seo, scaoilimid freisin creat foinse oscailte NMT in TensorFlow chun é a dhéanamh éasca do dhaoine eile ár dtorthaí a atáirgeadh agus a gcuid turgnaimh féin a dhéanamh.", 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)于往数年中得显进,产业系统现在部署到最终用户。 随其迅速,未详 NMT 架构元素所重译质。 于是臣等陈其对NMT架构大析参数敏感性。 臣等奏实验行数百方差,当WMT英语至德语翻译者GPU小时数过250,000少时。 实验嵌大小、网络深、RNN单元、残差接、注意、解码启发式素资实用之见。 为此一献,发TensorFlow一开源之NMT框架,使人得轻见而行其实验。', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) ने पिछले कुछ वर्षों में उल्लेखनीय प्रगति दिखाई है, जिसमें उत्पादन प्रणालियों को अब अंतिम उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए तैनात किया जा रहा है। जैसा कि क्षेत्र तेजी से आगे बढ़ रहा है, यह स्पष्ट नहीं हो गया है कि एनएमटी आर्किटेक्चर के किन तत्वों का अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रभाव पड़ता है। इस काम में, हम सामान्य हाइपरपैरामीटर के लिए एनएमटी आर्किटेक्चर की संवेदनशीलता का बड़े पैमाने पर विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम कई सौ प्रयोगात्मक रन के लिए अनुभवजन्य परिणामों और विचरण संख्याओं की रिपोर्ट करते हैं, जो एक डब्ल्यूएमटी अंग्रेजी से जर्मन अनुवाद कार्य पर 250,000 से अधिक जीपीयू घंटे के अनुरूप है। हमारे प्रयोगों इस तरह के एम्बेडिंग आकार, नेटवर्क गहराई, RNN सेल प्रकार, अवशिष्ट कनेक्शन, ध्यान तंत्र, और डिकोडिंग heuristics के रूप में कारकों के सापेक्ष महत्व में व्यावहारिक अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं। इस योगदान के हिस्से के रूप में, हम टेंसरफ्लो में एक ओपन-सोर्स एनएमटी फ्रेमवर्क भी जारी करते हैं ताकि दूसरों के लिए हमारे परिणामों को पुन: पेश करना और अपने स्वयं के प्रयोगों को करना आसान हो सके।', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგუმარება როდესაც საფუძო ძალიან ძალიან მოძრაობს, ეს უცნობი იყო, რომელიც NMT აქტიქტიქტურების ელემენტები აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი შესახებ გადაწყვეტილების ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ NMT არქტიქტურების სიგრძნელობის დიდი მაგალითი ანალიზაციას ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ საერთო ჰიპერ პარა ჩვენ ამოთრიკალური წარმოდგენები და გარიანსი რიცხვები რამდენიმე ასე ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენებისთვის, რომლებიც უფრო 250 000 GPU საათზე WMT ინგლისური გერმანეთის ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები პრაქტიკური შესახებ ფაქტორის პარატიური მნიშვნელობას, როგორც ჩვენებული ზომი, ქსელი სიგრძნობა, RNN კოლექტის ტიპი, დასრულებული კავშირები, დაახლოების როგორც ამ დამატების ნაწილი, ჩვენ ასევე განხორციელი NMT ფრამეტრი TensorFlow-ში გამოყენებთ, რომ სხვებისთვის მარტივი გავაკეთოთ ჩვენი შედეგი და გავაკეთოთ სხვა ექსპერიმენტე', 'hu': 'A Neural Machine Translation (NMT) az elmúlt néhány évben figyelemreméltó előrelépést mutatott, a gyártási rendszerek most a végfelhasználók számára telepítésre kerülnek. Mivel a terület gyorsan halad, egyértelművé vált, hogy az NMT architektúrák mely elemei vannak jelentős hatással a fordítási minőségre. Ebben a munkában az NMT architektúrák közös hiperparaméterekre való érzékenységének nagyszabású elemzését mutatjuk be. empirikus eredményeket és variancia számokat jelentünk több száz kísérleti futás esetén, ami több mint 250 000 GPU órának felel meg egy WMT angol-német fordítási feladat során. Kísérleteink gyakorlati betekintést nyújtanak az olyan tényezők relatív fontosságába, mint a beágyazási méret, a hálózatmélység, az RNN sejttípus, a maradék kapcsolatok, a figyelem mechanizmusa és a heurisztika dekódolása. Ennek a hozzájárulásnak a részeként egy nyílt forráskódú NMT keretrendszert is kiadunk a TensorFlow-ban, amely megkönnyíti mások számára az eredményeink reprodukálását és saját kísérleteik elvégzését.', 'el': 'Η Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT) έχει σημειώσει αξιοσημείωτη πρόοδο τα τελευταία χρόνια, με τα συστήματα παραγωγής να αναπτύσσονται τώρα στους τελικούς χρήστες. Καθώς ο τομέας κινείται γρήγορα, δεν είναι σαφές ποια στοιχεία των αρχιτεκτονικών έχουν σημαντικό αντίκτυπο στην ποιότητα της μετάφρασης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια μεγάλης κλίμακας ανάλυση της ευαισθησίας των αρχιτεκτονικών σε κοινές υπερπαραμέτρους. Αναφέρουμε εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα και αριθμούς διακύμανσης για αρκετές εκατοντάδες πειραματικές εκτελέσεις, που αντιστοιχούν σε πάνω από 250.000 ώρες σε μια εργασία μετάφρασης Αγγλικά σε Γερμανικά. Τα πειράματά μας παρέχουν πρακτικές γνώσεις σχετικά με τη σχετική σημασία παραγόντων όπως το μέγεθος ενσωμάτωσης, το βάθος δικτύου, ο τύπος κυττάρων υπολειμματικών συνδέσεων, ο μηχανισμός προσοχής και η heuristics αποκωδικοποίησης. Ως μέρος αυτής της συνεισφοράς, απελευθερώνουμε επίσης ένα πλαίσιο ανοικτού κώδικα στο TensorFlow για να διευκολύνουμε άλλους να αναπαράγουν τα αποτελέσματά μας και να εκτελέσουν τα δικά τους πειράματα.', 'it': "Neural Machine Translation (NMT) ha registrato notevoli progressi negli ultimi anni, con sistemi di produzione ora distribuiti agli utenti finali. Poiché il settore si sta muovendo rapidamente, non è chiaro quali elementi delle architetture NMT abbiano un impatto significativo sulla qualità della traduzione. In questo lavoro, presentiamo un'analisi su larga scala della sensibilità delle architetture NMT agli iperparametri comuni. Riportiamo risultati empirici e numeri di varianza per diverse centinaia di esecuzioni sperimentali, corrispondenti a oltre 250.000 ore GPU su un compito di traduzione WMT dall'inglese al tedesco. I nostri esperimenti forniscono informazioni pratiche sull'importanza relativa di fattori come dimensione di incorporamento, profondità della rete, tipo di cella RNN, connessioni residue, meccanismo di attenzione e decodifica euristica. Come parte di questo contributo, pubblichiamo anche un framework NMT open source in TensorFlow per rendere facile per altri riprodurre i nostri risultati e eseguire i propri esperimenti.", 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius kelerius metus neuroninių mašinų vertimas (NMT) parodė pastebimą pažangą, o gamybos sistemos dabar diegiamos galutiniams vartotojams. Kadangi sritis sparčiai juda, tapo neaišku, kurie NMT architektūros elementai turi didelį poveikį vertimo kokybei. Šiame darbe pateikiama plataus masto NMT architektūrų jautrumo bendriems hiperparatoriams analizė. Mes pranešame apie empirinius rezultatus ir variantų numerius keliems šimtams eksperimentinių rundų, atitinkančių daugiau kaip 250 000 GPU valandų WMT anglų ir vokiečių vertimo užduotyse. Mūsų eksperimentai praktiškai supranta santykinę veiksnių svarbą, pavyzdžiui, įterpimo dydį, tinklo gylį, RNN ląstelių tipą, likutines jungtis, dėmesio mechanizmą ir heuristiką. Šiame įnaše TensorFlow taip pat išleidžiame atviro kodo NMT sistemą, kad kiti galėtų lengviau atkurti savo rezultatus ir atlikti savo eksperimentus.', 'ms': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has shown remarkable progress over the past few years, with production systems now being deployed to end-users.  Semasa medan bergerak dengan cepat, ia telah menjadi tidak jelas mana unsur arkitektur NMT mempunyai kesan yang signifikan pada kualiti terjemahan. Dalam kerja ini, kami mempersembahkan analisis skala besar sensitiviti arkitektur NMT kepada hyperparameter umum. Kami laporkan hasil empirik dan nombor variasi untuk beberapa ratus percubaan, yang sepadan dengan lebih dari 250,000 jam GPU dalam tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggeris WMT ke Jerman. Eksperimen kami memberikan pengetahuan praktik tentang penting relatif faktor seperti saiz penyembedding, kedalaman rangkaian, jenis sel RNN, sambungan sisa, mekanisme perhatian, dan penyahkodan heuristik. Sebahagian daripada kontribusi ini, kami juga melepaskan kerangka NMT sumber terbuka di TensorFlow untuk memudahkan bagi orang lain untuk mereproduksi hasil kami dan melakukan eksperimen mereka sendiri.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасы (NMT) соңғы бірнеше жылдар бойы өзгертілген жағдай көрсетілді, жасау жүйелері енді соңғы пайдаланушыларға аударылады. Өріс жылдам жылжытып тұрғанда, NMT архитектураларының қай элементтері аудармалардың сапасына маңызды нәтижесі бар екенін білмейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, NMT архитектураларының көпшілігін жалпы гиперпараметрлерге шектелген үлкен масштабын анализ береміз. Біз WMT ағылшын тілінде неміс аудармалардың тапсырмасына сәйкес 250 000 GPU сағаттарына сәйкес келетін жүзеге тәжірибе жұмысының империялық нәтижелерін және түрлендір Біздің тәжірибеміздің көлемі, желік тереңдігі, RNN ұяшықтарының түрі, қалдық қосылымдарды, назардағы механизмі және геуристиканы декодтамасыз секілді факторлардың салыстырмалы маңыздығын көр Бұл қатынастың бір бөлігі ретінде, сондай-ақ TensorFlow дегенде ашық көзінің NMT бағдарламасын басқаларға нәтижелерімізді жасау және өзінің тәжірибелерін жасау үшін оңай болы', 'mk': 'Неуралната машинска транслекција (НМТ) покажа извонреден напредок во текот на изминатите неколку години, при што производствените системи сега се распоредуваат за крајните корисници. Како што полето брзо се движи, стана нејасно кои елементи на архитектурите на НМТ имаат значително влијание врз квалитетот на превод. Во оваа работа, претставуваме голема анализа на чувствителноста на архитектурите на НМТ на заедничките хиперпараметри. Ние известуваме емпириски резултати и броеви на варијанци за неколку стотици експериментални процеси, кои одговараат на над 250.000 ГПУ часови на WMT англиски на германски превод задача. Нашите експерименти обезбедуваат практични сфаќања за релативната важност на факторите како што се големината на вградувањето, длабочината на мрежата, типот на РНН клетки, резултатите на врските, механизмот на внимание и декодирањето на хеори Како дел од овој придонес, исто така објавуваме отворена рамка за НМТ во ТенсорФлоу за да им олесниме на другите да ги репродуктираат нашите резултати и да ги извршат своите експерименти.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ കുറച്ചു വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം അവസാന ഉപയോക ഫീല്\u200dഡ് വേഗത്തില്\u200d നീങ്ങുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, NMT ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകളുടെ മൂലകങ്ങള്\u200d ഏത് പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നു ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d NMT ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറുകളുടെ സ്വാഭാവത്തിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ അന്വേഷണം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. നൂറു പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള ഫലങ്ങളും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. വിഎംടി ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ഒരു ജെര നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാകൃതികമായ കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്നു. വലിപ്പം, നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കിന്റെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d, RNN സെല ഈ ഭാഗത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ടെന്\u200dസോര്\u200dഫ്രെയില്\u200d തുറന്ന NMT ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് വിടുന്നു. മറ്റുള്ളവര്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പുനര്\u200dത്', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) wykazało znaczące postępy w ciągu ostatnich kilku lat, a systemy produkcyjne są obecnie wdrażane u użytkowników końcowych. Ponieważ dziedzina ta rozwija się szybko, stało się niejasne, które elementy architektur NMT mają istotny wpływ na jakość tłumaczeń. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy szeroko zakrojoną analizę wrażliwości architektur NMT na powszechne hiperparametry. Raportujemy wyniki empiryczne i liczby wariancji dla kilkuset przebiegów eksperymentalnych, odpowiadające ponad 250.000 godzin GPU na zadaniu tłumaczenia WMT z języka angielskiego na niemiecki. Nasze eksperymenty dostarczają praktycznych wglądów na względne znaczenie czynników takich jak wielkość osadzenia, głębokość sieci, typ komórek RNN, połączenia resztkowe, mechanizm uwagi i heurystyka dekodowania. W ramach tego wkładu udostępniamy również open-source framework NMT w TensorFlow, aby ułatwić innym odtwarzanie naszych wyników i przeprowadzanie własnych eksperymentów.', 'mt': "Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has shown remarkable progress over the past few years, with production systems now being deployed to end-users.  Hekk kif il-qasam qed jiċċara malajr, sar mhux ċar liema elementi tal-arkitetturi NMT għandhom impatt sinifikanti fuq il-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nippreżentaw analiżi fuq skala kbira tas-sensittività tal-arkitetturi NMT għal parametri għoljin komuni. Aħna nirrappurtaw riżultati empiriċi u numri ta' varjanza għal diversi mijiet ta' runs sperimentali, li jikkorrispondu għal aktar minn 250,000 siegħa GPU fuq kompitu ta' traduzzjoni bl-Ingliż għall-Ġermaniż tal-WMT. L-esperimenti tagħna jipprovdu fehmiet prattiċi dwar l-importanza relattiva ta’ fatturi bħad-daqs tal-inkorporazzjoni, il-fond tan-netwerk, it-tip ta’ ċelluli RNN, il-konnessjonijiet residwi, il-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni, u d-dekodifikazzjoni tal-ġewristiċi. Bħala parti minn din il-kontribuzzjoni, nirrilaxxaw ukoll qafas ta’ NMT open-source f’TensorFlow biex jagħmilha faċli għal oħrajn li jirriproduċu r-riżultati tagħna u jwettqu l-esperimenti tagħhom stess.", 'ro': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) a înregistrat progrese remarcabile în ultimii ani, sistemele de producție fiind acum implementate utilizatorilor finali. Pe măsură ce domeniul se mișcă rapid, a devenit neclar care elemente ale arhitecturilor NMT au un impact semnificativ asupra calității traducerii. În această lucrare, prezentăm o analiză la scară largă a sensibilității arhitecturilor NMT la hiperparametrii comuni. Raportăm rezultate empirice și numere de variație pentru câteva sute de execuții experimentale, corespunzând la peste 250.000 de ore GPU pe o sarcină de traducere WMT din engleză în germană. Experimentele noastre oferă perspective practice asupra importanței relative a factorilor precum dimensiunea încorporării, adâncimea rețelei, tipul celulei RNN, conexiunile reziduale, mecanismul de atenție și decodarea euristică. Ca parte a acestei contribuții, lansăm, de asemenea, un cadru NMT open-source în TensorFlow pentru a face mai ușor pentru alții să reproducă rezultatele noastre și să efectueze propriile experimente.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хэдэн жилийн турш мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) нь гайхалтай хөгжлийг харуулсан. Ингээд бүтээлч системүүд эцсийн хэрэглэгчид ашиглаж байна. Зөвхөн хурдан хөдөлж байгаад NMT архитектуруудын элементүүд орчуулах чанарын тулд чухал нөлөө үзүүлэх нь тодорхой болсон. Энэ ажил дээр бид NMT архитектурын чухал мэдрэмжтэй байдлыг нийтлэг гиперпараметр руу шинжилгээ үзүүлнэ. Бид хэдэн зуун туршилтын туршилтын үр дүнг болон өөрчлөлт тоонуудыг WMT Англи хэл дээр Германы орчуулах ажлын тухай 250,000 GPU цаг илүү харьцуулдаг. Бидний туршилтууд нь хэмжээ, сүлжээний depth, RNN эсийн төрлийн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой, анхаарлын механизм болон хюристикийг шилжүүлэх мэт хүчин зүйлүүдийн харьцаатай чухал ач холбоотой байдаг. Үүний нэг хэсэг болгон, бид TensorFlow-д нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй NMT-ийн системийг ашиглаж бусдад үр дүнг үржүүлж өөрсдийн туршилтыг хийх нь амархан болгоно.', 'no': '@ info Etter at feltet flyttar raskt, har det blitt uventa kva element av NMT-arkitekturar har ein signifikant effekt på omsetjingskvalitet. I denne arbeiden presenterer vi ein stor analyse av følsomhet til NMT-arkitekturar til felles hyperparametrar. Vi rapporterer empiriske resultat og variansnummer for fleire hundre eksperimentale køyr, som tilsvarar over 250 000 GPU timar på eit WMT-engelsk til tysk oversettelsesoppgåve. Eksperimentane våre gjev praktiske innsyningar i den relative viktigheten til faktoren som innebygging av storleik, nettverksdybde, RNN-celletype, residuale tilkoplingar, oppmerksmekanismen og dekodering av hekuristikk. Som del av denne bidraga, så lager vi også ein open-source NMT-rammeverk i TensorFlow for å gjera det lett for andre å reprodusera resultatet våre og utføra sine eige eksperimenter.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු කීපයක් පස්සේ නිර්මාණ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය (NMT) පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරභාවය පෙන්වන්නේ, දැන ක්ෂේත්\u200dරය ඉක්මනින් වෙලාවට ගියොත්, ඒක නිර්දේශ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ NMT ස්තූතිපත්තියේ අයිතිපත්තියේ ක මේ වැඩේදී, අපි NMT සංවේදනය ගැන ලොකු විශාල විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වනවා සමාන්\u200dය හායිපර් ප්\u200dරමාණයකට. අපි පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ වෙනස් අංකයක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා පැ අපේ පරීක්ෂණාවල් ප්\u200dරායෝජික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ජාලය ගොඩක්, RNN කෝල වර මේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ කොටසක් විදිහට, අපි ටෙන්සෝර් ෆ්ලෝව් වලින් විවෘත්ත NMT ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'sr': 'Neuralni prevod mašine (NMT) pokazao je izuzetan napredak u proteklih nekoliko godina, a proizvodnji sistemi se sada raspoređuju krajnjim korisnicima. Pošto se polje brzo kreće, postalo je jasno koje elemente arhitekture NMT-a imaju značajan uticaj na kvalitet prevođenja. U ovom poslu predstavljamo veliku analizu osjetljivosti NMT arhitekture na zajedničke hiperparametre. Prijavljujemo empiričke rezultate i brojeve varijansa za nekoliko stotina eksperimentalnih trčanja, odgovarajući preko 250.000 GPU sati na zadatku WMT Engleskog za njemački prevod. Naši eksperimenti pružaju praktične uvide o relativnoj važnosti faktora kao što su uključivanje veličine, dubine mreže, tip RNN ćelija, ostatke veza, mehanizam pažnje i dekodiranje heuristike. Kao deo ovog doprinosa, takođe oslobodimo okvir otvorenog izvora NMT u TensorFlow kako bi bilo lako drugima da reprodukuju naše rezultate i izvedemo svoje eksperimente.', 'so': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has shown remarkable progress over the past few years, with production systems now being deployed to end-users.  Markii duurku si degdeg ah u dhaqdhaqaaqsado, waxay u muuqatay mid ka mid ah dhismaha NMT ay saameyn weyn ku leedahay qiimaha turjumista. Shaqadan waxaynu keenaynaa baaritaanka aad u weyn ee jaamacadaha dhismaha NMT ee u dhexeeya heerarka caadiga ah. Jarmalka waxaa looga soo diraa tiro boqol oo baaritaanka jirrabka ah oo u eg 250,000 GPU saacadood oo ku qoran WMT Ingiriis-da Jarmalka. Imtixaanadayada waxay ka muuqataa waxyaabaha muhiimka ah ee la xiriira sida cajiibka, moolka shabakadda, nooca xafiiska RNN, xiriirka hadhay, waxyaabaha kaleemeysiga ah iyo habaarka koritaanka. Qayb ka mid ah qasabkaas, waxaynu sidoo kale ka bixinnaa qashin furan oo ay ka fududaato TensorFlow, si ay kuwa kale ugu fududeeyaan inay soo celiyaan matooyinkeenna oo ay sameynaan jirrabadooda.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) கடந்த சில ஆண்டுகளில் முன்னேற்றம் காட்டியுள்ளது, பொருள் அமைப்புகள் தற்போது முடிவு பயனர்கள புலம் விரைவில் நகரும் போது, NMT அமைப்புகளின் உறுப்புகள் எந்த மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரம் மீது முக்கியமான பாதிப்பு உள்ளது என்பது  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் NMT அட்டவணைகளின் உணர்வுப் பெரிய அளவு ஆராய்ச்சியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். நாம் விரைவான முடிவுகள் மற்றும் மாறுபாடு எண்களை அறிவிக்கிறோம் பல நூறு சோதனை இயக்கிகளுக்கு, அது 250,000 ஜிபியு மணி நேரத்திற்கு ஒப் எங்கள் சோதனைகள் உள்ளிடப்பட்ட அளவு, வலைப்பின்னல் ஆழம், RNN செல்லு வகை, மீதி இணைப்பு இந்த பங்கீட்டின் பகுதியாக, நாம் டென்சோர்ப்லூவில் ஒரு திறந்த NMT சட்டத்தை வெளியிடுகிறோம். மற்றவர்கள் எங்கள் முடிவுகளை மீட்டு', 'sv': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) har visat anmärkningsvärda framsteg under de senaste åren, med produktionssystem som nu distribueras till slutanvändare. I takt med att fältet rör sig snabbt har det blivit oklart vilka delar av NMT-arkitekturerna som har en betydande inverkan på översättningskvaliteten. I detta arbete presenterar vi en storskalig analys av NMT-arkitekturers känslighet för vanliga hyperparametrar. Vi rapporterar empiriska resultat och variansnummer för flera hundra experimentella körningar, motsvarande över 250 000 GPU-timmar på en WMT engelsk till tysk översättningsuppgift. Våra experiment ger praktiska insikter i den relativa betydelsen av faktorer som inbäddningsstorlek, nätverksdjup, RNN-celltyp, kvarvarande anslutningar, uppmärksamhetsmekanism och avkodning av heuristik. Som en del av detta bidrag släpper vi också ett open source NMT-ramverk i TensorFlow för att göra det enkelt för andra att reproducera våra resultat och utföra sina egna experiment.', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) اگلوں کے چند سالوں میں بہت اچھی پیشرفت دکھائی گئی ہے، حالانکہ پیدائش سیستموں کے ساتھ اخری کارساز کے لئے فائدہ اٹھائے جاتے ہیں۔ جبکہ کھیتی سریع چلتی ہے، یہ غیر معلوم ہوگیا ہے کہ NMT معماری کی عناصر کس چیز کی ترجمہ کیفیت پر اہم اثر رکھتی ہیں۔ اس کام میں ہم نے NMT معماروں کی حساسيت کا ایک بڑا مقدار تحلیل پیش کیا ہے۔ ہم ایک WMT انگلیسی کے ذریعے چند سو آزمائش رونٹوں کے لئے امپراتیک نتیجے اور متفاوت نمبر گزارتے ہیں، جو جرمن کی ترجمہ کا کام پر 250,000 جی پی یو گھنٹوں سے زیادہ متفاوت ہے. ہماری آزمائش نے فاکتوروں کی نسبت اہم اثر کی تدبیر کی ہے جیسے انڈیڈنگ سائز، نیٹ ورک depth، RNN سلل کی طرح، باقی رہنے والی اتصال، توجه مکانیسم، اور ہوریستیک ڈیکوڈ کرنے والی. اس حصہ کے حصے میں ہم نے TensorFlow میں ایک کھلے سورج NMT فرم کو بھی آزاد کردیا ہے کہ دوسروں کے لئے ہمارے نتیجے دوبارہ پیدا کریں اور اپنی آزمائش کریں۔', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu ishda, biz NMT maktablarining juda katta aniqligini o'rganamiz, umumiy hyperparametrlar uchun. Biz bir necha necha tajriba ishlab chiqarish natijalari va variance raqamlarini ruxsat beramiz. WMT ingliz tilidan Olmoncha tarjima qilish vazifasi bilan 250,000 dan ortiq GPU soatlariga qisqaraydi. Bizning tajribalarimiz esa o'zgarishning oʻlchami, tarmoq uzunasi, RNN cell turi, resida bogʻlanish, muhimi mechanisiyasi va heuritiklarni ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu qanday paydo bo'lgan qismda, biz TensorFlow'da ochiq narsa NMT freymini chiqaramiz va boshqalarning natijalarimizni qaytadan qaytadan bajarishga oson qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Phiên dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) đã diễn ra một tiến bộ đáng chú ý trong vài năm qua, nhờ đó hệ thống sản xuất đã được áp dụng cho người dùng. Khi trường vận chuyển rất nhanh, không rõ các nguyên tố cấu trúc NMT có ảnh hưởng lớn đến chất lượng dịch. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đưa ra một bài phân tích quy mô lớn về sự nhạy cảm của các kiến trúc NMT với các siêu đẳng phổ biến. Chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả thực tế và số lượng variance của vài trăm lần thử nghiệm, tương ứng với hơn 250,000 GPU giờ trên một WM English với dịch vụ Đức. Các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cung cấp hiểu biết về tầm quan trọng tương đối của các yếu tố như sự nhúng vào kích thước, độ sâu mạng, kiểu tế bào RNN, các kết nối còn lại, cơ chế chú ý, và giải mã thần kinh. Trong phần đóng góp này, chúng tôi cũng phát hành một hệ thống NMT nguồn mở trong TenthFlow để cho những người khác dễ dàng mô phỏng kết quả và thực hiện thí nghiệm riêng.', 'da': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) har vist bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt i løbet af de seneste par år, og produktionssystemer er nu blevet implementeret til slutbrugerne. Efterhånden som feltet bevæger sig hurtigt, er det blevet uklart, hvilke elementer af NMT-arkitekturer der har en betydelig indflydelse på oversættelseskvaliteten. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en omfattende analyse af NMT-arkitekturers følsomhed over for almindelige hyperparametre. Vi rapporterer empiriske resultater og varianstal for flere hundrede eksperimentelle kørsler, svarende til over 250.000 GPU timer på en WMT engelsk til tysk oversættelsesopgave. Vores eksperimenter giver praktisk indsigt i den relative betydning af faktorer som indlejringsstørrelse, netværksdybde, RNN-celletype, restforbindelser, opmærksomhedsmekanisme og dekodering heuristik. Som en del af dette bidrag frigiver vi også en open source NMT framework i TensorFlow for at gøre det nemt for andre at gengive vores resultater og udføre deres egne eksperimenter.', 'bg': 'Невровият машинен превод (НМТ) показа забележителен напредък през последните няколко години, като производствените системи сега се използват за крайните потребители. Тъй като областта се движи бързо, стана неясно кои елементи на архитектурите имат значително въздействие върху качеството на превода. В тази работа представяме мащабен анализ на чувствителността на архитектурите на НМТ към общи хиперпараметри. Докладваме емпирични резултати и числа на вариациите за няколко стотин експериментални проби, съответстващи на над 250 000 GPU часа на задача за превод от английски на немски език. Нашите експерименти предоставят практическа представа за относителната важност на фактори като размер на вграждането, дълбочина на мрежата, тип клетка, остатъчни връзки, механизъм на вниманието и декодираща евристика. Като част от този принос ние също така пускаме рамка с отворен код в ТенсорFlow, за да улесним другите да възпроизвеждат нашите резултати и да извършват свои собствени експерименти.', 'hr': 'Neuralni prevod strojeva (NMT) pokazao je izuzetan napredak u proteklih nekoliko godina, a proizvodnji sustavi se sada raspoređuju krajnjim korisnicima. Pošto se polje brzo kreće, postalo je jasno koje elemente arhitekture NMT-a imaju značajan utjecaj na kvalitet prevoda. U ovom poslu predstavljamo veliku analizu osjetljivosti NMT arhitekture na zajedničke hiperparametre. Prijavljujemo empiričke rezultate i brojeve varijansa za nekoliko stotina eksperimentalnih trčanja, odgovarajući preko 250.000 GPU sati na zadatku WMT Engleskog za njemački prevod. Naši eksperimenti pružaju praktične uvide o relativnoj važnosti faktora poput uključenja veličine, dubine mreže, tip RNN ćelija, ostatke veze, mehanizam pažnje i dekodiranja heuristike. Kao dio ovog doprinosa, također ćemo osloboditi okvir otvorenog izvora NMT u TensorFlow kako bi bilo lako drugima reprodukirati naše rezultate i izvršiti svoj vlastiti eksperiment.', 'id': 'Perjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) telah menunjukkan kemajuan yang luar biasa selama beberapa tahun terakhir, dengan sistem produksi kini disediakan untuk pengguna akhir. Karena lapangan bergerak dengan cepat, sudah menjadi tidak jelas elemen mana arsitektur NMT memiliki dampak yang signifikan pada kualitas terjemahan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan analisis skala besar dari sensitivitas arsitektur NMT kepada hyperparameter umum. Kami melaporkan hasil empiris dan angka variasi untuk beberapa ratus percobaan, yang cocok dengan lebih dari 250.000 jam GPU dalam tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggris WMT ke Jerman. Eksperimen kami menyediakan pengetahuan praktis tentang penting relatif faktor seperti ukuran embedding, kedalaman jaringan, jenis sel RNN, koneksi residual, mekanisme perhatian, dan dekodifikasi heuristik. Sebagai bagian dari kontribusi ini, kami juga melepaskan rangkaian NMT sumber terbuka di TensorFlow untuk membuat hal lain mudah untuk mereproduksi hasil kami dan melakukan percobaan mereka sendiri.', 'de': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) hat in den letzten Jahren bemerkenswerte Fortschritte gezeigt, wobei Produktionssysteme nun auch für Endanwender eingesetzt werden. Da sich das Feld rasant bewegt, ist unklar geworden, welche Elemente von NMT-Architekturen einen wesentlichen Einfluss auf die Übersetzungsqualität haben. In dieser Arbeit präsentieren wir eine groß angelegte Analyse der Sensitivität von NMT-Architekturen auf gängige Hyperparameter. Wir berichten empirische Ergebnisse und Varianzzahlen für mehrere hundert Versuchslaufläufe, die über 250.000 GPU Stunden auf einer WMT Englisch-Deutsch Übersetzungsaufgabe entsprechen. Unsere Experimente liefern praktische Einblicke in die relative Bedeutung von Faktoren wie Einbettungsgröße, Netzwerktiefe, RNN-Zelltyp, Restverbindungen, Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus und Dekodierheuristik. Als Teil dieses Beitrags veröffentlichen wir auch ein Open-Source-NMT-Framework in TensorFlow, um es anderen zu erleichtern, unsere Ergebnisse zu reproduzieren und ihre eigenen Experimente durchzuführen.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)은 지난 몇 년 동안 현저한 발전을 이루었고 생산 시스템은 현재 단말기 사용자에게 배치되었다.이 분야가 급속히 발전함에 따라 NMT 체계 구조의 어떤 요소가 번역의 질에 중대한 영향을 미치는지는 이미 명확하지 않게 되었다.이 작업에서 우리는 NMT 체계 구조가 흔히 볼 수 있는 초파라미터에 대한 민감성을 대규모로 분석했다.우리는 수백 차례의 실험 운행 경험과 방차수를 보고했는데, 이는 WMT 영어에서 독일어 번역 임무까지의 250000시간의 GPU 시간과 맞먹는다.우리의 실험은 삽입 크기, 네트워크 깊이, RNN 세포 유형, 잉여 연결, 주의 메커니즘과 디코딩 계발 등 요소의 상대적인 중요성에 대한 실용적인 견해를 제공했다.이 공헌의 일부로서, 우리는 다른 사람들이 우리의 결과를 복제하고 자신들의 실험을 수행할 수 있도록 TensorFlow에 기원된 NMT 프레임워크를 발표했다.', 'nl': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) heeft de afgelopen jaren opmerkelijke vooruitgang geboekt, waarbij productiesystemen nu worden ingezet bij eindgebruikers. Naarmate het veld zich snel beweegt, is het onduidelijk geworden welke elementen van NMT architecturen een significante impact hebben op de vertaalkwaliteit. In dit werk presenteren we een grootschalige analyse van de gevoeligheid van NMT-architecturen voor veelvoorkomende hyperparameters. We rapporteren empirische resultaten en variatieaantallen voor enkele honderden experimentele runs, overeenkomend met meer dan 250.000 GPU uren op een WMT Engels naar Duits vertaaltaak. Onze experimenten geven praktische inzichten in het relatieve belang van factoren zoals inbedding grootte, netwerkdiepte, RNN celtype, restverbindingen, aandachtsmechanisme en decodering heuristiek. Als onderdeel van deze bijdrage brengen we ook een open-source NMT framework uit in TensorFlow om het voor anderen gemakkelijk te maken onze resultaten te reproduceren en hun eigen experimenten uit te voeren.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) در چند سال گذشته پیشرفت معرفی را نشان داده است، با سیستم\u200cهای تولید که در حال حاضر به کاربر پایان تغییر می\u200cشوند. در حالی که زمینه سریع حرکت می\u200cکند، مشخص شده است که کدام عناصر معماری NMT تاثیر بزرگی بر کیفیت ترجمه دارد. در این کار، ما یک تحلیل مقیاس بزرگی از حساسیت معماری NMT را به پارامترهای مشترک نشان می دهیم. ما نتیجه\u200cهای امپراتیک و شماره\u200cهای تغییرات را برای چند صد جریان آزمایشی گزارش می\u200cدهیم که با بیش از ۲۵۰۰۰ ساعت GPU در یک عملیات ترجمه آلمانی WMT به انگلیسی مترجم شده است. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در مورد اهمیت نسبت نسبت به عنوان اندازه\u200cگیری، عمیق شبکه، نوع سلول RNN، ارتباطات باقی مانده، مکانیسم توجه، و دکوندن هوریستیک را می\u200cدهند. به عنوان بخشی از این شرکت، ما همچنین یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT) imeonyesha maendeleo mazuri katika miaka michache iliyopita, na mifumo ya uzalishaji sasa imetumiwa kwa watumiaji wa mwisho. Wakati uwanja unaendelea kwa haraka, umekuwa wazi ni vipi vikuu vya majengo ya NMT vina athari kubwa kwa ubora wa tafsiri. Katika kazi hii, tunaweka uchambuzi mkubwa wa ufahamu wa majengo ya NMT kwa kipimo cha jumla. Tunatoa taarifa za matokeo na idadi ya mabadiliko kwa michakato ya majaribio mia moja, ikilinganisha zaidi ya masaa 250,000 ya GPU kwenye kazi ya Uingereza ya WMT hadi Ujerumani. Majaribio yetu yanatoa mitazamo ya kihalisi katika umuhimu wa mambo kama vile ukubwa wa mtandao, kina cha mtandao, aina ya viganjani vya RNN, viungo vya makazi, mfumo wa kusikiliza na kupunguza vizuri. Kama sehemu ya mchango huu, pia tunatoa mfumo wa NMT wa wazi nchini TensorFlow ili kuwawezesha watu wengine kurudisha matokeo yetu na kutekeleza majaribio yao wenyewe.', 'tr': "NMT-iň öňki ýyldan bäri, üretim sistemalary ahyrylara weýdýar. Bu saha çalt hareket edip ýörän bolanda, NMT arhitekturlyklaryň haýsy elementleriniň terjime kwalitetä örän möhüm täsiri bolup bilmedi. Bu işde, NMT arhitektarlaryň hasysynyň beýleki hiperparameterlere üýtget derejesini çykýarys. Biz beýleki ýüz deneyler üçin empirik netijeleri we çeşitli sanlary WMT iňlisçe Alman terjime täblisasyna baglaýarys. Biziň deneylerimiz içine girmek, şebek derinlikleri, RNN häsiýetleri, täsirli baglaýyşlar, üns meýdançasyny we heuristikleri kodmak ýaly faktörleriň has möhümligini temin edýärler. Bu rugsatyň bir bölegi bolsa, TensorFlow'da Açyk-kanunlary NMT frameworkyny çykaryp başgalarymyza netijelerimizi täzeden ýenidirmek we öz deneylerini ýerine ýetirmek üçin aňsat berýäris.", 'sq': 'Translation Neural Machine (NMT) ka treguar përparim të shquar gjatë viteve të fundit, me sistemet e prodhimit që tani janë vendosur për përdoruesit përfundimtarë. Ndërsa fusha po lëviz shpejt, është bërë e paqartë se cilat elemente të arkitekturave të NMT kanë një ndikim të rëndësishëm në cilësinë e përkthimit. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një analizë në shkallë të madhe të ndjeshmërisë së arkitekturave NMT ndaj hyperparametrave të përbashkët. Ne raportojmë rezultatet empirike dhe numrat e variancave për disa qindra vrasje eksperimentale, që korrespondonin me mbi 250,000 orë GPU në një detyrë të përkthimit anglez WMT në gjermani. Eksperimentet tona ofrojnë kuptime praktike në rëndësinë relative të faktorëve të tillë si përmasa e përfshirjes, thellësia e rrjetit, lloji i qelizave RNN, lidhjet e mbetura, mekanizmi i vëmendjes dhe dekodimi i heuristikës. Si pjesë e këtij kontributi, ne lëshojmë gjithashtu një kuadër NMT me burim të hapur në TensorFlow për të bërë të lehtë për të tjerët të riprodhojnë rezultatet tona dhe të kryejnë eksperimentet e tyre.', 'af': "Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT) het in die verlede paar jaar betekende vordering vertoon, met produksiestelsels wat nou na einde- gebruikers uitgestel word. As die veld vinnig beweeg, het dit onbekend geword wat elemente van NMT-arkitektuur 'n betekende invloek het op vertaling kwaliteit. In hierdie werk stel ons 'n groot-skaal analisie van die sensitiviteit van NMT-arkitektuur aan gemeenskaplike hiperparameters. Ons rapporteer empiriese resultate en varianse nommers vir verskeie honderd eksperimentale loop, ooreenstemmende met meer 250,000 GPU uur op 'n WMT Engels na Duitse vertaling taak. Ons eksperimente verskaf praktiese inligtings binne die relatiewe belangrikheid van faktore soos inbetering grootte, netwerk diepte, RNN seltipe, oorblywende verbindings, aandag mekanisme en heuristiese dekodering. As deel van hierdie bydrang, verlos ons ook 'n open-source NMT raamwerk in TensorFlow om dit maklik vir ander te maak om ons resultate te reproduseer en hulle eie eksperimente te doen.", 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) ցույց է տալիս հետաքրքիր առաջընթաց վերջին մի քանի տարիների ընթացքում, որտեղ արդեն օգտագործվում են արտադրողական համակարգեր վերջնական օգտագործողների համար: Քանի որ դաշտը արագ է շարժվում, անհասկանալի է, թե NMT ճարտարապետության որակի տարրերը որևէ նշանակալի ազդեցություն ունեն թարգմանման որակի վրա: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք NMT ճարտարապետության զգայունության մեծ վերլուծություն ընդհանուր հիպերպարամետրերի նկատմամբ: Մենք զեկուցում ենք էմպրիկական արդյունքներ և տարբերությունների թվեր մի քանի հարյուր փորձարկումների համար, որոնք համապատասխանում են ավելի քան 250,000 GPU ժամ աշխարհի անգլերենի և գերմանացի թարգմանման խնդիրների վրա: Մեր փորձարկումները պարունակում են պրակտիկ ընկալումներ գործոնների համեմատական կարևորության մասին, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ ներդրման չափը, ցանցի խորությունը, ՌՆՆ բջիջների տեսակը, մնացած կապերը, ուշադրության մեխանիզմը և ժոռիս Որպես այս ներդրումի մի մաս, մենք նաև ԹենսորFlow-ում բաց կոդը ստեղծում ենք NMT-ի կառուցվածք, որպեսզի մյուսների համար հեշտանա վերարտադրել մեր արդյունքները և կատարել իրենց սեփական փորձարկումները:', 'am': 'የኔural machine ትርጓሜ (NMT) ባለፉት ጥቂት ዓመታት የበለጠ ግንኙነት አሳየ፣ የፍሬት ስርዓት አሁን ወደ መጨረሻ ተጠቃሚዎች ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ As the field is moving rapidly, it has become unclear which elements of NMT architectures have a significant impact on translation quality.  በዚህ ሥራ የNMT የመሠረተ አካውንት ማስተያየትን ትልቅ ትልቅ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በWMT እንግሊዘኛ ወደጀርመን ትርጉም ሥራ በሚያያያየው 250,000 GPU ሰዓት ላይ የክፍተት ውጤቶች እና የልዩ ቁጥር ቁጥር እናስባለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የውይይት ማስታወቂያ፣ የመረብ ጥልቅ፣ የRNN የክፍል ዓይነት፣ የቀረውን ግንኙነት፣ ማስታወቂያውን እና አርስቲክ እና ክፍል የሚያደርጉት የውጤት ግንኙነት እና አርስቲክ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ አካሄድ ክፍል፣ ፍሬዎቻችንን እንዲመልሱ የገዛ ፈተናዎቻቸውንም እንዲፈጽም በቴንሱር ፎርማት ውስጥ የክፈት የNMT ፍሬም እናስፈቅዳለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Neuralni prevod strojeva (NMT) pokazao je izuzetan napredak u proteklih nekoliko godina, a proizvodnji sistemi se sada raspoređuju na krajnje korisnike. Dok se polje brzo kreće, postalo je jasno koje elemente arhitekture NMT-a imaju značajan uticaj na kvalitet prevoda. U ovom poslu predstavljamo veliku analizu osjetljivosti NMT arhitekture na zajedničke hiperparametre. Prijavljujemo empiričke rezultate i brojeve varijansa za nekoliko stotina eksperimentalnih trčanja, odgovarajući preko 250.000 GPU sati na zadatku WMT Engleskog za njemački prevod. Naši eksperimenti pružaju praktične uvide o relativnoj važnosti faktora poput uključenja veličine, dubine mreže, tipa RNN ćelija, ostalih veza, mehanizam pažnje i dekodiranja heuristike. Kao dio ovog doprinosa, također oslobađamo okvir otvorenog izvora NMT u TensorFlow kako bi bilo lako drugima da reproduktuju naše rezultate i izvrše svoje vlastite eksperimente.', 'ca': "La traducció neural de màquines (NMT) ha demostrat un progrés notable en els últims anys, amb sistemes de producció actualment implantats als usuaris finals. Mentre el camp es mou ràpidament, s'ha descobert quins elements de l'arquitectura NMT tenen un impacte significatiu en la qualitat de la traducció. In this work, we present a large-scale analysis of the sensitivity of NMT architectures to common hyperparameters.  Informem resultats empírics i números de variança per diverses centenars d'execucions experimentals, que corresponden a més de 250.000 hores de GPU en una tasca de traducció anglesa a alemanya en WMT. Els nostres experiments proporcionen insights pràctiques sobre l'importància relativa de factors com la mida d'incorporació, la profunditat de la xarxa, el tipus de cèl·lules RNN, les connexions residuals, el mecanisme d'atenció i la descodificació heurística. Com part d'aquesta contribució, també alliberam un marc de NMT de codi obert a TensorFlow per fer fàcil que els altres reprodueixin els nostres resultats i realitzen els seus propis experiments.", 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad (NMT) prokázal v posledních několika letech pozoruhodný pokrok, kdy výrobní systémy jsou nyní nasazeny u koncových uživatelů. Protože se obor rychle pohybuje, není jasné, které prvky NMT architektur mají významný vliv na kvalitu překladu. V této práci představujeme rozsáhlou analýzu citlivosti NMT architektur na běžné hyperparametry. Zaznamenáváme empirické výsledky a čísla rozptylů pro několik set experimentálních běhů, odpovídající více než 250.000 hodin GPU na WMT anglicky do německého překladu. Naše experimenty poskytují praktický pohled na relativní význam faktorů, jako je velikost vložení, hloubka sítě, typ RNN buněk, zbytkové spojení, mechanismus pozornosti a dekódování heuristiky. V rámci tohoto příspěvku také uvolníme open-source NMT framework v TensorFlow, který usnadňuje ostatním reprodukci našich výsledků a provádění vlastních experimentů.', 'az': "Əvvəlki neçə il boyunca nöral Makin Çeviri (NMT) müəyyən bir sürəti göstərdi, ürək sistemləri indi son istifadəçilərə istifadə edilir. Bu sahə tez hərəkətə gəldikdə, NMT arhitektarının hansı elementlərinin çevirin keyfiyyətinə möhkəm bir təsiri olduğunu bilmir. Bu işdə, NMT arhitektarının hisslərinin böyük ölçülü analizi ortaq hiperparametrlərə göstəririk. Biz impirik sonuçlarını və varians nömrələrini bir neçə yüz təcrübə müddətlərinə bildiririk, WMT İngilizceyi Alman çeviri işinə qarşı 250.000 GPU saatlarının üstündə müəyyən edilir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz böyüklüyü, ağ derinlikləri, RNN hücre türü, geri qalan bağlantıları, dikkati mehanizması və heuristik kodlaması kimi faktörlərin qohumluğunu təşkil edir. Bu qiymətin bir parçası olaraq, TensorFlow'da açıq-kaynaklı NMT framework ünü də yayındırırıq ki, başqalarına sonuçlarımızı yeniləşdirmək və öz eksperimentlərini yerinə yetirmək üçün asanlaşdırmaq.", 'et': "Neuraalne masintõlk (NMT) on viimastel aastatel näidanud märkimisväärseid edusamme, kuna tootmissüsteemid on nüüd lõppkasutajatele kasutusele võetud. Kuna valdkond liigub kiiresti, on muutunud ebaselgeks, millised NMT arhitektuuride elemendid avaldavad olulist mõju tõlkekvaliteedile. Käesolevas töös esitame laiaulatusliku analüüsi NMT arhitektuuride tundlikkuse kohta tavalistele hüperparameetritele. Esitame empiirilised tulemused ja erinevuste arvud mitmesaja katsesaja kohta, mis vastavad üle 250 000 GPU tunnile WMT inglise-saksa tõlketööl. Meie eksperimendid annavad praktilise ülevaate selliste tegurite suhtelisest tähtsusest nagu manustamise suurus, võrgusügavus, RNN-raku tüüp, jääkühendused, tähelepanumehhanism ja dekodeerimisheuristika. Selle panuse osana anname TensorFlow's välja ka avatud lähtekoodiga NMT raamistiku, et teistel oleks lihtne meie tulemusi reprodutseerida ja oma katseid teha.", 'bn': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has shown remarkable progress over the past few years, with production systems now being deployed to end-users.  ক্ষেত্রে তাড়াতাড়ি চলে যাচ্ছে, এটা পরিষ্কার হয়ে গেছে কোন উপাদানের এনএমটি স্থাপনের মান অনুবাদের মানে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প এই কাজে আমরা এনএমটি স্থাপত্যের সংবেদনশীল বিশ্লেষণ উপস্থাপন করি সাধারণ হাইপার্পারামিটারের জন্য। আমরা বেশ কয়েক শত পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং বিভিন্ন সংখ্যার প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি, যা জার্মান অনুবাদের কাজে ২৫০,০০০ জিপিউ ঘন্টার ম আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো বাস্তবতার প্রাকৃতিক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করেছে, যেমন আটকানোর আকার, নেটওয়ার্ক গভীর, রিএনএন সেলের ধরন, বাকি সংযোগ, মনোযোগ ম এই অবদানের অংশ হিসেবে আমরা টেন্সোরফ্লোতে একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স এনএমটি ফ্রেম মুক্তি দিচ্ছি যাতে অন্যদের জন্য এটা সহজ করে আমাদের ফলাফল পুনর', 'fi': 'Neurol Machine Translation (NMT) on edistynyt merkittävästi viime vuosina, ja tuotantojärjestelmiä on nyt otettu käyttöön loppukäyttäjille. Alan edetessä nopeasti on tullut epäselväksi, mitkä NMT-arkkitehtuurin elementit vaikuttavat merkittävästi käännösten laatuun. Tässä työssä esitetään laaja-alainen analyysi NMT-arkkitehtuurien herkkyydestä yleisille hyperparametreille. Raportoimme empiiriset tulokset ja varianssiluvut useista sadoista kokeellisista ajoista, jotka vastaavat yli 250 000 GPU-tuntia WMT:n englannin-saksan käännöstehtävässä. Kokeet tarjoavat käytännön oivalluksia sellaisten tekijöiden suhteellisesta merkityksestä, kuten upotuskoko, verkon syvyys, RNN-solutyyppi, jäännösyhteydet, huomiomekanismi ja dekoodausheuristiikka. Osana tätä panosta julkaisemme TensorFlow:ssa myös avoimen lähdekoodin NMT-kehyksen, jonka avulla muiden on helppo toistaa tuloksia ja tehdä omia kokeitaan.', 'jv': 'Ngucap Perintah NMT dumadhing kaé kapan dumadhi, nganggo sistem sing rawut neng sampek kanggo nggawe pengguna-pengguna. Taning jadah ing nglanggar-langgar wigatining, kaya ora becik ngono alam sing karo architecture NMT dumadhi kapan nganggep kuwi nggambar terjamahan. In this job, we present a big-scale test of the Sensitive of NMT architectures to Common Awak dhéwé ngertukno cara-cara sing karo perusahaan karo akeh metan sing tukang tukang karo 250,000 dolar Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan pratiki nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe wigat, nggambar aturan, ketahan pangan, perusahaan warni nggunakaé, yakuwis nggunakaé karo akeh uristik. Tanggala kelas in é iki, kita mulai mbukaké perusahaan NMT bukir-bukir ning TensFlow kanggo ngegampang kanggo ngerasakno dadi kerootan ingkang sampek karo hal-sampek kanggo ngerasakno winih dhéwé.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kama da field ke tafiyar da gaugãwa, aka san wanne element na NMT masu ƙunci mai girma a kan sifar fassarar. Daga wannan aikin, Munã halatar da rabon jama'a mai girma wa masu sanyin matsayin na NMT zuwa jumla-jumla parameters. Munã bãyar da rabo ga matsalar da variantun matsalar da aka lissafa kare ɗari, mai daidai da akan takis 25,000 na GPU a kan WMT na Ingiriya zuwa aikin fassarar jerumani. Kayan jarrabõyinmu, suna da gannai masu halin a cikin muhimmada na matsayi, kamar girgije mai ɗauki, girgije na garwaya, nau'in shekara na RNN, da haɗi masu sauri, kuma masu kashewa da heuristic. Daga wani rabo daga wannan aikin da Muke sakar da wani firam na NMT mai buɗaɗewa a cikin Tesorflow dõmin ya sauƙi da wasu mutane da su sami matsalanmu kuma su cika jarrabukansu.", 'he': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) has shown remarkable progress over the past few years, with production systems now being deployed to end-users.  בזמן שהשדה מתקדם מהר, הפך להיות לא ברור איזה אלמנטים של ארכיטקטורות NMT יש השפעה משמעותית על איכות התרגום. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים ניתוח בקנה מידה גדולה של רגישות הארכיטקטורות NMT ליפרפרמטרים משותפים. אנו מדווחים על תוצאות אמפיריות ומספרי שינוי במשך כמה מאות רצויות ניסויים, המתאימות למעלה מ-250,000 שעות GPU על משימה WMT אנגלית לתרגום גרמנית. הניסויים שלנו מספקים תובנות מעשיות על חשיבות יחסית של גורמים כמו הגודל של הכניסה, עמוק רשת, סוג תא RNN, קשרים שאריים, מנגנון תשומת לב, והיוריסטיקה לפיתוח. כחלק מהתרומה הזו, אנחנו גם משחררים מסגרת NMT מקור פתוח בטנסורפלו כדי להקל לאחרים לשחזר את התוצאות שלנו ולביצע ניסויים משלהם.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཚིག་འདིས་འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་དག་ལས་ཕར་རྒྱས་བརྗོད་ཡོད། སྒེའུ་ཁུང་གི་འགྱུར་མགོ་མ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐབས་ལུ། NMT བཟོ་བཀོད་ཁང་གི་རྣམ་པ་གང་ཡིན་པས་ཡིན་ན་ཚོར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གཤ In this work, we present a large-scale analysis of the sensitivity of NMT architectures to common hyperparameters. ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་འཕྲུལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་བསྟུན་པའི་ཨང་ཀིའམ་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། Our experiments provide practical insights into the relative importance of factors such as embedding size, network depth, RNN cell type, residual connections, attention mechanism, and decoding heuristics. དབང་ཆ་འདིའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཞིག་ལ། ང་ཚོས་TensorFlow་ནང་གི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་NMT རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་ཅིག་ཡང་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་།', 'sk': 'Živčni strojni prevod (NMT) je v zadnjih nekaj letih pokazal izjemen napredek, saj se proizvodni sistemi zdaj uvajajo končnim uporabnikom. Ker se področje hitro premika, je postalo nejasno, kateri elementi arhitekture NMT znatno vplivajo na kakovost prevajanja. V tem delu predstavljamo obsežno analizo občutljivosti NMT arhitektur na skupne hiperparametre. Poročamo empirične rezultate in številke variance za več sto eksperimentalnih potekov, kar ustreza več kot 250.000 GPU ur na WMT prevajanju angleščine v nemščino. Naši poskusi zagotavljajo praktične vpoglede v relativno pomembnost dejavnikov, kot so velikost vdelave, globina omrežja, vrsta celice RNN, preostale povezave, mehanizem pozornosti in dekodiranje heuristike. V okviru tega prispevka smo v TensorFlow izdali tudi odprtokodni NMT okvir, da bi drugim olajšali reproduciranje naših rezultatov in izvajanje lastnih eksperimentov.'}
{'en': 'Reinforcement Learning for Bandit Neural Machine Translation with Simulated Human Feedback', 'pt': 'Aprendizado por reforço para tradução automática neural de bandidos com feedback humano simulado', 'fr': 'Apprentissage par renforcement pour la traduction automatique neuronale bandit avec rétroaction humaine simulée', 'ar': 'التعلم المعزز للترجمة الآلية العصبية لقطاع الطرق مع ردود فعل بشرية محاكية', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de refuerzo para la traducción automática neuronal de Bandit con retroalimentación humana simulada', 'ja': 'シミュレートされた人間のフィードバックによる盗賊神経機械翻訳のための強化学習', 'zh': '盖拟人反馈之盗神经机器翻译强学也', 'hi': 'सिम्युलेटेड मानव प्रतिक्रिया के साथ बैंडिट न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение подкреплению для нейронного машинного перевода Bandit с моделируемой обратной связью с человеком', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Treisithe le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Meirleach Neural le hAiseolas Insamhladh Daonna', 'el': 'Μάθηση ενίσχυσης για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση ληστών με την προσομοιωμένη ανθρώπινη ανατροφοδότηση', 'hu': 'Megerősített tanulás Bandita Neurális Gépi Fordításhoz szimulált emberi visszajelzéssel', 'ka': 'ბანდიტის ნეიროლური მაქსინის გასაგრძელებისთვის სწავლება სიმულაციული ადამიანის გასაგრძელებისთვის', 'it': 'Apprendimento di rinforzo per la traduzione automatica neurale dei banditi con feedback umani simulati', 'lt': 'Reinforcement Learning for Bandit Neural Machine Translation with Simulated Human Feedback', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ബാന്\u200dഡിറ്റ് നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുക', 'mk': 'Појачување на научувањето за транслекција на бендитската неврална машина со симулирана човечка реакција', 'mt': 'Tisħiħ tat-Tagħlim għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali tal-Bandit b’Ritorn Simulat mill-Bniedem', 'kk': 'Bandit невралдық машинаның аудармасының білімін баптау', 'ro': 'Învățarea consolidată pentru traducerea automată neurală a bandiților cu feedback uman simulat', 'mn': 'Bandit Neural Machine Translation with Simulated Human Feed Learning for reinforcement Learning for Bandit Neural Machine Translation', 'no': 'Større læring for omsetjing av Bandit- neiralmaskin med simulert menneske tilbakemelding', 'sr': 'Pojačanje učenja za prevod nervne mašine Bandit sa simuliranim ljudskim povratkom', 'pl': 'Uczenie się wzmacniające dla tłumaczenia neuronowego bandytów z symulowanymi informacjami zwrotnymi ludzkimi', 'si': 'බැන්ඩිට් න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සමග සිමුලේට් මිනිස් පරිවර්තනය', 'sv': 'Förstärkt lärande för Bandit Neural Machine Translation med simulerad mänsklig återkoppling', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Reinforcement Learning for Bandit Neural Machine Translation with Simulated Human Feedback', 'ur': 'بنڈیٹ نیورال ماشین کی ترجمہ کے لئے سیمولیٹ انسان فیڈبک کے ساتھ استعمال کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường học về máy thần kinh của tổ chức nhạc Dịch với mô phỏng phản hồi con người', 'bg': 'Укрепване на обучението за бандитски неврален машинен превод със симулирана човешка обратна връзка', 'da': 'Forstærkelseslæring til Bandit Neural Machine Translation med simuleret menneskelig feedback', 'nl': 'Versterking Leren voor Bandit Neural Machine Translation met gesimuleerde menselijke feedback', 'de': 'Verstärkungslernen für Banditen-neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit simuliertem menschlichem Feedback', 'id': 'Perkuatan Belajar untuk Penerjemahan Mesin Neural Bandit dengan Reaksi Manusia Simulasi', 'hr': 'Pojačanje učenja za prevod nervnih strojeva Bandit sa simuliranim ljudskim povratkom', 'fa': 'تأثیر یادگیری برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی Bandit با برخورد انسان شبیه\u200cسازی', 'tr': 'Bandit Neural Maşynyň Çevirmesi üçin Ködleme Öwrenmek', 'af': 'Versterking Leer vir Bandit Neurale Masjien Vertaling met Simuleerde menslike Voorwerp', 'ko': '아날로그 인간 피드백의 Bandit 신경 기계 번역 강화 학습', 'sq': 'Përforcimi i mësimit për përkthimin e makinës nervore të banditëve me reagim të simuluar njerëzor', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Bandit N칬ral Makina 칂eviri il톛 Q캼d캼rlama 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'sw': 'Reinforcement Learning for Bandit Neural Machine Translation with Simulated Human Feedback', 'hy': 'Reinforcement Learning for Bandit Neural Machine Translation with Simulated Human Feedback', 'bn': 'ব্যান্ডিট নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য পুনরায় শিক্ষা শিক্ষা সিমুলেট মানব ফিডব্যাক দিয়ে', 'ca': "El reforç de l'aprenentatge de traducció de màquines neurals bandits amb feedback humà simulat", 'cs': 'Posilovací učení pro strojový překlad banditů s simulovanou lidskou zpětnou vazbou', 'et': 'Bandiidi neuroalse masintõlke tugevdamisõpe simuleeritud inimeste tagasisidega', 'bs': 'Pojačanje učenja za prevod nervne mašine Bandit sa simuliranim ljudskim povratkom', 'fi': 'Vahvistusoppiminen Bandit Neural Machine Translation kanssa simuloitu ihmisen palaute', 'jv': 'Ngubah Jejaring', 'sk': 'Okrepitveno učenje za Bandit nevral strojni prevod s simuliranimi človeškimi povratnimi informacijami', 'he': 'תגבורת לימוד לתרגום מכונת נוירות של בנדים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Simulated Human Feedback'}
{'en': 'Machine translation is a natural candidate problem for reinforcement learning from human feedback : users provide quick, dirty ratings on candidate translations to guide a system to improve. Yet, current neural machine translation training focuses on expensive human-generated reference translations. We describe a reinforcement learning algorithm that improves neural machine translation systems from simulated human feedback. Our algorithm combines the advantage actor-critic algorithm (Mnih et al., 2016) with the attention-based neural encoder-decoder architecture (Luong et al., 2015). This algorithm (a) is well-designed for problems with a large action space and delayed rewards, (b) effectively optimizes traditional corpus-level machine translation metrics, and (c) is robust to skewed, high-variance, granular feedback modeled after actual human behaviors.', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية هي مشكلة مرشح طبيعية للتعلم المعزز من ردود الفعل البشرية: يقدم المستخدمون تقييمات سريعة وقذرة على ترجمات المرشحين لتوجيه النظام للتحسين. ومع ذلك ، يركز التدريب الحالي على الترجمة الآلية العصبية على الترجمات المرجعية الباهظة الثمن التي ينشئها الإنسان. نحن نصف خوارزمية التعلم المعزز التي تعمل على تحسين أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية من ردود الفعل البشرية المحاكاة. تجمع الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا بين خوارزمية الممثل-الناقد (Mnih et al. ، 2016) مع بنية وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير العصبية القائمة على الانتباه (Luong et al. ، 2015). هذه الخوارزمية (أ) مصممة جيدًا للمشكلات المتعلقة بمساحة العمل الكبيرة والمكافآت المتأخرة ، (ب) تعمل على تحسين مقاييس الترجمة الآلية التقليدية على مستوى الجسم بشكل فعال ، و (ج) قوية إلى ردود الفعل المنحرفة عالية التباين والحبيبية المصممة بعد السلوكيات البشرية الفعلية.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique est un problème naturel pour l'apprentissage par renforcement à partir de commentaires humains\xa0: les utilisateurs fournissent des évaluations rapides et sales sur les traductions des candidats afin de guider un système à améliorer. Pourtant, la formation actuelle en traduction automatique neuronale se concentre sur les traductions de référence coûteuses générées par l'homme. Nous décrivons un algorithme d'apprentissage par renforcement qui améliore les systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale à partir de la rétroaction humaine simulée. Notre algorithme combine l'algorithme acteur-critique d'avantage (Mnih et al., 2016) avec l'architecture codeur-décodeur neuronal basée sur l'attention (Luong et al., 2015). Cet algorithme (a) est bien conçu pour les problèmes avec un grand espace d'action et des récompenses différées, (b) optimise efficacement les métriques de traduction automatique traditionnelles au niveau du corpus, et (c) est robuste à une rétroaction granulaire biaisée, à forte variance et modélisée d'après des comportements humains réels.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática é um problema candidato natural para o aprendizado por reforço a partir do feedback humano: os usuários fornecem avaliações rápidas e sujas nas traduções candidatas para orientar um sistema a melhorar. No entanto, o treinamento atual de tradução automática neural concentra-se em traduções de referência caras geradas por humanos. Descrevemos um algoritmo de aprendizado por reforço que melhora os sistemas de tradução automática neural a partir de feedback humano simulado. Nosso algoritmo combina a vantagem do algoritmo crítico do ator (Mnih et al., 2016) com a arquitetura do codificador-decodificador neural baseado em atenção (Luong et al., 2015). Esse algoritmo (a) é bem projetado para problemas com um grande espaço de ação e recompensas atrasadas, (b) otimiza efetivamente as métricas tradicionais de tradução automática em nível de corpus e (c) é robusto a feedback granular distorcido, de alta variância modelado após comportamentos humanos reais.', 'es': 'La traducción automática es un problema de candidato natural para reforzar el aprendizaje a partir de los comentarios humanos: los usuarios proporcionan calificaciones rápidas y sucias en las traducciones de los candidatos para guiar un sistema a mejorar. Sin embargo, la capacitación actual en traducción automática neuronal se centra en las costosas traducciones de referencias generadas por humanos. Describimos un algoritmo de aprendizaje por refuerzo que mejora los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal a partir de comentarios humanos simulados. Nuestro algoritmo combina la ventaja del algoritmo actor-crítico (Mnih et al., 2016) con la arquitectura de codificador-decodificador neuronal basada en la atención (Luong et al., 2015). Este algoritmo (a) está bien diseñado para problemas con un gran espacio de acción y recompensas retrasadas, (b) optimiza eficazmente las métricas tradicionales de traducción automática a nivel de corpus, y (c) es robusto para la retroalimentación granular, sesgada y de alta varianza modelada a partir de comportamientos humanos reales.', 'ja': '機械翻訳は、人間のフィードバックからの強化学習のための自然な候補問題です。ユーザーは、システムを改善するために候補翻訳に迅速で汚い評価を提供します。しかし、現在のニューラル機械翻訳トレーニングは、高価な人間が生成した参照翻訳に焦点を当てています。シミュレーションされた人間のフィードバックからニューラル機械翻訳システムを改善する強化学習アルゴリズムについて説明します。我々のアルゴリズムは、利点アクター批判的アルゴリズム（ Mnih et al., 2016 ）と注意力に基づくニューラルエンコーダーデコーダーアーキテクチャ（ Luong et al., 2015 ）を組み合わせている。このアルゴリズムは、(a)大きなアクションスペースと遅延した報酬を伴う問題に対して適切に設計されており、(b)従来のコーパスレベルの機械翻訳指標を効果的に最適化し、(c)実際の人間の行動に基づいてモデル化された偏った、高分散の粒度フィードバックに堅牢である。', 'zh': '机器翻译者,人工反馈之自然也:用户以速污之评级,以导其统。 然目前神经机器翻译训练侧重于贵人工生成参考译者。 述强化学算法,从拟人反馈改神经机器翻译系统。 吾侪算法合优势演员 - 论家算法(Mnih等,2016)与注意神经编码器 - 解码器架构(Luong等,2015)。 其算法(a)专为动作闲暇迟赏之计,(b)效优化旧语料库级机器翻译指标,且(c)倾侧于建模,高方差粒度反馈有鲁棒性。', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद मानव प्रतिक्रिया से सीखने के सुदृढीकरण के लिए एक प्राकृतिक उम्मीदवार समस्या है: उपयोगकर्ता एक प्रणाली को बेहतर बनाने के लिए मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए उम्मीदवार अनुवाद पर त्वरित, गंदे रेटिंग प्रदान करते हैं। फिर भी, वर्तमान तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रशिक्षण महंगे मानव-जनित संदर्भ अनुवादों पर केंद्रित है। हम एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म का वर्णन करते हैं जो नकली मानव प्रतिक्रिया से तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों में सुधार करता है। हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका एन्कोडर-डिकोडर आर्किटेक्चर (लुओंग एट अल। यह एल्गोरिथ्म (ए) एक बड़े एक्शन स्पेस और विलंबित पुरस्कारों के साथ समस्याओं के लिए अच्छी तरह से डिज़ाइन किया गया है, (बी) प्रभावी रूप से पारंपरिक कॉर्पस-स्तर की मशीन अनुवाद मीट्रिक को अनुकूलित करता है, और (सी) वास्तविक मानव व्यवहार के बाद मॉडलिंग किए गए तिरछे, उच्च-विचरण, दानेदार प्रतिक्रिया के लिए मजबूत है।', 'ru': 'Машинный перевод является естественной проблемой-кандидатом для обучения подкреплению на основе человеческой обратной связи: пользователи предоставляют быстрые, грязные оценки переводов-кандидатов, чтобы направлять систему на улучшение. Тем не менее, текущее обучение нейронному машинному переводу фокусируется на дорогостоящих человеческих эталонных переводах. Мы описываем алгоритм обучения подкреплению, который улучшает системы нейронного машинного перевода на основе смоделированной обратной связи с человеком. Наш алгоритм сочетает в себе преимущество актор-критического алгоритма (Mnih et al., 2016) с основанной на внимании архитектурой нейронного кодера-декодера (Luong et al., 2015). Этот алгоритм (a) хорошо разработан для проблем с большим пространством действий и отсроченными вознаграждениями, (b) эффективно оптимизирует традиционные метрики машинного перевода на уровне корпуса, и (c) является надежным для асимметричной, высоковариационной, детальной обратной связи, смоделированной по фактическому человеческому поведению.', 'ga': "Is fadhb iarrthóra nádúrtha é an t-aistriúchán meaisín le haghaidh foghlama treisithe ó aiseolas daonna: soláthraíonn úsáideoirí rátálacha tapa agus salacha ar aistriúcháin iarrthóirí chun córas a threorú chun feabhsú. Mar sin féin, díríonn oiliúint néaraistriúcháin meaisín reatha ar aistriúcháin thagartha costasacha a ghineann daoine. Déanaimid cur síos ar algartam foghlama treisithe a fheabhsaíonn córais néar-aistriúcháin meaisín ó aiseolas ionsamhlaithe daonna. Comhcheanglaíonn ár n-algartam an t-algartam aisteoir-criticeora buntáiste (Mnih et al., 2016) leis an ailtireacht ionchódóra-díchódóra néar-bhunaithe (Luong et al., 2015). Tá an t-algartam seo (a) dea-dheartha le haghaidh fadhbanna le spás mór gníomhaíochta agus luach saothair moillithe, (b) go n-uasmhéadaíonn sé go héifeachtach méadracht thraidisiúnta aistrithe meaisín ar leibhéal an chorpais, agus (c) tá sé láidir d'aiseolas gráinneach sceabhach, ard-athraithigh arna mhúnlú ina dhiaidh. iompraíochtaí daonna iarbhír.", 'ka': 'მაქსინური გაგრძელება არის პირადი კანდიდენტის პრობლემა, რომელიც ადამიანური გაგრძელებებიდან სწავლების უფრო მეტადებელება: მომხმარებელი გაგრძელება სისტემის გაუფრო მაგრამ, მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მაქინის გადაწყვეტილების გარგება უფრო ძალიან ადამიანის შექმნა რეფერენციის გარგება. ჩვენ აღწერეთ სწავლების ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების სისტემიდან სიმულაციული ადამიანის გაგრძელებიდან უფრო მეტადებს. ჩვენი ალგორიტიმა აკტერს-კრიტიკური ალგორიტიმს (Mnih et al., 2016) გამოიყენება ნეიროლური კოდერს-ევკოდერს აქტიქტიქტიკური (Luong et al., 2015). ეს ალგორიტიმ (a) უფრო დიდი მოქმედება და გადასრულებული მონაცემებისთვის პრობლემებისთვის. b) ეფექტიურად მოქმედება ტრადიციონალური მოქმედების მეტრიკის შეცვლა კორპუს-დონეზე, და c) უფრო ძალიან მოქმედება, მაღალური გა', 'el': 'Η μηχανική μετάφραση είναι ένα φυσικό υποψήφιο πρόβλημα για την ενίσχυση της μάθησης από την ανθρώπινη ανατροφοδότηση: οι χρήστες παρέχουν γρήγορες, βρώμικες αξιολογήσεις για τις υποψήφιες μεταφράσεις για να καθοδηγήσουν ένα σύστημα για τη βελτίωση. Ωστόσο, η τρέχουσα εκπαίδευση νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης επικεντρώνεται σε ακριβές ανθρώπινες μεταφράσεις αναφοράς. Περιγράφουμε έναν αλγόριθμο εκμάθησης ενίσχυσης που βελτιώνει τα νευρικά συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης από προσομοιωμένη ανθρώπινη ανατροφοδότηση. Ο αλγόριθμος μας συνδυάζει τον αλγόριθμο πλεονεκτήματος ηθοποιού-κριτικού (Μnih et al., 2016) με την αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικού κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή βασισμένη στην προσοχή (Luong et al., 2015). Αυτός ο αλγόριθμος (α) είναι καλά σχεδιασμένος για προβλήματα με μεγάλο χώρο δράσης και καθυστερημένες ανταμοιβές, (β) βελτιστοποιεί αποτελεσματικά τις παραδοσιακές μετρικές μηχανικής μετάφρασης σε επίπεδο σώματος, και (γ) είναι στιβαρός στις στρεβλές, υψηλής διακύμανσης, κοκκώδη ανατροφοδότηση μοντελοποιημένη σύμφωνα με τις πραγματικές ανθρώπινες συμπεριφορές.', 'hu': 'A gépi fordítás természetes jelöltprobléma az emberi visszajelzésekből származó tanulás megerősítésére: a felhasználók gyors, piszkos értékeléseket adnak a jelölt fordításokról, hogy irányítsák a rendszer fejlődését. A jelenlegi idegi gépi fordítási képzés azonban a drága ember által generált referencia fordításokra összpontosít. Leírunk egy erősítési tanulási algoritmust, amely javítja az idegi gépi fordítási rendszereket a szimulált emberi visszajelzésekből. Algoritmusunk ötvözi az előny színész-kritikus algoritmust (Mnih et al., 2016) a figyelem-alapú neurális kódoló-dekóder architektúrával (Luong et al., 2015). Ezt az algoritmust (a) jól tervezték nagy műveleti területekkel és késleltetett jutalmakkal kapcsolatos problémákra, (b) hatékonyan optimalizálja a hagyományos korpusz szintű gépi fordítási mutatókat, és (c) robusztus a ferde, nagy varianciájú, granulált visszajelzések tényleges emberi viselkedések alapján modellezve.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica è un problema naturale candidato per rafforzare l'apprendimento dal feedback umano: gli utenti forniscono valutazioni rapide e sporche sulle traduzioni dei candidati per guidare un sistema a migliorare. Tuttavia, l'attuale formazione di traduzione automatica neurale si concentra su costose traduzioni di riferimento generate dall'uomo. Descriviamo un algoritmo di apprendimento di rinforzo che migliora i sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale dal feedback umano simulato. Il nostro algoritmo combina l'algoritmo attore-critico di vantaggio (Mnih et al., 2016) con l'architettura encoder neurale-decoder basata sull'attenzione (Luong et al., 2015). Questo algoritmo (a) è ben progettato per problemi con un ampio spazio di azione e ricompense ritardate, (b) ottimizza efficacemente le metriche tradizionali di traduzione automatica a livello di corpus, e (c) è robusto a distorto, ad alta varianza, feedback granulare modellato in base ai comportamenti umani effettivi.", 'lt': 'Mašinų vertimas yra natūrali kandidatų problem a siekiant sustiprinti mokymąsi iš žmogaus grįžtamosios informacijos: vartotojai teikia greitus, špinamus vertimo kandidatais vertinimus, kad būtų galima pagerinti sistemą. Vis dėlto dabartinis nervinių mašinų vertimo mokymas daugiausia dėmesio skiria brangiam žmogaus sukeltam orientaciniam vertimui. Mes apibūdiname stiprinimo mokymosi algoritmą, kuris gerina nervinių mašinų vertimo sistemas iš simuliuojamos žmogaus grįžtamosios informacijos. Mūsų algoritmas derina pranašų aktorių ir kritinių algoritmų (Mnih et al., 2016) ir dėmesiu pagrįstos neurologinio kodavimo architektūros (Luong et al., 2015). Šis algoritmas a) gerai suprojektuotas didelio veikimo erdvės ir uždelstų atlyginimų problemoms spręsti, b) veiksmingai optimizuoja tradicinius korpuso lygio mašinų vertimo metrinius rodiklius ir c) yra tvirtas, kad b ūtų nubrėžta, didelio skirtumo, granulių grįžtamoji reakcija modeliuojama pagal tikrąjį žmogaus elgesį.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аударуы - адамдардың қайта-қайта-қайта оқу үшін көмектесу үшін табиғи кандидаттардың мәселесі: пайдаланушылар жүйені жақсарту үшін кандидаттардың аудармасына Бірақ қазіргі невралдық компьютердің аудармасының көпшілігі адамның құрылған сілтеменің аудармасына көмектеседі. Біз көбірек оқыту алгоритмін таңдаймыз. Бұл невралдық компьютердің аудару жүйелерін бағдарламалы адамдардың қайталауынан жақсарту алгоритмі. Алгоритміздің артықшылық актьтер-критикалық алгоритмі (Mnih et al., 2016) негіздеген невралдық кодер- декодер архитектурасы (Luong et al., 2015). Бұл алгоритм (a) үлкен әрекеттер бос орында және күтуге келтірілген мәселелер үшін жақсы құрылған, b) әдімгі корпус деңгейіндегі машинаның аудармалы метрикалығын оптимизациялау мүмкіндігі болады. c) шындық адамдардың әрекеттерін', 'mk': 'Машински превод е природен кандидатски проблем за зајакнување на учењето од човечките реакции: корисниците обезбедуваат брзи, валкани оценки за кандидатски преводи за водење на систем за подобрување. Сепак, сегашниот тренинг за превод на неврални машини се фокусира на скапи преводи генерирани од човек. We describe a reinforcement learning algorithm that improves neural machine translation systems from simulated human feedback.  Нашиот алгоритм го комбинира предност алгоритмот актер-критичар (Mnih и ал., 2016) со архитектурата на нервен кодер-декодер базирана на внимание (Luong и ал., 2015). Овој алгоритм (a) е добро дизајниран за проблеми со голем простор за акција и одложени награди, (b) ефикасно оптимизира традиционални метрики за машински превод на ниво на корпус, и (c) е силен за скриен, висока варијанција, грануларна реакција моделирана по вистинското човечко однесување.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഫിഡിബാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക പ്രശ്നമാണ് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകള്\u200d: പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന വ എന്നിട്ടും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് വിലയ്ക്കുള്ള മനുഷ്യരുടെ ജനിപ്പിച്ച വ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണ സിസ്റ്റം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മനുഷ്യന്റെ പ്രതികരണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഞങ്ങളുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഉപകാരം നടത്തുന്ന അലക്കോരിറ്റമിനെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു (Mnih et al., 2016) ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കി ഈ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം (a) വലിയ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥലത്തുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നന്നായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വൈകിയിരിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin adalah masalah calon alami untuk pembelajaran kuasa dari balas balik manusia: pengguna menyediakan nilai cepat, kotor pada terjemahan calon untuk memimpin sistem untuk memperbaiki. Namun, latihan terjemahan mesin saraf semasa fokus pada terjemahan rujukan yang dihasilkan oleh manusia yang mahal. Kami menggambarkan algoritma pembelajaran kuasa yang meningkatkan sistem terjemahan mesin saraf dari balas balik manusia simulasi. Algoritma kami menggabungkan algoritma pelakon-kritik keuntungan (Mnih et al., 2016) dengan arkitektur pengekod-dekoder saraf berdasarkan perhatian (Luong et al., 2015). Algoritma (a) ini direka dengan baik untuk masalah dengan ruang tindakan besar dan hadiah tertunda, (b) secara berkesan optimizasi metrik terjemahan mesin aras-corpus tradisional, dan (c) kuat untuk menggosok, variasi tinggi, balas granular yang dipodelkan selepas perilaku manusia sebenar.', 'mt': "It-traduzzjoni bil-magna hija problem a naturali tal-kandidati għat-tisħiħ tat-tagħlim mill-feedback tal-bniedem: l-utenti jipprovdu klassifikazzjonijiet rapidi u ħżiena dwar traduzzjonijiet kandidati biex jiggwidaw sistema biex titjieb. Madankollu, it-taħriġ attwali dwar it-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali jiffoka fuq traduzzjonijiet ta’ referenza ġenerati mill-bniedem li jiswew ħafna flus. Aħna niddeskrivu algoritmu ta' tagħlim ta' rinforz li jtejjeb is-sistemi ta' traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali minn reazzjonijiet umani simulati. L-algoritmu tagħna jikkombina l-algoritmu ta’ vantaġġ attur-kritiku (Mnih et al., 2016) mal-arkitettura ta’ kodifikatur newrali bbażata fuq l-attenzjoni (Luong et al., 2015). This algorithm (a) is well-designed for problems with a large action space and delayed rewards, (b) effectively optimizes traditional corpus-level machine translation metrics, and (c) is robust to skewed, high-variance, granular feedback modeled after actual human behaviors.", 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie maszynowe jest naturalnym problemem kandydatów do wzmocnienia uczenia się na podstawie opinii ludzkich: użytkownicy dostarczają szybkie, brudne oceny na temat tłumaczeń kandydatów, aby poprowadzić system do poprawy. Jednak obecne szkolenia neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego koncentrują się na drogich tłumaczeniach referencyjnych generowanych przez człowieka. Opisujemy algorytm uczenia się wzmocnienia, który usprawnia neuronowe systemy tłumaczenia maszynowego z symulowanych ludzkich informacji zwrotnych. Nasz algorytm łączy w sobie przewagę algorytm aktor-krytyka (Mnih et al., 2016) z architekturą neuronowego kodera-dekodera opartą na uwadze (Luong et al., 2015). Algorytm ten (a) jest dobrze zaprojektowany pod kątem problemów z dużą przestrzenią akcji i opóźnionymi nagrodami, (b) skutecznie optymalizuje tradycyjne metryki tłumaczenia maszynowego na poziomie korpusu, a (c) jest solidny w zakręconych, o wysokiej wariancji, granularnych informacjach zwrotnych modelowanych według rzeczywistych zachowań ludzkich.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată este o problemă naturală a candidatului pentru consolidarea învățării din feedback-ul uman: utilizatorii oferă evaluări rapide și murdare asupra traducerilor candidate pentru a ghida un sistem pentru a îmbunătăți. Cu toate acestea, curentul curent de traducere automată neurală se concentrează pe traduceri de referință scumpe generate de om. Descriem un algoritm de învățare de armare care îmbunătățește sistemele neuronale de traducere automată din feedback uman simulat. Algoritmul nostru combină algoritmul actor-critic avantajos (Mnih et al., 2016) cu arhitectura encoder-decoder neural bazată pe atenție (Luong et al., 2015). Acest algoritm (a) este bine conceput pentru probleme cu un spațiu mare de acțiune și recompense întârziate, (b) optimizează în mod eficient măsurătorile tradiționale de traducere automată la nivel de corp și (c) este robust până la distorsionat, variație ridicată, feedback granular modelat după comportamentele umane reale.', 'mn': 'Машин дамжуулагч нь хүний хариултаас суралцах боломжтой байгалийн захирагчийн асуудал юм: хэрэглэгчид системийг сайжруулахын тулд хурдан, гүн зэрэг түлхүүрүүдийг дамжуулдаг. Гэвч одоогийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжлийн дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал нь хүн төрөлхтний бий болсон үнэтэй дасгал хөгжлийн хөгжлийн дасгал хөгжлийн Бид мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах системийг хүн төрөлхтний хариултаас сайжруулдаг суралцах алгоритмыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний алгоритм нь анхаарлын үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөгч-шүүмжлэгчийн алгоритм (Mnih et al., 2016) дээр анхаарлын үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөгч-кодлогчийн архитектур (Luong et al., 2015). Энэ алгоритм (a) нь маш том үйл явдал орон зай болон уламжлалттай асуудлуудын төлөө сайн зохион байгуулагдсан, b) уламжлалтай корпус-түвшин машины хөгжүүлэлтийн метрикийг эерэг үзүүлдэг ба (c) нь хүний үйлдэлтийн дараа загварчлагдсан, өндөр өөрчлөлт, грану', 'no': 'Maskineoversettelse er eit naturleg kandidatproblem for å styrke læring frå menneskelige tilbakemelding: brukarar gjev rask, tørre verdiar på kandidatoversettelsar for å hjelpa fram eit system for å forbetra. Men gjeldande neuralmaskinsk omsetjing fokuserer på dykka menneske genererte referansomsetjingar. Vi beskriver ein forsterking-læringsalgoritme som forbetrar neuralmaskinsomsetjingssystemer frå simulert menneskelige tilbakemelding. Algoritmen vårt kombinerer fordel av aktorekritiske algoritmen (Mnih et al., 2016) med den oppmerksbaserte neuralkoderingsarkitekturen (Luong et al., 2015). Denne algoritmen (a) er veldig utforma for problemar med stor handlingsmessig og delagt tilbakemelding, b) optimaliserer tradisjonelle korpusnivå-omsetjingsmessige metrikar, og c) er kraftig for å skygge, høg varianse, granular tilbakemelding modellert etter faktiske menneske oppførsel.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ඉක්මනින් ඉක්මනින්, අමාරු රේටින්ස් ප නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූත න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස අපි විස්තර කරනවා විශ්වාස කරන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා. අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් අයිතිකාරියා අල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක (Mnis et al., 2016) අවධානය සඳහා අධිකාරිත න්\u200dයූරාල් ක මේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් (a) ලොකු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක අවස්ථාවක් සමග ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොඳින් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් හොඳින් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් හොඳයි, (b) පරාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පුස් ලේවල', 'so': 'Turjumista mashiinka waa dhibaatada kandidada dabiicadda ah ee ku kordhiya barashada dib u soo celinta dadka: isticmaalayaashu waxay bixiyaan fasax dhaqso ah oo wasakh ah oo ku qoran turjumaadda kandida si ay u hagaan nidaamka horumarinta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxbarashada qoraalka maskinada ee guud ee guud waxay ku focus yihiin turjumaadyo qaali ah oo dadka-generated reference. Waxaannu qoraynaa qoraalka barashada oo kordhiya nidaamka turjumidda maskaxda neurada oo similan dib u celinta dadka. Algoritkaagu wuxuu ku soo bandhigaa kalgorithm khatar-critic (Mnih et al., 2016) kaas oo ku qoran taariikhda koox-decoder (Luong et al., 2015). Algoritmkan (a) waxaa si wanaagsan loo sameeyaa dhibaatooyin la xiriira goob weyn oo dib u dhigtay abaalmarinta, (b) wuxuu si caqli ah u bedelaa maamulka turjumista hoose ee korpus-level machine turjumista, iyo (c) waxaa loo isticmaalaa sawirida, bedelka sare, feedbacka dib loo sameeyo dabeecada halis ah kadib.', 'sv': 'Maskin철vers채ttning 채r ett naturligt kandidatproblem f철r att st채rka inl채rningen fr책n m채nsklig feedback: anv채ndare ger snabba, smutsiga betyg p책 kandidat철vers채ttningar f철r att v채gleda ett system att f철rb채ttra. 횆nd책 fokuserar den nuvarande neurala maskin철vers채ttningsutbildningen p책 dyra m채nniskogenererade referens철vers채ttningar. Vi beskriver en f철rst채rkningsalgoritm som f철rb채ttrar neurala maskin철vers채ttningssystem fr책n simulerad m채nsklig 책terkoppling. V책r algoritm kombinerar f철rdelen actor-critic algoritm (Mnih et al., 2016) med uppm채rksamhetsbaserad neural encoder-dekoder arkitektur (Luong et al., 2015). Denna algoritm (a) 채r v채l utformad f철r problem med ett stort 책tg채rdsutrymme och f철rdr철jda bel철ningar, (b) optimerar effektivt traditionella maskin철vers채ttningsmetoder p책 korpusniv책, och (c) 채r robust till skev, h철g varians, granul채r feedback modellerad efter verkliga m채nskliga beteenden.', 'sr': 'Prevedenje mašine je prirodni kandidatski problem za pojačanje učenja iz ljudskih povratka: korisnici pružaju brze, prljave ocjene za prevode kandidata kako bi vodili sistem za poboljšanje. Ipak, trenutna obuka za prevod neuralne mašine fokusira se na skupe ljudske prevode. Mi opisujemo algoritam učenja pojačanja koji poboljšava sisteme prevoda neuronskih mašina iz simuliranog ljudskog povratka. Naš algoritam kombinira prednost kritičnog glumca algoritma (Mnih et al., 2016) sa arhitekturom neuralnog kodera-dekodera na pažnji (Luong et al., 2015). Ovaj algoritam (a) je dobro dizajniran za probleme sa velikim prostorom akcije i odgođenim nagradama, b) efikasno optimizira tradicionalnu metriku prevoda mašine na nivou korpusa, a c) je snažna za skeiranje, visoke varijanse, granularnu reakciju modeljenu nakon stvarnog ljudskog ponašanja.', 'ta': 'இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ஒரு இயல்பான தேர்ந்தெடுப்பான பிரச்சினையாகும் மனித செயல்பாட்டிலிருந்து கல்வி வலுப்படுத்துவதற்காக: முன்னே ஆனாலும், தற்போதைய புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பயிற்சியை விலையான மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழிபெயர்ப்ப நாம் ஒரு வலுப்பமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கல்வி முறையை விவரிக்கிறோம். அது போன்ற மனித பின்னணி மொழிமாற்றும் முறைமைகளை மேம எங்கள் ஆல்கோரிட்டம் முன்னுரிமை நடிகர்-critic algorithm (Mnih et al., 2016) கவனத்தில் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள புதிய குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டு அமைப்பு பெரிய செயல் இடைவெளியில் உள்ள பிரச்சனைகளுக்கான இந்த ஆல்கோரியம் (a) வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் தாமதமான விகிதம்', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ انسانی فیڈبک سے سیکھنے کے لئے ایک طبیعی کاندینٹ مسئلہ ہے: کارساز بہتر کرنے کے لئے سیستم کی راہ دکھانے کے لئے سریع اور خطرناک ریٹینگ پیش کرتے ہیں. لیکن، موجود نیورل ماشین ترکینس ترکینس کی تدبیر انسان کے پیدا ہوئے ارتباط ترکینس پر تمرکز کرتی ہے. ہم ایک نیرول ماشین ترجمہ سیستموں کو سیمالیٹ انسانی فیڈ پک سے سیمالیٹ کرتا ہے۔ ہماری الگوریتم نے اکتور-منکری الگوریتم (Mnih et al., 2016) کو توجه پر بنیاد رکھا ہے نیورال اکڈر-اکڈر الگوریتم (Luong et al., 2015) کے ساتھ ملائق کیا ہے۔ یہ الگوریتم (a) ایک بڑے کام کی جگہ اور دیر کی اجرت کے مسائل کے لئے بہتر طراحی کی گئی ہے، اور (b) عمدہ طور پر سنتی کرپوس-سطح ماشین کی ترجمہ متریک کے مطابق اچھی طراحی کی گئی ہے، اور (c) بڑی متفاوت کے مطابق مضبوط ہے، بڑی متفاوت کے مطابق بڑی فریب پکڑ', 'uz': "Name Lekin, hozir neyrolik tarjima tahrirchi oddiy inson-generated reference tarjimalarini qiymatda foydalanadi. Biz o'rganishni o'rganish algoritni tasavvur qilamiz. Bu bir necha maskina tarjima tizimini o'zgartiradi. Bizning algoritmiz muvaffaqiyatli actor-critic algorithm (Mnih et al., 2016) bilan birlashtirilgan neyural kodekoder arkitekasi (Luong et al., 2015). Bu algoritm katta amalning oʻlchami bilan muammolar uchun yaxshi nazar qilinadi va cheksiz paydo bo'ladi, (b) aslida oddiy inson xususiyatlaridan keyin oddiy korpus- darajadagi tarjima metriklarini moslash mumkin, va (c) o'zgarishga, yuqori, granular javob berishdan keyin boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy là một vấn đề tự nhiên của ứng viên để củng cố học hỏi từ phản hồi của con người: người dùng cung cấp đánh giá nhanh, sai lệch về ứng cử viên dịch để hướng dẫn một hệ thống cải tiến. Tuy nhiên, huấn luyện dịch chuyển máy thần kinh hiện tại tập trung vào dịch thuật quan trọng. Chúng tôi mô tả thuật toán học tăng cường giúp cải thiện hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh từ phản hồi của con người. Thuật toán của chúng ta kết hợp thuật toán diễn viên phê bình thuận lợi (M2h et al., 2006) với cấu trúc cưỡi mã hóa thần kinh trung lập. Thuật to án (a) được thiết kế c ẩn thận cho các vấn đề với không gian hành động lớn và phần thưởng chậm (b) tăng hiệu quả hóa các âm lượng dịch chuyển máy trên siêu hình truyền thống, và (c) có khả năng b ị lệch lạc, tần cao, phản hồi hạt theo mẫu hành vi con người.', 'bg': 'Машинният превод е естествен кандидатски проблем за засилване на обучението от човешката обратна връзка: потребителите предоставят бързи, мръсни оценки на кандидатските преводи, за да насочат системата за подобряване. Все пак, настоящото обучение по невронен машинен превод се фокусира върху скъпи референтни преводи, генерирани от човека. Описваме алгоритъм за усвояване, който подобрява невронните системи за машинен превод от симулирана обратна връзка. Нашият алгоритъм съчетава предимството актьор-критичен алгоритъм (Мних и др., 2016) с базираната на вниманието неврална енкодер-декодер архитектура (Лунг и др., 2015). Този алгоритъм (а) е добре проектиран за проблеми с голямо пространство за действие и забавени награди, (б) ефективно оптимизира традиционните метрики за машинен превод на ниво корпус и (в) е здрав до изкривен, с висока вариация, гранулирана обратна връзка, моделирана след действителното човешко поведение.', 'da': 'Maskinoversættelse er et naturligt kandidatproblem til styrkelse af læring fra menneskelig feedback: brugerne giver hurtige, beskidte vurderinger af kandidatoversættelser for at guide et system til at forbedre. Alligevel fokuserer den nuværende neurale maskinoversættelsesuddannelse på dyre menneskeskabte referenceoversættelser. Vi beskriver en forstærkning læringsalgoritme, der forbedrer neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer fra simuleret menneskelig feedback. Vores algoritme kombinerer fordelen aktør-kritisk algoritme (Mnih et al., 2016) med den opmærksomhedsbaserede neurale encoder-dekoder arkitektur (Luong et al., 2015). Denne algoritme (a) er godt designet til problemer med et stort handlingsrum og forsinkede belønninger, (b) optimerer effektivt traditionelle målinger for maskinoversættelse på korpusniveau, og (c) er robust til skæv, høj varians, granulær feedback modelleret efter faktisk menneskelig adfærd.', 'de': 'Maschinelle Übersetzung ist ein natürliches Kandidatenproblem für Verstärkung des Lernens aus menschlichem Feedback: Benutzer geben schnelle, schmutzige Bewertungen zu Kandidatenübersetzungen ab, um ein System zu verbessern. Dennoch konzentriert sich das aktuelle Training auf teure, vom Menschen generierte Referenzübersetzungen. Wir beschreiben einen Verstärkungs-Lernalgorithmus, der neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme aus simuliertem menschlichem Feedback verbessert. Unser Algorithmus kombiniert den Vorteil des akterkritischen Algorithmus (Mnih et al., 2016) mit der aufmerksamkeitsbasierten neuronalen Encoder-Decoder-Architektur (Luong et al., 2015). Dieser Algorithmus (a) ist gut für Probleme mit einem großen Aktionsraum und verzögerten Belohnungen konzipiert, (b) optimiert effektiv traditionelle Korpus-Level-Maschinelle Übersetzungsmetriken und (c) ist robust, um verzerrte, hochvariante, granulare Rückmeldungen zu erhalten, die nach tatsächlichen menschlichen Verhaltensweisen modelliert wurden.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin adalah masalah kandidat alami untuk memperkuat belajar dari feedback manusia: pengguna menyediakan nilai cepat, kotor pada terjemahan kandidat untuk memimpin sistem untuk memperbaiki. Namun, latihan mesin terjemahan saraf saat ini fokus pada terjemahan referensi yang dihasilkan oleh manusia mahal. Kami menggambarkan algoritma pembelajaran yang memperbaiki sistem terjemahan mesin saraf dari feedback manusia simulasi. Our algorithm combines the advantage actor-critic algorithm (Mnih et al., 2016) with the attention-based neural encoder-decoder architecture (Luong et al., 2015).  Algoritma ini (a) dirancang dengan baik untuk masalah dengan ruang aksi besar dan penghargaan tertunda, (b) secara efektif optimisasi metrik terjemahan mesin tingkat-corpus tradisional, dan (c) kuat untuk skewed, variasi tinggi, balas balik granular model setelah perilaku manusia sebenarnya.', 'nl': 'Machine Translation is een natuurlijk kandidaat-probleem voor versterking van leren van menselijke feedback: gebruikers geven snelle, vuile beoordelingen op kandidaat-vertalingen om een systeem te begeleiden om te verbeteren. Toch richt de huidige neurale machine translation training zich op dure door mensen gegenereerde referentievertalingen. We beschrijven een versterkingsleeralgoritme dat neurale machinevertaalsystemen verbetert op basis van gesimuleerde menselijke feedback. Ons algoritme combineert het voordeel acteur-criticus algoritme (Mnih et al., 2016) met de aandacht-gebaseerde neurale encoder-decoder architectuur (Luong et al., 2015). Dit algoritme (a) is goed ontworpen voor problemen met een grote actieruimte en vertraagde beloningen, (b) optimaliseert effectief traditionele corpus-level machine translation metrics, en (c) is robuust om scheef, met hoge variatie, granulaire feedback gemodelleerd naar daadwerkelijk menselijk gedrag.', 'ko': '기계 번역은 인류의 피드백에서 학습을 강화하는 자연스러운 후보 문제이다. 사용자는 후보 번역에 대해 신속하고 더러운 평점을 제공하여 시스템 개선을 지도한다.그러나 현재의 신경기계 번역 교육은 주로 비싼 인공 생성의 참고 번역에 주목한다.우리는 인간 피드백을 모의하여 신경기계 번역 시스템을 개선하는 강화 학습 알고리즘을 묘사했다.우리의 알고리즘은advantage actor-critic 알고리즘(Mnih 등, 2016)과 주의력을 바탕으로 하는 신경 인코더-디코더 구조(Luong 등, 2015)를 결합시켰다.이 알고리즘(a)은 큰 동작 공간과 지연 보상을 가진 문제에 대해 좋은 디자인을 했고 (b)는 전통적인 어료 라이브러리급 기계 번역 도량을 효과적으로 최적화시켰으며 (c)는 실제 인류 행위를 모의하는 경사, 고방차, 입도 피드백에 노봉성을 가진다.', 'hr': 'Prevod strojeva je prirodni kandidatski problem za pojačanje učenja iz ljudskih povratka: korisnici pružaju brze, prljave ocjene za prevod kandidata kako bi se povećao sustav. Ipak, trenutna obuka za prevod neuronskih strojeva usredotočila se na skupe ljudske prevode. Opišemo algoritam učenja pojačanja koji poboljšava sustave prevoda neuronskih strojeva iz simuliranog ljudskog povratka. Naš algoritam kombinira prednost kritičnog glumca algoritma (Mnih et al., 2016) sa arhitekturom neuralnog kodera-dekodera na pažnji (Luong et al., 2015). Ovaj algoritam (a) je dobro dizajniran za probleme s velikim prostorom djelovanja i odgođenim nagradama, b) učinkovito optimizira tradicionalnu metriku prevođenja strojeva na razini korpusa, a c) je snažna prema skiovanju, visokovarijanciji, granularnom povratku modelovanom nakon stvarnog ljudskog ponašanja.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین یک مشکل کاندیداتی طبیعی برای افزایش یادگیری از بازگشت انسان است: کاربران مقدار سریع و کثیف بر ترجمه\u200cهای کاندیداتی برای هدایت یک سیستم تا بهبود دهند. با این حال، آموزش ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی فعلی روی ترجمه\u200cهای مربوط به تولید انسان گران تمرکز می\u200cکند. ما الگوریتم یادگیری پشتیبانی را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که سیستم ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی را از روابط شبیه\u200cسازی انسان بهتر می\u200cکند. الگوریتم ما الگوریتم\u200cهای مفید بازیگر-منکتر (Mnih et al., 2016) را ترکیب می\u200cکند با معماری\u200cسازی\u200cهای عصبی\u200cسازی\u200cکننده\u200cی کودکتر\u200cکننده\u200cهای عصبی (Luong et al., 2015). این الگوریتم (a) برای مشکلات با فضای عملیات بزرگ و پاداش دیر طراحی شده است، و (b) به طور موثر متریک ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین سنتی در سطح کورپوس بهترین سازی می\u200cکند، و (c) برای تغییرات، تغییرات بزرگ، تغییرات بزرگ، پس از رفتارهای واقعی انسان مدل شده است.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine ni tatizo la mgombea asili kwa ajili ya kuimarisha kujifunza kutoka kwenye maoni ya binadamu: watumiaji wanatoa vigezo haraka, mabaya juu ya tafsiri za wagombea ili kuongoza mfumo wa kuboresha. Hata hivyo, mafunzo ya mashine ya kiserikali yanalenga tafsiri ghali zilizotengenezwa kwa binadamu. Tunaelezea algorithi ya kujifunza yenye kuboresha mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo kutoka kwenye maoni yanayofanana na binadamu. Ualgorithi wetu unaunganisha algorithi ya mpiga mkosoaji (Mnih et al., 2016) yenye ujenzi wa kodi-decode wa neura wenye msimamo mkali (Luong et al., 2015). Ualgorithi huu (a) umetengenezwa vizuri kwa matatizo yenye nafasi kubwa ya hatua na kucheleweshwa malipo, (b) kwa ufanisi unaorodhesha mbinu za kutafsiri mashine yenye kiwango cha kawaida, na (c) inabadilishwa kuchora tofauti, mabadiliko makubwa, maombi yaliyotengenezwa baada ya tabia halisi za binadamu.', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinave është një problem natyror i kandidatit për forcimin e mësimit nga përgjigjet njerëzore: përdoruesit ofrojnë vlerësime të shpejtë dhe të pista mbi përkthimet kandidate për të udhëzuar një sistem për të përmirësuar. Megjithatë, stërvitja aktuale e përkthimit të makinave nervore përqëndrohet në përkthimet e shtrenjta të prodhuara nga njerëzit. Ne përshkruajmë një algoritëm mësimi të forcimit që përmirëson sistemet e përkthimit të makinave nervore nga reagimet e simuluara njerëzore. Algoritmi ynë kombinon algoritmin e avantazhit aktor-kritik (Mnih et al., 2016) me arkitekturën e koduesit nervor të bazuar në vëmendje (Luong et al., 2015). Ky algoritëm (a) është i projektuar mirë për probleme me një hapësirë veprimi të madhe dhe shpërblime të vonuara, (b) optimizon efektivisht metrikat tradicionale të përkthimit të makinave në nivel korpus dhe (c) është i fuqishëm për të lëvizur, variancë të lartë, feedback granular modeluar pas sjelljeve reale njerëzore.', 'tr': 'Ullançy terjime edilen adatça sanat meseledir. Ullançy täzeliklerden öwrenmek üçin adatça terjime etmek üçin adatça terjime edilen mesele. Ullançy üçin üýtgetmek üçin adatça terjime etmek üçin gadyry terjime etmekdir. Ýöne, häzirki näyral maşynyň terjime edilmegi ynsan tarapyndan örän gymmat terjime eden çykyşlara üns berýär. Biz näral maşynyň terjime sistemlerini simüle edilen adamlaryň terjime edilmesinden has baglanýan öwrenme algoritmini tassyýarys. Biziň algoritmyz aktör-kritik algoritmi (Mnih et al., 2016) üns daşarylan neural koder-koder arhitektura (Luong et al., 2015). Bu algoritm', 'hy': 'Machine translation is a natural candidate problem for reinforcement learning from human feedback: users provide quick, dirty ratings on candidate translations to guide a system to improve.  Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման ուսումնասիրությունը կենտրոնանում է մարդկանց կողմից ստեղծված թանկ հաղորդակցման վրա: Մենք նկարագրում ենք ուժեղացման ուսումնական ալգորիթմ, որը բարելավում է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգերը մարդկային սիմուլյացված արձագանքից: Մեր ալգորիթմը միավորում է առավելագույն դերասան-քննադատող ալգորիթմը (Mna et al., 2016) ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային կոդեր-կոդեր ճարտարապետության հետ (Lung et al., 2015). Այս ալգորիթմը (a) լավ նախագծված է մեծ գործողությունների տարածության և ուշացած պարգևերի խնդիրների համար, b) արդյունավետ օպտիմացնում է ավանդական մարմնի մակարդակի մետրիկները, և c) ուժեղ է մարդկային վարքագիծից հետո մոդելավորված, բարձր տարբերակների, գծային արձագանքների համար:', 'af': "Masjien vertaling is 'n natuurlike kandidate probleem vir versterking van die onderwerp van menslike terugkeer: gebruikers verskaf vinnige, duidelike reitings op kandidate vertalings om 'n stelsel te lei om te verbeter. Maar, huidige neurale masjien vertaling oersetting fokus op kosbare mense genereerde verwysing vertalings. Ons beskryf 'n versterking leer algoritme wat neurale masjien vertaling stelsels verbeter van simuleerde menslike terugmelding. Ons algoritme kombinieer die voordeel akteur-kritiese algoritme (Mnih et al., 2016) met die aandag-gebaseerde neurale koder-dekoder-arkitektuur (Luong et al., 2015). Hierdie algoritme (a) is goed-ontwerp vir probleme met 'n groot aksie ruimte en verlate vergelde, b) effektief optimaliseer tradisionele korpus-vlak masjien vertaling metrike, en c) is kragtig na skei, hoë-variasie, granuleerde terugmelding modelleer na werklike menslike gedrag.", 'am': 'የመኪን ትርጉም የሰው መልዕክት ማድረግ የፍጥረተኛ የፓርላማዊ ፕሮጀክት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ተጠቃሚዎች ፈጥኖ፣ ጥሩ ጉዳይ እና ጥሩ ጉዳይ ስርዓት ለመሻለል ስርዓት ማቅናኘት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን አሁን የናውሬው የሆኑት መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ ማህበረሰብ በከንቱ የሰው-ወለደ reference ትርጓሜዎች ላይ ትምህርት ነው፡፡ አካባቢ የናቡር መሳሪያ ትርጉም ሲስተማርን ከሰው መለያየት የሚሻለውን አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አሌጎርቲም የጠቅላይ አካባቢ አሌጎርቲም (Mnih et al., 2016) በተመለከተው የየየደዌብ የኮድድ-decoder መሠረት (Luong et al., 2015). ይህ አጎሪትም (a) በተለየ ትልቅ ሥራ ቦታ እና ዋጋዎችን ለዘገየ፣ (b) ባሕላዊ ኮፕስ-level ማተርጓም ሚትሪክቶችን በመጠቀም ይሻላል፤ እናም (c) ትክክል፣ ከፍተኛ ልዩነት፣ አካባቢ ስብሰባ፣ ከሰው አካባቢ ሁኔታ በኋላ የተዘጋጀ ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Prevedenje strojeva je prirodni kandidatski problem za pojačanje učenja iz ljudskih povratka: korisnici pružaju brze, prljave ocjene za prevode kandidata kako bi vodili sistem za poboljšanje. Ipak, trenutna obuka za prevod neuronskih strojeva fokusira se na skupe ljudske prevode. Opišemo algoritam učenja pojačanja koji poboljšava sisteme prevoda neuronskih strojeva iz simuliranog ljudskog povratka. Naš algoritam kombinira prednost algoritma kritičnog glumca (Mnih et al., 2016) sa arhitekturom neuralnog kodera-dekodera na pažnji (Luong et al., 2015). Ovaj algoritam (a) je dobro dizajniran za probleme sa velikim prostorom akcije i odgođenim nagradama, b) efektivno optimizira tradicionalnu metriku prevoda mašine na nivou korpusa, a c) je snažna za skeiranje, visoke varijance, granularnu reakciju modeljenu nakon stvarnog ljudskog ponašanja.', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ একটি প্রাকৃতিক প্রার্থী সমস্যা: মানুষের ফিডিব্যাক থেকে শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করার জন্য: ব্যবহারকারীরা দ্রুত, দুর্নীতির তবে বর্তমান নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ প্রশিক্ষণ মানুষের দামী উৎপাদন করা রেফারেন্স অনুবাদের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। আমরা ব্যাখ্যা করি মানুষের প্রতিক্রিয়া থেকে নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেমের উন্নতি প্রদান করার ক্ষেত্রে। আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম সুবিধা অভিনেত্রী সমালোচনা অ্যালগরিদম (Mnih et al., ২০১৬) এর সাথে মনোযোগ প্রদান করা নিউরেল এনকোডার-ডেকোডার আর্কিটেক্টারের সা এই অ্যালগরিদম (a) বিশাল কাজের স্থানে সমস্যার জন্য ভালোভাবে ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে এবং বিরতীয় পুরস্কার দেয়া হয়েছে (b) কার্যকর্মীভাবে ঐতিহ্যবাহী কোর্পাস-স্তরের মেশিন অনুবাদ মেট্রিক', 'ca': "La traducció màquina és un problem a natural de candidats per reforçar l'aprenentatge a partir del feedback humà: els usuaris proporcionen puntuacions ràpids i brutes en traduccions candidates per guiar un sistema per millorar. Però l'entrenament actual de traducció neural de màquines es centra en traduccions de referència generades per humans. Descrivem un algoritme d'aprenentatge de reforç que millora els sistemes de traducció neural a partir de feedback humà simulat. Our algorithm combines the advantage actor-critic algorithm (Mnih et al., 2016) with the attention-based neural encoder-decoder architecture (Luong et al., 2015).  Aquest algoritme a) està ben dissenyat per a problemes amb un gran espai d'acció i recompensas retrasades, b) optimitza efectivament les mètriques tradicionals de traducció de la màquina a nivell de corpus, i c) està robust per esquiar, alta variança, feedback granular modelat després de comportaments humans reals.", 'cs': 'Strojový překlad je přirozeným kandidátským problémem pro posílení učení z lidské zpětné vazby: uživatelé poskytují rychlé a špinavé hodnocení kandidátských překladů, které vedou systém ke zlepšení. Současné školení neuronového strojového překladu se však zaměřuje na drahé referenční překlady generované člověkem. Popisujeme algoritmus posilování učení, který zlepšuje neuronové strojové překladové systémy ze simulované lidské zpětné vazby. Náš algoritmus kombinuje výhodný aktor-kritický algoritmus (Mnih et al., 2016) s architekturou neuronového kodéru-dekodéru založenou na pozornosti (Luong et al., 2015). Tento algoritmus (a) je dobře navržen pro problémy s velkým akčním prostorem a zpožděnými odměnami, (b) efektivně optimalizuje tradiční metriky strojového překladu na úrovni korpusu a (c) je robustní pro zkreslené, vysoce rozptylné, granulární zpětné vazby modelované podle skutečného lidského chování.', 'et': 'Masintõlge on loomulik kandidaadiprobleem inimeste tagasisidest õppimise tugevdamiseks: kasutajad annavad kandidaadi tõlketele kiire ja räpase hinnangu, et juhtida süsteemi täiustamist. Ometi keskendub praegune neuraalse masintõlke koolitus kallitele inimese loodud viitetõlketele. Kirjeldame tugevdusõppe algoritmi, mis parandab neuromasintõlkesüsteeme simuleeritud inimeste tagasisidest. Meie algoritm ühendab näitleja-kriitilise algoritmi (Mnih et al., 2016) tähelepanupõhise neurokodeeri-dekooderi arhitektuuriga (Luong et al., 2015). See algoritm (a) on hästi mõeldud suure tegevusruumi ja hilinenud tasudega seotud probleemide lahendamiseks, (b) optimeerib tõhusalt traditsioonilisi korpuse tasemel masintõlke mõõdikuid ja (c) on tugev kuni kõrge varieeruvusega, granulaarne tagasiside modelleeritud pärast tegelikku inimkäitumist.', 'fi': 'Konekäännös on luonnollinen ehdokasongelma ihmisten palautteesta oppimiseen: käyttäjät antavat nopeita, likaisia arvioita ehdokaskäännöksistä ohjaamaan järjestelmää parantamaan. Nykyinen neurokonekäännöskoulutus keskittyy kuitenkin kalliisiin ihmisen tuottamiin referenssikäännöksiin. Kuvaamme vahvistuksen oppimisalgoritmia, joka parantaa neurokonekäännösjärjestelmiä simuloidusta ihmisen palautteesta. Algoritmimme yhdistää toimija-kriittisen algoritmin (Mnih et al., 2016) huomiopohjaiseen neurokooderi-dekooderiarkkitehtuuriin (Luong et al., 2015). Tämä algoritmi (a) on suunniteltu hyvin suuriin toimintatiloihin ja viivästyneisiin palkintoihin liittyviin ongelmiin, (b) optimoi tehokkaasti perinteiset korpustason konekäännösmittarit ja (c) on vankka ja vääristynyt, suuren varianssin omaava, rakeinen palaute mallinnettuna todellisen ihmisen käyttäytymisen perusteella.', 'az': 'Makina çevirilməsi insan geri bildirməsindən öyrənmək üçün təbiətli kandidat problemidir: istifadəçilər yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün sistemi yola yönəltmək üçün hızlı, pis dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərini təmin edirlər. Halbuki, ağıllı nöral maşın təhsil təhsil edilməsi insan təhsil edilmiş təhsil təhsil edilməsinə odaqlanır. Biz insan reaksiyonundan nöral makina çevirim sistemlərini yaxşılaşdırır. Algoritimiz aktör-kritik algoritmi (Mnih et al., 2016) ünsiyyət-tabanlı nöral koder-dekoder arhitektüsü ilə birləşdirir. Bu algoritm (a) b öyük eylem alanı və gecikmiş mükafatları olan problemlərə yaxşı tasarlanmışdır; b) ehtimal olaraq korpus səviyyəsi maşına çeviriş metriklərini optimizləyir; c) insan davranışlarından sonra modelləşdirilmiş, yüksək dəyişiklik, granular reaksiyonu güclüdür.', 'jv': 'Global options politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing paling nggawe Algorithm kuwi nggawe barang sistem itoleh karo sistem sing tarjamahan, kuwi nggawe barang apik dhéwé. Algorithm dhéwé ngerasakno karo akeh liyane operator-krit Algorithm Algorithm iki', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Babu da, fassarar masu aikin neural na fassarar maɓallin neural na fokus a kan masu kyautar mutane-manufactured Reference translation. Munã bayyana wani algoritm da za'a ƙara karanta algoritm wanda ya kyautata fassarar masu aikin neural daga sami'uran mutane. Algorityinmu yana koma da algoritm na amfani da mai muhimmi (Mnih et al., 2016) da bakin muhimmanci na aikin koder-coder (Luunget et al., 2015). @ info", 'he': 'התרגום מכונות הוא בעיה מועמדת טבעית לתגבורת למידה מהתגובה אנושית: משתמשים מספקים ציונים מהירים ומלוכלכים על התרגומות המועמדים כדי להדריך מערכת לשפר. עם זאת, האימונים הנוכחיים של מכונת התרגום העצבית מתמקדים בתרגומות התייחסות היקרות של האדם. אנו מתארים אלגוריתם למידת תגבורה שמשתפר מערכות התרגום של מכונות עצביות ממחזור אנושי סימולרי. האלגוריתם שלנו משלב את האלגוריתם היתרון של שחקן-מבקר (Mnih et al., 2016) עם ארכיטקטורת הקודר-קידור העצבי המבוססת על תשומת לב (Luong et al., 2015). אלגוריתם זה (a) מעוצב היטב לבעיות עם מרחב פעולה גדול ופרסים מאוחרים, (b) אופטימיזם באופן יעיל מטריות התרגום מכונות ברמה הקורפוס מסורתית, ו (c) הוא חזק לתערבות, שונות גבוהה, חזרה granular מודל לאחר התנהגויות האנושיות האמיתיות.', 'sk': 'Strojno prevajanje je naravna težava kandidata za krepitev učenja iz človeških povratnih informacij: uporabniki zagotavljajo hitre in umazane ocene kandidatov prevodov, ki vodijo sistem za izboljšanje. Vendar se trenutno usposabljanje za nevronsko strojno prevajanje osredotoča na drage referenčne prevode, ki jih ustvari človek. Opisujemo algoritem učenja ojačitve, ki izboljšuje sisteme nevronskega strojnega prevajanja iz simuliranih človeških povratnih informacij. Naš algoritem združuje prednostni aktersko-kritični algoritem (Mnih et al., 2016) z arhitekturo nevronskih kodirnikov-dekoderjev, ki temelji na pozornosti (Luong et al., 2015). Ta algoritem (a) je dobro zasnovan za težave z velikim akcijskim prostorom in zakasnjenimi nagradami, (b) učinkovito optimizira tradicionalne meritve strojnega prevajanja na ravni korpusa in (c) je robusten do nagnjenih, visoko variančnih, granularnih povratnih informacij, modeliranih po dejanskem človeškem vedenju.', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ལྗེས་སྤྱོད་ནི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དངོས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐྱེས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་གཞུང་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྗོད་སྒྲུང་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོ ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་སྐྱོན་བྱེད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འདི་མཉམ་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། This algorithm (a) is well-designed for problems with a large action space and delayed rewards, (b) effectively optimizes traditional corpus-level machine translation metrics, and (c) is robust to skewed, high-variance, granular feedback modeled after actual human behavior.'}
{'en': 'Towards Compact and Fast Neural Machine Translation Using a Combined Method', 'ar': 'نحو ترجمة آلية عصبية مدمجة وسريعة باستخدام طريقة مشتركة', 'fr': "Vers une traduction automatique neuronale compacte et rapide à l'aide d'une méthode combinée", 'es': 'Hacia una traducción automática neuronal compacta y rápida mediante un método combinado', 'pt': 'Em direção à tradução automática neural compacta e rápida usando um método combinado', 'ja': '複合的な手法を用いた、コンパクトで高速な神経機械翻訳に向けて', 'hi': 'कॉम्पैक्ट और फास्ट न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद की ओर एक संयुक्त विधि का उपयोग कर', 'zh': '合而成神经机器翻译', 'ru': 'На пути к компактному и быстрому нейронному машинному переводу с использованием комбинированного метода', 'ga': 'I dtreo Aistriú Meaisín Néarach Dlúth agus Tapaidh le Modh Comhcheangailte', 'ka': 'Compact and Fast Neural Machine Translation', 'hu': 'A kompakt és gyors idegi gépi fordítás felé kombinált módszerrel', 'el': 'Προς τη συμπαγή και γρήγορη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση χρησιμοποιώντας μια συνδυασμένη μέθοδο', 'it': 'Verso una traduzione automatica neurale compatta e veloce utilizzando un metodo combinato', 'lt': 'Komplektinio ir greito nervinių mašinų vertimo link taikant kombinuotą metodą', 'kk': 'Комбинациялық әдісін қолдану арқылы компакт және тез неврал машинаны аудару', 'mk': 'Напред кон компактна и брза превод на неврална машина користејќи комбиниран метод', 'ms': 'Ke arah Terjemahan Mesin Neural Kompak dan Cepat menggunakan Kaedah Bergabung', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്ക് കണക്ട് ചെയ്ത മാറ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വേഗം നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'Lejn traduzzjoni kompatta u mgħa ġġla tal-Makkinarju Newrali bl-użu ta’ Metodu Magħqud', 'mn': 'Комплекс болон хурдан мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт руу', 'no': 'Til kompakt og rask neuralmaskinsomsetjing ved bruk av ein kombinasjon metode', 'pl': 'W kierunku kompaktowego i szybkiego tłumaczenia maszynowego neuronowego przy użyciu metody połączonej', 'sr': 'Do kompaktnog i brzog neuronskog prevoda sa kombiniranim metodom', 'ro': 'Către traducerea automată neurală compactă și rapidă folosind o metodă combinată', 'si': 'Compact and Fast neural machine translation', 'so': 'Towards Compact and Fast Neural machine Translation Using a Combined Method', 'sv': 'Mot kompakt och snabb neural maskinöversättning med hjälp av en kombinerad metod', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'کمپیٹ اور تیز نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới một trình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh tổng hợp và nhanh', 'bg': 'Към компактен и бърз неврален машинен превод чрез комбиниран метод', 'hr': 'Do kompaktnog i brzog neurološkog prevoda s kombiniranim metodom', 'da': 'På vej mod kompakt og hurtig neural maskinoversættelse ved hjælp af en kombineret metode', 'nl': 'Naar compacte en snelle neurale machinevertaling met behulp van een gecombineerde methode', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu kompakter und schneller neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung mit kombinierter Methode', 'ko': '조합 방법을 사용하여 치밀하고 빠른 신경 기계 번역을 실현하다', 'id': 'Menuju Perjemahan Mesin Neural Kompak dan Cepat menggunakan Metode Kombinasi', 'fa': 'به سمت ترجمه و سریع ترجمه ماشین عصبی با استفاده از روش پیوند', 'sw': 'Utafsiri wa Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'af': "Na Kompakte en Vinnige Neurale Masjien Vertaling deur gebruik van 'n Kombineerde Metode", 'tr': 'Kombinat we Çalt Jawanyň Terjimesine Ýarda', 'sq': 'Për përkthimin kompakt dhe të shpejtë të makinës nervore duke përdorur një metodë të kombinuar', 'am': 'Used a Combined Method', 'hy': 'Համեկցված և արագ նեյրոնային մեքենայի թարգմանություն օգտագործելով համադրված մեթոդ', 'az': 'Kompakt v톛 H캼zl캼 N칬ral Makinesi 칂evir톛m톛sin톛 t톛r톛f', 'bn': 'একটি কমবিনামিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে উপরে যোগাযোগ এবং দ্রুত নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'bs': 'Do kompaktnog i brzog neuronskog prevoda s kombiniranom metodom', 'ca': 'Vers la traducció de màquines neuronals compactes i ràpids utilitzant un mètode combinat', 'cs': 'K kompaktnímu a rychlému strojovému překladu s využitím kombinované metody', 'et': 'Kompaktse ja kiire neuromasintõlke suunas kombineeritud meetodi abil', 'fi': 'Kohti kompaktia ja nopeaa neurokonekäännöstä yhdistettyä menetelmää käyttäen', 'jv': 'Tulung kompct karo fast Neral Masine Terjamahan Ngawe Metoton Kombined', 'sk': 'K kompaktnemu in hitremu živčnemu strojnemu prevajanju s kombinirano metodo', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'לכיוון התרגום של מכונת נוירולית משותפת ומהירה באמצעות שיטה משולבת', 'bo': 'མདོར་བསྡུས་དང་མགྱོགས་མྱུར་བའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་ནུས་'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) lays intensive burden on computation and memory cost. It is a challenge to deploy NMT models on the devices with limited computation and memory budgets. This paper presents a four stage pipeline to compress model and speed up the decoding for NMT. Our method first introduces a compact architecture based on convolutional encoder and weight shared embeddings. Then weight pruning is applied to obtain a sparse model. Next, we propose a fast sequence interpolation approach which enables the greedy decoding to achieve performance on par with the beam search. Hence, the time-consuming beam search can be replaced by simple greedy decoding. Finally, vocabulary selection is used to reduce the computation of softmax layer. Our final model achieves 10 times speedup, 17 times parameters reduction, less than 35 MB storage size and comparable performance compared to the baseline model.', 'ar': 'تضع الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) عبئًا مكثفًا على تكلفة الحساب والذاكرة. يعد نشر نماذج NMT على الأجهزة ذات ميزانيات الحساب والذاكرة المحدودة تحديًا. يقدم هذا البحث خط أنابيب من أربع مراحل لضغط النموذج وتسريع فك التشفير لـ NMT. تقدم طريقتنا أولاً بنية مدمجة تعتمد على التشفير التلافيفي وحفلات الزفاف المشتركة الوزن. ثم يتم تطبيق تقليم الوزن للحصول على نموذج ضئيل. بعد ذلك ، نقترح نهج الاستيفاء المتسلسل السريع الذي يمكّن فك التشفير الجشع من تحقيق أداء على قدم المساواة مع البحث الشعاعي. وبالتالي ، يمكن استبدال البحث الشعاعي الذي يستغرق وقتًا طويلاً بفك تشفير بسيط جشع. أخيرًا ، يتم استخدام اختيار المفردات لتقليل حساب طبقة softmax. يحقق نموذجنا النهائي سرعة 10 مرات ، وتقليلًا للمعلمات 17 مرة ، وحجم تخزين أقل من 35 ميجابايت وأداءً مشابهًا مقارنةً بالنموذج الأساسي.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) impose une charge importante sur les coûts de calcul et de mémoire. Il est difficile de déployer des modèles NMT sur des appareils dont les budgets de calcul et de mémoire sont limités. Cet article présente un pipeline en quatre étapes pour compresser le modèle et accélérer le décodage pour NMT. Notre méthode introduit d'abord une architecture compacte basée sur un encodeur convolutif et des intégrations à poids partagé. Ensuite, l'élagage au poids est appliqué pour obtenir un modèle clairsemé. Ensuite, nous proposons une approche d'interpolation de séquence rapide qui permet au décodage gourmand d'atteindre des performances comparables à celles de la recherche de faisceau. Ainsi, la recherche de faisceau fastidieuse peut être remplacée par un simple décodage gourmand. Enfin, la sélection de vocabulaire est utilisée pour réduire le calcul de la couche softmax. Notre modèle final atteint une accélération 10 fois, une réduction des paramètres 17 fois plus importante, une taille de stockage inférieure à 35 Mo et des performances comparables par rapport au modèle de base.", 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal (NMT) supone una carga intensiva en los costos de computación y memoria. Implementar modelos de NMT en los dispositivos con presupuestos limitados de computación y memoria es todo un desafío. Este artículo presenta una canalización de cuatro etapas para comprimir el modelo y acelerar la decodificación para NMT. Nuestro método primero introduce una arquitectura compacta basada en codificadores convolucionales e incrustaciones de peso compartido. Luego se aplica poda de peso para obtener un modelo escaso. A continuación, proponemos un enfoque de interpolación de secuencia rápida que permite que la decodificación codiciosa logre un rendimiento a la par con la búsqueda de haces. Por lo tanto, la búsqueda de haces que consume mucho tiempo puede sustituirse por una simple decodificación codiciosa. Finalmente, la selección de vocabulario se utiliza para reducir el cálculo de la capa softmax. Nuestro modelo final logra una aceleración de 10 veces, una reducción de parámetros 17 veces, un tamaño de almacenamiento inferior a 35 MB y un rendimiento comparable en comparación con el modelo de referencia.', 'pt': 'A Tradução Automática Neural (NMT) impõe um fardo intensivo à computação e ao custo da memória. É um desafio implantar modelos NMT nos dispositivos com recursos limitados de computação e memória. Este artigo apresenta um pipeline de quatro estágios para compactar o modelo e acelerar a decodificação para NMT. Nosso método primeiro introduz uma arquitetura compacta baseada em codificador convolucional e embeddings compartilhados de peso. Em seguida, a poda de peso é aplicada para obter um modelo esparso. Em seguida, propomos uma abordagem de interpolação de sequência rápida que permite que a decodificação gulosa alcance desempenho no mesmo nível da busca de feixe. Assim, a busca de feixe demorada pode ser substituída por uma simples decodificação gulosa. Finalmente, a seleção de vocabulário é usada para reduzir o cálculo da camada softmax. Nosso modelo final atinge 10 vezes a velocidade, 17 vezes a redução de parâmetros, menos de 35 MB de tamanho de armazenamento e desempenho comparável em comparação com o modelo de linha de base.', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）は、計算とメモリコストに集中的な負担をもたらします。計算とメモリの予算が限られているデバイスにNMTモデルを導入することは困難です。モデルを圧縮し、NMTのデコードを高速化するための4段階のパイプラインを提示した。当社の方法は、まず、畳み込みエンコーダと重み共有埋め込みに基づくコンパクトなアーキテクチャを導入します。次に、重量枝刈りを適用してまばらなモデルを得る。次に、貪欲なデコードがビームサーチと同等のパフォーマンスを達成することを可能にする高速シーケンス補間アプローチを提案します。したがって、時間のかかるビーム検索は、単純な貪欲なデコードによって置き換えることができる。最後に、語彙選択を使用して、ソフトマックスレイヤーの計算を削減します。当社の最終モデルは、ベースラインモデルと比較して、10倍のスピードアップ、17倍のパラメータ削減、35 MB未満のストレージサイズ、および同等のパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)与计内存成本重累。 计内存有限 NMT 一以挑战。 本文设四段管道,压缩模形并快NMT解码速度。 吾法先引一基于卷积编码器权共嵌架构。 然后权重修剪,以得疏模。 继之以速序插值术,使贪解码得与波束索相当。 是以耗时之波束索,可以为简贪解码所代。 最后,用词汇择以损softmax数。 比之於准,吾终得10倍之速,17倍之参数少,小於35MB之存储大小与可比之性也。', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) ложится тяжелым бременем на вычисления и стоимость памяти. Развертывание моделей NMT на устройствах с ограниченным бюджетом вычислительной техники и памяти является сложной задачей. В настоящем документе представлен четырехступенчатый конвейер для сжатия модели и ускорения декодирования для НБП. Наш метод сначала вводит компактную архитектуру, основанную на сверточном кодере и весовых общих вложениях. Затем производят обрезку веса с получением разреженной модели. Далее мы предлагаем подход быстрой интерполяции последовательностей, который позволяет жадному декодированию достичь производительности наравне с поиском луча. Следовательно, длительный поиск луча может быть заменен простым жадным декодированием. Наконец, выбор словаря используется для уменьшения вычислений уровня softmax. Наша окончательная модель достигает 10-кратного ускорения, 17-кратного снижения параметров, меньшего размера хранилища 35 МБ и сопоставимой производительности по сравнению с базовой моделью.', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (NMT) गणना और स्मृति लागत पर गहन बोझ डालता है। सीमित गणना और स्मृति बजट वाले उपकरणों पर एनएमटी मॉडल को तैनात करना एक चुनौती है। यह पेपर मॉडल को संपीड़ित करने और एनएमटी के लिए डिकोडिंग को गति देने के लिए एक चार चरण पाइपलाइन प्रस्तुत करता है। हमारी विधि पहले convolutional एन्कोडर और वजन साझा एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर एक कॉम्पैक्ट वास्तुकला का परिचय देती है। फिर एक विरल मॉडल प्राप्त करने के लिए वजन की छंटाई लागू की जाती है। इसके बाद, हम एक तेज अनुक्रम इंटरपोलेशन दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो लालची डिकोडिंग को बीम खोज के बराबर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में सक्षम बनाता है। इसलिए, समय लेने वाली बीम खोज को सरल लालची डिकोडिंग द्वारा प्रतिस्थापित किया जा सकता है। अंत में, शब्दावली चयन का उपयोग सॉफ्टमैक्स परत की गणना को कम करने के लिए किया जाता है। हमारा अंतिम मॉडल बेसलाइन मॉडल की तुलना में 10 गुना स्पीडअप, 17 गुना पैरामीटर में कमी, 35 एमबी भंडारण आकार से कम और तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Leagann Neural Machine Translation (NMT) ualach dian ar an gcostas ríomh agus cuimhne. Is dúshlán é samhlacha NMT a imscaradh ar na gléasanna le buiséid ríomha agus chuimhne teoranta. Cuireann an páipéar seo píblíne ceithre chéim i láthair chun an tsamhail a chomhbhrú agus chun an díchódú do NMT a bhrostú. Tugann ár modh ailtireacht dhlúth isteach ar dtús bunaithe ar ionchódóra réchúiseach agus leabaithe comhroinnte meáchain. Ansin cuirtear bearradh meáchain i bhfeidhm chun múnla gann a fháil. Next, molaimid cur chuige idirshuíomh seicheamh tapa a chuireann ar chumas an díchódaithe greedy feidhmíocht a bhaint amach ar chomhchéim leis an gcuardach léas. Mar sin, is féidir díchódú greedy simplí a chur in ionad an chuardaigh bíomaí a ídíonn am. Ar deireadh, úsáidtear roghnú stór focal chun ríomh ciseal softmax a laghdú. Baineann ár múnla deiridh amach 10 n-uaire luas suas, 17 n-uaire laghdú paraiméadair, níos lú ná méid stórála 35MB agus feidhmíocht inchomparáide i gcomparáid leis an múnla bunlíne.', 'ka': 'Name NMT მოდელების გამოყენება მოწყობილობებით, რომლებიც კომპიუტაცია და მეხსიერების ბუჯეტები გადაყენება. ეს დოკუმენტი გამოყენებს ოთხჯერ ფესტის ფესტი, რომელიც მოდელის კომპრექტირება და სწრაფილობა NMT-ის დეკოდირება. ჩვენი მეთოდი პირველად კომპოქტური აქტიქტიქტიკის შესახებ კონტუალური კოდირების და გარეშე გარეშე შესახებ. შემდეგ სიმაღლე მოწყობილობა დააყენებულია, რომ მიიღებთ სიმაღლე მოდელს. შემდეგ, ჩვენ გვეძლევთ სწრაფად სექსეციის ინტერპოლაციის მიზეზი, რომელიც მოძლევს სექსეციის კონფიგურაციას გავაკეთოთ სექსეცია სექსეციის ამიტომ, სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყ საბოლოოდ, სიტყვალური მონიშნულება გამოყენება სიტყვალური მონიშნულება სიტყვალური სიტყვალის გამოყენება. ჩვენი ბოლო მოდელი 10-ჯერ სიჩქარე, 17-ჯერ პარამეტრების სიჩქარე, 35MB-ზე ნაკლები სიჩქარე და შემდგომარებელი გამოყენება, რომლებიც ბაზის მოდელთან შემდგო', 'hu': 'A Neural Machine Translation (NMT) intenzív terhet jelent a számítási és memóriaköltségekre. Kihívást jelent az NMT modellek telepítése korlátozott számítási és memóriaköltségvetéssel rendelkező eszközökön. Ez a tanulmány egy négy lépcsős csővezetéket mutat be a modell tömörítésére és az NMT dekódolásának felgyorsítására. Módszerünk először egy kompakt architektúrát vezet be, amely konvolúciós kódolókon és súlymegosztott beágyazásokon alapul. Ezután súlyos metszést alkalmaznak a ritka modell eléréséhez. Ezt követően egy gyors szekvencia interpolációs megközelítést javasolunk, amely lehetővé teszi a kapzsi dekódolás számára, hogy teljesítményt érjen el a sugárkereséssel egyenlő. Ezért az időigényes sugárkeresés helyettesíthető egyszerű kapzsi dekódolással. Végül a szókincs kiválasztását használják a softmax réteg kiszámításának csökkentésére. A végső modellünk 10-szeres gyorsulást, 17-szeres paraméterek csökkentést, kevesebb mint 35 MB tárolási méretet és összehasonlítható teljesítményt ér el az alapmodellhez képest.', 'el': 'Η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) επιβαρύνει έντονα τον υπολογισμό και το κόστος μνήμης. Είναι μια πρόκληση να αναπτυχθούν μοντέλα σε συσκευές με περιορισμένους προϋπολογισμούς υπολογισμού και μνήμης. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει έναν αγωγό τεσσάρων σταδίων για τη συμπίεση του μοντέλου και την επιτάχυνση της αποκωδικοποίησης για το NMT. Η μέθοδος μας εισάγει πρώτα μια συμπαγή αρχιτεκτονική βασισμένη σε σύνθετο κωδικοποιητή και κοινές ενσωματώσεις βάρους. Στη συνέχεια, εφαρμόζεται κλάδεμα βάρους για να ληφθεί ένα αραιό μοντέλο. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε μια γρήγορη προσέγγιση παρεμβολής ακολουθίας που επιτρέπει στην άπληστη αποκωδικοποίηση να επιτύχει απόδοση ίση με την αναζήτηση ακτίνων. Ως εκ τούτου, η χρονοβόρα αναζήτηση ακτίνων μπορεί να αντικατασταθεί από απλή άπληστη αποκωδικοποίηση. Τέλος, η επιλογή λεξιλογίου χρησιμοποιείται για τη μείωση του υπολογισμού του στρώματος softmax. Το τελικό μας μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει 10-φορές επιτάχυνση, 17-φορές μείωση παραμέτρων, μικρότερο από 35μέγεθος αποθήκευσης και συγκρίσιμη απόδοση σε σύγκριση με το μοντέλο βάσης.', 'it': "Neural Machine Translation (NMT) grava pesantemente sui costi di calcolo e di memoria. È una sfida implementare modelli NMT sui dispositivi con budget di calcolo e memoria limitati. Questo documento presenta una pipeline a quattro stadi per comprimere il modello e accelerare la decodifica per NMT. Il nostro metodo introduce in primo luogo un'architettura compatta basata su encoder convoluzionale e incorporazioni di peso condiviso. Successivamente viene applicata la potatura del peso per ottenere un modello sparso. Successivamente, proponiamo un approccio di interpolazione rapida della sequenza che consente alla decodifica avida di ottenere prestazioni alla pari con la ricerca del fascio. Quindi, la ricerca del fascio richiede tempo può essere sostituita da una semplice decodifica avida. Infine, la selezione del vocabolario viene utilizzata per ridurre il calcolo del livello softmax. Il nostro modello finale raggiunge 10 volte velocità, 17 volte riduzione dei parametri, meno di 35 MB di spazio di archiviazione e prestazioni paragonabili rispetto al modello di base.", 'lt': 'Neuralinės mašinos vertimo (NMT) našta yra didelė skaičiavimo ir atminties sąnaudoms. It is a challenge to deploy NMT models on the devices with limited computation and memory budgets.  Šiame dokumente pateikiamas keturių etapų vamzdynas, skirtas suspausti model į ir paspartinti NMT dekodiavimą. Mūsų metodas pirmiausia įdiegia kompaktinę architektūrą, grindžiamą konvoliuciniu kodatoriumi ir svorio daliniais įterpimais. Tuomet, siekiant gauti nedidelį model į, naudojamas svorio skalbimas. Kita vertus, siūlome greitą sekos interpoliavimo metodą, kuris leistų greedy dekoding pasiekti rezultatus lygiaverčius šviesos paieškai. Hence, the time-consuming beam search can be replaced by simple greedy decoding.  Galiausiai žodyno atranka naudojama softmax sluoksnio skaičiavimui sumažinti. Mūsų galutinis modelis pasiekia 10 kartų didesnį greitį, 17 kartų mažesnį parametrą, mažesnį kaip 35MB saugojimo dydį ir panašų veiksmingumą, palyginti su pradiniu modeliu.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасы (NMT) есептеу мен жады бағаларында тең жүктеу береді. NMT үлгілерін шектелген есептеу және жады бөлшектерінің құрылғыларына орналастыру мәселесі. Бұл қағаз үлгісін сығып NMT декодтамасын жылдамдықтау үшін төрт сәйкес сызығын көрсетеді. Біздің әдіміміз біріншіден конвольциялық кодерге және қатты ортақтастырылған ендірудің негізінде компакт архитектурасын таңдайды. Содан кейін қатты қисық үлгісін алу үшін қолданылады. Келесіден, біз жылдам реттеу интерполяциялық тәсілдерді ұсынамыз. Бұл жерде жұлдыз іздеу үшін жұлдыздық декодтауын жеткізуге мүмкіндік береді. Сондықтан уақыт бойынша сұрақ іздеу қарапайым сұрақтық декодтауымен алмастырылады. Соңында, сөздік таңдауы жабысша қабаттың есептерін азайту үшін қолданылады. Біздің соңғы үлгіміз 10 рет жылдамдығын, 17 рет параметрлерді азайту, 35Мб сақтау өлшемінен төмендету және негізгі үлгісімен салыстыруға болады.', 'mk': 'Неурална машинска транслекција (НМТ) поставува интензивно товар на компјутацијата и цената на меморијата. Тоа е предизвик да се распоредуваат НМТ модели на уредите со ограничени компјутери и мемориски буџети. Оваа хартија претставува четири фази гасовод за компресирање на моделот и забрзување на декодирањето на НМТ. Нашиот метод прво претставува компактна архитектура базирана на конволуционален кодер и делени вградувања на тежина. Тогаш тежината се применува за да се добие мал модел. Следно, предложуваме брз пристап на интерполација со секвенца кој овозможува алчното декодирање да постигне резултати во споредба со пребарувањето на зраците. Поради тоа, потрошувачкиот прозорец може да се замени со едноставно алчно декодирање. Конечно, изборот на речникот се користи за намалување на пресметката на слојот softmax. Нашиот финален модел постигнува 10 пати брзина, 17 пати намалување на параметрите, помалку од 35 МБ големина на складиште и споредлива резултатност во споредба со основниот модел.', 'ms': 'Penerjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) menetapkan beban intens pada pengiraan dan biaya memori. Ia adalah cabaran untuk menggunakan model NMT pada peranti dengan komputer dan anggaran ingatan terbatas. Kertas ini memperkenalkan paip empat tahap untuk memaksa model dan mempercepat penyahkodan untuk NMT. Our method first introduces a compact architecture based on convolutional encoder and weight shared embeddings.  Kemudian pemotongan berat dilaksanakan untuk mendapatkan model yang sedikit. Seterusnya, kita cadangkan pendekatan interpolasi urutan cepat yang membolehkan penyahkodan serakah untuk mencapai prestasi sama dengan pencarian cahaya. Hence, the time-consuming beam search can be replaced by simple greedy decoding.  Akhirnya, pemilihan vokbulari digunakan untuk mengurangi perhitungan lapisan softmax. Model akhir kita mencapai 10 kali speedup, 17 kali pengurangan parameter, kurang dari saiz storan 35MB dan prestasi yang sama dibandingkan dengan model asas.', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനും മെമ്മറിയുടെ ചെലവഴിക്കും വലുതായ ഭാരം ഇടുന്നു. എംഎംടി മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപകരണങ്ങളിലേക്ക് പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പരിധിയുള്ള കണക്ക് കണക്കും മെമ്മറി ബാഗറ്റുകളും ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നാല് സ്റ്റേജ് പൈപ്പിളൈന്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പ്രോസ്സ് മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും NMT-നുള്ള ഡോകോഡ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു കമ്പ്യൂട്ട് ആര്\u200dക്കറ്റിക്കേറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ക്രൂപ്റ പിന്നീട് ഭാരം പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു സ്പാസ് മോഡല്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കാനാണ്. അടുത്ത്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വേഗത്തിലുള്ള സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ഇന്\u200dറര്\u200dപ്പോളേഷന്\u200d നടപടിയാണ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നത്. അത് പാര്\u200dക്ക് പാര്\u200dക്ക് പ അതുകൊണ്ട്, സമയത്തിനുള്ള ബീമിന്\u200dറെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള ലോഗ്യത്തിന് പകരം മാറ്റാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. Finally, vocabulary selection is used to reduce the computation of softmax layer.  നമ്മുടെ അവസാനത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d പത്തിരട്ടി വേഗത്തില്\u200d എത്തുന്നു, 17 തവണ പരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200d കുറവും, 35എം സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വലിപ്പം കുറഞ്ഞത', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) тооцоолох болон санамжийн үнэ дээр маш их хүндрэлтэй хөгжүүлдэг. NMT загварыг хязгаарлагдсан тооцоолол, санамжийн бюджеттэй төхөөрөмж дээр ашиглах зорилго юм. Энэ цаас NMT-ийн загварыг цэвэрлэх болон хурдан шилжүүлэх дөрвөн этэйн хоолойн шугам болгодог. Эхлээд бидний арга нь холбогдолтой кодер болон жингийн хуваалцагдсан байгууллагуудын үндсэн компьютер барилгуудыг танилцуулдаг. Дараа нь жингийн загвар авахын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Дараагийн дараа, бид хурдан дараагийн интерполационы арга замыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь галзуу хайртай ажиллагааны талаар илтгэл хөдлөл хийх боломжтой. Тиймээс цаг хугацааны хэрэглэгч газрын хайлтыг энгийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой. Эцэст нь үгийн сонголт нь савны давхарын тооцооллыг багасгах хэрэгтэй. Бидний сүүлийн загвар нь 10 дахин хурдан, 17 дахин параметр багасгах, 35Мб хадгалах хэмжээнээс бага, суурь шугам загвартай харьцуулагдах үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'mt': 'It-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali (NMT) tqiegħed piż intensiv fuq il-komputazzjoni u l-ispiża tal-memorja. Huwa sfida li jintużaw mudelli NMT fuq l-apparati b’baġits limitati tal-komputazzjoni u l-memorja. Din il-karta tippreżenta pipeline ta’ erba’ stadji biex tikkompressa l-mudell u tħaffef id-dekodifikazzjoni għall-NMT. Il-metodu tagħna l-ewwel jintroduċi arkitettura kompatta bbażata fuq kodiċi konvoluzzjonali u inkorporazzjonijiet kondiviżi tal-piż. Imbagħad jiġi applikat il-pruning tal-piż biex jinkiseb mudell baxx. Next, we propose a fast sequence interpolation approach which enables the greedy decoding to achieve performance on par with the beam search.  Għaldaqstant, it-tiftix tar-raġġ li jieħu ż-żmien jista’ jiġi sostitwit b’dekodifikazzjoni sempliċi li tiflaħ. Fl-aħħar nett, l-għażla tal-vokabulari tintuża biex titnaqqas il-komputazzjoni tas-saff softmax. Il-mudell finali tagħna jilħaq 10 darbiet aktar veloċità, 17-il darba tnaqqis fil-parametri, inqas minn 35 MB fid-daqs tal-ħżin u prestazzjoni komparabbli meta mqabbel mal-mudell tal-linja bażi.', 'no': 'NMT- omsetjing av nøyralmaskinen lagar intensivt lasting på datamaskinen og minnekost. Det er eit utfordring å utføra NMT-modeller på einingane med begrenset datamaskin og minnebjektar. Denne papiret viser ein fire stadsrøyr for å komprimera modell og spelt opp kodinga for NMT. Metoden vårt først introduserer eit kompakt arkitektur basert på konvolusjonell koder og vekt delt innbøkingar. Deretter vert vektsprøven brukt for å få eit sparse modell. Neste foreslår vi ein rask sekvens-interpolasjonstilnærming som gjer at grøndedekodingen kan oppnå utføringar på par med straumsøket. Dette kan derfor søkja på strålen som brukar tidspunkt bytte ut med enkelt grønnkoding. Slutt blir ordbokvalet brukt for å redusera utrekninga av måkstmaks- laget. Det siste modellet har 10 ganger raskare, 17 ganger reduksjon av parametrar, mindre enn 35MB lagringsstorleik og sammenlignbare utviklingar samanlikna med baseline-modellen.', 'sr': 'Neuralno prevodenje mašine (NMT) stavlja intenzivni teret na troškove računala i uspomene. To je izazov da rasporedimo NMT modele na uređajima sa ograničenim računalom i budžetima za pamćenje. Ovaj papir predstavlja četiri faze cijevi za kompresiju model a i ubrzanje dekodiranja za NMT. Naša metoda prvo predstavlja kompaktnu arhitekturu na osnovu konvolucionalnog kodera i podeljenog ugrađenja težine. Onda se primjenjuje obrezanje težine da dobije rezervni model. Sledeće, predlažemo brzi pristup interpolaciji, koji omogućava pohlepnom dekodiranju da postigne izvedbu na par sa pretraživanjem zraka. Zato traženje zraka potrošnja vremena može da se zameni jednostavnim pohlepnim dekodiranjem. Konačno se izražavanje rečnika koristi za smanjenje računala softmax sloja. Naš poslednji model postiže 10 puta ubrzanje, 17 puta smanjenje parametara, manje od 35MB veličine skladišta i usporedno provedbe u usporedbi sa početnim modelom.', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) wiąże się z dużym obciążeniem kosztów obliczeń i pamięci. Wyzwaniem jest wdrażanie modeli NMT na urządzeniach o ograniczonym budżecie obliczeń i pamięci. Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia cztestopniowy rurociąg do kompresji modelu i przyspieszenia dekodowania NMT. Nasza metoda najpierw wprowadza kompaktową architekturę opartą na konwolucyjnym koderze i osadzeniach współdzielonych wagą. Następnie stosuje się przycinanie ciężaru, aby uzyskać rzadki model. Następnie proponujemy szybkie podejście interpolacji sekwencji, które pozwala chciwemu dekodowaniu osiągnąć wydajność na równi z wyszukiwaniem wiązki. Dlatego czasochłonne wyszukiwanie wiązki można zastąpić prostym chciwym dekodowaniem. Wreszcie, wybór słownictwa służy do zmniejszenia obliczeń warstwy softmax. Nasz końcowy model osiąga 10-krotną przyspieszenie, 17-krotną redukcję parametrów, mniejszą niż 35MB pamięci masowej i porównywalną wydajność w porównaniu z modelem bazowym.', 'ro': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) pune o povară intensă asupra costurilor de calcul și memorie. Este o provocare să implementați modele NMT pe dispozitivele cu bugete limitate de calcul și memorie. Această lucrare prezintă o conductă în patru etape pentru comprimarea modelului și accelerarea decodificării pentru NMT. Metoda noastră introduce mai întâi o arhitectură compactă bazată pe encoder convoluțional și încorporări de greutate partajate. Apoi se aplică tăierea în greutate pentru a obține un model rar. Apoi, propunem o abordare rapidă de interpolare a secvențelor care permite decodificarea lacomă să obțină performanțe la egalitate cu căutarea fasciculului. Prin urmare, căutarea razei consumatoare de timp poate fi înlocuită cu o simplă decodare lacomă. În cele din urmă, selectarea vocabularului este folosită pentru a reduce calculul stratului softmax. Modelul nostru final atinge o viteză de 10 ori, o reducere de 17 ori a parametrilor, o dimensiune de stocare mai mică de 35 MB și performanțe comparabile comparativ cu modelul de bază.', 'so': "Turjumidda gaadiidka (NMT) wuxuu saaraa culaab aad u weyn xisaabinta iyo kharashka xasuusta. Waa dhibaato in lagu soo diro muulooyinka NMT oo qalabka ku qoran xisaabinta iyo budgetarka xasuusta. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo bandhigaa afar darajad oo ay hoos u dhigto model iyo dhaqso codsiga NMT. Midabkayaga marka ugu horeysa wuxuu soo bandhigaa dhismaha heshiiska, taasoo ku saleysan qorsheynta bulshada iyo miisaanka oo saameysan. Then weight pruning is applied to obtain a sparse model.  Inta dambe, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo aad u dhaqdhaqaaqdo, taasoo awoodda in faa'iidada faa'iidada lagu helo baarka. Markaas waxaa lagu beddeli karaa qiimeynta faa'iidada sahliga ah oo ku sahlan. Ugu dambaysta waxaa loo isticmaalaa in la koobo xisaabinta xarunta saxda ah. Tusaalka ugu dambeeya wuxuu gaadhaa 10 jeer oo sii korodhsada, 17 jeer in parameters la kordhiyo, wax ka yar kaydsashada 35MB iyo tababarka u eg sameynta sameynta hoose.", 'sv': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) lägger stor börda på beräknings- och minneskostnader. Det är en utmaning att distribuera NMT-modeller på enheter med begränsade beräknings- och minnesbudgetar. Denna uppsats presenterar en fyra steg pipeline för att komprimera modell och påskynda avkodningen för NMT. Vår metod introducerar först en kompakt arkitektur baserad på konvulutionskodare och viktdelade inbäddningar. Därefter appliceras viktbeskärning för att få en gles modell. Därefter föreslår vi en snabb sekvensinterpoleringsmetod som gör det möjligt för den giriga avkodningen att uppnå prestanda i nivå med strålsökningen. Därför kan den tidskrävande strålsökningen ersättas av enkel girig avkodning. Slutligen används ordförråd val för att minska beräkningen av softmax lager. Vår slutliga modell uppnår 10 gånger snabbare hastighet, 17 gånger lägre parametrar, mindre än 35 MB lagringsstorlek och jämförbar prestanda jämfört med basmodellen.', 'si': 'පරිගණනය සහ මතකය විශේෂය සඳහා නිර්මාණ මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) විශේෂ භාරයක් තියෙනවා. ඒක අභ්\u200dයානයක් තමයි NMT මොඩේල් එක්ක සීමාවිත පරිගණනය සහ මතකය බිජෙට්ට් එක්ක උපකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශන මේ පැත්තේ ස්ටේජ් පායිප්ලින් හතරක් පෙන්වන්නවා NMT වෙනුවෙන් ඩිකොඩ් එක ඉක්මන් කරන්න. අපේ පළමු විදියට සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථාපනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථාපනයක් සහ බර ඊට පස්සේ බර ප්\u200dරින්සින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ලැබෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. ඊළඟට, අපි ඉක්මනින් ඉක්මනින් පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ග්\u200dරීඩි ඩිකොඩ් එක ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ඉතින්, වෙලාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සැලසුම් ග්\u200dරීඩි ඩිකෝඩ් වලින්. අන්තිමේදි, ශබ්ධ භාෂාවක් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න සෝඩ් විශ්වාස කරන්න. අපේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරමාණය 10 පාරක් වේගයෙන්, 17 පාරක් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් අඩුවෙන්, 35මැබ් සංග්රහණයේ ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් අඩුවෙන් 35මැබ', 'ta': 'நெய்ரல் இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) கணக்கில் மற்றும் நினைவு செலவுக்கு உயரமான சுமையை அமைக்கிறது. Name This paper presents a four stage pipeline to compress model and speed up the decoding for NMT.  நம்முடைய முறைமையில் முழுமையான குறியீட்டு மற்றும் எடை பகிர்ந்த பொருள்களை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு ஒப்பிட்ட அடிப் பின்னர் எடை விளக்கம் ஒரு சிறிய மாதிரி பெறுவதற்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும். அடுத்து, நாம் ஒரு வேகமான தொடர்ச்சி இடைவெளியீட்டு செயல்பாட்டை நினைவூட்டுகிறோம். அது பசி தேடுதல் மூலம் செயல்படுத்தும்  அதனால், நேரத்தில் பயன்படுத்தும் beam தேடுதல் எளிமையான பொருள் அலங்காரத்தால் மாற்றப்பட முடியும். கடைசியாக, மென்பொருள் அடுக்கு கணக்கினை குறைக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. எங்கள் இறுதி மாதிரி 10 முறை வேகம், 17 முறை அளபுருக்கள் குறைக்கும், 35MB சேமிப்பு அளவுக்கும் குறைவான மற்றும் அடிப்படைக்கோடு மாத', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کمپیوٹر اور یادگاری کے قیمت پر زیادہ بوجھ لگاتا ہے. یہ ایک چال ہے کہ NMT موڈل کو محدودہ کمپیوٹر اور یادگاری بوجٹوں کے ساتھ دستگاه پر استعمال کریں. This paper presents a four stage pipeline to compress model and speed up the decoding for NMT. ہمارا طریقہ پہلے ایک کامپیٹ معماری معماری معلوم کرتا ہے جو کانvolutional encoder اور weight shared embeddings پر بنیاد ہے. پھر اس کے لئے ایک ذره نمونہ حاصل کرنے کے لئے وزن کا پانی استعمال کیا جائے گا آگے، ہم ایک سریع سفارشی انٹرپولٹ کی تقریبا پیش کریں گے جس نے گھوٹی ڈیکوڈ کو ڈیکوڈ کے ذریعہ بجلی جگہ کے ذریعے کامیابی پر پہنچ سکے۔ لہٰذا، زمانہ مصرف کرنے والی بجلی تلاش کے ذریعہ سادھی آہستہ ڈیکوڈ سے بدل سکتا ہے۔ آخر میں، نرم لائر کے کمپیوٹر کی کمپیوٹ کرنے کے لئے لکھی ہوئی گزینش استعمال کی جاتی ہے. ہماری آخری مدل 10 دفعہ سرعت تک پہنچتی ہے، 17 دفعہ پارامیٹر کم ہوتی ہے، 35مگاب کے ذریعہ سے کم ذخیره اور برابر عملکرد بنیس لین مدل کے مقابلہ میں۔', 'uz': "Name Name Name Bizning usuli birinchi birinchi muammolar kodlash va vek bilan birlashtirilgan tashkilotni ishga tushirish mumkin. Keyin bir kichkina modelni olish uchun balandlik qo'llaniladi. Keyingi, biz qismni qidirish bilan bir tez cheksiz interpolation usulini talab qilamiz. Shunday qilib, vaqt ishlatish uchun qidirish oddiy qiyin orqali o'zgartirib boʻlishi mumkin. Oxiri, soʻzni tanlash uchun dastur qatlamni kamaytirish uchun ishlatiladi. Bizning oxirgi modelimiz 10 marta tezligi, 17 marta parametrlar kamaytirish, 35MB saqlash oʻlchamini kamaytirish va asosiy uslubi modeliga kamaytirish imkoniyatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) đặt gánh nặng lớn lên giá trị tính toán và trí nhớ. Đó là thách thức khi áp dụng các mô hình NMT trên thiết bị có giới hạn ngân sách tính to án và trí nhớ. Tờ giấy này có một đường ống bốn cấp để thu thập mẫu và nhanh chóng giải mã NMT. Trước tiên, phương pháp của chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc gọn dựa trên mã hóa xoắn ốc và sự gắn kết trọng lượng. Sau đó sẽ bị cắt giảm trọng lượng để đạt được mô hình mỏng. Kế tiếp, chúng tôi đề nghị một kế hoạch nội suy nhanh chóng cho phép việc giải mã tham lam đạt được hiệu quả giống với việc dò tia. Do đó, việc dò tia vượt thời gian có thể thay thế bằng cách giải mã tham lam đơn giản. Cuối cùng, sự chọn từ vựng được dùng để giảm tính lớp đa dạng. Hệ thống cuối cùng đạt được độ cao mười lần, 17 lần giảm các khoảng thời gian, ít hơn kích thước dự trữ 35MB và hiệu suất tương đương so với mô hình cơ bản.', 'da': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) lægger stor byrde på beregning og hukommelse omkostninger. Det er en udfordring at implementere NMT-modeller på enheder med begrænsede beregnings- og hukommelsesbudgeter. Dette papir præsenterer en firetrins rørledning til at komprimere model og fremskynde afkodningen af NMT. Vores metode introducerer først en kompakt arkitektur baseret på convolutional encoder og vægtdelte indlejringer. Derefter anvendes vægtbeskæring for at opnå en sparsom model. Dernæst foreslår vi en hurtig sekvensinterpolation tilgang, som gør det muligt for den grådige afkodning at opnå ydeevne på niveau med strålesøgningen. Derfor kan den tidskrævende strålesøgning erstattes af simpel grådig afkodning. Endelig bruges ordforråd valg til at reducere beregningen af softmax lag. Vores endelige model opnår 10 gange hastighed, 17 gange reduktion af parametre, mindre end 35 MB lagerstørrelse og sammenlignelig ydeevne sammenlignet med basismodellen.', 'hr': 'Neuralni prevod stroja (NMT) stavlja intenzivni teret na troškove računala i sjećanja. To je izazov raspoređivanja NMT modela na uređajima s ograničenim računalom i proračunima pamćenja. Ovaj papir predstavlja četiri faze cijevi za kompresiranje model a i ubrzanje dekodiranja za NMT. Naša metoda prvo predstavlja kompaktnu arhitekturu temeljenu na konvolucionalnom koderu i dijeljenoj težini. Onda se primjenjuje obrijanje težine za dobivanje rezervnog model a. Sljedeće, predlažemo brzi interpolacijski pristup sekvenciji koji omogućava pohlepnom dekodiranju da postigne izvršnost u vezi s pretraživanjem zraka. Stoga traženje zraka potrošnje vremena može zamijeniti jednostavnim pohlepnim dekodiranjem. Konačno se izražavanje riječnika koristi za smanjenje računala softmax sloja. Naš konačni model postiže 10 puta ubrzanje, 17 puta smanjenje parametara, manje od veličine skladišta 35MB i usporedno učinkovito u usporedbi s početnim modelom.', 'de': 'Die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) belastet die Berechnungs- und Speicherkosten intensiv. Es ist eine Herausforderung, NMT-Modelle auf Geräten mit begrenztem Rechen- und Speicherbudget bereitzustellen. Dieses Papier stellt eine vierstufige Pipeline vor, um das Modell zu komprimieren und die Dekodierung für NMT zu beschleunigen. Unsere Methode führt zunächst eine kompakte Architektur ein, die auf Convolutional Encoder und weight shared embeddings basiert. Dann wird Gewichtsschnitt angewendet, um ein spärliches Modell zu erhalten. Als nächstes schlagen wir einen schnellen Sequenzinterpolationsansatz vor, der es der gierigen Dekodierung ermöglicht, eine Leistung auf Augenhöhe mit der Strahlsuche zu erreichen. Somit kann die zeitaufwändige Strahlsuche durch einfache gierige Dekodierung ersetzt werden. Schließlich wird die Vokabelauswahl verwendet, um die Berechnung der Softmax-Schicht zu reduzieren. Unser letztes Modell erreicht 10-fache Beschleunigung, 17-fache Parameterreduktion, weniger als 35MB Speichergröße und vergleichbare Leistung im Vergleich zum Basismodell.', 'bg': 'Невровият машинен превод (НМТ) поставя интензивна тежест върху изчисленията и разходите за паметта. Предизвикателство е внедряването на модели на устройства с ограничен бюджет за изчисление и памет. Настоящата статия представя четиристепенен тръбопровод за компресиране на модела и ускоряване на декодирането на НМТ. Нашият метод първо въвежда компактна архитектура, базирана на конволюционален кодер и вграждания с споделено тегло. След това се прилага рязане на тегло, за да се получи рядък модел. След това предлагаме бърз подход за интерполация на последователността, който позволява на алчното декодиране да постигне ефективност, равна на търсенето на лъч. Следователно, отнемащото време търсене на лъчи може да бъде заменено с просто алчно декодиране. И накрая, селекцията на речника се използва за намаляване на изчисляването на слой софтмакс. Крайният ни модел постига 10-кратно ускорение, 17-кратно намаляване на параметрите, по-малък размер на съхранение от 35 МБ и сравнима производителност в сравнение с базовия модел.', 'nl': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) legt een intensieve belasting op de berekenings- en geheugenkosten. Het is een uitdaging om NMT-modellen te implementeren op apparaten met beperkte berekenings- en geheugenbudgetten. Dit document presenteert een vier fasen pijpleiding om model te comprimeren en de decodering voor NMT te versnellen. Onze methode introduceert eerst een compacte architectuur gebaseerd op convolutionele encoder en weight shared embeddings. Vervolgens wordt gewichtssnoei toegepast om een schaars model te verkrijgen. Vervolgens stellen we een snelle sequentie interpolatie benadering voor die de hebberige decodering in staat stelt prestaties te bereiken die vergelijkbaar zijn met de beam search. Vandaar dat de tijdrovende beam search kan worden vervangen door eenvoudige hebzuchtige decodering. Ten slotte wordt vocabulaire selectie gebruikt om de berekening van de softmax laag te verminderen. Ons uiteindelijke model bereikt 10-voudige versnelling, 17-voudige verlaging van parameters, minder dan 35MB opslaggrootte en vergelijkbare prestaties in vergelijking met het basismodel.', 'id': 'Translation Neural Machine (NMT) meletakkan beban intensiv pada komputasi dan biaya memori. Ini adalah tantangan untuk menggunakan model NMT pada perangkat dengan komputasi terbatas dan anggaran ingatan. Kertas ini mempersembahkan saluran pipa empat tahap untuk mengkompresi model dan mempercepat dekodasi untuk NMT. Metode kami pertama memperkenalkan arsitektur kompakt berdasarkan kode konvolusi dan berat berbagi embedding. Then weight pruning is applied to obtain a sparse model.  Selanjutnya, kita mengusulkan pendekatan interpolasi urutan yang cepat yang memungkinkan dekodasi serakah untuk mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan pencarian sinar. Oleh karena itu, pencarian beam memakan waktu dapat diganti dengan dekoding serakah sederhana. Akhirnya, seleksi vokabular digunakan untuk mengurangi komputasi lapisan softmax. Model akhir kita mencapai 10 kali kecepatan, 17 kali pengurangan parameter, kurang dari ukuran penyimpanan 35MB dan prestasi yang dibandingkan dengan model dasar.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya NMT (NMT) inaweka mzigo mkubwa juu ya hisabu na gharama za kumbukumbu. Ni changamoto ya kutumia mifano ya NMT kwenye vifaa vikuu vya kompyuta na bajeti zisizo na kumbukumbu. Gazeti hili linaonyesha pipeline ya jukwaa nne ili kusambaza mifano na kupanda kiwango cha upungufu wa NMT. Utawala wetu wa kwanza unaonyesha ujenzi wa makubaliano unaofanywa na utaratibu wa utata na mizani zilizosambazwa. Kisha upunguzi wa uzito unatumiwa kupata mtindo mdogo. Baadae, tunapendekeza mbinu za mchanganyiko wa haraka ambazo zinawezesha kupunguza umasikini ili kufikia utendaji kwa utafutaji wa umeme. Kwa hiyo, utafutaji wa umeme unaweza kubadilishwa kwa mapambo rahisi ya uchumi. Mwisho, uchaguzi wa lugha unatumiwa kupunguza hisabati ya kiwango cha programu. Mfano wetu wa mwisho unapata ongezeko la mara 10, kupunguza parameter 17, chini ya ukubwa wa storage 35MB na utendaji unaofanana na mtindo wa msingi.', 'tr': 'NMT NMT nusgalaryny çykyp biljek we hatda budgetleri bilen janlaşdyrmak kynçylykdyr. Bu kagyz nusgany sykylamak üçin dört staz pipelini görkezýär we NMT üçin kodlemesini çalt. Biziň täzimimiz ilkinji gezek konvolusiýal ködleme we kiçi bölünen ýerleşmelere daýanýar. Soňra çift sanly nusga gazanmak üçin ullanýar. Indiki, güýz gözatüşi bilen tanyş etmäge çalt bir taslaşma metodasyny teklip edýäris. Şol sebäpli, zamany aşyk tutan ugly gözlemek basit ýunançylyk bilen ewez edilebilir. Soňunda söz sözleri saýlamak üçin ytmynan kalamyny azaltmak üçin ullanylar. Bizim son modelimiz 10 kere hızlanmak üçin, 17 kere parametrer azaltmak üçin, 35MB depolama ölçüsinden az ve temel modellere karşılaşýar.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) بار زیادی بر هزینه\u200cهای محاسبه و حافظه قرار می\u200cدهد. این یک چالش است که مدل NMT را روی دستگاه\u200cهایی که با توجه\u200cهای محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت محدودیت و حافظه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند. این کاغذ یک لوله لوله چهار مرحله را برای تعیین مدل و سرعت دهندگی برای NMT نشان می دهد. اول روش ما یک معماری پیچیده را معرفی می\u200cکند که بر اساس رمزگذاری و وزن مشترک شده است. سپس کاهش وزن برای دریافت یک مدل کوچک استفاده می شود. بعدش، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک طریقه\u200cی سریع ترکیب بین\u200cنقطه\u200cگیری که اجازه می\u200cدهد دکوندن آلوده\u200cای برای رسیدن اجازه\u200cگیری در مورد برنامه\u200cگیری با جستجوی سیاه. بنابراین، جستجوی پرده\u200cهای زمان صرف می\u200cکند، می\u200cتواند به وسیله\u200cی دکوندن آب\u200cآب ساده جایگزین شود. بالاخره، انتخاب کلمات برای کاهش محاسبه لایه نرم\u200cترین استفاده می\u200cشود. مدل نهایی ما ۱۰ بار سرعت می\u200cرسد، ۱۷ بار پارامتر کاهش می\u200cکند، اندازه ذخیره کمتر از 35مگاب و عملکرد قابل مقایسه با مدل اصلی.', 'af': "Neural Masjien Vertaling (NMT) lê intensiewe las op rekenaar en geheue koste. Dit is 'n uitdrukking om NMT-modele op die toestelle te verwyder met beperkte rekenaar en geheue-budžete. Hierdie papier stel 'n vier stadige pyplyn voor om model te komprimeer en vinnig die dekodering vir NMT te maak. Ons metode introduseer eerste 'n kompakte arkitektuur gebaseer op konvolusiese enkoder en gewig gedeelde inbêdings. Dan word gewig druk aangepas om 'n sparse model te kry. Volgende, ons voorstel 'n vinnige volgorde interpolasie toegang wat die groet dekodering kan aanvaar om uitvoerings op par te bereik met die trap soek. Daarom kan die tyd-verbruiklike straam soektog vervang word deur eenvoudige groet dekodering. Eindelik, woordeboekkies word gebruik om die rekenaar van sagte maksimum laag te verminder. Ons eindelike model bereik 10 maal speeduig, 17 maal parameters reduksie, minder as 35mb opslaan grootte en vergelykbare prestasie vergelyk met die basisline model.", 'sq': 'Translation Neural Machine (NMT) vë një barrë intensive mbi llogaritjen dhe koston e kujtesës. Është një sfidë për të vendosur modele NMT në pajisjet me llogaritje të kufizuara dhe buxhete të kujtesës. Kjo letër paraqet një tubacion katër fazash për të kompresuar modelin dhe për të shpejtuar dekodimin për NMT. Metoda jonë fillimisht paraqet një arkitekturë kompakte bazuar në koduesin konvolutiv dhe përmbajtjet e përbashkëta të peshës. Pastaj përdorimi i peshës aplikohet për të marrë një model të vogël. Pastaj, ne propozojmë një metodë të shpejtë interpolacioni të sekuencës që lejon dekodimin lakmues për të arritur performancë të barabartë me kërkimin e rreze. Kështu, kërkimi i rreze që mban kohë mund të zëvendësohet me një dekodim të thjeshtë lakmues. Më në fund, zgjedhja e fjalorit përdoret për të reduktuar llogaritjen e shtresës softmax. Modeli ynë përfundimtar arrin 10 herë shpejtësinë, 17 herë reduktimin e parametrave, më pak se 35 MB madhësinë e depozitimit dhe performancën e krahasueshme me modelin bazë.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)은 계산과 저장에 큰 부담을 준다.NMT 모델을 컴퓨팅 및 메모리 예산이 제한된 장치에 배치하는 것은 어려운 과제입니다.본고는 모델을 압축하고 NMT의 디코딩을 가속화하는 4급 유수선을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 우선 볼륨 인코더와 권중 공유를 바탕으로 끼워 넣는 치밀한 구조를 소개했다.그리고 값을 통해 가지치기를 통해 희소 모형을 얻을 수 있다.다음에 우리는 탐욕 디코딩이 빔 검색과 비슷한 성능을 낼 수 있도록 빠른 시퀀스 삽입 방법을 제시했다.따라서 시간이 걸리는 빔 검색은 간단한 탐욕 디코딩으로 대체될 수 있다.마지막으로 어휘 선택을 사용하여softmax층의 계산량을 줄인다.기준 모델에 비해 우리의 최종 모델은 10배의 가속비, 17배의 매개 변수 감소, 35MB 이하의 저장 크기와 상당한 성능을 실현했다.', 'am': 'የናውራዊ መኪን ትርጉም (NMT) ቁጥጥር እና ማስታወስ ዋጋውን አስቸጋሪ ሸክም ያደርጋል። የNMT ሞዴላዎችን በዕቃዎች ላይ በተቃራኒ ቁጥጥር እና መታሰቢያ budget በመውጣት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም የክፍለ ቅርጽ አዲስ ዶላዎችን ለመጨመር እና ለNMT ጥያቄን ለመጨመር አራት ደረጃዎችን የሚያቀርብ ነው፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ ኮድ እና ሚዛን የተካፈለ የውይይት አካባቢ መሠረት ማሳየት ነው፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም ሚዛን ብልሃት በጭራሽ ሞዴል ለማግኘት ይፈልጋል፡፡ የሚቀጥለውን፣ የጥምቀት ግንኙነት ለመግለጫ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ ስለዚህም የሚጠቅመው ሰዓት ብረት ሲፈልግ ቀላል ምኞት በመለወጥ ይችላል፡፡ የመጨረሻ ምርጫዎች Our final model achieves 10 times speedup, 17 times parameters reduction, less than 35MB storage size and comparable performance compared to the baseline model.', 'hy': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) lays intensive burden on computation and memory cost.  Դա մարտահրավեր է օգտագործել NMT մոդելներ սարքերի վրա, որոնք ունեն սահմանափակ հաշվարկներ և հիշողության բյուջեն: Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է չորս փուլում գտնվող խողովակաշար, որպեսզի ընդլայնվի մոդելը և արագացներ NMT-ի կոդավորումը: Մեր մեթոդը առաջին հերթին ներկայացնում է կառուցվածքային ճարտարապետություն, որը հիմնված է կառուցվածքային կոդերի և կշիռի ընդհանուր ներդրումների վրա: Այնուհետև կշիռի կտրտումը կիրառվում է թեթև մոդելի ստանալու համար: Հաջորդը, մենք առաջարկում ենք արագ հաջորդականության ինտերպոլացիայի մոտեցում, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս ագահությամբ բացահայտելու համար ստանալ արտադրողությունը հավասար ճառագայթի որոնման: Այդ իսկ պատճառով, ժամանակ պահանջող ճառագայթի որոնումը կարող է փոխարինվել պարզ գաղտնի կոդավորումով: Վերջապես, բառարանի ընտրությունը օգտագործվում է նվազեցնելու համար հարթմաքսի շերտի հաշվարկումը: Մեր վերջնական մոդելը հասնում է 10 անգամ արագությունը, 17 անգամ փոքրացման պարամետրերից, 35 MB պահեստի չափից քիչ և համեմատական արդյունք, համեմատած հիմնական մոդելի հետ:', 'az': 'NMT-nin nöral mašin tərcüməsi hesaplama və yada maliyyətində ağır yükü yükləyir. NMT modelləri müəyyən hesablama və yada budžetları olan cihazlarda istifadə etmək çətindir. Bu kağıt modeli sıkıştırmaq və NMT kodlamasını hızlandırmaq üçün dörd fazla pipeline göstərir. Bizim metodumuz ilk dəfə convolutional encoder və a ğırlığımız paylaşılmış inbinglərə dayanan kompakt arhitektür təşkil edir. Sonra qırmızı modeli almaq üçün a ğırlıq qırmızı istifadə edilir. Sonradan, biz hızlı seçmə müxtəlif tərzini təklif edirik ki, çöpçü araştırması ilə birləşdirilməsini sağlayar. Buna görə də, vaxt istifadə edən ulduzlar araması basit dilli kodlama ilə əvəz edə bilər. Sonunda sözlü seçim yumuşaq səviyyənin hesabını azaltmaq üçün qullanılır. Son modellərimiz 10 dəfə hızlandırmaq, 17 dəfə parametru azaltmaq, 35MB depoya ölçüsindən az və başlanğıç modeli ilə müqayisədə müqayisədə müqayisədə müqayisədə olar.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) গণনা এবং স্মৃতির খরচের উপর গভীর বোঝা দিয়েছে। এটা এনএমটি মডেল ডিভাইসগুলোতে সীমিত গণনা এবং মেমরি বাজেটের মাধ্যমে অবরোধ করার একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই পত্রিকাটি এনএমটির জন্য মোডেল পাইপেলেন এবং ডিকোডের দ্রুত বাড়িয়ে দেয়ার জন্য চার মাত্রা পাইপেলাইন উপস্থা আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রথমে একটি প্রতিষ্ঠান আর্কিস্টারেক্টের পরিচয় করিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে বিশ্বাসী কোডার এবং ওজনের ভিত্তিত তাহলে ওজনের বুদ্ধি প্রয়োগ করা হয় একটি স্প্যাস মডেল পাওয়ার জন্য। পরবর্তীতে, আমরা একটি দ্রুত সেকেন্ড ইন্টারপোলেশনের ক্ষেত্রে প্রস্তাব করি যা দ্রুত প্রতিষ্ঠানের প্রস্তাব প্রদান করা যায়, যা  তাই, সময় খাওয়া বীম অনুসন্ধান সাধারণ লোভের কারণে প্রতিস্থাপন করা যাবে। অবশেষে, সফটম্যাক্স স্তরের গণনা কমানোর জন্য শব্দভাণ্ডার নির্বাচন ব্যবহার করা হয়। আমাদের চূড়ান্ত মডেল ১০ বার গতি পেতে পারে, ১৭ বার প্যারামিটার কমে, ৩৫ এমবিবি সংরক্ষণের আকার এবং বেস্লাইন মডেলের তুলনায় তুলনায় প্', 'bs': 'Neuralno prevodenje mašine (NMT) stavlja intenzivni teret na troškove računala i sjećanja. To je izazov raspoređivanja NMT modela na uređajima sa ograničenim računalom i budžetima za pamćenje. Ovaj papir predstavlja četiri faze cijevi za kompresiju model a i ubrzanje dekodiranja za NMT. Naša metoda prvo predstavlja kompaktnu arhitekturu baziranu na konvolucionalnom koderu i dijeljenoj težini. Onda se primjenjuje obrezanje težine za dobivanje rezervnog model a. Sljedeće, predlažemo brzi interpolacijski pristup sekvenciji koji omogućava pohlepnom dekodiranju da postigne izvedbu na par sa pretraživanjem zraka. Stoga, potraga zraka koja potroši vrijeme može biti zamijenjena jednostavnim pohlepnim dekodiranjem. Konačno se izražavanje riječnika koristi za smanjenje računala softmax sloja. Naš konačni model postiže 10 puta ubrzanje, 17 puta smanjenje parametara, manje od veličine skladišta 35MB i usporedno provedbe u usporedbi s početnim modelom.', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad (NMT) klade intenzivní zátěž na výpočet a paměťové náklady. Nasazení NMT modelů na zařízeních s omezeným rozpočtem výpočtu a paměti je výzvou. Tento článek představuje čtyřstupňové potrubí pro kompresi modelu a urychlení dekódování NMT. Naše metoda nejprve představuje kompaktní architekturu založenou na konvolučním snímači a integrovaných hmotnostních vloženích. Následně se aplikuje prořezání hmotnosti, aby se získal řídký model. Dále navrhujeme přístup rychlé sekvenční interpolace, který umožňuje chamtivému dekódování dosáhnout výkonu stejného jako vyhledávání paprsku. Časově náročné vyhledávání paprsku tedy může být nahrazeno jednoduchým chamtivým dekódováním. Na závěr slovní zásoby se používá ke snížení výpočtu vrstvy softmax. Náš konečný model dosahuje desetinásobné zrychlení, 17krát snížení parametrů, menší než 35MB velikosti úložiště a srovnatelného výkonu ve srovnání se základním modelem.', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös (NMT) rasittaa merkittävästi laskentaa ja muistikustannuksia. NMT-mallien käyttöönotto laitteissa, joilla on rajalliset laskenta- ja muistibudjetit, on haastavaa. Tässä työssä esitellään nelivaiheinen putkisto, jonka avulla voidaan puristaa mallia ja nopeuttaa NMT:n dekoodaamista. Menetelmämme esittelee ensin kompaktin arkkitehtuurin, joka perustuu konvolutionaaliseen kooderiin ja painojaetuihin upotuksiin. Sitten painon karsiminen käytetään harvaan malli. Seuraavaksi ehdotamme nopeaa sekvenssininterpolointimenetelmää, jonka avulla ahne dekoodaus saavuttaa suorituskykyä yhtä hyvin kuin säteen etsintä. Näin ollen aikaa vievä säteen haku voidaan korvata yksinkertaisella ahneella dekoodauksella. Lopuksi sanaston valintaa käytetään vähentämään softmax kerroksen laskentaa. Lopullinen mallimme saavuttaa 10-kertaisen nopeutumisen, 17-kertaisen parametrivähennyksen, alle 35 Mt tallennustilan koon ja vertailukelpoisen suorituskyvyn perusmalliin verrattuna.', 'ca': "La traducció neural de màquines (NMT) té una càrrega intensa en el cost de la computació i la memòria. És un repte implementar models NMT en els dispositius amb limitats pressupostos de computació i memòria. Aquest paper presenta un pipeline de quatre etapes per comprimir el model i accelerar la decodificació de la NMT. El nostre mètode introdueix primer una arquitectura compact a basada en codificador convolutiu i integracions compartides de pes. Llavors s'aplica la pruning de pes per aconseguir un model petit. Després, proposem un enfocament d'interpolació de seqüència ràpida que permet que la codificació codificada aconsegui un rendiment igual a la cerca del raig. Així doncs, la recerca al raig que consumeix temps pot ser substituïda per una simple codificació cobertura. Finalment, la selecció de vocabulari s'utilitza per reduir el calcul de la capa softmax. El nostre model final aconsegueix 10 vegades la velocitat, 17 vegades la reducció de paràmetres, menys de 35 MB la mida d'emmagatzematge i el rendiment comparable amb el model de base.", 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge (NMT) koormab intensiivselt arvutus- ja mälukulusid. NMT mudelite kasutuselevõtmine piiratud arvutus- ja mälueelarvega seadmetes on keeruline. Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse nelja etapi torujuhet mudeli tihendamiseks ja NMT dekodeerimise kiirendamiseks. Meie meetod tutvustab kõigepealt kompaktset arhitektuuri, mis põhineb konvolutsioonilisel kodeerijal ja kaalu jagatud manustamisel. Seejärel rakendatakse kaalu pügamist hõreda mudeli saamiseks. Järgmisena pakume välja kiire jada interpolatsiooni lähenemisviisi, mis võimaldab ahnel dekodeerimisel saavutada jõudluse samaväärne kiirte otsinguga. Seega saab aeganõudva kiirte otsingu asendada lihtsa ahne dekodeerimisega. Lõpuks kasutatakse sõnavara valikut, et vähendada softmax kihi arvutamist. Meie lõplik mudel saavutab 10-kordse kiirenduse, 17-kordse parameetrite vähendamise, vähem kui 35 MB salvestusruumi suuruse ja võrreldava jõudluse võrreldes baasmudeliga.', 'jv': 'Ngucap Jejaring Ora iku sarujar-saruji kanggo depurasi model NMT lan alat-alat iki dadi tanggal Ngetongke kuwi nambah tanggal upat kanggo nggambar model lan ngawasi luwih nggawe decoding kanggo NMT. Awakdhéwé nggawe mbêng ngomong akeh-akeh kompct sing basa gambar convolution Amarok Tulung, awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem interpolation sing bisa ngedol perbudhakan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang ngenggo dolanan surok nggawe politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive item-set Nyong model sing jerahke ditambah 10 kere ujaran, 16 kere parameters pipilisan, ukuran ukuran ukuran kanggo 3 MB arahan ukuran', 'ha': "Tafsiri na Kifin Naural (NMT) na samar da nauyi mai girma kan lissafi da kyautar memory. It a wani yanki ne da za'a saka misãlai na NMT kan shirin ayuka da lissafi da bajekin hukar tunar. Wannan takardar aiki na bãyar da wata pipilin wata huɗu daraja dõmin ya yi amfani da motsi kuma ya yi gaggawa kodin wa NMT. Kayan hanyoyinMu na fara wani matsayin da aka samu a kan kodi na sami masu samu'i. A sa'an nan, za'a tambayi mai nauyi dõmin ya sami wata misali mai ƙaranci. Na ƙarshe, za'a buƙata wata hanyoyi mai sauri da sauri wadda ke iya amfani da kyawurin raƙĩri da za'a sami karatun tashi a par. Saboda haka, za'a musanya filin mai amfani da lokaci da za'a yi musanya shi da ƙawar raɗaɗi mai sauƙi. Ya ƙara, ana yi amfani da shirin ayuka don a ƙara lissafin abun ayuka. Salon ƙarami yana sãmu sauki 10 sau sau, ƙarami parameteri 17 sau, kuma da ƙari girma ga adana 35 MB kuma da lissafi daidai da misalin layin.", 'he': 'התרגום של מכונות נוירות (NMT) מכניס עומס אינטנסיבי על מחשב ועלות זיכרון. זהו אתגר להפעיל מודלים NMT על המכשירים עם מחשב מוגבל ותקציב זיכרון. הנייר הזה מציג צינור ארבע שלבים כדי ללחוץ מודל ולמהיר את הפיתוח של NMT. השיטה שלנו קודם מכירה ארכיטקטורה משותפת מבוססת על קודד משקף ומשקל משותף. ואז משקל משקל מופעל כדי להשיג מודל נדיר. לאחר מכן, אנו מציעים גישה מהירה לאינטרפוליציה רצף שמאפשרת לפענוח החמאות להשיג ביצועים שווים לחיפוש בקרן. לכן, החיפוש על קרן משתמש בזמן יכול להחליף על ידי פיקוד חמדן פשוט. Finally, vocabulary selection is used to reduce the computation of softmax layer.  המודל הסופי שלנו משיג 10 פעמים מהירות, 17 פעמים פחות פרמטרים, פחות מ-35 MB בגודל האחסון והביצועים שווים בהשוואה למודל הבסיסי.', 'sk': 'Nevralni strojni prevod (NMT) veliko obremenjuje stroške računalništva in pomnilnika. Izziv je uvedba modelov NMT na napravah z omejenim računalniškim in pomnilniškim proračunom. V prispevku je predstavljen štiristostopenjski cevovod za stiskanje modela in pospešitev dekodiranja NMT. Naša metoda najprej uvaja kompaktno arhitekturo, ki temelji na konvolucijskem kodirniku in vgradnji s skupno težo. Nato se uporabi obrezovanje teže, da se pridobi redki model. Nato predlagamo hiter pristop interpolacije zaporedja, ki pohlepnemu dekodiranju omogoča enako učinkovitost kot iskanje žarka. Zato lahko dolgotrajno iskanje žarka nadomesti preprosto pohlepno dekodiranje. Končno, izbira besedišča se uporablja za zmanjšanje izračuna softmax plasti. Naš končni model dosega 10-kratno pospešitev, 17-kratno zmanjšanje parametrov, manj kot 35 MB pomnilnika in primerljivo zmogljivost v primerjavi z osnovnim modelom.', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT)shows intensive burden on computation and memory cost. It is a challenge to deploy NMT models on the devices with limited computation and memory budgets. This paper presents a four stage pipeline to compress model and speed up the decoding for NMT. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་པོ་ནས་མཛུབ་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བརྩིས་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་འདུག convolutional encoder་དང་weight shared embeddings . འོན་ཀྱང་། མཐའ་བཅད་ཀྱིས་མིང་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ལེན་རྒྱུ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མགྱོག་རིམ་ལྟར་བཅད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ཕན་ཚུན་འབྱུང་བ་དང་། དེར་བརྟེན། ཆུ་ཚོད་ཟུར་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བགོ་བ་ཞིག་ཚབ་བཅུག་ཐུབ། མཐའ་མར་མ་དེར། བརྡ་སྤྲོད་འདེམས་སྟངས་ནི་མཉེན་རིས་བང་རིམ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་རྩིས Our final model achieves 10 times speedup, 17 times parameters reduction, less than 35MB storage size and comparable performance compared to the baseline model.'}
{'en': 'Instance Weighting for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'es': 'Ponderación de instancias para la adaptación de dominios de traducción automática neuronal', 'ar': 'ترجيح المثيل لتكييف مجال ترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'fr': "Pondération d'instance pour l'adaptation du domaine de traduction automatique neuronale", 'pt': 'Ponderação de instância para adaptação de domínio de tradução automática neural', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション・ドメイン・アダプテーションのためのインスタンス・ウェイト', 'ru': 'Взвешивание экземпляров для адаптации домена преобразования нейронных машин', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए इंस्टेंस वेटिंग', 'zh': '用神经机器翻译域适配例加权', 'ga': 'Ualú Meáchain le haghaidh Oiriúnú Fearainn um Aistriú Inneall Néarach', 'el': 'Ζυγισμός Instances για προσαρμογή του τομέα της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Példányszámítás a neurális gépi fordítási tartomány adaptációjához', 'it': "Ponderazione delle istanze per l'adattamento del dominio di traduzione automatica neurale", 'mk': 'Инстантна тежина за адаптација на доменот за превод на неврални машини', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару доменінің адаптациясы', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo domeno pritaikymo momentinis koeficientas', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины хөрөнгө дамжуулалтын хэмжээ', 'mt': 'Piż Instanti għall-Adattament tad-Domain tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റെന്\u200dസ് വൈട്ടിങ്ങ്', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Ponderarea instanțelor pentru adaptarea domeniului de traducere automată neurală', 'pl': 'Ważenie instancji dla adaptacji domeny neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ms': 'Pembilangan Kejadian untuk Penyesuaian Domain Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'sr': 'Težina instanca za adaptaciju domena za prevod neuroloških mašina', 'so': 'Instance Weighting for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මෙසින් පරිවර්තන ඩෝමේන් අනුවර්තනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ විශාලනය', 'sv': 'Instansvägning för justering av domänen för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'நெயுரல் இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு களம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'نائرل ماشین ترجمہ ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ کے لئے انٹنس وزن', 'uz': 'Tarjima xonasini tahrirlash', 'vi': 'Luyện tập thể thao cho cấu trúc thần kinh', 'bg': 'Претегляне на инстанциите за адаптиране на домейна за неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Instance wegen voor Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'da': 'Instansvægtning for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaption', 'hr': 'Težina instanca za adaptaciju domena za prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'de': 'Instanzgewichtung für die Anpassung der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'id': 'Pembilangan Instansi untuk Adaptasi Domain Translation Mesin Neural', 'fa': 'وزن فصل برای تغییرات دامنۀ ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'ko': '신경기계 번역역 자체 적응 실례 가중', 'sw': 'Tovuti ya Utafiti kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani', 'sq': 'Peshimi i Instancës për Adaptimin e Domenit të Translacionit të Makinës Neurale', 'af': 'Instans weegting vir neural masjien vertaling domein aanpassing', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'tr': 'Neural Makina Terjime Etkileşimi Taýýarlama', 'az': 'Nöral mašin Çeviri Domain Adaptasiyonu üçün Instance Weight', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման դաշտի ադապտացիան', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ ডোমেনের জন্য ইনস্টেন ওয়াইটিং', 'bs': 'Težina instanca za adaptaciju domena neurološkog prevoda', 'ca': "Pes instantànic per l'adaptació del domini de traducció de màquines neurals", 'cs': 'Vážení instancí pro adaptaci domény neuronového strojového překladu', 'et': 'Instantsi kaalumine neuroaalse masintõlke domeeni kohandamise jaoks', 'fi': 'Instanssin punnitus neuraalisen konekäännöksen verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen', 'sk': 'Ponderiranje primerov za prilagoditev domene nevralnega strojnega prevajanja', 'jv': 'Instance', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'משקל מיידי עבור התאמה לתחום התרגום של מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation (Instance Weight for Neural Machine)'}
{'en': 'Instance weighting has been widely applied to phrase-based machine translation domain adaptation. However, it is challenging to be applied to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) directly, because NMT is not a linear model. In this paper, two instance weighting technologies, i.e., sentence weighting and domain weighting with a dynamic weight learning strategy, are proposed for NMT domain adaptation. Empirical results on the IWSLT English-German / French tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by up to 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, outperforming the existing baselines by up to 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.', 'ar': 'تم تطبيق ترجيح المثيلات على نطاق واسع في تكييف مجال الترجمة الآلية القائم على العبارات. ومع ذلك ، من الصعب تطبيقه على الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) مباشرة ، لأن NMT ليس نموذجًا خطيًا. في هذه الورقة ، تم اقتراح اثنين من تقنيات الترجيح ، أي ترجيح الجملة ووزن المجال مع إستراتيجية تعلم الوزن الديناميكي ، لتكييف مجال NMT. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مهام IWSLT الإنجليزية-الألمانية / الفرنسية أن الأساليب المقترحة يمكن أن تحسن أداء NMT بشكل كبير بما يصل إلى 2.7-6.7 نقطة BLEU ، متفوقة على خطوط الأساس الحالية بما يصل إلى 1.6-3.6 نقطة BLEU.', 'pt': 'A ponderação de instâncias tem sido amplamente aplicada à adaptação de domínios de tradução automática baseada em frases. No entanto, é um desafio ser aplicado diretamente à Tradução Automática Neural (NMT), porque a NMT não é um modelo linear. Neste artigo, duas tecnologias de ponderação de instâncias, ou seja, ponderação de sentenças e ponderação de domínio com uma estratégia de aprendizado de peso dinâmico, são propostas para adaptação de domínio NMT. Os resultados empíricos das tarefas de inglês-alemão/francês do IWSLT mostram que os métodos propostos podem melhorar substancialmente o desempenho do NMT em até 2,7-6,7 pontos BLEU, superando as linhas de base existentes em até 1,6-3,6 pontos BLEU.', 'es': 'La ponderación de instancias se ha aplicado ampliamente a la adaptación de dominios de traducción automática basada en frases. Sin embargo, es difícil aplicarlo directamente a la traducción automática neuronal (NMT), porque la NMT no es un modelo lineal. En este artículo, se proponen dos tecnologías de ponderación de instancias, es decir, ponderación de oraciones y ponderación de dominio con una estrategia de aprendizaje de peso dinámico, para la adaptación del dominio NMT. Los resultados empíricos de las tareas de IWSLT en inglés, alemán y francés muestran que los métodos propuestos pueden mejorar sustancialmente el rendimiento de la NMT hasta en 2.7 a 6.7 puntos BLEU, superando a las líneas de base existentes en hasta 1.6 a 3.6 puntos BLEU.', 'fr': "La pondération d'instance a été largement appliquée à l'adaptation de domaines de traduction automatique basée sur des phrases. Cependant, il est difficile de l'appliquer directement à la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT), car la NMT n'est pas un modèle linéaire. Dans cet article, deux technologies de pondération d'instance, à savoir la pondération de phrase et la pondération de domaine avec une stratégie d'apprentissage dynamique du poids, sont proposées pour l'adaptation du domaine NMT. Les résultats empiriques sur les tâches anglais-allemand/français de l'IWSLT montrent que les méthodes proposées peuvent améliorer considérablement les performances NMT de 2,7 à 6,7 points UEBL, surpassant les niveaux de référence existants de 1,6 à 3,6 points UEBL.", 'ja': 'インスタンス重み付けは、フレーズベースの機械翻訳ドメイン適応に広く適用されている。しかし、NMTは線形モデルではないため、神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）に直接適用することは困難です。この論文では、2つのインスタンス重み付け技術、すなわち、動的重み付け学習戦略を用いた文章重み付けとドメイン重み付けが、NMTドメイン適応のために提案されている。IWSLT英独仏タスクの実証結果は、提案された方法は、NMTパフォーマンスを最大2.7〜6.7 BLEUポイントまで実質的に改善でき、既存のベースラインを最大1.6〜3.6 BLEUポイント上回ることを示しています。', 'zh': '实例加权已广泛应用于短语之机器翻译域适配。 然则直用于神经机器翻译(NMT)有挑战性者,NMT非线性模也。 本文举二实加权术,盖动重学习策略句加权域加权,以应NMT域。 IWSLT英德/法任之实结果表明,所道能增NMT性27~6.7 BLEU,1.6~3.6 BLEU于今。', 'hi': 'इंस्टेंस वेटिंग को व्यापक रूप से वाक्यांश-आधारित मशीन अनुवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन पर लागू किया गया है। हालांकि, सीधे न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) पर लागू होना चुनौतीपूर्ण है, क्योंकि एनएमटी एक रैखिक मॉडल नहीं है। इस पेपर में, दो उदाहरण भार प्रौद्योगिकियों, यानी, एक गतिशील वजन सीखने की रणनीति के साथ वाक्य भार और डोमेन भार, एनएमटी डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए प्रस्तावित हैं। IWSLT अंग्रेजी-जर्मन / फ्रेंच कार्यों पर अनुभवजन्य परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित तरीके एनएमटी प्रदर्शन को 2.7-6.7 BLEU बिंदुओं तक काफी हद तक सुधार सकते हैं, जो मौजूदा बेसलाइन को 1.6-3.6 BLEU बिंदुओं तक पछाड़ सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Взвешивание экземпляров широко применяется для адаптации доменов машинного перевода на основе фраз. Тем не менее, его сложно применять непосредственно к нейронному машинному переводу (НМП), поскольку НМП не является линейной моделью. В настоящей работе предлагаются две технологии взвешивания, т.е. взвешивание предложений и взвешивание доменов с динамической стратегией обучения весу, для адаптации домена НБП. Эмпирические результаты по английско-немецко-французским задачам IWSLT показывают, что предлагаемые методы могут существенно улучшить показатели NMT до 2,7-6,7 баллов BLEU, опередив существующие базовые линии до 1,6-3,6 баллов BLEU.', 'ga': 'Cuireadh ualú cásanna i bhfeidhm go forleathan ar oiriúnú fearainn aistrithe meaisín bunaithe ar fhrásaí. Mar sin féin, tá sé dúshlánach é a chur i bhfeidhm go díreach ar Neural Machine Translation (NMT), toisc nach múnla líneach é NMT. Sa pháipéar seo, moltar dhá theicneolaíocht ualaithe ásc, i.e., ualú abairtí agus ualú fearainn le straitéis dhinimiciúil foghlama meáchain, le haghaidh oiriúnú fearainn NMT. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha ar thascanna Béarla-Gearmáinis/Fraincis IWSLT gur féidir leis na modhanna atá beartaithe feidhmíocht NMT a fheabhsú go substaintiúil suas le 2.7-6.7 pointe BLEU, ag comhlíonadh na mbunlínte atá ann cheana faoi suas le 1.6-3.6 pointe BLEU.', 'hu': 'A példánysúlyozást széles körben alkalmazzák a kifejezésalapú gépi fordítási tartomány adaptációjára. Ugyanakkor kihívást jelent közvetlenül a Neural Machine Translation (NMT) alkalmazása, mivel az NMT nem lineáris modell. Ebben a tanulmányban két példánysúlyozási technológiát javasolunk, azaz mondatsúlyozást és domain súlyozást dinamikus súlytanulási stratégiával. Az IWSLT angol-német/francia feladatainak empirikus eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszerek jelentősen javíthatják az NMT teljesítményét akár 2,7–6,7 BLEU ponttal, a meglévő alapkövetelményeket legfeljebb 1,6–3,6 BLEU ponttal.', 'el': 'Η στάθμιση των περιπτώσεων έχει εφαρμοστεί ευρέως στην προσαρμογή του τομέα μηχανικής μετάφρασης βάσει φράσεων. Ωστόσο, είναι δύσκολο να εφαρμοστεί άμεσα στην Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT), επειδή το NMT δεν είναι γραμμικό μοντέλο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνονται δύο τεχνολογίες στάθμισης, δηλαδή η στάθμιση των προτάσεων και η στάθμιση του τομέα με μια δυναμική στρατηγική μάθησης βάρους, για την προσαρμογή του τομέα NMT. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα σχετικά με τα αγγλο-γερμανικά/γαλλικά καθήκοντα δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι μπορούν να βελτιώσουν σημαντικά την απόδοση της NMT μέχρι και 2.7-6.7, ξεπερνώντας τις υπάρχουσες γραμμές βάσης μέχρι και 1.6-3.6 σημεία BLEU.', 'ka': 'ინსტანსის სიმართლე ძალიან გამოყენებულია ფრაზების დაბაზეული მაქინის გაგრძელების დიომენის ადატაციისთვის. მაგრამ, შესაძლებელია, რომ NMT არ არის ლეინერი მოდელი. ამ დოკუნში, ორი ინსტენციოს განმავლობა ტექნოლოგიები, მაგალითად სიტყვები და დინამიკური სწავლების სტრატიგიაზე, გადაწყვეტილია NMT დომინის აკაპეტაციისთვის. IWSLT-გერმანური/ფრანგური დავალების იმპერიკალური შედეგია, რომ პროგრამები შეუძლია გაუკეთება NMT-ის გავაკეთებას 2.7-6.7 BLEU წერტილებით, რომელიც მსგავსი ბაზის წერტილებით 1.6-3.6 BLEU წერტილებით.', 'it': "La ponderazione delle istanze è stata ampiamente applicata all'adattamento del dominio della traduzione automatica basato sulle frasi. Tuttavia, è difficile essere applicati direttamente alla traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), perché NMT non è un modello lineare. In questo articolo, due tecnologie di ponderazione di esempio, vale a dire ponderazione delle frasi e ponderazione del dominio con una strategia dinamica di apprendimento del peso, sono proposte per l'adattamento del dominio NMT. I risultati empirici dei compiti inglese-tedesco-francese di IWSLT mostrano che i metodi proposti possono migliorare notevolmente le prestazioni NMT fino a 2,7-6,7 punti BLEU, superando le linee di base esistenti fino a 1,6-3,6 punti BLEU.", 'kk': 'Инстинтацияның теңдірімі сөздерге негізделген машинаның аудару доменіне көптеген. Бірақ NMT сызық үлгісі емес. Бұл қағазда, екі инстанциялық тең технологиялар, т.е. деген динамикалық тең оқыту стратегиясы бар сөздердің тең және домендің тең тең, NMT домендің адаптациясы үшін ұсынылады. IWSLT ағылшын-неміс/француз тапсырмаларының империялық нәтижелері NMT жылдамдығын 2,7-6,7 BLEU нәтижелеріне көп жақсартып, бар негізгі жолдарды 1,6-3,6 BLEU нәтижелеріне дейін жеткізе алады.', 'lt': 'Įprastinis svertinis koeficientas buvo plačiai taikomas frazėmis grindžiamam mašinų vertimo domeno pritaikymui. Vis dėlto sunku tiesiogiai taikyti nervinių mašinų vertimui (NMT), nes NMT nėra linijinis model is. Šiame dokumente siūlomos dviejų pavyzdži ų svarstymo technologijos, t. y. sakinių ir domeno svarstymas su dinamiško svarstymo mokymosi strategija, siekiant prisitaikyti prie NMT srities. Empiriniai IWSLT anglų, vokiečių ir prancūzų užduočių rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomi metodai gali gerokai pagerinti NMT veiklos rezultatus iki 2,7–6,7 BLEU taško, o dabartinės bazinės linijos viršija iki 1,6–3,6 BLEU taško.', 'mk': 'Инстанциското тежирање е широко аплицирано на адаптација на доменот на машински превод базиран на фрази. Сепак, тешко е да се примени директно на преведувањето на невралните машини (НМТ), бидејќи НМТ не е линијарен модел. Во овој документ се предложени технологии за тежирање на две примери, tj. тежирање на речениците и тежирање на домените со стратегија за учење на динамична тежина, за адаптација на домените на НМТ. Импирските резултати на ИВСЛТ англиско-германско/француски задачи покажуваат дека предложените методи можат значително да ја подобрат резултатот на НМТ за 2,7-6,7 поени БЛЕУ, надминувајќи ги постојните бази за 1,6-3,6 поени БЛЕУ.', 'ms': 'Pembeban kejadian telah dilaksanakan secara luas untuk penyesuaian domain terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa. Namun, ia adalah cabaran untuk dilaksanakan kepada Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) secara langsung, kerana NMT bukan model linear. Dalam kertas ini, dua teknologi penimbangan contoh, iaitu penimbangan kalimat dan penimbangan domain dengan strategi pembelajaran berat dinamik, diusulkan untuk penyesuaian domain NMT. Keputusan empirik pada tugas Inggeris-Jerman/Perancis IWSLT menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh meningkatkan prestasi NMT dengan sehingga 2.7-6.7 titik BLEU, melebihi garis dasar yang ada dengan sehingga 1.6-3.6 titik BLEU.', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷ ഡൊമെന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷനിലേക്ക് ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റെന However, it is challenging to be applied to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) directly, because NMT is not a linear model.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d രണ്ടു ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ തൂക്കം തൂക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഭാരം തൂക്കുന്നതും ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഭാരം ധരിക്കുന്നതുമായ ഒര IWSLT ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d/ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ജോലിക്കുകളില്\u200d സാമ്രിക്കല്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d 2. 7- 6. 7 ബിലിയു പോയിന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d നിലവിലുള', 'mt': 'L-ippeżar tal-istanza ġie applikat b’mod wiesa’ għall-adattament tad-dominju tat-traduzzjoni tal-magna bbażat fuq il-frażi. Madankollu, huwa diffiċli li jiġi applikat direttament għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali (NMT), minħabba li NMT mhuwiex mudell lineari. F’dan id-dokument, huma proposti teknoloġiji tal-ippeżar ta’ żewġ każijiet, jiġifieri l-ippeżar tas-sentenzi u l-ippeżar tad-dominju bi strateġija dinamika tat-tagħlim tal-piż, għall-adattament tad-dominju NMT. Ir-riżultati empiriċi dwar il-kompiti tal-IWSLT Ingliż-Ġermaniż/Franċiż juru li l-metodi proposti jistgħu jtejbu b’mod sostanzjali l-prestazzjoni tal-NMT sa 2.7-6.7 punti BLEU, li jaqbżu l-linji bażi eżistenti sa 1.6-3.6 punti BLEU.', 'mn': 'Ингэснээр хэмжээний хэмжээг хэлбэрээр машины хөрөнгө оруулах зорилгоор өргөн хэрэглэгдсэн. Гэхдээ мэдрэлийн машины хөгжүүлэлт (NMT) руу шууд хэрэглэх нь хэцүү. Учир нь NMT шууд шууд загвар биш. Энэ цаасан дээр хоёр жингийн технологиуд, яг энгийн жингийн суралцах стратегийнхээ хөнгөн, өргөн хэмжээний хэмжээтэй, NMT холбооны адилтгалын төлөө санал болдог. IWSLT Англи-Герман/Француз даалгаварын эзэмшигийн үр дүн нь NMT үйл ажиллагааг 2.7-6.7 BLEU цэг хүртэл нэмэгдүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Instansvekking er veldig brukt til tilpassing av domenet for omsetjing frå fraserbasert maskin. Det er likevel vanskeleg å bruka direkte på Neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT), fordi NMT er ikkje ein lineær modell. I denne papiret foreslår to instans vektsteknologi, t.d. setningsveikning og domenevektsstrategi med ein dynamisk vektslæring, for NMT-domenetilpassing. Empirical results on the IWSLT English-German/French tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by up to 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, outperforming the existing baselines by up to 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.', 'pl': 'Ważenie instancji jest szeroko stosowane do adaptacji domeny tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na frazach. Jednak bezpośrednio stosowanie go do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) jest trudne, ponieważ NMT nie jest modelem liniowym. W niniejszym artykule zaproponowano dwie przykładowe technologie ważenia, tj. ważenie zdań i ważenie domeny z dynamiczną strategią uczenia się wagi, dla adaptacji domeny NMT. Wyniki empiryczne dotyczące zadań angielsko-niemieckich/francuskich IWSLT pokazują, że proponowane metody mogą znacznie poprawić wydajność NMT o punkty do 2.7-6.7 BLEU, przewyższając istniejące linie bazowe o punkty do 1.6-3.6 BLEU.', 'ro': 'Ponderarea instanțelor a fost aplicată pe scară largă adaptării domeniului traducerii automate bazate pe fraze. Cu toate acestea, este dificil să fie aplicat direct la Neural Machine Translation (NMT), deoarece NMT nu este un model liniar. În această lucrare, două tehnologii de ponderare a cazurilor, adică ponderea frazelor și ponderea domeniului cu o strategie dinamică de învățare a greutății, sunt propuse pentru adaptarea domeniului NMT. Rezultatele empirice privind sarcinile IWSLT engleză-germană/franceză arată că metodele propuse pot îmbunătăți substanțial performanța NMT cu până la 2,7-6,7 puncte BLEU, depășind valorile de bază existente cu până la 1,6-3,6 puncte BLEU.', 'sr': 'Težina instanca je široko primjenjena na adaptaciju domena prevoda na frazi. Međutim, teško je da se primjenjuje na neuronski prevod mašine (NMT) direktno, jer NMT nije linearni model. U ovom papiru, dve tehnologije težine težine primjerice, tj. težina rečenica i težina domena sa dinamičnom strategijom učenja težine, predlažu se za adaptaciju domena NMT-a. Impirički rezultati na zadatkima IWSLT-a engleskog-njemačkog/francuskog jezika pokazuju da predložene metode mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost NMT-a do 2,7-6,7 BLEU to čka, nadmašući postojeće osnovne linije do 1,6-3,6 BLEU točka.', 'si': 'වාර්තාවක් බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පරිවා නමුත්, න්\u200dයූරාල් මේෂින් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා, මොකද NMT ලේනියාර් මො මේ පත්තරේ දෙකක්, බලන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දෙකක්, ඉතින්, වාක්ය බලන්න සහ ඩෝමින් බලන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය බලන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමග, NMT ඩ IWSLT ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය-ජර්මාන්ස්/ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් වැඩේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියානු ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට NMT ප්\u200dරතිචාරය 2.7-6.7 BLUE', 'so': 'Miisaanku waxey si badan u codsatay habka turjumidda mashiinka oo ku saleysan afka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa habboon in si toos ah looga codsado tarjumaadda gaadiidka (NMT), maxaa yeelay NMT ma aha model linear ah. Warqadan waxaa looga soo jeedaa laba tusaale oo u miisaamayn teknolojiyo, tusaale ahaan miisaanka iyo gudaha miisaanka qoraalka waxbarashada miisaanka miisaanka miisaanka oo dabeecada ah, si loo beddelo bedelka gudaha NMT. Shaqooyinka IWSLT Ingiriis-German/Faraansiis waxay muujinayaan in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay ku hagaajin karaan dhaqdhaqaaqa NMT ilaa 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, oo sameynaya qorshaha joogta oo ay u socoto 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.', 'sv': 'Instansvägning har i stor utsträckning tillämpats på frasbaserad maskinöversättning domänanpassning. Det är dock svårt att applicera på Neural Machine Translation (NMT) direkt, eftersom NMT inte är en linjär modell. I denna uppsats föreslås två exempel viktningstekniker, dvs meningsvikt och domänviktning med en dynamisk viktinlärningsstrategi, för NMT-domänanpassning. Empiriska resultat från IWSLT:s engelsk-tyska/franska uppgifter visar att de föreslagna metoderna avsevärt kan förbättra NMT-prestandan med upp till 2,7–6,7 BLEU-poäng och överträffa de befintliga baslinjerna med upp till 1,6–3,6 BLEU-poäng.', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis எனினும், அது நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) நேரடியாக பயன்படுத்தப்படும் சவாலானது, ஏனென்றால் NMT ஒரு கோடு மாதிரி அல்ல இந்த காகிதத்தில், இரண்டு நிகழ்வுகள் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை எடுத்துக் கொண்டிருக்கும், அதாவது, வாக்கு எடை மற்றும் களத்திற்கும் தொகுதி தூண்டும்  Empirical results on the IWSLT English-German/French tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by up to 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, outperforming the existing baselines by up to 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.', 'ur': 'انٹنسنس وزن فریز بنیادی ماشین ترجمہ ڈومین کے اندازے پر پھیلا گیا ہے۔ However, it is challenging to be applied to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) directly, because NMT is a linear model not. اس کاغذ میں، دو مثالیں وزن تکنولوژی، یعنی جماعت وزن اور ڈومین کے ذریعہ ایک سینکی وزن تعلیم استراتژی کے ساتھ وزن کی جاتی ہیں، NMT ڈومین کی تعلیم کے لئے پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہیں. IWSLT انگلیسی-جرمن/فرانسوی تاسکیوں کے امپریز نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقے NMT فعالیت کو 2.7-6.7 BLEU پوینٹوں تک زیادہ بہتر کر سکتے ہیں، جو موجود بنیس لینیوں کو 1.6-3.6 BLEU پوینٹوں تک پہنچ سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Chunki NMT linear modeli emas. Bu hujjatda, ikkita misol texnologiyani o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish va domen o'zgartirish strategiya bilan o'zgartirish imkoniyatini boshqarishni istaysiz. Name", 'vi': 'Sự cân bằng hiện tại đã được áp dụng rộng rãi cho câu chỉnh sửa miền mềm. Tuy nhiên, khó áp dụng trực tiếp cho dịch lắp thần kinh (NMB) vì NMB không phải là một mô hình tuyến. Trong tờ giấy này, một công nghệ cân bằng hai trường hợp, như đo mức án và cân bằng miền với một chiến lược học tập cân nặng động động động động lực, được đề xuất trong việc sửa đổi miền miền NMT. Kết quả từ công nghệ trong các công việc I.WSLT (Anh-Đức-Pháp) cho thấy các phương pháp được đề nghị có thể cải thiện suất NMT đáng kể đến 2.7-6', 'bg': 'Тежестта на инстанциите е широко приложена при адаптирането на домейна за машинен превод на фрази. Въпреки това е предизвикателство да се приложи директно към невралния машинен превод (НМТ), тъй като НМТ не е линеен модел. В настоящата статия са предложени две инструментни технологии за претегляне, т.е. претегляне на изречения и претегляне на домейна с динамична стратегия за обучение на теглото, за адаптиране на домейна. Емпиричните резултати по англо-немски/френски задачи показват, че предложените методи могат значително да подобрят ефективността на НМТ с до 2,7-6,7 точки, като надминават съществуващите базови линии с до 1,6-3,6 точки.', 'da': "Eksempelvægtning er blevet anvendt i vid udstrækning til sætningsbaseret maskinoversættelsesdomænetilpasning. Det er dog udfordrende at blive anvendt direkte på Neural Machine Translation (NMT), fordi NMT ikke er en lineær model. I denne artikel foreslås to eksempelvægtningsteknologier, dvs. sætningsvægtning og domænevægtning med en dynamisk vægtlæringsstrategi, for NMT domæne tilpasning. Empiriske resultater af IWSLT's engelsk-tysk/franske opgaver viser, at de foreslåede metoder kan forbedre NMT's ydeevne væsentligt med op til 2,7-6,7 BLEU-point og overgå de eksisterende basislinjer med op til 1,6-3,6 BLEU-point.", 'nl': 'Instance weging is op grote schaal toegepast op frase-based machine translation domein aanpassing. Het is echter een uitdaging om direct toegepast te worden op Neural Machine Translation (NMT), omdat NMT geen lineair model is. In dit artikel worden twee instancewegingstechnologieën voorgesteld, namelijk zinsweging en domeinweging met een dynamische gewichtsleerstrategie, voor NMT domeinaanpassing. Empirische resultaten van de IWSLT Engels-Duits/Franse taken tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methoden de NMT prestaties aanzienlijk kunnen verbeteren met maximaal 2.7-6.7 BLEU punten, die de bestaande basislijnen met maximaal 1.6-3.6 BLEU punten overtreffen.', 'hr': 'Težina instanca je široko primjenjena na adaptaciju domena prevoda na formulama. Međutim, teško je primjenjivati se direktno na neuronski prevod strojeva (NMT), jer NMT nije linearni model. U ovom papiru, dvije tehnologije težine primjera, tj. težina rečenica i težina domena s dinamičnom strategijom učenja težine, predlažu se za adaptaciju domena NMT-a. Empirički rezultati na zadatkima IWSLT-a engleskog-njemačkog/francuskog jezika pokazuju da predložene metode mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost NMT-a do 2,7-6,7 BLEU to čka, iznosi postojeće osnovne linije do 1,6-3,6 BLEU točka.', 'de': 'Instanzgewichtung wurde weit verbreitet auf phrasenbasierte maschinelle Übersetzung Domänenanpassung angewendet. Es ist jedoch schwierig, direkt auf die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) angewendet zu werden, da NMT kein lineares Modell ist. In diesem Beitrag werden zwei Instanzgewichtungstechnologien vorgeschlagen, nämlich Satzgewichtung und Domänengewichtung mit einer dynamischen Gewichtslernstrategie. Empirische Ergebnisse zu den englisch-deutsch/französischen Aufgaben des IWSLT zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Methoden die NMT-Leistung um bis zu 2.7-6.7 BLEU Punkte erheblich verbessern können und die bestehenden Baselines um bis zu 1.6-3.6 BLEU Punkte übertreffen.', 'id': 'Pembeban instans telah diterapkan secara luas untuk adaptasi domain terjemahan mesin berdasarkan frasa. Namun, itu menantang untuk diaplikasikan ke Translation Mesin Neural (NMT) secara langsung, karena NMT bukan model linear. Dalam kertas ini, dua contoh teknologi penimbangan, yaitu penimbangan kalimat dan penimbangan domain dengan strategi pembelajaran berat dinamik, diusulkan untuk adaptasi domain NMT. Empirical results on the IWSLT English-German/French tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by up to 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, outperforming the existing baselines by up to 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.', 'ko': '실례 가중권은 이미 단어를 바탕으로 하는 기계 번역 분야의 자체 적응에 광범위하게 응용되었다.그러나 신경기계번역(NMT)은 하나의 선형 모델이 아니기 때문에 신경기계번역(NMT)에 직접 적용하는 것은 도전적이다.본고는 NMT 분야에 적응하는 두 가지 실례 가중 기술, 즉 문장 가중과 동적 가중 학습 전략을 채택하는 영역 가중을 제시했다.IWSLT 영어, 독일어/프랑스어 임무의 실증 결과에 따르면 제시된 방법은 NMT의 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있으며 최대 2.7-6.7 BLEU점을 높일 수 있으며 기존 기선보다 1.6-3.6 BLEU점 높다.', 'fa': 'وزن فناوری برای تغییرات دامین ترجمه دستگاه بر اساس عبارت وسیع کاربرد شده است. با این حال، مستقیماً برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) کاربرد کردن سخت است، زیرا NMT یک مدل خطی نیست. در این کاغذ، دو مثال تکنولوژی وزن وزن، یعنی وزن جمله و حوزه جمله با استراتژی یادگیری وزن دینامیک، برای تغییرات دومین NMT پیشنهاد می\u200cشود. نتایج امپراطوری در کار انگلیسی-آلمان/فرانسوی IWSLT نشان می دهد که روش پیشنهاد می تواند عملکرد NMT را به طور کلی تا نقطه های BLEU ۲.۷-۶.۷ تغییر دهد، که از خط بنیادی موجود تا نقطه های BLEU ۱.۶-۳.۶ تغییر دهد.', 'sw': 'Upasuaji wa utafiti umetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa ajili ya kubadilishana kwa mashine yenye msingi wa maneno. However, it is challenging to be applied to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) directly, because NMT is not a linear model.  Katika karatasi hii, mifano miwili yenye uzito wa teknolojia, yaani hukumu yenye uzito na ndani yenye mkakati wa kujifunza uzito wa uzito, unapendekezwa kwa ajili ya kubadilisha ndani ya NMT. Matokeo ya kipekee kwenye majukumu ya IWSLT ya Kiingereza-Ujerumani/Ufaransa yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinaweza kuboresha utendaji wa NMT kwa kiasi kikubwa na kufikia pointi 2.7-6.7 BLEU, zinazoonyesha misingi ya sasa kwa kufikia pointi 1.6-3.6 BLEU.', 'af': "Instans gewigging is vaste aangepas na frase-gebaseerde masjien vertaling domein-aanpassing. Maar dit is moeilik om direk toepassing te word na Neural Masjien Vertaling (NMT), omdat NMT nie 'n lineêre model is nie. In hierdie papier word twee voorbeeld gewigtende teknologies, t.d. gesoekte gewigting en domein gewigting met 'n dinamiese gewigte leer strategie voorgestel vir NMT domein aanpassing. Enige resultate op die IWSLT Engels-Duits/Franse taak wys dat die voorgestelde metodes kan substantieel NMT-prestasie verbeter deur 2.7-6.7 BLES punte, wat die bestaande basisline uitvoer tot 1.6-3.6 BLEU punte.", 'tr': 'Fraz tabanly makine terjime domaýynyň adilamasyna köpüräk uygulanan edildi. Ýöne, NMT hat nusgasy däldir. Bu kagyzda, iki örnek a ğırlyk tehnologiýasy, i ň.görnüşler dinamik kil öwrenmek stratejiýasy bilen çykarylyk we domena, NMT domeniň adaptasy üçin teklip edildi. IWSLT IWSLT iňlisçe-nemesçe/fransuzça netijesinde görkezilýän täzelikler NMT netijesini 2.7-6.7 BLEU nokatlara çenli gowurap biljekdigini görkez, meýdançalaryň 1.6-3.6 BLEU nokatlara çenli üýtgediklerini görkez.', 'sq': 'Peshimi i instancave është aplikuar gjerësisht për përshtatjen e domenit të përkthimit të makinave me bazë në fraza. Megjithatë, është e vështirë të aplikohet drejtpërdrejt në Translation Neural Machine (NMT), sepse NMT nuk është një model linear. Në këtë letër propozohen dy raste teknologji peshoje, i.e., peshoja e fjalëve dhe peshoja e domenit me një strategji dinamike mësimi i peshës, për përshtatjen e domenit NMT. Rezultatet imperiale mbi detyrat anglo-gjermane/franceze të IWSLT tregojnë se metodat e propozuara mund të përmirësojnë thelbësisht performancën e NMT me deri në 2.7-6.7 pikë BLEU, duke tejkaluar linjat bazë ekzistuese me deri në 1.6-3.6 pikë BLEU.', 'am': 'መግለጫ ነገር ግን NMT (NMT) የመስመር ሚኒስትን ትርጓሜ (NMT) በመጠቀም የሚችል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ሁለት ምሳሌ የቴክኖሎጂ ሚዛን እና ዶሜን በሚመዘን የውጤት ትምህርት ትምህርት ሚዛን ለNMT ዶሜን ማቀናቀል ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ የIWSLT እንግሊዘኛ-ጀርመን/ፈረንሳይኛ ስራ ላይ የኢንተርመን ውጤቶች ከ2.7-6.7 BLEU ነጥቦች በላይ የሚደረገውን የአሁኑን ደረጃዎች 1.6-3.6 BLEU ነጥቦችን እንዲያሳድጉ የሚችሉትን የኢንተርኔት ውጤቶች ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ինցենցիայի կշիռը լայնորեն կիրառվել է արտահայտությամբ հիմնված մեքենայի թարգմանման ոլորտի ադապտացիայի համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, դժվար է անմիջապես կիրառել Նեյրալ մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) վրա, քանի որ NMT գծային մոդել չէ: Այս թղթի մեջ երկու օրինակ թեխնոլոգիաներ են առաջարկում NMT-ի ոլորտի ադապտացիայի համար, այսինքն նախադասությունների և դասավորման դասավորման դասավորման և դասավորման դասավորման միջոցով: IwSMT անգլերեն-գերմանացի և ֆրանսիացի խնդիրների կայսրական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մեթոդները կարող են նշանակալի բարելավել NMT-ի արտադրողականությունը մինչև 2.7-6.7 միավորով, առավել քան գոյություն ունեցող հիմքերը մինչև 1.6-3.6 միավորով:', 'az': 'İnstans ağırlığı fraz tabanlı maşın çeviri domeinin uyğulamasına çox uyğunlaşdırıldı. Lakin NMT linear modeli deyildir. Bu kağızda, iki məsəl a ğırlıq teknolojisi, yani, cümlələr ağırlığı və domain ağırlığı dinamik ağırlıq öyrənmə stratejisi ilə, NMT domain adaptasiyonu üçün təklif edilir. IWSLT İngilizce-Alman/Fransız işlərinin impirik sonuçları təklif edilmiş metodların NMT performansını 2.7-6.7 BLEU noktalarına qədər daha yaxşılaşdıra biləcəyini göstərir, həmin təklif sətirlərin 1.6-3.6 BLEU noktalarına qədər daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər.', 'bs': 'Težina instanca je široko primjenjena na adaptaciju domena prevoda na frazi. Međutim, teško je primjenjivati se direktno na neuronski prevod strojeva (NMT), jer NMT nije linearni model. U ovom papiru, dvije tehnologije težine primjerice, tj. težine kazne i težine domena s dinamičnom strategijom učenja težine, predlažu se za adaptaciju domena NMT-a. Impirički rezultati na zadatkima IWSLT-a engleskog-njemačkog/francuskog jezika pokazuju da predložene metode mogu značajno poboljšati učinkovitost NMT-a do 2,7-6,7 BLEU bodova, iznosi postojeće osnovne linije do 1,6-3,6 BLEU bodova.', 'ca': "La ponderació instantària s'ha aplicat ampliament a l'adaptació del domini de traducció de la màquina basada en frases. No obstant això, és difícil aplicar-se directament a la traducció de màquines neuronals (NMT), perquè NMT no és un model linear. En aquest paper, es proponen tecnologies de ponderació de dos exemples, és a dir, ponderació de frases i ponderació de dominis amb una estratègia d'aprenentatge dinàmica de pes, per a l'adaptació del domini NMT. Empirical results on the IWSLT English-German/French tasks show that the proposed methods can substantially improve NMT performance by up to 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, outperforming the existing baselines by up to 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.", 'bn': 'ব্যাক্তিভিত্তিক মেশিন ভিত্তিক অনুবাদ ডোমেনের অ্যাডাপ্টেশনের জন্য ইনস্ট্রেন্স ওজন ব্যাপক প্রয়োগ তবে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সরাসরি প্রয়োগ করার চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে, কারণ এনএমটি কোন লাইনিয়ার মডেল নয়। এই কাগজটিতে দুই উদাহরণ প্রযুক্তির ওজন এবং ডোমেইনের মাধ্যমে প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে এনএমটি ডোমেইনের আপড IWSLT ইংরেজী জার্মান/ফ্রেঞ্চ কাজের উপর সামান্য ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি দুই. 7-6.', 'et': 'Instantsi kaalumist on laialdaselt rakendatud fraasipõhise masintõlke domeeni kohandamisel. Neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) otsene rakendamine on siiski keeruline, sest NMT ei ole lineaarne mudel. Käesolevas töös pakutakse NMT domeeni kohandamiseks välja kaks juhtumit kaalumise tehnoloogiat, st lause kaalumine ja domeeni kaalumine dünaamilise kaaluõppe strateegiaga. Empiirilised tulemused IWSLT inglise-saksa/prantsuse ülesannete kohta näitavad, et kavandatud meetodid võivad oluliselt parandada meretranspordi jõudlust kuni 2,7–6,7 BLEU punkti võrra, ületades olemasolevaid lähtejooni kuni 1,6–3,6 BLEU punkti võrra.', 'cs': 'Vážení instancí bylo široce uplatňováno při adaptaci domény strojového překladu založené na frázích. Je však náročné aplikovat přímo na neuronový strojový překlad (NMT), protože NMT není lineární model. V tomto článku jsou navrženy dvě instanční technologie vážení, tj. vážení vět a vážení domén s dynamickou strategií učení váhy, pro adaptaci NMT domén. Empirické výsledky anglicko-německo-francouzských úkolů IWSLT ukazují, že navržené metody mohou výrazně zlepšit výkon NMT až o 2.7-6.7 BLEU body a překonat stávající základní linie až o 1.6-3.6 BLEU body.', 'fi': 'Instanssin painotusta on sovellettu laajalti fraasipohjaiseen konekäännöksen verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen. Neuraalinen konekäännös (NMT) on kuitenkin haastavaa, koska NMT ei ole lineaarinen malli. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan kahta esimerkkipainotustekniikkaa eli lausepainotusta ja domeenipainotusta dynaamisella painotusstrategialla NMT-domeenin sopeutumiseen. IWSLT englanti-saksa/ranska-tehtävistä saadut empiiriset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetut menetelmät voivat merkittävästi parantaa NMT:n suorituskykyä jopa 2,7–6,7 BLEU-pisteellä, mikä ylittää nykyiset perusviivat jopa 1,6–3,6 BLEU-pisteellä.', 'ha': "An amfani da mai nauyi wa matsayin ayuka da aka ƙayyade wa adaptori ɗin fassarori na baka-gefen. A'aha, amma, yana yanke wa a applet wa Translate of Mashin Naural (NMT) ko kuwa, NMT bã wata masallaci na linjeri ba. A cikin wannan takardan, ana ƙayyade misali biyu masu nauyi wa technyoki, misali, ma'anar nauyi da sauran da aka yi nau'i da kimar ma'anar nau'i mai tsawo, don a sake adadi ga NMT. Empirical matsalar na da aikin IWSLT-Ingiriya-Jarman/French zina nuna cewa metoden da aka buƙata, za'a iya kyautata performance na NMT da up to 2.7-6.7 BLEU points, mai samar da wanda ke gabatar da shi up to 1.6-3.6 BLEU points.", 'he': 'משקל במקרה הופעל באופן רחב לתאמה בתחום התרגום של מכונות מבוסס על ביטויים. בכל אופן, זה מאתגר להפעיל לתרגום מכונות נוירוליות (NMT) ישירות, כי NMT הוא לא מודל לינרי. בעיתון הזה, שני טכנולוגיות משקל דוגמאות, כלומר משקל משפטים ומשקל שטח עם אסטרטגיה לימוד משקל דינמי, מוצעות להשתגלות בשטח NMT. תוצאות אימפריות על משימות IWSLT אנגלית-גרמנית/צרפתית מראות שהשיטות המוצעות יכולות לשפר באופן משמעותי את ההפעלה של NMT עד 2.7-6.7 נקודות BLEU, מעליות את קווי הבסיס הנוכחים עד 1.6-3.6 נקודות BLEU.', 'sk': 'Ponderiranje primerov se pogosto uporablja za prilagajanje domene strojnega prevajanja na podlagi fraz. Vendar pa je izziv uporabe neposredno pri nevralnem strojnem prevajanju (NMT), saj NMT ni linearni model. V prispevku sta predlagana dva primerna tehnologija tehtanja stavkov in domenska tehtanja z dinamično strategijo učenja uteži za prilagoditev domene NMT. Empirični rezultati nalog IWSLT angleško-nemško-francosko kažejo, da lahko predlagane metode bistveno izboljšajo uspešnost NMT za do 2,7–6,7 točke BLEU, kar presega obstoječe osnovne vrstice za do 1,6–3,6 točke BLEU.', 'jv': 'Instance measurement has been expanded to text-supported device translation domain modification. Nanging, iso nggambar kanggo aplikasi kanggo Perintah Jejaring (NMT), dadi NMT ora sampeyan model linear. In this paper, 2 instance measurement Teknçologies, i.e. Sentencils measurement and domain measurement with a dynamics size Learning policy, are proposal for NMT domain modification. Rasane sing perusahaan kanggo nggambar IWSLT Inggris-German/Perancis wong pada ngeranye supoyo cara nggawe biasane supoyo kanggo ngerayakno kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan NMT sampek tanggal 2.7-6.7 B luwih dumateng, mengko iso dianggawe basa sing dumateng sampek tanggal 1.6-3.6 B puntu.', 'bo': 'Instance weighting has been widely applied to phrase-based machine translation domain adaptation. ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་འདྲ་བ་ནི་Neural Machine Translation (NMT)ལ་ཐད་ཀར་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་པར་དཀའ་ངལ་པོ་རེད། གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན NMT དེ་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་མ་རེད། In this paper, two instance weighting technologies, i.e., sentence weighting and domain weighting with a dynamic weight learning strategy, are proposed for NMT domain adaptation. གཟུགས་འགྲུལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མིག་ཐག་ནས་གཟུགས་རིས་English-German/French བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐོག་ལས་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Regularization techniques for fine-tuning in neural machine translation', 'ar': 'تقنيات التنظيم للضبط الدقيق في الترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': 'Techniques de régularisation pour affiner la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'Técnicas de regularización para el ajuste fino de la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Técnicas de regularização para ajuste fino em tradução automática neural', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳の微調整のための規則化技術', 'zh': '用神经机器翻译微调正则化术', 'ru': 'Методы регуляризации для точной настройки в нейронном машинном переводе', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में ठीक ट्यूनिंग के लिए नियमितीकरण तकनीक', 'ga': 'Teicnící rialtachta le haghaidh mionchoigeartú in aistriúchán meaisín néarach', 'ka': 'რეგილარიზაციის ტექნოგიები ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაში', 'hu': 'Regularizációs technikák az idegi gépi fordítás finomhangolásához', 'el': 'Τεχνικές ρύθμισης για την τελειοποίηση της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'it': 'Tecniche di regolarizzazione per la messa a punto nella traduzione automatica neurale', 'lt': 'Reguliavimo metodai, skirti tiksliai sureguliuoti nervinės mašinos vertimą', 'mk': 'Regularization techniques for fine-tuning in neural machine translation', 'ms': 'Regularization techniques for fine-tuning in neural machine translation', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d സുന്ദരിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള നിയമപരമായ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്', 'kk': 'Невралдық машинаның аудармасында дұрыс түзету үшін регулярлау техникалары', 'mt': 'Tekniki ta’ regolarizzazzjoni għall-irfinar fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Дөвөрмөц машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын сайхан цэвэрлэх техник', 'sr': 'Regularizacijske tehnike za fino podešavanje u prevodu neuralne mašine', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාවේ හොඳින් සැකසුම් තාක්ෂණය', 'ro': 'Tehnici de regularizare pentru reglarea fină în traducerea automată neurală', 'pl': 'Techniki regularyzacji w zakresie dostrajania neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் நன்றாக மாற்றுவதற்கான வழக்கமைப்பு தொழில்நுட்பம்', 'sv': 'Regleringstekniker för finjustering i neural maskinöversättning', 'ur': 'نیورل ماشین ترجمہ میں پاکیزہ تنظیم کرنے کے لئے ریگلاریزی ٹیکنیک', 'so': 'Teknooyinka la soodajinta ee fine-tuning in neural machine translation', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Công nghệ chỉnh lại việc dịch chính trong máy thần kinh', 'bg': 'Техники за регулиране на фината настройка в невронния машинен превод', 'hr': 'Regularizacijske tehnike za fino prilagođenje u prevodu neuroloških strojeva', 'nl': 'Regularisatietechnieken voor finetuning in neurale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Regulariseringsteknikker til finjustering i neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Regularisierungstechniken zur Feinabstimmung in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 중의 정규화 마이크로스피커 기술', 'id': 'Teknik regularisasi untuk penyesuaian dalam terjemahan mesin saraf', 'tr': 'Neural maşynyň terjimesinde ýene-täzelemek üçin düzenleme teknikleri', 'af': 'Regularisasie teknike vir fyn- tuning in neural masjien vertaling', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'fa': 'تکنیک\u200cهای تغییر قانونی برای تغییر درست کردن در ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'sw': 'Teknolojia za utaratibu kwa ajili ya kutangaza vizuri katika tafsiri ya mashine ya asili', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման վերահսկման տեխնիկան', 'az': 'Nöral maşın çevirisində düzgün düzgün düzgün təklif metodları', 'bs': 'Regularizacijske tehnike za fino prilagođenje u prevodu neuralne mašine', 'sq': 'Teknikët e rregullimit për rregullimin e përkthimit të makinave nervore', 'ca': 'Técnices de regularització per a ajustar la traducció de màquines neurals', 'et': 'Regulariseerimise meetodid neuraalse masintõlke peenhäälestuseks', 'bn': 'নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের ভালোভাবে সুনিয়মিতকরণ প্রযুক্তি', 'fi': 'SĂ¤Ă¤ntelytekniikat neurokonekĂ¤Ă¤nnĂ¶ksen hienosĂ¤Ă¤tĂ¶Ă¤ varten', 'cs': 'Regularizační techniky pro jemné ladění v neuronovém strojovém překladu', 'jv': 'tab', 'he': 'טכניקות רפורליזציה לטיפול בתרגום מכונות עצביות', 'sk': 'Tehnike regularizacije za fino nastavitev v nevronskem strojnem prevajanju', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'neural machine translation(fine-tuning)ནང་དུ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ།'}
{'en': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset. In this scenario, overfitting is a major challenge. We investigate a number of techniques to reduce overfitting and improve transfer learning, including regularization techniques such as dropout and L2-regularization towards an out-of-domain prior. In addition, we introduce tuneout, a novel regularization technique inspired by dropout. We apply these techniques, alone and in combination, to neural machine translation, obtaining improvements on IWSLT datasets for EnglishGerman and EnglishRussian. We also investigate the amounts of in-domain training data needed for domain adaptation in NMT, and find a logarithmic relationship between the amount of training data and gain in BLEU score.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في تقنيات تكييف المجال الخاضع للإشراف للترجمة الآلية العصبية حيث يتم تكييف نموذج موجود تم تدريبه على مجموعة بيانات كبيرة خارج المجال مع مجموعة بيانات صغيرة في المجال. في هذا السيناريو ، يمثل فرط التجهيز تحديًا كبيرًا. نحن نحقق في عدد من التقنيات لتقليل فرط التخصيص وتحسين تعلم النقل ، بما في ذلك تقنيات التنظيم مثل التسرب وتنظيم L2 نحو خارج المجال مسبقًا. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقدم تقنية ضبط الصوت ، وهي تقنية تنظيم جديدة مستوحاة من التسرب. نحن نطبق هذه التقنيات ، بمفردها أو مجتمعة ، على الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، والحصول على تحسينات على مجموعات بيانات IWSLT للغة الإنجليزية → الألمانية والإنجليزية → الروسية. نحن نحقق أيضًا في كميات بيانات التدريب في المجال اللازمة لتكييف المجال في NMT ، ونجد علاقة لوغاريتمية بين كمية بيانات التدريب والمكاسب في درجة BLEU.', 'fr': "Nous étudions des techniques d'adaptation de domaine supervisée pour la traduction automatique neuronale dans lesquelles un modèle existant formé sur un ensemble de données hors domaine important est adapté à un petit ensemble de données dans le domaine. Dans ce scénario, le suréquipement constitue un défi majeur. Nous étudions un certain nombre de techniques pour réduire le surajustement et améliorer l'apprentissage par transfert, y compris des techniques de régularisation telles que le décrochage et la régularisation L2 vers un précédent hors domaine. De plus, nous introduisons Tuneout, une nouvelle technique de régularisation inspirée du décrochage. Nous appliquons ces techniques, seules ou en combinaison, à la traduction automatique neuronale, obtenant ainsi des améliorations sur les ensembles de données IWSLT pour l'anglais→allemand et l'anglais→le russe. Nous étudions également les quantités de données d'entraînement dans le domaine nécessaires pour l'adaptation du domaine en NMT, et trouvons une relation logarithmique entre la quantité de données d'entraînement et le gain du score BLEU.", 'es': 'Investigamos técnicas para la adaptación supervisada de dominios para la traducción automática neuronal en las que un modelo existente entrenado en un gran conjunto de datos fuera del dominio se adapta a un pequeño conjunto de datos dentro del dominio. En este escenario, el sobreajuste es un desafío importante. Investigamos una serie de técnicas para reducir el sobreajuste y mejorar el aprendizaje de transferencia, incluidas las técnicas de regularización como la deserción y la regularización L2 hacia un previo fuera del dominio. Además, presentamos tuneout, una novedosa técnica de regularización inspirada en la deserción escolar. Aplicamos estas técnicas, solas o en combinación, a la traducción automática neuronal, obteniendo mejoras en los conjuntos de datos IWSLT para inglés→alemán e inglés→ruso. También investigamos las cantidades de datos de entrenamiento en el dominio necesarios para la adaptación de dominio en NMT y encontramos una relación logarítmica entre la cantidad de datos de entrenamiento y la ganancia en la puntuación BLEU.', 'pt': 'Investigamos técnicas para adaptação de domínio supervisionado para tradução de máquina neural em que um modelo existente treinado em um grande conjunto de dados fora do domínio é adaptado a um pequeno conjunto de dados no domínio. Nesse cenário, o overfitting é um grande desafio. Investigamos uma série de técnicas para reduzir o overfitting e melhorar o aprendizado de transferência, incluindo técnicas de regularização, como dropout e regularização L2 em direção a uma priorização fora de domínio. Além disso, apresentamos o tuneout, uma nova técnica de regularização inspirada no dropout. Aplicamos essas técnicas, isoladamente e em combinação, à tradução automática neural, obtendo melhorias nos conjuntos de dados IWSLT para inglês→alemão e inglês→russo. Também investigamos a quantidade de dados de treinamento no domínio necessários para adaptação de domínio no NMT e encontramos uma relação logarítmica entre a quantidade de dados de treinamento e o ganho na pontuação BLEU.', 'ja': '私たちは、大規模なドメイン外データセットでトレーニングされた既存のモデルが小規模なドメイン内データセットに適応される神経機械翻訳のための監視されたドメイン適応のための技術を調査します。このシナリオでは、オーバーフィッティングが大きな課題です。私たちは、過剰適合を減らし、転移学習を改善するためのいくつかのテクニックを調査します。これには、ドロップアウトやL 2規則化などの規則化テクニックが含まれます。また、中退をモチーフにした斬新なレギュラー化手法「TUNEOUT」を導入。私たちは、これらの技術を単独で、または組み合わせて、神経機械翻訳に適用し、英語、→ドイツ語、および→ロシア語のIWSLTデータセットの改善を取得します。また、NMTのドメイン適応に必要なドメイン内トレーニングデータの量を調査し、トレーニングデータの量とBLEUスコアのゲインとの対数関係を見出します。', 'hi': 'हम तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए पर्यवेक्षित डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए तकनीकों की जांच करते हैं जहां एक बड़े आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित एक मौजूदा मॉडल को एक छोटे से इन-डोमेन डेटासेट के लिए अनुकूलित किया जाता है। इस परिदृश्य में, overfitting एक बड़ी चुनौती है। हम ओवरफिटिंग को कम करने और हस्तांतरण सीखने में सुधार करने के लिए कई तकनीकों की जांच करते हैं, जिसमें नियमितीकरण तकनीकें शामिल हैं जैसे कि ड्रॉपआउट और एल 2-नियमितीकरण आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन पूर्व की ओर। इसके अलावा, हम ट्यूनआउट, ड्रॉपआउट से प्रेरित एक उपन्यास नियमितीकरण तकनीक पेश करते हैं। हम इन तकनीकों को लागू करते हैं, अकेले और संयोजन में, तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए, अंग्रेजी→जर्मन और अंग्रेजी→रूसी के लिए IWSLT डेटासेट पर सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं। हम NMT में डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए आवश्यक इन-डोमेन प्रशिक्षण डेटा की मात्रा की भी जांच करते हैं, और प्रशिक्षण डेटा की मात्रा और BLEU स्कोर में लाभ के बीच एक लॉगरिदमिक संबंध पाते हैं।', 'zh': '臣等考神经机器翻译监域自适其术,其在域外数集上训练者,随小域内数集。 如此者,过拟合一主挑战也。 臣等考其损益拟合改进迁徙之术,包正则化,如辍学L2-正则化,以致域外先验。 又言 tuneout,此 dropout 新正则化术也。 合用于神经机器翻译,而改入英语→德语、英语→俄语之IWSLT数集。 又考NMT中域宜域内训练数据量,并见训练数据量与BLEU分益之对数。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем методы для контролируемой адаптации домена для нейронного машинного перевода, где существующая модель, обученная на большом наборе внедоменных данных, адаптирована к небольшому набору внутридоменных данных. В этом сценарии переоснащение является серьезной проблемой. Мы исследуем ряд методов, чтобы уменьшить переобучение и улучшить обучение передаче, включая методы регуляризации, такие как отсев и L2-регуляризация по отношению к внедоменному предшественнику. Кроме того, мы представляем Tuneout, новую технику регуляризации, вдохновленную выбыванием. Мы применяем эти методы, самостоятельно и в сочетании, к нейронному машинному переводу, получая улучшения на наборах данных IWSLT для английского→немецкого и английского→русского языков. Мы также исследуем объемы внутридоменных обучающих данных, необходимых для адаптации домена в НМТ, и находим логарифмическую зависимость между объемом обучающих данных и увеличением балла по шкале BLEU.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar theicnící le haghaidh oiriúnú fearainn maoirsithe le haghaidh néar-aistriúcháin meaisín i gcás ina ndéantar samhail atá ann cheana féin atá oilte ar thacar sonraí mór lasmuigh den fhearann a oiriúnú do thacar sonraí beag laistigh den fhearann. Sa chás seo, is dúshlán mór é rófheisteas. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar roinnt teicníochtaí chun rófheisteas a laghdú agus chun foghlaim aistrithe a fheabhsú, lena n-áirítear teicníochtaí rialtachta ar nós titim amach agus gnáthú T2 i dtreo réamhfheistithe lasmuigh den fhearann. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid isteach tuneout, teicníocht nua rialtachta spreagtha ag dropout. Cuirimid na teicníochtaí seo i bhfeidhm, ina n-aonar agus i dteannta a chéile, ar aistriúchán meaisín néarúil, ag fáil feabhsuithe ar thacair sonraí IWSLT don Bhéarla → Gearmáinis agus Béarla → Rúisis. Déanaimid imscrúdú freisin ar na méideanna sonraí oiliúna in-fearainn a theastaíonn le haghaidh oiriúnú fearainn in NMT, agus aimsímid gaol logartamach idir an méid sonraí oiliúna agus gnóthachan sa scór BLEU.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებისთვის მოდელი, რომლებიც დიდ დიომინის გარეშე მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის მანქანაციისთვის დავაკეთებულია ამ სინარიოში, ძალიან დასაწყება დიდი გამოცდილება. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ რამდენიმე ტექნექციები, რომლებიც საუკეთესო სწავლებას და გაუკეთესო გასწავლებას, რომლებიც რეგილარიზაციის ტექნექციები, როგორც საუკეთესო და L2-რეგი დამატებით, ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ტუნეოს, პრომენტის რეგილარიზაციის ტექნექტიკა, რომელიც დავიწყენება სტუნექტით. ჩვენ ამ ტექნექციების გამოყენება, ერთად და კომბინეციაში, ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგუნებისთვის, მივიღებთ IWSLT მონაცემების კომბინეციაში ინგლისური და ინგ ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებთ მონაცემების მონაცემების რაოდენობები, რომლებიც NMT-ში იჭირდება დიომინური ადატაციაში, და მოიძებნა ლოდარიტმიური შესახებ განსწავლების მონაცემების და BLEU-ის', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε τεχνικές επίβλεψης προσαρμογής τομέων για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση όπου ένα υπάρχον μοντέλο εκπαιδευμένο σε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων εκτός τομέα προσαρμόζεται σε ένα μικρό σύνολο δεδομένων εντός τομέα. Σε αυτό το σενάριο, η υπερπροσαρμογή αποτελεί σημαντική πρόκληση. Ερευνούμε μια σειρά τεχνικών για τη μείωση της υπερπροσαρμογής και τη βελτίωση της μάθησης μεταφοράς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων τεχνικών κανονικοποίησης όπως η παράπτωση και η ρύθμιση προς έναν προηγούμενο εκτός τομέα. Επιπλέον, εισάγουμε μια νέα τεχνική κανονικοποίησης εμπνευσμένη από το παράπτωμα. Εφαρμόζουμε αυτές τις τεχνικές, μόνες και σε συνδυασμό, στην νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, επιτυγχάνοντας βελτιώσεις στα σύνολα δεδομένων για τα Αγγλικά Γερμανικά και Αγγλικά Ρωσικά. Ερευνούμε επίσης τα ποσά των δεδομένων κατάρτισης εντός του τομέα που απαιτούνται για την προσαρμογή του τομέα στο NMT, και βρίσκουμε μια λογαριθμική σχέση μεταξύ της ποσότητας των δεδομένων κατάρτισης και του κέρδους στην βαθμολογία BLEU.', 'hu': 'Vizsgáljuk a felügyelt domain adaptációs technikákat neurális gépi fordításhoz, ahol egy meglévő modell, amelyet egy nagy domain kívül képzett adatkészletre alkalmaznak, egy kis domain adatkészlethez igazítanak. Ebben a forgatókönyvben a túlteljesítés komoly kihívást jelent. Számos technikát vizsgálunk a túlteljesítés csökkentésére és a transzfertanulás javítására, beleértve a szabályozási technikákat, mint például a lemaradás és az L2-szabályozás a domain kívüli korábbi felé. Ezenkívül bemutatjuk a tuneout-t, egy új szabályozási technikát, amelyet a lemaradás ihletett. Ezeket a technikákat önmagában és kombinációban alkalmazzuk az idegi gépi fordításra, így továbbfejlesztjük az IWSLT adatkészleteket angol német és angol orosz nyelven. Vizsgáljuk továbbá a domain adaptációhoz szükséges adatok mennyiségét NMT-ben, és logaritmikus összefüggést találunk a képzési adatok mennyisége és a BLEU pontszám nyeresége között.', 'it': "Investighiamo tecniche per l'adattamento supervisionato del dominio per la traduzione automatica neurale in cui un modello esistente addestrato su un grande set di dati fuori dominio è adattato a un piccolo set di dati in-dominio. In questo scenario, l'eccessivo adattamento è una sfida importante. Investighiamo una serie di tecniche per ridurre il sovrafitting e migliorare l'apprendimento del trasferimento, incluse tecniche di regolarizzazione come dropout e regolarizzazione L2 verso un precedente fuori dominio. Inoltre, introduciamo tuneout, una nuova tecnica di regolarizzazione ispirata al dropout. Applichiamo queste tecniche, da sole e in combinazione, alla traduzione automatica neurale, ottenendo miglioramenti sui dataset IWSLT per l'inglese tedesco e l'inglese russo. Esaminiamo anche la quantità di dati di formazione in-domain necessari per l'adattamento del dominio in NMT e troviamo una relazione logaritmica tra la quantità di dati di formazione e il guadagno nel punteggio BLEU.", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame prižiūrimos srities prisitaikymo prie nervinių mašin ų vertimo metodus, kai esamas model is, parengtas dideliu ne srities duomenų rinkiniu, pritaikomas prie mažo srities duomenų rinkinio. Šiame scenarijuje didelis iššūkis yra pernelyg didelis įrengimas. Mes tiriame kelis metodus, kuriais siekiama sumažinti perteklinius įrenginius ir pagerinti mokymąsi perkėlimu, įskaitant reguliavimo metodus, pvz., nutraukimą ir L2 reguliavimą, siekiant anksčiau netaikyti sričių. Be to, mes pristatome tuneuotą, naują reguliavimo metodą, įkvėptą pasitraukimo iš darbo. Mes taikome šiuos metodus, vieni ir kartu, neurologiniam mašin ų vertimui, siekiant patobulinti IWSLT duomenų rinkinius anglų vokiečių ir anglų rusų kalbomis. Taip pat tiriame mokymo srities duomenis, reikalingus prisitaikymui prie srities NMT, ir randame logaritminius mokymo duomenų kiekio ir BLEU rezultato įgijimo ryšius.', 'mk': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset.  In this scenario, overfitting is a major challenge.  Истражуваме голем број техники за намалување на прекумерното поставување и подобрување на трансферентното учење, вклучувајќи ги и техниките за регуларизација како што се отпуштање и регуларизација на L2 кон надвор од доменот претходно. In addition, we introduce tuneout, a novel regularization technique inspired by dropout.  Ние ги применуваме овие техники, сами и во комбинација, на нервен машински превод, добивајќи подобрувања на IWSLT податоци за англиски германски и англиски руски. Исто така, ги истражуваме количините на податоци за обука во домен потребни за адаптација на домен во НМТ, и најдовме логаритмички однос помеѓу количината на податоци за обука и добивањето на оценката БЛЕУ.', 'ms': 'Kami menyelidiki teknik untuk penyesuaian domain yang diawasi untuk terjemahan mesin saraf dimana model yang wujud dilatih pada set data luar domain besar disesuaikan kepada set data dalam domain kecil. In this scenario, overfitting is a major challenge.  We investigate a number of techniques to reduce overfitting and improve transfer learning, including regularization techniques such as dropout and L2-regularization towards an out-of-domain prior.  Selain itu, kami memperkenalkan tuneout, teknik pengaturan baru yang diinspirasi oleh keluar. We apply these techniques, alone and in combination, to neural machine translation, obtaining improvements on IWSLT datasets for English German and English Russian.  Kami juga menyelidiki jumlah data latihan dalam domain yang diperlukan untuk penyesuaian domain dalam NMT, dan mencari hubungan logaritmi antara jumlah data latihan dan keuntungan dalam skor BLEU.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയ്ക്കായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഡൊമെന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d നാം അന്വ ഈ സിനേരിയോയില്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നത് ഒരു വലിയ വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാലാണ്. പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പായി നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യം കുറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനും കുറച്ചു ടെക്നിക്കേഷനുകളും നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന In addition, we introduce tuneout, a novel regularization technique inspired by dropout.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഒറ്റയ്ക്കും, കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും, ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും, ഇംഗ്ലീ NMT-ല്\u200d ഡോമെന്\u200d ഡാഡിപ്പേഷന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ എണ്ണം നമ്മളും അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ബിലിയു സ്കോരില്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ലഭ്യമ', 'mt': "Aħna ninvestigaw tekniki għall-adattament tad-dominju sorveljat għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali fejn mudell eżistenti mħarreġ fuq sett kbir ta’ dejta barra mid-dominju huwa adattat għal sett żgħir ta’ dejta fid-dominju. F’dan ix-xenarju, it-tagħmir żejjed huwa sfida ewlenija. Aħna ninvestigaw għadd ta' tekniki biex inaqqsu t-tagħmir żejjed u jtejbu t-tagħlim tat-trasferiment, inklużi tekniki ta' regolarizzazzjoni bħat-tneħħija mill-iskola u r-regolarizzazzjoni tal-L2 lejn qabel barra d-dominju. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nintroduċu tuneout, teknika ġdida ta’ regolarizzazzjoni ispirata mill-waqfien mill-iskola. Aħna napplikaw dawn it-tekniki, waħedhom u flimkien, għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali, li jiksbu titjib fis-settijiet tad-dejta tal-IWSLT għall-Ingliż Ġermaniż u l-Ingliż Russu. Investigaw ukoll l-ammonti ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ fid-dominju meħtieġa għall-adattament tad-dominju fl-NMT, u nsibu relazzjoni logaritmika bejn l-ammont ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ u l-qligħ fil-punteġġ BLEU.", 'pl': 'Badamy techniki nadzorowanej adaptacji domeny dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego, gdzie istniejący model trenowany na dużym zbiorze danych poza domeną jest dostosowany do małego zbioru danych wewnątrz domeny. W tym scenariuszu nadmierne dopasowanie jest dużym wyzwaniem. Badamy szereg technik zmniejszających nadmierne dopasowanie i poprawę uczenia się transferu, w tym technik regularyzacji, takich jak rzucanie się i regularyzacja L2 w kierunku poza domeną. Dodatkowo wprowadzamy tuneout, nowatorską technikę regularyzacji inspirowaną wypadkiem. Stosujemy te techniki, samodzielnie i w połączeniu, do tłumaczenia maszynowego neuronowego, uzyskując ulepszenia zbiorów danych IWSLT dla angielskiego niemieckiego i angielskiego rosyjskiego. Badamy również ilość danych treningowych wewnątrz domeny potrzebnych do adaptacji domeny w NMT oraz znajdujemy relację logarytmiczną między ilością danych treningowych a zyskiem wyniku BLEU.', 'ro': 'Investigăm tehnici de adaptare supravegheată a domeniului pentru traducerea automată neurală în cazul în care un model existent instruit pe un set mare de date din afara domeniului este adaptat la un set mic de date din domeniu. În acest scenariu, suprasolicitarea este o provocare majoră. Investigăm o serie de tehnici pentru a reduce supraadaptarea și îmbunătăți învățarea transferului, inclusiv tehnici de regularizare, cum ar fi abandonul și regularizarea L2 către un anterior în afara domeniului. În plus, introducem tuneout, o nouă tehnică de regularizare inspirată de abandon. Aplicăm aceste tehnici, singure și în combinație, la traducerea automată neurală, obținând îmbunătățiri asupra seturilor de date IWSLT pentru limba engleză germană și engleză rusă. De asemenea, investigăm cantitățile de date de instruire în domeniu necesare pentru adaptarea domeniului în NMT și găsim o relație logaritmică între cantitatea de date de instruire și câștigul în scorul BLEU.', 'kk': 'Біз невралдық компьютердің аудармасының бақылау домендің адаптациясының техникаларын зерттейміз. Бұл үлкен домендің деректер қорларының үлкен үлгісі домендің деректер қорларына әрекетті кішкент Бұл сценарий үлкен сәйкестік - маңызды мәселе. Біз бірнеше технологияларды өзгерту және аудару үйренімін жақсарту үшін зерттеуді зерттеуді, мысалы, тұтас және L2- үлгіліктерді алдындағы доменге қарсы жоқ деңгейіне қарай жасау техно Қосымша, біз тунеутты, романдық қадамдастыру техникасын таңдаймыз. Біз бұл технологияларды жалғыз және біріктіріп, неврал машинаның аудармасына қолданып, IWSLT деректер жиындарын ағылшын тілінде және ағылшын тілінде жақсартып алдық. Біз сондай-ақ NMT домендің адаптациясы үшін керек домендің оқыту деректерінің санын зерттеп, және BLEU нөмірінде оқыту деректерінің арасындағы логарифмдік қатынасын табуыз.', 'no': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset. I denne scenarien er overfitting ein stor utfordring. Vi undersøker mange teknikk for å redusera overfitting og forbedra læring av overføringar, inkludert reguleringsteknikk som tråd og L2-regularisasjon mot eit uten domene før. I tillegg introduserer vi tuneout ein novel reguleringsteknikk inspirert av dropout. Vi bruker desse teknikkene, alene og i kombinasjon, til neuralmaskinsomsetjinga, og får forbedringar på IWSLT-datasett for engelsk tysk og engelsk russisk. Vi undersøker også kva mange opplæringsdata som treng i domene for domenetilpassing i NMT, og finn ein logaritmisk forhold mellom kva mykje opplæringsdata og får i BLEU-poeng.', 'so': "Waxaynu baaraynaa qalabka la ilaaliyo tilmaamaha internetka oo lagu turjumayo tarjumaadka maskaxda, kaas oo lagu baro model heysta oo ku qoran macluumaad aad u weyn oo a an domain-ka-lahayn lagu beddelo macluumaad yar. Muuqashadan, dib u dhaafitaanku waa dhibaato weyn. We investigate a number of techniques to reduce overfitting and improve transfer learning, including regularization techniques such as dropout and L2-regularization towards an out-of-domain prior.  Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu soo bandhignaa dhaqdhaqaaq qodob ah oo lagu waxyoodo dhaqdhaqaaq. Waxyaabahaas waxaynu u dalbannaa tarjumaadka maskaxda, kaliga iyo wadajirka ah, si aan u helno hagitaan tarjumaadka qoraalka IWSLT ee Ingiriis iyo Ingiriis. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa macluumaadka waxbarashada gudaha ee looga baahan yahay in lagu beddelo gudaha NMT, waxaana helaynaa xiriir la xiriir oo u dhexeeya tirada macluumaadka waxbarashada iyo faa'iidada scorta BLEU.", 'sv': 'Vi undersöker tekniker för övervakad domänanpassning för neural maskinöversättning där en befintlig modell utbildad på ett stort dataset utanför domänen anpassas till ett litet dataset inom domänen. I detta scenario är överanpassning en stor utmaning. Vi undersöker ett antal tekniker för att minska överpassning och förbättra transfer learning, inklusive regulariseringstekniker såsom dropout och L2-regularisering mot en out-of-domain tidigare. Dessutom introducerar vi tuneout, en ny regleringsteknik inspirerad av dropout. Vi tillämpar dessa tekniker, ensamma och i kombination, på neural maskinöversättning, och erhåller förbättringar på IWSLT datauppsättningar för engelska tyska och engelska ryska. Vi undersöker också mängden in-domain träningsdata som behövs för domänanpassning i NMT, och hittar ett logaritmiskt samband mellan mängden träningsdata och vinst i BLEU-poäng.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн удирдлагатай зохицуулалтын технологийг судалж байна. Харин том домены өгөгдлийн санд сургалтын загвар нь жижиг домены өгөгдлийн санд зохицуулагддаг. Энэ хувилбарт хэтэрхий тохиромжтой байдал бол чухал сорилт. Бид маш олон техник судалгаа хийж, шилжүүлэх сургалтыг багасгаж, хөдөлгөөн сургалтыг сайжруулахын тулд, өмнө нь холбоотой байдлаар шилжүүлэх боломжтой техникуудыг судалж байна. Үүнээс гадна бид дуу шууд, шинэ шинэчлэлтийн давхарлах техникийг танилцуулдаг. Бид эдгээр техникуудыг ганцаараа холбоотой, мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулж, IWSLT Герман, Англи хэлний Орос хэлний өгөгдлийн санд сайжруулах боломжтой болгодог. Мөн бид NMT-д зохицуулахын тулд хэрэгтэй холбоотой суралцах өгөгдлийн хэмжээг судалж, BLEU-н тооны хоорондын логарифмын харилцаа олох юм.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட ட டொமைன் ஒதுக்கீட்டுக்கான தொழில்நுட்பத்தைத் தேர்வு செய்கிறோம் புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான மாதிர இந்த காட்சியில், மீறுதல் ஒரு மிகப் பெரிய சவால் நாம் சில தொழில்நுட்பங்களை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம் அனுப்புதல் மற்றும் மாற்றுதல் கற்றத்தை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, வெளியே வெளியே இருக்கும் முன்னால In addition, we introduce tuneout, a novel regularization technique inspired by dropout.  நாம் இந்த தொழில்நுட்பத்தை தனியாக மற்றும் ஒன்றிணைப்பில் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றிக்கு, IWSLT தரவுத்தளங நாம் NMT-ல் உள்ள பயிற்சி தரவு தேவைப்பட்டிருக்கும் தொடர்பை தேடுகிறோம். பிலியு மத்திப்பு தகவல் மற்றும் பெருக்கும் மதிப்பிற்கு இடையே ஒர', 'sr': 'Istražujemo tehnike za nadzornu adaptaciju domena za prevod neuralne mašine gde je postojaći model obučen na velikoj seti podataka iz domena prilagođen malim setom podataka u domenu. U ovom scenariju, preuklapanje je veliki izazov. Istražujemo brojne tehnike da smanjimo preuređenje i poboljšamo učenje prijenosa, uključujući tehnike regularizacije kao što su propasti i regularizacija L2 prema izvan domena ranije. Osim toga, predstavljamo tuneout, novu tehniku regularizacije inspirisanu od dropout. Primjenjujemo te tehnike, sami i u kombinaciji, na prevod neuralne mašine, dobivanje poboljšanja podataka IWSLT za engleski njemački i engleski ruski. Istražujemo i količine podataka o obuci u domenu potrebnih za adaptaciju domena u NMT-u, i pronalazimo logaritmisku vezu između količine podataka o obuci i dobivanja u rezultatu BLEU-a.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂා කරලා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂා කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල මැෂින් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහ මේ සිනේරියෝ වලින්, ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වැඩිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා විශාල විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාරයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්වාස කරන්න, ප්\u200dරමාණය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාරයක් සමග ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ L ඒ වගේම, අපි ටුනියෝට් එක්ක පෙනුම් කරනවා, නියම සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් විද්\u200dයාපනය කරනවා. අපි මේ තාක්ෂණය, තනියමයි සම්බන්ධයෙන්, න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනයෙන්, IWSLT දත්ත සේට් එක්ක ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජර අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා NMT වලට අවශ්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධාන දත්තයේ ලොගරිත්මික සම්බන්ධයක් හොයාගන්න.', 'ur': 'ہم نے نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے تحقیق کی ٹیکنالوں کا تحقیق کرتا ہے جہاں ایک بڑے دومین ڈیٹ سٹ پر ایک چھوٹی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ آمادہ کیا گیا ہے. اس سناریو میں، اوپر فیٹ کرنے کا ایک بڑا چال ہے۔ ہم بہت سی تکنیک تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ اوپر فائدہ کے ساتھ کم کریں اور ترنسفور کی تعلیم کو بہتر کریں، جیسے پہلے ایک دومین خارج کی طرف ڈروپوٹ اور L2-ریگالیز تکنیک بھی شامل کریں۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے ٹونیوٹ کو پہنچا دیا، ایک نئی سیدھی روشنی تکنیک جو ڈروپوٹ کے ذریعے الهام کی جاتی ہے. ہم ان تکنیک کو اکیلے اور ترکیب میں استعمال کرتے ہیں، نئورل ماشین ترکیب پر، IWSLT ڈیٹ سٹ پر انگلیسی جرمن اور انگلیسی روسی کے لئے بہترین ترکیب حاصل کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی NMT میں ڈومین کے اندازے کے لئے لازم ہے ڈومین کی تربین ڈیٹوں کی تعلیم کی مقدار کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں، اور BLEU اسکور میں لوگریٹمیک رابطہ تلاش کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info Bu tashkilotda, koʻchirish juda katta qiyin. Biz bir necha teknologizni o'rganishni kamaytirish va o'rganishni o'zgartirish uchun ko'plab o'rganishni o'rganamiz. Shunday qilamiz, bir necha teknologizni o'rganishni o'rganishni ko'rganamiz, shunday holatdan oldin qo'yish tugmalari va boshqar Ko'pchilik, biz yordam boshqarish tugmasini ko'rsatumiz. Biz bu teknologilarni faqat va birlashtirishga qo'llamiz, yaxshi mashina tarjima qilamiz, ingliz tili va ingliz tili Ruscha uchun IWSLT maʼlumotlar tarjimalarini o'zgartirish uchun yaxshi tarjima qilamiz. Biz NMT'da domen tahrirlash uchun kerakli maʼlumotlar soni tahrirlamiz va BLEU scorida taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar orasidagi logarifmik bogʻlamasini topamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi điều tra về những kỹ thuật được kiểm soát cho các phiên dịch mạng bộ phẩn bộ phẩm mạn đã có ở một bộ thống lớn ở ngoài tập này được thay đổi. Trong trường hợp này, quá mức là một thách thức lớn. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu một số kỹ thuật để giảm cường hóa và cải thiện việc học chuyển nhượng, bao gồm các kỹ thuật luân hồi như là rút ra và chỉnh hóa L2 về một trường tiền trước. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi giới thiệu khí ga, một kỹ thuật chỉnh sửa mới tinh vi rút. Chúng tôi sử dụng những kỹ thuật này, đơn độc và kết hợp, để dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh, đạt được những cải tiến trên bộ dữ liệu IWSLT cho người Anh và Anh Nga. Chúng tôi cũng nghiên cứu các lượng trạng trạng dạng cần để giải quyết bật công trong công ty NMT, và tìm ra một sự quan hệ theo khoản học giữa các học thông tin và cuộc mạc máy', 'bg': 'Проучваме техники за контролирана адаптация на домейна за невронен машинен превод, при които съществуващ модел, обучен върху голям набор от данни извън домейна, е адаптиран към малък набор от данни в домейна. В този сценарий пренасочването е голямо предизвикателство. Проучваме редица техники за намаляване на пренасочването и подобряване на трансферното обучение, включително техники за регулиране като отпадане и регулировка към предшественик извън домейна. В допълнение, ние въвеждаме тунеут, нова техника за регулиране, вдъхновена от отпадането. Ние прилагаме тези техники, самостоятелно и в комбинация, за невронен машинен превод, като получаваме подобрения в наборите от данни за английски немски и английски руски. Също така изследваме количеството данни за обучение в областта, необходими за адаптация на домейна в НМТ, и намираме логаритмична връзка между количеството данни за обучение и печалбата в резултат на БУУ.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo tehnike za nadzornu adaptaciju domena za prevod neuralnih strojeva gdje je postojeći model obučen na velikoj seti podataka iz domena prilagođen malim setom podataka u domenu. U ovom scenariju, pretjeranje je veliki izazov. Istražujemo brojne tehnike za smanjenje preuključenja i poboljšanje učenja prijenosa, uključujući tehnike regularizacije poput dropout i L2-regularizacije prema izvan domena prije. Osim toga, predstavljamo tuneout, novu tehniku regularizacije inspiriranu od dropout. Primjenjujemo te tehnike, sam i u kombinaciji, na prevod neuroloških strojeva, dobivanje poboljšanja podataka IWSLT za njemački i engleski ruski. Također istražujemo količine podataka o obuci u domenu potrebnih za adaptaciju domena u NMT-u, i pronalazimo logaritmisku vezu između količine podataka o obuci i dobivanja u rezultatu BLEU-a.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger teknikker til overvåget domænetilpasning til neural maskinoversættelse, hvor en eksisterende model trænet på et stort datasæt uden for domænet er tilpasset et lille datasæt inden for domænet. I dette scenario er overtilpasning en stor udfordring. Vi undersøger en række teknikker til at reducere overfitting og forbedre overførselslæring, herunder reguleringsteknikker såsom dropout og L2-regulering mod en forudgående uden for domænet. Derudover introducerer vi tuneout, en ny reguleringsteknik inspireret af dropout. Vi anvender disse teknikker alene og i kombination til neural maskinoversættelse og opnår forbedringer på IWSLT datasæt til engelsk tysk og engelsk russisk. Vi undersøger også mængden af in-domain træningsdata, der er nødvendige for domænetilpasning i NMT, og finder et logaritmisk sammenhæng mellem mængden af træningsdata og gevinsten i BLEU score.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken technieken voor supervised domein adaptatie voor neurale machinevertaling waarbij een bestaand model getraind op een grote out-of-domain dataset wordt aangepast aan een kleine in-domain dataset. In dit scenario is overfitting een grote uitdaging. We onderzoeken een aantal technieken om overfitting te verminderen en transferleren te verbeteren, waaronder regularisatietechnieken zoals dropout en L2-regularisatie naar een out-of-domain prior. Daarnaast introduceren we tuneout, een nieuwe regularisatietechniek geïnspireerd op drop-out. We passen deze technieken, alleen en in combinatie, toe op neurale machinevertaling en verkrijgen verbeteringen op IWSLT datasets voor Engels Duits en Engels Russisch. We onderzoeken ook de hoeveelheden in-domein trainingsgegevens die nodig zijn voor domeinaanpassing in NMT, en vinden een logaritmische relatie tussen de hoeveelheid trainingsgegevens en de winst in BLEU score.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen Techniken zur überwachten Domänenanpassung für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung, bei denen ein vorhandenes Modell, das auf einem großen Out-of-Domain-Datensatz trainiert wird, an einen kleinen In-Domain-Datensatz angepasst wird. In diesem Szenario ist Überfitting eine große Herausforderung. Wir untersuchen eine Reihe von Techniken, um Überfitting zu reduzieren und Transferlernen zu verbessern, einschließlich Regularisierungstechniken wie Dropout und L2-Regularisierung hin zu einem Out-of-Domain Prior. Darüber hinaus stellen wir tuneout vor, eine neuartige Regularisierungstechnik, die vom Ausstieg inspiriert ist. Wir wenden diese Techniken allein und in Kombination auf neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung an und erzielen Verbesserungen an IWSLT-Datensätzen für Englisch Deutsch und Englisch Russisch. Wir untersuchen auch die Mengen an In-Domain Trainingsdaten, die für die Domänenanpassung in NMT benötigt werden, und finden eine logarithmische Beziehung zwischen der Menge der Trainingsdaten und dem Gewinn im BLEU Score.', 'fa': 'ما تکنیک\u200cهایی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که برای تغییر داده\u200cهای کوچک در دامنه\u200cهای کوچک در دامنه\u200cای تغییر داده می\u200cشود که یک مدل موجود در یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای خارج از دامنه آموزش داده شده است. در این سناریو، تفاوت یک چالش بزرگی است. ما تعدادی از تکنیک\u200cها را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا تعلیم فراوانی را کاهش دهیم و تحقیق کنیم، شامل تکنیک\u200cهای ساده\u200cسازی مانند نابودی و ساده\u200cسازی L2 به سوی یک خارج از دومین قبل. در addition, we introduce tuneout, a novel regularization technique inspired by dropout. ما این تکنولوژی را تنها و در ترکیب به ترکیب ماشین عصبی استفاده می\u200cکنیم، که در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای IWSLT برای آلمان و انگلیسی روسی انگلیسی بهتر شده است. ما همچنین تعداد آموزش داده های دامنی که نیاز دارند برای تغییرات دامنی در NMT تحقیق می کنیم و رابطه لوگریتمی بین تعداد داده های آموزش و دریافت در امتیاز BLEU پیدا می کنیم.', 'ko': '우리는 신경기계 번역에 사용되는 감독역 자체 적응 기술을 연구했는데 그 중에서 대형 역외 데이터 집합에서 훈련된 기존 모델이 소형 역내 데이터 집합에 적용되었다.이런 상황에서 과도한 인테리어는 중대한 도전이다.우리는 학업 중지와 L2 정규화 등 과도한 의합을 줄이고 이전 학습을 개선하기 위해 몇 가지 기술을 연구했다.그 밖에 우리는tuneout을 소개했는데 이것은dropout의 계발을 받은 신형 정규화 기술이다.우리는 이러한 기술을 신경 기계 번역에 단독 또는 조합하여 응용하여 영국과 러시아의 IWSLT 데이터 집합에서 개선을 얻었다.NMT 분야 적응에 필요한 영역 내 훈련 데이터량도 조사했고, 훈련 데이터량과 BLEU 점수 이득 사이에 대수적 관계가 있음을 발견했다.', 'id': 'Kami menyelidiki teknik untuk adaptasi domain yang diawasi untuk terjemahan mesin saraf dimana model yang ada dilatih pada set data luar domain besar diadaptasi ke set data kecil dalam domain. Dalam skenario ini, overfitting adalah tantangan besar. Kami menyelidiki beberapa teknik untuk mengurangi overfitting dan meningkatkan belajar transfer, termasuk teknik regularisasi seperti drop-out dan L2-regularisasi menuju luar domain sebelumnya. Selain itu, kami memperkenalkan tuneout, teknik regularisasi baru yang diinspirasi oleh keluar. We apply these techniques, alone and in combination, to neural machine translation, obtaining improvements on IWSLT datasets for English German and English Russian.  Kami juga menyelidiki jumlah data latihan dalam domain yang diperlukan untuk adaptasi domain di NMT, dan menemukan hubungan logaritmi antara jumlah data latihan dan keuntungan dalam skor BLEU.', 'sw': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset.  Katika tukio hili, kusafirishwa ni changamoto kubwa. Tunafahamu mbinu kadhaa za kupunguza usafiri na kuboresha elimu ya uhamiaji, ikiwa ni pamoja na teknolojia za kudhibiti kama vile kuachana na utaratibu wa L2 kuelekea nje ya ndani kabla. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha tunu, teknolojia ya kudhibiti riwaya inayohamasishwa na kutolewa. Tunatumia mbinu hizi, peke yake na kwa ushirikiano, kwa kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa, kupata maboresho katika seti za data za IWSLT kwa Kiingereza na Kiingereza. Pia tunachunguza kiasi cha taarifa za mafunzo ya ndani zinazohitajika kwa ajili ya kuboresha ndani ya NMT, na kutafuta mahusiano ya kitaaluma kati ya kiasi cha taarifa za mafunzo na kupata mafunzo katika vipindi vya BLEU.', 'sq': 'Ne hetojmë teknikat për përshtatjen e mbikqyrur të domenit për përkthimin e makinave nervore ku një model ekzistues i trajnuar në një set të madh të të dhënave jashtë domenit është përshtatur në një set të vogël të të dhënave në domeni. Në këtë skenar, mbipajtimi është një sfidë e madhe. We investigate a number of techniques to reduce overfitting and improve transfer learning, including regularization techniques such as dropout and L2-regularization towards an out-of-domain prior.  Përveç kësaj, ne paraqesim tuneut, një teknikë të re rregullalizimi frymëzuar nga braktisja. Ne i aplikojmë këto teknika, vetëm dhe në kombinim, për përkthimin nervor të makinave, duke marrë përmirësime në dataset IWSLT për anglisht gjerman dhe anglisht rusisht. Ne gjithashtu hetojmë sasitë e të dhënave të trajnimit në fushë të nevojshme për përshtatjen e fushës në NMT dhe gjejmë një marrëdhënie logaritmike midis sasisë së të dhënave të trajnimit dhe fitimit në rezultatin BLEU.', 'tr': "Biz näyral maşynyň terjimesi üçin gözetlenmiş domena adaptasyonuň tekniklerini inceleýäris. Bu ýerde bir bar model, bir büyük out-of-domain veri setisinde okuwçylýan kiçi domena datasetine adapt edildi. Bu senaryda, üstünlik örän uly kynçylykdyr. Biz a şırı uyumlu ve üstlenme öğrenmesini düşürmek üçin bir sürü teknikleri inceleýäris. Bir sürü düzenleme teknikleri, mesela dropout ve L2-regularizasyon bir domain dışında bir şekilde değerlendirmek üçin değerlendiriyoruz. Munuň üçin, biz tuneout täze taýýarlama teknikini görkeýäris. Biz bu teknikleri ýeke we birleşikde neural maşynyň terjimesine uygulaýarys we IWSLT veri setirlerini iňlisçe we iňlisçe Rus dilinde gelişmelerine geliştirdik. Biz hem NMT'de domeny adaptasyonunda gerekli domeny eğitim verilerinin sayılarını inceledik we BLEU çizgisinde bir logaritmik ilişkisi tapdyk.", 'af': "Ons ondersoek teknike vir ondersoekte domein aanpassing vir neurale masjien vertaling waar 'n bestaande model op' n groot uit- domein datastel aangepas word na' n klein in- domein datastel. In hierdie scenario is 'n groot uitdrukking. Ons ondersoek 'n aantal teknike om oorvloediging en oorvloediging onderwerp te verminder, insluitend regularisasie teknike soos dropout en L2-regularisasie tot 'n uit-domein vooraf te maak. In addition, we introduce tuneout, a novel regularization technique inspired by dropout. Ons toewend hierdie teknike, alleen en in kombinasie, na neurale masjien vertaling en verbeterings op IWSLT datastelle vir Engels Duits en Engels Russies. Ons ondersoek ook die hoeveelheid in-domein onderwerp data wat nodig is vir domein-aanpassing in NMT, en vind 'n logaritmiske verhouding tussen die hoeveelheid onderwerp data en verkry in BLEU-aantal.", 'am': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset.  In this scenario, overfitting is a major challenge.  ብዙ ስህተቶችን ከመስጠት እና ለመለወጥ ትምህርትን ለማድረግ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የዘላለም የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህን ቴክኖችንን ብቻውን እና በአንድነት ለመጠቀም፣ የደዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም እና የኢንጂልኛ ጀርመን እና እንግሊዘኛ የኢንጂልኛ እና ንግግሊኛ ዳታተርቶችን ለማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በNMT ውስጥ ለdomain ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልገውን የድምፅ መረጃዎችን እናመረምር ነበር፤ እናም በBLEU score ጥቅረት መካከል የጦማሪክ ውይይት እናገኘዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման վերահսկվող բնագավառի ադապտացիայի տեխնիկաները, որտեղ գոյություն ունի մի գոյություն ունեցող մոդել, որը վարժեցվում է բազմաթիվ բազմաթիվ տվյալների համակարգում, ադապ In this scenario, overfitting is a major challenge.  We investigate a number of techniques to reduce overfitting and improve transfer learning, including regularization techniques such as dropout and L2-regularization towards an out-of-domain prior.  Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք երաժշտությունը, նոր վերահսկողական տեխնիկան, որը ոգեշնչվում է դուրս գալուց: Մենք կիրառում ենք այս տեխնիկաները միայնակ և միասին նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար, որպեսզի ստանանք IwSLT տվյալների համակարգերի բարելավումներ անգլերեն և անգլերեն ռուսերեն: We also investigate the amounts of in-domain training data needed for domain adaptation in NMT, and find a logarithmic relationship between the amount of training data and gain in BLEU score.', 'bs': 'Istražujemo tehnike za nadzornu adaptaciju domena za prevod neuralnih strojeva gdje je postojaći model obučen na velikoj seti podataka iz domena prilagođen malim setom podataka u domenu. U ovom scenariju, preuklapanje je veliki izazov. Istražujemo broj tehnika za smanjenje preuređenja i poboljšanje učenja prijenosa, uključujući tehnike regularizacije poput dropout i L2-regularizacije prema izvan domena prije. Osim toga, predstavljamo tuneout, novu tehniku regularizacije inspirisanu od dropout. Primjenjujemo te tehnike, sam i u kombinaciji, na prevod neuralnih strojeva, dobivanje poboljšanja podataka IWSLT za engleski njemački i engleski ruski. Također istražujemo količine podataka o obuci u domenu potrebnih za adaptaciju domena u NMT-u, i pronalazimo logaritmisku vezu između količine podataka o obuci i dobivanja u rezultatu BLEU-a.', 'bn': 'আমরা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ডোমেইন পর্যবেক্ষণের প্রযুক্তি তদন্ত করি যেখানে একটি বিশাল ডোমেইন ডাটাসেটে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে একটি বিদায় ডোমেইন এই দৃশ্যের মধ্যে প্রবাহিত হচ্ছে প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি প্রযুক্তিগুলো তদন্ত করি যাতে প্রবাহিত এবং পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা কমিয়ে দেওয়া এবং সুবিধা প্রদান করা যায়, যার মধ্যে নিয়ন্ত্রণের প্রযুক্তি রয়ে এছাড়াও, আমরা টিউনিউটের সাথে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, একটি উপন্যাস নিয়ন্ত্রণের প্রযুক্তি যা ফেলে দিয়েছে। আমরা এই প্রযুক্তিগুলোকে একা এবং একত্রে প্রয়োগ করি নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য, ইংরেজি ও ইংরেজি রাশিয়ান ডাটাসেটের উন্নতি পেতে পার এনএমটিতে ডোমেইন প্রশিক্ষণের প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য অনুসন্ধান করি এবং বিলিউ স্কোরে প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্য এবং লাভের মাঝে লোগারিথিক সম্পর্ক খুঁজে বের করি।', 'et': 'Uurime neuromasintõlke kontrollitud domeeni kohandamise meetodeid, kus olemasolev mudel, mis on koolitatud suure domeenivälise andmekogumi kohta, on kohandatud väikese domeenisisese andmekogumiga. Selles stsenaariumis on ülepanek suur väljakutse. Uurime mitmeid tehnikaid ülepaneku vähendamiseks ja siirdeõppe parandamiseks, sealhulgas regulariseerimistehnikaid, nagu väljalangemine ja L2-regulariseerimine domeenivälise eelneva suunas. Lisaks tutvustame väljalangemisest inspireeritud uudset regulatsioonitehnikat, tuneout. Me rakendame neid tehnikaid üksi ja kombinatsioonis neuromasintõlkele, saavutades täiustusi IWSLT andmekogumites inglise saksa ja inglise vene keeles. Samuti uurime domeenisiseste koolitusandmete hulka, mida on vaja domeeni kohanemiseks NMT-s, ning leiame logaritmilise seose treeningandmete hulga ja BLEU skoori saavutamise vahel.', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme techniky supervisované adaptace domén pro neuronový strojový překlad, kde existující model trénovaný na velké mimo doménu datové sadě je adaptován na malou in-doménu datovou sadu. V tomto scénáři je přehnané vybavení velkou výzvou. Zkoumáme řadu technik pro snížení nadměrného přizpůsobení a zlepšení transferového učení, včetně regularizačních technik, jako je dropout a L2 regularizace směrem k mimo doménu prior. Kromě toho představujeme tuneout, novou regularizační techniku inspirovanou dropoutem. Tyto techniky aplikujeme samostatně a kombinovaně na neuronový strojový překlad a získáváme vylepšení datasetů IWSLT pro anglickou němčinu a anglickou ruštinu. Dále zkoumáme množství in-domain tréninkových dat potřebných pro doménovou adaptaci v NMT a nalezneme logaritmický vztah mezi množstvím tréninkových dat a ziskem v BLEU skóre.', 'ca': "Investiguem tècniques d'adaptació supervisada al domini per a la traducció de màquines neurals on un model existent entrenat en un gran conjunt de dades fora de domini està adaptat a un petit conjunt de dades en domini. En aquest escenari, la superadaptació és un repte major. Investiguem una sèrie de tècniques per reduir l'equipament excessiu i millorar l'aprenentatge de transfer ència, incloent tècniques de regularizació com l'abandon i la regularizació L2 cap a un anterior fora de domini. A més, introduïm una cançó, una nova tècnica de regularizació inspirada en l'abandon. Aplicam aquestes tècniques, sols i en combinació, a la traducció neural de màquines, obtenint millors en els conjunts de dades IWSLT en anglès alemany i anglès russ. També investigam les quantitats de dades de capacitació en domini necessàries per adaptar dominis a la NMT, i trobem una relació logarítmica entre la quantitat de dades de capacitació i el guany en la puntuació BLEU.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme neurokonekäännöksen valvotun domeenin sopeutumisen tekniikoita, joissa olemassa oleva malli, joka on koulutettu suurelle domeenin ulkopuoliselle aineistolle, mukautetaan pieneen domeeniin aineistoon. Tässä skenaariossa ylikuormitus on suuri haaste. Tutkimme useita tekniikoita, joilla vähennetään ylikuormitusta ja parannetaan siirtooppimista, mukaan lukien laillistamistekniikoita, kuten keskeyttämistä ja L2-regularisointia kohti toimialueen ulkopuolista aikaisempaa. Lisäksi esittelemme tuneout-tekniikan, joka on uusi säännöstelytekniikka, joka on inspiroitunut keskeyttämisestä. Sovellamme näitä tekniikoita yksinään ja yhdessä neurokonekääntämiseen, jolloin saamme parannuksia IWSLT-tietoaineistoihin englannin saksan ja englannin venäjän osalta. Tutkimme myös alueen sisäisten koulutustietojen määrää, joita tarvitaan alueen sopeutumiseen NMT:ssä, ja löydämme logaritmisen suhteen harjoitustietojen määrän ja BLEU-pistemäärän välillä.', 'az': 'Biz nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün gözləyirlən domena uyğunlaması üçün tekniklərini incidirik. Büyük domena veri qurğusunda təhsil edilən modeli, domena veri qurğusuna uyğunlaşdırılır. Bu scenariyada, a şırı uyğunluq böyük bir çətinlikdir. Biz bir neçə tehnikləri əvvəlcə bir domain dışı tərəfə düzəltmək və təkrar öyrənmək üçün təkrarlama öyrənmək üçün araşdırırıq. Əvvəlcə, biz tuneout, yeni düzgünlük tekniki təşkil edirik. Biz bu teknikləri yalnız və birlikdə nöral maşına çevirib, İngilizce və İngilizce Rus dilində IWSLT veri qurğuları ilə yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edirik. Biz də NMT-də domeinin uyğunlaşdırması üçün ehtiyacı olan domeinin təhsil məlumatlarının sayılarını incidirik, təhsil məlumatların və BLEU nöqtəsində qəbul olunması arasında logaritmik ilişkisi tapırıq.', 'jv': 'We istrae Methods for super Vised domain modification for Neral device translation Where an current model visited on a big out-of-domain dataset is aligned to a small in-domain dataset. Nang bener iki, nggo rerampungan kuwi kalong sing apik. We underlined a number of teknes to minimate the underfilling and refresh transfer Learning, compromising Regularsation teknes like DroPout and L2-Regularsation to an out-of-domain before. Nambah, kita nganggep tune nggo ngerasah, teknik kuwi nggawe aturan luwih dumaten. Awak dhéwé aplikake teknik iki, sampeyan lan tambah kanggo terjamahan kelas Neral, kang nglanggar dataset IWSLT kanggo ngerasakno Inggris lan Ruses. We tambah istrangie the amounts of in-domain tutorial data used for domain modification in NMT, and find a log orithm link there', 'he': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset.  בתרחיש הזה, התאמה יתר הוא אתגר גדול. אנו חוקרים מספר טכניקות כדי להפחית התאים יתר ולשיפר את הלימוד העברה, כולל טכניקות רפורליזציה כגון ההפסקה והרפורליזציה L2 לכיוון קודם מחוץ לתחום. בנוסף, אנחנו מציגים את הטונאוט, טכניקת ניתוח רפובליזציה חדשה שמושרפת על ידי הפסקה. אנחנו משתמשים בטכניקות אלה, לבד ובשילוב, לתרגום מכונות עצביות, להשיג שיפורים על קבוצות נתונים IWSLT לאנגלית גרמנית ואנגלית רוסית. אנו חוקרים גם את כמויות נתוני אימון בתחום הנדרשים להסתגל לתחום בני-אם-טי, ומצאים מערכת יחסים לוגריטמית בין כמות נתוני אימון ולהרוויח בתוצאות BLEU.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙidãya masu amfani da shirin adadin ɗin kafin da aka tsare wa fassarar kwamfyutan neura, inda wani motel na da aka sanar da shi a kan wani babban-don-Domen na fito zuwa wani ƙari cikin-Domen. A cikin wannan idãnun da aka wado, yana da wani rabo mai girma. Tuna karatun wasu masu kwamfyuta ko da za'a ƙara kodi ya sami kodi da zanen transfer, kamar masu shirya takwizartarwa kamar misãlin damu da L2-taratizartarwa zuwa birnin da ba ta fita ba. Da wannan, za mu introduce tuneo, wani na'anar taratibu na nan da aka yi wahayi da shi. Kana amfani da waɗannan tuɓaniya, shi kaɗai da koma, zuwa fassarar mashine na neural, suna samun improve kan data na IWSLT wa Ingiriya da Ingiriya. Tuna sami ƙidãya yawan data na tsari cikin-Domin da ake amfani da wa adadi cikin NMT, kuma munã sami wata danganci na logarithmic tsakanin tsarin data da za'a iya amfani da cikin scorin BLEU.", 'sk': 'Raziskujemo tehnike nadzorovane domenske prilagoditve za nevronsko strojno prevajanje, kjer je obstoječi model, usposobljen za velik zunajdomenski nabor podatkov, prilagojen majhnemu domenskemu naboru podatkov. V tem scenariju je prekomerno opremljanje velik izziv. Raziskujemo številne tehnike za zmanjšanje prekomernega opremljanja in izboljšanje transfernega učenja, vključno s tehnikami regularizacije, kot sta opustitev in L2-regularizacija v smeri izven domene. Poleg tega predstavljamo tuneout, novo tehniko regularizacije, ki jo navdihuje opustitev. Te tehnike uporabljamo samostojno in v kombinaciji za nevronsko strojno prevajanje, pri čemer pridobimo izboljšave naborov podatkov IWSLT za angleško nemščino in angleško rusko. Preučujemo tudi količino podatkov o usposabljanju, potrebnih za prilagoditev domene v NMT, in ugotovimo logaritmično povezavo med količino podatkov o usposabljanju in pridobivanjem rezultata BLEU.', 'bo': 'We investigate techniques for supervised domain adaptation for neural machine translation where an existing model trained on a large out-of-domain dataset is adapted to a small in-domain dataset. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཆེན་པོ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་གདོང་ལེན་ཁག་ཅིག་རེད། We investigate a number of techniques to reduce overfitting and improve transfer learning, including regularization techniques such as dropout and L2-regularization towards an out-of-domain prior. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་ཚིག་གི་བཟོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་འདི་ཚོ་སྤྱད་ནས་གཅིག་པུ་དང་མཉམ་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་མོལ་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We also investigate the amounts of in-domain training data needed for domain adaptation in NMT, and find a logarithmic relationship between the amount of training data and gain in BLEU score.'}
{'en': 'Using Target-side Monolingual Data for Neural Machine Translation through Multi-task Learning', 'ar': 'استخدام بيانات أحادية اللغة من الجانب المستهدف للترجمة الآلية العصبية من خلال التعلم متعدد المهام', 'es': 'Uso de datos monolingües del lado objetivo para la traducción automática neuronal mediante el aprendizaje multitarea', 'fr': "Utilisation de données monolingues côté cible pour la traduction automatique neuronale grâce à l'apprentissage multitâche", 'pt': 'Usando dados monolíngues do lado do destino para tradução automática neural por meio do aprendizado multitarefa', 'ja': 'マルチタスク学習による神経機械翻訳のためのターゲット側モノリンガルデータの使用', 'zh': '以多任务学用端单语数神经机器翻译之', 'hi': 'बहु-कार्य सीखने के माध्यम से तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए लक्ष्य-पक्ष मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Использование целевых одноязычных данных для нейронного машинного перевода посредством многозадачного обучения', 'ga': 'Sonraí Aonteangacha ar Thaobh an Sprice a úsáid le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach trí Fhoghlaim Ilthasc', 'ka': 'მრავალური მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Céloldali egynyelvű adatok használata idegi gépi fordításhoz többfeladatos tanulással', 'el': 'Χρήση μονογλωσσικών δεδομένων στην πλευρά του στόχου για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση μέσω της εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'it': "Utilizzo di dati monolingue sul lato target per la traduzione automatica neurale attraverso l'apprendimento multi-task", 'kk': 'Көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту арқылы нейрондық машинаны аудару үшін мақсатты бір тілді деректерді қолдану', 'mk': 'Користење монолингуални податоци од страна на целта за превод на неврални машини преку учење со повеќе задачи', 'lt': 'Naudojant tikslinius monolingviškus duomenis neurologiniam mašinų vertimui per daugiafunkcinį mokymąsi', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Data Monolingual-sisi Sasaran untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural melalui Belajar Berbanyak-Tugas', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ Dejta Monolingwali fuq in-naħa tal-mira għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali permezz ta’ Tagħlim Multikompitu', 'mn': 'Ихэнх ажлын суралцах аргаар Цагаан-талын нэг хэлний мэдээллийг ашиглах', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം- ഭാഗത്തുള്ള മോണോളിഗ്ലേഷല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന', 'no': 'Bruk målside monolingsdata for neuromaskinsomsetjing gjennom fleire oppgåver', 'ro': 'Utilizarea datelor monolingve pe partea țintă pentru traducerea automată neurală prin învățarea multifuncțională', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie danych jednojęzycznych po stronie docelowej do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego poprzez wielozadaniowe uczenie się', 'sr': 'Koristeći Monolingulne podatke za neuronski prevod mašine na cilju kroz učenje više zadataka', 'si': 'ඉලක්ක- පැත්තේ මොනෝලින්ගුල් දත්ත පාවිච්චි කරන්න බොහොම වැඩි වැඩි කාර්ය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Isticmaalka macluumaadka dhinaca gaadiidka ee munolingual ee lagu turjumayo tarjumaadka gaadiidka', 'sv': 'Använda målspråkiga enspråkiga data för neural maskinöversättning genom flerfunktionsinlärning', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கான இலக்கு- பக்கம் மொனோலிங் தகவலை பயன்படுத்து', 'ur': 'نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے موقع-سائڈ مونولینگ ڈاٹ کا استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Language', 'vi': 'Sử dụng dữ liệu ngôn ngữ riêng đối với máy thần kinh qua đa nhiệm vụ học tập', 'bg': 'Използване на моноезични данни от целевата страна за неврален машинен превод чрез многофункционално обучение', 'nl': 'Eentalige gegevens voor neuronale machinevertaling gebruiken door middel van meertalig leren', 'da': 'Brug af ensprogede data på målsiden til neural maskinoversættelse gennem multi-task læring', 'hr': 'Koristeći monolingične podatke za prevod neuroloških strojeva na cilju kroz učenje višezadataka', 'de': 'Verwendung von zielseitigen einsprachigen Daten für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung durch Multi-Task Learning', 'id': 'Menggunakan Data Monolingual di sisi Target untuk Translation Mesin Neural melalui Belajar Multi-Task', 'ko': '목표단 단어 데이터를 이용하여 다중 임무 학습을 하는 신경기계 번역', 'fa': 'استفاده از داده\u200cهای یک زبان موجود برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی از طریق یادگیری چندین کار', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia taarifa za Kitamaduni kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani kupitia mafunzo mengi', 'tr': 'Neural Makina Terjime etmek üçin Ullanyş-tarapyndan Monoling Maglumaty ullanýar', 'af': 'Gebruik van Teël- kant Monolinguele Data vir Neurale Masjien Vertaling deur Multi- task Leer', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i të dhënave monolinguale nga ana e objektivit për përkthimin e makinës nervore nëpërmjet mësimit me shumë detyra', 'am': 'language Data for Neural machine Translation via Multi-task Learning', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման միալեզու տվյալներ բազմախնդիրների սովորելու միջոցով', 'az': 'Multi-task 칐yr톛nm톛si vasit톛sil톛 N칬ral Makina 칂evirm톛si 칲칞칲n He칞-t톛r톛find톛n Monolingual Veril톛ri istifad톛 edir', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য টার্গেট- পার্শ্বের মোনোলিঙ্গুলি তথ্য ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে বহুবার কাজ শিক্ষা দি', 'bs': 'Koristeći monolingične podatke za neuronski prevod strojeva na cilju kroz učenje više zadataka', 'et': 'Sihtküljeliste ühekeelsete andmete kasutamine neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks mitme ülesandega õppe kaudu', 'ca': "Utilitzant dades monolingües per a la traducció de màquines neurones a través d'aprenentatge multitascat", 'cs': 'Použití cílových jednojjazyčných dat pro neuronový strojový překlad prostřednictvím víceúlohového učení', 'fi': 'Kohdepohjaisen monikielisen datan käyttäminen hermojen konekääntämiseen monitehtäväoppimisen avulla', 'he': 'Using Target-side Monolingual Data for Neural Machine Translation through Multi-task Learning', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Uporaba ciljnih enojezičnih podatkov za strojno prevajanje nevronov prek večopravilnega učenja', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah TarGet-side Monolngual Data kanggo Perintah Jejaring', 'bo': 'དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཕྱོགས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱིན་ཆས་འདོན་པའི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'The performance of Neural Machine Translation (NMT) models relies heavily on the availability of sufficient amounts of parallel data, and an efficient and effective way of leveraging the vastly available amounts of monolingual data has yet to be found. We propose to modify the decoder in a neural sequence-to-sequence model to enable multi-task learning for two strongly related tasks : target-side language modeling and translation. The decoder predicts the next target word through two channels, a target-side language model on the lowest layer, and an attentional recurrent model which is conditioned on the source representation. This architecture allows joint training on both large amounts of monolingual and moderate amounts of bilingual data to improve NMT performance. Initial results in the news domain for three language pairs show moderate but consistent improvements over a baseline trained on bilingual data only.', 'ar': 'يعتمد أداء نماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) بشكل كبير على توافر كميات كافية من البيانات المتوازية ، ولم يتم بعد العثور على طريقة فعالة وفعالة للاستفادة من الكميات المتاحة بشكل كبير من البيانات أحادية اللغة. نقترح تعديل وحدة فك التشفير في نموذج تسلسل عصبي إلى تسلسل لتمكين التعلم متعدد المهام لمهمتين وثيقتي الصلة: نمذجة اللغة من الجانب المستهدف والترجمة. يتنبأ مفكك الشفرة بالكلمة المستهدفة التالية من خلال قناتين ، نموذج لغة الجانب المستهدف على الطبقة الدنيا ، ونموذج متكرر الانتباه مشروط بتمثيل المصدر. تسمح هذه البنية بالتدريب المشترك على كميات كبيرة من البيانات أحادية اللغة والمعتدلة ثنائية اللغة لتحسين أداء NMT. تظهر النتائج الأولية في مجال الأخبار لثلاثة أزواج لغوية تحسينات معتدلة ولكن متسقة على خط الأساس الذي تم تدريبه على البيانات ثنائية اللغة فقط.', 'fr': "Les performances des modèles de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) dépendent fortement de la disponibilité de quantités suffisantes de données parallèles, et il reste encore à trouver un moyen efficace de tirer parti des quantités massives de données monolingues disponibles. Nous proposons de modifier le décodeur dans un modèle neuronal séquence-séquence pour permettre l'apprentissage multitâche pour deux tâches étroitement liées\xa0: la modélisation du langage côté cible et la traduction. Le décodeur prédit le mot cible suivant par deux canaux, un modèle de langage côté cible sur la couche inférieure, et un modèle récurrent attentionnel qui est conditionné par la représentation source. Cette architecture permet une formation conjointe sur de grandes quantités de données monolingues et modérées de données bilingues afin d'améliorer les performances NMT. Les premiers résultats dans le domaine de l'actualité pour trois paires de langues montrent des améliorations modérées mais constantes par rapport à une base formée uniquement sur des données bilingues.", 'es': 'El rendimiento de los modelos de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) depende en gran medida de la disponibilidad de cantidades suficientes de datos paralelos, y aún no se ha encontrado una forma eficiente y eficaz de aprovechar las cantidades ampliamente disponibles de datos monolingües. Proponemos modificar el decodificador en un modelo neuronal de secuencia a secuencia para permitir el aprendizaje multitarea para dos tareas fuertemente relacionadas: el modelado del lenguaje del objetivo y la traducción. El decodificador predice la siguiente palabra objetivo a través de dos canales, un modelo de lenguaje del lado del objetivo en la capa más baja y un modelo recurrente atencional que está condicionado a la representación de la fuente. Esta arquitectura permite la capacitación conjunta en grandes cantidades de datos monolingües y moderadas de datos bilingües para mejorar el rendimiento de la NMT. Los resultados iniciales en el dominio de noticias para tres pares de idiomas muestran mejoras moderadas pero consistentes con respecto a una línea de base entrenada solo con datos bilingües.', 'pt': 'O desempenho dos modelos de tradução automática neural (NMT) depende muito da disponibilidade de quantidades suficientes de dados paralelos, e ainda não foi encontrada uma maneira eficiente e eficaz de aproveitar a vasta quantidade de dados monolíngues disponíveis. Propomos modificar o decodificador em um modelo neural de sequência a sequência para permitir o aprendizado multitarefa para duas tarefas fortemente relacionadas: modelagem e tradução da linguagem do lado-alvo. O decodificador prevê a próxima palavra-alvo por meio de dois canais, um modelo de linguagem do lado-alvo na camada mais baixa e um modelo recorrente de atenção que é condicionado à representação da fonte. Essa arquitetura permite o treinamento conjunto em grandes quantidades de dados monolíngues e quantidades moderadas de dados bilíngues para melhorar o desempenho do NMT. Os resultados iniciais no domínio de notícias para três pares de idiomas mostram melhorias moderadas, mas consistentes, em relação a uma linha de base treinada apenas em dados bilíngues.', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) मॉडल का प्रदर्शन समानांतर डेटा की पर्याप्त मात्रा की उपलब्धता पर बहुत अधिक निर्भर करता है, और मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा की विशाल उपलब्ध मात्रा का लाभ उठाने का एक कुशल और प्रभावी तरीका अभी तक नहीं मिला है। हम दो दृढ़ता से संबंधित कार्यों के लिए बहु-कार्य सीखने को सक्षम करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल में डिकोडर को संशोधित करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: लक्ष्य-साइड भाषा मॉडलिंग और अनुवाद। डिकोडर दो चैनलों के माध्यम से अगले लक्ष्य शब्द की भविष्यवाणी करता है, सबसे कम परत पर एक लक्ष्य-पक्ष भाषा मॉडल, और एक चौकस आवर्तक मॉडल जो स्रोत प्रतिनिधित्व पर वातानुकूलित है। यह आर्किटेक्चर एनएमटी प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए द्विभाषी डेटा की बड़ी मात्रा में मोनोलिंगुअल और मध्यम मात्रा दोनों पर संयुक्त प्रशिक्षण की अनुमति देता है। तीन भाषा जोड़े के लिए समाचार डोमेन में प्रारंभिक परिणाम केवल द्विभाषी डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित बेसलाइन पर मध्यम लेकिन लगातार सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)模之性,恃足数之可用性,而未得一效而效者,以多单语数也。 请于神经序改解码器,以成两务多任务学:端语言建模译。 解码器以两道为单词,一为下,一为以源。 此架构许大合单语量双语数,以崇NMT性。 新闻域之中,三语初结果显示,比于双语数之基线,有适而一者改之。', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）モデルのパフォーマンスは、十分な量の並列データの可用性に大きく依存しており、膨大な量の単一言語データを活用する効率的で効果的な方法はまだ見つかっていません。ニューラルシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルでデコーダーを修正し、ターゲット側の言語モデリングと翻訳という2つの強く関連するタスクのためのマルチタスク学習を可能にすることを提案します。デコーダは、２つのチャネル、最下層上のターゲット側言語モデル、及びソース表現に条件付けられた注意深い再帰モデルを通じて次のターゲットワードを予測する。このアーキテクチャは、NMTのパフォーマンスを向上させるために、大量の単一言語データと中程度のバイリンガルデータの両方に関する共同トレーニングを可能にします。3つの言語ペアのニュースドメインの初期結果は、バイリンガルデータのみについてトレーニングされたベースラインよりも中程度ではあるが一貫した改善を示しています。', 'ru': 'Производительность моделей нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) в значительной степени зависит от наличия достаточного количества параллельных данных, а эффективный и действенный способ использования огромного объема одноязычных данных еще не найден. Мы предлагаем модифицировать декодер в нейронной модели последовательности к последовательности, чтобы обеспечить многозадачное обучение для двух тесно связанных задач: моделирование языка цели и перевод. Декодер предсказывает следующее целевое слово через два канала, модель языка целевой стороны на низшем уровне и рекуррентную модель внимания, которая обусловлена представлением источника. Эта архитектура позволяет проводить совместное обучение по большим объемам одноязычных и умеренных объемов двуязычных данных для улучшения производительности НБ. Первоначальные результаты в области новостей для трех языковых пар показывают умеренные, но последовательные улучшения по сравнению с базовым уровнем, обученным только двуязычным данным.', 'ga': 'Braitheann feidhmíocht na múnlaí Néar-Aistriúcháin Meaisín (NMT) go mór ar infhaighteacht méideanna imleor de shonraí comhthreomhara, agus tá bealach éifeachtúil agus éifeachtach le giaráil a dhéanamh ar na méideanna ollmhóra sonraí aonteangacha atá ar fáil fós le fáil. Tá sé beartaithe againn an díchódóir a mhodhnú i múnla néareach seicheamh-go-seicheamh chun foghlaim il-tasc a chumasú do dhá thasc a bhfuil baint láidir acu: samhaltú teanga ar an taobh sprice agus aistriúchán. Déanann an díchódóir an chéad spriocfhocal eile a thuar trí dhá chainéal, samhail teanga sprice ar an gciseal is ísle, agus múnla athfhillteach aireach atá coinníollach ar léiriú na foinse. Ligeann an ailtireacht seo comhoiliúint ar mhéideanna móra sonraí aonteangacha agus measartha ar shonraí dátheangacha chun feidhmíocht NMT a fheabhsú. Léiríonn torthaí tosaigh san fhearann nuachta do thrí phéire teanga feabhsuithe measartha ach comhsheasmhach thar bhunlíne atá oilte ar shonraí dátheangacha amháin.', 'hu': 'A Neurális Gépi Fordítás (NMT) modellek teljesítménye nagymértékben függ a megfelelő mennyiségű párhuzamos adat rendelkezésre állásán, és még nem találtunk hatékony és hatékony módot a széles körben rendelkezésre álló egynyelvű adatok kihasználására. Javasoljuk, hogy a dekódolót neurális szekvencia-szekvencia modellben módosítsuk, hogy lehetővé tegyük a többfeladatos tanulást két erősen összefüggő feladathoz: céloldali nyelvmodellezés és fordítás. A dekóder két csatornán keresztül jósolja meg a következő célszót, a legalacsonyabb rétegben egy céloldali nyelvi modellt és egy figyelemre visszatérő modellt, amely a forrás ábrázolásától függ. Ez az architektúra lehetővé teszi a közös képzést mind nagy mennyiségű egynyelvű, mind mérsékelt mennyiségű kétnyelvű adatokról, hogy javítsa az NMT teljesítményét. A három nyelvpárra vonatkozó kezdeti eredmények mérsékelt, de következetes javulást mutatnak a kizárólag kétnyelvű adatokra képzett alapképzéshez képest.', 'el': 'Η απόδοση των μοντέλων Νευρικής Μηχανικής Μετάφρασης (ΝΜΤ) βασίζεται σε μεγάλο βαθμό στη διαθεσιμότητα επαρκών ποσοτήτων παράλληλων δεδομένων και δεν έχει βρεθεί ακόμα ένας αποτελεσματικός και αποτελεσματικός τρόπος αξιοποίησης των εξαιρετικά διαθέσιμων ποσοτήτων μονογλωσσών δεδομένων. Προτείνουμε να τροποποιηθεί ο αποκωδικοποιητής σε ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής αλληλουχίας προς αλληλουχίας, ώστε να καταστεί δυνατή η εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για δύο στενά συνδεδεμένες εργασίες: τη μοντελοποίηση γλώσσας στην πλευρά του στόχου και τη μετάφραση. Ο αποκωδικοποιητής προβλέπει την επόμενη λέξη στόχου μέσω δύο καναλιών, ενός μοντέλου γλώσσας στην πλευρά του στόχου στο χαμηλότερο στρώμα και ενός προσοχής επαναλαμβανόμενου μοντέλου που εξαρτάται από την αναπαράσταση της πηγής. Αυτή η αρχιτεκτονική επιτρέπει κοινή εκπαίδευση τόσο σε μεγάλες ποσότητες μονογλωσσών όσο και σε μέτριες ποσότητες δίγλωσσων δεδομένων για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης της NMT. Τα αρχικά αποτελέσματα στον τομέα των ειδήσεων για τρία γλωσσικά ζεύγη δείχνουν μέτριες αλλά συνεπείς βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με μια βάση που εκπαιδεύεται μόνο σε δίγλωσσα δεδομένα.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქსინის გასაგრძელება (NMT) მოდელების გამოსახულება ძალიან დარწმუნება პარალელური მონაცემების მოსახულებაზე, და არ მოიძებნა ეფექტიური და ეფექტიური გამოსახულება მონოლენგური მონაცემების ძალია ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ დეკოდერების რედაქტირება ნეიროლური შემდეგების მოდელში გავაკეთოთ, რომ მრავალური რაოდენობების სწავლების შესაძლებლობად ორი ძალიან დაკავშირებული რაოდენობების შესა ევკოდერმა შემდეგ მინიშვნელოვანი სიტყვა ორი კანალზე, მინიშვნელოვანი ენის მოდელი ნაკლები სიტყვაში, და აღმოჩენელოვანი რეკოდერენტი მოდელი, რომელიც მინიშვნელოვანია მსოფლიო ამ აქტიქტიკურაში შესაძლებელია ერთადერთი განსწავლება მონოლენგური და მედირეტური მონაცემების დიდი ზომაზე, რომ NMT მუშაობის გაუფლება. სამუშაო ენის ზოგებისთვის პირველ შედეგი მონაცემულია, მაგრამ მხოლოდ ორიენგური მონაცემებისთვის მხოლოდ მუშაობელია დააწყება.', 'it': "Le prestazioni dei modelli NMT (Neural Machine Translation) dipendono fortemente dalla disponibilità di quantità sufficienti di dati paralleli e non è ancora stato trovato un modo efficiente ed efficace per sfruttare le quantità ampiamente disponibili di dati monolingue. Proponiamo di modificare il decoder in un modello neurale sequenza-sequenza per consentire l'apprendimento multi-task per due attività fortemente correlate: modellazione linguistica e traduzione sul lato target. Il decoder predice la parola target successiva attraverso due canali, un modello di lingua lato target sul livello più basso e un modello ricorrente attento che è condizionato dalla rappresentazione sorgente. Questa architettura consente una formazione congiunta su grandi quantità di dati monolingue e moderate di dati bilingui per migliorare le prestazioni NMT. I risultati iniziali nel dominio delle notizie per tre coppie linguistiche mostrano miglioramenti moderati ma costanti rispetto a una base di base addestrata solo su dati bilingui.", 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) modelių veiksmingumas labai priklauso nuo pakankamo lygiagrečių duomenų kiekio ir dar nėra rastas veiksmingas ir veiksmingas būdas suvienodinti didžiulį turimų vienakalbių duomenų kiekį. Siūlome pakeisti dekoderį iš vienos sekos į kitą modeliu, kad būtų galima mokytis daugiašalių užduočių dviem glaudžiai susijusioms užduotims: tikslinės kalbos modeliavimui ir vertimui. Dekodorius numato kitą tikslinį žodį per du kanalus, tikslinio kalbos model į žemiausiame sluoksnyje ir atidžiai pasikartojantį modelį, kuris priklauso nuo šaltinio pavaizdavimo. Ši architektūra leidžia bendrai mokyti tiek didelį kiekį vienakalbių, tiek vidutinio dydžio dvikalbių duomenų, kad pagerintų NMT veiksmingumą. Pradiniai trijų kalbų porų naujienų srities rezultatai rodo vidutiniškai, bet nuoseklų pagerėjimą, palyginti su pradiniais duomenimis, išmokytais tik dvikalbiais duomenimis.', 'mk': 'Претставноста на моделите на Неурална машина за транслекција (НМТ) се зависи во голема мера од достапноста на доволни количини паралелни податоци, и сé уште не е пронајден ефикасен и ефикасен начин за искористување на достапните количини на монојазични податоци. Предложуваме да го модификуваме декодерот во модел на нервна секвенца по секвенца за да овозможиме учење на мултизадачи за две силно поврзани задачи: моделирање на јазик на страната на целта и превод. Декодерот го предвидува следниот збор на целта преку два канали, модел на јазик на страната на целта на најнискиот слој и внимателен рецидент модел кој е условен на претставувањето на изворот. Оваа архитектура овозможува заедничка обука за големи количини монојазични и умерени количини на двјазични податоци за подобрување на резултатите на НМТ. Иницијалните резултати во новинскиот домен за три парови јазици покажуваат умерени, но константни подобрувања во однос на основните податоци обучени само на двајазични податоци.', 'kk': 'Неуралдық машинаны аудару (NMT) үлгілерінің істеу үлгілері параллель деректердің жеткілікті мөлшерлеріне тәуелді, бірақ монолингілік деректердің көмегімен жеткілікті және эффективні мөлшерлеріне көмектесу үшін табыл Біз декодерді невралдық реттеу- мен реттеу үлгісінде өзгерту үшін көптеген тапсырмаларды екі күшті жұмыс істеу үшін көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін ұсынамыз: мақсатты тіл моделі Декодер келесі мақсатты сөзді екі арнал арқылы, ең төменгі қабаттың мақсатты тіл үлгісін және көзінің келтірілген қайталану үлгісін таңдайды. Бұл архитектура NMT жылдамдығын жақсартуға мүмкіндік береді. Үш тіл екі жаңалық доменінің бастапқы нәтижелері жалпы, бірақ тек екі тіл деректерінде оқылған негізгі жолдардың жақсартуларын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Performasi model Translation Machine Neural (NMT) bergantung dengan kekuatan jumlah data selari yang cukup, dan cara efisien dan efektif untuk menggunakan jumlah data monobahasa yang sangat tersedia belum ditemui. Kami cadangkan untuk mengubahsuai dekoder dalam model urutan-ke-urutan saraf untuk membolehkan pembelajaran-tugas berbilang untuk dua tugas yang berkaitan dengan kuat: model bahasa-sisi sasaran dan terjemahan. Dekoder meramalkan kata sasaran berikutnya melalui dua saluran, model bahasa-sisi sasaran pada lapisan terrendah, dan model yang berulang perhatian yang dikundisikan pada perwakilan sumber. Arkitektur ini membolehkan latihan bersama pada kedua-dua jumlah besar data monobahasa dan sederhana untuk meningkatkan prestasi NMT. Keputusan awal dalam domain berita untuk tiga pasangan bahasa menunjukkan peningkatan sederhana tetapi konsisten atas dasar yang dilatih pada data dua bahasa sahaja.', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. മതിയായ അളവിലുള്ള ഡാറ്റാ ലഭ്യമല്ലാത്തതിനെക്കുറിച്ചും, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലില്\u200d ഡെകോഡേര്\u200d മാറ്റുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു ശക്തമായ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട രണ്ട് ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് പല ജോലികള്\u200d പഠ അടുത്ത ലക്ഷ്യ വാക്കുകള്\u200d രണ്ട് ചാനലുകളിലൂടെ അടുത്ത ലക്ഷ്യം വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്ത ലക്ഷ്യമാക്കുന്നു. അടുത്ത സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ന ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടറിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു നിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ രണ്ട മൂന്നു ഭാഷ ജോടികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡോമെനിന്\u200dറെ ആദ്യ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രം കാണിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്', 'mt': 'Il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali (NMT) tiddependi ħafna fuq id-disponibbiltà ta’ ammonti suffiċjenti ta’ dejta parallela, u għad irid jinstab mod effiċjenti u effettiv ta’ ingranaġġ tal-ammonti disponibbli ħafna ta’ dejta monolingwi. Aħna qed nipproponu li nimmodifikaw id-dekoder f’mudell ta’ sekwenza newrali b’mod li jippermetti tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti għal żewġ kompiti b’rabta qawwija: mudell tal-lingwa fuq il-ġenb tal-mira u traduzzjoni. Id-dekoder jipprevedi l-kelma fil-mira li jmiss permezz ta’ żewġ kanali, mudell lingwistiku min-naħa tal-mira fuq l-aktar saff baxx, u mudell rikorrenti attenzjonali li huwa kkundizzjonat fuq ir-rappreżentazzjoni tas-sors. This architecture allows joint training on both large amounts of monolingual and moderate amounts of bilingual data to improve NMT performance.  Ir-riżultati inizjali fid-dominju tal-a ħbarijiet għal tliet pari lingwistiċi juru titjib moderat iżda konsistenti fuq linja bażi mħarrġa fuq dejta bilingwi biss.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av Neuralmaskineomsetjingsmodulane (NMT) er kraftig på tilgjengeleg mange parallelle data, og ein effektiv og effektiv måte å levera dei vaste tilgjengelege mengda monospråk-data er enno funne. Vi foreslår å endra dekoderen i ein neuralsekvens- til- sekvensmodell for å slå på fleire oppgåver å lære for to sterkt relaterte oppgåver: målside- språk modellering og omsetjing. Dekoderen foregår det neste målsordet gjennom to kanalar, eit målspråsmodul på det laveste laget, og eit gjentakelig gjentakelsesmodell som er avhengig av kjelderepresentasjonen. Denne arkitekturen lèt deg kopla opplæring på både store mengdar av monospråk og moderate mengdar av bilispråk-data for å forbetra NMT-funksjonen. Førehandsvising i nyhetskområdet for tre språkopar viser moderate, men konsistent forbedringar over ein grunnlinje som berre treng på bilinguelt data.', 'pl': 'Wydajność modeli neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) zależy w dużej mierze od dostępności wystarczającej ilości danych równoległych, a skuteczny i efektywny sposób wykorzystania ogromnie dostępnych ilości danych jednojęzycznych nie został jeszcze znaleziony. Proponujemy modyfikację dekodera w modelu sekwencji neuronowej, aby umożliwić wielozadaniową naukę dla dwóch silnie powiązanych zadań: modelowania języka docelowego i tłumaczenia. Dekoder przewiduje następne słowo docelowe przez dwa kanały, model językowy po stronie docelowej na najniższej warstwie oraz model powtarzający uwagę uwarunkowany reprezentacją źródła. Architektura ta umożliwia wspólne szkolenie zarówno na dużych ilościach jednojęzycznych, jak i umiarkowanych ilościach dwujęzycznych danych w celu poprawy wydajności NMT. Wstępne wyniki w dziedzinie wiadomości dla trzech par językowych wykazują umiarkowaną, ale konsekwentną poprawę w stosunku do bazy bazowej trenowanej tylko na danych dwujęzycznych.', 'ro': 'Performanța modelelor Neural Machine Translation (NMT) se bazează în mare măsură pe disponibilitatea unor cantități suficiente de date paralele, iar o modalitate eficientă și eficientă de valorificare a cantităților vaste disponibile de date monolingve nu a fost încă găsită. Propunem modificarea decodorului într-un model neuronal secvență-la-secvență pentru a permite învățarea multi-sarcină pentru două sarcini puternic legate: modelarea limbajului țintă și traducerea. Decodorul prezice următorul cuvânt țintă prin două canale, un model de limbaj țintă pe cel mai jos strat și un model recurent atențional care este condiționat de reprezentarea sursei. Această arhitectură permite instruirea comună atât pentru cantități mari de date monolingve, cât și pentru cantități moderate de date bilingve pentru a îmbunătăți performanța NMT. Rezultatele inițiale în domeniul știrilor pentru trei perechi de limbi arată îmbunătățiri moderate, dar consistente față de o bază instruită numai pe date bilingve.', 'mn': 'Ньюрал машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) загварын үйлдэл нь хангалттай параллел өгөгдлийн хэмжээний хангалттай хэмжээний хэрэглээнээс хамааралтай, олон хэмжээний олон хэмжээний өгөгдлийг ашиглах боломжтой, үр дүнтэй, үр дүнтэй арга юм. Бид хэд хэдэн ажлын суралцах боломжтой хоёр хүчтэй холбогдолтой ажил, зорилготой хэлний модель болон орчуулалтыг өөрчлөх гэсэн санал байна. Дараагийн загварын үгийг хоёр загвар, хамгийн бага давхар дээрх загварын загвар, эх үүсвэрийн төлөвлөгөөнд шаардлагатай хоёр загвараар таамагладаг. Энэ архитектур нь NMT үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд том хэмжээний болон дундаж хэмжээний мэдээллийн хоёр хэл дээр нийлүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. Гурван хэл хоёрын мэдээллийн эхний үр дүн нь зөвхөн хоёр хэл өгөгдлийн сургалтын үндсэн шугам дээр сайжруулагддаг.', 'si': 'The Perfection of neural machine translation (NMT) Models is Heavy on the avability of the suffixes of comparison data, and an Effective and Effective way of improvising the vast avail levels of one language data has still to be traced. අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා විස්තර ක්\u200dරමයක් නිර්මාණ ක්\u200dරමයක් වෙනුවෙන් විස්තර කරන්න, විස්තර කාර්යයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විස්තර ඩිකොඩර් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් ලක්ෂණ වචන දෙකක් වලින්, ලක්ෂණ- පැත්ත භාෂාවක් මොඩල් පහළම් ස්ථානයේ ඉන්න, සහ අවස්ථාවක්  මේ ස්ථාපනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල භාෂාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්ප භාෂාව තුනක් සඳහා ආරම්භ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත', 'so': 'Qorshaha tarjumidda maskiinta Neural (NMT) waxay si adag ugu xiran tahay helitaanka taariikhda isbarbarka ah, iyo habka faa’iido leh oo faa’iido ah oo soo diraya macluumaadka qaranka ah oo aad u badan oo luuqada ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan beddelno codsiga qaababka neurada-xilliga-xilliga si uu u fududeeyo barashada waxbarashada shaqada badan oo laba shaqooyin oo si adag u saabsan: sameynta afka saxda ah iyo turjumidda. Qoraalku wuxuu soo sheegaa hadalka soo socda oo ku saabsan labo kanal, model afka dhinaca ku yaala darafka hoose, iyo model la soo jeedo oo lagu sharciyey wakiilka asalka. Tirkirkan wuxuu ka heli karaa waxbarasho wadajir ah oo ku saabsan labada luuqadood oo waaweyn oo luuqadood ah iyo noocyo kala duduwan si ay u hagaajiyaan tababarka NMT. Inta ugu horeysa marka lagu baro macluumaadka saddexda labo oo luqada ah waxaa ka muuqata mid-dhaqdhaqaaqi, laakiin waa horumarinta iskuulka lagu baro macluumaadka labada luuqadood oo kaliya.', 'sv': 'Prestandan hos NMT-modeller (Neural Machine Translation) beror i hög grad på tillgången till tillräckliga mängder parallella data, och ett effektivt sätt att utnyttja de mycket tillgängliga mängder enspråkiga data har ännu inte hittats. Vi föreslår att avkodaren modifieras i en neural sekvens-till-sekvensmodell för att möjliggöra multi-task lärande för två starkt relaterade uppgifter: målsidan språkmodellering och översättning. Dekodaren förutspår nästa målord genom två kanaler, en målsidan språkmodell på det lägsta lagret och en uppmärksam återkommande modell som är beroende av källrepresentationen. Denna arkitektur möjliggör gemensam träning på både stora mängder enspråkiga och måttliga mängder tvåspråkiga data för att förbättra NMT-prestanda. Initiala resultat i nyhetsdomänen för tre språkpar visar måttliga men konsekventa förbättringar jämfört med en baslinje som endast tränats på tvåspråkiga data.', 'sr': 'Proizvodnja modela Neuralnog prevoda mašine (NMT) teško se oslanja na dostupnost dovoljnih količina paralelnih podataka, a još nije pronađena efikasan i efikasan način za utjecanje na ogromne dostupne količine monojezičkih podataka. Predlažemo da izmijenimo dekoder u modelu neuralne sekvence do sekvence da omogućimo učenje multizadataka za dva snažno povezanih zadataka: modeliranje jezika na cilju i prevod. Dekoder predviđa sljedeću ciljnu reč kroz dva kanala, model jezika sa ciljne strane na najnižem sloju, i pažljivi rekonstruirani model koji se uvodi na predstavljanje izvora. Ova arhitektura omogućava zajedničku obuku na velike količine monojezičkih i umjerenih količina dvojezičkih podataka kako bi poboljšala učinkovitost NMT-a. Prvi rezultat u novinskom domenu za tri jezičke parove pokazuje umjerene ali konsekventne poboljšanja samo na početnoj liniji obučene samo na dvojezičkim podacima.', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) موڈل کی عملکرد بالکل زیادہ مشابہ دائٹوں کے موافقت پر ہے، اور ایک بڑے موافق موافق دائٹوں کی موافقت کے مطابق موافق اور اثرات طریقہ پر ہے۔ ہم نے ڈیکوڈر کو ایک نئورل سطح-تا-سطح موڈل میں بدل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ دو مضبوط کام کے لئے multi task سیکھنے کو امکان دیں: target-side زبان موڈلینگ اور ترجمہ. ڈیکوڈر دوسرے چانال کے ذریعے آگے موقع لکھنے کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے، ایک موقع لکھنے کی موقعیت نیچے لائر پر، اور ایک موقع دوبارہ ریٹرنٹ موڈل جو سورج نمایش پر موقعیت دی جاتی ہے. یہ معماری ان دونوں بڑے کلمات میں ایک زبان اور متوسط اندازے کے دو زبان ڈیٹے کو NMT کے کامیابی کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے joint training کی اجازت دیتی ہے. تین زبان جوڑوں کے لئے نیویس ڈومین میں پہلی نتیجے متوسط ہوتے ہیں لیکن صرف دو زبان ڈاٹوں پر آموزش کی بوسیلہ لین کے ذریعہ مہربانی ہوتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'நியூரால் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாடு போதுமான இணைப்பு தரவு கிடைக்கும் பொருளாக நம்பிக்கை கொண்டிருக்கிறது, மற்றும் அதிகமாக கிடைக்கும We propose to modify the decoder in a neural sequence-to-sequence model to enable multi-task learning for two strongly related tasks: target-side language modeling and translation.  குறியீட்டாளர் அடுத்த இலக்கு வார்த்தையை இரண்டு வழிகள் மூலம், குறைந்த மட்டத்தில் ஒரு இலக்க- பக்க மொழி மாதிரி, மற்றும் மூலத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட மூ இந்த அமைப்புக்கூறு சேர்ந்த பயிற்சியை அனுமதிக்கிறது பெரிய மொன்மொழி மற்றும் நடுவே இரு மொழி தரவுகளின் மேம்படுத்தும் NMT செ மூன்று மொழி ஜோடிகளுக்கான செய்தியின் முதல் முடிவு', 'uz': "Name Bir necha xil tarkibi modelidagi kodlash usulini o'zgartirish talab qilamiz: target-side tilning modeli va tarjima qilish uchun bir necha vazifa o'rganish imkoniyatini yordam beradi. Name Bu arxituvchi oddiy sonlarning katta ko'pchilik va taʼminlovchi ikkita tillar soni NMT bajarishni bajarishga ruxsat beradi. Initial results in the news domain for three language pairs show moderate but consistent improvements over a baseline trained on bilingual data only.", 'vi': 'Sự hiệu quả của các mô- đun cấu trúc thần kinh (NMB) phụ thuộc vào khả năng cung cấp đủ số lượng dữ liệu song song song, và một cách hiệu quả và hiệu quả để điều khiển lượng dữ liệu độc ngôn ngữ vô tận còn chưa được tìm thấy. Chúng tôi đề nghị thay đổi bộ giải bằng một mô hình dãy não-tới-dãy-lập để cho phép học nhiều nhiệm vụ cho hai nhiệm vụ liên quan đến nhau: thiết lập ngôn ngữ-đích và dịch. Bộ giải mã dự đoán từ mục tiêu tiếp theo qua hai kênh, một mô hình ngôn ngữ mặt đối tượng ở lớp thấp nhất, và một mô hình nổi chú ý được tạo ra dựa trên các mô tả nguồn. Kiến trúc này cho phép huấn luyện đồng bộ về lượng lớn các dữ liệu hai ngôn ngữ và vừa phải để nâng cao khả năng NMT. Kết quả đầu tiên trong lĩnh vực tin tức cho ba cặp ngôn ngữ cho thấy sự cải tiến vừa phải nhưng ổn định trên một đường cơ sở chỉ dựa vào dữ liệu hai thứ.', 'bg': 'Ефективността на моделите за невронен машинен превод (НМТ) разчита в голяма степен на наличието на достатъчно количество паралелни данни и все още не е намерен ефективен и ефективен начин за използване на огромно наличните количества едноезични данни. Предлагаме декодера да се модифицира в неврален модел последователност към последователност, за да се даде възможност за многозадачно обучение за две силно свързани задачи: целево езиково моделиране и превод. Декодерът прогнозира следващата целева дума чрез два канала, езиков модел на целевата страна на най-ниския слой и повтарящ се модел на вниманието, който е обусловен от представянето на източника. Тази архитектура позволява съвместно обучение както на големи количества едноезични, така и на умерени количества двуезични данни за подобряване на ефективността на НМТ. Първоначалните резултати в областта на новините за три езикови двойки показват умерени, но последователни подобрения спрямо базовата база, обучена само на двуезични данни.', 'nl': 'De prestaties van Neural Machine Translation (NMT)-modellen zijn sterk afhankelijk van de beschikbaarheid van voldoende hoeveelheden parallelle gegevens, en een efficiënte en effectieve manier om gebruik te maken van de enorm beschikbare hoeveelheden eentalige gegevens is nog niet gevonden. We stellen voor om de decoder te modificeren in een neuraal sequence-to-sequence model om multi-task leren mogelijk te maken voor twee sterk verwante taken: doelzijdige taalmodellering en vertaling. De decoder voorspelt het volgende doelwoord via twee kanalen, een doeltaalmodel op de laagste laag en een attentieel terugkerend model dat is geconditioneerd op de bronweergave. Deze architectuur maakt gezamenlijke training mogelijk op zowel grote hoeveelheden eentalige als matige hoeveelheden tweetalige gegevens om de NMT prestaties te verbeteren. De eerste resultaten in het nieuwsdomein voor drie taalparen tonen matige maar consistente verbeteringen ten opzichte van een baseline die alleen is getraind op tweetalige gegevens.', 'hr': 'Učinnost modela Neuralnog prevoda strojeva (NMT) teško se oslanja na dostupnost dovoljnih količina paralelnih podataka, a još se ne nalazi učinkovit i učinkovit način utjecaja na ogromne dostupne količine monojezičkih podataka. Predlažemo modificirati dekoder u modelu neuralne sekvence do sekvence kako bi omogućili učenje multizadataka za dva snažno povezanih zadataka: modeliranje jezika na cilju i prevod. Dekoder predviđa sljedeću ciljnu riječ kroz dva kanala, model jezika ciljne strane na najnižem sloju, i pažnju ponovnog modela koji se uvodi na predstavljanje izvora. Ova arhitektura omogućava zajedničku obuku na velike količine monojezičkih i umjerenih količina dvojezičkih podataka kako bi poboljšala učinkovitost NMT-a. Početni rezultati novinske domene za tri jezičke parove pokazuju umjerene ali konsekventne poboljšanje u početnoj liniji obučene samo na dvojezičkim podacima.', 'da': 'Ydelsen af NMT-modeller (Neural Machine Translation) afhænger i høj grad af tilgængeligheden af tilstrækkelige mængder parallelle data, og en effektiv måde at udnytte de meget tilgængelige mængder ensprogede data er endnu ikke fundet. Vi foreslår at ændre dekoderen i en neural sekvens-til-sekvens model for at muliggøre multi-task læring til to stærkt relaterede opgaver: målside sprogmodellering og oversættelse. Dekoderen forudsiger det næste målord gennem to kanaler, en målside sprogmodel på det laveste lag, og en opmærksom tilbagevendende model, der er betinget af kilderepræsentationen. Denne arkitektur giver mulighed for fælles træning på både store mængder ensprogede og moderate mængder tosprogede data for at forbedre NMT ydeevne. De første resultater på nyhedsområdet for tre sprogpar viser moderate, men konsekvente forbedringer i forhold til en basislinje, der kun er uddannet på tosprogede data.', 'de': 'Die Leistungsfähigkeit von Neural Machine Translation (NMT)-Modellen hängt stark von der Verfügbarkeit ausreichender Mengen an parallelen Daten ab, und ein effizienter und effektiver Weg zur Nutzung der immens verfügbaren Mengen an einsprachigen Daten ist noch nicht gefunden worden. Wir schlagen vor, den Decoder in einem neuronalen Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell zu modifizieren, um Multi-Task-Lernen für zwei stark verwandte Aufgaben zu ermöglichen: zielseitige Sprachmodellierung und Übersetzung. Der Decoder prognostiziert das nächste Zielwort über zwei Kanäle, ein zielseitiges Sprachmodell auf der untersten Ebene und ein aufmerksamkeitsreduzierendes Modell, das von der Quelldarstellung abhängig ist. Diese Architektur ermöglicht ein gemeinsames Training sowohl auf großen Mengen an einsprachigen als auch moderaten Mengen zweisprachiger Daten, um die NMT-Leistung zu verbessern. Erste Ergebnisse im Nachrichtenbereich für drei Sprachpaare zeigen moderate, aber konsistente Verbesserungen gegenüber einer Baseline, die nur auf bilingualen Daten trainiert wurde.', 'id': 'Performasi model Translation Machine Neural (NMT) bergantung sangat pada disponibilitas jumlah data paralel yang cukup, dan cara efisien dan efektif untuk menggunakan jumlah data monobahasa yang sangat tersedia belum ditemukan. Kami mengusulkan untuk mengubah dekoder dalam model urutan-ke-urutan saraf untuk memungkinkan pembelajaran multi-tugas untuk dua tugas yang berkaitan dengan kuat: model bahasa sisi target dan terjemahan. Dekoder memprediksi kata sasaran berikutnya melalui dua saluran, model bahasa sisi sasaran pada lapisan terendah, dan model rekuren perhatian yang dikundisikan pada representation sumber. Arkitektur ini memungkinkan pelatihan kongsi pada jumlah besar monobahasa dan jumlah moderat data bilingual untuk meningkatkan prestasi NMT. Hasil awal dalam domain berita untuk tiga pasangan bahasa menunjukkan peningkatan moderat tetapi konsisten dibanding dasar yang dilatih hanya pada data dua bahasa.', 'fa': 'فعالیت مدلهای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) بسیار سنگین بر موجودات اندازه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای پارالی بسیار وابسته است، و هنوز راه موثرتی و تاثیری برای تأثیر اندازه\u200cهای فراوانی از داده\u200cهای یک زبان وجود ندارد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که dekoder را در یک مدل جدید- تا- ترکیب عصبی تغییر دهیم تا آموزش چندین کار را برای دو کار بسیار ارتباط داشته باشد: مدل\u200cسازی و ترجمه زبان\u200cهای هدف- طرف. دکوردر کلمه هدف بعدی را از طریق دو کانال پیش بینی می\u200cکند، یک مدل زبان هدف در پایین طبقه، و یک مدل بازگشت مواظب است که بر روی نمایش منبع مشخص شده است. این معماری اجازه می دهد که آموزش مشترک در هر دو مقدار بزرگ یک زبان و متوسط اطلاعات دو زبان را برای بهبود عملکرد NMT بهتر کند. نتایج اولیه در دامنه خبری برای سه جفت زبان متوسط است ولی توسط یک خط پایین آموزش داده شده فقط بر داده های دو زبان است.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)모델의 성능은 어느 정도 충분한 양의 병렬 데이터의 가용성에 의존하지만 대량의 단어 데이터를 이용하는 효과적인 방법은 아직 찾지 못했다.우리는 신경 서열에서 서열 모델까지 디코더를 수정하여 두 가지 강력한 관련 임무를 실현하는 다중 임무 학습을 실현할 것을 제안한다. 그것이 바로 목표단 언어 모델링과 번역이다.디코더는 두 채널을 통해 다음 목표어를 예측한다. 하나는 최저층의 목표 측 언어 모델이고, 다른 하나는 원본 표징을 조건으로 하는 주의 재현 모델이다.이 아키텍처는 대량의 단어 데이터와 적당량의 이중 언어 데이터에 대해 연합 훈련을 실시하여 NMT 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.뉴스 분야에서 세 가지 언어에 대한 초보적인 결과는 이중 언어 데이터 훈련만을 바탕으로 하는 기선에 비해 적절하지만 일치하는 개선이 있었다.', 'sw': 'Utendaji wa mifano ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT) unategemea kwa kiasi kikubwa juu ya upatikanaji wa kiasi cha data kinachofanana, na njia yenye ufanisi na yenye ufanisi ya kutumia idadi kubwa ya takwimu za kiutaifa bado hazijapatikana. Tunazipendekeza kubadilisha decodi katika muundo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo wa neura ili kuwezesha kujifunza kazi nyingi kwa kazi mbili zilizohusiana na nguvu: mifano ya lugha ya upande na tafsiri. Kodi hilo linatabiri neno la lengo linalofuata kupitia chaneli mbili, modeli ya lugha kwa lengo la upande wa chini, na modeli ya kudhibiti kinachohusiana na uwakilishi wa chanzo hicho. Ujengo huu unaruhusu mafunzo ya pamoja katika idadi kubwa ya takwimu za lugha mbili za kiutaifa ili kuboresha utendaji wa NMT. Matokeo ya mwanzo yanatokana na maendeleo ya habari kwa ajili ya wanaume watatu wa lugha zinaonyesha hali ya juu lakini maboresho yanayoendelea zaidi ya mitandao ya msingi yanayofundishwa kwa takwimu za lugha mbili tu.', 'tr': 'Neural Maşynyň terjime etmegiň (NMT) nusgalarynyň ýeterli parallel maglumatyň ýeterli kalamlaryny tapyp biljek we ýeterli we täsirli bir şekilde tapylmady. Biz dekoderi näyral sequence-to-sequence modellerinde çoklu-täbliw öwrenmegi üçin iki güýçli işe yaratmak üçin üýtgetmegi teklip edýäris: maksadyň-tarapy dilini modellendirmek we terjime etmek üçin. Bejer Bu arhitektura NMT başarylygyny geliştirmek üçin hem uly bir monodil we umydyry bir topar bilim maglumatyny bilen birleştirmeke mümkin edýär. Täzelikler üç dil çiftleri üçin başlangıç netijesi orta çykarýar, ýöne diňe iki dil maglumatynda eğitilen baz hatlaryň üstünde durmuş gelişmeleri görkez.', 'af': "Die effektiviteit van Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT) modele is swaar op die beskikbaarheid van genoeg menigte parallele data, en 'n effektief en effektief manier om die vaste beskikbare menigte van monolinglike data te verwyder nog te vind. Ons voorstel om die dekoder in 'n neurale volgorde- na- volgorde model te verander om multi- taak leer te aktiveer vir twee sterk verwante taak: doel- side taal modeling en vertaling. Die dekoder voorskou die volgende teikenwoord deur twee kanale, 'n teikenkant taal model op die laagste laag, en 'n aandaglike rekenaar model wat op die bron verteenwoording beteken word. Hierdie arkitektuur laat saamste onderwerp toe op beide groot hoeveelheid monolinge en moderate hoeveelheid twee tale data om NMT-prestasie te verbeter. Aanvanklike resultate in die nuusdomein vir drie taal pare wys moderate maar konsistente verbeteringe oor 'n basislien wat slegs op twee-tale data opgelei is.", 'sq': 'Performanca e modeleve Neural Machine Translation (NMT) mbështetet shumë në dispozicionin e sasive të mjaftueshme të të dhënave paralele dhe ende nuk është gjetur një mënyrë efektive dhe efektive për të nxitur sasitë mjaft të disponueshme të të dhënave monogjuhësore. Ne propozojmë të modifikojmë dekoderin në një model nga sekuenca në sekuencë nervore për të mundësuar mësimin me shumë detyra për dy detyra të lidhura me forcë: modelimin e gjuhës nga ana e objektivit dhe përkthimin. Dekoduesi parashikon fjalën e ardhshme të objektivit nëpërmjet dy kanaleve, një model gjuhësh të an ës së objektivit në nivelin më të ulët dhe një model i përtëritshëm i vëmendshëm që është kushtuar nga përfaqësimi i burimit. Kjo arkitekturë lejon trajnimin e përbashkët në sasi të mëdha të të dhënave monogjuhësore dhe të moderuara për të përmirësuar performancën e NMT. Rezultatet fillestare në domenin e lajmeve për tre çifte gjuhësh tregojnë përmirësime të moderuara por konsistente lidhur me një bazë të trajnuar vetëm me të dhënat dygjuhëse.', 'am': 'የናውሬል መኪን ትርጉም (NMT) ሞዴላዎችን በጭንቅ በተቃራኒ ዳታዎችን ለማግኘት ይታመናል፤ የተጠቃሚ እና በጥያቄ እና በጥያቄ የሞሎንቋዊ ዳታዎችን ለመስጠት የሚችል መንገድ ገና አልተገኘም። ለሁለት ብርቱ ተቃውሞ ለሚያጋሩት ስራ ማማር እና ትርጓሜ እንዲያስችል የፊደል ቋንቋን ማሻሻል እናስጀምር፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ይህ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት የሁለት ልዩ ቋንቋዎች እና የመካከለኛ ቁጥጥር የኤንምቴን ድረ-አካባቢዎችን ለማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ውጤቶች ለሦስት ቋንቋዎች ሁለት ዓይነቶች ማሻሻለል ግን በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ዳታዎችን ብቻ የተማረከ በመስመር ሳጥን ማድረግ ይታያል፡፡', 'hy': "Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդելների արտադրողությունը մեծ քանակությամբ հիմնված է զուգահեռ տվյալների բավարար քանակությամբ հասանելիության վրա, և դեռ չկարելի է գտնել մի արդյունավետ և արդյունավետ միջոց, որպեսզի օգտագործենք միալեզվո Մենք առաջարկում ենք փոխել դեկոդերը նյարդային հաջորդականության մոդելի մեջ, որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի բազմախնդիրներ սովորել երկու ուժեղ կապված խնդիրների համար' նպատակային լեզվի մոդելներ և թարգմանություն: Դեկոդերը կանխատեսում է հաջորդ նպատակային բառը երկու ուղղությամբ, նպատակային լեզվի մոդել ամենացածր շերտի վրա, և ուշադրություն կրկնվող մոդել, որը կախված է աղբյուրի ներկայացման վրա: Այս ճարտարապետությունը հնարավորություն է տալիս միասին վարժեցնել երկլեզու տվյալների մեծ քանակությամբ և միալեզու տվյալների մեծ քանակությամբ, որպեսզի բարելավեն ՆՄԹ-ն: Առաջնական արդյունքները երեք լեզվի զույգերի նորությունների ոլորտում ցույց են տալիս նվազեցված, բայց կայուն բարելավումներ միայն երկլեզվի տվյալների վրա սովորեցված հիմնական արդյունքում:", 'az': 'Neural Machine Translation (NMT) modellərin performansı yeterli paralel məlumatların faydalanılmasına dəyər verir və daha çox mövcud olan monodil məlumatların çoxluğunu istifadə etmək üçün faydalanır və etkili yolu tapılır. Biz dekoderi nöral sequence-to-sequence modeli ilə dəyişdirməyi təklif edirik ki, çox-task öyrənməsini iki möhkəm işə yaratmaq üçün: target-side dil modelləri və tercümələri yaratmaq üçün. Dekoder sonraki məqsəd sözü iki kanal vasitəsilə, ən a şağı sütundakı məqsəd dili modeli və mənbə göstəricisində müəyyən edilən təsirli təsirli modeli təmin edir. Bu arhitektür NMT performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün iki dil və orta dəlil verilən iki dil təhsil üçün birlikdə təhsil edər. Üç dil çiftlərinin xəbər domeininin başlanğıç sonuçları ortalıq göstərir, amma yalnız iki dil verilənlərdə təhsil edilmiş temel çətinlərin üstündə müəyyən olunur.', 'bn': 'নেউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) মডেলের কার্যকলাপ প্রচুর পরিমাণ তথ্য প্রাপ্ত নির্ভর করে এবং ব্যাপক প্রাপ্ত মোনোলিভাল ভাষায় তথ্য প্রদানের কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর উপায় এখন আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি নিউরেল সেকেন্ড-থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেলে ডেকোডার পরিবর্তন করতে যাতে দুটি শক্তিশালী কাজের জন্য বহুকাজ শিক্ষা প্রদান করতে পারে: লক্ ডেকোডার ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে দুই চ্যানেলের মাধ্যমে পরবর্তী টার্গেট শব্দ, নিম্ন স্তরে একটি লক্ষ্য-পাশাপাশি ভাষার মডেল এবং উৎস প্রতিনিধিত্বে এই প্রতিষ্ঠানটি এনএমটি প্রদর্শনের উন্নতির জন্য যুক্ত প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করে দুই ভাষার বিশাল পরিমাণ এবং আধুনিক পরিমাণ দুই ভাষার তথ্য তিন ভাষার জোড়ার জন্য সংবাদ ডোমেইনের প্রাথমিক ফলাফল শুধুমাত্র দুই ভাষার তথ্যে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি বেসালাইনের ব্যাপারে', 'ca': "El rendiment dels models de traducció de màquines neurals (NMT) es basa fortament en la disponibilitat de quantitats suficients de dades paralleles, i encara no s'ha trobat una manera eficient i efectiva d'aprofitar les quantitats molt disponibles de dades monolingües. Proposem modificar el decodificador d'un model seqüència a seqüència neuronal per poder aprendre multitasques per dues tasques fortament relacionades: modelar i traduir el llenguatge al costat de l'objectiu. El decodificador prediu la següent paraula alvo a través de dos canals, un model de llenguatge al costat alvo de la capa més baixa, i un model recurrent atent que està condicionat per la representació de la font. This architecture allows joint training on both large amounts of monolingual and moderate amounts of bilingual data to improve NMT performance.  Els resultats inicials en el domini de notícies per tres parelles de llenguatges mostran millores moderades però consistents en relació amb una base basal entrenada només en dades bilingües.", 'cs': 'Výkonnost modelů neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) je silně závislá na dostupnosti dostatečného množství paralelních dat a ještě nebyl nalezen efektivní a efektivní způsob využití velmi dostupného množství jednojjazyčných dat. Navrhujeme modifikaci dekodéru v neuronovém sekvenčním modelu tak, aby umožnila víceúlohové učení pro dvě silně související úlohy: modelování cílového jazyka a překlad. Dekodér předpovídá další cílové slovo prostřednictvím dvou kanálů, cílového jazykového modelu na nejnižší vrstvě a pozornostního opakovaného modelu, který je podmíněn reprezentací zdroje. Tato architektura umožňuje společný trénink na velkém množství jednojzyčných i středně středních množství dvojjazyčných dat pro zlepšení výkonu NMT. Počáteční výsledky ve zpravodajské doméně pro tři jazykové páry ukazují mírné, ale konzistentní zlepšení oproti základnímu základnímu principu trénovanému pouze na dvojjazyčných datech.', 'bs': 'Proizvodnja modela neurološkog prevoda (NMT) teško se oslanja na dostupnost dovoljnih količina paralelnih podataka, a još nije pronađena efikasan i efikasan način utjecaja na ogromne dostupne količine monojezičkih podataka. Predlažemo modificirati dekoder u modelu neuralne sekvence do sekvence kako bi omogućili učenje multizadataka za dva snažno povezanih zadataka: modeliranje jezika na cilju i prevod. Dekoder predviđa sljedeću ciljnu riječ kroz dva kanala, model jezika sa ciljne strane na najnižem sloju, i pažljiv rekonstruirani model koji se uvodi na predstavljanje izvora. Ova arhitektura omogućava zajedničku obuku na velike količine monojezičkih i umjerenih količina dvojezičkih podataka kako bi poboljšala učinkovitost NMT-a. Početni rezultati u novinskom domenu za tri jezičke parove pokazuju umjerene ali konsekventne poboljšanje na početnoj liniji obučene samo na dvojezičkim podacima.', 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) mudelite jõudlus sõltub suuresti piisava hulga paralleelsete andmete kättesaadavusest ning tõhusat ja tõhusat viisi ühekeelsete andmete tohutult kättesaadavate koguste kasutamiseks ei ole veel leitud. Me teeme ettepaneku muuta dekooderit neuraalseks järjestuseks mudeliks, et võimaldada mitme ülesandega õppimist kahe tugevalt seotud ülesande jaoks: sihtpoolse keele modelleerimine ja tõlkimine. Dekooder ennustab järgmise sihtsõna kahe kanali kaudu: sihtkülje keelemudel madalaimal kihil ja tähelepanuväärne korduv mudel, mis sõltub allika esitusest. See arhitektuur võimaldab ühist koolitust nii suurte ühekeelsete kui ka mõõdukate kakskeelsete andmete koguste kohta, et parandada NMT tulemuslikkust. Uudiste valdkonna esialgsed tulemused kolme keelepaari kohta näitavad mõõdukat, kuid järjepidevat paranemist võrreldes algtasemega, mis on koolitatud ainult kakskeelsete andmetega.', 'fi': 'Neurol Machine Translation (NMT) -mallien suorituskyky perustuu vahvasti riittävän määrän rinnakkaista dataa saatavuuteen, ja tehokasta ja tehokasta tapaa hyödyntää valtavasti saatavilla olevaa monikielistä dataa ei ole vielä löydetty. Ehdotamme dekooderin muuttamista neurosekvenssimallissa mahdollistamaan monitehtävän oppimisen kahdessa vahvasti toisiinsa liittyvässä tehtävässä: kohdepuolen kielen mallinnuksessa ja kääntämisessä. Dekooderi ennustaa seuraavan kohdesanan kahden kanavan kautta, kohdepuolen kielimallin alimmalla kerroksella ja tarkkaavaisen toistuvan mallin, joka riippuu lähteen esittämisestä. Tämä arkkitehtuuri mahdollistaa yhteisen koulutuksen sekä suurista määristä monikielistä että kohtalaisista määristä kaksikielistä dataa NMT:n suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Kolmen kieliparin uutisalueen alustavat tulokset osoittavat maltillisia mutta johdonmukaisia parannuksia verrattuna vain kaksikielisiin tietoihin koulutettuun lähtötilanteeseen.', 'ha': "Tafiyar da misalin Tsarin Kikake na Neural (NMT) yana dõgara mai nau'i ga motsi na cikakken data masu daidaita, kuma an kasa gane hanyar mai Effekt da amfani da shi da yawan data masu da yawa na monolilanguage. Kana goyyar da musarin koda cikin wata misalin-sauri-zuwa-sequence na ƙarani, don ya iya amfani da karanta mulki-aikin da aka yi wa aikin aiki biyu masu husũma mai ƙarfi: masu motsi na-side da fassarar. Ana yi amfani da maganar taga ta ƙara cikin zanen sau biyu, wata motsi na-side harshen na taga kan ƙanshi mafi ƙasƙanci, da wata motel na sake sauri wanda aka ƙayyade kan wakin maɓallin source. Wannan arkin yana yarda da shirin haɗi a kan duk yawan mutane na monoliki da tsakiyar data na lugha biyu dõmin ya kyautata performance na NMT. Mataimakin farko na ƙari da mazaɓa wa mazaɓa sau-biyu na cikin harshen uku, yana nuna moderate, kuma yana daidai kodi a gaba-gaba ɗaya na da aka sanar da shi a kan data na biyu na'ura kawai.", 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཚོར་བརྗོད་གཞུང་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཚད་གནད་ཅིང་ཡོད་པའི་ཚད་ཆུང་ཉིད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རང་དབང་གི་གྲངས་རིམ་པ་ལ་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ཅིག་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་དང་། འདྲ་བྱུང་བའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྩོ The decoder predicts the next target word through two channels, a target-side language model on the lowest layer, and an attentional recurrent model which is conditioned on the source representation. སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདིས་གཞུང་གིས་གཅིག་སྐད་ཆ་དང་ཡག་རིམ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཚད་ཆེ་ཆུང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་ཆ སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་ལས་འགོ་འབྱེད་པའི་བརྡ་ཞིག་གི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གསུམ་ནང་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཡོད་ནའང་། གཞུང་གཞུང་ལ་', 'jv': 'Rasané model NMT sing paling nggampang Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem mbukak decoder nang sekondir-to-sekondir model kanggo ngawasi multi-task Learning kanggo kelangan langgar sampeyan pangan: goal-side language modelining lan terjamahan. Ngubah architecture Mulai cedhak ing saking barang kanggo telu nggawe bangsa sistem kuwi duluran, nganggep dino sing susahe perusahaan karo perusahaan seneng pisan bangsa', 'he': 'The performance of Neural Machine Translation (NMT) models relies heavily on the availability of sufficient amounts of parallel data, and an efficient and effective way of leveraging the vastly available amounts of monolingual data has yet to be found.  אנו מציעים לשנות את התיקון במודל של רצף עצבי כדי לאפשר למידה רבה משימות לשני משימות קשורות חזק: דוגמנית שפת צד המטרה ותרגום. הפענח חושף את מילת המטרה הבאה דרך שני ערוצים, מודל שפת צד המטרה על השכבה הנמוכה ביותר, ומודל מתחזר תשומת לב שמתאים ביצוע המקור. This architecture allows joint training on both large amounts of monolingual and moderate amounts of bilingual data to improve NMT performance.  התוצאות הראשונות בתחום החדשות של שלושה זוגות שפות מראות שיפורים ממוצעים, אך עקביים, מעל רקע המתאמן על נתונים שתיים שפות בלבד.', 'sk': 'Učinkovitost modelov nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) je močno odvisna od razpoložljivosti zadostnih količin vzporednih podatkov, učinkovit in učinkovit način za izkoriščanje veliko razpoložljivih količin enojezičnih podatkov pa še ni najti. Predlagamo spremembo dekoderja v nevronskem modelu zaporedja v zaporedje, da bi omogočili večopravilno učenje za dve močno povezani nalogi: modeliranje jezika na ciljni strani in prevajanje. Dekodir napoveduje naslednjo ciljno besedo skozi dva kanala, ciljni jezikovni model na najnižji plasti in pozorni ponavljajoči se model, ki je pogojen s predstavitvijo vira. Ta arhitektura omogoča skupno usposabljanje o velikih količinah enojezičnih in zmernih količinah dvojezičnih podatkov za izboljšanje zmogljivosti NMT. Začetni rezultati na področju novic za tri jezikovne pare kažejo zmerno, vendar dosledno izboljšanje v primerjavi z osnovnim izhodiščem, usposobljenim samo za dvojezične podatke.'}
{'en': 'Joint Concept Learning and Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Conjunta de Conceitos e Análise Semântica a partir de Explicações em Linguagem Natural', 'es': 'Aprendizaje conjunto de conceptos y análisis semántico a partir de explicaciones de lenguaje natural', 'ar': 'تعلم المفهوم المشترك والتحليل الدلالي من تفسيرات اللغة الطبيعية', 'fr': "Apprentissage conjoint de concepts et analyse sémantique à partir d'explications en langage naturel", 'ja': '自然言語の説明からの共同概念学習とセマンティック構文解析', 'zh': '自然语言说合其学语义解析', 'hi': 'संयुक्त अवधारणा सीखने और प्राकृतिक भाषा स्पष्टीकरण से शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Совместное изучение концепции и семантический разбор из объяснений естественного языка', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Chomhchoincheapa agus Parsáil Shéimeantach ó Mhínithe Teanga Nádúrtha', 'hu': 'Közös koncepciótanulás és szemantikus értelmezés természetes nyelvi magyarázatokból', 'el': 'Κοινή Μάθηση Έννοιας και Σημαντική Ανάλυση από Εξηγήσεις Φυσικής Γλώσσας', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი კონფექტის სწავლება და Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations', 'it': 'Apprendimento congiunto del concetto e analisi semantica dalle spiegazioni del linguaggio naturale', 'lt': 'Bendros koncepcijos mokymasis ir Semantinis analizavimas iš gamtos kalbos paaiškinimų', 'kk': 'Табиғи тіл түсініктерінен біріктірілген концепция оқу және семантикалық талдау', 'ms': 'Koncep Bersama-sama Belajar dan Menghurai Semantik Dari Penjelasan Bahasa Alami', 'mk': 'Заедничко учење на концепти и семантично анализирање од природните јазични објаснувања', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл тодорхойлолтуудын нэгтгэл ойлголт суралцах, Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations', 'mt': 'Konċett Konġunt ta’ Tagħlim u Analiżi Semantika minn Spjegazzjonijiet tal-Lingwa Naturali', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനും കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ് ചേര്\u200dക്', 'pl': 'Wspólne uczenie się koncepcji i analiza semantyczna z wyjaśnień języka naturalnego', 'no': 'Joint Concept Learning and Semantic Analysing from Natural Language Explanations', 'so': 'Heshiiska barbaarinta iyo jardiinada Semantic ka imaanshaha luqada asalka ah', 'sr': 'Zajedničko učenje koncepta i semantičko razmatranje iz prirodnih jezičkih objašnjenja', 'ro': 'Învățarea conceptului comun și interpretarea semantică din explicații de limbaj natural', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් සාමාන්තික ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி வெளிப்பாடு', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان واضح کی تعلیمات اور سیمنٹی پارس', 'sv': 'Gemensamt koncept lärande och semantisk tolkning från naturspråk Förklaringar', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát triển bằng ngôn ngữ mẹ học', 'bg': 'Съвместна концепция за учене и семантична обработка от обяснения на естествения език', 'hr': 'Zajedničko učenje koncepta i semantičko razmatranje iz prirodnih jezičkih objašnjenja', 'da': 'Fælles konceptlæring og semantisk fortolkning fra natursprogforklaringer', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijk Concept Leren en Semantisch Parsen van Uitleg Natuurlijke Taal', 'de': 'Gemeinsames Konzeptlernen und semantisches Parsing aus natursprachlichen Erklärungen', 'id': 'Koncep Bersama-sama Belajar dan Analisis Semantik Dari Penjelasan Bahasa Alami', 'ko': '자연 언어 해석을 바탕으로 하는 연합 개념 학습과 의미 분석', 'fa': 'تعلیم یادگیری و تجزیه\u200cگیری از توضیح زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'Kujiunga na Kujifunza na Uchaguzi wa Kisemantic kutoka Maelezo ya lugha ya asili', 'tr': 'Natal dil düşündirimlerinden soňra öwrenmek we Semantik Taýramçylyk', 'sq': 'Koncepti i përbashkët Mësim dhe analizim Semantik nga shpjegimet e gjuhës natyrore', 'af': 'Joint Concept Learning and Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Zajedničko učenje koncepta i semantičko razmatranje iz prirodnih jezičkih objašnjenja', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի բացատրություններից ստացված ընդհանուր գաղափարների սովորելը և սեմանտիկ վերլուծումը', 'az': 'T톛bi톛tli Dil a칞캼qlamalar캼ndan Joint Concept Learning and Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া থেকে শিক্ষা ও সেমান্টিক পার্সিং যুক্ত করুন', 'cs': 'Společná koncepce učení a sémantická analýza z vysvětlení přírodního jazyka', 'fi': 'Yhteinen konseptin oppiminen ja semanttinen analyysi luonnollisista kieliselityksistä', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge conjunt de conceptes i l'analització semàtica a partir d'explicacions de llenguatges naturals", 'et': 'Ühise kontseptsiooni õppimine ja semantiline parsing loodusliku keele selgitustest', 'jv': 'Joint Method Learning and semanti', 'sk': 'Skupno učenje koncepta in semantično razpravljanje iz pojasnil naravnega jezika', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Joint Concept Learning and Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations', 'bo': 'Joint Concept Learning and Semantic Parsing from Natural Language Explanations'}
{'en': 'Natural language constitutes a predominant medium for much of human learning and pedagogy. We consider the problem of concept learning from natural language explanations, and a small number of labeled examples of the concept. For example, in learning the concept of a phishing email, one might say ‘this is a phishing email because it asks for your bank account number’. Solving this problem involves both learning to interpret open ended natural language statements, and learning the concept itself. We present a joint model for (1) language interpretation (semantic parsing) and (2) concept learning (classification) that does not require labeling statements with logical forms. Instead, the model prefers discriminative interpretations of statements in context of observable features of the data as a weak signal for parsing. On a dataset of email-related concepts, our approach yields across-the-board improvements in classification performance, with a 30 % relative improvement in F1 score over competitive methods in the low data regime.', 'ar': 'تشكل اللغة الطبيعية وسيطًا سائدًا لكثير من التعلم البشري وعلم أصول التدريس. نحن نأخذ في الاعتبار مشكلة تعلم المفاهيم من تفسيرات اللغة الطبيعية ، وعدد صغير من الأمثلة المصنفة للمفهوم. على سبيل المثال ، عند تعلم مفهوم البريد الإلكتروني للتصيد الاحتيالي ، يمكن للمرء أن يقول "هذه رسالة بريد إلكتروني للتصيد الاحتيالي لأنها تطلب رقم حسابك المصرفي". يتضمن حل هذه المشكلة تعلم تفسير عبارات اللغة الطبيعية المفتوحة وتعلم المفهوم نفسه. نقدم نموذجًا مشتركًا لـ (1) تفسير اللغة (التحليل الدلالي) و (2) مفهوم التعلم (التصنيف) الذي لا يتطلب تسمية العبارات بأشكال منطقية. بدلاً من ذلك ، يفضل النموذج التفسيرات التمييزية للبيانات في سياق الميزات التي يمكن ملاحظتها للبيانات كإشارة ضعيفة للتحليل. في مجموعة بيانات من المفاهيم المتعلقة بالبريد الإلكتروني ، ينتج عن نهجنا تحسينات شاملة في أداء التصنيف ، مع تحسن نسبي بنسبة 30٪ في درجة F1 مقارنة بالطرق التنافسية في نظام البيانات المنخفض.', 'fr': "Le langage naturel constitue un médium prédominant pour une grande partie de l'apprentissage et de la pédagogie humains. Nous examinons le problème de l'apprentissage de concepts à partir d'explications en langage naturel et un petit nombre d'exemples étiquetés du concept. Par exemple, en apprenant le concept d'e-mail de phishing, on peut dire «\xa0il s'agit d'un e-mail de phishing parce qu'il demande votre numéro de compte bancaire\xa0». Pour résoudre ce problème, il faut à la fois apprendre à interpréter des énoncés ouverts en langage naturel et apprendre le concept lui-même. Nous présentons un modèle conjoint pour (1) l'interprétation du langage (analyse sémantique) et (2) l'apprentissage de concepts (classification) qui ne nécessite pas d'étiquetage des instructions avec des formes logiques. Le modèle préfère plutôt les interprétations discriminantes des déclarations dans le contexte des caractéristiques observables des données en tant que signal faible pour l'analyse. Sur un ensemble de données de concepts liés au courrier électronique, notre approche apporte des améliorations globales des performances de classification, avec une amélioration relative de 30\xa0% du score F1 par rapport aux méthodes concurrentielles dans le régime de faibles données.", 'es': 'El lenguaje natural constituye un medio predominante para gran parte del aprendizaje y la pedagogía humanos. Consideramos el problema del aprendizaje de conceptos a partir de explicaciones en lenguaje natural y un pequeño número de ejemplos etiquetados del concepto. Por ejemplo, al aprender el concepto de correo electrónico de phishing, se podría decir que «se trata de un correo electrónico de phishing porque te pide tu número de cuenta bancaria». Resolver este problema implica aprender a interpretar declaraciones abiertas en lenguaje natural y aprender el concepto en sí mismo. Presentamos un modelo conjunto para (1) la interpretación de idiomas (análisis semántico) y (2) el aprendizaje de conceptos (clasificación) que no requiere etiquetar las declaraciones con formas lógicas. En cambio, el modelo prefiere las interpretaciones discriminativas de las declaraciones en el contexto de las características observables de los datos como una señal débil para el análisis. En un conjunto de datos de conceptos relacionados con el correo electrónico, nuestro enfoque produce mejoras generales en el rendimiento de la clasificación, con una mejora relativa del 30% en la puntuación F1 con respecto a los métodos de la competencia en el régimen de datos bajos.', 'pt': "A linguagem natural constitui um meio predominante para grande parte da aprendizagem e pedagogia humana. Consideramos o problema da aprendizagem de conceitos a partir de explicações em linguagem natural e um pequeno número de exemplos rotulados do conceito. Por exemplo, ao aprender o conceito de e-mail de phishing, pode-se dizer 'este é um e-mail de phishing porque pede o número da sua conta bancária'. Resolver esse problema envolve aprender a interpretar declarações de linguagem natural abertas e aprender o próprio conceito. Apresentamos um modelo conjunto para (1) interpretação de linguagem (análise semântica) e (2) aprendizagem de conceitos (classificação) que não requer rotulagem de declarações com formas lógicas. Em vez disso, o modelo prefere interpretações discriminativas de declarações no contexto de características observáveis dos dados como um sinal fraco para análise. Em um conjunto de dados de conceitos relacionados a e-mail, nossa abordagem gera melhorias gerais no desempenho de classificação, com uma melhoria relativa de 30% na pontuação F1 em relação aos métodos competitivos no regime de dados baixos.", 'ja': '自然言語は、人間の学習と教育学の多くの主な媒体を構成している。 自然言語の説明からの概念学習の問題と、その概念の少数のラベル付けされた例を考察する。 たとえば、フィッシングメールの概念を学ぶ際には、「これは銀行口座番号を要求されるため、フィッシングメールです」と言われることがあります。 この問題の解決には、オープンエンドの自然言語ステートメントの解釈を学ぶことと、概念そのものを学ぶことの両方が含まれる。 (1)言語解釈（セマンティック構文解析）と(2)論理形でステートメントをラベリングする必要のない概念学習（分類）のための共同モデルを提示する。 代わりに、モデルは、データの観察可能な特徴の文脈におけるステートメントの差別的解釈を、構文解析のための弱い信号として好む。 電子メールに関連する概念のデータセットでは、当社のアプローチは、分類パフォーマンスの包括的な改善をもたらし、低データレジームでの競合する方法よりもF 1スコアが30%向上します。', 'hi': "प्राकृतिक भाषा मानव सीखने और शिक्षाशास्त्र के अधिकांश के लिए एक प्रमुख माध्यम का गठन करती है। हम प्राकृतिक भाषा स्पष्टीकरण से सीखने की अवधारणा की समस्या पर विचार करते हैं, और अवधारणा के लेबल किए गए उदाहरणों की एक छोटी संख्या। उदाहरण के लिए, फ़िशिंग ईमेल की अवधारणा को सीखने में, कोई कह सकता है कि 'यह एक फ़िशिंग ईमेल है क्योंकि यह आपके बैंक खाता संख्या के लिए पूछता है'। इस समस्या को हल करने में खुले अंत वाले प्राकृतिक भाषा बयानों की व्याख्या करना और अवधारणा को सीखना दोनों शामिल हैं। हम (1) भाषा व्याख्या (शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग) और (2) अवधारणा सीखने (वर्गीकरण) के लिए एक संयुक्त मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसे तार्किक रूपों के साथ लेबलिंग कथनों की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है। इसके बजाय, मॉडल पार्सिंग के लिए एक कमजोर संकेत के रूप में डेटा की अवलोकन योग्य विशेषताओं के संदर्भ में बयानों की भेदभावपूर्ण व्याख्याओं को पसंद करता है। ईमेल से संबंधित अवधारणाओं के डेटासेट पर, हमारा दृष्टिकोण वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन में बोर्ड सुधार के पार पैदावार करता है, जिसमें कम डेटा शासन में प्रतिस्पर्धी तरीकों पर एफ 1 स्कोर में 30% सापेक्ष सुधार होता है।", 'ru': 'Естественный язык является преобладающим средством для большей части человеческого обучения и педагогики. Рассмотрена проблема концептуального обучения на основе объяснений естественного языка, а также небольшое количество отмеченных примеров концепции. Например, изучая понятие фишингового письма, можно сказать: «Это фишинговое письмо, потому что оно запрашивает номер вашего банковского счета». Решение этой задачи предполагает как обучение интерпретации высказываний естественного языка с открытым концом, так и изучение самой концепции. Представляем совместную модель (1) интерпретации языка (семантического синтаксического анализа) и (2) концептуального обучения (классификации), не требующую маркировки операторов логическими формами. Вместо этого модель предпочитает дискриминационные интерпретации высказываний в контексте наблюдаемых особенностей данных как слабый сигнал для синтаксического анализа. Что касается набора данных о концепциях, связанных с электронной почтой, то наш подход обеспечивает общее улучшение качества классификации, при этом относительное улучшение показателя F1 на 30% по сравнению с конкурентными методами в режиме низких данных.', 'zh': '自然语言者,学教育学之大媒也。 以自然语言言问学,与其少示例。 如学网络钓电子邮件之大概,或曰"此一网络钓电子邮件,以其责君银行帐号也"。 既学解释开放式自然语言语,亦学其名。 立(1)言解(语义解析)与(2)名学(类)合模,不须以逻辑记语句。 反此者,好在数上下文之中,断别性理,以为解析之弱信。 凡电子邮件之名数集上,吾法生於类,下数於式,F1得分增於争30%。', 'ga': 'Is meán ceannasach í teanga nádúrtha le haghaidh cuid mhór d’fhoghlaim agus d’oideolaíocht an duine. Breathnaímid ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le foghlaim choincheapa ó mhínithe teanga nádúrtha, agus líon beag samplaí lipéadaithe den choincheap. Mar shampla, agus coincheap an ríomhphoist fioscaireachta á fhoghlaim agat, d’fhéadfaí a rá ‘se ríomhphost fioscaireachta é seo toisc go n-iarrann sé uimhir do chuntais bainc’. Is éard atá i gceist le réiteach na faidhbe seo ná foghlaim conas ráitis teanga nádúrtha oscailte a léirmhíniú, agus an coincheap féin a fhoghlaim. Cuirimid i láthair comhshamhail le haghaidh (1) léirmhíniú teanga (parsáil shéimeantach) agus (2) foghlaim choincheap (aicmiú) nach gá ráitis lipéadaithe le foirmeacha loighciúla a bheith ann. Ina áit sin, is fearr leis an tsamhail léirmhínithe idirdhealaitheacha ar ráitis i gcomhthéacs gnéithe inbhraite na sonraí mar chomhartha lag le haghaidh parsála. Ar thacar sonraí de choincheapa a bhaineann le r-phost, tagann ár gcur chuige amach feabhsuithe uileghabhálacha ar fheidhmíocht aicmithe, le feabhas coibhneasta 30% ar scór F1 i gcomparáid le modhanna iomaíocha sa réimeas sonraí íseal.', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური ენაში ადამიანის სწავლებისთვის და პედაგოგიისთვის უფრო მედინარეობა. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ კონცექტის შესწავლების პრობლემა, თავისუფალური ენის გამოსახულებიდან და კონცექტის მაგალითების პატარა რაოდენობა. მაგალითად, შეიძლება თქვენი ბანკის წიგნის ნომპონტის კონფიგურაციას ვისწავლოთ, როგორც თქვენი ბანკის წიგნის ნომპონტის შესაძლებელია. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვება იყოს ორივე სწავლობა, რომელიც გახსნილია თავისწავლობა, თავისწავლობა თავისწავლობა. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ერთადერთი მოდელის (1) ენის ინტერპუქციის (semantic parsing) და (2) კონცექტის სწავლების (classification) სწავლებისთვის, რომელიც არ მოჭირდება ლოგიკური ფორმებით ჩვენება. მაგრამ, მოდელეში დისკრიმინატიური ინტერპუქციების კონტექსტში მონაცემების შესახებელი ფუნქციების შესახებ, როგორც პარალისთვის ძალიან სიგნალია. მონაცემების შესახებ ელფოსტურის კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენი მონაცემები კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციაში 30%-ს შესახებ F1 წერტილის კონფიგურაციული მეტვების შესახებ და', 'el': 'Η φυσική γλώσσα αποτελεί κυρίαρχο μέσο για μεγάλο μέρος της ανθρώπινης μάθησης και παιδαγωγικής. Εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης εννοιών από εξηγήσεις φυσικής γλώσσας, και έναν μικρό αριθμό επισημασμένων παραδειγμάτων της έννοιας. Για παράδειγμα, μαθαίνοντας την έννοια ενός ηλεκτρονικού ταχυδρομείου ψαρέματος, θα μπορούσε κανείς να πει "αυτό είναι ένα ηλεκτρονικό ταχυδρομείο ψαρέματος επειδή ζητά τον αριθμό του τραπεζικού σας λογαριασμού". Η επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος περιλαμβάνει τόσο την εκμάθηση της ερμηνείας των δηλώσεων της ανοικτής γλώσσας όσο και την εκμάθηση της ίδιας της έννοιας. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα κοινό μοντέλο για (1) γλωσσική ερμηνεία (σημασιολογική ανάλυση) και (2) εκμάθηση εννοιών (ταξινόμηση) που δεν απαιτεί επισήμανση δηλώσεων με λογικές μορφές. Αντίθετα, το μοντέλο προτιμά διακριτικές ερμηνείες των δηλώσεων στο πλαίσιο των παρατηρήσιμων χαρακτηριστικών των δεδομένων ως ένα αδύναμο σήμα για ανάλυση. Σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων εννοιών που σχετίζονται με το ηλεκτρονικό ταχυδρομείο, η προσέγγισή μας αποδίδει ολοκληρωμένες βελτιώσεις στην απόδοση ταξινόμησης, με μια σχετική βελτίωση 30% στη βαθμολογία F1 έναντι των ανταγωνιστικών μεθόδων στο καθεστώς χαμηλών δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv az emberi tanulás és pedagógia nagy részének meghatározó médiuma. Figyelembe vesszük a koncepciótanulás problémáját természetes nyelvi magyarázatokból, valamint a koncepció néhány címkézett példáját. Például az adathalász e-mail fogalmának tanulásakor azt mondhatjuk, hogy "ez egy adathalász e-mail, mert kéri a bankszámlaszámát". A probléma megoldása magában foglalja mind a nyílt végű természetes nyelvi kijelentések értelmezésének tanulását, mind a koncepció megtanulását. Közös modellt mutatunk be (1) nyelvértelmezésre (szemantikai elemzésre) és (2) fogalmi tanulásra (osztályozásra), amely nem igényel logikai formákkal történő címkézést. Ehelyett a modell előnyben részesíti az állítások diszkriminatív értelmezését az adatok megfigyelhető jellemzőivel összefüggésben, mint gyenge elemzési jel. Az e-mailhez kapcsolódó koncepciók adatkészlete alapján megközelítésünk átfogó javulást eredményez az osztályozás teljesítményében, az F1 pontszám 30%-os relatív javulást eredményez a versenyképes módszerekhez képest alacsony adatszintű rendszerben.', 'it': "Il linguaggio naturale costituisce un mezzo predominante per gran parte dell'apprendimento umano e della pedagogia. Consideriamo il problema dell'apprendimento dei concetti dalle spiegazioni del linguaggio naturale, e un piccolo numero di esempi etichettati del concetto. Ad esempio, nell'apprendere il concetto di e-mail di phishing, si potrebbe dire `questa è una e-mail di phishing perché chiede il numero del tuo conto bancario'. La soluzione di questo problema comporta sia l'apprendimento dell'interpretazione di dichiarazioni di linguaggio naturale a termine aperto, sia l'apprendimento del concetto stesso. Presentiamo un modello comune per (1) l'interpretazione linguistica (analisi semantica) e (2) l'apprendimento dei concetti (classificazione) che non richiede l'etichettatura delle dichiarazioni con forme logiche. Invece, il modello preferisce interpretazioni discriminatorie delle affermazioni nel contesto di caratteristiche osservabili dei dati come segnale debole per l'analisi. Su un set di dati di concetti correlati all'email, il nostro approccio produce miglioramenti globali nelle prestazioni di classificazione, con un miglioramento relativo del 30% del punteggio F1 rispetto ai metodi competitivi nel regime dei dati bassi.", 'lt': 'Gamtinė kalba yra daugiausia žmogaus mokymosi ir pedagogijos priemonių. Mes svarstome koncepcijos mokymosi iš natūralių kalbų paaiškinimų problem ą ir nedidelį skaičių pažymėtų koncepcijos pavyzdžių. Pavyzdžiui, mokant Fišingo e. pašto koncepciją, galima pasakyti "tai yra Fišingo e. paštas, nes jis prašo jūsų banko sąskaitos numerio". Šios problemos sprendimas apima mokymąsi aiškinti atviras baigtas natūralias kalbas ir pačios koncepcijos mokymąsi. Pateikiame bendrą (1) kalbos aiškinimo (semantinio analizavimo) ir (2) koncepcijos mokymosi (klasifikavimo) model į, kuriame nereikalaujama ženklinti teiginių logiškomis formomis. Vietoj to, modelis pirmenybę teikia diskriminaciniam pareiškimų aiškinimui atsižvelgiant į pastebimus duomenų požymius kaip silpnam analizavimo signalui. Su elektroniniu paštu susijusių koncepcijų duomenų rinkinyje mūsų metodas iš esmės pagerina klasifikavimo rezultatus, o F1 rezultatai palyginti su konkurenciniais metodais mažo duomenų režimo metu gerėja 30 proc.', 'mk': 'Природниот јазик претставува претежно медиум за голем дел од човечкото учење и педагогија. Го разгледуваме проблемот со учењето на концептот од природните објаснувања на јазикот, и мал број обележани примери на концептот. На пример, кога ќе се научи концептот на фишинг мејл, може да се каже „ ова е фишинг мејл бидејќи бара број на вашата банкарска сметка “. Решењето на овој проблем вклучува и учење на интерпретација на отворени природни јазични изјави, и самото учење на концептот. Презентираме заеднички модел за (1) интерпретација на јазикот (семантично анализирање) и (2) учење на концептот (класификација) кој не бара означување на изјавите со логични форми. Наместо тоа, моделот преферира дискриминативни интерпретации на изјавите во контекст на набљудливите карактеристики на податоците како слаб сигнал за анализирање. On a dataset of email-related concepts, our approach yields across-the-board improvements in classification performance, with a 30% relative improvement in F1 score over competitive methods in the low data regime.', 'kk': 'Табиғи тіл адамдарды оқыту мен педагогия үшін көпшілікті медиақша болады. Біз табиғи тілді түсініктемелерден оқыту мәселесін және концепцияның кішкентай мәселелерін ойлаймыз. Мысалы, "Бұл банктық тіркелгі нөміріңізді сұрайтын эл. пошта" дегенді оқу үшін біреуі мүмкін. Бұл мәселеді шешу - ашық тілді түсініктемелерді түсініп, оны оқытуға болады. Біз (1) тілдердің интерпретациясы (semantic parsing) және (2) концептердің оқытуы (classification) үшін біріктірілген моделін таңдаймыз. Бұл логикалық пішімдердің жарлық мәліметтерін жарлық Бұл үлгі деректерді талдау үшін күш сигнал ретінде көрінетін мәліметтердің дискриминациялық толықтауын таңдайды. Эл. пошта сәйкесті концепциялардың деректер қорларында, біздің тәсіліміз салыстыру жұмысында 30% жұмыс істейді. F1 нөмірінде төменгі деректер режимінде қарындаушылық әдістерден артық жақсарту арқылы', 'mt': 'Il-lingwa naturali tikkostitwixxi mezz predominanti għal ħafna mit-tagħlim u l-pedagoġija tal-bniedem. Aħna nqisu l-problem a tat-tagħlim tal-kunċett minn spjegazzjonijiet tal-lingwa naturali, u numru żgħir ta’ eżempji ttikkettati tal-kunċett. Pereżempju, fit-tagħlim tal-kunċett ta’ email ta’ phishing, wieħed jista’ jgħid ‘dan huwa email ta’ phishing minħabba li jitlob in-numru tal-kont bankarju tiegħek’. Is-soluzzjoni ta’ din il-problema tinvolvi kemm it-tagħlim biex jiġu interpretati dikjarazzjonijiet lingwistiċi naturali miftuħa, kif ukoll it-tagħlim tal-kunċett innifsu. We present a joint model for (1) language interpretation (semantic parsing) and (2) concept learning (classification) that does not require labeling statements with logical forms.  Minflok, il-mudell jippreferi interpretazzjonijiet diskriminatorji tad-dikjarazzjonijiet fil-kuntest ta’ karatteristiċi osservabbli tad-dejta bħala sinjal dgħajjef għall-analiżi. Fuq sett ta’ dejta ta’ kunċetti relatati mal-email, l-approċċ tagħna jwassal għal titjib ġenerali fil-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni, b’titjib relattiv ta’ 30 % fil-punteġġ F1 fuq metodi kompetittivi fir-reġim baxx tad-dejta.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ മനുഷ്യന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും വിദ്യാഭാഷയ്ക്കും ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മെഡിയാണ്. സ്വാഭാഷയുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ആശയങ്ങളുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെപ്പറ്റിയും, ആശയത ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, ഒരു ഫിഷിങ്ങ് ഇമെയിലിന്റെ ആശയം പഠിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരാള്\u200d പറയും, "ഇത് ഫിഷിങ്ങ് ഇമെയില്\u200d ആണെന്ന് കാരണം അത് നിങ്ങളുടെ ബാ ഈ പ്രശ്നം പരിഹരിക്കുന്നത് തുറന്ന സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ്യാഖ്യാനിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതും പ്ര നമ്മള്\u200d (1) ഭാഷ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനും, ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d ഫോമുകളുമായി പ്രസ്താവിക്കാത്ത (സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസി) ഉപദേശം പഠിക്കുന്ന (2) ആശയം  പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ദുര്\u200dബലമായ സിഗ്നലായി ഡേറ്റാകളുടെ വിശേഷതകളുടെ വ്യാഖ്യാനം വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതിന ഈമെയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ആശയങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. കുറഞ്ഞ ഡാറ്', 'ms': "Bahasa semulajadi merupakan media yang berkuasa untuk banyak belajar dan pedagogi manusia. Kami mempertimbangkan masalah pembelajaran konsep dari penjelasan bahasa semulajadi, dan sejumlah kecil contoh yang ditabel konsep. Contohnya, dalam mempelajari konsep e-mel phishing, anda mungkin berkata `ini adalah e-mel phishing kerana ia meminta nombor akaun bank anda'. Name Solving this problem involves both learning to interpret open ended natural language statements, and learning the concept itself. We present a joint model for (1) language interpretation (semantic parsing) and (2) concept learning (classification) that does not require labeling statements with logical forms.  Sebaliknya, model lebih suka interpretasi diskriminatif pernyataan dalam konteks ciri-ciri yang boleh dilihat data sebagai isyarat lemah untuk hurai. On a dataset of email-related concepts, our approach yields across-the-board improvements in classification performance, with a 30% relative improvement in F1 score over competitive methods in the low data regime.", 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл нь хүний суралцах, педагогийг ихэнхдээ хамгийн чухал хэсэг юм. Бид байгалийн хэлний тодорхойлолтуудын тухай ойлголтын асуудлыг, ойлголтын жижиг жишээн тодорхойлолтуудын тухай бодож үздэг. Жишээлбэл, захирах эл. поштын ойлголтыг сурах үед нэг нь "Энэ бол захирах эл. пошт юм. Учир нь банкны хувьцааны тоо хүсч байна" гэх байх. Энэ асуудлыг шийдвэрлэх нь нээлттэй хэл хэлний илтгэлийг тодорхойлж суралцах, ойлголтыг суралцах юм. Бид (1) хэл илтгэлийн (semantic parsing) болон (2) ойлголтын суралцах (classification) загварыг илтгэдэг. Энэ нь логикийн хэлбэртэй илтгэлийг хэрэггүй. Үүний оронд загвар нь өгөгдлийн харагдах чадваруудын тухай тодорхойлолтуудыг хуваалцахын тулд бага зохиол болгон ялгаатай тодорхойлолтуудыг илүүдэлдэг. Эл.поштын холбоотой тодорхойлолтуудын тухай бидний арга зам нь хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааны дасгал хөгжлийн сайжруулалт гарч ирдэг. F1-ийн тооны 30% нь бага өгөгдлийн режимийн давхар давхар арга зам дээр өрсөлдөг.', 'pl': 'Język naturalny stanowi dominujące medium dla dużej części nauki i pedagogiki człowieka. Rozważamy problem uczenia się koncepcji z wyjaśnień języka naturalnego oraz niewielką liczbę oznaczonych przykładów koncepcji. Na przykład, ucząc się koncepcji wiadomości e-mail phishingowej, można powiedzieć "jest to wiadomość e-mail phishingowy, ponieważ prosi o numer konta bankowego". Rozwiązanie tego problemu polega zarówno na nauce interpretacji otwartych stwierdzeń języka naturalnego, jak i nauce samego pojęcia. Przedstawiamy wspólny model interpretacji języka (1) oraz (2) uczenia się koncepcji (klasyfikacja), który nie wymaga etykietowania stwierdzeń formami logicznymi. Zamiast tego model preferuje dyskryminacyjne interpretacje stwierdzeń w kontekście obserwowalnych cech danych jako słaby sygnał do analizy. W oparciu o zbiór danych koncepcji związanych z pocztą elektroniczną nasze podejście przynosi ogólną poprawę wydajności klasyfikacji, z 30% względną poprawą wyniku F1 w porównaniu z metodami konkurencyjnymi w systemie niskich danych.', 'no': 'Natural language constitutes a predominant medium for much of human learning and pedagogy. Vi ser på problemet med læring av konsept frå naturspråk-forklaringar, og eit liten tal med merkelige eksemplar av konsepten. For eksempel, ved læring av konsepten for ei fil-e-post, kan du si at «dette er ein fil-e-post fordi han spør etter bankkontoanummeret ditt». Å løysa dette problemet involverer begge læring for å tolka opne, enderte naturspråk- uttrykk, og læring av konsepten sjølv. Vi presenterer eit kopla modell for (1) språk- tolking (semantisk tolking) og (2) konseptlæring (klassifikasjon) som ikkje krev merkelappar med logiske formar. I staden fører modellen til diskriminativ tolking av uttrykk i konteksten av observerbare funksjonar for dataene som ein svak signal for tolking. På ein dataset av e-post-relaterte konseptar, tilnærminga vårt gjer forbedringar i klassifikasjonen over brettet, med 30 % relativt forbedring i F1-poeng over konkurentære metodar i låg dataregimen.', 'ro': "Limbajul natural constituie un mediu predominant pentru o mare parte a învățării umane și pedagogiei. Considerăm problema învățării conceptului din explicații de limbă naturală și un număr mic de exemple etichetate ale conceptului. De exemplu, în învățarea conceptului de e-mail de phishing, se poate spune `acesta este un e-mail de phishing deoarece solicită numărul contului tău bancar'. Rezolvarea acestei probleme implică atât învățarea interpretării declarațiilor deschise de limbă naturală, cât și învățarea conceptului în sine. Prezentăm un model comun pentru (1) interpretarea limbii (parsing semantic) și (2) învățarea conceptului (clasificare) care nu necesită etichetarea declarațiilor cu forme logice. În schimb, modelul preferă interpretări discriminatorii ale declarațiilor în contextul caracteristicilor observabile ale datelor ca un semnal slab pentru analizare. Pe baza unui set de date de concepte legate de e-mail, abordarea noastră oferă îmbunătățiri generale în performanța clasificării, cu o îmbunătățire relativă de 30% a scorului F1 față de metodele competitive în regimul de date scăzute.", 'sr': 'Prirodni jezik predstavlja predominantni medij za većinu ljudskog učenja i pedagogije. Smatramo problem učenja koncepta iz objašnjenja prirodnog jezika i malog broja označenih primjera koncepta. Na primer, u naučenju koncepta poštanskog e-maila, možda kaže: "Ovo je poštanski e-mail jer traži broj vašeg računa banke". Rešavanje ovog problema uključuje i učenje da interpretiše otvorene prirodne izjave jezika i učenje samog koncepta. Predstavljamo zajednički model za (1) interpretaciju jezika (semantičko analiziranje) i (2) učenje koncepta (klasifikacija) koji ne zahteva izjave označavanja etiketama sa logičkim oblicima. Umesto toga, model preferira diskriminaciju izjava u kontekstu opasnosti podataka kao slab signal za analizu. Na setu podataka pojma povezanih sa e-mailom, naš pristup pruža poboljšanje širom tabla u klasifikaciji, sa 30% relativno poboljšanjem u rezultatu F1 nad konkurentnim metodama u režimu niskih podataka.', 'si': "ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව තමයි මිනිස්සුන් ඉගෙනීම සහ පෙඩාගෝජියාවට ප්\u200dරධානයක් වෙන්නේ. අපි හිතන්නේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පොඩි සංඛ්යාවක උදාහරණයෙන්, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න, කිසිම කෙනෙක් කියන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට 'මේක සම්පූර්ණයක්' කියලා කි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවිත භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවස්ථාව කරලා ඉග (1) භාෂාව අභිවිධානය (semantic Parsing) සහ (2) අභිවිධානය අභිවිධානය (classification) සඳහා සංවිධානය (classification) සඳහා සංවිධානයක් පෙ ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, මොඩේල් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් සංඥාවක් විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරන්න බැරි සංඥාවක් විදිහට පරික්ෂ ඉමෙල් සම්බන්ධ විදියට තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ විදියට, අපේ විදියට විශේෂ විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා, F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයේ සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම", 'so': 'Luqada dabiicadda ah waa mid u dhexeeya waxbarasho iyo cilmi badan. We consider the problem of concept learning from natural language explanations, and a small number of labeled examples of the concept.  Tusaale ahaan marka aad barto fikrada e-mailka filiidinta, waxaa laga yaabaa in uu yidhaahdo kani waa e-mailka filitaanka, sababtoo ah waxay weydiinaysaa lambarka akawnkaaga. Xafiiska dhibaatadan waxaa ku saabsan barashada turjumidda afka furan ee furan iyo barashada fikrada qudheeda. Tusaale wadajir ah oo u qoran turjumaadda luqada (1) iyo waxbarashada (2) oo aan u baahnayn in lagu qoro qoraal rasmi ah. Isku bedelkeeda waxaa doorta turjumaadda takoorista ah, marka lagu jiro tababarida macluumaadka sida calaamad taageer ah oo lagu qorayo baaritaanka. Fitarka macluumaadka ah ee ku saabsan e-mailkayaga, dhaqdhaheenkayagu wuxuu ka soo bixinayaa horumarinta tababarka oo dhan, waxaana laga helaa 30% horumarinta ku saabsan qoraalka macluumaadka hoose ee F1.', 'sv': "Naturligt språk utgör ett dominerande medium för mycket av mänskligt lärande och pedagogik. Vi överväger problemet med konceptinlärning från naturspråksförklaringar och ett litet antal märkta exempel på begreppet. Till exempel, när man lär sig begreppet nätfiske e-post, kan man säga `detta är ett nätfiske e-postmeddelande eftersom det frågar efter ditt bankkontonummer'. Lösningen av detta problem innebär både att lära sig att tolka öppna naturspråk uttalanden, och att lära sig själva begreppet. Vi presenterar en gemensam modell för (1) språktolkning (semantisk tolkning) och (2) konceptinlärning (klassificering) som inte kräver märkning av satser med logiska former. Istället föredrar modellen diskriminerande tolkningar av påståenden i samband med observerbara egenskaper hos data som en svag signal för tolkning. På en dataset av e-postrelaterade koncept ger vårt tillvägagångssätt övergripande förbättringar av klassificeringsprestandan, med en relativ förbättring på 30% av F1 poäng jämfört med konkurrenskraftiga metoder i lågdataregimen.", 'ta': "இயல்பான மொழி ஒரு முக்கியமான நடுநிலை மனித கற்றல் மற்றும் கல்வி கல்வியை உருவாக்குகிறது. We consider the problem of concept learning from natural language explanations, and a small number of labeled examples of the concept.  எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, ஒரு மின்னஞ்சல் மின்னஞ்சலின் கருத்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் போது 'இது ஒரு மின்னஞ்சல் தான் உங்கள் வங்கி கணக்கு எண்ண இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்து திறந்த முடிந்த மொழியின் கூற்றுகளை பொருட்டும் கற்றுக் கொள்வதும் தொடர நாம் (1) மொழியின் மொழியின் மொழியின் மாதிரிப்பு (பாடல்) மற்றும் (2) கருத்து கற்றுக்கொள்ள (வகைப்படுத்தல்) ஒரு இணைய மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருக அதற்கு பதிலாக, மாதிரி பாடலுக்கு பலவீனமான குறியீட்டுக் குறியீட்டை பார்க்க முடியும் தகவலின் குணங்களை பார்க்கும் ப மின்னஞ்சல் தொடர்புடைய கருத்துக்களின் தகவல் அமைப்பில், எங்கள் முன்னேற்றம் வகைப்படுத்தல் செயல்பாட்டில் மேம்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, குறைந்த தரவு விதிவின", 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان انسان کی تعلیم اور پیڈگوژی کے لئے ایک بڑی وسیع ہے۔ ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ مفصل کی تعلیم طبیعی زبان کی توضیح سے اور مفصل کی تھوڑی سی مثالیں لکھی جاتی ہیں۔ مثال کے لئے، ایک فینگ ایمیل کا مطلب سیکھنے کے لئے، ایک شخص کہے گا کہ "یہ ایک فینگ ایمیل ہے کیونکہ یہ آپ کے بانک حساب شمار کے لئے طلب کرتا ہے". اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے دونوں کھلی زبان کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کے لئے موجود ہوتی ہے، اور خود سمجھ سکھاتی ہے۔ ہم ایک (1) زبان تفسیر (semantic parsing) اور (2) تفسیر (classification) کے لئے ایک مشترک موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں جو منطقی فرموں کے ساتھ لیبلینگ سٹیٹمنٹ کی ضرورت نہیں رکھتا۔ اس کے عوض، نمڈل کو پارس کے لئے کمزور سیگنالہ کے طور پر دھوکا دینے کے لئے دھوکا دینے کی تعبیر کی ترجیح دیتا ہے. ایمیل کے معاملہ میں ایک ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہمارا طریقہ کلاسپیٹ کے کامیابی میں سی فی 1 سکوٹ میں سی فی فی 1 سکوٹ کے معاملہ میں نیچے ڈیٹ ریجیم میں مقابلہ طریقوں پر اضافہ ہوتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Natalik til inson o'rganish va o'rganish uchun eng muhim medium. Biz tabiiy tilning tafsilotlaridan o'rganish muammolarini o'ylaymiz, va g'oyanining kichkina ko'p misollar. For example, in learning the concept of a phishing email, one might say `this is a phishing email because it asks for your bank account number'.  Bu muammolarni qidirish uchun ochiq tuzuvni o'rganish va o'zimni o'rganish mumkin. Биз (1) tillar tarjima qilish (semantik parsing) va (2) tizimni o'rganish uchun bir bir bir modelni hozir qilamiz. Ularning logical formatlarini o'rganish kerak emas. Oʻrniga, model ajratish uchun haqida maʼlumotning xususiyatlarini qisqarish imkoniyati deb belgilaydi. Elektron xabarlar bilan bog'liq fikrlarida, bizning murojaatiyatlarimiz darajalashtirish natijasida o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi, va F1'da 30% yaxshi o'zgarishni kamaytirish imkoniyatlaridan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ tự nhiên là phương tiện phổ biến nhất cho việc học tập và giáo dục. Chúng tôi xem xét vấn đề học về khái niệm từ những giải thích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, và một số ít các ví dụ được đánh dấu của khái niệm. Ví dụ, khi học về khái niệm về email của ông, có thể nói: "đây là email của ông đang đặt câu hỏi về tài khoản ngân hàng". Giải quyết vấn đề này gồm cả việc học cách giải thích các ngôn ngữ tự nhiên mở, và học cả khái niệm đó. Chúng tôi có một mô hình chung về cách giải thích ngôn ngữ (1) và (phân biệt ngữ) học về khái niệm (phân loại) mà không cần phải mô tả với các dạng logic. Thay vào đó, mô hình ưa thích cách phân biệt các phát biểu trong trường hợp các tính năng quan sát của dữ liệu như một tín hiệu yếu để phân tích. Trên một tập tin về các khái niệm liên quan email, phương pháp của chúng ta đạt hiệu quả về các hiệu suất phân hạng trên toàn cầu, với sự cải tiến tương đối của F1 hơn các phương pháp cạnh tranh trong chế độ dữ liệu thấp.', 'bg': 'Естественият език представлява преобладаваща среда за голяма част от човешкото учене и педагогиката. Разглеждаме проблема с изучаването на концепцията от обяснения на естествения език и малък брой етикетирани примери за концепцията. Например, при изучаването на концепцията за фишинг имейл, може да се каже "това е фишинг имейл, защото изисква номера на банковата ви сметка". Решаването на този проблем включва както учене да интерпретира твърденията на естествения език с отворен край, така и изучаване на самата концепция. Представяме съвместен модел за (1) езикова интерпретация (семантичен анализ) и (2) концептуално обучение (класификация), който не изисква етикетиране на твърдения с логически форми. Вместо това моделът предпочита дискриминационни интерпретации на твърденията в контекста на видимите характеристики на данните като слаб сигнал за анализ. На базата на набор от данни от концепции, свързани с електронната поща, нашият подход дава цялостни подобрения в ефективността на класификацията, с относително подобрение на оценката от 30% спрямо конкурентните методи в режима на ниски данни.', 'de': 'Natürliche Sprache ist ein vorherrschendes Medium für viel menschliches Lernen und Pädagogik. Wir betrachten das Problem des Konzeptlernens aus natursprachlichen Erklärungen und eine kleine Anzahl beschrifteter Beispiele des Konzepts. Wenn man zum Beispiel das Konzept einer Phishing-E-Mail lernt, könnte man sagen: "Dies ist eine Phishing-E-Mail, weil sie nach Ihrer Bankkontonummer fragt". Die Lösung dieses Problems beinhaltet sowohl das Erlernen der Interpretation offener natürlicher Sprachaussagen als auch das Erlernen des Konzepts selbst. Wir präsentieren ein gemeinsames Modell für (1) Sprachinterpretation (semantisches Parsen) und (2) Konzeptlernen (Klassifizierung), das keine Beschriftung von Aussagen mit logischen Formen erfordert. Stattdessen bevorzugt das Modell diskriminierende Interpretationen von Aussagen im Kontext von beobachtbaren Merkmalen der Daten als schwaches Signal zum Parsen. Auf einem Datensatz von E-Mail-bezogenen Konzepten führt unser Ansatz zu umfassenden Verbesserungen der Klassifizierungsleistung, mit einer relativen Verbesserung von 30% im F1-Score gegenüber wettbewerbsfähigen Methoden im Low Data-Regime.', 'id': "Bahasa alami merupakan media yang dominan untuk banyak belajar dan pedagogi manusia. Kami mempertimbangkan masalah konsep belajar dari penjelasan bahasa alami, dan sejumlah kecil contoh yang ditabel konsep. Contohnya, dalam mempelajari konsep dari email phishing, seseorang mungkin mengatakan `ini adalah email phishing karena meminta nomor rekening bank Anda'. Tidak. Menyelesaikan masalah ini melibatkan belajar untuk menerjemahkan pernyataan bahasa alam yang terbuka, dan belajar konsep itu sendiri. Kami mempersembahkan model bersama untuk (1) interpretasi bahasa (penghuraian semantis) dan (2) pembelajaran konsep (klasifikasi) yang tidak memerlukan pernyataan label dengan bentuk logis. Sebaliknya, model lebih suka interpretasi diskriminatif dari pernyataan dalam konteks karakteristik yang dapat diperhatikan dari data sebagai sinyal lemah untuk menghurai. Dalam set data konsep berkaitan dengan email, pendekatan kita memberikan perkembangan di seluruh papan dalam prestasi klasifikasi, dengan 30% perkembangan relatif pada skor F1 dibanding metode kompetitif dalam režim data rendah.", 'nl': "Natuurlijke taal vormt een overheersend medium voor veel menselijke leren en pedagogiek. We beschouwen het probleem van conceptleren uit natuurlijke taalverklaringen, en een klein aantal gelabelde voorbeelden van het concept. Bijvoorbeeld, bij het leren van het concept van een phishing-e-mail, zou men kunnen zeggen: 'Dit is een phishing-e-mail omdat het vraagt om uw bankrekeningnummer'. Het oplossen van dit probleem impliceert zowel het leren interpreteren van open ended natuurlijke taaluitspraken, als het leren van het concept zelf. We presenteren een gezamenlijk model voor (1) taalinterpretatie (semantische parsing) en (2) conceptleren (classificatie) dat geen labeling van statements met logische vormen vereist. In plaats daarvan geeft het model de voorkeur aan discriminerende interpretaties van statements in context van waarneembare kenmerken van de gegevens als een zwak signaal voor parsen. Op een dataset van e-mailgerelateerde concepten levert onze aanpak over de hele linie verbeteringen in classificatieprestaties op, met een relatieve verbetering van 30% in F1-score ten opzichte van concurrerende methoden in het lage dataregime.", 'da': "Naturligt sprog udgør et fremherskende medium for meget af menneskelig læring og pædagogik. Vi overvejer problemet med konceptlæring fra naturlige sprogforklaringer og et lille antal mærkede eksempler på konceptet. For eksempel, når man lærer begrebet phishing e-mail, kan man sige `dette er en phishing e-mail, fordi den beder om dit bankkontonummer'. Løsningen af dette problem indebærer både at lære at fortolke åbne sprogudsagn og at lære selve begrebet. Vi præsenterer en fælles model for (1) sprogfortolkning (semantisk fortolkning) og (2) begrebsindlæring (klassificering), der ikke kræver mærkning af udsagn med logiske former. I stedet foretrækker modellen diskriminerende fortolkninger af udsagn i kontekst med observerbare træk i dataene som et svagt signal til fortolkning. På et datasæt af e-mailrelaterede koncepter giver vores tilgang generelle forbedringer i klassificeringsydelsen med en relativ forbedring på 30% i F1 score i forhold til konkurrencedygtige metoder i lavdatasystemet.", 'hr': 'Prirodni jezik predstavlja predsjednik za većinu ljudskog učenja i pedagogije. Smatramo problem učenja koncepta iz objašnjenja prirodnog jezika i malog broja označenih primjera koncepta. Na primjer, u učenju koncepta poštanskog e-maila, jedan može reći: "Ovo je poštanski e-mail jer traži broj vašeg računa banke". Rešavanje ovog problema uključuje i učenje interpretiranja otvorenih prirodnih izjava jezika i učenje samog koncepta. Predstavljamo zajednički model za (1) interpretaciju jezika (semantičko analiziranje) i (2) učenje koncepta (klasifikacija) koji ne zahtijeva izjave označavanja označavanja s logičkim oblicima. Umjesto toga, model preferira diskriminiranje izjava u kontekstu promatrajućih karakteristika podataka kao slab signal za analizu. Na skupu podataka pojma povezanih s e-mailom, naš pristup pruža poboljšanje širom ploča u učinkovitosti klasifikacije, s relativnim poboljšanjem 30% u rezultatu F1 nad konkurentnim metodama u nizom režimu podataka.', 'ko': "자연 언어는 인류의 학습과 교육의 주요 매개체이다.우리는 자연 언어 해석에서 개념을 배우는 문제와 소량의 라벨이 있는 개념 예시를 고려했다.예를 들어 피싱 전자메일의 개념을 배울 때 누군가가'이것은 피싱 전자메일입니다. 왜냐하면 이것은 당신에게 은행 계좌 번호를 요구하기 때문입니다'라고 말할 수 있습니다.이 문제를 해결하려면 개방식 자연 언어 문장을 해석하는 것도 배워야 할 뿐만 아니라 개념 자체도 배워야 한다.우리는 (1) 언어 해석(어의 해석)과 (2) 개념 학습(분류)에 하나의 연합 모델을 제공하는데 논리적인 형식으로 문장을 표시할 필요가 없다.반면 이 모델은 데이터의 관찰 가능한 특징을 해석할 수 있는 미약한 신호로 하는 배경에서 문장을 구별적으로 해석하는 경향이 있다.전자 우편과 관련된 개념의 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법은 분류 성능에 있어서 전면적으로 개선되었고 낮은 데이터 영역의 경쟁 방법에 비해 F1 점수가 상대적으로 30% 높아졌다.", 'sw': 'Lugha ya asili inatengeneza katikati kubwa ya kujifunza na elimu ya binadamu. Tunafahamu tatizo la kujifunza kutoka maelezo ya lugha ya asili, na mifano michache ya dhana hiyo. Kwa mfano, katika kujifunza dhana ya barua pepe za upigaji filamu, mtu anaweza kusema “hii ni barua pepe za kutuliza kwa sababu inaomba namba yako ya benki.” Kusuluhisha tatizo hili linahusisha wote kujifunza kutafsiri kauli za lugha zilizokwisha huru, na kujifunza dhana hiyo yenyewe. Tunaweka muundo wa pamoja wa tafsiri ya lugha (1) kwa ajili ya tafsiri ya lugha (wimbo wa kimapenzi) na dhana ya kujifunza (utafsiri wa 2) ambayo haihitaji kutoa tamko kwa namna za kisaikolojia. Badala yake, modeli inapendelea tafsiri za kutofautisha matamko katika muktadha wa tabia za taarifa kama ishara dhaifu ya kuuza. Katika seti ya taarifa za dhana za barua pepe zinazohusiana na barua pepe, mbinu yetu inatoa maendeleo mbalimbali katika utendaji wa usambazaji, ikiwa ni asilimia 30 ya kuboreshwa kwa F1 kwa sababu ya mbinu za ushindani katika utawala wa chini wa data.', 'sq': "Gjuha natyrore përbën një mjet të mbizotërueshëm për shumë mësime dhe pedagogji njerëzore. Ne konsiderojmë problemin e mësimit të konceptit nga shpjegimet natyrore të gjuhës, dhe një numër të vogël shembuj të etiketuar të konceptit. Për shembull, në mësimin e konceptit të një email phishing, mund të thuhet `kjo është një email phishing sepse kërkon për numrin e llogarisë tuaj bankare'... Zgjidhja e këtij problemi përfshin si mësimin për të interpretuar deklaratat e hapura të gjuhës natyrore dhe mësimin e konceptit. Ne paraqesim një model të përbashkët për (1) interpretimin e gjuhës (analizimin semantik) dhe (2) mësimin e konceptit (klasifikimin) që nuk kërkon etiketën e deklaratave me forme logjike. Në vend të kësaj, modeli preferon interpretimet diskriminuese të deklaratave në kontekst të karakteristikave të vëzhgueshme të të dhënave si një sinjal të dobët për analizimin. Në një sërë të dhënash të koncepteve të lidhura me e-mailin, qasja jonë jep përmirësime të përgjithshme në performancën klasifikuese, me një përmirësim relativ 30% në rezultatin F1 mbi metodat konkurruese në regjimin e të dhënave të ulëta.", 'af': 'Natuurlike taal is \'n voordekende medium vir baie menslike leer en pedagogie. Ons beskou die probleem van konsepte leer van natuurlike taal uitduidelings en \'n klein aantal etiketeerde voorbeelde van die konsepte. Byvoorbeeld, in die leer van die konsepte van \'n phishing e-pos, kan iemand sê: "Hierdie is \'n phishing e-pos omdat dit vir jou bank rekening nommer vra". Die oplossing van hierdie probleem beteken beide leer om oop te interpreteer, eindig natuurlike taal uitdrukkings en die konsept self te leer. Ons stel \'n koppelige model vir (1) taal uitlegging (semantiese verwerking) en (2) konsepte leer (klasifikasie) wat nie benodig etiket uitleggings met logiese vorms nie. In plaas van die model verkies diskriminasiewe uitleggings van uitleggings in die konteks van aansigbare funksies van die data as \'n swak sein vir verwerking. Op \'n datastel van e-pos verwante konsepte gee ons toegang oor die bord verbeteringe in klasifikasie-prestasie, met \'n 30% relatiewe verbetering in F1 telling oor mededingsmetodes in die lae data reëls.', 'fa': 'زبان طبیعی برای بسیاری از دانش آموزش انسان و آموزش آموزش آموزشی است. ما مشکل یادگیری از توضیح زبان طبیعی و تعداد کوچک مثالهای نقاشی از مفهوم را به نظر می گیریم. برای مثال، در یاد گرفتن مفهوم یک ایمیل کوچک می\u200cتواند بگوید: «این یک ایمیل کوچک است، زیرا برای شماره حساب بانک شما می\u200cخواهد.» حل این مشکل دو تا یادگیری برای تعبیر کردن واژه\u200cهای زبان طبیعی باز و یادگیری خودش است. ما یک مدل مشترک برای تفسیر زبان (جدا کردن semantic) و (2) یادگیری (classification) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نیازی به گزارش برچسب با فرم\u200cهای منطقی ندارد. به جای آن، مدل ترجیح می\u200cدهد تعبیر جدایی از گزارش\u200cها در محیط ویژه\u200cهای قابل مشاهده\u200cای از داده\u200cها به عنوان سیگنال ضعیف برای بررسی. روی مجموعه داده\u200cها از نظریه\u200cهای رابطه با ایمیل، دستور ما توسعه\u200cهای تحصیل\u200cکننده\u200cای از طریق برنامه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cبندی، با توسعه\u200cهای 30 درصد نسبت به توسعه\u200cی نمونه\u200cهای F1 بر روش\u200cهای رقابت در رقابت\u200cکننده', 'tr': 'Tebiýal dil adamlaryň öwrenmesi we pedagogy köpüsi üçin öňünden gelen orta. Biz tebigy dil düşündirişinden öwrenmeniň kynçylygyny we düşünýän kynçylyk diýip pikir edýäris. Örneğin, saçmalyk e-mailiň düşünjegini öwrenmek üçin bir adam "bu ýerli e-maildir, sebäbi ol bankyň hesap sanyny soraýar" diýip soraýar. Bu meseleni çözmek hem açyk dil sözlerini çözmek hem öwrenmek hem tebigy dil sözlerini çykmak hem özüni öwrenmek hem bolar. Biz (1) dil terjimeleri (semantik terjimeler) we (2) konsept öwrenmesi (klasifikasy) üçin bir nusga görkeýäris Bu ýerde, model hasaplanjak üçin azajyk sinyal bolup hatlaryň kontekstinde diskriminät terjimelerini tercih eder. E-poçta temaslarymyzda, biziň metodamyz klasifikasyýa çykyşymyzda 30% dürli gelişmeleri bar we düşük harplar rejiminde konkursiýa ýüzerinde sereden ýüzeri çykýar.', 'am': 'የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ለሰው ትምህርት እና ትምህርት የሚበዛ ማዕከል ነው፡፡ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ትምህርት መምህርት እና የቆጠሩ ምሳሌዎች ጥቂት ነው ብለን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ የኢሜይል አካሄዱን በመማር የሚችል ሰው ‹ይህ የመፍለስ ኢሜይል ነው› ስለዚህም የbank അക ብ ቁጥር ይጠይቃል ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ጉዳይ መፍታት የተከፈተውን የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ንግግርን ለመፍረስ እና ራሱን ለመማር ይችላል፡፡ የቋንቋ ትርጓሜ (1) እና (semantic parsing) እና (2) ማስተማርን (classification) እናስገራለን፡፡ በፋንታ፣ ሞዴል ለማጋራት ደካማ ማኅበረሰብ የዳታ ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የደካማ ማኅበረሰብ ሲግል የሚለውጥ የንግግር ትርጉም ይመርጣል፡፡ የኢሜይል አካሄዱን የድምፅ አካባቢዎች፣ የግንኙነታችን ግንኙነት የክፍለ ግንኙነታችንን በክፍለ ሥርዓት ውስጥ 30% አካባቢ የF1 ትክክለኛ ሥርዓት በሚቆጠሩ ሀብት ይሻላል፡፡', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা বেশীর ভাগ মানুষ শিক্ষা এবং শিক্ষাবিদের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মাধ্যম। আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা ব্যাখ্যা থেকে শিক্ষা নিয়ে ধারণার সমস্যা বিবেচনা করি এবং ধারণার কয়েকটি সংখ্যা বিশেষ উদাহরণ উদাহরণস্বরূপ, একটি ফিশিং ই-মেইলের ধারণা শিখার সময়ে কেউ বলতে পারে, “এটা একটি ফিশিং ইমেইল, কারণ এটা আপনার ব্যাংক অ্যাকাউন্ট নাম্বারের জন্য প Solving this problem involves both learning to interpret open ended natural language statements, and learning the concept itself.  আমরা একটি যৌথ মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি (১) ভাষার ব্যাখ্যা (সেম্পেন্টিক পার্জিং) এবং (২) ধারণা শিক্ষা (শ্রেণীকরণ) যা লেবেলিকাল ফর্মে বিবৃত এর পরিবর্তে এই মডেল পার্সিং এর দুর্বল সিগন্যাল হিসেবে তথ্যের বৈষম্যের বৈষম্যের ব্যাখ্যা পছন্দ করে। ইমেইলের সাথে সম্পর্কিত ধারণার মাধ্যমে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বোর্ডের বিভিন্ন উন্নতি প্রদান করে, যার ফলে কম ডাটা শাসনের প্রতিযোগিতার মাধ্যমে ফি১-এ ৩০% আ', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil insan öyrənməsi və pedagogi üçün böyük bir ortamdır. Biz təbiətli dil a çıqlarından öyrənmək problemlərini və məsələnin küçük nümunələrini düşünürük. Misal olaraq, phishing e-maillərin fikrini öyrənmək üçün, birisi "bu bir phishing e-maildir, çünki bank a hesabınızın say ını istəyir" deyə bilər. Bu problemi çəkmək hər ikisi açıq dil ifadə etmək öyrənməsi və təbii dil ifadə edilməsi və təbiini öyrənməsi də məqsədildir. Biz (1) dil yorumlayıcısı (semantik parsing) və (2) konsept öyrənməsi (classification) üçün birləşdiririk ki, logik formlarla etiketləmə ifadələrini lazımdır. Əvəzində, model məlumatların görünülabilir xüsusiyyətlərini ayırmaq üçün zəif sinyal olaraq ayırmaq üçün dəyişiklik tərzlərini seçir. E-poçt bağlı fikirlərin verilən quruluğunda, bizim tərzimiz klasifikasyon performansının üstündə düşük məlumatlar rejimində müqayisədi metodların üstündə 30%-ni yaxşılaşdırır.', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզուն մարդկային ուսումնասիրության և pedagoգիայի մեծ մասի գերակշռող միջոց է: Մենք դիտարկում ենք գաղափարի ուսումնասիրության խնդիրը բնական լեզվի բացատրություններից և գաղափարի մի փոքր նշաններ: Օրինակ, ֆիշինգ էլեկտրոնային նամակի գաղափարը սովորելիս կարելի է ասել "սա ֆիշինգ էլեկտրոնային նամակ է, որովհետև այն հարցնում է ձեր բանկային հաշվի համարը": Այս խնդիրը լուծելը ներառում է երկուսի ուսումնասիրությունը բաց վերջնական բնական լեզվի հայտարարությունների մեկնաբանելու համար, ինչպես նաև ինքը հասկացությունը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք (1) լեզվի ինտերպրետացիայի (սեմանտիկ վերլուծում) և (2) հասկացության (դասակարգում) ընդհանուր մոդել, որը չի պահանջում խոսքերի պիտակ տալ տրամաբանական ձևերով: Փոխարենը, մոդելը նախընտրում է արտահայտությունների խտրականորեն մեկնաբանությունները տվյալների տեսանելի հատկանիշների կոնտեքստում որպես վերլուծության թույլ ազդանշան: Էլեկտրոնային նամակներով կապված գաղափարների տվյալների համակարգում մեր մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է դասակարգման արդյունքների ընդհանուր բարելավումներ, F1-ի գնահատականների 30 տոկոսի հարաբերական բարելավումը ցածր տվյալների ռեժիմի մրցակ', 'bs': 'Prirodni jezik predstavlja predsjednik za većinu ljudskog učenja i pedagogije. Smatramo problem učenja koncepta iz objašnjenja prirodnog jezika i malog broja označenih primjera koncepta. Na primjer, u učenju koncepta poštanskog e-maila, možda kaže: "Ovo je poštanski e-mail jer traži broj vašeg računa banke". Rešavanje ovog problema uključuje i učenje interpretiranja otvorenih prirodnih izjava jezika i učenje koncepta samog. Predstavljamo zajednički model za (1) interpretaciju jezika (semantičko analiziranje) i (2) učenje koncepta (klasifikacija) koji ne zahtijeva izjave označavanja označavanja s logičkim oblicima. Umjesto toga, model preferira diskriminiranje izjava u kontekstu promatrajućih karakteristika podataka kao slab signal za analizu. Na skupu podataka koncepta povezanih s e-mailom, naš pristup pruža poboljšanje širom tabla u klasifikaciji, s relativnim poboljšanjem 30% u rezultatu F1 nad konkurentnim metodama u regimu niskih podataka.', 'cs': 'Přirozený jazyk představuje převládající médium pro většinu lidského učení a pedagogiky. Zvažujeme problém učení konceptu z vysvětlení přirozeného jazyka a malý počet označených příkladů konceptu. Například, když se naučíte koncept phishingového e-mailu, můžete říct, "toto je phishingový e-mail, protože se ptá na číslo vašeho bankovního účtu". Řešení tohoto problému zahrnuje jak naučení se interpretovat otevřené výroky přirozeného jazyka, tak naučení se samotného konceptu. Představujeme společný model pro (1) jazykovou interpretaci (sémantické parsování) a (2) učení konceptů (klasifikace), který nevyžaduje označování příkazů logickými formami. Místo toho model preferuje diskriminační interpretace příkazů v kontextu pozorovatelných rysů dat jako slabý signál pro analýzu. Na datové sadě konceptů souvisejících s e-mailem náš přístup přináší celkové zlepšení klasifikačního výkonu s relativním 30% zlepšením skóre F1 oproti konkurenčním metodám v režimu nízkých dat.', 'et': 'Looduskeel on peamine meedium inimõppe ja pedagoogika jaoks. Me kaalume kontseptsiooni õppimise probleemi looduskeele selgitustest ja väikest hulka märgistatud näiteid kontseptsioonist. Näiteks andmepüügimeili kontseptsiooni õppimisel võib öelda, et tegemist on andmepüügimeiliga, sest see küsib teie pangakonto numbrit. Selle probleemi lahendamine hõlmab nii avatud looduskeele avalduste tõlgendamise õppimist kui ka kontseptsiooni enda õppimist. Esitame ühismudeli (1) keeletõlgendamiseks (semantiline parsimine) ja (2) kontseptsiooniõppeks (klassifitseerimine), mis ei nõua lausete märgistamist loogiliste vormidega. Selle asemel eelistab mudel väidete diskrimineerivat tõlgendamist andmete jälgitavate omaduste kontekstis nõrga signaalina parsimiseks. E-postiga seotud kontseptsioonide andmekogumi põhjal parandab meie lähenemisviis klassifitseerimise tulemuslikkust üldiselt ning F1 skoori suhteline paranemine 30% võrreldes konkurentsivõimeliste meetoditega madalate andmete režiimis.', 'ca': 'La llengua natural constitueix un medi predominant per a gran part de l\'aprenentatge i la pedagogia humana. Considerem el problem a de l\'aprenentatge de conceptes a partir d\'explicacions de llenguatge natural, i un petit nombre d\'exemples etiquetats del concepte. Per exemple, en aprendre el concepte d\'un correu electrònic de phishing, podríem dir "això és un correu electrònic de phishing perquè demana el teu número de compte bancari". La solució d\'aquest problema implica tant aprendre a interpretar declaracions de llenguatge natural obertes com aprendre el concepte mateix. We present a joint model for (1) language interpretation (semantic parsing) and (2) concept learning (classification) that does not require labeling statements with logical forms.  En comptes d\'això, el model prefereix interpretacions discriminatives de les declaracions en el context de característiques observables de les dades com un senyal dèbil d\'analització. En un conjunt de dades de conceptes relacionats amb el correu electrònic, el nostre enfocament produeix millores a nivell general en el rendiment de la classificació, amb una millora relativa del 30% en la puntuació F1 sobre els mètodes competitius en el règim baix de dades.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkieli on hallitseva väline suurelle osalle ihmisen oppimista ja pedagogiikkaa. Käsitteiden oppimista luonnollisen kielen selityksistä tarkastelemme sekä muutamia merkittyjä esimerkkejä käsitteestä. Esimerkiksi tietojenkalastelusähköpostin käsitettä opetellessa voidaan sanoa, että tämä on tietojenkalastelusähköposti, koska siinä pyydetään pankkitilinumeroasi. Ongelman ratkaiseminen edellyttää sekä avointen luonnonkielilauseiden tulkintaa että itse käsitteen oppimista. Esitämme yhteisen mallin (1) kielentulkkaukselle (semanttinen parsaus) ja (2) käsitteenoppimiselle (luokittelu), joka ei vaadi lauseiden merkitsemistä loogisilla muodoilla. Sen sijaan malli suosii lauseiden diskriminatiivisia tulkintoja datan havaittavissa olevien piirteiden kontekstissa heikkona signaalina jäsentämiselle. Lähestymistapamme tuottaa sähköpostiin liittyvien käsitteiden tietoaineiston avulla kokonaisvaltaisia parannuksia luokituksen suorituskykyyn, ja F1-pisteet paranevat suhteellisesti 30% verrattuna kilpailukykyisiin menetelmiin matalan datan järjestelmässä.', 'jv': "Perusahaan anyar saiki, dadi mbanjuraké kanggo kelas akeh pengguna sampek karo pedogé. Awak dhéwé sawetara perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno ning luwih basa, lan nganggo barang langgar sampek kudu nggawe kudu winih. Sampeyan, ngirim sistem sing nggambar obah email, supoyo iso ngomong: 'iki sampeyan email, dadi sing nyatakake isan sabanjuré. Mbok iso nggawe perbudhakan kuwi nggawe kelas kuwi tindang nglarani luwih apik, lan kelas kuwi nggawe barang. We present a joint model for (1) language In contrast, the model preferences disc section", 'ha': "Lugha na natura yana da wani mataimaki mai yawa ga learning na mutane. Munã ganin mataimako da za'a iya fahimta daga fassarar harshen asiyya, da misãlai kaɗan da aka faɗa. Misali, idan an karanta zato ɗin e-email mai yin fili, ko wani ya yiwu ya ce `wannan banki ne mai yin amfani da kuma don ya tambayi kwamfyutan bangonka.''... Tayyar da wannan mataimaki yana da amfani da su karɓi fassarar magana masu buɗe da aka baka harshen asimi, kuma ya sanar da zato da yake. Tuna gabatar da wani misali na haɗi wa fassarar harshen (1) da fassarar fassarori (parse semantic) da kwamfyutan karanta (tabalin) da ba ta buƙata yin rubutu da tsari masu lokacin. Bayyansa, shirin ya zaɓi fassarar da bakwai masu yin inganci cikin muhalli na tsari na data kamar wata salo mai rauni wa parse. Ga wani tsari na zaɓen idãnun email-da-husu, hanyoyinmu yana fitar da improvements kodi cikin mafarin-daraja, kuma yana da mafarinta ga muhimmanci 30% na F1 koyi over hanyoyin yin competiti a cikin mutane na ƙaranci.", 'sk': "Naravni jezik je prevladujoč medij za večino človeškega učenja in pedagogike. Obravnavamo problem učenja koncepta iz razlag naravnega jezika in majhnega števila označenih primerov koncepta. Pri spoznavanju koncepta e-pošte z lažnim predstavljanjem lahko na primer rečemo ‚to je e-poštno sporočilo z lažnim predstavljanjem, ker zahteva številko vašega bančnega računa'. Reševanje tega problema vključuje tako učenje interpretiranja odprtih izjav naravnega jezika kot učenje samega koncepta. Predstavljamo skupni model za (1) jezikovno interpretacijo (semantično razčlenitev) in (2) učenje koncepta (klasifikacija), ki ne zahteva označevanja izjav z logičnimi oblikami. Namesto tega model raje diskriminativno interpretacijo izjav v kontekstu opaznih značilnosti podatkov kot šibkega signala za razčlenitev. Na podlagi podatkovnega nabora konceptov, povezanih z e-pošto, naš pristop prinaša splošno izboljšanje uspešnosti klasifikacije s 30-odstotnim relativnim izboljšanjem rezultata F1 v primerjavi s konkurenčnimi metodami v režimu nizkih podatkov.", 'he': 'שפה טבעית מייצרת מדיום שליטי עבור רבה מהלימוד האנושי והpedagoגיה. אנו שוקלים את הבעיה של הלימודים של מושג מההסברים הטבעיים לשפה, ומספר קטן של דוגמאות מסוימות של המושג. לדוגמה, בללמד את הרעיון של דואר אלקטרוני פישינג, אפשר לומר "זה דואר אלקטרוני פישינג כי הוא מבקש את מספר חשבון הבנק שלך". Solving this problem involves both learning to interpret open ended natural language statements, and learning the concept itself.  אנחנו מציגים מודל משותף עבור (1) פרשנות שפה (מעבדה סמנטית) ו (2) לימוד מושג (קליזציה) שלא דורש הצהרות תלוויות עם צורות הגיוניות. במקום זאת, הדוגמא מעדיפה פירוש דיסקרטיבי של הצהרות בתוך הקשר של תכונות נצפים של הנתונים כאות חלש לאבחן. על קבוצת נתונים של הרעיונות הקשורות לאימייל, הגישה שלנו מובילה שיפורים ברחבי המערכת ביצועי מסווג, עם שיפור יחסי של 30% בתוצאות F1 מעל שיטות תחרותיות במערכת נתונים נמוכות.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་མི་ཤེས་བསླབ་དང་སྦྲེལ་ཤིང་ཁག་ཆེ་བའི་གྲངས་ཤིང་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚོད་དེ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། དཔེར་ན། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གློག་འཕྲིན་ལྟ་བུའི་གསལ་བཤད་འདི་བསླབ་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཕན་ཚེར་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ལས་ "འདི་ནི་ཕྱོགས་ཡག་འཕྲིན་ཡིན་ དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་མོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་དེ་ནི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚབ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བསྒྲགས་ནི་དང་ལྟ་ཀ We present a joint model for (1) language interpretation (semantic parsing) and (2) concept learning (classification) that does not require labeling statements with logical forms. Instead, the model prefers discriminative interpretations of statements in context of observable features of the data as a weak signal for parsing. Email related concepts'}
{'en': 'Grasping the Finer Point : A Supervised Similarity Network for Metaphor Detection', 'ar': 'استيعاب النقطة الدقيقة: شبكة تشابه خاضعة للإشراف للكشف عن الاستعارة', 'fr': 'Grasping the Finer Point\xa0: un réseau de similarité supervisé pour la détection de métaphore', 'es': 'Captando el punto más fino: una red de similitud supervisada para la detección de metáforas', 'pt': 'Agarrando o Ponto Mais Fino: Uma Rede de Similaridade Supervisionada para Detecção de Metáforas', 'zh': '守更精微之要,以隐喻检之监相似性网络', 'hi': 'बेहतर बिंदु को समझना: रूपक का पता लगाने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित समानता नेटवर्क', 'ja': 'より細かい点の把握：メタファー検出のための監視された類似性ネットワーク', 'ru': 'Понимание более тонкой точки: контролируемая сеть сходства для обнаружения метафоры', 'ga': 'An Pointe Níos Míne a Thapú: Líonra Cosúlachta Maoirsithe chun Meafar a Bhrath', 'ka': 'საჭირო წერტილის გადატანა: მეტაფორის განვიხოვრებისთვის დანახვა სწორეობის ქსელი', 'hu': 'A finomabb pont megragadása: felügyelt hasonlósági hálózat a metafór felismeréséhez', 'el': 'Πιάνοντας το καλύτερο σημείο: Ένα εποπτευμένο δίκτυο ομοιότητας για την ανίχνευση μεταφορών', 'kk': 'Іздеу нүктесі: Metaphor анықтау үшін бақылаған ұқсас желі', 'it': 'Afferrare il punto più fine: una rete di somiglianza supervisionata per il rilevamento della metafora', 'lt': 'Surinkimo taško gręžimas: stebimas panašumo tinklas metaforų aptikimui', 'mk': 'Запишување на најдобрата точка: надгледувана мрежа на сличност за детекција на метафори', 'ml': 'Finer Point Grasping: A Supervised Similarity Network for Metaphor Detection', 'mt': 'Il-ġbir tal-Punt tas-Sejba: Netwerk ta’ Similarità Sorveljat għad-Detezzjoni tal-Metafori', 'mn': 'Finer Point Grasping: A Supervised Similarity Network for Metaphor Detection', 'ms': 'Menambah Titik Terakhir: Rangkaian Keadaan Diperhatikan untuk Pengesanan Metafora', 'no': 'Teiknar Fintpunktet: Ein overvåka tilsvarande nettverk for metaforoppdaging', 'pl': 'Uchwytanie lepszego punktu: nadzorowana sieć podobieństwa do wykrywania metaforów', 'ro': 'Prinderea punctului mai fin: o rețea de similaritate supravegheată pentru detectarea metaforelor', 'sr': 'Uzimanje Finer Point: nadzorna mreža sličnosti za detekciju metafora', 'si': 'හොයාගන්න පින්තූර: මෙටාෆෝර් හොයාගන්න සඳහා බලන්න පුළුවන් වගේ ජාලය', 'so': 'Qaabashada barta Finer: A Supered Similarity Network for Detection Metaphor', 'sv': 'Ta tag i den finare punkten: Ett övervakat nätverk för att upptäcka metaforer', 'ta': 'காட்சி புள்ளியை வரைதல்: மெட்போர் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஒரே போன்ற பிணையத்தின் பிணையம்', 'ur': 'فائنر پوینٹ کو گھسیٹ کر رہا ہے: Metaphor Detection کے لئے ایک نظارت والی شباهت نیٹورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bắt lấy điểm tìm thấy: mạng lưới tương đồng giám sát để phát hiện siêu hình', 'bg': 'Схващане на по-фината точка: контролирана мрежа за сходство за откриване на метафори', 'nl': 'Het fijnere punt grijpen: een gecontroleerd gelijkenisnetwerk voor metaforetectie', 'id': 'Menangkap titik Finer: Jaringan Similaritas DiSupervisi untuk Deteksi Metafora', 'hr': 'Uzimanje točke Finer: Mreža nadzorne sličnosti za otkrivanje metafora', 'da': 'Grib det finere punkt: Et overvåget lighedsnetværk til Metaphor Detection', 'ko': '세부 사항 잡기: 은유 검출에 사용되는 감독 유사 네트워크', 'de': 'Den feineren Punkt erfassen: Ein überwachtes Ähnlichkeitsnetzwerk zur Metaphernerkennung', 'tr': 'Yükselme noktası:Metaphor Detection için gözetlenmiş bir benzeri ağ', 'sw': 'Akizunguza Point ya Finer: Mtandao wa Kifananifu wa Kuchunguza Mtandao', 'af': "Skrap die Finer Punt: ' n Besigtige Ligtigheidnetwerk vir Metafordeteksie", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Duke grabitur pikën Finer: Një rrjet i ngjashëm mbikqyrur për zbulimin e metaforave', 'az': 'Finer Nöqtəsini Grasping: Metaphor Detection üçün Supervised Similarity Network', 'bn': 'ফিনার পয়েন্ট গ্রাপিং: মেটাফোর ডিটেক্টরের জন্য একটি সাধারণত নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Uzimanje točke Finer: Mreža nadzorne sličnosti za otkrivanje metafora', 'fa': 'برداشتن نقطه Finer: یک شبکه شبیه\u200cسازی تحت نظر برای شناسایی متاپور', 'ca': 'Graving the Finer Point: Una xarxa de similaritat supervisada per la detecció de metàfores', 'cs': 'Chápání jemnějšího bodu: Dohlížená podobnostní síť pro detekci metaforem', 'et': 'Parema punkti haaramine: jälgitav sarnasuse võrgustik metafoori tuvastamiseks', 'hy': 'Գրագրում է գտնվող կետը. մետաֆորի հայտնաբերման նման ցանց', 'fi': 'Tarkempi piste: Valvottu samankaltaisuusverkosto metaforin havaitsemiseen', 'jv': 'Ngubah Finer Point: Njupuk Similrity Network nggo metaphor detection', 'sk': 'Dojemanje finejše točke: nadzorovano omrežje podobnosti za zaznavanje metafore', 'he': 'קלטת נקודת האמצע: רשת דומה משגיחה לגילוי מטאפורות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'མཛུབ་ཀྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ། ཕྱིར་མཐོང་དང་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'The ubiquity of metaphor in our everyday communication makes it an important problem for natural language understanding. Yet, the majority of metaphor processing systems to date rely on hand-engineered features and there is still no consensus in the field as to which features are optimal for this task. In this paper, we present the first deep learning architecture designed to capture metaphorical composition. Our results demonstrate that it outperforms the existing approaches in the metaphor identification task.', 'ar': 'إن انتشار الاستعارة في كل مكان في اتصالاتنا اليومية يجعلها مشكلة مهمة لفهم اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، تعتمد غالبية أنظمة معالجة الاستعارة حتى الآن على الميزات المصممة يدويًا ولا يوجد حتى الآن إجماع في هذا المجال على الميزات المثلى لهذه المهمة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم أول بنية التعلم العميق المصممة لالتقاط التركيب المجازي. تظهر نتائجنا أنها تتفوق على الأساليب الحالية في مهمة تحديد الاستعارة.', 'es': 'La ubicuidad de la metáfora en nuestra comunicación diaria la convierte en un problema importante para la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los sistemas de procesamiento de metáforas hasta la fecha se basan en funciones diseñadas a mano y todavía no hay consenso en el campo sobre qué características son óptimas para esta tarea. En este artículo, presentamos la primera arquitectura de aprendizaje profundo diseñada para capturar la composición metafórica. Nuestros resultados demuestran que supera a los enfoques existentes en la tarea de identificación de metáforas.', 'pt': 'A onipresença da metáfora em nossa comunicação cotidiana a torna um problema importante para a compreensão da linguagem natural. No entanto, a maioria dos sistemas de processamento de metáforas até hoje dependem de recursos projetados à mão e ainda não há consenso no campo sobre quais recursos são ideais para essa tarefa. Neste artigo, apresentamos a primeira arquitetura de aprendizado profundo projetada para capturar a composição metafórica. Nossos resultados demonstram que ele supera as abordagens existentes na tarefa de identificação de metáforas.', 'fr': "L'omniprésence de la métaphore dans notre communication quotidienne en fait un problème important pour la compréhension du langage naturel. Pourtant, la majorité des systèmes de traitement de métaphore à ce jour reposent sur des caractéristiques conçues à la main et il n'existe toujours pas de consensus sur le terrain quant aux caractéristiques optimales pour cette tâche. Dans cet article, nous présentons la première architecture d'apprentissage profond conçue pour capturer la composition métaphorique. Nos résultats démontrent qu'il surpasse les approches existantes dans la tâche d'identification de métaphore.", 'ja': '私たちの日常コミュニケーションにおけるメタファーの普遍性は、自然言語を理解するための重要な問題となります。しかし、今日までのメタファー処理システムの大部分は、手作業で設計された機能に依存しており、この分野では、どの機能がこのタスクに最適かについてのコンセンサスがまだありません。本稿では、比喩的な構成を取り込むように設計された最初の深層学習アーキテクチャを紹介する。私たちの結果は、メタファー識別タスクにおける既存のアプローチよりも優れていることを示しています。', 'hi': 'हमारे रोजमर्रा के संचार में रूपक की सर्वव्यापकता इसे प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या बनाती है। फिर भी, आज तक अधिकांश रूपक प्रसंस्करण प्रणालियां हाथ से इंजीनियर सुविधाओं पर भरोसा करती हैं और इस क्षेत्र में अभी भी कोई आम सहमति नहीं है कि इस कार्य के लिए कौन सी विशेषताएं इष्टतम हैं। इस पेपर में, हम रूपक संरचना को पकड़ने के लिए डिज़ाइन की गई पहली गहरी सीखने की वास्तुकला प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि यह रूपक पहचान कार्य में मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है।', 'zh': '隐喻在交流,使为自然语言解。 然迄今为止多隐喻统赖于工巧,而功最当之,未达共识。 于本文中,首示捕隐喻深度学架构。 吾之的结果表明,于隐喻知任优于今也。', 'ru': 'Повсеместное распространение метафоры в нашем повседневном общении делает ее важной проблемой для понимания естественного языка. Тем не менее, большинство систем обработки метафор на сегодняшний день полагаются на функции, разработанные вручную, и до сих пор нет консенсуса в этой области относительно того, какие функции являются оптимальными для этой задачи. В этой статье мы представляем первую архитектуру глубокого обучения, предназначенную для захвата метафорической композиции. Наши результаты показывают, что он превосходит существующие подходы в задаче идентификации метафоры.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar uileláithreacht an mheafar inár ngnáthchumarsáid is fadhb thábhachtach í maidir le tuiscint nádúrtha na teanga. Mar sin féin, tá formhór na gcóras próiseála meafar go dtí seo ag brath ar ghnéithe a ndearnadh innealtóireacht láimhe orthu agus níl aon chomhdhearcadh sa réimse go fóill maidir leis na gnéithe is fearr don tasc seo. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair an chéad ailtireacht domhainfhoghlama atá deartha chun comhdhéanamh meafarach a ghabháil. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go sáraíonn sé na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana sa tasc sainaitheanta meafar.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი ყოველდღე კომუნიკაციაში მეტაფორის სამყაროებელობა იქნება ის გასანიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა თავისუფლებისთვის. მაგრამ მეტაფორის პროცესი სისტემების უფრო დიდი მეტაფორის პროცესი, რომელიც ამ დავალებისთვის უფრო მეტაფორის განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციებიდან დარწმუნდება და არ არის კონს ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ პირველი დიდი სწავლების აქტიქტიქტურაცია, რომელსაც მეტაფორიკური კომპოზიციაში დავიწყებთ. ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ევმჲჟრთპაარ, ფვ რჲგა ნვ თჱოპაგთ თჟრთდსგაღთრვ ოპთჟლვეგაŒა ნა მვრატჲპჲგარა თევნტთკაუთ£ნა პაბჲრა.', 'hu': 'A metafora mindennapi kommunikációnkban mindenütt jelen van, fontos problémát jelent a természetes nyelv megértésében. Mégis a metafora feldolgozó rendszerek többsége eddig kézzel tervezett funkciókra támaszkodik, és a területen még mindig nincs konszenzus arról, hogy mely funkciók optimálisak ehhez a feladathoz. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az első olyan mélytanulási architektúrát, amelyet metaforikus kompozíció rögzítésére terveztek. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy felülmúlja a metafora azonosítási feladat meglévő megközelítéseit.', 'el': 'Η πανταχού παρουσία της μεταφοράς στην καθημερινή μας επικοινωνία την καθιστά σημαντικό πρόβλημα για την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, η πλειονότητα των συστημάτων επεξεργασίας μεταφορών μέχρι σήμερα βασίζεται σε χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά και δεν υπάρχει ακόμα συναίνεση στο πεδίο ως προς το ποια χαρακτηριστικά είναι βέλτιστα για αυτό το έργο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη αρχιτεκτονική βαθιάς μάθησης σχεδιασμένη για να αποτυπώσει μεταφορική σύνθεση. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις στην εργασία αναγνώρισης μεταφορικών μέσων.', 'it': "L'ubiquità della metafora nella nostra comunicazione quotidiana la rende un problema importante per la comprensione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei sistemi di elaborazione delle metafore ad oggi si basa su caratteristiche ingegnerizzate a mano e non c'è ancora consenso sul campo su quali caratteristiche sono ottimali per questo compito. In questo articolo presentiamo la prima architettura di deep learning progettata per catturare la composizione metaforica. I nostri risultati dimostrano che supera gli approcci esistenti nel compito di identificazione metaforica.", 'lt': 'Metaforos įvairovė mūsų kasdieniame komunikate daro ją svarbia problema natūraliam kalbų supratimui. Vis dėlto dauguma metaforų apdorojimo sistemų iki šiol priklauso nuo rankiniu būdu sukurtų savybių ir šioje srityje vis dar nėra sutarimo, kokios savybės yra optimalios šiai užduotims atlikti. Šiame dokumente pristatome pirmąją gilaus mokymosi architektūrą, sukurtą metaforinei kompozicijai surinkti. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad jis viršija esamus metodus metaforų identifikavimo užduotyje.', 'kk': 'Әрбір күнделік коммуникациясындағы метафорының көбіндігі табиғи тілді түсінуге маңызды мәселе болады. Бірақ қазіргі метафорлық процессор жүйелерінің көпшілігі қол инженерлік мүмкіндіктеріне тәуелді, және осы тапсырма үшін қай мүмкіндіктерінің оптималы болуы үшін осы өрісте Бұл қағазда бірінші терең оқыту архитектурасын метафориялық құрылғыны түсіру үшін құрылған. Метафордың идентификациялау тапсырмасындағы барлық жағдайларды жасайтынын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Секаде на метафората во нашата секојдневна комуникација го прави важен проблем за природното разбирање на јазикот. Сепак, мнозинството системи за процес на метафори досега се потпираат на рачно инженерирани карактеристики и сé уште нема консензус во областа за тоа кои карактеристики се оптимални за оваа задача. Во овој весник ја претставуваме првата архитектура за длабоко учење дизајнирана за да ја фати метафорската композиција. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека ги надминува постојните пристапи во задачата за идентификација на метафорите.', 'ml': 'നമ്മുടെ എല്ലാ ദിവസവാചകത്തിലുമുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നമാണ് അത് സ്വാഭാഷയുടെ മനസ്സിന് പ്രധാനപ്പ എന്നിട്ടും ഇന്നത്തേക്ക് മിക്കവാറും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും കൈയ്യില്\u200d എഞ്ചിനീയര്\u200d ചെയ്ത വിശേഷങ്ങളെ ആശ്രയ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ ആഴത്തെ ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേഷന്\u200d കാണ നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു അത് നിലവിലുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന്.', 'mt': 'Il-preżenza ta’ metafora fil-komunikazzjoni tagħna ta’ kuljum tagħmel din problema importanti għall-fehim naturali tal-lingwa. Madankollu, il-maġġoranza tas-sistemi tal-ipproċessar tal-metafori s’issa jiddependu fuq karatteristiċi in ġinerizzati bl-idejn u għad m’hemm l-ebda kunsens fil-qasam dwar liema karatteristiċi huma ottimali għal dan il-kompitu. F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw l-ewwel arkitettura ta’ tagħlim profond iddisinjata biex tinqabad il-kompożizzjoni metaforika. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li dan jaqbeż l-approċċi eżistenti fil-kompitu ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-metafora.', 'mn': 'Бидний өдөр тутмын харилцааны метафорын хаана ч байдал нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд чухал асуудал болгодог. Гэхдээ одоогийн ихэнх метафор процесс системүүд гар инженерчлэлийн чадварыг хамгаалдаг. Энэ үйл ажилд ямар чадваруудыг эерэг үзүүлэхэд хүрэхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид анхны гүн гүнзгий суралцах архитектурыг метафорик зохиолыг авах зориулагдсан. Бидний үр дүн нь метафорын тодорхойлолтын үйл ажилд байгаа ойлголтыг үр дүнтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan metafora dalam komunikasi kita setiap hari menjadikannya masalah penting untuk pemahaman bahasa alam. Namun, kebanyakan sistem pemprosesan metafora hingga kini bergantung pada ciri-ciri rekayasa tangan dan masih tiada konsensus dalam medan mana ciri-ciri yang optimal untuk tugas ini. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan arkitektur pembelajaran mendalam pertama yang direka untuk menangkap komposisi metaforik. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa ia melebihi pendekatan yang ada dalam tugas pengenalan metafora.', 'ro': 'ubiquitatea metaforei în comunicarea noastră de zi cu zi o face o problemă importantă pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea sistemelor de prelucrare a metaforelor de până în prezent se bazează pe caracteristici proiectate manual și încă nu există nici un consens în domeniu cu privire la caracteristicile optime pentru această sarcină. În această lucrare, prezentăm prima arhitectură de învățare profundă concepută pentru a surprinde compoziția metaforică. Rezultatele noastre demonstrează că depășește abordările existente în sarcina de identificare a metaforelor.', 'no': 'Den gjennomsnittet av metaforen i vårt kvardag kommunikasjon gjer det ein viktig problem for naturspråk forståking. Men dei fleste metaforhandlingssystemene til dag er avhengig på handingeniverte funksjonar, og det finst framleis ingen konsensus i feltet om kva funksjonar er optimal for denne oppgåva. I denne papiret presenterer vi den første dyppa læringsarkitekturen som er lagt for å henta metaforiske komponent. Resultatet våra viser at det utfører dei eksisterande tilnærmingane i metaforidentifikasjonsprogrammet.', 'pl': 'Wszechobecność metafory w naszej codziennej komunikacji sprawia, że jest ona ważnym problemem dla zrozumienia języka naturalnego. Jednak do tej pory większość systemów przetwarzania metafor opiera się na ręcznie projektowanych funkcjach i nadal nie ma konsensusu co do tego, które funkcje są optymalne do tego zadania. W artykule przedstawiamy pierwszą architekturę głębokiego uczenia zaprojektowaną w celu uchwycenia metaforycznej kompozycji. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że przewyższa istniejące podejścia w zadaniu identyfikacji metafory.', 'so': 'Dhaqbalka qaabilaadda ee warqadeena maalin walba waxay ka dhigataa dhibaato muhiim ah waxyaabaha garashada afka dabiicadda ah. Yet, the majority of metaphor processing systems to date rely on hand-engineered features and there is still no consensus in the field as to which features are optimal for this task.  Qoraalkan waxaynu keenaynaa dhismaha waxbarashada ee ugu horeeyay ee loo qoray inay qabsato sawir u eg. Abaalkayaga waxay caddaysaa in ay ka muuqato qaababka joogta ah oo ku jira shaqada aqoonsiga tababarka.', 'sv': 'Metaforens utbredning i vår dagliga kommunikation gör det till ett viktigt problem för förståelsen av det naturliga språket. Ändå förlitar sig de flesta metaforbearbetningssystem hittills på handgjorda funktioner och det finns fortfarande ingen konsensus på området om vilka funktioner som är optimala för denna uppgift. I denna uppsats presenterar vi den första djupinlärningsarkitekturen utformad för att fånga metaforisk komposition. Våra resultat visar att det överträffar de befintliga tillvägagångssätten i metaforidentifieringsuppgiften.', 'si': 'අපේ හැම දවස් සම්බන්ධයේ මෙටාෆෝර් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඒක ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න වැදගත් ප නමුත්, මෙටාෆෝර් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස් පද්ධතියේ බොහොම අත්තර ඉංජිනියාර් විශේෂතාවට විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ වැඩේ කො මේ පත්තරේ අපි පලවෙනි ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපයක් තියෙන්නේ මෙටාෆෝරික් සංවිධ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ මෙටාෆෝර් පරීක්ෂණ වැඩ', 'sr': 'Svakost metafore u našoj svakodnevnoj komunikaciji čini to važan problem za razumevanje prirodnog jezika. Ipak, većina metaforskih obrađivanjskih sustava do sada oslanja se na ruke-in ženjerne karakteristike i još uvek nema konsenzusa na terenu o kojima su karakteristike optimalne za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvu duboku arhitekturu učenja dizajniranu da uhvatimo metaforsku kompoziciju. Naši rezultati pokazuju da to iznosi postojeće pristupe u zadatku za identifikaciju metafora.', 'ta': 'எங்கள் நாள் தொடர்புகளில் ஒப்புக்கொள்ள முக்கியமான பிரச்சனையை இயற்கையான மொழியை புரிந்து கொள்ளு ஆனாலும், பெரும்பாலான முயற்சி அமைப்புகளில் கையில் பொறிந்த தன்மைகளை நம்புகிறார்கள் மற்றும் புலத்தில் எந்த ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும் இல்லை ஏனெ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முதல் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கட்டுப்பாடுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மெதுவான உருவமைப்பை  முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہمارے روزہ ارتباط میں مٹافور کی جگہ اسے طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے اہم مشکل بناتا ہے۔ لیکن اکثر مٹوفور پرسس سیستموں کی جو تازگی کے لئے ہندی انجینر کی فکرتوں پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں اور اس کھیل میں بھی کوئی کنسوس نہیں ہے کہ اس کام کے لئے کس فکرتوں کا اچھا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی عمیق تعلیم معماری معماری کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو مٹافوریک پیدا کرنے کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے۔ ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مٹافور کی شناسایی کے کام میں موجود طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bizning har kuni aloqalarimizdagi metaphoning eng muhim muammolari bu tabiiy tilni tushunish uchun muhim muammo qiladi. Hozirda, ko'pchilik metaphor boshqaruvchisi tizimi qo'llangan xususiyatlarni ishlatadi va davlatda bunday imkoniyatlar bu vazifa uchun optik. Bu qogʻozda, biz metafocal kompyuterni olib tashlash uchun eng boshqa o'rganish architektorini hozir qilamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz metaphor identification vazifasidagi mavjud murakkablarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Sự tồn tại của phép ẩn dụ trong cuộc giao tiếp hàng ngày của chúng ta biến nó thành vấn đề quan trọng cho sự hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các hệ thống chế biến ẩn cho đến nay dựa trên các tính năng chế tạo bằng tay và vẫn chưa có sự đồng ý trong lĩnh vực nào về khả năng ứng dụng tối ưu cho nhiệm vụ này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu kiến trúc sâu học đầu tiên được thiết kế để ghi hình tác phẩm trừu tượng. Những kết quả của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng nó hoàn thiện các phương pháp tồn tại trong nhiệm vụ nhận dạng ẩn dụ.', 'hr': 'Svakost metafore u našoj svakodnevnoj komunikaciji čini to važan problem za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. Međutim, većina sustava obrade metafora do sada oslanja se na ruke-in ženjerne funkcije i još uvijek nema konsenzusa na terenu o kojima su funkcije optimalne za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvu duboku arhitekturu učenja dizajniranu da uhvati metaforski sastav. Naši rezultati pokazuju da iznosi postojeće pristupe u zadatku za identifikaciju metafora.', 'bg': 'Разпространението на метафорите в ежедневната ни комуникация я прави важен проблем за разбирането на естествения език. Въпреки това, по-голямата част от метафорните системи за обработка до днешна дата разчитат на ръчно проектирани функции и все още няма консенсус в областта кои функции са оптимални за тази задача. В тази статия представяме първата архитектура за дълбоко учене, предназначена да улови метафорична композиция. Нашите резултати показват, че тя надминава съществуващите подходи в задачата за идентифициране на метафорите.', 'nl': 'De alomtegenwoordigheid van metafoor in onze dagelijkse communicatie maakt het een belangrijk probleem voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. Toch is de meerderheid van metaforverwerkingssystemen tot nu toe afhankelijk van hand-engineered functies en er is nog steeds geen consensus in het veld over welke functies optimaal zijn voor deze taak. In dit artikel presenteren we de eerste deep learning architectuur ontworpen om metaforische compositie vast te leggen. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het de bestaande benaderingen in de metafoor identificatie taak overtreft.', 'de': 'Die Allgegenwärtigkeit der Metapher in unserer täglichen Kommunikation macht sie zu einem wichtigen Problem für das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. Die meisten Metaphernverarbeitungssysteme basieren bisher jedoch auf handgefertigten Features und es gibt noch keinen Konsens darüber, welche Features für diese Aufgabe optimal sind. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die erste Deep Learning Architektur vor, die metaphorische Komposition erfassen soll. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass es die bisherigen Ansätze in der Metaphern-Identifikation übertrifft.', 'ko': '은유는 일상 교제에서 보편적으로 존재하기 때문에 자연 언어 이해의 중요한 문제가 된다.그러나 지금까지 대부분의 은유 처리 시스템은 수공 디자인의 기능에 의존해 왔고 어떤 기능이 이 임무에 가장 적합한지에 대해 이 분야는 여전히 공감대가 없다.본고에서 우리는 첫 번째 깊이 있는 학습 구조를 제시했는데 은유 성분을 포착하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 은유 식별 임무에서 기존의 방법보다 우수한 모습을 보였다.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan metafora dalam komunikasi harian kita membuat masalah penting untuk pemahaman bahasa alam. Namun, kebanyakan sistem memproses metafora hingga saat ini bergantung pada ciri-ciri rekayasa tangan dan masih tidak ada konsensus dalam bidang tentang ciri-ciri yang optimal untuk tugas ini. In this paper, we present the first deep learning architecture designed to capture metaphorical composition.  Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa hal itu lebih dari pendekatan yang ada dalam tugas identifikasi metafora.', 'sw': 'Usubiri wa mawasiliano yetu ya kila siku inafanya kuwa tatizo muhimu kwa kuelewa lugha ya asili. Hata hivyo, mifumo mingi ya upasuaji wa ubunifu mpaka sasa wanategemea vipengele vilivyoundwa na mikononi na bado hakuna makubaliano katika uwanja na vipi vipi vipi vipi vizuri kwa kazi hii. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka majengo ya kwanza ya kwanza ya kujifunza ya kina yenye lengo la kutengeneza ujenzi wa mitazamo. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa inaonyesha mbinu zilizopo katika kazi ya utambulisho wa mitandao.', 'fa': 'همه جا در ارتباط روزانی ما مشکل مهم برای درک زبان طبیعی است. ولی بیشتر سیستم\u200cهای پرداخت مثبت تا حالا بر ویژه\u200cهای دستی مهندسی بستگی دارند و هنوز در این میدان هیچ کنسونسی وجود ندارد که ویژه\u200cها برای این کار optimal هستند. در این کاغذ، ما اولین معماری عمیق یادگیری را نشان می دهیم که طراحی شده برای گرفتن ترکیب متعفری است. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که آن از طریق\u200cهای موجود در وظیفه شناسایی متعفری بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'da': 'Metaforens allestedsnærværelse i vores daglige kommunikation gør det til et vigtigt problem for forståelsen af det naturlige sprog. Alligevel er de fleste metaforbehandlingssystemer hidtil afhængige af håndkonstruerede funktioner, og der er stadig ingen konsensus på området om, hvilke funktioner der er optimale til denne opgave. I denne artikel præsenterer vi den første deep learning arkitektur designet til at fange metaforisk komposition. Vores resultater viser, at det overgår de eksisterende tilgange i metaforidentifikationsopgaven.', 'sq': 'Gjithmonë metafora në komunikimin tonë të përditshëm e bën një problem të rëndësishëm për kuptimin natyror të gjuhës. Megjithatë, shumica e sistemeve të përdorimit të metaforave deri tani mbështeten në karakteristika të inxhinieruara me dorë dhe ende nuk ka konsensus në fushë se cilat karakteristika janë optimale për këtë detyrë. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim arkitekturën e parë të mësimit të thellë të dizajnuar për të kapur kompozicionin metaforik. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se ajo ekziston më tepër se metodat ekzistuese në detyrën e identifikimit të metaforës.', 'am': 'የዘወትር ግንኙነታችን የፍጥረተ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል የሚያስፈልጋት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ ብዙዎቹ የተመሳሳይ የሥርዓት ምርጫዎች በእጁ-engineered features ላይ ይታመናሉ፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የመጀመሪያውን የጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት መሠረት እናቀርባታለን፡፡ Our results demonstrate that it outperforms the existing approaches in the metaphor identification task.', 'af': "Die omheerlikheid van metafore in ons elke dagkommunikasie maak dit 'n belangrike probleem vir natuurlike taal verstanding. Maar die meeste van metaforverwerking stelsels tot datum vertrou op hand-in ženiere funksies en daar is nog nog geen konsensus in die veld waarvan die funksies optimal is vir hierdie taak nie. In hierdie papier het ons die eerste diep leer arkitektuur voorgestel om metaforiese opstelling te vang. Ons resultate wys dat dit die bestaande toegang uitvoer in die metaforidentifikasie taak.", 'hy': 'Մեր առօրյա հաղորդակցման մեջ փոխաբերության տարածությունը դարձնում է այն կարևոր խնդիր բնական լեզվի հասկանալու համար: Սակայն մինչ օրս մետաֆորային վերամշակման համակարգերի մեծամասնությունը կախված է ձեռքի ճարտարագիտական հատկանիշներից և դեռևս չկա համաձայնություն այն ոլորտում, թե որպիսի հատկանիշներ լավագույն են այս խնդրի համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք առաջին խորը ուսումնասիրության ճարտարապետությունը, որը ստեղծվել է փոխաբերական բաղադրությունը նկարելու համար: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այն գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները փոխաբերական հայտնաբերման խնդրում:', 'tr': 'Her gün komunikaciýamyzdaki metaforyň ýerleşligi tebigy dil düşünmesi üçin wajyp mesele edip bilýär. Ýöne şu wagtlar metafora işleýän sistemalaryň köp bölegi el in ženýöredilen özelliklerine ynanýar we bu işiň üçin hiç hili ylalaşyk ýok. Bu kagyzda, metaforik composiziony almak üçin ilkinji gaty öwrenme arhitekturyny görkezýäris. Biziň netijelerimiz metaforyň kimligi täblisinde bar ýagdaýlarynyň netijesini çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'az': 'Günlük iletişimətimizdə metaforların hər tərəfində olması təbiətli dil anlaşılması üçün mühüm problemi olur. Halbuki, metaforlar işləmə sistemlərinin çoxu əl in ženjerliyi tərzlərinə təvəkkül edir və bu işlər üçün hansı tərzlərin optimal olduğu barədə belə bir konsensu yoxdur. Bu kağızda, metaforik kompozisyonu almaq üçün hazırlanmış ilk dərin öyrənmə arhitektarını göstəririk. Bizim sonuçlarımız metaforlar tanıdırması işində olan müəyyən edilənlərdən üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'bs': 'Svakost metafore u našoj svakodnevnoj komunikaciji čini to važan problem za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. Ipak, većina metaforskih sustava obrade do sada oslanja se na ruke-in ženjerne karakteristike i još uvijek nema konsenzusa na terenu o kojima su karakteristike optimalne za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prvu duboku arhitekturu učenja dizajniranu da uhvati metaforsku kompoziciju. Naši rezultati pokazuju da iznosi postojeće pristupe u zadatku za identifikaciju metafora.', 'ca': "La ubicació de la metàfora en la nostra comunicació cotidiana ho fa un problema important per a la comprensió natural del llenguatge. Tot i així, la majoria dels sistemes de processament de metàfores fins ara depenen de característiques manuals i encara no hi ha consens en el camp sobre quines característiques són optimals per aquesta tasca. En aquest article presentem la primera arquitectura d'aprenentatge profund dissenyada per capturar la composició metàforica. Els nostres resultats demostren que supera els enfocaments existents en la tasca d'identificació de metàfores.", 'cs': 'Všudypřítomnost metafory v naší každodenní komunikaci z ní činí důležitý problém pro porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Přesto většina systémů zpracování metaforem dosud spoléhá na ručně navržené funkce a stále neexistuje shoda v oboru, které funkce jsou pro tento úkol optimální. V tomto článku představujeme první architekturu hlubokého učení navrženou pro zachycení metaforické kompozice. Naše výsledky ukazují, že překonává stávající přístupy v oblasti identifikace metafory.', 'et': 'Metafoori levik meie igapäevases suhtluses muudab selle oluliseks probleemiks loodusliku keele mõistmiseks. Enamik metafooride töötlemise süsteeme siiani tugineb käsitsi projekteeritud funktsioonidele ja selles valdkonnas ei ole endiselt üksmeelt, millised funktsioonid on selle ülesande jaoks optimaalsed. Käesolevas töös tutvustame esimest sügavõppe arhitektuuri, mille eesmärk on jäädvustada metafooriline kompositsioon. Meie tulemused näitavad, et see ületab olemasolevaid lähenemisviise metafoori identifitseerimise ülesandes.', 'fi': 'Metaforan levinneisyys jokapäiväisessä viestinnässämme tekee siitä tärkeän ongelman luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämiselle. Kuitenkin suurin osa metaforien käsittelyjärjestelmistä tähän mennessä perustuu käsintehtyihin ominaisuuksiin, eikä alalla ole vieläkään yksimielisyyttä siitä, mitkä ominaisuudet ovat optimaalisia tähän tehtävään. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme ensimmäisen syväoppimisen arkkitehtuurin, joka on suunniteltu kuvaamaan metaforista sommittelua. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että se suoriutuu paremmin kuin metaforien tunnistamisessa jo olemassa olevat lähestymistavat.', 'bn': 'আমাদের প্রতিদিনের যোগাযোগের মধ্যে মেটাফোরের নৈতিকতা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বুঝার জন্য এক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তবে এখন পর্যন্ত বেশীরভাগ মেটাফার প্রক্রিয়ার সিস্টেম হাত-ইঞ্জিনিয়ার বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভর করে এবং ক্ষেত্রে এখনো কোন সমর্থন নেই যেহেতু এই এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথম গভীর গভীর শিক্ষার কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করছি যা মেটোফিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্য ধরার জন্য গভীর। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এটা মেটাফার পরিচিতির কাজে বিদ্যমান ক্ষমতা প্রদর্শন করে।', 'jv': 'Ubahan kanggo metaphor kanggo komunikasi ning awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe perbudhakan kanggo langgar sing apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nanging pempet iki, awak dhéwé iso nggawe akeh barêng-barêng sing luwih dumaten kanggo ngerasakno basa metaphoriki. Rejalaké dhéwé nambah ngomong nik nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno metaphor', 'he': 'כל מקום של מטאפורה בתקשורת יומית שלנו הופך אותה לבעיה חשובה להבנה טבעית של שפה. עם זאת, רוב מערכות מעבדת מטאפורות עד כה תלויות על תכונות הנדסה ידנית ועדיין אין קונסנסנס בשטח לגבי איזה תכונות הם אופטימיים למשימה הזאת. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים את הארכיטקטורה הראשונה של הלימודים העמוקים שנועצבה כדי לתפוס ריכוב מטאפורי. התוצאות שלנו מראות שהיא מעלית את הגישות הקיומות בתפקיד זיהוי המטאפורה.', 'ha': "The ubiquity of metaphor in our everyday communication makes it an important problem for natural language understanding.  Babu da haka, mafi yawanci na tsarin aiki na metafor zuwa yanzu, yana dõgara kan wasu mistakardar da aka samar da hannayen na-inganci kuma ba za'a iya yarda da yardarwa a birnin da ke da masu amfani da wannan aikin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da na farkon matsayin da aka sanar da shi na farko na ƙari da aka yi wa ɗauki samun mutafari. MatamayinMu sun nuna cewa ita ke samar da hanyõyin da ke cikin aikin bayani na misãlai.", 'sk': 'Zaradi vseprisotnosti metafore v naši vsakdanji komunikaciji je pomemben problem za razumevanje naravnega jezika. Vendar pa se večina metafornih sistemov do danes zanaša na ročno izdelane funkcije in na tem področju še vedno ni soglasja o tem, katere funkcije so optimalne za to nalogo. V prispevku predstavljamo prvo arhitekturo globokega učenja, namenjeno zajemanju metaforične kompozicije. Naši rezultati kažejo, da presega obstoječe pristope v nalogi identifikacije metafore.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་རྟག་པར་དུ་ཆ་མཚུངས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིས་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཆ་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། ད་ནའང་དུས་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཆེར་ལས་སྦྱོར་རིམ་གྱི་ཆ་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་ནི་ལག་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱིས་བྱ་སྤྱོད་འདི་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཟབ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་བཟོ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དང་པོ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བ་དག་གིས་གནས་ཡུལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Identifying civilians killed by police with distantly supervised entity-event extraction', 'ar': 'التعرف على المدنيين الذين قتلتهم الشرطة مع استخراج الكيان-الحدث تحت إشراف بعيد', 'es': 'Identificación de civiles muertos por la policía con extracción de entidad-evento supervisada a distancia', 'pt': 'Identificando civis mortos pela polícia com extração de entidade-evento supervisionada à distância', 'fr': "Identification des civils tués par la police grâce à une extraction d'entité surveillée à distance", 'ja': '遠隔監視された実体抽出で警察に殺害された民間人を特定する', 'zh': '取远程监之实以识警察杀之民', 'hi': 'दूर से पर्यवेक्षित इकाई-घटना निष्कर्षण के साथ पुलिस द्वारा मारे गए नागरिकों की पहचान करना', 'ru': 'Идентификация гражданских лиц, убитых полицией при дистанционном наблюдении за деятельностью организации', 'ga': 'Sibhialtaigh a mharaigh na póilíní a aithint le hastarraingt aonáin-imeacht atá faoi mhaoirseacht i bhfad i gcéin', 'ka': 'იდენტიფიკაცია სიცილიალური პოლიციაში, რომელიც გადაკვირდება განსხვავებული ინტერტიკური განსხვავება', 'hu': 'A rendőrség által megölt civilek azonosítása távolról felügyelt entitás-esemény kivonásával', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός αμάχων που σκοτώθηκαν από την αστυνομία με απομακρυσμένη επιτήρηση συμβάντος οντότητας', 'kk': 'Оқиғаларды қашықтан қарау үшін полицияның өлтіруін анықтау', 'it': 'Identificare i civili uccisi dalla polizia con estrazione entità-evento sorvegliata a distanza', 'mk': 'Идентификување на цивили убиени од страна на полицијата со далечно надгледувана екстракција на ентитет-настан', 'lt': 'Policijos nužudytų civilių asmenų identifikavimas vykdant toli prižiūrimą subjekto ir įvykio gavimą', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti warga awam yang dibunuh oleh polis dengan pengekstrakan entiti-peristiwa yang diawasi jauh', 'mn': 'Цэргийн иргэншлийн хүмүүсийг холын харилцааны удирдлагатай байгууллагуудыг', 'ml': 'പോലീസുകാരെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പോലീസുകാരുടെ കൊല്ലപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്നാണ്.', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ ċivili maqtula mill-pulizija b’estrazzjoni mill-bogħod sorveljata bejn entità u avveniment', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av siviliane som er drept av politikk med ekstraksjon av avstanden oversikt av entitetshendingar', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja cywilów zabitych przez policję z odległym nadzorem wydobycia zdarzeń', 'ro': 'Identificarea civililor uciși de poliție cu extragerea entității-eveniment supravegheată la distanță', 'sr': 'Identifikovanje civila ubijenih od strane policije sa izvlačenjem područja nad nadzorom', 'si': 'පොලිසියානුවෙන් මැරුණු පොලිසියානුවෙන් පොලිසියානුවෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ.', 'sv': 'Identifiering av civila dödade av polisen med avlägset övervakad entitet-händelse utvinning', 'ta': 'போலீஸ் கொல்லப்பட்ட மக்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருள் நிகழ்வு வெளியேற்றப்பட்டு', 'ur': 'پولیس کے ذریعے مصنوعی لوگوں کو پہچان لیا گیا ہے جو دور کی نظارت کے ذریعے موجود ہیں', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada muwaadiniinta booliska lagu dilay oo aad u ilaaliya soo saaridda dhaqaalaha', 'uz': "Polish qo'llanmalarini o'rganishni tasdiqlash", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng thường dân bị cảnh sát sát giết bằng cách rời xa thực thể.', 'da': 'Identificering af civile dræbt af politiet med fjernt overvåget enhedshændelse', 'hr': 'Identifikacija civila ubijenih od strane policije sa izvlačenjem daljnje nadziranih entitetskih događaja', 'nl': 'Identificeren van burgers gedood door politie met afstandelijk begeleide entiteiten-gebeurtenis extractie', 'de': 'Identifizierung von Zivilisten, die von der Polizei getötet wurden, mit fernüberwachter Entitätenereignis-Extraktion', 'id': 'Identifikasi warga sipil yang dibunuh oleh polisi dengan ekstraksi entity-peristiwa yang diawasi jauh', 'fa': 'شناسایی افرادی که توسط پلیس کشته شدند با استخراج اتفاقات تحت نظر دور', 'ko': '원격 감시를 통해 실체 사건을 추출하여 경찰에 의해 살해된 민간인을 식별하다', 'sw': 'Kutambua raia waliouawa na polisi kwa kuchukuliwa kwa matukio yanayofuatiliwa sana', 'tr': 'Polisiýa tarapyndan öldürilen ýagdaýlary tanyşdyrmak üçin', 'af': 'Geidentifiseer siviliewe wat deur polisie gedood is met afgeleë onderwerp van entiteite-gebeurtenis', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i civilëve të vrarë nga policia me nxjerrjen e njësisë dhe ngjarjeve të mbikqyrura larg', 'am': 'በፖሊስ የተገደሉትን ዜጎች በብርቱ ላይ የተጠበቀው አካል አውጥቷል፡፡', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на цивилни, убити от полицията с дистанционно наблюдение', 'hy': 'Պոստիկանության կողմից սպանված քաղաքացիների հայտնաբերումը հեռավոր վերահսկվող առանձնահատվածների և իրադարձությունների վերացման միջոցով', 'az': 'Polisin öldürülmüş siviləri təşkil edirlər', 'bs': 'Identifikacija civila ubijenih od strane policije sa izvlačenjem daljnje nadziranih entitetskih događaja', 'bn': 'পুলিশের নিহত সাধারণ নাগরিকদের চিহ্নিত করে দেখা যাচ্ছে বিভিন্ন প্রতিষ্ঠান-অনুষ্ঠানের দ্বারা', 'cs': 'Identifikace civilistů zabitých policií s odstraněním událostí subjektů na dálku', 'et': 'Politsei poolt kaugjärelevalve all olevate üksuste väljavõtmisel tapetud tsiviilisikute tuvastamine', 'fi': 'Poliisin tappamien siviilien tunnistaminen etävalvonnassa', 'ca': 'Identificar civils morts per la policia amb extracció remota supervisada', 'jv': 'Ojih-jeja sing paling-pernik nik diponsak pulisi sing wis nguasai kapan nguasai podho', 'he': 'זיהוי אזרחים נהרגים על ידי המשטרה עם חיטוף של אירוע-ישות שמשגיח מרחוק', 'sk': 'Identifikacija civilistov, ki jih je ubila policija z oddaljenim nadzorom subjekta.', 'ha': 'Ina gane civilian da aka kashe su daga police da cire-haramtar-inci', 'bo': 'དབུལ་སྡུད་དམིགས་བསལ་བའི་མི་སྡོད་རྣམས་ལས་བརྟན་དཔྱད་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་མི་མང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་བཞག་པ'}
{'en': 'We propose a new, socially-impactful task for natural language processing : from a news corpus, extract names of persons who have been killed by police. We present a newly collected police fatality corpus, which we release publicly, and present a model to solve this problem that uses EM-based distant supervision with logistic regression and convolutional neural network classifiers. Our model outperforms two off-the-shelf event extractor systems, and it can suggest candidate victim names in some cases faster than one of the major manually-collected police fatality databases.', 'ar': 'نقترح مهمة جديدة ذات تأثير اجتماعي لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية: من مجموعة الأخبار ، استخراج أسماء الأشخاص الذين قتلوا على أيدي الشرطة. نقدم مجموعة الوفيات التي تم جمعها حديثًا للشرطة ، والتي نصدرها للجمهور ، ونقدم نموذجًا لحل هذه المشكلة يستخدم إشرافًا بعيدًا قائمًا على EM مع الانحدار اللوجستي ومصنفات الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية. يتفوق نموذجنا على اثنين من أنظمة استخراج الأحداث الجاهزة ، ويمكن أن يقترح أسماء الضحايا المرشحين في بعض الحالات بشكل أسرع من إحدى قواعد بيانات الوفيات الرئيسية للشرطة والتي تم جمعها يدويًا.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova tarefa socialmente impactante para o processamento de linguagem natural: de um corpus de notícias, extrair nomes de pessoas que foram mortas pela polícia. Apresentamos um corpus de fatalidade policial recém-coletado, que divulgamos publicamente, e apresentamos um modelo para resolver esse problema que usa supervisão à distância baseada em EM com regressão logística e classificadores de rede neural convolucional. Nosso modelo supera dois sistemas de extração de eventos prontos para uso e pode sugerir nomes de vítimas candidatas em alguns casos mais rapidamente do que um dos principais bancos de dados de fatalidades policiais coletados manualmente.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle tâche à impact social pour le traitement du langage naturel\xa0: à partir d'un corpus d'actualités, extraire les noms des personnes qui ont été tuées par la police. Nous présentons un corpus de décès récemment recueilli par la police, que nous publions, et présentons un modèle pour résoudre ce problème qui utilise la supervision à distance basée sur EM avec régression logistique et classificateurs de réseaux neuronaux convolutifs. Notre modèle surpasse deux systèmes d'extraction d'événements standard, et il peut suggérer des noms de victimes candidates dans certains cas plus rapidement que l'une des principales bases de données sur les décès de policiers collectées manuellement.", 'es': 'Proponemos una nueva tarea de impacto social para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural: de un corpus de noticias, extraer los nombres de las personas que han sido asesinadas por la policía. Presentamos un corpus de muertes policiales recién recopilado, que publicamos públicamente, y presentamos un modelo para resolver este problema que utiliza la supervisión a distancia basada en EM con regresión logística y clasificadores de redes neuronales convolucionales. Nuestro modelo supera a dos sistemas de extracción de eventos estándar, y puede sugerir los nombres de las víctimas candidatas en algunos casos más rápido que una de las principales bases de datos de muertes policiales recopiladas manualmente.', 'ja': '私たちは、自然言語処理のための社会的影響のある新しいタスクを提案します。ニュースコーパスから、警察によって殺害された人物の名前を抽出します。我々は、新たに収集した警察の致死性コーパスを公開し、ロジスティック回帰と畳み込みニューラルネットワーク分類器を用いたEMベースの遠隔監視を用いてこの問題を解決するモデルを提示する。当社のモデルは、2つの既製のイベント抽出システムを上回っており、場合によっては、主要な手動で収集された警察の死亡データベースの1つよりも早く、被害者候補の名前を示唆することができます。', 'hi': 'हम प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए एक नए, सामाजिक रूप से प्रभावी कार्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: एक समाचार कॉर्पस से, उन व्यक्तियों के नाम निकालें जो पुलिस द्वारा मारे गए हैं। हम एक नए एकत्र किए गए पुलिस घातक कॉर्पस को प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसे हम सार्वजनिक रूप से जारी करते हैं, और इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए एक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन और कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क क्लासिफायरके साथ ईएम-आधारित दूर के पर्यवेक्षण का उपयोग करता है। हमारा मॉडल दो ऑफ-द-शेल्फ इवेंट एक्सट्रैक्टर सिस्टम को मात देता है, और यह कुछ मामलों में उम्मीदवार पीड़ित नामों का सुझाव दे सकता है जो प्रमुख मैन्युअल रूप से एकत्र किए गए पुलिस घातक डेटाबेस में से एक की तुलना में तेजी से होता है।', 'zh': '新造一条,自然语言处分于世,取警察警察杀者名于新闻语料库。 展一新集之警察死亡语料库,我等公行,发一模以决之,宜用远EM监与逻辑归卷积神经网络分器。 吾形优于两成之事提取器系统,其于手动之大要警察死亡数据库更快议选受害者姓名。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую, социально значимую задачу по обработке естественного языка: из новостного корпуса извлекать имена убитых полицией. Мы представляем недавно собранный полицейский корпус со смертельным исходом, который мы публично публикуем, и представляем модель для решения этой проблемы, которая использует дистанционное наблюдение на основе ЭМ с логистической регрессией и сверточными классификаторами нейронной сети. Наша модель превосходит две готовые системы извлечения событий, и она может предложить имена жертв-кандидатов в некоторых случаях быстрее, чем одна из основных собранных вручную баз данных о смертельных случаях в полиции.', 'ga': 'Molaimid tasc nua a mbeidh tionchar sóisialta aige do phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha: as corpas nuachta, sleachta ainmneacha daoine a maraíodh ag póilíní. Cuirimid i láthair corpas básmhaireachta póilíneachta nua-bhailithe, a scaoilimid go poiblí, agus cuirimid múnla i láthair chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach a úsáideann cian-mhaoirseacht bunaithe ar EM le aischéimniú lóistíochta agus aicmitheoirí líonraí néaracha comhbheartaithe. Feidhmíonn ár múnla níos fearr ná dhá chóras eastósctha imeacht as an tseilf, agus is féidir leis ainmneacha iarrthóirí íospartaigh a mholadh i gcásanna áirithe níos tapúla ná ceann de bhunachair shonraí na mbásanna póilíneachta móra a bhailítear de láimh.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალი, საზოგადოებოდ განახლებელი საქმე პროცესისთვის: ახალგაზომის კოპპუსისგან, პოლიციაში მოკლექტული ადამიანების სახელი, რომლებიც მოკლექტა. ჩვენ ახალი კოლექციური პოლისტის ტარალური კორპუსს ჩვენ აღწერეთ, რომელიც ჩვენ აღწერეთ ადამიანურად, და ჩვენ აღწერეთ მოდელს ამ პრობლემას, რომელიც გამოყენებს EM-ის განმავლობაში გადარ ჩვენი მოდელი ექსტრექტორის თექსტრექტორის სისტემების გამოყენება, რომელიც შეგიძლია აჩვენოთ კანდიდენტის ზედაპირების სახელსახულებში სწრაფად ვიდრე ერთი მანძილურად კოლექტრებული', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο, κοινωνικό έργο επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας: από ένα σώμα ειδήσεων, αποσπάστε ονόματα ατόμων που έχουν σκοτωθεί από την αστυνομία. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πρόσφατα συλλεγμένο σώμα θανάτων της αστυνομίας, το οποίο δημοσιεύουμε δημοσίως, και παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο για την επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος που χρησιμοποιεί μακρινή επίβλεψη με βάση την ΕΜ με λογιστική παλινδρόμηση και ταξινομητές σύνθετων νευρωνικών δικτύων. Το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά δύο έτοιμα συστήματα εξαγωγής συμβάντων, και μπορεί να προτείνει ονόματα υποψηφίων θυμάτων σε ορισμένες περιπτώσεις γρηγορότερα από μια από τις κύριες μη αυτόματες βάσεις δεδομένων αστυνομικών θανάτων.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv feldolgozásának új, társadalmi hatású feladatát javasoljuk: a rendőrség által megölt személyek nevét kivonjuk egy hírcsoportból. Bemutatunk egy újonnan összegyűjtött rendőrségi halálos korpuszt, amelyet nyilvánosan kiadunk, és bemutatunk egy modellt a probléma megoldására, amely EM-alapú távoli felügyeletet használ logisztikai regresszióval és konvolúciós neurális hálózati osztályozókkal. Modellünk felülmúlja két elérhető eseményelszívó rendszert, és bizonyos esetekben gyorsabban tudja javasolni a jelöltek nevét, mint az egyik fő manuálisan gyűjtött rendőrségi halálesetek adatbázisa.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo compito socialmente efficace per l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale: da un corpus di notizie estraete i nomi delle persone uccise dalla polizia. Presentiamo un corpus di vittime della polizia appena raccolto, che pubblichiamo pubblicamente, e presentiamo un modello per risolvere questo problema che utilizza la supervisione a distanza basata su EM con regressione logistica e classificatori di reti neurali convoluzionali. Il nostro modello supera due sistemi di estrazione eventi off-the-shelf e può suggerire i nomi delle vittime candidate in alcuni casi più velocemente di uno dei principali database di vittime della polizia raccolti manualmente.", 'lt': 'Siūlome naują, socialinį poveikį turinčią gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotį: iš naujienų korpuso ištraukti asmenų, kuriuos nužudė policija, vardus. Mes pristatome naujai surinktą policijos mirtingumo korpusą, kurį skelbiame viešai, ir pristatome model į, kaip išspręsti šią problem ą, kuri naudoja nuotolinę EM priežiūrą su logistine regresija ir konvoliucinio nervų tinklo klasifikatoriais. Mūsų modelis yra didesnis už dvi nepalankių įvykių gavimo sistemas ir kai kuriais atvejais gali pasiūlyti aukų kandidatų vardus greičiau nei viena iš pagrindinių rankiniu būdu surinktų policijos mirties duomenų bazių.', 'kk': 'Біз табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін жаңа, социалдық әсер етпейтін тапсырманы ұсынамыз: жаңалық корпус, полицияның өлтірілген адамдардың атауын тарқатып шығу. Біз жаңа жинақталған полицияның өлтімдік корпусын таңдаймыз. Бұл көпшілікті ашып, EM-негіздегі жұмысын логистикалық регрессия және көпшілікті невралдық желінің классификаторларының қашықтығы Біздің үлгіміз екі оқиға алып тастау жүйелерінен тыс болады. Бұл кандидаттардың атауын кейбір жағдайда қолмен жинақталған полицияның өлтімдік деректер қорларының бірінен тез болады.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു പുതിയ, സാമൂഹിക പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പുതിയ ഒരു പോലീസിന്\u200dറെ മരണശീലതയുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് പ്രസ്താവികമായി വിടുന്നു. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഈ പ്രശ് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ട് പേരില്\u200d പെട്ടെന്ന് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ചില കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നവരുടെ പേരുകള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കാന്\u200d', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова, социјално влијателна задача за природното обработување на јазиците: од новински корпус, извлекување имиња на лица кои биле убиени од полицијата. Презентираме ново собран полициски корпус за смртност, кој го ослободуваме јавно, и претставуваме модел за решавање на овој проблем кој користи далечен надзор на ЕМ со логистичка регресија и конволуционални класификатори на нервната мрежа. Нашиот модел надминува два системи за извлекување настани надвор од полицијата и може да предложи имиња на кандидатските жртви во некои случаи побрзо од една од главните рачно собрани полициски бази на податоци за смртност.', 'ms': 'Kami mengusulkan tugas baru, yang mempengaruhi sosial untuk pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi: dari korpus berita, mengekstrak nama orang yang telah dibunuh oleh polis. Kami memperkenalkan korpus kematian polis yang baru dikumpulkan, yang kami lepaskan secara awam, dan memperkenalkan model untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini yang menggunakan pengawasan jauh berdasarkan EM dengan regresi logistik dan klasifikasi rangkaian saraf konvolusi. Model kami melampaui dua sistem pengekstrak peristiwa luar rak, dan ia boleh menyarankan nama calon mangsa dalam beberapa kes lebih cepat daripada salah satu pangkalan data kematian polis yang dikumpulkan secara manual utama.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu kompitu ġdid, li għandu impatt soċjali fuq l-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali: minn korpus tal-a ħbarijiet, neħħi ismijiet ta’ persuni li nqatlu mill-pulizija. Aħna nippreżentaw korpus ta’ fatalità tal-pulizija li għadu kif inġabar, li nħarġu pubblikament, u nippreżentaw mudell biex issolvi din il-problem a li tuża superviżjoni distanti bbażata fuq l-EM b’rigressjoni loġistika u klassifikaturi tan-netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali. Il-mudell tagħna jwassal għal żewġ sistemi ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ avvenimenti barra mill-ixkaffa, u jista’ jissuġġerixxi ismijiet ta’ vittmi kandidati f’xi każijiet aktar malajr minn waħda mid-databases maġġuri ta’ mortalità tal-pulizija miġbura manwalment.', 'mn': 'Бид байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн шинэ, нийгмийн нөлөөтэй ажил санал болгож байна: мэдээллийн корпус, цагдаагаар алдсан хүмүүсийн нэр гаргаж байна. Бид шинэ цуглуулсан цагдааны өлсгөлөн корпус илтгэдэг. Энэ нь олон нийтэд гаргаж, EM-д суурилсан хол удирдлага болон сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний хуваалцагчид ашигладаг энэ асуудлыг шийдэх загвар өгдөг. Бидний загварын загвар нь хоёр гараас гарсан үйл явц авагчийн системээс илүү хурдан гарч ирдэг. Зарим тохиолдлуудын хохирогчийн нэрийг зарим тохиолдлуудад цуглуулсан цуглуулсан цагдааны үхэл өгөгдлийн сангийн нэгээс илүү хурдан ху', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt, sosialt-effektiv oppgåve for naturspråkshandtering: frå ein nyhetskorpus, pakk ut namn på personer som er drept av politikk. Vi presenterer eit nytt samla politiske fatalitetskorpus, som vi løyser offentlig, og presenterer eit modell for å løyse denne problemet som brukar EM-basert distant oversikt med logistiske regresjon og konvolusjonelle neuralnettverksklassifikatorar. Modellen vårt utfører to av skjelfshendingar-ekstraktorsystem, og det kan foreslå kandidat-filnamn i nokre tilfelle raskare enn ein av dei større manuelt samla politiske fatalitetsdatabasene.', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă sarcină cu impact social pentru procesarea limbajului natural: dintr-un corpus de știri, extrageți numele persoanelor care au fost ucise de poliție. Vă prezentăm un corpus recent colectat de poliție mortalitate, pe care îl lansăm public, și prezentăm un model pentru rezolvarea acestei probleme care utilizează supravegherea la distanță bazată pe EM cu regresie logistică și clasificatoare de rețele neuronale convoluționale. Modelul nostru depășește două sisteme de extragere de evenimente off-the-raft, și poate sugera numele victimelor candidate în unele cazuri mai repede decât una dintre bazele de date majore colectate manual de poliție decese.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe, społecznie oddziaływane zadanie przetwarzania języka naturalnego: z korpusu informacyjnego wyciągnięcie nazwisk osób zabitych przez policję. Przedstawiamy nowo zebrany korpus ofiar policyjnych, który publikujemy publicznie, oraz przedstawiamy model rozwiązania tego problemu, który wykorzystuje odległy nadzór oparty na EM z regresją logistyczną i klasyfikatorami konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych. Nasz model przewyższa dwa gotowe systemy wyciągania zdarzeń i może sugerować nazwiska kandydatów ofiar w niektórych przypadkach szybciej niż jedna z głównych ręcznie zebranych baz danych dotyczących ofiar policyjnych.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත්, සමාජිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා: පොලිසියෙන් මැරුණු ම අපි අලුත් පොලිසියාගෙන ඉන්න පොලිසියා මරණ කොර්පුස් එකක් පෙන්වනවා, ඒක අපි ප්\u200dරජාවිත විස්තර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න මේ ප අපේ මොඩල් දෙකක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පොලිසියේ මරණ දත්ත බේස් එකට වඩා වේගයි.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட்டிற்கான புதிய, சமூக பாதிக்கும் பணியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்: ஒரு செய்தி குறிப்பிலி நாங்கள் புதிய சேகரிக்கப்பட்ட போலீஸ் தாய் குறிப்பை கொண்டுள்ளோம், அதை நாம் பொதுவாக வெளியிடுகிறோம், இந்த பிரச்சினையை தீர்க்க ஒரு மாதிரியை கொண் எங்கள் மாதிரி இரண்டு வெளியேறும் நிகழ்வு பிரச்சனைகளை வெளியீட்டு அமைப்புகள் செய்கிறது, சில நிகழ்வுகளில் வேகமாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட போலீஸ', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi, društveno-efikasni zadatak prirodnog jezika: iz vesti korpusa, izvlačimo imena osoba koje je ubila policija. Predstavljamo novog skupljenog policijskog korpusa smrti, koji objavljujemo javno, i predstavljamo model da reši ovaj problem koji koristi daljinski nadzor na EM-u sa klasifikatorima logističke regresije i konvolucionalne neuralne mreže. Naš model iznosi dve izvlačivačke sisteme izvlačivača iz policije, i može predložiti imena kandidata žrtve u nekim slučajevima brže od jedne od najvećih policijskih podataka o fatalnosti.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shaqo cusub oo saameyn u leh bulshada ah ee baaraandegista afka dabiicadda ah: ka soo bixino qofka warqada ah, ka soo bixi magacyada qofka booliska dilay. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qof dhimashada booliska oo cusub soo urursan, kaas oo aan si bayaan u siineynaa, waxaana keenaynaa model si aan u xallino dhibaatadan, kaas oo ku isticmaalaya ilaaliyo meel fog oo la soo celiyo jimicsiga iyo fasaxa shabakadda neuro-ka. Tusaale ahaan ayaa ka muuqata laba nidaam oo ka baxsada dhacdooyinka, waxaana suurtogal ah in qofka ka mid ah magacyada qofka dhibbanaha ka mid ah ay waqtiyada qaarkood ka dhaqso u dhaqso badan yihiin macluumaadka dhimashada ee booliska ee qofka gacmaha loo soo ururiyey.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny, socialt påverkande uppgift för naturspråksbehandling: ur en nyhetskorpus extrahera namn på personer som dödats av polisen. Vi presenterar en nyligen samlad polisdödskorpus, som vi släpper ut offentligt, och presenterar en modell för att lösa detta problem som använder EM-baserad fjärrövervakning med logistisk regression och konvulutionella neurala nätverk klassificerare. Vår modell överträffar två färdiga händelseextraktionssystem och kan i vissa fall föreslå offrens namn snabbare än en av de stora manuellt insamlade polisdatabaserna.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی، اجتماعی اور اجتماعی تاثیر کے کام کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ طبیعی زبان پردازش کے لئے: ایک خبر کورپوس سے، پولیس کے ذریعہ مارے ہوئے لوگوں کے نام اٹھا لیتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نئی جمع پولیس کی موت کورپوس کو پیش کیا ہے، جسے ہم ظاہر آزاد کرتے ہیں، اور اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے ایک مدل پیش کرتے ہیں جو لوجیسٹیک ریگرس اور کنویرول نیورل نیٹ ورک کلیسٹر کے ساتھ EM بنیاد دور کی نظر استعمال کرتا ہے. ہمارا مدل دو شرف ایڈیٹ اکٹراٹر سیستموں سے زیادہ سریع عمل کرتا ہے، اور یہ کئی قسموں میں کڈیٹ ڈیٹ بیس کے ایک سے زیادہ سریع ترجیح دیتا ہے کہ کڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ بیس کی ایک بڑی مضبوط پولیس جمع کی گئی ہے۔', 'uz': "We propose a new, socially-impactful task for natural language processing: from a news corpus, extract names of persons who have been killed by police.  Biz yangi qo'llangan Polish fatiyatlarini ko'rganamiz. Bu muammolarni publiclashimiz mumkin. Bu muammolarni EM asosida uzoq boshqaruvchidan foydalanishimiz mumkin. Bu muammolarning logistik boshqarish va murakkab neyrol tarmoqning tabiifsiyatlaridan foydalanadi. Bizning modelimiz qo'llanmalar qo'llangan polish qo'llanmalarning birinchidan tez olib tashlash tizimini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một nhiệm vụ ảnh hưởng xã hội mới cho việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên: từ một tập đoàn tin, lấy tên của những người đã bị cảnh sát giết. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập đoàn chết chóc mới được thu thập, mà chúng tôi công khai phát hành, và đưa ra một mô hình để giải quyết vấn đề này, sử dụng sự giám sát xa cách EM với các phân loại mạng lưới hậu cần và kết nối thần kinh. Người mẫu của chúng tôi thực hiện hai hệ thống chuyên kích hoạt sự kiện, và nó có thể gợi ý tên các nạn nhân ứng cử viên trong một số trường hợp nhanh hơn một trong những cơ sở dữ liệu mạng cảnh sát được thu thập bằng tay.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова, социално въздействаща задача за обработка на естествения език: от информационния корпус извличане на имена на убити от полицията лица. Представяме новосъбран полицейски корпус за смъртни случаи, който публикуваме публично, и представяме модел за решаване на този проблем, който използва ЕМ-базиран дистанционен надзор с логистична регресия и класификатори на конволюционни невронни мрежи. Нашият модел превъзхожда две системи за екстракция на събития, и може да предложи имена на кандидати жертви в някои случаи по-бързо от една от основните ръчно събрани полицейски бази данни за смъртни случаи.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny, socialt påvirkende opgave for behandling af natursprog: Fra et nyhedskorpus udtrækkes navne på personer, der er blevet dræbt af politiet. Vi præsenterer et nyligt indsamlet politikorpus, som vi offentliggør, og præsenterer en model til at løse dette problem, der bruger EM-baseret fjernovervågning med logistisk regression og konvulutionelle neurale netværk klassifikationer. Vores model overgår to off-the-shelf hændelsesudsugningssystemer, og den kan foreslå kandidater ofrenavne i nogle tilfælde hurtigere end en af de store manuelt indsamlede politidødsdatabaser.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe, sociaal-impactvolle taak voor de verwerking van natuurlijke taal voor: uit een nieuwscorpus namen halen van personen die zijn gedood door de politie. We presenteren een nieuw verzameld politieorganisatiecorpus dat we publiekelijk vrijgeven, en presenteren een model om dit probleem op te lossen dat gebruik maakt van EM-based remote supervision met logistieke regressie en convolutional neural network classificators. Ons model presteert beter dan twee standaard event extractor systemen, en het kan kandidaat slachtoffernamen in sommige gevallen sneller suggereren dan een van de belangrijkste handmatig verzamelde politiedatabases.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan tugas baru, sosial-impaktif untuk proses bahasa alam: dari sebuah korpus berita, mengekstrak nama orang-orang yang telah dibunuh oleh polisi. Kami mempersembahkan korpus kematian polisi yang baru dikumpulkan, yang kami lepaskan secara publik, dan mempersembahkan model untuk memecahkan masalah ini yang menggunakan pengawasan jauh berdasarkan EM dengan regresi logistik dan klasifikasi jaringan saraf konvolusi. Our model outperforms two off-the-shelf event extractor systems, and it can suggest candidate victim names in some cases faster than one of the major manually-collected police fatality databases.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi, socijalno učinkoviti zadatak prirodnog obrazovanja jezika: iz vijestinskog korpusa, izvlačimo imena osoba koje je ubila policija. Predstavljamo novog skupljenog policijskog korpusa smrti, koji objavljujemo javno, i predstavljamo model kako bi riješili ovaj problem koji koristi daljinski nadzor na EM-u s klasifikatorima logističke regresije i konvolucionalne neuromreže. Naš model iznosi dva izvlačivačka sustava izvlačivačkih događaja iz policije i može predložiti imena kandidata žrtve u nekim slučajevima brže od jedne od najvećih podataka o smrtonosnoj policiji koji su prikupili ručno.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine neue, sozial wirkungsvolle Aufgabe für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache vor: Aus einem Nachrichtenkorpus extrahieren Sie Namen von Personen, die von der Polizei getötet wurden. Wir stellen einen neu gesammelten Polizeisterminalitätskorpus vor, den wir öffentlich veröffentlichen, und stellen ein Modell zur Lösung dieses Problems vor, das EM-basierte Fernüberwachung mit logistischer Regression und convolutionalen neuronalen Netzklassifikatoren verwendet. Unser Modell übertrifft zwei standardmäßige Ereignisextrahierungssysteme und kann Kandidaten-Opfernamen in einigen Fällen schneller vorschlagen als eine der wichtigsten manuell erfassten Polizei-Todesdatenbanken.', 'ko': '우리는 사회에 영향을 미치는 새로운 자연 언어 처리 임무를 제시했다. 뉴스 자료 라이브러리에서 경찰에 의해 살해된 사람의 이름을 추출했다.우리는 새로 수집한 경찰 사망 자료 라이브러리를 제시했다. 우리는 이 자료 라이브러리를 공개적으로 발표했고 이 문제를 해결하기 위해 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 EM 기반의 원격 감시와 논리 회귀와 권적 신경 네트워크 분류기를 사용했다.우리의 모델은 기존의 두 사건 추출 시스템보다 우수하다. 어떤 경우, 주요 수동으로 수집된 경찰 사망 데이터베이스보다 후보 피해자의 이름을 더 빨리 건의할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما یک وظیفه جدید و اجتماعی تاثیرگذاری برای پرداخت زبان طبیعی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: از یک شرکت خبری، نام\u200cهای افرادی که توسط پلیس کشته شده\u200cاند اخراج می\u200cکنیم. ما یک شرکت مرگ پلیس جدید جمع شده را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به طور عمومی آزاد می\u200cکنیم و یک مدل برای حل این مشکل را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از بررسی دور بر اساس ایم استفاده می\u200cکند با بررسی\u200cکنندگان شبکه عصبی\u200cهای لوژیک و بررسی\u200cکنندگان عصبی\u200cهای مختلف. مدل ما دو سیستم خارج کننده رویداد خارج از قفس انجام می دهد، و می تواند نام قربانی کاندیداتی را در بعضی موارد سریع تر از یکی از بان داده های مرگ پلیس با دستی جمع شده است پیشنهاد دهد.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza kazi mpya yenye madhara ya kijamii kwa ajili ya upasuaji wa lugha asili: kutoka kwenye makampuni ya habari, kuondoa majina ya watu waliouawa na polisi. We present a newly collected police fatality corpus, which we release publicly, and present a model to solve this problem that uses EM-based distant supervision with logistic regression and convolutional neural network classifiers.  Mfano wetu unafanya mifumo miwili ya utekelezaji wa tukio hilo, na inaweza kupendekeza majina ya wagombea katika baadhi ya matukio ya haraka kuliko moja ya database za vifo vya polisi zilizokusanywa kwa mkono.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe, sosiale-effektiewe taak vir natuurlike taal-verwerking: van 'n nuuskorpus, uitpak naams van persoon wat deur polisie gedood is. Ons stel 'n nuwe versamele polisie fataliteit korpus voor, wat ons openlik verlos en 'n model voorsien om hierdie probleem te los wat EM-gebaseerde afgeleë supervisie gebruik met logistike regresie en konvolusieele neuralnetwerk klassifiseerders. Ons model uitvoer twee af-die-shelf-gebeurtenis uittrekkingsstelsels, en dit kan voorstel kandidate-slagoffernaams in sommige gevalle vinniger as een van die grootste hand-versamele polisie fataliteit-databasis.", 'tr': 'Biz tebigy diller işlemek üçin täze, sosialy etýän täze bir işi teklip edip otyrys: haberler korpusyndan, polisiýadan öldürilen adamlaryň adyny goýuň. Biz täze toplanýan polisiýanyň ölüm korpusyny görkeýäris. Bu meseläni publika çykaryp, we bu meseläni EM-iň üstünde logatik regressiýasy we gönüllü näyral şebek klasifikalary bilen çözmek üçin nusgasyny çözýäris. Biziñ nusgymyz sistemalarymyz iki golaýdan çykyş sistemalaryny çykarýar, we bu durumda kandidyň adyny birnäçe elle toplanýan polisiýanyň ölüm databaseleriniň birinden çalt döredip biler.', 'am': 'ለባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል አዲስ፣ ማኅበራዊ የበይነመረብ ስራ እናስባለን፤ ከዜና ካርፓስ፣ በፖሊስ የተገደሉትን ሰዎች ስም እናወጣለን፡፡ አዲስ የተሰበሰቡትን የፖሊስ ሞት ካርፓስ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ይህንም ጉዳይ የኢሜይል የራቀ ጉዳይ እና የግልፅ ግንኙነት እና የደዌብ መረብ ተቃዋሚዎችን ለመፍታት እና እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን ሁለት የሸፍ ጉዳይ የውጤት ስርዓት ያሳያል፣ እናም በተጨማሪው የፖሊስ የሞት ዳታ መቀመጫዎች ከመጀመሪያው ቁጥጥር ይልቅ ፈጥኖ የሚችሉትን የአካባቢዎቹ ስም ያሳየዋል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün yeni, sosyal təsirli bir iş təklif edirik: xəbər korpusundan, polisin öldürülmüş kişilərin adlarını çıxart. Biz yeni toplanmış polis ölümcülük korpusu göstəririk, ki, a çıq-aşkar yayındırırıq və bu problemi çəkmək üçün bir model göstəririk ki, e.m. tabanlı uzaq təhlükəsizlik və konvolucional nöral ağ klasifikaları ilə istifadə edir. Bizim modellərimiz iki nəfərdən uzaq olaraq istifadə edir, və bu, bəzi vaxtlarda kandidəyə qurban adlarının adlarını özündən daha hızlı pul ölüm veri tabanlarından birindən daha hızlı təklif edir.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një detyrë të re, me ndikim social për procesimin natyror të gjuhës: nga një korpus lajmesh, nxjerr emrat e personave që janë vrarë nga policia. Ne paraqesim një korpus të sapo mbledhur për vdekjen e policisë, të cilin e lëshojmë publikisht, dhe paraqesim një model për të zgjidhur këtë problem që përdor mbikqyrjen e largët me bazë EM me regresion logjistik dhe klasifikuesit e rrjetit nervor konvolutiv. Modeli ynë ekzekuton dy sisteme nxjerrëse të ngjarjeve jashtë raftit dhe mund të sugjerojë emrat e viktimave kandidate në disa raste më shpejt se një nga bazat kryesore të dhënash për vdekjen e policisë të mbledhura manualisht.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր, սոցիալական ազդեցություն ունեցող խնդիր բնական լեզվի վերլուծության համար. լրատվական կորպոսից դուրս բերելով ոստիկանության կողմից սպանված մարդկանց անունները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նորից հավաքված ոստիկանության մահացության կորպոս, որը մենք հանրային կերպով հրապարակում ենք, և ներկայացնում ենք մի մոդել այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար, որը օգտագործում է էլեկտրոնային էլեկտրոնային համակարգով հիմնված հեռավոր վերահսկողություն լոգիստիկ ռե Մեր մոդելը արտադրում է երկու անդաշտային իրադարձությունների վերացման համակարգ, և այն կարող է առաջարկել թեկնածու զոհերի անուններ որոշ դեպքերում ավելի արագ, քան ոստիկանության մահացության հիմնական ձեռքով հավաքված տվյալների մեկը:', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য একটি নতুন, সামাজিক-প্রভাবিক কাজ প্রস্তাব করি: একটি সংবাদ কোর্পাস থেকে পুলিশের নাম নি আমরা একটি নতুন সংগ্রহ করা পুলিশের মৃত্যুর কোর্পাস উপস্থাপন করছি, যা আমরা প্রকাশ্যে মুক্তি দেই এবং এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য একটি মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যা ইমেম ভিত্তিক দূরবর্ আমাদের মডেল দুটি অফ-শেলফ অনুষ্ঠান বিক্রেতা ব্যবস্থা প্রদর্শন করে, আর এটি কিছু ক্ষেত্রে প্রার্থীর নাম পরামর্শ দিতে পারে যে কোন ক্ষেত্রে পুলি', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi, društveno učinkoviti zadatak prirodnog obrazovanja jezika: iz novinskog korpusa, izvlačimo imena osoba koje je ubila policija. Predstavljamo novog skupljenog policijskog korpusa smrti, koji objavljujemo javno, i predstavljamo model da riješimo ovaj problem koji koristi daljinski nadzor na EM-u sa klasifikatorima logističke regresije i konvolucionalne neuralne mreže. Naš model iznosi dvije izvlačivačke sustave izvlačivača iz policije, i može predložiti imena kandidata žrtve u nekim slučajevima brže od jedne od najvećih podataka o smrti policije u ručnim podacima.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový, sociálně působivý úkol pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka: ze zpravodajského korpusu extrahujeme jména osob zabitých policií. Představujeme nově shromážděný policejní korpus úmrtí, který veřejně zveřejňujeme, a představujeme model pro řešení tohoto problému využívající EM vzdálený dohled s logistickou regresí a klasifikátory konvolučních neuronových sítí. Náš model překonává dva standardní systémy extrakce událostí a může navrhnout jména kandidátů obětí v některých případech rychleji než jedna z hlavních ručně shromážděných databází policejních úmrtí.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue, sotsiaalselt mõjutava ülesande looduskeele töötlemiseks: uudistekorpusest välja võtta politsei poolt tapetud isikute nimed. Esitame äsja kogutud politsei surmajuhtumite korpuse, mille avaldame avalikult, ja esitame mudeli selle probleemi lahendamiseks, mis kasutab EM-põhist kaugjärelevalvet logistilise regressiooni ja konvolutsioonivõrgu klassifitseerijatega. Meie mudel ületab kahte sündmuste väljavõtmise süsteemi ja võib mõnel juhul soovitada ohvrite nime kiiremini kui üks suuremaid käsitsi kogutud politsei surmajuhtumite andmebaase.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta, sosiaalisesti vaikuttavaa tehtävää luonnollisen kielen käsittelyyn: uutiskorpusesta poimia poliisin tappamien henkilöiden nimet. Esittelemme hiljattain kerätyn poliisin kuolemantapauskorpusen, jonka julkaisemme julkisesti, ja esitämme mallin ongelman ratkaisemiseksi, joka käyttää EM-pohjaista etävalvontaa logistisen regression ja konvolutional neural network classificators. Mallimme on parempi kuin kaksi helppokäyttöistä tapahtumanpoistojärjestelmää, ja se voi ehdottaa uhriehdokkaiden nimiä joissakin tapauksissa nopeammin kuin yksi tärkeimmistä manuaalisesti kerätyistä poliisin kuolemien tietokannoista.', 'ca': 'We propose a new, socially-impactful task for natural language processing: from a news corpus, extract names of persons who have been killed by police.  Presentam un corps de mortalitat policial recentment recollit, que vam publicar, i vam presentar un model per resoldre aquest problem a que utilitza supervisió remota basada en EM amb regressió logística i classificadors convolucionaris de xarxes neurals. Our model outperforms two off-the-shelf event extractor systems, and it can suggest candidate victim names in some cases faster than one of the major manually-collected police fatality databases.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 ndhukung sing beraksi ak챕w챕, saraha-saraha gak bener kanggo ngilangno langgar oleh: suku kelas barang, nd챔w챔k챕 surok barang dh챔w챔k챕 endi wis nguasakno ning pulisi ya. Awak dh챕w챕 nambah karo perusahaan hukum sing nggawe polisi sing berarti, iki dh챕w챕 ngembuk perusahaan winih dh챕w챕, lan ngak챕w챕 ngesalakno perusahaan sistem sing isin챕 perusahaan Rong-sistem sing basa gambar uwong gawe nguasakno perusahaan sistem dianggap banjur챕 berarti tambah it챕 Model dh챕w챕 iso nglanggar sistem sing wis alih dumadhi gawan-dumadhi, lan iki iso nggawe nambah perbudhakan winih dh챕w챕 sing luwih apik dh챕w챕, nganggo perusahaan langgar sampek sing bakal terus sab챗n gewis dh챕w챕, kuwi wis nguasai m챗ng awak dh챕w챕 sing ngedol철', 'sk': 'Predlagamo novo, družbeno vplivno nalogo obdelave naravnega jezika: iz korpusa novic izvlečemo imena oseb, ki jih je ubila policija. Predstavljamo novo zbran policijski korpus smrtnih žrtev, ki ga objavljamo javno, in model za reševanje tega problema, ki uporablja daljni nadzor na podlagi EM z logistično regresijo in konvolucijskimi nevronskimi klasifikatorji. Naš model je boljši od dveh pripravljenih sistemov za odstranjevanje dogodkov in lahko v nekaterih primerih predlaga imena kandidatov žrtev hitreje kot ena od glavnih policijskih zbirk smrtnih žrtev.', 'ha': "Tuna goyya da wani aikin da yake mai amfani da shi a cikin harshen na asili: daga wani shirin bushãra, za'a fitar sunan wasu waɗanda aka kashe su na Police. We present a newly collected police fatality corpus, which we release publicly, and present a model to solve this problem that uses EM-based distant supervision with logistic regression and convolutional neural network classifiers.  Shiryoyinmu na sami biyu daga-wurin-shelf, kuma yana iya shawarar da sunayen wanda aka nuna wa mataimaki, a cikin wani abu, mafĩfĩci ko ɗayan kayan matabbata na police da hannuwanmu.", 'he': 'אנו מציעים משימה חדשה, משפיעה חברתית לעבוד שפת טבעית: מחברת חדשות, להוציא שמות של אנשים שנהרגו על ידי המשטרה. אנחנו מציגים גופוס קטלני משטרה שאסוף לאחרונה, שאנחנו משחררים באופן פומבי, ומציג מודל לפתור את הבעיה הזו שמשתמש בפיקוח רחוק מבוסס EM עם גירוס לוגיסטי ומקלסיפי רשת עצבית משותפת. המודל שלנו מציג שני מערכות מחלץ אירועים מחוץ למדף, והוא יכול להציע שמות מועמדים לקורבנות במקרים מסוימים מהר יותר מאחד מבסיסי הנתונים הגדולים של המשטרה שנאספו בידיים למוות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལྟ་བུ་གསར་བ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་གནོད་འགྱུར་བའི་ལས་ཀ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་ཁང་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གིས་སྡོམ་པ་ཞིག་འཇུག་གི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་དུ་བཏོན་བཤུད་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་མིང་གཉིས་ལས་བརྟེན་བྱས་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་པའི་དོན་ཚན་རྐྱེན་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'Asking too much? The rhetorical role of questions in political discourse', 'ar': 'يسأل كثيرا؟ الدور البلاغي للأسئلة في الخطاب السياسي', 'es': '¿Pides demasiado? El papel retórico de las preguntas en el discurso político', 'fr': 'Tu en demandes trop\xa0? Le rôle rhétorique des questions dans le discours politique', 'pt': 'Pedindo demais? O papel retórico das perguntas no discurso político', 'ja': '質問しすぎ？政治論考における質問の言い回しの役割', 'hi': 'बहुत ज्यादा पूछना? राजनीतिक विमर्श में सवालों की बयानबाजी की भूमिका', 'ru': 'Слишком много спрашиваешь? Риторическая роль вопросов в политическом дискурсе', 'zh': '求之太多? 政语修辞用', 'ga': 'Ag cur an iomarca? Ról reitriciúil na gceisteanna sa dioscúrsa polaitíochta', 'ka': 'მნჲდჲ ლთ ოთრაქ? პოლიტიკური კითხვების რეტორიკალური პროლია', 'hu': 'Túl sokat kérsz? A kérdések retorikai szerepe a politikai diskurzusban', 'el': 'Ζητάς πάρα πολλά; Ο ρητορικός ρόλος των ερωτήσεων στον πολιτικό διάλογο', 'it': 'Chiedere troppo? Il ruolo retorico delle domande nel discorso politico', 'mk': 'Asking too much?  Реторичката улога на прашањата во политичкиот дискурс', 'kk': 'Көп сұрау керек пе? Саяси дискурстарындағы сұрақтардың реторикалық рөлі', 'lt': 'Asking too much?  Klausimų retorinis vaidmuo politinėje diskusijoje', 'mn': 'Хэдэн их асууж байна уу? Улс төрийн ярианд асуултын реторик үүрэг', 'ms': 'Asking too much?  The rhetorical role of questions in political discourse', 'ml': 'Asking too much?  രാഷ്ട്രീയ സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം', 'mt': 'Asking too much?  The rhetorical role of questions in political discourse', 'no': 'Spør for mykje? Retorisk rolle på spørsmål i politiske diskursar', 'pl': 'Za dużo prosisz? Rola retoryczna pytań w dyskursie politycznym', 'ro': 'Cere prea mult? Rolul retoric al întrebărilor în discursul politic', 'so': "aad u weydiin kartaa? Sharciyada arimaha su'aalaha ku saabsan hadalka siyaasada", 'sv': 'Frågar du för mycket? Frågornas retoriska roll i den politiska diskursen', 'ta': 'மிகவும் கேட்க? அரசியல் பேச்சில் கேள்விகளின் முக்கிய பங்கு', 'sr': 'Previše pitaš? Retorička uloga pitanja u političkim diskusijama', 'si': 'ගොඩක් අහන්නේ? රජාත්\u200dරික කතාවේ ප්\u200dරශ්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'ur': 'بہت زیادہ پوچھتے ہیں؟ سیاسی صحبت میں سوالوں کی روشنی روش', 'uz': "Juda ko'p so'rayapmi? Siyasi talabada savollar haqida", 'vi': 'Hỏi nhiều quá à? Câu hỏi trả lời về vai trò trong ngôn luận chính trị', 'hr': 'Previše pitaš? Retorička uloga pitanja u političkim diskusijama', 'bg': 'Искаш прекалено много? Реторичната роля на въпросите в политическия дискурс', 'da': 'Beder du om for meget? Spørgsmålens retoriske rolle i den politiske diskurs', 'ko': '요구가 너무 많아요?정치 언어 중 의문문의 수사 작용', 'nl': 'Te veel vragen? De retorische rol van vragen in het politieke discours', 'sw': 'Unauliza sana? Jukumu la msingi la maswali katika mazungumzo ya kisiasa', 'de': 'Zu viel verlangt? Die rhetorische Rolle von Fragen im politischen Diskurs', 'id': 'Meminta terlalu banyak? Peran retorik pertanyaan dalam pidato politik', 'af': 'Vra te veel? Die retoriese rol van vrae in politieke diskursie', 'sq': 'Të kërkosh shumë? Roli retorik i pyetjeve në diskursin politik', 'hy': 'Շատ հարցնելով: Քաղաքական խոսակցության մեջ հարցերի ռետորիկական դերը', 'az': '√áox ist…ôyirsiniz? Siyasi s√∂hb…ôtl…ôrd…ô soruŇüanlarńĪn retorik roli', 'tr': 'Köp soraýarsyňmy? Syýasy gürrüňlerde soraglaryň retorikalary roli', 'fa': 'زيادي ميخواي؟ نقش بازیگری سوال در صحبت سیاسی', 'ca': 'Preguntar massa? El paper retòric de les preguntes en el discurs polític', 'am': 'ብዙ ጥያቄ? የፖለቲካ ንግግር ውስጥ የጥያቄ ትርጓሜ', 'cs': 'Žádáš moc? Řečnická role otázek v politickém diskurze', 'et': 'Küsid liiga palju? Küsimuste retooriline roll poliitilises diskursuses', 'fi': 'Pyydätkö liikaa? Kysymysten retorinen rooli poliittisessa keskustelussa', 'bn': 'Asking too much?  রাজনৈতিক কথোপকথনে প্রশ্নের নৈতিক ভূমিকা', 'bs': 'Previše pitaš? Retorička uloga pitanja u političkim diskusijama', 'he': 'שואל יותר מדי? התפקיד הרטורי של שאלות בדיור פוליטי', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu The rhetorical role of questions in political discourse', 'jv': 'Ngerti katimbang tho ? Ngucap rothik karo cejané sing nganggo barang politik', 'sk': 'Preveč prosiš? Retorična vloga vprašanj v političnem diskurzu', 'bo': 'དེ་བཞིན་རྫུན་ཞུ་བ་འཇུག་དགོས་སམ། ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་'}
{'en': 'Questions play a prominent role in social interactions, performing rhetorical functions that go beyond that of simple informational exchange. The surface form of a question can signal the intention and background of the person asking it, as well as the nature of their relation with the interlocutor. While the informational nature of questions has been extensively examined in the context of question-answering applications, their rhetorical aspects have been largely understudied. In this work we introduce an unsupervised methodology for extracting surface motifs that recur in questions, and for grouping them according to their latent rhetorical role. By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discoursesuch as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition partiesand reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator’s tenure and political career ambitions.', 'ar': 'تلعب الأسئلة دورًا بارزًا في التفاعلات الاجتماعية ، حيث تؤدي وظائف بلاغية تتجاوز التبادل المعلوماتي البسيط. يمكن أن يشير الشكل السطحي للسؤال إلى نية وخلفية الشخص الذي يطرحه ، بالإضافة إلى طبيعة علاقته بالمحاور. في حين تم فحص الطبيعة المعلوماتية للأسئلة على نطاق واسع في سياق تطبيقات الإجابة على الأسئلة ، إلا أن جوانبها الخطابية قد تم تجاهلها إلى حد كبير. نقدم في هذا العمل منهجية غير خاضعة للرقابة لاستخراج الزخارف السطحية التي تتكرر في الأسئلة ، ولتجميعها وفقًا لدورها البلاغي الكامن. من خلال تطبيق هذا الإطار على جلسات الأسئلة في برلمان المملكة المتحدة ، نظهر أن التصنيف الناتج يشفر الجوانب الرئيسية للخطاب السياسي - مثل التشعب في استجواب السلوك بين الحكومة وأحزاب المعارضة - ويكشف عن رؤى جديدة حول آثار فترة المشرع وطموحاته المهنية السياسية.', 'es': 'Las preguntas desempeñan un papel destacado en las interacciones sociales, desempeñando funciones retóricas que van más allá del simple intercambio de información. La forma superficial de una pregunta puede indicar la intención y los antecedentes de la persona que la formula, así como la naturaleza de su relación con el interlocutor. Si bien la naturaleza informativa de las preguntas ha sido ampliamente examinada en el contexto de las solicitudes de respuesta a preguntas, sus aspectos retóricos no han sido estudiados en gran medida. En este trabajo presentamos una metodología no supervisada para extraer motivos de superficie que se repiten en las preguntas y para agruparlos de acuerdo con su papel retórico latente. Al aplicar este marco al escenario de las sesiones de preguntas en el Parlamento del Reino Unido, demostramos que la tipología resultante codifica aspectos clave del discurso político, como la bifurcación en el comportamiento de cuestionamiento entre el gobierno y los partidos de la oposición, y revela nuevas ideas sobre los efectos de una la permanencia del legislador y las ambiciones de carrera política.', 'fr': "Les questions jouent un rôle prépondérant dans les interactions sociales, remplissant des fonctions rhétoriques qui vont au-delà du simple échange d'informations. La forme superficielle d'une question peut indiquer l'intention et les antécédents de la personne qui la pose, ainsi que la nature de sa relation avec l'interlocuteur. Bien que la nature informationnelle des questions ait été largement examinée dans le contexte des applications de réponse aux questions, leurs aspects rhétoriques ont été largement sous-étudiés. Dans ce travail, nous introduisons une méthodologie non supervisée pour extraire des motifs de surface qui reviennent dans les questions et pour les regrouper en fonction de leur rôle rhétorique latent. En appliquant ce cadre à la mise en place de séances de questions au parlement britannique, nous montrons que la typologie qui en résulte encode des aspects clés du discours politique, tels que la bifurcation dans le comportement de questionnement entre le gouvernement et les partis d'opposition, et révèle de nouvelles perspectives sur les effets d'un le mandat du législateur et les ambitions de carrière politique.", 'pt': 'As perguntas têm um papel de destaque nas interações sociais, desempenhando funções retóricas que vão além da simples troca informacional. A forma superficial de uma pergunta pode sinalizar a intenção e o histórico de quem a faz, bem como a natureza de sua relação com o interlocutor. Embora a natureza informacional das perguntas tenha sido extensivamente examinada no contexto de aplicativos de resposta a perguntas, seus aspectos retóricos foram amplamente pouco estudados. Neste trabalho apresentamos uma metodologia não supervisionada para extrair motivos superficiais que se repetem em perguntas e para agrupá-los de acordo com seu papel retórico latente. Ao aplicar essa estrutura ao cenário de sessões de perguntas no parlamento do Reino Unido, mostramos que a tipologia resultante codifica aspectos-chave do discurso político – como a bifurcação no comportamento questionador entre o governo e os partidos da oposição – e revela novos insights sobre os efeitos da mandato de um legislador e ambições de carreira política.', 'ja': '質問は社会的相互作用において顕著な役割を果たし、単純な情報交換の機能を超えた修辞的機能を果たす。 質問の表面的な形式は、質問者の意図と背景、および対話者との関係の性質を示すことができます。 質問に対する応用の文脈では、質問の情報性が広く検討されているが、その修辞的側面はほとんど研究不足である。 この研究では、質問で繰り返される表面モチーフを抽出し、潜在的な修辞的役割に従ってそれらをグループ化するための監督されていない方法論を紹介します。 この枠組みを英国議会の質問セッションの設定に適用することで、結果として生じる類型化が、政府と野党の間の疑問行動の分岐点などの政治的言説の主要な側面をコード化し、立法者の任期と政治的キャリアの野心の効果に関する新しい洞察を明らかにすることを示している。', 'zh': '世互动中起有奇用,修辞功过简流。 问者,所以明问者之意背景,与其对话者之性也。 虽博考信息性质,其修辞颇不尽究。 引入无监督之法,以取反覆之表面图案,因其潜修辞角色而分之。 以此框架应用于英国议会之问会议,所以生类型学编码政语之要 - 如政府、反对党之间质疑之分 - 而明立法者任政业之新见也。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न सामाजिक बातचीत में एक प्रमुख भूमिका निभाते हैं, बयानबाजी कार्य करते हैं जो सरल सूचनात्मक आदान-प्रदान से परे जाते हैं। एक प्रश्न की सतह का रूप इसे पूछने वाले व्यक्ति के इरादे और पृष्ठभूमि के साथ-साथ वार्ताकार के साथ उनके संबंध की प्रकृति का संकेत दे सकता है। जबकि प्रश्नों की सूचनात्मक प्रकृति को प्रश्न-उत्तर देने वाले अनुप्रयोगों के संदर्भ में बड़े पैमाने पर जांच की गई है, उनके बयानबाजी पहलुओं को काफी हद तक कम करके आंका गया है। इस काम में हम सतह रूपांकनों को निकालने के लिए एक असुरक्षित पद्धति पेश करते हैं जो प्रश्नों में पुनरावृत्ति करते हैं, और उन्हें उनकी अव्यक्त बयानबाजी भूमिका के अनुसार समूहीकृत करने के लिए। यूके की संसद में प्रश्न सत्रों की स्थापना के लिए इस ढांचे को लागू करके, हम दिखाते हैं कि परिणामी टाइपोलॉजी राजनीतिक प्रवचन के प्रमुख पहलुओं को एन्कोड करती है- जैसे कि सरकार और विपक्षी दलों के बीच व्यवहार पर सवाल उठाने में विभाजन- और एक विधायक के कार्यकाल और राजनीतिक कैरियर की महत्वाकांक्षाओं के प्रभावों में नई अंतर्दृष्टि प्रकट करता है।', 'ru': 'Вопросы играют важную роль в социальных взаимодействиях, выполняя риторические функции, выходящие за рамки простого информационного обмена. Поверхностная форма вопроса может сигнализировать о намерении и предыстории человека, задающего его, а также о характере его отношений с собеседником. Хотя информационный характер вопросов широко изучался в контексте приложений, дающих ответы на вопросы, их риторические аспекты в значительной степени изучались недостаточно. В этой работе мы вводим неконтролируемую методологию для извлечения поверхностных мотивов, которые повторяются в вопросах, и для группировки их в соответствии с их скрытой риторической ролью. Применяя эти рамки к постановке вопросов в парламенте Великобритании, мы показываем, что полученная типология кодирует ключевые аспекты политического дискурса, такие как бифуркация в сомнительном поведении между правительством и оппозиционными партиями, и раскрывает новые представления о последствиях пребывания законодателя в должности и политических карьерных амбициях.', 'ga': 'Tá ról suntasach ag ceisteanna in idirghníomhaíochtaí sóisialta, ag comhlíonadh feidhmeanna reitriúla a théann níos faide ná mar a bhaineann le malartú faisnéise simplí. Is féidir le foirm dhromchla na ceiste rún agus cúlra an duine a chuireann í a chur in iúl, chomh maith le nádúr an chaidrimh atá aige leis an idirghabhálaí. Cé go ndearnadh scrúdú forleathan ar nádúr faisnéiseach na gceisteanna i gcomhthéacs feidhmeanna freagartha ceisteanna, is beag staidéar a rinneadh ar a ngnéithe reitriúla den chuid is mó. Sa saothar seo tugaimid isteach modheolaíocht gan mhaoirseacht chun móitífeanna dromchla a thagann chun cinn arís i gceisteanna a bhaint amach, agus chun iad a ghrúpáil de réir a róil fholaigh reitriciúil. Tríd an gcreat seo a chur i bhfeidhm maidir le seisiún ceisteanna a shocrú i bParlaimint na Ríochta Aontaithe, léirímid go n-ionchódaíonn an tíopeolaíocht a bhíonn mar thoradh air sin príomhghnéithe an dioscúrsa pholaitiúil—cosúil le déthaobhacht in iompar ceistiúcháin idir an rialtas agus páirtithe an fhreasúra—agus nochtann sé léargais nua ar éifeachtaí tionacht reachtóra agus uaillmhianta gairme polaitiúla.', 'ka': 'კითხვები საზოგადოებო ინფორმაციული გაცვლილების გარეშე მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია, რომელიც რეტორიკალური ფუნქციები გავაკეთებენ. კითხვის სამუშაო ფორმა შეიძლება სიგნალიზონოთ ადამიანის საზოგადომი და ფონდომი, რომელიც მათ კითხვა, და მათი პრობლექტის საზოგადომის საზოგადო თუმცა კითხვების ინფორმაციონალური სახელსაწყოთა პროგრამების კონტექსტში უფრო დიდი გამოყენებული იყო, მათი რეტორიკალური აპექტიკები უფრო დასწავლია. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ შევცვალობთ არაფერიზებული მეტოლოგია, რომელიც საკითხვაში გადავიწყებენ, და რომელიც შევცვალობთ მათი წინ რეტორიკალური პროლის შესახებ. ამ პარამეტრის გადაყენებით კითხვების სეციების შესახებ UK პოლიმანტიში, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ შემდეგ ტიპოლოგია კოდის გასაკუთრების გასაკუთრებული აპექტები, როგორც ბიტურაცია პოლიტიკური კითხვების მონაცემების შესახებ პოლიტიკური და ოპო', 'hu': 'A kérdések kiemelkedő szerepet játszanak a társadalmi interakciókban, olyan retorikai funkciókat látnak el, amelyek túlmutatnak az egyszerű információcserén. A kérdés felületi formája jelezheti a megkérdező személy szándékát és hátterét, valamint a beszélgetőpartnerrel való kapcsolatának természetét. Míg a kérdések tájékoztatási jellegét a kérdésre válaszoló pályázatok keretében széles körben vizsgálták, retorikai vonatkozásaikat nagyrészt alulvizsgálták. Ebben a munkában felügyelet nélküli módszertant mutatunk be a kérdésekben ismétlődő felületi motívumok kivonására, valamint látens retorikai szerepük szerinti csoportosítására. Azáltal, hogy ezt a keretet alkalmazzuk az Egyesült Királyság parlamentjében folytatott kérdésekre, megmutatjuk, hogy az ebből eredő tipológia a politikai diskurzus kulcsfontosságú aspektusait kódolja – mint például a kormány és az ellenzéki pártok közötti kérdéses viselkedésben bekövetkező kettős kérdéseket –, és új betekintéseket tár fel a törvényhozó megbízatásának és politikai karriertörekvéseinek hatásaiba.', 'el': 'Οι ερωτήσεις διαδραματίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο στις κοινωνικές αλληλεπιδράσεις, εκτελούντας ρητορικές λειτουργίες που υπερβαίνουν αυτή της απλής πληροφορικής ανταλλαγής. Η επιφανειακή μορφή μιας ερώτησης μπορεί να σηματοδοτήσει την πρόθεση και το υπόβαθρο του ατόμου που την κάνει, καθώς και τη φύση της σχέσης του με τον συνομιλητή. Ενώ ο πληροφοριακός χαρακτήρας των ερωτήσεων έχει εξεταστεί εκτενώς στο πλαίσιο των αιτήσεων απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις, οι ρητορικές πτυχές τους δεν έχουν μελετηθεί σε μεγάλο βαθμό. Στην παρούσα εργασία εισάγουμε μια μεθοδολογία χωρίς επίβλεψη για την εξαγωγή επιφανειακών μοτίβων που επαναλαμβάνονται σε ερωτήματα, και για την ομαδοποίηση τους σύμφωνα με τον λανθάνοντα ρητορικό τους ρόλο. Εφαρμόζοντας αυτό το πλαίσιο στη διαμόρφωση ερωτήσεων στο κοινοβούλιο του Ηνωμένου Βασιλείου, αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προκύπτουσα τυπολογία κωδικοποιεί βασικές πτυχές του πολιτικού λόγου – όπως η διχοτομία στην αμφισβήτηση της συμπεριφοράς μεταξύ κυβέρνησης και αντιπολίτευσης – και αποκαλύπτει νέες απόψεις σχετικά με τις επιπτώσεις της θητείας ενός νομοθέτη και των πολιτικών φιλοδοξιών σταδιοδρομίας.', 'kk': 'Сұрақтар жалпы мәліметті ауыстыруға арналған реторикалық функцияларды орындайды. Сұрақ көздегі сұрағының мақсатын және аясын сұраған адамдардың мақсатын, және оның қатынасының қасиетін меңзеп алуға болады. Сұрақтардың мәліметті қасиеттері сұрақ жауап беру қолданбаларының контексті көбірек тексерілген болса, олардың реториялық аспектері көбірек оқылған. Бұл жұмыста біз сұрақтарда қайталанатын поверхностық мотифтерді тарқату үшін, оларды соңғы реторикалық рольіне сәйкес топтастыру үшін бағытталмаған методологияны келтіреміз. Бірақ Британия парламентіндегі сұрақ сеанстарын орнату үшін бұл қоршауды қолдануға болады. Сондағы тифология үкімет мен оппозициялық парламенттер арасындағы сұрақ қасиеттерінің негізгі аспекттерін кодтамыз. Мысалы, саяси директорлық амбицияларының әсерін жаңа түсініктер', 'lt': "Klausimai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį social in ėje sąveikoje, atliekant retorines funkcijas, kurios viršija paprastą keitimąsi informacija. The surface form of a question can signal the intention and background of the person asking it, as well as the nature of their relation with the interlocutor.  Nors klausimų informacinis pobūdis buvo išsamiai išnagrinėtas atsakant į klausimus, jų retoriniai aspektai buvo iš esmės nepakankamai išnagrinėti. Šiame darbe įvedame nepastebimą paviršinių motyvų, kurie kartojasi klausimuose, gavimo metodiką ir jų grupavimą pagal jų latent in į retorinį vaidmenį. By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discourse-such as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition parties-and reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator's tenure and political career ambitions.", 'mk': 'Questions play a prominent role in social interactions, performing rhetorical functions that go beyond that of simple informational exchange.  The surface form of a question can signal the intention and background of the person asking it, as well as the nature of their relation with the interlocutor.  Иако информативната природа на прашањата е екстремно испитана во контекст на апликациите за одговори на прашањата, нивните реторички аспекти се во голема мера разбрани. In this work we introduce an unsupervised methodology for extracting surface motifs that recur in questions, and for grouping them according to their latent rhetorical role.  Со аплицирањето на оваа рамка на одредувањето на прашањата во парламентот на Велика Британија, покажуваме дека резултатот на типологијата ги кодира клучните аспекти на политичкиот дискурс, како што е двоумењето во сомневањето во однесувањето помеѓу владата и опозициските партии и открива нови погледи за ефектите на мандатот на законодавците', 'it': "Le domande svolgono un ruolo di primo piano nelle interazioni sociali, svolgendo funzioni retoriche che vanno oltre quella del semplice scambio informativo. La forma superficiale di una domanda può segnalare l'intenzione e lo sfondo della persona che la pone, così come la natura della sua relazione con l'interlocutore. Mentre la natura informativa delle domande è stata ampiamente esaminata nel contesto delle domande di risposta alle domande, i loro aspetti retorici sono stati ampiamente sottovalutati. In questo lavoro introduciamo una metodologia non supervisionata per estrarre motivi superficiali che ricoprono nelle domande, e per raggrupparli secondo il loro ruolo retorico latente. Applicando questo quadro all'impostazione delle sessioni di domande nel parlamento britannico, mostriamo che la tipologia risultante codifica aspetti chiave del discorso politico, come la biforcazione nel comportamento di discussione tra governo e partiti di opposizione, e rivela nuove intuizioni sugli effetti del mandato di un legislatore e le ambizioni di carriera politica.", 'ms': "Pertanyaan bermain peran yang terkenal dalam interaksi sosial, melaksanakan fungsi retorik yang melebihi fungsi pertukaran maklumat sederhana. Bentuk permukaan soalan boleh memberi isyarat tujuan dan latar belakang orang yang bertanya, serta sifat hubungan mereka dengan interlocutor. Sementara sifat maklumat soalan telah diperiksa secara ekstensif dalam konteks aplikasi menjawab soalan, aspek retorik mereka telah kebanyakan dipahami. In this work we introduce an unsupervised methodology for extracting surface motifs that recur in questions, and for grouping them according to their latent rhetorical role.  By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discourse-such as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition parties-and reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator's tenure and political career ambitions.", 'ml': 'ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക ഇടപാടുകളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പങ്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് സാമൂഹ്യ വ ചോദ്യം ചോദിക്കുന്ന ആളുടെ ഉദ്ദേശവും പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിന്റെ ഉദ്ദേശവും സിഗ്നല്\u200d ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമായിരിക്കും അതിന്റെ  While the informational nature of questions has been extensively examined in the context of question-answering applications, their rhetorical aspects have been largely understudied.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കു ഈ ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ് യുക്കി സംഘത്തില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സെഷനുകള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു തരുന്നു, അതിന്റെ ഫലമായ ടൈപ്പോളജി രാഷ്ട്രീയ സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്', 'mn': 'Энэ асуултууд нийгмийн харилцааны чухал дүр зураг, энгийн мэдээллийн солилцоос илүү олон роторикийн функцүүд хийдэг. Энэ асуултын гадаргуу хэлбэр нь хүний зорилго болон түүнийг асууж байгаа хүн, харилцааны байдлыг харуулж чадна. Харин асуултуудын мэдээллийн байдлыг асуулт хариултын хэрэглээний тухай маш их судалсан ч тэдний реторик асуудлыг ихэвчлэн судалсан. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид асуулт дээр дахин дахин давтагдах гадаргуу хөдөлгөөнийг гаргах, тэдний сүүлийн роторикийн үүрэг дээр бүлгээх арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүнийг АНУ-ын парламентын асуулт суралцах хэмжээсүүд дээр хэрэглэхэд бид улс төрийн ярианы чухал асуудлыг дүгнэж, засгийн газар болон эсрэг парламентын хоорондын харилцааны хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хо', 'no': 'Spørsmål speler eit viktig rolle i sosiale samhandlingar og utfører retoriske funksjonar som går over det enkle informasjonsbyte. Overflatsformen av eit spørsmål kan signalisera vilje og bakgrunnen av personen som spør henne, og naturen av deres relasjon med interlocutoren. Selv om informasjonsnaturen av spørsmål er utvida i konteksten av spørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsmålspørsm I denne arbeida introduserer vi ein ukjend metodologi for å pakka ut overflate motiftar som gjentar i spørsmål, og for å gruppa dei etter sine latente retoriske rolle. Ved å bruka dette rammeverket til oppsettet av spørsmålsøkter i Storbritannia, viser vi at resultatet typologien koderer nøkkelaspektane av politiske diskursar, slik som bifurkasjonen i spørsmål av oppførsel mellom regjeringen og motsetjande partier, og viser nye innsyn i effekten av ein lovgivning og politiske karjerambisjoner.', 'mt': "Questions play a prominent role in social interactions, performing rhetorical functions that go beyond that of simple informational exchange.  Il-form a tal-wiċċ ta’ mistoqsija tista’ tindika l-intenzjoni u l-isfond tal-persuna li titlobha, kif ukoll in-natura tar-relazzjoni tagħhom mal-interlokutur. Filwaqt li n-natura informattiva tal-mistoqsijiet ġiet eżaminata b’mod estensiv fil-kuntest tal-applikazzjonijiet għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet, l-aspetti retoriċi tagħhom kienu fil-biċċa l-kbira maqbuża. In this work we introduce an unsupervised methodology for extracting surface motifs that recur in questions, and for grouping them according to their latent rhetorical role.  By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discourse-such as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition parties-and reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator's tenure and political career ambitions.", 'pl': 'Pytania odgrywają ważną rolę w interakcjach społecznych, pełniąc funkcje retoryczne wykraczające poza prostą wymianę informacji. Forma powierzchniowa pytania może sygnalizować intencję i tło zadającej osoby, a także charakter ich relacji z rozmówcą. Chociaż charakter informacyjny pytań został szczegółowo zbadany w kontekście wniosków o udzielanie odpowiedzi na pytania, ich aspekty retoryczne zostały w dużej mierze niezbadane. W niniejszej pracy wprowadzamy bez nadzoru metodologię ekstrakcji powierzchniowych motywów powtarzających się w pytaniach oraz grupowania ich według ich utajonej roli retorycznej. Stosując te ramy do ustawienia sesji pytań w brytyjskim parlamencie, pokazujemy, że powstała typologia koduje kluczowe aspekty dyskursu politycznego – takie jak rozdzielenie kwestionowania zachowań między rządem a partiami opozycyjnymi – oraz ujawnia nowe spojrzenie na skutki kadencji prawodawcy i ambicji politycznych kariery.', 'ro': 'Întrebările joacă un rol proeminent în interacțiunile sociale, îndeplinind funcții retorice care depășesc cel al schimbului informațional simplu. Forma de suprafață a unei întrebări poate semnala intenția și fundalul persoanei care o solicită, precum și natura relației acesteia cu interlocutorul. Deși natura informațională a întrebărilor a fost examinată pe scară largă în contextul aplicațiilor de răspuns la întrebări, aspectele retorice ale acestora au fost în mare măsură dublate. În această lucrare introducem o metodologie nesupravegheată pentru extragerea motivelor de suprafață care se repetă în întrebări și pentru gruparea lor în funcție de rolul lor retoric latent. Prin aplicarea acestui cadru la stabilirea sesiunilor de interogare în parlamentul Regatului Unit, arătăm că tipologia rezultată codifică aspecte cheie ale discursului politic – cum ar fi bifurcarea comportamentului de interogare între guvern și partidele de opoziție – și dezvăluie noi perspective asupra efectelor mandatului unui legiuitor și ambițiilor de carieră politică.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාජික සම්බන්ධතාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, සාමාජික සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අදහස් සහ පිටිපස්සේ ඒක අහන්න පුළුවන්, ඒවගේම ඔවු ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ තොරතුරු ස්වභාවිතාවය ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවයේ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා න මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200d මේක ප්\u200dරශ්න සම්බන්ධයක් වෙනුවෙන් UK පාර්ලිමින්ටම් වලට, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට රජය සහ විරුද්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන', 'sv': 'Frågor spelar en framträdande roll i sociala interaktioner och utför retoriska funktioner som går utöver det enkla informationsutbytet. Ytformen av en fråga kan signalera avsikten och bakgrunden hos den person som frågar den, liksom arten av deras relation till samtalspartnern. Frågornas informationskaraktär har undersökts i stor utsträckning i samband med frågeställningsapplikationer, men deras retoriska aspekter har till stor del understuderats. I detta arbete introducerar vi en oövervakad metod för att utvinna ytmotiv som återkommer i frågor, och för att gruppera dem efter deras latenta retoriska roll. Genom att tillämpa detta ramverk för att ställa frågor i Storbritanniens parlament visar vi att den resulterande typologin kodar centrala aspekter av den politiska diskursen – såsom bifurceringen i ifrågasättandet mellan regering och oppositionspartier – och avslöjar nya insikter om effekterna av en lagstiftares mandattid och politiska karriärambitioner.', 'so': "Saamayaashu waxay leeyihiin qayb weyn oo ku saabsan xiriirka arrimaha bulshada, kuwaas oo sameynaya shaqooyin ku saabsan iskuulka macluumaadka sahlan. Foomka surfa ee su'aalku wuxuu saxiimi karaa dhamaanka iyo gadaasha qofka weydiinaya, sidoo kale dabiicadda xiriirka qofka wadanka u dhexeeya. While the informational nature of questions has been extensively examined in the context of question-answering applications, their rhetorical aspects have been largely understudied.  Shaqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa qaab aan la ilaalinayn in la soo bixiyo dhaqdhaqaaqa surfa ee su'aalaha ku soo noqda iyo in loo koobi karo si waafaqsan cilmigooda ugu dambeeyay. Sida lagu codsashada koorsooyinka baarlamaanka UK, waxaynu tusnaynaa in dhaqdhaqaaq ay ka kooban yihiin dhinacyada hadalka siyaasadeedka, tusaale ahaan rabshad ku saabsan tababarka xafiiska dowladda iyo qaybaha ka geesta ah iyo waxyaabaha cusub ee ay saameyn ku yeelaan dhaqdhaqaaqa sharciga iyo siyaasadeeda.", 'ta': "கேள்விகள் சமூக இடைமுறைகளில் ஒரு பெரிய பங்கை விளையாடுகின்றன, சுலபமான தகவல் மாற்றம் மாற்றத்திற்கு மேல் செல்லும் வ கேள்வியின் மேற்கோள் வடிவத்தை கையெழுத்து கொள்ள முடியும் நபர் அதை கேட்கிறார்கள், மற்றும் அவரது உள்ளூட்டாளருடன் தொடர் கேள்வி பதில் அளிக்கும் பயன்பாடுகளின் மூலம் விரிவாக சோதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது போது, அவர்களுடைய வெளிப்பாட்டு பக்கங்கள் பெரும்பாலாக ஆய இந்த வேலையில் நாம் ஒரு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது திரும்ப வேண்டிய கேள்விகளில் இருக்கும் மாற்றங்களை வ By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discourse-such as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition parties-and reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator's tenure and political career ambitions.", 'sr': 'Pitanja imaju veliku ulogu u društvenim interakcijama, izvršavajući retoričke funkcije koje idu izvan jednostavne informacione razmjene. Površni oblik pitanja može ukazati na namjeru i pozadinu osobe koja ga pita, kao i prirodu njihovog odnosa sa interlocutorom. Iako je informativna priroda pitanja široko ispitivana u kontekstu aplikacija odgovarajućih pitanja, njihovi retorički aspekti su uglavnom pod proučavanjem. U ovom poslu predstavljamo neodređenu metodologiju za izvlačenje površinskih motifova koje se ponovljaju na pitanjima, i za skupinu njih prema njihovoj latentnoj retoričkoj ulozi. Primjenjujući ovaj okvir za postavljanje sesija pitanja u Britanskom parlamentu, pokazujemo da rezultat tipologije kodira ključne aspekte političkih diskursa, kao što je bifurka u pitanju ponašanja između vlade i opozicionih stranaka i otkriva nove uvide u utjecaje vlasti i političkih ambicija karijere zakonodavca.', 'ur': 'سوال سوسیل تعاملات میں ایک بڑا رئوٹر لگا رہے ہیں، جو راٹوریکل فناورک کرتی ہیں جو ساده معلومات تبدیل سے زیادہ گزر رہے ہیں. ایک سوال کی سطح فرم اس شخص کے مطلب اور پچھلے کی سیگنالہ کر سکتا ہے جو اس سے پوچھتا ہے، اور ان کے ارتباط کی طبیعت بھی ان کے ارتباط کے مطابق مشخص کر سکتا ہے. اگرچہ سوال کی اطلاعات کی تعبیر سؤال جواب دینے والی کاربریوں کے بارے میں بہت زیادہ تحقیق کی گئی ہے، ان کی روٹریک الگوں میں بہت زیادہ تحقیق کی گئی ہیں. اس کام میں ہم نے سطح موٹیفوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے غیر قابل تحقیق کی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے جو سوال میں دوبارہ تکرار ہوتے ہیں اور ان کو ان کے اگلے ٹوریک رول کے مطابق گروپ کرنے کے لئے۔ اس فرم کو انگلیس پارلمانت میں سؤال کے سؤال کے مقرر کرنے کے لئے لازم کرتا ہے، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ نتیجہ کی تایپولوژی سیاسی گفتگو کی کلیدی اثرات کا اندازہ کرتا ہے، جیسے حکومت اور مخالفت پارکینوں کے درمیان سوال کرنے کے لئے، اور ایک قانون کے ذریعہ اور سیاسی کاری امیدوں کے اثرات میں نو اثرات ظاہر کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Soʻrovlar jamiyat interfektlarida eng muhim o'zini bajariladi, va oddiy maʼlumot o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Name Javob beruvchi dasturlarda haqida maʼlumot savollar natijasi juda ko'p tekshirilgan paytda, ularning elektron aspektlarni ko'p o'rganadi. In this work we introduce an unsupervised methodology for extracting surface motifs that recur in questions, and for grouping them according to their latent rhetorical role.  Bu freymni AQSH парламентда саволлар seanslarini o'zgartirishdan foydalanishga tushunamiz, natijasida tiyologiya siyasagi talaffiyatlarning muhim aspektlarini qo'shiladi, чунки ҳукумат ва opposition парламентлар орасида суҳбат бериш, ва қонунлик парламент орасидаги суҳбат ҳосилларини кўриб беради ва қонунчилик лойиҳасини ва сиёсий маслаҳатларнинг таъсирларига таъсир", 'vi': 'Câu hỏi đặt ra một vai trò quan trọng trong giao tiếp xã hội, thực hiện các chức năng tu từ vượt xa quy tắc trao đổi thông tin đơn giản. Hình bề mặt của câu hỏi có thể đánh dấu ý định và nền của người hỏi, cũng như bản chất mối quan hệ của họ với đối tác. Trong khi câu hỏi được xem xét kỹ lưỡng trong các ứng dụng trả lời câu hỏi, thì các khía cạnh tu từ của câu hỏi đã được diễn tả rõ. Trong công việc này, chúng ta sẽ áp dụng một phương pháp không giám sát để khai thác các mô tả bề mặt thường xuyên trở lại trong các câu hỏi, và để kết hợp chúng dựa trên vai trò ẩn dật của chúng. Bằng cách áp dụng cơ quan này vào buổi hẹn chất vấn ở Quốc hội Anh, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng loại học kết quả đã mã hóa các khía cạnh chủ chốt của cuộc tranh luận chính trị, như Chia rẽ trong việc đặt câu hỏi về hành vi giữa chính phủ và các đảng đối lập, và tiết lộ những nhận thức mới về hiệu quả của nhiệm kỳ và tham vọng chính trị.', 'bg': 'Въпросите играят важна роля в социалните взаимодействия, изпълнявайки реторични функции, които надхвърлят прост информационен обмен. Повърхностната форма на въпрос може да сигнализира за намерението и фона на лицето, което го задава, както и естеството на връзката им със събеседника. Въпреки че информационният характер на въпросите е широко проучен в контекста на заявленията за отговор на въпроси, техните реторични аспекти са до голяма степен недостатъчно проучени. В тази работа въвеждаме методология без надзор за извличане на повърхностни мотиви, които се повтарят във въпросите, и за групиране им според латентната реторична роля. Прилагайки тази рамка към поставянето на въпросни сесии в парламента на Обединеното кралство, ние показваме, че произтичащата от нея типология кодира ключови аспекти на политическия дискурс – като разделението в поставянето под въпрос поведението между правителството и опозиционните партии – и разкрива нови прозрения за ефектите от мандата на законодателя и политическите кариерни амбиции.', 'de': 'Fragen spielen eine prominente Rolle in sozialen Interaktionen und erfüllen rhetorische Funktionen, die über den einfachen Informationsaustausch hinausgehen. Die Oberflächenform einer Frage kann die Absicht und den Hintergrund der Person signalisieren, die sie stellt, sowie die Art ihrer Beziehung zum Gesprächspartner. Während der Informationscharakter von Fragen im Kontext von Fragebeantworterungen ausführlich untersucht wurde, wurden ihre rhetorischen Aspekte weitgehend unteruntersucht. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir eine unbeaufsichtigte Methodik vor, um in Fragen wiederkehrende Oberflächenmotive zu extrahieren und nach ihrer latenten rhetorischen Rolle zu gruppieren. Durch die Anwendung dieses Rahmens auf Fragesitzungen im britischen Parlament zeigen wir, dass die resultierende Typologie Schlüsselaspekte des politischen Diskurses kodiert – wie die Verzweigung des Frageverhaltens zwischen Regierung und Oppositionsparteien – und neue Einblicke in die Auswirkungen der Amtszeit und politischen Karriereambitionen eines Gesetzgebers eröffnet.', 'da': 'Spørgsmål spiller en fremtrædende rolle i sociale interaktioner og udfører retoriske funktioner, der går ud over simpel informationsudveksling. Overfladeformen af et spørgsmål kan signalere hensigten og baggrunden for den person, der spørger det, samt arten af deres forhold til samtalepartneren. Selv om spørgsmålenes informationsmæssige karakter er blevet omfattende undersøgt i forbindelse med spørgsmålsbesvarelsesansøgninger, er deres retoriske aspekter i vid udstrækning blevet undervurderet. I dette arbejde introducerer vi en uautoriseret metode til at udtrække overflademotiver, der gentager sig i spørgsmål, og til at gruppere dem efter deres latente retoriske rolle. Ved at anvende denne ramme til indstillingen af spørgsmålstegn i det britiske parlament viser vi, at den resulterende typologi koder centrale aspekter af den politiske diskurs – såsom biforceringen i spørgsmålstegn ved adfærd mellem regering og oppositionspartier – og afslører nye indsigter i virkningerne af en lovgivers embedsperiode og politiske karrieremuligheder.', 'hr': 'Pitanja imaju značajnu ulogu u društvenim interakcijama, izvršavajući retoričke funkcije koje idu izvan jednostavne informacione razmjene. Površni oblik pitanja može ukazati na namjeru i pozadinu osobe koja ga pita, kao i prirodu njihovog odnosa s interlocutorom. Iako se informativna priroda pitanja široko ispitivala u kontekstu prijave odgovarajućih pitanja, njihovi retorički aspekti su u velikoj mjeri pod ispitivanjem. U ovom poslu predstavljamo neodređenu metodologiju za izvlačenje površinskih motifova koje se ponovljaju na pitanjima i za skupinu njih prema njihovoj latentnoj retoričkoj ulozi. Primjenjujući ovaj okvir za postavljanje sesija pitanja u Britanskom parlamentu, pokazujemo da rezultat tipologije kodira ključne aspekte političkih diskursa, poput bifurkacije u ispitivanju ponašanja između vlade i opozicionih stranaka i otkriva nove uvide u utjecaje vlasti i političkih ambicija karijere zakonodavca.', 'nl': 'Vragen spelen een prominente rol in sociale interacties en vervullen retorische functies die verder gaan dan die van eenvoudige informatie-uitwisseling. De oppervlaktevorm van een vraag kan de intentie en achtergrond van de persoon die het stelt aangeven, evenals de aard van hun relatie met de gesprekspartner. Hoewel het informatieve karakter van vragen uitvoerig is onderzocht in het kader van vragen beantwoordende aanvragen, zijn hun retorische aspecten grotendeels onderzocht. In dit werk introduceren we een methodologie zonder toezicht voor het extraheren van oppervlaktemotieven die terugkeren in vragen, en voor het groeperen ervan volgens hun latente retorische rol. Door dit raamwerk toe te passen op de opstelling van vragensessies in het Britse parlement, laten we zien dat de resulterende typologie sleutelaspecten van het politieke discours codeert – zoals de splitsing in vragengedrag tussen overheid en oppositiepartijen – en nieuwe inzichten onthult in de effecten van de ambtstermijn van een wetgever en politieke carrièremogelijkheden.', 'ko': '의문문은 사회 교류에서 중요한 역할을 하는데 그 수사 기능은 간단한 정보 교류를 초월한다.문제의 표면적인 형식은 질문자의 의도와 배경, 그리고 대화자와의 관계의 성격을 나타낼 수 있다.퀴즈 응용 배경에서 문제의 정보성은 이미 광범위한 연구를 받았지만 그들의 수사 분야는 기본적으로 충분한 연구를 얻지 못했다.이 작업에서 우리는 문제에 반복되는 표면적인 주제를 추출하고 그들의 잠재적인 수사 작용에 따라 그룹을 나누는 무감독적인 방법을 소개했다.이 틀을 영국 의회 질의 회의에 적용하는 설정을 통해 우리는 이로 인해 발생하는 유형학이 정치적 언어의 관건적인 부분, 예를 들어 정부와 반대당 간의 질의 행위에 대한 의견 차이를 코딩하고 입법자의 임기와 정치적 직업 포부에 영향을 미치는 새로운 견해를 제시했다.', 'fa': 'سوالات نقش بزرگی در ارتباطات اجتماعی بازی می کنند، و عملکرد بازیگری را انجام می دهند که بیشتر از آن از تبادل اطلاعات ساده است. شکل سطح یک سوال می\u200cتواند قصد و پشتیبانی شخصی که از آن می\u200cپرسد، و طبیعت رابطه\u200cاش با پیوندگر نشان دهد. در حالی که طبیعت اطلاعاتی از سوالات در محیط کاربردهای پاسخ پرسیدن بسیار تحقیق شده\u200cاند، نسبت\u200cهای بازیگری آنها بسیار زیادی تحقیق شده\u200cاند. در این کار، ما یک روش غیرقابل تحریک برای اخراج موتیف سطح را معرفی می کنیم که در سوال تکرار می شود، و برای گروه کردن آنها به طبق نقش بازیگری گذشته آنها. با استفاده از این چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارپرسی در پارلمانت انگلیسی، نشان می دهیم که تایپولوژی نتیجه\u200cای از نقطه\u200cهای کلیدی از گفتگوهای سیاسی، مانند دو فرکان در بازجویی رفتار بین دولت و حزب\u200cهای مخالفت، و مشاهده\u200cهای جدیدی را در اثر جستجو و ج', 'af': "Vragate speel 'n prominente rol in sosiale interaksies, wat retoriese funksies uitvoer wat buite daardie van eenvoudige informasiese verwysing gaan. Die oorspronklike vorm van 'n vraag kan sein die bedoel en agtergrond van die persoon wat dit vra, en die natuur van hul verwanting met die interlocutor. Alhoewel die inligting natuur van vrae is uitbreidig ondersoek in die konteks van vraag-antwoord toepassings, is hulle retoriese aspekte groot ondersoek. In hierdie werk introduseer ons 'n ongeondersteunde metodologie vir uitpakking van oorspronklike motifs wat herhaal in vrae en vir groepering hulle volgens hulle latente retoriese rol. Deur hierdie raamwerk te toewend aan die opstelling van vraagsessies in die VK-parlamente, wys ons dat die resulteerde tipologie die sleutel aspekte van die politieke diskursie enkodeer, soos die bifurkaasie in vraag gedrag tussen regering en teenwoordigheid-partye, en openbaar nuwe inligtings in die effekte van 'n wetslateur se tenure en politieke karieërambisies.", 'sq': 'Pyetjet luajnë një rol të shquar në ndërveprimet shoqërore, duke kryer funksione retorike që shkojnë përtej asaj të shkëmbimit informacional të thjeshtë. Forma e sipërfaqes së një pyetjeje mund të sinjalizojë qëllimin dhe sfondin e person it që e kërkon atë, si dhe natyrën e marrëdhënies së tyre me interlokuturin. Ndërsa natyra informative e pyetjeve është shqyrtuar në mënyrë të gjerë në kontekstin e aplikimeve për përgjigje pyetjeve, aspektet e tyre retorike janë kuptuar në mënyrë të madhe. Në këtë punë ne paraqesim një metodologi të pazgjidhur për nxjerrjen e motiveve të sipërfaqes që përsëriten në pyetje dhe për grupimin e tyre sipas rolit retorik të tyre të fshehtë. Duke zbatuar këtë kuadër në vendosjen e sesioneve të pyetjeve në parlamentin e Mbretërisë s ë Bashkuar, ne tregojmë se tipologjia që rezulton kodon aspektet kyçe të diskursit politik të tillë si dyfishimi në diskutimin e sjelljes midis qeverisë dhe partive të opozitës dhe zbulon pamje të reja në efektet e mandatit të një legjislaturi dhe ambicioneve politike të karrierës.', 'id': "Pertanyaan bermain peran yang prominent dalam interaksi sosial, melaksanakan fungsi retorik yang melampaui fungsi perdagangan informasi sederhana. Bentuk permukaan pertanyaan dapat mengisinyal niat dan latar belakang orang yang bertanya, serta alami hubungan mereka dengan interlokutor. Sementara sifat informasional pertanyaan telah diperiksa secara ekstensif dalam konteks aplikasi menjawab pertanyaan, aspek retorik mereka telah kebanyakan dipahami. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami memperkenalkan metodologi yang tidak diawasi untuk mengekstraksi motif permukaan yang berulang-ulang dalam pertanyaan, dan untuk mengumpulkan mereka menurut peran retorik tersembunyi mereka. By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discourse-such as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition parties-and reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator's tenure and political career ambitions.", 'sw': 'Maswali yanacheza nafasi kubwa katika mitandao ya kijamii, kutekeleza shughuli za maneno yanayoendelea zaidi ya mabadiliko rahisi ya taarifa. Mtazamo wa swali unaweza kuweka saini lengo na nyuma ya mtu aliyeuliza, pamoja na asili ya mahusiano yao na mtangazaji wa ndani. Wakati asili ya maswali ya taarifa imekuwa ikichunguzwa kwa kiasi kikubwa katika muktadha wa matumizi ya majibu ya maswali, mambo yao ya msingi yamekwisha kufahamu kwa kiasi kikubwa. Katika kazi hii tunaonyesha mbinu zisizo na uhakika wa kutengeneza hatua za surfe zinazoendelea katika maswali, na kwa kuwakusanya kwa mujibu wa jukumu lao la hivi karibuni. Kwa kutumia miundombi hii katika kutengeneza vikao vya maswali katika bunge la Uingereza, tunaonyesha kwamba matukio yanayotokana yanahusu mambo muhimu ya mazungumzo ya kisiasa- kama vile utata wa kuhoji tabia kati ya serikali na vyama vya upinzani na kuonyesha mitazamo mpya katika athari za msimamo wa sheria na nia za kazi za kisiasa.', 'tr': 'Soraglar sosial teşkiliklerde örän möhüm rol oýnaýarlar, basit informasiýa üýtgetmeginiň üstünde bolan retorikalar fonksiyonlary ýerine ýetirýärler. Soragyň ýüzi namaýyny we arkaýyny sorap adamyň namaýyny we ilişkileriniň tebigatyny görkezip biler. Soraglaryň informasiýaly tebigaty soraglary jogap bermegi barada ýakynlaşdyrylýar, olaryň retorik aspektleri bütin ýagdaýda okalýar. Bu işde ýüz çykyşlaryň ýüze çykyşlyklaryny açmak üçin garaşylmadyk bir methodologiýany we olaryň soňky retorik rolüne görä toparlamak üçin tanyşdyrýarys. AK parlamentyndaky soraglaryň setirmelerine uygulamak üçin, netijäki tifologiýanyň syýasy s özleriniň esasy diýip, hökümetin we oppositsiýa partiýatlaryň arasyndaky soraglaryň bifurkeýşeni we täze düşünjelerin täze düşünjelerini s a ýlaýar.', 'az': 'Sorular sosyal əlaqələrdə böyük bir rol oynayır, sadəcə informasiyal dəyişiklikdən daha çox çəkinən retorik funksiyalarını işləyir. Bir sualın üzərində olan şəxsin niyyətini və arxa planını, həmçinin ilişkisinin təbiətini və ilişkisinin təbiətini müəyyən edir. Soruların informasiyal təbiəti sual cavab verən proqramların məsələsində çox çətinliklə imtahana çəkilmiş halda, onların retorik aspektləri çox dəyişdirilmişdir. Bu işdə suallarda geri dönən yüzeysel motifləri çıxartmaq üçün müəyyən edilməmiş bir metodoloji təşkil edirik və onları son rətorik rollərinə görə dəstəkləndiririk. Bu framework ü İngiltere parlamentasında sual qurğularına uygulamaq üçün göstərdik ki, sonuçlarının typoloji siyasi s öhbətlərin a çarlı aspektlərini kodlayır, çünki hökumət və opozicion partilərin arasındakı davranışlarını sorğu-sual etmək üçün bifurqası və yeni fikirləri legisların sahibi və siyasi kariyerin təsirlərinin təsirlərini göstərər.', 'am': 'ጥያቄዎች በማኅበራዊ ግንኙነት ላይ የበለጠ የበለጠ መረጃ ማቀናቀል የሚደረጉትን ትርጓሜዎችን የሚያደርጉ ናቸው፡፡ የጥያቄ መልክ የሚጠይቁትን አቃውሞ እና የመደቡን ውጤት እና የመጠየቃቸው ግንኙነት እና የመረጃ ግንኙነት ይነግራል፡፡ While the informational nature of questions has been extensively examined in the context of question-answering applications, their rhetorical aspects have been largely understudied.  በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የደረቅ ጥያቄዎችን ለመውጣት እና እንደቀድሞው የቡሃታዊ ክፍል ለማሰናከል የማይጠበቀውን ማቀናጃ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት በአግሪካ ፓርላማ ውስጥ የጥያቄን ሰይኖች በመቀበል በመጠቀም፣ ፍለጋው ጥያቄ የፖለቲካ ንግግር መክፈቻን እንደሚያሳየው እና በተቃዋሚ ፓርቲዎች መካከል የፖለቲካ ንግግር ግንኙነትን በመጠየቅ እና የሕግ አካባቢ እና የፖለቲካ ስርዓት አካባቢ ፍላጎቶችን በመጠየቅ እና አዲስ ማስታወቂያዎችን በአዲ', 'ca': "Les preguntes juguen un paper prominent en les interaccions socials, fent funcions retòriques que van més enllà del simple intercanvi d'informació. La form a superficial d'una pregunta pot indicar la intenció i el fons de la persona que la pregunta, i la naturalesa de la seva relació amb l'interlocutor. Mentre la naturalesa informativa de les preguntes s'ha examinat ampliament en el context de les aplicacions de resposta a preguntes, els seus aspectes retòrics s'han entendut en gran part. En aquest treball introduïm una metodologia no supervisada per extrair motius superficials que repeten en preguntes i per agrupar-los segons el seu paper retòric latent. Aplicant aquest marc a la definició de sesions de preguntes al parlament britànic, demostram que la tipologia resultant codifica aspectes clau del discurs polític, com la bifurcació en el dubte sobre el comportament entre govern i partits d'oposició, i revela noves idees sobre els efectes del mandat d'un legislador i les ambicions de carrera política.", 'cs': 'Otázky hrají významnou roli v sociálních interakcích a plní rétorické funkce, které přesahují jednoduchou informační výměnu. Povrchová forma otázky může signalizovat záměr a pozadí osoby, která ji položí, stejně jako povahu jejich vztahu s partnerem. Zatímco informační povaha otázek byla důkladně zkoumána v kontextu žádostí o odpovědi na otázky, jejich rétorické aspekty byly do značné míry nezkoumány. V této práci představujeme metodiku bez dohledu pro extrakci povrchových motivů, které se v otázkách opakují, a pro seskupení podle jejich latentní rétorické role. Použitím tohoto rámce na nastavení otázek v britském parlamentu ukazujeme, že výsledná typologie zakóduje klíčové aspekty politického diskurzu – jako je rozdělení zpochybňování chování mezi vládou a opozičními stranami – a odhaluje nové pohledy na dopady funkčního období zákonodárce a politických kariérních ambicí.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক যোগাযোগ মাধ্যমে প্রশ্নের একটি বিশাল ভূমিকা প্রদর্শন করে, যা সাধারণ তথ্য বিনিময়ের বাইরে যায়। একটি প্রশ্নের প্রাক্ষাপটের ফর্মটি ব্যক্তির উদ্দেশ্য এবং পটভূমিকা স্বাক্ষর করতে পারে যে ব্যক্তি এটি জিজ্ঞেস করেছেন, এবং  প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রশ্নের প্রেক্ষাপটে তথ্য প্রশ্নের প্রকৃতি ব্যাপকভাবে পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু তাদের উত্তরাধিকার প্রাক্ষ্য এই কাজে আমরা প্রশ্নের প্রশ্নের উদ্দেশ্য বের করার জন্য একটি অরক্ষিত পদ্ধতিতে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই এবং তাদের সাম্প্রতিক ভূমিকা অনুসারে তাদের গ্রুপ করা যুক্তরাজ্যের সংসদে প্রশ্নের অধিবেশনের সংস্থার প্রতি এই কার্যক্রম প্রয়োগ করার মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এর ফলে রাজনৈতিক কথোপকথনের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রাপ্ত প্রতিক্রিয়া রয়েছে, যেমন সরকার এবং বিরো', 'et': 'Küsimused mängivad sotsiaalses suhtluses silmapaistvat rolli, täites retoorilisi funktsioone, mis ulatuvad kaugemale lihtsast teabevahetusest. Küsimuse pinnaline vorm võib märkida seda esitava isiku kavatsust ja tausta, samuti tema suhte olemust vestluskaaslasega. Kuigi küsimuste informatiivset laadi on küsimustele vastamise taotluste kontekstis põhjalikult uuritud, on nende retoorilisi aspekte suures osas vähe uuritud. Käesolevas töös tutvustame järelevalveta metoodikat küsimustes korduvate pinnamotiivide eraldamiseks ja nende rühmitamiseks vastavalt nende latentsele retoorilisele rollile. Rakendades seda raamistikku Ühendkuningriigi parlamendis toimuvate küsimussessioonide seadmisel, näitame, et sellest tulenev tüpoloogia kodeerib poliitilise diskursuse põhiaspekte, nagu valitsuse ja opositsiooniparteide käitumise kahtluse küsimuse lahknemine, ning paljastab uusi teadmisi seadusandja ametiaja ja poliitiliste karjääriaambitsioonide mõjust.', 'fi': 'Kysymyksillä on merkittävä rooli sosiaalisessa vuorovaikutuksessa, sillä ne suorittavat retorisia tehtäviä, jotka ylittävät yksinkertaisen tiedonvaihdon. Kysymyksen pintamuoto voi merkitä kysymyksen esittäjän aikomusta ja taustaa sekä hänen suhteensa keskustelukumppaniin. Kysymysten informatiivista luonnetta on tutkittu laajasti kysymyksiin vastaavien hakemusten yhteydessä, mutta niiden retorisia näkökohtia ei ole tutkittu paljolti. Tässä työssä esittelemme valvomattoman menetelmän kysymyksissä toistuvien pintamotiivien poimimiseksi ja niiden ryhmittelemiseksi niiden latentin retorisen roolin mukaan. Sovelltamalla tätä kehystä kysymyssessioiden asettamiseen Ison-Britannian parlamentissa osoitamme, että tuloksena syntyvä typologia koodaa poliittisen diskurssin keskeisiä näkökohtia – kuten hallituksen ja oppositiopuolueiden välisen käyttäytymisen kyseenalaistamista – ja paljastaa uusia näkemyksiä lainsäätäjän toimikauden vaikutuksista ja poliittisista uratavoitteista.', 'bs': 'Pitanja imaju veliku ulogu u društvenim interakcijama, izvršavajući retoričke funkcije koje idu izvan jednostavne informacione razmjene. Površni oblik pitanja može signalizirati namjeru i pozadinu osobe koja je postavlja, kao i prirodu njihovog odnosa sa interlocutorom. Iako je informativna priroda pitanja u kontekstu prijave odgovarajućih pitanja široko ispitivana, njihovi retorički aspekti su u velikoj mjeri pod ispitivanjem. U ovom poslu predstavljamo neodređenu metodologiju za izvlačenje površinskih motifa koji se ponovljaju na pitanjima i za skupinu njih prema njihovoj latentnoj retoričkoj ulozi. Primjenjujući ovaj okvir na postavljanje sesija pitanja u Britanskom parlamentu, pokazujemo da rezultat tipologije kodira ključne aspekte političkih diskursa, poput bifurkacije u pitanju ponašanja između vlade i opozicionih stranaka i otkriva nove uvide u utjecaje vlasti i političkih ambicija karijere zakonodavca.', 'hy': 'Questions play a prominent role in social interactions, performing rhetorical functions that go beyond that of simple informational exchange.  Հարցի մակերևույթի ձևը կարող է ազդանշան տալ հարցը հարցող անձի մտադրության և ետևի մասին, ինչպես նաև իրենց հարաբերության բնույթին ինտերլոկուտորի հետ: Մինչդեռ հարցերի ինֆորմացիոնալ բնույթը մեծամասնությամբ ուսումնասիրել է հարցերին պատասխանող ծրագրերի կոնտեքստում, նրանց ռետորական ասպեկտները մեծամասնությամբ հասկացած են: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ոչ վերահսկված մեթոդոլոգիա, որպեսզի ստանանք մակերևույթի մոտիվացիաներ, որոնք կրկնվում են հարցերում, և խմբավորենք դրանք ըստ իրենց թաքնված ռետորական դերի: Այս շրջանակը կիրառելով Հիմնական Բրիտանիայի խորհրդատվության հարցազրույցների ընթացքում, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ արդյունքում ստացված տիպոլոգիան կոդավորում է քաղաքական խոսակցության կարևոր ասպեկտները, ինչպիսիք են կառավարության և դիմադրության կողմերի միջև կասկածելի վարքագիծը կասկածելի երկու անգամ հարցադր', 'jv': 'color-profile-policy Ndukundhi kesempatan ning perspekpun iso nggambar aturan karo perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar, dadi apik obarané perbudhakan karo akeh sabanjuré. Genjer-genjer informasi punika dipunangé kesempatan akeh lanjut ujian ing kontèké aplikasi sing ngomong cejane, akeh perspective retoroteké dhéwé wis dipujaran akeh durung. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gênggunaké mêthologi sing gak nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno sistêm kuwi nggawe gerakan, lan nggawe jenis-jenis cara sing nêmên uwong. Ngawe ki nggawe sistem iki kanggo nggawe sesiyon kanggo ngilanggar-wong ning karamelan ingkang Api Kara, ning awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngilanggar dipulangan politik sing dikarepaké dimulakno karo winih sing berarti winih kanggo ngilanggar sampek winih kanggo ngilanggar sampek winih lan ning aceh parti opo-wong lan mbukakipun ajeng dumadhi winih dhéwé kanggo nguasai perusahaan kanggo', 'he': "Questions play a prominent role in social interactions, performing rhetorical functions that go beyond that of simple informational exchange.  The surface form of a question can signal the intention and background of the person asking it, as well as the nature of their relation with the interlocutor.  While the informational nature of questions has been extensively examined in the context of question-answering applications, their rhetorical aspects have been largely understudied.  In this work we introduce an unsupervised methodology for extracting surface motifs that recur in questions, and for grouping them according to their latent rhetorical role.  By applying this framework to the setting of question sessions in the UK parliament, we show that the resulting typology encodes key aspects of the political discourse-such as the bifurcation in questioning behavior between government and opposition parties-and reveals new insights into the effects of a legislator's tenure and political career ambitions.", 'sk': 'Vprašanja imajo pomembno vlogo v družbenih interakcijah, saj opravljajo retorične funkcije, ki presegajo preprosto izmenjavo informacij. Površinska oblika vprašanja lahko signalizira namen in ozadje osebe, ki ga zastavlja, pa tudi naravo njihovega odnosa s sogovornikom. Čeprav je bila informacijska narava vprašanj obsežno preučena v okviru prošenj za odgovore na vprašanja, so bili njihovi retorični vidiki v veliki meri premalo preučeni. V tem delu predstavljamo nenadzorovano metodologijo za ekstrakcijo površinskih motivov, ki se ponavljajo v vprašanjih, in za njihovo združevanje glede na njihovo latentno retorično vlogo. Z uporabo tega okvira pri postavljanju vprašanj v parlamentu Združenega kraljestva pokažemo, da izhajajoča tipologija kodira ključne vidike političnega diskurza – kot je razcep pri spraševanju vedenja med vladnimi in opozicijskimi strankami – in razkriva nove vpoglede v učinke mandata zakonodajalca in političnih kariernih ambicij.', 'ha': "Masuwãyar suna da wani babban roli a cikin masu husũma da jamii, da performing functionin mataimaki wanda ke ƙara bayan musanya masu labarai mai sauƙi. The surface form of a question can signal the intention and background of the person asking it, as well as the nature of their relation with the interlocutor.  A lokacin da aka jarraba masu labarai cikin muhimman da aka karɓa wa shiryoyin su masu tambayar, an ƙara karɓi masu sakan. Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙara wani hanyoyi wanda ba a tsare shi ba dõmin ka fitar da firawi na bakin da za ta kõma a cikin tambayar, kuma dõmin ka sami su daidai da fassararsu na ƙara. Ina amfani da wannan firam zuwa a daidaita zaman shawara masu tambaya a bunar UK, ko kuma tuna nuna cewa matsayin ayuka na koda masu muhimman magana na siasa-kamar furura a cikin tambayar al'amarin a tsakanin government da s ãɓa-ƙungiya-Oppositi kuma ya bayyana gannai na daban a kan sha'anin tamko na raye na wata sharci na sharci.", 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་དག་ལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། The surface form of a question can signal the intention and background of the person asking it, as well as the nature of their relationship with the interlocutor. འདྲི་ཚིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རང་བཞིན་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་དོན་རྟོགས་པ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་གདོང་རིས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱིན་ཡུལ་ཁུལ་ཚབ་ནང་གི་མཐའ་འཁོར་སྐྱོན་འདི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་ལས་འོང་ཕན་ཐོགས་གཙོ་ཆེན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་ལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Detecting Perspectives in Political Debates', 'ar': 'كشف وجهات النظر في النقاشات السياسية', 'fr': 'Détecter les perspectives dans les débats politiques', 'es': 'Detección de perspectivas en los debates políticos', 'pt': 'Detectando Perspectivas em Debates Políticos', 'ja': '政治的議論における視点の検出', 'zh': '见于政辩', 'ru': 'Обнаружение перспектив в политических дебатах', 'hi': 'राजनीतिक बहस में परिप्रेक्ष्य का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Peirspictíochtaí a Bhrath i nDíospóireachtaí Polaitíochta', 'ka': 'პერსპექტიკური პოლიტიკური განვითარებაში', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση προοπτικών στις πολιτικές συζητήσεις', 'hu': 'Perspektívák felismerése a politikai vitákban', 'it': 'Individuare le prospettive nei dibattiti politici', 'kk': 'Саяси жөндеулердің перспективтерін анықтау', 'lt': 'Politinių diskusijų perspektyvų nustatymas', 'mk': 'Detecting Perspectives in Political Debates', 'ml': 'രാഷ്ട്രീയ വിവരങ്ങളിലുള്ള പ്രതീക്ഷകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Mengesan Perspektif dalam Debat Politik', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tal-perspettivi fid-dibattiti politiċi', 'mn': 'Улс төрөлхтний зөрчилдөөнийг олох', 'no': 'Finn perspektiv i politiske debatter', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie perspektyw w debatach politycznych', 'ro': 'Detectarea perspectivelor în dezbaterile politice', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje perspektiva u političkim debatima', 'si': 'රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක සංවේදනයේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය හොයාගන්න', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka perspektiv i politiska debatter', 'so': 'Find Perspectives in Political Debates', 'ta': 'அரசியல் தர்க்கங்களில் முன்னோர்க்கைகளை கண்டறிதல்', 'ur': 'سیاسی ڈیبوٹوں میں نظریں پتہ لیتی ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện triển vọng trong cuộc thảo luận chính trị.', 'bg': 'Откриване на перспективи в политическите дебати', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje perspektiva u političkim debatima', 'da': 'Afsløring af perspektiver i politiske debatter', 'nl': 'Perspectieven opsporen in politieke debatten', 'de': 'Perspektiven in politischen Debatten erkennen', 'fa': 'شناسایی perspektiv در بحث سیاسی', 'id': 'Mengeteksi Perspektif dalam Debat Politis', 'sw': 'Kuchunguza mtazamo katika Mijadala ya Siasa', 'tr': 'Politiki Debatlarda Perspektyny Aňlaşdyrmak', 'ko': '정치 변론에서 관점을 발견하다', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar perspektivat në debatet politike', 'af': 'Kies Perspektiewe in Politiese Debate', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Քաղաքական քննարկումների ընթացքում տեսանկյուններ հայտնաբերելը', 'az': 'Siyasi Debatlarda Perspektivlﾉ决', 'bn': 'রাজনৈতিক বিতর্কে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিকে সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje perspektiva u političkim debatima', 'cs': 'Odhalování perspektiv v politických debatách', 'et': 'Perspektiivide tuvastamine poliitilistes aruteludes', 'fi': 'Perspektiivien havaitseminen poliittisissa keskusteluissa', 'ca': 'Detectar perspectives en debats polítics', 'jv': 'Caret', 'ha': 'Detecting Perspectives in Political Debates', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje perspektiv v političnih razpravah', 'he': 'גילוי פרספקטיבות בדיונים פוליטיים', 'bo': 'ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འདྲ་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'We explore how to detect people’s perspectives that occupy a certain proposition. We propose a Bayesian modelling approach where topics (or propositions) and their associated perspectives (or viewpoints) are modeled as latent variables. Words associated with topics or perspectives follow different generative routes. Based on the extracted perspectives, we can extract the top associated sentences from text to generate a succinct summary which allows a quick glimpse of the main viewpoints in a document. The model is evaluated on debates from the House of Commons of the UK Parliament, revealing perspectives from the debates without the use of labelled data and obtaining better results than previous related solutions under a variety of evaluations.', 'ar': 'نستكشف كيفية اكتشاف وجهات نظر الناس التي تشغل اقتراحًا معينًا. نقترح نهج النمذجة Bayesian حيث يتم نمذجة الموضوعات (أو المقترحات) ووجهات النظر المرتبطة بها (أو وجهات النظر) كمتغيرات كامنة. تتبع الكلمات المرتبطة بالمواضيع أو المنظورات طرقًا إنتاجية مختلفة. استنادًا إلى المنظورات المستخرجة ، يمكننا استخراج أهم الجمل المرتبطة من النص لإنشاء ملخص موجز يسمح بإلقاء نظرة سريعة على وجهات النظر الرئيسية في المستند. يتم تقييم النموذج في مناقشات مجلس العموم في برلمان المملكة المتحدة ، وكشف وجهات النظر من المناقشات دون استخدام البيانات المصنفة والحصول على نتائج أفضل من الحلول السابقة ذات الصلة في إطار مجموعة متنوعة من التقييمات.', 'fr': "Nous explorons comment détecter les points de vue des personnes qui occupent une certaine proposition. Nous proposons une approche de modélisation bayésienne dans laquelle les sujets (ou propositions) et leurs perspectives (ou points de vue) associés sont modélisés en tant que variables latentes. Les mots associés à des sujets ou à des perspectives suivent différentes voies génératives. Sur la base des perspectives extraites, nous pouvons extraire les principales phrases associées du texte pour générer un résumé succinct qui permet d'avoir un aperçu rapide des principaux points de vue d'un document. Le modèle est évalué sur la base des débats de la Chambre des communes du Parlement britannique, révélant les perspectives des débats sans utiliser de données étiquetées et obtenant de meilleurs résultats que les solutions connexes précédentes dans le cadre de diverses évaluations.", 'es': 'Exploramos cómo detectar las perspectivas de las personas que ocupan una determinada propuesta. Proponemos un enfoque de modelado bayesiano en el que los temas (o propuestas) y sus perspectivas (o puntos de vista) asociados se modelan como variables latentes. Las palabras asociadas a temas o perspectivas siguen diferentes rutas generativas. Basándonos en las perspectivas extraídas, podemos extraer del texto las principales frases asociadas para generar un resumen sucinto que permita echar un vistazo rápido a los principales puntos de vista de un documento. El modelo se evalúa en los debates de la Cámara de los Comunes del Parlamento del Reino Unido, revelando las perspectivas de los debates sin el uso de datos etiquetados y obteniendo mejores resultados que las soluciones anteriores relacionadas bajo una variedad de evaluaciones.', 'pt': 'Exploramos como detectar as perspectivas das pessoas que ocupam uma determinada proposição. Propomos uma abordagem de modelagem Bayesiana onde tópicos (ou proposições) e suas perspectivas associadas (ou pontos de vista) são modelados como variáveis latentes. Palavras associadas a tópicos ou perspectivas seguem diferentes rotas generativas. Com base nas perspectivas extraídas, podemos extrair do texto as principais frases associadas para gerar um resumo sucinto que permite vislumbrar rapidamente os principais pontos de vista de um documento. O modelo é avaliado em debates da Câmara dos Comuns do Parlamento do Reino Unido, revelando perspectivas dos debates sem o uso de dados rotulados e obtendo melhores resultados do que soluções anteriores relacionadas sob uma variedade de avaliações.', 'ja': '私たちは、特定の提案を占める人々の視点を検出する方法を探ります。私たちは、トピック（または提案）とその関連する視点（または視点）が潜在変数としてモデル化されるベイズモデリングアプローチを提案します。トピックまたは視点に関連付けられた単語は、異なる生成経路に従います。抽出されたパースペクティブに基づいて、テキストから上部の関連する文章を抽出して、ドキュメントの主要なビューポイントを簡単に確認できる簡潔な要約を作成できます。このモデルは、英国議会下院の議論に基づいて評価され、ラベル付けされたデータを使用せずに議論からの視点を明らかにし、さまざまな評価の下で以前の関連ソリューションよりも良い結果を得る。', 'zh': '我们探索怎么检测据某个命题的人说。 建一贝叶斯建模法,其主题(或命题)及其关说(或论)建模为潜变量。 与题论相关者单词循异路也。 盖提取之视角,可以取最上之句,以成简洁之摘要,可以速览文档中之大要。 以英国议会下议院之辩论之,见不用标签数据之论,而获解决方案于前者。', 'hi': 'हम लोगों के दृष्टिकोण का पता लगाने के तरीके का पता लगाते हैं जो एक निश्चित प्रस्ताव पर कब्जा करते हैं। हम एक बायेसियन मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां विषयों (या प्रस्तावों) और उनके संबंधित दृष्टिकोण (या दृष्टिकोण) को अव्यक्त चर के रूप में मॉडलिंग किया जाता है। विषयों या दृष्टिकोणों से जुड़े शब्द विभिन्न जनन मार्गों का पालन करते हैं। निकाले गए दृष्टिकोणों के आधार पर, हम एक संक्षिप्त सारांश उत्पन्न करने के लिए पाठ से शीर्ष संबद्ध वाक्यों को निकाल सकते हैं जो दस्तावेज़ में मुख्य दृष्टिकोणों की त्वरित झलक की अनुमति देता है। यूके की संसद के हाउस ऑफ कॉमन्स से बहस पर मॉडल का मूल्यांकन किया जाता है, लेबल किए गए डेटा के उपयोग के बिना बहस से दृष्टिकोण का खुलासा करता है और विभिन्न मूल्यांकनों के तहत पिछले संबंधित समाधानों की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем, как обнаружить точки зрения людей, которые занимают определенное положение. Мы предлагаем подход байесовского моделирования, в котором темы (или предложения) и связанные с ними перспективы (или точки зрения) моделируются как скрытые переменные. Слова, связанные с темами или перспективами, следуют разным генеративным путям. Основываясь на извлеченных перспективах, мы можем извлечь верхние связанные предложения из текста, чтобы сгенерировать краткое резюме, которое позволяет быстро взглянуть на основные точки зрения в документе. Модель оценивается на основе дебатов в Палате общин парламента Соединенного Королевства, раскрывая перспективы дебатов без использования маркированных данных и получая лучшие результаты, чем предыдущие соответствующие решения в рамках различных оценок.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid iniúchadh ar conas dearcthaí daoine atá i tairiscint áirithe a bhrath. Molaimid cur chuige samhaltaithe Bayesian ina ndéantar topaicí (nó tairiscintí) agus na peirspictíochtaí (nó dearcthaí) a bhaineann leo a mhúnlú mar athróga folaigh. Leanann focail a bhaineann le topaicí nó le peirspictíochtaí bealaí giniúna éagsúla. Bunaithe ar na peirspictíochtaí a bhaintear, is féidir linn na habairtí is fearr a bhaineann leo a bhaint as téacs chun achoimre achomair a chruthú a cheadaíonn léargas tapa a fháil ar na príomhamhairc i ndoiciméad. Déantar an tsamhail a mheas ar dhíospóireachtaí ó Theach na dTeachtaí de chuid Pharlaimint na RA, ag nochtadh peirspictíochtaí ó na díospóireachtaí gan úsáid a bhaint as sonraí lipéadaithe agus ag baint amach torthaí níos fearr ná réitigh ghaolmhara roimhe seo faoi mheastóireachtaí éagsúla.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε πώς μπορούμε να εντοπίσουμε τις προοπτικές των ανθρώπων που καταλαμβάνουν μια συγκεκριμένη πρόταση. Προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση μοντέλων όπου τα θέματα (ή προτάσεις) και οι σχετικές προοπτικές (ή απόψεις) μοντελοποιούνται ως λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές. Οι λέξεις που σχετίζονται με θέματα ή προοπτικές ακολουθούν διαφορετικές παραγωγικές διαδρομές. Με βάση τις εξαγόμενες προοπτικές, μπορούμε να εξαγάγουμε τις κορυφαίες σχετικές προτάσεις από το κείμενο για να δημιουργήσουμε μια συνοπτική περίληψη που επιτρέπει μια γρήγορη ματιά στις κύριες απόψεις ενός εγγράφου. Το μοντέλο αξιολογείται σε συζητήσεις από τη Βουλή των Κοινοτήτων του Ηνωμένου Βασιλείου, αποκαλύπτοντας προοπτικές από τις συζητήσεις χωρίς τη χρήση επισημασμένων δεδομένων και επιτυγχάνοντας καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από προηγούμενες σχετικές λύσεις στο πλαίσιο ποικίλων αξιολογήσεων.', 'hu': 'Megvizsgáljuk, hogyan lehet felismerni az emberek nézőpontját, amelyek elfoglalnak egy bizonyos javaslatot. Bajeziai modellezési megközelítést javasolunk, ahol a témákat (vagy javaslatokat) és azokhoz kapcsolódó perspektívákat (vagy nézőpontokat) látens változóként modellezzük. A témákhoz vagy perspektívákhoz kapcsolódó szavak különböző generációs útvonalakat követnek. A kivont perspektívák alapján kivonhatjuk a szövegből a legfontosabb mondatokat, hogy rövid összefoglalót hozzunk létre, amely lehetővé teszi a dokumentum főbb nézőpontjainak gyors bepillantását. A modell értékelése az Egyesült Királyság parlamentjének alsóházában zajló viták során történik, amelyek feltárják a viták perspektíváit címkézett adatok használata nélkül, és jobb eredményeket érnek el, mint a korábbi kapcsolódó megoldások különböző értékelések során.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვაკვირდებით როგორ განაკვირდებით ადამიანების პეროვტიკური პეროვტიკური, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული პროგრამეტს. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ბაეზიანის მოდელური პროგრამა, სადაც ტემები (ან პროგრამები) და მათი დაკავშირებული პერპექტიკები (ან ხედის პროგრამები) მოდელურებულია როგორც სიტყვები, რომელიც ტემებით ან პერპოვტიკურებით დაკავშირებულია განსხვავებული გენერატიური გეზების შემდეგ. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ტექსტიდან ყველაზე დაკავშირებული სიმბოლოების გამოყენება, რომლებიც დოკუმენტიდან მნიშვნელოვანი სიმბოლოების შესაძლებლობად ძალიან გახსნა. მოდელის შესაბამისი განსაზღვრებაში, რომელიც ბრიტანეთის პოლიმანტის კომპოლიმანტის კომპოლიმანტის კომპოლიმანტის კომპოლიმანტის კომპოლიმანტიდან გამოიყენება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული', 'it': "Esploriamo come rilevare le prospettive delle persone che occupano una certa proposizione. Proponiamo un approccio di modellazione bayesiana in cui argomenti (o proposizioni) e le loro prospettive associate (o punti di vista) sono modellati come variabili latenti. Le parole associate ad argomenti o prospettive seguono diversi percorsi generativi. Sulla base delle prospettive estratte, possiamo estrarre le frasi principali associate dal testo per generare un riassunto succinto che consente una rapida panoramica dei punti di vista principali di un documento. Il modello è valutato sui dibattiti della Camera dei Comuni del Parlamento del Regno Unito, rivelando le prospettive dei dibattiti senza l'uso di dati etichettati e ottenendo risultati migliori rispetto alle precedenti soluzioni correlate in una varietà di valutazioni.", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame, kaip nustatyti žmonių perspektyvas, kurios užima tam tikrą pasiūlymą. Siūlome Bayezijos modeliavimo metodą, pagal kurį temos (arba pasiūlymai) ir jų susijusios perspektyvos (arba požiūriai) modeliuojami kaip latentieji kintamieji. Su temomis ar perspektyvomis susiję žodžiai seka skirtingas kartas. Based on the extracted perspectives, we can extract the top associated sentences from text to generate a succinct summary which allows a quick glimpse of the main viewpoints in a document.  Šis modelis vertinamas Jungtinės Karalystės parlamento bendrųjų rūmų diskusijose, atskleidžiant diskusijų perspektyvas nenaudojant pažymėtų duomenų ir gaunant geresnius rezultatus nei ankstesni susiję sprendimai įvairiais vertinimais.', 'mk': 'Истражуваме како да ги откриеме перспективите на луѓето кои окупираат одреден предлог. Предложуваме бајезиски пристап на моделирање каде темите (или предлозите) и нивните поврзани перспективи (или погледни точки) се моделирани како лантни променливи. Зборовите поврзани со теми или перспективи следат различни генерациски патишта. На основа на извадените перспективи, можеме да ги извадиме врвните поврзани реченици од текстот за да генерираме кратко преглед кој овозможува брз поглед на главните погледни точки во документот. Моделот се проценува на дебатите од Куќата на комуните на Парламентот на Велика Британија, откривајќи перспективи од дебатите без користење на означени податоци и добивајќи подобри резултати од претходните поврзани решенија под различни проценки.', 'kk': 'Біз мәліметті таңдайтын адамдардың көрінісін қалай анықтау керектігін зерттейміз. Біз Байезиялық модель тәртібін тақырыптар (немесе суреттер) және олардың қатынастығы (немесе қарау нүктелері) келесі айнымалылықтар ретінде моделдірілген. Тақырыптар не қарастырулармен байланысты сөздер әртүрлі генерациялық жолдарына келеді. Құжаттың негізгі көрініс нүктелерін тез қарау мүмкіндігін жасау үшін, мәтіннен жоғарғы сұлбаларды тастай аламыз. Бұл үлгі Біріккен Парламенттің Компаниялық Палатасындағы дискуссиялар туралы бағалайды, жарлық деректерді қолданбаған дискуссиялардан қарап, алдыңғы сәйкесті шешімдерден артық нәтижелерді алдыңғы шарттардан', 'ms': 'Kami mengeksplorasi bagaimana untuk mengesan perspektif orang yang memegang cadangan tertentu. Kami cadangkan pendekatan pemodelan Bayesian di mana topik (atau cadangan) dan perspektif mereka berkaitan (atau titik pandangan) dipodelkan sebagai pembolehubah tersembunyi. Kata yang berkaitan dengan topik atau perspektif mengikut laluan generasi berbeza. Berdasarkan perspektif ekstrak, kita boleh ekstrak kalimat terkait atas dari teks untuk menghasilkan ringkasan singkat yang membolehkan melihat cepat titik pandangan utama dalam dokumen. Model ini diteliti pada perbincangan dari House of Commons Parliment UK, mengungkap perspektif dari perbincangan tanpa menggunakan data yang ditabel dan mendapatkan keputusan yang lebih baik daripada penyelesaian berkaitan sebelumnya di bawah pelbagai penilaian.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ജനങ്ങളുടെ ദൃഷ്ടാന്തങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതെന്ന്. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d മോഡലിങ്കല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു) അവരുടെ ബന്ധപ പ്രമേയങ്ങള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കാഴ്ചകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ജനററിവ് വഴികള്\u200d പിന്തുടര പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട കാഴ്ചയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു രേഖയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d നിന യുക്കി സംഘത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഹൗസില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവാദങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും മോഡല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വിവാദങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യക്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പ', 'mt': "We explore how to detect people's perspectives that occupy a certain proposition.  Aħna nipproponu approċċ ta’ mudellar Bayeżjan fejn is-suġġetti (jew il-proposti) u l-perspettivi assoċjati tagħhom (jew il-punti ta’ vista) huma mudellati bħala varjabbli moħbija. Il-kliem assoċjat ma’ suġġetti jew perspettivi jsegwu rotot ġenerattivi differenti. Abbażi tal-perspettivi estratti, nistgħu nġibdu l-ogħla sentenzi assoċjati mit-test biex niġġeneraw sommarju fil-qosor li jippermetti ħarsa mgħa ġġla tal-punti ta’ vista ewlenin f’dokument. Il-mudell huwa evalwat fuq dibattiti mill-Kamra tal-Komuni tal-Parlament tar-Renju Unit, li jiżvelaw perspettivi mid-dibattiti mingħajr l-użu ta’ dejta ttikkettata u jiksbu riżultati a ħjar minn soluzzjonijiet relatati preċedenti taħt varjetà ta’ evalwazzjonijiet.", 'no': 'Vi utforskar korleis å oppdaga folks perspektiv som oppgjev eit viss forslag. Vi foreslår ein Bayesiansk modelleringstilnærming der emne (eller forslag) og sine tilknytte perspektiv (eller visingspunkt) er modelert som latente variabler. Ord assosiert med emner eller perspektiv følgjer ulike genereringsruter. Basert på den ekstraherte perspektiva, kan vi pakke ut dei øvste tilknytte setningane frå tekst for å laga eit sammendrag som tillèt ein rask sjå på hovudpunktane i eit dokument. Modellen er evaluert på debatar frå House of Commons of the UK Parliament, som viser perspektiv frå debatane utan bruk av merkelige data og får bedre resultat enn tidlegare relaterte løsningar under forskjellige evalueringar.', 'mn': 'Бид тодорхой санал зааж байгаа хүмүүсийн ойлголтыг хэрхэн олохыг судалж байна. Бид Байзийн загварын загварын арга загвар (эсвэл зөвлөмж) болон харилцааны харилцаа (эсвэл үзэл үзэл цэгүүдийг) сүүлийн хувьсгал гэж загварчлагдсан байдаг. Судалгаанууд эсвэл үзэл бодлоор холбогдсон үг өөр өөр төрлийн замыг дагадаг. Шинэ авсан үзэл дээр бид текстээс хамааралтай дээд холбогдсон өгүүлбэрүүдийг бичиж болно. Энэ нь баримтын гол үзэл цэгүүдийг хурдан харж болно. Энэ загвар Англи Парламентын Компанийн Парламентын захиралдаас илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргаж байгаа юм.', 'pl': 'Badamy, jak wykryć perspektywy ludzi, które zajmują pewną propozycję. Proponujemy Bayesowskie podejście do modelowania, w którym tematy (lub propozycje) i związane z nimi perspektywy (lub punkty widzenia) są modelowane jako zmienne utajone. Słowa związane z tematami lub perspektywami podążają różnymi drogami generacyjnymi. Na podstawie wyodrębnionych perspektyw, możemy wyodrębnić górne powiązane zdania z tekstu, aby wygenerować zwięzłe podsumowanie, które pozwala na szybkie spojrzenie na główne punkty widzenia w dokumencie. Model jest oceniany na debatach Izby Gmin Parlamentu Wielkiej Brytanii, ujawniając perspektywy z debat bez użycia etykietowanych danych i uzyskując lepsze wyniki niż poprzednie powiązane rozwiązania w ramach różnorodnych ocen.', 'ro': 'Explorăm cum să detectăm perspectivele oamenilor care ocupă o anumită propunere. Propunem o abordare de modelare bayesiană în care subiectele (sau propunerile) și perspectivele lor asociate (sau punctele de vedere) sunt modelate ca variabile latente. Cuvintele asociate cu subiecte sau perspective urmează diferite rute generative. Pe baza perspectivelor extrase, putem extrage propozițiile asociate de top din text pentru a genera un rezumat succint care permite o privire rapidă a punctelor de vedere principale dintr-un document. Modelul este evaluat pe baza dezbaterilor din Camera Comunelor a Parlamentului Regatului Unit, dezvăluind perspective din dezbateri fără utilizarea datelor etichetate și obținând rezultate mai bune decât soluțiile conexe anterioare în cadrul unei varietăți de evaluări.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo kako da otkrijemo perspektive ljudi koji okupljaju određenu predlogu. Predlažemo bazijski pristup modelima u kojem se teme (ili prijedlogi) i njihove povezani perspektive (ili pogledi) modeliraju kao latentne promjene. Rijeèi povezani sa temama ili perspektivama prate razlièite generativne puteve. Na temelju izvlačenih perspektiva, možemo izvući vrhunske povezane rečenice iz teksta kako bi stvorili sažetak koji omogućava brz pogled glavnih pogleda u dokumentu. Model se procjenjuje o debatima iz Kuće Commons parlamenta Britanije, otkrivajući perspektive iz debata bez upotrebe označenih podataka i dobivanja boljih rezultata nego prethodnih povezanih rešenja u raznim procenama.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න කොහොමද කියලා. අපි බේසියාන් මොඩිලින් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සම විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පස්සෙන්  අපිට පිළිබඳින්න පිළිබඳින්න පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන්, පිළිබඳින් ඉහළ සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන් වි මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ UK පාලමින්ටර් ගොඩනිස්සුන් ගොඩනිස්සුන් ගොඩනිස්සුන් ගොඩනිසා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳ කරලා තියෙන', 'so': 'Waxaynu baarinaynaa sida loo ogaano aragtida dadka ay leeyihiin soo jeedin. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab muuqashada Bayesian ah oo ay ka muuqato mada (ama soo jeedida) iyo aragtidooda la xiriira (ama aragtida) sida isbedelka ugu dambeeya. Ereyga la xiriira mada ama aragtida waxay raacaan wadooyin kala duduwan. Sida lagu saleyn karo aragtida la soo saaray, waxaan ka soo saari karnaa erayada sare ee la xiriiray, si aan u sameyno summar, kaasoo u sawiraa aragtida ugu dhaqsaha dukumentiga. Tusaale ahaan waxaa laga qiimeynayaa debaado ka soo baxay guriga baarlamaanka UK, waxaana ka muuqanayaa aragtida debaanka iyadoon isticmaalin macluumaad la qoray iyo helin resultooyin ka wanaagsan macluumaadyo hore oo qiimeyn kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker hur man upptäcker människors perspektiv som upptar ett visst förslag. Vi föreslår en Bayesian modellering ansats där ämnen (eller propositioner) och deras associerade perspektiv (eller synpunkter) modelleras som latenta variabler. Ord förknippade med ämnen eller perspektiv följer olika generativa vägar. Baserat på de extraherade perspektiven kan vi extrahera de översta associerade meningarna från text för att generera en kortfattad sammanfattning som möjliggör en snabb glimt av de viktigaste synpunkterna i ett dokument. Modellen utvärderas på debatter från underhuset i Storbritanniens parlament, avslöjar perspektiv från debatterna utan användning av märkta data och får bättre resultat än tidigare relaterade lösningar under en mängd olika utvärderingar.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் எப்படி மக்களின் பார்வைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் என்று கண்டறிந்து கொள்கிறோம் ஒரு சில பரிந் நாம் ஒரு பேயீசியன் மாதிரியும் செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் அதில் தலைப்பு தலைப்புகள் அல்லது பார்வைகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகள் வெவ்வேறு பொதுவான பொருள்களை பின்பற்று பெறுக்கப்பட்ட காட்சிகளை அடிப்படையில், நாம் உரையிலிருந்து மேல் தொடர்புடைய வாக்கியங்களை வெளியேற்ற முடியும், அது ஆவணத்தில் முக்கிய புள் இந்த மாதிரி விவாதத்தின் வீட்டில் இருந்து பிரச்சனைகள் பற்றி மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது, குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலை பயன்படுத்தாமல் விவாதத்திலிருந்து காட்சிகளை வெளிப்படு', 'ur': 'ہم کس طرح لوگوں کی نظر آگاہ کریں جو ایک مقررہ پیشنهاد کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک ایسی موڈلینگ طریقے سے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جہاں موضوع (یا پیشنهاد) اور ان کے ارتباط دار نظریں (یا نظریہ پوینٹ) لٹینٹ متغیروں کے طور پر موڈلیل کئے جاتے ہیں۔ موضوع یا نظریات کے ساتھ ارتباط کی کلمات مختلف جنرائیٹ روٹوں کی پیروی کرتی ہیں. اٹھائے ہوئے منظور پر، ہم متن سے اوپر متعلق ہوئے جماعتوں کو اٹھا سکتے ہیں تاکہ ایک سوسکینٹ جمع پیدا کریں جو ایک دکھانے میں سریع دکھانے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. یہ مدل انگلیسی پارلمانٹ کی کمونس کے گھروں میں سے بحث پر مطالبہ کیا جاتا ہے، مطالبہ کے بغیر لیبل ڈاٹ کے مطالبہ کی نظریں ظاہر کرتا ہے اور اگلوں سے بہتر نتیجے حاصل کرتا ہے جو مختلف مطالبات کے اندر مختلف ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz odamlarning ko'rinishini qanday aniqlashni ko'rganamiz. Bir necha talab qiladigan fikrlarni o'rganamiz. Biz BayxiyaName Name Koʻrsatilgan obʼektlarni asosida, biz matnning yuqori bogʻliq sonlarni chiqarish mumkin. Hujjatdagi asosiy koʻrinishida tez qisqarish imkoniyatini yaratish mumkin. Bu model AQSH парламентнинг палатадан баҳсламаларига тажовуз қилинади, баҳсли маълумотлардан фойдаланмаса ва аввалги маълумотлар маълумотлардан кўра яхшироқ натижаларни қабул қилаверади.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi tìm hiểu cách phát hiện quan điểm của mọi người đang đưa ra một đề xuất nhất định. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mô hình người Bayesian, nơi các chủ đề (hay các dự đoán) và các quan điểm tương ứng của họ được mô hình như là biến số tiềm năng. Những từ liên quan đến chủ đề hoặc triển vọng theo các đường hệ hệ khác nhau. Dựa trên các góc nhìn được trích ra, chúng ta có thể trích ra các câu sau cùng từ văn bản để tạo ra một bản tóm tắt ngắn gọn cho phép một cái nhìn nhanh chóng của các quan điểm chính trong một tài liệu. Kiểu này được đánh giá dựa trên các cuộc tranh luận của Hạ viện Anh Quốc, tiết lộ các quan điểm trong cuộc tranh luận mà không cần dùng dữ liệu có nhãn và đạt kết quả tốt hơn những giải pháp liên quan trước trong nhiều dự án.', 'bg': 'Проучваме как да откриваме перспективите на хората, които заемат определено предложение. Предлагаме Байсийски подход за моделиране, при който темите (или предложенията) и свързаните с тях перспективи (или гледни точки) са моделирани като латентни променливи. Думите, свързани с теми или перспективи, следват различни генеративни маршрути. Въз основа на извлечените перспективи можем да извлечем най-важните свързани изречения от текста, за да генерираме кратко резюме, което позволява бърз поглед към основните гледни точки в документа. Моделът се оценява на дебати от Камарата на общините на парламента на Обединеното кралство, разкривайки перспективи от дебатите без използването на етикетирани данни и получавайки по-добри резултати от предишните свързани решения при различни оценки.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo kako otkrivati perspektive ljudi koje okupljaju određeni prijedlog. Predlažemo Bayesijski modelirani pristup u kojem se teme (ili prijedloge) i njihove povezane perspektive (ili poglede) modeliraju kao latentne promjene. Riječi povezani s temama ili perspektivama prate različite generativne puteve. Na temelju izvlačenih perspektiva, možemo izvući vrhunske povezane rečenice iz teksta kako bi stvorili sažetak koji omogućava brz pogled glavnih pogleda u dokumentu. Model se procjenjuje o debatima iz kuće Commons parlamenta Britanije, otkrivajući perspektive iz debata bez primjene označenih podataka i dobivanja boljih rezultata od prethodnih povezanih rješenja u raznim procjenama.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken hoe we perspectieven van mensen kunnen detecteren die een bepaalde propositie innemen. We stellen een Bayesiaanse modelleringsbenadering voor waarbij onderwerpen (of proposities) en hun bijbehorende perspectieven (of gezichtspunten) worden gemodelleerd als latente variabelen. Woorden geassocieerd met onderwerpen of perspectieven volgen verschillende generatieve routes. Op basis van de geëxtraheerde perspectieven kunnen we de bovenste bijbehorende zinnen uit tekst extraheren om een beknopte samenvatting te genereren die een snelle glimp van de belangrijkste standpunten in een document mogelijk maakt. Het model wordt geëvalueerd op debatten van het Lagerhuis van het Britse parlement, waarbij perspectieven van de debatten worden onthuld zonder het gebruik van gelabelde gegevens en betere resultaten worden verkregen dan eerdere gerelateerde oplossingen onder verschillende evaluaties.', 'id': 'Kami mengeksplorasi bagaimana mendeteksi perspektif orang yang memenuhi sebuah proposi tertentu. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan modeling Bayesian di mana topik (atau proposisi) dan perspektif mereka terkait (atau sudut pandang) dipodelkan sebagai variabel latent. Kata-kata yang berhubungan dengan topik atau perspektif mengikuti rute generasi berbeda. Berdasarkan perspektif ekstrakt, kita dapat mengekstrak kalimat terkait atas dari teks untuk menghasilkan ringkasan singkat yang memungkinkan melihat cepat dari titik pandangan utama dalam dokumen. Model ini diuji dalam debat dari House of Commons dari Parlimen Inggris, mengungkap perspektif dari debat tanpa menggunakan data yang ditabel dan mendapatkan hasil yang lebih baik dari solusi terkait sebelumnya di bawah berbagai evaluasi.', 'de': 'Wir erforschen, wie man Perspektiven erkennt, die einen bestimmten Satz einnehmen. Wir schlagen einen Bayesschen Modellierungsansatz vor, bei dem Themen (oder Sätze) und ihre zugehörigen Perspektiven (oder Sichtweisen) als latente Variablen modelliert werden. Wörter, die mit Themen oder Perspektiven verbunden sind, folgen verschiedenen generativen Wegen. Basierend auf den extrahierten Perspektiven können wir die obersten zugehörigen Sätze aus Text extrahieren, um eine kurze Zusammenfassung zu generieren, die einen schnellen Einblick in die wichtigsten Standpunkte eines Dokuments ermöglicht. Das Modell wird anhand von Debatten des House of Commons des britischen Parlaments evaluiert, Perspektiven aus den Debatten ohne die Verwendung von markierten Daten enthüllt und bessere Ergebnisse als frühere verwandte Lösungen unter einer Vielzahl von Evaluierungen erzielt.', 'fa': 'ما کشف می کنیم چگونه تصور مردم را کشف کنیم که یک پیشنهاد معین را مشغول می کنند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش مدل\u200cسازی بایزی که موضوع (یا پیشنهاد) و نقطه\u200cهای مربوط به آنها (یا نقطه\u200cهای دیدگاه) به عنوان تغییرات latent مدل\u200cسازی می\u200cشوند. کلمات ارتباط با موضوع یا perspektivها مسیرهای ژنترافی متفاوت پیروی می کنند. بر اساس نقطه\u200cهای خارج شده، می\u200cتوانیم جمله\u200cهای بالای مرتبط را از متن خارج کنیم تا یک جمع نازل کننده را تولید کنیم که اجازه می\u200cدهد یک نگاه سریع از نقطه\u200cهای بنظر اصلی در یک سند. این مدل در مورد بحث های خانه کمونس پارلمان بریتانیا ارزیابی می شود، که نظرهای بحث را بدون استفاده از داده های بریتانیا نشان می دهد و نتیجه های بهتر از راه حل های رابطه قبلی در زیر یک جور ارزیابی است.', 'ko': '우리는 사람들이 어떤 명제에 대한 견해를 어떻게 발견하는지 탐색한다.또는 우리는 잠재적인 관점(또는 베일스 방법)을 제기하고 이를 잠재적인 변수로 모델링했다.화제나 관점과 관련된 단어는 서로 다른 생성 경로를 따른다.추출의 시각을 바탕으로 우리는 텍스트에서 맨 위의 관련 문장을 추출하여 간결한 요약을 만들어 문서의 주요 시각을 신속하게 훑어볼 수 있다.이 모델은 영국 의회 하원의 변론을 통해 평가를 하고 표기 데이터를 사용하지 않은 채 변론의 관점을 제시하며 각종 평가에서 이전 관련 해결 방안보다 더 좋은 결과를 얻었다.', 'tr': 'Biz adamlaryň perspektivlerini belli bir teklib etmäni nädip gözlemegini keşfetýäris. Biz Beýeziýaly modelleşdirmek approach nusgalary (ýa-da teklibler) we olaryň gollaşyk perspektivleri (ýa-da görnüş noktalary) soňky üýtgeşikleri hökmünde modellenir. Meýdançalar ýa-da perspektivler bilen baglanýan sözler farklı janlaşdyryş ýolary yzarlar. Taryh edilen gözüne görä, biz esaplaryň üstini metinden çekip, a şyk süýtgewleri senediň esasy noktalaryny çalt bir gözleme mümkin edip bileris. Bu model AB Parlamentiň Commons Palatasynyň debatlarynda deňlendirilýär, debatlardan etiket edilen maglumatlaryň ulanmasyndan we öňki çözgütlerden has gowy netijeleri aldyrylýar.', 'sw': 'Tunagundua namna ya kutambua mtazamo wa watu ambao unashughulikia pendekezo fulani. Tunazipendekeza mbinu za mifano ya Bayesia ambapo mada (au pendekezo) na mitazamo yao yanayohusiana (au mitazamo ya maoni) huwekwa kama mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni. Maneno yanayohusiana na mada au mitazamo yanafuata njia tofauti za kizalendo. Kwa mujibu wa mtazamo uliotolewa, tunaweza kuondoa hukumu za juu zinazohusiana na maandishi ili kutengeneza muhtasari wa muhtasari ambao unaruhusu mtazamo wa haraka katika nyaraka. Mfano huo unapitishwa kwenye mijadala ya Nyumba ya Commons Bunge la Uingereza, unaonyesha mitazamo kutoka kwenye mjadala huo bila kutumia taarifa zilizotajwa na kupata matokeo bora zaidi ya suluhisho zilizopita zinazohusiana na maelezo mbalimbali.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek hoe om mense se perspeksies te ontdek wat 'n sekere voorstelling besluit. Ons voorstel 'n Bayesian modellering toegang waar onderwerpe (of voorstellings) en hulle geassosieerde perspeksies (of aansigpunte) as latente veranderlikes gemodel word. Woorde geassosieer met onderwerpe of perspeksies volg verskillende genereerbare raate. Basies op die uitgevoerde perspeksies, kan ons die bo geassosieerde teikens van teks uitpak om 'n aansoek opsomming te genereer wat toelaat 'n vinnige aansig van die hoof aansigpunte in 'n dokument. Die model is uitgewerk op debate van die huis van die Commons van die VK-Parlament, wat perspeksies van die debate openbaar sonder die gebruik van gemerkte data en beter resultate kry as vorige verwante oplossings onder 'n verskillende evaluasies.", 'sq': 'Ne eksplorojmë si të zbulojmë perspektivat e njerëzve që përfshijnë një propozim të caktuar. Ne propozojmë një metodë modelimi Bayesian ku temat (ose propozimet) dhe perspektivat e tyre të lidhura (ose pikëpamjet) modelohen si ndryshues të fshehtë. Words associated with topics or perspectives follow different generative routes.  Bazuar në perspektivat e nxjerra, ne mund të nxjerrim frazat më të larta të lidhura nga teksti për të gjeneruar një përmbledhje të shkurtër që lejon një pamje të shpejtë të pikave kryesore të pamjes në një dokument. Modeli vlerësohet në debatet nga Dhoma e Komunave e Parlamentit të Mbretërisë së Bashkuar, duke zbuluar perspektivat nga debatet pa përdorimin e të dhënave të etiketuara dhe duke marrë rezultate më të mira se zgjidhjet e mëparshme të lidhura me të nën një varietet vlerësimesh.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger, hvordan man opdager folks perspektiver, der optager et bestemt forslag. Vi foreslår en Bayesian modellering tilgang, hvor emner (eller forslag) og deres tilknyttede perspektiver (eller synspunkter) modelleres som latente variabler. Ord, der er knyttet til emner eller perspektiver, følger forskellige generative ruter. Baseret på de udtrukne perspektiver, kan vi udtrække de øverste tilknyttede sætninger fra tekst for at generere et kortfattet resumé, der giver et hurtigt glimt af de vigtigste synspunkter i et dokument. Modellen evalueres på baggrund af debatter fra Underhuset i det britiske parlament, der afslører perspektiver fra debatterne uden brug af mærkede data og opnår bedre resultater end tidligere relaterede løsninger under en række evalueringer.', 'am': 'የሕዝብ ዓይኖችን እንዴት እንደሚገልጽ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የባይስያ ምሳሌ መግለጫ እና የባይስያ ጉዳዮች (ወይም ጉዳዮች) አካባቢዎች (ወይም የዓይነት አሳይ) እንደ ቀድሞው መለወጫ እንዲመስሉ እናሳስባታለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በአካባቢው ቦታዎች ላይ በተገኘው፣ ከጽሑፍ የተገኘውን የክፍለ ጉዳይ ማቀናጃ ማውጣት ይችላል፡፡ ምሳሌው ከዩንግሊክ ፓርላማ ቤት ካለፈ ውይይት ላይ በተለየ ድምፅ እና በተለያዩ ውይይቶች በተለያዩ ውይይቶች ላይ የተለየ ውይይቶችን እና የተሻለ ፍሬዎችን ከመቀድሞው በተለያዩ ውይይቶች ላይ ለማግኘት ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Biz insanların görünüşünü necə keşfetməsini təşkil edirik. Biz Bayeziya modellik approach təklif edirik ki, məsələlər (ya da təklif) və onların şəkildə olan perspektivlər (ya da göz nöqtələri) latent dəyişikliklər kimi modellik edilir. Məsələlər və perspektivlər ilə bağlı sözlər müxtəlif generativ yollarına uyur. Çıkarılmış perspektivlərə baxsaq, ən yüksək bağlı cümlələri mətndən çıxara bilərik ki, bir məktub içindəki ana görünüş nöqtələrinin tez görünüşünü yaratsın. Model İngiltere Parlamentinin Cumhuriyetlərin Palatasından mübahisələr haqqında değerlendirilir, etiketli məlumatların istifadəsi olmadan mübahisələrdən perspektivlər a çılır və əvvəlkilərin müxtəlif değerlendirmələrin altında daha yaxşı sonuçlar alırlar.', 'bn': 'আমরা খুঁজে বের করি কিভাবে মানুষের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি আবিষ্কার করতে পারে যারা একটি নির্দিষ্ট প্রস্তাব করে। আমরা একটি বেয়েশিয়ান মডেলিং পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে বিষয় (অথবা প্রস্তাব) এবং তাদের সাথে যোগাযোগী দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি (অথবা দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি)  বিষয় অথবা দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির সঙ্গে যুক্ত শব্দ অনুসরণ করে বিভিন্ন জেনারেটিভ রাস্তায়। বের করা দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির ভিত্তিতে, আমরা টেক্সট থেকে সর্বোচ্চ সংশ্লিষ্ট বাক্য উৎপাদন করতে পারি একটি সাক্সিকিন্ট সার্মার তৈরি করতে যা একটি নথিতে প যুক্তরাজ্যের সংসদের হাউস অফ কমন্স সংসদের বিতর্কের বিষয়ে মডেলটি মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন মূল্যের অধীনে ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া বিতর্', 'bs': 'Istražujemo kako da otkrijemo perspektive ljudi koji okupljaju određeni predlog. Predlažemo Bayesijski modelirani pristup u kojem se teme (ili prijedloge) i njihove povezane perspektive (ili perspektive mišljenja) modeliraju kao latentne promjene. Riječi povezani s temama ili perspektivama prate različite generativne puteve. Na temelju izvlačenih perspektiva, možemo izvući vrhunske povezane rečenice iz teksta kako bi stvorili sažetak koji omogućava brz pogled glavnih pogleda u dokumentu. Model se procjenjuje o debatima iz kuće Commons parlamenta Britanije, otkrivajući perspektive iz debata bez upotrebe označenih podataka i dobivanja boljih rezultata nego prethodnih povezanih rješenja u raznim procenama.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես հայտնաբերել մարդկանց տեսանկյունները, որոնք ընդունում են որոշակի առաջարկ: We propose a Bayesian modelling approach where topics (or propositions) and their associated perspectives (or viewpoints) are modeled as latent variables.  Բառերը, որոնք կապված են թեմաների կամ տեսանկյունների հետ, հետևում են տարբեր սերունդների ուղիներին: Հաշվի առնելով արտադրված տեսանկյուններից, մենք կարող ենք վերջին ասոցացված նախադասությունները հեռացնել տեքստից, որպեսզի ստեղծենք կարճ համառոտագրություն, որը թույլ է տալիս արագ տեսնել փաստաթղթի հիմնական տեսանկյունները: Մոդելը գնահատվում է Միացյալ Թագավորության համայնքային խորհրդատվության քննարկումների արդյունքում, բացահայտում է քննարկումների տեսանկյունները առանց պիտակավորված տվյալների օգտագործման և ավելի լավ արդյունքներ ստանում, քան նախորդ կապված լուծումները բազմաթիվ գնահ', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme, jak odhalit perspektivy lidí, které zaujímají určitý návrh. Navrhujeme Bayesovský modelovací přístup, kdy jsou témata (nebo návrhy) a s nimi související perspektivy (nebo pohledy) modelovány jako latentní proměnné. Slova spojená s tématy nebo perspektivy sledují různé generační cesty. Na základě extrahovaných perspektiv můžeme extrahovat nejvyšší související věty z textu a vytvořit stručné shrnutí, které umožňuje rychlý nahlédnout do hlavních pohledů v dokumentu. Model je hodnocen na diskuzích Dolní sněmovny britského parlamentu, odhaluje perspektivy z debat bez použití označených dat a dosahuje lepších výsledků než předchozí související řešení v rámci různých hodnocení.', 'ca': "Explorem com detectar les perspectives de la gent que ocupen una certa proposició. Proposem un enfocament de modelació bayèsia on els temes (o proposacions) i les seves perspectives (o punts de vista) són modelats com variables latents. Les paraules associades amb temes o perspectives segueixen rutes diferents de generació. Sobre la base de les perspectives extraites, podem extrair les frases superiors associades del text per generar un resum succint que permet un ràpid ull dels punts de vista principals d'un document. El model es valora en debats de la Cámara de Comunes del Parlamento del Regne Unit, revelant perspectives dels debats sense utilitzar dades etiquetades i obtenint millors resultats que solucions relacionades anteriors sota una varietat d'evaluacions.", 'et': 'Me uurime, kuidas tuvastada inimeste perspektiive, mis hõlmavad teatud ettepanekut. Pakume välja Bayesi modelleerimise lähenemisviisi, kus teemad (või ettepanekud) ja nendega seotud perspektiivid (või vaatepunktid) modelleeritakse latentsete muutujatena. Teemade või perspektiividega seotud sõnad järgivad erinevaid generatiivseid marsruute. Tuginedes ekstraheeritud perspektiividele, saame ekstraheerida tekstist peamised seotud laused, et luua lühike kokkuvõte, mis võimaldab kiiresti vaadata dokumendi peamisi vaatepunkte. Mudelit hinnatakse Ühendkuningriigi parlamendi alamkoja arutelude põhjal, paljastades arutelude perspektiive ilma märgistatud andmete kasutamiseta ja saavutades paremaid tulemusi kui varasemad seotud lahendused erinevate hinnangute alusel.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme, miten havaitaan ihmisten näkökulmat, jotka vievät tietyn ehdotuksen. Ehdotamme bayesilaista mallinnusta, jossa aiheet (tai ehdotukset) ja niihin liittyvät näkökulmat (tai näkökulmat) mallinnetaan latentteina muuttujina. Aiheisiin tai näkökulmiin liittyvät sanat kulkevat eri generatiivisia reittejä. Poistettujen näkökulmien perusteella voimme poimia tekstistä tärkeimmät lauseet ja luoda tiivistelmän, joka mahdollistaa nopean katsauksen asiakirjan keskeisiin näkökulmiin. Mallia arvioidaan Yhdistyneen kuningaskunnan parlamentin alahuoneen keskusteluissa, joissa tuodaan esiin näkökulmia keskusteluista ilman merkittyä dataa ja saadaan parempia tuloksia kuin aikaisemmissa vastaavissa ratkaisuissa erilaisissa arvioinneissa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukne piye ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno perspektan wong liyane We proposal a bayesuan modelling method here, as the Subjects (or proposal) and their Associate perspectual (or view points) are modelld as LAMP Variable. structural navigation Mungkin Ngawe Peringuhaan langgambar sing dibutuhke Model sing gek dhéwé éntuk ngéwé debasar winih ning Bukaké Komunasi sing berarti sawetara winih sing berarti sawetara karo perusahaan data sing berarti tambah karo perusahaan sistem sing luwih apik sing bakal terus tambah karo perusahaan langgar sampek winih sampek winih.', 'he': 'אנחנו חוקרים איך לגלות את הנקודות של אנשים שמעסיקים הצעה מסוימת. אנו מציעים גישה לדוגמא בייזית שבו נושאים (או הצעות) והנקודות הנקודות שלהם (או נקודות מבט) מודלים כמשתנים מוסתורים. מילים שקשורות לנושאים או נקודות מבט עוקבות אחר דרכים דורות שונות. בהתבסס על הנקודות הנוצאות, אנחנו יכולים להוציא את המשפטים העליונים הקשורים מהטקסט כדי ליצור סכם קצר שמאפשר להסתכל מהר על הנקודות העיקריות במסמך. הדוגמא הוערכה על דיון מבית הקומונס של הפרלמנט הבריטי, חושף פרספקטיבות מהדיון בלי להשתמש במידע המתוויד ולהשיג תוצאות טובות יותר משפתרונות קודמות שקשורות תחת מגוון של הערכות.', 'sk': 'Raziskujemo, kako zaznati perspektive ljudi, ki zasedajo določen predlog. Predlagamo bajzijski pristop modeliranja, kjer teme (ali predlogi) in z njimi povezane perspektive (ali stališča) modeliramo kot latentne spremenljivke. Besede, povezane s temami ali perspektivami, sledijo različnim generativnim potem. Na podlagi izvlečenih perspektiv lahko iz besedila izvlečemo zgornje povezane stavke in ustvarimo kratek povzetek, ki omogoča hiter vpogled v glavne stališče dokumenta. Model je ocenjen na podlagi razprav v spodnjem domu parlamenta Združenega kraljestva, ki razkriva perspektive iz razprav brez uporabe označenih podatkov in pridobi boljše rezultate od prejšnjih sorodnih rešitev v okviru različnih ocen.', 'ha': "Tuna gane jinsi za'a gane idãnun mutãne da ke karɓi wani zato. We propose a Bayesian modelling approach where topics (or propositions) and their associated perspectives (or viewpoints) are modeled as latent variables.  @ action: button Basan da masu motsa masu motsa, za'a iya nuna cewa masu husũma daga matsayin, don mu iya ƙiƙiro wani ƙarami na succint wanda ke yarda da wata gafuwa ta fara ɗaya cikin takardar. Ana ƙaddara motel a kan jãyayya daga House of Commons of Bulgar UK, yana bayyana misãlai daga jãyayya bila ya yi amfani da wasu data na taƙaita kuma a sami mafi kyau daga fassarar masu da aka sani a gabãnin haka, a cikin wasu misãlai dabam-dabam.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མི་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣེ་འདྲ་བ་གཅིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་གསལ་འདྲ་བ་དང་བློ་གཏད་པའི་ཚོགས་སྣང་མིན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གནད་དོན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཡི་གེ་ལའང་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཞན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཡོད། དམིགས་བསལ་བའི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་མཐོང་བའི་ཚིག The model is evaluated on debates from the House of Commons of the UK Parliament, revealing perspectives from the debates without the use of labelled data and obtaining better results than previous related solutions under a variety of evaluations.'}
{'en': 'i have a feeling trump will win.................. : Forecasting Winners and Losers from User Predictions on Twitter', 'ar': '"لدي شعور بأن ترامب سيفوز ..................": توقع الفائزين والخاسرين من توقعات المستخدم على Twitter', 'es': '«Tengo la sensación de que Trump ganará...»: Pronosticando ganadores y perdedores a partir de las predicciones de los usuarios en Twitter', 'fr': "«\xa0J'ai le sentiment que Trump va gagner...\xa0»\xa0: Prévoir les gagnants et les perdants à partir des prédictions des utilisateurs sur Twitter", 'pt': '“tenho a sensação de que o trunfo vencerá ...................”: Previsão de vencedores e perdedores de previsões de usuários no Twitter', 'ja': '「私はトランプが勝つと感じています..................」： Twitterのユーザー予測から勝者と敗者を予測する', 'zh': '"我有一觉,特朗普胜............":以Twitter用户占赢家输家', 'hi': '"मुझे लगता है कि ट्रम्प जीत जाएगा .......................: चहचहाना पर उपयोगकर्ता भविष्यवाणियों से विजेताओं और हारने वालों का पूर्वानुमान', 'ru': '«У меня есть чувство, что козырь победит..................»: Прогнозирование победителей и проигравших из прогнозов пользователей в Twitter', 'ga': '“Tá mé ag mothú go mbeidh an bua ag trump...................”: Buaiteoirí agus Cailliúnaithe Réamhaisnéise ó Úsáideoirí Tuartha ar Twitter', 'ka': 'თმამ ფსგჟრგჲ, ფვ რპყმო ღვ ოჲბვეთ... მომხმარებელი წინასწორებების და დასრულებელი Twitter-ში', 'hu': '"Van egy olyan érzésem, hogy Trump fog győzni.........." A győztesek és vesztesek előrejelzése a felhasználói jóslásokból a Twitteren', 'el': "Έχω ένα προαίσθημα ότι θα νικήσει..................': Προβλέψεις νικητών και ηττημένων από προβλέψεις χρηστών στο Twitter", 'it': "'Ho la sensazione che trionferà.........' Previsione di vincitori e perdenti dalle previsioni degli utenti su Twitter", 'mk': '"Имам чувство дека трупот ќе победи..." Предложување на победниците и губитниците од предвидувањата на корисниците на Твитер', 'lt': '"Turiu jausmą, kad trumpas laimės..........": Naudotojų prognozių laimėtojų ir pralaimėtojų prognozė Twitter', 'ml': "'എനിക്ക് തോന്നുന്നു ട്രൂപ്പ് ജയിക്കും... ' ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ മുന്\u200dഗണന്മാരില്\u200d നിന്നും വിജയികളും നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ടവരും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന", 'mt': '"I have a feeling trump will win..................": It-Tbassir tar-Rebbieħa u t-Telf minn Tbassir tal-Utenti fuq Twitter', 'ms': "'I have a feeling trump will win..................': Ramalan Pemenang dan Pengkalah dari Ramalan Pengguna di Twitter", 'pl': 'Mam przeczucie, że Trumpf wygra. Prognozowanie zwycięzców i przegranych z prognoz użytkowników na Twitterze', 'kk': '"Менің көпшілігім жеңілейді .........................." Твиттердегі пайдаланушының алдындағы жеңілдерді және жоғалтушыларды бақылау', 'ro': 'Am sentimentul că atunci câştigă... Prognozarea câștigătorilor și pierzătorilor din predicțiile utilizatorilor pe Twitter', 'mn': '"Надад тавьсан мэдрэмж ялах болно ....................... Твиттерийн Хожилагчид болон алдагчид', 'no': '"Eg har ein følelse som trump vil vinna ....................... Forhåndsvising av vinner og taparar frå brukarar-forhåndsvising på Twitter', 'sr': 'Imam osećaj da će trup pobijediti..................... Predviđanje pobednika i gubitnika iz predviđanja korisnika na Twitter-u', 'si': 'මට දැනෙනවා ට්\u200dරැම්ප් එකක් දිනයි..................... පාවිච්චි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විනාශකයෝ සහ නැතිවෙන්නේ.', 'so': "'waxaan haystaa buuqa dareemeysan ayaa guulaysan doona........................ Forecasting Winners and Losers from User Predictions on Twitter", 'sv': '"Jag har en känsla av att trumpet kommer att vinna.........." Prognosera vinnare och förlorare från användarförutsägelser på Twitter', 'ta': "'நான் ஒரு உணர்வு குதிக்கை வெற்றி வேண்டும் ......................' Twitter யில் பயனர் முன்னேற்றங்களில் இருந்து வெற்றியாளர்கள் மற்றும் இழந்தவர்கள் முன்வாக்குதல்", 'ur': "'میرے پاس ایک احساس ترمپ غالب آئے گا ................':  توئیٹر پر کارساز کی پیشنهاد سے غالبوں اور خسارہوں کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے", 'vi': "'Tôi có cảm giác thắng cuộc sẽ thắng... Nhóm thắng và thua từ dự đoán người dùng trên Twitter", 'uz': "'mening bir hisob musiqasi muvaffaqiyatli bo'ladi...' ' Name", 'bg': 'Имам чувството, че Тръмп ще победи. Прогнозиране на победители и губещи от потребителски прогнози в Туитър', 'nl': "'Ik heb het gevoel dat Trumpf zal winnen............': Voorspelling van winnaars en verliezers op basis van gebruikersvoorspellingen op Twitter", 'da': '"Jeg har en fornemmelse trumf vil vinde.................." Forudsigelse af vindere og tabere fra brugerforudsigelser på Twitter', 'de': "'Ich habe das Gefühl, dass Trumpf gewinnen wird............': Vorhersage von Gewinnern und Verlierern anhand von Nutzerprognosen auf Twitter", 'hr': 'Imam osjećaj da će trup pobijediti... Predviđanje pobjednika i gubitnika iz predviđanja korisnika na Twitter-u', 'id': "'Aku punya perasaan trump akan menang..................': Memprediksi Pemenang dan Pengkalah dari Prediksi Pengguna di Twitter", 'ko': '"트럼프가 이길 것 같아..."트위터의 사용자를 통해 승자와 패자를 예측하다', 'sw': "'nina hisia kuwa mabomu yatashinda...................': Kutangaza Washindi na Washindi kutoka Tamko za Mtumiaji kwenye mtandao wa Twita", 'fa': 'من احساس ميکنم که ترامپ برنده ميشه پیش\u200cبینی برنده\u200cها و بازنده\u200cها از پیشنهاد کاربر توئیتر', 'am': "'ስሜ ድምፅ አሸንፋለች... ' አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር", 'af': '"Ek het \'n voel tromp sal win..................\':  Voorskou van Winners en Losers van Gebruiker Voorskou op Twitter', 'az': '"M톛n hiss edir톛m ki, trump qalib g톛l톛c톛k......................." 캻stifad톛칞il톛rin T칬vratdak캼 Qazananlar캼 v톛 Kay캼blar캼', 'tr': "'I have a feeling trump will win.............':  Ullançy Maslahatlaryndan Kazananlar we Loserler Taýuter", 'bn': "'i have a feeling trump will win..................':  টুইটারে ব্যবহারকারী পছন্দ থেকে বিজয়ী এবং হারিয়েছেন", 'bs': 'Imam osjećaj da će trup pobijediti... Predviđanje pobjednika i gubitnika iz predviđanja korisnika na Twitter-u', 'sq': "'i have a feeling trump will win..................':  Parashikimi i fituesve dhe humbësve nga parashikimet e përdoruesve në Twitter", 'ca': '"Tinc la sensació que la trompa guanyarà..................": La previsió dels guanyadors i perdedors de les prediccions dels usuaris a Twitter', 'cs': 'Mám pocit, že trumf vyhraje. Prognóza vítězů a prohrávajících z uživatelských predikcí na Twitteru', 'et': 'Mul on tunne, et trump võidab. Võitjate ja kaotajate prognoosimine kasutajate prognooside põhjal Twitteris', 'hy': '"Ես ունեմ մի զգացողություն, որ թռոմպը կհաղթեն .........": Թվիթերի օգտագործողների կանխատեսումներից հաղթողների և կորցողների կանխատեսումը', 'fi': 'Minulla on tunne, että valtti voittaa. Voittajien ja häviäjien ennustaminen käyttäjien ennusteista Twitterissä', 'sk': "'Imam občutek, da bo premagal............': Napovedovanje zmagovalcev in poražencev iz napovedi uporabnikov na Twitterju", 'jv': "'Aku sujine sampeyan trus menehi ... ... ... ...': Winters lan Pallare Jabun", 'he': '"יש לי הרגשה שטרופ ינצח..." צפייה של נצחים ומפסידים מהצפיות של משתמשים בטוויטר', 'bo': "'ངས་ལ་འཕགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་ཞིག་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་ཅིན་.............':  Forecasting Winners and Losers from User Predictions on Twitter", 'ha': "'ina da wani matsayi zai rinjãya... Predictions from user Predictions on Twitter"}
{'en': 'Social media users often make explicit predictions about upcoming events. Such statements vary in the degree of certainty the author expresses toward the outcome : Leonardo DiCaprio will win Best Actor vs. Leonardo DiCaprio may win or No way Leonardo wins !. Can popular beliefs on social media predict who will win? To answer this question, we build a corpus of tweets annotated for veridicality on which we train a log-linear classifier that detects positive veridicality with high precision. We then forecast uncertain outcomes using the wisdom of crowds, by aggregating users’ explicit predictions. Our method for forecasting winners is fully automated, relying only on a set of contenders as input. It requires no training data of past outcomes and outperforms sentiment and tweet volume baselines on a broad range of contest prediction tasks. We further demonstrate how our approach can be used to measure the reliability of individual accounts’ predictions and retrospectively identify surprise outcomes.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يقوم مستخدمو وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي بتنبؤات صريحة حول الأحداث القادمة. تختلف مثل هذه العبارات في درجة اليقين التي يعبر عنها المؤلف تجاه النتيجة: "ليوناردو دي كابريو سيفوز بجائزة أفضل ممثل" مقابل "قد يفوز ليوناردو دي كابريو" أو "لا يمكن أن يفوز ليوناردو بأي حال من الأحوال!". هل يمكن للمعتقدات الشائعة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي أن تتنبأ بمن سيفوز؟ للإجابة على هذا السؤال ، قمنا ببناء مجموعة من التغريدات المشروحة للتأكد من صدقها والتي ندرب عليها مصنفًا لوغاريتميًا خطيًا يكتشف التحقق الإيجابي بدقة عالية. ثم نتوقع نتائج غير مؤكدة باستخدام حكمة الجماهير ، من خلال تجميع تنبؤات المستخدمين الصريحة. طريقتنا في التنبؤ بالفائزين آلية بالكامل ، وتعتمد فقط على مجموعة من المتنافسين كمدخلات. لا يتطلب أي بيانات تدريبية للنتائج السابقة ويتفوق على المشاعر وخطوط أساس حجم التغريدات في مجموعة واسعة من مهام التنبؤ بالمسابقة. نوضح كذلك كيف يمكن استخدام نهجنا لقياس موثوقية تنبؤات الحسابات الفردية وتحديد النتائج المفاجئة بأثر رجعي.', 'fr': "Les utilisateurs des réseaux sociaux font souvent des prévisions explicites sur les événements à venir. Ces affirmations varient selon le degré de certitude que l'auteur exprime quant au résultat\xa0: «\xa0Leonardo DiCaprio gagnera le prix du meilleur acteur\xa0» contre «\xa0Leonardo DiCaprio pourrait gagner\xa0» ou «\xa0Pas question que Leonardo gagne\xa0!\xa0». Les croyances populaires sur les réseaux sociaux peuvent-elles prédire qui va gagner\xa0? Pour répondre à cette question, nous créons un corpus de tweets annotés pour la véridicalité sur lequel nous entraînons un classificateur log-linéaire qui détecte la véridicalité positive avec une grande précision. Nous prévoyons ensuite des résultats incertains en utilisant la sagesse des foules, en agrégeant les prédictions explicites des utilisateurs. Notre méthode de prévision des gagnants est entièrement automatisée et ne repose que sur un ensemble de concurrents. Il ne nécessite aucune donnée d'entraînement sur les résultats passés et surpasse les niveaux de référence des sentiments et du volume de tweets pour un large éventail de tâches de prédiction de concours. Nous démontrons également comment notre approche peut être utilisée pour mesurer la fiabilité des prévisions des comptes individuels et identifier rétrospectivement les résultats inattendus.", 'es': 'Los usuarios de las redes sociales suelen hacer predicciones explícitas sobre los próximos eventos. Tales afirmaciones varían en el grado de certeza que el autor expresa hacia el resultado: «Leonardo DiCaprio ganará el premio al mejor actor» frente a «Leonardo DiCaprio puede ganar» o «¡Leonardo no gana de ninguna manera!». ¿Pueden las creencias populares en las redes sociales predecir quién ganará? Para responder a esta pregunta, creamos un corpus de tuits anotados para verificar la veracidad en el que entrenamos un clasificador logarítmico lineal que detecta la veridicalidad positiva con alta precisión. Luego, pronosticamos resultados inciertos utilizando la sabiduría de las multitudes, agregando las predicciones explícitas de los usuarios. Nuestro método para pronosticar ganadores es totalmente automatizado, y solo se basa en un conjunto de contendientes como aportación. No requiere datos de entrenamiento de resultados pasados y supera a las líneas base de opinión y volumen de tuits en una amplia gama de tareas de predicción de concursos. Además, demostramos cómo se puede utilizar nuestro enfoque para medir la fiabilidad de las predicciones de las cuentas individuales e identificar retrospectivamente los resultados inesperados.', 'pt': 'Os usuários de mídia social geralmente fazem previsões explícitas sobre os próximos eventos. Tais afirmações variam no grau de certeza que o autor expressa em relação ao resultado: “Leonardo DiCaprio vai ganhar Melhor Ator” vs. “Leonardo DiCaprio pode ganhar” ou “De jeito nenhum Leonardo ganha!”. As crenças populares nas mídias sociais podem prever quem vencerá? Para responder a essa pergunta, construímos um corpus de tweets anotados para veracidade no qual treinamos um classificador log-linear que detecta veridicidade positiva com alta precisão. Em seguida, prevemos resultados incertos usando a sabedoria das multidões, agregando as previsões explícitas dos usuários. Nosso método de previsão de vencedores é totalmente automatizado, contando apenas com um conjunto de concorrentes como entrada. Ele não requer dados de treinamento de resultados anteriores e supera as linhas de base de sentimento e volume de tweets em uma ampla variedade de tarefas de previsão de concursos. Demonstramos ainda como nossa abordagem pode ser usada para medir a confiabilidade das previsões de contas individuais e identificar retrospectivamente resultados surpreendentes.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアユーザーは、今後のイベントについて明示的に予測することがよくあります。 このような記述は、「レオナルド・ディカプリオが最優秀主演男優賞を受賞する」対「レオナルド・ディカプリオが受賞する可能性がある」または「レオナルドが受賞する可能性はありません！」という結果に向けて、著者が表現する確実性の程度によって異なります。 ソーシャルメディア上の人気のある信念は、誰が勝つかを予測することができますか？ この質問に答えるために、正確性のために注釈が付けられたツイートのコーパスを構築し、正の正確性を高精度で検出する対数線形分類子をトレーニングします。 その後、ユーザーの明示的な予測を集約することにより、クラウドの知恵を使用して不確実な結果を予測します。 勝者を予測するための当社の方法は完全に自動化されており、インプットとしての競争相手のセットのみに依存しています。 過去の結果のトレーニングデータを必要とせず、幅広いコンテスト予測タスクで感情やツイート量のベースラインを上回ります。 私たちはさらに、私たちのアプローチを使用して、個々のアカウントの予測の信頼性を測定し、遡及的にサプライズアウトカムを特定する方法を実証します。', 'ru': 'Пользователи социальных сетей часто делают ясные прогнозы о предстоящих событиях. Такие заявления различаются по степени уверенности, которую автор выражает в отношении результата: «Леонардо Ди Каприо победит в номинации« Лучший актер »против« Леонардо Ди Каприо может победить »или« Леонардо ни за что не победит! ». Могут ли популярные убеждения в социальных сетях предсказать, кто победит? Чтобы ответить на этот вопрос, мы строим корпус твитов, аннотированных для веридиальности, на котором мы обучаем логарифмический линейный классификатор, который обнаруживает положительную веридиальность с высокой точностью. Затем мы прогнозируем неопределенные результаты, используя мудрость толпы, путем агрегирования явных прогнозов пользователей. Наш метод прогнозирования победителей полностью автоматизирован, полагаясь только на набор претендентов в качестве входных данных. Он не требует данных обучения о прошлых результатах и превосходит базовые значения настроений и объема твитов по широкому кругу задач прогнозирования соревнований. Мы далее демонстрируем, как наш подход может быть использован для измерения надежности прогнозов отдельных счетов и ретроспективного определения неожиданных результатов.', 'zh': '社交媒体用户常明占。 其言异于作者,莱昂纳多·迪卡普里奥将赢最佳男主角"与"莱昂纳多·迪卡普里奥或赢"、"莱昂纳多不可胜"! 社交媒体之行信孰胜哉? 为此构一推文语料库,推文注为真,练一对数线性分类器,可高精度检正。 然后总用户之明占,用人之智不定。 吾卜获胜者之道全自动化,惟恃群竞争者为输。 不须旧习数,且博胜情推文量基线。 示我以度个人账户可靠性,追性地知不虞。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया उपयोगकर्ता अक्सर आगामी घटनाओं के बारे में स्पष्ट भविष्यवाणियां करते हैं। इस तरह के बयान निश्चितता की डिग्री में भिन्न होते हैं जो लेखक परिणाम की ओर व्यक्त करता है: "लियोनार्डो डिकैप्रियो सर्वश्रेष्ठ अभिनेता जीतेंगे" बनाम "लियोनार्डो डिकैप्रियो जीत सकते हैं" या "लियोनार्डो जीतने का कोई तरीका नहीं है! क्या सोशल मीडिया पर लोकप्रिय मान्यताएं भविष्यवाणी कर सकती हैं कि कौन जीतेगा? इस प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए, हम वेरिडिकलिटी के लिए एनोटेट किए गए ट्वीट्स का एक कॉर्पस बनाते हैं जिस पर हम एक लॉग-रैखिक क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं जो उच्च परिशुद्धता के साथ सकारात्मक सत्यापन का पता लगाता है। फिर हम उपयोगकर्ताओं की स्पष्ट भविष्यवाणियों को एकत्रित करके भीड़ के ज्ञान का उपयोग करके अनिश्चित परिणामों का पूर्वानुमान लगाते हैं। विजेताओं की भविष्यवाणी के लिए हमारी विधि पूरी तरह से स्वचालित है, केवल इनपुट के रूप में दावेदारों के एक सेट पर निर्भर करती है। इसके लिए पिछले परिणामों के प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है और प्रतियोगिता भविष्यवाणी कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर भावना और ट्वीट वॉल्यूम बेसलाइन को मात देता है। हम आगे प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारे दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग व्यक्तिगत खातों की भविष्यवाणियों की विश्वसनीयता को मापने और पूर्वव्यापी रूप से आश्चर्यजनक परिणामों की पहचान करने के लिए कैसे किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Is minic a dhéanann úsáideoirí meáin shóisialta tuar follasach faoi imeachtaí atá le teacht. Athraíonn ráitis den sórt sin ó thaobh na cinnteachta a chuireann an t-údar in iúl maidir leis an toradh: “Beidh an bua ag Leonardo DiCaprio ar an Aisteoir is Fearr” vs “Is féidir le Leonardo DiCaprio an bua a fháil” nó “Níl an bua ag Leonardo!”. An féidir le tuairimí coitianta ar na meáin shóisialta a thuar cé a bheidh an bua? Chun an cheist seo a fhreagairt, déanaimid corpas de thvuíteanna a bhfuil anót orthu maidir le fírinneacht a thógáil, ar a gcuirimid oiliúint ar aicmitheoir log-líneach a bhraitheann fírinneacht dhearfach le cruinneas ard. Déanaimid réamhaisnéis ansin ar thorthaí neamhchinnte ag baint úsáide as eagna na sluaite, trí thuar follasach na n-úsáideoirí a chomhiomlánú. Tá ár modh chun buaiteoirí a thuar go hiomlán uathoibrithe, ag brath ar shraith iomaitheoir amháin mar ionchur. Ní éilíonn sé aon sonraí oiliúna ar thorthaí san am a chuaigh thart agus sáraíonn sé bonnlínte toirte meon agus tweetanna ar raon leathan de thascanna chun comórtais a thuar. Léirímid freisin conas is féidir ár gcur chuige a úsáid chun iontaofacht tuar na gcuntas aonair a thomhas agus chun torthaí iontasacha a shainaithint go cúlghabhálach.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média felhasználói gyakran kifejezett előrejelzéseket tesznek a közelgő eseményekről. Az ilyen kijelentések eltérőek a szerző által az eredményhez kapcsolódó bizonyosság tekintetében: "Leonardo DiCaprio nyeri a legjobb színészt" kontra "Leonardo DiCaprio nyerhet" vagy "Kizárt, hogy Leonardo nyer!". Megjósolhatják-e a közösségi médiában a népszerű hitek, hogy ki fog nyerni? Ennek a kérdésnek a megválaszolásához egy olyan tweetekből álló korpuszt építünk, amelyre a hitelesség szempontjából megjegyzett loglineáris osztályozót képezünk, amely nagy pontossággal felismeri a pozitív hitelességet. Ezután a tömegek bölcsességével, a felhasználók explicit előrejelzéseinek összesítésével előrejelzünk bizonytalan eredményeket. A győztesek előrejelzésének módszere teljesen automatizált, csak egy sor versenyzőre támaszkodik, mint input. Nincs szükség a múltbeli eredményekről szóló edzési adatokra, és a versenyelőrejelzési feladatok széles skáláján felülmúlja az érzelmeket és a tweet mennyiségét. Ezenkívül bemutatjuk, hogyan lehet megközelítésünket az egyes számlák előrejelzéseinek megbízhatóságának mérésére és visszamenőleg azonosítani a meglepetések eredményeit.', 'el': 'Οι χρήστες των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης συχνά κάνουν σαφείς προβλέψεις σχετικά με επερχόμενα γεγονότα. Τέτοιες δηλώσεις διαφέρουν ως προς το βαθμό βεβαιότητας που εκφράζει ο συγγραφέας ως προς το αποτέλεσμα: "Ο Λεονάρντο ΝτιΚάπριο θα κερδίσει τον καλύτερο ηθοποιό" εναντίον του Λεονάρντο ΝτιΚάπριο μπορεί να κερδίσει" ή "Αποκλείεται να κερδίσει ο Λεονάρντο ΝτιΚάπριο!". Μπορούν οι δημοφιλείς πεποιθήσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης να προβλέψουν ποιος θα κερδίσει; Για να απαντήσουμε σε αυτή την ερώτηση, χτίζουμε ένα σώμα σχολιασμένων tweets για αληθοφανεία πάνω στο οποίο εκπαιδεύουμε έναν γραμμικό ταξινομητή που ανιχνεύει θετική αληθοφανεία με υψηλή ακρίβεια. Στη συνέχεια, προβλέπουμε αβέβαια αποτελέσματα χρησιμοποιώντας τη σοφία του πλήθους, συγκεντρώνοντας ρητές προβλέψεις των χρηστών. Η μέθοδος πρόβλεψης νικητών είναι πλήρως αυτοματοποιημένη, βασιζόμενος μόνο σε ένα σύνολο διαγωνιζομένων ως εισροή. Δεν απαιτεί δεδομένα κατάρτισης για προηγούμενα αποτελέσματα και ξεπερνά τις γραμμές βάσης συναισθημάτων και όγκου tweets σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών πρόβλεψης διαγωνισμού. Επιδεικνύουμε περαιτέρω πώς η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη μέτρηση της αξιοπιστίας των προβλέψεων μεμονωμένων λογαριασμών και τον αναδρομικό προσδιορισμό των αποτελεσμάτων έκπληξης.', 'it': "Gli utenti dei social media spesso fanno previsioni esplicite sui prossimi eventi. Tali affermazioni variano nel grado di certezza che l'autore esprime nei confronti del risultato: 'Leonardo DiCaprio vincerà il miglior attore' contro 'Leonardo DiCaprio potrebbe vincere' o 'Leonardo DiCaprio non vincerà!'. Le credenze popolari sui social media possono prevedere chi vincerà? Per rispondere a questa domanda, costruiamo un corpus di tweet annotati per veridicità su cui addestriamo un classificatore log-lineare che rileva la veridicità positiva con alta precisione. Prevediamo quindi risultati incerti utilizzando la saggezza delle folle, aggregando le previsioni esplicite degli utenti. Il nostro metodo di previsione dei vincitori è completamente automatizzato, basandosi solo su una serie di concorrenti come input. Non richiede dati di allenamento sui risultati passati e supera le linee di riferimento del volume di sentiment e tweet su un'ampia gamma di attività di previsione dei concorsi. Dimostriamo inoltre come il nostro approccio possa essere utilizzato per misurare l'affidabilità delle previsioni dei singoli conti e identificare retrospettivamente i risultati a sorpresa.", 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos naudotojai dažnai aiškiai prognozuoja būsimus įvykius. Tokie pareiškimai skiriasi tam tikru mastu, kurį autorius išreiškia dėl rezultato: "Leonardo DiCaprio laimės geriausias aktorius" prieš "Leonardo DiCaprio gali laimėti" arba "Leonardo negali laimėti!". Ar populiarūs įsitikinimai socialinėje žiniasklaidoje gali nuspėti, kas laimės? Atsakydami į šį klausimą, mes sukuriame daugybę tweetų, anotuotų dėl tikrovės, kuriuose treniruojame log-linijinį klasifikatorių, kuris labai tiksliai nustato teigiamą tikrovę. Tuomet prognozuojame neapibrėžtus rezultatus naudojant visuomenės išmintingumą, suvestinę aiškias naudotojų prognozes. Mūsų laimėtojų prognozavimo metodas yra visiškai automatizuotas, remdamasis tik konkurentų rinkiniu kaip įnašu. Jam nereikalaujama mokymo duomenų apie ankstesnius rezultatus ir rezultatus sentimento ir tweeto apimties bazėse, susijusiose su įvairiomis konkursų prognozavimo užduotimis. Toliau parodysime, kaip mūsų požiūris gali būti naudojamas vertinant atskirų sąskaitų prognozių patikimumą ir atgaline data nustatant nustebintus rezultatus.', 'ms': "Pengguna media sosial sering membuat ramalan jelas mengenai peristiwa yang akan datang. Such statements vary in the degree of certainty the author expresses toward the outcome: 'Leonardo DiCaprio will win Best Actor' vs. 'Leonardo DiCaprio may win' or 'No way Leonardo wins!'.  Bolehkah kepercayaan populer pada media sosial meramalkan siapa yang akan menang? Untuk menjawab soalan ini, kita membina sebuah korpus tweet yang dicatat untuk kebenaran di mana kita melatih pengklasifikasi log-linear yang mengesan kebenaran positif dengan ketepatan tinggi. Kemudian kami meramalkan hasil yang tidak pasti menggunakan kebijaksanaan ramai, dengan menggabungkan ramalan eksplicit pengguna. Kaedah kami untuk meramalkan pemenang adalah sepenuhnya automatik, bergantung hanya pada set penentang sebagai input. Ia memerlukan tiada data latihan hasil masa lalu dan melaksanakan sentimen dan garis dasar volum tweet pada julat luas tugas ramalan kontes. Kami juga menunjukkan bagaimana pendekatan kita boleh digunakan untuk mengukur kepercayaan ramalan akaun individu dan mengesan hasil kejutan secara retrospektif.", 'mk': "Корисниците на социјалните медиуми честопати прават експлицитни предвидувања за следните настани. Таквите изјави се различни во степенот на сигурност што авторот го изразува кон резултатот: „Леонардо Дикаприо ќе победи на најдобриот актер“ против „Леонардо Дикаприо може да победи“ или „Нема шанси Леонардо да победи!“. Може ли популарните верувања во социјалните медиуми да предвидат кој ќе победи? За да одговориме на ова прашање, ние изградуваме корпус на твитови анотирани за вердикалност на кои тренираме лог-линијарен класификатор кој детектира позитивна вердикалност со висока прецизност. We then forecast uncertain outcomes using the wisdom of crowds, by aggregating users' explicit predictions.  Нашиот метод за предвидување на победниците е целосно автоматизиран, потпирајќи се само на неколку кандидати како влог. Таа не бара податоци за обука за минатите резултати и изведува основни линии за чувства и твитови за голем број задачи за предвидување на натпреварите. Понатаму демонстрираме како нашиот пристап може да се користи за мерење на доверливоста на предвидувањата на индивидуалните сметки и ретроспективно идентификување на изненадувачките резултати.", 'mt': "L-utenti tal-midja soċjali spiss jagħmlu tbassir espliċitu dwar l-avvenimenti li ġejjin. Dikjarazzjonijiet bħal dawn ivarjaw fil-grad ta' ċertezza li l-awtur jesprimi lejn ir-riżultat: 'Leonardo DiCaprio se jirbħu l-Aħjar Attur' kontra 'Leonardo DiCaprio jista' jirbħ' jew 'L-ebda mod li Leonardo jirbħ!'. It-twemmin popolari dwar il-midja soċjali jista’ jipprevedi min se jirbaħ? Biex twieġeb għal din il-mistoqsija, a ħna nibnu korpus ta’ tweets annotati għall-veridiċità li fuqha aħna nħarrġu klassifikatur log-lineari li jidentifika veridiċità pożittiva bi preċiżjoni għolja. Imbagħad nipprovaw riżultati inċerti bl-użu tal-għerf tal-popolazzjoni, billi naggregaw il-previżjonijiet espliċiti tal-utenti. Il-metodu tagħna għat-tbassir tar-rebbieħa huwa awtomatizzat bis-sħiħ, u jiddependi biss fuq sett ta’ kontenituri bħala input. Hija ma teħtieġ l-ebda dejta ta’ taħriġ dwar ir-riżultati tal-passat u tirriżulta fil-linji bażi tal-volum ta’ sentiment u tweet fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ kompiti ta’ tbassir tal-kompetizzjoni. Aħna nippruvaw ukoll kif l-approċċ tagħna jista' jintuża biex titkejjel l-affidabbiltà tat-tbassir tal-kontijiet individwali u jiġu identifikati b'mod retrospettiv ir-riżultati sorpriżi.", 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d വരുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് പലപ്പോഴും വ്യക്തമായി പ്രവചിപ്പിക് ഇതുപോലുള്ള പ്രസ്താനങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുന്നു “ലിയോനാര്\u200dഡോ ഡിക്യാപ്രിയോ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല നടത്തിക്കാരനെ ജയിക്കും” അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ലിയോനാര്\u200dഡോ ജയി ആരാണ് ജയിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിശ്വാസം? To answer this question, we build a corpus of tweets annotated for veridicality on which we train a log-linear classifier that detects positive veridicality with high precision.  പിന്നീട് കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ ജ്ഞാനം ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ വ്യക്തമായ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നാം അറിയ വിജയികളെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും സ്വതന്ത്ര്യമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന കഴിഞ്ഞ ഫലങ്ങളുടെ പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇതിന് ആവശ്യമില്ല, വികാരങ്ങളും ട്വീറ്റ് വോള്\u200dവം ബേസ്ലൈനുകളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കേണ്ടതില്ല.  വ്യക്തിക അക്കൗണ്ടിന്റെ വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ അളവ് അളക്കാനും പിന്നീട് പരിശോധിച്ച് അത്ഭുതകരമായ പരിണതി', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн хэрэглэгчид ирээдүйн тухай тодорхой таамаглалтуудыг ихэвчлэн таамагладаг. Үүний үр дүнд зохиолч нь "Леонардо Дикаприо хамгийн сайн акторууд ялна" эсвэл "Леонардо Дикаприо ялна" эсвэл "Леонардо ялахгүй" гэсэн үг. Нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээрх олон хүмүүсийн итгэл нь хэн ялах вэ? Энэ асуултыг харуулахын тулд бид үнэндээ илэрхийлж буй tweet-ын корпус бүтээж, үүнийг лог-шугамын хуваалцагч болон эерэг үнэндээ үнэндээ тодорхой байдлыг мэдэж чадна. Дараа нь бид олон нийгмийн ухааныг ашиглаж, хэрэглэгчийн тодорхой таамаглалтуудыг нийлүүлснээр тодорхойгүй үр дүнг тодорхойлж байна. Бидний ялагчдыг таамаглах арга нь автоматжуулагдсан. Зөвхөн хэдэн өрсөлдөгчдийг автоматжуулагдсан. Энэ нь өнгөрсөн үр дүн болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үндсэн шугам дээр олон төрлийн өрсөлдөөний таамаглах үйл ажиллагааны дасгал хөдөлгөөн өгөгдлийг хэрэггүй. Бид өөрсдийн ойлголт хэрхэн хэрхэн хэрэглэгдэж болох вэ гэдгийг харуулж, хувийн тооны таамаглалтын итгэлтэй байдлыг хэмжиж, гайхалтай үр дүнг дахин харуулж болно.', 'no': 'Sosiale mediabrukarar gjer ofte eksplisitt forhåndsvising om kommende hendingar. Desse uttalene varierer i graden for sikkerhet uttrykket forfatteren mot resultatet: "Leonardo DiCaprio vil vinna beste aktor" mot. "Leonardo DiCaprio kan vinna" eller "Ingen måte Leonardo vinna!" Kan populære tror på sosiale media forventa kva vil vinna? For å svara på dette spørsmålet, bygger vi ein korpus av tweeter merkt for veridigheit som vi treng ein logglineær klassifiserer som oppdager positivt veridigheit med høy nøyaktig. Vi forventar så usikkerte utgåver ved å bruka vitenskapen av folk, ved å samla brukarane eksplisitte foregåver. Metoden vårt for forecasting av vinnere er fullstendig automatisert, som berre vert tilbakekalla på eit sett med innstillingar. Det krev ingen øvingsdata om tidlegare utgåver og utfører sentiment og tvitter lydstyrke på eit brett rekke av oppgåver for forhåndsvisingar. Vi viser meir korleis tilnærminga vårt kan brukast for å måle tiltruddeligheten til foregåver av individuelle kontoar og gjennomsiktig identifisere overraskende utgåver.', 'ro': 'Utilizatorii rețelelor sociale fac adesea previziuni explicite despre evenimentele viitoare. Astfel de afirmații variază în gradul de certitudine exprimat de autor față de rezultat: "Leonardo DiCaprio va câștiga cel mai bun actor" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio poate câștiga" sau "Leonardo DiCaprio nu va câștiga!". Pot convingerile populare de pe rețelele de socializare prezice cine va câștiga? Pentru a răspunde la această întrebare, construim un corpus de tweet-uri adnotate pentru veridicitate pe care instruim un clasificator log-liniar care detectează veridicitatea pozitivă cu mare precizie. Apoi prognozăm rezultate nesigure folosind înțelepciunea mulțimilor, prin agregarea predicțiilor explicite ale utilizatorilor. Metoda noastră de prognozare a câștigătorilor este complet automatizată, bazându-se doar pe un set de concurenți ca input. Nu necesită date de antrenament privind rezultatele anterioare și depășește valorile de referință ale volumului de sentiment și tweet într-o gamă largă de sarcini de predicție a concursului. De asemenea, demonstrăm modul în care abordarea noastră poate fi utilizată pentru a măsura fiabilitatea previziunilor conturilor individuale și pentru a identifica retroactiv rezultatele surprinzătoare.', 'pl': 'Użytkownicy mediów społecznościowych często wyraźnie przewidują nadchodzące wydarzenia. Takie stwierdzenia różnią się stopniem pewności, jaką autor wyraża wobec rezultatu: "Leonardo DiCaprio wygra Najlepszego Aktora" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio może wygrać" lub "Nie ma mowy, żeby Leonardo wygrał!". Czy popularne przekonania w mediach społecznościowych mogą przewidzieć, kto wygra? Aby odpowiedzieć na to pytanie, budujemy korpus tweetów adnotacjonowanych pod kątem werydykalności, na którym trenujemy klasyfikator log-liniowy, który z wysoką precyzją wykrywa dodatnią werydykalność. Następnie przewidujemy niepewne wyniki wykorzystując mądrość tłumów, agregując wyraźne przewidywania użytkowników. Nasza metoda prognozowania zwycięzców jest w pełni zautomatyzowana, polegając tylko na zestawie konkurentów jako wkład. Nie wymaga danych treningowych dotyczących wcześniejszych wyników i przewyższa nastroje i ilość tweetów w szerokim zakresie zadań przewidywania konkursów. Ponadto pokazujemy, w jaki sposób nasze podejście można wykorzystać do mierzenia wiarygodności prognoz poszczególnych kont i wstecznej identyfikacji niespodziewanych rezultatów.', 'sr': 'Korisnici društvenih medija često čine jasne predviđanja o predstojećim događajima. Takve izjave se razlikuju u stepeni sigurnosti koju autor izražava na ishod: "Leonardo DiCaprio će pobijediti najbolji glumac" protiv "Leonardo DiCaprio može pobijediti" ili "Leonardo neće pobijediti!" Može li popularna verovanja u društvenim medijima predvidjeti ko će pobediti? Da bi odgovorili na to pitanje, izgradili smo korpus tweeta annotiranog za vernost na kojoj treniramo dnevnog klasifikatora koji otkriva pozitivnu vernost sa visokom preciznošću. Onda predviđamo neodređene ishode koristeći mudrost publike, skupljanjem pojasnih predviđanja korisnika. Naš metod za predviđanje pobednika je potpuno automatski, oslanjajući se samo na setu takmičara kao ulaz. To ne zahteva podatke o obuci prošlih ishoda i iznosi osjećaj i tviteljske osnovne linije na širom opsegu predviđanja takmičenja. Dalje pokazujemo kako se naš pristup može iskoristiti da mjeri pouzdanost predviđanja pojedinih računa i retrospektivno identifikujemo iznenađenja.', 'si': "සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ සාමාජික විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වෙන්න පුළුවන් ස එහෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් වෙන්නේ නිශ්චාත්මක විදියට ලේඛකයා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ: 'ලියනර්ඩෝ ඩිකැප්රියෝ හොඳම විදියට සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්ද කවුද දිනයි කියලා? මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට උත්තර දෙන්න, අපි විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි ලොග් ලිනියර් විශ්වාසකයෙක් ප්\u200dරශ අපි පස්සේ අනිශ්චිත ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා මිනිස්සුන්ගේ බුද්ධිමත් ප්\u200dරයෝ අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය දිනාගත්ත විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ඇතුළත් විදියට විතරයි. ඒකෙන් අවස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ ඒ වගේම අවස්ථාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරනවා වගේම සංවේදන අපි තව ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ විදිහට කොහොමද ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්", 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიახის მომხმარებელი ხშირად გავაკეთებენ წარმოდგენების შესახებ. ასეთი გამოსახულებები განსხვავებულია წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც ავტორის გამოსახულებას გააკეთებს: "ლეონდო დიკაპრიო უკეთესი აკტერის გადაიბრუნება" და "ლეონდო დიკაპრიო შეიძლება მჲზვ ლთ ოჲლსოაპნთ გწპგაŒა ნა ჟჲუთალნთრვ მვეთ ეა ოპვეგთეწრ კჲი ღვ ოჲბვეთ? ამ კითხვის გასაღებისთვის, ჩვენ შევქმნით კორპუს ტივის, რომელიც სინამდვილეობისთვის აღმოჩენა, რომელიც ჩვენ ვარწმნეთ ლოგლინური კლასიფიკაციერი, რომელიც აღმოჩენა პ შემდეგ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ უცნობიერი მოვლენების გამოყენება მსოფლიოს მსოფლიოს გამოყენებით, აგგრებით გამოყენებელების გამოყენება. ჩვენი პროცემი დავიწყობინებელების წარმოდგენისთვის ყველაფერად ავტომატიურია, მხოლოდ მხოლოდ კონდენტერების ნაწილის შესახებ. ის არ უნდა გავაკეთოთ წინასწარმოდგენების მონაცემები და გავაკეთებს სენტიმენტის და გავაკეთებს ბოლომენტის ბოლომენტის საზოგადომის უფრო დიდი კონტენტის წ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, როგორ ჩვენი პროგორმა შეიძლება გამოიყენება, რომ განსაზღვრება ინდიველური წიგნის განსაზღვრებას და retrospectively განსაზღვრება გამოვიყენება განსხვავებ', 'kk': 'Социалдық медиа пайдаланушылары көбінесе келесі оқиғалар туралы түсінікті көрсетеді. Бұл мәліметтер шындық градусында ауыстырылатын автор "Леонардо Дикаприо жақсы актерді жеңеді" немесе "Леонардо Дикаприо жеңеді" немесе "Леонардо жеңеді" немесе "Леонардо жоқ". Социалдық медиақтардың көпшілік сенімдері кім жеңіледі деп ойлай алады ба? Бұл сұрақты жауап беру үшін, біз шындықтық үшін белгіленген tweet корпус құрамыз. Бұл журнал сызықтағы классификаторын оқыту үшін оң дұрыс дұрыстығын көрсетеді. Содан кейін, пайдаланушылардың түсінікті таңдау арқылы, көпшіліктердің акылымын қолдануға көмектеспейтін нәтижелерін таңдаймыз. Біздің ұсынысымыз жетілдірушілерді автоматты түрде қалдырылады, тек бірнеше көмектесушілерді келтіру ретінде қалдырылады. Бұл өткен нәтижелердің оқыту деректері қажет емес, сезімдерді және ауыстыру көлемінің көптеген жұмыс тапсырмалардың көптеген диапазоның негізгі жолдарын жасау және Біз біздің тәсіліміздің қалай қолданылатынын көрсету үшін әрбір тіркелгілердің таңдау мүмкіндігін өлшейту және қайта қайта қарай таңдау нәтижесін анықтау үшін', 'so': 'Social media users often make explicit predictions about upcoming events.  Aqooyinkaas waxay ku kala duwan yihiin shahaadada runta ah, qofka qoraalka u muuqata dhamaadka: "Leonardo DiCaprio wuxuu guulaysan doonaa sharciyada ugu wanaagsan" - vs. \'Leonardo DiCaprio waa guulaysan karaa\' ama \'Maya habboon Leonardo wuu guulaysan karaa!\'. Miyey aaminnimada guud ee shabakadda bulshada wax ka sheegi karaan yaa guulaysan doona? Si aan ugu jawaabno su\'aalkaas, waxaynu dhisaynaa hal koob oo tweeteed ah oo lagu caddeeyey xaqiiqnimo, kaas oo aynu ku tababarinno fasalka qoraalka, taasoo xaqiiqnimada aad u sahlan. Markaas waxaynu hor marsiinnay falimaha aan la garanaynin xigmadda dadka oo dhan, waxaannu ku sii darsiinnaa waxyaalaha sii muuqata ee isticmaalayaasha. Dhaqsadeena horumarinta guuleeyayaashayada ayaa si kamid ah u maamula, wuxuuna ku kalsoonaadaa mid ka mid ah kuwa dagaalamaya sida input. Lagama baahna macluumaad waxbarasho oo ku saabsan dhamaadka hore iyo waxyaabaha la sii sheegayo oo ballaadhan oo la xiriira sameynta fikrada iyo waxyaabaha Twitteetka. Waxaynu sii muujinnaa sida loo isticmaali karo qaababkayaga si loo qiyaaso u aaminsanaanshaha tartanka shakhsiga ah iyo si dib looga caddeeyo dhacdooyinka yaabka leh.', 'sv': 'Sociala medieanvändare gör ofta uttryckliga förutsägelser om kommande evenemang. Sådana uttalanden varierar i graden av säkerhet författaren uttrycker mot resultatet: "Leonardo DiCaprio kommer att vinna bästa skådespelare" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio kan vinna" eller "Leonardo vinner inte!". Kan populär tro på sociala medier förutsäga vem som kommer att vinna? För att besvara denna fråga bygger vi en korpus tweets kommenterade för veridicitet där vi tränar en logglinjär klassificerare som detekterar positiv veridicitet med hög precision. Vi förutspår sedan osäkra resultat med hjälp av folkmassornas visdom, genom att aggregera användares explicita förutsägelser. Vår metod för att prognostisera vinnare är helt automatiserad och förlitar sig endast på en uppsättning tävlande som input. Det kräver inga träningsdata om tidigare resultat och överträffar sentiment- och tweetvolymer i ett brett spektrum av tävlingsförutsägelseuppgifter. Vi visar vidare hur vårt tillvägagångssätt kan användas för att mäta tillförlitligheten i enskilda kontos förutsägelser och i efterhand identifiera överraskningsutfall.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகம் பயனர்கள் பெரும்பாலாக வரும் நிகழ்வுகளை பற்றி வெளிப்படையாக முன்னாட்டுகளை செய்கிறார் "லியோனார்டோ டிகாப்ரியோ சிறந்த நடிகர் வெற்றி பெறுவார்" vs. \'லியோனார்டோ டிகாப்ரியோ வெற்றி பெற வேண்டும் அல்லது \'லியோனார்டோ வெற்றி இல்லை!\'  சமூக ஊடகங்களில் பிரபலமான நம்பிக்கைகள் யார் வெற்றி பெற முடியும்? இந்த கேள்விக்கு பதில் அளிக்க, நாம் சரிபார்த்தத்திற்கு அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு குறியீடுகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அதை நாம் ஒரு பதிவு கோடு வகுப்ப பின்னர் நாம் குழுக்களின் ஞானத்தை பயன்படுத்தி அறியாத முடிவு வெற்றியாளர்களை முன்னோக்கும் எங்கள் முறைமையாக தானியங்கி உள்ளது, வெளியீட்டில் மட்டும் நம்புகிறது. இது முந்தைய விளைவுகளின் பயிற்சி தகவல் தேவைப்படவில்லை மற்றும் உணர்வு மற்றும் தொடர்பு ஒலியளவு அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது ப நாம் எவ்வாறு நம்முடைய அணுகல் பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் தனியார் கணக்குகளின் நம்பிக்கையை அளக்க மற்றும', 'ur': "سوسیلی میڈیا کارساز اکثر آیندہ اتفاقات کے بارے میں صریح پیش بینی کرتے ہیں۔ یہ باتیں یقین کے درجے میں متفاوت ہیں جو لکھنے والا نتیجے کے بارے میں بیان کرتا ہے: 'لئونارڈو ڈیکپریو بہترین بازی غالب کرے گا' vs. 'لئونارڈو ڈیکپریو غالب آئے گا' یا 'لئونارڈو غالب نہیں آئے گا!' کیا سوسیل میڈیا کے معاملہ میں مشهور اعتقاد کس کا انتظار کرسکتے ہیں؟ اس سؤال کی جواب دینے کے لئے ہم ایک ٹویٹ کی جسم بناتے ہیں جس پر ہم ایک لاگ لینیاری کلیسائر کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں جو مثبت حقیقت کو بالا دقیق سے پہچانتا ہے۔ پھر ہم نے لوگوں کی حکیمت کے مطابق غیر قطعی نتائج کا انتظام کیا ہے، اور ان کے مطابق صریح پیشگویاں جمع کریں گے۔ ہمارا طریقہ جو پیغام پہنچانے والوں کو پوری طور پر اتمام کیا گیا ہے، صرف ایک مجموعہ کے ذریعے ایک مجموعہ پر بھروسہ رکھتا ہے۔ اس کے لئے اگلے نتائج کی تدریس ڈیٹی نہیں کی ضرورت ہے اور احساسات اور ٹویٹ والم بنیس لینوں کو ایک گھیری مختلف مختلف پیش بینی کے کاموں پر کام کرتا ہے. ہم اس سے بڑھ کر دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ کس طرح استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ ایک شخص حساب کی پیش بینی کی امانت کا اندازہ کرے اور پھر دیکھتے ہیں کہ عجیب نتائج کو پہچان سکتے ہیں.", 'uz': 'Name Bu so\'zlar natijaga ega bo\'ladi: "Leonardo DiCaprio eng yaxshi amalga oshadi" va "Leonardo DiCaprio muvaffaqiyatli bo\'lishi mumkin yoki Leonardo muvaffaqiyatli yoʻq!" Jami shaxsiy media\'da faqatlarni kim muvaffaqiyatga erishishi mumkin? Bu savol javob berish uchun, biz haqiqiqiylik uchun haqiqiqiylik bilan xabar qiladigan Twitterlarning qismlarini yaramiz. Bu xavfsiz juda yaxshi tashkilotni ko\'rganamiz. Сўнгра биз foydalanuvchilarнинг ҳикматларини ва аниқ огоҳлантиришни тарк қилдик. Tashqi vazifalarni taqdimot qilish usuli faqat boshqaruvchilar natijasida ishlatadi. Bu oldingi natijalar haqida taʼminlovchi maʼlumot kerak emas, va hissiyot va Twitt disk qismi asosiy bazasini boshlash kerak emas. Biz yana birinchi ko\'rsatdik, biz oddiy hisob hisoblarining ishonini qanday qilishimizni ko\'rsatdik va qaytadan tasavvur natijalarini aniqlash uchun ishlatiladimiz.', 'vi': 'Người dùng mạng xã hội thường đưa ra dự đoán rõ ràng về các sự kiện sắp tới. Những lời phát biểu này thay đổi trong mức độ chắc chắn mà tác giả thể hiện về kết quả: "Leonardo DiCaprio sẽ giành được vai diễn xuất sắc nhất" và "Leonardo DiCaprio có thể thắng" hoặc "Không đời nào Leonardo thắng"! Tin tưởng nổi tiếng trên truyền thông xã hội có thể đoán được ai sẽ thắng? Để trả lời câu hỏi này, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập hợp các dòng tweet được ghi chú để xác thực, chúng tôi đào tạo một chuyên gia ghi âm tính tích cực với độ chính xác cao. Sau đó chúng tôi dự đoán kết quả không rõ ràng bằng cách tổng hợp dự đoán trực tiếp của người dùng. Phương pháp dự đoán của chúng ta hoàn toàn tự động, chỉ dựa vào một nhóm ứng viên tham gia. Nó không đòi hỏi dữ liệu huấn luyện về kết quả trước và thực hiện thông tin tình cảm và âm lượng trên Twitter dựa trên một loạt các công việc dự đoán cuộc thi. Chúng tôi còn chứng minh cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi có thể được dùng để đo lường tính đáng tin cậy của tài khoản cá nhân và sau đó xác định kết quả ngạc nhiên.', 'bg': 'Потребителите на социалните медии често правят изрични прогнози за предстоящите събития. Такива твърдения варират в степента на сигурност, която авторът изразява по отношение на резултата: "Леонардо ДиКаприо ще спечели най-добър актьор" срещу "Леонардо ДиКаприо може да спечели" или "Няма начин Леонардо да спечели!". Могат ли популярните вярвания в социалните медии да предскажат кой ще спечели? За да отговорим на този въпрос, изграждаме корпус от туитове, анотирани за веридност, върху които обучаваме логлинеен класификатор, който открива положителната веридност с висока точност. След това прогнозираме несигурни резултати, използвайки мъдростта на тълпите, като обединим изричните прогнози на потребителите. Нашият метод за прогнозиране на победителите е напълно автоматизиран, разчитайки само на набор от претенденти като вход. Тя не изисква данни за тренировки за минали резултати и надминава базовите линии на сентимента и обема на туитовете при широк спектър от задачи за предсказване на състезания. Освен това демонстрираме как нашият подход може да бъде използван за измерване на надеждността на прогнозите на отделните сметки и ретроспективно идентифициране на изненадващи резултати.', 'nl': "Social media gebruikers maken vaak expliciete voorspellingen over aankomende evenementen. Dergelijke uitspraken variëren in de mate van zekerheid die de auteur uitdrukt ten aanzien van de uitkomst: 'Leonardo DiCaprio wint Beste Acteur' versus 'Leonardo DiCaprio mag winnen' of 'Leonardo DiCaprio wint niet!'. Kunnen populaire overtuigingen op sociale media voorspellen wie zal winnen? Om deze vraag te beantwoorden bouwen we een corpus tweets geannoteerd voor veridicaliteit waarop we een log-lineaire classificator trainen die positieve veridicaliteit met hoge precisie detecteert. Vervolgens voorspellen we onzekere resultaten met behulp van de wijsheid van crowds, door expliciete voorspellingen van gebruikers te aggregeren. Onze methode voor het voorspellen van winnaars is volledig geautomatiseerd en vertrouwt alleen op een reeks deelnemers als input. Het vereist geen trainingsgegevens van eerdere resultaten en presteert beter dan sentiment- en tweetvolumebaselines bij een breed scala aan wedstrijdvoorspellingstaken. We laten verder zien hoe onze aanpak kan worden gebruikt om de betrouwbaarheid van de voorspellingen van individuele rekeningen te meten en achteraf verrassingsresultaten te identificeren.", 'da': 'Brugere af sociale medier giver ofte udtrykkelige forudsigelser om kommende begivenheder. Sådanne udtalelser varierer i den grad af sikkerhed, forfatteren udtrykker over for resultatet: "Leonardo DiCaprio vinder bedste skuespiller" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio vinder måske" eller "Leonardo DiCaprio vinder ikke!". Kan populære overbevisninger på sociale medier forudsige, hvem der vinder? For at besvare dette spørgsmål bygger vi et korpus af tweets kommenteret for veridicitet, hvor vi træner en log-lineær klassificering, der detekterer positiv veridicitet med høj præcision. Vi forudsiger derefter usikre resultater ved hjælp af folkemængdernes visdom ved at samle brugernes eksplicitte forudsigelser. Vores metode til forudsigelse af vindere er fuldt automatiseret og afhænger kun af et sæt deltagere som input. Det kræver ingen træningsdata for tidligere resultater og overstiger sentiment og tweet volumen baselines på en bred vifte af konkurrenceforudsigelsesopgaver. Vi demonstrerer endvidere, hvordan vores tilgang kan bruges til at måle pålideligheden af individuelle regnskabers forudsigelser og efterfølgende identificere overraskelsesresultater.', 'hr': "Korisnici društvenih medija često čine jasne predviđanja o budućim događajima. Takve izjave se razlikuju u stupnji sigurnosti autor izražava na ishod: 'Leonardo DiCaprio će pobijediti najbolji glumac' protiv 'Leonardo DiCaprio može pobijediti' ili 'Leonardo neće pobijediti!'. Može li popularna vjerovanja u društvenim medijima predvidjeti tko će pobijediti? Da bi odgovorili na to pitanje, izgradili smo korpus tweeta označen za istinitost na kojoj treniramo dnevni klasifikator koji otkriva pozitivnu istinitost sa visokom preciznošću. Onda predviđamo neodređene ishode koristeći mudrost publike, skupljanjem pojasnih predviđanja korisnika. Naša metoda za predviđanje pobjednika je potpuno automatski, pouzdajući se samo na setu svađa ča kao ulaz. To ne zahtijeva podatke o obuci prošlih ishoda i nadmašuje osjećaj i temeljne osnovne linije na širom opsegu predviđanja takmičenja. Dalje pokazujemo kako se naš pristup može koristiti za mjerenje pouzdanosti predviđanja pojedinih računa i retrospektivno identificiranje iznenađenja.", 'de': 'Social Media Nutzer machen oft explizite Vorhersagen über bevorstehende Ereignisse. Solche Aussagen variieren in dem Grad der Gewissheit, den der Autor in Bezug auf das Ergebnis ausdrückt: "Leonardo DiCaprio wird den besten Schauspieler gewinnen" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio kann gewinnen" oder "Leonardo DiCaprio gewinnt nicht!". Können populäre Überzeugungen in sozialen Medien vorhersagen, wer gewinnen wird? Um diese Frage zu beantworten, bauen wir einen Korpus von Tweets auf, auf denen wir einen log-linearen Klassifikator trainieren, der positive Veridikalität mit hoher Präzision detektiert. Wir prognostizieren dann unsichere Ergebnisse anhand der Weisheit der Crowds, indem wir explizite Vorhersagen der Nutzer aggregieren. Unsere Methode zur Vorhersage von Gewinnern ist vollautomatisch und verlässt sich nur auf eine Reihe von Wettbewerbern als Input. Es erfordert keine Trainingsdaten vergangener Ergebnisse und übertrifft Sentiment- und Tweet-Volumen-Baselines bei einer Vielzahl von Wettkampfvorhersagen. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, wie unser Ansatz genutzt werden kann, um die Zuverlässigkeit von Prognosen einzelner Konten zu messen und Überraschungsergebnisse retrospektiv zu identifizieren.', 'fa': 'کاربران رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی اغلب پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای مشخص در مورد اتفاقات پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند. این واژه\u200cها در درجه مطمئن تغییر می\u200cکنند که نویسنده به نتیجه توضیح می\u200cدهد: « لئوناردو دیکاپریو بهترین بازیگر » علیه: « لئوناردو دیکاپریو می\u200cتواند برنده شود » یا «هیچ راهی لئوناردو برنده نمی\u200cشود آیا باوری های مشهور در رسانه های اجتماعی پیش بینی می کنند که کی پیروز خواهد شد؟ برای پاسخ به این سوال، ما یک جسد از توئیت\u200cها را ساختیم که برای حقیقت مشخص می\u200cشود که در آن یک راهنمایی خط\u200cشناسی را آموزش می\u200cدهیم که با دقیق بالا حقیقت مثبت را شناسایی می\u200cکند. سپس نتایج مطمئنی را با استفاده از حکمت مردم پیش بینی می\u200cکنیم، با جمع کردن پیش بینی\u200cهای مشخص کاربران. روش ما برای پیش\u200cبینی برنده\u200cها کاملاً اتوماتیک شده است، تنها بر مجموعه\u200cی ستیزه\u200cکنندگان به عنوان ورودی اعتماد می\u200cکنند. این نیاز به اطلاعات آموزشی از نتایج گذشته و احساسات و خطوط زیرزمینی در یک مجموعه وسیع از وظیفه پیش بینی مسابقه نیاز ندارد. ما بیشتر نشان می دهیم که چگونه دسترسی ما می تواند برای اندازه قابلیت پیش بینی\u200cهای حساب\u200cهای فردی استفاده شود و نتیجه\u200cهای سورپرایز را برگردانیم.', 'id': "Pengguna media sosial sering membuat prediksi eksplicit tentang peristiwa yang akan datang. Pernyataan tersebut berbeda dengan tingkat kepastian yang diungkapkan oleh penulis terhadap hasil: 'Leonardo DiCaprio akan menang Aktor Terbaik' vs. 'Leonardo DiCaprio mungkin menang' atau 'Tidak ada cara Leonardo menang!'. Bisakah kepercayaan populer pada media sosial memprediksi siapa yang akan menang? To answer this question, we build a corpus of tweets annotated for veridicality on which we train a log-linear classifier that detects positive veridicality with high precision.  Kemudian kita memprediksi hasil yang tidak pasti menggunakan kebijaksanaan orang ramai, dengan menggabungkan prediksi eksplisit pengguna. Metode kami untuk memprediksi pemenang sepenuhnya otomatis, bergantung hanya pada set kontesten sebagai input. Ini tidak membutuhkan data pelatihan hasil masa lalu dan hasil sentimen dan saluran pangkalan volume tweet pada jangkauan luas dari tugas prediksi kontes. Kita lebih lanjut menunjukkan bagaimana pendekatan kita dapat digunakan untuk mengukur kepercayaan prediksi rekening individu dan retrospektif mengidentifikasi hasil kejutan.", 'ko': '소셜미디어 사용자들은 다가오는 사건에 대해 명확한 예측을 자주 한다.이런 주장은 작가가 결과에 대한 확정도에서 다르다. "레오나르도 디카프리오가 남우주연상을 받을 것" 과 "레오나르도 디카프리오가 이길 것 같다", "레오나르도가 이길 수 없다".소셜 미디어의 유행 관념은 누가 이길지 예측할 수 있습니까?이 문제에 대답하기 위해 우리는 진실성을 표시하는 추문 자료 라이브러리를 구축했다. 이를 바탕으로 우리는 대수선형 분류기를 훈련하여 정진실성을 고정밀하게 측정할 수 있다.그리고 우리는 사용자의 명확한 예측을 모아 단체의 지혜를 이용하여 불확실한 결과를 예측한다.우리가 이긴 사람을 예측하는 방법은 완전히 자동화되어 한 그룹의 경쟁자만 수입으로 의존한다.과거 결과에 대한 훈련 데이터를 필요로 하지 않고 광범위한 경기 예측 임무에서 정서와 추문량 기준선보다 뛰어나다.우리는 어떻게 우리의 방법을 사용하여 개인 계좌 예측의 신뢰성을 평가하고 의외의 결과를 회고적으로 확정하는지 보여 주었다.', 'tr': "Sosyal medýdançalary köplenç ulaşan bolup geçýän hadysalar barada düşündirilýärler. Bu sözler sonuçlara doğru ifade eden eminlik derecesinde farklı: 'Leonardo DiCaprio üstüne gelecek' vs. 'Leonardo DiCaprio kazanabilir' ya da 'Leonardo kazanamaz' ya da 'Leonardo kazanamaz.' Sosyal medýdanlaryñ meşhur ynamyny kimiň gazanacağıny tahmin edip bilýärmi? Bu soraga jogap bermek üçin, dogruçylyk üçin a ýdylan tweet corpusu inşa edýäris we bu ýerde Log-linear klassifikatçi beýleki derejesi bilen söz berýäris. Soňra köpürleriň akyllygyny ulanyp kesinliksiz netijeleri tahmin edip görýäris. Biziň ýolymyz ýeňçileri önlenmek üçin tamamlandyrylýar, diňe bir topar taryşçylara giriş hökmünde ynanýarlar. Geçen netijeler üçin hiç hili bilim maglumaty gerek däldir we duýgulary we gürrüňli taryşma täzelikleriniň döwletlerinde tweet etmelidir. Biz indiki esaplaryň öngörümleriniň ynamlylygyny ýagdaýa çykarmak üçin özümiziň golaýymyzyň nähili ulanylýandygyny we yzyna süýtgeşik netijelerini tanyşdyrjak bolandygyny görkez.", 'af': 'Soziale media gebruikers maak dikwels uitduidelike voorskou oor opkomstige gebeurtenis. Hierdie uitdrukkings verander in die grad van sekerlik die outeur uitdruk teenoor die uitdrukking: "Leonardo DiCaprio sal win beste Actor" teenoor. "Leonardo DiCaprio mag win" of "Geen manier Leonardo wen!" Kan populêre geloof op sosiale media voorskou wie sal wen? Om hierdie vraag te antwoord, bou ons \'n korpus van tweets wat vir waarheid aangeteken is, waarop ons \'n log-lineêre klassifiseerder uittrei wat positiewe waarheid met hoë presisie ontdek. Ons verwag dan onverseker outekoms deur die wysheid van skare te gebruik deur die uitgespreidings van gebruikers te sameleer. Ons metode vir voorskou van winners is volledig outomaties, vertrou slegs op \'n stel van bevolgers as invoer. Dit benodig geen onderwerp data van verlede uitkoms en uitvoer sentiment en tweet volume baselyne op \'n breë reek van voorskou opdragte. Ons wys verder hoe ons toegang kan gebruik word om die betroubaarheid van individuele rekeninge se voorskoue te maak en retrospektief te identifiseer verbaas uittekens.', 'sw': 'Watumiaji wa mitandao ya kijamii mara nyingi hufanya utabiri wa wazi kuhusu matukio yanayotokea. Tamko kama hizo zinatofautiana na kiwango cha uhakika mwandishi anaelezea matokeo yake: “Leonardo DiCaprio atashinda Mwanasheria bora zaidi” na \'Leonardo DiCaprio anaweza kushinda\' au \'Hapana namna Leonardo anavyoshinda!\'" Je, imani maarufu kwenye mitandao ya kijamii inaweza kutabiri nani atashinda? Ili kujibu swali hili, tunajenga makampuni ya twiti zinazodhihirishwa kwa uhakika na kuwafundisha wataalamu wa mstari unaoonesha uhakika chanya kwa kiwango kikubwa. Kisha tunatabiri matokeo yasiyo na uhakika kwa kutumia ujuzi wa umma, kwa kuongeza utabiri wa watumiaji wa wazi. Utawala wetu wa kutabiri washindi umejikita, unategemea tu kwenye kundi la washiriki kama kujitangaza. Haihitaji taarifa za mafunzo ya matokeo yaliyopita na kutekeleza hisia na kura za Twita katika kazi mbalimbali za kutabiri mashindano. We further demonstrate how our approach can be used to measure the reliability of individual accounts\' predictions and retrospectively identify surprise outcomes.', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ተጠቃሚዎች ብዙ ጊዜ ስለሚመጣው ጉዳዮች የሚያሳልፉ ትንቢት ይናገራሉ፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ንግግር ፍጻሜው ወደ ፍጻሜው በሚያሳየው እርግጠኛ ይለያያሉ፡፡ ሊዮናርዶ ዲካፕሪዮ የበለጠ ተሟጋቾችን ያሸንፋል፡፡ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሕዝብ እምነት ማን ያሸንፋል ይችላልን? ለዚህ ጥያቄ ለመመልስ፣ እውነተኛነትን ለማግኘት የጦማሪን ክፍል እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም የብዙ ሕዝብ ጥበብ በመጠቀም፥ በሚገልጽ ትንቢት በማሳደፍ የማይታወቅንን ፍጻሜ አስቀድመን። Our method for forecasting winners is fully automated, relying only on a set of contenders as input.  የቀድሞው ውጤቶች እና የጦማሪው የድምፅ ድምፅ ማሳየት አያስፈልጋቸውም፡፡ የሁሉንም የአካባቢው የድምፅ ውይይት እና ፍጻሜውን ለመመለስ እንዴት እንደሚችል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': "Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների օգտագործողները հաճախ պարզ կանխատեսումներ են կատարում գալիք իրադարձությունների մասին: Այսպիսի հայտարարությունները տարբերվում են հեղինակի վստահության աստիճանով, որն արտահայտում է արդյունքի վրա. «Լեոնարդո ԴիԿապրիոն ամենալավ դերասանն է հաղթելու» և «Լեոնարդո ԴիԿապրիոն կարող է հաղթել» կամ «Լեոնարդո երբեք չի հաղթելու»: Can popular beliefs on social media predict who will win?  Այս հարցին պատասխանելու համար մենք կառուցում ենք մի շարք թվիթեր, որոնք գրված են ճշմարտության համար, որի վրա մենք վարժեցնում ենք մի լոգ-գծային դասակարգչի, որը բարձր ճշգրտությամբ բացահայտում է դրական ճշգրտությունը: Այնուհետև մենք կանխատեսում ենք անորոշ արդյունքներ՝ օգտագործելով ամբոխի իմաստությունը, համախմբելով օգտագործողների բացահայտ կանխատեսումները: Մեր հաղթողների կանխատեսման մեթոդը լիովին ավտոմատիկ է, հիմնված է միայն մի շարք մրցուցիչների վրա որպես ներմուծք: Այն չի պահանջում ոչ մի ուսուցման տվյալներ անցյալի արդյունքների մասին, ոչ էլ զգացմունքների և թվիթերի ծավալի հիմնական գծերի վրա մրցակցության կանխատեսման բազմաթիվ խնդիրների վրա: We further demonstrate how our approach can be used to measure the reliability of individual accounts' predictions and retrospectively identify surprise outcomes.", 'az': 'Sosyal medya istifadəçiləri tezliklə gələcək vaxt barəsində açıq-aydın tədbir edərlər. Bu sözlər müəyyən dərəcəsində yazıcın sonuçta ifade edir: "Leonardo DiCaprio ən yaxşı oyuncu kazanacaq" və ya "Leonardo DiCaprio kazanacaq" və ya "Leonardo kazanacaqdır!" Sosyal mediyaların məşhur inanmaları kimin qalib gələcəyini tahmin edə bilərmi? Bu suala cavab vermək üçün, biz həqiqət olaraq bildirilmiş twetlərin korpusu inşa edirik ki, onun üstündə çox qiymətli olaraq pozitiv doğruluğu tanıyan log-linear klasifikatoru təhsil edirik. Sonra müəyyən olmayan sonuçları insanların hikməti ilə təmin edirik, istifadəçilərin açıq tədbirlərini toplayaraq. Bizim qazananları təmin etmək yolumuz tamamilə avtomatik edilir, ancaq bir dəstə mübahisə edənlərə tapılır. Bu, keçmiş sonuçların təhsil məlumatlarına ehtiyacı yoxdur və hiss və tweet səhifələrinin geniş bir səhifələrində təhsil etməsi lazımdır. Biz indi hesabların təsəvvürlərinin güveniliğini ölçürmək və təsəvvürlərinin sonuçlarını yenidən təsdiqləmək üçün necə istifadə ediləcəyini göstəririk.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম ব্যবহারকারীরা প্রায়শ ভবিষ্যৎবাণী প্রকাশ করে। এই ধরনের বিবৃতি নিশ্চিতভাবে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন যে লেখকের ফলাফলের দিকে প্রকাশ করেছেন: ‘লিওনার্দো ডিক্যাপ্রিয়া সেরা অভিনেত্রী জিতে পারবে’ সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে জনপ্রিয় বিশ্বাস কি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে পারে কে জিতবে? এই প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি টুইটের কার্পাস তৈরি করি যা নিশ্চিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য ব্যাপারে উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে, যার উপরে আমরা একটি ল্যাগ-লা তারপর আমরা ব্যবহারকারীদের সুস্পষ্ট ভবিষ্যৎবাণী বৃদ্ধির মাধ্যমে জনতার জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে নিশ্চিত ফলাফলের প্রতি ধারণা দি Our method for forecasting winners is fully automated, relying only on a set of contenders as input.  অতীতের ফলাফলের কোন প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রয়োজন নেই এবং অনুভূতি এবং টুইটের ভলোম বেসাইনের ব্যাপারে প্রতিযোগিতা ভবিষ্যতের কাজের উপর প্ আমরা আরো প্রদর্শন করি কিভাবে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করা যায় ব্যক্তিগত একাউন্টের ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর বিশ্বাসযোগ্যতা পরিমাপ করা এবং পুনরা', 'bs': 'Korisnici društvenih medija često čine jasne predviđanja o budućim događajima. Takve izjave se razlikuju u stepeni sigurnosti koju autor izražava na ishod: "Leonardo DiCaprio će pobijediti najbolji glumac" protiv "Leonardo DiCaprio može pobijediti" ili "Leonardo neće pobijediti!" Može li popularna verovanja u društvenim medijima predvidjeti ko će pobijediti? Da bi odgovorili na to pitanje, izgradili smo korpus tweeta annotiranog za istinitost na kojoj treniramo dnevnog klasifikatora koji otkriva pozitivnu vernost sa visokom preciznošću. Onda predviđamo neodređene ishode koristeći mudrost publike, skupljanjem pojasnih predviđanja korisnika. Naša metoda za predviđanje pobjednika je potpuno automatska, pouzdajući se samo na setu svađa ča kao ulaz. To ne zahtijeva podatke o obuci prošlih ishoda i iznosi osjećaj i tviteljske osnovne linije na širom opsegu predviđanja takmičenja. Dalje pokazujemo kako se naš pristup može iskoristiti kako bi mjerili pouzdanost predviđanja pojedinačnih računa i retrospektivno identificirali ishod iznenađenja.', 'ca': "Els usuaris dels mitjans socials sovint fan prediccions explícites sobre els propers esdeveniments. Such statements vary in the degree of certainty the author expresses toward the outcome: 'Leonardo DiCaprio will win Best Actor' vs. 'Leonardo DiCaprio may win' or 'No way Leonardo wins!'.  Poden les creences populars dels mitjans socials predir qui guanyarà? Per respondre a aquesta pregunta, construim un cos de tweets anotats per veridicalitat en el qual entrenem un classificador log-linear que detecta veridicalitat positiva amb alta precisió. Després predim resultats incerts utilitzant la saviesa de la multitud, agregant les prediccions explícites dels usuaris. El nostre mètode de previsió dels guanyadors és totalment automatitzat, només confiant en un conjunt de competidors com a entrada. No requereix dades d'entrenament dels resultats passats i resultats de sentiments i volums de tweet en una amplia gama de tasques de predicció del concurs. Ens demostram també com es pot utilitzar el nostre enfocament per mesurar la fiabilitat de les prediccions de comptes individuals i identificar retrospectivament els resultats sorprenents.", 'cs': 'Uživatelé sociálních médií často dělají explicitní předpovědi o nadcházejících událostech. Taková tvrzení se liší v míře jistoty, kterou autor vyjadřuje k výsledku: "Leonardo DiCaprio vyhraje nejlepší herec" versus "Leonardo DiCaprio může vyhrát" nebo "Leonardo DiCaprio nevyhraje!". Mohou populární přesvědčení na sociálních médiích předvídat, kdo vyhraje? Pro odpověď na tuto otázku vytvoříme korpus tweetů anotovaných pro veridikalitu, na kterém trénujeme log-lineární klasifikátor, který detekuje pozitivní veridikalitu s vysokou přesností. Poté předpovídáme nejisté výsledky s využitím moudrosti davů agregováním explicitních předpovědí uživatelů. Naše metoda předpovídání vítězů je plně automatizovaná, spoléhá pouze na sadu soutěžících jako vstup. Nevyžaduje žádné tréninkové údaje o minulých výsledcích a překonává základní linie sentimentu a objemu tweetů na široké škále úkolů predikce soutěže. Dále ukazujeme, jak lze náš přístup použít k měření spolehlivosti předpovědí jednotlivých účtů a zpětně identifikovat překvapivé výsledky.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia kasutajad teevad sageli selgesõnalisi prognoose tulevaste sündmuste kohta. Sellised avaldused varieeruvad autori poolt väljendatud kindluses tulemuse suhtes: "Leonardo DiCaprio võidab parima näitleja" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio võib võita" või "Leonardo ei võida mingil juhul!" Kas sotsiaalmeedia populaarsed uskumused ennustavad, kes võidab? Sellele küsimusele vastamiseks ehitame tõendamiseks märgitud säutsude korpuse, millele koolitame logilineaarset klassifikaatorit, mis tuvastab positiivse tõendamise suure täpsusega. Seejärel prognoosime ebakindlaid tulemusi, kasutades rahvahulga tarkust, koondades kasutajate selgesõnalised prognoosid. Meie võitjate prognoosimise meetod on täielikult automatiseeritud, tuginedes vaid konkurentide komplektile. See ei nõua koolitusandmeid varasemate tulemuste kohta ning ületab sentimentaalse ja säutsu mahu lähtejooni paljudes võistluste prognoosimise ülesannetes. Lisaks näitame, kuidas meie lähenemisviisi saab kasutada individuaalsete kontode prognooside usaldusväärsuse mõõtmiseks ja üllatustulemuste tagasiulatuvalt tuvastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median käyttäjät tekevät usein selkeitä ennusteita tulevista tapahtumista. Tällaiset lausunnot vaihtelevat siinä määrin, että tekijä ilmaisee varmuuden lopputuloksesta: "Leonardo DiCaprio voittaa parhaan näyttelijän" vs. "Leonardo DiCaprio voi voittaa" tai "Leonardo ei voita!". Voiko sosiaalisen median suositut uskomukset ennustaa, kuka voittaa? Vastataksemme tähän kysymykseen rakennamme twiittejä sisältävän korpusen todenmukaisuutta varten, johon koulutamme log-lineaarisen luokittimen, joka tunnistaa positiivisen todenmukaisuuden erittäin tarkasti. Tämän jälkeen ennustamme epävarmoja tuloksia väkijoukkojen viisaudella yhdistämällä käyttäjien selkeät ennusteet. Menetelmämme voittajien ennustamiseksi on täysin automatisoitu ja perustuu vain joukko kilpailijoita panoksena. Se ei vaadi harjoitustietoja aikaisemmista tuloksista ja ylittää tunteiden ja twiittien volyymin perusviivat monissa kilpailuennustetehtävissä. Lisäksi näytämme, miten lähestymistapaamme voidaan käyttää mittaamaan yksittäisten tilien ennusteiden luotettavuutta ja tunnistamaan takautuvasti yllätystuloksia.', 'sq': 'Social media users often make explicit predictions about upcoming events.  Deklaratat e tilla ndryshojnë në shkallën e sigurisë që shpreh autori drejt përfundimit: "Leonardo DiCaprio do të fitojë aktorin më të mirë" kundër "Leonardo DiCaprio mund të fitojë" ose "Nuk ka asnjë mënyrë që Leonardo të fitojë!". Can popular beliefs on social media predict who will win?  Për t\'u përgjigjur kësaj pyetjeje, ne ndërtojmë një korpus tweets të anotuar për veridikalitetin në të cilin ne trajnojmë një klasifikues log-linear që zbulon veridikalitetin pozitiv me saktësi të lartë. Pastaj parashikojmë rezultate të pasigurta duke përdorur mençurinë e turmës, duke mbledhur parashikimet eksplicite të përdoruesve. Metoda jonë për parashikimin e fituesve është plotësisht automatizuar, duke u mbështetur vetëm në një sërë konkurentësh si input. Ajo nuk kërkon të dhëna treinimi të rezultateve të kaluara dhe rezultatet e ndjenjave dhe niveleve bazë të volumit të tweetit në një gamë të gjerë detyrash parashikimi të garës. Ne demonstrojmë më tej se si mund të përdoret qasja jonë për të matur besueshmërinë e parashikimeve të llogarive individuale dhe për të identifikuar retrospektivisht rezultatet e befasive.', 'jv': "Ulahé media sotil diunganggo perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno Pero cawaran sing dipunangé uwong kelas certu sing dipunangé seneng pisan seneng pisan kelas nang kelompok sinau: ' Gak bener hukum sing paling apik karo media sotiki supaya sapa piye bisa amben? Rasané awak iki, awak dhéwé nggawe nik kuwi gek dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé basa sing pernik nik awak dhéwé kuwi mau Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasai perbudhakan kanggo nggambar aturan kamangkaran ning wong liyane Awak dhéwé sistem kanggo nggawe Winter podho akeh automatik, nggawe ngubah batir tentang karo ingkang dadi. Awak dhéwé ora takon data nggawe barang-barang sing paling ditambah banjur, iso nggawe barang nggawe barang sing ditambah kuwi tindakan sing paling dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan langkung dipunangé awak dhéwé iso nggambar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe kontu sing tek dadi ngono nggawe barang apik dhéwé", 'ha': "Yin amfani da mitandai na jamii, ko da yawa, suna bayan bayani masu takarda. Such statements vary in the degree of certainty the author expresses toward the outcome: 'Leonardo DiCaprio will win Best Actor' vs. 'Leonardo DiCaprio may win' or 'No way Leonardo wins!'.  Kuna iya umarin imani a kan mitandai da jamii zai iya gabani wane zai rinjãya? Ga ya jiba wa wannan tambayi, muna samar wani makari na Twitter wanda aka yi wa gaskatar da gaskiyar gaskiyar, wanda Muke sanar da wani daraja na log-line wanda ke gane gaskiyar da gaskiyar da ke da tsari. Sa'an nan kuma Muka sanya waɗansu ãyõyi bayyanannu. Kayan hanyoyinmu da za'a gabatar da marinjaya ne mafiya farat ɗaya, yana dõgara a kan wasu mataimaka masu motsi kamar da aka shigar. Babu buƙata wani danne na ƙidãya wa matsalan da aka gabatar da kuma yana cika bakin sauti da sauti-wato a kan aikin bayani mai tsawo. Tuna bayan jinsi za'a iya amfani da hanyarmu dõmin a iya cika masu aminci ga abin da aka sani na akani guda da bakin ka gane matsalam na mãkirci.", 'sk': 'Uporabniki družbenih medijev pogosto izrecno napovedujejo prihajajoče dogodke. Takšne izjave se razlikujejo v stopnji gotovosti, ki jo avtor izraža glede rezultata: "Leonardo DiCaprio bo zmagal za najboljšega igralca" proti "Leonardo DiCaprio lahko zmaga" ali "Leonardo nikakor ne zmaga!". Ali lahko priljubljena prepričanja na socialnih omrežjih napovedujejo, kdo bo zmagal? Da bi odgovorili na to vprašanje, zgradimo korpus tweetov z oznakami za veridikalnost, na katerem usposabljamo log-linearni klasifikator, ki z visoko natančnostjo zazna pozitivno veridikalnost. Nato napovedujemo negotove rezultate z uporabo modrosti množice, z združevanjem eksplicitnih napovedi uporabnikov. Naša metoda za napovedovanje zmagovalcev je popolnoma avtomatizirana in se zanaša le na nabor tekmovalcev kot vložek. Ne zahteva podatkov o usposabljanju preteklih rezultatih in presega osnovne črte občutkov in tweetov pri širokem naboru nalog napovedovanja tekmovanj. Dodatno prikazujemo, kako naš pristop lahko uporabimo za merjenje zanesljivosti napovedi posameznih računov in retrospektivno identificiranje rezultatov presenečenj.', 'he': 'משתמשים בתקשורת חברתית לעתים קרובות עושים חזיונות ברורות על האירועים הקרובים. הצהרות כאלה שונות במידה של ביטחון שהסופר מבטא כלפי התוצאה: "לאונרדו דיקפריו ינצח בשחקן הטוב ביותר" נגד "לאונרדו דיקפריו יכול לנצח" או "אין סיכוי שליאונרדו ינצח!". האם אמונות פופולריות בתקשורת חברתית יכולות לחזות מי ינצח? כדי לענות על השאלה הזאת, אנו בונים קופוס של טוויטים שנעטפו עבור האמיתיות שבה אנו מאמן מסווג לוג-לינרי שמגלה אמתיות חיובית עם מדויקה גבוהה. ואז אנו מתחזים תוצאות לא בטוחות בשימוש בחכמה של הקהל, באמצעות האספקציה של התחזויות הברורות של המשתמשים. השיטה שלנו לציון המנצחים אוטומטית לחלוטין, תסמכת רק על קבוצת מתעמדים כתוצאה. זה לא דורש מידע אימון של תוצאות עברות ומוציא תחושות ותוויט קווים בסיסיים על מגוון רחב של משימות חזיון התחרות. אנחנו גם מראים איך הגישה שלנו יכולה להשתמש כדי למדוד את אמינות החשבונות הפרטיים של חשבונות בודדים ולזיהוי באופן אחורה תוצאות הפתעה.', 'bo': "སྤྱི་ཚོགས རྩོམ་པ་པོ་འདི་དག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་མཇུག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་མིན་འདུག: 'Leonardo DiCaprio་ནི་རྒྱལ་ཁ་ཐོག་མཁན་རྒྱལ་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། Leonardo DiCaprio་ནི་ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་གི་མི་མང་ཆེ་བའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྟོན་ཐུབ་མིན་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་འདི་ལ་ལན་པར་ངེད་ཚོའི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་མཐོ་ཁག་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མི་རྟོགས་པའི་དཔོན་རིགས་སྤྱད་ནས་ངེད་ཚོའི་གསལ་བཤད་རྟོགས་པའི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་བསྡད་བྱས་ནས་ Our method for forecasting winners is fully automated, relying on a set of contenders as input. It requires no training data of past outcomes and outperforms sentiment and tweet volume baselines on a broad range of contest prediction tasks. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ཇི་ལྟར་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་རུང་བ་དང་ལྟ་སྟངས་གཞན་"}
{'en': 'Story Comprehension for Predicting What Happens Next', 'ar': 'استيعاب القصة للتنبؤ بما سيحدث بعد ذلك', 'es': 'Comprensión de la historia para predecir lo que sucederá después', 'pt': 'Compreensão da história para prever o que acontece a seguir', 'fr': "Compréhension de l'histoire pour prédire ce qui se passera ensuite", 'ja': '次に起こることを予測するためのストーリーの理解', 'zh': '故事,所以卜接也', 'hi': 'आगे क्या होता है यह भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए कहानी समझ', 'ru': 'Понимание истории для предсказания того, что произойдет дальше', 'ga': 'Tuiscint Scéil le hAghaidh Ar Aghaidh A Thuar', 'ka': 'ისტორიის კომპრენცია, რომელიც შემდეგ მოხდება', 'hu': 'Történetértés a következő történetek előrejelzéséhez', 'el': 'Κατανόηση ιστοριών για την πρόβλεψη του τι θα συμβεί στη συνέχεια', 'it': 'Comprensione della storia per prevedere ciò che accadrà dopo', 'kk': 'Келесі нәтижелерді таңдау үшін оқиғалардың көпшілігі', 'lt': 'Story Comprehension for Predicting What Happens Next', 'mk': 'Приказна за предвидување на она што ќе се случи следно', 'ms': 'Pemahaman Cerita untuk Menambarkan Apa yang berlaku Seterusnya', 'ml': 'അടുത്തെത്തുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടി സൂക്ഷിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Komprensjoni tal-istorja għat-Tbassir ta’ X’jiġri Wara', 'mn': 'Дараагийн юу болж байгааг таамаглах түүх', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie historii dla przewidywania tego, co się wydarzy dalej', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea poveștii pentru a anticipa ce se întâmplă în continuare', 'sr': 'Komplikacija priče za predviđanje šta se događa sledeće', 'si': 'කතාව සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා මොකක්ද ඊලඟ වෙන්නේ?', 'so': 'Qori dhamaanka u diyaarinta', 'sv': 'Berättelseförståelse för att förutsäga vad som händer härnäst', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்றத்திற்கான சேமிப்பு முடிவு', 'ur': 'اگلے کیا ہوتا ہے؟', 'uz': 'Story Comprehension for Predicting What Happens Next', 'vi': 'Sự hiểu biết về chuyện xảy ra tiếp theo', 'bg': 'Разбиране на историята за предсказване какво ще се случи след това', 'da': 'Historieforståelse for at forudsige, hvad der sker næste gang', 'nl': 'Begrijpen van het verhaal om te voorspellen wat er daarna gebeurt', 'hr': 'Komplikacija priče za predviđanje što se događa sljedeće', 'id': 'Kompresi cerita untuk memprediksi apa yang terjadi selanjutnya', 'fa': 'توضیح داستان برای پیش بینی کردن اتفاق بعدی', 'de': 'Story-Verständnis für Vorhersagen, was als nächstes passiert', 'sw': 'Hifadhi ya Kupima kwa ajili ya Kujiandaa Kinachofuata', 'tr': 'Sonraki Neler bolup geçirip Beklemek için Geçmiş Derleme', 'af': 'Story Comprehension for Predicting What Happens Next', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Պատմությունների ընկալումն այն բանի համար, թե ինչ է տեղի ունենում հետո', 'sq': 'Përfaqje historie për parashikimin e asaj që ndodh më pas', 'ko': '앞으로 무슨 일이 일어날지 예측하는 이야기 이해', 'az': 'Sonrakı nələr olacağını öyrənmək üçün hekayələri', 'bn': 'পরবর্তী কি পছন্দ করার জন্য সংরক্ষণ করুন', 'bs': 'Komplikacija priče za predviđanje šta se događa sljedeće', 'ca': 'Comprensió de la història per predir el que passa després', 'cs': 'Porozumění příběhu pro predikci toho, co se stane dál', 'et': 'Lugu arusaam järgmise juhtumi prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'Tarinan ymmärtäminen seuraavien tapahtumien ennustamiseen', 'jv': 'Ngucap asai perbudhakan kanggo Kemerdekaan Winih Nari', 'sk': 'Razumevanje zgodbe za predvidevanje, kaj se bo zgodilo naslednje', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'בינה סיפורים על מנת לחזות מה קורה הבא', 'bo': 'Story Comprehension for Predicting What Happens Next'}
{'en': 'Automatic story comprehension is a fundamental challenge in Natural Language Understanding, and can enable computers to learn about social norms, human behavior and commonsense. In this paper, we present a story comprehension model that explores three distinct semantic aspects : (i) the sequence of events described in the story, (ii) its emotional trajectory, and (iii) its plot consistency. We judge the model’s understanding of real-world stories by inquiring if, like humans, it can develop an expectation of what will happen next in a given story. Specifically, we use it to predict the correct ending of a given short story from possible alternatives. The model uses a hidden variable to weigh the semantic aspects in the context of the story. Our experiments demonstrate the potential of our approach to characterize these semantic aspects, and the strength of the hidden variable based approach. The model outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches and achieves best results on a publicly available dataset.', 'ar': 'يعد الفهم التلقائي للقصة تحديًا أساسيًا في فهم اللغة الطبيعية ، ويمكن أن يمكّن أجهزة الكمبيوتر من التعرف على الأعراف الاجتماعية والسلوك البشري والمنطق. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نموذجًا لفهم القصة يستكشف ثلاثة جوانب دلالية مميزة: (1) تسلسل الأحداث الموصوفة في القصة ، (2) مسارها العاطفي ، و (3) اتساق الحبكة. نحكم على فهم النموذج لقصص العالم الواقعي من خلال الاستفسار عما إذا كان بإمكانه ، مثل البشر ، تطوير توقع لما سيحدث بعد ذلك في قصة معينة. على وجه التحديد ، نستخدمها للتنبؤ بالنهاية الصحيحة لقصة قصيرة معينة من البدائل الممكنة. يستخدم النموذج متغيرًا خفيًا لتقييم الجوانب الدلالية في سياق القصة. توضح تجاربنا إمكانات نهجنا لوصف هذه الجوانب الدلالية ، وقوة النهج الخفي القائم على المتغير. يتفوق النموذج على أحدث الأساليب ويحقق أفضل النتائج على مجموعة بيانات متاحة للجمهور.', 'es': 'La comprensión automática de historias es un desafío fundamental en la comprensión del lenguaje natural y puede permitir que las computadoras aprendan sobre las normas sociales, el comportamiento humano y el sentido común. En este artículo, presentamos un modelo de comprensión de historias que explora tres aspectos semánticos distintos: (i) la secuencia de eventos descritos en la historia, (ii) su trayectoria emocional y (iii) su consistencia argumental. Juzgamos la comprensión del modelo de las historias del mundo real al preguntarnos si, al igual que los humanos, puede desarrollar una expectativa de lo que sucederá después en una historia determinada. Específicamente, lo utilizamos para predecir el final correcto de una historia corta dada a partir de posibles alternativas. El modelo utiliza una variable oculta para sopesar los aspectos semánticos en el contexto de la historia. Nuestros experimentos demuestran el potencial de nuestro enfoque para caracterizar estos aspectos semánticos y la fuerza del enfoque basado en variables ocultas. El modelo supera a los enfoques más avanzados y logra los mejores resultados en un conjunto de datos disponible públicamente.', 'pt': 'A compreensão automática de histórias é um desafio fundamental na compreensão da linguagem natural e pode permitir que os computadores aprendam sobre normas sociais, comportamento humano e senso comum. Neste artigo, apresentamos um modelo de compreensão da história que explora três aspectos semânticos distintos: (i) a sequência de eventos descritos na história, (ii) sua trajetória emocional e (iii) sua consistência do enredo. Julgamos a compreensão do modelo das histórias do mundo real perguntando se, como os humanos, ele pode desenvolver uma expectativa do que acontecerá a seguir em uma determinada história. Especificamente, nós o usamos para prever o final correto de um determinado conto a partir de alternativas possíveis. O modelo usa uma variável oculta para pesar os aspectos semânticos no contexto da história. Nossos experimentos demonstram o potencial de nossa abordagem para caracterizar esses aspectos semânticos e a força da abordagem baseada em variáveis ocultas. O modelo supera as abordagens de última geração e alcança os melhores resultados em um conjunto de dados disponível publicamente.', 'fr': "La compréhension automatique d'une histoire est un défi fondamental dans la compréhension du langage naturel et peut permettre aux ordinateurs d'en savoir plus sur les normes sociales, le comportement humain et le bon sens. Dans cet article, nous présentons un modèle de compréhension de l'histoire qui explore trois aspects sémantiques distincts\xa0: (i) la séquence des événements décrits dans l'histoire, (ii) sa trajectoire émotionnelle et (iii) sa cohérence dans l'intrigue. Nous jugeons la compréhension que le modèle a des histoires du monde réel en nous demandant si, comme les humains, il peut développer une attente quant à ce qui va se passer ensuite dans une histoire donnée. Plus précisément, nous l'utilisons pour prédire la fin correcte d'une nouvelle donnée à partir d'alternatives possibles. Le modèle utilise une variable cachée pour peser les aspects sémantiques dans le contexte de l'histoire. Nos expériences démontrent le potentiel de notre approche pour caractériser ces aspects sémantiques et la force de l'approche basée sur les variables cachées. Le modèle surpasse les approches de pointe et obtient les meilleurs résultats sur un ensemble de données accessible au public.", 'ja': 'ストーリーの自動理解は、自然言語理解の基本的な課題であり、コンピュータが社会規範、人間の行動、常識について学ぶことができます。 本稿では、(i)ストーリーに記載されている事象の順序、(ii)その感情的軌跡、(iii)そのプロットの一貫性という3つの異なる意味的側面を探求するストーリー理解モデルを提示する。 私たちは、モデルが現実の物語を理解しているかどうかを判断するために、人間のように、それが特定の物語で次に何が起こるかを期待することができるかどうかを問い合わせます。 具体的には、可能な代替案から与えられた短編の正しい結末を予測するために使用します。 モデルは、隠された変数を使用して、ストーリーの文脈における意味的側面を重み付けします。 私たちの実験は、これらの意味的側面を特徴付けるための私たちのアプローチの可能性と、隠れた変数ベースのアプローチの強さを示しています。 このモデルは、最先端のアプローチを上回り、公開されているデータセットで最高の結果を達成します。', 'zh': '自解者,自然语言知之本,可使计算机知社会规范,人行常识也。 于本文中,发一事解模,当探三异语义:(i)事次第,(ii)其情迹,及(iii)其情节一致性。 问模样如人,可以接给定事,何期以决世事之解? 具体来说以易方给定短篇小说之正也。 用隐变量权衡上下文语义也。 吾实验证吾方法表征此语义之力,及隐变量之术。 先入之法,明数集上最。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित कहानी समझ प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ में एक मौलिक चुनौती है, और कंप्यूटर को सामाजिक मानदंडों, मानव व्यवहार और सामान्य ज्ञान के बारे में जानने में सक्षम बना सकती है। इस पेपर में, हम एक कहानी समझ मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो तीन अलग-अलग शब्दार्थ पहलुओं की पड़ताल करता है: (i) कहानी में वर्णित घटनाओं का अनुक्रम, (ii) इसका भावनात्मक प्रक्षेपवक्र, और (iii) इसकी साजिश स्थिरता। हम वास्तविक दुनिया की कहानियों की मॉडल की समझ का न्याय करते हैं, यह पूछकर कि क्या, मनुष्यों की तरह, यह एक उम्मीद विकसित कर सकता है कि किसी दी गई कहानी में आगे क्या होगा। विशेष रूप से, हम इसका उपयोग संभावित विकल्पों से किसी दिए गए लघु कहानी के सही अंत की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए करते हैं। मॉडल कहानी के संदर्भ में शब्दार्थ पहलुओं को तौलने के लिए एक छिपे हुए चर का उपयोग करता है। हमारे प्रयोगइन शब्दार्थ पहलुओं को चिह्नित करने के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण की क्षमता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और छिपे हुए चर आधारित दृष्टिकोण की ताकत। मॉडल अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है और सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटासेट पर सर्वोत्तम परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Автоматическое понимание истории является фундаментальной задачей в понимании естественного языка и может позволить компьютерам узнать о социальных нормах, человеческом поведении и здравом смысле. В этой статье мы представляем модель понимания истории, которая исследует три отдельных семантических аспекта: (i) последовательность событий, описанных в истории, (ii) ее эмоциональную траекторию и (iii) ее сюжетную последовательность. Мы оцениваем понимание модели реальных историй, спрашивая, может ли она, как и люди, развить ожидание того, что произойдет дальше в данной истории. В частности, мы используем его, чтобы предсказать правильное окончание данной короткой истории из возможных альтернатив. Модель использует скрытую переменную для взвешивания семантических аспектов в контексте истории. Наши эксперименты демонстрируют потенциал нашего подхода к характеристике этих семантических аспектов, а также силу подхода, основанного на скрытых переменных. Модель превосходит современные подходы и достигает наилучших результатов на общедоступном наборе данных.', 'ga': 'Dúshlán bunúsach sa Tuiscint ar Theanga Nádúrtha is ea tuiscint scéalta go huathoibríoch, agus féadann sí cur ar chumas ríomhairí foghlaim faoi noirm shóisialta, iompar daonna agus tuiscint coiteann. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid múnla tuisceana i láthair a dhéanann iniúchadh ar thrí ghné shéimeantacha ar leith: (i) seicheamh na n-imeachtaí a gcuirtear síos orthu sa scéal, (ii) a chonair mhothúchánach, agus (iii) a chomhsheasmhacht plota. Déanaimid breithiúnas ar thuiscint na samhla ar scéalta ón bhfíorshaol trína fhiafraí an féidir leis, cosúil le daoine, ionchas a fhorbairt don chéad rud eile a tharlóidh i scéal ar leith. Go sonrach, bainimid úsáid as chun deireadh ceart gearrscéal tugtha a thuar ó roghanna eile a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann. Úsáideann an tsamhail athróg fholaithe chun na gnéithe shéimeantacha a mheá i gcomhthéacs an scéil. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh acmhainn ár gcur chuige chun na gnéithe séimeantacha seo a thréithriú, agus neart an chur chuige fholaithe atá bunaithe ar athróga. Sáraíonn an tsamhail na cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha agus baintear amach na torthaí is fearr ar thacar sonraí atá ar fáil go poiblí.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus történetmegértés alapvető kihívás a természetes nyelv megértésében, és lehetővé teszi a számítógépek számára, hogy megismerjék a társadalmi normákat, az emberi viselkedést és a közérzetet. Ebben a cikkben bemutatunk egy történetértési modellt, amely három különböző szemantikai aspektust vizsgál: (i) a történetben leírt események sorrendjét, (ii) az érzelmi pályáját, és (iii) a történet konzisztenciáját. Úgy ítéljük meg, hogy a modell megérti a valós történeteket, hogy megkérdezzük, hogy az emberekhez hasonlóan képes-e kifejleszteni azt az elvárást, hogy mi fog történni egy adott történetben. Konkrétan arra használjuk, hogy megjósoljuk egy adott novella helyes befejezését a lehetséges alternatívákból. A modell egy rejtett változót használ, hogy mérlegelje a szemantikai aspektusokat a történet kontextusában. Kísérleteink bemutatják megközelítésünk lehetőségét ezen szemantikai aspektusok jellemzésére, valamint a rejtett változó alapú megközelítés erejét. A modell felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb megközelítéseket, és a nyilvánosan elérhető adatkészleten a legjobb eredményeket éri el.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη κατανόηση της ιστορίας είναι μια θεμελιώδης πρόκληση στην κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας και μπορεί να επιτρέψει στους υπολογιστές να μάθουν για τους κοινωνικούς κανόνες, την ανθρώπινη συμπεριφορά και την κοινή λογική. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο κατανόησης ιστορίας που διερευνά τρεις διακριτές σημασιολογικές πτυχές: (i) την ακολουθία των γεγονότων που περιγράφονται στην ιστορία, (ii) τη συναισθηματική της πορεία και (iii) τη συνοχή της πλοκής. Κρίνουμε την κατανόηση του μοντέλου των πραγματικών ιστοριών ρωτώντας αν, όπως και οι άνθρωποι, μπορεί να αναπτύξει μια προσδοκία για το τι θα συμβεί στη συνέχεια σε μια δεδομένη ιστορία. Συγκεκριμένα, το χρησιμοποιούμε για να προβλέψουμε το σωστό τέλος μιας συγκεκριμένης διηγήσεως από πιθανές εναλλακτικές λύσεις. Το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί μια κρυμμένη μεταβλητή για να ζυγίσει τις σημασιολογικές πτυχές στο πλαίσιο της ιστορίας. Τα πειράματά μας καταδεικνύουν τη δυνατότητα της προσέγγισής μας να χαρακτηρίσουμε αυτές τις σημασιολογικές πτυχές, καθώς και τη δύναμη της προσέγγισης με βάση τις κρυμμένες μεταβλητές. Το μοντέλο ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις και επιτυγχάνει τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα σε ένα δημόσιο διαθέσιμο σύνολο δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ავტომატური ისტორიების გაგრძნობა არის ფუნდამენტური გამოცდილება, რომელიც შეუძლია კომპიუტერები სოციალური ნორმებზე, ადამიანის ქცევის და საერთო სიცოცხლეობ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ისტორიის მოდელს, რომელიც სამი განსაკუთრებული სემონტიკური აპექტიკების განსხვავება: i) ისტორიაში აჩვენებული მოვლენების განსხვავება, ii) მისი ემოციონალური რპაექტიკო და iii) მი ჩვენ მოდელის შესახებ რეალური მსოფლიო ისტორიების შესახებ დავუწვებთ თუ, როგორც ადამიანები, ის შეუძლია განვითარება რას მოხდება შემდეგ განვითარებული ისტორიაში. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ ამას გამოყენებთ შესაძლებელი ალტენტიფიკატების მარტივი დასრულება. მოდელის გამოყენება საკუთარი ცვლილების სიმენტიკური აპექტები ისტორიის კონტექსტში. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი პროგრამის პროცენტის პროცენტის პროცენტის გამოყენება, რომელიც ამ სემონტიკური აპექტირების პროცენტის, და დახურებილი ცვლი მჲევლყრ ნაოპაგთ ნაი-ეჲბპთრვ პვჱსლრართ ნა ოსბლთფნჲ ოპთლთფნთ ეანაზთრვ.', 'it': "La comprensione automatica della storia è una sfida fondamentale nella comprensione del linguaggio naturale e può consentire ai computer di conoscere le norme sociali, il comportamento umano e il senso comune. In questo articolo, presentiamo un modello di comprensione della storia che esplora tre aspetti semantici distinti: (i) la sequenza degli eventi descritti nella storia, (ii) la sua traiettoria emotiva, e (iii) la sua consistenza della trama. Giudiciamo la comprensione del modello delle storie del mondo reale chiedendoci se, come gli esseri umani, può sviluppare un'aspettativa di ciò che accadrà dopo in una data storia. Nello specifico, lo usiamo per prevedere la conclusione corretta di un dato racconto breve da possibili alternative. Il modello utilizza una variabile nascosta per pesare gli aspetti semantici nel contesto della storia. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano il potenziale del nostro approccio per caratterizzare questi aspetti semantici, e la forza dell'approccio basato su variabili nascoste. Il modello supera gli approcci all'avanguardia e raggiunge i migliori risultati su un set di dati pubblicamente disponibile.", 'lt': 'Automatinis istorijos supratimas yra esminis iššūkis gamtos kalbos supratimo srityje ir gali sudaryti sąlygas kompiuteriams mokytis apie socialines normas, žmogaus elgesį ir bendrą supratimą. Šiame dokumente pristatome istorijos supratimo model į, kuriame nagrinėjami trys skirtingi semantiniai aspektai: i) istorijoje aprašytų įvykių seka, ii) jos emocinė trajektorija ir iii) jos ploto nuoseklumas. Mes vertiname modelio supratimą apie tikrąjį pasaulį, klausdami, ar, kaip ir žmonės, jis gali išsivystyti lūkesčius dėl to, kas įvyks toliau konkrečioje istorijoje. Konkrečiai, mes naudojame ją, kad nuspėtume teisingą tam tikros trumpos istorijos pabaigą iš galimų alternatyvų. Modelis naudoja paslėptą kintamąjį, kad pasvertų semantinius aspektus istorijos kontekste. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo mūsų požiūrio potencialą apibūdinti šiuos semantinius aspektus ir paslėpto kintamojo požiūrio stiprumą. Šis modelis atitinka naujausius metodus ir užtikrina geriausius viešai prieinamų duomenų rinkinio rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Автоматското разбирање на приказните е фундаментален предизвик во разбирањето на природниот јазик, и може да им овозможи на компјутерите да научат за социјалните норми, човечкото однесување и заедничкото мислење. Во овој весник претставуваме модел за разбирање на приказната кој истражува три различни семантични аспекти: (i) секвенцијата на настаните опишани во приказната, (ii) нејзината емоционална траекторија, и (iii) нејзината констанција на заговорот. Го проценуваме разбирањето на моделот за приказните на вистинскиот свет со прашање дали, како и луѓето, може да развие очекувања за тоа што ќе се случи следно во одредена приказна. Специфично, го користиме за да го предвидеме вистинскиот крај на дадена кратка приказна од можни алтернативи. Моделот користи скриена променлива за тежина на семантичните аспекти во контекстот на приказната. Нашите експерименти го демонстрираат потенцијалот на нашиот пристап да ги карактеризираме овие семантични аспекти, и силата на скриениот променлив базиран пристап. The model outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches and achieves best results on a publicly available dataset.', 'kk': 'Автоматтық оқиғаны түсіну - табиғи тілді түсінуде негізгі мәселе. Компьютердің әлемдік нормалары, адамдардың әрекеттері және көпшілік сезімі туралы үйренуге Бұл қағазда, біз үш түрлі семантикалық аспекттерді зерттейтін түсініктер үлгісін таңдаймыз: i) оқиғада таңдаған оқиғалардың реті, (ii) оның эмоциялық траекториясы және (iii) оның платқа тұрақтылығы. Біз үлгісін шын әлемдегі оқиғаларды түсініп, адамдар сияқты, ол келесі оқиғада не болатынын күтпей алады деп сұрақ аламыз. Мүмкін альтернативтерден келтірілген қысқа оқиғаны дұрыс аяқтау үшін қолданамыз. Бұл үлгі жасырын айнымалылығын журналдың контекстінде семантикалық аспекттерді өлшейту үшін қолданады. Біздің тәжірибеміз бұл семантикалық аспекттерді, жасырын айнымалылық тәжірибесінің күшін көрсетеді. Бұл үлгі күй- жайындағы күй- жайын жеткізеді және жалпы деректер жиынының ең жақсы нәтижелерін жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Pemahaman cerita automatik adalah cabaran dasar dalam Pemahaman Bahasa Alami, dan boleh memungkinkan komputer untuk belajar tentang norm sosial, perilaku manusia dan keseluruhan. Dalam kertas in i, kami memperkenalkan model pemahaman cerita yang mengeksplorasi tiga aspek semantik yang berbeza: (i) urutan peristiwa yang diterangkan dalam cerita, (ii) trajektori emosionalnya, dan (iii) konsistensi plot. Kami menghakimi pemahaman model cerita dunia sebenar dengan bertanya-tanya jika, seperti manusia, ia boleh mengembangkan harapan apa yang akan berlaku selanjutnya dalam cerita tertentu. Secara khusus, kita gunakannya untuk meramalkan akhir yang betul cerita pendek yang diberikan dari alternatif yang mungkin. Model menggunakan pembolehubah tersembunyi untuk menimbang aspek semantik dalam konteks cerita. Eksperimen kita menunjukkan potensi pendekatan kita untuk mengukur aspek semantik ini, dan kekuatan pendekatan berbasis pembolehubah tersembunyi. Model ini melebihi pendekatan terbaik dan mencapai keputusan terbaik pada set data yang tersedia secara awam.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ കഥ പരിഗണിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ ബോധനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വ്യാല്\u200dക്കെല്ലാം ആണ്. കമ്പ്യൂട്ടറുകള്\u200dക്ക് സാമൂ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സെമാന്റിക് ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കഥ മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു: (i) കഥാനത്തില്\u200d വിവരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സംഭവ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക കഥകളെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ ഗ്രഹം വിധിക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലെയാണെന്ന് ചോദിക്കുന്നത് അത് പി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d അത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സാധ്യതകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ചെറിയ കഥ അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന ചരിത്രത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d തൂക്കുവാന്\u200d ഒരു മറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന മാറിവേറിയല്\u200d ഉപ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ സെമാന്റിക്ക് ഭാഗങ്ങളെ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കാനുള്ള നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയുടെ സാധ്യതയും ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന ഈ മോഡല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയിലേക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകം ലഭ്യമായ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്', 'mt': "Il-fehim awtomatiku tal-istorja huwa sfida fundamentali fil-fehim tal-lingwa naturali, u jista’ jippermetti lill-kompjuters jitgħallmu dwar in-normi soċjali, l-imġiba tal-bniedem u l-kunsens komuni. In this paper, we present a story comprehension model that explores three distinct semantic aspects: (i) the sequence of events described in the story, (ii) its emotional trajectory, and (iii) its plot consistency.  Aħna nġudikaw il-fehim tal-mudell tal-istoriji tad-dinja reali billi nistaqsu jekk, bħall-bnedmin, jistax jiżviluppa aspettattiva ta' dak li se jseħħ wara fi storja partikolari. Speċifikament, a ħna nużaw dan biex nipprojbixxu t-tmiem korrett ta’ storja qasira partikolari minn alternattivi possibbli. Il-mudell juża varjabbli moħbija biex jiżnu l-aspetti semantiċi fil-kuntest tal-istorja. L-esperimenti tagħna juru l-potenzjal tal-approċċ tagħna biex jikkaratterizzaw dawn l-aspetti semantiċi, u s-saħħa tal-approċċ moħbi bbażat fuq varjabbli. Il-mudell iwettaq l-a ħjar approċċi avvanzati u jikseb l-aħjar riżultati fuq sett ta’ dejta disponibbli għall-pubbliku.", 'mn': 'Автоматикийн түүхийг ойлгох нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын үндсэн сорилт юм. Компьютерүүд нийгмийн норм, хүн төрөлхтний үйл ажиллагааны талаар сурах боломжтой болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид 3 төрлийн semantic хэмжээг судлах түүхийн тухай ойлголтын загварыг тайлбарлаж байна: i) түүхэнд тайлбарласан үйл явдлын дарааллыг, ii) сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загвар, iii) түүхийн төлөвлөгөө. Бид загварын бодит ертөнцийн түүхийн тухай ойлголтыг шалгаж, хүмүүс шиг, дараагийн түүхийн тухай юу болж болох вэ гэдгийг асууж байна. Ялангуяа бид үүнийг тодорхой богино түүх боломжтой сонголтуудын төгсгөлийг тодорхойлохын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Энэ загвар нь түүхийн туршлаганд семантик хэмжээсүүдийг жингэхэд нуугдан хувьсагч ашигладаг. Бидний туршилтууд эдгээр семантик хэмжээсүүдийг харуулахын тулд бидний ойлголтын потенциал болон нуугдсан өөрчлөлтийн ойлголтын хүч чадлыг харуулдаг. Энэ загвар нь урлагийн байр суурь ойлголтыг гаргаж, олон нийтэд ашиглах өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайн үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Automatisk storleik er ein grunnleggjande utfordring i naturspråk forståking, og kan slå på datamaskiner å lære om sosiale normar, menneske atferd og fellesskap. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein historiesforstørringsmodul som utforskar tre ulike semantiske aspektar: i) sekvensen av hendingar som er beskriven i historien, (ii) sin emosjonell trajektori, og (iii) plottskonsistens. Vi bestemmer modellen for forståelse av verkelege historiar ved å spørja om, som mennesker, den kan utvikle eit forventing av hva som vil skje neste i ei gitt historie. Spesielt bruker vi det for å foregå korrekte slutten av ein gitt kort historie frå moglege alternativer. Modellen brukar ein gøymd variabel for å vekta semantiske aspektane i historien. Eksperimentane våre viser potensialen på tilnærminga vårt for å karakterisera desse semantiske aspektane, og styrken på den gøymde variabelen baserte tilnærminga. Modellen utfører tilstanden til kunsten og oppnår beste resultat på ein offentlig tilgjengeleg datasett.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne zrozumienie opowieści jest podstawowym wyzwaniem w rozumieniu języka naturalnego i może umożliwić komputerom naukę o normach społecznych, ludzkich zachowaniach i zdrowym rozsądku. W artykule przedstawiamy model zrozumienia opowieści, który bada trzy odrębne aspekty semantyczne: (i) sekwencję zdarzeń opisanych w opowieści, (ii) jej trajektorię emocjonalną oraz (iii) spójność fabuły. Oceniamy zrozumienie przez model historii rzeczywistego świata poprzez pytanie, czy, podobnie jak ludzie, może rozwinąć oczekiwania na to, co będzie dalej wydarzyć się w danej historii. W szczególności używamy go do przewidywania prawidłowego zakończenia danej opowieści z możliwych alternatyw. Model wykorzystuje ukrytą zmienną do ważenia aspektów semantycznych w kontekście opowieści. Nasze eksperymenty demonstrują potencjał naszego podejścia do charakteryzowania tych aspektów semantycznych oraz siłę podejścia opartego na ukrytych zmiennych. Model ten przewyższa najnowocześniejsze podejścia i osiąga najlepsze wyniki na publicznie dostępnym zbiorze danych.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea automată a poveștii este o provocare fundamentală în înțelegerea limbajului natural și poate permite computerelor să învețe despre normele sociale, comportamentul uman și bunul simț. În această lucrare, prezentăm un model de înțelegere a poveștii care explorează trei aspecte semantice distincte: (i) secvența evenimentelor descrise în poveste, (ii) traiectoria emoțională și (iii) consistența complotului. Judecăm înțelegerea modelului a poveștilor din lumea reală întrebând dacă, la fel ca oamenii, acesta poate dezvolta o așteptare a ceea ce se va întâmpla în continuare într-o anumită poveste. Mai exact, îl folosim pentru a prezice sfârșitul corect al unei anumite povestiri scurte din posibile alternative. Modelul folosește o variabilă ascunsă pentru a cântări aspectele semantice în contextul povestirii. Experimentele noastre demonstrează potențialul abordării noastre de a caracteriza aceste aspecte semantice și puterea abordării bazate pe variabile ascunse. Modelul depășește abordările de ultimă generație și obține cele mai bune rezultate pe un set de date disponibil publicului.', 'sr': 'Automatska razumevanja priče je osnovni izazov u razumevanju prirodnog jezika, i može omogućiti kompjutere da nauče o društvenim normama, ljudskom ponašanju i zajedničkom smislu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model razumijevanja priče koji istražuje tri različita semantička aspekta: i) sekvencija događaja opisana u priči, ii) njegovu emocionalnu trajektoriju i iii) njegovu konsekvenciju ploča. Mi osuđujemo model razumevanja priče o stvarnom svijetu pitanjem da li, kao ljudi, može razviti očekivanje šta će se sledeće dogoditi u određenoj priči. Posebno ga koristimo da predvidimo pravo kraj određene kratke priče od mogućih alternativa. Model koristi skrivenu varijable da bi težio semantičke aspekte u kontekstu priče. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju potencijal našeg pristupa da karakteriziramo te semantičke aspekte i snagu skrivenog varijačnog pristupa. Model iznosi pristupe države umjetnosti i postiže najbolje rezultate na javno dostupnom setu podataka.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය කතාව තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය භාෂාව තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාජික සාමාජික සාම මේ පැත්තේ, අපි කතාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ සෙමැන්ටික් තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන කතාවක් තියෙන්නේ: (i) කතාවයේ විශේෂ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වග අපි මොඩල් එකේ ඇත්ත ලෝකය කතාවක් ගැන තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න, මිනිස්සු වගේ, ඒක පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන් විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි ඒක පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කතාවක් අවසානය කරන්න. මොඩේල් භාවිත කරන්න හැංගුණු වෙනස් භාවිත කරන්න කතාවේ සම්බන්ධයේ සැමැන්තික ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක්. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය මේ සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරවේශනය, සහ හුඟු වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ බලය. මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් දත්ත සූදානයේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'so': 'Taariikhda asalka ah waa dhibaato muhiim ah oo ku qoran waxgarashada afka asalka ah, kambiyuutarkuna wuxuu baran karaa wax ku saabsan caadooyinka bulshada, tababarka dadka iyo farsamada. Qoraalkan waxan ku qornaa tusaale hoos u dhigista, kaasoo baaraya saddex dhinac oo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan:(i) dhacdooyinka sheekada lagu qoray, (ii) waddooyinkiisa xisaabta ah iyo (iii) qorshaheeda dhamaantooda. Waxaynu xukunnaa garashada tusaalada ku saabsan sheekooyinka nolosha ee runta ah si a an wax u weydiinno in sida dadka, waxay horumari kartaa rajada waxa ka dhici doona xigta sheeko la siiyey. Si gaar ah, waxaynu isticmaalnaa si aan ugu hor tagno dhammaadka saxda ah ee warqada gaaban ee suurtagal ah. Tusaale wuxuu isticmaalaa bedelka qarsoon si uu u miisaamo dhinaca kala duwan ee warqada. Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan awoodda qaababkayaga si aan u aqoonsanno dhinacyadan kala duwan iyo xoogga qaababka qarsoon ee qarsoon. Tusaalada ayaa sameynaya habka farshaxanka ah, wuxuuna ka helaa resultooyin ugu wanaagsan oo ku saabsan sawirka macluumaadka oo aad u baahan tahay.', 'sv': 'Automatisk berättelseförståelse är en grundläggande utmaning i Natural Language Understanding, och kan göra det möjligt för datorer att lära sig om sociala normer, mänskligt beteende och allmänst. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en berättelseförståelse modell som utforskar tre distinkta semantiska aspekter: (i) sekvensen av händelser som beskrivs i berättelsen, (ii) dess emotionella bana, och (iii) dess plotkonsistens. Vi bedömer modellens förståelse av verkliga berättelser genom att fråga om den, liksom människor, kan utveckla en förväntan om vad som kommer att hända härnäst i en given berättelse. Specifikt använder vi den för att förutsäga det korrekta slutet på en given novell från möjliga alternativ. Modellen använder en dold variabel för att väga de semantiska aspekterna i berättelsens sammanhang. Våra experiment visar potentialen i vårt tillvägagångssätt att karakterisera dessa semantiska aspekter, och styrkan i det dolda variabelbaserade tillvägagångssättet. Modellen överträffar de senaste tillvägagångssätten och uppnår bästa resultat på en allmänt tillgänglig datamängd.', 'ur': 'سٹوٹی کہانیاں سمجھنے کی وجہ سے ایک بنیادی چال ہے، اور کمپیوٹروں کو اجتماعی قوموں، انسان رفتار اور عام سمجھنے کے بارے میں سیکھنے کے لئے قادر کر سکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک کہانی پیش کرتے ہیں کہ اس کی مصنوعی مدل کی تعریف کرتی ہے جو تین مختلف سیمنٹی الگوں کی تحقیق کرتی ہے: i) کہانی میں توصیح کی اتفاقات کی تعریف، ii) اس کی مصنوعی طریقہ اور iii) اس کی مصنوعی تعریف کی تعریف کرتی ہے۔ ہم نے مدل کی حقیقی دنیا کی کہانیاں کا سمجھنا فیصلہ کر لیا ہے کہ انسانوں کی طرح یہ ایک ایسی انتظار بتا سکتا ہے کہ بعدی کہانیاں میں کیا ہوگا؟ خاص طور پر، ہم اس کا استعمال کر رہے ہیں کہ ایک چھوٹی کہانی کا ٹھیک انتظام کریں ممکن انتظام سے۔ Model uses a hidden variable to weigh the semantic aspects in the context of the story. ہماری آزمائش نے ہمارے تقریبا کی امکانات کو دکھائی ہے کہ ان سیمانٹی الگوں کو دکھائیں اور چھپائے ہوئے بدل کی تقریبا کی قوت۔ موڈل ایک ظاہر موجود ڈاٹ سٹ پر بہترین نتیجے حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'தானாகவே கதை தொகுதி இயல்பான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் ஒரு முக்கிய சவால் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மூன்று வித்தியாசமான அரைப்பகுதிகளைத் தேடும் ஒரு கதை தொகுதி மாதிரி கொண்டுள்ளோம்: (i) கதையில் விவரிக்கப்பட்ட நிகழ்வுகளின் வரிச நாம் உண்மையான உலக கதைகளின் புரிந்து தீர்ப்பு தீர்ப்பு வழங்குகிறோம், மனிதர்களைப் போன்று, அது அடுத்த ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட கதை குறிப்பிட்டால், நாம் அதை பயன்படுத்தி சாத்தியமான மாற்றங்களிலிருந்து கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சிறிய கதையின் சரியா The model uses a hidden variable to weigh the semantic aspects in the context of the story. எங்கள் சோதனைகள் இந்த அரைப்பகுதிகளை குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு எங்கள் செயல்பாடுகளின் சாத்திரத்தைக் காட்டுகிறது, மறைந்த மாறிகள் ச The model outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches and achieves best results on a publicly available dataset.', 'uz': "Avto-aniqlash tarixini tabiiy tilni o'rganish asosiy muammolar, va kompyuterlarni jamiyat qoidalari, inson tabiiy va xavfli haqida o'rganish mumkin. In this paper, we present a story comprehension model that explores three distinct semantic aspects: (i) the sequence of events described in the story, (ii) its emotional trajectory, and (iii) its plot consistency.  Biz modelning haqiqiqiy dunyodagi hikoyalarni tushunamiz, insonlar kabi, bu keyingi ko'rsatilgan tarixida nima bo'ladigan kutilgan kutilgan deb so'raymiz. Ko'rsatilgan, biz buni foydalanamiz mumkin bo'lgan qisqa tarixining oxirini o'zgartirish uchun ishlatimiz mumkin. Name Bizning imtiyozlarimiz bu semantik aspektlarni ko'rsatishimizning imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi, va qarab boʻlgan o'zgaruvchining asosiy usuli kuchini ko'rsatadi. Name", 'vi': 'Việc thấu hiểu câu chuyện tự động là một thử thách cơ bản trong hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, và có thể giúp máy tính học về các tiêu chuẩn xã hội, hành vi con người và tầm thường. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đưa ra một mô hình thấu hiểu câu chuyện mà nghiên cứu ba khía cạnh khác nhau về mặt ngữ pháp: i) chuỗi các sự kiện được mô tả trong câu chuyện, Chúng tôi đánh giá s ự hiểu biết của người mẫu về những câu chuyện thế giới thực bằng cách hỏi rằng, giống như con người, nó có thể phát triển mong đợi những gì sẽ xảy ra tiếp theo trong một câu chuyện cụ thể. Cụ thể, chúng ta sử dụng nó để dự đoán kết thúc đúng đắn của một câu chuyện ngắn từ những phương án có thể. Người mẫu dùng biến ẩn để cân nhắc các khía cạnh ngữ pháp trong ngữ cảnh của câu chuyện. Những thí nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy khả năng của phương pháp đặc trưng những khía cạnh ngữ pháp này, và sức mạnh của phương pháp căn bản biến ẩn. The model ngoài thực hiện các phương pháp hiện đại và đạt được kết quả tốt nhất trên một bộ dữ liệu công khai.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното разбиране на историята е основно предизвикателство в разбирането на естествения език и може да даде възможност на компютрите да научат за социалните норми, човешкото поведение и благоразумието. В настоящата статия представяме модел за разбиране на историята, който изследва три различни семантични аспекта: (i) последователността от събитията, описани в историята, (ii) емоционалната траектория и (iii) последователността на сюжета. Ние преценяваме разбирането на модела за историите от реалния свят, като питаме дали, подобно на хората, той може да развие очакване какво ще се случи след това в дадена история. По-конкретно, ние го използваме, за да предвидим правилния край на даден кратък разказ от възможни алтернативи. Моделът използва скрита променлива за претегляне на семантичните аспекти в контекста на историята. Нашите експерименти демонстрират потенциала на нашия подход за характеризиране на тези семантични аспекти и силата на подхода, базиран на скрити променливи. Моделът превъзхожда най-съвременните подходи и постига най-добри резултати на публично достъпни данни.', 'nl': 'Automatisch verhaal begrijpen is een fundamentele uitdaging in het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal, en kan computers in staat stellen om te leren over sociale normen, menselijk gedrag en gezond verstand. In dit artikel presenteren we een verhaalvoorgrondmodel dat drie verschillende semantische aspecten onderzoekt: (i) de volgorde van gebeurtenissen beschreven in het verhaal, (ii) zijn emotionele traject, en (iii) zijn plotconsistentie. We beoordelen het begrip van het model van echte verhalen door te vragen of het, net als mensen, een verwachting kan ontwikkelen van wat er in een bepaald verhaal zal gebeuren. Specifiek gebruiken we het om het juiste einde van een bepaald kort verhaal te voorspellen vanuit mogelijke alternatieven. Het model gebruikt een verborgen variabele om de semantische aspecten in de context van het verhaal te wegen. Onze experimenten tonen het potentieel van onze aanpak om deze semantische aspecten te karakteriseren, en de kracht van de verborgen variabele gebaseerde benadering. Het model overtreft de state-of-the-art benaderingen en bereikt de beste resultaten op een publiek beschikbare dataset.', 'da': 'Automatisk historieforståelse er en grundlæggende udfordring i Natural Language Forståelse, og kan gøre det muligt for computere at lære om sociale normer, menneskelig adfærd og almindelig fornuft. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en historieforståelsesmodel, der udforsker tre forskellige semantiske aspekter: (i) rækkefølgen af begivenheder beskrevet i historien, (ii) dens følelsesmæssige bane, og (iii) dens plot konsistens. Vi bedømmer modellens forståelse af den virkelige verdens historier ved at spørge, om den, ligesom mennesker, kan udvikle en forventning om, hvad der vil ske næste gang i en given historie. Specielt bruger vi det til at forudsige den korrekte afslutning på en given novelle fra mulige alternativer. Modellen bruger en skjult variabel til at veje de semantiske aspekter i forbindelse med historien. Vores eksperimenter viser potentialet i vores tilgang til at karakterisere disse semantiske aspekter, og styrken af den skjulte variabelbaserede tilgang. Modellen overgår de nyeste tilgange og opnår de bedste resultater på et offentligt tilgængeligt datasæt.', 'hr': 'Autonomska razumijevanja priče je osnovni izazov u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika i može omogućiti računalima naučiti o društvenim normama, ljudskom ponašanju i češćem smislu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model razumijevanja priče koji istražuje tri različita semantička aspekta: i) sekvencija događaja opisanih u priči, ii) njegovu emocionalnu trajektoriju i iii) njegovu konsekvenciju ploča. Mi osuđujemo model razumijevanje priče o stvarnom svijetu pitanjem da li, kao što su ljudi, može razviti očekivanje o tome što će se sljedeće dogoditi u određenoj priči. Posebno ga koristimo za predviđanje pravog kraja određene kratke priče od mogućih alternativa. Model koristi skrivenu promjenu za težinu semantičkih aspekta u kontekstu priče. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju potencijal našeg pristupa karakteriziranju tih semantičkih aspekta i snagu skrivenih promjennih pristupa. Model iznosi pristupe države umjetnosti i postigne najbolje rezultate na javno dostupnom setu podataka.', 'de': 'Automatisches Geschichtenverständnis ist eine grundlegende Herausforderung im Verstehen natürlicher Sprache und kann Computern ermöglichen, soziale Normen, menschliches Verhalten und gesunden Menschenverstand kennenzulernen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein Story-Verständnis-Modell vor, das drei verschiedene semantische Aspekte untersucht: (i) die Abfolge von Ereignissen, die in der Geschichte beschrieben werden, (ii) ihre emotionale Flugbahn und (iii) ihre Plotkonsistenz. Wir beurteilen das Verständnis des Modells von realen Geschichten, indem wir fragen, ob es, wie Menschen, eine Erwartung entwickeln kann, was als nächstes in einer bestimmten Geschichte passieren wird. Konkret verwenden wir sie, um das korrekte Ende einer bestimmten Kurzgeschichte aus möglichen Alternativen vorherzusagen. Das Modell verwendet eine versteckte Variable, um die semantischen Aspekte im Kontext der Geschichte abzuwägen. Unsere Experimente zeigen das Potenzial unseres Ansatzes, diese semantischen Aspekte zu charakterisieren, und die Stärke des auf versteckten Variablen basierenden Ansatzes. Das Modell übertrifft die modernen Ansätze und erzielt beste Ergebnisse auf einem öffentlich zugänglichen Datensatz.', 'id': 'Pemahaman cerita otomatis adalah tantangan dasar dalam Pemahaman Bahasa Alami, dan dapat memungkinkan komputer untuk belajar tentang norma sosial, perilaku manusia dan keseluruhan. Dalam kertas in i, kami mempersembahkan sebuah model pemahaman cerita yang mengeksplorasi tiga aspek semantis yang berbeda: (i) urutan peristiwa yang disebutkan dalam cerita, (ii) trajektori emosionalnya, dan (iii) konsistensi plotnya. Kami menilai pemahaman model tentang cerita dunia nyata dengan bertanya-tanya apakah, seperti manusia, itu dapat mengembangkan harapan apa yang akan terjadi selanjutnya dalam cerita tertentu. Secara spesifik, kita menggunakannya untuk memprediksikan akhir yang benar dari cerita pendek yang diberikan dari kemungkinan alternatif. The model uses a hidden variable to weigh the semantic aspects in the context of the story.  Eksperimen kita menunjukkan potensi pendekatan kita untuk mengkaraterisasi aspek semantis ini, dan kekuatan pendekatan tersembunyi berdasarkan variabel. Model ini melebihi pendekatan terbaik dan mencapai hasil terbaik pada set data yang tersedia publik.', 'fa': 'فهمیدن داستان خودکار یک چالش بنیادی در درک زبان طبیعی است، و می تواند کامپیوترها را توان دهد که درباره نرم\u200cهای اجتماعی، رفتار انسان و احساس معمولی یاد بگیرند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل درک داستان را نشان می دهیم که سه نقطه\u200cهای semantic متفاوت را تحقیق می\u200cکند: (i) نقطه\u200cای از اتفاقات توصیف شده در داستان, (ii) نقطه\u200cی احساساتش و (iii) نقطه\u200cاش متفاوت است. ما درک مدل داستان دنیای واقعی را با بپرسیم آیا، مانند انسانها، می تواند انتظار توسعه دهد که در داستان داده شده چه اتفاقی بعدی خواهد افتاد. به طور خاص، ما از آن استفاده می کنیم تا پایان درست یک داستان کوتاه را از انتخابات ممکن پیش بینی کنیم. مدل از یک متغیر پنهان استفاده می\u200cکند تا سنگین نقطه\u200cهای semantic در محیط داستان باشد. آزمایشات ما پتانسیل دسترسی ما را نشان می دهند که این نقطه\u200cهای semantic و قدرت دسترسی قابل تغییر قابل مخفی را تعریف کنیم. این مدل بهترین نتیجه\u200cهای یک مجموعه داده\u200cای که در دسترس عمومی موجود می\u200cشود، به حالت هنر برخورد می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '자동 이야기 이해는 자연 언어 이해의 기본적인 도전으로 컴퓨터로 하여금 사회 규범, 인류 행위와 상식을 이해하게 할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 이야기 이해 모델을 제시하고 세 가지 서로 다른 의미를 탐색했다. (i) 이야기에서 묘사된 사건의 순서, (ii)의 감정 궤적, 그리고 (iii)의 줄거리 일치성이다.우리는 모델이 인간처럼 이야기에서 다음에 발생할 일에 대해 기대를 가질 수 있는지 물어 모델이 현실 세계 이야기에 대한 이해를 판단한다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 그것으로 가능한 예비 방안에서 단편 이야기의 정확한 결말을 예측한다.이 모델은 숨겨진 변수를 사용하여 이야기의 상하문에 있는 의미를 평가한다.우리의 실험은 이러한 의미의 잠재력을 묘사하는 방법과 변수를 숨기는 방법에 기초한 장점을 증명했다.이 모델은 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하고 공개된 데이터 집합에서 최상의 결과를 얻는다.', 'sw': 'Hali ya simulizi ya kujitegemea ni changamoto ya msingi katika lugha ya asili, na inaweza kuwawezesha kompyuta kujifunza kuhusu utamaduni wa kijamii, tabia za binadamu na makubaliano. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mfano wa msingi wa simu inayotafuta vipande vitatu tofauti vya ngono: (i) mfululizo wa matukio yaliyoelezwa katika hadithi hiyo, (ii) njia yake ya hisia, na (iii) mpango wake unaendelea. Tunahukumu ufahamu wa hadithi halisi za dunia kwa kuuliza kama, kama binadamu, inaweza kutengeneza matumaini ya kile kinachotokea baadaye katika hadithi fulani. Kwa hakika, tunatumia kutabiri mwisho sahihi wa hadithi fupi iliyotolewa kutoka kwa njia zilizowezekana. Mfano huo unatumia mabadiliko yaliyofichikana ili kupunguza vipande vya sekunde katika muktadha wa hadithi. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha uwezekano wa njia yetu ya kuweka sifa hizi za sekunde, na nguvu ya mbinu za mabadiliko. Mfano huu unaonyesha hali ya mambo ya sanaa na kupata matokeo bora kwenye seti ya taarifa zinazopatikana wazi.', 'tr': 'Otomatik hekaýa düşünmek tebigy dil düşünmesinde esasy kynçylykdyr we kompýuterleri sosial normalar, adam davranışy we jemgyýetli duýgular barada öwrenmäge mümkin edip biler. Bu kagyzda, biz 3 üýtgeşik semantik aspektini gözlemek üçin bir hekaýa düşürmek nusgasyny görkeýäris: (i) hekaýada tassyklanan wajyplaryň sırasyny, (ii) onuň duýgun trajektýasyny, we (iii) onuň çizginiň durmuşyny çykýar. Biz nusganyň hakyky dünýä hekaýalarynyň düşünmesini çözerek ynsanlar ýaly bir hekaýada näme boljakdygyny sorap bilýäris. Adatça, muny mümkin seçeneklerden berilen gysga hekaýanyň dogry soňuny çaklamak üçin ulanýarys. Bu model hekaýanyň kontekstinde semantik aspektleri çykmak üçin gizli üýtgeşikleri ulanýar. Bizim deneylerimiz bu semantik aspektleri ve gizli değişkenin tabanlı yaklaşımının gücünü tanıtır. Bu nusga häzirki möhüm bolan ýagdaýyň durumyny çykarýar we halkara bar maglumat setirinde iñ gowy netijesi çykar.', 'af': "Outomatiese storie verstaan is 'n fundamentele uitdrukking in Natuurlike Taal Verstaan, en kan rekenaars aktiveer om te leer oor sosiale norme, menslike gedrag en gewoonlik. In hierdie papier voorsien ons 'n storie verstaan model wat drie verskillende semantiese aspekte uitsoek: i) die volgorde van gebeurtenis beskrywe in die storie, (ii) sy emosionele trajektorie, en (iii) sy plot konsistensie. Ons oordeel die model se verstanding van werklike wêreld stories deur te vra of dit 'n verwaging van wat volgende sal gebeur in 'n gegewe storie, soos mense, kan ontwikkel. Spesifieke, ons gebruik dit om die regte einde van 'n gegewe kort storie te voorskou van moontlik alternatiewe. Die model gebruik 'n verborge veranderlike na weeg die semantiese aspekte in die konteks van die storie. Ons eksperimente vertoon die potensiele van ons toegang om hierdie semantiese aspekte te karakteriseer en die krag van die verborge veranderlike gebaseerde toegang te bewys. Die model uitvoer die staat van die kuns toegang en bereik die beste resultate op 'n openlik beskikbaar datastel.", 'sq': 'Përkuptimi automatik i historive është një sfidë thelbësore në kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore dhe mund të lejojë kompjuterët të mësojnë rreth normave sociale, sjelljes njerëzore dhe kuptimit të përbashkët. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një model të kuptimit të historisë që eksploron tre aspekte të ndryshme semantike: (i) sekuenca e ngjarjeve të përshkruara në histori, (ii) trajektoria e saj emocionale dhe (iii) konsistencën e komplotit të saj. Ne gjykojmë kuptimin e model it për historitë e botës reale duke pyetur nëse, si njerëzit, mund të zhvillojë një shpresë për atë që do të ndodhë më pas në një histori të caktuar. Veçanërisht, ne e përdorim për të parashikuar përfundimin e saktë të një historie të shkurtër nga alternativa të mundshme. Modeli përdor një variabel të fshehur për të peshuar aspektet semantike në kontekstin e historisë. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë potencialin e qasjes sonë për të karakterizuar këto aspekte semantike, dhe forcën e qasjes së fshehur të bazuar në ndryshuesit. Modeli kryen qasjet më të moderne dhe arrin rezultatet më të mira në një grup të dhënash të disponueshme publikisht.', 'am': 'በራሱ ታሪክ ማቀናቀል የባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ዋና ነው፤ ኮምፒውተሮችም ስለ ማኅበራዊ ትምህርት፣ የሰው ልማድ እና ትምህርት ማወቅ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ ሦስት የተለየ የsemantic ጉዳይ የሚፈልገውን የጉዳይ ክፍል እናቀርባታለን:(i) ታሪክ የተዘረጉትን ጉዳይ፣ (ii) የስህተት መንገዶች እና (iii) የፕሮግራሙን ትክክል ነው፡፡ እውነተኛውን ዓለም ታሪክ ማወቅ የምንፈርድበት ምሳሌ፣ እንደሰው፣ በተሰጠው ታሪክ የሚደርገውን ተስፋ ማድረግ ይችላልን? በተለይም፣ የተሰጠውን ታሪክ ከቻይለኛ ምርጫዎች የተፈጸመውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴል ታሪክ ክፍል ውስጥ የsemantic aspects በመመዘን የተሰወረ ለውጦችን ይጠቅማል። ፈተናዎቻችን የእነዚህን የsemantic ጉዳይ እና የተሰወረውን የልዩ ልዩነት ሥርዓት መግለጫ ማሳየት የችሎታችንን ኃይል ያሳያል፡፡ ሞዴል የልዩ አርእስት ግንኙነትን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ պատմությունների ընկալումը բնական լեզուների ընկալումը հիմնական մարտահրավեր է, և կարող է թույլ տալ համակարգիչներին սովորել սոցիալական նորմերի, մարդկային վարքագիծի և ընդհանուր գիտակցության մասին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի պատմության ընկալումների մոդել, որը ուսումնասիրում է երեք առանձնահատուկ սեմանտիկ ասպեկտներ. i) պատմության մեջ նկարագրված իրադարձությունների հաջորդականությունը, i) դրա էմոցիոնալ ճանապարհը և i) դրա գծագրի համապատասխան Մենք դատում ենք մոդելի իրական աշխարհի պատմությունների հասկացությունը հարցնելով, թե արդյոք, ինչպես մարդիկ, այն կարող է զարգացնել ակնկալությունը, թե ինչ է կատարվում հաջորդ պատմության մեջ: Specifically, we use it to predict the correct ending of a given short story from possible alternatives.  Մոդելը օգտագործում է թաքնված փոփոխական, որը կշռի սեմանտիկ ասպեկտները պատմության կոնտեքստում: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոտեցումների պոտենցիալը այս սեմանտիկ ասպեկտների բնորոշման և թաքնված փոփոխականների հիմնված մոտեցումների ուժը: Մոդելը արտադրում է ամենաբարձր մոտեցումները և հասնում է լավագույն արդյունքներին հանրային հասանելի տվյալների համակարգում:', 'ca': "La comprensió automàtica de les històries és un repte fonamental a la comprensió del llenguatge natural, i pot permetre als ordinadors aprendre sobre les normes socials, el comportament humà i el consens comú. En aquest article, presentem un model de comprensió de la història que explora tres aspectes semàntics distints: (i) la seqüència d'esdeveniments descrits en la història, (ii) la seva trajectòria emocional, i (iii) la seva consistencia del tram. We judge the model's understanding of real-world stories by inquiring if, like humans, it can develop an expectation of what will happen next in a given story.  En concret, l'utilitzem per predir el final correcte d'una història curta de possibles alternatives. El model utilitza una variable oculta per pesar els aspectes semàntics en el context de la història. Els nostres experiments demostren el potencial del nostre enfocament per caracteritzar aquests aspectes semàntics, i la força de l'enfocament ocult basat en variables. El model supera els enfocaments més avançats i aconsegueix els millors resultats d'un conjunt de dades disponible al públic.", 'bs': 'Otomačna razumijevanja priče je osnovni izazov u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika, i može omogućiti kompjutere da nauče o društvenim normama, ljudskom ponašanju i zajedničkom smislu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model razumijevanja priče koji istražuje tri različita semantička aspekta: i) sekvencija događaja opisanih u priči, ii) njegovu emocionalnu trajektoriju, i iii) njegovu konsekvenciju ploča. Mi osuđujemo model razumijevanja priče o stvarnom svijetu pitanjem da li, kao ljudi, može razviti očekivanje šta će se sljedeće dogoditi u određenoj priči. Posebno ga koristimo da predvidimo pravo kraj određene kratke priče od mogućih alternativa. Model koristi skrivenu promjenu da bi težio semantičke aspekte u kontekstu priče. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju potencijal našeg pristupa da karakteriziramo te semantičke aspekte i snagu skrivenog varijačnog pristupa. Model iznosi pristupe države umjetnosti i postigne najbolje rezultate na javno dostupnom setu podataka.', 'az': 'Avtomatik hekayələrin anlama təbiətli dil anlama dəyişiklikdir və komputerlərin sosial normlar, insan davranışları və sıradan anlama haqqında öyrənməsini qabilleşirər. Bu kağızda, üç müxtəlif semantik aspekti keşif edən bir hekayə göstəririk: i) hekayədə tanımlanmış olaraq, ii) onun emosiyal traktörünü və iii) onun planının konsistencisini. Biz model in in gerçek dünya hekayələrinin anlayışına hökm edirik, insanlar kimi bu hekayədə nələr gələcəyini gözləyirik. Biz onu mümkün alternatiflardan müəyyən edilmiş qısa hekayənin düzgün sonunu öyrənmək üçün istifadə edirik. Model hekayənin məlumatında semantik aspektlərin a ğırlığını çəkmək üçün gizli dəyişikliyi kullanır. Bizim eksperimentlərimiz bu semantik aspektləri və gizli dəyişiklik tərzlərinin gücünü göstərir. Model mövcud məlumatların yaxınlıqlarını a şkar edir və insanlara müvəffəq verilən verilən qurduğu ən yaxşı sonuçları art ırar.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় গল্প সম্পূর্ণ স্বাভাবিক ভাষা বুঝতে পারে একটি মৌলিক চ্যালেঞ্জ, আর কম্পিউটার সামাজিক নিয়ম, মানব আচরণ এবং কমন্সেন্স এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গল্প সম্পূর্ণ মডেল উপস্থাপন করেছি যা তিনটি বিভিন্ন সেমেন্টিক প্রাক্ষাপগুলো খুঁজে বের করেছে: (i) গল্পে বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে ঘটনার প্রাক্তন ঘটন আমরা এই মডেলের বাস্তবতা বিচার করি প্রকৃত বিশ্বের গল্পের ব্যাপারে জিজ্ঞেস করি যে মানুষের মত, এটা একটি নির্দিষ্ট কাহিনীতে ক বিশেষ করে আমরা এটা ব্যবহার করি সম্ভাব্য বিকল্প থেকে একটি সংক্ষিপ্ত গল্পের সঠিক সমাপ্তি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য। এই মডেলটি গল্পের প্রেক্ষাপটে সেমেন্টিক প্রান্তের ওজন করতে লুকিয়ে রেখেছে। আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে এই সেমেন্টিক প্রাক্ষাপগুলোকে চিহ্নিত করার ক্ষমতা এবং লুকিয়ে রেখেছে ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির শক মডেলটি প্রকাশ্যে প্রাপ্ত তথ্যের সেরা ফলাফল পাওয়া যায়।', 'cs': 'Automatické porozumění příběhům je základní výzvou v porozumění přirozenému jazyce a může počítačům umožnit učit se o sociálních normách, lidském chování a zdravém rozumu. V tomto článku představujeme model porozumění příběhu, který zkoumá tři odlišné sémantické aspekty: (i) posloupnost událostí popsaných v příběhu, (ii) jeho emocionální trajektorii a (iii) jeho konzistenci. Posuzujeme porozumění modelu příběhům z reálného světa tím, že se ptáme, zda, stejně jako lidé, může rozvíjet očekávání toho, co se stane dál v daném příběhu. Konkrétně ji používáme k předpovědi správného konce daného povídku z možných alternativ. Model používá skrytou proměnnou k zvážení sémantických aspektů v kontextu příběhu. Naše experimenty demonstrují potenciál našeho přístupu k charakterizaci těchto sémantických aspektů a sílu přístupu založeného na skrytých proměnných. Model překonává nejmodernější přístupy a dosahuje nejlepších výsledků na veřejně dostupné datové sadě.', 'fi': 'Automaattinen tarinan ymmärtäminen on olennainen haaste luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisessä, ja se voi auttaa tietokoneita oppimaan sosiaalisia normeja, ihmisen käyttäytymistä ja maalaisjärjestystä. Tässä työssä esittelemme tarinan ymmärtämismallin, joka tutkii kolmea eri semanttista näkökulmaa: (i) tarinassa kuvattujen tapahtumien järjestystä, (ii) sen emotionaalista kehityskulkua ja (iii) sen juonen johdonmukaisuutta. Arvioimme mallin ymmärrystä tosimaailman tarinoista kysymällä, voiko se ihmisten tavoin kehittää odotuksia siitä, mitä tapahtuu seuraavaksi tietyssä tarinassa. Erityisesti käytämme sitä ennustamaan tietyn novellin oikean lopun mahdollisista vaihtoehdoista. Malli käyttää piilotettua muuttujaa semanttisten näkökohtien punnitsemiseen tarinan kontekstissa. Kokeet osoittavat lähestymistapamme potentiaalin karakterisoida näitä semanttisia näkökohtia ja piilotetun muuttujapohjaisen lähestymistavan vahvuuden. Malli ylittää uusimmat lähestymistavat ja saavuttaa parhaat tulokset julkisesti saatavilla olevasta aineistosta.', 'et': 'Automaatne lugude mõistmine on loomuliku keele mõistmise põhiküsimus ja võib võimaldada arvutitel õppida sotsiaalsete normide, inimkäitumise ja mõistuse kohta. Käesolevas töös tutvustame loo mõistmise mudelit, mis uurib kolme erinevat semantilist aspekti: (i) loos kirjeldatud sündmuste jada, (ii) selle emotsionaalne trajektoor ja (iii) selle graafiku järjepidevus. Me hindame mudeli arusaamist reaalmaailma lugudest, uurides, kas nagu inimesed, suudab ta arendada ootusi selle kohta, mis juhtub järgmisena antud loos. Täpsemalt kasutame seda, et ennustada antud lühijutu õiget lõppu võimalikest alternatiividest. Mudel kasutab varjatud muutujat semantiliste aspektide kaalumiseks loo kontekstis. Meie eksperimendid näitavad meie lähenemisviisi potentsiaali iseloomustada neid semantilisi aspekte ja varjatud muutujapõhise lähenemisviisi tugevust. Mudel ületab kaasaegseid lähenemisviise ja saavutab avalikult kättesaadavate andmekogumitega parimad tulemused.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé Awakdhéwé sing beraksi akeh basa ning Awakdhéwé Ingkang Daerah, lan iso ngubah tikomputer kanggo ngerasakno basa Norm sokusaha, Terasakno-sangguna lan basa sing mengko. Nang pepulan iki, kita menehi pernganggo kuwi model kuwi tindakan karo alêr semanti sing mengatasai: i) sekondirno akèh barêng nggawe gerarané karo isturéné, i i) trajectoré sampek, lan (i ii) sing mengko pernganggo urip. Awak dhéwé hukum sistem sing ngerasara awak dhéwé iki dadi sakjane neng ijol-ijolan winih, yo sampek uwis seneng kuwi tindakan dhéwé iso ngubah awak dhéwé bakal terus netwayak dhéwé. Laptop" and "Desktop Language Where\'s the reference model', 'ha': "Halarin al'amarin na farat ɗaya yana da wata kima a cikin Lugha Kiasar Fasani, kuma yana iya amfani da kwamfyutan su iya fahimta game da shiryoyin jamii, aikin mutane da komasanci. Daga wannan takardan, Munã zo da wani misalin tamko wanda ke samu da bakin bayani uku na dabam-daban:(i) ƙarshen al'amarin da aka faɗa a a cikin lãbãrin, (ii) hanyonta na tamka, kuma (3) na sami da ma'anarsa. We judge the model's understanding of real-world stories by inquiring if, like humans, it can develop an expectation of what will happen next in a given story.  Aka ƙayyade, Munã amfani da shi dõmin Mu yi bayani ga ƙarshen al'amarin da aka ƙayyade nau'i daga masu yiwuwa. @ info: whatsthis Kayan jarrabayanmu sun nuna awon hanyarmu ga su yi tayari ga waɗannan masu sakan na semantiki, da ƙarfin hanyarwa wanda aka ɓõye. @ info: whatsthis", 'he': 'ההבנה אוטומטית של סיפורים היא אתגר בסיסי בהבנה של שפת טבעית, ויכולת לאפשר למחשבים ללמוד על נורמות חברתיות, התנהגות אנושית והמשמעות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים מודל הבנה סיפור שמחקר שלושה היבטים סמנטיים הבודדים: (i) רצף האירועים התארו בסיפור, (ii) מסלול הרגשי שלה, ו (iii) התקבלות התכנית שלה. אנחנו שופטים את ההבנה של המודל לסיפורים בעולם האמיתי על ידי שואל אם, כמו בני אדם, הוא יכול לפתח ציפיות של מה יקרה הבא בסיפור מסוים. במיוחד, אנו משתמשים בו כדי לחזות את הסוף הנכון של סיפור קצר מסוים מאליטרנטיבות אפשריות. המודל משתמש בשתנה חבויה כדי לשקול את היבטים הסמנטיים בקשר לסיפור. הניסויים שלנו מראים את הפוטנציאל של הגישה שלנו לתייצב את היבטים הסמנטיים האלה, וכוח של הגישה הסמויה של השתנה המבוססת. הדוגמא מגיעה יותר מהגישות המיוחדות והגיעה לתוצאות הטובות ביותר על קבוצת נתונים זמינה לציבור.', 'sk': 'Avtomatsko razumevanje zgodb je temeljni izziv v razumevanju naravnega jezika in lahko računalnikom omogoči, da se naučijo o družbenih normah, človeškem vedenju in dobrem smislu. V prispevku predstavljamo model razumevanja zgodbe, ki raziskuje tri različne semantične vidike: (i) zaporedje dogodkov, opisanih v zgodbi, (ii) njeno čustveno pot in (iii) njeno skladnost ploskve. Modelovo razumevanje resničnih zgodb presojamo tako, da vprašamo, ali lahko tako kot ljudje razvije pričakovanje, kaj se bo zgodilo naslednje v določeni zgodbi. Natančneje ga uporabljamo za napovedovanje pravilnega konca dane kratke zgodbe iz možnih alternativ. Model uporablja skrito spremenljivko za tehtanje semantičnih vidikov v kontekstu zgodbe. Naši eksperimenti kažejo potencial našega pristopa za karakterizacijo teh semantičnih vidikov in moč pristopa, ki temelji na skritih spremenljivkah. Model presega najsodobnejše pristope in dosega najboljše rezultate na javno dostopnem naboru podatkov.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རྟོགས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་རྟོགས་བསམ་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་གི་རྨན་གཞི་གྱི་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲུང་ཚོར་མི་འདྲ་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་འཆར་ཡོད་པ་དེ། ང་ཚོས་མ་དབྱིབས་འཛམ་གླིང་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་སྤེལ་བའི་གནད་དོན་རྟོགས་འདོད་པ་ལས་ མི་རིགས་དང་མི་རིགས་ལ་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱས་ནས་འད ཁྱད་པར་ན། ང་ཚོས་དེ་ལ་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཐོག་པར་བྱིན་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཐུང་ཐག་རིང་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་སྔར་སྲོལ་གྱི་འགྱུར་བ་ཅིག་སྤྱད་ནས་ཟུར་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་མཚམས་འཇོག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་experiments་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་འདི་ཚོར་འབྲི་བ་དང་། སྦྱར་ཡོད་པའི་འགྱུར་ཅན་ཀྱི་གདོང་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀ མིག་གཟུགས་འདིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་གྲངས་འབོར་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'CRF Autoencoder for Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'CRF Autoencoder لتحليل التبعية غير الخاضع للإشراف', 'fr': "Encodeur automatique CRF pour l'analyse des dépendances non supervisée", 'pt': 'Autoencoder CRF para análise de dependência não supervisionada', 'es': 'Autoencoder CRF para análisis de dependencias no supervisado', 'ja': '監視されていない依存関係解析のためのCRFオートエンコーダー', 'zh': '无监赖解析者 CRF 自编码器', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए CRF ऑटोएनकोडर', 'ru': 'Автокодировщик CRF для неконтролируемого анализа зависимостей', 'ga': 'Uath-ionchódóir CRF le haghaidh Parsáil Spleáchais Gan Mhaoirseacht', 'ka': 'CRF ავტოკოდირები განსხვავებული დასამუშავებელობის პარამეტრებისთვის', 'hu': 'CRF automatikus kódoló felügyelet nélküli függőség-értelmezéshez', 'el': 'Αυτόματος κωδικοποιητής CRF για ανάλυση ανεξέλεγκτης εξάρτησης', 'it': "Codificatore automatico CRF per l'analisi non controllata della dipendenza", 'kk': 'CRF автокодері сақталмаған тәуелдік талдау үшін', 'mk': 'CRF автокодер за ненадгледувано анализирање на зависности', 'lt': 'KRF savikodifikatorius, skirtas neprižiūrimam priklausomybės analizavimui', 'ms': 'Pengenkod Auto CRF untuk Penghuraian Dependensi Tidak Dikawal', 'ml': 'സൂക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്വയം കോഡെര്\u200d CRF', 'mn': 'CRF Автоматикийн кодлогч', 'mt': 'Awtokodifikatur tas-CRF għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza Mhux Sorveljata', 'no': 'CRF- autokodar for ikkje- lagra avhengighetstolking', 'pl': 'Autokoder CRF dla parowania zależności nienadzorowanej', 'sr': 'CRF Autokoder za neodržavane analize zavisnosti', 'ro': 'Encoder automat CRF pentru analizarea dependenței nesupravegheate', 'si': 'CRF ස්වායංචික කෝඩොර්ටර්', 'so': 'Qoraalka bilowga ah ee jardiinada aan la ilaalinayn', 'sv': 'Autokodning av CRF för icke övervakad beroendetolkning', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத சார்ந்த பாடலுக்கான CRF தன்னியக்க குறியீடு', 'ur': 'غیر محافظت اعتباری پارچینگ کے لئے CRF اتوٹ کوڈر', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': "Bảng mã hóa CRF cho'Không quan hệ phụ thuộc'.", 'da': 'Autoencoder til ikke-overvåget afhængighedstolkning af CRF', 'nl': 'CRF-autoencoder voor niet-gecontroleerde afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'hr': 'Autokoder CRF-a za neodržavano ocjenjivanje ovisnosti', 'de': 'CRF Autoencoder für unbeaufsichtigte Abhängigkeitsparsing', 'id': 'Autokoder CRF untuk Penganalis Dependensi Tidak Disupervisi', 'bg': 'Автокодер CRF за анализ на зависимостта без надзор', 'fa': 'کره\u200cدهنده خودکار CRF برای تحلیل بستگی ناحفاظت', 'sw': 'CRF', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar Maglumaty Taýýarlamak üçin CRF Otomatik Ködleme', 'af': 'CRF Outokoder vir Onondersteunde Afhanklikheidverwerking', 'ko': '감독 의존 해석이 없는 CRF 자동 인코더', 'am': 'CRF Autoencoder for Unsupervised Dependency Parsing', 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկվող կախվածության վերլուծության', 'bn': 'নির্ভর করা নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং এর জন্য CRF স্বয়ংক্রিয় এনকোডার', 'sq': 'Autokodues CRF për analizimin e pavarësisë së mbikqyrur', 'ca': "Autocodificador CRF per a l'analització de dependencies sense supervisió", 'cs': 'Autokodér CRF pro analýzu závislosti bez dohledu', 'et': 'CRF automaatkodeerija järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimise jaoks', 'az': 'Qeyd edilməmiş bağlılıq analizi üçün CRF Avtomatik Kodlayıcı', 'bs': 'CRF autokoder za neodržavano ocjenjivanje ovisnosti', 'fi': 'CRF: n automaattinen koodaus valvomattomaan riippuvuuden analysointiin', 'jv': 'Cage', 'he': 'קודד אוטומטי CRF עבור בדיקת תלויות ללא השגחה', 'sk': 'Samodejni kodirnik CRF za nenadzorovano razčlenjanje odvisnosti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'CRF རྩིས་ཡོད་མེད་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བཤད་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised dependency parsing, which tries to discover linguistic dependency structures from unannotated data, is a very challenging task. Almost all previous work on this task focuses on learning generative models. In this paper, we develop an unsupervised dependency parsing model based on the CRF autoencoder. The encoder part of our model is discriminative and globally normalized which allows us to use rich features as well as universal linguistic priors. We propose an exact algorithm for parsing as well as a tractable learning algorithm. We evaluated the performance of our model on eight multilingual treebanks and found that our model achieved comparable performance with state-of-the-art approaches.', 'es': 'El análisis de dependencias sin supervisión, que trata de descubrir estructuras de dependencia lingüística a partir de datos no anotados, es una tarea muy desafiante. Casi todo el trabajo anterior en esta tarea se centra en el aprendizaje de modelos generativos. En este artículo, desarrollamos un modelo de análisis de dependencias no supervisado basado en el autocodificador CRF. La parte del codificador de nuestro modelo es discriminativa y está normalizada globalmente, lo que nos permite utilizar funciones ricas, así como antecedentes lingüísticos universales. Proponemos un algoritmo exacto para el análisis, así como un algoritmo de aprendizaje manejable. Evaluamos el rendimiento de nuestro modelo en ocho bancos de árboles multilingües y descubrimos que nuestro modelo logró un rendimiento comparable con enfoques de última generación.', 'fr': "L'analyse des dépendances non supervisée, qui essaie de découvrir des structures de dépendance linguistique à partir de données non annotées, est une tâche très difficile. Presque tous les travaux précédents sur cette tâche se concentrent sur l'apprentissage de modèles génératifs. Dans cet article, nous développons un modèle d'analyse de dépendance non supervisée basé sur l'autoencodeur CRF. La partie encodeur de notre modèle est discriminante et normalisée globalement, ce qui nous permet d'utiliser des fonctionnalités riches ainsi que des antécédents linguistiques universels. Nous proposons un algorithme exact pour l'analyse syntaxique ainsi qu'un algorithme d'apprentissage tractable. Nous avons évalué les performances de notre modèle sur huit banques d'arbres multilingues et avons constaté que notre modèle atteignait des performances comparables avec des approches de pointe.", 'ar': 'يعد تحليل التبعية غير الخاضع للإشراف ، والذي يحاول اكتشاف هياكل التبعية اللغوية من البيانات غير المقيدة ، مهمة صعبة للغاية. تركز جميع الأعمال السابقة تقريبًا في هذه المهمة على تعلم النماذج التوليدية. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بتطوير نموذج تحليل تبعية غير خاضع للإشراف استنادًا إلى المشفر التلقائي CRF. يعتبر جزء التشفير في نموذجنا تمييزيًا ويتم تطبيعه عالميًا مما يسمح لنا باستخدام ميزات غنية بالإضافة إلى مقدمات لغوية عالمية. نقترح خوارزمية دقيقة للتحليل بالإضافة إلى خوارزمية تعلم يمكن تتبعها. قمنا بتقييم أداء نموذجنا على ثمانية بنوك متعددة اللغات ووجدنا أن نموذجنا حقق أداءً مشابهاً مع أحدث الأساليب.', 'pt': 'A análise de dependência não supervisionada, que tenta descobrir estruturas de dependência linguística a partir de dados não anotados, é uma tarefa muito desafiadora. Quase todos os trabalhos anteriores nesta tarefa se concentram no aprendizado de modelos generativos. Neste artigo, desenvolvemos um modelo de análise de dependência não supervisionado baseado no autoencoder CRF. A parte do codificador do nosso modelo é discriminativa e globalmente normalizada, o que nos permite usar recursos ricos, bem como prioritários linguísticos universais. Propomos um algoritmo exato para análise, bem como um algoritmo de aprendizado tratável. Avaliamos o desempenho de nosso modelo em oito bancos de árvores multilíngues e descobrimos que nosso modelo alcançou desempenho comparável com abordagens de última geração.', 'zh': '无监赖解析(尝试未尝注数中见言语恃以结构)一甚有挑战性也。 庶几前事集于学成模。 本文开一本CRF自编码器无监赖解析模形。 吾编码器者,别规范化也,使吾能用多闻言先验。 臣等立精解析算法及易治算法。 八言树库上评模形,见我先进成可比。', 'ja': '未注釈のデータから言語依存構造を発見しようとする、監視されていない依存関係解析は、非常に困難な作業です。この課題に関する以前のほとんどすべての作業は、生成モデルを学習することに焦点を当てている。本稿では、CRFオートエンコーダをベースとした依存関係解析モデルを開発する。私たちのモデルのエンコーダ部分は差別的であり、世界的に正規化されているため、豊富な機能と普遍的な言語学的前触れを使用することができます。解析のための正確なアルゴリズムと、トラクタブルラーニングアルゴリズムを提案します。私たちは、8つの多言語ツリーバンクでのモデルのパフォーマンスを評価し、最先端のアプローチで同等のパフォーマンスを達成しました。', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемый синтаксический анализ зависимостей, который пытается обнаружить лингвистические структуры зависимостей из аннотированных данных, является очень сложной задачей. Почти вся предыдущая работа над этой задачей сосредоточена на изучении генеративных моделей. В данной работе мы разрабатываем модель неконтролируемого синтаксического анализа зависимостей на основе автокодера CRF. Кодерная часть нашей модели является дискриминационной и глобально нормализованной, что позволяет нам использовать богатые возможности, а также универсальные лингвистические притязания. Мы предлагаем точный алгоритм синтаксического анализа, а также обучаемый алгоритм. Мы оценили эффективность нашей модели на восьми многоязычных берегах деревьев и обнаружили, что наша модель достигла сопоставимой эффективности с самыми современными подходами.', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग, जो अनएनोटेड डेटा से भाषाई निर्भरता संरचनाओं की खोज करने की कोशिश करता है, एक बहुत ही चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। इस कार्य पर लगभग सभी पिछले काम उत्पादक मॉडल सीखने पर केंद्रित हैं। इस पेपर में, हम सीआरएफ ऑटोएनकोडर के आधार पर एक असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग मॉडल विकसित करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल का एन्कोडर हिस्सा भेदभावपूर्ण और विश्व स्तर पर सामान्यीकृत है जो हमें समृद्ध सुविधाओं के साथ-साथ सार्वभौमिक भाषाई प्राथमिकताओं का उपयोग करने की अनुमति देता है। हम पार्सिंग के लिए एक सटीक एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ-साथ एक सभ्य सीखने के एल्गोरिथ्म का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमने आठ बहुभाषी ट्रीबैंक पर अपने मॉडल के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन किया और पाया कि हमारे मॉडल ने अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों के साथ तुलनीय प्रदर्शन हासिल किया।', 'ga': 'Is tasc an-dúshlánach é parsáil spleáchais gan mhaoirseacht, a dhéanann iarracht struchtúir spleáchais theangeolaíocha a aimsiú ó shonraí neamhótáilte. Díríonn beagnach gach obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar an tasc seo ar shamhlacha giniúna foghlama. Sa pháipéar seo, forbraímid múnla parsála spleáchais gan mhaoirseacht bunaithe ar uath-ionchódóir CRF. Tá an chuid ionchódóra dár múnla idirdhealaitheach agus normalaithe go domhanda a ligeann dúinn úsáid a bhaint as gnéithe saibhre chomh maith le tosaíochtaí teanga uilíocha. Molaimid algartam beacht le haghaidh parsála chomh maith le algartam foghlama inrianaithe. Rinneamar measúnú ar fheidhmíocht ár samhail ar ocht gcruach crann ilteangach agus fuaireamar amach gur bhain ár samhail feidhmíocht inchomparáide le cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'უცნობიერებული დამართლებელობის პანსერაცია, რომელიც ძალიან დარწმუნებელია ენგუფისტიკური დამართლებელობის სტრუქტურები, რომელიც უცნობიერებული მონაცემების შესახე პირდაპირად ყველა წინა სამუშაო ამ სამუშაო მუშაო დააკეთება გენერაციური მოდელზე. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ განვითარებით არაფერიზებული დასაწყებელობის მოდელს CRF ავტოკოდერების ბაზაზე. ჩვენი მოდელის კოდერების ნაწილი დისკრიმინატიურია და გლობალურად ნორმალიზებულია, რომელიც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გამოიყენოთ ბედნიერი ფუნქციები, რომელიც უნივერ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ მარტივი ალგორიტიმ, როგორც ტრაქტობული სწავლების ალგორიტიმ. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის გამოყენებას 8 მრავალენგური საბრძოლოებით გავამუშავოთ და მივიღეთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებელი გამოყენებას გავამუშავოთ მრავალური გამოყენ', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση εξάρτησης χωρίς επιτήρηση, η οποία προσπαθεί να ανακαλύψει γλωσσικές δομές εξάρτησης από μη σημειωμένα δεδομένα, είναι μια πολύ δύσκολη εργασία. Σχεδόν όλες οι προηγούμενες εργασίες σχετικά με αυτό το έργο επικεντρώνονται στην εκμάθηση παραγωγικών μοντέλων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναπτύσσουμε ένα μοντέλο ανάλυσης εξάρτησης χωρίς επίβλεψη βασισμένο στον αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή CRF. Το μέρος του κωδικοποιητή του μοντέλου μας είναι διακριτικό και παγκοσμίως ομαλοποιημένο, γεγονός που μας επιτρέπει να χρησιμοποιούμε πλούσια χαρακτηριστικά καθώς και καθολικά γλωσσικά προηγούμενα. Προτείνουμε έναν ακριβή αλγόριθμο ανάλυσης καθώς και έναν αλγόριθμο εκμάθησης. Αξιολογήσαμε την απόδοση του μοντέλου μας σε οκτώ πολύγλωσσες δεντρολίβες και διαπιστώσαμε ότι το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε συγκρίσιμες επιδόσεις με προσεγγίσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A felügyeletlen függőségi elemzés, amely megpróbálja felfedezni a nyelvi függőségi struktúrákat a megjegyzés nélküli adatokból, nagyon kihívást jelent. Szinte minden korábbi munka ezen a feladaton a generációs modellek tanulására összpontosít. Ebben a tanulmányban egy felügyelet nélküli függőség elemzési modellt dolgozunk ki a CRF autoencoder alapján. Modellünk kódoló része diszkriminatív és globálisan normalizált, ami lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy gazdag funkciókat és univerzális nyelvi prioritásokat használjunk. Javasolunk egy pontos algoritmust az elemzéshez, valamint egy vonható tanulási algoritmust. Modellünk teljesítményét nyolc többnyelvű fapadon értékeltük, és megállapítottuk, hogy modellünk összehasonlítható teljesítményt ért el a legkorszerűbb megközelítésekkel.', 'it': "L'analisi delle dipendenze non monitorata, che cerca di scoprire strutture di dipendenza linguistiche da dati non notati, è un compito molto impegnativo. Quasi tutti i lavori precedenti su questo compito si concentrano sull'apprendimento dei modelli generativi. In questo articolo, sviluppiamo un modello di analisi delle dipendenze non supervisionato basato sull'autoencoder CRF. La parte codificatrice del nostro modello è discriminatoria e normalizzata globalmente, il che ci permette di utilizzare funzionalità ricche e precedenti linguistici universali. Proponiamo un algoritmo esatto per l'analisi e un algoritmo di apprendimento trattabile. Abbiamo valutato le prestazioni del nostro modello su otto treebank multilingue e abbiamo scoperto che il nostro modello ha raggiunto prestazioni comparabili con approcci all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas priklausomybės analizavimas, kuris bando nustatyti kalbinės priklausomybės struktūras iš nenotiruotų duomenų, yra labai sunki užduotis. Beveik visi ankstesni darbai šioje užduotyje daugiausia dėmesio skiria mokymosi kartų modeliams. Šiame dokumente mes kuriame neprižiūrėtą priklausomybės analizavimo model į, pagrįstą CRF autokodatoriumi. Mūsų modelio kodavimo dalis yra diskriminacinė ir pasauliniu mastu normalizuota, todėl galime naudoti turtingas savybes ir universalius kalbinius precedentus. Siūlome tikslų analizavimo algoritmą ir traukiamą mokymosi algoritmą. Vertinome savo modelio rezultatus aštuoniose daugiakalbėse medienose ir nustatėme, kad mūsų modelis pasiekė panašius rezultatus kaip naujausi metodai.', 'kk': 'Бұл лингвистикалық тәуелсіздік құрылғыларын анықтау әрекетінің талдауы - беймәлім деректерден анықталмаған тәуелсіздік талдау - өте қиын тапсырма. Бұл тапсырманың барлық алдыңғы жұмысы генерациялық үлгілерді оқытуға көңіл береді. Бұл қағазда біз CRF автокодеріне негізделген тәуелдік талдау үлгісін құрамыз. Моделіміздің кодер бөлігі дискриминациялық және әлемдегі түрлендірілген, бұл бізге баяны мүмкіндіктерді және әлемдегі лингвистикалық алдындағыларды қолдануға мүм Біз дұрыс талдау алгоритмін және тақырыпты оқыту алгоритмін ұсынамыз. Біз үлгіміздің сегіз көптілік мәтіндіктерінің қасиетін бағалап, моделіміздің күй-жайы әдістерімен салыстыратын әдістерін таптық.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувано анализирање на зависноста, кое се обидува да открие јазични структури на зависност од незабележани податоци, е многу тешка задача. Скоро сите претходни работи на оваа задача се фокусираат на учењето генеративни модели. Во овој весник, развиваме ненадгледуван модел за анализирање зависност базиран на автокодерот на CRF. Кодерскиот дел од нашиот модел е дискриминативен и глобално нормализиран што ни овозможува да користиме богати карактеристики како и универзални јазички претходни. Предложуваме точен алгоритм за анализирање, како и алгоритм за учење. Го проценивме резултатот на нашиот модел на осум мултијазични дрвја бази и откривме дека нашиот модел постигна споредлива резултат со најновите пристапи.', 'ms': 'Unsupervised dependency parsing, which tries to discover linguistic dependency structures from unannotated data, is a very challenging task.  Hampir semua kerja sebelumnya pada tugas ini fokus pada belajar model generatif. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan model penghurai dependensi yang tidak diawasi berdasarkan pengekod sendiri CRF. The encoder part of our model is discriminative and globally normalized which allows us to use rich features as well as universal linguistic priors.  Kami cadangkan algoritma yang tepat untuk menghurai serta algoritma pembelajaran yang boleh ditarik. Kami menilai prestasi model kami pada lapan pangkalan pokok berbilang bahasa dan mendapati bahawa model kami mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan pendekatan terbaik.', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ആശ്രയിക്കാത്ത പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ്, ഭാഷ്ട്രീയ ആശ്രയിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങളില ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള പണിയെല്ലാം ജെനററിവ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ആശ്രയിക്കാത്ത പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d നാം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. CRF സ്വയം കോഡ നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200dഡര്\u200d ഭാഗമാണ് വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുന്നത്. അത് നമുക്ക് സമ്പത്തുള്ള വിശേഷതകളും പ്രപഞ്ച ഭാ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും ട്രാക്കേബിള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിനും വേണ്ടി ഒരു കൃത്യമായ ആല്\u200dഗോര ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം എട്ട് മണ്ടില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ട്രീബാങ്കുകളില്\u200d വിലയിച്ചു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തി... ...ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ', 'mn': 'Энэ нь хэлний хамааралтай байдлын бүтцийг мэдэхийг хичээдэггүй хамааралтгүй хамааралтай хуваалцах нь маш хэцүү ажил. Энэ ажил дээрх бараг л өмнөх бүх зүйл бүтээлч загваруудыг сурах төвлөрүүлдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CRF автокодлогч дээр үндсэн хамааралтгүй хамааралтай хуваалцах загварыг бүтээж байна. Бидний загварын коддогч хэсэг нь ялгаатай, дэлхий даяарчлагдсан бөгөөд энэ нь бидэнд баян чанар болон универсал хэлний өмнө ашиглах боломжтой болгодог. Бид тодорхой алгоритм болон трактерийн суралцах алгоритм гэдгийг санал болгож байна. Бид найм хэлний загварын үйлдвэрлэлийг үнэлгээд, бидний загвар нь урлагийн тусламжтай харьцуулагдах үйлдвэрлэлтэй гарч ирсэн.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tad-dipendenza mhux sorveljata, li tipprova tiskopri strutturi ta’ dipendenza lingwistika minn dejta mhux innotata, hija kompitu diffiċli ħafna. Kważi l-ħidma preċedenti kollha dwar dan il-kompitu tiffoka fuq it-tagħlim ta’ mudelli ġenerattivi. F’dan id-dokument, qed niżviluppaw mudell ta’ analiżi tad-dipendenza mhux sorveljat ibbażat fuq l-awtokodifikatur tas-CRF. Il-parti tal-kodifikatur tal-mudell tagħna hija diskriminatorja u normalizzata globalment li tippermettilna nużaw karatteristiċi rikki kif ukoll prijoritajiet lingwistiċi universali. Aħna nipproponu algoritmu eżatt għall-analiżi kif ukoll algoritmu ta’ tagħlim li jista’ jiġi ttrattat. Aħna evalwajna l-prestazzjoni tal-mudell tagħna fuq tmien banek tas-siġar multilingwi u sabu li l-mudell tagħna kiseb prestazzjoni komparabbli mal-approċċi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'no': 'Dette er ein veldig vanskeleg oppgåve for å tolka uavhengige avhengighetsstrukturer frå ulike data. Nesten alle førre arbeida på denne oppgåva fokuserer på læring av genererte modeller. I denne papiret utviklar vi eit ikkje-oppretta avhengighetstolkingsmodul basert på CRF-kodaren. Koderedelen av modellen vårt er diskriminasjon og globalt normalisert som tillater oss å bruka rike funksjonar og universelle lingviske førehandsvisingar. Vi foreslår ein nøyaktig algoritme for tolking, og ein algoritme for læring av sportabellen. Vi evaluerte utviklinga av modellen vårt på åtte fleirspråkbanker og fant at modellen vårt oppnådd sammenlignbare utviklingar med tilnærmingar av kunsten.', 'pl': 'Niemonitorowane parsowanie zależności, które próbuje odkryć językowe struktury zależności z niezapisanych danych, jest bardzo trudnym zadaniem. Prawie wszystkie poprzednie prace nad tym zadaniem skupiają się na uczeniu się modeli generacyjnych. W niniejszym artykule opracowujemy model parsowania zależności bez nadzoru oparty na autokoderze CRF. Część kodera naszego modelu jest dyskryminacyjna i globalnie znormalizowana, co pozwala nam korzystać z bogatych funkcji oraz uniwersalnych priorów językowych. Proponujemy dokładny algorytm parsowania oraz algorytm uczenia się. Oceniliśmy wydajność naszego modelu na ośmiu wielojęzycznych brzegach drzew i stwierdziliśmy, że nasz model osiągnął porównywalną wydajność z najnowocześniejszymi podejściami.', 'sr': 'Neobezbeđeno analiziranje zavisnosti, koji pokušava otkriti strukture jezičke zavisnosti iz neoznačenih podataka, veoma je izazovan zadatak. Skoro svi prethodni radovi na ovom zadatku fokusiraju se na učenje generativnih modela. U ovom papiru razvijamo model analize nezavisnosti na osnovu autokodera CRF-a. Koder deo našeg modela je diskriminacija i globalno normalizirana što nam omogućava da koristimo bogate karakteristike kao i univerzalne jezičke prednosti. Predlažemo tačan algoritam za analizu, kao i algoritam za učenje traktala. Procjenjivali smo izvršnost našeg modela na osam višejezičkih kreveta i otkrili da je naš model postigao usporedno izvršenje sa pristupima države umjetnosti.', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependențelor nesupravegheată, care încearcă să descopere structuri de dependență lingvistică din date nesupravegheate, este o sarcină foarte dificilă. Aproape toate lucrările anterioare privind această sarcină se concentrează pe învățarea modelelor generative. În această lucrare, dezvoltăm un model nesupravegheat de analizare a dependențelor bazat pe autoencoder CRF. Partea codificatoare a modelului nostru este discriminatorie și normalizată la nivel global, ceea ce ne permite să folosim caracteristici bogate, precum și priorități lingvistice universale. Propunem un algoritm exact pentru analizare, precum și un algoritm de învățare tractabil. Am evaluat performanța modelului nostru pe opt braebank multilingve și am constatat că modelul nostru a obținut performanțe comparabile cu abordări de ultimă generație.', 'si': 'බොහොම විශ්වාසය නැති විශ්වාසය විශ්වාසය, භාෂාවික විශ්වාසය සංස්කරණය හොයාගන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා නැති දත්ත මේ වැඩේ පිළිබඳ හැම දෙයක්ම මුලින් වැඩේ ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපිට CRF ස්වයංකේතකයෙන් අධිරූපය නැති විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපේ මොඩල් එකේ කෝඩාර් කොටසක් විශ්වාසීය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ඒකෙන් අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භාෂාවික වලි අපි සිද්ධ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කියලා. අපි අපේ මෝඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ගැන ගොඩක් භාෂාභාෂාත්මක විසින් අටයි අරගෙන හොයාගත්තා අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විස', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka aan ilaalinayn ku filnayn, kaas oo isku dayaya in uu ka ogaado dhismaha ku xiran luuqada, taas oo ah shaqo aad u adag. Shaqoda hore oo dhamaantood waxqabadkan waxay ku cusbooneysaa waxbarashada modelalka geneeral. In this paper, we develop an unsupervised dependency parsing model based on the CRF autoencoder.  Qaybta kooxda sameyntu waa takoorid iyo caalami ah, taas oo inagu ogolaan karta isticmaalka tayada hodanka ah iyo afka caalamiga ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal sax ah oo lagu qoro baaritaanka iyo qoraalka waxbarashada tababarida ah. Waxaannu qiimeynay sameynta siddeed baalal oo luqad kala duduwan, waxaana ogaanay in modelkayagu gaadhay muuqashada u eg qaababka farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Oserverad beroendetolkning, som försöker upptäcka språkliga beroendestrukturer från oanmälda data, är en mycket utmanande uppgift. Nästan allt tidigare arbete med denna uppgift fokuserar på att lära generativa modeller. I denna uppsats utvecklar vi en oövervakad beroendetolkningsmodell baserad på CRF autoencoder. Kodningsdelen av vår modell är diskriminerande och globalt normaliserad vilket gör att vi kan använda rika funktioner och universella språkliga prioriteringar. Vi föreslår en exakt algoritm för tolkning samt en spårbar inlärningsalgoritm. Vi utvärderade prestandan för vår modell på åtta flerspråkiga trädbackar och fann att vår modell uppnådde jämförbar prestanda med state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத சார்பு பாடல், அது மொழியில் சார்பு அமைப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முயற்சி செய்ய முயற்சி செய்கிறது, அறியாத தரவில கிட்டத்தட்ட அனைத்து முந்தைய பணி இந்த காகிதத்தில், CRF தன்னியக்க குறியீட்டை அடிப்படையில் காப்பாற்றப்படாத சார்பு பாடல் மாதிரி உருவாக்கு எங்கள் மாதிரியின் குறியீட்டு பகுதி வித்தியாசமான மற்றும் உலகமாவிய சாதாரண செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது அது நமக்கு பணக்குரிய குணங நாங்கள் பாசிங் கூட ஒரு சரியான ஆல்பரிதம் மற்றும் ஒரு தட்டச்சு கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கல்லோரியம் தேர்ந்தெடுக்க நாங்கள் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் செயல்பாட்டை எட்டு பல மொழி மரத்துண்டுகளில் மதிப்பிட்டோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் மாதிரி மாதிரி நிலைமையின் மு', 'ur': 'غیر محفوظ اعتمادی پارسینگ، جو زبان کے اعتمادی ساختاروں کو غیر معلوم ہونے کے لئے تلاش کرتی ہے، ایک بہت مشکل کام ہے. اس کام پر تقریباً تمام اگلوں کے کام جنرائیٹ موڈل کی تعلیم پر تمرکز کر رہے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک غیر قابل اعتمادی پارسینگ موڈل ایجاد کر رہے ہیں جو CRF اتوکوڈر پر بنیاد ہے. ہمارے موڈل کا کوڈر حصہ تقسیم کرنے والی ہے اور جہانول سے عامل کیا گیا ہے کہ ہمیں ثروت کے خصوصے اور عمومی زبان شناسی سے پہلے بھی استعمال کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم ایک دقیق الگوریتم کو پارس کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں اور ایک تراکٹبل سیکھنے الگوریتم بھی۔ ہم نے آٹھ زبان کے ٹریبنک پر ہمارے مدل کی عملکرد کا ارزش کیا اور دیکھا کہ ہمارے مدل نے آٹھ زبان کے ٹریبنک کے مطابق مقابلہ کی عملکرد کو پہنچایا تھا۔', 'uz': "@ info Bu vazifaning oldingi hamma ishlari generativ modellarini o'rganish uchun foydalanadi. Bu hujjatda, biz CRF автоматик рамзгузоrga asoslangan qoʻllanmagan qoʻllanmagan qoʻllanmagan qoʻllanmalar. Modemizning kodlash qiymati - ta'minlovchi va dunyo oddiy ishlayotgan. Bu bizga hosil xususiyatlarni va umumiy tillarning oldini ishlatish imkoniyatlariga ruxsat beradi. Biz tashkilotni o'rganish uchun haqiqiqiy algoritni ko'raymiz. Biz modelimizning natijasini ko'pgina tilning sakkizta ta'sirlarida qiymatimiz va modelimizning davlat sohasi usullari bilan bir xil tilda o'zgarishga ega bo'lganligini ko'rsatdik.", 'vi': 'Việc phân tích phụ thuộc không giám sát, cố gắng tìm ra các cấu trúc phụ thuộc ngôn ngữ từ dữ liệu không báo trước, là một nhiệm vụ rất khó khăn. Hầu hết các công việc trước về nhiệm vụ này tập trung vào các mô hình sinh sản. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình phân tích phụ thuộc không giám sát dựa trên mã hóa CRF. Phần mã hóa của mẫu này là sự phân biệt và hoàn to àn bình thường. Nó cho phép chúng ta sử dụng các yếu tố giàu có và các ưu tiên ngôn ngữ phổ biến. Chúng tôi đề nghị thuật toán chính xác phân tích và thuật toán học theo dấu vết. Chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng của mô hình trên tám cây bóng đa dạng và phát hiện ra rằng mô hình của chúng tôi đạt được hiệu suất tương tự với các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'hr': 'Nepotrebno analiziranje zavisnosti, koji pokušava otkriti strukture jezičke zavisnosti iz neoznačenih podataka, veoma je izazovan zadatak. Skoro svi prethodni rad na ovom zadatku usredotoči se na učenje generativnih modela. U ovom papiru razvijamo model analize neovisne zavisnosti na temelju autokodera CRF-a. Koder dio našeg modela je diskriminiran i globalno normaliziran što nam omogućava koristiti bogate karakteristike kao i univerzalne jezičke prednosti. Predlažemo tačan algoritam za analizu, kao i algoritam za učenje traktora. Procjenjivali smo učinkovitost našeg modela na osam višejezičkih područja i otkrili da je naš model postigao usporedno učinkovitost s pristupima države umjetnosti.', 'bg': 'Неконтролираното анализиране на зависимост, което се опитва да открие структури на лингвистична зависимост от неописани данни, е много предизвикателна задача. Почти цялата предишна работа по тази задача се фокусира върху ученето на генеративни модели. В тази статия разработваме модел за анализ на зависимостта без надзор, базиран на автокодер. Частта от кодера на нашия модел е дискриминативна и глобално нормализирана, което ни позволява да използваме богати функции, както и универсални лингвистични приоритети. Предлагаме точен алгоритъм за анализ, както и проследим алгоритъм за учене. Оценихме ефективността на нашия модел на осем многоезични дървесни ленти и установихме, че нашият модел постига сравними резултати с най-съвременните подходи.', 'da': 'Userveret afhængighedsanalyse, som forsøger at opdage sproglige afhængighedsstrukturer fra uopnoterede data, er en meget udfordrende opgave. Næsten alt tidligere arbejde med denne opgave fokuserer på at lære generative modeller. I denne artikel udvikler vi en uautoriseret afhængighedsanalysemodel baseret på CRF autoencoder. Encoder delen af vores model er diskriminerende og globalt normaliseret, hvilket giver os mulighed for at bruge rige funktioner såvel som universelle sproglige prioriteter. Vi foreslår en præcis algoritme til parsing samt en tractable læringsalgoritme. Vi evaluerede vores models ydeevne på otte flersprogede træbanker og fandt ud af, at vores model opnåede sammenlignelige ydeevne med state-of-the-art tilgange.', 'de': 'Unsupervised Dependency Parsing, das versucht, sprachliche Abhängigkeitsstrukturen aus nicht notierten Daten zu entdecken, ist eine sehr herausfordernde Aufgabe. Fast alle bisherigen Arbeiten zu dieser Aufgabe konzentrieren sich auf das Lernen generativer Modelle. In diesem Beitrag entwickeln wir ein unüberwachtes Dependency Parsing Modell basierend auf dem CRF Autoencoder. Der Encoder-Teil unseres Modells ist diskriminierend und global normalisiert, was uns erlaubt, reichhaltige Funktionen sowie universelle linguistische Priors zu verwenden. Wir schlagen einen exakten Algorithmus zum Parsen sowie einen traktablen Lernalgorithmus vor. Wir haben die Performance unseres Modells an acht mehrsprachigen Baumbänken evaluiert und festgestellt, dass unser Modell vergleichbare Leistungen mit modernsten Ansätzen erzielt.', 'ko': '무감독 의존 분석은 주석이 없는 데이터에서 언어 의존 구조를 발견하기 위해 매우 도전적인 작업이다.이전에 거의 모든 이 임무에 관한 작업은 학습 생성 모델에 집중되었다.본고에서 우리는 CRF 자동 인코더를 기반으로 하는 무감독 의존 해석 모델을 개발했다.우리 모델의 인코더 부분은 구별되고 전역적으로 규범화되어 풍부한 특징과 통용되는 언어의 선험을 사용할 수 있다.우리는 정확한 해석 알고리즘과 처리하기 쉬운 학습 알고리즘을 제시했다.우리는 8개의 다중 언어 트리 라이브러리에서 우리의 모델의 성능을 평가했고 우리의 모델과 가장 선진적인 방법이 상당한 성능을 얻었다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Kutegemea parge, ambayo inajaribu kugundua muundo wa kutegemea lugha kutokana na taarifa zisizoeleweka, ni kazi yenye changamoto sana. Karibu kazi zote zilizopita katika kazi hii inajikita kwenye kujifunza mifano ya kizalendo. Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza modeli ya parsing isiyotegemea kwa kutumia kodi ya CRF. Sehemu ya muundo wetu ni ya ubaguzi na imewekwa kawaida duniani ambayo inaturuhusu kutumia utajiri na lugha za ulimwengu. Tunapendekeza algorithi sahihi kwa ajili ya kuuza pamoja na algorithi ya kujifunza kwa njia ya kawaida. We evaluated the performance of our model on eight multilingual treebanks and found that our model achieved comparable performance with state-of-the-art approaches.', 'nl': 'Onbewaakte afhankelijkheidsparsing, waarbij wordt geprobeerd linguïstische afhankelijkheidsstructuren te ontdekken uit ongenoteerde gegevens, is een zeer uitdagende taak. Bijna alle eerdere werkzaamheden aan deze taak richten zich op het leren van generatieve modellen. In dit artikel ontwikkelen we een onbeheerd afhankelijkheidsparsing model gebaseerd op de CRF autoencoder. Het encodergedeelte van ons model is discriminerend en wereldwijd genormaliseerd, waardoor we zowel rijke functies als universele taalkundige vooroordelen kunnen gebruiken. We stellen een exact algoritme voor parsen en een traceerbaar leeralgoritme voor. We evalueerden de prestaties van ons model op acht meertalige boombanken en ontdekten dat ons model vergelijkbare prestaties behaalde met state-of-the-art benaderingen.', 'fa': 'تقسیم بستگی غیر قابل تحقیق، که سعی می\u200cکند ساختار بستگی زبان\u200cشناسی را از داده\u200cهای غیر معلوم کند، یک کار بسیار سخت است. تقریبا تمام کارهای قبلی روی این کار تمرکز به یادگرفتن مدل های ژنترافی است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل تحلیل بستگی غیرقابل توسعه می کنیم که بر اساس کریفور خودکوډر CRF است. بخشی از مدل ما جدایی و عادی است که به ما اجازه می دهد از ویژه\u200cهای ثروتمند و پیشینیان زبان\u200cشناسی جهانی استفاده کنیم. ما یک الگوریتم دقیقا برای بررسی و الگوریتم یادگیری ردیابی پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما عملکرد مدل خود را بر هشت تخته\u200cهای متعدد زبان ارزیابی کردیم و فهمیدیم که مدل ما عملکرد قابل مقایسه با نزدیک\u200cهای ایالت هنر را رسید.', 'tr': 'Ilm채ni흫 gar힊ylanmadyk baglanylyk analyzasy, bu 첵erde bilimsel baglanylyk strukturlaryny tanamak 체챌in synany힊첵ar, birn채챌e kyn챌ylyk bir i힊dir. Di흫e hemme 철흫ki i힊i흫 bu zady흫 d철redijili nusgalary 철wrenmek 체챌in 체ns ber첵채r. Bu kagyzda, CRF otok철dlerine da첵an 첵an umytsyzlyk analyziji nusgasyny 챌ykar첵arys. Bizi흫 modelimi흫 k철dleme b철legi diskrimin챌채 we d체n첵채d채ki g철rn체힊diril첵채r. Bu bizi흫 ba첵 철zelliklerimizi we d체n첵채bir dil 철흫ki bilen ulanmagymyza m체mkin ed첵채r. Biz takyk bir algoritmi we tractable 철wrenme algoritmi 체챌in teklip edip g철r첵채ris Biz nusgamyzy흫 etkinle힊igini sekiz dil 챌yzygynda de흫le힊dirdik we nusgamyzy흫 m철h체m sanat 첵akynla힊yklaryny흫 첵akynla힊yk 챌yky힊lygyny tapdyk.', 'af': "Onondersteunde afhanklikheid verwerking, wat probeer om lingwisiese afhanklikheidstrukture te ontdek van onbekende data, is 'n baie belangrike taak. Almal al die vorige werk op hierdie taak fokus op die leer van genereerbare modele. In hierdie papier, ontwikkel ons 'n ononderwerpende afhanklikheid inlys model gebaseer op die CRF outokoder. Die enkoder deel van ons model is diskriminasief en globaal normaliseer wat ons toelaat om ryke funksies te gebruik en universele lingwisiese voorheede te gebruik. Ons voorstel 'n presies algoritme vir verwerking en 'n tractabel leer algoritme. Ons het die effektiviteit van ons model op agt multilinglike treebanks geevalueer en gevind dat ons model vergelykbaar effektiviteit bereik het met staat van die kunstenaar toegang.", 'id': 'Penganalisan dependensi yang tidak diawasi, yang mencoba untuk menemukan struktur dependensi bahasa dari data yang tidak dicatat, adalah tugas yang sangat menantang. Almost all previous work on this task focuses on learning generative models.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan model penghuraian dependensi yang tidak diawasi berdasarkan otokoder CRF. Bagian pengekode dari model kita diskriminatif dan secara global normalisasi yang memungkinkan kita menggunakan ciri-ciri kaya serta priori bahasa universal. Kami mengusulkan algoritma yang tepat untuk menghurai serta algoritma belajar yang dapat diseret. Kami mengevaluasi prestasi model kami pada delapan batang pohon berbagai bahasa dan menemukan bahwa model kami mencapai prestasi yang bisa dibandingkan dengan pendekatan terbaik.', 'am': 'የማይጠበቀው የቋንቋዊ ጥናት መሠረቶች ከዳታ ለማግኘት የሚሞክረው የግንኙነት ፓርቲ በጣም አዋቂ ስራ ነው፡፡ ይህ ስራ ላይ የቀድሞው ሥራ ሁሉ የዘረኝነት ሞዴላዎችን በማስተማር ላይ ትኩረት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የCRF አውቶማክዶር በመሠረት ላይ ያልጠበቀ የመደገፊያ የፓርቲ ሞዴል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሞዴል ክፍል የተለየ እና በዓለምአቀፍ የተለየ እና የሀብታም ምርጫዎች እና የዓለምነት ቋንቋ ቀድሞ ለመጠቀም የሚችል ነው፡፡ ማጋራት እና መማር መፍታትን እና ለመማር መዝገብን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በስምንት ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሞላማችንን ድምፅ አረጋገጥን እናም ምሳሌያችን በሀገር-የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት እንዲያሳየው አግኝተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկվող կախվածության վերլուծությունը, որը փորձում է բացահայտել լեզվաբանական կախվածության կառուցվածքներ աննկարագրված տվյալներից, շատ դժվար է: Գրեթե բոլոր նախորդ աշխատանքները այս խնդրի վրա կենտրոնանում են սովորելու սերնդի մոդելների վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք անվերահսկված կախվածության վերլուծության մոդել, որը հիմնված է ԿՌՖ ավտոկոդերի վրա: Մեր մոդելի կոդավորման մասը խտրականում է և գլոբալ առումով նորմալ է, ինչը թույլ է տալիս մեզ օգտագործել հարուստ հատկություններ, ինչպես նաև համընդհանուր լեզվաբանական նախաձեռնություններ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ճշգրիտ ալգորիթմ վերլուծության համար, ինչպես նաև գրավիչ սովորելու ալգորիթմ: We evaluated the performance of our model on eight multilingual treebanks and found that our model achieved comparable performance with state-of-the-art approaches.', 'az': 'Dil bağlılığı quruluşlarını tanıtmağa çalışan müəyyən edilməmiş bağlılıq ayırması çox çətin bir işdir. Bu işin çox əvvəlki işləri generativ modellərin öyrənməsinə odaqlanır. Bu kağızda, CRF avtomatik kodlayıcına dayanan müvəffəqiyyət ayırma modelini təhsil edirik. Modelimizin kodlayıcı bir parças ı diskriminasiya və qlobal olaraq normalizədir ki, bizə zengin özellikləri və universal dil əvvəlkiləri istifadə edə bilər. Biz analizi və tractable öyrənmə algoritmi üçün tam bir algoritmi təklif edirik. Biz modellərimizin səkkiz dil çubuqlarında performansını değerləşdirdik və modellərimizin müəyyən edilmiş şəkildə müəyyən olunmuş yaxınlıqlarla qarşılaşdırılabilir performansımızı tapdıq.', 'bn': 'নির্ভর করা নির্ভরশীল পার্জিং যা ভাষার নির্ভরিত কাঠামো খুঁজে বের করার চেষ্টা করছে যা অজানা তথ্য থেকে ভাষায় নির্ভর করা ক Almost all previous work on this task focuses on learning generative models.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সিআরএফ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভিত্তিক পার্সিং মডেল তৈরি করি। আমাদের মডেলের এনকোডারের অংশ বৈষম্য এবং বিশ্বব্যাপী স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিক এবং সমৃদ্ধ বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করার সুযোগ দেয় পার্সিং এবং ট্র্যাকাবেল শিক্ষার জন্য আমরা সঠিক অ্যালগরিদম প্রস্তাব করি। আমরা আমাদের মডেলের প্রভাবের পরিমাণ মূল্যায়ন করেছি আটটি বহুভাষার ট্রিব্যাংকের উপর এবং আমরা পেয়েছি যে আমাদের মডেল রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পে', 'sq': 'Analizimi i pavarësisë së mbikqyrur, i cili përpiqet të zbulojë strukturat e varësisë gjuhësore nga të dhënat e papritura, është një detyrë shumë sfiduese. Almost all previous work on this task focuses on learning generative models.  Në këtë letër, ne zhvillojmë një model analizimi të pavarësisë pa mbikqyrur bazuar në autokoduesin CRF. Pjesa koduese e modelit tonë është diskriminuese dhe globalisht e normalizuar që na lejon të përdorim karakteristika të pasura si dhe paraardhje gjuhësore universale. Ne propozojmë një algoritëm të saktë për analizimin si dhe një algoritëm mësimi të trajtueshëm. Ne vlerësuam performancën e modelit tonë në tetë baza pemësh shumëgjuhëse dhe gjetëm se modeli ynë arriti performancë të krahasueshme me qasjet më të larta.', 'cs': 'Nespevněná analýza závislostí, která se snaží odhalit jazykové struktury závislostí z nezapsaných dat, je velmi náročným úkolem. Téměř všechny předchozí práce na tomto úkolu se zaměřují na učení generativních modelů. V tomto článku vyvíjíme model analýzy závislostí bez dozoru založený na CRF autokodéru. Kodérová část našeho modelu je diskriminační a globálně normalizovaná, což nám umožňuje používat bohaté funkce i univerzální lingvistické priory. Navrhujeme přesný algoritmus pro analýzu, stejně jako traktivní učební algoritmus. Hodnotili jsme výkonnost našeho modelu na osmi vícejazyčných stromových březích a zjistili jsme, že náš model dosáhl srovnatelného výkonu s nejmodernějšími přístupy.', 'ca': "L'analització de la dependencia no supervisada, que intenta descobrir estructures de dependencia lingüística a partir de dades no notades, és una tasca molt difícil. Quasi tota la feina anterior en aquesta tasca es centra en aprendre models generadors. En aquest article, desenvolupem un model d'analització de dependencies sense supervisió basat en l'autocodificador CRF. La part codificadora del nostre model és discriminativa i normalitzada globalment que ens permet utilitzar característiques riques i priors lingüístics universals. Proposem un algoritme exacte per analitzar i un algoritme d'aprenentatge tractable. Vam evaluar el rendiment del nostre model en vuit bancs d'arbres multilingües i vam descobrir que el nostre model va aconseguir un rendiment comparable amb els enfocaments més avançats.", 'bs': 'Neodređeno analiziranje zavisnosti, koji pokušava otkriti strukture jezičke zavisnosti iz neoznačenih podataka, veoma je izazovan zadatak. Skoro svi prethodni radovi na ovom zadatku fokusiraju se na učenje generativnih modela. U ovom papiru razvijamo model analize neodređene zavisnosti na temelju autokodera CRF-a. Koder dio našeg modela je diskriminiran i globalno normaliziran što nam omogućava da koristimo bogate karakteristike kao i univerzalne jezičke prednosti. Predlažemo tačan algoritam za analizu, kao i algoritam za učenje traktora. Procijenili smo učinkovitost našeg modela na osam višejezičkih podudara i otkrili da je naš model postigao usporedbenu izvedbu sa pristupima države umjetnosti.', 'et': 'Järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimine, mis püüab avastada keelelise sõltuvuse struktuure märkimata andmetest, on väga keeruline ülesanne. Peaaegu kõik varasemad tööd selle ülesandega keskenduvad generatiivsete mudelite õppimisele. Käesolevas töös töötame välja järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimise mudeli, mis põhineb CRF automaatkodeerijal. Meie mudeli kodeerija osa on diskrimineeriv ja globaalselt normaliseeritud, mis võimaldab meil kasutada nii rikkalikke funktsioone kui ka universaalseid keelelisi prioriteete. Pakume välja täpse algoritmi parsimiseks ja jälgitava õppealgoritmi. Hindasime oma mudeli tulemuslikkust kaheksal mitmekeelsel puupangal ja leidsime, et meie mudel saavutas võrreldava tulemuslikkuse kaasaegsete lähenemisviisidega.', 'fi': 'Valvontaton riippuvuuden jäsentäminen, jolla pyritään löytämään kielellisiä riippuvuusrakenteita merkitsemättömästä datasta, on erittäin haastava tehtävä. Lähes kaikki aikaisemmat työt tässä tehtävässä keskittyvät generatiivisten mallien oppimiseen. Tässä työssä kehitämme valvomattoman riippuvuuden parsausmallin, joka perustuu CRF-automaattikooderiin. Mallimme koodaajaosa on diskriminatiivinen ja maailmanlaajuisesti normalisoitu, minkä ansiosta voimme käyttää monipuolisia ominaisuuksia sekä universaaleja kielellisiä prioriteetteja. Ehdotamme tarkkaa algoritmia jäsentämiseen sekä jäljitettävää oppimisalgoritmia. Arvioimme mallimme suorituskykyä kahdeksalla monikielisellä puupenkillä ja totesimme, että mallimme saavutti vertailukelpoisen suorituskyvyn uusimpien lähestymistapojen kanssa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe urip urip nggawe, sapa nguasai nggawe akeh juter ditukda data sing gak nggawe barang, sing akeh tenan kudu nggawe Tulung kabèh hal-hal yang mungkin ing nggawe lan mungkin kuwi bisa ngulinakake model sing ujaran. Nang mapukan iki, kita ditambah model kuwi nggawe perusahaan urip, iso nguasai paten nggunakake cara-kotar Ndok koder parts ning model sing dibenalke sampeyan karo nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar kang dibenalke duluran sampeyan ingkang karo ingkang dipunalke saiki. We proposal an exact Algorithm for testing and a tractable Learn Algorithm. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe modèl kanggo nggawe sawalih luwih-luwih karo ngono kuwi model sing ngendalikne kuwi nggawe gerarané karo hal-sanga sing ngwalih lanjut gedhéwé.', 'ha': "Banda tsari da ba'a yi tsaro ba, da yana jarraba gane tsarin lugha masu inganci daga data na da ba'a sani ba, shi ne mai gauraya. Akwai duk aikin da ya gabata a kan wannan aikin yana fokus wa zane-motsi masu ƙarai. Ga wannan takardan, muna buɗe wata salon parse da ba da tsare ba, a kan karatun CRF farat ɗaya. Babban kode daga misalin mu na zama masu yin ɓarna da mai tsayi a cikin duniya, wanda yana yarda mu yi amfani da wasu mistakardu masu riki da sami da fassarar harshen farko. Munã goyyar da algoritin da za'a yi parse da kuma algoritin da za'a sani. Mun ƙaddara cikakken misalinmu a kan takardan misalin takwas na mulki-mulki, kuma muka gane cewa misalinmu ya sami da misalin-na-sanar.", 'he': 'בדיקת תלויות ללא השגחה, שמנסה לגלות מבני תלויות שפתיים ממידע ללא השגחה, היא משימה מאד מאתגרת. כמעט כל העבודה הקודמת על המשימה הזאת מתמקדת בללמד דוגמנים דוריים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מפתחים מודל בדיקת תלויות ללא השגחה מבוסס על קודד אוטומטי CRF. החלק המקודם של המודל שלנו הוא דיסקרטיבי ומנורמלי גלובלי שמאפשר לנו להשתמש בתוכניות עשירות כמו גם קודמות שפתיים אוניברסליים. אנו מציעים אלגוריתם מדויק לאבחן כמו גם אלגוריתם למידה מושכת. הערכנו את ההופעה של המודל שלנו על שמונה גבולות עץ רבות שפות ומצאנו שהמודל שלנו השיג ביצוע שווה עם גישות חדשות.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཆ་ཁག་གིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བསླར་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་CRF རང་འགུལ་གསལ་བྱེད་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མེད་པའི་མིང་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་མཚོན་ནི་ཁྱད་པར་ཕྱོགས We propose an exact algorithm for parsing as well as a tractable learning algorithm. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་འདིའི་རྩལ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovano razčlenitev odvisnosti, ki poskuša odkriti strukture jezikovne odvisnosti iz neobvezanih podatkov, je zelo zahtevna naloga. Skoraj vse prejšnje delo na tej nalogi se osredotoča na učenje generativnih modelov. V tem prispevku smo razvili model za razčlenitev odvisnosti brez nadzora, ki temelji na samokodirniku CRF. Kodirni del našega modela je diskriminativen in globalno normaliziran, kar nam omogoča uporabo bogatih funkcij in univerzalnih jezikovnih predhodnikov. Predlagamo natančen algoritem za razčlenjevanje in sledljiv algoritem učenja. Učinkovitost modela smo ocenili na osmih večjezičnih drevesnih ploščah in ugotovili, da je naš model dosegel primerljivo učinkovitost z najsodobnejšimi pristopi.'}
{'en': 'Efficient Discontinuous Phrase-Structure Parsing via the Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence', 'ar': 'تحليل فعال لبنية العبارة غير المستمر من خلال التشجير الأقصى المعمم', 'fr': "Analyse discontinue efficace de structure de phrase via l'arborescence généralisée à couverture maximale", 'es': 'Análisis eficiente de la estructura de frase discontinua a través de la arborescencia de expansión máxima generalizada', 'pt': 'Análise de estrutura de frase descontínua eficiente por meio da arborescência de abrangência máxima generalizada', 'ja': '一般化された最大スパニングアルボレセンスを介した効率的な不連続フレーズ構造解析', 'zh': '广义最大跨度树干有效者不连短语构解析', 'hi': 'कुशल असंतत वाक्यांश-संरचना सामान्यीकृत अधिकतम Spanning Arborescence के माध्यम से पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Эффективный прерывистый разбор фразы-структуры через обобщенную максимальную охватывающую арборесценцию', 'ga': 'Parsáil Struchtúr Frásaí Neamhleanúnach Éifeachtach tríd an gCreimeadh Uasta Ginearálaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματική διαχρονική ανάλυση φράσεων-δομών μέσω της γενικευμένης μέγιστης έκτασης δασοκομίας', 'hu': 'Hatékony szakaszos mondatszerkezet-értelmezés az általános maximális feszültségű erdőszakon keresztül', 'it': "Analisi discontinua efficiente delle frasi-strutture tramite l'arborescenza di spanning massima generalizzata", 'kk': 'Жергілікті максималдық көлемдеу жұмыс арқылы көмектесетін фраз- структурасы талдау', 'lt': 'Veiksmingas nutraukiamas frazių struktūros analizavimas naudojant generalizuotą didžiausią įtempimo trukmę', 'mk': 'Ефикасно расправање на прекинувачката фраза- структура преку генерализираната максимална досадност', 'mn': 'Цэцэглэгдсэн хамгийн их хэмжээний өргөмжийг ашиглаж буй фраз-структурын талаар', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Frasa-Struktur Berhenti Efisien Melalui Penjelasan Maksimum Umum', 'mt': 'Analiżi Effiċjenti tal-Istruttura tal-Frażi Mwaqqfa permezz tal-Arborexxenza Massima Ġeneralizzata', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ വാക്ക്- സ്ട്രാക്ടര്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്പാനിങ്ങ് ആര്\u200dബോര്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ്സ്', 'pl': 'Efektywne nieciągłe parowanie struktury fraz poprzez ogólną maksymalną rozpiętość drzewną', 'no': 'Effektivt avslutting av frysestrukturen gjennom den genereliserte maksimum avslutting', 'sr': 'Efikasno prekinuto razmatranje fraze-strukture putem generaliziranog maksimalnog proširenja arborescenzije', 'ro': 'Analizarea eficientă discontinuoasă a frazelor-structurii prin arborescența maximă generalizată', 'so': 'Heshiiska la xiriira Fasax-Structure via the Generalized maximum Spanning Arborescence', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසිත විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර කරන්න', 'sv': 'Effektiv discontinuerlig frasstruktur tolkning via den generaliserade maximala spanning trädskog', 'ta': 'பொதுவாக்கப்பட்ட அதிகபட்ச இடைவெளியிடுதல் மூலம் தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளாத சொற்றொடர்- கட்டுப்பாடு பகுதி', 'ur': 'عمدہ مہربانی مہربانی مہربانی مہربانی کے ذریعہ مہربانی فریس-ساختار پارسینگ', 'uz': 'Esga solish', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name là tập tin tạm thời', 'hr': 'Učinjeno prekinuto razmatranje fraze-strukture putem generalizirane maksimalne proširenje arborescence', 'bg': 'Ефективно прекъсване на фразата-структурата чрез общия максимален диапазон', 'nl': 'Efficiënte discontinueuze frase-structuur parsing via de algemene maximale spanende boomstructuur', 'id': 'Efisien Penganalisan Frasa-Struktur Berhenti Melalui Penyerangan Maksimum Jeneralisasi', 'ko': '광의적 최대 생성 트리 그래프의 효율적인 비연속 단어 구조 해석', 'de': 'Effizientes diskontinuierliches Parsen von Phrasenstrukturen über die generalisierte maximal spannende Arboreszenz', 'fa': 'پاداش ساختاری کلمه\u200cهای فعالی از طریق استفاده از طریق استفاده\u200cهای بزرگترین استفاده', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa Mikondo inayoendelea kwa ufanisi kupitia Umoja wa Hifadhi ya Uhishimizi', 'af': 'Effektiewe Afsluit Frase-Struktuur Verwerking deur die Generaliseerde Maksimum Spanning Arborescence', 'da': 'Effektiv diskontinuerende sætningsstruktur fortolkning via den generelle maksimale spændende skovbrug', 'tr': 'Umumy Aýratyn Gaýşart Edilmiş Frase-Structure Taýýarlama', 'az': '칖niyy톛tli Maksimum 캻stifad톛칞ilik 칖st칲nl칲y칲 vasit톛sil톛 Etkinli Fraz-Structure Parsing', 'am': 'escence', 'sq': 'Analizë efikase e ndërprerjes së frazës-strukturës nëpërmjet Arborescence maksimale të gjeneralizuar', 'hy': 'Efficient Discontinuous Phrase-Structure Parsing via the Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence', 'bs': 'Efikasno prekinuto razmatranje fraze-strukture putem generaliziranog maksimalnog proširenja arborescenzije', 'bn': 'সর্বোচ্চ সর্বোচ্চ স্প্যানিং আর্বোরেসেন্সে', 'cs': 'Efektivní diskontinuální analýza struktury fráze prostřednictvím obecné maximální rozpětí Arborescence', 'ca': "Analització eficient de frases i estructures descontinues a través de l'arborescència generalitzada màxima d'espansió", 'et': 'Tõhus katkestatud fraasistruktuuri parsimine üldise maksimaalse ulatusega arborestsentsi kaudu', 'fi': 'Tehokas katkeava lause-rakenteen jäsentely yleisen enimmäiskattavuuden avulla', 'jv': 'EfEffectent Diskntinuuus', 'ha': 'Escape', 'sk': 'Učinkovito prekinjeno razčlenjevanje fraze-strukture prek splošnega največjega razpona Arborescence', 'bo': 'Efficient Discontinuous Phrase-Structure Parsing via the Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence', 'he': 'תוצאה יעילה של פרסם-מבנה הפריזי המשיכה באמצעות התפתחות המקסימלית הגנרליזציה'}
{'en': 'We present a new method for the joint task of tagging and non-projective dependency parsing. We demonstrate its usefulness with an application to discontinuous phrase-structure parsing where decoding lexicalized spines and syntactic derivations is performed jointly. The main contributions of this paper are (1) a reduction from joint tagging and non-projective dependency parsing to the Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence problem, and (2) a novel decoding algorithm for this problem through Lagrangian relaxation. We evaluate this model and obtain state-of-the-art results despite strong independence assumptions.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة جديدة للمهمة المشتركة المتمثلة في وضع العلامات وتحليل التبعية غير الإسقاطي. نبرهن على فائدته من خلال تطبيق التحليل المتقطع لهيكل العبارة حيث يتم إجراء فك تشفير العمود الفقري المعجم والاشتقاقات النحوية بشكل مشترك. المساهمات الرئيسية في هذه الورقة هي (1) تقليل وضع العلامات المشتركة والاعتماد غير الإسقاطي على مشكلة التشجير ذات النطاق الأقصى المعمم ، و (2) خوارزمية فك تشفير جديدة لهذه المشكلة من خلال استرخاء لاغرانج. نقوم بتقييم هذا النموذج والحصول على أحدث النتائج على الرغم من افتراضات الاستقلال القوية.', 'es': 'Presentamos un nuevo método para la tarea conjunta de etiquetado y análisis de dependencias no proyectivas. Demostramos su utilidad con una aplicación al análisis discontinuo de estructuras de frases donde la decodificación de espinas lexicalizadas y derivaciones sintácticas se realiza de forma conjunta. Las principales contribuciones de este artículo son (1) una reducción del etiquetado conjunto y el análisis de dependencias no proyectivas al problema de arborescencia de expansión máxima generalizada, y (2) un algoritmo de decodificación novedoso para este problema a través de la relajación lagrangiana. Evaluamos este modelo y obtenemos resultados de vanguardia a pesar de los sólidos supuestos de independencia.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um novo método para a tarefa conjunta de marcação e análise de dependência não projetiva. Demonstramos sua utilidade com uma aplicação para análise de estrutura de frase descontínua onde a decodificação de espinhos lexicalizados e derivações sintáticas é realizada em conjunto. As principais contribuições deste artigo são (1) uma redução da marcação conjunta e análise de dependência não-projetiva para o problema Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence, e (2) um novo algoritmo de decodificação para este problema através da relaxação Lagrangiana. Avaliamos este modelo e obtemos resultados de última geração apesar de fortes suposições de independência.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une nouvelle méthode pour la tâche conjointe de balisage et d'analyse de dépendance non projective. Nous démontrons son utilité avec une application à l'analyse discontinue de structure de phrase où le décodage des épines lexicalisées et des dérivations syntaxiques est effectué conjointement. Les principales contributions de cet article sont (1) une réduction du marquage conjoint et de l'analyse de dépendance non projective au problème Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence, et (2) un nouvel algorithme de décodage pour ce problème par relaxation lagrangienne. Nous évaluons ce modèle et obtenons des résultats de pointe malgré de fortes hypothèses d'indépendance.", 'ja': 'タグ付けと非投機的依存関係解析の共同作業のための新しい方法を提示します。我々は、語彙化された脊椎と構文導出をデコードすることが共同で行われる不連続な語句構造解析への応用で、その有用性を実証した。本論文の主な貢献は、(1)関節タグ付けおよび非投機的依存性解析から一般化最大スパニングアルボレッセンス問題への還元、(2)ラグランジュ緩和を通じたこの問題に対する新規のデコードアルゴリズムである。このモデルを評価し、強い独立性の前提にもかかわらず、最先端の結果を得る。', 'zh': '我们为标记和非投影赖赖解析的合务发出一种新法。 以不连短语构解析之应用程序证其有用性,其解码词汇化棘句法遣生共之。 本文大要(1)自合标及非射影赖解析减至广义最大跨度树轴,及(2)因拉格朗日弛新型解码算法。 估其模形,获其先进,虽有强独立性。', 'ru': 'Представляем новый метод совместной задачи тегирования и непроективного синтаксического анализа зависимостей. Продемонстрируем его полезность применением к прерывистому фразеоструктурному парсингу, где декодирование лексикализованных шипов и синтаксических производных выполняется совместно. Основным вкладом этой статьи является (1) сокращение от совместной маркировки и непроективного синтаксического анализа зависимостей до задачи обобщенной максимальной охватывающей арборесценции, и (2) новый алгоритм декодирования для этой задачи через релаксацию Лагранжа. Мы оцениваем эту модель и получаем самые современные результаты, несмотря на сильные предположения о независимости.', 'hi': 'हम टैगिंग और गैर-प्रोजेक्टिव निर्भरता पार्सिंग के संयुक्त कार्य के लिए एक नई विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम असंतत वाक्यांश-संरचना पार्सिंग के लिए एक आवेदन के साथ इसकी उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं जहां कोकोडिंग लेक्सिकलाइज्ड स्पाइन और वाक्यात्मक व्युत्पत्ति संयुक्त रूप से की जाती है। इस पेपर के मुख्य योगदान (1) संयुक्त टैगिंग और गैर-प्रोजेक्टिव निर्भरता पार्सिंग से सामान्यीकृत अधिकतम स्पैनिंग आर्बोरेसेंस समस्या में कमी है, और (2) लाग्रांगियन विश्राम के माध्यम से इस समस्या के लिए एक उपन्यास डिकोडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म। हम इस मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और मजबूत स्वतंत्रता मान्यताओं के बावजूद अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid modh nua i láthair chun an tasc comhpháirteach a dhéanamh maidir le clibeáil agus parsáil spleáchais neamhtheilgneach. Léirímid a úsáidí is atá sé le hiarratas ar pharsáil neamhleanúnach de struchtúr frásaí áit a ndéantar díchódú ar dhromanna foclóirithe agus díorthaigh chomhréire i gcomhpháirt. Is iad príomh-ranníocaíochtaí an pháipéir seo (1) laghdú ó chlibeáil chomhpháirteach agus parsáil spleáchais neamhtheilgeanach go dtí an fhadhb Uasta Chéimse Ghinearálta Arborescence, agus (2) algartam díchódaithe úrscéal don fhadhb seo trí scíthe Lagrangian. Déanaimid measúnú ar an tsamhail seo agus faighimid torthaí úrscothacha in ainneoin boinn tuisceana láidre neamhspleáchais.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალი პროექტიური გადაწყვეტილების და არ-პროექტიური დამართლების გადაწყვეტილების ერთადერთი დავალებისთვის გაჩვენებთ. ჩვენ მისი გამოყენებელობა პროგრამით გამოყენება, რომელიც განხორციელი ფრაზების სტრუქტურაციის პარაზაციაში, სადაც ლექსიკალიზებული სტრუქტურაციები და სინტაქტიური გადა ამ დოკუნტის მნიშვნელოვანები არის (1) ერთადერთი მაგრამების და არ-პროექტიური განსახულების პარასიზაციის განსახულების პრობლემაზე, და (2) პრობლემენტის განსახულების ალგორიტიმს ამ პრობლემას Lagrangian განსახულებით. ჩვენ ამ მოდელის შესახებ და მივიღებთ წარმოდგენების შესახებ ძალიან უცნობიერება.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy új módszert a címkézés és a nem projektív függőség elemzés közös feladatára. Hasznosságát egy szakaszos kifejezésszerkezeti elemzésre való alkalmazással mutatjuk be, ahol a lexikalizált tüskék és szintaktikus származékok dekódolása közösen történik. A tanulmány fő hozzájárulásai (1) a közös címkézésről és a nem projektív függőség elemzéséről a Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence problémára való csökkentés, valamint (2) egy új dekódolási algoritmus erre a problémára Lagrangian relaxáción keresztül. Ezt a modellt értékeljük, és az erős függetlenségi feltételezések ellenére korszerű eredményeket érünk el.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την κοινή εργασία της επισήμανσης και της μη προβολικής ανάλυσης εξάρτησης. Αποδεικνύουμε τη χρησιμότητά του με μια εφαρμογή σε ασυνεχή ανάλυση φράσεων-δομών όπου η αποκωδικοποίηση λεξιλογικών σπονδύλων και συντακτικών παραγώγων πραγματοποιείται από κοινού. Οι κυριότερες συνεισφορές της παρούσας εργασίας είναι (1) μια μείωση από την κοινή σήμανση και την ανάλυση μη προβολικής εξάρτησης στο πρόβλημα της γενικευμένης μέγιστης έκτασης Arborescence, και (2) ένας νέος αλγόριθμος αποκωδικοποίησης για αυτό το πρόβλημα μέσω της Λαγκρανγιανής χαλάρωσης. Αξιολογούμε αυτό το μοντέλο και επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας παρά τις ισχυρές παραδοχές ανεξαρτησίας.', 'it': "Presentiamo un nuovo metodo per il compito congiunto di tagging e analisi delle dipendenze non proiettive. Ne dimostriamo l'utilità con un'applicazione al parsing discontinuo frasario-struttura dove la decodifica spine lessicalizzate e derivazioni sintattiche viene eseguita congiuntamente. I principali contributi di questo articolo sono (1) una riduzione dal tagging congiunto e dall'analisi delle dipendenze non proiettive al problema dell'Arborescenza Maxima Generalized Spanning, e (2) un nuovo algoritmo di decodifica per questo problema attraverso il rilassamento Lagrangiano. Valutiamo questo modello e otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia nonostante forti ipotesi di indipendenza.", 'kk': 'Біз жаңа тәуелдік талдау және проективті емес тәуелдік талдау үшін жаңа тапсырманы таңдаймыз. Біз оның пайдалығын қолданбамен, лексикализацияланған бұрыштарды, синтактикалық нәрселерді бірге декодтау үшін сөздер структурасын бұғаттауға болады. Бұл қағаздың негізгі қатынасы (1) біріктірілген тегтерді және проективті емес тәуелсіздік талдауынан жалпы максималдық көлемдеу мәселесіне шектеу, және (2) осы мәселе үшін романдық декодирациялау алгоритмі Lagrangian қатынасы ар Бұл үлгісін оқу және өзгерту күйінің нәтижесін аламыз. Біз күшті тәуелсіздік ойларына қарамастан.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов метод за заедничката задача на означување и непроективно анализирање на зависноста. Ние ја демонстрираме неговата корисност со апликација за прекинување на анализирањето на фрази-структура каде декодирањето на лексикализираните грб и синтактичките деринации се извршуваат заедно. Главните придонеси на овој документ се (1) намалувањето од заедничкото означување и непроективното анализирање на зависноста на генерализираниот проблем со максималното разгоруваое, и (2) нов алгоритм за декодираое на овој проблем преку релаксација на Лагранг. Го проценуваме овој модел и добиваме најдобри резултати и покрај силните претпоставувања за независност.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame naują metodą bendrai užduotims žymėti ir nenumatyti priklausomybės analizuoti. Mes įrodome, kad jis naudingas taikant programą nutraukti frazių struktūros analizavimą, kai dekodiuojamos leksikalizuotos stuburo ir sintaktinių darinių jungtys. Pagrindiniai šio dokumento indėliai yra (1) bendro žymėjimo ir nenumatytos priklausomybės analizės sumažinimas iki bendros didžiausio išplitimo triukšmo problemos ir (2) naujas šios problemos dekodinimo algoritmas, atsipalaiduojant Lagrangui. Vertiname šį model į ir gauname naujausius rezultatus, nepaisant tvirtų nepriklausomybės prielaidų.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan kaedah baru untuk tugas kongsi penghuraian dependensi dan tidak projektif. Kami menunjukkan kegunaannya dengan aplikasi untuk menghurai frasa-struktur berhenti di mana penyahkodan tulang belakang lexikal dan derivasi sintaktik dilakukan bersama-sama. kontribusi utama kertas ini ialah (1) pengurangan dari tag bersama dan penghuraian dependensi bukan-projektif ke masalah Penyerangan Maksimum Umum, dan (2) algoritma penyahkodan baru untuk masalah ini melalui penenang Lagrangian. Kami menilai model ini dan mendapatkan keputusan terbaik walaupun anggapan kemerdekaan yang kuat.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw metodu ġdid għall-kompitu konġunt tat-tikkettar u l-analiżi tad-dipendenza mhux proġettiva. Aħna nippruvaw l-utilità tagħha b’applikazzjoni għall-analiżi tal-istruttura tal-frażi li titwaqqaf fejn id-dekodifikazzjoni tas-sinsla lexikalizzata u d-derivazzjonijiet sintetiċi ssir b’mod konġunt. Il-kontribuzzjonijiet ewlenin ta’ dan id-dokument huma (1) tnaqqis mill-analiżi tat-tikketti konġunti u tad-dipendenza mhux proġettiva għall-problem a Ġeneralizzata tal-Arborexxenza tal-Ispannar Massimu, u (2) algoritmu ġdid tad-dekodifikazzjoni għal din il-problema permezz tar-rilassament tal-Lagrangian. Nivvalutaw dan il-mudell u niksbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati minkejja suppożizzjonijiet b’saħħithom ta’ indipendenza.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നത് ടാഗിങ്ങിന്റെയും പ്രോജക്ടിവിന്റെയും ആശ്രയിക്കാത്ത പാര We demonstrate its usefulness with an application to discontinuous phrase-structure parsing where decoding lexicalized spines and syntactic derivations is performed jointly.  ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പങ്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോജക്ടീവികമില്ലാത്ത ആശ്രയികത പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിലേക്കും പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിലേക്കും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് (1) ലാഗ്ര ശക്തിയായ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം ഊഹിച്ചാലും നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Бид шинэ арга замыг тайлбарлах болон проектив бус хамааралтай хуваалцах боломжтой. Бид түүний хэрэгжүүлэгдлийг хэлбэрээр зогсохын тулд илэрхийллийн бүтэц хуваалцахын тулд хэрэгжүүлэгдлийг харуулж байна. Энэ цаасын гол түвшинд (1) хамтдаа маркинг болон проектив бус хамааралтай хамааралтай байдлын хуваалцаас хамааралтай хамааралтай байдлын асуудал болон (2) энэ асуудлын тухай шинэ салбарын алгоритм юм. Бид энэ загварыг үнэлгээд, хүчтэй тогтнолтой байдлын тодорхойлолтоор улс төрийн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nową metodę wspólnego zadania tagowania i nieprojektywnego parsowania zależności. Wykazujemy jego przydatność z aplikacją do nieciągłego parsowania struktury fraz, gdzie dekodowanie leksykalizowanych kolców i pochodnych składni jest wykonywane wspólnie. Głównym wkładem niniejszego artykułu jest (1) redukcja ze wspólnego tagowania i nieprojektywnego parsowania zależności do ogólnego maksymalnego rozciągania Arborescencji oraz (2) nowy algorytm dekodowania dla tego problemu poprzez relaksację Lagranga. Oceniamy ten model i uzyskujemy najnowocześniejsze wyniki pomimo silnych założeń niezależności.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o nouă metodă pentru sarcina comună de etichetare și analizare a dependenței non-proiective. Îi demonstrăm utilitatea printr-o aplicație la analizarea discontinuă a structurii frazelor, unde decodarea spinilor lexicalizați și derivațiilor sintactice se realizează în comun. Principalele contribuții ale acestei lucrări sunt (1) reducerea de la etichetarea comună și analizarea dependenței non-proiective la problema Arborescenței Maxime Generalizate, și (2) un algoritm nou de decodare pentru această problemă prin relaxarea Lagrangiană. Evaluăm acest model și obținem rezultate de ultimă generație în ciuda ipotezelor puternice de independență.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein ny metode for samsvarande oppgåve med merking og ikkje- projektiv avhengighetstolking. Vi demonstrerer sin nyttighet med eit program for å avslutta uttrykk- strukturen der dekoderinga av leksikaliserte spinar og syntaktiske derivasjonar vert utført saman. Den viktigste bidraga til denne papiret er (1) ein reduksjon frå samsvarande merking og ikkje- prosjektive avhengighetstolking til den generelliserte maksimale utbreidde arboreskanseproblem, og (2) ein roman kodingsalgoritme for dette problemet gjennom Lagrangian relaksjon. Vi evaluerer denne modellen og får resultatet av kunsten til tross sterke uavhengige antar.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novu metodu za zajednički zadatak oznake i neoprojektivne analize zavisnosti. Pokazujemo njegovu korisnost sa aplikacijom za prekinuti razmatranje fraze-strukture gde se zajedno izvršava dekodiranje leksikaliziranih kičmarica i sintaktičnih derivacija. Glavni doprinosi ovog papira su (1) smanjenje od zajedničkog značkanja i neoprojektivnog parsiranja zavisnosti do problem a generalizovanog maksimalnog proširenja Arborescence, i (2) novog algoritma dekodiranja ovog problema kroz opuštenje Lagrangiana. Procjenjujemo ovaj model i dobijamo rezultate umetnosti uprkos jakim pretpostavkama nezavisnosti.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් විධානයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ටැග් කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාත්මක නැති විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න. අපි එයාගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය මේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිතාවය (1) සම්බන්ධ ටැගින් සහ නොප්\u200dරොජේක්ටිව නොප්\u200dරොජේක්ටිවිශ්වාසික විශ්වාසයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි මේ මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'so': "We present a new method for the joint task of tagging and non-projective dependency parsing.  Waxaynu muujinnaa faa'iidadeedii ay ku leedahay codsiga aan joojinno baaritaanka rasmiga ah, meesha lagu sameynayo iskaashatada leksikaliska iyo iskaashatada. Kharashaadka ugu horeeya ee warqaddan waa (1) ka go’aanka tagida wadajirka ah iyo baaritaanka aan la-projective ku xirnayn baaritaanka oo la xiriiray dhibaatada caadiga ah ee ugu badnaanta hiwaayadaha arimaha borescence, iyo (2) dhibaatadan algoritm ku qoranaya ee la xiriira Lagrangian. Tusaaladan waxaynu qiimeynaynaa, waxaana helaynaa arimaha xaaladda farshaxanka inkastoo ay leeyihiin fekero xorriyad oo xoog badan.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ny metod för den gemensamma uppgiften att tagga och icke-projektiv beroendetolkning. Vi demonstrerar dess användbarhet med en tillämpning på diskontinuell frasstrukturtolkning där dekodning av lexikaliserade ryggar och syntaktiska härledningar utförs gemensamt. De viktigaste bidragen i denna uppsats är (1) en minskning från gemensam märkning och icke-projektiv beroendetolkning till Generalized Maximal Spanning Arborescence problem, och (2) en ny avkodningsalgoritm för detta problem genom Lagrangian relaxation. Vi utvärderar denna modell och uppnår toppmoderna resultat trots starka oberoende antaganden.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒட்டுதல் மற்றும் திட்டப்பணியில்லாத சார்ந்த பாடலுக்கான ஒரு புதிய முறையை கொண்டுவருகிறோம். நாங்கள் ஒரு பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு பயன்பாட்டுடன் ஒரு சொற்றொடர் கட்டுப்பாட்டை நிறுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது அதில்  இந்த தாளின் முக்கிய பங்கள் (1) இணைய ஒட்டுதல் மற்றும் திட்டப்பணி இல்லாத சார்பு பாசிட்டு பொதுவாக்கப்பட்ட அதிகபட்ச ஸ்பென்னிங் ஆர்போரிஸ் பிரச்சனைக்கு, மற்றும் (2) ல நாம் இந்த மாதிரி மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் கடுமையான சுதந்தி எண்ணங்கள் போன்ற நிலையில் முடிவுகளை பெறுக', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں ٹاگ اور غیر پروژیکٹی اعتباری پارسینگ کے جوڑ کے کام کے لئے۔ ہم اس کا فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں ایک کاروبار کے ساتھ جہاں لکسیکلیز اسپینٹ اور سینٹکتیک ڈریوٹریس ڈکوڈ کیا جاتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ کی اصلی حصہ یہ ہے کہ (1) joint tagging اور non-projective dependency parsing سے ایک کاغذ ہے جنرالیزہ Maximalized Spanning Arborescence مشکل کے ذریعہ، اور (2) اس مشکل کے لئے ایک نئی ڈیکوڈینگ الگوریتم لاگرینیان رالکس کے ذریعہ۔ ہم نے اس مدل کا ارزش کیا اور مضبوط مستقل فرضیات کے بغیر اس کی حالت کا نتیجہ حاصل کیا۔', 'uz': "Biz bir yangi usulni yozib qo'yish va projektiv qo'shish uchun bir qanday usul qilamiz. Biz ularning foydalanishini ko'rsatdik, imkoniyatlarni to ʻxtatishni tasavvur qilishni istaysizmi, leksikiz sonlarni kodlash va syntactik derivatlarini birlashtirish mumkin. Ushbu qogʻozning asosiy qandaydir (1) birlashtirish va projektiv qoʻshish muammosidan birlashtirish va umumiy eslab chiqarish muammolariga va (2) Lagrangian to ʻxtatish orqali darajaga kodlash uchun novel kodlash algoritmi. Biz bu modelni qiymatimiz va ko'proq imkoniyatlarni tasavvur qilayotganimiz kerak bo'ladik.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để giải quyết việc phân tích phụ thuộc không bị dự đoán. Chúng tôi chứng minh nó hữu dụng với một ứng dụng để phân tách các cụm từ điển học không khai thác được nơi chúng tôi thực hiện cùng nhau. The main contributions of this paper are (1) a computetion from joint taging and non non non-projectve dependence Hả to the Generieved tối đa Spanning Arborescens problem, and (2) a new decoding progression for this problem qua Lagrangian thư giãn. Chúng tôi đánh giá kiểu này và đạt được kết quả hiện đại mặc dù giả định độc lập mạnh mẽ.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ny metode til den fælles opgave med tagging og ikke-projektiv afhængighed parsing. Vi demonstrerer dens nytte med en anvendelse til diskontinuel frastruktur parsing, hvor afkodning af leksikaliserede spine og syntaktiske derivater udføres i fællesskab. De vigtigste bidrag i denne artikel er (1) en reduktion fra fælles mærkning og ikke-projektiv afhængighed parsing til Generalised Maximum Spanning Arborescence problem, og (2) en ny afkodningsalgoritme for dette problem gennem Lagrangian afslapning. Vi evaluerer denne model og opnår state-of-the-art resultater trods stærke uafhængighedsantagelser.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo novu metodu za zajednički zadatak oznake i neoprojektivne analize zavisnosti. Pokazujemo njegovu korisnost s aplikacijom za prekinuti razmatranje fraze-strukture gdje se zajedno provede dekodiranje leksikaliziranih kičmarica i sintaktičnih derivacija. Glavni doprinosi ovog papira su (1) smanjenje od zajedničkog značkanja i neoprojektivnog analiza ovisnosti na problem generaliziranog maksimalnog proširenja Arborescence i (2) novog algoritma dekodiranja ovog problem a kroz opuštenje Lagrangiana. Procjenjujemo ovaj model i dobijamo rezultate stanja umjetnosti uprkos jakim pretpostavkama nezavisnosti.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine neue Methode für die gemeinsame Aufgabe des Tagging und des nicht-projektiven Dependency Parsing vor. Wir demonstrieren seine Nützlichkeit mit einer Anwendung für diskontinuierliches Parsen von Phrasenstrukturen, bei dem lexikalisierte Spines und syntaktische Ableitungen gemeinsam dekodiert werden. Die Hauptbeiträge dieser Arbeit sind (1) eine Reduktion von Joint Tagging und nicht-projektivem Dependency Parsing auf das Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence Problem und (2) ein neuartiger Decodieralgorithmus für dieses Problem durch Lagrange Relaxation. Wir evaluieren dieses Modell und erhalten trotz starker Unabhängigkeitsannahmen aktuelle Ergebnisse.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan metode baru untuk tugas kongsi untuk menandai dan tidak proyektif penghuraian dependensi. Kami menunjukkan penggunaannya dengan aplikasi untuk menghurai frasa-struktur berhenti di mana dekodifikasi tulang belakang lexikal dan derivasi sintaksi dilakukan bersama-sama. Kontribusi utama dari kertas ini adalah (1) pengurangan dari tag kongsi dan tidak proyektif dependensi parsing ke masalah maksimum Spanning Arborescence Generalised, dan (2) algoritma dekoding baru untuk masalah ini melalui relaxation Lagrangian. We evaluate this model and obtain state-of-the-art results despite strong independence assumptions.', 'ko': '우리는 표기와 비투영 의존 분석에 사용되는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리는 이를 불연속 단어 구조 분석에 응용할 것이다. 불연속 단어 구조 분석에서 어휘화 곤란과 문법 파생의 디코딩은 연합하여 진행된 것이다.본고의 주요 공헌은 (1) 연합 표시와 비투영 의존 해석을 광의적으로 가장 큰 트리 그래프 생성 문제로 간소화하고 (2) 라그랑의 해이를 통해 새로운 디코딩 알고리즘을 제시했다.우리는 이 모델에 대해 평가를 하고 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다. 비록 매우 강한 독립성 가설이 있지만.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов метод за съвместната задача за маркиране и непроективно анализиране на зависимост. Доказваме неговата полезност с приложение за прекъснато фразово-структурно анализиране, където декодирането на лексикализирани шипове и синтактични деривати се извършва съвместно. Основните приноси на тази статия са (1) намаляване от съвместно маркиране и непроективно анализиране на зависимостта към задачата за генерализиран максимален обхват на аргорисценцията и (2) нов алгоритъм за декодиране на този проблем чрез лакрангианска релаксация. Ние оценяваме този модел и получаваме най-съвременни резултати въпреки силните предположения за независимост.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een nieuwe methode voor de gezamenlijke taak van tagging en niet-projectieve afhankelijkheidsparsing. We demonstreren het nut ervan met een toepassing op discontinuous frase-structure parsing waarbij lexicaliseerde stekels en syntactische afleidingen gezamenlijk worden gedecodeerd. De belangrijkste bijdragen van dit artikel zijn (1) een vermindering van joint tagging en niet-projectieve afhankelijkheidsparsing naar het Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescentie probleem, en (2) een nieuw decoderingsalgoritme voor dit probleem door Lagrange ontspanning. We evalueren dit model en verkrijgen state-of-the-art resultaten ondanks sterke onafhankelijkheidsveronderstellingen.', 'tr': 'Biz täze bir täze tägler we faýllaryň üstine baglanyşyklygyny a ňlamak üçin täze bir täze täze täze üýtgedik. Biz bu ýerini bir äplikeýşenler bilen soňra bir fraz strukturynyň çözümlenmesini saýlamak üçin ullanlygyny görkeýäris. Bu ýerde tekizlikli çykarylyklar we sintaktik çykarylyklar bir arada çykarylýar. Bu kagyzyň esasy gabdalyklary (1) toplam taglamakdan we projektiv ýok baglanylykdan azatlandyrmak iň beýleki süýşiklik meselä däldir. we (2) bu meseläň üçin Lagrangian süýşiklik bilen bir roman kodlemegi algoritmi. Biz bu nusgany deňleýäris we güýçli boýunça çaklamalaryna rağmen öz-özümizden gelen ýagdaýlary çykýarys.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش جدید برای کار مشترک نشان گیری و پالاس بستگی غیر پروژه\u200cای را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما استفاده\u200cاش را با یک کاربرد نشان می\u200cدهیم تا پارسال ساختار عبارت متوقف شود جایی که تغییرات الکسیکولی و تولید\u200cهای سنتاکتی با هم انجام می\u200cشود. اعضای اصلی این کاغذ (۱) کاهش از پرداخت مشترک و بستگی غیر پروژه\u200cدهنده به مشکل بزرگترین اربورسینگی اسپانیایی است، و (۲) یک الگوریتم رمانی برای این مشکل از طریق آرامش لاگرینیان است. ما این مدل را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و نتیجه\u200cهای ایالت هنر را با وجود فرضیه\u200cهای استقلال قوی می\u200cگیریم.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një metodë të re për detyrën e përbashkët të etiketave dhe analizimit të varësisë jo-projektive. Ne demonstrojmë dobinë e saj me një aplikacion për analizimin e ndërprerë të frazës-strukturës ku dekodimi i shpinëve lexikale dhe derivatave sintaktike kryehet së bashku. Kontributet kryesore të kësaj letre janë (1) një reduktim nga etiketat e përbashkëta dhe analizimi i varësisë jo-projektive në problemin e gjeneralizuar maksimal të zgjerimit të Arborescence dhe (2) një algoritëm i ri dekodimi për këtë problem nëpërmjet relaksionit lagrangian. Ne vlerësojmë këtë model dhe fitojmë rezultate më të larta pavarësisht nga supozimet e forta të pavarësisë.', 'am': 'የአዲስ ስራ ማሰናከል እና የፕሮጀክት ማኅበረሰብ የማትደገፍ ስራ አቀረብን፡፡ ለሌክሲካዊ ጉዳዮችን እና የሲንተርካዊ ጉዳዮች እና ተሳታፊ ጉዳዮችን በማድረግ ለመቆም በተግባራዊ ፕሮግራም ጥቅማቸውን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ The main contributions of this paper are (1) a reduction from joint tagging and non-projective dependency parsing to the Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence problem, and (2) a novel decoding algorithm for this problem through Lagrangian relaxation.  ይህንን ምሳሌ እናሳውቃለን እና የዓለማዊ ፍሬዎችን አግኝተናል፡፡', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza njia mpya ya jukumu la pamoja la kuchagua wimbo na kutegemea wimbo usio na mradi. Tunaonyesha manufaa yake kwa kutumia programu ya kusitisha ubaguzi wa muundo wa msemo ambapo kupunguza vifaa vya uchimbaji wa lexico na vifaa vya ushirikiano unafanyika pamoja. Mchango mkuu wa gazeti hili ni (1) kupunguza kwa wimbo wa pamoja na utengenezaji usio na mradi wa kutegemea kuingia kwenye tatizo la Kijumla la la Uhishimizi wa Ukumbuzi, na (2) utaratibu wa riwaya unaokodi kwa ajili ya tatizo hili kupitia mapumziko ya Lagrangian. Tunatathmini mtindo huu na kupata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa pamoja na dhana kali ya uhuru.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n nuwe metode voor die saamste taak van merking en nie-projektiewe afhanklikheid verwerking. Ons wys sy gebruikerheid met 'n toepassing om afsluit frase-struktuur te verwerking waar die dekodering van leksikaliseerde spine en sintaktiske afgeleidings saamgevoer word. Die hoofbydraaghings van hierdie papier is (1)  'n reduksie van joint tagging en non- projektiewe afhanklikheid verwerking tot die Generaliseerde Maksimum Spanning Arborescence probleem, en (2) ' n roman dekoderingsalgoritme vir hierdie probleem deur Lagrangian relaksie. Ons evalueer hierdie model en verkry staat-van-kunstens resultate, verag sterke onveiligheid aanvaardes.", 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করছি যুক্ত ট্যাগিং এবং অপ্রকল্পের নির্ভরশীল পার্জিং এর জন্য। We demonstrate its usefulness with an application to discontinuous phrase-structure parsing where decoding lexicalized spines and syntactic derivations is performed jointly.  এই পত্রিকার প্রধান অংশগ্রহণ হচ্ছে (১) যৌথ ট্যাগিং এবং অপ্রকল্প নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং থেকে কমে যাওয়া এবং সাধারণ মাধ্যমে সর্বোচ্চ স্প্যানিং আর্বরেসেন্স সমস্যার সাথে পার্সিং আমরা এই মডেলের মূল্য দিচ্ছি এবং শক্তিশালী স্বাধীনতা ধারণা সত্ত্বেও শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের ফলাফল পাই।', 'az': 'Biz etiketləmək və projektiv olmayan bağlılıq ayırmaq üçün yeni bir metod göstəririk. Biz onun faydalanılığını bir proqramla göstəririk ki, lexikalizirlən spinləri və sintaktik derivativları birlikdə çəkildiyimiz şəkildə əlavə edilmək üçün sonsuz fraz strukturları ayırmaq üçün. Bu kağıdın ən böyük qismətləri (1) birləşdirilmiş etiketlərdən və projektiv olmayan bağımlılıqlardan uzaqlaşdırılmış Maximum Spanning Arborescence probleminə düşürülmüşdür, və (2) bu problem ə Lagrangian rahatlama vasitəsilə yeni kodlama algoritmi. Biz bu modeli değerləşdiririk və güclü bağımsızlıq iddiasına rağmen möhkəm məxluqat sonuçlarını alırıq.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր մեթոդ, որպեսզի համընդհանուր առաջադրանքը նշաններ անենք և ոչ պրոեկտիվ կախվածության վերլուծում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս դրա օգտակարությունը մի ծրագրի օգնությամբ դադար արտահայտված արտահայտությունների կառուցվածքի վերլուծում, որտեղ միասին արտադրվում է արտահայտված լեքսիկալիզացված ողնուղերը և սինտակտիկ տարբերակները: The main contributions of this paper are (1) a reduction from joint tagging and non-projective dependency parsing to the Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence problem, and (2) a novel decoding algorithm for this problem through Lagrangian relaxation.  Մենք գնահատում ենք այս մոդելը և ստանում ենք ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ, չնայած ուժեղ անկախության ենթադրություններին:', 'ca': "Presentam un nou mètode per a la tasca conjunta d'etiquetar i analitzar la dependencia no projeccionada. We demonstrate its usefulness with an application to discontinuous phrase-structure parsing where decoding lexicalized spines and syntactic derivations is performed jointly.  Les principals contribucions d'aquest paper són (1) una reducció de l'etiquetage conjunt i l'analisi de la dependencia no projectiva al problem a Generalised Maximum Spanning Arborescence, i (2) un nou algoritme de decodificació d'aquest problema a través de la relaxació lagrangiana. Evaluam aquest model i obtenim resultats més avançats malgrat fortes suposicions d'independència.", 'cs': 'Představujeme novou metodu pro společný úkol tagování a neprojektivní analýzy závislostí. Jeho užitečnost demonstrujeme pomocí aplikace pro diskontinuální parsování frázové struktury, kde je dekódováno lexikalizované páteře a syntaktické odvození společně. Hlavními příspěvky tohoto článku jsou (1) redukce ze společného tagování a neprojekční analýzy závislostí na problém obecné maximální napětí arborescence a (2) nový dekódovací algoritmus pro tento problém prostřednictvím Lagrangovské relaxace. Tento model hodnotíme a získáváme nejmodernější výsledky navzdory silným předpokladům nezávislosti.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novu metodu za zajednički zadatak oznake i neoprojektivne analize zavisnosti. Pokazujemo njegovu korisnost s aplikacijom za prekinuti analizu fraze-strukture gdje se zajedno provede dekodiranje leksikaliziranih kičmarica i sintaktičnih derivacija. Glavni doprinosi ovog papira su (1) smanjenje od zajedničkog značkanja i neoprojektivnog analiza ovisnosti na problem generaliziranog maksimalnog proširenja Arborescence i (2) novog algoritma dekodiranja ovog problem a kroz opuštenje Lagrangiana. Procjenjujemo ovaj model i dobijamo rezultate države umjetnosti uprkos jakim pretpostavkama nezavisnosti.', 'et': 'Esitleme uut meetodit sildistamise ja mitteprojektiivse sõltuvuse parsimise ühisülesandeks. Näitame selle kasulikkust katkematu fraasistruktuuri parsimise rakendusega, kus leksikaliseeritud spine ja süntaktilisi tuletisi dekodeeritakse ühiselt. Käesoleva töö põhilised panused on (1) vähendamine ühise sildistamise ja mitteprojektiivse sõltuvuse parsimisel üldise maksimaalse ulatusega arborestsentsi probleemile ja (2) uudne dekodeerimisalgoritm selle probleemi jaoks Lagrangi lõdvestuse kaudu. Hindame seda mudelit ja saame kaasaegseid tulemusi hoolimata tugevatest sõltumatuse eeldustest.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden menetelmän tunnisteiden ja ei-projektiivisen riippuvuuden jäsentämisen yhteiseen tehtävään. Osoitamme sen hyödyllisyyden sovelluksella keskeytymättömään fraasirakenteen jäsentämiseen, jossa leksikalisoitujen piikkien ja syntaktisten johdannaisten dekoodaaminen suoritetaan yhdessä. Tämän artikkelin keskeiset osuudet ovat (1) lyhentäminen yhteismerkintästä ja ei-projektiivisesta riippuvuuden parsimisesta yleiseen maksimialueeseen arboresenssi-ongelmaan, ja (2) uusi dekoodausalgoritmi tähän ongelmaan Lagrangen rentoutumisen avulla. Arvioimme tätä mallia ja saamme huipputason tuloksia vahvoista itsenäisyysoletuksista huolimatta.', 'jv': '@label We show the use-full ness with an Application to decontinuuus text-structural PASSing Where decoding lexCaled spines and licaction mines is used joinly. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem iki ngono nggawe barang-sistem sing perusahaan karo ngono kuwi nggawe barang pengguna kuwi tindakan.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wata hanyoyi na wadan aikin tagtagogi da da ba'a-projeta da parci. Tuna nũna amfani da shirin ayuka da za'a sãɓa parse na fassarar-rubutu, inda za'a yi kodi da surori-leksisi da suntactic da ke samu'a. Maɓallin sadakõkin wannan takarda shine (1) ƙaranci daga taging da non--projeative da ke samu'a zuwa mataimaki na Jarella ta Tsarandin ArBorescene, da kuma (2) wata algoritm na kodi algoritm wa wannan muammãni a tsakanin Lagrangian. Ina ƙidãya wannan misalin kuma munã sami matsalar-na-sanar, kuma kõ da dai zato mai ƙarfi na zato da ɗai.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo novo metodo za skupno nalogo označevanja in neprojektivnega razčlenjanja odvisnosti. Njegovo uporabnost dokazujemo z aplikacijo za prekinjeno frazno-strukturno razčlenjevanje, kjer dekodiramo leksikalizirane hrbtenice in sintaktične derivacije skupaj. Glavni prispevki tega prispevka so (1) zmanjšanje od skupnega označevanja in neprojektivnega razčlenjanja odvisnosti do problema Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence (Generalized Maximum Spanning Arborescence) in (2) nov algoritem dekodiranja tega problema skozi Lagrangovo sprostitev. Ta model ocenimo in kljub močnim predpostavkam neodvisnosti pridobimo najsodobnejše rezultate.', 'he': 'We present a new method for the joint task of tagging and non-projective dependency parsing.  אנו מראים את שימושיתו באמצעות יישום למחקר מבנה-ביטויים הפסיק שבו מפענח עמוד השדרה הלקסיקלי והתוצאות סינטקטיות מבצעים יחד. התרומות העיקריות של הנייר הזה הן (1) הפחות מתג משותף ולא פרויקטיבי התלויות מעבדה לבעיה המקסימלית הגנרליזציה של התרחשות המקסימלית, ו (2) אלגוריתם חדש לפענוח הבעיה הזאת דרך ההרגעה של לאגרנג. אנו מעריכים את המודל הזה ולהשיג תוצאות חדשות למרות הנחות עצמאות חזקות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་བྱེད་མི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་མིན་པ་ཁག་གི་བགོ་སྟངས་ལ་མཐུན་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། We demonstrate its usefulness with an application to discontinuous phrase-structure parsing where decoding lexicalized spines and syntactic derivations is performed jointly. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་རྩ་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡུལ་ཆ་འདི(1)མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་དང་ལས་རྐྱེན་མེད་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མིན ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་འབྲས་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་བསམ'}
{'en': 'Incremental Graph-based Neural Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'تحليل التبعية العصبية القائم على الرسم البياني التزايدي', 'fr': 'Analyse de dépendance neuronale incrémentielle basée sur un', 'pt': 'Análise de dependência neural baseada em gráfico incremental', 'es': 'Análisis incremental de dependencias neuronales basado en gráficos', 'hi': 'वृद्धिशील ग्राफ-आधारित तंत्रिका निर्भरता पार्सिंग', 'ja': '増分グラフベースのニューラル依存性解析', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ нейронной зависимости на основе инкрементного графика', 'zh': '盖增量图之神经赖解析', 'ga': 'Parsáil Incriminteach Graf-bhunaithe um Spleáchas Néarach', 'el': 'Ανάλυση νευρωνικής εξάρτησης με βάση το αυξανόμενο γράφημα', 'ka': 'გრაფიკური განსაზღვრებული ნეირალური განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'Inkrementális grafikon alapú idegfüggőség-értelmezés', 'kk': 'Кеңейтілген график негіздеген нейрондық тәуелдік талдау', 'it': 'Analisi della dipendenza neurale basata su grafico incrementale', 'lt': 'Didesnis diagramais pagrįstas neurologinio priklausomybės analizavimas', 'mk': 'Анализирање на неврална зависност базирано на график', 'ml': 'Incremental Graph-based Neural Dependency Parsing', 'ms': 'Incremental Graph-based Neural Dependency Parsing', 'mn': 'График дээр нэмэгдсэн мэдрэлийн хамаарал шалгалт', 'no': 'Øvre grafikkbasert neuralavhengighetstolking', 'mt': 'Analiżi ta’ Dipendenza Newrali bbażata fuq Grafika Żieda', 'pl': 'Analiza zależności neuronowej oparta na wykresie przyrostowym', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependenței neurale bazată pe grafice incrementale', 'sr': 'Увеличање на графике невралног зависимости', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'ta': 'அதிகபட்ச வரைப்படத்தை அடிப்படையான நெயுரல் சார்ந்த பாடல்', 'so': 'Heshiiska mas’uulka ah ee qoyska ee ku saleysan fasaxa', 'sv': 'Inkrementell grafbaserad neural beroendetolkning', 'ur': 'افزایش گراف بنیادی نیورل اعتباری پارسینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Обработване на невронна зависимост въз основа на графика', 'hr': 'Povećajna analiza neurološke zavisnosti na grafiku', 'da': 'Inkrement grafbaseret neural afhængighedsfortolkning', 'de': 'Inkrementelle Graphen-basierte Analyse der neuronalen Abhängigkeit', 'id': 'Analisasi Dependensi Neural Berdasarkan Graf Incremental', 'nl': 'Neuronale afhankelijkheidsparsing op basis van incrementele grafieken', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha Uhuru wa Neural anayeishi na Graph', 'tr': 'Grafik tabanly nusgala baglançylyk', 'af': 'Inkremental Graafgebaseerde neurale afhanklikheid verwerking', 'ko': '증량도에 기초한 신경 의존 분석', 'sq': 'Analizimi i varësisë neurone me bazë në grafik', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'fa': 'تولید اعتماد عصبی بر اساس گراف افزایش', 'hy': 'Գրաֆի հիմնված աճող նյարդային կախվածության վերլուծությունը', 'az': 'Grafik-tabanlı nöral bağlılıq analizi', 'bn': 'বেশী গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক নিউরাল নির্ভর পার্সিং', 'ca': 'Analització de dependencies neuronals incremental basada en gràfics', 'cs': 'Analýza neuronové závislosti založená na inkrementálním grafu', 'et': 'Diagrammipõhine närvisõltuvuse analüüs', 'bs': 'Povećavajući analizu neuralne zavisnosti na grafiku', 'fi': 'Kaaviopohjainen hermoriippuvuuden analysointi', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev nevronske odvisnosti na osnovi grafov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'בדיקת תלויות נוירוליות מבוססת בגרף', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བརྙན་རིས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སུ་རྒྱུད་ལྡན་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་'}
{'en': 'Very recently, some studies on neural dependency parsers have shown advantage over the traditional ones on a wide variety of languages. However, for graph-based neural dependency parsing systems, they either count on the long-term memory and attention mechanism to implicitly capture the high-order features or give up the global exhaustive inference algorithms in order to harness the features over a rich history of parsing decisions. The former might miss out the important features for specific headword predictions without the help of the explicit structural information, and the latter may suffer from the error propagation as false early structural constraints are used to create features when making future predictions. We explore the feasibility of explicitly taking high-order features into account while remaining the main advantage of global inference and learning for graph-based parsing. The proposed parser first forms an initial parse tree by head-modifier predictions based on the first-order factorization. High-order features (such as grandparent, sibling, and uncle) then can be defined over the initial tree, and used to refine the parse tree in an iterative fashion. Experimental results showed that our model (called INDP) archived competitive performance to existing benchmark parsers on both English and Chinese datasets.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، أظهرت بعض الدراسات حول محللي التبعية العصبية ميزة على تلك التقليدية على مجموعة متنوعة من اللغات. ومع ذلك ، بالنسبة لأنظمة تحليل التبعية العصبية القائمة على الرسم البياني ، فإنها إما تعتمد على الذاكرة طويلة المدى وآلية الانتباه لالتقاط الميزات ذات الترتيب العالي ضمنيًا أو التخلي عن خوارزميات الاستدلال الشاملة الشاملة من أجل تسخير الميزات عبر تاريخ ثري من اعراب القرارات. قد يفقد الأول الميزات المهمة لتنبؤات الكلمات الرئيسية المحددة دون مساعدة المعلومات الهيكلية الصريحة ، وقد يعاني الأخير من انتشار الخطأ حيث يتم استخدام قيود هيكلية خاطئة مبكرة لإنشاء ميزات عند إجراء تنبؤات مستقبلية. نحن نستكشف جدوى أخذ الميزات عالية الترتيب في الاعتبار بشكل صريح مع الحفاظ على الميزة الرئيسية للاستدلال العالمي والتعلم من أجل التحليل المستند إلى الرسم البياني. يقوم المحلل اللغوي المقترح أولاً بتشكيل شجرة تحليل أولية بواسطة تنبؤات معدل الرأس بناءً على عامل الترتيب الأول. يمكن بعد ذلك تحديد الميزات عالية الترتيب (مثل الجد ، والأخ ، والعم) فوق الشجرة الأولية ، واستخدامها لتحسين شجرة التحليل بطريقة تكرارية. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا (المسمى INDP) قد أرشفة الأداء التنافسي لمحللي المعايير الحاليين في كل من مجموعات البيانات الإنجليزية والصينية.', 'fr': "Très récemment, certaines études sur les analyseurs de dépendance neuronale ont montré des avantages par rapport aux analyseurs traditionnels dans une grande variété de langues. Cependant, pour les systèmes d'analyse de dépendance neuronale basés sur des graphes, ils comptent sur le mécanisme de mémoire et d'attention à long terme pour capturer implicitement les caractéristiques d'ordre élevé ou abandonnent les algorithmes d'inférence exhaustifs globaux afin d'exploiter les caractéristiques sur une riche histoire de décisions d'analyse. Le premier peut manquer les fonctionnalités importantes pour des prédictions de mots clés spécifiques sans l'aide d'informations structurelles explicites, et le second peut souffrir de la propagation de l'erreur car de fausses contraintes structurelles précoces sont utilisées pour créer des entités lors de prévisions futures. Nous explorons la possibilité de prendre explicitement en compte les caractéristiques d'ordre élevé tout en restant le principal avantage de l'inférence globale et de l'apprentissage pour l'analyse graphique. L'analyseur proposé forme d'abord un arbre d'analyse initial par des prédictions de modificateurs de tête basées sur la factorisation du premier ordre. Les entités d'ordre élevé (telles que grand-parent, frère et oncle) peuvent ensuite être définies sur l'arbre initial et utilisées pour affiner l'arbre d'analyse de manière itérative. Les résultats expérimentaux ont montré que notre modèle (appelé INDP) archivait les performances concurrentielles des analyseurs de référence existants sur des ensembles de données anglais et chinois.", 'pt': 'Muito recentemente, alguns estudos sobre analisadores de dependência neural mostraram vantagem sobre os tradicionais em uma ampla variedade de linguagens. No entanto, para sistemas de análise de dependência neural baseados em gráficos, eles contam com a memória de longo prazo e o mecanismo de atenção para capturar implicitamente os recursos de alta ordem ou abandonam os algoritmos de inferência globais exaustivos para aproveitar os recursos em um rico histórico de decisões de análise. O primeiro pode perder os recursos importantes para previsões de palavras-chave específicas sem a ajuda das informações estruturais explícitas, e o último pode sofrer com a propagação de erros, pois as restrições estruturais iniciais falsas são usadas para criar recursos ao fazer previsões futuras. Exploramos a viabilidade de considerar explicitamente os recursos de alta ordem, mantendo a principal vantagem da inferência global e do aprendizado para análise baseada em grafos. O analisador proposto primeiro forma uma árvore de análise inicial por previsões do modificador de cabeça com base na fatoração de primeira ordem. Recursos de alta ordem (como avô, irmão e tio) podem ser definidos sobre a árvore inicial e usados para refinar a árvore de análise de maneira iterativa. Os resultados experimentais mostraram que nosso modelo (chamado INDP) arquivava o desempenho competitivo dos analisadores de benchmark existentes nos conjuntos de dados em inglês e chinês.', 'es': 'Muy recientemente, algunos estudios sobre analizadores de dependencias neuronales han demostrado tener ventaja sobre los tradicionales en una amplia variedad de lenguajes. Sin embargo, para los sistemas de análisis de dependencia neuronal basados en gráficos, cuentan con el mecanismo de memoria y atención a largo plazo para capturar implícitamente las características de alto orden o renuncian a los algoritmos de inferencia exhaustivos globales para aprovechar las funciones a lo largo de un rico historial de decisiones de análisis. El primero podría pasar por alto las características importantes para las predicciones de palabras clave específicas sin la ayuda de la información estructural explícita, y el segundo puede sufrir la propagación de errores, ya que se utilizan restricciones estructurales tempranas falsas para crear características al hacer predicciones futuras. Exploramos la viabilidad de tener en cuenta explícitamente las características de orden superior y, al mismo tiempo, seguir siendo la principal ventaja de la inferencia global y el aprendizaje para el análisis basado en gráficos. El analizador propuesto primero forma un árbol de análisis inicial mediante predicciones de modificadores de cabeza basadas en la factorización de primer orden. Las características de orden superior (como abuelo, hermano y tío) se pueden definir en el árbol inicial y usarse para refinar el árbol de análisis de forma iterativa. Los resultados experimentales mostraron que nuestro modelo (llamado INDP) archivaba el rendimiento competitivo de los analizadores de referencia existentes en conjuntos de datos en inglés y chino.', 'ja': 'ごく最近では、ニューラル依存構文解析器に関するいくつかの研究は、多種多様な言語で従来のものよりも優れていることを示しています。 しかしながら、グラフベースのニューラル依存性解析システムでは、高次の特徴を暗黙のうちに取り込むために長期記憶と注意メカニズムに依存するか、または豊富な解析決定履歴にわたって特徴を活用するためにグローバル網羅的な推論アルゴリズムを放棄するかのいずれかである。 前者は、明示的な構造情報の助けなしに、特定のヘッドワード予測の重要な特徴を見逃す可能性があり、後者は、誤った早期構造制約が将来の予測を行う際に特徴を作成するために使用されるため、エラー伝播に苦しむ可能性がある。 私たちは、グラフベースの構文解析のためのグローバル推論と学習の主な利点を維持しながら、高次の機能を明示的に考慮することの実現可能性を探ります。 提案された構文解析器は、まず、一階の因数分解に基づいた頭部修正器予測によって初期構文解析ツリーを形成する。 次いで、高次の特徴（祖父母、兄弟姉妹、叔父など）を初期ツリーにわたって定義し、構文解析ツリーを反復的に絞り込むために使用することができる。 実験結果は、当社のモデル（ INDPと呼ばれる）が、英語と中国語のデータセットの両方で既存のベンチマークパーサーに競争力のあるパフォーマンスをアーカイブしていることを示しました。', 'zh': '近者,神经赖解析器之论,诸言语,比于旧解析器,其为胜势也。 然于图之神经依赖性解析统,或以久记注意机隐式获高阶,或弃全局之详算,以资解析策之丰史。 若无显式结构信息之助,前或误特定题占之要,后或有差传,盖未来之时,用误早期结构以创之也。 论明虑高阶可行性,兼守全局推理,学基于图形解析之大势也。 所建解析器首因式解首饰符占以成解析树。 然后可以初树定义高阶(如祖父母、兄弟姊妹、叔),以迭代优化解析树。 实验结果表明,吾模样(谓之INDP)将竞性能存档与英语、中文数据集上见有基准分析器。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, तंत्रिका निर्भरता पार्सर पर कुछ अध्ययनों ने विभिन्न प्रकार की भाषाओं पर पारंपरिक लोगों पर लाभ दिखाया है। हालांकि, ग्राफ-आधारित तंत्रिका निर्भरता पार्सिंग सिस्टम के लिए, वे या तो उच्च-क्रम की विशेषताओं को स्पष्ट रूप से कैप्चर करने के लिए दीर्घकालिक स्मृति और ध्यान तंत्र पर भरोसा करते हैं या पार्सिंग निर्णयों के समृद्ध इतिहास पर सुविधाओं का दोहन करने के लिए वैश्विक संपूर्ण अनुमान एल्गोरिदम को छोड़ देते हैं। पूर्व स्पष्ट संरचनात्मक जानकारी की मदद के बिना विशिष्ट हेडवर्ड भविष्यवाणियों के लिए महत्वपूर्ण विशेषताओं को याद कर सकता है, और उत्तरार्द्ध त्रुटि प्रसार से पीड़ित हो सकता है क्योंकि भविष्य की भविष्यवाणियां करते समय सुविधाओं को बनाने के लिए झूठी प्रारंभिक संरचनात्मक बाधाओं का उपयोग किया जाता है। हम स्पष्ट रूप से उच्च-क्रम सुविधाओं को ध्यान में रखने की व्यवहार्यता का पता लगाते हैं, जबकि ग्राफ-आधारित पार्सिंग के लिए वैश्विक अनुमान और सीखने का मुख्य लाभ शेष है। प्रस्तावित पार्सर पहले प्रथम-क्रम के कारकीकरण के आधार पर सिर-संशोधक भविष्यवाणियों द्वारा एक प्रारंभिक पार्स पेड़ बनाता है। उच्च-क्रम की विशेषताएं (जैसे दादा-दादी, भाई-बहन और चाचा) को तब प्रारंभिक पेड़ पर परिभाषित किया जा सकता है, और एक पुनरावर्ती फैशन में पार्स पेड़ को परिष्कृत करने के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चला है कि हमारे मॉडल (जिसे आईएनडीपी कहा जाता है) ने अंग्रेजी और चीनी डेटासेट दोनों पर मौजूदा बेंचमार्क पार्सर में प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन को संग्रहीत किया।', 'ru': 'Совсем недавно некоторые исследования нейронных парсеров зависимостей показали преимущество по сравнению с традиционными на широком спектре языков. Тем не менее, для графовых систем анализа нейронных зависимостей они либо рассчитывают на долгосрочную память и механизм внимания, чтобы имплицитно захватить признаки высокого порядка, либо отказываются от глобальных исчерпывающих алгоритмов вывода, чтобы использовать признаки в богатой истории решений по анализу. Первые могут пропустить важные признаки для конкретных прогнозов заголовков без помощи явной структурной информации, а вторые могут пострадать от распространения ошибок, поскольку ложные ранние структурные ограничения используются для создания признаков при составлении будущих прогнозов. Мы изучаем возможность прямого учета функций высокого порядка, оставаясь при этом главным преимуществом глобального вывода и обучения для анализа на основе графов. Предложенный синтаксический анализатор сначала формирует начальное синтаксическое дерево по предсказаниям головного модификатора на основе факторизации первого порядка. Функции высокого порядка (такие как бабушка и дедушка, брат и дядя) затем могут быть определены над начальным деревом и использоваться для уточнения дерева синтаксического анализа итеративным образом. Экспериментальные результаты показали, что наша модель (называемая INDP) архивировала результаты конкурентной борьбы с существующими эталонными парсерами как на английском, так и на китайском наборах данных.', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, léirigh roinnt staidéar ar pharsálaithe spleáchais néaracha go bhfuil buntáiste ann thar na cinn thraidisiúnta ar raon leathan teangacha. I gcás córais pharsála spleáchais néarbhunaithe, áfach, bíonn siad ag brath ar mheicníocht cuimhne agus aird fhadtéarmach chun na gnéithe ard-ord a ghabháil go hintuigthe nó chun na halgartaim táimhe uileghabhálach domhanda a thabhairt suas chun leas a bhaint as na gnéithe thar stair shaibhir de. cinntí parsála. D’fhéadfadh go gcaillfeadh an chéad cheann acu na gnéithe tábhachtacha maidir le tuar ceannfhocail ar leith gan cabhair ón bhfaisnéis struchtúrach fhollasach, agus d’fhéadfadh go mbeadh iomadú earráide ag baint leis an dara ceann de réir mar a úsáidtear srianta struchtúracha bréagacha luatha chun gnéithe a chruthú agus réamh-mheastacháin á ndéanamh amach anseo. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar an bhféidearthacht gnéithe ard-oird a chur san áireamh go sainráite agus fós mar phríomhbhuntáiste tátail dhomhanda agus foghlaim do pharsáil ghraf-bhunaithe. Cruthaíonn an parsálaí atá beartaithe crann parsála tosaigh ar dtús de réir réamh-mheastacháin mhionathraithe ceann bunaithe ar an bhfachtóirú céad-ordú. Is féidir gnéithe ard-ord (cosúil le seantuismitheoir, siblín, agus uncail) a shainiú ansin thar an gcrann tosaigh, agus iad a úsáid chun an crann parse a bheachtú ar bhealach atriallach. Léirigh torthaí turgnamhacha gur chuir ár múnla (ar a dtugtar INDP) feidhmíocht iomaíoch i gcartlann do pharsálaithe tagarmharcála a bhí ann cheana ar thacair shonraí Bhéarla agus Shíneacha araon.', 'hu': 'Nemrégiben a neurális függőség elemzőivel kapcsolatos néhány tanulmány előnyt mutatott a hagyományos nyelvekkel szemben számos nyelven. A gráf alapú neurális függőség elemző rendszerek esetében azonban vagy a hosszú távú memória és figyelem mechanizmusára számítanak, hogy implicit módon rögzítsék a nagy rendű funkciókat, vagy feladják a globális kimerítő következtetési algoritmusokat annak érdekében, hogy hasznosítsák a funkciókat a gazdag elemzési döntések történetében. Az előbbi a kifejezett strukturális információk segítsége nélkül kihagyhatja a konkrét címszó-előrejelzések fontos jellemzőit, míg az utóbbi szenvedhet a hiba terjedésétől, mivel hamis korai strukturális korlátozásokat használnak a jövőbeli előrejelzések során jellemzők létrehozására. Megvizsgáljuk, hogy kifejezetten figyelembe vesszük a magas rendű funkciókat, miközben továbbra is a globális következtetés és a grafikonalapú elemzés tanulásának fő előnye marad. A javasolt elemző először egy kezdeti elemzési fát alkot fej-módosító előrejelzésekkel az elsőrendű faktorizáció alapján. A nagy rendű funkciók (például nagyszülő, testvér és nagybátyja) ezután definiálhatók a kezdeti fa felett, és használhatók a feldolgozási fa iteratív módon finomítására. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatták, hogy modellünk (INDP) versenyképes teljesítményt archivált a meglévő benchmark elemzők számára mind angol, mind kínai adatkészleteken.', 'el': 'Πολύ πρόσφατα, ορισμένες μελέτες σχετικά με τους αναλυτές νευρωνικής εξάρτησης έχουν δείξει πλεονέκτημα έναντι των παραδοσιακών σε μια μεγάλη ποικιλία γλωσσών. Ωστόσο, για συστήματα ανάλυσης νευρωνικής εξάρτησης βασισμένα σε γραφήματα, είτε βασίζονται στη μακροπρόθεσμη μνήμη και τον μηχανισμό προσοχής για να συλλάβουν έμμεσα τα χαρακτηριστικά υψηλής τάξης είτε εγκαταλείπουν τους παγκόσμιους εξαντλητικούς αλγόριθμους συμπερασμάτων προκειμένου να αξιοποιήσουν τα χαρακτηριστικά σε ένα πλούσιο ιστορικό αναλύσεων αποφάσεων. Το πρώτο μπορεί να παραλείψει τα σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά για συγκεκριμένες προβλέψεις λέξεων χωρίς τη βοήθεια των ρητών δομικών πληροφοριών, και το τελευταίο μπορεί να υποφέρει από τη διάδοση σφαλμάτων καθώς ψευδείς αρχικοί δομικοί περιορισμοί χρησιμοποιούνται για τη δημιουργία χαρακτηριστικών κατά την πραγματοποίηση μελλοντικών προβλέψεων. Εξετάζουμε τη σκοπιμότητα της ρητής λήψης χαρακτηριστικών υψηλής τάξης, παραμένοντας παράλληλα το κύριο πλεονέκτημα της παγκόσμιας συμπερασμάτων και μάθησης για ανάλυση με βάση γραφήματα. Ο προτεινόμενος αναλυτής σχηματίζει πρώτα ένα αρχικό δέντρο ανάλυσης με προβλέψεις τροποποιητή κεφαλής με βάση τον παράγοντα πρώτης τάξης. Χαρακτηριστικά υψηλής τάξης (όπως ο παππούς, ο αδερφός και ο θείος) μπορούν στη συνέχεια να οριστούν πάνω από το αρχικό δέντρο και να χρησιμοποιηθούν για να βελτιώσουν το δέντρο με επαναλαμβανόμενο τρόπο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα έδειξαν ότι το μοντέλο μας (που ονομάζεται INDP) αρχειοθέτησε την ανταγωνιστική απόδοση σε υπάρχοντες αναλυτές αναφοράς τόσο σε αγγλικά όσο και σε κινέζικα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ძალიან ახლა, ნეიროლის დასამხრებელობის პარასერების კვლევები გამოიყენება ტრადიციონალური მსგავსი ენაზე. მაგრამ, გრაფიკური განსაზღვრებული ნეიროლის განსაზღვრებული სისტემებისთვის, ისინი იყოს ძალიან სიმართლური მეხსიერება და ინტერსიკური მექანსისთვის, რომელიც იმპლიციტურად უფრო სიმართლური განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციების შესახე პირველი შეიძლება შეიძლება გამოსხვა მნიშვნელოვანი ფუნქციები განსაზღვრებისთვის სპექტიკური სტრუქტურული ინფორმაციის დახმარებისთვის, და შემდეგ შეიძლება შეცდომის პროპაგიაციაზე გადარჩენა, რო ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებელობა, რომელსაც გლობალური ინფრენცია და სწავლება გრაფიკური განსხვავებისთვის გასაკეთებელობა. პირველი პროგრამის პირველი პროგრამის ფაქტორიზაციაზე დაბადებული პირველი პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის პარასის ხე. შემდეგ შეიძლება განსაზღვრება საშუალო ხეზე და გამოყენება განსაზღვრება საშუალო ხეზე. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები გამოჩნდა, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი (INDP) არქიურებულია კონფექტიური პროცექტის მსოფლიო ბენქმენტიური პარასერებისთვის ანგლი', 'kk': 'Жуырда, невралдық тәуелдік талдаушыларының кейбір зерттеулері әдеттегі тілдерінің көптеген тілдерінің артықшылығын көрсетті. Бірақ графикалық негіздеген невралдық тәуелдік талдау жүйелері үшін олар жоғары реттегі мүмкіндіктерді қамтамасыз ету үшін ұзындық жады мен тәуелдік механизміне есеп береді немесе жалпы жүйелік тәуелдік алгоритмдерді қалдыру үшін Біріншісі таңдалған құрылғы мәліметінің көмегімен келтірілген айдарлардың алдындағы маңызды мүмкіндіктері жоқ болуы мүмкін, және соңғылар қате пропагациясынан шығу мүмкін, келесі алдындағы құрылғыларды құру Біз график негізінде талдау және оқыту үшін негізгі мәселелерді қалдырып тұрғанда, жоғары реттегі мүмкіндіктерді есептеу мүмкіндігін зерттеп көрдік. Бірінші талдаушы бастапқы талдау бұтағын бастапқы түрлендірушілердің алдыңғы реттік факторизациясына негізделген алдыңғы талдау бұтағын құрады. Жоғары реттегі мүмкіндіктері (мысалы, әйел, дәлем және дәлем) бастапқы ағаш арқылы анықталады және талдау ағашын қайталау үшін қолданылады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің (INDP деп аталатын) моделіміздің ағылшын және қытайлық деректер қорларында бар банкмарк талдаушыларына архивтеу әрекеттерімізді көрсетті', 'it': "Molto recentemente, alcuni studi sui parser di dipendenza neurale hanno mostrato un vantaggio rispetto a quelli tradizionali su un'ampia varietà di lingue. Tuttavia, per i sistemi di analisi delle dipendenze neurali basati su grafici, essi contano sulla memoria a lungo termine e sul meccanismo di attenzione per catturare implicitamente le caratteristiche di alto ordine o rinunciano agli algoritmi globali di inferenza esaustivi al fine di sfruttare le caratteristiche in una ricca storia di decisioni di analisi. Il primo potrebbe perdere le caratteristiche importanti per le previsioni specifiche di headpword senza l'aiuto di informazioni strutturali esplicite, e il secondo potrebbe soffrire della propagazione dell'errore in quanto falsi vincoli strutturali iniziali vengono utilizzati per creare caratteristiche quando si fanno previsioni future. Esploriamo la fattibilità di prendere esplicitamente in considerazione le funzionalità di alto ordine pur rimanendo il vantaggio principale dell'inferenza globale e dell'apprendimento per l'analisi basata su grafici. Il parser proposto per prima cosa forma un albero di analisi iniziale per predizioni head-modificator basate sulla fattorizzazione del primo ordine. Le caratteristiche di alto ordine (come nonno, fratello e zio) possono quindi essere definite sopra l'albero iniziale e utilizzate per affinare l'albero di analisi in modo iterativo. I risultati sperimentali hanno mostrato che il nostro modello (chiamato INDP) archivia le prestazioni competitive rispetto ai parser di benchmark esistenti su set di dati inglesi e cinesi.", 'lt': 'Labai neseniai kai kurie tyrimai su nervų priklausomybės analizatoriais parodė pranašumą, palyginti su tradiciniais įvairių kalbų tyrimais. Tačiau grafiniu būdu pagrįstų nervų priklausomybės analizavimo sistemų atžvilgiu jos arba pasikliauja ilgalaikiu atminties ir dėmesio mechanizmu, kad būtų galima netiesiogiai surinkti aukštos tvarkos savybes, arba atsisakyti visapusiškų išsamių išvadų algoritmų, kad būtų galima pasinaudoti savybėmis per turtingą analizavimo sprendimų istoriją. Pirmasis gali praleisti svarbius konkrečių galvos žodžių prognozių požymius be aiškios struktūrinės informacijos, o antrasis gali patirti klaidų plitimą, nes sukuriant būsimas prognozes naudojami klaidingi ankstyvieji struktūriniai apribojimai. Mes išnagrinėjame galimybę aiškiai atsižvelgti į aukštos tvarkos ypatumus ir išlaikyti pagrindinį pasaulinės išvados ir mokymosi grafiniu būdu pranašumą. Siūlomas analizatorius pirmiausia sudaro pradinį analizatorių medį pagal galvos modifikatorių prognozes, pagrįstas pirmosios eilės faktorizacija. Tuomet per pradinį medį gali būti apibrėžiami aukštos eilės požymiai (pvz., senelis, sesuo ir dėdė) ir juos galima pakartotinai tobulinti. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai parodė, kad mūsų modelis (vadinamasis INDP) archyvuoja konkurencinius rezultatus esamuose lyginamuosiuose analizatoriuose tiek anglų, tiek Kinijos duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'mk': 'Неодамна, некои студии за анализатори на нервната зависност покажаа предност над традиционалните на широка различност на јазици. Сепак, за системите за анализирање на нервната зависност базирани на графот, тие или сметаат на долгорочниот механизам на меморија и внимание за имплицитно заземање на високи карактеристики или се откажуваат од глобалните исцрпеливи алгоритми на инференција со цел да ги искористат карактеристиките во текот на бо Првите може да ги пропуштат важните карактеристики за специфичните предвидувања на главните зборови без помош од експлицитните структурни информации, а последните може да страдаат од пропагација на грешки бидејќи лажни рани структурни ограничувања се користат за создавање карактеристики кога се прави ид Ние ја истражуваме физибилитетот на експлицитно земање во предвид карактеристики од висок ред, додека остануваме главната предност на глобалната инференција и учењето за анализирање на график. Предложениот анализатор прво формира првично дрво за анализирање со предвидувања за модификација на главата базирани на факторизацијата од прв ред. High-order features (such as grandparent, sibling, and uncle) then can be defined over the initial tree, and used to refine the parse tree in an iterative fashion.  Експерименталните резултати покажаа дека нашиот модел (наречен ИНДП) архивираше конкурентна перформанса на постоечките анализатори за референтни оценки на англиски и кинески податоци.', 'ms': 'Very recently, some studies on neural dependency parsers have shown advantage over the traditional ones on a wide variety of languages.  Bagaimanapun, bagi sistem penghurai dependensi saraf berdasarkan graf, ia sama ada mengandalkan memori jangka panjang dan mekanisme perhatian untuk secara implicit menangkap ciri-ciri tertib tinggi atau menyerah algoritma kesimpulan yang melelahkan global untuk menggunakan ciri-ciri dalam sejarah yang kaya penghuraian keputusan. Yang pertama mungkin melewatkan ciri-ciri penting untuk ramalan perkataan kepala khusus tanpa bantuan maklumat struktur eksplicit, dan yang terakhir mungkin menderita dari penyebaran ralat kerana kekangan struktur awal palsu digunakan untuk mencipta ciri-ciri apabila membuat ramalan masa depan. Kami mengeksplorasi kemungkinan mengambil secara eksplicit ciri-ciri tertib tinggi dalam akaun sementara kekal keuntungan utama dari kesimpulan global dan belajar untuk penghuraian berdasarkan graf. Penghurai yang diusulkan pertama membentuk pepohon hurai awal dengan ramalan pengubahsuai-kepala berdasarkan faktorisasi tertib pertama. Ciri-ciri tertib tinggi (seperti datuk bapa, saudara saudara, dan bapa saudara) kemudian boleh ditakrif di atas pokok awal, dan digunakan untuk menaiki pepohonan hurai dengan cara yang mengulang. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kami (dipanggil INDP) arkib prestasi kompetitif kepada penghurai tanda rujukan yang wujud pada set data Inggeris dan Cina.', 'mn': 'Саяхан зарим судалгаанууд мэдрэлийн хамааралтай судлаачид олон төрлийн хэл дээр уламжлалтын талаар ашиг үзүүлсэн. Гэхдээ график дээрх мэдрэлийн хамааралтай хуваалцах системийн хувьд тэд урт хугацааны санамж, анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмийн хувьд өндөр дарааллын чадварыг барьж, эсвэл дэлхий даяарсан халдварын алгоритмыг хадгалахын тулд баян түүхэн шийдвэрлэх шийдвэрл Өмнөх нь тодорхойлолтой бүтэц мэдээллийн тусламжгүй тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын чухал тодорхойлолтуудыг алдагдуулж магадгүй. Эдгээр нь алдааны хөгжүүлэлтийн тулд ирээдүйн таамаглах үед худлаа бүтэц хязгаарлалт үүс Бид дэлхийн халдвар, график дээр ажиллах сургалтын гол давуу тал үлдэх үед өндөр дарааллыг тодорхой ойлгох чадварыг судалж байна. Эхлээд санал дэвшигчийн хуваарч анхны хуваарч модыг анхны дарааллын хуваарч хуваарч болох таамаглалтай болгодог. Хамгийн өндөр дараа нь (өвөө, дүү, дүү нар, дүү нар мэт) анхны мод дээр тодорхойлж чадна. Ийтератив аргаар хуваалцах модыг цэвэрлэхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар (INDP гэдэг) англи болон Хятад өгөгдлийн санд оршиж байгаа банкмарк ажиллагчдын архивчлалтай ажиллагааг харуулсан.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ, ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസറുകളെക്കുറിച്ച് കുറച്ച് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d വിവിധ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പാരമ്പര് എന്നാലും ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നെയൂറല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് സിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അവര്\u200d നീണ്ട മെമ്മറിയും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന സാധ്യതകളും പിടികൂടുന്നതിനെക പ്രത്യേക ഹെഡ്വോര്\u200dഡ് പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രഖ്യാപനത്തില്\u200d നിന് We explore the feasibility of explicitly taking high-order features into account while remaining the main advantage of global inference and learning for graph-based parsing.  ആദ്യം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷത്തെ തലയില്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യം മാറ്റുന്നതിന്റെ ആദ്യം ആ ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ക്രമീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d (മുത്തച്ഛന്\u200d, സഹോദരി, അമ്മാവന്\u200d, പിന്നെ ആദ്യത്തെ വൃക്ഷത്തിന്\u200dമേല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷത്തെ സാധാരണമ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d (INDP എന്ന് പേരിട്ടു) നിലവിലുള്ള ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dസു', 'mt': 'Dan l-a ħħar ħafna, xi studji dwar il-analizzaturi tad-dipendenza newrali wrew vantaġġ fuq dawk tradizzjonali fuq varjetà wiesgħa ta’ lingwi. Madankollu, għas-sistemi ta’ analizzazzjoni tad-dipendenza newrali bbażati fuq il-grafika, huma jew jistrieħu fuq il-memorja u l-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni fit-tul biex jinqabdu impliċitament il-karatteristiċi ta’ ordni għolja jew jitneħħew l-algoritmi globali ta’ inferenza eżawrjenti sabiex jintużaw il-karatteristiċi fuq storja rikka ta’ deċiżjonijiet ta’ analizzazzjoni. L-ewwel jista’ jitilfu l-karatteristiċi importanti għal tbassir speċifiku tal-kelma ewlenija mingħajr l-għajnuna tal-informazzjoni strutturali espliċita, u dan tal-aħħar jista’ jsofri mill-propagazzjoni tal-iżbalji billi jintużaw restrizzjonijiet strutturali bikrija foloz biex jinħolqu karatteristiċi meta jsiru tbassir futur. Aħna nesploraw il-fattibbiltà li jitqiesu b’mod espliċitu l-karatteristiċi ta’ ordni għolja filwaqt li jibqgħu l-vantaġġ ewlieni tal-inferenza globali u t-tagħlim għall-analiżi bbażata fuq il-grafika. Il-analizzatur propost l-ewwel jifforma siġar tal-analizzazzjoni inizjali bi tbassir tal-modifikatur tar-ras ibbażat fuq il-fatturizzazzjoni tal-ewwel ordni. Karatteristiċi ta’ ordni għolja (bħan-nonna, l-aħwa, u l-ziju) imbagħad jistgħu jiġu ddefiniti fuq is-siġar inizjali, u jintużaw biex jiġi raffinat is-siġar tal-ipproċessar b’mod iterattiv. Riżultati esperimentali wrew li l-mudell tagħna (imsejjaħ INDP) arkivja l-prestazzjoni kompetittiva għal analizzaturi ta’ punti ta’ riferiment eżistenti kemm fuq settijiet tad-dejta Ingliż kif ukoll Ċiniż.', 'pl': 'Bardzo ostatnio niektóre badania nad parserami zależności neuronowej wykazały przewagę nad tradycyjnymi w wielu różnych językach. Jednakże w przypadku systemów analizowania zależności neuronowej opartych na wykresie, albo liczą na mechanizm pamięci długoterminowej i uwagi, aby domyślnie uchwycić cechy wysokiego rzędu, albo rezygnują z globalnych wyczerpujących algorytmów wnioskowania w celu wykorzystania tych cech w bogatej historii decyzji analizowania. Pierwsza może pominąć ważne cechy dla określonych przewidywań słów kluczowych bez pomocy wyraźnych informacji strukturalnych, a druga może cierpieć z powodu propagacji błędów, ponieważ fałszywe wczesne ograniczenia strukturalne są wykorzystywane do tworzenia cech podczas przyszłych prognoz. Badamy możliwość jednoznacznego uwzględnienia funkcji wysokiego rzędu, pozostając jednocześnie główną zaletą globalnego wnioskowania i uczenia się do parsowania opartego na wykresie. Proponowany parser najpierw tworzy początkowe drzewo parsowania przez prognozy modyfikatora głowy oparte na czynnikowaniu pierwszego rzędu. Funkcje wysokiego rzędu (takie jak dziadek, rodzeństwo i wujek) można następnie zdefiniować nad początkowym drzewem i używać do udoskonalania drzewa parse w sposób iteracyjny. Wyniki eksperymentalne wykazały, że nasz model (zwany INDP) zarchiwizował wyniki konkurencyjne do istniejących analizatorów benchmarkowych zarówno na angielskich, jak i chińskich zbiorach danych.', 'sr': 'Nedavno, neke studije o parserima neuralne zavisnosti pokazale su prednost nad tradicionalnim na širokoj raznolikosti jezika. Međutim, za sisteme analize neuralne zavisnosti na grafiku, računaju na dugoročni mehanizam pamćenja i pažnje da bi implicitno uhvatili visokoredne karakteristike ili odustali od globalnih iscrpljivih algoritma infekcije kako bi iskoristili karakteristike bogate istorije analize odluke. Bivši bi mogli propustiti važne karakteristike za specifične predviđanja glavne reči bez pomoći eksplicitnih strukturnih informacija, a poslednji bi mogli patiti od propagacije grešaka jer se koriste lažne ranije strukturne ograničenja za stvaranje karakteristika kada buduće predviđanje budu predviđene. Istražujemo mogućnost izrazito uzimanja u obzir visokoredne karakteristike dok ostajemo glavnu prednost globalne infekcije i učenja za analizu na grafiku. Predloženi analizator je prvi put formirao prvi analizaciju drveta predviđanjem glavnog modifikatora na osnovu faktorizacije prvog reda. Visokoredne karakteristike (kao što su baka, braća i ujak) onda se mogu definisati preko prvog drveta, i koristiti se za refinansiranje parse drveta iterativno. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazali su da je naš model (nazvan INDP) arhiviran konkurentni performans postojećim konzervativnim analitičarima na engleskim i kineskim podacima.', 'ro': 'Foarte recent, unele studii privind parserele dependenței neurale au arătat avantaje față de cele tradiționale pe o mare varietate de limbi. Cu toate acestea, pentru sistemele de analizare a dependenței neurale bazate pe grafice, acestea fie se bazează pe mecanismul de memorie și atenție pe termen lung pentru a capta implicit caracteristicile de ordine înaltă sau renunță la algoritmii globali exhaustivi de inferență pentru a valorifica caracteristicile pe o istorie bogată a deciziilor de analizare. Primul ar putea pierde caracteristicile importante pentru predicțiile specifice cuvintelor anterioare fără ajutorul informațiilor structurale explicite, iar cel de-al doilea ar putea suferi de propagarea erorilor deoarece constrângeri structurale false timpurii sunt folosite pentru a crea caracteristici atunci când fac previziuni viitoare. Explorăm fezabilitatea luării explicite în considerare a caracteristicilor de ordine înaltă, rămânând în același timp principalul avantaj al inferenței globale și al învățării pentru analizarea bazată pe grafice. Parserul propus formează mai întâi un arbore inițial de parsare prin predicții head-modificator bazate pe factorizarea primului ordin. Caracteristicile de ordine înaltă (cum ar fi bunicul, fratele și unchiul) pot fi definite apoi peste arborele inițial și folosite pentru a rafina arborele de pătrundere într-un mod iterativ. Rezultatele experimentale au arătat că modelul nostru (numit INDP) a arhivat performanța competitivă pentru parserele de referință existente atât pe seturile de date engleze cât și chinezești.', 'no': 'Somme studiar om neuralavhengighetsanalyser har vist fordel over tradisjonelle på mange språk. Dette er imidlertid for grafikkbaserte neuralavhengighetsystemet, men dei teller anten på den langsiktige minne og oppmerksmekanismen for å implisitt henta dei høg rekkefølgjande funksjonane eller gi opp den globale utløpste infeksjonsgoritmen for å bruka funksjonane over ein rike historie av tolkingsslutningar. Den tidlegare kanskje manglar dei viktige funksjonane for spesifikke hovudforhåndsvising utan hjelp av den eksplisitte strukturinformasjonen, og dei siste kan gå frå feilpropagasjonen som falske tidlegare strukturbegrensningar vert brukte for å laga funksjonar når det gjer framtidige forhåndsvising. Vi undersøker at det kan eksplisisere å ta høg rekkefølgje i konto mens det gjenstår hovudfordel av globale infeksjon og læring for grafikkbasert tolking. Foreslått tolkaren formar først ein opphavsrett tolkettre ved hovudmodifikasjonsformasjonar basert på den første rekkefølgjande faktoriseringa. Høg rekkefølgje- funksjonar (som grandparent, sibling og onkel) kan derfor definerast over den opphavsretten, og brukast for å refinera tolkettråen på ein iterativ måte. Eksperimentale resultat viste at modellen vår (kalla INDP) er arkivert konkurentivt utvikling til eksisterande benchmarkanalysar på både engelske og kinesiske datasett.', 'sv': 'Nyligen har vissa studier på neurala beroendetolkare visat fördelar jämfört med traditionella på en mängd olika språk. Men för grafbaserade neurala beroendeanalyssystem räknar de antingen med att det långsiktiga minnet och uppmärksamhetsmekanismen underförstått fångar högordsfunktionerna eller ger upp de globala uttömmande slutsatsalgoritmerna för att utnyttja funktionerna över en rik historia av tolkningsbeslut. Den förstnämnda kan missa viktiga funktioner för specifika huvudordsförutsägelser utan hjälp av den uttryckliga strukturella informationen, och den senare kan drabbas av felspridningen eftersom falska tidiga strukturella begränsningar används för att skapa funktioner när framtida förutsägelser görs. Vi undersöker möjligheten att uttryckligen ta hänsyn till avancerade funktioner samtidigt som vi förblir den största fördelen med global inferens och lärande för grafbaserad tolkning. Den föreslagna parsern bildar först ett inledande parseträd av head-modifier förutsägelser baserat på första ordningens faktorisering. Högordsfunktioner (som farföräldrar, syskon och farbror) kan sedan definieras över det ursprungliga trädet och användas för att förfina parseträdet på ett iterativt sätt. Experimentella resultat visade att vår modell (kallad INDP) arkiverade konkurrenskraftig prestanda till befintliga jämförelsetolkare på både engelska och kinesiska datauppsättningar.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், புதிய சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பார்சர்கள் பற்றி சில படிப்பியல்கள் பல மொழிகளில் பழமையான பாரம்பர்களை விட அதிக மேன்ம However, for graph-based neural dependency parsing systems, they either count on the long-term memory and attention mechanism to implicitly capture the high-order features or give up the global exhaustive inference algorithms in order to harness the features over a rich history of parsing decisions.  முந்தைய குறிப்பிட்ட தலைப்புச்சொல் முன்னிருப்பு முக்கிய குறிப்பிட்ட முக்கிய பண்புகளை காணவில்லை வெளிப்படையான அமைப்பு தகவலுக்கு உதவி இல்லாமல், மற்ற நாம் வெளிப்படையாக உயர் வரிசையில் உள்ள பண்புகளை கணக்கில் எடுத்துக் கொள்ள முடியும் போது பொதுவான பொருளின் முதன்மையான அனுமதி பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பகுதி முதலில் மாற்று முதல் வரிசைப்படுத்தலை அடிப்படையில் முதல் வரிசையை மாற்றி முன்னோட்டமைப்ப உயர் வரிசையின் குணங்கள் (பாத்தாய், சகோதரர், மற்றும் மாமா) பின்னர் முதல் மரத்தின் மீது வரையறுக்கப்பட முடியும், பார்ஸ் மரத்தை உருவாக்கும் வட முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பித்தது என்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரி (INDP என்று அழைக்கப்பட்ட) தற்போதைய பென்மார்க் பார்சர்ஸ் இருக்கும் ஆங்கி', 'si': 'ගොඩක් අවස්ථානයි, න්\u200dයූරල් විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස කරුණාකරුවන් ගැන සමහර අධ්\u200dයානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන නමුත්, ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරාල් නිර්මාණය විශ්ලේෂණ පද්ධතිය සඳහා, ඔවුන් ලොකු වෙලාවක් මතකය සහ අවධානය පද්ධතිය සඳහා බලාපොරොත්තු පද්ධතිය සඳහා අ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විශේෂ හෙඩවර්ඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වෙන්න පුළුවන් ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන්ම විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත විශ මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පටන්ගන්න විශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා මුලින්ම පටන්ගන ප්\u200dරධාන වර්ගයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මදුල (INDP කියලා) සංග්\u200dරහණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ච', 'so': "Muddo dhowaad ah qaar waxbarasho ku saabsan baarlamaanka ku xiran xuquuqda neurada ayaa ka muuqday faa'iido badan oo ku saabsan luqado kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxay ku xiran yihiin nidaamka baaritaanka neurada ee ku saabsan xarunta, waxay ku xiran yihiin xuquuqda xasuusta waqtiga dheer iyo dhaqaalaha, si ay u qabsadaan xarumaha baaritaanka sare ama ay ka daataan Algorityada caalamiga ah oo daalka ah si ay u hagaajiyaan xuquuqda ku saabsan taariikhda baaritaanka. Qofkii hore wuxuu ka baahan karaa waxyaabaha muhiimka ah ee la sii sheegayo hadalka madaxda ee gaarka ah, iyadoon caawimaad la’aanta macluumaadka cad ee dhismaha dhismaha, qofka dambena wuxuu ka xanuunsan karaa ogeysiiska qaladka, sababtoo ah qasabka hore ee dhismaha waxaa loo isticmaalaa inay sameeyaan qalab gaar ah marka loo sii sheego mustaqbalka. Waxaynu baaraynaa suurtagalka si cad u qaadashada takhasusyada sare, iyadoo hadhay faa'iidada ugu muhiimsan dhamaanka caalamiga ah iyo barashada baaritaanka sawiraadka. Parser-ka la soo jeeday marka ugu horeysa wuxuu sameeyaa geed bilowga ah oo madax-beddelaya oo ku saleysan fasaxa hore. Xiriikhda sare (tusaale ahaan waalidka, walaalaha iyo onka) waxaa lagu aqoonsan karaa geedka hore, waxaana lagu isticmaali karaa in lagu hagaajiyo geedka baarlamaanka. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqday in modellkayaga (magaca INDP) uu soo bandhigay sameynta tartanka oo ku saabsan baaritaanka bangiga ee ku jira Ingiriis iyo Shiino labadoodaba.", 'ur': 'بہت اچھا، کچھ مطالعہ نورول اعتماد پارس کے بارے میں بہت سی مختلف زبانوں پر قانون لوگوں پر فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں. However, for graph based neural dependency parsing systems, they either count on the long-term memory and attention mechanism to implicitly capture the high-order features or give up the global exhaustive inference algorithms to use the features of a rich history of parsing decisions. پہلے لوگوں کو صریح ساختاری معلومات کی مدد کے بغیر ایک سرویڈ کی پیش بینی کے لئے اہم ویژگی ویژگی کے معلومات کو چھوڑ سکتا ہے، اور پچھلے لوگوں کو گمراہی کی پھیلائی سے پڑے گی جیسے false early structural constraints are used to create features when making future predictions. ہم صریح طور پر اچھی آرام کے فرضیوں کو اپنا حساب لینے کے قابل تحقیق کر رہے ہیں جب کہ گراف بنیاد پارسینگ کے لئے سراسر فائدہ رہتے ہیں۔ پیشنهاد پارچر پہلی بار ایک پہلی پارچس درخت کو سر-modifier پیش بینی کے ذریعہ بنا رہا ہے جو پہلی اوردر فاکتوریزی پر بنیاد ہے. اس کے بعد آغاز درخت پر تعریف کی جاتی ہے اور پارس درخت کو ایک دوسری طرح پابند کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. آزمائش کے نتائج دکھائے گئے کہ ہمارے موڈل (INDP) نے موجود بنچم مارک پارس کو انگلیسی اور چینی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعے آرکیف کیا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Gần đây, một số nghiên cứu về các phân tích phụ thuộc thần kinh đã cho thấy lợi thế hơn những nghiên cứu truyền thống về nhiều ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, với hệ thống phân tích dây thần kinh dựa trên đồ thị, chúng có thể dựa vào bộ nhớ và cơ chế chú ý lâu dài để có thể ngầm nắm giữ các tính chất cao hay từ bỏ các thuật to án luận tối đa hoàn toàn để nắm giữ các tính năng trong một lịch sử giàu có của các quyết định. Đầu tiên có thể bỏ qua những tính chất quan trọng cho những dự đoán cụ thể từ đầu mà không có sự giúp đỡ của các thông tin cấu trúc rõ ràng, và cuối có thể phải chịu nạn khi đào tạo lỗi từ khi sử dụng sai lệch cấu trúc để tạo ra tính năng trong dự đoán tương lai. Chúng tôi khám phá khả năng của việc hiển thị các tính năng cao trong khi vẫn còn có lợi thế chính của ngụ ý toàn cầu và học tập cho phân tích đồ thị. Người phân giải đã đề nghị tạo ra một cây phân tách đầu tiên dựa trên tính toán hàng đầu. Các tính năng cao cấp (như là ông nội, anh chị em, chú) sau đó có thể được xác định trên cây sơ ban, và được dùng để lọc cây cha vị theo một cách lặp lại. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi (gọi là NP) đã lưu lại khả năng cạnh tranh với các phân tích tiêu chuẩn trên cả bộ dữ liệu Anh và Trung Quốc.', 'uz': "Yaqinda, bir necha o'rganishlar neyrolik parlamenter davomida ta'lim o'qituvchilarini ko'plab turli tillardan foydalanadi. Lekin grafik asosida neyrolik tashkilotlari tizimi uchun ularning eng uzoq xotira va muhimlik mechanisini aniqlaydi yoki eng yuqori jarayonlarni olib tashlash uchun dunyo yo yo'q qo'llanmalarni o'zgartirish o'zgarishning taxminan tarixiga o'zgartirish uchun dunyo yo yo'qovchilik algoritlarini tugatadi. Keyingi birinchi tugmalar birikmasini yaratish mumkin. We explore the feasibility of explicitly taking high-order features into account while remaining the main advantage of global inference and learning for graph-based parsing.  Aniqlanadigan parse darajasi boshqa birinchi tarqatish asosida boshqa oʻzgarishni boshqarish natijasida bajarish darajasini yaratadi. Yuqori taqdimot xususiyatlari (balki ota-onasi, siblingi va onkel) keyin birinchi daraxtda aniqlash mumkin, va cheksiz daraxtni tahrirlash uchun ishlatiladi. Tekshirish natijalari esa, modelmiz INDP (INDP) degan benchmark parserlarini ingliz va Xitoycha maʼlumotlar sohasida ishlab chiqaradi.", 'bg': 'Съвсем наскоро някои проучвания на анализаторите на нервната зависимост показват предимство пред традиционните при голямо разнообразие от езици. Въпреки това, за системите за анализ на нервната зависимост, базирани на графики, те или разчитат на дългосрочния механизъм на паметта и вниманието, за да уловят имплицитно характеристиките от висок ред или да се откажат от глобалните изчерпателни алгоритми за изводи, за да впрегнат характеристиките в богата история на решенията за анализ. Първият може да пропусне важните характеристики за конкретни прогнози на заглавната дума без помощта на изричната структурна информация, а вторият може да страда от разпространението на грешките, тъй като фалшиви ранни структурни ограничения се използват за създаване на функции при правене на бъдещи прогнози. Проучваме възможността изрично да се вземат предвид функциите от висок ред, като същевременно остават основното предимство на глобалното заключение и учене за анализ въз основа на графики. Предложеният анализатор първо формира първоначално дърво за анализ чрез прогнози на модификатори на глава въз основа на факторизацията от първи ред. Функции от висок ред (като баба, брат и брат) след това могат да бъдат дефинирани върху първоначалното дърво и да се използват за рафиниране на дървото за анализ по итеративен начин. Експерименталните резултати показаха, че нашият модел (наречен индекс) архивира конкурентното представяне на съществуващите референтни анализатори на английски и китайски набори от данни.', 'nl': 'Zeer recent hebben sommige studies over neurale afhankelijkheidsparsers voordeel aangetoond ten opzichte van de traditionele op een grote verscheidenheid van talen. Voor op grafieken gebaseerde neurale afhankelijkheidsparsing systemen rekenen ze echter ofwel op het langetermijngeheugen en het aandachtsmechanisme om impliciet de kenmerken van hoge orde vast te leggen, ofwel geven ze de globale uitputtende inferentiealgoritmen op om de kenmerken te benutten in een rijke geschiedenis van parsing beslissingen. De eerste kan de belangrijke kenmerken voor specifieke hoofdwoordvoorspellingen missen zonder de hulp van de expliciete structurele informatie, en de laatste kan lijden aan de foutpropagatie omdat valse vroege structurele beperkingen worden gebruikt om kenmerken te creëren bij het maken van toekomstige voorspellingen. We onderzoeken de haalbaarheid om expliciet rekening te houden met functies van hoge orde, terwijl het belangrijkste voordeel van globale inferentie en leren voor grafiekgebaseerde parsing blijft. De voorgestelde parser vormt eerst een eerste parse boom door head-modifier voorspellingen gebaseerd op de eerste orde factorization. Hoogwaardige functies (zoals grootouder, zus en oom) kunnen vervolgens worden gedefinieerd over de initiële boom, en worden gebruikt om de parse-boom op een iteratieve manier te verfijnen. Experimentele resultaten toonden aan dat ons model (genaamd INDP) concurrerende prestaties archiveerde naar bestaande benchmark parsers op zowel Engelse als Chinese datasets.', 'da': 'For nylig har nogle undersøgelser af neurale afhængighedsfortolkere vist fordele i forhold til de traditionelle på en bred vifte af sprog. Men for grafbaserede neurale afhængighedsanalysesystemer regner de enten med den langsigtede hukommelse og opmærksomhedsmekanisme til implicit at fange de høje ordensfunktioner eller opgive de globale udtømmende inference algoritmer for at udnytte funktionerne over en rig historie af parsing beslutninger. Førstnævnte kan gå glip af de vigtige funktioner for specifikke hovedordsforudsigelser uden hjælp af de eksplicitte strukturelle oplysninger, og sidstnævnte kan lide af fejlspredning, da falske tidlige strukturelle begrænsninger bruges til at skabe funktioner, når der laves fremtidige forudsigelser. Vi undersøger muligheden for eksplicit at tage højde for high-order funktioner, mens vi forbliver den største fordel ved global inference og læring til grafbaseret parsing. Den foreslåede parser danner først et indledende parsetræ ved hjælp af head-modifier forudsigelser baseret på førsteordens faktorisering. Funktioner af høj orden (såsom bedsteforælder, søskende og onkel) kan derefter defineres over det oprindelige træ, og bruges til at forfine parsetræet på en iterativ måde. Eksperimentelle resultater viste, at vores model (kaldet INDP) arkiverede konkurrencedygtige resultater til eksisterende benchmark parsere på både engelske og kinesiske datasæt.', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, beberapa penelitian tentang parser ketergantuan saraf telah menunjukkan keuntungan atas yang tradisional pada berbagai bahasa. Namun, untuk sistem penghuraian dependensi saraf berdasarkan grafik, mereka sama ada mengandalkan memori jangka panjang dan mekanisme perhatian untuk secara implicit menangkap fitur tertib tinggi atau menyerah dari algoritma kesimpulan global yang melelahkan untuk menggunakan fitur-fitur dalam sejarah yang kaya penghuraian keputusan. Yang pertama mungkin melewatkan ciri-ciri penting untuk prediksi kata kepala spesifik tanpa bantuan dari informasi struktur eksplisit, dan yang kedua mungkin menderita dari propagasi kesalahan karena batasan struktur awal palsu digunakan untuk menciptakan ciri-ciri ketika membuat prediksi masa depan. Kami mengeksplorasi feasibilitas untuk secara eksplicit mempertimbangkan fitur tertib tinggi sementara tetap keuntungan utama dari kesimpulan global dan belajar untuk penganalisan berdasarkan grafik. Pemanalis yang diusulkan pertama membentuk pohon analisis awal dengan prediksi modifier kepala berdasarkan faktorisasi tertib pertama. Karakteristik tertinggi (seperti kakek tua, saudara saudara, dan paman) kemudian dapat didefinisikan di atas pohon awal, dan digunakan untuk memperrafinisikan pohon analisis dengan cara iteratif. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kami (yang disebut INDP) mengaktifkan prestasi kompetitif ke benchmark parser yang ada di set data Inggris dan Cina.', 'ko': '최근 신경 의존성 해석기에 대한 일부 연구에 따르면 전통적인 해석기에 비해 다양한 언어에서 우위를 가진다고 한다.그러나 그림을 바탕으로 하는 신경 의존 해석 시스템에 대해 장기적인 기억과 주의 메커니즘에 의존하여 고급 특징을 은밀하게 포착하거나 전체적인 궁거 추리 알고리즘을 포기하여 해석 결정의 풍부한 역사에서 이러한 특징을 이용하도록 한다.전자는 명확한 구조 정보 없이 특정 단어 예측의 중요한 특징을 놓칠 수 있고, 후자는 미래 예측을 할 때 잘못된 초기 구조 제약을 사용하여 특징을 생성하기 때문에 잘못된 전파의 영향을 받을 수 있다.우리는 고급 특징을 현저하게 고려하는 타당성을 탐구했고 그림의 해석을 바탕으로 하는 전체적인 추리와 학습의 주요 장점을 보존했다.이 해석기는 우선 1단계 인자 분해의 머리 장식자 예측을 바탕으로 초기 해석 트리를 형성한다.그리고 초기 트리에서 고급 특징(예를 들어 조부모, 형제자매, 삼촌)을 정의하고 트리를 교체하는 방식으로 최적화 해석할 수 있다.실험 결과, 우리 모델(INDP라고 함)의 중영문 데이터 집합에서의 성능은 기존의 기준 해석기와 비슷하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'hr': 'Nedavno, neki ispitivanja o analitičarima neuralne zavisnosti pokazali su prednost nad tradicionalnim na širokoj razini jezika. Međutim, za sustave analize neuralne zavisnosti na grafiku računaju na dugoročni mehanizam sjećanja i pažnje kako bi se implicitno uhvatili visokoredne karakteristike ili odustali od globalnih iscrpljivih algoritma infekcije kako bi iskoristili karakteristike bogate povijesti analize odluka. Bivši bi mogli propustiti važne karakteristike za određene predviđanja glavne riječi bez pomoći eksplicitnih strukturnih informacija, a posljednji bi mogli patiti od propagacije greške, jer se koriste lažne rane strukturne ograničenje za stvaranje karakteristika kada buduće predviđanje buduće. Istražujemo mogućnost jasno uzimanja u obzir visokoredne karakteristike dok je ostala glavna prednost globalne infekcije i učenja za analizu na grafiku. Predloženi analitičar prvo oblikuje početno analiziranje drvo po predviđanjima glavnog modifikatora na temelju faktorizacije prvog reda. Visokoredne karakteristike (poput djeda, braća i ujaka) onda se mogu definirati preko početnog drveta i koristiti se za refinansiranje prazničnog drveta iterativno. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazali su da je naš model (nazvan INDP) arhiviran konkurentni učinkovit postojećim razmatračima kriterija na engleskim i kineskim podacima.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, baadhi ya utafiti kuhusu wabunge wanaotegemea uraia wameonyesha faida zaidi ya utamaduni katika lugha mbalimbali. Hata hivyo, kwa mifumo ya mabunge ya kisasa yenye msingi wa picha, wanategemea kumbukumbu na mfumo wa muda mrefu wa kutangaza utambulisho wa ubora wa juu au kuacha algorithi za uchunguzi ulimwenguni ili kuhamasisha utambulisho wa historia tajiri ya maamuzi ya mabunge. Kabla ya zamani inaweza kukosa vipengele muhimu vya utabiri wa habari maalum bila msaada wa taarifa za ujenzi, na baadae inaweza kutokea kutangaza kosa kwa sababu vikwazo vya mwanzo vya msingi vinatumika kutengeneza vipengele wakati wa kutabiri mustakabali. Tunafahamu uwezekano wa kuchukua hoja za juu wakati tunabaki faida kubwa ya ugonjwa wa dunia na kujifunza kwa ajili ya wimbo wa picha. Parser alipendekezwa kwanza inatengeneza mti wa mwanzo wa parge kwa utabiri wa mabadiliko ya kichwa kwa msingi wa mfumo wa kwanza. High-order features (such as grandparent, sibling, and uncle) then can be defined over the initial tree, and used to refine the parse tree in an iterative fashion.  Matokeo ya majaribio yalionyesha kuwa muundo wetu (unaoitwa INDP) uliweka ushindani wa kufanya kazi za ushindani kwa mabango yaliyopo kwenye seti za data za Kiingereza na Kichina.', 'de': 'In jüngster Zeit haben einige Studien über neuronale Abhängigkeitsparser Vorteile gegenüber den traditionellen auf einer Vielzahl von Sprachen gezeigt. Für graphenbasierte neuronale Abhängigkeits-Parsing-Systeme verlassen sie sich jedoch entweder auf das Langzeitgedächtnis und den Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um die Merkmale hoher Ordnung implizit zu erfassen, oder geben die globalen erschöpfenden Inferenz-Algorithmen auf, um die Merkmale über eine reiche Geschichte von Parsing-Entscheidungen zu nutzen. Erstere könnten ohne die Hilfe der expliziten Strukturinformationen wichtige Merkmale für spezifische Stichwortvorhersagen übersehen, und letztere können unter der Fehlerausbreitung leiden, da falsche frühe strukturelle Einschränkungen verwendet werden, um Merkmale bei zukünftigen Vorhersagen zu erstellen. Wir untersuchen die Machbarkeit, Funktionen hoher Ordnung explizit zu berücksichtigen und gleichzeitig der Hauptvorteil globaler Inferenz und Lernen für graphbasiertes Parsen zu bleiben. Der vorgeschlagene Parser bildet zunächst einen ersten Parse-Baum durch Head-Modifier Vorhersagen basierend auf der Faktorisierung erster Ordnung. Hochrangige Funktionen (wie Großeltern, Geschwister und Onkel) können dann über dem ursprünglichen Baum definiert und verwendet werden, um den Parse-Baum iterativ zu verfeinern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigten, dass unser Modell (genannt INDP) die Wettbewerbsleistung in bestehenden Benchmark-Parsern sowohl auf englischen als auch auf chinesischen Datensätzen archivierte.', 'fa': 'خیلی اخیرا، برخی مطالعه\u200cها درباره\u200cی بازرسان بستگی عصبی بر روی سنتی\u200cها از زبان\u200cهای مختلف فایده\u200cای نشان داده\u200cاند. با این حال، برای سیستم\u200cهای تقسیم بستگی عصبی بر اساس گراف، آنها یا روی مکانیسم حافظه طولانی و توجه را حساب می\u200cکنند تا به طور اخلاقی ویژه\u200cهای سفارشی بالا را بگیرند یا الگوریتم\u200cهای عفونت\u200cکننده جهانی را تسلیم کنند تا ویژه\u200cهای ثروتمند در تاریخ\u200cهای تقسیم تصمیم\u200cگیری را پیشینیان ممکن است ویژگی های مهم برای پیش بینی کلمه مخصوص بدون کمک اطلاعات ساختاری مشخص را از دست داد، و latter ممکن است از پراژدهای خطایی دردناک شود، همانطور که محدودیت ساختاری ساختاری غلط در زمان پیش بینی آینده برای ایجاد ویژگی ها استفاده ما قابلیت تحقیق کردن ویژه\u200cهای بالا به توجه می\u200cکنیم در حالی که استفاده اصلی از آلودگی جهانی و یادگیری برای تحلیل گراف بر اساس گراف باقی مانده است. پیشنهاد\u200cدهنده اول یک درخت آغاز توسط پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای تغییردهنده سر بر اساس تعداد اولین دستور می\u200cسازد. ویژگی\u200cهای پایه\u200cترین (مثل والدین بزرگ، برادر و عمو) سپس می\u200cتوانند بر روی درخت اول تعریف شوند، و برای پایه\u200cسازی درخت\u200cهای پاره\u200cسازی به صورت تکراری استفاده می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان داده است که مدل ما (به نام INDP) اجرای مسابقه\u200cای برای بازرسان\u200cهای سنگ\u200cمارک موجود در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای انگلیسی و چینی است.', 'tr': '횦akynda n채sir baglanylyk analyzlerini흫 k채bir 철wrenmeleri d체rli dillerde 철r채n k철p g철rn체힊ler g철rkezil첵채r. 횦agna g철r채, grafik tabanly n채ural baglan힊yk analysi sistemalary 체챌in, 첵철ne uzak durmu힊y yada 체ns me첵dan챌asyna 체첵tgetmek 체챌in 첵okary tertiblemek 체챌in 첵okary tertiblemek 체챌in 첵agda첵ynda 체첵tgetmek 체챌in 첵okary tertibleme algoritmalaryny 체첵tgetmek 체챌in 첵okary 첵ok taryhy 체st체nde 체첵tgetmek 체챌in 첵 횜흫ki kell채흫 철ng철r체mleri belli kell채흫 철ng철r체mleri 체챌in wajyp 철zellikleri 첵ok bolmagy ahmal. So흫ki d체zg체n strukturlar maglumatyny흫 k철mek bolmadyk we so흫ky 체챌in 첵al흫y힊 strukturlar m체mkin챌iliklerini gelejekde 체첵tgetmek 체챌in ullan첵ar. Biz d체n첵채d채ki 챌yky힊 we grafik tabanly 챌yky힊 체챌in esasy 챌yky힊 체챌in 첵okaryk d체z체mlerni흫 체첵tgebilirini g철zden 챌ykar첵arys. 횜흫 teklip eden 챌철z체mler birinji gezek 체챌in ba힊langy챌 챌철z체mleme aga챌yny kell 챌ap챌ilik챌i 철n체mlerine g철r채 tertibler. 횦aky s체첵tgelikler Durman챌ylyk netijesi bizi흫 nusgymyz (INDP) hem I흫lis챌e, hem 횉in챌e veri setirlerinde ar힊iwlet edilen 챌yky힊챌ylar 체챌in ar힊iwlet etm채ge g철rkezil첵채r.', 'sq': 'Shumë kohët e fundit, disa studime mbi analizuesit e varësisë nervore kanë treguar përparësi mbi ato tradicionale në një varietet të gjerë gjuhësh. Megjithatë, për sistemet e analizimit të varësisë nervore të bazuar në grafik, ata ose mbështeten në kujtesën afat-gjatë dhe mekanizmin e vëmendjes për të kapur implicitisht karakteristikat e rendit të lartë apo heqin dorë nga algoritmet e përfundimeve të mërzitshme globale me qëllim që të shfrytëzojnë karakteristikat mbi një histori të pasur të analizimit të vendimeve. I pari mund të humbasë karakteristikat e rëndësishme për parashikimet e posaçme të fjalëve kryesore pa ndihmën e informacionit strukturor të shprehur dhe i fundit mund të vuajë nga përhapja e gabimeve pasi kufizime të rreme strukturore të hershme përdoren për të krijuar karakteristikat kur bëjnë parashikime të ardhshme. Ne eksplorojmë realizueshmërinë e marrjes në konsideratë eksplicite të karakteristikave të rendit të lartë ndërsa mbetet avantazhi kryesor i përfundimeve globale dhe mësimit për analizimin bazuar në grafik. Analizatori i propozuar formon së pari një pemë fillestare analizimi nga parashikimet e modifikuesit të kokës bazuar në faktorizimin e rendit të parë. Karakteristikat e rendit të lartë (të tilla si gjyshi, motra dhe xhaxhai) mund të përcaktohen mbi pemën fillestare dhe të përdoren për të rafinuar pemën e analizimit në mënyrë të përsëritur. Rezultatet eksperimentale treguan se modeli ynë (i quajtur INDP) arkivoi shfaqjen konkurruese ndaj analizuesve ekzistues të referencës në të dhënat angleze dhe kineze.', 'af': "Baie onlangs het sommige studie op neurale afhanklikheidverwerkers voordeel gewys oor die tradisionele op 'n wyde verskillende tale. Maar vir graf-gebaseerde neuralafhanklikheid verwerking stelsels, tel hulle of op die lang-term geheue en aandag mekanisme om die hoë-volgorde funksies te vang of die globale uitgevoerde infeksie algoritme te gee om die funksies oor 'n ryk geskiedenis van verwerking besluit te verwerk. Die vorige mag die belangrike eienskappe vir spesifieke hoofwoord voorskoue mis sonder die hulp van die eksplisiese strukturele inligting, en die laaste mag lyk van die fout propagasie as valse vroeg strukturele beheinings gebruik word om funksies te skep wanneer toekomstige voorskoue gemaak word. Ons ondersoek die feilikheid van uitduidelik te neem hoë-volgorde funksies in rekening terwyl die hoofvoordeel van globale inferensie en leer vir graafgebaseerde verwerking oorbly word. Die voorgestelde tolker vorm eerste 'n aanvanklike verwerking boom deur kop- verander voorskoue gebaseer op die eerste- volgorde faktoriseering. Hoog-volgorde funksies (soos oupa, broer en oom) dan kan wees gedefinieerd oor die aanvanklike boom, en gebruik word om die verwerking boom in 'n iteratiewe manier te herstel. Eksperimentale resultate het vertoon dat ons model (INDP genoem) gemaak gemeenskap effektiviteit aan bestaande benchmark verwerkers op engelse en Sjinese datastelle.", 'am': 'በቅርብ ዘመን አንዳንዶቹ በናውራዊ ታዋቂነት ፓርላር ላይ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በተለየ ባሕላዊ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ትምህርት አብልጠዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ለgraph-based የኔural ደጋፊነት የፓርቲ ሲስተም፣ የረጅም ዘመን ማስታወስ እና የጥያቄ ሥርዓት ማሰናከል፣ ከፍተኛ ሥርዓት ማቀናቀፍ ፍላጎቶችን ለመያዝ ወይም የዓለምነዊ ደካማ ድካም አልgorithምን ለመጠቀም፣ የፓርቲል ትርጉም ታሪክ ላይ ባለጠጋ ታሪክ ማድረግ ማድረግ ይቆጥራሉ፡፡ የቀድሞው የአሁኑን የአሁኑን ትክክለኛ ቃላት ለመፍጠር ግንኙነት ሳይጠይቅ የግልጹ የሐሰት አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ በዓለምአቀፍ ጥቅረት እና በgraph-based ማኅበረሰብ ላይ መማር የተደረገውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተገኘው የፓርላማ መጀመሪያ የፓርስ ዛፍ በመጀመሪያ የፊደል ክፍተት የተደረገ የራስ-አዲስ የፊደል ውይይት የራስ-አዲስ ውይይት ነው፡፡ የላይኛይቱ ደረጃዎች (such as ታላቂቱ፣ ወንድሞች እናት አጎት) ከዚያም በኋላ በመጀመሪያው ዛፍ ላይ ይታወቃል፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች በንግግሊዝና በቻይና ዳታተሮች ላይ ያሉትን የቢንኩርክ ፋርስር የድጋፍ ፍላጎችን (INDP) እንዳሳየው ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Son zamanlarda, nöral bağımlılıq ayırıcıları barəsində bəzi təhsil təhsil edilən təhsil dillərin çoxluğunda mənfəəti göstərmişdir. Lakin, graf-tabanlı nöral bağımlılıq ayırma sistemlərinə görə, ya uzun-müddət yaddaş və gözləmə mehanizminə sayılırlar ki, yüksək sıralar fərqlərini yaxalamaq üçün, ya da qlobal təhlükəsizlik algorimlərini tərk edərlər ki, bəzi təhlükəsizlik tarihində fərqli təhlükəsizlər istifadə edərlər. Əvvəlkilər müəyyən edilmiş başlıq tədbirlərinin məlumatlarını açıq strukturlu məlumatların köməyi olmadan qeyb edə bilər və sonuncusu xəta propagasyonundan üz verə bilər ki, gələcək tədbirlərin tədbirlərini yaratmaq üçün yanlış ilk strukturlu müddətlər istifadə edilir. Biz dünya həyatının və graf-tabanlı ayırmaq üçün öyrənmək üçün əsl mənfəəti saxlanırkən, yüksək sıralıq özelliklərini müəyyən edilməsini təşkil edirik. Əvvəlcə təklif edilən ayırıcı ilk dəfə birinci ayırış ağacı ilk dəfə fabrikasiyasına dayanan başlıq dəyişdiricisi təhlükəsizləri ilə yaradır. Yüksek səviyyətlər (atası, qardaş və amca kimi) sonra başlangıç ağacın üstündə tanımlanar və parçalıq ağacını iterativ şəkildə təmizləmək üçün istifadə edilər. Experimental sonuçları göstərdilər ki, modellərimiz (INDP deyilən) İngilizce və Çin veri quruları ilə mövcuddur benchmark analizacılarına arşiviyyat edir.', 'hy': 'Շատ վերջերս, որոշ ուսումնասիրություններ նյարդային կախվածության վերաբերյալ ցույց են տալիս ավանդական լեզուների հատկությունը տարբեր լեզուների վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, գծագրի հիմնված նյարդային կախվածության վերլուծության համակարգերի համար նրանք կամ հույս են դնում երկարաժամկետ հիշողության և ուշադրության մեխանիզմի վրա, որպեսզի միանգամայն վերցնեն բարձր կարգչային հատկությունները, կամ հրաժարվեն գլոբալ ծայրահեղ հետևանքների ալգորիթմների Առաջինը կարող է բաց թողնել հատուկ գլխաբառերի կանխատեսումների կարևոր հատկությունները առանց առանձնահատուկ կառուցվածքային տեղեկատվության օգնության, և վերջինը կարող է տառապվել սխալների տարածման պատճառով, քանի որ սխալ վաղ կառուցվածքային սահմանափակումները We explore the feasibility of explicitly taking high-order features into account while remaining the main advantage of global inference and learning for graph-based parsing.  Առաջին հերթին առաջարկում է վերլուծության ծառը գլխավոր փոփոխության կանխատեսումների միջոցով, հիմնված առաջին հերթին գործոնացման վրա: Հետո բարձր հատկություններ (ինչպիսիք են տատիկս, քույրը և հորեղբայրը) կարող են սահմանվել սկզբնական ծառի վրա և օգտագործվել վերլուծման ծառը կրկնօրինակ կերպով: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ մեր մոդելը (INPD կոչվող) արխիվացնում է գոյություն ունեցող համեմատային գործողությունները անգլերենի և չինական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա:', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি নিউরাল নির্ভরশীল পার্সারের উপর কিছু গবেষণা প্রকাশ করেছে ঐতিহ্যবাহী ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায়। তবে গ্রাফের ভিত্তিক নিউরেল নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং সিস্টেমের জন্য তারা দীর্ঘমেয়াদী মেমরি এবং মনোযোগ মাধ্যমের উপর নির্ভর করে উচ্চ কার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশ্বের ক্লান্তিকর সিদ্ধান প্রাক্তন কাঠামো তথ্যের সাহায্য ছাড়াই প্রকাশিত শিরোনামের ভবিষ্যৎবাণীর জন্য প্রধান বৈশিষ্ট্যের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্য হারিয়ে যেতে পারে, আর ভব আমরা স্পষ্ট অর্ডারের বৈশ্বিক অসুস্থ এবং গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক পার্জিং এর প্রধান সুবিধা বাকি থাকার সময় স্পষ্ট ভাবে বিশ্বের বিশ্বের সুব প্রস্তাবিত প্রস্তাবিত প্যারাজ প্রথমে প্রথম অর্ডারেশনের ভিত্তিতে মাথা-পরিবর্তনের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী দ্বারা প্রথম উচ্চমর্যাদা বৈশিষ্ট্য (যেমন দাদা, ভাই, এবং চাচা) তারপর প্রাথমিক গাছের উপর নির্ধারণ করা যাবে এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মাধ্যমে পার্স গাছের সুস্ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল (ইনডিপি) বিদ্যমান বেনম্যার্ক পার্সার উভয় ইংরেজি এবং চীনা ডাটাসেটে প্রতিযোগিতা', 'bs': 'Nedavno, neke studije o analitičarima neuralne zavisnosti pokazale su prednost nad tradicionalnim na širokoj raznolikosti jezika. Međutim, za sisteme analize neuralne zavisnosti bazirane na grafiku, računaju na dugoročni mehanizam sjećanja i pažnje kako bi implicitno uhvatili visokoredne karakteristike ili odustali od globalnih iscrpljivih algoritma infekcije kako bi iskoristili karakteristike oko bogate povijesti analize odluka. Bivši bi mogli propustiti važne karakteristike za određene predviđanja glavne riječi bez pomoći eksplicitnih strukturnih informacija, a poslednji bi mogli patiti od propagacije greške, jer se koriste lažne ranije strukturne ograničenja za stvaranje karakteristika kada buduće predviđanje buduće. Istražujemo mogućnost jasno uzimanja u obzir visokoredne karakteristike dok ostajemo glavnu prednost globalne infekcije i učenja za analizu na grafiku. Predloženi analitičar prvo formira početno analiziranje drvo po predviđanjima glavnog modifikatora na osnovu faktorizacije prvog reda. Visokoredne karakteristike (poput baka, braća i ujaka) onda se mogu definirati preko početnog drveta, i koristiti se za refinansiranje drveta analiza na iterativni način. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazali su da je naš model (nazvan INDP) arhiviran konkurentni učinkovit postojećim konzervativnim analitičarima na engleskim i kineskim podacima.', 'ca': "Very recently, some studies on neural dependency parsers have shown advantage over the traditional ones on a wide variety of languages.  No obstant això, per als sistemes d'analització de la dependencia neuronal basats en el gràfic, o bé compten en el mecanisme de memòria i atenció a llarg termini per capturar implícitament les característiques d'alta ordre o renuncien als algoritmes de inferència exhaustius a nivell mundial per aprofitar les característiques d'una història rica de decisions d'analització. Els primers podrien perdre les característiques importants de prediccions específices de paraules de cap sense l'ajuda de la informació estructural explícita, i aquests altres podrien patir la propagació d'errors, com falses restriccions estructurals primers s'utilitzen per crear característiques quan es fan prediccions futures. Explorem la viabilitat de tenir en compte explícitament les característiques d'alta ordre mentre siguem l'avantatge principal de la inferència global i l'aprenentatge per l'analització basada en gràfics. L'analitzador proposat forma primer un arbre d'analització inicial segons prediccions de modificador del cap basades en la fabricació de primer ordre. Les característiques d'alta ordre (com el avis, la germana i l'oncle) es poden definir sobre l'arbre inicial i utilitzar per refinar l'arbre d'analització de manera iterativa. Els resultats experimentals van demostrar que el nostre model (anomenat INDP) arquivava el rendiment competitiu als analitzadors de referència existents en conjunts de dades anglès i xinès.", 'cs': 'V nedávné době některé studie neuronových závislostních parserů ukázaly výhodu oproti tradičním na široké škále jazyků. Nicméně, u systémů analýzy neuronové závislosti založených na grafech, buď počítají s dlouhodobou pamětí a mechanismem pozornosti, aby implicitně zachytil funkce vysokého řádu, nebo se vzdávají globálních vyčerpávajících algoritmů inference, aby mohli tyto funkce využít v bohaté historii analýzy rozhodnutí. První mohou přehlédnout důležité vlastnosti pro specifické předpovědi slov bez pomoci explicitních strukturálních informací a druhé mohou trpět šířením chyb, protože falešná raná strukturální omezení se používají k vytváření vlastností při provádění budoucích předpovědí. Zkoumáme možnost explicitně zohlednit funkce vysokého řádu a zároveň zůstat hlavní výhodou globální inference a učení pro analýzu grafů. Navržený parser nejprve vytvoří počáteční parse strom pomocí predikcí head-modifikátoru založených na faktorizaci prvního řádu. Funkce vysokého řádu (například prarodič, sourozenec a strýc) pak mohou být definovány nad počátečním stromem a použity k upřesnění parse stromu iterativním způsobem. Experimentální výsledky ukázaly, že náš model (nazývaný INDP) archivoval konkurenční výkon do existujících benchmarkových parserů na anglických i čínských datových sadách.', 'et': 'Väga hiljuti on mõned uuringud närvisõltuvuse parserite kohta näidanud eeliseid traditsiooniliste omadega mitmesugustes keeltes. Graafikutel põhinevate närvisõltuvuse parsimissüsteemide puhul loodetakse nad kas pikaajalisele mälu- ja tähelepanumehhanismile, et kaudselt jäädvustada kõrge järjekorra funktsioone, või loobuvad globaalsetest ammendavatest järelduste algoritmidest, et neid funktsioone kasutada rikkalikus parsimisotsuste ajaloos. Esimene võib ilma selgesõnalise struktuurse teabe abita jätta konkreetsete pealkirjade prognooside olulised omadused vahele ning viimane võib kannatada vea leviku tõttu, kuna tulevaste prognooside tegemisel kasutatakse valevaraseid struktuurilisi piiranguid funktsioonide loomiseks. Uurime otseselt kõrge järjekorra funktsioonide arvessevõtmise teostatavust, jäädes samal ajal globaalse järelduse ja graafikapõhise parsimise peamiseks eeliseks. Kavandatud parser moodustab esmase parsimispuu esimese astme faktorisatsioonil põhinevate peamodifitseerijate prognooside abil. Kõrge järjekorra funktsioone (nagu vanavanem, vend ja onu) saab määratleda esialgse puu kohal ja neid kasutada parsimispuu iteratiivseks rafineerimiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitasid, et meie mudel (INDP) arhiveeris konkurentsivõime olemasolevatele võrdlusparseritele nii inglise kui hiina andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Äskettäin jotkut tutkimukset neuroriippuvuuden parsereista ovat osoittaneet etua perinteisiin verrattuna monilla eri kielillä. Graafiseen neuroriippuvuuteen perustuvissa parsausjärjestelmissä ne joko luottavat pitkän aikavälin muistin ja huomiomekanismin kuvaamaan implisiittisesti korkean järjestyksen ominaisuuksia tai luopuvat maailmanlaajuisista tyhjentävistä päättelyalgoritmeista voidakseen valjastaa ominaisuudet monipuoliseen jäsennyspäätösten historiaan. Ensimmäiset saattavat jättää huomiotta tiettyjen otsasanaennusteiden tärkeät ominaisuudet ilman nimenomaista rakenteellista tietoa, ja jälkimmäiset saattavat kärsiä virheiden leviämisestä, koska vääriä varhaisia rakenteellisia rajoituksia käytetään luomaan ominaisuuksia tulevaisuuden ennusteita tehtäessä. Tutkimme mahdollisuutta ottaa selkeästi huomioon korkean järjestyksen ominaisuudet samalla kun säilytämme globaalin päättelyn ja oppimisen tärkeimpänä etuna graafiseen jäsentämiseen. Ehdotettu jäsentäjä muodostaa ensin ensimmäisen jäsennyspuun päämodifiointiennusteilla, jotka perustuvat ensimmäisen asteen faktorisointiin. Korkean järjestyksen ominaisuudet (kuten isovanhemmat, sisarukset ja setä) voidaan määrittää alkuperäisen puun päälle, ja niitä voidaan käyttää jäsennyspuun tarkentamiseen iteratiivisesti. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittivat, että mallimme (INDP) arkistoi kilpailukyvyn nykyisille benchmark-parsereille sekä englannin että kiinan aineistoille.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé, akeh akeh pisan neng akeh basa banjur karo pakeh, iso nggawe barang nggawe barang manut karo akeh akeh basa luwih apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop Awakdhéwe isih perusahaan kelas perusahaan podho akeh-urin lan ingkang dipunangé perusahaan nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang urip bantuan ingkang dipunangé karo sapa pangutan. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Punika-pernik diangkamu (koyo ibung-uwong, kapa, lan ujar) iso dianggo oleh dumateng punika, lan Ngawe Perintah dumateng kuwi nggawe Tarjamah-sistem iki, iso dianggo oleh dumateng sekolah dumateng. Refirming', 'he': 'לאחרונה מאוד, כמה מחקרים על חוקרי תלויות עצביות הראו יתרון מעל אלה המסורתיים על מגוון רחב של שפות. עם זאת, עבור מערכות בדיקת תלויות עצביות מבוססת בגרף, הן או סומכות על הזיכרון לטווח ארוך ומנגנון תשומת לב כדי לתפוס באופן מיותר את המאפיינים של סדר גבוה או לוותר על אלגוריתמים המתמשכים הגלובליים כדי לנצל את המאפיינים במהלך היסטוריה עשירה של החלטות בדיקת. העתיד הראשון עלול לפספס את המאפיינים החשובים לחזויות מילים ראשיות ספציפיות ללא עזרה של מידע המבנה המיוחד, והשני עלול לסבול מהפיצול של טעויות כאשר מחסומים מבנה מוקדמים שווא משתמשים כדי ליצור תכונות כאשר יוצרים חיזויים עתידיים. אנו חוקרים את האפשרות של לקחת בחשבון באופן ברור תכונות סדר גבוה בזמן שנשאר היתרון העיקרי של ההנחה הגלובלית וללמוד עבור בדיקת מבוססת בגרף. The proposed parser first forms an initial parse tree by head-modifier predictions based on the first-order factorization.  אופיינים גבוהים (כמו סבא, אחים ודוד) אז יכולים להגדיר מעל העץ הראשון, ומשתמשים כדי לטהר את עץ המחקר באופן חוזר. תוצאות ניסיוניות הראו שהמודל שלנו (שנקרא INDP) ארכיב ביצועים תחרותיים למחקרי רמזים קיימים על קבוצות נתונים אנגלית וסינית.', 'ha': "A yanzu, akwai wasu karatun masu karatun a kan parlaman da ke tsayar da neural sun nuna mafiya kyauta a kan watannin da ke cikin wasu harshe dabam-dabam. However, for graph-based neural dependency parsing systems, they either count on the long-term memory and attention mechanism to implicitly capture the high-order features or give up the global exhaustive inference algorithms in order to harness the features over a rich history of parsing decisions.  Mai yiwuwa ya saka bayani ga masu muhimu wa zaman faɗin sarrafa masu buƙata ba da taimako masu bayyani wa tsarin, kuma ƙarshen ya iya cũtar da bayani idan an bayyana ƙarya kwanan da za'a yi amfani da su sami tsari idan an gabatar bayani masu yiwuwa. Munã jarraba abincin ka sami tsari masu sarrafa ko kuma masu baka yana da muhimmin amfani na kasar kasar kasar duniya da karatun wa parse-karatun. Parser ɗin da aka goyyade ya farkon yana danna wata itãci na parse ta farko da bashi-mai gyare-gyare-mai bascan a kan fabori na farko. Tsarawa masu sarki (kamar yadda mahaifan da 'yan'uwan' kuma 'yan'uwa) kan sa'an nan a gane shi a kan itãcen na farko, kuma yana amfani da in gyarar itãcen marmari cikin wani shida. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa misalinmu (kallo INDP) ya adana ƙidãya mai ƙidido zuwa parser masu da ke gaba ga bankimar bangon ayukan Ingiriya da kuma tsaron danasãyi na China.", 'sk': 'V zadnjem času so nekatere študije o razčlenjevalnikih nevronske odvisnosti pokazale prednost pred tradicionalnimi pri različnih jezikih. Vendar pa pri sistemih razčlenitve nevronske odvisnosti, ki temeljijo na grafu, računajo bodisi na dolgoročni pomnilnik in mehanizem pozornosti, da implicitno zajamejo značilnosti visokega reda, bodisi se odpovejo globalnim izčrpnim algoritmom sklepanja, da bi izkoristili značilnosti skozi bogato zgodovino razčlenitve odločitev. Prvi lahko brez pomoči eksplicitnih strukturnih informacij zamudijo pomembne značilnosti za določene napovedi naslovov, drugi pa lahko trpi zaradi širjenja napak, saj se za ustvarjanje značilnosti pri prihodnjih napovedih uporabljajo lažne zgodnje strukturne omejitve. Raziskujemo izvedljivost eksplicitnega upoštevanja funkcij visokega reda, hkrati pa ostaja glavna prednost globalnega sklepanja in učenja za razčlenjevanje na podlagi grafov. Predlagani razčlenjevalnik najprej tvori začetno drevo razčlenjevanja s predvidevanji glavnega modifikatorja, ki temelji na faktorizaciji prvega reda. Funkcije visokega reda (kot so stari starši, brat in stric) se nato lahko določijo nad prvotnim drevesom in se uporabljajo za izboljšanje razčlenjenega drevesa na iterativen način. Eksperimentalni rezultati so pokazali, da je naš model (imenovan INDP) arhiviral konkurenčno uspešnost obstoječim referenčnim računalnikom na angleških in kitajskih naborih podatkov.', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བར་བྱུང་། However, for graph-based neural dependency parsing systems, they either count on the long-term memory and attention mechanism to implicitly capture the high-order features or give up the global exhaustive inference algorithms in order to harness the features over a rich history of parsing decisions. The former might miss out the important features for specific headword predictions without the help of the explicit structural information, and the latter may suffer from the error propagation as false early structural constraints are used to create features when making future predictions. ང་ཚོས་འཛམ་གླིང་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་རྩ་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མིང་ཚོགས་དང་པོ་དེ་མགོ་ཡིག་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པའི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སེལ སྔོན་པ་དང་ཨ་མོ་ལ་ཆུང་དང་ཨ་མོ། དེ་ནས་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་(དཔེར་ན། རྨང་དང་ཨ་མོ།) དེ་ནས་འགོ་བཙུགས་སུང་གི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་ནང་ལ Experimental Results showed that our model (INDP) archived competitive performance to existing benchmark parsers on both English and Chinese data sets.'}
{'en': 'Neural Discontinuous Constituency Parsing', 'ar': 'اعراب الدائرة العصبية المتقطعة', 'pt': 'Análise Neural Descontínua de Grupos Constituintes', 'es': 'Análisis de circunscripciones discontinuas neuronales', 'fr': 'Analyse discontinue des constituants neuronaux', 'ja': 'ニューラル不連続選挙区パーシング', 'zh': '神经不连解析', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ нейронных несплошных избирательных округов', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका असंतत निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सिंग', 'ga': 'Parsáil um Thoghcheantar Neamhleanúnach Néarach', 'el': 'Ανάλυση νευρωνικής διακοπής καταστάσεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neural Discontinuális választókerületi elemzés', 'kk': 'Нейрондық тұрақтық тұрақтылық талдау', 'it': 'Analisi della circoscrizione discontinua neurale', 'lt': 'Nervų sistemos sutrikimai', 'mk': 'Анализирање на нервната прекинлива конститунција', 'ms': 'Menghurai Konstitusi Berhenti Neural', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്ന് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Analiżi tal-Kostitwenza Newrali Mwaqqfa', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл тогтвортой байгууллагын шалгалт', 'no': 'Neuralt avslutta konstitusjonstolking', 'pl': 'Analiza ustawodawczości nerwowej', 'ro': 'Analiza circumscripţiei neuronale discontinue', 'sr': 'Neuralno prekidanje konstitucije', 'so': 'Heshiiska shuruudda', 'sv': 'Neural discontinuerlig valkretstolkning', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරේල් අවස්ථාවක් ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය', 'ur': 'Neural Discontinuous Constituency Parsing', 'ta': 'புதிய தொடர்ந்து பாடல்', 'uz': 'Umumiy davom etish', 'vi': 'Thần kinh ngưng trệ phân tích', 'nl': 'Neural Discontinuous Constituency Parsing', 'da': 'Neural discontinue valgkreds Parsing', 'bg': 'Прекъсване на нервната система', 'hr': 'Neuralno prekidanje konstitucije', 'id': 'Analisasi Konstitusi Berhenti Neural', 'fa': 'تولید محیط عصبی متوقف', 'de': 'Neural Discontinuous Constituency Parsing', 'sw': 'Kuchapisha katiba zisizo na msingi', 'tr': 'Neural Zatlanyş konstituency', 'ko': '신경 불연속 선택 영역 분석', 'sq': 'Analizimi i kushtetutës së ndërprerë neurone', 'hy': 'Նյարդային դադար կառուցվածքի վերլուծությունը', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Neurale Ontvangende Konstituunsinstellingsverwerking', 'bn': 'নিউরেল সংবিধান পার্সিং', 'az': 'Nöral Keçici Konstitüsü Parsing', 'ca': 'Analització de la Constituència Neural Discontinua', 'cs': 'Nervální diskontinuální analýza konstituce', 'bs': 'Neuralno prekidanje konstitucije', 'et': 'Neuraalsete katkestuste analüüsimine', 'fi': 'Hermojen keskeyttäminen', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev živčnih prekinitev sestavnih enot', 'he': 'ניתוח חוקיות עצבית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Neural Discontinuous Constituency Parsing'}
{'en': 'One of the most pressing issues in discontinuous constituency transition-based parsing is that the relevant information for parsing decisions could be located in any part of the stack or the buffer. In this paper, we propose a solution to this problem by replacing the structured perceptron model with a recursive neural model that computes a global representation of the configuration, therefore allowing even the most remote parts of the configuration to influence the parsing decisions. We also provide a detailed analysis of how this representation should be built out of sub-representations of its core elements (words, trees and stack). Additionally, we investigate how different types of swap oracles influence the results. Our model is the first neural discontinuous constituency parser, and it outperforms all the previously published models on three out of four datasets while on the fourth it obtains second place by a tiny difference.', 'ar': 'واحدة من أكثر القضايا إلحاحًا في التحليل غير المستمر القائم على الانتقال للدائرة الانتخابية هو أن المعلومات ذات الصلة لقرارات التحليل يمكن أن تكون موجودة في أي جزء من المكدس أو المخزن المؤقت. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح حلاً لهذه المشكلة عن طريق استبدال نموذج perceptron المنظم بنموذج عصبي تكراري يحسب تمثيلاً شاملاً للتكوين ، وبالتالي يسمح حتى لأجزاء التكوين بالتأثير على قرارات الإعراب. نقدم أيضًا تحليلاً مفصلاً لكيفية بناء هذا التمثيل من التمثيلات الفرعية لعناصره الأساسية (الكلمات والأشجار والمكدس). بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نحن نحقق في كيفية تأثير أنواع مختلفة من مبادلة أوراكل على النتائج. نموذجنا هو أول محلل للدوائر العصبية المتقطعة ، وهو يتفوق في أدائه على جميع النماذج المنشورة سابقًا في ثلاثة من أصل أربع مجموعات بيانات بينما في الرابع حصل على المركز الثاني بفارق ضئيل.', 'pt': 'Um dos problemas mais prementes na análise descontínua baseada em transição de eleitorado é que as informações relevantes para decisões de análise sintática podem estar localizadas em qualquer parte da pilha ou do buffer. Neste artigo, propomos uma solução para este problema substituindo o modelo perceptron estruturado por um modelo neural recursivo que calcula uma representação global da configuração, permitindo assim que até mesmo as partes mais remotas da configuração influenciem as decisões de análise. Também fornecemos uma análise detalhada de como essa representação deve ser construída a partir de sub-representações de seus elementos centrais (palavras, árvores e pilha). Além disso, investigamos como diferentes tipos de oráculos de troca influenciam os resultados. Nosso modelo é o primeiro analisador de constituinte descontínuo neural e supera todos os modelos publicados anteriormente em três dos quatro conjuntos de dados, enquanto no quarto obtém o segundo lugar por uma pequena diferença.', 'fr': "L'un des problèmes les plus urgents dans l'analyse discontinue basée sur la transition de circonscription est que les informations pertinentes pour les décisions d'analyse peuvent se trouver dans n'importe quelle partie de la pile ou du tampon. Dans cet article, nous proposons une solution à ce problème en remplaçant le modèle de perceptron structuré par un modèle neuronal récursif qui calcule une représentation globale de la configuration, permettant ainsi même aux parties les plus éloignées de la configuration d'influencer les décisions d'analyse. Nous fournissons également une analyse détaillée de la façon dont cette représentation doit être construite à partir de sous-représentations de ses éléments principaux (mots, arbres et pile). De plus, nous étudions comment les différents types d'oracles de permutation influencent les résultats. Notre modèle est le premier analyseur de constituants neuronaux discontinus, et il surpasse tous les modèles publiés précédemment sur trois ensembles de données sur quatre tandis que sur le quatrième, il obtient la deuxième place par une infime différence.", 'es': 'Uno de los problemas más apremiantes en el análisis basado en la transición de la unidad constitutiva discontinua es que la información relevante para las decisiones de análisis podría ubicarse en cualquier parte de la pila o el búfer. En este artículo, proponemos una solución a este problema mediante la sustitución del modelo perceptrón estructurado por un modelo neuronal recursivo que calcula una representación global de la configuración, permitiendo así que incluso las partes más remotas de la configuración influyan en las decisiones de análisis. También ofrecemos un análisis detallado de cómo esta representación debe construirse a partir de sub-representaciones de sus elementos principales (palabras, árboles y pila). Además, investigamos cómo los diferentes tipos de oráculos de intercambio influyen en los resultados. Nuestro modelo es el primer analizador de circunscripciones discontinuas neuronales, y supera a todos los modelos publicados anteriormente en tres de cuatro conjuntos de datos, mientras que en el cuarto obtiene el segundo lugar por una pequeña diferencia.', 'ja': '不連続な選挙区遷移ベースの構文解析における最も緊急な問題の1つは、構文解析決定のための関連情報がスタックまたはバッファの任意の部分に位置する可能性があることである。この論文では、構造化パーセプトロンモデルを構成のグローバル表現を計算する再帰的ニューラルモデルに置き換えることで、構成の最も遠隔の部分でも構文解析の決定に影響を与えることができるようにすることで、この問題の解決策を提案した。また、コア要素（単語、木、スタック）のサブ表現からこの表現を構築する方法の詳細な分析も提供します。さらに、異なるタイプのスワップオラクルが結果にどのように影響するかを調査します。私たちのモデルは最初の神経不連続な選挙区構文解析器であり、4つのデータセットのうち3つのデータセットで以前に公開されたすべてのモデルを上回っていますが、4つ目のデータセットではわずかな差で2位になります。', 'zh': '不续者,选区转易之最急者一,所以决策相关,在堆栈、缓冲区也。 于本文之中,发一解决方案之法,以递归神经易结构化感知器,计置全局,故虽至远解析决。 具以详论,宜从其核素(单词,树与堆栈)子表之。 又论异类之易言机也。 首神经不连解析器,其在四集上者三集上优于诸先发,而于四集上,以微为二。', 'hi': 'असंतत निर्वाचन क्षेत्र संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सिंग में सबसे अधिक दबाव वाले मुद्दों में से एक यह है कि पार्सिंग निर्णयों के लिए प्रासंगिक जानकारी स्टैक या बफर के किसी भी हिस्से में स्थित हो सकती है। इस पेपर में, हम संरचित परसेप्ट्रॉन मॉडल को एक पुनरावर्ती तंत्रिका मॉडल के साथ बदलकर इस समस्या का समाधान प्रस्तावित करते हैं जो कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के वैश्विक प्रतिनिधित्व की गणना करता है, इसलिए कॉन्फ़िगरेशन के सबसे दूरस्थ हिस्सों को पार्सिंग निर्णयों को प्रभावित करने की अनुमति देता है। हम इस बात का एक विस्तृत विश्लेषण भी प्रदान करते हैं कि इस प्रतिनिधित्व को इसके मूल तत्वों (शब्दों, पेड़ों और स्टैक) के उप-प्रतिनिधित्व से कैसे बनाया जाना चाहिए। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम जांच करते हैं कि विभिन्न प्रकार के स्वैप ओरेकल परिणामों को कैसे प्रभावित करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल पहला तंत्रिका असंतत निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सर है, और यह चार डेटासेट में से तीन पर पहले से प्रकाशित सभी मॉडलों को मात देता है, जबकि चौथे पर यह एक छोटे से अंतर से दूसरा स्थान प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Одной из наиболее насущных проблем при прерывистом синтаксическом разборе на основе перехода является то, что соответствующая информация для синтаксического разбора решений может быть расположена в любой части стека или буфера. В данной работе мы предлагаем решение этой задачи путем замены структурированной персептронной модели рекурсивной нейронной моделью, которая вычисляет глобальное представление конфигурации, тем самым позволяя даже самым удаленным частям конфигурации влиять на решения по парсингу. Мы также даем подробный анализ того, как это представление должно быть построено из подпредставлений его основных элементов (слов, деревьев и стека). Кроме того, мы исследуем, как различные типы своп оракулов влияют на результаты. Наша модель является первым нейронным прерывистым парсером избирательных округов, и она превосходит все ранее опубликованные модели по трем из четырех наборов данных, в то время как на четвертом она получает второе место с крошечной разницей.', 'ga': 'Ceann de na saincheisteanna is práinní a bhaineann le parsáil neamhleanúnach atá bunaithe ar thrasdultach dáilcheantair ná go bhféadfaí an fhaisnéis ábhartha le haghaidh cinntí parsála a lonnú in aon chuid den chruach nó den mhaolán. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid réiteach ar an bhfadhb seo trí shamhail néarach athfhillteach a chur in ionad an mhúnla struchtúrtha perceptron a ríomhann léiriú domhanda den chumraíocht, rud a ligeann do na codanna is iargúlta den chumraíocht tionchar a imirt ar na cinntí parsála. Cuirimid anailís mhionsonraithe ar fáil freisin ar an gcaoi ar cheart an léiriú seo a thógáil as fo-léirithe dá phríomhghnéithe (focail, crainn agus stoic). Ina theannta sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag cineálacha éagsúla oracles babhtála ar na torthaí. Is é ár múnla an chéad pharsálaí toghlaigh neamhleanúnach néarach, agus sáraíonn sé na samhlacha go léir a foilsíodh roimhe seo ar thrí as gach ceithre thacar sonraí agus ar an gceathrú háit faigheann sé an dara háit le difríocht bheag.', 'el': 'Ένα από τα πιο πιεστικά ζητήματα στην ασυνεχή ανάλυση με βάση τη μετάβαση εκλογικής περιφέρειας είναι ότι οι σχετικές πληροφορίες για την ανάλυση αποφάσεων θα μπορούσαν να βρίσκονται σε οποιοδήποτε μέρος της στοίβας ή της προσωρινής μνήμης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια λύση σε αυτό το πρόβλημα αντικαθιστώντας το δομημένο μοντέλο perceptron με ένα αναδρομικό νευρωνικό μοντέλο που υπολογίζει μια συνολική αναπαράσταση της διαμόρφωσης, επιτρέποντας έτσι ακόμη και τα πιο απομακρυσμένα μέρη της διαμόρφωσης να επηρεάσουν τις αποφάσεις ανάλυσης. Παρέχουμε επίσης μια λεπτομερή ανάλυση του πώς αυτή η αναπαράσταση πρέπει να κατασκευαστεί από υποαναπαραστάσεις των βασικών στοιχείων της (λέξεις, δέντρα και στοίβα). Επιπλέον, διερευνούμε πώς οι διαφορετικοί τύποι μαντείων ανταλλαγής επηρεάζουν τα αποτελέσματα. Το μοντέλο μας είναι ο πρώτος νευρικός ασυνεχής αναλυτής εκλογικής περιφέρειας, και ξεπερνά όλα τα προηγούμενα δημοσιευμένα μοντέλα σε τρία από τα τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων ενώ στο τέταρτο κερδίζει τη δεύτερη θέση με μια μικρή διαφορά.', 'hu': 'A szakaszos választókerületi átmeneti alapú elemzés egyik legsürgetőbb kérdése, hogy a döntések elemzéséhez szükséges információk a stack vagy a puffer bármely részében elhelyezhetők. Ebben a tanulmányban a strukturált perceptron modellt egy rekurzív neurális modellre helyettesítjük, amely a konfiguráció globális ábrázolását számítja ki, így a konfiguráció legtávolabbi részei is befolyásolhatják az elemzési döntéseket. Részletes elemzést nyújtunk arról is, hogy ezt a reprezentációt hogyan kell kiépíteni a fő elemeinek (szavak, fák és halom) aláreprezentációiból. Továbbá azt vizsgáljuk, hogy a swap orákulusok különböző típusai hogyan befolyásolják az eredményeket. Modellünk az első neurális discontinuális választókerületi elemző, és a korábban publikált modelleket három adatkészleten felülmúlja, míg a negyediken apró különbséggel második helyezést szerez.', 'ka': 'ერთი უფრო ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან სტაკონტურის ან ბუტურის ყველა ნაწილის შესაძლებელი ინფ ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას გადავიყენებთ სტრუქტურებული პერპექტრონის მოდელს რეკურსიური ნეირალური მოდელზე, რომელიც კონფიგურაციის გლობალური გამოსახულებას გამოწყენებს, ამიტომ კონფიგურაციის ჩვენ ასევე დავიწყებთ განსაზღვრებული ანალიზაცია როგორ ეს გამოსახულება უნდა იყოს მისი ყველაფერი ელემენტების (სიტყვები, ეხეები და სტაკის) სტაკტიდან დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ თუ როგორ განსხვავებული შეცვლის ორაკულების შესახებ შემდეგ. ჩვენი მოდელი არის პირველი ნეიროლური გადარჩენებული კონსტუტიური პანელი, და ის უფრო გავაკეთება ყველა პირველი პრობლუტიური მოდელების სამუშაობაში სამუშაობაში, სამუშაობაში სამუშაობ', 'it': "Uno dei problemi più urgenti nell'analisi discontinua basata sulla transizione elettorale è che le informazioni rilevanti per l'analisi delle decisioni potrebbero essere localizzate in qualsiasi parte dello stack o del buffer. In questo articolo, proponiamo una soluzione a questo problema sostituendo il modello percettron strutturato con un modello neurale ricorsivo che calcola una rappresentazione globale della configurazione, consentendo quindi anche alle parti più remote della configurazione di influenzare le decisioni di analisi. Forniamo anche un'analisi dettagliata di come questa rappresentazione dovrebbe essere costruita da sub-rappresentazioni dei suoi elementi fondamentali (parole, alberi e stack). Inoltre, esaminiamo come diversi tipi di oracoli swap influenzano i risultati. Il nostro modello è il primo parser di circoscrizione discontinua neurale, e supera tutti i modelli precedentemente pubblicati su tre dataset su quattro mentre sul quarto ottiene il secondo posto con una piccola differenza.", 'kk': 'Шеберлерді талдау үшін керек мәселелердің бірі стактың не буферінің кез келген бөлігінде болуы мүмкін. Бұл қағазда, бұл мәселеге құрылған түсініктер үлгісін қайталанатын невралдық үлгісімен алмастырып, жүйелік конфигурацияның жалпы түсініктерін есептеу үшін шешімдерді өзгертуге мүмкіндік береміз. Біз сондай-ақ бұл кескіндігін негізгі элементтердің (сөздер, ағаштар және стектердің) ішінде қалай құрылуының егжей- тегжейлі анализ береміз. Қосымша, біз ауыстыру ораларының нәтижелеріне қанша әсер ететін түрлерін зерттейміз. Біздің үлгіміз - бірінші невралдық қалқымалық қалқымалық параметрлері. Бұл төртінші дегенде үш деректер қорларынан үш деген үшін, екіншіден кішкентай айырмашылық арқылы, екіншіден орналасады.', 'lt': 'One of the most pressing issues in discontinuous constituency transition-based parsing is that the relevant information for parsing decisions could be located in any part of the stack or the buffer.  Šiame dokumente siūlome išspręsti šią problem ą, pakeičiant struktūrizuotą perceptono model į rekursyviu nerviniu modeliu, kuris apskaičiuoja visuotinį konfigūracijos atvaizdą, todėl net atokiausios konfigūracijos dalys gali daryti įtaką analizavimo sprendimams. Mes taip pat išsamiai analizuojame, kaip šis atstovavimas turėtų būti sudarytas iš jo pagrindinių elementų (žodžių, medžių ir kopijos) mažesnių atstovavimų. Be to, mes tiriame, kaip įvairių tipų apsikeitimo orakliai daro įtaką rezultatams. Mūsų model is yra pirmasis neuralinis nenutrūkstamas rinkimų apygardos analizatorius ir jis viršija visus anksčiau paskelbtus modelius trijuose iš keturių duomenų rinkinių, o ketvirtajame jis gauna antrąją vietą nedideliu skirtumu.', 'mk': 'Едно од најитните прашања во прекинувањето на анализирањето базирано на транзиција во изборниот округ е дека релевантните информации за анализирање на одлуките може да се лоцираат во било кој дел од групата или буферот. Во овој документ, предложуваме решение на овој проблем со замена на структурираниот модел на перцептрон со рекурсивен нервен модел кој компјутира глобално претставување на конфигурацијата, со што дури и најдалечните делови од конфигурацијата ќе овозможат да влијаат на одлуките за анализирање. Ние, исто така, обезбедуваме детална анализа на тоа како ова претставување треба да се изгради од подпретставувања на неговите основни елементи (зборови, дрвја и стоп). Покрај тоа, ние истражуваме како различни типови на размени оракли влијаат на резултатите. Нашиот модел е првиот нервен прекинат анализатор на изборниот округ, и ги надминува сите претходно објавени модели на три од четирите податоци, додека на четвртото добива второ место со мала разлика.', 'ms': 'Salah satu isu yang paling penting dalam penghuraian berdasarkan transisi konstitusi yang berhenti adalah bahawa maklumat berkaitan untuk penghuraian keputusan boleh ditempatkan di mana-mana bahagian tumpukan atau penimbal. In this paper, we propose a solution to this problem by replacing the structured perceptron model with a recursive neural model that computes a global representation of the configuration, therefore allowing even the most remote parts of the configuration to influence the parsing decisions.  Kami juga memberikan analisis terperinci bagaimana perwakilan ini perlu dibina dari subperwakilan unsur utamanya (perkataan, pokok dan tumpukan). Additionally, we investigate how different types of swap oracles influence the results.  Model kita adalah penghurai kejadian neural yang pertama, dan ia melebihi semua model yang telah diterbitkan sebelumnya pada tiga daripada empat set data semasa pada keempat ia mendapat tempat kedua dengan perbezaan kecil.', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് തീരുമാനത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d നിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും അമര്\u200dത്തുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണെന്നാല്\u200d സ്റ്റാക In this paper, we propose a solution to this problem by replacing the structured perceptron model with a recursive neural model that computes a global representation of the configuration, therefore allowing even the most remote parts of the configuration to influence the parsing decisions.  ഈ പ്രതിനിധിയെ എങ്ങനെയാണ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കേണ്ടതെന്നും അതിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള മൂലകങ്ങളുടെ (വാക്കുകള്\u200d, മരങ്ങളും സ്റ്റാക്കുകള അതുകൂടാതെ, വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലെ വാര്\u200dത്തകാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രാധാന്യം വരുത്തുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന പ്രസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധമാണ്. നാല് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d മൂന്ന് പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ച മോഡല', 'mt': 'Waħda mill-kwistjonijiet l-aktar urġenti fl-analiżi kontinwa bbażata fuq it-tranżizzjoni tal-kostitwenza hija li l-informazzjoni rilevanti għall-analiżi tad-deċiżjonijiet tista’ tinsab fi kwalunkwe parti tal-pil jew tar-riżerva. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu soluzzjoni għal din il-problem a billi nisostitwixxu l-mudell tal-perċepton strutturat b’mudell newrali rikorrenti li jikkalkula rappreżentanza globali tal-konfigurazzjoni, u għalhekk jippermettu anki l-partijiet l-aktar imbiegħda tal-konfigurazzjoni li jinfluwenzaw id-deċiżjonijiet tal-analiżi. Aħna nipprovdu wkoll analiżi dettaljata dwar kif din ir-rappreżentanza għandha tinbena minn sottorappreżentazzjonijiet tal-elementi ewlenin tagħha (kliem, siġar u pil). Barra minn hekk, ninvestigaw kif tipi differenti ta’ orakli ta’ skambju jinfluwenzaw ir-riżultati. Il-mudell tagħna huwa l-ewwel parser newrali kontinwu tal-kostitwenza, u huwa ogħla mill-mudelli kollha ppubblikati qabel fuq tlieta minn erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta filwaqt li fir-raba’ jinkiseb it-tieni post b’differenza żgħira.', 'pl': 'Jednym z najbardziej pilnych problemów w nieciągłym parsowaniu opartym na przejściu wyborczym jest to, że istotne informacje do analizowania decyzji mogą znajdować się w dowolnej części stosu lub bufora. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy rozwiązanie tego problemu poprzez zastąpienie strukturalnego modelu perceptronowego rekursywnym modelem neuronowym, który oblicza globalną reprezentację konfiguracji, pozwalając tym samym nawet najbardziej odległe części konfiguracji wpływać na decyzje parsowania. Zapewniamy również szczegółową analizę tego, jak ta reprezentacja powinna być zbudowana z podreprezentacji jej podstawowych elementów (słów, drzew i stosu). Dodatkowo badamy, jak różne rodzaje wyroczni wymiany wpływają na wyniki. Nasz model jest pierwszym neuronowym nieciągłym parserem okręgów wyborczych i przewyższa wszystkie wcześniej opublikowane modele na trzech z czterech zbiorów danych, podczas gdy na czwartym uzyskuje drugie miejsce o niewielką różnicę.', 'ro': 'Una dintre cele mai presante probleme în analizarea tranziției circumscripției discontinue este că informațiile relevante pentru analizarea deciziilor ar putea fi localizate în orice parte a stivei sau a tamponului. În această lucrare, propunem o soluție la această problemă prin înlocuirea modelului perceptron structurat cu un model neural recursiv care calculează o reprezentare globală a configurației, permițând astfel chiar și părțile cele mai îndepărtate ale configurației să influențeze deciziile de analizare. De asemenea, oferim o analiză detaliată a modului în care această reprezentare ar trebui construită din subreprezentări ale elementelor sale de bază (cuvinte, copaci și stivă). În plus, investigăm modul în care diferite tipuri de oracle swap influențează rezultatele. Modelul nostru este primul parser de circumscripţii neurale discontinue şi depăşeşte toate modelele publicate anterior pe trei din patru seturi de date, în timp ce pe al patrulea obţine locul doi cu o mică diferenţă.', 'mn': 'Хамгийн дарамттай асуудал нь хамгийн түгээмэл байгууллагын шилжилт дээр суурилсан талаар шийдвэрлэх шийдвэрлэлийн хамгийн чухал мэдээлэл нь ямар ч хэсэгт байж болох юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлын шийдэл гаргаж, бүтээгдэхүүний ойлголтын загварыг дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн загвартай орлуулж, дэлхийн загварын үзүүлэлтийг тооцоолж байна. Тиймээс энэ загварын хамгийн хол хэсэг нь хуваалцах шийдвэрийг нөлөөлж Мөн бид үүнийг жинхэнэ элементүүдийн (үг, мод, жинхэнэ) доор хэрхэн бий болгох талаар нарийвчлалтай шинжилгээ өгдөг. Үүний үр дүнд хэрхэн өөр төрлийн өөрчлөлт хийх үг нөлөөлж байгааг судалж байна. Бидний загвар бол анхны мэдрэлийн тогтвортой байгууллагуудын хуваагч юм. Энэ нь өмнө хэвлэгдсэн бүх загваруудыг 4 дахь өгөгдлийн загвараас 3 дахин үржүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Ein av dei mest trykkende problema i tilbakestill konstitusjonsovergangsbasert tolking er at det relevante informasjonen om tolking av avgjøringar kunne plasserast i kvar del av stakken eller bufferen. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit løysing til dette problemet ved å byta ut strukturerte oppdagingsmodellen med eit rekursivt neuralmodell som reknar ut eit globalt representasjon av oppsettet, derfor tillet dei mest fjerne delene av oppsettet til å påvirke tolkingsslutningane. Vi gjev også ein detaljert analyse av korleis denne representasjonen skal byggerast ut av underrepresentasjonane av kjerneelementa sin (ord, tre og stakk). I tillegg undersøker vi korleis ulike typar byte- oraklar påvirkar resultatene. Modellen vårt er den første neuralstoppe konstitusjonstolkaren, og den utfører alle førre utgjevne modelane på tre av fire datasett, mens den fjerde får andre plass med ein liten forskjell.', 'si': 'අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන එකක් තමයි විශ්ලේෂණ තීර්ණණාවට සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු ස් මේ පැත්තට, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ විස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිස් අපි ඒවගේම විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණයක් ලැබෙනවා මේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපය කොහොමද සිද්ධ විස්තර කරන්නේ (වචන, ගස් සහ ස්ටෑක් වලින තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වෙනස් වර්ගයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පරීක අපේ මොඩල් තමයි පලවෙනි න්\u200dයූරාල් අවස්ථාවක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මුලින් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන සියළුම දත්ත සේට් 4ක් වලින් තුනක්', 'so': "Mid ka mid ah arimaha ugu dhibaataysan ee ku saabsan baarlamaanka aan la joojin karin waa in macluumaadka muhiimka ah ee go’aanka baarlamaanka laga heli karo qeyb kasta oo ka mid ah boolada ama baabuurka. Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo jeedaynaa xal ka qabsashada dhibaatadan, in aan ku beddelno modelka la dhisay perceptron, kaas oo xisaabta qaabilaadda caalamiga ah oo ku saameyn kara go'aanka baarlamaanka. Sidoo kale waxaynu siinaynaa baaritaan faah’iido ah oo ku saabsan sida loo dhiso qaababkan oo laga sameeyo koob-dhigista xarumaha kooxaha (hadallada, dhirta iyo baabuurta). Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa sidoo kale hadallada kala duduwan oo ay saameyn ku yeelan karaan arimaha. Tusaalkayagu waa kooxaha ugu horeeyay oo aan la joojin karin baaritaanka, wuxuuna sameynayaa noocyada hore oo ka horeeyay saddex ka mid ah afar databaseeti, afraadna waxay helaan meel labaad oo kala duwan.", 'ta': 'நிறுத்தப்படாத மாற்றம் அடிப்படையான பாடலில் ஒரு அழுத்தல் பிரச்சனை இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சினைக்கு ஒரு தீர்வு தீர்வு அளிக்கிறோம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பெட்ரான் மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரியை மாற்றி வடிவமைப்பின் பொது உலக We also provide a detailed analysis of how this representation should be built out of sub-representations of its core elements (words, trees and stack).  மேலும், நாம் வேறு வகையான மாற்று சொல்லுகள் முடிவுகளை எவ்வாறு பாதிக்கும் என்பதை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். நமது மாதிரி என்பது முதல் புதிய நிறுத்தும் நிறுத்தக்கூடிய பாதிப்பு, முன்னால் வெளியிடப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில் நான்கு தரவுத்தளத்தில் மூன்று மு', 'sv': 'En av de mest angelﾃ､gna frﾃ･gorna i diskontinuell valkretsﾃｶvergﾃ･ngsbaserad tolkning ﾃ､r att relevant information fﾃｶr tolkning av beslut kan finnas i vilken del av stacken eller bufferten som helst. I denna uppsats fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en lﾃｶsning pﾃ･ detta problem genom att ersﾃ､tta den strukturerade perceptronmodellen med en rekursiv neural modell som berﾃ､knar en global representation av konfigurationen, vilket gﾃｶr det mﾃｶjligt fﾃｶr ﾃ､ven de mest avlﾃ､gsna delarna av konfigurationen att pﾃ･verka tolkningsbesluten. Vi ger ocksﾃ･ en detaljerad analys av hur denna representation bﾃｶr byggas ut av underrepresentationer av dess kﾃ､rnelement (ord, trﾃ､d och stack). Dessutom undersﾃｶker vi hur olika typer av swap orakel pﾃ･verkar resultatet. Vﾃ･r modell ﾃ､r den fﾃｶrsta neurala diskontinuﾃｶsa valkretstolkaren, och den ﾃｶvertrﾃ､ffar alla tidigare publicerade modeller pﾃ･ tre av fyra datauppsﾃ､ttningar medan den fjﾃ､rde fﾃ･r andraplats med en liten skillnad.', 'ur': 'یہ ہے کہ فیصلہ پارس کرنے کے لئے سب سے زیادہ ضروری مسئلہ استاک یا بوفر کے کسی حصہ میں موجود ہو سکتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم اس مسئلہ کے لئے ایک حل پیش کریں گے کہ ساختہ نظر نظر نظر نظر نظر نظر نظر مدل کو ایک دوسرے نئورل مدل کے ساتھ بدل دیں جو سازمان نظر نظر نظر نظر کرتا ہے، تو اس کے نتیجے میں بھی بہت دور ترین ٹکڑے کو پارسینگ فیصلے کے تاثیر دیں۔ اور ہم نے اس کی اصلی عناصر (کلمات، درخت اور سٹک) سے کس طرح اس کی نمونش بنائی جاتی ہے اس کی تفصیل کا تفصیل بھی پیش کیا ہے۔ اور اضافہ، ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح مختلف طریقے سوپ الکل نتائج پر اثر دیتے ہیں۔ ہماری مدل پہلی نئورل کی قطعہ پارچر ہے، اور اس سے پہلے چار ڈیٹسٹ میں سے تین سے تین ڈیٹسٹ کے سامنے تمام نمونوں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور چوتھے پر دوسری جگہ کم تفاوت کے ذریعہ حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'sr': 'Jedan od najvažnijih pitanja u prekinutoj razmatranju predstava na prelaznoj prijelaznosti je da bi relevantne informacije za razmatranje odluka mogle biti nalažene u bilo kojem dijelu gomile ili bufera. U ovom papiru predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a zamjenom strukturiranog modela perceptrona rekursivnim neuralnim modelom koji računa globalno predstavljanje konfiguracije, stoga omogućavamo čak i najdaljinijim dijelovima konfiguracije da utiče na odluke o analizu. Takođe pružamo detaljnu analizu kako bi se ova predstavljanja trebala izgraditi iz podpredstavljanja svojih osnovnih elementa (reči, drveća i stakla). Osim toga, istražujemo kako različite vrste mijenjanja orala utiču na rezultate. Naš model je prvi neuralni prekinutni analitičar konstitucija, i iznosi sve ranije objavljene modele na tri od četiri dataseta dok na četvrtom dobija drugo mesto malim razlikom.', 'uz': "Koʻrsatilgan tashkilotni toʻxtatish uchun eng boshqaruv muammolar biri - bu bogʻ'liq yoki bufferning bir qismida bo'lishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz bu muammolarni qidirish uchun quyidagi perceptron modelini o'zgartirishni istaysizki, bu moslamaning global representiyasini hisoblash mumkin. Bu sababda, bu moslamaning eng masofadagi qismlariga aytish mumkin. We also provide a detailed analysis of how this representation should be built out of sub-representations of its core elements (words, trees and stack).  Ko'pchilik, biz boshqa so'zlar natijaga qanday ishlatiladi. Bizning modelimizning birinchi neyron davomida toʻxtatib boʻlmaydi. Bu avvaldagi 4 maʼlumotlar sohasidagi uchta modellarni bajaradi, va 4- chi paytda birinchi birinchi birinchi darajada kichkina o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Một trong những vấn đề quan trọng nhất trong phân tích sơ bộ bầu cử người khác là những thông tin liên quan để phân tích các quyết định có thể nằm ở bất kỳ phần nào của cọc hay bộ đệm. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách thay thế mô hình perceptun có hình thần kinh đệ nhất tính to án sự đại diện toàn cầu của cấu hình, cho nên ngay những phần xa nhất của cấu hình có thể ảnh hưởng đến các quyết định phân tích. Chúng tôi cung cấp một phân tích chi tiết về cách xây dựng sự đại diện này bằng các chi tiết của nhân tố cơ bản (từ, cây và chồng). Thêm nữa, chúng tôi điều tra các loại hoán đổi hay hoán đổi có ảnh hưởng thế nào. Mô hình của chúng tôi là nhà phân tích hàng hoá thần kinh đầu tiên, và nó sản xuất ra tất cả các mô hình được xuất bản trước đây trên ba trên bốn bộ dữ liệu, trong lúc thứ tư nó có vị trí thứ hai bởi một sự khác biệt nhỏ.', 'hr': 'Jedan od najvažnijih pitanja u prekinutoj razmatranju područja na prelaznoj prijelaznosti je da bi relevantne informacije za razmatranje odluka mogle biti pronađene u bilo kojem dijelu gomile ili bufera. U ovom papiru predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a zamjenom strukturiranog modela perceptrona rekursivnim neuralnim modelom koji računa globalno predstavljanje konfiguracije, stoga omogućava čak i najdaljinijim dijelovima konfiguracije utjecati na odluke o analizu. Također pružamo detaljnu analizu kako bi se ova predstavljanja trebala izgraditi iz podpredstavljanja svojih osnovnih elementa (riječi, drveća i stakla). Osim toga, istražujemo kako različite vrste mijenjanja orala utječu na rezultate. Naš model je prvi neuralni prekinutni analizač konstitucija, i iznosi sve ranije objavljene modele na tri od četiri podataka, dok na četvrtom dobija drugo mjesto malim razlikom.', 'da': 'Et af de mest presserende spørgsmål i diskontinuel valgkreds overgangsbaseret fortolkning er, at de relevante oplysninger til fortolkning af beslutninger kunne findes i enhver del af stakken eller bufferen. I denne artikel foreslår vi en løsning på dette problem ved at erstatte den strukturerede perceptronmodel med en rekursiv neural model, der beregner en global repræsentation af konfigurationen, hvilket giver selv de mest fjerntliggende dele af konfigurationen mulighed for at påvirke fortolkningsbeslutningerne. Vi giver også en detaljeret analyse af, hvordan denne repræsentation skal bygges ud af underrepræsentationer af dens kerneelementer (ord, træer og stak). Derudover undersøger vi, hvordan forskellige typer swap orakler påvirker resultaterne. Vores model er den første neurale diskontinuelle valgkreds parser, og den overgår alle tidligere offentliggjorte modeller på tre ud af fire datasæt, mens den på fjerde får andenpladsen med en lille forskel.', 'bg': 'Един от най-належащите проблеми при прекъснатия анализ на избирателните райони, базиран на преход, е, че съответната информация за анализиране на решенията може да се намира във всяка част от стека или буфера. В настоящата статия предлагаме решение на този проблем чрез замяна на структурирания възприетон модел с рекурсивен невронен модел, който изчислява глобално представяне на конфигурацията, като по този начин позволява дори и най-отдалечените части от конфигурацията да повлияят на решенията за анализ. Също така предлагаме подробен анализ на това как това представяне трябва да бъде изградено от подпредставяния на основните му елементи (думи, дървета и стек). Освен това изследваме как различните видове суап оракули влияят върху резултатите. Нашият модел е първият невронен прекъснат анализатор на избирателните райони и надминава всички публикувани преди това модели на три от четири набора данни, докато на четвъртия получава второ място с малка разлика.', 'nl': 'Een van de meest urgente problemen bij discontinuous kiesdistrict transition-based parsing is dat de relevante informatie voor het parsen van beslissingen kan worden gevonden in elk deel van de stack of de buffer. In dit artikel stellen we een oplossing voor dit probleem voor door het gestructureerde perceptronmodel te vervangen door een recursief neuraal model dat een globale representatie van de configuratie berekent, waardoor zelfs de meest afgelegen delen van de configuratie de parsing beslissingen kunnen beïnvloeden. We bieden ook een gedetailleerde analyse van hoe deze representatie moet worden opgebouwd uit subrepresentaties van de kernelementen (woorden, bomen en stapel). Daarnaast onderzoeken we hoe verschillende soorten swap oracles de resultaten beïnvloeden. Ons model is de eerste neurale discontinuous kiesdistrict parser, en het presteert alle eerder gepubliceerde modellen op drie van de vier datasets, terwijl het op de vierde met een klein verschil de tweede plaats verovert.', 'id': 'One of the most pressing issues in discontinuous constituency transition-based parsing is that the relevant information for parsing decisions could be located in any part of the stack or the buffer.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan solusi untuk masalah ini dengan menggantikan model persepton strukturasi dengan model saraf rekursif yang menghitung representation global dari konfigurasi, sehingga memungkinkan bahkan bagian paling jauh dari konfigurasi untuk mempengaruhi keputusan penghuraian. Kami juga memberikan analisis terperinci bagaimana representation ini harus dibangun dari sub-representation elemen inti (kata, pohon dan tumpukan). Selain itu, kami menyelidiki bagaimana tipe-tipe orakel swap berbeda mempengaruhi hasilnya. Model kami adalah parser konstitunsi neural yang pertama yang tidak terhubung, dan ia melebihi semua model yang telah diterbitkan sebelumnya pada tiga dari empat set data sementara pada keempat itu mendapatkan tempat kedua dengan perbedaan kecil.', 'de': 'Eines der drängendsten Probleme beim diskontinuierlichen Parsing auf Basis von Wahlkreisen ist, dass sich die relevanten Informationen zum Parsen von Entscheidungen in jedem Teil des Stacks oder des Puffers befinden können. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Lösung für dieses Problem vor, indem wir das strukturierte Perzeptronmodell durch ein rekursives neuronales Modell ersetzen, das eine globale Repräsentation der Konfiguration berechnet, wodurch selbst die entferntesten Teile der Konfiguration die Parsing-Entscheidungen beeinflussen können. Wir bieten auch eine detaillierte Analyse, wie diese Darstellung aus Unterdarstellungen ihrer Kernelemente (Wörter, Bäume und Stapel) aufgebaut werden sollte. Zusätzlich untersuchen wir, wie verschiedene Arten von Swap-Orakeln die Ergebnisse beeinflussen. Unser Modell ist der erste neuronale diskontinuierliche Wahlkreisparser und übertrifft alle zuvor veröffentlichten Modelle auf drei von vier Datensätzen, während es auf dem vierten um einen winzigen Unterschied den zweiten Platz einnimmt.', 'fa': 'یکی از مهمترین مسائل فشار در تغییر تغییر بر اساس تغییر تغییر محلی است که اطلاعات مربوط به تغییر تصمیم\u200cگیری\u200cها در هر بخشی از قطعه\u200cای از قطعه یا بوفر می\u200cتواند موجود باشد. در این کاغذ، ما یک راه حل برای این مشکل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با جایگزینش مدل نظریه\u200cای ساخته شده با یک مدل عصبی تکرار می\u200cکند که یک نمایش جهانی پیکربندی را محاسبه می\u200cکند، بنابراین اجازه می\u200cدهیم حتی بخش\u200cهای دور از پیکربندی تاثیر تصمیم\u200cگیری را تحلیل کند ما همچنین تحلیل جزئیات را در مورد چگونه این نمایش باید از زیر نمایش عناصرش ساخته شود (کلمات، درختان و استک). به اضافه، ما تحقیق می کنیم که چگونه نوع واژه های تغییر تغییر متفاوتی بر نتیجه ها تأثیر می دهد. مدل ما اولین مشخص محیطه\u200cهای عصبی متوقف است، و تمام مدل\u200cهای پیش از آن در سه از چهار مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها، در حالی که در چهارمین محیطه دوم را با یک تفاوت کوچک می\u200cگیرد.', 'sw': 'Moja ya masuala yanayoshinikiza zaidi ya kusitisha mabadiliko ya uchaguzi ni kwamba taarifa muhimu kwa maamuzi ya uchaguzi unaweza kuwepo katika sehemu yoyote ya viwanja au boti. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza suluhisho la tatizo hili kwa kubadilisha muundo wa mtazamo ulioanzishwa na modeli ya neurali inayokadiria uwakilishi wa kimataifa wa bunge hilo, kwa hiyo tunaruhusu hata sehemu za mbali kabisa za ubunifu kuathiri maamuzi ya parge. Pia tunatoa uchambuzi wa kina wa jinsi uwakilishaji huu unavyopaswa kutengenezwa kutokana na wawakilishaji wa vifaa vyake vya msingi (maneno, miti na viwanja). Kwa nyongeza, tunachunguza namna aina tofauti ya maneno yanavyoathiri matokeo. Mfano wetu ni uchambuzi wa kwanza wa ubongo usio na ukweli, na unaonyesha mifano yote iliyochapishwa hapo awali kwenye seti tatu ya takwimu nne wakati wa nne inapata nafasi ya pili kwa tofauti ndogo.', 'ko': '비연속 선택 영역 전환을 바탕으로 하는 해석에서 가장 긴박한 문제 중 하나는 해석 결정과 관련된 정보가 창고나 버퍼 구역의 어느 부분에 있을 수 있다는 것이다.본고에서 우리는 구조화된 감지기 모델을 귀속신경 모델로 바꾸고 이 모델의 계산 설정의 전체적인 표시를 통해 설정의 가장 먼 부분이 해석 결정에 영향을 미치는 것을 허용하는 해결 방안을 제시했다.우리는 핵심 요소(단어, 나무와 창고)의 하위 표시를 어떻게 활용하여 이런 표시를 구축하는지 상세하게 분석했다.그 밖에 우리는 서로 다른 유형의 교환 예언이 결과에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지 연구했다.우리의 모델은 첫 번째 신경 불연속 선택 영역 해석기인데, 4분의 3의 데이터 집합에서는 이전에 발표된 모든 모델보다 성능이 우수하고, 네 번째 데이터 집합에서는 미세한 차이로 2위를 차지한다.', 'am': 'የአካባቢው ምርጫዎች በክፍል፣ የክፍለ ምርጫዎች ማግኘት የሚችል መረጃ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የተመሠረተውን የፕቶፕሮን ሞዴል በመለወጥ የዓለምአቀፍ መልዕክት በሚቆጥረው የናውሮል ሞዴል በመለወጥ ለዚህ ጉዳይ መፍትሄን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ እናም ይህ መልዕክት እንዴት እንደተሠራ አካባቢ አካላት (ቃላት፣ ዛፎች እና መደገፊያ) እንዲገልጽ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የመለወጥ ቃላት ምን ያህል ፍሬዎቹን እንዲያስቀምጥ እናመርመራለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የፊተኛውን የነጥብ ምርጫዎች ነው፤ እናም የቀድሞው የተዘጋጁት ሞዴላዎችን ከአራቱ ዳታተሮች በሦስት ላይ እና በአራተኛው ክፍል ላይ ሁለተኛ ስፍራን ትንሽ ልዩነት ያገኛል፡፡', 'tr': 'Devam etmek 체챌in i흫 baskyn mesele ge챌irmek 체챌in ge챌irmek 체챌in h채zirki maglumaty pa첵lamak 체챌in bir b철l체mde bolup biler. Bu kagyzda, biz bu mesele 체챌in 챌철z체m teklif edip strukturyly d체힊체n첵채n nural modelini 첵erle힊dirip, bu seb채pden 챌철z체mleme kararlaryna etm채ge rugsat beren nural modelini almak 체챌in guruldyrys. Biz hem bu surat캇n temel elementlerinin (s철zler, a 휓a챌lar ve stack) alt캇ndan nas캇l in힊a edilmelidigini detaylar analizi sunuyoruz. 횥stelik, 체첵tgetmek 체챌in d체rli t체rleri 체첵tgetmek 체챌in netijelerine n채hili t채sirle첵채ndigini soradyk. Bizi흫 modelimiz ilkinji neural ta첵첵arlanmyk ta첵첵arlanmyk b철legidir we bu i흫 철흫ki d철rt datasetlerden 체챌 t채ze d철rt nusgada 체챌in be첵leki ta첵첵arlanmyk 체챌in t채zeden 챌ykar.', 'af': "Een van die mees gedrukende probleme in ondersteunde konstituasie-oorgang-gebaseerde verwerking is dat die relevante inligting vir verwerking van besluite kan in enige deel van die stak of die buffer wees. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n oplossing vir hierdie probleem deur die struktureerde perceptron model te vervang met 'n rekursiewe neuralmodel wat 'n globale voorstelling van die konfigurasie bereken, dus toelaat ek selfs die mees afgeleë dele van die konfigurasie om die verwerking besluitings te influens. Ons verskaf ook 'n gedetale analisie van hoe hierdie voorstelling moet gebou word uit onderstellings van sy kernelelemente (woorde, bome en stapel). In addition, we investigate how different types of swap oracles affect the results. Ons model is die eerste neurale ontbreiding konstituency ontsteller, en dit uitvoer al die voorheen gepubliseerde modele op drie uit vier datastelle terwyl op die vierde, dit verkry tweede plek deur 'n klein verskil.", 'sq': 'Një nga çështjet më urgjente në analizimin e ndërprerë bazuar në tranzicionin e qarkut zgjedhor është se informacioni i rëndësishëm për analizimin e vendimeve mund të gjendet në çdo pjesë të grumbullit apo bufferit. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një zgjidhje për këtë problem duke zëvendësuar modelin e strukturuar të perceptonit me një model neural rekursiv që llogarit një përfaqësim global të konfigurimit, duke lejuar kështu edhe pjesët më të largëta të konfigurimit të ndikojnë në vendimet e analizimit. Ne japim gjithashtu një analizë të detajuar se si ky përfaqësim duhet të ndërtohet nga nënpërfaqësimet e elementeve të tij thelbësore (fjalë, pemë dhe grumbull). Përveç kësaj, ne hetojmë se si llojet e ndryshme të orakleve të shkëmbimit ndikojnë në rezultatet. Modeli ynë është analizuesi i parë i qarkut të zgjedhjeve të vazhdueshëm neuronal, dhe ai paraqet të gjitha modelet e publikuara më parë në tre nga katër të dhënat ndërsa në të katërtin ai merr vendin e dytë me një ndryshim të vogël.', 'hy': "Ամենագրավիչ խնդիրներից մեկն այն է, որ անընդհատ ընտրական շրջանի վերանայման հիմնված վերանայման մեջ որոշումների վերանայման կարևոր տեղեկատվությունը կարող է գտնվել կույտի ցանկացած մասում կամ բուֆերում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք լուծում այս խնդիրը, փոխարինելով կառուցվածված ընկալման մոդելը վերականգնող նյարդային մոդելով, որը հաշվարկում է կառուցվածքի գլոբալ ներկայացումը, ինչը թույլ է տալիս, որ նույնիսկ կառուցվածքի ամենահեռավոր մասերը Մենք նաև մանրամասն վերլուծում ենք, թե ինչպես պետք է այս ներկայացումը կառուցել իր հիմնական տարրերի (բառերի, ծառերի և կույտի) ենթաներկայացումներից: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես են փոխանակումների տարբեր տեսակները ազդում արդյունքներին: Մեր մոդելը առաջին նյարդային անխուսափելի ընտրական շրջանի վերլուծումն է, և այն արտադրում է նախկինում հրատարակված բոլոր մոդելները չորս տվյալներից երեք-ից, իսկ չորրորդը' երկրորդ տեղը ստանում է փոքր տարբերություն:", 'az': 'Ən çox sıxıntılı məsələlərdən biri istifadə etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün hökmlərin hər hansı bir bölümündə və ya buferin məlumatı olar. Bu kağızda, biz bu problem ə çözüm təklif edirik, strukturlu perceptron modelini yenidən bir nöral modeli ilə əvəz edərək, quruluşunun küresel təhrif edilməsini hesablayaraq, buna görə də konfigurasiyanın ən uzaq parçalarını ayırma kararlarına etkisi edərək. Biz həmçinin bu göstərişin əsas elementlərin (sözlərin, a ğacların və çəkinlərin) altından necə inşa edilməsini təsdiqləyirik. Daha da, biz müxtəlif dəyişiklik sözlərinin sonuçlarına necə təsir edir. Bizim modellərimiz ilk nöral müxtəlif müxtəlif bölümlərdir, və dördüncü dəfə ikinci yeri kiçik fərqli olaraq üç dəfə ilə əvvəl yayınlanan modellərdən üstün tutar.', 'bs': 'Jedan od najvažnijih pitanja u prekinutoj razmatranju predstava na prelaznoj prijelaznosti je da bi relevantne informacije za razmatranje odluka mogle biti nalažene u bilo kojem dijelu gomile ili bufera. U ovom papiru predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a zamjenom strukturiranog modela perceptrona rekursivnim neuralnim modelom koji računa globalno predstavljanje konfiguracije, stoga omogućava čak i najdaljinijim dijelovima konfiguracije da utjecaju na odluke o analizu. Također predstavljamo detaljnu analizu kako bi se ova predstavljanja trebala izgraditi iz podpredstavljanja njegovih osnovnih elementa (riječi, drveća i stakla). Osim toga, istražujemo kako različite vrste mijenjanja orala utječu na rezultate. Naš model je prvi neuralni prekinutni analizač konstitucija, i iznosi sve ranije objavljene modele na tri od četiri dataseta, dok na četvrtom dobija drugo mjesto malim razlikom.', 'bn': 'ভিত্তিক পার্সিং বন্ধ করার সবচেয়ে চাপ প্রয়োজনীয় বিষয় হচ্ছে পার্সিং সিদ্ধান্তের কোন অংশে স্ট্যাক অথবা বাফারের কোন অংশে পার্সিং সিদ্ধ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই সমস্যার সমাধানের প্রস্তাব করি কাঠামো প্রতিষ্ঠানের মডেলের সাথে পুনরাবৃত্তিক নিউরেল মডেল প্রতিস্থাপন করে যা কনফিগারেশনের বিশ্বপূর্ণ প্রতিনিধিত এছাড়াও আমরা বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি যে এই প্রতিনিধিত্ব কিভাবে তার মূল উপাদানের সাবপ্রতিনিধিত্বের (শব্দ, গাছ এব এছাড়াও আমরা তদন্ত করি কিভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের প্রতিক্রিয়া অর্গালের ফলাফল প্রভাব ফেলে। আমাদের মডেল হচ্ছে প্রথম নিউরুল প্রতিনিধি বাতিল করার প্রস্তাব, আর এটি চারটি ডাটাসেট থেকে প্রকাশিত সমস্ত মডেল প্রকাশ করে, আর চারটিতে এটি ছোট একটা পার্থ', 'ca': "Una de les qüestions més pressives en l'analització permanente basada en la transició del districte electoral és que la informació pertinentper l'analització de decisions podria estar localitzada en qualsevol part de la pila o el buffer. In this paper, we propose a solution to this problem by replacing the structured perceptron model with a recursive neural model that computes a global representation of the configuration, therefore allowing even the most remote parts of the configuration to influence the parsing decisions.  També proporcionem una anàlisi detallada de com hauria de construir aquesta representació amb subrepresentacions dels seus elements fonamentals (paraules, arbres i pila). A més, investigam com diferents tipus d'oracles d'intercanvi influeixen en els resultats. El nostre model és el primer analitzador neural discontinu del districte electoral, i supera tots els models publicats anteriorment en tres de cada quatre conjunts de dades mentre el quart obté el segon lloc per una minúscula diferència.", 'cs': 'Jedním z nejnaléhavějších problémů v diskontinuální analýze volebních obvodů je, že relevantní informace pro analýzu rozhodnutí mohou být umístěny v libovolné části zásobníku nebo vyrovnávací paměti. V tomto článku navrhujeme řešení tohoto problému nahrazením strukturovaného perceptronového modelu rekurzivním neuronovým modelem, který vypočítá globální reprezentaci konfigurace a umožňuje tak ovlivnit i ty nejvzdálenější části konfigurace rozhodnutí o analýze. Dále poskytujeme detailní analýzu toho, jak by měla být tato reprezentace sestavena z podreprezentací jejích základních prvků (slova, stromy a stoh). Dále zkoumáme, jak různé typy swapových věštek ovlivňují výsledky. Náš model je prvním neuronovým diskontinuálním volebním parserem, který předčítá všechny dříve publikované modely na třech ze čtyř datových sad, zatímco na čtvrtém získává druhé místo malým rozdílem.', 'et': 'Üks kõige pakilisemaid probleeme valimisringkonna üleminekul põhinevas parsimises on see, et otsuste parsimiseks vajalik teave võib asuda mis tahes virna või puhvri osas. Käesolevas töös pakume välja lahenduse sellele probleemile, asendades struktureeritud perceptronmudeli rekursiivse närvimudeliga, mis arvutab konfiguratsiooni globaalse esituse, võimaldades seega isegi konfiguratsiooni kõige kaugematel osadel mõjutada parsimisotsuseid. Samuti anname üksikasjaliku analüüsi selle kohta, kuidas see esitus peaks olema ehitatud selle põhielementide (sõnad, puud ja virna) alamesitustest. Lisaks uurime, kuidas erinevat tüüpi swap oraakelid mõjutavad tulemusi. Meie mudel on esimene neuraalne katkematu valimisringkonna parser ja see ületab kõiki varem avaldatud mudeleid kolmel neljast andmekogumist, samas kui neljandal saavutab ta teise koha väikese erinevusega.', 'fi': 'Er채s kiireellisimmist채 kysymyksist채 ep채jatkuvassa vaalipiirisiirtym채pohjaisessa j채sent채misess채 on se, ett채 p채채t철sten j채sent채miseen tarvittava tieto voisi sijaita miss채 tahansa pinon tai puskurin osassa. T채ss채 ty철ss채 ehdotamme ratkaisua t채h채n ongelmaan korvaamalla strukturoidun perceptronimallin rekursiivisella neuromallilla, joka laskee konfiguraation globaalin edustuksen, jolloin konfiguraation syrj채isimm채t osat voivat vaikuttaa j채sennysp채채t철ksiin. Tarjoamme my철s yksityiskohtaisen analyysin siit채, miten t채m채 esitys tulisi rakentaa sen ydinelementtien (sanat, puut ja pino) aliesityksist채. Lis채ksi tutkimme, miten erilaiset swap-oraakkelit vaikuttavat tuloksiin. Mallimme on ensimm채inen ep채jatkuvien vaalipiirien j채sent채j채, ja se p채ihitt채채 kaikki aiemmin julkaistut mallit kolmessa nelj채st채 aineistosta, kun taas nelj채nness채 se saa toisen sijan pienell채 erolla.', 'sk': 'Eno od najbolj perečih vprašanj pri prekinitvi prehoda volilnih okrožij, ki temelji na prehodu, je, da so ustrezne informacije za razčlenitev odločitev lahko v katerem koli delu sklopa ali blažilnika. V prispevku predlagamo rešitev tega problema z zamenjavo strukturiranega perceptronskega modela z rekurzivnim nevronskim modelom, ki izračuna globalno predstavitev konfiguracije in tako omogoča, da celo najbolj oddaljeni deli konfiguracije vplivajo na odločitve o razčlenitvi. Ponujamo tudi podrobno analizo tega, kako naj se ta predstavitev gradi iz podpredstavitev njegovih ključnih elementov (besed, drevesa in kup). Poleg tega raziskujemo, kako različne vrste swap oraklov vplivajo na rezultate. Naš model je prvi razčlenjevalec nevronskih kontinuinuiranih volilnih okrožij, ki presega vse prej objavljene modele na treh od štirih naborov podatkov, medtem ko na četrtem pridobi drugo mesto z majhno razliko.', 'ha': "Babba daga masu ƙaranci da za'a sãɓa parse-mai da aka danne shi a sãɓa, yana cẽwa, za'a iya sami information masu da muhimmi wa masu cire-gareshi ga parse cikin wani rabon hagu ko buffet. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗe masu sola wa wannan mataimaki a matsayin ka musanya motel na bakin percpectron da wata motel mai riƙo na guda, wanda yana ƙidãya wani mai tsari na kiman canza tsarin, don haka yana yarda, ko da mafi ƙaranci na canza canza tsarin ya yi amfani da hukuncin parse. Kuma Munã bã da rabo daki-daki ga yadda za'a gina wannan misalin daga sub-wakin elements na ƙarƙashin (magana, itãce da stack). Ina ƙaranci, Munã tambaya yadda nau'i-nau'i na musanya sun yi amfani da matsala. Misalinmu ne na farkon neural wanda ba'a goge shi ba, kuma yana tafiyar da duk misãlai na zaman wanda aka nuna shi a kan uku daga huɗu dangane, kuma a kan rubutu, yana da wani wuri mai ƙaranci.", 'he': 'אחת מהבעיות המדחפות ביותר בהעברה המבוססת במחוז הבחירות היא שהמידע הרלוונטי להעברה החלטות יכול להיות מאתר בכל חלק מהערימה או הגבול. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים פתרון לבעיה הזאת על ידי החלפת מודל הפרפטרון המבנה עם מודל עצבי חוזר שמחשב מייצג גלובלי של ההבנה, ולכן מאפשר אפילו החלקים הרחוקים ביותר של ההבנה להשפיע על החלטות המחקר. אנחנו גם מספקים ניתוח פרטי של איך היציגה הזאת צריכה להיבנה מתוך מייצגות תת של אלמנטים העיקריים שלה (מילים, עצים וערימה). בנוסף, אנחנו חוקרים איך סוגים שונים של אורקלים החליפים משפיעים על התוצאות. המודל שלנו הוא הפרסם הראשון של מחוז הבחירות העצבי הפסיק, והוא מעליף את כל המודלים שהופרסמו קודם על שלושה מארבע קבוצות נתונים בזמן שברביעי הוא מקבל מקום שני על ידי הבדל קטן.', 'jv': 'Learn Mode Nang pewiir iki, kita mudyone perusahaan kanggo nyebah ning arah iki dadi bisa ngubah model nggawe barang alat sing ngedol modèl Awak dhéwé mungkin ngerti dadi nggawe paten winih kanggo nyelaraké nggawe barang-nyelaraké karo éwé nggawe barang-nyelaraké (gambaran, punika lan kok). Nambah, kita maneh mengko perusahaan kelas kanggo kalagayaan pangan anyar Awak dhéwé model iku tualke perusahaan nambah énêr, sampeyan ngono nggawe model sing apik dhéwé, ngono kuwi nambah sabên sesuk sabên dataset sing katêpakan, sampeyan nganggo sampeyan tanggal saiki wis segala macem depan.', 'bo': 'One of the most pressing issues in discontinuous constituency transition-based parsing is that the relevant information for parsing decisions can be located in any part of the stack or the buffer. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོགས་ཚབ་ཏུ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་པ་འདི་ཇི་ལྟའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཙོ་རིམ་ཚན་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་བཤེར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མེད་པ་རྣམས་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་དང་པོ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་མཚམས་མཐོང་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཏུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Stack-based Multi-layer Attention for Transition-based Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'الانتباه متعدد الطبقات المعتمد على المكدس لتحليل التبعية القائم على الانتقال', 'pt': 'Atenção multicamada baseada em pilha para análise de dependência baseada em transição', 'es': 'Atención multicapa basada en pilas para el análisis de dependencias basado en transiciones', 'fr': "Attention multicouche basée sur la pile pour l'analyse des dépendances basée sur la transition", 'ja': 'トランジションベースの依存関係解析のためのスタックベースのマルチレイヤーアテンション', 'zh': '盖堆栈之所重者,转易之所恃解析', 'hi': 'स्टैक-आधारित बहु-परत ध्यान संक्रमण-आधारित निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए', 'ru': 'Внимание на основе стека для многоуровневого анализа зависимостей на основе перехода', 'ga': 'Aird Ilchiseal atá bunaithe ar chruach do Pharsáil Spleáchais Idirthréimhsebhunaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Stack-alapú többrétegű figyelem az átmeneti alapú függőség-értelmezésre', 'el': 'Προσοχή για ανάλυση εξάρτησης με βάση τη μετάβαση', 'it': "Attenzione a più strati basata su stack per l'analisi della dipendenza basata sulla transizione", 'kk': 'Қалқа негіздеген көп қабаттар тәуелдік талдау үшін', 'lt': 'Daugiasluoksnis dėmesys pereinamojo laikotarpio priklausomybės analizei', 'mk': 'Внимание на повеќето слоеви за анализирање зависности базирано на транзиција', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റാക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സ്റ്റാക്ക് പല-layer ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Attenzjoni fuq diversi saffi bbażata fuq il-pilastri għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza bbażata fuq it-Tranżizzjoni', 'no': 'Stackbasert fleire lag', 'ms': 'Perhatian berbilang-lapisan berdasarkan tumpukan untuk Penghuraian Dependensi berdasarkan Peralihan', 'pl': 'Wielowarstwowa uwaga dla parowania zależności opartego na przejściu', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх-үндсэн хамааралын талаар олон давхар таталцлага', 'ro': 'Atenție pe mai multe straturi bazată pe stivă pentru analizarea dependenței bazată pe tranziție', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Stak-bazirana višeslojna pažnja za analizu zavisnosti na transiciji', 'so': 'Jardiino ku saleysan jardiinada gaarka loo leeyahay', 'ta': 'மாற்றத்தை அடிப்படையான சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பாசிங்குக்கான அடுக்கு பல- அடுக்கு கவனிப்பு', 'ur': 'Stack-based Multi layer Attention for Transition-based Dependency Parsing', 'sv': 'Stackbaserad flerlagers uppmärksamhet för övergångsbaserad beroendetolkning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Theo từng lớp Nghiêm túc về phụ thuộc vào giai đoạn', 'nl': 'Stapelgebaseerde meerlaagse aandacht voor overgangsgebaseerde afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'hr': 'Pozor na višeslojevima na stazi za analizu zavisnosti na transiciji', 'da': 'Stakbaseret flerlags opmærksomhed på overgangsbaseret afhængighedsfortolkning', 'bg': 'Многослойно внимание за анализ на зависимостта въз основа на преход', 'id': 'Perhatian berbagai lapisan berdasarkan tumpukan untuk Penganalisan Dependensi berdasarkan Transisi', 'fa': 'توجه بسیاری از طبقه\u200cها برای تحلیل بستگی بر اساس تغییرات', 'de': 'Stapelbasiertes Multi-Layer-Attention for Transition-based Dependency Parsing', 'ko': '창고 기반의 다중 주의 변환 의존 분석', 'sw': 'Mtazamo wa layer Multi-Layer kwa ajili ya Kuchapisha Utegemea wa Upitiaji', 'tr': 'Gejime-daýry Baýlyklyklyk Taýýarlama üçin Köp-katyr Dyggaty', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Vëmendje me shumënivele bazuar në stack për analizimin e varësisë me bazë në tranzicion', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Մյուս շերտերի բազմաշերտ ուշադրություն', 'bn': 'ট্যাক ভিত্তিক স্ট্যাক-ভিত্তিক অনেক স্তরের আকর্ষণ', 'az': 'Xəta-tabanlı çoxlu-Layer Attention for Transition-based Dependency Parsing', 'ca': "Atenció multicapa basada en piles per l'analització de dependencies basada en la transició", 'cs': 'Vícevrstvá pozornost pro analýzu závislosti založené na přechodu', 'et': 'Pinnapõhine mitmekihiline tähelepanu üleminekupõhisele sõltuvuse parsimisele', 'bs': 'Stak-bazirana višeslojna pažnja za analizu zavisnosti na transiciji', 'fi': 'Pintopohjainen monikerroksinen huomio siirtymäpohjaiseen riippuvuuden analysointiin', 'he': 'Stack-based Multi-layer Attention for Transition-based Dependency Parsing', 'sk': 'Večplastna pozornost na podlagi skladišča za razčlenitev odvisnosti na podlagi prehoda', 'jv': 'Stack-basa Multi-layer Attention for Traverse-basa Dehensitive Parasing', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Stack-based Multi layer Attention for Transition-based Dependency Parsing'}
{'en': 'Although sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) network has achieved significant success in many NLP tasks such as machine translation and text summarization, simply applying this approach to transition-based dependency parsing can not yield a comparable performance gain as in other state-of-the-art methods, such as stack-LSTM and head selection. In this paper, we propose a stack-based multi-layer attention model for seq2seq learning to better leverage structural linguistics information. In our method, two binary vectors are used to track the decoding stack in transition-based parsing, and multi-layer attention is introduced to capture multiple word dependencies in partial trees. We conduct experiments on PTB and CTB datasets, and the results show that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy and significant improvement in labeled precision with respect to the baseline seq2seq model.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن شبكة التسلسل إلى التسلسل (seq2seq) قد حققت نجاحًا كبيرًا في العديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية مثل الترجمة الآلية وتلخيص النص ، فإن تطبيق هذا النهج ببساطة على تحليل التبعية القائم على الانتقال لا يمكن أن يؤدي إلى مكاسب أداء مماثلة كما هو الحال في حالة أخرى. - الأساليب الفنية ، مثل المكدس- LSTM واختيار الرأس. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج اهتمام متعدد الطبقات قائم على المكدس لتعلم seq2seq لتحسين معلومات اللغويات الهيكلية. في طريقتنا ، يتم استخدام متجهين ثنائيين لتتبع مكدس فك التشفير في التحليل القائم على الانتقال ، ويتم تقديم الانتباه متعدد الطبقات لالتقاط تبعيات كلمات متعددة في الأشجار الجزئية. نجري تجارب على مجموعات بيانات PTB و CTB ، وتظهر النتائج أن نموذجنا المقترح يحقق دقة متطورة وتحسنًا كبيرًا في الدقة الموصوفة فيما يتعلق بنموذج خط الأساس seq2seq.', 'es': 'Aunque la red de secuencia a secuencia (seq2seq) ha logrado un éxito significativo en muchas tareas de PNL, como la traducción automática y el resumen de texto, la simple aplicación de este enfoque al análisis de dependencias basado en transiciones no puede producir una ganancia de rendimiento comparable a la de otros métodos de última generación, como la pila -LSTM y selección de cabezales. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de atención multicapa basado en pilas para el aprendizaje de seq2seq para aprovechar mejor la información lingüística estructural. En nuestro método, se utilizan dos vectores binarios para rastrear la pila de decodificación en el análisis basado en transiciones, y se introduce la atención de múltiples capas para capturar múltiples dependencias de palabras en árboles parciales. Llevamos a cabo experimentos en conjuntos de datos de PTB y CTB, y los resultados muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto logra una precisión de vanguardia y una mejora significativa en la precisión del etiquetado con respecto al modelo seq2seq de referencia.', 'fr': "Bien que le réseau de séquence à séquence (seq2seq) ait connu un succès significatif dans de nombreuses tâches de NLP telles que la traduction automatique et la synthèse de texte, le simple fait d'appliquer cette approche à l'analyse des dépendances basée sur la transition ne peut pas produire un gain de performance comparable à celui d'autres méthodes de pointe, telles que la pile -Sélection LSTM et tête. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle d'attention multicouche basé sur une pile pour l'apprentissage de seq2seq afin de mieux exploiter les informations de linguistique structurelle. Dans notre méthode, deux vecteurs binaires sont utilisés pour suivre la pile de décodage dans l'analyse basée sur la transition, et une attention multicouche est introduite pour capturer plusieurs dépendances de mots dans des arbres partiels. Nous menons des expériences sur des ensembles de données PTB et CTB, et les résultats montrent que notre modèle proposé atteint une précision de pointe et une amélioration significative de la précision marquée par rapport au modèle seq2seq de base.", 'pt': 'Embora a rede sequência a sequência (seq2seq) tenha alcançado sucesso significativo em muitas tarefas de PNL, como tradução automática e resumo de texto, simplesmente aplicar essa abordagem à análise de dependência baseada em transição não pode gerar um ganho de desempenho comparável como em outros estados da rede. métodos -art, como stack-LSTM e seleção de cabeça. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo de atenção multicamada baseado em pilha para aprendizado seq2seq para melhor alavancar as informações linguísticas estruturais. Em nosso método, dois vetores binários são usados para rastrear a pilha de decodificação na análise baseada em transição, e a atenção multicamada é introduzida para capturar várias dependências de palavras em árvores parciais. Conduzimos experimentos em conjuntos de dados PTB e CTB, e os resultados mostram que nosso modelo proposto alcança precisão de última geração e melhora significativa na precisão rotulada em relação ao modelo seq2seq de linha de base.', 'ja': 'シーケンスツーシーケンス（ seq 2 seq ）ネットワークは、機械翻訳およびテキスト要約などの多くのNLPタスクで大きな成功を収めているが、このアプローチを遷移ベースの依存関係解析に単純に適用しても、スタック- LSTMおよびヘッド選択などの他の最先端の方法のように、同等のパフォーマンスの向上をもたらすことはできない。この論文では、構造言語学情報をより良く活用するために、seq 2 seq学習のためのスタックベースの多層注目モデルを提案した。本方法では、2つのバイナリベクトルを使用して、遷移ベースの構文解析におけるデコードスタックを追跡し、多層注意を導入して、部分木における複数の単語依存性をキャプチャする。我々は、PTBおよびCTBデータセットの実験を行い、その結果は、提案されたモデルが、ベースラインseq 2 seqモデルに関して、最先端の精度および標識された精度の有意な改善を達成することを示している。', 'zh': '虽序至序(seq2seq)网络多NLP之任(如机器翻译文摘要)之大成,但当用于转移之资解析不能生与他最先进之法(如堆栈LSTM头择)相当者升擢。 于本文中,立一堆栈之多端,施于seq2seq学,以益结构语言学信。 于吾法,用二二进制向量以蹑转换之解析解码堆栈,引入多层意力来获树中数单词赖之。 PTB、CTB数集上行实验,结果表明,则先进之精,相对基线seq2seq表。', 'hi': 'यद्यपि अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (seq2seq) नेटवर्क ने मशीन अनुवाद और पाठ सारांशीकरण जैसे कई एनएलपी कार्यों में महत्वपूर्ण सफलता हासिल की है, बस संक्रमण-आधारित निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए इस दृष्टिकोण को लागू करने से अन्य अत्याधुनिक विधियों जैसे स्टैक-एलएसटीएम और हेड चयन के रूप में एक तुलनीय प्रदर्शन लाभ प्राप्त नहीं हो सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम संरचनात्मक भाषाविज्ञान जानकारी का बेहतर लाभ उठाने के लिए seq2seq सीखने के लिए एक स्टैक-आधारित बहु-परत ध्यान मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि में, दो बाइनरी वैक्टर का उपयोग संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सिंग में डिकोडिंग स्टैक को ट्रैक करने के लिए किया जाता है, और आंशिक पेड़ों में कई शब्द निर्भरताओं को पकड़ने के लिए बहु-परत ध्यान पेश किया जाता है। हम PTB और CTB डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं, और परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल बेसलाइन seq2seq मॉडल के संबंध में लेबल परिशुद्धता में अत्याधुनिक सटीकता और महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Хотя сеть последовательности к последовательности (seq2seq) достигла значительного успеха во многих задачах NLP, таких как машинный перевод и обобщение текста, простое применение этого подхода к синтаксическому анализу зависимостей на основе перехода не может обеспечить сопоставимое повышение производительности, как в других современных методах, таких как стек-LSTM и выбор головы. В этой статье мы предлагаем многослойную модель внимания на основе стека для обучения seq2seq, чтобы лучше использовать структурную лингвистическую информацию. В нашем способе используют два двоичных вектора для отслеживания стека декодирования при синтаксическом анализе на основе перехода, и вводят многоуровневое внимание для захвата множества зависимостей слов в частичных деревьях. Мы проводим эксперименты на наборах данных PTB и CTB, и результаты показывают, что наша предлагаемая модель достигает современной точности и значительного улучшения маркированной точности по сравнению с базовой моделью seq2seq.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil rath suntasach bainte amach ag líonra seicheamh-go-seicheamh (seq2seq) i go leor tascanna NLP mar aistriúchán meaisín agus achoimriú téacs, ní féidir ach an cur chuige seo a chur i bhfeidhm ar pharsáil spleáchais atá bunaithe ar an trasdul gnóthachan feidhmíochta inchomparáide mar atá i stát eile. - modhanna ealaíne, mar shampla stack-LSTM agus roghnú cinn. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla aird ilchiseal bunaithe ar chruach d’fhoghlaim seq2seq chun faisnéis struchtúrach teangeolaíochta a ghiaráil níos fearr. Inár modh, úsáidtear dhá veicteoir dhénártha chun an stack díchódaithe a rianú i bparsáil tras-bhunaithe, agus tugtar aird ilchiseal isteach chun spleáchais ilfhocail a ghabháil i gcrainn pháirteacha. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí PTB agus CTB, agus léiríonn na torthaí go mbaineann ár múnla molta cruinneas den scoth amach agus feabhas suntasach ar chruinneas lipéadaithe maidir leis an tsamhail bonnlíne seq2seq.', 'el': 'Αν και το δίκτυο ακολουθίας-σε-ακολουθίας (έχει επιτύχει σημαντική επιτυχία σε πολλές εργασίες όπως η μηχανική μετάφραση και η σύνοψη κειμένου, η απλή εφαρμογή αυτής της προσέγγισης στην ανάλυση εξάρτησης με βάση τη μετάβαση δεν μπορεί να αποφέρει ένα συγκρίσιμο κέρδος απόδοσης όπως σε άλλες μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, όπως στοίβα και επιλογή κεφαλιού. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο προσοχής πολλαπλών επιπέδων βασισμένο σε στοίβες για τη μάθηση για να αξιοποιήσει καλύτερα τις διαρθρωτικές γλωσσικές πληροφορίες. Στη μέθοδο μας, δύο δυαδικά διανύσματα χρησιμοποιούνται για την παρακολούθηση της στοίβας αποκωδικοποίησης σε ανάλυση με βάση τη μετάβαση, και η πολυστρωματική προσοχή εισάγεται για να συλλάβει πολλαπλές εξαρτήσεις λέξεων σε μερικά δέντρα. Διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων PTB και CTB και τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και σημαντική βελτίωση στην ακρίβεια της σήμανσης σε σχέση με το βασικό μοντέλο seq2seq.', 'hu': 'Bár a szekvencia-szekvencia (seq2Seq) hálózat számos NLP feladatban jelentős sikert ért el, mint például a gépi fordítás és a szövegösszefoglalás, ennek a megközelítésnek az átmeneti alapú függőség elemzésére történő alkalmazása nem eredményezhet hasonló teljesítménynövekedést, mint más korszerű módszerek, például stack-LSTM és fejválasztás. Ebben a tanulmányban egy stack-alapú, többrétegű figyelemmodellt javasolunk a szek2seq tanulásra, hogy jobban hasznosítsuk a strukturális nyelvészeti információkat. Módszerünkben két bináris vektort használunk a dekódoló halom nyomon követésére átmeneti alapú elemzésben, és többrétegű figyelmet vezetünk be a több szófüggőség rögzítésére a részleges fákban. PTB és CTB adatkészleteken végzünk kísérleteket, és az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk a legkorszerűbb pontosságot és jelentős javulást ér el a címkézett pontosságban a kiindulási seq2seq modellhez képest.', 'ka': 'თუმცა სკენექცია-დან-სკენექცია (seq2seq) ქსელი მნიშვნელოვანი წარმატებით, როგორც მაქსინური გაგრძელება და ტექსტის სკენექციაციაში, მხოლოდ ამ პროგრამის გამოყენება განსაზღვრებულობის გადასაწყება შეუძლებელია შემდგომარებელი პრო ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მრავალური ინფორმაციის მოდელს, რომელსაც seq2seq სწავლად უკეთესი სტრუქტური ინფორმაციას უფრო მეტი სიტრუქტური ინფორმაციისთვის,  ჩვენი მეთოდიდან, ორი ბინერი გვექტორი გამოყენებულია გადაწყენების სტაკოდის სტაკოდის გადაწყენებაში, და მრავალური გეგნიერება გადაყენებულია მრავალური სიტყვის განსარულებულ ჩვენ PTB და CTB მონაცემების შესახებ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, და შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები მოდელის მონაცემები გავაკეთება სინამდვილეში სინამდვილეობა და მნიშვნელოვანი გაუკეთება მართლა', 'it': "Sebbene la rete sequenza-sequenza (seq2Seq) abbia raggiunto un successo significativo in molte attività NLP come la traduzione automatica e la sintesi del testo, semplicemente applicando questo approccio all'analisi delle dipendenze basata sulla transizione non può produrre un guadagno di prestazioni paragonabile come in altri metodi all'avanguardia, come stack-LSTM e la selezione della testa. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello di attenzione multi-layer basato su stack per l'apprendimento seq2seq per sfruttare meglio le informazioni linguistiche strutturali. Nel nostro metodo, due vettori binari sono usati per tracciare lo stack di decodifica nell'analisi basata sulla transizione, e l'attenzione multi-layer è introdotta per catturare dipendenze multiple di parole in alberi parziali. Conduciamo esperimenti su set di dati PTB e CTB, e i risultati mostrano che il nostro modello proposto raggiunge una precisione all'avanguardia e un significativo miglioramento della precisione etichettata rispetto al modello di base seq2seq.", 'lt': 'Although sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) network has achieved significant success in many NLP tasks such as machine translation and text summarization, simply applying this approach to transition-based dependency parsing cannot yield a comparable performance gain as in other state-of-the-art methods, such as stack-LSTM and head selection.  Šiame dokumente siūlome daugiasluoksnį dėmesio model į, skirtą sek2seq mokymuisi, siekiant geriau sutelkti struktūrinę kalbinę informaciją. Mūsų metode du dviejų vektorių naudojami dekodinimo kopijai sekti pereinamojo laikotarpio analizuojant, o daugiasluoksnis dėmesys skiriamas kelių žodžių priklausomybei daliniuose medžiuose nustatyti. Atliekame eksperimentus su PTB ir CTB duomenų rinkiniais, ir rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis pasiekia naujausią tikslumą ir žymiai pagerina žymėtą tikslumą, palyginti su pradiniu modeliu seq2seq.', 'mk': 'Иако мрежата од секвенца до секвенца (seq2seq) постигна значителен успех во многу NLP задачи како што се машински превод и резултат на текстот, едноставно апликацијата на овој пристап до анализирање на зависноста базирана на транзиција не може да даде споредлив профит како во другите најсовремени методи, како што се stack-LSTM и избор на глава. Во овој документ, предложуваме модел на многупотребно внимание за сеq2seq учење со цел подобро да се искористи структурната лингвистичка информација. Во нашиот метод, два бинарни вектори се користат за следење на групата на декодирање во анализирањето базирано на транзиција, а вниманието на повеќето слоеви е воведено за зафатување на повеќе зависности од зборови во делумни дрвја. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на компјутери на податоци ПТБ и ПТБ, и резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел постигнува најсовремена точност и значително подобрување на означената прецизност во однос на основниот модел seq2seq.', 'kk': 'Көп NLP тапсырмаларында, мысалы, компьютердің аудару мен мәтін тұжырымдамасында, тапсырмалар тізіміне (seq2seq) тапсырмалар сәтті желімге жеткізген болса да, бұл тәуелсіздік талдауына қолдану кәдімгі және басқа орындау әдістерінде, stack-LS Бұл қағазда, сек2сек оқыту үшін бірнеше қабат негіздеген көп қабатты назар үлгісін қолданамыз. Біздің әдімімізде екі бинарлық вектор өзгертілген талдау бойынша декодтау стегін қадағалау үшін қолданылады, және көп қабаттардың бірнеше сөздің тәуелдігін бөлшекті ағаштарда қатынасы Біз PTB және CTB деректер қорларының тәжірибелерін жасаймыз, және оның нәтижелері қолданатын моделіміздің күйінің дұрыстығын және негізгі seq2seq моделіне қатынау үшін жазылған дұрыстығын жақсарту жә', 'ms': 'Walaupun rangkaian jujukan-ke-jujukan (seq2seq) telah mencapai kejayaan yang signifikan dalam banyak tugas NLP seperti terjemahan mesin dan ringkasan teks, hanya melaksanakan pendekatan ini kepada penghuraian dependensi berasaskan-trangsi tidak dapat memberikan keuntungan prestasi yang sama seperti dalam kaedah-kaedah-state-of-the-art lain, seperti stack-LSTM dan pemilihan kepala. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model perhatian berbilang lapisan berdasarkan tumpukan untuk belajar seq2seq untuk menggunakan maklumat bahasa struktur yang lebih baik. Dalam kaedah kami, dua vektor binari digunakan untuk mengesan tumpukan penyahkodan dalam penghuraian berasaskan-transisi, dan perhatian berbilang lapisan diperkenalkan untuk menangkap dependensi perkataan berbilang dalam pokok bahagian. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data PTB dan CTB, dan hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa model kami direncanakan mencapai ketepatan state-of-the-art dan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam ketepatan labeled terhadap model dasar seq2seq.', 'mt': 'Għalkemm in-netwerk minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (seq2seq) kiseb suċċess sinifikanti f’ħafna kompiti NLP bħat-traduzzjoni tal-magna u s-sommarju tat-test, sempliċement l-applikazzjoni ta’ dan l-approċċ għall-analiżi tad-dipendenza bbażata fuq it-tranżizzjoni ma tistax twassal għal żieda komparabbli fil-prestazzjoni bħal fil-metodi l-aktar avvanzati oħra, bħall-istack-LSTM u l-għa żla tar-ras. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ attenzjoni fuq diversi livelli bbażat fuq il-pilastri għat-tagħlim seq2seq biex tingħata spinta a ħjar lill-informazzjoni lingwistika strutturali. Fil-metodu tagħna, jintużaw żewġ vetturi binarji biex jittraċċaw il-pil tad-dekodifikazzjoni fl-analiżi bbażata fuq it-tranżizzjoni, u tiġi introdotta attenzjoni fuq diversi saffi biex jinqabdu dipendenzi multipli tal-kliem fis-siġar parzjali. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta PTB u CTB, u r-riżultati juru li l-mudell propost tagħna jikseb l-aktar preċiżjoni avvanzata u titjib sinifikanti fil-preċiżjoni ttikkettata fir-rigward tal-mudell ta’ referenza seq2seq.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കിയും പോലുള്ള പല ജോലികളിലും വിജയം നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ടെക്സ്റ്റാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിലേക്ക് മാത്രമേ ഈ വഴിയില്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്റ്റാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പല-layer ശ്രദ്ധ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് വേണ്ടി  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d, രണ്ടു ബൈനറി വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ട്രാന്\u200dസിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങില്\u200d ഡെകോഡിങ് സ്റ്റാക്ക് പാട്ടിങ്ങിനെ കണ പിടിബിയും സിറ്റിബി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d സ', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр дарааллаас дарааллаар (seq2seq) сүлжээнд машины хөрөнгө оруулалт болон текст цуглуулалт шиг олон NLP даалгавруудад маш чухал амжилт гарч ирсэн ч энэ арга хэрэглэх нь шилжүүлэлт дээрх хамаарал хамааралтай ажиллагааны хуваалтын тулд бага зэрэг бусад урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны арга Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний хэлний мэдээллийг илүү сайжруулахын тулд seq2seq суралцах олон давхар дээрх олон давхар анхаарал загварыг суралцаж байна. Бидний арга хэмжээнд хоёр хоёр давхар вектор шилжүүлэлт суурилсан хуваалцах хэлбэрийг олоход хэрэглэгддэг. Мөн олон давхар анхаарал нь хэсэг модонд олон үгийн хамааралтай байдлыг ойлгохын тулд танилцуулдаг. Бид PTB болон CTB өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилт хийдэг. Үүний үр дүнд бидний санал болгон загвар нь суурь загварын зөв байдал болон суурь загварын тухай тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой сайжруулалт хийдэг.', 'no': 'Selv om sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) nettverk har oppnådd signifikante suksess i mange NLP-oppgåver som maskinsomsetjing og samansering av tekst, kan det ikkje gje noko sammenlignbare utvikling som i andre metodar for kunsten, som stack-LSTM og hovudutval, for eksempel å bruka denne tilnærminga til tolking av overgangsbaserte avhengighet. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit fleire lagoppmerksmodell for å lære seq2seq til å levera strukturlige lingvistikk. På metoden vårt blir to binære vektorar brukt for å spora dekodingsstakken i oversikningsbasert tolking, og fleire lag er innført for å henta fleire ord-avhengighet i delvis tre. Vi gjer eksperimenter på PTB- og CTB- datasett, og resultatet viser at vår foreslått modell når det er nøyaktig og betydelig forbedring i merket nøyaktig med hensyn til baseline seq2seq- modellen.', 'pl': 'Chociaż sieć sekwencji-do-sekwencji (seq2seq) osiągnęła znaczący sukces w wielu zadaniach NLP, takich jak tłumaczenie maszynowe i podsumowanie tekstu, zwykłe zastosowanie tego podejścia do parsowania zależności opartego na przejściu nie może przynieść porównywalnego zysku wydajności jak w innych najnowocześniejszych metodach, takich jak stos-LSTM i wybór głowy. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wielowarstwowy model uwagi oparty na stosach dla nauki seq2seq, aby lepiej wykorzystać strukturalne informacje językowe. W naszej metodzie, dwa wektory binarne są używane do śledzenia stosu dekodowania w parsowaniu opartym na przejściach, a wielowarstwowa uwaga została wprowadzona w celu uchwycenia wielu zależności słów w drzewach częściowych. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na zbiorach danych PTB i CTB, a wyniki pokazują, że proponowany model osiąga najnowocześniejszą dokładność i znaczącą poprawę precyzji etykietowanych w stosunku do modelu seq2seq bazowego.', 'ro': 'Deși rețeaua secvență-la-secvență (seq2Seq) a obținut succes semnificativ în multe sarcini PNL, cum ar fi traducerea automată și rezumarea textului, simpla aplicare a acestei abordări la analizarea dependențelor bazate pe tranziție nu poate genera un câștig de performanță comparabil ca în alte metode de ultimă oră, cum ar fi stack-LSTM și selecția capului. În această lucrare, propunem un model de atenție bazat pe mai multe straturi pentru învățarea sec2seq pentru o mai bună valorificare a informațiilor lingvistice structurale. În metoda noastră, doi vectori binari sunt folosiți pentru a urmări stiva de decodare în analizarea bazată pe tranziție, iar atenția pe mai multe straturi este introdusă pentru a capta dependențe multiple de cuvinte în copaci parțiali. Realizăm experimente pe seturi de date PTB și CTB, iar rezultatele arată că modelul nostru propus obține acuratețe de ultimă oră și îmbunătățiri semnificative în precizia etichetată în raport cu modelul de bază seq2seq.', 'si': 'නමුත් sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) ජාලයෙන් විශේෂ වැඩසටහන් ලැබුණු NLP වැඩසටහන් වලින් මැෂින් භාවිතය සහ පාළුවක් සංවිධානය සඳහා මේ වැඩසටහන් භාවිත විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්ටැක් අධාරිත විශේෂ භාෂාවික තොරතුරු සඳහා ස්ටැක් අධාරිත විශේෂ අවධානය කරනවා. අපේ විධානයේ බායිනාරි වෙක්ටර් දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝ අපි PTB සහ CTB දත්ත සැට් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වනවා අප', 'sr': 'Iako mreža sekvencija do sekvencije (seq2seq) postigla je značajan uspjeh u mnogim zadacima NLP, poput prevoda mašine i sažetka teksta, jednostavno primjenjivanje ovog pristupa analizaciji zavisnosti na temelju transicije ne može donijeti usporedno dobiti provedbu kao i u drugim metodama umjetnosti, poput stack-LSTM i izbora glave. U ovom papiru predlažemo model pažnje na staklama za seq2seq učenje za bolju uticaj na strukturne lingvističke informacije. U našoj metodi se koriste dve binarne vektore za praćenje komada dekodiranja u razmatranju na prijelazu, a višeslojna pažnja je uvedena kako bi uhvatila višestruku riječnu zavisnost u delovima drveta. Mi provodimo eksperimente na PTB i CTB datasetima, i rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model postiže tačnost stanja umjetnosti i značajno poboljšanje označene preciznosti u odnosu na osnovni model seq2seq.', 'sv': 'Även om sekvens-till-sekvens-nätverk (seq2seq) har uppnått betydande framgång i många NLP-uppgifter såsom maskinöversättning och textsammanfattning, kan bara tillämpa denna metod för övergångsbaserad beroendetolkning inte ge en jämförbar prestandaökning som i andra state-of-the-art metoder, såsom stack-LSTM och huvudval. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en stapelbaserad flerlagers uppmärksamhetsmodell för sek2seq lärande för att bättre utnyttja strukturell lingvistisk information. I vår metod används två binära vektorer för att spåra avkodningsstenen i övergångsbaserad tolkning, och flerlagers uppmärksamhet introduceras för att fånga flera ordberoenden i partiella träd. Vi genomför experiment på PTB- och CTB-dataset, och resultaten visar att vår föreslagna modell uppnår toppmodern noggrannhet och signifikant förbättring av märkt precision jämfört med baseline sek2seq-modellen.', 'so': "Inta kastoo shabakadda xilliga (seq2seq) uu ku guulaystay liibaano aad u weyn shaqaalaha NLP, tusaale ahaan tarjumaadka machine iyo qoraalka, marka lagu codsado qaababkan ku saabsan baaritaanka ku xiran ee baarlamaanka ku saleysan ku xirashada (seq2seq), ma soo saari karo faa'iido u eg, sida stack-LSTM iyo xulasha madaxa. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa model aad u jeedid darajada kala duduwan, taas oo loo barto macluumaadka luuqadaha dhismaha sawirka ee sawirka. Sida qaabkeenna waxaa loo isticmaalaa laba wadooyin oo labaad ah in lagu soo dabarayo jardiinada lagu soo wareejiyo, waxaana loo soo bandhigayaa in lagu qabsado hadal badan oo ku xiran geedaha qeybta ah. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaan ku saabsan PTB iyo CTB-ka, resultariyaduna waxay muuqataa in modelkayagii la soo jeeday ay uu gaadho saxda farshaxanka iyo hagaajinta aad u weyn ee saxda lagu qoray sameynta qaababka hoose-hoose xiliga 2seq.", 'ur': 'اگرچہ sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) نیٹ ورک بہت سی NLP ٹاکسٹوں میں بڑی موفقیت پہنچ چکی ہے جیسے ماشین ترجمہ اور ٹکس ترجمہ کرنا، یہ طریقہ صرف تغییر-based dependency پارسینگ کے لئے لازم کرنا ہے، اس طریقہ کے طور پر دوسرے ایٹ-آرت طریقوں میں، جیسے استک-LSTM اور سر انتخاب کے طور پر برابری کا اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک استک پر بنیاد رکھنے والی ملی لائر کی توجه موڈل کو سq2seq کی تعلیم کے لئے بہترین ساختار زبان شناسی معلومات کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ہمارے طریقے میں، دو بیناری ویکتروں کو تغییر کے بنیاد پارسینگ میں ڈیکوڈ سٹک کو ترک کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، اور بہت سی لائر کی توجه حصہ کے درختوں میں بہت سی کلمات اعتباری کو پکڑنے کے لئے پیش کیا جاتا ہے. ہم PTB اور CTB ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں، اور نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل سطح کے لحاظ کو پہنچ سکتی ہے اور اس کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ مضبوط مضبوط مضبوطی کے ساتھ لیبل کیا گیا ہے۔', 'ta': 'பின்வரிசை- to- seq2seq (seq2seq) network has achieved significant success in many NLP tasks such as machine translation and text summarization, simply applying this approach to transition-based dependency parsing can not produce a comparable performance gain as in other state- of-the-art methods, such as stack- LSTM and head selection. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு ஸ்டாக் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பல அடுக்கு கவனம் மாதிரி முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் சிறந்த வாழ்க்கை  In our method, two binary vectors are used to track the decoding stack in transition-based parsing, and multi-layer attention is introduced to capture multiple word dependencies in partial trees.  பிடிபி மற்றும் CTB தரவுத்தளங்களில் நாம் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். முடிவுகள் தெரியும் என்றால் நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி நிலையை சரியாக பெறுகிறது மற்று', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu qogʻozda, biz quyidagi muloqat muhim modelini seq2seq o'rganish uchun yaxshi darajali tizim tizimini o'rganish uchun o'rganish modelini o'ylaymiz. Bizning usulida ikki binal vektori o'zgarishning asosida kodlash usulini qidirish uchun ishlatiladi, va bir necha qancha so'zlarni bir necha so'zlarning bir necha daraxtda qo'llanmalarni qabul qilish uchun ko'p qanday so'zlarni qo'llash mumkin. Biz PTB va CTB maʼlumotlar tarkibini bajaramiz va natijalarimiz esa hozirgi modelimiz asosiy seq2seq modeli bilan ishlab chiqarishga muhim imkoniyatlarni bajarishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù mạng dãy-tới-dãy (seq2seq) đã đạt được thành công lớn trong nhiều công việc lập tư lệnh kiểu như dịch-máy và tổng hợp văn bản, đơn giản là áp dụng phương pháp này vào phân tách phụ thuộc dựa vào sự chuyển đổi không thể tạo ra lợi nhuận tương đương với các phương pháp nghệ thuật khác, như là nhạc đệm-HTTM và thủ não được chọn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình tập trung đa lớp với chồng để học cách tạo phản ngôn ngữ học. Trong phương pháp của chúng tôi, hai sinh tố nhị phân được dùng để theo dõi lớp vỏ trong phân tích chuyển tiếp, và tập trung nhiều lớp để xác định các từ thuộc phụ thuộc vào các loại cây. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên các tập tin mẫu PTB và CTB, và kết quả cho thấy rằng mẫu của chúng tôi đạt đến độ chính xác cao nhất và tiến bộ đáng kể với độ chính xác với mẫu cáp Kq2seq.', 'nl': 'Hoewel seq2seq (seq2seq) netwerk aanzienlijk succes heeft behaald in veel NLP-taken, zoals machinevertaling en tekstsamenvatting, kan het eenvoudig toepassen van deze benadering op overgangsgebaseerde afhankelijkheidsparsing geen vergelijkbare prestatiewinst opleveren als bij andere state-of-the-art methoden, zoals stack-LSTM en head selectie. In dit artikel stellen we een stapelgebaseerd meerlaags attentiemodel voor seq2seq leren voor om structurele taalkundige informatie beter te benutten. In onze methode worden twee binaire vectoren gebruikt om de decoderingsstapel te volgen in transitie-based parsing, en meerlaagse aandacht wordt geïntroduceerd om meerdere woordafhankelijkheden in gedeeltelijke bomen vast te leggen. We voeren experimenten uit met PTB- en CTB-datasets, en de resultaten tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid en significante verbetering van de gelabelde precisie bereikt ten opzichte van het baseline seq2seq-model.', 'da': 'Selvom sekvens-til-sekvens-netværket (seq2Seq) har opnået betydelig succes i mange NLP-opgaver såsom maskinoversættelse og tekst resuméering, kan simpelthen anvende denne tilgang til overgangsbaseret afhængighedsanalyse ikke give en sammenlignelig ydeevne gevinst som i andre state-of-the-art metoder, såsom stack-LSTM og hovedvalg. I denne artikel foreslår vi en stack-baseret multi-lags opmærksomhedsmodel til sek2seq læring for bedre at udnytte strukturel lingvistisk information. I vores metode bruges to binære vektorer til at spore afkodningsstammen i overgangsbaseret parsing, og opmærksomhed i flere lag introduceres til at fange flere ord afhængigheder i delvise træer. Vi udfører forsøg på PTB- og CTB-datasæt, og resultaterne viser, at vores foreslåede model opnår topmoderne nøjagtighed og signifikant forbedring i mærket præcision i forhold til baseline sek2seq-modellen.', 'hr': 'Iako mreža sekvencija do sekvencije (seq2seq) postigla je značajan uspjeh u mnogim zadacima NLP-a poput prevoda strojeva i sažetka teksta, jednostavno primjenjivanje ovog pristupa analizaciji ovisnosti na temelju transicije ne može donijeti usporedno dobiti učinkovitost kao i u drugim metodama umjetnosti, poput stack-LSTM i izbora glave. U ovom papiru predlažemo model pažnje na staklama na više slojeva za učenje seq2seq za bolju učenje strukturnih jezičkih informacija. U našoj metodi se koriste dvije binarne vektore za praćenje staze dekodiranja u razmatranju na temelju prijenosa, a višeslojna pažnja je uvedena kako bi uhvatila višestruku riječnu zavisnost u djelomičnim drvećem. Mi provodimo eksperimente na PTB-u i CTB-u, i rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model postigne tačnost stanja umjetnosti i značajno poboljšanje označene preciznosti u odnosu na početni model seq2seq.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че мрежата последователност към последователност (seq2seq) е постигнала значителен успех в много задачи като машинен превод и обобщаване на текст, просто прилагането на този подход към анализиране на зависимостта въз основа на преход не може да доведе до сравнимо повишаване на производителността, както при други съвременни методи, като например стек-LSTM и селекция на глави. В настоящата статия предлагаме многослоен модел на внимание, базиран на стек, за да се възползва по-добре структурната лингвистична информация. В нашия метод, два двоични вектора се използват за проследяване на декодиращия стек в базиран на преход анализ, а многослойно внимание се въвежда за улавяне на множество зависимости от думи в частични дървета. Провеждаме експерименти с набори от данни и резултатите показват, че нашият предложен модел постига най-съвременна точност и значително подобрение на етикетираната точност по отношение на базовия модел.', 'ko': 'sequence to sequence(seq2seq) 네트워크는 기계 번역과 텍스트 요약 등 많은 NLP 작업에서 현저한 성공을 거두었지만 이러한 방법을 변환에 기반한 의존항 해석에만 적용하면 다른 가장 선진적인 방법(예를 들어 창고 LSTM과 헤더 선택)과 상당한 성능 이득을 얻을 수 없다.본고에서 우리는 seq2seq학습을 위해 창고를 바탕으로 하는 다중 주의 모델을 제시하여 구조언어학 정보를 더욱 잘 활용하도록 한다.우리의 방법에서, 두 개의 이진 벡터는 변환을 기반으로 하는 해석 중의 디코딩 창고를 추적하고, 여러 층의 주의를 도입하여 일부 트리의 여러 단어의 의존을 포착하는 데 사용된다.PTB와 CTB 데이터 세트에서 실험한 결과 베이스라인 seq2seq 모델에 비해 우리가 제시한 모델이 가장 선진적인 정밀도에 도달했고 표기 정밀도를 현저히 향상시켰다.', 'id': 'Although sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) network has achieved significant success in many NLP tasks such as machine translation and text summarization, simply applying this approach to transition-based dependency parsing cannot yield a comparable performance gain as in other state-of-the-art methods, such as stack-LSTM and head selection.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model perhatian berbagai lapisan berdasarkan tumpukan untuk pelajaran seq2seq untuk menggunakan informasi lingwistik struktural yang lebih baik. Dalam metode kami, dua vektor binari digunakan untuk melacak tumpukan dekoding dalam penganalisan berdasarkan transisi, dan perhatian multi-lapisan diperkenalkan untuk menangkap berbagai dependensi kata di pohon-pohon bagian. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data PTB dan CTB, dan hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan mencapai akurasi state-of-the-art dan peningkatan signifikan dalam presisi yang ditandai terhadap model dasar seq2seq.', 'de': 'Obwohl Sequence-to-Sequence (seq2seq) Netzwerk in vielen NLP-Aufgaben, wie maschinelle Übersetzung und Textzusammenfassung, erhebliche Erfolge erzielt hat, kann die einfache Anwendung dieses Ansatzes auf transition-based dependence parsing keinen vergleichbaren Leistungsgewinn erzielen wie bei anderen State-of-the-Art Methoden, wie Stack-LSTM und Head Selection. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein stackbasiertes mehrschichtiges Aufmerksamkeitsmodell für seq2seq Lernen vor, um strukturelle linguistische Informationen besser zu nutzen. In unserer Methode werden zwei Binärvektoren verwendet, um den Decodierungsstapel in transition-based parsing zu verfolgen, und mehrschichtige Aufmerksamkeit wird eingeführt, um mehrere Wortabhängigkeiten in partiellen Bäumen zu erfassen. Wir führen Experimente an PTB- und CTB-Datensätzen durch, und die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell eine State-of-the-Art-Genauigkeit und signifikante Verbesserung der Etikettengenauigkeit gegenüber dem Baseline-seq2seq-Modell erreicht.', 'sw': 'Ingawa mtandao wa mfululizo wa mfululizo (seq2seq) umefanikiwa mafanikio makubwa katika kazi nyingi za NLP kama vile tafsiri ya mashine na muhtasari wa maandishi, kwa kutumia mbinu hii kwa ajili ya parge ya kutegemea msingi wa mpito hauwezi kutoa mafanikio yanayofanana kama vile katika njia nyingine za sanaa, kama vile stack-LSTM na chaguo la kichwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya uchunguzi wa ngazi mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa lugha bora za miundombinu ya utulivu. Katika njia yetu, vector mbili mbili zinatumiwa kufuatilia viwanja vya kupunguza mabadiliko katika mabadiliko yenye msingi wa mpito, na vifaa vingi vinavyoanzishwa kuchukua maneno mengi yanategemea katika miti ya sehemu. Tunafanya majaribio kwenye seti za databases za PTB na CTB, na matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu wa pendekezo unaweza kupata ufanisi wa hali ya sanaa na kuboreshwa kwa kiwango kikubwa cha sahihi kuhusu mifano ya msingi wa sex2seq.', 'tr': 'NLP täzelikleri ýaly sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) şebekege, maşynyň terjime we metin jemgyýeti ýaly köp başarnykly başarnykly bolup başarmady. Bu ýagdaýy transitsiýa daýanýan baglançylyk analysiýasyna uygulamak üçin beýleki möhüm taýýarlançylyklaryň başga durumynda, stack-LSTM we kell saýlamagyna ýaly karşılaş Bu kagyzda, seq2seq öwrenmegi üçin ýeterlik gaty daşarylan bir çoklu gaty üns nusgasyny çykarýarys. Bizim yönümizde, iki iki iki vektör geçici şekilde çözümlenme çubuğunu izlemek için kullanılır ve birçok katlanmış agaçlarda birden çoklu kelime bağlılığını parçalamak için kullanılır. Biz PTB we CTB veri setirleri üzerinde deneyler çykýarys we netijelerimiz teklip eden nusganymyz beýik setirli seq2seq nusganyna görä has dogrylygyny we dogrylygyny çykýardyklaryny görkez.', 'af': "Alhoewel sekvensie-na-sekvensie (seq2seq) netwerk betekende sukses in baie NLP-opdragte soos masjien oorsetting en teks opsomming bereik het, sal hierdie toegang eenvoudig toepassing tot transisie-gebaseerde afhanklikheid verwerking nie 'n vergelykbare prestasie verkry nie soos in ander staat-van-die-kuns-metodes, soos stack-LSTM en kopkeuse verkry nie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n stack-gebaseerde multi-layer aandag model vir seq2seq leer om beter voorbeeld te maak strukturele lingwisiese inligting. In ons metode word twee binêre vektore gebruik om die dekoding stapel in oorgang-gebaseerde verwerking te spor, en meerdere laag aandag is ingestel om veelvuldige woord afhanklikheids in deel bome te vang. Ons doen eksperimente op PTB en CTB-datastelle, en die resultate wys dat ons voorgestelde model bereik die state-of-the-art presies en betaling verbetering in die etiketeerde presies met betrekking tot die basisline seq2seq-model.", 'sq': 'Megjithëse rrjeti sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) ka arritur sukses të konsiderueshëm në shumë detyra NLP të tilla si përkthimi i makinave dhe përmbledhja e tekstit, thjesht zbatimi i kësaj qasje në analizimin e varësisë bazuar në tranzicion nuk mund të japë një fitim të krahasueshëm performancë si në metodat e tjera të gjendjes së fundit, të tilla si stack-LSTM dhe zgjedhja e kokës Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një model vëmendjeje me shumënivele bazuar në grumbull për mësimin seq2seq për të përdorur më mirë informacionin strukturor gjuhësor. Në metodën tonë, dy vektorë binarë përdoren për të gjurmuar grumbullin e dekodimit në analizimin bazuar në tranzicion, dhe vëmendja shumënivele futet për të kapur varësitë e fjalëve të shumëfishta në pemë të pjesshme. Ne kryejmë eksperimente në grupet e të dhënave PTB dhe CTB, dhe rezultatet tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar arrin saktësinë më të lartë dhe përmirësimin e rëndësishëm në saktësinë e etiketuar lidhur me model in bazë seq2seq.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን ወደ seq2seq (seq2seq) መረብ በብዙ NLP ስራዎችን ማሻሻሻል እና የጽሑፍ ማጠቃለያ አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት ለመተላለፍ በተመሳሳይ የታመነ ፓርቲ ለመጠቀም ብቻውን በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለseq2seq የተሻለ የደረጃ ቋንቋዎች መረጃዎችን ለመማር የተጨማሪን የብዙልደረጃን ተጨማሪ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሥርዓታችን፣ ሁለት የሁለተኛ የዌብ መቃኛዎች በክፍል በክፍል ዛፎች ውስጥ የዶዶድ መቆጣጠርን ለመከተል ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ በPTB እና CTB ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፣ ፍሬዎቹም በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የ-የ-art ግንኙነት እንዲደርስ እና በጽሑፎችን የጥሩ ግንኙነት እንዲደርስ እና በጽሑፎችን በጥያቄ ስክ2seq ሞዴል እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Seq2seq şəbəkəsi maşın tercüməsi və metin təmizləməsi kimi çoxlu NLP işlərində böyük başarısızlıq yetişdirsə də, bu təsiri təmizləməyə sadəcə istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edilən təmizlənmə təmizlənməsi üçün başqa şəbəkələrin, stack-LSTM və baş seçilməsi kimi, müqayisədə müqayisədə müqayisədə müəyyən bir performans kaz Bu kağızda, seq2seq öyrənməsi üçün çoxlu-katlı ünsiyyət modelini daha yaxşı yapışmaq üçün quruluş dil məlumatlarını təklif edirik. Bizim yolumuzda, hərəkət tərəfindən ayırılmaq üçün iki binal vektör kodlama çəkilməsi üçün istifadə edilir, və çoxlu səviyyə tərəfindən çoxlu söz bağlılıqlarını parçacıq ağaclarda tutmaq üçün təşkil edilir. Biz PTB və CTB veri quruları barəsində təcrübələr edirik, və sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif etdiyimiz modellərin təcrübə-təcrübə dəqiqliyinə və etiketli təcrübə modeli seq2seq modeli barəsində dəqiqliyinə müvafiq təcrübələrə gəlir.', 'hy': 'Չնայած, որ հաջորդականությունը հաջորդականություն է հասել շատ NSP-ի առաջադրանքներում, ինչպիսիք են մեքենայի թարգմանումը և տեքստի հաջորդականությունը, պարզապես այս մոտեցումը վերաբերյալ հաջորդականության վերլուծությանը հիմնված վերաբերյալ կախվածության վերլուծությանը չի կարող համեմատական արդյունավետության բարձրացում ստանալ,  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք համակարգով հիմնված բազմաշերտ ուշադրության մոդել, որպեսզի կարողանանք ավելի լավ օգտագործել կառուցվածքային լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիան: Մեր մեթոդի մեջ երկու երկու վեկտոր օգտագործվում են վերանայման հիմնված վերլուծության ընթացքում, և բազմաշերտերի ուշադրությունը ներկայացվում է բազմաթիվ բառերի կախվածությունների նկատմամբ մասամբ ծառերում: Մենք փորձարկումներ ենք կատարում ՀՏԲ և ՀՏԲ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, և արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր ճշգրտության և նշանակալի բարելավման պիտակավորված ճշգրտության վերաբերյալ ըստ ըստ 2Sex մոդելի:', 'bn': 'যদিও সেকেন্ড-ব্যবহার (seq2seq) নেটওয়ার্ক অনেক এনএলপি কাজের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সফলতা অর্জন করেছে, যেমন মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ, শুধুমাত্র ট্রান্সিং-ভিত্তিক নির্ভর পার্সিং এর কাছে  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি স্ট্যাক ভিত্তিক বহুস্তরের মনোযোগ মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে সেক্ট২সেকের জন্য ভালো ভাষার কাঠামো ভাষার আমাদের পদ্ধতিতে দুই বাইনারি ভেক্টর ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে ট্রান্সিং-ভিত্তিক পার্জিং-এ ডিকোডিং স্ট্যাক ট্র্যাক চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে এবং অংশীল গা We conduct experiments on PTB and CTB datasets, and the results show that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy and significant improvement in labeled precision with respect to the baseline seq2seq model.', 'bs': 'Iako mreža sekvencije do sekvencije (seq2seq) postigla je značajan uspjeh u mnogim zadacima NLP, poput prevoda strojeva i sažetka teksta, jednostavno primjenjivanje ovog pristupa analizaciji zavisnosti na temelju transicije ne može dobiti usporedbenu dobitak učinkovitosti kao i u drugim metodama umjetnosti, poput stack-LSTM i izbora glave. U ovom papiru predlažemo model pažnje na staklama, bazirani na višeslojnim slojevima, za učenje seq2seq, kako bi bolje uticali na strukturne jezičke informacije. U našoj metodi se koriste dvije binarne vektore za praćenje staze dekodiranja u razmatranju na prijelazu, a višeslojna pažnja je uvedena kako bi uhvatila višestruku riječnu zavisnost u djelomičnim drvećem. Mi vodimo eksperimente na PTB i CTB datasetima, i rezultati pokazuju da naš predloženi model postigne tačnost stanja umjetnosti i značajno poboljšanje označene preciznosti u odnosu na početni model seq2seq.', 'ca': "Encara que la xarxa seq2seq ha aconseguit un èxit significatiu en moltes tasques del NLP, com la traducció màquina i la resumida del text, simplement aplicant aquest enfocament a l'analització de dependencies basada en la transició no pot produir un guany de rendiment comparable com en altres mètodes més avançats, com la pila de LSTM i la selecció del cap. En aquest paper, proposem un model d'atenció multicapa basat en piles per a l'aprenentatge seq2seq per aprofitar millor la informació lingüística estructural. En el nostre mètode, dos vectors binars s'utilitzen per seguir la pila de decodificació en l'analització basada en transició, i s'introdueix atenció a moltes capes per capturar múltiples dependencies de paraules en arbres parcials. Hem fet experiments en conjunts de dades PTB i CTB, i els resultats demostren que el nostre model proposat aconsegueix una precisió més moderna i una millora significativa en la precisió etiquetada en relació al model de base seq2seq.", 'fa': 'اگرچه شبکه\u200cهای sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) موفقیت بزرگی در بسیاری از کارهای NLP مانند ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و ترجمه\u200cهای متن را به دست آورده است، این روش را به تقسیم بستگی بر اساس تغییر تغییر نمی\u200cتواند در روش\u200cهای دیگر قابل مقایسه\u200cای مانند استک-LSTM و انتخاب سر به دست آورد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل توجه بسیاری از طبقه\u200cها را برای یادگیری seq2seq برای اطلاعات ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی بهتر پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. در روش ما، دو ویکتور دوگانی برای ردیابی از استفاده می\u200cشوند که استفاده می\u200cشوند برای ردیابی استفاده می\u200cشوند استفاده می\u200cشوند که استفاده می\u200cکنند در پاره\u200cسازی بر اساس تغییر، و توجه بسیاری از طبقه\u200cها برای گرفتن بستگی\u200cهای کلمه ما آزمایش\u200cهای PTB و CTB در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای CTB انجام می\u200cدهیم، و نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما دقیقات وضعیت هنر و بهترین عملی در مورد دقیقات برچسب\u200cشده با نسبت به مدل سq2seq پایین رسیده است.', 'cs': 'Ačkoli síť sekvence-to-sekvence (seq2seq) dosáhla významného úspěchu v mnoha úkolech NLP, jako je strojový překlad a shrnutí textu, jednoduché použití tohoto přístupu k analýze závislostí založené na přechodu nemůže přinést srovnatelný zisk výkonu jako u jiných nejmodernějších metod, jako je stack-LSTM a výběr hlavy. V tomto článku navrhujeme vícevrstvý model pozornosti založený na zásobníku pro seq2seq učení, který lépe využívá strukturální lingvistické informace. V naší metodě jsou použity dva binární vektory ke sledování dekódovacího zásobníku v parsování založeném na přechodu a vícevrstvá pozornost je zachycena více slovních závislostí v dílčích stromech. Provádíme experimenty na datových sadách PTB a CTB a výsledky ukazují, že náš navržený model dosahuje nejmodernější přesnosti a významného zlepšení přesnosti značení ve srovnání se základním seq2seq modelem.', 'et': 'Kuigi järjestusest järjestusesse (seq2seq) võrk on saavutanud märkimisväärset edu paljudes NLP ülesannetes, nagu masintõlge ja teksti kokkuvõtlik koostamine, ei saa selle lähenemisviisi lihtsalt rakendamine üleminekupõhisele sõltuvuse parsimisele anda võrreldavat jõudlust nagu teiste kaasaegsete meetodite puhul, nagu stack-LSTM ja peavalik. Käesolevas töös pakume välja stack-põhise mitmekihilise tähelepanu mudeli seq2seq õppimiseks, et paremini kasutada struktuurset lingvistika teavet. Meie meetodis kasutatakse kahte binaarset vektorit dekodeerimisvirna jälgimiseks üleminekupõhises parsimises ning mitmekihilist tähelepanu kasutatakse mitme sõnasõltuvuse jäädvustamiseks osalistes puudes. Teostame katseid PTB ja CTB andmekogumitega ning tulemused näitavad, et meie pakutud mudel saavutab kaasaegse täpsuse ja märgistatud täpsuse olulise paranemise võrreldes baasmudeliga seq2seq.', 'fi': 'Vaikka sekvenssi-to-sekvenssi (seq2seq) -verkosto on saavuttanut merkittävää menestystä monissa NLP-tehtävissä, kuten konekäännöksessä ja tekstien yhteenvedossa, tämän lähestymistavan soveltaminen siirtymäpohjaiseen riippuvuuden jäsentämiseen ei voi tuottaa vastaavaa suorituskykyä kuin muissa huippuluokan menetelmissä, kuten stack-LSTM ja head selection. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme pinopohjaista monikerroksista huomiomallia seq2seq-oppimiseen, jotta voidaan hyödyntää paremmin rakenteellista kielitiedettä. Menetelmässämme käytetään kahta binäärivektoria dekoodauspaikan seuraamiseen siirtymäpohjaisessa jäsentämisessä, ja monikerroksinen huomio otetaan käyttöön useiden sanariippuvuuksien kaappaamiseksi osittaisissa puissa. Teemme kokeita PTB- ja CTB-aineistoilla, ja tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetulla mallilla saavutetaan huipputekninen tarkkuus ja merkittävä parannus merkintätarkkuudessa suhteessa perusmalliin seq2seq.', 'ha': "Ingawa masu saka-zuwa-seq2seq (seq2seq) sun sami babban rabo cikin wasu aikin NLP kamar fassarar mashine da kurarin matsayi, kuma masu amfani da wannan hanzara kawai zuwa masu shige da inganci da parse kan shawara, bã ya iya ƙara wani amfani da kwamfyutan ajiya kamar da ke cikin other state-of-the-art, kamar stack-LTRM kuma zaɓen kice. Daga wannan takarda, Munã buɗa wani misalin muhalli na masu karatun wa seq2seq da za'a iya ƙara wa kungiyar linguistic na salon da aka rubuta. Yana amfani da shiryoyi biyu masu ƙara cikin parse-mai bassi, kuma an introduce muhalli masu yawa ga su kãma masu sauri biyu masu kalma cikin itãcen rabo. We conduct experiments on PTB and CTB datasets, and the results show that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy and significant improvement in labeled precision with respect to the baseline seq2seq model.", 'sk': 'Čeprav je omrežje zaporedja v zaporedje (seq2seq) doseglo velik uspeh pri številnih nalogah NLP, kot sta strojni prevod in povzetek besedila, preprosta uporaba tega pristopa pri razčlenitvi odvisnosti na podlagi prehoda ne more prinesti primerljivega povečanja učinkovitosti kot pri drugih najsodobnejših metodah, kot sta stack-LSTM in izbira glave. V tem prispevku predlagamo večplastni model pozornosti za učenje seq2seq, ki bo bolje izkoristil strukturne jezikoslovne informacije. V naši metodi se uporabljata dva binarna vektorja za sledenje dekodiranju v prehodnem razčlenjevanju, večplastna pozornost pa je uvedena za zajemanje več besednih odvisnosti v delnih drevesih. Izvajamo poskuse na naborih podatkov PTB in CTB, rezultati pa kažejo, da naš predlagani model dosega najsodobnejšo natančnost in znatno izboljšanje označene natančnosti glede na osnovni model seq2seq.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang kuwi iki, kita supoyo sistem sing basa na stak-basa multi-layer atensi model kanggo seq2seq cilengan kanggo luwih dumaten structural lengwistiki. Pingsun Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk sing pernik-pernik nik dipun-pernik karo PNB karo dataset (ditambat) lan mbutuhak dhéwé kuwi nggawe sistem sing nyimpen dhéwé, kuwi jenis-jenis layang-jenis lan akeh lani kanggo nyelehake kuwi model seq2seq.', 'he': 'למרות שרשת רצף-לרצף (seq2seq) השיגה הצלחה משמעותית במשימות רבות של NLP כמו תרגום מכונת ומסכם טקסט, פשוט ההשתמשות של גישה זו לאבחן התלויות מבוסס במעבר אינה יכולה להביא רווח ביצועים שווה כמו בשיטות מצוינות אחרות, כמו Stack-LSTM ובחירה ראשית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל תשומת לב רב-שכבות מבוסס על ערימה ללמוד seq2seq כדי להשתמש יותר במידע שפתי מבנה. בשיטתנו, שני ווקטורים בינריים משתמשים כדי לאתר את ערכת הפענוח בחקירה המבוססת במעבר, ו תשומת לב רבות שכבות מוצגת כדי לתפוס תלויות מילים רבות בעצים חלקיים. אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים PTB ו-CTB, והתוצאות מראות שהמודל המוצע שלנו משיג מדויק מצוין ואמצעי שיפור משמעותי בדיוק מוטבע בנוגע למודל הסק2seq בסיסי.', 'bo': 'Although sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) network has achieved significant success in many NLP tasks such as machine translation and text summarization, simply applying this approach to transition-based dependency parsing cannot yield a comparable performance gain as in other state-of-the-art methods, such as stack-LSTM and head selection. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སུ་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྣ་ཆ་མཐོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར། གཉིས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཁང་བའི་གླེང་སྒྲའི་ནང་ནས་གཏོང་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We conduct experiments on PTB and CTB datasets, and the results show that our proposed model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy and significant improvement in labeled precision with respect to the baseline seq2seq model.'}
{'en': 'Dependency Grammar Induction with Neural Lexicalization and Big Training Data', 'ar': 'الاستقراء النحوي مع المعجم العصبي وبيانات التدريب الكبيرة', 'pt': 'Indução de Gramática de Dependência com Lexicalização Neural e Big Training Data', 'es': 'Inducción de la gramática de la dependencia con lexicalización neuronal y big training data', 'fr': 'Induction de la grammaire de dépendance avec lexicalisation neuronale et Big Training Data', 'ja': 'ニューラル・レキシカル化とビッグ・トレーニング・データによる依存文法誘導', 'hi': 'निर्भरता व्याकरण प्रेरण तंत्रिका Lexicalization और बड़े प्रशिक्षण डेटा के साथ', 'zh': '依赖性语法归神经词汇化、大训练数', 'ru': 'Индукция грамматики зависимости с нейронной лексикализацией и большими данными обучения', 'ga': 'Ionduchtú Gramadaí Spleáchais le Foclóireacht Néarach agus Sonraí Oiliúna Móra', 'hu': 'Függőségi nyelvtani indukció neurális lexikalizációval és nagy edzési adatokkal', 'ka': 'განსაკუთრებულობა გრამატური ინდექცია ნეირალური ლექსიკალიზაციის და დიდი განაკუთრების მონაცემებით', 'el': 'Επαγωγή γραμματικής εξάρτησης με Νευρική Λεξικό και Μεγάλα Εκπαιδευτικά Δεδομένα', 'it': 'Induzione grammaticale di dipendenza con lessicalizzazione neurale e Big Training Data', 'kk': 'Нейрондық лексикализациялау және үлкен оқыту деректерімен тәуелдік граматтардың индукциясы', 'lt': 'Dependency Grammar Induction with Neural Lexicalization and Big Training Data', 'ml': 'Dependency Grammar Induction with Neural Lexicalization and Big Training Data', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай эмэгтэйчүүд сэтгэл хөдлөл болон том дасгал өгөгдлийг', 'no': 'Avhengighetsgrammatiske induksjon med nøyrale leksikalisering og store treningsdata', 'pl': 'Indukcja gramatyki zależności z leksykalizacją neuronową i dużymi danymi treningowymi', 'mk': 'Зависност Грамарна индукција со неврална лексикализација и големи податоци за обука', 'ms': 'Induksi Gram Dependensi dengan Pemleksikan Neural dan Data Pelatihan Besar', 'mt': 'Dipendenza Induzzjoni Grammarja b’Lessikalizzazzjoni Newrali u Dejta dwar Taħriġ Kbar', 'ro': 'Inducţia gramaticală a dependenţei cu lexicalizare neurală şi date mari de antrenament', 'sr': 'Dependencija Grammar Indukcija sa neurološkim leksijalizacijom i velikim podacima obuke', 'si': 'විශේෂතාවක් ග්\u200dරාම්ටර් ඉන්දුක්ෂණය සමග න්\u200dයූරල් ලෙක්සිකිකිසිකය සහ ලොකු ක්\u200dරේන්සිකිසික', 'so': 'Induction ku xiran Grammar with Neural Lexicalization and Big Training Data', 'sv': 'Beroendegrammatisk induktion med neural lexikalisering och stora träningsdata', 'ur': 'اعتمادی گرامر انڈاکسیٹ نیورال لکسکسیکزیزی اور بزرگ ترینینگ ڈاٹ کے ساتھ', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த தரவுடன் நெயுரல் லெக்சிகேசைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் பெரிய பயிற்சி', 'vi': 'Sự phụ thuộc Truyền Thông Thái Thần kinh và Thông tin Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Зависимост граматична индукция с неврална лексикализация и големи тренировъчни данни', 'nl': 'Afhankelijkheidsgrammatica Inductie met Neurale Lexicalisatie en Big Training Data', 'hr': 'Zavisina Grammar Indukcija s neurološkim leksijalizacijom i velikim podacima obuke', 'da': 'Afhængighed Grammatik Induktion med Neural Lexikalisering og Big Training Data', 'de': 'Dependenzgrammatikinduktion mit neuronaler Lexikalisierung und Big Training Data', 'id': 'Indeksi Grammar Dependensi dengan Lexikalisasi Neural dan Data Pelatihan Besar', 'ko': '신경 어휘화와 대훈련 데이터에 기초한 의존 문법 귀납', 'fa': 'اعتماد گرم\u200cداری با داده\u200cهای تطابق عصبی و آموزش بزرگ', 'sw': 'Kutegemea Uwezeshaji wa Grammar na Uwekezaji wa Neural na Taarifa kubwa ya mafunzo', 'tr': 'Mazmunlyk', 'sq': 'Indeksioni i Gramave me Leksikalizimin Neural dhe të dhënat e Treinimit të Madh', 'af': 'Afhanklikheid Grammar Induksie met Neurale Leksikalisasie en Groot Oefening Data', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'az': 'Nöral təhsil və böyük təhsil məlumatları ilə bağımlılıq Grammar Induction', 'hy': 'Ախխտանգության գրամամային ինդուկցիան նյարդային լեքսիկալիզացիայի և մեծ ուսուցման տվյալների միջոցով', 'bn': 'নিউরাল লেক্সিক্সিজেশন এবং বড় প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্যের সাথে নির্ভর করা গ্রামার ইন্ডিজেশন', 'ca': 'Dependency Grammar Induction with Neural Lexicalization and Big Training Data', 'et': 'Sõltuvusgrammatika induktsioon neuraalse leksikaliseerimise ja suurte koolitusandmetega', 'cs': 'Indukce závislosti gramatiky s neuronovou Lexikalizací a velkými tréninkovými daty', 'bs': 'Dependencija Grammar Indukcija sa neurološkim leksijalizacijom i velikim podacima obuke', 'fi': 'Riippuvuuden kieliopin induktio hermoleksikalisoinnilla ja isolla harjoitteludatalla', 'jv': 'Diwuhente Gramatik Yhendisengan Neral Leksikalisator lan Bigge Triangkat data', 'ha': 'Indoyion with Neural Lex and Large Training Data', 'he': 'תלויות מערכת גרמה עם לקסיקליזציה נוירולית ומידע אימון גדול', 'sk': 'Indukcija slovnice odvisnosti z nevralno leksikalizacijo in velikimi podatki o treningu', 'bo': 'Dependency Grammar Induction with Neural Lexicalization and Big Training Data'}
{'en': 'We study the impact of big models (in terms of the degree of lexicalization) and big data (in terms of the training corpus size) on dependency grammar induction. We experimented with L-DMV, a lexicalized version of Dependency Model with Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) and L-NDMV, our lexicalized extension of the Neural Dependency Model with Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). We find that L-DMV only benefits from very small degrees of lexicalization and moderate sizes of training corpora. L-NDMV can benefit from big training data and lexicalization of greater degrees, especially when enhanced with good model initialization, and it achieves a result that is competitive with the current state-of-the-art.', 'ar': 'ندرس تأثير النماذج الكبيرة (من حيث درجة المعجمية) والبيانات الضخمة (من حيث حجم مجموعة التدريب) على تحريض الاعتماد النحوي. لقد جربنا L-DMV ، نسخة معجمية من نموذج التبعية مع Valence (Klein and Manning ، 2004) و L-NDMV ، امتدادنا المفرد لنموذج التبعية العصبية مع Valence (Jiang et al. ، 2016). نجد أن L-DMV يستفيد فقط من درجات صغيرة جدًا من المعجمية والأحجام المعتدلة من هيئات التدريب. يمكن أن تستفيد L-NDMV من بيانات التدريب الكبيرة وتوحيد الدرجات المعجمية ، خاصة عندما يتم تعزيزها بتهيئة نموذجية جيدة ، وتحقق نتيجة تنافسية مع أحدث التقنيات.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el impacto de los grandes modelos (en términos del grado de lexicalización) y los big data (en términos del tamaño del corpus de capacitación) en la inducción de la gramática de la dependencia. Experimentamos con L-DMV, una versión lexicalizada del Modelo de Dependencia con Valence (Klein y Manning, 2004) y L-NDMV, nuestra extensión lexicalizada del Modelo de Dependencia Neural con Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Descubrimos que L-DMV solo se beneficia de grados muy pequeños de lexicalización y tamaños moderados de cuerpos de entrenamiento. L-NDMV puede beneficiarse de grandes datos de entrenamiento y lexicalización de grados mayores, especialmente cuando se mejora con una buena inicialización del modelo, y logra un resultado que es competitivo con el estado de vanguardia actual.', 'pt': 'Estudamos o impacto de big models (em termos de grau de lexicalização) e big data (em termos de tamanho do corpus de treinamento) na indução de gramática de dependência. Experimentamos com L-DMV, uma versão lexicalizada do Modelo de Dependência com Valence (Klein e Manning, 2004) e L-NDMV, nossa extensão lexicalizada do Modelo de Dependência Neural com Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Descobrimos que o L-DMV só se beneficia de graus muito pequenos de lexicalização e tamanhos moderados de corpora de treinamento. O L-NDMV pode se beneficiar de grandes dados de treinamento e lexicalização de maior grau, especialmente quando aprimorado com boa inicialização do modelo, e alcança um resultado competitivo com o estado da arte atual.', 'fr': "Nous étudions l'impact des grands modèles (en termes de degré de lexicalisation) et des mégadonnées (en termes de taille du corpus de formation) sur l'induction de la grammaire de dépendance. Nous avons expérimenté L-DMV, une version lexicalisée du modèle de dépendance avec Valence (Klein et Manning, 2004) et L-NDMV, notre extension lexicalisée du modèle de dépendance neuronale avec Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Nous constatons que le L-DMV ne bénéficie que de très faibles degrés de lexicalisation et de tailles modérées de corpus d'entraînement. L-NDMV peut bénéficier de données d'entraînement volumineuses et d'une lexicalisation plus poussée, en particulier lorsqu'il est amélioré avec une bonne initialisation du modèle, et il obtient un résultat compétitif par rapport à l'état actuel de la technologie.", 'ja': '我々は、依存文法誘導に対するビッグモデル（語彙化の度合いの観点から）とビッグデータ（トレーニングコーパスのサイズの観点から）の影響を研究している。我々は、Valenceを備えた依存モデルの辞書化されたバージョンであるL - DMV （ Klein and Manning, 2004 ）およびValenceを備えた神経依存モデルの辞書化された拡張であるL - NDMV （ Jiang et al., 2016 ）を実験した。L - DMVは、非常に小さな程度の語彙化と中程度の大きさの訓練からのみ恩恵を受けることがわかっています。L - NDMVは、特に良好なモデル初期化で強化された場合に、ビッグトレーニングデータとより高い程度の語彙化の恩恵を受けることができ、現在の最先端と競合する結果を達成します。', 'hi': 'हम निर्भरता व्याकरण प्रेरण पर बड़े मॉडल (लेक्सिकलाइजेशन की डिग्री के संदर्भ में) और बड़े डेटा (प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस आकार के संदर्भ में) के प्रभाव का अध्ययन करते हैं। हमने एल-डीएमवी के साथ प्रयोग किया, वैलेंस (क्लेन और मैनिंग, 2004) और एल-एनडीएमवी के साथ निर्भरता मॉडल का एक लेक्सिकलाइज्ड संस्करण, वैलेंस के साथ तंत्रिका निर्भरता मॉडल का हमारा लेक्सिकलाइज्ड विस्तार (जियांग एट अल। हम पाते हैं कि एल-डीएमवी केवल लेक्सिकलाइजेशन की बहुत छोटी डिग्री और प्रशिक्षण निगम के मध्यम आकार से लाभ उठाता है। एल-एनडीएमवी बड़े प्रशिक्षण डेटा और अधिक से अधिक डिग्री के लेक्सिकलाइजेशन से लाभान्वित हो सकता है, खासकर जब अच्छे मॉडल प्रारंभिककरण के साथ बढ़ाया जाता है, और यह एक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है जो वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है।', 'zh': '臣等考之大模(词汇化而言)与大数(则训语料库大小而言)以语法归之。 吾试L-DMV,此Valence之词汇化版(KleinManning,2004)与L-NDMV,此吾Valence之神经赖其词法而广(Jiang等,2016)也。 见L-DMV仅受其小词汇化及中等规模之培训语料库。 L-NDMV益于大练数大程度之词汇化,而益之以善初始化,与先进之术争矣。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем влияние больших моделей (по степени лексикализации) и больших данных (по размеру обучающего корпуса) на индукцию грамматики зависимости. Мы экспериментировали с L-DMV, лексикализованной версией модели зависимости с валентностью (Klein and Manning, 2004) и L-NDMV, нашим лексикализованным расширением модели нейронной зависимости с валентностью (Jiang et al., 2016). Мы обнаружили, что L-DMV извлекает выгоду только из очень малых степеней лексикализации и умеренных размеров обучающих тел. L-NDMV может извлечь выгоду из больших обучающих данных и лексикализации более высоких степеней, особенно когда увеличено с хорошей инициализацией модели, и она достигает результата, который является конкурентоспособным с текущим современным.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an tionchar a bhíonn ag samhlacha móra (i dtéarmaí leibhéal na foclóireachta) agus ag sonraí móra (i dtéarmaí mhéid an chorpais oiliúna) ar ionduchtú gramadaí spleáchais. Rinneamar turgnamh le L-DMV, leagan lexicalized de Samhail Spleáchais le Valence (Klein agus Manning, 2004) agus L-NDMV, ár síneadh foclóirithe ar an Múnla Spleáchais Néaracha le Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Faighimid amach nach mbaineann L-DMV leas ach as céimeanna an-bheag foclóirithe agus méideanna measartha corpora oiliúna. Is féidir le L-NDMV leas a bhaint as sonraí oiliúna móra agus foclóireacht níos mó, go háirithe nuair a dhéantar é a fheabhsú le dea-thosú múnla, agus go mbaineann sé amach toradh atá iomaíoch leis an stát is nua-aimseartha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ დიდი მოდელეების (ლექსიკალიზაციის დონეზე) და დიდი მონაცემების (განაკეთებული კორპუსის ზომაზე) შესახებ გრამიკალიზაციის ინდექციაზე. ჩვენ ვკერიმენეთ L-DMV-ით, ლექსიკალიზებული განსაკუთრებულობის მოდელის ვერსია გალენსი (Klein and Manning, 2004) და L-NDMV-ით, ჩვენი ლექსიკალიზებული განსაკუთრებულობის მოდელის ლექსიკალიზება გალენსი (Jiang et al., 2016). ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ L-DMV მხოლოდ ლექსიკალიზაციის ძალიან პატარა გრადუსიდან და მედირატური ზომიდან გამოიყენება კოპორაციის განაკეთება. L-NDMV შეუძლია გავიყენოთ დიდი განსწავლების მონაცემების და ლექქსიკალიზაციის უფრო დიდი გრადუსის, განსაკუთრებით როდესაც უფრო დიდი მოდელური ინციალიზაციაზე გავიყენებული, და ის მიიღებ', 'hu': 'Tanulmányozzuk a nagy modellek (lexikalizációs fok) és a nagy adatok (edzési korpusz mérete) hatását a függőség nyelvtani indukcióra. Kísérleteztünk az L-DMV-vel, a Dependency Model lexikalizált változatával Valence-szel (Klein és Manning, 2004) és az L-NDMV-vel, a Neural Dependency Model lexikalizált kiterjesztésével Valence-szel (Jiang et al., 2016). Úgy találjuk, hogy az L-DMV csak nagyon kis mértékű lexikalizációs és mérsékelt méretű edzőtestek hasznát élvezi. Az L-NDMV előnyös lehet a nagy edzési adatokból és a nagyobb fokozatú lexikalizálásból, különösen ha jó modell inicializálással bővíti, és versenyképes eredményt ér el a jelenlegi korszerűséggel.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε τον αντίκτυπο των μεγάλων μοντέλων (όσον αφορά το βαθμό λεξικοποίησης) και των μεγάλων δεδομένων (όσον αφορά το μέγεθος του σώματος εκπαίδευσης) στην επαγωγή της γραμματικής εξάρτησης. Πειραματιστήκαμε με μια λεξιλογική έκδοση του μοντέλου εξάρτησης με τον Βέλενς (Κλάιν και Μάνινγκ, 2004) και τον Λ-NDMV, την λεξιλογική επέκταση του μοντέλου Νευρικής εξάρτησης με τον Βέλενς (Τζιάνγκ κ.λ., 2016). Διαπιστώνουμε ότι το L-DMV επωφελείται μόνο από τους πολύ μικρούς βαθμούς λεξιλογικής και τα μέτρια μεγέθη των εκπαιδευτικών σωμάτων. Το μπορεί να επωφεληθεί από τα μεγάλα δεδομένα κατάρτισης και τη λεξιλογική μεγαλύτερων βαθμών, ειδικά όταν ενισχυθεί με την καλή αρχικοποίηση του μοντέλου, και επιτυγχάνει ένα αποτέλεσμα που είναι ανταγωνιστικό με την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας.', 'it': "Studiamo l'impatto dei grandi modelli (in termini di grado di lessicalizzazione) e dei big data (in termini di dimensione del corpo di allenamento) sull'induzione grammaticale della dipendenza. Abbiamo sperimentato L-DMV, una versione lessicalizzata del modello di dipendenza con Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) e L-NDMV, la nostra estensione lessicalizzata del modello di dipendenza neurale con Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Troviamo che L-DMV beneficia solo di gradi molto piccoli di lessicalizzazione e dimensioni moderate di corpi di allenamento. L-NDMV può beneficiare di grandi dati di allenamento e lessicalizzazione di gradi maggiori, soprattutto se potenziato con una buona inizializzazione del modello, e raggiunge un risultato competitivo con l'attuale stato dell'arte.", 'kk': 'Біз үлкен үлгілердің (лексикализациялау градусына қарап) және үлкен деректер (корпус өлшеміне қарап) негізделік грамматикалық индукциясына қатынасын зерттейміз. Біз L-DMV, Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) және L-NDMV, нейрондық тәуелдік үлгісінің лексикализациялық нұсқасы мен Лексикализациялық Валенс (Jiang et al., 2016) үлгісінің лексикализациялық үлгісінің кеңейтуі. L-DMV тек кішкентай лексикализацияның және орташа оқыту корпорасының өлшемінен пайда алады деп ойлаймыз. L-NDMV үлкен оқыту деректерінен және лексикализациялаудан артық болады, осымен қатар жақсы үлгі инициализациялау үшін жақсы түрде көтерілген кезде, және ол назардағы суреттердің күйіне қарапайым н', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari kesan model besar (dalam terma darjah leksikalisasi) dan data besar (dalam terma saiz korpus latihan) pada induksi grammar dependensi. Kami eksperimen dengan L-DMV, versi leksikal Model Dependency dengan Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) dan L-NDMV, sambungan leksikal kami Model Dependency Neural dengan Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Kami mendapati bahawa L-DMV hanya bermanfaat dari darjah-darjah leksikalisasi yang sangat kecil dan saiz-saiz sederhana corpora latihan. L-NDMV boleh mengambil manfaat dari data latihan besar dan leksikalisasi darjah yang lebih besar, terutama apabila ditambah dengan awalkan model yang baik, dan ia mencapai keputusan yang bersaing dengan keadaan semasa.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d വലിയ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം പഠിക്കുന്നു (ലെക്സിക്സിക്ഷേഷന്\u200dറെ ഡിഗ്രിയില്\u200d ) വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളും (പരിശീലന കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് വലിപ്പ ലെക്സിക്സിക്കേഷന്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ ഒരു ലെക്സിക്സിക്കേറ്റ് സംസാരിച്ച സംസാരം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. വാലെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ (ക്ലെയിനും മാനിംഗ് 2004) ല്\u200d എംഡിഎംവി, ഞങ ലെക്സിക്സിഷേഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും മാത്രം പരിശീലന കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയില്\u200d നിന്നും ലെക്സിക്ഷേഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും ലേക്ക്സിക L-NDMV നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വലിയ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ ഡിഗ്രികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലെക്സിക്സിഷഷഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകരിക്കാം, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме влијанието на големите модели (во поглед на степенот на лексикализација) и големите податоци (во поглед на големината на обуката на корпусот) на индукцијата на граматиката на зависноста. Експериментиравме со L-DMV, лексикализирана верзија на Моделот на зависност со Валенс (Клајн и Манинг, 2004) и L-NDMV, нашата лексикализирана продолжување на Моделот на неврална зависност со Валенс (Jiang и ал., 2016). We find that L-DMV only benefits from very small degrees of lexicalization and moderate sizes of training corpora.  Л-НДМВ може да има корист од големи податоци за обука и лексикализација на поголеми степени, особено кога се подобрува со добра иницијализација на моделот, и постигнува резултат кој е конкурентен со сегашната најнова технологија.', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw l-impatt ta’ mudelli kbar (f’termini tal-grad ta’ lexikalizzazzjoni) u dejta kbira (f’termini tad-daqs tal-korpus tat-taħriġ) fuq l-induzzjoni tal-grammatika tad-dipendenza. Esperimentajna b’L-DMV, verżjoni lexikalizzata tal-Mudell ta’ Dipendenza b’Valence (Klein u Manning, 2004) u L-NDMV, l-estensjoni lexikalizzata tagħna tal-Mudell ta’ Dipendenza Newrali b’Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Issibu li l-L-DMV tibbenefika biss minn gradi żgħar ħafna ta’ lexicalization u daqsijiet moderati ta’ korpora ta’ taħriġ. L-NDMV tista’ tibbenefika minn dejta kbira ta’ taħriġ u lexikalizzazzjoni ta’ gradi akbar, speċjalment meta mtejba b’inizjalizzazzjoni tajba ta’ mudell, u tikseb riżultat li huwa kompetittiv mal-aktar avvanzat attwali.', 'lt': 'We study the impact of big models (in terms of the degree of lexicalization) and big data (in terms of the training corpus size) on dependency grammar induction.  Eksperimentavome su L-DMV, leksikalizuota priklausomybės modelio versija su Valencija (Klein ir Manning, 2004) ir L-NDMV, mūsų leksikalizuotas priklausomybės modelio išplėtimas su Valencija (Jiang et al., 2016). Matome, kad L-DMV naudinga tik iš labai mažo laipsnio leksikalizacijos ir vidutinio dydžio mokymo korpora. L-NDMV gali pasinaudoti dideliais mokymo duomenimis ir didesnių laipsnių lexikalizavimu, ypač kai jis patobulinamas gerai inicijuojant model į, ir jis pasiekia rezultatą, kuris yra konkurencingas su dabartiniu pažangiausiu.', 'pl': 'Badamy wpływ dużych modeli (pod względem stopnia leksykalizacji) oraz big data (pod względem wielkości korpusu treningowego) na indukcję gramatyki zależności. Eksperymentowaliśmy z L-DMV, leksykalizowaną wersją modelu zależności z Valence (Klein i Manning, 2004) oraz L-NDMV, naszym leksykalizowanym rozszerzeniem modelu zależności neuronowej z Valence (Jiang i al., 2016). Odkrywamy, że L-DMV korzysta tylko z bardzo małych stopni leksykalizacji i umiarkowanej wielkości korpusów treningowych. L-NDMV może korzystać z dużych danych treningowych i leksykalizacji większych stopni, zwłaszcza gdy jest wzbogacony o dobrą inicjalizację modelu, i osiąga wynik konkurencyjny w stosunku do obecnego stanu sztuki.', 'ro': 'Studiem impactul modelelor mari (în ceea ce privește gradul de lexicalizare) și al datelor mari (în ceea ce privește dimensiunea corpului de formare) asupra inducției gramaticale dependenței. Am experimentat cu L-DMV, o versiune lexicalizată a modelului de dependență cu Valence (Klein și Manning, 2004) și L-NDMV, extensia noastră lexicalizată a modelului de dependență neurală cu Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Considerăm că L-DMV beneficiază doar de grade foarte mici de lexicalizare și dimensiuni moderate ale corpurilor de formare. L-NDMV poate beneficia de date mari de formare și lexicalizare de grade mai mari, mai ales atunci când este îmbunătățită cu inițializarea bună a modelului, și obține un rezultat care este competitiv cu actualul stat-of-the-art.', 'mn': 'Бид том загварын нөлөөг (лексикализацийн хэмжээнд) судалж, том мэдээллийг (хөгжүүлэх корпус хэмжээний хувьд) грамматик үйлдвэрлэл дээр хамааралтай байдаг. Бид L-DMV, Валенс (Klein, Manning, 2004) болон L-NDMV, Валенс (Jiang et al., 2016) гэх мэт загварын Лексикализацийн загварын хувилбарыг хийсэн. Бид L-DMV зөвхөн лексикализацийн жижиг хэмжээнээс, дундаж хэмжээнээс ашигладаг. L-NDMV нь том сургалтын өгөгдлийн болон илүү их хэмжээний лексикализацийг ашиглаж чадна. Ялангуяа сайн загварын эхлэл дээр нэмэгдүүлсэн үед, энэ нь одоогийн урлагийн байдалтай өрсөлдөг үр дүн гарч чадна.', 'no': 'Vi studierer effekten av store modeller (i henhold til leksikalisering) og store data (i henhold til opplæringskorpusstorleiken) på grammatiske induksjon av avhengighet. Vi eksperimenterte med L-DMV, ein leksikalisert versjon av avhengighetsmodellen med Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) og L-NDMV, vår leksikalisert utviding av den neirale avhengighetsmodellen med Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Vi finn at L-DMV brukar berre frå svært lite grader med leksikalisering og moderate storleik på øvingskorpora. L-NDMV kan nytte frå store opplæringsdata og leksikalisering av større grader, spesielt når det er forbetra med godt opplæring av modellen, og det oppnår ein resultat som er konkurentivt med den gjeldande kunsttilstanden.', 'si': 'අපි ලොකු මෝඩේල්සිකාලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා (ලෙක්සිකාලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) සහ ලොකු දත්ත (ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කෝපුස්  අපි L-DMV එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය කළා, වැලෙන්ස් (Klein and Manling, 2004) සහ L-NDMV, අපේ ලෙක්සිකාලිස් විස්තරයක් වැලෙන්ස් (Jiang et al., 2016) සහ න්\u200dයූරාල් විස්තර මඩේල්ස් එක්ක ලෙ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි L-DMV ලෙක්සිකාලිස් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි කොර්පෝර L-NDMV පුළුවන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා දත්ත සහ ලෙක්සිකාලිස් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, විශේෂයෙන්ම හොඳ මෝඩේල් පටන් ගන්න වෙලාව', 'so': "Waxaannu baranaynaa saamaynta modelalka waaweyn (sida shahaadada leksikaliska) iyo macluumaadka waaweyn (sida loo eego tirada tababarka koopuska) oo ku xiran karo fasaxa xarunta. Waxaannu ku jirnay L-DMV, warqad lexicalized oo ay ka tirsan tahay Dependence Model with Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) iyo L-NDMV, lexicalized extension of the Neural Dependance Model with Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Waxaynu helnaa in L-DMV oo keliya faa'iido ka hela shahaado yar oo leksikalisisi iyo noocyada tacliinta dhexe. L-NDMV waxey faa’iido ka heli karaan macluumaadka waxbarashada waaweyn iyo shahaadada aad u weyn, khusuusan marka lagu kordhiyo bilowga modelka wanaagsan, sababtuna waxay gaadhaa mid ku tartanka xaaladda hore.", 'sr': 'Proučavamo uticaj velikih modela (u smislu leksikalizacije) i velikih podataka (u smislu veličine obuke korpusa) na gramatičku indukciju zavisnosti. Eksperimentirali smo sa L-DMV, leksikaliziranom verzijom model zavisnosti sa Valensom (Klein i Manning, 2004) i L-NDMV, našom leksikaliziranom produženom modela Neuralne zavisnosti sa Valensom (Jiang et al., 2016). Mi smatramo da L-DMV koristi samo od veoma male stepenice leksikalizacije i umjerene veličine obuke korpore. L-NDMV može imati korist od velikih podataka obuke i leksikalizacije većih stupnjeva, posebno kada se poboljšava sa dobrim modelom inicijalizacijom, i postiže rezultat koji je konkurentno sa trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar effekten av stora modeller (i termer av graden av lexikalisering) och big data (i termer av träningskorpusstorlek) på beroendegrammatik induktion. Vi experimenterade med L-DMV, en lexikaliserad version av Dependency Model med Valence (Klein och Manning, 2004) och L-NDMV, vår lexikaliserade förlängning av Neural Dependency Model med Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Vi finner att L-DMV endast gynnas av mycket små grader av lexikalisering och måttliga storlekar av träningscorpora. L-NDMV kan dra nytta av stora träningsdata och lexikalisering av högre grader, särskilt när den förstärks med bra modell initialisering, och det uppnår ett resultat som är konkurrenskraftigt med nuvarande state-of-the-art.', 'ta': 'பெரிய மாதிரிகளின் தாக்கத்தை நாம் படிக்கிறோம் (லெக்சிகிச்சிகலைசெயல்பாட்டின் degree) மற்றும் பெரிய தகவல் (பயிற்சி குறிப்பு அளவில்)  நாங்கள் L-DMV, வாலென்ஸ் மாதிரியின் லெக்சிக்சிகேட்டு பதிப்பு (கிளைன் மற்றும் மானிங், 2004) மற்றும் L- NDMV, வாலென்ஸ் உடன் நெயுரல் சார்பு மாதிரியின் வெளியேற்றம L-DMV மிகவும் சிறிய டிகிரி லெக்சிகேசியல் மற்றும் நடுவான பயிற்சி நிறுவனத்தின் அளவு மட்டுமே பயன்பாடுகளை கண்டு L-NDMV பெரிய பயிற்சி தகவல் மற்றும் பெரிய கலைப்பாட்டிலிருந்து உபயோகிக்க முடியும், குறிப்பாக நல்ல மாதிரி துவக்கத்தை மேம்படுத்தும்போது,', 'ur': 'ہم بڑے مدلکوں کے تاثیر پڑھتے ہیں (لکسیکلیزی کے درجے سے) اور بڑے ڈیٹے (ترینس کورپوس کی اندازہ سے) اعتمادی گراماری انڈاکسی پر۔ ہم نے والنس (Klein and Manning, 2004) اور L-NDMV (L-DMV) کے ساتھ ایک لکس کیسیکالیز موڈل کی ایک نسخه کی آزمائش کی، اور والنس (Jiang et al., 2016) کے ساتھ ہماری لکس کیسیکالیز ڈیفاندنسی موڈل کی استعمال کی۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ L-DMV صرف بہت چھوٹے درجے لکس کالیزا اور مدینہ اندازے کی تعلیم کورپورا سے فائدہ دیتا ہے. L-NDMV بہت بڑے درجے کی آموزش اور لکس کالیزا سے فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے، مخصوصا جب اچھی موڈل کی آغاز کے ساتھ بہتر ہو جاتی ہے، اور یہ ایک نتیجہ پہنچا سکتا ہے جو موجود هنر کی حالت سے مسابقه ہے.', 'uz': "Biz katta modellarning effektini o'rganamiz (leksikalik darajasi darajada) va katta maʼlumot (kompyuterning oʻlchamiga) qo'shish grammatika tashkilotga ishlatiladik. Biz Valens (Klein va Manning, 2004) va L-NDMV (L-DMV) bilan leksikalisiz moduli versiyasi bilan o'tibor berdik va Valensning (Jiang et, 2016) bilan bizning leksikalisiz muvaffaqiyatli modulimiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, L-DMV faqat Leksikalik darajasi va taʼminlovchi kompaniya katta taʼminlovchisi huquqlaridan foydalanishini anglatadi. L-NDMV juda katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumot va katta darajadagi leksikatsiyalarni foydalanishi mumkin, hususan yaxshi modelni ishga tushirishda bajariladigan paytda, va u joriy sananing holatida rivojlanishiga ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu tác động của các mô hình lớn (theo mức độ ngôn ngữ) và các dữ liệu lớn (theo dạng dạng dạng tập thể huấn) vào quy trình nhận ngữ pháp phụ thuộc. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm với L-DMV, một phiên bản ngôn ngữ của chế độ phụ thuộc với Valence (Klein và Manning, 2001) và L-NDMV, bản khai thác từ của Mô hình Thần kinh thuộc với Valence (Jiang et al., thậm chí 2006). Chúng tôi thấy L-DMV chỉ có lợi lộc từ độ ngôn ngữ rất nhỏ và tầm vóc của tập đoàn. L-NDMV có thể được hưởng lợi từ dữ liệu huấn luyện lớn và từ ngữ có độ cao hơn, đặc biệt khi được tăng cường bằng cách khởi đầu mô hình tốt, và đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh với hiện thời.', 'bg': 'Изследваме влиянието на големите модели (по отношение на степента на лексикализация) и големите данни (по отношение на размера на тренировъчния корпус) върху индукцията на граматиката на зависимостта. Експериментирахме с лексикализирана версия на модела на зависимост с Валенс (Клайн и Манинг, 2004) и нашето лексикализирано разширение на модела на невронна зависимост с Валенс (Дзян и др., 2016). Намираме, че Л-ДМВ се възползва само от много малки степени на лексикализация и умерени размери на тренировъчните корпуси. Могат да се възползват от големи данни за обучение и лексикализация на по-големи степени, особено когато са подобрени с добра инициализация на модела, и постигат резултат, който е конкурентен с настоящото състояние на изкуството.', 'nl': "We bestuderen de impact van big modellen (in termen van de mate van lexicalisering) en big data (in termen van de grootte van het trainingscorpus) op afhankelijkheidsgrammatica inductie. We experimenteerden met L-DMV, een lexicaliseerde versie van Afhankelijkheidsmodel met Valence (Klein en Manning, 2004) en L-NDMV, onze gelexicaliseerde uitbreiding van het Neural Afhankelijkheidsmodel met Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). We vinden dat L-DMV alleen profiteert van zeer kleine niveaus van lexicalisering en matige grootte van trainingscorpora's. L-NDMV kan profiteren van grote trainingsdata en lexicalisering van grotere graden, vooral wanneer verbeterd met een goede model initialisatie, en het bereikt een resultaat dat concurrerend is met de huidige state-of-the-art.", 'da': 'Vi studerer effekten af store modeller (med hensyn til graden af leksikalisering) og big data (med hensyn til træningskorpusstørrelsen) på afhængighedsgrammatik induktion. Vi eksperimenterede med L-DMV, en leksikaliseret version af Dependency Model med Valence (Klein og Manning, 2004) og L-NDMV, vores leksikaliserede udvidelse af Neural Dependency Model med Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Vi finder ud af, at L-DMV kun drager fordel af meget små grader af leksikalisering og moderate størrelser af træningskorpora. L-NDMV kan drage fordel af store træningsdata og leksikalisering af større grader, især når forstærket med god model initialisering, og det opnår et resultat, der er konkurrencedygtigt med den nuværende state-of-the-art.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen den Einfluss von Big Modellen (in Bezug auf den Grad der Lexikalisierung) und Big Data (in Bezug auf die Größe des Trainingskorpus) auf die Induktion der Abhängigkeitsgrammatik. Wir experimentierten mit L-DMV, einer lexikalisierten Version des Abhängigkeitsmodells mit Valence (Klein und Manning, 2004) und L-NDMV, unserer lexikalisierten Erweiterung des neuronalen Abhängigkeitsmodells mit Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Wir stellen fest, dass L-DMV nur von sehr geringen Lexikalisierungsgraden und moderaten Größen von Trainingskorpora profitiert. L-NDMV kann von großen Trainingsdaten und Lexikalisierung größerer Grade profitieren, insbesondere wenn sie durch eine gute Modellinitialisierung ergänzt wird, und erzielt ein Ergebnis, das mit dem aktuellen Stand der Technik konkurrenzfähig ist.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo učinak velikih modela (u smislu stupnja leksikalizacije) i velikih podataka (u smislu veličine obuke korpusa) na indukciju gramatike zavisnosti. Eksperimentirali smo s L-DMV, leksikaliziranom verzijom model ovisnosti s Valencem (Klein i Manning, 2004) i L-NDMV, našem leksikaliziranom produženom modela neuralne zavisnosti s Valencem (Jiang et al., 2016). Mi smatramo da L-DMV koristi samo od vrlo malih stupnjeva leksikalizacije i umjerene veličine obuke korpore. L-NDMV može imati korist od velikih podataka obuke i leksikalizacije većih stupnjeva, posebno kad se poboljšava s dobrom inicijalizacijom model a, i postići rezultat koji je konkurentno s trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti.', 'sw': 'Tunafuatilia athari ya mifano makubwa (kwa kiwango cha kiwango cha ukosefu wa lexico) na taarifa kubwa (kwa kiasi cha ukubwa wa mafunzo ya kompyuta) kwa kutegemea viwanda vya kompyuta. We experimented with L-DMV, a lexicalized version of Dependency Model with Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) and L-NDMV, our lexicalized extension of the Neural Dependency Model with Valence (Jiang et al., 2016).  Tunaona kuwa L-DMV ni faida tu kutoka kwa kiwango kidogo cha uchochezi na kiwango cha wastani cha mafunzo. L-NDMV inaweza kufaidika na takwimu kubwa za mafunzo na ukosefu wa vyeo vikubwa, hasa pale ambapo umeongezeka kwa mifano mazuri ya kuanzishwa, na inapata matokeo ambayo yanashindana na hali ya sanaa ya sasa.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari dampak model besar (dalam terma derajat leksikalisasi) dan data besar (dalam terma ukuran tubuh pelatihan) pada induksi gramatika tergantung. Kami eksperimen dengan L-DMV, versi leksikalisasi Dependency Model dengan Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) dan L-NDMV, ekstensi leksikalisasi kami dari Neural Dependency Model dengan Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Kami menemukan bahwa L-DMV hanya berguna dari derajat yang sangat kecil dari leksikalisasi dan ukuran moderat dari korpora latihan. L-NDMV dapat mengambil manfaat dari data latihan besar dan leksikalisasi dari derajat yang lebih besar, terutama ketika meningkat dengan model inisialisasi yang baik, dan itu mencapai hasil yang kompetitif dengan state-of-the-art saat ini.', 'fa': 'ما تاثیر مدلهای بزرگ (به عنوان درجه زبان\u200cشناسی) و داده\u200cهای بزرگ (به عنوان اندازه\u200cی کورپوس آموزش) روی تولید گرم\u200cشناسی مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. ما با L-DMV آزمایش کردیم، یک نسخه\u200cی مدل اعتمادی با والنس (Klein and Manning, 2004) و L-NDMV، لاکسیکولیزی\u200cسازی ما از مدل اعتمادی عصبی با والنس (Jiang et al., 2016). ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که L-DMV فقط از درجه\u200cهای بسیار کوچک زبان\u200cشناسی و اندازه\u200cهای متوسط آموزش شرکت سود می\u200cدهد. L-NDMV می تواند از داده های بزرگ آموزش و زبان\u200cشناسی درجه\u200cهای بزرگتر سود دهد، مخصوصا وقتی با آغاز مدل خوب بالا برده شود، و نتیجه\u200cای را که با حالت هنر فعلی رقابت می\u200cکند می\u200cرسد.', 'ko': '우리는 큰 모델(어휘화 정도에 따라)과 빅데이터(훈련 어료 라이브러리 크기에 따라)가 문법 귀납에 의존하는 영향에 대해 연구했다.우리는 L-DMV와 L-NDMV로 실험을 진행했다. L-DMV는 유가의존모델의 어휘화 버전(Klein과 Manning, 2004)이고 L-NDMV는 유가의존모델의 어휘화 확장(Jiang 등, 2016)이다.우리는 L-DMV가 아주 작은 어휘화 정도와 중간 규모의 훈련 자료 라이브러리에서만 이익을 얻는 것을 발견했다.L-NDMV는 큰 훈련 데이터와 더 큰 어휘화에서 이득을 볼 수 있다. 특히 좋은 모델을 초기화하여 강화할 때 현재의 가장 선진적인 수준과 경쟁하는 결과를 실현할 수 있다.', 'am': 'የታላቁ ሞዴላዎች (የሊክሲካሌ ክፍል) እና ታላላቅ ዳታዎችን (የኮፕስ መጠን ክፍለ ክፍል) በተደገመ grammar ክፍል ላይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ በ L-DMV፣ የዋላንስ እና ማኒንግ እና L-NDMV፣ የነዌራዊ ድጋፍ ሞዴል እና ዋላንስ ጋር (ጂang et.2016) የሊክሲካዊ ግንኙነት ሞዴል አሰራጠርን ፈተናል፡፡ L-DMV ከሌክሲካዊ እና ከመካከለኛ ትምህርት ክፍሎች ከታናሽ ደረጃዎች ብቻ ጥቅም ብቻ ሲሆን እናገኛለን፡፡ L-NDMV ከታላቁ ትምህርት ዳታዎች እና ከልዩ ደረጃዎች ሊክሲሲነ ይችላል፤ ይልቁንም በመልካም ሞዴል መጀመሪያ በተሻለ ጊዜ እና በሁለተኛው የ-art ሥርዓት ጋር የሚታገል ፍጻሜን ያገኛል፡፡', 'tr': 'Biz uly nusgalaryň (leksikalizasyň derejesi barada) we uly maglumatlaryň täsirini gramatik induksyona görýäris. Biz L-DMV, Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) we L-NDMV, biziň leksikilizat nusgasyzlyk Modeli Valence bilen (Jiang et al., 2016) synanyşypdyk. L-DMV diňe kiçijik derejeden lezikalaýşlyk we orta derejeden üçin faydalanýar öýdýäris. L', 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë ndikimin e modeleve të mëdha (në terma të gradës së lexikalizimit) dhe të dhënave të mëdha (në terma të madhësisë së trupit të trajnimit) në induksionin e varësisë gramatike. Eksperimentuam me L-DMV, një version lexikalizuar i Modelit të Varësisë me Valencën (Klein dhe Manning, 2004) dhe L-NDMV, zgjerimi ynë lexikalizuar i Modelit të Varësisë Neurale me Valencën (Jiang et al., 2016). We find that L-DMV only benefits from very small degrees of lexicalization and moderate sizes of training corpora.  L-NDMV mund të përfitojë nga të dhënat e mëdha të trainimit dhe lexikalizimit të shkallëve më të mëdha, veçanërisht kur përmirësohet me inicializimin e model it të mirë dhe arrin një rezultat që është konkurrues me gjendjen aktuale të teknologjisë.', 'af': "Ons studieer die effek van groot modele (in terms of the degree of lexicalization) en groot data (in terms of the training corpus size) op afhanklikheid grammar induksie. Ons het eksperimenteer met L-DMV, 'n lexikaliseerde weergawe van afhanklikheidmodeel met Valence (Klein en Manning, 2004) en L-NDMV, ons leksikaliseerde uitbreiding van die neurale afhanklikheidmodeel met Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). Ons vind dat L-DMV slegs voordeel van baie klein grade leksikalisasie en moderate grootte van onderwerp korpora. L-NDMV kan voordeel van groot onderwerp data en leksikalisasie van groter grade, veral wanneer verhoog is met goeie model inisialisering, en dit bereik 'n resultaat wat medelykbaar is met die huidige staat van die kuns.", 'bs': 'Proučavamo učinak velikih modela (u smislu leksikalizacije) i velikih podataka (u smislu veličine obuke korpusa) na gramatičku indukciju ovisnosti. Eksperimentirali smo s L-DMV, leksikaliziranom verzijom modela ovisnosti sa Valensom (Klein i Manning, 2004) i L-NDMV, našem leksikaliziranom produženom modela neuralne zavisnosti sa Valensom (Jiang et al., 2016). Mi smatramo da L-DMV koristi samo od vrlo malih stupnjeva leksikalizacije i umjerene veličine treninga korpore. L-NDMV može imati korist od velikih podataka obuke i leksikalizacije većih stupnjeva, posebno kad se poboljšava sa dobrom inicijalizacijom model a, i ostvarila je rezultat koji je konkurentno sa trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մեծ մոդելների ազդեցությունը (լեքսիկալիզացիայի մակարդակի առումով) և մեծ տվյալները (մարմնի ուսումնասիրության չափի առումով) կախվածության գրամական ինդուկցիայի վրա: Մենք փորձեցինք L-DMV-ի հետ, Վալենսի կախվածության մոդելի լեքսիկալիզացված տարբերակը (Կլայնը և Մանինգը, 2004) և L-ԴՆԴՄՎ-ի հետ, մեր լեքսիկալիզացված ընդլայնումը Նյարդային կախվածության մոդելի Վալենսի հետ (Ջիանգ և այլն, 2016). Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ L-DMV-ը օգտակար է միայն շատ փոքր աստիճանների լեքսիկալիզացիայի և միջին չափերի ուսուցման մարմնի համար: L-NDMV can benefit from big training data and lexicalization of greater degrees, especially when enhanced with good model initialization, and it achieves a result that is competitive with the current state-of-the-art.', 'ca': "Estudem l'impacte dels grans models (en termes de grau de lexicalització) i les grans dades (en termes de mida del cos d'entrenament) en l'inducció gramàtica de la dependencia. We experimented with L-DMV, a lexicalized version of Dependency Model with Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) and L-NDMV, our lexicalized extension of the Neural Dependency Model with Valence (Jiang et al., 2016).  Trobem que L-DMV només beneficia de graus molt petits de lexicalització i de mida moderada de corpora d'entrenament. L-NDMV pot beneficiar de grans dades d'entrenament i lexicalització de graus més grans, especialment quan es millora amb una bona inicialització del model, i aconsegueix un resultat competitiu amb l'actualitat.", 'az': 'Biz böyük modellərin təsirini (leksikalizasyon dərəsi ilə) və böyük məlumatların (təhsil corpus böyüklüyü ilə) müvəffəqiyyət grammatik induksyonu təhsil edirik. Biz Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) və L-NDMV, Valence (Jiang et al., 2016) ilə Nöral bağımlılıq Modelinin leksikilizatlı Vörümünü L-DMV ilə imtahana çəkdik. L-DMV yalnız küçük dərəcələrdən və orta ölçülərdən ötrü təhsil korporasından faydalanır. L-NDMV böyük təhsil məlumatlarından və daha böyük dərəcələrin leksikalizasyonundan fayda verə bilər, özlərinə də yaxşı modellərin başlanğıcılığı ilə yaxşılaşdığı zaman, və bu məlumatların hökmünün müqayisədə müqayisədə olduğu sonuçlarına yetişər.', 'bn': 'আমরা বড় মডেলের প্রভাব গবেষণা করছি (লেক্সিক্সিজেশনের ডিগ্রি এবং বড় তথ্য (প্রশিক্ষণ কোর্পাসের আকারের ব্যাপারে) নির্ভর করে গ্রামার শ ভ্যালেন্সের (ক্লিন এবং ম্যানিং, ২০০৪) এবং এল-এনডিএমভি নিউরাল মেন্টির নির্ভর মডেলের লেক্সিক্সিক্যালেন্সি মোডেলের একটি লেক্সিক্সিকাল সংস্করণে আমরা পরীক্ষা করছি। আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে এল-ডিএমভি শুধুমাত্র লেক্সিক্সিজেশন এবং মধ্যবর্তী প্রশিক্ষণ কোর্পোরায় সুবিধা দিয়েছে। L-NDMV বড় প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য এবং বেশী ডিগ্রীর লেক্সিকেশন থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করতে পারে, বিশেষ করে যখন ভাল মডেল প্রাথমিকভাবে বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করা হয়, এবং এট', 'cs': 'Studujeme vliv velkých modelů (z hlediska stupně lexikalizace) a big dat (z hlediska velikosti tréninkového korpusu) na indukci závislosti gramatiky. Experimentovali jsme s L-DMV, lexikalizovanou verzí modelu závislosti s Valencem (Klein a Manning, 2004) a L-NDMV, naším lexikalizovaným rozšířením modelu neuronové závislosti s Valencem (Jiang et al., 2016). Zjišťujeme, že L-DMV těží pouze z velmi malých stupňů lexikalizace a střední velikosti tréninkových korpusů. L-NDMV může těžit z velkých tréninkových dat a lexikalizace větších stupňů, zejména pokud je rozšířen o dobrou inicializaci modelu, a dosahuje výsledku, který je konkurenceschopný současnému stavu techniky.', 'et': "Uurime suurte mudelite (leksikaliseerimise astme) ja suurandmete (koolituskorpuse suuruse) mõju sõltuvusgrammatika induktsioonile. Me eksperimenteerisime L-DMV-ga, sõltuvusmudeli leksikaliseeritud versiooniga Valence'iga (Klein and Manning, 2004) ja L-NDMV-ga, meie neurosõltuvusmudeli leksikaliseeritud laiendusega Valence'iga (Jiang et al., 2016). Leiame, et L-DMV saab kasu ainult väga väikesest leksikaliseerimise astmest ja mõõdukatest treeningkorpustest. L-NDMV võib saada kasu suurtest koolitusandmetest ja suuremate kraadide leksikaliseerimisest, eriti kui seda täiustatakse hea mudeli initsialiseerimisega, ning see saavutab tulemuse, mis on konkurentsivõimeline praeguse tehnika tasemega.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme suurten mallien (leksikalisoitumisasteen) ja big datan (koulutuskorpusen koon) vaikutusta riippuvuuden kieliopin induktioon. Kokeilimme L-DMV:tä, leksikalisoitua versiota Dependency Modelista Valencella (Klein ja Manning, 2004) ja L-NDMV:tä, leksikalisoitua laajennustamme Neural Dependency Modelista Valencella (Jiang et al., 2016). Havaitsemme, että L-DMV hyötyy vain hyvin pienistä leksikalisoitumisasteista ja kohtalaisista koulutuskorpusista. L-NDMV voi hyötyä big training datasta ja suurempien tutkintojen leksikalisoinnista, varsinkin kun sitä parannetaan hyvällä mallialustalla, ja se saavuttaa tuloksen, joka on kilpailukykyinen nykytekniikan kanssa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntuk akeh model luwih (sampek deggres) lan data bekanyir dhéwé (tambah kuwi tindakané cara-cara kuwi tindakané). Awak dhéwé énpembersene karo L-DMV, akeh leksikalisasi versi Dewekenenten model karo Valénse (klain and Manning, 2004) lan L-NDMV, awak dhéwé leksikalisasi tanggal Néural Dewekenenten model karo Valénse (Jiang et al, 2011). Awak dhéwé ngerti, L-DMV kuwi anake bener dhéwé kuwi tindang langkung karo iso nggawe barang nggawe ketahanan mrupu. L-NDMV iso nglanggar aturan data sing luwih nggawe lan kelikkalisi aturan sing luwih dumateng, supoyo iso nggoleki modèl sing luwih apik, lan iso nggawe sistem sing beraksikno iki dadi wis dipolehasno karo Stat-of-the-arts', 'he': 'אנו לומדים את ההשפעה של דוגמנים גדולים (במונחים של תואר הלקסיקליזציה) ובנתונים גדולים (במונחים של גודל הקורפוס האימוני) על התנדבות גרמטיקה. ניסינו עם L-DMV, גרסה מלקסיקלית של מודל תלויות עם ולנס (Klein and Manning, 2004) ו L-NDMV, ההארכה הלקסיקלית שלנו של מודל תלויות נוירוליות עם ולנס (Jiang et al., 2016). אנחנו מוצאים ש L-DMV תועלת רק מדרגות קטנות מאוד של לקסיקליזציה וגודלים ממוצעים של גופורה אימון. L-NDMV יכול להרוויח ממידע אימון גדול ולקסיקליזציה של דרגות גדולות יותר, במיוחד כשמשתפר עם ניזאליזציה מודל טובה, והוא משיג תוצאה שהיא תחרותית עם המצב הנוכחי של האמנות.', 'sk': 'Preučujemo vpliv velikih modelov (glede na stopnjo leksikalizacije) in velikih podatkov (glede na velikost korpusa usposabljanja) na indukcijo slovnice odvisnosti. Eksperimentirali smo z L-DMV, leksikalizirano različico modela odvisnosti z Valencem (Klein in Manning, 2004) in L-NDMV, našo leksikalizirano razširitev modela nevronske odvisnosti z Valencem (Jiang et al., 2016). Ugotavljamo, da L-DMV koristi le zelo majhne stopnje leksikalizacije in zmerne velikosti treningskih korpusov. L-NDMV lahko koristi od velikih podatkov o usposabljanju in leksikalizacije višjih stopenj, še posebej, če je izboljšana z dobro inicializacijo modela, in doseže rezultat, ki je konkurenčen s trenutnim najsodobnejšim.', 'ha': "Munã karatun matsayin misalin babban (da aka so'ar daraja na leksisi) da data mai girma (cikin muhimmin sha'anin girmar nau'in rubutu) kan ƙaramin karammari. Mun jarraba da L-DMV, wani version na Deputancy Model na Hallance (KIein and Manning, 2004) da L-NDMV, wanda aka ƙarfafa shi na diƙaitaccen Naural DeDeputance da Mance (Jiang et et al., 2016). Tuna gane cewa L-DMV na da amfani kawai daga daraja kaɗan na littafin leksisi da tsakanin girma na tsarin makampuni. L-NDMV yana da amfani daga data mai girma wa mai ƙidãya da mai lissafa daraja masu girma, hususan idan an ƙara shi da shirin ayuka mai kyau, kuma yana sami matsalar ta yi ta ƙari da halin-sanar da ake kai yanzu.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔེ་བརྗོད་བྱས་ནི། (lexicalization་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཐོག་ལས་) ཞིབ་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནང་བ We experimented with L-DMV, a lexicalized version of Dependency Model with Valence (Klein and Manning, 2004) and L-NDMV, our lexicalized extension of the Neural Dependency Model with Valence (Jiang et al., 2016). ང་ཚོས་L-DMV་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲི་ཚིག་ལས་ཆུང་བའི་ཚད་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་མེད་ཐུབ། L'}
{'en': 'Combining Generative and Discriminative Approaches to Unsupervised Dependency Parsing via Dual Decomposition', 'es': 'Combinación de enfoques generativos y discriminativos para el análisis de dependencias no supervisado a través de la descomposición dual', 'pt': 'Combinando abordagens generativas e discriminativas para análise de dependência não supervisionada via decomposição dupla', 'ar': 'الجمع بين النهج التوليدية والتمييزية لتحليل التبعية غير الخاضعة للرقابة عبر التحلل المزدوج', 'fr': "Combinaison d'approches génératives et discriminatives pour l'analyse de dépendance non supervisée via la double décomposition", 'zh': '合生成与判别方法,重解无监解析', 'ja': '二重分解による監視されていない依存関係解析への生成的アプローチと区別的アプローチの組み合わせ', 'hi': 'दोहरी अपघटन के माध्यम से Unsupervised निर्भरता पार्सिंग करने के लिए उत्पादक और भेदभावपूर्ण दृष्टिकोण का संयोजन', 'ru': 'Объединение генеративного и дискриминационного подходов к анализу неконтролируемых зависимостей посредством двойного разложения', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Ginideach agus Idirdhealaitheach a Chomhcheangal i leith Parsáil Spleáchais Gan Mhaoirseacht trí Dhian-Dhianscaoileadh', 'ka': 'დავიყენება განვითარებული და დისკრიმინატიური პროგრამების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებელობის გადაწყენება', 'hu': 'Generatív és diszkriminatív megközelítések kombinálása a felügyelet nélküli függőség értelmezéséhez kettős bomláson keresztül', 'el': 'Συνδυασμός γενειακών και διακριτικών προσεγγίσεων στην ανάλυση ανεξέλεγκτης εξάρτησης μέσω διπλής αποσύνθεσης', 'it': "Combinare approcci generativi e discriminatori all'analisi della dipendenza non controllata tramite la doppia decomposizione", 'lt': 'Generacinių ir diskriminacinių metodų derinimas, taikant dvigubą suskaidymą atliekant nepriklausomybės analizę', 'kk': 'Қосымша шектеу арқылы құрылған және дискриминалдық қатынақтарын біріктіру', 'mk': 'Комбинирање генеративни и дискриминативни пристапи до анализирање на ненадгледувана зависност преку двојна декомпозиција', 'ml': 'അസൂക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ആശ്രമത്തിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിലേക്ക് സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Menggabungkan pendekatan generatif dan diskriminatif ke penghuraian Dependensi tanpa diawasi melalui Dekomposisi Dua', 'mt': 'Il-Kombinazzjoni ta’ Approċċi Ġenerattivi u Diskriminattivi għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza Mhux Sorveljata permezz ta’ Dekompożizzjoni Doppja', 'mn': 'Хоёр давхар багасгалын тусламжтайгаар төрөлхтний болон хувьсгалын тусламжтайгаар', 'ro': 'Combinarea abordărilor generative și discriminatorii privind analizarea dependenței nesupravegheate prin intermediul dezcompunerii duble', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය සහ විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැති විශේෂතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'no': 'Kombinerer genererte og diskriminerte tilnærmingar til ulike avhengighetstolking via dobbelt dekompositering', 'pl': 'Łączenie generacyjnego i dyskryminacyjnego podejścia do niekontrolowanego parowania zależności za pomocą podwójnego rozkładu', 'sr': 'Kombiniranje generativnih i diskriminativnih pristupa neodržavanoj razmatranju zavisnosti putem dvostruke dekompozicije', 'sv': 'Kombinera genererande och diskriminerande tillvägagångssätt för tolkning av obevakat beroende via dubbel nedbrytning', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த சார்ந்த தொடர்பு பாசில்லாத இணைப்பு உருவாக்கப்படுகிறது', 'so': 'Combination Generative and Discriminative Approaches to Unsupervised Dependence Parsing via Dual Decimation', 'ur': 'پیدا کرنے والی اور بحث کرنے والی تقریبیں دوگنی کمپیوٹ کے ذریعہ بغیر حفاظت کی تقریبیں', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Kết hợp Phát triển nhận dạng và phân biệt', 'hr': 'Kombiniranje generativnih i diskriminativnih pristupa neodržavanoj razmatranju zavisnosti putem dvostruke dekompozicije', 'da': 'Kombination af genererende og diskriminerende tilgange til ikke-overvåget afhængighedsanalyse via dobbelt nedbrydning', 'bg': 'Комбиниране на генеративни и дискриминационни подходи към неразглеждано анализиране на зависимостта чрез двойно разлагане', 'nl': 'Combinatie van generatieve en discriminerende benaderingen voor onbewaakte afhankelijkheidsparsing via dubbele decompositie', 'de': 'Kombination von generativen und diskriminierenden Ansätzen zur unbeaufsichtigten Dependency Parsing mittels Dual Decomposition', 'ko': '짝분해를 통해 생성과 판별 방법을 무감독 의존 분석에 결합시키다', 'fa': 'ترکیب دسترسی نسل\u200cآوری و اختلاف\u200cآوری به تولید اعتمادی بی\u200cحفاظت از طریق دسترسی دوم', 'id': 'Combining Generative and Discriminative Approaches to Unsupervised Dependency Parsing via Dual Decomposition', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Kizalendo na Ubaguzi wa Kujitolewa kwa Kuchapisha Utegemea kupitia Uamuzi wa Dual', 'tr': 'Taýram edip bolmadyk baglançylyk üçin janlaşdyrma we Taýram Etkinleşen yaklaşyklary iki çykyş bilen birleştirilýär', 'sq': 'Përbashkimi i përqasjeve gjenerative dhe diskriminuese për analizimin e varësisë së pazgjidhur nëpërmjet zhvendosjes së dyfishtë', 'af': 'Kombineer Genereerde en diskrimineerde toegang tot Ononderwerpendige Afhanklikheidverwerking deur Dubbel Onsamposisie', 'hy': 'Երկու բաժանման միջոցով ընդհանուր գեներատիվ և դիսկրմինատիվ մոտեցումներ անկախվածության վերլուծում', 'az': 'Təşkil və Diskriminat Yaxınlıqlarını İkinci Dekompozisyon vasitəsilə Müvəffəqiyyətsiz Təşkil Aracılığı ilə birləşdirilən', 'bn': 'বৈষম্য এবং বৈষম্যের সাথে সংযুক্ত করা হচ্ছে দুই ডিসোম্পেস্টের মাধ্যমে অনভার করা নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং পার্সিং', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'ca': 'Combinant Approaches Generative and Discriminative to Unsupervised Dependence Parsing via Dual Decomposition', 'bs': 'Kombiniranje generativnih i diskriminativnih pristupa neodržavanoj razmatranju zavisnosti putem dvostruke dekompozicije', 'cs': 'Kombinace generačních a diskriminačních přístupů k analýze závislosti bez dohledu prostřednictvím duální dekompozice', 'et': 'Generatiivsete ja diskrimineerivate lähenemisviiside kombineerimine järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimisele kahekordse lagunemise kaudu', 'fi': 'Generatiivisten ja syrjivien lähestymistapojen yhdistäminen valvomattomaan riippuvuuden analysointiin kaksoishajoamisen avulla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'שילוב גישות גנרטיביות ודיסקרמינציות לתחקר תלויות ללא השגחה באמצעות התפרצות כפולה', 'sk': 'Združevanje generativnih in diskriminativnih pristopov k nenadzorovanem razčlenitvi odvisnosti prek dvojnega razgradnje', 'bo': 'མཉམ་བསྡུས་ནུས་མེད་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་འགྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་མེད་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised dependency parsing aims to learn a dependency parser from unannotated sentences. Existing work focuses on either learning generative models using the expectation-maximization algorithm and its variants, or learning discriminative models using the discriminative clustering algorithm. In this paper, we propose a new learning strategy that learns a generative model and a discriminative model jointly based on the dual decomposition method. Our method is simple and general, yet effective to capture the advantages of both models and improve their learning results. We tested our method on the UD treebank and achieved a state-of-the-art performance on thirty languages.', 'pt': 'A análise de dependência não supervisionada visa aprender um analisador de dependência a partir de sentenças não anotadas. O trabalho existente concentra-se em aprender modelos generativos usando o algoritmo de maximização de expectativas e suas variantes, ou aprender modelos discriminativos usando o algoritmo de agrupamento discriminativo. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova estratégia de aprendizagem que aprende um modelo generativo e um modelo discriminativo em conjunto com base no método de decomposição dual. Nosso método é simples e geral, mas eficaz para capturar as vantagens de ambos os modelos e melhorar seus resultados de aprendizagem. Testamos nosso método no UD treebank e obtivemos um desempenho de última geração em trinta idiomas.', 'ar': 'يهدف تحليل التبعية غير الخاضع للإشراف إلى تعلم محلل التبعية من الجمل غير المشروحة. يركز العمل الحالي إما على تعلم النماذج التوليدية باستخدام خوارزمية تعظيم التوقع ومتغيراتها ، أو تعلم النماذج التمييزية باستخدام خوارزمية التجميع التمييزي. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إستراتيجية تعلم جديدة تتعلم نموذجًا توليديًا ونموذجًا تمييزيًا بشكل مشترك على أساس طريقة التحلل المزدوج. طريقتنا بسيطة وعامة ، لكنها فعالة في التقاط مزايا كلا النموذجين وتحسين نتائج التعلم. اختبرنا طريقتنا على بنك الشجرة UD وحققنا أداءً متطورًا على ثلاثين لغة.', 'es': 'El análisis de dependencias no supervisado tiene como objetivo aprender un analizador de dependencias a partir de oraciones no anotadas. El trabajo existente se centra en el aprendizaje de modelos generativos mediante el algoritmo de maximización de expectativas y sus variantes, o en el aprendizaje de modelos discriminativos mediante el algoritmo de agrupamiento discriminativo. En este artículo, proponemos una nueva estrategia de aprendizaje que aprende un modelo generativo y un modelo discriminativo de forma conjunta basados en el método de descomposición dual. Nuestro método es simple y general, pero eficaz para captar las ventajas de ambos modelos y mejorar sus resultados de aprendizaje. Probamos nuestro método en el banco de árboles de la UD y logramos un rendimiento de vanguardia en treinta idiomas.', 'fr': "L'analyse de dépendance non supervisée vise à apprendre un analyseur de dépendance à partir de phrases non annotées. Les travaux existants se concentrent soit sur l'apprentissage de modèles génératifs utilisant l'algorithme de maximisation de l'attente et ses variantes, soit sur l'apprentissage de modèles discriminatifs utilisant l'algorithme de clustering discriminatif. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle stratégie d'apprentissage qui apprend un modèle génératif et un modèle discriminatif conjointement basés sur la méthode de décomposition double. Notre méthode est simple et générale, tout en étant efficace pour saisir les avantages des deux modèles et améliorer leurs résultats d'apprentissage. Nous avons testé notre méthode sur la banque d'arbres UD et avons obtenu des performances de pointe dans trente langues.", 'ja': '監視されていない依存関係の構文解析は、注釈のない文から依存関係の構文解析器を学習することを目的としている。既存の研究は、期待最大化アルゴリズムとその変形を使用して生成モデルを学習するか、または判別クラスタリングアルゴリズムを使用して判別モデルを学習するかのいずれかに焦点を当てている。本稿では，二重分解法に基づく生成モデルと判別モデルを共同で学習する新しい学習戦略を提案する．私たちの方法はシンプルで一般的ですが、両方のモデルの利点を把握し、学習結果を改善するのに効果的です。UDツリーバンクでメソッドをテストし、30の言語で最先端のパフォーマンスを達成しました。', 'zh': '无监赖解析旨于未注之句解析器。 今之所重者,用期最大化算法及变体学成模形,或用判别聚类算法学判模形。 本条有一种对偶分解法的生成模样和判别模形合学习的新学习策略。 吾道简而通用,可以有效而善其学。 试我于UD树库,三十言最先进。', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемый синтаксический анализ зависимостей направлен на изучение синтаксического анализатора зависимостей из неаннотированных предложений. Существующая работа сосредоточена либо на изучении генеративных моделей с использованием алгоритма максимизации ожиданий и его вариантов, либо на изучении дискриминационных моделей с использованием алгоритма дискриминирующей кластеризации. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую стратегию обучения, которая изучает генеративную модель и дискриминационную модель совместно на основе метода двойной декомпозиции. Наш метод прост и общий, но эффективен для того, чтобы уловить преимущества обеих моделей и улучшить их результаты обучения. Мы протестировали наш метод на банке деревьев UD и достигли самых современных результатов на тридцати языках.', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित निर्भरता पार्सिंग का उद्देश्य अघोषित वाक्यों से एक निर्भरता पार्सर सीखना है। मौजूदा काम या तो अपेक्षा-अधिकतमीकरण एल्गोरिथ्म और इसके रूपों का उपयोग करके उत्पादक मॉडल सीखने पर केंद्रित है, या भेदभावपूर्ण क्लस्टरिंग एल्गोरिथ्म का उपयोग करके भेदभावपूर्ण मॉडल सीखरहा है। इस पेपर में, हम एक नई सीखने की रणनीति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो दोहरी अपघटन विधि के आधार पर संयुक्त रूप से एक उत्पादक मॉडल और एक भेदभावपूर्ण मॉडल सीखता है। हमारी विधि सरल और सामान्य है, फिर भी दोनों मॉडलों के लाभों पर कब्जा करने और उनके सीखने के परिणामों में सुधार करने के लिए प्रभावी है। हमने यूडी ट्रीबैंक पर अपनी विधि का परीक्षण किया और तीस भाषाओं पर एक अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन हासिल किया।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag parsáil spleáchais gan mhaoirseacht parsálaí spleáchais a fhoghlaim ó phianbhreitheanna gan nótaí. Díríonn an obair atá ann faoi láthair ar mhúnlaí ginideacha foghlama agus úsáid á baint as an algartam uasmhéadaithe ionchas agus a leaganacha, nó ag foghlaim samhlacha idirdhealaitheacha ag baint úsáide as an algartam cnuasaithe idirdhealaitheach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid straitéis foghlama nua a fhoghlaimíonn múnla ginideach agus samhail idirdhealaitheach atá bunaithe i gcomhpháirt ar an modh dé-dhianscaoilte. Tá ár modh simplí agus ginearálta, ach fós éifeachtach chun buntáistí an dá mhúnla a ghabháil agus a gcuid torthaí foghlama a fheabhsú. Thástáil muid ár modh ar chrann crann UD agus bhaineamar amach feidhmíocht den scoth ar thríocha teanga.', 'ka': 'უცნობიერებული დამატებულობის პანსერაციის მიზეზია, რომ დამატებულობის პანსერაციას უცნობიერებული სიტყვების გადასწავლას. მსგავსი სამუშაო მუშაობაში კონუკურებულია ან დისკრიმინატიური კლასტერის ალგორიტიმს გამოყენებული განმეხოვრება-მაქსიმიზაციის ალგორიტიმს და მისი გარიანტებზე, ან დისკრიმინატი ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალი სწავლის სტრატიგია, რომელიც გენერაციური მოდელს და დისკრიმინაციური მოდელს ერთადერთად დავიწყებთ ორივე განკომპოციაციის მეტიდან. ჩვენი მეთოდი უკეთესი და საერთო, მაგრამ ეფექტიური იყო ორივე მოდელების მოსახლეობები და მათი სწავლების შედეგების გაუკეთება. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ჩვენი პროცემი UD-ის საბოლობაში და მივიღეთ სამყარო წარმოდგენება 30 ენაზე.', 'hu': 'A felügyeletlen függőség elemzés célja, hogy megtanuljon egy függőség elemzőt a nem jegyzett mondatokból. A meglévő munka a generációs modellek tanulására összpontosít az elvárás-maximalizálási algoritmus és annak változatai segítségével, vagy diszkriminatív modellek tanulására a diszkriminatív klaszterezési algoritmus segítségével. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új tanulási stratégiát javasolunk, amely a kettős bomlási módszeren alapuló generatív modellt és diszkriminatív modellt tanul meg közösen. Módszerünk egyszerű és általános, mégis hatékony a két modell előnyeinek megragadására és tanulási eredményeinek javítására. A módszerünket az UD-n teszteltük, és harminc nyelven értünk el korszerű teljesítményt.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση εξάρτησης χωρίς επιτήρηση έχει ως στόχο να μάθει έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης από μη σημειωμένες προτάσεις. Η υπάρχουσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται είτε στην εκμάθηση παραγωγικών μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας τον αλγόριθμο μεγιστοποίησης προσδοκιών και τις παραλλαγές του, είτε στην εκμάθηση διακριτικών μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας τον αλγόριθμο διαχωριστικής ομαδοποίησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μαθησιακή στρατηγική που μαθαίνει ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο και ένα διακριτικό μοντέλο από κοινού βασισμένο στη μέθοδο διπλής αποσύνθεσης. Η μέθοδος μας είναι απλή και γενική, αλλά αποτελεσματική για να συλλάβει τα πλεονεκτήματα και των δύο μοντέλων και να βελτιώσει τα μαθησιακά τους αποτελέσματα. Δοκιμάσαμε τη μέθοδο μας στην όχθη δέντρων και επιτύχαμε μια υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση σε τριάντα γλώσσες.', 'it': "L'analisi delle dipendenze non monitorata mira a imparare un parser di dipendenze da frasi non notate. Il lavoro esistente si concentra sull'apprendimento di modelli generativi utilizzando l'algoritmo di massimizzazione delle aspettative e le sue varianti, o sull'apprendimento di modelli discriminatori utilizzando l'algoritmo di clustering discriminatorio. In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova strategia di apprendimento che apprende un modello generativo e un modello discriminatorio basato congiuntamente sul metodo della doppia decomposizione. Il nostro metodo è semplice e generale, ma efficace per cogliere i vantaggi di entrambi i modelli e migliorare i loro risultati di apprendimento. Abbiamo testato il nostro metodo sulla pedana UD e ottenuto una performance all'avanguardia su trenta lingue.", 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas priklausomybės analizavimas siekiama išsiaiškinti priklausomybės analizatorių iš nenotiruotų sakinių. Dabartiniame darbe daugiausia dėmesio skiriama mokymosi modeliams, naudojantiems lūkesčių maksimalizavimo algoritmą ir jo variantus, arba mokymosi diskriminaciniams modeliams, naudojantiems diskriminacinį klasifikavimo algoritmą. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują mokymosi strategiją, kurioje mokomas kartos modelis ir diskriminacinis modelis, grindžiamas dvigubo skaidymo metodu. Mūsų metodas paprastas ir bendras, tačiau veiksmingas abiejų modelių privalumams išnaudoti ir jų mokymosi rezultatams gerinti. We tested our method on the UD treebank and achieved a state-of-the-art performance on thirty languages.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуваното анализирање на зависноста има за цел да научи анализирач на зависноста од незабележани реченици. Постојаната работа се фокусира или на научување генерациски модели користејќи го алгоритмот за максимизација на очекувањата и неговите варијанти, или научување дискриминативни модели користејќи дискриминативен алгоритм за групирање. Во овој документ, предложуваме нова стратегија за учење која научи генерациски модел и дискриминативен модел заедно базиран на методот на двојна декомпозиција. Нашиот метод е едноставен и генерален, но ефикасен за заземање на предностите на двата модели и подобрување на нивните резултати на учењето. Го тестиравме нашиот метод на дрвото на УД и постигнавме најдобра претстава на 30 јазици.', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік талдау мәліметі білмеген сөздерден тәуелсіздік талдағышын үйрену үшін. Бар жұмыс күту алгоритмі мен оның варианттарын қолданатын генерациялық моделдерді оқытуға не дискриминациялық кластерлік алгоритмін қолданатын дискриминациялық моделдерді оқытуға көмектеседі. Бұл қағаздың жаңа оқыту стратегиясын ұсынамыз. Бұл жалпы үлгі мен дискриминациялық үлгі екі бөлістік әдісіне негізделген. Біздің әдіміміз қарапайым және жалпы, бірақ үлгілердің артықшылығын алу және олардың оқыту нәтижесін жасау үшін әсер етеді. Біз UD құрылғының әдісімізді тексеріп, 30 тілде әртүрлі әдістерін жеткіздік.', 'ms': 'Penghuraian dependensi tidak diawasi bermaksud untuk belajar penghurai dependensi dari kalimat yang tidak ditandakan. Kerja yang wujud fokus pada sama ada mempelajari model generatif menggunakan algoritma maksimum-jangkaan dan varian-variannya, atau mempelajari model diskriminatif menggunakan algoritma pengumpulan diskriminatif. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan strategi pembelajaran baru yang mempelajari model generatif dan model diskriminatif berdasarkan kaedah pemisahan dua. Kaedah kita mudah dan umum, namun berkesan untuk menangkap keuntungan kedua-dua model dan memperbaiki hasil belajar mereka. Kami menguji kaedah kami di bahagian pokok UD dan mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam 30 bahasa.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tad-dipendenza mhux sorveljata għandha l-għan li titgħallem analizzatur tad-dipendenza minn sentenzi mhux innotati. Ix-xogħol eżistenti jiffoka jew fuq mudelli ġenerattivi ta’ tagħlim bl-użu tal-algoritmu tal-massimizzazzjoni tal-aspettattivi u l-varjanti tiegħu, jew fuq mudelli diskriminattivi ta’ tagħlim bl-użu tal-algoritmu diskriminatorju ta’ raggruppament. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu strateġija ġdida ta’ tagħlim li tagħmel mudell ġenerattiv u mudell diskriminatorju bbażat b’mod konġunt fuq il-metodu ta’ dekompożizzjoni doppja. Il-metodu tagħna huwa sempliċi u ġenerali, iżda effettiv biex jinqabdu l-vantaġġi taż-żewġ mudelli u jittejbu r-riżultati tat-tagħlim tagħhom. Ittestjaw il-metodu tagħna fuq il-bażi tas-siġar tal-UD u kisbu prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq tletin lingwa.', 'ml': 'ആശ്രയിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ആശ്രയിച്ച പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ആ നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലി ജോലിയുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് പ്രതീക്ഷ- വലുതാക്കുന്നത് അല്\u200dഗോരിതം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെയും അതിന്റെ വേറിയറ്ററികളെയും ഉപയോ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ പഠിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതി പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡല്\u200d കൂടിയായി  നമ്മുടെ രീതി ലളിതമാണ്, സാധാരണ, എന്നിട്ടും രണ്ട് മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുകയും അവയുടെ പഠന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d യുഡി ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചു മുപ്പത് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്രഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തന', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдэхгүй хамааралтгүй хамааралтай хуваалцах зорилго нь мэдэгдэхгүй өгүүлбэрээс хамааралтай хуваалцааг сурах зорилго юм. Ингээд байгаа ажил нь хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх алгоритм болон түүний өөрчлөлтийг ашиглан генериал загварын суралцах загварууд дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ суралцах стратегийг суралцаж байна. Энэ нь генериал загвар, ялгаагүй загвар хоёр дахин хуваагдах аргын үндсэн. Бидний арга нь энгийн, ерөнхий, гэхдээ загварын давуу талаар аваад суралцах үр дүнг сайжруулахад үр дүнтэй. Бид UD дагуулын салбарын аргыг шалгаад 30 хэл дээр урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргасан.', 'sr': 'Neobezbeđeno analiziranje zavisnosti cilja je naučiti analiziranje zavisnosti iz neoznačenih rečenica. Postojeći rad se fokusira na učenje generativnih modela koristeći algoritam za maksimalizaciju očekivanja i njegove variante, ili učenje diskriminacijskih modela koristeći diskriminacijski algoritam skusteringa. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu strategiju učenja koja uči generativni model i diskriminacijski model zajedno na temelju metode dvostrukog raskidanja. Naša metoda je jednostavna i generalna, ali je efikasna da uhvatimo prednost oba modela i poboljšamo njihove rezultate učenja. Testirali smo našu metodu na UD treebandu i postigli predstavu umjetnosti na trideset jezika.', 'si': 'අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය නැති විශ්වාසය විශ්වාසය අරමුණ විශ්වාසයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයක් ඉගෙන ග ඉතින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අල්ගෝරිතම් සහ එයාගේ වෙනස් භාවිතාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  මේ පත්තරේ අපි අලුත් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණය අපේ පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය, නමුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් මොඩල් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අල්ලගන්න ස අපි UD ට්\u200dරෙබැන්ක් එකේ පරීක්ෂා කරලා භාෂාව තුනක් තියෙනවා.', 'pl': 'Niemonitorowane parsowanie zależności ma na celu nauczenie się parser zależności z niezapisanych zdań. Dotychczasowe prace koncentrują się na uczeniu się modeli generacyjnych z wykorzystaniem algorytmu maksymalizacji oczekiwań i jego wariantów, lub nauce modeli dyskryminacyjnych z wykorzystaniem algorytmu klastrowania dyskryminacyjnego. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową strategię uczenia się, która uczy się modelu generatywnego i modelu dyskryminacyjnego wspólnie opartego na metodzie podwójnego rozkładu. Nasza metoda jest prosta i ogólna, ale skuteczna, aby wychwycić zalety obu modeli i poprawić ich wyniki nauki. Przetestowaliśmy naszą metodę na drzewie UD i osiągnęliśmy najnowocześniejszą wydajność na trzydziestu językach.', 'no': 'Tillesing av uavhengige avhengighet måtar å læra ein avhengighetstolkar frå uttrykket setningar. Det eksisterande arbeidet fokuserer på anten læring av generelle modeller ved hjelp av algoritmen for forventinga og maksimeringa og variantane, eller læring av diskriminasjonske modeller ved hjelp av diskriminasjonsglasseringsalgoritmen. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny læringsstrategi som lærer ein generelt modell og ein diskriminasjonsmodul kopla basert på den doble dekomposisjonsmetoden. Metoden vårt er enkelt og generelt, men effektivt for å henta fordelene av både modeller og forbetra læringsresultatet. Vi prøvde metoden vårt på UD-treebanken og oppnådd ein tilstand av kunsten på tretti språk.', 'ro': 'Analizarea dependenței nesupravegheată își propune să învețe un parser de dependență din propoziții nesupravegheate. Lucrările existente se concentrează fie pe învățarea modelelor generative utilizând algoritmul de maximizare a așteptărilor și variantele sale, fie pe învățarea modelelor discriminatorii utilizând algoritmul de clusterizare discriminatorie. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă strategie de învățare care învață un model generativ și un model discriminatoriu bazat în comun pe metoda duală de descompunere. Metoda noastră este simplă și generală, dar eficientă pentru a capta avantajele ambelor modele și pentru a îmbunătăți rezultatele lor de învățare. Am testat metoda noastră pe brațul UD și am obținut o performanță de ultimă generație pe treizeci de limbi.', 'so': "Unsupervised dependency parsing aims to learn a dependency parser from unannotated sentences.  Shaqo joogta ah wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa tusaale ahaan barashada dhaqaalaha ah oo ku isticmaalaya algorithmka rajada-u-dhigista iyo kuwa kala bedela, ama barashada tusaalaha takoorista ah oo isticmaalaya algoritka ku takoorista. Qoraalkan waxaynu horumarinaynaa qoraal cusub oo waxbarasho ah oo baranaya model dhaqan ah iyo qaab takooris ah oo isku xiran ku saleynaya qaababka dugaagga. Midabkayagu waa fudud iyo guud, laakiin waa mid faa’iido leh in la qabsado faa'iidada labada model iyo in uu horumariyo fashihiisa waxbarashada. Waxaannu imtixaannay qaabkeeneena oo ku qoran UD-da-da-da-farshaxanka oo ku qoran soddon luqadood.", 'sv': 'Oserverad beroendetolkning syftar till att lära sig en beroendetolkare från oannoterade meningar. Befintligt arbete fokuserar på att antingen lära sig generativa modeller med hjälp av algoritmen för förväntningsmarginering och dess varianter, eller lära sig diskriminerande modeller med hjälp av den diskriminerande klustringsalgoritmen. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny inlärningsstrategi som tillsammans lär sig en generativ modell och en diskriminerande modell baserad på dual sönderdelning metoden. Vår metod är enkel och generell, men effektiv för att fånga fördelarna med båda modellerna och förbättra deras inlärningsresultat. Vi testade vår metod på UD-trädbanken och uppnådde en toppmodern prestanda på trettio språk.', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத சார்பு பாடல் சார்ந்த சார்பு பகுதியை கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும். தற்போதைய வேலை பொதுவான மாதிரிகள் எதிர்பார்ப்பு பெரிதாக்குதல் அல்லது அதன் மாறிகளையும் பயன்படுத்தி கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பொதுவான மாதிரிகளையும் கவ இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் திட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது ஒரு பொதுவான மாதிரி மற்றும் ஒரு வேறுபாடு  எங்கள் முறைமை எளிய மற்றும் பொதுவாக இருக்கும், ஆனால் இவ்விரண்டு மாதிரிகளின் பயன்பாடுகளை பிடித்து அவர்களுடைய கற்றல நாங்கள் UD ட்ரீபாங்க் மீது எங்கள் முறைமையை சோதித்து மூன்று மொழிகளில் ஒரு நிலையில் கலை செயல்படுத்தினோம்.', 'ur': 'غیر قابل تعلقات پارسینگ کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ غیر معلوم جماعتوں سے ایک مستقل پارسینٹ کی سیکھنا چاہے. Existing work focuses on either learning generative models using the expectation-maximization algorithm and its variants, or learning discriminative models using the discriminative clustering algorithm. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی سیکھنے کا استراتژی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک جوانٹ موڈل اور ایک جدائی موڈل کو دوبارہ جدائی طریقے پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ ساده اور عمومی ہے، لیکن ان دونوں موڈلوں کے فائدہ اٹھانے اور ان کی تعلیم نتیجے کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے مفید ہے. ہم نے UD ٹریب بانک پر اپنے طریقے کی آزمائش کی اور تیس زبانوں پر ایک ایٹیٹ کی فعالیت پہنچ گئی۔', 'uz': "@ info Mavjud vazifani qo'shish uchun umumiy modellarni o'rganish va ularning tarkibini qo'yish va o'zgarishlar bilan o'rganish mumkin, yoki o'zgarishni tashqi qilish uchun o'xshash modellarni o'rganish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz yangi o'rganish strategini o'rganamiz, yangi o'rganish strategini o'rganamiz va bir ikkinchi dekomposition usuli asosida o'rganish modeli o'rganadi. Bizning usuli oddiy va umumiy, ammo modellarning imkoniyatlarini qabul qilish va o'rganish natijalarini yaxshi ko'rsatish uchun ishlaydi. We tested our method on the UD treebank and achieved a state-of-the-art performance on thirty languages.", 'vi': 'Không giám sát phân tích phụ thuộc nhằm học hỏi người phân tích phụ thuộc từ những câu chưa ghi chú. Việc tồn tại tập trung vào các mô- đun tạo học dựa trên thuật toán kích thích dự đoán và các biến thể của nó, hoặc chọn các mô- đun phân biệt dựa trên thuật toán phân biệt. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một chiến lược học tập mới học một mô hình sinh sản và một mô hình phân biệt dựa trên phương pháp phân hủy kép. Cách của chúng tôi đơn giản và chung, nhưng hiệu quả để nắm bắt lợi thế của cả hai mô hình và cải thiện kết quả học tập của chúng. Chúng tôi đã thử nghiệm phương pháp của mình trên ba-banh UD-ba và đạt được một suất tuyệt vời trên ba mươi ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Неконтролираното анализиране на зависимости цели да научи анализатор на зависимости от неописани изречения. Съществуващата работа се фокусира върху изучаването на генеративни модели, използващи алгоритъма за максимизиране на очакванията и неговите варианти, или изучаването на дискриминационни модели, използващи алгоритъма за дискриминация на клъстери. В настоящата статия предлагаме нова стратегия за учене, която усвоява генеративен модел и дискриминационен модел, базиран съвместно на метода на двойно разлагане. Нашият метод е прост и общ, но ефективен за улавяне на предимствата на двата модела и подобряване на резултатите от обучението им. Изпробвахме метода си на тристранната лента и постигнахме най-съвременно представяне на тридесет езика.', 'nl': 'Onbewaakte afhankelijkheidsparsing heeft als doel een afhankelijkheidsparser te leren van niet-genoteerde zinnen. Bestaand werk richt zich op het leren van generatieve modellen met behulp van het verwachtingsmaximalisatie algoritme en zijn varianten, of het leren van discriminatieve modellen met behulp van het discriminatieve clustering algoritme. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe leerstrategie voor die een generatief model en een discriminatief model leert gezamenlijk gebaseerd op de duale decompositiemethode. Onze methode is eenvoudig en algemeen, maar toch effectief om de voordelen van beide modellen vast te leggen en hun leerresultaten te verbeteren. We testten onze methode op de UD boombank en bereikten een state-of-the-art performance op dertig talen.', 'hr': 'Neodređeno analiziranje zavisnosti cilja je naučiti analiziranje zavisnosti iz neoznačenih rečenica. Postojeći rad se fokusira na učenje generativnih modela koristeći algoritam za maksimalizaciju očekivanja i njegove variante, ili učenje diskriminacijskih modela koristeći diskriminacijski algoritam skusteringa. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu strategiju učenja koja uči generativni model i diskriminacijski model zajedno na temelju metode dvostrukog raskidanja. Naš metod je jednostavan i općen, a ipak učinkovit da uhvatimo prednosti oba modela i poboljšamo rezultate učenja. Testirali smo našu metodu na UD treebandu i postigli predstavu umjetnosti na trideset jezika.', 'da': 'Uovervåget afhængighedsanalyse har til formål at lære en afhængighedsfortolker fra uopnoterede sætninger. Eksisterende arbejde fokuserer på enten at lære generative modeller ved hjælp af algoritmen for forventning-maksimering og dens varianter, eller at lære diskriminerende modeller ved hjælp af den diskriminerende clustering algoritme. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny læringsstrategi, der lærer en generativ model og en diskriminerende model i fællesskab baseret på dobbelt nedbrydningsmetode. Vores metode er enkel og generel, men effektiv til at fange fordelene ved begge modeller og forbedre deres læringsresultater. Vi testede vores metode på UD treebank og opnåede en state-of-the-art performance på tredive sprog.', 'ko': '무감독 의존 문법 분석의 목적은 주석이 없는 문장에서 의존 문법 분석을 배우는 것이다.기존의 작업은 기대 최대화 알고리즘과 변체 학습 생성 모델을 사용하거나 분류 알고리즘을 사용하여 분류 모델을 학습하는 데 집중되었다.본고에서 우리는 짝분해 방법을 바탕으로 하는 연합 학습 생성 모델과 판별 모델을 새로운 학습 전략을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 간단하고 통용적이지만 두 모델의 장점을 효과적으로 잡고 학습 효과를 높였다.우리는 UD 트리 라이브러리에서 우리의 방법을 테스트했고 30개 언어에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다.', 'id': 'Penghuraian dependensi yang tidak diawasi bermaksud untuk belajar penghuraian dependensi dari kalimat yang tidak dicatat. Pekerjaan yang ada fokus pada sama ada mempelajari model generatif menggunakan algoritma maksimalisasi-harapan dan variannya, atau mempelajari model diskriminatif menggunakan algoritma klastering diskriminatif. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan strategi belajar baru yang mempelajari model generatif dan model diskriminatif berdasarkan metode dekomposisi dua. Metode kami sederhana dan umum, namun efektif untuk menangkap keuntungan kedua model dan meningkatkan hasil belajar mereka. Kami menguji metode kami di batang pohon UD dan mencapai pertunjukan terbaik pada tiga puluh bahasa.', 'fa': 'ویرایش بستگی غیرقابل تحقیق هدف است که یک ویرایشگر بستگی از جمله\u200cهای غیرقابل شناخته یاد بگیرد. کار موجود روی یادگیری از مدل ژنتریفی با استفاده از الگوریتم انتظار و maximization و variants آن تمرکز می\u200cکند، یا یادگیری از مدل جدایی با استفاده از الگوریتم کلاسترینگ جدایی می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما یک استراتژی جدید یادگیری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل ژنترافی و یک مدل جدایی با هم بر اساس روش جدایی دوگانه یاد می\u200cگیرد. روش ما ساده و عمومی است، ولی با این حال موثر است که سودهای هر دو مدل را بگیریم و نتیجه یادگیری آنها را بهبود دهیم. ما روش خودمون رو روی درخت\u200cبندی UD آزمایش کردیم و اجرای ایالت هنر در ۳۰ زبان رسیدیم.', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji usio na utegemeo unalenga kujifunza mchambuzi wa kutegemea kutoka hukumu zisizo na maana. Kazi zilizopo zinalenga maana ya kujifunza mifano ya uzalendo kwa kutumia algorithi ya matumaini na mabadiliko yake, au kujifunza mifano ya ubaguzi kwa kutumia algorithi yenye ubaguzi. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mkakati mpya wa kujifunza ambao unajifunza modeli ya kizalendo na modeli ya ubaguzi pamoja kwa kutumia mbinu za kupungua kwa mara mbili. Utawala wetu ni rahisi na mkuu, lakini ni wenye ufanisi wa kukutana faida za mifano hizo na kuboresha matokeo yao ya kujifunza. Tulijaribu mbinu yetu kwenye mitandao ya UD na tukafanikiwa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa kwa lugha thelathini.', 'de': 'Unsupervised Dependency Parsing zielt darauf ab, einen Dependency Parser aus nicht notierten Sätzen zu lernen. Bestehende Arbeiten konzentrieren sich entweder auf das Lernen generativer Modelle unter Verwendung des Erwartungsmaximierungsalgorithmus und seiner Varianten oder das Lernen diskriminierender Modelle unter Verwendung des diskriminierenden Clustering Algorithmus. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neue Lernstrategie vor, die ein generatives Modell und ein diskriminierendes Modell gemeinsam lernt, basierend auf der dualen Zersetzungsmethode. Unsere Methode ist einfach und allgemein, aber effektiv, um die Vorteile beider Modelle zu erfassen und ihre Lernergebnisse zu verbessern. Wir haben unsere Methode an der UD Baumbank getestet und eine State-of-the-Art Performance auf dreißig Sprachen erreicht.', 'af': "Onondersteunde afhanklikheid verwerking doel om 'n afhanklikheidspanser te leer van onbekende setinge. Bestaande werk fokus op of leer genereerbare modele deur die verwagting-maximizasie algoritme en sy variante te gebruik of diskriminasiewe modele te leer deur die diskriminasiewe clustering algoritme te gebruik. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe leer strategie wat leer 'n genereerbare model en 'n diskriminasiewe model saamstig gebaseer op die tweede dekomposisie metode. Ons metode is eenvoudig en algemeen, maar effektief om die voordeel van beide modele te vang en hulle leersresultate te verbeter. Ons het ons metode probeer op die UD treebank en 'n staat-van-kuns-prestasie op dertig tale bereik.", 'tr': 'Mazmunlanmadyk baglanylyk ayırmagy üçin bilinmedik sözlerden baglanylyk tanyşyny öwrenmek maksady. Öň bar işi oňat-kalamlama algoritmi we onun wariantlaryny ulanan jenerativ modellere öwrenmek üçin fokus edýär ýa-da diskriminetik klusterleme algoritmi ulanan diskriminetik modellere öwrenmek üçin. Bu kagyzda döredijili bir nusga we diskrimin nusga iki çykyş yöntemine birlikde döredilen täze bir öwrenme stratejisini teklip edýäris. Biziň ýüregimiz basit we umumy, ýöne nusgalaryň ýerini almak we öwrenmeniň netijelerini geliştirmek üçin täsirli. UD baglançynda çyzgymyzy bardyk we otuz dillerde bir ýagtylyk taýýarlamasyny bardyk.', 'sq': 'Analizimi i pavarësisë së mbikqyrur synon të mësojë një analizues të pavarësisë nga fjalët e pa shënuara. Puna ekzistuese përqëndrohet ose në mësimin e modeleve gjenerative duke përdorur algoritmin e shpresave-maksimizimit dhe variantet e tij, ose në mësimin e modeleve diskriminuese duke përdorur algoritmin diskriminues të grupimit. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një strategji të re mësimi që mëson një model gjenerativ dhe një model diskriminues të bazuar së bashku në metodën e ndarjes së dyfishtë. Metoda jonë është e thjeshtë dhe e përgjithshme, por e efektshme për të kapur avantazhet e të dy modeleve dhe për të përmirësuar rezultatet e tyre të mësimit. Testuam metodën tonë në bazën e drurit të UD dhe arritëm një shfaqje më të lartë në tridhjetë gjuhë.', 'am': 'የማይጠበቀው የአደራጆች ማዘጋጀት የአደራጆች ምርጫዎች ከስህተት ውይይት ለማስተማር ይፈልጋል፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥራ የሥልጣን ሥርዓት፣ የአልጎርቲም እና ልዩነቶችን በመጠቀም የሚማር የፍጥረት ምሳሌዎችን በማስተማር ወይም በተለያዩ አልጎሪትምን በመጠቀም የሚማር ተቃውሞ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ አዲስ ትምህርት strategie አዲስ መምህርት እና በሁለት ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ላይ በተመሳሳይ እና የተለያየ ሞዴል ትምህርት እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ ዘዴያችን ቀላል እና አዋላጅ ነው፣ ነገር ግን የዓይነቶችን ጥቅም ለመያዝ እና ትምህርታቸውን ለማሻሻል የሚቻል ነው፡፡ በሀገር አዳራዊ ቋንቋ ላይ ሥርዓታችንን ሞከርን በሠላሳ ቋንቋዎችም የ-የ-የ-አርእስት አግኝተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկվող կախվածության վերլուծությունը նպատակն է սովորել կախվածության վերլուծություն առանց նշումների նախադասություններից: Գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է կամ սովորելու սերունդային մոդելների վրա, օգտագործելով ակնկալիքների-մեծացման ալգորիթմը և դրա տարբերակները, կամ սովորելով խտրականության մոդելներ, օգտագործելով խտրականության ալգորիթմ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ուսումնական ռազմավարություն, որը սովորում է սերունդային մոդել և խտրականության մոդել, որոնք միասին հիմնված են երկու կոմպոզիցիայի մեթոդի վրա: Մեր մեթոդը պարզ և ընդհանուր է, սակայն արդյունավետ է երկու մոդելների առավելությունները վերցնելու և ուսուցման արդյունքները բարելավելու համար: Մենք փորձարկեցինք մեր մեթոդը UD ծառի վրա և հասանք լավագույն ներկայացումների երեսուն լեզուներում:', 'az': 'Qeyd edilməmiş bağlılıq ayırılması məqsədilə tanımadıqları cümlələrdən bağlılıq ayırıcısını öyrənmək istəyir. Önümdəki işlər ya gözləmə-maksimalizasyon algoritmi və onun variablarını istifadə edir, ya da diskriminasiya clustering algoritmi kullanan diskriminasiya modellərini öyrənir. Bu kağızda, yeni öyrənmə stratejisini təklif edirik ki, generativ modeli öyrənir və ikinci dəyişiklik metodu ilə birlikdə dəyişiklik modeli öyrənir. Bizim metodumuz sadəcə və genel, amma modellərin faydalarını almaq və öyrənmək sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün etkilidir. Biz UD treebank sistemində metodumuzu imtahana çəkdik və otuz dillərdə sanat göstəricisi nəticəsinə yetirdik.', 'bs': 'Neodređeno analiziranje zavisnosti cilja je naučiti analiziranje zavisnosti iz neoznačenih rečenica. Postojeći rad se fokusira na učenje generativnih modela koristeći algoritam za maksimalizaciju očekivanja i njegove variante, ili učenje diskriminacijskih modela koristeći diskriminacijski algoritam skusteringa. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu strategiju učenja koja uči generativni model i diskriminacijski model zajedno na temelju metode dvostrukog raskidanja. Naš metod je jednostavan i općen, ali je efikasan da uhvatimo prednost oba modela i poboljšamo njihove rezultate učenja. Testirali smo našu metodu na UD treebandu i postigli predstavu države umjetnosti na trideset jezika.', 'ca': "L'analització de dependencies no supervisada té l'objectiu d'aprendre un analitzador de dependencies a partir de frases no notades. La feina actual es centra en aprendre models generadors utilitzant l'algoritme de maximització de l'expectativa i les seves variants, o aprendre models discriminatoris utilitzant l'algoritme discriminatiu d'agrupament. En aquest paper, proposem una nova estratègia d'aprenentatge que aprenga un model generador i un model discriminatiu basat conjuntament en el mètode de doble descomposició. El nostre mètode és simple i general, però eficaç per capturar les avantatges dels dos models i millorar els seus resultats d'aprenentatge. Vam provar el nostre mètode a la base d'arbres de l'UD i vam aconseguir una actuació moderna en trenta llengües.", 'cs': 'Nehlídaná analýza závislostí má za cíl naučit se parser závislostí z nezapsaných vět. Stávající práce se zaměřuje buď na učení generativních modelů s využitím algoritmu maximalizace očekávání a jeho variant, nebo na učení diskriminačních modelů pomocí algoritmu diskriminačního clusterování. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou strategii učení, která se učí generativní model a diskriminační model společně založený na metodě duálního rozkladu. Naše metoda je jednoduchá a obecná, ale efektivní pro zachycení výhod obou modelů a zlepšení jejich výsledků učení. Naši metodu jsme testovali na UD stromovém břehu a dosáhli nejmodernějšího výkonu na třiceti jazycích.', 'bn': 'নির্ভর করা নির্ভরশীল পার্সিং এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে নির্ভরিত বাক্য থেকে নির্ভরিত ব্যাপার শিখার জন্য। বিদ্যমান কাজের উপর জেনারেটিভ মডেল শিক্ষা দিয়েছে প্রত্যাশা -সর্বোচ্চ অ্যালগরিদম এবং এর ভেরেন্ট ব্যবহার করে, অথবা বৈষম্যমূলক ক্ষেত্রে বৈষম্যের মডেল এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন শিক্ষা কৌশল প্রস্তাব করি যা একটি জেনারেটিভ মডেল শিখতে পারে এবং একটি বৈষম্য মডেল যোগাযোগ করে দুইবাল ডিকমোপসি আমাদের পদ্ধতি সাধারণ এবং জেনারেল, কিন্তু কার্যকর, উভয় মডেলের সুবিধা গ্রহণ করা এবং তাদের শিক্ষার ফলাফল উন্নত করা। আমরা ইউডি ট্রিব্যাংকে আমাদের পদ্ধতি পরীক্ষা করেছি এবং ত্রিশ ভাষায় শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের প্রদর্শন করেছি।', 'et': 'Järelevalveta sõltuvuse parsimise eesmärk on õppida sõltuvuse parsimist märkimata lausetest. Olemasolev töö keskendub kas ootuste maksimeerimise algoritmi ja selle variantide abil generatiivsete mudelite õppimisele või diskrimineerivate mudelite õppimisele diskrimineeriva klastrite algoritmi abil. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue õppestrateegia, mis õpib generatiivset mudelit ja diskrimineerivat mudelit, mis põhinevad ühiselt topeltlagunemise meetodil. Meie meetod on lihtne ja üldine, kuid samas tõhus, et haarata mõlema mudeli eeliseid ja parandada nende õpitulemusi. Testisime oma meetodit UD puupangal ja saavutasime tipptasemel esinemise kolmekümnes keeles.', 'fi': 'Valvontattomalla riippuvuuden jäsentämisellä pyritään oppimaan riippuvuuden jäsentäjä merkitsemättömistä lauseista. Työssä keskitytään joko odotusten maksimointialgoritmia ja sen variantteja hyödyntävien generatiivisten mallien oppimiseen tai diskriminatiivisen klusterointialgoritmin oppimiseen. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta oppimisstrategiaa, joka oppii yhdessä generatiivisen mallin ja diskriminatiivisen mallin, joka perustuu dual decomposition menetelmään. Menetelmämme on yksinkertainen ja yleinen, mutta tehokas molempien mallien edut ja oppimistulosten parantaminen. Testasimme menetelmämme UD-puupankilla ja saavutimme huipputason suorituskyvyn kolmenkymmenellä kielellä.', 'jv': 'marker Algorithm Nang pember iki, kita enyester sistem tuku nggawe sistem anyar sing lemuran model model Generative lan model di sistem sing isine supoyo nggo ndelokomosi sistem dhuwur. Awakdhéwé sistem sampeyan ngono alam kuwi nggawe layang-tanggal gawe nguasai iki dadi ditulaké sampeyan ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas kuwi. Awak dhéwé ngejer-ngwale kuwi nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar banter', 'ha': "QRegExp Filin aiki da ke gaba yana fokus a kan karatun misãlai mai gabatar da amfani da algoritm mai ƙayyade-faɗaɗawa da ake amfani da shi, ko kuma a sanar da misãlai masu yin inganci da ke amfani da algoritm mai cire-baka. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani akan da za'a sanar da shi wata motsi mai jama'a da wata misãli mai rarraba da baka kowace a kan metoden diomposition na dual. Tayyayinmu ne mai sauƙi da mai jama'a, kuma amma yana da amfani zuwa ta samun misalin su kuma ya kyautata matsalan su. Haƙĩƙa, mun jarraba hanyoyinmu a kan Treebank na UD kuma muka sami wani halin-da-sanar cikin harshen talãtin.", 'he': 'בדיקת תלויות ללא השגחה מתכוונת ללמוד בדיקת תלויות משפטים ללא השגחה. העבודה הנוכחית מתמקדת או על לימוד דוגמנים דוורתיים באמצעות אלגוריתם המקסימום-ציפיות והשונים שלה, או על לימוד דוגמנים דיסקרטיביים באמצעות האלגוריתם המקסימום המבדל. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים אסטרטגיה חדשה ללמוד דוגמא דורית ומדוגמא דיסקרטיבית מבוססת ביחד על שיטת התפרצות כפולה. Our method is simple and general, yet effective to capture the advantages of both models and improve their learning results.  בדקנו את השיטה שלנו על גבי העץ של ארצות הברית והגענו להופעה חדשה בשלושים שפות.', 'sk': 'Namen nenadzorovanega razčlenjevanja odvisnosti je učiti razčlenjevalnik odvisnosti iz neobvezanih stavkov. Obstoječe delo se osredotoča bodisi na učenje generativnih modelov z uporabo algoritma za maksimiranje pričakovanj in njegovih variant, bodisi na učenje diskriminativnih modelov z uporabo algoritma diskriminativnega grozdja. V prispevku predlagamo novo učno strategijo, ki se uči generativnega modela in diskriminativnega modela, ki skupaj temelji na metodi dvojnega razpadanja. Naša metoda je preprosta in splošna, vendar učinkovita za zajemanje prednosti obeh modelov in izboljšanje njihovih učnih rezultatov. Našo metodo smo preizkusili na UD treebank in dosegli vrhunsko predstavo na tridesetih jezikih.', 'bo': 'རྩིས་མེད་ཐུབ་པའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མིན་སྒྲིག Existing work focuses on either learning generative models using the expectation-maximization algorithm and its variants, or learning discriminative models using the discriminative clustering algorithm. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྦྱོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ནས་གྲངས་སུ་རྐྱེན་པའི་མ་དཔེ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞ ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་པར་མིག་ཆས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕར་རིས་ལ། ང་ཚོས་UD'}
{'en': 'Effective Inference for Generative Neural Parsing', 'fr': "Inférence efficace pour l'analyse neuronale générative", 'ar': 'الاستدلال الفعال للتحليل العصبي التوليدي', 'es': 'Inferencia eficaz para el análisis neuronal generativo', 'pt': 'Inferência eficaz para análise neural generativa', 'zh': '生成式神经解析有效推理', 'ja': '生成的ニューラル構文解析のための有効な推論', 'ru': 'Эффективный вывод для генеративного нейронного анализа', 'hi': 'जननात्मक तंत्रिका पार्सिंग के लिए प्रभावी अनुमान', 'ga': 'Tátal Éifeachtach maidir le Parsáil Néarach Giniteach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Hatékony fertőzés generációs neurális értelmezéshez', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματικό συμπέρασμα για τη γενετική νευρωνική ανάλυση', 'it': "Inferenza efficace per l'analisi neurale generativa", 'kk': 'Жаратылған нейралық талдау үшін эффективті қасиеттер', 'lt': 'Veiksminga infekcija generaciniam nervų analizavimui', 'mk': 'Ефективна инференција за генеративна нервна анализа', 'ms': 'Inferensi Efektif untuk Menghurai Neural Generatif', 'ml': 'പൊതുവാക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള പ്രഭാവ പ്രഭാവം', 'mt': 'Inferenza Effettiva għall-Analiżi Newrali Ġenerattiva', 'mn': 'Өндөрсөн мэдрэлийн шинжилгээний эффектив нөлөө', 'no': 'Effektiv Inferens for generert neiralt tolking', 'ro': 'Inferență eficientă pentru analiza neurală generativă', 'pl': 'Skuteczne wnioski dla generacyjnego analizowania nerwowego', 'sr': 'Efektivna Inferencija za generativno neiralno razmatranje', 'so': 'Effective Inference for Generative Neural Parsing', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරභාවිත න්\u200dයූරාල විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිත විස්තර', 'sv': 'Effektiv inferens för generativ neural tolkning', 'ta': 'பொதுவான புதிய பாசிங்குக்கான விளைவு', 'ur': 'فعالیت نیورال پارسینگ کے لئے اثرات اثر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thông tin hiệu quả cho chế độ thần kinh phát triển', 'bg': 'Ефективно заключение за генеративно неврално анализиране', 'da': 'Effektiv inferens til genererende neural fortolkning', 'nl': 'Effectieve Inferentie voor Generatieve Neurale Parsing', 'hr': 'Efektivna utjecaja na generativno neuroanalizu', 'de': 'Effektive Schlussfolgerung für die generative neuronale Parsing', 'id': 'Inferensi Efektif untuk Analisasi Neural Generatif', 'ko': '생성성 신경 분석의 효과적인 추리', 'fa': 'تأثیر فعالی برای تجزیه عصبی نسل', 'sw': 'Effective Inference for Generative Neural Parsing', 'tr': 'Döredijili Nural Taýýarlama üçin etkinlik', 'af': 'Effektiewe Inferensie vir Genereerde Neurale Ontlegging', 'am': 'undo-type', 'sq': 'Inferenca efektive për analizimin gjenerativ neuronal', 'hy': 'Գեներատիվ նյարդային վերլուծության էֆեկտիվ ինֆերենսը', 'az': 'Generativ nöral analizi üçün effektiv Inference', 'bn': 'নিউরেল পার্সিং এর জন্য সক্রিয় ইনফেরেন্স', 'bs': 'Efektivna utjecaja na generativno neurološko razmatranje', 'cs': 'Účinný závěr pro generační neuronové analýzy', 'ca': "Inferència efectiva per a l'analització neuronal generativa", 'et': 'Efektiivne järeldus generatiivse närviparsimise jaoks', 'fi': 'Tehokas päätelmä generatiiviselle hermoparsaukselle', 'jv': 'Effectative Info kanggo Generative Neral Parasing', 'he': 'הפרעה אפקטיבית למחקר נוירולי גנרטיבי', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učinkovito sklepanje za generativno razčlenitev živcev', 'bo': 'Effective Inference for Generative Neural Parsing'}
{'en': 'Generative neural models have recently achieved state-of-the-art results for constituency parsing. However, without a feasible search procedure, their use has so far been limited to reranking the output of external parsers in which decoding is more tractable. We describe an alternative to the conventional action-level beam search used for discriminative neural models that enables us to decode directly in these generative models. We then show that by improving our basic candidate selection strategy and using a coarse pruning function, we can improve accuracy while exploring significantly less of the search space. Applied to the model of Choe and Charniak (2016), our inference procedure obtains 92.56 F1 on section 23 of the Penn Treebank, surpassing prior state-of-the-art results for single-model systems.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux génératifs ont récemment obtenu des résultats de pointe pour l'analyse des circonscriptions. Cependant, en l'absence d'une procédure de recherche réalisable, leur utilisation a jusqu'ici été limitée à un nouveau classement de la sortie des analyseurs externes dans lesquels le décodage est plus facile à manipuler. Nous décrivons une alternative à la recherche conventionnelle de faisceaux au niveau de l'action utilisée pour les modèles neuronaux discriminants qui nous permet de décoder directement dans ces modèles génératifs. Nous montrons ensuite qu'en améliorant notre stratégie de base de sélection des candidats et en utilisant une fonction d'élagage grossier, nous pouvons améliorer la précision tout en explorant beaucoup moins l'espace de recherche. Appliquée au modèle de Choe et Charniak (2016), notre procédure d'inférence obtient 92,56 F1 sur la section 23 du Penn Treebank, surpassant les résultats de pointe antérieurs pour les systèmes à modèle unique.", 'ar': 'لقد حققت النماذج العصبية التوليدية مؤخرًا أحدث النتائج لتحليل الدوائر الانتخابية. ومع ذلك ، بدون إجراء بحث عملي ، فقد اقتصر استخدامها حتى الآن على إعادة إخراج ناتج المحللات الخارجية حيث يكون فك التشفير أكثر قابلية للتتبع. وصفنا بديلاً للبحث التقليدي في الحزمة على مستوى الإجراء المستخدم للنماذج العصبية التمييزية التي تمكننا من فك الشفرة مباشرةً في هذه النماذج التوليدية. نوضح بعد ذلك أنه من خلال تحسين إستراتيجيتنا الأساسية لاختيار المرشح واستخدام وظيفة التقليم الخشن ، يمكننا تحسين الدقة أثناء استكشاف مساحة بحث أقل بشكل ملحوظ. بالتطبيق على نموذج Choe and Charniak (2016) ، حصل إجراء الاستدلال الخاص بنا على 92.56 F1 في القسم 23 من Penn Treebank ، متجاوزًا أحدث النتائج للأنظمة أحادية الطراز.', 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales generativos han logrado recientemente resultados de vanguardia para el análisis de las circunscripciones. Sin embargo, sin un procedimiento de búsqueda factible, su uso se ha limitado hasta ahora a volver a ordenar la salida de analizadores externos en los que la decodificación es más manejable. Describimos una alternativa a la búsqueda de haz de nivel de acción convencional utilizada para los modelos neuronales discriminativos que nos permite decodificar directamente en estos modelos generativos. Luego demostramos que al mejorar nuestra estrategia básica de selección de candidatos y usar una función de poda gruesa, podemos mejorar la precisión mientras exploramos significativamente menos espacio de búsqueda. Aplicado al modelo de Choe y Charniak (2016), nuestro procedimiento de inferencia obtiene 92,56 F1 en la sección 23 del Penn Treebank, superando los resultados anteriores de última generación para sistemas de modelo único.', 'pt': 'Modelos neurais generativos alcançaram recentemente resultados de última geração para análise de constituintes. No entanto, sem um procedimento de busca viável, seu uso até agora tem se limitado a reclassificar a saída de analisadores externos nos quais a decodificação é mais tratável. Descrevemos uma alternativa à busca de feixe de nível de ação convencional usada para modelos neurais discriminativos que nos permite decodificar diretamente nesses modelos generativos. Em seguida, mostramos que, melhorando nossa estratégia básica de seleção de candidatos e usando uma função de poda grosseira, podemos melhorar a precisão enquanto exploramos significativamente menos do espaço de busca. Aplicado ao modelo de Choe e Charniak (2016), nosso procedimento de inferência obtém 92,56 F1 na seção 23 do Penn Treebank, superando resultados anteriores do estado da arte para sistemas de modelo único.', 'ja': '生成ニューラルモデルは、最近、選挙区解析のための最先端の結果を達成しました。しかしながら、実現可能な検索手順がない場合、それらの使用は、デコードがより牽引可能である外部構文解析器の出力を再ランク付けすることに限定されている。判別ニューラルモデルに使用される従来のアクションレベルのビーム検索の代替手段を説明し、これらの生成モデルで直接デコードすることができます。そして、基本的な候補の選択戦略を改善し、粗刈り機能を使用することで、探索空間を大幅に少なくしながら精度を向上させることができることを示した。Choe and Charniak （ 2016 ）のモデルに適用される推論手順は、ペンツリーバンクのセクション23で92.56 F 1を取得し、単一モデルシステムの以前の最先端の結果を上回っています。', 'hi': 'उत्पादक तंत्रिका मॉडल ने हाल ही में निर्वाचन क्षेत्र पार्सिंग के लिए अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं। हालांकि, एक व्यवहार्य खोज प्रक्रिया के बिना, उनका उपयोग अब तक बाहरी पार्सर के आउटपुट को फिर से तैयार करने तक सीमित है जिसमें डिकोडिंग अधिक सभ्य है। हम भेदभावपूर्ण तंत्रिका मॉडल के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली पारंपरिक एक्शन-लेवल बीम खोज के विकल्प का वर्णन करते हैं जो हमें इन उत्पादक मॉडलों में सीधे डीकोड करने में सक्षम बनाता है। फिर हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी मूल उम्मीदवार चयन रणनीति में सुधार करके और एक मोटे प्रूनिंग फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग करके, हम खोज स्थान की काफी कम खोज करते हुए सटीकता में सुधार कर सकते हैं। Choe और Charniak (2016) के मॉडल पर लागू, हमारी अनुमान प्रक्रिया पेन ट्रीबैंक की धारा 23 पर 92.56 F1 प्राप्त करती है, जो एकल-मॉडल सिस्टम के लिए पूर्व अत्याधुनिक परिणामों को पार करती है।', 'ru': 'Генеративные нейронные модели недавно достигли самых современных результатов для анализа избирательных округов. Однако в отсутствие практически осуществимой процедуры поиска их использование до сих пор ограничивалось перегруппировкой выходных данных внешних парсеров, в которых декодирование является более практичным. Мы описываем альтернативу обычному поиску лучей на уровне действия, используемому для дискриминационных нейронных моделей, что позволяет нам декодировать непосредственно в этих генерирующих моделях. Затем мы показываем, что, улучшая нашу базовую стратегию выбора кандидатов и используя функцию грубой обрезки, мы можем повысить точность, при этом изучая значительно меньше пространства поиска. Применяемая к модели Чо и Чарняка (2016), наша процедура вывода получает 92,56 F1 на участке 23 Пенн-Трибэнк, превосходя предыдущие современные результаты для одномодельных систем.', 'zh': '生神经近得区解析之最新也。 然无可行之索,至于目前为止,其用止于对外部解析器输,其解码尤易。 吾言别神经故事波束索者代方,使吾得径成其解码。 然后改入吾本而用粗剪函数,可以崇准确性,兼探明少之搜索空间。 宜用于Choe、Charniak(2016),吾推理程序得92.56 F1于Penn Treebank第23节上,过于最新也。', 'ga': 'Tá torthaí úrscothacha bainte amach le déanaí ag samhlacha néaracha giniúna maidir le parsáil toghlaigh. Gan nós imeachta cuardaigh indéanta, áfach, tá a n-úsáid teoranta go dtí seo d’athrangú a dhéanamh ar aschur parsálaithe seachtracha ina bhfuil an díchódú níos inrianaithe. Déanaimid cur síos ar rogha eile seachas an gnáthchuardach bíoma ag leibhéal gníomhaíochta a úsáidtear le haghaidh samhlacha néaracha idirdhealaitheacha a chuireann ar ár gcumas díchódú go díreach sna samhlacha giniúna seo. Léirímid ansin, trí fheabhas a chur ar ár mbunstraitéis roghnúcháin iarrthóirí agus trí úsáid a bhaint as feidhm garbh bearrtha, gur féidir linn cruinneas a fheabhsú agus sinn ag iniúchadh i bhfad níos lú den spás cuardaigh. Agus é curtha i bhfeidhm ar shamhail Choe and Charniak (2016), faigheann ár nós imeachta tátail 92.56 F1 ar alt 23 den Penn Treebank, rud a sháraíonn na torthaí úrscothacha a bhí ann roimhe seo do chórais mhúnla aonair.', 'el': 'Τα γενετικά νευρωνικά μοντέλα έχουν επιτύχει πρόσφατα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την ανάλυση εκλογικών περιφερειών. Ωστόσο, χωρίς μια εφικτή διαδικασία αναζήτησης, η χρήση τους μέχρι στιγμής περιορίστηκε στην επανακατάταξη της εξόδου εξωτερικών αναλύσεων στους οποίους η αποκωδικοποίηση είναι πιο ελκυστική. Περιγράφουμε μια εναλλακτική λύση στη συμβατική αναζήτηση ακτίνων επιπέδου δράσης που χρησιμοποιείται για διακριτικά νευρωνικά μοντέλα που μας επιτρέπει να αποκωδικοποιήσουμε απευθείας σε αυτά τα παραγωγικά μοντέλα. Στη συνέχεια, αποδεικνύουμε ότι βελτιώνοντας τη βασική στρατηγική επιλογής υποψηφίων και χρησιμοποιώντας μια λειτουργία χονδρικού κλαδέματος, μπορούμε να βελτιώσουμε την ακρίβεια ενώ εξερευνούμε σημαντικά λιγότερο χώρο αναζήτησης. Εφαρμοσμένη στο μοντέλο Τσόε και Χαρνιάκ (2016), η διαδικασία συμπερασμάτων μας επιτυγχάνει 92.56 F1 στο τμήμα 23 της Πέννης Δέντρου, ξεπερνώντας τα προηγούμενα αποτελέσματα για συστήματα ενιαίου μοντέλου.', 'hu': 'A generációs neurális modellek a közelmúltban korszerű eredményeket értek el a választókerületi elemzésben. Megvalósítható keresési eljárás nélkül azonban alkalmazásuk eddig csak a külső elemzők kimenetének átrendezésére korlátozódott, amelyekben a dekódolás sokkal kezelhetőbb. Leírjuk a diszkriminatív neurális modellekhez használt hagyományos akciószintű sugárkeresés alternatíváját, amely lehetővé teszi, hogy közvetlenül dekódoljunk ezekben a generációs modellekben. Ezután megmutatjuk, hogy alapvető jelöltkiválasztási stratégiánk fejlesztésével és durva metszési funkcióval javíthatjuk a pontosságot, miközben jelentősen kevesebb keresési területet fedezünk fel. Choe és Charniak (2016) modelljére alkalmazott következtetési eljárásunk 92,56 F1-t ér el a Penn Treebank 23. szakaszán, ami meghaladja a korábbi legkorszerűbb eredményeket az egymodell rendszerek esetében.', 'kk': 'Жалпы невралдық моделдері бұрышты талдау үшін күй- жалпы нәтижелеріне жеткізді. Бірақ іздеу процедуры мүмкін емес, олардың қолдануы бұл уақытта қайта бағытталған сыртқы талдаушылардың шығысын қайта бағыттау үшін шектелген. Біз әдетті әрекеттер деңгейінде дискриминациялық невралдық моделдерді іздеу үшін қолданылатын әдетті әрекеттер деңгейінің альтернативті түсіндіреміз. Бұл генерациялық моделдерінде дә Содан кейін біз негізгі кандидаттардың таңдау стратегиясын жақсартып, көпшілік таңдау функциясын қолдану арқылы, іздеу бос орынды таңдау кезінде дұрыстығын жақсартып аламыз. Choe and Charniak (2016) үлгісіне қолданылады, біздің инференциялық процедурамыз Penn Treebank 23 бөлімінде 92,56 F1 болады, бір үлгілі жүйелер үшін алдындағы әртүрлі нәтижелерді өзгертеді.', 'ka': 'პენექტიური ნეიროლური მოდელები ახლა მივიღეთ კონსტუტენტის პარალიზაციისთვის წარმოდგენება. მაგრამ, შესაძლებელი ძიება პროცესტის გარეშე, მათი გამოყენება უფრო მეტი გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე პროცესტის გამოყენება. ჩვენ განახსენებთ ალტენტიფიკაციას, რომელიც დისკრიმინაციური ნეიროლური მოდელეებისთვის გამოყენებული კონტრაციონალური მონაცემებისთვის, რომელიც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია განახ შემდეგ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი საბაზო კანდენტების მონიშნული სტრატიგიაზე და გამოყენებით კონდენტების ფუნქციის გამოყენებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ წარმოდგ ჩვენი ინფრენციის პროცექტის მოდელისთვის მოდელისთვის (2016), ჩვენი ინფრენციის პროცექტის მიღება 92.56 F1 პერექტისთვის პერექტის 23-ზე, რომელიც პერექტის ტრიბანკის წინასწარმოდგენა წინასწ', 'it': "I modelli neurali generativi hanno recentemente raggiunto risultati all'avanguardia per l'analisi delle circoscrizioni. Tuttavia, senza una procedura di ricerca fattibile, il loro uso è stato finora limitato a ricalcolare l'output di parser esterni in cui la decodifica è più trattabile. Descriviamo un'alternativa alla ricerca convenzionale del fascio a livello di azione utilizzata per modelli neurali discriminatori che ci permette di decodificare direttamente in questi modelli generativi. Dimostriamo quindi che migliorando la nostra strategia di base di selezione dei candidati e utilizzando una funzione di potatura grossolana, possiamo migliorare l'accuratezza esplorando significativamente meno spazio di ricerca. Applicato al modello di Choe e Charniak (2016), la nostra procedura di inferenza ottiene 92,56 F1 sulla sezione 23 della Penn Treebank, superando i precedenti risultati dello stato dell'arte per i sistemi monomodello.", 'lt': 'Generaciniai nervų modeliai neseniai pasiekė pažangiausius rezultatus rinkinių apklausai atlikti. Tačiau be įmanomos paieškos procedūros jų naudojimas iki šiol buvo apribotas išorinių analizatorių, kuriuose dekodiavimas yra įmanomas, išėjimo perskaičiavimu. Mes apibūdiname alternatyvą tradiciniam veikimo lygio šviesos paieškai, naudojamam diskriminaciniams neurologiniams modeliams, kurie leidžia mums tiesiogiai dekoduoti šiuose kartų modeliuose. Tuomet parodysime, kad pagerindami savo pagrindinę kandidatų atrankos strategiją ir naudojant didžiulę skaldymo funkciją, galėsime pagerinti tikslumą ir ištirti gerokai mažiau paieškos erdvės. Taikant Choe ir Charniak model į (2016 m.), mūsų išvados procedūra gauna 92,56 F1 Penn Treebank 23 skirsnyje, viršijant ankstesnius pažangiausius vieno modelio sistemų rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Генеративните нервни модели неодамна постигнаа најдобри резултати за анализирање на изборните окрузи. Сепак, без спроведлива процедура на пребарување, нивната употреба досега е ограничена на повторно поврзување на излезот на надворешни анализатори во кои декодирањето е попривлечно. Опишуваме алтернатива за трагата на конвенционално ниво на акција, која се користи за дискриминативни нервни модели кои ни овозможуваат директно да декодираме во овие генеративни модели. Потоа покажуваме дека со подобрување на нашата основна стратегија за избор на кандидати и користење на груба функција на прскање, можеме да ја подобриме прецизноста, истовремено истражувајќи значително помалку место за пребарување. Примено на моделот на Чо и Чарнијак (2016), нашата процедура на инференција добива 92,56 Ф1 на секција 23 на пен дрвот, надминувајќи ги претходните најдобри резултати за едномоделните системи.', 'ms': 'Generative neural models have recently achieved state-of-the-art results for constituency parsing.  Namun, tanpa prosedur gelintar yang boleh dilakukan, penggunaan mereka hingga kini telah terbatas kepada menyalakan semula output penghurai luaran yang mana penyahkodan lebih menarik. Kami menggambarkan alternatif untuk pencarian beam tahap tindakan konvensional yang digunakan untuk model saraf diskriminatif yang membolehkan kita menyahkod secara langsung dalam model generasi ini. Kemudian kita tunjukkan bahawa dengan meningkatkan strategi pemilihan calon asas kita dan menggunakan fungsi pemotong kasar, kita boleh meningkatkan ketepatan semasa mengeksplorasi jauh kurang ruang carian. Diaplikasikan kepada model Choe dan Charniak (2016), prosedur kesimpulan kami mendapatkan 92.56 F1 pada seksyen 23 pokok Penn, melebihi keputusan terakhir bagi sistem model tunggal.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli newrali ġenerattivi reċentement kisbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati għall-analiżi tal-kostitwenzi. Madankollu, mingħajr proċedura ta’ tiftix fattibbli, l-użu tagħhom s’issa kien limitat għall-ħolqien mill-ġdid tal-output tal-analizzaturi esterni li fihom id-dekodifikazzjoni hija aktar attraenti. Aħna niddeskrivu alternattiva għat-tiftix konvenzjonali fuq livell ta’ azzjoni tar-raġġi użat għal mudelli newrali diskriminattivi li jippermettilna niddekoduċu direttament f’dawn il-mudelli ġenerattivi. We then show that by improving our basic candidate selection strategy and using a coarse pruning function, we can improve accuracy while exploring significantly less of the search space.  Applikat għall-mudell ta’ Choe u Charniak (2016), il-proċedura ta’ inferenza tagħna tikseb 92.56 F1 fuq it-taqsima 23 tal-Penn Treebank, li taqbeż ir-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati minn qabel għal sistemi b’mudell wieħed.', 'mn': 'Бүтээлтийн мэдрэлийн загварууд саяхан байгууллагын хуваалцааны төвшин урлагийн үр дүнг гаргасан. Гэхдээ хайлтын үйл ажиллагаагүй, тэдний хэрэглээ нь гадаад ажиллаачидын гаралыг дахин хэлбэрээр шилжүүлэхэд хязгаарлагддаг. Бид эдгээр бүтээлтийн загваруудыг шууд шинэчлэх боломжтой болгодог энгийн үйл ажиллагааны түвшинд хайж буй загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Дараа нь бид үндсэн захирагчийн сонголтын стратегийг сайжруулж, хайлтын орон зайд үнэхээр бага зөв байдлыг сайжруулж чадна. Хоё болон Чарниак (2016) загварын загвар дээр хэрэглэгдсэн бидний халдварын процедур Пенс Treebank-ын 23 хэсэгт 92.56 F1 авч, нэг загварын системийн өмнө урлагийн үр дүн гарч ирсэн.', 'ml': 'സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയിലെ കലാകാര്യ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d അടുത്ത് നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കു എന്നാലും സാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത തെരച്ചില്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയില്ലാതെ അവയുടെ ഉപയോഗം പുറത്തുള്ള പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dസിന്റെ ഫലം പുനരുക്കുന്നതിനായി  ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ നിലപാടിനു വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച് നാം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജനറല We then show that by improving our basic candidate selection strategy and using a coarse pruning function, we can improve accuracy while exploring significantly less of the search space.  ചോയിന്റെയും ചാര്\u200dനിയക്കിന്റെയും മോഡലിന്റെയും പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പെന്\u200d ട്രീബാങ്കിന്റെ 23 ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അപകടത്തിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്ക് 92. 56', 'pl': 'Generatywne modele neuronowe osiągnęły ostatnio najnowocześniejsze wyniki analizy okręgów wyborczych. Jednak bez wykonalnej procedury wyszukiwania, ich zastosowanie do tej pory ograniczało się do ponownego rankingu wyjścia parserów zewnętrznych, w których dekodowanie jest bardziej przyciągane. Opisujemy alternatywę dla konwencjonalnego wyszukiwania wiązki na poziomie działania stosowanego dla dyskryminacyjnych modeli neuronowych, która pozwala nam dekodować bezpośrednio w tych modelach generacyjnych. Następnie pokazujemy, że poprzez ulepszenie naszej podstawowej strategii selekcji kandydatów i wykorzystanie funkcji grubego przycinania możemy poprawić dokładność przy jednoczesnym badaniu znacznie mniejszej części przestrzeni wyszukiwania. Zastosowana do modelu Choe i Charniak (2016), nasza procedura wnioskowania uzyskuje 92.56 F1 na odcinku 23 Penn Treebank, przewyższając wcześniej najnowocześniejsze wyniki dla systemów pojedynczych.', 'no': 'Generiv neuralmodeller har nyleg oppnådd tilstanden av kunsten for å tolka konstitusjonar. Men utan ein feilig søkjeprosedyr, har bruken av dei så langt begrenset til å gjenoppretta utdata av eksterne tolkarar der dekodering er meir sportabell. Vi beskriver ein alternativ til den konvensjonelle søket på strømmenivået som brukar for diskriminasjonale neuralmodeller som kan dekode oss direkte i desse genererte modelane. Vi viser derfor at ved å forbetra vår grunnleggjande kandidatutvalsstrategi og ved å bruka eit uttrykk funksjon, kan vi forbetra nøyaktighet medan vi utforskar mykje mindre av søkjeområdet. I bruk av modellen Choe and Charniak (2016) får infeksjonsprosedyren vårt 92,56 F1 på seksjon 23 av Penn Treebank, gjennomgår førre kunstige resultat for enkelmodelsystemet.', 'ro': 'Modelele neuronale generative au obţinut recent rezultate de ultimă oră pentru analizarea circumscripţiei. Cu toate acestea, fără o procedură de căutare fezabilă, utilizarea lor s-a limitat până în prezent la redistribuirea rezultatelor analizelor externe în care decodarea este mai tractabilă. Descriem o alternativă la căutarea razelor convenționale la nivel de acțiune utilizată pentru modele neurale discriminatorii care ne permit să decodăm direct în aceste modele generative. Apoi arătăm că prin îmbunătățirea strategiei noastre de selecție a candidaților de bază și utilizarea unei funcții de tăiere grosieră, putem îmbunătăți precizia explorând în același timp mult mai puțin spațiu de căutare. Aplicată modelului Choe și Charniak (2016), procedura noastră de deducție obține 92.56 F1 pe secțiunea 23 a Penn Treebank, depășind rezultatele anterioare de state-of-the-art pentru sistemele single-model.', 'sr': 'Generativni neuralni modeli su nedavno postigli rezultate umetnosti za analizu konstitucija. Međutim, bez moguće pretraživačke procedure, njihova upotreba je do sada ograničena na preokretanje izlaza vanjskih parsera u kojem je dekodiranje veće tražiteljstvo. Opišemo alternativu konvencionalnog traženja zraka na nivou akcije korištenog za diskriminacijske neuralne modele koje nam omogućava da dekodiramo direktno u ovim generičnim modelima. Onda pokažemo da, poboljšavajući našu osnovnu strategiju izbora kandidata i koristeći vrhunsku funkciju pružanja, možemo poboljšati tačnost dok istražujemo značajno manje prostora pretraživanja. Primijenio se na model Choe i Charniak (2016), naša procedura infekcije dobija 92,56 F1 na dijelu 23 Penn Treebank-a, prelazeći prethodne rezultate umjetnosti za jedinstvene modele.', 'so': 'Tusaalada dhalashada neurada ayaa ugu dhowaad helay arimaha farshaxanka ee jardiinada guud. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, iyadoo aan lagu samayn karo xiliga raadinta, isticmaalkoodu ilaa waqti waa xad ku leedahay in la cusboonaysiiyo soo bixinta baarlamayaasha dibadda ah, kuwaas oo ay ku qoran tahay mid ka sii suurad badan. Waxaynu tilmaamaynaa mid ka bedel ah raadinta saxda dabeecada ee caadiga ah ee loo isticmaalay tusaalaha neurada takoorista ah oo toos nooga dhigi karo tusaalahan generashada. Markaas waxaynu muujinnaa in horumarinta qorshaha doorashada aasaasiga ah iyo isticmaalka koorasyada waxgarashada, waxaan kordhin karnaa saxda iyo baarinta goobta raadinta si ka yar. Tusaalada Choe iyo Charniak (2016), tartankeena cudurka waxaa laga helaa 92.56 F1 qeybta 23 ee Penn Treebank, iyadoo horay u dhaafaysa kooxaha farshaxanka ee hal nidaam ah.', 'si': 'නිර්මාණික නිර්මාණ මදුල් අලුත් වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරතිදේශ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිදේශයක් ලැබුනා. නමුත්, පුළුවන් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයක් නැතුව, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තවමත් සීමාවිත වෙලා තියෙන්නේ පුළ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා භාවිත වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක න්\u200dයූරාල මොඩේල් වල අපි පස්සේ පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මූලික ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපිට පුළුවන් සොයා චෝයි චාර්නියාක් වල ප්\u200dරමාණය (2016), අපේ පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතියේ පෙන්න් ට්\u200dරී බැන්ක් 23 වලින් 92.56 F1 පද්ධතිය ලබාගන්නවා, ප්\u200dරමාණයේ ප්\u200dරමාණ ප', 'sv': 'Generativa neurala modeller har nyligen uppnått toppmoderna resultat för valkretstolkning. Utan ett genomförbart sökförfarande har dock användningen hittills begränsats till att omräkna resultatet från externa tolkare där avkodning är mer lätthanterlig. Vi beskriver ett alternativ till den konventionella aktionsnivåstrålsökningen som används för diskriminerande neurala modeller som gör det möjligt för oss att avkoda direkt i dessa generativa modeller. Vi visar sedan att genom att förbättra vår grundläggande kandidaturvalsstrategi och använda en grov beskärningsfunktion kan vi förbättra noggrannheten samtidigt som vi utforskar betydligt mindre av sökutrymmet. Tillämpat på modellen Choe och Charniak (2016) uppnår vår slutsatssprocess 92,56 F1 på avsnitt 23 i Penn Treebank, vilket överträffar tidigare state-of-the-art resultat för enkelmodellsystem.', 'ta': 'பொதுவான புதிய மாதிரிகள் சமீபத்தில் பாடலுக்கான நிலை- கலை முடிவுகளை பெற்றுவிட்டது. ஆயினும், சாத்தியமான தேடும் செயல்முறையில்லாமல், அவர்களுடைய பயன்பாடு வெளியீட்டின் வெளியீட்டை மீண்டும் வரையறுக்கப்பட்டுள் நாம் ஒரு வித்தியாசமான செயல்-மட்டத்தின் தேடுதலை விவரிக்கிறோம். வித்தியாசமான புதிய மாதிரிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. பின்னர் நமது அடிப்படை தேர்வு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு திட்டத்தை மேம்படுத்தி ஒரு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தி சரியான செயல்பாட சோய் மற்றும் சார்னியாக (2016) மாதிரிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டு, எங்கள் பாதிப்பு செயல்பாடு 92.56 F1 பென் ட்ரீபாங்கின் பாகம் 23 பாகம் கிடைக்கும், ஒற்றை மாதிரி முற', 'ur': 'پیدا کرنے والی نیورال موڈلز اچھے سے کام آئے ہیں کہ کانسیٹنسٹ پارسینگ کے لئے موقعیت-of-the-art نتیجے پہنچ چکے ہیں. However, without a feasible search procedure, their use has so far been limited to re-anking the output of external parsers in which decoding is more tractable. ہم ایک الٹ نسبت کے اقدام-سطح سیاہی کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جو ہمیں ان جنرائیٹیوں مدلکوں میں سیدھا ڈیکڈ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے۔ پھر ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری بنیادی کاندینٹ انتخاب استراتژی کو بہتر کر دیتے ہیں اور کورس پرینٹ فونسل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم سیدھی بات کو بہتر کر سکتے ہیں جبکہ جگہ جگہ میں بہت کم تلاش کرتے ہیں۔ Choe and Charniak (2016) کے مدل پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے، ہماری آزمائش پردازی پین تری بینک کے 23 حصہ پر 92.56 F1 حاصل کرتی ہے، ایک مدل سیستموں کے لئے پہلے کی حالت کا نتیجہ اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Generative neural models have recently achieved state-of-the-art results for constituency parsing.  Lekin, imkoniyatli qidirish vazifasi yo'q, ularning foydalanishi huddi tashqi parserning natijasini qaytadan qayta yuklashni chegara qiladi. Biz bu generativ modellarida bir tomonidan foydalanadigan oddiy narsalarning qidirish uchun o'zgarishni anglatamiz. Keyin biz buni ko'rsamiz, asosiy kandida tanlash strategimizni o'zgartirishimiz va koox fikr funksiyasini ishlatish mumkin, biz qidirish joyini qidirish juda kichkina ko'paytirish mumkin. Comment", 'vi': 'Mẫu dây thần kinh phát triển gần đây đạt được kết quả tối tân cho phân tích bầu cử. Tuy nhiên, nếu không có một thủ tục tìm kiếm khả thi, cho tới nay việc sử dụng nó đã giới hạn để lần lại sản xuất của các phân tách ngoại ô trong đó có thể kéo dài hơn. Chúng tôi mô tả một sự thay thế cho việc tìm kiếm luồng kích thước của các mô hình thần kinh phân biệt dùng để giải mã trực tiếp trong các mô hình sinh sản này. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng cải thiện chiến lược chọn ứng cử viên cơ bản và sử dụng một chức năng cắt tỉa thô, chúng tôi có thể nâng cao độ chính xác trong khi khám phá không gian tìm kiếm. Ứng dụng theo kiểu Chong và Charniak (vượt qua phần 23 của ngân hàng cây Penn Tree, và kết quả hiện đại của một hệ thống mô hình đơn.', 'bg': 'Генеративните невронни модели наскоро постигнаха най-съвременни резултати за анализ на избирателните райони. Въпреки това, без осъществима процедура за търсене, използването им досега е било ограничено до пренареждане на изхода на външни анализатори, в които декодирането е по-проследимо. Описваме алтернатива на конвенционалното търсене на лъчи на ниво действие, използвано за дискриминационни невронни модели, което ни позволява да декодираме директно в тези генеративни модели. След това показваме, че подобрявайки основната ни стратегия за подбор на кандидати и използвайки функция за грубо подрязване, можем да подобрим точността, като същевременно изследваме значително по-малко пространство за търсене. Приложена към модела на Чое и Чарняк (2016), нашата процедура за заключение получава 92.56 на секция 23 на Пен Трейбанк, надминавайки предишните най-съвременни резултати за едномоделни системи.', 'da': 'Generative neurale modeller har for nylig opnået state-of-the-art resultater for valgkreds parsing. Uden en gennemførlig søgeprocedure har deres anvendelse imidlertid hidtil været begrænset til at omdirigere output fra eksterne fortolkere, hvor afkodning er mere traktabel. Vi beskriver et alternativ til den konventionelle aktionsniveau strålesøgning brugt til diskriminerende neurale modeller, der gør det muligt for os at afkode direkte i disse generative modeller. Vi viser derefter, at vi ved at forbedre vores grundlæggende kandidatudvælgelsesstrategi og bruge en grov beskæringsfunktion kan forbedre nøjagtigheden samtidig med at vi udforsker betydeligt mindre af søgeområdet. Anvendt på modellen af Choe og Charniak (2016) opnår vores inference procedure 92,56 F1 på afsnit 23 i Penn Treebank, hvilket overgår tidligere state-of-the-art resultater for single-model systemer.', 'hr': 'Generativni neuralni modeli nedavno su postigli rezultate umjetnosti za analizu predstava. Međutim, bez mogućeg postupaka pretraživanja, njihova uporaba je do sada ograničena na preokretanje izlaza vanjskih parsera u kojem je dekodiranje tražiteljnije. Mi opisujemo alternativu konvencionalnog traženja zraka na razini akcija koja se koristi za diskriminacijske neuralne modele koje nam omogućava da dekodiramo direktno u ovim generativnim modelima. Zatim pokažemo da poboljšavanjem naše osnovne strategije izbora kandidata i upotrebom vrhunske funkcije pružanja možemo poboljšati preciznost dok istražujemo značajno manje od prostora pretraživanja. Primjeren na model Choe i Charniak (2016), naš infekcijski postupak dobija 92,56 F1 na dijelu 23 Penn Treebank, prelazeći prethodni rezultati umjetnosti za jednomodelne sustave.', 'nl': 'Generatieve neurale modellen hebben onlangs state-of-the-art resultaten behaald voor kiesdistrict parsing. Echter, zonder een haalbare zoekprocedure, is hun gebruik tot nu toe beperkt tot het opnieuw rangschikken van de output van externe parsers waarin decodering meer traceerbaar is. We beschrijven een alternatief voor de conventionele actie-level beam search gebruikt voor discriminatieve neurale modellen die ons in staat stelt om direct te decoderen in deze generatieve modellen. Vervolgens laten we zien dat we door onze basisstrategie voor de selectie van kandidaten te verbeteren en een grove snoeifunctie te gebruiken, de nauwkeurigheid kunnen verbeteren terwijl we aanzienlijk minder zoekruimte kunnen verkennen. Toegepast op het model van Choe en Charniak (2016), bereikt onze inferentieprocedure 92.56 F1 op sectie 23 van de Penn Treebank, die eerdere state-of-the-art resultaten voor single-model systemen overtreft.', 'de': 'Generative neuronale Modelle haben in jüngster Zeit State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse für das Parsing von Wahlkreisen erzielt. Ohne ein durchführbares Suchverfahren beschränkte sich ihre Verwendung bisher jedoch auf die Neurangierung der Ausgabe externer Parser, bei denen die Dekodierung besser nachvollziehbar ist. Wir beschreiben eine Alternative zur konventionellen Strahlensuche auf Aktionsebene für diskriminierende neuronale Modelle, die es uns ermöglicht, direkt in diesen generativen Modellen zu decodieren. Wir zeigen dann, dass wir durch die Verbesserung unserer grundlegenden Kandidatenauswahl und den Einsatz einer groben Beschneidungsfunktion die Genauigkeit verbessern und gleichzeitig deutlich weniger Suchfläche erkunden können. Angewendet auf das Modell von Choe und Charniak (2016), erreicht unser Inferenzverfahren 92.56 F1 auf Abschnitt 23 der Penn Treebank und übertrifft frühere State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse für Einzelmodell-Systeme.', 'id': 'Model saraf generatif baru-baru ini telah mencapai hasil terbaik untuk pemeriksaan konstitusi. Namun, tanpa prosedur pencarian yang bisa dilakukan, penggunaan mereka hingga sekarang telah terbatas untuk mengatur ulang hasil parser eksternal di mana dekodifikasi lebih menarik. Kami menggambarkan alternatif untuk pencarian beam tingkat aksi konvensional yang digunakan untuk model saraf diskriminatif yang memungkinkan kita untuk mendekode langsung dalam model generasi ini. Kemudian kita menunjukkan bahwa dengan meningkatkan strategi pemilihan kandidat dasar kita dan menggunakan fungsi pemotong kasar, kita dapat meningkatkan akurasi sambil mengeksplorasi jauh lebih sedikit ruang pencarian. Diaplikasikan pada model Choe dan Charniak (2016), prosedur kesimpulan kami mendapatkan 92,56 F1 pada bagian 23 dari Penn Treebank, melebihi hasil terbaik sebelumnya untuk sistem model tunggal.', 'ko': '생성성 신경모델은 최근 선거구 분석에서 최신 성과를 거두었다.그러나 실행 가능한 검색 프로그램이 없기 때문에, 그들의 사용은 지금까지 외부 해상도의 출력을 다시 배열하는 데만 한정되어 있으며, 이러한 해상도에서는 디코딩이 더욱 쉽게 처리된다.우리는 전통적인 동작 수평 빔 검색을 대체하는 방법을 묘사하여 구분성 신경 모델에 사용하고 이러한 생성 모델에서 직접 디코딩을 할 수 있도록 한다.그 다음에 우리는 기본적인 후보 선택 전략을 개선하고 굵은 가지치기 함수를 사용함으로써 검색 공간을 현저하게 줄이는 동시에 정확성을 높일 수 있음을 보여 주었다.Choe와Charniak(2016)의 모델에 응용한 우리의 추리 프로그램은 펜실베이니아 트리은행 23절에서 92.56F1을 얻어 단일 모델 시스템의 이전 최신 결과를 초과했다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای عصبی نسل اخیرا نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری برای تجزیه کردن محیط\u200cها به دست آورده\u200cاند. با این حال، بدون روش جستجوی ممکن، استفاده از آن\u200cها تا حالا محدودیت شده است برای بازسازی نتیجه پارسالهای خارجی که در آن دکوندن قابل ردیابی بیشتری است. ما جایگزینی برای جستجوی سطح اقدام معمولی که برای مدل عصبی جدایی استفاده می\u200cشود را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد مستقیماً در این مدل\u200cهای ژنترافی دکود کنیم. سپس نشان می دهیم که با improving the basic candidate selection strategy and using a coarse pruning function, we can improve accuracy while exploring significantly less of the search space. برای مدل چو و چارنیاک (2016) استفاده می\u200cشود، روش آلودگی ما 92.56 F1 در بخش 23 پن درخت بانک را می\u200cگیرد، و نتیجه\u200cهای پیشینیان هنری برای سیستم\u200cهای یک مدل بیشتر از آن می\u200cگذرد.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa ubongo wa vizazi hivi karibuni umepata matokeo ya aina ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kuimba uchaguzi wa uchaguzi. Hata hivyo, bila utaratibu wa kutafuta uwezekano, matumizi yao yamekuwa vizuizini mpaka sasa kubadilisha matokeo ya mabunge ya nje ambapo kupunguza mabango ni mabadiliko zaidi. Tunaelezea mabadiliko ya utafutaji wa kiwango cha kawaida wa mitandao ya ubongo uliotumika kwa ajili ya mifano ya ubaguzi wa taratibu ambazo inatuwezesha kupunguza moja kwa moja katika mifano hii ya kizazi. Kisha tunaonyesha kwamba kwa kuboresha mkakati wetu wa uchaguzi wa msingi na kwa kutumia kazi ya kuelezea bara, tunaweza kuboresha uhakika wakati wa kutafiti kwa kiasi kikubwa chini ya nafasi ya kutafuta. Kutumiwa kwa mtindo wa Choe na Charniak (2016), mchakato wetu wa maambukizi unapata 92.56 F1 katika kipande 23 cha Penn Treebank, ukipitia matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwa mifumo moja.', 'af': "Genereerde neurale modele het onlangs bereik state- of- the- art resultate vir konstituency parsing. Maar sonder 'n feilike soektog prosedure, het hulle gebruik so ver beperk om die uitvoer van eksterne verwerkers te herank waarin dekodering meer tractabel is. Ons beskrywe 'n alternatief vir die konvensionele aksie-vlak-trap soek wat gebruik word vir diskriminasiewe neurale modele wat ons toelaat om direk in hierdie genereerbare modele te dekode. Ons wys dan dat deur ons basiese kandidate-keuse strategie te verbeter en met gebruik van 'n kors pruning funksie, kan ons regverdigheid verbeter terwyl ons betekenlik minder van die soektog spasie uitsoek. Aangepas na die model van Choe en Charniak (2016), ons inferensie-prosedure verkry 92.56 F1 op artikel 23 van die Penn Treebank, deurgegaan vooraf status-of-kuns-resultate vir enkelmodel stelsels.", 'sq': 'Generative neural models have recently achieved state-of-the-art results for constituency parsing.  Megjithatë, pa një procedurë kërkimi të realizueshme, përdorimi i tyre deri tani është kufizuar në rishikimin e daljes së analizuesve të jashtëm në të cilën dekodimi është më i trajtueshëm. Ne përshkruajmë një alternativë për kërkimin konvencional të nivelit të rreze të veprimit të përdorur për modele diskriminuese neurale që na lejon të dekodiojmë drejtpërdrejt në këto modele gjenerative. Pastaj ne tregojmë se duke përmirësuar strategjinë tonë bazë të zgjedhjes së kandidatëve dhe duke përdorur një funksion të ashpër rrënjeje, ne mund të përmirësojmë saktësinë ndërsa eksplorojmë më pak hapësirën e kërkimit. I aplikuar në modelin e Çoi dhe Çarnjakut (2016), procedura jonë e përfundimit merr 92.56 F1 në seksionin 23 të Penn Treebank, duke kapërcyer rezultatet e mëparshme të state-of-the-art për sistemet e modelit të vetëm.', 'tr': "= Ýöne, gözlemek mümkin prosesdir bolmady, olaryň ulany şu wagt daşarydaky parslerniň çikgisini ýene-de tapmak üçin yada edildi. Bu ýerde kodlemek köp tractabilir. Biz bu döredijilik modellerde düzgün dekodine mümkin edýän, adil aksiyon nivel maglumatyň gözlemesini saýlaýrys. Sonra esasy kandidýalarymyzyň stratejisini gowurarak we özümizi gorkunç gabdalyk fonksiyonyny ulanarak, biz özümiziň dogrylygyny gözlemek ýerinden azajyk ýüze çykaryp bileris. Choe we Charniak nusgasyna üýtgedildi, biziň ulaganymyz prosedymyz Penn Treebank'yň 23-nji böleginde 92.56 F1 öňünde bir nusgasy sistemasyna geçýär.", 'am': 'የውይይት አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች በቅርብ ጊዜ የመንግስት አካል ፍሬዎችን አግኝተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በተቻለው የፍላጎት ጉዳይ ሳይኖር፣ የውጭ ፓርስር ውጤታቸውን በመመለስ ላይ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ አቀማመጥ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የChoe እና Charniak (2016) ምሳሌ የተጠቀም፣ የነካራ ፕሮጀክታችን የፓን ቲርባክ ክፍል 92.56 F1 አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': 'Nəyral modellər müəyyən edilmə müəyyən edilməsi üçün müəyyən edilmə müddətinə qədər yaxınlaşdı. Lakin, mümkün olaraq arama prosedüsü olmadan, onların istifadəsi daha çox tractable olduğu externi analizacıların çıxışını yenidən dəyişdirmək üçün dəyişdirilmişdir. Biz bu genetik modellərdə dəyişiklik edə bilən müxtəlif eyni-seviyyətli nürol modellərə istifadə edilən nürol araştırmaların alternatifi təsbit edirik. Sonra göstəririk ki, temel kandidat seçmə stratejisini yaxşılaşdırmaq və qeyri-təmiz fəaliyyəti istifadə edərək, arama alanının çox az olduğunu keşfetmək üçün ədaləti daha yaxşılaşdırabilirik. Choe və Charniak modelinin (2016-ci ildə) istifadə edilmişdir. Bizim infeksiyonumuz Penn Treebank 23-ci bölümündə 92.56 F1 alır, tək modellər sistemlərinin əvvəlki məhsul sonuçlarından keçmişdir.', 'hy': 'Գեներատիվ նյարդային մոդելները վերջերս հասել են ընտրական շրջանների վերլուծության ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին: Այնուամենայնիվ, առանց հնարավոր որոնման գործընթացի, նրանց օգտագործումը մինչ այժմ սահմանափակվել է արտաքին վերամշակումների արդյունքի վերականգնմանը, որտեղ կոդավորումը ավելի լավ է: Մենք նկարագրում ենք ավանդական գործողության մակարդակի ճառագայթի որոնման այլընտրանք, որը օգտագործվում է խտրականող նյարդային մոդելների համար, որոնք մեզ հնարավորություն են տալիս անմիջապես բացահայտել այս սերունդների մոդելները: Այնուհետև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ բարելավելով թեկնածուների ընտրության հիմնական ռազմավարությունը և օգտագործելով խիստ խզբզելի ֆունկցիա, մենք կարող ենք բարելավել ճշգրտությունը, միաժամանակ ավելի քիչ ուսումնասիրելով որոնման տարածքը: Համակարգված Չոյի և Շարնիակի (2016) մոդելի վրա, մեր հետևյալ գործընթացը ստանում է 92.56 F1 Penn Tree բանկի 23. հատվածում, որը գերազանցում է նախկին ամենակարևոր արդյունքները միամոդելային համակարգերի համար:', 'bn': 'প্রজন্মের নিউরেল মডেল সম্প্রতি সংসদীয় পার্গারের জন্য রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে। তবে বাইরের পার্সারের আউটপুট পুনরায় সীমাবদ্ধ করার জন্য তাদের ব্যবহার এখন পর্যন্ত সীমাবদ্ধ হয়েছে যেখানে ডিকোডিং আরো বেশী ট্র্যাক আমরা একটি বিকল্প বর্ণনা করি যা কনশনাল কাজ-স্তরের বীম অনুসন্ধানের জন্য বৈষম্য নিউরেল মডেলের জন্য ব্যবহৃত, যা আমাদের এই জেনারেটিভ মডেলে সরাসর তারপর আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মৌলিক প্রার্থী নির্বাচন কৌশল উন্নত করে এবং কোর্স বুদ্ধিমান কাজ ব্যবহার করে আমরা সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করতে পারি যখন আমরা অনু চো এবং চার্নিয়াক (২০১৬) এর মডেল প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে, আমাদের অসুস্থ প্রক্রিয়া পেন ট্রেবাঙ্কের ২৩ সেকেন্টে ৯২. ৫৬ এফ১ পেয়েছে, এক মডেল ব্যবস্থার পূর্বে শিল্প', 'cs': 'Generační neuronové modely v poslední době dosáhly nejmodernějších výsledků pro analýzu volebních obvodů. Nicméně bez proveditelného vyhledávacího postupu bylo jejich použití doposud omezeno na přesměrování výstupu externích parserů, ve kterých je dekódování více traktivní. Popisujeme alternativu k konvenčnímu vyhledávání paprsku na úrovni akce používanému u diskriminačních neuronových modelů, které nám umožňuje dekódovat přímo v těchto generativních modelech. Poté ukazujeme, že zlepšením naší základní strategie výběru kandidátů a použitím funkce hrubého prořezávání můžeme zlepšit přesnost a zároveň zkoumat výrazně menší část vyhledávacího prostoru. Aplikovaná na model Choe a Charniaka (2016) získává náš inferenční postup 92.56 F1 na úseku 23 Penn Treebank, který překonává předchozí nejmodernější výsledky pro jednomolové systémy.', 'ca': "Els models neurals generatius han aconseguit recentment resultats més avançats per l'analització electoral. No obstant això, sense un procediment de cerca viable, fins ara la seva utilització s'ha limitat a reenvolupar la producció dels analitzadors externs en què la descodificació és més tractable. Descrivem una alternativa a la busca convencional de raig d'acció utilitzada per models neurals discriminatius que ens permeten descodificar directament en aquests models generadors. Ens demostram que millorant la nostra estratègia bàsica de selecció de candidats i utilitzant una funció grossa de pruning, podem millorar la precisió mentre explorem significativament menys espai de cerca. Aplicat al model de Choe i Charniak (2016), el nostre procediment de inferència obté 92,56 F1 a la secció 23 del Penn Treebank, superant els resultats anteriors d'última generació per sistemes de model únic.", 'fi': 'Generatiiviset neuromallit ovat viime aikoina saavuttaneet huipputason tuloksia vaalipiirien jäsentämisessä. Ilman toteuttamiskelpoista hakumenettelyä niiden käyttö on kuitenkin toistaiseksi rajoittunut sellaisten ulkoisten parserien tuotoksen uudelleenjärjestelyyn, joissa dekoodaaminen on helpompi jäljittää. Kuvaamme vaihtoehdon perinteiselle toimintatason sädehaulle, jota käytetään diskriminatiivisissa neuromalleissa, jonka avulla voimme purkaa suoraan näissä generatiivisissa malleissa. Tämän jälkeen osoitamme, että parantamalla perustutkintastrategiaamme ja käyttämällä karkeaa karsintatoimintoa voimme parantaa tarkkuutta ja samalla tutkia huomattavasti vähemmän hakutilaa. Choen ja Charniakin (2016) malliin sovellettuna päätelmämenettelymme tuottaa Penn Treebankin 23. osassa 92,56 F1, ylittäen aiemmat huipputason tulokset yksimallijärjestelmissä.', 'bs': 'Generativni neuralni modeli su nedavno postigli rezultate umjetnosti za analizu konstitucija. Međutim, bez moguće postupke pretraživanja, njihova upotreba je do sada ograničena na preokretanje izlaza vanjskih parsera u kojem je dekodiranje tražiteljnije. Mi opisujemo alternativu konvencionalnog traženja zraka na nivou akcije koja se koristi za diskriminirane neuralne modele koje nam omogućava da dekodiramo direktno u ovim generičnim modelima. Onda pokazujemo da, poboljšavajući našu osnovnu strategiju izbora kandidata i koristeći vrhunsku funkciju pružanja, možemo poboljšati preciznost dok istražujemo značajno manje od prostora pretraživanja. Primijenio se na model Choe i Charniak (2016), naša procedura infekcije dobija 92,56 F1 na dijelu 23 Penn Treebank, pretjerujući prethodne rezultate umjetnosti za jedinstvene modele.', 'et': 'Generatiivsed närvimudelid on viimasel ajal saavutanud tipptasemel tulemusi valimisringkondade parsimisel. Kuid ilma teostatava otsingumenetluseta on nende kasutamine siiani piirdunud väliste parserite väljundi ümberjakendamisega, kus dekodeerimine on jälgitav. Kirjeldame alternatiivi tavapärasele tegevustaseme kiirte otsingule, mida kasutatakse diskrimineerivate närvimudelite jaoks, mis võimaldab meil dekodeerida otse nendes generatiivsetes mudelites. Seejärel näitame, et täiustades oma põhilist kandidaadivaliku strateegiat ja kasutades jämedat pügamisfunktsiooni, saame parandada täpsust, uurides samas oluliselt vähem otsinguruumi. Choe ja Charniaki (2016) mudelile rakendatud järeldusprotseduur saavutab Penn Treebanki 23. jaotises 92,56 F1, ületades ühemudelisüsteemide varasemaid tipptasemel tulemusi.', 'sk': 'Generativni nevronski modeli so nedavno dosegli najsodobnejše rezultate za analizo volilnih okrožij. Vendar je bila brez izvedljivega postopka iskanja njihova uporaba do zdaj omejena na ponovno razporejanje izhodov zunanjih razčlenjevalnikov, v katerih je dekodiranje bolj sledljivo. Opisujemo alternativo običajnemu iskanju žarkov na ravni akcije, ki se uporablja za diskriminativne nevronske modele, ki nam omogoča neposredno dekodiranje v teh generativnih modelih. Nato pokažemo, da lahko z izboljšanjem osnovne strategije izbire kandidatov in uporabo grobe funkcije obrezovanja izboljšamo natančnost in občutno manj iskalnega prostora. Uporabljen za model Choe in Charniak (2016), naš postopek sklepanja pridobi 92,56 F1 na oddelku 23 Penn Treebank, kar presega najsodobnejše rezultate za enomodelne sisteme.', 'jv': 'Report translation bugs to <\\.\\.\\.> politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awakdhéwé ngpisan Alternate kanggo ngilanggar aksi sampek tanggal aksi iki dadi nggawe modèl Neral sing bisa supoyata tanggal nggawe ngubah dhéwé ning model sing nyimpen iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngéwé ngerasah basa Candidaturan tambah nggawe nguasah barang kotak nggawe barang nggawe aturan tambah bantêr, kita iso nggawe barang awak dhéwé, beraksi-beraksi sing luwih apik dhéwé. Aplikasi nang model sing dibenakake Côe lan charnik (2011), dadi kapan ingkang dipolerané awak dhéwé butunggal ngéwé, Drongen ingkang dipolerané dipolerané nang butunggal sing katêpakan karo perangkat-akeh sing bakal terus.', 'ha': "@ action: button A lokacin da ba'a iya amfani da shi ba, sai aka ƙayyade amfani da su zuwa an sake sake sake raba matsalar parser na bakwai, inda kodi ya fi zama taƙaitaccen. Tuna bayyana wata musamman wa filin aiki-rayi da aka yi amfani da wa zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane da za'a bada kodi a cikin waɗannan masu motsi. Sa'an nan kuma Muke nũna cewa, game da improve kimar zaɓa ɓen kandanmu na asalin da kuma mu yi amfani da wani aikin mai gyarawa na kure, za'a iya kyautata taƙaitacce a lokacin da za'a sami kashin filin. Aka amfani da kwamfyutan Choe da Charniak (2016), aikininmu na sami'a 92.46 F1 kan section 23 na Penn Treebank, yana ƙarami gaba ga-state-of-the-art na sami-na'ura na-dumar-dumar.", 'he': "דוגמנים עצביים גנרטיביים השיגו תוצאות חדשות לאחרונה עבור בדיקת מחוז הבחירות. עם זאת, ללא תהליך חיפוש אפשרי, השימוש שלהם עד כה הוגבל לשיקול מחדש את היציאה של מעבדות חיצוניים שבהם התקתק יותר אפשרי. אנחנו מתארים אלטרנטיבה לחיפוש בקרן פעולה קונסיונציונלי שמשתמש לדוגמנים עצביים דיסקרטיביים שמאפשר לנו לפענח ישירות בדוגמנים הדורתיים האלה. ואז אנחנו מראים כי על ידי שיפור האסטרטגיה הבסיסית שלנו לבחור מועמדים ושימוש בתפקיד חיתוך עצום, אנחנו יכולים לשפר בדיקת בזמן לחקור משמעותית פחות של מרחב החיפוש. שימש למודל של צ'ו ושרניאק (2016), תהליך ההנחה שלנו מקבל 92.56 F1 על חלק 23 של פני עץ, מעבר לתוצאות מוקדמות מוקדמות למערכות דוגמניות אחת.", 'bo': 'Generative neural models have recently achieved state-of-the-art results for constituency parsing. However, without a feasible search procedure, their use has so far been limited to reranking the output of external parsers in which decoding is more tractable. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྟངས་ལས་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་མཐུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བྲིས འོན་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་རྨན་གཞི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་མཐའ་འཁོར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་ར ལག་ལེན་པ་འདིས་Choe དང་Charniak(2016)མ་དབྱིབས་གནད་སྡུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ལ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབྱིབས་པ་སྦེ་(92.56 F1) ལ་ཤུགས་སྒྲིག་དང་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Semi-supervised Structured Prediction with Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'ar': 'تنبؤ منظم شبه خاضع للإشراف مع وحدة التشفير التلقائي CRF', 'fr': 'Prédiction structurée semi-supervisée avec autoencodeur CRF neuronal', 'pt': 'Previsão estruturada semi-supervisionada com Autoencoder CRF Neural', 'es': 'Predicción estructurada semisupervisada con autoencoder neuronal CRF', 'ja': 'ニューラルCRFオートエンコーダーによる半監督構造化予測', 'zh': '用神经CRF自编码器督结构化占', 'ru': 'Полуавтоматическое структурированное предсказание с нейронным автокодером CRF', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका CRF Autoencoder के साथ अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित संरचित भविष्यवाणी', 'ga': 'Réamhthuar Struchtúrtha leathmhaoirsithe le hIonchódóir Néarach CRF', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt strukturált előrejelzés Neural CRF Autoencoder segítségével', 'el': 'Ημιεποπτευόμενη δομημένη πρόβλεψη με αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή νευρωνικού CRF', 'ka': 'ნახევარჯერი სტრუქტურაციული პროდიქცია ნეირალური CRF ავტოკოდერისთან', 'it': 'Predizione strutturata semi-supervisionata con Autoencoder Neural CRF', 'kk': 'Нейралық CRF автокодтағы жарты бақылау құрылған бағдарламасы', 'lt': 'Pus prižiūrima struktūrinė prognozė su neurologiniu CRF autokodatoriumi', 'mk': 'Половина надгледувана структурна предвидба со неврален CRF автокодер', 'ms': 'Prediksi Struktur Semi-mengawasi dengan Autopengekod CRF Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d CRF സ്വയം കോഡെര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള സെമിമി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഘട്ടത്തിന്റ', 'mt': 'Predizzjoni Strutturata Semi-Sorveljata b’Awtokodifikatur Neural CRF', 'mn': 'Цөмийн CRF автокодертай хагас дамжуулагдсан Structured Prediction', 'pl': 'Pół-nadzorowana strukturalna predykcja z autokoderem neuronowym CRF', 'no': 'Halvoversikt strukturerte forhåndsvising med nøyralt CRF-kodar', 'ro': 'Predicție structurată semi-supravegheată cu Autoencoder Neural CRF', 'sr': 'Полунадзорена структурна предсказуја с невралним крФ автокодером', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරාල CRF ස්වයංකේතකය සමග අධිපත්ත සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරධානය', 'so': 'Semi-supervised Prediction structured with Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'ta': 'பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கட்டுப்பாட்டு விருப்பத்தேர்வு', 'sv': 'Semiövervakad strukturerad förutsägelse med Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'ur': 'نصف-supervised Structured Prediction with Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'da': 'Semiovervåget struktureret forudsigelse med Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised Structured Prediction met Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'bg': 'Полунадзорно структурирано прогнозиране с неврален автокодер', 'ko': '신경 네트워크 CRF 자동 인코더 기반의 반감독 구조 예측', 'hr': 'Polovično nadgledano strukturno predviđenje sa Neuralnim CRF autokoderom', 'id': 'Prediksi Struktur Semi-Tersupervisi dengan Autokoder CRF Neural', 'de': 'Halbüberwachte strukturierte Vorhersage mit neuronalem CRF Autoencoder', 'af': 'Semi- superviseer Struktuurde voordeel met Neural CRF Outokoder', 'tr': 'Azylyk Gözlemli Structured Prediction with Neural CRF Autoencoder', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد ساخته\u200cشده\u200cی نیمه تحت نظر با خودکوردر CRF عصبی', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i strukturuar gjysmë i mbikqyrur me Autokoduesin Neural CRF', 'sw': 'Udhibiti ulioangaliwa na Mpango wa Nguvu wa CRF', 'hy': 'Կամի կառուցվածքային կանխատեսումը նյարդային ԿՌՖ ավտոկոդերով', 'az': 'Nöral CRF Avtomatik Kodlayıcısı ilə yarı-gözləyirli Yapılmış Vəzəli', 'bs': 'Polovično nadgledano strukturno predviđenje sa neuronskim CRF autokoderom', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'cs': 'Polovičně dohledovaná strukturovaná predikce s neuronovým CRF autokodérem', 'ca': 'Predicció estructurada semisupervisada amb Autocodificador Neural CRF', 'bn': 'নিউরাল CRF স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পর্যবেক্ষণ করা পছন্দ', 'fi': 'Puolivalvonnettu strukturoitu ennuste neuro CRF automaattikooderilla', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega struktureeritud prognoos neuroalse CRF automaatkodeerijaga', 'jv': 'Pilihan Neral CFO autokoder', 'he': 'שימוש מובנה בחצי עם קודד אוטומטי CRF עצבי', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovana strukturirana napoved z nevralnim samokodirnikom CRF', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་མཚོན་པ་ལྟ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་Neural CRF Autoencoder'}
{'en': 'In this paper we propose an end-to-end neural CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) model for semi-supervised learning of sequential structured prediction problems. Our NCRF-AE consists of two parts : an encoder which is a CRF model enhanced by deep neural networks, and a decoder which is a generative model trying to reconstruct the input. Our model has a unified structure with different loss functions for labeled and unlabeled data with shared parameters. We developed a variation of the EM algorithm for optimizing both the encoder and the decoder simultaneously by decoupling their parameters. Our Experimental results over the Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging task on eight different languages, show that our model can outperform competitive systems in both supervised and semi-supervised scenarios.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج المشفر التلقائي CRF (NCRF-AE) من طرف إلى طرف للتعلم شبه الخاضع للإشراف لمشاكل التنبؤ المنظم التسلسلي. يتكون NCRF-AE الخاص بنا من جزأين: مشفر وهو نموذج CRF محسّن بواسطة شبكات عصبية عميقة ، وجهاز فك التشفير وهو نموذج توليدي يحاول إعادة بناء المدخلات. نموذجنا له هيكل موحد مع وظائف خسارة مختلفة للبيانات المصنفة وغير المسماة مع المعلمات المشتركة. لقد طورنا تباينًا في خوارزمية EM لتحسين كل من المشفر ووحدة فك التشفير في وقت واحد عن طريق فصل معلماتهما. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية حول مهمة وضع علامات على جزء من الكلام (POS) في ثماني لغات مختلفة ، أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يتفوق على الأنظمة التنافسية في كل من السيناريوهات الخاضعة للإشراف وشبه الإشراف.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo propomos um modelo de autoencoder neural CRF de ponta a ponta (NCRF-AE) para aprendizado semi-supervisionado de problemas de predição estruturada sequencial. Nosso NCRF-AE consiste em duas partes: um codificador que é um modelo CRF aprimorado por redes neurais profundas e um decodificador que é um modelo generativo tentando reconstruir a entrada. Nosso modelo possui uma estrutura unificada com diferentes funções de perda para dados rotulados e não rotulados com parâmetros compartilhados. Desenvolvemos uma variação do algoritmo EM para otimizar o codificador e o decodificador simultaneamente, desacoplando seus parâmetros. Nossos resultados experimentais sobre a tarefa de marcação Part-of-Speech (POS) em oito linguagens diferentes, mostram que nosso modelo pode superar sistemas competitivos em cenários supervisionados e semi-supervisionados.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle d'auto-encodeur CRF neuronal de bout en bout (NCRF-AE) pour l'apprentissage semi-supervisé de problèmes de prédiction structurée séquentielle. Notre NCRF-AE se compose de deux parties\xa0: un codeur qui est un modèle CRF amélioré par des réseaux de neurones profonds, et un décodeur qui est un modèle génératif essayant de reconstruire l'entrée. Notre modèle possède une structure unifiée avec différentes fonctions de perte pour les données étiquetées et non étiquetées avec des paramètres partagés. Nous avons développé une variante de l'algorithme EM pour optimiser simultanément le codeur et le décodeur en découplant leurs paramètres. Nos résultats expérimentaux sur la tâche de marquage des parties du discours (POS) dans huit langues différentes montrent que notre modèle peut surpasser les systèmes concurrents dans les scénarios supervisés et semi-supervisés.", 'es': 'En este artículo proponemos un modelo de autocodificador CRF neuronal de extremo a extremo (NCRF-AE) para el aprendizaje semisupervisado de problemas de predicción estructurada secuencial. Nuestro NCRF-AE consta de dos partes: un codificador que es un modelo CRF mejorado por redes neuronales profundas, y un decodificador que es un modelo generativo que intenta reconstruir la entrada. Nuestro modelo tiene una estructura unificada con diferentes funciones de pérdida para datos etiquetados y no etiquetados con parámetros compartidos. Desarrollamos una variación del algoritmo EM para optimizar simultáneamente tanto el codificador como el decodificador desacoplando sus parámetros. Nuestros resultados experimentales sobre la tarea de etiquetado de partes del discurso (POS) en ocho idiomas diferentes muestran que nuestro modelo puede superar a los sistemas de la competencia tanto en escenarios supervisados como semisupervisados.', 'ja': '本稿では，逐次構造化予測問題の半監督学習のためのエンドツーエンドのニューラルCRFオートエンコーダ（ NCRF - AE ）モデルを提案する．当社のNCRF - AEは、深層ニューラルネットワークによって強化されたCRFモデルであるエンコーダと、入力を再構築しようとする生成モデルであるデコーダの2つの部分から構成されています。当社のモデルは、共有パラメータを持つラベル付けされたデータとラベル付けされていないデータの異なる損失関数を持つ統一された構造を持っています。エンコーダとデコーダを同時に最適化するためのEMアルゴリズムのバリエーションを開発しました。8つの異なる言語の部分音声（ POS ）タグ付けタスクに関する実験結果は、当社のモデルが監督されたシナリオと半監督シナリオの両方で競合システムを上回ることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文建端到端神经CRF自编码器(NCRF-AE)模样,施于次第结构化占候半监习。 吾NCRF-AE两分:编码器者,深神经网络之CRF,与解码器者,重造而成形也。 吾法有一,异丧函数,所以共参数、未纪数也。 发EM算法之变体,以因解耦编码器与解码器之参数而优化编码器解码器。 八辞之词性(POS)实验结果表明,二监之场,皆优于争统。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम अनुक्रमिक संरचित भविष्यवाणी समस्याओं के अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड तंत्रिका सीआरएफ ऑटोएनकोडर (एनसीआरएफ-एई) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे NCRF-AE में दो भाग होते हैं: एक एन्कोडर जो एक CRF मॉडल है जो गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क द्वारा बढ़ाया जाता है, और एक डिकोडर जो इनपुट को फिर से बनाने की कोशिश कर रहा एक उत्पादक मॉडल है। हमारे मॉडल में साझा पैरामीटर के साथ लेबल किए गए और अनलेबल किए गए डेटा के लिए विभिन्न हानि कार्यों के साथ एक एकीकृत संरचना है। हमने एनकोडर और डिकोडर दोनों को एक साथ उनके मापदंडों को डिकपल करके अनुकूलित करने के लिए ईएम एल्गोरिथ्म की एक भिन्नता विकसित की। आठ अलग-अलग भाषाओं पर पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैगिंग कार्य पर हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम, दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल पर्यवेक्षित और अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित दोनों परिदृश्यों में प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रणालियों को मात दे सकता है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы предлагаем модель сквозного нейронного автокодера ИРК (NCRF-AE) для полуконтролируемого изучения задач последовательного структурированного прогнозирования. Наш NCRF-AE состоит из двух частей: кодировщика, который является моделью CRF, усиленной глубокими нейронными сетями, и декодера, который является генеративной моделью, пытающейся реконструировать входные данные. Наша модель имеет унифицированную структуру с различными функциями потерь для маркированных и немаркированных данных с общими параметрами. Разработана вариация ЭМ алгоритма для оптимизации одновременно как кодера, так и декодера путем разделения их параметров. Наши экспериментальные результаты по тегированию части речи (POS) на восьми различных языках показывают, что наша модель может превосходить конкурентные системы как в контролируемых, так и в полуконтролируемых сценариях.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo molaimid múnla uath-ionchódóra CRF néarúil ó cheann ceann go ceann (NCRF-AE) le haghaidh foghlaim leath-mhaoirsithe ar fhadhbanna struchtúrtha seicheamhach a thuar. Tá dhá chuid inár NCRF-AE: ionchódóir atá ina shamhail CRF feabhsaithe ag líonraí néaracha doimhne, agus díchódóir ar samhail ghiniúna é a dhéanann iarracht an t-ionchur a athchruthú. Tá struchtúr aontaithe ag ár múnla le feidhmeanna caillteanais éagsúla le haghaidh sonraí lipéadaithe agus neamhlipéadaithe le paraiméadair roinnte. D’fhorbraíomar athrú ar an algartam EM chun an t-ionchódóir agus an díchódóir a bharrfheabhsú go comhuaineach trína bparaiméadar a dhíchúpláil. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí Turgnamhach thar thasc clibeála Pháirt-de-Urlabhra (POS) ar ocht dteanga dhifriúla gur féidir lenár múnla feidhmiú níos fearr ná córais iomaíocha i gcásanna maoirsithe agus leath-mhaoirsithe araon.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა ნეიროლური CRF ავტოკოდერი (NCRF-AE) მოდელის ნახევარწმუნებული სკენტიური სტრუქტურული პრობლემების მეცნიერება. ჩვენი NCRF-AE არის ორი ნაწილის შეფარდება: კოდერი, რომელიც CRF მოდელია, რომელიც ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელებით გაუქმებული, და დეკოდერი, რომელიც წარმოიქმებული მოდელია, რომელიც მოწყობილო ჩვენი მოდელი აქვს ერთადერთი სტრუქტურა, რომელიც განსხვავებული სტრუქტურები აქვს მარტივის და არაფერებული მონაცემების განმავლობაში. ჩვენ EM ალგორიტიმს განსხვავებას განვითარებდით, რომელიც ორივე კოდირების და დეკოდირების განსხვავებას ერთადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო სი', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban egy end-to-end neurális CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) modellt javasolunk szekvenciális strukturált predikciós problémák félig felügyelt tanulására. Az NCRF-AE két részből áll: egy mély neurális hálózatokkal bővített CRF modell, és egy dekóder, amely egy generációs modell, amely a bemenetet rekonstruálni próbálja. Modellünk egységes struktúrával rendelkezik, különböző veszteségfunkciókkal a megosztott paraméterekkel ellátott címkézett és címke nélküli adatokhoz. Az EM algoritmus egy variációját fejlesztettük ki, hogy mind a kódoló, mind a dekóder egyidejűleg optimalizáljuk paramétereik leválasztásával. A beszédrész (POS) címkézési feladat nyolc különböző nyelven végzett kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy modellünk mind felügyelt, mind félig felügyelt forgatókönyvekben felülmúlja a versenyképes rendszereket.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο αυτοκωδικοποιητή νευρωνικού CRF (NCRF-AE) για ημι-εποπτευόμενη μάθηση διαδοχικών δομημένων προβλημάτων πρόβλεψης. Το NCRF-AE αποτελείται από δύο μέρη: έναν κωδικοποιητή που είναι ένα μοντέλο CRF ενισχυμένο από βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα, και έναν αποκωδικοποιητή που είναι ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο που προσπαθεί να ανακατασκευάσει την είσοδο. Το μοντέλο μας έχει μια ενοποιημένη δομή με διαφορετικές λειτουργίες απώλειας για μαρκαρισμένα και μη μαρκαρισμένα δεδομένα με κοινές παραμέτρους. Αναπτύξαμε μια παραλλαγή του αλγόριθμου ΕΜ για τη βελτιστοποίηση τόσο του κωδικοποιητή όσο και του αποκωδικοποιητή ταυτόχρονα αποσυνδέοντας τις παραμέτρους τους. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα σχετικά με την εργασία σήμανσης μέρους ομιλίας (σε οκτώ διαφορετικές γλώσσες, δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να ξεπεράσει τα ανταγωνιστικά συστήματα τόσο σε εποπτευόμενα όσο και ημι-εποπτευόμενα σενάρια.', 'it': "In questo articolo proponiamo un modello end-to-end di autoencoder neurale CRF (NCRF-AE) per l'apprendimento semi-supervisionato di problemi di predizione strutturata sequenziale. Il nostro NCRF-AE è composto da due parti: un encoder che è un modello CRF potenziato da reti neurali profonde, e un decoder che è un modello generativo che cerca di ricostruire l'ingresso. Il nostro modello ha una struttura unificata con diverse funzioni di perdita per dati etichettati e non etichettati con parametri condivisi. Abbiamo sviluppato una variazione dell'algoritmo EM per ottimizzare contemporaneamente sia l'encoder che il decoder disaccoppiando i loro parametri. I nostri risultati sperimentali sul compito di tagging Part-of-Speech (POS) in otto lingue diverse dimostrano che il nostro modello può superare i sistemi competitivi sia in scenari supervisionati che semi-supervisionati.", 'mk': 'Во овој документ предложуваме модел од крај до крај на нервен CRF автокодер (NCRF-AE) за полунадгледувано учење на секвенцијалните структурирани предвидувачки проблеми. Нашиот NCRF-AE се состои од два дела: кодер кој е модел на CRF подобрен од длабоките нервни мрежи, и декодер кој е генеративен модел кој се обидува да го реконструира внесувањето. Нашиот модел има унифицирана структура со различни изгубени функции за означени и неозначени податоци со споделени параметри. Развивме варијација на ЕМ алгоритмот за оптимизација на кодерот и декодерот истовремено со раздвојување на нивните параметри. Нашите експериментални резултати во врска со задачата за означување на дел од говорот (POS) на осум различни јазици покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да ги надмине конкурентните системи во надгледувани и полунадгледувани сценарија.', 'lt': 'In this paper we propose an end-to-end neural CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) model for semi-supervised learning of sequential structured prediction problems.  Mūsų NCRF-AE sudaro dvi dalys: kodatorius, kuris yra CRF model is, patobulintas giliais nervų tinklais, ir dekoderis, kuris yra generacinis modelis, bandantis atkurti įvestį. Mūsų modelis turi vieningą struktūrą su skirtingomis nuostolių funkcijomis žymėtiems ir nenustatytiems duomenims su bendrais parametrais. Mes sukūrėme EM algoritmo variantą, kad optimizuotume ir kodatorių, ir dekoderį vienu metu atsijungdami jų parametrai. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai, susiję su kalbos dalies (POS) ženklinimo užduotimi aštuoniomis skirtingomis kalbomis, rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali viršyti konkurencines sistemas ir prižiūrimose, ir pusiau prižiūrimose scenarijose.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаздың соңындағы невралдық CRF автокодері (NCRF- AE) үлгісін жарты бақылау үшін қараймыз. NCRF- AE- іміздің екі бөлігіміз: CRF үлгісі, терең невралдық желілерден көтерілген, және енгізуді қайта құру үшін генерациялық модель декодері. Біздің моделімізде ортақ параметрлермен жарлық және жарлық берілмеген деректер үшін біріктірілген құрылымыз бар. Олардың параметрлерін декодтау арқылы EM алгоритмінің түрлендірілігін жасадық. Сөйлеу (POS) бөлігін сегіз түрлі тілде белгілеу тапсырмасының эксперименталдық нәтижелеріміз, моделіміздің бақылау және жарты бақылау сценарияларында конкуренциялық жүйелерді орындай алады.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami cadangkan model pengekod CRF saraf (NCRF-AE) akhir-akhir untuk pembelajaran setengah-mengawasi masalah ramalan struktur urutan. NCRF-AE kami terdiri dari dua bahagian: pengekod yang merupakan model CRF yang ditambah oleh rangkaian saraf dalam, dan pengekod yang merupakan model generatif yang cuba untuk membina semula input. Model kita mempunyai struktur bersatu dengan fungsi kehilangan yang berbeza untuk data yang ditabel dan tidak ditabel dengan parameter berkongsi. Kami mengembangkan variasi algoritma EM untuk optimizasi kedua-dua pengekod dan penyahkop secara bersamaan dengan menyahkopi parameter mereka. Our Experimental results over the Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging task on eight different languages, show that our model can outperform competitive systems in both supervised and semi-supervised scenarios.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu mudell ta’ awtokoder tas-CRF newrali minn tarf sa tarf (NCRF-AE) għal tagħlim semisorveljat ta’ problemi ta’ tbassir strutturat sekwenzjali. L-NCRF-AE tagħna tikkonsisti f’żewġ partijiet: kodifikatur li huwa mudell tas-CRF imsaħħa ħ minn netwerks newrali profondi, u dekoder li huwa mudell ġenerattiv li jipprova jirrikostrui l-input. Il-mudell tagħna għandu struttura unifikata b’funzjonijiet differenti ta’ telf għal dejta ttikkettata u mingħajr tikketta b’parametri kondiviżi. Żviluppajna varjazzjoni tal-algoritmu EM għall-ottimizzazzjoni kemm tal-kodifikatur kif ukoll tad-dekoder fl-istess ħin billi diżakkoppjajna l-parametri tagħhom. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna dwar il-kompitu ta’ tikkettar tal-Parti tal-Kellem (POS) fuq tmien lingwi differenti, juru li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jwettaq sistemi kompetittivi kemm f’xenarji sorveljati kif ukoll f’xenarji semisorveljati.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രവചന പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി അവസാനിക്കുന്ന നുറല്\u200d സിഎഫ് സ് നമ്മുടെ NCRF-AE രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉള്ളതാണ്: ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്ററില്\u200d നെറ്ററില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡെ നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സ്ഥാനമുണ്ട്, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ നഷ്ട്ടത്തിന്റെ ഫങ്ഷനുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേറെയൊരു കൂട് എം ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. കോഡെരും അവയുടെ അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി മാറ എട്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എട്ട് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ടാഗിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein modell for avslutten av neurale CRF-koding (NCRF-AE) for semioversikt læring av sekvensiske strukturerte forhåndsvising. NCRF-AE vårt består av to deler: ein koder som er ein CRF-modell forbetra av dype neuralnettverk, og ein dekoder som er ein generelt modell som prøver å gjenoppretta inndata. Modellen vårt har ein uniformert struktur med ulike tapsfunksjonar for merkelige og ubeabelte data med delte parametrar. Vi utvikla ein variasjon av EM-algoritmen for å optimalisera både koderen og dekoderen samtidig ved å dekoppera parametra sine. Eksperimentale resultatet vårt over det delt av språk (POS) som merker oppgåva på åtte ulike språk, viser at modellen vårt kan utføre konkurentære systemar i både oversikte og halvoversikte scenarior.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy kompleksowy model autokodera neuronowego CRF (NCRF-AE) dla częściowo nadzorowanego uczenia się sekwencyjnych problemów przewidywania struktury. Nasz NCRF-AE składa się z dwóch części: kodera będącego modelem CRF wzbogaconym o głębokie sieci neuronowe oraz dekodera będącego modelem generatywnym próbującym odtworzyć wejście. Nasz model posiada ujednoliconą strukturę z różnymi funkcjami strat dla danych etykietowanych i nieoznakowanych ze wspólnymi parametrami. Opracowaliśmy odmianę algorytmu EM do optymalizacji zarówno kodera, jak i dekodera jednocześnie poprzez oddzielenie ich parametrów. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące tagowania części mowy (POS) w ośmiu różnych językach pokazują, że nasz model może przewyższyć konkurencyjne systemy zarówno w scenariuszach nadzorowanych, jak i pół-nadzorowanych.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид дараагийн бүтээгдэхүүний судалгааны талаар ажиглаж байгаа мэдрэлийн CRF автокодлогч (NCRF-AE) загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний NCRF-AE нь хоёр хэсгийг бүрдүүлдэг: CRF загвар юм. Энэ бол гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд нэмэгдүүлсэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар юм. Бидний загварын загвар нь хуваалцаагүй параметрлүүдтэй тэмдэглэгдсэн, хуваалцаагүй өгөгдлийн функцийн нэгтгэл бүтэц байдаг. Бид EM алгоритмын өөрчлөлт бүтээсэн. Кодчууд болон декодчууд нь параметрлүүдийг шинэчлэхэд хамгийн сайн сайжруулах боломжтой. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнг 8 өөр хэл дээр тайлбарлаж буй ажил дээр, бидний загвар нь дамжуулагдсан, хагас дамжуулагдсан хувилбарт өрсөлдөг системээс илүү өрсөлдөг боломжтой болно.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare propunem un model end-to-end de autoencoder neural CRF (NCRF-AE) pentru învățarea semi-supravegheată a problemelor de predicție structurată secvențială. NCRF-AE-ul nostru constă din două părți: un encoder care este un model CRF îmbunătățit de rețele neuronale profunde, și un decoder care este un model generativ care încearcă să reconstruiască intrarea. Modelul nostru are o structură unificată cu diferite funcții de pierdere pentru date etichetate și neetichetate cu parametri partajați. Am dezvoltat o variație a algoritmului EM pentru optimizarea simultană a encoderului și a decodorului prin decuplarea parametrilor acestora. Rezultatele experimentale ale sarcinii de etichetare Part-of-Speech (POS) pe opt limbi diferite arată că modelul nostru poate depăși performanțele sistemelor competitive atât în scenarii supravegheate, cât și în scenarii semi-supravegheate.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo model neuralnog CRF autokodera (NCRF-AE) za polu-nadzorno učenje sekvencijalnih structuriranih problema predviđanja. Naša NCRF-AE sastoji se od dva dijela: koder koji je CRF model poboljšan dubokim neuralnim mrežama, i dekoder koji je generativni model koji pokušava rekonstruisati ulaz. Naš model ima ujedinjenu strukturu sa različitim funkcijama gubitka za etiketirane i neoznačene podatke sa zajedničkim parametrama. Razvili smo varijaciju EM algoritma za optimizaciju i kodera i dekodera istovremeno prekidajući njihove parametre. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati o delu govora (POS) označavanju zadatka na osam različitih jezika pokazuju da naš model može izvršiti konkurentne sisteme u nadzornim i polu nadzornim scenarijama.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි අවසානයෙන් අවසාන CRF ස්වයංකේතකය (NCRF-AE) නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවසානය කරනවා. අපේ NCRF-AE එකේ කොටස් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: CRF මොඩල් එකක්, ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙන් විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරභාවිත මදුල්යෙ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක සංවිධානයක් තියෙනවා වෙනස් නැති වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරදි වැරද අපි EM ඇල්ගෝරිතම්ගේ වෙනස් විදියට විස්තර කළා, ඒකෝඩර් සහ ඩිකෝඩර් දෙන්නම් එකම වෙනස් කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණි අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනස් භාෂාවක් අටයි ටැග් කරනවා කාර්යය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en end-to-end neural CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) modell för semi-övervakad inlärning av sekventiella strukturerade prediktionsproblem. Vår NCRF-AE består av två delar: en encoder som är en CRF-modell förstärkt av djupa neurala nätverk, och en dekoder som är en generativ modell som försöker rekonstruera ingången. Vår modell har en enhetlig struktur med olika förlustfunktioner för märkta och omärkta data med delade parametrar. Vi utvecklade en variant av EM-algoritmen för att optimera både kodaren och avkodaren samtidigt genom att frikoppla deras parametrar. Våra experimentella resultat över POS-märkningsuppgiften på åtta olika språk visar att vår modell kan överträffa konkurrerande system i både övervakade och halvövervakade scenarier.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa modelka kooxda CRF ee ugu dambaysta neurada ah (NCRF-AE) oo ah barashada barashada dhibaatooyinka la soo hor dhigo dabadeed. NCRF-AE waxaa ka mid ah laba qayb: Qodxad oo ah model CRF oo lagu kordhiyey shabakado aad u dheer oo neurada, iyo decoder oo ah model generative oo isku dayaya in lagu cusboonaysiiyo input. Tusaalkayaga waxaa ku yaala dhismo la isku dayay oo ay leeyihiin functiooyin khasaaro kala duduwan oo ay ku qoran yihiin macluumaad aan la aqoon karin oo ay leeyihiin parameters qayb ah. Waxaannu horumarinnay isbedelka kalgoritka EM si aan u bedelno koordirada iyo koordirada islamarkaasna aan u kala qeybinno parameteriyada. Our Experimental results over the Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging task on eight different languages, show that our model can outperform competitive systems in both supervised and semi-supervised scenarios.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نائرل CRF اتوکوڈر (NCRF-AE) موڈل کو نصف-supervised سیکھنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے NCRF-AE دو قسموں میں سے ہے: ایک Encoder ہے جو ایک CRF موڈل ہے جو عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کے ذریعے مہربانی کی گئی ہے، اور ایک ڈیکوڈر ہے جو ایک پیدا کرنے والی موڈل ہے، اس کے سوال کو دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے. ہمارے مدل کے پاس ایک متحدہ ساختار ہے جو مختلف خسارہ فنکٹوں کے ساتھ لیبل کیا گیا ہے اور مشترک پارامتروں کے ساتھ غیر قابل ذخیره کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم نے EM الگوریتم کی ایک تغییر تولید کی کہ ان کے پارامتروں کو دکورڈ کرنے کے لئے کوڈر اور ڈیکوڈر کو اچھی طرح دکورڈ کرنے کے لئے۔ ہمارے آزمائش کا نتیجہ آٹھ مختلف زبانوں پر ٹاگ کرنے کے لئے ہے اور ہماری مدل ان دونوں موجودات میں مسابقات سیستموں سے زیادہ کام کرسکتا ہے جو نظارت یافتہ ہیں اور نیچے نظارت یافتہ ہیں۔', 'ta': 'In this paper we propose an end-to-end neural CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) model for semi-supervised learning of sequential structured prediction problems.  எங்கள் NCRF-AE இரண்டு பகுதிகளில் உள்ளது: இது CRF முறைமையாகும் அதிகப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது ஆழமான புதிய பிணையம் வலைப்பின்னல்களால் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளத எங்கள் மாதிரியில் ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட கட்டமைப்பு வேறு இழப்பு செயல்பாடுகளுடன் குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் குறிப்பிட குறியீட்டு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு மற்றும் அதே நேரத்தில் அளபுருக்களை பிரிப்பதற்காக முன்னிருப்பு மாறுதலை உருவாக்கினோம். எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் எட்டு வித்தியாசமான மொழிகளில் பேச்சின் பாகம் குறிக்கும் பணியின் மீது, எங்கள் மாதிரியில் போட்டியாளர்கள் முறைமைகளை', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz keyingi qanchalik tasdiqlangan deb hisoblash muammolarini o'rganish uchun oxiriga oʻtish neyron neyron CRF (NCRF-AE) modelini tahrirlash. Bizning NCRF-AE ikki qismlardan bir kodlash usuli: KDEF modeli eng yuqori neyrol tarmoqlari tomonidan oshirilgan imkoniyat, va kiritini qayta yaratishni harakat qilayotgan generativ modeli. Bizning modelimizda bir bir bir tizim bor, cheksiz qo'shish funksiyalari bilan ishlab chirilgan va notoʻgʻri maʼlumot bilan birlashtirilgan parametrlar bilan bir nechta qo'yish funksiyati bor. We developed a variation of the EM algorithm for optimizing both the encoder and the decoder simultaneously by decoupling their parameters.  Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz sakkiz xil tillarda (POS) teglash vazifasini ko'rsatadi, bizning modelimiz taxminan tizimlarni taʼminlovchi va semi-taʼminlovchi tashkilotlarda bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình tự mã hóa CRF thần kinh (NCRF-AE) cho việc học theo chế độ phân giám sát các vấn đề dự đoán theo chuỗi. Chiếc NCRF-AE của chúng ta gồm hai phần: một bộ mã hóa, một mô hình CRF được tăng cường bởi các mạng thần kinh sâu, và một bộ giải mã, một mô hình gây ra cố tái tạo lại dữ liệu. Mẫu của chúng tôi có một cấu trúc thống nhất với các chức năng mất mát khác nhau cho dữ liệu dán nhãn và vô hiệu với các tham số chung. Chúng tôi phát triển một thay đổi của thuật toán EM để tăng khả năng giữa bộ mã hóa và bộ giải bằng cách tách các tham số của chúng ra. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta trong lĩnh vực Phát ngôn (POS) trên tám ngôn ngữ khác nhau, cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta có thể vượt trội các hệ thống cạnh tranh trong các viễn cảnh được giám sát và bán giám sát.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en end-to-end neural CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) model til semi-overvåget læring af sekventielle strukturerede forudsigelsesproblemer. Vores NCRF-AE består af to dele: en encoder, som er en CRF model forbedret af dybe neurale netværk, og en dekoder, som er en generativ model, der forsøger at rekonstruere input. Vores model har en samlet struktur med forskellige tabsfunktioner for mærkede og ikke-mærkede data med delte parametre. Vi udviklede en variation af EM algoritmen til at optimere både encoder og dekoder samtidig ved at afkoble deres parametre. Vores eksperimentelle resultater over Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging opgaven på otte forskellige sprog viser, at vores model kan overgå konkurrencedygtige systemer i både overvågede og halvovervågede scenarier.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein End-to-End neuronales CRF Autoencoder (NCRF-AE) Modell für semi-überwachtes Lernen sequentiell strukturierter Vorhersageprobleme vor. Unser NCRF-AE besteht aus zwei Teilen: einem Encoder, das ein CRF-Modell ist, das durch tiefe neuronale Netze verbessert wird, und einem Decoder, der ein generatives Modell ist, das versucht, den Eingang zu rekonstruieren. Unser Modell verfügt über eine einheitliche Struktur mit verschiedenen Verlustfunktionen für beschriftete und nicht beschriftete Daten mit gemeinsamen Parametern. Wir entwickelten eine Variation des EM-Algorithmus zur gleichzeitigen Optimierung von Encoder und Decoder durch Entkopplung ihrer Parameter. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse über die Part-of-Speech (POS)-Tagging-Aufgabe in acht verschiedenen Sprachen zeigen, dass unser Modell wettbewerbsfähige Systeme sowohl in überwachten als auch halbüberwachten Szenarien übertreffen kann.', 'nl': "In dit artikel stellen we een end-to-end neurale CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) model voor voor semi-supervised leren van sequentiële gestructureerde voorspellingsproblemen. Onze NCRF-AE bestaat uit twee delen: een encoder die een CRF model is versterkt door diepe neurale netwerken, en een decoder die een generatief model is dat probeert de ingang te reconstrueren. Ons model heeft een uniforme structuur met verschillende verliesfuncties voor gelabelde en niet-gelabelde gegevens met gedeelde parameters. We ontwikkelden een variatie van het EM algoritme om zowel de encoder als de decoder tegelijkertijd te optimaliseren door hun parameters te ontkoppelen. Onze experimentele resultaten over de Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging taak op acht verschillende talen tonen aan dat ons model concurrerende systemen kan overtreffen in zowel supervised als semi-supervised scenario's.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия ние предлагаме модел от край до край невронен автокодер за полунадзорно обучение на последователни структурирани прогнозни проблеми. Нашият NCRF-AE се състои от две части: кодер, който е CRF модел, подобрен от дълбоки невронни мрежи, и декодер, който е генеративен модел, опитващ се да възстанови входа. Нашият модел има единна структура с различни функции за загуба на етикетирани и неетикетирани данни с споделени параметри. Разработихме вариация на ЕМ алгоритъма за оптимизиране едновременно на кодера и декодера чрез отделяне на параметрите им. Нашите експериментални резултати по задачата за маркиране на част от речта (ПОС) на осем различни езика показват, че нашият модел може да надмине конкурентните системи както при сценарии под надзор, така и при полунадзор.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo model neuralnog CRF autokodera (NCRF-AE) za polu-nadzorno učenje sekvencijalnih problema s strukturovanim predviđanjem. Naša NCRF-AE sastoji se od dva dijela: koder koji je CRF model poboljšan dubokim nervnim mrežama, i dekoder koji je generativni model pokušavajući rekonstruirati ulaz. Naš model ima ujedinjenu strukturu sa različitim funkcijama gubitka za označene i neoznačene podatke s zajedničkim parametrama. Razvili smo varijaciju EM algoritma za optimizaciju i kodera i dekodera istovremeno prekidanjem njihovih parametara. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati nad zadatkom dio govora (POS) označavanjem na osam različitih jezika pokazuju da naš model može izvršiti konkurentne sustave u nadzirenim i polu nadzirenim scenarijima.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک مدل استفاده از استفاده\u200cکننده\u200cی سی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآی\u200cآ NCRF-AE ما از دو قسمت بستگی دارد: یک کوردر که یک مدل CRF است که توسط شبکه های عصبی عمیق افزایش یافته شده، و یک dekoder که یک مدل ژنتوری است که سعی می\u200cکند وارد را بازسازی کند. مدل ما یک ساختار متحد با عملکرد از دست دادن متفاوت برای اطلاعات با پارامترهای مشترک و نقاشی مشترک دارد. ما تغییرات الگوریتم EM را برای optimization of both the encoder and the decoder simultaneously by decoupling their parameters. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما روی بخشی از سخنرانی (POS) که در هشت زبان مختلف نشان می\u200cدهد، نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما می\u200cتواند سیستم\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cای را در سیناریو\u200cهای نظارت\u200cشده و نیمه\u200cنظارت\u200cشده انجام دهد.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunapendekeza mfumo wa kompyuta ya CRF ya mwisho wa mwisho (NCRF-AE) kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa utabiri ulioanzishwa kwa sekunde. NCRF-AE inajumuisha sehemu mbili: kodi ambalo ni mfumo wa CRF ulioongezwa na mitandao ya ndani ya ubongo wa neura, na decodi ambayo ni modeli ya jeneral inayojaribu kujenga tena kituo hicho. Mradi wetu una muundo wa pamoja na kazi mbalimbali za kupoteza kwa ajili ya taarifa zisizoeleweka na zile zisizoeleweka kwa vipimo vilivyoshirikiana. We developed a variation of the EM algorithm for optimizing both the encoder and the decoder simultaneously by decoupling their parameters.  Matokeo yetu ya majaribio juu ya jukumu la kuandika habari katika lugha nane tofauti, yanaonyesha kuwa model yetu inaweza kufanya mifumo ya ushindani katika mazingira yanayofuatiliwa na yanayofuatiliwa na nusu.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mengusulkan sebuah model CRF otokoder saraf akhir-akhir (NCRF-AE) untuk pembelajaran semi-supervised tentang masalah proyeksi strukturasi sekuensial. NCRF-AE kami terdiri dari dua bagian: sebuah pengekode yang merupakan model CRF yang diperbaiki oleh jaringan saraf dalam, dan sebuah pengekode yang merupakan model generatif yang mencoba untuk rekonstruksi input. Model kita memiliki struktur bersatu dengan fungsi kehilangan yang berbeda untuk data yang ditabel dan tidak ditabel dengan parameter berbagi. Kami mengembangkan variasi dari algoritma EM untuk optimisasi kedua koder dan dekoder secara bersamaan dengan melepas parameter mereka. Hasil Eksperimental kami atas tugas tagging Part-of-Speech (POS) pada delapan bahasa yang berbeda, menunjukkan bahwa model kami dapat melampaui sistem kompetitif dalam skenario yang diawasi dan semi-mengawasi.', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n end- to- end neural CRF autoencoder (NCRF- AE) model vir semi- superviseer leer van sekwensielle struktureerde voorskou probleme. Ons NCRF-AE bestaan van twee dele:  'n enkoder wat 'n CRF model is verbeter deur diep neuralnetwerke, en 'n dekoder wat 'n genereerbare model is probeer om die invoer te herkonstrukteer. Ons model het 'n eenvoudige struktuur met verskillende verlies funksies vir etiketeerde en ongeabelde data met gedeelde parameters. Ons het 'n verandering van die EM-algoritme ontwikkel vir optimaliseer beide die enkoder en die dekoder eenmaal deur hulle parameters afkoppel te maak. Ons eksperimentele resultate oor die Part-of-Speech (POS) merking opdrag op agt verskillende tale, wys dat ons model kan uitvoer medelykstelsels in beide ondersoekte en semi-ondersoekte scenarios.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër propozojmë një model të autokoduesit nervor CRF (NCRF-AE) për mësimin gjysmë-mbikqyrur të problemeve sekuenciale të parashikimit të strukturuar. NCRF-AE-ja jonë përbëhet nga dy pjesë: një kodues i cili është një model CRF i përmirësuar nga rrjetet e thella nervore, dhe një dekoder i cili është një model gjenerativ që përpiqet të rindërtojë input. Modeli ynë ka një strukturë të unifikuar me funksione të ndryshme humbjeje për të dhënat e etiketuara dhe të paetiketuara me parametra të përbashkëta. Ne zhvilluam një variacion të algoritmit EM për optimizimin si koduesit dhe dekoderit në të njëjtën kohë duke shkëputur parametrat e tyre. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale lidhur me detyrën e etiketimit të Pjesës së Fjalës (POS) në tetë gjuhë të ndryshme tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të mbizotërojë sistemet konkurruese në skenarë të mbikqyrur dhe gjysmë-mbikqyrur.', 'ko': '본고는 서열 구조 예측 문제의 반감독 학습에 사용되는 단도직입적인 신경 CRF 자동 인코더(NCRF-AE) 모델을 제시했다.우리의 NCRF-AE는 두 부분으로 구성되어 있다. 하나는 인코더이고, 하나는 깊이 신경 네트워크를 통해 강화된 CRF 모델이며, 다른 하나는 인코더이다. 이것은 입력을 재구성하려는 생성 모델이다.우리의 모델은 하나의 통일된 구조를 가지고 공유 매개 변수를 가진 표기와 미표기 데이터에 대해 서로 다른 손실 함수를 가진다.우리는 인코더와 디코더의 파라미터를 결합시켜 인코더와 디코더를 동시에 최적화하는 EM 알고리즘의 변체를 개발했다.우리가 8가지 서로 다른 언어의 어성 표기 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 감독과 반감독이 있는 상황에서 경쟁 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz iň soňunda näyral CRF otokodçysy (NCRF-AE) nusgasyny yzarlanýan strukturly öňlenme meseleleri üçin ýarym-gözlenen öwrenmek üçin nusgasyny teklip edýäris. NCRF-AE biziň iki bölümlerimiz bar: kirdisini ýene inşa etmek üçin ýüzelendirilen CRF ködleme modeli. Biziň modelimiz beýleki ýigşirlik funksiýaly etiket edilen we ýazman maglumaty paýlaşdyr. Biz EM algoritminin üýtgewini hem kodlayıcı hem dekoderi hem de parallelerini çözerek geliştirdik. Biziň azykly netijelerimiz Speech-iň (POS) bölüminde sekiz dürli dillerde taglama täbligini görkezip, nusgamyzyň hem gözleýän we hem ýa-gözleýän senaryolaryda konkursiýa sistemalary çykyp biljekdigini görkez.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি যে শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল সিআরএফ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কোডার (NCRF-AE) মডেলের (এনসিআরএফ-এই) পরবর্তীকালীন ভবিষ্যৎ আমাদের NCRF-AE দুই অংশের মধ্যে রয়েছে: একটি এনকোডার যা গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে সিআরএফ মডেল এবং একটি ডেকোডার যা ইনপুট পুনরায় তৈর আমাদের মডেলের একটি একত্রিত কাঠামো আছে যার মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত কার্যক্রম রয়েছে লেবেল এবং অলীকৃত তথ্যের জন্য এম এমএমএল্গোরিদমের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সংক্রান্ত এনকোডার এবং ডেকোডার একই সাথে তাদের প আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল আট ভিন্ন ভাষায় ট্যাগিং কাজের উপর, দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবস্থা দুটো', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የሆኑት የኒዌራዊ የCRF የራሱ ኮድ (NCRF-AE) ሞዴል በኋላው የተገኘውን የውይይት ቅድሚያ ጉዳይ ለመማር እናሳልቃለን፡፡ የNCRF-AE የሁለት ክፍሎች ነው፤ የጥልቅ የነዌብ መረብ የCRF ሞዴል ነው፤ የውይይት ግንኙነትን ለመሠረት የሚሞክረው አዲስ ዶላር ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የተለያየ የጠፋ ሥርዓት እና ያልታወቀ አካላት በተካፈሉት አካላት ጋር ነው፡፡ የኢሜይል አልጎሪትምን አካላቢ እና የኮድ አካላቢውን በመጠቀም አካባቢ እና አካላቢውን በመለወጥ አካሄድን፡፡ የሞከሩ ፍጥረታችን በስምንት ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የፖএস-የንግግር ማተሚያ ስራ ላይ ነው፤ ሞዴላያችን በተጠበቀው እና በsemi-ታዋቂው ስዕይታዎች ውስጥ የሚችሉትን ድጋፍ ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք վերջ-վերջ նյարդային ԿՌՖ ավտոկոդեր (NCRF-AE) մոդել, որը կիսավերահսկվող ուսումնասիրում է հաջորդական կառուցվածքային կանխատեսման խնդիրները: Մեր NCRF-AE-ը կազմված է երկու մասից. կոդեր, որը հիմնական նյարդային ցանցերով բարելավված է ԿՌՖ մոդելն է, և կոդեր, որը սերունդային մոդել է, որը փորձում է վերակառուցել ներմուծը: Մեր մոդելը ունի միասնական կառուցվածք, որն ունի տարբեր կորստի ֆունկցիաներ, որոնք նշանված են և աննշանված տվյալներ ունեն ընդհանուր պարամետրերով: Մենք զարգացրեցինք ԷՄ ալգորիթմի տարբերակը, որպեսզի միաժամանակ օպտիմացնենք և կոդերը, բաժանելով նրանց պարամետրերը: Our Experimental results over the Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging task on eight different languages, show that our model can outperform competitive systems in both supervised and semi-supervised scenarios.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda biz sona qədər sona qədər nöral CRF autokodlayıcı (NCRF-AE) modelini seçdikləri strukturlu tədbir problemlərinin yarı-gözləyirli öyrənməsi üçün təklif edirik. NCRF-AE-miz iki parçadan olub: CVF modeli, derin nöral a ğları ilə genişlənmiş, yenidən inşa etmək üçün generikli modeli olan bir dekoderdir. Modelimiz paylaşılmış parametrlərlə etiket edilmiş və yazılmamış məlumatlar üçün müxtəlif kaybı funksiyaları ilə birləşdirilmiş bir quruluşdur. Biz EM algoritminin bir dəyişikliyini yaratdıq ki, hər ikisini də kodlayıcı və dekoderi birlikdə parametrlərini dəyişdirmək üçün optimizləndirmək üçün. Bizim təcrübəmiz səkkiz fərqli dillərdə səkkiz təcrübə edir, modellərimiz hər ikisinin gözləyirli və yarı-gözləyirli senaryolarda müəllif sistemlərdən üstün olar.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme end-to-end neuronový CRF autokodér (NCRF-AE) model pro semi-supervisované učení sekvenčních strukturovaných predikčních problémů. Náš NCRF-AE se skládá ze dvou částí: kodéru, což je CRF model rozšířený hlubokými neuronovými sítěmi, a dekodéru, který je generativní model, který se snaží rekonstruovat vstup. Náš model má jednotnou strukturu s různými ztrátovými funkcemi pro označená i neoznačená data se sdílenými parametry. Vyvinuli jsme variantu EM algoritmu pro optimalizaci snímače i dekodéru současně oddělením jejich parametrů. Naše experimentální výsledky týkající se tagování části řeči (POS) na osmi různých jazycích ukazují, že náš model dokáže překonat konkurenční systémy v dohledovaných i polovičně dohledovaných scénářích.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja lõpp-otsa neuraalse CRF autokodeeri (NCRF-AE) mudeli järjestikuste struktureeritud ennustusprobleemide pooljuhitamiseks. Meie NCRF-AE koosneb kahest osast: kodeerijast, mis on CRF mudel, mida täiustavad sügavad närvivõrgud, ja dekooderist, mis on generatiivne mudel, mis püüab sisendit rekonstrueerida. Meie mudelil on ühtne struktuur erinevate kadufunktsioonidega märgistatud ja märgistamata andmete jaoks jagatud parameetritega. Töötasime välja variatsiooni EM algoritmist, et optimeerida nii kodeerijat kui ka lahti üheaegselt nende parameetrite lahtiühendamise teel. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused kõneosa (POS) sildistamise ülesande kohta kaheksas erinevas keeles näitavad, et meie mudel suudab ületada konkurentsivõimelisi süsteeme nii järelevalve kui ka pooljärelevalve all olevates stsenaariumides.', 'ca': "En aquest paper proposem un model d'autocodificador neural CRF (NCRF-AE) per aprendre semisupervisadament els problemes seqüencials de predicció estructurada. El nostre NCRF-AE està compost de dues parts: un codificador que és un model CRF millorat per xarxes neuronals profundes, i un codificador que és un model generador intentant reconstruir la entrada. El nostre model té una estructura unificada amb funcions de pèrdua diferents per a les dades etiquetades i no etiquetades amb paràmetres compartits. Vam desenvolupar una variació del algoritme EM per optimitzar tant el codificador com el descodificador al mateix temps descoplant els seus paràmetres. Our Experimental results over the Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging task on eight different languages, show that our model can outperform competitive systems in both supervised and semi-supervised scenarios.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme end-to-end neuronal CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) -mallia sekvensaalisten strukturoitujen ennustusongelmien puolivalvottuun oppimiseen. NCRF-AE koostuu kahdesta osasta: kooderista, joka on syvähermoverkkojen tehostama CRF-malli, ja dekooderista, joka on generatiivinen malli, joka yrittää rekonstruoida tuloa. Mallissamme on yhtenäinen rakenne, jossa on erilaisia häviötoimintoja merkityille ja merkitsemättömille tiedoille jaetuilla parametreilla. Kehitimme EM-algoritmin variaation, joka optimoi sekä kooderin että dekooderin samanaikaisesti irrottamalla niiden parametrit. Kokeelliset tulokset POS-tagging-tehtävästä kahdeksalla eri kielellä osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy suoriutumaan kilpailukykyisistä järjestelmistä sekä valvotuissa että puolivalvotuissa skenaarioissa.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo model neuralnog CRF autokodera (NCRF-AE) za polu-nadzorno učenje problema sa sekvencijalnim strukturovanim predviđanjem. Naša NCRF-AE sastoji se od dva dijela: koder koji je CRF model poboljšan dubokim neuralnim mrežama, i dekoder koji je generativni model koji pokušava rekonstruirati ulaz. Naš model ima ujedinjenu strukturu sa različitim funkcijama gubitka za etiketirane i neoznačene podatke sa zajedničkim parametrama. Razvili smo varijaciju EM algoritma za optimizaciju i kodera i dekodera istovremeno decoupliranjem njihovih parametara. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati nad zadatkom dio govora (POS) na osam različitih jezika pokazuju da naš model može izvršiti konkurentne sustave u nadzirenim i polovicnim scenarijama.', 'jv': 'Nan pepulan iki, kita supoyo model sing sampeyan end-to-end Nyural Njuk-Njuk-AE nambah sing sampeyan duwe pating: koder sing model kref sing ditambah karo deep Neral netwisen, lan dekorar sing ngenerajilan model sing bisa nguasai nggawe biyene Kernel Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem karo Algorithm EM gak nggawe koder karo decoder sampeyan nguasai winih Rasane sing paling awak dhéwé ning pating-tanggal (po S) sing gagal gak 8 luwih gak bener, iso nggawe modèl dhéwé iso nggawe sistem sing arep nggawe nguasai sistem sing arep karo pak, iso nggawe sistem sing wis nguasar suarané lan sembarang-suarané.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo model end-to-end nevronskega CRF autoencoder (NCRF-AE) za polnadzorovano učenje zaporednih strukturiranih napovedovalnih težav. Naš NCRF-AE je sestavljen iz dveh delov: kodirnika, ki je CRF model, okrepljen z globokimi nevronskimi omrežji, in dekodirnika, ki je generativni model, ki poskuša rekonstruirati vhod. Naš model ima enotno strukturo z različnimi funkcijami izgube za označene in neoznačene podatke s skupnimi parametri. Razvili smo variacijo EM algoritma za optimizacijo tako kodirja kot dekoderja hkrati z ločevanjem parametrov. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pri nalogi označevanja dela govora (POS) na osmih različnih jezikih kažejo, da lahko naš model presega konkurenčne sisteme v nadzorovanem in polnadzorovanem scenariju.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציעים מודל של קודם אוטומטי CRF (NCRF-AE) של סוף-סוף ללימודים חצי-מפקחים של בעיות צפייה מסורתיות. NCRF-AE שלנו מורכב משני חלקים: קודד שהוא מודל CRF ששופר על ידי רשתות עצביות עמוקות, ומקודד שהוא מודל דולרי מנסה לבנות מחדש את הכניסה. למודל שלנו יש מבנה מאוחד עם תפקודות אובדן שונות עבור נתונים מסומנים ולא מסומנים עם פרמטרים משותפים. פיתחנו שינוי של האלגוריתם EM לאופטיזציה גם את הקודן וגם את הפיתוח באותו הזמן על ידי פירוק הפרמטרים שלהם. התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו במהלך המשימה של "חלק-של-דיבור" (POS) לתג בשמונה שפות שונות, מראות שמודל שלנו יכול להתגבר על מערכות תחרותיות בתרחישים ששומרים על פיקוח וחצי על פיקוח.', 'ha': 'Daga cikin wannan takardan, muna goyyade wata misãlin CRF-kode farat-ƙari zuwa-ƙari (NCRF-AU) wa karantar da aka yi duhu-tsare wa masu basĩri masu ƙaranci da aka baka wani. @ info: whatsthis @ info: tooltip Mun buɗe wani variant na algoritm na EM dõmin ka fi kyautar da kode da kwamfyuta sami da kwamfyuta. MatariyinMu na jarraba kan aikin tagogi na part-of-Speakin (PoS) a kan harshen takwas dabam-daban, ke nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya ƙaranci cikin tsarin tarajada da aka tsare da shi.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མི་འོད་སྡུད་ལག་ལེན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། Our NCRF-AE consists of two parts: an encoder which is a CRF model enhanced by deep neural networks, and a decoder which is a generative model trying to reconstruct the input. Our model has a unified structure with different loss functions for labeled and unlabeled data with shared parameters. We developed a variation of the EM algorithm for optimizing both the encoder and the decoder simultaneously by decoupling their parameters. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་Speech(POS)གི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྐད་རིགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་མི་མཐོང་བ། མ་དབྱིབས་རྩིས་ལག་སྟར་ལྟ་ར'}
{'en': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'ar': 'تحليل TAG مع الشبكات العصبية وتمثيلات المتجهات للعلامات العليا', 'pt': 'Análise de TAG com redes neurais e representações vetoriais de supertags', 'es': 'Análisis TAG con redes neuronales y representaciones vectoriales de superetiquetas', 'fr': 'Analyse TAG avec des réseaux de neurones et des représentations vectorielles de supertags', 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークとスーパータグのベクトル表現によるタグ解析', 'zh': '以神经网络超级表向量 TAG 解析之', 'ru': 'Анализ ТЕГОВ с помощью нейронных сетей и векторных представлений супертегов', 'hi': 'सुपरटैग के तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ टैग पार्सिंग', 'ga': 'Parsáil TAG le Líonraí Néaracha agus Léirithe Veicteoireachta ar Supertags', 'el': 'Ανάλυση με Νευρικά Δίκτυα και Διανυσματικές Αντιπροσωπείες Υπερετικετών', 'hu': 'TAG értelmezés neurális hálózatokkal és szupercímkék vektoros reprezentációival', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Analisi TAG con reti neurali e rappresentazioni vettoriali dei Supertag', 'kk': 'Супертегтердің негізгі желі және векторлық таңдаулары TAG талдау', 'lt': 'TAG analizavimas su neuroniais tinklais ir superžymenų vektorių atstovavimais', 'mk': 'Анализирање на TAG со неврални мрежи и векторни претставувања на суперознаки', 'ms': 'Menghurai TAG dengan Rangkaian Neural dan Perwakilan Vektor bagi Supertag', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'mn': 'TAG Цөмийн сүлжээлүүд болон векторын супертеги', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Parasowanie TAG z sieciami neuronowymi i wektorowymi reprezentacjami supertagów', 'ro': 'Analizarea TAG cu rețele neurale și reprezentarea vectorială a Supertagurilor', 'sr': 'TAG analiza sa neuronskim mrežama i vektorskim predstavljanjem Supertags', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Network and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'sv': 'TAG Parsing med neurala nätverk och vektorrepresentationer av supertaggar', 'ta': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'TAG Đức thầy với các mạng thần kinh và các đường dẫn đường', 'bg': 'Таг анализ с неврални мрежи и векторни представи на супертагове', 'da': 'TAG Parsing med Neurale Netværk og Vektor Repræsentationer af Supertags', 'de': 'TAG Parsing mit neuronalen Netzwerken und Vektordarstellungen von Supertags', 'hr': 'TAG analiza sa neuronskim mrežama i vektorskim predstavljanjem superznakova', 'nl': 'TAG Parsing met Neurale Netwerken en Vector Representaties van Supertags', 'ko': '신경 네트워크 기반 라벨 해석 및 슈퍼 라벨 벡터 표시', 'id': 'TAG Parsing dengan Rangkaian Neural dan Perwakilan Vektor dari Supertag', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'TAG Nöral Ağlar ve Vektör Temsilleri', 'sw': 'TAG akicheza na mitandao ya Neural na Representations of Supertags', 'az': 'Nöral Ağları və Vektör Təşkilatları ilə TAG Analyzing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'sq': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'am': 'Name', 'bs': 'TAG analiza sa neuronskim mrežama i vektorskim predstavljanjem Supertags', 'ca': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'hy': 'ՏԱԳ-ի վերլուծությունը սուպերթեգի նյարդային ցանցերի և վեկտորների ներկայացումների հետ', 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'TAG Parsing s neuronovými sítěmi a vektorovými reprezentacemi supertagů', 'et': 'TAG parsimine neurovõrkude ja supersiltide vektorite esitustega', 'fi': 'TAG Parsing with Neural Networks and Vector Representations of Supertags', 'jv': 'TaG Taring karo Neral Network lan vector representations of super tags', 'sk': 'TAG Parsing z nevralnimi omrežji in vektorskimi predstavitvami supertags', 'he': 'TAG בדיקה עם רשתות נוירוליות ויקטוריות מייצגים של סופרטגים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'TAG དབྱིབས་མཐུན་དྲ་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ།'}
{'en': 'We present supertagging-based models for Tree Adjoining Grammar parsing that use neural network architectures and dense vector representation of supertags (elementary trees) to achieve state-of-the-art performance in unlabeled and labeled attachment scores. The shift-reduce parsing model eschews lexical information entirely, and uses only the 1-best supertags to parse a sentence, providing further support for the claim that supertagging is almost parsing. We demonstrate that the embedding vector representations the parser induces for supertags possess linguistically interpretable structure, supporting analogies between grammatical structures like those familiar from recent work in distributional semantics. This dense representation of supertags overcomes the drawbacks for statistical models of TAG as compared to CCG parsing, raising the possibility that TAG is a viable alternative for NLP tasks that require the assignment of richer structural descriptions to sentences.', 'ar': 'نقدم نماذج تعتمد على العلامات الفائقة للتحليل النحوي المجاور للشجرة التي تستخدم بنيات الشبكة العصبية وتمثيل متجه كثيف للعلامات الفوقية (الأشجار الأولية) لتحقيق أداء متطور في درجات المرفقات غير المسماة والمسمى. يتجنب نموذج التحليل - تقليل التحول - المعلومات المعجمية تمامًا ، ويستخدم فقط أفضل العلامات الفوقية 1 لتحليل جملة ، مما يوفر مزيدًا من الدعم للادعاء بأن العلامات الفائقة "تحلل تقريبًا". نوضح أن تمثيلات متجه التضمين التي يحرضها المحلل اللغوي للعلامات الفوقية تمتلك بنية قابلة للتفسير لغويًا ، وتدعم التشابهات بين الهياكل النحوية مثل تلك المألوفة من العمل الأخير في دلالات التوزيع. يتغلب هذا التمثيل الكثيف للعلامات الفوقية على عيوب النماذج الإحصائية لـ TAG مقارنةً بتحليل CCG ، مما يزيد من احتمال أن يكون TAG بديلاً قابلاً للتطبيق لمهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية التي تتطلب تعيين أوصاف هيكلية أكثر ثراءً للجمل.', 'fr': "Nous présentons des modèles basés sur le supertagging pour l'analyse de la grammaire adjacente à l'arbre qui utilisent des architectures de réseaux neuronaux et une représentation vectorielle dense des supertags (arbres élémentaires) afin d'obtenir des performances de pointe en matière de scores d'attachement non étiquetés et étiquetés. Le modèle d'analyse Shift-Reduce évite complètement les informations lexicales et utilise uniquement les superbalises 1 meilleure pour analyser une phrase, ce qui apporte un soutien supplémentaire à l'affirmation selon laquelle le supertagging est «\xa0presque une analyse syntaxique\xa0». Nous démontrons que les représentations vectorielles d'inclusion que l'analyseur induit pour les superétiquettes possèdent une structure interprétable linguistiquement, soutenant des analogies entre des structures grammaticales comme celles connues dans les travaux récents en sémantique distributionnelle. Cette représentation dense des supertags surmonte les inconvénients des modèles statistiques de TAG par rapport à l'analyse CCG, soulevant la possibilité que TAG soit une alternative viable pour les tâches de PNL qui nécessitent l'affectation de descriptions structurelles plus riches aux phrases.", 'es': 'Presentamos modelos basados en superetiquetado para el análisis de gramática contigua a árboles que utilizan arquitecturas de redes neuronales y una representación vectorial densa de superetiquetas (árboles elementales) para lograr un rendimiento de vanguardia en puntuaciones de adjuntos no etiquetados y etiquetados. El modelo de análisis de reducción de cambios evita por completo la información léxica y utiliza solo las mejores superetiquetas 1 para analizar una oración, lo que proporciona más apoyo a la afirmación de que el superetiquetado es «casi analizar». Demostramos que las representaciones vectoriales de incrustación que el analizador induce para las superetiquetas poseen una estructura lingüísticamente interpretable, lo que admite analogías entre estructuras gramaticales como las familiares del trabajo reciente en semántica distribucional. Esta representación densa de superetiquetas supera los inconvenientes de los modelos estadísticos de TAG en comparación con el análisis CCG, lo que plantea la posibilidad de que TAG sea una alternativa viable para las tareas de PNL que requieren la asignación de descripciones estructurales más ricas a las oraciones.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos modelos baseados em supertags para análise gramatical de adjunção de árvores que usam arquiteturas de rede neural e representação vetorial densa de supertags (árvores elementares) para obter desempenho de última geração em pontuações de anexos não rotulados e rotulados. O modelo de análise shift-reduce evita completamente as informações lexicais e usa apenas as 1-melhores supertags para analisar uma frase, fornecendo suporte adicional para a afirmação de que a supermarcação está “quase analisando”. Demonstramos que as representações vetoriais de incorporação que o analisador sintático induz para supertags possuem estrutura interpretável linguisticamente, suportando analogias entre estruturas gramaticais como aquelas familiares de trabalhos recentes em semântica distribucional. Essa representação densa de supertags supera as desvantagens dos modelos estatísticos de TAG em comparação com a análise CCG, levantando a possibilidade de que o TAG seja uma alternativa viável para tarefas de PNL que exigem a atribuição de descrições estruturais mais ricas às sentenças.', 'ru': 'Мы представляем модели на основе супертегов для синтаксического анализа грамматики с присоединением деревьев, которые используют архитектуры нейронных сетей и плотное векторное представление супертегов (элементарных деревьев) для достижения самой современной производительности в немеченных и помеченных оценках вложения. Модель синтаксического анализа Shift-reduce полностью избегает лексической информации и использует только 1-лучшие супертеги для синтаксического анализа предложения, что дополнительно подтверждает утверждение о том, что синтаксический анализ «почти синтаксический.« Мы демонстрируем, что векторные представления встраивания, которые парсер вызывает для супертегов, обладают лингвистически интерпретируемой структурой, поддерживая аналогии между грамматическими структурами, такими как те, которые знакомы из недавней работы в дистрибутивной семантике. Это плотное представление супертегов преодолевает недостатки для статистических моделей ТЕГОВ по сравнению с парсингом CCG, повышая вероятность того, что ТЕГ является жизнеспособной альтернативой для задач NLP, которые требуют назначения более богатых структурных описаний предложениям.', 'ja': '私たちは、ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャとスーパータグ（基本木）の濃密なベクトル表現を使用して、ラベル付けされていない添付ファイルスコアで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成する、ツリー隣接文法構文解析のためのスーパータグベースのモデルを提示します。シフト縮小構文解析モデルは、語彙情報を完全に回避し、1ベストのスーパータグのみを使用して文章を構文解析し、スーパータグ化が「ほぼ構文解析」であるという主張をさらに支持する。「私たちは、構文解析器がスーパータグのために誘導する埋め込みベクトル表現が、言語学的に解釈可能な構造を持っていることを実証し、分布意味論の最近の研究でよく知られているような文法構造間の類推をサポートしています。スーパータグのこの濃密な表現は、ＣＣＧ構文解析と比較して、タグの統計モデルの欠点を克服し、タグがより豊富な構造記述の文章への割り当てを必要とするＮＬＰタスクの実行可能な代替である可能性を提起する。', 'zh': '为树邻语法解析为超标记,以神经网络架构超标记(以)密矢量,以先其数。 shift-reduce 解析模形尽避词汇息,但用 1-best supertag 以解析句,为 supertagging 几解析之说。 吾证解析器为超级标导之嵌向量示有语言可解之构,支语法结构之类,犹近在布语义学之中熟者也。 比于CCG解析,则胜TAG计形之短,而增益之TAG,句分之富NLP可以代方也。', 'hi': 'हम ट्री अटैचिंग ग्रामर पार्सिंग के लिए सुपरटैगिंग-आधारित मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर और सुपरटैग (प्राथमिक पेड़ों) के घने वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करते हैं ताकि बिना लेबल वाले और लेबल किए गए अनुलग्नक स्कोर में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त किया जा सके। शिफ्ट-कम पार्सिंग मॉडल पूरी तरह से लेक्सिकल जानकारी को छोड़ देता है, और एक वाक्य को पार्स करने के लिए केवल 1-सर्वश्रेष्ठ सुपरटैग का उपयोग करता है, इस दावे के लिए आगे समर्थन प्रदान करता है कि सुपरटैगिंग "लगभग पार्सिंग" है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि एम्बेडिंग वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व पार्सर सुपरटैग के लिए प्रेरित करता है, जिसमें भाषाई रूप से व्याख्यायोग्य संरचना होती है, जो वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ में हाल के काम से परिचित लोगों की तरह व्याकरणिक संरचनाओं के बीच उपमाओं का समर्थन करती है। सुपरटैग का यह घना प्रतिनिधित्व सीसीजी पार्सिंग की तुलना में टैग के सांख्यिकीय मॉडल के लिए कमियों को दूर करता है, जिससे यह संभावना बढ़ जाती है कि टीएजी एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए एक व्यवहार्य विकल्प है जिसके लिए वाक्यों के लिए समृद्ध संरचनात्मक विवरणों के असाइनमेंट की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair samhlacha sárchlibeála do pharsáil Ghramadaí Tadhlach Crann a úsáideann ailtireachtaí líonra néaraigh agus ionadaíocht dlúth veicteoireach ar shárchlibeanna (crainn bhunúsacha) chun feidhmíocht úrscothach a bhaint amach i scóir ceangaltáin gan lipéad agus lipéadaithe. Seachnaíonn an tsamhail parsála laghdaithe-aistrithe faisnéis léacsach go hiomlán, agus ní úsáideann ach na 1 sárchlibeanna is fearr chun pianbhreith a pharsáil, ag tabhairt tacaíochta breise don maíomh go bhfuil sárchlibeáil “beagnach parsáil”. Léirímid go bhfuil struchtúr inléirithe ó thaobh teanga ag na huiríll veicteoirí leabaithe a spreagann an parsálaí le haghaidh sárchlibeanna, ag tacú le analaí idir struchtúir ghramadaí cosúil leis na cinn a bhfuil eolas orthu ó obair le déanaí sa tséimeantaic dáileacháin. Sáraíonn an léiriú dlúth seo ar shárchlibeanna na míbhuntáistí do mhúnlaí staitistiúla TAG i gcomparáid le parsáil CCG, rud a ardaíonn an fhéidearthacht gur rogha inmharthana é TAG do thascanna NLP a éilíonn go sanntar tuairiscí struchtúracha níos saibhre ar abairtí.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μοντέλα που βασίζονται στην υπερσήμανση για την ανάλυση της γραμματικής που χρησιμοποιούν αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων και πυκνή διανυσματική αναπαράσταση των υπερετικετών (στοιχειώδεις δένδρα) για να επιτύχουν επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε βαθμολογίες προσάρτησης χωρίς ετικέτα και ετικέτα. Το μοντέλο ανάλυσης μείωσης μετατόπισης αποφεύγει εντελώς τις λεξικές πληροφορίες και χρησιμοποιεί μόνο τις καλύτερες υπερετικέτες για να αναλύσει μια πρόταση, παρέχοντας περαιτέρω υποστήριξη για τον ισχυρισμό ότι η υπερσήμανση είναι "σχεδόν ανάλυση". Αποδεικνύουμε ότι οι ενσύρματοι διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις που προκαλεί ο αναλυτής για υπερετικέτες έχουν γλωσσικά ερμηνευτή δομή, υποστηρίζοντας αναλογίες μεταξύ γραμματικών δομών όπως αυτές που είναι γνωστές από πρόσφατες εργασίες στη διανεμητική σημασιολογία. Αυτή η πυκνή αναπαράσταση υπερετικετών ξεπερνά τα μειονεκτήματα των στατιστικών μοντέλων TAG σε σύγκριση με την ανάλυση CCG, αυξάνοντας την πιθανότητα ότι το TAG είναι μια βιώσιμη εναλλακτική λύση για εργασίες που απαιτούν την ανάθεση πλουσιότερων δομικών περιγραφών σε προτάσεις.', 'hu': 'Olyan szupercímkézési alapú modelleket mutatunk be a Tree Adjoining Grammar elemzéséhez, amelyek neurális hálózati architektúrákat és a szupercímkék (elemi fák) sűrű vektoros ábrázolását használják a címke nélküli és címkézett csatolási pontszámok korszerű teljesítményének eléréséhez. A shift-reduce elemzési modell teljesen kikerüli a lexikai információkat, és csak az 1 legjobb szupercímkéket használja egy mondat elemzéséhez, ami további támogatást nyújt annak az állításnak, hogy a szupercímkézés "majdnem elemzés". Bemutatjuk, hogy az elemző által a szupercímkék beágyazási vektorábrázolásai nyelvileg értelmezhető struktúrával rendelkeznek, támogatva a nyelvtani struktúrák analógiáját, mint amilyenek a disztribúciós szemantikában ismerősek. A szupercímkék sűrű ábrázolása felülmúlja a TAG statisztikai modelleinek hátrányait a CCG elemzéséhez képest, növelve annak lehetőségét, hogy a TAG életképes alternatívát jelent az NLP feladatok számára, amelyek gazdagabb strukturális leírásokat igényelnek mondatokhoz.', 'ka': "ჩვენ აჩვენებთ სუპერტიგური მოდელები, რომლებიც სუპერტიგური ქსელის აკტერქტურების გამოყენება (ელემენტური ქსელების) სუპერტიგური (ელემენტური ქსელების) სუპერტიგური მოდელების გამოყენება სუპერტიგური ქს shift-reduced parsing model eschews fully lexical information, and uses only the 1-best supertags to parse a sentence, providing further support for the claim that supertagging is 'almost parsing'. ჩვენ ევმონსტრაცით, რომ დაბრუნებული გვქტორი გამოსახულებს სუპერტიკის ინდისტუქციების სუპერტიკური ინდისტუქციების სტრუქტურაციას, რომელიც გრამიკური სტრუქტურაციების შორის ანალოგიების ეს სუპერტიკალური განსახულების გამოსახულება გადავიწყება TAG-ის სტატისტიკური მოდელებისთვის, როგორც CCG-ის განახულებაზე, და შესაძლებლობა, რომ TAG არის უფრო ცხოვრებელი ალტენტრუმენტი NLP დავალებისთვის, რომელიც უფრო", 'kk': "Біз нейрондық желі архитектураларды және үлкен векторларды супертегтерді (элементтерлік ағаштарды) көрсету үшін супертегтерді негізделген үлгілерді таңдаймыз. Түрлендіру үлгісін шектеу үлгісі лексикалық мәліметін толық шектеп, сөзді талдау үшін тек 1- ең жақсы супертегтерді қолданады, супертегтерді 'жалғыз талдау' деген сұранысты қолданады. Біз ендіру векторының супертегтердің индукцияларының тілдік түрлендіруі мүмкіндігін көрсетеді, грамматикалық құрылғылар арасындағы жаңа жұмыс істегендердің аналогияларын қолдайды. Бұл супертегтердің тұрақтығы тапсырмаларының статистикалық үлгілерін CCG талдауына салыстырып, тапсырмалар NLP тапсырмаларының артықшылық альтернативі болуы мүмкіндігін көтереді. Бұл тапсырмалардың баяндау құрылғысының түсіні", 'it': 'Presentiamo modelli basati su supertagging per l\'analisi grammaticale Tree Adjoining che utilizzano architetture di rete neurale e rappresentazione vettoriale densa di supertag (alberi elementari) per ottenere prestazioni all\'avanguardia in punteggi allegati non etichettati ed etichettati. Il modello di parsing shift-reduce evita completamente le informazioni lessicali e utilizza solo i supertag 1 migliori per analizzare una frase, fornendo ulteriore supporto per l\'affermazione che il supertagging è "quasi parsing". Dimostriamo che le rappresentazioni vettoriali incorporate che il parser induce per i supertag possiedono una struttura linguisticamente interpretabile, supportando analogie tra strutture grammaticali come quelle familiari da recenti lavori nella semantica distributiva. Questa rappresentazione densa dei supertag supera gli svantaggi per i modelli statistici di TAG rispetto all\'analisi CCG, aumentando la possibilità che TAG sia una valida alternativa per le attività NLP che richiedono l\'assegnazione di descrizioni strutturali più ricche alle frasi.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome superžymėjimu pagrįstus medžio jungiamųjų gramų analizavimo modelius, kurie naudoja nervinių tinklų architektūras ir tankią superžymėjimų (elementinių medžių) vektorių atstovavimą, kad būtų pasiekti pažangiausi rezultatai nepažymėtuose ir pažymėtuose pritvirtinimo taškuose. Perkelto mažinimo analizavimo model is visiškai išvengia leksikinės informacijos ir tik naudoja 1 geriausią superžymenį sakiniam apdoroti, taip toliau remiant teiginį, kad superžymenys yra "beveik apdorojimas". Mes įrodome, kad įterpiamieji vektoriai, kuriuos parzorius sukelia superžymenų atžvilgiu, turi lingvistiškai aiškinamą struktūrą, palaikančią gramatinių struktūrų analogijas, pavyzdžiui, tas, kurios buvo žinomos neseniai atlikus darbą platinimo semantikoje. Šis tankus superžymenų atstovavimas pašalina statistinių TAG modelių trūkumus, palyginti su CCG analizavimu, todėl TAG gali būti gyvybinga alternatyva NLP užduotims, kurioms reikia skirti turtingesnius struktūrinius aprašymus sakiniams.', 'mk': 'Презентираме модели базирани на суперознаки за анализирање на грамар на дрво Приклучување кои користат архитектури на нервната мрежа и густа векторна претстава на суперознаки (елементарни дрвја) за постигнување на најсовремена резултат во неозначени и означени оценки на приклучување. Моделот на анализирање на смената-намалување целосно ги избегнува лексикалните информации и ги користи само 1-најдобрите суперознаки за анализирање на реченица, обезбедувајќи понатамошна поддршка за тврдењето дека суперознака е „речиси анализирање“. Демонстрираме дека вградените векторни претставувања кои ги индустрира анализаторот за суперознаки имаат јазички интерпретабилна структура, поддржувајќи аналогии помеѓу граматичките структури како оние познати од неодамнешната работа во дистрибутивната семантика. Оваа густа претстава на суперознаки ги надминува недостатоците за статистичките модели на ТАГ во споредба со анализирањето на ЦЦЦГ, зголемувајќи ја можноста ТАГ да биде остварлива алтернатива за задачите на НЛП кои бараат доделба на побогати структурни описи на речениците.', 'ms': "Kami perkenalkan model berasaskan-supertag untuk huraian Grammar Pemgabungan Pohon yang menggunakan arkitektur rangkaian saraf dan perwakilan vektor tebal bagi supertag (pokok asas) untuk mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dalam skor lampiran tidak ditabel dan ditabel. Model penghuraian shift-reduce melepaskan maklumat leksikal sepenuhnya, dan hanya menggunakan supertag 1-terbaik untuk hurai kalimat, menyediakan sokongan lanjut untuk klaim bahawa supertag adalah 'hampir hurai.' Kami menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan vektor yang disebabkan oleh penghurai untuk supertag mempunyai struktur yang boleh diinterpretasi secara bahasa, menyokong analogi antara struktur grammatik seperti yang biasa dari kerja baru-baru ini dalam semantik distribusi. Perwakilan tebal supertag ini mengatasi kelemahan bagi model statistik TAG dibandingkan dengan penghuraian CCG, meningkatkan kemungkinan bahawa TAG adalah alternatif yang mudah untuk tugas NLP yang memerlukan penugasan deskripsi struktur yang lebih kaya kepada kalimat.", 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw mudelli bbażati fuq is-supertagging għall-analizzazzjoni tal-Grammar tal-Assoċjazzjoni tas-Siġar li jużaw arkitetturi tan-netwerk newrali u rappreżentazzjoni densa tal-vetturi tas-supertags (siġar elementari) biex jinkisbu l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fil-punteġġi tat-twaħħil mhux ittikkettati u ttikkettati. Il-mudell tal-analizzazzjoni shift-reduce jevita l-informazzjoni lexikali kompletament, u juża biss l-aqwa supertags 1 biex janalizza sentenza, u jipprovdi aktar appoġġ għall-pretensjoni li s-supertagging huwa 'kważi janalizza'. Aħna nuru li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi inkorporati li l-analizzatur jinduċi għas-supertags għandhom struttura interpretabbli lingwistikament, li tappoġġja analogiji bejn strutturi grammatiċi bħal dawk familjari minn xogħol riċenti fis-semantika distributtiva. Din ir-rappreżentanza densa ta’ supertags tegħleb l-iżvantaġġi għall-mudelli statistiċi tat-TAG meta mqabbla mal-analiżi tas-CCG, u jżid il-possibbiltà li t-TAG tkun alternattiva vijabbli għall-kompiti tal-NLP li jeħtieġu l-assenjazzjoni ta’ deskrizzjonijiet strutturali aktar rikki għas-sentenzi.", 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കെറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സൂപ്പര്\u200dട്ടാഗ്രികളുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സൂപ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ ഈ ഷിഫ്റ്റ്- കുറക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് മോഡല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒഴിവാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്ക് പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സു സൂപ്പര്\u200dട്ടാഗ്സിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സൂപ്പര്\u200dട്ടാഗുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d, ഭാഷ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഘടനയിലുള് സിസിജി പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനെക്കുറിച്ച് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനായി ടാജിന്റെ സൂപ്പര്\u200dട്ടിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ പിന്നിലേക്കുള്ള സൂപ്പര്\u200dട്ടാഗുകളുടെ ആഴത്തിലുള്ള പ്രതി', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy modele oparte na supertagowaniu dla analizy gramatyki przylegającej do drzew, które wykorzystują architekturę sieci neuronowej i gęstą reprezentację wektorową supertagów (drzew elementarnych), aby osiągnąć najnowocześniejszą wydajność w punktacjach załączników nieoznakowanych i etykietowanych. Model parsowania zmiany redukcji całkowicie unika informacji leksykalicznych i używa tylko 1-najlepszych supertagów do analizy zdania, zapewniając dalsze wsparcie dla twierdzenia, że supertagowanie jest "prawie parsowanie". Wykazujemy, że reprezentacje wektorowe wbudowane przez parser dla supertagów posiadają językowo interpretowalną strukturę, wspierającą analogię między strukturami gramatycznymi, takimi jak te znane z ostatnich prac w semantyce dystrybucyjnej. Ta gęsta reprezentacja supertagów pokonuje wady modeli statystycznych TAG w porównaniu z analizą CCG, zwiększając możliwość, że TAG jest realną alternatywą dla zadań NLP, które wymagają przypisania bogatszych opisów strukturalnych do zdań.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm modele bazate pe superetichetare pentru analizarea gramaticală adâncă copaci care utilizează arhitecturi de rețea neurală și reprezentare vectorială densă a superetichetelor (copaci elementari) pentru a obține performanțe de ultimă oră în scorurile de atașament neetichetate și etichetate. Modelul de parsare shift-reducere evită în întregime informațiile lexicale și utilizează doar cele mai bune 1 supertag-uri pentru a analiza o propoziție, oferind suport suplimentar pentru afirmația că supertagging este "aproape parsing". Demonstrăm că reprezentările vectoriale de încorporare induse de parser pentru supertaguri posedă o structură interpretabilă lingvistic, susținând analogii între structurile gramaticale precum cele familiarizate din lucrările recente în semantica distribuțională. Această reprezentare densă a supertagurilor depășește dezavantajele modelelor statistice ale TAG în comparație cu analizarea CCG, ridicând posibilitatea ca TAG să fie o alternativă viabilă pentru sarcinile PNL care necesită atribuirea unor descrieri structurale mai bogate propozițiilor.', 'mn': "Бид мод Аджингийн грамматерийн хуваалцааны супер тегжингийн супер тегжингийн загваруудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурууд болон супертегүүдийн (элемент мод) жинхэнэ векторуудыг ашигладаг. Шинфт-багасгах загварын хуваалцах загвар нь лексикийн мэдээллийг бүрэн алдагдаж, өгүүлбэрийг хуваалцахад зөвхөн 1 сайн супертег ашигладаг. Супертег нь 'бараг хуваалцах' гэсэн утгыг илүү дэмжих боломжтой. Бид супертегт хуваалцагчийн хуваалцагчийн хуваалцагчийн хуваалцагч нь хэл хэлбэрээр илэрхийлж чадах бүтэц, грамматикийн бүтэц хоорондын шинжилгээг дэмжиж байгааг харуулж байна. This dense representation of supertags overcomes the drawbacks for statistical models of TAG as compared to CCG parsing, raising the possibility that TAG is a viable alternative for NLP tasks that require the assignment of richer structural descriptions to sentences.", 'si': 'Name Shift-Redempt පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේලය ලෙක්සිකල් තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, වචනයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න 1-හොදම සුපුර්ටට් පරීක්ෂණය කරනව අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා සුපර්ටැග්ස් සඳහා පර්ශක වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා කියලා, භාෂාවික විශ්වාසයෙන් භාෂාවික විශ්වාසය සඳහා ව මේ සුපර් ටැග්ස් වලින් සුපර් ටැග්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා TAG ගේ ස්ථානික මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා, CCG විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය', 'so': "Waxaan soo saaraynaa modelyo supertagging ah oo u qoran geed Adjoining Grammar oo isticmaalaya dhismaha shabakadda neurada iyo vector culus oo ku saabsan qoryaha supertags (elementary trees) si aan u gaadhno joojinta farshaxanka oo aan labeled iyo labeled attachments. Tusaalada baarlamaanka ee hoos u dhigista ayaa si buuxda ah u leexdaa macluumaad la xiriira, wuxuuna isticmaalaa alaabta ugu fiican oo kaliya si uu u baaraandego go go'aanka, kaasoo caawimaad dheeraad ah ka heli karo qiimeynta ku saabsan in lagu baaraandeeyo. Waxaynu muujinnaa in vectorka gudaha ka mid ah baaritaanka Paragga waxay leedahay dhismo af luuqad ah oo lagu turjumo, kaas oo taageeraya sawirro u dhexeeya dhismaha grammatika sida kuwa u yaqaan shaqada ugu dambeeyay ee qaybsan semantika. Muuqashadan qarsoon ee supertagyadu waxay ka adkaadaa dib u dhigista TAG si barxadda CCG, wuxuuna korinayaa suurtowda in TAG yahay mid u bedelan shaqaalaha NLP oo u baahan in loo sameeyo qoraalka dhismaha taajirka ah oo loo baahan yahay ciqaabaha.", 'sr': 'Predstavljamo modele na osnovu superetiketiranja za analizu drveta koji koriste neuralne mreže arhitekture i guste vektore predstavljanja superetiketa (elementarnih drveta) kako bi postigli postupak umjetnosti u neobeleženim i označenim rezultatima dodatka. Model razmatranja sa smjenom izbjegava leksičke informacije u potpunosti, i koristi samo 1-najbolje superetikete za analizu rečenice, pružajući daljnju podršku tvrdnji da je superetiketiranje "skoro razmatranje". Pokazujemo da uključujući vektor predstavlja analogske indukcije za superznakove posjeduju lingvistički interpretabilnu strukturu, podržavajući analogiju između gramatičkih struktura kao što su oni poznati iz nedavnog rada u distribucijskom semantiku. Ova gusta predstavljanja superznakova prevlada zaustavljanja statističkih modela TAG u usporedbi s analizanjem CCG-a, povećavajući mogućnost da je TAG živototvorna alternativa zadataka NLP-a koja zahteva dodavanje bogatih strukturnih opisa rečenicama.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar supertaggbaserade modeller för Tree Adjoining Grammar parsing som använder neurala nätverksarkitekturer och tät vektorrepresentation av supertags (elementära träd) för att uppnå toppmodern prestanda i omärkta och märkta bilagor poäng. Tolkningsmodellen shift-reduce undviker lexikal information helt och hållet, och använder endast de 1-bästa supertaggarna för att tolka en mening, vilket ger ytterligare stöd för påståendet att supertaggar är "nästan parsing". Vi demonstrerar att de inbäddande vektorrepresentationer parsern inducerar för supertaggar har språkligt tolkningsbar struktur, vilket stöder analogier mellan grammatiska strukturer som de bekanta från senaste arbete inom distributionsemantik. Denna täta representation av supertaggar övervinner nackdelarna för statistiska modeller av TAG jämfört med CCG-tolkning, vilket ökar möjligheten att TAG är ett livskraftigt alternativ för NLP-uppgifter som kräver tilldelning av rikare strukturella beskrivningar till meningar.', 'ta': 'நாம் மரத்தில் சேரும் சிறப்பு மாதிரிகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் அது புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் தூண்டும் நெக்கார் மூல குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்பாட மாற்று- குறைக்கும் பாடல் மாதிரி முழுமையான தகவலை வெளியேறிவிடும், மற்றும் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தை பிரிப்பதற்கு மட்டும் 1- சிறந்த மேலுள்ள ஒட்டுகள நாங்கள் உள்ளிடப்படும் வெக்டார் பிரித்துக் கொண்டுள்ளது சூப்பர் ஒட்டுக்காட்டு மொழியில் விளக்கக்கூடிய அமைப்புகளுக்கு உருவாக்கும், சமீபத்தில்  சிசிஜி பாசிங்களுக்கு ஒப்பிடுமாக TAG புள்ளிவிவரங்களுக்கு புள்ளியியல் மாதிரிகளுக்கு இந்த கூடுதல் குறிப்பிடும், TAG என்பது வாக்குகளுக்கு பணக்க முறையான நிலைப', 'no': 'Vi presenterer supermerkingsbaserte modeller for å tolka treet som er samordna med Grammar som brukar neuralnettverksarkitekturar og tett vektorrepresentasjon av supermerkingar (elementære trær) for å oppnå tilstanden til kunstendige utviklingar i ubemerkte og merkelige vedleggscorer. Forskyvingsmodellen reduserer tolkinga forskyver leksiske informasjon heilt, og brukar berre dei 1-beste supertaggane for å tolka eit setning, og tilbyr meir støtte for tiltak at supermerkinga er «nesten tolking». Vi demonstrerer at den innebygde vektoren representerer analyseren som induserer for supertaggar, har språk tolkbare struktur, som støttar analogiar mellom grammatiske strukturar som dei som kjenner frå nyleg arbeid i distribusjonssemantikk. Denne tette representasjonen av supermerker overfører teikningane for statistiske modeller av TAG som samanliknet med tolking av CCG, og gjer den muligheten at TAG er ein bærekraftig alternativ for NLP-oppgåver som krev tilordning av rikre strukturskildringar til setningar.', 'ur': "ہم نے درخت کے لئے سوپر ٹاگن بنیادی موڈل پیش کیے ہیں جن کو نائرول نیٹ ورک معماری اور گہرے ویکتوروں کا نمونہ استعمال کرتا ہے سوپر ٹاگن (اصلی درختوں) کے لئے بغیر قابل نوشتہ اور لیبل کے اٹیٹ سکوٹوں میں موجود ہوتا ہے۔ shift-reduce parsing model eschews lexical information entirely, and uses only the 1-best supertags to parse a sentence, providing further support for the claim that supertagging is 'almost parsing'. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ انڈیڈنگ ویکتور سوپر ٹاگ کے بارے میں پارٹر کی نشانیاں ہیں جو زبان کی تعبیر قابل ہے، جیسے اچھے کاروں سے تقسیم سیمانٹیکوں کے بارے میں معلوم ہونے والی ساختاروں کے درمیان آنلوژی کی مدد کرتا ہے. یہ سپرٹاگ کی گہرے نمونہ ٹاگ کی سی جی پارسینگ کے مقابلہ میں ٹاگ کے ڈراب پک پر غالب آتا ہے، اس امکان کو اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ ٹاگ NLP تاسکیوں کے لئے ایک قابل قابل الفاظ ہے جو بہت ثروت ساختاری توصیفے کے لئے ضرورت رکھتی ہے.", 'uz': "Biz bu daraxtni birlashtirish uchun supertagning asosiy modellarini hozir qilamiz. Ularni notoʻgʻri va lab boʻlmagan ilova qismi holatni bajarish uchun neyrol tarmoq maktablaridan foydalanuvchi va qiyin vektor (elementary daraxtlari) qo'llanmalarning holatini bajarishi mumkin. Comment Biz ajratilgan vektor esa supertagning qismlarining qismlarini o'zgartiradik tillarda tarjima qilinadigan structuriyasi, grammatik tuzuvlarining orasidagi analogiyalarni qo'llash mumkin. Yaqinda tarqatish semantika ishlaridan yaxshi nazarda. Supertagning qiyin taʼminlovchisi, CCG parsing bilan qisqarli statistical modellarning uzunligini oshadi. Bu imkoniyatlarni bajarish imkoniyatini bajarish imkoniyatini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu các mô hình dựa trên đỉnh của Tree Adsung Grammar phân tích các cấu trúc mạng thần kinh và mô tả vector đậm đặc của supertags (cây nguyên tử) để đạt trình độ nghệ thuật trong các điểm đính kèm không được dán nhãn. Mô hình phân tích phân tích ngắn của phiên bản thay đổi hoàn to àn thông tin ngôn ngữ, và chỉ sử dụng các thẻ siêu hạng tốt nhất để phân tích một câu, cung cấp thêm hỗ trợ cho yêu cầu bồi thường rằng hiệu lệnh "sắp phân tích". Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng các biểu tượng vector để nhúng vào sẽ gây ra các thẻ siêu đẳng sở hữu cấu trúc giải thích ngôn ngữ, hỗ trợ các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ như cấu trúc mà gần đây đã quen thuộc trong phân phối ngữ học. Sự mô tả đặc trưng của những thẻ siêu hạng vượt qua khó khăn đối với các mô hình thống kê của TAG so với cách phân tích của CCG, gây nên khả năng rằng TAG là một thay thế khả thi cho các công việc của đài Nchọc (NMB) mà buộc phải phân bổ đầy đủ các mô tả cấu trúc thành câu án.', 'bg': 'Представяме модели, базирани на свръхмаркиране, за анализ на придружаващата се граматика на дървета, които използват архитектури на невронни мрежи и плътно векторно представяне на супермаркери (елементарни дървета), за да се постигне най-съвременно представяне в неозначени и етикетирани оценки на прикачени файлове. Моделът за анализиране на изместване-намаляване напълно избягва лексикалната информация и използва само 1-добрите супертагове за анализиране на изречение, осигурявайки допълнителна подкрепа за твърдението, че супертаговете са "почти анализиране". Ние демонстрираме, че вграждащите векторни представяния, които анализаторът индуцира за супертагове, притежават лингвистично интерпретируема структура, поддържаща аналогии между граматически структури като тези, познати от последните работи в дистрибуционната семантика. Това плътно представяне на супертагове преодолява недостатъците за статистическите модели на ТАГ в сравнение с анализа на ТАГ, което повдига възможността ТАГ да е жизнеспособна алтернатива за задачи на НЛП, които изискват възлагане на по-богати структурни описания на изреченията.', 'hr': "Predstavljamo modele na nadmergama za analizu drveta koji se pridružuju Grammaru koji koriste arhitekture neuralne mreže i guste vektore predstavljanja superznakova (elementarnih drveta) kako bi postigli postupak umjetnosti u neizbiljnim i označenim rezultatima priključenja. Model razmatranja smjene potpuno isključuje leksičke informacije i koristi samo 1-najbolje superznakove za analizu rečenice, pružajući daljnju podršku tvrdnji da je superznakovanje 'skoro razmatranje'. Pokazujemo da uključujući vektor predstavlja analiziranje induciranja za superznakove posjeduju jezički interpretabilnu strukturu, podržavajući analogije između gramatičkih struktura poput one poznate iz nedavnog rada u distribucijskom semantiku. Ova gusta predstavljanja superznakova nadvlači neuspjeha statističkih modela TAG u usporedbi s analizanjem CCG-a, povećavajući mogućnost da je TAG održiva alternativa za zadatke NLP-a koji zahtijevaju dodavanje bogatih strukturnih opisa kaznim.", 'nl': "We presenteren supertagging-gebaseerde modellen voor Tree Adjoining Grammar parsing die gebruik maken van neurale netwerkarchitecturen en dichte vectorrepresentatie van supertags (elementaire bomen) om state-of-the-art prestaties te bereiken in niet-gelabelde en gelabelde bijlagen scores. Het shift-reduce parsing model vermijdt lexicale informatie volledig en gebruikt alleen de 1-beste supertags om een zin te parsen, wat verdere ondersteuning biedt voor de bewering dat supertagging 'bijna parsen' is. We tonen aan dat de insluitende vectorrepresentaties die de parser induceert voor supertags taalkundig interpreteerbare structuur hebben, die analogieën ondersteunt tussen grammaticale structuren zoals die bekend zijn uit recent werk in distributionele semantica. Deze dichte representatie van supertags overwint de nadelen van statistische modellen van TAG in vergelijking met CCG parsing, waardoor de mogelijkheid groter wordt dat TAG een levensvatbaar alternatief is voor NLP taken die de toewijzing van rijkere structurele beschrijvingen aan zinnen vereisen.", 'da': "Vi præsenterer supertagging-baserede modeller til Tree Adjoining Grammar parsing, der bruger neurale netværksarkitekturer og tæt vektorrepræsentation af supertags (elementære træer) til at opnå state-of-the-art ydeevne i uafhængige og mærkede vedhæftningsscore. Skift-reducere fortolkningsmodellen undgår helt leksikalsk information og bruger kun de 1-bedste supertags til at fortolke en sætning, hvilket yder yderligere støtte til påstanden om, at supertagg er 'næsten fortolkning.' Vi demonstrerer, at de indlejringsvektorrepræsentationer parseren fremkalder for supertags besidder sprogligt fortolkende struktur, der understøtter analogier mellem grammatiske strukturer som dem, der er kendt fra nyligt arbejde i distributionsemantik. Denne tætte repræsentation af supertags overvinder ulemperne for statistiske modeller af TAG sammenlignet med CCG parsing, hvilket øger muligheden for, at TAG er et levedygtigt alternativ til NLP opgaver, der kræver tildeling af rigere strukturelle beskrivelser til sætninger.", 'de': 'Wir stellen Supertagging-basierte Modelle für Tree Adjoining Grammar Parsing vor, die neuronale Netzwerkarchitekturen und dichte Vektordarstellung von Supertags (elementare Bäume) verwenden, um State-of-the-Art-Performance bei nicht beschrifteten und beschrifteten Attachment Scores zu erzielen. Das Shift-Reduce Parsing-Modell verzichtet vollständig auf lexikalische Informationen und verwendet nur die 1-besten Supertags, um einen Satz zu parsen, was weitere Unterstützung für die Behauptung bietet, dass Supertagging "fast parsing" ist. Wir zeigen, dass die eingebetteten Vektorrepräsentationen, die der Parser für Supertags induziert, linguistisch interpretierbare Struktur besitzen und Analogien zwischen grammatischen Strukturen unterstützen, wie sie aus neueren Arbeiten in der Verteilungsseminatik bekannt sind. Diese dichte Repräsentation von Supertags überwindet die Nachteile statistischer Modelle von TAG im Vergleich zum CCG-Parsing und erhöht die Möglichkeit, dass TAG eine praktikable Alternative für NLP-Aufgaben ist, die die Zuordnung umfangreicherer struktureller Beschreibungen zu Sätzen erfordern.', 'id': "Kami mempersembahkan model berbasis supertagging untuk pemeriksaan Grammar Pemgabungan Pohon yang menggunakan arsitektur jaringan saraf dan representation vektor tebal dari supertags (pohon dasar) untuk mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dalam skor lampiran tanpa label dan labeled. Model penghuraian shift-reduce melepaskan informasi leksikal sepenuhnya, dan menggunakan hanya 1-terbaik supertag untuk menghurai kalimat, menyediakan dukungan lanjut untuk klaim bahwa supertag adalah 'hampir menghurai.' We demonstrate that the embedding vector representations the parser induces for supertags possess linguistically interpretable structure, supporting analogies between grammatical structures like those familiar from recent work in distributional semantics.  Perwakilan tebal supertag ini mengatasi kelemahan untuk model statistik TAG dibandingkan dengan penghuraian CCG, meningkatkan kemungkinan bahwa TAG adalah alternatif yang dapat diterima untuk tugas NLP yang membutuhkan penugasan deskripsi struktur yang lebih kaya kepada kalimat.", 'ko': "우리는 초표기 트리 인접 문법 분석 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 신경 네트워크 구조와 초표기(기본 트리)의 밀집 벡터 표시를 사용하여 미표기와 표기 연결 점수의 최신 성능을 실현한다.shift-reduce 해석 모델은 어휘 정보를 완전히 피하고 1-best 슈퍼 표기 해석 문장만 사용하여 슈퍼 표기'거의 해석'이라는 표현을 더욱 지지한다.분석기가 SuperTag에서 내보낸 내장 벡터는 언어학적으로 해석할 수 있는 구조를 의미하며, 최근 분포어의학에서 익숙한 문법 구조처럼 문법 구조 간의 유비를 지원한다는 것을 입증했습니다.CCG 분석에 비해 하이퍼태그의 이런 밀집 표현은 표기 통계모델의 단점을 극복하고 문장에 더 풍부한 구조묘사를 할당해야 하는 NLP 임무에 대한 표기가 실행 가능한 대안일 가능성을 높였다.", 'fa': 'ما مدل\u200cهای پایه\u200cگیری بر پایه\u200cگیری\u200cهای سوپر\u200cتاگ\u200cگیری برای پاره\u200cگیری درخت\u200cها که از معماری\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی استفاده می\u200cکنند و ویکتور\u200cهای عمده\u200cای از سوپر\u200cتاگ\u200cها (درخت\u200cهای اصلی) برای رسیدن عملکرد هنری در نقاط\u200cگیری و نقاط\u200cگیری\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکنند. مدل تقسیم کردن تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر دهنده کاملاً اطلاعات لغوی را تغییر می دهد، و تنها ۱ بهترین تغییر تغییر تغییر برای تقسیم کردن یک جمله استفاده می کند، و برای تقسیم کردن یک جمله پشتیبانی بیشتر ما نشان می دهیم که ویکتور وارد شدن نشان می دهد که ویکتور وارد شدن تولید کننده\u200cها برای سوپرتاگ\u200cها ساختار قابل تفسیر زبانی دارند، آنالوژی بین ساختارهای گرامیک مانند آن\u200cها که از کار اخیر آشنا شده\u200cاند در سیمانتیک\u200cهای تقسیم می\u200cکنند. این نمایش عمیق از برچسب\u200cهای سوپرتاگ برای مدل\u200cهای آماری TAG در مقایسه با برچسب\u200cهای CCG پیروز می\u200cشود، و احتمال بالا می\u200cبرد که TAG یک جایگزینه قابل قابل قابل قابل توجه برای کار NLP است که نیاز به تعیین توضیح ساختاری ثروتمند\u200cتر به جمله\u200cها است.', 'tr': 'Başka bir şekilde nöral şebeke arhitektarları ve yoğun vektörler, süper taşlar (elementer ağaçlar) şeklinde yazılmadığı ve etiket edilmediği şekilde başarmak için Tree Adjoining Grammar analizi için tabanlı modelleri gösteriyoruz. shift Biz içeri giren vektör şeklinde, süper taşlar için yapılandırılabilir bir yapılar olduğunu gösteriyoruz. Bu süper taglaryň ýumuşluky CCG parslamasyna görä TAG statistik modelleriniň çekilmelerini üstüne getirir. Bu TAG sözleriň baýlyk strukturlaryň taslamasyna gerek ýerli bir alternatiw üçin ýeterleýär.', 'af': "Ons stel supertagging-gebaseerde modele vir Boom Adjoining Grammar verwerking wat gebruik neural netwerk arkitektuurs en dens vektor voorstelling van supertags (elementêre bome) om state-of-the-art-prestasie te bereik in ongeabelde en etiketeerde aanhegstelling. Die verskuif-verduur verwerking model skep leksiese inligting heeltemal, en gebruik slegs die 1-beste superetikette om 'n seting te ontlees, verskaf verdere ondersteuning vir die aandrukking wat superetiketting is 'amper verwerking'. Ons wys dat die inbêring vektor voorstellings van die ontwerker wat die ontwerker induseer vir superetikette het lingvisieslik uittelbare struktuur, ondersteun analogies tussen grammatiese strukture soos dié wat van onlangse werk bekend is in verspreidingssemantieke. Hierdie dense verteenwoording van superetikette oorwin die tekeninge vir statistiese modele van TAG soos vergelyk met CCG verwerking, die moontlikheid dat TAG 'n bepaalde alternatief is vir NLP-opdragte wat die toewysing van ryker strukturele beskrywings na setinge benodig.", 'sw': "Tunaweza kutengeneza mifano yenye mifano ya Ujumbe kwa ajili ya Mlima Kujiunga Gramu inayotumia majengo ya mtandao wa neurali na uwakilishi wa vifaa vya juu (miti ya msingi) ili kupata utendaji wa sanaa katika vipindi vya vipengele vinavyoeleweka na viungo vinavyoonyesha. Mfano wa mabadiliko ya uchimbaji unaondoa taarifa za kimapenzi kabisa, na inatumia vifaa vyema vya juu pekee vya kufungia hukumu hiyo, na kutoa msaada zaidi kwa madai ya kudai kuwa upigaji kura ni 'karibu kubadilisha'. Tunaonyesha kwamba vector inayoingiza inawakilisha viwanda vya Parser kwa ajili ya vifaa vya supertag wanamiliki muundo wa kutafsiri lugha, wakiunga mkono uchambuzi kati ya miundombinu ya grammatiki kama wale wanaofahamika na kazi za hivi karibuni katika mitandao ya usambazaji. This dense representation of supertags overcomes the drawbacks for statistical models of TAG as compared to CCG parsing, raising the possibility that TAG is a viable alternative for NLP tasks that require the assignment of richer structural descriptions to sentences.", 'am': 'የናውሬል መረብ መክፈቻዎች እና የዋነኛ የዌብ መክፈቻ የsupertags (elementary ዛፎች) የ-art ድረ-ሥርዓት ስርዓት ለማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የመለስ-አነስተኛ ፓርቲ ሞዴል ከሌክሲካዊ መረጃዎች በተለየ ይራቃል፡፡ አካባቢው ቦታር ለሱፎርተሮች የሚተረጉት ቋንቋ ቋንቋ የሚተርጉም መሠረት እንዲያሳየን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ This dense representation of supertags overcomes the drawbacks for statistical models of TAG as compared to CCG parsing, raising the possibility that TAG is a viable alternative for NLP tasks that require the assignment of richer structural descriptions to sentences.', 'bn': 'আমরা সুপার্ট্যাগিং ভিত্তিক মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি গ্রাম যোগ দেওয়ার জন্য যারা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের আর্কিটাক্টার ব্যবহার করে সুপার ট্রাগের (মৌলিক গাছ) প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে সুপার পার্সিং মডেল পুরোপুরি লেক্সিক তথ্য থেকে সরে যায় এবং শুধুমাত্র ১ সেরা সুপার্ট্যাগ ব্যবহার করে একটি বাক্য পার্স করার জন্য, যারা দাবি করে সুপা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বিভিন্ন ভেক্টর সুপার্ট্যাগের প্রতিনিধির প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে সুপার্ট্যাগের জন্য প্রকাশিত প্রক্রিয়া ভাষায় ভাষায় ব্যাখ্যাত কাঠ সিসিজি পার্সিং এর তুলনায় টাজি সুপার্ট্যাগের গভীর প্রতিনিধিত্বে টাজির পরিসংখ্যান মডেলের পিঠের প্রতিনিধিত্ব পেয়েছে এবং তার সম্ভাবনা বাড়িয়ে দেয় যে টাজি এনএলপ', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim modele me bazë superetiketash për analizimin e Gramave të bashkimit me pemë që përdorin arkitektura të rrjetit nervor dhe përfaqësim të dendur vektor të superetiketave (pemë elementare) për të arritur shfaqjen më të lartë në rezultate të pashkruar dhe të etiketuar të lidhjeve. Modeli i ndryshimit-reduktimit i analizimit shmanget plotësisht nga informacioni lexik dhe përdor vetëm 1-më të mira supertags për të analizuar një fjalim, duke ofruar mbështetje të mëtejshme për pretendimin se supertagging është "pothuajse analizim." Ne demonstrojmë se përfaqësimet e vektorit të përfshirë që analizuesi indukton për supertagët posedojnë strukturë gjuhësore të interpretueshme, duke mbështetur analogjitë midis strukturave grammatike si ato të njohura nga punët e fundit në semantikën shpërndarëse. Ky përfaqësim i dendur i superetiketave kapërcen dëmet për modelet statistikë të TAG krahasuar me analizimin e CCG, duke rritur mundësinë që TAG të jetë një alternativë e realizueshme për detyrat e NLP që kërkojnë përcaktimin e përshkrimeve strukturore më të pasura ndaj dënimeve.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ծառերի միացման գրամամարի գերթեգավորման հիմնված մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործում են նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություններ և գերթեգավորման խիտ վեկտորների ներկայացումներ (էլեկտրոնային ծառեր) լավագույն արտադրողությունների հասնելու համար առանց նշանների և նշանների կապված գնահատակ Փոխավոր-նվազեցնել վերլուծության մոդելը ամբողջովին հեռանում է լեքսիկական տեղեկատվությունը և օգտագործում է միայն 1 լավագույն սուպերթեգը նախադասություն վերլուծելու համար, ապահովում է ավելի շատ աջակցություն այն փաստի համար, որ սուպերթեգը գրեթե վեր Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ներառված վեկտորների ներդրումները, որոնք գործադրողը ստեղծում է սուպերթեգերի համար, ունեն լեզվաբանական մեկնաբանելի կառուցվածք, որը աջակցում է գրամատիկ կառուցվածքների միջև նման գրամատիկ կառուցվածքների, որոնք ծանոթ This dense representation of supertags overcomes the drawbacks for statistical models of TAG as compared to CCG parsing, raising the possibility that TAG is a viable alternative for NLP tasks that require the assignment of richer structural descriptions to sentences.', 'cs': 'Představujeme modely založené na supertagingu pro analýzu gramatiky přilehlých stromů, které využívají architektury neuronových sítí a hustou vektorovou reprezentaci supertagů (elementárních stromů) k dosažení nejmodernějšího výkonu v neznačených a označených bodech příloh. Model parsování s redukcí posunu se zcela vyhýbá lexikálním informacím a k analýze věty používá pouze nejlepší supertagy, což poskytuje další podporu tvrzení, že supertagování je "téměř parsování". Ukazujeme, že vkládací vektorové reprezentace, které parser indukuje pro supertagy, mají lingvisticky interpretovatelnou strukturu, podporující analogii mezi gramatickými strukturami, jako jsou známé z nedávné práce v distribuční sémantice. Tato hustá reprezentace supertagů překonává nevýhody statistických modelů TAG ve srovnání s CCG parsováním, což zvyšuje možnost, že TAG je životaschopnou alternativou pro NLP úlohy, které vyžadují přiřazení bohatších strukturálních popisů k větám.', 'az': "Biz ağac Adjusting Grammar analizi üçün süper etiketli modelləri göstəririk ki, nöral ağ arhitektarını və süper etiketlərin (elemental ağacların) müəyyən edilməsi üçün süper etiketlərin (elemental ağacların) müəyyən edilməsi və etiketli bağlama nöqtələrində istifadə edir. shift-reduce parsing modeli leksik məlumatlarını tamamilə uzaqlaşdırır, və sözləri ayırmaq üçün yalnız 1-ən yaxşı superetiketləri istifadə edir, superetiketin 'az qala ayırmaq' iddiasına daha çox dəstək verir. Biz göstəririk ki, içərisində olan vektör süper etiketlərin yaradılışında dil təfsil edilebilir strukturların sahibi olduğunu göstərir, müxtəlif semantik işlərində tanıdıqları kimi gramatik strukturların arasında analogiləri desteklər. Bu süper etiketlərin sıxıntılı göstəricisi CCG ayırması ilə müqayisədə TAG statistik modellərinin geri çəkilməsini üstün edir, TAG is ə cümlələrə daha qüvvətli strukturlu tanımlamaları lazımdır.", 'bs': "Predstavljamo modele na osnovu superetiketiranja za analizu drveta koji se pridružuju Grammar koji koriste arhitekture neurone mreže i guste vektore predstavljanja superetiketa (elementarnih drveta) kako bi postigli postupak umjetnosti u neizbiljnim i označenim rezultatima priključenja. Model za analiziranje smjene potpuno isključuje leksičke informacije, a koristi samo 1-najbolje superznakove za analiziranje rečenice, pružajući daljnju podršku tvrdnji da je superznakovanje 'gotovo analiziranje'. Pokazujemo da uključujući vektor predstavlja analiziranje induciranja za superznakove posjeduju lingvistički interpretabilnu strukturu, podržavajući analogije između gramatičkih struktura poput one poznate iz nedavnog rada u distribucijskom semantiku. Ova gusta predstavljanja superznakova prevlada zaustavljanja statističkih modela TAG u usporedbi s analizanjem CCG-a, povećavajući mogućnost da je TAG održiva alternativa za zadatak NLP-a koji zahtijevaju dodavanje bogatih strukturnih opisa kaznim.", 'ca': 'We present supertagging-based models for Tree Adjoining Grammar parsing that use neural network architectures and dense vector representation of supertags (elementary trees) to achieve state-of-the-art performance in unlabeled and labeled attachment scores.  El model d\'analització shift-reduce evita completament la informació lèxica, i només utilitza les 1 millors superetiquetes per analitzar una frase, proporcionant més suport a la afirmació de que superetiquetar és "gairebé analitzar". Demonstrem que les representacions de vectors incorporadors que el analitzador indueix per superetiquetes tenen estructura lingüísticament interpretable, suportant analogies entre estructures gramàtiques com aquelles familiars del treball recent en semàntica distribucional. Aquesta densa representació de superetiquetes supera els inconvenients dels models estadístics de TAG en comparació amb l\'analització de CCG, augmentant la possibilitat que TAG sigui una alternativa viable per a les tasques de NLP que requereixen la asignació de descripcions estructurals més riques a les frases.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme supertagging-pohjaisia malleja Tree Adjoining Grammar -jäsentämiseen, joissa käytetään neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria ja supertagien tiheää vektoriesitystä (alkeispuut) saavuttaakseen huipputason suorituskyvyn merkitsemättömissä ja merkitsemättömissä liitetiedoissa. Shift-reduce-jäsennysmalli torjuu sanaston tiedot kokonaan ja käyttää vain yhden parhaan supertagin lauseen jäsentämiseen, mikä tukee väitettä, että supertagging on "melkein jäsentämistä". Osoitamme, että jäsentäjän supertageille indusoimilla upottavilla vektoriesityksillä on kielellisesti tulkittavissa oleva rakenne, joka tukee analogiaa kieliopillisten rakenteiden välillä, kuten viimeaikaisissa jakelusemantiikassa tehdyissä tutkimuksissa. Tämä tiheä supertagien esittäminen voittaa TAG:n tilastollisten mallien haittapuolet CCG:n jäsentämiseen verrattuna, mikä nostaa mahdollisuuden, että TAG on elinkelpoinen vaihtoehto NLP-tehtäviin, jotka edellyttävät rikkaampien rakenteellisten kuvausten osoittamista lauseille.', 'et': 'Esitleme supersildistamisel põhinevaid mudeleid Tree Adjoining Grammar parsimiseks, mis kasutavad neurovõrgu arhitektuure ja supersildide tihedat vektorikujutamist (elementaarsed puud), et saavutada tipptasemel jõudlus märgistamata ja märgistamata manustamiskoorides. Shift-reduce parsimismudel eemaldab täielikult leksikaalse teabe ja kasutab lause parsimiseks ainult 1 parimat supersilti, pakkudes täiendavat toetust väitele, et supersiltimine on "peaaegu parsimine". Näitame, et parseri poolt supersiltidele indutseeritavatel manustatavatel vektorikujutistel on keeleliselt tõlgendatav struktuur, mis toetab analoogiaid grammatiliste struktuuride vahel, nagu need, mis on tuttavad hiljutisest distributsioonisemintika tööst. See supermärkide tihe esitus ületab TAG statistiliste mudelite puudused võrreldes CCG parsimisega, tõstes võimaluse, et TAG on elujõuline alternatiiv NLP ülesannete jaoks, mis nõuavad lausetele rikkalikumate struktuurikirjelduste määramist.', 'jv': 'We present super tagging shift-limits We show that the embedding vector representations the browser nduices for super tags have Linguistically interjectable structural, supported annelogies amongst gram graphical architectures like the recent job in Distribubution semanti. Ngubah bener', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da misãlai masu bincike wa Tree Adjoined Grammar da ke yi amfani da tsarin tarakiki na jerin neural da mai ƙunci na masu tsari wa masu basin tags (ƙanshi na itãce) to achieve halin-of-the-art cikin score na da ba'a rubuta ba. The shift-reduce parsing model eschews lexical information entirely, and uses only the 1-best supertags to parse a sentence, providing further support for the claim that supertagging is 'almost parsing.'  Tuna nuna cewa in da ke samar da shirin parser masu fassarar wa dukkan tags sunã da tsarin da ake fassara lugha da linguistic, sunã ƙarfafa masu motsi a tsakanin matsayin grammati kamar waɗanda aka sani daga aikin a yanzu cikin sakantiki. Wannan mai ƙunci na rufe multi-tags na rinjãya bayan motsi na tsari na TAG kamar sami da parse na CCG, kuma ya ɗaukaka yiwuwa, TAG shi wata shida mai inganci wa aikin NLP da yana nufin an gaura misãlai masu ƙaranci zuwa azãba.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo modele, ki temeljijo na superoznačevanju za razčlenjevanje slovnice dreves, ki uporabljajo arhitekturo nevronskih omrežij in gosto vektorsko reprezentacijo superoznak (elementarna drevesa), da bi dosegli najsodobnejšo zmogljivost pri neoznačenih in označenih ocenah priključkov. Model razčlenitve shift-reduce popolnoma izogiba leksikalnim informacijam in uporablja samo 1 najboljše superoznake za razčlenitev stavka, kar zagotavlja dodatno podporo trditvi, da je superoznaka "skoraj razčlenitev". Pokazali smo, da imajo vektorske predstavitve, ki jih razčlenjevalec inducira za superoznake, jezikovno razložljivo strukturo, ki podpira analogije med slovničnimi strukturami, kot so tiste, ki so znane iz nedavnega dela distribucijske semantike. Ta gosta predstavitev superoznak premaga pomanjkljivosti statističnih modelov TAG v primerjavi z razčlenjevanjem CCG, kar dviguje možnost, da je TAG izvedljiva alternativa za naloge NLP, ki zahtevajo dodelitev bogatejših strukturnih opisov stavkom.', 'bo': "We present supertagging-based models for Tree Adjoining Grammar parsing that use neural network architectures and dense vector representation of supertags (elementary trees) to achieve state-of-the-art performance in unlabeled and labeled attachment scores. The shift-reduce parsing model eschews lexical information entirely, and uses only the 1-best supertags to parse a sentence, providing further support for the claim that supertagging is 'almost parsing.' ང་ཚོས་embedding vector representations that the parser induces for supertags have linguistically interpretable structure. འདིའི་dense representation of supertags overcomes the drawbacks for statistical models of TAG as compared to CCG parsing, raising the possibility that TAG is a viable alternative for NLP tasks that require the assignment of richer structural descriptions to sentences.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים דוגמנים מבוססים על תגים עבור מעבדת גראמאר הצטרפות עץ אשר משתמשים בארכיטקטורות רשת עצבית וייצגת וקטורים צפופופות דוגמנית ההעברה המפחית מתחמקת מידע לקסי לחלוטין, ושתמשת רק בתגים על-1 הטובים ביותר כדי להעביר משפט, ומספקת תמיכה נוספת לטענה שהתגים על זה כמעט מעבד. אנו מוכיחים שהמייצגים של הוקטורים הקולבים שהמפרסם מעורר לתגים על יש מבנה אפשרי לפרסם בשפה, לתמוך באנלוגיות בין מבנים גרמטיים כמו אלה שמכרים מהעבודה האחרונה בסמנטיקה פיצועית. ההצגה העצומה הזו של תגים על מתגברים על החסרונות של דוגמנים סטטיסטיים של TAG בהשוואה לבדיקת CCG, מעלה את האפשרות שTAG היא אלטרנטיבה חיונית למשימות NLP שדורשת את העבודה של תיאורים מבנה עשירים יותר למשפטים.'}
{'en': 'Global Normalization of Convolutional Neural Networks for Joint Entity and Relation Classification', 'ar': 'التطبيع العالمي للشبكات العصبية التلافيفية لتصنيف الكيان المشترك والعلاقة', 'es': 'Normalización global de redes neuronales convolucionales para la clasificación conjunta de entidades y relaciones', 'fr': 'Normalisation globale des réseaux de neurones convolutifs pour la classification conjointe des entités et des relations', 'pt': 'Normalização Global de Redes Neurais Convolucionais para Classificação Conjunta de Entidade e Relação', 'ja': '共同体と関係分類のための畳み込みニューラルネットワークのグローバル規格化', 'zh': '以合体类者卷积神经网络全局规范化', 'hi': 'संयुक्त इकाई और संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का वैश्विक सामान्यीकरण', 'ru': 'Глобальная нормализация сверточных нейронных сетей для классификации совместных сущностей и отношений', 'ga': "Normalú Domhanda ar Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite d'Aicmiú Comhaonán agus Caidrimh", 'ka': 'ჩვენი ერთადერთი ელემენტი და შესახებების კლასიფიკაციის გლობალური ნორმალიზაცია', 'hu': 'Konvolúciós neurális hálózatok globális normalizálása a közös entitások és kapcsolatok osztályozására', 'el': 'Παγκόσμια Κανονικοποίηση των Νευρικών Δικτύων για την Κοινή Κατάταξη Οντότητας και Σχέσεων', 'it': 'Normalizzazione globale delle reti neurali convoluzionali per la classificazione congiunta delle entità e delle relazioni', 'kk': 'Жалпы нысандар мен қатынастар классификациясының жүйелік нейрондық желінің жалпы нормализациясы', 'lt': 'Bendro subjekto ir santykių klasifikavimo konvolucinių nervinių tinklų visuotinis normalizavimas', 'mk': 'Глобална нормализација на конволуционалните неурални мрежи за класификација на заедничкиот ентитет и односите', 'ms': 'Normalisasi Global Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional untuk Klasifikasi Entiti dan Hubungan Bersama', 'mt': 'Normalizzazzjoni Globali tan-Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Entità Konġunta u r-Relazzjonijiet', 'ml': 'യൂണ്ട് എന്റിറ്റിയും ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടിയുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെ ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d ന', 'no': 'Global Normalisering av konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk for joint Entity and Relation Classification', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн нэгж, харилцааны классификацийн дэлхийн сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн', 'pl': 'Globalna normalizacja konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych dla klasyfikacji wspólnych podmiotów i relacji', 'si': 'ජාතික සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසය සම්බන්ධ අයිති සහ සම්බන්ධ ක්ලාසිකරණය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණි', 'so': 'Global Normalization of Convolution Neural Network for Joint Entity and Relation Classification', 'ro': 'Normalizarea globală a rețelelor neuronale convoluționale pentru clasificarea entităților comune și a relațiilor', 'sr': 'Globalna normalizacija konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža za klasifikaciju zajedničkih područja i odnosa', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Global normalisering av konvulutionella neurala nätverk för gemensam enhets- och relationsklassificering', 'ur': 'Joint Entity and Relations Classification for Convolutional Neural Networks of Global Normalization', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tiêu chuẩn toàn cầu mạng thần kinh có liên hệ cho liên minh và liên hệ', 'da': 'Global normalisering af konvolutionelle neurale netværk til klassificering af fælles enheder og relationer', 'hr': 'Globalna normalizacija konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža za klasifikaciju zajedničkih područja i odnosa', 'nl': 'Globale Normalisatie van Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken voor Gezamenlijke Entiteit en Relatie Classificatie', 'id': 'Normalisasi Global Rangkaian Neural Konvelusi untuk Klasifikasi Entitas dan Hubungan Bersama', 'de': 'Globale Normalisierung konvevolutionaler neuronaler Netzwerke zur gemeinsamen Entität- und Beziehungsklassifikation', 'ko': '실체와 관계 분류를 결합하는 권적 신경 네트워크의 전역 귀일화', 'bg': 'Глобална нормализация на конвелуционните неврални мрежи за класификация на съвкупността и отношенията', 'tr': 'Birleşik Entitet we Relşik Klasifikasy üçin Halkara Jawanlar', 'sw': 'Udhalilishaji wa Kimataifa wa Mtandao wa Ujadala wa Kiraia kwa Kuhusiana na Ujadala', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمومی برای کلاس\u200cسازی اجتماعی و ارتباطات', 'hy': 'Միացյալ հասարակության և հարաբերությունների դասակարգման համաշխարհային նորմալիզացիան', 'af': 'Globale Normaliseering van Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke vir Gesamelede Entiteit en Relasifikasie', 'sq': 'Normalizimi global i rrjeteve nervore konvolutive për klasifikimin e njësisë së përbashkët dhe marrëdhënieve', 'bn': 'সংযুক্ত এন্টিটি এবং সম্পর্কের জন্য কনভোলেশনের নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের গ্লোবাল স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক', 'bs': 'Globalna normalizacija konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža za klasifikaciju zajedničkih područja i odnosa', 'ca': 'Global Normalization of Convolutional Neural Networks for Joint Entity and Relation Classification', 'cs': 'Globální normalizace konvelučních neuronových sítí pro společnou klasifikaci entit a vztahů', 'az': 'Həmçinin İlişkilər və İlişkilər Klasifikasyonu üçün Kürbəli Nürül Sənələrinin Kürbəli Normalizasyonu', 'et': 'Konvolutsiooniliste neuraalsete võrkude globaalne normaliseerimine ühise olemuse ja suhte klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Konvolutionaalisten hermoverkostojen maailmanlaajuinen normalisointi yhteistä kokonaisuutta ja suhdetta varten', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Global', 'he': 'נורמליזציה גלובלית של רשתות נוירוליות משתנות עבור יחידה ומערכת יחסים', 'sk': 'Globalna normalizacija konvolucijskih živčnih omrežij za klasifikacijo skupnih entitet in odnosov', 'bo': 'མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'We introduce globally normalized convolutional neural networks for joint entity classification and relation extraction. In particular, we propose a way to utilize a linear-chain conditional random field output layer for predicting entity types and relations between entities at the same time. Our experiments show that global normalization outperforms a locally normalized softmax layer on a benchmark dataset.', 'ar': 'نقدم شبكات عصبية تلافيفية موحدة عالميًا لتصنيف الكيانات المشتركة واستخراج العلاقة. على وجه الخصوص ، نقترح طريقة لاستخدام طبقة خرج حقل عشوائي شرطي من سلسلة خطية للتنبؤ بأنواع الكيانات والعلاقات بين الكيانات في نفس الوقت. تُظهر تجاربنا أن التطبيع العالمي يتفوق على طبقة softmax المعيارية محليًا على مجموعة بيانات معيارية.', 'es': 'Introducimos redes neuronales convolucionales normalizadas globalmente para la clasificación de entidades conjuntas y la extracción de relaciones. En particular, proponemos una forma de utilizar una capa de salida de campo aleatorio condicional de cadena lineal para predecir los tipos de entidad y las relaciones entre entidades al mismo tiempo. Nuestros experimentos muestran que la normalización global supera a una capa softmax normalizada localmente en un conjunto de datos de referencia.', 'pt': 'Introduzimos redes neurais convolucionais globalmente normalizadas para classificação de entidades conjuntas e extração de relações. Em particular, propomos uma maneira de utilizar uma camada de saída de campo aleatório condicional de cadeia linear para prever tipos de entidade e relações entre entidades ao mesmo tempo. Nossos experimentos mostram que a normalização global supera uma camada softmax normalizada localmente em um conjunto de dados de referência.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons des réseaux neuronaux convolutifs normalisés à l'échelle mondiale pour la classification conjointe d'entités et l'extraction de relations En particulier, nous proposons un moyen d'utiliser une couche de sortie de champ aléatoire conditionnel à chaîne linéaire pour prédire les types d'entités et les relations entre les entités en même temps. Nos expériences montrent que la normalisation globale surpasse une couche softmax normalisée localement sur un jeu de données de référence.", 'ja': '我々は、合同実体分類と関係抽出のためのグローバルに正規化された畳み込みニューラルネットワークを導入します。特に、実体の種類と実体間の関係を同時に予測するために、線形鎖条件付きランダムフィールド出力層を利用する方法を提案する。当社の実験では、グローバル正規化は、ベンチマークデータセット上のローカル正規化されたソフトマックスレイヤーを上回ることが示されています。', 'hi': 'हम संयुक्त इकाई वर्गीकरण और संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए विश्व स्तर पर सामान्यीकृत convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एक ही समय में इकाई प्रकार और संस्थाओं के बीच संबंधों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक रैखिक-श्रृंखला सशर्त यादृच्छिक क्षेत्र आउटपुट परत का उपयोग करने का एक तरीका प्रस्तावित करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि वैश्विक सामान्यीकरण एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर स्थानीय रूप से सामान्यीकृत सॉफ्टमैक्स परत को मात देता है।', 'zh': '引入全局归一化卷积神经网络,以合体类取之。 特为一用线性随机场输一时占实体之法。 臣等实验明,在基准数据集上,全局归一化优于局归一化软最大。', 'ru': 'Мы вводим глобально нормализованные сверточные нейронные сети для классификации совместных сущностей и извлечения отношений. В частности, мы предлагаем способ использования линейного слоя условного случайного поля для предсказания типов сущностей и отношений между сущностями одновременно. Наши эксперименты показывают, что глобальная нормализация превосходит локально нормализованный слой softmax на базовом наборе данных.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach líonraí néaracha conbhlóideacha normalaithe ar fud an domhain le haghaidh aicmiú comh-eintiteas agus eastóscadh caidreamh. Go háirithe, molaimid bealach chun ciseal aschuir réimse randamach coinníollach slabhra-líneach a úsáid chun cineálacha eintiteas agus caidreamh idir eintitis a thuar ag an am céanna. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn normalú domhanda ciseal softmax normalaithe go háitiúil ar thacar sonraí tagarmhairc.', 'hu': 'Globálisan normalizált convolucionális neurális hálózatokat vezetünk be a közös entitás osztályozására és a kapcsolat extrakciójára. Különösen azt javasoljuk, hogy egy lineáris láncú feltételes véletlenszerű mezőkimeneti réteget használjunk az entitástípusok és entitások közötti kapcsolatok egyidejű előrejelzésére. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a globális normalizáció felülmúlja a lokálisan normalizált softmax réteget egy benchmark adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε παγκοσμίως ομαλοποιημένα νευρωνικά δίκτυα για κοινή ταξινόμηση οντοτήτων και εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε έναν τρόπο χρήσης ενός στρώματος εξόδου τυχαίου πεδίου γραμμικής αλυσίδας υπό όρους για την πρόβλεψη τύπων οντοτήτων και σχέσεων μεταξύ οντοτήτων ταυτόχρονα. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η παγκόσμια ομαλοποίηση ξεπερνά ένα τοπικό ομαλοποιημένο στρώμα σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გლობალურად ნორმალურად ნეიროლური ქსელების კლასიფიკაციას და შესახებ ექსტრაქციისთვის ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ მინდომებით სხვა გზა, როგორც ლინერიური კვანდიციური კონდიციური გამოყენება ფაილის გამოყენება განსაკუთრებისთვის ინტერტის ტიპები და განსაკუთრების ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ გლობალური ნორმალიზაცია ლოკალურად ნორმალიზებული softmax ჟურნალის მონაცემების მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე', 'it': "Introduciamo reti neurali convoluzionali normalizzate a livello globale per la classificazione delle entità congiunte e l'estrazione delle relazioni. In particolare, proponiamo un modo per utilizzare un livello di output casuale condizionale a catena lineare per prevedere i tipi di entità e le relazioni tra entità allo stesso tempo. I nostri esperimenti mostrano che la normalizzazione globale supera un livello softmax normalizzato localmente su un set di dati benchmark.", 'kk': 'Біз жалпы жалпы түрлендірілген нейрондық желілерді біріктіру және қатынастарды тарқату үшін көңіл түрлендірілген. Есінікте, біз бір уақытта нысандардың түрлерін және қатынастарын бақылау үшін сызық тілкелердің кездейсоқ өрістердің шығыс қабатты қолдануға арналған жолын таңдаймыз. Біздің тәжірибелеріміз жалпы нормализациялау жергілікті қабаттың бағыттау деректер жиынында ең жақсы қабатты жасайды дегенді көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме глобално нормализирани конволуционални нервни мрежи за класификација на заеднички ентитет и екстракција на врски. Посебно, предложуваме начин да се искористи линијарен ланец условен случајен слој на поле за предвидување на типовите на ентитети и односите помеѓу ентитетите во исто време. Our experiments show that global normalization outperforms a locally normalized softmax layer on a benchmark dataset.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan rangkaian saraf konvolusi yang normal secara global untuk klasifikasi entiti bersama dan ekstraksi hubungan. In particular, we propose a way to utilize a linear-chain conditional random field output layer for predicting entity types and relations between entities at the same time.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa normalisasi global melampaui lapisan softmax normalisasi setempat pada set data benchmark.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d സാധാരണ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. In particular, we propose a way to utilize a linear-chain conditional random field output layer for predicting entity types and relations between entities at the same time.  നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഗ്ലോക്കല്\u200d സാധാരണമാക്കുന്നത് ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame pasauliniu mastu normalizuotus konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus bendrų subjektų klasifikavimui ir santykių išgavimui. Visų pirma siūlome būdą panaudoti linijinės grandinės sąlyginį atsitiktinio lauko išėjimo sluoksnį numatant subjektų tipus ir santykius tarp subjektų tuo pačiu metu. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad pasaulinė normalizacija viršija vietos normalizuotą softmax sluoksnį lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinyje.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali normalizzati globalment għall-klassifikazzjoni konġunta tal-entità u l-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. B’mod partikolari, qed nipproponu mod kif nistgħu nużaw saff ta’ produzzjoni każwali tal-kamp b’katina lineari kondizzjonali għat-tbassir tat-tipi ta’ entitajiet u r-relazzjonijiet bejn l-entitajiet fl-istess ħin. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li n-normalizzazzjoni globali tirriżulta minn saff softmax normalizzat lokalment fuq sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer globalt normaliserte konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk for joint entity classification and relation extraction. I særskilt foreslår vi ein måte å bruka eit lineær kjede-kondicionalt tilfeldige utlaglag for å foreslå ulike typar og forhold mellom einingar samtidig. Eksperimentane våre viser at globalnormalisering utfører ein lokalt normalisert måkstmaksimum lag på ein benchmark dataset.', 'mn': 'Бид дэлхий даяарчлагдсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд нийлбэр бүтээгдэхүүний хуваарилалт болон харилцааны хамааралтай холбоотой мэдрэлийн сүлжээг танилцуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид шулууны хэлхээ шаардлагатай санамсаргүй өргөн гаргах давхарга ашиглах арга зааж өгдөг. Бидний туршилтууд дэлхийн нормализацийг тойролцоогоор нормализацийн максимум давхар өгөгдлийн санд гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy globalnie znormalizowane konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe do klasyfikacji wspólnych jednostek i ekstrakcji relacji. W szczególności proponujemy sposób wykorzystania warstwy wyjściowej pola losowego o łańcuchu liniowym do przewidywania typów jednostek i relacji między jednostkami. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że globalna normalizacja przewyższa lokalnie znormalizowaną warstwę softmax na zestawie danych referencyjnych.', 'ro': 'Introducem rețele neuronale convoluționale normalizate la nivel global pentru clasificarea entităților comune și extragerea relațiilor. În special, propunem o modalitate de a utiliza un strat de ieșire a câmpurilor aleatorii condiționate în lanț liniar pentru a predice tipurile de entități și relațiile dintre entități în același timp. Experimentele noastre arată că normalizarea globală depășește un strat softmax normalizat local pe un set de date de referință.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ සම්බන්ධ විදියට විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනව අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ජාතික සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ස්ථානික සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් එක', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa shabakado caalamiga ah oo dabiicadda ah oo la caadi ah oo la soo saaray fasax iyo iskuul xiriir. Si gaar ah, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qaab aan ku isticmaalno xarunta beerta oo ku qoran qoraal-xadhig ah, si aan ugu sii sheegno noocyada iyo xiriirka ay u dhexeeyaan waxyaabaha. Imtixaanadeena waxay muuqataa in caadiga caalamiga ah uu ka soo saaraa xarunta hoos-caadi ah oo ku qoran taariikhda benchmark.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar globalt normaliserade konvulutionella neurala nätverk för gemensam entitetsklassificering och relationsextraktion. I synnerhet föreslår vi ett sätt att använda ett linjärt kedjeläge villkorat slumpmässigt fältutmatningslager för att förutsäga entitetstyper och relationer mellan entiteter samtidigt. Våra experiment visar att global normalisering överträffar ett lokalt normaliserat softmax-lager på en benchmarkdatauppsättning.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo globalno normalizovane konvolucione neuralne mreže za klasifikaciju zajedničkih entiteta i izvlačenje odnosa. Posebno predlažemo način da upotrebimo linearni lančani uslovni sloj izlaza polja za predviđanje tipa entiteta i odnosa između entiteta u isto vreme. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da globalna normalizacija iznosi lokalno normalizirani softmax sloj na setu podataka.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் சேர்ந்த பொருளின் வகுப்பு மற்றும் தொடர்பு பெறுவதற்கான உலக இயல்பான சாதாரண புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்களை  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு வரிசையில் சங்கிலியான நிபந்தனை புலத்தின் வெளியீட்டு அடுக்கை பயன்படுத்த ஒரு வழியை பயன்படுத்தி பொருள் வகைகள்  Our experiments show that global normalization outperforms a locally normalized softmax layer on a benchmark dataset.', 'ur': 'ہم جہانول سے عام طور پر قابل معلوم ہوئے نئورل نیٹورل نیٹورک کو مشترک انٹیٹی کلیسی اور رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے معلوم کرتے ہیں. مخصوصا، ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ ایک لائنیر-زنجیر کانڈیشن کانڈیشن فیلڈ اپوٹ لائر کا استعمال کریں ایک طریقہ کے لئے ایک طریقہ کی پیش بینی کریں اور ایک طریقہ کے درمیان اتحادیت کے درمیان رابطہ. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ گلوبل نارمولیزی ایک بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ پر ایک نرمولیزی لائئر کی عمدہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz birinchi narsalarni birlashtirish va bog'liq boshqarish uchun dunyo oddiy tarmoq tarmoqlarini ko'rganamiz. Boshqa, biz quyidagi obʼektlarning turlari va bogʻlamalari bilan bir necha harfning chegarasini ishlatish uchun yordam qilamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimizni ko'rsatadi, dunyo normalisiyasi benchmark maʼlumotlar sahifasidagi lokal soddalashtirilgan softmax darajaga bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu kết nối thần kinh ổn định trên toàn cầu cho việc phân loại các tổ hợp hợp và phân tích. Chúng tôi đề xuất một cách để sử dụng một lớp xuất trường trường ngẫu nhiên trong chuỗi tuyến tính để dự đoán các kiểu thực thể và các mối quan hệ giữa các thực thể cùng lúc. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy sự bình thường toàn cầu đạt được một lớp mềm tổng hợp cục bộ trên một bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo globalno normalizirane konvolucionalne neurone mreže za klasifikaciju zajedničkih entiteta i izvlačenje odnosa. Posebno predlažemo način korištenja linearnog lanca uslovnog slučajnog izlaznog sloja polja za predviđanje tipa entiteta i odnosa između entiteta u isto vrijeme. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da globalna normalizacija iznosi lokalno normalizirani softmax sloj na setu podataka o referenciji.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer globalt normaliserede konvulutive neurale netværk til fælles enhedsklassificering og relation ekstraktion. Især foreslår vi en måde at udnytte et lineær-kæde betinget tilfældigt felt output lag til at forudsige entitetstyper og relationer mellem entiteter på samme tid. Vores eksperimenter viser, at global normalisering overgår et lokalt normaliseret softmax lag på et benchmark datasæt.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan jaringan saraf konvolusi global normalisasi untuk klasifikasi entitas kongsi dan ekstraksi hubungan. Terutama, kami mengusulkan cara untuk menggunakan rantai linear bersyarat lapisan output lapisan acak lapisan lapisan untuk memprediksi tipe entitas dan hubungan antara entitas pada saat yang sama. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa normalisasi global melebihi lapisan softmax normalisasi lokal pada set data benchmark.', 'de': 'Wir führen global normalisierte convolutionale neuronale Netze zur gemeinsamen Entitätsklassifizierung und Beziehungsextraktion ein. Insbesondere schlagen wir eine Möglichkeit vor, eine linear-kettige bedingte Zufallsfeldausgabeschicht zur Vorhersage von Entitätstypen und Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten gleichzeitig zu nutzen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die globale Normalisierung eine lokal normalisierte Softmax-Schicht auf einem Benchmark-Datensatz übertrifft.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме глобално нормализирани конволюционни невронни мрежи за съвместна класификация и извличане на релации. По-специално, ние предлагаме начин за използване на линейно-верижен условен произволно поле изходен слой за прогнозиране на типове обекти и релации между обекти в същото време. Нашите експерименти показват, че глобалната нормализация превъзхожда локално нормализирания слой на база данни.', 'nl': 'We introduceren wereldwijd genormaliseerde convolutionele neurale netwerken voor gezamenlijke entiteitsclassificatie en relatieontwikkeling. In het bijzonder stellen we een manier voor om een lineaire keten voorwaardelijke random field output laag te gebruiken voor het voorspellen van entiteitentypes en relaties tussen entiteiten op hetzelfde moment. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat globale normalisatie beter presteert dan een lokaal genormaliseerde softmax laag op een benchmark dataset.', 'ko': '우리는 전체 국면의 귀일화 권적 신경 네트워크를 도입하여 실체의 분류와 관계 추출을 결합시키는 데 사용한다.특히 우리는 선형 체인 조건을 이용하여 랜덤장 출력층을 이용하여 실체 유형과 실체 간의 관계를 동시에 예측하는 방법을 제시했다.우리의 실험은 기준 데이터 집합에서 전역 표준화가 국부 표준화된softmax층보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'ما شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معرفی شده جهانی را برای classification of entities joint و extraction of relations معرفی می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصا، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم راهی برای استفاده از یک طبقه خروج از زمینه\u200cهای تصادفی با زنجیر خطی برای پیش\u200cبینی از نوع\u200cها و رابطه\u200cها بین واحدها در یک زمان. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که عادی جهانی یک طبقه نرم\u200cترین نرم\u200cترین طبقه در یک مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای نرم\u200cترکیب محلی بیشتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha mitandao ya kijeshi ya kimataifa ya kawaida kwa ajili ya kutangazwa na utoaji wa mahusiano. Kwa hakika, tunapendekeza njia ya kutumia kiwango cha uzalishaji wa mazingira ya mstari kwa ajili ya kutabiri aina na mahusiano kati ya vitu wakati huo huo. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa utaratibu wa duniani unaonyesha kiwango cha kawaida cha programu cha kawaida kwenye seti ya taarifa za benchmark.', 'tr': 'Munuň dünýädäki dünýäde görkezilýän näwletleri birleşik entitet klasifikasy we baglaýyşy çekmek üçin taýýarlapdyr. Aýratyn bolsa, biz birnäçe entiler we birnäçe guramlaryň arasynyň baglaýyşyny çaklamak üçin çizgi-tünleri modi ullanmaga teklip edip görýäris Biziň deneylerimiz küresel normalizasyonyň ýerleşdirilýan ýerleşdirilýan ýokarydaky eňki hatlaryň üstünde azaltýandygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë rrjete nervore konvolutive të normalizuara globalisht për klasifikimin e njësisë së përbashkët dhe nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve. Në veçanti, ne propozojmë një mënyrë për të përdorur një shtresë të daljes së fushës së rastësishme me zinxhir linear për parashikimin e llojeve të njësisë dhe marrëdhënieve midis njësisë në të njëjtën kohë. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se normalizimi global ekziston mbi një shtresë softmax të normalizuar lokalisht në një bazë të dhënash.', 'az': 'Biz dünya səviyyəsində, birlikdə bir entitə klasifikasyonu və əlaqəsi çıxartmaq üçün normalizləndirilmiş konvolucional nöral ağlarını tanıyırıq. Özellikle, biz bir dəfə entitə növlərini və məlumatların arasındakı ilişkileri təmin etmək üçün linear zəncirlə münasibətli saha çıxış düzümünü istifadə etmək üçün bir yolu təklif edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz küresel normalizasyon bir benchmark veri qutusu üzerində yerli olaraq normalizasyon edilən yumuşaqlıq sütunu göstərir.', 'bn': 'আমরা বিশ্বব্যাপী স্বাভাবিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই যুক্ত বস্তুর বিভাগ এবং সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য। বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি রাস্তা প্রস্তাব করি যেন একটি লাইনিয়ার-চেইন ব্যবহার করতে পারি ক্ষেত্রের ক্ষেত্রে অনুযায়ী ক্ষেত্রের আউটপুট স্তরের জন্ আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে বিশ্ব স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক সফটম্যাক্স স স্তরের একটি স', 'af': "Ons introduseer globaliseerde konvolusiele neuralnetwerke vir joint entiteitklassifikasie en verwanting uitpakking. In spesifieke voorstel ons 'n manier om 'n lineêre ketting voorwaardige willekeurige veld uitvoer laag te gebruik vir voorskou van entiteittipes en relasies tussen entiteite op dieselfde tyd. Ons eksperimente wys dat globale normalisering uitvoer 'n lokaal normaliseerde sagte maksimum laag op 'n benchmark datastel.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo globalno normalizovane konvolucione neurone mreže za klasifikaciju zajedničkih entiteta i izvlačenje odnosa. Posebno predlažemo način korištenja linearnog lanca uslovnog nasumičnog sloja izlaza polja za predviđanje tipa entiteta i odnosa između entiteta u isto vrijeme. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da globalna normalizacija iznosi lokalno normalizirani softmax sloj na setu podataka o referenciji.', 'hy': 'We introduce globally normalized convolutional neural networks for joint entity classification and relation extraction.  Մենք հատկապես առաջարկում ենք մի միջոց օգտագործելու գծային շղթայի պայմանավոր պատահական դաշտի արտադրման շերտը միաժամանակ կազմակերպությունների տեսակների և հարաբերությունների կանխատեսման համար: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ գլոբալ նորմալիզացիան գերազանցում է տեղական նորմալիզացված սոֆթմաքսի շերտը համեմատային տվյալների համակարգում:', 'am': 'በዓለምአቀፍ የተዘጋጀውን የነዌብ መረብ ለማቀናቀል እና ግንኙነት ለመለየት እና ለመውጣት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ በአካባቢው መካከል ዓይነት እና ግንኙነት በመጠቀም የመስመር አካላዊ አካል እና ግንኙነት በመጠቀም የመስመር አካል የደረጃ ውጤት ደረጃን ለመጠቀም የሚችል መንገድን እናሳስባለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የዓለምአቀፍ ትምህርት በአካባቢው የሶፍትኮት ደረጃን በbenchmark ዳታ ላይ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Představujeme globálně normalizované konvoluční neuronové sítě pro klasifikaci společných entit a extrakci vztahů. Konkrétně navrhujeme způsob využití lineárně řetězcové podmíněné výstupní vrstvy náhodného pole pro předpověď typů entit a vztahů mezi entitami současně. Naše experimenty ukazují, že globální normalizace předčí lokálně normalizovanou vrstvu softmaxu na referenční datové sadě.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme globaalisti normalisoituja konvolutionaalisia neuroverkkoja yhteisen entiteetin luokittelua ja suhdeuuttamista varten. Erityisesti ehdotamme tapaa hyödyntää lineaarisen ketjun ehdollista satunnaiskenttälähtökerrosta entiteettityyppien ja entiteettien välisten suhteiden ennustamiseen samanaikaisesti. Kokeemme osoittavat, että globaali normalisointi ylittää paikallisesti normalisoidun softmax-kerroksen vertailuaineistossa.', 'et': 'Tutvustame globaalselt normaliseeritud konvolutsiooniv繭rgustikke 羹histe olemite klassifitseerimiseks ja seoste ekstraheerimiseks. Eelk繭ige pakume v瓣lja, kuidas kasutada lineaarse ahela tingimuslikku juhusliku v瓣lja v瓣ljundikihti olemit羹羹pide ja olemite vaheliste suhete prognoosimiseks samal ajal. Meie eksperimendid n瓣itavad, et globaalne normaliseerimine 羹letab v繭rdlusandmekogumil kohalikult normaliseeritud softmax kihi.', 'ca': "We introduce globally normalized convolutional neural networks for joint entity classification and relation extraction.  En particular, proposem una manera d'utilitzar una capa de sortida aleatòria de camp condicionada en cadena linear per predir tipus d'entitats i relacions entre entitats al mateix temps. Els nostres experiments demostren que la normalització global supera una capa softmax normalitzada localment en un conjunt de dades de referència.", 'jv': 'Kernel Genjer-Genjer Name', 'he': 'אנו מציגים רשתות עצביות נורמליות גלובלית לסיווג יחידות משותפת וחילוץ מערכות יחסים. In particular, we propose a way to utilize a linear-chain conditional random field output layer for predicting entity types and relations between entities at the same time.  הניסויים שלנו מראים שהנורמליזציה הגלובלית יוצאת מעל שכבת סופטמאקס נורמלית מקומית על קבוצת נתונים.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo globalno normalizirane konvolucijske nevronske mreže za skupno klasifikacijo entitet in ekstrakcijo relacij. Predlagamo zlasti način uporabe linearne verige pogojnega naključnega polja izhodnega sloja za napovedovanje vrst entitet in relacij med entitetami hkrati. Naši poskusi kažejo, da globalna normalizacija presega lokalno normalizirano softmax plast na referenčnem naboru podatkov.', 'ha': "Tuna fara da wasu taryutan neural wanda ke da a cikin duniya a ƙididdige zuwa raba-danganta da mazaɓa. A cikin ƙayyade, muna buƙat a wani hanya da za'a yi amfani da wani wuri na cire-tsayi wa ƙananan fitarwa da ba'a sauce wa ya yi bashirin nau'i da kuma da haɗi tsakanin abun sami daidai. Our experiments show that global normalization outperforms a locally normalized softmax layer on a benchmark dataset.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡུལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཆ་མཐུན་དབྱིབས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་སྤྲོ In particular, we propose a way to use a linear-chain conditional random field output layer for predicting entity types and relations between entities at the same time. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པ་ལས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱུན'}
{'en': 'End-to-End Neural Relation Extraction with Global Optimization', 'pt': 'Extração de relações neurais de ponta a ponta com otimização global', 'fr': 'Extraction de relations neuronales de bout en bout avec optimisation globale', 'ar': 'استخراج العلاقة العصبية من طرف إلى طرف مع التحسين العالمي', 'es': 'Extracción integral de relaciones neuronales con optimización global', 'hi': 'ग्लोबल ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन के साथ एंड-टू-एंड तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण', 'ja': 'グローバル最適化によるエンドツーエンドの神経関係抽出', 'zh': '有全局优化端到端神经取之', 'ru': 'Сквозная экстракция нейронной связи с глобальной оптимизацией', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Caidrimh Néaraigh ó cheann ceann go ceann le optamú domhanda', 'ka': 'ბოლობალური ოპტიმიზაციის გადასრულება', 'hu': 'End-to-end idegrendszeri kapcsolat extrakció globális optimalizálással', 'el': 'Εκχύλισμα Νευρικής Σχέσης από τέλος σε τέλος με παγκόσμια βελτιστοποίηση', 'it': 'Estrazione end-to-end della relazione neurale con ottimizzazione globale', 'kk': 'Жалпы оптимизациялаумен аяқтау- аяқтау нейралық қатынастарды тарқату', 'lt': 'End-to-End Neural Relation Extraction with Global Optimization', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural Akhir-Akhir dengan Optimisasi Global', 'ml': 'ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d ഐച്ഛികങ്ങളുമായി അവസാനിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Newrali minn tmiem sa tmiem mal-Optimizzazzjoni Globali', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн төгсгөл-төгсгөл мэдрэлийн харилцаа хамааралтай хамааралтай', 'no': 'Utpakking av slutt til slutt av nøyralrelasjonar med globale optimalisering', 'pl': 'Kompleksowa ekstrakcja relacji neuronowych z globalną optymalizacją', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških odnosa sa globalnom optimizacijom', 'mk': 'Екстракција од крај до крај на неуралната врска со глобалната оптимизација', 'so': 'End-to-End Neural Relation Extraction with Global Optimization', 'ro': 'Extragerea relaţiilor neurale end-to-end cu optimizarea globală', 'sv': 'Extraktion av neural relation från början till slut med global optimering', 'ta': 'பொதுவான விருப்பத்தேர்வுடன் முடிவுக்கு முடிவு', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාවය සමඟ අවසාන සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය', 'ur': 'گلوبل اپٹیمایزی کے ساتھ پایان-پایان-پایان نیورال رابطہ اخراج', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Rút kết quả thần kinh với quang cách to àn cầu', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških odnosa sa globalnom optimizacijom', 'bg': 'Екстракция от край до край на невралната връзка с глобална оптимизация', 'nl': 'End-to-End neuronale relatie extractie met wereldwijde optimalisatie', 'da': 'End-to-End neural relation ekstraktion med global optimering', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural Akhir-Akhir dengan Optimisasi Global', 'fa': 'اخراج ارتباط عصبی به پایان و پایان با بهترین جهانی', 'de': 'End-to-End-Extraktion von neuronalen Beziehungen mit globaler Optimierung', 'ko': '전역 최적화를 바탕으로 하는 끝에서 끝까지 신경 관계 추출', 'sw': 'Kutokana na Uchaguzi wa Kimataifa', 'tr': 'Niýal Görniş Opşenler bilen Ahyry Ýüklemek', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i lidhjes nervore nga fundi në fund me optimizimin global', 'af': 'Einde na- einde Neurale Relasie Uitpakking met Globale Optimaliseering', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Համաշխարհային օպտիմացման հետ վերջ-վերջ նյարդային հարաբերությունների արտադրումը', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija neuroloških odnosa sa globalnom optimizacijom', 'ca': "Extracció de relació neuronal final a final amb l'optimització global", 'cs': 'Komplexní extrakce neuronových vztahů s globální optimalizací', 'et': 'Lõpp-lõpuni neuraalsete suhete ekstraheerimine globaalse optimeerimisega', 'az': 'Qlobal Optimizasiya ilə Nöral İlişkilərin son-to-end Extraction', 'fi': 'End-to-End Neural Relation Extraction with Global Optimization', 'bn': 'গ্লোবাল অপশনের সাথে শেষ- থেকে সমাপ্তি নিউরেল সম্পর্ক এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'jv': 'Fin-to-End', 'he': 'קיצוץ מערכת יחסים נוירוליות בסוף לסוף עם אופטימיזציה גלובלית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ekstrakcija nevronskih odnosov od konca do konca z globalno optimizacijo', 'bo': 'Global Optimization'}
{'en': 'Neural networks have shown promising results for relation extraction. State-of-the-art models cast the task as an end-to-end problem, solved incrementally using a local classifier. Yet previous work using statistical models have demonstrated that global optimization can achieve better performances compared to local classification. We build a globally optimized neural model for end-to-end relation extraction, proposing novel LSTM features in order to better learn context representations. In addition, we present a novel method to integrate syntactic information to facilitate global learning, yet requiring little background on syntactic grammars thus being easy to extend. Experimental results show that our proposed model is highly effective, achieving the best performances on two standard benchmarks.', 'ar': 'أظهرت الشبكات العصبية نتائج واعدة لاستخراج العلاقة. تعرض النماذج الحديثة المهمة على أنها مشكلة شاملة ، يتم حلها تدريجياً باستخدام مصنف محلي. ومع ذلك ، فقد أظهر العمل السابق باستخدام النماذج الإحصائية أن التحسين العالمي يمكن أن يحقق أداءً أفضل مقارنةً بالتصنيف المحلي. نحن نبني نموذجًا عصبيًا مُحسّنًا عالميًا لاستخراج العلاقة من طرف إلى طرف ، ونقترح ميزات LSTM جديدة من أجل تعلم تمثيلات السياق بشكل أفضل. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقدم طريقة جديدة لدمج المعلومات النحوية لتسهيل التعلم العالمي ، ومع ذلك تتطلب القليل من الخلفية حول القواعد النحوية وبالتالي يسهل توسيعها. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا المقترح فعال للغاية ، ويحقق أفضل أداء على معيارين معياريين.', 'es': 'Las redes neuronales han mostrado resultados prometedores para la extracción de relaciones. Los modelos más modernos presentan la tarea como un problema de principio a fin, que se resuelve de forma gradual mediante un clasificador local. Sin embargo, trabajos anteriores con modelos estadísticos han demostrado que la optimización global puede lograr mejores rendimientos en comparación con la clasificación local. Creamos un modelo neuronal optimizado globalmente para la extracción de relaciones de extremo a extremo, proponiendo nuevas funciones de LSTM para aprender mejor las representaciones del contexto. Además, presentamos un método novedoso para integrar información sintáctica para facilitar el aprendizaje global, pero que requiere pocos conocimientos sobre gramáticas sintácticas, por lo que es fácil de ampliar. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto es altamente efectivo, logrando los mejores rendimientos en dos puntos de referencia estándar.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones ont donné des résultats prometteurs pour l'extraction de relations Les modèles de pointe présentent la tâche comme un problème de bout en bout, résolu progressivement à l'aide d'un classificateur local. Pourtant, des travaux antérieurs utilisant des modèles statistiques ont démontré que l'optimisation globale peut atteindre de meilleures performances par rapport à la classification locale. Nous construisons un modèle neuronal globalement optimisé pour l'extraction de relations de bout en bout, proposant de nouvelles fonctionnalités LSTM afin de mieux apprendre les représentations contextuelles. En outre, nous présentons une nouvelle méthode pour intégrer des informations syntaxiques afin de faciliter l'apprentissage global, mais nécessitant peu de connaissances sur les grammaires syntaxiques, ce qui facilite l'extension. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle que nous proposons est très efficace, obtenant les meilleures performances sur deux points de référence standard.", 'pt': 'As redes neurais têm mostrado resultados promissores para extração de relações. Modelos de última geração lançam a tarefa como um problema de ponta a ponta, resolvido de forma incremental usando um classificador local. No entanto, trabalhos anteriores usando modelos estatísticos demonstraram que a otimização global pode alcançar melhores desempenhos em comparação com a classificação local. Construímos um modelo neural globalmente otimizado para extração de relação de ponta a ponta, propondo novos recursos LSTM para melhor aprender as representações de contexto. Além disso, apresentamos um novo método para integrar informações sintáticas para facilitar o aprendizado global, mas requer pouco conhecimento em gramáticas sintáticas, sendo fácil de estender. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo proposto é altamente eficaz, alcançando os melhores desempenhos em dois benchmarks padrão.', 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークは、関係抽出の有望な結果を示しています。最先端のモデルは、タスクをエンドツーエンドの問題としてキャストし、ローカル分類子を使用して段階的に解決します。しかし、統計モデルを使用した以前の研究は、グローバル最適化がローカル分類と比較してより良いパフォーマンスを達成できることを示しています。私たちは、エンドツーエンドの関係抽出のためにグローバルに最適化されたニューラルモデルを構築し、コンテキスト表現をよりよく学ぶために新規のLSTM機能を提案します。さらに、グローバルな学習を容易にするために構文情報を統合するための新規の方法を提示しますが、構文文法の背景はほとんど必要ないため、簡単に拡張できます。実験結果は、提案されたモデルが非常に効果的で、2つの標準ベンチマークで最高のパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '神经网络已见所取可冀矣。 最先进者转事为端,用本地分类器渐解。 然前用计模之事已验,比之局部分类,全局优化可以成善性。 构端到端之全球优化神经模,立新之LSTM,以善学上下文。 又有整合句法息以趣新法,而于句法语法几无背景知,故易广也。 实验结果表明,所陈模形有强效率,于两准准中得最佳。', 'ru': 'Нейронные сети показали многообещающие результаты для извлечения отношений. Современные модели ставят задачу как сквозную задачу, решаемую постепенно с помощью локального классификатора. Однако предыдущая работа с использованием статистических моделей показала, что глобальная оптимизация может обеспечить лучшие показатели по сравнению с местной классификацией. Мы создаем глобально оптимизированную нейронную модель для сквозного извлечения отношений, предлагая новые функции LSTM для лучшего изучения контекстных представлений. Кроме того, мы представляем новый метод интеграции синтаксической информации для содействия глобальному обучению, но требующий небольшого фона в синтаксических грамматиках, который, таким образом, легко расширить. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемая нами модель является высокоэффективной, достигая наилучших показателей по двум стандартным критериям.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका नेटवर्क ने संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए आशाजनक परिणाम दिखाए हैं। अत्याधुनिक मॉडल ने कार्य को एक एंड-टू-एंड समस्या के रूप में कास्ट किया, जिसे स्थानीय क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करके वृद्धिशील रूप से हल किया गया। फिर भी सांख्यिकीय मॉडल का उपयोग करके पिछले काम ने प्रदर्शित किया है कि वैश्विक अनुकूलन स्थानीय वर्गीकरण की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर सकता है। हम एंड-टू-एंड रिलेशन निष्कर्षण के लिए एक विश्व स्तर पर अनुकूलित तंत्रिका मॉडल का निर्माण करते हैं, जो संदर्भ प्रतिनिधित्व को बेहतर ढंग से सीखने के लिए उपन्यास एलएसटीएम सुविधाओं का प्रस्ताव करता है। इसके अलावा, हम वैश्विक सीखने की सुविधा के लिए वाक्यात्मक जानकारी को एकीकृत करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं, फिर भी वाक्यात्मक व्याकरणों पर थोड़ी पृष्ठभूमि की आवश्यकता होती है, इस प्रकार विस्तार करना आसान होता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल अत्यधिक प्रभावी है, दो मानक बेंचमार्क पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर रहा है।', 'ga': 'Léirigh líonraí néaracha torthaí dóchais maidir le heastóscadh gaol. Leagann samhlacha den scoth an tasc mar fhadhb cheann go ceann, arna réiteach go hincriminteach ag baint úsáide as aicmitheoir áitiúil. Ach léirigh obair roimhe seo a bhain úsáid as samhlacha staidrimh gur féidir le barrfheabhsú domhanda feidhmíocht níos fearr a bhaint amach i gcomparáid le haicmiú áitiúil. Déanaimid múnla néarúil optamaithe ar fud an domhain a thógáil le haghaidh eastóscadh caidreamh ceann go ceann, ag moladh gnéithe LSTM núíosacha chun léirithe comhthéacs a fhoghlaim níos fearr. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid modh nua i láthair chun faisnéis chomhréire a chomhtháthú chun foghlaim dhomhanda a éascú, ach is beag cúlra atá ag teastáil ó thaobh gramadaí comhréire, rud a bheidh éasca le leathnú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil ár múnla molta an-éifeachtach, ag baint amach na feidhmíochtaí is fearr ar dhá thagarmharc caighdeánach.', 'el': 'Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα έχουν δείξει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα θέτουν την εργασία ως ένα ολοκληρωμένο πρόβλημα, το οποίο επιλύεται σταδιακά χρησιμοποιώντας έναν τοπικό ταξινομητή. Ωστόσο, προηγούμενες εργασίες με τη χρήση στατιστικών μοντέλων έχουν δείξει ότι η παγκόσμια βελτιστοποίηση μπορεί να επιτύχει καλύτερες επιδόσεις σε σύγκριση με την τοπική ταξινόμηση. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα παγκοσμίως βελτιστοποιημένο νευρωνικό μοντέλο για εξαγωγή σχέσεων από το τέλος σε το τέλος, προτείνοντας νέα χαρακτηριστικά προκειμένου να μάθουμε καλύτερα αναπαραστάσεις περιβάλλοντος. Επιπλέον, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την ενσωμάτωση συντακτικών πληροφοριών για τη διευκόλυνση της παγκόσμιας μάθησης, χωρίς ωστόσο να απαιτείται ελάχιστο υπόβαθρο για τις συντακτικές γραμματικές, ώστε να είναι εύκολο να επεκταθεί. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο είναι εξαιρετικά αποτελεσματικό, επιτυγχάνοντας τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις σε δύο τυποποιημένα κριτήρια αναφοράς.', 'hu': 'A neurális hálózatok ígéretes eredményeket mutattak a kapcsolat extrakció terén. A legkorszerűbb modellek végponttól végpontig terjedő problémának tekintik a feladatot, amelyet egy helyi osztályozó segítségével fokozatosan oldunk meg. A statisztikai modelleket használó korábbi munkák azonban bebizonyították, hogy a globális optimalizálás jobb teljesítményt érhet el a helyi osztályozáshoz képest. Globálisan optimalizált neurális modellt építünk a végpontok közötti kapcsolatok kivonására, új LSTM funkciókat javasolunk a kontextusreprezentációk jobb megismerése érdekében. Ezen túlmenően bemutatunk egy új módszert a szintaktikus információk integrálására a globális tanulás megkönnyítése érdekében, mégis kevés hátteret igényel a szintaktikus nyelvtan így könnyen kiterjeszthető. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk rendkívül hatékony, két standard referenciaértéken a legjobb teljesítményt érve el.', 'it': "Le reti neurali hanno mostrato risultati promettenti per l'estrazione delle relazioni. Modelli all'avanguardia proiettano il compito come un problema end-to-end, risolto incrementalmente utilizzando un classificatore locale. Tuttavia, i precedenti lavori con modelli statistici hanno dimostrato che l'ottimizzazione globale può ottenere prestazioni migliori rispetto alla classificazione locale. Costruiamo un modello neurale ottimizzato a livello globale per l'estrazione delle relazioni end-to-end, proponendo nuove funzionalità LSTM al fine di imparare meglio le rappresentazioni del contesto. Inoltre, presentiamo un nuovo metodo per integrare le informazioni sintattiche per facilitare l'apprendimento globale, ma richiede poco background sulle grammatiche sintattiche così da essere facile da estendere. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello proposto è altamente efficace, raggiungendo le migliori prestazioni su due benchmark standard.", 'kk': 'Нейрондық желілер қатынасын тарқату үшін үлкен нәтижелерді көрсетті. Жергілікті классификациясының күйінің үлгілері тапсырманы аяқтау мәселесі ретінде шешілді. Бірақ статистикалық үлгілерді қолданып алдыңғы жұмыс жалпы оптимизация жергілікті классификацияға салыстырып жақсы жұмыс істеуге болады деп көрсетті. Біз жалпы жұмыс істеу үшін соңғы-соңғы қатынастарды тарқату үшін әлемді оптимизацияланған невралдық моделін құрамыз. Жалпы контексті түсіндіру үшін жақсы LSTM мүмкіндікт Қосымша, біз синтактикалық мәліметті жалпы оқытуды көмектесу үшін, синтактикалық граммалардың арқылы кішкентай аясын келтіру әдісін таңдаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің ұсынған моделіміз көп эффективті, екі стандартты бағдарламалардың ең жақсы оқиғаларын жеткізеді.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ქსელები გაჩვენეთ გასაკეთებელი შედეგების შედეგები. სურათის მოდელები დასაწყისი პრობლემა, როგორც დასაწყისი პრობლემა, პრობლემაციის გამოყენება მხოლოდ ლოკალური კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება. მაგრამ პირველი სამუშაო სტატისტიკური მოდელების გამოყენებაში გამოიყენებულია, რომ გლობალური ოპტიმიზაცია შეუძლია უკეთესი მონაცემები ლოკა ჩვენ დოლობალურად ოპტიმიზებული ნეიროლური მოდელი გადავიწყებთ კონტექსტურის გამოსახულებისთვის, რომელიც პრომენტური LSTM ფუნქციების გამოსახულება, რომ უფრო უფრო დამატებით, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით სინტექტიკური ინფორმაციის ინტერგურაციას, რომელიც გლობალური სწავლების შესაძლებლობად დავიწყებთ, მაგრამ სინტექტიკური გრამეტრების პატარ ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაქთწრ ოპველადან მჲევლ ვ მნჲდჲ ვტვკრთგ, ეჲჟრთდნაგაღთ ნაი-ეჲბპთრვ ოპველჲზვნთწ ნა ეგა ჟრ', 'lt': 'Neuraliniai tinklai parodė perspektyvius santykių gavimo rezultatus. Naujausi modeliai užduotį iškelia kaip problem ą nuo vienos iki kitos, išspręsta palaipsniui naudojant vietos klasifikatorių. Tačiau ankstesnis darbas naudojant statistinius modelius parodė, kad pasaulinė optimizacija gali pasiekti geresnių rezultatų, palyginti su vietos klasifikacija. Mes sukuriame pasauliniu mastu optimizuotą tarpusavio ryšių ekstrahavimo model į, siūlydami naujas LSTM savybes, kad geriau išsiaiškintume konteksto rodmenis. Be to, pristatome naują sintaksinės informacijos integravimo metodą, kuris palengvintų pasaulinį mokymąsi, tačiau reikalauja mažai žinių apie sintaksinę gramatiką, todėl lengva ją išplėsti. Experimental results show that our proposed model is highly effective, achieving the best performances on two standard benchmarks.', 'mk': 'Неуралните мрежи покажаа ветувачки резултати за извлекување врски. State-of-the-art models cast the task as an end-to-end problem, solved incrementally using a local classifier.  Сепак, претходната работа користејќи статистички модели покажа дека глобалната оптимизација може да постигне подобри резултати во споредба со локалната класификација. We build a globally optimized neural model for end-to-end relation extraction, proposing novel LSTM features in order to better learn context representations.  Покрај тоа, претставуваме нов метод за интегрирање на синтактичките информации за олеснување на глобалното учење, но бараме мала позадина на синтактичките граматики и така е лесно да се продолжи. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел е високо ефикасен, постигнувајќи ги најдобрите резултати на два стандардни benchmarks.', 'mt': 'In-netwerks newrali wrew riżultati promettenti għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Il-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati jagħtu l-kompitu bħala problem a minn tarf sa tarf, solvuti inkrementalment bl-użu ta’ klassifikatur lokali. Iżda xogħol preċedenti bl-użu ta’ mudelli statistiċi wera li l-ottimizzazzjoni globali tista’ tikseb prestazzjonijiet aħjar meta mqabbla mal-klassifikazzjoni lokali. Aħna nibnu mudell newrali globali ottimizzat għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni minn tarf sa tarf, li jipproponi karatteristiċi ġodda tal-LSTM sabiex jitgħallmu a ħjar rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kuntest. Barra minn hekk, qed nippreżentaw metodu ġdid għall-integrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni sintattika biex jiġi ffaċilitat it-tagħlim globali, iżda jeħtieġu ftit sfond dwar il-grammi sintattiċi u għalhekk ikun faċli li jiġi estiż. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell propost tagħna huwa effettiv ħafna, u jikseb l-aħjar prestazzjonijiet fuq żewġ punti ta’ riferiment standard.', 'ms': 'Rangkaian saraf telah menunjukkan keputusan yang berjanji untuk pengekstrakan hubungan. Model-state-of-the-art melemparkan tugas sebagai masalah akhir-akhir, diselesaikan secara bertambah menggunakan pengeklasifikasi setempat. Namun kerja terdahulu menggunakan model statistik telah menunjukkan bahawa pemoptimasi global boleh mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dibandingkan kelasukan setempat. We build a globally optimized neural model for end-to-end relation extraction, proposing novel LSTM features in order to better learn context representations.  Selain itu, kami mempersembahkan kaedah baru untuk mengintegrasikan maklumat sintaktik untuk memudahkan pembelajaran global, namun memerlukan sedikit latar belakang pada grammar sintaktik jadi mudah untuk dilanjutkan. Keputusan percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kami direncanakan sangat berkesan, mencapai prestasi terbaik pada dua tanda referensi piawai.', 'no': 'Neuralnettverk har vist foreløpige resultat for utpakking av relasjonar. Name Men førre arbeid med statistiske modeller har demonstrert at globale optimalisering kan oppnå bedre utføringar sammenlignet med lokale klassifikasjon. Vi bygger eit globalt optimalisert neuralmodell for utpakking av ende- til- slutt- relasjon, og foreslår novelle LSTM- funksjonar for å læra kontekstrepresentasjonar. I tillegg presenterer vi eit nytt metode for å integrere syntaksisk informasjon for å gjere tilgjengelege læring, men det krev liten bakgrunn på syntaksiske grammar slik at det er lett å utvide. Eksperimentale resultat viser at vår foreslått modell er svært effektivt, og når det gjer dei beste utføringane på to standardbanker.', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രത്യേക ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- ആര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരു അവസാന പ്രശ്നമായി ജോലിയെ പരിഹരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രാദേശിക ക ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d ഉപയോഗ എന്നിട്ടും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി സ്ഥിതിക മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും ലോക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷ അവസാനത്തെ ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ലോകത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച നെയൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. നോവല്\u200d എസ്റ്റം  കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്ലോക്കല്\u200d പഠനം ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d സാങ്കേതിക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചുക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d വളരെ പ്രവർത്തമാണെന്ന്, രണ്ട് സാ', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale au arătat rezultate promițătoare pentru extracția relației. Modelele de ultimă generație au transformat sarcina ca o problemă end-to-end, rezolvată progresiv folosind un clasificator local. Cu toate acestea, lucrările anterioare folosind modele statistice au demonstrat că optimizarea globală poate obține performanțe mai bune comparativ cu clasificarea locală. Construim un model neural optimizat la nivel global pentru extragerea relațiilor end-to-end, propunând caracteristici LSTM noi pentru a învăța mai bine reprezentările contextului. În plus, vă prezentăm o metodă nouă de integrare a informațiilor sintactice pentru a facilita învățarea globală, dar necesită puține cunoștințe despre gramaticile sintactice, fiind astfel ușor de extins. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru propus este extrem de eficient, obținând cele mai bune performanțe pe două criterii standard de referință.', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд харилцааны хамааралтай үр дүнг харуулсан. Шинэ урлагийн загварууд үүнийг төгсгөлд нь асуудал болгож, орон нутгийн хэлбэрийг ашиглаж нэмэгдүүлсэн. Гэвч өмнө нь статистикийн загваруудыг ашиглаж байгаа ажил дэлхийн сайхан сэтгэл хөдлөл нь орон нутгийн хэлбэрээс харьцуулахад илүү сайхан үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна Бид дэлхийн төгсгөл-төгсгөл хамааралтай хамааралтай сэтгэл зүйн загвар бүтээж, шинэ LSTM боломжуудыг илүү сайн ойлгохын тулд санал болгож байна. Түүнчлэн бид шинэ арга зам дэлхийн сургалтыг хялбарчлахын тулд синтактик мэдээллийг нэгтгэх шинэ арга зам илэрхийлдэг. Гэхдээ синтактик грамм дээр бага хэмжээний арга зам хэрэгтэй. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний санал өгсөн загвар маш үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хоёр стандарт багц дээр хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж байна.', 'pl': 'Sieci neuronowe wykazały obiecujące wyniki ekstrakcji relacji. Najnowocześniejsze modele postrzegają zadanie jako kompleksowy problem, rozwiązywany stopniowo za pomocą lokalnego klasyfikatora. Jednak poprzednie prace z wykorzystaniem modeli statystycznych wykazały, że globalna optymalizacja może osiągnąć lepsze wyniki w porównaniu z klasyfikacją lokalną. Budujemy globalnie zoptymalizowany model neuronowy do kompleksowej ekstrakcji relacji, proponując nowe funkcje LSTM w celu lepszej nauki reprezentacji kontekstu. Ponadto przedstawiamy nowatorską metodę integracji informacji składniowych w celu ułatwienia globalnego uczenia się, a jednocześnie wymagającą niewielkiego doświadczenia w zakresie gramatyki składniowej, dzięki czemu można je łatwo rozszerzyć. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowany przez nas model jest wysoce skuteczny, osiągając najlepsze osiągnięcia na dwóch standardowych standardowych wskaźnikach referencyjnych.', 'sr': 'Neuralne mreže pokazale su obećavajuće rezultate za izvlačenje odnosa. Državni modeli umjetnosti su postavili zadatak kao problem kraja do kraja, rešili se veoma korištenjem lokalnog klasifikatora. Ipak, prethodni rad koristeći statističke modele pokazao je da globalna optimizacija može postići bolje izvode u usporedbi sa lokalnom klasifikacijom. Napravili smo globalno optimizirani neuralni model za ekstrakciju odnosa na kraju do kraja, predlažeći nove karakteristike LSTM kako bi bolje naučili predstave konteksta. Osim toga, predstavljamo novu metodu da integrišemo sintaktične informacije kako bi olakšali globalno učenje, ali zahtevajući malo pozadine o sintaktičnim gramatičkim gramatikama, tako da je lako proširiti. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš predloženi model vrlo efikasan, ostvarivanje najboljih izvora na dva standardna kritika.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරේල් ජාලය ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න තියෙනවා. ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට අවසාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, ස්ථානික විශ්වාසකයෙක් ප්\u200dරයෝ නමුත් පසුගින් වැඩේ ස්ථානික විශේෂය සඳහා ස්ථානික විශේෂය සඳහා හොඳ වැඩක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් කිය අපි ජාතික විශේෂයෙන් අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන් නිර් ඒ වගේම, අපි සංවිධානය තොරතුරු එකතු කරන්න පුළුවන් විධානයක් පෙන්වන්න, ජාතික ඉගෙනගන්න, ඒත් සංවිධානය විධානයේ  පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයි, ස්ථාන', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு வெளியீட்டிற்கான பாதுகாப்பான முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறது. மாநிலை- கலை மாதிரிகள் பணியை முடிவுக்கு முடிவுக்கு பிரச்சனையாக வைத்துள்ளார் ஆனாலும் முந்தைய வேலை புள்ளிவிவரமான மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது உலக விருப்பங்கள் உள்ளூர் வகைப்ப நாம் முடிவில் முடிவு தொடர்பு வெளியேற்றத்திற்கான உலகத்தில் விருப்பப்படுத்தப்பட்ட புதிய மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம், சிறந்த மேலும், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறையைக் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் உலக கற்றலை சேர்க்க ஒருங்கிணைப்பு தகவலை ஒன்றாக்குவதற்கு, ஆனால் சிறிய பின்னணி தே சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி மிகவும் சிறந்த செயல்பாடுகள், இரண்டு நிலையான பென்கார', 'so': 'Neural networks have shown promising results for relation extraction.  Tilmaamaha farshaxanka ee dowladda ah waxay shaqada u saaraan dhibaato ugu dhammaad dhammaadka, waxayna u xalaaleen si aad u badan isticmaalka fasaxa degmada. Shaqo hore oo isticmaalaya tusaalooyin takhasuska ah waxay caddaysay in horumarinta caalamiga ah uu soo gaadhi karo bandhigyo wanaagsan oo la barbaran fasalka deegaanka. Waxaynu dhisaynaa model neurada oo caalamiga ah oo loo bedelay dhammaadka xiriirka dhammaadka ugu dambeeya, waxaana soo jeedinayaa warqada LSTM si aad u barto noocyo-xirfadeed. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab sawir ah si aan u qabsato macluumaad la xiriira waxbarashada caalamiga ah, laakiin waxaan u baahan nahay background yar oo ku saabsan tababarka syntactic, sidaas darteed si sahlan u sii wado. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayaga la soo jeeday uu aad u faa’iido badan yahay, in uu dhamaado wixii ugu wanaagsan labada qiimaha standardka ah.', 'ur': 'نیورال نیٹورک نے نسبت اخراج کے لئے وعدہ دینے والی نتیجے دکھائے ہیں۔ State-of-the-art models cast the task as an end-to-end problem, solved incrementally using a local classifier. لیکن پہلے کے کام ایسٹیسٹیکل موڈل کے مطابق دکھائے گئے ہیں کہ گلوبی اپنا اپنا اپنا اچھا کام پہنچا سکتا ہے لیکن محلی کلاسیفوں کے مقابلہ میں بہتر کام پہنچا سکتا ہے. ہم ایک نئورل موڈل بناتے ہیں جو آخر و آخر نسبت اٹھانے کے لئے بہترین سیکھنے کے لئے نئورل موڈل بناتے ہیں، نومین LSTM موجودات کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک نو طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ سینٹاکٹیک معلومات کو گلوب سیکھنے کے لئے آسان بنانے کے لئے تخلیق کریں، مگر سینٹاکٹیک گرامر پر تھوڑا پشت کی ضرورت ہے کہ اس طرح زیادہ آسان ہو جائے۔ Experimental results show that our proposed model is highly effective, achieving the best performances on two standard benchmarks.', 'sv': 'Neurala nätverk har visat lovande resultat för relationsextraktion. Toppmoderna modeller kastar uppgiften som ett heltäckande problem som lösts stegvis med hjälp av en lokal klassificerare. Ändå har tidigare arbete med statistiska modeller visat att global optimering kan uppnå bättre prestanda jämfört med lokal klassificering. Vi bygger en globalt optimerad neural modell för end-to-end relationsextraktion och föreslår nya LSTM-funktioner för att bättre lära sig kontextrepresentationer. Dessutom presenterar vi en ny metod för att integrera syntaktisk information för att underlätta globalt lärande, men kräver lite bakgrund på syntaktiska grammatiker vilket är lätt att utöka. Experimentella resultat visar att vår föreslagna modell är mycket effektiv och uppnår bästa resultat på två standardriktmärken.', 'uz': "Name Shaxsiy modellar vazifani oxiriga oʻtish muammolari sifatida qoʻyish mumkin, lokal klassifiker yordamida ko'proq tugatdi. Lekin oldingi ishni statistical modellar yordamida ko'rsatish mumkin. Umumiy moslamalar lokal klassifikga kamaytirilgan yaxshi ish natijalarini bajarishi mumkin. Biz butun oxirigi aloqalarni ajratish uchun umumiy neyrolik modelini yaratimiz. Konstant representarini yaxshi o'rganish uchun novel LSTM imkoniyatlarini yaxshi o'rganamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz dunyo ta'limni foydalanish uchun qo'shish uchun novel usulini birlashtiramiz, lekin syntactik grammatika orqa foni kerak, shunday qilib ko'payishi oson bo'ladi. Tajriba natijalari esa, pendilgan modelmiz juda effektiv, ikkita standard parametrlarda eng yaxshi bajarish natijalarini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Hệ thần kinh đã cho thấy kết quả hứa hẹn về các mối quan hệ. Các mô hình cổ đại đã chọn nhiệm vụ như một vấn đề cuối cùng, được giải quyết dần bằng một người phân loại địa phương. Tuy nhiên công việc trước sử dụng các mô hình thống kê đã chứng minh khả năng đạt hiệu suất tốt hơn so với phân loại địa phương. Chúng tôi xây dựng một mô hình thần kinh thần kinh tối đa cho kết thúc mọi kết quả, đề xuất các tính năng LSD mới để học hỏi các biểu hiện ngữ cảnh tốt hơn. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi có một phương pháp mới để hòa nhập thông tin cú pháp để dễ dàng học hành to àn cầu, nhưng cần ít nền tảng về các chương trình cú pháp để dễ mở rộng. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu thử của chúng ta rất hiệu quả, đạt được những hiệu quả tốt nhất trên hai tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Невралните мрежи показват обещаващи резултати за екстракция на релации. Най-съвременните модели представят задачата като проблем от край до край, решен постепенно с помощта на местен класификатор. Предишни изследвания, използващи статистически модели, показват, че глобалната оптимизация може да постигне по-добри резултати в сравнение с местната класификация. Ние изграждаме глобално оптимизиран невронен модел за извличане на взаимоотношения от край до край, предлагайки нови функции за по-добро изучаване на контекстните представяния. В допълнение, ние представяме нов метод за интегриране на синтактична информация за улесняване на глобалното учене, но изисква малко опит за синтактичната граматика и по този начин е лесно да се разшири. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният модел е изключително ефективен, постигайки най-добри показатели по два стандартни показателя.', 'nl': "Neurale netwerken hebben veelbelovende resultaten voor relatieontwikkeling laten zien. State-of-the-art modellen beschouwen de taak als een end-to-end probleem, stapsgewijs opgelost met behulp van een lokale classificator. Eerder onderzoek met behulp van statistische modellen heeft echter aangetoond dat wereldwijde optimalisatie betere prestaties kan bereiken in vergelijking met lokale classificatie. We bouwen een wereldwijd geoptimaliseerd neuraal model voor end-to-end relatieontwikkeling en stellen nieuwe LSTM-functies voor om contextrepresentaties beter te leren. Daarnaast presenteren we een nieuwe methode om syntactische informatie te integreren om wereldwijd leren te vergemakkelijken, maar vereisen weinig achtergrond over syntactische grammatica's waardoor ze gemakkelijk uit te breiden zijn. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model zeer effectief is en de beste prestaties behaalt op twee standaard benchmarks.", 'da': 'Neurale netværk har vist lovende resultater for relation ekstraktion. State-of-the-art modeller kaster opgaven som et end-to-end problem, der løses trinvist ved hjælp af en lokal klassificering. Men tidligere arbejde med statistiske modeller har vist, at global optimering kan opnå bedre resultater sammenlignet med lokal klassificering. Vi opbygger en globalt optimeret neural model til end-to-end relationsudvinding og foreslår nye LSTM funktioner for bedre at lære kontekst repræsentationer. Derudover præsenterer vi en ny metode til at integrere syntaktisk information for at lette global læring, men kræver lidt baggrund på syntaktiske grammatier og dermed er let at udvide. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores foreslåede model er yderst effektiv og opnår de bedste resultater på to standardbenchmarks.', 'hr': 'Neuralne mreže pokazale su obećavajuće rezultate za izvlačenje odnosa. Modeli države umjetnosti bacili su zadatak kao problem kraja do kraja, koji su se povećavajući koristeći lokalni klasifikator. Međutim, prethodni rad koristeći statističke modele pokazao je da globalna optimizacija može postići bolje učinke u usporedbi s lokalnom klasifikacijom. Napravili smo globalno optimizirani neuralni model za ekstrakciju odnosa na kraju do kraja, predlažeći nove karakteristike LSTM kako bi bolje naučili predstave konteksta. Osim toga, predstavljamo novu metodu za integraciju sintaktičkih informacija kako bi olakšali globalno učenje, a zatim zahtijevamo malo pozadine o sintaktičkim gramaticima da se tako lako proširi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš predloženi model vrlo učinkovit, ostvarivanje najboljih učinka na dvije standardne kriterije.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی نتایج قول\u200cدهنده برای اخراج ارتباط نشان داده\u200cاند. مدلهای ایالت هنر این کار را به عنوان یک مشکل پایان و پایان، با استفاده از یک گروه محلی حل کردند. هنوز کارهای قبلی با استفاده از مدل های آمار نشان داده اند که optimization globally can achieve better performances compared to local classification. ما یک مدل عصبی جهانی optimized globally for end-to-end relation extraction, proposing novel LSTM features in order to better learn context representations. در addition, we present a new method to integrate syntactic information to facilitate global learning, yet requiring little background on syntactic grammar thus being easy to extend. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل پیشنهاد ما بسیار موثر است، تا بهترین نمایش\u200cهایی در دو مقدار استاندارد برسد.', 'de': 'Neuronale Netzwerke haben vielversprechende Ergebnisse für die Beziehungsextraktion gezeigt. Modernste Modelle betrachten die Aufgabe als End-to-End-Problem, das schrittweise mit einem lokalen Klassifikator gelöst wird. Bisherige Arbeiten mit statistischen Modellen haben jedoch gezeigt, dass globale Optimierung bessere Leistungen im Vergleich zur lokalen Klassifizierung erzielen kann. Wir entwickeln ein global optimiertes neuronales Modell für die End-to-End-Beziehungsextraktion und schlagen neue LSTM-Funktionen vor, um Kontextdarstellungen besser zu erlernen. Darüber hinaus stellen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, um syntaktische Informationen zu integrieren, um globales Lernen zu erleichtern, aber wenig Hintergrundwissen über syntaktische Grammatiken erfordert und somit leicht zu erweitern ist. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell sehr effektiv ist und die besten Leistungen auf zwei Standard-Benchmarks erzielt.', 'ko': '신경 네트워크는 관계 추출에 이미 좋은 효과를 보였다.가장 선진적인 모델은 임무를 끝에서 끝까지의 문제로 전환하고 국부 클래스를 사용하여 점차적으로 해결한다.그러나 이전에 통계모델을 사용한 작업은 국부 분류에 비해 전역 최적화가 더욱 좋은 성능을 얻을 수 있음을 증명했다.우리는 상하문 표현을 더욱 잘 배우기 위해 전체적으로 최적화된 끝에서 끝까지의 관계 추출 신경 모델을 구축하고 새로운 LSTM 특징을 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 문법 정보를 통합시켜 전체적인 학습을 추진하는 새로운 방법을 제시했지만 문법 문법의 배경에 대한 요구가 낮기 때문에 확장하기 쉽다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 모델은 매우 효과적이며 두 표준 기준에서 최상의 성능을 실현하였다.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ya kijamii imeonyesha matokeo yanayoahidi kupata utoaji wa uhusiano. Mfano wa sanaa wa nchi hiyo huweka juhudi kama tatizo la mwisho la mwisho, lilitua kwa kutumia kundi la ndani. Hata hivyo, kazi iliyopita kwa kutumia mifano ya takwimu imeonyesha kuwa uwezekano wa maeneo ya dunia unaweza kupata ufanisi mzuri zaidi ukilinganishwa na maafisa wa eneo hilo. Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa neura ulimwenguni mzuri wa utoaji wa mahusiano ya mwisho, tunapendekeza vifaa vya kitabu cha LSTM ili kujifunza zaidi uwakilishi wa mazingira. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaweka mbinu ya riwaya ya kuunganisha taarifa za ushirikiano ili kusaidia kujifunza duniani, lakini tunahitaji maeneo machache kuhusu gramma za ushirikiano kwa hiyo ni rahisi kupanua. Experimental results show that our proposed model is highly effective, achieving the best performances on two standard benchmarks.', 'id': 'Jaringan saraf telah menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji untuk ekstraksi hubungan. Model state-of-the-art melemparkan tugas sebagai masalah akhir-akhir, diselesaikan secara incremental menggunakan klasifikasi lokal. Namun pekerjaan sebelumnya menggunakan model statistik telah menunjukkan bahwa optimisasi global dapat mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dibandingkan klasifikasi lokal. Kami membangun model neural global optimized untuk ekstraksi hubungan akhir-akhir, melaporkan ciri-ciri LSTM baru untuk belajar lebih baik rappresentasi konteks. Selain itu, kami mempersembahkan metode baru untuk mengintegrasi informasi sintaksi untuk memudahkan belajar global, namun membutuhkan sedikit latar belakang pada gramatika sintaksi sehingga mudah untuk diperoleh. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan sangat efektif, mencapai prestasi terbaik pada dua benchmark standar.', 'tr': 'Näsir şebekeler baglaýyşy açmak üçin söz berýän netijeleri görkezildi. PropertyName Ýöne öňki işiň istatistik modelleri ullanýän işiň küresel optimizasyň ýerli klasifikasyýa bilen has gowy performanslary başaryp biljekdigini görkezildi. Biz dünýäpli gözetilgeli näral modelini soňra-soňra baglaýyşy çekmek üçin, LSTM eserlerini gowy öwrenmek üçin täze bir nural modelini in şa edýäris. Munuň üçin dünýädäki öwrenmek üçin sintaktik maglumatlary birleştirmek üçin bir nowel yöntemi görkezip, ýöne sintaktik gramlaryň üstünde kiçiräk arkaplan gerek bolsa beýleki ýagdaýda ýeňil bolar. Experimanyň netijeleri biziň teklip eden nusgymyzyň örän täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär, 2 standart benchmarklarda iň gowy performanslary çykarýar.', 'af': "Nurale netwerke het beloftende resultate vertoon vir verwanting uitpakking. State-of-the-art modele het die taak as 'n end-to-end probleme gegooi, opgelos inkrementeer deur 'n plaaslike klassifiseerder te gebruik. Maar voorree werk met statistiese modele het bevestig dat globale optimalisasie beter uitvoerings kan bereik, vergelyk met plaaslike klasifikasie. Ons bou 'n globale optimaliseerde neural model vir einde-na-einde verhouding van uittrekking, voorstel novele LSTM-funksies om beter konteks voorstellings te leer. In addition, we present a novel method to integrate syntactic information to facilitate global learning, but requiring little background on syntactic grammar so be easy to extend. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons voorgestelde model baie effektief is, en die beste uitvoerings op twee standaard benchmarke bereik.", 'am': 'የውይይት መረብ ግንኙነት ለመውጣት የተስፋ ውጤቶች አሳይቷል፡፡ የሀገር-አርእስት ዓይነቶች ስራውን ወደ መጨረሻ መጨረሻ ጉዳይ እንዲያደርጉት፣ የተለየ ግንኙነት መግለጫ በመጠቀም አስተካክሎአል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የቀድሞው ሥራ በstatistic ሞዴላዎችን በመጠቀም የዓለምአቀፍ ማቀናቀፍ ከቅርብ ክፍል ጋር የሚሻለውን ፍለጎቶችን እንዲያገኝ ያስታያል፡፡ አቀማመጥ ለመጨረሻ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ሞዴል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የዓለማዊ ትምህርት ለማቀናቀል የሲንተርክ መረጃዎችን ለማከማከማቻል የመረጃ አቀማመጥ አቀናልለናል፣ ነገር ግን በSyntactic grammar ላይ ትንሽ መደብ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የሞከሩ ሞዴላዎቻችን በሁለቱ ደጋፊዎች ላይ የመልካሙን የውጤት ውጤቶች እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Rrjetet neuronale kanë treguar rezultate premtuese për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve. Modelet më të mëdha e rendin detyrën si një problem nga fundi në fund, zgjidhur gradualisht duke përdorur një klasifikues lokal. Megjithatë, puna e mëparshme duke përdorur modele statistike ka demonstruar se optimizimi global mund të arrijë rezultate më të mira krahasuar me klasifikimin lokal. Ne ndërtojmë një model neuronal të optimizuar globalisht për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve nga fundi në fund, duke propozuar karakteristika të reja LSTM me qëllim që të mësojmë më mirë përfaqësime konteksti. Përveç kësaj, ne paraqesim një metodë të re për të integruar informacionin sintaktik për të lehtësuar mësimin global, megjithatë duke kërkuar pak sfond mbi gramatikat sintaktike kështu që të jetë e lehtë për të zgjeruar. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar është mjaft efektiv, duke arritur rezultatet më të mira në dy pika standarte.', 'az': 'Nöral ağları bağlantı çıxartması üçün vəd verici sonuçları göstərdilər. İstiqamət modelləri işləri son-son problemi kimi çəkdilər, yerli klasifikatçı ilə art ıq çəkilər. Halbuki əvvəlki işlər Statistik modelləri ilə istifadə edir ki, küresel optimizasiya yerli klasifikasiya salınması ilə daha yaxşı performanslar yetişə bilər. Biz küresel olaraq optimizləndirilmiş nöral modeli son-to-end bağlantıları çıxartmaq üçün, yeni LSTM özelliklərini daha yaxşı öyrənmək üçün təklif edirik. Əvvəlcə, küresel öyrənməyi asanlaşdırmaq üçün sintaktik məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün yeni bir yol göstəririk, lakin sintaktik qrammalar barəsində küçük arxa plan lazımdır. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modelimiz çox etkilidir, iki standart benchmarkların ən yaxşı performanslarını başa düşürür.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերը ցույց են տալիս խոստացնող արդյունքներ հարաբերությունների վերացման համար: Նորագույն մոդելները հանգեցնում են խնդիրը որպես վերջ-վերջ խնդիր, որոնք բազմապատկապես լուծվում են տեղական դասակարգչի օգնությամբ: Սակայն նախորդ աշխատանքը, օգտագործելով վիճակագրական մոդելներ, ցույց է տվել, որ գլոբալ օպտիմացիան կարող է ավելի լավ արդյունք հասնել, համեմատած տեղական դասակարգման հետ: Մենք կառուցում ենք համաշխարհային օպտիմացված նյարդային մոդել վերջ-վերջ հարաբերությունների վերացման համար, առաջարկում ենք նոր LSMT-ի հատկանիշներ, որպեսզի ավելի լավ սովորենք կոնտեքստի ներկայացումներ: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք սինտակտիկ տեղեկությունը ինտեգրելու նոր մեթոդ գլոբալ սովորելու համար, սակայն անհրաժեշտ է փոքր հիմք սինտակտիկ գրամագրությունների վրա, ինչը հեշտ է ընդլայնել: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը շատ արդյունավետ է, հասնելով լավագույն արդյունքները երկու ստանդարտ համեմատական նպատակների վրա:', 'ca': "Les xarxes neuronals han demostrat resultats prometedors per l'extracció de relacions. Els models d'última edat van posar la tasca com un problem a de final a final, resoldre's incrementalment fent servir un classificador local. Però la feina anterior utilitzant models estadístics ha demostrat que l'optimització mundial pot aconseguir millors resultats comparats amb la classificació local. Construim un model neural globalment optimitzat per l'extracció de relació final a final, proposant noves característiques LSTM per aprendre millor representacions contextuals. A més, presentem un nou mètode d'integració de la informació sinàctica per facilitar l'aprenentatge global, però requerem poc passat sobre les gramàtiques sinàctiques, així que és fàcil d'estendre. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model proposat és molt efectiu, aconseguint els millors resultats en dos punts de referència estándar.", 'bn': 'নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক সম্পর্ক বের করার প্রতিশ্রুতি ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে। স্টেট-অফ-শিল্প মডেল এই কাজ শেষ পর্যন্ত সমস্যা হিসেবে প্রদান করে, স্থানীয় ক্লাশিফার ব্যবহার করে সমাধান করা হয়। কিন্তু পূর্ববর্তী কাজ পরিসংখ্যান মডেল ব্যবহার করে প্রমাণিত করেছে যে বিশ্বব্যাপী অপারেশন স্থানীয় বিভিন্ন ক্লাস শেষ পর্যন্ত সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য আমরা বিশ্বব্যাপী নিউরেল মডেল তৈরি করি, এলএসএমএর উপন্যাসের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী প্রস্তাব করি যাতে প্রতিন এছাড়াও আমরা বিশ্বব্যাপী শিক্ষা সহজয়তার জন্য সিন্ট্যাক্টিক তথ্য একত্রিত করার একটি উপন্যাস পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি, কিন্তু সিন্ট্যাকটিক পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল অত্যন্ত কার্যকর, দুই স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বেনমার্কের সেরা প্রদর্শনের ক', 'bs': 'Neuralne mreže pokazale su obećavajuće rezultate za izvlačenje odnosa. Modeli države umjetnosti bacili su zadatak kao problem kraja do kraja, koji su se povećavajući koristeći lokalni klasifikator. Međutim, prethodni rad koristeći statističke modele pokazao je da globalna optimizacija može ostvariti bolje učinke u usporedbi s lokalnom klasifikacijom. Mi gradimo globalno optimizirani neuralni model za ekstrakciju odnosa na kraju do kraja, predlažeći nove karakteristike LSTM kako bi bolje naučili predstave konteksta. Osim toga, predstavljamo novu metodu da integrišemo sintaktične informacije kako bi olakšali globalno učenje, ali zahtijevamo malo pozadine o sintaktičnim gramatičkim gramaticama da se tako lako proširi. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš predloženi model vrlo efikasan, ostvarivanje najboljih izvora na dva standardna kritika.', 'cs': 'Neurální sítě ukázaly slibné výsledky pro extrakci vztahů. Nejmodernější modely uvádějí úlohu jako komplexní problém, řešený postupně pomocí lokálního klasifikátoru. Předchozí práce s využitím statistických modelů však ukázaly, že globální optimalizace může dosáhnout lepších výkonů ve srovnání s lokální klasifikací. Vytváříme globálně optimalizovaný neuronový model pro komplexní extrakci vztahů, který navrhuje nové LSTM funkce, abychom se lépe naučili reprezentace kontextu. Kromě toho představujeme novou metodu integrace syntaktických informací pro usnadnění globálního učení, přesto vyžaduje malé zázemí o syntaktických gramatikách, takže je snadné rozšířit. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš navržený model je vysoce efektivní a dosahuje nejlepších výkonů na dvou standardních benchmarkech.', 'et': 'Närvivõrgustikud on näidanud paljulubavaid tulemusi seoste ekstraheerimisel. Tipptasemel mudelid esitavad ülesande otsast otsani probleemina, mis lahendatakse järk-järgult kohaliku klassifitseerija abil. Samas on varasemad statistiliste mudelite kasutamise tööd näidanud, et globaalne optimeerimine võib saavutada paremaid tulemusi võrreldes kohaliku klassifikatsiooniga. Loome globaalselt optimeeritud närvimudeli lõpp-lõpuni suhete ekstraheerimiseks, pakkudes välja uudseid LSTM funktsioone, et paremini õppida konteksti esitusi. Lisaks esitame uudse meetodi süntaktilise teabe integreerimiseks, et hõlbustada globaalset õppimist, kuid nõuab vähe tausta süntaktiliste grammatikate kohta, seega on lihtne laiendada. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie pakutud mudel on väga tõhus, saavutades parimad tulemused kahe standardse võrdlusaluse alusel.', 'fi': 'Hermoverkostot ovat osoittaneet lupaavia tuloksia relaatioiden uuttamisessa. Viimeisimmät mallit luovat tehtävän päästä päähän -ongelmaksi, joka ratkaistaan asteittain paikallisella luokittelijalla. Aikaisemmat tilastollisia malleja hyödyntävät tutkimukset ovat kuitenkin osoittaneet, että globaalilla optimoinnilla voidaan saavuttaa parempia tuloksia paikalliseen luokitteluun verrattuna. Rakennamme globaalisti optimoidun neuromallin päästä päähän -suhdeuuttamiseen, jossa ehdotetaan uusia LSTM-ominaisuuksia kontekstin esittämisen oppimiseksi paremmin. Lisäksi esittelemme uuden menetelmän integroida syntaktista tietoa helpottamaan maailmanlaajuista oppimista, mutta vaatii vain vähän taustaa syntaktisista kieliopista, joten sitä on helppo laajentaa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli on erittäin tehokas ja saavuttaa parhaat tulokset kahdella standardilla.', 'jv': 'Network Name politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing paling-perintahaan maneh sing nggawe gerakan gambar tanggal rabi, supoyo nggawe barêng-barêng kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing nêmên, iso nggawe layakno sing paling-terakhir dumadhiné. Nambah, kita mudhaya nyumbang kelas kanggo ditambah informasi sinaksi kanggo ngejaran mulasar global, sampeyan akeh mbukak mungkun tarjamahan kanggo nguasar sinaksi gram-sampeyan kuwi susahe gambar. Refirming', 'sk': 'Živčna mreža so pokazala obetavne rezultate pri ekstrakciji relacij. Najsodobnejši modeli predstavljajo opravilo kot problem od konca do konca, ki se postopoma rešuje z lokalnim razvrščevalnikom. Vendar pa so predhodna dela s statističnimi modeli pokazala, da lahko globalna optimizacija doseže boljše učinkovitosti v primerjavi z lokalno klasifikacijo. Gradimo globalno optimiziran nevronski model za ekstrakcijo relacij od konca do konca, ki predlaga nove funkcije LSTM, da bi se bolje naučili kontekstnih predstavitev. Poleg tega predstavljamo novo metodo integracije sintaktičnih informacij za olajšanje globalnega učenja, vendar zahteva malo ozadja sintaktičnih slovnic in je tako enostavno razširiti. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš predlagani model zelo učinkovit, saj dosega najboljše rezultate na dveh standardnih merilih.', 'he': 'רשתות עצביות הראו תוצאות מבטיחות לחלץ יחסים. מודלים חד-מוקדמים משקיעים את המשימה כבעיה סוף-סוף, נפתרו באופן נוסף באמצעות מסווג מקומי. אך העבודה הקודמת בשימוש בדוגמנים סטטיסטיים הוכחה שאופטימיזציה גלובלית יכולה להשיג ביצועים טובים יותר בהשוואה לקליגציה מקומית. אנו בונים מודל עצבי אופטימי גלובלי לחלץ מערכת יחסים סוף-סוף, מציעים תכונות LSTM חדשות כדי ללמוד יותר מייצגות קונטקסט. בנוסף, אנו מציגים שיטה חדשה לשלוט מידע סינטאקטי כדי להקל ללמוד גלובלי, אך דורשים רקע קטן על גרמטיקות סינטאקטיות כך להיות קל להאריך. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהמודל המוצע שלנו יעיל מאוד, להשיג את ההופעות הטובות ביותר בשני נקודות רמז סטנדרטיים.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin neural sun nuna matsalar masu yi wa'adi wa masu husũma. Modellun-na-sanar sun jẽfa aikin kamar wata shida zuwa ƙari, ya sola yana amfani da wani mai tsari mai lokacin. Yet previous work using statistical models have demonstrated that global optimization can achieve better performances compared to local classification.  Tuna samar da wata motsi mai kyaun neural a duniya, wa cire masu haɗi zuwa ƙari-ƙari, kuma Munã buƙata masu amfani da matsayin LTRM don ya iya amfani da masu tsarin mazaɓa. Da wannan, Munã ƙayyade wata hanyor nowaya dõmin su haɗa information masu haɗiya dõmin ya sauƙa ƙara wa lõkaci na global, kuma amma yana da ɗan bakin bango a kan grammati masu yin syntactic, don haka yana da sauƙi ga shimfiɗa. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu da aka buƙata, yana mai amfani mai girma, kuma ya sami mafiya kyakkyawan aikin da ke kanzu biyu na daidaita.", 'bo': 'དཔུད་རིས་དྲ་བ་ཚོར་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྐྱེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ལ་ཁས་ལེན་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་ཡོད། State-of-the-art model cast the task as a end-to-end problem, solved incrementally using a local classifier. ཡིན་ནའང་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས We build a global optimized neural model for end-to-end relation extraction, proposing new LSTM features in order to better learn context representations. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འཛམ་གླིང་སློབ་ཆེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་འཇུག་གི་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དེ་ཡིན་ནའང་སྦྱར་བ་དེ་རྒྱ Experimental Results show that our proposed model is highly effective, achieving the best performances on two standard benchmarks.'}
{'en': 'KGEval : Accuracy Estimation of Automatically Constructed Knowledge Graphs', 'ar': 'KGEval: تقدير دقة الرسوم البيانية المعرفية التي تم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا', 'fr': 'KGEval\xa0: Estimation de la précision des graphes de connaissances construits automatiquement', 'pt': 'KGEval: Estimativa de Precisão de Gráficos de Conhecimento Construídos Automaticamente', 'es': 'KGeval: Estimación de precisión de gráficos de conocimiento construidos automáticamente', 'ja': 'KGEval:自動構築されたナレッジグラフの精度推定', 'hi': 'KGEval: स्वचालित रूप से निर्मित ज्ञान रेखांकन की सटीकता अनुमान', 'ru': 'KGEval: Оценка точности автоматически построенных графиков знаний', 'zh': 'KGEval:图谱准确性度', 'ga': 'KGEval: Cruinneas a Mheastachán ar Ghraif Eolais a Tógadh go Uathoibríoch', 'el': 'Εκτίμηση ακρίβειας των αυτόματα κατασκευασμένων γραφικών γνώσης', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'KGEval: Automatikusan konstruált tudásgrafok pontossági becslése', 'kk': 'KGEval: Автоматты құрылған білім графикаларының дұрыстығы', 'it': 'KGEval: Stima di precisione dei grafici di conoscenza costruiti automaticamente', 'ms': 'KGEval: Estimasi Ketepatan Graf Pengetahuan Dibangun secara Automatik', 'lt': 'KGEval: Automatiškai sukurtų žinių grafikų tikslumas', 'mt': 'KGEval: Stima tal-eżattezza tal-Graffi tal-Għarfien Kostruiti Awtomatikament', 'mn': 'KGEval: Автоматик бүтээсэн мэдлэг графикийн тодорхойлолт', 'pl': 'KGEval: Dokładność oszacowania automatycznie konstruowanych wykresów wiedzy', 'ro': 'KGEval: Estimarea acurateții graficelor de cunoștințe construite automat', 'sr': 'KGEval: preciznost procjene automatski izgrađenih znanstvenih grafika', 'mk': 'KGEval: Проценка на точноста на автоматски изградени знања', 'ml': 'കെജിവാല്\u200d: സ്വയം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ്സിന്റെ എക്സ്റ്റര്\u200dസി എസ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d', 'no': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'sv': 'KGEval: Exakthetsberäkning av automatiskt konstruerade kunskapsgrafer', 'ta': 'KGEvalGenericName', 'so': 'KGEval: Heshiis Estimation of Automatically Constructed Knowledge Graphs', 'ur': 'GenericName', 'si': 'GenericName', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KGEval: Dự đoán chính xác của đồ hoạ Kiến thức tự động xây dựng', 'bg': 'КГЕвал: Оценка на точността на автоматично изградените графики на знанието', 'hr': 'KGEval: Procjenjivanje preciznosti automatski izgrađenih znanstvenih grafika', 'da': 'KGEval: Nøjagtighedskøn af automatisk konstruerede vidensgrafer', 'nl': 'KGEval: Nauwkeurigheidsschatting van automatisch geconstrueerde kennisgrafieken', 'de': 'KGEval: Genauigkeitsschätzung automatisch konstruierter Wissensgrafiken', 'id': 'KGEval: Perkiraan Ketepian Graf Pengetahuan Dibangun Otomatis', 'sw': 'KGEval: Hesabu ya Hesabu ya Tafsiri zilizojengwa kwa kujitegemea', 'af': 'KGEval: Naakigheid Estimatie van Automaties Konstrueer Kennis Grafies', 'ko': 'KGEval: 지식도를 자동으로 구성하는 정밀도 추정', 'fa': 'Name', 'am': 'KGEval: ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'KGeal: Ավտոմատիկ կառուցված գիտելիքի գրաֆների ճշգրիտ գնահատումը', 'tr': 'Otomatik Yapılan Bilgi Grafiklerinin Dyggat Hesabı', 'sq': 'KGEval: Accuracy Estimation of Automatically Constructed Knowledge Graphs', 'ca': "KGEval: Estimat d'exactitud dels gràfics de coneixement construïts automàticament", 'cs': 'KGEval: Přesnost odhadu automaticky sestavených znalostních grafů', 'az': 'KGEval: Avtomatik Yapılmış Bilim Grafiklərinin doğruluğu', 'bn': 'KGEval: স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নির্মাণ করা জ্ঞান গ্রাফের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গণনা', 'fi': 'KGeval: Automaattisesti rakennettujen tietokaavioiden tarkkuuden arviointi', 'bs': 'KGEval: preciznost procjene automatski izgrađenih znanstvenih grafika', 'et': 'KGeval: Automaatselt ehitatud teadmisgraafikute täpsuse hindamine', 'jv': 'KGEVal:Kemerdekaan Kemerdekaan Suasar', 'sk': 'KGeval: Ocena natančnosti samodejno sestavljenih grafov znanja', 'he': 'KGEval: הערכה מדויקת של גרפי ידע שנבנו באופן אוטומטי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'KGEval རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པའི་ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ངེས་པར་ཐག་ཚོད།'}
{'en': 'Automatic construction of large knowledge graphs (KG) by mining web-scale text datasets has received considerable attention recently. Estimating accuracy of such automatically constructed KGs is a challenging problem due to their size and diversity. This important problem has largely been ignored in prior research   we fill this gap and propose KGEval. KGEval uses coupling constraints to bind facts and crowdsources those few that can infer large parts of the graph. We demonstrate that the objective optimized by KGEval is submodular and NP-hard, allowing guarantees for our approximation algorithm. Through experiments on real-world datasets, we demonstrate that KGEval best estimates KG accuracy compared to other baselines, while requiring significantly lesser number of human evaluations.', 'ar': 'حظي الإنشاء التلقائي لرسومات بيانية معرفية كبيرة (KG) عن طريق التنقيب عن مجموعات بيانات نصية على نطاق الويب باهتمام كبير مؤخرًا. يعد تقدير دقة هذه القيم التي يتم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا مشكلة صعبة نظرًا لحجمها وتنوعها. تم تجاهل هذه المشكلة المهمة إلى حد كبير في البحث السابق - نحن نملأ هذه الفجوة ونقترح KGEval. يستخدم KGEval قيود الاقتران لربط الحقائق وتجميع المصادر القليلة التي يمكنها استنتاج أجزاء كبيرة من الرسم البياني. لقد أثبتنا أن الهدف الذي تم تحسينه بواسطة KGEval هو شبه معياري و NP صعب ، مما يسمح بضمانات لخوارزمية التقريب الخاصة بنا. من خلال التجارب على مجموعات البيانات في العالم الحقيقي ، نوضح أن KGEval أفضل تقدير لدقة KG مقارنة بخطوط الأساس الأخرى ، بينما تتطلب عددًا أقل بكثير من التقييمات البشرية.', 'pt': 'A construção automática de grandes grafos de conhecimento (KG) pela mineração de conjuntos de dados de texto em escala da web tem recebido atenção considerável recentemente. Estimar a precisão de tais KGs construídos automaticamente é um problema desafiador devido ao seu tamanho e diversidade. Este importante problema foi amplamente ignorado em pesquisas anteriores – preenchemos essa lacuna e propomos o KGEval. KGEval usa restrições de acoplamento para vincular fatos e crowdsources aqueles poucos que podem inferir grandes partes do gráfico. Demonstramos que o objetivo otimizado pelo KGEval é submodular e NP-hard, permitindo garantias para nosso algoritmo de aproximação. Por meio de experimentos em conjuntos de dados do mundo real, demonstramos que o KGEval estima melhor a precisão do KG em comparação com outras linhas de base, exigindo um número significativamente menor de avaliações humanas.', 'fr': "La construction automatique de grands graphes de connaissances (KG) par extraction de jeux de données texte à l'échelle du Web a récemment fait l'objet d'une attention considérable. L'estimation de la précision de tels KG construits automatiquement est un problème difficile en raison de leur taille et de leur diversité. Ce problème important a été largement ignoré dans les recherches antérieures — nous comblons cette lacune et proposons KGEval. KGEval utilise des contraintes de couplage pour lier les faits et externaliser les quelques éléments qui peuvent déduire de grandes parties du graphique. Nous démontrons que l'objectif optimisé par KGEval est sous-modulaire et NP-dur, ce qui permet de garantir notre algorithme d'approximation. Grâce à des expériences sur des ensembles de données du monde réel, nous démontrons que KGEval estime au mieux la précision du KG par rapport à d'autres bases de référence, tout en nécessitant un nombre significativement inférieur d'évaluations humaines.", 'es': 'La construcción automática de grandes gráficos de conocimiento (KG) mediante la extracción de conjuntos de datos de texto a escala web ha recibido considerable atención recientemente. La estimación de la precisión de tales KG construidos automáticamente es un problema difícil debido a su tamaño y diversidad. Este importante problema ha sido ignorado en gran medida en investigaciones anteriores: llenamos este vacío y proponemos KGeval. KGeval utiliza restricciones de acoplamiento para vincular los hechos y colabora con aquellos pocos que pueden inferir grandes partes del gráfico. Demostramos que el objetivo optimizado por KGeval es submodular y NP-hard, lo que permite garantías para nuestro algoritmo de aproximación. A través de experimentos en conjuntos de datos del mundo real, demostramos que KGeval estima mejor la precisión de KG en comparación con otras líneas de base, al tiempo que requiere un número significativamente menor de evaluaciones en humanos.', 'ja': 'ウェブスケールのテキストデータセットをマイニングすることによる大規模なナレッジグラフ（ KG ）の自動構築は、最近かなり注目されています。このような自動構築されたＫＧの精度を推定することは、その大きさと多様性のために困難な問題である。この重要な問題は、以前の研究ではほとんど無視されています。このギャップを埋め、KGEvalを提案します。KGEvalはカップリング制約を使用して事実を束縛し、グラフの大きな部分を推論できる少数の事実をクラウドソーシングする。KGEvalによって最適化された目的がサブモジュール的であり、NP - hardであることを実証し、近似アルゴリズムの保証を可能にします。現実のデータセットの実験を通じて、KGEvalが他のベースラインと比較してKG精度を最も推定すると同時に、人間による評価の数が著しく少ないことを実証します。', 'hi': 'खनन वेब-स्केल टेक्स्ट डेटासेट द्वारा बड़े ज्ञान रेखांकन (केजी) के स्वचालित निर्माण ने हाल ही में काफी ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। इस तरह के स्वचालित रूप से निर्मित केजी की सटीकता का अनुमान लगाना उनके आकार और विविधता के कारण एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या है। इस महत्वपूर्ण समस्या को पूर्व अनुसंधान में काफी हद तक नजरअंदाज कर दिया गया है - हम इस अंतर को भरते हैं और केजीईवल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। KGEval तथ्यों और crowdsources को बांधने के लिए युग्मन बाधाओं का उपयोग करता है जो ग्राफ के बड़े हिस्सों का अनुमान लगा सकते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि KGEval द्वारा अनुकूलित उद्देश्य submodular और NP-hard है, जो हमारे सन्निकटन एल्गोरिथ्म के लिए गारंटी देता है। वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि KGEval अन्य बेसलाइन की तुलना में केजी सटीकता का सबसे अच्छा अनुमान लगाता है, जबकि मानव मूल्यांकन की काफी कम संख्या की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ru': 'В последнее время значительное внимание уделяется автоматическому построению больших графов знаний (КГ) путем майнинга текстовых наборов данных веб-масштаба. Оценка точности таких автоматически построенных КГ является сложной проблемой из-за их размера и разнообразия. Эта важная проблема была в значительной степени проигнорирована в предыдущих исследованиях – мы заполняем этот пробел и предлагаем KGEval. KGEval использует ограничения связи для связывания фактов и краудсорсинга тех немногих, которые могут вывести большие части графика. Мы демонстрируем, что цель, оптимизированная KGEval, является субмодульной и NP-твердой, что позволяет гарантировать наш алгоритм аппроксимации. Экспериментируя на реальных наборах данных, мы демонстрируем, что KGEval наилучшим образом оценивает точность КГ по сравнению с другими исходными уровнями, в то же время требуя значительно меньшего количества человеческих оценок.', 'zh': '掘网络文本数据集自构大体图谱(KG)近受大注。 以其大小多样性,度其自构之KG准确性一挑战性也。 要在前论被忽视多矣 - 吾辈补而KGEval之。 KGEval用耦合束绑定事,并众其可推者少也。 吾证KGEval优化者,子模之与NP也,可以保吾近似算法。 以真实世界数集之实验,吾证KGEval比诸基线,计KG准确性最佳,兼须人伦估次数要少得多。', 'ga': 'Le déanaí tugadh aird nach beag ar thógáil uathoibríoch graif mhóra eolais (KG) trí thacair sonraí téacs ar scála gréasáin a mhianadóireacht. Is fadhb dhúshlánach é cruinneas na KGanna sin a thógtar go huathoibríoch a mheas mar gheall ar a méid agus a n-éagsúlacht. Níor tugadh neamhaird don fhadhb thábhachtach seo i dtaighde a rinneadh roimhe seo – líonaimid an bhearna seo agus molaimid KGEval. Úsáideann KGEval srianta cúplála chun fíricí a cheangal agus sluafhoinsiú a dhéanamh ar an mbeagán sin is féidir a bhaint as codanna móra den ghraf. Léirímid go bhfuil an cuspóir optamaithe ag KGEval fomhodúil agus NP-chrua, rud a cheadaíonn ráthaíochtaí dár n-algartam comhfhogasaithe. Trí thurgnaimh ar thacair shonraí an domhain fhíora, léirímid gurb é is fearr a dhéanann KGEval meastachán ar chruinneas KG i gcomparáid le bunlínte eile, agus go dteastaíonn líon i bhfad níos lú meastóireachtaí daonna de ag an am céanna.', 'ka': 'დიდი ცნობიერების გრაფიკების (KG) ავტომატიკური შექმნა ტექსტის მონაცემების ტექსტის შესახებ ახლა აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი მონიშნობა. ასეთი ავტომატურად კონფიგურაციული KGების წარმოდგენება შესაძლებელი პრობლემა იყო მათი ზომის და განსხვავებულობის შესახებ. ეს მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა უფრო მეტი იგნორიურებულია წინ შესწავლობაში - ჩვენ ამ პარამეტრის გადაყენებთ და KGEval-ს მინდომა. Name ჩვენ ევმონსტრაცით, რომ KGEval-ის ऑპტიმიზებული მიზეზი სუბმოულურია და NP-მარტივია, რომელიც დავუძლია დარანტიები ჩვენი ახლოების ალგორტიმს. ექსპერიმენტებით რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე, ჩვენ ევმონსტრებით, რომ KGEval უკეთესი განსაზღვრება KG სხვა ფესოფლიო ხაზებისთვის შედგენა, რო', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη κατασκευή μεγάλων γραφημάτων γνώσης (KG) με την εξόρυξη συνόλων κειμένων σε κλίμακα ιστού έχει λάβει ιδιαίτερη προσοχή πρόσφατα. Η εκτίμηση της ακρίβειας τέτοιων αυτόματα κατασκευασμένων ΚΓ είναι ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα λόγω του μεγέθους και της ποικιλομορφίας τους. Αυτό το σημαντικό πρόβλημα έχει αγνοηθεί σε μεγάλο βαθμό σε προηγούμενες έρευνες και εμείς συμπληρώνουμε αυτό το κενό και προτείνουμε το KGEval. Το KGEval χρησιμοποιεί περιορισμούς ζεύξης για να συνδέσει γεγονότα και πηγές πλήθους που μπορούν να συναγάγουν μεγάλα τμήματα του γραφήματος. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι ο στόχος που βελτιστοποιείται από το KGEval είναι υποδομικός και NP-σκληρός, επιτρέποντας εγγυήσεις για τον αλγόριθμο προσέγγισης μας. Μέσα από πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου, αποδεικνύουμε ότι η KGEval εκτιμά καλύτερα την ακρίβεια KG σε σύγκριση με άλλες γραμμές βάσης, ενώ απαιτεί σημαντικά μικρότερο αριθμό ανθρώπινων αξιολογήσεων.', 'kk': 'Веб- масштабтағы мәтін деректер қорларының автоматты түрде үлкен мәлімет графиктерін (KG) құру жаңа уақытта қарады. Бұл автоматты түрде құрылған KG дұрыстығын бағалау - олардың өлшемі мен әртүрлікті себебі бұл қиын мәселе. Бұл маңызды мәселе алдыңғы зерттеулерде елемейді - біз осы бос орынды толтыру және KGEval дегенді таңдаймыз. Name Біз KGEval- тың оптимизациясының субмодуль және NP- қатты мақсатын көрсетедік. Біздің жақындау алгоритміздің гарантияларына мүмкіндік береді. Шын әлемдегі деректер қорларының тәжірибелері арқылы, KGEval бағалау үшін басқа негізгі жолдармен салыстырып, адамдардың оқиғаларының санын артық керек деп көрсетеді.', 'it': "La costruzione automatica di grandi grafici di conoscenza (KG) mediante estrazione di set di dati testuali su scala web ha ricevuto recentemente notevole attenzione. Stimare l'accuratezza di questi KG costruiti automaticamente è un problema impegnativo a causa della loro dimensione e diversità. Questo importante problema è stato ampiamente ignorato nelle ricerche precedenti - colmiamo questa lacuna e proponiamo KGEval. KGEval utilizza vincoli di accoppiamento per legare fatti e crowdsources quei pochi che possono dedurre grandi parti del grafico. Dimostriamo che l'obiettivo ottimizzato da KGEval è submodulare e NP-hard, consentendo garanzie per il nostro algoritmo di approssimazione. Attraverso esperimenti su set di dati reali, dimostriamo che KGEval stima al meglio l'accuratezza KG rispetto ad altre linee di base, richiedendo un numero significativamente inferiore di valutazioni umane.", 'mk': 'Automatic construction of large knowledge graphs (KG) by mining web-scale text datasets has received considerable attention recently.  Оценувањето на точноста на ваквите автоматски изградени КГ е предизвикувачки проблем поради нивната големина и различност. Овој важен проблем е во голема мера игнориран во претходното истражување - ја пополнуваме оваа празнина и предложуваме KGEval. KGEval ги користи приклучувачките ограничувања за врзување на фактите и изворите на толпата оние мали кои можат да донесат големи делови од графот. Демонстрираме дека целта оптимизирана од KGEval е подмодуларна и NP тешка, овозможувајќи гаранции за нашиот алгоритм за приближување. Through experiments on real-world datasets, we demonstrate that KGEval best estimates KG accuracy compared to other baselines, while requiring significantly lesser number of human evaluations.', 'ms': 'Pembangunan automatik graf pengetahuan besar (KG) dengan perlombongan set data teks skala-web telah menerima perhatian yang besar baru-baru ini. Estimating accuracy of such automatically constructed KGs is a challenging problem due to their size and diversity.  Masalah penting ini telah kebanyakan diabaikan dalam kajian sebelumnya - kita mengisi ruang ini dan melamar KGEval. KGEval menggunakan keterangan sambungan untuk mengikat fakta dan sumber ramai yang sedikit yang boleh menyimpulkan bahagian besar graf. Kami menunjukkan bahawa objektif yang dipotomikan oleh KGEval adalah submodular dan NP-hard, membenarkan jaminan untuk algoritma pendekatan kita. Melalui eksperimen pada set data dunia nyata, kami menunjukkan bahawa KGEval menghargai kebaikan ketepatan KG dibandingkan dengan garis dasar lain, sementara memerlukan bilangan penilaian manusia yang lebih sedikit.', 'ml': 'വെബ്- സ്കേല്\u200d ടെക്സ്കേറ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ചെറുതാക്കി വലിയ അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫുകളുടെ സ്വയം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന ഇങ്ങനെ സ്വയം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട കെജിസിന്റെ തെളിവ് എണ്ണപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് അവരുടെ വലിപ്പം, വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത് ഈ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പഠനത്തില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d അവഗണിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു - ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ വേഗപ്പ ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റിന്റെ വലിയ ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d പെരുമാറ്റാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന കെജിവാല്\u200d സാധനങ്ങള്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും പരിധ കെജെവാലിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വം സബ്മോഡ്മോളിലും NP-കഠിനമാണെന്നും നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, കെജിവാല്\u200d മറ്റുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം കൂടുതല്\u200d കെജിജി ശരിയായ പരിശോ', 'mn': 'Веб-хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангуудын автоматтын томоохон мэдлэг график (KG) үүсгэх нь саяхан анхаарал хангалттай болсон. Тэдгээр автоматаар бүтээгдэхүүний зөв байдлыг тооцоолж байгаа нь хэмжээ, олон янз бүрийн шаардлагатай асуудал юм. Энэ чухал асуудал өмнөх судалгаанд ихэнхдээ анзаарсан. Бид энэ зай дүүрэн KGEval-г санал болгож байна. KGEval графикийн том хэсгүүдийг нийлүүлж чадах жинхэнэ хэсгүүдийг хоорондоо холбох хязгаарыг ашигладаг. Бид KGEval-ын хамгийн гол зорилго нь субмодуль болон NP-хэцүү, ойролцоогоор алгоритмыг гаргах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтаар KGEval-г бусад суурь шулуунтай харьцуулахад хамгийн бага тооцоолж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'Il-kostruzzjoni awtomatika ta’ grafiċi kbar tal-għarfien (KG) permezz ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta tat-test fuq skala tal-internet fil-minjieri riċentement irċeviet attenzjoni konsiderevoli. Estimating accuracy of such automatically constructed KGs is a challenging problem due to their size and diversity.  Din il-problema importanti fil-biċċa l-kbira ġiet injorata fir-riċerka preċedenti - aħna nimlew din id-distakk u nipproponu KGEval. KGEval uses coupling constraints to bind facts and crowdsources those few that can infer large parts of the graph.  We demonstrate that the objective optimized by KGEval is submodular and NP-hard, allowing guarantees for our approximation algorithm.  Through experiments on real-world datasets, we demonstrate that KGEval best estimates KG accuracy compared to other baselines, while requiring significantly lesser number of human evaluations.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna konstrukcja dużych wykresów wiedzy (KG) poprzez wydobycie zbiorów tekstowych w skali sieciowej zyskała ostatnio dużą uwagę. Oszacowanie dokładności takich automatycznie konstruowanych KG jest trudnym problemem ze względu na ich wielkość i różnorodność. Ten ważny problem został w dużej mierze ignorowany we wcześniejszych badaniach i wypełniamy tę lukę i proponujemy KGEval. KGEval używa ograniczeń sprzężania do wiązania faktów i źródeł społecznych tych nielicznych, które mogą wnioskować duże części wykresu. Wykazujemy, że obiekt zoptymalizowany przez KGEval jest submodułowy i NP-twardy, co gwarantuje nasz algorytm aproximacyjny. Poprzez eksperymenty na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazujemy, że KGEval najlepiej ocenia dokładność KG w porównaniu z innymi liniami bazowymi, wymagając jednocześnie znacznie mniejszej liczby ocen ludzkich.', 'ro': 'Construcția automată de grafice de cunoștințe mari (KG) prin extragerea seturilor de date text la scară web a primit recent o atenție considerabilă. Estimarea acurateții unor astfel de KG-uri construite automat reprezintă o problemă provocatoare datorită dimensiunii și diversității acestora. Această problemă importantă a fost ignorată în mare măsură în cercetările anterioare - umplem acest gol și propunem KGEval. KGEval folosește constrângeri de cuplare pentru a lega faptele și crowdsources acele puține care pot deduce părți mari ale graficului. Demonstrăm că obiectivul optimizat de KGEval este submodular și NP-dur, permițând garanții pentru algoritmul nostru de aproximare. Prin experimente pe seturi de date din lumea reală, demonstrăm că KGEval estimează cel mai bine precizia KG comparativ cu alte linii de referință, necesitând în același timp un număr semnificativ mai mic de evaluări umane.', 'no': 'Automatisk konstruksjon av stor kunnskap- grafen (KG) ved å minna nettskala- datasett har nyleg fått mykje oppmerksomhet. Å vurdere nøyaktighet på slike automatisk konstruerte KGs er eit vanskeleg problem på grunn av storleiken og mangfoldet. Dette viktige problemet har mest ignorert i førre forskning. Vi fyller denne mellomrommet og foreslår KGEval. Name Vi demonstrerer at målet som er optimalisert av KGEval er submodular og NP-hardt, som tillater garantiar for tilnærmingsgoritmen vår. Då gjennom eksperimenter på verkeleg datasett, viser vi at KGEval bestemmer KG- nøyaktighet sammenlignet med andre baselinjer, mens det krev mykje mindre antall menneskelige evalueringar.', 'si': 'Name KGs ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය හා විව මේ වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කලින් පරීක්ෂණයේ අවධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ - අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුර Name අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා KGEval විසින් හොඳ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සබ් මොඩියුලර් සහ NP- හරියට, අපේ සම්බන්ධ ඇල ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සේට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණාවක් වලින්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ KGEval විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අනිත් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා අ', 'sr': 'Automatska konstrukcija velikih znanja grafika (KG) podataka za rudarske mreže nedavno je primila značajnu pažnju. Procjenjivanje tačnosti takvih automatski konstruiranih KGs je izazovan problem zbog njihove veličine i raznolikosti. Ovaj važan problem je uglavnom ignorisan u prethodnim istraživanjima - ispunjavamo taj praznik i predlažemo KGEval. KGEval koristi ograničenja povezanja za vezanje činjenica i izvora gužve koje mogu zaraditi velike dijelove grafika. Pokazujemo da je objekt optimiziran od KGEval podmodular i NP-težak, omogućavajući garanciju za naš algoritam približavanja. Kroz eksperimente na setima podataka na stvarnom svijetu, pokazujemo da KGEval najbolje procjenjuje tačnost KG u usporedbi sa drugim osnovnim linijama, dok zahteva značajno manji broj ljudskih procjena.', 'hu': 'Az utóbbi időben jelentős figyelmet kapott a nagy tudásgrafok (KG) automatikus felépítése webes méretű szövegadatok bányászatával. Az ilyen automatikusan felépített KG-k pontosságának becslése kihívást jelent méretük és sokszínűségük miatt. Ezt a fontos problémát nagymértékben figyelmen kívül hagyták a korábbi kutatások során - kitöltjük ezt a hiányt és javasoljuk a KGEval-t. A KGEval összekapcsolási korlátozásokat használ a tények és közösségi források összekapcsolására, amelyek a grafikon nagy részét képesek következtetni. Bemutatjuk, hogy a KGEval által optimalizált célkitűzés szubmoduláris és NP-kemény, ami garantálja a közelítési algoritmusunkat. Valós adatkészleteken végzett kísérletek révén bizonyítjuk, hogy a KGEval a legjobban becsüli a KG pontosságát más referenciavonalakhoz képest, miközben jelentősen kisebb számú emberi értékelést igényel.', 'sv': 'Automatisk konstruktion av stora kunskapsgrafer (KG) genom utvinning av textdataset i webbskala har fått stor uppmärksamhet på senare tid. Att uppskatta noggrannheten hos sådana automatiskt konstruerade KG är ett utmanande problem på grund av deras storlek och mångfald. Detta viktiga problem har till stor del ignorerats i tidigare forskning - vi fyller denna lucka och föreslår KGEval. KGEval använder kopplingsbegränsningar för att binda fakta och crowdsources de få som kan härleda stora delar av grafen. Vi visar att målet optimerat av KGEval är submodulärt och NP-hårt, vilket ger garantier för vår approximationsalgoritm. Genom experiment på verkliga dataset visar vi att KGEval bäst uppskattar KG-noggrannhet jämfört med andra baslinjer, samtidigt som det kräver betydligt mindre antal mänskliga utvärderingar.', 'ta': 'பெரிய அறிவு வரைபடங்களின் தானாகவே உருவாக்கம் இணைய- அளவு உரை தகவல் அமைப்புகள் சமீபத்தில் கவனத்தை பெற்றுள்ளது. இத்தகைய தானியங்கி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேகிஸ்களின் சரியான மதிப்பை கணக்கிடுதல் அவர்களுடைய அளவு மற்றும் பல்வேறு பிரச்னை இந்த முக்கியமான பிரச்சனை முன்னால் ஆராய்ச்சியில் புறக்கணிக்கப்பட்டது - நாம் இந்த இடைவெளி நிரப்பி KGEval பர கேஜிவால் வரைப்படத்தின் பெரிய பகுதிகளை பாதிக்க முடியும் குறைந்த சிறிய காரணிகளை இணைக்க கட்டுப்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத் நாம் கேஜிவால் மூலம் உகப்படுத்தப்பட்ட காரியங்களை காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்பது துணை மூலம் மற்றும் NP-கடினம், நம்முடைய சுருக்கமான ஆல்பர உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் மூலம் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் கேஜிவால் மற்ற அடிப்பகுதிகளுக்கு ஒப்பிடும் சிறந்த சரியான மதிப்பிட', 'lt': 'Automatic construction of large knowledge graphs (KG) by mining web-scale text datasets has received considerable attention recently.  Estimating accuracy of such automatically constructed KGs is a challenging problem due to their size and diversity.  This important problem has largely been ignored in prior research - we fill this gap and propose KGEval.  KGEval uses coupling constraints to bind facts and crowdsources those few that can infer large parts of the graph.  We demonstrate that the objective optimized by KGEval is submodular and NP-hard, allowing guarantees for our approximation algorithm.  Through experiments on real-world datasets, we demonstrate that KGEval best estimates KG accuracy compared to other baselines, while requiring significantly lesser number of human evaluations.', 'so': 'Dhiniinka maamulka aqoonta ee gaarka ah (KG) waxaa ugu dhowaad helay daryeel aad u adag. Qiimeynta saxda KGs oo ay automatic u dhisan tahay waa dhibaato qallafsan tiradooda iyo kala duduwantooda darteed. Dhibaatadan muhiimka ah waxaa loo jeediyey baaritaanka hore - waxaynu buuxinnaa burburka kadibna waxaan soo jeedinayaa KGEval. KGEval wuxuu isticmaalaa xaduudaha la xiriira, si uu u xidho waxyaabaha aad u dhaqdhaqaaqi karto, iyo kuwa yar oo ka fekeri karta sawirka. Waxaynu muujinnaa in waxyaabaha la tijaabiyey KGEval waa mid hoos-modal ah iyo NP-adag, kaas oo u ogolaanaya garashada kalgorithimadeenna ku dhow. Imtixaamo ku saabsan sawirada dunida ee runta ah ayaannu muujinnaa in KGEval si fiican ugu qiimeeyaa saxda KG oo la barbardhiga saldhigyada kale, iyadoo loo baahan yahay in aad ka yar tirada qiimeynta dadka.', 'ur': 'ویب-اسکیل ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعے بڑے علم گراف (KG) کی آٹوٹی بنائی ہے۔ اس طرح کی دقیقیقیت کا ارزش کرنا KGs ان کے اندازے اور مختلف اندازے کے باعث ایک مشکل ہے۔ یہ اہم مسئلہ پہلے کی تحقیقات میں اکثر غفلت کی گئی ہے - ہم اس فضا کو بھر کر KGEval کی پیشنهاد کریں گے۔ Name ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ KGEval کے ذریعہ سے اچھی ترجیح کی موجود زیر موڈولر اور NP-سخت ہے، ہمارے نزدیک آلگوریتم کے لئے гарانتیاں اجازت دیتے ہیں. حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ کے آزمائش کے ذریعے ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ KGEval نے بہترین مطابق KG کو دوسرے بنسٹ لین کے مقابلہ میں مطابق مقابلہ کرتا ہے، حالانکہ انسان کی مطابق بہت کم تعداد کی ضرورت ہے.', 'vi': 'Việc xây dựng tự động các biểu đồ về kiến thức lớn (KG) bằng các tập tin văn bản trên web khai thác đã nhận được rất nhiều chú ý gần đây. Khả năng dự đoán độ chính xác của KG tự động xây dựng là một vấn đề khó khăn do kích thước và đa dạng của chúng. Đây là vấn đề quan trọng đã được bỏ qua trong nghiên cứu trước. Chúng ta lấp đầy khoảng trống này và đề nghị KGeoval. KGEval dùng các thiết bị kết nối để ràng buộc các sự kiện và chứng khoán trong số ít người có thể ngụ ý các phần lớn của đồ thị. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng mục tiêu đã được hiệu chỉnh bởi KGeoval là phụ đề và NPR-cứng, cho phép đảm bảo về thuật toán ước lượng. Bằng các thí nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu thế giới thực, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng Kmval đánh giá cao cao độ chính xác của KG so với các cơ sở khác, trong khi yêu cầu số lượng đánh giá thấp con người.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu muhim muammolar oldin o'rganishda o'zgartirilgan edi - biz bu gap toʻldimiz va KGEval soʻrashmiz. Name We demonstrate that the objective optimized by KGEval is submodular and NP-hard, allowing guarantees for our approximation algorithm.  Mavjud dunyo haqida maʼlumotlar tizimlari orqali biz KGEval boshqa asboblar bilan o'xshash KG haqida o'xshash imkoniyatlarni ko'rsatdik, va juda kichkina inson qiymatlari kerak.", 'nl': "De automatische constructie van grote kennisgrafieken (KG) door het mining van web-scale tekstdatasets heeft de laatste tijd veel aandacht gekregen. Het schatten van de nauwkeurigheid van dergelijke automatisch geconstrueerde KG's is een uitdagend probleem vanwege hun grootte en diversiteit. Dit belangrijke probleem is grotendeels genegeerd in eerdere onderzoeken en we vullen deze kloof en stellen KGEval voor. KGEval gebruikt koppelingsbeperkingen om feiten te binden en crowdsources die weinigen die grote delen van de grafiek kunnen afleiden. We tonen aan dat het door KGEval geoptimaliseerde objectief submodulair en NP-hard is, wat garanties biedt voor ons approximatie algoritme. Door experimenten met real-world datasets laten we zien dat KGEval KG nauwkeurigheid het beste schat in vergelijking met andere baselines, terwijl het aanzienlijk minder aantal menselijke evaluaties vereist.", 'bg': 'Автоматичното изграждане на големи графики на знанието (КГ) чрез добиване на уеб-мащабни текстови набори получи значително внимание напоследък. Оценката на точността на такива автоматично конструирани КГ е предизвикателен проблем поради техния размер и разнообразие. Този важен проблем до голяма степен е пренебрегнат в предишни изследвания - запълваме тази празнота и предлагаме КГЕвал. KGeval използва ограничения за свързване, за да обвърже факти и crowdsources тези малко, които могат да заключат големи части от графиката. Ние демонстрираме, че целта оптимизирана от KGeval е субмодуларна и NP-твърда, което дава гаранции за нашия алгоритъм за приближаване. Чрез експерименти с реални набори от данни, ние демонстрираме, че KGeval най-добре оценява точността на KG в сравнение с други базови линии, като същевременно изисква значително по-малък брой човешки оценки.', 'hr': 'Automatska izgradnja velikih znanja grafika (KG) podataka o rudarskoj mrežnoj skali nedavno je primila značajnu pažnju. Procjenjivanje to čnosti takvih automatski konstruiranih KGs je izazovan problem zbog njihove veličine i raznolikosti. Ovaj važan problem je uglavnom ignoriran u prethodnim istraživanjima - ispunjavamo taj praznik i predlažemo KGEval. KGEval koristi ograničenja povezanja za povezanje činjenica i izvora publike koji mogu inficirati velike dijelove grafika. Pokazujemo da je cilj optimiziran od KGEval podmodular i NP-težak, omogućavajući garancije za naš algoritam približavanja. Kroz eksperimente na podacima realnog svijeta pokazujemo da KGEval najbolje procjenjuje to čnost KG u usporedbi s drugim osnovnim linijama, dok je potrebno značajno manji broj ljudskih procjena.', 'da': "Automatisk opførelse af store vidensgrafer (KG) ved udvinding af tekstdatasæt i webskala har for nylig fået stor opmærksomhed. At estimere nøjagtigheden af sådanne automatisk konstruerede KG'er er et udfordrende problem på grund af deres størrelse og mangfoldighed. Dette vigtige problem er stort set blevet ignoreret i tidligere forskning - vi udfylder dette hul og foreslår KGEval. KGEval bruger koblingsbegrænsninger til at binde fakta og crowdsources de få, der kan udlede store dele af grafen. Vi demonstrerer, at målet optimeret af KGEval er submodulært og NP-hårdt, hvilket giver garantier for vores tilnærmelsesalgoritme. Gennem eksperimenter på virkelige datasæt viser vi, at KGEval bedst estimerer KG nøjagtighed sammenlignet med andre baselines, samtidig med at det kræver betydeligt mindre antal menneskelige evalueringer.", 'id': 'Konstruksi otomatis grafik pengetahuan besar (KG) dengan penambangan dataset teks skala web telah menerima perhatian yang besar baru-baru ini. Perkiraan akurasi KG yang dibuat secara otomatis adalah masalah yang menantang karena ukuran dan diversitas mereka. This important problem has largely been ignored in prior research - we fill this gap and propose KGEval.  KGEval menggunakan batas sambungan untuk mengikat fakta dan sumber masyarakat yang sedikit yang dapat menyimpulkan bagian besar dari grafik. Kami menunjukkan bahwa tujuan yang optimisasi oleh KGEval adalah submodular dan NP-hard, membolehkan jaminan untuk algoritma pendekatan kita. Melalui eksperimen pada set data dunia nyata, kami menunjukkan bahwa KGEval memperkirakan lebih baik akurasi KG dibandingkan dengan garis dasar lainnya, sementara membutuhkan jumlah penilaian manusia yang jauh lebih kecil.', 'de': 'Die automatische Konstruktion von großen Wissensgraphen (KG) durch Mining webbasierter Textdatensätze hat in letzter Zeit große Aufmerksamkeit erfahren. Die Schätzung der Genauigkeit solcher automatisch konstruierten KGs ist aufgrund ihrer Größe und Vielfalt ein herausforderndes Problem. Dieses wichtige Problem wurde in früheren Forschungen weitgehend ignoriert und wir schließen diese Lücke und schlagen KGEval vor. KGEval verwendet Kopplungsbeschränkungen, um Fakten zu binden und Crowdsources diejenigen wenigen, die große Teile des Graphen ableiten können. Wir zeigen, dass das von KGEval optimierte Objektiv submodulär und NP-hart ist, was Garantien für unseren Approximationsalgorithmus ermöglicht. Durch Experimente an realen Datensätzen zeigen wir, dass KGEval die KG-Genauigkeit im Vergleich zu anderen Baselines am besten abschätzt und dabei deutlich weniger menschliche Auswertungen erfordert.', 'sw': 'Ujengaji wa picha kubwa za maarifa (KG) kwa kutumia seti za taarifa za maandishi yenye ubora wa mtandaoni imepokea hisia kubwa hivi karibuni. Kukadiria uhakika wa KGs zilizojengwa automatically ni tatizo la changamoto kutokana na ukubwa na utofauti wao. Tatizo hili muhimu limepuuzwa sana katika utafiti uliopita - tunajaza mapambano haya na tunapendekeza KGEval. KGEval inatumia vikwazo vya kuunganisha viungo vya ukweli na vyanzo vya umma wachache ambao wanaweza kuathiri sehemu kubwa ya picha hiyo. Tunaonyesha kuwa malengo yanayopaswa na KGEval ni vigumu na vigumu vya NP, inaruhusu uhakika wa algorithi yetu ya karibu. Kwa kupitia majaribio ya taarifa za dunia halisi, tunaonyesha kuwa KGEval anakadiria kuwa KG ni sahihi zaidi na misingi mengine, wakati tunahitaji kiasi kidogo cha uchunguzi wa tathmini za binadamu.', 'ko': '네트워크 규모를 발굴한 텍스트 데이터 세트를 통해 대형지식도(KG)를 자동으로 구축하는 것이 최근 수년간 폭넓은 관심을 받았다.자동적으로 구축된 KG의 크기와 다양성 때문에 그 정확성을 추정하는 것은 도전적인 문제다.이전 연구에서 이 중요한 문제는 어느 정도 무시되었다. 우리는 이 공백을 메우고 KGEval을 제기했다.KGEval은 결합 구속을 사용하여 사실을 바인딩하고 그림의 대부분을 추정할 수 있는 소수의 사람들을 패키지로 구성합니다.KGEval 최적화의 목표는 서브모드와 NP가 어렵다는 것을 증명했고 이것은 우리의 근사 알고리즘에 보증을 제공했다.실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험을 통해 우리는 KGEval이 다른 기선보다 KG의 정확도를 더 잘 평가하고 필요한 인공 평가 수량이 훨씬 적다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'ساختن اخیراً توجه بسیار زیادی از گراف\u200cهای دانش بزرگ (KG) با توجه کردن مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مقیاس وب به ذخیره رسید. تقریباً دقیقات چنین KGs ساخته شده به طور خودکار یک مشکل سختی به دلیل اندازه و تنوع آنها است. این مشکل مهم بیشتر در تحقیقات قبلی نادیده گرفته شده است - ما این فاصله را پر می کنیم و KGEval را پیشنهاد می کنیم. Name ما نشان می دهیم که هدف بهترین توسط KGEval زیر modular و NP سخت است، که اجازه می دهد برای الگوریتم نزدیک ما تضمین دهد. از طریق آزمایش\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی، نشان می\u200cدهیم که KGEval بهترین تقدیر دقیق KG را در مقایسه با دیگر خط\u200cهای بنیادی مقایسه می\u200cکند، در حالی که نیاز به تعداد ارزیابی انسانی بسیار کمتر است.', 'af': "Outomatiese konstruksie van groot kennis grafieke (KG) deur die mining van web- scale teks datastelle het onlangs aandagbaar aandag ontvang. Estimateer presies van sodanige automaties konstrukteer Kgs is 'n pragtige probleem vanweë hul grootte en verskeidigheid. Hierdie belangrike probleem is groot geïgnoreer in voorheede ondersoek - ons vul hierdie afstand en voorstel KGEval. Name Ons wys dat die doel wat deur KGEval optimaliseer is is submodular en NP- harde, toelaat garanties vir ons toekoms algoritme. Deur eksperimente op reël- wêreld datastelle, wys ons dat KGEval die beste estimatie van Kg regverdigheid vergelyk met ander basisline, terwyl ons betekenlik minder aantal menslike evaluerings benodig.", 'hy': 'Վերջերս մեծ գիտելիքների գրաֆիկների (KG) ավտոմատիկ կառուցվածքը ինտեքստի տեքստի համակարգերի միջոցով շատ ուշադրություն է ստացել: Այսպիսի ավտոմատ կառուցված KG-ների ճշմարտության գնահատումը դժվար խնդիր է նրանց չափի և բազմազանության պատճառով: This important problem has largely been ignored in prior research - we fill this gap and propose KGEval.  KGeal- ն օգտագործում է զուգահեռ սահմանափակումներ փաստերի և ժողովրդի կապելու համար այն փոքրերը, որոնք կարող են գրաֆիկի մեծ մասեր անել: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ KGeva-ի կողմից օպտիմացված օբյեկտիվացման նպատակը ենթամոդուլյար է և ՆՊ-ով բարդ, թույլ տալով երաշխավորություններ մեր մոտեցման ալգորիթմի համար: Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումների միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ KGeva-ը լավագույնն է գնահատում KG ճշգրտությունը համեմատած այլ հիմնական գծերի հետ, միաժամանակ պահանջում է մարդկային գնահատականների շատ ավելի քիչ քանակը:', 'tr': "Ullakan bilgi grafiklerini (KG) ahyrlaň web kalamlarnyň metin tertibleri bilen oňa üns berilýär. KG'iň öz-özünden inşa edilen ýaly takyklyklaryň dogrylygyny çaklamak, ululyklary we näçeşitlikleriň sebäbi kynçylyk meseledir. Öňki araştyrmalarda bu wajyp mesele ýok edildi - biz bu boşluky dolduryp KGEval'y teklip edýäris. KGEval faýllary baglamak üçin birnäçe bölümleri grafikiň uly bölümlerini azaltyp biljek kiçi kiçi bölümleri baglamak üçin hasarlamak üçin çarpyşlygyny ulanýar. KGEval tarapyndan optimizlənen maksadyň submodular we NP-kyn düzüldigini görkezýäris. KGEval tarapyndan golaýlaşyk üçin garantilere mümkin edýäris. Gerçek dünýädäki veri setirlerinde experimentalar bilen KGEval'iň gowy görnüşi KG'iň dogrylygyny başga üýtgeliklere görä deňleýär we adamlaryň deňleşmeleriniň has az sanyny gerek bolýar.", 'sq': 'Ndërtimi automatik i grafikave të mëdha të njohurive (KG) nga miniera e të dhënave teksti në skalë web ka marrë vëmendje të konsiderueshme kohët e fundit. Vlerësimi i saktësisë së KG të tilla të ndërtuara automatikisht është një problem sfidues për shkak të madhësisë dhe diversitetit të tyre. Ky problem i rëndësishëm është injoruar kryesisht në kërkimet e mëparshme - ne e mbushim këtë boshllëk dhe propozojmë KGEval. KGEval përdorë kufizime të lidhjes për të lidhur fakte dhe burime publike ato pak që mund të përfshijnë pjesë të mëdha të grafikut. Ne demonstrojmë se objektivi optimizuar nga KGEval është nënmodular dhe NP-hard, duke lejuar garanci për algoritmin tonë të afërsisë. Nëpërmjet eksperimenteve në grupet e të dhënave të botës reale, ne demonstrojmë se KGEval vlerëson më së miri saktësinë e KG krahasuar me linjat e tjera bazë, duke kërkuar numër më të vogël vlerësimesh njerëzore.', 'bs': 'Automatska konstrukcija velikih znanja grafika (KG) podataka o rudarskoj mrežnoj skali nedavno je primila značajnu pažnju. Procjenjivanje preciznosti takvih automatski konstruiranih KGs je izazovan problem zbog njihove veličine i raznolikosti. Ovaj važan problem je uglavnom ignoriran u prethodnim istraživanjima - ispunjavamo taj praznik i predlažemo KGEval. KGEval koristi ograničenja povezanja za vezivanje činjenica i izvora publike one koji mogu inficirati velike dijelove grafika. Pokazujemo da je objekt optimiziran od KGEval podmodular i NP-težak, omogućavajući garancije za naš algoritam približavanja. Kroz eksperimente na podacima realnog svijeta, pokazujemo da KGEval najbolje procjenjuje tačnost KG u usporedbi sa drugim osnovnim linijama, dok je potrebno značajno manji broj ljudskih procjena.', 'bn': 'ওয়েব-স্কেল টেক্সট ডাটাসেট মিনিয়ে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিশাল জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ (কে. জি) নির্মাণ করার মাধ্যমে স্বয়ং Estimating accuracy of such automatically constructed KGs is a challenging problem due to their size and diversity.  এই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সমস্যাটি আগে গবেষণায় উপেক্ষা করা হয়েছে- আমরা এই বিভ্রান্তি পূরণ করি এবং কেজেভালের প্রস্তাব করি। কেজিভাল এই গ্রাফের বিশাল অংশের আক্রান্ত কিছু অংশ বাধা দিতে পারে যে সমস্ত বাস্তবতা বানানোর জন্য কেজিভাল ব্যবহার আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কেজেভালের উদ্দেশ্য সাবমোডুয়াল এবং এনপি-কঠিন, যা আমাদের ক্ষেত্রে আলগরিদমের জন্য নিশ্চিত। বাস্তব বিশ্বের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে কেজেভাল অন্যান্য বেসাইনের তুলনায় কেজি সঠিকভাবে গণনা করেছে, যেখানে মান', 'ca': "Automatic construction of large knowledge graphs (KG) by mining web-scale text datasets has received considerable attention recently.  Estimar la precisió d'aquests KG construïts automàticament és un problem a difícil degut a la seva mida i diversitat. Aquest problema important s'ha ignorat en gran part en recerca anterior - omplem aquest buit i proposem KGEval. KGEval utilitza restriccions d'acoplament per acoplar fets i fonts de multitud aquells pocs que poden deduir grans parts del gràfic. Demostram que l'objectiu optimitzat per KGEval és submodular i NP dur, permetent garanties per al nostre algoritme d'aproximació. Amb experiments en conjunts de dades del món real, demostram que KGEval estima millor la precisió de KG en comparació amb altres línies de base, mentre requereix un nombre significativament menys d'evaluacions humanes.", 'et': 'Suurte teadmisgraafikute (KG) automaatne ehitamine veebimõõtmeliste tekstiandmekogumite kaevandamise abil on viimasel ajal saanud märkimisväärset tähelepanu. Selliste automaatselt ehitatud KGide täpsuse hindamine on nende suuruse ja mitmekesisuse tõttu keeruline probleem. Seda olulist probleemi on varasemates uuringutes suures osas ignoreeritud - me täidame selle lünka ja pakume KGevali ettepanekut. KGeval kasutab sidumispiiranguid faktide sidumiseks ja rahvahulgaallikate sidumiseks neid väheseid, mis suudavad järeldada suuri osa graafikust. Näitame, et KGevali poolt optimeeritud eesmärk on submodulaarne ja NP-kõva, võimaldades tagatisi meie lähenemisalgoritmile. Reaalmaailma andmekogumitega tehtavate katsete abil näitame, et KGeval hindab KGE täpsust kõige paremini võrreldes teiste lähtejoontega, nõudes samas oluliselt vähem inimeste hinnanguid.', 'fi': 'Suurten tietograafien (KG) automaattinen rakentaminen web-mittakaavan tekstiaineistojen louhintaan on viime aikoina saanut huomattavaa huomiota. Automaattisesti rakennettujen KG:iden tarkkuuden arviointi on haastava ongelma niiden koon ja monimuotoisuuden vuoksi. Tämä tärkeä ongelma on suurelta osin jätetty huomiotta aiemmissa tutkimuksissa - me täytämme tämän aukon ja ehdotamme KGevalia. KGeval käyttää kytkentärajoituksia sitoakseen faktoja ja joukkolähteitä niitä harvoja, jotka voivat päätellä suuria osia kaaviosta. Osoitamme, että KGevalin optimoima tavoite on alimodulaarinen ja NP-kova, mikä antaa takeet lähentämisalgoritmillemme. Reaalimaailman tietoaineistoilla tehtyjen kokeiden avulla osoitamme KGevalin arvioivan KGevalin parhaiten KG:n tarkkuuden muihin perusviivoihin verrattuna, mutta vaatii huomattavasti vähemmän ihmisarviointeja.', 'am': 'የድምፅ ምርጫዎች እንደዚህ የKGs አውቶማዊ ግንኙነት ለመቆጣጠር መጠን እና ልዩ ልዩነት ምክንያት የጭንቀት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ይህ አስቀድሞ ትምህርት ላይ የተለየ መከራ ነው - ይህንን ክፍል እናሞላታለን KGEval እናሳልጋለን፡፡ KGEval ውነቶችን እና የህዝብ ጉዳይ ማሰራጠር የሚችሉትን ጥቂቶች የክፍል ክፍሎች የሚያሳስቡ ናቸው፡፡ የKGEval አካባቢ መሆኑን እና የNP አካባቢ ነው፡፡ እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዎችን በመፈተና፣ KGEval ከሌሎቹ መሠረት ጋር KG እርግጠኛ እንዲቆጠር እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'az': "İnternet ölçüsü məlumat qurmaqları ilə böyük bilgi grafiklərinin (KG) avtomatik inşaatı son zamanlarda çox gözəl məlumat alındı. Bu qədər avtomatik inşa edilmiş KG'lərin doğruluğunu təmin etmək onların böyüklüyü və müxtəlifliyi üzündən çətin bir problemdir. Bu möhüm problemi daha çox əvvəlki araştırmalarda ignore edildi - biz bu boşluğu doldurur və KGEval təklif edirik. Name Biz KGEval tarafından optimizləndirilən məqsəd submodular və NP-də çətin olduğunu göstəririk. Yaxınlaşdırma algoritmi üçün garantilərə izin verir. Gerçek dünya verilənlərin qurğuları ilə sınaqlar vasitəsilə KGEval'in digər əsas səhifələrlə qarşılaşdığı qədər ədaləti KG'nin daha azı hesablamasını göstərdik.", 'cs': 'Automatická konstrukce velkých znalostních grafů (KG) těžbou textových souborů v webovém měřítku se v poslední době věnovala značné pozornosti. Odhad přesnosti takových automaticky konstruovaných KG je vzhledem k jejich velikosti a rozmanitosti náročným problémem. Tento důležitý problém byl do značné míry ignorován v předchozím výzkumu, protože tuto mezeru vyplníme a navrhujeme KGEval. KGEval používá omezení vazby k vazbě faktů a crowdsources těch málo, které mohou odvodit velké části grafu. Dokazujeme, že objektiv optimalizovaný KGEvalem je submodulární a NP-tvrdý, což umožňuje záruku pro náš aproximacní algoritmus. Prostřednictvím experimentů na reálných datových sadách ukazujeme, že KGEval nejlépe odhaduje KG přesnost ve srovnání s ostatními základními liniemi, přičemž vyžaduje výrazně menší počet lidských hodnocení.', 'sk': 'Avtomatsko gradnjo velikih grafov znanja (KG) z rudarjenjem spletnih besedilnih naborov podatkov je v zadnjem času prejelo veliko pozornosti. Ocenjevanje natančnosti takšnih samodejno zgrajenih KG je zaradi njihove velikosti in raznolikosti zahteven problem. Ta pomembna težava je bila v preteklih raziskavah večinoma ignorirana - to vrzel zapolnimo in predlagamo KGeval. KGeval uporablja omejitve povezovanja za vezavo dejstev in množičnih virov tistih malih, ki lahko sklepajo velike dele grafa. Dokazujemo, da je cilj optimiziran s strani KGevala submodularen in NP-trd, kar omogoča jamstva za naš algoritem približevanja. Z eksperimenti na resničnih podatkovnih nizih dokazujemo, da KGeval najbolje ocenjuje natančnost KG v primerjavi z drugimi osnovnimi linijami, hkrati pa zahteva bistveno manjše število človeških ocen.', 'jv': 'Text Tulung kanggo ngilangno nganggo cah-cah sing automatik iki KGs kuwi nggawe botem sing apik tur ayu cah dumadhi iki banget Aspect ratio KDE Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasai bener kanggo KGEVal iki dadi module karo NP-karti, iso nggawe garantasi kanggo kelompok algorim dhéwé Ato sing perbudhakan kanggo dataset sing gagal-uwong, kéné ngomongke tindakan KGEVal dadi sing paling nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang dhéwé, terus nyimpen langgar nganggo perbudhakan uwong sing paling dhéwé.', 'he': 'בנייה אוטומטית של גרפי ידע גדולים (KG) על ידי מינוי מסמכים טקסט ברשת מינוי קיבל תשומת לב משמעותית לאחרונה. Estimating accuracy of such automatically constructed KGs is a challenging problem due to their size and diversity.  בעיה חשובה זו התעלמה בעיקר במחקר קודם - אנחנו ממלאים את הפער הזה ומציעים KGEval. KGEval משתמש באמצעות מחויבות קשר כדי לקשור עובדות ומקורות קהל אלה מעטים שיכולים למצוא חלקים גדולים של הגרף. אנו מראים שהאובייקטיבי המאופטימיזם על ידי KGEval הוא תחת-מודל ו NP קשה, מאפשר הבטחות לאלגוריתם התקרב שלנו. באמצעות ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי, אנו מראים כי KGEval מעריך הכי טוב את מדויקת KG בהשוואה לקווים הבסיסים אחרים, בזמן שדורשים מספר הרבה פחות של הערכות אנושיות.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Ki ƙaddara tsarin wannan KGs' an gina farat ɗaya, yana da wata masĩfa mai tsanani kan haske da girma da tsurance. @ info: whatsthis KGEV yana amfani da yin haɗi da tsaro dõmin a binde fakta da kilowan umarni masu ƙaranci kaɗan da ke iya ƙaranci girma na grafi. We demonstrate that the objective optimized by KGEval is submodular and NP-hard, allowing guarantees for our approximation algorithm.  Ko bayan jarrabo a kan data masu cikin dũniya masu gaskiya, za mu nuna KGEV yana ƙidãya mafi kyauta KG'a da tsarin, da misãlin misalin wasu basuɗe, kuma yana da kashin da ke ƙaranci ƙidãyayar mutum.", 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མང་པོ(KG)དེ་ནས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཟོ་བརྩིས་ཡོད་པའི་KGs་གི་བདེ་བསམ་ཚད་ནི་ཁོ་ཚོའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་དཀའ གལ་ཆེན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་སྔོན་གྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནང་དུ་སྣང་མེད་བཞག KGEval ཡིས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ཐོག་ཁྲམ་དག་གི་ལྡོག་ཕུད་སྒྲིག་མཁན་ཚུ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གཅིག་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་KGEval ཡི་ལས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་NP-ཐག་པོ་ཡིན་པ་ལ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན། KGEval་གིས་གནད་གནད་གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡ'}
{'en': 'Sparsity and Noise : Where Knowledge Graph Embeddings Fall Short', 'ar': 'التباين والضوضاء: حيث تقصر عمليات تضمين الرسم البياني المعرفي', 'pt': 'Espasidade e ruído: onde as incorporações do gráfico de conhecimento ficam aquém', 'fr': 'Sparsity and Noise\xa0: là où les intégrations des graphes de connaissances sont insuffisantes', 'es': 'Dispersión y ruido: donde las incorporaciones de Knowledge Graph se quedan cortas', 'ja': '希少性と騒音：ナレッジグラフの埋め込みが短い場所', 'ru': 'Редкость и шум: где вложения графа знаний оказываются короткими', 'ga': 'Teimhneacht agus Torann: An Áit a dTiteann Leabú Grafa Eolais gairid', 'zh': '疏性与噪声:知图谱嵌不足', 'hi': 'Sparsity और शोर: जहां ज्ञान ग्राफ एम्बेडिंग कम हो जाते हैं', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Gyorsaság és zaj: ahol a tudásgraf beágyazása rövid', 'el': 'Σπανιότητα και θόρυβος: Εκεί που οι ενσωμάτωση γραφικών γνώσεων υπολείπονται', 'it': 'Sparsità e rumore: dove le incorporazioni dei grafici della conoscenza sono corte', 'kk': 'Кеңіл мен дыбыс: Білім графикалық ендірулері қайда қысқартылып келеді', 'lt': 'Spartumas ir triukšmas: kai žinių grafikos įrangos mažėja', 'mk': 'Брзина и бучава: Каде знаењето графички вградувања се кратки', 'ms': 'Sparsity and Noise: Where Knowledge Graph Embeddings Fall Short', 'mt': 'L-isparsità u l-istorbju: Fejn l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-Grafika tal-Għarfien jaqgħu qasir', 'ml': 'സ്പാര്\u200dസിറ്റിയും നോസും എവിടെയാണ് അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d വീഴുന്നത് ചെറുതാണ്', 'mn': 'Хаана мэдлэг график нэвтрүүлэлт богино', 'no': 'Kort mellomrom og støy: Kor innbygging av kjennomgrafikk fallar kort', 'pl': 'Oszczędność i hałas: Gdzie wbudowania wykresów wiedzy są niedobre', 'sr': 'Sparsity i Glas: Gde se ukljuèenje znanstvenih grafa kratko pada', 'ro': 'Sparsitate și zgomot: în cazul în care încorporarea graficului cunoștințelor se scurtează', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Iswidishka iyo noocyada: Meel aqoonta Graph Fall Short', 'ta': 'இடைவெளி மற்றும் குறிப்பு: Where Knowledge Graph Embedding Fall Short', 'sv': 'Sparsity och brus: Där kunskapsgrafens inbäddningar faller kort', 'ur': 'جہاں علم گراف جمع کئے گئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tâm trang và nhiễu: Nơi thao tác đồ họa có thể rơi ngắn', 'bg': 'Спасителност и шум: Където вгражданията на графиката на знанието падат къси', 'da': 'Sparsitet og støj: Hvor viden Graph Embeddings falder kort', 'hr': 'Sparsty i Glas: Gdje se uključenje grafika znanja kratko pada', 'nl': 'Sparsity and Noise: Waar kennisgrafiekembeddings tekortschieten', 'de': 'Sparsity and Noise: Wo Knowledge Graph Embeddings zu kurz kommen', 'ko': '희소성과 소음: 지식도 삽입의 부족한 점', 'id': 'Kecepatan dan Kebisingan: Dimana Pengetahuan Graf Jatuh Pendek', 'fa': 'گسترش و صدا: جایی که پیوند گراف دانش کوتاه می\u200cشود', 'sw': 'Uhispania na Noise: Where Knowledge Graph', 'af': 'Sparsiteit en ruis: Waar kennis Grafie Inhoudings Kolt val', 'tr': '=', 'sq': 'Shpejtësia dhe zhurma: Ku përfshirjet e grafikut të njohurive bien të shkurtra', 'am': 'Where Known Graph Embeds Fall Short', 'az': 'Süpürlük və səs: Bilim Grafiklərinin İfadələri Kısa düşər', 'hy': 'Շարունակությունը և աղմուկը. Որտեղ գիտելիքի գրաֆիկները դառնում են կարճ', 'bn': 'স্প্যারাসিটি এবং নোজ: কোথায় জ্ঞান গ্রাফ এমবেডিং পতনের সংক্ষিপ্ত', 'bs': 'Sparsty i Glas: Gdje se uključenje grafika znanja kratko pada', 'ca': 'Spartitat i Brut: On Knowledge Graph Embeddings Fall Short', 'cs': 'Šetrnost a hluk: Kde vkládání znalostních grafů nedostatek', 'fi': 'Sparsity and Noise: Where Knowledge Graph Embeddings Fall Short', 'et': 'Vähesus ja müra: kus teadmisgraafiku manustamine on lühike', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects', 'he': 'המהירות והרעש: איפה שטפי ידע מתקצרים', 'sk': 'Redkost in hrup: kjer so vdelave grafikona znanja kratke', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Sparsity and Noise: Where Knowledge Graph Embeddings Fall Short'}
{'en': 'Knowledge graph (KG) embedding techniques use structured relationships between entities to learn low-dimensional representations of entities and relations. One prominent goal of these approaches is to improve the quality of knowledge graphs by removing errors and adding missing facts. Surprisingly, most embedding techniques have been evaluated on benchmark datasets consisting of dense and reliable subsets of human-curated KGs, which tend to be fairly complete and have few errors. In this paper, we consider the problem of applying embedding techniques to KGs extracted from text, which are often incomplete and contain errors. We compare the sparsity and unreliability of different KGs and perform empirical experiments demonstrating how embedding approaches degrade as sparsity and unreliability increase.', 'ar': 'تستخدم تقنيات تضمين الرسم البياني للمعرفة (KG) العلاقات المنظمة بين الكيانات لتعلم التمثيلات منخفضة الأبعاد للكيانات والعلاقات. أحد الأهداف البارزة لهذه الأساليب هو تحسين جودة الرسوم البيانية المعرفية عن طريق إزالة الأخطاء وإضافة الحقائق المفقودة. من المثير للدهشة أن معظم تقنيات التضمين قد تم تقييمها على مجموعات بيانات معيارية تتكون من مجموعات فرعية كثيفة وموثوقة من KGs المنسق بها الإنسان ، والتي تميل إلى أن تكون كاملة إلى حد ما وتحتوي على القليل من الأخطاء. في هذا البحث ، نأخذ في الاعتبار مشكلة تطبيق تقنيات التضمين على KGs المستخرجة من النص ، والتي غالبًا ما تكون غير مكتملة وتحتوي على أخطاء. نحن نقارن التباين وعدم الموثوقية في KGs المختلفة ونجري تجارب تجريبية توضح كيف تتدهور مناهج التضمين مع زيادة التباين وعدم الموثوقية.', 'pt': 'As técnicas de incorporação de gráficos de conhecimento (KG) usam relacionamentos estruturados entre entidades para aprender representações de baixa dimensão de entidades e relações. Um objetivo proeminente dessas abordagens é melhorar a qualidade dos gráficos de conhecimento, removendo erros e adicionando fatos ausentes. Surpreendentemente, a maioria das técnicas de incorporação foi avaliada em conjuntos de dados de referência que consistem em subconjuntos densos e confiáveis de KGs curados por humanos, que tendem a ser bastante completos e com poucos erros. Neste artigo, consideramos o problema de aplicar técnicas de embedding a KGs extraídos de texto, que muitas vezes estão incompletos e contêm erros. Comparamos a dispersão e a falta de confiabilidade de diferentes KGs e realizamos experimentos empíricos demonstrando como as abordagens de incorporação se degradam à medida que a dispersão e a falta de confiabilidade aumentam.', 'fr': "Les techniques d'intégration de Knowledge Graph (KG) utilisent des relations structurées entre des entités pour apprendre des représentations de faible dimension d'entités et de relations. L'un des principaux objectifs de ces approches est d'améliorer la qualité des graphiques de connaissances en supprimant les erreurs et en ajoutant des faits manquants. Étonnamment, la plupart des techniques d'intégration ont été évaluées sur des ensembles de données de référence constitués de sous-ensembles denses et fiables de KG gérés par l'homme, qui ont tendance à être assez complets et comportent peu d'erreurs. Dans cet article, nous examinons le problème de l'application de techniques d'intégration à des KG extraits de texte, qui sont souvent incomplets et contiennent des erreurs. Nous comparons la parcimonie et le manque de fiabilité de différents KG et réalisons des expériences empiriques démontrant comment les approches d'intégration se dégradent à mesure que la parcimonie et le manque de fiabilité augmentent.", 'es': 'Las técnicas de incorporación de gráficos de conocimiento (KG) utilizan relaciones estructuradas entre entidades para aprender representaciones de baja dimensión de entidades y relaciones. Un objetivo destacado de estos enfoques es mejorar la calidad de los gráficos de conocimiento mediante la eliminación de errores y la adición de datos faltantes. Sorprendentemente, la mayoría de las técnicas de incrustación se han evaluado en conjuntos de datos de referencia que consisten en subconjuntos densos y confiables de KG curados por humanos, que tienden a ser bastante completos y tienen pocos errores. En este artículo, consideramos el problema de aplicar técnicas de incrustación a los KG extraídos del texto, que a menudo son incompletos y contienen errores. Comparamos la dispersión y la falta de confiabilidad de diferentes KG y realizamos experimentos empíricos que demuestran cómo los enfoques de incrustación se degradan a medida que aumentan la dispersión y la falta de confiabilidad.', 'ja': 'ナレッジグラフ（ KG ）埋め込み技術は、エンティティとリレーションシップの低次元表現を学習するためにエンティティ間の構造化されたリレーションシップを使用します。これらのアプローチの顕著な目標の1つは、誤りを除去し、欠落している事実を追加することによって、ナレッジグラフの品質を向上させることです。驚くべきことに、ほとんどの埋め込み技術は、かなり完全であり、エラーが少ない傾向にある、ヒトがキュレーションしたＫＧの密度が高く信頼性の高いサブセットからなるベンチマークデータセットで評価されている。本稿では、テキストから抽出されたKGに埋め込み技術を適用する際の問題について考察し、不完全で誤りが含まれていることが多い。我々は、異なるKGの希少性および信頼性を比較し、希少性および信頼性が増加するにつれて埋め込みアプローチがどのように分解されるかを実証する実証実験を実施する。', 'ru': 'Методы внедрения графа знаний (KG) используют структурированные отношения между сущностями для изучения низкоразмерных представлений сущностей и отношений. Одна из важных целей этих подходов заключается в повышении качества диаграмм знаний путем устранения ошибок и добавления недостающих фактов. Удивительно, но большинство методов встраивания были оценены на основе эталонных наборов данных, состоящих из плотных и надежных подмножеств КГ, курированных человеком, которые, как правило, являются достаточно полными и имеют мало ошибок. В данной работе рассмотрена проблема применения методов встраивания к КГ, извлеченным из текста, которые часто являются неполными и содержат ошибки. Мы сравниваем редкость и ненадежность различных КГ и проводим эмпирические эксперименты, демонстрирующие, как подходы к внедрению ухудшаются по мере увеличения редкости и ненадежности.', 'ga': 'Úsáideann teicníochtaí leabú graf eolais (KG) caidrimh struchtúrtha idir eintitis chun léirithe ísealtoiseacha aonáin agus caidrimh a fhoghlaim. Sprioc shuntasach amháin de na cineálacha cur chuige seo is ea cáilíocht ghraif an eolais a fheabhsú trí earráidí a bhaint agus fíricí atá in easnamh a chur leis. Is ionadh é, rinneadh meastóireacht ar fhormhór na dteicnící neadaithe ar thacair thacair thacair ina bhfuil fo-thacair dlúth agus iontaofa de KGanna daonna-choimeádta, a mbíonn claonadh acu a bheith measartha iomlán agus nach bhfuil mórán earráidí acu. Sa pháipéar seo, breithnímid an fhadhb a bhaineann le teicnící leabaithe a chur i bhfeidhm ar KGanna a bhaintear as téacs, a bhíonn go minic neamhiomlán agus ina bhfuil earráidí. Déanaimid comparáid idir teimhneacht agus neamhiontaofacht KGanna éagsúla agus déanaimid turgnaimh eimpíreacha a thaispeánann conas a dhíghrádaíonn cur chuige leabú de réir mar a mhéadaíonn teimhneacht agus neamhiontaofacht.', 'hi': 'नॉलेज ग्राफ (केजी) एम्बेडिंग तकनीकें संस्थाओं और संबंधों के कम-आयामी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए संस्थाओं के बीच संरचित संबंधों का उपयोग करती हैं। इन दृष्टिकोणों का एक प्रमुख लक्ष्य त्रुटियों को हटाकर और लापता तथ्यों को जोड़कर ज्ञान ग्राफ़ की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करना है। हैरानी की बात है, अधिकांश एम्बेडिंग तकनीकों का मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर किया गया है जिसमें मानव-क्यूरेटेड केजी के घने और विश्वसनीय सबसेट शामिल हैं, जो काफी पूर्ण होते हैं और कुछ त्रुटियां होती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम पाठ से निकाले गए केजी में एम्बेडिंग तकनीकों को लागू करने की समस्या पर विचार करते हैं, जो अक्सर अधूरे होते हैं और त्रुटियां होती हैं। हम विभिन्न केजी की sparsity और अविश्वसनीयता की तुलना करते हैं और अनुभवजन्य प्रयोगों का प्रदर्शन करते हैं कि कैसे एम्बेडिंग दृष्टिकोण sparsity और अविश्वसनीयता में वृद्धि के रूप में नीचा दिखाते हैं।', 'zh': '知图谱(KG)用实体之结构化,以学实体之低维。 此其所以明知图谱之实也。 可讶者,多嵌术皆准集上评之,集由人谋之KG密可恃者,往往全而几无过也。 于本文之中,思将嵌术取KG于文本,KG常不完而包误也。 余校其疏KG与不可靠性,实验其实证,证其随疏不可靠性增而退化。', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების გრაფიკა (KG) ტექნოგიები გამოყენებენ სტრუქტურებული პირობები ელექნეტების შორის, რომ ვისწავლოთ ცოტა განზომილებების და პირობების გამოყენება. ერთი მნიშვნელოვანი მიზეზი ამ გადაწყვეტილების უფრო უფრო მეცნიერების გრაფიკების კაalitეტის გაუქმება, შეცდომის წაშლად და დამატებით გამოკლებული ფაქტის და სხვადასხვა, უფრო მეტი შემოწყვეტილი ტექნოგიები ბენქმარკური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში შექმნა, რომლებიც ადამიანის კონფიგურაციული კონფიგურაციის ძალიან დარწმუნებული და დარწმუნებელ ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ პრობლემა, რომელიც ტექსტიდან გამოყენებული KGs ტექსტიდან გამოყენებული ტექსტის გამოყენება, რომელიც ბევრად არაფერი და შეცდომის შეცდომა. ჩვენ განსხვავებული KGs-ის დამწყვეტილება და დაუწყვეტილება და ემპერიკალური ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, როგორ დამწყვეტილება დასწორება, როგორც დასწორება დასწორება, როგ', 'hu': 'A tudásgraf (KG) beágyazási technikák az entitások közötti strukturált kapcsolatokat használják az entitások és kapcsolatok alacsony dimenziós reprezentációjának elsajátítására. E megközelítések egyik kiemelkedő célja, hogy javítsa a tudásdiagramok minőségét a hibák eltávolításával és a hiányzó tények hozzáadásával. Meglepő módon a legtöbb beágyazási technikát olyan benchmark adatkészleteken értékelték, amelyek sűrű és megbízható részhalmazokból állnak, amelyek általában meglehetősen teljesek és kevés hibával rendelkeznek. Ebben a tanulmányban megvizsgáljuk a beágyazási technikák problémáját a szövegből kivont KG-k esetében, amelyek gyakran hiányosak és hibákat tartalmaznak. Összehasonlítjuk a különböző KG-k ritkaságát és megbízhatatlanságát, és empirikus kísérleteket végezünk annak bemutatására, hogy a beágyazási megközelítések hogyan romlanak a ritkaság és a megbízhatatlanság növekedésével.', 'el': 'Οι τεχνικές ενσωμάτωσης γραφήματος γνώσης (ΚΓ) χρησιμοποιούν δομημένες σχέσεις μεταξύ οντοτήτων για να μάθουν χαμηλής διάστασης αναπαραστάσεις οντοτήτων και σχέσεων. Ένας σημαντικός στόχος αυτών των προσεγγίσεων είναι η βελτίωση της ποιότητας των γραφικών γνώσεων αφαιρώντας λάθη και προσθέτοντας στοιχεία που λείπουν. Παραδόξως, οι περισσότερες τεχνικές ενσωμάτωσης έχουν αξιολογηθεί σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς που αποτελούνται από πυκνά και αξιόπιστα υποσύνολα από ανθρώπους που έχουν την τάση να είναι αρκετά πλήρη και έχουν λίγα λάθη. Στην παρούσα εργασία εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εφαρμογής τεχνικών ενσωμάτωσης σε ΚΓ που εξάγονται από κείμενο, τα οποία συχνά είναι ελλιπή και περιέχουν λάθη. Συγκρίνουμε την έλλειψη και την αναξιόπιστη των διαφόρων ΚΓ και διεξάγουμε εμπειρικά πειράματα που αποδεικνύουν πώς υποβαθμίζονται οι προσεγγίσεις ενσωμάτωσης καθώς αυξάνεται η έλλειψη και η αναξιόπιστη.', 'it': "Le tecniche di incorporazione del grafico della conoscenza (KG) utilizzano relazioni strutturate tra entità per imparare rappresentazioni a bassa dimensione di entità e relazioni. Uno degli obiettivi principali di questi approcci è quello di migliorare la qualità dei grafici della conoscenza rimuovendo errori e aggiungendo fatti mancanti. Sorprendentemente, la maggior parte delle tecniche di embedding sono state valutate su set di dati di benchmark costituiti da sottoinsiemi densi e affidabili di KG curati dall'uomo, che tendono ad essere abbastanza completi e hanno pochi errori. In questo articolo, consideriamo il problema dell'applicazione di tecniche di embedding ai KG estratti dal testo, che sono spesso incompleti e contengono errori. Confrontiamo la scarsità e l'inaffidabilità di diversi KG ed eseguiamo esperimenti empirici che dimostrano come gli approcci di incorporazione si degradano man mano che la scarsità e l'inaffidabilità aumentano.", 'lt': 'Žinių grafikas (KG) įtraukimo metodai naudoja struktūrinius subjektų santykius, kad galėtų mokytis mažo matmens subjektų atstovavimo ir santykių. One prominent goal of these approaches is to improve the quality of knowledge graphs by removing errors and adding missing facts.  Įspūdinga, kad dauguma įterpimo metodų buvo įvertinti lyginamuosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose, sudarytuose iš tankių ir patikimų žmogaus kuruojamų KG pogrupių, kurie paprastai yra gana išsamūs ir kurių klaidos yra nedidelės. Šiame dokumente mes svarstome problem ą, susijusią su įdėjimo metodų taikymu KG, išgautiems iš teksto, kurie dažnai yra neišsamūs ir kuriuose yra klaidų. Palyginame skirtingų KG spartumą ir nepatikimumą ir atliekame empirinius eksperimentus, rodančius, kaip įterpiamieji metodai blogėja, didėjant spartumui ir nepatikimumui.', 'kk': 'Білім график (KG) ендіру техникалары бірліктер мен қатынастардың төменгі өлшемі түсініктерін үйрену үшін құрылған қатынастарын қолданады. Бұл жағдайлардың бір мақсаты - білім графиктерінің сапатын өзгерту және қателерді өшіру және жоқ факттерді қосу. Көбінесе, ендіру технологияларының көпшілігі банк деректер қорларында, адамдардың жұмыс және сенімді KG қапшықтардан тұратын, олар дұрыс аяқталған және бірнеше қате бар. Бұл қағазда KG мәтіннен таратылған ендіру технологияларды қолданудың мәселесін қарастырмыз. Бұл көбінде қате жоқ. Біз әртүрлі КГ-дердің кеңістігін және сенімділігін салыстырып, эмпирикалық тәжірибелерді қалай ендіру керектігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Техниките за вклопување на знаење (KG) користат структурирани односи помеѓу ентитетите за да научат нискодимензионални претставувања на ентитетите и односите. Една од истакнатите цели на овие пристапи е подобрувањето на квалитетот на графиките на знаење со отстранување на грешките и додавање на недостасувачките факти. Surprisingly, most embedding techniques have been evaluated on benchmark datasets consisting of dense and reliable subsets of human-curated KGs, which tend to be fairly complete and have few errors.  Во овој документ, го разгледуваме проблемот со апликацијата на техниките на вградување на KGs извадени од текст, кои честопати се нецелосни и содржат грешки. Ние ја споредуваме реткоста и неодговорноста на различните КГ и спроведуваме емпириски експерименти кои демонстрираат како вградените пристапи се деградираат со зголемување на реткоста и неодговорноста.', 'ms': 'Knowledge graph (KG) embedding techniques use structured relationships between entities to learn low-dimensional representations of entities and relations.  Satu tujuan terkenal bagi pendekatan ini adalah untuk meningkatkan kualiti graf pengetahuan dengan membuang ralat dan menambah fakta yang hilang. Yang mengejutkan, kebanyakan teknik penyembedding telah diuji pada set data benchmark yang terdiri dari subkumpulan yang padat dan boleh dipercayai KG yang dikurasi oleh manusia, yang cenderung menjadi cukup lengkap dan mempunyai sedikit ralat. Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan masalah melaksanakan teknik penyembedding kepada KG yang dikekstrak dari teks, yang sering tidak lengkap dan mengandungi ralat. Kita membandingkan kecepatan dan ketidaksabaran KG yang berbeza dan melakukan eksperimen empirik yang menunjukkan bagaimana pendekatan memasukkan turun sebagai kecepatan dan ketidaksabaran meningkat.', 'ml': 'വിജ്ഞാന ഗ്രാഫ് (കെജി) പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളുടെയും ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള സ്ഥാപിത ബന്ധങ്ങള ഈ അടുത്തുവരുന്നതിന്റെ ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ലക്ഷ്യം അറിവുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റിന്റെ ഗ്രാപ്റ്റ് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുക അത്ഭുതപ്പെട്ടു കൊണ്ട്, മിക്കവാറും വിശ്വസ്തനായ കെഗികളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലുള്ള മിക്കവിദ്യകള്\u200d വിലയിച്ച ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നത് ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടുള്ള കെജിസിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവ നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത കെജികളുടെ സ്പെയിസ്റ്റിയും അസാധിക്കാവുന്നതിനെയും തുല്യമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രത്യേക പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത', 'mt': 'It-tekniki ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-graff tal-għarfien (KG) jużaw relazzjonijiet strutturati bejn entitajiet biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet baxxi ta’ entitajiet u relazzjonijiet. Għan prominenti ta’ dawn l-approċċi huwa li tittejjeb il-kwalità tal-grafiċi tal-għarfien billi jitneħħew l-iżbalji u jiżdiedu l-fatti nieqsa. Surprisingly, most embedding techniques have been evaluated on benchmark datasets consisting of dense and reliable subsets of human-curated KGs, which tend to be fairly complete and have few errors.  F’dan id-dokument, aħna nqisu l-problema tal-applikazzjoni ta’ tekniki ta’ inkorporazzjoni għal KGs estratti mit-test, li spiss mhumiex kompleti u fihom żbalji. Aħna nqabblu l-iskarsezza u n-nuqqas ta’ responsabbiltà ta’ KGs differenti u nagħmlu esperimenti empiriċi li juru kif l-approċċi inkorporati jiddegradaw bħala żieda fl-iskarsezza u n-nuqqas ta’ responsabbiltà.', 'no': 'Kvitningsgraf (KG) innebygde teknikkar brukar strukturerte forhold mellom einingar for å lære lavdimensjonale representasjonar av einingar og forhold. Eit viktig mål på desse tilnærmingane er å forbetra kvaliteten på kunnskap-grafikk ved å fjerna feil og leggja til manglande faktar. I det meste innbyggingsteknikkar har det blitt evaluert på benchmarkdatasett som består av tette og tilgjengelege undergrupper av menneskelige kurserte KGs, som oftast er ganske fullførte og har få feil. I denne papiret ser vi på problemet med å bruka innbyggingsteknikk til KG som er ekstrahert frå tekst, som ofte er ikkje komplett og inneheld feil. Vi samanliknar sparsiteten og ulikheten av ulike KGs og utfører empiriske eksperimenter som demonstrerer korleis innbygging av tilnærmingar gjer degradert som sparsiteten og ukjengeleg økt.', 'pl': 'Techniki osadzania wykresów wiedzy (KG) wykorzystują ustrukturyzowane relacje między jednostkami do nauki niskowymiarowych reprezentacji jednostek i relacji. Jednym z ważnych celów tych podejść jest poprawa jakości wykresów wiedzy poprzez usuwanie błędów i dodanie brakujących faktów. Co zaskakujące, większość technik osadzania została oceniona na zbiorach danych referencyjnych składających się z gęstych i wiarygodnych podzbiorów KG kurowanych przez człowieka, które zazwyczaj są dość kompletne i mają niewiele błędów. W niniejszym artykule rozważamy problem zastosowania technik osadzania do KG wyciąganych z tekstu, które często są niekompletne i zawierają błędy. Porównujemy słabość i niewiarygodność różnych KG oraz przeprowadzamy eksperymenty empiryczne pokazujące, jak podejścia do osadzenia ulegają degradacji wraz ze wzrostem słabości i niewiarygodności.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн график (KG) бүрдүүлэх технологи нь биетүүдийн болон харилцааны бага хэмжээст харилцааны харилцааны бүтэц харилцаа ашигладаг. Эдгээр ойлголтын нэг чухал зорилго бол мэдлэг графикийн сайн чанарыг сайжруулах, алдаа алдаа гарч буй зүйлсийг нэмэх юм. Гайхалтай нь ихэнх сорилтой технологиуд хүн төрөлхтний хөнгөн, итгэлтэй хэсэгт байдаг банкмарк өгөгдлийн сан дээр үнэлдэг. Энэ нь хэд хэдэн алдаа байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид KG-ээс гаргаж буй техникуудыг ашиглах асуудал гэж бодож байна. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн буруу байдаг. Бид өөр төрлийн КГ-ын жинхэнэ, итгэлцэлгүй байдлыг харьцуулж, эмперикийн туршилтуудыг хэрхэн ойлголтын тухай багасгаж, итгэлцгүй байдлын нэмэгдүүлэхийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Tehnicile de încorporare a graficului cunoștințelor (KG) utilizează relații structurate între entități pentru a învăța reprezentări dimensionale joase ale entităților și relațiilor. Un obiectiv important al acestor abordări este îmbunătățirea calității graficelor de cunoaștere prin eliminarea erorilor și adăugarea de fapte lipsă. Surprinzător, majoritatea tehnicilor de încorporare au fost evaluate pe seturi de date de referință constând din subseturi dense și fiabile de KG-uri curate de om, care tind să fie destul de complete și au puține erori. În această lucrare, luăm în considerare problema aplicării tehnicilor de încorporare la KG-urile extrase din text, care sunt adesea incomplete și conțin erori. Comparăm scaritatea și inaffidabilitatea diferitelor KG-uri și efectuăm experimente empirice demonstrând modul în care abordările încorporate se degradează pe măsură ce scaritatea și inaffidabilitatea cresc.', 'si': 'Name මේ ප්\u200dරධාන අදහස් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ දැනුම් අතිරීක්ෂණය සහ අතිරීක්ෂණ ඇත්ත අතිරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. පුදුම විශ්වාසයි, බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සේට් වලින් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක මිනිස්සු විශ්වාස කරපු KGs සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය මේ පත්තරේ අපි හිතන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය KGs වලින් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය ලැබීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ අපි වෙනස් KGs වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය සහ අවිශ්වාසය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කිය', 'sr': 'Tehnike za integraciju znanja (KG) koriste strukturirane veze između entitata kako bi naučili niske dimenzionalne predstave entitata i odnosa. Jedan veliki cilj ovih pristupa je poboljšati kvalitet grafika znanja uklanjanjem grešaka i dodavanjem nestalih činjenica. Iznenađujuće, većina ugrađenih tehnika je procjenjena na standardnim setima podataka, sastavljajući se od gustih i pouzdanih podataka ljudskih KGs-a, koje su često potpune i imaju nekoliko grešaka. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o problemu primjene tehnika uključenja KGs izvedenih iz teksta, koji su često nepotpuni i sadržavaju greške. Uspoređujemo sparsitnost i nepouzdanost različitih KG-a i izvodimo empiričke eksperimente koji pokazuju kako uključujući pristupe degrade kao povećanje sparsitnosti i nepouzdanosti.', 'so': "Teqooyinka aqoonta (KG) ee ku qoran waxay isticmaalaan xiriir la dhisay oo ay u dhexeeyaan dhamaanka si ay u bartaan noocyo-gaar ah oo ay u leeyihiin xuquuqda iyo xiriirka. Hadal muhiim ah oo aad u baahan tahay waa in lagu hagaajiyo takwirada aqoonta, in la qaado qaladka iyo ku daro xaqiiqyada la'aanta. Si la yaab leh waxaa lagu qiimeeyay wax badan oo ka mid ah kooxo qarsoon oo lagu aamin karo KGs, kuwaas oo ku habboon inay si qumman u dhamaadaan oo ay leeyihiin qaladyo yar. In this paper, we consider the problem of applying embedding techniques to KGs extracted from text, which are often incomplete and contain errors.  Waxaannu isbarbardhignaa dhaqdhaqaaqi iyo sinnaanta KGs oo kala duwan, waxaana sameynaa jirrabaadyo jimicsi ah oo caddaynaya siduu u soo dhowaado cibaadada iyo korodhka caasinimada ah.", 'sv': 'Kunskapsgraf (KG) inbäddningstekniker använder strukturerade relationer mellan entiteter för att lära sig lågdimensionella representationer av entiteter och relationer. Ett framträdande mål med dessa tillvägagångssätt är att förbättra kvaliteten på kunskapsgrafer genom att ta bort fel och lägga till saknade fakta. Överraskande nog har de flesta inbäddningstekniker utvärderats på benchmarkdatauppsättningar bestående av täta och tillförlitliga delmängder av mänskligt kuraterade KG, som tenderar att vara ganska kompletta och har få fel. I denna uppsats behandlar vi problemet med att tillämpa inbäddningstekniker på KG extraherade från text, som ofta är ofullständiga och innehåller fel. Vi jämför sparsiteten och opålitligheten hos olika KG och utför empiriska experiment som visar hur inbäddningsmetoder försämras i takt med att sparsiteten och opålitligheten ökar.', 'ta': 'அறிவு வரைப்படம் (KG) உள்ளிடப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பம் பொருள்கள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளின் குறைந்தபட்ச பங்குகளையும் கற்று கொள்ள கட்ட இந்த முன்னேற்றங்களின் ஒரு பெரிய இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் அறிவு வரைபடங்களின் தரம் மேம்படுத்துவது பிழைகளை நீக்கி காணவில ஆச்சரியமாக, பெரும்பாலான உள்ளிடப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் மதிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது மனித குறைக்கப்பட்ட கேக்ஸின் க இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பிரச்சனையை உரையிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட KGs க்கு பயன்படுத்தும் தொழில்நுட்ப தொழில்நுட்ப ப நாம் வேறு கேகிகளின் வெளிர்ச்சியையும் நிர்ணயில்லாத சோதனைகளையும் ஒப்பிடுக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அதிர்ச்சியில் எவ்வாறு உள்ளு', 'ur': 'علم graph (KG) embedding techniques use structured relationships between entities to learn low-dimensional representations of entities and relations. ان طریقوں کا ایک بڑا مقصد یہ ہے کہ علم گراف کا کیفیت زیادہ سے زیادہ اضافہ کرنا اور گم ہونے والی حقیقت میں زیادہ اضافہ کرنا۔ عجیب ہے کہ اکثر انڈینگ ٹیکنیک بنچمبرک ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطابق کیا گیا ہے جو انسان کے کنٹ کجی کے گہرے اور امانت دار سٹے ہیں، جو انصاف طور پر کامل ہوتے ہیں اور بہت کم خطاؤں ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں مشکل کو دیکھتے ہیں کہ KGs کے لئے پیغام سے نکالا گیا ہے جو اکثر غلطی اور غلطی ہیں۔ ہم مختلف KGs کی کمزوری اور غیر مستحکمی کی مثال دیتے ہیں اور مصریح آزمائش کرتے ہیں جو نشان دیتے ہیں کہ آزمائش کی آزمائش کس طرح کمزوری اور غیر مستحکمی کے طور پر کمزور ہوتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu usullarning eng muhim maqsadi xatolarni olib tashlash va yoʻqolmagan faktlarni qoʻshish mumkin. O'zingiz, ko'pchilik teknikalar benchmark maʼlumotlari haqida qiymat qilindi. Bu ko'pchilik qo'shilgan ko'pchilik qo'shilgan KGs guruhlarida juda ham ishonch va juda kam xatolar bor. Bu hujjatda, biz matn tomonidan chiqarilgan KGs'ga qoʻllaniladigan muammolarni o'ylaymiz. Bu narsa ko'p notoʻgʻri va xatolar bor. Biz boshqa KGs'ning cheksizlikni kamaytirimiz va ishlatmayligimizni bajaramiz va muvaffaqiyatli imtiyozlarni ko'rsatishni anglatamiz.", 'vi': 'Dùng các mối quan hệ nội bộ cơ cấu trúc giữa các thực thể để học các biểu tượng nhỏ chiều của các thực thể và quan hệ. Một mục tiêu nổi bật của các phương pháp này là cải thiện chất lượng của đồ thị về kiến thức bằng cách xóa lỗi và thêm dữ kiện thiếu. Ngạc nhiên là, hầu hết các kỹ thuật gia nhập đã được đánh giá trên các tập tin tiêu chuẩn, gồm các nhóm mô-tô dày và đáng tin cậy của KG được quản lý người, mà có xu hướng đầy đủ và có rất ít lỗi. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xem xét vấn đề áp dụng kỹ thuật cài ghép vào KG lấy ra từ văn bản, mà thường không đầy đủ và có lỗi. Chúng tôi so sánh độ phân tán và không có thói quen chịu trách nhiệm của mỗi G.', 'nl': "Knowledge Graph (KG) embedding technieken gebruiken gestructureerde relaties tussen entiteiten om laagdimensionale representaties van entiteiten en relaties te leren. Een prominent doel van deze benaderingen is om de kwaliteit van kennisgrafieken te verbeteren door fouten te verwijderen en ontbrekende feiten toe te voegen. Verrassend genoeg zijn de meeste embedding technieken geëvalueerd op benchmark datasets bestaande uit dichte en betrouwbare subsets van door mensen gecureerde KG's, die over het algemeen vrij compleet zijn en weinig fouten bevatten. In dit artikel bekijken we het probleem van het toepassen van embedding technieken op KG's die uit tekst zijn gehaald, die vaak onvolledig zijn en fouten bevatten. We vergelijken de schaarste en onbetrouwbaarheid van verschillende KG's en voeren empirische experimenten uit die aantonen hoe embedding benaderingen degraderen naarmate schaarste en onbetrouwbaarheid toenemen.", 'da': "Vidensgraf (KG) indlejringsteknikker bruger strukturerede relationer mellem enheder til at lære lavdimensionelle repræsentationer af enheder og relationer. Et fremtrædende mål med disse tilgange er at forbedre kvaliteten af vidensgrafer ved at fjerne fejl og tilføje manglende fakta. Overraskende nok er de fleste indlejringsteknikker blevet evalueret på benchmark datasæt bestående af tætte og pålidelige delmængder af menneskelige kuraterede KG'er, som har tendens til at være temmelig komplette og har få fejl. I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med at anvende indlejringsteknikker på KG'er udvundet fra tekst, som ofte er ufuldstændige og indeholder fejl. Vi sammenligner sparsomheden og upålideligheden af forskellige KG'er og udfører empiriske eksperimenter, der demonstrerer, hvordan indlejringsmetoder nedbrydes, efterhånden som sparsomheden og upålideligheden stiger.", 'bg': 'Техниките за вграждане на графика на знанието (КГ) използват структурирани взаимоотношения между субектите, за да научат нискоизмерни представяния на субектите и взаимоотношенията. Една от основните цели на тези подходи е да се подобри качеството на графиките на знанието чрез премахване на грешки и добавяне на липсващи факти. Изненадващо, повечето техники за вграждане са оценени върху сравнителни набори от данни, състоящи се от плътни и надеждни подгрупи от курирани от човека КГ, които са склонни да бъдат сравнително пълни и имат малко грешки. В тази статия разглеждаме проблема с прилагането на техники за вграждане на КГ, извлечени от текст, които често са непълни и съдържат грешки. Сравняваме рядкостта и ненадеждността на различните КГ и провеждаме емпирични експерименти, показващи как вграждащите подходи се влошават с увеличаване на оскъдността и ненадеждността.', 'hr': 'Tehnike integracije znanja (KG) koriste strukturirane veze između subjekta kako bi naučili niske dimenzionalne predstave subjekta i odnosa. Jedan veliki cilj ovih pristupa je poboljšati kvalitet grafika znanja uklanjanjem grešaka i dodavanjem nestalih činjenica. Iznenađujuće, većina ugrađenih tehnika je procijenjena na standardnim podacima podataka koji se sastoje od gustih i pouzdanih podataka ljudskih KGs-a, koje su često kompletno i imaju nekoliko grešaka. U ovom papiru smatramo problem primjenjivanja ugrađenih tehnika KGs izvedenih iz teksta, koji su često nepotpuni i sadržavaju greške. Uspoređujemo rezervitet i nepouzdanost različitih KG-a i izvodimo empiričke eksperimente koji pokazuju kako se uključivanje pristupa smanjuje kao povećanje rezerviteta i nepouzdanosti.', 'id': 'Graf pengetahuan (KG) teknik penyembedding menggunakan hubungan struktur antara entitas untuk belajar representation dimensi rendah entitas dan hubungan. Satu tujuan terkenal dari pendekatan ini adalah meningkatkan kualitas grafik pengetahuan dengan menghapus kesalahan dan menambahkan fakta yang hilang. Yang mengejutkan, kebanyakan teknik penerbangan telah diuji pada set data benchmark yang terdiri dari subkelompok yang padat dan dapat dipercaya KG-curasi manusia, yang cenderung cukup lengkap dan memiliki beberapa kesalahan. Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan masalah untuk menerapkan teknik penyembedding ke KG yang dikeluarkan dari teks, yang sering tidak lengkap dan mengandung kesalahan. Kami membandingkan kecepatan dan ketidakbertanggung jawab KG yang berbeda dan melakukan eksperimen empiris yang menunjukkan bagaimana pendekatan penerbangan merendahkan sebagai kecepatan dan ketidakbertanggung jawab meningkat.', 'de': 'Knowledge Graph (KG) Einbettungstechniken verwenden strukturierte Beziehungen zwischen Entitäten, um niederdimensionale Darstellungen von Entitäten und Beziehungen zu lernen. Ein prominentes Ziel dieser Ansätze ist die Verbesserung der Qualität von Wissensgraphen durch Beseitigung von Fehlern und Hinzufügen fehlender Fakten. Überraschenderweise wurden die meisten Einbettungstechniken auf Benchmark-Datensätzen evaluiert, die aus dichten und zuverlässigen Teilmengen menschlich kuratierter KGs bestehen, die in der Regel ziemlich vollständig und fehlerfrei sind. In diesem Beitrag betrachten wir das Problem der Anwendung von Einbettungstechniken auf KGs, die aus Text extrahiert werden, die oft unvollständig sind und Fehler enthalten. Wir vergleichen die Sparsität und Unzuverlässigkeit verschiedener KGs und führen empirische Experimente durch, die zeigen, wie Einbettungsansätze mit zunehmender Sparsität und Unzuverlässigkeit degradieren.', 'ko': '지식 그래프(KG) 삽입 기술은 실체 간의 구조화된 관계를 이용하여 실체와 관계의 저차원 표현을 배운다.이러한 방법의 두드러진 목표는 오류를 없애고 부족한 사실을 첨가함으로써 지식도의 질을 높이는 것이다.놀랍게도 대부분의 삽입 기술은 기준 데이터 집합에서 평가를 하는 것이다. 기준 데이터 집합은 밀집되고 신뢰할 수 있는 인류가 기획한 KG 서브집합으로 구성되어 있는데 이런 데이터 집합은 왕왕 상당히 완전하고 오류가 거의 없다.본문에서, 우리는 삽입 기술을 텍스트에서 추출한 KG에 응용하는 문제를 고려했는데, 이러한 KG는 통상적으로 완전하지 않고 오류가 포함되어 있다.우리는 서로 다른 KG의 희소성과 신뢰성을 비교하고 실증 실험을 실시하여 삽입 방법이 희소성과 신뢰성이 증가함에 따라 어떻게 낮아지는지 증명하였다.', 'fa': 'گراف دانش (KG) تکنیک\u200cهای استفاده از رابطه\u200cهای ساخته\u200cشده بین سازمان\u200cها برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای کم بعدی از سازمان\u200cها و رابطه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند. یک هدف بزرگی از این دسترسی است که کیفیت گرافیک دانش را با حذف اشتباهی و اضافه کردن حقیقت ناپدید می\u200cکند. تعجب کننده است که بیشترین تکنیک\u200cهای پیدا کردن روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای صندوق\u200cبندی که consist of dense and reliable subsets of human-curated KGs, which tend to be fairly complete and have a few errors. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل استفاده از تکنولوژی وارد کردن به KGs که از متن خارج شده\u200cاند، به نظر می\u200cرسیم که اغلب غلطی و اشتباهی دارند. ما نسبت به آرامش و اعتمادی KGs متفاوت مقایسه می کنیم و آزمایشات امپراتیک را انجام می دهیم که نشان می دهند که چگونه درگیری نزدیک ها به عنوان افزایش آرامش و اعتمادی افزایش می کنند.', 'sw': 'Graphi ya maarifa (KG) inatumia mahusiano yaliyotengenezwa kati ya vitu ili kujifunza uwakilizaji wa vifaa vya chini na mahusiano. Lengo moja kubwa la mbinu hizi ni kuboresha ubora wa picha za maarifa kwa kuondoa makosa na kuongeza ukweli uliopotea. Inashangaza, mbinu nyingi zilizotengenezwa zimekuwa za kuchapishwa kwenye seti za taarifa za bendera zinazojumuisha makundi yenye mizito na yenye kuaminika na viungo vya KGs vinavyofunguliwa kwa binadamu, ambavyo vinaendelea kuwa vimekamilika vizuri na vina makosa machache. Katika karatasi hii, tunafikiria tatizo la kutumia teknolojia za kuzuia kwa KGs zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye maandishi, ambazo mara nyingi hazijatilika na zina makosa. Tunawalinganisha ukame na kutokuwepo kwa vifaa vya KGs tofauti na kutekeleza majaribio ya msimamo ili kuonyesha jinsi inavyoingia vibaya kama kuongezeka kwa unyanyasaji na kutokuwepo kwa usawa.', 'tr': "Bilim grafiki (KG) düzümlenmiş teknikler biretler arasynda düşük boyutlu guramlary we baglaýyşlaryň temsillerini öwrenmek üçin ullanýarlar. Bu golaýlaryň ýene wajyp maksady, ýalňyşlyklary ýitiräk we ýitiräk faktlary ekläp bilim grafikleriniň keyfiyetini geliştirmekdir. Iň köp taýýarlanan tehnologiýa benchmark sanatynda çykyş we ynamly KG üçin meňzeş we güýçli bir toparda deňlendirildi. Bu ýerde adil bir şekilde tamamlandyrylýar we birnäçe hata bar. Bu kagyzda KG'den çykylýan ýagdaý teknikleri ýazmakda mesele pikir edýäris. Biz farklı KG'laryň ýagtylygyny we ynamlygyny daşyrýarys we empirik deneyleri edip, nusga daşyrýan ýagdaýyň azalyşygyny we jogapsyzlyklygyny görkez.", 'af': 'Kenning graaf (KG) inbêer teknike gebruik struktureerde verhouding tussen entiteite na leer lae- dimensie voorstellings van entiteite en relasies. Een prominente doel van hierdie toegang is om die kwaliteit van kennis grafieke te verbeter deur foute te verwyder en te byvoeg van miskiede fakte. Oorwurk, die meeste inbêring teknike is geevalueer op benchmark datastelle wat bestaan van dens en betroubare subartikels van mens- kureweerde Kgs, wat tendig na wees regtig volledig en het paar foute. In hierdie papier, ons beskou die probleem van toepassing van inbêde teknike na Kgs uitgevoer van teks, wat is dikwels onvolledige en bevat foute. Ons vergelyk die sparsiteit en onvertroubaarheid van verskillende KG en uitvoer empiriese eksperimente wat wys hoe inbêding toegang toegang vergroot as sparsiteit en onvertroubaarheid vergroot.', 'sq': 'Knowledge graph (KG) embedding techniques use structured relationships between entities to learn low-dimensional representations of entities and relations.  Një qëllim i shquar i këtyre qasjeve është përmirësimi i cilësisë së grafikave të njohurive duke hequr gabimet dhe duke shtuar fakte të munguara. Për mrekulli, shumica e teknikave të përfshirjes janë vlerësuar në grupet e të dhënave referenciale që përbëhen nga nëngrupe të dendura dhe të besueshme të KG-ve të kuruara nga njerëzit, të cilat tenderojnë të jenë mjaft të plota dhe kanë pak gabime. Në këtë letër, ne konsiderojmë problemin e aplikimit të teknikave të përfshirjes në KG të nxjerra nga teksti, të cilat shpesh janë jo të plota dhe përmbajnë gabime. Ne krahasojmë pakësinë dhe papërgjegjshmërinë e KG-ve të ndryshme dhe kryejmë eksperimente empirike që tregojnë se si përkrahjet e përfshirjes degradojnë si pakësia dhe rritja e papërgjegjshmërisë.', 'am': 'የእውቀት ግንኙነት (KG) ማቀናቀል ስክሮዎች አካባቢዎች እና ግንኙነትን ለመማር የመሠረት ግንኙነት ይጠቅማል፡፡ የእነዚህ ደረጃዎች የሚደረገው አንዲት አቃውሞ ስህተቶችን በማስወግድ እና የጠፋውን እውነተኞችን በመጨመር የእውቀትን ቀረፎችን ማሻሻል ነው፡፡ በተደነቀ ነገር፣ አብዛኛዎቹ የቢንኩርክ ዳታዎችን በተመሳሳይ እና በሚታመኑ የKGs አካባቢዎች በተመሳሳይ እና ጥቂት ስህተት ይኖራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት ጉዳይ፣ ከጽሑፍ ለተወጡት KGs የስህተት ስህተቶችን ለመቀበል መከራን እናስባለን፡፡ የKGs ፍጥረት እና የማይቻለውን እናሳስመስላለን እና የቻይነትን ፈተና እንዴት እንደሚያሳርፍ እና የማይቻልበትን ጥቃት እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': "Bilim grafı (KG) birləşdirilmiş tekniklərlə birləşdirilmiş məlumat və əlaqələrin düşük ölçülük göstərilmələrini öyrənmək üçün strukturlu əlaqələri istifadə edir. Bu tərzlərin ən böyük məqsədi, xətaları silib qeyb faktlarını əlavə edərək elm grafiklərinin keyfiyyətini düzəltməkdir. Bu təəccüblü, çox inşa edən tekniklər, insanların sıxıntılı və güvenilir KG-lərdən olan benchmark veri qurularında değerlendirilmişdir. Bunlar ədalətlə tamamlanmış və az hatalardır. Bu kağızda, KG'lərdən çıxarılan mətnlərə istifadə edən teknikləri uyğunlaşdırmaq problemini düşünürük. Bu çox sıxıntılar tamamlanmışdır və hatalardır. Biz fərqli KG'lərin küçük və güclülüyü ilə qarşılaşdırırıq və empirik təcrübələrini göstərdik ki, yaxınlıqların necə yerləşdirilməsini və güclüyü artırmağı göstərir.", 'hy': 'Գիտության գրաֆիկը (KG) ներառող տեխնիկաները օգտագործում են կառուցվածքային հարաբերություններ կազմակերպված կազմակերպությունների միջև, որպեսզի սովորեն կազմակերպությունների և հարաբերությունների ցածր չափերի ներկայացումներ One prominent goal of these approaches is to improve the quality of knowledge graphs by removing errors and adding missing facts.  Զարմանալի է, որ ներդրման մեծ մասը գնահատվել է մարդկային կորտերացված KG-ների խտուն և վստահելի ենթախմբերից, որոնք հակված են բավականին ամբողջական և մի քանի սխալներ ունեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք դիտարկում ենք ներգրավման մեթոդներ կիրառելու խնդիրը տեքստից հանված KG-ների համար, որոնք հաճախ անլրիվ են և սխալներ են պարունակում: Մենք համեմատում ենք տարբեր KG-ների հազվադեպությունը և անվստահությունը և կատարում ենք էմպրիկական փորձարկումներ, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, թե ինչպես են ներառված մոտեցումները դեգրավորում, երբ հազվադեպությունը և անվստահությունը աճում են', 'bs': 'Graf znanja (KG) ugrađene tehnike koriste strukturirane veze između entitata kako bi naučili niske dimenzionalne predstave entitata i odnosa. Jedan veliki cilj ovih pristupa je poboljšati kvalitet grafika znanja uklanjanjem grešaka i dodavanjem nestalih činjenica. Iznenađujuće, većina ugrađenih tehnika je procijenjena na standardnim podacima podataka koji se sastoje od gustih i pouzdanih podataka ljudskih KGs-a, koja se čini da su prilično kompletna i imaju nekoliko grešaka. U ovom papiru razmišljamo o problemu primjene tehnika uključenja KGs izvedenih iz teksta, koji su često nepotpuni i sadržavaju greške. Uspoređujemo sparsitnost i nepouzdanost različitih KG-a i izvodimo empiričke eksperimente koji pokazuju kako se uključivanje pristupa smanjuje kao povećanje sparsitnosti i nepouzdanosti.', 'ca': "Les tècniques d'incorporació del gràfic del coneixement (KG) utilitzen relacions estructuradas entre entitats per aprendre representacions baixes dimensions d'entitats i relacions. Un objectiu prominent d'aquests enfocaments és millorar la qualitat dels gràfics del coneixement eliminant els errors i afegint els fets que falten. Sorprenentment, la majoria de tècniques d'incorporació s'han evaluat en conjunts de dades de referència que consisteixen en subgrups densos i fiables de KG curats per humans, que tendeixen a ser bastant complets i tenen pocs errors. En aquest paper, considerem el problema d'aplicar tècniques d'incorporació a KG extraïts del text, que sovint són incomplets i contenen errors. Comparem la escassetat i l'irresponsabilitat de diferents KG i fem experiments empírics que demostren com els enfocaments incorporadors degraden a mesura que l'escassetat i l'irresponsabilitat augmenten.", 'cs': 'Techniky vkládání znalostních grafů (KG) využívají strukturované vztahy mezi entitami k učení se nízkorozměrných reprezentací entit a vztahů. Jedním z významných cílů těchto přístupů je zlepšení kvality znalostních grafů odstraněním chyb a přidáním chybějících faktů. Překvapivě, většina technik vkládání byla hodnocena na referenčních datových sadách sestávajících z hustých a spolehlivých podmnožin KG vytvářených lidmi, které mají tendenci být poměrně kompletní a mají málo chyb. V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou aplikace metod vložení na KG extrahované z textu, které jsou často neúplné a obsahují chyby. Porovnáváme řídkost a nespolehlivost různých KG a provádíme empirické experimenty demonstrující, jak se vkládací přístupy degradují s nárůstem řídkosti a nespolehlivosti.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান গ্রাফ (কে. জি.) বিভিন্ন প্রযুক্তিগুলো ব্যবহার করে বস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্ব ও সম্পর্কের ক্ষেত্রে নিম্নমিত সম্পর্ক শিখত এই পদক্ষেপের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে তারা ভুল অপসারণ করে এবং নিখোঁজ তথ্য যোগ করে জ্ঞানের গ্রাফের মান উন্নত করে। বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের বেশীরভাগ বেশীরভাগ প্রযুক্তি মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে যার মধ্যে মানুষের কঠোর এবং বিশ্বস্ত বিভাগ কেজিগুলোর মধ্যে রয়েছে, যারা খ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিবেচনা করি লেখা থেকে বের করা কে- জিগির কাছে প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করার সমস্যা, যা প্রায়শই সম্পূর্ণ এবং ত্রুটির মধ্ আমরা বিভিন্ন কেজির স্মৃতির সামান্য এবং অবিশ্বাসের তুলনা করি এবং ক্ষমতার পরীক্ষার প্রতি প্রদর্শন করি কিভাবে প্রবেশের প্রতিক্রিয়া স্ম', 'et': 'Teadmisgraafiku (KG) manustamise tehnikad kasutavad struktureeritud suhteid üksuste vahel, et õppida üksuste ja suhete madalamõõtmelisi esitusi. Nende lähenemisviiside üks silmapaistev eesmärk on parandada teadmiste graafikute kvaliteeti, kõrvaldades vead ja lisades puuduvad faktid. Üllataval kombel on enamikku manustamismeetodeid hinnatud võrdlusandmekogumite põhjal, mis koosnevad tihedatest ja usaldusväärsetest inimkureeritud KG alamkogumitest, mis kipuvad olema üsna täielikud ja millel on vähe vigu. Käesolevas töös käsitleme probleemi manustamismeetodite rakendamisega tekstist ekstraheeritud KG-dele, mis on sageli mittetäielikud ja sisaldavad vigu. Me võrdleme erinevate KG-de hõredust ja ebausaldusväärsust ning teeme empiirilisi katseid, mis näitavad, kuidas hõredus ja ebausaldusväärsus suurenevad.', 'fi': 'Knowledge graph (KG) upotustekniikat käyttävät strukturoituja suhteita entiteettien välillä oppiakseen pieniulotteisia esityksiä entiteeteistä ja suhteista. Yksi näistä lähestymistavoista on parantaa tietokaavioiden laatua poistamalla virheitä ja lisäämällä puuttuvia tietoja. Yllättävää kyllä useimmat upotustekniikat on arvioitu vertailuaineistoihin, jotka koostuvat tiheistä ja luotettavista ihmiskuratoiduista KG:istä, jotka ovat yleensä melko täydellisiä ja joissa on vähän virheitä. Tässä artikkelissa pohdimme ongelmaa upotustekniikan soveltamisesta tekstistä poimittuihin KG:iin, jotka ovat usein epätäydellisiä ja sisältävät virheitä. Vertailemme eri KG:iden harvaluutta ja epäluotettavuutta ja suoritamme empiirisiä kokeita, joissa osoitetaan, miten upotusmenetelmät heikkenevät harvaluuden ja epäluotettavuuden kasvaessa.', 'jv': 'Kerensi Graf Omah sing perbudhakan nganggo sampeyan iki dadi kanggo luwih apik dadi nggawe barang kelas karo nggawe eror lan nambah barang berkakatan lahir text-editor-action Nang pebuk iki, kita isih perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno teknik sing tuwih nggawe KGs seneng nggambar tèks, sing apik tenan lan barang akeh barang. Awak dhéwé nggerarangké kaluwargan lan ora nggawe barang karo KGs ulih dumadhi lan muncul ujian sing perbudhakan maneh', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Babu wani abu na fara daga wannan masu hanyarwa ni'ani da ya kyautata sifar fassaran ilmi na tafiyar da ɓata kuma a ƙara masu sakan. Ina yi mãmãki, an evaluce mafiya yawan tufãfin da aka samar a kan bangon-bangon data masu ƙunsa da ƙanƙan da masu amintarwa na KGs, wanda ke kasancẽwa ta cika cikakken ko kuma yana da ɓata kaɗan. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade matsalar da za'a amfani da akwatin akwatin bayani na KGs wanda aka fito daga matsayin, da yawa ba su cika ba kuma suna cikin ɓata. Munã samfan saurin da bã da hakki ba na KGs na dabam-daban kuma Muke cika jarrabo masu amfani da kuma Muke nuna jinsi da za'a kusantar ta wuri kamar an ƙãra haske da bã ya iya ĩmãni.", 'he': 'גרף הידע (KG) שימוש בטכניקות הכניסה משתמשים במערכת יחסים בין יחידות כדי ללמוד מייצגים נמוכים של יחידות ומערכות יחסים. מטרה ראשית של גישות אלה היא לשפר את איכות גרפי הידע על ידי הסירה של טעויות ותוספת עובדות חסרות. באופן מפתיע, רוב הטכניקות ההכניסה הוערכו על קבוצות נתונים של רמזים המרכזים המכילים ממקבוצות צפופות ואמינות של KGs מטופלים על ידי אדם, אשר נוטים להיות די מושלמות ויש להם כמה טעויות. בעיתון הזה, אנו שוקלים את הבעיה של שימוש טכניקות קישור ל KGs מווצאים מהטקסט, אשר לעתים קרובות לא מלאות ומכילים טעויות. אנו שווים את הידרות והאי-אמוניות של KG שונים ובצעים ניסויים אמפיריים שמוכיחים כיצד גישות מעורבות מתקלקלות כאשר הידרות והאי-אמוניות מגיעות.', 'sk': 'Tehnike vključevanja grafov znanja (KG) uporabljajo strukturirane odnose med entitetami za učenje nizkodimenzionalnih predstavitev entitet in odnosov. Eden od pomembnih ciljev teh pristopov je izboljšanje kakovosti grafikonov znanja z odstranjevanjem napak in dodajanjem manjkajočih dejstev. Presenetljivo je, da je bila večina tehnik vdelave ocenjena na referenčnih naborih podatkov, sestavljenih iz gostih in zanesljivih podnaborov človeško kuriranih KG, ki so običajno dokaj popolni in imajo malo napak. V tem prispevku obravnavamo problem uporabe tehnik vdelave za KG, pridobljene iz besedila, ki so pogosto nepopolne in vsebujejo napake. Primerjamo redkost in nezanesljivost različnih KG-jev ter izvajamo empirične poskuse, ki dokazujejo, kako se vdelani pristopi razgradijo, ko se redkost in nezanesljivost povečujejo.', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཤེས་པའི་གྲངས་རིས། ཕལ་ཚུལ་འདི་དག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཆེན་གཅིག་ནི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་པར་རིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་ན། Surprisingly, most embedding techniques have been evaluated on benchmark datasets consisting of dense and reliable subsets of human-curated KGs, which tend to be fairly complete and have few errors. It is a common mistake. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་KGs་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་ནས་ཕན་ཚུན་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ ང་ཚོས་KGs་མ་འདྲ་བའི་བསམ་བློ་དང་རྫུན་མེད་པར་བཟོ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Dual Tensor Model for Detecting Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations', 'fr': 'Modèle à double tenseur pour la détection de relations lexico-sémantiques asymétriques', 'pt': 'Modelo de tensor duplo para detectar relações léxico-semânticas assimétricas', 'ar': 'نموذج الموتر المزدوج لاكتشاف العلاقات المعجمية الدلالية غير المتكافئة', 'es': 'Modelo de doble tensor para detectar relaciones léxico-semánticas asimétricas', 'ja': '非対称なレキシコ-セマンティック関係を検出するための二重テンソルモデル', 'zh': '检非对称词法-语义偶张量模', 'hi': 'असममित लेक्सिको-शब्दार्थ संबंधों का पता लगाने के लिए दोहरी टेंसर मॉडल', 'ru': 'Двойная тензорная модель для обнаружения асимметричных лексико-семантических отношений', 'ga': 'Múnla Dé-Teannaitheoir chun Caidrimh Neamhshiméadracha Foclóra-Séimeantach a Bhrath', 'ka': 'მეორე ტენსორის მოდელი აზიმეტრიური ლვქსიკჲ- ჟვმანტიკური შესახებ განახსნა', 'hu': 'Kettős feszültségmodell az aszimmetrikus lexiko-szemantikus kapcsolatok felismerésére', 'el': 'Διπλό μοντέλο Tensor για την ανίχνευση ασύμμετρων Λεξικό-Σημαντικών Σχέσεων', 'it': 'Modello a doppio tensore per il rilevamento delle relazioni lessico-semantiche asimmetriche', 'kk': 'Asymmetric Lexico- Semantic Relations Detection үшін екі тенсор моделі', 'mk': 'Модел на двоен тензор за детектирање асиметрички лексико-семантични односи', 'ms': 'Model Tensor Dua untuk Mengesan Hubungan Lexico-Semantik Asimetrik', 'lt': 'Dvigubasis tempimo modelis asimetriniams leksikosemantiniams ryšiams nustatyti', 'ml': 'Dual Tensor Model for Detecting Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Tensor Doppju għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Relazzjonijiet Asimetriċi Lessiko-Semantiċi', 'mn': 'Ассимметрийн лексико-семантийн харилцаа олох хоёр тенсор загвар', 'pl': 'Model podwójnego napinania do wykrywania asymetrycznych relacji leksyko-semantycznych', 'no': 'Dobbelt tensmodul for oppdaging av aspimetriske leksiko- semiantiske relasjonar', 'ro': 'Model dual tensor pentru detectarea relațiilor lexico-semantice asimetrice', 'sr': 'Dualni model tenzora za otkrivanje asimetričkih leksičkih i semantičkih odnosa', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Dual Tensor Model for Detecting Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations', 'sv': 'Dual Tensor Model för detektering av asymmetriska Lexico-Semantiska relationer', 'ta': 'ஆசிமெட்ரிக் லெக்சிகோ- செமான்டிக் தொடர்புகளை கண்டறிவதற்கான இரட்டை டென்சார் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'آسیمیٹریک لکسیکو-سیمنٹی رابطہ شناسایی کے لئے دوئل ٹنسور موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Dubbel Tensor Model voor het Detecteren van Asymmetrische Lexico-Semantische Relaties', 'bg': 'Модел на двойно напрежение за откриване на асиметрични лексико-семантични отношения', 'da': 'Dual Tensor Model til detektering af asymmetriske Lexico-Semantiske relationer', 'hr': 'Dualni model tenzora za otkrivanje asimetričkih leksičkih i semantičkih odnosa', 'id': 'Model Dual Tensor untuk mendeteksi Hubungan Asymetrik Lexico-Semantik', 'ko': '비대칭 어휘의 의미 관계를 측정하는 짝장량 모델', 'de': 'Dual Tensor Modell zur Erkennung asymmetrischer Lexiko-Semantischer Beziehungen', 'af': 'Dubbel Tensor Model vir die ontdekking van Asymmetriese Lexico- Semantiese Relasies', 'tr': 'Asymmetrik Leksiko-Semantik Baglaýyşlary Aňlamak üçin 2-nji sansor Modeli', 'fa': 'Model دوم تنسور برای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای آسیمتریک لکسیکو-سیمانتیک', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Tensor mbili kwa Kuchunguza Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations', 'hy': 'Ասիմմետրական լեքսիկո-սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման երկու տենսորի մոդել', 'sq': 'Model i dyfishtë tensioni për zbulimin e marrëdhënieve asimetrike leksiko-Semantike', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'ca': 'Dual Tensor Model for Detecting Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations', 'az': 'Asymmetrik Leksiko-Semantik Ä°liÅŸkilÉ™ri keÅŸfetmÉ™k Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n ikili Tensor Modeli', 'bn': 'আসিমেট্রিক লেক্সিকো- সেম্যান্ডিক সম্পর্ক সনাক্ত করার জন্য দুই টেনসার মডেল', 'cs': 'Model dvojitého napínače pro detekci asymetrických Lexiko-Sémantických vztahů', 'et': 'Kahe pingega mudel asümmeetriliste leksikosemantiliste suhete tuvastamiseks', 'bs': 'Dualni model tenzora za otkrivanje asimetričkih leksičkih i semantičkih odnosa', 'fi': 'Kaksijännitysmalli epäsymmetristen Lexico-Semanttisten suhteiden havaitsemiseksi', 'jv': 'Dual Tenor model para detect AsMmetic Leksio-semanti Relations', 'sk': 'Model z dvojnim napetostnikom za odkrivanje asimetričnih lexično-semantičnih odnosov', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודל טנסור כפול לגלות יחסים אסימטריים לקסיקו-סמנטיים', 'bo': 'Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations Detecting Dual Tensor Model for Detecting Asymmetric Lexico-Semantic Relations'}
{'en': 'Detection of lexico-semantic relations is one of the central tasks of computational semantics. Although some fundamental relations (e.g., hypernymy) are asymmetric, most existing models account for asymmetry only implicitly and use the same concept representations to support detection of symmetric and asymmetric relations alike. In this work, we propose the Dual Tensor model, a neural architecture with which we explicitly model the asymmetry and capture the translation between unspecialized and specialized word embeddings via a pair of tensors. Although our Dual Tensor model needs only unspecialized embeddings as input, our experiments on hypernymy and meronymy detection suggest that it can outperform more complex and resource-intensive models. We further demonstrate that the model can account for polysemy and that it exhibits stable performance across languages.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف العلاقات المعجمية والدلالية أحد المهام المركزية للدلالات الحسابية. على الرغم من أن بعض العلاقات الأساسية (على سبيل المثال ، Hypernymy) غير متناظرة ، فإن معظم النماذج الحالية تفسر عدم التناسق بشكل ضمني فقط وتستخدم نفس تمثيلات المفهوم لدعم اكتشاف العلاقات المتماثلة وغير المتماثلة على حدٍ سواء. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذج Dual Tensor ، وهي بنية عصبية نقوم بها صراحة بنمذجة عدم التناسق والتقاط الترجمة بين حفلات الزفاف غير المتخصصة والمتخصصة عبر زوج من الموترات. على الرغم من أن نموذجنا Dual Tensor لا يحتاج إلا إلى حفلات الزفاف غير المتخصصة كمدخلات ، فإن تجاربنا في الكشف عن التشابه المفرط والكشف عن الأسماء المرئية تشير إلى أنه يمكن أن يتفوق على النماذج الأكثر تعقيدًا وكثافة الموارد. نوضح كذلك أن النموذج يمكن أن يفسر تعدد المعاني وأنه يُظهر أداءً مستقرًا عبر اللغات.', 'pt': 'A detecção de relações léxico-semânticas é uma das tarefas centrais da semântica computacional. Embora algumas relações fundamentais (por exemplo, hipernímia) sejam assimétricas, a maioria dos modelos existentes considera a assimetria apenas implicitamente e usa as mesmas representações de conceito para apoiar a detecção de relações simétricas e assimétricas. Neste trabalho, propomos o modelo Dual Tensor, uma arquitetura neural com a qual modelamos explicitamente a assimetria e capturamos a tradução entre embeddings de palavras não especializadas e especializadas por meio de um par de tensores. Embora nosso modelo Dual Tensor precise apenas de embeddings não especializados como entrada, nossos experimentos sobre detecção de hipernímia e meronímia sugerem que ele pode superar modelos mais complexos e com uso intensivo de recursos. Demonstramos ainda que o modelo pode dar conta da polissemia e que apresenta desempenho estável em todas as linguagens.', 'fr': "La détection des relations lexico-sémantiques est l'une des tâches centrales de la sémantique computationnelle. Bien que certaines relations fondamentales (par exemple, l'hypernymie) soient asymétriques, la plupart des modèles existants ne tiennent compte de l'asymétrie qu'implicitement et utilisent les mêmes représentations conceptuelles pour soutenir la détection de relations symétriques et asymétriques. Dans ce travail, nous proposons le modèle Dual Tensor, une architecture neuronale avec laquelle nous modélisons explicitement l'asymétrie et capturons la traduction entre les intégrations de mots non spécialisés et spécialisés via une paire de tenseurs. Bien que notre modèle Dual Tensor ne nécessite que des intégrations non spécialisées en entrée, nos expériences sur la détection de l'hypernymie et de la méronymie suggèrent qu'il peut surpasser les modèles plus complexes et gourmands en ressources. Nous démontrons également que le modèle peut tenir compte de la polysémie et qu'il présente des performances stables dans toutes les langues.", 'es': 'La detección de las relaciones léxico-semánticas es una de las tareas centrales de la semántica computacional. Aunque algunas relaciones fundamentales (por ejemplo, la hipernemia) son asimétricas, la mayoría de los modelos existentes tienen en cuenta la asimetría solo de forma implícita y utilizan las mismas representaciones conceptuales para apoyar la detección de relaciones simétricas y asimétricas por igual. En este trabajo, proponemos el modelo Dual Tensor, una arquitectura neuronal con la que modelamos explícitamente la asimetría y capturamos la traducción entre incrustaciones de palabras no especializadas y especializadas a través de un par de tensores. Aunque nuestro modelo de doble tensor solo necesita incorporaciones no especializadas como entrada, nuestros experimentos sobre la detección de hipernemia y meronimia sugieren que puede superar a los modelos más complejos y que consumen muchos recursos. Además, demostramos que el modelo puede tener en cuenta la polisemia y que presenta un rendimiento estable en todos los idiomas.', 'ja': 'レキシコ-セマンティック関係の検出は、計算意味論の中心的なタスクの一つである。いくつかの基本的な関係（例えば、ハイパーニミー）は非対称であるが、ほとんどの既存のモデルは非対称性を暗黙的に説明し、同じ概念表現を使用して、対称関係と非対称関係の検出を同様にサポートする。この研究では、非対称性を明示的にモデル化し、一対のテンソルを介して非専門化された単語埋め込みと専門化された単語埋め込みの間の翻訳を取り込むニューラルアーキテクチャであるデュアルテンソルモデルを提案します。当社のデュアルテンソルモデルは、入力として非専門化された埋め込みのみを必要としますが、ハイパーニミーとメロニミー検出の実験では、より複雑でリソースの多いモデルよりも優れたパフォーマンスを発揮できることが示唆されています。さらに、モデルが多義性を説明でき、言語間で安定したパフォーマンスを示すことを実証します。', 'ru': 'Обнаружение лексико-семантических отношений является одной из центральных задач вычислительной семантики. Хотя некоторые фундаментальные отношения (например, гипернимия) являются асимметричными, большинство существующих моделей учитывают асимметрию только косвенно и используют одни и те же концептуальные представления для поддержки обнаружения как симметричных, так и асимметричных отношений. В этой работе мы предлагаем модель двойного тензора, нейронную архитектуру, с помощью которой мы явно моделируем асимметрию и захватываем перевод между неспециализированными и специализированными вложениями слов с помощью пары тензоров. Хотя наша модель двойного тензора требует только неспециализированных вложений в качестве входных данных, наши эксперименты по обнаружению гипернимии и меронимии показывают, что она может превосходить более сложные и ресурсоемкие модели. Мы далее демонстрируем, что модель может быть учтена для полисемии и что она демонстрирует стабильную производительность между языками.', 'zh': '检词法语义者,计语义学之一也。 虽(本hypernymy)非其称,大抵隐式说不称,同名相非对称。 于此之事,吾为双张量模,此一神经架构也,吾以显式建模不对称性,因双张量获非专用词嵌之平移。 虽双张量模止须异嵌为输,然对超张量与超音速检之实验明,其优于复杂、资源密集型者也。 吾益证之,当模形可以解多义词,而其出跨言语之稳定性能。', 'hi': 'लेक्सिको-शब्दार्थ संबंधों का पता लगाना कम्प्यूटेशनल शब्दार्थ के केंद्रीय कार्यों में से एक है। यद्यपि कुछ मौलिक संबंध (उदाहरण के लिए, हाइपरनिमी) असममित हैं, अधिकांश मौजूदा मॉडल केवल स्पष्ट रूप से विषमता के लिए खाते हैं और सममित और असममित संबंधों का समान रूप से पता लगाने का समर्थन करने के लिए एक ही अवधारणा प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करते हैं। इस काम में, हम दोहरी टेंसर मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक तंत्रिका वास्तुकला जिसके साथ हम स्पष्ट रूप से विषमता को मॉडल करते हैं और टेंसर की एक जोड़ी के माध्यम से विशेष और विशेष शब्द एम्बेडिंग के बीच अनुवाद पर कब्जा करते हैं। यद्यपि हमारे दोहरी टेंसर मॉडल को इनपुट के रूप में केवल विशेषीकृत एम्बेडिंग की आवश्यकता होती है, हाइपरनिमी और मेरोनीमी डिटेक्शन पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि यह अधिक जटिल और संसाधन-गहन मॉडल को पछाड़ सकता है। हम आगे प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि मॉडल पॉलीसेमी के लिए जिम्मेदार हो सकता है और यह भाषाओं में स्थिर प्रदर्शन प्रदर्शित करता है।', 'ga': 'Ceann de thascanna lárnacha an tséimeantaic ríomhaireachtúil is ea caidreamh foclóireachta-shéimeantach a bhrath. Cé go bhfuil roinnt bunchaidrimh (m.sh. hipirimide) neamhshiméadrach, ní thugann formhór na samhlacha atá ann faoi láthair cuntas ar neamhshiméadracht ach go hintuigthe agus úsáideann siad na léirithe coincheapa céanna chun tacú le caidreamh siméadrach agus neamhshiméadrach araon a bhrath. Sa saothar seo, molaimid an tsamhail Dé-Tensor, ailtireacht néarúil lena ndéanaimid samhaltú sainráite ar an neamhshiméadracht agus a ndéanaimid an t-aistriúchán idir leabaithe focal neamhspeisialaithe agus sainithe trí phéire teanntóirí a ghabháil. Cé nach bhfuil ach leabaithe neamhspeisialaithe ag teastáil ónár múnla Dé-Tensor mar ionchur, tugann ár dturgnaimh ar bhrath hipearinimice agus meiriniúna le fios gur féidir leis dul i bhfeidhm ar shamhlacha níos casta agus níos déine ó thaobh acmhainní de. Léirímid freisin gur féidir leis an tsamhail cuntas a thabhairt ar ilghnéitheach agus go léiríonn sé feidhmíocht chobhsaí trasna teangacha.', 'ka': 'ლექსიკჲ-ჟვმანტიკური პრობლემენტიკების განსახულება არის კომპუტაციალური სემანტიკის ცენტრალური დავალებების ერთი. თუმცა რამდენიმე ფუნდამეტური შესახებ (მაგალითად, ჰიპერნიმი) არსებობენ, უფრო მხოლოდ არსებობს მოდელების შესახებ მხოლოდ არსებობით და იგივე კონცექტის გამოყენება სიმტერრიული და არსებობითი ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მუშაობთ ეუალური ტენსორის მოდელი, ნეიროლური არქტიქტიკური, რომელიც ჩვენ განვითარებით აციმეტრიის მოდელია და დავწეროთ განსხვავება არსპეციალური და სპეციალური სიტყვების შე თუმცა ჩვენი ეუალური ტენსორის მოდელი უნდა მხოლოდ სპეციალური ინბედინგიები იჭირდება, ჩვენი ექსპერიმები ჰიპერნიმის და მეპრონიმის განახლების შესაძლებელია, რომ ის შეუძლია უფრო კომპ ჩვენ უფრო დავიწყებთ, რომ მოდელის შესაძლებელია პოლისემის შესახებ და რომ ის გამოჩვენებს სტაბლური მუშაობა ენების განმავლობაში.', 'hu': 'A lexiko-szemantikai kapcsolatok felismerése a számítástechnika egyik központi feladata. Bár néhány alapvető kapcsolat (pl. hipernímia) aszimmetrikus, a legtöbb meglévő modell csak implicit módon magyarázza az aszimmetriát, és ugyanazokat a fogalmi reprezentációkat használja a szimmetrikus és aszimmetrikus kapcsolatok észlelésére egyaránt. Ebben a munkában a Dual Tensor modellt javasoljuk, egy neurális architektúrát, amellyel kifejezetten modellezzük az aszimmetriát, és egy tenzorpár segítségével rögzítjük a nem speciális és speciális szóbeágyazások közötti fordítást. Bár a Dual Tensor modellünknek csak specifikálatlan beágyazásokra van szüksége bemenetként, a hipernímia és a meronymia detektálásával végzett kísérleteink azt sugallják, hogy az összetettebb és erőforrás-igényesebb modelleket képes felülmúlni. Bemutatjuk továbbá, hogy a modell képes a poliszémiára, és stabil teljesítményt mutat a nyelvek között.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση λεξικού-σημασιολογικών σχέσεων είναι ένα από τα κεντρικά καθήκοντα της υπολογιστικής σημασιολογίας. Αν και ορισμένες θεμελιώδεις σχέσεις (π.χ. υπερνύμια) είναι ασύμμετρες, τα περισσότερα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα εξηγούν την ασυμμετρία μόνο έμμεσα και χρησιμοποιούν τις ίδιες αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών για να υποστηρίξουν την ανίχνευση συμμετρικών και ασύμμετρων σχέσεων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε το μοντέλο διπλής έντασης, μια νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική με την οποία μοντελοποιούμε ρητά την ασυμμετρία και συλλαμβάνουμε τη μετάφραση μεταξύ μη εξειδικευμένων και εξειδικευμένων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων μέσω ενός ζεύγους τενόρων. Αν και το μοντέλο διπλού Tensor μας χρειάζεται μόνο μη εξειδικευμένες ενσωματώσεις ως εισαγωγή, τα πειράματά μας στην ανίχνευση υπερνύμης και μερωνυμίας δείχνουν ότι μπορεί να ξεπεράσει πιο πολύπλοκα και εντατικά μοντέλα πόρων. Αποδεικνύουμε περαιτέρω ότι το μοντέλο μπορεί να εξηγήσει την πολυσημία και ότι παρουσιάζει σταθερή απόδοση σε όλες τις γλώσσες.', 'it': "La rilevazione delle relazioni lessico-semantiche è uno dei compiti centrali della semantica computazionale. Sebbene alcune relazioni fondamentali (ad esempio, ipernimia) siano asimmetriche, la maggior parte dei modelli esistenti rappresentano l'asimmetria solo implicitamente e utilizzano lo stesso concetto di rappresentazione per supportare la rilevazione di relazioni simmetriche e asimmetriche allo stesso modo. In questo lavoro, proponiamo il modello Dual Tensor, un'architettura neurale con la quale modelliamo esplicitamente l'asimmetria e catturiamo la traduzione tra embedding di parole non specializzate e specializzate tramite una coppia di tensori. Anche se il nostro modello Dual Tensor necessita solo di incorporazioni non specializzate come input, i nostri esperimenti sul rilevamento di ipernimia e meronimia suggeriscono che può superare modelli più complessi e ad alta intensità di risorse. Dimostriamo inoltre che il modello può spiegare la polisemia e che mostra prestazioni stabili in tutte le lingue.", 'kk': 'Лексико- семантикалық қатынастарды анықтау - компьютерлік семантикалық негізгі тапсырмалардың бірі. Бірақ кейбір негізгі қатынастар (мысалы, гиперним) асимметриялық болса да, барлық моделдердің көпшілігі асимметриялық үшін тек қана симметриялық және асимметриялық қатынастарды анықтау үшін бір концепциялық қатынастарды қо Бұл жұмыс ішінде, екі тенсор үлгісін, невралдық архитектурасын таңдап, асимметрияны түсіндіріп, өзгертілмеген және өзгертілмеген сөздер арасындағы аудармасын бірнеше тенсорлар арқылы түсіндіріп, тү Екінші тенсор үлгісіміздің тек енгізілмеген енгізіміз керек болса да, біздің гипернимді және меронимді анықтау тәжірибелеріміз оның көптеген және ресурстардың тең үлгілерінен артық болуын ше Біз басқа үлгі полицемия дегенді көрсетеді және ол тілдерде стабильді істеу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Leksiko-semantinių santykių nustatymas yra viena pagrindinių kompiuterinės semantikos užduočių. Nors kai kurie pagrindiniai santykiai (pvz., hipernimija) yra asimetriški, dauguma esamų modelių reiškia asimetriją tik netiesiogiai ir naudoja tas pačias koncepcijas, kad būtų galima nustatyti ir simetriškus, ir asimetriškus santykius. Šiame darbe siūlome dvejopo tenzorio model į, neurologinę architektūrą, su kuria aiškiai modeliuojame asimetriją ir gauname vertimą tarp nespecializuotų ir specializuotų žodžių įterpimo per dviejų tempiklių porą. Nors mūsų dviejų tenorių modeliui reikia tik specializuotų įdėjimų kaip įdėjimo, mūsų eksperimentai dėl hipernimijos ir meronimijos nustatymo rodo, kad jis gali viršyti sudėtingesnius ir ištekliams imlius modelius. Be to, mes įrodome, kad modelis gali atspindėti polisemiją ir kad jis rodo stabilius įvairių kalbų rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan hubungan leksiko-semantik adalah salah satu tugas pusat semantik komputasi. Walaupun beberapa hubungan dasar (contohnya, hipernimi) tidak simetrik, kebanyakan model yang wujud menganggap asimetri hanya secara implicit dan menggunakan perwakilan konsep yang sama untuk menyokong pengesan hubungan simetrik dan asimetrik sama. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan model Dual Tensor, arkitektur saraf dengan mana kami secara eksplicit model asimetri dan tangkap terjemahan antara penyembedding perkataan tidak spesialis dan spesialis melalui pasangan tensor. Walaupun model Dual Tensor kami hanya memerlukan penyembedding tidak spesialis sebagai input, eksperimen kami pada pengesan hypernymy dan meronymy menunjukkan bahawa ia boleh melampaui model yang lebih kompleks dan memaksa sumber. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa model boleh menganggap polisemi dan bahawa ia menunjukkan prestasi yang stabil di seluruh bahasa.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на лексико-семантичните односи е една од централните задачи на компјутатичката семантика. Иако некои фундаментални односи (на пример хипернимија) се асиметрични, повеќето постоечки модели претставуваат асиметрија само имплицитно и ги користат истите претставувања на концептот за поддршка на детекцијата на симетрични и асиметрични односи исто така. Во оваа работа, го предложуваме моделот на Двојен тензор, нервна архитектура со која експлицитно ја моделираме асиметријата и го фативме преводот помеѓу неспецијализираните и специјализираните зборови вградени преку пар тензори. Иако на нашиот двојен тензор модел му требаат само неспецијализирани вложувања како влог, нашите експерименти на хипернимија и меронимија откривање покажуваат дека може да ги надмине комплексните и поинтензивни модели. Понатаму демонстрираме дека моделот може да предизвика полисемија и дека тој покажува стабилни резултати низ јазиците.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കോ- സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടികേന്ദ്രത്തിന്റെ മദ ചില അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ബന്ധുക്കള്\u200d (ഉദാഹരണമായ ഹൈപ്പെര്\u200dനിമേറ്റി) ആസിമെറ്റിക്കാണെങ്കിലും നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d അക്കൌണ്ട് ആസിമെറ്റിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രമേ  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡയല്\u200d ടെന്\u200dസോറിന്\u200dറെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു, ഒരു പുതിയ പ്രധാന ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d, അതിലൂടെ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തി ആസിമീറ നമ്മുടെ ഡ്യൂള്\u200d ടെന്\u200dസോര്\u200d മോഡലിന് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ആവശ്യമുള്ളൂ. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പോലിസെമിയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നതും, ഭാഷകളില്\u200d മ', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta ta’ relazzjonijiet lexikosemantiċi hija waħda mill-kompiti ċentrali tas-semantika komputattiva. Għalkemm xi relazzjonijiet fundamentali (e ż. ipernimja) huma asimetriċi, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli eżistenti jirrappreżentaw asimetrija impliċitament biss u jużaw l-istess rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kunċett biex jappoġġjaw l-iskoperta ta’ relazzjonijiet simetriċi u asimetriċi bl-istess mod. F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu l-mudell tat-Tensor Doppju, arkitettura newrali li biha nimmudellaw b’mod espliċitu l-asimetrija u nqabdu t-traduzzjoni bejn inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem mhux speċjalizzati u speċjalizzati permezz ta’ par ta’ tensuri. Although our Dual Tensor model needs only unspecialized embeddings as input, our experiments on hypernymy and meronymy detection suggest that it can outperform more complex and resource-intensive models.  Aħna nippruvaw ukoll li l-mudell jista’ jikkunsidra l-poliżimja u li juri prestazzjoni stabbli fil-lingwi kollha.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av lexico-semantiske relasjonar er ein av dei sentrale oppgåvene i datasemantikk. Selv om nokre grunnleggjande forhold (f.eks. hypernimus) er asymmetriske, er det mest eksisterande modellerkontoen for asymmetrisk berre implisitt og bruk same konseptrepresentasjonar for å støtta oppdaging av symmetriske og asymmetriske forhold som liknar. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi den Dual Tensor-modellen, eit neuralarkitektur som vi eksplisisk modeller asymmetrien og hentar omsetjinga mellom ikkje spesialiserte og spesialiserte ordinnbygging gjennom ei par tensorer. Selv om vår Dual Tensor-modell treng berre ikkje spesialiserte innbygging som inndata, vil eksperimentene våre på hypernymen og meronime-oppdaging tyder på at det kan utføra meir komplekse og ressursintensivne modeller. Vi viser meir at modellen kan rekna på polysemi og at den viser stabil utvikling på språk.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie relacji leksyko-semantycznych jest jednym z głównych zadań semantyki obliczeniowej. Chociaż niektóre relacje fundamentalne (np. hipernimia) są asymetryczne, większość istniejących modeli uwzględnia asymetrię tylko domyślnie i używa tych samych reprezentacji koncepcyjnych, aby wspierać wykrywanie relacji symetrycznych i asymetrycznych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy model Dual Tensor, architekturę neuronową, za pomocą której wyraźnie modelujemy asymetrię i uchwycamy tłumaczenie między niespecjalizowanymi i specjalistycznymi osadzeniami słów za pomocą pary tenzorów. Chociaż nasz model Dual Tensor wymaga tylko niespecjalizowanych osadzeń jako danych wejściowych, nasze eksperymenty dotyczące wykrywania hipernimii i meronimii sugerują, że może on przewyższać bardziej złożone i zasobochłonne modele. Ponadto pokazujemy, że model może uwzględniać polisemię i że wykazuje stabilną wydajność w różnych językach.', 'mn': 'Лексико-семантийн харилцааны тодорхойлолт нь тооцоололтын семантикийн нэг төвөгтэй ажил юм. Гэхдээ зарим үндсэн харилцаа (жишээ нь гиперним) нь асимметрик, ихэнх оршиж байгаа загварууд нь асимметрийн хувьд зөвхөн адилхан ойлголтыг ашиглаж, ижил ойлголтын хувьд симметрик болон асимметрийн харилцааныг олж мэдэхэд тусалдаг Энэ ажил дээр бид хоёр давхар тенсор загварыг санал болгож, мэдрэлийн архитектурыг тодорхой хэлбэрээр загварлан асимметрийг загварлаж, хуваалцаагүй, онцгой хэлбэргүй үгийг хоёр давхар архитектур ашиглан авч үздэг. Хэдийгээр бидний дундаж тенсор загварын загвар нь зөвхөн тодорхойлогдож буй загваруудыг оролцох хэрэгтэй ч бидний хиперним болон меронимийн олох туршилтууд илүү комплекс болон нөөц бүтээгдэхүүний хүчтэй загваруудыг илүү хийх Бид дараа нь загвар нь полицемийг тодорхойлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь хэл дээр тогтвортой үйл ажиллагааг харуулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Detectarea relațiilor lexico-semantice este una dintre sarcinile centrale ale semanticii computaționale. Deși unele relații fundamentale (de exemplu hipernimia) sunt asimetrice, majoritatea modelelor existente explică asimetria doar implicit și folosesc același concept reprezentând același concept pentru a sprijini detectarea relațiilor simetrice și asimetrice deopotrivă. În această lucrare, propunem modelul Dual Tensor, o arhitectură neurală cu care modelăm în mod explicit asimetria și capturăm traducerea dintre încorporările de cuvinte nespecializate și specializate printr-o pereche de tensori. Deși modelul nostru Dual Tensor necesită doar încorporări nespecializate ca intrare, experimentele noastre privind detectarea hipernimiei și a meronimiei sugerează că acesta poate depăși modelele mai complexe și cu resurse intensive. Mai mult, demonstrăm că modelul poate reprezenta polisemie și că prezintă performanțe stabile în toate limbile.', 'si': 'lexico-semantic සම්බන්ධතාවන් හොයාගන්න එකක් තමයි පරිගණික සිමාන්තික විද්\u200dයාවයේ මධ්\u200dයම වැඩේ එකක්. හැබැයි මූලික සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බ මේ වැඩේ අපි දූල් ටෙන්සර් මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, න්\u200dයූරල් ස්ථාපනයක්, ඒ වගේම අපි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයෙන් අසිමිත්\u200dරීය සහ විශේෂි අපේ දූල් ටෙන්සර් මෝඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ඇතුළුම් විතරයි, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය හා මෙරෝනිමි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තියෙනව අපි තව ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා මොඩේල් එක පොලිසිමියා ගැන හිතන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒ වගේම ඒක භාෂාවල් වල ස්ථ', 'so': 'Detection of lexico-semantic relations is one of the central tasks of computational semantics.  In kastoo xiriir aasaasi ah (tusaale ahaan hypernymi) ay yihiin asymmetic, inta badan samooyinka jiraan waxay ku xisaabiyaan asymmetri oo kaliya oo ay u isticmaalaan qaab isku mid ah si ay u caawiyaan aqoonsiga isku xiriirka iyo asymmetri. Shaqadan, waxaan soo jeedaynaa modelka labaad ee Tensor, kaas oo ah dhismaha neuro ee aan si cad u sameyno asymmetriyada, waxaana qabsan karnaa turjumaadka u dhexeeya hadalka aan la aqoonsan iyo gaar u lahayno oo lagu soo diro labo noocyo. In kastoo modelkeenna labaad ee labaad uu u baahan yahay mid aan la aqoonsan oo kaliya, imtixaankayada ku saabsan jaamacadda iyo cadaynta meronimada waxay ka muuqan karaan in ay sameyn karto qaababka adag iyo waxyaabaha intensive ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in muusikadu uu xisaab ku sameyn karo polysemi iyo in ay muuqato muuqashada si adag oo luqadaha oo dhan.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje leksikossemantičkih odnosa je jedan od centralnih zadataka kompjuterskih semantika. Iako su neki osnovni odnosi (npr. hipernimi) asimetrični, većina postojećih modela računa za asimetriju samo implicitno i koristi iste predstave koncepta kako bi podržali otkrivanje simetričkih i asimetričkih odnosa. U ovom poslu predlažemo model dvostrukog tenzora, neuralnu arhitekturu s kojom bismo izrazito modelili asimetriju i uhvatili prevod između neopecijalizovanih i specijalizovanih reči ugrađenja putem par tenzora. Iako naš model Dualnog Tenzora treba samo neobične integracije kao ulaz, naši eksperimenti na hipernimu i meronimi pokazuju da može izvršiti kompleksnije i intenzivnije modele resursa. Dalje pokazujemo da model može računati za polizmu i da pokazuje stabilnu predstavu na jezicima.', 'sv': 'Detektering av lexiko-semantiska relationer är en av de centrala uppgifterna i beräkningsemantiken. Även om vissa grundläggande relationer (t.ex. hypernymi) är asymmetriska, redovisar de flesta befintliga modeller asymmetri endast implicit och använder samma konceptrepresentationer för att stödja detektering av symmetriska och asymmetriska relationer. I detta arbete föreslår vi Dual Tensor-modellen, en neural arkitektur med vilken vi explicit modellerar asymmetrin och fångar översättningen mellan ospecialiserade och specialiserade ordinbäddningar via ett par tensorer. Även om vår Dual Tensor-modell endast behöver ospecialiserade inbäddningar som indata tyder våra experiment på hypernymy- och meronymidetektering på att den kan överträffa mer komplexa och resursintensiva modeller. Vi visar vidare att modellen kan redogöra för polysemi och att den uppvisar stabil prestanda över olika språk.', 'ur': 'لکسیکو-سیمانٹی رابطہ کا تلاش کرنا محاسباتی سیمانٹی کے مرکزی کاموں میں سے ایک ہے. اگرچہ بعض بنیادی رابطہ (جیسا کہ ہیرنیمی) برابر ہیں، بہت سے موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود مو اس کام میں ہم دوئل ٹنسور موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک نئورل معمار جس کے ذریعہ ہم مضبوط طور پر آسیمتریکی موڈل کرتے ہیں اور غیر مخصوص اور مخصوص کلمات کے درمیان ترجمہ کو پکڑتے ہیں ایک ٹنسور کے ذریعہ۔ اگرچہ ہمارے دوئل ٹنسور موڈل صرف غیر مشخص انڈینگ کی ضرورت ہے، ہماری آزمائش ہیپر نیمی اور مرونمیی آزمائش کے ذریعہ ہے کہ یہ اس سے زیادہ پیچیدہ اور سراسر زیادہ مضبوط موڈل کرسکتا ہے۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ موڈل پولیسیسی کے لئے حساب کرسکتا ہے اور یہ زبانوں میں ثابت قدم کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'லெக்சிகோ-பெமான்டிக் தொடர்புகள் கண்டறிதல் கணிப்பு கணிப்பாக கணிப்பாக கணக்கிடு அரைப்புகளின் மத்திய பணிகள். சில அடிப்படையான தொடர்புகள் (உதாரணமாக hypernymy) ஆசிம்மெட்ரிக்காக இருந்தாலும் பெரும்பாலும் இருக்கும் மாதிரிகளின் கணக்கு பாதுகாப்பில் மட்டும் தெரியாத மற்றும இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இரண்டு டென்சார் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், ஒரு புதிய பாதுகாப்பு கட்டுப்பாடு, அதைக் கொண்டு நாம் வெளிப்படையாக மாதிரி மற்றும் ஒரு ஜோட எங்கள் இரட்டை டென்சார் மாதிரி உள்ளீட்டில் மட்டும் தேவையில்லாத உள்ளீடுகளை மட்டும் தேவைப்படுமானாலும், எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்பு மேலும் சிக்கல் மற்றும நாம் மாதிரி பலசீமி கணக்கிட முடியும் மற்றும் அது மொழிகளில் நிலையான செயல்பாட்டை காட்டுகிறது.', 'uz': "Detection of lexico-semantic relations is one of the central tasks of computational semantics.  Agar bir necha asymmetrik huquqlar (masalan hypernyma) asymmetrik, ko'pchilik modellar asymmetri uchun faqat umumiy hisoblanadi va bir xizmatni aniqlash uchun bir xizmatni ishlatish mumkin. Bu ishda biz bir necha tensor modelini tahlil qilamiz. Bu bilan biz asymmetri modelini aniqlab qolamiz va bir necha tensor orqali o'zgarishni tasavvur qilamiz. Agar bizning ikkinchi tensor modeli faqat input sifatida muvaffaqiyatli foydalanuvchilarga kerak bo'lsa, hypernemiya va meronymi aniqlashimizda taʼminlovchi imtiyozlarimiz shu murakkab va Resource intensiv modellarini bajarishi mumkin. Biz yana ko'rsatganimiz, modeli polysemi uchun hisoblash mumkin, va bu tillar tilidagi stabil ish natijasini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện quan hệ ngôn ngữ văn học là một trong những công việc quan trọng của ngữ pháp tính. Mặc dù một số quan hệ cơ bản (v.d., siêu năng) không phù hợp, nhưng hầu hết các mô- đun hiện tại chỉ dựa vào sự không phù hợp và dùng các biểu hiện khái niệm tương tự để hỗ trợ việc xác định các mối quan hệ đối đối đối lập và không đối xứng. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề xuất mô hình kép, một kiến trúc thần kinh mà chúng tôi hiển thị mô tả sự không phù hợp và thu thập dịch giữa sự nhúng vào từ ngữ chưa được chia ra qua một cặp đồng tiền. Mặc dù mô hình kép chỉ cần xuất nhập vào các trường hợp chưa được công bố, thí nghiệm về độ phát hiện siêu năng động và mã hoá cho thấy nó có thể phát triển các mô hình phức tạp và đặc biệt. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng mô- đun này có thể giải thích cho polysemy và nó có trình độ ổn định xuyên ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Откриването на лексико-семантични отношения е една от централните задачи на изчислителната семантика. Въпреки че някои фундаментални отношения (например хипернимия) са асиметрични, повечето съществуващи модели отчитат асиметрията само имплицитно и използват едни и същи концепции, за да подкрепят откриването на симетрични и асиметрични отношения. В тази работа предлагаме модела на двоен тензор, неврална архитектура, с която изрично моделираме асиметрията и улавяме превода между неспециализирани и специализирани словни вграждания чрез чифт тензори. Въпреки че нашият модел се нуждае само от неспециализирани вграждания като вход, нашите експерименти за откриване на хипернимия и меронимия предполагат, че той може да надмине по-сложни и ресурсно-интензивни модели. Освен това демонстрираме, че моделът може да отчита полисемията и че показва стабилна производителност на различните езици.', 'da': 'Detektion af leksiko-semantiske relationer er en af de centrale opgaver i beregningsmæssig semantik. Selvom nogle grundlæggende relationer (f.eks. hypernymi) er asymmetriske, skyldes de fleste eksisterende modeller kun implicit asymmetri og bruger de samme begrebsrepræsentationer til at understøtte detektion af symmetriske og asymmetriske relationer. I dette arbejde foreslår vi Dual Tensor modellen, en neural arkitektur med hvilken vi eksplicit modellerer asymmetrien og fanger oversættelsen mellem uspecialiserede og specialiserede ord indlejringer via et par tensorer. Selvom vores Dual Tensor-model kun kræver uspecialiserede indlejringer som input, tyder vores eksperimenter med hypernymi og meronymi detektion på, at det kan overgå mere komplekse og ressourceintensive modeller. Vi viser endvidere, at modellen kan redegøre for polysemi, og at den udviser stabil ydeevne på tværs af sprog.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje leksikossemantičkih odnosa je jedan od centralnih zadataka računalnih semantika. Iako su neki temeljni odnosi (npr. hipernimu) asimetrični, većina postojećih modela računa za asimetriju samo implicitno i koristi iste predstave koncepta kako bi podržali otkrivanje simetričkih i asimetričkih odnosa. U ovom poslu predlažemo model Dual Tensor, neuralnu arhitekturu s kojom bismo izrazito modelili asimetriju i uhvatili prevod između neopecijalizovanih i specijalizovanih riječi uključenih putem par tenzora. Iako naš model Dual Tensor treba samo neobične integracije kao ulaz, naši eksperimenti na hipernimu i meronimiju pokazuju da može izvršiti kompleksnije i intenzivnije modele resursa. Dalje pokazujemo da model može računati za polizemiju i da pokazuje stabilnu učinku na jezicima.', 'nl': 'Detectie van lexico-semantische relaties is een van de centrale taken van computationele semantiek. Hoewel sommige fundamentele relaties (bijvoorbeeld hyperniemie) asymmetrisch zijn, verklaren de meeste bestaande modellen asymmetrie slechts impliciet en gebruiken dezelfde conceptrepresentaties om de detectie van symmetrische en asymmetrische relaties te ondersteunen. In dit werk stellen we het Dual Tensor model voor, een neurale architectuur waarmee we expliciet de asymmetrie modelleren en de vertaling tussen niet-gespecialiseerde en gespecialiseerde woordinbeddingen vastleggen via een paar tensoren. Hoewel ons Dual Tensor model alleen niet-gespecialiseerde embeddings als input nodig heeft, suggereren onze experimenten met hypernymie en meronymie detectie dat het complexere en resourceintensievere modellen kan overtreffen. We tonen verder aan dat het model polysemie kan verklaren en dat het stabiele prestaties in verschillende talen vertoont.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung lexiko-semantischer Beziehungen ist eine der zentralen Aufgaben der rechnerischen Semantik. Obwohl einige fundamentale Beziehungen (z.B. Hypernymie) asymmetrisch sind, erklären die meisten existierenden Modelle Asymmetrie nur implizit und verwenden dieselben Konzeptdarstellungen, um die Erkennung symmetrischer und asymmetrischer Beziehungen gleichermaßen zu unterstützen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir das Dual Tensor Modell vor, eine neuronale Architektur, mit der wir explizit die Asymmetrie modellieren und die Übersetzung zwischen unspezialisierten und spezialisierten Worteinbettungen über ein Tensorpaar erfassen. Obwohl unser Dual Tensor Modell nur unspezialisierte Einbettungen als Input benötigt, deuten unsere Experimente zur Hypernymie- und Meronymie-Erkennung darauf hin, dass es komplexere und ressourcenintensive Modelle übertreffen kann. Wir zeigen weiter, dass das Modell Polysemie erklären kann und dass es eine stabile Leistung über Sprachen hinweg aufweist.', 'ko': '어휘 어의 관계의 검측은 어의학을 계산하는 핵심 임무 중의 하나다.비록 일부 기본 관계(예를 들어 초어)는 비대칭적이지만 대부분의 기존 모델은 비대칭만을 은밀하게 해석하고 같은 개념 표시를 사용하여 대칭과 비대칭 관계의 검측을 지원한다.이 작업에서 우리는 이중 장량 모델을 제기했다. 이것은 신경 체계 구조이다. 우리는 한 쌍의 장량 현식 모델링을 통해 비대칭성을 형성하고 비전문화와 전문화 단어 삽입 간의 전환을 포착한다.비록 우리의 두 장량 모델은 비특정 삽입을 입력으로 하기만 하면 되지만, 초동명과 인어공주 검측에 대한 실험은 더욱 복잡하고 자원 집약적인 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 보여준다.우리는 이 모델이 다의적 현상을 해석할 수 있고 서로 다른 언어에서 안정적인 성능을 나타낼 수 있음을 한층 더 증명했다.', 'id': 'Deteksi hubungan lexiko-semantis adalah salah satu tugas pusat dari semantik komputasi. Meskipun beberapa hubungan dasar (contohnya, hipernimi) adalah asimetri, kebanyakan model yang ada menganggap asimetri hanya secara implicit dan menggunakan represisi konsep yang sama untuk mendukung deteksi hubungan simetrik dan asimetri sama. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan model Dual Tensor, arsitektur saraf dengan mana kami secara eksplicit model asimetri dan menangkap terjemahan antara pembangunan kata tidak spesialis dan spesialis melalui sepasang tensor. Meskipun model Dual Tensor kita hanya membutuhkan embedding yang tidak spesialis sebagai input, eksperimen kami pada deteksi hipernimi dan meronymy menyarankan bahwa hal ini dapat melampaui model yang lebih kompleks dan memanfaatkan sumber daya. Kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa model dapat memperhitungkan polisemi dan bahwa ia menunjukkan prestasi stabil di seluruh bahasa.', 'fa': 'کشف رابطه\u200cهای لکسیکو-semantic یکی از وظیفه\u200cهای مرکزی semantics محاسبه است. اگرچه بعضی رابطه\u200cهای بنیادی (مثال hypernymy) نابرابر هستند، بیشترین مدل\u200cهای موجود برای نابرابری فقط به طور معمولی و استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای مشابه\u200cای برای پشتیبانی کشف رابطه\u200cهای مشابه و نابرابری مشابه می\u200cشوند. در این کار، ما مدل دو تنسور را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک معماری عصبی که با آن مشخصا مدل آسیمتریک را می\u200cسازیم و ترجمه بین کلمه\u200cهای مخصوص و مخصوص با وجود یک جفت تنسور می\u200cگیریم. اگرچه مدل تنسور دوئولی ما فقط به عنوان ورودی غیر ویژه نیاز دارد، آزمایشات ما در مورد هوپر نیمی و شناسایی مرونیم پیشنهاد می دهند که می تواند مدل های پیچیده\u200cتر و عمده\u200cتر از منابع انجام دهد. ما به بعد نشان می دهیم که مدل می تواند برای پلیسمی حساب کند و این عملکرد ثابت در زبانها نشان می دهد.', 'sw': 'Kugundua mahusiano ya kishindano ya lexico ni moja ya kazi za katikati za mifumo ya hesabu. Ingawa baadhi ya mahusiano ya msingi (kwa mfano, umeme) ni ubunifu, mitindo mengi ya kuwepo yanahesabu kwa ajili ya ulinzi pekee kwa uhakika na kutumia maoni yale yanayofanana ili kusaidia kutambua mahusiano ya kijamii na kimasymmetric yanayofanana. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya Kitensor Dual, ujenzi wa kisasa ambacho tunaonyesha kwa uwazi kuunda mtindo wa kujikinga na kupata tafsiri kati ya maneno yasiyoeleweka na yaliyowekwa maalum kupitia viungo viwili. Ingawa mifano yetu ya Tensor ya Dual inahitaji mabango yasiyo na ufanisi, majaribio yetu kuhusu utambulisho wa umeme na umeme unaonyesha kuwa inaweza kufanya mifano ya kompyuta na yenye rasilimali. Tunaonyesha zaidi kuwa mtindo huu unaweza kuchukua hisia za utamaduni na kwamba inaonyesha maonyesho imara katika lugha mbalimbali.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i marrëdhënieve lexiko-semantike është një nga detyrat qendrore të semantikës llogaritare. Megjithëse disa marrëdhënie themelore (për shembull hiperinimi) janë asimetrike, shumica e modeleve ekzistuese llogariten për asimetri vetëm implicitisht dhe përdorin përfaqësime të njëjta koncept për të mbështetur zbulimin e marrëdhënieve simetrike dhe asimetrike si të njëjtat. Në këtë punë, propozojmë modelin e Tensorit të Dyfishtë, një arkitekturë neurale me të cilën modelojmë eksplicitisht asimetrinë dhe kapim përkthimin midis përfshirjeve të fjalëve të posaçme dhe të specializuara nëpërmjet një çifti tensorësh. Megjithëse modeli ynë i Tensor it të Dyfishtë ka nevojë vetëm për përfshirje të paspecializuara si hyrje, eksperimentet tona mbi hiperiniminë dhe zbulimin e meronimisë sugjerojnë se mund të kalojë modelet më komplekse dhe me shumë burime. Ne demonstrojmë më tej se modeli mund të llogarisë për polizimin dhe se ekspozon shfaqje të qëndrueshme nëpërmjet gjuhëve.', 'tr': 'Leksiko-semantik ilişkilerini tanamak kalkular semantikleriniň esasy zadynyň biridir. Çünkü bazı temel ilişkiler (meselâ, hipernimi) asymmetrik olsa da, köp bar modeller asymmetrik üçin bir şekilde değerlendirmek ve simetrik we asymmetrik ilişkilerin değerlendirmesini desteklemek üçin aynı düşünce temsillerini kullanırlar. Bu işde, biz Dual Tensor nusgasyny teklip edip, nural arhitektegi bilen asymetriýany görkeýän we paýlaşmaýan we spesialistiýan sözler arasynda terjime edip alýarys. Biziň Dual Tensor nusgasymyzda diňe beýleki daşary hökmünde isleýän daşary gerek bolsa, hipernimiň we meronimiň tanyşymyzyň çykyşymyzyň has karmaşık we resurslar-gaty nusgalardan çykyp biljekdigini maslahat berýär. Biz daşary bir nusga polysemi üçin esap biljekdigini we bu nusga dilleriň arasynda stabil ukyplary görkezip biljekdigini görkez.', 'af': "Opdekking van lexico-semantiese relasies is een van die sentrale taak van rekenaarse semantieke. Alhoewel sommige fundamental e relasies (bv. hypernymie) asymmetries is, mees bestaande modellerekening vir asymmetrie slegs inplisiteit en gebruik dieselfde konsepte voorstellings om beskrywing van simetriese en asymmetriese relasies lyk te ondersteun. In hierdie werk, voorstel ons die Dual Tensor model, 'n neurale arkitektuur waarmee ons uitduidelik model die asymetrie en die vertaling tussen onspesialiseerde en spesialiseerde woord inbêding deur 'n paar tensors. Alhoewel ons Dual Tensor model slegs ongespesialiseerde inbêdings as invoer benodig, ons eksperimente op hipernimi en meronimie opdekking voorstel dat dit meer kompleks en hulpbron-intensiewe modele kan uitvoer. Ons wys verder dat die model kan reken vir polisemie en dat dit stabile prestasie oor tale vertoon.", 'am': 'የሌክሲኮ-semantic ግንኙነት ማዕከላዊ ስራዎችን ማግኘት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አንዳንዶቹ የዋና ግንኙነት (ምሳሌ hypernymi) የasymmetric ቢሆኑ፣ አብዛኞቹ ምሳሌዎች ለasymmetry ጥያቄ ብቻ ሳይገልጹ እና በአንድ አካባቢ የሴሜትሪክ እና የኢስምሜትሪክ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት ይጥላሉ፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የሁለተኛ ቴንሶር ሞዴል፣ የናቡር አርካክስቲት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሁለተኛ ቴንስር ሞዴል ምንም እንኳን እንደማያስፈልገው ማውጣት ብቻ ነው፣ ሞክራታችንን በhypernymy እና meronimy ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ ምሳሌው የፖሊሳሚን መቆጣጠር እንዲችል እና በቋንቋዎች ሁሉ የተደላደለውን የድጋፍ ሥራ እንዲያሳየው እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկո-սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերումը հաշվարկների սեմանտիկայի հիմնական խնդիրներից մեկն է: Չնայած որոշ հիմնարար հարաբերությունները (օրինակ հիպերնիմիան) անհամաչափ են, գոյություն ունեցող մոդելների մեծ մասը անհամաչափ հաշվարկում է անհամաչափությունը և օգտագործում է նույն գաղափարը՝ համաչափ և անհամաչափ հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման համար: In this work, we propose the Dual Tensor model, a neural architecture with which we explicitly model the asymmetry and capture the translation between unspecialized and specialized word embeddings via a pair of tensors.  Չնայած մեր երկու տենսորի մոդելը միայն անմասնավոր ներդրումներ է անհրաժեշտ որպես ներդրում, մեր հիպերնիմիայի և մերոնիմիայի հայտնաբերման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այն կարող է գերազանցել ավելի բարդ և ռեսուրսներանսիվ մոդելները Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մոդելը կարող է հաշվի առնել պոլիզեմիան և որ այն ցույց է տալիս հաստատուն արդյունք լեզուների միջև:', 'bn': 'লেক্সিকো-সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্কের সনাক্তি হচ্ছে গণমেন্টিক্সের কেন্দ্রীয় কাজ। যদিও কিছু মৌলিক সম্পর্ক (উদাহরণস্বরূপ হাইপারেনিমেট্রিক), বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান মডেল একাউন্ট কেবলমাত্র গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং একই ধারণার প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব ব্যবহার করে সিম্ এই কাজে আমরা ডুয়াল টেনসার মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, একটি নিউরেল কাঠামোর, যার সাথে আমরা স্পষ্ট ভাবে প্রতিষ্ঠানের উদ্দেশ্যে মডেল করি এবং বিশেষ শব্দের মধ্যে অনুবাদের গ্রহণ করি  Although our Dual Tensor model needs only unspecialized embeddings as input, our experiments on hypernymy and meronymy detection suggest that it can outperform more complex and resource-intensive models.  আমরা আরো প্রদর্শন করছি যে মডেল পলিসেমির জন্য হিসেবে বিবেচনা করতে পারে এবং এটি সারা ভাষায় স্থায়ীভাবে প্রদর্শন করে।', 'az': 'Leksiko-semantik iliŇükil…ôrin keŇüfini hesaplamaq semantikalarńĪnńĪn orta iŇüind…ôn biridir. BazńĪ temel iliŇükiler (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, hipernim) asimetrik olmasńĪna rańümen, √ßox m√∂vcud modell…ôr asimetrik hesabńĪ yalnńĪz imkansńĪz olaraq v…ô simetrik v…ô asimetrik iliŇükilerin keŇüfini d…ôst…ôkl…ôm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô ed…ôrl…ôr. Bu iŇüd…ô, biz Dual Tensor modelini t…ôblińü edirik, bir n√∂ral arhitektura, bu Ňü…ôkild…ô asimetriya modelini a √ßńĪq-aydńĪn modell…ôŇüdirir v…ô bir √ßift tensor vasit…ôsil…ô m…ôŇüńüul edilm…ôy…ôn v…ô √∂zellikli s√∂z arasńĪnda terc√ľm…ô alńĪrńĪq. Dual Tensor modeliyimizin yalnńĪz m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ômiŇü inŇüallarńĪ kimi ehtiyacńĪ olmasńĪna rańümen, hipernimi v…ô meronimi tanńĪmlamasńĪ t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimizin daha kompleks v…ô √ßox q√ľvv…ôtli modell…ôrd…ôn √ľst√ľn olmasńĪnńĪ iddia edir. Daha sonra modell…ôrin √ßoxluńüu hesab ed…ô bil…ôc…ôyini v…ô dill…ôrin arasńĪnda stabil performansńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôr…ôc…ôyini g√∂st…ôririk.', 'ca': "La detecció de les relacions lèxico-semàntiques és una de les tasques centrals de la semàntica computacional. Tot i que algunes relacions fonamentals (per exemple, hipernimia) són asimètriques, la majoria dels models existents només explicen asimetria implícitament i utilitzen les mateixes representacions de concept e per sostenir la detecció de relacions simètriques i asimètriques de la mateixa manera. En aquest treball, proposem el model de doble tensor, una arquitectura neuronal amb la qual modelem explícitament l'asimetria i capturem la traducció entre incorporacions de paraules no especialitzades i especialitzades a través d'un parell de tensors. Tot i que el nostre model de doble tensor només necessita incorporacions no especialitzats com a entrada, els nostres experiments sobre l'hipernimi i la detecció de meronimia suggereixen que pot superar models més complexos i intensivs en recursos. Ens demostram que el model pot tenir en compte la polissima i que mostra un rendiment estable a través de les llengües.", 'et': 'Leksiko-semantiliste suhete tuvastamine on arvutussemantika üks keskseid ülesandeid. Kuigi mõned põhisuhted (nt hüpernüümia) on asümmeetrilised, käsitlevad enamik olemasolevaid mudeleid asümmeetriat vaid kaudselt ja kasutavad sama kontseptsiooni, et toetada sümmeetriliste ja asümmeetriliste suhete tuvastamist. Käesolevas töös pakume välja Dual Tensor mudeli, neuraalse arhitektuuri, millega modelleerime selgesõnaliselt asümmeetriat ja jäädvustame tõlke spetsialiseerimata ja spetsialiseeritud sõna manustamise vahel tensorite paari kaudu. Kuigi meie Dual Tensor mudel vajab sisendina ainult spetsialiseerimata manustamist, näitavad meie hüpernüümia ja meronüümia tuvastamise eksperimendid, et see suudab ületada keerukamaid ja ressursimahukamaid mudeleid. Lisaks näitame, et mudel võib arvestada polüseemia ja et see näitab stabiilset jõudlust kõigis keeltes.', 'cs': 'Detekce lexiko-sémantických vztahů je jednou z hlavních úkolů výpočetní sémantiky. Ačkoli některé základní vztahy (např. hypernymie) jsou asymetrické, většina existujících modelů vysvětluje asymetrii pouze implicitně a používá stejné konceptní reprezentace k podpoře detekce symetrických i asymetrických vztahů. V této práci navrhujeme model Dual Tensor, neuronovou architekturu, se kterou explicitně modelujeme asymetrii a zachycujeme překlad mezi nespecializovanými a specializovanými vloženími slov pomocí páru tenzorů. Ačkoli náš model Dual Tensor potřebuje pouze nespecializované vložení jako vstup, naše experimenty na detekci hypernymie a meronymie naznačují, že může překonat složitější a zdrojově náročné modely. Dále ukazujeme, že model může zohlednit polysemii a že vykazuje stabilní výkon napříč jazyky.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje leksikossemantičkih odnosa je jedan od centralnih zadataka računalnih semantika. Iako su neki osnovni odnosi (npr. hipernimi) asimetrični, većina postojećih modela računa za asimetriju samo implicitno i koristi iste predstave koncepta kako bi podržali otkrivanje simetričkih i asimetričkih odnosa. U ovom poslu predlažemo model dvostrukog tenzora, neuralnu arhitekturu s kojom bismo izrazito modelili asimetriju i uhvatili prevod između neopecijalizovanih i specijalizovanih riječi uključenih putem par tenzora. Iako naš model Dual Tensor treba samo neobične integracije kao ulaz, naši eksperimenti na hipernimu i meronimiju pokazuju da može izvršiti kompleksnije i intenzivnije modele resursa. Dalje pokazujemo da model može računati za polizmu i da pokazuje stabilnu izvedbu na jezicima.', 'fi': 'Leksiko-semanttisten suhteiden tunnistaminen on yksi laskennallisen semantiikan keskeisistä tehtävistä. Vaikka jotkin perussuhteet (esim. hypernyymia) ovat epäsymmetrisiä, useimmat olemassa olevat mallit kuvaavat epäsymmetriaa vain implisiittisesti ja käyttävät samoja käsitteitä tukemaan symmetristen ja epäsymmetristen suhteiden havaitsemista. Tässä työssä ehdotamme Dual Tensor -mallia, neuroarkkitehtuuria, jolla mallinnamme epäsymmetriaa ja tallennamme käännöksen spesifioimattomien ja erikoistuneiden sanaupotusten välillä tensoriparin kautta. Vaikka Dual Tensor -mallimme tarvitsee syötteenä vain erikoistumattomia upotuksia, hypernyymia- ja meronyymitunnistuskokeemme viittaavat siihen, että se voi suoriutua monimutkaisempia ja resursseja vaativampia malleja paremmin. Lisäksi osoitamme, että malli pystyy selittämään polysemian ja että sen suorituskyky on vakaa kaikilla kielillä.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé luwih-semanti ngregani iku saben ning tasks tanggal semanti komputer Nanging kabèh akeh basa rak wigatining (t.d. :) Nang gawar iki, kita supoyo model Dual Tenor, architecture Neral sing ngedol karo awak dhéwé kesalahan kanggo nyelarakno tentang karo akeh basa gambaran tanggal nggawe tarjamahan karo pawar sing apik lan padha winih sing apik dhéwé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntukno ngono kuwi model iso disenyong nggawe polisemi lan ngono kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo langgar.', 'ha': "Ina gane cewa masu husũma na Leksiko yana daga aikin na tsakanin matsayin. Akwai da wasu dangantaka masu bincike (misali, Hyernymi) sun zama asymmetic, ko kuwa mafi yawansa misalin masu jira yana ƙidãya wa asymmetri kawai da buƙata kuma yana amfani da shaidar kwamfyuta don ka iya ƙara ganin dangano na jammetriki da asymmetric daidai. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗar da misalin na Dual-Tsarin, wata matsayin neura wanda Muke motsa, da shi, shirin asymmetiri mai bayyanãwa kuma mu kãma fassarar sarrafiya tsakanin da ba'a da aka faɗa maganar da aka ƙayyade shi ba da sauri biyu. Ingawa misalinmu na Dual-Tesor yana da amfani kawai da tsari waɗanda ba su iya lissafa ba kamar a shiga, kuma jarrabananmu na kan gane surori da surori na musamman za'a iya samun misãlai masu kamfata da masu ƙaranci. Tuna bayan wani misalin ya iya lissafa da misalin mutane, kuma yana samun karatun mai tabbatarwa a cikin harshen.", 'he': 'גילוי יחסים לקסיקו-סמנטיים הוא אחד המשימות המרכזיות של סמנטיקה מחשבית. למרות שיש מערכות יחסים בסיסיות (למשל היפרנימיה) אסימטריות, רוב הדוגמנים הנוכחים מחשבות לאסימטריה רק באופן מיותר ומשתמשים באותו מושג כדי לתמוך בזיהוי יחסים סימטריים ואסימטריים. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים את דוגמנית טנסור כפול, ארכיטקטורה עצבית שבה אנו דוגמנים באופן ברור את האסימטריה ולתפוס את התרגום בין מילים בלתי מיוחדות ומיוחדות באמצעות זוג של טנסורים. למרות שמודל הטנסור הכפול שלנו זקוק רק לתכניות בלתי מיוחדות כתוצאה, הניסויים שלנו על היפרנימיה וגילוי מרונימיה מציעים שהוא יכול להתגבר על מודלים מורכבים יותר ויותר משאבים אינטנסיביים. אנו גם מציגים שהמודל יכול לחשבון על פוליזמיה והוא מציג ביצועים יציבים בכל שפות.', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje leksikosemantičnih relacij je ena od osrednjih nalog računalniške semantike. Čeprav so nekateri temeljni odnosi (npr. hipernimija) asimetrični, večina obstoječih modelov uporablja asimetrijo le implicitno in uporablja iste konceptne reprezentacije za podporo odkrivanju simetričnih in asimetričnih odnosov. V tem delu predlagamo model dvojnega napetostnika, nevronsko arhitekturo, s katero eksplicitno modeliramo asimetrijo in zajamemo prevod med nespecializiranimi in specializiranimi besednimi vdelavami preko parov tensorjev. Čeprav naš model z dvojnim napetostnikom potrebuje le nespecializirane vdelave kot vhod, naši eksperimenti na odkrivanju hipernimije in meronimije kažejo, da lahko preseže kompleksnejše modele in modele z intenzivnimi viri. Dodatno dokazujemo, da model lahko upošteva polikemijo in da ima stabilno delovanje v vseh jezikih.', 'bo': 'lexico-semantic relations་རྟོགས་ནི་རྩིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་དབུས་བཀོད་གྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་ཞིག་རེད། རྨན་གཞི་རྩ་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ལ་ཤས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། hipernymy་ནི་asymmetric་ཡིན་ནའང་མ་འདུག In this work, we propose the Dual Tensor model, a neural architecture with which we explicitly model the asymmetry and capture the translation between unspecialized and specialized word embeddings via a pair of tensors. Name Although our Dual Tensor model needs only unspecialized embeddings as input, our experiments on hypernymy and meronymy detection suggest that it can outperform more complex and resource-intensive models. ང་ཚོས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དག་གི་སྔོན་ཆེ་ལ་རྩིས་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Relation Paths in Neural Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'دمج مسارات العلاقة في استخراج العلاقة العصبية', 'pt': 'Incorporando caminhos de relação na extração de relações neurais', 'fr': "Incorporation de chemins de relation dans l'extraction de relations", 'es': 'Incorporación de trayectorias de relación en la extracción de', 'ja': 'ニューラルリレーション抽出にリレーションパスを組み込む', 'ru': 'Включение путей связи в извлечение нейронной связи', 'ga': 'Cosáin Chaidrimh a Ionchorprú in Eastóscadh Gaol Néaraigh', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण में संबंध पथ को शामिल करना', 'zh': '于神经提合路径', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση διαδρομών σχέσης στην εξαγωγή νευρωνικών σχέσεων', 'hu': 'Kapcsolat útvonalak beépítése a neurális kapcsolat extrakcióba', 'it': "Incorporare percorsi di relazione nell'estrazione di relazione neurale", 'kk': 'Нейралық қатынас тарқатуында қатынас жолдарын ендіру', 'lt': 'Įtraukti santykinius kelius į nervinių santykių ekstrakciją', 'mk': 'Вклучувајќи патеки за врски во екстракција на нервните врски', 'ms': 'Mengangkutkan Laluan Hubungan dalam Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d ബന്ധപാതകങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Inkorporazzjoni ta’ Rotot ta’ Relazzjoni fl-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл харилцааны гадагшлуулалтын харилцааны зам', 'pl': 'Włączenie ścieżek relacji do ekstrakcji relacji neuronowych', 'sr': 'Uključujući puteve veze u izvlačenju neuroloških odnosa', 'ro': 'Incorporarea căilor de relație în extracția relației neurale', 'no': 'Inkorporering av relasjonsbaner i utpakking av nøyralrelasjon', 'so': 'Jidooyinka xiriirka ee ka soo guuridda Neural', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ මාර්ගය නිර්මාණය සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය', 'sv': 'Införlivande av relationsvägar i extraktion av neural relation', 'ta': 'புதிய தொடர்பு பாதைகளை பிரித்து வெளியீடு', 'ur': 'نیورال رابطہ اٹھانے میں رابطہ رابطہ اٹھانے والی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Có liên quan đến các chi tiết về tim mạch', 'da': 'Inddragelse af relationer veje i neural relation ekstraktion', 'de': 'Einbeziehung von Beziehungspfaden in die Extraktion neuronaler Beziehungen', 'bg': 'Включване на релационни пътища в извличането на неврални отношения', 'nl': 'Opnemen van relatiepaden in neurale relatierextractie', 'hr': 'Uključujući puteve veze u izvlačenju neuroloških odnosa', 'sw': 'Kuingiza njia za Kuhusiana katika Kutengwa kwa Utamaduni wa Neural', 'id': 'Menginkorporasi Laluan Hubungan dalam Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural', 'tr': 'Niýal Maglumaty Açmak', 'af': 'Inkorporeer Relasie Paths in Neurale Relasie Uitpakking', 'sq': 'Duke përfshirë rrugët e marrëdhënieve në ekstraksionin e marrëdhënieve nervore', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Նյարդային հարաբերությունների արտադրման մեջ հարաբերության ուղիներ ներառելը', 'ko': '신경 관계 추출 중의 관계 경로 합병', 'fa': 'راههای ارتباطی در استخراج ارتباط عصبی', 'az': 'Nöral İlişkilər Çıqışmasında İlişkil Yolları', 'bn': 'নিউরেল সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ে যোগাযোগ পাথ', 'ca': "Incorporar camins de relació a l'extracció de relació neuronal", 'cs': 'Začlenění vztahových cest do extrakce neuronových vztahů', 'fi': 'Suhteen polkujen sisällyttäminen hermosuhteiden uuttamiseen', 'et': 'Seosteede lisamine neuraalsete suhete ekstraheerimisse', 'bs': 'Uključujući puteve veze u izvlačenju neuroloških odnosa', 'sk': 'Vključevanje relacijskih poti v ekstrakcijo živčnih relacij', 'he': 'Incorporating Relation Paths in Neural Relation Extraction', 'ha': 'Incorporating Relation Paths in Neural Relation Extraction', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'bo': 'མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་བ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནང་དུ་ཚུད་མཁན་གྱི་འབྲེལ་ལམ་'}
{'en': 'Distantly supervised relation extraction has been widely used to find novel relational facts from plain text. To predict the relation between a pair of two target entities, existing methods solely rely on those direct sentences containing both entities. In fact, there are also many sentences containing only one of the target entities, which also provide rich useful information but not yet employed by relation extraction. To address this issue, we build inference chains between two target entities via intermediate entities, and propose a path-based neural relation extraction model to encode the relational semantics from both direct sentences and inference chains. Experimental results on real-world datasets show that, our model can make full use of those sentences containing only one target entity, and achieves significant and consistent improvements on relation extraction as compared with strong baselines. The source code of this paper can be obtained from.https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE.\n    ', 'ar': 'تم استخدام استخراج العلاقة تحت الإشراف عن بعد على نطاق واسع للعثور على حقائق علائقية جديدة من نص عادي. للتنبؤ بالعلاقة بين زوج من كيانين مستهدفين ، تعتمد الأساليب الحالية فقط على تلك الجمل المباشرة التي تحتوي على كلا الكيانين. في الواقع ، هناك أيضًا العديد من الجمل التي تحتوي على واحد فقط من الكيانات المستهدفة ، والتي توفر أيضًا معلومات مفيدة غنية ولكن لم يتم استخدامها بعد عن طريق استخراج العلاقة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نبني سلاسل استدلال بين كيانين مستهدفين عبر كيانات وسيطة ، ونقترح نموذجًا لاستخراج العلاقة العصبية قائم على المسار لتشفير الدلالات العلائقية من الجمل المباشرة وسلاسل الاستدلال. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات الواقعية أن نموذجنا يمكنه الاستفادة الكاملة من تلك الجمل التي تحتوي على كيان مستهدف واحد فقط ، ويحقق تحسينات مهمة ومتسقة في استخراج العلاقة مقارنة بخطوط الأساس القوية. يمكن الحصول على الكود المصدري لهذه الورقة من <https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>.', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones supervisada a distancia se ha utilizado ampliamente para encontrar hechos relacionales novedosos a partir de texto sin formato. Para predecir la relación entre un par de dos entidades objetivo, los métodos existentes se basan únicamente en las frases directas que contienen ambas entidades. De hecho, también hay muchas oraciones que contienen solo una de las entidades objetivo, que también proporcionan información útil y rica, pero que aún no se utilizan para la extracción de relaciones. Para abordar este problema, construimos cadenas de inferencia entre dos entidades objetivo a través de entidades intermedias, y proponemos un modelo de extracción de relaciones neuronales basado en rutas para codificar la semántica relacional tanto de oraciones directas como de cadenas de inferencia. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos del mundo real muestran que nuestro modelo puede hacer pleno uso de aquellas frases que contienen solo una entidad objetivo y logra mejoras significativas y consistentes en la extracción de relaciones en comparación con líneas de base sólidas. Puede obtener el código fuente de este artículo en < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'pt': 'A extração de relação supervisionada à distância tem sido amplamente utilizada para encontrar novos fatos relacionais a partir de texto simples. Para prever a relação entre um par de duas entidades alvo, os métodos existentes dependem apenas das sentenças diretas que contêm ambas as entidades. De fato, também existem muitas sentenças contendo apenas uma das entidades alvo, que também fornecem informações úteis ricas, mas ainda não empregadas pela extração de relações. Para resolver esse problema, construímos cadeias de inferência entre duas entidades alvo por meio de entidades intermediárias e propomos um modelo de extração de relação neural baseado em caminho para codificar a semântica relacional de sentenças diretas e cadeias de inferência. Resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados do mundo real mostram que nosso modelo pode fazer uso completo dessas sentenças contendo apenas uma entidade alvo e alcança melhorias significativas e consistentes na extração de relações em comparação com linhas de base fortes. O código-fonte deste artigo pode ser obtido em <https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations supervisée à distance a été largement utilisée pour trouver de nouveaux faits relationnels à partir de texte brut. Pour prédire la relation entre une paire de deux entités cibles, les méthodes existantes s'appuient uniquement sur les phrases directes contenant les deux entités. En fait, il existe également de nombreuses phrases contenant uniquement une des entités cibles, qui fournissent également des informations utiles mais qui ne sont pas encore utilisées par l'extraction de relations. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous construisons des chaînes d'inférence entre deux entités cibles via des entités intermédiaires, et proposons un modèle d'extraction de relation neuronale basé sur des chemins pour coder la sémantique relationnelle à partir de phrases directes et de chaînes d'inférence. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des ensembles de données réels montrent que notre modèle peut utiliser pleinement les phrases contenant une seule entité cible et apporte des améliorations significatives et cohérentes sur l'extraction de relations par rapport à des bases de référence solides. Le code source de ce document peut être obtenu auprès de < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.", 'ja': '遠隔に監督された関係抽出は、プレーンテキストから新規の関係事実を見つけるために広く使用されてきた。 ２つのターゲットエンティティのペア間の関係を予測するために、既存のメソッドは、両方のエンティティを含むそれらの直接文のみに依存する。 実際、ターゲットエンティティの1つのみを含む文も多くあり、豊富な有用な情報も提供しますが、関係抽出ではまだ採用されていません。 この問題に対処するために、中間エンティティを介して2つのターゲットエンティティ間で推論チェーンを構築し、直接文と推論チェーンの両方からの関係意味論を符号化するパスベースの神経関係抽出モデルを提案します。 実世界のデータセットの実験結果は、当社のモデルが1つのターゲットエンティティのみを含む文章を最大限に活用し、強力なベースラインと比較して、関係抽出で大幅かつ一貫した改善を達成できることを示しています。 本稿のソースコードはから入手することができる<https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>。', 'ru': 'Дистанционно контролируемое извлечение отношений широко используется для нахождения новых относительных фактов из обычного текста. Чтобы предсказать связь между парой двух целевых сущностей, существующие методы полагаются исключительно на те прямые предложения, которые содержат обе сущности. На самом деле, есть также много предложений, содержащих только одну из целевых сущностей, которые также предоставляют богатую полезную информацию, но еще не используются путем извлечения отношений. Для решения этой проблемы мы строим цепочки вывода между двумя целевыми сущностями через промежуточные сущности и предлагаем модель извлечения нейронных отношений на основе пути для кодирования реляционной семантики как из прямых предложений, так и цепочек вывода. Экспериментальные результаты на реальных наборах данных показывают, что наша модель может в полной мере использовать те предложения, которые содержат только одну целевую сущность, и достигает значительных и последовательных улучшений в извлечении отношений по сравнению с сильными базовыми линиями. Исходный код этого документа можно получить по адресу<https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>.', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid go forleathan as eastóscadh gaol atá faoi chian-mhaoirseacht chun fíricí nua choibhneasta a aimsiú ó ghnáththéacs. Chun an gaol idir péire de dhá sprioc-eintiteas a thuar, braitheann na modhanna atá ann cheana go hiomlán ar na habairtí díreacha sin ina bhfuil an dá eintiteas. Déanta na fírinne, tá go leor abairtí ann freisin nach bhfuil ach ceann amháin de na sprioc-eintitis iontu, a sholáthraíonn faisnéis shaibhir úsáideach freisin ach nach bhfuil in úsáid fós ag eastóscadh gaol. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, tógaimid slabhraí tátail idir dhá sprioc-eintiteas trí aonáin idirmheánacha, agus molaimid samhail eastósctha caidreamh néar-bhunaithe cosán chun an tséimeantaic choibhneasta a ionchódú ó abairtí díreacha agus slabhraí tátail araon. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair shonraí an fhíorsaoil gur féidir lenár múnla úsáid iomlán a bhaint as na habairtí sin nach bhfuil iontu ach sprioc-aonán amháin, agus go mbaineann sé amach feabhsuithe suntasacha comhsheasmhacha ar eastóscadh caidrimh i gcomparáid le bonnlínte láidre. Is féidir cód foinse an pháipéir seo a fháil ó <https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>.', 'hi': 'दूर पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण व्यापक रूप से सादे पाठ से उपन्यास संबंधपरक तथ्यों को खोजने के लिए इस्तेमाल किया गया है। दो लक्ष्य संस्थाओं की एक जोड़ी के बीच संबंध की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए, मौजूदा तरीके पूरी तरह से उन प्रत्यक्ष वाक्यों पर भरोसा करते हैं जिनमें दोनों इकाइयां होती हैं। वास्तव में, ऐसे कई वाक्य भी हैं जिनमें केवल लक्ष्य संस्थाओं में से एक है, जो समृद्ध उपयोगी जानकारी भी प्रदान करते हैं लेकिन अभी तक संबंध निष्कर्षण द्वारा नियोजित नहीं हैं। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम मध्यवर्ती संस्थाओं के माध्यम से दो लक्ष्य संस्थाओं के बीच अनुमान श्रृंखलाओं का निर्माण करते हैं, और प्रत्यक्ष वाक्यों और अनुमान श्रृंखलाओं दोनों से संबंधपरक शब्दार्थ को एन्कोड करने के लिए एक पथ-आधारित तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि, हमारा मॉडल उन वाक्यों का पूरा उपयोग कर सकता है जिसमें केवल एक लक्ष्य इकाई होती है, और मजबूत बेसलाइन की तुलना में संबंध निष्कर्षण पर महत्वपूर्ण और सुसंगत सुधार प्राप्त करता है। इस पेपर का स्रोत कोड <https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE> से प्राप्त किया जा सकता है।', 'zh': '远程督取已遍于纯文本中求新事实。 为占一双的实体之间,现在方法只依于包含两实体的直句。 多句只含一个实体,这些句子也给富有用信息,但未被关系提取。 立理于两体之间,立一神经于径路,以编码句理之语义。 真实世界数集上之实验结果表明,比于强基线,吾形可以充一体之句,而取显一于关系者也。 本文源代码可得于<https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>。', 'hu': 'A távolról felügyelt kapcsolatok kivonását széles körben használták új kapcsolati tények megtalálására egyszerű szövegből. A két célentitás párja közötti kapcsolat előrejelzésére a meglévő módszerek kizárólag azokra a közvetlen mondatokra támaszkodnak, amelyek mindkét entitást tartalmaznak. Valójában sok mondat is létezik, amely csak az egyik célentitást tartalmazza, és amely szintén gazdag hasznos információt nyújt, de még nem használja a kapcsolatkivonást. A probléma megoldása érdekében köztes entitásokon keresztül két célentitás közötti következtetési láncokat építünk, és javaslatot teszünk egy útvonalalapú neurális kapcsolat extrakciós modellt, amely kódolja a relációs szemantikát mind a közvetlen mondatokból, mind a következtetési láncokból. A valós adatkészleteken végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk teljes mértékben ki tudja használni azokat a mondatokat, amelyek csak egy célentitást tartalmaznak, és jelentős és következetes javulást ér el a kapcsolatkivonásban az erős alapvonalakhoz képest. A tanulmány forráskódja a < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'el': 'Η εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή σχέσεων έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί ευρέως για την εύρεση νέων σχεσιακών γεγονότων από απλό κείμενο. Για να προβλεφθεί η σχέση μεταξύ δύο οντοτήτων-στόχων, οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι βασίζονται αποκλειστικά σε αυτές τις άμεσες προτάσεις που περιέχουν και τις δύο οντότητες. Στην πραγματικότητα, υπάρχουν επίσης πολλές προτάσεις που περιέχουν μόνο μία από τις οντότητες-στόχους, οι οποίες παρέχουν επίσης πλούσια χρήσιμες πληροφορίες αλλά δεν χρησιμοποιούνται ακόμη για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, κατασκευάζουμε αλυσίδες συμπερασμάτων μεταξύ δύο οντοτήτων στόχων μέσω ενδιάμεσων οντοτήτων, και προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο εξαγωγής νευρωνικών σχέσεων βασισμένο σε διαδρομή για την κωδικοποίηση της σχετικής σημασιολογίας τόσο από τις άμεσες προτάσεις όσο και από τις αλυσίδες συμπερασμάτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων του πραγματικού κόσμου δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να αξιοποιήσει πλήρως αυτές τις προτάσεις που περιέχουν μόνο μία οντότητα-στόχο και επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές και συνεπείς βελτιώσεις στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων σε σύγκριση με ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας αυτής της εργασίας μπορεί να ληφθεί από < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'ka': 'შორის დამართებული პრობლემების ექსტრექცია ძალიან გამოყენებულია პრობლემენტური ფაქტების ძებაზე. თუ გადაწყვეტა ორი მიზეზი ინტერტიების კომპორტის შესახებ, მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მიზეზი სიტყვების შესახებ ორივე ინტერტიების შესახებ. სინამდვილეში, მხოლოდ აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვები, რომელიც მხოლოდ ერთი მინიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია, მაგრამ არ არის კონტაქციის გამოყენებული. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ შევქმნით ინფრენციის წერტილები ორი მიზეზი ელემენტიების შორის საშუალებელი ელემენტიების გამოყენება და მიზეზით ნეიროლური დაკავშირების მოდელის გამოყენება, რომ კ ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემები რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეიძლება ყველაფერი გამოყენება ამ მონაცემების მხოლოდ ერთი მინიშვნელოვანი ინტერტიკის შესახებ და გა ამ გვერდის მხოლოდ კოდი შეიძლება მიიღება < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE - ეა.', 'lt': 'Nuotoliškai prižiūrimas santykių išgavimas buvo plačiai naudojamas ieškant naujų santykinių faktų iš paprasto teksto. Siekiant prognozuoti dviejų tikslinių subjektų santykį, esami metodai grindžiami tik tais tiesioginiais sakiniais, kuriuose yra abu subjektai. Tiesą sakant, yra daug sakinių, kuriuose yra tik vienas iš tikslinių subjektų, kurie taip pat teikia turtingą naudingą informaciją, bet dar nėra naudojami išgavant santykius. Siekdami išspręsti šį klausimą, mes sukuriame dviejų tikslinių subjektų išvadų grandines per tarpinius subjektus ir siūlome keliu pagrįstą nervinių santykių išgavimo model į, koduojantį santykinę semantiką tiek tiesioginių sakinių, tiek išvadų grandinių atžvilgiu. Eksperimentiniai realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali visapusiškai panaudoti tuos sakinius, kuriuose yra tik vienas tikslinis subjektas, ir pasiekti reikšmingų ir nuoseklių santykių išgavimo patobulinimų, palyginti su tvirtais baziniais taškais. Šio popieriaus pradinis kodas gali būti gautas iš < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'it': "L'estrazione di relazioni supervisionate a distanza è stata ampiamente usata per trovare nuovi fatti relazionali dal testo semplice. Per prevedere la relazione tra una coppia di due entità target, i metodi esistenti si basano esclusivamente su quelle frasi dirette contenenti entrambe le entità. Infatti, ci sono anche molte frasi contenenti solo una delle entità target, che forniscono anche ricche informazioni utili ma non ancora impiegate nell'estrazione delle relazioni. Per affrontare questo problema, costruiamo catene di inferenza tra due entità target tramite entità intermedie e proponiamo un modello di estrazione delle relazioni neurali basato sul percorso per codificare la semantica relazionale sia da frasi dirette che da catene di inferenza. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati reali mostrano che, il nostro modello può fare pieno uso di quelle frasi contenenti una sola entità target e raggiunge miglioramenti significativi e coerenti nell'estrazione delle relazioni rispetto a linee di base forti. Il codice sorgente di questo articolo può essere ottenuto da < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.", 'kk': 'Кәдімгінен жаңа қатынастық факттерді табу үшін қашықтағы қатынастың тарқатуы көп қолданылды. Екі мақсатты нысандар арасындағы қатынасын бақылау үшін бар әдістер тек екі нысандар бар тізбекті сөздеріне тұрады. Сонымен қатар бірнеше мәлімет бар, бірақ қатынас тарқату арқылы қолданылмайды. Бұл мәселені шешу үшін, екі мақсатты нысандар арасындағы инференциялық тізбектерді орташа нысандар арқылы құрып, жолды негізделген невралдық қатынас шығару үлгісін қолданамыз. Қатысушылық семантикалық тізбект Шынымен әлемдегі деректер қорларының тәжірибелі нәтижелері біздің үлгіміз тек бір мақсатты мәселелерді толық қолдануға болады және бір мақсатты мәселелерді қолдануға болады, және қатынас Бұл қағаздың көзі коды < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'mk': 'Оддалечено надгледуваната екстракција на односите е широко употребена за да се најдат нови релативни факти од обичен текст. To predict the relation between a pair of two target entities, existing methods solely rely on those direct sentences containing both entities.  Всушност, постојат и многу реченици кои содржат само еден од целните ентитети, кои исто така обезбедуваат богати корисни информации, но сé уште не се употребени со извлекување на врски. За да го решиме ова прашање, ние изградуваме ланцеви на инференција помеѓу двата целни ентитети преку меѓународни ентитети, и предложуваме модел на екстракција на нервни односи базиран на патот за кодирање на односната семантика од директните реченици и ланцеви на инференција Експерименталните резултати на базите на податоци на реалниот свет покажуваат дека нашиот модел може целосно да ги искористи овие реченици кои содржат само еден целен ентитет и постигнува значителни и константни подобрувања во извлекувањето на односите во споредба со силните бази. Изворниот код на оваа хартија може да се добие од < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi hubungan yang diawasi jauh telah digunakan secara luas untuk mencari fakta hubungan baru dari teks biasa. Untuk meramalkan hubungan antara pasangan dua entiti sasaran, kaedah yang wujud hanya bergantung pada kalimat langsung yang mengandungi kedua-dua entiti. Malah, terdapat juga banyak kalimat yang mengandungi hanya satu daripada entiti sasaran, yang juga menyediakan maklumat yang berguna kaya tetapi belum digunakan oleh ekstraksi hubungan. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kita membina rantai kesimpulan antara dua entiti sasaran melalui entiti sementara, dan melamar model ekstraksi hubungan saraf berdasarkan laluan untuk mengekodkan semantik hubungan dari kedua-dua kalimat langsung dan rantai kesimpulan. Hasil percubaan pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa, model kita boleh menggunakan penuh kalimat yang mengandungi hanya satu entiti sasaran, dan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dan konsisten pada ekstraksi hubungan dibandingkan dengan garis dasar yang kuat. Kod sumber kertas ini boleh diperoleh dari < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'no': 'Avstand oversikt av utpakking av relasjonar er breidd brukt for å finna novel relasjonelle faktar frå vanleg tekst. For å foregå forandringa mellom ei par av to målentiteter, finst dei eksisterande metodane berre på dei direkte setningane som inneheld begge entiteter. Faktisk er det også mange setningar som inneheld berre ein av målene, som også tilbyr rikke nyttige informasjon, men ikkje enno arbeida ved utpakking av relasjonar. For å oppretta dette problemet bygger vi inferenseskjeder mellom to målsettingar gjennom mediate einingar, og foreslår ein banebasert neuralrelasjonsmodell for ekstraksjon for å koda relasjonelle semantikk frå både direkte setningar og inferenseskjeder. Eksperimentale resultat på datasett for verkeleg verda viser at modellen vårt kan fullstendig bruka dei setningane som inneheld berre ein målentitet, og oppnår signifikante og konsistent forbedringar på utpakking av relasjon som sammenlignet med sterke baselinjer. Kjeldekode for denne papiret kan hentast frå < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിനായി സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധപ്രക്ഷേപം വ്യാ രണ്ട് ലക്ഷ്യം വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധം പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d രണ്ടു വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും നേരിട്ട വാക്കു യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തില്\u200d പല വാക്കുകളും ലക്ഷ്യസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉള്ളൂ. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് ലക്ഷ്യസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d അപരിഹാരം ശില്ലകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. നേരിട്ട് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും,  ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ ഉറവിട കോഡ് < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлбэрээс хамааралтай хамааралтай харилцаа хадгалахын тулд шинэ харилцааны жинхэнэ зүйлсийг олохын тулд маш их хэрэглэгдсэн. Хоёр зориулагдсан бүтээгдэхүүний хоорондын харилцааныг тодорхойлохын тулд оршин байгаа арга нь зүгээр л хоёр бүтээгдэхүүнтэй шууд өгүүлбэрээс хамаарна. Үнэндээ олон өгүүлбэрүүд нь зөвхөн нэг зорилготой байгууллагуудыг агуулдаг. Энэ нь мөн баян ашигтай мэдээллийг өгч, харилцааны хамааралтаар ажиллаж байгаагүй. Энэ асуудлыг асуухын тулд бид хоёр зориулагдсан загварын хоорондын инференцийн хэлхээ бий болгож дундаж бүтээгдэхүүний аргаар бий болгож, зам дээр суурилсан мэдрэлийн харилцааны тархины загварыг шууд өгүүлбэр болон инференцийн хэлхээс хо Бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь зөвхөн нэг зорилготой нэг зүйлтэй тэдгээр өгүүлбэрийг бүрэн ашиглаж чадна. Тэгээд хүчтэй суурь шулуунуудыг харьцуулахын тулд хамааралтай, үргэлжлэлтэ Энэ цаасын эх үүсвэрийн код < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'mt': 'Distantly supervised relation extraction has been widely used to find novel relational facts from plain text.  Biex titbassar ir-relazzjoni bejn żewġ entitajiet fil-mira, il-metodi eżistenti jiddependu biss fuq dawk is-sentenzi diretti li fihom iż-żewġ entitajiet. Fil-fatt, hemm ukoll ħafna sentenzi li fihom biss waħda mill-entitajiet fil-mira, li jipprovdu wkoll informazzjoni utli rikka iżda li għadha mhijiex użata mill-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nibnu ktajjen ta’ inferenza bejn żewġ entitajiet fil-mira permezz ta’ entitajiet intermedji, u nipproponu mudell ta’ estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni newrali bbażat fuq il-passaġġ biex nikkodifikaw is-semantika relattiva kemm mis-sentenzi diretti kif ukoll mill-ktajjen ta’ inferenza. Riżultati esperimentali fuq settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li, il-mudell tagħna jista’ jagħmel użu sħiħ minn dawk is-sentenzi li fihom entità fil-mira waħda biss, u jikseb titjib sinifikanti u konsistenti fl-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet meta mqabbel ma’ linji bażi b’saħħithom. Il-kodiċi tas-sors ta’ din il-karta jista’ jinkiseb minn < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji nadzorowanych na odległość jest szeroko stosowana do znalezienia nowych faktów relacyjnych z tekstu zwykłego. Aby przewidzieć relację między parą dwóch docelowych jednostek, istniejące metody opierają się wyłącznie na tych bezpośrednich zdaniach zawierających oba jednostki. W rzeczywistości istnieje również wiele zdań zawierających tylko jeden z docelowych podmiotów, które również dostarczają bogatych przydatnych informacji, ale nie są jeszcze wykorzystywane do ekstrakcji relacji. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, budujemy łańcuchy wnioskowania między dwoma docelowymi jednostkami za pośrednictwem jednostek i proponujemy model ekstrakcji relacji neuronowych oparty na ścieżce, aby kodować semantykę relacji relacji zarówno ze zdań bezpośrednich, jak i łańcuchów wnioskowania. Wyniki eksperymentalne na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasz model może w pełni wykorzystać te zdania zawierające tylko jedną jednostkę docelową i osiąga znaczące i konsekwentne ulepszenia ekstrakcji relacji w porównaniu z silnymi liniami bazowymi. Kod źródłowy niniejszego artykułu można uzyskać od < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'ro': 'Extracția relațiilor supravegheate la distanță a fost utilizată pe scară largă pentru a găsi noi fapte relaționale din text simplu. Pentru a prezice relația dintre o pereche de două entități țintă, metodele existente se bazează exclusiv pe acele propoziții directe care conțin ambele entități. De fapt, există, de asemenea, multe propoziții care conțin doar una dintre entitățile țintă, care oferă, de asemenea, informații utile bogate, dar care nu sunt încă utilizate de extracția relațiilor. Pentru a aborda această problemă, construim lanțuri de inferență între două entități țintă prin intermediul entităților intermediare și propunem un model de extracție a relațiilor neurale bazat pe cale pentru a codifica semantica relațională atât din propoziții directe, cât și din lanțuri de inferență. Rezultatele experimentale ale seturilor de date din lumea reală arată că modelul nostru poate utiliza pe deplin propozițiile care conțin o singură entitate țintă și obține îmbunătățiri semnificative și consecvente în extragerea relațiilor în comparație cu liniile de bază puternice. Codul sursă al acestei lucrări poate fi obținut de la < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'so': 'Magaalada laga maamulayo soo saarida xiriirka waxaa loo isticmaalay mid aad u badan in laga helo warqada saxda ee xiriirka ee saxda ah. Si loo sii sheegayo xiriirka u dhexeeya labo jidh oo goal ah, qaababka joogta oo kaliya waxay ku xiran yihiin xukunka tooska ah ee labada jidh leh. Sida xaqiiqada ah waxaa sidoo kale laga helaa qeybo badan oo ka mid ah hay’adaha waxqabadka, kaas oo sidoo kale macluumaad faa’iido leh, laakiin aan weli shaqeyn soo bixinta xiriirka. Si aan arrintan ula macaamiloono, waxaannu u dhisnaa silsilado dhibaato ah oo u dhexaysa labada alaabta waxqabadka dhexe, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qaab ka soo bixinta wadanka neurada ah si aan u kooban sameyno qoraalka xiriirka ee tooska ah iyo silsiladaha iyo dhibaatada. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka qaranka ee caalamiga ah waxay muuqan karaan in modellkayagu uu buuxin karo isticmaalka erayadan oo ku jirta jidh kaliya, wuxuuna gaadhaa hagaajiyada soo bixinta xiriirka sida isbarbardhigta xarumaha xoogga badan. Aqoonta warqadan waxaa laga heli karaa < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'sv': 'Avskilt övervakad relationsextraktion har använts i stor utsträckning för att hitta nya relationella fakta från klartext. För att förutsäga förhållandet mellan två målentiteter förlitar sig befintliga metoder enbart på direkta meningar som innehåller båda entiteterna. Faktum är att det finns också många meningar som endast innehåller en av målenheterna, som också ger rik användbar information men ännu inte används av relationsextraktion. För att lösa detta problem bygger vi inferenskedjor mellan två målentiteter via intermediära entiteter, och föreslår en banbaserad modell för extraktion av neurala relationer för att koda relationens semantik från både direkta meningar och inferenskedjor. Experimentella resultat på verkliga datauppsättningar visar att vår modell fullt ut kan använda meningarna som endast innehåller en målenhet och uppnår betydande och konsekventa förbättringar av relationsextraktion jämfört med starka baslinjer. Källkoden för detta dokument kan erhållas från < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'sr': 'Daljinski nadzorni ekstrakcija odnosa se široko koristi za pronalaženje novih veznih činjenica iz prostog teksta. Da bi predvidio vezu između dva ciljna entiteta, postojeće metode oslanjaju se samo na te direktne rečenice koje sadrže oba entiteta. U stvari, postoji i mnoge rečenice koje sadrže samo jednu od ciljnih entitata, koje takođe pružaju bogate korisne informacije, ali još nisu zaposleni izvlačenjem odnosa. Da bi se riješili ovog pitanja, izgradili smo lance infekcije između dva ciljna entiteta putem prosječnih entitata i predložili model izvlačenja neuralnih odnosa na putu da kodiramo odnošne semantike iz direktnih rečenica i lanca infekcije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka na stvarnom svetu pokazuju da naš model može potpuno iskoristiti te rečenice koje sadrže samo jednu ciljnu entitetu i ostvariti značajne i konsekventne poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa u usporedbi sa jakim osnovnim linijama. Izvorni kod ovog papira se može dobiti od < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'si': 'දුරස්ථ විදිහට බලන්න සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශය විදිහට සම්බන්ධතාවක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරවේ ඉලක්කම් දෙකක් ගැන සම්බන්ධයක් අතර ඉන්නගන්න, තියෙන්නේ විධානය දෙකක් අතර සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරත ඇත්තටම, ඉලක්ෂාව තියෙන එකක් විතරයි වචනයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය තොරතුරු දෙන්නේ නමුත් තවමත් සම්බන්ධ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය කරන්න, අපි ඉලක්කම් දෙකක් අතර ඉන්ධානයක් දෙකක් අතර ඉන්ධානයක් විධානය කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ඉලක්ෂණ අයිතියක් තියෙන අයිතියක් තිය < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'ta': 'வெறும் உரையிலிருந்து புதிய தொடர்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. இரண்டு இலக்கு உறுப்புகளுக்கிடையே இரண்டு இரண்டு தொடர்புகளுக்கும் இடையே முன்வாக்குவதற்கு, இருக்கும் முறைகள் இரு பொருளுக் உண்மையில், பல வாக்குகள் இலக்கு பொருள்களில் மட்டும் ஒன்று மட்டும் உள்ளன, அது பணக்க பயனுள்ள தகவல் வழங்குகிறது, ஆனால் இன்னும் தொடர் இந்த பிரச்சனையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க, நாம் இரண்டு இலக்கு பொருளுக்கும் இடையே நடுவில் உள்ள பொருள்களுக்கும் இடையே பாதிப்பு சங்கிலிகளை உருவாக்கி, பாதைய உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது, நம் மாதிரி ஒரே இலக்கு பொருளை மட்டும் முழுமையாக பயன்படுத்த முடியும், மற்றும் வலிமை அடி இந்த தாளின் மூல குறியீடு < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'ur': 'دور سے نظارت کی نسبت اٹھانے کے لئے بہت وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے کہ صریح متن سے نئی نسبت کی حقیقت تلاش کریں. دو موجود متحدوں کے درمیان رابطہ کی پیش آنے کے لئے موجود طریقے صرف ان دونوں متحدوں پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں. حقیقت میں بہت سی جماعتیں بھی ہیں جن میں صرف ایک موقع اختیار ہے، جو بہترین فائدہ معلومات بھی دیتے ہیں لیکن ابھی رابطہ اٹھانے کے ذریعہ استعمال نہیں کرتے۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم نے دو موقع کے درمیان موقع کے ذریعہ دو موقع کے زنجیریں بنائیں، اور ایک مسئلہ کی بنیادی نئورل رابطہ نکلنے کی مدل پیش کریں کہ دونوں مستقیم جماعتوں اور بیماری زنجیروں سے رابطہ داری سیمانٹیکوں کو کوڈ کریں. حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری مدل صرف ایک موقع واحد کے ساتھ صرف ایک موقع واحد کے ساتھ کامل استعمال کر سکتا ہے، اور مضبوط بنسٹ لین کے مقابلہ میں ارتباط کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اضافہ اور اس کاغذ کا سراسر کوڈ <سے مل سکتا ہے https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'vi': 'Cách hấp thụ quan hệ giám sát xa nhau đã được sử dụng rộng rãi để tìm ra các bằng chứng liên quan mới. Để dự đoán mối quan hệ giữa hai thực thể đích, các phương pháp hiện tại chỉ dựa vào các câu trực tiếp có chứa hai thực thể. Trên thực tế, cũng có nhiều câu chỉ có một trong những thực thể đích đến, mà cũng cung cấp đầy đủ thông tin hữu ích nhưng chưa được sử dụng bằng cách hấp thụ các mối quan hệ. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng ta xây dựng các chuỗi nhận biết giữa hai thực thể mục tiêu thông qua các thực thể trung tâm, và đề xuất một mô hình liên quan về các kết thần kinh để mã hóa các ngữ pháp liên quan từ cả các câu trực tiếp và các chuỗi nhận biết. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên các tập tin trên thế giới thực cho thấy, mô hình của chúng ta có thể sử dụng toàn bộ các câu truyện chỉ có một thực thể mục tiêu, và đạt được những cải tiến quan trọng và nhất về cách hấp thụ các mối quan hệ so với các bản mẫu mạnh. Mật mã nguồn của tờ giấy này có thể lấy từ https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE -̀.', 'uz': "Name Ikki obʼekt obʼektlarining orasidagi bogʻlanishini predict qilish uchun mavjud usullar faqat ikkita obʼektlarning direkt so'zlariga ishlatadi. Aslida, ko'p so'zlarda faqat target obʼektlaridagi bir so'zlar mavjud. Bu esa hozir foydalanuvchi maʼlumot yordam beradi, ammo bunday murakkab chiqarishni ishlatmaydi. Bu muammo bilan murojaat qilish uchun biz o'rtacha narsalar bilan bir necha bogʻliqlarni qo'yishingiz va o'rtacha narsalar yordamida qo'shish modelini qo'shish uchun qo'llanmalar bilan bog'liq semantika boshqarishni boshqarish mumkin. Mavjud dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari ko'rsatishi mumkin, bizning modelimiz faqat bir qavsga ega so'zlarni butunlay ishlatish mumkin, va bir qanday asboblar bilan bog'liqni ajratishda muhim va davom etish muvaffaqiyatlarini oshirish mumkin. Ushbu hujjatning manba kodi <dan olib boʻladi https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.", 'nl': 'Op afstand begeleide relatieontwikkeling is veel gebruikt om nieuwe relationele feiten uit platte tekst te vinden. Om de relatie tussen twee doelentiteiten te voorspellen, zijn bestaande methoden uitsluitend gebaseerd op die directe zinnen die beide entiteiten bevatten. In feite zijn er ook veel zinnen die slechts één van de doelentiteiten bevatten, die ook rijke nuttige informatie bieden, maar nog niet gebruikt worden bij relatieontwikkeling. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, bouwen we inferentieketens tussen twee doelentiteiten via intermediaire entiteiten, en stellen we een pad-gebaseerd neurale relatie extractiemodel voor om de relationele semantiek te coderen van zowel directe zinnen als inferentieketens. Experimentele resultaten op real-world datasets tonen aan dat ons model volledig gebruik kan maken van zinnen die slechts één doelentiteit bevatten, en significante en consistente verbeteringen op het gebied van relatieontwikkeling bereikt in vergelijking met sterke baselines. De broncode van dit artikel is te verkrijgen bij < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'hr': 'Daljinsko nadzirano izvlačenje odnosa široko se koristi za pronalaženje novih odnosanih činjenica iz običnog teksta. Kako bi predvidjela odnos između dva ciljna entiteta, postojeće metode oslanjaju se samo na te izravne rečenice koje sadrže oba entiteta. U stvari, postoji i mnoge rečenice koje sadrže samo jednu od ciljnih subjekta, koje također pružaju bogate korisne informacije, ali još nisu zaposleni izvlačenjem odnosa. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, izgradimo lance infekcije između dvije ciljne subjekte putem prosječnih subjekta i predlažemo model izvlačenja neuralnih odnosa na putu kako bi kodirali odnošne semantike iz direktnih rečenica i lanca infekcije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naš model može potpuno iskoristiti te rečenice koje sadrže samo jednu ciljnu entitetu i ostvariti značajne i konsekventne poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa u usporedbi s jakim osnovnim linijama. Izvorni kod ovog papira se može dobiti iz < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'da': 'Afstandsvis overvåget relation ekstraktion er blevet udbredt til at finde nye relationelle fakta fra almindelig tekst. For at forudsige forholdet mellem to målenheder er eksisterende metoder udelukkende baseret på de direkte sætninger, der indeholder begge enheder. Faktisk er der også mange sætninger, der kun indeholder en af målenhederne, som også giver rige nyttige oplysninger, men som endnu ikke er anvendt i relation ekstraktion. For at løse dette problem bygger vi inference kæder mellem to målenheder via mellemliggende enheder, og foreslår en sti-baseret neural relation ekstraktion model til at kode relationel semantik fra både direkte sætninger og inference kæder. Eksperimentelle resultater på virkelige datasæt viser, at vores model kan gøre fuld brug af de sætninger, der kun indeholder én målenhed, og opnå betydelige og konsekvente forbedringer af relationsudtrækning sammenlignet med stærke basislinjer. Kildekoden for dette papir kan hentes fra < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'id': 'Distantly supervised relation extraction has been widely used to find novel relational facts from plain text.  Untuk memprediksi hubungan antara dua entitas sasaran, metode yang ada hanya bergantung pada kalimat langsung yang mengandung kedua entitas. Bahkan, ada juga banyak kalimat yang hanya mengandung salah satu entitas sasaran, yang juga menyediakan informasi yang berguna yang kaya tetapi belum digunakan oleh ekstraksi hubungan. To address this issue, we build inference chains between two target entities via intermediate entities, and propose a path-based neural relation extraction model to encode the relational semantics from both direct sentences and inference chains.  Hasil eksperimental pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa, model kita dapat membuat penggunaan penuh dari kalimat-kalimat yang berisi hanya satu entitas sasaran, dan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dan konsisten pada ekstraksi hubungan dibandingkan dengan garis dasar yang kuat. Kode sumber kertas ini dapat diperoleh dari < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'ko': '원격 감독 관계 추출은 순수한 텍스트에서 새로운 관계 사실을 발견하는 데 광범위하게 사용된다.두 목표 실체 간의 관계를 예측하기 위해 기존의 방법은 두 실체를 포함하는 직접적인 문장에만 의존한다.사실 많은 문장들이 하나의 목표 실체만 포함하고 풍부한 유용한 정보를 제공하지만 관계 추출에 사용되지 않는다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 중간 실체를 통해 두 목표 실체 사이에 추리 체인을 구축하고 경로를 바탕으로 하는 신경 관계 추출 모델을 제시하여 직접 문장과 추리 체인의 관계 의미를 인코딩했다.실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 하나의 목표 실체만 포함하는 문장을 충분히 활용할 수 있고 강한 기선에 비해 관계 추출에 있어 현저하고 일치된 개선을 얻었다.이 문서의 소스 코드는 <https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE>.', 'sw': 'Kutengenezwa kwa mahusiano yasiyo ya moja kwa moja imetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kutafuta ukweli wa kisasa kutoka kwenye maandishi ya wazi. Ili kutabiri uhusiano kati ya vitu viwili viwili vya malengo, mbinu zilizopo zinategemea tu kwenye hukumu za moja kwa moja zenye vitu vyote viwili. Kiukweli, pia kuna hukumu nyingi yenye moja tu ya vitu vinavyolenga, ambavyo pia vinatoa taarifa zenye manufaa lakini bado hazijajiriwa na utoaji wa mahusiano. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunajenga viungo vya uchunguzi kati ya vifaa viwili vya malengo kwa kupitia vitu vya kati, na kupendekeza muundo wa utoaji wa mahusiano ya kijamii anayeishi barani ili kuweka mfumo wa mahusiano kutoka kwenye hukumu za moja kwa moja na silaha zisizo na madhara. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye taarifa za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kuwa, mtindo wetu unaweza kutumia sentensi hizo zilizo na entity moja tu inayolenga, na kupata maboresho makubwa na yenye kamili kuhusu utoaji wa mahusiano kama ilivyolinganishwa na misingi yenye nguvu. Kifungu cha chanzo cha gazeti hili kinaweza kupatikana kutoka < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'bg': 'Извличането на отдалечено наблюдение на връзките е широко използвано за намиране на нови релационни факти от обикновен текст. За да се предвиди връзката между двойка от две целеви субекти, съществуващите методи разчитат единствено на тези преки изречения, съдържащи и двете субекти. Всъщност има и много изречения, съдържащи само един от целевите субекти, които също предоставят богата полезна информация, но все още не са използвани за извличане на релации. За да се справим с този проблем, ние изграждаме вериги на изводи между две целеви единици чрез междинни единици и предлагаме модел на извличане на невронни връзки, базиран на пътя, за да кодираме релационната семантика както от директните изречения, така и от веригите на изводи. Експерименталните резултати на набори от данни от реалния свят показват, че нашият модел може да използва пълноценно изреченията, съдържащи само една целева единица, и постига значителни и последователни подобрения при извличането на релации в сравнение със силните базови линии. Изходният код на тази статия може да бъде получен от < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'de': 'Fernüberwachte Beziehungsextraktion ist weit verbreitet, um neue relationale Fakten aus Klartext zu finden. Um die Beziehung zwischen einem Paar von zwei Zielentitäten vorherzusagen, stützen sich bestehende Methoden ausschließlich auf die direkten Sätze, die beide Entitäten enthalten. Tatsächlich gibt es auch viele Sätze, die nur eine der Zielentitäten enthalten, die auch reiche nützliche Informationen liefern, aber noch nicht für die Beziehungsextraktion verwendet werden. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, bauen wir Inferenzketten zwischen zwei Zielentitäten über Zwischenentitäten auf und schlagen ein pfadbasiertes neuronales Beziehungsextraktionsmodell vor, um die relationale Semantik sowohl aus direkten Sätzen als auch aus Inferenzketten zu kodieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse auf realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Modell die Sätze voll ausnutzen kann, die nur eine Zielentität enthalten und signifikante und konsistente Verbesserungen bei der Beziehungsextraktion im Vergleich zu starken Baselines erzielt. Der Quellcode dieser Arbeit ist abrufbar unter < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura largësisht është përdorur gjerësisht për të gjetur fakte të reja marrëdhënieve nga teksti i thjeshtë. Për të parashikuar lidhjen midis dy njësive objektive, metodat ekzistuese mbështeten vetëm në ato fjalime të drejtpërdrejta që përmbajnë të dy njësitë. Në fakt, ka gjithashtu shumë fjalë që përmbajnë vetëm një nga njësitë objektive, të cilat gjithashtu ofrojnë informacion të pasur të dobishëm por ende nuk janë të punësuar nga nxjerrja e marrëdhënieve. To address this issue, we build inference chains between two target entities via intermediate entities, and propose a path-based neural relation extraction model to encode the relational semantics from both direct sentences and inference chains.  Rezultatet eksperimentale në grupet e të dhënave të botës reale tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të përdorë plotësisht ato fjalë që përmbajnë vetëm një njësi objektiv dhe arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme dhe konsistente në nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve krahasuar me linjat bazë të forta. Kodi burimi i kësaj letre mund të merret nga < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'tr': 'Daşdan gözlenen baglaýyşy açmak aňsatly metinden roman hakykaty tapmak üçin ullanýar. Iki maksad zadyň ikisi arasyndaky baglaýyşyny çaklamak üçin, bar işleriň bar diňe her iki zady diýip bolan sözleriňe ynamyny bar. Aslynda, bir köp sözlem bar diňe maksadyň birini bar, hem baý uly maglumaty berilýär ýöne şu wagt dowam etmändir. Bu meselede çözmek üçin, iki maksadyň arasynda sazlanç sanatyny aralygynda, we ýoldan tabanly neural baglaýyşyň çykarma modelini hem direkt sözleriň we a şyk sanatynyň ködlemesini teklip edýäris. Gerçek dünýäde munuň netijeleri bardygyny görkezýär, nusgasymyz diňe bir maksady hedef bardygyny sözleriň dolysyny ulanyp biler we güýçli baseçinler bilen görä baglanşyklaryň üstüne düzetmelidir. %s senediň çeşme kody alyp biler https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'fa': 'برای پیدا کردن حقیقت رابطه\u200cهای رابطه\u200cای از متن ساده استفاده شده است. برای پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط بین جفت از دو شرکت هدف، روش\u200cهای موجود تنها بر این جمله\u200cهای مستقیم که در هر دو شرکت دارند اعتماد دارند. در حقیقت، جمله\u200cهای زیادی وجود دارد که فقط یکی از موجودات هدف دارند، که اطلاعات مفید ثروتمند را نیز می\u200cدهند ولی هنوز توسط استخراج ارتباط کاری نمی\u200cکنند. برای حل این مسئله، ما زنجیرهای آلودگی بین دو واحد هدف را از طریق یک واحد متوسط ساختیم، و یک مدل اخراج عصبی بر اساس مسیر پیشنهاد می کنیم تا سیمانتیک ارتباطی را از جمله\u200cهای مستقیم و زنجیرهای آلودگی کودک کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که، مدل ما می\u200cتواند از این جمله\u200cها کامل استفاده کند که فقط یک واحد هدف دارد، و بهترین توسعه\u200cهای معنی و هماهنگی در انتقال ارتباط به مقایسه با خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی کد منبع این کاغذ می\u200cتواند از < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE .', 'af': "Afgeleë ondersoekte verhouding van uittrekking is vaste gebruik om novele relatiewe fakte van eenvoudige teks te vind. Om die verwanting tussen 'n paar van twee doel entiteite te voorskou, bestaande metodes word slegs op die direkte setinge wat beide entiteite bevat. In werklikheid is daar ook baie setnings wat slegs een van die doel entiteite bevat, wat ook ryk nuttige inligting verskaf maar nog nie deur verwanting uittrek gebruik word nie. Om hierdie probleem te adres, bou ons inferensie kettings tussen twee doel entiteite deur middelste entiteite, en voorstel ons 'n pad-gebaseerde neurale verhouding van uittrekking model om die relasionele semantieke te kodeer van beide direkte setnings en inferensie kettings. Eksperimentale resultate op reël wêreld datastelle vertoon dat ons model kan volledige gebruik maak van dié teikene wat slegs een doel entiteit bevat, en bereik betekende en konsistente verbeteringe op verhouding van verhouding soos vergelyk met sterke basisline. Die bronkode van hierdie papier kan ontvang word van < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >", 'az': 'Yaxşı mətndən yeni əlaqələr tapmaq üçün uzaq müdafiə edilmiş əlaqələr çıxarılması genişliyinə istifadə edildi. İki məqsəd məlumatların arasındakı ilişkiləri təmin etmək üçün, həmin metodlar yalnız hər ikisi məlumatları barəsindəki doğru sözlərə təvəkkül edir. Əslində, həmçinin sadəcə məqsəd məlumatlardan birini daxil edən bir çox cümlələr də var, bunlar da çox faydalı məlumatlar verirlər, lakin hələ də əlaqə çıxarılması ilə istifadə edilməmişdir. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, iki məqsəd məlumatları arasında orta məlumatlar vasitəsilə infeksiya zincirlərini inşa edirik və yol tabanlı nöral bağlantı ekstraksiyası modeli ilə, həmçinin doğru cümlələrdən və infeksiya zincirlərindən ilişkili semantikləri kodlamaq üçün təklif edirik. Gerçek dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları göstərir ki, modellərimiz sadəcə bir məqsəd məlumatı barəsindəki cümlələrdən tamamilə istifadə edə bilər və möhkəm baselines ilə qarşılaşdığı əlaqələr haqqında möhkəm və sürəkli düzəltmələr yetirir. Bu kağızın mənbə kodu < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'hy': 'Հեռու վերահսկվող հարաբերությունների վերացումը լայնորեն օգտագործվել է նոր հարաբերական փաստեր պարզ տեքստից գտնելու համար: Երկու նպատակային միավորի միջև կապը կանխատեսելու համար գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները միայն հիմնված են երկու միավորների պարունակող ուղղակի նախադասությունների վրա: Իրականում, կան նաև շատ նախադասություններ, որոնք պարունակում են միայն նպատակային միավորներից մեկը, որոնք նաև հարուստ օգտակար տեղեկատվություն են տալիս, բայց դեռ չեն օգտագործվում հարաբերությունների վերացման միջոցով: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք կառուցում ենք երկու նպատակային միավորների միջև հետևյալների շղթաներ միջնորդների միջոցով և առաջարկում ենք ուղղությամբ հիմնված նյարդային հարաբերությունների դուրս բերելու մոդել, որպեսզի կոդավորենք հարաբերական սեմանտիկան և ուղղակի նա Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է ամբողջովին օգտագործել այն նախադասությունները, որոնք պարունակում են միայն մեկ նպատակային էակ, և հասնում է նշանակալի և համապատասխանատու բարելավումների հարաբերություններ Այս թղթի աղբյուր կոդը կարող է ստանալ https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE ]:', 'bn': 'সাধারণ টেক্সট থেকে নোভেল সম্পর্কের তথ্য খুঁজে বের করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পরিচিত সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। দুই টার্গেট বিষয়বস্তুর মধ্যে সম্পর্ক ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য, বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র দুই বস্তুর মধ্যে যে সরাসরি বাক্ বাস্তবতার মধ্যে অনেক শাস্তি রয়েছে যার মধ্যে শুধুমাত্র লক্ষ্যবস্তু আছে, যার মধ্যে সমৃদ্ধ কার্যকর তথ্য প্রদান করে কিন্তু এখনো সম এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা মাধ্যমের মাধ্যমে দুই লক্ষ্য বস্তুর মধ্যে অনভুমিক শিকল তৈরি করি এবং সরাসরি শাস্তি এবং সংক্রান্ত শিকল থেকে যে সম্পর্কের সম্পর্কের বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল শুধুমাত্র একটি লক্ষ্য বস্তুকে ব্যবহার করতে পারে এবং তার সাথে যোগাযোগ বেছে নেওয়া সম্পর্কে এই কাগজের উৎস কোড <থেকে পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >', 'am': 'Distantly supervised relation extraction has been widely used to find novel relational facts from plain text.  በሁለቱ አካባቢዎች መካከል ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ፣ አሁን ያሉት ሥርዓቶች በሁለቱ አካባቢዎች ውስጥ ያሉትን ቀጥተኛ ቃላት ብቻ ይጠጋሉ፡፡ በእውነት፣ በተጨማሪው አካባቢ አንዱ ብቻ የሚኖሩት ብዙ ፍርድ አሉ፣ ይህም ደግሞ ባለጠጋ ጠቃሚ መረጃ እና ግንኙነት ግን ገና ሳይገኙ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ በሁለቱ ተቃውሞ አካባቢዎች መካከል በመካከለኛ አካሄድ መካከል ስንሰለቶችን እናደርጋለን፣ እናም የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እና ሰንሰለቶችን ከቀጥተኛ ፍርድ እና ማሰሪያ እና ማሰሪያ እና የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማውጣት ሞዴል እናሳልቃለን፡፡ እውነተኛውን ዓለም ዳታተሮች ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳየው፣ ሞዴላያችን በአንድ አካል ብቻ የሚኖሩትን እነዚህን ቃላት ሙሉ ሊጠቀም ይችላል፣ እናም በአካባቢው መሠረት ላይ የሚያስከትለውን እና በጽኑ መሠረት ማድረጊያውን እንዲያገኛል፡፡ የዚህ ገጽ የኩነቶች ኮድ ከ < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'cs': 'Extrakce vzdáleně dohlížených vztahů byla široce používána k nalezení nových relačních faktů z prostého textu. Pro předpověď vztahu mezi dvěma cílovými entitami se stávající metody spoléhají pouze na přímé věty obsahující obě entity. Ve skutečnosti existuje také mnoho vět obsahujících pouze jednu z cílových entit, které také poskytují bohaté užitečné informace, ale ještě nejsou použity pro extrakci vztahů. Pro řešení tohoto problému vytvoříme inferenční řetězce mezi dvěma cílovými entitami prostřednictvím intermediálních entit a navrhujeme model extrakce neuronových vztahů založený na cestách pro kódování relační sémantiky z přímých vět i inferenčních řetězců. Experimentální výsledky na reálných datových sadách ukazují, že náš model dokáže plně využít věty obsahující pouze jednu cílovou entitu a dosahuje významných a konzistentních zlepšení extrakce vztahů ve srovnání se silnými základními liniemi. Zdrojový kód tohoto článku lze získat na adrese < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions remotament supervisada s'ha utilitzat ampliament per trobar fets relacionals noves del text senzill. To predict the relation between a pair of two target entities, existing methods solely rely on those direct sentences containing both entities.  De fet, també hi ha moltes frases que contenen només una de les entitats alvo, que també proporcionen informació útil rica però encara no utilitzada per l'extracció de relacions. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, construïm cadenes de inferència entre dues entitats alvo a través d'entitats intermedies, i proposem un model d'extracció de relació neuronal basat en el camí per codificar la semàntica relacional tant de frases directes com de cadenes de inferència. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades del món real mostran que el nostre model pot utilitzar plenament aquelles frases que només contenen una entitat alvo, i aconsegueix millores significatives i consistents en l'extracció de relacions en comparació amb línies de base fortes. The source code of this paper can be obtained from < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.", 'bs': 'Daljinski nadzirani izvlačenje odnosa široko se koristi za pronalaženje novih veznih činjenica iz prostog teksta. Da bi predvidjela vezu između dva ciljna entiteta, postojeće metode oslanjaju se samo na te direktne rečenice koje sadrže oba entiteta. U stvari, postoji i mnoge rečenice koje sadrže samo jednu od ciljnih entitata, koje također pružaju bogate korisne informacije, ali još nisu zaposleni izvlačenjem odnosa. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, izgradimo lance infekcije između dva ciljna entiteta putem prosječnih entitata i predlažemo model izvlačenja neuralnih odnosa na putu kako bi kodirali odnošne semantike iz direktnih rečenica i lanca infekcije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naš model može potpuno iskoristiti te rečenice koje sadrže samo jednu ciljnu entitetu, i ostvariti značajne i konsekventne poboljšanje izvlačenja odnosa u usporedbi sa jakim osnovnim linijama. Izvorni kod ovog papira se može dobiti od < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE - Da.', 'et': 'Kaugjärelevalve all olevate suhete ekstraheerimist on laialdaselt kasutatud uute suhetefaktide leidmiseks tavalisest tekstist. Kahest sihtüksusest koosneva paari vahelise seose prognoosimiseks tuginevad olemasolevad meetodid ainult nendele otsestele lausetele, mis sisaldavad mõlemat üksust. Tegelikult on ka palju lauseid, mis sisaldavad ainult ühte sihtüksustest, mis annavad ka rikkalikku kasulikku teavet, kuid ei ole veel seoste ekstraheerimiseks kasutatud. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks loome kahe sihtotstarbelise olemi vahel vahepealsete olemite vahel järeldusahelad ja pakume välja teepõhise neurosuhte ekstraheerimise mudeli, et kodeerida relatsioonisemantikat nii otselausetest kui ka järeldusahelatest. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused reaalmaailma andmekogumite kohta näitavad, et meie mudel suudab täielikult ära kasutada neid lauseid, mis sisaldavad ainult ühte sihtmärki, ning saavutab märkimisväärseid ja järjepidevaid parandusi seoste ekstraheerimisel võrreldes tugevate lähtejoontega. Käesoleva dokumendi lähtekoodi saab aadressilt < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'fi': 'Kaukana valvottua relaatioekstraktiota on käytetty laajalti uusien relaatiofaktojen löytämiseen yksinkertaisesta tekstistä. Kahden kohdekokonaisuuden välisen suhteen ennustamiseksi olemassa olevat menetelmät perustuvat yksinomaan niihin suoriin lauseisiin, jotka sisältävät molemmat kokonaisuudet. Itse asiassa on olemassa myös monia lauseita, jotka sisältävät vain yhden kohdekokonaisuuden, joka tarjoaa myös runsaasti hyödyllistä tietoa, mutta jota ei vielä käytetä suhteessa uuttamiseen. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi rakennamme johtoketjuja kahden kohdeentiteetin välille välientiteettien kautta ja ehdotamme polkupohjaista neurosuhteiden uuttamismallia relaatiosemantiikan koodaamiseksi sekä suorista lauseista että johtoketjuista. Kokeelliset tulokset reaalimaailman aineistoista osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy hyödyntämään kaikkia lauseita, jotka sisältävät vain yhden kohdekokonaisuuden, ja saavuttaa merkittäviä ja johdonmukaisia parannuksia relaatioiden uuttamisessa vahvoihin lähtölinjoihin verrattuna. Tämän artikkelin lähdekoodi on saatavissa osoitteesta < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'jv': "AllProgressBar bookmark user@example:button Rasané iki dadi, kita nggawe lansangan karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan sampeyan karo hal-sampeyan karo hal-sampeyan karo perusahaan kelas nyori dianggawe sistem sing nyimpen karo perusahaan sampeyan karo perusahaan dumadhi winih dhéwé Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog Kayané kelompok nggo mapané iki oleh nang < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >", 'ha': "An amfani da ɗabi'a wa nẽman gano fakta na yanzu masu husũma daga matsayin plain. To domin ka gabatar da mazaɓa tsakanin nau'i biyu na ƙanshin, hanyõyin da ke cikin shirin ayuka, yana dõgara kawai kan su sauna masu daidaita da duk abubuwa biyu. Ga gaskiyar, akwai da wasu kalmõmi mãsu yawa wanda ke ƙunsa da ɗayan abubuwa masu amfani da shi, da wannan yana ga matalauci da amfani, kuma amma ba a yi amfani da shi ba da cire masu hushi. To, dõmin ka yi tambaya ga wannan masu al'amarin, muna samar da sarƙoƙi biyu masu nau'i a tsakanin abubuwa, kuma Muke buƙata wata misãlai na cire-muhimmin neural-based zuwa kode semantiki na haɗi daga cire-daban da cire-nau'i. Matarin jarrabai a kan data masu cikin duniya da gaske yana nuna cewa, misalinmu yana iya cika amfani da su ga ayuka wanda ke ƙunsa da duk abu guda kawai, kuma yana isa mafiya amfani da masu muhimmi da daidai a sami da misalin bango mai ƙarfi. Kana iya sami kodi na wannan takardar aiki daga < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >", 'sk': 'Oddaljeno nadzorovano ekstrakcijo relacij se pogosto uporablja za iskanje novih relacijskih dejstev iz navadnega besedila. Za napovedovanje razmerja med parom dveh ciljnih subjektov obstoječe metode temeljijo izključno na tistih neposrednih stavkih, ki vsebujejo oba subjekta. Pravzaprav obstaja tudi veliko stavkov, ki vsebujejo samo eno od ciljnih subjektov, ki zagotavljajo tudi bogate koristne informacije, vendar še niso uporabljene za ekstrakcijo relacij. Za reševanje tega problema gradimo sklepne verige med dvema ciljnima entitetama prek vmesnih entitet in predlagamo model ekstrakcije nevronskih relacij, ki temelji na poti, za kodiranje relacijske semantike iz direktnih stavkov in sklepnih verig. Poskusni rezultati na naborih podatkov v realnem svetu kažejo, da lahko naš model v celoti izkoristi stavke, ki vsebujejo samo eno ciljno entiteto, in doseže znatne in dosledne izboljšave pri ekstrakciji relacij v primerjavi z močnimi osnovnimi črtami. Izvorno kodo tega prispevka je mogoče dobiti pri < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'he': 'מחילוץ מערכת יחסים ששולטת מרחוק השתמש במרחק רחב כדי למצוא עובדות יחסיות חדשות מתוך טקסט פשוט. כדי לחזות את היחסים בין זוג של שתי יחידות מטרה, שיטות קיימות תלויות בלבד על המשפטים ישירים שמכילים את שתי יחידות. למעשה, ישנם גם משפטים רבים שמכילים רק אחת מהישויות המטרה, אשר גם מספקות מידע שימושי עשיר אבל עדיין לא מועסקים על ידי קישור יחסים. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו בונים שרשרות התוצאות בין שתי יחידות המטרה דרך יחידות ביניים, ולהציע מודל חיסוך מערכת יחסים עצביים מבוסס על מסלול כדי לקוד את הסמנטיקה היחסית משני משפטים ישירים וגם שרשרות התוצאות. תוצאות ניסיוניות על קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראות כי, הדוגמא שלנו יכול להשתמש במלוא במשפטים אלה שמכילים רק יחידה מטרה אחת, ולהשיג שיפורים משמעותיים ותקבלים בהוצאה מערכת יחסים בהשוואה לקווים בסיסיים חזקים. קוד המקור של הנייר הזה יכול להשיג מ < https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >.', 'bo': 'ཐག་རིང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་པའི་ཕྱིར་བསྒྲགས་ནི་རྩ་བ་ནས་མཐོང་བའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་ནས་གསར་གཏོང་འབྲེལ་རྐྱེན་བྲི དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་ཕུད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་རིགས་མ་དང་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོ་རྣམས་གཅིག་མཐུད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་འདི་དག དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལྟར་ན། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་འབེབས་པའི་དབུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབུལ་རིས་མཐུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ནས་དབུལ་གྱི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་བཅས ངའི་མིག་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཅིག་ལས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚོགས་གཅིག་ལས་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག <ལས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ཐོག་མའི་ཁུངས་ཨང་རིམ་འདི་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/thunlp/PathNRE >'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'تدريب الخصومة لاستخراج العلاقة', 'fr': "Formation contradictoire pour l'extraction de relations", 'es': 'Entrenamiento contradictorio para la extracción de relaciones', 'pt': 'Treinamento Adversário para Extração de Relações', 'ja': '関係抽出のための対抗トレーニング', 'zh': '关系提抗训练', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण', 'ru': 'Тренировка соперников для извлечения отношений', 'ga': 'Oiliúint Sáraíochta le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αντίθετα εκπαίδευση για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων', 'hu': 'Relatív extrakció mellékhatásos képzése', 'it': "Formazione avversaria per l'estrazione di relazioni", 'kk': 'Қатынасын тарқату үшін белсенді оқыту', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas mokymas santykiams ištraukti', 'mk': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'ml': 'വിലാസപുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വിഭാഗപരിശീലനം', 'ms': 'Latihan Perlawanan untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan', 'mt': 'Taħriġ Adversarju għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet', 'mn': 'Хариулт татгалзахын тулд дэмжлэх сургалт', 'pl': 'Szkolenie przeciwne dla ekstrakcji relacji', 'no': 'Rekursarialt trening for utpakking av relasjonar', 'ro': 'Instruire adversară pentru extracția relației', 'sr': 'Adversarijska obuka za izvlačenje odnosa', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'so': 'Waxbarashada la xiriirta', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதலுக்கான முன்னேறிய பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'رابطہ اخراج کے لئے مخالف ترین', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giáo dục về tương lai', 'bg': 'Неблагоприятно обучение за извличане на връзка', 'nl': 'Bijwerkende training voor relatienextractie', 'da': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'hr': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'de': 'Adversarial Training zur Beziehungsextraktion', 'id': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'fa': 'آموزش تجاوز برای اخراج رابطه', 'sw': 'Mafunzo ya kitaifa kwa ajili ya kuondolewa kwa uhusiano', 'tr': 'Sylaýyn Açmak üçin sirkinlik Taýramy', 'af': 'Adversariale Oefening vir Relasie Uitpakking', 'sq': 'Trenimin kundërshtar për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հաբերության արտադրման հակառակ վարժում', 'bs': 'Adversarijska obuka za izvlačenje odnosa', 'bn': 'সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ের জন্য প্রাক্তন প্রশিক্ষণ', 'az': 'İlişkilərin çıxarılması üçün Adversarial Training', 'cs': 'Nepříznivý výcvik pro extrakci vztahů', 'et': 'Kõrvaltoimete koolitus seoste ekstraheerimiseks', 'fi': 'Haittavaikutuskoulutus suhdeuutetta varten', 'ca': 'Adversarial Training for Relation Extraction', 'ko': '관계 추출의 대항 훈련', 'jv': 'Advertary Learning for Relative extract', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Neželeno usposabljanje za ekstrakcijo odnosov', 'he': 'אימון נוגדי להוציא יחסים', 'bo': 'མཐུན་འབྲེལ་འཕར་རིས་ལ་སྐྱུར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Adversarial training is a mean of regularizing classification algorithms by generating adversarial noise to the training data. We apply adversarial training in relation extraction within the multi-instance multi-label learning framework. We evaluate various neural network architectures on two different datasets. Experimental results demonstrate that adversarial training is generally effective for both CNN and RNN models and significantly improves the precision of predicted relations.', 'ar': 'التدريب العدائي هو وسيلة لتنظيم خوارزميات التصنيف عن طريق توليد ضوضاء عدائية لبيانات التدريب. نحن نطبق التدريب العدائي في استخراج العلاقة ضمن إطار عمل التعلم متعدد العلامات متعدد الحالات. نقوم بتقييم هياكل الشبكات العصبية المختلفة على مجموعتي بيانات مختلفتين. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن التدريب العدائي فعال بشكل عام لكل من نماذج CNN و RNN ويحسن بشكل كبير دقة العلاقات المتوقعة.', 'pt': 'O treinamento adversário é um meio de regularizar algoritmos de classificação gerando ruído adversário para os dados de treinamento. Aplicamos treinamento contraditório na extração de relação dentro da estrutura de aprendizado multi-rótulo de várias instâncias. Avaliamos várias arquiteturas de rede neural em dois conjuntos de dados diferentes. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que o treinamento adversário é geralmente eficaz para os modelos CNN e RNN e melhora significativamente a precisão das relações previstas.', 'es': 'El entrenamiento contradictorio es un medio de regularizar los algoritmos de clasificación mediante la generación de ruido contradictorio a los datos de entrenamiento. Aplicamos el entrenamiento contradictorio en la extracción de relaciones dentro del marco de aprendizaje de múltiples instancias y etiquetas. Evaluamos varias arquitecturas de redes neuronales en dos conjuntos de datos diferentes. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que el entrenamiento contradictorio es generalmente efectivo para los modelos CNN y RNN y mejora significativamente la precisión de las relaciones predichas.', 'ja': '対位法トレーニングは、トレーニングデータに対位法ノイズを生成することによって、分類アルゴリズムを規則化する手段である。マルチインスタンスマルチラベルラーニングフレームワーク内での関連抽出における対立トレーニングを適用します。私たちは、2つの異なるデータセット上の様々なニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを評価します。実験結果は、対抗訓練が一般的にＣＮＮ及びＲＮＮモデルの両方に有効であり、予測される関係の精度を著しく向上させることを示している。', 'fr': "L'entraînement contradictoire est un moyen de régulariser les algorithmes de classification en générant un bruit contradictoire dans les données d'entraînement. Nous appliquons une formation contradictoire à l'extraction de relations dans le cadre d'apprentissage multi-instances multi-étiquettes. Nous évaluons différentes architectures de réseaux neuronaux sur deux ensembles de données différents. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que l'entraînement contradictoire est généralement efficace pour les modèles CNN et RNN et améliore considérablement la précision des relations prédites.", 'zh': '对抗性教者,所以生对抗性噪声规范化类算法也。 多实多标学框架内将抗练宜。 各以其数集上论诸神经网络架构。 实验结果表明,抗训CNNRNN,显加占候。', 'ru': 'Состязательное обучение - это средство регуляризации алгоритмов классификации путем создания состязательного шума к обучающим данным. Мы применяем состязательную подготовку в отношении извлечения отношений в рамках многоэлементного многоуровневого обучения. Мы оцениваем различные архитектуры нейронных сетей на двух разных наборах данных. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что состязательная тренировка, как правило, эффективна как для моделей CNN, так и для моделей RNN и значительно повышает точность прогнозируемых отношений.', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण प्रशिक्षण डेटा के लिए प्रतिकूल शोर उत्पन्न करके वर्गीकरण एल्गोरिदम को नियमित करने का एक साधन है। हम बहु-उदाहरण बहु-लेबल सीखने के ढांचे के भीतर संबंध निष्कर्षण में प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण लागू करते हैं। हम दो अलग-अलग डेटासेट पर विभिन्न तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण आम तौर पर सीएनएन और आरएनएन मॉडल दोनों के लिए प्रभावी होता है और अनुमानित संबंधों की सटीकता में काफी सुधार करता है।', 'ga': 'Is meán í oiliúint sháraíochta chun halgartaim aicmithe a thabhairt chun rialtachta trí thorann sáraíochta a ghiniúint sna sonraí oiliúna. Cuirimid oiliúint sháraíochta i bhfeidhm maidir le heastóscadh laistigh den chreat foghlama ilchodach il-lipéid. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar ailtireachtaí líonraí néarúla éagsúla ar dhá thacar sonraí éagsúla. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil oiliúint sháraíochta éifeachtach go ginearálta do mhúnlaí CNN agus RNN araon agus go bhfeabhsaítear go suntasach beachtas an chaidrimh thuartha.', 'ka': 'კონდერსარიალური განათლება არის სინამდვილეში, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციის ალგორიტიმების რეგილარიზაცია, რომელიც განათლების მონაცემებისთვის განათლების განათლებაში გან ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულ განსწავლების გამოყენება მრავალ ინსტენსტის მრავალური განსწავლების ფრამეტში. ჩვენ განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურები ორი განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გავამუშავებთ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ ნექსპერიმენტიური განათლება უფრო ეფექტიურია CNN და RNN მოდელებისთვის და მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო მეტადებს', 'hu': 'Az ellentétes képzés az osztályozási algoritmusok szabályozásának eszköze a képzési adatok ellentétes zajának generálásával. A többpéldányos többcímkés tanulási keretrendszeren belül ellentétes képzést alkalmazunk a kapcsolatkivonásban. Két különböző adatkészleten értékeljük a különböző neurális hálózati architektúrákat. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az ellenfélképzés általában hatékony mind a CNN, mind az RNN modellek esetében, és jelentősen javítja a várható kapcsolatok pontosságát.', 'el': 'Η επιθετική εκπαίδευση είναι ένα μέσο για την ομαλοποίηση των αλγορίθμων ταξινόμησης με την παραγωγή αντιθετικού θορύβου στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Εφαρμόζουμε την αντικρουστική εκπαίδευση στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων μέσα στο πλαίσιο μάθησης πολλαπλών καταστάσεων. Αξιολογούμε διάφορες αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων σε δύο διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η αντίπαλη εκπαίδευση είναι γενικά αποτελεσματική τόσο για τα μοντέλα όσο και για τα μοντέλα και βελτιώνει σημαντικά την ακρίβεια των προβλεπόμενων σχέσεων.', 'it': "L'addestramento avverso è un mezzo di regolarizzazione degli algoritmi di classificazione generando rumore avverso ai dati di allenamento. Applichiamo la formazione avversaria nell'estrazione delle relazioni all'interno del framework di apprendimento multi-etichetta multi-istanza. Valutiamo varie architetture di rete neurale su due diversi set di dati. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che la formazione avversaria è generalmente efficace sia per i modelli CNN che RNN e migliora significativamente la precisione delle relazioni previste.", 'mk': 'Негативна обука е средство за регулирање на алгоритмите за класификација со генерирање на противна бучава на податоците за обука. Ние аплицираме непријателска обука во врска со извлекувањето во рамките за мултиинзионално учење. Ги проценуваме различните нервни мрежни архитектури на два различни податоци. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека непријателската обука е генерално ефикасна за моделите на СНН и РНН и значително ја подобрува прецизноста на предвидените односи.', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas mokymas yra klasifikavimo algoritmų reguliavimo priemonė, sukuriant prieštaringą triukšmą mokymo duomenims. We apply adversarial training in relation extraction within the multi-instance multi-label learning framework.  We evaluate various neural network architectures on two different datasets.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad priešingas mokymas paprastai yra veiksmingas tiek CNN, tiek RNN modeliams ir gerokai pagerina numatomų santykių tikslumą.', 'kk': 'Конверсариялық оқыту - классификациялық алгоритмдерді бақылау деректеріне қарсы дыбыс құрады. Біз көп инстанциялық бірнеше жарлық оқу фреймінде қатынас арқылы қатынас арқылы қатынастық оқыту үшін қолданымыз. Біз екі түрлі деректер қорларында түрлі неврал желінің архитектураларын бағалаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер CNN және RNN моделдеріне қарсы оқыту әдетте эффективні деп көрсетеді және таңдалған қатынастың дұрыстығын өзгертеді.', 'ms': 'Latihan lawan adalah cara untuk mengatur algoritma klasifikasi dengan menghasilkan bunyi lawan ke data latihan. Kami melaksanakan latihan lawan dalam ekstraksi hubungan dalam rangkaian pembelajaran multi-label berbilang-contoh. Kami menilai berbagai arkitektur rangkaian saraf pada dua set data yang berbeza. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa latihan lawan secara umum berkesan untuk model CNN dan RNN dan meningkatkan dengan signifikan ketepatan hubungan yang dijangka.', 'ml': 'Adversarial training is a mean of regularizing classification algorithms by generating adversarial noise to the training data.  പല ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പല-ലേറ്റ് പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിരോധമായ പരിശീലനം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കെറ്റ് ആര്\u200dക്ക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു വിരോധമായ പരിശീലനം സിഎനിനെയും RNN മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും സാധാരണ പ്രവർത്തികമാണെന്ന്. പ്രത', 'mt': 'It-taħriġ avversarju huwa mezz li jirregolarizza l-algoritmi tal-klassifikazzjoni billi jiġġenera storbju avversarju għad-dejta tat-taħriġ. We apply adversarial training in relation extraction within the multi-instance multi-label learning framework.  Aħna jevalwaw diversi arkitetturi tan-netwerks newrali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta differenti. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li t-taħriġ avversarju huwa ġeneralment effettiv kemm għall-mudelli CNN kif ukoll RNN u jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-preċiżjoni tar-relazzjonijiet imbassra.', 'no': 'Rekursarialt opplæring er ein gjennomsnitt på å reguleringa klassifikasjonsgoritme ved å laga negativ støy til opplæringsdata. Vi bruker kontrateralisk opplæring i forhold til utpakking i multiinstans multi-label læringsrammeverket. Vi evaluerer ulike neuralnettverksarkitekturar på to ulike datasett. Eksperimentale resultat viser at negativ trening er generelt effektiv for både CNN og RNN-modeller og betydelig forbedrar presisjonen av forventa forhold.', 'pl': 'Trening przeciwny jest środkiem regularyzacji algorytmów klasyfikacji poprzez generowanie szumu przeciwnego do danych treningowych. Stosujemy szkolenia przeciwne w zakresie ekstrakcji relacji w ramach multi-instancyjnego multi-label framework edukacji. Oceniamy różne architektury sieci neuronowych na dwóch różnych zbiorach danych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że trening przeciwny jest ogólnie skuteczny zarówno dla modeli CNN, jak i RNN i znacząco poprawia precyzję przewidywanych relacji.', 'ro': 'Antrenamentul adversar este un mijloc de regularizare a algoritmilor de clasificare prin generarea zgomotului adversar la datele de antrenament. Aplicăm instruire adversară în extragerea relațiilor în cadrul cadrului de învățare multi-instanță multi-label. Evaluăm diferite arhitecturi de rețele neurale pe două seturi de date diferite. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că antrenamentul adversar este în general eficient atât pentru modelele CNN cât și RNN și îmbunătățește semnificativ precizia relațiilor anticipate.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн сургалтын дасгал нь дасгал өгөгдлийн санаанд эсрэг чимээ бий болгож хуваалцах алгоритмыг зөвхөн дүрслэх дундаж юм. Бид олон тохиолдолд олон тохиолдол суралцах үйл ажиллагааны холбоотой эсрэг дасгал сургалт хийдэг. Бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуруудыг хоёр өөр өгөгдлийн сүлжээнд үнэлдэг. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд нь эсрэг дасгал хөдөлгөөн CNN болон RNN загваруудын тулд ихэвчлэн үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'sr': 'Preporučna obuka je srednja regularizacije algoritma klasifikacije stvarajući neprijateljsku buku podacima o obuci. Primjenjujemo neprijateljsku obuku u odnosu na ekstrakciju u okviru multi-instancije multi-label učenja. Procjenjujemo različite arhitekture neuralne mreže na dva različita seta podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je neprijateljska obuka općenito efikasna za CNN i RNN modele i značajno poboljšava preciznost predviđenih odnosa.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දත්තට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේ අපි සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි වෙනස් දත්ත සටහන් දෙකට වෙනස් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සංවිධානය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ විරෝධික ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම CNN සහ RNN මොඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'so': 'Waxbarashada iskuulaadku waa mid ku saabsan maamulka kooxaha fasaxa, kaasoo ah mid ka mid ah codyo ka gees ah oo u sameynaya macluumaadka waxbarashada. Waxbarashada cadaawayaasha ah waxaan ka codsanaynaa iskuulka barashada kala duduwan. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa xarunta shabakado cudurada ah oo ku yaal labada macluumaad oo kala duduwan. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in waxbarashada cadaawayaasha ah uu si caadiga ah u shaqeeyaa modelalka CNN iyo RNN, wuxuuna si weyn u hagaajiyaa saxda xiriirka la sii sheegay.', 'sv': 'Adversarial träning är ett sätt att reglera klassificeringsalgoritmer genom att generera motstridigt ljud till träningsdata. Vi tillämpar kontradiktorisk utbildning i relation extraktion inom ramen för multi-instans multi-label lärande. Vi utvärderar olika neurala nätverksarkitekturer på två olika datauppsättningar. Experimentella resultat visar att motpartsträning generellt är effektiv för både CNN- och RNN-modeller och avsevärt förbättrar precisionen i förutsedda relationer.', 'ta': 'பயிற்சி தரவுக்கு எதிர்மறையான சப்தம் உருவாக்குவதால் வகுப்பு படிப்புகளை கட்டுப்படுத்தும் பொருளாகும். We apply adversarial training in relation extraction within the multi-instance multi-label learning framework.  இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான தரவு அமைப்புகளில் நாம் பல்வேறு புதிய பிணைய அட்டவணைகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் எதிர்மறை பயிற்சி பொதுவாக CNN மற்றும் RNN மாதிரிகளுக்கும் பயன்படுத்தும் மற்றும் முன்வாக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்புகள', 'ur': 'مخالف تطالب کا مطالبہ یہ ہے کہ کلاسپیٹ الگوریٹم کو تطالب ڈیٹوں کے لئے مخالف صوت پیدا کرے۔ ہم بہت سی مثالیں multi-label یادگیری فرم کے درمیان مقابلہ تطارین میں استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم دو مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر مختلف نیورل نیٹ ورک آرکیٹ کا ارزش کرتے ہیں۔ تجربے کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ مخالف ترکین سین اور آرن کی مدلکوں کے لئے عموماً مفید ہے اور بہت اچھی طرح پیش آئی ہوئی رابطہ کے مضبوطی سے بہتر ہے.', 'uz': "Ta\xa0ľminlovchi tarmoqni ta\xa0ľminlovchi ma\xa0ľlumotga to \xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri tovush yaratish mumkin. Biz bir necha misol ko'plab o'rganishni o'rganishni qo'llayapmiz. Biz ikki boshqa ma\xa0ľlumotlar tarmoqni qiymatimiz. Tekshirish natijalari hozirgi ko'rsatadi, bizga ta'lim treni umuman CNN va RNN modellari uchun ishlatiladi va kutilgan murakkablarning tashkilotlarini aniqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Huấn luyện trở lại là một phương tiện giúp hiệu chỉnh các thuật to án quy định bằng cách tạo ra tiếng ồn đối nghịch cho dữ liệu huấn luyện. Chúng tôi thực hiện huấn luyện đối nghịch trong các trường hợp học đa nhãn. Chúng tôi đánh giá các kiến trúc mạng thần kinh khác nhau trên hai bộ dữ liệu. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy huấn luyện đối nghịch có hiệu quả với cả hai mô hình CNN và RNN và tăng độ chính xác của các mối quan hệ dự đoán.', 'bg': 'Неблагоприятното обучение е средство за регламентиране на класификационните алгоритми чрез генериране на контрагенциален шум към данните за обучение. Ние прилагаме съперническо обучение във връзка с извличането на връзки в рамките на многоинстанционната рамка за обучение с множество етикети. Ние оценяваме различни архитектури на невронни мрежи на два различни набора от данни. Експерименталните резултати показват, че състезателното обучение като цяло е ефективно както за моделите и значително подобрява прецизността на прогнозираните взаимоотношения.', 'da': 'Modsat træning er et middel til regulering af klassifikationsalgoritmer ved at generere modstandsstøj til træningsdataene. Vi anvender adversial træning i relation ekstraktion inden for multi-instans multi-label læringsramme. Vi evaluerer forskellige neurale netværksarkitekturer på to forskellige datasæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at modstandstræning generelt er effektiv for både CNN- og RNN-modeller og forbedrer præcisionen af forudsigede relationer markant.', 'nl': 'Tegenstrijdige training is een middel om classificatiealgoritmen te regulariseren door tegenstrijdige ruis te genereren aan de trainingsgegevens. We passen adversaire training in relatieontwikkeling toe binnen het multi-instance multi-label leerkader. We evalueren verschillende neurale netwerkarchitecturen op twee verschillende datasets. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat tegenstrijdige training over het algemeen effectief is voor zowel CNN- als RNN-modellen en de nauwkeurigheid van voorspelde relaties aanzienlijk verbetert.', 'hr': 'Preporučna obuka je srednja regularizacije algoritma klasifikacije stvarajući neprijateljsku buku podacima o obuci. Primjenjujemo adversarnu obuku u odnosu na ekstrakciju u okviru multi-instancije multi-etiketnog učenja. Procjenjujemo različite arhitekture neuralne mreže na dva različita podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je neprijateljska obuka općenito učinkovita za CNN i RNN modele i značajno poboljšava preciznost predviđenih odnosa.', 'de': 'Adversariales Training ist ein Mittel zur Regularisierung von Klassifikationsalgorithmen durch Erzeugung von feindlichem Rauschen zu den Trainingsdaten. Wir wenden adversariales Training zur Beziehungsextraktion innerhalb des Multi-Instance Multi-Label Learning Frameworks an. Wir evaluieren verschiedene neuronale Netzwerkarchitekturen auf zwei verschiedenen Datensätzen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass adversariales Training im Allgemeinen sowohl für CNN- als auch RNN-Modelle effektiv ist und die Präzision der vorhergesagten Beziehungen signifikant verbessert.', 'ko': '대항성 훈련은 훈련 데이터에 대항성 소음을 발생시켜 분류 알고리즘을 규범화하는 방법이다.다중 실례 다중 라벨 학습 구조에서 우리는 대항적인 훈련을 관계 추출에 응용할 것이다.우리는 두 개의 서로 다른 데이터 집합에서 각종 신경 네트워크 구조를 평가한다.실험 결과 대항훈련은 CNN과 RNN 모델 모두에 효과적이며 예측 관계의 정밀도를 현저히 높인 것으로 나타났다.', 'id': 'Pelatihan lawan adalah cara untuk mengatur algoritma klasifikasi dengan menghasilkan suara lawan ke data pelatihan. Kami menerapkan pelatihan lawan dalam ekstraksi hubungan dalam rangka belajar multi-label multi-instance. Kami mengevaluasi berbagai arsitektur jaringan saraf pada dua set data yang berbeda. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pelatihan lawan secara umum efektif untuk model CNN dan RNN dan meningkatkan dengan signifikan presisi hubungan yang diprediksi.', 'fa': 'آموزش تجاوز یک وسیله آلگوریتم\u200cهای تجاوز با تولید صدای دشمنی به داده\u200cهای آموزش است. ما آموزش دشمنی را در رابطه خارج کردن در چهارچوب یادگیری چندین نمونه\u200cهای متعدد استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما معماری شبکه عصبی مختلف را در دو مجموعه داده متفاوت ارزیابی می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که آموزش دشمنی عموماً برای مدل\u200cهای CNN و RNN موثر است و دقیق ارتباط پیش\u200cبینی را significantly بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Reklamçy okuwçy düzenli klasifikasyon algoritmalaryny okuwçy maglumatlara garşy döredip düzenlemek üçin bir orta sany. Biz birnäçe öwrenme çerçevesinde nätanyş okuwçylygy birnäçe öwrenme çerçevesinde gollaşdyrýarys. Biz dürli näsir şebek arhitektarlaryny iki dürli veri setirinde çykýarys. Araşdyrylyk netijeleri CNN we RNN modelleri üçin düýbünden täsirli bilim taýýarlandyrýandygyny görkez.', 'af': "Adversariële onderwerp is 'n gemiddelde van regularisering van klassifikasiealgoritme deur teenstandaarde ruis te genereer aan die onderwerp data. Ons toewend teenstandaarlike onderwerking in verwanting uittrekking binne die multi-instansie multi-label leer raamwerk. Ons evalueer verskillende neuralnetwerk arkitektuure op twee verskillende datastelle. Eksperimentale resultate bevestig dat teenstandaarlike onderwerking generel effektief is vir CNN en RNN-modelles en betekeurig verbeter die presisie van voorskoude relasies.", 'sq': 'Treinimi kundërshtar është një mjet për të rregulluar algoritmet e klasifikimit duke krijuar zhurmë kundërshtare në të dhënat e trainimit. Ne aplikojmë trajnimin kundërshtar në lidhje me nxjerrjen brenda kuadrit të mësimit me shumë raste. We evaluate various neural network architectures on two different datasets.  Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se trajnimi kundërshtar është përgjithësisht efektiv si për modelet CNN ashtu edhe RNN dhe përmirëson ndjeshëm saktësinë e marrëdhënieve të parashikuara.', 'hy': 'Առաջնական ուսուցման միջոցը դասակարգման ալգորիթմների վերահսկման միջոցն է, ստեղծելով հակառակ աղմուկ ուսուցման տվյալների համար: Մենք կիրառում ենք հակառակ կրթություն բազմաթիվ օրինակների բազմաթիվ պիտակների ուսումնասիրության շրջանակում: Մենք գնահատում ենք տարբեր նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետությունները երկու տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ հակառակյալ վարժումը ընդհանուր առմամբ արդյունավետ է CNN-ի և ՌՆՆ-ի մոդելների համար և նշանակալի բարելավում է կանխատեսված հարաբերությունների ճշգրիտությունը:', 'am': 'የልዩ ትምህርት ትምህርት የግንኙነት ድምፅ ለትምህርት ዳታዎችን በመፍጠር ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት በተለይ በብዙ ምሳሌ በተማሩ ፍሬም ውስጥ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ልዩ ዳታተሮች ላይ የናቡር መረብ መሠረቶች እናስተዋልናለን፡፡ Experimental results demonstrate that adversarial training is generally effective for both CNN and RNN models and significantly improves the precision of predicted relations.', 'sw': 'mafunzo ya tofauti ni maana ya kudhibiti algorithi za usambazaji kwa kutengeneza sauti mbadala kwa takwimu za mafunzo. Tunatumia mafunzo ya upinzani katika utoaji wa uhusiano ndani ya mfumo wa kujifunza kwa mifano mingi. Tutathmini majengo mbalimbali ya mtandao wa neura katika seti mbili tofauti. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mafunzo ya upinzani kwa ujumla ni yenye ufanisi kwa mifano ya CNN na RNN na kuboresha ukweli wa mahusiano yanayotarajiwa.', 'az': 'Müvəffəqiyyət təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil verilənlərə düzgünlü klasifikasiya algoritmini təhsil etmək məqsədilədir. Biz çoxlu in şallar çoxlu etiketli öyrənmə çerçevesində əlaqələr əlaqəsində təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz müxtəlif nöral ağ arhitektarını iki müxtəlif veri qurğularında değerlendiririk. Experimental sonuçları, CNN və RNN modellərinin düşmənçilik təcrübəsinin genellik təcrübəsinin faydalı olduğunu göstərir və təcrübə edilmiş ilişkilərin precizitini çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bs': 'Preporučna obuka je srednja regularizacije algoritma klasifikacije stvarajući neprijateljsku buku podacima o obuci. Primjenjujemo neprijateljsku obuku u odnosu na ekstrakciju u okviru multi-instancije multi-label učenja. Procjenjujemo različite arhitekture neuralne mreže na dva različita podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je neprijateljska obuka općenito efikasna za CNN i RNN modele i značajno poboljšava preciznost predviđenih odnosa.', 'ca': "L'entrenament adversari és una mitjana de regularitzar els algoritmes de classificació generant soroll adversari a les dades d'entrenament. Aplicam formació adversaria en relació amb l'extracció dins el marc d'aprenentatge multi-instants. Evaluam diverses arquitectures de xarxa neural en dos conjunts de dades diferents. Els resultats experimentals demostren que la formació adversaria és generalment efectiva tant per als models CNN com RNN i millora significativament la precisió de les relacions previstes.", 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষণের মানে ট্রেনিং ডাটাতে বিরোধী শব্দ তৈরি করে শ্রেণীবিভাগ অ্যালগোরিদম নিয়ন্ত্রণের মানে। মাল্টিলেট শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের মধ্যে আমরা বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ প্রয়োগ করি। আমরা দুই ভিন্ন ডাটাসেটে বিভিন্ন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো মূল্য দিচ্ছি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ সাধারণত সিএনএন এবং আরএনএন মডেলের জন্য কার্যকর এবং ভবিষ্যত সম্পর্কের সুস্পষ্ট সম্পর্কের সমা', 'cs': 'Nepřátelský trénink je prostředek regularizace klasifikačních algoritmů generováním nepřátelského šumu do tréninkových dat. Aplikujeme adversariální školení v extrakci vztahů v rámci multi-instance multi-label vzdělávacího rámce. Vyhodnocujeme různé architektury neuronových sítí na dvou různých datových sadách. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že adversariální trénink je obecně efektivní pro CNN i RNN modely a výrazně zlepšuje přesnost predikovaných vztahů.', 'et': 'Kõrvalõpe on klassifitseerimisalgoritmide regulariseerimise vahend, tekitades koolitusandmetele vastasmüra. Me rakendame vastastikust koolitust seoste ekstraheerimisel mitmeastmelise mitmemärgisega õppe raamistikus. Hindame erinevaid neurovõrgu arhitektuure kahel erineval andmekogumil. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et vastastikune treening on üldiselt efektiivne nii CNN kui RNN mudelite puhul ning parandab oluliselt prognoositavate suhete täpsust.', 'fi': 'Haittakoulutus on keino säännöllistää luokitusalgoritmeja tuottamalla vastamelua harjoitusdataan. Sovellamme kontradiktorista koulutusta vuorovaikutuksen poimimiseen monikerroksisessa monikerroksisessa oppimiskehyksessä. Arvioimme erilaisia neuroverkkoarkkitehtuuria kahdella eri datalla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että vastarintaharjoittelu on yleensä tehokasta sekä CNN- että RNN-malleissa ja parantaa merkittävästi ennustettujen suhteiden tarkkuutta.', 'jv': 'Advertary Learning is a means to Regular Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo paketen seneng nggawe barang tanggal nggambar neng akeh multi-instal sing nyimpen multi-label Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem sing paling-alat sing sampeyan dataset Rejalaké sing paling pengguna kuwi nggawe sawalik dhéwé kuwi triyang karo nganggo sistem MTN lan model DNN lan barang pengguna bantuan kanggo mbatalé kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno', 'ha': "Tayyar da zaman shawarar ta zama ma'anar managi algoritori na classified, na samã sauri mai motsi zuwa data na shirin. Munã amfani da shirin motsi a cikin firam masu amfani da multi-misali. Tuna ƙaddara wasu matsakan na'urar neura a kan danne-danne biyu. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa, wa'adin motsi mai motsi yana da amfani ga duk misãlai na CNN da RNN kuma yana kyautata ƙaddari na fassarar danganta na ƙayyade.", 'sk': 'Neželeno usposabljanje je sredstvo za ureditev klasifikacijskih algoritmov z ustvarjanjem kontrastnega hrupa na podatke o usposabljanju. Uporabljamo kontradiktorsko usposabljanje v okviru več-stopenjskega učnega okvira. Ocenjujemo različne arhitekture nevronskih omrežij na dveh različnih naborih podatkov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da je kontradiktorsko usposabljanje na splošno učinkovito za modele CNN in RNN in bistveno izboljšuje natančnost napovedanih relacij.', 'he': 'Adversarial training is a mean of regularizing classification algorithms by generating adversarial noise to the training data.  We apply adversarial training in relation extraction within the multi-instance multi-label learning framework.  אנו מעריכים ארכיטקטורות רשת עצבית שונות בשני קבוצות נתונים שונות. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהאימון היריב הוא בערך יעיל גם למודלים CNN וגם RNN, ושפר באופן משמעותי את הדיוק של יחסים צפויים.', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གི་སློབ་ཐག་ནི་གནད་དོན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཤིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱས་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ནས་སྤྱད ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སུ་རྩིས་བཏང་བ་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་དག་གི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་རྣམས་CNN དང་RNN མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས'}
{'en': 'Context-Aware Representations for Knowledge Base Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'التمثيلات الواعية بالسياق لاستخراج علاقة قاعدة المعرفة', 'pt': 'Representações baseadas no contexto para extração de relação da base de conhecimento', 'fr': "Représentations sensibles au contexte pour l'extraction de relations dans la base de connaissances", 'es': 'Representaciones sensibles al contexto para la extracción de relaciones de base de conocimientos', 'ja': 'ナレッジベース関係抽出のためのコンテキスト意識表現', 'zh': '以知识库取之上下文知也', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए संदर्भ-जागरूक अभ्यावेदन', 'ru': 'Контекстно-зависимые представления для извлечения связей базы знаний', 'ga': 'Léirithe Comhthéacs-Eolas do Eastóscadh Gaol Bhonn Eolais', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Αντιπροσωπείες με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων γνώσης βάσης', 'hu': 'Környezettudatos reprezentációk a tudásbázis kapcsolat kivonásához', 'it': "Rappresentazioni contestuali per l'estrazione delle relazioni della Knowledge Base", 'kk': 'Мәліметтер негізгі қатынасын тарқату үшін контексті- түсініктемелер', 'lt': 'Žinių bazių santykių ekstrahavimo sąmoningas atstovavimas', 'mk': 'Context-Aware Representations for Knowledge Base Relation Extraction', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Serangan-Konteks untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet Kuntest-Konxji għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Bażi tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'Контекст-Aware Representations for Knowledge Base Relation Extraction', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Kontekstowe reprezentacje dla ekstrakcji relacji z bazy wiedzy', 'sr': 'Predstavnici za izvlačenje odnosa baze znanja', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Ka soo bixinta aqoonta aasaasiga ah', 'sv': 'Kontextmedvetna representationer för extraktion av kunskapsbasrelationer', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதலுக்கான உள்ளமைப்பு தெரியும் பிரதிநிகழ்வுகள்', 'ur': 'علم Base Relationship Extraction کے لئے کنٹکسٹ-Aware Representations', 'ro': 'Reprezentări conștiente de context pentru extragerea relațiilor bazei de cunoștințe', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Quan điểm tương ứng học', 'bg': 'Представления, осъзнаващи контекста, за извличане на отношенията в базата данни от знания', 'nl': 'Contextbewuste representaties voor het extraheren van kennisbaserelaties', 'da': 'Kontekstbevidste repræsentationer til udtrækning af videnbaserelation', 'hr': 'Predstavnici za izvlačenje odnosa baze znanja', 'de': 'Kontextbezogene Repräsentationen für die Extraktion von Knowledge Base Relations', 'id': 'Perwakilan Conteks-Aware untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Basa Pengetahuan', 'fa': 'نماینده\u200cهای آگاهی کنترل برای اخراج رابطه\u200cهای بنیادی دانش', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 관계 추출의 상하문 감지 표시', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo yanayofahamika kwa ajili ya Kutoa Kuhusiana na Ufahamu', 'tr': 'Bilgi Esasy Açmak üçin Kontekst-Bilgi Görkezilmeleri', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuese të ndërgjegjshme në kontekst për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të bazës së njohurive', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Bilim temel 톛laq톛l톛ri 칞캼xar캼lmas캼 칲칞칲n Context-Aware Representations', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Predstavnici za izvlačenje odnosa baze znanja', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের মূল সংযোগ বিনিময়ের জন্য বিভিন্ন পরিচিত প্রতিনিধি', 'cs': 'Kontextová reprezentace pro extrakci vztahů znalostní báze', 'ca': "Representacions conscients del contest per l'extracció de relacions basades en el coneixement", 'et': 'Kontekstiteadlikud esindused teabebaasi seoste väljavõtmiseks', 'fi': 'Knowledge Base Relation Extraction -tietokannan kontekstitietoiset esitykset', 'jv': 'context-Awave', 'sk': 'Predstavitve ozaveščenih o kontekstu za pridobivanje odnosov iz zbirke znanja', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Context-Aware Representations for Knowledge Base Relation Extraction', 'bo': 'Context-Aware Representations for Knowledge Base Relation Extraction'}
{'en': 'We demonstrate that for sentence-level relation extraction it is beneficial to consider other relations in the sentential context while predicting the target relation. Our architecture uses an LSTM-based encoder to jointly learn representations for all relations in a single sentence. We combine the context representations with an attention mechanism to make the final prediction. We use the Wikidata knowledge base to construct a dataset of multiple relations per sentence and to evaluate our approach. Compared to a baseline system, our method results in an average error reduction of 24 on a held-out set of relations. The code and the dataset to replicate the experiments are made available at.https://github.com/ukplab/.\n    ', 'ar': 'نوضح أنه بالنسبة لاستخراج العلاقة على مستوى الجملة ، من المفيد النظر في العلاقات الأخرى في السياق الوجداني أثناء التنبؤ بالعلاقة المستهدفة. تستخدم هندستنا برنامج تشفير قائم على LSTM لتعلم تمثيلات مشتركة لجميع العلاقات في جملة واحدة. نقوم بدمج تمثيلات السياق مع آلية الانتباه لعمل التنبؤ النهائي. نحن نستخدم قاعدة المعرفة Wikidata لبناء مجموعة بيانات من العلاقات المتعددة لكل جملة ولتقييم نهجنا. مقارنة بالنظام الأساسي ، تؤدي طريقتنا إلى تقليل متوسط الخطأ بمقدار 24 في مجموعة علاقات ثابتة. يتم توفير الكود ومجموعة البيانات لتكرار التجارب على <https://github.com/ukplab/>.', 'es': 'Demostramos que para la extracción de relaciones a nivel de oración es beneficioso considerar otras relaciones en el contexto de oración mientras se predice la relación objetivo. Nuestra arquitectura utiliza un codificador basado en LSTM para aprender conjuntamente las representaciones de todas las relaciones en una sola oración. Combinamos las representaciones de contexto con un mecanismo de atención para hacer la predicción final. Utilizamos la base de conocimientos de Wikidata para construir un conjunto de datos de múltiples relaciones por oración y para evaluar nuestro enfoque. En comparación con un sistema de referencia, nuestro método da como resultado una reducción de error promedio de 24 en un conjunto de relaciones mantenidas. El código y el conjunto de datos para replicar los experimentos están disponibles en < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'fr': "Nous démontrons que pour l'extraction de relations au niveau de la phrase, il est avantageux de prendre en compte d'autres relations dans le contexte sententiel tout en prédisant la relation cible. Notre architecture utilise un encodeur basé sur LSTM pour apprendre conjointement les représentations de toutes les relations en une seule phrase. Nous combinons les représentations contextuelles avec un mécanisme d'attention pour faire la prédiction finale. Nous utilisons la base de connaissances Wikidata pour construire un ensemble de données de relations multiples par phrase et pour évaluer notre approche. Par rapport à un système de base, notre méthode entraîne une réduction moyenne des erreurs de 24 sur un ensemble de relations maintenues. Le code et le jeu de données permettant de reproduire les expériences sont disponibles à l'adresse < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.", 'pt': 'Demonstramos que para a extração de relações em nível de sentença é benéfico considerar outras relações no contexto sentencial enquanto prediz a relação alvo. Nossa arquitetura usa um codificador baseado em LSTM para aprender conjuntamente representações para todas as relações em uma única frase. Combinamos as representações de contexto com um mecanismo de atenção para fazer a previsão final. Usamos a base de conhecimento Wikidata para construir um conjunto de dados de múltiplas relações por sentença e para avaliar nossa abordagem. Comparado a um sistema de linha de base, nosso método resulta em uma redução média de erro de 24 em um conjunto de relações mantidas. O código e o conjunto de dados para replicar os experimentos estão disponíveis em <https://github.com/ukplab/>.', 'ja': '文レベルの関係抽出では、ターゲット関係を予測しながら、センテンシャルコンテキスト内の他の関係を考慮することが有益であることを実証します。私たちのアーキテクチャは、LSTMベースのエンコーダを使用して、1つの文ですべての関係の表現を共同で学習します。文脈表現と注意メカニズムを組み合わせて、最終的な予測を行います。ウィキデータナレッジベースを使用して、文章ごとに複数の関係のデータセットを構築し、アプローチを評価します。ベースラインシステムと比較して、当社の方法では、一連の関係で平均24の誤差を減らすことができます。実験を複製するためのコードとデータセットは、で入手可能である<https://github.com/ukplab/>。', 'zh': '吾证之于句也,于占也,于句上下文,于事有益也。 吾架构用基 LSTM 之编码器,同一句之中。 以上下文合意,以终其占。 吾以维基数知识库构句数集,并评吾法。 比之基线统,则吾道均差减24。 以复制试代码及数据集<https://github.com/ukplab/>上。', 'hi': 'हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि वाक्य-स्तर के संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए लक्ष्य संबंध की भविष्यवाणी करते समय संवेदनशील संदर्भ में अन्य संबंधों पर विचार करना फायदेमंद है। हमारी वास्तुकला एक ही वाक्य में सभी संबंधों के लिए संयुक्त रूप से प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक एलएसटीएम-आधारित एन्कोडर का उपयोग करती है। हम अंतिम भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ संदर्भ प्रतिनिधित्व को जोड़ते हैं। हम प्रति वाक्य कई संबंधों के डेटासेट का निर्माण करने और हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए विकिडेटा नॉलेज बेस का उपयोग करते हैं। एक बेसलाइन सिस्टम की तुलना में, हमारी विधि के परिणामस्वरूप संबंधों के एक आयोजित-आउट सेट पर 24 की औसत त्रुटि में कमी होती है। प्रयोगों को दोहराने के लिए कोड और डेटासेट <https://github.com/ukplab/> पर उपलब्ध कराए जाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы демонстрируем, что для извлечения отношения на уровне предложения полезно рассматривать другие отношения в контексте предложения при прогнозировании целевого отношения. Наша архитектура использует кодер на основе LSTM для совместного изучения представлений для всех отношений в одном предложении. Мы объединяем контекстные представления с механизмом внимания, чтобы сделать окончательный прогноз. Мы используем базу знаний Викидата для построения набора данных из нескольких связей на предложение и для оценки нашего подхода. По сравнению с базовой системой, наш метод приводит к среднему снижению погрешности на 24 при сохраненном наборе отношений. Код и набор данных для репликации экспериментов доступны по адресу<https://github.com/ukplab/>.', 'ga': 'Léirímid go bhfuil sé tairbheach maidir le caidreamh ar leibhéal na habairte caidreamh eile a mheas i gcomhthéacs na bpianbhreithe agus an spriocchaidreamh á thuar. Úsáideann ár n-ailtireacht ionchódóir LSTM-bhunaithe chun uiríll do gach caidreamh a fhoghlaim i gcomhpháirt in aon abairt amháin. Comhcheanglaímid na huiríll comhthéacs le meicníocht aird chun an tuar deiridh a dhéanamh. Bainimid úsáid as bunachar eolais Wikidata chun tacar sonraí de chaidreamh iolrach a chruthú in aghaidh na habairte agus chun ár gcur chuige a mheas. I gcomparáid le córas bunlíne, is é an toradh a bhíonn ar ár modh ná meánlaghdú earráide de 24 ar thacar caidrimh a choinnítear amach. Tá an cód agus an tacar sonraí chun na turgnaimh a mhacasamhlú ar fáil ag <https://github.com/ukplab/>.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სიტყვების დონეზე შესახებ ექსტრაქციის შესახებ უფრო გამოსაყენებელია სხვა შესახებ სენტიალური კონტექსტში, როცა მიზეზი შესახებ ჩვენი არქტიქტიკატი გამოყენება LSTM-ის ფორმაციის კოდერი, რომ ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ ყველა შესახებ ერთადერთი სიტყვაში ყველა შესახებ. ჩვენ კონტექსტური გამოსახულებების შემდეგ ახალგაზრულების მექანსისთვის შემდეგ გადავიწყებთ. ჩვენ ვიკეთეტატის ცნობიერების ბაზის გამოყენებთ, რომ გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების რაოდენობის კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც ყოველ სიტყვებში და ჩვენი და ჩვენი მეთოდი გადასრულებული სისტემისთან გადასრულებულია, ჩვენი მეთოდი გადასრულებული შეცდომას 24-ის გადასრულებაში. კოდი და მონაცემების სექტი, რომლებიც ექსპერიმენტები გახსნა <სექსპერიმენტებში https://github.com/ukplab/ - ეა.', 'el': 'Αποδεικνύουμε ότι για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων σε επίπεδο πρότασης είναι ευεργετικό να εξετάσουμε άλλες σχέσεις στο νοητικό πλαίσιο ενώ προβλέπουμε τη σχέση στόχου. Η αρχιτεκτονική μας χρησιμοποιεί έναν κωδικοποιητή με βάση το LSTM για να μάθει από κοινού αναπαραστάσεις για όλες τις σχέσεις σε μια πρόταση. Συνδυάζουμε τις αναπαραστάσεις περιβάλλοντος με έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής για να κάνουμε την τελική πρόβλεψη. Χρησιμοποιούμε τη βάση γνώσεων για να κατασκευάσουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων πολλαπλών σχέσεων ανά πρόταση και να αξιολογήσουμε την προσέγγισή μας. Σε σύγκριση με ένα σύστημα βάσης, η μέθοδος μας έχει ως αποτέλεσμα τη μέση μείωση σφαλμάτων του 24 σε ένα καθυστερημένο σύνολο σχέσεων. Ο κώδικας και το σύνολο δεδομένων για την αναπαραγωγή των πειραμάτων διατίθενται στο < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk, hogy a mondatszintű kapcsolat kivonásához hasznos más kapcsolatokat is figyelembe venni a célkapcsolat előrejelzése közben. Az építészetünk LSTM alapú kódolót használ arra, hogy egyetlen mondatban közösen tanulja meg az összes kapcsolat reprezentációját. A kontextusábrázolásokat egy figyelemmechanizmussal kombináljuk a végső előrejelzés elkészítéséhez. A Wikidata tudásbázisát arra használjuk, hogy mondatonként több kapcsolatból álló adatkészletet építsünk fel és értékeljük a megközelítésünket. A kiindulási rendszerhez képest a módszerünk átlagosan 24-es hibacsökkenést eredményez egy kitartott kapcsolat esetén. A kísérletek replikálására szolgáló kód és adatkészlet a < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'it': "Dimostriamo che per l'estrazione della relazione a livello di frase è utile considerare altre relazioni nel contesto sentimentale mentre predice la relazione target. La nostra architettura utilizza un encoder basato su LSTM per imparare insieme le rappresentazioni di tutte le relazioni in una singola frase. Combiniamo le rappresentazioni del contesto con un meccanismo di attenzione per fare la previsione finale. Usiamo la Knowledge Base di Wikidata per costruire un set di dati di relazioni multiple per frase e per valutare il nostro approccio. Rispetto ad un sistema di base, il nostro metodo si traduce in una riduzione media degli errori di 24 su un insieme di relazioni trattenute. Il codice e il dataset per replicare gli esperimenti sono disponibili a < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.", 'kk': 'Біз сөйлеме деңгейіндегі қатынасы тарқату үшін мақсатты қатынасын бақылау кезінде басқа қатынастарды қарастыру мүмкіндігін көрсетедік. Біздің архитектурамыз LSTM-негіздеген кодерді бір сөзде барлық қатынастарды біріктіру үшін біріктіру үшін қолданады. Соңғы таңдау үшін контексті таңдау механизмімен біріктіреміз. Біз Викидеректер білім негізін бір сөзде бірнеше қатынастарды құру үшін және қатынасызды бағалау үшін қолданамыз. Негізгі жүйесіне салыстырып, әдіміздің әдіміміз қатынасын орташа 24- қатынасын төмендетеді. Тәжірибелерді қайталау үшін код мен деректер жиыны < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'lt': 'Mes įrodome, kad ištraukiant santykius bausmės lygiu naudinga apsvarstyti kitus santykius bausmės kontekste ir prognozuoti tikslinį santykį. Mūsų architektūra naudoja LSTM pagrįstą kodatorių bendrai mokytis visų santykių atstovavimų vienu sakiniu. We combine the context representations with an attention mechanism to make the final prediction.  Naudojame Wikidata žinių bazę, kad sukurtume daugelio santykių duomenų rinkinį kiekviename sakinyje ir įvertintume mūsų požiūrį. Palyginti su pradine sistema, mūsų metodas sumažin a vidutinę klaidą 24 palaikomų santykių grupėje. Eksperimentų kopijavimo kodas ir duomenų rinkinys pateikiami < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'mk': 'Демонстрираме дека за извлекувањето на односот на ниво на реченици е корисно да се разгледаат други односи во реченицискиот контекст, истовремено предвидувајќи го односот на целта. Нашата архитектура користи кодер базиран на LSTM за заеднички да научи претставници за сите односи во една реченица. Ние ги комбинираме контекстните претставувања со механизам на внимание за да го направиме конечното предвидување. Ние ја користиме базата на знаење на Викидата за да изградиме податоци од повеќе односи по реченица и да го процениме нашиот пристап. Во споредба со основниот систем, нашиот метод резултира со просечно намалување на грешките на 24 на одржани односи. Кодот и податоците за репликација на експериментите се поставени на < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'ms': 'Kami menunjukkan bahawa untuk ekstraksi hubungan tahap kalimat ia berguna untuk mempertimbangkan hubungan lain dalam konteks kalimat sementara meramalkan hubungan sasaran. Our architecture uses an LSTM-based encoder to jointly learn representations for all relations in a single sentence.  Kami menggabungkan perwakilan konteks dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk membuat ramalan akhir. Kami menggunakan pangkalan pengetahuan Wikidata untuk membina set data hubungan berbilang per kalimat dan untuk menilai pendekatan kami. Berbanding dengan sistem asas, kaedah kita menghasilkan pengurangan ralat rata-rata 24 pada set hubungan yang ditahan-keluar. Kod dan set data untuk mereplikasi eksperimen dibuat tersedia di < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'mt': 'Aħna nuru li għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni bejn il-livell tas-sentenza huwa ta’ benefiċċju li jitqiesu relazzjonijiet oħra fil-kuntest sentenzjali filwaqt li titbassar ir-relazzjoni fil-mira. Our architecture uses an LSTM-based encoder to jointly learn representations for all relations in a single sentence.  Nikkombinaw ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kuntest ma’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni biex nagħmlu t-tbassir finali. Aħna nużaw il-bażi tal-għarfien Wikidata biex nibnu sett ta’ dejta ta’ relazzjonijiet multipli għal kull sentenza u biex jevalwaw l-approċċ tagħna. Meta mqabbel ma’ sistema ta’ linja bażi, il-metodu tagħna jirriżulta fi tnaqqis medju ta’ żball ta’ 24 fuq sett ta’ relazzjonijiet miżmuma. Il-kodiċi u s-sett tad-dejta biex jiġu replikati l-esperimenti huma disponibbli fuq < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'pl': 'Pokazujemy, że dla ekstrakcji relacji na poziomie zdania korzystne jest rozważenie innych relacji w kontekście sentencjalnym przy przewidywaniu relacji docelowej. Nasza architektura wykorzystuje koder oparty na LSTM, aby wspólnie uczyć się reprezentacji wszystkich relacji w jednym zdaniu. Łączymy reprezentacje kontekstowe z mechanizmem uwagi, aby dokonać ostatecznej prognozy. Wykorzystujemy bazę wiedzy Wikidata do zbudowania zbioru danych wielu relacji na zdanie i oceny naszego podejścia. W porównaniu do systemu bazowego nasza metoda skutkuje średnią redukcją błędów 24 na utrzymanym zbiorze relacji. Kod i zestaw danych do replikacji eksperymentów są udostępniane pod adresem < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'ro': 'Demonstrăm că pentru extragerea relației la nivel de frază este benefic să luăm în considerare alte relații în contextul sentimental, în timp ce predicționăm relația țintă. Arhitectura noastră folosește un encoder bazat pe LSTM pentru a învăța împreună reprezentări pentru toate relațiile într-o singură propoziție. Combinăm reprezentările contextului cu un mecanism de atenție pentru a face predicția finală. Folosim baza de cunoștințe Wikidata pentru a construi un set de date de relații multiple pe propoziție și pentru a evalua abordarea noastră. Comparativ cu un sistem de bază, metoda noastră are ca rezultat o reducere medie a erorilor de 24 pe un set de relații reținute. Codul și setul de date pentru replicarea experimentelor sunt puse la dispoziție la < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'sr': 'Pokazujemo da je za izvlačenje odnosa na nivou rečenica korisno razmotriti druge odnose u sentencijalnom kontekstu dok predviđamo ciljnu vezu. Naša arhitektura koristi koder osnovan na LSTM-u da zajedno nauči zastupanje za sve odnose u jednoj rečenici. Kombinujemo kontekstske predstave sa mehanizam pažnje kako bi napravili konačnu predvidku. Koristimo bazu znanja Wikidata kako bi izgradili komplet podataka o višestrukim odnosima po rečenici i procenili naš pristup. U usporedbi sa osnovnim sistemom, naš metod rezultira prosječnom smanjenju greške od 24 na određenom setu odnosa. Kod i seta podataka za kopiranje eksperimenata su dostupni na < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് നില ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടിയാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത്, ലക്ഷ്യബന്ധത്തെ പ്രവചിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വിശ്വാസ നമ്മുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള ഒരു LSTM-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ കോഡോര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d എല്ലാ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒര അവസാനത്തെ പ്രവചനം വരുത്താനുള്ള ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റമിനെ കൂട്ടിയിടുന്നു. വിക്കിഡാറ്റ അറിവുകളുടെ ബേസ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, വാക്കിലില്\u200d ഒരു വിധി ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്ക ഒരു ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെതിരായി ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും 24 ല്\u200d പിശക്  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പകര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്ന കോഡും ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'mn': 'Бид өгүүлбэр-түвшинд хамааралтай холбоотой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Цагийн холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг таамаглаж бусад холбоотой холбоотой байх нь үнэ цэнэтэй. Бидний архитектур нь LSTM-ын үндсэн кодерийг нэг өгүүлбэрээр бүх харилцааны илтгэл суралцахын тулд ашигладаг. Бид хамгийн сүүлийн таамаглалтыг хийхэд анхаарлын механизмтэй харилцааныг нэгтгэдэг. Бид Wikidata мэдлэгийн суурь ашиглаж өгүүлбэрт олон харилцаа бүтээх, ойлголтыг үнэлэх боломжтой. Гурав шугам системтэй харьцуулахад бидний арга нь дундаж алдаа хамааралтай холбоотой 24-ыг багасгаж байна. Эдгээр туршилтуудыг хуулбарлах код болон өгөгдлийн сан нь < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා වාක්ෂාව සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම් අපේ නිර්මාණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් LSTM-අධාරිත සංකේතකයෙක් භාවිත කරනවා එක්ක වාක්යෙක් වල සියලුම් සම්බන් අපි අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න. අපි විකිඩේටා දන්නවන අධ්\u200dයානය භාවිතා කරනවා වාක්ෂාවට වඩා ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධයක් නිර්මාණය මූලික පද්ධතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ විදියට, අපේ විදියට පද්ධතිය 24 වැරදි අඩු වෙනවා සම්බන්ධ විදියට. පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත සැට < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'sv': 'Vi demonstrerar att det är fördelaktigt att överväga andra relationer i sentimental kontext samtidigt som man förutspår målrelationen. Vår arkitektur använder en LSTM-baserad kodare för att gemensamt lära sig representationer för alla relationer i en enda mening. Vi kombinerar kontextrepresentationerna med en uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att göra den slutliga förutsägelsen. Vi använder Wikidata kunskapsbas för att konstruera en dataset med flera relationer per mening och för att utvärdera vårt tillvägagångssätt. Jämfört med ett baslinjesystem resulterar vår metod i en genomsnittlig felminskning på 24 på en utdragen uppsättning relationer. Koden och datauppsättningen för att replikera experimenten finns tillgängliga på < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'no': 'Vi viser at for setningsnivået relasjon til utpakking er det nyttig å forstå andre forholdar i sentensielt kontekst mens det foregår målrelasjonen. Arkitekturen vårt bruker ein LSTM-basert koder for å lære representasjonar for alle relasjonar i eit enkelt setning. Vi kombinerer kontekstrepresentasjonane med ein oppmerksmekanisme for å gjera det siste forhåndsvising. Vi bruker Wikidata-kunnskapsbasen for å konstruere eit dataset med fleire forhold per setning og evaluere tilnærminga vårt. Sammenlignet med ein grunnlinjesystem resulterer metoden vårt i gjennomsnittsfeilreduksjon av 24 på eit sett av forhold. Koden og dataset som skal kopierast eksperimentane er tilgjengeleg på < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'so': 'We demonstrate that for sentence-level relation extraction it is beneficial to consider other relations in the sentential context while predicting the target relation.  Arkitiyeygu wuxuu isticmaalaa qodol ku saleysan LSTM si uu u barto noocyo wadajir ah u barto wakiilada xiriirka oo dhan hal kaliya. Waxaynu isku darsameynaa muusikada deegaanka si aan ugu dambaysta wax u sheegno. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa aasaaska aqoonta ee Wikidata si aan u dhisno koob-tiro xiriir kala duduwan oo aan u qiimeynayno qaababkayaga. Isbarbardhig nidaamka asalka ah, qaabkanagu wuxuu sabab u noqdaa qalabka ugu badnaan ee 24 ka hoosaysa xiriir la xiriiray. Kaarka iyo sawirada in lagu beddelo imtixaanka waxaa laga helaa < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'ta': 'வாக்கு மட்டத்திற்கு தொடர்பு வெளியேற்றத்திற்கு இது வாக்கியமான தொடர்புகளை பார்க்க உதவும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது இலக்கு தொடர்பை  Our architecture uses an LSTM-based encoder to jointly learn representations for all relations in a single sentence.  நாம் சூழல் பிரதிநிதிகளை ஒரு கவனம் முறைமையுடன் ஒன்று சேர் நாங்கள் விகிடிட்டாவின் அறிவிப்பு தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி ஒவ்வொரு வாக்கியத்திற்கும் பல தொடர்புகளை உருவாக்கி எங்கள்  ஒரு அடிப்படைக்கோட்டு அமைப்பிற்கு ஒப்பிட்டால், எங்கள் முறைமையில் ஒரு வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட தொடர்புகளின் மீது சராசரியா பரிசோதனைகளை மாற்றுவதற்கு குறியீடு மற்றும் தரவு அமைப்புகள் < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'ur': 'ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ مجلس سطح کے ارتباط کے لئے اٹھانے کے لئے فائدہ ہے کہ دوسرے ارتباط کو احساس کے متعلق سمجھنے کے بعد موجود ارتباط کی پیش کرو۔ ہماری معماری ایک جماعت میں تمام رابطے کے لئے ایک لس ٹیم کی بنیادی کوڈر کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے کنٹنسیٹ کی نمایش کو ایک توجه کی مکانیسم کے ساتھ جمع کیا ہے کہ آخری پیش بینی کریں۔ ہم ویکیڈاٹا علم بنسٹ کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ہر جماعت میں بہت سی رابطہ بنائیں اور ہماری طریقہ کا ارزش کریں۔ ایک بنیس لین سیسٹم کے مقابلہ میں، ہمارا طریقہ ایک متوسط خطا کم کرتا ہے جس طریقے کے سامنے حفظ ہونے والی نسبت پر 24 کی خطا کم ہوتی ہے. کوڈ اور ڈیٹ سٹ جو آزمائش کو دفع کرنے کے لیے موجود ہے <پر https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'uz': "Biz maxfiy soʻzni tahrirlash uchun boshqa aloqalarni o'ylash imkoniyatini ko'rsatumiz. Govt aloqalarini oldin oldinga o'ylab turish juda foydalanadi. Bu bir so'z bilan hamma munosabatlarning xususiyatlarini o'rganish uchun LSTM asosiy kodlash qoidadan foydalanadi. Biz muhimkoniyatlarni eng oxirgi hozir qilish mekani bilan birlashtiramiz. Biz Wikidata haqida maʼlumot bazasini bir so'z bir necha munosabatlarni yaratish uchun foydalanamiz va tuyg'izni qiymatlash uchun. Asosiy satr tizimga teng qilingan usulning o'zgarishga 24 ta'minlovchi darajada xato kamaytirish mumkin. Name https://github.com/ukplab/ >.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng việc trích xuất mức án là tốt khi xem xét các mối quan hệ khác trong trường hợp bị xem xét, trong khi dự đoán mối quan hệ mục tiêu. Kiến trúc của chúng tôi sử dụng bộ mã hóa LSTM để cùng nhau học kinh doanh mọi quan hệ trong một câu. Chúng ta kết hợp các biểu hiện ngữ ngữ cảnh với một cơ chế tập trung để đưa ra dự đoán cuối cùng. Chúng tôi sử dụng căn cứ kiến thức của WikiLti để xây dựng một tập tin chứa nhiều quan hệ mỗi câu và đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi. So với một hệ cơ bản, phương pháp của chúng ta dẫn tới một sự giảm lỗi trung bình của 24 trên một chuỗi các mối quan hệ còn lại. Mật mã và bộ dữ liệu để sao chép các thí nghiệm được cung cấp https://github.com/ukplab/ -̀.', 'nl': 'We tonen aan dat het nuttig is om andere relaties in de sententiële context te overwegen bij het voorspellen van de doelrelatie. Onze architectuur maakt gebruik van een LSTM-gebaseerde encoder om gezamenlijk representaties te leren voor alle relaties in één zin. We combineren de contextrepresentaties met een aandachtsmechanisme om de uiteindelijke voorspelling te maken. We gebruiken de Wikidata kennisbank om een dataset van meerdere relaties per zin op te bouwen en onze aanpak te evalueren. Vergeleken met een baseline systeem resulteert onze methode in een gemiddelde foutreductie van 24 op een uitgestelde set relaties. De code en de dataset om de experimenten te repliceren zijn beschikbaar op < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'bg': 'Ние демонстрираме, че за извличане на връзка на ниво изречение е полезно да се вземат предвид други отношения в контекста на сентенцията, докато се предвижда целевата връзка. Нашата архитектура използва базиран кодер, за да научи съвместно представяне на всички отношения в едно изречение. Комбинираме контекстните представи с механизъм за внимание, за да направим окончателното предсказание. Използваме базата от знания на Уикиданни, за да изградим набор от данни от множество връзки на изречение и да оценим нашия подход. В сравнение с базовата система, методът ни води до средно намаляване на грешките с 24 при задържан набор от връзки. Кодът и наборът от данни за репликиране на експериментите са достъпни на < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'hr': 'Pokazujemo da je u odnosu na razini kazne korisno razmotriti druge odnose u kaznenom kontekstu dok predviđamo ciljnu vezu. Naša arhitektura koristi koder osnovan na LSTM-u kako bi zajedno naučila zastupanje svih odnosa u jednoj rečenici. Kombiniramo kontekstske predstave sa mehanizam pažnje kako bi napravili konačnu predviđanje. Koristimo bazu znanja Wikidata kako bi izgradili skup podataka o višestrukim odnosima po rečenici i procijenili naš pristup. U usporedbi s početnim sustavom, naša metoda rezultira prosječnom smanjenju greške od 24 na određenom nizu odnosa. Kod i seta podataka za kopiranje eksperimenata su dostupni na < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'ko': '우리는 문장급 관계 추출에 있어 목표 관계를 예측할 때 문장 상하문 중의 다른 관계를 고려하는 것이 유익하다는 것을 증명했다.우리의 구조는 LSTM 기반의 인코더를 사용하여 한 마디에 모든 관계의 표시를 함께 배운다.우리는 언어 환경 표징과 주의 메커니즘을 결합시켜 최종 예측을 진행할 것이다.Wikidata Knowledgebase를 사용하여 각 문장의 여러 관계를 포함하는 데이터 세트를 구축하고 방법을 평가합니다.기선 시스템에 비해 우리의 방법은 한 그룹이 유지하는 관계의 평균 오차가 24 감소했다.복제 실험의 코드와 데이터 세트는 <https://github.com/ukplab/>.', 'da': 'Vi demonstrerer, at det ved sætningsniveau relationsudtrækning er gavnligt at overveje andre relationer i sentimental kontekst samtidig med at forudsige målrelationen. Vores arkitektur bruger en LSTM-baseret encoder til i fællesskab at lære repræsentationer for alle relationer i en enkelt sætning. Vi kombinerer kontekst repræsentationer med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme for at lave den endelige forudsigelse. Vi bruger Wikidata vidensbase til at konstruere et datasæt af flere relationer pr. sætning og til at evaluere vores tilgang. Sammenlignet med et baseline system resulterer vores metode i en gennemsnitlig fejlreduktion på 24 på et holdt sæt relationer. Koden og datasættet til replikering af eksperimenterne stilles til rådighed på < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'fa': 'ما نشان می دهیم که برای استخراج ارتباط سطح مجازات سودمندانه است که رابطه\u200cهای دیگر را در محیط احکامی در زمان پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط هدف در نظر بگیریم. معماری ما از یک رمزگر بنیاد LSTM استفاده می\u200cکند تا با هم نمایش\u200cهایی برای همه رابطه\u200cها در یک جمله یاد بگیرد. ما نمایش\u200cهای محیط را با یک مکانیسم توجه برای انجام پیش بینی نهایی ترکیب می\u200cکنیم. ما از پایگاه دانش ویکیدادا استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک مجموعه داده\u200cای از ارتباطات چندین در هر جمله بسازیم و برای ارزیابی روش ما استفاده کنیم. در مقایسه با یک سیستم پایین، روش ما به کاهش خطای متوسط ۲۴ در یک مجموعه از ارتباطات پایین می\u200cرسد. کد و مجموعه داده\u200cها برای تکرار آزمایشات در < https://github.com/ukplab/ .', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha kwamba kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa kiwango cha kuhusiana na hukumu ni faida zaidi kufikiri mahusiano mengine katika muktadha wa sentensi wakati unatabiri uhusiano wa lengo. Ujengo wetu unatumia kodi inayoko LSTM ili kujifunza wakilishi pamoja kwa ajili ya mahusiano yote katika hukumu moja. Tunaunganisha uwakilizaji wa muktadha na mfumo wa kutoa hisia ili kutengeneza utabiri wa mwisho. Tunatumia msingi wa maarifa ya Wikidata ili kutengeneza seti ya taarifa za mahusiano kadhaa kwa kila hukumu na kutathmini hatua yetu. Kulinganishwa na mfumo wa msingi, mbinu zetu zinasababisha kupungua kwa wastani makosa 24 kwenye seti ya mahusiano. Kodi na seti ya taarifa ya kubadilisha majaribio yanapatikana kwenye < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'de': 'Wir zeigen, dass es für die Beziehungsextraktion auf Satzebene vorteilhaft ist, andere Beziehungen im sententialen Kontext zu berücksichtigen und gleichzeitig die Zielbeziehung vorherzusagen. Unsere Architektur nutzt einen LSTM-basierten Encoder, um gemeinsam Darstellungen für alle Beziehungen in einem Satz zu lernen. Wir kombinieren die Kontextdarstellungen mit einem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um die endgültige Vorhersage zu treffen. Wir nutzen die Wikidata Knowledge Base, um einen Datensatz mehrerer Relationen pro Satz zu erstellen und unseren Ansatz zu evaluieren. Im Vergleich zu einem Baseline-System resultiert unsere Methode in einer durchschnittlichen Fehlerreduktion von 24 auf einem festgehaltenen Satz von Relationen. Der Code und der Datensatz zur Replikation der Experimente werden unter < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'id': 'Kami menunjukkan bahwa untuk ekstraksi hubungan tingkat kalimat itu berguna untuk mempertimbangkan hubungan lain dalam konteks kalimat sementara memprediksi hubungan sasaran. Arkitektur kami menggunakan pengekode berdasarkan LSTM untuk bersama-sama belajar representation untuk semua hubungan dalam satu kalimat. Kami menggabungkan representation konteks dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk membuat prediksi akhir. Kami menggunakan pangkalan pengetahuan Wikidata untuk membangun dataset hubungan berbilang per kalimat dan untuk mengevaluasi pendekatan kita. Dibandingkan dengan sistem dasar, metode kita menghasilkan pengurangan kesalahan rata-rata 24 pada set hubungan yang terhenti. Kode dan set data untuk mereplikasikan eksperimen dibuat tersedia di < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'tr': 'Biz sözlem derejesi baglaýyşy çekmek üçin sözlemde başga bir baglaýyşy düşünmek üçin bir faydaly däldir. Biziň arhitekturymyz LSTM tabanly kodçysyny bir sözlemde ähli baglaýyşlary üçin üýtgetmek üçin ullanýar. Biz daşaryk temsillerini son öňünden geçirmek üçin üns meýdançasyny bilen birleşdirýäris. Biz Wikidata bilgi bazyny sözleriňde birnäçe sanat baglaşyklaryň düzenlemek üçin ullanýarys we öz golamyzy deňlemek üçin ullanýarys. Basit sistemine karşılaştırıldığında, bizim yöntemimiz ortalama hata düşürmesine sebep ediyor. Synaglary ýeňlemek üçin köd we veri setirine bar < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'am': "የሥርዓት ደረጃ ግንኙነት ለመውጣት የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በማስታወቂያው ጊዜ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለመጠየቅ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የመዝገብ ካውንተራችን የLSTM የሆኑትን የሆኑት የግንኙነት ሁሉ መልዕክቶች በአንድ ቃል ለመማር ይጠቅማል፡፡ የኋለኛውን ትንቢት ለማድረግ የግንኙነቱን መልዕክት እናሳስባለን፡፡ የWikidata እውቀት መቀመጫን በየፍርዱ የዳታ ግንኙነቶችን ለመሥራት እና የግንኙነታችንን ለማስተዋል እናስጠንቃለን፡፡ ከዋና ሳጥን ስርዓት የተደረገው ስህተታችን የ24 ጥያቄ የውጤት ግንኙነት ሲያሳስል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s https://github.com/ukplab/ >.", 'af': "Ons wys dat vir sentence-level verwanting van uittrekking dit is nuttig om ander verwantings in die sentenciele konteks te beskou terwyl die doel verwanting voorskou is. Ons arkitektuur gebruik 'n LSTM-gebaseerde enkoder om saamstig voorstellings te leer vir alle verwantings in 'n enkele seting. Ons kombinieer die konteks voorstellings met 'n aandagmekanisme om die eindelike voorskou te maak. Ons gebruik die Wikidata kennis basis om 'n datastel van veelvuldige verwantings per seting te konstrukteer en ons toegang te evalueer. Vergelyk met 'n basilyn stelsel, ons metode resulteer in 'n gemiddelde fout reduksie van 24 op 'n vasgehou stel van relasies. Die kode en die datastel om die eksperimente te kopieer word beskikbaar by < https://github.com/ukplab/ >", 'hy': 'Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նախադասության մակարդակի հարաբերությունների վերացման համար օգտակար է հաշվի առնել այլ հարաբերությունները նախադասության կոնտեքստում, միաժամանակ կանխատեսելով նպատակային հարաբերությունները: Մեր ճարտարապետությունը օգտագործում է LSMT-ով հիմնված կոդեր, որպեսզի միասին սովորենք բոլոր հարաբերությունների ներկայացումներ մեկ նախադասության մեջ: Մենք համադրում ենք կոնտեքստի ներկայացումները ուշադրության մեխանիզմի հետ վերջնական կանխատեսումը կատարելու համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք Վիքիդատայի գիտելիքների հիմքը, որպեսզի կառուցենք յուրաքանչյուր նախադասություն բազմաթիվ հարաբերությունների տվյալներ և գնահատենք մեր մոտեցումը: Համեմատելով հիմնական համակարգին, մեր մեթոդը հանգեցնում է 24-ի միջին սխալների կրճատմանը հարաբերությունների պահպանված հատվածում: Փորձերի կրկնօրինակման կոդը և տվյալների համակարգը հասանելի են https://github.com/ukplab/ ]:', 'az': 'Biz göstəririk ki, cümlələr səviyyəsi ilə əlaqəsi çıxarmaq üçün, məqsəd əlaqəsini təmin edərkən başqa əlaqələri düşünmək faydalandır. Bizim arhitektarımız LSTM tabanlı kodlayıcını tək cümlədə bütün ilişkilər üçün birlikdə ifadələr öyrənmək üçün istifadə edir. Əvvəlki tədbir etmək üçün məlumatları gözləmə mehānismi ilə birləşdiririk. Biz Wikidata elm üssünü cümlələrdə çoxlu əlaqələrin qurmaq üçün və bizim tərəfimizi değerləşdirmək üçün istifadə edirik. Əsas sistemi ilə qarşılaşdırıldığımız tərzimiz ortalama xəta azaltmasına görə, müəyyən edilmiş müxtəlif əlaqələrdə 24-ni azaltır. İşyaları kopiyalamaq üçün kodu və veri qurulu < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'sq': 'Ne demonstrojmë se për nxjerrjen e lidhjes me nivelin e dënimeve është e dobishme të konsiderojmë marrëdhënie të tjera në kontekstin e dënimeve ndërsa parashikojmë lidhjen me objektivin. Arkitektura jonë përdor një kodues bazuar në LSTM për të mësuar së bashku përfaqësime për të gjitha marrëdhëniet në një fjalim të vetëm. Ne kombinojmë përfaqësimet e kontekstit me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje për të bërë parashikimin përfundimtar. We use the Wikidata knowledge base to construct a dataset of multiple relations per sentence and to evaluate our approach.  Në krahasim me një sistem bazë, metoda jonë rezulton në një reduktim mesatar të gabimeve prej 24 në një sërë marrëdhënieve të ndaluara. Kodi dhe grupi i të dhënave për të përsëritur eksperimentet janë bërë në dispozicion në < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'ca': "Demonstrem que per a l'extracció de la relació entre frases és beneficiós considerar altres relacions en el context de frases mentre predim la relació alvo. La nostra arquitectura utilitza un codificador basat en LSTM per aprendre conjuntament representacions per totes les relacions en una sola frase. Combnem les representacions contextuals amb un mecanisme d'atenció per fer la predicció final. Utilitzem la base de coneixements de Wikidata per construir un conjunt de dades de múltiples relacions per frase i per avaluar el nostre enfocament. Comparat amb un sistema de base, el nostre mètode provoca una reducció d'errors mitjana de 24 en un conjunt de relacions que no es mantenen. El codi i el conjunt de dades per replicar els experiments estan disponibles a < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.", 'cs': 'Ukazujeme, že pro extrakci vztahů na úrovni věty je výhodné zvážit ostatní vztahy v sententiálním kontextu při predikci cílové vztahy. Naše architektura používá kodér založený na LSTM, aby se společně učila reprezentace všech vztahů v jedné větě. Kombinujeme kontextové reprezentace s mechanismem pozornosti pro konečnou predikci. Využíváme znalostní databázi Wikidata k sestavení datové sady více vztahů za větu a k vyhodnocení našeho přístupu. Ve srovnání se základním systémem, naše metoda vede k průměrnému snížení chyb 24 na vydržené sadě vztahů. Kód a datová sada pro replikaci experimentů jsou k dispozici na adrese < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'bs': 'Pokazujemo da je za izvlačenje odnosa na razini kazne korisno razmotriti druge odnose u kaznenom kontekstu dok predviđamo ciljnu vezu. Naša arhitektura koristi koder osnovan na LSTM-u da zajedno nauči zastupanje za sve odnose u jednoj rečenici. Kombiniramo kontekstske predstave sa mehanizam pažnje kako bi napravili konačnu predvidku. Koristimo bazu znanja Wikidata kako bi izgradili komplet podataka o višestrukim odnosima po rečenici i procenili naš pristup. U usporedbi s početnim sistemom, naša metoda rezultira prosječnom smanjenju greške od 24 na određenom setu odnosa. Kod i seta podataka za kopiranje eksperimenata su dostupni na < https://github.com/ukplab/ - Da.', 'bn': 'আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শাস্তি পর্যায়ের সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য এটা অন্যান্য সম্পর্ক বিবেচনা করার জন্য উপকার। আমাদের প্রতিষ্ঠান একটি এলস্টিএম-ভিত্তিক এনকোডার ব্যবহার করে একটি শাস্তিতে সকল সম্পর্কের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে। We combine the context representations with an attention mechanism to make the final prediction.  আমরা উইকিদাতা জ্ঞানের বেস ব্যবহার করি প্রতি বাক্যের বেশ কিছু সম্পর্ক নির্মাণ করার জন্য এবং আমাদের পদক্ষেপের মূল্য একটি বেস্টলাইন সিস্টেমের তুলনায়, আমাদের পদ্ধতি সাধারণত ২৪ টি ত্রুটির মাধ্যমে সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে সংক্ < https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'fi': 'Osoitamme, että lausetason suhteen purkamisessa on hyödyllistä tarkastella muita suhteita sententiaalisessa kontekstissa samalla kun ennustetaan kohdesuhdetta. Arkkitehtuurimme käyttää LSTM-pohjaista koodausta oppiakseen yhdessä kaikkien suhteiden representaatioita yhdessä lauseessa. Yhdistämme kontekstin esitykset huomiomekanismiin lopullisen ennusteen tekemiseksi. Käytämme Wikidatan tietopohjaa rakentaaksemme useita suhteita lausetta kohti ja arvioimme lähestymistapaamme. Verrattuna perusjärjestelmään menetelmämme johtaa keskimääräiseen virhevähennykseen 24:llä keskeytetyissä suhteissa. Kokeiden toistamiseen käytettävä koodi ja aineisto on saatavilla osoitteessa < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'et': 'Näitame, et lausetaseme suhte väljavõtmisel on kasulik kaaluda teisi suhteid sentimentaalses kontekstis, prognoosides samal ajal sihtsuhet. Meie arhitektuur kasutab LSTM-põhist kodeerijat, et ühiselt õppida esitusi kõigi suhete kohta ühes lauses. Me kombineerime konteksti esitused tähelepanu mehhanismiga, et teha lõplik prognoos. Me kasutame Wikidata teadmistebaasi, et luua andmekogum mitmest seosest lause kohta ja hinnata oma lähenemisviisi. Võrreldes baassüsteemiga vähendab meie meetod keskmiselt vea 24 võrra kinni peetud suhete puhul. Kood ja andmekogum katsete paljundamiseks on kättesaadav aadressil < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'ha': "Tuna nũna cewa, don ka yi amfani da ka yi tunãni ga masu haɗi da danganta cikin mazaɓa da kalma idan an yi bayani ga tsarin da aka yi amfani da shi. An yi amfani da kodi na LSSM da kwamfyuta zuwa a haɗa barci masu tsari wa dukkan muhimmanci cikin birnin keliya. Munã haɗa mazaɓan mazaɓa da wani mekanin muhimmanci da za'a samar da bakin bayani. Munã amfani da bangon ilmi na Wikidata dõmin mu sami tsarin danasãri masu yawa ko da ɗabi'a, kuma dõmin mu ƙaddara hanyarmu. @ info: whatsthis Kodi da tsarin da za'a sami jarraboyin su da < https://github.com/ukplab/ >", 'he': 'אנחנו מוכיחים שבשביל חיטוף מערכת יחסים משפטים זה מועיל לשקול יחסים אחרים בקשר משפטי בזמן לחזות את מערכת יחסים המטרה. הארכיטקטורה שלנו משתמשת בקוד מבוסס על LSTM כדי ללמוד יחד מייצגים לכל מערכות יחסים במשפט אחד. אנחנו משלבים את היציגות הקשר עם מנגנון תשומת לב כדי לעשות את החזוי הסופי. אנחנו משתמשים בסיס הידע של ויקידאטה כדי לבנות קבוצת נתונים של יחסים רבים לכל משפט ולעריך את הגישה שלנו. בהשוואה למערכת בסיסית, השיטה שלנו מובילה להפחית טעות ממוצעת של 24 על קבוצת מערכות יחסים מחוסרות. הקוד והקבוצת הנתונים כדי לשכפל את הניסויים הופכים זמינים ב < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'sk': 'Dokazujemo, da je pri ekstrakciji razmerja na ravni stavka koristno upoštevati druge odnose v kontekstu sentimentalnega ob napovedovanju ciljne relacije. Naša arhitektura uporablja kodirnik, ki temelji na LSTM, za skupno učenje predstavitev vseh relacij v enem stavku. Za končno napoved združujemo kontekstne reprezentacije z mehanizmom pozornosti. Zbirko znanja Wikipodatkov uporabljamo za gradnjo nabora podatkov več relacij na stavek in za oceno našega pristopa. V primerjavi z osnovnim sistemom je naša metoda povprečno zmanjšala napako za 24 pri zadržanih odnosih. Koda in nabor podatkov za ponovitev poskusov sta na voljo na < https://github.com/ukplab/ >.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno karo kelas-kelas barang nggap gampang architecture Awakdhéwé pisan kontèks Rayaké ambekan karo mekanistik sing beraksi kanggo ngilanggar galawih dumadhi. Awak dhéwé éntuk kelas nang aléndhu podho kanggo nggawe dataset kanggo nggawe barang kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo nyelaraé awak dhéwé. Ngawe nambah sistem sing paling-sistem, dadi kapan kanggo ngerasakno uwis 24 kanggo ditambah barang kanggo ngerasakno Coverage https://github.com/ukplab/ >', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་ཕྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་སྐྱེན་པའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གཞན་པ་ཚོར་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཅིག་ནང་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་LSTM་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌབ་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱིན ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྟོགས་པ་མཉམ་དུ་དམིགས་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་Wikidata་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཚིག་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྨང་གཞིའི་མ་ལག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་ཕྱིར་ཁང་གི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཚད་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལྡ བརྟག་ཞིབ་འདི་བསུབ་པར་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད་པ< https://github.com/ukplab/ >'}
{'en': 'A Soft-label Method for Noise-tolerant Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'طريقة التسمية اللينة لاستخراج العلاقة تحت الإشراف البعيد لتحمل الضوضاء', 'es': 'Un método de etiqueta suave para la extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia tolerante al ruido', 'fr': "Une méthode d'étiquetage souple pour l'extraction de relations supervisée à distance tolérante au bruit", 'pt': 'Um método de rótulo suave para extração de relação supervisionada à distância tolerante a ruído', 'ja': 'ノイズ耐性遠隔監視下の関係抽出のためのソフトラベル法', 'zh': '一容扰远督取软标签法', 'hi': 'शोर-सहिष्णु दूर से पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए एक सॉफ्ट-लेबल विधि', 'ru': 'Метод с мягкой меткой для шумоустойчивой дистанционно контролируемой экстракции', 'ga': 'Modh Lipéad Bog le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh Chianmhaoirsithe atá Torainn-fhulangach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια μέθοδος μαλακής ετικέτας για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων με αντοχή σε θόρυβο με απομακρυσμένη εποπτεία', 'hu': 'Soft-label módszer a zajtűrő, távolról felügyelt viszonyok kivonására', 'kk': 'Дыбыс- толерантты қашықтың қатынасын қарау үшін қысқартылған жарлық әдісі', 'it': "Metodo Soft-label per l'estrazione di relazioni a distanza tolleranti al rumore", 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Mažas triukšmui toleruojamo nuotolinio kontroliuojamo santykio ekstrakcijos metodas', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സോഫ്റ്റ്- ലെറ്റ് മാറ്റം നോസ്- tolerant Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'mn': 'Шүлэг-холбогдолтой холбогдолтой хамааралтай хамааралтай гаргах', 'mt': 'Metodu b’tikketta ratba għall-estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjoni sorveljata mill-bogħod li tittollera l-istorbju', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Metoda miękkiej etykiety dla ekstrakcji relacji tolerancyjnych na odległość nadzorowanych związków', 'ro': 'O metodă soft-label pentru extracția relațiilor tolerante la zgomot supravegheate la distanță', 'sr': 'Metod mekih etiketa za izvlačenje veza s udaljenim nadzornim glasom', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Midabka Software-label for Noise-tolerant Distantly Supervised Relation Extraction', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'En mjuk metod för brustolerant fjärrövervakad relationsextraktion', 'ur': 'صوت ثابت ہونے والی دور نظارت والی رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے سائٹ لیبل طریقہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cách thức đo mềm cho độ chịu nhiễu ảnh hưởng cách nhìn xa', 'bg': 'Метод с мек етикет за извличане на шумоустойчива отдалечено контролирана връзка', 'da': 'En blød mærkningsmetode til støjtolerant fjernovervåget relation ekstraktion', 'hr': 'Metod mekog označavanja za izvlačenje odnosa s udaljeno nadziranom glasom', 'nl': 'Een soft-label methode voor ruistolerante relatieextractie op afstand', 'de': 'Eine Soft-Label-Methode zur rauschtoleranten Fernüberwachten Beziehungsextraktion', 'ko': '소음을 용인하는 원격 감독 관계 추출 소프트 표기 방법', 'id': 'Name', 'fa': 'یک روش نرم برچسب برای اخراج رابطه\u200cهای دور تحت نظر صدا', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Simu-label kwa ajili ya Utoaji wa Kizungumzo', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një metodë e etiketës së butë për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura nga larg që tolerojnë zhurmën', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Süfür-tolerant uzaq-gözləyirli İlişkilər Çıqarması üçün Yaxınlıq Etilmə metodu', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Metod mekih etiketa za izvlačenje udaljenog nadzornog odnosa', 'ca': "Un mètode d'etiqueta suau per a l'extracció de relacions remotament supervisades tolerants al soroll", 'cs': 'Metoda Soft-label pro extrakci vztahů odolných šumu s dálkovým dohledem', 'et': 'Pehme märgisega meetod müratalerantseks kaugjärelevalvega seoste eraldamiseks', 'fi': 'Pehmeän etiketin menetelmä melusiedettävään etävalvottuun suhteeseen', 'tr': 'A çmak üçin Ýift-etiket Metini Açmak üçin', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'A Softer-label Method for Noisa-tolerans Distant Distant Subtracted Relative extract', 'sk': 'Metoda mehkega označevanja za odstranjevanje odnosov, odpornih proti hrupu z daljnim nadzorom', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་མཐུད་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཐུན་རྗེས་མཁན་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས'}
{'en': 'Distant-supervised relation extraction inevitably suffers from wrong labeling problems because it heuristically labels relational facts with knowledge bases. Previous sentence level denoise models do n’t achieve satisfying performances because they use hard labels which are determined by distant supervision and immutable during training. To this end, we introduce an entity-pair level denoise method which exploits semantic information from correctly labeled entity pairs to correct wrong labels dynamically during training. We propose a joint score function which combines the relational scores based on the entity-pair representation and the confidence of the hard label to obtain a new label, namely a soft label, for certain entity pair. During training, soft labels instead of hard labels serve as gold labels. Experiments on the benchmark dataset show that our method dramatically reduces noisy instances and outperforms other state-of-the-art systems.', 'ar': 'يعاني استخراج العلاقة الخاضع للإشراف حتماً من مشاكل وضع العلامات الخاطئة لأنه يصف الحقائق العلائقية بقواعد المعرفة بشكل استكشافي. لا تحقق نماذج تقليل الضوضاء على مستوى الجملة السابقة أداءً مرضيًا لأنها تستخدم ملصقات صلبة يتم تحديدها من خلال الإشراف البعيد وغير قابلة للتغيير أثناء التدريب. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقدم طريقة إزالة الضوضاء على مستوى زوج الكيان والتي تستغل المعلومات الدلالية من أزواج الكيانات المصنفة بشكل صحيح لتصحيح الملصقات الخاطئة ديناميكيًا أثناء التدريب. نقترح وظيفة درجة مشتركة تجمع بين الدرجات العلائقية بناءً على تمثيل زوج الكيان وثقة الملصق الثابت للحصول على تسمية جديدة ، وهي تسمية ناعمة ، لزوج كيان معين. أثناء التدريب ، تكون الملصقات اللينة بدلاً من الملصقات الصلبة بمثابة ملصقات ذهبية. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعة البيانات المعيارية أن طريقتنا تقلل بشكل كبير الحالات الصاخبة وتتفوق على الأنظمة الحديثة الأخرى.', 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones supervisadas a distancia sufre inevitablemente de problemas de etiquetado incorrecto porque etiqueta heurísticamente los hechos relacionales con bases de conocimiento. Los modelos de ruido a nivel de oración anteriores no logran rendimientos satisfactorios porque utilizan etiquetas duras que están determinadas por supervisión distante e inmutables durante el entrenamiento. Con este fin, introducimos un método de eliminación de ruido a nivel de par de entidades que aprovecha la información semántica de los pares de entidades correctamente etiquetados para corregir etiquetas incorrectas de forma dinámica durante el entrenamiento. Proponemos una función de puntuación conjunta que combina las puntuaciones relacionales basadas en la representación del par de entidades y la confianza de la etiqueta dura para obtener una nueva etiqueta, a saber, una etiqueta suave, para cierto par de entidades. Durante el entrenamiento, las etiquetas blandas en lugar de etiquetas duras sirven como etiquetas doradas. Los experimentos en el conjunto de datos de referencia muestran que nuestro método reduce drásticamente las instancias ruidosas y supera a otros sistemas de última generación.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations supervisée à distance souffre inévitablement de problèmes d'étiquetage erronés car elle étiquette de manière heuristique des faits relationnels avec des bases de connaissances. Les modèles de réduction du bruit de niveau de phrase précédent n'atteignent pas des performances satisfaisantes car ils utilisent des étiquettes rigides qui sont déterminées par une supervision à distance et immuables pendant l'entraînement. À cette fin, nous introduisons une méthode de réduction du bruit au niveau des paires d'entités qui exploite les informations sémantiques des paires d'entités correctement étiquetées pour corriger les étiquettes erronées de manière dynamique pendant l'apprentissage. Nous proposons une fonction de score conjointe qui combine les scores relationnels en fonction de la représentation de la paire d'entités et de la confiance de l'étiquette dure afin d'obtenir une nouvelle étiquette, à savoir une étiquette souple, pour certaines paires d'entités. Pendant l'entraînement, les étiquettes souples au lieu des étiquettes rigides servent d'étiquettes dorées. Les expériences sur le jeu de données de référence montrent que notre méthode réduit considérablement les instances bruyantes et surpasse les autres systèmes de pointe.", 'pt': 'A extração de relação supervisionada à distância inevitavelmente sofre de problemas de rotulagem errados porque rotula heuristicamente fatos relacionais com bases de conhecimento. Modelos anteriores de redução de ruído em nível de sentença não alcançam desempenhos satisfatórios porque usam rótulos rígidos que são determinados por supervisão distante e imutáveis durante o treinamento. Para este fim, introduzimos um método de redução de ruído em nível de par de entidades que explora informações semânticas de pares de entidades rotulados corretamente para corrigir rótulos errados dinamicamente durante o treinamento. Propomos uma função de pontuação conjunta que combina as pontuações relacionais baseadas na representação entidade-par e a confiança do hard label para obter um novo rótulo, ou seja, um soft label, para determinado par de entidades. Durante o treinamento, rótulos flexíveis em vez de rótulos rígidos servem como rótulos dourados. Experimentos no conjunto de dados de referência mostram que nosso método reduz drasticamente as instâncias ruidosas e supera outros sistemas de última geração.', 'ja': '遠隔監視された関係抽出は、知識ベースで関係事実をヒューリスティックにラベル付けするため、間違ったラベル付けの問題に必然的に苦しむ。以前の文章レベルのデノイズモデルは、遠隔監督によって決定され、トレーニング中に不変であるハードラベルを使用するため、満足のいくパフォーマンスを実現しません。このために、エンティティペアレベルのデノイズ法を導入し、正しくラベル付けされたエンティティペアからのセマンティック情報を利用して、トレーニング中に間違ったラベルを動的に修正します。エンティティペア表現とハードラベルの信頼性に基づく関係スコアを組み合わせて、特定のエンティティペアの新しいラベル、すなわちソフトラベルを取得するジョイントスコア関数を提案します。トレーニング中は、ハードラベルではなくソフトラベルがゴールドラベルとして機能します。ベンチマークデータセットの実験によると、当社のメソッドはノイズの多いインスタンスを劇的に削減し、他の最先端のシステムよりも優れています。', 'zh': '远监提不免于过,以其用知识库启发式实也。 前句降噪不得志,以其用远程督定,不可变也。 是以引入降噪法,以正其语义,以正其非。 发一合评分函数,函数分数与置信度合,以得特定实之新签,即软标签也。 其训练之间,软签非硬标以为金也。 其数集之实验,吾法大大减少噪声实,且优于他最先进之统。', 'hi': 'दूर-पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण अनिवार्य रूप से गलत लेबलिंग समस्याओं से ग्रस्त है क्योंकि यह ज्ञान के आधार के साथ संबंधपरक तथ्यों को लेबल करता है। पिछले वाक्य स्तर के डेनोइस मॉडल संतोषजनक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त नहीं करते हैं क्योंकि वे कठिन लेबल का उपयोग करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण के दौरान दूर के पर्यवेक्षण और अपरिवर्तनीय द्वारा निर्धारित होते हैं। इस अंत के लिए, हम एक एंटिटी-पेयर स्तर denoise विधि पेश करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण के दौरान गतिशील रूप से गलत लेबल को सही करने के लिए सही ढंग से लेबल किए गए एंटिटी जोड़े से शब्दार्थ जानकारी का शोषण करता है। हम एक संयुक्त स्कोर फ़ंक्शन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एंटिटी-पेयर प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर रिलेशनल स्कोर को जोड़ता है और कुछ एंटिटी जोड़ी के लिए एक नया लेबल, अर्थात् एक नरम लेबल प्राप्त करने के लिए हार्ड लेबल के आत्मविश्वास को जोड़ता है। प्रशिक्षण के दौरान, हार्ड लेबल के बजाय नरम लेबल सोने के लेबल के रूप में काम करते हैं। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि नाटकीय रूप से शोर के उदाहरणों को कम करती है और अन्य अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को मात देती है।', 'ru': 'Отдаленное извлечение отношений неизбежно страдает от неправильных проблем маркировки, потому что оно эвристически маркирует реляционные факты с базами знаний. Предыдущие модели уровня шума предложения не достигают удовлетворительных показателей, потому что они используют жесткие метки, которые определяются дистанционным надзором и неизменны во время обучения. С этой целью мы вводим метод шумоподавления на уровне пары сущностей, который использует семантическую информацию из правильно обозначенных пар сущностей для динамической коррекции неправильных меток во время обучения. Мы предлагаем функцию совместной оценки, которая объединяет реляционные оценки, основанные на представлении пары сущностей и уверенности жесткой метки, чтобы получить новую метку, а именно мягкую метку, для определенной пары сущностей. Во время обучения мягкие этикетки вместо твердых этикеток служат в качестве золотых этикеток. Эксперименты с эталонным набором данных показывают, что наш метод резко снижает шумные случаи и превосходит другие современные системы.', 'ga': 'Is cinnte go mbíonn fadhbanna míchearta lipéadaithe ag baint le heastóscadh caidrimh chian-mhaoirsithe toisc go ndéanann sé lipéadú heoristiciúil ar fhíorais choibhneasta le boinn eolais. Ní shásaíonn samhlacha denoise leibhéal na habairte feidhmíocht shásúil mar go n-úsáideann siad lipéid chrua a chinntear trí chianmhaoirseacht agus nach féidir a mhalartú le linn oiliúna. Chuige sin, tugaimid isteach modh denoise ar leibhéal aonáin-péire a bhaineann leas as faisnéis shéimeantach ó phéirí aonán atá lipéadaithe i gceart chun lipéid mhíchearta a cheartú go dinimiciúil le linn na hoiliúna. Molaimid feidhm chomhscóir a chomhcheanglaíonn na scóir choibhneasta atá bunaithe ar an ionadaíocht eintiteas-péire agus muinín an lipéid chrua chun lipéad nua a fháil, eadhon lipéad bog, le haghaidh péire eintiteas áirithe. Le linn na hoiliúna, feidhmíonn lipéid bhog in ionad lipéid chrua mar lipéid óir. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar an tacar sonraí tagarmharcála go laghdaítear cásanna torainn go mór lenár modh agus go sáraíonn sé na córais úrscothacha eile.', 'hu': 'A távoli felügyelt kapcsolatok kitermelése elkerülhetetlenül rossz címkézési problémákkal szenved, mert heurisztikailag megjelöli a kapcsolati tényeket tudásbázisokkal. Az előző mondatszint jelölési modellek nem érnek el kielégítő teljesítményt, mert kemény címkéket használnak, amelyeket távoli felügyelet határoz meg és változtathatatlan edzés közben. Ennek érdekében bevezetünk egy entitás-pár szintű denoise módszert, amely a helyesen címkézett entitáspárokból származó szemantikai információkat használja ki, hogy dinamikusan korrigálja a hibás címkéket a képzés során. Javasolunk egy közös pontszám függvényt, amely kombinálja az entitás-pár reprezentáció alapján megjelenő relációs pontszámokat és a hard label bizalmát, hogy egy új címkét, nevezetesen egy soft labelt kapjon bizonyos entitáspárra. Az edzés során a kemény címkék helyett a puha címkék arany címkeként szolgálnak. A benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk drasztikusan csökkenti a zajos példányokat és felülmúlja a többi korszerű rendszert.', 'el': 'Η εξόρυξη σχέσεων υπό την εποπτεία εξ αποστάσεως πάσχει αναπόφευκτα από προβλήματα λανθασμένης επισήμανσης επειδή επισημάνει heuristικά σχεσιακά γεγονότα με βάσεις γνώσης. Τα προηγούμενα πρότυπα δεν επιτυγχάνουν ικανοποιητικές επιδόσεις επειδή χρησιμοποιούν σκληρές ετικέτες που καθορίζονται από μακρινή επίβλεψη και αμετάβλητες κατά τη διάρκεια της προπόνησης. Για το σκοπό αυτό, εισάγουμε μια μέθοδο που χρησιμοποιεί σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες από σωστά επισημασμένα ζεύγη οντοτήτων για να διορθώσει δυναμικά λανθασμένες ετικέτες κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Προτείνουμε μια κοινή λειτουργία βαθμολογίας που συνδυάζει τις σχεσιακές βαθμολογίες με βάση την αναπαράσταση του ζευγαριού οντότητας και την εμπιστοσύνη της σκληρής ετικέτας για να αποκτήσει μια νέα ετικέτα, δηλαδή μια μαλακή ετικέτα, για ένα συγκεκριμένο ζευγάρι οντοτήτων. Κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, μαλακές ετικέτες αντί για σκληρές ετικέτες χρησιμεύουν ως χρυσές ετικέτες. Τα πειράματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας μειώνει δραματικά τις θορυβώδεις περιπτώσεις και ξεπερνά άλλα συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'ექსტრაქტიკური შესახებ ექსტრაქციის შესახებ უნდა შეცდომა პრობლემების შეცდომა, რადგან ის ჰერისტიკურად აღნიშნულია შესახებ ფაქტების შესახებ ც წინა სიტყვების დონეში მოდელები არ მიიღებენ შესაძლებელი მონაცემები, რადგან ისინი გამოყენებენ ძალიან სიტყვები, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია ძალიან დამართვა და ამ დასაწყისთვის ჩვენ ინტერტიკური ორი დონეზე გამოყენებთ სემონტიკური ინფორმაცია, რომელიც სემონტიკური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება მართლად ნიშნავული ინტერტიკური ორიდან, რომ დარწ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ერთადერთი მონაცემების ფუნქცია, რომელიც ერთადერთი მონაცემების შესაძლებლობად ერთადერთი მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ერთადერთი მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ერთადერთი მონაცემების შესაძ სტრუნქციის განმავლობაში, მარტივი ლებეტები მცხოვრებულია, მარტივი ლებეტების მცხოვრებით, როგორც დლატური ლებე მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი დირამატიკურად უფრო დამატებს სიტყვას და უფრო გავაკეთებს სხვა სისტემის შესახებ.', 'it': "L'estrazione di relazioni supervisionate a distanza soffre inevitabilmente di problemi di etichettatura errati perché etichetta euricamente i fatti relazionali con basi di conoscenza. I modelli di denoising precedenti non raggiungono prestazioni soddisfacenti perché utilizzano etichette rigide che sono determinate da supervisione a distanza e immutabili durante l'allenamento. A tal fine, introduciamo un metodo di denoising a livello di coppia entità che sfrutta informazioni semantiche provenienti da coppie di entità correttamente etichettate per correggere dinamicamente le etichette sbagliate durante la formazione. Proponiamo una funzione di punteggio comune che combina i punteggi relazionali basati sulla rappresentazione entità-coppia e la fiducia dell'hard label per ottenere una nuova etichetta, vale a dire una soft label, per determinate coppie di entità. Durante l'allenamento, le etichette morbide invece di quelle rigide servono da etichette dorate. Esperimenti sul set di dati di benchmark mostrano che il nostro metodo riduce drasticamente le istanze rumorose e supera altri sistemi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Nuotolinės priežiūros santykių gavyba neišvengiamai patiria klaidingų ženklinimo problemų, nes heuristiškai ženklinami santykiniai faktai su žinių bazėmis. Ankstesnio sakinio lygio denoise modeliai nepasiekia patenkinamų rezultatų, nes jie naudoja kietąsias etiketes, kurios nustatomos nuotolinės priežiūros ir neiškeičiamos mokymo metu. Šiuo tikslu įvedame subjektų ir poros lygio denoise metodą, kuris naudojasi semantine informacija iš teisingai pažymėtų subjektų poros, kad mokymo metu būtų dinamiškai ištaisomos klaidingos etiketės. Siūlome jungtinę rezultatų funkciją, kurioje sujungiami santykiniai rezultatai, pagrįsti subjekto poros atstovavimu ir kietosios etiketės pasitikėjimu, siekiant gauti naują etiketę, būtent minkštą etiketę, tam tikros subjekto poros atžvilgiu. Mokymo metu minkštos etiketės, o ne kietosios etiketės, naudojamos kaip auksinės etiketės. Eksperimentai, susiję su lyginamuoju duomenų rinkiniu, rodo, kad mūsų metodas smarkiai mažina triukšmingus atvejus ir viršija naujausias sistemas.', 'kk': 'Қашықтағы қашықтық қатынасы тарқату қатесі жарлық жарлық мәселелерінен тұрады, себебі бұл білім негізінде қатынастық факттарды жарлықтайды. Алдыңғы сөз деңгейі үлгілерді таңдау мүмкіндіктеріне жеткізбейді, себебі олар оқыту кезінде қатты жарлықтар қолданылады. Бұл соңында, біз бөліктердің екі деңгейінде симантикалық мәліметті дұрыс жарлық жарлықтарды динамикалық оқыту кезінде дұрыс жарлық жарлықтарды түзету үшін келтіреміз. Біз жаңа жарлық белгісін алу үшін, мәселе жарлық белгісін біріктіру үшін қатынастық нәтижелерді біріктіріп, қатынастық нәтижелерді біріктіреді. Оқыту кезінде қатты жарлықтар орнына алтын жарлықтар ретінде жазылады. Деректер жиынындағы тәжірибелер әдіміміздің дыбыс инстанцияларын көшірмелеп, басқа суреттердің күйінен шығаруын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Оддалеченото надгледувано извлекување на односите неизбежно страда од погрешни проблеми со означувањето бидејќи хеористички ги означува односните факти со базите на знаење. Претходното ниво на реченица одбива дека моделите не постигнуваат задоволни изведби бидејќи користат цврсти етикети кои се одредени од далечен надзор и непроменливи за време на обуката. За оваа цел, воведуваме метод за деноизирање на ниво на ентитет-пар кој искористува семантични информации од правилно означени парови ентитети за динамично да ги поправи погрешните означувања за време на обуката. We propose a joint score function which combines the relational scores based on the entity-pair representation and the confidence of the hard label to obtain a new label, namely a soft label, for certain entity pair.  За време на обуката, меките ознаки наместо цврстите ознаки служат како златни ознаки. Експериментите на базата на податоци покажуваат дека нашиот метод драматично ги намалува звучните случаи и ги надминува другите најсовремени системи.', 'ms': 'Pengekstraksi hubungan yang diawasi jauh tidak dapat dihindari dari masalah label yang salah kerana ia heuristik label fakta hubungan dengan pangkalan pengetahuan. Aras kalimat terdahulu menolak model tidak mencapai prestasi yang memuaskan kerana mereka menggunakan label keras yang ditentukan oleh pengawasan jauh dan tidak dapat diubah semasa latihan. Untuk tujuan ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah denoise tahap entiti-pasangan yang mengeksploitasi maklumat semantik dari pasangan entiti yang diberi label dengan betul untuk betulkan label yang salah secara dinamik semasa latihan. Kami cadangkan fungsi skor bersama yang menggabungkan skor relatif berdasarkan perwakilan pasangan-entiti dan kepercayaan label keras untuk mendapatkan label baru, iaitu label lembut, untuk pasangan entiti tertentu. Semasa latihan, label lembut selain dari label keras berkhidmat sebagai label emas. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami mengurangi secara dramatis kes bunyi dan melampaui batas sistem-sistem yang lain yang terbaik.', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് തെറ്റായ ലേബില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വേദനിക്കുന്നതാണ്. കാരണം അത മുമ്പുള്ള വാക്കിന്റെ നില ഡെനോയിസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെ തൃപ്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നില്ല. കാരണം അകലെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ ജോടി നില ഡെനോസ് രീതിയില്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത്തുന്ന സമയത്ത് തെറ്റായ ലേബറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും ശരിയായി ക നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു യൂട്ട് സ്കോര്\u200d ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട സ്കോര്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പുത പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഹാര്\u200dഡ് ലേബിളുകള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണലേബുകളായി സേവിക്കുന്നു. ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ശബ്ദമുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയമാ', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni sorveljata mill-bogħod inevitabbilment tbati minn problemi ta’ tikkettar ħażin minħabba li tikketta b’mod ġeristiku fatti relatati mal-bażijiet tal-għarfien. Il-mudelli ta’ denoise fil-livell tas-sentenza preċedenti ma jiksbux prestazzjonijiet sodisfaċenti minħabba li jużaw tikketti ibsin li huma determinati minn superviżjoni distanti u immutabbli matul it-taħriġ. Għal dan il-għan, aħna nintroduċu metodu ta’ denożi fil-livell ta’ par ta’ entitajiet li jisfrutta informazzjoni semantika minn par ta’ entitajiet ittikkettati b’mod korrett biex jikkoreġu t-tikketti żbaljati b’mod dinamiku matul it-taħriġ. Aħna nipproponu funzjoni konġunta ta’ punteġġ li tgħaqqad il-punteġġi relattivi bbażati fuq ir-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ par ta’ entità u l-kunfidenza tat-tikketta iebsa biex tinkiseb tikketta ġdida, jiġifieri tikketta rotob, għal ċertu par ta’ entità. Matul it-taħriġ, it-tikketti rotob minflok it-tikketti iebsa jservu bħala tikketti tad-deheb. L-esperimenti fuq is-sett ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li l-metodu tagħna jnaqqas drammatikament l-istanzi storbjużi u jwassal għal sistemi l-aktar avvanzati oħra.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja relacji nadzorowanych na odległość nieuchronnie cierpi z powodu błędnych problemów etykietowania, ponieważ heurystycznie oznacza fakty relacyjne bazami wiedzy. Poprzedni poziom zdań denoise modele nie osiągają satysfakcjonujących wyników, ponieważ używają twardych etykiet, które są określane przez odległy nadzór i niezmienne podczas treningu. W tym celu wprowadzamy metodę denoise na poziomie jednostki-pary, która wykorzystuje informacje semantyczne z poprawnie oznaczonych par jednostek do dynamicznego poprawiania błędnych etykiet podczas treningu. Proponujemy wspólną funkcję wyników, która łączy wyniki relacyjne oparte na reprezentacji para jednostki i pewność twardej etykiety, aby uzyskać nową etykietę, mianowicie miękką etykietę, dla określonej pary jednostek. Podczas treningu miękkie etykiety zamiast twarde służą jako złote etykiety. Eksperymenty na zestawie danych referencyjnych pokazują, że nasza metoda dramatycznie redukuje szumowe instancje i przewyższa inne najnowocześniejsze systemy.', 'ro': 'Extracția relațiilor supravegheate la distanță suferă inevitabil de probleme de etichetare greșită, deoarece etichetează euristic faptele relaționale cu baze de cunoștințe. Modelele anterioare nu obţin performanţe satisfăcătoare deoarece folosesc etichete dure care sunt determinate de supraveghere la distanţă şi imuabile în timpul antrenamentului. În acest scop, introducem o metodă de denotare a nivelului entității-pereche care exploatează informațiile semantice din perechile de entități etichetate corect pentru a corecta etichetele greșite dinamic în timpul instruirii. Propunem o funcție de scor comun care combină scorurile relaționale bazate pe reprezentarea entitate-pereche și încrederea etichetei hard pentru a obține o nouă etichetă, și anume o etichetă soft, pentru anumite perechi de entități. În timpul antrenamentului, etichetele moi în loc de etichete dure servesc ca etichete aurii. Experimentele pe setul de date de referință arată că metoda noastră reduce dramatic instanțele zgomotoase și depășește alte sisteme de ultimă generație.', 'mn': 'Учир нь хоорондын харилцааны хамаарал нь мэдлэг суурь дээр харилцааны харилцааны талаар буруу маркингийн асуудлуудаас шаналдаг. Өмнөх өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд загварууд хангалттай үйл ажиллагааг илэрхийлж чадахгүй. Учир нь тэд суралцах үед хоорондын харах болон хөдөлгөөнгүй загварууд ашигладаг хэцүү тэмдэглэгддэг. Энэ төгсгөлд бид нэгж хоёр түвшинд нэг хэмжээг тайлбарлах аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь нэгж хоёрын зөв хэлбэрээс зөв хэлбэрээр зөв хэлбэрээр зөв хэлбэрээс ашигладаг. Бид нэг зүйлийн хоёр илтгэлийн үндсэн харилцааны оноо болон шинэ загвар гаргах хэцүү загварын итгэл үндсэн холбоотой тоонуудыг нийлүүлдэг нэгэн тооны функцын санал болгодог. Боловсролт хийх үед хэцүү загваруудын оронд энгийн загварууд алт загварууд болдог. Бидний арга хэмжээний мэдээллийн хэмжээний туршилтууд үнэхээр чимээгүй үйл явдлыг багасгаж бусад урлагийн үйл явдлыг дамжуулдаг.', 'sr': 'Daljinski nadzorni odnos ekstrakcija neizbežno pati od pogrešnih problema označavanja jer heuristički označava odnose činjenice sa bazama znanja. Prije razine rečenice pokazuju da modeli ne ostvaruju zadovoljavajuće učinke jer koriste tvrde etikete koje su određene udaljenim nadzorom i nemogućim tijekom treninga. Za taj cilj, predstavljamo nivo objekata koji indicira metodu koja iskorištava semantičke informacije iz ispravno označene pare entiteta da ispravi pogrešne etikete dinamički tokom treninga. Predlažemo zajedničku funkciju rezultata koja kombinira povezane rezultate na temelju zastupanja objekata i povjerenja tvrdog etiketa da dobije novu etiketu, a to je meka etiketa, za određene objekte. Tokom treninga, meke etikete umjesto tvrde etikete služe kao zlatne etikete. Eksperimenti na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naša metoda dramatično smanjuje bučne slučajeve i iznosi druge stanje umjetnosti.', 'sv': 'Fjärrkontrollerad relationsextraktion lider oundvikligen av fel märkningsproblem eftersom den heuristiskt märker relationsfat med kunskapsbaser. Föregående meningsnivå denoise modeller uppnår inte tillfredsställande prestanda eftersom de använder hårda etiketter som bestäms av avlägsen övervakning och oföränderliga under träning. För detta ändamål introducerar vi en entitetspar nivå denoise metod som utnyttjar semantisk information från korrekt märkta entitetspar för att korrigera fel etiketter dynamiskt under träning. Vi föreslår en gemensam poängfunktion som kombinerar de relationella poängen baserat på entitetsparets representation och den hårda etikettens förtroende för att få en ny etikett, nämligen en mjuk etikett, för vissa entitetspar. Under träningen fungerar mjuka etiketter istället för hårda etiketter som guldetiketter. Experiment på benchmarkdatauppsättningen visar att vår metod dramatiskt minskar bullriga instanser och överträffar andra toppmoderna system.', 'si': 'Distant-supervised සම්බන්ධයක් නිර්භාවිත වැරදි ලේබල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මොකද ඒක හයුරිස්ටිකින් ල මුලින් වාක්ය ස්ථානය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ නැහැ මොකද ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු හ මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පිළිගන්නේ, ඒ වගේම සෙමැන්ටික් තොරතුරු හරියට ලේබල් දෙන අපි සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒකෙන් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා අලුත් ලේබල් එකක් ලබාගන්න, අලුත් ලේබල් එකක් ස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, හරිම ලේබල් වලින් සුන් ලේබල් වලින් සේවා කරනවා. බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සූදානයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විද්\u200dයාව විශ්වාස කලින් සිද්ධ විදිහට අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන', 'ur': 'دور نظارت والی نسبت اٹھانے کے لئے غلط لابلینگ مشکلوں سے ہے کیونکہ یہ علم بنسس کے ساتھ رابطہ والی حقیقت کو لابلیٹ کرتا ہے. اگلے جماعت سطح کی نمونوں کو دکھا دیتا ہے کہ نمونوں کو مطمئن کرنے والی نمونوں تک پہنچ نہیں سکتے کیونکہ وہ سخت لیبل استعمال کرتے ہیں جو دور کی نظارت کے ذریعہ مقرر کئے جاتے ہیں اور تمرین کے وقت بدل نہیں سکتے اس کے لئے ہم ایک ایستی جفت سطح کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جو سیمانٹی معلومات کو سیمانٹی معلومات کے مطابق لابل جفت سے استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ تطابق کے وقت غلط لابل درست کریں. ہم ایک جوئنٹ اسکور فونسل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک نرم لابل حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک نرم لابل ہے، ایک خاص ایٹنی جوڑ کے لئے، ارتباطی اسکور کو ترکیب کرتا ہے۔ تعلیم کے وقت، سخت لابل کے بدلے نرم لابل سونے لابل کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں. بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ غلط اندازے سے کم کر دیتا ہے اور دوسری حالت آرتی سیسٹم کو کم کر دیتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'தொலைநிலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட தொடர்பு பிரித்தல் தவறான சிக்கல் பிரச்சனை முந்தைய வாக்கிய நிலை டெனோஸ் மாதிரிகள் திருப்தி செய்ய முடியாது ஏனென்றால் அவர்கள் தூரத்தில் கண்காணிப்பு மற்றும் பயிற் இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் ஒரு பொருள் ஜோடி மட்டத்தில் டெனோஸ் முறைமையை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது சரியாக குறிப்பிட்ட பொருள் ஜோடி இருந்து சரியாக ச நாம் ஒரு சேர்ந்த மதிப்பெண் செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பொருள் ஜோடி குறிப்பிடுதலை அடிப்படையில் தொடர்பு மதிப்புகளை இணைக்கும் மற்றும பயிற்சியில், கடினமான சிட்டைகளுக்கு பதிலாக மென்னெழுத்து சிட்டைகள் தங்கக் குறிகளாக சேவைக்கும். பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் முறைமையில் சப்தமான நிகழ்வுகளை குறைக்கும் மற்றும் மற்ற நில', 'no': 'Avstand-oversikt relasjon for ekstraksjon kan uavhengig gå frå feil merkelapp, fordi den heuristisk merker relasjonelle faktar med kunnskapsbaser. Førre setningsnivå gjer modeller ikkje tilfredsstillende utføringar, fordi dei brukar vanskeleg etikettar som er bestemt av distant oversikt og uavhengige under opplæring. I denne slutten introduserer vi ein einingspar- nivå med metode som eksploderer semantisk informasjon frå rett merket entitetspar for å korrigera feil merkelapp dynamisk under opplæring. Vi foreslår ein kopla poengsfunksjon som kombinerer relasjonelle poengjer basert på representasjonen av einingar- par og tillit til den vanlege etiketten for å få ein ny etikett, som er eit måk etikett, for nokre einingar. Med opplæring kan måke etikettar i staden for vanskeleg etikettar gjere som gull etikettar. Eksperimentar på datasettet for benchmarket viser at metoden vår dramatisk reduserer støyinstansar og utfører andre kunstsystemar.', 'so': 'Iska soo saarista xiriirka la ilaaliyo waa laga xanuunsadaa dhibaatooyin khalad ah, sababtoo ah waxay ku qoran tahay xaqiiqa xiriirka ee ku saabsan aasaaska aqoonta. Tusaaladaha heerka denois ee hore ma gaadho wax ku raalli ah, sababtoo ah waxay isticmaalaan calaamado adag oo ay ku qoran yihiin ilaalinta fog iyo caqabashada xilliga waxbarashada. Taas darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ay leedahay labo nooc oo denoise ah, kaas oo macluumaad qayb ah ka soo bixinaya labo saxda ah si ay u hagaajiyaan alaabta khaladda ah marka lagu tababaro. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa kooxda iskuulka wadajirka ah oo isku xiran kooxda xiriirka oo ku saleysan xuquuqda dhamaanka labada nooc iyo kalsoonaanta calaamadda adag in la helo calaamad cusub, taas oo ah calaamad jilicsan, labo cayiman. Xilliga waxbarashada waxaa lagu adeegaa calaamado jilicsan oo ay ka bedeshaan calaamado adag. Experiments on the benchmark dataset show that our method dramatically reduces noisy instances and outperforms other state-of-the-art systems.', 'uz': "Masofadan ta\xa0ľminlovchi ulanish muammolari noto'ylab, chunki u ilmiy asosida bog'liq haqiqatlarni ko'rsatadi. Oldingi so'zlar darajasi denoise modellari natijalarini amalga oshirib bo\xa0Ľlmaydi chunki ular ta\xa0ľminlovchi so\xa0Ľzda uzoq ta\xa0ľminlovchi va himoyalar yordamida ishlatiladigan qisqa tugmalar yordamida ishlatiladi. Bu yerda biz bir ikki darajadagi denoise usulini ko\xa0Ľrsatish mumkin. Bu narsa ta\xa0ľminlovchi soni to \xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri noto\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri noto\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri noto\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri yozilgan narsalarni to\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri noto\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri yordam beradi. Biz bir bir bir bir xil funksiyasini talab qilamiz, bu bog\xa0Ľ'liq qo'l qoidaga bog\xa0Ľliq qismi qoidasi va yangi yorliqni olish uchun qiyin yorliqning imkoniyatini birlashtirish mumkin. Tashqi davomida, qiyin tugmalar yordamida qo\xa0Ľshli tugmalar yordamida gull tegi sifatida ishlaydi. Benchmark ma\xa0ľlumotlar tarkibida ta\xa0ľminlovchi imtiyozlar hosil qiladi va boshqa shaxsiy tizimlarni aniqlaydi.", 'vi': 'Các mối quan hệ giám sát xa nhau không tránh khỏi bị ảnh hưởng bởi vì nó đánh giá cao các dữ kiện liên quan với căn cứ kiến thức. Trước mức án ám chỉ các mô hình không đạt được những hiệu ứng thỏa đáng bởi vì chúng dùng nhãn cứng được quyết định bởi sự giám sát xa xôi và bất biến trong thời gian huấn luyện. Để đạt được mục đích, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mức thực thể-cặp chỉ ra phương pháp khai thác thông tin ngữ pháp từ các cặp thực thể được đánh dấu đúng để sửa các nhãn sai theo động cơ trong thời gian huấn luyện. Chúng tôi đề xuất một hàm số điểm chung kết hợp các điểm liên quan dựa trên đại diện cho thực thể và sự tự tin của nhãn cứng để có một nhãn hiệu mới, là một nhãn mềm, cho một số thực thể cặp. Trong thời gian huấn luyện, những nhãn mềm thay vì nhãn cứng được dùng làm nhãn vàng. Các thí nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta giảm đột ngột nhiễu và vượt trội các hệ thống hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Извличането на отношенията под дистанционно наблюдение неизбежно страда от погрешни проблеми с етикетирането, защото евристично обозначава релационните факти с бази от знания. Предишното ниво на изречение означава, че моделите не постигат задоволителни показатели, защото използват твърди етикети, които се определят от дистанционно наблюдение и са неизменни по време на тренировка. За тази цел въвеждаме метод за обозначаване на ниво двойка единици, който експлоатира семантична информация от правилно обозначени двойки единици, за да коригира динамично грешните етикети по време на обучението. Предлагаме функция за съвместен резултат, която съчетава релационните резултати въз основа на представянето на двойката единици и увереността на твърдия етикет, за да се получи нов етикет, а именно мек етикет, за определена двойка единици. По време на обучението меките етикети вместо твърдите етикети служат като златни етикети. Експериментите с базовия набор от данни показват, че нашият метод драстично намалява шумните случаи и превъзхожда други съвременни системи.', 'hr': 'Djelujuće nadzorne odnose o ekstrakciji neizbježno pati od pogrešnih problema označavanja jer heuristički označava odnose činjenice s bazama znanja. Prije razine rečenice pokazuju da modeli ne ostvaruju zadovoljavajuće učinke jer koriste tvrde etikete koje su određene udaljenim nadzorom i nemogućim tijekom treninga. Za taj cilj, predstavljamo metodu navedenog nivou objekata koji iskorištava semantičke informacije iz ispravno označenih parova entiteta da ispravi pogrešne etikete dinamički tijekom obuke. Predlažemo zajedničku funkciju rezultata koja kombinira povezane rezultate na temelju zastupanja objekata i povjerenja tvrdog etiketa kako bi dobila novu etiketu, a to je meka etiketa, za određene objekte. Tijekom obuke, meke etikete umjesto tvrde etikete služe kao zlatne etikete. Eksperimenti na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naša metoda dramatično smanjuje bučne slučajeve i iznosi druge stanje umjetnosti.', 'da': 'Afstandsovervåget relationsudvinding lider uundgåeligt af forkerte mærkningsproblemer, fordi det heurisk mærker relationelle fakta med vidensbaser. Tidligere sætningsniveau denoise modeller opnår ikke tilfredsstillende præstationer, fordi de bruger hårde etiketter, som er bestemt af fjernsyn og uforanderlige under træning. Til dette formål introducerer vi en enhed-par niveau denoise metode, der udnytter semantisk information fra korrekt mærkede enhedspar til at rette forkerte etiketter dynamisk under træning. Vi foreslår en fælles scorefunktion, der kombinerer de relationelle scorer baseret på entitetsparrets repræsentation og den hårde labels tillid til at opnå en ny label, nemlig en soft label, for visse entitetspar. Under træningen fungerer bløde etiketter i stedet for hårde etiketter som guldetiketter. Eksperimenter med benchmarkdatasættet viser, at vores metode dramatisk reducerer støjende forekomster og overgår andre state-of-the-art systemer.', 'nl': 'Relatietextractie met toezicht op afstand lijdt onvermijdelijk aan verkeerde etiketteringsproblemen omdat het relationele feiten heuristisch labelt met kennisbases. Eerder zinsniveau denoise modellen bereiken geen bevredigende prestaties omdat ze harde labels gebruiken die worden bepaald door toezicht op afstand en onveranderlijk tijdens de training. Hiervoor introduceren we een entiteitspaar-niveau denoise methode die semantische informatie van correct gelabelde entiteitsparen exploiteert om verkeerde labels dynamisch te corrigeren tijdens de training. We stellen een gezamenlijke score functie voor die de relationele scores combineert op basis van de entiteitspaar representatie en het vertrouwen van het harde label om een nieuw label te verkrijgen, namelijk een soft label, voor een bepaald entiteitspaar. Tijdens de training dienen zachte labels in plaats van harde labels als gouden labels. Experimenten met de benchmark dataset laten zien dat onze methode ruisende instances drastisch vermindert en overtreft andere state-of-the-art systemen.', 'de': 'Distant-überwachte Beziehungsextraktion leidet unweigerlich unter falschen Beschriftungsproblemen, da sie relationale Fakten heuristisch mit Wissensbasen beschriftet. Vorherige Satzstufe denoise Modelle erzielen keine befriedigenden Leistungen, weil sie harte Labels verwenden, die durch Fernüberwachung bestimmt und während des Trainings unveränderlich sind. Zu diesem Zweck führen wir eine Entity-Pair-Denoise-Methode ein, die semantische Informationen korrekt beschrifteter Entity-Paare ausnutzt, um falsche Labels während des Trainings dynamisch zu korrigieren. Wir schlagen eine gemeinsame Score-Funktion vor, die die relationalen Scores basierend auf der Entity-Pair-Repräsentation und dem Vertrauen des Hard Label kombiniert, um ein neues Label, nämlich ein Soft Label, für bestimmte Entity-Paare zu erhalten. Während des Trainings dienen weiche statt harte Etiketten als goldene Etiketten. Experimente am Benchmark-Datensatz zeigen, dass unsere Methode rauschende Instanzen drastisch reduziert und andere State-of-the-Art-Systeme übertrifft.', 'fa': 'رابطه\u200cای که از بیرون بردن رابطه\u200cهای دور نظارت می\u200cکند به طور غیر قابل تحمل از مشکلات برچسب اشتباه می\u200cشود، زیرا آن برچسب\u200cهای رابطه\u200cای با پایگاه\u200cهای علم را با برچسب می\u200cکند. سطح جمله قبل مدل\u200cها را تشخیص می\u200cدهد که نمونه\u200cهای راضی به دست نمی\u200cآورند چون از نقاشی\u200cهای سخت استفاده می\u200cکنند که در طول تمرین با بررسی دور و قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قرار می\u200cگیرند. برای این پایان، ما یک سطح جفت اجتماعی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که در طول تمرین اطلاعات semantic را از جفت\u200cهای جفت\u200cهای جفت\u200cهای مستقیم استفاده می\u200cکند تا نقاشی\u200cهای اشتباهی را درست کند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک تابع امتیاز مشترک که امتیاز ارتباطی را بر اساس نمایش جفت\u200cها و اطمینان نقاشی سخت برای پیدا کردن نقاشی جدید، یعنی نقاشی نرم، برای جفت\u200cهای معنی، ترکیب می\u200cکند. در طول تمرین، نقاشی نرم به جای نقاشی سخت به عنوان نقاشی طلا خدمت می کنند. تجربه\u200cهایی روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای صندوق نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200cهای ما به شدت خطرناک به صورت صوتی کاهش می\u200cدهد و دیگر سیستم\u200cهای صندوق\u200cهنری را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'id': 'Ekstrasi hubungan yang diawasi jauh tidak dapat dihindari menderita dari masalah label yang salah karena itu heuristik label fakta relatif dengan dasar pengetahuan. Tingkat kalimat sebelumnya menolak model tidak mencapai prestasi yang memuaskan karena mereka menggunakan label keras yang ditentukan oleh pengawasan jauh dan tidak bergerak selama latihan. Untuk tujuan ini, kami memperkenalkan metode denoise tingkat entitas-pasangan yang mengeksploitasi informasi semantis dari pasangan entitas yang diberi label dengan benar untuk memperbaiki label yang salah secara dinamik selama latihan. Kami mengusulkan fungsi skor kongsi yang menggabungkan skor relatif berdasarkan representation entity-pair dan kepercayaan label keras untuk mendapatkan label baru, yaitu label lembut, untuk pasangan entitas tertentu. Selama latihan, label lembut bukannya label keras layak sebagai label emas. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa metode kita secara dramatis mengurangi kejadian bising dan melampaui batas sistem-sistem terbaik lainnya.', 'ko': '원격 감독 관계 추출은 잘못된 표시 문제를 피할 수 없다. 왜냐하면 지식 라이브러리를 사용하여 관계 사실을 계발식으로 표시하기 때문이다.기존의 문장급 소음 제거 모델은 원격 감독에 의해 결정된 하드 라벨을 사용했고 훈련 과정에서 변하지 않았기 때문에 만족스러운 성능을 얻지 못했다.이를 위해 우리는 실체대급 소음 제거 방법을 소개했다. 이 방법은 정확하게 표기된 실체대중의 의미 정보를 이용하여 훈련 과정에서 잘못된 표기를 동태적으로 바로잡는다.우리는 실체가 표시하는 관계 평점과 하드 라벨의 신뢰도를 결합시켜 특정한 실체가 표시하는 새로운 라벨, 즉 소프트 라벨을 얻을 수 있는 연합 평점 함수를 제시했다.훈련 기간에 소프트 라벨이 하드 라벨 대신 금 라벨이 된다.기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리의 방법이 소음 실례를 현저히 감소시켰고 다른 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Kutengenezwa kwa mahusiano yasiyoeleweka bila shaka inatumia matatizo yanayotokana na vibaya kwa sababu inaonyesha ukweli wa mahusiano na msingi wa maarifa. Mfano wa kiwango cha kwanza cha sauti hauwezi kufanikiwa kwa sababu wanatumia alama ngumu ambazo zinategemewa na uangalizi wa mbali na kinga wakati wa mafunzo. Kwa mwisho huu, tunaonyesha mbinu za kiwango cha viwili cha denoise ambacho kinatumia taarifa za kimapenzi kutoka kwa viwili vinavyoitwa sahihi ili kurekebisha alama zisizo sahihi wakati wa mafunzo. Tunazipendekeza funzo la pamoja ambalo linaunganisha vipindi vya mahusiano kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa entity wawili na imani ya alama ngumu kupata label mpya, yaani alama nyepesi, kwa ajili ya viwili fulani. Wakati wa mafunzo, alama nyepesi badala ya alama ngumu huhudumia kama alama za dhahabu. Majaribio kwenye seti ya taarifa za bendera yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu kwa kiasi kikubwa inapunguza matukio ya kelele na kutengeneza mifumo mingine ya sanaa.', 'tr': 'Ýuwaşyk-gözleýän ýuwaşyk hakykaty ýalňyş etiketleme kynçylyklaryndan çykyp barýar, sebäbi bu bilim tabanlary bilen görnüş hakykatlary etiketleýär. Öňki sözlem derejesi tanyşdyrýan nusgalary hoşaýynly çykyşlaryna ýetmeýär sebäbi olar uzak supervisiýa we eğitim wagtynda tanyşdyrylýan kyn etiketleri ulanýarlar. Bu üçin, bir entitet çift derejesi görkezýäris ki semantik maglumaty dogry etitlenýän guramlardan dinamik edip ýalňyş etitleri düzeltmek üçin ulanýar. Biz birleşmiş notlar fonksiyonu teklif edip, birleştirmek üçin birleşmiş notlary birleştirir Okuw wagtynda ýumuş etiketler kyn etiketleriň ýerine altyn etiketleri diýip işleýärler. Çykyş salgynyň üzerinde ýagdaýlaryň barlag çykyşymyzyň çykyş ýagdaýyny çykarýar we sungat sistemleriniň başga durumyny çykarýardygyny görkez.', 'af': "Afstand-onderhouerde verhouding van uittrekking onbepaalde lyf van verkeerde etiket probleme, omdat dit heuristiese etiket relatiewe fakte met kennisbasis. Vorige setvlak verteenwoordig modele nie versadig uitvoerings bereik nie omdat hulle harde etikette gebruik wat deur afgeleë supervisie en onveranderbaar word tydens opvoering bepaal word nie. Na hierdie einde, introduseer ons 'n entiteite-paar vlak die metode wat semantiese inligting uitbrei van korrek gemerkte entiteite paar om verkeerde etikette te korrigeer dinamies tydens onderwerp. Ons voorstel 'n joint telling funksie wat kombinieer die relationele telling gebaseer op die entiteit- paar voorstelling en die vertroue van die harde etiket om 'n nuwe etiket te kry, naamlik 'n sagte etiket, vir sekere entiteit paar. During oefening, sagte etikette in plaas van harde etikette dien as goud etikette. Eksperimente op die benchmarkdatastel vertoon dat ons metode dramatiese klausvoorbeelde verminder en ander staat van die kunstenstelsels uitvoer.", 'am': "የውይይት ግንኙነት ውይይት እውቀት መቀመጫውን በማድረግ የስሕተት መሳሰል አይችልም፡፡ Previous sentence level denoise models don't achieve satisfying performances because they use hard labels which are determined by distant supervision and immutable during training.  ለዚህ ምክንያት፣ አካባቢ-ሁለት ደረጃን ዲኖስ ማቀናቀል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ አካባቢው-ሁለት መልዕክት እና አዲስ የጽሑፍ ምልክት ማግኘት የሚታመን የግንኙነት ነጥብ ክፍተቶችን እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ትምህርት በተደረገ ጊዜ ጥሩ ምልክቶች እንደሚሆን ወርቅ ምልክቶች ማድረግ ይገዛሉ። በbenchmark dataset ላይ ፈተናዎች የድምፅ ግንኙነታችንን ድምፅ የሚያጎድልበት እና ሌሎችን የ-art-ስርዓት ስርዓቶች የሚያሳድግ ነው፡፡", 'sq': 'Nxitimi i marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura nga largësia pashmangshmërisht vuan nga probleme të gabuara të etiketave sepse etiketon në mënyrë heuristike faktet e marrëdhënieve me bazat e njohurive. Niveli i paraardhshëm i dënimit mohon modelet nuk arrijnë shfaqje t ë kënaqshme sepse përdorin etiketa të forta që janë të përcaktuara nga mbikqyrje e largët dhe të pashmangshme gjatë trajnimit. Për këtë qëllim, ne futim një metodë denozimi të nivelit njësi-çifti që shfrytëzon informacionin semantik nga çiftet e njësisë me etiketë të sakta për të korrektuar etiketat e gabuara dinamikisht gjatë trajnimit. Ne propozojmë një funksion të përbashkët rezultatesh që kombinon rezultatet relative bazuar në përfaqësimin e njësisë-çiftit dhe besimin e etiketës së vështirë për të marrë një etiketë të re, veçanërisht një etiketë të butë, për një çift njësie të caktuar. Gjatë trajnimit, etiketat e buta në vend të etiketave të forta shërbejnë si etiketat e artë. Eksperimentet në bazën e të dhënave tregojnë se metoda jonë redukton dramatikisht rastet zhurmësore dhe ekzekuton sisteme të tjera më të larta.', 'hy': 'Հեռավոր վերահսկվող հարաբերությունների վերացումը անխուսափելի է տառապում սխալ պիտակումների խնդիրներից, որովհետև այն հիերոստիկ պիտակում է հարաբերական փաստերը գիտելիքի հիմքերի հետ: Անցյալ նախադասության մակարդակը մերժում է, որ մոդելները չեն հասնում բավարար արդյունքների, որովհետև նրանք օգտագործում են բարդ պիտակներ, որոնք որոշվում են հեռավոր վերահսկողության և անփոփոխելի վարժությունների ընթացքում: Այս նպատակով մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի անհատականության-զույգ մակարդակի դինոզայի մեթոդ, որը օգտագործում է սեմանտիկ տեղեկությունը ճիշտ նշանակված անհատականության զույգերից, որպեսզի դինամիկ ճիշտ ուղղեն սխալ նշան We propose a joint score function which combines the relational scores based on the entity-pair representation and the confidence of the hard label to obtain a new label, namely a soft label, for certain entity pair.  Արժեքի ընթացքում, բարդ պիտակների փոխարեն փափուկ պիտակները ծառայում են որպես ոսկու պիտակներ: Համեմարկի տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը խիստ նվազեցնում է աղմկոտ դեպքերը և արտադրում է այլ բարձրագույն համակարգեր:', 'az': 'Uzun gözləyirli əlaqələr çıxarmaq mümkün olmaqla yanlış etiketləmə problemlərinə bənzəyir, çünki bu heuristik olaraq elm üssələri ilə əlaqəli faktları etiketləyir. Əvvəlki cümə səviyyəsində modelləri t əhsil etmək üçün təhsil edilməz, çünki onlar uzaq gözləmə və təhsil sırasında təhsil edilməz ağır etiketlər istifadə edirlər. Bu səbəbdə, bir entitə çift səviyyəsini tanıdırıq ki, semantik məlumatları doğru etiketli bir entitə çiftindən istifadə edir və təhsil sırasında yanlış etiketləri düzəltmək üçün dinamik olaraq yanlış etiketləri düzəltər. Biz birlikdə nöqtə funksiyasını təklif edirik ki, bir nöqtə çiftəsinə dayanan ilişkili nöqtələri birləşdirir və yeni nöqtəsi almaq üçün çətin nöqtəsinin güveniliğini, məsələn ki, yumuşaq nöqtəsi, müəyyən bir nöqtəsi üçün birləşdirir. Eğitimin sırasında ağır etiketlər yerinə qızıl etiketlər kimi istifadə edirlər. Benchmark verilənlərin təcrübələrinin istifadələri bizim metodumuzun gürültü olaraq azaldığını və digər sanat sistemlərinin istifadəsindən daha çox azaldığını göstərir.', 'bn': 'বাদ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সম্পর্ক নির্বাচনের ক্ষেত্রে ভুল লেবেলের সমস্যা থেকে কষ্ট পেয়েছে কারণ এটা জ্ঞানের ভেসের সাথে সম্পর্কের ব পূর্ববর্তী বাক্যের স্তরের ডেনোজ মডেলের কারণ তারা কঠিন লেবেল ব্যবহার করে যা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং নিরাপত্তা ব্যবহ এই পর্যন্ত আমরা একটি বস্তুর জোড়া ডেনোজের মাধ্যমে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় সঠিক লেবেলের জোড়া থেকে সেম্যান্টিক তথ্য ব্যবহার করে। আমরা একটি যৌথ স্কোর ফাংশন প্রস্তাব করি যা বস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভিত্তিতে সম্পর্কের স্কোর এবং নতুন লেবেল পাওয়ার বিশ্বাসযোগ্য লেবেল, যেটি নির্দিষ প্রশিক্ষণের সময়, হার্ড লেবেলের বদলে সোনার লেবেল হিসেবে সেবা করে। বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি ন্যায়েকভাবে কণ্ঠস্বর কমিয়ে দেয় এবং অন্যান্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল', 'bs': 'Izvlačenje udaljenih odnosa neizbježno pati od pogrešnih problema označavanja jer heuristički označava odnose činjenice s bazama znanja. Prije razine rečenice pokazuju da modeli ne ostvaruju zadovoljavajuće učinke jer koriste tvrde etikete koje su određene udaljenim nadzorom i nemogućim tijekom treninga. Za taj cilj, predstavljamo nivo objekata koji navodi metodu koja iskorištava semantičke informacije iz ispravno označene pare entiteta da ispravi pogrešne etikete dinamički tijekom treninga. Predlažemo zajedničku funkciju rezultata koja kombinira povezane rezultate na temelju zastupanja objekata i povjerenja tvrdog etiketa da dobije novu etiketu, a to je meka etiketa, za određene objekte. Tokom treninga, meke etikete umjesto tvrde etikete služe kao zlatne etikete. Eksperimenti na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naša metoda dramatično smanjuje bučne slučajeve i nadmašuje drugi sistemi umjetnosti.', 'ca': "L'extracció de relacions supervisades a distància pateix inevitablement problemes d'etiquetar incorrectament perquè heurísticament etiqueta fets relacionals amb bases de coneixement. El nivell de frases anteriors denota que els models no aconsegueixen performances satisfaccionants perquè utilitzen etiquetes dures que estan determinades per supervisió remota i immutables durant l'entrenament. Per això, introduïm un mètode de denòsis entre parelles d'entitats que explota la informació semàntica de parelles d'entitats etiquetades correctament per corregir les etiquetes equivocades dinàmicament durant l'entrenament. Proposem una funció de puntuació conjunta que combina les puntuacions relacionals basades en la representació de parell d'entitats i la confiança de l'etiqueta dura per obtenir una nova etiqueta, a saber, una etiqueta suau, per a un parell d'entitats. Durant l'entrenament, les etiquetes suaves en lloc d'etiquetes dures serveixen com etiquetes d'or. Experiments on the benchmark dataset show that our method dramatically reduces noisy instances and outperforms other state-of-the-art systems.", 'cs': 'Extrakce vztahů s dohledem na dálku nevyhnutelně trpí problémy se špatným označováním, protože heuristicky označuje relační fakta znalostními bázi. Úroveň předchozí věty denoise modely nedosahují uspokojivých výkonů, protože používají tvrdé etikety, které jsou určeny vzdáleným dohledem a neměnné během tréninku. Za tímto účelem představujeme metodu denoise na úrovni entity-pair, která využívá sémantické informace ze správně označených entity párů k dynamické korekci nesprávných etiket během tréninku. Navrhujeme funkci společného skórování, která kombinuje relační skóre založené na reprezentaci entity-pair a důvěru tvrdého štítku k získání nového štítku, konkrétně soft label, pro určitý entity-pair. Během tréninku slouží měkké etikety namísto tvrdých etiket jako zlaté etikety. Experimenty na benchmarkovém datovém souboru ukazují, že naše metoda dramaticky snižuje hlučné instance a překonává ostatní nejmodernější systémy.', 'et': 'Kaugjuhitava suhte ekstraheerimine kannatab paratamatult valede märgistamisprobleemide all, sest see tähistab heuristiliselt relatsioonifakte teadmistebaasidega. Eelmine lausetase tähendab, et mudelid ei saavuta rahuldavaid tulemusi, sest nad kasutavad kõvad sildid, mis on määratud kaugjärelevalve ja muutumatud treeningu ajal. Selleks tutvustame olemipaari taseme denoise meetodit, mis kasutab õigesti märgistatud olemipaaride semantilist teavet valede siltide dünaamiliseks parandamiseks koolituse ajal. Me pakume välja ühise skoori funktsiooni, mis ühendab suhtelised skoorid, mis põhinevad olemi-paari esindamisel ja kindlustundel raske märgise, et saada uus märgis, nimelt pehme märgis, teatud olemi paari jaoks. Koolituse ajal toimivad pehmed etiketid raskete etikettide asemel kuldsete etikettidena. Katsed võrdlusandmekogumiga näitavad, et meie meetod vähendab märkimisväärselt mürakaid juhtumeid ja ületab teisi kaasaegseid süsteeme.', 'fi': 'Kaukana ohjattu relaatiouutto kärsii väistämättä vääristä merkintäongelmista, koska se heuristisesti leimaa relaatiofaktat tietopohjilla. Edellinen lausetaso tarkoittaa, että mallit eivät saavuta tyydyttävää suorituskykyä, koska ne käyttävät kovia etikettejä, jotka määräytyvät etävalvonnassa ja jotka eivät muutu harjoittelun aikana. Tätä varten otamme käyttöön entiteettiparin tason denoise-menetelmän, joka hyödyntää semanttista tietoa oikein merkityistä entiteettipareista korjatakseen vääriä etikettejä dynaamisesti koulutuksen aikana. Ehdotamme yhteistä pisteytysfunktiota, joka yhdistää suhteelliset pisteet, jotka perustuvat entiteettipariin ja kovan etiketin luottamukseen, saadakseen uuden etiketin, eli pehmeän etiketin, tietylle entiteettiparille. Koulutuksen aikana pehmeät etiketit kovien etikettien sijaan toimivat kultaetiketeinä. Vertailutietojen kokeet osoittavat, että menetelmämme vähentää merkittävästi meluisia esiintymiä ja ylittää muiden huippuluokan järjestelmien suorituskyvyn.', 'jv': 'Awak-Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo akeh luwih apik dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan sing apik dhéwé kuwi Manual echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Ditawak dhéwé Genjer-genjer Eremut setunggal, etiket sing ditambah, sane nambah layanan sampeyan ngegol user', 'sk': 'Ekstrakcija odnosov na daljavo neizogibno trpi zaradi napačnih težav z označevanjem, ker heuristično označuje relativna dejstva z bazami znanja. Prejšnja stopnja stavka označuje, da modeli ne dosegajo zadovoljivih zmogljivosti, ker uporabljajo trde oznake, ki jih določa daljni nadzor in so nespremenljivi med vadbo. V ta namen predstavljamo metodo denoizacije na ravni entitet-par, ki izkorišča semantične informacije iz pravilno označenih parov entitet za dinamično popravljanje napačnih oznak med usposabljanjem. Predlagamo funkcijo skupnega rezultata, ki združuje relacijske rezultate na podlagi reprezentacije entitet-par in zaupanja trdega oznake, da bi dobili novo oznako, namreč mehko oznako, za določen par entitet. Med usposabljanjem mehke nalepke namesto trde nalepke služijo kot zlate nalepke. Poskusi na referenčnem naboru podatkov kažejo, da naša metoda dramatično zmanjšuje hrupne primere in presega druge najsodobnejše sisteme.', 'ha': "@ action: button Motolin danoise na zaman maganar ta tsohon, ba su sãmu mai yardarwa ba, kwani suna yin amfani da alama masu nau'i wanda aka ƙaddara shi da tsari mai nĩsa a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi. Ga wannan, Munã ƙara wani shirin nau'i biyu na danoise, wanda ke samun ma'anar mutane daga nau'in abun da aka rubũta, da kuma don ya daidaita alama masu inganci a lokacin da ake yi musu shirin. Tuna buɗe wani functional na haɗi wanda ke haɗa score masu husũma a kan bincike masu tsari ga abun-biyu da gaskiyar label mai nau'i dõmin ya sami wani label na daban, kamar wata label mai nau'i, wa'yan nau'in abun biyu. A cikin kõrar, alama masu rubutu ke amfani da musamman alama masu nau'i kamar alama na zĩnãriya. Kayan jarrabai kan danne-bangon ayuka na nuna cewa metoden mu kanana ƙara sauri farat ɗaya kuma ya sami wasu na'urar-state-of-the-art.", 'he': 'חוטפת מערכת יחסים משומרת מרחוק סובלת בלתי נמנעת מבעיות טעות בתיקוי כי היא תווית בעובדות יחסיות עם בסיסי ידע. רמת המשפט הקודמת מכחישה דוגמנים לא מגיעים להופעות מרוצות כי הם משתמשים בתוויות קשות שנקבעו על ידי פיקוח מרוחק ובלתי ניתנים בזמן האימון. למטרה זו, אנחנו מציגים שיטת דנואיז רמה של זוג יחידות שמשתמשת במידע סמנטי משותפים של יחידות עם תווים נכונים לתקן תוויות לא נכונות דינמית במהלך האימון. אנו מציעים פונקציה משותפת של נקודה שמשולבת את נקודות היחסים המבוססות על היציגה של זוג היחידות והאמון של התווית הקשה כדי להשיג תווית חדשה, כלומר תווית רכה, לזוג היחידות מסוים. במהלך האימון, תוויות רכות במקום תוויות קשות משמשות בתוויות זהב. ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים של רמז מראים ששיטתנו מפחידה דרמטית מקרים רעשים ומוציאה מערכות חדשות.', 'bo': 'Distant-supervised relation extraction inevitably suffers from wrong labeling problems because it heuristically labels relational facts with knowledge bases. སྔོན་གྱི་ཚིག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཤད་པའི་མིག་རྣམ་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་པའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལས་མཐུན་ཡོད་མེད། To this end, we introduce an entity-pair level denoise method which exploits semantic information from correctly labeled entity pairs to correct wrong labels dynamically during training. To this end, we introduce an entity-pair level denoise method which exploits semantic information from correctly labeled entity pairs to correct wrong labels dynamically during training. We propose a joint score function which combines the relational scores based on the entity-pair representation and the confidence of the hard label to obtain a new label, namely a soft label, for certain entity pair. During training, soft labels instead of hard labels serve as gold labels. Experiments on the benchmark dataset show that our method dramatically reduces noisy instances and outperforms other state-of-the-art systems.'}
{'en': 'A Sequential Model for Classifying Temporal Relations between Intra-Sentence Events', 'ar': 'نموذج متسلسل لتصنيف العلاقات الزمنية بين أحداث داخل الجملة', 'pt': 'Um modelo sequencial para classificar relações temporais entre eventos intrafrase', 'es': 'Un modelo secuencial para clasificar las relaciones temporales entre eventos dentro de una oración', 'fr': 'Un modèle séquentiel pour classifier les relations temporelles entre les événements intra-phrases', 'ja': '文中事象間の時間関係を分類するための逐次モデル', 'zh': '句内事间分类', 'hi': 'अंतर-वाक्य घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंधों को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक अनुक्रमिक मॉडल', 'ru': 'Последовательная модель для классификации временных отношений между событиями внутри предложения', 'ga': 'Samhail Sheicheamhach chun Caidrimh ama a Aicmiú idir Imeachtaí laistigh de Phianbhreith', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Az időbeli kapcsolatok osztályozására szekvenciális modell a mondaton belüli események között', 'el': 'Ένα διαδοχικό μοντέλο για την ταξινόμηση των προσωρινών σχέσεων μεταξύ συμβάντων εντός ποινών', 'kk': 'Температуралық қатынастарды түрлендіру үлгісі', 'lt': 'Laikinųjų santykių klasifikavimo tarp nuosprendžių įvykių sekos modelis', 'it': 'Un modello sequenziale per la classificazione delle relazioni temporali tra eventi intra-frase', 'mk': 'Секвенцијален модел за класификување на временски односи помеѓу внатрешните настани', 'ml': 'ക്ലാസിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള താല്\u200dക്കാലികമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell Sekwenzjali għall-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet Temporali bejn Avvenimenti ta’ Sentenza Interna', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Интернэт өгүүлбэрийн хоорондох температурын харилцааны дараагийн загвар', 'pl': 'Model sekwencyjny klasyfikacji relacji czasowych między zdarzeniami wewnątrz zdania', 'ro': 'Un model secvențial pentru clasificarea relațiilor temporale dintre evenimentele intrasentință', 'sr': 'Sekvencijalni model za klasifikaciju vremenskih odnosa između događaja unutrašnjeg kazne', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Modeel for fasaxa xiriirka ku meelgaarka ah ee u dhexeeya dhacdooyinka uurka', 'sv': 'En sekventiell modell för klassificering av tidsmässiga relationer mellan händelser inom meningen', 'ta': 'தற்காலிக தொடர்புகளை வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கான பின்வரும் மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình lặp đi lặp lại các giao tiếp thời gian giữa các giai đoạn nhạy cảm', 'nl': 'Een sequentieel model voor het classificeren van tijdelijke relaties tussen gebeurtenissen binnen de zin', 'bg': 'Последователен модел за класифициране на времевите отношения между събития в рамките на присъдата', 'hr': 'Sekvencijalni model klasifikacije vremenskih odnosa između događaja unutarnje kazne', 'id': 'Name', 'ko': '문장 내 이벤트 시간 관계 분류의 서열 모델', 'fa': 'Model sequence for Classifying Temporary Relations between Internal-sentence Events', 'da': 'En sekventiel model til klassificering af tidsmæssige relationer mellem intra-sætning begivenheder', 'sw': 'Utawala wa mara kwa mara kwa ajili ya kutangaza mahusiano ya muda kati ya matukio ya kudhibiti', 'de': 'Ein Sequenzmodell zur Klassifizierung temporaler Beziehungen zwischen innersatzungsinternen Ereignissen', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk äpişgeleri arasynda tertiblemek üçin bir nusgala', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një model sekuencor për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve të përkohshme midis ngjarjeve brenda dënimit', 'hy': 'Տարբեր դատողությունների միջև եղած ժամանակական հարաբերությունների դասակարգման հաջորդական մոդել', 'az': 'İçəri Sözü Vaqiaları arasındakı Temporal İlişkilərin Sequencial Modeli', 'bn': 'বিশেষ অনুষ্ঠানের মধ্যে স্থায়ী সম্পর্কের জন্য সাধারণ মোডেল', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'cs': 'Sekvenční model pro klasifikaci časových vztahů mezi událostmi uvnitř věty', 'bs': 'Sekvencijalni model za klasifikaciju vremenskih odnosa između događaja unutrašnjeg kazne', 'fi': 'Sarjamalli tuomionsisäisten tapahtumien ajallisten suhteiden luokittelemiseksi', 'ca': 'Un model secuencial per classificar les relacions temporals entre esdeveniments intrasentencials', 'et': 'Järjekordne mudel ajaliste suhete klassifitseerimiseks karistusesiseste sündmuste vahel', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Zaporedni model za razvrščanje časovnih odnosov med dogodki znotraj kazni', 'bo': 'ནང་འཁོད་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་སྐབས་རིགས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་'}
{'en': 'We present a sequential model for temporal relation classification between intra-sentence events. The key observation is that the overall syntactic structure and compositional meanings of the multi-word context between events are important for distinguishing among fine-grained temporal relations. Specifically, our approach first extracts a sequence of context words that indicates the temporal relation between two events, which well align with the dependency path between two event mentions. The context word sequence, together with a parts-of-speech tag sequence and a dependency relation sequence that are generated corresponding to the word sequence, are then provided as input to bidirectional recurrent neural network (LSTM) models. The neural nets learn compositional syntactic and semantic representations of contexts surrounding the two events and predict the temporal relation between them. Evaluation of the proposed approach on TimeBank corpus shows that sequential modeling is capable of accurately recognizing temporal relations between events, which outperforms a neural net model using various discrete features as input that imitates previous feature based models.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا متسلسلًا لتصنيف العلاقة الزمنية بين الأحداث داخل الجملة. الملاحظة الرئيسية هي أن الهيكل النحوي العام والمعاني التركيبية للسياق متعدد الكلمات بين الأحداث مهمة للتمييز بين العلاقات الزمنية الدقيقة. على وجه التحديد ، يستخرج نهجنا أولاً سلسلة من كلمات السياق التي تشير إلى العلاقة الزمنية بين حدثين ، والتي تتماشى جيدًا مع مسار التبعية بين حدثين مذكورين. يتم بعد ذلك توفير تسلسل كلمات السياق ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع سلسلة علامات أجزاء الكلام وتسلسل علاقة التبعية التي يتم إنشاؤها وفقًا لتسلسل الكلمات ، كمدخلات لنماذج الشبكة العصبية المتكررة ثنائية الاتجاه (LSTM). تتعلم الشبكات العصبية التمثيلات التركيبية والنحوية للدلالات للسياقات المحيطة بالحدثين وتتنبأ بالعلاقة الزمنية بينهما. يُظهر تقييم النهج المقترح في مجموعة TimeBank أن النمذجة المتسلسلة قادرة على التعرف بدقة على العلاقات الزمنية بين الأحداث ، والتي تتفوق على نموذج الشبكة العصبية باستخدام ميزات منفصلة متنوعة كمدخلات تحاكي النماذج السابقة القائمة على الميزات.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle séquentiel pour la classification des relations temporelles entre les événements intra-phrases. L'observation clé est que la structure syntaxique globale et les significations de composition du contexte multi-mots entre les événements sont importantes pour distinguer les relations temporelles fines. Plus précisément, notre approche extrait d'abord une séquence de mots contextuels qui indiquent la relation temporelle entre deux événements, qui s'alignent bien avec le chemin de dépendance entre deux mentions d'événements. La séquence de mots contextuels, ainsi qu'une séquence d'étiquettes de parties vocales et une séquence de relations de dépendance qui sont générées correspondant à la séquence de mots, sont ensuite fournies en tant qu'entrée à des modèles de réseaux neuronaux récurrents bidirectionnels (LSTM). Les réseaux neuronaux apprennent des représentations syntaxiques et sémantiques compositionnelles des contextes entourant les deux événements et prédisent la relation temporelle entre eux. L'évaluation de l'approche proposée sur le corpus TimeBank montre que la modélisation séquentielle est capable de reconnaître avec précision les relations temporelles entre les événements, ce qui surpasse un modèle de réseau neuronal utilisant diverses caractéristiques discrètes comme entrée imitant les modèles basés sur des caractéristiques précédents.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo sequencial para classificação de relações temporais entre eventos intrafrases. A principal observação é que a estrutura sintática geral e os significados composicionais do contexto multi-palavra entre eventos são importantes para distinguir entre relações temporais refinadas. Especificamente, nossa abordagem primeiro extrai uma sequência de palavras de contexto que indica a relação temporal entre dois eventos, que se alinham bem com o caminho de dependência entre duas menções de eventos. A sequência de palavras de contexto, juntamente com uma sequência de tags de partes de fala e uma sequência de relação de dependência que são geradas correspondendo à sequência de palavras, são então fornecidas como entrada para modelos de rede neural recorrente bidirecional (LSTM). As redes neurais aprendem representações sintáticas e semânticas composicionais de contextos que cercam os dois eventos e predizem a relação temporal entre eles. A avaliação da abordagem proposta no corpus do TimeBank mostra que a modelagem sequencial é capaz de reconhecer com precisão as relações temporais entre eventos, o que supera um modelo de rede neural usando vários recursos discretos como entrada que imita modelos anteriores baseados em recursos.', 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo secuencial para la clasificación de relaciones temporales entre eventos intra-oración. La observación clave es que la estructura sintáctica general y los significados compositivos del contexto de varias palabras entre eventos son importantes para distinguir entre las relaciones temporales de grano fino. Específicamente, nuestro enfoque primero extrae una secuencia de palabras de contexto que indica la relación temporal entre dos eventos, que se alinean bien con la ruta de dependencia entre dos menciones de eventos. La secuencia de palabras de contexto, junto con una secuencia de etiquetas de partes del habla y una secuencia de relación de dependencia que se generan correspondientes a la secuencia de palabras, se proporcionan entonces como entrada a los modelos de red neuronal recurrente bidireccional (LSTM). Las redes neuronales aprenden representaciones sintácticas y semánticas compositivas de los contextos que rodean a los dos eventos y predicen la relación temporal entre ellos. La evaluación del enfoque propuesto en el corpus de TimeBank muestra que el modelado secuencial es capaz de reconocer con precisión las relaciones temporales entre eventos, lo que supera a un modelo de red neuronal que utiliza varias características discretas como entrada que imita los modelos basados en características anteriores.', 'ja': '文中事象間の時間関係分類のシーケンシャルモデルを提示した。 主要な観察は、イベント間の多言語文脈の全体的な構文構造と構成的意味が、細かい時間的関係の間で区別するために重要であることである。 具体的には、我々のアプローチはまず、２つの事象間の時間的関係を示す文脈語のシーケンスを抽出し、これは２つの事象が言及する間の依存経路とよく一致する。 次いで、コンテキストワードシーケンスは、ワードシーケンスに対応して生成される発話部分タグシーケンス及び依存関係シーケンスと共に、双方向再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ ＬＳＴＭ ）モデルへの入力として提供される。 ニューラルネットは、２つの事象を取り巻く文脈の構成的構文および意味論的表現を学習し、それらの間の時間的関係を予測する。 TimeBankコーパスの提案されたアプローチの評価では、シーケンシャルモデリングは、過去の特徴ベースのモデルを模倣する入力として様々な離散的特徴を使用してニューラルネットモデルを上回る、イベント間の時間的関係を正確に認識することができることが示されています。', 'zh': '我们发出一个句子内事情关系分类的次第。 要之观也,事多词语境之体句法结构成义,于分细粒度为重。 具体来说,吾道首取一系上下文词,指两事之间,甚与两事相关涉。 然后,上下文词序及词序相应者词性标序与倚序并为双向递归神经网络 (LSTM) 模者输之。 神经网络学两事之上下文,句法语义之象,占其时日。 其法于TimeBank语料库上之评,次建模能正识事之日月,其性优于用诸离散特征为输神经网络,当模模仿前模。', 'hi': 'हम इंट्रा-वाक्य घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए एक अनुक्रमिक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। मुख्य अवलोकन यह है कि घटनाओं के बीच बहु-शब्द संदर्भ की समग्र वाक्यात्मक संरचना और रचनात्मक अर्थ ठीक-दाने वाले लौकिक संबंधों के बीच अंतर करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण हैं। विशेष रूप से, हमारा दृष्टिकोण पहले संदर्भ शब्दों का एक अनुक्रम निकालता है जो दो घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंध को इंगित करता है, जो दो घटनाओं के उल्लेखों के बीच निर्भरता पथ के साथ अच्छी तरह से संरेखित होता है। संदर्भ शब्द अनुक्रम, एक भागों के भाषण टैग अनुक्रम और एक निर्भरता संबंध अनुक्रम के साथ जो शब्द अनुक्रम के अनुरूप उत्पन्न होते हैं, फिर द्विदिश आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (एलएसटीएम) मॉडल के लिए इनपुट के रूप में प्रदान किए जाते हैं। तंत्रिका जाल दो घटनाओं के आसपास के संदर्भों के रचनात्मक वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व सीखते हैं और उनके बीच अस्थायी संबंध की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। TimeBank कॉर्पस पर प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण के मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि अनुक्रमिक मॉडलिंग घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंधों को सही ढंग से पहचानने में सक्षम है, जो इनपुट के रूप में विभिन्न असतत सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके एक तंत्रिका नेट मॉडल को मात देता है जो पिछले फीचर आधारित मॉडल की नकल करता है।', 'ru': 'Предложена последовательная модель для классификации временных отношений между событиями внутри предложения. Ключевым замечанием является то, что общая синтаксическая структура и композиционные значения многословного контекста между событиями важны для различения между мелкозернистыми временными отношениями. В частности, наш подход сначала извлекает последовательность контекстных слов, которые указывают на временную связь между двумя событиями, которые хорошо согласуются с путем зависимости между двумя упоминаниями событий. Затем последовательность контекстного слова вместе с последовательностью тегов частей речи и последовательностью отношений зависимости, которые генерируются в соответствии с последовательностью слов, предоставляются в качестве входных данных для двунаправленных моделей рекуррентной нейронной сети (LSTM). Нейронные сети изучают композиционные синтаксические и семантические представления контекстов, окружающих два события, и предсказывают временную связь между ними. Оценка предлагаемого подхода на корпусе TimeBank показывает, что последовательное моделирование способно точно распознавать временные связи между событиями, что превосходит нейронную сетевую модель, использующую различные дискретные признаки в качестве входных данных, имитирующих предыдущие модели на основе признаков.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid múnla seicheamhach i láthair maidir le haicmiú caidreamh ama idir imeachtaí laistigh den abairt. Is é an príomh-bhreathnú go bhfuil an struchtúr comhréire foriomlán agus bríonna cumadóireachta an chomhthéacs ilfhocail idir imeachtaí tábhachtach chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir caidreamh ama míne. Go sonrach, sleachtar ár gcur chuige ar dtús seicheamh focal comhthéacs a léiríonn an gaol ama idir dhá imeacht, a ailíníonn go maith leis an gcosán spleáchais idir dhá ócáid a luaitear. Soláthraítear ansin seicheamh na bhfocal comhthéacs, mar aon le seicheamh clibeanna coda cainte agus seicheamh gaol spleáchais a ghintear a chomhfhreagraíonn don seicheamh focal, mar ionchur do shamhlacha de líonra néarach athfhillteach déthreo (LSTM). Foghlaimíonn na líonta néaracha léirithe comhréire comhdhéanaimh agus shéimeantacha de chomhthéacsanna a bhaineann leis an dá imeacht agus déanann siad an gaol ama eatarthu a thuar. Léiríonn meastóireacht ar an gcur chuige atá molta ar TimeBank corpus go bhfuil samhaltú seicheamhach in ann caidreamh ama idir imeachtaí a aithint go cruinn, rud a sháraíonn samhail néarghlan agus úsáid á baint as gnéithe scoite éagsúla mar ionchur a dhéanann aithris ar shamhlacha gné-bhunaithe roimhe seo.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy szekvenciális modellt a mondaton belüli események időbeli viszonyok osztályozására. A legfontosabb megfigyelés, hogy az események közötti többszós kontextus általános szintaktikai struktúrája és kompozíciós jelentése fontos a finomszemcsés időbeli kapcsolatok megkülönböztetéséhez. Konkrétan, a megközelítésünk először egy kontextusszavak sorozatát vonja ki, amely jelzi a két esemény közötti időbeli kapcsolatot, amelyek jól illeszkednek a két eseményemlítés közötti függőségi útvonalhoz. A kontextusszavak sorozata, valamint a beszéd részei címkék sorozata és a szósorozatnak megfelelő függőségi kapcsolat sorozata, amely ezt követően bemenetként kerül megadásra a kétirányú visszatérő neurális hálózat (LSTM) modellekhez. A neurális hálók megtanulják a két eseményt körülvevő kontextusok kompozíciós szintaktikai és szemantikai ábrázolását és megjósolják a köztük lévő időbeli kapcsolatot. A TimeBank korpusz javasolt megközelítésének értékelése azt mutatja, hogy a szekvenciális modellezés képes pontosan felismerni az események közötti időkapcsolatokat, amelyek felülmúlják a neurális hálózati modellt különböző diszkrét funkciókkal, amelyek utánozzák a korábbi funkcióalapú modelleket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ სკენტიური მოდელი თავსონალური კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციაში შორის მოვლენების შორის. მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები არის, რომ მრავალური სინტექტიკური სტრუქტურა და კომპოზიციური ნიშნავები მოვლენების შორის მნიშვნელოვანია მოვლენების განსხვავებაში გასანიშვნელოვანი თავ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი პირველი პროგრამა კონტექსტური სიტყვების წერტილი, რომელიც ორი მოვლენების შორის თითონალური დაკავშირება, რომელიც ორი მოვლენების შორის დასაკუთრებულობ კონტექსტური სიტყვების წესები, რომელიც სიტყვების წესების წესებით და დამხოლობა სიტყვების კონტექსტური წესებით, რომელიც შექმნილია შემდეგ სიტყვების წესების წესებით, შემდეგ იყენება როგ ნეიროლური ქსელები შესწავლობენ კომპოზიციოლური სინტაქტიული და ჟენმანტიური გამოსახულებების კონტექსტის ორი მოვლენების გადარჩენება და განახულებენ მათგან შორის TimeBank corpus-ის მოწყობილობის განსაზღვრება აჩვენებს, რომ სკენტიური მოდელირება შეუძლებელია წარმოადგილად მოცემების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ნეიროლური მხოლობის მოდელის გამოყენება განსხვავებული დისკრეტური ფუნქცი', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα διαδοχικό μοντέλο για την ταξινόμηση χρονικών σχέσεων μεταξύ συμβάντων εντός ποινών. Η βασική παρατήρηση είναι ότι η συνολική συντακτική δομή και οι σύνθετες έννοιες του πολυλεκτικού πλαισίου μεταξύ των γεγονότων είναι σημαντικές για τη διάκριση μεταξύ των λεπτόκοκκων χρονικών σχέσεων. Συγκεκριμένα, η προσέγγισή μας εξάγει πρώτα μια ακολουθία λέξεων περιβάλλοντος που υποδεικνύει την χρονική σχέση μεταξύ δύο γεγονότων, τα οποία ευθυγραμμίζονται καλά με τη διαδρομή εξάρτησης μεταξύ δύο αναφορών γεγονότων. Η ακολουθία λέξεων περιβάλλοντος, μαζί με μια ακολουθία ετικετών τμημάτων ομιλίας και μια ακολουθία σχέσης εξάρτησης που παράγονται αντιστοιχούν στην ακολουθία λέξεων, παρέχονται στη συνέχεια ως εισαγωγή σε μοντέλα δικατεύθυνσης επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων (LSTM). Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα μαθαίνουν συνθηματικές και σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις των πλαισίων που περιβάλλουν τα δύο γεγονότα και προβλέπουν τη χρονική σχέση μεταξύ τους. Η αξιολόγηση της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης στο σώμα δείχνει ότι η διαδοχική μοντελοποίηση είναι ικανή να αναγνωρίσει με ακρίβεια χρονικές σχέσεις μεταξύ συμβάντων, το οποίο ξεπερνά ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου χρησιμοποιώντας διάφορα διακριτά χαρακτηριστικά ως εισαγωγή που μιμείται προηγούμενα μοντέλα βασισμένα σε χαρακτηριστικά.', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello sequenziale per la classificazione delle relazioni temporali tra eventi intra-frase. L'osservazione chiave è che la struttura sintattica complessiva e i significati compositivi del contesto multi-parola tra eventi sono importanti per distinguere tra relazioni temporali a grana fine. Nello specifico, il nostro approccio estrae prima una sequenza di parole di contesto che indica la relazione temporale tra due eventi, che ben si allineano con il percorso di dipendenza tra due menzioni di eventi. La sequenza di parole contestuali, insieme ad una sequenza di tag parti-of-speech e ad una sequenza di relazioni di dipendenza generate corrispondenti alla sequenza di parole, vengono quindi fornite come input ai modelli di rete neurale ricorrente bidirezionale (LSTM). Le reti neurali imparano rappresentazioni sintattiche compositive e semantiche dei contesti che circondano i due eventi e predicono la relazione temporale tra loro. La valutazione dell'approccio proposto sul corpus TimeBank mostra che la modellazione sequenziale è in grado di riconoscere accuratamente le relazioni temporali tra eventi, che superano un modello di rete neurale utilizzando varie caratteristiche discrete come input che imitano modelli basati su funzionalità precedenti.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame eilinį laiko santykių klasifikavimo tarp sakinio viduje įvykių model į. Pagrindinė pastaba yra ta, kad bendra daugiakalbio konteksto sintaktinė struktūra ir sudėtinė reikšmė tarp įvykių yra svarbūs siekiant atskirti smulkiai grūdintus laikinus santykius. Konkrečiai, mūsų požiūris pirmiausia ištraukia kontekstinių žodžių seką, kurioje nurodomas laiko ryšys tarp dviejų įvykių, kurie gerai suderinami su priklausomybės keliu tarp dviejų įvykių paminėjimų. Tuomet kontekstinė žodžių seka, kartu su žodžio žymenų dalimis ir priklausomybės santykio seka, kuri susidaro pagal žodžio seką, pateikiama kaip įėjimas į dvikrypčius pakartotinio nervinio tinklo (LSTM) modelius. Nervų tinklai mokosi kompozicinių sintaksinių ir semantinių aplinkybių aprašymų ir prognozuoja jų laiko santykį. Įvertinus siūlomą metodą dėl TimeBank corpus matyti, kad sekacinis modeliavimas gali tiksliai pripažinti laiko santykius tarp įvykių, kurie yra didesni už nervinio tinklo model į, naudojantį įvairias atskiras savybes kaip įvestį, imituojantį ankstesnius savybes pagrįstus modelius.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan model sunyi untuk klasifikasi hubungan sementara antara peristiwa dalam kalimat. Perhatian kunci ialah struktur keseluruhan sintaktik dan makna komposisi konteks berbilang-kata diantara peristiwa adalah penting untuk membezakan antara hubungan sementara yang sempurna. Secara khusus, pendekatan kita pertama mengekstrak urutan kata-kata konteks yang menunjukkan hubungan sementara antara dua peristiwa, yang menyesuaikan dengan laluan dependensi antara dua peristiwa disebut. Jujukan perkataan konteks, bersama dengan jujukan tag-bahagian-ucapan dan jujukan hubungan dependensi yang dijana yang sepadan dengan jujukan perkataan, kemudian disediakan sebagai input ke model rangkaian saraf berkurunan bidireksi (LSTM). Rangkaian saraf belajar perwakilan komposisi sintaktik dan semantik konteks yang mengelilingi dua peristiwa dan meramalkan hubungan sementara diantaranya. Evaluasi pendekatan yang direncanakan pada TimeBank corpus menunjukkan bahawa pemodelan berturut-turut mampu mengenali dengan tepat hubungan sementara antara peristiwa, yang melampaui model jaringan saraf menggunakan berbagai ciri-ciri diskret sebagai input yang meniru model berdasarkan ciri-ciri terdahulu.', 'kk': 'Біз сұрақтар арасындағы уақытша қатынас үлгісін таңдаймыз. Оқиғалар арасындағы көп сөз контекстінің жалпы синтактикалық құрылымы және құрылымдық мәліметтері уақытша қатынастарды айыру үшін маңызды. Ескерту үшін, біріншіден, екі оқиға арасындағы уақытша қатынасын көрсету үшін, екі оқиға туралы тәуелдік жолымен тәуелдік жолын түзетуге болады. Контексті сөздердің реті, сөздердің бөлігі тегтердің реті мен сөздердің ретіне сәйкес келетін тәуелсіздік ретіні біріктірілген, содан кейін екі директивалық қайталанатын невралдық желінің (LSTM) моделдеріне келтіріледі. Невралдық желі екі оқиғаларды айналып, арасындағы уақытша қатынасын көрсетеді. TimeBank корпусындағы ұсынылған тәсілдерді оқиғалар арасындағы уақытша қатынасын дұрыс анықтау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Бұл невралдық желі үлгісін өзгертіп, алдыңғы мүмкіндіктерді негіздеген үлгілерді көшірмелейтін дис', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധനത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള സംഭവത്തിന്റെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d അര്\u200dത്ഥങ്ങളുടെയും മൊത്തം സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ സംഭവത്തിന്റെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് ആദ്യ പ്രാധാന്യം രണ്ടു സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത് വാക്കിന്റെ സംവാക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങളും വാക്കിന്റെ സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ സെക്സ്റ്റെന്റ് സെക്സ്റ്റെന്റ് കൊണ്ട്, പിന്നീട് വാക The neural nets learn compositional syntactic and semantic representations of contexts surrounding the two events and predict the temporal relation between them.  ടൈമ്ബാങ്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d അവസ്ഥകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള സമയാലാവധി ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ശരിയായി തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴി', 'mk': 'Презентираме секвенцијален модел за класификација на временска врска помеѓу случувањата во реченицата. Клучната набљудување е дека целокупната синтактичка структура и композициските значења на мултизборниот контекст помеѓу настаните се важни за разлика помеѓу фините температурни односи. Специфично, нашиот пристап прво извлекува секвенца на контекстни зборови кои ја индицираат временската врска помеѓу двата настани, кои добро се согласуваат со патот на зависност помеѓу двата спомена на настани. Контекстна секвенца на зборови, заедно со секвенца на делови од зборот на тегите и секвенца на врска со зависност што се генерирани што одговара на зборот секвенца, потоа се обезбедуваат како влог на двојно рецидентна неурална мрежа (LSTM) модели. Неуралните мрежи научуваат композициски синтактички и семантички претставувања на контекстите околу двата настани и предвидуваат температурна врска помеѓу нив. Evaluation of the proposed approach on TimeBank corpus shows that sequential modeling is capable of accurately recognising temporal relations between events, which outperforms a neural net model using various discrete features as input that imitates previous feature-based models.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw mudell sekwenzjali għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjoni temporali bejn avvenimenti intra-sentenzjali. L-osservazzjoni ewlenija hija li l-istruttura sintattika globali u t-tifsiriet kompożittivi tal-kuntest b’ħafna kliem bejn l-avvenimenti huma importanti għad-distinzjoni bejn ir-relazzjonijiet temporali ta’ ħbub fin. B’mod speċifiku, l-approċċ tagħna l-ewwel jastrexxi sekwenza ta’ kliem ta’ kuntest li jindika r-relazzjoni temporali bejn żewġ avvenimenti, li jallinjaw sew mal-mogħdija tad-dipendenza bejn żewġ msemmija avvenimenti. The context word sequence, together with a parts-of-speech tag sequence and a dependency relation sequence that are generated corresponding to the word sequence, are then provided as input to bidirectional recurrent neural network (LSTM) models.  Ix-xbieki newrali jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet kompożizzjonali sintattiċi u semantiċi ta’ kuntesti madwar iż-żewġ avvenimenti u jipprevedu r-relazzjoni temporali bejniethom. L-evalwazzjoni tal-approċċ propost dwar TimeBank corpus turi li l-immudellar sekwenzjali huwa kapaċi jirrikonoxxi b’mod preċiż ir-relazzjonijiet temporali bejn l-avvenimenti, li jwassal għal mudell ta’ xibka newrali li juża karatteristiċi diskreti varji bħala input li jimita mudelli bbażati fuq karatteristiċi preċedenti.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein sekvensisk modell for mellombels relasjonsklassifikasjon mellom innsetningane. Nøkkelobservasjonen er at det generelle syntaksiske strukturen og komposisjonelle betydningane av det fleire ord-konteksten mellom hendingane er viktig for å distisera mellom fint tidsstyrre forhold. Dette er spesielt at tilnærminga vårt først ekstraherer ei rekkjefølgje av kontekstord som viser tidsstyrrelsen mellom to hendingar, som godt justerer med den avhengighetsstigen mellom to hendingar. Kontekst- ordsekvensen, saman med ein del av talemerkefølgje og ein avhengighetsrelasjonssekvens som er generert som tilsvarar ordsekvensen, vert så gitt som inndata til bidireksjonale rekursjonsverktøymodeller (LSTM). Neuralnettet lærer sammensatte syntaktiske og semantiske representasjonar av kontekstar omkring to hendingar og foregår mellombels relasjon mellom dei. Evaluering av den foreslåde tilnærminga på TimeBank corpus viser at sekvensære modellering kan nøyaktig gjenkjenne tidlegare forhold mellom hendingar, som utfører eit neuralnettmodell med ulike diskrete funksjonar som inndata som imiterer førre funksjonsbaserte modeller.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model sekwencyjny klasyfikacji relacji czasowych między zdarzeniami wewnątrz zdania. Kluczową obserwacją jest fakt, że ogólna struktura składni i znaczenia kompozycyjne kontekstu wielosłownego między zdarzeniami są istotne dla rozróżnienia między drobnoziarnistymi relacjami czasowymi. W szczególności nasze podejście najpierw wyodrębnia sekwencję słów kontekstowych, które wskazują czasową relację między dwoma zdarzeniami, które dobrze zgadzają się ze ścieżką zależności między dwoma wzmiankami zdarzeń. Kontekstowa sekwencja słów wraz z sekwencją tagów części mowy i sekwencją relacji zależności, które są generowane odpowiadające sekwencji słowa, są następnie dostarczane jako wejście do dwukierunkowych modeli rekrutującej sieci neuronowej (LSTM). Sieci neuronowe uczą się kompozycyjnych składni i semantycznych reprezentacji kontekstów otaczających oba zdarzenia i przewidują czasową relację między nimi. Ocena proponowanego podejścia na korpusie TimeBanku pokazuje, że modelowanie sekwencyjne jest zdolne do dokładnego rozpoznawania relacji czasowych między zdarzeniami, co przewyższa model sieci neuronowej wykorzystując różne cechy dyskretne jako wejście imitujące poprzednie modele oparte na cechach.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un model secvențial pentru clasificarea relațiilor temporale între evenimentele intra-frază. Observația cheie este că structura sintactică generală și semnificațiile compoziționale ale contextului multi-cuvânt între evenimente sunt importante pentru distingerea între relațiile temporale fine. Mai exact, abordarea noastră extrage mai întâi o secvență de cuvinte contextuale care indică relația temporală dintre două evenimente, care se aliniază bine cu calea dependenței dintre două mențiuni de eveniment. Secvența de cuvinte contextuale, împreună cu o secvență de etichete părți de vorbire și o secvență de relații de dependență care sunt generate corespunzător secvenței de cuvinte, sunt apoi furnizate ca intrare la modelele de rețea neurală recurentă bidirecțională (LSTM). Rețelele neurale învață reprezentări sintactice și semantice compoziționale ale contextelor din jurul celor două evenimente și prezic relația temporală dintre ele. Evaluarea abordării propuse asupra corpului TimeBank arată că modelarea secvențială este capabilă să recunoască corect relațiile temporale dintre evenimente, ceea ce depășește un model de rețea neurală utilizând diverse caracteristici discrete ca intrare care imită modelele anterioare bazate pe caracteristici.', 'mn': 'Бид интро-өгүүлбэрийн хоорондох хугацааны харилцааны дараагийн загварыг үзүүлнэ. Хамгийн чухал ажиглах нь олон үгийн тодорхойлолтын бүтэц болон бүтэц утгыг нь тодорхойлох нь цаг хугацааны харилцааны хоорондоо ялгах нь чухал. Ялангуяа бидний ойлголт эхлээд хоёр үйл явдлын хоорондын хугацааны харилцааны дарааллыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Энэ нь хоёр үйл явдлын хоорондын хамааралтай замыг сайн зэрэгцүүлдэг. Сүүлийн үг дарааллаа, хэлэлцээний хэсгүүд болон үгийн дарааллаас харьцуулсан хамааралтай холбоотой дарааллаа холбоотой, дараа нь хоёр дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээ (LSTM) загвар руу оруулдаг. Цөмийн сүлжээн нь хоёр үйл явдлыг тойрон хоорондын хугацааны харилцааны хугацааны харилцааны нэгтгэл болон semantic байдлыг суралцдаг. Таймбанк корпус дээрх санал өгсөн арга загварын үнэлгээ үзүүлэх нь өмнөх арга загварын үндсэн загваруудын хугацааны харилцааны хоорондын хугацааны харилцааны тодорхойлж чадах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන්. මුළු පරීක්ෂණය තමයි සාමාන්\u200dය සංවිධානය සහ සංවිධානය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය අ විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ පළමුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය දෙකක් අතර සම්බන්ධයක් පෙන්වන්න සම්බන්ධ වචන පරීක්ෂණය, භාෂාවක් ටැග් පරීක්ෂණය සමග සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග සම්බන්ධතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වචන පරීක්ෂණය සමග සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයෙන් සංවේදනය සහ සංවේදනයේ සංවේදනය දෙකක් වටිනවා සංවේදනය දෙකක් වටිනවා සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන TimeBank කෝර්පුස් වල ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණයේ ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණය පෙන්වනවා කියලා විසින් විසින් මෝඩලින් සැකසුම් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාවක', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ku saabsan fasaxa ku meelgaarka ah ee u dhexeeya dhacdooyinka marxaladda. Qoraalka muhiimka ah waa in la kala soocaa xiriirka dhaqdhaqaaqa badan ee la xiriira xiliga waqtiga ah. Si gaar ah, dhaqdhaqaalahayaga ugu horraysa ayaa soo saara hadal hoose ah oo muuqata xiriirka waqtiga ah ee u dhexeeya labada dhacdooyinka, taasoo si fiican u hagaajiya waddada ku xirnaanta labada xafiiska dhacdooyinka. Xiriirka hadalka, iyo qayb ka mid ah calaamada hadalka, iyo xiriirka ku xiriirka ku xiran ee la soo saaray si u eg qeybta ereyga, waxaa laguugu soo bandhigaa sida input oo kale, tusaalaha shabakadda neurada ee soo socda (LSTM). Internetka neurada ah waxay bartaan isbitaalka kooxaha ah iyo qeybaha kala duwan ee dhacdooyinka labada dhacdooyinka ku wareegsan iyo waxay horay u sheegaan xiriirka waqtiga ah ee u dhexeeya. Qiimeynta dhaqdhaqaalaha la soo jeeday ee ku qoran kooxda TimeBank waxay muuqaneysaa in qaababka soo socda uu awoodo inuu si saxda ah u aqoonsado xiriirka waqtiga ah ee dhacdooyinka dhexdooda ah, kaas oo soo saara model shabakadda neural ah oo isticmaalaya noocyo kala duwan oo kala duwan sida input oo u eg tusaalooyin hore.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo sekvencijski model za privremenu klasifikaciju veze između događaja unutrašnje rečenice. Ključna promatranja je da su ukupna sintaktička struktura i kompozicionalna značenja multirečnog konteksta između događaja važna za razliku između finog vremenskog odnosa. Posebno, naš pristup prvi izvlači sekvenciju kontekstskih reči koja ukazuje na privremenu vezu između dva događaja, koji se dobro uklapa sa putem zavisnosti između dva spominjanja događaja. Kontekstska sekvencija riječi, zajedno sa sekvencijom dijelova govora i sekvencijom zavisnosti odnosa koja se stvara u skladu sa sekvencijom riječi, onda se predstavlja kao ulaz u modele dvodirektivne recirene neuralne mreže (LSTM). Neuralne mreže nauče kompozicionalne sintaktične i semantične predstave konteksta oko dva događaja i predviđaju privremenu vezu između njih. Evaluacija predloženog pristupa TimeBank korpusu pokazuje da je sekvencijalna modelizacija sposobna da precizno prizna temporalne odnose između događaja, što iznosi neuralni mrežni model koristeći različite diskretne karakteristike kao ulaz koji imitira prethodne modele bazirane na karakteristikama.', 'ta': 'நாம் தற்காலிக தொடர்பு வகைப்பு இடையில் உள்ள வாக்கு நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு ஒரு பின்னணி மாதிரி கொண்டுள்ளோம். முக்கிய பார்வை என்னவென்றால் நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையில் உள்ள மொத்த ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் கூட்டு அர்த்தத்திற்கும் முக்கியமா குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் முதல் நெருக்கம் ஒரு பின்னணி வார்த்தைகளை வெளியிடும், அது இரண்டு நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையே தற்காலிக உறவை குறிக்கும், அத சூழல் வார்த்தையின் வரிசையுடன், பேச்சு ஒட்டு வரிசையுடனும், சார்ந்த தொடர்பு விளிம்புகளுடன் உருவாக்கப்பட்டது, சொல்லு வரிசைக்கு பொருத்தமான தொடர்புகளுடன், பிறகு தொடர் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் சுற்றியுள்ள இரண்டு நிகழ்வுகளை சுற்றி ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் மற்றும் அரைப்புர TimeBank குறிப்புக்கு முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் பார்வை காட்டுகிறது நிகழ்வுகளுக்கிடையில் நேர தொடர்புகளை சரியாக அறிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் என்பது தெரியும், அது வெவ', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en sekventiell modell för tidsrelationsklassificering mellan intra-meningshändelser. Den viktigaste observationen är att den övergripande syntaktiska strukturen och kompositionella betydelsen av flerordssammanhanget mellan händelser är viktiga för att skilja mellan finkorniga temporala relationer. Specifikt extraherar vårt tillvägagångssätt först en sekvens av sammanhangsord som indikerar det tidsmässiga förhållandet mellan två händelser, som väl anpassar sig till beroendebanan mellan två händelseomnämningar. Sammanhangsordsekvensen, tillsammans med en taggsekvens för delar av tal och en beroenderelationssekvens som genereras motsvarande ordsekvensen, tillhandahålls sedan som inmatning till dubbelriktade återkommande neurala nätverksmodeller (LSTM). De neurala näten lär sig kompositionella syntaktiska och semantiska representationer av kontexter som omger de två händelserna och förutspår tidsförhållandet mellan dem. Utvärdering av det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet på TimeBank korpus visar att sekventiell modellering är kapabel att exakt identifiera temporala relationer mellan händelser, vilket överträffar en neural nätmodell med olika diskreta funktioner som indata som imiterar tidigare funktionsbaserade modeller.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سفارشی موڈل کو اندازے مجموعہ کے درمیان موقت رابطہ کا کلاسیفون کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں. کلی نظر یہ ہے کہ بہت سینٹکتیک ساختار اور بہت سی لفظ کی تعریف حادثوں کے درمیان بہت سی لفظ کی تعریف کے لئے اہم ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہماری تقریبا پہلی بار ایک کنٹنسیٹ کلمات کی سطح نکالتا ہے جو دو حادثوں کے درمیان موقت رابطہ دکھاتا ہے، جو دو حادثوں کے درمیان اعتمادی رابطہ کے ساتھ ٹھیک ٹھیک ہے. کانکسٹ ورڈ کثیر، ایک ٹاگ کے ٹاگ کثیر کے ساتھ اور ایک اپنا اعتمادی رابطہ کثیر کے ساتھ جو کلمات کثیر کے مطابق پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، پھر دوبارہ تکرار نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک (LSTM) موڈل کے لئے ایمپیوتر بنا دیا جاتا ہے. نئورل نیٹ سینٹ کی تعبیر کی سینٹکسٹیسی اور سیمنٹیسی معجزات کی جگہ دو اتفاقات کے احاطہ میں اور ان کے درمیان موقت رابطہ کی پیش بینی کرتی ہیں. تایمبنک کورپوس کے مقرر کردہ طریقے کا ارزیابہ دکھاتا ہے کہ سفارشی موڈلینگ واقعات کے درمیان موقتی رابطہ کو دقیق پہچان سکتی ہے، جو ایک نئورل نیٹ موڈل کو مختلف طریقے خصوصے کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے جو پہلے کی فرصت کی بنیادی موڈل کی', 'uz': "Biz bir xil maxfiy soʻzlar orasidagi vaqt munosabatlarni tahrirlash uchun modelni hozir qilamiz. Muhimlik taʼminlovchisi, bir so'zlar tarkibidagi bir necha so'zlar tarkibini ajratish muhim vaqt bilan ajratish muhim. @ info Name Neural tarmoqlar ikki hodisalarning ikki hodisa taʼminlovchi tarmoqning kompyuterlik va semantik tashkilotlarini o'rganadi va ularning orasidagi vaqt aloqalarini predictable qiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình tương tự cho mức độ liên quan thời gian giữa các sự kiện. Quan sát quan trọng là cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc tổng hợp của các từ ngữ giữa các sự kiện rất quan trọng để phân biệt giữa các mối quan hệ thời gian phức tạp. Cụ thể, cách tiếp cận của chúng ta đầu tiên trích ra một chuỗi các từ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ cảnh cho thấy mối liên hệ thời gian giữa hai sự kiện, nó rất phù hợp với đường phụ thuộc giữa hai sự kiện đề cập. Chuỗi từ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ, cùng với một chuỗi phần của thẻ bài phát biểu và một chuỗi liên quan phụ thuộc được tạo ra tương ứng với chuỗi các từ, được cung cấp như sự nhập vào các mô- đun mạng thần kinh chạy trực tiếp (LSTM). Lưới thần kinh học các biểu tượng cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc theo ngữ pháp xung quanh hai sự kiện và dự đoán mối liên hệ thời gian giữa hai sự kiện. Bài đánh giá phương pháp được đề xuất trên tập đoàn TimeBank cho thấy khả năng tạo mẫu chuỗi có khả năng xác nhận chính xác các mối quan hệ thời gian giữa các sự kiện, mà hoàn thiện một mô hình lưới thần kinh bằng nhiều tính năng riêng khác nhau như nhập giả các mô hình dựa trên tính năng trước.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een sequentieel model voor temporele relatieklassing tussen intra-zin gebeurtenissen. De belangrijkste observatie is dat de algehele syntactische structuur en compositionele betekenissen van de multi-word context tussen gebeurtenissen belangrijk zijn om onderscheid te maken tussen fijnkorrelige temporele relaties. In het bijzonder extraheert onze aanpak eerst een reeks contextwoorden die de temporele relatie tussen twee gebeurtenissen aangeeft, die goed overeenkomen met het afhankelijkheidspad tussen twee gebeurtenisvermeldingen. De contextwoordsequentie, samen met een parts-of-speech tag sequentie en een afhankelijkheidsrelatie sequentie die overeenkomt met de woordsequentie, worden vervolgens geleverd als invoer voor bidirectionele recidivierende neurale netwerkmodellen (LSTM). De neurale netten leren compositionele syntactische en semantische representaties van contexten rondom de twee gebeurtenissen en voorspellen de tijdelijke relatie tussen hen. Evaluatie van de voorgestelde aanpak op TimeBank corpus toont aan dat sequentiële modellering in staat is om nauwkeurige temporele relaties tussen gebeurtenissen te herkennen, wat een neuraal netmodel overtreft met behulp van verschillende discrete kenmerken als input die eerdere feature based modellen imiteert.', 'bg': 'Представяме последователен модел за класификация на времевите взаимоотношения между събитията в рамките на изречението. Ключовото наблюдение е, че цялостната синтактична структура и композиционните значения на многословния контекст между събитията са важни за разграничаването на фините времеви отношения. По-конкретно, нашият подход първо извлича последователност от контекстни думи, които показват времевата връзка между две събития, които добре съответстват на пътя на зависимост между две споменавания събития. Последователността на думите в контекста, заедно с последователността на части от речните маркери и последователността на зависимостта, които се генерират, съответстващи на последователността на думите, след това се предоставят като вход за двупосочни модели на повтаряща се невронна мрежа (LSTM). Неврологичните мрежи научават композиционни синтактични и семантични представи на контекстите около двете събития и предсказват времевата връзка между тях. Оценката на предложения подход към корпуса показва, че последователното моделиране е способно точно да разпознае времевите отношения между събитията, което превъзхожда модела на невронната мрежа, използвайки различни дискретни функции като вход, който имитира предишни модели базирани на функции.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en sekventiel model for tidsmæssig relation klassificering mellem intra-sætning begivenheder. Den centrale observation er, at den overordnede syntaktiske struktur og kompositionelle betydninger af multi-word kontekst mellem begivenheder er vigtige for at skelne mellem finkornede tidsmæssige relationer. Specielt udtrækker vores tilgang først en sekvens af kontekstord, der angiver den tidsmæssige relation mellem to begivenheder, som godt passer til afhængighedsstien mellem to begivenhedsnævnelser. Den kontekstordsekvens, sammen med en parts-of-speech tagsekvens og en afhængighedsrelationsekvens, der genereres svarende til ordsekvensen, leveres derefter som input til to retninger tilbagevendende neurale netværk (LSTM) modeller. De neurale net lærer kompositionelle syntaktiske og semantiske repræsentationer af sammenhænge omkring de to begivenheder og forudsiger den tidsmæssige relation mellem dem. Evaluering af den foreslåede tilgang til TimeBank korpus viser, at sekventiel modellering er i stand til nøjagtigt at genkende tidsmæssige relationer mellem begivenheder, hvilket overgår en neural netmodel ved hjælp af forskellige diskrete funktioner som input, der efterligner tidligere funktionsbaserede modeller.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein sequenzielles Modell zur zeitlichen Relationsklassifikation zwischen intra-satz Ereignissen. Die zentrale Beobachtung ist, dass die gesamte syntaktische Struktur und kompositorische Bedeutung des Mehrwortkontexts zwischen Ereignissen wichtig sind, um zwischen feinkörnigen zeitlichen Beziehungen zu unterscheiden. Insbesondere extrahiert unser Ansatz zunächst eine Sequenz von Kontextwörtern, die die zeitliche Beziehung zwischen zwei Ereignissen angibt, die gut mit dem Abhängigkeitspfad zwischen zwei Ereigniserwähnungen übereinstimmen. Die Kontextwortsequenz, zusammen mit einer Wortteilsequenz und einer Abhängigkeitsbeziehungssequenz, die entsprechend der Wortsequenz generiert werden, werden dann als Input für bidirektional recidivierende neuronale Netze (LSTM)-Modelle bereitgestellt. Die neuronalen Netze lernen kompositorische syntaktische und semantische Darstellungen von Kontexten, die die beiden Ereignisse umgeben, kennen und prognostizieren die zeitliche Beziehung zwischen ihnen. Die Auswertung des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes am TimeBank-Korpus zeigt, dass sequenzielle Modellierung in der Lage ist, zeitliche Beziehungen zwischen Ereignissen genau zu erkennen, was ein neuronales Netzmodell übertrifft, indem verschiedene diskrete Merkmale als Eingabe verwendet werden, die frühere Feature-basierte Modelle imitieren.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model urutan untuk klasifikasi hubungan sementara antara kejadian dalam kalimat. Perhatian kunci adalah bahwa struktur sintaksi umum dan arti komposisi konteks multi-kata antara peristiwa penting untuk membedakan antara hubungan temporal yang sempurna. Secara spesifik, pendekatan kita pertama mengekstrak urutan kata-kata konteks yang menunjukkan hubungan temporal antara dua peristiwa, yang dengan baik menyesuaikan dengan jalur dependensi antara dua peristiwa menyebutkan. Jujukan kata konteks, bersama dengan urutan tag-bagian-dari-pidato dan urutan hubungan dependensi yang dihasilkan yang sepadan dengan urutan kata, kemudian disediakan sebagai input ke model jaringan neural rekuren bidireksi (LSTM). Rangkaian saraf belajar persembahan komposisi sintaks dan semantis dari konteks yang mengelilingi dua peristiwa dan memprediksi hubungan temporal antara mereka. Evaluasi pendekatan yang diusulkan pada TimeBank corpus menunjukkan bahwa model sekuensial mampu mengenali dengan akurat hubungan temporal antara peristiwa, yang melebihi model jaringan saraf menggunakan berbagai ciri-ciri diskret sebagai input yang imitasi model berdasarkan ciri-ciri sebelumnya.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل ردیابی برای برقراری رابطه موقتی بین اتفاقات داخل جمله را نشان می دهیم. مشاهده کلید این است که عمومی ساختار سنتاکتیک و معنی\u200cهای ترکیب از محیط کلمات بین رویدادها مهم است برای جدایی بین رابطه\u200cهای موقتی\u200cهای پاکیزه. دقیقاً دسترسی ما اول یک دستور از کلمات محیط را خارج می\u200cکند که ارتباط موقتی بین دو رویداد نشان می\u200cدهد، که با مسیر بستگی بین دو رویداد به خوبی ارتباط می\u200cدهد. سپس به عنوان ورودی به مدل شبکه عصبی (LSTM) دوباره تکرار می\u200cشوند. شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cها نمایش\u200cهای ساختمان\u200cآوری و سیمانتیک\u200cهای محیط دو رویداد را یاد می\u200cگیرند و ارتباط موقتی بین آنها را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنند. ارزیابی دستور پیشنهاد در کورپوس تایمبانک نشان می دهد که مدل\u200cسازی\u200cهای بعدی قادر است که با دقیق شناختن رابطه\u200cهای موقتی بین رویداد\u200cها باشد، که یک مدل شبکه عصبی را با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای مختلف جدا و مختلف به عنوان ورودی که مدل\u200cهای معمولی قبلی را', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa usambazaji wa muda kati ya matukio ya kifungu. Maoni muhimu ni kwamba muundo mzima wa ushirikiano na maana ya mkusanyiko wa mazingira ya maneno mengi kati ya matukio mengi ni muhimu kwa kutofautisha kati ya mahusiano ya muda mzuri. Kwa ujumla, hatua yetu ya kwanza inaleta mfululizo wa maneno ya muktadha unaoonyesha uhusiano wa muda kati ya matukio mawili, ambayo yanaunganisha vizuri na njia ya kutegemea kati ya matamko mawili. Neno ya muktadha, pamoja na sehemu ya viungo vya hotuba na mfululizo wa uhusiano wa kutegemea unaotengenezwa kwa mujibu wa mfululizo wa maneno, na baadae inatengenezwa kama input kwa mifano ya upatikanaji wa mtandao wa neural unaoendelea (LSTM). Mtandao wa neura wanajifunza muungano wa pamoja na uwakilishi wa sekunde wa mikutano yanayozunguka matukio mawili na kutabiri uhusiano wa muda kati yao. Tathmini ya mbinu zilizopendekezwa kwenye makampuni ya TimeBank inaonyesha kuwa muundo wa kufuatia unaweza kutambua mahusiano ya muda wa muda kati ya matukio, ambayo inaonyesha muundo wa mtandao wa neura kwa kutumia vipengele tofauti kama vile vinavyofananisha mifano iliyopita.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo sekvencijski model za klasifikaciju privremenih odnosa između događaja unutrašnje rečenice. Ključna promatranja je da su ukupna sintaktička struktura i kompozicionalna značenja multiriječnog konteksta između događaja važna za razliku između finog zrnca vremenskih odnosa. Posebno, naš pristup prvi izvlači sekvenciju kontekstskih riječi koja ukazuje na privremenu odnos između dva događaja, koji se dobro uključuje na put ovisnosti između dva spominjanja događaja. Kontekstska sekvencija riječi, zajedno s sekvencijom dijelova govornog znakova i sekvencijom zavisnosti koja se stvara u skladu s sekvencijom riječi, zatim se pružaju kao ulaz u modele dvodirektivne recirene neuralne mreže (LSTM). Neuralne mreže uče kompozicionalne sintaktične i semantične predstave konteksta oko dva događaja i predviđaju privremenu vezu između njih. Procjenjivanje predloženog pristupa TimeBank corpusu pokazuje da je sekvencijalna modelizacija sposobna da precizno prizna privremene odnose između događaja, što iznosi neuralni mrežni model koristeći različite diskretne karakteristike kao ulaz koji imitira prethodne modele bazirane na funkcijama.', 'tr': 'Biz döwürler içine gizli baglaşma üçin bir nusga görkeýäris. Açyk gözlemek bolsa, olar arasyndaky ähli sintaktik struktür we kompozisyonal wajyplaryň, täze-täze dynç baglaşyklaryň arasynda tapawutlamak üçin wajyp däldir. Adatça, biziň golaýymyz ilkinji gezek iki äpişgäniň arasynda wagtyň baglaýyşyny takyklaýar, iki äpişgäniň arasyndaky baglaýyşlygyny gowy gabdalýar. Çaltylyk sözleri terjime bilen, sözleriniň bir parçalary bilen we sözleriniň terjime görä baglanşyk terjime bilen, soňra iki görnöş terjime täblisaň (LSTM) nusgasyna giriş şeklinde berilýär Nöral ağlar iki olay çevresindeki duygusal sentaktik ve semantik görüntülerini öğrenir ve olaryň arasyndaki zamanlı ilişkilerini tahmin edir. TimeBank korpusynda teklip eden ýagdaýyň çykyşynyň çykyşyny görkez edýän ýagdaýynyň geçmiş nusgalaryň arasyndaky baglaýyşlaryny dogry tanamagy mümkin edip bilýändigini görkez.', 'ko': '우리는 문장 내의 사건 시간 관계 분류의 서열 모델을 제시했다.관건적인 관찰 결과 사건 사이의 다사 상하문의 전체적인 문법 구조와 조합 의미는 세립도를 구분하는 시간 관계에 매우 중요하다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리의 방법은 먼저 일련의 상하문어를 추출하여 두 사건 간의 시간 관계를 나타낸다. 이것은 두 사건 언급 간의 의존 경로와 잘 일치한다.그런 다음 컨텍스트 단어 시퀀스와 단어 시퀀스에 대응하는 단어 표기 시퀀스 및 의존 관계 시퀀스를 양방향 반복 신경 네트워크(LSTM) 모델의 입력으로 사용합니다.신경 네트워크 학습은 이 두 사건의 상하문을 둘러싼 조합 문법과 의미 표시를 둘러싸고 그들 간의 시간 관계를 예측한다.시간 은행 자료 라이브러리에 대한 평가에 따르면 서열 모델링은 사건 간의 시간 관계를 정확하게 식별할 수 있는데 이것은 각종 이산적 특징을 입력의 신경 네트워크 모델로 사용하는 것보다 우수하다. 이 모델은 이전에 특징을 바탕으로 한 모델을 모방했다.', 'am': 'የጊዜው ግንኙነት ክፍለ ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የቁልፎች ማስተያየት፣ በጉዳዩ መካከል የብዙ ቃላት ማሰናከል እና አካባቢ ማሰናከል በጥሩ ጊዜ ግንኙነት ለመለየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የመጀመሪያው ቃላችን በሁለቱ ሁኔታ መካከል የጊዜው ግንኙነት እና በሁለቱ ሁኔታዎች መካከል በመታሰሪያ መንገድ እና በመደገፍ የሚታየው የግንኙነታችንን ግንኙነት የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ የንግግር ቃላት ግንኙነት፣ በአንድ ክፍል የንግግር ምልክት ክፍል እና የመታሰል ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ክፍል እና ለቃላት ግንኙነት ክፍል፣ በዚያን ጊዜ በጥያቄ ለመደጋገም የሚቆጠሩ የኔural መረብ (LSTM) ሞዴላዎችን ለመስጠት ይደረጋሉ። በሁለቱ ሁኔታዎች ውስጥ ያሉትን የአካባቢ ግንኙነት እና የደብዳቤ መረብ ተማርተዋል፡፡ በቴምባክ ኮርፓስ ላይ በተዘጋጀው የጥያቄ ሥርዓት ማሳየት የሚችል የጥያቄ ግንኙነት በሁኔታ መካከል ማስታወቂያውን እንደሚችል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model sekuencial për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve temporale midis ngjarjeve brenda fjalës. The key observation is that the overall syntactic structure and compositional meanings of the multi-word context between events are important for distinguishing among fine-grained temporal relations.  Veçanërisht, qasja jonë nxjerr së pari një sekuencë fjalësh konteksti që tregon lidhjen e përkohshme midis dy ngjarjeve, të cilat përshtaten mirë me rrugën e varësisë midis dy përmendimeve të ngjarjeve. Sekuenca e fjalëve të kontekstit, së bashku me një sekuencë pjesësh të etiketës së fjalimit dhe një sekuencë të lidhjes së varësisë që gjenerohen në përputhje me sekuencën e fjalëve, furnizohen pastaj si hyrje në modelet e rrjetit nervor të përsëritur dy-drejtues (LSTM). Rrjetet nervore mësojnë përfaqësime kompozitive sintaktike dhe semantike të konteksteve rreth dy ngjarjeve dhe parashikojnë lidhjen temporale midis tyre. Vlerësimi i qasjes së propozuar ndaj korpusit TimeBank tregon se modelimi sekuencial është i aftë të njohë saktësisht marrëdhëniet temporale midis ngjarjeve, e cila ekziston mbi një model rrjeti neural duke përdorur karakteristika të ndryshme diskrete si input që imiton modelet e mëparshëm bazuar në karakteristika.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ժամանակական հարաբերությունների դասակարգման հաջորդական մոդել ներս նախադասության իրադարձությունների միջև: Հիմնական հետևանքն այն է, որ իրադարձությունների միջև բազմաբառերի կոնտեքստի ընդհանուր սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքը և բազմաբառերի կառուցվածքային իմաստը կարևոր են, որպեսզի տարբերակեն գեղեցիկ ժամանակական հարաբերություններ Իրականում, մեր մոտեցումը առաջին անգամ հանում է կոնտեքստի բառերի հաջորդականություն, որը ցույց է տալիս երկու իրադարձությունների միջև եղած ժամանակական հարաբերությունը, որը լավ համապատասխանում է երկու իրադարձությունների միջև եղած կախվածության ուղին: Ապա բառերի կոնտեքստի հաջորդականությունը, միասին խոսքի թեգ հաջորդականության մասերի հետ և կախվածության հարաբերության հաջորդականությունը, որոնք ստեղծվում են բառերի հաջորդականությամբ համապատասխանող բառերի հաջորդականությամբ, տրվում են որպես ներմուծք երկուղղությամբ Նյարդային ցանցերը սովորում են երկու իրադարձությունների շրջապատող կոնտեքստների ստեղծագործական սինտակտիկ և սեմանտիկ ներկայացումներ և կանխագուշակում են դրանց միջև եղած ժամանակական հարաբերությունները: Թայմբանկի կորպուսի մասին առաջարկված մոտեցումների գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ հաջորդական մոդելը կարողանում է ճշգրիտ ճանաչել ժամանակական հարաբերությունները իրադարձությունների միջև, ինչը գերազանցում է նյարդային ցանցային մոդելը, օգտագործելով տարբեր անհնար հատկություններ որպես', 'af': "Ons stel 'n sekwensiele model vir tydelike verwanting klasifikasie tussen intra-seting gebeurtenis. Die sleutel observasie is dat die hele sintaktieke struktuur en samenstellende betekenings van die multiwoord konteks tussen gebeurtenis belangrik is om onder fyn-kornerede tydelike verwantings te verkies. Spesifieke, ons toegang eerste uitpak 'n reeks van kontekswoorde wat wys die tydelike verwanting tussen twee gebeurtenis, wat goed gelyk met die afhanklikheid pad tussen twee gebeurtenis bepaalde. Die konteks woord volgorde, saam met 'n dele- van- spreek etiket volgorde en 'n afhanklikheid verwantigheid volgorde wat genereer word ooreenstemmende na die woord volgorde, word dan verskaf as invoer na bidireksjonale rekursiewe neuralnetwerk (LSTM) modele. Die neurale netwerke leer komposisielike sintaktieke en semantiese voorstellings van kontekste wat omsingel die twee gebeurtenis en voorskou die tydelike verwanting tussen hulle. Evalueer van die voorgestelde toegang op TimeBank corpus vertoon dat sekwensiele modellering is in staat om tydelike verwantings tussen gebeurtenis te herken, wat 'n neurale net model uitvoer deur verskillende diskrete funksies te gebruik as invoer wat die vorige funksie gebaseerde modele imiteer.", 'ca': "Presentam un model seqüencial per a classificar la relació temporal entre esdeveniments intra-frases. L'observació clau és que l'estructura sinàctica global i els significats compositius del contexte multiparaula entre esdeveniments són importants per distingir entre les relacions temporals fins. Specifically, our approach first extracts a sequence of context words that indicates the temporal relation between two events, which well align with the dependency path between two event mentions.  La seqüència de paraules contextuals, juntament amb una seqüència de parts-of-speech tag i una seqüència de relació de dependencia que es generen que corresponden a la seqüència de paraules, es proporcionen com entrada a models de xarxa neural recurrent bidireccional (LSTM). The neural nets learn compositional syntactic and semantic representations of contexts surrounding the two events and predict the temporal relation between them.  L'evaluació de l'enfocament proposat en TimeBank corpus mostra que la modelació seqüencial és capaç de reconèixer exactament les relacions temporals entre els esdeveniments, que supera un model de xarxa neural utilitzant diverses característiques discretes com entrada que imita models basats en característiques anteriors.", 'cs': 'Představujeme sekvenční model pro klasifikaci časových vztahů mezi událostmi uvnitř věty. Klíčovým pozorováním je, že celková syntaktická struktura a kompoziční významy multislovního kontextu mezi událostmi jsou důležité pro rozlišení jemnozrnných časových vztahů. Konkrétně, náš přístup nejprve extrahuje sekvenci kontextových slov, která indikuje časový vztah mezi dvěma událostmi, které dobře sladí s cestou závislosti mezi dvěma zmínkami událostí. Kontextová sekvence slov spolu s sekvencí značek části řeči a sekvencí vztahů závislosti, které jsou generovány odpovídající sekvenci slov, jsou pak poskytovány jako vstup do obousměrných rekurentních neuronových sítí (LSTM). Neuronové sítě se učí kompoziční syntaktické a sémantické reprezentace kontextů obklopujících obě události a předpovídají časový vztah mezi nimi. Vyhodnocení navrženého přístupu na korpusu TimeBank ukazuje, že sekvenční modelování je schopno přesně rozpoznat časové vztahy mezi událostmi, které překonávají model neuronové sítě pomocí různých diskrétních prvků jako vstup, který napodobuje předchozí modely založené na funkcích.', 'et': 'Esitame järjestikuse mudeli lausesiseste sündmuste ajalise seose klassifitseerimiseks. Peamine tähelepanek on, et sündmustevahelise mitmesõnalise konteksti üldine süntaktiline struktuur ja kompositsioonilised tähendused on olulised peenete ajaliste suhete eristamiseks. Täpsemalt, meie lähenemine ekstraheerib esmalt kontekstisõnade jada, mis näitab ajalist seost kahe sündmuse vahel, mis hästi joonduvad sõltuvusteega kahe sündmuse mainimise vahel. Kontekstisõnade jada koos kõnesõnade osade jadaga ja sõnasõnade jadaga, mis genereeritakse vastavalt sõnasõnade jadale, esitatakse seejärel sisendina kahesuunalise korduva närvivõrgu (LSTM) mudelitele. Närvivõrgud õpivad kahte sündmust ümbritsevate kontekstide kompositsioonilisi süntaktilisi ja semantilisi representatsioone ning ennustavad nendevahelist ajalist seost. Kavandatud lähenemisviisi hindamine TimeBank korpusele näitab, et järjestikune modelleerimine suudab täpselt tuvastada sündmustevahelisi ajalisi suhteid, mis ületab närvivõrgu mudelit, kasutades erinevaid diskreetseid funktsioone sisendina, mis imiteerib varasemaid funktsioonipõhiseid mudeleid.', 'bn': 'আমরা কারাদণ্ডের মধ্যে সাময়িক সম্পর্ক বিভাগের জন্য একটি মডেল উপস্থাপন করি। গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পর্যবেক্ষণ হচ্ছে যে অনুষ্ঠানের মধ্যে মাল্টিশব্দের মানে সাধারণ সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামো এবং সংগঠনের মানে বিভিন্ন সময়ে Specifically, our approach first extracts a sequence of context words that indicates the temporal relation between two events, which well align with the dependency path between two event mentions.  কন্টেক্সট শব্দের সীমা, একটি অংশের বক্তৃতা ট্যাগ সেকেন্স এবং একটি নির্ভরিত সম্পর্কের সংক্রান্ত সংযোগ যা শব্দের সীমান্তের সাথে তৈরি করা হয়, তারপর পুনরাবর্তন নিউরেল ন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক এই দুই ঘটনার চারপাশের প্রতিযোগিতার সাথে একত্রিত সিন্ট্যাকটিক এবং সেমেন্টিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখে এবং তাদে টাইমব্যাংক কোর্পাসের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির বিষয়টি মূল্যায়ন করে দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পরবর্তী মডেলিং অনুষ্ঠানের মধ্যে সঠিকভাবে স্বীকার করতে সক্ষম, যা বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বৈচিত্', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo sekvencijski model za klasifikaciju privremenih odnosa između događaja unutrašnje rečenice. Ključna promatranja je da su ukupna sintaktična struktura i kompozicionalna značenja multiriječnog konteksta između događaja važna za razliku između finog vremenskog odnosa. Posebno, naš pristup prvi izvlači sekvenciju kontekstskih riječi koja ukazuje na privremenu vezu između dva događaja, koji se dobro uključuje sa putem ovisnosti između dva spominjanja događaja. Kontekstska sekvencija riječi, zajedno sa sekvencijom dijelova govora i sekvencijom odnosa zavisnosti koja se stvara u skladu sa sekvencijom riječi, onda se pružaju kao ulaz u modele dvodirektivne rekoretne neuralne mreže (LSTM). Neuralne mreže nauče kompozicionalne sintaktične i semantične predstave konteksta oko dva događaja i predviđaju privremenu vezu između njih. Evaluacija predloženog pristupa TimeBank korpusu pokazuje da je sekvencijalna modelizacija sposobna da precizno prizna temporalne odnose između događaja, što iznosi neuralni mrežni model koristeći različite diskretne karakteristike kao ulaz koji imitira prethodne modele bazirane na karakteristikama.', 'fi': 'Esitämme sekvenssimallin lauseen sisäisten tapahtumien ajalliseen suhteeseen. Keskeinen havainto on, että tapahtumien välisen monisanaisen kontekstin syntaktinen rakenne ja kompositiiviset merkitykset ovat tärkeitä hienorakeisten aikasuhteiden erottamiseksi toisistaan. Tarkemmin sanottuna lähestymistapamme poimii ensin kontekstisanat, jotka osoittavat kahden tapahtuman välisen ajallisen suhteen, jotka ovat hyvin linjassa kahden tapahtumamaininnan välisen riippuvuusreitin kanssa. Kontekstisanasekvenssi sekä sanasekvenssiä vastaava puheen tunnistesekvenssi ja riippuvuussuhteen sekvenssi annetaan syötteenä kaksisuuntaisiin toistuviin hermoverkkomalleihin (LSTM). Neuroverkot oppivat kompositiivisia syntaktisia ja semanttisia esityksiä tapahtumia ympäröivistä konteksteista ja ennustavat niiden välistä ajallista suhdetta. TimeBank-korpuseen ehdotetun lähestymistavan arviointi osoittaa, että sekvenssimallinnus kykenee tunnistamaan tapahtumien väliset ajalliset suhteet tarkasti, mikä päihittää hermoverkkomallin käyttämällä erilaisia erillisiä ominaisuuksia syötteenä, joka jäljittelee aiempia ominaisuuspohjaisia malleja.', 'az': 'Biz cümlələr arasındakı müddətli ilişkil klasifikasyonu seçən bir modeli göstəririk. Anahtar gözləməsi olaraq, çoxlu söz məlumatının bütün sintaktik yapısı və müxtəlif məlumatı olaraq müxtəlif müxtəlif əlaqələr arasında ayırmaq üçün vacibdir. Bizim tərəfimiz ilk dəfə iki olaraq arasındakı müddət bağlantısını göstərən məlumat sözlərinin sıralamasını çəkir, bu iki olaraq yada salmaq arasındakı bağlılıq yolunu yaxşı tərəfləndirir. Sözlük sıralaması, sözlərin parçaları ilə birlikdə, sözlərin sıralaması ilə və sözlərin sıralamasına uyğun bağlılıq sıralaması ilə birlikdə, sonra ikidiktiraqlı tekrarlanan nöral a ğ (LSTM) modellərinə giriş olaraq təyin edilir. Nöral ağları ikisinin ətrafındakı müxtəlif sintaktik və semantik göstərişlərini öyrənir və onların arasındakı müddətli ilişkisini təmin edirlər. TimeBank korpusu üçün təklif edilmiş tərzlərinin değerlendirməsi göstərir ki, sonraki modellərin əvvəlki tərzlərin təhrif edilmiş modellərin imzaladığı kimi nöral a ğ modeli ilə müxtəlif tərzlərini istifadə edən nöral ağ modeli ilə müxtəlif tərzlərini təhrif edir.', 'jv': 'Monday Wurung punika dipunangé punika dipunangé sampek winih lan kelangan kelangan sampek butawak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerarané sampek tarjamahan kanggo nggawe gerarané sampek tarjamahan. user context string Network Tarjamahan kang dipolehasan sing dibutuhke nggo timeBank coro kuwi sawetara dadi model sing berarti iso nguasai perkaraan akeh dumadhi winih sing dibutuhke tarjamahan ning eventah, sing wis nambah model de neto sing isin petani sing dibutuhke iso nguasai model sing bisa pasar awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל רצופי להסדר יחסים זמניים בין אירועים בתוך משפט. הבחנה המרכזית היא שהמבנה הסינטקטי הכללי והמשמעות המרכיבית של הקשר של מילים רבות בין אירועים חשובים להבדיל בין יחסים זמניים מעולים. במיוחד, הגישה שלנו קודם חולץ רצף של מילים קונטקסט שמצביע על היחסים הזמניים בין שני אירועים, אשר מתאימים היטב למסלול התלויה בין שני זיכרונות אירועים. הרצף המילים הקונקסט, יחד עם הרצף החלקים של תווית הנאום ורצף יחסי תלויות שנוצרים מתאימים לרצף המילים, נותן כתוצאה למודלים לרשת העצבית המחזרה בשני כיוונים (LSTM). הרשתות העצביות לומדות מייצגים סינטקטיים וסמנטיים של הקשר שמסביב את שני האירועים ולחזות את היחסים הזמניים ביניהם. הערכה של הגישה המוצעת על "טיימבנק קורפוס" מראה שדוגמניות רצופיות מסוגלות לזהות בדיוק יחסים זמניים בין אירועים, אשר מפעיל דוגמנית רשת עצבית בשימוש תכונות דיסקרטיות שונות כתוצאה שמחזיקת דוגמנים מבוססים על תכונות קודמות.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo zaporedni model za klasifikacijo časovnih relacij med dogodki znotraj stavka. Ključna ugotovitev je, da sta splošna sintaktična struktura in kompozicijski pomeni večbesednega konteksta med dogodki pomembni za razlikovanje med drobnozrnatimi časovnimi odnosi. Natančneje, naš pristop najprej izvleče zaporedje kontekstnih besed, ki označuje časovno razmerje med dvema dogodkoma, ki se dobro uskladita s potjo odvisnosti med dvema omenjenima dogodkoma. Zaporedje besed v kontekstu, skupaj z zaporedjem delov govornih oznak in zaporedjem odvisnosti, ki ustvarjajo v skladu z zaporedjem besed, se nato zagotovi kot vhod v modele dvosmernega ponavljajočega se nevronskega omrežja (LSTM). Nevronske mreže učijo kompozicijske sintaktične in semantične reprezentacije kontekstov, ki obdajajo oba dogodka, in napovedujejo časovno razmerje med njima. Ocena predlaganega pristopa na korpusu TimeBank kaže, da je zaporedno modeliranje sposobno natančno prepoznati časovne odnose med dogodki, kar presega model nevronske mreže z uporabo različnih diskretnih funkcij kot vhod, ki posnema prejšnje funkcijske modele.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani misalin mai fassarawa ga mutane a tsakanin da takardan-cire. Tsarin maɓalli ne cẽwa jumla na haɗatiki da ma'anar compositi na muhimmin muhimmin da za'a rarraba tsakanin haɗi na masu fassarar-faɗi. Aka ƙayyade, hanyarmu na farkon ta fizge wani sauri na mazaɓa, wanda ke nuna muhimmin haɗi tsakanin abu biyu, da abin da ke daidaita da hanyar da ke tsakanin abu biyu. @ label: listbox Intanet na neural sun sanar da composition syntactic and semantic wakilishions of the context around the inci biyu and anaƙayyade your temporary link between them. Ana ƙayyade hanyarwa da aka buƙata a kan nau'in TimeBank na nuna cewa shirin ayuka na daban yana iya iya iya iya gane wa tsari masu lokaci a tsakanin ayuka, wanda ya nuna wata motel na jerin da ke amfani da wasu masu buƙata masu buƙata kamar shirin da ke tsohatar da zaman shawarar.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་ནང་འཁོད་བྱ་ཚིག་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་གཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། མཐོ་ཆོག་གི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་དང་ཐོག་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པས། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་དང་པོ་དེ་ནི་འགྱུར་བ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ལས་དབང་གི་ཁྱད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་གོ་རིམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ། The context word sequence, together with a parts-of-speech tag sequence and a dependency relation sequence that are generated corresponding to the word sequence, are then provided as input to bidirectional recurrent neural network (LSTM) models. སྒེར་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དུ་ཚོའི་མཉམ་སྦྱོར་དབྱེ་བ་དང་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གནས་ཚུལ་གཉིས་མཐའ་ནས་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ར Evaluation of the proposed approach on TimeBank corpus shows that sequential modeling is capable of accurately recognizing temporal relations between events, which outperforms a neural net model using various discrete features as input that imitates previous feature based models.'}
{'en': 'Deep Residual Learning for Weakly-Supervised Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'التعلم العميق المتبقي لاستخراج العلاقة الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف', 'fr': "Apprentissage résiduel profond pour l'extraction de relations faiblement supervis", 'pt': 'Aprendizado residual profundo para extração de relação fracamente supervisionada', 'es': 'Aprendizaje residual profundo para la extracción de relaciones débilmente supervisada', 'ru': 'Глубокое остаточное обучение для слабо контролируемого извлечения отношений', 'ja': '弱く監督された関係抽出のための深い残留学習', 'zh': '以弱监取深残差学', 'hi': 'कमजोर-पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए गहरी अवशिष्ट सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Iarmhar Dhomhain le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh faoi Mhaoirseacht Lag', 'el': 'Βαθιά Υπολείπουσα Μάθηση για την αδύναμη Εποπτευμένη Εξόρυξη Σχέσεων', 'hu': 'Mély maradéktalan tanulás a gyengén felügyelt kapcsolatok kivonásához', 'it': "Deep Residual Learning per l'estrazione di relazioni debolmente supervisionate", 'lt': 'Išsamus liekanų mokymasis silpnai prižiūrimų santykių ekstrahavimui', 'mk': 'Длабоко преостанато учење за екстракција на слабо надгледувани односи', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Tersisa Dalam untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan Terjaga-lemah', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലെ വീണ്ടും പഠിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Residwu Profond għal Estrazzjoni ta’ Relazzjoni b’Superviżjoni Dgħufa', 'ka': 'ძალიან განტოლებული სწავლება ძალიან დამუშავებელი შესახებ', 'no': 'Deep residual læring for veksleg utpakking av relasjonar', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай гүн үлдсэн суралцах', 'pl': 'Głębokie uczenie się pozostałości dla słabo nadzorowanej ekstrakcji relacji', 'kk': 'Қате бақылау қатынасын шығару үшін қалдық оқыту', 'ro': 'Învățare reziduală profundă pentru extragerea relațiilor slab supravegheate', 'so': 'Waxbarashada deegaan ee deganaanshaha la xiriira', 'sv': 'Deep Residual Learning för svagt övervakad relationsextraktion', 'ta': 'வெளியேற்றத்திற்கான ஆழமான தீர்வுகற்றல்', 'sr': 'Duboko preostalno učenje za izvlačenje odnosa s slabim nadzorom', 'si': 'Weather- supervised සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ නික්\u200dරමණ සඳහා ගොඩක් රිසිදුල් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ur': 'ضعیف نظارت والی رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے عمیق رہنے والی تعلیم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học về sâu lượng cho mối tương quan giám sát tận', 'bg': 'Дълбоко остатъчно обучение за извличане на слабо контролирана връзка', 'da': 'Deep Residual Learning for svagt overvåget relationsudvinding', 'nl': 'Deep Residual Learning voor het extraheren van relaties onder zwak toezicht', 'hr': 'Duboko preostalno učenje za izvlačenje odnosa s slabom nadzorom', 'id': 'Deep Residual Learning for Weakly-Supervised Relation Extraction', 'ko': '깊이 있는 잉여 학습에 기초한 약한 감독 관계 추출', 'de': 'Deep Residual Learning für schwach überwachte Beziehungsextraktion', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler Görniş Opşenler Görniş Opşenler üçin Gadyr Derjesi Öwrenme', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa kina kwa ajili ya kuondolewa kwa Wizara', 'sq': 'Mësimi i thellë i mbetjeve për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura me dobësi', 'af': 'Deep Residual Learning for Weakly- Supervised Relation Extraction', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Խնդաղ մնացած սովորելը թույլ-վերահսկված հարաբերությունների արտահանման համար', 'bn': 'উইক্ত- সাপারভিস্ট সম্পর্ক বিক্রেতার জন্য গভীর রিসিডিয়াল শিক্ষা', 'az': 'Qısqa-gözləyirli İlişkilər Açırması üçün Deep Residual Learning for Weakly-Supervised Relations Extraction', 'bs': 'Duboko preostalno učenje za izvlačenje odnosa s slabim nadzorom', 'fa': 'یادگیری عمیق باقی مانده برای اخراج ارتباطات ضعیف', 'ca': "Aprendiment residual profund per a l'extracció de relacions debidament supervisades", 'et': 'Sügav jääkõpe nõrgalt järelevalvestatud suhete ekstraheerimiseks', 'fi': 'Syvä jäännösoppiminen heikosti valvottuun suhteeseen', 'cs': 'Hluboké zbytkové učení pro extrakci vztahů se slabým dohledem', 'jv': 'deep', 'sk': 'Globoko učenje ostankov za slabo nadzorovano ekstrakcijo odnosov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'למידה עמוקה של שאריות להוציא מערכת יחסים עם שליטה חלשה', 'bo': 'ཁྱད་དུ་འཕགས་པ་(Deep Residual Learning for Weakly-Supervised Relation Extraction)'}
{'en': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) is a new method for training very deep neural networks using identity mapping for shortcut connections. ResNet has won the ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 classification task, and achieved state-of-the-art performances in many computer vision tasks. However, the effect of residual learning on noisy natural language processing tasks is still not well understood. In this paper, we design a novel convolutional neural network (CNN) with residual learning, and investigate its impacts on the task of distantly supervised noisy relation extraction. In contradictory to popular beliefs that ResNet only works well for very deep networks, we found that even with 9 layers of CNNs, using identity mapping could significantly improve the performance for distantly-supervised relation extraction.', 'pt': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) é um novo método para treinar redes neurais muito profundas usando mapeamento de identidade para conexões de atalho. A ResNet ganhou a tarefa de classificação ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 e alcançou desempenhos de última geração em muitas tarefas de visão computacional. No entanto, o efeito do aprendizado residual em tarefas ruidosas de processamento de linguagem natural ainda não é bem compreendido. Neste artigo, projetamos uma nova rede neural convolucional (CNN) com aprendizado residual e investigamos seus impactos na tarefa de extração de relação ruidosa supervisionada à distância. Ao contrário das crenças populares de que o ResNet só funciona bem para redes muito profundas, descobrimos que, mesmo com 9 camadas de CNNs, o uso de mapeamento de identidade pode melhorar significativamente o desempenho da extração de relação supervisionada à distância.', 'ar': 'التعلم المتبقي العميق (ResNet) هو طريقة جديدة لتدريب الشبكات العصبية العميقة جدًا باستخدام تعيين الهوية لاتصالات الاختصار. فازت ResNet بمهمة تصنيف ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 ، وحققت أداءً متطورًا في العديد من مهام رؤية الكمبيوتر. ومع ذلك ، فإن تأثير التعلم المتبقي على مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية الصاخبة لا يزال غير مفهوم جيدًا. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بتصميم شبكة عصبية تلافيفية جديدة (CNN) مع التعلم المتبقي ، والتحقيق في تأثيرها على مهمة استخراج العلاقة الصاخبة تحت الإشراف عن بعد. في تناقض مع المعتقدات الشائعة بأن ResNet تعمل بشكل جيد فقط للشبكات العميقة جدًا ، وجدنا أنه حتى مع 9 طبقات من شبكات CNN ، فإن استخدام تعيين الهوية يمكن أن يحسن بشكل كبير الأداء لاستخراج العلاقة الخاضع للإشراف عن بعد.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje residual profundo (ResNet) es un nuevo método para entrenar redes neuronales muy profundas mediante el mapeo de identidad para conexiones de acceso directo. ResNet ha ganado la tarea de clasificación de ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 y ha logrado un rendimiento de vanguardia en muchas tareas de visión artificial. Sin embargo, aún no se comprende bien el efecto del aprendizaje residual en las tareas ruidosas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, diseñamos una novedosa red neuronal convolucional (CNN) con aprendizaje residual e investigamos sus impactos en la tarea de extracción de relaciones ruidosas supervisadas a distancia. En contradicción con la creencia popular de que ResNet solo funciona bien para redes muy profundas, descubrimos que incluso con 9 capas de CNN, el uso del mapeo de identidad podría mejorar significativamente el rendimiento para la extracción de relaciones supervisada a distancia.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage résiduel profond (ResNet) est une nouvelle méthode d'entraînement de réseaux neuronaux très profonds à l'aide de la cartographie d'identité pour les connexions de raccourcis. ResNet a remporté la tâche de classification ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 et a obtenu des performances de pointe dans de nombreuses tâches de vision par ordinateur. Cependant, l'effet de l'apprentissage résiduel sur les tâches de traitement du langage naturel bruyantes n'est toujours pas bien compris. Dans cet article, nous concevons un nouveau réseau de neurones convolutifs (CNN) avec apprentissage résiduel, et étudions ses impacts sur la tâche d'extraction de relations bruyantes supervisée à distance. Contrairement à la croyance populaire selon laquelle ResNet ne fonctionne bien que pour les réseaux très profonds, nous avons constaté que même avec 9 couches de CNN, l'utilisation de la cartographie d'identité pouvait considérablement améliorer les performances pour l'extraction de relations supervisée à distance.", 'ja': 'Deep residual learning （ ResNet ）は、ショートカット接続のためのアイデンティティマッピングを使用して非常に深いニューラルネットワークをトレーニングするための新しい方法です。ResNetはImageNet ILSVRC 2015分類タスクを受賞し、多くのコンピュータビジョンタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを実現しました。しかし、騒々しい自然言語処理課題に対する残留学習の効果はまだよく理解されていない。本稿では，残留学習を伴う新規の畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）を設計し，遠隔監視下の雑音関係抽出の課題に対する影響を検討する． ResNetは非常に深いネットワークでしか機能しないという一般的な信念とは対照的に、私たちは、9層のCNNであっても、アイデンティティマッピングを使用することで、遠隔監視された関係抽出のパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることができることを発見しました。', 'zh': '深残差学 (ResNet) 用身映射快捷方式接习深神经网络新法也。 ResNet 得 ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 类,而计算机视最先进者也。 然残差学嘈杂自然语言治事未甚解。 于本文之中,设残差学之新型卷积神经网络(CNN),究其远监噪声关其任使。 与人普遍认为ResNet深网络相反,虽用9CNN,映射显远。', 'ru': 'Глубокое остаточное обучение (ResNet) - это новый метод обучения очень глубоких нейронных сетей, использующий отображение идентичности для ярлычных соединений. ResNet выиграл классификационную задачу ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 и достиг самых современных результатов во многих задачах компьютерного зрения. Тем не менее, влияние остаточного обучения на шумные задачи обработки естественного языка все еще недостаточно хорошо понимается. В этой статье мы создаем новую сверточную нейронную сеть (CNN) с остаточным обучением и исследуем ее влияние на задачу дистанционно контролируемого извлечения шумных отношений. Вопреки распространенным представлениям о том, что ResNet хорошо работает только для очень глубоких сетей, мы обнаружили, что даже с 9 слоями CNN, использование отображения идентичности может значительно улучшить производительность для дистанционно контролируемого извлечения отношений.', 'hi': 'डीप अवशिष्ट शिक्षण (ResNet) शॉर्टकट कनेक्शन के लिए पहचान मानचित्रण का उपयोग करके बहुत गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक नई विधि है। ResNet ने ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 वर्गीकरण कार्य जीता है, और कई कंप्यूटर दृष्टि कार्यों में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त किया है। हालांकि, शोर प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों पर अवशिष्ट सीखने का प्रभाव अभी भी अच्छी तरह से समझा नहीं गया है। इस पेपर में, हम अवशिष्ट सीखने के साथ एक उपन्यास कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) डिजाइन करते हैं, और दूर से पर्यवेक्षित शोर संबंध निष्कर्षण के कार्य पर इसके प्रभावों की जांच करते हैं। लोकप्रिय मान्यताओं के विरोधाभासी में कि ResNet केवल बहुत गहरे नेटवर्क के लिए अच्छी तरह से काम करता है, हमने पाया कि CNN की 9 परतों के साथ भी, पहचान मानचित्रण का उपयोग करके दूर-पर्यवेक्षित संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार हो सकता है।', 'ga': 'Is modh nua í an fhoghlaim iarmharach dhomhain (ResNet) chun líonraí néaracha an-domhain a thraenáil trí úsáid a bhaint as mapáil aitheantais le haghaidh naisc aicearra. Tá tasc aicmithe ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 buaite ag ResNet, agus tá feidhmíocht den scoth bainte amach aige i go leor tascanna fís ríomhaireachta. Mar sin féin, ní thuigtear go maith fós éifeacht na foghlama iarmharaí ar thascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha torannacha. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid dearadh ar líonra néarúil comhraonta (CNN) úrnua le foghlaim iarmharach, agus déanaimid imscrúdú ar a thionchair ar an tasc a bhaineann le heastóscadh an chaidrimh fhuaimnigh faoi mhaoirseacht i bhfad i gcéin. Murab ionann agus tuairimí coitianta nach n-oibríonn ResNet ach go maith do líonraí an-domhain, fuaireamar amach, fiú le 9 sraith de CNNs, go bhféadfadh úsáid a bhaint as mapáil aitheantais feabhas suntasach a chur ar fheidhmíocht eastóscadh caidreamh faoi mhaoirseacht i bhfad i gcéin.', 'hu': 'A mély reziduális tanulás (ResNet) egy új módszer a nagyon mély neurális hálózatok kiképzésére, amely azonosító leképezést használ a rövid kapcsolatokhoz. A ResNet elnyerte az ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 osztályozási feladatot, és számos számítógépes látási feladat során a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ért el. Azonban a maradéktalan tanulás hatása a zajos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokra még mindig nem ismert. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új konvuluációs neurális hálózatot (CNN) tervezünk maradványos tanulással, és vizsgáljuk annak hatását a távolról felügyelt zajviszony extrakció feladatára. Ellentétben a népszerű meggyőződéssel, miszerint a ResNet csak nagyon mély hálózatokban működik jól, megállapítottuk, hogy még 9 rétegű CNN-ek esetében is az identitás leképezése jelentősen javíthatja a távolról felügyelt kapcsolatok kivonásának teljesítményét.', 'el': 'Η βαθιά υπολειμματική μάθηση (ResNet) είναι μια νέα μέθοδος για την εκπαίδευση πολύ βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων χρησιμοποιώντας χαρτογράφηση ταυτότητας για σύντομες συνδέσεις. Το ResNet έχει κερδίσει την εργασία ταξινόμησης και έχει επιτύχει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε πολλές εργασίες όρασης υπολογιστών. Ωστόσο, η επίδραση της υπολειπόμενης μάθησης στις θορυβώδεις εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας εξακολουθεί να μην είναι καλά κατανοητή. Στην παρούσα εργασία, σχεδιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο (ΚΝΝ) με υπολειμματική μάθηση, και διερευνούμε τις επιπτώσεις του στο έργο της εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενης εξαγωγής θορυβωδών σχέσεων. Σε αντίθεση με τις λαϊκές πεποιθήσεις ότι το ResNet λειτουργεί καλά μόνο για πολύ βαθιά δίκτυα, διαπιστώσαμε ότι ακόμη και με εννέα στρώματα CNN, η χρήση χαρτογράφησης ταυτότητας θα μπορούσε να βελτιώσει σημαντικά την απόδοση για την εξ αποστάσεως εποπτευόμενη εξαγωγή σχέσεων.', 'it': "Deep residual learning (ResNet) è un nuovo metodo per formare reti neurali molto profonde utilizzando la mappatura dell'identità per connessioni rapide. ResNet ha vinto il compito di classificazione ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 e ha ottenuto prestazioni all'avanguardia in molte attività di computer vision. Tuttavia, l'effetto dell'apprendimento residuo sui rumorosi compiti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale non è ancora ben compreso. In questo articolo, progettiamo una nuova rete neurale convoluzionale (CNN) con apprendimento residuo, e analizziamo i suoi impatti sul compito di estrazione delle relazioni rumorose supervisionate a distanza. In contraddizione con le credenze popolari secondo cui ResNet funziona bene solo per reti molto profonde, abbiamo scoperto che anche con 9 strati di CNN, l'utilizzo di identity mapping potrebbe migliorare significativamente le prestazioni per l'estrazione di relazioni supervisionate a distanza.", 'lt': 'Išsamus likutinis mokymasis (ResNet) yra naujas labai gilių nervų tinklų mokymo metodas, naudojantis tapatybės žemėlapiu trumpalaikių jungčių atžvilgiu. ResNet has won the ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 classification task, and achieved state-of-the-art performances in many computer vision tasks.  Tačiau likutinio mokymosi poveikis triukšmingoms natūralios kalbos apdorojimo užduotims vis dar nėra gerai suprantamas. Šiame dokumente sukuriame naują konvoliucinį nervų tinklą (CNN) su likutiniu mokymusi ir tiriame jo poveikį toli prižiūrimoms triukšmo santykių gavybos užduotims. Prieštaraujant populiariems įsitikinimams, kad ResNet veikia tik labai giliems tinklams, mes nustatėme, kad net naudojant 9 CNN sluoksnius tapatybės žemėlapių naudojimas galėtų gerokai pagerinti nuotoliniu būdu prižiūrimos santykių gavybos rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran yang tersisa dalam (ResNet) adalah kaedah baru untuk melatih rangkaian saraf yang sangat dalam menggunakan peta identiti untuk sambungan pintasan. ResNet telah memenangkan tugas klasifikasi ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, dan mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dalam banyak tugas penglihatan komputer. Namun, kesan pembelajaran sisa pada tugas pemprosesan bahasa biasa yang bunyi masih belum dipahami dengan baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami merancang rangkaian saraf konvolusi (CNN) yang baru dengan pembelajaran sisa, dan menyelidiki kesannya pada tugas ekstraksi hubungan bunyi yang diawasi jauh. Dalam bertentangan dengan keyakinan populer bahawa ResNet hanya bekerja dengan baik untuk rangkaian yang sangat dalam, kami mendapati bahawa walaupun dengan 9 lapisan CNN, menggunakan peta identiti boleh meningkatkan prestasi untuk ekstraksi hubungan yang diawasi jauh.', 'mk': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) is a new method for training very deep neural networks using identity mapping for shortcut connections.  Ресенет ја освои задачата за класификација на ImageNet ИлСВРЦ 2015 и постигна најсовремени изведувања во многу задачи за компјутерска визија. Сепак, ефектот на остатокот на учењето на гласните природни задачи за обработување јазици сé уште не е добро разбран. Во овој весник дизајнираме нова конволуционална нервна мрежа (ЦНН) со остатокот на учење, и ги истражуваме нејзините влијанија на задачата на оддалечено надгледувана екстракција на звучни односи. Во спротивност на популарните верувања дека Реснет функционира добро само за многу длабоки мрежи, откривме дека дури и со 9 слоеви од ЦНН, користењето на мапирање на идентитетот би можело значително да ја подобри резултатот за екстракција на односи под далечен надзор.', 'ml': 'കുറുക്കുവഴി ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനം മാപ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ശേഷ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന (റെ റെസ്നെറ്റ് ഇമേജ്നെറ്റ് ഐല്\u200dഎസ്\u200cവിര്\u200dസി 2015 ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലി ജയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് കമ്പ്യൂട്ടറില്\u200d കാണാന്\u200d പ എന്നാലും ശബ്ദം സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d ബാക്കിയുള്ള പഠിപ്പിന്റെ പ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഡിസൈനര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. ശേഷ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം നമ് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിശ്വാസികള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമായി റെസ്നെറ്റ് വളരെ ആഴമുള്ള നെറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രമേ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ, നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim residwu profond (ResNet) huwa metodu ġdid għat-taħriġ ta’ netwerks newrali profondi ħafna bl-użu tal-immappjar tal-identità għal konnessjonijiet ta’ qtugħ. ResNet rebħet il-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, u kisbet prestazzjonijiet avvanzati f’ħafna kompiti ta’ viżjoni tal-kompjuter. Madankollu, l-effett tat-tagħlim residwu fuq kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali storbjużi għadu mhux mifhum sew. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niddisinjaw netwerk newtrali konvoluzzjonali (CNN) ġdid b’tagħlim residwu, u ninvestigaw l-impatti tiegħu fuq il-kompitu ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet storbjużi sorveljati mill-bogħod. In contradictory to popular beliefs that ResNet only works well for very deep networks, we found that even with 9 layers of CNNs, using identity mapping could significantly improve the performance for distantly-supervised relation extraction.', 'mn': 'Хамгийн гүн үлдсэн суралцах (ResNet) нь маш гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний суралцах шинэ арга юм. ResNet нь ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 оны классификацийн ажил хожигдсон ба компьютерийн үзэж буй олон ажил дээр улс төрлийн урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргасан. Гэвч үлдсэн суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үнэхээр сайн ойлгомжгүй байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (CNN) бүтээж үлдсэн суралцаж, хол даяарчлан удирдагдсан чимээгүй харилцааны нөлөөлөлийг судалж байна. ResNet зөвхөн үнэхээр гүн гүнзгий сүлжээнд ажилладаг гэж олон олон хүмүүсийн итгэлтэй эсрэгээр бид 9 давхар СНН-г ашиглаж байгааг мэдээллийн зураг ашиглах нь хол холбоотой харилцааны хамааралтай ажиллагааг илүү сайжруулж ча', 'no': 'Deep residual læring (ResNet) er ein ny metode for å læra veldig dyp neuralnettverk med identitetkarting for snarvegstilkoplingar. ResNet har vann ImageNet ILSVRC 2015-klassifikasjonsprogrammet, og oppnådd tilstanden av kunsten i mange datavisingsoppgåver. Dette er imidlertid effekten av læring på støy naturleg språk-handteringsoppgåver fortsatt ikkje godt forstått. I denne papiret designerer vi eit nytt konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (CNN) med restitusjonell læring, og undersøker effekten på oppgåva av distantt oversikt støyrelasjon. I motsetning til populære tror at ResNet berre fungerer bra for svært dyp nettverk, fann vi at sjølv med 9 lag av CNN, ved å bruka identitetmappinga, kunne forbetra utviklinga for ekstrahering av distantt oversikt relasjon.', 'pl': 'Deep Residual Learning (ResNet) to nowa metoda szkolenia bardzo głębokich sieci neuronowych wykorzystująca mapowanie tożsamości dla połączeń skrótowych. ResNet zdobył zadanie klasyfikacyjne ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 i osiągnął najnowocześniejsze osiągnięcia w wielu zadaniach związanych z wizją komputerową. Jednak wpływ nauki resztkowej na hałaśliwe zadania przetwarzania języka naturalnego nadal nie jest dobrze zrozumiany. W niniejszym artykule projektujemy nową sieć konwolucyjną (CNN) z pozostałościowym uczeniem się i zbadamy jej wpływ na zadanie odległie nadzorowanej ekstrakcji szumowych relacji. W sprzeczności z popularnymi przekonaniami, że ResNet działa dobrze tylko w bardzo głębokich sieciach, odkryliśmy, że nawet w przypadku dziewięciu warstw CNN, zastosowanie mapowania tożsamości może znacznie poprawić wydajność ekstrakcji relacji pod nadzorem oddalonym.', 'kk': 'Қалған қалқымалы үйрену (ResNet) деген жаңа әдіс - тіркесімдер қосылымдарының идентификациялық картасын қолданатын невралдық желілерді оқыту арқылы. ResNet ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 классификациялау тапсырмасын жетті, және компьютердің көптеген көрініс тапсырмаларындағы күй- жайымды орындалды. Бірақ қалдық оқыту үшін табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларына әлі дұрыс түсінбейді. Бұл қағазда, біз қалдық оқыту арқылы романдық невралдық желі (CNN) құрылып, олардың қашықтығын қашықтық қатынастың көмегімен қашықтығын зерттеп тұрамыз. ResNet тек толық қалыпты желілер үшін жақсы жұмыс істейді деп қарсы, біз 9 қабатты CNN қабаттары қолдану үшін идентификациялық картасын қолдану үшін көп қалыпты қатынасын өзгертуге болады.', 'ro': 'Învățarea reziduală profundă (ResNet) este o nouă metodă de instruire a rețelelor neuronale foarte profunde folosind cartografierea identității pentru conexiunile rapide. ResNet a câștigat sarcina de clasificare ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 și a obținut performanțe de ultimă oră în multe sarcini de viziune computerizată. Cu toate acestea, efectul învățării reziduale asupra sarcinilor zgomotoase de procesare a limbajului natural nu este încă bine înțeles. În această lucrare, proiectăm o nouă rețea neuronală convoluțională (CNN) cu învățare reziduală și investigăm impactul acesteia asupra sarcinii extracției relațiilor zgomotoase supravegheate la distanță. În contradicție cu convingerile populare că ResNet funcționează bine doar pentru rețele foarte profunde, am constatat că, chiar și cu 9 straturi de CNN, utilizarea identității mapării ar putea îmbunătăți semnificativ performanța pentru extragerea relațiilor supravegheate la distanță.', 'sr': 'Duboko preostalo učenje (ResNet) je novi metod za obuku veoma dubokih neuralnih mreža koristeći kartanje identiteta za prečice veze. ResNet je osvojio posao sa klasifikacijom ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, i postigao izvedbe stanja umjetnosti u mnogim zadacima kompjuterskog vizije. Međutim, učinak ostatka učenja na buku prirodno obrađivanje zadataka još uvijek nije dobro razumeo. U ovom papiru, mi dizajniramo novu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (CNN) sa ostatkom učenja, i istražujemo njegov uticaj na zadatak izvlačenja distantno nadziranog zvuka. U suprotnosti popularnim verovanjima da ResNet radi samo dobro za veoma duboke mreže, otkrili smo da čak i sa 9 slojeva CNN-a, koristeći mapiranje identiteta, može značajno poboljšati učinkovitost izvlačenja odnosa s dalekim nadzorom.', 'ka': 'ძალიან ძალიან დასწავლებელი სწავლება (ResNet) არის ახალი მეტი, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელების განმავლობაში იდენტიფიკაციის მარტივის Name მაგრამ, ჩემი ძალიან ძალიან უფრო ცოტა სიტყვალის პროცესი დავალების ეფექტი არ უცოტა. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ პრომენტის კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) დავყენებთ, რომელიც დარჩენა დასწავლებელი სწავლებით, და შევხედავთ მისი ექსელების შესახებ ძალიან დანარჩენა პოლიპური წარმოდგენებისგან, რომ ResNet მხოლოდ მხოლოდ ძალიან დიდი ქსელებისთვის მუშაობს, ჩვენ ვიღებთ, რომ კონტაქტის 9 ნაგეზებით კონტაქტისთვის გამოყენება იდენტიფიკაციის კაპრაფიკაციის გამ', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ඉතුරු ඉගෙනීම (ResNet) අලුත් විධානයක් තමයි ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා අඳ ResNet has won the PictureNet ILSVRC 2015 classification job, and accompanied state-of-the-art Perfections in a lot of computer Vision Jobs. නමුත්, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය වැඩේ ඉතුරු ඉගෙනීමේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තාමත් හොඳට තේරෙන්නේ  මේ පත්තරේ අපි නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ නිවැරදි න්\u200dයුරෝල ජාලය (CNN) එකක්, ඉතුරු ඉගෙන ගන්න, ඒ වගේම එයාගේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ දුරට ResNet ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ජාල ජාල විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා අපිට හොයාගත්තා කියලා, CNNs ලේජ 9 වලින් තියෙනවා කියලා, අනතුරු සැකසුම් භාවිතා කරන්', 'so': 'Waxbarashada deegaanka (ResNet) waa qaab cusub oo lagu baranayo shabakada neurada ee aad u dheer, oo lagu isticmaalayo sawirka aqoonsiga ee xiriirka gaaban. ResNet wuxuu ku guulaystay Shaqada fasalka ee ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, wuxuuna gaadhay shaqooyin badan oo muuqashada kambiyuutarka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee saameynta waxbarashada joogtada ah oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka baaraandegista afka dabiicadda ah weli lama fahmin karo. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa shabakadda neurada oo dhan (CNN) oo ku qoran waxbarashada joogtada ah, waxaana baaritaan saamaynta ku saabsan shaqada laga ilaaliyo daryeelka qaylada. Inta ka duwan ka duwan iimaanka dadka maamulka ah ee ResNet wuxuu si wanaagsan ugu shaqeeyaa shabakado aad u dheer, waxaynu ogaannay in xataa 9 xabbadood oo CNNNs ku jira, isticmaalka kartooyinka aqoonsiga ayaa si weyn u hagaajin kara sameynta ka soo bixinta xiriirka.', 'sv': 'Deep residue learning (ResNet) är en ny metod för att träna mycket djupa neurala nätverk med hjälp av identitetskarvning för genvägar. ResNet har vunnit ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 klassificeringsuppgiften och uppnått toppmoderna prestanda i många datorseende uppgifter. Effekten av kvarvarande inlärning på bullriga naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter är dock fortfarande inte väl förstådd. I den här uppsatsen utformar vi ett nytt konvulutionellt neuralt nätverk (CNN) med kvarvarande inlärning, och undersöker dess påverkan på uppgiften med fjärrövervakad bullerskelationsextraktion. I motsats till den allmänna uppfattningen att ResNet bara fungerar bra för mycket djupa nätverk fann vi att även med 9 lager CNN skulle användningen av identitetskarvning avsevärt förbättra prestandan för fjärrövervakad relationsextraktion.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான மீதமான கற்றல் (ResNet) சுருக்குவழி இணைப்புகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தி மிகவும் ஆழமான புதிய புதிய முறைமையாகும். ResNet has won the ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 classification task, and achieved the state- of-the- art performances in many computer vision tasks. ஆனால், ஆச்சரியமான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் பணிகள் மீது மீது கற்றல் விளைவு இன்னும் நன்றாக புரிந்து கொள் In this paper, we design a novel convolutional neural network (CNN) with residual learning, and investigate its impacts on the task of distantly supervised noisy relation extraction.  மிகவும் ஆழ்ந்த வலைப்பின்னல்களுக்கு மட்டும் செயல்படுகிறது என்று பொதுவான நம்பிக்கைகளுக்கு மாறுபட்டு, சிஎன்னிகளின் 9 அடுக்குகள் கூட, அடையாளம் வரைபடம் பயன்படுத', 'ur': 'عمیق باقی رہنے والی تعلیم (رسنیٹ) بہت عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ ہے، جسے چارٹ اتصال کے لئے identity mapping کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں. ریس نیٹ نے ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 کلاسپیٹ کا کام جیتا ہے، اور بہت سی کمپیوٹر نظر کے کاموں میں موجود state-of-the-art performances حاصل کی ہے. لیکن باقی رہنے کی تعلیم آواز طبیعی زبان پردازی کے کاموں پر اثر ابھی خوب سمجھ نہیں جاتی۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک نئی نئورل نیورل نیٹ ورک (سین ان) کو باقی رہنے والی تعلیم کے ساتھ طراحی کر رکھا ہے، اور اس کے اثرات کو دور کی نظارت کی صوت رابطہ اٹھانے کے کام پر تحقیق کر لیا ہے. ملی ایمانوں کے مقابلہ میں کہ رسنٹ صرف بہت عمیق نیٹورک کے لئے بہتر کام کرتا ہے، ہم نے دیکھا کہ اگرچہ ۹ لائج سی نیٹ نیٹ نیٹ کے ساتھ، شناساتی نقشه استعمال کرتا ہے، دور کی نظارت کی نسبت اضافہ کے لئے عملکرد بہتر کر سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Comment Lekin, tabiiy tilni boshqarish vazifalari bilan o'rganish natijasi faqat yaxshi tushunmaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz daqiqa o'rganish bilan bir novel neyron tarmoq (CNN) yaratumiz, va bu narsalarni uzoqlash vazifasini o'rganamiz. Mualliflik fikrlariga ResNet faqat juda eng uzun tarmoqlar uchun yaxshi ishlaydi, biz CNNS'ning 9 qatlamlari bilan shaxsiyatlarni ishlatish mumkin, shaxsiyatlarni ishlatishni tasdiqlashdan ham juda muhim oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Học sâu còn lại (ResNet) là một phương pháp mới để huấn luyện các mạng thần kinh rất sâu sử dụng bản đồ danh tính cho các kết nối đường tắt. ResNet đã thắng được công việc phân loại ImagePlugin ILSVC 2005 và đạt được trình độ tối tân trong nhiều công việc hình ảnh trên máy tính. Tuy nhiên, ảnh hưởng của việc học hành dư thừa lên các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên ồn ào vẫn chưa được hiểu rõ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thiết kế một mạng lưới thần kinh rối mới (CNN) với việc học hành còn lại, và nghiên cứu tác động của nó vào nhiệm vụ khai thác liên quan ồn ào được giám sát xa. Trong sự mâu thuẫn với tín ngưỡng phổ biến rằng ResNet chỉ hoạt động tốt cho các mạng lưới cực sâu, chúng tôi phát hiện ra rằng dù có 9 tầng nằm trong CNN, sử dụng bản đồ danh tính có thể tăng hiệu suất cho việc khai thác mối quan hệ giám sát xa.', 'da': "Deep residue learning (ResNet) er en ny metode til træning af meget dybe neurale netværk ved hjælp af identitetskortering til genvejsforbindelser. ResNet har vundet ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 klassificeringsopgaven og opnået state-of-the-art præstationer i mange computervisionsopgaver. Virkningen af resterende læring på støjende natursprogbehandlingsopgaver er imidlertid stadig ikke godt forstået. I denne artikel designer vi et nyt konvulutivt neuralt netværk (CNN) med restlæring, og undersøger dets indvirkning på opgaven med fjernt overvåget støjerelation ekstraktion. I modsætning til populære overbevisninger om, at ResNet kun fungerer godt til meget dybe netværk, fandt vi ud af, at selv med 9 lag CNN'er kunne brug af identitetskortering betydeligt forbedre ydeevnen for fjernovervåget relationsudvinding.", 'hr': 'Duboko preostalo učenje (ResNet) je novi metod za obuku jako dubokih neuronskih mreža koristeći kartanje identiteta za prečice veze. ResNet je osvojio zadatak klasifikacije ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, i postigao izvedbe stanja umjetnosti u mnogim zadacima računalnog vizije. Međutim, učinak ostatka učenja na bučne prirodne obaveze obrađivanja jezika još uvijek nije dobro shvaćen. U ovom papiru, dizajniramo novu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (CNN) s ostatkom učenja i istražujemo njegov utjecaj na zadatak izvlačenja distantno nadziranog zvuka. U suprotnosti popularnim uvjerenjima da ResNet radi samo dobro za veoma duboke mreže, otkrili smo da čak i sa 9 slojeva CNN-a koristeći kartanje identiteta može značajno poboljšati učinkovitost izvlačenja odnosa s dalekim nadzorom.', 'bg': 'Дълбокото остатъчно обучение (ResNet) е нов метод за обучение на много дълбоки невронни мрежи, използвайки идентичност картографиране за преки връзки. РезНет спечели класификационната задача и постигна най-съвременни изпълнения в много задачи за компютърно зрение. Въпреки това ефектът от остатъчното учене върху шумните задачи по обработка на естествения език все още не е добре разбран. В тази статия ние проектираме нова конволюционна невронна мрежа (НСН) с остатъчно учене и изследваме нейното въздействие върху задачата за дистанционно контролирано извличане на шумни взаимоотношения. В противоречие с популярните убеждения, че работи добре само за много дълбоки мрежи, установихме, че дори и с 9 слоя CNN, използването на идентичност картографиране може значително да подобри производителността при извличане на взаимоотношения под дистанционно наблюдение.', 'nl': "Deep residual learning (ResNet) is een nieuwe methode voor het trainen van zeer diepe neurale netwerken met behulp van identity mapping voor snelkoppelingen. ResNet heeft de ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 classificatietaak gewonnen en heeft state-of-the-art prestaties behaald in veel computer vision taken. Het effect van restleren op lawaaierige natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken is echter nog niet goed begrepen. In dit artikel ontwerpen we een nieuw convolutional neural network (CNN) met residual learning, en onderzoeken we de impact ervan op de taak van distant supervised noisy relation extraction. In tegenstelling tot de populaire overtuiging dat ResNet alleen goed werkt voor zeer diepe netwerken, vonden we dat zelfs met negen lagen CNN's, het gebruik van identity mapping de prestaties voor afstandelijk begeleide relatieontwikkeling aanzienlijk kon verbeteren.", 'id': 'Pelajaran residual dalam (ResNet) adalah metode baru untuk melatih jaringan saraf yang sangat dalam menggunakan peta identitas untuk koneksi pintas. ResNet telah memenangkan tugas klasifikasi ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam banyak tugas penglihatan komputer. Namun, efek belajar sisa pada tugas pengprosesan bahasa alam yang berisik masih belum dipahami dengan baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami merancang jaringan neural konvolusi (CNN) yang baru dengan belajar sisa, dan menyelidiki dampaknya pada tugas ekstraksi hubungan bising yang diawasi jauh. Berbeda dengan keyakinan populer bahwa ResNet hanya bekerja dengan baik untuk jaringan yang sangat dalam, kami menemukan bahwa bahkan dengan 9 lapisan CNN, menggunakan peta identitas bisa meningkatkan prestasi untuk ekstraksi hubungan yang diawasi jauh.', 'ko': '딥 잉여 학습(ResNet)은 신분 매핑을 이용하여 초심도 신경 네트워크를 훈련시키는 새로운 방법이다.ResNet은 ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 분류 작업을 획득했고 많은 컴퓨터 시각 작업 중에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다.그러나 잉여 학습이 소음이 있는 자연 언어 처리 임무에 미치는 영향은 아직 명확하지 않다.본고는 새로운 잔차 학습권적신경망(CNN)을 설계하고 원거리 감시 소음 관계 추출 임무에 대한 영향을 연구했다.ResNet이 매우 깊은 네트워크에만 적용된다는 일반적인 견해와는 반대로 9층 CNN이 있어도 신분 매핑을 사용하면 원격 감독 관계 추출의 성능을 현저히 높일 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa kina (ResNet) ni njia mpya ya kufundisha mitandao ya kijamii yenye kina ndani kwa kutumia ramani ya utambulisho kwa ajili ya viungo vifupi. ResNet imeshinda kazi ya kutangaza mtandao wa ILSVRC 2015, na imefanikiwa matukio ya sanaa katika kazi nyingi za maono ya kompyuta. Hata hivyo, madhara ya kujifunza kwa sauti kuhusu kazi za uchunguzi wa lugha asili bado haielewi vizuri. Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza mtandao wa kitabu cha kikatili wa neura (CNN) wenye elimu ya kudumu, na kuchunguza athari zake juu ya kazi ya utoaji wa kelele za sauti. Tofauti na imani maarufu kwamba ResNet inafanya kazi vizuri kwa mitandao ya ndani sana, tuligundua kuwa hata kwa vipande 9 vya CNNN, kwa kutumia ramani ya utambulisho kunaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa utoaji wa mahusiano yanayofuatiliwa sana.', 'fa': 'یادگیری عمیق (ResNet) یک روش جدید برای آموزش شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق با استفاده از نقشه\u200cسازی هویت برای ارتباطات لنگریز است. ResNet به وظیفه\u200cی گرانشی ImageNet ILSVRC ۲۰۱۵ برنده شده و به اجرای وضعیت هنری در بسیاری از وظیفه\u200cهای دید کامپیوتر رسیده است. ولی تاثیر یادگیری باقی مانده بر کارهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی صوتی هنوز خوب متوجه نشده است. در این کاغذ، ما یک شبکه عصبی (CNN) رمانی را با یادگیری باقی مانده طراحی می\u200cکنیم، و اثراتش را بر روی کاری رابطه\u200cهای صوتی که دور و دور بررسی شده\u200cاند تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. در مقابل باور مردمی که ResNet فقط برای شبکه های عمیق کار می کند، یافتیم که حتی با ۹ طبقه از CNN، استفاده از نقشه\u200cهای هویت می\u200cتواند عملکرد برای اخراج رابطه\u200cهای دور و دور را بهتر کند.', 'af': "Deep oorblywende leer (ResNet) is 'n nuwe metode vir onderwerp van baie diep neuralnetwerke wat identiteit kaart vir kortpad verbindings gebruik word. ResNet het gewen die ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 klassifikasie taak, en die state-of-the-art uitvoerings in baie rekenaar gesigtige taak bereik. Maar die effek van oorblyfsel leer op geluid natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte is nog nie goed verstaan nie. In hierdie papier, ontwerp ons 'n roman konvolusionele neuralnetwerk (CNN) met oorblyfstelike leer, en ondersoek sy impakte op die taak van afgeleë ruitsverhouding van uittrekking. In teenstemming met populêre geloof dat ResNet slegs goed werk vir baie diep netwerke, het ons gevind dat selfs met 9 lage van CNN, gebruik van identiteitskaart kan betekeurig die prestasie vir afgeleë verhouding van uittrekking verbeter.", 'sq': 'Mësimi i thellë i mbetur (ResNet) është një metodë e re për trajnimin e rrjeteve nervore shumë të thella duke përdorur hartimin e identitetit për lidhjet e shkurtra. ResNet ka fituar detyrën e klasifikimit të ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 dhe ka arritur shfaqje më të larta në shumë detyra të vizionit kompjuterik. Megjithatë, efekti i mësimit të mbetur në detyrat e zhurmshme të procesimit natyror të gjuhës nuk është ende i kuptuar mirë. Në këtë letër, ne dizajnojmë një rrjet nervor konvolutiv (CNN) të ri me mësim të mbetur dhe hetojmë ndikimet e tij në detyrën e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve zhurmuese të mbikqyrura larg. Në kundërshtim me besimet popullore se ResNet punon mirë vetëm për rrjete shumë të thella, gjetëm se edhe me 9 shtresa CNN, përdorimi i hartimit të identitetit mund të përmirësojë ndjeshëm performancën për nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të mbikqyrura nga larg.', 'am': 'የጥልቅ ትምህርት (ResNet) አዲስ የጥልቅ የneural network ማህበረሰብ ነው የሥርዓት ማህበረሰብ አቋራጭ ግንኙነትን ለመጠቀም ResNet የመስመር ገጽ ILSVRC 2015 የተለየ አድራጊውን አሸነፈ፥ በብዙ ኮምፒውተር ራእይ ስራዎችን የ-የ-art ድራፍ አግኝቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ስራዎችን በሚያስተማሩ ላይ የቀረውን ትምህርት ገና ማስታወቂያው አይደለም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቀረውን ትምህርት የሚያስፈልገውን የነዌብ መረብ (CNN) እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተቃውሞው የረጀብ መረብ ብቻ ለጥልቅ መረብ ይሠራል፡፡', 'tr': 'Derrew kalan öwrenmek ResNet ImageNet ILSVRC 2015-nji ýygnak göresini ýeňdi we kompýuter görkezilişinde halkara sungat eserlerini ýeňdi. Ýöne, täbi dil işlemegi barada täsirli öwrenmeniň etkisi entägem gowy düşünmedi. Bu kagyzda, netijeli öwrenmek bilen birleşik bir nuwasal şebeke (CNN) düzenledik we uzak-yähili gürrüňli baglaşyklarynyň täsirini çykarmak täsirinde barlaýarys. ResNet diňe gaty derin şebekeler üçin gowy işleýär diýip meşhur ynamalaryň üstünde, hatda 9 katly CNN bilen pikir etdik, kimligi kartlamagy ullanyp uzakdan gözleýän baglaýyşyň çekişigini gowurap biler.', 'hy': 'Խիրջ մնացած ուսումնասիրությունը (ReNet) շատ խորը նյարդային ցանցերի ուսումնասիրության նոր մեթոդ է, օգտագործելով ինքնության քարտեզագրումը կարճ կապերի համար: ՌեսNet-ը հաղթել է 2015 թվականին պատասխանատվությունը, և հասել է ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքներին համակարգչային տեսողության բազմաթիվ խնդիրներում: Այնուամենայնիվ, մնացած ուսումնասիրության ազդեցությունը աղմկոտ բնական լեզվի վերամշակումների վրա դեռևս լավ չի հասկանում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր հակառակցող նյարդային ցանց (CNN), որն ունի մնացած ուսումնասիրություն, և ուսումնասիրում ենք դրա ազդեցությունը հեռավորությամբ վերահսկվող աղմուկ հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդրի վրա: Հակառակ հայտնի համոզմունքներին, որ ReNet-ը միայն լավ է աշխատում շատ խորը ցանցերի համար, մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ նույնիսկ CNN-ի 9 շերտերի միջոցով ինքնության քարտեզագրման օգտագործումը կարող է նշանակալի բարելավել հեռավորության վերահսկվող հարաբերությունների արտադրող', 'de': 'Deep Residual Learning (ResNet) ist eine neue Methode zum Training sehr tiefer neuronaler Netzwerke mittels Identity Mapping für Shortcut-Verbindungen. ResNet hat die Klassifikationsaufgabe ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 gewonnen und bei vielen Aufgaben im Bereich der Computerbildverarbeitung Spitzenleistungen erzielt. Allerdings ist der Effekt des Restlernens auf lärmende Aufgaben der natürlichen Sprachverarbeitung noch nicht gut verstanden. In diesem Beitrag entwerfen wir ein neuartiges Convolutional Neuronal Network (CNN) mit Residual Learning und untersuchen dessen Auswirkungen auf die Aufgabe der distant überwachten Rauschrelationsextraktion. Im Gegensatz zu der weit verbreiteten Überzeugung, dass ResNet nur für sehr tiefe Netzwerke gut funktioniert, fanden wir heraus, dass die Verwendung von Identity Mapping selbst mit neun CNNs die Leistung für die distanziert überwachte Beziehungsextraktion signifikant verbessern könnte.', 'bn': 'গভীর বাকি শিক্ষা (রেসেট) একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি যা খুব গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি যা শর্টকাট সংযো রেসেন্ট অনেক কম্পিউটার ভিশন কাজে ইমেজেন্টনেট আইএলএসভিআরসি ২০১৫ সালের ক্লাসাফিকেশন কাজ জ জিতেছে এবং অনেক কম্পিউটারের দৃশ্ তবে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজের উপর বাকি শিক্ষার প্রভাব এখনো বুঝতে পারে না। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বাকি শিক্ষা দিয়ে একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) নির্মাণ করি এবং তার প্রভাব অনুসন্ধান করি যে শব্দ সম্পর্কের বিরুদ্ধে দূরে পর্যবেক In contradictory to popular beliefs that ResNet only works well for very deep networks, we found that even with 9 layers of CNNs, using identity mapping could significantly improve the performance for distantly-supervised relation extraction.', 'cs': 'Deep Residual Learning (ResNet) je nová metoda pro trénink velmi hlubokých neuronových sítí pomocí mapování identity pro zkratková spojení. ResNet získal klasifikační úkol ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 a dosáhl nejmodernějších výkonů v mnoha úkolech počítačového vidění. Vliv zbytkového učení na hlučné úlohy zpracování přirozeného jazyka však stále není dobře pochopen. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou konvoluční neuronovou síť (CNN) se zbytkovým učením a zkoumáme její vliv na úlohu vzdáleně dohlížené hlučné extrakce vztahů. V rozporu s populárním přesvědčením, že ResNet funguje dobře pouze pro velmi hluboké sítě, jsme zjistili, že i s devíti vrstvami CNN by použití mapování identity mohlo výrazně zlepšit výkon pro extrakci vztahů pod vzdáleným dohledem.', 'bs': 'Duboko preostalo učenje (ResNet) je novi metod za obuku veoma dubokih neuralnih mreža koristeći kartanje identiteta za prečice veze. ResNet je osvojio zadatak klasifikacije ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, i postigao izvedbe stanja umjetnosti u mnogim računalnim zadacima za viziju. Međutim, učinak ostatka učenja na bučne prirodne obaveze obrade jezika još uvijek nije dobro shvaćen. U ovom papiru, mi dizajniramo novu konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu (CNN) sa ostatkom učenja, i istražujemo njegove utjecaje na zadatak izvlačenja distantno nadziranog buknog odnosa. U suprotnosti popularnim uvjerenjima da ResNet radi samo dobro za veoma duboke mreže, otkrili smo da čak i sa 9 slojeva CNN-a, koristeći kartanje identiteta, značajno bi poboljšali učinkovitost izvlačenja odnosa s dalekim nadzorom.', 'az': 'Yerli qalan öyrənmək (ResNet) çox derin nöral a ğları təhsil etmək üçün yeni bir yoldur. Qısqa yol bağlantıları üçün kimlik maplaması istifadə edir. ResNet ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 klasifikasiya görevi kazandı və kompjuter görünüş görevlərinin çoxluğunda mövcuddur. Lakin, təbiətli dil işləmə işlərinin sonrakı öyrənməsinin etkisi hələ də yaxşı anlanmadır. Bu kağızda, yeni konvolucional nöral a ğ (CNN) təyin edirik ki, geri qalan öyrənmək ilə, və uzaq-uzaq təhlükəsizli səsl əlaqəsinin istifadə etməsinin təsirini incidirik. ResNet ancaq çox derin ağılar üçün yaxşı işləyir. Biz, hətta 9 katlı CNN-lərlə birlikdə, kimlik mapasını istifadə edərək uzaq-gözləyirli ilişki ekstraksiyası üçün performansını çox yaxşılaşdıra bilər.', 'ca': "Deep residual learning (ResNet) is a new method for training very deep neural networks using identity mapping for shortcut connections.  ResNet ha guanyat la tasca de classificació de ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 i ha aconseguit actuacions més avançades en moltes tasques de visió informàtica. No obstant això, l'efecte de l'aprenentatge residual en les tasques sorolloses de processament de llenguatges naturals encara no està ben entendut. In this paper, we design a novel convolutional neural network (CNN) with residual learning, and investigate its impacts on the task of distantly supervised noisy relation extraction.  Contrariament a les creences populars que ResNet només funciona bé per a xarxes molt profundes, vam descobrir que fins i tot amb 9 capes de CNN, utilitzant el mapatge d'identitat podria millorar significativament el rendiment de l'extracció de relacions supervisades a distància.", 'et': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) on uus meetod väga sügavate närvivõrkude koolitamiseks, kasutades identiteedi kaardistamist otseteede jaoks. ResNet on võitnud ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 klassifitseerimisülesande ja saavutanud kaasaegse tulemuse paljudes arvutinägemise ülesannetes. Siiski ei ole jäänud õppe mõju mürakatele looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetele veel hästi mõistetud. Käesolevas töös projekteerime uudse konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu (CNN) jääkõppega ja uurime selle mõju kaugelt jälgitava mürasummuse ekstraheerimise ülesandele. Vastupidiselt levinud uskumustele, et ResNet toimib hästi ainult väga sügavate võrkude puhul, leidsime, et isegi 9-kihilise CNN-i puhul võib identiteedi kaardistamine oluliselt parandada tulemuslikkust kaugjärelevalve all olevate suhete ekstraheerimisel.', 'fi': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) on uusi menetelmä hyvin syvien hermoverkkojen kouluttamiseen käyttämällä identiteettikartoitusta pikayhteyksissä. ResNet on voittanut ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 -luokituksen ja saavuttanut huipputason suorituskykyä monissa tietokonenäkötehtävissä. Jäännöskoulutuksen vaikutusta meluisiin luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtäviin ei kuitenkaan vieläkään ymmärretä hyvin. Tässä työssä suunnitellaan uusi konvolutionaalinen neuroverkko (CNN), jossa on jäännösoppimista, ja tutkitaan sen vaikutuksia etäohjattuun melusuhteeseen. Vastoin suosittuja uskomuksia siitä, että ResNet toimii hyvin vain erittäin syvissä verkoissa, huomasimme, että jopa yhdeksän CNN-kerrosta käytettäessä identiteettikartoituksen käyttö voisi merkittävästi parantaa suorituskykyä etävalvotun suhteen purkamisessa.', 'he': 'למידה עמוקה שאריות (ResNet) היא שיטה חדשה לאימון רשתות עצביות עמוקות מאוד באמצעות מפת זהות לקשרים קצרים. רסנט זכה במשימת ההקלטה של ImageNet ILSVRC 2015, והשגה ביצועים חדשים בהרבה משימות חזון מחשבים. עם זאת, ההשפעה של הלימוד השארי על משימות עיבוד שפה טבעית רעשות עדיין לא מובנות היטב. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מעצבים רשת עצבית משתנה (CNN) חדשה עם לימוד שאריות, וחקירים את השפעות שלה על המשימה של חיפוש מערכת יחסים רעילות שמשולטת מרחוק. בניגוד לאמונות פופולריות שרסנט עובדת היטב רק לרשתות עמוקות מאוד, מצאנו שאפילו עם 9 שכבות של CNN, השימוש במפית זהות יכול לשפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה עבור חיפוש מערכת יחסים שמבוטחת מרחק.', 'ha': "Yi amfani da zane-zane-zane wa zane-zane na tsari (ResNet) yanzu na shirin kwamfyuta masu ƙarƙashin neura mai girma @ info Haƙĩƙa, ba za'a fahimta fasalin da za'a yi sauri a kan aikin zartar da harshe na asili ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã design wani jerin nan da aka samu da tsarin neura (CNN) da yana da bakin karatun, kuma munã ƙidãya musamman ta kan aikin da aka tsare masu haɗi na sauri. Di sãɓata zuwa ga imani mafiya popular da ResNet yana aiki da amfani kawai ga zanen tsaro mai girma, sai muka gane cewa, kõ da kuma akwai zane 9 na CNNN, kan yin amfani da karmapi ya yi amfani da zane-zane za'a ƙara mafiya girma ga zartar da danganta mai nĩsa.", 'sk': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) je nova metoda za usposabljanje zelo globokih nevronskih omrežij z uporabo kartiranja identitete za bližnjične povezave. ResNet je osvojil nalogo razvrščanja ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 in dosegel najsodobnejše delovanje v številnih nalogah računalniškega vida. Vendar pa učinek preostalega učenja na hrupne naloge obdelave naravnega jezika še vedno ni dobro razumljen. V prispevku smo oblikovali novo konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje (CNN) s preostalim učenjem in raziskali njegove vplive na nalogo daljno nadzorovanega ekstrakcije hrupnih relacij. V nasprotju s priljubljenim prepričanjem, da ResNet dobro deluje samo za zelo globoka omrežja, smo ugotovili, da lahko tudi z 9 plastmi CNN-jev uporaba identitetnega kartiranja bistveno izboljša učinkovitost pri ekstrakciji odnosov z daljnim nadzorom.', 'jv': 'deep Resneth wis amben nggawe Imagenet ISVR 2013, sampeyan wis kelas state-of-the-arts rampun kanggo akeh operasi komputer. Nanging, efek kanggo ngerasai kapan mulai kanggo ngerasai pengguna-pakan anyar tentang. Nang pepulan iki, kita dibudhake nyumbang kelas konvoluksi, tambah kuwi wis nguasai kapan mulasai, lan ujarane nggunakake kapan kuwi nggawe nguasai perkaraan sampeyan tambah. Mangkin segala karo populer kredane resnet kang dipun ajeng di netek sing luwih apik, awak dhéwé wis ngerasakno karo 9 Layer of KNs, nambah nambah kang dipunangé perusahaan anit maneh iso nggawe akeh luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilanggar nggawe barang langkung sampeyan luwih dumadhi winih.', 'bo': 'Deep residual learning (ResNet) is a new method for training very deep neural networks using identity mapping for shortcut connections. ResNet has won the ImageNet ILSVRC 2015 classification task, and achieved state-of-the-art performances in many computer vision tasks. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྨན་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནུས་པ་སྦྱར་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནོད་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཆེན་དྲ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ResNet དྲ་རྒྱའི་ཆ་མཐོང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྐྱོན་པ་ཡིན་པའི་ཡིད་ཆ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་རྣམ་འགྱུར་གཟུགས་རིས་ཁྱབ་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction : A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'ar': 'إشراف عن بعد متجمع بالضوضاء لاستخراج العلاقة: منظور بايزي غير معلمي', 'pt': 'Supervisão Distante Agrupada por Ruído para Extração de Relação: Uma Perspectiva Bayesiana Não Paramétrica', 'fr': "Supervision distante groupée par bruit pour l'extraction de relations\xa0: une perspective bayésienne non paramétrique", 'es': 'Supervisión a distancia agrupada en ruido para la extracción de relaciones: una perspectiva bayesiana no paramétrica', 'ja': 'ノイズクラスタ化された関係抽出の遠隔監視：ノンパラメトリックベイズの視点', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण के लिए शोर-संकुल दूर पर्यवेक्षण: एक Nonparametric Bayesian परिप्रेक्ष्य', 'zh': '所取噪声聚类远监:非参数贝叶斯透视', 'ru': 'Шумовое кластерное дистанционное наблюдение за извлечением отношений: непараметрическая байесовская перспектива', 'ga': 'Maoirseacht Chianchnuasaithe Torainn le haghaidh Eastóscadh Caidrimh: Peirspictíocht Bayesian Neamhparaiméadrach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Θόρυβος-Clustered μακρινή επίβλεψη για την εξαγωγή σχέσεων: Μια μη παραμετρική Bayesian προοπτική', 'hu': 'Zajcsoportosított távolsági felügyelet a relatív extrakcióhoz: Nem parametrikus bayesiai perspektíva', 'kk': 'Қатыстарды тарқату үшін дыбыс- кластердің қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы наблюдение: Бейезия перспективасы', 'lt': 'Nuotolinė santykių ekstrakcijos su triukšmu kontrolė: nepaparametrinė Bayezijos perspektyva', 'it': "Supervisione a distanza a cluster di rumore per l'estrazione della relazione: una prospettiva bayesiana non parametrica", 'mk': 'Разгласена дистантна надзора за екстракција на односите: Непараметрична бајезиска перспектива', 'ms': 'Pengawalan Jarak Berkumpulan-Bunyi untuk Ekstraksi Hubungan: Perspektif Bayesian Tidak Parametrik', 'mt': 'Superviżjoni Distanza Raggruppata bl-Istorbju għall-Estrazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni: Perspettiva Bajesjana Mhux Parametrika', 'mn': 'Хувь-кластер холбоотой хамааралтын гадагшлуулалтын хол харилцаа: Нэг параметр Байзийн Перспектив', 'no': 'Støyklastert distansoversikt for utpakking av relasjonar: ein ikkje-parametrisk Bayesiansk perspektiv', 'pl': 'Nadzór na odległość w zakresie ekstrakcji relacji szumowych: nieparametryczna perspektywa Bayesowska', 'ro': 'Supravegherea distantă cu grupuri de zgomot pentru extracția relației: o perspectivă bayesiană nonparametrică', 'sr': 'Zvuk-klusterirani udaljeni nadzor za izvlačenje odnosa: Neparametrična Bejska perspektiva', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'இணைப்பு வெளியீட்டுக்கான ஒலி தூரத்தை கண்காணிப்பு: A non-parametric Bayesian perspective', 'sv': 'Bullerkusterad fjärrövervakning för relationsextraktion: Ett icke-parametriskt bayesiskt perspektiv', 'ur': 'رابطہ اخراج کے لئے صدا-کلستر دور نظر: ایک غیر پارامتریک Bayesian Perspective', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള അസ്ഥാന സൂപ്പര്\u200dഷന്\u200d: ഒരു പാര്\u200dമെറ്റിക് ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d പെരുമെന്\u200dടിവ്', 'so': 'Noise-Clusted Distant Supervision for Relations Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'vi': 'Phân chia cách ồn ào cho Lôi Đình', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Шумно-клъстерен дистанционен надзор за извличане на отношенията: Непараметрична Байезийска перспектива', 'hr': 'Glasno klasirano daljnje nadzor za izvlačenje odnosa: Neparametrična Bayesijska perspektiva', 'da': 'Støjklynget fjernsyn for relationsudvinding: Et ikke-parametrisk bayesisk perspektiv', 'nl': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervisie voor Relatie Extractie: Een niet-parametrisch Bayesian Perspectief', 'de': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayes Perspective', 'id': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'fa': 'بررسی فاصله\u200cای از صوت\u200cبندی برای اخراج رابطه: یک منظور بی\u200cپارامتریک', 'ko': '관계 추출 소음 집합 원격 모니터링: 비파라미터 베일스 시각', 'sw': 'Kituo cha Kuondolewa kwa Kuhusiana: Mtazamo wa Bayesia', 'tr': 'Referans Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'sq': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Ամուտ-խմբագրված հեռավոր վերահսկողություն հարաբերության արտադրման համար', 'az': 'İlişkilərin çıxarılması üçün səs-Clustered Distant Supervision: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'bn': 'সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ের জন্য অজুহাত-ক্লাস্টেড ড ডিস্ট্রেন্ট সুপারেশনName', 'bs': 'Glasno-klusterirano daljnje nadzor za izvlačenje odnosa: Neparametrična Bayesijska perspektiva', 'ca': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'cs': 'Šumový cluster vzdálený dohled pro extrakci vztahů: neparametrická Bayesovská perspektiva', 'et': 'Müra-klastriga kaugjärelevalve suhete ekstraheerimiseks: mitteparameetriline bayesia perspektiiv', 'fi': 'Meluklusteroitu etäisyysvalvonta suhteessa uuttamiseen: ei-parametrinen Bayesian näkökulma', 'jv': 'Noisa-clustered Distant super view for Relation extract: A Nonparametric bayesi perspective', 'sk': 'Razdaljni nadzor hrupa za ekstrakcijo odnosov: neparametrična bajzijska perspektiva', 'he': 'הפיקוח מרחוק עם רעש לחיצת יחסים: פרספקטיבה בייזית לא פרמטרית', 'ha': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective', 'bo': 'Noise-Clustered Distant Supervision for Relation Extraction: A Nonparametric Bayesian Perspective'}
{'en': 'For the task of relation extraction, distant supervision is an efficient approach to generate labeled data by aligning knowledge base with free texts. The essence of it is a challenging incomplete multi-label classification problem with sparse and noisy features. To address the challenge, this work presents a novel nonparametric Bayesian formulation for the task. Experiment results show substantially higher top precision improvements over the traditional state-of-the-art approaches.', 'ar': 'بالنسبة لمهمة استخراج العلاقة ، فإن الإشراف عن بعد هو نهج فعال لتوليد البيانات ذات العلامات من خلال محاذاة قاعدة المعرفة مع النصوص المجانية. جوهرها هو مشكلة تصنيف متعددة غير مكتملة صعبة مع ميزات متفرقة وصاخبة. لمواجهة التحدي ، يقدم هذا العمل صيغة بايزية غير معلمية جديدة للمهمة. تظهر نتائج التجربة تحسينات أعلى في الدقة بشكل كبير على الأساليب التقليدية الحديثة.', 'es': 'Para la tarea de extracción de relaciones, la supervisión a distancia es un enfoque eficiente para generar datos etiquetados mediante la alineación de la base de conocimientos con los textos libres. La esencia de esto es un desafiante problema de clasificación de múltiples etiquetas incompletas con características escasas y ruidosas. Para abordar el desafío, este trabajo presenta una novedosa formulación bayesiana no paramétrica para la tarea. Los resultados de los experimentos muestran mejoras de precisión superior sustancialmente mayores en comparación con los enfoques tradicionales de vanguardia.', 'pt': 'Para a tarefa de extração de relações, a supervisão à distância é uma abordagem eficiente para gerar dados rotulados alinhando a base de conhecimento com textos livres. A essência disso é um problema desafiador de classificação multirrótulo incompleto com recursos esparsos e ruidosos. Para enfrentar o desafio, este trabalho apresenta uma nova formulação Bayesiana não paramétrica para a tarefa. Os resultados do experimento mostram melhorias de precisão superior substancialmente mais altas em relação às abordagens tradicionais de última geração.', 'fr': "Pour la tâche d'extraction de relation, la supervision à distance est une approche efficace pour générer des données étiquetées en alignant la base de connaissances avec des textes libres. L'essence de ce problème est un problème complexe de classification multiétiquette incomplète avec des caractéristiques éparses et bruyantes. Pour relever ce défi, ce travail présente une nouvelle formulation bayésienne non paramétrique pour cette tâche. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent des améliorations de précision de pointe nettement supérieures par rapport aux approches de pointe traditionnelles.", 'ja': '関係抽出のタスクでは、遠隔監視は、ナレッジベースを自由テキストに整列させることによってラベル付けされたデータを生成する効率的なアプローチです。その本質は、まばらで騒々しい特徴を持つ、難しい不完全なマルチラベル分類問題です。この課題に対処するために、この研究は、タスクのための新規のノンパラメトリックベイズ式を提示している。実験結果は、従来の最先端のアプローチよりも大幅に高い最高精度の改善を示しています。', 'zh': '远程督者,所以齐知识库文本也。 其质一挑战性不全者多标签分类,有疏与嘈杂之征。 为此挑战,事有新参数贝叶斯公式。 实验结果表明,比先进之法,精有更进。', 'hi': 'संबंध निष्कर्षण के कार्य के लिए, दूर का पर्यवेक्षण मुक्त ग्रंथों के साथ ज्ञान के आधार को संरेखित करके लेबल किए गए डेटा को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक कुशल दृष्टिकोण है। इसका सार विरल और शोर सुविधाओं के साथ एक चुनौतीपूर्ण अपूर्ण बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण समस्या है। चुनौती को संबोधित करने के लिए, यह काम कार्य के लिए एक उपन्यास nonparametric Bayesian सूत्रीकरण प्रस्तुत करता है। प्रयोग के परिणाम पारंपरिक अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों पर काफी अधिक शीर्ष परिशुद्धता सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Для задачи извлечения отношений дистанционное наблюдение является эффективным подходом к генерации маркированных данных путем согласования базы знаний со свободными текстами. Суть его заключается в сложной неполной многоуровневой проблеме классификации с редкими и шумными признаками. Чтобы решить проблему, в этой работе представлена новая непараметрическая байесовская формулировка для задачи. Результаты Эксперимента показывают значительно более высокие верхние улучшения точности по сравнению с традиционными современными подходами.', 'ga': 'Maidir le heastóscadh an chaidrimh, is cur chuige éifeachtúil í an chianmhaoirseacht chun sonraí lipéadaithe a ghiniúint trí bhunachar eolais a ailíniú le saorthéacsanna. Is fadhb dhúshlánach neamhiomlán aicmithe illipéid í an croílár a bhfuil gnéithe tanaí agus torannacha aici. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dúshlán, cuireann an saothar seo foirmliú nua neamhpharaiméadrach Bayesian i láthair don tasc. Léiríonn torthaí na dturgnamh feabhsuithe beachtas níos airde i bhfad níos airde ná na cineálacha cur chuige traidisiúnta den scoth.', 'ka': 'დაკავშირებული ექსტრექციის დავალებისთვის, გარეშე მონაცემებისთვის ეფექტიური მონაცემების შექმნა მონაცემების შექმნა, თავისუფალი ტექსტით გარეშე. მისი მნიშვნელობა არის საშუალებელი მრავალური კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემა, რომელიც საშუალებელი და ბუნური ფუნქციებით. ეს სამუშაო პრომენტიკური ბეიზიანური ფორმაცია დაახლოებით. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთრვ პვჱსლრამთ ოჲკაჱგარ მნჲდჲ ოჲ-დჲლწმა ოჲ-დჲლწმა ოპთწრნჲჟრ ჱა რპაეთუთჲნალნთრვ ჟყჟრჲწნთ ოპთჟლვეგანия.', 'el': 'Για το έργο της εξαγωγής σχέσεων, η μακρινή εποπτεία είναι μια αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για την παραγωγή ετικετών δεδομένων ευθυγραμμίζοντας τη βάση γνώσεων με ελεύθερα κείμενα. Η ουσία του είναι ένα προκλητικό ελλιπές πρόβλημα ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών με αραιά και θορυβώδη χαρακτηριστικά. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί η πρόκληση, αυτή η εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα μη παραμετρική Bayesian διατύπωση για το έργο. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν σημαντικά υψηλότερες βελτιώσεις υψηλής ακρίβειας έναντι των παραδοσιακών προσεγγίσεων τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatkivonás feladatához a távoli felügyelet hatékony megközelítés a címkézett adatok létrehozására a tudásbázis szabad szövegekkel való összehangolásával. Ennek lényege egy kihívást jelentő, többcímkés osztályozási probléma, amely ritka és zajos tulajdonságokkal rendelkezik. A kihívás megoldása érdekében ez a munka bemutatja a feladathoz egy új, nem paraméteres bayesiai formulát. A kísérletek eredményei a hagyományos korszerű megközelítésekhez képest lényegesen nagyobb precizitást mutatnak.', 'it': "Per il compito di estrazione delle relazioni, la supervisione a distanza è un approccio efficiente per generare dati etichettati allineando la base di conoscenza con i testi liberi. L'essenza di esso è un difficile problema incompleto di classificazione multi-etichetta con caratteristiche scarne e rumorose. Per affrontare la sfida, questo lavoro presenta una nuova formulazione bayesiana non parametrica per il compito. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano miglioramenti notevolmente più elevati rispetto agli approcci tradizionali all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Atstuminė priežiūra yra veiksmingas būdas gaminti pažymėtus duomenis suderinant žinių bazę su nemokamais tekstais. Jos esmė yra sudėtinga neišsami daugiametė klasifikavimo problem a, turinti retas ir triukšmingas savybes. Siekiant išspręsti šį uždavinį, šiame darbe pateikiama nauja ne parametrinė Bayezijos formuluotė. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo gerokai didesnį tikslumą, palyginti su tradiciniais naujausiais metodais.', 'mk': 'За задачата на извлекувањето на односите, далечниот надзор е ефикасен пристап за генерирање на означени податоци со прилагодување на базата на знаење со слободните тексти. Всушност е предизвикувачки нецелосен проблем со класификација со мултиетикети со ретки и бучни карактеристики. За да се реши предизвикот, оваа работа претставува нова непараметричка бајезиска формулација за задачата. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат значително повисоки најдобри подобрувања во однос на традиционалните најнови пристапи.', 'kk': 'Қатарлық тарқату тапсырмасы үшін, қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы мәтіндерді бос мәтіндермен тегістеу үшін мәліметтерді құру үшін мәліметтерді құру үшін ефективті Оның негізгісі - бірнеше жарлық және дыбыс мүмкіндіктерімен бірнеше жарлық классификациялау мәселесі. Бұл жұмыс істеу үшін тапсырма үшін романдық бейезия формулациясын көрсетеді. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері дәстүрлі орындағы әдетті күй- жағдайдың жақсы жақсартуларына көп жоғары жақсартуларын көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന ജോലി അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വിലാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിലാസപുലര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d കഴിയില്ലാത്ത പല-ലേബിലേറ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക് ഈ ചോദ്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിലപിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ ജോലി ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട മുന്\u200dഗണന മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай холбоотой ажилд, хол даяарлын харилцаа нь үнэгүй текстэй тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийг бүтээх эффективны арга юм. Үүний суурь нь маш хэцүү олон загварын хуваалтын асуудал юм. Сорилтыг удирдахын тулд энэ ажил нь ажлын төлөө шинэ биезийн тодорхойлолтыг харуулдаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд уламжлалтын урлагийн ойлголтын тулд хамгийн өндөр тодорхой сайжруулалтыг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Untuk tugas pengekstrakan hubungan, pengawasan jauh adalah pendekatan efisien untuk menghasilkan data labeled dengan menyesuaikan pangkalan pengetahuan dengan teks bebas. Intinya adalah masalah klasifikasi multi-label yang tidak lengkap yang menantang dengan ciri-ciri yang ringan dan bunyi. Untuk mengatasi cabaran ini, kerja ini memperkenalkan formulasi Bayesian yang tidak parametrik untuk tugas ini. Keputusan eksperimen menunjukkan peningkatan ketepatan atas yang lebih tinggi daripada pendekatan tradisional state-of-the-art.', 'mt': 'Għall-kompitu tal-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet, superviżjoni distanti hija approċċ effiċjenti biex tiġi ġġenerata dejta ttikkettata billi l-bażi tal-għarfien tiġi allinjata mat-testi ħielsa. L-essenza tagħha hija problem a ta’ klassifikazzjoni multitikketta mhux kompluta ta’ sfida b’karatteristiċi baxxi u storbjużi. To address the challenge, this work presents a novel nonparametric Bayesian formulation for the task.  Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru titjib sostanzjalment ogħla fl-ogħla preċiżjoni fuq l-approċċi tradizzjonali l-aktar avvanzati.', 'no': 'For oppgåva til utpakking av relasjonar er ein effektivt tilnærming til å laga merkelige data ved å justera kunnskapsbasen med fri tekstar. Det er ein vanskeleg ufullstendig fleire merkelappeklassifikasjonsfeil med sparse og støy-funksjonar. For å handtera utfordringen, viser denne arbeidet eit roman ikkje-parametrisk Bayesian-formasjon for oppgåva. Eksperimentresultatet viser mykje høgare forbedringar av den tradisjonelle tilstanden av kunsten.', 'pl': 'Dla zadania ekstrakcji relacji odległy nadzór jest skutecznym podejściem do generowania etykietowanych danych poprzez dostosowanie bazy wiedzy do wolnych tekstów. Istotą tego jest trudny, niekompletny problem klasyfikacji wieloznakowych z rzadkimi i głośnymi cechami. Aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu, w niniejszej pracy przedstawiono nową nieparametryczną formułę Bayesowską do tego zadania. Wyniki eksperymentów pokazują znacznie większą poprawę najwyższej precyzji w porównaniu z tradycyjnymi najnowocześniejszymi podejściami.', 'ro': 'Pentru activitatea extragerii relațiilor, supravegherea la distanță este o abordare eficientă pentru generarea datelor etichetate prin alinierea bazei de cunoștințe cu textele libere. Esența acesteia este o problemă dificilă de clasificare incompletă cu mai multe etichete, cu caracteristici rare și zgomotoase. Pentru a răspunde provocării, această lucrare prezintă o nouă formulare bayesiană nonparametrică pentru această sarcină. Rezultatele experimentelor arată îmbunătățiri substanțial mai mari de precizie superioară față de abordările tradiționale de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Za zadatak izvlačenja odnosa, daljinski nadzor je efikasan pristup stvaranju označenih podataka prilagođenjem baze znanja slobodnim tekstima. U suštini njega je izazovni nepotpuni problem klasifikacije multietiketa sa rezervnim i buknim karakteristikama. Da bi se riješio izazov, ovaj rad predstavlja novu neoparametriju Bejzijansku formulaciju za taj zadatak. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju značajno veće poboljšanje vrhunske preciznosti u odnosu na tradicionalne pristupe umetnosti.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ පිළිගන්න වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, දුරස්ථ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි නිදහස් පරික්ෂණය සඳහා දන්නවත් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා  ඒකේ මූල්\u200dයය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනිපූර්ණයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අභ්\u200dයානය විධානය කරන්න, මේ වැඩේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්නේ නොප්\u200dරමාණික බේසියාන් විධානයක් වෙන්නේ. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශාලනය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'För uppgiften att extrahera relationer är fjärrövervakning ett effektivt tillvägagångssätt för att generera märkta data genom att anpassa kunskapsbasen till fria texter. Kärnan i det är ett utmanande ofullständigt klassificeringsproblem med flera etiketter med glesa och bullriga egenskaper. För att möta utmaningen presenterar detta arbete en ny icke-parametrisk Bayesian formulering för uppgiften. Experimentsresultaten visar betydligt högre toppprecisionsförbättringar jämfört med traditionella toppmoderna metoder.', 'ur': 'تعلق اٹھانے کے کام کے لئے دور والی نظارت کا ایک مفید طریقہ ہے کہ لیبل ڈیٹا پیدا کرے اور علم بنسس کو آزاد ٹیکسٹ کے ساتھ تضامیل کرے۔ اس کی بنیاد ایک مشکل ہے جو بہت سی لیبل کلاسپیٹ مشکل ہے جہاز اور آواز کی خصوصیت کے ساتھ. اس چال کے بارے میں یہ کام ایک نوم غیر پارامتریک بائزین فرمول کے لئے پیش کرتا ہے۔ آزمائش نتیجے بہت زیادہ بالاتر دقیق ترتیب کے اضافہ کے ذریعے آزمائش کے مطابق اضافہ کررہے ہیں.', 'so': 'Maxaa yeelay shaqada soo saaridda xiriirka, ilaalinta fog waa qaab faa’iido ah oo ku imaanaya macluumaadka la qoray oo ku qoran qoraal xor ah. Taasi waa dhibaato kala qaybsan oo aan dhamaaneyn dhibaato kala duduwan oo ay leedahay hiwaayad iyo qaylo. To address the challenge, this work presents a novel nonparametric Bayesian formulation for the task.  Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda hagaajinta koronta kordhinta si aad u sarreeya oo ka horumarinta xaaladda farshaxanka ah.', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு பிரித்தலின் செயல்பாட்டிற்கு, தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல்களை உருவாக்க அறிவு அடிப்படையை இலவச உரைகளு அதின் முக்கியம் ஒரு சவாலானது முழுமையான பல்லெட்டு வகுப்பு பிரச்சனையாகும் சவால் மற்றும் சப்தம் குணங்களுடனும To address the challenge, this work presents a novel nonparametric Bayesian formulation for the task.  முயற்சி முடிவுகள் மிகவும் அதிகமாக மேல் துல்லியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை காட்டுகின்றன.', 'vi': 'Với nhiệm vụ khai thác mối quan hệ, sự giám sát xa xôi là một cách hiệu quả để tạo dữ liệu được dán nhãn bằng cách căn cứ kiến thức hợp với các văn bản miễn phí. Bản chất của nó là một vấn đề phân loại đa nhãn đầy đủ khó khăn với các tính chất nhiễu nhương. Để giải quyết thử thách này, công việc này mang đến một công trình không phân tích định giới tính mới cho nhiệm vụ. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy sự cải tiến độ chính xác cao hơn nhiều so với các phương pháp truyền thống.', 'uz': "Ulanish vazifasi uchun masofadagi muvaffaqiyatli maʼlumot bazasini bilan bir matn bilan aniqlash imkoniyatini yaratish muvaffaqiyatli usuli. Buning muhimligi kichkina va harflar xususiyatlari bilan ko'plab tarqatish muammolari. O'qituvchiga qarish uchun bu ishni vazifa uchun hech qanday parametrik Bayesiya formulyasini beradi. Name", 'bg': 'За задачата за извличане на релации дистанционният надзор е ефективен подход за генериране на етикетирани данни чрез привеждане на базата от знания в съответствие със свободните текстове. Същността на това е предизвикателен непълн многоетикетен проблем с класификация с редки и шумни характеристики. За да се справи с предизвикателството, тази работа представя нова непараметрична бакейска формулировка за задачата. Резултатите от експериментите показват значително по-високи подобрения на максималната прецизност в сравнение с традиционните съвременни подходи.', 'nl': 'Voor de taak van relatieontwikkeling is supervisie op afstand een efficiënte aanpak om gelabelde data te genereren door kennisbasis af te stemmen op vrije teksten. De essentie hiervan is een uitdagend incompleet multi-label classificatieprobleem met schaarse en lawaaierige kenmerken. Om de uitdaging aan te pakken, presenteert dit werk een nieuwe niet-parametrische Bayesiaanse formulering voor deze taak. Experimentele resultaten tonen aanzienlijk hogere topprecisieverbeteringen aan ten opzichte van de traditionele state-of-the-art benaderingen.', 'da': 'Til opgaven med relation ekstraktion er fjernovervågning en effektiv tilgang til at generere mærkede data ved at tilpasse vidensbase til frie tekster. Essensen af det er et udfordrende ufuldstændigt problem med flere mærker klassificering med sparsomme og støjende funktioner. For at løse udfordringen præsenterer dette arbejde en ny ikke-parametrisk Bayesian formulering til opgaven. Eksperimentelle resultater viser betydeligt højere toppræcisionsforbedringer i forhold til de traditionelle state-of-the-art metoder.', 'id': 'Untuk tugas ekstraksi hubungan, pengawasan jauh adalah pendekatan efisien untuk menghasilkan data labeled dengan menyesuaikan dasar pengetahuan dengan teks gratis. Intinya adalah masalah klasifikasi multi-label yang tidak lengkap yang menantang dengan ciri-ciri yang ringan dan berisik. Untuk mengatasi tantangan ini, pekerjaan ini mempersembahkan formulasi Bayesian nonparametrik novel untuk tugas ini. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan peningkatan presisi atas yang lebih tinggi dari pendekatan tradisional state-of-the-art.', 'de': 'Für die Aufgabe der Beziehungsextraktion ist die Fernüberwachung ein effizienter Ansatz, um beschriftete Daten zu generieren, indem Wissensdatenbank mit freien Texten ausgerichtet wird. Das Wesentliche ist ein herausforderndes, unvollständiges Multi-Label-Klassifizierungsproblem mit spärlichen und lauten Funktionen. Um dieser Herausforderung gerecht zu werden, stellt diese Arbeit eine neuartige nicht parametrische Bayesianische Formulierung für diese Aufgabe vor. Die Ergebnisse der Experimente zeigen deutlich höhere Höchstpräzisionsverbesserungen als herkömmliche State-of-the-Art-Ansätze.', 'ko': '관계 추출 임무에 대해 원격 모니터링은 지식 라이브러리와 자유 텍스트를 맞추어 표기 데이터를 생성하는 효과적인 방법이다.그 본질은 희소함과 소음 특징을 지닌 불완전한 다중 라벨 분류 문제이다.이 도전에 대응하기 위해 본고는 새로운 비변수 베일스 공식을 제시했다.실험 결과 전통적인 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 최고급 정밀도가 현저히 높아졌다.', 'fa': 'برای کار اخراج ارتباط، بررسی دور یک روش موثرتی برای تولید داده\u200cهای برچسب با تنظیم پایگاه دانش با متن آزاد است. بنیادی آن یک مشکل مختصات زیادی با ویژه\u200cهای خاصی و صوتی است. برای حل چالش، این کار یک فرمول بی\u200cپارامتریک برای این کار را نشان می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cها بهترین دقیق بالا بر روی نزدیک\u200cهای وضعیت هنری سنتی نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Kwa jukumu la kuchaguliwa mahusiano, ufuatiliaji wa mbali ni njia yenye ufanisi wa kutengeneza taarifa zilizoonyesha kwa kutambua msingi wa maarifa kwa kutumia ujumbe huru. Umuhimu wake ni tatizo lisilokuwa na changamoto lisilo kamili la kutangazwa kwa lugha mbalimbali na hofu na kelele. Kupambana na changamoto hilo, kazi hii inaleta riwaya isiyo ya kibiashara kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha maendeleo ya kiwango kikubwa zaidi ya hali ya kawaida ya sanaa.', 'tr': 'Syýahat açmak üçin, uzak supervisiň ücretsiz metinler bilen etitlenýän maglumat üýtgetmek üçin etkinlik bir metodyr. Onun esasy, surat ve sesli özellikleri bilen incomplet bir çoklu etiketli klasifikasyon meselesidir. kynçylyga çözmek üçin bu işi görev üçin bir roman beýezi eserleri gösterir. Testler netijesi däpli ýokary ukyp taýýarlanmagyny däpli-ýokary ukyp taýýarlanmagyny görkezýär.', 'am': 'ለግንኙነት ለመውጣት ስራ የራቀ ጉዳይ ነፃ ጽሑፎችን በማሳወቅ የጽሑፎችን የጽሑፍ የጽሑፎችን የጽሑፎችን የጽሑፍ ዳታ መፍጠር የሚችል ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤቱ በብዙ-label በተለያዩት መከራ ነው፡፡ ይህም ሥራ ለሥራ የባይስያ የፓርማቲካ ባይስያ ፎልማሎችን ያቀርባል፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች የባሕላዊው የዓርት ግንኙነት አካባቢ ክፍል በላይ ከፍተኛ አዋራዎችን ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Vir die taak van verhouding van uitpakking is 'n afstand onderskyning effektief toegang om die gemerkte data te genereer deur kennis basis te aligneer met vry teks. Die esensie daarvan is 'n pragtige onvolledige multi-etiket klasifikasie probleem met spanseer en geluid funksies. Om die uitdrukking te adres, stel hierdie werk 'n roman nie-parametriese Bayesian formasie vir die taak. Eksperiment-resultate vertoon substantieel hoër boonste presisie verbeteringe oor die tradisionele staat-van-kuns-toegang.", 'sq': 'Për detyrën e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve, mbikqyrje e largët është një qasje e efektshme për të gjeneruar të dhënat e etiketuara duke përshtatur bazën e njohurive me tekstet e lira. Esenza e saj është një problem sfidues i pakompletuar klasifikimi me shumë etiketa me karakteristika të vogla dhe zhurmëshme. Për të trajtuar sfidën, ky punë paraqet një formulim të ri jo parametrik Bayesian për detyrën. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë përmirësime thelbësisht më të larta të saktësisë lidhur me qasjet tradicionale më të larta.', 'hr': 'Za zadatak izvlačenja odnosa, udaljeni nadzor je učinkovit pristup stvaranju označenih podataka prilagođenjem baze znanja slobodnim tekstima. U suštini njega je izazovni nepotpuni problem klasifikacije multietiketa s rezervnim i buknim karakteristikama. Za rješavanje izazova ovaj rad predstavlja novu neoparametriju Bayesiansku formulaciju za zadatak. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju značajno veće poboljšanje vrhunske preciznosti u odnosu na tradicionalne pristupe umjetnosti.', 'hy': 'Հաբերության վերացման խնդրի համար հեռավոր վերահսկողությունը արդյունավետ մոտեցում է, որպեսզի ստեղծվի պիտակ տվյալներ՝ հարմարեցնելով գիտելիքի հիմքը ազատ տեքստերի հետ: Այն մարտահրավեր ունի բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասակարգման խնդիր, որն ունի հազվադեպ և աղմկոտ հատկություններ: Խնդիրը լուծելու համար այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է այս խնդրի համար նոր ոչ պարամետրիկ բեյզիացի ձևափոխություն: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս հիմնականում ավելի բարձր լավագույն ճշգրիտ բարելավումներ ավանդական լավագույն մոտեցումների դեպքում:', 'az': 'İlişkilərin əlaqəsi çıxarılması üçün uzaq təhlükəsi boş metinlərlə elm üssünü müəyyən etmək üçün etiketli məlumatları yaratmaq üçün faydalı bir yoldur. Onun əslində səsl və səsl xüsusiyyətləri ilə çoxlu etiketli klasifikasiya problemidir. Bu işin çətinliklərə çəkilməsi üçün bu iş iş üçün yeni parametrik Bayezi formülünü göstərir. İşləmə sonuçları həqiqətən ən yüksək dəqiqliyyat yüksək düzəltənətlərini təhsil müddətlərinin yaxınlıqlarına görə göstərir.', 'bn': 'সম্পর্ক নির্বাচনের কাজের জন্য দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণ হচ্ছে মুক্ত টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে লেবেল ডাটা তৈরি করার কার্যকর উপায়। এটার প্রয়োজন হচ্ছে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ অসম্পূর্ণ মাল্টি লেবেলের গ্রাফিকেশন সমস্যা, স্প্যান এবং আওয়াজের বৈশিষ্ট্যে চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে কথা বলার জন্য এই কাজ কর্মসূচি বেয়েশিয়ান নির্বাচনের জন্য একটি নোভেল উপস্থাপন করেছে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে ঐতিহ্যবাহী রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের পদক্ষেপের ব্যাপারে বেশি উন্নতি প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Za zadatak izvlačenja odnosa, udaljeni nadzor je efikasan pristup stvaranju označenih podataka prilagođenjem baze znanja slobodnim tekstima. U suštini njega je izazovni nepotpuni problem klasifikacije multietiketa sa rezervnim i buknim karakteristikama. Da bi se riješio izazov, ovaj rad predstavlja novu neoparametriju Bayesijsku formulaciju za taj zadatak. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju značajno veće poboljšanje vrhunske preciznosti nad tradicionalnim pristupima stanja umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Per a l'extracció de relacions, la supervisió remota és un enfocament eficient per generar dades etiquetades alliniant la base de coneixements amb textos lliures. L'essència és un problem a incomplet de classificació multietiquetada amb característiques escasses i sorolloses. Per abordar el repte, aquest treball presenta una nova formulació baièsia no paramètrica per a la tasca. Els resultats dels experiments mostren millores de precisió molt més elevades en relació amb els enfocaments tradicionals d'última generació.", 'cs': 'Pro úkol extrakce vztahů je vzdálený dohled efektivním přístupem k generování označených dat sladěním znalostní báze s volnými texty. Podstatou je náročný neúplný problém klasifikace více etiket s řídkými a hlučnými vlastnostmi. Pro řešení této výzvy představuje tato práce novou neparametrickou Bayesovskou formulaci pro tento úkol. Výsledky experimentů ukazují podstatně vyšší vyšší přesnost oproti tradičním moderním přístupům.', 'et': 'Seoste eraldamise ülesandeks on kaugjärelevalve tõhus lähenemisviis märgistatud andmete genereerimiseks, viies teadmistebaasi vastavusse vabade tekstidega. Selle olemus on keeruline mitme märgisega klassifitseerimise probleem, millel on hõredad ja mürakad omadused. Selle väljakutse lahendamiseks esitatakse käesolevas töös uudne mitteparameetriline bayesia vorm selle ülesande jaoks. Katsetulemused näitavad, et traditsiooniliste tipptasemel lähenemisviisidega võrreldes on tipptasemel oluliselt paremad.', 'fi': 'Suhteiden louhinta etävalvonta on tehokas tapa tuottaa merkittyä dataa yhdenmukaistamalla tietopohja vapaiden tekstien kanssa. Sen ydin on haastava epätäydellinen monimerkkinen luokitusongelma, jossa on harvoja ja meluisia ominaisuuksia. Haasteeseen vastaamiseksi tässä työssä esitellään uusi ei-parametrinen bayesilainen formulaatio tehtävään. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että huipputarkkuus paranee huomattavasti perinteisiin huipputekniikkaan verrattuna.', 'sk': 'Za nalogo ekstrakcije relacij je oddaljeni nadzor učinkovit pristop k ustvarjanju označenih podatkov z usklajevanjem baze znanja s prostimi besedili. Bistvo tega je zahteven nepopoln problem razvrščanja več oznak z redkimi in hrupnimi značilnostmi. Za reševanje izziva je v tem delu predstavljena nova neparametrična bajzijska formulacija za nalogo. Rezultati poskusov kažejo bistveno večje izboljšave vrhunske natančnosti v primerjavi s tradicionalnimi najsodobnejšimi pristopi.', 'ha': "Ga aikin da aka nuna wa masu husũma, surinai mai nĩsa yana da wata hanyoyi mai sha'awa zuwa ta ƙiƙiro data da aka rubũta shi da gane salon da matsayin da ba'a sani ba. QXml To, in addu'ar da shirin ayuka, wannan aiki yana bãyar da wani noveli nonparametric Bayesian formulan wa aikin. Matarin jarrabai na nuna mafiya girma ga taƙaita na sarki ko kuma mafi kyauta a kan halin-halin-sanar.", 'he': 'למשימה של חיפוש מערכות יחסים, פיקוח רחוק הוא גישה יעילה לייצור נתונים מסומנים על ידי התאמת בסיס הידע עם טקסטים חינם. העיקר של זה הוא בעיה מאתגרת בלתי מושלמת מסווג עם תווים נדירים ורעשים. כדי להתמודד עם האתגר, העבודה הזו מציגה צורה לא פרמטרית בייזית חדשה למשימה. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שיפורים מדויקים גבוהים ביותר בהרבה על גישות המסורתיות של המצב האמנתי.', 'jv': 'Saiki nggambar nggambar Kemerdekaan Rong Bapak buddy kanggo nganggo perbudhakan iki, nggawe iki dadi mpungan bukane dadi nonparametris bayesi nggo nggawe barang nggo nggawe Ngucap perintah langkung banjur akeh langkung akeh banter kanggo ngerasahan kanggo ngerasahan kanggo didasahan langkung sampek.', 'bo': 'For the task of relation extraction, distant supervision is an efficient approach to generate labeled data by aligning knowledge base with free texts. འདིའི་རྨང་གཞིས་ནི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཆེ་བ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆེ་བ་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཤིག་རེད། To address the challenge, this work presents a novel nonparametric Bayesian formulation for the task. ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དེ་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་མཐོང་ཚད་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཏུ་མཐོང'}
{'en': 'Temporal dynamics of semantic relations in word embeddings : an application to predicting armed conflict participants', 'ar': 'الديناميات الزمنية للعلاقات الدلالية في حفلات الزفاف: تطبيق للتنبؤ بالمشاركين في النزاع المسلح', 'fr': 'Dynamique temporelle des relations sémantiques dans les intégrations de mots\xa0: une application pour prédire les participants à un conflit armé', 'pt': 'Dinâmica temporal de relações semânticas em word embeddings: uma aplicação para prever participantes de conflitos armados', 'es': 'Dinámica temporal de las relaciones semánticas en la incrustación de palabras: una aplicación para predecir los participantes en conflictos armados', 'ja': '単語埋め込みにおける意味関係の時間動態：武力紛争参加者を予測するためのアプリケーション', 'zh': '词嵌中语义时动,占武装冲突参与者之用', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग में शब्दार्थ संबंधों की अस्थायी गतिशीलता: सशस्त्र संघर्ष प्रतिभागियों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक आवेदन', 'ru': 'Временная динамика семантических отношений в словарных вложениях: приложение для прогнозирования участников вооруженного конфликта', 'ga': 'Dinimic ama an chaidrimh shéimeantaigh i neadú focal: feidhm chun rannpháirtithe coinbhleachta armtha a thuar', 'ka': 'სიტყვების ინტერმენტიკური განსაზღვრების ტემპორალური დინამიკა: პროგრამა, რომელიც გადაწყვება გასაზღვრებელი კონფლიქტური მოთავსებელი', 'hu': 'Szemantikai kapcsolatok idődinamikája a szóbeágyazásokban: alkalmazás a fegyveres konfliktusok résztvevőinek előrejelzésére', 'el': 'Χρονική δυναμική σημασιολογικών σχέσεων στην ενσωμάτωση λέξεων: εφαρμογή στην πρόβλεψη συμμετεχόντων ένοπλων συγκρούσεων', 'it': "Dinamica temporale delle relazioni semantiche negli embedding di parole: un'applicazione per predire i partecipanti ai conflitti armati", 'lt': 'Temporal dynamics of semantic relations in word embeddings: an application to predicting armed conflict participants', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру үшін семантикалық қатынастарының тұмандық динамикасы: құрылған қатынасшыларды таңдау үшін қолданба', 'mk': 'Привремена динамика на семантичките односи во вклучувањето на зборови: апликација за предвидување на учесниците во вооружените конфликти', 'ms': 'Temporal dynamics of semantic relations in word embeddings: an application to predicting armed conflict participants', 'ml': 'വാര്\u200dത്തില്\u200d അകത്തേക്കുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം', 'mt': 'Dinamika temporali tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi fl-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem: applikazzjoni għat-tbassir tal-parteċipanti fil-kunflitti armati', 'mn': 'Зөвхөн хэлбэрийн харилцааны температур динамик: цэргийн зөрчилдөөн оролцогчдыг таамаглах хэрэгсэл.', 'no': 'Temporalt dynamikk for semantiske relasjonar i ordinnbygging: eit program for å forhåndsvisa arme konflikt deltakarar', 'pl': 'Czasowa dynamika relacji semantycznych w osadzeniach słów: aplikacja do przewidywania uczestników konfliktu zbrojnego', 'ro': 'Dinamica temporală a relațiilor semantice în încorporarea cuvintelor: o aplicație pentru predicția participanților la conflictele armate', 'sr': 'Temporalna dinamika semantičkih odnosa u rečima ugrađenja: aplikacija za predviđanje učesnika oružanih sukoba', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් වල: ආයුධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න අව', 'so': 'Midowga ku meelgaarka ah ee xiriirka semantika ee word embeddings: codsiga la sii sheegayo kuwa ka qayb gala dagaallada armed', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கியில் காலாவதியான தொடர்புகளின் தற்காலிக இயந்திரம்:', 'sv': 'Temporal dynamik av semantiska relationer i ord inbäddningar: en tillämpning för att förutsäga väpnade konfliktdeltagare', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی رابطہ کی تغییر تغییرات لکھنے میں: اسلحہ اختلاف شرکت کرنے والوں کی پیش بینی کے لئے ایک کاروبار', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hoạt động thời gian của mối quan hệ theo ngữ nghĩa trong sự ràng buộc từ: một ứng dụng dự đoán xung đột vũ trang', 'da': 'Temporal dynamik af semantiske relationer i ord embeddings: en applikation til at forudsige væbnede konfliktdeltagere', 'hr': 'Temporalna dinamika semantičkih odnosa u uključenju riječi: zahtjev za predviđanje učesnika oružanih sukoba', 'nl': 'Tijdelijke dynamiek van semantische relaties in woordembeddingen: een toepassing op het voorspellen van deelnemers aan gewapende conflicten', 'bg': 'Времева динамика на семантичните отношения в вграждането на думи: приложение за предсказване на участниците във въоръжен конфликт', 'id': 'Dinamika temporal dari hubungan semantis dalam pembangunan kata: aplikasi untuk memprediksi peserta konflik bersenjata', 'de': 'Temporale Dynamik semantischer Beziehungen in Worteinbettungen: eine Anwendung zur Vorhersage bewaffneter Konfliktteilnehmer', 'ko': '단어가 중어의 관계를 삽입하는 시간동력학: 무장 충돌 참여자의 응용을 예측한다', 'fa': 'تغییرات زمانی رابطه\u200cهای semantic در ابتدایی کلمات: یک کاربرد برای پیش\u200cبینی از شرکتگران مبارزه\u200cهای مسلح', 'sw': 'Utawala wa muda mfupi wa mahusiano ya kimapenzi katika maneno yanayoingia: matumizi ya kutabiri washiriki wa migogoro ya silaha', 'sq': 'Dinamika përkohore e marrëdhënieve semantike në përfshirjet e fjalëve: një aplikim për parashikimin e pjesëmarrësve të konfliktit të armatosur', 'tr': 'Semantik guramlaryň semantik baglaýyşlaryň dinamiki: silahly çatışma işgärlerini täze etmek üçin bir uygulama', 'az': 'Sözlüklər içərisində semantik ilişkilərin müddətli dinamiki: silahlı münafiqlərə tədbir etmək üçün uyğulama', 'bn': 'শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে সেমান্টিক সম্পর্কের দৈর্ঘ্য: সশস্ত্র সংঘাতের অংশগ্রহণকারীদের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী', 'af': 'Tydelike dinamiek van semantiese relasies in woord inbettings: ֳ¢ֲ€ֲ™n toepassing om gewapende konflikte deelnaders te voorskou', 'ca': "Dinàmica temporal de les relacions semàntiques en l'incorporació de paraules: una aplicació per predir els participants en conflictes armats", 'am': 'በንግግር ውስጥ የsemantic ግንኙነት አቀማመጥ: የጦር ግንኙነት ተጋሪዎችን ለመጠየቅ ፕሮግራም', 'bs': 'Temporalna dinamika semantičkih odnosa u riječima ugrađenja: prijava za predviđanje učesnika oružanih sukoba', 'hy': 'Temporal dynamics of semantic relations in word embeddings: an application to predicting armed conflict participants', 'et': 'Semantiliste suhete ajaline dünaamika sõnade manustamises: rakendus relvastatud konfliktis osalejate ennustamiseks', 'cs': 'Časová dynamika sémantických vztahů ve slovních vloženích: aplikace pro predikci účastníků ozbrojeného konfliktu', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten semanttisten suhteiden aikadynamiikka: sovellus aseellisten konfliktien osallistujien ennustamiseen', 'jv': 'dynamics-output-type', 'he': 'דינמיקה זמנית של יחסים סמנטיים בתכניות מילים: יישום לחזות משתתפים בקונפליקטים חמושים', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'sk': 'Časovna dinamika semantičnih odnosov v besednih vdelavah: aplikacija za napovedovanje udeležencev oboroženih spopadov', 'bo': 'semantic relations in word embedding: an application to predict armed conflict participants'}
{'en': 'This paper deals with using word embedding models to trace the temporal dynamics of semantic relations between pairs of words. The set-up is similar to the well-known analogies task, but expanded with a time dimension. To this end, we apply incremental updating of the models with new training texts, including incremental vocabulary expansion, coupled with learned transformation matrices that let us map between members of the relation. The proposed approach is evaluated on the task of predicting insurgent armed groups based on geographical locations. The gold standard data for the time span 19942010 is extracted from the UCDP Armed Conflicts dataset. The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة استخدام نماذج تضمين الكلمات لتتبع الديناميكيات الزمنية للعلاقات الدلالية بين أزواج من الكلمات. الإعداد مشابه لمهمة القياس المعروفة ، لكن تم توسيعه مع بُعد زمني. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقوم بتطبيق التحديث التدريجي للنماذج بنصوص تدريبية جديدة ، بما في ذلك التوسع التدريجي للمفردات ، إلى جانب مصفوفات التحويل المكتسبة التي تتيح لنا التخطيط بين أعضاء العلاقة. يتم تقييم النهج المقترح على أساس مهمة التنبؤ بالجماعات المسلحة المتمردة على أساس المواقع الجغرافية. البيانات المعيارية الذهبية للفترة الزمنية 1994-2010 مستخرجة من مجموعة بيانات UCDP Armed Conflicts. تظهر النتائج أن الطريقة مجدية وتتفوق على خطوط الأساس ، ولكن لا يزال هناك عمل مهم يتعين القيام به.', 'fr': "Cet article traite de l'utilisation de modèles d'intégration de mots pour tracer la dynamique temporelle des relations sémantiques entre des paires de mots. La configuration est similaire à la tâche des analogies bien connue, mais étendue avec une dimension temporelle. À cette fin, nous appliquons une mise à jour incrémentielle des modèles avec de nouveaux textes de formation, y compris une extension incrémentielle du vocabulaire, associée à des matrices de transformation apprises qui nous permettent de cartographier les membres de la relation. L'approche proposée est évaluée sur la base de la tâche de prédire les groupes armés insurgés en fonction de leur emplacement géographique. Les données étalon-or pour la période 1994—2010 sont extraites de l'ensemble de données UCDP Armed Conflicts. Les résultats montrent que la méthode est réalisable et surpasse les niveaux de référence, mais aussi qu'un travail important reste à faire.", 'pt': 'Este artigo trata do uso de modelos de incorporação de palavras para traçar a dinâmica temporal das relações semânticas entre pares de palavras. A configuração é semelhante à conhecida tarefa de analogias, mas expandida com uma dimensão de tempo. Para tanto, aplicamos atualização incremental dos modelos com novos textos de treinamento, incluindo expansão incremental de vocabulário, juntamente com matrizes de transformação aprendidas que permitem mapear entre os membros da relação. A abordagem proposta é avaliada na tarefa de prever grupos armados insurgentes com base em localizações geográficas. Os dados padrão ouro para o período de 1994 a 2010 são extraídos do conjunto de dados de Conflitos Armados da UCDP. Os resultados mostram que o método é viável e supera as linhas de base, mas também que ainda há um trabalho importante a ser feito.', 'es': 'Este artículo trata sobre el uso de modelos de incrustación de palabras para trazar la dinámica temporal de las relaciones semánticas entre pares de palabras. La configuración es similar a la conocida tarea de analogías, pero ampliada con una dimensión temporal. Con este fin, aplicamos la actualización incremental de los modelos con nuevos textos de entrenamiento, incluida la expansión incremental del vocabulario, junto con matrices de transformación aprendidas que nos permiten mapear entre los miembros de la relación. El enfoque propuesto se evalúa en función de la tarea de predecir los grupos armados insurgentes en función de su ubicación geográfica. Los datos de referencia para el período 1994—2010 se extraen del conjunto de datos de conflictos armados de la UCDP. Los resultados muestran que el método es factible y supera a las líneas de base, pero también que aún queda mucho trabajo por hacer.', 'ja': 'この論文では、単語埋め込みモデルを使用して、単語ペア間の意味関係の時間動態をトレースすることについて扱う。設定はよく知られているアナロジータスクに似ていますが、時間ディメンションで拡張されています。この目的のために、私たちは、増分語彙拡張を含む新しいトレーニングテキストを含むモデルの増分更新を適用し、学習された変換マトリックスとともに、関係のメンバー間のマッピングを行います。提案されたアプローチは、地理的位置に基づいて反乱武装組織を予測するタスクで評価されます。1994 -2010年の時間スパンのゴールド標準データは、UCDP Armed Conflictsデータセットから抽出されます。この結果は、この方法が実現可能であり、ベースラインを上回ることを示していますが、まだ重要な作業が残っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文涉用词嵌模以踪迹词对间语义时动。 宜设类于众所知,而广日月维度。 是以模范之增量,新练文本,包增量词汇广大,加以学习转矩阵,映射于成人之间。 议曰:据地占团体。 1994-2010年时间跨度黄金之数,从UCDP武装冲突数集取之。 结果表明可,优于基线,而事有待成者。', 'ru': 'Данная работа посвящена использованию моделей вложения слов для прослеживания временной динамики семантических отношений между парами слов. Настройка аналогична известной задаче аналогий, но расширена с временным измерением. С этой целью мы применяем постепенное обновление моделей новыми учебными текстами, включая постепенное расширение словарного запаса, в сочетании с изученными матрицами преобразования, которые позволяют нам составить карту между членами отношения. Предлагаемый подход оценивается на основе задачи прогнозирования повстанческих вооруженных групп на основе географических местоположений. Данные по золотому стандарту за период 1994–2010 годов взяты из набора данных по вооруженным конфликтам УКГП. Результаты показывают, что этот метод является практически осуществимым и превосходит исходные показатели, но при этом еще предстоит проделать важную работу.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर शब्दों के जोड़े के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों की अस्थायी गतिशीलता का पता लगाने के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का उपयोग करने से संबंधित है। सेट-अप प्रसिद्ध उपमाओं के कार्य के समान है, लेकिन एक समय आयाम के साथ विस्तारित है। इस अंत के लिए, हम नए प्रशिक्षण ग्रंथों के साथ मॉडल के वृद्धिशील अद्यतन को लागू करते हैं, जिसमें वृद्धिशील शब्दावली विस्तार शामिल है, जो सीखा परिवर्तन आव्यूहों के साथ युग्मित होता है जो हमें संबंध के सदस्यों के बीच मैप करने देता है। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन भौगोलिक स्थानों के आधार पर विद्रोही सशस्त्र समूहों की भविष्यवाणी करने के कार्य पर किया जाता है। 1994-2010 की अवधि के लिए स्वर्ण मानक डेटा यूसीडीपी सशस्त्र संघर्ष डेटासेट से निकाला जाता है। परिणाम बताते हैं कि विधि संभव है और बेसलाइन को मात देती है, लेकिन यह भी कि महत्वपूर्ण काम अभी भी किया जाना बाकी है।', 'ga': 'Baineann an páipéar seo le húsáid a bhaint as samhlacha leabaithe focal chun dinimic ama an chaidrimh shéimeantaigh idir péirí focal a rianú. Tá an leagan amach cosúil leis an tasc analógach aithnidiúla, ach leathnaíodh é le toise ama. Chuige sin, cuirimid nuashonrú incriminteach ar na samhlacha i bhfeidhm le téacsanna oiliúna nua, lena n-áirítear leathnú incriminteach stór focal, in éineacht le maitrísí claochlaithe foghlamtha a ligeann dúinn léarscáiliú idir baill an choibhneasa. Déantar an cur chuige atá beartaithe a mheas ar an tasc grúpaí armtha insurgent a thuar bunaithe ar láithreacha geografacha. Baintear na sonraí caighdeánacha óir don tréimhse ama 1994-2010 as tacar sonraí Coinbhleachtaí Armtha UCDP. Léiríonn na torthaí go bhfuil an modh indéanta agus go sáraíonn sé na bunlínte, ach freisin go bhfuil obair thábhachtach fós le déanamh.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a szavak párjai közötti szemantikai kapcsolatok időbeli dinamikájának nyomon követésére foglalkozik. A felállítás hasonló a jól ismert analógiák feladathoz, de idődimenzióval bővítve. Ennek érdekében a modellek fokozatos frissítését alkalmazzuk új képzési szövegekkel, beleértve a fokozatos szókincsbővítést is, párosulva tanult transzformációs mátrixokkal, amelyek lehetővé teszik a kapcsolat tagjai közötti feltérképezést. A javasolt megközelítést a lázadó fegyveres csoportok előrejelzésének feladata alapján értékelik. Az 1994-2010-es időtartamra vonatkozó aranyszabású adatokat az UCDP fegyveres konfliktusok adatkészletéből nyerik ki. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a módszer megvalósítható és meghaladja az alapvető értékeket, ugyanakkor azt is, hogy fontos munka van még hátra.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία ασχολείται με τη χρήση μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για την ανίχνευση της χρονικής δυναμικής των σημασιολογικών σχέσεων μεταξύ ζευγαριών λέξεων. Η ρύθμιση είναι παρόμοια με την γνωστή εργασία αναλογίων, αλλά επεκτάθηκε με μια χρονική διάσταση. Για το σκοπό αυτό, εφαρμόζουμε βαθμιαία ενημέρωση των μοντέλων με νέα εκπαιδευτικά κείμενα, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αύξησης του λεξιλογίου, σε συνδυασμό με μαθημένους πίνακες μετασχηματισμού που μας επιτρέπουν να χαρτογραφήσουμε μεταξύ των μελών της σχέσης. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση αξιολογείται με βάση το καθήκον πρόβλεψης εξεγερμένων ένοπλων ομάδων με βάση γεωγραφικές τοποθεσίες. Τα δεδομένα χρυσού προτύπου για το χρονικό διάστημα 1994-2010 εξάγονται από το σύνολο δεδομένων ενόπλων συγκρούσεων UCDP. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος είναι εφικτή και ξεπερνά τις βασικές γραμμές, αλλά και ότι σημαντικό έργο παραμένει ακόμα να γίνει.', 'lt': 'This paper deals with using word embedding models to trace the temporal dynamics of semantic relations between pairs of words.  Įrengimas panašus į gerai žinomą analogijos užduotį, tačiau išplėstas laiku. To this end, we apply incremental updating of the models with new training texts, including incremental vocabulary expansion, coupled with learned transformation matrices that let us map between members of the relation.  Siūlomas požiūris vertinamas atsižvelgiant į užduotį numatyti sukilėlių ginkluotas grupes pagal geografines vietoves. Iš UCDP ginkluotų konfliktų duomenų rinkinio išimami 1994–2010 m. standartiniai aukso duomenys. The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.', 'it': "Questo articolo si occupa dell'utilizzo di modelli di embedding di parole per tracciare le dinamiche temporali delle relazioni semantiche tra coppie di parole. Il set-up è simile al noto compito delle analogie, ma ampliato con una dimensione temporale. A tal fine, applichiamo l'aggiornamento incrementale dei modelli con nuovi testi formativi, compresa l'espansione incrementale del vocabolario, accoppiata con matrici di trasformazione apprese che ci permettono di mappare tra i membri della relazione. L'approccio proposto è valutato sul compito di prevedere i gruppi armati insorti in base alle posizioni geografiche. I dati gold standard per il periodo 1994-2010 sono estratti dal set di dati UCDP Armed Conflicts. I risultati dimostrano che il metodo è fattibile e supera le linee di base, ma anche che resta ancora da fare un lavoro importante.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз сөздерді ендіру үлгілерін қолдану үшін бірнеше сөздер арасындағы симантикалық қатынастың уақытша динамикасын қадағалау үшін қолданылады. Жоспарлау керек аналогиялар тапсырмасына ұқсас, бірақ уақыт өлшемімен кеңейтілді. Бұл үшін біз үлгілерді жаңа оқыту мәтіндерімен көптеген жаңарту үлгілерін қолданамыз, сондай-ақ көптеген сөздердің кеңейтуі және қатынастың мүшелерінің арасында картасын жасауға болады. Келтірілген тәсілі географиялық орналасуында негізделген жергілікті қоршау топтарды тапсырмасына бағалады. 1994- 2010 уақыт бойынша алтын стандартты деректері UCDP Күшін Қайшылық Деректер жиынынан таратылады. Нәтижелер әдісі мүмкін және негізгі сызықтарды жасайды, сондай-ақ маңызды жұмыс әлі жасалмайды.', 'mk': 'This paper deals with using word embedding models to trace the temporal dynamics of semantic relations between pairs of words.  The set-up is similar to the well-known analogies task, but expanded with a time dimension.  За оваа цел, применуваме постојано ажурирање на моделите со нови тексти за обука, вклучувајќи и постојано проширување на речникот, заедно со научени трансформациски матрици кои ни овозможуваат да мапираме меѓу членовите на односот. Предложениот пристап се проценува во врска со задачата да се предвидат вооружени бунтовници врз основа на географските локации. Златните стандардни податоци за времето 1994-2010 се извлекуваат од податоците на УКДП за вооружени конфликти. The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini berurusan dengan menggunakan model penyembedding perkataan untuk jejak dinamik sementara hubungan semantik antara pasangan perkataan. The set-up is similar to the well-known analogies task, but expanded with a time dimension.  To this end, we apply incremental updating of the models with new training texts, including incremental vocabulary expansion, coupled with learned transformation matrices that let us map between members of the relation.  The proposed approach is evaluated on the task of predicting insurgent armed groups based on geographical locations.  Data piawai emas untuk jangkauan masa 1994-2010 dikekstrak dari set data konflik bersenjata UCDP. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa kaedah ini boleh dilakukan dan melampaui garis dasar, tetapi juga bahawa kerja penting masih perlu dilakukan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ വാക്ക് എപ്പോഡിങ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു സെറ്റോപ്പ് പരിചയപ്പെട്ട അനാലജിക്കങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന് പോലെ ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി, പുതിയ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചെയ്ത് മോഡലുകളുടെ പുതിയ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പുതുക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വിദ്വേഷിക്കുന്ന സുഹൃത്തുക്കളുടെ ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവചിക് 1994-2010 സ്പാന്\u200d സ്പാനിലേക്കുള്ള സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡാര്\u200dഡേറ്റ് ഡേറ്റാഡാ യുസിഡിപിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടു അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ളതും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jittratta l-użu ta’ mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem biex tiġi traċċata d-dinamika temporali tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi bejn pari ta’ kliem. L-istruttura hija simili għall-kompitu tal-analogiji magħruf sew, iżda espandita b’dimensjoni taż-żmien. Għal dan il-għan, aħna napplikaw aġġornament inkrementali tal-mudelli b’testi ġodda ta’ taħriġ, inkluż espansjoni inkrementali vokabulari, flimkien ma’ matriċi ta’ trasformazzjoni mgħallma li jippermettulna nimmappjaw bejn il-membri tar-relazzjoni. L-approċċ propost huwa evalwat fuq il-kompitu tat-tbassir ta’ gruppi armati insurġenti bbażati fuq postijiet ġeografiċi. Id-dejta standard tad-deheb għall-perjodu ta’ żmien 1994-2010 hija estratta mis-sett tad-dejta tal-UCDP dwar il-Kunflitti Armati. Ir-riżultati juru li l-metodu huwa fattibbli u jaqbeż il-linji bażi, iżda wkoll li għad irid isir xogħol importanti.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტის შესახებ სიტყვების შესახებ მოდელების გამოყენება სიტყვების შესახებ სიმბოლოების ტემპალური დინამიკის შესახებ. სერტიფიკაცია უცნობილი ანალოგიის რაოდენობისთვის მსგავსია, მაგრამ განზომილება დროის განზომილებით. ამ მიზეზით, ჩვენ მოდელების ინტერმენტიური ახალგაზრულება ახალგაზრულება ახალგაზრულებული ტექსტებით, რომლებიც ინტერმენტიური სიტყვებულის გაფართვა, დავყენებთ სწავლილი ტრანფორმა პროგრამების მიზეზი გადაწყვეტილია გეგოგოფიკალური ადგილებების დაბაზედ დაკავშირების დასაწყვეტილება. 1994- 2010 წლის დოლანდის სტანდარტური მონაცემები UCDP დაკავშირებული კონფლიქტურების მონაცემებისგან გამოყენება. წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ მეტი შესაძლებელია და უფრო მეტი გავაკეთებს ბაზის ხაზები, მაგრამ ასევე რომ მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო მუშაო დავაკეთება', 'pl': 'Artykuł zajmuje się wykorzystaniem modeli osadzania słów do śledzenia dynamiki czasowej relacji semantycznych między parami słów. Ustawa jest podobna do dobrze znanego zadania analogicznego, ale rozszerzona o wymiar czasowy. W tym celu stosujemy stopniową aktualizację modeli o nowe teksty treningowe, w tym przyrostowe rozszerzanie słownictwa, w połączeniu z nauczonymi macierzami transformacji, które pozwalają nam mapować pomiędzy członkami relacji. Proponowane podejście ocenia się na zadaniu przewidywania powstańczych grup zbrojnych w oparciu o lokalizacje geograficzne. Złote standardy danych dla okresu 1994-2010 są ekstraktowane z zbioru danych UCDP Armed Conflicts. Wyniki pokazują, że metoda ta jest wykonalna i przewyższa linię bazową, ale także że ważna praca pozostaje do wykonania.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare se ocupă de utilizarea modelelor de încorporare a cuvintelor pentru a urmări dinamica temporală a relațiilor semantice dintre perechi de cuvinte. Setarea este similară cu sarcina cunoscută de analogii, dar extinsă cu o dimensiune de timp. În acest scop, aplicăm actualizarea graduală a modelelor cu noi texte de instruire, inclusiv extinderea incrementală a vocabularului, împreună cu matrici de transformare învățate care ne permit să mapăm între membrii relației. Abordarea propusă este evaluată pe baza sarcinii de a anticipa grupurile armate insurgente pe baza locațiilor geografice. Datele standard de aur pentru perioada 1994-2010 sunt extrase din setul de date UCDP Armed Conflicts. Rezultatele arată că metoda este fezabilă și depășește liniile de referință, dar și că mai rămân lucrări importante de făcut.', 'no': 'Denne papiret gjer med bruk av ord-innebygde modeller for å spora tidlegare dynamikk av semantiske forhold mellom par ord. Oppsettet er liknande til den kjende analogiske oppgåva, men utvida med ei tidsstyrke. I denne slutten bruker vi incrementalt oppdatering av modelane med nye opplæringstekstar, inkludert incrementalt ordbokutviding, kopla med lærte transformeringsmatriser som la oss kartera mellom medlemmer i relasjonen. Den foreslåde tilnærminga er evaluert på oppgåva for å foreslå bøymde arme grupper basert på geografiske stader. Goldstandard data for tidspunktet 1994- 2010 vert pakka ut frå UCDP Armed Conflicts dataset. Resultatet viser at metoden er feilig og utfører baselinjene, men også at viktige arbeid fortsatt skal utførast.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хоёр үгийн хоорондын семантик харилцааны хугацааны динамикийг судлах үед үг нэвтрэх загваруудыг ашиглаж байна. Оролцоо нь мэдэгдэх аналогичдын ажилтай адилхан, гэхдээ цаг хэмжээсүүдтэй нэмэгдсэн. Үүний тулд бид шинэ сургалтын текстэй загварын нэмэлт шинэчлэлүүдийг ашиглаж, нэмэлт үгийн дэвшилт, харилцааны гишүүн хоорондоо газрын зурагтай сургалтын өөрчлөлтийн матрицуудыг хамтдаа ашиглаж байна. Хэрэглэгдсэн арга баримт газрын байр суурь газрын тойрноос үндсэн зөрчилдөгчдийн цэрэг бүлгүүдийг таамаглах ажил дээр үнэлдэг. 1994-2010 оны цаг хугацааны алтын стандарт өгөгдлийг UCDP зөрчилдөөн өгөгдлийн санаас гаргасан. Үүний үр дүнд энэ арга нь суурь шугам дээр ажиллаж чадах боломжтой, бас чухал ажил нь үргэлж ажиллах хэрэгтэй.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa loola macaamiloodaa isticmaalka midowga word-embedding models si uu u dabarayo ku meelgaarka ah xiriirka semantika ee u dhexeeya labo hadal. Heeganka waxaa la mid ah shaqada la yaqaan kalluumeysiga, laakiin waxaa lagu kordhiyey muddo waqti ah. Taas darteed waxaynu u codsanaynaa qoraalka waxbarashada cusub, kuwaas oo ka mid ah kordhiska hadalka sii-koritaanka, waxaana la xiriirnaa macluumaadka beddelashada ee la bartay, kaas oo aynu ku sawiranno xubnaha xiriirka. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeedo waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa shaqada ku saabsan ka sii sheegashada kooxaha dagaalka degdega ah oo ku saleysan meelo geographical ah. Macluumaadka standardka dahabka ee xilliga 1994-2010 waxaa laga soo saaray macluumaadka dagaalladaha ee UCDP. Abaalku waxay muuqataa in qaabku suurtogal yahay oo uu sameynayo aasaasiga, laakiin sidoo kale shaqada muhiimka ah weli waa in la sameeyaa.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir se bavi korištenjem modela uključujući riječi kako bi pratili temporalnu dinamiku semantičkih odnosa između parova riječi. Ustava je slična poznatom analogijskom zadatku, ali se proširila sa vremenskim dimenzijom. Za taj cilj, primjenjujemo incrementalno aktualizaciju modela sa novim tekstima obuke, uključujući incrementalnu proširenje rečenika, zajedno sa naučenim matricama transformacije koja nam dopušta da mapiramo između članova odnosa. Predloženi pristup se procjenjuje na zadatku predviđanja oružanih grupa uvrednika na temelju geografskih lokacija. Zlatni standardni podaci za vrijeme 1994-2010 izvlaèeni su iz podataka UCDP-a o oružanim konfliktima. Rezultati pokazuju da je metod moguć i iznosi osnovne linije, ali i da još uvek treba obaviti važan posao.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar att använda ordinbäddningsmodeller för att spåra tidsdynamiken i semantiska relationer mellan ordpar. Uppsättningen liknar den välkända analoguppgiften, men utökas med en tidsdimension. För detta ändamål tillämpar vi stegvis uppdatering av modellerna med nya utbildningstexter, inklusive stegvis vokabulärexpansion, tillsammans med lärda transformationsmatriser som låter oss kartlägga mellan medlemmarna i relationen. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet utvärderas utifrån uppgiften att förutsäga upproriska väpnade grupper baserat på geografiska platser. Guldstandarddata för perioden 1994-2010 hämtas från UCDP:s dataset Armed Conflicts. Resultaten visar att metoden är genomförbar och överträffar baslinjerna, men också att viktigt arbete fortfarande återstår att göra.', 'ta': 'Name இந்த அமைப்பு நன்கு அறியப்பட்ட ஆராய்ந்திகள் செயல்பாடு போன்றது, ஆனால் ஒரு நேர பரிமாணத்துடன் விரிவாக்கப்பட்டது. இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் புதிய பயிற்சி உரைகளைக் கொண்டு மாதிரிகளின் புதிய புதுப்பித்தலை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அதிகப்பட்ட சொல்வளை விரிவாக்கம், கற் புவியியல் இடங்களை அடிப்படையிலான பிரிவாக்கும் ஆயுத்த குழுக்களை முன்னோக்கிய செயல்பாட்டின் மீது மதிப்ப 1994-2010 ஸ்பென் நேரத்திற்கான தங்க இயல்பான தரவு UCDP கையாள தகவல் அமைப்பிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்டது. முடிவு', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න. සැට්ස් එක හොඳට දන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාවක් වැඩක් වගේ, නමුත් වෙලාවක් විසින් විසින් විසින්. මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි අලුත් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂණාවක් සමග අවසානය අවසානය කරනවා මොඩල් එක්ක අවසානය කරනවා, විශාල ශබ්ද විස්තරය සමග, සම්බන්ධ විස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ භාවිත්\u200dයාත්මක ස්ථානයේ අධිරූපයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කණ්ඩායමක් අනුවෙන්  1994- 2010 වෙලාවේ සුන්දු ප්\u200dරමාණ තොරතුරු UCDP ආයුධ ප්\u200dරදේශ දත්ත සැකයෙන් නිකාලා තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'ur': 'This paper deals with word embedding models to trace the temporal dynamics of semantic relations between two words. سائٹ-اپ معلوم آنلوژی کام کے مطابق برابر ہے، لیکن ایک وقت اندازہ سے پھیلا گیا ہے. اس کے لئے ہم مدلکوں کے اضافہ کرنے کے لئے نو ترسین ٹیکسٹ کے ساتھ اضافہ کریں گے، شامل ہوتے ہیں اضافہ آواز پھیلانے والی پھیلانے والی پھیلانے والی پھیلانے والی متریس کے ساتھ جو ہمیں رابطہ کے اعضاں کے درمیان نقشه بنا پیشنهاد کی تقریبا جغرافی جگہ موقعیت پر بنیاد رکھنے کے کام پر قدرت کی جاتی ہے. 1994-2010 کے لئے سونڈ استاندارڈ ڈاٹ اٹھایا گیا ہے UCDP سلاح کنفال ڈاٹ سٹ سے۔ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ قابل ہے اور بنیادی لینوں سے زیادہ قابل ہے، لیکن اس طرح بھی کہ اہم کام یہاں تک کر رہے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Shunday qilib, biz modellarni yangi taʼminlov matnlari bilan yangi taʼminlovchi textlarni qo'llab qo'llamiz, yangi so'zlar soʻzni kengaytirish va o'rganish matrikalarni o'rganadigan o'zgarishlar bilan o'rganadigan matrikalar bilan qo'llamiz. Name 1994-2010 yil paytidagi gold standard maʼlumot UCDP qo'llanmalar maʼlumotidan olingan. Natijalarni koʻrsatish mumkin va asosiy tugmalarini bajaradi, ammo muhim ishni ham bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến việc sử dụng các mô hình ghép từ để theo dõi tính khí thời gian của quan hệ theo chữ ngữ. Thiết lập tương tự với công việc tương tự, nhưng mở rộng với chiều thời gian. Để đạt được mục đích, chúng tôi mở rộng các mô hình với các văn bản đào tạo mới, bao gồm việc mở rộng vốn từ, kết hợp với các tấm bản đồ chuyển đổi đã cho phép chúng tôi chia ra các thành viên của mối quan hệ. Kế hoạch này được đánh giá dựa trên nhiệm vụ dự đoán các nhóm vũ trang nổi dậy dựa trên địa điểm. Đội dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn vàng cho thời gian chiến 1994-Chỗ này được lấy từ bộ giá trí liệu của UCDD. Kết quả cho thấy phương pháp này khả thi và hoàn thiện bản lề, nhưng cũng là việc quan trọng vẫn chưa được hoàn thành.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда използването на модели за вграждане на думи за проследяване на времевата динамика на семантичните отношения между двойки думи. Настройката е подобна на добре познатата задача за аналогии, но разширена с времево измерение. За тази цел прилагаме постепенно актуализиране на моделите с нови учебни текстове, включително постепенно разширяване на речника, съчетано с научени трансформационни матрици, които ни позволяват да картографираме членовете на връзката. Предложеният подход се оценява по задачата за предвиждане на въоръжени групировки на бунтовници въз основа на географските местоположения. Данните от златния стандарт за периода 1994-2010 г. са извлечени от набора от данни за въоръжени конфликти на ПСОК. Резултатите показват, че методът е осъществим и превъзхожда базовите линии, но също така остава важна работа за вършене.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel behandelt het gebruik van woordinbeddingsmodellen om de temporele dynamiek van semantische relaties tussen woordparen te traceren. De opzet is vergelijkbaar met de bekende analogietak, maar uitgebreid met een tijdsdimensie. Hiervoor passen we incrementele updates van de modellen toe met nieuwe trainingsteksten, inclusief incrementele woordenschat uitbreiding, gekoppeld aan aangeleerde transformatiematrices waarmee we tussen leden van de relatie in kaart kunnen brengen. De voorgestelde aanpak wordt geëvalueerd op de taak van het voorspellen van opstandige gewapende groepen op basis van geografische locaties. De gouden standaardgegevens voor de tijdspanne 1994-2010 zijn geëxtraheerd uit de UCDP Armed Conflicts dataset. De resultaten laten zien dat de methode haalbaar is en de basislijnen overtreft, maar ook dat er nog veel werk moet worden gedaan.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir se bavi korištenjem modela uključujući riječi kako bi pratili temporalnu dinamiku semantičkih odnosa između parova riječi. Ustava je slična poznatim zadatkom analogije, ali se proširila s vremenskim dimenzijom. Za taj cilj, primjenjujemo incrementalno aktualiziranje modela sa novim tekstima obuke, uključujući povećanu proširenje riječnika, zajedno s učenim matricama transformacije koja nam omogućava mapu između članova odnosa. Predloženi pristup procjenjuje se na zadatku predviđanja oružanih grupa protivnika na temelju geografskih lokacija. Zlatni standardni podaci za vrijeme 1994-2010 izvlačeni su iz podataka UCDP-a o oružanim konfliktima. Rezultati pokazuju da je metod moguć i nadmašuje početne linije, ali i da je i dalje trebao obaviti važan posao.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskæftiger sig med at bruge ordindlejringsmodeller til at spore den tidsmæssige dynamik af semantiske relationer mellem ord par. Opsætningen ligner den velkendte analogiopgave, men udvides med en tidsdimension. Til dette formål anvender vi trinvis opdatering af modellerne med nye træningstekster, herunder trinvis ordforråd udvidelse, kombineret med lærte transformationsmatricer, der lader os kortlægge mellem medlemmer af relationen. Den foreslåede tilgang evalueres ud fra opgaven med at forudsige oprørsvæbnede grupper baseret på geografiske placeringer. Guldstandarddataene for perioden 1994-2010 er udvundet fra UCDP Armed Conflicts datasæt. Resultaterne viser, at metoden er gennemførlig og overstiger basislinjerne, men også, at vigtigt arbejde stadig skal gøres.', 'ko': '본고는 단어 삽입 모델을 이용하여 단어가 간의 의미 관계에 대한 시간 동태를 추적한다.모두가 알고 있는 클래스 작업과 유사하지만 시간 차원을 확장합니다.이를 위해 우리는 새로운 교육 텍스트를 사용하여 모델에 대해 증량 업데이트를 하고 증량 어휘 확장을 포함하며 학습의 전환 행렬을 포함하여 관계 구성원들 사이에서 비추도록 한다.지리적 위치에 따라 반란 무장단체의 임무를 예측하고 제안한 방법을 평가했다.1994~2010년 금본위 데이터는 UCDP 무장 충돌 데이터 세트에서 추출되었습니다.그 결과 이 방법은 실행할 수 있고, 성능은 기선보다 우수하지만, 여전히 중요한 일을 해야 한다.', 'sw': 'Kanisa hili linahusiana na kutumia mifano ya maneno yaliyoandikwa ili kutafuta nguvu za muda wa muda za mahusiano ya kimapenzi kati ya maneno mawili. Mpango huo unafanana na kazi inayofahamika, lakini umepandishwa kwa muda. Kwa mwisho huu, tunatumia upya mpya wa mifano kwa kutumia ujumbe mpya wa mafunzo, ikiwa ni pamoja na kuongezeka kwa lugha, pamoja na vigezo vya mabadiliko ambavyo vinaturuhusu ramani kati ya wanachama wa uhusiano. Mpango huu unapendekezwa unavutiwa katika jukumu la kutabiri makundi ya wanajeshi wenye silaha kwa kutumia maeneo ya kijiografia. Takwimu za kiwango cha dhahabu kwa kipindi cha mwaka 1994-2010 zimetolewa kutoka kwenye seti ya taarifa za vita vya UCDP. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hiyo inawezekana inaonyesha msingi, lakini pia kwamba kazi muhimu bado inaendelea kufanywa.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz semantik sözlerin arasyndaky temas etmek üçin sözleri ekleýän nusgalary ulanýar. Sahypa düzümlenme tanyş analogiler täblisasine meňzeş, ýöne wagt ölçüsi bilen genişletildir. Bu yüzden, yeni eğitim metinleri ile modelleri artımlı güncellemeyi uygulayıp, artımsal sözler genişletilmesi ve ilişkisinin üyeleri arasında haritalaştırmaya çalışıyoruz. Ýagtylamak isleýän metody geografiýaly ýerlere daýanýan ýaragly taýýarlary tahmin etmek üçin deňlenýär. 1994-2010 ýyldan bäri bellenen altyn standart maglumat Netijeler çözüm üýtgebilir we baseliniň üstüni çykarýandygyny görkezýär, ýöne hem wajyp işiň edil hem edil bolmalydygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Hierdie papier verwerk met die gebruik van woord inbêring modele om die tydelike dinamike van semantiese verhouding tussen paar woorde te spor. Die opstelling is gelyk aan die bekende analogies taak, maar uitgevou met 'n tydsdimensie. Op hierdie einde, toewend ons inkremensiele opdatering van die modele met nuwe onderwerp teks, insluitend inkremensiele woordeboek uitbreiding, saam met leer transformasie matrikse wat laat ons kaart tussen lede van die verwanting. Die voorgestelde toepassing is uitgewerk op die taak van voorskou van oorweldige arme groepe gebaseer op geografiese liggings. Die goud standaard data vir die tyd span 1994- 2010 is uitgevoer van die UCDP Armed Conflicts dataset. Die resultate wys dat die metode moontlik is en uitvoer die basisline, maar ook dat belangrike werk nog steeds om te doen.", 'id': 'Kertas ini berurusan dengan menggunakan model embedding kata untuk melacak dinamika temporal hubungan semantis antara sepasang kata. Set-up mirip dengan tugas analogi yang dikenal, tetapi diperbesar dengan dimensi waktu. Untuk tujuan ini, kami menerapkan pemutakhiran incremental model dengan teks latihan baru, termasuk ekspansi vokbulari incremental, ditambah dengan matris transformasi belajar yang membiarkan kita peta antara anggota hubungan. The proposed approach is evaluated on the task of predicting insurgent armed groups based on geographical locations.  Data standar emas untuk jangkauan waktu 1994-2010 diekstraksi dari dataset konflik bersenjata UCDP. The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschäftigt sich mit der Verwendung von Wort-Einbettungsmodellen, um die zeitliche Dynamik semantischer Beziehungen zwischen Wortpaaren nachzuvollziehen. Der Aufbau ist ähnlich der bekannten Analogieaufgabe, aber um eine Zeitdimension erweitert. Dazu wenden wir inkrementelle Aktualisierung der Modelle mit neuen Trainingstexten an, einschließlich inkrementeller Vokabelerweiterung, gekoppelt mit erlernten Transformationsmatrizen, die es uns ermöglichen, zwischen Mitgliedern der Beziehung abzubilden. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz wird anhand der Aufgabe evaluiert, aufständische bewaffnete Gruppen anhand geografischer Standorte vorherzusagen. Die Goldstandarddaten für die Zeitspanne 1994-2010 werden aus dem UCDP Armed Conflicts Datensatz extrahiert. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Methode machbar ist und die Basislinien übertrifft, aber auch, dass noch wichtige Arbeit zu tun ist.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በሁለት ቃላት መካከል የስምአዊ ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ በቃላት የሚጨመር ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም ይቆማል፡፡ አካባቢው የሚታወቀው ትምህርት አድራጊ ነው፤ ነገር ግን በጊዜው ክፍል ይዘረጋል፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት አዲስ ትምህርት ጽሑፎችን እና አዲስ ትምህርት ጽሑፎችን እናስጠጋለን፣ እና በአካባቢው አባላት መካከል ካርታ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የጂዮግራፊ ቦታዎች በመሠረት ላይ የአስቃቂው ጦር ጉባኤ ላይ በመስጠት ላይ ነው፡፡ The gold standard data for the time span 1994-2010 is extracted from the UCDP Armed Conflicts dataset.  The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای وارد کردن کلمه برای ردیابی دینامیک موقتی رابطه\u200cهای سیمانتیک بین جفت کلمه است. تنظیم شبیه به کار آنالوژی شناخته شده است، اما با یک اندازه زمانی گسترده شده است. برای این قسمت، ما اضافه کردن اضافه\u200cای از مدل\u200cها را با متن\u200cهای آموزش جدید انجام می\u200cدهیم، شامل گسترش vocabulary اضافه\u200cای، با متریس تغییر آموزش یاد گرفته\u200cایم که اجازه می\u200cدهیم بین اعضای ارتباط نقشه بگیریم. این روش پیشنهاد بر روی وظیفه پیش بینی گروه\u200cهای مسلح مخالف بر اساس محل جغرافی ارزیابی می\u200cشود. داده\u200cهای استاندارد طلا برای مدت زمان ۱۹۹۴-۲۰۰۱ از مجموعه داده\u200cهای مخالفت مسلح UCDP اخراج می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش ممکن است و بیشتر از خطوط پایین\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد، ولی همچنین کار مهم هنوز باید انجام شود.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër merret me përdorimin e modeleve të përfshirjes së fjalëve për të gjurmuar dinamikën temporale të marrëdhënieve semantike midis çifteve fjalësh. Konfigurimi është i ngjashëm me detyrën e njohur të analogjisë, por është zgjeruar me një dimension kohore. Për këtë qëllim, ne aplikojmë përditësimin gradual të modeleve me tekste të reja trajnimi, duke përfshirë zgjerimin gradual të fjalorëve, së bashku me matricat e mësuara të transformimit që na lejojnë të hartojmë midis anëtarëve të marrëdhënies. Përqasja e propozuar vlerësohet në detyrën e parashikimit të grupeve të armatosura rebelë bazuar në vendet gjeografike. Të dhënat e standartit të artë për periudhën kohore 1994-2010 nxirren nga grupi i të dhënave për konfliktet e armatosura të UCDP-së. Rezultatet tregojnë se metoda është e realizueshme dhe përmirëson linjat bazë, por gjithashtu se ende mbetet punë e rëndësishme për të bërë.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, iki söz arasındakı semantik ilişkisinin temprali dinamikini izləmək üçün sözlər içərisində modellər istifadə etmək üçün işləyir. Ayarlama tanınmış analogi işləri kimidir, amma zamanın ölçüsü ilə genişlənir. Bu səbəbdə, modellərin yeni təhsil məktumları ilə artıq güncellənməsini istifadə edirik, həmçinin artıqlıq sözlərin genişlənməsi və öyrəndiyi transformasyon matrikləri ilə birləşdiririk ki, əlaqələrin üyeləri arasında mapa edək. Önülləşdirilmiş tərzim geografik məqamlarına dayanan insurgent silahlı qrupların tərzini təmin etməsi üçün təmin edilir. 1994-2010 üçün qızıl standart verilər UCDP silahlı konflikt verilər qutusundan çıxarılır. Sonuçlar metodların mümkün olduğunu göstərir və baz çətinlərini daha üstün edər, lakin hələ də möhüm işlər hələ də bitməlidir.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir se bavi korištenjem modela uključujući riječi kako bi pratili temporalnu dinamiku semantičkih odnosa između parova riječi. Ustava je slična poznatom analogijskom zadatku, ali se proširila sa vremenskim dimenzijom. Za taj cilj, primjenjujemo incrementalno aktualiziranje modela sa novim tekstima obuke, uključujući incrementalnu proširenje riječnika, zajedno sa naučenim matricama transformacije koja nam dopušta da mapiramo između članova odnosa. Predloženi pristup se procjenjuje na zadatku predviđanja oružanih grupa protivnika na temelju geografskih lokacija. Zlatni standardni podaci za vrijeme 1994-2010 izvlačeni su iz podataka UCDP-a o oružanim konfliktima. Rezultati pokazuju da je metod moguć i nadmašuje osnovne linije, ali i da je i dalje trebao obaviti važan posao.', 'hy': 'This paper deals with using word embedding models to trace the temporal dynamics of semantic relations between pairs of words.  The set-up is similar to the well-known analogies task, but expanded with a time dimension.  Այս նպատակով, մենք կիրառում ենք նոր վարժեցման տեքստերի հետ կապված մոդելների անընդհատ վերականգնումը, ներառյալ բառարանի անընդհատ ընդլայնումը, միասին սովորված վերափոխման մատրիկների հետ, որոնք թույլ են տալիս մեզ քարտեզագրել հարաբերության The proposed approach is evaluated on the task of predicting insurgent armed groups based on geographical locations.  1994-2010 թվականի ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալները հեռացվում են UCPD-ի զենք հակամարտությունների տվյալներից: The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি শব্দ ব্যবহার করে সাম্প্রতিক যোগাযোগের মধ্যে দুই শব্দের মধ্যে সাম্প্রতিক সম্পর্কের মধ্যে সামান্যিক ডায়া সেট-আপ সেট পরিচিত বিশ্লেষণ কাজের সমতুল্য, কিন্তু সময়ের মাধ্যমে বিস্তৃত। এই পর্যন্ত আমরা নতুন প্রশিক্ষণ টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে মডেলের ক্রমাগত আপডেট প্রয়োগ করি, যার মধ্যে ক্রমাগত শব্দভাণ্ডার বিস্তারিত, যার মধ্যে শিখা যায় পরিবর্তনে এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ভৌগোগ্রাফিকিক অবস্থানের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে বিদ্রোহী সশস্ত্র গ্রুপের প্রতি ভবিষ্যদ ইউসিডিপি সশস্ত্র সংঘর্ষের ডাটাসেট থেকে সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার ডাটা উৎপাদন করা হয়েছে। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই পদ্ধতি সম্ভব এবং বেসেলাইনের বাইরে প্রদর্শন করা যায়, কিন্তু এছাড়াও গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ এখনো করা যা', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä käsitellään sanaupotusmallien käyttöä sanaparien semanttisten suhteiden ajallisen dynamiikan jäljittämiseen. Asennus muistuttaa tunnettua analogiatehtävää, mutta laajenee aikaulottuvuudella. Tätä varten sovellamme mallien asteittaista päivittämistä uusilla harjoitusteksteillä, mukaan lukien asteittaista sanaston laajennusta sekä opittuja transformaatiomatriiseja, joiden avulla voimme kartoittaa suhdetta jäsenten välillä. Ehdotettua lähestymistapaa arvioidaan tehtävästä ennustaa kapinallisia aseellisia ryhmiä maantieteellisen sijainnin perusteella. Vuosien 1994–2010 kultastandarditiedot on saatu UCDP:n aseellisten konfliktien aineistosta. Tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmä on toteuttamiskelpoinen ja ylittää lähtöarvot, mutta myös että tärkeää työtä on vielä tehtävä.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá využitím modelů vkládání slov ke sledování časové dynamiky sémantických vztahů mezi páry slov. Nastavení je podobné známému úkolu analogie, ale rozšířeno o časovou dimenzi. Za tímto účelem aplikujeme inkrementální aktualizaci modelů o nové tréninkové texty, včetně inkrementálního rozšíření slovní zásoby, ve spojení s naučenými transformačními maticemi, které nám umožňují mapovat mezi členy vztahu. Navržený přístup je hodnocen na úkolu predikce povstaleckých ozbrojených skupin na základě geografických poloh. Data zlatého standardu pro časové rozpětí 1994-2010 jsou extrahována z datové sady ozbrojených konfliktů UCDP. Výsledky ukazují, že metoda je proveditelná a překonává základní linie, ale také že důležitá práce stále zbývá udělat.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös käsitletakse sõnade manustamise mudelite kasutamist sõnapaaride semantiliste suhete ajalise dünaamika jälgimiseks. Seadistus on sarnane tuntud analoogiaülesandega, kuid laiendatud ajalise mõõtmega. Selleks rakendame mudelite täiendavat uuendamist uute koolitustekstidega, sealhulgas täiendava sõnavara laiendamisega, koos õppitud transformatsioonimatriksidega, mis võimaldavad kaardistada seose liikmeid. Kavandatud lähenemisviisi hinnatakse ülesandeks ennustada mässulisi relvastatud rühmitusi geograafilise asukoha alusel. Ajavahemiku 1994–2010 kuldstandardi andmed on välja võetud ÜRO relvastatud konfliktide andmekogumist. Tulemused näitavad, et meetod on teostatav ja ületab lähtejooni, kuid samuti on vaja teha veel olulist tööd.', 'ca': "This paper deals with using word embedding models to trace the temporal dynamics of semantic relations between pairs of words.  La configuració és similar a la tasca d'analògies coneguda, però s'expandeix amb una dimensió temporal. Per això, aplicam actualitzacions incrementals dels models amb nous textos d'entrenament, incloent l'expansió incremental del vocabulari, juntament amb matrius de transformació aprengutes que ens permeten mapejar entre membres de la relació. The proposed approach is evaluated on the task of predicting insurgent armed groups based on geographical locations.  The gold standard data for the time span 1994-2010 is extracted from the UCDP Armed Conflicts dataset.  The results show that the method is feasible and outperforms the baselines, but also that important work still remains to be done.", 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתמודד עם השימוש בדוגמנים של מילים מעורבים כדי לאתר את הדינמיקה הזמנית של יחסים סמנטיים בין זוגות מילים. The set-up is similar to the well-known analogies task, but expanded with a time dimension.  למטרה זו, אנו משתמשים בהעדכון משותף של הדוגמנים עם טקסטים אימונים חדשים, כולל התרחבות מילים משותפת, יחד עם מטריסי שינוי למדורים שמאפשרים לנו למפות בין חברי הקשר. הגישה המוצעת מוערכת על המשימה של לחזות קבוצות חמושות מורדים מבוססות על מיקומות גיאוגרפיים. הנתונים הסטנדרטיים של הזהב במהלך התקופה 1994-2010 מווצאים מהקבוצת הנתונים של אוניברסיטת אוניברסיטת הסכסוכים הנחמדים. התוצאות מראות שהשיטה אפשרית ויוציאה מעל השורות הבסיסיות, אך גם שעדיין נשאר עבודה חשובה לעשות.', 'sk': 'Prispevek obravnava uporabo modelov vgradnje besed za sledenje časovne dinamike semantičnih relacij med parom besed. Nastavitev je podobna dobro znanemu nalogu analogij, vendar se razširi s časovno dimenzijo. V ta namen uporabljamo postopno posodabljanje modelov z novimi učnimi besedili, vključno s postopno širitvijo besedišča, skupaj z učenimi transformacijskimi matricami, ki nam omogočajo kartiranje med člani relacije. Predlagani pristop je ocenjen glede na nalogo napovedovanja uporniških oboroženih skupin na podlagi geografskih lokacij. Zlati standardni podatki za obdobje 1994–2010 so pridobljeni iz nabora podatkov o oboroženih spopadih UCDP. Rezultati kažejo, da je metoda izvedljiva in presega izhodiščne vrednosti, vendar je treba opraviti še pomembno delo.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke yi amfani da misãlai da aka embedded cikin magana dõmin ya trace dinamikin mutane na mutane tsakanin biyu. An daidaita wani shiri kamar aikin wanda aka san mai fassarawa, kuma an shimfiɗa shi da wani lokaci. Ga wannan, Munã amfani da kwamfyuta masu ƙaranci cikin misalin da littãfin na tsari-yanzu, ikin faɗi na ƙaranci, da matricikin musamman da aka sanar da musamman da za'a karta tsakanin ma'abũta mazaɓa. Ana ƙaddara aikin wanda aka yi niyyar a kan aikin ka yi bayani ga jama'a masu sãduwa da ma'abũta silaha, a kan wurãren wurãren geographical. Dakatan nauyi na zĩnãriya wa zaman shawara 1994-2010 aka samu daga data na UCDD ɗin muramman da ake yi. Mataimakin za'a nuna cewa metoden a iya iya gabatar da kuma yana fara bakin, kuma amma, za'a iya tsaye da aikin muhimmi.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop The set-up is like the letextattr task" Kita ngomong, kita aplike atualizasi nggawe model karo textual atualizasi nggawe Genjer-jejer EMAIL OF TRANSLATORS Rejalaké wong mengko nganggep sistem sing dianggonan lan ora bisa dianggonan iki, njuk ngono cara sing mau basa njaluk.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་ནང་གི་མིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་དེ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་འདྲ་བ། ཡིན་ནའང་དུས་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་ཞིག་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པ། མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་མིག་རྩལ་ཆེན་དུ་ཡར་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་སྐྱེལ་བ་ཡོད་པ་ལས། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་རྣམ་པ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་དང་། 1994-2010 དུས་ཚོད་ལྟ་བུའི་རིང་གི་ཚད་གཞིའི་གནས་སྟངས་སྤྱད་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱ་ལམ་དེ་བྱས་ཆོས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་། གལ་ཆེན་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་ད'}
{'en': 'Dynamic Entity Representations in Neural Language Models', 'ar': 'تمثيلات الكيان الديناميكي في نماذج اللغة العصبية', 'pt': 'Representações de Entidades Dinâmicas em Modelos de Linguagem Neural', 'es': 'Representaciones dinámicas de entidades en modelos de lenguaje neuronal', 'fr': "Représentations dynamiques d'entités dans les modèles de langage neur", 'hi': 'तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल में गतिशील इकाई प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ru': 'Динамические представления сущностей в моделях нейронных языков', 'ga': 'Léirithe Aonáin Dinimiciúla i Múnlaí Neural Language', 'zh': '神经言模形之实体也', 'ja': '神経言語モデルにおける動的エンティティ表現', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δυναμικές αναπαραστάσεις οντοτήτων σε μοντέλα νευρωνικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Dinamikus entitás-reprezentációk neurális nyelvi modellekben', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni dinamiche di entità nei modelli di linguaggio neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық тіл үлгілерінде динамикалық нысандарды таңдау', 'mk': 'Динамични претставувања на ентитетите во моделите на невралниот јазик', 'lt': 'Dinaminio subjekto atstovavimai neurologinių kalbų modeliuose', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Entiti Dinamik dalam Model Bahasa Neural', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ Entità Dinamika fil-Mudelli tal-Lingwa Newrali', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ഡൈനാമിക് എന്റിറ്റി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Динамик Entity Representations in Neural Language Models', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Reprezentacje podmiotów dynamicznych w modelach języka neuronowego', 'sr': 'Представљања динамичних предмета у моделима невралних езика', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea dinamică a entităților în modelele de limbaj neural', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරාල් භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් වලින් විශාල ප්\u200dරධානය', 'so': 'Dadka u soo jeeda noocyada afka Neural', 'sv': 'Dynamiska entitetsrepresentationer i neurala språkmodeller', 'ta': 'நெயுரல் மொழி மாதிரிகளில் Dynamic Entity Representations', 'ur': 'نئورل زبان موڈل میں داینامیک اینتیٹی روشنی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'da': 'Dynamiske enhedsrepræsentationer i neurale sprogmodeller', 'hr': 'Predstavi dinamičnih područja u modelima nervnog jezika', 'nl': 'Dynamische entiteitsrepresentaties in neurale taalmodellen', 'bg': 'Динамични представи на същества в неврални езикови модели', 'id': 'Perwakilan Entitas Dinamik dalam Model Bahasa Neural', 'de': 'Dynamische Entitätendarstellungen in neuronalen Sprachmodellen', 'fa': 'نمایش عناصر دینامیک در مدل زبان عصبی', 'sw': 'Replaces in Neural language Models', 'ko': '신경 언어 모델에서의 동적 실체 표시', 'tr': 'Nusgala Diller', 'af': 'Stencils', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuese të njësisë dinamike në modelet e gjuhës nervore', 'hy': 'Նյարդային լեզվի մոդելներում դինամիկ միավորների ներկայացումները', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'bn': 'নিউরাল ভাষার মডেলে ডাইনামিক এন্টিটি প্রতিনিধি', 'ca': "Representacions d'entitats dinàmiques en models de llenguatge neural", 'cs': 'Reprezentace dynamických entit v neuronových jazykových modelech', 'et': 'Dünaamilised olemi esindused neurokeele mudelites', 'fi': 'Dynaamiset entiteettiedustukset hermokielimalleissa', 'az': 'N√∂ral Dil Modell…ôrind…ô dinamik Entity Representations', 'bs': 'Predstavi dinamičnih područja u neuronskim modelima', 'jv': 'dialogs-action', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'sk': 'Dinamične predstavitve entitet v modelih nevronskega jezika', 'he': 'מייצגים של יחידה דינמית במודלים של שפה נוירולית', 'bo': 'དབུལ་སྒྱུར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Understanding a long document requires tracking how entities are introduced and evolve over time. We present a new type of language model, EntityNLM, that can explicitly model entities, dynamically update their representations, and contextually generate their mentions. Our model is generative and flexible ; it can model an arbitrary number of entities in context while generating each entity mention at an arbitrary length. In addition, it can be used for several different tasks such as language modeling, coreference resolution, and entity prediction. Experimental results with all these tasks demonstrate that our model consistently outperforms strong baselines and prior work.', 'es': 'Entender un documento largo requiere hacer un seguimiento de cómo se introducen y evolucionan las entidades con el tiempo. Presentamos un nuevo tipo de modelo de lenguaje, EntityNLM, que puede modelar entidades explícitamente, actualizar dinámicamente sus representaciones y generar sus menciones contextualmente. Nuestro modelo es generativo y flexible; puede modelar un número arbitrario de entidades en contexto y generar cada mención de entidad con una longitud arbitraria. Además, se puede utilizar para varias tareas diferentes, como el modelado del lenguaje, la resolución de correferencias y la predicción de entidades. Los resultados experimentales con todas estas tareas demuestran que nuestro modelo supera sistemáticamente las bases de referencia sólidas y el trabajo previo.', 'fr': "Comprendre un long document nécessite de suivre la manière dont les entités sont introduites et évoluent au fil du temps. Nous présentons un nouveau type de modèle de langage, EntityNLM, qui peut modéliser explicitement des entités, mettre à jour dynamiquement leurs représentations et générer leurs mentions de manière contextuelle. Notre modèle est génératif et flexible\xa0; il peut modéliser un nombre arbitraire d'entités en contexte tout en générant chaque mention d'entité à une longueur arbitraire. En outre, il peut être utilisé pour différentes tâches telles que la modélisation du langage, la résolution de coréférence et la prédiction d'entités. Les résultats expérimentaux pour toutes ces tâches démontrent que notre modèle surpasse constamment les valeurs de base solides et les travaux antérieurs.", 'ar': 'يتطلب فهم مستند طويل تتبع كيفية تقديم الكيانات وتطورها بمرور الوقت. نقدم نوعًا جديدًا من نموذج اللغة ، EntityNLM ، الذي يمكنه بشكل صريح وضع نماذج للكيانات ، وتحديث تمثيلاتها ديناميكيًا ، وإنشاء إشاراتها حسب السياق. نموذجنا توليدي ومرن ؛ يمكنه نمذجة عدد تعسفي من الكيانات في السياق أثناء إنشاء ذكر كل كيان بطول عشوائي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يمكن استخدامه للعديد من المهام المختلفة مثل نمذجة اللغة ودقة المرجع وتوقع الكيان. تظهر النتائج التجريبية لجميع هذه المهام أن نموذجنا يتفوق باستمرار على خطوط الأساس القوية والعمل السابق.', 'pt': 'Compreender um documento longo requer o rastreamento de como as entidades são introduzidas e evoluem ao longo do tempo. Apresentamos um novo tipo de modelo de linguagem, EntityNLM, que pode modelar entidades explicitamente, atualizar dinamicamente suas representações e gerar suas menções contextualmente. Nosso modelo é generativo e flexível; ele pode modelar um número arbitrário de entidades no contexto enquanto gera cada menção de entidade em um comprimento arbitrário. Além disso, ele pode ser usado para várias tarefas diferentes, como modelagem de linguagem, resolução de correferência e previsão de entidade. Resultados experimentais com todas essas tarefas demonstram que nosso modelo supera consistentemente linhas de base fortes e trabalhos anteriores.', 'hi': 'एक लंबे दस्तावेज़ को समझने के लिए ट्रैकिंग की आवश्यकता होती है कि समय के साथ संस्थाओं को कैसे पेश किया जाता है और विकसित किया जाता है। हम एक नए प्रकार का भाषा मॉडल, EntityNLM प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो स्पष्ट रूप से संस्थाओं को मॉडल कर सकता है, गतिशील रूप से उनके प्रतिनिधित्व को अपडेट कर सकता है, और प्रासंगिक रूप से उनके उल्लेख उत्पन्न कर सकता है। हमारा मॉडल उत्पादक और लचीला है; यह संदर्भ में संस्थाओं की एक मनमाना संख्या मॉडल कर सकते हैं, जबकि एक मनमाना लंबाई पर प्रत्येक इकाई का उल्लेख उत्पन्न. इसके अलावा, इसका उपयोग कई अलग-अलग कार्यों जैसे भाषा मॉडलिंग, कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन और एंटिटी भविष्यवाणी के लिए किया जा सकता है। इन सभी कार्यों के साथ प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल लगातार मजबूत बेसलाइन और पूर्व कार्य से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Понимание длинного документа требует отслеживания того, как сущности внедряются и развиваются с течением времени. Мы представляем новый тип языковой модели, EntityNLM, которая может явно моделировать сущности, динамически обновлять их представления и контекстно генерировать их упоминания. Наша модель является генеративной и гибкой; она может моделировать произвольное количество сущностей в контексте, генерируя каждое упоминание сущности в произвольной длине. Кроме того, он может использоваться для нескольких различных задач, таких как языковое моделирование, разрешение ядра и прогнозирование сущности. Экспериментальные результаты по всем этим задачам показывают, что наша модель последовательно превосходит сильные базовые линии и предыдущую работу.', 'ja': '長い文書を理解するには、エンティティがどのように導入され、時間の経過とともに進化するかを追跡する必要があります。私たちは、エンティティを明示的にモデル化し、表現を動的に更新し、コンテキストでメンションを生成することができる新しいタイプの言語モデル、EntityNLMを提示します。私たちのモデルは生成的で柔軟です。コンテキスト内の任意の数のエンティティをモデル化し、各エンティティが任意の長さでメンションを生成できます。さらに、それは、言語モデリング、コアリファレンス解決、およびエンティティ予測などのいくつかの異なるタスクに使用することができます。これらすべてのタスクの実験結果は、当社のモデルが強力なベースラインと以前の作業を一貫して上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '知长文档须随实体引入,及随时演变。 发一新型之语,EntityNLM可显式而建模之,动而新之,生于上下文。 吾形者,生也;吾形者,生也。 上下文中建模,以任情生。 其外可施于数务,若言建模、共推理解析、实体。 凡此诸实验结果表明,始终优于强基线及前事。', 'ga': 'Chun doiciméad fada a thuiscint ní mór an chaoi a dtugtar isteach agus a n-éabhlóidíonn eintitis le himeacht ama a rianú. Cuirimid i láthair cineál nua de shamhail teanga, EntityNLM, atá in ann aonáin a shamhaltú go sainráite, a gcuid léiriúcháin a nuashonrú go dinimiciúil, agus a lua a ghiniúint i gcomhthéacs. Tá ár samhail ginideach agus solúbtha; is féidir leis líon treallach eintiteas a shamhaltú i gcomhthéacs agus gach aonán a lua go treallach. Ina theannta sin, is féidir é a úsáid le haghaidh roinnt tascanna éagsúla cosúil le samhaltú teanga, réiteach croí-chomhdhála, agus tuar aonáin. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha leis na tascanna seo go léir go sáraíonn ár múnla go seasta bonnlínte láidre agus obair roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'ძალიან დოკუმენტის გაგრძნობა უნდა დანახვა თუ როგორ ინტერტიკები დაიყენება და განვითარება დროში. ჩვენ ახალი ტიპი ენის მოდელი, EntityNLM, რომელიც შეუძლია გამოსახულებელად მოდელური ინტერტიები, დინამიკურად განახლება თავის გამოსახულებები, და შემდეგ მათი ამოსახულებების შექმნა ჩვენი მოდელი გენერაციურია და გრძნობელია; ეს შეიძლება კონტექსტში არბრიტური ელემენტების რაოდენობას მოდელუროთ, როცა ყოველ ელემენტის შესახებ არბრიტური სიგრძე. დამატებით, ეს შეიძლება გამოიყენება რამდენიმე განსხვავებული დავალებისთვის, როგორც ენის მოდელირება, წარმოდგენება და ინტერტის წარმოდგენება. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთ პვჱსლრართ ჟ გჟთფკთ რვჱთ პაბჲრთ ევმჲჟრთპარ, ფვ ნაქთწრ მჲევლ ოჲჟლვენჲ ნვ ოპაგთ ჟთლნთ ბაჱლთნთ თ ოპვეთ პაბჲრა.', 'hu': 'Egy hosszú dokumentum megértéséhez nyomon követni kell, hogy az entitások hogyan kerülnek bevezetésre és fejlődnek az idő során. Bemutatunk egy új típusú nyelvi modellt, az EntityNLM-et, amely kifejezetten modellezi az entitásokat, dinamikusan frissíti reprezentációikat, és kontextuálisan generálja említéseiket. Modellünk generációs és rugalmas; tetszőleges számú entitást modellezhet kontextusban, miközben minden entitás említést tetszőleges hosszúságban generál. Ezenkívül számos különböző feladathoz is használható, mint például nyelvmodellezés, coreferencia felbontás és entitás előrejelzés. Mindezekkel a feladatokkal kapcsolatos kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk következetesen felülmúlja az erős alapvetőségeket és a korábbi munkákat.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση ενός μεγάλου εγγράφου απαιτεί παρακολούθηση του τρόπου με τον οποίο οι οντότητες εισάγονται και εξελίσσονται με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Παρουσιάζουμε έναν νέο τύπο γλωσσικού μοντέλου, το οποίο μπορεί ρητά να μοντελοποιήσει οντότητες, να ενημερώσει δυναμικά τις αναπαραστάσεις τους και να δημιουργήσει τις αναφορές τους. Το μοντέλο μας είναι παραγωγικό και ευέλικτο. μπορεί να μοντελοποιήσει έναν αυθαίρετο αριθμό οντοτήτων στο πλαίσιο ενώ δημιουργεί κάθε αναφορά οντότητας σε αυθαίρετο μήκος. Επιπλέον, μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για διάφορες διαφορετικές εργασίες, όπως η μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών, η ανάλυση συσχετισμού και η πρόβλεψη οντότητας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα με όλες αυτές τις εργασίες δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σταθερά τις ισχυρές βάσεις και τις προηγούμενες εργασίες.', 'it': 'Comprendere un documento lungo richiede il monitoraggio di come le entità vengono introdotte e si evolvono nel tempo. Presentiamo un nuovo tipo di modello linguistico, EntityNLM, che può modellare esplicitamente le entità, aggiornare dinamicamente le loro rappresentazioni e generare contestualmente le loro menzioni. Il nostro modello è generativo e flessibile; può modellare un numero arbitrario di entità nel contesto generando ogni menzione di entità a una lunghezza arbitraria. Inoltre, può essere utilizzato per diverse attività diverse come la modellazione del linguaggio, la risoluzione della coreferenza e la previsione delle entità. I risultati sperimentali con tutti questi compiti dimostrano che il nostro modello supera costantemente le solide linee di base e il lavoro precedente.', 'lt': 'Siekiant suprasti ilgą dokumentą reikia stebėti, kaip subjektai įdiegiami ir vystomi laikui bėgant. Mes pristatome naują kalbos model į EntityNLM, kuris gali aiškiai modeliuoti subjektus, dinamiškai atnaujinti jų atstovavimus ir kontekstiniu požiūriu sukurti jų paminėjimus. Mūsų model is yra generacinis ir lankstus; it can model an arbitrary number of entities in context while generating each entity mention at an arbitrary length.  Be to, jis gali būti naudojamas kelioms skirtingoms užduotims, pvz., kalbų modeliavimui, koreferencijos pertvarkymui ir subjektų prognozei. Experimental results with all these tasks demonstrate that our model consistently outperforms strong baselines and prior work.', 'mk': 'Разбирањето на долг документ бара следење како ентитетите се воведени и еволуираат со текот на времето. Презентираме нов тип на јазички модел, EntityNLM, кој може експлицитно да ги моделира ентитетите, динамично да ги ажурира нивните претставувања и контекстно да ги генерира нивните спомени. Нашиот модел е генеративен и флексибилен; може да моделира арбитрален број ентитети во контекст, истовремено генерирајќи ги спомените на секој ентитет на арбитрален должина. Покрај тоа, истиот може да се користи за неколку различни задачи како што се јазичното моделирање, резолуцијата на соодветноста и предвидувањето на ентитетите. Експерименталните резултати со сите овие задачи покажуваат дека нашиот модел постојано ги надминува силните основни линии и претходната работа.', 'kk': 'Уақыт құжатты түсінуге бағдарламаларды уақытта қалай ендіру және өзгерту керек. Біз тіл үлгісін жаңа түрлі, EntityNLM үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл оның үлгісін түсіндіре алады, динамикалық түрлерін жаңарту және қазіргі уақытта олардың айтылуларын жасайды. Біздің моделіміз жасайтын және гибкілді. бұл әрбір нәтижесін өзінің ұзындығында жасау кезінде контекстікте тәуелсіз нәтижелер санын үлгілей алады. Қосымша, ол тіл моделігі, қасиеттердің айырмашылығы және нысандарды бақылау үшін бірнеше түрлі тапсырмалар үшін қолданылады. Барлық тапсырмалардың эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің күшті негізгі сызықтарды және алдыңғы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Memahami dokumen panjang memerlukan pengesan bagaimana entiti diperkenalkan dan berkembang melalui masa. Kami memperkenalkan jenis baru model bahasa, EntityNLM, yang boleh secara eksplicit model entiti, kemaskini dinamik perwakilan mereka, dan secara konteks menghasilkan sebutan mereka. Model kita adalah generatif dan fleksibel; ia boleh model bilangan entiti arbitrari dalam konteks semasa menjana setiap entiti disebut pada panjang arbitrari. Selain itu, ia boleh digunakan untuk beberapa tugas berbeza seperti pemodelan bahasa, resolusi keterangan, dan ramalan entiti. Hasil percubaan dengan semua tugas ini menunjukkan bahawa model kita secara konsisten melampaui garis dasar yang kuat dan kerja sebelumnya.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim ta’ dokument twil jeħtieġ li jiġi segwit kif l-entitajiet jiġu introdotti u jevolvu maż-żmien. Aħna nippreżentaw tip ġdid ta’ mudell lingwistiku, EntityNLM, li jista’ jimmudella espliċitament entitajiet, jaġġorna dinamikament ir-rappreżentanzi tagħhom, u jiġġenera kuntestwalment is-semmiet tagħhom. Il-mudell tagħna huwa ġenerattiv u flessibbli; tista’ timmudella numru arbitrarju ta’ entitajiet fil-kuntest filwaqt li tiġġenera kull entità msemmija f’tul arbitrarju. Barra minn hekk, jista’ jintuża għal diversi kompiti differenti bħall-mudell tal-lingwi, ir-riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza, u t-tbassir tal-entità. Experimental results with all these tasks demonstrate that our model consistently outperforms strong baselines and prior work.', 'mn': 'Урт баримт ойлгоход биетүүдийг цаг хугацаанд хэрхэн танилцуулж болон хөгжүүлэхийг хэрэгтэй. Бид хэл загварын шинэ төрлийн загвар, EntityNLM-г тайлбарлаж чадна. Энэ нь тодорхой загварын загварын загварын загварыг шинэчлүүлж чадна. Бидний загвар бол бүтээлч, сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй. биетүүд бүрийг аргагүй урттай бий болгож байх үед аргагүй биетүүдийн тоо загварчлах боломжтой. Үүнээс гадна хэл загварчлалыг, зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэлтийг, бүтэц таамаглалыг зэрэг олон өөр үйл ажиллагаанд ашиглаж болно. Эдгээр бүх ажлын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь үргэлж хүчтэй суурь шугам болон өмнөх ажлын тухай илүүтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'ഒരു നീണ്ട രേഖയെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നത് സമയത്ത് എങ്ങനെ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നുവെന്നും കണ്ടുപിടിക് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് പ്രത്യക്ഷമായി മോഡല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് സാധിക്കും, അവരുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ പുതുതുക്കുന്നതും, അവരുടെ  നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ജനറലിനും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതുമാണ്; ഓരോ വസ്തുവിന്റെയും പ്രസ്താവിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഓരോ വസ്തുവിന്റെയും നീളം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിന് ഒരു അറട്ടി ഇതിനും കൂടാതെ, ഭാഷ മോഡലോഡിങ്, കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസല്\u200dമെഷന്\u200d, വസ്തുവിന്റെ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഇത് വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക്  എല്ലാ ജോലികളുമായി പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളിലും മു', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie długiego dokumentu wymaga śledzenia tego, jak podmioty są wprowadzane i ewoluowane w czasie. Prezentujemy nowy typ modelu językowego EntityNLM, który może wyraźnie modelować podmioty, dynamicznie aktualizować ich reprezentacje oraz kontekstowo generować ich wzmianki. Nasz model jest generatywny i elastyczny; Może modelować dowolną liczbę podmiotów w kontekście generując każdą wzmiankę o dowolnej długości. Ponadto może być używany do kilku różnych zadań, takich jak modelowanie językowe, rozdzielczość współzależności i przewidywanie jednostek. Wyniki eksperymentalne z tymi wszystkimi zadaniami pokazują, że nasz model konsekwentnie przewyższa silne linie bazowe i poprzednie prace.', 'no': 'For å forstå eit lang dokument krev å spora korleis einingar vert introdusert og utvikla over tid. Vi presenterer ein ny type språk- modell, EntityNLM, som kan eksplisisere modeller einingar, dynamisk oppdatere representasjonane sine, og kontekstvis lagar oppmerkingane sine. Modellen vårt er generert og fleksibel. kan det modelere eit tilfeldig tal på einingar i kontekst medan det genererar kvar eining som er mengd på ein tilfeldig lengd. I tillegg kan det brukast for fleire forskjellige oppgåver som språk modellering, koreferanse oppløysing og forhåndsvising av einingar. Eksperimentale resultat med alle desse oppgåvene viser at modellen vårt konsistent utfører sterke baselinjer og førre arbeid.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea unui document lung necesită urmărirea modului în care entitățile sunt introduse și evoluează în timp. Vă prezentăm un nou tip de model lingvistic, EntityNLM, care poate modela în mod explicit entitățile, actualiza dinamic reprezentările lor și genera contextual mențiunile lor. Modelul nostru este generativ și flexibil; poate modela un număr arbitrar de entități în context în timp ce generează fiecare mențiune de entitate la o lungime arbitrară. În plus, poate fi utilizat pentru mai multe sarcini diferite, cum ar fi modelarea limbajului, rezoluția corefenței și predicția entității. Rezultatele experimentale cu toate aceste sarcini demonstrează că modelul nostru depășește în mod constant liniile de bază puternice și activitatea anterioară.', 'sr': 'Razumevanje dugog dokumenta zahteva praćenje kako se entiteti uvede i razvijaju tokom vremena. Predstavljamo novi tip jezičkog model a, EntityNLM, koji može izraziti modele entiteta, dinamički aktualizirati njihove predstave, i u kontekstu stvoriti njihove spomena. Naš model je generativan i fleksibilan; može modelirati arbitrarni broj entiteta u kontekstu dok stvara svaku entitetu spominjanu na arbitrarnoj dužini. Osim toga, može se koristiti za nekoliko različitih zadataka poput jezičkog modela, rezolucije pristojnosti i predviđanja entitata. Eksperimentalni rezultati sa svim ovim zadacima pokazuju da naš model stalno iznosi jake osnovne linije i prije posla.', 'so': "Waxgarashada dukumenti dheer wuxuu u baahan yahay inaad soo socoto sida ay waxyaabuhu u soo bandhigaan oo ay u bedelaan waqti dheer. Tusaale cusub oo luqada ah, EntityNLM, kaas oo si cad u sameyn kara, oo si dabiicad u cusboonaysiinta qaabkooda, islamarkaasna si toos ah u abuuri karnaa macluumaadkooda. Tusaalkayagu waa wax dhaliya oo faa'iido leh; waxay sameyn kartaa lambarka cadaawayaasha ah marka lagu sameynayo dhererka cadaawayaasha. Waxaa intaas dheer oo lagu isticmaali karaa shaqooyin kala duduwan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan luuqada, go’aanka kaararka iyo wixii la soo sheegay. Imtixaanka oo dhamaan shaqaalahaas waxay muujiyaan in modellkayagu uu si joogto ah u sameeyo aasaasyo xoog leh iyo shaqo horay ah.", 'sv': 'Att förstå ett långt dokument kräver att man spårar hur entiteter introduceras och utvecklas över tid. Vi presenterar en ny typ av språkmodell, EntityNLM, som explicit kan modellera entiteter, dynamiskt uppdatera deras representationer och kontextuellt generera deras omnämnanden. Vår modell är generativ och flexibel. det kan modellera ett godtyckligt antal entiteter i sammanhanget samtidigt som varje entitetsomnämnande genereras med godtycklig längd. Dessutom kan den användas för flera olika uppgifter som språkmodellering, coreferencelopplösning och entitetsförutsägelse. Experimentella resultat med alla dessa uppgifter visar att vår modell konsekvent överträffar starka baslinjer och tidigare arbete.', 'ta': 'ஒரு நீண்ட ஆவணத்தை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பொருள்கள் எப்படி முன்னேற்றப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் முன்னேற்றப்படு நாம் ஒரு புதிய மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை கொண்டுள்ளோம். அது வெளிப்படையாக மாதிரி பொருள்கள், தானாகவே அவர்களுடைய குறிப்புகளை புதுப்பிக் எங்கள் மாதிரி உருவாக்குதல் மற்றும் பரிசுத்தமுள்ளது. அது ஒரு ஆர்டிக் நீளத்தில் ஒவ்வொரு உண்மையும் உருவாக்கும்போது ஒரு பிரிவின் எண்ணிக்கையை மாற்ற முடியும். மேலும், மொழி மாதிரிப்பு, குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் மற்றும் பொருள் முன்னோட்டம். அனைத்து பணிகளுடனும் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது நமது மாதிரி முறைமையிலும் வலிமை அடிப்படைகள் மற்றும் முன்', 'si': 'ලොකු දස්තාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා වෙලාවෙන් ඉන්න හා කොහොමද කියලා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. අපි අළුත් භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, ඇන්ටිටින් NLM, ඒක ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, ඔවුන අපේ නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය සහ හැකියාවක්; ඒකට පුළුවන් සංවේදනයේ සාමාන්\u200dය සංවේදනයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් හැම අංවේදනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. ඒවගේම, ඒක වෙනස් වෙනස් වැඩක් වැඩකට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්, භාෂාව මොඩොලින්, කෝරෙෆ්\u200dරෙෆෙර්ස් ර මේ සියලුම වැඩක් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ශක්', 'ur': 'ایک طویل دفتر سمجھنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ انٹیٹیوں کو کس طرح معلوم کیا جاتا ہے اور کس طرح تکامل کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہم ایک نو گونه زبان موڈل، EntityNLM کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو صریح موڈل کے ذریعے موڈل کر سکتا ہے، ان کی روشنی کے ساتھ ان کی روشنی کو اضافہ کر سکتا ہے، اور ان کے ذریعے اضافہ کر سکتا ہے. ہمارا نمونہ پیدا کرنے والا اور مہربان ہے اس کے ذریعہ ایک منصفات کی تعداد کی مدل کر سکتا ہے جب ہر ایک متحد کو ایک منصفات طول پر جوڑ رہا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ یہ بہت سی مختلف کاموں کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے جیسے زبان نمادلینگ، مہربانی رخصت اور انتظام. یہ سب کاموں کے ساتھ تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری مدل مضبوط بنسٹلین اور پہلے کام سے زیادہ مضبوط ہے۔', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Biz yangi tilning modeli, EntityNLM (EntityNLM) hozir bilan foydalanishi mumkin, uning tashkilotlarini aniqlab yangilash mumkin, va har doim ularning fikrlarini yaratish mumkin. Bizning modelmiz ijodkorlik va fleksiblik. @ info: whatsthis In addition, it can be used for several different tasks such as language modeling, coreference resolution, and entity prediction.  Bu hamma vazifalar bilan tajriba natijalari esa modelmiz bir qanchalik asboblar va oldingi ishni bajaradi.', 'vi': 'Hiểu được một tài liệu dài đòi hỏi theo dõi cách các thực thể được đưa vào và phát triển qua thời gian. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiểu mô hình ngôn ngữ mới, Entity NLM, người có thể mô tả trực tiếp các thực thể, thay đổi các biểu hiện của họ, và hiển nhiên tạo ra các chỉ thị. Cơ chế của chúng tôi là vi sinh và linh hoạt. nó có thể mô tả một số thực thể ngẫu nhiên trong ngữ cảnh, trong khi tạo ra mỗi thực thể tên tuổi ngẫu nhiên. Nó có thể được dùng cho nhiều công việc khác nhau như kiểu thiết kế ngôn ngữ, giảm hạn, và dự đoán về thực thể. Kết quả thí nghiệm với tất cả các công việc này cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta hoàn toàn vượt trội.', 'da': 'Forståelse af et langt dokument kræver sporing af, hvordan enheder introduceres og udvikles over tid. Vi præsenterer en ny type sprogmodel, EntityNLM, der eksplicit kan modellere enheder, dynamisk opdatere deres repræsentationer og kontekstuelt generere deres omtaler. Vores model er generativ og fleksibel. det kan modellere et vilkårligt antal enheder i kontekst, mens hver enhed omtales på en vilkårlig længde. Derudover kan det bruges til flere forskellige opgaver såsom sprogmodellering, coreferenceopløsning og entitetsforudsigelse. Eksperimentelle resultater med alle disse opgaver viser, at vores model konsekvent overgår stærke basislinjer og tidligere arbejde.', 'nl': 'Het begrijpen van een lang document vereist bijhouden hoe entiteiten worden geïntroduceerd en evolueren in de loop van de tijd. We presenteren een nieuw type taalmodel, EntityNLM, dat expliciet entiteiten kan modelleren, hun representaties dynamisch kan bijwerken en contextueel hun vermeldingen kan genereren. Ons model is generatief en flexibel; Het kan een willekeurig aantal entiteiten modelleren in context terwijl elke entiteitsvermelding op een willekeurige lengte wordt gegenereerd. Daarnaast kan het worden gebruikt voor verschillende taken, zoals taalmodellering, coreferentie resolutie en entiteitsvoorspelling. Experimentele resultaten met al deze taken tonen aan dat ons model consequent beter presteert dan sterke baselines en eerdere werkzaamheden.', 'bg': 'Разбирането на дълъг документ изисква проследяване как субектите се въвеждат и развиват с течение на времето. Представяме нов тип езиков модел, който може изрично да моделира обекти, динамично да актуализира техните представи и контекстуално да генерира споменаванията им. Нашият модел е генеративен и гъвкав; тя може да моделира произволен брой субекти в контекста, като същевременно генерира споменаването на всеки субект с произволна дължина. В допълнение, той може да се използва за няколко различни задачи като езиково моделиране, разделителна способност на кореференцията и прогнозиране на обекти. Експерименталните резултати с всички тези задачи показват, че нашият модел постоянно превъзхожда силните базови линии и предишната работа.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje dugog dokumenta zahtijeva praćenje načina uvođenja i razvoja entitata tijekom vremena. Predstavljamo novi tip jezičkog model a, EntityNLM, koji može izraziti modele entiteta, dinamički aktualizirati njihove predstave, i u kontekstu stvoriti njihove spomena. Naš model je generativan i fleksibilan; može modelirati proizvodnji broj entitata u kontekstu dok proizvodi svaku entitetu spominjanu na proizvodnjoj dužini. Osim toga, može se koristiti za nekoliko različitih zadataka poput jezičkog modela, rješavanja pristojnosti i predviđanja entitata. Eksperimentalni rezultati sa svim tim zadacima pokazuju da naš model stalno nadmašuje jake osnovne linije i prije posla.', 'id': 'Memahami dokumen panjang membutuhkan melacak bagaimana entitas diperkenalkan dan berevolusi dengan waktu. Kami mempersembahkan tipe baru dari model bahasa, EntityNLM, yang dapat secara eksplicit model entitas, secara dinamik memperbaharui perwakilan mereka, dan secara kontekstual menghasilkan sebutan mereka. Model kita adalah generatif dan fleksibel; dapat memmodelir sejumlah entitas secara arbitrar dalam konteks sementara menghasilkan setiap entitas menyebutkan pada panjang arbitrar. Selain itu, dapat digunakan untuk beberapa tugas yang berbeda seperti model bahasa, resolusi koreferensi, dan prediksi entitas. Hasil eksperimen dengan semua tugas ini menunjukkan bahwa model kita secara konsisten melampaui batas dasar yang kuat dan pekerjaan sebelumnya.', 'de': 'Um ein langes Dokument zu verstehen, müssen Sie nachverfolgen, wie Entitäten im Laufe der Zeit eingeführt und weiterentwickelt werden. Wir präsentieren eine neue Art von Sprachmodell, EntityNLM, die Entitäten explizit modellieren, ihre Repräsentationen dynamisch aktualisieren und ihre Erwähnungen kontextuell generieren kann. Unser Modell ist generativ und flexibel; Es kann eine beliebige Anzahl von Entitäten im Kontext modellieren, während jede Entitätserwähnung in beliebiger Länge generiert wird. Darüber hinaus kann es für verschiedene Aufgaben wie Sprachmodellierung, Coreferenzauflösung und Entitätsvorhersage verwendet werden. Experimentelle Ergebnisse mit all diesen Aufgaben zeigen, dass unser Modell konsequent starke Baselines und frühere Arbeiten übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Kuelewa kwa nyaraka ndefu inahitaji kufuatilia jinsi vitu vinavyoanzishwa na kuendelea kwa muda. Tunaweza kutoa mtindo mpya wa lugha, EntityNLM, ambao unaweza kuonyesha vifaa vya mifano wazi, kwa nguvu upya uwakilishi wao, na kwa wakati mwingine unatengeneza maoni yao. Mfano wetu ni uzalishaji na mzuri; inaweza kuonyesha idadi ya vitu vya kiholela katika muktadha huo na kutengeneza kila entity kutajwa kwa kiwango cha kiholela. Zaidi ya hayo, inaweza kutumika kwa kazi kadhaa tofauti kama vile mifano ya lugha, utambulisho wa mafanikio na utabiri wa entity. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na kazi zote hizi yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaendelea kutengeneza msingi wa nguvu na kazi za kabla.', 'fa': 'درک کردن یک سند طولانی نیاز به دنبال کردن چگونه شرکتها در طول زمان معرفی می شوند و تکامل می شوند. ما یک نوع جدید مدل زبانی را نشان می دهیم، EntityNLM که می تواند به طور کامل مواد مواد باشد، به طور طبیعی نمایش\u200cدهندگان آنها را تبدیل کند، و در موقعیت اشاره\u200cهایشان را تولید کند. مدل ما نسبت به ژنرال و آسان است. می\u200cتواند تعداد تصادفی از عناصر را در محیط نمونه کند در حالی که هر عناصر را در طول تصادفی تولید می\u200cکند. در addition, it can be used for several tasks different such as language modeling, coreference resolution, and entity prediction. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه با تمام این وظیفه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما همیشه از خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cهای قوی و کارهای پیشینی بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '긴 문서를 이해하려면 실체가 어떻게 시간의 추이에 따라 도입되고 변화하는지 추적해야 한다.우리는 새로운 언어 모델인 EntityNLM을 제시했는데, 이것은 실체를 현저하게 모델링하고, 그것들의 표현을 동적으로 업데이트하며, 상하문에서 그것들의 인용을 생성할 수 있다.우리의 모델은 생성성과 유연성을 가지고 있다.이것은 상하문에서 임의의 수량의 실체를 모델링할 수 있으며, 동시에 임의의 길이로 모든 실체를 생성할 수 있다.그 밖에 언어 모델링, 공지 해소와 실체 예측 등 다양한 임무에도 사용될 수 있다.이 모든 임무의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 시종 강기선과 이전의 작업보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Understanding a long document requires tracking how entities are introduced and evolve over time.  Ne paraqesim një lloj të ri të modelit gjuhësor, EntityNLM, që mund të modelojë eksplicitisht njësitë, të përditësojë dinamikisht përfaqësimet e tyre dhe në kontekst të gjenerojë përmendimet e tyre. Modeli ynë është gjenerativ dhe fleksibel; mund të modelojë një numër arbitrar njësive në kontekst ndërsa gjeneron çdo njësi përmend në një gjatësi arbitrare. Përveç kësaj, mund të përdoret për disa detyra të ndryshme të tilla si modelimi gjuhësor, zgjidhja e koreferencës dhe parashikimi i njësisë. Rezultatet eksperimentale me të gjitha këto detyra demonstrojnë se modeli ynë vazhdimisht kalon linjat bazë të forta dhe punën e mëparshme.', 'hy': 'Երկար փաստաթղթի հասկանալը պահանջում է հետևել, թե ինչպես են միավորները ներկայացվում և զարգանում ժամանակի ընթացքում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք լեզվի նոր տեսակի մոդել, ENTITY-ՆԼՄ-ը, որը կարող է բացահայտորեն մոդել կազմակերպությունները, դինամիկ վերականգնել իրենց ներկայացումները և կոնտեքստորեն ստեղծել իրենց հիշողությունները: Մեր մոդելը սերունդային և ճկուն է, it can model an arbitrary number of entities in context while generating each entity mention at an arbitrary length.  Ավելին, այն կարող է օգտագործվել բազմաթիվ տարբեր առաջադրանքների համար, ինչպիսիք են լեզվի մոդելը, կորեֆերանսի լուծումը և էության կանխատեսումը: Այս բոլոր խնդիրների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը մշտապես գերազանցում է ուժեղ հիմնական գծերը և նախորդ աշխատանքը:', 'am': 'ረጅም ሰነዱን ለማስተዋል አካባቢዎች እንዴት እንዲገልጹና እንዴት እንዲለወጥ እንዲያስፈልጋሉ ያስፈልጋል። አዲስ ዓይነት የቋንቋ ምሳሌ (EntityNLM) እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን አዲስ እና ፍላጎት ነው:: በክፍለ አካባቢ ቁጥር በመፍጠር ውስጥ እያንዳንዱ አካባቢ ጥያቄን በመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ፣ የኮርፌንስ ውጤት እና አካባቢነትን ለመፍጠር በተለየ ሌሎች ስራ ይጠቀማል፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች እነዚህን ስራዎች ሁሉ ምሳሌያችን በብርቱ መሠረት እና አስቀድሞ ሥራን እንዲሠራ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'একটি দীর্ঘ নথিপত্র বুঝতে প্রয়োজন কিভাবে বস্তুগুলো পরিচিতি ও পরিবর্তন করা হবে তা অনুসন্ধান করতে হবে। আমরা একটি নতুন ধরনের ভাষার মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি, যা পরিষ্কারভাবে মডেল বিষয়বস্তু, যারা তাদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব আপডেট করতে পারে এবং সাথে তাদের কথা তৈরি  আমাদের মডেল জেনারেটিভ এবং ফ্ল্যাক্সিয়াল; প্রত্যেক বস্তুর উল্লেখ করার সময় এটি একটি বৈরাচিত্র্যহীন সংখ্যা মডেল করতে পারে। এছাড়াও এটি বিভিন্ন কাজের জন্য ব্যবহার করতে পারে যেমন ভাষার মডেলিং, কোরেফেন্সের সিসেশন এবং বস্তুর ভবিষ্যত। এই সমস্ত কাজের মধ্যে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের মডেল সবসময় শক্তিশালী বেসেলাইন এবং পূর্বেই কাজ করে।', 'az': "Uzun bir dökümə anlamaq zaman boyunca entitələrin necə təşkil edildiyini və necə təşkil edildiyini gözləməsi lazımdır. Biz yeni dil modeli, EntityNLM'i göstərdik ki, sadəcə olaraq modelləri modelləşdirə bilər, dinamik olaraq onların göstərişlərini yeniləşdirə bilər və müxtəlif məlumatlarını yaradır. Bizim modelimiz genetik və fleksibildir. bu, hər birini müəyyən bir uzunluğa nəzər edərkən müəyyən bir növ sayısını müxtəlif tərzdə modelləşdirə bilər. Buna görə də dil modelləri, mərhəmətli çözünürləri və tədbirləri kimi çoxlu fərqli işlər üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Bütün bu işlərdən təcrübə sonuçları modelimiz möhkəm səhifələri və əvvəlki işlərdən daha üstün olduğunu göstərir.", 'tr': 'Uzun senedi düşünmek üçin birnähili guralýan we ösüşini wagtynda gözlemek gerek. Biz täze bir dil nusgasyny görkezip, EntityNLM, bu nusgalary kesinlikle örän nusgasyny görkezip biler we olaryň sözlerini döredip biler. Biziň nusgymyz döredijili we fleksibdir; unit synonyms for matching user input Munuň üçin bu ýerde diller modelleýän, seçmeli çözümlenme we barlygyň öňlemesi ýaly birnäçe dürli zada ullanılabilir. Bu zadyň hemme netijesi bilen örän synanyşdyrylýan nusgalarymyz nusgalarymyzyň güýçli we öňki işimizden daşary ýok bolýandygyny görkez.', 'af': "Die verstaan van 'n lang dokument benodig om te volg hoe entiteite ingevoer word en deur tyd te ontwikkel. Ons stel 'n nuwe tipe taal model, EntityNLM, wat kan eksplisies model entiteite, dinamies opdateer hul voorstellings, en contextually genereer hul bemenging. Ons model is genereerbaar en fleksibel; dit kan 'n arbitrêre nommer van entiteite in konteks model terwyl elke entiteit met 'n arbitrêre lengte genereer word. In addition, it can be used for several different tasks such as language modeling, coreference resolution, and entity prediction. Eksperimentale resultate met al hierdie opdragte bevestig dat ons model konsistentlik sterke basisline en vooraf werk uitvoer.", 'et': 'Pika dokumendi mõistmine nõuab jälgimist, kuidas olemid aja jooksul tutvustatakse ja arenevad. Tutvustame uut tüüpi keelemudelit, EntityNLM, mis suudab selgesõnaliselt modelleerida olemeid, dünaamiliselt uuendada nende esitusi ja kontekstuaalselt genereerida nende nimetusi. Meie mudel on generatiivne ja paindlik; see võib modelleerida suvalise arvu olemeid kontekstis, tekitades iga olemi mainimise suvalise pikkusega. Lisaks sellele saab seda kasutada mitmete erinevate ülesannete jaoks, nagu keele modelleerimine, kordferentsi lahutus ja olemi prognoosimine. Kõigi nende ülesannete eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel on pidevalt tugevad lähtejooned ja varasemad tööd parem.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje dugog dokumenta zahtijeva praćenje načina uvođenja i razvoja entitata tijekom vremena. Predstavljamo novi tip jezičkog model a, EntityNLM, koji može izraziti modele entiteta, dinamički aktualizirati njihove predstave, i u kontekstu stvoriti njihove spomena. Naš model je generativni i fleksibilni. može modelirati proizvoljni broj entiteta u kontekstu dok stvara svaku entitetu spominjanu na proizvoljnoj dužini. Osim toga, može se koristiti za nekoliko različitih zadataka poput jezika modela, rješavanja pristojnosti i predviđanja entitata. Eksperimentalni rezultati sa svim ovim zadacima pokazuju da naš model stalno iznosi jake osnovne linije i prije posla.', 'ca': "Entendre un llarg document requereix seguir com s'introdueixen i evolucionen les entitats al llarg del temps. Presentam un nou tipus de model lingüístic, EntityNLM, que pot modelar explícitament entitats, actualitzar dinàmicament les seves representacions i generar contextualment les seves mencions. El nostre model és generador i flexible; pot modelar un nombre arbitrari d'entitats en el context mentre genera la menció de cada entitat a una llargada arbitraria. A més, es pot utilitzar per diverses tasques diferents, com la modelació de llenguatges, la resolució de coreferença i la predicció d'entitats. Els resultats experimentals amb totes aquestes tasques demostren que el nostre model contínuament supera fortes línies de base i treball anterior.", 'cs': 'Pochopení dlouhého dokumentu vyžaduje sledování toho, jak jsou entity zaváděny a vyvíjejí se v průběhu času. Představujeme nový typ jazykového modelu EntityNLM, který umí explicitně modelovat entity, dynamicky aktualizovat jejich reprezentace a kontextově generovat jejich zmínky. Náš model je generativní a flexibilní; může modelovat libovolný počet entit v kontextu a generovat každou zmínku entity na libovolné délce. Kromě toho může být použit pro několik různých úkolů, jako je jazykové modelování, rozlišení koreferencí a predikce entity. Experimentální výsledky se všemi těmito úkoly ukazují, že náš model trvale překonává silné základní linie a předchozí práci.', 'fi': 'Pitkän asiakirjan ymmärtäminen edellyttää, että seurataan, miten entiteetit otetaan käyttöön ja kehittyvät ajan myötä. Esittelemme uudentyyppisen kielimallin, EntityNLM, joka voi nimenomaisesti mallintaa entiteettejä, päivittää dynaamisesti niiden esitystä ja luoda kontekstuaalisesti niiden mainintoja. Mallimme on generatiivinen ja joustava. se voi mallintaa mielivaltaisen määrän entiteettejä kontekstissa samalla, kun jokainen entiteetti mainitaan mielivaltaisesti. Lisäksi sitä voidaan käyttää useisiin eri tehtäviin, kuten kielimallinnukseen, koreferenssin resoluutioon ja entiteetin ennustamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset kaikista näistä tehtävistä osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti vahvemmista lähtökohdista ja aiemmasta työstä.', 'he': 'להבין מסמך ארוך דורש מעקב איך ישויות מוצגות ופתחות במהלך הזמן. We present a new type of language model, EntityNLM, that can explicitly model entities, dynamically update their representations, and contextually generate their mentions.  המודל שלנו הוא דורתי וגמיש; הוא יכול לדוגמא מספר אקדחי של יחידות בקשר בזמן שיוצר כל יחידה הזכירה באורך אקדחי. בנוסף, הוא יכול להשתמש בכמה משימות שונות כמו דוגמנית שפת, פיתרון קופורנציה, וחזוי ישויות. תוצאות ניסיוניות עם כל המשימות האלה מראות שהדוגמנית שלנו עוברת בתקבילות מעל קווי בסיס חזקים ועבודה קודמת.', 'ha': "Idan an gane wani takardar zaman shawara, sai ya ƙayyade yin amfani da jinsi an introduce da abubuwa kuma a cire bayan lokaci. Tuna gabatar da wata nau'i na harshen, EntityNLM, wanda ke iya iya samun misãlai da bayyani, za'a iya riga mazaɓa masu motsi, kuma a lokacin da ake samun su. Misalinmu yana mai zato da mai rauni. Kana iya motsa nau'in abubuwa cikin mazaɓa a lokacin da ya ƙãga kowace abun da tsakanin arbitati. Da wannan, za'a yi amfani da shi ga wasu aikin dabam-daban kamar misãlai na harshe, tsoron sarrafi na kure da kuma babu wani abu. Mataimakin jarrabai da duk wannan aikin sun nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya ƙaranci bakin salo da aiki na gaba.", 'sk': 'Za razumevanje dolgega dokumenta je treba slediti, kako se entitete uvajajo in se sčasoma razvijajo. Predstavljamo nov tip jezikovnega modela EntityNLM, ki lahko eksplicitno modelira entitete, dinamično posodablja njihove reprezentacije in kontekstualno ustvarja njihove omembe. Naš model je generativen in fleksibilen; lahko modelira poljubno število subjektov v kontekstu, medtem ko ustvarja vsako omembo subjekta v poljubni dolžini. Poleg tega se lahko uporablja za več različnih opravil, kot so jezikovno modeliranje, ločljivost koreference in napoved entitete. Eksperimentalni rezultati z vsemi temi nalogami kažejo, da naš model dosledno presega močne osnovne linije in predhodno delo.', 'jv': 'Tulung luwih dokumen sing dibutuhi kapan kelas nang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan karo akeh dumadhi Kernel Dheweke model sing gener-gener lan ujah-ujah; iki dadi string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Rasane sing paling awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe lan akeh nggawe modèl kuwi njaluké awak dhéwé kuwi tindahan sing ngedol ngono nggawe barang dhéwé.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་རིང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་དབྱིབས་ཆས་གང་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་སྐད ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་ཆུང་བསླབས་པའི་འཕྲོ་བ་ཡིན། unit-format དེ་ལས་ཁྱད་པར། སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེར་ན། སྤྲོ་སྟངས་གཟུགས་རིས། དབྱིབས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ངལ་རྩོལ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་ལས་འགན་འགྲུལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཞུང་གི་རྨན་གཞི་སྟེང་དང་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས'}
{'en': 'Reference-Aware Language Models', 'ar': 'نماذج اللغة المرجعية المدركة', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem com reconhecimento de referência', 'fr': 'Modèles de langage compatibles avec les références', 'es': 'Modelos de lenguaje con reconocimiento de referencias', 'ja': '参照意識言語モデル', 'zh': '参考感知言语模样', 'ru': 'Языковые модели, основанные на справочной информации', 'hi': 'संदर्भ-जागरूक भाषा मॉडल', 'ga': 'Múnlaí Teanga Tagartha-Fhiosrach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Γλωσσικά μοντέλα με επίγνωση αναφοράς', 'it': 'Modelli linguistici consapevoli di riferimento', 'hu': 'Referencia-tudatos nyelvi modellek', 'kk': 'Reference- Aware тіл үлгілері', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Awas-Rujukan', 'lt': 'Reference-Aware Language Models', 'mk': 'Модели на референциски јазик', 'ml': 'പരിഗണിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'pl': 'Modele językowe świadome referencji', 'mt': 'Mudelli tal-Lingwa ta’ Referenza Konxji', 'mn': 'Reference-Aware Language Models', 'sr': 'Референцијски модели језика', 'ro': 'Modele lingvistice conștiente de referință', 'no': 'Reference-Aware Language Modellar', 'so': 'Modelooyinka luuqada ee la garto', 'sv': 'Referensmedvetna språkmodeller', 'ta': 'குறிப்பு அறியப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகள்', 'ur': 'Reference-Aware Language Models', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mẫu ngôn ngữ', 'da': 'Referencebevidste sprogmodeller', 'bg': 'Референтни езикови модели', 'nl': 'Referentiebewuste taalmodellen', 'de': 'Referenzbasierte Sprachmodelle', 'id': 'Reference-Aware Language Models', 'ko': '참조 감지 언어 모델', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبان معرفی', 'sw': 'Modeli za Lugha zilizofahamika', 'tr': 'Çeşmeler', 'af': 'Verwysing- Aware Taal Modelle', 'sq': 'Modele gjuhësh të njohura', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'az': 'Reference-Aware Dil Modell톛ri', 'hr': 'Modeli jezika iz referencije', 'bn': 'রেফারেন্স- পরিচিত ভাষা মোডেল', 'ca': 'Models de llenguatge conegut', 'et': 'Viiteteadlikud keelemudelid', 'hy': 'Հետևում գիտակցված լեզվի մոդելները', 'cs': 'Referenční jazykové modely', 'fi': 'Viitetietoiset kielimallit', 'bs': 'Modeli jezika', 'he': 'Reference-Aware Language Models', 'ha': 'Modellun da aka sani', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Referenčni jezikovni modeli', 'bo': 'Reference-Aware Language Models'}
{'en': 'We propose a general class of language models that treat reference as discrete stochastic latent variables. This decision allows for the creation of entity mentions by accessing external databases of referents (required by, e.g., dialogue generation) or past internal state (required to explicitly model coreferentiality). Beyond simple copying, our coreference model can additionally refer to a referent using varied mention forms (e.g., a reference to Jane can be realized as she), a characteristic feature of reference in natural languages. Experiments on three representative applications show our model variants outperform models based on deterministic attention and standard language modeling baselines.', 'es': 'Proponemos una clase general de modelos de lenguaje que tratan la referencia como variables latentes estocásticas discretas. Esta decisión permite la creación de menciones de entidades mediante el acceso a bases de datos externas de referentes (requerido, por ejemplo, por la generación de diálogos) o el estado interno pasado (requerido para modelar explícitamente la correferenciación). Más allá de la simple copia, nuestro modelo de correferencia también puede referirse a un referente mediante diversas formas de mención (por ejemplo, una referencia a «Jane» se puede realizar como «ella»), un rasgo característico de referencia en los lenguajes naturales. Los experimentos en tres aplicaciones representativas muestran que nuestras variantes de modelo superan a los modelos basados en la atención determinista y en las líneas de base de modelado del lenguaje estándar.', 'ar': 'نقترح فئة عامة من نماذج اللغة التي تتعامل مع المرجع كمتغيرات عشوائية منفصلة كامنة. يسمح هذا القرار بإنشاء كيانات مذكورة عن طريق الوصول إلى قواعد البيانات الخارجية للمراجع (المطلوبة ، على سبيل المثال ، إنشاء الحوار) أو الحالة الداخلية السابقة (المطلوبة لنمذجة مرجعية صريحة). بالإضافة إلى النسخ البسيط ، يمكن أن يشير نموذج المرجع لدينا أيضًا إلى مرجع باستخدام أشكال ذكر متنوعة (على سبيل المثال ، يمكن إدراك الإشارة إلى "جين" على أنها "هي") ، وهي سمة مميزة للإشارة في اللغات الطبيعية. تُظهر التجارب على ثلاثة تطبيقات تمثيلية أن متغيرات النموذج الخاصة بنا تتفوق على النماذج القائمة على الاهتمام الحتمي وخطوط الأساس لنمذجة اللغة القياسية.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma classe geral de modelos de linguagem que tratam a referência como variáveis latentes estocásticas discretas. Essa decisão permite a criação de menções de entidade acessando bancos de dados externos de referentes (exigidos por, por exemplo, geração de diálogo) ou estado interno passado (necessário para modelar explicitamente a correferencialidade). Além da simples cópia, nosso modelo de correferência pode adicionalmente se referir a um referente usando formas de menção variadas (por exemplo, uma referência a “Jane” pode ser percebida como “ela”), uma característica de referência em linguagens naturais. Experimentos em três aplicativos representativos mostram que nossas variantes de modelo superam os modelos com base em atenção determinística e linhas de base de modelagem de linguagem padrão.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une classe générale de modèles de langage qui traitent la référence comme des variables latentes stochastiques discrètes. Cette décision permet la création de mentions d'entités en accédant à des bases de données externes de référents (requis par exemple pour la génération de dialogue) ou d'un état interne antérieur (requis pour modéliser explicitement la coréférentialité). Au-delà de la simple copie, notre modèle de coréférence peut également faire référence à un référent en utilisant des formes de mention variées (par exemple, une référence à «\xa0Jane\xa0» peut être réalisée comme «\xa0elle\xa0»), une caractéristique de référence dans les langues naturelles. Des expériences sur trois applications représentatives montrent que nos variantes de modèles surpassent les modèles basés sur l'attention déterministe et les bases de référence de modélisation de langage standard.", 'ja': '我々は、参照を離散的な確率的潜在変数として扱う言語モデルの一般的なクラスを提案する。この決定は、参照元の外部データベース（例えば、対話生成によって必要）または過去の内部状態（コレクティブアクセラレーションを明示的にモデル化するために必要）にアクセスすることによって、エンティティのメンションを作成することを可能にします。単純なコピーに留まらず、本発明のコアレファレンスモデルは、自然言語における参照の特徴である、多様な言及形態（例えば、「Ｊａｎｅ」への言及を「Ｓｈｅ」として実現することができる）を使用して、参照元を追加的に参照することができる。3つの代表的なアプリケーションの実験では、決定論的な注意と標準的な言語モデリングのベースラインに基づいて、モデルのバリアントがモデルよりも優れていることが示されています。', 'hi': 'हम भाषा मॉडल के एक सामान्य वर्ग का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संदर्भ को असतत स्टोकेस्टिक अव्यक्त चर के रूप में मानते हैं। यह निर्णय संदर्भों के बाहरी डेटाबेस (उदाहरण के लिए, संवाद पीढ़ी द्वारा आवश्यक) या पिछले आंतरिक राज्य (स्पष्ट रूप से सह-सापेक्षता को मॉडल करने के लिए आवश्यक) तक पहुंचकर उल्लेखित इकाई के निर्माण की अनुमति देता है। सरल प्रतिलिपि बनाने से परे, हमारा सह-सम्मेलन मॉडल इसके अतिरिक्त विभिन्न उल्लेख रूपों का उपयोग करके एक दिग्दर्शन को संदर्भित कर सकता है (उदाहरण के लिए, "जेन" के संदर्भ को "वह" के रूप में महसूस किया जा सकता है), प्राकृतिक भाषाओं में संदर्भ की एक विशेषता विशेषता। तीन प्रतिनिधि अनुप्रयोगों पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे मॉडल वेरिएंट नियतात्मक ध्यान और मानक भाषा मॉडलिंग बेसलाइन के आधार पर मॉडल से आगे निकलते हैं।', 'zh': '吾侪引为离散随机变量语。 此议许访引外数据库(如,对话生须)旧内(须显式建模共性)以创实体。 自简复制之外,共指征模形可以引(,Jane引可以为"she"),此自然语言之征也。 三代表性应用程序之实验,变体优于确定性言建模基线。', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем общий класс языковых моделей, которые рассматривают ссылку как дискретные стохастические скрытые переменные. Это решение позволяет создавать упоминания сущностей путем доступа к внешним базам данных референтов (требуемым, например, генерацией диалога) или к прошлому внутреннему состоянию (требуемому для явного моделирования кореференциальности). Помимо простого копирования, наша базовая модель может дополнительно ссылаться на референта с использованием различных форм упоминания (например, ссылка на «Джейн» может быть реализована как «она»), характерная особенность ссылки на естественные языки. Эксперименты с тремя репрезентативными приложениями показывают, что наши варианты моделей превосходят модели, основанные на детерминированном внимании и стандартном базовом моделировании языка.', 'ga': 'Molaimid aicme ghinearálta de mhúnlaí teanga a phléann le tagairt mar athróga folaigh stochastic scoite. Leis an gcinneadh seo is féidir tagairtí eintitis a chruthú trí rochtain a fháil ar bhunachair shonraí sheachtracha de thagairtí (a éilíonn, m.sh., giniúint idirphlé) nó staid inmheánach san am a chuaigh thart (a theastaíonn chun croíthábharthacht a shamhaltú go sainráite). Taobh amuigh den chóipeáil shimplí, is féidir lenár múnla croíláir tagairt a dhéanamh freisin do thagairt a úsáideann foirmeacha éagsúla lua (m.sh., is féidir tagairt do “Jane” a bhaint amach mar “sí”), gné shainiúil tagartha i dteangacha nádúrtha. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thrí fheidhmchlár ionadaíocha go n-éiríonn lenár malairtí samhlacha níos fearr ná na samhlacha atá bunaithe ar aird cinntitheach agus bonnlínte caighdeánacha samhaltaithe teanga.', 'ka': "ჩვენ გვეძლევა ენის მოდელების საერთო კლასი, რომელიც რეფერენციას დისკრეტური სტაქტიკური ლატენტიური ცვლილებების განსაზღვრება. ეს გადაწყვეტი შესაძლებელია ელექტის შექმნა, რომელიც რეფერენტების გარეშე მონაცემების ბაზები (მაგალითად, დიალოგის შექმნა) ან გარეშე ინტერული სტატის შექმნა (მუშაობელია, რომელიც მო მარტივი კოპერაციის გარეშე, ჩვენი კოპერაციის მოდელი შეუძლია დამატებით განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ფორმების გამოყენება რეფერენტის რეფერენტის შესახებ (მაგალითად, განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ფორმების რეფერენტი ' სამი გამოსახულებული პროგრამების ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მოდელური გარიანტები უფრო გავაკეთებენ მოდელების განსახულებაზე და სტანდარტური ენის მოდელური ბაზ", 'hu': 'Olyan nyelvi modellek általános osztályát javasoljuk, amelyek diszkrét sztochasztikus látens változóként kezelik a referenciát. Ez a döntés lehetővé teszi entitási említések létrehozását referenti külső adatbázisok (például párbeszédgenerálás) vagy a korábbi belső állapot (a coreferenciality kifejezetten modellezéséhez szükséges) elérésével. Az egyszerű másoláson túl a coreferencia modellünk különböző említési formák segítségével is hivatkozhat referentre (pl. a Jane-re való hivatkozás "ő"-ként valósítható meg), amely a természetes nyelvekben jellemző referencia jellemzője. Három reprezentatív alkalmazáson végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellváltozataink meghaladják a determinisztikus figyelmet és a standard nyelvmodellezési alapokat.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια γενική κατηγορία γλωσσικών μοντέλων που αντιμετωπίζουν την αναφορά ως διακριτές στοχαστικές λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές. Η απόφαση αυτή επιτρέπει τη δημιουργία αναφορών οντοτήτων με πρόσβαση σε εξωτερικές βάσεις δεδομένων αναφορών (απαιτείται π.χ. από τη δημιουργία διαλόγου) ή προηγούμενη εσωτερική κατάσταση (απαιτείται ρητά για να μοντελοποιηθεί η συνάφεια). Πέρα από την απλή αντιγραφή, το μοντέλο μας μπορεί επίσης να παραπέμπει σε έναν referent χρησιμοποιώντας ποικίλες μορφές αναφοράς (π.χ., μια αναφορά στην "Jane" μπορεί να πραγματοποιηθεί ως "αυτή"), χαρακτηριστικό χαρακτηριστικό αναφοράς στις φυσικές γλώσσες. Τα πειράματα σε τρεις αντιπροσωπευτικές εφαρμογές δείχνουν ότι οι παραλλαγές μοντέλων μας ξεπερνούν τα μοντέλα που βασίζονται σε ντετερμινιστική προσοχή και τυποποιημένες γραμμές γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης.', 'kk': "Біз сілтемені дискретті стохастикалық latent айнымалылары ретінде қалайтын тіл үлгілерінің жалпы класын ұсынамыз. Бұл шешім сілтемелердің сыртқы деректер қорларына (мысалы, диалогты құру) немесе өткен ішкі күйін құруға мүмкіндік береді (міндетті диалогты құру үшін керек). Қарапайым көшірмелеу үлгісіміз қосымша айырмашылық түрлерді қолдану үлгісін қолдануға болады (мысалы, 'Jane' деген сілтемесін 'she' деп ойлауға болады), табиғи тілдерінде сілтемелер қасиеті болады. Үш reprezentative қолданбалардың тәжірибелері дефистикалық назарды және стандартты тілдерді моделдеу негізгі жолдарына негізделген үлгілерімізді көрсетеді.", 'it': "Proponiamo una classe generale di modelli linguistici che trattano il riferimento come variabili stocastiche latenti discrete. Questa decisione consente la creazione di menzioni di entità accedendo a database esterni di referenti (richiesti, ad esempio, dalla generazione di dialoghi) o dallo stato interno passato (richiesto per modellare esplicitamente la coreferenzialità). Oltre alla semplice copia, il nostro modello di coreferenza può anche riferirsi a un referente utilizzando varie forme di menzione (ad esempio, un riferimento a 'Jane' può essere realizzato come 'lei'), caratteristica caratteristica di riferimento nei linguaggi naturali. Esperimenti su tre applicazioni rappresentative mostrano che le nostre varianti di modelli superano i modelli basati sull'attenzione deterministica e sulle linee di base di modellazione del linguaggio standard.", 'mk': 'Предложуваме генерална класа на јазички модели кои ги третираат референциите како дискретни стокастички лантни променливи. This decision allows for the creation of entity mentions by accessing external databases of referents (required by, e.g., dialogue generation) or past internal state (required to explicitly model coreferentiality).  Покрај едноставното копирање, нашиот модел на соодветност може дополнително да се однесува на референт користејќи различни форми за споменување (на пример, референцијата на „Џејн“ може да се оствари како „таа“), карактеристичка карактеристика на референција на природните јазици. Експериментите на три репрезентативни апликации покажуваат дека нашите моделни варијанти ги надминуваат моделите базирани на децентристичко внимание и стандардните бази на моделирање на јазикот.', 'lt': 'We propose a general class of language models that treat reference as discrete stochastic latent variables.  Šiuo sprendimu leidžiama sukurti subjektą, kuriam būtų suteikta galimybė naudotis išorinėmis referentų duomenų bazėmis (reikalaujama, pvz., dialogo kūrimo) arba ankstesnės vidaus valstybės (reikalaujama aiškiai modeliuoti koreferenciją). Be paprasto kopijavimo, mūsų koreferencijos modelis gali būti papildomai susijęs su referentu naudojant įvairias minčių formas (pvz., nuoroda į "Jane" gali būti suprantama kaip "ji"), kuri yra ypatinga nuoroda natūraliomis kalbomis. Trijų tipinių programų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelio variantai viršija modelius, pagrįstus deterministiniu dėmesiu ir standartiniu kalbų modeliavimu.', 'ms': "Kami cadangkan kelas umum model bahasa yang memperlakukan rujukan sebagai pembolehubah stokastik yang tertutup. Keputusan ini membenarkan penciptaan sebutan entiti dengan mengakses pangkalan data luaran referen (diperlukan, cth., generasi dialog) atau keadaan dalaman masa lalu (diperlukan untuk secara ekspresif model korefereniality). Selain salinan sederhana, model koreferensi kita boleh tambahan rujuk kepada referens menggunakan bentuk sebutan berbeza (cth., rujukan kepada 'Jane' boleh disedari sebagai 'dia'), ciri-ciri rujukan dalam bahasa semulajadi. Experiments on three representative applications show our model variants outperform models based on deterministic attention and standard language modeling baselines.", 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് വിവേകതയുള്ള സ്റ്റോക്സിക് ലേറ്റിന്\u200dറെ വേര This decision allows for the creation of entity mentions by accessing external databases of referents (required by, e.g., dialogue generation) or past internal state (required to explicitly model coreferentiality).  എളുപ്പമുള്ള പകര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം നമ്മുടെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു റെഫറന്\u200dസിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യഭാഷകളില്\u200d  മൂന്നു പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വേറെന്റുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധയും സ', 'mn': 'Бид хэл загваруудын ерөнхий хэл загваруудыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөж байдаг. Энэ шийдвэр нь хүмүүсийн гадаад өгөгдлийн сангуудыг (жишээ нь, диалог бүтээлч) эсвэл өнгөрсөн дотоод байр суурь байгуулах боломжтой болгодог. Энгийн хуулбарлалтын дараа бидний зөвшөөрөл загвар нь өөр өөр хэлбэртэй хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж, өөр өөр хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж, өөр өөр хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж чадна (жишээ нь, Жейн гэдэг хэлбэрүүдийг "тэр" гэдэг хэлбэрээ Гурван төлөөлөгчийн хэрэглэгчдийн туршилтууд бидний загварын өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлолтой анхаарал, стандарт хэл загварын суурь шугам дээр багасгаж байгаа загваруудыг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu klassi ġenerali ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi li jittrattaw ir-referenza bħala varjabbli stokastiċi latenti diskreti. Din id-deċiżjoni tippermetti l-ħolqien ta’ menzjonijiet ta’ entità billi taċċessa bażijiet ta’ dejta esterni ta’ referenti (meħtieġa minn, pereżempju, ġenerazzjoni ta’ djalogu) jew stat intern tal-passat (meħtieġa biex jimmudellaw b’mod espliċitu l-koreferenzjalità). Lil hinn mill-kopja sempliċi, il-mudell ta’ koreferenza tagħna jista’ wkoll jirreferi g ħal referent bl-użu ta’ formoli varjati ta’ referenza (pereżempju, referenza għal ‘Jane’ tista’ titwettaq bħala ‘hi’), karatteristika karatteristika ta’ referenza fil-lingwi naturali. L-esperimenti fuq tliet applikazzjonijiet rappreżentattivi juru li l-varjanti tal-mudell tagħna jaqbżu l-mudelli bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni determinattiva u l-linji bażi tal-mudell tal-lingwi standard.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy ogólną klasę modeli językowych, które traktują odniesienie jako dyskretne stochastyczne utajone zmienne. Decyzja ta umożliwia tworzenie wzmianek podmiotów poprzez dostęp do zewnętrznych baz danych referentów (wymaganych np. przez generowanie dialogów) lub poprzedni stan wewnętrzny (wymagany do wyraźnego modelowania współreferencyjności). Oprócz prostego kopiowania, nasz model koreferencji może dodatkowo odwoływać się do referenta za pomocą zróżnicowanych form wzmianki (np. odniesienie do Jane może być realizowane jako "ona"), charakterystycznej cechy odniesienia w językach naturalnych. Eksperymenty na trzech reprezentatywnych aplikacjach pokazują, że nasze warianty modeli przewyższają modele oparte na deterministycznej uwadze i standardowych liniach modelowania językowego.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein generell klasse språk- modeller som behandler referansen som diskrete stokastiske latente variabler. Denne avgjøringa lèt deg oppretta einingar med å få tilgang til eksterne databaser av referanser (dvs. dialoggenerering) eller sidan interne tilstand (nødvendig for å eksplisisere modeller koreferentialitet). Utan enkelt kopiering kan vårt koreferansmemodel tillegg referera til e in referanse ved bruk av varierte referanse (f.eks. ein referanse til « Jane » kan gjerast som « she »), ein karakteristisk referanse på naturspråk. Eksperimentar på tre reprezentativ program viser modeller våre utfører modeller basert på deterministiske oppmerksomhet og standardsmodellering av språk.', 'ro': 'Propunem o clasă generală de modele lingvistice care tratează referința ca variabile stocastice latente discrete. Această decizie permite crearea mențiunilor entității prin accesarea bazelor de date externe ale referenților (solicitate de exemplu de generarea dialogului) sau de starea internă anterioară (necesară modelarea explicită a corefențialității). Pe lângă simpla copiere, modelul nostru de corefență se poate referi și la un referent folosind diverse forme de menționare (de exemplu, o referire la "Jane" poate fi realizată ca "ea"), o caracteristică caracteristică de referință în limbile naturale. Experimentele efectuate pe trei aplicații reprezentative arată că variantele noastre de modele depășesc performanțele modelelor bazate pe atenția deterministă și modelarea limbajului standard.', 'sr': "Predlažemo generalnu klasu jezičkih modela koji se odnose na referenciju kao diskretne stokastične latentne promjene. Ova odluka omogućava stvaranje entiteta spominjanja pristupanjem vanjskim bazama podataka referenta (zahteva, npr. generacija dijaloga) ili prošle unutrašnje države (zahteva za izraziti model koreferencijalnosti). Osim jednostavnog kopiranja, naš model pristojnosti dodatno može referirati na referentu koristeći različite formulare spominjanja (npr. referencija na 'Jane') može se shvatiti kao 'ona'), karakterističnu karakteristiku referencije na prirodnim jezicima. Eksperimenti na tri reprezentativne aplikacije pokazuju da naše modelne variante iznose modele na osnovu determinističke pažnje i standardnih jezičkih modela.", 'si': 'අපි භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේ මෙම තීරණය සඳහා පිළිබඳු පිළිබඳ දත්ත බේස්තුවක් පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා (උදාහරණය, සංවාදය නිර්මාණ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිලිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළ ප්\u200dරධාන භාවිතා තුනක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න අපේ මොඩල් වෙනස් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය නිර්දේශීය අවධානය සහ ස', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en allmän klass av språkmodeller som behandlar referens som diskreta stokastiska latenta variabler. Detta beslut gör det möjligt att skapa entitetsomnämnanden genom att komma åt externa databaser med referenter (som krävs av t.ex. dialoggenerering) eller tidigare internt tillstånd (som krävs för att uttryckligen modellera coreferenzialitet). Förutom enkel kopiering kan vår coreferencemodell dessutom hänvisa till en referens med hjälp av olika omnämningsformulär (t.ex. en hänvisning till "Jane" kan realiseras som "hon"), ett karakteristiskt inslag av referens i naturliga språk. Experiment på tre representativa applikationer visar att våra modellvarianter överträffar modeller baserade på deterministisk uppmärksamhet och standardspråkmodellering.', 'so': "Waxaan soo jeedaynaa fasalka caadiga ah oo kala duwan ee ugu dambeeya noocyada luuqada. Go'aankaas wuxuu xaq u yeelan karaa in uu sameyno macluumaad macluumaadka dibadda ah (sida loo baahan yahay muuqashada dialog) ama dowladda gudaha e e hore (waxaa loo baahan yahay aqoonsiga tusaale cad). Kopieysiga sahlan ka sokow, noocyada aqoonsiga waxaa loogu jeedi karaa noocyo magac kala duduwan (tusaale ahaan looga jeedo 'Jane'), waxaa loo ogaan karaa noocyo gaar ah oo ku qoran luqadaha dabiicadda ah. Imtixaanka ku qoran saddexda codsiga wakiilku waxay muujiyaan qaababka noocyada kala bedela oo ku saleysan taxadirka aqoonta iyo sameynta qoraalka qoraalka afka caadiga ah.", 'ta': "நாம் ஒரு பொது மொழி மாதிரிகளின் வகுப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது வேறு வித்தியாசமான ஸ்டாக்டிக் சமீபத்தில இந்த தீர்வு அனுமதிக்கும் பொருளின் குறிப்புகளின் வெளி தரவுத்தளத்தை அணுகலாம் (உதாரணமாக, உரையாடல் உருவாக்கியால்) அல்லது முந்தைய உள்ளமைப்பு நிலைய எளிய நகல் எடுக்கும் பின்னர், எங்கள் குறிப்பு மாதிரி மாதிரி வேறுபாடு குறிப்பிட்ட வடிவங்களை பயன்படுத்தி கூடுதலாம் (உதாரணமாக 'ஜேன்' என்று குறிப்பிடும் என்பது ' மூன்று பிரதிநிதிகள் பயன்பாடுகளில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் தீர்மானிக்கல் கவனத்தை மற்றும் நிலையான மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி அடிப்படைகள", 'ur': "ہم ایک ژنرال کلاس کی زبان موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو سرنوشت کو مختلف استاکسٹیک لاٹینٹ ویرئیٹ کے طور پر سمجھتے ہیں. یہ فیصلہ منصفات کے بیرونی ڈیٹابیس (جنس کے مطابق، ڈیلوگ پیدا کرنے کے لئے) یا پچھلے داخلی حالت کے لئے (صریح موڈل کے مطابق قابلیت کے لئے لازم ہے) بنانے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ساده کپی کرنے کے بعد، ہماری مہربانی موڈل مختلف ذکر فرمول کے مطابق ایک رائنٹ کو اضافہ کر سکتا ہے (جین کے مطابق ایک رائنٹ 'جین' کو 'وہ' کے مطابق سمجھ سکتا ہے)، طبیعی زبانوں میں ایک رائنٹ کا ویژہ ہے۔ تین نمایشگر کاربریوں کے تجربے ہمارے نمایشگروں کو نمایشگری توجه اور استاندارڈ زبان نمایشگری بنسلین پر بنیاد لینٹوں پر زیادہ مدل کرتی ہیں۔", 'uz': "Biz tilning bir umumiy sinf modellarini o'ylaymiz, o'zgarishni ajratishni o'zgarishlar deb hisoblash mumkin. Bu buyruqni tanlash @ info: whatsthis Uch taʼminlovchi dasturdagi imtiyozlar modelimizni aniqlashni va standard tilning modeli asosida yaratish modellarimizni koʻrsatiladi.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi đề xuất một lớp mô hình ngôn ngữ phổ biến xem trọng chỉ là các biến tiềm ẩn ngẫu nhiên. Quyết định này cho phép tạo ra các thực thể được nhắc đến bằng cách truy cập các cơ sở dữ liệu từ bên ngoài (nhu cầu từ, v.d., tạo ra các cuộc đối thoại) hay trạng thái nội bộ (cần thiết để mô tả rõ ràng Ngoài việc chép đơn giản, ví dụ của chúng ta cũng có thể được g ọi là tham khảo bằng các dạng nhắc khác nhau (v.v. có thể nhận dạng'Jane'là'she', một đặc trưng của tham chiếu trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Thí nghiệm trên ba ứng dụng đại diện cho thấy biến thể của chúng ta vượt trội các mô hình dựa trên sự chú ý của bộ trưởng và hệ thống thiết lập ngôn ngữ.", 'nl': "We stellen een algemene klasse van taalmodellen voor die referentie behandelen als discrete stochastische latente variabelen. Dit besluit maakt het mogelijk om entiteitsvermeldingen te maken door toegang te krijgen tot externe databases van referenten (vereist door bijvoorbeeld dialooggeneratie) of eerdere interne status (vereist om expliciet coreferentaliteit te modelleren). Naast simpel kopiëren kan ons coreferentiemodel ook verwijzen naar een referent met behulp van verschillende vermeldingsvormen (bijvoorbeeld een verwijzing naar 'Jane' kan worden gerealiseerd als 'zij'), een kenmerkend kenmerk van verwijzing in natuurlijke talen. Experimenten met drie representatieve toepassingen tonen aan dat onze modelvarianten beter presteren dan modellen op basis van deterministische aandacht en standaardtaalmodelleringsbaselines.", 'da': "Vi foreslår en generel klasse af sprogmodeller, der behandler reference som diskrete stokastiske latente variabler. Denne beslutning gør det muligt at oprette enhedsnævnelser ved at få adgang til eksterne databaser af referenter (krævet af f.eks. dialoggenerering) eller tidligere interne tilstande (krævet for eksplicit at modellere coreferencialitet). Ud over simpel kopiering kan vores coreferencemodel desuden referere til en referent ved hjælp af forskellige nævnelsesformer (f.eks. kan en henvisning til 'Jane' realiseres som 'hun'), et karakteristisk træk ved reference i natursprog. Eksperimenter med tre repræsentative applikationer viser, at vores modelvarianter overgår modeller baseret på deterministisk opmærksomhed og standard sprogmodellering baselines.", 'bg': 'Предлагаме общ клас езикови модели, които третират референцията като дискретни стохастични латентни променливи. Това решение позволява създаването на споменавания на субекти чрез достъп до външни бази данни на референти (изисквани от, например, генериране на диалог) или минало вътрешно състояние (изисквани за изрично моделиране на кореференциалността). Освен просто копиране, нашият модел на кореференция може допълнително да се позовава на референт, използвайки разнообразни форми за споменаване (напр. позоваване на "Джейн" може да се осъществи като "тя"), характерна особеност за справка в естествените езици. Експериментите на три представителни приложения показват, че нашите варианти на модела надминават моделите, базирани на детерминистично внимание и стандартни базови линии на езиково моделиране.', 'de': "Wir schlagen eine allgemeine Klasse von Sprachmodellen vor, die Referenzen als diskrete stochastische latente Variablen behandeln. Diese Entscheidung ermöglicht die Erstellung von Entity-Erwähnungen durch Zugriff auf externe Datenbanken von Referenzen (erforderlich durch z.B. Dialoggenerierung) oder vergangene interne Zustände (erforderlich, um die Koreferenzität explizit zu modellieren). Über das einfache Kopieren hinaus kann unser Coreferenz-Modell auch über verschiedene Erwähnungsformen auf einen Referenten verweisen (z.B. kann ein Verweis auf 'Jane' als 'sie' realisiert werden), ein charakteristisches Bezugsmerkmal in natürlichen Sprachen. Experimente an drei repräsentativen Anwendungen zeigen, dass unsere Modellvarianten Modelle übertreffen, die auf deterministischen Aufmerksamkeits- und Standardsprachenmodellierungsgrundlagen basieren.", 'id': "We propose a general class of language models that treat reference as discrete stochastic latent variables.  Keputusan ini memungkinkan penciptaan entitas disebutkan dengan mengakses pangkalan data eksternal referen (diperlukan oleh, contohnya, generasi dialog) atau negara interna masa lalu (diperlukan untuk secara eksplicit model korefereniality). Selain salinan sederhana, model koreferensi kita dapat tambahan merujuk referen menggunakan bentuk sebutan berbagai macam (contohnya, referensi ke 'Jane' dapat disadari sebagai 'dia'), karakteristik referensi dalam bahasa alam. Eksperimen pada tiga aplikasi mewakili menunjukkan varian model kita melebihi model berdasarkan perhatian deterministik dan garis dasar model bahasa standar.", 'ko': "우리는 인용을 이산 임의 잠재 변수로 보는 통용 언어 모델을 제시했다.이 결정은 인용 대상의 외부 데이터베이스(예를 들어 대화 생성에 필요함)이나 과거의 내부 상태(예를 들어 모델링과 관련된 것을 명확히 함)를 방문하여 실체 언급을 만들 수 있다.간단한 복제 외에 우리의 공지대 모델은 여러 가지 언급 형식(예를 들어'Jane'에 대한 언급을'she'로 실현할 수 있다)을 사용할 수 있는데 이것은 자연 언어에서 가리키는 특징이다.세 가지 대표적인 응용 프로그램의 실험에서 우리의 모델 변체는 확정적인 주의와 표준 언어 모델링 기선을 바탕으로 하는 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.", 'sw': "Tunazipendekeza darasa la moja la mifano ya lugha ambalo hukabiliwa kama mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni. This decision allows for the creation of entity mentions by accessing external databases of referents (required by, e.g., dialogue generation) or past internal state (required to explicitly model coreferentiality).  Zaidi ya nakala rahisi, muundo wetu wa msingi unaweza kumaanisha maoni kwa kutumia mifumo tofauti ya kutambua (kwa mfano, maana ya 'Jane' inaweza kutambuliwa kama 'yeye'), utaalam wa mahusiano katika lugha za asili. Majaribio kwenye matumizi matatu ya wakilishi yanaonyesha mabadiliko yetu ya mifano yanayotumia mifano kwa msingi wa ufuatiliaji na mifano ya lugha za kawaida.", 'fa': 'ما یک کلاس عمومی از مدل زبان را پیشنهاد می کنیم که به عنوان تغییرات متغییرات متفاوت متفاوت متفاوت متفاوت متفاوت مختلف درمان می کنند. این تصمیم اجازه می\u200cدهد برای ایجاد کردن واحد\u200cها با دسترسی به پایگاه داده\u200cهای خارجی از گزارش\u200cها (به عنوان تولید محاورها) یا وضعیت داخلی گذشته (که برای مدل\u200cهای مشخص\u200cآوری قابل توجه است). بعد از کپی ساده، مدل رضایت ما می تواند به اضافه\u200cای با استفاده از فرم\u200cهای مختلف اشاره (مثلاً مرتبط به "جین" به عنوان "او" تشخیص داده شود) یک ویژگی ویژگی مرتبط به زبانهای طبیعی ارائه دهد. تجربه\u200cها در سه کاربرد نمایش\u200cکننده\u200cها متغیر مدل\u200cهای ما بر اساس توجه deterministic و مدل\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای زبان استاندارد نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': "Biz referans diskretli stokastik döwletlere görýän dili nusgalarynyň umumy teklip edip görýäris. Bu karar çykyş referanslaryň daşarydaky databaselerine goll etmek üçin birnäçe agzalan gurama mümkin edýär Basit nusgalaryň öňünde, biziň seçeneklerimiz nusgalarymyz daşary çykan nusgalary ulanyp biler (meselâ, 'Jane'-a 'ol') diýip kabul edilýär), tebigy dillerde hatlaryň özellikleri. Üç temel uygulamalardan örnekler nusgalarymyzy deterministik üns we standart diller modelleýän bazylaryna daşary edip görkezýär.", 'hr': "Predlažemo općem klasom jezičkih modela koji se odnose na referenciju kao diskretne stokastične latentne promjene. Ova odluka omogućava stvaranje subjekta spominjanja pristupanjem vanjskim bazama podataka referenta (potrebna od, npr. generacije dijaloga) ili prošlog unutarnjeg stanja (potrebna za izraziti model koreferencijalnosti). Osim jednostavnog kopiranja, naš model pristojnosti dodatno može referirati na referentu koristeći različite formulare spominjanja (npr. referent na 'Jane') može se shvatiti kao 'she'), karakterističnu karakteristiku referencije na prirodnim jezicima. Eksperimenti na tri predstavne aplikacije pokazuju da naše modelne variante iznose modele na temelju determinističke pažnje i standardnih osnovnih linija modela jezika.", 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք լեզվի մոդելների ընդհանուր դասարան, որոնք վերաբերվում են հաղորդակցությանը որպես խիստ սթոշատիկ թաքնված փոփոխականներ: Այս որոշումը հնարավորություն է տալիս կազմակերպությունների հիշողությունների ստեղծման միջոցով հնարավորություն ունենալ արտաքին տվյալների բազաների (օրինակ, խոսակցության ստեղծման) կամ անցյալ ներքին վիճակի (առանձնահատուկ կորեֆերենցիալիության մո Ավելին պարզ կոպիաներից, մեր կորեֆերանսի մոդելը կարող է նաև անվանել հանրախորհրդին՝ օգտագործելով տարբեր նշումների ձևեր (օրինակ, անվանումները «Ջեյնի» մասին կարող են իրականացվել որպես «նա»), բնական լեզուներում անվանումների հատկանիշ հատկություն: Երեք ներկայացուցիչ ծրագրերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելների տարբերակները գերազանցում են որոշիչ ուշադրության և ստանդարտ լեզվի մոդելների հիմնական գծերի վրա հիմնված մոդելները:', 'sq': "Ne propozojmë një klasë të përgjithshme modelesh gjuhësh që trajtojnë referencën si ndryshues të fshehtë stokastik diskret. This decision allows for the creation of entity mentions by accessing external databases of referents (required by, e.g., dialogue generation) or past internal state (required to explicitly model coreferentiality).  Përtej kopjimit të thjeshtë, modeli ynë i korreferencës mund të referohet shtesë në një referent duke përdorur forma të ndryshme përmendimi (për shembull, një referim ndaj 'Jane' mund të realizohet si 'ajo'), një karakteristike e referimit në gjuhët natyrore. Eksperimentet në tre aplikime përfaqësuese tregojnë se variantet tona të modelit janë më të larta se modelet bazuar në vëmendjen përcaktuese dhe linjat bazë të modelimit standard të gjuhës.", 'bn': "আমরা একটি সাধারণ ভাষার মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যারা বিভিন্ন স্টোক্সিক সাম্প্রতিক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ এই সিদ্ধান্ত নির্মাণের বাইরের তথ্যের বাইরে প্রবেশ করার সুযোগ প্রদান করতে পারে (যেমন ডায়ালগ প্রজন্মের প্রয়োজন) অথবা অতীতের অভ্যন্তরীণ অবস্থা (স্পষ্ট মডে সাধারণ কপি ছাড়াও আমাদের কোরেফেন্স মডেল বিভিন্ন উল্লেখের ফর্ম ব্যবহার করে একটি রেফেন্টের কথা উল্লেখ করতে পারে (যেমন 'জেন' নামে উল্লেখ করা যায়), সে প্রাকৃতিক ভ Experiments on three representative applications show our model variants outperform models based on deterministic attention and standard language modeling baselines.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ዓይነቶች የቋንቋ ሞዴላዎችን በተለየ ቀናት መለያየት እንዲቆጠሩ እናሳስባታለን፡፡ ይህ ፍርድ የውጭው ዳታቤቶችን በመጠቀም (ለምሳሌ በጥያቄ ትውልድ) ወይም ያለፈው ውይይት ሀብት (በግልጽ ዓይነት ማሳየት ያስፈልጋል) በመፍጠር ይፈቅዳል፡፡ ከቀላል ቅጂ በቀር፣ የኮርፌንስ ሞዴል በተለየ የውይይት ባሕላዊ ቋንቋዎች የተጠቃሚ ፎርማዎች (ምሳሌ ‹ጃን›› የተባለው መልዕክት ‘እርስዋ› እንዲታወቅ ይችላል፡፡ Experiments on three representative applications show our model variants outperform models based on deterministic attention and standard language modeling baselines.', 'az': 'Biz t…ôklif edirik ki, d…ôyiŇüiklik stochastik latent d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôr kimi t…ôklif edir. Bu karar √ß…ôtinlikl…ôrin dńĪŇü veril…ôn veril…ônl…ôrin (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, dialoq n…ôz…ôriyy…ôti) v…ô ke√ßmiŇü i√ß durumlarńĪn (a√ßńĪq-aydńĪn modell…ôri qazanmaq √ľ√ß√ľn lazńĪmdńĪr) yaratmasńĪna imkan verir. Basit kopyalama √∂yr…ôndikd…ôn sonra, bizim m…ôrh…ôm…ôtli modelimiz t…ôbi…ôtli dill…ôrd…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik m…ôrh…ôm…ôtl…ôrini istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôrh…ôm…ôtli formlarla referans ed…ô bil…ôr. √ú√ß temsilci proqramlarńĪn sńĪnaqlarńĪ modell…ôrimizin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri deterministik dikkati v…ô standart dil modell…ôrimizin …ôsas s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin…ô dayanan modell…ôrd…ôn daha √ľst√ľn g√∂st…ôrir.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme obecnou třídu jazykových modelů, které považují reference za diskrétní stochastické latentní proměnné. Toto rozhodnutí umožňuje vytvoření zmínek entit přístupem k externím databázím referentů (vyžadovaným např. generováním dialogů) nebo minulým interním stavem (vyžadovaným explicitním modelováním koreferenciálního stavu). Kromě jednoduchého kopírování může náš koreferenční model navíc odkazovat na referenta pomocí různých zmiňovacích forem (např. odkaz na Jane lze realizovat jako "ona"), což je charakteristický rys reference v přírodních jazycích. Experimenty na třech reprezentativních aplikacích ukazují, že naše modelové varianty překonávají modely založené na deterministické pozornosti a standardních jazykových modelovacích liniích.', 'et': "Pakume välja keelemudelite üldklassi, mis käsitlevad viidet kui diskreetseid stohhastilisi latentseid muutujaid. See otsus võimaldab luua üksuse nimetusi, kasutades viiteid (nõutavad näiteks dialoogi genereerimine) või varasemat sisemist olekut (nõutavad selgesõnaliselt kaaseferentsuse modelleerimiseks). Lisaks lihtsale kopeerimisele võib meie koreferrentsimudel viidata ka viitele, kasutades erinevaid märkimisvorme (nt viidet Jane'ile võib realiseerida kui tema), mis on looduskeeltes viidatava iseloomulik tunnusjoon. Kolme tüüpilise rakenduse eksperimendid näitavad, et meie mudelivariantid ületavad deterministlikul tähelepanul põhinevaid mudeleid ja standardseid keele modelleerimise lähtejooni.", 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n algemene klas taal modele wat verwysing as diskrete stokastike latente veranderlikes behandel. Hierdie besluit laat to e vir die skepping van entiteite bepaal deur toegang tot eksterne databasis van verwysings (benodig deur, bv. dialoog genereering) of verlede interne staat (benodig na eksplisiese model van koreferentialiteit). Buitend eenvoudige kopiëring kan ons koreferensiemodel bymekaar verwys na 'n verwysing deur gebruik van verskeie verwysing vorms (bv. 'n verwysing na 'Jane' kan as 'she'), as 'n karakteristiese eienskap van verwysing in natuurlike tale. Eksperimente op drie reprezentante toepassings vertoon ons model variante buite uitvoer modele gebaseer op deterministiese aandag en standaard taal modeling basisline.", 'ca': 'Proposem una classe general de models de llenguatge que tracten la referència com a variables latents estòchastes discretes. Aquesta decisió permet la creació de mencions d\'entitats accedant a bases de dades externes de referents (requerits per exemple per generar diàleg) o a l\'estat intern passat (requerit per modelar explícitament la coreferentialitat). A més enllà de la simple còpia, el nostre model de coreferència pot referir-se a un referent utilitzant formes de menció variades (per exemple, una refer ència a "Jane" es pot veure com a "ella"), una característica de referència en llengües naturals. Experiments on three representative applications show our model variants outperform models based on deterministic attention and standard language modeling baselines.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme yleistä luokkaa kielimalleja, jotka käsittelevät viittausta erillisinä stokastisina piilevinä muuttujina. Tämä päätös mahdollistaa entiteettimainintojen luomisen käyttämällä ulkoisia viitetietokantoja (esim. dialogin luominen) tai aikaisempaa sisäistä tilaa (tarvitaan nimenomaan yhteisferentiaalisuuden mallintamiseen). Yksinkertaisen kopioinnin lisäksi koreferenssimallimme voi myös viitata viittaukseen erilaisilla mainintamuotoilla (esim. viittaus Jane voidaan toteuttaa nimellä "hän"), joka on luontaisilla kielillä esiintyvän viittauksen ominaispiirre. Kolmella edustavalla sovelluksella tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että mallivariantimme ovat parempia kuin deterministiseen huomioon perustuvat mallit ja vakiokielimallinnuksen perusviivat.', 'bs': "Predlažemo generalnu klasu jezičkih modela koji se odnose na referenciju kao diskretne stokastične latentne promjene. Ova odluka omogućava stvaranje subjekta spominjanja pristupanjem vanjskim bazama podataka referenta (zahteva, npr. generacija dijaloga) ili prošle unutrašnje države (zahteva za izraziti model koreferencijalnosti). Osim jednostavnog kopiranja, naš model pristojnosti dodatno može referirati na referentu koristeći različite formulare spominjanja (npr. referent na 'Jane') može se shvatiti kao 'she'), karakterističnu karakteristiku referencije na prirodnim jezicima. Eksperimenti na tri reprezentativne aplikacije pokazuju da naše modelne variante iznose modele na temelju determinističke pažnje i standardnih osnovnih linija modela jezika.", 'ha': "Munã goyyar da wata takardar misalin harshe da ke zartar da karatun masu motsi da suka taɓa. Wannan hukuncin na yarda wa an ƙiƙira sunan abun abuni da za'a iya sami danna danna masu ƙarƙashin mutane (misali, kizaɓen zauren akwatin bayani) ko halin wanda ya shige (don a ƙayyade tsari mai bayyani da motel). Bai ƙari kodi mai sauƙi, misalin bangonmu ya iya amfani da wani matsayi mai amfani da tsaro masu sãɓa (misali, za'a gane cewa 'jane' kamar 'ta'), wani haske mai ƙayyade wa fassarar cikin harshen asimi. Fijaroyi kan shiryoyin ayuka uku na rubutu, ya nuna misalin ayuka masu variant da ke samar da misalin ayuka, a kan bincike masu tsari ga masu tsari da kuma misalin harshe na daidaita.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo splošni razred jezikovnih modelov, ki referenco obravnavajo kot diskretne stohastične latentne spremenljivke. Ta odločitev omogoča ustvarjanje omemb entitet z dostopom do zunanjih zbirk podatkov referentov (ki jih zahteva npr. ustvarjanje dialoga) ali preteklega notranjega stanja (ki se zahteva za izrecno modeliranje koreferencialnosti). Poleg preprostega kopiranja se lahko naš koreferenčni model dodatno nanaša na referentko z uporabo različnih obrazcev omenjanja (npr. sklicevanje na "Jane" lahko uresničimo kot "ona"), značilnost reference v naravnih jezikih. Eksperimenti na treh reprezentativnih aplikacijah kažejo, da so naše variante modelov boljše od modelov, ki temeljijo na deterministični pozornosti in standardnih izhodiščih jezikovnega modeliranja.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Candidaturan iki dipoleh kanggo nggawe akeh entis menehi ngewehke perusahaan databasa dadi nggawe urip (terus diutag-uteg, dialog)sane sampeyan akeh dumadhi (terus diutag-uteg kanggo model corefectuasi). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Peringatan karo aplikasi sing telu repréentasi nang sampek akeh variant model sing bisa supoyo model sing basa supoyo nggunakake tarjamahan lan model sing usul bangsa.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས། This decision allows for the creation of entity mentions by accessing external databases of referents (required by, e.g., dialog generation) or past internal state (required to explicitly model coreferentiality). Name Beyond simple copying, our coreference model can additionally refer to a referent using varied mention forms (e.g., a reference to 'Jane' can be realized as 'she'), a characteristic feature of reference in natural languages. ལག་སྟར་རྟོགས་པའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གསུམ་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་པའི་མིག", 'he': "We propose a general class of language models that treat reference as discrete stochastic latent variables.  ההחלטה הזו מאפשרת ליצור יחידה שזכירה על ידי גישה לבסיסי נתונים חיצוניים של רפורנטים (דרושים על ידי, למשל, דואר דיאלוג) או מדינה פנימית עברה (דרושים על מנת לדוגמא באופן בלתי ברור קורפרנציאליות). מעבר לעתקים פשוטים, דוגמנית התאמה שלנו יכולה להתייחס באופן נוסף לרפורננט בשימוש טופסי הזכרות שונים (למשל, התייחס ל 'ג'יין' יכול להיבנות כ' היא'), תכונה אופיינית של התאמה בשפות טבעיות. ניסויים על שלושה שימושים מייצגים מראים שינויים הדוגמנים שלנו מתגברים על דוגמנים מבוססים על תשומת לב קבועה ובקווי הבסיס של הדוגמנים של שפה סטנדרטיים."}
{'en': 'A Simple Language Model based on PMI Matrix Approximations', 'ar': 'نموذج لغة بسيط يعتمد على تقديرات مصفوفة PMI', 'fr': 'Un modèle de langage simple basé sur des approximations de matrices PMI', 'es': 'Un modelo de lenguaje simple basado en aproximaciones de matriz de PMI', 'pt': 'Um modelo de linguagem simples baseado em aproximações de matriz PMI', 'ja': 'PMIマトリックス近似に基づくシンプルな言語モデル', 'ru': 'Простая языковая модель, основанная на приближениях матрицы PMI', 'zh': '盖PMI矩阵近之简言也', 'hi': 'पीएमआई मैट्रिक्स सन्निकटन पर आधारित एक सरल भाषा मॉडल', 'ga': 'Samhail Teanga Shimplí bunaithe ar Chomhmheastacháin Mhaitríse PMI', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egyszerű nyelvi modell a PMI mátrix megközelítéseken alapuló', 'el': 'Ένα απλό γλωσσικό μοντέλο βασισμένο στις προσεγγίσεις Matrix PMI', 'kk': 'PMI матрикстің көмегімен негізделген қарапайым тіл үлгісіName', 'it': 'Un modello di linguaggio semplice basato sulle approssimazioni della matrice PMI', 'lt': 'Paprastas kalbos modelis, pagrįstas PMI matricos apytikriais metodais', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'PMI മാറ്റിക്സ് അപ്രോക്സിമേഷനുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200dName', 'mn': 'PMI Матрикс ойролцоогоор үндсэн энгийн хэл загвар', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Sederhana berdasarkan Perkiraan Matriks PMI', 'mt': 'Mudell Lingwistiku Simpli bbażat fuq Approssimazzjonijiet tal-Matrix PMI', 'pl': 'Prosty model językowy oparty na aproximacjach PMI Matrix', 'ro': 'Un model de limbaj simplu bazat pe aproximări matriciale PMI', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Jednostavni jezički model na osnovu približnosti PMI Matrix', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Model fudud oo ku saleysan PMI Matrix', 'sv': 'En enkel språkmodell baserad på PMI Matrix approximationer', 'ta': 'PMI பிரிக்ஸ் பொருத்தம் பார்வைகளை அடிப்படையிலான சுலபமான மொழி மாதிரி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình ngôn ngữ đơn giản dựa trên Ma Trận M.', 'da': 'En enkel sprogmodel baseret på PMI Matrix-tilnærmelser', 'nl': 'Een eenvoudig taalmodel gebaseerd op PMI Matrix Approximaties', 'bg': 'Прост езиков модел, базиран на матрични приближения', 'hr': 'Jednostavni jezički model na temelju približnosti PMI Matrix', 'id': 'Model Bahasa sederhana berdasarkan Pendekatan Matriks PMI', 'de': 'Ein einfaches Sprachmodell basierend auf PMI Matrix Approximationen', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'PMI Matrix Taýýarlamasyna dayanan basit bir dil nusgasy', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Lugha nyepesi inayohusiana na matatizo ya PMI', 'ko': 'PMI 매트릭스와 비슷한 간단한 언어 모델 기반', 'sq': 'Një model gjuhësh të thjeshtë bazuar në përafërsimet e matricës PMI', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Պարզ լեզվի մոդել, որը հիմնված է ՄՄԻ մատրիքսի մոտեցումների վրա', 'az': 'PMI Matrix Yaxınlıqlarına dayanan Basit Dil Modeli', 'bn': 'A Simple Language Model based on PMI Matrix Approximations', 'bs': 'Jednostavni jezički model na osnovu približnosti PMI Matrix', 'ca': 'Un model de llenguatge senzill basat en aproximacions de la matrix PMI', 'cs': 'Jednoduchý jazykový model založený na PMI Matrix Approximacích', 'et': 'Lihtne keelemudel, mis põhineb PMI maatriksi lähenemistel', 'fi': 'Yksinkertainen kielimalli, joka perustuu PMI Matrix Approximations', 'jv': 'Una Simple Language model basa na PMO MAtrix Acceksimations', 'he': 'A Simple Language Model based on PMI Matrix Approximations', 'sk': 'Preprost jezikovni model, ki temelji na matričnih približkih PMI', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'PMI ཆ་རི་བ་དང་བཅས་མཚུངས་པར་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྐད་ཆ་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'In this study, we introduce a new approach for learning language models by training them to estimate word-context pointwise mutual information (PMI), and then deriving the desired conditional probabilities from PMI at test time. Specifically, we show that with minor modifications to word2vec’s algorithm, we get principled language models that are closely related to the well-established Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) based language models. A compelling aspect of our approach is that our models are trained with the same simple negative sampling objective function that is commonly used in word2vec to learn word embeddings.', 'ar': 'في هذه الدراسة ، نقدم نهجًا جديدًا لتعلم نماذج اللغة من خلال تدريبهم على تقدير سياق الكلمات والمعلومات المتبادلة النقطية (PMI) ، ثم اشتقاق الاحتمالات الشرطية المرغوبة من PMI في وقت الاختبار. على وجه التحديد ، نوضح أنه مع تعديلات طفيفة على خوارزمية word2vec ، نحصل على نماذج لغة مبدئية ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا بنماذج اللغة القائمة على تقدير تباين الضوضاء (NCE). يتمثل أحد الجوانب الجذابة في نهجنا في أن نماذجنا يتم تدريبها بنفس الوظيفة المستهدفة لأخذ العينات السلبية البسيطة التي تُستخدم بشكل شائع في word2vec لتعلم تضمين الكلمات.', 'es': 'En este estudio, presentamos un nuevo enfoque para el aprendizaje de modelos lingüísticos al capacitarlos para estimar la información mutua puntual (PMI) de contexto de palabras y luego derivar las probabilidades condicionales deseadas del PMI en el momento del examen. Específicamente, mostramos que con pequeñas modificaciones en el algoritmo de word2vec, obtenemos modelos de lenguaje basados en principios que están estrechamente relacionados con los modelos de lenguaje basados en la estimación de contraste de ruido (NCE) bien establecidos. Un aspecto convincente de nuestro enfoque es que nuestros modelos están entrenados con la misma función objetivo de muestreo negativo simple que se usa comúnmente en word2vec para aprender la incrustación de palabras.', 'fr': "Dans cette étude, nous introduisons une nouvelle approche pour l'apprentissage des modèles de langage en les entraînant à estimer les informations mutuelles ponctuelles (PMI) contextuelles de mots, puis en dérivant les probabilités conditionnelles souhaitées à partir du PMI au moment du test. Plus précisément, nous montrons qu'avec des modifications mineures apportées à l'algorithme de word2vec, nous obtenons des modèles de langage basés sur des principes qui sont étroitement liés aux modèles de langage bien établis basés sur l'estimation contrastive du bruit (NCE). Un aspect intéressant de notre approche est que nos modèles sont entraînés avec la même fonction d'objectif d'échantillonnage négatif simple qui est couramment utilisée dans word2vec pour apprendre les intégrations de mots.", 'pt': 'Neste estudo, introduzimos uma nova abordagem para aprender modelos de linguagem treinando-os para estimar informações mútuas pontuais (PMI) de contexto de palavra e, em seguida, derivando as probabilidades condicionais desejadas do PMI no momento do teste. Especificamente, mostramos que com pequenas modificações no algoritmo do word2vec, obtemos modelos de linguagem baseados em princípios que estão intimamente relacionados aos modelos de linguagem baseados em Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE). Um aspecto atraente de nossa abordagem é que nossos modelos são treinados com a mesma função objetiva simples de amostragem negativa que é comumente usada no word2vec para aprender incorporações de palavras.', 'ja': 'この研究では、言語モデルを学習するための新しいアプローチを紹介します。言語モデルは、単語-文脈点別相互情報（ PMI ）を推定し、テスト時にPMIから所望の条件付き確率を導き出すように訓練します。具体的には、word 2 vecのアルゴリズムをわずかに修正することで、確立されたノイズコントラスト推定（ NCE ）ベースの言語モデルと密接に関連する原理的言語モデルが得られることを示しています。私たちのアプローチの説得力のある側面は、私たちのモデルが、単語埋め込みを学ぶためにword 2 vecで一般的に使用されているのと同じ単純なネガティブサンプリングの目的関数でトレーニングされていることです。', 'zh': '于此论之,吾言学言模形之法,以习其度单词 - 上下文点相信(PMI),然后试PMI推导出所需概率。 具体来说者,word2vec算之微改也,得成熟之基于噪声(NCE)言之相关也。 吾道之一引人注目,吾法用与word2vec同者简而教之,以采样函数学词嵌之。', 'hi': 'इस अध्ययन में, हम भाषा मॉडल सीखने के लिए एक नया दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं, उन्हें शब्द-संदर्भ बिंदुवार पारस्परिक जानकारी (पीएमआई) का अनुमान लगाने के लिए प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, और फिर परीक्षण के समय पीएमआई से वांछित सशर्त संभावनाओं को प्राप्त करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम दिखाते हैं कि वर्ड 2वीईसी के एल्गोरिथ्म में मामूली संशोधनों के साथ, हमें सैद्धांतिक भाषा मॉडल मिलते हैं जो अच्छी तरह से स्थापित शोर कंट्रास्टिव अनुमान (एनसीई) आधारित भाषा मॉडल से निकटता से संबंधित हैं। हमारे दृष्टिकोण का एक सम्मोहक पहलू यह है कि हमारे मॉडल को एक ही सरल नकारात्मक नमूना उद्देश्य समारोह के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है जिसका उपयोग आमतौर पर शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए वर्ड 2वेक में किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании мы вводим новый подход к изучению языковых моделей, обучая их оценивать слово-контекстную точечную взаимную информацию (PMI), а затем выводя желаемые условные вероятности из PMI во время тестирования. В частности, мы показываем, что с незначительными изменениями алгоритма word2vec мы получаем принципиальные языковые модели, которые тесно связаны с хорошо отлаженными языковыми моделями, основанными на оценке контрастности шума (NCE). Убедительным аспектом нашего подхода является то, что наши модели обучаются с помощью той же простой целевой функции отрицательной выборки, которая обычно используется в word2vec для изучения вложений слов.', 'ga': 'Sa staidéar seo, tugaimid isteach cur chuige nua maidir le foghlaim samhlacha teanga trí oiliúint a chur orthu chun faisnéis fhrithpháirteach pointe-comhthéacs a mheas (PMI), agus ansin na dóchúlachtaí coinníollach inmhianaithe a dhíorthú ó PMI ag am tástála. Léirítear go sonrach, le mionathruithe ar algartam Word2vec, go bhfaighimid múnlaí teanga prionsabail a bhaineann go dlúth leis na múnlaí teanga seanbhunaithe atá bunaithe ar Mheastachán Codarsnachta Torainn (NCE). Gné an-láidir dár gcur chuige ná go gcuirtear oiliúint ar ár múnlaí leis an bhfeidhm oibiachtúil shimplí dhiúltach shimplí chéanna a úsáidtear go coitianta in word2vec chun leabú focal a fhoghlaim.', 'ka': 'ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ ახალი პროგრამა ვისწავლოთ ენის მოდელების სწავლობისთვის, რომლებიც ისინი შემწავლოთ სიტყვა-კონტექსტური საერთო ინფორმაცია (PMI) და შემდეგ შემწავლობული შესაძლებლობა PMI-და განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ უფრო ცოტა შეცვლილებით სიტყვას 2vec ალგორიტიმში, ჩვენ მივიღებთ პრინციპური ენის მოდელები, რომლებიც ძალიან განსაკუთრებული სიტყვას კონტროსტიგური გან ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებელი აპექტი არის რომ ჩვენი მოდელები იგივე განსაკუთრებულ განსაკუთრებულ განსაკუთრებულ პროგრამის ტუნქცია, რომელიც საერთოდ გამოყენებული სიტყვებში გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban új megközelítést vezetünk be a nyelvi modellek tanulására azáltal, hogy kiképezzük őket a szó-kontextus pontos kölcsönös információk becslésére (PMI), majd a vizsgálat időpontjában levonjuk a kívánt feltételes valószínűségeket a PMI-ből. Konkrétan azt mutatjuk meg, hogy a word2vec algoritmusának kisebb módosításával elvi nyelvi modelleket kapunk, amelyek szorosan kapcsolódnak a jól bevált Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) alapú nyelvi modellekhez. Megközelítésünk egyik meggyőző aspektusa, hogy modelleinket ugyanazzal az egyszerű negatív mintavételi objektív funkcióval képezik, amelyet a word2vec-ben gyakran használnak a szóbeágyazások tanulására.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, εισάγουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για την εκμάθηση γλωσσικών μοντέλων εκπαιδεύοντάς τα να εκτιμούν τις σημειακές αμοιβαίες πληροφορίες μεταξύ λέξεων και περιβάλλοντος και στη συνέχεια να αντλούν τις επιθυμητές υπό όρους πιθανότητες από τις ΑΠΘ κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής. Συγκεκριμένα, καταδεικνύουμε ότι με μικρές τροποποιήσεις στον αλγόριθμο του παίρνουμε αρχειοθετημένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα που σχετίζονται στενά με τα καθιερωμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα που βασίζονται στην εκτίμηση της αντίθεσης θορύβου (NCE). Μια συναρπαστική πτυχή της προσέγγισής μας είναι ότι τα μοντέλα μας εκπαιδεύονται με την ίδια απλή αρνητική αντικειμενική λειτουργία δειγματοληψίας που χρησιμοποιείται συνήθως στο για να μάθουν ενσωμάτωση λέξεων.', 'it': "In questo studio, introduciamo un nuovo approccio per l'apprendimento dei modelli linguistici addestrandoli a stimare le informazioni reciproche del contesto verbale (PMI), e quindi derivando le probabilità condizionali desiderate dal PMI al momento del test. Nello specifico, mostriamo che con piccole modifiche all'algoritmo di word2vec, otteniamo modelli linguistici basati su principi strettamente correlati ai modelli linguistici basati sulla stima del contrasto del rumore (NCE). Un aspetto convincente del nostro approccio è che i nostri modelli sono addestrati con la stessa semplice funzione obiettivo di campionamento negativo che è comunemente usata in word2vec per imparare le incorporazioni di parole.", 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеулерде біз тіл үлгілерін оқыту үшін жаңа арқылы сөздердің контексті мәліметін (PMI) бағалау үшін оқыту арқылы, содан керек шарттардың мүмкіндігін PMI-ден тексеру уақытында табылады. Сөздігімен, біз 2vec алгоритміне кішкентай өзгертілген тіл үлгілерімізді көрсетедік. Біз тіл үлгілерімен жақын құрылған дыбыс контрастық оқиға (NCE) негіздеген тіл үлгілеріне қатынасыз. Біздің тәсілдеріміздің көмектесу аспекті - үлгілеріміз сөздерді ендіру үшін көпшілікті сөздерді оқыту үшін бір қарапайым негативті түрлендіру мақсатты функциясынан оқылған.', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime įvedame naują požiūrį į kalbų mokymosi modelius, apmokydami juos vertinti žodžių konteksto savitarpio informaciją (angl. word-context pointwise mutual information (PMI)), o vėliau ištirdami pageidaujamas sąlygines PMI tikimybes bandymo metu. Konkrečiai, mes rodome, kad nedideliais žodžio 2vec algoritmo pakeitimais gauname principinius kalbos modelius, kurie glaudžiai susiję su gerai nustatytais kalbos modeliais, pagrįstais Kontrastiniu triukšmo vertinimu (NCE). Ypač įtikinamas mūsų požiūrio aspektas yra tas, kad mūsų modeliai mokomi naudojant tą pačią paprastą neigiamą objektyvią mėginių ėmimo funkciją, kuri paprastai naudojama žodžio 2vec įdėjimui išmokti.', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d, ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d നാം പരിശീലന സമയത്ത് വാക്ക്-കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റോക്സ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഗണന പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വാര്\u200dഡ്2വിക്കിന്റെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ ചെറിയ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമുക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കിട്ടുന്നു. നല്ല സ്ഥ നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദാനത്തിന്റെ ഒരു നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ ഭാഗം എന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരേ എളുപ്പമായ നെഗറിവ് മാമ്പിള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പഠ', 'ms': 'Dalam kajian ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk mempelajari model bahasa dengan melatih mereka untuk menghargai maklumat persamaan kata-konteks menurut titik (PMI), dan kemudian menghasilkan kemungkinan syarat yang diinginkan dari PMI pada masa ujian. Secara khusus, kita menunjukkan bahawa dengan perubahan kecil kepada algoritma word2vec, kita mendapat model bahasa utama yang berkaitan dengan model bahasa yang berdasarkan Estimation Kontrastive Noise (NCE) yang ditetapkan dengan baik. Aspek yang meyakinkan dari pendekatan kita adalah bahawa model kita dilatih dengan fungsi objektif sampel negatif yang sama yang biasanya digunakan dalam word2vec untuk belajar penyembedding perkataan.', 'no': 'I denne studien introduserer vi ein ny tilnærming for å lære språk-modeller ved å lære dei for å vurdere ord-kontekst med målsettingsinformasjon (PMI), og deretter avhende dei ønskte vilkårlege sannsynlighetane frå PMI ved testtid. Spesielt viser vi at med mindre endringar i ord2veks algoritme, får vi hovudmodeller for språk som er nærare relatert til den godt utvikla språkkontrastevalueringsmodellen (NCE). Ein komplisering av tilnærminga vårt er at modellen våre er trent med det same enkle negative samplingsmålfunksjonen som ofte vert brukt i ord2vekt for å lære ordinnbygging.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд бид хэлний загварын суралцах шинэ арга загварыг тайлбарлаж, тэднийг үг-нөхцөлд хоорондын харилцааны мэдээллийг (ПMI) тооцоолж, дараа нь PMI-ээс шалгалтын үед хүссэн шаардлагатай магадлал гаргаж ирсэн. Ялангуяа бид 2вектийн алгоритмын бага зэрэг өөрчлөлтийг харуулж байна. Бид үндсэн хэл загваруудын загваруудыг сайн байгуулагдсан Дуу эсрэг Дуудлын Дуудлын НК-ын төлөвлөгөөтэй ойролцоогоор харьцуулдаг. Бидний арга хэмжээний гайхалтай асуудал бол бидний загвар нь сөрөг хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг сөрөг хэлбэртэй адилхан сөрөг хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг зорилготой функц юм.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu wprowadzamy nowe podejście do nauki modeli językowych poprzez szkolenie ich w celu oszacowania wzajemnych informacji w kontekście słowa (PMI), a następnie wywodzenie pożądanych prawdopodobieństw warunkowych z PMI w czasie testu. W szczególności pokazujemy, że przy drobnych modyfikacjach algorytmu word2vec otrzymujemy zasadnicze modele językowe, które są ściśle powiązane z ugruntowanymi modelami językowymi opartymi na szumach kontrastywnych (NCE). Przekonującym aspektem naszego podejścia jest to, że nasze modele są trenowane przy użyciu tej samej prostej funkcji negatywnego próbkowania, która jest powszechnie stosowana w Word2vec do nauki osadzeń słów.', 'ro': 'În acest studiu, introducem o nouă abordare pentru învățarea modelelor lingvistice prin instruirea acestora pentru a estima informațiile reciproce cuvinte-context punct (PMI), și apoi obținerea probabilităților condiționale dorite din PMI la momentul testului. Mai exact, arătăm că, cu modificări minore ale algoritmului word2vec, obținem modele lingvistice bazate pe principii care sunt strâns legate de modelele lingvistice bine stabilite bazate pe estimarea contrastivă a zgomotului (NCE). Un aspect convingător al abordării noastre este că modelele noastre sunt instruite cu aceeași funcție obiectivă simplă de eșantionare negativă care este utilizată în mod obișnuit în word2vec pentru a învăța încorporarea cuvintelor.', 'mk': 'Во оваа студија, воведуваме нов пристап за учење на јазички модели со обука на нив за проценка на зборов-контекст во точки однос заеднички информации (ПМИ), а потоа да ги извлечеме желбите условни веројатности од ПМИ во времето на тест. Специфично, покажуваме дека со мали модификации на алгоритмот на word2vec, добиваме принципирани јазички модели кои се блиски поврзани со добро воспоставени јазички модели со контрастивна проценка на шумата (NCE). Преконлив аспект на нашиот пристап е дека нашите модели се обучени со иста едноставна негативна објективна функција на примерок која е често употребена во word2vec за да се научи зборови внесување.', 'sr': 'U ovoj studiji, predstavljamo novi pristup jezičkim modelima, obučavajući ih da procenjuju međusobne informacije iz reči-konteksta (PMI), a zatim izvedemo željene uvjetne mogućnosti iz PMI u testu. Posebno, pokazujemo da sa manjim modifikacijama algoritma rečeni2veka dobijamo principalne jezičke modele koji su bliski povezani sa dobro uspostavljenim jezičkim modelima na osnovu proračuna kontrastivnog glasa (NCE). Uzbudljiv aspekt našeg pristupa je da su naši modeli obučeni sa istom jednostavnom negativnom objektivnom funkcijom uzorka koja se uobičajeno koristi u rečju 2vek kako bi naučili uključenje reči.', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan waxan ku soo bandhignaa qaabab cusub oo ah qaababka barashada luuqada, si aan ugu qiimeyno macluumaadka hoose-dhexe (PMI), kadibna waxaan waqtiga imtixaanka ah ka soo bandhignaa suurtagalka aad u baahan tahay PMI. Si gaar ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in lagu beddelo qoraalka qoraalka 2vec, waxaan helaynaa modelalka afka ugu horeeya oo ku dhow xiriira qaababka ku saabsan saxda noocyada (NCE). Qaar ka mid ah qaababkayaga waa in qaababkayaga lagu baraa qaababka noocyada oo la mid ah sameynta noocyada rasmiga ah, kaas oo si caadiga ah ugu isticmaala qoraalka 2vec si uu u barto hadalka ku qoran.', 'sv': 'I denna studie introducerar vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för att lära sig språkmodeller genom att utbilda dem att uppskatta ord-kontext punktvis ömsesidig information (PMI), och sedan härleda önskade villkorliga sannolikheter från PMI vid testtid. Specifikt visar vi att vi med mindre ändringar av word2vecs algoritm får principiella språkmodeller som är nära relaterade till de väletablerade Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) baserade språkmodellerna. En övertygande aspekt av vårt tillvägagångssätt är att våra modeller är tränade med samma enkla negativa samplingsobjektiva funktion som vanligtvis används i word2vec för att lära sig ordinbäddningar.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි භාෂාව මොඩේල් ඉගෙන ගන්න අලුත් අභ්\u200dයාසයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා, ඔවුන්ට පරීක්ෂණ වෙලාවේ වචන සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු (PMI) වි විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වචන 2වෙක්ගේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට පොඩි වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපිට ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂා මොඩේල් ලැබෙනවා ඒ වගේම හොඳ ස්ථාපිත ශ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය නිර්මාණය අක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩක් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ කියලා ව', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் மொழி மாதிரிகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். சோதனையில் இருந்து PMI இருந்து விரும்பும்  சிறிய மாற்றங்கள் 2விகின் மொழிமாற்றங்களுடன், முதலில் மொழிமாற்றங்கள் மாதிரிகளை காட்டுகிறோம். சரியாக நிறுவப்பட்ட மொழியின் மாதிரிகளுடன் தொடர்புட எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் கடினமான விளைவு என்னவென்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரிகள் ஒரே எளிய எதிர்மறை மாதிரி செயல்பாட்டில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகிறது அது', 'mt': 'F’dan l-istudju, a ħna nintroduċu approċċ ġdid għat-tagħlim tal-mudelli lingwistiċi billi nħarrġuhom biex jistmaw l-informazzjoni reċiproka bil-kliem fil-kuntest puntwali (PMI), u mbagħad niġbdu l-probabbiltà kondizzjonali mixtieqa mill-PMI fil-ħin tat-test. Speċifikament, nagħmlu evidenza li b’modifiki minuri fl-algoritmu tal-kliem2vec, nagħmlu mudelli lingwistiċi prinċipjati li huma relatati mill-qrib mal-mudelli lingwistiċi bbażati fuq Stima Kontrastiva tal-Istorbju (NCE) stabbiliti sewwa. A compelling aspect of our approach is that our models are trained with the same simple negative sampling objective function that is commonly used in word2vec to learn word embeddings.', 'ur': 'اس مطالعہ میں ہم نے زبان کی مدلکوں کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک نوی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے کہ ان کو کلمات کی کنٹنسٹ کی آپس کی معلومات (PMI) کا مطالعہ کریں اور پھر آزمائش زمانہ میں PMI سے چاہے ہوئے کنڈنسیوں کی احتمالات پیدا کریں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلمات 2vec کی الگوریتم کے ذرہ برابر بدلنے کے ساتھ، ہم نے پرنسیلڈ زبان موڈلے حاصل کئے ہیں جو بہترین مقررہ صوت کنٹروسٹیو ارزش (NCE) کی بنیادی زبان موڈلے سے نزدیک مرتبہ ہیں. ہمارے طریقے کا ایک مضبوط حصہ یہ ہے کہ ہمارے نمڈل ایسے سادھے منفی نمڈینگ موجود فعالیت کے ساتھ آموزش کی جاتی ہیں جو کلمات 2vec میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ کلمات انڈینگ کی تعلیم حاصل کریں.', 'uz': "Bu tadqida, biz tilni o'rganish modellarini o'rganish uchun yangi usulni o'rganamiz va ularni so'zlar tarkibini qidirish mumkin (PMI) bilan bir xil muhit haqida o'rganish uchun o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganamiz va keyin imtiyozda PMI'dan yetarli holat Ko'rsatganda, biz soʻzning algoritga kichkina oʻzgarishlarni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, biz yaxshi ko'rsatilgan Noise Kontraktiv Estimatsiya (NCE) asosiy tillar modellari bilan yaxshi bogʻ'liq. Bizning fikrimizning qiziqarli qismlarimiz esa, modellarimiz bir oddiy negativ misol funksiyati bilan o'rganiladi, bu soʻzni o'rganish uchun oddiy narsa 2 vek soʻzda ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để học các mô hình ngôn ngữ bằng cách đào tạo họ để ước lượng ngữ cảnh ngữ pháp chỉ điểm thông tin lẫn nhau (PMI) và sau đó lấy khả năng điều kiện mong muốn từ PMI vào thời điểm thử nghiệm. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng với các s ửa đổi nhỏ vào thuật to án của Từ 2Véc, chúng tôi nhận các mô hình ngôn ngữ có nguyên tắc liên quan đến mô hình tương phản ồn đã được thiết lập. Một khía cạnh hấp dẫn trong phương pháp của chúng ta là các mẫu được huấn luyện với cùng một hàm tiêu điểm tiêu cực tiêu cực đơn giản được dùng chung trong Từ 2Véc để học sự ghép từ.', 'da': 'I dette studie introducerer vi en ny tilgang til at lære sprogmodeller ved at træne dem til at estimere ord-kontekst punktvis gensidig information (PMI), og derefter udlede de ønskede betingede sandsynligheder fra PMI på testtidspunktet. Specielt viser vi, at med mindre ændringer af word2vecs algoritme får vi principbaserede sprogmodeller, der er tæt relateret til de veletablerede Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) baserede sprogmodeller. Et overbevisende aspekt af vores tilgang er, at vores modeller er trænet med den samme simple negative sampling objektive funktion, som almindeligvis bruges i word2vec til at lære ord indlejringer.', 'nl': 'In dit onderzoek introduceren we een nieuwe aanpak voor het leren van taalmodellen door ze te trainen om woord-context puntige wederzijdse informatie (PMI) te schatten, en vervolgens de gewenste voorwaardelijke waarschijnlijkheid af te leiden van PMI tijdens de test. Specifiek laten we zien dat met kleine aanpassingen aan het algoritme van word2vec, we principiële taalmodellen krijgen die nauw verwant zijn met de gevestigde Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) gebaseerde taalmodellen. Een overtuigend aspect van onze aanpak is dat onze modellen worden getraind met dezelfde eenvoudige negatieve sampling objectief functie die vaak wordt gebruikt in word2vec om woord embeddings te leren.', 'de': 'In dieser Studie stellen wir einen neuen Ansatz für das Erlernen von Sprachmodellen vor, indem wir sie trainieren, wortkontextbezogene punktuelle gegenseitige Information (PMI) zu schätzen und dann die gewünschten bedingten Wahrscheinlichkeiten aus PMI zur Testzeit abzuleiten. Insbesondere zeigen wir, dass wir mit geringfügigen Modifikationen des Word2vec Algorithmus prinzipielle Sprachmodelle erhalten, die eng mit den etablierten Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) basierten Sprachmodellen verwandt sind. Ein überzeugender Aspekt unseres Ansatzes ist, dass unsere Modelle mit der gleichen einfachen negativen Sampling-Objektivfunktion trainiert werden, die üblicherweise in word2vec verwendet wird, um Worteinbettungen zu lernen.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju, predstavljamo novi pristup jezičkim modelima obučavanjem njih kako bi procijenili međusobne informacije iz riječi-konteksta (PMI), a zatim izvršili željene uvjetne vjerojatnosti iz PMI u vrijeme testa. Posebno, pokazujemo da s manjim modifikacijama algoritma rečeni2veca dobijamo glavne jezičke modele koji su bliski povezani s dobro utvrđenim jezičkim modelima baziranim na procjenama kontrastivnog glasa (NCE). Uticavajući aspekt našeg pristupa je da su naši modeli obučeni sa istom jednostavnom negativnom objektivnom funkcijom uzimanja uzoraka koja se često koristi u rečju 2vek kako bi naučili uključenje riječi.', 'bg': 'В това проучване въвеждаме нов подход за изучаване на езикови модели, като ги обучаваме да оценяват думично-контекстната взаимна информация (ПЗМ), след което извличаме желаните условни вероятности от ПЗМ по време на теста. По-конкретно, показваме, че с незначителни модификации на алгоритъма получаваме принципни езикови модели, които са тясно свързани с добре установените езикови модели, базирани на оценка на шума. Привлекателен аспект на нашия подход е, че нашите модели са обучени със същата проста функция с цел отрицателна извадка, която обикновено се използва в за изучаване на вграждането на думи.', 'id': "Dalam penelitian ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk mempelajari model bahasa dengan melatih mereka untuk memperkirakan kata-konteks dengan titik informasi persamaan (PMI), dan kemudian mendapatkan kemungkinan syarat yang diinginkan dari PMI pada waktu tes. Specifically, we show that with minor modifications to word2vec's algorithm, we get principled language models that are closely related to the well-established Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) based language models.  Aspekt yang menarik dari pendekatan kita adalah bahwa model kita dilatih dengan fungsi objektif sampel negatif yang sama yang biasanya digunakan dalam word2vec untuk belajar penyembedding kata.", 'fa': 'در این مطالعه، ما یک روش جدید برای یادگیری مدل زبان را با آموزش آنها برای تقریبا کردن اطلاعات متفاوتی (PMI) به عنوان محیط کلمه\u200cهای متفاوتی (PMI) معرفی می\u200cکنیم، و سپس از احتمال شرایط خواسته\u200cای از PMI در زمان تست استفاده می\u200cکنی دقیقاً ما نشان می دهیم که با تغییرات کوچک الگوریتم کلمه ۲vek، ما مدل های اصلی زبان را می گیریم که نزدیک با مدل های ارزیابی با ارزیابی ارزیابی صوتی قابل ثابت شده (NCE) بسیار خوب ارتباط دارند. یک نقطه مجبور کننده از طریق ما این است که مدلهای ما با یک فعالیت موجود نمونه منفی ساده آموزش می\u200cشوند که معمولاً در کلمه ۲vek برای یاد گرفتن کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Katika utafiti huu, tunaonyesha mbinu mpya ya kujifunza mifano ya lugha kwa kuwafundisha ili kuwakadiria taarifa zinazohusiana na maneno (PMI), na kisha kuonyesha uwezekano wa mazingira yanayohitajika kutoka kwa PMI kwa wakati wa jaribio. Kwa ujumla, tunaonyesha kwamba kwa mabadiliko madogo ya algorithi ya neno la 2vec, tunapata mifano ya lugha ya msingi ambayo yanahusiana karibu na mifano ya Ujadala wa Ujadala (NCE) anayeishi kwenye lugha. Sehemu ya msingi wetu ni kuwa mifano yetu inafundishwa na kazi moja ya michezo yenye malengo ya hasi ambayo kwa kawaida hutumiwa katika Word2vec ili kujifunza ujumbe wa maneno.', 'ko': '이 연구에서 우리는 언어 모델을 학습하는 새로운 방법을 도입했다. 언어 모델을 훈련시켜 단어의 상하문에서 점차적인 상호정보(PMI)를 평가한 다음에 테스트 시 PMI에서 필요한 조건 확률을 도출하는 것이다.구체적으로 말하자면 워드2vec 알고리즘을 미세하게 수정한 후에 우리는 소음 대비 추정(NCE)을 바탕으로 하는 성숙한 언어 모델과 밀접한 관계를 가진 원칙적인 언어 모델을 얻었다.우리의 방법의 눈에 띄는 점은 우리의 모델은word2vec에서 자주 사용하는 학습 단어에 삽입된 간단한 마이너스 샘플링 목표 함수를 사용하여 훈련하는 것이다.', 'tr': 'Bu okuwda, biz dil nusgalaryny öwrenmek üçin täze bir ýazşy tanyşdyrýarys we soňra PMI-den isleýän şartlyk mümkinçiliklerini test wagtynda çykar. Adatça, 2vekiň algoritminiň azajyk üýtgewleri bilen, geň düzgün düzgün düzgün düzgün düzgün gürrüňli tarzda çykyş düzgünlere (NCE) baglanýan dil modellerine gollanýarys diýipdir. Biziň ýaryşymyzyň täsirli bölegimiz, nusgalarymyz kelime integrasyny öwrenmek üçin birnäçe ýeňil nädogry bölegi funksiýasy bilen bilinýär.', 'af': "In hierdie studie, introduseer ons 'n nuwe toegang vir die leer van taal modele deur hulle onderwerp om woord-konteks wys gemeenskaplike inligting (PMI) te vure, en dan afgelei die verwagte voorwaardige waarskynlikheite van PMI op toets tyd. Spesifieke, ons wys dat met minder veranderinge na woord2vec se algoritme, ons kry die vorderde taal modele wat naby verwante is met die goed gestalte Noise kontrastiewe estimatie (NCE) gebaseerde taal modele. 'n Oorweldige aspekt van ons toegang is dat ons modele is opgelei met dieselfde eenvoudige negatiewe versameling objektief funksie wat gewoonlik gebruik word in woorde 2vec om woord inbettings te leer.", 'sq': 'In this study, we introduce a new approach for learning language models by training them to estimate word-context pointwise mutual information (PMI), and then deriving the desired conditional probabilities from PMI at test time.  Në mënyrë specifike, ne tregojmë se me modifikime të vogla në algoritmin e word2vec, ne marrim modele gjuhësh të kryesuara që janë të lidhura ngushtë me modelet gjuhësore bazuar në vlerësimin e kundërshtueshëm të zhurmës (NCE). Një aspekt i bindshëm i qasjes sonë është se modelet tona janë stërvitur me të njëjtin funksion objektiv të thjeshtë të mosmarrëveshjes negative që përdoret zakonisht në fjalë2vec për të mësuar përfshirjen e fjalëve.', 'am': "በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለማስተማር አዲስ ልውቀት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ለቃላት 2vec'ን አሌgoritm ትንሽ ሽፋኖች እናሳየዋለን፣ የቋንቋ ሞዴላዎች በተመሳሳይ አነስተኛ ቋንቋ አካላት (NCE) የተመሳሳይ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ የልግስናችን ግንኙነት ግን ሞዴሎቻችን በአንድ ቀላል የnegative ምሳሌ አካባቢ ሥራ እንዲያስተማሩ ነው፡፡", 'az': 'Bu təhsil içində, dil modellərini öyrənmək üçün yeni bir yol göstəririk, onları söz-məlumatlarını təhsil etmək üçün təhsil edirik və sonra PMI təhsil vaxtında istədiyi şəkildə mümkün olaraq təhsil edirik. Özellikle, biz 2vec algoritminin küçük dəyişiklikləri ilə müəyyən edilmiş dil modelləri ilə yaxınlaşdırılmış s əs kontrastif təsiri (NCE) dil modelləri ilə yaxınlaşdırılmışdır. Yaxınlığımızın zorlaşdırıcı bir aspekti, modellərimiz sözləri içərisində öyrənmək üçün çox olaraq istifadə edilən oxumuz negatif nümunə oxumaq objektif funksiyası ilə təhsil edilmişdir.', 'hy': "Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք լեզվի մոդելների սովորելու նոր մոտեցում' սովորեցնելով նրանց բառի-կոնտեքստի գնահատելու իմաստային փոխադարձ տեղեկատվությունը (ՄՄԻ) և հետո ստանալով ուզում պայմանավոր հավանականությունները ՄԻ Հատկապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ 2Վ բառի ալգորիթմի փոքր փոփոխություններով մենք ստանում ենք լեզվի հիմնական մոդելներ, որոնք շատ կապված են լավ հաստատված աղմուկի հակադրական գնահատման (NCE) հիմնված լեզվի մոդելների հետ: Մեր մոտեցումների համոզված ասպեկտը նրանում է, որ մեր մոդելները վարժեցվում են նույն պարզ բացասական նմուշներ վերցնելու օբյեկտիվ ֆունկցիայով, որը սովորաբար օգտագործվում է 2Վ բառերի ներգրավման համար:", 'bs': 'U ovom ispitivanju, predstavljamo novi pristup jezičkim modelima, obučavajući ih kako bi procijenili riječi-kontekstske međusobne informacije (PMI), a zatim dobili željene uvjetne mogućnosti iz PMI u testu. Posebno, pokazujemo da sa manjim modifikacijama algoritma rečeni2veca dobijamo principalne jezičke modele koji su bliski povezani sa dobro uspostavljenim jezičkim modelima jezika baziranim na procjenama kontrastivnog glasa (NCE). Uticavajući aspekt našeg pristupa je da su naši modeli obučeni sa istom jednostavnom negativnom objektivnom funkcijom uzorka koja se uobičajeno koristi u rečju 2vek kako bi naučili uključenje riječi.', 'ca': "En aquest estudi, introduïm un nou enfocament per aprendre models de llenguatge formant-los per estimar la informació mutua en sentit de paraula-context (IMP), i després derivant les probabilitats condicionals desitjades de IMP en el moment de la prova. Especificament, demostram que amb modificacions minor s en l'algoritme de word2vec, obtenim models lingüístics principiosos que estan estretament relacionats amb models lingüístics basats en l'Estima Contrastiva del Brut (NCE). Un aspecte convincent del nostre enfocament és que els nostres models estan entrenats amb la mateixa funció objectiva negativa que s'utilitza normalment en word2vec per aprendre integracions de paraules.", 'cs': 'V této práci představujeme nový přístup k učení jazykových modelů tím, že je školíme odhadovat vzájemné informace v kontextu slova a následně odvodíme požadované podmíněné pravděpodobnosti z PMI v době testu. Konkrétně ukazujeme, že s drobnými úpravami algoritmu Word2vec získáváme zásadní jazykové modely, které jsou úzce související s zavedenými jazykovými modely založenými na NCE (Noise Contrastive Estimation). Přesvědčivým aspektem našeho přístupu je, že naše modely jsou trénovány se stejnou jednoduchou funkcí negativního vzorkování, která je běžně používána ve Word2vec k učení se vložení slov.', 'bn': 'এই গবেষণায় আমরা ভাষা মডেল শিক্ষা শিক্ষার জন্য একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি তুলে ধরি তাদের প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে শব্দ-প্রেক্ষেত্রের বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়বস্তুর ব বিশেষ করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শব্দ২ভেকের আলগরিদমের সামান্য পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রধান ভাষার মডেল পেয়েছি যারা ভালো স্থিরিত নোসের কন্ট্রেস্ট্রেটি আমাদের পদক্ষেপের একটি বাধ্যতামূলক প্রতিক্রিয়া হচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল একই সাধারণ নেতিবাচক উদাহরণের সাথে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যা সাধার', 'et': 'Käesolevas uuringus tutvustame uut lähenemisviisi keelemudelite õppimiseks, koolitades neid hindama sõna-konteksti punktilist vastastikust informatsiooni (PMI) ning seejärel tuletades PMI-st soovitud tingimuslikud tõenäosused testimise ajal. Täpsemalt näitame, et Word2vec algoritmi väikeste muudatustega saame põhimõttelisi keelemudeleid, mis on tihedalt seotud väljakujunenud müra kontrastiivse hindamise (NCE) keelemudelitega. Meie lähenemisviisi veenvaks aspektiks on see, et meie mudelid on koolitatud sama lihtsa negatiivse valimi eesmärgi funktsiooniga, mida tavaliselt kasutatakse Word2vec sõna manustamise õppimiseks.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa esitellään uusi lähestymistapa kielimallien oppimiseen kouluttamalla niitä arvioimaan sana-konteksti pointwise mutual information (PMI) ja johtamaan haluttuja ehdollisia todennäköisyyksiä PMI:stä testiaikana. Erityisesti osoitamme, että Word2vecin algoritmiin tehdyillä pienillä muutoksilla saamme periaatteellisia kielimalleja, jotka liittyvät läheisesti vakiintuneisiin Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) -kielimalleihin. Mielenkiintoinen näkökulma lähestymistapaamme on se, että mallejamme koulutetaan samalla yksinkertaisella negatiivisella näytteenottoobjektiivilla, jota käytetään yleisesti Word2vecissä sanan upottamiseen.', 'jv': "Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gunakake sistem anyar kanggo ingkang model sing luwih panelusuran kanggo kuwi nggunakake gambar nggo kuwi nggawe informasi gambar n' titik dhéwé CURRENTCURRENT Aspect ratio dhéwé", 'ha': "Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã ƙara wani hanyoyi na karanta misãlai cikin harshen zuwa a ƙidãya su ƙidãya masu muhimmin maganar-mazaɓa da mutane (PRI), kuma sai Mu sami masu yiwuwa da aka ƙayyade daga mazaɓa a lokacin da aka jarraba. Aka ƙayyade, munã nuna cewa, idan an canza sigarin zuwa algoritm na 2vc, za'a sami misãlai masu ƙaranci cikin harshen waɗanda ke mafi kusantar haɗi da tsarin da aka samar da shi na fasahan Nose Contrastive (NCE). Bayan wani abu mai lazimta daga hanyarmu ne aka sanar da misalinmu da aikin misalin misãlai mai sauƙi da abin da ke amfani da shi, a cikin word2webc don ya sanar da masu shiga maganar.", 'he': 'במחקר הזה, אנחנו מציגים גישה חדשה ללמוד דוגמני שפת על ידי אימון אותם להעריך מילה-קונטקסט מידע משני נקודות (PMI), ואז להשיג את הסבירות המתנאיות הנרצאות מ-PMI בזמן המבחן. במיוחד, אנחנו מראים כי עם שינויים קטנים לאלגוריתם של Word2vec, אנחנו מקבלים מודלים שפות בעקרונות שקשורים קרוב לדוגמנים שפות המבוססים בהערכה נוגדית רעש (NCE). היבט משכנע של הגישה שלנו הוא שהדוגמנים שלנו מאומנים עם אותה פונקציה אובייקטיבית שלילית פשוטה', 'sk': 'V tej študiji predstavljamo nov pristop k učenju jezikovnih modelov, tako da jih usposabljamo za ocenjevanje besedno-kontekstnih točkovnih medsebojnih informacij (PMI), nato pa izpeljemo želene pogojne verjetnosti iz PMI v času testiranja. Natančneje pokažemo, da z manjšimi spremembami algoritma word2vec dobimo načelne jezikovne modele, ki so tesno povezani z uveljavljenimi jezikovnimi modeli na podlagi NCE (Noise Contrastive Estimation). Privlačen vidik našega pristopa je, da so naši modeli usposobljeni z enako preprosto negativno vzorčenjsko funkcijo, ki se običajno uporablja v Word2vec za učenje vgradnje besed.', 'bo': "In this study, we introduced a new approach for learning language models by training them to estimate word-context pointwise mutual information (PMI), and then derive the desired conditional probabilities from PMI at test time. Specifically, we show that with minor modifications to word2vec's algorithm, we get principled language models that are closely related to the well-established Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) based language models. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་མཐའ་འཁོར་སྟངས་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྩོལ་བ་སྟངས་བདེ་ཐག་ཆུང་གི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པ་རེད།"}
{'en': 'Inducing Semantic Micro-Clusters from Deep Multi-View Representations of Novels', 'ar': 'استحثاث المجموعات الدقيقة الدلالية من تمثيلات الروايات متعددة العروض العميقة', 'fr': 'Induction de micro-clusters sémantiques à partir de représentations multivues profondes de romans', 'pt': 'Induzindo Microclusters Semânticos a partir de Representações Multi-Visualização Profundas de Romances', 'es': 'Inducir microclústeres semánticos a partir de representaciones multivista profundas de novelas', 'ja': '小説の深層マルチビュー表現からセマンティックマイクロクラスターを誘導する', 'zh': '小言深度多视图示诱语义微集群', 'hi': 'उपन्यासों के गहरे मल्टी-व्यू प्रतिनिधित्व से सिमेंटिक माइक्रो-क्लस्टर को प्रेरित करना', 'ru': 'Индуцирование семантических микрокластеров из глубоких многовидовых представлений романов', 'ga': 'Micrea-chnuasaigh Shéimeantacha a aslú ó Léirithe Ilamhairc ar Úrscéalta', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Indurre micro-cluster semantici dalle rappresentazioni multi-vista profonde dei romanzi', 'kk': 'Жаңалықтардың көп- қарау кескіндерінен семантикалық микро- кластерді көтеру', 'hu': 'Szemantikus mikroklaszterek indukálása regények mély többnézetű ábrázolásából', 'el': 'Προκίνηση Σημαντικών Μικροσμήνων από βαθιές πολυοπτικές αναπαραστάσεις μυθιστοριών', 'lt': 'Inducing Semantic Micro-Clusters from Deep Multi-View Representations of Novels', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പല- കാഴ്ച പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമാന്റിക് മൈക്രോ- ക്ലസ്റ്റര്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Гүн олон харагдах олон шинжлэх ухааны микро-кластеруудыг', 'mk': 'Индуцирање на семантични микрокластри од длабоките мултипогледни претставувања на романите', 'mt': 'L-induzzjoni ta’ mikroraggruppamenti Semantiċi minn Rappreżentazzjonijiet Multiviżivi Profondi ta’ Novelli', 'no': 'Induksjon av semiantiske mikroklassar frå dyppa fleirvisingsrepresentasjonar av nover', 'ro': 'Inducerea microclusterelor semantice din reprezentarea profundă multivizuală a romanelor', 'pl': 'Indukcja semantycznych mikroklastrów z głębokich reprezentacji powieści', 'sr': 'Ucinjavajući semantične mikro-klustere iz dubokog višestrukog predstavljanja Novela', 'sv': 'Frambringa semantiska mikrokluster från djupa multivisuella representationer av romaner', 'so': 'Inducing Semantic Micro-Clusters from Deep-View Representations of Novels', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی میکروٹ کلستر کو نیوئل کی عمیق Multi-View Representations سے نشان دیتا ہے', 'ta': 'Name', 'ms': 'Menyulakan Mikro-Kelompok Semantik dari Perwakilan Baru-Paparan Dalam Dalam Novel', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sản xuất tinh vi hỗn loạn từ Deep multishow Representations of novel', 'bg': 'Индуктиране на семантични микро-клъстери от дълбоки многообразни представи на романи', 'nl': 'Semantische microclusters induceren uit diepe multi-view representaties van romans', 'hr': 'Podsticajući semantičke mikroklastre iz dubokog višestrukog pogleda predstavljanja novčanica', 'da': 'Induktion af semantiske mikroklynger fra dybe multi-view repræsentationer af romaner', 'de': 'Semantische Mikrocluster aus tiefen Multi-View-Darstellungen von Romanen induzieren', 'fa': 'تولید میکروپانتیک میکروپانتیک از نمایش\u200cهای زیادی نمایش\u200cهای نوئل\u200cها', 'id': 'Menyindusikan Micro-Clusters Semantik dari Perwakilan Multi-Paparan Dalam Novel', 'ko': '소설의 심층 다각도 표징에서 의미의 미집단을 귀납하다', 'sw': 'Kuonyesha viwanja vya Micro-Makundi vya Semantic from deep view of Novels', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Duke nxitur mikro-grupe Semantike nga përfaqësimet e thella me shumë pamje të romanëve', 'tr': 'Galan köp görnöşinden gelen Micro Clusters', 'az': '仃뙶泉饲楮ⁱ慲慮泄녱⁇쎶狃뱮쎼얟⁇쎶狃뱮쎼얟泉饲楮擉饮⁓敭慮瑩欠䵩歲漭䭵汴畲污狄넊', 'am': 'መንቀሳቅስ', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ միկրոխլաստրերի արտադրումը նորությունների խորը բազմատեսողական ներկայացումներից', 'bn': 'গভীর মাল্টিক- ভিউ প্রতিনিধি থেকে সেম্যান্টিক মাইক্রো- ক্লাস্টার প্রদর্শন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Ucinjavajući semantičke mikroklastre iz dubokog višepogleda predstavljanja novčanica', 'ca': 'Inducir microgrups Semàtics a partir de representacions multivistes profundes de novels', 'cs': 'Indukce sémantických mikroclusterů z hlubokých multipohledových reprezentací románů', 'et': 'Semantiliste mikroklastrite indutseerimine romaanide sügavatest mitmevaadetest', 'fi': 'Semanttisten mikroklusterien indusoiminen romaanien syvästä moninäkymästä', 'jv': 'Ngubah semanti mikro-clusteres karo deep Multi-ViewItems', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Indukcija semantičnih mikro grozdov iz globokih večpoglednih predstavitev romanov', 'he': 'מיקרוקלסטרים סמנטיים ממצגות רבות עמוקות של רומנים', 'bo': 'Inducing Semantic Micro-Clusters from Deep Multi-View Representations of Novels'}
{'en': 'Automatically understanding the plot of novels is important both for informing literary scholarship and applications such as summarization or recommendation. Various models have addressed this task, but their evaluation has remained largely intrinsic and qualitative. Here, we propose a principled and scalable framework leveraging expert-provided semantic tags (e.g., mystery, pirates) to evaluate plot representations in an extrinsic fashion, assessing their ability to produce locally coherent groupings of novels (micro-clusters) in model space. We present a deep recurrent autoencoder model that learns richly structured multi-view plot representations, and show that they i) yield better micro-clusters than less structured representations ; and ii) are interpretable, and thus useful for further literary analysis or labeling of the emerging micro-clusters.', 'fr': "La compréhension automatique de l'intrigue des romans est importante à la fois pour informer l'érudition littéraire et pour les applications telles que le résumé ou la recommandation. Différents modèles ont répondu à cette tâche, mais leur évaluation est restée largement intrinsèque et qualitative. Nous proposons ici un cadre basé sur des principes et évolutif utilisant des balises sémantiques fournies par des experts (par exemple, mystère, pirates) pour évaluer les représentations d'intrigue de manière extrinsèque, évaluant leur capacité à produire des regroupements cohérents localement de romans (micro-clusters) dans l'espace modèle. Nous présentons un modèle d'auto-encodeur récurrent profond qui apprend des représentations graphiques multivues richement structurées, et montre qu'elles i) produisent de meilleurs micro-agrégats que des représentations moins structurées\xa0; et ii) sont interprétables, et donc utiles pour une analyse littéraire ou un étiquetage plus poussés des micro-grappes émergentes.", 'pt': 'A compreensão automática do enredo dos romances é importante tanto para informar o conhecimento literário quanto para aplicações como resumo ou recomendação. Vários modelos abordaram essa tarefa, mas sua avaliação permaneceu em grande parte intrínseca e qualitativa. Aqui, propomos uma estrutura escalável e baseada em princípios, alavancando tags semânticas fornecidas por especialistas (por exemplo, mistério, piratas) para avaliar representações de enredo de maneira extrínseca, avaliando sua capacidade de produzir agrupamentos localmente coerentes de romances (micro-clusters) no espaço do modelo. Apresentamos um modelo de autoencoder recorrente e profundo que aprende representações de plotagem multi-view ricamente estruturadas e mostramos que elas i) produzem melhores micro-clusters do que representações menos estruturadas; e ii) são interpretáveis e, portanto, úteis para posterior análise literária ou rotulagem dos microgrupos emergentes.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم حبكة الروايات تلقائيًا أمرًا مهمًا لإعلام المنح الأدبية والتطبيقات مثل التلخيص أو التوصية. عالجت نماذج مختلفة هذه المهمة ، لكن تقييمها ظل جوهريًا ونوعيًا إلى حد كبير. هنا ، نقترح إطارًا مبدئيًا وقابلًا للتطوير يستفيد من العلامات الدلالية التي يوفرها الخبراء (على سبيل المثال ، الغموض والقراصنة) لتقييم تمثيلات الحبكة بطريقة خارجية ، وتقييم قدرتها على إنتاج مجموعات متماسكة محليًا من الروايات (مجموعات صغيرة) في مساحة النموذج. نقدم نموذجًا عميقًا للتشفير التلقائي المتكرر يتعلم تمثيلات مؤامرة متعددة العرض منظمة بشكل غني ، ويظهر أنها (أ) تنتج مجموعات صغيرة أفضل من التمثيلات الأقل تنظيمًا ؛ و 2) قابلة للتفسير ، وبالتالي فهي مفيدة لمزيد من التحليل الأدبي أو وضع العلامات على المجموعات الصغيرة الناشئة.', 'es': 'La comprensión automática de la trama de las novelas es importante tanto para informar la erudición literaria como para las solicitudes, como el resumen o la recomendación. Varios modelos han abordado esta tarea, pero su evaluación ha seguido siendo en gran medida intrínseca y cualitativa. Aquí, proponemos un marco escalable y basado en principios que aprovecha las etiquetas semánticas proporcionadas por expertos (por ejemplo, misterio, piratas) para evaluar las representaciones de la trama de una manera extrínseca, evaluando su capacidad para producir agrupaciones de novelas coherentes a nivel local (microclusters) en el espacio modelo. Presentamos un modelo de autocodificador recurrente profundo que aprende representaciones de parcelas multivista ricamente estructuradas, y mostramos que i) producen mejores microclústeres que representaciones menos estructuradas; y ii) son interpretables y, por lo tanto, útiles para el análisis literario o el etiquetado de los microclústeres emergentes.', 'ja': '小説のプロットを自動的に理解することは、文学的な学問に情報を提供するためにも、要約や推奨などの応用にも重要である。さまざまなモデルがこの課題に取り組んできたが、その評価はほとんど本質的かつ質的なものに留まっている。ここでは、専門家が提供するセマンティックタグ（例えば、ミステリー、海賊）を活用して、プロット表現を外部的な方法で評価し、モデル空間で小説（マイクロクラスタ）の局所的に一貫したグループを生成する能力を評価する原理的でスケーラブルなフレームワークを提案する。我々は、豊富に構造化されたマルチビュープロット表現を学習し、それらがi ）構造化の少ない表現よりも優れたマイクロクラスターを生み出すこと、およびii ）解釈可能であり、したがって、新興マイクロクラスターのさらなる文献分析またはラベル付けに有用であることを示す深い繰り返しのオートエンコーダーモデルを提示する。', 'zh': '自解小说情节,于文学、总结、荐举等应用信息皆重。 诸模已解其事,而其估犹内定性也。 设有道广框架,因专家之语义标(,秘盗版)之外,评其形势之间,生局贯之说(微集群)分朋之力。 深循环自编码器,学多视图图,明其i)少于结构微聚类; 与ii)可解,故可施于文学析新微观集群之标。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूप से उपन्यासों के कथानक को समझना साहित्यिक छात्रवृत्ति और अनुप्रयोगों जैसे सारांश या सिफारिश को सूचित करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। विभिन्न मॉडलों ने इस कार्य को संबोधित किया है, लेकिन उनका मूल्यांकन काफी हद तक आंतरिक और गुणात्मक रहा है। यहां, हम एक बाहरी फैशन में साजिश प्रतिनिधित्व का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए विशेषज्ञ-प्रदान किए गए शब्दार्थ टैग (जैसे, रहस्य, समुद्री डाकू) का लाभ उठाने के लिए एक सैद्धांतिक और स्केलेबल फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, मॉडल स्पेस में उपन्यासों (माइक्रो-क्लस्टर) के स्थानीय रूप से सुसंगत समूहों का उत्पादन करने की उनकी क्षमता का आकलन करते हैं। हम एक गहरी आवर्तक ऑटोएनकोडर मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो समृद्ध रूप से संरचित बहु-दृश्य प्लॉट प्रतिनिधित्व सीखता है, और दिखाते हैं कि वे i) कम संरचित प्रतिनिधित्व की तुलना में बेहतर माइक्रो-क्लस्टर उत्पन्न करते हैं; और ii) व्याख्यायोग्य हैं, और इस प्रकार उभरते हुए सूक्ष्म समूहों के आगे के साहित्यिक विश्लेषण या लेबलिंग के लिए उपयोगी हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматическое понимание сюжета романов важно как для информирования литературоведения, так и для приложений, таких как резюме или рекомендации. Различные модели решают эту задачу, но их оценка остается в значительной степени внутренней и качественной. Здесь мы предлагаем принципиальную и масштабируемую структуру, использующую предоставленные экспертами семантические теги (например, тайны, пираты) для оценки представлений сюжета внешним образом, оценивая их способность создавать локально согласованные группировки романов (микрокластеров) в пространстве моделей. Мы представляем модель глубокого повторяющегося автокодирования, которая изучает богато структурированные многовидовые графические представления и показывает, что они i) дают лучшие микрокластеры, чем менее структурированные представления; и ii) являются интерпретируемыми и, таким образом, полезными для дальнейшего литературного анализа или маркировки возникающих микрокластеров.', 'ga': 'Tá sé tábhachtach plota na n-úrscéal a thuiscint go huathoibríoch chun eolas a thabhairt do scoláireacht liteartha agus d’fheidhmchláir mar achoimre nó moladh. Tá múnlaí éagsúla tar éis dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, ach tá a gcuid meastóireachta fós intreach agus cáilíochtúil den chuid is mó. Anseo, molaimid creat prionsabal agus inscálaithe a ghiaráil clibeanna shéimeantacha arna soláthar ag saineolaithe (m.sh., mistéir, foghlaithe mara) chun léirithe plota a mheas ar bhealach eistreach, ag measúnú a gcumas grúpálacha comhleanúnacha áitiúla d’úrscéalta (micrea-chnuasaigh) a tháirgeadh i spás samhla. Cuirimid i láthair múnla uath-ionchódóra athfhillteach domhain a fhoghlaimíonn léirithe plota ilamhairc atá struchtúrtha go saibhir, agus a thaispeánann go (i) go dtugann siad micreabhraislí níos fearr ná léirithe níos lú struchtúrtha; agus ii) gur féidir iad a léirmhíniú, agus úsáideach mar sin chun tuilleadh anailíse liteartha nó lipéadú a dhéanamh ar na micrea-chnuasaigh atá ag teacht chun cinn.', 'hu': 'A regények cselekményének automatikus megértése fontos mind az irodalmi ösztöndíj tájékoztatásához, mind az olyan pályázatokhoz, mint az összefoglalás vagy az ajánlás. Különböző modellek kezelték ezt a feladatot, de értékelésük nagyrészt belső és minőségi maradt. Itt egy elvi és skálázható keretrendszert javasolunk, amely a szakértők által biztosított szemantikai címkéket (pl. rejtélyek, kalózok) használja a cselekmények ábrázolásának külső módon történő értékelésére, felmérve azok képességét, hogy lokálisan koherens regénycsoportokat (mikroklaszterek) készítsenek modelltérben. Bemutatunk egy mély visszatérő autokódoló modellt, amely gazdagon strukturált multi-view plot reprezentációkat tanul, és megmutatja, hogy i) jobb mikroklasztereket eredményez, mint a kevésbé strukturált reprezentációk; és ii) értelmezhetőek, és így hasznosak a kialakuló mikroklaszterek további irodalmi elemzéséhez vagy címkézéséhez.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη κατανόηση της πλοκής των μυθιστορημάτων είναι σημαντική τόσο για την ενημέρωση της λογοτεχνικής επιστήμης όσο και για αιτήσεις όπως σύνοψη ή σύσταση. Διάφορα μοντέλα αντιμετώπισαν το έργο αυτό, αλλά η αξιολόγησή τους παρέμεινε σε μεγάλο βαθμό εγγενής και ποιοτική. Εδώ, προτείνουμε ένα θεμελιώδες και κλιμακωτό πλαίσιο που χρησιμοποιεί σημασιολογικές ετικέτες που παρέχονται από εμπειρογνώμονες (π.χ. μυστήριο, πειρατές) για να αξιολογήσει τις αναπαραστάσεις πλοκής με εξωφρενικό τρόπο, αξιολογώντας την ικανότητά τους να παράγουν τοπικά συνεκτικές ομάδες μυθιστορημάτων (μικροσυστάδες) στο χώρο μοντέλου. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα βαθύ επαναλαμβανόμενο μοντέλο αυτόματου κωδικοποιητή που μαθαίνει πλούσια δομημένες αναπαραστάσεις πλοκής πολλαπλών προβολών και δείχνει ότι αποδίδουν καλύτερες μικροσυστάδες από λιγότερο δομημένες αναπαραστάσεις. και ii) είναι ερμηνευτές και συνεπώς χρήσιμες για περαιτέρω λογοτεχνική ανάλυση ή επισήμανση των αναδυόμενων μικροσυστάδων.', 'ka': 'პრომენტების პროგრამის ავტომატურად გაგრძნობა მნიშვნელოვანია, როგორც ლიტერატური სტუდენტი და პროგრამების ინფორმაციაში, როგორც სისუდენტიზა განსხვავებული მოდელები ამ დავალების შესახებ, მაგრამ მათი განსაზღვრება ძალიან ინტერნექტიური და კვალიტატიური დარჩენა. აქ, ჩვენ მინდა პრინციპულ და მარტივი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ექსპერტიკური სემონტიკური ჭდეები (მაგალითად, მთესტერია, ოთრატი) გავამუშაოთ პროგრამის გამოსახულებების გამოსახულებას, რომელიც მათი შესაძლებლობა მხოლოდ კონომენტიკური ჯგ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ძალიან რეკურენტიური ავტოკოდერების მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო სტრუქტურებული მრავალური მონაცემები პროგრამის გამოსახულებები, და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ i) მიკროკოდერები უფრო მცირე და ii) შეიძლება ინტერპლექტირებულია, და ამიტომ გამოყენებელია მეტი ლიტრატური ანალიზაციისთვის ანალიზაციისთვის ანალიზაციისთვის.', 'mk': 'Автоматското разбирање на планот на романите е важно за информирање на литературната стипендија и апликациите како што е резултатот или препораката. Разни модели ја решија оваа задача, но нивната оценка остана во голема мера интересна и квалитетна. Овде, предложуваме принципирана и скалирана рамка која ќе ги искористи семантичките ознаки обезбедени од експертите (на пример, мистерија, пирати) за проценка на претставувањата на заговорите на екстринзички начин, проценка на нивната способност да создадат локално кохерентни групи на романи (микрокластри) во моделниот простор Презентираме длабок рецидент модел на автокодер кој научи богато структурирани мултипогледни графички претставувања и покажува дека i) даваат подобри микрокластри отколку помалку структурирани претставувања; и ii) се интерпретабилни и со тоа корисни за понатамошна литературна анализа или етикетирање на новите микрокластри.', 'lt': 'Automatiškai suprasti romanų sklypą svarbu tiek informuojant literatūros stipendijas, tiek ir taikant tokias programas kaip santrauka ar rekomendacija. Šią užduotį išnagrinėjo įvairi modeliai, tačiau jų vertinimas išliko iš esmės būdingas ir kokybiškas. Čia mes siūlome principinę ir skaliuojamą sistemą, pagal kurią būtų naudojami ekspertų suteikti semantiniai ženklai (pvz., paslaptys, piratai), siekiant įvertinti ploto atstovavimus išoriniu būdu, vertinant jų gebėjimą sukurti vietos nuoseklias romanų grupes (mikroklasterius) modelių erdvėje. We present a deep recurrent autoencoder model that learns richly structured multi-view plot representations, and show that they i) yield better micro-clusters than less structured representations;  ii) yra aiškinamos ir todėl naudingos tolesnei naujų mikrogrupių literatūrai analizei arba ženklinimui.', 'it': "Comprendere automaticamente la trama dei romanzi è importante sia per informare la borsa di studio letteraria che per applicazioni come sintesi o raccomandazione. Vari modelli hanno affrontato questo compito, ma la loro valutazione è rimasta in gran parte intrinseca e qualitativa. Qui, proponiamo un framework basato su principi e scalabili che sfrutta tag semantici forniti da esperti (ad esempio, mistero, pirati) per valutare le rappresentazioni della trama in modo estrinseco, valutando la loro capacità di produrre raggruppamenti localmente coerenti di romanzi (micro-cluster) nello spazio modello. Presentiamo un modello di autocodificatore ricorrente profondo che apprende rappresentazioni di plot multi-view riccamente strutturate, e mostra che i) producono micro-cluster migliori rispetto a rappresentazioni meno strutturate; e ii) sono interpretabili e quindi utili per un'ulteriore analisi letteraria o etichettatura dei micro-cluster emergenti.", 'ms': 'Pemahaman secara automatik plot novel adalah penting kedua-dua untuk maklumkan bursa sastra dan aplikasi seperti ringkasan atau rekomendasi. Berbagai model telah mengatasi tugas ini, tetapi penilaian mereka telah kekal pada sebagian besar intrinsik dan kualitatif. Di sini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian berprinsip dan boleh skala menggunakan tag semantik yang diberikan ahli (misalnya misteri, lanun) untuk menilai perwakilan plot dalam cara ekstrinsik, menilai kemampuan mereka untuk menghasilkan kumpulan novel secara setempat yang konsisten (mikro-kumpulan) dalam ruang model. Kami memperkenalkan model auto pengekod yang berulang-ulang yang mempelajari persembahan plot berbilang-pandangan yang terstruktur yang kaya, dan menunjukkan bahawa i) menghasilkan kumpulan mikro yang lebih baik daripada persembahan yang kurang struktur; dan ii) boleh ditafsirkan, dan berguna untuk analisis literari lanjut atau label mikrokelompok yang muncul.', 'kk': 'Романың графикасын автоматты түрде түсініп, әріпті стипендік пен қолданбаларды, мысалы, тұжырымдамасы не рекомендациясы, туралы мәліметті түсініңіз. Бұл тапсырманы бірнеше үлгілер адресті, бірақ олардың бағалауы көбінде ішкі және сапатты болды. Мұнда, біз көпшілік және масштабтау бағдарламасын эксперттердің келтірілген семантикалық тегтерін (мысалы, тасымалылық, пираттар) сыртқы тәсілдерді бағалау үшін, олардың жергілікті топтастыру мүмкіндіктерін (микро-кластердің) үлгілерінде жасауға Біз қайталанатын автокодер үлгісін көрсетедік. Бұл көптеген көптеген көрініс планеталарының түсініктерін оқып, i) микро- кластерді құрылған кескіндерден артық түсініктерді көрсетеді. ii) түсіндіруге болады, сонымен қатар көмектесетін микро-кластердің алғашқы литературалық анализ не жарлықтау үшін пайдалы.', 'mt': "Il-fehim awtomatiku tal-kompost tar-rombli huwa importanti kemm għall-informazzjoni tal-borża ta’ studju letterarju kif ukoll għall-applikazzjonijiet bħas-sommarju jew ir-rakkomandazzjoni. Diversi mudelli indirizzaw dan il-kompitu, iżda l-evalwazzjoni tagħhom baqgħet fil-biċċa l-kbira intrinsika u kwalitattiva. Hawnhekk, qed nipproponu qafas prinċipjat u skalabbli li jagħti spinta lit-tikketti semantiċi pprovduti mill-esperti (pereżempju, misteri, pirati) biex jevalwaw ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-plots b’mod estern, u jivvalutaw il-kapaċità tagħhom li jipproduċu raggruppamenti lokali koerenti ta’ romanzi (mikroraggruppamenti) fl-ispazju mudell. Aħna nippreżentaw mudell rikorrenti profond ta' awtokoders li jitgħallem rappreżentazzjonijiet strutturati b'ħafna viżti, u nuru li i) jagħtu mikroraggruppamenti a ħjar minn rappreżentazzjonijiet inqas strutturati; u ii) huma interpretabbli, u għalhekk utli għal aktar analiżi letterarja jew tikkettar tal-mikroraggruppamenti emerġenti.", 'no': 'Automatisk forstår plottet på romanar er viktig både for å informera bokstavarske stipende og program som samansering eller anbefaling. Fleire modeller har adressert denne oppgåva, men deres evalueringa er fortsatt stort intrinsisk og kvalitativ. Her foreslår vi eit prinsippet og skalerbar rammeverk som leverer eksperten-leverer semantiske merker (f.eks. mysterium, piratar) for å evaluera plottsrepresentasjonar i eit ekstrinsk måte, og vurdere dei mulighetene til å produsera lokalt samanlige grupper av romanar (mikroklassar) i modellerom. Vi presenterer ein dyp gjentaande autokodingsmodell som lærer riktig strukturerte multivisningsplanerepresentasjonar, og viser at dei i) gjer betre mikroklassar enn mindre strukturerte representasjonar. og ii) er tolkbare, og derfor er nyttig for ytterligere literar analyse eller etiketting av dei utgåande mikroklassar.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne zrozumienie fabuły powieści jest ważne zarówno dla informowania nauki literackiej, jak i wniosków takich jak podsumowanie czy rekomendacja. Różne modele zajęły się tym zadaniem, ale ich ocena pozostała w dużej mierze wewnętrzna i jakościowa. Proponujemy zasadnicze i skalowalne ramy wykorzystujące znaczniki semantyczne dostarczone przez ekspertów (np. tajemnice, piraci) do oceny reprezentacji fabuły w sposób zewnętrzny, oceniając ich zdolność do tworzenia lokalnie spójnych grup powieści (mikroklastrów) w przestrzeni modelowej. Przedstawiamy głęboki, powtarzający się model autokodera, który uczy się bogato ustrukturyzowanych reprezentacji wykresu wielu widoków i pokazuje, że i) dają lepsze mikroklastry niż mniej ustrukturyzowane reprezentacje; i ii) są interpretowalne, a zatem przydatne do dalszej analizy literackiej lub oznaczania powstających mikroklastrów.', 'ml': 'നോവലുകളുടെ പ്ലാന്\u200d സ്വയം മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് സാഹിത്ര വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിതിയും പ്രയോഗങ്ങളും വിവരമറിയിക്ക വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വിവരമറിയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ അവരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ആവേകത്തി ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്\u200dറിക് ടാഗുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ (ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി രഹസ്യ, പൈറ്ററുകള്\u200d) പ്രതിനിധികള ഒരു ആഴത്തില്\u200d തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന ഓട്ടോകോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് വളരെ കൃത്യമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പല്ലിക് എന്നിട്ട് വ്യാഖ്യാനിക്കുന്നതാണ്, അതുകൊണ്ട് കൂടുതല്\u200d സാഹിത്ര വിശദീകരണത്തിനോ പുറപ്പെടുന്ന മൈക്രോ ക്ലസ്റ', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea automată a complotului romanelor este importantă atât pentru informarea burselor literare, cât și pentru aplicații cum ar fi rezumarea sau recomandarea. Diferite modele au abordat această sarcină, dar evaluarea lor a rămas în mare parte intrinsecă și calitativă. Aici, propunem un cadru principial și scalabil care utilizează etichete semantice furnizate de experți (de exemplu, mister, pirați) pentru a evalua reprezentările complotului într-o manieră extrinsă, evaluând capacitatea acestora de a produce grupuri locale coerente de romane (micro-clustere) în spațiul model. Vă prezentăm un model de autoencoder recurent profund care învață reprezentări complot multi-view bogat structurate și arată că i) produc micro-clustere mai bune decât reprezentări mai puțin structurate; și ii) sunt interpretabile și, prin urmare, utile pentru analiza literară ulterioară sau etichetarea microclusterelor emergente.', 'sr': 'Automatski razumijevanje ploča romana je važno i za informaciju književne stipendije i aplikacije poput sažetke ili preporuke. Razni modeli su riješili ovaj zadatak, ali njihova procjena je ostala u velikoj mjeri intrinsična i kvalitativna. Ovde predlažemo principalni i skalabilni okvir koji utiču na semantičke etikete (npr. misterije, pirate) predstavljene stručnjakima (npr. misterija, pirati) kako bi procenili zastupanje ploča na ekstrintički način, procenili njihovu sposobnost da proizvode lokalne saskaņotne grupe romana (mikroklastera) u modelu svemira. Predstavljamo duboko rekonstruirani model autokodera koji nauči bogatski strukturirane predstave višestrukog pogleda i pokazuje da i) daju bolji mikroklaster od manje strukturiranih predstavljanja; i ii) su interpretabilne i tako korisne za daljnju literarnu analizu ili označavanje izražavajućih mikroklasera.', 'so': 'Sida bilowga loo garanayo qorshaha riwaayadaha waxaa muhiim ah in loo ogeysiiyo barashada luuqadda iyo codsiga qoraalka, tusaale ahaan summarinta ama soo jeedinta. Tusaale kala duduwan waxay ku addeexeen shuqulkaas, laakiin qiimeyntooda waxay ku jirtay mid aad u mid ah hoos-hoos iyo mid-gaar ah. Halkan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qalabka firaaqada ah oo caadiga ah oo la sawiraa alaabta kale (tusaale ahaan qarsoodiga, pirats) in lagu qiimeeyo kooxaha qorraxda, si loo qiimeeyo qaab dibadda ah, waxaana qiimeynayaa awooddooda ku soo saaridda kooxaha hoose-dhexe (micro-clusters) oo sameynta. Waxaynu keenaynaa model muuqasho dheer oo dib u soo socda oo aad u baranaya muuqashada aragtida badan, waxaana muujinaynaa in ay soo bixiyaan muuqashada dhaqaalaha micro-club oo ka mid ah kuwa ka yaraan qof la dhisay; ii) waa turjumaan, sidaas darteed waxey faa’iido u leeyihiin baaritaanka sawirida ama sawirida dhaqaalaha micro-soo socda.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ලියාත්\u200dරික විද්\u200dයාවය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමහරව වෙනස් මොඩේල් මේ වැඩේ ලැබුනා, නමුත් ඔවුන්ගේ විශ්ලේෂණය ගොඩක් අභ්\u200dයාසය සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක තියෙනවා. මෙන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ස්කේල් කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න,  අපි ගොඩක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වගේ ගොඩක් සංක්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ඒ ව ඒ වගේම දැනගන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'mn': 'Шинэ зохиолын загварыг автоматаар ойлгох нь бичил судлаачид болон хэрэглээний тухай тодорхойлолт эсвэл зөвлөх зөвлөмжийг мэдэх нь чухал. Олон загварууд үүнийг удирдаж байгаа, гэхдээ тэдний үнэлгээ ихэвчлэн дотоод болон чадвартай байлаа. Энд бид үндсэн, хэмжээтэй хэлбэрээр мэргэжилтнүүд хандивладаг semantic tags (жишээлбэл, нууц, далайн далайн дээрэмчүүд) загварын үзүүлэлтийг гадаад хэлбэрээр үнэлэх боломжтой, загварын загварын нийтлэл нийтлэл зохиолуудыг бүтээх чадварыг тооцоолж байна. Бид өөрсдийгөө эргэн тохирох автокодчуудын загварыг суралцаж, олон үзэгдлийн газрын зураг суралцаж, i) бага бүтээгдэхүүнээс илүү сайн бичил кластеруудыг харуулж байна. ii) хөгжиж буй бичил кластеруудын илүү бичил хэлний шинжилгээ эсвэл тэмдэглэх хэрэгтэй.', 'sv': 'Att automatiskt förstå romanhandlingen är viktigt både för att informera litterära stipendier och ansökningar som sammanfattning eller rekommendation. Olika modeller har tagit itu med denna uppgift, men utvärderingen av dessa har varit till stor del inneboende och kvalitativa. Här föreslår vi ett principiellt och skalbart ramverk som utnyttjar experttillhandahållna semantiska taggar (t.ex. mystery, pirater) för att utvärdera plotrepresentationer på ett extrinskt sätt, bedöma deras förmåga att producera lokalt sammanhängande grupperingar av romaner (mikrokluster) i modellrummet. Vi presenterar en djup återkommande autoencoder modell som lär sig rikt strukturerade multi-view plot representationer, och visar att de i) ger bättre mikrokluster än mindre strukturerade representationer; och ii) är tolkningsbara och därmed användbara för ytterligare litterär analys eller märkning av de framväxande mikroklustren.', 'ta': 'புதிய வரைபடத்தை தானாகவே புரிந்து கொள்ளும் ஒரு சுருக்கம் அல்லது பரிந்துரைப்பு போன்ற நிரல் கல்வி மற்றும் பயன்பாடுகள பல்வேறு மாதிரிகள் இந்த செயலை முகவரியிருக்கின்றன, ஆனால் அவர்களுடைய மதிப்பு மிக உள்ளிருக்கும் மற்றும் குணங்கள இங்கே நாம் ஒரு தலைப்பு மற்றும் scalable சட்டத்திற்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட சிறப்பாளர் வழங்கப்பட்ட பெமான்டிக் குறிப்புகளை வழங்குவதை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மாதிரி இடைவெளியில் வரைபடங்களின் பிரதிநி We present a deep recurrent autoencoder model that learns richly structured multi-view plot representations, and show that they i) yield better micro-clusters than less structured representations;  ii) விளக்கமுடியும், அதனால் மேலும் விளக்கம் அல்லது வெளிவரும் மைக்ரோ க்ளஸ்டர்களின் குறிப்புகளுக்கு பயனுள்ளது.', 'ur': 'خوانیوں کی نقشه کو اپنے ساتھ سمجھنے کے لئے اہم ہے کہ لکھائی علم اور کاربریاں کی اطلاعات کرنے کے لئے۔ مختلف نمڈلوں نے اس کام کو سمجھایا ہے لیکن ان کی ارزیابی بہت بڑی داخلی اور کیفیت کے ساتھ رہی ہے. یہاں، ہم ایک پرنسیلڈ اور مقدار قابل فرمود کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جنہوں نے متخصص طریقے کے سامنی ٹاگ (جیسے mysteries, pirates) کو ایک خارجی طریقے میں پول کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے، ان کی قابلیت کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے محلی جگہ کے مطابق (میکروکلسٹر) روان گروہوں کے گروہوں کو مواد فضائی میں پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم ایک عمیق دوبارہ دوبارہ دوبارہ آٹ کوڈر موڈل کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی ساختہ متعدد نظر کی نقشه کی تصاویرات سکھاتا ہے اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ (i) کم ساختہ نمونات سے بہتر میکروک کلسٹر پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ اور ii) ان کی تعبیر قابل ہے، اور اسی طرح اگلوں کی میکروکلسٹر کے اضافہ تحلیل یا لابلینگ کے لئے مفید ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Tự động hiểu được cốt truyện tiểu thuyết là quan trọng cả cho học bổng văn học và các ứng dụng như là tóm tắt hay giới thiệu. Các mô hình khác nhau đã giải quyết xong nhiệm vụ này, nhưng đánh giá của chúng vẫn còn phần lớn trong tính chất. Ở đây, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở hình ảnh có nguyên tắc và khả năng kích hoạt các thẻ theo ngữ pháp chuyên gia cung cấp (v.d. bí ẩn, hải tặc) để đánh giá các biểu hiện biểu đồ biểu đồ đồ đồ đồ ngoài khuôn khổ, đánh giá khả năng sản xuất các nhóm tiểu thuyết tương ứng địa phương (vi-cụm) trong mô hình. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mã hóa tự động thường xuyên sâu sắc học được các biểu tượng đa cảnh có cấu trúc giàu có, và cho thấy rằng và sẽ được giải thích, và có ích cho việc phân tích văn học hay mô phỏng các vi-cụm mới nổi.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik modellar bu vazifani boshqaradi, ammo ularning qiymatlari juda katta ichki va qualitativ edi. Bu yerda, biz ekspert berilgan semantik taglarini (m. g. mystery, piratlar) qo'llanmalarni qiymatlashni o'ylashimiz mumkin, modelning joyida lokal koʻpaytirilgan novellar (micro-clusterlar) yaratish qoidalarini qiymatlashni tasavvur qilamiz. Biz ko'plab ko'plab-kodlash shakllarini o'rganadigan boshqa avtomatik kodlash modelini ko'rganamiz va ular qo'llangan tashkilotlardan yaxshi ko'proq kodlash usulini ko'rsatamiz. ㈡ ma'lumotni o'rganish mumkin, shunday qilib ko'proq o'qituvchi micro-clusterlarni ko'rsatish uchun foydalanadi.", 'nl': 'Het automatisch begrijpen van de plot van romans is belangrijk zowel voor het informeren van literaire wetenschap als toepassingen zoals samenvatting of aanbeveling. Verschillende modellen hebben deze taak aangepakt, maar hun evaluatie is grotendeels intrinsiek en kwalitatief gebleven. Hier stellen we een principieel en schaalbaar framework voor dat gebruik maakt van semantische tags van experts (bijvoorbeeld mysterie, piraten) om plotrepresentaties op een extrinsieke manier te evalueren en hun vermogen om lokaal coherente groeperingen van romans (microclusters) te produceren in modelruimte beoordelen. We presenteren een diep terugkerend autoencoder model dat rijk gestructureerde multi-view plot representaties leert, en laten zien dat ze i) betere micro-clusters opleveren dan minder gestructureerde representaties; en ii) interpreteerbaar zijn en dus nuttig zijn voor verdere literaire analyse of etikettering van de opkomende microclusters.', 'da': 'Automatisk forståelse af romanplottet er vigtigt både for at informere litterært stipendium og ansøgninger som opsummering eller anbefaling. Forskellige modeller har behandlet denne opgave, men deres evaluering har i vid udstrækning været egentlig og kvalitativ. Her foreslår vi en principiel og skalerbar ramme, der udnytter ekspertvidlede semantiske tags (f.eks. mystery, pirater) til at evaluere plotrepræsentationer på en ekstren måde, vurdere deres evne til at producere lokalt sammenhængende grupper af romaner (mikroklynger) i modelrummet. Vi præsenterer en dyb tilbagevendende autoencoder model, der lærer rigt strukturerede multi-view plot repræsentationer, og viser, at de i) giver bedre mikroklynger end mindre strukturerede repræsentationer; og ii) er fortolkelige og dermed nyttige til yderligere litterær analyse eller mærkning af de nye mikroklynger.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното разбиране на сюжета на романите е важно както за информиране на литературната наука, така и за приложения като обобщаване или препоръка. Различни модели са разгледали тази задача, но тяхната оценка остава до голяма степен присъща и качествена. Тук предлагаме принципна и мащабируема рамка, използваща предоставените от експерти семантични тагове (напр. мистерии, пирати), за да оцени представянето на сюжета по външен начин, оценявайки способността им да произвеждат локално съгласувани групи от романи (микроклъстери) в моделното пространство. Представяме модел на дълбоко повтарящ се автокодер, който изучава богато структурирани мулти-визуални изображения на графиките и показва, че те и) дават по-добри микроклъстери от по-малко структурирани изображения; и ii) могат да бъдат тълкувани и следователно полезни за по-нататъшен литературен анализ или етикетиране на възникващите микроклъстери.', 'hr': 'Automatski razumijevanje ploča romana važno je obavijestiti književnu stipendiju i primjene poput sažetke ili preporuke. Razni modeli su riješili ovaj zadatak, ali njihova procjena ostala je u velikoj mjeri intrinsična i kvalitativna. Ovdje predlažemo načelni i mjerljiv okvir koji će omogućiti semantičke etikete (npr. misterije, gusare) predstavljene stručnjakima (npr. tajanstveno, gusarske) da procjenjuju zastupanje ploča na ekstriničnom načinu, procjenjivati njihovu sposobnost proizvodnje lokalne saskašne skupine romana (mikroklastera) u modelu svemira. Predstavljamo duboko rekonstruirani model autokodera koji uči bogatski strukturirane predstave višestrukog pogleda i pokazuje da i) pružaju bolji mikroklaster nego manje strukturirane predstave; i ii) su interpretabilne i tako korisne za daljnju literarnu analizu ili označavanje pojavljujućih mikroklasera.', 'id': 'Mengerti secara otomatis plot novel penting untuk memberitahu beasiswa sastra dan aplikasi seperti ringkasan atau rekomendasi. Various models have addressed this task, but their evaluation has remained largely intrinsic and qualitative.  Di sini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian yang berprinsip dan dapat diperkirakan menggunakan tags semantis yang diberikan ahli (misalnya misteri, bajak laut) untuk mengevaluasi persembahan plot dengan cara ekstrinsik, mengevaluasi kemampuan mereka untuk menghasilkan kelompok novel secara lokal yang konsisten (mikrokelompok) di ruang model. Kami mempersembahkan model auto-encoder yang berulang-ulang dalam yang mempelajari representation multi-view yang sangat struktur, dan menunjukkan bahwa i) mereka menghasilkan mikro-cluster yang lebih baik daripada representation yang kurang struktur; dan ii) dapat diterjemahkan, sehingga berguna untuk analisis sastra lebih lanjut atau label mikro-cluster yang muncul.', 'de': 'Das automatische Verständnis der Handlung von Romanen ist sowohl für die Information der Literaturwissenschaft als auch für Anwendungen wie Zusammenfassung oder Empfehlung wichtig. Verschiedene Modelle haben sich dieser Aufgabe angenommen, aber ihre Bewertung ist weitgehend intrinsisch und qualitativ geblieben. Hier schlagen wir ein prinzipielles und skalierbares Framework vor, das von Experten bereitgestellte semantische Tags (z.B. Mystery, Piraten) nutzt, um Plotdarstellungen auf extrinsische Weise zu bewerten und ihre Fähigkeit zu bewerten, lokal kohärente Gruppierungen von Romanen (Mikrocluster) im Modellraum zu produzieren. Wir präsentieren ein tiefes, wiederkehrendes Autoencoder-Modell, das reich strukturierte Multi-View-Plot-Darstellungen lernt, und zeigen, dass sie i) bessere Mikrocluster als weniger strukturierte Darstellungen liefern; und ii) sind interpretierbar und somit nützlich für die weitere literarische Analyse oder Kennzeichnung der entstehenden Mikrocluster.', 'ko': '소설의 줄거리를 자동으로 이해하는 것은 문학 학술과 응용(예를 들어 총결산이나 추천)에 매우 중요하다.각종 모델이 이 임무를 해결했지만 그들의 평가는 어느 정도 내재적이고 정적이다.여기서 우리는 원칙적이고 확장 가능한 구조를 제시했다. 전문가가 제공한 의미 표기(예를 들어 신비, 해적)를 이용하여 외부 방식으로 줄거리를 평가하고 모델 공간에서 국부적인 연관 소설 그룹(미집단)을 생성하는 능력을 평가한다.우리는 깊이 있게 귀속되는 자동 인코더 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 구조가 풍부한 다시도 표시를 배울 수 있고 그들의 i)가 구조가 비교적 적은 표시보다 더 좋은 마이크로 집단을 형성할 수 있음을 나타낸다.ii)와 해석할 수 있기 때문에 신흥 미집단에 대한 진일보한 문학 분석이나 표기에 도움이 된다.', 'fa': 'به طور خودکار فهمیدن نقشه روزنامه ها برای اطلاعات دانش آموزشی و کاربردهای کتابی مثل جمع کردن یا پیشنهاد مهم است. مدل\u200cهای مختلف این کار را حل کردند، ولی ارزیابشان بسیار داخلی و کیفیت باقی مانده است. در اینجا، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب اصلی و قابل اندازه\u200cگیری برای تولید کردن نقشه\u200cهای متخصص\u200cکننده\u200cای (مثال راز، دزدان دریایی) برای ارزیابی نمایش\u200cهای نقشه\u200cها در یک طریق خارجی، با ارزیابی توانایی\u200cهایشان برای تولید گروه\u200cهای رمان\u200cهای محلی (میکروکلاستر) در فضای مدل محلی بسازند. ما یک مدل خودکوردر عمیق تکرار می\u200cکنیم که نمایش\u200cهای نقشه\u200cهای زیادی بسیار ساخته شده را یاد می\u200cگیرد و نشان می\u200cدهیم که (i) میکروکلاس\u200cهای بهتر از نمایش\u200cهای کمتر ساخته می\u200cشوند. و ii) قابل تعبیر هستند، و به همین دلیل برای تحلیل ادبیات بیشتری یا نقاشی از میکروکلاس\u200cهای پیدا می\u200cکنند مفید است.', 'sw': 'Kwa urahisi kuelewa mpango wa riwaya ni muhimu kwa ajili ya kutoa taarifa za elimu za fasihi na matumizi kama vile muhtasari au mapendekezo. Mfano mbalimbali wamejadili kazi hii, lakini tathmini zao zimekuwa za ndani na yenye uhakika. Hapa, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kanuni na utaratibu wa kutumia alama zilizotolewa na wataalam wa sekondari (kwa mfano, siri, pira) kutathmini wakilishi vitimbi vya mpango kwa namna ya nje, na kutathmini uwezo wao wa kutengeneza makundi ya riwaya za ndani (viungo vidogo) katika nafasi ya mifano. Tunaonyesha model i ya kodi inayoendelea kwa kiasi kikubwa ambacho inajifunza wakiwakilisha mipango ya mitazamo mbalimbali, na tunaonyesha kwamba mimi) hutoa viungo vizuri zaidi kuliko uwakilishi mdogo zaidi; na ni kutafsiri, na kwa hiyo inatufaika kwa uchambuzi zaidi wa fasihi au maambuzi ya viungo vidogo vinavyotokea.', 'tr': 'Aýarlaryň meýdançasyny otomatik bilen düşünmek hem edebiýat mekdepleriň we uygulamalaryň sumlaşdyrma ýa maslahat ýaly maglumatlary bilen wajyp däldir. Birnäçe nusgalar bu zady çözdi, ýöne olaryň deňlemesi ýok we möhüm derejesi bar. Bu ýerde, biz prinsipli we golaýlaýan bir çerçew ukyplary tarapyndan uzmanly semantik tägleri (meseläm, mysteri, piratler) çykyş şeklinde düzümlenmelerini çykarmak üçin teklip berýäris, we olaryň ýerli ýerlerde birleşen romanlaryň (mikro-klusterler) toparlaryny nusgala etmäg e ukyplaryny çykarmak üçin teklip berýäris. Biz derin bir tekrarlı otokodlayıcı modelini gösterip, düzgün şekilde yapılmış çoklu görüntüleri gösterir ve bunların i) daha iyi mikro-cluster şeklinde daha az yapılmış ifadelerden oluşan bir şekilde gösteririz. ii) ýüzeleşik mikro-klusterlerin başka bir edebiýat analizi veya etiketlemesi üçin faydaly däldir.', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi automatik i komplotit të romanëve është i rëndësishëm si për informimin e bursës letërore ashtu dhe aplikimeve të tilla si përmbledhje apo rekomandime. Various models have addressed this task, but their evaluation has remained largely intrinsic and qualitative.  Këtu, ne propozojmë një kuadër të parim dhe të shkallësuar që të përdorë etiketa semantike të ofruara nga ekspertët (për shembull, mister, piratë) për të vlerësuar përfaqësimet e komplotit në një mënyrë ekstrinzike, duke vlerësuar aftësinë e tyre për të prodhuar grupe lokalisht koherente të romanëve (mikrogrupe) në hapësirën modelore. Ne paraqesim një model autokodues të thellë të përsëritur që mëson përfaqësime plotash shumë-pamje të strukturuara të pasura dhe tregojmë se i) prodhojnë mikrogrupe më të mira sesa përfaqësime më pak të strukturuara; and ii) are interpretable, and thus useful for further literary analysis or labeling of the emerging micro-clusters.', 'af': "Outomaties verstaan die plot van romane is belangrik beide vir die informasie van literarie stipendheid en toepassings soos opsomming of aanbeveling. Verskeie modele het hierdie taak aangespreek, maar hulle evaluasie het groot intrinsiese en kwaliteit bly. Hier, ons voorstel 'n prinsipelle en skalerbare raamwerk wat eksperteer verskaf het semantiese etikette (bv. mysterie, pirate) om plot voorstellings in 'n ekstrinsiese manier te evalueer, om hul moontlikheid te verwerp om lokale koerende groepe van romane (mikro-klasters) in model spasie te produseer. Ons voorsien 'n diep herhaalde outokoder model wat leer richtig structureerde multi- view plot voorstellings, en wys dat hulle i) beter mikro- klasters gee as minder structureerde voorstellings; en ii) is uittelbaar, en so nuttig vir verdere literarie analisie of etiketting van die uitkommende mikroklasers.", 'am': 'የአንባቢ ትምህርት እና ማስታወቂያውን እንደማስታወቂያ ወይም ምክንያት ለማሳወቅ የዝግጅት ትምህርት እና ፕሮግራሞች ማሳወቂያ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የተለያዩ ሞዴላዎች ይህንን ስራ አድራጊዎች ናቸው፤ ነገር ግን ማስታወሳቸው በብዙ ውስጥ ውስጥና ውስጥነት ይኖራል፡፡ Here, we propose a principled and scalable framework leveraging expert-provided semantic tags (e.g., mystery, pirates) to evaluate plot representations in an extrinsic fashion, assessing their ability to produce locally coherent groupings of novels (micro-clusters) in model space.  በጥልቅ የሚቆጠሩ የፖለቲካዊ ፕሮግራም መልዕክቶችን በመማር እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በ) የሚተረጉም፣ ስለዚህም ለመጠቀም የሚወጡትን ሚክሮዎች ማረፊያ ወይም ማሳየት ይጠቅማል፡፡', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সাহিত্যিক শিক্ষা এবং অ্যাপ্লিকেশন যেমন সংক্ষেপ অথবা পরামর্শ প্রদান করার জন্য সাহিত্যের প্ল্যান্ বিভিন্ন মডেল এই কাজের নিয়ে কথা বলেছে, কিন্তু তাদের মূল্য বেশীরভাগ বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন এখানে আমরা একটি প্রধান এবং ক্যালেবাল ফ্রেম কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করছি যা প্রদান করা বিশেষজ্ঞ সেমেন্টিক ট্যাগ (যেমন রহস্য, জলদস্যু) প্রতিনিধিদের মূল্যায়ন করার জন্য, যাতে মডেল স্থানে তাদ আমরা একটি গভীর পুনরাবর্তন স্বয়ংক্রিয় কোডার মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যেটি সম্পূর্ণ গঠনের মাল্টিভিউ প্ল্যানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখে এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে  আর ২) ব্যাখ্যা করা যায়, আর এভাবেই আরো সাহিত্য বিশ্লেষণ বা উদ্ভাবনী মাইক্রো ক্লাস্টারের লেবেলের জন্য উপকার।', 'az': 'romanların plotlərini avtomatik anlamaq istədiyi kimi yazılmış scholarship və uyğulamalar xəbərdar etmək üçün vacibdir. Müxtəlif modellər bu işi çəkdilər, amma onların değerlendirməsi çox içərisində və qabiliyyətli idi. Burada, biz müəllif və ölçülü bir çerçive təklif edirik ki, ekspertlər təklif edilmiş semantik etiketlər (məsələn, gizli, korsanlar) modellərdə yazılmış məsələləri çətinliklə təklif etmək üçün, yerli məlumatlar (mikro-clusterlər) ilə birləşdirmək bacarıqlarını təmin edirik. Biz çoxlu nümunələri öyrənən, çoxlu nümunələri öyrənən, və i) daha yaxşı mikro-klasterləri daha az strukturlı nümunələrdən istifadə edirik. ii) təfsil edilə bilər və bu səbəbdən daha çox yazılı analizi və ya yenidən gələn mikro-clusterlərin etiketi üçün faydalı olar.', 'bs': 'Automatski razumijevanje ploča romana je važno i za informaciju književne stipendije i aplikacije poput sažetke ili preporuke. Razni modeli su riješili ovaj zadatak, ali njihova procjena je ostala u velikoj mjeri intrinsična i kvalitativna. Ovdje predlažemo principalni i mjerljiv okvir koji utječe na semantičke etikete (npr. misterije, pirate) predstavljene stručnjakima (npr. tajanstvene, pirate) da procjenjuju predstavljanja ploča na ekstrinski način, procjenjujući njihovu sposobnost da proizvode lokalno saskaņone skupine romana (mikroklastera) u modelu svemira. Predstavljamo duboko rekonstruirani model autokodera koji nauči bogatski strukturirane predstave višestrukog pogleda i pokazuje da i) daju bolji mikroklaster nego manje strukturirane predstave; i ii) su interpretabilne i tako korisne za daljnju literarnu analizu ili označavanje pojavljivih mikroklastera.', 'ca': "Compreendre automàticament la trama de novels és important tant per informar la beca literaria com per aplicacions com la somària o la recomendació. Various models have addressed this task, but their evaluation has remained largely intrinsic and qualitative.  Aquí proposem un marc de principis i e scalable que utilitzi etiquetes semàntiques proporcionades per experts (per exemple, misteri, pirates) per avaluar representacions de trams d'una manera extrínsica, evaluant la seva habilitat de produir agrupaments localment coherents de novels (microagrupaments) a l'espai model. Presentam un model d'autocodificador recurrent profund que aprenen representacions de gràfics multivistes ricament estructurades i mostren que i) produeixen millors microgrups que representacions menys estructurades; and ii) are interpretable, and thus useful for further literary analysis or labeling of the emerging micro-clusters.", 'cs': 'Automatické porozumění děje románů je důležité jak pro informování literární vědy, tak pro aplikace jako shrnutí či doporučení. Tento úkol byl řešen různými modely, ale jejich hodnocení zůstalo z velké části intrinské a kvalitativní. Zde navrhujeme principiální a škálovatelný rámec využívající odborníky poskytnuté sémantické značky (např. tajemství, piráti) k vyhodnocování reprezentace děje extrinsickým způsobem a posouzení jejich schopnosti produkovat lokálně koherentní seskupení románů (mikroclustery) v modelovém prostoru. Představujeme hluboký recidivní model autokodéru, který se učí bohatě strukturované reprezentace vícepohledových plotů a ukazuje, že i) vytvářejí lepší mikroclustery než méně strukturované reprezentace; a ii) jsou interpretovatelné, a proto užitečné pro další literární analýzu nebo označování vznikajících mikroklastrů.', 'fi': 'Romaanien juonen automaattinen ymmärtäminen on tärkeää sekä kirjallisen tutkimuksen että hakemusten kuten tiivistelmän tai suosituksen kannalta. Tähän tehtävään on vastattu eri malleissa, mutta niiden arviointi on säilynyt pitkälti luontaisena ja laadullisena. Tässä työssä ehdotamme periaatteellista ja skaalautuvaa viitekehystä, joka hyödyntää asiantuntijoiden tarjoamia semanttisia tunnisteita (esim. mysteeri, piraatit), jotta voidaan arvioida juonen representaatioita ulkoisella tavalla ja arvioida niiden kykyä tuottaa paikallisesti johdonmukaisia romaanien ryhmittelyjä (mikroklustereita) malliavaruudessa. Esittelemme syvän toistuvan automaattikooderimallin, joka oppii rikkaasti strukturoidut moninäkymäkuvioesitykset ja osoittaa, että ne i) tuottavat parempia mikroklustereita kuin vähemmän strukturoidut esitykset; ja ii) ne ovat tulkittavissa ja siten hyödyllisiä uusien mikroklustereiden kirjallisen analyysin tai merkitsemisen kannalta.', 'et': 'Romaanide sünniku automaatne mõistmine on oluline nii kirjandusstipendiumi teavitamiseks kui ka taotluste, näiteks kokkuvõtte või soovituse esitamiseks. Seda ülesannet on käsitlenud mitmed mudelid, kuid nende hindamine on jäänud suures osas olemuslikuks ja kvalitatiivseks. Siin pakume välja põhimõttelise ja skaleeritava raamistiku, mis võimendab ekspertide poolt pakutavaid semantilisi silte (nt müsteerium, piraadid), et hinnata graafikute esitusi välisel moel, hinnates nende võimet luua lokaalselt sidusaid romaanide rühmitusi (mikroklastrid) mudeliruumis. Esitame sügava korduva automaatkodeerija mudeli, mis õpib rikkalikult struktureeritud mitmevaatelise graafiku esitusi ja näitab, et i) annavad paremad mikroklastrid kui vähem struktureeritud esitused; ja ii) on tõlgendatavad ja seega kasulikud tekkivate mikroklastrite edasiseks kirjanduslikuks analüüsiks või märgistamiseks.', 'hy': 'Ռոմերի պատկերը ավտոմատիկ հասկանալը կարևոր է գրական գիտակցության և ծրագրերի, ինչպիսիք են համառոտագրությունը կամ խորհուրդը, տեղեկացնելու համար: Various models have addressed this task, but their evaluation has remained largely intrinsic and qualitative.  Here, we propose a principled and scalable framework leveraging expert-provided semantic tags (e.g., mystery, pirates) to evaluate plot representations in an extrinsic fashion, assessing their ability to produce locally coherent groupings of novels (micro-clusters) in model space.  We present a deep recurrent autoencoder model that learns richly structured multi-view plot representations, and show that they i) yield better micro-clusters than less structured representations;  and ii) are interpretable, and thus useful for further literary analysis or labeling of the emerging micro-clusters.', 'ha': "Ana fahimta farat ɗaya kunan kwanan-yanzu masu muhimu a wajen gaya wa masu fasalin littãfi da shiryoyin ayuka kamar ƙararin ko shawara. @ info: whatsthis A nan, Munã buɗa wani kanuni da wanda ke lissafa saman firam mai bãyar da masu fitarwa (misali, ƙiyayya, piratsu) dõmin a evaluate masu tsari ga shirin jigon a bakwai, kuma Mu ƙaddara abincin su sami komai na cikin filin fanel. Tuna gabatar da wani misali na kode farat-farat wanda ke iya ƙaranci, yana sanar da masu tsari masu baka multi-viewnai, kuma Munã nuna su sami masu ƙaranci masu ƙaranci masu motsi; ii) za'a fassara, kuma don haka yana da amfani ga fassarar littafi ko da aka samu karatun ƙarƙashin masu fitarwa.", 'sk': 'Avtomatsko razumevanje zgodbe romanov je pomembno tako za informiranje literarne štipendije kot tudi za aplikacije, kot je povzetek ali priporočilo. To nalogo so obravnavali različni modeli, vendar je njihova ocena v veliki meri ostala notranja in kvalitativna. Pri tem predlagamo načelni in razširljiv okvir s pomočjo strokovnih semantičnih oznak (npr. skrivnost, pirati) za vrednotenje predstavitev ploskve na ekstrinzičen način in ocenjevanje njihove sposobnosti za proizvodnjo lokalno koherentnih združenj romanov (mikrogrozdov) v modelnem prostoru. Predstavljamo globoko ponavljajoči se avtokodirni model, ki se uči bogato strukturiranih večpoglednih predstavitev ploskve in pokaže, da i) prinašajo boljše mikrogrozde kot manj strukturirane predstavitve; in ii) so razložljive in zato koristne za nadaljnjo literarno analizo ali označevanje nastajajočih mikrogrozdov.', 'he': 'הבנה אוטומטית של התכנית של רומנים חשובה גם כדי להודיע למלגה ספורתית וגם ליישומים כמו הסכם או המלצה. דוגמנים שונים התייחסו למשימה הזאת, אך הערכה שלהם נשארה בעיקר פנימית ואיכותית. כאן, אנו מציעים מסגרת עקרונית ומאפשרת להשתמש בתגים סמנטיים מומחים (למשל מסתוריות, פיראטים) כדי להעריך מייצגים של תכנית באופן חיצוני, להעריך את היכולת שלהם לייצר קבוצות מקומיות של רומנים (מיקרוקלסטרים) בחלל מודל. אנחנו מציגים מודל קודם אוטומטי עמוק חוזר שלמד מייצגים מובנים עשירים של תוכניות רבות-צפייה, ולהראות שהם i) יוצרים מיקרו-קלסטרים טובים יותר מאשר מייצגים פחות מובנים; ולכן הם שימושיים לניתוח ספרתי נוסף או לטיוט של המיקרוקלסטרים החולמים.', 'jv': 'Layout dadine Punika, kita ndhukung akeh basa sing dipunangé karo akeh lansangan karo nggawe gerakan kelas nggawe barang semanti nggambar (adil.ne, misteri, pirate) nggawe nyimpen sithik gambar neng modèl liyane, iso nggawe jilian nggawe nguasakno sistem sing g a we nguasakno sistem matan dumaten (mikro-clusters) ning alam model. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem akeh perusahaan koder iki) iso nggunakake, lan dadi luwih-luwih tenan kanggo ngerasakno resmi dadi karo etiket karo mikro-clusteru sing gagasakno.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་གསར་གཏོད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གློག མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་བྱས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེར Here, we propose a principled and scalable framework leveraging expert-provided semantic tags (e.g. mystery, pirates) to evaluate plot representations in an extrinsic fashion, assessing their ability to produce locally coherent groupings of novels (micro-clusters)in model space. We present a deep recurrent autoencoder model that learns richly structured multi-view plot representations, and show that they i) yield better micro-clusters than less structured representations; and ii) are interpretable, and thus useful for further literary analysis or labeling of the emerging micro-clusters.'}
{'en': 'Initializing Convolutional Filters with Semantic Features for Text Classification', 'fr': 'Initialisation de filtres convolutifs avec des caractéristiques sémantiques pour la classification de texte', 'ar': 'تهيئة المرشحات التلافيفية بالميزات الدلالية لتصنيف النص', 'es': 'Inicialización de filtros convolucionales con características semánticas para la clasificación de textos', 'pt': 'Inicializando filtros convolucionais com recursos semânticos para classificação de texto', 'ja': 'テキスト分類のためのセマンティック機能を備えた畳み込みフィルタの初期化', 'zh': '用文本分类者语义特徵初始化卷积筛选器', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं के साथ Convolutional फ़िल्टर प्रारंभ करना', 'ru': 'Инициализация сверточных фильтров с семантическими признаками для классификации текста', 'ga': "Tús a chur le Scagairí Comhtháite le Gnéithe Séimeantacha d'Aicmiú Téacs", 'el': 'Αρχικοποίηση τυλιγμένων φίλτρων με σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά για ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Konvolúciós szűrők kezdeményezése szemantikus jellemzőkkel a szövegosztályozáshoz', 'it': 'Inizializzazione dei filtri convoluzionali con caratteristiche semantiche per la classificazione del testo', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясының семантикалық мүмкіндіктері арқылы қисық сүзгілерді инициализациялау', 'ml': 'പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷനിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിശേഷതകളുമായി കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200d ആരംഭിക്കുന്നു', 'lt': 'Inicializuojant konvoliucinius filtrus su Semantinėmis teksto klasifikavimo savybėmis', 'mk': 'Иницијализирање на конволуционални филтри со семантични функции за класификација на текст', 'mt': 'Inizjalizzazzjoni ta’ Filtri Konveoluzzjonali b’Karatteristiċi Semantiċi għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test', 'ms': 'Memulakan Penapis Berkonvolusi dengan Ciri Semantik untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'no': 'Startar konvolusjonelle filter med semiantiske funksjonar for tekstklassifikasjon', 'mn': 'Текст классификацийн Semantic Features for Convolutional Filters Initializing', 'pl': 'Inicjalizacja filtrów konwolucyjnych z cechami semantycznymi dla klasyfikacji tekstu', 'ro': 'Inițializarea filtrelor convoluționale cu caracteristici semantice pentru clasificarea textelor', 'sr': 'Инициализирање конволуционалних филтера са семантичним функцијама за класификацију текста', 'si': 'පාළුවන් විශේෂණය සඳහා සෙමැන්ටික් විශේෂතාවන් සමග සම්පූර්ණික සිතුරු පටන්ගන්න', 'so': 'Initializing Convolutional Filters with Semantic Features for Text Classification', 'sv': 'Initiera konvulutionsfilter med semantiska funktioner för textklassificering', 'ur': 'Text Classification کے لئے سیمنٹی فرصت کے ساتھ کنورولیوشن فیلٹر آغاز کی جاتی ہیں', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான தொகுதி வடிகட்டிகளை துவக்குகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khởi Tạo Bộ lọc Thuyết Tinh Trung với Hạng Văn bản', 'bg': 'Инициализиране на конвелуционни филтри със семантични характеристики за класификация на текста', 'da': 'Initialisering af konvolutionelle filtre med semantiske funktioner til tekstklassifikation', 'nl': 'Initialiseren van convolutionele filters met semantische kenmerken voor tekstclassificatie', 'hr': 'Inicijaliziranje konvolucionalnih filtra sa semantičnim karakteristikama za klasifikaciju teksta', 'id': 'Inisialisasi Penapis Konvelusi dengan Features Semantik untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'de': 'Initialisierung von Faltfiltern mit semantischen Merkmalen für die Textklassifizierung', 'ko': '의미 특징을 바탕으로 하는 볼륨 필터 텍스트 분류에서의 초기화', 'fa': 'آغاز کردن پالایه\u200cهای متغیر با ویژه\u200cهای متغیر برای کلاس\u200cسازی متن', 'tr': 'Sened Klassifikasiýasy üçin süýtgelikler bilen görkezilýän filtreler', 'sw': 'Kuanzisha Michoro ya Kujitoleza kwa Vitabu vya Kisemantiki', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Initializing Convolutional Filters with Semantic Features for Text Classification', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Initializing Convolutional Filters with Semantic Features for Text Classification', 'az': 'Mətn Klasifikası üçün Semantik Özümləri ilə Konvolucional Filterləri başlanğıçlandırılır', 'bs': 'Inicijaliziranje konvolucionalnih filtara sa semantičnim karakterima za klasifikaciju teksta', 'ca': 'Inicialitzar filtres de conversió amb característiques Semàtiques per a la classificació del text', 'cs': 'Inicializace konvelučních filtrů se sémantickými vlastnostmi pro klasifikaci textu', 'et': 'Teksti klassifitseerimiseks semantiliste omadustega konvolutsioonifiltrite initsialiseerimine', 'fi': 'Tekstin luokittelua varten konvolutionaalisuodattimien alustaminen semanttisilla ominaisuuksilla', 'jv': 'tutorial_basic', 'sk': 'Inicializacija konvolucijskih filtrov s semantičnimi funkcijami za klasifikacijo besedila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מתחיל מסננים שינויים עם תכונות סמנטיות לסימון טקסט', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆ་རྟགས་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྣམ་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་འགོ་འཛུགས་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) are widely used in NLP tasks. This paper presents a novel weight initialization method to improve the CNNs for text classification. Instead of randomly initializing the convolutional filters, we encode semantic features into them, which helps the model focus on learning useful features at the beginning of the training. Experiments demonstrate the effectiveness of the initialization technique on seven text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis and topic classification.', 'ar': 'تستخدم الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) على نطاق واسع في مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. تقدم هذه الورقة طريقة جديدة لبدء الوزن لتحسين شبكات CNN لتصنيف النص. بدلاً من التهيئة العشوائية للمرشحات التلافيفية ، نقوم بترميز الميزات الدلالية فيها ، مما يساعد النموذج على التركيز على تعلم الميزات المفيدة في بداية التدريب. توضح التجارب فعالية تقنية التهيئة في سبع مهام لتصنيف النص ، بما في ذلك تحليل المشاعر وتصنيف الموضوع.', 'pt': 'As Redes Neurais Convolucionais (CNNs) são amplamente utilizadas em tarefas de PNL. Este artigo apresenta um novo método de inicialização de peso para melhorar as CNNs para classificação de texto. Em vez de inicializar aleatoriamente os filtros convolucionais, codificamos recursos semânticos neles, o que ajuda o modelo a se concentrar no aprendizado de recursos úteis no início do treinamento. Os experimentos demonstram a eficácia da técnica de inicialização em sete tarefas de classificação de texto, incluindo análise de sentimentos e classificação de tópicos.', 'es': 'Las redes neuronales convolucionales (CNN) se utilizan ampliamente en las tareas de PNL. Este artículo presenta un nuevo método de inicialización de ponderación para mejorar las CNN para la clasificación de textos. En lugar de inicializar aleatoriamente los filtros convolucionales, codificamos características semánticas en ellos, lo que ayuda al modelo a centrarse en aprender funciones útiles al comienzo del entrenamiento. Los experimentos demuestran la eficacia de la técnica de inicialización en siete tareas de clasificación de textos, incluido el análisis de sentimientos y la clasificación de temas.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones convolutifs (CNN) sont largement utilisés dans les tâches de PNL. Cet article présente une nouvelle méthode d'initialisation du poids pour améliorer les CNN pour la classification de texte. Au lieu d'initialiser aléatoirement les filtres convolutifs, nous y codons des caractéristiques sémantiques, ce qui permet au modèle de se concentrer sur l'apprentissage de fonctionnalités utiles au début de la formation. Les expériences démontrent l'efficacité de la technique d'initialisation pour sept tâches de classification de texte, y compris l'analyse des sentiments et la classification des sujets.", 'ja': '畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）は、NLPタスクで広く使用されています。テキスト分類のためのCNNを改善するための新規の重み初期化法を提示した。畳み込みフィルタをランダムに初期化するのではなく、セマンティック機能をエンコードします。これにより、モデルはトレーニングの開始時に有用な機能を学習することに焦点を当てることができます。実験は、センチメント分析とトピック分類を含む7つのテキスト分類タスクにおける初期化テクニックの有効性を示します。', 'hi': 'Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) का व्यापक रूप से NLP कार्यों में उपयोग किया जाता है। यह पेपर पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए CNN को बेहतर बनाने के लिए एक उपन्यास वजन प्रारंभ विधि प्रस्तुत करता है। बेतरतीब ढंग से convolutional फिल्टर शुरू करने के बजाय, हम उनमें शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं को एन्कोड करते हैं, जो मॉडल को प्रशिक्षण की शुरुआत में उपयोगी सुविधाओं को सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने में मदद करता है। प्रयोग सात पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर प्रारंभिक तकनीक की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जिसमें भावना विश्लेषण और विषय वर्गीकरण शामिल हैं।', 'zh': '卷积神经网络 (CNN) 博于 NLP 务。 本文条上改进CNN文本分类权重初始化法。 吾非随机初始化卷积滤波器也,编码之于语义,此助于习始而专于学也。 实验验初始化术在七本分类之有效性,情析主题之类也。', 'ru': 'Конволюционные нейронные сети (CNN) широко используются в задачах NLP. В этой статье представлен новый метод инициализации веса для улучшения CNN для классификации текста. Вместо того, чтобы случайным образом инициализировать сверточные фильтры, мы кодируем в них семантические признаки, что помогает модели сосредоточиться на изучении полезных признаков в начале обучения. Эксперименты демонстрируют эффективность методики инициализации по семи задачам классификации текста, включая анализ настроений и классификацию тем.', 'ga': 'Úsáidtear Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite (CNNanna) go forleathan i dtascanna NLP. Cuireann an páipéar seo modh túsaithe meáchain núíosach i láthair chun na CNNanna d’aicmiú téacs a fheabhsú. In ionad na scagairí comhbheartaithe a thúsú go randamach, déanaimid gnéithe shéimeantacha a ionchódú isteach iontu, rud a chabhraíonn leis an tsamhail díriú ar ghnéithe úsáideacha a fhoghlaim ag tús na hoiliúna. Léiríonn turgnaimh éifeachtacht na teicníochta tosaigh ar sheacht dtasc aicmithe téacs, lena n-áirítear anailís ar mheon agus aicmiú topaicí.', 'hu': 'A konvolúciós neurális hálózatokat széles körben használják az NLP feladatokban. Ez a tanulmány egy új súlyinicializációs módszert mutat be a szövegosztályozáshoz szükséges CNN-ek javítására. A konvolúciós szűrők véletlenszerűen inicializálása helyett szemantikai jellemzőket kódolunk bele, ami segít a modell a képzés elején hasznos funkciók tanulására összpontosítani. A kísérletek bemutatják az inicializációs technika hatékonyságát hét szövegosztályozási feladatban, beleértve a sentiment elemzést és a témaosztályozást.', 'el': 'Τα εξελικτικά Νευρικά Δίκτυα (ΚΝΝ) χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως σε εργασίες ΝΛΠ. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια νέα μέθοδο αρχικοποίησης βάρους για τη βελτίωση των CNN για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου. Αντί να αρχικοποιούμε τυχαία τα σύνθετα φίλτρα, κωδικοποιούμε σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά σε αυτά, γεγονός που βοηθά το μοντέλο να επικεντρωθεί στην εκμάθηση χρήσιμων χαρακτηριστικών στην αρχή της εκπαίδευσης. Τα πειράματα καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της τεχνικής αρχικοποίησης σε επτά εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένου, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων και της ταξινόμησης θεμάτων.', 'ka': 'Name ამ დოკუნტის ახალი სიმაღლის თნციალიზაციის მეტი, რომელიც ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის CNN- ს გაუქმედება. შემდეგ კონგულოციალური ფილტრების დასაწყისად, ჩვენ ისინი სემონტიკური ფუნქციების კონფორტირებაში კონფორტირებას, რომელიც მოდელის კონფორტირებას საჭირო ფუნქცი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ ინიციალიზაციის ტექნონიკაციის ეფექტიურობა 7 ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის, включая სენტიმენტის ანალიზაცია და ტექნო', 'it': "Le reti neurali convoluzionali (CNN) sono ampiamente utilizzate nelle attività PNL. Questo articolo presenta un nuovo metodo di inizializzazione del peso per migliorare le CNN per la classificazione del testo. Invece di inizializzare casualmente i filtri convoluzionali, codifichiamo le caratteristiche semantiche in essi, che aiutano il modello a concentrarsi sull'apprendimento di funzionalità utili all'inizio della formazione. Esperimenti dimostrano l'efficacia della tecnica di inizializzazione su sette compiti di classificazione del testo, tra cui l'analisi del sentiment e la classificazione degli argomenti.", 'kk': 'Қосымшалық нейралық желі (CNNs) NLP тапсырмаларында көп қолданылады. Бұл қағаз CNN бағалау үшін жаңа тең инициализациялау әдісін көрсетеді. Қосымшалық сүзгілерді кездейсоқ бастау орнына, біз оның ішінде семантикалық қасиеттерді кодтамыз. Бұл үлгі оқыту басында пайдалы мүмкіндіктерді оқытуға көмектеседі. Тәжірибелер жеті мәтін шектеу тапсырмаларында инициализациялау техникасының ең әсері болуын көрсетеді, сондай-ақ сезімді анализ және нақышты шектеу.', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d (CNNNs) NLP ജോലികളില്\u200d വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനുള്ള CNNs മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ഭാരം തുടങ്ങുന്ന രീതിയെ കാണി പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ആരംഭിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് ഗുണഗണങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലേക്ക് കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ തുടക്കത ഏഴു ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികളില്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്ക', 'mk': 'Конволуционалните неврални мрежи (CNN) се широко употребени за задачите на NLP. Оваа вест претставува нов метод на иницијализација на тежина за подобрување на CNN за класификација на текст. Instead of randomly initializing the convolutional filters, we encode semantic features into them, which helps the model focus on learning useful features at the beginning of the training.  Експериментите ја покажуваат ефикасноста на техниката на иницијализација на седум задачи за класификација на текст, вклучително и анализа на чувствата и класификација на темата.', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Neural Convolutional (CNNs) digunakan secara luas dalam tugas NLP. Kertas ini menghasilkan kaedah awalkan berat baru untuk meningkatkan CNN untuk klasifikasi teks. Instead of randomly initializing the convolutional filters, we encode semantic features into them, which helps the model focus on learning useful features at the beginning of the training.  Eksperimen menunjukkan kegunaan teknik awalkan pada tujuh tugas klasifikasi teks, termasuk analisis sentimen dan klasifikasi topik.', 'mn': 'NLP даалгаврууд дэлгэрэнгүй хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ цаас CNN-г текст хуваалтын тулд сайжруулахын тулд шинэ жин эхлүүлэх аргыг харуулдаг. Тохиромжтой сүзгүүдийг санамсаргүй эхлүүлэх оронд, бид тэдний дотор semantic өөрчлөлтийг шинэчлэх болно. Энэ загвар нь сургалтын эхлээд хэрэглэгдэх чадваруудыг сурах тулд анхаарна. Эмчилгээний туршилт нь 7-р текст хуваалтын ажил дээр эхлүүлэх техникийн үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'In-Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNNs) jintużaw b’mod wiesa’ fil-kompiti tal-NLP. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta metodu ġdid ta’ inizjalizzazzjoni tal-piż biex jittejbu s-CNNs għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test. Minflok l-inizjalizzazzjoni każwali tal-filtri konvoluzzjonali, aħna nkodifikaw karatteristiċi semantiċi fihom, li jgħinu lill-mudell jiffoka fuq karatteristiċi utli tat-tagħlim fil-bidu tat-taħriġ. L-esperimenti juru l-effettività tat-teknika ta’ inizjalizzazzjoni fuq seba’ kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test, inklużi analiżi tas-sentimenti u klassifikazzjoni tas-suġġett.', 'no': 'Konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk (CNNs) vert breidd bruka i NLP- oppgåver. Denne papiret viser eit nytt vektsinitialiseringsmetode for å forbedra CNN-ane for tekstklassifikasjon. I staden for å starta tilfeldig konvolusjonelle filteret, koder vi semantiske funksjonar inn i dei, som hjelper modellen å fokusera på læring av nyttige funksjonar på begynnelsen av opplæringa. Eksperimentar viser effektiviteten av oppstartteknikken på sju tekstklassifikasjonar, inkludert sentimentanalyse og temaklassifikasjon.', 'pl': 'Konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe (CNN) są szeroko stosowane w zadaniach NLP. W artykule przedstawiono nową metodę inicjalizacji wagi w celu poprawy CNN dla klasyfikacji tekstu. Zamiast losowo inicjować filtry konwolucyjne, kodujemy w nich cechy semantyczne, co pomaga modelowi skupić się na nauce przydatnych funkcji na początku szkolenia. Eksperymenty pokazują skuteczność techniki inicjalizacji w siedmiu zadaniach klasyfikacji tekstu, w tym analizy sentymentów i klasyfikacji tematów.', 'ro': 'Rețelele Neurale Convoluționale (CNN) sunt utilizate pe scară largă în sarcinile PNL. Această lucrare prezintă o nouă metodă de inițializare a greutății pentru îmbunătățirea CNN-urilor pentru clasificarea textelor. În loc să inițializăm aleatoriu filtrele convoluționale, codăm caracteristici semantice în ele, ceea ce ajută modelul să se concentreze pe învățarea caracteristicilor utile la începutul instruirii. Experimentele demonstrează eficiența tehnicii de inițializare pe șapte sarcini de clasificare a textului, inclusiv analiza sentimentului și clasificarea subiectelor.', 'sr': 'Konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNNs) se široko koriste u zadatku NLP-a. Ovaj papir predstavlja novu metodu inicijalizacije težine kako bi poboljšala CNN za klasifikaciju teksta. Umesto slučajno inicijaliziranja konvolucionalnih filtara, kodiramo semantične karakteristike u njih, što pomaže modelu da se fokusira na učenje korisnih karakteristika na početku obuke. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost tehnike inicijalizacije na sedam zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, uključujući analizu sentimenta i klasifikaciju tema.', 'si': 'Name මේ පැත්තේ පිළිබඳ විශේෂණය සඳහා CNN විශේෂ විශේෂය සඳහා වැඩ කරන්න විධානයක් තියෙනවා. සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික පිළිතුරු පටන් ගන්න බැරි වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ඔවුන්ට සෙමාන්ටික් විශේෂතාවක් සංකේත කරන්න, ඒකෙන් මොඩේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය තාක්ෂණයේ පරික්ෂණය විශේෂණ විශේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශේෂණය සමග', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka Neural Network (CNNs) waxaa lagu isticmaalaa goobaha NLP. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo saaraa qaab ku saabsan miisaanka bilowga ah si uu u hagaajiyo CNNs-da fasalka qoraalka. Iska bedelka filimayaasha aan si fudud u billaabno, waxaynu ka koobnaynaa qeybaha semantika ah, kaas oo ku caawinaya tusaalka oo ku kalsoonaya barashada waxyaabaha faa’iidada ah marka waxbarashada bilowga. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda shaqada teknikada bilowga ee todobada shaqada fasaxa qoraalka ah, kuwaas oo ka mid ah baaritaanka xisaabta iyo fasaxa madaxa.', 'sv': 'Konvulutionella neurala nätverk (CNN) används ofta i NLP-uppgifter. Denna uppsats presenterar en ny viktinitialiseringsmetod för att förbättra CNN för textklassificering. Istället för att slumpmässigt initiera konvulutionsfiltren kodar vi semantiska funktioner i dem, vilket hjälper modellen att fokusera på att lära sig användbara funktioner i början av utbildningen. Experiment visar initialiseringsteknikens effektivitet på sju textklassificeringsuppgifter, inklusive sentimentalanalys och ämnesklassificering.', 'ta': 'Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) are widely used in NLP tasks.  இந்த தாள் உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான CNNs மேம்படுத்த ஒரு புதிய எடை துவக்க முறையை கூட்டுகிறது. குறிப்பில்லாமல் துவங்கும் பொதுவான அலங்காரத்திற்கு பதிலாக, பயிற்சியின் ஆரம்பத்தில் மாதிரி குணங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள உதவுகிறது. ஏழு உரை வகுப்பு பணிகளில் துவங்கும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் விளைவுகளைக் காட்டுகிறது, உணர்வு ஆய்வு மற்றும் தலைப்பு வகுப்பு', 'lt': 'Konveliuciniai nerviniai tinklai (CNN) plačiai naudojami NLP užduotims atlikti. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas naujas svorio inicializavimo metodas, skirtas pagerinti teksto klasifikavimo CNN. Instead of randomly initializing the convolutional filters, we encode semantic features into them, which helps the model focus on learning useful features at the beginning of the training.  Experiments demonstrate the effectiveness of the initialization technique on seven text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis and topic classification.', 'ur': 'NLP کے کاموں میں عمدہ طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. This paper presents a new weight initialization method to improve the CNN for text classification. اس کے بدلے ہم ان میں سیمنٹی فکرتوں کو آغاز کریں گے، جو مدل کی تعلیم کے آغاز میں مفید فکرتوں کی تعلیم پر مفید فکرتوں کی تعلیم کی مدد کرتی ہے. تجربے سات ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کے کاموں پر آغاز کی تکنیک کی عمدگی دکھاتے ہیں، احساس تحلیل اور ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کے شامل ہوتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) are widely used in NLP tasks.  Name Tasodifiy filterlarni ishga tushirishni oʻrniga, biz ularga semantik xususiyatlarini kodlash imkoniyatlariga yordam beramiz. Bu model taʼminlovchi boshlandida foydali xossalarni o'rganish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Gắn kết nối các mạng thần kinh (đài CNN) được sử dụng rộng rãi trong các công việc. Tờ giấy này cung cấp một phương pháp hiệu chỉnh trọng lượng mới nhằm cải thiện CNN cho việc phân loại văn bản. Thay vì khởi động ngẫu nhiên các bộ lọc xoắn ốc, chúng ta sẽ cài đặt các tính năng theo ngữ nghĩa vào chúng, giúp mô hình tập trung vào các tính năng hữu ích khi bắt đầu huấn luyện. Thí nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của kỹ thuật khởi tạo trong bảy nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản, bao gồm phân tích cảm xúc và phân loại chuyên môn.', 'bg': 'Конволюционните неврални мрежи (CNN) са широко използвани в задачите на НЛП. Настоящата статия представя нов метод за инициализация на теглото за подобряване на КНН за класификация на текста. Вместо случайно инициализиране на конвелуционните филтри, ние кодираме семантични характеристики в тях, което помага на модела да се фокусира върху изучаването на полезни функции в началото на обучението. Експериментите демонстрират ефективността на инициализационната техника при седем задачи за класификация на текста, включително анализ на сентимента и класификация на темата.', 'nl': "Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN's) worden veel gebruikt in NLP-taken. Dit artikel presenteert een nieuwe methode voor gewichtsinitialisatie om de CNN's voor tekstclassificatie te verbeteren. In plaats van de convolutionele filters willekeurig te initialiseren, coderen we semantische kenmerken erin, waardoor het model zich kan concentreren op het leren van nuttige functies aan het begin van de training. Experimenten tonen de effectiviteit van de initialisatietechniek aan bij zeven tekstclassificatietaken, waaronder sentimentanalyse en topic classificatie.", 'da': "Konvulutionsneurale netværk (CNN'er) anvendes i vid udstrækning i NLP-opgaver. Denne artikel præsenterer en ny vægtinitialiseringsmetode til at forbedre CNN'erne til tekstklassifikation. I stedet for tilfældigt at initialisere konvulutionsfiltrene, koder vi semantiske funktioner ind i dem, hvilket hjælper modellen med at fokusere på at lære nyttige funktioner i begyndelsen af træningen. Eksperimenter viser effektiviteten af initialiseringsteknikken på syv tekstklassifikationsopgaver, herunder sentimentalanalyse og emneklassificering.", 'hr': 'Konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNNs) se široko koriste u zadatkima NLP-a. Ovaj papir predstavlja novu metodu inicijalizacije težine kako bi poboljšala CNN za klasifikaciju teksta. Umjesto slučajno inicijaliziranja konvolucionalnih filtara, kodiramo semantične karakteristike u njih, što pomaže modelu fokusirati se na učenje korisnih karakteristika na početku obuke. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost tehnike inicijalizacije na sedam zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, uključujući analizu osjećaja i klasifikaciju tema.', 'de': 'Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs) sind in NLP-Aufgaben weit verbreitet. Diese Arbeit stellt eine neuartige Methode zur Gewichtsinitialisierung vor, um die CNNs für die Textklassifizierung zu verbessern. Anstatt die Faltungsfilter zufällig zu initialisieren, codieren wir semantische Merkmale in sie, was dem Modell hilft, sich auf das Erlernen nützlicher Funktionen zu Beginn des Trainings zu konzentrieren. Experimente demonstrieren die Effektivität der Initialisierungstechnik bei sieben Textklassifizierungsaufgaben, einschließlich Stimmungsanalyse und Themenklassifizierung.', 'id': 'Jaringan Neural Konvelusional (CNN) sangat digunakan dalam tugas NLP. Kertas ini mempersembahkan metode inisialisasi berat baru untuk meningkatkan CNN untuk klasifikasi teks. Daripada menginisialisasi secara acak filter konvolusi, kita mengkode fitur semantis ke dalamnya, yang membantu model fokus pada belajar fitur berguna pada awal latihan. Eksperimen menunjukkan efektivitas teknik inisialisasi pada tujuh tugas klasifikasi teks, termasuk analisis sentimen dan klasifikasi topik.', 'ko': 'CNN은 NLP 임무에 널리 활용된다.본고는 텍스트 분류 중의 CNN을 개선하기 위해 새로운 권중 초기화 방법을 제시했다.우리는 무작위로 볼륨 필터를 초기화하는 것이 아니라 의미 특징을 볼륨 필터에 인코딩함으로써 모델이 훈련을 시작할 때 유용한 특징을 학습하는 데 도움이 된다.실험은 이 초기화 기술이 7개의 텍스트 분류 임무에서의 유효성을 증명했는데 감정 분석과 주제 분류를 포함한다.', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Neural (CNNs) unatumiwa sana katika kazi za NLP. Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu ya mwanzo wa uzito wa riwaya ili kuboresha CNN kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa maandishi. Badala ya kuanzisha filteri za kimataifa, tunajumuisha vipengele vya kimapenzi, ambavyo vinasaidia mifano ya kujifunza vipengele vinavyofaa katika mwanzo wa mafunzo. Majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa teknolojia ya kuanzishwa kwa kazi saba za usambazaji wa maandishi, ikiwa ni pamoja na uchambuzi wa hisia na kutangazwa kwa mada.', 'tr': "Adatça NLP görevlerinde ullanylýar Bu kagyz CNN'i metin klasifikasy üçin gowuramak üçin täze bir gol başlatma yöntemi görkezýär. Akylly filtreler başlamak ýerine semantik özellikleri olara kodlaýarys. Bu nusga okuwçynyň başynda faydaly özellikler öwrenmesine kömek edip otyrýar. Testler başlatmak teknikleriniň etkinliýetini 7 metin klasifikasynda görkez.", 'af': "Name Hierdie papier stel 'n nuwe gewig inisialisering metode om die CNN vir teks klasifikasie te verbeter. In plaas van willekeurige inisialisering van die konvolusiele filters, ons kodeer semantiese funksies in hulle, wat help die model fokus op die leer van nuttige funksies op die begin van die onderwerp. Eksperimente wys die effektiviteit van die inisialiseringtekniks op sewe teks klassifiseringtaak, insluitend sentimentanalisie en onderwerp klassifisering.", 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (CNNs) گسترده در کار NLP استفاده می\u200cشوند. این کاغذ روش آغاز وزن جدید را نشان می دهد تا CNN را برای گروه متن بهتر کند. به جای آغاز تصادفی فیلترهای معمولی، ما ویژگی\u200cهای semantic را در آنها Encode می\u200cکنیم، که به مدل تمرکز می\u200cکند بر ویژگی\u200cهای مفید یادگیری در آغاز آموزش. تجربه\u200cها موثرت تکنیک آغاز کردن روی هفت وظیفه\u200cی مختصات متن را نشان می\u200cدهند، شامل تحلیل احساسات و مختصات موضوع.', 'hy': 'Կանվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցերը (CNN) լայնորեն օգտագործվում են ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքներում: This paper presents a novel weight initialization method to improve the CNNs for text classification.  Փոխարենը պատահական սկզբնական ֆիլտրերը կոդավորելու փոխարեն, մենք դրանց մեջ կոդավորում ենք սեմանտիկ հատկություններ, ինչը օգնում է մոդելը կենտրոնանալ ուսուցման օգտակար հատկությունների վրա ուսուցման սկզբում: Փորձերը ցույց են տալիս ինիցիալիզացիայի տեխնիկայի արդյունավետությունը եօթը տեքստի դասակարգումների համար, ներառյալ զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը և թեմային դասակարգումը:', 'az': 'Konvolucional NLP işlərində NLP işlərində çox istifadə edilir. Bu kağıt, CNN-ləri mətn klasifikasiyası üçün yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün yeni a ğırlıq başlanğıç yolunu göstərir. Konvolucional filtrləri başlatmaq yerinə, semantik özellikləri onların içində kodlayırıq. Bu modeli təhsil başlarında faydalı özellikləri öyrənməyə kömək edir. Həqiqətən, təcrübələr yeddi metin klasifikasyonu işlərində başlanğıçma tekniklərinin etkinliğini göstərir, hiss analizi və məsələlərin klasifikasyonu də dahil edərlər.', 'sq': 'Rrjetet Neurale Konveolutive (CNNs) përdoren gjerësisht në detyrat NLP. Kjo letër paraqet një metodë të re për nisjen e peshës për të përmirësuar CNN për klasifikimin e tekstit. Në vend të nisjes së rastësishme të filtrave konvolutive, ne kodojmë karakteristika semantike në to, që ndihmon modelin të përqëndrohet në mësimin e karakteristikave të dobishme në fillim të trajnimit. Eksperimentet tregojnë efektshmërinë e teknikës së nisjes në shtatë detyra klasifikuese teksti, duke përfshirë analizën e ndjenjave dhe klasifikimin e temës.', 'am': 'Convolution Neural Network (CNNs) is widely used in NLP tasks. ይህ ገጽ የጽሑፍ መግለጫ CNNs ለጽሑፍ መግለጫ የሚያሳድገውን የአሁኑን ሚዛን መግለጫ የሚያቀርብ ነው፡፡ አካባቢ አጣራዎችን በመጀመሪያ ፋንታ፣ የsemantic ምርጫዎች ለይተዋል፡፡ ፈተናዎች የመጀመሪያውን የቴክኖክና የጽሑፍ ክፍለ ሥርዓት፣ አስተያየት እና የጉዳዩ ክፍል እና ትምህርት ክፍተት የሚያሳየው፡፡', 'ca': "Les xarxes neuronals convolucionals s'utilitzen ampliament en tasques de NLP. Aquest article presenta un nou mètode d'inicialització de pes per millorar les CNN per a la classificació de text. En lloc d'iniciar aleatòriament els filtres convolucionaris, codifiquem característiques semàntiques en elles, que ajuda al model a centrar-se en aprendre característiques útils al principi de l'entrenament. Els experiments demostren l'eficacia de la tècnica d'inicialització en set tasques de classificació de textos, incloent l'anàlisi del sentiment i la classificació del tema.", 'bn': 'কনভোলেশন নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) NLP কাজে ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এই পত্রিকাটি টেক্সট ক্লাসাফিকেশনের জন্য সিএনএন-এর উন্নতি প্রদান করার জন্য একটি নvel ওজনের প্রাথমিক পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন প্রশিক্ষণের শুরুতে মোডেলের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি শিক্ষা শুরু করার পরিবর্তে আমরা সেম্যান্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বিষয়বস্তু এনকোড করি। পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে সাত টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশন কাজের উপর প্রথম প্রযুক্তির কার্যক্রম, যার মধ্যে অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণ এবং বিষয় বি', 'cs': 'Convoluční neuronové sítě (CNN) jsou široce používány v NLP úlohách. Tento článek představuje novou metodu inicializace hmotnosti pro zlepšení CNN pro klasifikaci textu. Namísto náhodné inicializace konvolučních filtrů do nich kódujeme sémantické prvky, což pomáhá modelu zaměřit se na učení užitečných funkcí na začátku tréninku. Experimenty demonstrují efektivitu inicializační techniky na sedmi úlohách klasifikace textu, včetně analýzy sentimentu a klasifikace témat.', 'et': 'Konvolutsioonilisi närvivõrke (CNN) kasutatakse laialdaselt NLP ülesannetes. Käesolevas töös on esitatud uus kaalu initsialiseerimise meetod, et parandada CNN-sid teksti klassifitseerimiseks. Konvolutsioonifiltrite juhusliku initsialiseerimise asemel kodeerime nendesse semantilisi funktsioone, mis aitab mudelil keskenduda kasulike funktsioonide õppimisele koolituse alguses. Eksperimentid näitavad initsialiseerimise tehnika efektiivsust seitsmes teksti klassifitseerimisülesandes, sealhulgas sentimentaalüüs ja teemaklassifitseerimine.', 'bs': 'Konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNNs) se široko koriste u zadatkima NLP-a. Ovaj papir predstavlja novu metodu inicijalizacije težine kako bi poboljšala CNN za klasifikaciju teksta. Umjesto slučajno inicijaliziranja konvolucionalnih filtara, kodiramo semantične karakteristike u njih, što pomaže modelu da se fokusira na učenje korisnih karakteristika na početku obuke. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost tehnike inicijalizacije na sedam zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, uključujući analizu osjećanja i klasifikaciju tema.', 'fi': 'Konvolutionaalisia hermoverkkoja (CNN) käytetään laajalti NLP-tehtävissä. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään uusi painon alustusmenetelmä tekstiluokituksen CNN:ien parantamiseksi. Sen sijaan, että alustaisimme konvolutionaalisia suodattimia satunnaisesti, koodaamme niihin semanttisia ominaisuuksia, mikä auttaa mallia keskittymään hyödyllisten ominaisuuksien oppimiseen koulutuksen alussa. Kokeet osoittavat alustamistekniikan tehokkuuden seitsemässä tekstiluokittelutehtävässä, mukaan lukien tunteiden analysointi ja aiheluokittelu.', 'jv': "Kernel Gambar nyong ngewehi sistem Anyar Manual Sampeyan tanggal mrogram kuwi arep mulasar convolution Where's this text", 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da wata hanyor farko na cikin yanzu don ya ƙara CNNNs wa fasalin matsayi. Babu fara ta fara fili masu ƙidãya, ko na kodi masu tsari na semantic cikin su, wanda ke taimakon motel ya fokus a kan karanta masu amfani da fara ta shawarar. Tajarakin na nuna alama ga technical na fara ta kan aikin classified matsayin baka, kamar akwai anayi na hisia da kuma kallon maɓalli.', 'he': 'רשתות נוירוליות משותפות (CNN) משתמשות באופן רחב במשימות NLP. הנייר הזה מציג שיטת ניזאליזציה של משקל חדשה כדי לשפר את CNN עבור מסווג טקסט. במקום להתחיל באופן אקראי את הסננים השתניים, אנו קודים להם תכונות סמנטיות, מה שעוזר למודל להתמקד בללמד תכונות שימושיות בתחילת האימון. ניסויים מראים את היעילות של טכניקת ההתחלה על שבעה משימות מסווג טקסט, כולל ניתוח רגשות וסווג נושא.', 'sk': 'Konvolucijska živčna omrežja (CNN) se pogosto uporabljajo pri nalogah NLP. V prispevku je predstavljena nova metoda inicializacije teže za izboljšanje CNN-jev za klasifikacijo besedila. Namesto naključnega inicializacije konvolucijskih filtrov v njih kodiramo semantične funkcije, kar pomaga modelu, da se osredotoči na učenje uporabnih funkcij na začetku usposabljanja. Eksperimenti dokazujejo učinkovitost inicializacijske tehnike pri sedmih nalogah klasifikacije besedil, vključno z analizo sentimenta in klasifikacijo teme.', 'bo': 'ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ(CNNs)ནི་NLP ལས་ཀ་ནང་སྤྱོད་པ་རེད ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་CNN་ཚིག་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་དུ་གཏོང་བའི་དུས་ཚོད་ཀྱི་འགོ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ། Instead of randomly initializing the convolutional filters, we encode semantic features into them, which helps the model focus on learning useful features at the beginning of the training. Experiments demonstrate the effectiveness of the initialization technique on seven text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis and topic classification.'}
{'en': 'Shortest-Path Graph Kernels for Document Similarity', 'ar': 'نواة الرسم البياني الأقصر مسارًا لتشابه المستند', 'fr': 'Noyaux de graphe Shortest-Path pour la similitude des documents', 'es': 'Núcleos de gráficos de ruta más corta para la similitud de documentos', 'pt': 'Kernels de gráfico de caminho mais curto para similaridade de documentos', 'ja': 'ドキュメントの類似性のための最短経路グラフカーネル', 'zh': '文档相似性最短径图内核', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़ समानता के लिए सबसे छोटा-पथ ग्राफ़ कर्नेल', 'ru': 'Ядра графиков с кратчайшим путем для подобия документа', 'ga': 'Eithne Ghraf Cosáin Is Giorra le haghaidh Cosúlachta Doiciméid', 'hu': 'A dokumentum hasonlóságához legrövidebb útvonalú grafikkarminták', 'el': 'Πυρήνες γραφήματος συντομότερης διαδρομής για ομοιότητα εγγράφων', 'it': 'Kernel grafico a percorso più breve per la somiglianza del documento', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Құжатты ұқсастыру үшін ең қысқарттық жол графикалық деректері', 'ml': 'രേഖയ്ക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ വഴി ഗ്രാഫ് കെര്\u200dണലുകള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Kernel Graf Laluan Terpendek untuk Kesamaan Dokumen', 'mk': 'Графски јадри со најкратка патека за сличност на документот', 'mt': 'Il-Kernels tal-Grafika l-iqsar bit-triq għal Similarità tad-Dokument', 'mn': 'Документийн хамгийн бага зам график Kernels', 'pl': 'Jądra wykresu najkrótszej ścieżki dla podobieństwa dokumentów', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Kernele grafice cu cea mai scurtă cale pentru similitudinea documentelor', 'sr': 'Најкраћи график графика за прилику документа', 'si': 'Comment', 'lt': 'Dokumento panašumo grafiniai branduoliai trumpiausiu keliu', 'so': 'Qrnels', 'sv': 'Grafkärnor med kortaste sökvägar för dokumentlikhet', 'ta': 'ஆவணத்திற்கான சிறிய பாதையின் வரைகலை கெர்னல்கள்', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'File tráo đổi vCalendar Comment', 'uz': 'Hujjatning moslamalari uchun qisqa yoʻl grafik kernellari', 'nl': 'Kortste pad grafiekkernels voor documentgelijkenis', 'da': 'Grafkerner med korteste sti til dokumentlighed', 'bg': 'Ядрота на графиката с най-кратки пътища за сходство с документите', 'de': 'Diagrammkerne mit dem kürzesten Pfad für die Ähnlichkeit von Dokumenten', 'hr': 'Najkraći način grafičke konzerve za sličnost dokumenta', 'ko': '문서 유사성 최단 경로 핵', 'id': 'Shortest-Path Graph Kernels for Document Similarity', 'sw': 'Kernels for Document Similarity', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Sened bejerilmesi üçin iň kısa yol grafik karneleri', 'sq': 'Shortest-Path Graph Kernels for Document Similarity', 'am': 'ሰነድ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'D칬k칲mat oxumas캼 칲칞칲n 톛n q캼sa yol Grafik Kernel톛ri', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্টের সমতার জন্য সর্বনিম্ন- পাথ গ্রাফ কেরেলস', 'bs': 'Najskratki poglavlje grafika za sličnost dokumenta', 'ca': 'Els núcles de gràfics de camí més curt per a la similitud dels documentos', 'cs': 'Jádra grafů s nejkratší cestou pro podobnost dokumentů', 'et': 'Dokumendi sarnasuse lühima asukohaga graafiku tuumad', 'fi': 'Lyhyimmän polun grafiikkaytimet asiakirjojen samankaltaisuutta varten', 'jv': 'Graph Kernels kanggo Ketok Simularity', 'sk': 'Jedra grafikona za najkrajšo pot za podobnost dokumentov', 'he': 'גרעיני גרף במסלול הקצר ביותר עבור דומה למסמך', 'ha': 'Shortest-Path Graph Kernels for Document Similarity', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་མཚོན་རུང་ལ་མཐའ་ཆེ་བའི་འགྲུལ་ལམ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a novel document similarity measure based on the definition of a graph kernel between pairs of documents. The proposed measure takes into account both the terms contained in the documents and the relationships between them. By representing each document as a graph-of-words, we are able to model these relationships and then determine how similar two documents are by using a modified shortest-path graph kernel. We evaluate our approach on two tasks and compare it against several baseline approaches using various performance metrics such as DET curves and macro-average F1-score. Experimental results on a range of datasets showed that our proposed approach outperforms traditional techniques and is capable of measuring more accurately the similarity between two documents.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم مقياسًا جديدًا للتشابه بين المستندات بناءً على تعريف نواة الرسم البياني بين أزواج من المستندات. يأخذ التدبير المقترح في الاعتبار كلا من المصطلحات الواردة في الوثائق والعلاقات فيما بينها. من خلال تمثيل كل مستند كرسم بياني للكلمات ، يمكننا تصميم هذه العلاقات ثم تحديد مدى تشابه وثيقتين باستخدام نواة رسم بياني أقصر مسار معدل. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا في مهمتين ومقارنته بالعديد من الأساليب الأساسية باستخدام مقاييس أداء مختلفة مثل منحنيات DET ومتوسط الدرجة الكلية F1. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة من مجموعات البيانات أن نهجنا المقترح يتفوق على التقنيات التقليدية وقادر على قياس التشابه بين وثيقتين بدقة أكبر.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos una novedosa medida de similitud de documentos basada en la definición de un núcleo de gráficos entre pares de documentos. La medida propuesta tiene en cuenta tanto los términos contenidos en los documentos como las relaciones entre ellos. Al representar cada documento como un gráfico de palabras, podemos modelar estas relaciones y luego determinar qué tan similares son dos documentos mediante el uso de un núcleo de gráficos de ruta más corta modificado. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque en dos tareas y lo comparamos con varios enfoques de referencia utilizando varias métricas de rendimiento, como curvas DET y puntuación F1 macromedia. Los resultados experimentales en una variedad de conjuntos de datos mostraron que nuestro enfoque propuesto supera a las técnicas tradicionales y es capaz de medir con mayor precisión la similitud entre dos documentos.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle mesure de similarité de documents basée sur la définition d'un noyau graphique entre des paires de documents. La mesure proposée tient compte à la fois des termes contenus dans les documents et des relations entre eux. En représentant chaque document sous la forme d'un graphe de mots, nous sommes en mesure de modéliser ces relations, puis de déterminer dans quelle mesure deux documents sont similaires à l'aide d'un noyau de graphe du plus court chemin modifié. Nous évaluons notre approche sur deux tâches et la comparons à plusieurs approches de base à l'aide de divers indicateurs de performance tels que les courbes DET et le score F1 macro-moyen. Les résultats expérimentaux sur une gamme d'ensembles de données ont montré que l'approche que nous proposons surpasse les techniques traditionnelles et est capable de mesurer plus précisément la similitude entre deux documents.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova medida de similaridade de documentos baseada na definição de um kernel de grafo entre pares de documentos. A medida proposta leva em consideração tanto os termos contidos nos documentos quanto as relações entre eles. Ao representar cada documento como um gráfico de palavras, somos capazes de modelar esses relacionamentos e, em seguida, determinar a semelhança entre dois documentos usando um kernel de gráfico de caminho mais curto modificado. Avaliamos nossa abordagem em duas tarefas e a comparamos com várias abordagens de linha de base usando várias métricas de desempenho, como curvas DET e pontuação F1 média macro. Resultados experimentais em uma variedade de conjuntos de dados mostraram que nossa abordagem proposta supera as técnicas tradicionais e é capaz de medir com mais precisão a similaridade entre dois documentos.', 'ja': '本稿では、ペアの文書間のグラフカーネルの定義に基づく新規の文書類似性測定を提示する。提案された措置は、文書に含まれる用語とそれらの間の関係の両方を考慮しています。各ドキュメントを単語のグラフとして表すことで、これらの関係をモデル化し、修正された最短経路グラフカーネルを使用して2つのドキュメントがどれだけ類似しているかを決定することができます。2つのタスクに対するアプローチを評価し、DET曲線やマクロ平均F 1スコアなどのさまざまなパフォーマンス指標を使用して、いくつかのベースラインアプローチと比較します。さまざまなデータセットの実験結果は、提案されたアプローチが従来のテクニックよりも優れており、2つの文書間の類似性をより正確に測定することができることを示しました。', 'zh': '本文之中,立一基于文档之间图核定义新型文档相似性量。 拟议既虑文中所载语,亦思其关系。 每文档为词图,能建模之,然后用改后最短路径图内核定二文档相似。 吾评二务之法,并用诸性能指标(如DET曲线宏观平均值F1分数)比之数基线。 列数集上实验结果表明,优于旧术,而测两文档之相似性。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम दस्तावेज़ों के जोड़े के बीच ग्राफ कर्नेल की परिभाषा के आधार पर एक उपन्यास दस्तावेज़ समानता माप प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रस्तावित उपाय दस्तावेजों में निहित दोनों शर्तों और उनके बीच संबंधों को ध्यान में रखता है। ग्राफ-ऑफ-वर्ड्स के रूप में प्रत्येक दस्तावेज़ का प्रतिनिधित्व करके, हम इन संबंधों को मॉडल करने में सक्षम हैं और फिर यह निर्धारित करने में सक्षम हैं कि संशोधित सबसे छोटे-पथ ग्राफ कर्नेल का उपयोग करके दो दस्तावेज़ कितने समान हैं। हम दो कार्यों पर अपने दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और विभिन्न प्रदर्शन मीट्रिक जैसे डीईटी वक्र और मैक्रो-औसत एफ 1-स्कोर का उपयोग करके कई बेसलाइन दृष्टिकोणों के खिलाफ इसकी तुलना करते हैं। डेटासेट की एक श्रृंखला पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चला है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण पारंपरिक तकनीकों से बेहतर है और दो दस्तावेजों के बीच समानता को अधिक सटीक रूप से मापने में सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем новую меру подобия документа, основанную на определении ядра графа между парами документов. Предлагаемая мера учитывает как термины, содержащиеся в документах, так и взаимосвязи между ними. Представляя каждый документ в виде графа слов, мы можем смоделировать эти отношения, а затем определить, насколько похожи два документа, используя модифицированное ядро графа с кратчайшим путем. Мы оцениваем наш подход по двум задачам и сравниваем его с несколькими базовыми подходами, используя различные показатели эффективности, такие как кривые DET и макросредний показатель F1. Экспериментальные результаты по ряду наборов данных показали, что предлагаемый нами подход превосходит традиционные методы и способен более точно измерять сходство между двумя документами.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair beart cosúlachta doiciméad núíosach bunaithe ar an sainmhíniú ar eithne graif idir péirí doiciméad. Cuirtear san áireamh sa bheart atá beartaithe na téarmaí atá sna doiciméid agus na gaolmhaireachtaí eatarthu. Trí gach doiciméad a léiriú mar ghraf focal, táimid in ann na gaolmhaireachtaí seo a shamhaltú agus ansin a chinneadh cé chomh cosúil agus atá an dá dhoiciméad trí úsáid a bhaint as eithne ghraf cosán is giorra modhnaithe. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár gcur chuige maidir le dhá thasc agus déanaimid é a chur i gcomparáid le roinnt cineálacha cur chuige bonnlíne ag baint úsáide as méadrachtaí feidhmíochta éagsúla cosúil le cuair DET agus macra-mheánscór F1. Léirigh torthaí turgnamhacha ar raon tacar sonraí go sáraíonn ár gcur chuige molta na teicnící traidisiúnta agus go bhfuil sé in ann cosúlacht idir dhá dhoiciméad a thomhas ar bhealach níos cruinne.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ ახალი დოკუმენტის სინამდვილეობის განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც დოკუმენტის ორივე დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებით. პროგრამეტრებულია, რომელიც დოკუმენტებში და შესახებ შორის შესახებ იქნება. ყოველ დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებით როგორც სიტყვების გრაფიკის განსაზღვრებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ამ შესახებების მოდელედ და შემდეგ განსაზღვრება რამდენიმე მსგავსი ორი დო ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამის შესახებ ორი სამუშაო დავამუშავებთ და ამის შესახებ რამდენიმე სამუშაო მხოლოდ გამოყენება განსხვავებული კონტაქტის მეტრიკის გამოყენებით, როგორ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი მონაცემების განსხვავებაში გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამების განსხვავება სატრაციონალური ტექნოგიების გაუკეთება და უფრო წესიერად შეუძლია გა', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új dokumentumhasonlósági mérést, amely a dokumentumok párjai közötti gráfamag definícióján alapul. A javasolt intézkedés figyelembe veszi mind a dokumentumokban szereplő feltételeket, mind pedig a közöttük lévő kapcsolatokat. Az egyes dokumentumok szavak grafikonjaként történő ábrázolásával modellezhetjük ezeket a kapcsolatokat, majd meghatározhatjuk, hogy mennyire hasonlítanak a két dokumentum egy módosított legrövidebb útvonalú grafikonkernelben segítségével. Két feladaton keresztül értékeljük megközelítésünket, és összehasonlítjuk azt több alapvető megközelítéssel, különböző teljesítménymutatókkal, mint például a DET görbék és a makróátlagos F1 pontszám. Számos adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatták, hogy javasolt megközelítésünk felülmúlja a hagyományos technikákat, és képes pontosabban mérni két dokumentum hasonlóságát.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μέτρο ομοιότητας εγγράφων που βασίζεται στον ορισμό ενός πυρήνα γραφής μεταξύ ζευγαριών εγγράφων. Το προτεινόμενο μέτρο λαμβάνει υπόψη τόσο τους όρους που περιέχονται στα έγγραφα όσο και τις σχέσεις μεταξύ τους. Αντιπροσωπεύοντας κάθε έγγραφο ως γράφημα λέξεων, είμαστε σε θέση να μοντελοποιήσουμε αυτές τις σχέσεις και στη συνέχεια να καθορίσουμε πόσο παρόμοια είναι δύο έγγραφα χρησιμοποιώντας έναν τροποποιημένο πυρήνα γραφήματος συντομότερης διαδρομής. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας σε δύο εργασίες και τη συγκρίνουμε με διάφορες προσεγγίσεις βάσης χρησιμοποιώντας διάφορες μετρήσεις απόδοσης, όπως καμπύλες και μακρομέση βαθμολογία F1. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε μια σειρά δεδομένων έδειξαν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά τις παραδοσιακές τεχνικές και είναι σε θέση να μετρήσει με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια την ομοιότητα μεταξύ δύο εγγράφων.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, presentiamo una nuova misura di somiglianza del documento basata sulla definizione di un kernel grafico tra coppie di documenti. La misura proposta tiene conto sia dei termini contenuti nei documenti che dei loro rapporti. Rappresentando ogni documento come un grafico di parole, siamo in grado di modellare queste relazioni e quindi determinare quanto siano simili due documenti utilizzando un kernel grafico a percorso più breve modificato. Valutiamo il nostro approccio su due attività e lo confrontiamo con diversi approcci di base utilizzando varie metriche di performance come curve DET e punteggio F1 macro-medio. I risultati sperimentali su una serie di set di dati hanno dimostrato che il nostro approccio proposto supera le tecniche tradizionali ed è in grado di misurare più accuratamente la somiglianza tra due documenti.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naują dokumento panašumo priemonę, grindžiamą grafinio branduolio tarp dokumentų poros apibrėžimu. The proposed measure takes into account both the terms contained in the documents and the relationships between them.  Vertindami kiekvieną dokumentą kaip žodžių grafiką, galime modeliuoti šiuos santykius ir tada nustatyti, kaip panašūs du dokumentai yra naudojant modifikuotą trumpiausio kelio grafikos branduolį. Vertiname savo požiūrį į dvi užduotis ir palyginame jį su keliais baziniais požiūriais naudojant įvairius veiklos rodiklius, pvz., DET kreives ir makroekonominius F1 balais. Eksperimentiniai įvairių duomenų rinkinių rezultatai parodė, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas atitinka tradicinius metodus ir gali tiksliau įvertinti dviejų dokumentų panašumą.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме нова мерка на сличност на документот базирана на дефиницијата на графски јадро помеѓу парови документи. Предложената мерка ги зема предвид и условите што се содржат во документите, и односите меѓу нив. Со претставувањето на секој документ како граф на зборови, можеме да ги моделираме овие односи и потоа да одредиме колку се слични два документи со користење на модификуваниот најкраток графски јадро. Ние го проценуваме нашиот пристап на две задачи и го споредуваме со неколку основни пристапи користејќи различни метрики на перформанса како што се кривите на DET и макро-просечната оценка F1. Експерименталните резултати на голем број податоци покажаа дека нашиот предложен пристап ги надминува традиционалните техники и е способен да ја мери попрецизно сличноста помеѓу двата документи.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita memperkenalkan ukuran kesamaan dokumen baru berdasarkan definisi kernel graf antara pasangan dokumen. Tindakan yang diusulkan mempertimbangkan kedua-dua terma yang terdapat dalam dokumen dan hubungan antara mereka. Dengan mewakili setiap dokumen sebagai graf-perkataan, kita boleh model hubungan ini dan kemudian menentukan bagaimana dua dokumen yang serupa dengan menggunakan kernel graf laluan pendek yang diubahsuai. Kita menilai pendekatan kita pada dua tugas dan membandingkannya dengan beberapa pendekatan dasar menggunakan berbagai-bagai metrik prestasi seperti lengkung DET dan makro-rata F1-skor. Hasil percubaan pada julat set data menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami diusulkan melampaui teknik tradisional dan mampu mengukur lebih tepat persamaan antara dua dokumen.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, екі құжаттың арасындағы график өзегінің анықтамасына негізделген романдық құжаттың ұқсас өлшемін көрсетеді. Келтірілген өлшемі құжаттар мен олардың арасындағы қатынастар тәртібін есептеп береді. Әрбір құжатты сөздер графикалық ретінде көрсету үшін бұл қатынастарды үлгілеп, содан кейін екі құжатты өзгертілген ең қысқа жол графикалық өзегін қолдану үшін анықтай аламыз. Екі тапсырмаға қатынасызды бағалап, оны бірнеше негізгі жолдардың қатынасына салыстырып, DET қисықтары мен F1- нәтижесінің макро орташасына сәйкес келеді. Деректер жиындарының бірнеше тәжірибелі нәтижелері біздің ұсынған тәжірибеміздің әдімгі технологияларды жасайды және екі құжаттың арасындағы ұқсастығын дұрыс өлшеп', 'ml': 'In this paper, we present a novel document similarity measure based on the definition of a graph kernel between pairs of documents.  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട അളവ് രേഖകളിലുള്ള വിധികളും അവയ്ക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങളും കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ രേഖയ്ക്കും ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ്- വാക്കുകളായി പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഈ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുവാന്\u200d നമുക്ക് കഴിയും, പിന്നീട് ഇതുപോലെ രണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു ജോലികളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയും, അതിനെ വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും  ഒരുപാട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ പ്ര', 'mt': 'In this paper, we present a novel document similarity measure based on the definition of a graph kernel between pairs of documents.  Il-miżura proposta tqis kemm it-termini li jinsabu fid-dokumenti kif ukoll ir-relazzjonijiet bejniethom. Billi nirrappreżentaw kull dokument bħala grafika tal-kliem, nistgħu nimmudellaw dawn ir-relazzjonijiet u mbagħad niddeterminaw kemm huma simili żewġ dokumenti billi nuqqasijiet modifikati tal-grafika l-iqsar. Aħna nivvalutaw l-approċċ tagħna fuq żewġ kompiti u nqabbluh ma’ diversi approċċi bażiċi bl-użu ta’ diversi metriċi ta’ prestazzjoni bħall-kurvi DET u l-punteġġ makromedju F1. Riżultati esperimentali fuq firxa ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta wrew li l-approċċ propost tagħna jaqbeż it-tekniki tradizzjonali u huwa kapaċi jkejjel b’mod aktar preċiż is-similarità bejn żewġ dokumenti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр документийн хоорондын график Kernel-ын тодорхойлолт дээр шинэ баримт тэнцүү хэмжээг тайлбарлаж байна. Тайлбарласан хэмжээнд баримт болон хоорондын харилцааны хоорондох томъёо хоёуланг нь тодорхойлж байна. Бид баримт бүрийг график үгсийн хэлбэрээр загварчлах боломжтой болно. Тэгээд хоёр баримт хэрхэн төстэй вэ гэдгийг харуулж, хамгийн богино замын график kernel ашиглаж байгааг тодорхойлж чадна. Бид хоёр даалгаварын арга барилгыг үнэлгээд, DET муруй, дундаж F1-тоо шиг олон суурь шулууны арга барилгыг ашиглан харьцуулж байна. Мөн олон өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга зам уламжлалтын технологиудыг дамжуулж, хоёр баримтын хоорондын адилтгалыг илүү тодорхой хэмжиж чадна гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy nowatorską miarę podobieństwa dokumentów opartą na definicji jądra wykresu pomiędzy parami dokumentów. Proponowany środek uwzględnia zarówno warunki zawarte w dokumentach, jak i relacje między nimi. Przedstawiając każdy dokument jako wykres słów, jesteśmy w stanie modelować te relacje, a następnie określić, jak podobne są dwa dokumenty za pomocą zmodyfikowanego jądra wykresu najkrótszej ścieżki. Oceniamy nasze podejście w odniesieniu do dwóch zadań i porównujemy je z kilkoma podejściami bazowymi przy użyciu różnych wskaźników wydajności, takich jak krzywe DET i makroeprzeciętny wynik F1. Wyniki eksperymentalne na szeregu zbiorów danych pokazały, że proponowane podejście przewyższa tradycyjne techniki i jest w stanie dokładniej mierzyć podobieństwo między dwoma dokumentami.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm o nouă măsură a similitudinii documentelor bazată pe definiția unui nucleu de grafic între perechi de documente. Măsura propusă ține seama atât de termenii conținuți în documente, cât și de relațiile dintre acestea. Reprezentând fiecare document ca un grafic de cuvinte, suntem capabili să modelăm aceste relații și apoi să determinăm cât de similare sunt două documente folosind un nucleu de grafic modificat cu cea mai scurtă cale. Evaluăm abordarea noastră pe două sarcini și o comparăm cu mai multe abordări de bază folosind diferite măsurători de performanță, cum ar fi curbele DET și scorul F1 macro-mediu. Rezultatele experimentale pe o serie de seturi de date au arătat că abordarea noastră propusă depășește tehnicile tradiționale și este capabilă să măsoare mai precis similitudinea dintre două documente.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi eit nytt dokumenttilsvarende mål basert på definisjonen av eit grafkjerne mellom par dokument. Den foreslåde målet tar i bruk både vilkåra som inneheld i dokumentet og forholdet mellom dei. Ved å representere kvar dokument som eit graf av ord, kan vi modellere desse forholdene og så bestemme kor liknande to dokument er ved å bruka eit endra kortste baneprogramkjerne. Vi evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på to oppgåver og samanliknar det med fleire baseline tilnærmingar med ulike funksjonsmetrikar som DET kurver og makro-gjennomsnittlig F1-poeng. Eksperimentale resultat på eit rekke dataset viste at vår foreslått tilnærming utfører tradisjonelle teknikk og kan måle meir nøyaktig liknande mellom to dokument.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa qoraal sawir ah oo isku mid ah oo ku saleysan sawir lagu qorayo qalabka qoraalka ee u dhexeeya labada nooc oo dukumenti ah. Xisaabta la soo jeedo waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa sharciga dukumentiyada iyo xiriirka dhexdooda ku jira. Markaas waxaynu sameyn karnaa xiriirkan, kadibna waxaynu ku qori karnaa sida labada dukumenti oo kale ku qoran karto xarunta wadooyinka ee gaaban. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababkayaga labada shaqaalaha, waxaynu ka hor dhignaa qaababka hoose ee lagu isticmaalayo qaabab kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan DET cursor iyo waxyaabaha ugu dhexeeya F1. Imtixaanka ku saabsan sawirada kala duduwan waxay muuqatay in qalabkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay sameeyaan qalabka caadiga ah, wuxuuna awoodaa inuu si saxda ah u qiyaaso labada dukumenti dhexdooda.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett nytt dokument likhetsmät baserat på definitionen av en grafkärna mellan par dokument. I den föreslagna åtgärden beaktas både villkoren i dokumenten och förhållandet mellan dem. Genom att representera varje dokument som en graf av ord, kan vi modellera dessa relationer och sedan bestämma hur liknande två dokument är genom att använda en modifierad kortaste sökväg grafkärna. Vi utvärderar vårt tillvägagångssätt på två uppgifter och jämför det mot flera baslinjetillvägagångssätt med hjälp av olika prestandamått såsom DET-kurvor och makro-genomsnittlig F1-poäng. Experimentella resultat på en rad datauppsättningar visade att vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt överträffar traditionella tekniker och kan mäta likheten mellan två dokument mer exakt.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஆவணத்தை சமமான அளவு கொடுக்கிறோம். வரைப்படத்தின் மூலம் இரண்டு ஆவணங்களுக்கிடையில் வரை The proposed measure takes into account both the terms contained in the documents and the relationships between them.  ஒவ்வொரு ஆவணத்தையும் வரைபடமாக குறிப்பிடுவதால், இந்த இணைப்புகளை மாற்ற முடியும். பின்னர் இவ்விரண்டு ஆவணங்கள் எவ்வாறு மாற்றப்பட்ட குறைந் நாம் இரண்டு பணிகளில் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் அதை பல அடிப்படைக்கோட்டின் முறைமைகளுக்கு எதிராக ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். DE சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் பல தரவுத்தளங்களில் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டது நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட நெறிமுறையில் மரபார்ந்த துள்ள தொழில்நுட்பத்தை', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu mjeru sličnosti dokumenta baziranu na definiciji grafičkog kernel između parova dokumenta. Predložena mjera uzima u obzir i uslove sadržane u dokumentima i odnosima između njih. Predstavljajući svaki dokument kao graf-reči, možemo modelirati te veze i onda utvrditi koliko su slične dvije dokumente koristeći modificirani graf najkraći put. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na dva zadatka i uspoređujemo ga sa nekoliko pristupa početne linije koristeći različite metrike funkcionalnosti kao što su DET krive i makro-prosječni F1 rezultat. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nizu podataka pokazali su da naš predloženi pristup iznosi tradicionalne tehnike i da je sposoban da preciznije mjeri sličnost između dva dokumenta.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නියම වැඩසටහන් සමාන විශේෂතාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ කර්නල් අතර විශේෂයේ අ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලිපින්තුවක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙන තියෙන ප්\u200d හැම දස්තාවෙක්ම ග්\u200dරාෆ්-වචන් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණ කරනවා, අපිට පුළුවන් මේ සම්බන්ධ වලින් මොඩල් කරන්න, ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරත අපි කාර්ය දෙකක් විදියට අපේ විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මාක්\u200dරෝ-සාමාන්\u200dය F1-ස්කෝර් විදියට විවිධ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජන පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දත්ත සෙට් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරතිච', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نئی دفتر کے مطابق مطابق اندازہ کو دفتر کے جوڑوں کے درمیان ایک گراف کرنل کی تعریف پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. پیشنهاد کی ناپ دونوں مدارکیوں میں اور ان کے درمیان رابطہ کی شرایط کا حساب لیتا ہے. ہر دفتر کو ایک گراف-of-words کے طور پر نمایش دینے کے ذریعہ، ہم ان رابطے موڈل کر سکتے ہیں اور پھر معلوم کر سکتے ہیں کہ کس طرح دو دفتروں کے برابر ہو رہے ہیں بدل دینے کے ذریعہ ایک چھوٹی-مسیر گراف کرنل. ہم اپنے طریقے کو دو کاموں پر مطابق کریں اور اسے چند بنسلین طریقے کے مطابق مطابق کے مطابق مختلف عملکرد متریک کے مطابق مقایسہ کریں جیسے DET کروؤں اور مکرو متوسط F1-اسکور کے مطابق مقایسہ کریں۔ ڈاٹ سٹ کے ایک طریقے پر تجربے کا نتیجہ دکھایا گیا کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی تقریبا سنتی ٹیکنیک سے زیادہ زیادہ مطابق اندازے کے قابل ہے اور دو لاسوندوں کے درمیان مطابق مطابق اندازے کے قابل ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz bir necha hujjatning orasidagi grafik kerneli aniqlash asosida yaratilgan novel hujjatni koʻrsatimiz. Koʻrsatilgan holatda hujjatlarda va orasidagi munosabatlarning ikkita darajalarini hisoblash mumkin. Har bir hujjatni grafik so'zlar sifatida koʻrsatish mumkin, biz ushbu aloqalarni modellashimiz mumkin va keyin ikkita hujjatning qanday oʻzgartirilgan qisqa yoʻl grafik kerneli yordamida qaramamiz mumkin. Biz ikkita vazifalar orqali qiymatmiz va uning bir necha baseline murakkablariga o'xshash qilamiz. DET kursorlari va makro F1 darajasi bir necha darajada bir necha darajaga kamaytirishingiz mumkin. Bir necha maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari koʻrsatilgan shunday qilib, biz talab qilingan usulning tabiiy texnologiyani bajaradi va ikkita hujjatning orasidagi bir toʻgʻri oʻxshash imkoniyatlariga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một thước đo về nét giống nhau văn bản mới dựa trên định nghĩa của hạt nhân đồ thị giữa các cặp tài liệu. Đối tượng đề nghị sẽ cân nhắc cả những điều khoản trong tài liệu và mối quan hệ giữa chúng. Bằng cách đại diện mỗi tài liệu như một đồ thị từ, chúng tôi có thể mô hình các mối quan hệ này và sau đó xác định hai tài liệu tương tự bằng cách sử dụng một hạt nhân đồ vẽ đường ngắn. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi về hai nhiệm vụ và so sánh nó với nhiều phương pháp cơ bản sử dụng các đo trình lượng khác nhau, như các đường cong lT và siêu số F1-điểm. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên một loạt các dữ liệu cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội các kỹ thuật truyền thống và có khả năng đo chính xác nét tương đồng giữa hai tài liệu.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi et nyt dokument lighedsmål baseret på definitionen af en grafkerne mellem par dokumenter. Den foreslåede foranstaltning tager hensyn til både betingelserne i dokumenterne og forholdet mellem dem. Ved at repræsentere hvert dokument som en graf af ord, er vi i stand til at modellere disse relationer og derefter bestemme, hvor ens to dokumenter er ved at bruge en modificeret kortest sti grafkerne. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang på to opgaver og sammenligner den med flere baseline tilgange ved hjælp af forskellige præstationsmålinger såsom DET kurver og makro-gennemsnit F1-score. Eksperimentelle resultater på en række datasæt viste, at vores foreslåede tilgang overgår traditionelle teknikker og er i stand til mere nøjagtigt at måle ligheden mellem to dokumenter.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нова мярка за сходство на документи въз основа на дефиницията на графично ядро между двойки документи. Предложената мярка отчита както условията, съдържащи се в документите, така и връзките между тях. Като представяме всеки документ като графика от думи, можем да моделираме тези взаимоотношения и след това да определим колко сходни са два документа, като използваме модифицирано ядро на графиката с най-кратък път. Оценяваме подхода си по две задачи и го сравняваме с няколко базови подхода, използвайки различни показатели за ефективност, като криви и макросредния резултат. Експерименталните резултати на редица набори от данни показаха, че предложеният ни подход превъзхожда традиционните техники и е в състояние да измерва по-точно приликата между два документа.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu mjeru sličnosti dokumenta na temelju definicije grafičkog kernel između par dokumenta. Predložena mjera uzima u obzir i uvjete u dokumentima i odnose između njih. Predstavljajući svaki dokument kao graf riječi, možemo modelirati te veze i onda utvrditi kako slična dva dokumenta koristeći modificirani graf najkraći put. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na dva zadatka i uspoređujemo ga s nekoliko početnih pristupa koristeći različite mjere učinkovitosti kao što su DET krive i makro-prosječni F1 rezultat. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nizu podataka pokazali su da naš predloženi pristup iznosi tradicionalne tehnike i može preciznije mjeriti sličnost između dva dokumenta.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe mate van documentgelijkenis op basis van de definitie van een grafiekkernel tussen paren van documenten. De voorgestelde maatregel houdt rekening met zowel de in de documenten vervatte termen als met de onderlinge verhoudingen. Door elk document weer te geven als een grafiek van woorden, zijn we in staat om deze relaties te modelleren en vervolgens te bepalen hoe vergelijkbaar twee documenten zijn met behulp van een aangepaste grafiekkernel met het kortste pad. We evalueren onze aanpak op twee taken en vergelijken deze met verschillende baseline benaderingen met behulp van verschillende prestatiestatistieken zoals DET curves en macro-gemiddelde F1-score. Experimentele resultaten op een reeks datasets toonden aan dat onze voorgestelde aanpak overtreft traditionele technieken en in staat is om nauwkeuriger de gelijkenis tussen twee documenten te meten.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan sebuah dokumen baru ukuran persamaan berdasarkan definisi kernel grafik antara pasangan dokumen. Ukuran yang diusulkan mempertimbangkan kedua istilah yang terdapat dalam dokumen dan hubungan antara mereka. Dengan mewakili setiap dokumen sebagai grafik-dari-kata, kita dapat model hubungan ini dan kemudian menentukan bagaimana dua dokumen yang sama dengan menggunakan kernel grafik jalur pendek yang diubah. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan kita pada dua tugas dan membandingkannya dengan beberapa pendekatan dasar menggunakan berbagai metrik prestasi seperti kurva DET dan makro-rata F1 skor. Hasil eksperimental pada jangkauan dataset menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kami yang diusulkan melampaui teknik tradisional dan mampu mengukur lebih akurat persamaan antara dua dokumen.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges Dokument Ähnlichkeitsmaß vor, das auf der Definition eines Graphenkerns zwischen Dokumentenpaaren basiert. Die vorgeschlagene Maßnahme berücksichtigt sowohl die in den Dokumenten enthaltenen Begriffe als auch die Beziehungen zwischen ihnen. Indem wir jedes Dokument als Graph-of-Word darstellen, sind wir in der Lage, diese Beziehungen zu modellieren und dann festzustellen, wie ähnlich zwei Dokumente sind, indem wir einen modifizierten Graph-Kernel mit dem kürzesten Pfad verwenden. Wir evaluieren unseren Ansatz für zwei Aufgaben und vergleichen ihn mit mehreren Baseline-Ansätzen anhand verschiedener Leistungsmetriken wie DET-Kurven und makrodurchschnittlichem F1-Score. Experimentelle Ergebnisse auf einer Reihe von Datensätzen zeigten, dass unser vorgeschlagener Ansatz herkömmliche Techniken übertrifft und in der Lage ist, die Ähnlichkeit zwischen zwei Dokumenten genauer zu messen.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 문서 간의 도핵 정의를 바탕으로 한 새로운 문서의 유사성 도량을 제시했다.제안된 조치는 서류 속의 조항도 고려했고 그것들 간의 관계도 고려했다.모든 문서를 단어 그래프로 표시함으로써 우리는 이러한 관계를 모델링한 다음에 수정된 가장 짧은 경로 그래프를 사용하여 두 문서의 유사도를 확정할 수 있다.우리는 두 가지 임무에서 우리의 방법을 평가하고 각종 성능 지표(예를 들어 DET 곡선과 거시적 평균 F1 점수)를 사용하여 몇 가지 기선 방법과 비교했다.일련의 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 방법은 전통적인 방법보다 우수하고 두 문서 간의 유사성을 더욱 정확하게 측정할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک مقدار شباهت سند رمانی را بر اساس تعریف کرن گراف بین جفت سند نشان می دهیم. اندازه پیشنهاد هر دو شرایطی که در مدارک و رابطه بین آنها وجود دارد به حساب می گیرد. با نمایش هر سند به عنوان یک گراف کلمه، ما می توانیم این رابطه را مدل کنیم و سپس تصمیم بگیریم که چگونه دو سند شبیه است با استفاده از یک کرنه کوتاه ترین مسیر تغییر داده شده است. ما روش خودمان را بر دو کار ارزیابی می کنیم و آن را با چندین روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cخط مقایسه می\u200cکنیم با استفاده از متریک\u200cهای فعالیت مختلف مثل کروف DET و نمونه\u200cهای متوسط F1. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها نشان دادند که دستور پیشنهاد ما تکنیک\u200cهای سنتی را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد و می\u200cتواند دقیقاً اندازه\u200cگیری شباهت بین دو سند را بیشتر کند.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka nyaraka za riwaya zinazofanana kutokana na ufafanuzi wa tarakimu kati ya nyaraka mbili. Hatua ya pendekezo inachukua makubaliano yote yaliyopo katika nyaraka na uhusiano kati yao. Kwa kuwakilisha kila nyaraka kama picha ya maneno, tunaweza kuunda mahusiano haya na kisha kuamua jinsi nyaraka hizo mbili zinavyofanana kwa kutumia vifaa vidogo vya upungufu wa barabara. Tutathmini mbinu yetu katika kazi mbili na kuilinganisha dhidi ya mbinu kadhaa za msingi kwa kutumia mbinu mbalimbali za utendaji kama vile vibonzo vya DET na vipande vya wastani wa F1. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti mbalimbali za taarifa yalionyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa zinafanya mbinu za kitamaduni na inaweza kupima sawa sawa zaidi kati ya nyaraka mbili.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz bir roman senediň çift sany arasynda grafik kernel definisyonyna daýanýar. Önerlenen çözümler senediň we olaryň arasyndaky baglaşyklaryň hem şartlaryny gowy görýär. Her senedi grafik-sözler olarak temsil edip, bu ilişkileri örnekleyebiliriz ve soňra iki sened daha kiçi-üç bir grafik kernel kullanarak tanımlayabiliriz. Biz yaklaşımızı iki görevde değerlendirip, farklı etkinlik metriklerini kullanarak birkaç temel yaklaşımlara karşılaştırıyoruz. Örneğin DET kurşları ve macro-ortalama F1 noktası gibi. Araşdyrylyk netijeleri birnäçe veri setirlerinde görkezilýän ýagdaýymyz däpli tekniklerden çykarýar we iki sened arasynyň meňzeşligini dogry ölçüp biler.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ በሁለት ዓይነት ሰነዶች መካከል ካለው የግራፍ አረንጓል በማስተካከል የተመሳሳይ የሰነድ አካል እናቀርባለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው መስኮት በሰነዳዎች እና በመካከላቸው ግንኙነት ውስጥ ያሉትን ግንኙነት ይጨምርበታል፡፡ ሁሉንም ሰነዱን እንደ graph-የቃላት በመምሰል፣ እነዚህን ግንኙነት ማሳየት እናስችላለን እና በኋላም እንደዚህ ያሉ ሁለት ሰነዶች እንዴት እንደሆኑ በመጠቀም አነስተዋል፡፡ በሁለት ስራ ላይ ሥቃናችንን እናስተዋልታለን እና እንደDET መስኮቶችን እና ማክሮው የF1 ነጥብ መስኮትን በመጠቀም በብዙ የድምፅ ደረጃዎችን እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ የመፈተና ፍሬዎች በሁለት ሰነዶች መካከል በሚመስል ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një masë të ngjashme të dokumentit të ri bazuar në përcaktimin e një bërthamës grafike midis çifteve dokumentesh. Masa e propozuar merr parasysh si termat e përmbajtura në dokumente si dhe marrëdhëniet midis tyre. By representing each document as a graph-of-words, we are able to model these relationships and then determine how similar two documents are by using a modified shortest-path graph kernel.  Ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në dy detyra dhe e krahasojmë atë me disa qasje bazë duke përdorur metrika të ndryshme performance të tilla si kurvat DET dhe makro-mesataren e rezultatit F1. Rezultatet eksperimentale në një gamë të të dhënave treguan se qasja jonë e propozuar ekziston më tepër se teknikat tradicionale dhe është në gjendje të matë më saktësisht ngjashmërinë midis dy dokumenteve.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր փաստաթղթի նմանության չափ, որը հիմնված է գրաֆիկական միջուկի սահմանման վրա փաստաթղթերի զույգերի միջև: Պատրաստված մեթոդը հաշվի առնում է փաստաթղթերում գտնվող բառերը և դրանց միջև կապը: Ամեն փաստաթղթի ներկայացնելով որպես բառերի գծագրի, մենք կարող ենք մոդելավորել այս հարաբերությունները և ապա որոշել, թե ինչպիսի են երկու փաստաթղթերը, օգտագործելով ամենակարճ ճանապարհի գծագրի միջուկը: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը երկու խնդիրների վրա և համեմատում ենք այն մի քանի հիմնական մոտեցումների հետ, օգտագործելով տարբեր արդյունավետության մետրիկներ, ինչպիսիք են DET կորերը և մակրոմիջին F1-գնահատականը: Տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումը գերազանցում է ավանդական տեխնիկաները և ունի ավելի ճշգրիտ չափել երկու փաստաթղթերի միջև նմանությունը:', 'bn': 'In this paper, we present a novel document similarity measure based on the definition of a graph kernel between pairs of documents.  প্রস্তাবিত পরিমাপ নথিপত্র এবং তাদের মধ্যে সম্পর্কের উভয় শর্তের বিষয়টি হিসেবে গ্রহণ করে। প্রত্যেক নথিপত্রের একটি গ্রাফ-অফ-শব্দ হিসেবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে আমরা এই সম্পর্কের মডেল করতে পারি এবং তারপর নির্ধারণ করতে পারি কি ভাবে পরিবর্তন করা  আমরা দুই কাজের উপর আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা মূল্যায়ন করি এবং বিভিন্ন প্রদর্শন মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে বেশ কয়েকটি বেসেলাইনের মাধ্যমে তুলনা করি। বেশ কিছু তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখিয়েছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ঐতিহ্যবাহী প্রযুক্তি প্রযুক্তি প্রদর্শন করে এবং দুই নথ', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons stel 'n roman dokument gelykbaarheid maat gebaseer op die definisie van 'n graaf kernel tussen paar dokumente. Die voorgestelde maat neem in rekening beide die bepalings wat in die dokumente en die verhouding tussen hulle bevat is. Deur elke dokument as 'n graf-van-woorde te verteenwoordig, kan ons hierdie verwantings model en dan bepaal hoe vergelykbare twee dokumente is deur 'n verander kortste- pad graf kernel te gebruik. Ons evalueer ons toegang op twee opdragte en vergelyk dit teen verskeie basisline toegang met verskeie prestasie metries soos DET kurves en makro-gemiddelde F1-score. Eksperimentale resultate op 'n reek datastel het vertoon dat ons voorgestelde toegang tradisionele teknike uitvoer en is in staat om meer presies die gelykenis tussen twee dokumente te maak.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, bir yeni döküm kimiliğini belə göstəririk ki, çift belədir arasında grafik kernel tanımlamasına dayanılır. Önüllü ölçüdə belə yazılmış və aralarındakı ilişkiler barəsindəki şartları da hesablayır. Hər dökümü graf-sözlər kimi təsdiqləyib, bu bağlantıları modellə edə bilərik və sonra müəyyən edilən ən qısa yol grafı kernel ilə müəyyən edilən iki dökümə nə qədər bənzər olduğunu belə təsdiqləyib edə bilərik. Biz tərəfimizi iki iş ilə değerləşdiririk və buna DET körpələri və makro-ortalama F1 nöqtəsi kimi müxtəlif performans metrikləri ilə müqayisədə çəkiririk. Bir çox verilən qurğularda təcrübə sonuçları təcrübə etdiyimiz təcrübələrimiz nəticəli tekniklərdən üstün olduğunu göstərdi və iki belədir arasında daha doğru ölçüyə bilər.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu mjeru sličnosti dokumenta na temelju definicije grafičkog kernel između parova dokumenta. Predložena mjera uzima u obzir i uslove sadržane u dokumentima i odnosima između njih. Predstavljajući svaki dokument kao graf-riječi, možemo modelirati te veze i onda utvrditi koliko su slične dvije dokumente koristeći modificirani graf najkraći put. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na dva zadatka i uspoređujemo ga s nekoliko početnih pristupa koristeći različite mjere učinkovitosti kao što su DET krive i makro-prosječni F1 rezultat. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nizu podataka pokazali su da naš predloženi pristup iznosi tradicionalne tehnike i može preciznije mjeriti sličnost između dva dokumenta.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nové měřítko podobnosti dokumentů založené na definici grafového jádra mezi páry dokumentů. Navrhované opatření zohledňuje jak pojmy obsažené v dokumentech, tak vztahy mezi nimi. Představením každého dokumentu jako grafu slov jsme schopni tyto vztahy modelovat a pak určit, jak podobné jsou dva dokumenty pomocí upraveného jádra grafu s nejkratší cestou. Hodnotíme náš přístup na dvou úkolech a porovnáváme ho s několika základními přístupy pomocí různých metrik výkonu, jako jsou DET křivky a makro-průměrné F1 skóre. Experimentální výsledky na řadě datových sad ukázaly, že náš navržený přístup překonává tradiční techniky a je schopen přesněji měřit podobnost mezi dvěma dokumenty.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame uudse dokumendi sarnasuse mõõtmise, mis põhineb graafilise tuuma definitsioonil dokumentide paaride vahel. Kavandatud meetmes võetakse arvesse nii dokumentides sisalduvaid tingimusi kui ka nendevahelisi seoseid. Esitades iga dokumendi sõnagraafikuna, saame neid seoseid modelleerida ja seejärel määrata, kui sarnased kaks dokumenti on, kasutades muudetud lühima tee graafiku tuuma. Hindame oma lähenemisviisi kahe ülesande puhul ja võrdleme seda mitme baasil põhineva lähenemisviisiga, kasutades erinevaid jõudlusnäitajaid, nagu DET-kõverad ja makrokeskmine F1-skoor. Mitmete andmekogumite eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitasid, et meie kavandatud lähenemisviis ületab traditsioonilisi tehnikaid ja suudab täpsemalt mõõta kahe dokumendi sarnasust.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, presentem una nova mesura de similitud basada en la definició d'un núcleu de gràfic entre parells de documents. La mesura proposada té en compte tant els termes contenuts en els documents com les relacions entre ells. Representant cada document com un gràfic de paraules, podem modelar aquestes relacions i després determinar com són dos documents semblants utilitzant un núcleu de gràfic de camí més curt modificat. Evaluam el nostre enfocament en dues tasques i el comparem amb diversos enfocaments basals utilitzant diverses mètriques de rendiment com les corbes DET i la puntuació macromitjana F1. Els resultats experimentals d'un conjunt de dades van demostrar que el nostre enfocament proposat supera les tècniques tradicionals i és capaç de mesurar amb més precisió la similitud entre dos documents.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään uusi dokumenttien samankaltaisuuden mittari, joka perustuu graafiytimen määrittelyyn dokumenttiparien välillä. Ehdotetussa toimenpiteessä otetaan huomioon sekä asiakirjoihin sisältyvät ehdot että niiden väliset suhteet. Esittämällä kunkin asiakirjan sanakaaviona pystymme mallintamaan nämä suhteet ja määrittämään, kuinka samankaltaisia kaksi asiakirjaa ovat käyttämällä muokattua lyhyimmän polun graafiytimeä. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme kahdessa tehtävässä ja vertaamme sitä useisiin peruslähestymistapoihin käyttämällä erilaisia suorituskykymittareita, kuten DET-käyriä ja makrokeskiarvoa F1-pisteitä. Kokeelliset tulokset useista aineistoista osoittivat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa ylittää perinteiset tekniikat ja pystyy mittaamaan tarkemmin kahden asiakirjan samankaltaisuutta.', 'jv': 'Nang peurén iki, kita nyibagi nggawe basa pernik kuwi nggawe geraraning nggawe karo nggawe karo nggawe tokkum. Perintah sing dipunanggé kuwi nggawe sistem sing dumadhi tanggal kuwi duluran tokkum lan babagan sing rumangsa cara Ngawe Perintah-Ngerawat saben dokumen nganggo graf-of We assessor this method on the 2 tasks and assessor it against the Rejalaké sing paling dhéwé ning akeh dataset sing ngomong nik awak dhéwé nggawe dadi wis ngerasai tékno sing dikarolaan karo ngono iso nggawe akeh sing dikarolan tambah karo dokumen sing duwé.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo novo merilo podobnosti dokumentov, ki temelji na definiciji grafičnega jedra med pari dokumentov. Predlagani ukrep upošteva pogoje iz dokumentov in razmerja med njimi. S predstavitvijo vsakega dokumenta kot graf besed lahko modeliramo te relacije in nato ugotovimo, kako podobna sta dva dokumenta z uporabo spremenjenega jedra grafičnih najkrajših poti. Naš pristop ocenjujemo pri dveh nalogah in ga primerjamo z več osnovnimi pristopi z uporabo različnih meritev zmogljivosti, kot so krivulje DET in makropovprečni rezultati F1. Eksperimentalni rezultati na naboru podatkov so pokazali, da naš predlagani pristop presega tradicionalne tehnike in je sposoben natančneje meriti podobnost med dvema dokumentoma.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מידה דומה של מסמך חדש מבוססת על הגדרה של גראפ גראפ גראפ בין זוגות מסמכים. המצע המוצע לוקח בחשבון גם את התנאים שנמצאים במסמכים וגם את היחסים ביניהם. על ידי מייצג כל מסמך כגרף של מילים, אנחנו מסוגלים לדוגמא את מערכות היחסים האלה ואז לקבוע כמה שני מסמכים דומים הם על ידי השימוש בגרף גרף במסלול הקצר ביותר שינוי. אנו מעריכים את הגישה שלנו בשני משימות ושוואים אותה עם מספר גישות בסיסיות באמצעות מטריות ביצועים שונות כמו קווי DET ומוצע F1 מקרו-ממוצע. תוצאות ניסיוניות על מגוון של קבוצות נתונים הראו שהגישה המוצעת שלנו מתגברת על טכניקות מסורתיות והיא מסוגלת למדוד בדיוק יותר את הדמיון בין שני מסמכים.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardar, Munã bãyar da wani takardar aiki da ke daidaita, a kan ƙayyade wani kernel na grafi tsakanin takardun duk biyu. Kima da aka sake shi yana bincike da ƙaddara biyu wanda yake cikin takardan takardar, da dangantaka da tsakaninsu. By representing each document as a graph-of-words, we are able to model these relationships and then determine how similar two documents are by using a modified shortest-path graph kernel.  Mu ƙaddara hanyoyinmu a kan aikin biyu kuma mu samã shi a kan kowanta hanyoyin bakwai masu amfani da wasu mitori na fassarar aiki kamar curve na DAT da ma'abũcin F1. Matarinta na jarrabi a cikin wasu masu tsari na bayani ya nuna cewa hanyoyinmu da ake buƙata, yana iya iya ƙayyade kowancin da ke daidaita tsakanin takardar biyu.", 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་ཡོད་པ་དང་། འཆར་ཟིན་པའི་ཚད་ལ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག By representing each document as a graph-of-words, we are able to model these relationships and then determine how similar two documents are by using a modified shortest-path graph kernel. We evaluate our approach on two tasks and compare it against several baseline approaches using various performance metrics such as DET curves and macro-average F1-score. Experimental results on a range of datasets show that our proposed approach outperforms traditional techniques and is capable of measuring more accurately the similarity of two documents.'}
{'en': 'Adapting Topic Models using Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'ar': 'تكييف نماذج الموضوعات باستخدام الارتباطات المعجمية مع Tree Priors', 'es': 'Adaptación de modelos temáticos mediante asociaciones léxicas con tres antecedentes', 'fr': "Adaptation de modèles thématiques à l'aide d'associations lexicales avec des arborescences", 'pt': 'Adaptando Modelos de Tópicos Usando Associações Lexicais com Árvores Prioritárias', 'ja': 'トピックモデルをツリーの前歴との語彙的関連付けを使用して適応させる', 'zh': '用词法关联与树先验调正主题模形', 'hi': 'ट्री Priors के साथ लेक्सिकल एसोसिएशनों का उपयोग कर विषय मॉडल अनुकूलन', 'ru': 'Адаптация тематических моделей с использованием лексических ассоциаций с деревьями-приорами', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Topaicí a Chur in Oiriúint ag úsáid Cumainn fhoclóra le Priors Crann', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή Θεματικών Μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας Λεξικές Συνδέσεις με Δενδρόπους', 'hu': 'Téma modellek adaptálása Lexikai társulások használatával Tree Priors', 'kk': 'Нақыштар үлгілерін бұтақ алдыңғылармен лексикалық қатынастарды қолдану', 'it': 'Adattare modelli di argomenti utilizzando associazioni lessicali con Tree Priors', 'lt': 'Teminių modelių pritaikymas naudojant Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണങ്ങള്\u200d വൃക്ഷപ്രഭുക്കന്മാരോടൊപ്പം ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള പ്രമേയ മോഡ', 'mt': 'L-adattament tal-Mudelli Tematiċi bl-użu ta’ Assoċjazzjonijiet Lessiċi ma’ Tree Priors', 'ms': 'Menyesuaikan Model Topik menggunakan Persatuan Leksikal dengan Sebelumnya Pohon', 'mn': 'Загварын загварын загваруудыг модны өмнөх холбоотой', 'pl': 'Dostosowywanie modeli tematycznych przy użyciu stowarzyszeń leksykalnych z przewodnikami drzew', 'no': 'Tilpass emnemodular med leksiske tilknytingar med tre- prioriter', 'ro': 'Adaptarea modelelor de subiect utilizând asocieri lexicale cu priorități copaci', 'sr': 'Prilagođenje temskih modela koristeći leksičke asocijacije sa drvećem prioritetom', 'so': 'Adapting Topic Models using Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකාල් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරධාන වර්ගය සමග ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Anpassa ämnesmodeller med hjälp av Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'درخت قبریس کے ساتھ لکسیکل اتصال کے استعمال سے موضوع موڈل اڈیٹ کیے جاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chỉnh sửa các kiểu Topic bằng các tổ hợp môi trường với bậc cây', 'da': 'Tilpasning af emnemodeller ved hjælp af Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'nl': 'Aanpassen van topic modellen met behulp van Lexische associaties met boompriors', 'hr': 'Prilagoditi modele teme koristeći leksičke udruženje s drvetom', 'de': 'Anpassung von Themenmodellen mithilfe von Lexika-Assoziationen mit Baumprioren', 'bg': 'Адаптиране на тематични модели, използващи лексикални асоциации с дървета Приори', 'ko': '어휘 관련 및 트리 우선 조정 테마 모델 사용하기', 'fa': 'Adapting Topic Models using Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'id': 'Adaptasi Model Topik menggunakan Asosiasi Lexik dengan Pertama Pohon', 'sw': 'Kuupa upya Modeli za Madagaska kwa kutumia Chama cha Lexico na Vitu', 'tr': 'Meýdançalar', 'af': 'Aanpasser onderwerp Modelle gebruik Leksiese Associations met Boom Priore', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Adapting Topic Models using Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'sq': 'Adaptimi i modeleve tematike duke përdorur Shoqatat Leksike me Paraardhësit e Pemës', 'bn': 'ট্রি প্রধান সহযোগে লেক্সিকাল সংস্থা ব্যবহার করে বিষয় মডেল আপডেট করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Přizpůsobení tématických modelů pomocí Lexických asociací se stromovými priory', 'az': 'Ańüa√ß √Ėncelikl…ôri il…ô Leksik ńįŇükil…ôri istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk Mevzu Modell…ôrini AdlandńĪrmaq', 'bs': 'Prilagoditi modele teme koristeći leksičke asocijacije sa drvećem prioritetom', 'ca': 'Adaptar models tòpics utilitzant associacions lècsiques amb Tree Priors', 'et': 'Teemamudelite kohandamine, kasutades leksiaalseid seoseid puuvanematega', 'fi': 'Aihemallien mukauttaminen Lexical Associations with Tree Priors', 'jv': 'Nambah model Temik', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje tematskih modelov z uporabo leksičnih povezav z drevesnimi priorji', 'he': 'מתאים מודלים נושאים באמצעות קשרים לקסיים עם עץ קודמות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྡོང་བོའི་དབྱིབས་མཐོང་བྱེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Models work best when they are optimized taking into account the evaluation criteria that people care about. For topic models, people often care about interpretability, which can be approximated using measures of lexical association. We integrate lexical association into topic optimization using tree priors, which provide a flexible framework that can take advantage of both first order word associations and the higher-order associations captured by word embeddings. Tree priors improve topic interpretability without hurting extrinsic performance.', 'es': 'Los modelos funcionan mejor cuando se optimizan teniendo en cuenta los criterios de evaluación que preocupan a las personas. Para los modelos temáticos, las personas a menudo se preocupan por la interpretabilidad, que se puede aproximar mediante medidas de asociación léxica. Integramos la asociación léxica en la optimización de temas utilizando tres antecedentes, que proporcionan un marco flexible que puede aprovechar tanto las asociaciones de palabras de primer orden como las asociaciones de orden superior capturadas por la incrustación de palabras. Tres antecedentes mejoran la interpretabilidad del tema sin perjudicar el rendimiento extrínseco.', 'pt': 'Os modelos funcionam melhor quando são otimizados levando em consideração os critérios de avaliação com os quais as pessoas se preocupam. Para modelos de tópicos, as pessoas geralmente se preocupam com a interpretabilidade, que pode ser aproximada usando medidas de associação lexical. Integramos a associação lexical na otimização de tópicos usando prioris de árvore, que fornecem uma estrutura flexível que pode tirar proveito tanto das associações de palavras de primeira ordem quanto das associações de ordem superior capturadas por embeddings de palavras. Árvores prioritárias melhoram a interpretabilidade do tópico sem prejudicar o desempenho extrínseco.', 'fr': "Les modèles fonctionnent mieux lorsqu'ils sont optimisés en tenant compte des critères d'évaluation qui intéressent les personnes. Pour les modèles thématiques, les gens se soucient souvent de l'interprétabilité, qui peut être approximée à l'aide de mesures d'association lexicale. Nous intégrons l'association lexicale dans l'optimisation des sujets à l'aide de l'arborescence priors, qui fournit un cadre flexible qui peut tirer parti à la fois des associations de mots de premier ordre et des associations d'ordre supérieur capturées par les intégrations de mots. Les trois antécédents améliorent l'interprétabilité des sujets sans nuire aux performances extrinsèques.", 'ar': 'تعمل النماذج بشكل أفضل عندما يتم تحسينها مع مراعاة معايير التقييم التي يهتم بها الناس. بالنسبة لنماذج الموضوعات ، غالبًا ما يهتم الأشخاص بقابلية التفسير ، والتي يمكن تقريبها باستخدام مقاييس الارتباط المعجمي. نقوم بدمج الارتباط المعجمي في تحسين الموضوع باستخدام أدوات مقدمة الشجرة ، والتي توفر إطارًا مرنًا يمكن أن يستفيد من كل من ارتباطات الكلمات من الدرجة الأولى والجمعيات ذات الترتيب الأعلى التي تم التقاطها بواسطة تضمين الكلمات. تعمل مقدمات الشجرة على تحسين إمكانية تفسير الموضوع دون الإضرار بالأداء الخارجي.', 'ja': 'モデルは、人々が関心を持つ評価基準を考慮して最適化された場合に最も効果的です。トピックモデルの場合、人々はしばしば解釈可能性に関心を持ちます。これは、語彙的関連性の尺度を使用して近似することができます。私たちは、木の前置詞を使用してトピック最適化に語彙的な関連付けを統合します。これは、一階の単語の関連付けと、単語の埋め込みによって取り込まれる高次の関連付けの両方を利用できる柔軟なフレームワークを提供します。ツリー前科は、外因性のパフォーマンスを損なうことなく、トピックの解釈性を向上させます。', 'zh': '凡模者,优化之以至效也。 其于大体,人常忧可解释性,此可以词汇度量近之也。 用树先验将词法关联集成主题优化中,树先验给了一个灵活的框架,可以一阶词关联和词嵌入高阶关联。 树先验于不损外于性能者,崇其可解释性也。', 'ru': 'Модели работают лучше всего, когда они оптимизированы с учетом критериев оценки, которые заботятся о людях. Для тематических моделей люди часто заботятся о интерпретируемости, которая может быть аппроксимирована с помощью мер лексической ассоциации. Мы интегрируем лексическую ассоциацию в оптимизацию тем с помощью древовидных приводов, которые обеспечивают гибкую структуру, которая может использовать преимущества как ассоциаций слов первого порядка, так и ассоциаций более высокого порядка, захваченных вложениями слов. Древовидные притчи улучшают интерпретируемость темы, не ухудшая внешнюю производительность.', 'hi': 'मॉडल सबसे अच्छा काम करते हैं जब उन्हें मूल्यांकन मानदंडों को ध्यान में रखते हुए अनुकूलित किया जाता है जो लोग परवाह करते हैं। विषय मॉडल के लिए, लोग अक्सर व्याख्याक्षमता के बारे में परवाह करते हैं, जिसे लेक्सिकल एसोसिएशन के उपायों का उपयोग करके अनुमानित किया जा सकता है। हम पेड़ priors का उपयोग कर विषय अनुकूलन में lexical एसोसिएशन एकीकृत, जो एक लचीला ढांचा है कि दोनों पहले आदेश शब्द संघों और शब्द embeddings द्वारा कब्जा कर लिया उच्च क्रम संघों का लाभ ले सकते हैं प्रदान करते हैं. ट्री priors बाहरी प्रदर्शन को चोट पहुंचाए बिना विषय interpretability में सुधार.', 'ga': 'Is fearr a n-oibríonn samhlacha nuair a dhéantar iad a bharrfheabhsú, ag cur san áireamh na critéir mheastóireachta is cúram do dhaoine. Maidir le samhlacha topaicí, is minic go mbíonn daoine faoi chúram inléirmhínithe, ar féidir iad a chomhfhogasú trí úsáid a bhaint as bearta comhlachais foclóireachta. Déanaimid comhlachas foclóireachta a chomhtháthú le barrfheabhsú topaicí ag baint úsáide as tosaíochtaí crann, a sholáthraíonn creat solúbtha a fhéadfaidh leas a bhaint as comhlachais focal céadoird agus as na cumainn ardoird a ghabhann le leabaithe focal. Feabhsaíonn tosaíochtaí crann inléirmhíniú topaicí gan dochar a dhéanamh d’fheidhmíocht eistreach.', 'hu': 'A modellek akkor működnek a legjobban, ha optimalizálják azokat az értékelési kritériumokat, amelyekkel az emberek törődnek. A témaköri modellek esetében az emberek gyakran törődnek az értelmezhetőséggel, amely a lexikai asszociáció méréseivel közelíthető meg. A lexikális asszociációt a témaoptimalizálásba integráljuk fa priorok segítségével, amelyek rugalmas keretet biztosítanak, amely mind az elsőrendű szóasszociációkat, mind a szóbeágyazások által rögzített magasabbrendű asszociációkat kihasználhatja. A fa prioritások javítják a témák értelmezhetőségét anélkül, hogy károsítanák a külső teljesítményt.', 'ka': 'მოდელები მუშაობს, როდესაც ისინი ოპტიმიზებულიან, როდესაც ადამიანები დაინახლობენ განსაზღვრების კრიტერიების შესახებ. ტემების მოდელებისთვის, ადამიანები ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც შეიძლება იყოს ლექსიკალური აზოციაციის მიზეზით. ჩვენ ლექსიკალური აციოციაციაციას ტემების ოპტიმიზაციაში ინტერგურაცით, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან ფრამიზაცია, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოიყენოთ პირველი სიტყვების აციოციაციაციაციაციაციაცი ეყპგჲრჲ ოპვეთ ეყპგჲრჲ ოჲ-ეჲბპვ ვ რვოკარა თნრვპოთრთპამჲჟრ, ბვჱ ეა ნაპანწ ეყპგჲრჲ ოპაგთლნჲჟრ.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα λειτουργούν καλύτερα όταν βελτιστοποιούνται λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τα κριτήρια αξιολόγησης για τα οποία νοιάζονται οι άνθρωποι. Για τα μοντέλα θεμάτων, οι άνθρωποι συχνά ενδιαφέρονται για την ερμηνεία, η οποία μπορεί να προσεγγιστεί χρησιμοποιώντας μέτρα λεξικής συσχέτισης. Ενσωματώνουμε τη λεξική συσχέτιση στη βελτιστοποίηση θεμάτων χρησιμοποιώντας προηγούμενα δένδρα, τα οποία παρέχουν ένα ευέλικτο πλαίσιο που μπορεί να εκμεταλλευτεί τόσο τις ενώσεις λέξεων πρώτης τάξης όσο και τις ενώσεις ανώτερης τάξης που συλλαμβάνονται από ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Τα προηγούμενα δέντρα βελτιώνουν την ερμηνεία του θέματος χωρίς να βλάπτουν την εξωτερική απόδοση.', 'it': "I modelli funzionano meglio quando sono ottimizzati tenendo conto dei criteri di valutazione a cui le persone tengono. Per i modelli tematici, le persone spesso si preoccupano dell'interpretabilità, che può essere approssimata utilizzando misure di associazione lessicale. Integriamo l'associazione lessicale nell'ottimizzazione degli argomenti utilizzando i priori ad albero, che forniscono un framework flessibile che può sfruttare sia le associazioni di parole di primo ordine che le associazioni di ordine superiore catturate dalle incorporazioni di parole. I precedenti ad albero migliorano l'interpretabilità degli argomenti senza danneggiare le prestazioni estrinseche.", 'kk': 'Үлгілер адамдардың оқиғаларының бағалау критериясын есептеу үшін оқиғаларының ең жақсы жұмыс істейді. Нақыштар үлгілері үшін, адамдар көпшілік түсініктерді қалайды. Бұл лексикалық қосымша мәліметтерді қолдануға болады. Біз лексикалық құрылымызды нақыштардың оптимизациясына біріктіреміз. Бұл бірінші реттік сөз құрылымының және сөз ендіру арқылы алғашқы реттік құрылымының артықшылығын қолдануға болады. Бұтақ алдындағылар нақыштың түсініктемесін сыртқы істеу арқылы өзгертеді.', 'lt': 'Models work best when they are optimized taking into account the evaluation criteria that people care about.  Teminių modelių atveju žmonės dažnai rūpi aiškinamumu, kuris gali būti suderintas taikant leksinės asociacijos priemones. Mes įtraukiame lexinę asociaciją į teminę optimizaciją naudojant medžio priešpriešinius elementus, kurie suteikia lanksčią sistemą, kuri gali pasinaudoti ir pirmosios eilės žodžių asociacijomis, ir aukštesnės eilės asociacijomis, gautomis žodžių įterpimo būdu. Išankstiniai medžiai pagerina teminį aiškinimą nepažeidžiant išorinių rezultatų.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് ആലോചിക്കുന്ന വിലയ്ക്കുറിച്ച് കണക്കാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കും. പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക്, ആളുകള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും വ്യാഖ്യാനം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ആലോചിക്കുന്നു. അത്  ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സങ്കേതം മുമ്പുള്ള വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിലേക്ക് നാം ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നു. അത് ആ പ്രധാന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വേദനിപ്പിക്കാതെ മരത്തിന് മുന്\u200dപ് വ്യക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dപ്', 'ms': 'Models work best when they are optimized taking into account the evaluation criteria that people care about.  Untuk model topik, orang sering peduli tentang keterlaluan, yang boleh diharapkan menggunakan ukuran persekutuan leksikal. Kami mengintegrasikan persekutuan leksikal ke dalam optimasi topik menggunakan latar depan pepohon, yang menyediakan kerangka fleksibel yang boleh mengambil keuntungan dari kedua-dua persekutuan perkataan tertib pertama dan persekutuan tertib-tinggi yang ditangkap oleh pelengkapan perkataan. Pertama pokok memperbaiki interpretabiliti topik tanpa menyakiti prestasi luar.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli jaħdmu bl-aħjar mod meta jiġu ottimizzati filwaqt li jitqiesu l-kriterji ta’ evalwazzjoni li n-nies jieħdu ħsiebhom. Għall-mudelli tematiċi, in-nies spiss jieħdu ħsieb l-interpretabbiltà, li tista’ tiġi approssimatizzata bl-użu ta’ miżuri ta’ assoċjazzjoni lexika. Aħna nintegraw l-assoċjazzjoni lexika fl-ottimizzazzjoni tas-suġġett bl-użu ta’ tree priors, li jipprovdu qafas flessibbli li jista’ jieħu vantaġġ kemm mill-assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kelma tal-ewwel ordni kif ukoll mill-assoċjazzjonijiet ta’ ordni ogħla maqbuda mill-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelma. Il-prijoritajiet tas-siġar itejbu l-interpretabilità tas-suġġett mingħajr ma jagħmlu ħsara lill-prestazzjoni esterna.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн сонирхолтой дүгнэлтийн шаардлагатай шаардлагатай үед загварууд хамгийн сайн ажилладаг. Судалгааны загваруудын тулд хүмүүс ихэвчлэн илтгэлцэх чадварыг анхаардаг. Энэ нь лексикийн холбоотой хэмжээсүүдийг ашиглан ойролцох боломжтой. Бид лексикийн холбоотой сэдэв дээрх сайхан сэдэв рүү нэгтгэдэг. Энэ нь анхны дараагийн үг холбоотой холбоотой болон үг холбоотой өндөр дараагийн холбоотой холбоотой байгууллагуудыг ашиглаж чадна. Мөн модны өмнөх нь сурагчдын тухай ярьж чаддаггүй байдлыг сайжруулдаг.', 'pl': 'Modele działają najlepiej, gdy są zoptymalizowane z uwzględnieniem kryteriów oceny, na których ludzie dbają. W przypadku modeli tematycznych ludzie często dbają o interpretację, którą można przybliżyć za pomocą miar skojarzenia leksykalnego. Integrujemy skojarzenia leksykalne do optymalizacji tematów za pomocą priorów drzew, które zapewniają elastyczne ramy, które mogą wykorzystać zarówno skojarzenia słów pierwszego rzędu, jak i skojarzenia wyższego rzędu uchwycone przez osadzenia słów. Drzewa poprawiają interpretowalność tematu bez uszczerbku wydajności zewnętrznej.', 'no': 'Modellar fungerer best når dei vert optimaliserte ved å ta opp i bruk av evalueringskriteriene folk bryr på. For temamodeller bryr folk ofte om tolkingsbehandling, som kan bli omtrent med tiltak til leksiske tilknyting. Vi integrerer leksisk assosiasjon til optimalisering av tema ved å bruka tre førre, som tilbyr ein fleksibel rammeverk som kan bruka både første rekkefølgje for ordassosiasjonar og dei høgare rekkefølgja assosiasjonane som er henta av ordinnbygging. Tre førre forbedrar uttolkingsbehandling av emne utan å skade ekstrinske utføringar.', 'ro': 'Modelele funcționează cel mai bine atunci când sunt optimizate ținând cont de criteriile de evaluare de care oamenii le pasă. Pentru modelele tematice, oamenilor le pasă adesea de interpretabilitate, care poate fi aproximativă folosind măsuri de asociere lexicală. Integrăm asocierea lexicală în optimizarea subiectelor folosind priorități arbore, care oferă un cadru flexibil care poate profita atât de asocierile de cuvinte de primă ordine, cât și de asocierile de ordine superioară capturate de încorporarea cuvintelor. Prioritățile copacilor îmbunătățesc interpretabilitatea subiectelor fără a afecta performanța extrinsă.', 'mk': 'Моделите работат најдобро кога се оптимизирани со оглед на критериумите за проценка за кои луѓето се грижат. За темските модели, луѓето честопати се грижат за интерпретабилноста, која може да се приближи користејќи мерки на лексичка асоцијација. Ние интегрираме лексикално асоцијација во оптимизацијата на темата користејќи ги предходните дрвја, кои обезбедуваат флексибилна рамка која може да ги искористи и асоцијациите на прв ред и асоцијациите на повисок ред зафатени со вложување на зборови. Претходните дрвја ја подобруваат интерпретабилноста на темата без да ја повредат надворешната изведба.', 'sr': 'Modeli najbolje rade kada se optimizuju uzimajući u obzir kriterije procjene o kojima ljudi brinu. Za modele teme, ljudi često brinu o interpretabilnosti, što se može približiti koristeći mjere leksičke asocijacije. Integrujemo leksičku asocijaciju u optimizaciju teme koristeći drveće pre nego što pruža fleksibilni okvir koji može iskoristiti i prve redne asocijacije riječi i veće redne asocijacije koje su uhvaćene rečenicima. Prijatelji drveta poboljšavaju interpretabilnost teme bez povrede ekstrinskog izvođenja.', 'so': 'Modelooyinka ayaa si wanaagsan u shaqeeya marka loo tixgeliyo qiimeynta qiimeynta dadku ay ka xanaaneeyaan. Tusaale ahaan mada waxaa inta badan dadku u baahan yihiin turjubaanka, kaas oo lagu isticmaali karo qiyaastii urur leksikal ah. We integrate lexical association into topic optimization using tree priors, which provide a flexible framework that can take advantage of both first order word associations and the higher-order associations captured by word embeddings.  Geedka waxaa horumarinaya inuu kordhiso turjubaanka mada iyadoon waxyeeleyn tababarka dibadda.', 'sv': 'Modeller fungerar bäst när de optimeras med hänsyn till de utvärderingskriterier som människor bryr sig om. För ämnesmodeller bryr sig människor ofta om tolkning, som kan ungefäras med hjälp av mått av lexikal association. Vi integrerar lexikala associationer i ämnesoptimering med hjälp av tree priors, vilket ger ett flexibelt ramverk som kan dra nytta av både ordassociationer i första ordningen och de associationer i högre ordning som fångas av ordinbäddningar. Trädprior förbättrar ämnestolkningen utan att skada yttre prestanda.', 'ta': 'மாதிரிகள் சிறந்த வேலை செய்யும் போது அவர்கள் முன்னிருப்பார்கள் மக்கள் கவலைப்படுகிறார் தலைப்பு மாதிரிகளுக்கு, மக்கள் பெரும்பாலும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பற்றி கவலைப்படுகிறார் நாம் முன்னுரிமையை பயன்படுத்தி லெக்சிக்சியல் இணைப்பு தலைப்பு முன்னுரிமையாக ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறோம், அது ஒரு flexible சட்டத்தை வழங்கும், முதல் வரிசை வ முன்னுரிமை தலைப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பை மேம்படுத்துகிறது வெளியீட்டு செயல்பாட்டின் செயல்பாட்ட', 'ur': 'Models work best when they are optimized taking into account the evaluation criteria that people care about. ٹوپ موڈل کے لئے، لوگوں کو اغلب تعبیر کے بارے میں اچھی طرح محبت کرتا ہے، جو لکسیکل اتحادیہ کے مطابق مطابق محبت کر سکتا ہے. ہم لکسیکل اتصال کو توسط اچھی طریقہ سے پہلے درخت کے مطابق اتصال کر رہے ہیں، جو ایک مضبوط فرم دیتا ہے جو پہلی اوردن کلمات اتصال اور کلمات انڈینگ کے مطابق اچھی اوردن اتصال کو فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے. درخت سے پہلے موضوع کا تفسیر قابل تفسیر اضافہ نہیں کرتا۔', 'si': 'මොඩල් හොඳම වැඩ කරනවා ඔවුන් හොඳම වැඩ කරනවා මිනිස්සු ගැන බලාපොරොත්තු විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා. මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන්, මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන බල අපි ලෙක්සිකල් සම්බන්ධ විදියට විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒකෙන් වර්ගය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් පළ විදියට ප්\u200dරධාන වර්ගයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'uz': "Modellar qo'llanmalar haqida qiymatning qiymatlarini hisoblash mumkin. Mavzu modellari uchun odamlar ko'pincha tarjima qilish haqida o'ylashadi. Bu leksikal aloqalarni foydalanish mumkin. Leksikal aloqani topilmoqchi daraxt oldini ishlatish uchun birlashtiramiz. Bu so'zlarning birinchi taklif soʻzlar bilan birinchi so'zlar bog'liqlaridan foydalanishi mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Chế độ làm việc tốt nhất khi chúng được nâng cấp cẩn thận để cân nhắc các tiêu chuẩn đánh giá mà người ta quan tâm. Đối với các mô hình chủ đề, người ta thường quan tâm về thể dịch, có thể thích nghi hơn bằng cách dùng các biện pháp ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi hòa nhập ngôn ngữ văn học vào việc khai thác các chủ đề bằng ưu tiên cây, cung cấp một cơ sở linh hoạt, có thể sử dụng cả hệ thống ngôn ngữ thứ nhất và các tổ chức cao cấp được ghi nhận bởi sự nhúng tay từ. Kỷ lục cây cải thiện diễn giải về chủ đề mà không làm tổn thương năng lực.', 'bg': 'Моделите работят най-добре, когато са оптимизирани, като се вземат предвид критериите за оценка, за които хората се интересуват. За тематичните модели хората често се интересуват от интерпретацията, която може да бъде приблизителна с помощта на мерки за лексикална асоциация. Ние интегрираме лексикалната асоциация в оптимизацията на темата, като използваме три предишни, които осигуряват гъвкава рамка, която може да се възползва както от асоциациите от първи ред, така и асоциациите от по-висок ред, уловени от вграждането на думи. Дървесните приоритети подобряват интерпретацията на темата, без да навредят на външното представяне.', 'hr': 'Modeli najbolje rade kada se optimiziraju uzimajući u obzir kriterije procjene o kojima ljudi brinu. Za modele teme, ljudi često brinu o interpretabilnosti, što se može približiti koristeći mjere leksičke asocijacije. Mi integriramo leksičku asocijaciju u optimizaciju teme koristeći prije drveta, koji pruža fleksibilni okvir koji može iskoristiti i prvu redovnu asocijaciju riječi i veće redovne asocijacije koje su uhvaćene riječima. Prije drveta poboljšavaju interpretabilnost teme bez povrede ekstrintičkog učinka.', 'da': 'Modeller fungerer bedst, når de er optimeret under hensyntagen til de evalueringskriterier, som folk holder af. For emnemodeller bekymrer folk sig ofte om fortolkning, som kan tilnærmes ved hjælp af målinger af leksikalsk association. Vi integrerer leksikalsk association i emneoptimering ved hjælp af tree priors, som giver en fleksibel ramme, der kan drage fordel af både førsteordens ordassociationer og højere ordens associationer fanget af ord indlejringer. Træforudsætninger forbedrer emnets fortolkningsevne uden at skade ekstern ydeevne.', 'nl': 'Modellen werken het beste als ze geoptimaliseerd zijn, rekening houdend met de evaluatiecriteria waar mensen om geven. Voor topic modellen geven mensen vaak om interpreteerbaarheid, die kan worden benaderd met behulp van maatstaven van lexicale associatie. We integreren lexicale associaties in topic optimalisatie met behulp van tree priors, die een flexibel kader bieden dat kan profiteren van zowel eerste orde woordassociaties als hogere orde associaties vastgelegd door woord embeddings. Boompriors verbeteren de interpreteerbaarheid van onderwerpen zonder afbreuk te doen aan extrinsieke prestaties.', 'de': 'Modelle funktionieren am besten, wenn sie unter Berücksichtigung der Bewertungskriterien optimiert werden, die den Menschen wichtig sind. Bei Themenmodellen geht es den Menschen oft um Interpretierbarkeit, die mit Maßen der lexikalischen Assoziation approximiert werden kann. Wir integrieren lexikalische Assoziationen in die Themenoptimierung mithilfe von Tree Priors, die ein flexibles Framework bieten, das sowohl Wortassoziationen erster Ordnung als auch Assoziationen höherer Ordnung, die durch Worteinbettungen erfasst werden, nutzen kann. Tree Priors verbessern die Interpretierbarkeit von Themen, ohne die extrinsische Leistung zu beeinträchtigen.', 'fa': 'Models work best when they are optimized taking into account the evaluation criteria that people care about. برای مدل\u200cهای موضوع، مردم اغلب به تعبیر قابلیت اهمیت می\u200cدهند، که می\u200cتوانند با استفاده از اندازه\u200cهای ارتباط زبان\u200cشناسی محدود شوند. ما با استفاده از پیشینیان درخت، اتحادیه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی را به بهترین عنوان موضوع متصل می\u200cکنیم، که یک چهارچوب flexible را می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند از اتحادیه\u200cهای اولین دستور و اتحادیه\u200cهای اولین دستور و اتحادیه\u200cهای بالاتر که تو پیشینیان درخت، قابلیت تفسیر موضوع را بدون آسیب به عملکرد خارجی بهتر می کند.', 'ko': '모델은 사람들의 관심을 고려한 평가 기준을 고려할 때 최적화할 때 효과가 가장 좋다.주제 모델에 대해 사람들은 일반적으로 해석 가능성에 관심을 가지는데 이것은 어휘 연상의 도량을 통해 비슷할 수 있다.우리는 트리 테스트를 사용하여 어휘 관련을 주제 최적화에 통합시켰다. 이것은 유연한 구조를 제공하여 1단계 단어 관련과 단어 삽입 포획의 고급 관련을 이용할 수 있다.트리 우선 순위는 외부 성능에 영향을 주지 않는 상황에서 주제의 해석성을 높일 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Adamlar gözleýän deňlenme kriterilerini göz önüne almak üçin nusgalar gowy işleýär. Topat nusgalary üçin adamlar köplenç terjime edip bilýärler we bu nusgalary leksiýa guralýar. Biz leksiýa birleşmeleri agaç öňünden ullanýan meýdançasyna üýtget edýäris. Bu ýerde fleksible bir çerädçi bolup bilen ilkinji рет söz birleşmeleriniň we söz ekleýän ýokary düzümlerniň fayda ýetirebilir. Ağaç öňündeki meýdançalary çykyş edip bolmadyk meýdançalary gowylaşdyrýar.', 'id': 'Model bekerja terbaik ketika mereka optimisasi mempertimbangkan kriteria evaluasi yang orang peduli. Untuk model topik, orang sering peduli tentang interpretabilitas, yang dapat didekati menggunakan ukuran asosiasi leksik. Kami mengintegrasikan asosiasi leksik ke optimisasi topik menggunakan prior pohon, yang menyediakan rangka fleksibel yang dapat mengambil keuntungan dari kedua asosiasi kata perintah pertama dan asosiasi tertinggi yang ditangkap oleh pembenaman kata. Sebelumnya pohon meningkatkan interpretasi topik tanpa menyakiti prestasi luar.', 'af': "Modele werk beste wanneer hulle optimaliseer word, neem in rekening die evalueringskriteriërs waaroor mense belangrik word. Vir onderwerp-modelles is mense dikwels bekommerd oor uitleggbare verklaring, wat kan omtrent wees deur die gebruik van die maatjies van leksiese assosiasie. Ons integreer leksiese assosiasie in onderwerp optimaliseering deur boom vooraf te gebruik, wat 'n fleksibel raamwerk verskaf wat voordeel kan neem van beide eerste volgorde woord assosiasies en die hoër volgorde assosiasies wat deur woord inbettings gevang word. Boom vooraf verbeter onderwerp-uitlegging sonder om ekstrinsiese prestasie te skandeer.", 'sq': 'Modelet funksionojnë më mirë kur optimizohen duke marrë parasysh kriteret e vlerësimit për të cilët njerëzit kujdesen. Për modelet tematike, njerëzit shpesh kujdesen për interpretueshmërinë, e cila mund të përcaktohet duke përdorur masat e shoqërimit lexik. Ne integrojmë shoqërimin lexik në optimizimin e temës duke përdorur paraardhjet e pemëve, të cilat ofrojnë një kuadër fleksibel që mund të përfitojë si nga shoqërimet e fjalëve me rend të parë dhe shoqërimet me rend më të lartë të kapura nga përfshirjet e fjalëve. Paraardhësit e pemës përmirësojnë interpretueshmërinë tematike pa dëmtuar shfaqjen ekstreme.', 'am': 'ሞዴል ሰዎች የሚያደነግጡትን አካሄድ በመጠቀም በተሻለ ጊዜ የሚሠራ ነው፡፡ ለጉዳዩ ምሳሌዎች፣ ብዙ ጊዜም ሰዎች የሊክሲካዊ ማኅበረሰብ መጠቀም የሚችሉትን ትርጉም ያስባሉ፡፡ ሌክሲካዊ ማኅበረሰብ ከዛፍ አስቀድሞ በመጠቀም ለጉዳይ ማቀናቀል እናስቀራለን፡፡ የዛፍ ምርጫዎች ውጪ የውጭ ጉዳይ ሳይጎዳ ትርጉም ማድረግ ይሻላል፡፡', 'sw': 'Modeli hufanya kazi vizuri pale wanapotarajiwa kuzingatia vigezo vya uchunguzi ambavyo watu wanajali. Kwa mifano ya mada, watu mara nyingi hujali kuhusu tafsiri, ambayo inaweza kutumia hatua za jumuiya ya lexico. Tunaunganisha ushirikiano wa lexico katika maendeleo ya mada kwa kutumia miti ya awali, ambayo inatoa mfumo mzuri unaohitaji matumizi ya jumuiya za kwanza za za maneno na mashirika ya juu yaliyochukuliwa na maneno yaliyoandikwa. Mtu unaboresha ufafanuzi wa mada bila kuumiza utendaji wa nje.', 'az': 'Modellər optimizləndirildiyi zaman insanların gözlədiyi değerlendirmə kriterilərini hesablayır. Məsələn modelləri üçün insanlar çox çox təfsil edilməsi haqqında gözləyirlər, ki bu məsələlər leksik birliklərinin ölçülərini istifadə edə bilər. Əvvəlki a ğac vasitəsilə leksik bağlantısını məsələlərə optimizasiya ilə birləşdiririk ki, bu da ilk sıra söz bağlantılarından və sözlərin bağlantılarından alınan yüksək sıra bağlantılarından fayda verə bilər. Ağaç əvvəlkiləri məsələn təfsirləşdirilebilirini extrinsic performans yaratmadan daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'মোডেল যখন তাদের অপ্রাপ্ত করা হয়, তখন মূল্যের মূল্য মূল্যের মূল্যের ব্যাপারে কাজ করে। বিষয়ের মডেলের জন্য মানুষ প্রায়শই ব্যাখ্যা করে, যা লেক্সিকাল সংস্থার মাধ্যমে ব্যবহার করা যায়। আমরা লেক্সিক্সিয়াল সংযোগ বিষয়বস্তুর সুবিধানে একত্রিত করি গাছের পূর্বে ব্যবহার করে, যা একটি ফ্লিক্সিবল ফ্রেম প্রদান করে যা প্রথম আদেশের শব্দ সংস্ বিষয়টির বিষয়টির ব্যাপারে বিষয়টির ব্যাখ্যা বাড়িয়ে দেয়ার আগে তারা বিষয়টির বিষয়টির ব্যাপ', 'hy': 'Մոդելները լավագույնն են աշխատում, երբ դրանք օպտիմացվում են հաշվի առնելով մարդկանց հետաքրքրված գնահատման կանոնները: Տեմային մոդելների համար մարդիկ հաճախ մտահոգվում են թարգմանելիության մասին, որը կարելի է մոտավորել օգտագործելով լեքսիկական ասոցիայի չափումներ: Մենք ինտեգրում ենք լեքսիկական կապվածությունը թեմայի օպտիմացիա օգտագործելով ծառի նախօրինակներ, որոնք տրամադրում են ճկուն շրջանակ, որը կարող է օգտագործել նաև առաջին դասակարգ բառերի կապվածությունները, և բարձր դասակարգ կապվածություն Փառի նախադասությունները բարելավում են թեմային մեկնաբանելիությունը առանց վնասելու արտաքին արտադրողականությունը:', 'ca': "Els models funcionen millor quan s'optimizen tenint en compte els criteris d'evaluació que preocupen la gent. Per als models temàtics, la gent sovint es preocupa per l'interpretabilitat, que es pot aproximar fent servir mesures d'associació lècsica. Integrem l'associació lèxica en l'optimització del tema fent servir priors d'arbre, que proporcionen un marc flexible que pot aprofitar les associacions de paraules de primer ordre i les associacions d'ordre superior capturades per incorporació de paraules. Tree priors improve topic interpretability without hurting extrinsic performance.", 'cs': 'Modely fungují nejlépe, pokud jsou optimalizovány s ohledem na hodnotící kritéria, na kterých lidé záleží. U tématických modelů se lidé často zajímají o interpretovatelnost, kterou lze aproximovat pomocí mír lexikální asociace. Do optimalizace tématu integrujeme lexikální asociace pomocí stromových priorů, které poskytují flexibilní rámec, který může využít jak slovní asociace prvního řádu, tak asociace vyššího řádu zachycené vložením slov. Záznamy stromů zlepšují interpretovatelnost tématu bez poškození vnějšího výkonu.', 'et': 'Mudelid töötavad kõige paremini siis, kui need on optimeeritud, võttes arvesse hindamiskriteeriume, millest inimesed hoolivad. Teemamudelite puhul hoolivad inimesed sageli tõlgendatavusest, mida saab lähendada leksikaalse seose mõõtmete abil. Me integreerime leksikaalse seose teema optimeerimisse, kasutades eelkõige puusid, mis pakuvad paindlikku raamistikku, mis võimaldab ära kasutada nii esimese astme sõnasuhteid kui ka kõrgema astme seoseid, mis on kajastatud sõnaseadustega. Puude prioriteedid parandavad teemade tõlgendatavust, kahjustamata väliseid tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Mallit toimivat parhaiten, kun ne optimoidaan ottaen huomioon arviointikriteerit, joista ihmiset välittävät. Aihemalleissa ihmiset välittävät usein tulkittavuudesta, jota voidaan lähentää leksikaalisen assosiaation mittareilla. Yhdistämme sanaston yhdistämisen aihepiirin optimointiin käyttämällä puita prioriteetteja, jotka tarjoavat joustavan kehyksen, joka voi hyödyntää sekä ensimmäisen järjestyksen sanayhdistelmiä että sanaupotusten keräämiä korkeamman järjestyksen assosiaatioita. Puun prioriteetit parantavat aiheen tulkittavuutta vahingoittamatta ulkoista suorituskykyä.', 'bs': 'Modeli najbolje rade kada se optimiziraju uzimajući u obzir kriterije procjene o kojima ljudi brinu. Za modele teme, ljudi često brinu o interpretabilnosti, što se može približiti koristeći mjere leksičke asocijacije. Integrujemo leksičku asocijaciju u optimizaciju teme koristeći prije drveta, koji pruža fleksibilni okvir koji može iskoristiti i prve redne asocijacije riječi i veće redne asocijacije koje su uhvaćene riječima. Prijatelji drveta poboljšavaju interpretabilnost teme bez povrede ekstrinskog učinka.', 'jv': 'Validity Ngawe model tema, wong saé kesempaké aturan akeh tarjamahan, sing bisa gabunggo nggawe Perintah sing sampeyan luwih. Awak dhéwé éngleksi luwih akeh lan akeh operasi ning tématik dhéwé ning Awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan diwong kuwi nggawe sistem sing beraksi iki ning awak dhéwé, lan akeh langgar-alam sing apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éngleksi cara-alam sing beraksi lan tambah kuwi Awak dhéwé sing beraksi perbudhakan kanggo ngerasah tarjamahan lan ora nglarang kanggo ngerasah cara sing luwih.', 'ha': 'Modellu ke aiki mafi kyaun idan an yi amfani da su a ƙayyade kayan evaluation da wasu mutane ke kiyaye. Ga misãlai masu madaidaici, mutane ko da yawa suna tambaya wa fassarar, wanda za a iya karimci su yi amfani da tsarin mutane na leksisi. Tuna haɗa shirin leksikali zuwa madaidaici na amfani da itãcen kwance, wanda ke iya amfani da firam mai fleksibo wanda ke iya amfani da su biyu na rubutun kalmõmin da kuma asalin sarki da aka kãma su da maganar zura. Tre na gabatar da ya improve fassarar maɓallin sarrafiya ko kuma ba ya cũci fassarar na bakwai.', 'he': 'דוגמנים עובדים הכי טוב כשהם אופטימים בהתחשב בקריטריונים הערכה שאכפת לאנשים ממנה. למודלים נושאיים, לאנשים לעתים קרובות אכפת מהאפשרות לפרשנות, אשר אפשר להתקרב באמצעות מדידות של איגוד לקסי. We integrate lexical association into topic optimization using tree priors, which provide a flexible framework that can take advantage of both first order word associations and the higher-order associations captured by word embeddings.  Tree priors improve topic interpretability without hurting extrinsic performance.', 'sk': 'Modeli delujejo najbolje, ko so optimizirani ob upoštevanju meril ocenjevanja, ki jih ljudje skrbijo. Pri tematskih modelih ljudi pogosto skrbi za tolmačljivost, ki jo je mogoče približati z merili leksikalne povezave. V optimizacijo teme vključujemo leksikalno povezavo z uporabo drevesnih predhodnikov, ki zagotavljajo prilagodljiv okvir, ki lahko izkoristi tako besedne povezave prvega reda kot višjega reda povezav, zajete z vgradnjo besed. Drevesni predhodniki izboljšajo razlago teme, ne da bi škodili zunanji učinkovitosti.', 'bo': 'མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་མིག མི་མང་གིས་ཕན་ཚུལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་རྩིས་མཐུད་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་སྔོན་གྱི་རྩོད་པ་དང་མཐུན་ཚུལ སྡོང་བོའི་དབྱིབས་གྱི་དབྱིབས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནི་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Finding Patterns in Noisy Crowds : Regression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'ar': 'البحث عن الأنماط في الحشود الصاخبة: تجميع التعليقات التوضيحية المستند إلى الانحدار لبيانات التعهيد الجماعي', 'fr': "Trouver des modèles dans les foules bruyantes\xa0: agrégation d'annotations basée sur la régression pour les données crowdsourcées", 'pt': 'Encontrando padrões em multidões barulhentas: agregação de anotação baseada em regressão para dados de crowdsourcing', 'es': 'Encontrar patrones en multitudes ruidosas: agregación de anotaciones basada en regresión para datos de colaboración colectiva', 'ja': 'ノイズの多いクラウドでパターンを見つける：クラウドソーシングされたデータの回帰ベースのアノテーション集約', 'ru': 'Поиск паттернов в шумных толпах: агрегация аннотаций на основе регрессии для краудсорсинговых данных', 'hi': 'शोर भीड़ में पैटर्न ढूँढना: क्राउडसोर्स्ड डेटा के लिए प्रतिगमन-आधारित एनोटेशन एकत्रीकरण', 'zh': '于嘈杂中求模式:针众包数归注合', 'ga': 'Patrúin a Fháil i Sluaite Torann: Comhiomlánú Anótála Bunaithe ar Aischéimniú do Shonraí Sluaite', 'hu': 'Minták megtalálása zajos tömegekben: Regresszió alapú jegyzékek összesítése közösségi forrásból álló adatokhoz', 'el': 'Εύρεση προτύπων σε θορυβώδη πλήθη: Συγκέντρωση σχολίων βασισμένη στην αναδρομή για δεδομένα από πλήθος', 'it': 'Trovare modelli nelle folle rumorose: aggregazione di annotazioni basate sulla regressione per i dati crowdsourced', 'ka': 'მონაცემები ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა', 'ms': 'Mencari Corak dalam Kelompok Bunyi: Aggregasi Annotasi Berasas Regresi untuk Data Sumber Kelompok', 'kk': 'Дыбыс қабырғандағы үлгілерді табу: Регрессия негіздеген жазбалардың сәйкестігі', 'lt': 'Finding Patterns in Noisy Crowds: Regression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'ml': 'നോസി ക്രൌഡ്സില്\u200d പാത്റെര്\u200dമാര്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു: Regression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'mk': 'Finding Patterns in Noisy Crowds: Regression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'mn': 'Шүлэг хэмжээсүүд дээр дүрслэлүүдийг олох: Регрессийн үндсэн анзаарлын агрегаци Crowdsourced Data', 'no': 'Finn mønsterelementer i støykrøver: Regresjonsbasert annotasjon for Crowdsourced Data', 'pl': 'Znajdywanie wzorców w hałasowych tłumach: agregacja adnotacji oparta na regresji dla danych zaopatrzonych w tłumy społeczne', 'ro': 'Găsirea modelelor în mulțimile zgomotoase: agregarea adnotării bazată pe regresie pentru datele crowdsourced', 'sr': 'Pronađivanje uzorka u grudnim krugovima: Agregacija oznake na osnovu regresije za Crowdsourced Data', 'mt': 'Is-Sejbien ta’ Patterni f’Crowds Noisy: Aggregazzjoni ta’ Annotazzjoni bbażata fuq ir-Regressjoni għal Dejta Miġbura mill-Crowd', 'so': 'Finding Patterns in Noisy Crowds: Regression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'sv': 'Att hitta mönster i bullriga folkmassor: Regressionsbaserad noteringsaggregation för Crowdsourced Data', 'ta': 'வெறுமையான குறியீடுகளில் பாதையாளர்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க: Regression- based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced data', 'ur': 'Noisy Crowds میں پٹرونٹ لکھ رہے ہیں', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Sourced data', 'vi': 'Tìm các biểu mẫu trong đông nạn: Sự tập hợp kích thích tập hợp các dữ liệu Name', 'bg': 'Намиране на модели в шумни тълпи: агрегация на анотации въз основа на регресия за данни от множеството', 'hr': 'Pronađivanje uzorka u grčkim krugovima: Agregacija oznake na osnovu regresije za Crowdsourced Data', 'da': 'Finde mønstre i støjende crowds: Regressionsbaseret annoteringssaggregation for crowdsourcerede data', 'nl': 'Patronen vinden in lawaaierige crowds: op regressie gebaseerde annotatieaggregatie voor crowdsourced data', 'de': 'Patterns in Noisy Crowds finden: Regressionsbasierte Annotation Aggregation für Crowdsourced Daten', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن نمونه\u200cها در سرمایه\u200cهای صدایی: مجموعه\u200cسازی یادآوری بر اساس تجاوز برای داده\u200cهای Crowdsourced', 'id': 'Mencari Pattern dalam Crowd Noisy: Aggregasi Annotasi Berdasarkan Regresi untuk Data Crowdsourced', 'sw': 'Kutafuta Wazalendo katika Noisy Crowds: Utangazaji wa Taarifa inayotumiwa na ukandamizaji', 'ko': '시끄러운 사람들 속에서 패턴 찾기: 회귀된 패키지 데이터 주석 집합 기반', 'am': 'sourced Data', 'af': 'Soek Patrone in Noisy Crowds: Regresie- gebaseerde Opmerking Opmerking vir Crowdsourced Data', 'sq': 'Gjetja e modeleve në turma zhurmuese: Aggregimi i anotacioneve bazuar në regresion për të dhënat e burimeve të turmës', 'bn': 'নোইসি ক্রোডে প্যাটার্ন খুঁজে বের করা: ক্রুডসোর্স ডাটার জন্য নিয়ন্ত্রণের ভিত্তিক অ্যাঙ্গুটেশন', 'az': 'S칲p칲rl칲k K칬p칲rl칲kl톛rind톛 칬rn톛kl톛r tap캼l캼r: Reqression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'hy': 'Գտնել աղմկոտ ժողովրդի մոդելներ. ժողովրդի տվյալների ընդգրկումը', 'cs': 'Vyhledávání vzorů v hlučných davech: agregace anotací založená na regresi pro data z crowdsourcingu', 'tr': 'Golak Hatlaryň içinde örnekler tapylmak: Regresiýa-tabanly Açmak üçin Ullanyş Maglumaty', 'et': 'Mürase rahvahulga mustrite leidmine: ühisandmete regressioonipõhine annotatsioonide koondamine', 'ca': "Trobar patrons en grups ruidosos: Aggregació d'anotacions basada en la regressió", 'bs': 'Pronađivanje uzorka u grudnim krugovima: Agregacija oznake na osnovu regresije za Crowdsourced Data', 'fi': 'Kuvien etsiminen meluisissa joukkoissa: Regressioon perustuva merkintäaggregaatio joukkolähteistä peräisin oleville tiedoille', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'he': 'Finding Patterns in Noisy Crowds: Regression-based Annotation Aggregation for Crowdsourced Data', 'ha': 'Sourced Data', 'sk': 'Iskanje vzorcev v hrupnih množicah: združevanje opomb na podlagi regresije za množične podatke', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་བའི་ཚོགས་རྣམ་པ་ལ་བཙལ་དགོས། བསྡུས་བརྗོད་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labeled data quickly and inexpensively. However, crowdsourced labels are often noisier than expert-annotated data, making it difficult to aggregate them meaningfully. We present an aggregation approach that learns a regression model from crowdsourced annotations to predict aggregated labels for instances that have no expert adjudications. The predicted labels achieve a correlation of 0.594 with expert labels on our data, outperforming the best alternative aggregation method by 11.9 %. Our approach also outperforms the alternatives on third-party datasets.', 'ar': 'يوفر التعهيد الجماعي وسيلة ملائمة للحصول على البيانات المصنفة بسرعة وبتكلفة زهيدة. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما تكون التسميات التي يتم الاستعانة بمصادر خارجية لها أكثر ضجيجًا من البيانات المشروحة من قبل الخبراء ، مما يجعل من الصعب تجميعها بشكل مفيد. نقدم نهج التجميع الذي يتعلم نموذج الانحدار من التعليقات التوضيحية التعهيد الجماعي للتنبؤ بالتسميات المجمعة للحالات التي ليس لها أحكام خبراء. تحقق الملصقات المتوقعة ارتباطًا قدره 0.594 مع تسميات الخبراء في بياناتنا ، متفوقةً على أفضل طريقة تجميع بديلة بنسبة 11.9٪. يتفوق نهجنا أيضًا على البدائل الموجودة في مجموعات بيانات الجهات الخارجية.', 'fr': "Le crowdsourcing offre un moyen pratique d'obtenir des données étiquetées rapidement et à peu de frais. Cependant, les étiquettes issues du crowdsourcing sont souvent plus bruyantes que les données annotées par des experts, ce qui rend difficile leur agrégation significative. Nous présentons une approche d'agrégation qui apprend un modèle de régression à partir d'annotations participatives afin de prédire les étiquettes agrégées pour les instances qui n'ont pas fait l'objet d'évaluations d'experts. Les étiquettes prédites présentent une corrélation de 0,594 avec les labels experts sur nos données, surpassant la meilleure méthode d'agrégation alternative de 11,9\xa0%. Notre approche surpasse également les alternatives sur les ensembles de données tiers.", 'es': 'El crowdsourcing ofrece un medio práctico de obtener datos etiquetados de forma rápida y económica. Sin embargo, las etiquetas colaborativas suelen ser más ruidosas que los datos anotados por expertos, lo que dificulta agregarlos de manera significativa. Presentamos un enfoque de agregación que aprende un modelo de regresión a partir de anotaciones colaborativas para predecir etiquetas agregadas para instancias que no tienen adjudicaciones de expertos. Las etiquetas previstas alcanzan una correlación de 0.594 con las etiquetas de expertos en nuestros datos, superando al mejor método de agregación alternativo en un 11.9%. Nuestro enfoque también supera a las alternativas de los conjuntos de datos de terceros.', 'pt': 'O crowdsourcing oferece um meio conveniente de obter dados rotulados de forma rápida e barata. No entanto, os rótulos de crowdsourcing costumam ser mais ruidosos do que os dados anotados por especialistas, dificultando a agregação deles de maneira significativa. Apresentamos uma abordagem de agregação que aprende um modelo de regressão a partir de anotações de crowdsourcing para prever rótulos agregados para instâncias que não possuem julgamentos de especialistas. Os rótulos previstos atingem uma correlação de 0,594 com rótulos de especialistas em nossos dados, superando o melhor método de agregação alternativo em 11,9%. Nossa abordagem também supera as alternativas em conjuntos de dados de terceiros.', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングは、ラベル付けされたデータを迅速かつ安価に取得する便利な手段を提供します。しかし、クラウドソーシングされたラベルは、専門家が注釈したデータよりも騒音が大きいことが多く、有意義に集約することが困難です。クラウドソーシングされたアノテーションから回帰モデルを学習し、専門家の裁定がないインスタンスの集約されたラベルを予測する集約アプローチを提示します。予測されるラベルは、データ上の専門家ラベルと0.594の相関を達成し、最良の代替集計方法を11.9 ％上回ります。当社のアプローチは、サードパーティのデータセットの代替案よりも優れています。', 'zh': '众包给疾速、廉价取标数便捷之法。 然众包标常嘈杂于注数,故难合也。 我们立了一种聚合的方法,该法从众包注中学习归模形,以占无专家决定的实例。 占标与数相关性为 0.594,视最佳者高 11.9%。 吾法亦优于第三方数集之代方案。', 'ru': 'Краудсорсинг - удобное средство быстрого и недорогого получения маркированных данных. Тем не менее, краудсорсинговые метки часто шумят больше, чем аннотированные экспертами данные, что затрудняет их значимую агрегирование. Мы представляем подход агрегирования, который изучает регрессионную модель на основе краудсорсинговых аннотаций для прогнозирования агрегированных меток для случаев, которые не имеют экспертных суждений. Прогнозируемые метки достигают корреляции 0,594 с экспертными метками на наших данных, превосходя лучший альтернативный метод агрегирования на 11,9%. Наш подход также превосходит альтернативы для наборов данных сторонних производителей.', 'hi': 'Crowdsourcing लेबल किए गए डेटा को जल्दी और सस्ते में प्राप्त करने का एक सुविधाजनक साधन प्रदान करता है। हालांकि, crowdsourced लेबल अक्सर विशेषज्ञ-एनोटेट डेटा की तुलना में शोर करते हैं, जिससे उन्हें सार्थक रूप से एकत्रित करना मुश्किल हो जाता है। हम एक एकत्रीकरण दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो उन उदाहरणों के लिए एकत्रित लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए क्राउडसोर्स किए गए एनोटेशन से एक प्रतिगमन मॉडल सीखता है जिनके पास कोई विशेषज्ञ निर्णय नहीं है। पूर्वानुमानित लेबल हमारे डेटा पर विशेषज्ञ लेबल के साथ 0.594 का सहसंबंध प्राप्त करते हैं, जो 11.9% द्वारा सर्वोत्तम वैकल्पिक एकत्रीकरण विधि से आगे निकल जाते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण भी तीसरे पक्ष के डेटासेट पर विकल्पों से बेहतर है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann sluafhoinsiú bealach áisiúil ar fáil chun sonraí lipéadaithe a fháil go tapa agus go saor. Mar sin féin, is minic a bhíonn lipéid sluafhoinsithe níos glóraí ná sonraí anótáilte ó shaineolaithe, rud a fhágann go mbíonn sé deacair iad a chomhiomlánú go ciallmhar. Cuirimid cur chuige comhiomlánaithe i láthair a fhoghlaimíonn samhail aischéimniúcháin ó nótaí sluafhoinsithe chun lipéid chomhiomlánaithe a thuar do chásanna nach bhfuil aon bhreithnithe ó shaineolaithe acu. Baineann na lipéid tuartha amach comhghaol 0.594 le lipéid shaineolach ar ár sonraí, rud a sháraíonn an modh comhiomlánaithe malartach is fearr 11.9%. Is fearr lenár gcur chuige freisin na roghanna eile ar thacair sonraí tríú páirtí.', 'ka': 'Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labeled data quickly and inexpensively. მაგრამ, მსოფლიოსური ლაბეტები ხშირად უფრო სიტყვა ვიდრე ექსპერტის ანოტირებული მონაცემები, რომლებიც მათ უფრო რთულია აგგრადოთ სანიშვნ ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ახალგაზრულების მოდულის რეგრესის მოდელს, რომელიც ახალგაზრდებით ახალგაზრულებული ახალგაზრულებებიდან დავიწყებთ ახალგაზრულებული ახალგაზრულებების შესახე პროგრამებული ნიშანები 0,594-ის კორელაციას მიიღებენ ჩვენი მონაცემების ექსპერტის ნიშანებით, 11,9%-ით უკეთესი ალტენტრუმენტური ადგრაციის მეტი. ჩვენი პროგორმა უფრო გავაკეთება ალტენტრუმენტები სამუშაო მონაცემების სეტებში.', 'el': 'Η Crowdsourcing προσφέρει ένα βολικό μέσο για την απόκτηση δεδομένων με ετικέτα γρήγορα και οικονομικά. Ωστόσο, οι ετικέτες είναι συχνά πιο θορυβώδεις από τα δεδομένα που σχολιάζουν εμπειρογνώμονες, καθιστώντας δύσκολη τη συγκέντρωση τους με νόημα. Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση συγκέντρωσης που μαθαίνει ένα μοντέλο παλινδρόμησης από σχολιασμούς με πολλαπλές πηγές για να προβλέψει συγκεντρωτικές ετικέτες για περιπτώσεις που δεν έχουν αποφάσεις εμπειρογνωμόνων. Οι προβλεπόμενες ετικέτες επιτυγχάνουν συσχέτιση 0.594 με ετικέτες εμπειρογνωμόνων στα δεδομένα μας, ξεπερνώντας την καλύτερη εναλλακτική μέθοδο συγκέντρωσης κατά 11.9%. Η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά επίσης τις εναλλακτικές λύσεις σε σύνολα δεδομένων τρίτων μερών.', 'hu': 'A Crowdsourcing kényelmes eszközt kínál a címkézett adatok gyors és olcsó beszerzésére. A közösségi forrásból származó címkék azonban gyakran zajosabbak, mint a szakértői jegyzetekkel ellátott adatok, ami megnehezíti azok jelentős összesítését. Olyan aggregációs megközelítést mutatunk be, amely megtanulja a regressziós modellt a közösségi forrásból származó megjegyzésekből, hogy előrejelezze az aggregált címkéket olyan esetekben, amelyeknek nincs szakértői döntése. Az előrejelzett címkék 0,594 korrelációt érnek el adatainkon szakértői címkékkel, 11,9%-kal felülmúlva a legjobb alternatív aggregációs módszert. Megközelítésünk a harmadik féltől származó adatkészletek alternatíváit is felülmúlja.', 'kk': 'Көпшілік құрылғысы жарлық деректерді жылдам және көмегімен алу мүмкіндігін ұсынады. Бірақ көпшілікті жарлықтар көпшілікті мәліметтерден тыңдайтын деректерден артық болып, оларды маңызды біріктіру қиын болады. Біз көпшілікті жазбалардан регрессия үлгісін оқу үшін көпшілікті жазбалардың жазбаларын өзгерту үшін қосымша жазбаларды таңдаймыз. Көрсетілген жарлықтар 0,594 мәліметіміздің эксперттер жарлықтарымен, 11,9% арқылы ең жақсы альтернативті сәйкестік әдісін жеткізеді. Біздің қасиетіміз де үшінші бөлім деректер жиындарындағы альтернативтерді жасайды.', 'it': 'Il crowdsourcing offre un mezzo conveniente per ottenere dati etichettati in modo rapido ed economico. Tuttavia, le etichette crowdsourcing sono spesso più rumorose dei dati annotati da esperti, rendendo difficile aggregarli in modo significativo. Presentiamo un approccio di aggregazione che apprende un modello di regressione dalle annotazioni crowdsourcing per prevedere etichette aggregate per le istanze che non hanno giudizi di esperti. Le etichette previste raggiungono una correlazione di 0,594 con etichette esperte sui nostri dati, superando del 11,9% il miglior metodo alternativo di aggregazione. Il nostro approccio supera anche le alternative sui set di dati di terze parti.', 'ms': 'Crowdsourcing menawarkan cara yang sesuai untuk mendapatkan data yang ditabel dengan cepat dan tidak mahal. Namun, label sumber ramai sering lebih bunyi daripada data yang dicatat oleh ahli, membuatnya sukar untuk menyempurnakannya dengan bermakna. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan agregasi yang mempelajari model regresi dari anotasi crowdsourced untuk meramalkan label aggregated untuk kes yang tidak mempunyai penilaian pakar. Label dijangka mencapai korelasi 0.594 dengan label ahli pada data kita, melampaui kaedah agregasi alternatif terbaik dengan 11.9%. Pendekatan kita juga melebihi alternatif pada set data pihak ketiga.', 'mk': 'Crowdsourcing нуди удобни средства за брзо и нескапо добивање на означени податоци. Сепак, популарните етикети честопати се повисоки од информациите на експертите, што им овозможува значително да се агресираат. Презентираме агрегациски пристап кој научи регресен модел од публички анотации за да предвиде агрегетирани етикети за случаи кои немаат експертски судии. Предвидените етикети постигнуваат корелација од 0,594 со експертски етикети на нашите податоци, надминувајќи го најдобриот алтернативен метод на агрегација за 11,9 отсто. Our approach also outperforms the alternatives on third-party datasets.', 'ml': 'Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labeled data quickly and inexpensively.  എന്നാലും, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളെക്കാള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d മൂലസ്സോര്\u200dസ് ലേബലുകള്\u200d ശബ്ദമാകുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥമായി അവരെ ക പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിശേഷിപ്പുകള്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്ത മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒരു റിക്രഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒര പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട കുറിപ്പുകള്\u200d 0. 594 ന്റെ ബന്ധം എത്തുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട കുറിപ്പുകളുമുള്ള ലേബ മൂന്നാമത്തെ പാര്\u200dട്ടി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Il-crowdsourcing joffri mezz konvenjenti biex tinkiseb dejta ttikkettata malajr u b’mod mhux għali. Madankollu, it-tikketti crowdsourced ħafna drabi jkunu aktar storbjużi minn dejta annotata minn esperti, u dan jagħmilha diffiċli li jiġu aggregati b’mod sinifikanti. Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ ta’ aggregazzjoni li jitgħallem mudell ta’ rigressjoni minn annotazzjonijiet crowdsourced biex nipprojbixxu tikketti aggregati għal każijiet li m’għandhomx a ġġudikazzjonijiet esperti. It-tikketti mbassra jiksbu korrelazzjoni ta’ 0.594 ma’ tikketti ta’ esperti fuq id-dejta tagħna, li taqbeż l-a ħjar metodu alternattiv ta’ aggregazzjoni b’11.9%. L-approċċ tagħna jisboq ukoll l-alternattivi dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ partijiet terzi.', 'pl': 'Crowdsourcing oferuje wygodny sposób na szybkie i tanie pozyskiwanie etykietowanych danych. Jednak etykiety crowdsourcingowe są często bardziej hałaśliwe niż dane z adnotacjami ekspertów, co utrudnia ich sensowne agregowanie. Przedstawiamy podejście agregacyjne, które uczy się modelu regresji z adnotacji crowdsourcingowych w celu przewidywania zagregowanych etykiet dla przypadków, które nie mają orzeczeń ekspertów. Przewidywane etykiety osiągają korelację 0,594 z etykietami ekspertów na naszych danych, przewyższając najlepszą alternatywną metodę agregacji o 11,9%. Nasze podejście przewyższa również alternatywy na zbiorach danych firm trzecich.', 'lt': 'Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labeled data quickly and inexpensively.  Vis dėlto daugybės šaltinių etiketės dažnai triukšmingesnės nei ekspertų užrašyti duomenys, todėl sunku jas reikšmingai suvestinti. Pateikiame agregacinį metodą, kuris mokosi regresijos modelio iš daugybės užrašų, kad būtų galima numatyti agreguotas etiketes tais atvejais, kai ekspertų nuomonių nėra. Numatytose etiketėse koreliacija yra 0,594 su mūsų duomenų ekspertų etiketėmis, o geriausias alternatyvus agregacijos metodas – 11,9 %. Mūsų požiūris taip pat viršija trečiųjų šalių duomenų rinkinių alternatyvas.', 'mn': 'Хоосон сэтгэл хөрөнгө өгөгдлийг хурдан болон тодорхойлолтгүй авах боломжтой арга гаргадаг. Гэхдээ олон нийтийн нэвтрүүлэг нь мэргэжилтнүүдийн мэдээллээс илүү чимээгүй, тэднийг утгатай нэгтгэхэд хэцүү болгодог. Бид олон нийтийн сэтгэл хөдлөлөөс хамтын загварыг суралцдаг нэг нийтлэг арга загвар тайлбарлаж, мэргэжлийн шаардлагагүй жишээнд нийтлэгдсэн загваруудыг таамаглах болно. Тодорхойлогдсон etiket нь 0.594 болон бидний өгөгдлийн мэргэжилтэн etiket гэх мэт харилцааны холбоотой байдаг. 11.9% нь хамгийн сайн альтернатив нийлүүлэлтийн аргыг илүү ашигладаг. Бидний арга зам нь гуравдагч хэсэгт өгөгдлийн сангуудын альтернативуудыг дамжуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Crowdsourcing oferă un mijloc convenabil de a obține date etichetate rapid și ieftin. Cu toate acestea, etichetele crowdsourcing sunt adesea mai zgomotoase decât datele adnotate de experți, ceea ce face dificilă agregarea lor în mod semnificativ. Vă prezentăm o abordare de agregare care învață un model de regresie din adnotările crowdsourced pentru a prezice etichetele agregate pentru instanțele care nu au judecări de experți. Etichetele preconizate obțin o corelație de 0,594 cu etichetele experți pe datele noastre, depășind cea mai bună metodă alternativă de agregare cu 11,9%. Abordarea noastră depășește, de asemenea, alternativele pe seturi de date terțe părți.', 'so': 'Crowdsourcing wuxuu bixiyaa qaab ku haboon oo aad u hesho macluumaad labo oo dhaqso ah iyo si hawlgab ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee alaabta dadku waxay inta badan ka dhawaaqdaan macluumaad kharash ah, taas oo ay ku adag tahay in ay si macnaheedu u leedahay. Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa qaab qalabka dib u dhigista oo ka baranaya noocyo ka mid ah calaamada dadka laga soo bandhigay si ay u sii sheegto tusaale ahaan a an haysan bedelka kharashka. The predicted labels achieve a correlation of 0.594 with expert labels on our data, outperforming the best alternative aggregation method by 11.9%.  Dhaqdhaheenna waxay sidoo kale ka muuqataa fursadaha labaad ee kooxa saddexaad.', 'sv': 'Crowdsourcing erbjuder ett bekvämt sätt att få märkta data snabbt och billigt. Men crowdsourcerade etiketter är ofta mer bullriga än expertkommenterade data, vilket gör det svårt att samla dem på ett meningsfullt sätt. Vi presenterar en aggregeringsmetod som lär sig en regressionsmodell från crowdsourced-anteckningar för att förutsäga aggregerade etiketter för instanser som inte har några expertbedömningar. De förutspådda etiketterna uppnår en korrelation på 0,594 med expertetiketter på våra data, vilket överträffar den bästa alternativa aggregeringsmetoden med 11,9%. Vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar också alternativen på datauppsättningar från tredje part.', 'ta': 'Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labeled data quickly and inexpensively.  ஆனால், மக்களின் மூலம் குறியீடுகள் பெரும்பாலும் அறிவிப்பான தகவல்களை விட சப்தமாக இருக்கிறது, அதாவது அவர்களை பிரித்து பெர நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பு முறைமையை கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் என்று ஒரு திருப்ப மாதிரி கூட்டத்தின் அறிவிப்புகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்க முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட சிட்டைகள் 0. 594 க்கு ஒரு தொடர்பு அடையும் எங்கள் தகவல் மீது சிறந்த மாற்று பிரித்தல் முறைமை 11. 9%. மூன்றாம் கட்சி தரவுத்தளங்களில் மாற்றியங்களை மாற்றுகிறது.', 'no': 'Crowdsourcing tilbyr ein avansert måte å få merkelappe data raskt og utrygt. Dette er ofte støyere enn ekspertannotaterte data, som gjer det vanskeleg å samla dei gjennomsiktig. Vi presenterer ein aggregasjonstilnærming som lærer ein regresjonsmodul frå crowdsourced annotations for å foregå aggregasjonsmerkelappar for instansar som ikkje har noko eksperttilnærmingar. Den foregåande etikettene oppnår ein korrelasjon av 0,594 med ekspertetikettene på data våre, som utfører den beste alternative samlingsmetoden med 11,9%. Tilnærminga vårt utfører også alternativene på tredjepartisdata.', 'si': 'Name නමුත්, සම්පූර්ණ ලෙබෙල්ල් සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාත්මක දත්ත වඩා ශබ්ද වෙනවා, ඒක අමාරුයි  අපි සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැති  අපේ දත්තේ විශ්වාසිත ලේබල් එක්ක 0.594 වලින් සම්බන්ධයක් ලැබෙනවා, 11.9% වලින් හොඳම වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරන්න. අපේ විදිහට තුන්වෙනි පාර්ටි දත්ත සේට් වල වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sr': 'Crowdsourcing nudi prikladno sredstvo za dobivanje označenih podataka brzo i nepoštećeno. Međutim, masovne etikete su često bučnije od ekspertskih annotiranih podataka, čineći ih teško skupljati značajno. Predstavljamo agregacioni pristup koji nauči model regresije iz publikovanih annotacija kako bi predvidjeli aggregatne etikete za instance koje nemaju ekspertne osude. Predviđene etikete postižu korelaciju od 0,594 sa ekspertskim etiketama na našim podacima, iznosi najbolju alternativnu metodu aggregacije za 11,9%. Naš pristup takođe iznosi alternative na treæim stranama podataka.', 'ur': 'کروڈ سورچینگ لکڑی ہوئی ڈیٹا کو سریع اور غیر زیادہ حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک مناسب طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے. لیکن اکثریت کے سرمایہ لہروں سے زیادہ آواز سے زیادہ آواز ہیں، جو ان کو معنی طور پر جمع کرنے کے لئے مشکل بناتے ہیں. ہم ایک جمع طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو جمع ہونے والی مثالیں کے لئے جمع ہونے والی لابل کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے ایک دوسری جمع کرنے والی موڈل سکھاتا ہے جس میں کوئی متخصص فیصلہ نہیں ہے۔ پیش بینی لیبل 0.594 کی تعلقات پہنچ گئی ہے ہمارے ڈاٹے پر استرالیٹ لیبل کے ساتھ، 11.9% سے بہترین الٹرائیٹ جمع طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کر رہے ہیں. ہمارا طریقہ بھی تیسرے پارتی ڈیٹ سٹ پر الٹِیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے خلاف عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Tập đoàn đến đây là cách thuận tiện để lấy dữ liệu dán nhãn nhanh chóng và rẻ tiền. Tuy nhiên, nhãn đập mạnh thường đáng chú ý hơn các dữ liệu được ghi chú bởi chuyên gia, làm cho việc tổng hợp chúng rất khó. Chúng tôi trình bày một phương pháp tập hợp mà học một mô hình phục hồi từ ghi chú crodsourced để dự đoán các nhãn tổng hợp cho các trường hợp không có chẩn đoán chuyên gia. Những nhãn được dự đoán sẽ tạo ra sự tương đồng 0.594 với các nhãn chuyên gia trên dữ liệu của chúng tôi, vượt qua phương pháp tổng hợp lựa chọn tốt nhất theo 11.9 Name Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta cũng vượt trội các cách khác nhau trên bộ dữ liệu.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, jamoatlar tugmalari ko'pincha taʼminlovchi maʼlumotdan ham yozma'lumotlardan foydalanishi mumkin. Ularni o'zgartirish juda qiyin qiladi. Biz taqdimot usulini o'rganamiz, boshqarish modelini jamoatlar taqdimotlaridan o'rganamiz, masalan, taxminan taʼminlovchilar yoʻq masallardan ko'paytirish mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan tugmalar tarkibi 0.594 bilan ekspert teglari bilan bog'liqga ega bo'ladi va eng eng eng eng eng eng eng yuqori chegaralarni 11.9%bilanbajarish mumkin. Bizning fikrimiz esa uchinchi qismi maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartiradi.", 'hr': 'Crowdsourcing nudi odgovarajuće sredstvo za dobivanje označenih podataka brzo i jeftino. Međutim, crowdsourced etikete su često bukniji od podataka o komentaciji stručnjaka, čineći ih teško skupljati značajno. Predstavljamo aggregacijski pristup koji nauči model regresije iz publikovanih annotacija kako bi predvidjeli aggregacije etikete za slučajevi koji nemaju stručne sudbe. Predviđene etikete postignu korelaciju od 0,594 sa stručnim etiketama na našim podacima, iznosi najbolju alternativnu metodu aggregacije za 11,9%. Naš pristup također iznosi alternative na trećim stranama podataka.', 'da': 'Crowdsourcing tilbyder et bekvemt middel til at få mærkede data hurtigt og billigt. Men crowdsourcerede etiketter er ofte mere støjende end ekspertanoterede data, hvilket gør det vanskeligt at samle dem meningsfuldt. Vi præsenterer en aggregeringsmetode, der lærer en regressionsmodel ud fra crowdsourcerede annoteringer til at forudsige aggregerede etiketter for tilfælde, der ikke har ekspertgodømmelser. De forventede etiketter opnår en korrelation på 0,594 med ekspert etiketter på vores data, hvilket overgår den bedste alternative aggregeringsmetode med 11,9%. Vores tilgang overgår også alternativerne på tredjepartsdatasæt.', 'bg': 'Кроудсорсингът предлага удобно средство за получаване на етикетирани данни бързо и евтино. Въпреки това, етикетите с crowdsourcing често са по-шумни от данните с анотация на експерти, което затруднява тяхното смислено обобщаване. Представяме подход за агрегиране, който изучава регресионен модел от анотации с crowdsourcing, за да предвижда агрегирани етикети за случаи, които нямат експертни решения. Прогнозираните етикети постигат корелация от 0,594 с експертните етикети на нашите данни, като надминават най-добрия алтернативен метод на агрегиране с 11,9%. Нашият подход също надминава алтернативите на набори от данни на трети страни.', 'nl': 'Crowdsourcing biedt een handige manier om gelabelde data snel en goedkoop te verkrijgen. Crowdsourcing labels zijn echter vaak luidruchtiger dan door experts geannoteerde gegevens, waardoor het moeilijk is om ze zinvol te aggregeren. We presenteren een aggregatiebenadering die een regressiemodel leert van crowdsourcing annotaties om geaggregeerde labels te voorspellen voor instanties die geen deskundige jurisdicties hebben. De voorspelde labels bereiken een correlatie van 0,594 met deskundige labels op onze gegevens, die de beste alternatieve aggregatiemethode met 11,9% overtreffen. Onze aanpak overtreft ook de alternatieven op datasets van derden.', 'de': 'Crowdsourcing bietet eine komfortable Möglichkeit, beschriftete Daten schnell und kostengünstig zu erhalten. Crowdsourcing-Labels sind jedoch oft lauter als von Experten kommentierte Daten, was es schwierig macht, sie sinnvoll zu aggregieren. Wir stellen einen Aggregationsansatz vor, der ein Regressionsmodell aus Crowdsourcing-Annotationen lernt, um aggregierte Labels für Instanzen vorherzusagen, die keine Expertenbeurteilungen haben. Die prognostizierten Labels erreichen eine Korrelation von 0,594 mit Experten-Labels auf unseren Daten und übertreffen die beste alternative Aggregationsmethode um 11,9%. Unser Ansatz übertrifft auch die Alternativen auf Datensätzen von Drittanbietern.', 'id': 'Crowdsourcing menawarkan cara yang nyaman untuk mendapatkan data labeled dengan cepat dan tidak mahal. Namun, label sumber keramaian sering lebih bunyi dari data yang dicatat oleh ahli, membuatnya sulit untuk menggabungkannya dengan berarti. We present an aggregation approach that learns a regression model from crowdsourced annotations to predict aggregated labels for instances that have no expert adjudications.  Label yang diprediksi mencapai korelasi 0,594 dengan label ahli pada data kita, melebihi metode agregasi alternatif terbaik dengan 11,9%. pendekatan kita juga melebihi alternatif pada set data pihak ketiga.', 'fa': 'Crowdsourcing یک وسیله مناسب برای گرفتن داده\u200cهای نقاشی سریع و بی\u200cاندازه پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. با این حال، نقاشی\u200cهای جمعیت\u200cها معمولاً از داده\u200cهای متخصص\u200cکننده\u200cتر صدا می\u200cشوند، و این کار را به معنی جمع کردن آنها سخت می\u200cکند. ما یک روش جمع را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل بازگشت را از نوشته\u200cهای جمعیت یاد می\u200cگیرد تا نقاشی جمع شده را پیش\u200cبینی کنیم برای instances که هیچ حکم متخصص ندارند. برچسب\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cها با برچسب\u200cهای متخصص روی داده\u200cهای ما به ارتباط 0.594 رسیده\u200cاند، که بهترین روش جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای alternatives به ۱۱.۹ درصد بیشتری می\u200cکنند. دسترسی ما همچنین انتخاب\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سوم را بر پایه می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Pulsatçy etilen maglumatlary çalt we gaýd etmek üçin ýeterli bir umyt berer. Ýöne köpürli etiketler uzmanly hasaplanýan maglumatlardan köplenç gürrüňli hasaplanýar, olary wajyplygy bilen toplamak kyn edýärler. Biz gatnaşmak nusgasyny gatnaşmak nusgasyndan öwrenip otyrýan nusgasyny ukyp edýäris. Önümüzdeki etiketler, 0.594 verimizdeki uzmanlar etiketlerle birleşmesine ulaşarlar, 11.9% tarafından en güzel alternatif toplama yöntemi üstüne getirirler. Biziň ýaryşymyz üçünji çarpyş veri setirlerinde başga saýlawlary gowy gazanýar.', 'sw': 'Vyombo vya Crowdsource vinatoa njia nzuri ya kupata taarifa zinazoonyesha kwa haraka na si vizuri. Hata hivyo, alama zinazotumiwa na watu mara nyingi zinapiga kelele kuliko taarifa za wataalam zinazotajwa, na inafanya kuwa vigumu kuwaweka vibaya kwa maana. Tunawasilisha mbinu za kuchaguliwa ambazo zinajifunza muundo wa kandamizi kutoka kwenye matangazo yanayotangazwa na watu kutabiri alama zilizopangwa kwa mfano ambazo hazina mabadiliko ya wataalam. Alama zilizotabiriwa zinafanikiwa uhusiano wa 0.594 na alama za wataalam kuhusu takwimu zetu, kwa kuonyesha njia bora ya kuchaguliwa kwa asilimia 11.9. Hatua yetu pia inaonyesha mabadiliko katika seti za takwimu za tatu.', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃዎች ፈጥኖ እና ፍጥረት ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን ማሰናከል ያስችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የብሔራዊ የድምፅ ምልክቶች ብዙ ጊዜ ከታዋቂው ዳታዎች ይልቅ ድምፅ ይናገራሉ፣ በአሳማሚ ማሰቃየት ይችላል፡፡ አካባቢ ተሳሳታፊዎች የሌላቸው ምሳሌዎችን ለመቀበል የሚችል የድምፅ አካባቢ ማድረግ እናስቀራለን፡፡ የተቀረጸው ምልክቶች የ0.594 ደጋፊዎች በማድረጃችን ላይ ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ የሦስተኛ ፓርቲ ዳታ-ሰርተቶችን የሚለወጥ ምርጫዎች ደግሞ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Crowdsourcing ofron një mjet të përshtatshëm për të marrë të dhënat e etiketuara shpejt dhe pa shpenzim. However, crowdsourced labels are often noisier than expert-annotated data, making it difficult to aggregate them meaningfully.  Ne paraqesim një qasje agregimi që mëson një model regresioni nga anotacionet e burimeve të shumta për të parashikuar etiketa të aggreguara për raste që nuk kanë gjykime eksperte. Etiketat e parashikuara arrijnë një korrelacion prej 0.594 me etiketat eksperte në të dhënat tona, duke kaluar metodën më të mirë alternative të agregimit me 11.9%. Përqasja jonë është gjithashtu më e lartë se alternativat në grupet e të dhënave të partive të treta.', 'af': "Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labelled data quickly and inexpensively. Maar die skapgesoekte etikette is dikwels geluider as eksperteer-annotateerde data, maak dit moeilik om hulle betekenlik te sameleer. Ons stel 'n aggregasie toegang wat leer 'n regresie model van skare verkry notasies om agtergroot etikette te voorskou vir voorbeelde wat geen ekspertiese toespraak het nie. Die voorskoude etikette het 'n korrelasie van 0.594 bereik met ekspertiese etikette op ons data, uitgevoer die beste alternatiewe groep metode by 11.9%. Ons toegang uitvoer ook die alternatiewe op derde party datastelle.", 'ko': '크라우드소싱은 표기 데이터를 신속하고 저렴하게 얻을 수 있는 편리한 방법을 제공했다.그러나 패키지 라벨은 보통 전문가가 주석한 데이터보다 시끄러워 의미 있는 집합을 하기 어렵다.우리는 전문가의 판결이 없는 실례의 집합 라벨을 예측하기 위해 집합 방법을 제시했다.우리의 데이터에서 예측된 라벨과 전문가 라벨의 상관성은 0.594로 가장 좋은 대체 집합 방법보다 11.9% 높았다.우리의 방법은 제3자 데이터 집합에서도 다른 방법보다 우수하다.', 'hy': 'Հանդիսատեսությունը հնարավոր միջոց է առաջարկում արագ և անծախսափելի պիտակ տվյալներ ստանալու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, ժողովրդի աղբյուրները հաճախ ավելի աղմկոտ են, քան մասնագետների նկարագրված տվյալները, ինչը դժվարանում է դրանք իմաստալիորեն համախմբել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ագրեգացիոն մոտեցում, որը սովորում է ռեգրեսիոն մոդել ամբողջ ծառայություն ունեցող նոտացիաներից, որպեսզի կանխատեսենք ագրեգատիվ պիտակները դեպքերում, որոնք չունեն մասնագետ դատողություններ: Պատկերացված պիտակները հասնում են 0.59-ի և մեր տվյալների մասնագետների պիտակների հետ, որոնք 11.9 տոկոսով գերազանցում են լավագույն այլընտրանքային ագրեգացիայի մեթոդը: Our approach also outperforms the alternatives on third-party datasets.', 'bn': 'ক্রাউডসোর্সিং দ্রুত এবং অযৌক্তিক তথ্য পাওয়ার জন্য একটি সুবিধাজনক উপায় প্রদান করেছে। তবে জনসূত্রের লেবেল প্রায়শই বিশেষজ্ঞ তথ্যের চেয়ে চিৎকারের চেয়ে চিৎকার করে, যার ফলে তাদের মানে বিশেষভাবে বিরক আমরা একটি গ্রেফতার কর্মসূচি উপস্থাপন করেছি যেখানে কোন বিশেষজ্ঞ প্রতিযোগিতা নেই। ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী লেবেলটি আমাদের তথ্যে বিশেষজ্ঞ লেবেলের সাথে 0. 594 সম্পর্ক পৌঁছে যায়, ১১. আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া তৃতীয় পার্টি ডাটাসেটের বিকল্প প্রদর্শন করেছে।', 'az': 'Crowdsourcing etiketlənmiş məlumatları tez və çox səbəb almaq üçün uyğun bir yol təklif edir. Ancaq qüvvətli etiketlər müxtəlif məlumatlardan daha səsləndirlər, onları anlamıyla birləşdirmək zorlaşdırır. Biz bir toplama metodlarını göstəririk ki, qövmünün məlumatlarından bir regresiya modeli öyrənir ki, müxtəlif hökmləri olmayan məlumatlar üçün toplanmış etiketlər təmin edir. Önümüzdeki etiketlər, məlumatlarımızdakı ekspertlər etiketləri ilə 0,594 ilə bağlantılı olaraq, ən yaxşı alternatif toplama metodlarını 11,9%-dən artırar. Bizim tərzimiz də üçüncü dəstə verilənlərin alternatiflarını başa düşər.', 'bs': 'Crowdsourcing nudi prikladno sredstvo za dobivanje označenih podataka brzo i jeftino. Međutim, crowdsourced etikete su često bukniji od podataka o komentaciji stručnjaka, čineći ih teško skupljati značajno. Predstavljamo aggregacijski pristup koji nauči model regresije iz popularnih annotacija kako bi predvidjeli aggregatne etikete na slučajevi koji nemaju stručne osude. Predviđene etikete postignu korelaciju od 0,594 sa ekspertskim etiketama na našim podacima, iznosi najbolju alternativnu metodu aggregacije za 11,9%. Naš pristup također iznosi alternative na trećim stranama podataka.', 'ca': "Crowdsourcing ofereix un mitjà convenient d'obtenir dades etiquetades ràpidament i baratament. Tot i així, les etiquetes d'origen multiple sovint són més sorolloses que les dades anotates per experts, dificultant l'agrupació de manera significativa. Presentam un enfocament d'agregació que aprenen un model de regressió a partir d'anotacions d'una multitud per predir etiquetes agregades en casos que no tenen adjudicacions expertes. The predicted labels achieve a correlation of 0.594 with expert labels on our data, outperforming the best alternative aggregation method by 11.9%.  El nostre enfocament també supera les alternatives dels conjunts de dades de tercers.", 'cs': 'Crowdsourcing nabízí pohodlný způsob, jak rychle a levně získat označená data. Crowdsourcingové štítky jsou však často hlučnější než data s anotovanými odborníky, což ztěžuje jejich smysluplné agregování. Představujeme agregační přístup, který se naučí regresní model z crowdsourcingových anotací k předpovědi agregovaných štítků pro instance, které nemají žádné odborné posouzení. Předpokládané štítky dosahují korelace 0,594 s expertními štítky na našich datech a překonávají nejlepší alternativní agregační metodu o 11,9%. Náš přístup také překoná alternativy na datových sadách třetích stran.', 'et': 'Ühisturundus pakub mugavat vahendit märgistatud andmete kiireks ja odavaks saamiseks. Ühisallikatega märgistused on aga sageli mürakamad kui ekspertide märgistusega andmed, mistõttu on nende mõistlik koondamine keeruline. Esitame agregeerimise lähenemisviisi, mis õpib regressioonimudeli ühisallikatest annotatsioonidest, et prognoosida agregeeritud silte juhtudel, kus ekspertide otsuseid ei ole. Prognoositavad etiketid saavutavad meie andmetel ekspertmärgistega korrelatsiooni 0,594, mis ületab parimat alternatiivset agregatsioonimeetodit 11,9%. Meie lähenemisviis ületab ka kolmandate osapoolte andmekogumite alternatiive.', 'fi': 'Joukkorakennus tarjoaa kätevän tavan hankkia merkittyjä tietoja nopeasti ja edullisesti. Joukkovertaiset etiketit ovat kuitenkin usein meluisampia kuin asiantuntijamerkinnät, mikä vaikeuttaa niiden merkityksellistä kokoamista. Esittelemme aggregointimenetelmän, joka oppii regressiomallin joukkolähdemerkinnöistä ennustamaan aggregoituja tunnisteita tapauksissa, joissa ei ole asiantuntijalausuntoja. Ennustettujen etikettien korrelaatio on 0,594 asiantuntijaetikettien kanssa, mikä ylittää parhaan vaihtoehtoisen aggregointimenetelmän 11,9%. Lähestymistapamme ylittää myös kolmansien osapuolten tietoaineistojen vaihtoehdot.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awakdhéwé éntuk ndherengé beraksi kanggo ngerasakno dadi nggawe ngupakan anyar petani sing nyimpen kanggo ngerasakno Where am I Awakdhéwé éntuk ngerti Alternate kanggo dataset wis telu.', 'sk': 'Crowdsourcing ponuja priročno sredstvo za hitro in poceni pridobivanje označenih podatkov. Vendar pa so nalepke množičnega vira pogosto hrupnejše od podatkov s strokovnimi opombami, zaradi česar jih je težko smiselno združiti. Predstavljamo pristop združevanja, ki se uči regresijskega modela iz množičnih opomb za predvidevanje združenih oznak za primere, ki nimajo strokovnih sodb. Predvidene oznake dosegajo korelacijo 0,594 s strokovnimi oznakami na naših podatkih, kar presega najboljšo alternativno metodo agregacije za 11,9%. Naš pristop presega tudi alternative pri naborih podatkov tretjih oseb.', 'he': 'הצוות מציע אמצעים נוחים להשיג מידע מסוים מהר ולא יקר. עם זאת, תוויות מקורות קהל הן לעתים קרובות יותר רעשות ממידע מומחה שמכתב, מה שעושה את זה קשה לארגון אותם באופן משמעותי. אנו מציגים גישה אגוגרציה שלמדה דוגמא חזרה מהציונים המקורים הקהליים כדי לחזות תוויות אגוגרציות למקרים שאין להם שיעורים מומחים. התוויות הנצפויות מגיעות לתיאור של 0.594 עם תוויות מומחיות על הנתונים שלנו, מעליפות את שיטת האגרגרגרציה החלופית הטובה ביותר ב-11.9%. הגישה שלנו גם מגבירה את האליטרנטיבות על קבוצות נתונים של חלק שלישי.', 'ha': "Sourceing offers a proper way of observing labels data rapid and inexPenive. A lokacin da aka bada sunãye na umarni ko da yawa sun yi saurãre ko da data masu zane-zane, kuma yana yarda da su zama mai ƙunci a fassarar. Tuna gabatar da hanyor gargaɗin da za'a sanar da wata motel na regression daga kunnufi-sourcen mutane dõmin ya yi bayani ga alama masu cire misali waɗanda ba su da juya masu sani ba. The predicted labels achieve a correlation of 0.594 with expert labels on our data, outperforming the best alternative aggregation method by 11.9%.  Kayya da mataimakanmu yana samun zaɓata a kan danne-danne na uku.", 'bo': 'Crowdsourcing offers a convenient means of obtaining labeled data quickly and inexpensively. ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་མང་གི་ཁྱད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཡིག We present an aggregation approach that learns a regression model from crowdsourced annotations to predict aggregated labels for instances that have no expert adjudications. The predicted labels achieve a correlation of 0.594 with expert labels on our data, outperforming the best alternative aggregation method by 11.9%. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་འདྲ་བརྗོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་གསུམ་པ་ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP : A Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles', 'ar': 'الحشد في الحلقة: نهج هجين لتوضيح الأدوار الدلالية', 'pt': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: uma abordagem híbrida para anotar papéis semânticos', 'fr': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP\xa0: une approche hybride pour annoter des rôles sémantiques', 'es': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Un enfoque híbrido para anotar roles semánticos', 'ja': 'CROWD - IN - THE - LOOP ：セマンティックロールの注釈付けのためのハイブリッドアプローチ', 'zh': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP:一以注语义角色之混合也', 'hi': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Semantic Roles Annotating के लिए एक हाइब्रिड दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: гибридный подход к аннотированию семантических ролей', 'ga': 'Slua-san-AN-lúb: Cur Chuige Hibrideach chun Róil Shéimeantacha a Anótáil', 'ka': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: ჰიბრიდის მიღება სემონტიკური პროლების ანოტაციაში', 'el': 'Μια υβριδική προσέγγιση για την παρατήρηση σημασιολογικών ρόλων', 'hu': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Hibrid megközelítés a szemantikus szerepek jegyzetelésére', 'kk': 'CROWD- IN- THE- LOOP: Semantic Roles Annotating Hybrid Approach', 'it': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: un approccio ibrido per annotare i ruoli semantici', 'lt': 'KROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: hibridinis metodas, skirtas užrašyti seminius vaidmenis', 'mk': 'Хибриден пристап за анатирање на семантични улоги', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് റോളുകള്\u200d അറിയിക്കുന്നതിന് ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡിയുടെ വഴി', 'mn': 'ХОУРДАН-ДОХ: ХОУРДАН ДОХ Нөлөөлөлт', 'mt': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Approċċ ibridu għall-Annotazzjoni tar-Rwoli Semantiċi', 'no': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'pl': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: hybrydowe podejście do komentowania ról semantycznych', 'ro': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: O abordare hibridă pentru adnotarea rolurilor semantice', 'sr': 'Hibridni pristup za annotaciju semantičkih uloga.', 'si': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP', 'so': 'WAKA-IN-LOOP: A Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles', 'ta': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sv': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: En hybrid strategi för att kommentera semantiska roller', 'ms': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: A Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles', 'ur': 'کروود-ن-لوپ: ایک ہیبراڈ تقریبا سیمنٹی روائل کا اظہار کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'SHOL: Semantic Rollar Anotatsiya', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp tráo đổi cho các vai trò châm giải.', 'da': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: En hybrid tilgang til notering af semantiske roller', 'bg': 'КРАУД-В-ЪЛГАТА: Хибриден подход за анотиране на семантични роли', 'hr': 'HJEBIDNI PRIJAZ ZA NOTACIJU SEMANTIČNE uloge', 'nl': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Een hybride aanpak voor het annoteren van semantische rollen', 'de': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Ein hybrider Ansatz zur Annotation semantischer Rollen', 'fa': 'یک دسترسی Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles', 'sw': 'HABARI IN-LOOP: Ndege la Hybrid kwa Kutangaza Role za Semantic', 'ko': '그룹 재환: 의미 역할에 대한 주석 혼합 방법', 'tr': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP:', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sq': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: A Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles', 'am': 'የ-የ-ውይይት: የኬብሪድ አካባቢ የሴሞንቲክ ኮሌዎች', 'az': 'CROWD-IN-LOOP: Semantik Rulləri Annotating üçün Hibrid Yaxınlıq', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ դերերի նշումների հիբրիդ մոտեցումը', 'id': 'A Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles', 'cs': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Hybridní přístup pro anotování sémantických rolí', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক রোলেস বিজ্ঞাপনের জন্য একটি হাইব্রিডের পথ', 'ca': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Una aproximació híbrida per anotar rols Semàtics', 'bs': 'Hibridni pristup za annotaciju semantičkih uloga.', 'et': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Hübriidne lähenemisviis semantiliste rollide märgistamiseks', 'fi': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: Hybridi lähestymistapa semanttisten roolien merkitsemiseen', 'jv': 'COWD-IN-LOOP', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: hibridni pristop za označevanje semantičnih vlog', 'he': 'גישה היברידית להציג תפקידים סמנטיים', 'bo': 'CROWD-IN-THE-LOOP: A Hybrid Approach for Annotating Semantic Roles'}
{'en': 'Crowdsourcing has proven to be an effective method for generating labeled data for a range of NLP tasks. However, multiple recent attempts of using crowdsourcing to generate gold-labeled training data for semantic role labeling (SRL) reported only modest results, indicating that SRL is perhaps too difficult a task to be effectively crowdsourced. In this paper, we postulate that while producing SRL annotation does require expert involvement in general, a large subset of SRL labeling tasks is in fact appropriate for the crowd. We present a novel workflow in which we employ a classifier to identify difficult annotation tasks and route each task either to experts or crowd workers according to their difficulties. Our experimental evaluation shows that the proposed approach reduces the workload for experts by over two-thirds, and thus significantly reduces the cost of producing SRL annotation at little loss in quality.', 'ar': 'لقد أثبت التعهيد الجماعي أنه طريقة فعالة لتوليد البيانات المصنفة لمجموعة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، فإن المحاولات المتعددة الأخيرة لاستخدام التعهيد الجماعي لإنشاء بيانات تدريب ذات علامات ذهبية لتسمية الأدوار الدلالية (SRL) أبلغت عن نتائج متواضعة فقط ، مما يشير إلى أن SRL ربما تكون مهمة صعبة للغاية بحيث لا يمكن تعهيدها بشكل فعال. في هذه الورقة ، نفترض أنه في حين أن إنتاج تعليق توضيحي لـ SRL يتطلب مشاركة الخبراء بشكل عام ، فإن مجموعة فرعية كبيرة من مهام وضع العلامات SRL مناسبة في الواقع للجمهور. نقدم سير عمل جديدًا نستخدم فيه مصنفًا لتحديد مهام التعليقات التوضيحية الصعبة وتوجيه كل مهمة إما إلى الخبراء أو العاملين في الحشد وفقًا للصعوبات التي يواجهونها. يوضح تقييمنا التجريبي أن النهج المقترح يقلل من عبء العمل على الخبراء بأكثر من الثلثين ، وبالتالي يقلل بشكل كبير من تكلفة إنتاج تعليق توضيحي لـ SRL مع خسارة قليلة في الجودة.', 'pt': 'O crowdsourcing provou ser um método eficaz para gerar dados rotulados para uma série de tarefas de PNL. No entanto, várias tentativas recentes de usar o crowdsourcing para gerar dados de treinamento rotulados como ouro para rotulagem de papéis semânticos (SRL) relataram apenas resultados modestos, indicando que o SRL talvez seja uma tarefa muito difícil para ser efetivamente crowdsourced. Neste artigo, postulamos que, embora a produção de anotações SRL exija o envolvimento de especialistas em geral, um grande subconjunto de tarefas de rotulagem SRL é de fato apropriado para a multidão. Apresentamos um novo fluxo de trabalho no qual empregamos um classificador para identificar tarefas de anotação difíceis e encaminhar cada tarefa para especialistas ou trabalhadores de multidão de acordo com suas dificuldades. Nossa avaliação experimental mostra que a abordagem proposta reduz a carga de trabalho para especialistas em mais de dois terços e, portanto, reduz significativamente o custo de produção de anotações SRL com pouca perda de qualidade.', 'fr': "Le crowdsourcing s'est révélé être une méthode efficace pour générer des données étiquetées pour une gamme de tâches de PNL. Cependant, de nombreuses tentatives récentes d'utilisation du crowdsourcing pour générer des données de formation labellisées or pour l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles (SRL) n'ont donné que des résultats modestes, indiquant que la SRL est peut-être une tâche trop difficile pour être efficacement externalisée. Dans cet article, nous postulons que même si la production d'annotations SRL nécessite la participation d'experts en général, un large sous-ensemble de tâches d'étiquetage SRL est en fait approprié pour la foule. Nous présentons un nouveau flux de travail dans lequel nous utilisons un classificateur pour identifier les tâches d'annotation difficiles et acheminer chaque tâche vers des experts ou des travailleurs en groupe en fonction de leurs difficultés. Notre évaluation expérimentale montre que l'approche proposée réduit la charge de travail des experts de plus des deux tiers, et réduit ainsi de manière significative le coût de production de l'annotation SRL avec une faible perte de qualité.", 'es': 'El crowdsourcing ha demostrado ser un método eficaz para generar datos etiquetados para una variedad de tareas de PNL. Sin embargo, varios intentos recientes de utilizar el crowdsourcing para generar datos de entrenamiento con etiqueta dorada para el etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL) reportaron solo resultados modestos, lo que indica que SRL es quizás una tarea demasiado difícil para ser efectivamente colaborada. En este artículo, postulamos que, si bien la producción de anotaciones de SRL requiere la participación de expertos en general, un gran subconjunto de tareas de etiquetado de SRL es de hecho apropiado para la multitud. Presentamos un flujo de trabajo novedoso en el que empleamos un clasificador para identificar tareas de anotación difíciles y dirigir cada tarea a expertos o trabajadores de masas de acuerdo con sus dificultades. Nuestra evaluación experimental muestra que el enfoque propuesto reduce la carga de trabajo de los expertos en más de dos tercios y, por lo tanto, reduce significativamente el costo de producción de anotaciones SRL con poca pérdida de calidad.', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングは、さまざまなNLPタスクのラベル付きデータを生成するための効果的な方法であることが証明されています。しかし、セマンティックロールラベリング（ SRL ）のためのゴールドラベルのトレーニングデータを生成するためにクラウドソーシングを使用する最近の複数の試みは、わずかな結果しか報告されておらず、SRLが効果的にクラウドソーシングされるには難しすぎるタスクであることを示しています。この論文では、SRLアノテーションの作成には一般的に専門家の関与が必要であるが、SRLラベリングタスクの大きなサブセットは実際にはクラウドに適していると仮定している。私たちは、難しい注釈タスクを特定し、難易度に応じて各タスクを専門家またはクラウドワーカーにルーティングするために分類子を採用する新しいワークフローを提示します。当社の実験的評価によると、提案されたアプローチは、専門家の作業負荷を3分の2以上削減し、SRLアノテーションを作成するコストを大幅に削減し、品質を損なうことはほとんどありません。', 'zh': '众包已证为一系NLP生成标数有效。 然近数试用众包以成语义角(SRL)黄金标练数,但言所宜,明SRL或一难之任,无效众包也。 本文设虽成SRL注常须专家,SRL标记甚大,实合人群。 吾举新功,以类识难,因其难而工作者之。 臣等实验料,所出减三分之二以上,显损小SRL注释之本。', 'hi': 'Crowdsourcing NLP कार्यों की एक श्रृंखला के लिए लेबल डेटा उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक प्रभावी तरीका साबित हुआ है। हालांकि, सिमेंटिक रोल लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) के लिए गोल्ड-लेबल प्रशिक्षण डेटा उत्पन्न करने के लिए क्राउडसोर्सिंग का उपयोग करने के कई हालिया प्रयासों ने केवल मामूली परिणामों की सूचना दी, यह दर्शाता है कि एसआरएल शायद प्रभावी ढंग से क्राउडसोर्स होने के लिए बहुत मुश्किल काम है। इस पेपर में, हम मानते हैं कि एसआरएल एनोटेशन का उत्पादन करते समय सामान्य रूप से विशेषज्ञ भागीदारी की आवश्यकता होती है, एसआरएल लेबलिंग कार्यों का एक बड़ा सबसेट वास्तव में भीड़ के लिए उपयुक्त है। हम एक उपन्यास वर्कफ़्लो प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसमें हम कठिन एनोटेशन कार्यों की पहचान करने के लिए एक क्लासिफायर को नियुक्त करते हैं और प्रत्येक कार्य को उनकी कठिनाइयों के अनुसार विशेषज्ञों या भीड़ श्रमिकों को रूट करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण विशेषज्ञों के लिए काम के बोझ को दो-तिहाई से अधिक कम कर देता है, और इस प्रकार गुणवत्ता में कम नुकसान पर एसआरएल एनोटेशन के उत्पादन की लागत को काफी कम कर देता है।', 'ru': 'Краудсорсинг зарекомендовал себя как эффективный метод генерации маркированных данных для ряда задач NLP. Тем не менее, многочисленные недавние попытки использования краудсорсинга для генерации данных обучения с золотой маркировкой для семантической маркировки ролей (SRL) показали лишь скромные результаты, указывающие на то, что SRL, возможно, является слишком сложной задачей для эффективного краудсорсинга. В этой статье мы постулируем, что, хотя создание аннотации SRL действительно требует участия экспертов в целом, большое подмножество задач маркировки SRL на самом деле подходит для толпы. Мы представляем новый рабочий процесс, в котором мы используем классификатор для определения сложных задач аннотации и направления каждой задачи либо экспертам, либо крауд-работникам в соответствии с их трудностями. Наша экспериментальная оценка показывает, что предлагаемый подход снижает рабочую нагрузку на экспертов более чем на две трети и, таким образом, значительно снижает затраты на производство аннотации SRL при незначительной потере качества.', 'ga': 'Tá sé cruthaithe gur modh éifeachtach é sluafhoinsiú chun sonraí lipéadaithe a ghiniúint do raon tascanna NLP. Mar sin féin, níor thuairiscigh iarrachtaí iolracha le déanaí maidir le sluafhoinsiú a úsáid chun sonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe ór a ghiniúint le haghaidh lipéadú róil shéimeantach (SRL) ach torthaí measartha, rud a thugann le fios go mb’fhéidir gur tasc ródheacair é SRL le bheith plódaithe go héifeachtach. Sa pháipéar seo, deirtear linn, cé go dteastaíonn rannpháirtíocht shaineolach go ginearálta ó shaineolaithe chun anótáil SRL a tháirgeadh, go bhfuil fo-thacar mór de thascanna lipéadaithe SRL oiriúnach don slua. Cuirimid sreabhadh oibre nua i láthair ina bhfostaimid aicmitheoir chun tascanna anótála deacra a aithint agus chun gach tasc a threorú chuig saineolaithe nó slua-oibrithe de réir a gcuid deacrachtaí. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht thurgnamhach go laghdaítear an t-ualach oibre do shaineolaithe faoi níos mó ná dhá thrian leis an gcur chuige atá beartaithe, agus mar sin laghdaítear go suntasach an costas a bhaineann le nótáil SRL a tháirgeadh ar bheagán cáilíochta.', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ ბევრი ახალი მოცდილობის გამოყენება მუშაობის შესაძლებლობა სიმენტიკური პროლის მარცხლის მონაცემების შექმნა (SRL) მხოლოდ მხოლოდ სურათი შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც აღწერა, რომ ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ პოსტულაცით, რომ SRL ნიოტაციის გამოყენებაში ექსპერტის დამატება საერთოდ უნდა იყოს, რომ დიდი საერთო საერთო საერთო საერთო საერთო საერთო საერთო საერთო საერთო სა ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის სამუშაო გავამუშავებთ, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციერი გამოყენებთ, რომ განსაცნობა ძალიან წარმოადგენების სამუშაოდ და ყველა სამუშაო ექსპერტებს ან ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური განსაზღვრება აჩვენებს, რომ პროგრამის გასაზღვრება ექსპერტისთვის სამუშაოდ მეტი სამუშაოდ დამატებს, და ამიტომ მნიშვნელოვანად გასაზღვრება სისტემა', 'el': 'Η crowdsourcing έχει αποδειχθεί μια αποτελεσματική μέθοδος για τη δημιουργία επισημασμένων δεδομένων για μια σειρά εργασιών NLP. Ωστόσο, πολλές πρόσφατες προσπάθειες χρήσης για τη δημιουργία δεδομένων κατάρτισης με χρυσή σήμανση για τη σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (SRL) ανέφεραν μόνο μέτρια αποτελέσματα, υποδεικνύοντας ότι η SRL είναι ίσως πολύ δύσκολη εργασία για να γίνει αποτελεσματική crowdsourcing. Σε αυτή την εργασία, υποθέτουμε ότι ενώ η παραγωγή σχολιασμού απαιτεί τη συμμετοχή εμπειρογνωμόνων γενικά, ένα μεγάλο υποσύνολο εργασιών σήμανσης είναι στην πραγματικότητα κατάλληλο για το πλήθος. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα ροή εργασίας στην οποία χρησιμοποιούμε έναν ταξινομητή για να εντοπίσουμε δύσκολες εργασίες σχολιασμού και να δρομολογήσουμε κάθε εργασία είτε σε εμπειρογνώμονες είτε σε εργαζόμενους πλήθους ανάλογα με τις δυσκολίες τους. Η πειραματική μας αξιολόγηση δείχνει ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση μειώνει τον φόρτο εργασίας των εμπειρογνωμόνων κατά πάνω από τα δύο τρίτα, μειώνοντας έτσι σημαντικά το κόστος παραγωγής σχολιασμού με μικρή απώλεια ποιότητας.', 'hu': 'A crowdsourcing hatékony módszernek bizonyult a címkézett adatok generálására számos NLP-feladathoz. Azonban a közelmúltban több kísérlet arra, hogy a közösségi forrásokat használják a szemantikus szerepkörcímkézéshez (SRL) szükséges arany címkézéssel ellátott képzési adatok generálására, csak szerény eredményekről számolt be, ami azt jelzi, hogy az SRL talán túl nehéz feladat ahhoz, hogy hatékonyan közösségi forrásokat kapjanak. Ebben a tanulmányban azt feltételezzük, hogy bár az SRL megjegyzések elkészítése általában szakértői bevonást igényel, az SRL címkézési feladatok nagy részhalmaza valójában megfelelő a tömeg számára. Egy új munkafolyamatot mutatunk be, amelyben osztályozót alkalmazunk, hogy azonosítsuk a nehéz jegyzetelési feladatokat, és minden feladatot a szakértők vagy a tömeg munkavállalók nehézségeinek megfelelően irányítsuk. Kísérleti értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy a javasolt megközelítés több mint kétharmaddal csökkenti a szakértők munkaterhelését, így jelentősen csökkenti az SRL jegyzetek előállításának költségeit kis minőségveszteség mellett.', 'it': "Il crowdsourcing si è dimostrato un metodo efficace per generare dati etichettati per una serie di attività NLP. Tuttavia, diversi recenti tentativi di utilizzare il crowdsourcing per generare dati di formazione gold-label per l'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli (SRL) hanno riportato solo risultati modesti, indicando che SRL è forse un compito troppo difficile per essere efficacemente crowdsourcing. In questo articolo, postuliamo che mentre produrre annotazioni SRL richiede un coinvolgimento esperto in generale, un ampio sottoinsieme di compiti di etichettatura SRL è infatti appropriato per la folla. Presentiamo un nuovo flusso di lavoro in cui impieghiamo un classificatore per identificare le attività di annotazione difficili e indirizzare ogni attività agli esperti o ai lavoratori di massa in base alle loro difficoltà. La nostra valutazione sperimentale mostra che l'approccio proposto riduce il carico di lavoro per gli esperti di oltre due terzi, e quindi riduce significativamente i costi di produzione di annotazioni SRL con poca perdita di qualità.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше NLP тапсырмаларының аумағында жарлық деректерді құру үшін көмектесу әдісі болып көрсетілді. Бірақ, бірнеше жаңа көпшілікті көпшілік көпшіліктерді қолдану әрекеттері семантикалық роль жарлығына (SRL) жарлығына алтын жарлығындағы оқыту деректерін жасау үшін көпшілікті нәтижелерін жаса Бұл қағазда, біз SRL жазбаларын жасау кезінде эксперттердің көпшілігін жалғастыру керек екендігін жалғастырып береміз. Көпшіліктің көпшілікті SRL жазбаларының көпшілігі Біз романдық жұмыс жұмысын таңдаймыз. Біз классификациясының күшті жазбаларды анықтау және әрбір тапсырманы эксперттерге не көп жұмыс істеу жұмыстарына көмектеседі. Біздің тәжірибелікті оқиғамыз келтірілген тәжірибе эксперттердің жұмыс жүктеуді екі үшіншіден артық қысқартады, сондықтан СРЛ жазбаларының бағаларын сапалы жоғалуына көмект', 'ml': 'ക്രൌഡ്സോര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഒരു നിരവധി NLP ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് ലേബല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രായോഗ്യമായ രീതി എന്നാലും സെമാന്റിക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിക് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ-ലേബിള്\u200d ട്രെയിനിങ്ങ് ഡേറ്റാ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലനങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പോസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് SRL പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പൊതുവില്\u200d വിശേഷിപ്പുകാരുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കണമെന്നാണ്,  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ പരിശീലനത്തിലേക്കോ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനോ പ്രയാസപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളിലേക്കോ പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പരിശോധന നടപടികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് മൂന്നില്\u200d കുറവാക', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian ramai telah terbukti sebagai kaedah yang berkesan untuk menghasilkan data labeled untuk julat tugas NLP. Namun, pelbagai percubaan baru-baru ini untuk menggunakan crowdsourcing untuk menghasilkan data latihan berwarna emas untuk label peranan semantik (SRL) melaporkan hanya keputusan sederhana, menunjukkan bahawa SRL mungkin terlalu sukar untuk dikeluarkan secara efektif crowdsourcing. In this paper, we postulate that while producing SRL annotation does require expert involvement in general, a large subset of SRL labeling tasks is in fact appropriate for the crowd.  Kami memperkenalkan aliran kerja novel di mana kami menggunakan pengukur untuk mengenalpasti tugas annotasi yang sukar dan jalankan setiap tugas sama ada kepada pakar atau pekerja keramaian menurut kesulitan mereka. Pengesahan percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan mengurangkan muatan kerja para ahli-ahli dengan lebih dari dua pertiga, dan dengan itu mengurangkan secara signifikan kos menghasilkan anotasi SRL dengan sedikit kehilangan kualiti.', 'mt': "Il-crowdsourcing wera li huwa metodu effettiv għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ dejta ttikkettata għal firxa ta’ kompiti NLP. Madankollu, diversi tentattivi reċenti li jintużaw crowdsourcing biex tiġi ġġenerata dejta ta’ taħriġ bit-tikketta tad-deheb għat-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku (SRL) irrappurtaw biss riżultati modesti, li jindikaw li SRL huwa forsi diffiċli wisq biex jiġi effettivament crowdsourced. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nippreżulaw li filwaqt li nipproduċu l-annotazzjoni tal-SRL teħtieġ involviment espert b’mod ġenerali, sottosett kbir ta’ kompiti ta’ tikkettar tal-SRL huwa fil-fatt xieraq għall-popolazzjoni. Aħna nippreżentaw fluss tax-xogħol ġdid li fih nimpjegaw klassifikatur biex nidentifika kompiti diffiċli ta' annotazzjoni u nirrezzjonaw kull kompitu jew lejn esperti jew ħaddiema tal-massa skont id-diffikultajiet tagħhom. L-evalwazzjoni sperimentali tagħna turi li l-approċċ propost inaqqas il-piż tax-xogħol għall-esperti b’aktar minn żewġ terzi, u b’hekk inaqqas b’mod sinifikanti l-ispiża tal-produzzjoni tal-annotazzjoni SRL bi ftit telf fil-kwalità.", 'lt': 'Įrodyta, kad visuomenės ištekliai yra veiksmingas būdas rengti pažymėtus duomenis įvairioms NLP užduotims. Tačiau keletas pastarųjų pastarųjų bandymų panaudoti visuomenės išteklius, kad būtų sukurti aukso ženklinti mokymo duomenys semantiniam vaidmeniui ženklinti (SRL), parodė tik nedidelius rezultatus, o tai rodo, kad SRL gali būti pernelyg sunku veiksmingai panaudoti visuomenės išteklius. Šiame dokumente darome prielaidą, kad rengiant SRL anotaciją iš esmės reikalingas ekspertų dalyvavimas, tačiau didelė SRL ženklinimo užduotis iš tikrųjų tinka visuomenės atžvilgiu. Pateikiame naują darbo srautą, kuriame naudojame klasifikatorių, kad nustatytume sudėtingas anotacijos užduotis ir kiekvieną užduotį nukreiptume į ekspertus arba minių darbuotojus atsižvelgiant į jų sunkumus. Our experimental evaluation shows that the proposed approach reduces the workload for experts by over two-thirds, and thus significantly reduces the cost of producing SRL annotation at little loss in quality.', 'mk': 'Crowdsourcing has proven to be an effective method for generating labeled data for a range of NLP tasks.  Сепак, неколку неодамнешни обиди за користење на пулсорсинг за генерирање златни податоци за обука за семантичко означување на улогата (СРЛ) објавија само скромни резултати, индицирајќи дека СРЛ е можеби премногу тешка задача за ефикасно пулсорсирање. Во овој весник, претпоставуваме дека додека произведувањето на анатација на СРЛ бара експертска вмешаност генерално, голем подгруп задачи за означување на СРЛ всушност се соодветни за публиката. We present a novel workflow in which we employ a classifier to identify difficult annotation tasks and route each task either to experts or crowd workers according to their difficulties.  Нашата експериментална евалуација покажува дека предложениот пристап го намалува работниот товар за експертите за повеќе од две третини, и со тоа значително ги намалува трошоците за производство на анатација на СРЛ со мала загуба на квалитетот.', 'mn': 'Хоосон сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн нь NLP ажлын хэдэн хэсэгт нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийг бий болгох эффективны аргыг баталсан. Гэвч саяхан олон хүмүүсийн санхүүжилтийг ашиглах хичээл нь зөвхөн бага зэрэг үр дүнг зөвхөн бага зэрэг бага зэрэг зарцуулсан бөгөөд SRL хүмүүсийн санхүүжилтийн ажил хэтэрхий хэцүү байж магадгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид SRL нэр дэвшүүлэхэд мэргэжилтнүүдийн оролцоо ихэвчлэн хэрэгтэй гэдгийг хэлж байна. Бид шинэ ажлын урсгалыг тайлбарлаж, хэцүү сэтгэл хөдлөлийг тодорхойлж, ажил бүрийг эрдэмтэд эсвэл олон нийгмийн ажилтнуудыг тэдний хэцүү байдлаар зааж өгдөг. Бидний туршилтын оюун шалгалт нь санал өгсөн арга зам нь мэргэжилтнүүдийн ажиллагааг 2/3-аас илүү багасгаж байгааг харуулж байна. Иймээс хариултын үнэ цэнэтэй багасгаж болох СРЛ нээлт гаргах өртөг багасгаж', 'no': 'Crowdsourcing har bevist som ein effektiv metode for å laga merkelige data for eit område av NLP- oppgåver. Men fleire nyleg forsøk på å bruka crowdsourcing for å generera gullsmerket øvingsdata for semantisk rolletiketting (SRL) rapporterte berre minste resultat, som tyder på at SRL er kanskje for vanskeleg å vera effektivt crowdsourced. I denne papiret er vi postulert at medan det produserer SRL-notasjonen krev ekspertinvolvering generelt, er det faktisk eit stor undergruppe av SRL-merkelappar tilgjengeleg for folket. Vi presenterer eit nytt arbeidsfløys som vi bruker ein klassifiserer for å identifisera vanskeleg notasjonsoppgåver og rutera kvar oppgåve enten til ekspertar eller folkarbeidsgiver etter vanskeleghetane sine. Vårt eksperimentell evaluering viser at den foreslåde tilnærming reduserer arbeidslaget for ekspertar med over to tredjedeler, og derfor reduserer kostnaden til å produsere SRL-notasjon med lite tap i kvalitet.', 'pl': 'Crowdsourcing okazał się skuteczną metodą generowania etykietowanych danych dla szeregu zadań NLP. Jednak wiele ostatnich prób wykorzystania crowdsourcingu do generowania złotych danych szkoleniowych dla semantycznego oznaczania roli (SRL) przyniosło jedynie skromne wyniki, wskazując, że SRL jest być może zbyt trudnym zadaniem, aby skutecznie być crowdsourcing. W niniejszym artykule postulujemy, że chociaż produkcja adnotacji SRL wymaga ogólnego zaangażowania ekspertów, duży podzbiór zadań etykietowania SRL jest w rzeczywistości odpowiedni dla tłumu. Prezentujemy nowatorski przepływ pracy, w którym wykorzystujemy klasyfikator do identyfikacji trudnych zadań adnotacyjnych i kierujemy każde zadanie do ekspertów lub pracowników tłumu zgodnie z ich trudnościami. Nasza eksperymentalna ocena pokazuje, że proponowane podejście zmniejsza obciążenie ekspertów o ponad dwie trzecie, a tym samym znacznie obniża koszty produkcji adnotacji SRL przy niewielkiej stratie jakości.', 'ro': 'Crowdsourcing-ul s-a dovedit a fi o metodă eficientă pentru generarea de date etichetate pentru o serie de sarcini PNL. Cu toate acestea, mai multe încercări recente de a utiliza crowdsourcing pentru a genera date de instruire cu etichete aurii pentru etichetarea rolurilor semantice (SRL) au raportat doar rezultate modeste, indicând faptul că SRL este, probabil, o sarcină prea dificilă pentru a fi eficient crowdsourcing. În această lucrare, presupunem că deși producerea adnotării SRL necesită implicarea experților în general, un subset mare de sarcini de etichetare SRL este de fapt adecvat pentru mulțime. Vă prezentăm un nou flux de lucru în care angajăm un clasificator pentru a identifica sarcinile dificile de adnotare și pentru a direcționa fiecare sarcină fie către experți, fie către angajați în funcție de dificultățile lor. Evaluarea noastră experimentală arată că abordarea propusă reduce volumul de muncă al experților cu peste două treimi, reducând astfel semnificativ costul producerii adnotării SRL cu o mică pierdere de calitate.', 'si': 'Name නමුත්, සමාන්තික භාවිතය (SRL) ලේබලින් වෙනුවෙන් රත්තු ලේබලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ගොඩක් අතුරුදු උත්සාහ කරනවා කියලා, SRL ප්\u200dරශ් මේ පත්තරේ අපි පොස්ටල් කරනවා SRL නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් විශ්වාසිය සම්බන්ධතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා, SRL ලේබිල් ක අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා අමාරුයි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාවක් අඳුරගන් අපේ පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට විශ්වාසිකයෝ දෙන්නෙක් වඩා විශ්වාසිකයෝ වැඩ කරන', 'sr': 'Crowdsourcing je dokazao da je efikasna metoda za stvaranje označenih podataka za niz NLP zadataka. Međutim, višestruki nedavni pokušaji korištenja crowdsourcing za generiranje zlatnih podataka o obuci za etiketiranje semantičkih uloga (SRL) prijavili su samo skromne rezultate, ukazujući na to da je SRL možda previše težak zadatak za učinkovito usvajanje. U ovom papiru, objavljujemo da dok proizvodimo annotaciju SRL-a zahteva učešće stručnjaka općenito, velika podskupina zadataka označavanja SRL-a je u stvari odgovarajuća za gomilu. Predstavljamo nov tok rada u kojem zapošljavamo klasifikatora kako bi identifikovali teške zadatke za annotaciju i uputili svaki zadatak ili stručnjacima ili masovnim radnicima u skladu sa njihovim problemima. Naša eksperimentalna procjena pokazuje da predloženi pristup smanjuje radni teret ekspertima preko dve trećine, i stoga značajno smanjuje troškove proizvodnje annotacije SRL sa malo gubitka kvalitete.', 'so': 'Crowdsourcing waxay caddeysay inuu noqdo qaab faa’iido ah oo u sameynta macluumaad labeled oo ah shaqooyin badan oo NLP ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, jarrabo badan oo isticmaalaya isticmaalka dadweynaha si uu u sameeyo macluumaad waxbarasho oo dahab ah oo lagu qoray qoraalka semantic role labelinta (SRL) oo kaliya ayaa soo sheegay resulto fudud oo kaliya, waxayna caddaynaysaa in SRL ay tahay mid ugu adag shaqo uu si fircoon u noqdo. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa in marka aad soo saareyso ogeysiiska SRL waxay u baahan tahay in la wadaago khabiir gaar ah, shaqada laga soo bandhigayo SRL waxyaabo badan oo lagu qoro waa u habboon dadka. Waxaannu qabanaynaa safar shaqo oo warqad ah oo aan ku shaqaynayno si aan u caddeyno shaqooyin adag oo aan u wadno shaqo kasta oo khabiir ah ama shaqaalaha bulshada sida ay dhibaatooyinkoodu tahay. Qiimeynta baaritaanka ah waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday uu kharashka shaqada u hoosaysiiyo in ka badan labo saddex meelood oo meelood loo dhigay, sidaas darteed qiimaha soo saarista SRL waxyaabaha ugu yaraan khasaarada qiimaha.', 'ta': 'க்ரூட்sourceing has proved to be an effective method for generating labelled data for a range of NLP tasks. However, multiple recent attempts of using crowdsourcing to generate gold-labeled training data for semantic role labeling (SRL) reported only modest results, indicating that SRL is perhaps too difficult a task to be effectively crowdsourced.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், எஸ்ஆர்எல் அறிவிப்பு உருவாக்கும் போது சிறப்பான பங்கேற்பு தேவைப்படுகிறது, ஒரு பெரிய துணை SRL குறிப்பு பணிகள் மக்களுக நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய வேலை இயக்கம் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் அதில் நாம் ஒரு வகுப்பாளரை வேலை செய்கிறோம் கடினமான அறிவிப்பு பணிகளை அடையாளம் மற்றும்  நம்முடைய சோதனையின் மதிப்பெண்கள் தெரியும் முன்னிருப்பப்பட்ட செயல்பாடுகளுக்கு வேலை ஏற்பத்தை இரண்டு மூன்று முறை குறைக்கும், அதனால் தரத்', 'ur': 'Name However, several recent attempts to use crowdsourcing to generate gold-labeled training data for semantic role labeling (SRL) reported only modest results, indicating that SRL may be too difficult a task to be effectively crowdsourced. ہم اس کاغذ میں پوسٹل کرتے ہیں کہ SRL نوٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے عمومی مخصوص مشارکت کی ضرورت ہے، SRL کے ایک بڑے زیادہ سپٹ کے لابلینگ کاموں کے لئے حقیقت میں جماعت کے لئے مناسب ہے. ہم ایک نو کارفول کو پیش کرتے ہیں جس میں ہم ایک کلاسیر کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ مشکل اذیت کے کاموں کو پہچان سکیں اور ہر کام کو متخصص کرنے والوں یا گروہوں کے کاموں کو ان کی مشکلات کے مطابق راہ دکھائیں. ہماری آزمائش تحقیقات دکھاتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا دو تین سے زیادہ زیادہ تکلیف کے لئے کارلوڈ کو کم کر دیتا ہے اور اسی طرح اس کے ذریعہ سے SRL اظہار کرنے کا قیمت کم کر دیتا ہے۔', 'sv': 'Crowdsourcing har visat sig vara en effektiv metod för att generera märkta data för en rad NLP-uppgifter. Flera nyligen genomförda försök att använda crowdsourcing för att generera guldmärkta utbildningsdata för semantisk rollmärkning (SRL) rapporterade dock endast blygsamma resultat, vilket tyder på att SRL kanske är en alltför svår uppgift för att effektivt crowdsourcing ska kunna nås. I denna uppsats postulerar vi att även om produktionen av SRL-noteringar kräver expertengagemang i allmänhet, är en stor delmängd av SRL-märkningsuppgifter faktiskt lämplig för publiken. Vi presenterar ett nytt arbetsflöde där vi använder en klassificerare för att identifiera svåra noteringsuppgifter och dirigera varje uppgift antingen till experter eller crowd workers beroende på deras svårigheter. Vår experimentella utvärdering visar att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet minskar arbetsbelastningen för experter med över två tredjedelar och därmed avsevärt minskar kostnaden för att producera SRL-anteckningar med liten kvalitetsförlust.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bir necha marta ko'pchilik jamoatlarni ishlatish uchun, semantik role lab chiqarish (SRL) haqida qo'llanmalarni yaratish uchun bir necha jarayonlarni ishlatish uchun ko'pchilik jarayonlarini yaratish mumkin. Bu yerda SRL ishlab chiqarishi juda qiyin bo'lishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz SRL taʼminlovchisi yaratishda oddiy ekspert ishlashi kerak. Bu juda katta SRL taʼminlovchi vazifalar jamoasi uchun juda muhim. Biz bir novel ish orqali hozir qilamiz, bu yerda qiyin tajriba vazifalarni aniqlash uchun muammolar yoki bir vazifani boshqarish uchun boshqaruvchimiz. Our experimental evaluation shows that the proposed approach reduces the workload for experts by over two-thirds, and thus significantly reduces the cost of producing SRL annotation at little loss in quality.", 'vi': 'Tập đoàn tụ đã chứng minh đó là một phương pháp hiệu quả để tạo dữ liệu dán nhãn cho một loạt các công việc. Tuy nhiên, nhiều nỗ lực gần đây của việc sử dụng crodsouring để tạo dữ liệu huấn luyện bằng vàng cho mô phỏng các vai trò theo mặt phân biệt (SR) chỉ báo cáo những kết quả khiêm tốn, cho thấy rằng SR có lẽ là một nhiệm vụ quá khó để có thể được tụ điểm. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xác định rằng trong khi sản xuất bản ghi chú SDL yêu cầu sự tham gia chuyên gia chung, một nhóm lớn các nhiệm vụ phân loại SDL là rất phù hợp với đám đông. Chúng tôi đưa ra một hệ thống làm việc mới mà chúng tôi thuê một người phân loại để xác định các công việc chú thích khó khăn và giao mỗi nhiệm vụ cho chuyên gia hoặc đám nhân viên đông dựa theo những khó khăn của họ. Xét nghiệm thử nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp đề xuất làm giảm công việc của các chuyên gia hơn hai phần ba, và làm giảm đáng kể chi phí sản xuất ghi chú SSR với mức độ thấp về chất lượng.', 'bg': 'Кроудсорсинга се доказа като ефективен метод за генериране на етикетирани данни за редица задачи от НЛП. Въпреки това, многобройните скорошни опити за използване на crowdsourcing за генериране на златни данни за обучение за семантично етикетиране на роли (SRL) отчитат само скромни резултати, което показва, че SRL може би е твърде трудна задача, за да бъде ефективно crowdsourcing. В тази статия постулираме, че докато производството на анотация изисква експертно участие като цяло, голяма част от задачите за етикетиране на СРЛ всъщност е подходяща за тълпата. Представяме нов работен поток, в който използваме класификатор, за да идентифицираме трудните задачи за анотация и да насочваме всяка задача към експерти или тълпата работници според техните трудности. Нашата експериментална оценка показва, че предложеният подход намалява натоварването на експертите с над две трети и по този начин значително намалява разходите за производство на анотация при малка загуба на качество.', 'nl': 'Crowdsourcing heeft bewezen een effectieve methode te zijn voor het genereren van gelabelde data voor een reeks NLP-taken. Meerdere recente pogingen om crowdsourcing te gebruiken om goud gelabelde trainingsgegevens te genereren voor semantische rollabeling (SRL) meldden echter slechts bescheiden resultaten, wat erop wijst dat SRL misschien te moeilijk is om effectief crowdsourced te worden. In dit artikel postuleren we dat hoewel het produceren van SRL annotatie in het algemeen deskundige betrokkenheid vereist, een grote subset van SRL labeling taken in feite geschikt is voor de menigte. We presenteren een nieuwe workflow waarin we een classificator gebruiken om moeilijke annotatietaken te identificeren en elke taak naar experts of crowdworkers te leiden volgens hun moeilijkheden. Uit onze experimentele evaluatie blijkt dat de voorgestelde aanpak de werklast voor experts met meer dan twee derde vermindert, en daarmee de kosten voor het produceren van SRL-annotatie aanzienlijk verlaagt bij weinig kwaliteitsverlies.', 'da': 'Crowdsourcing har vist sig at være en effektiv metode til generering af mærkede data til en række NLP-opgaver. Adskillige nylige forsøg på at bruge crowdsourcing til at generere guldmærkede træningsdata til semantisk rollemærkning (SRL) rapporterede imidlertid kun beskedne resultater, hvilket indikerer, at SRL måske er en for vanskelig opgave til effektivt crowdsourcing. I denne artikel antager vi, at selvom fremstilling af SRL-annoteringer generelt kræver ekspertindvikling, er en stor del af SRL-mærkningsopgaver faktisk passende for publikum. Vi præsenterer en ny arbejdsgang, hvor vi ansætter en klassificerer til at identificere vanskelige annoteringsopgaver og dirigere hver opgave enten til eksperter eller crowd medarbejdere i henhold til deres vanskeligheder. Vores eksperimentelle evaluering viser, at den foreslåede fremgangsmåde reducerer arbejdsbyrden for eksperter med over to tredjedele, og dermed reducerer omkostningerne ved fremstilling af SRL annotation betydeligt med ringe kvalitetstab.', 'hr': 'Crowdsourcing je dokazao da je učinkovit metod proizvedenja označenih podataka za nizak NLP zadataka. Međutim, višestruki nedavni pokušaji koristiti crowdsourcing kako bi stvorili podatke o obuci označenim zlatom za etiketiranje semantičkih uloga (SRL) prijavili su samo skromne rezultate, ukazujući na to da je SRL možda previše težak zadatak za učinkovito usmjeren. U ovom papiru, objavljujemo da, dok proizvodnja oznake SRL-a zahtijeva učešće stručnjaka općenito, velika podskupina zadataka oznake SRL-a zapravo je prikladna za gomilu. Predstavljamo nov radni tok u kojem zapošljavamo klasifikatora kako bi identifikovali teške zadatke za annotaciju i putovali svaki zadatak stručnjacima ili masovnim radnicima u skladu s njihovim poteškoćama. Naša eksperimentalna procjena pokazuje da predloženi pristup smanjuje radnu opterećenost stručnjaka za više od dvije trećine, te stoga značajno smanjuje troškove proizvodnje oznake SRL-a na manji gubitak kvalitete.', 'de': 'Crowdsourcing hat sich als effektive Methode zur Generierung von markierten Daten für eine Reihe von NLP-Aufgaben erwiesen. Mehrere neuere Versuche, Crowdsourcing zur Generierung von goldfarbenen Trainingsdaten für die semantische Rollenbeschriftung (SRL) zu nutzen, zeigten jedoch nur bescheidene Ergebnisse, was darauf hindeutet, dass SRL möglicherweise eine zu schwierige Aufgabe ist, um effektiv Crowdsourcing zu betreiben. In diesem Artikel postulieren wir, dass die Erstellung von SRL-Annotation zwar generell eine fachkundige Beteiligung erfordert, eine große Teilmenge von SRL-Beschriftungsaufgaben jedoch für die Crowd geeignet ist. Wir präsentieren einen neuartigen Workflow, in dem wir einen Klassifikator einsetzen, um schwierige Annotationsaufgaben zu identifizieren und jede Aufgabe entsprechend ihrer Schwierigkeiten entweder an Experten oder Crowdworker weiterzuleiten. Unsere experimentelle Auswertung zeigt, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz den Arbeitsaufwand für Experten um über zwei Drittel reduziert und damit die Kosten für die Erstellung von SRL-Annotationen bei geringem Qualitätsverlust signifikant reduziert.', 'id': 'Crowdsourcing telah terbukti sebagai metode efektif untuk menghasilkan data yang ditabel untuk jangkauan tugas NLP. Namun, beberapa percobaan baru-baru ini untuk menggunakan crowdsourcing untuk menghasilkan data pelatihan berwarna emas untuk label peran semantis (SRL) melaporkan hanya hasil sederhana, menunjukkan bahwa SRL mungkin terlalu sulit untuk secara efektif crowdsourced. Dalam kertas ini, kami menduga bahwa sementara memproduksi anotasi SRL membutuhkan keterlibatan ahli secara umum, sebuah subset besar tugas label SRL sebenarnya cocok untuk kerumunan. Kami mempersembahkan aliran kerja novel di mana kami menggunakan klasifikasi untuk mengidentifikasi tugas anotasi sulit dan rute setiap tugas baik kepada ahli atau pekerja keramaian menurut kesulitan mereka. Evaluasi eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan mengurangi beban kerja para ahli dengan lebih dari dua pertiga, dan dengan itu mengurangi dengan signifikan biaya produksi anotasi SRL dengan sedikit kehilangan kualitas.', 'fa': 'Crowdsourcing ثابت کرده است که یک روش موثری برای تولید داده\u200cهای برچسب برای مجموعه کارهای NLP است. ولی تلاش های اخیر اخیر از استفاده از سرمایه گذاری جمعیت برای تولید داده های آموزشی با برچسب طلا برای برچسب نقش semantic (SRL) فقط نتیجه\u200cهای ناتوانی را گزارش دادند، که نشان می\u200cدهند که شاید SRL یک کار بسیار سخت است تا به طور موثرت به سوی جمعیت برس در این کاغذ، ما فرستادیم که در حالی که تولید نویسندگی SRL نیاز به مشارکت متخصص در کل است، یک دسته بزرگ از مسائل نویسندگی SRL در واقع برای جمعیت مناسب است. ما یک جریان کار نویسی را پیشنهاد می کنیم که در آن از یک سرپرست استفاده می کنیم تا کارهای مشکلی را شناسایی کند و هر کاری را به متخصص یا کارگران جمعیت بر اساس مشکلات آنها هدایت کنیم. ارزیابی آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که این روش پیشنهاد بار کار برای متخصص را بیش از دو سوم کاهش می دهد، و بنابراین هزینه های تولید نویسند SRL را با کمی از دست دادن کیفیت کاهش می دهد.', 'ko': '클러스터백은 일련의 NLP 작업에 대해 태그 데이터를 생성하는 효과적인 방법으로 증명되었습니다.그러나 최근 여러 차례 크라우드백을 의미 캐릭터 표시(SRL)로 황금 표시를 만드는 교육 데이터를 사용해 보았지만 결과가 제한적이었다. 이는 SRL이 효과적인 크라우드백을 실현하기 어려울 수 있음을 보여준다.본고에서 우리는 SRL 주석을 생성하는 데 전문가의 참여가 필요하지만 SRL 표기 임무의 상당 부분은 실제적으로 사람들에게 적합하다고 가정한다.우리는 새로운 업무 절차를 제시했다. 그 중에서 우리는 분류기를 사용하여 어려운 주석 임무를 식별하고 전문가나 그룹 직원들의 어려움에 따라 모든 임무를 그들에게 전달한다.우리의 실험 평가에 따르면 제시된 방법은 전문가의 작업량을 3분의 2 이상 줄여 SRL 주석 생성 비용을 현저히 낮추었지만 품질 손실은 매우 적었다.', 'sw': 'Chanzo cha Crowdsources kimekwisha kuwa njia yenye ufanisi wa kutengeneza takwimu zilizoonyeshwa kwa kazi nyingi za NLP. Hata hivyo, jaribio kadhaa za hivi karibuni za kutumia vyanzo vya umma kwa ajili ya kutengeneza taarifa za mafunzo ya dhahabu kwa ajili ya maarufu ya kimapenzi (SRL) iliripoti matokeo madogo tu, zinazoonyesha kwamba SRL labda ni vigumu sana kufanya kazi ya watu kuwezeshwa kwa ufanisi. In this paper, we postulate that while producing SRL annotation does require expert involvement in general, a large subset of SRL labeling tasks is in fact appropriate for the crowd.  Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu za kazi za riwaya ambazo tunatumia mwandishi wa kutambua kazi ngumu za matatizo na kuwapeleka kila kazi au kuwapa wataalam au wafanyakazi wa umma kwa mujibu wa matatizo yao. Utafiti wetu wa majaribio unaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa kupunguza kazi kwa wataalam kwa zaidi ya theluthi mbili, na hivyo kupunguza gharama za kutengeneza uchunguzi wa SRL kwa kupoteza kwa kiwango kidogo.', 'sq': 'Crowdsourcing ka provuar të jetë një metodë efektive për krijimin e të dhënave të etiketuara për një gamë detyrash NLP. Megjithatë, përpjekjet e shumta të fundit për përdorimin e crowdsourcing për të gjeneruar të dhëna të trajnimit me etiketë të artë për etiketën semantike të rolit (SRL) njoftuan vetëm rezultate modeste, duke treguar se SRL është ndoshta tepër e vështirë për të qenë efektivisht crowdsourcing. Në këtë letër, postulojmë se ndërsa prodhimi i anotacionit SRL kërkon përfshirje eksperte në përgjithësi, një nëngrup i madh detyrash të etiketave SRL është në fakt i përshtatshëm për turmën. Ne paraqesim një rrjedhje të re pune në të cilën ne përdorim një klasifikues për të identifikuar detyrat e vështira të anotacionit dhe për të udhëtuar çdo detyrë ose tek ekspertët ose punonjësit e turmës sipas vështirësive të tyre. Our experimental evaluation shows that the proposed approach reduces the workload for experts by over two-thirds, and thus significantly reduces the cost of producing SRL annotation at little loss in quality.', 'tr': "Gatuşmak NLP täblisasi üçin etitlenýän maglumatlary janlaşdyrmak üçin etkinlik bir yön döredi. Ýöne, semantik rol etiketlemesi üçin köp sanat harplaryny ulanmak üçin köp sanat synanyşynyň (SRL) diňe örän kiçi netijeleri bilen a ýdypdyr we SRL'iň gaty kyn zady etmäge mümkin edip bilýär. Bu kagyzda, biz SRL duýdury üretýän wagtynda ukyplaryň umumy tarapynda ukyplaryň gatnaşmasyny gerek bolandygyny düşünýäris. Biz täze bir täze işgäri tanamak üçin klassifikatçi işgäri ulanýarys we her işi uzmanlaryň ýa-da kalamlar işgärlerine görýäris. Biziň synanyşymyz çykyşymyz muny teklip eden ýagdaýyň uzmanlaryň töwereginiň 2/3 üstünden ýokary azaltýandygyny görkezýär we şonuň üçin SRL duýdurmanyň töweregini kiçi ýok bolmagyny azaltýar.", 'am': 'Crowdsourcing has proved to be an effective method for creating labeled data for several NLP tasks. ነገር ግን ከቅርብ ዘመን በመጠቀም የብዙsources በመጠቀም የወርቅ-labeled የድምፅ ማህበረሰብ ዳታዎችን ለsemantic role labeling (SRL) የሚጠቅሙት ፍሬዎችን ብቻ ቀላል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ SRL ማስታወቂያውን በመፍጠር ጊዜ አስተማሪዎችን ማግባት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የአሁኑን ሥራ ፈተና እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ፈተናውን ድምፅ የሚያሳየው ተፈቃዱ የሁለት ሶስተኛ ክፍል የሚያሳድገው የሥራ አካሄዱን ያጎድላል፡፡', 'af': "Name Maar, veelvuldige onlangse probeers van die gebruik van skare-sourcing om goud-etiketeerde onderwerp data te genereer vir semantiese roletiketting (SRL) het slegs modeste resultate berig, aanduidelik dat SRL miskien te moeilik is 'n taak om effektief skare te wees. In hierdie papier, ons postuleer dat terwyl die produksie van SRL annotasie benodig ekspertiese insluitering in die algemeen, 'n groot subartikel van SRL etiketting opdragte is in werklikheid geskik vir die skare. Ons stel 'n nuwe werksvloei waarin ons 'n klassifiseerder gebruik om moeilike annotasie opdragte te identifiseer en elke taak of na eksperte of skare werkers te raai volgens hulle moeilikhede. Ons eksperimentale evaluasie wys dat die voorgestelde toegang die werkdraad vir eksperiërs met meer twee derde verduur, en dus betekenlik verduur die koste van die produksie van SRL annotasie by klein verlies in kwaliteit.", 'hy': 'Հաշխարհային ռեսուրսինգը ապացուցել է, որ արդյունավետ մեթոդն է, որպեսզի ստեղծվի նշանակված տվյալներ մի շարք ՆԼՊ խնդիրների համար: However, multiple recent attempts of using crowdsourcing to generate gold-labeled training data for semantic role labeling (SRL) reported only modest results, indicating that SRL is perhaps too difficult a task to be effectively crowdsourced.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ մինչ արտադրելով ՍՌԼ նոտացիա անհրաժեշտ է մասնագետների ներգրավման ընդհանուր առմամբ, ՍՌԼ-ի պիտակավորման խնդիրների մեծ ենթախումբը իրականում համապատասխանում է ժողովրդին Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր աշխատանքի հոսք, որտեղ մենք օգտագործում ենք դասակարգչի, որպեսզի բացահայտենք դժվար annoտացիոն խնդիրները և ուղղորդենք յուրաքանչյուր խնդիր կամ մասնագետների, կամ ժողովրդի աշխատակիցների հետ կապված իրեն Մեր փորձարկվող գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկած մոտեցումը նվազեցնում է մասնագետների աշխատանքային ծանրությունը ավելի քան երկու երրորդով, և այսպես նշանակալի նվազեցնում է արտադրության արտադրման արժեքը, որակի քիչ կորու', 'az': 'Crowdsourcing NLP işləri üçün etiketli məlumatlar yaratmaq üçün effektiv bir yöntem olduğunu kanıtladı. Lakin, semantik rol etiketi (SRL) üçün qızıl etiketli təhsil məlumatlarını yaratmaq üçün çoxlu yeni təhsil istifadə etmək üçün çoxlu sınaqlar təhsil etdi ki, SRL təhsil edilmək üçün çox çətin bir iş olduğunu göstərdi. Bu kağıtda, biz təbliğ edirik ki, SRL annotasyonu ürəkləndirmək üçün müxtəlif məlumatların genel iştirağı lazımdır, çox böyük SRL etiketləndirmək işlərinin əslində qövmün üçün uyğun olması lazımdır. Biz yeni bir çalışma akışını göstəririk ki, sıxıntılı bir işçi istifadə edirik və hər işi yoxlayaraq müsafirlərə ya da qüvvətli çalışanlara göndəririk. Bizim təcrübəmiz təcrübəmiz göstərir ki, bu təcrübəmiz təcrübəsi ekspertlər üçün çalışma yükünü iki üçüncü ilə azaldırır, və buna görə də CVL təcrübəsinin maliyetini azaldırır.', 'bs': 'Crowdsourcing je dokazao da je efikasna metoda za stvaranje označenih podataka za niz NLP zadataka. Međutim, višestruki nedavni pokušaji koristiti crowdsourcing kako bi stvorili podatke o obuci označenim zlatom za etiketiranje semantičkih uloga (SRL) prijavili su samo skromne rezultate, ukazujući na to da je SRL možda previše težak zadatak za učinkovito usmjeren. U ovom papiru, objavljujemo da, dok proizvodnja annotacije SRL-a zahtijeva učešće stručnjaka općenito, velika podskupina zadataka označavanja SRL-a zapravo je prikladna za gomilu. Predstavljamo nov tok rada u kojem zapošljavamo klasifikatora kako bi identifikovali teške zadatke za annotaciju i uputili svaki zadatak ili stručnjacima ili masovnim radnicima u skladu s njihovim poteškoćama. Naša eksperimentalna procjena pokazuje da predloženi pristup smanjuje radni teret ekspertima preko dvije trećine, i stoga značajno smanjuje troškove proizvodnje annotacije SRL-a na manji gubitak kvalitete.', 'ca': "La crowdsourcing ha demostrat ser un mètode eficaç per generar dades etiquetades per a una gama de tasques NLP. Tanmateix, múltiples intents recents d'utilitzar crowdsourcing per generar dades d'entrenament etiquetades d'or per etiquetar rols semàntics (SRL) només van informar de resultats modests, indicant que SRL potser és massa difícil d'aconseguir efectivament crowdsourcing. En aquest paper, postulem que mentre produeixen anotació SRL requereix la participació d'experts en general, un gran subconjunt de tasques d'etiquetar SRL és de fet apropiat per a la multitud. Presentam un nou flux de treball en el qual utilitzem un classificador per identificar tasques difícils d'anotació i dirigir cada tasca tant a experts com a treballadors de multitud segons les seves dificultats. La nostra evaluació experimental mostra que l'enfocament proposat redueix la càrrega de treball dels experts en més de dos terços, i així redueix significativament el cost de produir anotació SRL amb poca pèrdua de qualitat.", 'cs': 'Crowdsourcing se ukázal jako efektivní metoda generování označených dat pro řadu úloh NLP. Nicméně, několik nedávných pokusů o využití crowdsourcingu k generování zlatě označených tréninkových dat pro sémantické označování rolí (SRL) vykazovalo pouze skromné výsledky, což naznačuje, že SRL je možná příliš obtížný úkol na to, aby byl efektivně crowdsourcing. V tomto článku předpokládáme, že zatímco produkce anotace SRL vyžaduje obecně odborné zapojení, velká podmnožina úloh značení SRL je ve skutečnosti vhodná pro dav. Představujeme nový pracovní postup, ve kterém používáme klasifikátor k identifikaci obtížných anotací úkolů a směrování každého úkolu na odborníky nebo crowd workery podle jejich obtíží. Naše experimentální hodnocení ukazuje, že navržený přístup snižuje pracovní zátěž odborníků o více než dvě třetiny, a tím výrazně snižuje náklady na výrobu SRL anotace při malé ztrátě kvality.', 'fi': 'Joukkorakennus on osoittautunut tehokkaaksi menetelmäksi merkitäyn datan tuottamiseen moniin NLP-tehtäviin. Kuitenkin useat viimeaikaiset yritykset käyttää joukkoistamista kultamerkityn koulutustiedon tuottamiseen semanttista roolimerkintää varten (SRL) tuottivat vain vaatimattomia tuloksia, mikä osoittaa, että SRL on ehkä liian vaikea tehtävä, jotta sitä voitaisiin tehokkaasti joukkoistamaan. Tässä artikkelissa oletamme, että vaikka SRL-merkinnän tuottaminen vaatii asiantuntijoiden osallistumista yleisesti, suuri osa SRL-merkintätehtävistä on itse asiassa sopiva yleisölle. Esittelemme uudenlaisen työnkulun, jossa käytämme luokittelijaa tunnistamaan vaikeat merkinnät ja ohjaamaan jokaisen tehtävän joko asiantuntijoille tai joukkotyöntekijöille heidän vaikeuksiensa mukaan. Kokeellinen arviointi osoittaa, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa vähentää asiantuntijoiden työmäärää yli kahdella kolmasosalla ja vähentää siten merkittävästi SRL-merkinnän tuottamisen kustannuksia vähäisellä laadulla.', 'et': 'Ühisturundus on osutunud tõhusaks meetodiks märgistatud andmete genereerimiseks mitmesuguste NLP ülesannete jaoks. Mitmed hiljutised katsed ühishankimise kasutamiseks kuldmärgistatud koolitusandmete genereerimiseks semantilise rollimärgistuse jaoks andsid siiski vaid tagasihoidlikud tulemused, mis viitavad sellele, et ühishankimine on ehk liiga raske ülesanne, et seda tõhusalt ühishankida. Käesolevas dokumendis oletame, et kuigi SRL-i märgistamise tootmine nõuab ekspertide kaasamist üldiselt, on suur osa SRL-i märgistamisülesannetest tegelikult rahvahulgale sobiv. Tutvustame uudset töövoogu, kus kasutame klassifitseerijat raskete annoteerimistegevuste tuvastamiseks ja iga ülesande suunamiseks kas ekspertidele või rahvatöötajatele vastavalt nende raskustele. Meie eksperimentaalne hindamine näitab, et kavandatud lähenemisviis vähendab ekspertide töökoormust enam kui kahe kolmandiku võrra ja vähendab seega märkimisväärselt SRL annotatsiooni tootmise kulusid vähese kvaliteedikaotusega.', 'bn': 'ক্রাউডসোর্সিং একটি কার্যকর পদ্ধতি হিসেবে প্রমাণ করেছে এনএলপি কাজের জন্য লেবেল ডাটা তৈরি করার জন্য। তবে সাম্প্রতিক কিছু প্রচেষ্টার চেষ্টা করা হয়েছে যাতে স্বর্ণ-লেবেলেড প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য তৈরি করার জন্য (এসআরএল) সংবাদ প্রদান করেছে শুধুমাত্র সাধারণ ভূমিকা লেবে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পোস্ট করেছি যে এসআরএল বিজ্ঞাপন উৎপাদন করার সময় সাধারণত বিশেষজ্ঞদের সাথে অংশগ্রহণের প্রয়োজন, এসআরএল ল্যাবেলিং কাজের একটি বিশা আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের কাজের প্রবাহ উপস্থাপন করছি যেখানে আমরা এক বিশেষজ্ঞ কাজ চিহ্নিত করি এবং তাদের সমস্যার অনুযায়ী বিশেষজ্ঞ বা জনগণের কাছে কা আমাদের পরীক্ষার মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি দুই তৃতীয়াংশের মাধ্যমে বিশেষজ্ঞের জন্য কার্যলোড কমিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে এবং তাই এসআরএল ব', 'jv': 'checkbox politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngeremut kanggo ngelarang cara-cara nggunakake srl iki dadi supar nggawe cara-cara nggawe barang nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara-cara ng Awak dhéwé éntuk ingkang dolanan sing nggawe kesempatan kanggo nggawe kesempatan tentang karo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe ngubah apakno Tarjamahan sing perusahaan anyar tentang ngomong nik nggawe geranggap perusahaan negoro perusahaan kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan duwé, lan ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngelarang langkung wih sabanjuré.', 'he': 'הוכחה שהקרב הוא שיטה יעילה לייצור נתונים מסומנים לטווח של משימות NLP. בכל אופן, ניסיונות רבות לאחרונה להשתמש במקורי קהל כדי ליצור נתוני אימון עם תווית זהב לתווית תפקידים סמנטיים (SRL) דיווחו רק על תוצאות צנועות, שמצביעים שאולי SRL הוא משימה קשה מדי כדי להיות מקובל בצורה יעילה קהל. בעיתון הזה, אנו משערים שבזמן שיוצר ציון SRL דורש מעורבות מומחית בכלל, תת-קבוצה גדולה של משימות ציון SRL היא למעשה מתאימה לקהל. אנחנו מציגים זרם עבודה חדש בו אנו משתמשים בכיתה כדי לזהות משימות ציונים קשות ומסלול כל משימה או למומחים או לעובדים הקהל לפי קשותיהם. Our experimental evaluation shows that the proposed approach reduces the workload for experts by over two-thirds, and thus significantly reduces the cost of producing SRL annotation at little loss in quality.', 'sk': 'Crowdsourcing se je izkazal za učinkovito metodo za ustvarjanje označenih podatkov za vrsto nalog NLP. Vendar pa so več nedavnih poskusov uporabe množičnega nabora za ustvarjanje zlatih podatkov o usposabljanju za semantično označevanje vlog (SRL) poročali le o skromnih rezultatih, kar kaže, da je SRL morda preveč težka naloga, da bi bila učinkovita množična nabava. V tem članku predpostavljamo, da čeprav proizvodnja označevanja SRL na splošno zahteva strokovno sodelovanje, je velik podsklop nalog označevanja SRL dejansko primeren za množico. Predstavljamo nov potek dela, v katerem uporabljamo klasifikator za prepoznavanje težavnih nalog označevanja in usmerjanje vsake naloge bodisi strokovnjakom bodisi množičnim delavcem glede na njihove težave. Naša eksperimentalna ocena kaže, da predlagani pristop zmanjšuje delovno obremenitev strokovnjakov za več kot dve tretjini in tako znatno zmanjšuje stroške izdelave oznak SRL z majhno izgubo kakovosti.', 'ha': "Source A lokacin da aka yi amfani da wasu jarrabo masu ƙaranci da umarni don su ƙiƙira data na shiryarwa na zĩnãriya da aka rubũta na rubutu na semantic role (SRL) da aka sanar da fassarar al'amarra kawai masu nadãma, sunã nũna cewa SRL mai yiwuwa ne mai ƙunci a aikin da za'a kasance mai amfani da umarnin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙayyade cẽwa, a lokacin da ake fitar da zanar SRL, yana bukãta masu husũma da jumla, jama'a, jama'a, jama'ar jama'a mai girma na musamman aikin SRL na gaske ne ga umam. Tuna gabatar da wani mai aiki na yanzu wanda Muke aiki wani mai fassarawa a cikinsa dõmin su gane aikin zartar da kuma mu shiryu kowace aiki zuwa masu fitarwa ko jama'a ko jama'a ko kuma don su sami mutane kamar da suka shige su. Ana ƙaddara masu jarrabi na nũna cẽwa, hanyarMu wanda aka ƙaddara yana ƙarantar aikin na masu fitarwa da taki biyu na uku, kuma yana ƙarantar aikin ta ƙara hasãra na SRL da hasãra mai nauyi.", 'bo': 'Crowdsourcing has proven to be an effective method for generating labeled data for a range of NLP tasks. However, multiple recent attempts of using crowdsourcing to generate gold-labeled training data for semantic role labeling (SRL) reported only modest results, indicating that SRL is perhaps too difficult a task to be effectively crowdsourced. In this paper, we postulate that while producing SRL annotation does require expert involvement in general, a large subset of SRL labeling tasks is in fact appropriate for the crowd. ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱོད་པ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་འཛིན་གྱི་འཛིན་སྐྱོད་པ་ཞིག་ལས་གནད་མེད་སྟོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་མིང་རེ་ར ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ན་འོང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་འགན་གཉིས་ལས་ཉུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་ཚོར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ཉུང་བར་ཉུང་'}
{'en': 'Earth Mover’s Distance Minimization for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction', 'ar': 'محرك الأرض لتقليل المسافة من أجل تحريض المعجم ثنائي اللغة غير الخاضع للإشراف', 'es': 'Minimización de distancia de Earth Mover para la inducción de léxico bilingüe no supervisada', 'fr': "Minimisation de la distance de Earth Mover pour l'introduction d'un lexique bilingue non supervisé", 'pt': 'Minimização de distância do Earth Mover para indução de léxico bilíngue não supervisionado', 'ja': '無監督バイリンガル辞書誘導のためのアースムーバーの距離最小化', 'zh': '地球移动器在无监督双语词典归中距最小化', 'ru': 'Минимизация расстояния землетрясения для индукции неконтролируемого двуязычного лексикона', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण के लिए पृथ्वी मूवर की दूरी न्यूनीकरण', 'ga': "Íoslaghdú Caidrimh Earth Mover d'Ionduchtú Foclóir Dátheangach Gan Maoirseacht", 'ka': 'მინიმიზაცია სამყარო მოძრაობელი განსხვავება არ განსხვავებული მექსიკონის ინდექციისთვის', 'hu': 'Föld mozgató távolságának minimalizálása a felügyelet nélküli kétnyelvű Lexikon indukció érdekében', 'kk': 'Жергілікті жылжытушысының қашықтығын шегіндіру', 'el': 'Ελαχιστοποίηση απόστασης του μετακινητή Γης για μη εποπτευόμενη δίγλωσση επαγωγή λεξικού', 'it': 'Minimizzazione della distanza del movimento terrestre per induzione lessicale bilingue non sorvegliata', 'ml': "Earth Mover's Distance Minimization for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction", 'mt': 'Minimizzazzjoni tad-Distanza tal-Movitur tad-Dinja għall-Induzzjoni Bilinguali tal-Lexicon Mhux Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн хөдөлгөөнүүдийн хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондоо багасгах', 'ms': 'Minimumkan Jarak Pemindah Bumi untuk Induksi Lexikon Bilingual Tidak Dikawal', 'lt': 'Žemės judančiojo nuotolio mažinimas nekontroliuojamai dvikalbei leksikono indukcijai', 'mk': 'Минимизација на далечината на земјскиот движач за ненадгледувана двогласна индукција на лексикони', 'pl': 'Minimalizacja odległości Earth Mover dla niekontrolowanej dwujęzycznej indukcji leksykonu', 'no': 'Minimalisering av avstanden til jordflyttaren for ikkje-oppretta bølgjande leksjonsinduksjon', 'ro': 'Minimizarea distanței mișcătorului Pământului pentru inducția lexiconică bilingvă nesupravegheată', 'sr': 'Minimizacija udaljenosti Zemljskog pokretača za neodržavanu dvostruku leksiju', 'so': "Minimization of Earth's Distance for Unsupervised Bilingual Lexicon Induction", 'sv': 'Jordförflyttningens distansminimering för oövervakad tvåspråkig Lexikoninduktion', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத பில்லிங்கல் லெக்சிகோன் காட்சிக்கான பூமி நகர்த்தி தூரத்தை சிறிதாக்குதல்', 'ur': 'زمین حرکت کرنے والے کی فاصلہ ناپاکیزہ دوئینگ لکسیسون انڈاکشن کے لئے ناپاکیزہ کرنا', 'si': 'පෘථිවිය යාළුවාගේ දුරස්ථානය ප්\u200dරමාණය නැති ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ phân chia xa phổ biến của Người Trái Đất Động đậy', 'bg': 'Намаляване на разстоянието на земния движещ се механизъм за неконтролирана двуезична индукция на лексикона', 'nl': 'Afstand minimaliseren van Earth Mover voor niet-beheerde tweetalige Lexicon Inductie', 'da': 'Jordbevægelsens afstand minimering for ukontrolleret tosproget Lexikoninduktion', 'de': 'Distanzminimierung durch Earth Mover für die nicht überwachte zweisprachige Lexikon-Induktion', 'hr': 'Minimizacija udaljenosti zemaljskog pokretača za neodržavanu dvostruku leksiju', 'id': 'Minimisasi Jarak Pemindah Bumi untuk Induksi Lexikon Bilingual Tidak Disupervisi', 'fa': 'فاصله حرکتگر زمینی کمینه\u200cسازی برای تأثیر درمانی دوگانه\u200cای', 'ko': '무감독 이중 언어 사전 귀납 중의 토목 공사 거리 최소화', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የደረጃ ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Minimizimi i Distancës s ë Lëvizësit të Tokës për Induktimin e Lexikonëve Dygjuhës të Pambikqyrur', 'sw': 'Kupungua Ukosefu wa Ukosefu wa Ukumbuzi wa Dunia kwa ajili ya Muundo wa Lexico asiyefuatiliwa kwa lugha za Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Dünýäniň göçmeniň azalyşygy Dört Gaýşartmaýan iň kiçi/beýikligi', 'az': 'Yer hərəkətçisinin uzaqlaşışını müəyyən edilməmiş İkinci Leksiyon Induksyonu üçün Minimalizasyon', 'bn': 'বিলিঙ্গুয়াল লেক্সিকোন নির্দেশনার জন্য পৃথিবী মোভারের দূরত্ব নিম্নলিসেশন', 'ca': "Minimització de la Distancia del Movedor de la Terra per a l'Inducció de Lexicòns Bilingual s sense supervisió", 'et': 'Maaliikuri kauguse minimeerimine järelevalveta kahekeelse leksikoni induktsiooni jaoks', 'hy': 'Երկրի շարժման հեռավորության նվազեցնելը անվերահսկված երկլեզու լեքսիկոնի ինդուկցիայի համար', 'cs': 'Minimalizace vzdálenosti Earth Mover pro indukci dvojjazyčného Lexikonu bez kontroly', 'fi': "Earth Mover's Distance Minimization for Valvontaton kaksikielinen Lexicon Induction", 'bs': 'Minimizacija udaljenosti zemaljskog pokretača za neodržavanu dvostruku leksiju', 'jv': 'Distance', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מינימיזציה מרחק של מעבר כדור הארץ לתכנית לקסיקון משולשת ללא השגחה', 'sk': 'Minimizacija razdalje zemeljskega gibalnika za neobzorovano dvojezično indukcijo leksikonov', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་བར་ཐག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱིས་ཉར་གསུང་མེད་པའི་ཟུར་ཐག'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual natural language processing hinges on the premise that there exists invariance across languages. At the word level, researchers have identified such invariance in the word embedding semantic spaces of different languages. However, in order to connect the separate spaces, cross-lingual supervision encoded in parallel data is typically required. In this paper, we attempt to establish the cross-lingual connection without relying on any cross-lingual supervision. By viewing word embedding spaces as distributions, we propose to minimize their earth mover’s distance, a measure of divergence between distributions. We demonstrate the success on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task. In addition, we reveal an interesting finding that the earth mover’s distance shows potential as a measure of language difference.', 'ar': 'تتوقف معالجة اللغات الطبيعية عبر اللغات على فرضية وجود ثبات عبر اللغات. على مستوى الكلمات ، حدد الباحثون مثل هذا الثبات في كلمة تضمين المساحات الدلالية للغات مختلفة. ومع ذلك ، من أجل توصيل المساحات المنفصلة ، يلزم عادةً الإشراف عبر اللغات المشفر في بيانات متوازية. في هذه الورقة ، نحاول إنشاء اتصال عبر اللغات دون الاعتماد على أي إشراف عبر اللغات. من خلال عرض مسافات تضمين الكلمات كتوزيعات ، نقترح تقليل مسافة محرك الأرض ، وهو مقياس للاختلاف بين التوزيعات. نظهر النجاح في مهمة الاستقراء غير الخاضعة للرقابة للمعجم ثنائي اللغة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نكشف عن اكتشاف مثير للاهتمام وهو أن مسافة محرك الأرض تُظهر إمكانات كمقياس لاختلاف اللغة.', 'fr': "Le traitement multilingue du langage naturel repose sur le principe qu'il existe une invariance entre les langues. Au niveau des mots, les chercheurs ont identifié une telle invariance dans le mot incorporant des espaces sémantiques de différentes langues. Cependant, afin de connecter les espaces séparés, une supervision multilingue codée dans des données parallèles est généralement requise. Dans cet article, nous tentons d'établir la connexion interlinguistique sans nous appuyer sur une quelconque supervision interlinguistique. En considérant les espaces d'inclusion de mots comme des distributions, nous proposons de minimiser la distance entre les moteurs terrestres, une mesure de divergence entre les distributions. Nous démontrons le succès de la tâche d'introduction au lexique bilingue non supervisé. De plus, nous révélons une découverte intéressante selon laquelle la distance du terreur montre un potentiel en tant que mesure de la différence linguistique.", 'es': 'El procesamiento del lenguaje natural multilingüe se basa en la premisa de que existe invariancia entre idiomas. A nivel de palabra, los investigadores han identificado tal invariancia en la palabra que incrusta espacios semánticos de diferentes idiomas. Sin embargo, para conectar los espacios separados, normalmente se requiere una supervisión multilingüe codificada en datos paralelos. En este artículo, intentamos establecer la conexión multilingüe sin depender de ninguna supervisión multilingüe. Al ver los espacios de incrustación de palabras como distribuciones, proponemos minimizar la distancia de sus transportadores de tierras, una medida de divergencia entre distribuciones. Demostramos el éxito en la tarea de inducción al léxico bilingüe sin supervisión. Además, revelamos un interesante hallazgo de que la distancia del movimiento de tierra muestra potencial como medida de la diferencia de idioma.', 'pt': 'O processamento de linguagem natural multilíngue depende da premissa de que existe invariância entre os idiomas. No nível da palavra, pesquisadores identificaram tal invariância na palavra embutindo espaços semânticos de diferentes idiomas. No entanto, para conectar os espaços separados, normalmente é necessária a supervisão de vários idiomas codificada em dados paralelos. Neste artigo, tentamos estabelecer a conexão multilíngue sem depender de qualquer supervisão multilíngue. Ao visualizar os espaços de incorporação de palavras como distribuições, propomos minimizar a distância do seu motor de terra, uma medida de divergência entre as distribuições. Demonstramos o sucesso na tarefa de indução de léxico bilíngue não supervisionada. Além disso, revelamos uma descoberta interessante de que a distância do motor de terra mostra potencial como medida de diferença de linguagem.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルな自然言語処理は、言語間に不変性が存在するという前提に立っている。ワードレベルでは、研究者は異なる言語のセマンティックスペースを埋め込むワードにこのような不変性があることを特定しました。しかしながら、別々のスペースを接続するためには、並列データに符号化されたクロスリンガル監視が典型的に必要である。本稿では、クロスリンガルの監督に依存することなく、クロスリンガルの接続を確立しようと試みる。ワード埋め込み空間を分布と見なすことで、分布間の乖離の尺度であるアースムーバーの距離を最小限に抑えることを提案する。私たちは、無監督のバイリンガル辞書誘導タスクでの成功を実証します。さらに、地球移動者の距離が言語差の尺度として潜在的な可能性を示しているという興味深い発見を明らかにした。', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण इस आधार पर निर्भर करता है कि भाषाओं में विचरण मौजूद है। शब्द स्तर पर, शोधकर्ताओं ने विभिन्न भाषाओं के शब्दार्थ रिक्त स्थान को एम्बेड करने वाले शब्द में इस तरह के विचरण की पहचान की है। हालांकि, अलग-अलग रिक्त स्थान को जोड़ने के लिए, समानांतर डेटा में एन्कोडेड क्रॉस-लिंगुअल पर्यवेक्षण आमतौर पर आवश्यक होता है। इस पेपर में, हम किसी भी क्रॉस-लिंगुअल पर्यवेक्षण पर भरोसा किए बिना क्रॉस-लिंगुअल कनेक्शन स्थापित करने का प्रयास करते हैं। वितरण के रूप में शब्द एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान को देखकर, हम उनके पृथ्वी मूवर की दूरी को कम करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो वितरण के बीच विचलन का एक उपाय है। हम असुरक्षित द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण कार्य पर सफलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम एक दिलचस्प खोज को प्रकट करते हैं कि पृथ्वी मूवर की दूरी भाषा के अंतर के उपाय के रूप में क्षमता दिखाती है।', 'zh': '跨语言自然语言处在跨语言不变性前提。 在单词层面,论者已定语义空单词之不变性。 然接独间,常须以并行数编码跨语督之。 在本文中,我们试图在不恃一切跨语监督的事情建立跨语接连。 以词嵌空为分,议最小化其土方移动器,此散量度也。 展无监双语词典归成功。 此外,我们揭示了一个有趣的发现,就地球移动器的距离显示出为言语差异的潜力。', 'ru': 'Межязычная обработка естественного языка основана на предпосылке, что существует неизменность между языками. На уровне слов исследователи выявили такую инвариантность в словосочетании семантических пространств разных языков. Однако для соединения отдельных пространств, как правило, требуется межъязыковое наблюдение, закодированное в параллельных данных. В этой статье мы пытаемся установить кросс-лингвистическую связь, не полагаясь на какой-либо кросс-лингвистический надзор. Рассматривая пространства вложения слов как распределения, мы предлагаем свести к минимуму расстояние их землетрясения, мера расхождения между распределениями. Демонстрируем успех неконтролируемой двуязычной лексико-индукционной задачи. Кроме того, мы обнаруживаем интересный вывод о том, что расстояние землетрясения показывает потенциал как мера языковой разницы.', 'ga': 'Tá próiseáil teanga nádúrtha thrastheangach ag brath ar an mbonn go bhfuil éagsúlacht ann trasna teangacha. Ag leibhéal na bhfocal, tá a leithéid d’éagsúlacht aitheanta ag taighdeoirí sna focail ag neadú spásanna shéimeantacha i dteangacha éagsúla. Chun na spásanna ar leith a nascadh, áfach, is gnách go mbíonn gá le maoirseacht thrastheangach arna ionchódú i sonraí comhthreomhara. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iarracht an nasc tras-teanga a bhunú gan a bheith ag brath ar aon mhaoirseacht thrastheangach. Trí spásanna leabaithe focal a fheiceáil mar dháileacháin, tá sé beartaithe againn fad a ghluaiseoir talún a íoslaghdú, tomhas ar an éagsúlacht idir dáiltí. Léirímid an rath a bhí ar an tasc ionduchtaithe foclóireachta dátheangach gan mhaoirseacht. Ina theannta sin, nochtaimid toradh suimiúil go léiríonn fad an ghluaisteánaí an poitéinseal mar thomhas ar an difríocht teanga.', 'el': 'Η γλωσσική επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας εξαρτάται από την προϋπόθεση ότι υπάρχει αμετάβλητη μεταξύ των γλωσσών. Σε επίπεδο λέξεων, οι ερευνητές έχουν εντοπίσει μια τέτοια αμετάβλητη λέξη που ενσωματώνει σημασιολογικούς χώρους διαφορετικών γλωσσών. Ωστόσο, προκειμένου να συνδεθούν οι ξεχωριστοί χώροι, συνήθως απαιτείται διαγώνια εποπτεία κωδικοποιημένη σε παράλληλα δεδομένα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, επιχειρούμε να καθιερώσουμε τη διασυνοριακή σύνδεση χωρίς να βασιζόμαστε σε οποιαδήποτε διασυνοριακή εποπτεία. Βλέποντας τους χώρους ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων ως διανομές, προτείνουμε να ελαχιστοποιηθεί η απόσταση του γήινου μετακινητή τους, ένα μέτρο απόκλισης μεταξύ των διανομών. Επιδεικνύουμε την επιτυχία στην εργασία επαγωγής χωρίς επίβλεψη δίγλωσσου λεξικού. Επιπλέον, αποκαλύπτουμε ένα ενδιαφέρον εύρημα ότι η απόσταση του γήινου μετακινητή δείχνει δυναμικό ως μέτρο της γλωσσικής διαφοράς.', 'hu': 'A nyelvek közötti természetes nyelvfeldolgozás azon a feltételezésen múlik, hogy a nyelvek közötti invariancia létezik. A szószinten a kutatók azonosították ezt az invarianciát a különböző nyelvek szemantikai tereit beágyazó szóban. A különálló terek összekapcsolásához azonban általában párhuzamos adatokkal kódolt nyelvű felügyeletre van szükség. Ebben a tanulmányban igyekszünk megteremteni a nyelvek közötti kapcsolatot anélkül, hogy bármilyen nyelvi felügyeletre támaszkodnánk. A szóbeágyazott tereket eloszlásként tekintve azt javasoljuk, hogy minimalizáljuk a földmozgató távolságát, ami az eloszlások közötti eltérés mértéke. A felügyelet nélküli kétnyelvű lexikon indukciós feladat sikerét mutatjuk be. Ezenkívül egy érdekes megállapítást fedünk fel, miszerint a földmozgató távolsága potenciálisan mutatja a nyelvi különbség mértékét.', 'ka': 'მრავალური თავისუფალური ენის პროცესის შესახებ პრემიზიზიდან, რომ ენების განმავლობაში არსებობს ინგარესი. სიტყვების დონეში, მსწავლობელი განსაზღვრებული სიტყვებში სემონტიკური ადგილები განსხვავებული ენების სიტყვებში. მაგრამ, განსაკუთრებული სივრცე დაკავშირებისთვის, პარალელი მონაცემებში კოდირებული კოდირებული სივრცემები უნდა იყოს. ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ ვცდილობთ კრისი ენგური დაკავშირებას დავწეროთ, რომელიც არაფერი კრისი ენგური დანახვა. სიტყვის გადავხედავთ სიტყვის, როგორც დისტრიბუციების განმავლობაში, ჩვენ მინუსიზებთ მინუსიზებას მინუსიზებას მინუსიზებას მინუსიზებას მინუსიზებას, განმა ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ წარმატების მუშაობას, რომელიც არ განსხვავებული ორიენგური ლექსიკონის ინდექციის რაოდენობაზე. დამატებით, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ ინტერესური მოძრაობა, რომ სამყარო მოძრაობელი განსხვავებაში პონტიციალური გამოყენება ენის განსხვავება.', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbinis natūralaus kalbų apdorojimas priklauso nuo to, kad kalbos skiriasi. žodžių lygmeniu mokslininkai nustatė tokį neatitikimą žodžiuose, kuriuose įtraukiamos semantinės skirtingų kalbų erdvės. Tačiau siekiant sujungti atskiras erdves paprastai reikalinga tarpkalbinė priežiūra, koduota lygiagrečiais duomenimis. In this paper, we attempt to establish the cross-lingual connection without relying on any cross-lingual supervision.  Pažiūrėdami į žodžių įterpimo erdves kaip paskirstymus, siūlome kuo labiau sumažinti jų žemės judančiojo atstumą, skirtumo tarp paskirstymų matavimą. Mes parodome sėkmę nepastebimoje dvikalbio leksikono indukcijos užduotyje. Be to, atskleidžiame įdomią išvadą, kad Žemės judančiojo atstumas rodo potencialą kaip kalbos skirtumo matavimą.', 'it': "L'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale cross-lingual dipende dalla premessa che esiste invarianza tra le lingue. A livello di parola, i ricercatori hanno identificato tale invarianza nella parola incorporando spazi semantici di lingue diverse. Tuttavia, per collegare gli spazi separati, in genere è necessaria una supervisione cross-lingual codificata in dati paralleli. In questo articolo, cerchiamo di stabilire la connessione interlinguistica senza fare affidamento su alcuna supervisione interlinguistica. Osservando gli spazi che incorporano le parole come distribuzioni, proponiamo di ridurre al minimo la distanza del movimento terra, una misura della divergenza tra le distribuzioni. Dimostriamo il successo nel compito non supervisionato di induzione lessicale bilingue. Inoltre, riveliamo un'interessante scoperta che la distanza del movimento terra mostra potenziale come misura della differenza linguistica.", 'mk': 'Кросјазичното природно обработување на јазиците зависи од претпоставката дека постои инваријанција меѓу јазиците. На зборно ниво, истражувачите ја идентификуваа ваквата инваријанција во зборот вклучувајќи семантични простори на различни јазици. Сепак, за да се поврзат одделните простори, обично се бара прекујазичен надзор кодиран во паралелни податоци. Во овој весник се обидуваме да воспоставиме прекујазична врска без да се потпираме на ниту еден прекујазичен надзор. Со поглед на зборовите кои вклучуваат простори како дистрибуции, предлагаме да ја минимизираме далечината на нивниот земјен движач, мерка на разлика помеѓу дистрибуциите. Го демонстрираме успехот на ненадгледуваната задача за индукција на двојјазични лексикони. Покрај тоа, откриваме интересно откритие дека далечината на земјскиот движач покажува потенцијал како мерка на разлика на јазикот.', 'kk': 'Тілдерден бірнеше тілді өзгерту тілдерін өзгерту үшін премизасында көп тілді өзгерту нәтижелері бар. Сөздің деңгейінде зерттеушілер әртүрлі тілдердің семантикалық орындарын ендірген сөзде бұл қатынасы анықталды. Бірақ бөлек бос орындарды қосылу үшін, параллель деректерде кодталған көп тілді қарау қажет. Бұл қағазда, біз тілдерді бірнеше тілдерді басқаруға сеніміз жоқ тілдерді қосылуға тырыстық. Біз үлестіру кеңістіктерін сөздердің арасындағы кеңістіктерін түсіндіру үшін олардың жерінің жылжытушысының арасындағы кеңістіктерін түсіндіру керек. Біз екі тілі лексикандық индукция тапсырмасының сәттігін көрсету. Қосымша, біз жер жылжытушысының қашықтығын тіл айырмашылығының өлшемі ретінде көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi saling bahasa bergantung pada pernyataan bahawa terdapat pencerobohan di seluruh bahasa. Pada tahap perkataan, peneliti telah mengenalpasti keterlaluan seperti ini dalam perkataan memasukkan ruang semantik bahasa yang berbeza. Bagaimanapun, untuk menyambungkan ruang terpisah, pengawasan saling-bahasa dikodifikasikan dalam data selari biasanya diperlukan. Dalam kertas ini, kita cuba untuk menetapkan sambungan saling bahasa tanpa bergantung pada mana-mana pengawasan saling bahasa. Dengan melihat kata-kata memasukkan ruang sebagai distribusi, kami melamar untuk mengurangkan jarak pemindah bumi mereka, ukuran perbezaan antara distribusi. Kami menunjukkan keberhasilan dalam tugas induksi leksikon bilingual yang tidak diawasi. Selain itu, kami mengungkapkan penemuan yang menarik bahawa jarak pemindah bumi menunjukkan potensi sebagai ukuran perbezaan bahasa.', 'mt': 'L-ipproċessar translingwistiku tal-lingwi naturali jiddependi fuq il-preżunzjoni li jeżisti invarjanza bejn il-lingwi. At the word level, researchers have identified such invariance in the word embedding semantic spaces of different languages.  Madankollu, sabiex jiġu konnessi l-ispazji separati, is-superviżjoni translingwistika kkodifikata f’dejta parallela hija tipikament meħtieġa. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippruvaw nistabbilixxu l-konnessjoni translingwistika mingħajr ma nistabbilixxu fuq superviżjoni translingwistika. Billi nqisu l-ispazji tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem bħala distribuzzjonijiet, nipproponu li nimminimizzaw id-distanza tal-moviment tad-dinja tagħhom, miżura ta’ diverġenza bejn id-distribuzzjonijiet. Aħna nuru s-suċċess fil-kompitu ta’ induzzjoni tal-lexicon bilingwi mhux sorveljat. Barra minn hekk, niżvelaw sejba interessanti li d-distanza tal-moviment tad-dinja turi l-potenzjal bħala kejl tad-differenza lingwistika.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രം ഭാഷകളില്\u200d അപകടം ഉണ്ടെന്ന പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നതി വാക്ക് നില്\u200dക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് സ്പെയിന്\u200dറിക് സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശീലനിരീക്ഷിക എന്നാലും, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d ബന്ധിപ്പിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധാരണമായി അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലാങ്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷയുടെ ബന്ധം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കുള്ള സംരക്ഷണ വിഭവങ്ങളായി വാക്കുകള്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നത് കാണുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, അവരുടെ ഭൂമി നീക്കുന്ന ദൂരം കുറച്ചു കൂട്ടുന്നതാണ്, വിതരണ വ്യത സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200d ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d പണിയില്\u200d വിജയം കാണിക്കുന്നു. കൂടാതെ, ഭൂമി നീക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ദൂരം ഭാഷയുടെ വ്യത്യാസവുമായി സാധ്യതകള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Krysspråksbehandling av naturspråk gjer hjelp på premisen at det finst invarians over språk. På ordnivået har forskere identifisert slik invarians i ordet som innebyr semantiske mellomrom på ulike språk. For å kopla sammen dei separe mellomroma er det vanlegvis nødvendig krysspråksovervåking koda i parallelle data. I denne papiret prøver vi å oppretta krysspråk tilkopling utan å levera på nokon krysspråk oversikt. Ved å sjå ord som innebygge mellomrom som distribusjonar, fører vi å minimera avstanden til jordtrekkeren sine, ein mål av forskjellighet mellom distribusjonar. Vi demonstrerer suksessen på den ugjennomsiktige funksjonen for å induksjona på biletmenyen. I tillegg opnar vi eit interessant oppdaging at avstanden av jordflyttaren viser potensielt som mål av språk-forskjellen.', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн хэл болон байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл нь хэл дээр давхар байдал байдаг гэдэгт ойлгомжтой. Үүний хэмжээнд судлаачид өөр хэлний семантик орон зайд ийм хүчирхийллийг олж мэдсэн. Гэхдээ ялгаатай орон зайг холбохын тулд параллел өгөгдлийн шинжлэх ухаан ихэвчлэн хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний харилцааны холбоотой холбоотой байгуулахыг хичээдэг. Үүнийг хуваарилцаа гэж нэрлэж, дэлхийн хөдөлгүүрийн зайг багасгаж, хуваарилцааны хоорондын ялгаа хэмжээг үзэхээр санал болно. Бид хоёр хэл хэлний дасгалын үйл ажилд амжилтыг үзүүлдэг. Мөн бид дэлхийн хөдөлгөөнүүдийн зай нь хэлний ялгааг хэмжээний хэмжээнд боломжтой харуулж байгааг сонирхолтой олж харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne przetwarzanie języka naturalnego zależy od założenia, że istnieje niezmienność między językami. Na poziomie słów badacze zidentyfikowali taką niezmienność w słowie osadzającym przestrzenie semantyczne różnych języków. Jednak w celu połączenia oddzielnych przestrzeni zazwyczaj wymagany jest nadzór między językami zakodowany w równoległych danych. W niniejszym artykule staramy się nawiązać połączenie między językami bez polegania na jakimkolwiek nadzorze między językami. Postrzegając przestrzenie osadzające słowa jako rozkłady, proponujemy zminimalizować odległość ich ruchu ziemi, miarę rozbieżności między rozkładami. Pokazujemy sukces w zadaniu indukcji dwujęzycznego leksykonu bez nadzoru. Ponadto ujawniamy interesujące ustalenie, że odległość ruchomego ziemi wykazuje potencjał jako miarę różnicy językowej.', 'ro': 'Procesarea limbajului natural interlingvistic depinde de premisa că există invarianță între limbi. La nivel de cuvânt, cercetătorii au identificat o astfel de invarianță în cuvântul încorporând spații semantice ale diferitelor limbi. Cu toate acestea, pentru a conecta spațiile separate, este de obicei necesară supravegherea translingvistică codificată în date paralele. În această lucrare, încercăm să stabilim conexiunea interlingvă fără a ne baza pe vreo supraveghere interlingvă. Vizualizând spațiile încorporate de cuvinte ca distribuții, propunem să minimizăm distanța mișcătorului lor de pământ, o măsură a divergenței dintre distribuții. Demonstrăm succesul în sarcina de inducție a lexiconului bilingv nesupravegheată. În plus, dezvăluim o descoperire interesantă că distanța mișcătorului de pământ arată potențial ca o măsură a diferenței de limbă.', 'si': 'භාෂාත්මක භාෂාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සිද්ධියක් තියෙන්නේ භාෂාත්මක සිද්ධියක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරධා වචන ස්ථානයෙන්, පරීක්ෂකයෝ වෙනස් භාෂාවන්ගේ සෙමැන්ටික් ස්ථානයක් ඇතුළත් කරලා තියෙනවා. නමුත්, වෙනුවෙන් තැනක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, සමාන්\u200dය දත්තේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවික බලන්න අවශ්\u200dයයි. මේ පත්තරේ අපි උත්සාහ කරනවා ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධයක් ස්ථාපනය කරන්න, කිසිම භාෂාවක් බලන්න බැරි  විතරයෙන් විතරයෙන් වචන ස්ථානයක් බලන්න, අපි ඔවුන්ගේ පෘථිවිය යාලකගේ දුරක්ෂණය, විතරයෙන් අතර විතරයෙන් විතරය අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නැති දෙවල් භාෂාවක් ලෙක්සිකෝන් නිර්මාණය වැඩේ සාර්ථක විදියට. ඒ වගේම, අපි හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් හොයාගන්නෙ පෘථිවිය හැරෙන්නේ කියලා භාෂාව වෙනස් විශේෂයක් වගේ', 'so': "Ka baaraandegista luqada asalka ah ee luuqadaha iskutallaabta ah waxay ka leedahay in lagu soo galo luuqadaha oo dhan. Shaqo-baarayaashu waxay ku aqoonsadeen waxyaabo kale oo ay ku qoran luqado kala duwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee si aad u xiriirto goobaha kala duwan, waxaa sida caadiga ah loo baahan yahay ilaalinta luuqada kala duwan oo lagu qorayo macluumaadka lambarka ah. Qoraalkan waxaan isku daynaa inaannu dhisno xiriirka luuqadaha iskutallaabta ah iyadoon ku kalsoonayn ilaalinta luuqadaha kala duwan. Markii aan aragno hadalka meelaha lagu kala firdhiyo sida qayb ahaan, waxaan ka fekeraynaa in aan hoos u dhigno safarka dhulka, qiyaas oo ah kala duwan qaybsan. Waxaynu muujinnaa liibaanka shaqada leksisinka labada luqadood oo aan la ilaalinayn. In addition, we reveal an interesting finding that the earth mover's distance shows potential as a measure of language difference.", 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig behandling av naturligt språk beror på antagandet att det finns invarians över språk. På ordnivå har forskare identifierat en sådan invarians i ordet inbäddande semantiska utrymmen av olika språk. För att ansluta de separata utrymmena krävs dock vanligtvis tvärspråkig övervakning kodad i parallella data. I denna uppsats försöker vi etablera den tvärspråkiga kopplingen utan att förlita oss på någon tvärspråkig övervakning. Genom att betrakta ordinbäddande utrymmen som fördelningar föreslår vi att minimera deras jordförflyttnings avstånd, ett mått på skillnader mellan fördelningar. Vi visar framgången med tvåspråkig lexikoninduktion utan övervakning. Dessutom avslöjar vi ett intressant fynd att jordförflyttarens avstånd visar potential som ett mått på språkskillnad.', 'sr': 'Prejezički prirodni jezik obrađivanje ukazuje na predstavu da postoji invariacija na jezicima. Na nivou reči, istraživači su identifikovali takvu invariaciju u reči koja uključuje semantičke prostore različitih jezika. Međutim, kako bi povezali odvojene prostore, obično je potrebno preko jezičkog nadzora kodiranog u paralelnim podacima. U ovom papiru pokušavamo da uspostavimo prejezičku vezu, a da se ne oslanjamo na bilo kakvu prejezičku nadzor. Predlažemo da minimiziramo udaljenost njihovog pokretača zemlje, mjeru razlike između distribucije. Pokazujemo uspeh na neodređenom dvojezičkom indukcijskom zadatku. Osim toga, otkrivamo interesantno otkriće da udaljenost zemaljskog pokretača pokazuje potencijal kao mjera jezičke razlike.', 'ur': 'کروس زبان کی طبیعی زبان کی پردازشی کی ہینگ اس پر ہے کہ زبانوں میں غلطی موجود ہے۔ لفظ سطح میں، تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے لفظ میں ایسی غلطی پہچان لی ہے جو مختلف زبانوں کی سیمنٹی جگہ میں داخل ہوتی ہے۔ However, for connecting the separate spaces, cross-lingual supervision encoded in parallel data is typically required. اس کاغذ میں، ہم کلاس زبان کی تعلق کا ارتباط بنانے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں بغیر کسی کلاس زبان کی نظر پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ان کے زمین حرکت کرنے والوں کے فاصلے کو کم کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے، تقسیم کے درمیان تفریق کا اندازہ. ہم اس کامیابی کو دکھاتے ہیں جو غیر قابل تعلق کی دو زبان تکلیف کے کام پر ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم ایک جالب پیدا کریں گے کہ زمین چلنے والوں کی دور کی امکانات کو زبان فرق کے اندازے سے دکھاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் முன்னோட்டத்தில் உள்ளது மொழிகள் முழுவதும் நுழைவு இருக்கிறது. வார்த்தை நிலையில், ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் வேறு மொழிகளின் பெம்பென்டிக் இடைவெளிகளை உள்ளிடும் வார்த்தையில்  ஆயினும், தனிப்பட்ட இடைவெளிகளை இணைக்க, இணைப்பு தரவில் குறியிடப்பட்ட மொழி கண்காணிப்பு வழக்கமாக தேவைப்படுகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கிரும்மொழி இணைப்பை உறுதிப்படுத்த முயற்சி செய்ய முயற்சி செய்கிறோம் எந்த கிரும்மொழ விரிவாக்கும் இடைவெளிகளை பார்த்தால், நாம் அவர்களுடைய பூமி நகர்த்தும் தூரத்தை குறைக்க பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், பங்கீட்டு நாம் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத இரண்டு மொழி லெக்சியான தொழில் வெற்றியை காட்டுகிறோம். மேலும், நாம் ஒரு சுவாரசியமான கண்டுபிடிப்பை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் பூமி நகர்த்துபவரின் தூரம் மொழி வேறுபாட', 'uz': "Name So'zlar darajada o'qituvchilar boshqa tillardan semantik boʻsh joylarini aniqlashdi. Lekin, alohida boʻsh joy bilan aloqa oʻrnatish uchun, parallel maʼlumotdagi bir necha tilni kodlash kerak. Bu qogʻozda, biz har bir necha tillar qo'llanib qo'llanmagan qo'llanmiz. @ info: whatsthis Biz qo'llanmagan ikki tillar lekson ishni muvaffaqiyatlarini ko'rsatamiz. In addition, we reveal an interesting finding that the earth mover's distance shows potential as a measure of language difference.", 'vi': 'Quá trình xử lý ngôn ngữ tự do xuyên ngôn ngữ phụ thuộc vào việc tồn tại xâm lược ngôn ngữ. Theo từ cấp trên, các nhà nghiên cứu đã xác định sự xâm lược này trong từ ngữ pháp của các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, để kết nối các khoảng cách riêng, giám sát ngôn ngữ khác nhau mã hóa bằng dữ liệu song song thường cần thiết. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cố gắng thiết lập liên kết ngôn ngữ khác nhau mà không dựa vào sự giám sát ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi xem các khoảng trống được tạo ra như phân phát, chúng tôi đề nghị giảm bớt khoảng cách tạo vật đất của chúng, một s ố phân phát khác nhau. Chúng tôi chứng minh thành công trong nhiệm vụ này. Ngoài ra, chúng tôi tiết lộ một kết quả thú vị rằng khoảng cách của người chuyển động đất cho thấy khả năng là thước đo của s ự khác biệt ngôn ngữ.', 'da': 'Tværsproget naturlig sprogbehandling afhænger af den forudsætning, at der eksisterer invarians på tværs af sprog. På ordniveau har forskere identificeret en sådan invarians i ordet integrering semantiske rum af forskellige sprog. For at forbinde de separate rum kræves der dog typisk tværsproget overvågning, der er kodet i parallelle data. I denne artikel forsøger vi at etablere den tværsprogede forbindelse uden at stole på noget tværsproget tilsyn. Ved at se ord indlejring rum som fordelinger foreslår vi at minimere deres jordbevægelses afstand, et mål for divergens mellem fordelinger. Vi demonstrerer succesen på den uopvågede tosprogede lexikoninduktionsopgave. Derudover afslører vi et interessant fund, at jordbevægelsens afstand viser potentiale som mål for sprogforskel.', 'nl': 'Meertalige natuurlijke taalverwerking hangt af van het uitgangspunt dat er invariantie tussen talen bestaat. Op woordniveau hebben onderzoekers dergelijke invariantie geïdentificeerd in het woord dat semantische ruimten van verschillende talen insluit. Om de afzonderlijke ruimtes met elkaar te verbinden, is echter meestal cross-lingual supervisie vereist, gecodeerd in parallelle gegevens. In dit artikel proberen we de meertalige verbinding tot stand te brengen zonder te vertrouwen op enige meertalige begeleiding. Door woordinsluitingsruimten te beschouwen als verdelingen, stellen we voor om de afstand van hun aardverschuiver te minimaliseren, een maat voor divergentie tussen verdelingen. We demonstreren het succes op de niet-begeleide tweetalige lexicon inductie taak. Daarnaast onthullen we een interessante bevinding dat de afstand van de aardverschuiver potentieel toont als maatstaf voor taalverschil.', 'bg': 'Междуезичната обработка на естествения език зависи от предпоставката, че съществува инвариация между езиците. На ниво думата изследователите са идентифицирали такава инвариация в думата, вграждаща семантични пространства на различни езици. Въпреки това, за да се свържат отделните пространства, обикновено се изисква междуезичен надзор, кодиран в паралелни данни. В тази статия се опитваме да установим междуезична връзка, без да разчитаме на междуезичен надзор. Като разглеждаме думата вграждащи пространства като разпределения, предлагаме да сведем до минимум разстоянието на техния земен движещ се устройство, мярка за отклонение между разпределенията. Ние демонстрираме успеха на задачата за индукция на двуезичен лексикон без надзор. В допълнение, разкриваме интересно откритие, че разстоянието на земния движещ се показва потенциал като мярка на езиковата разлика.', 'de': 'Die sprachübergreifende Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache hängt von der Prämisse ab, dass es eine Invarianz zwischen den Sprachen gibt. Auf Wortebene haben Forscher eine solche Invarianz im Wort identifiziert, das semantische Räume verschiedener Sprachen einbettet. Um die einzelnen Räume miteinander zu verbinden, ist jedoch typischerweise eine mehrsprachige Überwachung erforderlich, die in parallelen Daten codiert ist. In diesem Beitrag versuchen wir, die sprachübergreifende Verbindung herzustellen, ohne auf eine sprachübergreifende Betreuung angewiesen zu sein. Indem wir Wort Einbettungsräume als Verteilungen betrachten, schlagen wir vor, die Entfernung ihres Erdbewegers zu minimieren, ein Maß für Divergenz zwischen Verteilungen. Wir demonstrieren den Erfolg an der unbeaufsichtigten zweisprachigen Lexikon-Induktionsaufgabe. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir eine interessante Erkenntnis, dass die Entfernung des Erdbewegers Potential als Maß für Sprachdifferenz zeigt.', 'hr': 'Krozjezički prirodni jezik obrađivanje ukazuje na premiju da postoji invariacija na jezicima. Na razini riječi, istraživači su identificirali takvu invariaciju u riječi uključujući semantičke prostore različitih jezika. Međutim, kako bi se povezali odvojene prostore, obično je potrebno preko jezičke nadzore kodirane u paralelnim podacima. U ovom papiru pokušavamo utvrditi preko jezičke veze bez oslanjanja na bilo koji preko jezičkog nadzora. Gledajući riječi uključujući prostore kao distribucije, predlažemo minimizirati udaljenost njihovog zemaljskog pokretača, mjeru razlike između distribucija. Mi pokazujemo uspjeh na neodređenom dvojezičnom zadatku indukcije leksiona. Osim toga, otkrivamo zanimljivo otkriće da udaljenost zemaljskog pokretača pokazuje potencijal kao mjera jezičke razlike.', 'id': "Proses bahasa alam saling bahasa bergantung pada premis bahwa ada invariansi di seluruh bahasa. Pada tingkat kata, peneliti telah mengidentifikasi invariansi seperti ini dalam kata memasukkan ruang semantis dari bahasa yang berbeda. Namun, untuk menghubungkan ruang terpisah, pengawasan saling bahasa dikodeksi dalam data paralel biasanya diperlukan. In this paper, we attempt to establish the cross-lingual connection without relying on any cross-lingual supervision.  Dengan melihat kata-kata memasukkan ruang sebagai distribusi, kami mengusulkan untuk mengurangi jarak pemindah bumi mereka, ukuran divergensi antara distribusi. Kami menunjukkan sukses dalam tugas induksi lexikon bilingual yang tidak diawasi. In addition, we reveal an interesting finding that the earth mover's distance shows potential as a measure of language difference.", 'sw': 'Utafiti wa lugha za asili na lugha zinazuia utabiri kwamba kuna uvamizi katika lugha mbalimbali. Katika kiwango cha neno, watafiti wametambua uvamizi wa aina hiyo katika neno linaloingiza nafasi za sekunde za lugha tofauti. Hata hivyo, kwa ajili ya kuunganisha nafasi tofauti, ufuatiliaji wa lugha unaoandikwa katika takwimu za usambazaji unahitajika kwa kawaida. Katika karatasi hii, tunajaribu kuanzisha uhusiano wa lugha hii bila kutegemea ulinzi wowote wa lugha. Kwa kuangalia neno ambalo linapanda nafasi kama usambazaji, tunapendekeza kupunguza umbali wa safari zao za ardhi, kiasi cha tofauti kati ya usambazaji. Tunaonyesha mafanikio katika kazi ya sekta ya lexico ya lugha mbili isiyo na uhakika. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha hali ya kusisimua kwamba umbali wa kusafiri duniani unaonyesha uwezekano wa tofauti za lugha.', 'fa': 'پرداخت زبان طبیعی متوسط زبان بر روی نقطه\u200cای که در زبان\u200cها بی\u200cنیازی وجود دارد. در سطح کلمه، تحقیقات\u200cکننده\u200cها چنین ناتوانی را در کلمه\u200cای که فضای semantic از زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی در هم پیدا می\u200cکنند شناسایی کردند. ولی برای ارتباط فضای جدا، نظارت متفاوت زبانی که در داده های متفاوت رمزگذاری شده معمولاً لازم است. در این کاغذ، ما سعی می کنیم ارتباط متوسط زبان را بدون اعتماد به هیچ نظارت متوسط زبان بسازیم. با نگاه کردن کلمه\u200cای که فضا را به عنوان توزیع می\u200cدهند، پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که فاصله\u200cهای حرکت کننده زمین آنها را کمینه کنیم، اندازه تفاوتی بین توزیع\u200cها. ما موفقیت را بر روی وظیفه\u200cی تحریک زبان\u200cهای دوزبانی ناپذیر نشان می\u200cدهیم. علاوه بر این، ما یک پیدا جالبی را نشان می دهیم که فاصله حرکت کننده زمین به عنوان اندازه تفاوت زبانی پتانسیل را نشان می دهد.', 'tr': 'Diller arasynda adalat diller işlemek üçin adalat düşmekler. söz derejesinde, araştyranlar beýleki dilleriň semantik seleňlerini takyklaýan sözlerde şeýle täsirsizlik tanap etdiler. Ýöne ayrı seleňleri baglaşdyrmak üçin parallel maglumatlar içinde ködlenýär. Bu kagyzda biz çarpaz diller garaşyp bilmeýän baglaýyşy gurmana synanyşýarys. Bölümler diýip daşarylýan ýerleri görýän ýerleriniň ýokarylygyny azaltmak üçin teklip edýäris. Biz ikinji dilde boýunça arzanmaýan sözlerin täsirini görkeýäris. Munuň üçin ýer ýüzünüň göçmesiniň arasynyň dil üýtgeşigi diýip bolan gyzykly bir tapylygy görkeýäris.', 'af': "Cross-lingual natuurlike taal verwerking hinges op die premise dat daar onderwerp oor tale bestaan. Op die woord vlak het ondersoekers so ongelukkig in die woord wat semantiese spasies van verskillende tale ingesluit het. Maar, om die aparte spasies te koppel, is die kruistale supervisie gekodeer in parallele data tipies nodig. In hierdie papier probeer ons om die kruistale verbinding te stel sonder om op enige kruistale supervisie te vertrou. Deur die besigtig van woord ingesluit spasies a s verspreidings, voorstel ons om hul aarde skuif se afstand te minimiseer, 'n maat van verspreiding tussen verspreidings te maak. Ons wys die sukses op die ononderwerpende bilinguele leksikoon induksie taak. In addition, we reveal an interesting finding that the earth mover's distance shows potential as a measure of language difference.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ቋንቋዎች በቋንቋዎች ውስጥ መግባት እንዳለ መግለጫ ያስከለክላል፡፡ በንግግር ደረጃዎች፣ አስተማሪዎቹ እንደዚህ ያለ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የsemantic ቦታዎች በሚያሳዩ ቃላት ግለጹ፡፡ ነገር ግን በተለየ ቦታዎች ለመግጠም የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ማየት በተለየ ዳታ በተለየ ተጠቃሚ ያስፈልጋል። በዚህ ገጽ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነትን በማንኛውም የቋንቋ ግንኙነት ሳይታመን እንሞክራለን፡፡ የአካባቢ ቦታዎች እንደሚያሳዩ ቃላትን በመመለከት፣ የምድር መንቀሳቃሚውን ርቀት እናጎድልላቸዋለን፣ በተለያዩ መካከል የልዩነት መጠን እናስባለን፡፡ የሁለት ቋንቋ ልዩ ልስክሲን ሥራ ላይ ድል ማግኘት እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የምድር መንቀሳቅስ ርቀት የቋንቋ ልዩነት እንዲመስል የሚቻለውን ነገር እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i gjuhës natyrore ndërgjuhësore varet nga premtimi se ekziston pushtimi nëpërmjet gjuhëve. Në nivelin e fjalës, kërkimtarët kanë identifikuar një vazhdim të tillë në fjalën që përfshin hapësira semantike të gjuhëve të ndryshme. Megjithatë, me qëllim që të lidhen hapësirat e veçanta, mbikqyrja ndërgjuhësore e koduar në të dhëna paralele është tipikisht e kërkuar. Në këtë letër, ne përpiqemi të krijojmë lidhjen ndërgjuhësore pa u mbështetur në ndonjë mbikqyrje ndërgjuhësore. Duke parë fjalën duke përfshirë hapësirat si shpërndarje, ne propozojmë të minimizojmë distancën e lëvizësit të tokës s ë tyre, një masë dallimi midis shpërndarjeve. We demonstrate the success on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task.  Përveç kësaj, ne zbulojmë një gjetje interesante se distanca e lëvizësit të tokës tregon potencialin si një masë e dallimit gjuhësor.', 'hy': 'Cross-lingual natural language processing hinges on the premise that there exists invariance across languages.  Բառի մակարդակում հետազոտողները հայտնաբերել են նման անընդհատություն բառի մեջ, որը ներառում է տարբեր լեզուների սեմանտիկ տարածքներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, առանձին տարածքների կապելու համար, պարագալ տվյալներով կոդավորված երկլեզու վերահսկողությունը սովորաբար պահանջվում է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք փորձում ենք հաստատել երկլեզվային կապը առանց կախված լինելու ցանկացած երկլեզվային վերահսկողության վրա: Տեսնելով բառերը, որոնք ներառում են տարածքները որպես բաժանմունքներ, մենք առաջարկում ենք նվազեցնել իրենց երկրի շարժողի հեռավորությունը, բաժանմունքների միջև տարբերության չափով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս հաջողությունը անվերահսկված երկլեզու լեքսիկոնի ինդուկցիոն խնդրի վրա: Ավելին, մենք բացահայտում ենք հետաքրքիր հայտնաբերություն, որ Երկրի շարժողի հեռավորությունը ցույց է տալիս պոտենցիալը որպես լեզվի տարբերության չափ:', 'ko': '크로스 언어의 자연 언어 처리의 전제는 크로스 언어에 불변성이 존재하는 것이다.단어 차원에서 연구원들은 이미 서로 다른 언어의 단어가 의미 공간에 박혀 있는 가운데 이러한 불변성을 발견했다.그러나 단독 공간을 연결하기 위해서는 병렬 데이터 인코딩의 다중 언어 감독이 필요하다.본고에서 우리는 어떠한 크로스 언어 감독에도 의존하지 않는 상황에서 크로스 언어 연결을 구축하고자 한다.단어를 공간에 끼워 넣는 것을 분포로 간주함으로써 우리는 그것들의 지구 이동기 거리를 최소화하는 것을 권장한다. 이것은 분포 간의 차이의 도량이다.우리는 무감독 이중 언어 어휘 귀납 임무의 성공을 보여 주었다.그 밖에 우리는 지구 이동자의 거리가 언어의 차이점으로서의 잠재력을 보여준다는 흥미로운 발견도 제시했다.', 'az': 'Dillərin çox-çox təbiətli dil işləməsi dillərin çətinliklərində istifadə edilməsi haqqında dəyişdirir. Söz səviyyəsində, araştırmacılar bu səviyyədə müxtəlif dillərin semantik məsafələrini tanıdılar. Lakin ayrı yer bağlamaq üçün paralel məlumatlarda kodlanmış çoxlu dil supervizyonu genellikle ehtiyacıdır. Bu kağızda, biz dillərin çoxlu bağlantısını təyin etməyə çalışırıq. Bölümlərini dağıtmaq kimi dağıtmaq üçün yer hərəkətçilərinin uzağını azaltmaq üçün təklif edirik. Biz müəyyən edilməmiş iki dil dilində təşkil etdiyi təqdirdə başarılı göstəririk. Əksinə, biz yer hərəkətçilərinin uzaqlaşışını dillərin fərqli ölçü olaraq potensial göstərir.', 'bs': 'Prejezički prirodni obrađivanje jezika pokazuje da postoji invariacija na jezicima. Na razini riječi, istraživači su identifikovali takvu invariaciju u riječi koja uključuje semantičke prostore različitih jezika. Međutim, kako bi povezali odvojene prostore, obično je potrebno preko jezičke nadzore kodirane u paralelnim podacima. U ovom papiru pokušavamo uspostaviti preko jezičke veze, a da se ne oslanjamo na bilo koji preko jezičkog nadzora. Gledajući riječ uključujući prostore kao distribucije, predlažemo minimizirati udaljenost njihovog zemaljskog pokretača, mjeru razlike između distribucije. Mi pokazujemo uspjeh na neodređenom dvojezičnom zadatku indukcije leksiona. Osim toga, otkrivamo interesantno otkriće da udaljenost zemaljskog pokretača pokazuje potencijal kao mjera jezičke razlike.', 'cs': 'Křížové zpracování přirozeného jazyka závisí na předpokladu, že existuje invariance mezi jazyky. Na slovní úrovni výzkumníci identifikovali takovou invarianci ve slovním vkládání sémantických prostorů různých jazyků. Pro propojení samostatných prostorů je však obvykle vyžadován křížový dohled kódovaný v paralelních datech. V tomto článku se snažíme navázat mezijazyčné spojení bez spoléhání na jakýkoliv mezijazyčný dohled. Vnímáním slovních vkládacích prostorů jako distribucí navrhujeme minimalizovat vzdálenost jejich pohybu země, což je měřítko divergence mezi distribucemi. Dokazujeme úspěch na bez dozoru dvojjazyčné indukční úloze lexikonu. Kromě toho odhalujeme zajímavý zjištění, že vzdálenost země ukazuje potenciál jako měřítko jazykového rozdílu.', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার বিষয়টিকে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার বিষয়টির বিরুদ্ধে  শব্দের স্তরে গবেষকরা বিভিন্ন ভাষার সেম্পেন্টিক স্থানে যুক্ত শব্দে এই ধরনের অভিযান চিহ্নিত করেছেন। তবে বিভিন্ন জায়গাগুলোর সংযোগ স্থাপনের জন্য, প্যারালেল ডাটায় ক্ষেত্রে সাধারণত প্রয়োজন। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ক্রস-ভাষার সংযোগ স্থাপন করার চেষ্টা করছি কোন ক্রস-ভাষার উপর নির্ভর করা ছাড়া। বিতরণ হিসেবে বিভিন্ন শব্দ দেখার মাধ্যমে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি তাদের পৃথিবী মানুষদের দূরত্ব কমানোর, বিতরণের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন পা আমরা অরক্ষিত দুই ভাষা লেক্সিকোন শিল্পের কাজে সফলতা প্রদর্শন করি। এছাড়াও, আমরা একটা মজার খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে পৃথিবীর পরিবর্তনের দূরত্ব দেখাচ্ছে ভাষার পার্থক্য হিসেবে।', 'ca': 'El processament translingüístic de llenguatges naturals depèn de la premisa que hi ha invariació a través de llenguatges. A nivell de paraules, els investigadors han identificat aquesta invariació en la paraula incorporant espais semàntics de diferents llengües. Però per connectar els espais separats, normalment es requereix supervisió translingüística codificada en dades paralleles. En aquest article intentem establir la connexió translingüística sense confiar en cap supervisió translingüística. Vistant les paraules incorporant espais com distribucions, proposem minimitzar la distància del moviment terrestre, una mesura de divergència entre distribucions. We demonstrate the success on the unsupervised bilingual lexicon induction task.  A més, revelem un descobriment interessant que la distància del moviment de la Terra mostra el potencial com a mesura de la diferència lingüística.', 'fi': 'Kielten välinen luonnollinen kielen käsittely perustuu olettamukseen, että kielten välillä on invarianssi. Sanatasolla tutkijat ovat tunnistaneet tällaisen invarianssin eri kielten semanttisia tiloja sisältävässä sanassa. Erillisten tilojen yhdistäminen edellyttää kuitenkin tyypillisesti rinnakkaistietoina koodattua monikielistä valvontaa. Tässä asiakirjassa pyrimme luomaan monikielisen yhteyden tukematta minkäänlaiseen monikieliseen valvontaan. Tarkastelemalla sanaa upottavia tiloja jakaumoina ehdotamme, että minimoidaan niiden maansiirtäjän etäisyys, joka on jakaumien välisen eron mitta. Osoitamme menestyksen valvomattomassa kaksikielisessä sanaston induktiotehtävässä. Lisäksi paljastamme mielenkiintoisen havainnon, että maansiirtäjän etäisyys osoittaa potentiaalia kielieron mittana.', 'et': 'Keeleülene looduskeele töötlemine sõltub eeldusest, et keelte vahel esineb invariantsus. Sõnatasemel on teadlased tuvastanud sellist invariantsust erinevate keelte semantilisi ruume sisaldavas sõnas. Kuid eraldi ruumide ühendamiseks on tavaliselt vaja paralleelsete andmetega kodeeritud keeleülest järelevalvet. Käesolevas dokumendis püüame luua keeleülese seose, toetumata keeleülesele järelevalvele. Vaadates sõna manustamise ruume jaotustena, teeme ettepaneku minimeerida nende maa liikuja kaugust, mis on jaotuste lahknevuse mõõt. Näitame edu järelevalveta kakskeelse leksikoni induktsiooni ülesandel. Lisaks paljastame huvitava avastuse, et maaliikuja kaugus näitab potentsiaali keelelise erinevuse mõõtmisena.', 'sk': 'Medjezična obdelava naravnega jezika temelji na predpostavki, da obstaja invarianca med jeziki. Na ravni besed so raziskovalci takšno invarianco prepoznali v besedi, ki vsebuje semantične prostore različnih jezikov. Vendar pa je za povezovanje ločenih prostorov običajno potreben medjezični nadzor, kodiran v vzporednih podatkih. V tem članku poskušamo vzpostaviti medjezično povezavo, ne da bi se zanašali na noben medjezični nadzor. Z ogledom besednih vgradnih prostorov kot porazdelitev predlagamo, da se zmanjša razdalja njihovega premikalca zemlje, merilo razlike med porazdelitvami. Prikazujemo uspeh pri nenadzorovani indukciji dvojezičnega leksikona. Poleg tega razkrivamo zanimivo ugotovitev, da razdalja zemeljskega gibalca kaže potencial kot merilo jezikovne razlike.', 'ha': "QScriptBreakpointsModel Dukan zane-zane, watani sun gane suriyar wannan cikin magana wanda ke cikin filayen semantic masu cikin harshen dabam-daban. Amma, dõmin ka yi haɗi da filayen da aka ƙayyade, ana ƙayyade tsarin lissafa wanda aka kodi cikin data da ke daidaita. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba mu tabbatar da haɗi na'urar-lugha'a ko kuma ba mu dõgara a kan wani tsari na fassarar-harshen. Ina iya dũbi maganar da ke cikin filayen da aka buɗe su kamar rabo, sai Muke nufi zuwa ƙara tsakanin tafiyar ƙa s a, ko wani gwargwadon da ke s ãɓãwa. Tuna nũna cin nasara a kan aikin da ba'a tsare shi ba. In addition, we reveal an interesting finding that the earth mover's distance shows potential as a measure of language difference.", 'he': "עיבוד שפת טבעית בין שפות תלוי בהנחה שיש פריצה בין שפות. ברמה המילים, חוקרים זיהיו פרידות כזו במילה שמכילה חללים סמנטיים של שפות שונות. בכל אופן, כדי לחבר את המרחבים הנפרדים, פיקוח שפתי צלב מוצפן במידע מקביל נדרש בדרך כלל. בעיתון הזה, אנו מנסים לקבוע את הקשר בין השפה ללא לסמוך על שום פיקוח בין השפה. By viewing word embedding spaces as distributions, we propose to minimize their earth mover's distance, a measure of divergence between distributions.  אנחנו מראים את הצלחה במשימת ההתחלה ללא השגחה של הלקסיקון השולשי. בנוסף, אנחנו חושפים מציאה מעניינת שהמרחק של מעביר כדור הארץ מראה פוטנציאל כמדידת ההבדל בשפה.", 'jv': 'Slang Nang perangkat awak, nambah layang-layang saiki untarangke panjenengan langgar sampeyan winih. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang kuwi iki, awake nambah ndelok kanggo sabanjure sampeyan luwih-luwih kuwi mau nganggo perspeknan liya-luwih. Taning Awakdhéwé éntuk barêng langgar-barêng nggawe barang urip gak dhéwé. Nambah, awak dhéwé éntuk akeh bantên kanggo ngerasakno iki banget wong liya sing nguasai perusahaan kanggo tukang tanggal nglanga.', 'bo': "སྐད་རིགས་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་ཕན་རིས་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་གཅིག་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཤིང་། At the word level, researchers have identified such invariance in the word embedding semantic spaces of different languages. ཡིན་ནའང་། ས་སྐད་ཆ་སོ་སོ་སོའི་བར་སྟོང་དང་གཅིག་མཐུད་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་parallel data་ལས་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟར་དགོས་པ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བུ་མཐུད་ལམ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་རྩོལ་ནུས་མེད་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདི་ By viewing word embedding spaces a s distributions, we propose to minimize their earth mover's distance, a measure of divergence between distributions. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྐྱེས་པའི་བར་ཐག་རིང་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Graph Convolutional Encoders for Syntax-aware Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'التشفير التلافيفي للرسم البياني للترجمة الآلية العصبية المدركة للنحو', 'pt': 'Codificadores convolucionais de gráfico para tradução automática neural sensível à sintaxe', 'es': 'Codificadores convolucionales de gráficos para traducción automática neuronal sensible a la sintaxis', 'fr': 'Codeurs convolutifs de graphe pour la traduction automatique neuronale sensible à la syntaxe', 'ja': '構文認識ニューラル機械翻訳のためのグラフ畳み込みエンコーダ', 'zh': '以语法感知神经机器译之图卷积编码器', 'hi': 'वाक्यविन्यास के लिए ग्राफ कनवल्शनल एन्कोडर-जागरूक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ru': 'Графические сверточные кодировщики для синтаксического нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': "Ionchódóirí Comhraontacha Graf d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach atá feasach ar Chomhréir", 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Κωδικοποιητές στροφής γραφήματος για νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση που γνωρίζει τη σύνταξη', 'hu': 'Graf konvolúciós kódolók szintaxistudatos neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Encoder conveluzionali grafici per traduzione automatica neurale consapevole della sintassi', 'kk': 'Синтаксис түсінікті нейралы машинаны аудару үшін графикалық құрылғылық кодерлері', 'lt': 'Grafiniai konvoliuciniai kodai, skirti sintaksui žinomam neurologiniam vertimui', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ്- അറിയുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡിറ്റര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Синтаксис ойлгомжтой мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй механикийн хөгжлийн график хөгжлийн кодлогчид', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Kodery konwolucyjne wykresu do tłumaczenia maszynowego neuronu', 'mt': 'Graph Convolution Encoders for Syntax-aware Neural Machine Translation', 'sr': 'Konvolucionalni koderi grafika za prevod neuroloških mašina svjesnog sintaksa', 'ro': 'Encodere conveluționale grafice pentru traducerea automată neurală conștientă de sintaxă', 'si': 'සින්තැක්ස් දැනගැනීම් න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය වෙනුවෙන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්පූර්ණික ක', 'so': 'Turjumidda Masiinka Neural ee Sintax-aware', 'sv': 'Grafkonvulutionella kodare för syntaxmedveten neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் நெருக்கி மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான வரைபடம் குறியீடுகள்', 'ur': 'سینٹکس-آگاہ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے گراف کنویلوژنل اکڈر', 'vi': 'Văn bản Truyền thuyết thuyết trình cho máy móc thần kinh.', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Графични конвелуционни кодери за синтаксисен неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'Graf konvolutionelle kodere til syntaksbevidst neural maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Grafische Convolutionele Encoders voor syntax-bewuste neurale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Konvolucionalni koderi grafika za prevod neuroloških strojeva svjesnog sintaksa', 'de': 'Graph Convolutional Encoder für syntaxbewusste neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Graph Convolutional Encoders for Syntax-aware Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '문법 감지 신경 기계 번역에 사용되는 볼륨 인코더', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Sintaks bilen näral Mazmunlar terjime üçin grafik ködlemeler', 'sq': 'Grafiko koduesit konvolutorë për përkthimin e makinës nervore të ndërgjegjshme në sintaksi', 'am': 'Graph Convolutional Encoders for Syntax-aware Neural Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Սինտաքսից գիտակցած նեյրոնային մեքենայի թարգմանման գրաֆիկ հակադարձ կոդերները', 'bn': 'সিন্যাক্স- সচেতন নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য গ্রাফ কনফোল্ডার এনকোডার', 'az': 'Sintaks-bilən Nöral Makin Çeviri üçün Grafik Konvolucional Kodlayıcıları', 'bs': 'Grafički konvolucionalni koderi za prevod neuroloških strojeva svjesnog sintaksa', 'ca': 'Codificadors Convolucionaris de Gràfic per la traducció de màquines neuronals conscients de la sintaxi', 'cs': 'Grafové konveluční kódéry pro syntaxický neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Graafilised konvolutsioonilised kodeerijad süntaksiteadlikuks neuraalseks masintõlkeks', 'fi': 'Graph Convolutional Encoders for Syntax-aware Neural Machine Translation', 'jv': 'Unknown', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'קודים שינויים גרפים לתרגום מכונת נוירולית מודעת לסינטקס', 'sk': 'Grafični konvolucijski kodirniki za sintaksno zavedanje nevronskih strojnih prevodov', 'bo': 'ཡིག་རིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་སྒྱུར་བ་མཚོན་རྟགས་འགྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'We present a simple and effective approach to incorporating syntactic structure into neural attention-based encoder-decoder models for machine translation. We rely on graph-convolutional networks (GCNs), a recent class of neural networks developed for modeling graph-structured data. Our GCNs use predicted syntactic dependency trees of source sentences to produce representations of words (i.e. hidden states of the encoder) that are sensitive to their syntactic neighborhoods. GCNs take word representations as input and produce word representations as output, so they can easily be incorporated as layers into standard encoders (e.g., on top of bidirectional RNNs or convolutional neural networks). We evaluate their effectiveness with English-German and English-Czech translation experiments for different types of encoders and observe substantial improvements over their syntax-agnostic versions in all the considered setups.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche simple et efficace pour intégrer la structure syntaxique dans des modèles encodeur-décodeur basés sur l'attention neuronale pour la traduction automatique. Nous nous appuyons sur les réseaux convolutifs de graphes (GCN), une classe récente de réseaux neuronaux développés pour la modélisation de données structurées par des graphes. Nos GCN utilisent des arbres de dépendances syntaxiques prédits des phrases sources pour produire des représentations de mots (c'est-à-dire des états cachés de l'encodeur) qui sont sensibles à leurs voisins syntaxiques. Les GCN prennent des représentations de mots en entrée et produisent des représentations de mots en sortie, de sorte qu'ils peuvent facilement être incorporés sous forme de couches dans des codeurs standard (par exemple, au-dessus de RNN bidirectionnels ou de réseaux de neurones convolutifs). Nous évaluons leur efficacité avec des expériences de traduction anglais-allemand et anglais-tchèque pour différents types d'encodeurs et observons des améliorations substantielles par rapport à leurs versions indépendantes de la syntaxe dans toutes les configurations considérées.", 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque simple y eficaz para incorporar la estructura sintáctica en los modelos de codificador-decodificador basados en la atención neuronal para la traducción automática. Nos basamos en las redes convolucionales de gráficos (GCN), una clase reciente de redes neuronales desarrolladas para modelar datos estructurados en gráficos. Nuestros GCN utilizan árboles de dependencias sintácticas predichas de oraciones fuente para producir representaciones de palabras (es decir, estados ocultos del codificador) que son sensibles a sus vecindarios sintácticos. Los GCN toman representaciones de palabras como entrada y producen representaciones de palabras como salida, por lo que se pueden incorporar fácilmente como capas en codificadores estándar (por ejemplo, encima de RNN bidireccionales o redes neuronales convolucionales). Evaluamos su eficacia con experimentos de traducción inglés-alemán e inglés-checo para diferentes tipos de codificadores y observamos mejoras sustanciales con respecto a sus versiones independientes de la sintaxis en todas las configuraciones consideradas.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا بسيطًا وفعالًا لدمج البنية النحوية في نماذج وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير القائمة على الانتباه العصبية للترجمة الآلية. نحن نعتمد على شبكات الرسوم البيانية التلافيفية (GCNs) ، وهي فئة حديثة من الشبكات العصبية تم تطويرها لنمذجة البيانات المهيكلة بالرسوم البيانية. تستخدم شبكات GCN الخاصة بنا أشجار التبعية النحوية المتوقعة لجمل المصدر لإنتاج تمثيلات للكلمات (أي الحالات المخفية للتشفير) التي تكون حساسة لأحيائها النحوية. تأخذ شبكات GCN تمثيلات الكلمات كمدخلات وتنتج تمثيلات للكلمات كمخرجات ، بحيث يمكن دمجها بسهولة كطبقات في التشفير القياسي (على سبيل المثال ، أعلى شبكات RNN ثنائية الاتجاه أو الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية). نقوم بتقييم فعاليتها من خلال تجارب الترجمة الإنجليزية-الألمانية والإنجليزية-التشيكية لأنواع مختلفة من التشفير ونلاحظ التحسينات الجوهرية على إصداراتها الحيادية في جميع الإعدادات المدروسة.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem simples e eficaz para incorporar a estrutura sintática em modelos de codificador-decodificador baseados em atenção neural para tradução automática. Contamos com redes convolucionais de grafos (GCNs), uma classe recente de redes neurais desenvolvidas para modelagem de dados estruturados em grafos. Nossos GCNs usam árvores de dependência sintática previstas de sentenças de origem para produzir representações de palavras (ou seja, estados ocultos do codificador) que são sensíveis às suas vizinhanças sintáticas. Os GCNs usam representações de palavras como entrada e produzem representações de palavras como saída, para que possam ser facilmente incorporadas como camadas em codificadores padrão (por exemplo, em cima de RNNs bidirecionais ou redes neurais convolucionais). Avaliamos sua eficácia com experimentos de tradução inglês-alemão e inglês-tcheco para diferentes tipos de codificadores e observamos melhorias substanciais em suas versões agnósticas de sintaxe em todas as configurações consideradas.', 'zh': '立简效之法,结构句法整合于神经之编码器 - 解码器,以机器翻译之。 吾等赖图卷积网络(GCN),此近结数建模开之类神经网络。 吾 GCN 用源句之占句法赖树来以成其句法邻域敏者单词(编码器之隐)也。 GCN以单词为输而成单词,故可以轻为并编码器(,)于双向RNN、卷积神经网络之上。 参伍之编码器英语- 德语与英语 - 捷克语译实验以论其有效性,观诸虑之语法,有实质性之改。', 'ru': 'Представлен простой и эффективный подход к включению синтаксической структуры в модели кодера-декодера на основе нейронного внимания для машинного перевода. Мы полагаемся на графоповоротные сети (GCN), недавний класс нейронных сетей, разработанных для моделирования графоструктурированных данных. Наши GCN используют прогнозируемые синтаксические деревья зависимостей исходных предложений для создания представлений слов (т.е. скрытых состояний кодировщика), которые чувствительны к их синтаксическим соседям. GCN принимают представления слов в качестве входных данных и производят представления слов в качестве выходных данных, поэтому они могут быть легко включены в качестве слоев в стандартные кодировщики (например, поверх двунаправленных RNN или сверточных нейронных сетей). Мы оцениваем их эффективность с помощью англо-немецких и англо-чешских экспериментов по переводу для различных типов кодеров и наблюдаем существенные улучшения по сравнению с их синтаксис-диагностическими версиями во всех рассматриваемых установках.', 'ja': '私たちは、機械翻訳のためのニューラルアテンションベースのエンコーダデコーダモデルに構文構造を組み込むためのシンプルで効果的なアプローチを提示します。私たちは、グラフ構造化データをモデリングするために開発された最近のニューラルネットワークのクラスであるグラフ畳み込みネットワーク（ GCN ）に依存しています。我々のＧＣＮは、ソース文の予測された構文依存性ツリーを使用して、それらの構文近傍に感受性のある単語（すなわち、エンコーダの隠れた状態）の表現を生成する。ＧＣＮは、単語表現を入力として取り、単語表現を出力として生成するため、それらは、（例えば、双方向ＲＮＮまたは畳み込みニューラルネットワークの上に）標準エンコーダにレイヤーとして容易に組み込まれ得る。私たちは、さまざまなタイプのエンコーダのための英語-ドイツ語および英語-チェコ語翻訳実験でそれらの有効性を評価し、検討されたすべてのセットアップで、構文非推論バージョンよりも大幅な改善を観察します。', 'hi': 'हम मशीन अनुवाद के लिए तंत्रिका ध्यान-आधारित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल में वाक्यात्मक संरचना को शामिल करने के लिए एक सरल और प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम ग्राफ-कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क (जीसीएन) पर भरोसा करते हैं, जो ग्राफ-संरचित डेटा मॉडलिंग के लिए विकसित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का एक हालिया वर्ग है। हमारे GCNs स्रोत वाक्यों के अनुमानित वाक्यात्मक निर्भरता पेड़ों का उपयोग शब्दों के प्रतिनिधित्व का उत्पादन करने के लिए करते हैं (यानी एन्कोडर के छिपे हुए राज्य) जो उनके वाक्यात्मक पड़ोस के प्रति संवेदनशील हैं। GCNs इनपुट के रूप में शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व लेते हैं और आउटपुट के रूप में शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व का उत्पादन करते हैं, इसलिए उन्हें आसानी से मानक एनकोडर में परतों के रूप में शामिल किया जा सकता है (उदाहरण के लिए, द्विदिश RNNs या convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के शीर्ष पर)। हम विभिन्न प्रकार के एनकोडर के लिए अंग्रेजी-जर्मन और अंग्रेजी-चेक अनुवाद प्रयोगों के साथ उनकी प्रभावशीलता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और सभी माने गए सेटअप में उनके वाक्यविन्यास-अज्ञेयवादी संस्करणों पर पर्याप्त सुधार देखते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair cur chuige simplí agus éifeachtach chun struchtúr comhréire a ionchorprú i múnlaí ionchódóra-díchódóra néar-bhunaithe aird-bhunaithe le haghaidh aistriúcháin mheaisín. Táimid ag brath ar líonraí graf-raonta (GCNanna), aicme líonraí néaracha le déanaí a forbraíodh chun sonraí graf-struchtúrtha a shamhaltú. Úsáideann ár GCNanna crainn spleáchais chomhréire réamh-mheasta d’abairtí foinseacha chun léiriú a thabhairt ar fhocail (i.e. stáit fholaithe an ionchódóra) atá íogair dá gcomharsanachtaí comhréire. Glacann GCNanna léiriúcháin focal mar ionchur agus táirgeann siad léiriúcháin focal mar aschur, ionas gur féidir iad a ionchorprú go héasca mar shraitheanna in ionchódóirí caighdeánacha (m.sh., ar bharr RNNanna déthreocha nó líonraí néaracha comhbheartaithe). Déanaimid measúnú ar a n-éifeachtacht le turgnaimh aistriúcháin Béarla-Gearmáinis agus Béarla-Seice do chineálacha éagsúla ionchódóirí agus breathnaimid ar fheabhsuithe suntasacha ar a leaganacha comhréire-agnóiseacha sna socruithe go léir a mheastar.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή και αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για την ενσωμάτωση της συντακτικής δομής σε μοντέλα κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών με βάση την νευρική προσοχή για μηχανική μετάφραση. Βασιζόμαστε σε δίκτυα γραφής-συστολής (GCN), μια πρόσφατη κατηγορία νευρωνικών δικτύων που αναπτύχθηκε για τη μοντελοποίηση δεδομένων δομημένων με γραφήματα. Τα GCN μας χρησιμοποιούν προβλεπόμενα συντακτικά δέντρα εξάρτησης των προτάσεων προέλευσης για να παράγουν αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων (δηλαδή κρυφές καταστάσεις του κωδικοποιητή) που είναι ευαίσθητες στις συντακτικές γειτονιές τους. Τα GCN λαμβάνουν τις αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων ως εισαγωγή και παράγουν τις αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων ως έξοδο, έτσι ώστε εύκολα να ενσωματωθούν ως στρώματα σε τυποποιημένους κωδικοποιητές (π.χ., πάνω από αμφίδρομη ή σύνθετα νευρωνικά δίκτυα). Αξιολογούμε την αποτελεσματικότητά τους με αγγλογερμανικά και αγγλοτσεχικά μεταφραστικά πειράματα για διαφορετικούς τύπους κωδικοποιητών και παρατηρούμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις συντακτικά-αγνωστικές εκδόσεις τους σε όλες τις εξεταζόμενες ρυθμίσεις.', 'hu': 'Egyszerű és hatékony megközelítést mutatunk be a szintaktikus struktúra beépítésének idegi figyelem-alapú kódoló-dekódoló modellekbe gépi fordításhoz. Graf-convolucionális hálózatokra (GCN-ekre) támaszkodunk, amelyeket a gráf-strukturált adatok modellezésére fejlesztettek ki. Általános hálózataink a forráspontok előrejelzett szintaktikus függőségi fáit használják, hogy olyan szavakat (azaz a kódoló rejtett állapotát) készítsenek, amelyek érzékenyek a szintaktikus környékeikre. A GCN-ek bemenetként veszik a szóreprezentációkat és kimenetként szóreprezentációkat állítanak elő, így könnyen beépíthetők rétegekként szabványos kódolókba (pl. kétirányú RNN-ek vagy konvolúciós neurális hálózatok tetején). Hatékonyságukat angol-német és angol-cseh fordítási kísérletekkel értékeljük különböző típusú kódolók esetében, és jelentős javulást figyelünk meg a szintaxis-agnosztikus változataikhoz képest minden figyelembe vett beállításban.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ უფრო და ეფექტიური პროგრამის გამოყენება სინტექტიკური სტრუქტურაციას ნეიროლური დაახლოებით ინფორმაციის რეკოდერების მოდელში. ჩვენ გრაფიკონგულუციონალური ქსელები (GCNs) დავყენებთ, ახალი ნეიროლური ქსელების კლასი, რომელიც განვითარებულია გრაფიკური სტრუქტურული მონაც ჩვენი GCNs გამოყენება სინტექტიკური დამართებულობა სინტექტიკური სინტექტიკური წყალების გამოყენება სიტყვების გამოყენება (მაგალითად სინტექტიკური წყალების გამოყენება) რომელიც ისინი სინ GCNs იყენებს სიტყვების გამოსახულებები როგორც შეიყენება და გამოსახულება სიტყვების გამოსახულებები როგორც გამოსახულება, რადგან ისინი ადვილედ შეიძლება გამოყენება როგორც სიტყვები სტანდარტანე კო ჩვენ ისინი ეფექციურობას ინგლისური-გერმანური და ინგლისური-ფექური გადაწყვეტილების ექსპერიმენტებით განსხვავებული ტიპის კოდერებისთვის გავუმუშავებთ და ისინი სინტაქსი-ადნოს', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio semplice ed efficace per incorporare la struttura sintattica in modelli encoder-decoder basati sull'attenzione neurale per la traduzione automatica. Ci affidiamo alle reti graf-convolutional (GCN), una recente classe di reti neurali sviluppata per modellare dati strutturati con grafici. I nostri GCN utilizzano alberi di dipendenza sintattica previsti delle frasi sorgente per produrre rappresentazioni di parole (cioè stati nascosti dell'encoder) sensibili ai loro quartieri sintattici. Le GCN prendono rappresentazioni di parole come input e producono rappresentazioni di parole come output, in modo che possano essere facilmente incorporate come layer in encoder standard (ad esempio, sopra a RNN bidirezionali o reti neurali convoluzionali). Valutiamo la loro efficacia con esperimenti di traduzione inglese-tedesco e inglese-ceco per diversi tipi di encoder e osserviamo miglioramenti sostanziali rispetto alle loro versioni sintassi-agnostiche in tutte le configurazioni considerate.", 'lt': 'Mes pateikiame paprastą ir veiksmingą požiūrį į sintaksinės struktūros įtraukimą į neurologiniu dėmesiu pagrįstus kodavimo kodavimo modelius mašininiam vertimui. Mes pasikliaujame grafinių konvoliucinių tinklų (GCNs), naujausios klasės nervinių tinklų, sukurtų grafinių struktūrinių duomenų modeliavimui. Mūsų GCNs naudoja prognozuojamus sintaksinį priklausomybę nuo i šorinių sakinių medžius, kad būtų galima atspindėti žodžius (t. y. paslėptas kodavimo būkles), kurie yra jautrūs jų sintaksiniams rajonams. GCNs laiko žodžių atvaizdais kaip įvesties ir gamina žodžių atvaizdais kaip išvesties, todėl juos lengvai galima įtraukti kaip sluoksnius į standartinius kodus (pvz., virš dvikrypčių RNN arba konvoliucinių nervų tinklų). Vertiname jų veiksmingumą atliekant įvairių kodų rūšių anglų, vokiečių ir čekų vertimo eksperimentus ir stebime esminius jų sintaksinės-agnostinės versijos patobulinimus visose svarstomose struktūrose.', 'mk': 'Презентираме едноставен и ефикасен пристап кон вклучување на синтактичката структура во моделите на кодер-декодер за машински превод базирани на нервно внимание. Се потпираме на графско-конволуционални мрежи (GCNs), неодамнешна класа на нервни мрежи развиени за моделирање на графски структурирани податоци. Нашите GCNs користат предвидени синтактички дрвја на зависност од изворните реченици за да создадат претставувања на зборови (т.е. скриени состојби на кодерот) кои се чувствителни на нивните синтактички соседи. GCNs take word representations as input and produce word representations as output, so they can easily be incorporated as layers into standard encoders (e.g., on top of bidirectional RNNs or convolutional neural networks).  Ние ја проценуваме нивната ефективност со англиско-германски и англиско-чешки преведувачки експерименти за различни типови на кодери и набљудуваме значителни подобрувања во врска со нивните синтакси-агностички верзии во сите размислени поставувања.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan sederhana dan efektif untuk memasukkan struktur sintaktik ke dalam model pengekod-pengekod berasaskan perhatian saraf untuk terjemahan mesin. Kami bergantung pada rangkaian-konvolusi graf (GCNs), kelas rangkaian saraf yang baru-baru ini dikembangkan untuk memmodelkan data struktur graf. GCNs kami menggunakan pokok dependensi sintaktik terduga kalimat sumber untuk menghasilkan perwakilan perkataan (iaitu keadaan tersembunyi pengekod) yang sensitif kepada lingkungan sintaktik mereka. GCNs mengambil perwakilan perkataan sebagai input dan menghasilkan perwakilan perkataan sebagai output, supaya ia mudah disertakan sebagai lapisan ke dalam pengekod piawai (cth., di atas RNN bidireksi atau rangkaian saraf konvolusi). Kami menilai kegunaan mereka dengan eksperimen terjemahan bahasa Inggeris-Jerman dan bahasa Inggeris-Cek untuk jenis pengekod yang berbeza dan mengamati peningkatan yang besar atas versi sintaks-agnostik mereka dalam semua setup yang dianggap.', 'kk': 'Біз синтактикалық құрылғыны невралдық назардағы кодер- декодер үлгілеріне ендіру үшін қарапайым және эффективті арқылы таңдаймыз. Біз график құрылған деректерді моделдеу үшін жаңа невралдық желілер класына сенеміз. GCN-деріміз синтактикалық мәліметтерінің синтактикалық тәуелсіздік ағаштарын қолданып, синтактикалық қоршауларына синтактикалық мәліметтерді (яғни, кодердің жасырын күйлері) көрсетуге арналған сөздер GCN сөздерді келтіріп, сөздерді шығыс ретінде көрсету үшін құрылады, сондықтан олар стандартты кодерлер ретінде қабаттар ретінде (мысалы, бидирекциялық RNN немесе конверсиялық невралдық желілердің үстінен қоса алады). Біз ағылшын- неміс және ағылшын- чех аудармаларының әртүрлі түрлері кодерлердің тәжірибесін бағалап, олардың синтаксис- агностикалық нұсқаларының көп жақсартуларын қараймыз.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധയോടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലുകളിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d സ നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്-ക്രാപ്റ്റമില്ലാത്ത ശൃംഖലങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രാഫ് സ്ഥാപിച്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നതിനാ നമ്മുടെ ജിസിഎന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വിധികളുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയാണ്  @ info ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ചെക്ക്-ചെക്ക് പരിശോധന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി അവരുടെ പ്രവർത്', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy proste i skuteczne podejście do włączenia struktury składni do neuronowych modeli kodera-dekodera do tłumaczenia maszynowego opartych na uwadze. Opieramy się na sieciach grafowo-konwolucyjnych (GCN), najnowszej klasie sieci neuronowych opracowanych do modelowania danych strukturalnych wykresów. Nasze GCN wykorzystują przewidywane drzewa zależności składni zdań źródłowych do tworzenia reprezentacji słów (tj. ukrytych stanów kodera), które są wrażliwe na ich składniowe sąsiedztwa. GCN przyjmują reprezentacje słów jako wejście i produkują reprezentacje słów jako wyjście, więc mogą być łatwo włączone jako warstwy do standardowych koderów (np. na górze dwukierunkowych RNN lub konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych). Oceniamy ich skuteczność za pomocą eksperymentów tłumaczeniowych angielsko-niemieckich i angielsko-czeskich dla różnych rodzajów koderów i obserwujemy znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do ich wersji agnostycznych składni we wszystkich rozważanych konfiguracjach.', 'mn': 'Бид синтактик бүтцийг мэдрэлийн анхаарлын үндсэн кодлогчийн загвар руу шилжүүлэхэд энгийн, эффективны арга зам өгч байна. Бид график-хоорондын сүлжээнд (GCNs) итгэдэг. Саяхан мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хэсэг нь график бүтээгдэхүүний өгөгдлийг модельчлэхэд хөгжсөн. Бидний GCN-д эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрүүдийн синтактик хамааралтай модыг ашиглаж өгүүлбэртэй үг бий болгоход (яг л коддогчийн нуугдсан орнууд) синтактик хөршөөнд мэдрэмжтэй байдаг. GCNs үгний илэрхийллийг орлуулж, үгний илэрхийллийг үржүүлэх гэж бий болгодог. Тиймээс тэд стандарт коддогчид хэлбэрээр амархан нэгтгэх боломжтой. Бид Англи-Герман, Англи-Чех хэлний хөрөнгө оруулах туршилттай тэдний үр дүнг өөр төрлийн коддогчдын туршилтаар үнэлдэг. Тэдний синтаксис-агностик хувилбаруудын тухай олон сайжруулалтыг харах болно.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein enkel og effektiv tilnærming til å inkludere syntaksisk struktur i neuraloppmerksomhetsbaserte koderingsmodeller for maskinsomsetjing. We rely on graph-convolutional networks (GCNs), a recent class of neural networks developed for modelling of graph-structured data. GCN-ane våre bruker forventa syntaksisk avhengighetstråde av kjeldesetningar for å produsera representasjonar av ord (t.d. gøymde tilstandar av koderen) som er sensitiv til sine syntakske nabotnader. GCNs tar ordrepresentasjonar som inndata og produserer ordrepresentasjonar som utdata, slik at dei kan enkelt inkluderast som lag i standardekoder (f.eks. øvre av bidireksjonale RNN eller konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk). Vi evaluerer effektiviteten sine med engelsk-tysk og engelsk-tsjekkisk omsetjingsperiment for ulike typar koder og observerer store forbedringar over sine syntaks-agnostiske versjonar i alle oppsetta.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o abordare simplă și eficientă pentru încorporarea structurii sintactice în modele de encoder-decoder bazate pe atenție neurală pentru traducerea automată. Ne bazăm pe rețelele grafice-convoluționale (GCNs), o clasă recentă de rețele neuronale dezvoltată pentru modelarea datelor grafice-structurate. GCN-urile noastre folosesc arbori de dependență sintactică predicți ai propozițiilor sursă pentru a produce reprezentări ale cuvintelor (adică stările ascunse ale codificatorului) care sunt sensibile la cartierele lor sintactice. GCN-urile iau reprezentări de cuvinte ca intrare și produc reprezentări de cuvinte ca ieșire, astfel încât acestea pot fi ușor încorporate ca straturi în codificatoare standard (de exemplu, deasupra RNN-urilor bidirecționale sau rețelelor neuronale convoluționale). Evaluăm eficiența acestora cu experimente de traducere engleză-germană și engleză-cehă pentru diferite tipuri de codificatoare și observăm îmbunătățiri substanțiale față de versiunile lor sintaxe-agnostice în toate setările luate în considerare.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan i efikasan pristup uključenju sintaktičke strukture u modele kodera za prevod mašine na osnovu neuralne pažnje. Oslanjamo se na graf-konvolucione mreže (GCNs), nedavnu klasu neuralnih mreža razvijene za modeliranje grafostrukturovanih podataka. Naši GCN koriste predviđene sintaktične zavisnosti drveća izvornih rečenica da bi proizveli predstave reči (tj. skrivenih država kodera) koje su osjetljive na njihove sintaktične komšiluke. GCNs uzima reèi predstave kao ulaz i proizvode reèi kao izlaz, tako da se mogu lako ukljuèiti kao slojevi u standardne kodere (npr. na vrh dvodirektivnih RNN-a ili konvolucionalnih neuralnih mreža). Procjenjujemo njihovu učinkovitost sa eksperimentima engleskog-njemačkog i engleskog-češkog prevoda za različite vrste kodera i posmatramo značajne poboljšanje nad njihovim sintaksa-agnostičkim verzijama u svim razmotrenim setovima.', 'si': 'අපි සාධාරණ සහ ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදිහයක් පෙන්වන්නේ සංවිධානය සංවිධානයක් න්\u200dයූරාල අවධානය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ්-සංවේදනය ජාලය (GCNs) වලට විශ්වාස කරනවා, අලුත් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයේ සංවේදනය සංවේ අපේ GCNs පාවිච්චි විදිහට සංවිධානය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරභාවිත වර්ගයේ වර්ගයේ වර්ගය (ඉතින් ඔවුන්ගේ සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ වර් GCNs වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඇතුළත් විදියට ගන්න සහ වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විදියට ගන්න පුළුවන්, ඉතින් ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ කෝඩර් ව අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීස්-ජර්මන් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීස්-චෙක් භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ඔවුන්ගේ පරීක්ෂණය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා වෙනස් වර්ගයක් සඳහා වෙනස් ක', 'so': "Waxaynu keennaa qaab fudud oo faa’iido ah oo ku qoraya dhismaha syntactic, si aan u dhigno tusaalayaasha kooxda codcoder-decoder ee turjumidda machine. Waxaynu ku kalsoonnahay shabakado maamul ah (GCNs), taasoo ah fasalka ugu dhow shabakada neurada ah oo loo horumariyey si loo sameynayo macluumaadka rasmiga ah. Qorigayada GCNku waxay isticmaalaan geedaha isku xiran e e xukunka sourceedka si ay u soo saaraan xuquuqda hadallada (sida dowlada qarsoon ee kooxooyinka) oo u jilicsanaya derisyadooda. GCNs waxay u qaadaan hadal ka muuqashada sida input oo kale, markaasna waxay u soo bandhigi karaan warqado ka mid ah sida soo baxa, sidaa darteed waxaa si fudud loogu qori karaa qasnadaha kaararka ah (tusaale ahaan kore-ka RNs ama shabakado cayimanta ah). Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa faa'iidadooda ku saabsan imtixaanka turjumista Ingiriis-Jarmal iyo Ingiriis-Czech ee noocyo kala duduwan, waxaana fiirinaynaa horumarinta ugu horumarinta kooxahooda syntax-agnostika ee la xisaabiyay oo dhan.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett enkelt och effektivt tillvägagångssätt för att införliva syntaktisk struktur i neurala uppmärksamhetsbaserade encoder-dekoder modeller för maskinöversättning. Vi förlitar oss på grafkonvulutionsnätverk (GCN), en nyligen utvecklad klass av neurala nätverk som utvecklats för modellering av grafstrukturerade data. Våra GCN använder förutspådda syntaktiska beroendeträd av källmeningar för att producera representationer av ord (dvs dolda tillstånd av kodaren) som är känsliga för deras syntaktiska kvarter. GCN tar ordrepresentationer som inmatning och producerar ordrepresentationer som utmatning, så att de enkelt kan införlivas som lager i standardkodare (t.ex. ovanpå dubbelriktade RNN eller konvulutionella neurala nätverk). Vi utvärderar deras effektivitet med engelsk-tyska och engelsk-tjeckiska översättningsexperiment för olika typer av kodare och observerar betydande förbättringar jämfört med deras syntax-agnostiska versioner i alla tänkta konfigurationer.', 'ta': 'கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரிகளை சேர்க்க ஒரு எளிய மற்றும் விளைவான முறைமையை நாம் கொண்டுவருகிறோ நாங்கள் வரைபடத்தில் சார்ந்த பிணையங்களை நம்புகிறோம், சமீபத்தில் ஒரு புதிய புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்கும் தரவ எங்கள் ஜிசிஎன்கள் மூல வாக்குகளின் ஒத்திசைப்படையான சார்பு மரங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறார்கள் அதாவது அவர்கள் ஒத்திசைக்கூடிய அணுகுகளுக்கு உணர்வுடை GCNs வார்த்தையை உள்ளீட்டில் எடுத்து வார்த்தையை வெளியீட்டாக உருவாக்குகிறது, அதனால் அவர்கள் சுலபமாக அடுக்குகளை நிலையான குறியீடுகளாக சேர்க்க முடிய ஆங்கிலம்- ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலம்- செக்- செக் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பரிசோதனைகளுடன் அவர்களுடைய விளைவை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் கருதப்பட்ட எல்லா அமைப', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ساده اور اثبات طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ سینٹاکتیک ساختار کو نیورال توجه پر بنیاد رکھا گیا ایک کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل مشین ترجمہ کے لئے شامل کریں۔ ہم گراف-کنویلوژن نیٹورک (GCNs) پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں، ایک نئورل نیٹورک کا اخیر کلاس ہے جو گراف-ساختہ ڈیٹا کی مدل کے لئے پیدا ہوا ہے۔ ہمارے GCNs نے کلمات کی پیش بینی کی سینٹاکسی اعتماد کے درختوں کو استعمال کیا ہے جو ان کے سینٹاکسی محله پر حساس ہیں۔ GCNs لفظوں کو اینٹرنیٹ کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے اور لفظوں کو اینٹرنیٹ کے طور پر اینٹرنیٹ بناتے ہیں، تاکہ یہ لفظوں کے طور پر استاندارڈ کوڈر میں آسان ہو سکتے ہیں (جیسا کہ بیڈیریٹرنیٹ RNN یا کنویرول نیورل نیٹرنیٹ کے بال ہم انگلیسی-جرمانی اور انگلیسی-چک کی ترجمہ آزمائش کے ساتھ ان کی فعالیت کا ارزش کرتے ہیں مختلف طریقوں کے لئے اور ان کے سینٹکس-agnostic نسخہ پر بہت اضافہ کی نظر کرتے ہیں ہر طرح کی نظر میں۔', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ sempliċi u effettiv għall-inkorporazzjoni ta’ struttura sintattika f’mudelli ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder ibbażati fuq l-attenzjoni newrali għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna. We rely on graph-convolutional networks (GCNs), a recent class of neural networks developed for modeling graph-structured data.  Il-GCNs tagħna jużaw siġar ta’ dipendenza sintetika mbassra tas-sentenzi tas-sors biex jipproduċu rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ kliem (jiġifieri stati moħbija tal-kodifikatur) li huma sensittivi għall-viċinat sintetiku tagħhom. GCNs take word representations as input and produce word representations as output, so they can easily be incorporated as layers into standard encoders (e.g., on top of bidirectional RNNs or convolutional neural networks).  Aħna jevalwaw l-effettività tagħhom bl-esperimenti ta’ traduzzjoni Ingliż-Ġermaniż u Ingliż-Ċek għal tipi differenti ta’ kodifikaturi u josservaw titjib sostanzjali fuq il-verżjonijiet sintaksi-agnostiċi tagħhom fl-istabbilimenti kollha kkunsidrati.', 'uz': "Biz bir oddiy va effektiv usulni mashinaning tarjima tarjima uchun neyron paydo-asosida kodekoder modellariga kiritish uchun sodda va foydalanuvchi usul qilamiz. Biz grafik muammolar tarmoqlariga (GCNs), yaqinda, grafik tuzilgan maʼlumotni modellash uchun yaxshi tarmoq tarmoqlariga ishlatamiz. Bizning GCNlar qo'shilgan tashkilotlardan foydalaniladigan tashkilotni tasavvur qiladi. Bu soʻzlarning sintaktik sonlariga o'xshash bo'lgan so'zlar (m.g. kodlash davlatlari) dan foydalanadi. Name Biz ingliz tilida Olmonchaga va ingliz-chekscha tarjima tahrirchi imtiyozlarini qiymatimiz va har xil turli kodlash uchun ularning syntax-agnostik versiyalarini ko'rib chiqqamiz hamma tugmalar tarjimalarda o'zgarishni ko'raymiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một phương pháp đơn giản và hiệu quả để nhập cấu trúc cú pháp vào các mẫu mã hóa dựa vào tập trung thần kinh. Chúng tôi dựa vào các mạng lưới bọc đồ thị (GCNs), một lớp sóng thần kinh mới được phát triển để thiết kế dữ liệu cấu trúc đồ thị. Các GCN của chúng ta sử dụng các cây phụ thuộc cú pháp tiên đoán để tạo các biểu hiện từ (tức là trạng thái bị giấu của bộ mã hóa) nhạy cảm với môi trường cú pháp của chúng. Các GCNs dùng các phát biểu từ làm nhập và sản xuất các biểu hiện từ như kết xuất, vì thế chúng có thể dễ dàng được nhập vào các lớp trong bộ mã hóa chuẩn (v.d., trên đỉnh của RNN hai trực tiếp hay các mạng thần kinh rối xoắn). Chúng tôi đánh giá hiệu quả của chúng bằng các thí nghiệm dịch chuyển Anh-Đức và Anh-Séc cho các loại mã hóa khác nhau và quan sát những cải tiến đáng kể trong các phiên bản cộng hưởng.', 'bg': 'Представяме прост и ефективен подход за включване на синтактична структура в невронно-внимателни кодер-декодерни модели за машинен превод. Разчитаме на графично-конволюционни мрежи (ГНС), скорошен клас невронни мрежи, разработени за моделиране на графично-структурирани данни. Нашите ГН използват прогнозирани синтактични дървета на зависимостта на изходните изречения, за да произвеждат изображения на думи (т.е. скрити състояния на кодера), които са чувствителни към техните синтактични квартали. Генералните кодове приемат изразите на думи като вход и произвеждат изрази на думи като изход, така че те могат лесно да бъдат вградени като слоеве в стандартни кодери (например върху двупосочни RNN или конволюционни невронни мрежи). Ние оценяваме тяхната ефективност с експерименти за превод на английски-немски и английски-чешки език за различни видове кодери и наблюдаваме значителни подобрения спрямо техните синтаксис-агностични версии във всички разглеждани настройки.', 'da': "Vi præsenterer en enkel og effektiv tilgang til at indarbejde syntaktisk struktur i neurale opmærksomhedsbaserede encoder-dekoder modeller til maskinoversættelse. Vi er afhængige af graf-convolutional netværk (GCNs), en nylig klasse af neurale netværk udviklet til modellering af grafstrukturerede data. Vores GCN'er bruger forudsigede syntaktiske afhængighedstræer af kildesætninger til at producere repræsentationer af ord (dvs. skjulte tilstande af koderen), der er følsomme over for deres syntaktiske kvarterer. GCN'er tager ord repræsentationer som input og producerer ord repræsentationer som output, så de nemt kan indarbejdes som lag i standard encodere (f.eks. oven på bidirektionelle RNN'er eller konvulutive neurale netværk). Vi evaluerer deres effektivitet med engelsk-tysk og engelsk-tjekkisk oversættelseseksperimenter for forskellige typer kodere og observerer betydelige forbedringer i forhold til deres syntaks-agnostiske versioner i alle de overvejede opsætninger.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan i učinkovit pristup uključenju sintaktičke strukture u modele kodera za prevod strojeva na osnovu neuronske pažnje. Oslanjamo se na graf-konvolucione mreže (GCNs), nedavnu klasu neuralnih mreža razvijene za modeliranje podataka s grafom. Naši GCN koriste predviđene sintaktičke zavisnosti drveća izvornih rečenica kako bi proizveli predstave riječi (tj. skrivenih država kodera) koje su osjetljive na njihove sintaktičke susjede. GCNs uzima riječije predstave kao ulaz i proizvode riječije predstave kao izlaz, tako da se mogu lako uključiti kao slojeve u standardne kodere (npr. na vrh dvoričnih RNN-a ili konvolucionalnih neuralnih mreža). Procjenjujemo njihovu učinkovitost s eksperimentima engleskog-njemačkog i engleskog-češkog prevoda za različite vrste kodera i posmatramo značajne poboljšanje nad njihovim sintaksičkim agnostičkim verzijama u svim razmotrenim setovima.', 'nl': "We presenteren een eenvoudige en effectieve aanpak voor het integreren van syntactische structuur in neurale aandacht gebaseerde encoder-decoder modellen voor machinevertaling. We vertrouwen op graph-convolutional networks (GCN's), een recente klasse van neurale netwerken ontwikkeld voor het modelleren van grafiekgestructureerde gegevens. Onze GCN's gebruiken voorspelde syntactische afhankelijkheidsbomen van bronzinnen om representaties te produceren van woorden (d.w.z. verborgen toestanden van de encoder) die gevoelig zijn voor hun syntactische buurten. GCN's nemen woordrepresentaties als input en produceren woordrepresentaties als output, zodat ze gemakkelijk als lagen kunnen worden opgenomen in standaard encoders (bijvoorbeeld bovenop bidirectionele RNN's of convolutionele neurale netwerken). We evalueren hun effectiviteit met Engels-Duits en Engels-Tsjechisch vertaalexperimenten voor verschillende typen encoders en observeren aanzienlijke verbeteringen ten opzichte van hun syntaxis-agnostische versies in alle overwogen opstellingen.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen einfachen und effektiven Ansatz, um syntaktische Strukturen in neuronale aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Encoder-Decoder-Modelle für die maschinelle Übersetzung zu integrieren. Wir setzen auf Graph-Convolutional Networks (GCNs), eine neue Klasse neuronaler Netzwerke, die für die Modellierung graph-strukturierter Daten entwickelt wurde. Unsere GCNs verwenden prognostizierte syntaktische Abhängigkeitsbäume von Quellsätzen, um Repräsentationen von Wörtern (d.h. versteckte Zustände des Encoders) zu erzeugen, die empfindlich auf ihre syntaktischen Nachbarschaften reagieren. GCNs nehmen Wortdarstellungen als Eingabe und produzieren Wortdarstellungen als Ausgabe, so dass sie leicht als Layer in Standard-Encoder integriert werden können (z.B. über bidirektionalen RNNs oder convolutionalen neuronalen Netzwerken). Wir bewerten deren Effektivität mit Englisch-Deutsch und Englisch-Tschechisch Übersetzungsexperimenten für verschiedene Encodertypen und beobachten signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber ihren syntaxagnostischen Versionen in allen betrachteten Setups.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش ساده و تاثیر برای شامل ساختار سنتاکتیک را در مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cهای عصبی برای ترجمه ماشین نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما به شبکه\u200cهای گراف-کنvolutional (GCNs) اعتماد می\u200cکنیم، یک کلاس جدید از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی که برای مدل داده\u200cهای ساخته شده\u200cی گراف توسعه می\u200cکنند. GCN ما از درختان بستگی سنتاکتیک پیش\u200cبینی از جمله\u200cهای منبع برای تولید نمایش\u200cهای کلمات (یعنی وضعیت\u200cهای پنهان\u200cشده\u200cی رمز\u200cکننده) استفاده می\u200cکنند که به محله\u200cهای سنتاکتیک آنها حساس هستند. GCN نمایش\u200cنامه\u200cهای کلمه را به عنوان ورودی می\u200cگیرند و نمایش\u200cنامه\u200cهای کلمه را به عنوان خروج می\u200cگیرند، بنابراین می\u200cتوانند به آسانی به عنوان طبقه\u200cها به عنوان لایه\u200cها در رمز\u200cنامه\u200cهای استاندارد (مثال بر بالای RNN\u200cهای دورژی یا ما عملکرد آنها را با آزمایش ترجمه\u200cهای انگلیسی-آلمانی و انگلیسی-چک برای نوع\u200cهای متفاوت\u200cکننده\u200cها ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم و توسعه\u200cهای بسیار زیادی بر نسخه\u200cهای سنتاکس-agnostic آنها در تمام ساختمان\u200cهایی که به نظر می\u200cرسند نگاه می', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan sederhana dan efektif untuk memasukkan struktur sintaksi ke dalam model pengekoder-dekoder berbasis perhatian saraf untuk terjemahan mesin. Kami bergantung pada jaringan konvolusi grafik (GCNs), kelas jaringan saraf baru-baru ini dikembangkan untuk memmodelir data strukturasi grafik. GCNs kami menggunakan pohon-pohon pendekatan sintaks prediksi dari kalimat sumber untuk menghasilkan representation dari kata (i.e. keadaan tersembunyi koder) yang sensitif kepada lingkungan sintaks mereka. GCNs mengambil represensi kata sebagai input dan menghasilkan represensi kata sebagai output, sehingga mereka dapat mudah disertai sebagai lapisan ke koder standar (contohnya, di atas RNN bidireksi atau jaringan neural konvolusi). Kami mengevaluasi efektivitas mereka dengan eksperimen terjemahan bahasa Inggris-Jerman dan bahasa Inggris-Cek untuk jenis pengekode berbeda dan mengamati peningkatan yang besar atas versi sintaks-agnostik mereka dalam semua setup yang dianggap.', 'ko': '우리는 간단한 효과적인 방법을 제시하여 문법 구조를 신경 주의를 바탕으로 하는 기계 번역 디코더 모델에 통합시켰다.GCNs(Golume Network) 에 의존하는 Google은 최근에 개발된 모델링 도면 구조 데이터에 사용되는 신경 네트워크입니다.GCN은 원본 문장의 예측 문법 의존 트리를 사용하여 문법 이웃에 민감한 단어 표시 (즉 인코더의 숨겨진 상태) 를 생성합니다.GCN은 단어 표시를 입력으로 하고 단어 표시를 출력으로 생성하기 때문에 표준 인코더(예를 들어 양방향 RNN이나 권적 신경 네트워크 위)에 쉽게 층으로 통합할 수 있다.우리는 영어, 독일어, 영어, 체코어로 서로 다른 유형의 인코더에 대해 번역 실험을 실시하여 그들의 유효성을 평가했고 모든 고려된 설정에서 문법이 알 수 없는 버전보다 실질적인 개선이 있음을 관찰했다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mbinu rahisi na yenye ufanisi wa kuingiza muundo wa muundo wa ushirikiano katika mifano ya kodi-decodir kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine. Tunategemea mitandao ya picha yenye uhakika (GCNs), darasa la hivi karibuni la mitandao ya neura zilizoundwa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza taarifa zilizotengenezwa. Watu wetu wa GCNs wanatumia mti wa ushirikiano unaotarajiwa kutegemea hukumu za vyanzo ili kutengeneza uwakilizaji wa maneno (yaani nchi zilizofichikana ya kodi) ambazo ni wenye hisia kwa maeneo yao ya ushirikiano. Shirika la GCNs huchukua maonesho ya neno kama input na kutengeneza maonesho ya neno kama matokeo, ili kwa urahisi wanaweza kuunganishwa kama vipengele vya kiwango cha kawaida (kwa mfano juu ya mitandao ya RNNs au ya utata ya neurali). Tunatathmini ufanisi wao kwa majaribio ya tafsiri ya Kiingereza na Kiingereza na Kizech kwa aina mbalimbali ya kodi na kuangalia maboresho makubwa zaidi ya toleo lao la kikagnostic katika matatizo yote yanayofikiriwa.', 'sq': 'We present a simple and effective approach to incorporating syntactic structure into neural attention-based encoder-decoder models for machine translation.  Ne mbështetemi në rrjetet grafike-konvolutive (GCNs), një klasë e fundit rrjetesh nervore të zhvilluar për modelimin e të dhënave të strukturuara grafikisht. GCNs-ët tanë përdorin pemë të parashikuara të varësisë sintaktike të fjalëve burimore për të prodhuar përfaqësime të fjalëve (i.e. gjendjeve të fshehta të koduesit) që janë të ndjeshme ndaj lagjeve sintaktike të tyre. GCNs marrin përfaqësimet e fjalëve si input dhe prodhojnë përfaqësimet e fjalëve si output, kështu që ato mund të përfshihen lehtë si shtresa në koduesit standard (për shembull, mbi RNN dy-drejtuese apo rrjetet nervore konvolutive). Ne vlerësojmë efektshmërinë e tyre me eksperimentet e përkthimit anglisht-gjerman dhe anglisht-çek për lloje të ndryshme kodues dhe vëzhgojmë përmirësime thelbësore mbi versionet e tyre sintaks-agnostike në të gjitha konfigurimet e konsideruara.', 'am': 'የናውሬው የኮድዶር-የድምፅ አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን ለመግጠም ቀላል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በgraph-convolute networks (GCNs), የቀን የኔural network ለgraph-structured data ማሳየት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ የGCNs እና ለጎረቤቶቻቸው የሚታወቁ የቃላት (የኮድዶ ሀገሮች) መልዕክቶች እንዲያሳስቡ በተቀረበ የሲንተርካዊ ታዋቂነት የክፍል ዛፎችን ይጠቅማሉ፡፡ የGCNs ቃላት አቀማመጥ እንደምትገባ እና ቃላትን እንደ ውጤት አቀማመጥ እና እንደውጤት አቀማመጥ እንዲችሉ ለቀላል አካባቢዎች እንዲገቡ ይችላል (ምሳሌ ምሳሌ RNs በላይ ወይም በጉዳዩ የደዌብ መረብ ማተሚያ ላይ). በንግግሊዝኛ-ጀርመን እና እንግሊዘኛ-ቻክክ ትርጉም ፈተናዎች ለልዩ ዓይነቶች የኮድ ክፍተቶችን እናየዋለን እና በተመለከቱት ጉዳዮች ሁሉ ላይ የሲንካስብ-agnostic ክፍተቶችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'tr': "Biz sintaktik strukturuny näyral üns tabanly koder-koder modellerini maşynyň terjime etmek üçin basit we etkinlik bir nusgasyny görkeýäris Grafik-eýlenekli şebekelere (GCNs), grafik strukturlary modelleýän maglumatlar üçin ýokarylan nural şebekelere ynanýarlar. GCN-lerimiz çe şme sözleriniň önümlenýän syntaksiýa baglaryny ulanýarlar (diýmek üçin koder durumlary) öz syntaksiýa etraplaryna hasaplaýarlar. GCN girdi şeklinde kelime temsilleri alır we çizgi şeklinde kelime temsilleri oluşturur. Bu şekilde standart kodlayıcılara (meselâ, çizgi dereceler RNN'nin üstünde ya da g önüllü nürol ağlara dahil edilebilir). Biz iňlisçe-nemes we iňlisçe-Çehiň terjime etmegi deneylerini farklı ködler üçin deňleýäris we olaryň sintaks-agnostik wersiýalarynda ähli gözlenen ähli düzümlerde örän gowuralyklary barýarys.", 'af': "Ons stel 'n eenvoudige en effektief toegang om sintaktieke struktuur in neurale aandag-gebaseerde enkoder-dekoder modele te inkorporeer vir masjien vertaling. Ons vertrou op graf-konvolusionele netwerke (GCN), â\x80\x99n onlangse klas neuralnetwerke ontwikkel vir modellering van graf-struktureerde data. Ons GCN gebruik voorskoude sintaktieke afhanklikheidbome van bron setnings om voorstellings van woorde (bv. verborge staatste van die koder) te produseer wat sensitief is na hul sintaktieke naboorte. GCN neem woord voorstellings as invoer en produseer woord voorstellings as uitvoer, sodat hulle maklik as lage in standaard enkodere inkorporeer kan word (bv. bo van bidirectional RNN of konvolusionele neuralnetwerke). Ons evalueer hulle effektiviteit met Engels-Duitse en Engels-Tscheeske vertaling eksperimente vir verskillende tipes enkodere en observer substantiele verbeteringe oor hulle sintaks-agnostiese weergawes in al die aangesien opstelling.", 'hy': 'Մենք պարզ և արդյունավետ մոտեցում ենք ներառելու սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքը նյարդային ուշադրության հիմնված կոդերի-կոդերի մոդելների մեքենայի թարգմանման համար: Մենք հիմնված ենք գծագրային-կոնվոլյուցիոն ցանցերի վրա, որը վերջերս ստեղծվել է գծագրային կառուցվածքավորված տվյալների մոդելավորման համար: Մեր GCNs-ները օգտագործում են նախատեսված սինտակտիկ կախվածության ծառեր աղբյուր նախադասությունների համար բառերի (այսինքն, կոդերի թաքնված վիճակների) ներկայացումներ ստեղծելու համար, որոնք զգայուն են իրենց սինտակտիկ հարևանքներին: GCNs-ները բառերի ներկայացումներ են ընդունում որպես ներկայացումներ և արտադրում են բառերի ներկայացումներ որպես ներկայացումներ, այնպես որ դրանք հեշտությամբ կարող են ներառվել որպես շերտեր ստանդարտ կոդերների մեջ (օրինակ, երկուղղահայաց ՌՆՆ-ների կամ կոնվոլյուցիոն նե Մենք գնահատում ենք նրանց արդյունավետությունը անգլերեն-գերմաներեն և անգլերեն-ցեխի թարգմանման փորձերի միջոցով տարբեր տեսակի կոդերների համար և հետևում ենք նշանակալի բարելավումներին իրենց սինտաքսի-ագնոստիկ տարբերակների վերաբերյա', 'az': 'Biz sintaktik quruluşu nöral dikkati-tabanlı kodlayıcı modellərə qatmaq üçün basit və etkili bir yol göstəririk. Biz graf-konvolucional a ğlarına təvəkkül edirik, graf-strukturlı məlumatlarını modelləşdirmək üçün yeni nöral ağlarının sınıfı. GCN-lərimiz sintaktik müvəffəqiyyət ağaclarını sintaktik məmləkətlərinə hiss edən sözlərin təşkil etmək üçün təmin edilmiş sintaktik bağlılıq ağaclarını kullanır. GCN sözlərin ifadəsi girdi və sözlərin ifadəsi çıxdığı kimi ürəklənir, böylece onlar standart kodlayıcılar kimi asanlıqla daxil olarlar (məsələn, bidirectional RNN və convolutional neural networks üstündə). İngilizce-Alman və İngilizce-Çək çeviri təhsil edilməsini müxtəlif kodlayıcılar üçün müxtəlif təhsil etdik və sintaks-agnostik versiyonlarının üstündə böyük düzəltmələri gözləyirik.', 'bn': 'আমরা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামোর মধ্যে যুক্ত করার একটি সহজ এবং কার্যকর উপায় উপস্থাপন করি। আমরা গ্রাফ-কনফিন্যাল নেটওয়ার্কের উপর নির্ভর করি, সাম্প্রতিক ক্লাস নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, গ্রাফ-কাঠামো তথ্য মডেল করার জন্য উন আমাদের জিসিএনএরা ভবিষ্যৎ সিন্ট্যাক্টিক নির্ভরশীল বৃক্ষ ব্যবহার করে সোর্সের বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব (যেমন এনকোডারের লুকিয়ে রাষ্ট্র) শব GCNs শব্দের প্রতিনিধি ইনপুট হিসেবে গ্রহণ করে আউটপুট হিসেবে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করে, যাতে তারা সহজে স্ট্যান্ডার এনকোডার হিসেবে স্থাপন করা যায় (উদ We evaluate their effectiveness with English-German and English-Czech translation experiments for different types of encoders and observe substantial improvements over their syntax-agnostic versions in all the considered setups.', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament senzill i efectiu per incorporar l'estructura sinàctica en models de codificador basats en l'atenció neuronal per traducció màquina. Esperem en xarxes gràfics-convolucionals (GCNs), una classe recent de xarxes neurals desenvolupades per modelar dades estructuradas en gràfics. Els nostres CNG utilitzen arbres de dependencia sinàctica predits de frases de font per produir representacions de paraules (i.e. estats amagats del codificador) sensibles als seus barris sinàctics. Els CNG prenen representacions de paraules com entrada i produeixen representacions de paraules com sortida, així que es poden incorporar fàcilment com capes en codificadors estàndard (per exemple, a dalt dels RNN bidireccionals o les xarxes neurals convolucionals). Evaluam la seva eficacia amb experiments de traducció anglès-alemán i anglès-cec per diferents tipus de codificadors i observem millores substàntiques sobre les seves versions sintaxis-agnòstiques en totes les configuracions considerades.", 'cs': 'Představujeme jednoduchý a efektivní přístup k začlenění syntaktické struktury do modelů kodérů-dekodérů založených na neuronové pozornosti pro strojový překlad. Spoléháme na grafově konvoluční sítě (GCN), nedávné třídy neuronových sítí vyvinuté pro modelování grafově strukturovaných dat. Naše GCN používají predikované syntaktické stromy závislostí zdrojových vět k vytváření reprezentací slov (tj. skrytých stavů kodéru), které jsou citlivé na jejich syntaktické sousedství. GCN berou slovní reprezentace jako vstup a produkují slovní reprezentace jako výstup, takže je lze snadno začlenit jako vrstvy do standardních kodérů (např. nad obousměrnými RNN nebo konvolučními neuronovými sítěmi). Hodnotíme jejich efektivitu pomocí anglicko-německých a anglicko-českých překladových experimentů pro různé typy kodérů a pozorujeme podstatné zlepšení oproti jejich syntax-agnostickým verzím ve všech zvažovaných nastaveních.', 'et': 'Esitleme lihtsat ja efektiivset lähenemisviisi süntaktilise struktuuri kaasamiseks neurotähelepanu põhinevatesse masintõlke kodeerijate-dekoodrite mudelitesse. Me toetume graafilistele konvolutsioonivõrkudele (GCN), mis on hiljutine graafiliste struktureeritud andmete modelleerimiseks välja töötatud neurovõrkude klass. Meie GCN-id kasutavad lähtelausete prognoositavaid süntaktilisi sõltuvuspuid, et luua sõnade (st kodeerija varjatud olekud), mis on tundlikud nende süntaktiliste naabruskondade suhtes. GCN-id võtavad sisendina sõnarepresentatsioone ja toodavad väljundina sõnarepresentatsioone, nii et neid saab hõlpsasti integreerida kihtidena standardsetesse kodeerijatesse (nt kahesuunaliste RNN-ide või konvolutsioonivõrkude peale). Hindame nende tõhusust inglise-saksa ja inglise-tšehhi tõlkekontrollidega erinevat tüüpi kodeerijate jaoks ning jälgime nende süntaksiagnostiliste versioonide olulisi parandusi kõigis kaalutletud seadistustes.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme yksinkertaisen ja tehokkaan lähestymistavan syntaktisen rakenteen sisällyttämiseen neurohuomiopohjaisiin kooderi-dekooderimalleihin konekäännöstä varten. Luotamme graafi-konvolutional-verkkoihin (GCN), joka on hiljattain kehitetty graafisen strukturoidun datan mallintamiseen. GCN:mme käyttävät lähdelauseiden ennustettuja syntaktisia riippuvuuspuita tuottaakseen representaatioita sanoista (eli kooderin piilotiloista), jotka ovat herkkiä niiden syntaktisille alueille. GCN:t ottavat sanaesityksiä syötteenä ja tuottavat sanaesityksiä tulosteena, joten ne voidaan helposti yhdistää kerroksina vakiokoodereihin (esim. kaksisuuntaisten RNN:ien tai konvolutionaalisten neuroverkkojen päälle). Arvioimme niiden tehokkuutta englannin-saksan ja englannin-tšekin käännöskokeilla erityyppisille koodereille ja havainnoimme merkittäviä parannuksia niiden syntaksiagnostisiin versioihin kaikissa harkituissa kokoonpanoissa.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo jednostavan i efikasan pristup uključenju sintaktičke strukture u modele kodera za prevod strojeva na osnovu neuralne pažnje. Oslanjamo se na graf-konvolucione mreže (GCNs), nedavnu klasu neuralnih mreža razvijene za modeliranje graf-strukturiranih podataka. Naši GCN koriste predviđene sintaktičke zavisnosti drveća izvornih rečenica kako bi proizveli predstave riječi (tj. skrivenih država kodera) koje su osjetljive na njihove sintaktične komšiluke. GCNs uzima riječije predstave kao ulaz i proizvode riječije predstave kao izlaz, tako da ih lako mogu uključiti kao slojeve u standardne kodere (npr. na vrhu bidirektivnih RNN-a ili konvolucionalnih neuralnih mreža). Procjenjujemo njihovu učinkovitost s eksperimentima engleskog-njemačkog i engleskog-češkog prevoda za različite vrste kodera i posmatramo značajne poboljšanje nad njihovim sintaksa-agnostičkim verzijama u svim razmišljanim setovima.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing sampeyan lan ijol-ijolan layang sampeyan anyar tentang karo nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe knoder-decoder model kanggo kelas teljamahan. Awak dhéwé wis dipertaké ditambahak graf-convolution (GNs), klass alas karo netawak dhéwé wis disebarke kanggo modeleling data graf-structural. Attribute GSNs menehi gambar representation sing gambar input lan nambah kelas nang output, dadi iki dadi iso disebarke banget kanggo ngira kalah dumadhil karo koder (adil. nambah, sampeyan luwih dumadhil DNNs lan nambah alah dumadhil). Awak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan ingkang-alaman karo Perusahaan ingkang karo ingkang-Cek karo perusahaan kanggo kalagayaan karo koder sing itlanjut gak dhéwé ngerasahan kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing apik dhéwé, nggo ngerasakno sistem sing apik dhéwé.', 'he': "אנו מציגים גישה פשוטה ויעילה להכניס מבנה סינטקטי למודלים של קודר-קודר מבוססים על תשומת לב עצבית לתרגום מכונות. אנו סומכים על רשתות גרף-משתנות (GCNs), כיתה לאחרונה של רשתות עצביות שפותחות לדוגמא נתונים מבוססים גרף. Our GCNs use predicted syntactic dependency trees of source sentences to produce representations of words (i.e. hidden states of the encoder) that are sensitive to their syntactic neighborhoods.  GCNs לוקחים ייצוגים מילים כתוצאה ויוצרים ייצוגים מילים כתוצאה, כך שהם יכולים בקלות להיות מעורבים כשכבות לקודים סטנדרטיים (למשל, על מעל RNNs bidirectional או רשתות עצביות convolutional). אנו מעריכים את היעילות שלהם עם ניסויים התרגום אנגלי-גרמני-אנגלי-צ'קי עבור סוגים שונים של קודים ולצפות בשיפורים משמעותיים על גרסאות הסינטקסי-אגנוסטיות שלהם בכל המערכות הנחשבות.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo preprost in učinkovit pristop k vključevanju sintaktične strukture v živčno pozornost temelječe kodirni-dekodirni modeli za strojno prevajanje. Zanašamo se na grafsko-konvolucionalna omrežja (GCN), nedavni razred nevronskih omrežij, razvitih za modeliranje grafsko strukturiranih podatkov. Naše GCN uporabljajo napovedana sintaktična drevesa odvisnosti izvornih stavkov za ustvarjanje predstavitev besed (tj. skritih stanj kodirnika), ki so občutljive na njihovo sintaktično sosesko. GCN jemlje besedne reprezentacije kot vhod in proizvajajo besedne reprezentacije kot izhod, tako da jih je mogoče enostavno vključiti kot plasti v standardne kodirje (npr. na vrhu dvosmernih RNN-jev ali konvolucijskih nevronskih omrežij). Njihovo učinkovitost ocenjujemo z angleško-nemškimi in angleško-češkimi prevajalnimi eksperimenti za različne vrste kodirnikov in opazujemo bistvene izboljšave v primerjavi z njihovimi sintaksa-agnostičnimi različicami v vseh obravnavanih nastavitvah.', 'ha': "We present a simple and effective approach to incorporating syntactic structure into neural attention-based encoder-decoder models for machine translation.  Tuna dõgara a kan garwayan grafi-konkurta (GCNs), wata jama'a na'urar taruwar neural na tsãge ta samu'a ga motsi data-da aka samu. GCNs na yi amfani da GCNs masu iya ƙayyade danganta ga itãcen kwanza da za'a danne halarce wa maganar (misali, states of the encoder) waɗanda ke da gane wa matattararsu na syntactic. @ info Tuna ƙaddara aikinsu da aka jarraba fasarin Ingiriya-Jarman da Ingiriya-Czech zuwa nau'i-nau'i-nau'in kode-daban kuma tuna tsari masu girma a kanana kodi-agnostic kodi cikin dukkan kayan da aka yi bincike.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྟབས་བདེ་སྦྱོར་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་དཔར་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུད་སྣང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་GCNs ཡིས་གསལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་རྩིས་ཐོའི་མཛུབ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཐོག་རིམ་སྟོན་པ་དེ་ཚོའི་ནང་ནས་གསལ་བ་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ GCNs take word representations as input and produce word representations as output, so they can easily be incorporated as layers into standard encoders (e.g., on top of bidirectional RNNs or convolutional neural networks). We evaluate their effectiveness with English-German and English-Czech translation experiments for different types of encoders and observe substantial improvements over their syntax-agnostic versions in all the considered setups.'}
{'en': 'Trainable Greedy Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'فك الجشع القابل للتدريب للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': 'Décodage gourmand formable pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'Decodificación codiciosa entrenable para la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Decodificação gananciosa treinável para tradução automática neural', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のための訓練可能な貪欲なデコード', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए Trainable लालची डिकोडिंग', 'zh': '用于神经机器翻译者,可以练贪解码', 'ru': 'Обучаемое жадное декодирование для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Díchódú Greedy Inaistrithe le haghaidh Neural Machine Translation', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Tréningezhető kapzsiság dekódolás idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Εκπαιδευόμενη άπληστη αποκωδικοποίηση για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Decodifica avida tracciabile per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Неврал машинаны аудару үшін оқылмайтын Greedy декодтамасы', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി ഗ്രീഡി ഡികോഡിങ്ങ്', 'mk': 'Тренирано сиво декодирање за превод на неврални машини', 'lt': 'Mokytinas neišsamus kodavimas nervinių mašinų vertimui', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Kelabu Boleh Latihan untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mt': 'Dikodifikazzjoni Greedy Taħriġ għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'ro': 'Decodare lacomă instruibilă pentru traducerea mașinii neurale', 'mn': 'Сургуулах боломжтой Гридийн мэдрэлийн машин хөгжлийн шинэчлэл', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Trenable Greedy Decoding dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Kaartaynta sharciga ee maamulka neurada', 'sv': 'Tränbar girig avkodning för neural maskinöversättning', 'sr': 'Obuèavajuæi Gredi Dekodiranje Neuralnog prevoda mašine', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Trainable Greedy Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'vi': 'Đào tạo cỗ máy thần kinh', 'bg': 'Тренируемо алчно декодиране за неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'Træningsbar grådig dekodning til neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Uvježbano Dekodiranje Grčke za neuronski prevod strojeva', 'nl': 'Trainbare hebzuchtige decodering voor neurale machinevertaling', 'de': 'Trainable Greedy Decoding für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Dekodasi Kelabu Terlatih untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Neural Maşynyň terjimesi üçin Ýunança Ködleme', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kufunguliwa kwa Makodi ya Ugiriki kwa Tafsiri ya Mashiniki ya Njerumani', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'sq': 'Trainable Greedy Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգը', 'az': 'N칬ral ma코in t톛rc칲m톛si 칲칞칲n t톛hsil edil톛 bil톛n Greedy kodlamas캼', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য গ্রীডি ডিকোডিং', 'ko': '신경 기계 번역 훈련 탐욕 디코딩', 'ca': 'Un codificador greu entrenable per a la traducció de màquines neurals', 'fi': 'Harjoiteltava ahne dekoodaus hermojen konekäännökseen', 'et': 'Haritav ahne dekodeerimine neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'bs': 'Uvježbano Dekodiranje Neuralnog uređaja', 'cs': 'Trénovatelné chamtivé dekódování pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'jv': 'Yukono Kebijakan Yukono kanggo Terjamahan Njaral', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'sk': 'Treinable Greedy Dekodiranje za nevralni strojni prevod', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'འཁྲུལ་སྐྱོད་རུང་བའི་Greedy་ཡིས་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Recent research in neural machine translation has largely focused on two aspects ; neural network architectures and end-to-end learning algorithms. The problem of decoding, however, has received relatively little attention from the research community. In this paper, we solely focus on the problem of decoding given a trained neural machine translation model. Instead of trying to build a new decoding algorithm for any specific decoding objective, we propose the idea of trainable decoding algorithm in which we train a decoding algorithm to find a translation that maximizes an arbitrary decoding objective. More specifically, we design an actor that observes and manipulates the hidden state of the neural machine translation decoder and propose to train it using a variant of deterministic policy gradient. We extensively evaluate the proposed algorithm using four language pairs and two decoding objectives and show that we can indeed train a trainable greedy decoder that generates a better translation (in terms of a target decoding objective) with minimal computational overhead.', 'ar': 'ركزت الأبحاث الحديثة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية إلى حد كبير على جانبين ؛ معماريات الشبكة العصبية وخوارزميات التعلم الشامل. ومع ذلك ، لم تحظ مشكلة فك التشفير باهتمام كبير نسبيًا من مجتمع البحث. في هذه الورقة ، نركز فقط على مشكلة فك التشفير في ضوء نموذج ترجمة آلي عصبي مدرب. بدلاً من محاولة بناء خوارزمية فك تشفير جديدة لأي هدف محدد لفك التشفير ، نقترح فكرة خوارزمية فك التشفير القابلة للتدريب والتي نقوم فيها بتدريب خوارزمية فك التشفير للعثور على ترجمة تزيد من هدف فك التشفير التعسفي. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نصمم فاعلًا يراقب ويتلاعب بالحالة المخفية لوحدة فك ترميز الترجمة الآلية العصبية ونقترح تدريبه باستخدام متغير من التدرج الحتمي للسياسة. نقوم بتقييم الخوارزمية المقترحة على نطاق واسع باستخدام أربعة أزواج لغوية وهدفين لفك التشفير ، ونبين أنه يمكننا بالفعل تدريب وحدة فك ترميز جشعة قابلة للتدريب والتي تولد ترجمة أفضل (من حيث هدف فك التشفير المستهدف) مع الحد الأدنى من النفقات الحسابية.', 'es': 'Las investigaciones recientes sobre la traducción automática neuronal se han centrado principalmente en dos aspectos: las arquitecturas de redes neuronales y los algoritmos de aprendizaje de extremo a extremo. Sin embargo, el problema de la decodificación ha recibido relativamente poca atención por parte de la comunidad investigadora. En este artículo, nos centramos únicamente en el problema de la decodificación dado un modelo de traducción automática neuronal entrenado. En lugar de intentar construir un nuevo algoritmo de decodificación para cualquier objetivo de decodificación específico, proponemos la idea de un algoritmo de decodificación entrenable en el que entrenamos un algoritmo de decodificación para encontrar una traducción que maximice un objetivo de decodificación arbitrario. Más específicamente, diseñamos un actor que observa y manipula el estado oculto del decodificador de traducción automática neuronal y proponemos entrenarlo utilizando una variante de gradiente de política determinista. Evaluamos exhaustivamente el algoritmo propuesto utilizando cuatro pares de idiomas y dos objetivos de decodificación y demostramos que, de hecho, podemos entrenar un decodificador codicioso y entrenable que genere una mejor traducción (en términos de un objetivo de decodificación objetivo) con una sobrecarga computacional mínima.', 'pt': 'Pesquisas recentes em tradução automática neural se concentraram amplamente em dois aspectos; arquiteturas de rede neural e algoritmos de aprendizado de ponta a ponta. O problema da decodificação, no entanto, recebeu relativamente pouca atenção da comunidade de pesquisa. Neste artigo, focamos apenas no problema de decodificação dado um modelo de tradução automática neural treinado. Em vez de tentar construir um novo algoritmo de decodificação para qualquer objetivo de decodificação específico, propomos a ideia de algoritmo de decodificação treinável no qual treinamos um algoritmo de decodificação para encontrar uma tradução que maximize um objetivo de decodificação arbitrário. Mais especificamente, projetamos um ator que observa e manipula o estado oculto do decodificador de tradução automática neural e propomos treiná-lo usando uma variante de gradiente de política determinístico. Avaliamos extensivamente o algoritmo proposto usando quatro pares de idiomas e dois objetivos de decodificação e mostramos que podemos de fato treinar um decodificador guloso treinável que gera uma tradução melhor (em termos de um objetivo de decodificação de destino) com sobrecarga computacional mínima.', 'fr': "Les recherches récentes en traduction automatique neuronale se sont largement concentrées sur deux aspects\xa0: les architectures de réseaux neuronaux et les algorithmes d'apprentissage de bout en bout. Le problème du décodage a cependant reçu relativement peu d'attention de la part de la communauté des chercheurs. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons uniquement sur le problème du décodage à partir d'un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale entraîné. Au lieu d'essayer de construire un nouvel algorithme de décodage pour un objectif de décodage spécifique, nous proposons l'idée d'un algorithme de décodage pouvant être entraîné dans lequel nous entraînons un algorithme de décodage pour trouver une traduction qui maximise un objectif de décodage arbitraire. Plus précisément, nous concevons un acteur qui observe et manipule l'état caché du décodeur de traduction automatique neuronale et proposons de l'entraîner à l'aide d'une variante de gradient de politique déterministe. Nous évaluons en profondeur l'algorithme proposé à l'aide de quatre paires de langues et de deux objectifs de décodage et montrons que nous pouvons effectivement entraîner un décodeur gourmand qui génère une meilleure traduction (en termes d'objectif de décodage cible) avec un temps de calcul minimal.", 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークのアーキテクチャとエンドツーエンドの学習アルゴリズムの2つの側面に焦点を当てている。 しかしながら、復号化の問題は、研究コミュニティから比較的ほとんど注目されていない。 本稿では、訓練されたニューラル機械翻訳モデルが与えられたデコードの問題にのみ焦点を当てる。 特定のデコード目的のために新しいデコードアルゴリズムを構築しようとするのではなく、任意のデコード目的を最大化する翻訳を見つけるためにデコードアルゴリズムをトレーニングするトレーニング可能なデコードアルゴリズムのアイデアを提案します。 より具体的には、神経機械翻訳デコーダの隠れた状態を観察して操作するアクターを設計し、決定論的政策勾配の変種を使用してそれを訓練することを提案します。 私たちは、4つの言語ペアと2つのデコード目標を使用して提案されたアルゴリズムを広範囲にわたって評価し、計算オーバーヘッドを最小限に抑えて（ターゲットデコード目標の観点から）より良い翻訳を生成するトレーニング可能な貪欲なデコーダーを実際に訓練することができることを示します。', 'zh': '近在神经机器翻译者,要在两端。 神经网络架构与端到端学算法。 然解码问见研究界者少矣。 本文者,唯注给定训练之神经机器翻译解码。 吾无试为特定解码构新解码算法,有可练解码算法之心,于此法中,吾等训练解码算法以得最大化随意解码转。 更具体地说,设观操神经机器翻译解码器隐之Actor,议用确定性策梯度之变体以习之。 吾以四言博论二解码,明吾诚可以练一可练之贪解码器,当解码器以至小之数成之(则解码而言)。', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования в области нейронного машинного перевода в значительной степени сосредоточены на двух аспектах: архитектуре нейронных сетей и алгоритмах сквозного обучения. Проблеме декодирования, однако, уделяется относительно мало внимания со стороны исследовательского сообщества. В данной работе мы сосредоточены исключительно на задаче декодирования с учетом обученной модели нейронного машинного перевода. Вместо того, чтобы пытаться построить новый алгоритм декодирования для любой конкретной цели декодирования, мы предлагаем идею обучаемого алгоритма декодирования, в котором мы обучаем алгоритм декодирования, чтобы найти перевод, который максимизирует произвольную цель декодирования. Более конкретно, мы проектируем актёра, который наблюдает и манипулирует скрытым состоянием декодера нейронного машинного перевода и предлагаем обучать его с использованием варианта детерминированного градиента политики. Мы тщательно оцениваем предлагаемый алгоритм, используя четыре языковые пары и две цели декодирования, и показываем, что мы действительно можем обучить обучаемый жадный декодер, который генерирует лучший перевод (с точки зрения целевой цели декодирования) с минимальными вычислительными накладными расходами.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में हाल के शोध ने काफी हद तक दो पहलुओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है; तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर और एंड-टू-एंड लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम। डिकोडिंग की समस्या, हालांकि, अनुसंधान समुदाय से अपेक्षाकृत कम ध्यान दिया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम पूरी तरह से एक प्रशिक्षित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल को देखते हुए डिकोडिंग की समस्या पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। किसी भी विशिष्ट डिकोडिंग उद्देश्य के लिए एक नया डिकोडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म बनाने की कोशिश करने के बजाय, हम प्रशिक्षित डिकोडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म के विचार का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें हम एक डिकोडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं ताकि एक अनुवाद मिल सके जो एक मनमाना डिकोडिंग उद्देश्य को अधिकतम करता है। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम एक अभिनेता को डिजाइन करते हैं जो तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद विकोडक की छिपी हुई स्थिति को देखता है और हेरफेर करता है और इसे नियतात्मक नीति ढाल के एक संस्करण का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित करने का प्रस्ताव देता है। हम चार भाषा जोड़े और दो डिकोडिंग उद्देश्यों का उपयोग करके प्रस्तावित एल्गोरिथ्म का बड़े पैमाने पर मूल्यांकन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि हम वास्तव में एक प्रशिक्षित लालची डिकोडर को प्रशिक्षित कर सकते हैं जो न्यूनतम कम्प्यूटेशनल ओवरहेड के साथ एक बेहतर अनुवाद (लक्ष्य डिकोडिंग उद्देश्य के संदर्भ में) उत्पन्न करता है।', 'ga': 'Dhírigh taighde le déanaí ar aistriúchán meaisín néarach go mór ar dhá ghné; ailtireachtaí líonraí néaracha agus halgartaim foghlama ceann go ceann. Is beag aird a thug an pobal taighde ar fhadhb an díchódaithe, áfach. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid go hiomlán ar fhadhb an díchódaithe nuair a thugtar múnla oilte néaraistriúcháin meaisín. In ionad a bheith ag iarraidh algartam díchódaithe nua a thógáil le haghaidh aon sainchuspóir díchódaithe, molaimid smaoineamh ar algartam díchódaithe in oiliúint ina ndéanaimid oiliúint ar algartam díchódaithe chun aistriúchán a aimsiú a uasmhéadaíonn cuspóir díchódaithe treallach. Go sonrach, déanaimid aisteoir a dhearadh a bhreathnaíonn agus a ionramhálann staid fholaithe an díchódóra néar-aistritheora meaisín agus a mholaimid é a oiliúint trí leas a bhaint as leagan de ghrádán beartais cinntitheach. Déanaimid meastóireacht fhairsing ar an algartam atá beartaithe ag baint úsáide as ceithre phéire teanga agus dhá chuspóir díchódaithe agus taispeánann muid gur féidir linn díchódóir greedy inathraithe a oiliúint a ghineann aistriúchán níos fearr (i dtéarmaí spriocchuspóir díchódaithe) le híoschostas ríomhaireachtúil.', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítással kapcsolatos közelmúltbeli kutatások nagyrészt két aspektusra összpontosítottak; neurális hálózati architektúrák és teljes körű tanulási algoritmusok. A dekódolás problémájára viszonylag kevés figyelmet kapott a kutatóközösség. Ebben a tanulmányban kizárólag a dekódolás problémájára koncentrálunk egy képzett neurális gépi fordítási modell alapján. Ahelyett, hogy megpróbálnánk új dekódolási algoritmust építeni bármely konkrét dekódolási célhoz, javasoljuk az edzhető dekódolási algoritmus ötletét, amelyben egy dekódolási algoritmust képezünk arra, hogy olyan fordítást találjunk, amely maximalizálja a tetszőleges dekódolási célt. Pontosabban egy olyan színészt tervezünk, amely megfigyeli és manipulálja az idegi gépi fordítási dekóder rejtett állapotát, és javasoljuk, hogy a determinisztikus politikai gradiens változatával képezzük. Alaposan értékeljük a javasolt algoritmust négy nyelvpár és két dekódolási célkitűzés felhasználásával, és megmutatjuk, hogy valóban képesek vagyunk egy képzett kapzsi dekóderet kiképezni, amely jobb fordítást generál (a cél dekódolási célkitűzés szempontjából) minimális számítási költséggel.', 'el': 'Η πρόσφατη έρευνα στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση επικεντρώθηκε σε μεγάλο βαθμό σε δύο πτυχές: Αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων και αλγόριθμοι πλήρους μάθησης. Ωστόσο, το πρόβλημα της αποκωδικοποίησης έχει λάβει σχετικά μικρή προσοχή από την ερευνητική κοινότητα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε αποκλειστικά στο πρόβλημα της αποκωδικοποίησης δεδομένου ενός εκπαιδευμένου μοντέλου νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Αντί να προσπαθήσουμε να χτίσουμε έναν νέο αλγόριθμο αποκωδικοποίησης για οποιονδήποτε συγκεκριμένο στόχο αποκωδικοποίησης, προτείνουμε την ιδέα ενός εκπαιδευόμενου αλγόριθμου αποκωδικοποίησης στον οποίο εκπαιδεύουμε έναν αλγόριθμο αποκωδικοποίησης για να βρούμε μια μετάφραση που μεγιστοποιεί έναν αυθαίρετο στόχο αποκωδικοποίησης. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, σχεδιάζουμε έναν παράγοντα που παρατηρεί και χειρίζεται την κρυμμένη κατάσταση του αποκωδικοποιητή νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης και προτείνουμε να τον εκπαιδεύσουμε χρησιμοποιώντας μια παραλλαγή ντετερμινιστικής κλίσης πολιτικής. Αξιολογούμε εκτενώς τον προτεινόμενο αλγόριθμο χρησιμοποιώντας τέσσερα ζεύγη γλωσσών και δύο στόχους αποκωδικοποίησης και δείχνουμε ότι μπορούμε πράγματι να εκπαιδεύσουμε έναν εκπαιδευόμενο άπληστο αποκωδικοποιητή που παράγει μια καλύτερη μετάφραση (από την άποψη ενός στόχου αποκωδικοποίησης στόχου) με ελάχιστο υπολογιστικό κόστος.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ ნეიროლური მაქსინის გაგრძელებაში მნიშვნელოვანი ორი აპექტებზე კონუქტირებულია; ნეიროლური ქსელის არქტიქტურები და დასწავლების ალგორიტიმები. მაგრამ კოდირებას პრობლემა მიიღეთ პარამეტრებით პატარა აღმოჩენა სწავლობის საზოგადოებაზე. ჩვენ მხოლოდ ამ დოკუნტში განვითარებული ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების მოდელზე დავუყენებთ პრობლემაზე. ახალი დიკოდირების ალგორიტიმს შექმნა, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული დიკოდირების მიზეზი, ჩვენ მინდომებით ახალი დიკოდირების ალგორიტიმს იდეა, რომელიც ჩვენ განვიწყებთ დიკოდირების ალგორიტიმს, რომელიც განვიწყებთ განსა უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ აკტერის განაზღვრება, რომელიც აჩვენებს და მანიპულებს ნეიროლური მაქინის განაცვლის განაზღვრების კოდექტური სტატუსის შესახებ და მოძლევებთ, რომ ჩვენ ძალიან გავაკეთებთ ალგორიტიმა, რომელიც გამოყენება ოთხი ენის ზოგები და ორი დეკოდირების მიზეზი და გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ნამდვილად შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ შესაძლებელი მსგავსი დეკოდირები, რომელიც უ', 'it': "La recente ricerca nella traduzione automatica neurale si è concentrata in gran parte su due aspetti; architetture di rete neurale e algoritmi di apprendimento end-to-end. Il problema della decodifica, tuttavia, ha ricevuto relativamente poca attenzione da parte della comunità di ricerca. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo esclusivamente sul problema della decodifica dato un modello di traduzione automatica neurale addestrato. Invece di cercare di costruire un nuovo algoritmo di decodifica per qualsiasi obiettivo specifico di decodifica, proponiamo l'idea di algoritmo di decodifica trainable in cui addestriamo un algoritmo di decodifica per trovare una traduzione che massimizza un obiettivo arbitrario di decodifica. Più specificamente, progettiamo un attore che osserva e manipola lo stato nascosto del decoder di traduzione automatica neurale e proponiamo di addestrarlo utilizzando una variante di gradiente deterministico della politica. Valutiamo ampiamente l'algoritmo proposto utilizzando quattro coppie linguistiche e due obiettivi di decodifica e dimostriamo che possiamo effettivamente addestrare un decodificatore avido che genera una traduzione migliore (in termini di obiettivo di decodifica target) con un sovraccarico computazionale minimo.", 'lt': 'Neseniai atliekami nervinių mašin ų vertimo moksliniai tyrimai daugiausia susiję su dviem aspektais; nervinių tinklų architektūros ir mokymosi nuo pabaigos algoritmai. Tačiau mokslinių tyrimų bendruomenės santykinai nedaug dėmesio skyrė dekodiavimo problemai. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame kodavimo problemai, susijusiai su apmokomu nervinių mašinų vertimo modeliu. Vietoj to, kad bandytume sukurti naują dekodiavimo algoritmą bet kuriam konkrečiam dekodiavimo tikslui, siūlome idėją traukiamo dekodiavimo algoritmo, kuriame mokome dekodiavimo algoritmą surasti vertimą, kuris maksimaliai padidintų savavališką dekodiavimo tikslą. Konkrečiau, mes suprojektuojame veikėją, kuris stebi ir manipuliuoja paslėpta nervinių mašinų vertimo dekoderio būkle ir siūlo jį treniruoti naudojant deterministinės politikos gradiento variant ą. Mes išsamiai vertiname siūlomą algoritmą naudojant keturias kalbų poros ir du dekodiavimo tikslus ir parodome, kad iš tikrųjų galime treniruoti traukiamą pagonišką dekoderį, kuris sukuria geresnį vertimą (tikslinio dekodiavimo tikslo atžvilgiu) su minimalia skaičiavimo viršutine išlaida.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы невралдық компьютердің аудармасындағы зерттеулері екі аспекте көңіл береді. Неврал желінің архитектуралары мен аяқтау алгоритмдері. Декодтау мәселесі, бірақ зерттеу коммуникасынан салыстырып тұрған. Бұл қағазда, біз тек невралдық компьютердің аудару үлгісін декодтамыз. Жаңа декодтау алгоритмін кез келген декодтау мақсаты үшін жаңа декодтау алгоритмін құру орнына, біз арбитралық декодтау мақсатын шектеу үшін декодтау алгоритмін табу алгоритмін ұсынамыз. Көбірек, біз невралдық компьютердің аудармалау декодерінің жасырын күйін қарайтын және өзгертетін актьтерді құрастырып, оны deterministic ережелер градиентін қолдану үшін оқытуды ұсынып тастаймыз. Біз алгоритмді төрт тіл екі және екі декодтау мақсаттарын қолданатын алгоритмді көптеген оқу үшін жұмыс салу декодтағын көрсетуге болады. Сонымен қатар, жұмыс аударуын (мақсатты декодтау мақсаттары) минимал компьютер', 'ms': 'kajian baru-baru ini dalam terjemahan mesin saraf telah fokus pada dua aspek; arkitektur rangkaian saraf dan algoritma pembelajaran akhir-akhir. Masalah penyahkodan, bagaimanapun, telah menerima sedikit perhatian dari komuniti penyelidikan. Dalam kertas ini, kita hanya fokus pada masalah penyahkodan diberikan model terjemahan mesin saraf terlatih. Daripada cuba membina algoritma penyahkodan baru untuk mana-mana objektif penyahkodan khusus, kita cadangkan idea algoritma penyahkodan boleh dilatih di mana kita melatih algoritma penyahkodan untuk mencari terjemahan yang maksimumkan objektif penyahkodan arbitrari. Lebih khususnya, kami merancang pelakon yang mengamati dan memanipulasi keadaan tersembunyi dekoder terjemahan mesin saraf dan melamar untuk melatihnya menggunakan variasi gradien kebijakan deterministik. Kami menilai secara ekstensif algoritma yang diusulkan menggunakan empat pasangan bahasa dan dua sasaran penyahkodan dan menunjukkan bahawa kita benar-benar boleh melatih penyahkod serakah yang boleh dilatih yang menghasilkan terjemahan yang lebih baik (dalam terma objektif penyahkodan sasaran) dengan minimal pengiraan overhead.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешното истражување во преводот на невропските машини се фокусираше во голема мера на два аспекти; архитектури на нервната мрежа и алгоритми за учење од крај до крај. The problem of decoding, however, has received relatively little attention from the research community.  Во овој весник, се фокусираме само на проблемот со декодирањето со обучен модел за превод на невропските машини. Наместо да се обидеме да изградиме нов алгоритм за декодирање за секоја специфична објектива за декодирање, предложуваме идеја за возлив алгоритм за декодирање во кој тренираме алгоритм за декодирање за да најдеме превод кој максимизира арбитрална објектива за декодирање. Поконкретно, дизајнираме актер кој ја набљудува и манипулира скриената состојба на декодерот за превод на невровните машини и предложува да го обучува користејќи варијант на децентристички политички градиент. Ги проценуваме предложените алгоритми користејќи четири јазички парови и две декодирачки цели и покажуваме дека навистина можеме да обучуваме трениран алчен декодер кој генерира подобар превод (во поглед на цел декодирање на целта) со минимални пресметувачки надтрошоци.', 'mt': "Ir-riċerka riċenti fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali ffukat l-aktar fuq żewġ aspetti; arkitetturi tan-netwerks newrali u algoritmi tat-tagħlim minn tarf sa tarf. Madankollu, il-problema tad-dekodifikazzjoni rċeviet relattivament ftit attenzjoni mill-komunità tar-riċerka. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niffokaw biss fuq il-problem a tad-dekodifikazzjoni minħabba mudell ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali mħarreġ. Minflok nippruvaw nibnu algoritmu ġdid ta’ dekodifikazzjoni għal kwalunkwe objettiv speċifiku ta’ dekodifikazzjoni, nipproponu l-idea ta’ algoritmu ta’ dekodifikazzjoni li jista’ jitħarreġ li fih in ħarrġu algoritmu ta’ dekodifikazzjoni biex isibu traduzzjoni li timmassimizza objettiv arbitrarju ta’ dekodifikazzjoni. More specifically, we design an actor that observes and manipulates the hidden state of the neural machine translation decoder and propose to train it using a variant of deterministic policy gradient.  Aħna jevalwaw b'mod estensiv l-algoritmu propost bl-użu ta' erba' pari lingwistiċi u żewġ għanijiet ta' dekodifikazzjoni u nuru li tabilħaqq nistgħu nħarrġu dekodifikatur greedy li jiġġenera traduzzjoni a ħjar (f'termini ta' objettiv ta' dekodifikazzjoni fil-mira) b'infiq ġenerali tal-komputazzjoni minimu.", 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷയിലെ അടുത്ത പരിശോധന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിര ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റുകളും അവസാനം പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളും The problem of decoding, however, has received relatively little attention from the research community.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d കൊടുത്ത പ്രശ്നത്തിന്\u200dറെ പേരില്\u200d മാ ഒരു പുതിയ ഡെക്കോഡിങ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മം ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ ആശയം പരിശീലിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒര കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള രഹസ്യമായ സ്ഥിതിയെ നോക്കുകയും നിരീക്ഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു നടനാക്കുക നാലു ഭാഷകളും രണ്ടു ഡികോഡിങ് ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിനെ വിശിഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. നമുക്ക് കാണിക്കാന്\u200d പറ്റുമെന്ന് നമുക്ക് ഒരു', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania nad tłumaczeniem maszynowym neuronowym skupiły się w dużej mierze na dwóch aspektach; Architektury sieci neuronowych i kompleksowe algorytmy uczenia się. Problem dekodowania zwrócił jednak stosunkowo niewielką uwagę ze strony środowiska badawczego. W artykule skupiamy się wyłącznie na problemie dekodowania przy użyciu przeszkolonego modelu maszynowego tłumaczenia neuronowego. Zamiast próbować zbudować nowy algorytm dekodowania dla jakiegokolwiek konkretnego celu dekodowania, proponujemy pomysł treningowego algorytmu dekodowania, w którym trenujemy algorytm dekodowania, aby znaleźć tłumaczenie, które maksymalizuje dowolny cel dekodowania. W szczególności projektujemy aktora obserwującego i manipulującego ukrytym stanem dekodera maszynowego tłumaczenia neuronowego oraz proponujemy trenowanie go przy użyciu wariantu gradientu deterministycznego polityki. Szczegółowo oceniamy proponowany algorytm przy użyciu czterech par językowych i dwóch celów dekodowania i pokazujemy, że rzeczywiście możemy trenować chciwy dekoder, który generuje lepsze tłumaczenie (pod względem docelowego celu dekodowania) przy minimalnym nakładzie obliczeniowym.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын судалгаа ихэвчлэн хоёр талаар анхаарлаа хандуулсан. мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектур, суралцах алгоритм. Гэхдээ судалгааны нийгэмд харьцангуй бага анхаарал авсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид зөвхөн сургалтын мэдрэлийн дамжуулагч загвар өгсөн бодлого дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Ямар ч тодорхой шинэ кодлонгийн алгоритм бий болгохын оронд бид арбитралын кодлонгийн зорилго дээр хамгийн их шинэ зорилго олгох алгоритмыг суралцах боломжтой алгоритмыг санал болгож байна. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулагчийн нууцтай байдлыг ажиглаж, загварчлагч загварчлагч бүтээж, тодорхойлох бодлогын төвшин градиентийг ашиглаж суралцах боломжтой. Бид санал өгсөн алгоритмыг 4 хэл хоёр, хоёр загварыг ашиглан дүгнэж, бид жинхэнэ тооцоололтын дээд илүү сайн хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Cercetările recente în traducerea automată neurală s-au concentrat în mare parte pe două aspecte; arhitecturi de rețele neurale și algoritmi de învățare end-to-end. Cu toate acestea, problema decodificării a primit relativ puțină atenție din partea comunității de cercetare. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm exclusiv pe problema decodării dată fiind un model de traducere automată neurală instruit. În loc să încercăm să construim un nou algoritm de decodare pentru orice obiectiv specific de decodare, propunem ideea unui algoritm de decodare instruibil în care antrenăm un algoritm de decodare pentru a găsi o traducere care maximizează un obiectiv de decodare arbitrară. Mai exact, proiectăm un actor care observă și manipulează starea ascunsă a decodorului de traducere automată neurală și propunem să-l antrenăm folosind o variantă de gradient determinist de politică. Evaluăm pe scară largă algoritmul propus utilizând patru perechi de limbi și două obiective de decodare și arătăm că putem antrena într-adevăr un decodor lacom antrenabil care generează o traducere mai bună (în termeni de obiectiv de decodare țintă) cu costuri minime de calcul.', 'no': 'Nyleg forskning i omsetjinga av neuralmaskinen har stort fokusert på to aspektar. Neuralnettverksarkitektur og læringsalgoritme for slutttil slutt. Problemet med dekodering har imidlertid motteken relativt liten oppmerksomhet frå forskningssamfunnet. I denne papiret fokuserer vi berre på problemet med å dekode opp eit trengt neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodul. I staden for å prøve å bygge ein ny dekodingsalgoritme for kvar spesifikke dekodingsmål, fører vi ideen om trykkbare dekodingsalgoritme der vi treng ein dekodingsalgoritme for å finna eit omsetjing som maksimerer ein tilfeldige dekodingsmål. Dette er meir spesifikt at vi designerer ein aktor som observerer og manipulerer skjulte tilstanden til omsetjingskodekoderen for neuralmaskina og foreslår å trena han med ein variant av deterministiske politikkovergangar. Vi evaluerer den foreslåde algoritmen med fire språkparar og to dekodingsmål og viser at vi faktisk kan trenge ein ønskjelig grådekoder som lagar ein betre omsetjing (i tillegg til eit mål dekoding mål) med minimal datamaskineoverhode.', 'sr': 'Nedavno istraživanje u prevodu neuralne mašine uglavnom se fokusiralo na dva aspekta; arhitekture neurone mreže i algoritmi učenja kraja do kraja. Međutim, problem dekodiranja je dobio relativno malo pažnje iz istraživačke zajednice. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se samo na problem dekodiranja s obzirom na trenirani model prevoda neuralne mašine. Umesto da pokušamo da izgradimo novi algoritam za dekodiranje svakog određenog objekta za dekodiranje, predlažemo ideju o obučenom algoritmu za dekodiranje u kojem treniramo algoritam za dekodiranje da nađemo prevod koji maksimalizuje arbitrarni cilj dekodiranja. Posebnije, mi dizajniramo glumca koji posmatra i manipulira skriveno stanje dekodera neuralne mašine i predlažemo da ga obučimo sa variantom determinističkog političkog gradient a. Mi široko procjenjujemo predloženi algoritam koristeći četiri jezičke pare i dva cilja dekodiranja i pokažemo da zaista možemo trenirati trenirajući pohlepni dekoder koji stvara bolji prevod (u smislu ciljnog objekta dekodiranja) sa minimalnim računalnim iznad glave.', 'si': 'අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනයේ විශාල පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් දෙකක් ප්\u200d න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය ස්ථාපනය සහ අන්තිම අවසානය ඉගෙන ගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ඒත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සංවේදනය සමාජයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුනා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dර අළුත් ඩිකොඩින් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් නිර්මාණය කරන්න හැදුවොත්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් ඩිකොඩ් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් අදහසක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපි ක්\u200dරියා තව විශේෂයෙන්, අපි සැකසුම් කරුණාකරුවෙක් සැකසුම් කරනවා ඒ වගේම න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනයේ සැකසුම් ස්ථිතියේ හු අපි භාෂාව හතරක් සහ ඩිකෝඩ් අරමුණ දෙකක් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් අල්ගෝරිතම් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පෙන්වන්න, අපි ඇත්තටම පුළුවන් පුළු', 'so': "Waxbarashada ugu dhowaad ee tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada ayaa si badan ugu focus ugu dhigay laba dhinac; dhismaha shabakada neurada iyo dhammaadka waxbarashada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dhibaatada la xiriira deynta waxaa laga helay daryeel yar oo ka mid ah bulshada waxbarashada. Qoraalkan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaan nahay dhibaatada codsiga oo la siiyey model turjumista maskaxda neurada. Hadii a an isku dayno in aan dhisno algorithm cusub oo ah wax walbo cayiman oo la qorayo, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa fikrada ah oo la baran karo kalgorithm ah oo aan ku tababarinno si aan u helno turjum aad ugu kordhiso waxyaabaha la baro arbitrary deynta. Si gaar ah, waxaynu designnaa qof dhaqaale ah oo eegaya oo maamulaya xaaladda qarsoon ee tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada, waxaana soo jeedaynaa in lagu baro si aad u kala dudaato heer siyaasadeed. Waxaan si badan u qiimeynaynaa algoritka la soo jeeday oo ku isticmaalaya afarta luqadood oo labo noocyo ah iyo labo noocyo deynta ah, waxaana tusaynaa inaannu tababari karno deynta faa'iidada leh oo sameynaya turjum ka wanaagsan (sida goal decoding) oo ugu yaraan madaxa xisaabta.", 'sv': 'Ny forskning inom neural maskinöversättning har till stor del fokuserat på två aspekter; neurala nätverksarkitekturer och heltäckande inlärningsalgoritmer. Problemet med avkodning har dock fått relativt liten uppmärksamhet från forskarvärlden. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi enbart på problemet med avkodning givet en utbildad neural maskinöversättning modell. Istället för att försöka bygga en ny avkodningsalgoritm för något specifikt avkodningsmål, föreslår vi idén med träningsbar avkodningsalgoritm där vi tränar en avkodningsalgoritm för att hitta en översättning som maximerar ett godtyckligt avkodningsmål. Mer specifikt designar vi en aktör som observerar och manipulerar det dolda tillståndet hos den neurala maskinöversättningsdekodaren och föreslår att träna den med hjälp av en variant av deterministisk politisk gradient. Vi utvärderar utförligt den föreslagna algoritmen med hjälp av fyra språkpar och två avkodningsmål och visar att vi faktiskt kan träna en träningsbar girig avkodning som genererar en bättre översättning (i termer av målavkodningsmål) med minimal beräkningskostnad.', 'ur': 'نئورل ماشین ترجمہ میں اچھی تحقیق دو قسمتوں پر بڑا تمرکز کیا گیا ہے۔ نئورل نیٹ ورک معماری اور آخر و آخر کی تعلیم الگوریتم۔ لیکن اکڈوڈ کا مسئلہ تحقیق کمونٹی سے نسبتا تھوڑا توجه حاصل کیا گیا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم صرف ایک تدریس نائرول ماشین ترجمہ موڈل کے ذریعہ ڈیکوڈ کرنے کے مسئلہ پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں. اس کے بدلے ہم ایک نو ڈیکوڈینگ الگوریتم بنانے کی کوشش کریں گے جو کسی مخصوص ڈیکوڈینگ موضوع کے لئے ہے، ہم تطالب ڈیکوڈینگ الگوریتم کا خیال پیش کریں گے جہاں ہم ایک ڈیکوڈینگ الگوریتم کو تطالب کریں گے کہ ایک ترجمہ پیدا کریں جو کسی طرح کی ڈیکوڈینگ موضوع کو مزی اور زیادہ مخصوص، ہم ایک اکٹر طراحی کرتے ہیں جو نیورل ماشین ترجمہ ڈیکوڈر کی چھپائی موقعیت کو دیکھ رہا ہے اور منظورت کرتا ہے اور اس کی ترجمہ کرتا ہے کہ اسے ایک مقررہ پالیس گریڈینٹ کے استعمال کر سکے۔ ہم نے چار زبان جوڑوں اور دو ڈیکوڈینگ موضوع کے مطابق پیشنهاد الگوریتم کو اضافہ کر لیا ہے اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ ہم یقیناً ایک ٹرینابل گلڈی ڈیکوڈر کی تعلیم کرسکتے ہیں جو بہتر ترجمہ پیدا کرتا ہے (ایک موضوع ڈیکوڈینگ موضوع کے مطابق) کم کم کمپیوٹ', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் உள்ள ஆராய்ச்சி மொழிபெரும்பாலாக இரண்டு பக்கங்களில் கவனம் செலுத்த புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கங்கள் மற்றும் முடிவு முடிவு கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கல்விகள். ஆயினும் குறியீட்டு பிரச்சனையில் ஆராய்ச்சி சமூகத்திலிருந்து சிறிய கவனம் கிடைத்தது. In this paper, we solely focus on the problem of decoding given a trained neural machine translation model.  எந்த குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிடும் பொருளுக்கான ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பிட்ட எழுத்துருவாக்கம் உருவாக்க முயற்சி செய்ய முயற்சிக்குப் பதிலா மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒரு நடிகரை வடிவமைக்கும் மறைந்த நிலையை கண்காணிக்கும் மறைந்து இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி குறியீட்டு மற்றும் கையாள நாங்கள் நான்கு மொழி ஜோடி மற்றும் இரண்டு குறியீட்டு பொருள்களை பயன்படுத்தி முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மொழிக்கோவையை விரிவாக மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் நிச்சயமாக', 'uz': "Yaqinda yangi tarjima kompyuterdagi tahrirlar ikki tomondan foydalanadi; neural network architectures and end-to-end learning algorithms.  Kodlash muvaffaqiyati, taʼminlovchi jamiyatlardan juda kichkina paydo bo'ldi. Bu qogʻozda biz faqat o'rganilgan neural tarjima modelini kodlash muammosiga foydalanamiz. Bir qanday foydalanish uchun yangi kodlash algoritni yaratishni istaysizni istaysizki, biz taʼminlovchi algoritmni o'rganish fikrida o'ylaymiz. Bu bir tarjima topish uchun arbitratik kodlash obʼektini ko'paytirish uchun o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. Koʻrsatilgan, biz neyron tarjima tarjima holatini ko'rib turgan va boshqaruvchi amalni yaratish va uni aniqlash qoidagi boshqa darajada o'rganish talab qilamiz. Biz tasavvur qiladigan algoritni to'rt tillar ikki xil va ikkita kodlash maqola yordamida qiymatimiz va ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, biz juda yaxshi tarjima qilish (obʼekt tizimi bilan kichkina kompyuterning sarlavhasi bilan yaxshi tarjima qilishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu gần đây về dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh đã được nghiên cứu về hai khía cạnh; kiến trúc mạng thần kinh và thuật to án học kết thúc. Tuy nhiên, vấn đề giải mã đã nhận được khá ít sự chú ý từ cộng đồng nghiên cứu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chỉ tập trung vào vấn đề giải mã được tạo ra một mô hình dịch thiết bị thần kinh học. Thay vì cố xây dựng một thuật to án giải mã mới cho bất kỳ mục tiêu giải mã cụ thể nào, chúng tôi đề nghị một thuật toán giải mã định hướng giúp chúng ta đào tạo thuật toán giải mã để tìm ra một bản dịch tối đa một mục tiêu giải mã ngẫu nhiên. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi thiết kế một diễn viên theo dõi và thao túng tình trạng ẩn của bộ giải mã dịch cỗ máy thần kinh và đề xuất huấn luyện nó bằng một biến thể của chiều chuẩn chính sách. Chúng tôi đánh giá kỹ thuật toán đã đề nghị sử dụng bốn cặp ngôn ngữ và hai mục tiêu giải mã. Và cho thấy chúng tôi có thể huấn luyện một giải mã tham lam lâu dài tạo ra một bản dịch tốt hơn (với mục tiêu giải mã đích đích) với mức tính phí tối thiểu.', 'da': 'Nylig forskning i neural maskinoversættelse har i vid udstrækning fokuseret på to aspekter; neurale netværksarkitekturer og end-to-end læringsalgoritmer. Problemet med afkodning har imidlertid fået relativt lidt opmærksomhed fra forskningssamfundet. I denne artikel fokuserer vi udelukkende på problemet med afkodning givet en trænet neural maskinoversættelsesmodel. I stedet for at forsøge at bygge en ny afkodningsalgoritme til et bestemt afkodningsmål, foreslår vi ideen om træningsbar afkodningsalgoritme, hvor vi træner en afkodningsalgoritme til at finde en oversættelse, der maksimerer et vilkårligt afkodningsmål. Mere specifikt designer vi en aktør, der observerer og manipulerer den skjulte tilstand af den neurale maskinoversættelseskoder og foreslår at træne den ved hjælp af en variant af deterministisk politik gradient. Vi evaluerer grundigt den foreslåede algoritme ved hjælp af fire sprogpar og to afkodningsmål og viser, at vi faktisk kan træne en træningsdygtig grådig dekoder, der genererer en bedre oversættelse (i form af et mål afkodningsmål) med minimal beregningsmæssig overhead.', 'hr': 'Nedavno istraživanje u prevodu neuralnih strojeva uglavnom se fokusiralo na dva aspekta; arhitekture neurone mreže i algoritmi učenja kraja do kraja. Međutim, problem dekodiranja je dobio relativno malo pažnje iz istraživačke zajednice. U ovom papiru, usredotočili smo se samo na problem dekodiranja s obzirom na trenirani model prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Umjesto pokušavanja izgraditi novi algoritam dekodiranja za svaki određeni cilj dekodiranja, predlažemo ideju algoritma obučenog dekodiranja u kojem treniramo algoritam dekodiranja kako bi pronašli prevod koji maksimalizira proizvoljni cilj dekodiranja. Posebnije, dizajniramo glumca koji posmatra i manipulira skriveno stanje dekodera neuralnog uređaja i predlažemo da ga obučavamo s variantom determinističkog političkog gradient a. Mi široko procjenjujemo predloženi algoritam koristeći četiri jezičke pare i dva cilja dekodiranja i pokazujemo da možemo trenirati trenirajući pohlepni dekoder koji stvara bolji prevod (u smislu ciljnog cilja dekodiranja) s minimalnim računalnim iznad glave.', 'nl': 'Recent onderzoek naar neurale machinevertaling heeft zich grotendeels gericht op twee aspecten; neuronale netwerkarchitecturen en end-to-end leeralgoritmes. Het probleem van decodering heeft echter relatief weinig aandacht gekregen van de onderzoeksgemeenschap. In dit artikel richten we ons uitsluitend op het probleem van decodering met behulp van een getraind neural machine translation model. In plaats van te proberen een nieuw decoderingsalgoritme te bouwen voor een specifiek decoderingsdoel, stellen we het idee voor van training decoderingsalgoritme waarin we een decoderingsalgoritme trainen om een vertaling te vinden die een willekeurig decoderingsdoel maximaliseert. Meer specifiek ontwerpen we een actor die de verborgen toestand van de neurale machine translation decoder observeert en manipuleren en stellen we voor om deze te trainen met behulp van een variant van deterministische beleidsgradiënt. We evalueren het voorgestelde algoritme uitgebreid met behulp van vier taalparen en twee decoderdoelen en laten zien dat we inderdaad een trainde hebberige decoder kunnen trainen die een betere vertaling genereert (in termen van een doeldecoderdoelstelling) met minimale rekenkosten.', 'id': 'Penelitian baru-baru ini dalam terjemahan mesin saraf telah fokus pada dua aspek; arsitektur jaringan saraf dan algoritma belajar akhir-akhir. Masalah dekoding, bagaimanapun, telah menerima perhatian relatif sedikit dari komunitas penelitian. Dalam kertas ini, kita hanya fokus pada masalah dekodasi diberikan model terjemahan mesin saraf terlatih. Daripada mencoba membangun algoritma dekoding baru untuk setiap objektif dekoding spesifik, kita mengusulkan ide algoritma dekoding yang bisa dilatih di mana kita melatih algoritma dekoding untuk menemukan terjemahan yang memaksimalkan objektif dekoding secara arbitrar. Lebih spesifik, kami merancang aktor yang mengamati dan memanipulasi keadaan tersembunyi dekoder terjemahan mesin saraf dan mengusulkan untuk melatihnya menggunakan variasi gradien kebijakan determinis. Kami mengevaluasi secara ekstensif algoritma yang diusulkan menggunakan empat pasangan bahasa dan dua tujuan dekodifikasi dan menunjukkan bahwa kita benar-benar dapat melatih sebuah dekodifikasi serakah yang dapat dilatih yang menghasilkan terjemahan yang lebih baik (dalam termasuk tujuan dekodifikasi sasaran) dengan minimal perhitungan overhead.', 'de': 'Die jüngste Forschung im Bereich der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung hat sich weitgehend auf zwei Aspekte konzentriert: Neuronale Netzwerkarchitekturen und End-to-End-Lernalgorithmen. Das Problem der Dekodierung wurde jedoch von der Forschungsgemeinschaft relativ wenig beachtet. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns ausschließlich auf das Problem der Dekodierung mit einem trainierten neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungsmodell. Anstatt zu versuchen, einen neuen Dekodierungsalgorithmus für ein bestimmtes Dekodierungsziel zu erstellen, schlagen wir die Idee eines trainierbaren Dekodierungsalgorithmus vor, in dem wir einen Dekodierungsalgorithmus trainieren, um eine Übersetzung zu finden, die ein beliebiges Dekodierungsziel maximiert. Genauer gesagt entwerfen wir einen Akteur, der den verborgenen Zustand des neuronalen maschinellen Translationsdekoders beobachtet und manipuliert und schlagen vor, ihn mithilfe einer Variante deterministischer Policy Gradienten zu trainieren. Wir evaluieren den vorgeschlagenen Algorithmus ausführlich mit vier Sprachpaaren und zwei Dekodierzielen und zeigen, dass wir tatsächlich einen trainierbaren gierigen Decoder trainieren können, der eine bessere Übersetzung (in Bezug auf ein Ziel-Dekodierziel) mit minimalem Rechenopdown generiert.', 'bg': 'Последните изследвания в областта на невронния машинен превод до голяма степен са фокусирани върху два аспекта; архитектури на невронните мрежи и алгоритми за обучение от край до край. Проблемът с декодирането обаче е получил относително малко внимание от изследователската общност. В тази статия ние се фокусираме единствено върху проблема с декодирането, като се има предвид обучен модел на невронен машинен превод. Вместо да се опитваме да изградим нов алгоритъм за декодиране за всяка конкретна цел, ние предлагаме идеята за тренируем алгоритъм за декодиране, в който тренираме алгоритъм за декодиране, за да намерим превод, който максимизира произволна цел за декодиране. По-конкретно, ние проектираме актьор, който наблюдава и манипулира скритото състояние на невралния машинен превод декодер и предлага да го обучи, използвайки вариант на детерминистичен градиент на политиката. Ние обстойно оценяваме предложения алгоритъм, използвайки четири езикови двойки и две цели за декодиране и показваме, че наистина можем да тренираме алчен декодер, който генерира по-добър превод (по отношение на целта за декодиране) с минимални изчислителни разходи.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa hivi karibuni katika tafsiri ya mashine ya ubongo umejikita zaidi kwenye masuala mawili; neural network architectures and end-to-end learning algorithms.  Tatizo la kupunguza vifaa hivyo, hata hivyo, limepokea macho kidogo kutoka kwenye jamii ya utafiti. Katika gazeti hili, tunalenga tu kwenye tatizo la kupanua kwa kipindi cha utafsiri wa mashine ya neurali. Badala ya kujaribu kujenga mialgorithi mpya ya kuboresha kwa lengo lolote la kuboresha, tunapendekeza wazo la ufundishaji wa algorithi wa mafunzo ambalo tunafundisha algorithi ya kuboresha ili kutafuta tafsiri inayoongezea lengo la kudhibiti kiholela. Zaidi zaidi, tunaunda mwigizaji anayeongalia na kudhibiti hali ya siri ya kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo na tunapendekeza kufundisha kwa kutumia mabadiliko ya msingi wa sera. Tutathmini kwa kiasi kikubwa utaratibu huu unapendekezwa kwa kutumia viwili vya lugha nne na malengo mawili ya kuchodiwa na kuonyesha kwamba kwa hakika tunaweza kufundisha mpango wa uchumi wa kifaa kinachotengeneza tafsiri bora (kwa sababu ya malengo ya kudodi) kwa kiwango kidogo cha hisabati.', 'ko': '최근 신경기계 번역 분야의 연구는 주로 두 가지 측면에 집중되었다.신경 네트워크 구조와 끝에서 끝까지 학습 알고리즘.그러나 디코딩 문제는 연구계의 주목을 받지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 훈련 신경기계 번역 모델에 대한 디코딩 문제에만 주목한다.우리는 어떠한 특정한 디코딩 목표를 위해 새로운 디코딩 알고리즘을 구축하려고 시도하지 않고 디코딩 알고리즘을 훈련할 수 있는 사상을 제기했다. 이 알고리즘에서 우리는 디코딩 알고리즘을 훈련하여 임의의 디코딩 목표를 최대화하는 번역을 찾았다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 신경기계 번역 디코더의 숨겨진 상태를 관찰하고 조종하기 위해 참가자를 설계했고, 이를 훈련하기 위해 확실한 전략적 사다리를 사용하는 것을 제안했다.우리는 네 가지 언어를 사용하여 두 개의 디코딩 목표와 제시된 알고리즘에 대해 광범위한 평가를 실시한 결과 우리는 훈련 가능한 탐욕 디코딩기를 훈련시켜 최소한의 계산 비용으로 더 좋은 번역을 만들 수 있다(목표 디코딩 목표에 대해서).', 'tr': 'Ýakynda näral maşynyň terjimesinde öňki araştyrmalar iki aspekte üýtgedi; näyral şebeke arhitektarlar we soňra öwrenme algoritmaları. Ýöne ködleme mesele ylmy jemgyýetinden az üns berildi. Bu kagyzda, biz diňe öwrenmeli näral maşynyň terjime nusgasyny taýýarlamak meselesine üns berýäris. Her hili bir takyk kodlemek maksady üçin täze bir ködleme algoritmi in şa etmek ýerine, biz öz içinde bozgunç kodlemek üçin bir terjime tapmak üçin taýýarlanabilir kodleme algoritmi fikrini teklip edýäris. Aýratyn görä, biz neural maşynyň kodçysynyň gizli durumyny bejeren we üýtgeden aktöri tasarlap we muny deterministik politika gradiýasynyň wariantyny ulanmagy teklip edýäris. Biz öň teklip eden algoritmini dört dil çift we iki gol maksadyny ulanarak muňzam deňleýäris we çyndanam kalkularyň üstünde gowy bir terjime etmäge mümkin edip biljegimizi görkezip bilýäris.', 'fa': 'تحقیقات اخیرا در ترجمه ماشین عصبی بیشتر روی دو قسمت تمرکز شده است. معماری شبکه عصبی و الگوریتم یادگیری پایان. ولی مشکل دکوندن، توجه نسبتا کمی از جامعه تحقیقات گرفته است. در این کاغذ، ما تنها روی مشکل دکوندن یک مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی آموزش داده شده تمرکز می کنیم. به جای تلاش کردن آلگوریتم جدید برای هر هدف ویژه\u200cای از دکوندن خاص ساخته شود، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم ایده الگوریتم دکوندن قابل آموزش آموزش الگوریتم دکوندن را برای پیدا کردن ترجمه\u200cای که یک هدف دکوندن قابل توافق می\u200cکند. دقیقاً ما یک بازیگر طراحی می کنیم که موقعیت پنهان ترجمه ماشین عصبی را نگاه می\u200cکند و تغییر می\u200cدهد که با استفاده از یک گوناگون سیاست تعریف می\u200cکند. ما الگوریتم پیشنهاد را با استفاده از چهار جفت زبان و دو هدف دکوندی کشور ارزیابی می کنیم و نشان می دهیم که ما واقعا می توانیم یک دکوردر آلودگی آموزش دهیم که یک ترجمه بهتر (به عنوان یک هدف دکوندن هدف) را با سر کمی محاسبات تولید می کند.', 'af': "Onlangse verondersoek in neural masjien vertaling het groot gefokus op twee aspekte; neuralnetwerk-arkitekturke en einde-tot-einde leer algoritme. Die probleem van dekodering het, tog, relativief klein aandag ontvang van die ondersoek gemeenskap. In hierdie papier, ons fokus slegs op die probleem van dekodering wat gegee is 'n gevorderde neurale masjien vertaling model. In plaas van probeer om 'n nuwe dekoding algoritme te bou vir enige spesifieke dekoding objekte, voorstel ons die idee van ontvangbare dekoding algoritme waarin ons 'n dekoding algoritme tref om 'n vertaling te vind wat 'n arbitrêre dekoding objekte maksimeer. More specifically, we design an actor that observes and manipulates the hidden state of the neural machine translation decoder and proposes to train it using a variant of deterministic policy gradient. Ons evalueer die voorgestelde algoritme met vier taal paar en twee dekodeerde objekte en wys dat ons sekerlik 'n onderwerpende groet dekoder kan trein wat 'n beter vertaling genereer (in terms van 'n doel dekodeerde objek) met minimale rekenaar oordeel.", 'sq': 'Recent research in neural machine translation has largely focused on two aspects;  arkitektura e rrjetit neural dhe algoritme mësimi nga fundi në fund. Problemi i dekodimit, megjithatë, ka marrë relativisht pak vëmendje nga komuniteti kërkimor. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi vetëm në problemin e dekodimit të dhënë një model të trajnuar të përkthimit të makinave nervore. Në vend të përpjekjes për të ndërtuar një algoritëm të ri dekodimi për çdo objektiv të caktuar dekodimi, ne propozojmë idenë e algoritmit të dekodimit të trajnuar në të cilin ne trajnojmë një algoritëm dekodimi për të gjetur një përkthim që maksimizon një objektiv arbitrar dekodimi. Më specifikisht, ne dizajnojmë një aktor që vëzhgon dhe manipulon gjendjen e fshehtë të dekoderit të përkthimit të makinave nervore dhe propozojmë ta trajnojmë duke përdorur një variant të gradient it të politikës deterministe. Ne vlerësojmë gjerësisht algoritmin e propozuar duke përdorur katër çifte gjuhësh dhe dy objektiva dekodimi dhe tregojmë se ne me të vërtetë mund të trajnojmë një dekodim lakmitar që gjeneron një përkthim më të mirë (në lidhje me objektivin e dekodimit të objektivit) me minimale të përgjithshme llogaritare.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ የናቡር መሣሪያን ትርጉም በሁለቱ ጉዳዮች ላይ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የኔውራዊ መረብ መሠረት እና የመጨረሻ ትምህርት አልጎርት ምንም እንኳን የድምፅ ጉዳይ ግን ትምህርት ማኅበረሰብ ጥቂት ትኩረት ተቀበለ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የተማረከውን የናውሮል መሣሪያን ትርጓሜ ሞዴል በተሰጠው የድምፅ ጉዳይ ላይ ብቻ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ የክፍለ አቃውሞ መክፈት ማድረግ በመፈለግ ፋንታ አዲስ የክፍለ አቃራቢያ ማድረግ ማድረግ ማሰናከል እናስባለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የተሰወረውን የናውሮል መሣሪያውን ትርጉም አካባቢውን እናስተባብል እና በተለየ የፖሊሲ ቀዳሚ በመጠቀም እናስተማርነው ዘንድ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው አሌጎሪም በአራቱ ቋንቋዎች ሁለት እና ሁለት አዳራጊዎችን በመጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': 'Nöral maşın çevirindəki son araştırmalar çox iki aspektə odaqlandı. nöral ağ arhitektarı və sonun öyrənmə algoritmi. Ancaq, araşdırma toplumundan çox az ünsiyyət alındı. Bu kağızda, biz yalnız təhsil edilmiş nöral maşına çevirilməsi modelinin kodlaması problemlərinə odaqlanırıq. Hər kəsin kodlama məqsədi üçün yeni bir kodlama algoritmi in şa etmək yerinə, biz özümüzə müəyyən edilən kodlama algoritmi iddiasını təklif edirik ki, bir dəyişiklik algoritmi öyrəndik və arbitrary kodlama məqsədini maximizləndirir. Daha çox xüsusiyyətli, biz bir aktör tasarlayırıq ki, nöral maşın çeviri kodlayıcının gizli durumunu görür və manipul edir və onu deterministik siyasi gradientinin dəyişikliyi ilə təhsil etməyi təklif edirik. Biz təklif etdiyimiz algoritmi dörd dil çift və iki dekoding məqsədilə vasitə değerləşdiririk və həqiqətən də, daha yaxşı bir çeviri (məqsədilə kodlama məqsədilə) minimal hesap üstündə təklif edə biləcəyimizi göstəririk.', 'hy': 'Recent research in neural machine translation has largely focused on two aspects;  neural network architectures and end-to-end learning algorithms.  Այնուամենայնիվ, կոդավորման խնդիրը համեմատաբար քիչ ուշադրություն է ստացել հետազոտության համայնքից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք միայն կենտրոնանում ենք դեկոդավորման խնդիրների վրա, որը տրվում է ուսուցանված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելի: Փորձելու փոխարեն ստեղծել նոր բախտավորման ալգորիթմ ցանկացած հատուկ բախտավորման նպատակի համար, մենք առաջարկում ենք պատրաստվող բախտավորման ալգորիթմի գաղափար, որտեղ մենք պատրաստում ենք բախտավորման ալգորիթմ գտնելու թարգմանություն, որը մեծանացնում է ցանկացած բախտավորման ն Ավելի հատկապես, մենք դիզայնում ենք դերասան, որը հետևում է և կառավարում է նյարդային մեքենայի թաքնված թաքնված դիկոդերի վիճակը և առաջարկում է այն վարժեցնել օգտագործելով որոշիչ քաղաքականության աստիճանի տարբերակը: Մենք էքսպենսիվ գնահատում ենք առաջարկված ալգորիթմը, օգտագործելով չորս լեզվի զույգեր և երկու կոդավորման նպատակներ, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մենք իսկապես կարող ենք պատրաստել փորձարկվող ագահություն կոդավորող, որը ստեղծում է ավելի լավ թարգմանություն (նպատակային կոդավորման', 'ca': "Recent research in neural machine translation has largely focused on two aspects;  arquitectures de xarxes neurals i algoritmes d'aprenentatge de final a final. Però el problema de la descodificació ha rebut relativament poca atenció de la comunitat de recerca. In this paper, we solely focus on the problem of decoding given a trained neural machine translation model.  En lloc d'intentar construir un nou algoritme de decodificació per qualsevol objectiu específic de decodificació, proposem la idea d'algoritme de decodificació entrenable en el qual entrenem un algoritme de decodificació per trobar una traducció que maximitze un objectiu arbitrari de decodificació. Més específicament, dissenyem un actor que observe i manipula l'estat ocult del decodificador de traducció neural de màquines i proponem treinar-lo fent servir una variant de gradient de política determinista. Evaluam ampliament l'algoritme proposat fent servir quatre parelles de llenguatges i dos objectius de decodificació i demostram que podem treinar un decodificador alegre que genera una millor traducció (en termes d'objectiu de decodificació de l'objectiu) amb un mínim de càlcul superior.", 'cs': 'Nedávný výzkum neuronového strojového překladu se do značné míry zaměřil na dva aspekty: architektury neuronových sítí a komplexní učební algoritmy. Problém dekódování však věnoval výzkumné komunitě relativně malou pozornost. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme pouze na problematiku dekódování s využitím trénovaného neuronového strojového překladu modelu. Namísto toho, abychom se snažili vytvořit nový dekódovací algoritmus pro konkrétní dekódovací cíl, navrhujeme myšlenku trénovatelného dekódovacího algoritmu, ve kterém trénujeme dekódovací algoritmus tak, aby našel překlad, který maximalizuje libovolný dekódovací cíl. Konkrétněji navrhujeme aktéra, který pozoruje a manipuluje skrytým stavem dekodéru neuronového strojového překladu a navrhujeme jej trénovat pomocí varianty deterministického gradientu politiky. Důkladně vyhodnocujeme navržený algoritmus pomocí čtyř jazykových párů a dvou dekódovacích cílů a ukazujeme, že můžeme skutečně trénovat chamtivý dekodér, který generuje lepší překlad (z hlediska cílového dekódovacího cíle) s minimálním výpočetním režimem.', 'fi': 'Äskettäinen neurokonekäännöksen tutkimus on keskittynyt pitkälti kahteen näkökohtaan: neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurit ja kokonaisoppimisalgoritmit. Tutkimusyhteisö on kuitenkin kiinnittänyt suhteellisen vähän huomiota dekoodaukseen. Tässä työssä keskitytään yksinomaan dekoodauksen ongelmaan, kun otetaan huomioon koulutettu neurokonekäännösmalli. Sen sijaan, että yrittäisimme rakentaa uutta dekoodaantialgoritmia mihin tahansa tiettyyn dekoodaantitavoitteeseen, ehdotamme ideaa koulutettavasta dekoodaantialgoritmista, jossa koulutamme dekoodaantialgoritmia löytämään käännöksen, joka maksimoi mielivaltaisen dekoodaantitavoitteen. Tarkemmin sanottuna suunnittelemme toimijan, joka tarkkailee ja manipuloi neurokonekäännöksen dekooderin piilotettua tilaa ja ehdottaa sen kouluttamista deterministisen politiikan gradientin variantin avulla. Arvioimme ehdotettua algoritmia laajasti käyttäen neljää kieliparia ja kahta dekoodaustavoittetta ja osoitamme, että pystymme kouluttamaan koulutettavan ahneen dekooderin, joka tuottaa paremman käännöksen (kohdedekoodaustavoitteen suhteen) minimaalisella laskennallisella yleiskustannuksilla.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের সম্প্রতি গবেষণা বেশীরভাগ দুটি দিকে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে; নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো এবং শেষ পর্যন্ত শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদম। তবে গবেষণা সম্প্রদায়ের কাছ থেকে খুব কম মনোযোগ পেয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শুধুমাত্র একটি প্রশিক্ষিত নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল দেখানোর সমস্যার উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। কোন নির্দিষ্ট উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য নতুন ডিকোডিং অ্যালগরিদম তৈরি করার চেষ্টা করার পরিবর্তে আমরা প্রশিক্ষণিত অ্যালগরিদমের ধারণা প্রস্তাব করি, যেখানে আমরা একটি ডিকোডিং অ্যালগরিদ আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি অভিনেতা ডিজাইন করি যা নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের লুকিয়ে রাখে এবং পরিচালনা করে এবং এটি প্রস্তাব করি নির্ধারিত নীতি গ্রেডেন্ডের ব আমরা প্রস্তাবিত অ্যালগরিদম চার ভাষা জোড়া এবং দুই ডিকোডিং উদ্দেশ্য ব্যবহার করে ব্যাপকভাবে মূল্যায়ন করি এবং দেখাই যে আমরা অবশ্যই একটি প্রশিক্ষণিত লোভী ডেকোডার প্রশিক্ষণ দিতে প', 'bs': 'Nedavno istraživanje u prevodu neuralne mašine uglavnom se fokusiralo na dva aspekta; arhitekture neurone mreže i algoritmi učenja kraja do kraja. Međutim, problem dekodiranja je dobio relativno malo pažnje iz istraživačke zajednice. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se samo na problem dekodiranja s obzirom na trenirani model prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Umjesto pokušavanja izgraditi novi algoritam dekodiranja za svaki konkretni cilj dekodiranja, predlažemo ideju algoritma obučenog dekodiranja u kojem treniramo algoritam dekodiranja da nađemo prevod koji maksimalizuje proizvoljni cilj dekodiranja. Posebnije, mi dizajniramo glumca koji posmatra i manipulira skriveno stanje dekodera neuralne mašine i predlažemo da ga obučavamo koristeći variant determinističkog političkog gradient a. Mi široko procjenjujemo predloženi algoritam koristeći četiri jezičke pare i dva cilja dekodiranja i pokazujemo da zaista možemo trenirati trenirani pohlepni dekoder koji stvara bolji prevod (u smislu ciljnog objekta dekodiranja) sa minimalnim računalnim iznad glave.', 'et': 'Hiljutised neuromasintõlke uuringud on suures osas keskendunud kahele aspektile; neurovõrgu arhitektuurid ja lõppõppe algoritmid. Dekodeerimise probleemile on aga teadusringkonnad pööranud suhteliselt vähe tähelepanu. Käesolevas töös keskendume ainult dekodeerimise probleemile, arvestades väljaõpetatud neuraalse masintõlke mudelit. Selle asemel, et ehitada uut dekodeerimisalgoritmi mis tahes konkreetse dekodeerimise eesmärgi jaoks, pakume välja idee koolitatavast dekodeerimisalgoritmist, kus me koolitame dekodeerimisalgoritmi leidmaks tõlke, mis maksimeerib suvalise dekodeerimise eesmärgi. Täpsemalt disainime näitleja, kes jälgib ja manipuleerib neuraalse masintõlke dekoodri varjatud olekut ning teeb ettepaneku koolitada seda deterministliku poliitika gradienti variandi abil. Hindame põhjalikult väljapakutud algoritmi, kasutades nelja keelepaari ja kahte dekodeerimise eesmärki, ning näitame, et saame tõepoolest treenida koolitatavat ahnet dekoderit, mis tekitab parema tõlke (sihtdekodeerimise eesmärgi mõttes) minimaalse arvutuskuluga.', 'ha': "Tafiti na farko cikin fassarar ɗin aikin neura ya zura zura kiyãye a cikin biyu; QNetworkAccessFileBackend Haƙĩƙa, ma'abũcin kodi ya motsa muhimmi daga jamii na fassarar. In a cikin wannan takardan, munã fokus a kan matabbatar koda da aka ba da wani misali na fassarar fassarori na aikin neural. Babu jarraba ka gina wani algoriti na kodi kodi wa wani abu na ƙayyade koda, sai mu buƙata fikãfin da za'a sanar da algoritm wanda za'a sanar da shi algoritm na kodi a kwamfyuta don mu sami wani fassarar da ke faɗa ɗa abun arbitaruki. Ko da ƙayyade, Munã design wani actor wanda ke tsare da kuma yana maniyya halin da aka ɓõye, kodi na fassarar fassarar maɓallin neural kuma Muke buƙaitar da shi dõmin ya sanar da shi da wani variant na daraja na lissafi. Tuna ƙaddara algoritm da aka faɗana ana ana amfani da nau'i huɗu cikin harshen sauri da abubuwa biyu, kuma munã nuna cewa lalle ne, za mu iya ƙidãya wani kodi mai ƙidãya wa raɗari wanda ke iya samar fassarar da mafi alhẽri (idan an ƙidãya wata objective) da ƙarami na lissafi.", 'he': 'Recent research in neural machine translation has largely focused on two aspects;  neural network architectures and end-to-end learning algorithms.  הבעיה של הפענוח, עם זאת, קיבלה מעט תשומת לב יחסית מקהילת המחקר. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמקדים בלבד בבעיה של פיתוח נתן מודל התרגום המכונה העצבית מאומן. במקום לנסות לבנות אלגוריתם פתאום חדש לכל אובייקט פתאום ספציפי, אנו מציעים את הרעיון של אלגוריתם פתאום ניתן לאמן בו אנו מאמן אלגוריתם פתאום במיוחד יותר, אנחנו מעצבים שחקן שמצפה ומניפול את המצב הסמוי של התרגום המכונה העצבית ומציע לאמן אותו באמצעות שינוי של gradient מדיניות קבענית. אנו מעריכים באופן רחב את האלגוריתם המוצע באמצעות ארבעה זוגות שפות ושני מטרות לפענוח ולהראות שאנחנו יכולים למעשה לאמן מפענח חמדן שאומר שיוצר תרגום טוב יותר', 'sk': 'Nedavne raziskave na področju nevronskega strojnega prevajanja so se v veliki meri osredotočile na dva vidika: arhitekture nevronskih omrežij in algoritmi učenja od konca do konca. Vendar pa je raziskovalna skupnost deležna relativno malo pozornosti problemu dekodiranja. V prispevku se osredotočamo izključno na problem dekodiranja glede na usposobljen model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja. Namesto da bi poskušali zgraditi nov algoritem dekodiranja za katerega koli določenega dekodiranja, predlagamo idejo učnega dekodiranja algoritma, v katerem usposabljamo dekodiranje algoritma, da bi našli prevod, ki maksimira poljubni cilj dekodiranja. Natančneje, oblikujemo igralca, ki opazuje in manipulira skrito stanje nevronskega strojnega prevajanja dekoderja in ga predlagamo usposabljanje z uporabo različice determinističnega gradienta politike. Predlagani algoritem smo obsežno ocenili s štirimi jezikovnimi pari in dvema dekodirnima ciljema ter pokazali, da lahko resnično usposabljamo pohlepnega dekodirnika, ki ustvarja boljši prevod (v smislu ciljnega dekodiranja) z minimalnim računalniškim stroškom.', 'jv': 'FullName Neral network architectures and end-to-end Learning Algorithms. Mangkane ono wektu nggolok, dadi, nyong, ora tau ngomong mungkin sumudhakan kelas nang nguasakno. Nang pempet iki, kita diponton kanggo langgar kuwi seneng nggawe geranggunakake bot sing dadi model itoleraning perintake alat. Tanggal ono nggawe Algorithm sing nggawe nggawe sistem sistem decoding Link Awak dhéwé luwih beraksi Algorithm sing gawe ngubah tanggal apat lan galaksi sing dibutuhke tarjamahan karo winih dhéwé kuwi nggawe ngubah dhéwé iso nggawe ngedolok tarjamahan sing luwih apik dhéwé', 'bo': 'དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འདིས་ཆེས་རྐྱེན་དུ་ཆེས་ཉུང སྒུལ་སློང་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དང་མཐའ་ལྡན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་རྩལ་བ་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཕྱོགས་སྡུད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚོགས་སྡེར་ནས་བཟུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལ་ཐོབ་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་མ་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ལྡན་གྱི་དཀའ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་གསལ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གསརཔ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བ་རེད། More specifically, we design an actor that observes and manipulates the hidden state of the neural machine translation decoder and proposes to train it using a variant of deterministic policy gradient. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention Mechanism and Linguistic Features', 'ar': 'كشف الأخبار الساخرة وتحليلها باستخدام آلية الانتباه والميزات اللغوية', 'pt': 'Detecção e análise de notícias satíricas usando mecanismo de atenção e recursos linguísticos', 'fr': "Détection et analyse des actualités satiriques à l'aide du mécanisme de l'attention et des caractéristiques linguistiques", 'es': 'Detección y análisis de noticias satíricas mediante mecanismos de atención y funciones lingüísticas', 'ja': '注意メカニズムと言語的特徴を使用した風刺ニュースの検出と分析', 'zh': '盖意机语言之刺新闻检析也', 'hi': 'व्यंग्यात्मक समाचार का पता लगाने और विश्लेषण ध्यान तंत्र और भाषाई सुविधाओं का उपयोग कर', 'ru': 'Обнаружение и анализ сатирических новостей с использованием механизма внимания и лингвистических особенностей', 'ga': 'Brath agus Anailís Aoir na Nuachta agus Úsáid á baint as Meicníocht Airde agus Gnéithe Teangeolaíochta', 'ka': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention Mechanism and Linguistic Features', 'hu': 'Szatirikus hírek felismerése és elemzése figyelemmechanizmus és nyelvi jellemzők segítségével', 'el': 'Σατιρικές ειδήσεις Ανίχνευση και Ανάλυση χρησιμοποιώντας Μηχανισμό Προσοχής και Γλωσσολογικά Χαρακτηριστικά', 'it': 'Rilevazione e analisi di notizie satiriche utilizzando il meccanismo di attenzione e le caratteristiche linguistiche', 'kk': 'Қазір механизмі және лингвистикалық қасиеттерді қолданып сатық жаңалықтарды анықтау және анализ', 'lt': 'Satirinių žinių aptikimas ir analizė naudojant dėmesio mechanizmą ir kalbines savybes', 'mk': 'Детектирање и анализа на сатиричните вести користејќи механизам за внимание и јазични карактеристики', 'ms': 'Pengesanan dan Analisi Berita Satirikal menggunakan Mekanisme Perhatian dan Ciri-ciri Bahasa', 'mn': 'Сангаалын мэдээллийн мэдээлэл олох болон шинжилгээ анхаарлын механизм болон хэлбэрийн чадваруудыг ашиглан', 'ml': 'ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ മെക്കനിസ്റ്റും ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്കും വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സാറ്റിരിക്കല്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഡിറ്', 'mt': 'Sejbien u Analiżi tal-Aħbarijiet Satiriċi bl-użu tal-Mekkaniżmu tal-Attenzjoni u l-Karatteristiċi Lingwistiċi', 'no': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention Mechanism and Linguistic Features', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie i analiza satyrycznych wiadomości przy użyciu mechanizmu uwagi i cech językowych', 'ro': 'Detectarea și analiza știrilor satirice folosind mecanismul de atenție și caracteristicile lingvistice', 'si': 'සැටිරිකාලික වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න සහ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ භාෂාවික විශේෂය', 'so': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention mechanism and Linguistic Features', 'sv': 'Satiriska nyhetsdetektering och analys med hjälp av uppmärksamhetsmekanism och språkliga funktioner', 'sr': 'Satirička novost otkrivanje i analiza koristeći mehanizam pažnje i lingvističke karakteristike', 'ta': 'கவனம் முறைமை மற்றும் Linguistic பண்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி செயல் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் Analysis', 'ur': 'اچھی مکانیسم اور لینگ ویسٹیسٹ فوکتوروں کے استعمال کے مطابق سٹیریٹریک نیویس آشنا اور تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thiết bị truy tìm và phân tích tin tức cố định dùng chức năng chú ý và ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Откриване и анализ на сатирични новини чрез механизъм на вниманието и лингвистични характеристики', 'nl': 'Satirisch Nieuws Detectie en Analyse met behulp van Aandacht Mechanisme en Taalkenmerken', 'hr': 'Detekcija i analiza satiričkih vijesti koristeći mehanizam pažnje i lingvističke karakteristike', 'da': 'Satiriske nyheder Detektion og analyse ved hjælp af opmærksomhedsmekanisme og sproglige funktioner', 'id': 'Deteksi dan Analisi Berita Satiris menggunakan Mekanisme Perhatian dan Karakteristik Bahasa', 'ko': '주의 메커니즘과 언어 특징을 바탕으로 하는 풍자 뉴스 검측과 분석', 'de': 'Satirische Nachrichtenerkennung und -analyse mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus und sprachlichen Merkmalen', 'fa': 'با استفاده از مکانیسم توجه و ویژه\u200cهای لینگیستیک', 'af': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention Mechanism and Linguistic Features', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Habari za Satirical and Analysis kwa kutumia Mfumo wa Uchunguzi na Tamko za Kilinguistic', 'sq': 'Gjetja dhe analiza e lajmeve satirike duke përdorur mekanizmin e vëmendjes dhe funksionet gjuhësore', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Hatlaryň Metniýasy we Dil Görnüşleri ullanýan Satirik Haýtalar Tapma we Analizi', 'hy': 'Սատրիկական նորությունների հայտնաբերումը և վերլուծությունը, օգտագործելով ուշադրության մեխանիզմը և լեզվական առանձնահատկությունները', 'az': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention Mechanism and Linguistic Features', 'bs': 'Detekcija i analiza satiričkih vijesti koristeći mehanizam pažnje i lingvističke karakteristike', 'ca': "La detecció i l'anàlisi de notícies satèriques utilitzant el mecanisme d'atenció i les característiques lingüístices", 'et': 'Satiiriliste uudiste tuvastamine ja analüüs tähelepanu mehhanismi ja keeleliste omaduste abil', 'fi': 'Satiiristen uutisten havaitseminen ja analysointi huomiomekanismin ja kielellisten ominaisuuksien avulla', 'bn': 'মনোযোগ মেকানিজম এবং লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে স্যাটিরিক সংবাদ সনাক্ত এবং বিশ্লেষণ', 'cs': 'Detekce a analýza satirických zpráv pomocí mechanismu pozornosti a jazykových vlastností', 'jv': 'Samurai Keterangan Hawitan detection and Test Using Attention mehanisms and Linguist Attributions', 'he': 'גילוי חדשות וסטיריות באמצעות מכונות תשומת לב ותחויות שפתיות', 'sk': 'Satirično odkrivanje in analiza novic z uporabo mehanizma pozornosti in jezikovnih značilnosti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Satirical News Detection and Analysis using Attention Mechanism and Linguistic Features'}
{'en': 'Satirical news is considered to be entertainment, but it is potentially deceptive and harmful. Despite the embedded genre in the article, not everyone can recognize the satirical cues and therefore believe the news as true news. We observe that satirical cues are often reflected in certain paragraphs rather than the whole document. Existing works only consider document-level features to detect the satire, which could be limited. We consider paragraph-level linguistic features to unveil the satire by incorporating neural network and attention mechanism. We investigate the difference between paragraph-level features and document-level features, and analyze them on a large satirical news dataset. The evaluation shows that the proposed model detects satirical news effectively and reveals what features are important at which level.', 'ar': 'تعتبر الأخبار الساخرة من وسائل الترفيه ، لكنها قد تكون خادعة وضارة. على الرغم من النوع المضمن في المقالة ، لا يمكن للجميع التعرف على الإشارات الساخرة وبالتالي تصديق الأخبار على أنها أخبار حقيقية. نلاحظ أن الإشارات الساخرة غالبًا ما تنعكس في فقرات معينة بدلاً من المستند بأكمله. الأعمال الحالية تأخذ في الاعتبار فقط الميزات على مستوى المستند لاكتشاف السخرية ، والتي يمكن أن تكون محدودة. نحن نعتبر الميزات اللغوية على مستوى الفقرة للكشف عن السخرية من خلال دمج الشبكة العصبية وآلية الانتباه. نحن نحقق في الاختلاف بين الميزات على مستوى الفقرة والميزات على مستوى المستند ، ونحللها في مجموعة بيانات إخبارية ساخرة كبيرة. يُظهر التقييم أن النموذج المقترح يكتشف الأخبار الساخرة بفعالية ويكشف عن الميزات المهمة في أي مستوى.', 'es': 'Las noticias satíricas se consideran entretenimiento, pero son potencialmente engañosas y dañinas. A pesar del género incrustado en el artículo, no todos pueden reconocer las señales satíricas y, por lo tanto, creer que las noticias son noticias reales. Observamos que las señales satíricas a menudo se reflejan en ciertos párrafos y no en todo el documento. Las obras existentes solo consideran características a nivel de documento para detectar la sátira, que podría ser limitada. Consideramos que las características lingüísticas a nivel de párrafo revelan la sátira al incorporar una red neuronal y un mecanismo de atención. Investigamos la diferencia entre las características a nivel de párrafo y las funciones a nivel de documento, y las analizamos en un gran conjunto de datos de noticias satíricas. La evaluación muestra que el modelo propuesto detecta eficazmente las noticias satíricas y revela qué características son importantes en qué nivel.', 'fr': "Les nouvelles satiriques sont considérées comme du divertissement, mais elles sont potentiellement trompeuses et nuisibles. Malgré le genre intégré dans l'article, tout le monde ne peut pas reconnaître les indices satiriques et donc croire que les nouvelles sont vraies. Nous observons que les indices satiriques sont souvent reflétés dans certains paragraphes plutôt que dans l'ensemble du document. Les œuvres existantes ne prennent en compte que les caractéristiques au niveau du document pour détecter la satire, qui peuvent être limitées. Nous considérons les caractéristiques linguistiques au niveau du paragraphe pour dévoiler la satire en incorporant un réseau de neurones et un mécanisme d'attention. Nous étudions la différence entre les fonctionnalités au niveau des paragraphes et celles au niveau du document, et les analysons dans un vaste ensemble de données d'actualités satiriques. L'évaluation montre que le modèle proposé détecte efficacement les actualités satiriques et révèle quelles caractéristiques sont importantes à quel niveau.", 'pt': 'As notícias satíricas são consideradas entretenimento, mas são potencialmente enganosas e prejudiciais. Apesar do gênero incorporado ao artigo, nem todos conseguem reconhecer as pistas satíricas e, portanto, acreditar na notícia como notícia verdadeira. Observamos que as sugestões satíricas são frequentemente refletidas em certos parágrafos, e não em todo o documento. Os trabalhos existentes consideram apenas recursos em nível de documento para detectar a sátira, o que pode ser limitado. Consideramos recursos linguísticos em nível de parágrafo para desvendar a sátira, incorporando rede neural e mecanismo de atenção. Investigamos a diferença entre recursos de nível de parágrafo e recursos de nível de documento e os analisamos em um grande conjunto de dados de notícias satíricas. A avaliação mostra que o modelo proposto detecta notícias satíricas de forma eficaz e revela quais recursos são importantes em qual nível.', 'ja': '風刺ニュースはエンターテイメントと見なされますが、潜在的に欺瞞的で有害です。記事にジャンルが組み込まれているにもかかわらず、誰もが風刺的な手がかりを認識し、したがってニュースを真のニュースとして信じることができるわけではありません。風刺的な手がかりは、文書全体ではなく、特定の段落に反映されることが多いことがわかります。既存の作品では、風刺を検出するための文書レベルの機能のみが考慮されており、これは制限される可能性があります。パラグラフレベルの言語学的特徴を考慮し、ニューラルネットワークと注意メカニズムを組み込むことで風刺を公開します。段落レベルの機能とドキュメントレベルの機能の違いを調査し、大規模な風刺ニュースデータセットで分析します。この評価は、提案されたモデルが風刺的なニュースを効果的に検出し、どのレベルで重要な機能を明らかにすることを示しています。', 'zh': '讥新闻以为乐,而有欺骗性危害之性。 虽文中嵌流,非人所能识,以此信新闻为真新闻。 刺刺之线,往往见于段落,非一文也。 今文惟思文档级以检刺,或有限矣。 臣等思段落级言语特征,以合神经网络意机制以示刺。 考其落文档之异,而大刺新闻数集上析之。 论曰:模形检讽刺性新闻,所揭层面为重。', 'ru': 'Сатирические новости считаются развлечением, но они потенциально обманчивы и вредны. Несмотря на встроенный в статью жанр, не каждый может распознать сатирические подсказки и поэтому верить новостям как истинным. Мы отмечаем, что сатирические сигналы часто находят отражение в определенных пунктах, а не во всем документе. Существующие работы учитывают только характеристики на уровне документа для обнаружения сатиры, которые могут быть ограничены. Мы рассматриваем лингвистические особенности абзацевого уровня, чтобы раскрыть сатиру путем включения нейронной сети и механизма внимания. Мы исследуем разницу между функциями на уровне абзаца и функциями на уровне документа и анализируем их на большом наборе сатирических новостей. Оценка показывает, что предлагаемая модель эффективно обнаруживает сатирические новости и показывает, какие особенности важны на каком уровне.', 'hi': 'व्यंग्यात्मक समाचारों को मनोरंजन माना जाता है, लेकिन यह संभावित रूप से भ्रामक और हानिकारक है। लेख में एम्बेडेड शैली के बावजूद, हर कोई व्यंग्यात्मक संकेतों को पहचान नहीं सकता है और इसलिए खबर को सच्ची खबर के रूप में विश्वास कर सकता है। हम देखते हैं कि व्यंग्यात्मक संकेत अक्सर पूरे दस्तावेज़ के बजाय कुछ पैराग्राफ में परिलक्षित होते हैं। मौजूदा कार्य केवल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए दस्तावेज़-स्तर की सुविधाओं पर विचार करते हैं, जिसे सीमित किया जा सकता है। हम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और ध्यान तंत्र को शामिल करके व्यंग्य का अनावरण करने के लिए पैराग्राफ-स्तरीय भाषाई विशेषताओं पर विचार करते हैं। हम पैराग्राफ-स्तर की सुविधाओं और दस्तावेज़-स्तर की सुविधाओं के बीच के अंतर की जांच करते हैं, और एक बड़े व्यंग्यात्मक समाचार डेटासेट पर उनका विश्लेषण करते हैं। मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल व्यंग्यात्मक समाचारों का प्रभावी ढंग से पता लगाता है और यह बताता है कि किस स्तर पर कौन सी विशेषताएं महत्वपूर्ण हैं।', 'ga': 'Meastar gur siamsaíocht é nuacht aoir, ach d’fhéadfadh sé a bheith mealltach agus díobhálach. In ainneoin an seánra leabaithe san alt, ní féidir le gach duine na leideanna aoir a aithint agus dá bhrí sin creideann siad an nuacht mar nuacht fíor. Tugaimid faoi deara gur minic a léirítear leideanna aoir i míreanna áirithe seachas sa doiciméad iomlán. Ní bhreathnaíonn saothair atá ann faoi láthair ach ar ghnéithe ar leibhéal doiciméad chun an aoir a bhrath, rud a d’fhéadfadh a bheith teoranta. Breathnaímid ar ghnéithe teangeolaíocha ag leibhéal na míre chun an aoir a nochtadh trí ghréasán néaraíoch agus meicníocht aire a ionchorprú. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an difríocht idir gnéithe ar leibhéal ailt agus gnéithe ar leibhéal doiciméad, agus déanaimid anailís orthu ar thacar sonraí mór aoir. Léiríonn an mheastóireacht go n-aimsíonn an tsamhail mholta nuacht aoir go héifeachtach agus go nochtar ann cad iad na gnéithe atá tábhachtach ag an leibhéal.', 'el': 'Τα σατιρικά νέα θεωρούνται ψυχαγωγία, αλλά είναι δυνητικά παραπλανητικά και επιβλαβή. Παρά το ενσωματωμένο είδος στο άρθρο, δεν μπορούν όλοι να αναγνωρίσουν τις σατιρικές ενδείξεις και ως εκ τούτου να πιστέψουν τις ειδήσεις ως αληθινές ειδήσεις. Παρατηρούμε ότι οι σατιρικές ενδείξεις συχνά αντικατοπτρίζονται σε ορισμένες παραγράφους και όχι σε ολόκληρο το έγγραφο. Τα υπάρχοντα έργα λαμβάνουν υπόψη μόνο χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο εγγράφων για να ανιχνεύσουν τη σάτιρα, η οποία θα μπορούσε να περιοριστεί. Εξετάζουμε γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο παραγράφου για να αποκαλύψουμε τη σάτιρα ενσωματώνοντας νευρωνικό δίκτυο και μηχανισμό προσοχής. Ερευνούμε τη διαφορά μεταξύ χαρακτηριστικών σε επίπεδο παραγράφου και χαρακτηριστικών σε επίπεδο εγγράφων και τα αναλύουμε σε ένα μεγάλο σατιρικό σύνολο δεδομένων ειδήσεων. Η αξιολόγηση δείχνει ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ανιχνεύει αποτελεσματικά σατιρικές ειδήσεις και αποκαλύπτει ποια χαρακτηριστικά είναι σημαντικά σε ποιο επίπεδο.', 'hu': 'A szatirikus híreket szórakoztatónak tekintik, de potenciálisan megtévesztő és káros. A cikkben található beágyazott műfaj ellenére nem mindenki ismeri fel a szatirikus jeleket, és ezért hiszi a híreket igaz hírként. Megfigyeljük, hogy a szatirikus utalások gyakran tükröződnek bizonyos bekezdésekben, nem pedig az egész dokumentumban. A meglévő művek csak dokumentumszintű funkciókat vesznek figyelembe a szatíra felismerésére, amelyek korlátozhatóak. A bekezdésszintű nyelvi tulajdonságokat úgy tekintjük, hogy felfedjük a szatírát neurális hálózat és figyelem mechanizmus beépítésével. Vizsgáljuk a bekezdésszintű funkciók és a dokumentumszintű funkciók közötti különbséget, és egy nagy szatirikus híradatkészleten elemezzük őket. Az értékelés azt mutatja, hogy a javasolt modell hatékonyan felismeri a szatirikus híreket, és feltárja, hogy mely szinten milyen jellemzők fontosak.', 'ka': 'ჟართპთფვჟკთ ნჲგთნთ ჟვ ჟვმნწრ ჱა თნრვპვნრთპაუთწ, ნჲ რჲგა ვ ოჲრთნუთჲნალნჲ თჱკაპარვლნჲ თ სზაჟნჲ. არც ყველას შეიძლება სატარიფური სიტყვების შეცდომა და ამიტომ გაგწეროთ ახალგაზრულებს როგორც მართლა ახალგაზრულება. ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ სატატიური სიმბოლოები ზოგიერთი პარაგრაფიებში უფრო მეტი დოკუმენტის გარეშე. მხოლოდ მხოლოდ დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც შესაძლებელია დასაზღვრება. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ პერაპარაგიური ენგურისტიკური ფუნქციები, რომელიც სატირეს გახსნა, ნეიროლური ქსელის და ინტერნეციური მექანსის შეყვარებით. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებას პარაგრამის დოკუმენტის განსხვავებას და დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის განსხვავებას და გავაანალიზებთ მათ დიდი სატარიური ნუ გავამუშავება, რომ მოდელის მოდელის შესაძლებელად სატარიკური ნუზები აღმოჩნდება და აღმოჩნდება რა მნიშვნელობები გასანიშვნელოვანია რომელიც დონეში', 'it': "Le notizie satiriche sono considerate intrattenimento, ma sono potenzialmente ingannevoli e dannose. Nonostante il genere incorporato nell'articolo, non tutti possono riconoscere gli spunti satirici e quindi credere alla notizia come vera notizia. Osserviamo che gli spunti satirici si riflettono spesso in alcuni paragrafi piuttosto che nell'intero documento. Le opere esistenti considerano solo caratteristiche a livello di documento per rilevare la satira, che potrebbe essere limitata. Consideriamo caratteristiche linguistiche a livello di paragrafo per svelare la satira incorporando rete neurale e meccanismo di attenzione. Investighiamo la differenza tra le caratteristiche a livello di paragrafo e quelle a livello di documento e le analizziamo su un ampio set di dati satirici. La valutazione dimostra che il modello proposto rileva efficacemente le notizie satiriche e rivela quali caratteristiche sono importanti a quale livello.", 'lt': 'Satirical news is considered to be entertainment, but it is potentially deceptive and harmful.  Nepaisant į straipsnį įtraukto genre, ne visi gali atpažinti satirinius ženklus ir todėl tikėti naujienomis kaip tikromis naujienomis. Pastebėjome, kad satiriniai ženklai dažnai atsispindi tam tikrose dalyse, o ne visame dokumente. Esamuose darbuose aptariamos tik dokumentų lygmens savybės, skirtos nustatyti satyrą, kuris gali būti ribotas. Mes manome, kad šio straipsnio lygio kalbinės savybės atskleidžia satyrą įtraukdami nervų tinklą ir dėmesio mechanizmą. Mes tiriame skirtumą tarp punktų ir dokumentų lygmens savybių ir juos analizuojame didelėje satiriškoje žinių rinkinyje. Vertinimas rodo, kad siūlomas modelis veiksmingai atskleidžia satirines žinias ir atskleidžia, kokie požymiai yra svarbūs, kokiu lygiu.', 'mk': 'Сатиричните вести се сметаат за забава, но потенцијално се измамни и штетни. И покрај вградениот генер во статијата, не сите можат да ги препознаат сатиричните знаци и затоа да веруваат во вестите како вистински вести. Ние забележуваме дека сатиричните знаци честопати се рефлектирани во одредени параграфии наместо во целиот документ. Постојаните дела ги сметаат само карактеристиките на ниво на документи за детектирање на сатирот, кој може да биде ограничен. Размислуваме дека јазичните карактеристики на ниво на параграф ќе го откријат сатирот со вклучување на нервната мрежа и механизмот на внимание. Ја истражуваме разликата помеѓу карактеристиките на нивото на параграф и карактеристиките на нивото на документ, и ги анализираме на голем сатиричен податок. Оваа оценка покажува дека предложениот модел ефикасно открива сатирични вести и открива кои карактеристики се важни на кое ниво.', 'ml': 'സാറിറിക്കല്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d വിനോദമാണെന്ന് വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ അത് വഞ്ചിക്കുന്നവനും വിപത്തുമാണ്. പ്രഖ്യാനത്തിലെ അകത്തുള്ള ജന്തുക്കള്\u200d എങ്കിലും എല്ലാവര്\u200dക്കും വിചാരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല, അതുകൊണ്ട് വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d സത് എല്ലാ രേഖയെക്കാളും പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് പകരം കുറച്ചു പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള രേഖ-നില വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുവാന്\u200d മാത്രമേ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കും ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ മെനിസ്റ്റമും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പാര്\u200dട്ടാഫ് നില ഭ പാര്\u200dപ്പഫ് നില വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും രേഖ-നില വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും, ഒരു വലിയ വ ഈ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d സാധാരണമായ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതാണെന്നും, ഏത', 'mt': 'L-aħbarijiet satiriċi huma kkunsidrati bħala divertiment, iżda huma potenzjalment qarrieqa u ta’ ħsara. Minkejja l-ġeneru inkorporat fl-artikolu, mhux kulħadd jista’ jirrikonoxxi l-indikazzjonijiet satiriċi u għalhekk jemmen li l-aħbarijiet huma aħbarijiet veri. Aħna nużaw li l-indikazzjonijiet satiriċi spiss jiġu riflessi f’ċerti paragrafi aktar milli fid-dokument kollu. Ix-xogħlijiet eżistenti jikkunsidraw biss karatteristiċi fil-livell tad-dokument biex jinstabu s-satir, li jistgħu jkunu limitati. Aħna nqisu karatteristiċi lingwistiċi fil-livell tal-paragrafu biex niżvelaw is-satire billi ninkorporaw netwerk newrali u mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni. We investigate the difference between paragraph-level features and document-level features, and analyze them on a large satirical news dataset.  L-evalwazzjoni turi li l-mudell propost jiskopri b’mod effettiv l-aħbarijiet satiriċi u jiżvela liema karatteristiċi huma importanti f’liema livell.', 'ms': 'Berita satirik dianggap sebagai hiburan, tetapi ia berpotensi menipu dan berbahaya. Despite the embedded genre in the article, not everyone can recognize the satirical cues and therefore believe the news as true news.  Kami memperhatikan bahawa tanda-tanda satirik sering dicerminkan dalam beberapa paragraf daripada seluruh dokumen. Kerja yang wujud hanya mempertimbangkan ciri-ciri aras dokumen untuk mengesan satire, yang boleh dibatasi. Kami mempertimbangkan ciri-ciri bahasa aras-paragraf untuk membuka satire dengan memasukkan rangkaian saraf dan mekanisme perhatian. Kami menyelidiki perbezaan antara ciri-ciri aras paragraf dan ciri-ciri aras dokumen, dan menganalisisnya pada set data berita satirik yang besar. Evaluasi menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan mengesan berita satirik secara efektif dan mengungkapkan apa ciri-ciri yang penting pada tahap mana.', 'pl': 'Satyryczne wiadomości są uważane za rozrywkę, ale potencjalnie są zwodnicze i szkodliwe. Pomimo gatunku osadzonego w artykule, nie każdy może rozpoznać satyryczne wskazówki i dlatego wierzyć w wiadomości jako prawdziwą wiadomość. Zauważamy, że sygnały satyryczne są często odzwierciedlone w pewnych akapitach, a nie w całym dokumencie. Istniejące prace uwzględniają jedynie funkcje na poziomie dokumentu w celu wykrycia satyry, które mogą być ograniczone. Rozważamy cechy językowe na poziomie akapitów, aby odsłonić satyrę poprzez włączenie sieci neuronowej i mechanizmu uwagi. Badamy różnicę między funkcjami na poziomie akapitów a funkcjami na poziomie dokumentów i analizujemy je na dużym zestawie satyrycznych wiadomości. Ocena pokazuje, że proponowany model skutecznie wykrywa wiadomości satyryczne i ujawnia, jakie cechy są ważne na jakim poziomie.', 'mn': 'Сандрын мэдээ хөгжилтэй гэж үздэг. Гэхдээ энэ магадгүй хуурамч, хохиромжтой. Бүх хүн бүр шүлэг тэмдэглэгчийг таньж чадахгүй. Тиймээс мэдээг үнэн мэдээ гэж итгэдэг. Бид бүх баримтуудын оронд зурагтай тэмдэгт ихэвчлэн зарим хэсгүүдэд харагдаж байгааг анзаарлаа. Бас оршиж байгаа ажиллууд зөвхөн баримтуудын түвшинд хязгаарлагдмал сайтыг олж мэдэх боломжтой байдаг. Бид хэлний хэлний хэмжээний төвшинд мэдрэлийн сүлжээ болон анхаарлын механизмийг бүрдүүлэхээр зорилгодог хэлбэрийн тухай боддог. Бид хэлбэрийн түвшин болон баримтын түвшин харилцааны ялгааг судалж, тэднийг маш том зурагтай мэдээллийн хэлбэрээр шинжилгээ хийдэг. Энэ шалгалт нь санал өгсөн загвар нь зурагтай мэдээг эффективно олж, ямар түвшинд чухал боломжтой зүйлсийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Știrile satirice sunt considerate a fi divertisment, dar sunt potențial înșelătoare și dăunătoare. În ciuda genului încorporat în articol, nu toată lumea poate recunoaște indiciile satirice și, prin urmare, crede știrile ca știri adevărate. Observăm că indiciile satirice sunt adesea reflectate în anumite paragrafe mai degrabă decât în întregul document. Lucrările existente iau în considerare doar caracteristicile la nivel de document pentru a detecta satira, care ar putea fi limitată. Considerăm caracteristici lingvistice la nivel de paragraf pentru a dezvălui satira prin încorporarea rețelei neurale și mecanismului de atenție. Investigăm diferența dintre caracteristicile la nivel de paragraf și caracteristicile la nivel de document și le analizăm pe un set mare de date satirice de știri. Evaluarea arată că modelul propus detectează eficient știrile satirice și dezvăluie ce caracteristici sunt importante la ce nivel.', 'sr': 'Satiričke vesti smatraju zabavom, ali je potencijalno prevarantno i štetno. Uprkos ugrađenom genru u članku, ne mogu svi prepoznati satirske znakove i zato vjeruju vesti kao prave vesti. Primećujemo da su satirske znakove često odražene u određenim odstavcima umjesto cijelog dokumenta. Postojeći radovi smatraju samo karakteristikama na nivou dokumenta da bi otkrili satir, koji bi mogao biti ograničen. Smatramo jezičke karakteristike na nivou paragrafa da otkrijemo satir uključujući neuralnu mrežu i mehanizam pažnje. Istražujemo razliku između karakteristika na nivou paragrafa i karakteristika na nivou dokumenta i analiziramo ih na velikoj satričnoj novosti. Procjenjivanje pokazuje da predloženi model efektivno otkriva satirske vijesti i pokazuje kakve su karakteristike važne na kojem nivou.', 'kk': 'Сатирикалық жаңалықтар көңіл деп ойлайды, бірақ бұл мүмкіндік көңіл және қарсы. Мақаланың ендірілген жанрына қарамастан, әрбір сатитикалық белгілерді тануға болмайды, сондықтан жаңалықтарды шын жаңалықтар ретінде сене алады. Біз сатириялық белгілер барлық құжаттың орнына кейбір бөлшектерінде көрсетіледі. Бар жұмыстар тек құжаттың деңгейіндегі сатрын анықтау үшін ғана шектеу мүмкін болады. Біз параграф деңгейіндегі лингвистикалық қасиеттерді невралдық желі мен назарды механизмін қосу үшін сатиру мүмкіндігін қалаймыз. Абзац деңгейінің қасиеттері мен құжат деңгейінің қасиеттері арасындағы айырмашылығын зерттеп, оларды үлкен сатирикалық жаңалық деректер жиынында анализ. Бұл бағалау үлгісі сатирикалық жаңалықтарды ең жақсы анықтайды және қай деңгейде маңызды мүмкіндіктерді көрсетеді.', 'si': 'සැටිරිකාලික ආරංචියක් හිතන්නේ විනෝදය කියලා, ඒත් ඒක සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් විනෝදය සහ අනතුර ලේඛයේ ඇතුළත් ජේන්ටර් එක්ක, හැමෝම සැසිරිකාව අඳුරන්න බෑ ඒ වගේම ආරංචියක් ඇත්ත ආරංචියක් විශ් අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ විස්තරයෙන් සිද්ධ විස්තරයෙන් සිද්ධ විස්තරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකෘ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් වැඩ කරන්නේ විතරයි ලිපින්ත- ලේවල් විශේෂතාවක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න, ඒක සීමාවිත වෙ අපි පැරැග්රාෆ් ලේවල් භාෂාවික අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් හිතන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය සහ අවධාන පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ පැරැග්රාෆ්-ලේවල් අවශ්\u200dයය සහ ලේඛන-ලේවල් අවශ්\u200dයය අතර, ඒවා ලොකු සැටිරික් වාර්තාව පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විසිද්ධ වාර්තාව', 'so': 'Wararka martiqaadka waxaa looga tiriyaa inuu noqdo burbur, laakiin waxay u macquul tahay khiyaano iyo waxyeello. Inta kastoo uu qoraalka ku jiro, qof waluba ma aqoonsan karo cudurada jimicsiga, sababtaas darteed injiilku waxay u aaminsan karaan warka runta ah. Waxaynu fiirinaynaa in cudurada jimicsiyada inta badan lagu soo bandhigi karo qeybo cayiman oo ka bedelan dukumentiga oo dhan. Shuqullada joogtada oo keliya waxay ka fikiraan aqoonta heerka dukumentiga, taas oo aan xadeyn karin. Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa qeybaha luuqadda ku qoran darafka, si aan u furno qalabka, si aan u soo saarno shabakadda neurada iyo habaarka. Waxaynu baaraynaa kala duwanaanshaha heerka saxda iyo heerka dukumentiga, waxaana ku baaraynaa sawir aad u weyn oo macluumaad ku saabsan. Qiimeyntu wuxuu muuqanayaa in muusikada la soo jeeday uu si faa’iido leh u ogaado warar jimicsi ah, wuxuuna muujiyaa heerka ay muhiim u yihiin.', 'sv': 'Satiriska nyheter anses vara underhållning, men det är potentiellt vilseledande och skadligt. Trots den inbäddade genren i artikeln kan inte alla känna igen de satiriska ledtrådarna och därför tro nyheterna som sanna nyheter. Vi konstaterar att satiriska signaler ofta återspeglas i vissa punkter snarare än i hela dokumentet. Befintliga verk tar endast hänsyn till funktioner på dokumentnivå för att upptäcka satiren, vilket skulle kunna begränsas. Vi anser att språkliga funktioner på paragrafnivå avslöjar satiren genom att införliva neurala nätverk och uppmärksamhetsmekanism. Vi undersöker skillnaden mellan funktioner på paragrafnivå och funktioner på dokumentnivå och analyserar dem på ett stort satiriskt nyhetsdataset. Utvärderingen visar att den föreslagna modellen effektivt upptäcker satiriska nyheter och avslöjar vilka funktioner som är viktiga på vilken nivå.', 'ta': 'செய்திகள் வியாபாரத்தை என கருதப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் அது சாத்தியமாக ஏமாற்றல் மற்றும் தீங்கும். கட்டுரையில் உள்ளடக்கப்பட்ட மரனம் என்றாலும், அனைவரும் விளையாட்டு கூட்டத்தை அறிய முடியாது எனவே உண்மையான செய்திகளை நம் நாம் பார்க்க வேண்டும் என்று பார்க்கிறோம் முழு ஆவணத்தை விட பிரதிபலிக்கப்படும் சில பதிப்புகளில். தற்போதைய செயல்கள் மட்டும் ஆவண- மட்டத்தின் குணங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க மட்டுமே கருது நாம் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மற்றும் கவனம் முறைமையை சேர்த்து மூலம் திறக்க வேண்டும் பத்தியின் நிலையில் மொழிமாற்று  நாம் எழுத்து மட்டத்தின் குணங்கள் மற்றும் ஆவண- மட்டத்தின் குணங்களுக்கிடையே வேறுபாட்டை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம், பெரிய வே இந்த மதிப்பீடு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி விளையாட்டு செய்திகளை வெளிப்படுத்தும் எந்த', 'no': 'Satiriske nyhetar vert anslått som entertainment, men det er potensielt forbedra og skadelig. Til tross av den innebygde genre i artikkelen kan ikkje alle gjenkjenne satriske teikn og derfor tror nyhetane som sanne nyhetar. Vi observerer at satiske teikn ofte er reflektert i enkelte avsnitt i staden for heile dokumentet. Dei eksisterande arbeida ser berre på dokumentnivåfunksjonar for å finna satiret, som kan vera begrenset. Vi ser på språk-nivå på paragrafske språk for å opna satiret ved å inkludere neuralnettverk og oppmerksmekanisme. Vi undersøker forskjellen mellom avsnittnivåfunksjonar og dokumentnivåfunksjonar, og analyserer dei på ein stor satriske nyhetsinnstilling. Evalueringa viser at den foreslåde modellen oppdager satiske nyhetar effektivt og avgjer kva funksjonar er viktig på kva nivå.', 'ur': 'اچھی خبریں مذاق سمجھی جاتی ہیں، لیکن یہ ممکن ہے کہ دھوکہ دینے والا اور نقصان اٹھانے والا ہے اگرچہ مقالہ میں داخل ہونے والی جنر کے ساتھ، ہر شخص کو ہنسی نشانیاں پہچان نہیں سکتا، سو یہ خبر سچی خبر ہے ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ مصیبت کی نشانیاں بہت سی دفعہ کے بغیر ایک دفعہ میں تفصیل کی جاتی ہیں۔ موجود عمل صرف دفتر سٹیر کو پہچان سکنے کے لئے دفتر سطح سطح کے فائدے کو سمجھتے ہیں، جو محدود ہو سکتا ہے. ہم پاراگراف-سطح زبان شناسی ویژگی ویژگی سمجھتے ہیں کہ سیٹر کو نائرول نیٹورک اور توجه کی مکانیسم میں شامل کریں۔ ہم پاراگراف-سطح کے متفاوتوں اور دفتر-سطح کے متفاوتوں کے درمیان تفاوت کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور ان کو ایک بڑے سیٹریک اخبار ڈیٹ سٹ میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل مصیبت کے ساتھ مصیبت کی خبریں اثبات کرتا ہے اور کس سطح میں اثبات کیا ہے؟', 'uz': "Satritik хабарлар хушхабар деб ҳисобланади, аммо у мағрурланувчи ва фойдаланувчи ҳисобланади. Despite the embedded genre in the article, not everyone can recognize the satirical cues and therefore believe the news as true news.  Biz ko'rib chiqqatganimizni ko'p qo'llanmalar butun hujjatdan ko'rinishini ko'rinadi. Mavjud vazifalar faqat hujjatning darajasining imkoniyatlarini aniqlash mumkin. Bu amalni cheksiz qilish mumkin. Biz paragraph darajasini o'ylaymiz, neyron tarmoq va taqdim mechanismni o'zgartirish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatish mumkin. Biz paragraf darajasi xossalari va hujjatning darajadagi imkoniyatlarining o'zgarishni qidirib, va ularni katta keksikal xabar maʼlumotlar tarkibida Analyzeriz. Ko'rib chiqarishni koʻrsatish: rivojlanadigan model amalga oshiriladi va xususiyatlarni qayta darajada muhim deb belgilaydi.", 'vi': 'Tin cố định được coi là giải trí, nhưng nó có khả năng lừa dối và có hại. Mặc dù thể loại có sẵn trong bài báo, không phải ai cũng nhận ra được tín hiệu châm biếm và vì vậy tin tin rằng tin tức là tin tức thật. Chúng tôi nhận thấy những câu châm biếm thường xuất hiện trong vài đoạn thay vì toàn bộ tài liệu. Các công trình tồn tại chỉ xem các tính chất công cụ để phát hiện độ châm, có thể hạn chế. Chúng tôi xem xét các yếu tố ngôn ngữ cấp đoạn để tiết lộ mỉa mai bằng việc nhập vào mạng thần kinh và cơ chế tập trung. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu sự khác nhau giữa các tính năng cấp đoạn và các tính năng cấp tài liệu, và phân tích chúng trên một bộ dữ liệu tin tức mỉa mai lớn. Bản đánh giá này cho thấy mẫu đề xuất phát hiện tin châm biếm có hiệu quả và tiết lộ những tính chất quan trọng ở mức nào.', 'bg': 'Сатиричните новини се считат за забавление, но те са потенциално измамни и вредни. Въпреки вградения жанр в статията, не всеки може да разпознае сатиричните знаци и следователно вярва на новините като истинска новина. Наблюдаваме, че сатиричните знаци често се отразяват в определени параграфи, а не в целия документ. Съществуващите произведения разглеждат само характеристиките на ниво документ, за да откриват сатирата, която може да бъде ограничена. Ние разглеждаме езиковите особености на ниво параграф, за да разкрием сатирата чрез включване на невронна мрежа и механизъм на внимание. Проучваме разликата между функциите на ниво абзац и функциите на ниво документ и ги анализираме на голям сатиричен набор от данни от новини. Оценката показва, че предложеният модел ефективно открива сатирични новини и разкрива какви характеристики са важни на кое ниво.', 'nl': 'Satirisch nieuws wordt beschouwd als entertainment, maar het is mogelijk misleidend en schadelijk. Ondanks het ingebedde genre in het artikel, kan niet iedereen de satirische cues herkennen en daarom het nieuws als waar nieuws geloven. We zien dat satirische aanwijzingen vaak in bepaalde paragrafen worden weerspiegeld in plaats van in het hele document. Bestaande werken beschouwen alleen kenmerken op documentniveau om de satire te detecteren, die beperkt zou kunnen zijn. We beschouwen taalkundige kenmerken op alinea-niveau om de satire te onthullen door neuraal netwerk en aandachtsmechanisme op te nemen. We onderzoeken het verschil tussen features op alinea-niveau en features op documentniveau en analyseren deze op een grote satirische dataset. Uit de evaluatie blijkt dat het voorgestelde model satirisch nieuws effectief detecteert en onthult welke kenmerken op welk niveau belangrijk zijn.', 'da': 'Satiriske nyheder anses for at være underholdning, men det er potentielt vildledende og skadeligt. På trods af den indlejrede genre i artiklen, kan ikke alle genkende de satiriske signaler og derfor tro nyhederne som sande nyheder. Vi bemærker, at satiriske signaler ofte afspejles i visse afsnit snarere end i hele dokumentet. Eksisterende værker tager kun hensyn til dokumentniveau funktioner for at opdage satiren, som kunne være begrænset. Vi betragter paragrafniveau sproglige træk til at afsløre satiren ved at indarbejde neurale netværk og opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Vi undersøger forskellen mellem funktioner på afsnitsniveau og funktioner på dokumentniveau og analyserer dem på et stort satirisk nyhedsdatasyt. Evalueringen viser, at den foreslåede model opdager satiriske nyheder effektivt og afslører, hvilke træk der er vigtige på hvilket niveau.', 'de': 'Satirische Nachrichten gelten als Unterhaltung, sind aber potenziell täuschend und schädlich. Trotz des eingebetteten Genres im Artikel kann nicht jeder die satirischen Hinweise erkennen und daher die Nachrichten als wahre Nachrichten glauben. Wir beobachten, dass sich satirische Hinweise oft eher in bestimmten Absätzen als im gesamten Dokument widerspiegeln. Bestehende Arbeiten berücksichtigen nur Merkmale auf Dokumentenebene, um die Satire zu erkennen, die eingeschränkt sein könnten. Wir betrachten sprachliche Merkmale auf Absatzebene, um die Satire zu enthüllen, indem wir neuronale Netze und Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen integrieren. Wir untersuchen den Unterschied zwischen Merkmalen auf Absatzebene und Merkmalen auf Dokumentenebene und analysieren diese auf einem großen satirischen Nachrichtendatensatz. Die Auswertung zeigt, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell satirische Nachrichten effektiv erkennt und zeigt, welche Merkmale auf welcher Ebene wichtig sind.', 'hr': 'Satirska vijest se smatra zabavom, ali je potencijalno prevarantna i štetna. Uprkos ugrađenom genru u članku, ne mogu svi prepoznati satirske znakove i stoga vjeruju u vijesti kao prave vijesti. Primijetimo da su satirske znakove često odražene u određenim odstavcima umjesto cijelog dokumenta. Postojeći radovi smatraju samo karakteristikama na razini dokumenta kako bi otkrili satir, koji bi mogao biti ograničen. Smatramo jezičke karakteristike na razini paragrafa da otkrijemo satir uključujući neuralnu mrežu i mehanizam pažnje. Istražujemo razliku između karakteristika razine odstavka i karakteristika razine dokumenta i analiziramo ih na velikoj satričnoj vijesti. Procjenjivanje pokazuje da predloženi model učinkovito otkriva satirske vijesti i pokazuje kakve su karakteristike važne na kojoj razini.', 'sw': 'Habari za kusisimua zinachukuliwa kuwa ni burudani, lakini inawezekana ni udanganyifu na madhara. Pamoja na jinsia iliyoandaliwa kwenye makala hiyo, si kila mmoja anaweza kutambua mitazamo ya kejeli na hivyo kuamini habari hizo kama habari za kweli. Tunaona kuwa mikono ya kejeli mara nyingi yanaonekana katika vipengele fulani badala ya nyaraka yote. Kazi zilizopo zinachukulia tu vipengele vya nyaraka ili kutambua chezo, ambacho kinaweza kuwa vizuizi. Tunaona vipengele vya lugha kwa kiwango cha paragraph ili kufungua uchochezi huo kwa kuingiza mitandao ya kijamii na mfumo wa kusikiliza. Tunachunguza tofauti kati ya vipengele vya paragraph na vipengele vya nyaraka, na tunachambua kwenye seti kubwa ya taarifa za kejeli. Tathmini hiyo inaonyesha kuwa modeli ya pendekezo inagundua habari za kejeli kwa ufanisi na inaonyesha vipi hoja muhimu katika ngazi gani.', 'ko': '풍자 뉴스는 오락으로 여겨지지만, 잠재적인 사기성과 위해성을 가지고 있다.비록 이 글은 여러 가지 유형을 포함하고 있지만, 모든 사람이 풍자 암시를 식별할 수 있는 것은 아니기 때문에 이 뉴스가 진실한 뉴스라고 믿는다.우리는 풍자 암시가 종종 문서 전체가 아니라 일부 단락에 반영된다는 것을 알아차렸다.기존 작품은 문서급 특징만 고려해 풍자를 감지하는 데 한계가 있을 수 있다.우리는 신경 네트워크와 주의 메커니즘을 결합시켜 단락 차원의 언어 특징을 고려하여 풍자 작품을 제시한다.우리는 단락급 특징과 문서급 특징 간의 차이를 연구했고 대형 풍자 뉴스 데이터 집합에서 분석했다.평가 결과 이 모델은 풍자 뉴스를 효과적으로 검출하고 어느 차원에서 어떤 특징이 중요한지 보여줄 수 있다.', 'id': 'Satirical news is considered to be entertainment, but it is potentially deceptive and harmful.  Meskipun genre terkandung dalam artikel, tidak semua orang dapat mengenali tanda satiris dan karena itu percaya berita sebagai berita yang sebenarnya. Kami memperhatikan bahwa tanda satiris sering terrefleksi dalam beberapa paragraf daripada seluruh dokumen. Pekerjaan yang ada hanya mempertimbangkan fitur tingkat dokumen untuk mendeteksi satire, yang bisa terbatas. Kami mempertimbangkan fitur bahasa tingkat paragraf untuk mengungkapkan satire dengan memasukkan jaringan saraf dan mekanisme perhatian. Kami menyelidiki perbedaan antara fitur tingkat paragraf dan fitur tingkat dokumen, dan menganalisisnya di dataset berita satiris besar. Evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan mendeteksi berita satiris secara efektif dan mengungkapkan fitur apa yang penting pada tingkat mana.', 'fa': 'اخبار ماهواره\u200cای به عنوان سرگرمی می\u200cشود، ولی احتمالاً فریبکار و آسیبی است. با وجود اینکه نوع پیدا شده در مقاله، هرکس نمی\u200cتواند نشانه\u200cهای مذاکری را شناسایی کند و بنابراین اخبار را به عنوان اخبار حقیقی باور دارد. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که نشانه\u200cهای مذاکره اغلب در بخش\u200cهای خاص به جای کل سند تفکیر می\u200cشوند. کارهای موجود تنها ویژه\u200cهای سطح سند را برای شناسایی سطح محدود می\u200cکند. ما ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی پاراگراف\u200cسطح را به نظر می\u200cگیریم که با توجه به شبکه\u200cهای عصبی و مکانیسم توجه آن را آشکار کنند. ما تفاوت بین ویژه\u200cهای سطح پاراگراف و ویژه\u200cهای سطح سند را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم و آنها را در یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مذاکره\u200cای بزرگ تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. این ارزیابی نشان می دهد که مدل پیشنهاد اخبار مذاکری را به طور موثر شناسایی می کند و نشان می دهد که چه ویژه های مهم در کدام سطح است.', 'sq': 'Lajmi satirik konsiderohet si argëtim, por është potencialisht mashtrues dhe dëmtues. Megjithë gjenerin e përfshirë në artikull, jo të gjithë mund të njohin shenjat satirike dhe prandaj të besojnë lajmet si lajme të vërteta. Ne vëzhgojmë se shenjat satirike shpesh pasqyrohen në disa paragrafa në vend të të gjithë dokumentit. Punët ekzistuese konsiderojnë vetëm karakteristika të nivelit të dokumentit për të zbuluar satirin, i cili mund të jetë i kufizuar. Ne konsiderojmë karakteristika gjuhësore në nivelin e paragrafit për të zbuluar satirin duke përfshirë rrjetin nervor dhe mekanizmin e vëmendjes. Ne hetojmë dallimin midis karakteristikave të nivelit të paragrafit dhe karakteristikave të nivelit të dokumentit, dhe i analizojmë ato në një set të madh të të dhënave satirike të lajmeve. Vlerësimi tregon se modeli i propozuar zbulon lajmet satirike efektivisht dhe zbulon se cilat karakteristika janë të rëndësishme në cilin nivel.', 'am': 'የሳታሪክ ዜና መብል ሆኖ ይመስላል፥ ነገር ግን የሚያታልልና የሚያስጨንቅ ነው። Despite the embedded genre in the article, not everyone can recognize the satirical cues and therefore believe the news as true news.  ሰነዱን ሁሉ ይልቅ በብዛት የሚቆጠሩ አካባቢዎች ላይ እንደሆነ እናየዋለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ሥራ የሚቀጥለውን የሰነድ ደረጃን ማግኘት ብቻ ምረጡ፤ ይህም የተደረገውን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ የኔውራዊ መረብ እና የጥያቄን አካባቢ በመጠቀም የቋንቋዊ ቋንቋ ግንኙነትን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በጽሑፍ ደረጃዎች እና የሰነድ ደረጃዎች መካከል የልዩነትን እናሳይቃቸዋለን እናሳውቃቸዋለን፡፡ ማስታወቂያውም የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በሥርዓት የሚያስፈልገውን የጣዖት ዜና የሚያሳውቃትን እና በምን ደረጃ ላይ የሚያስፈልገውን ግንኙነት የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Սատրիկական նորությունը համարվում է զվարճալի, բայց այն պոտենցիալ խաբեցնող է և վնասավոր: Չնայած հոդվածի ներգրավված գենդերին, ոչ բոլորը կարող են ճանաչել սաթիրիկական նշանները և դրա համար հավատալ նորություններին որպես ճշմարիտ նորություն: Մենք նկատում ենք, որ սաթիրիկական նշանները հաճախ արտացոլվում են որոշ պարբերակներում, ոչ թե ամբողջ փաստաթղթի մեջ: Existing works only consider document-level features to detect the satire, which could be limited.  Մենք կարծում ենք, որ պարբերակի մակարդակի լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունները բացահայտելու համար, ներառելով նյարդային ցանց և ուշադրության մեխանիզմ: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք պարբերակի մակարդակի և փաստաթղթի մակարդակի առանձնահատկությունների տարբերությունը և վերլուծում ենք դրանք մեծ սաթիրիկ նորությունների տվյալների համակարգում: Ագնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը արդյունավետ հայտնաբերում է սաթիրիկ նորությունները և բացահայտում է, թե ինչ հատկություններ են կարևոր որպիսի մակարդակում:', 'tr': 'Iňki baglaýyşlar eğlenceli diýip pikir edilýär, ýöne olar kynçylykly we näsazlydyr. Maksadyň içindeki ýançysy gaýratyn hemme kişi satik cuentany tanap bilmeýär we şonuň üçin täzelikleri dogry ýaly ynanýar. Biz soňky sanatlar tüm senediň ýerine belli paragraflarda köplenç garalýandygyny gözleýäris. Öň bar işleri diňe sened-derejesi sahypany aňlamak üçin sened-derejesi çaplar. Biz paragraf derejesi lingwistiki düzümlerini näyral şebek we üns meýdançasyny dahil etmek üçin satiri açmak üçin pikir edýäris. Biz paragraf derejesi we sened derejesi hatlarynyň arasyndaky farklygyny çykarýarys we olaryň uly sattik bagytlaryň düzümlerini çözürýäris. Ýardamçylyk şu teklip eden nusgaliniň satylyk täsirini ýüze tanyýandygyny we nähili möhüm derejede tanyýandygyny görkezýär.', 'bn': 'স্যাটিরিকেল সংবাদ বিনোদন হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হয়, কিন্তু এটা সম্ভবত প্রতারণা এবং ক্ষতিকর। প্রবন্ধের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন লিঙ্গ সত্ত্বেও, সবাই বিদ্রোহী কিউকে চিনতে পারে না এবং তাই এই সংবাদ সত্যিকারের সংবাদ হি আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে পুরো নথির চেয়ে বিদ্রুপ প্রতিক্রিয়ায় বিদ্রূপ কিউজ প্রতিফলিত হয়। বর্তমান কাজ শুধুমাত্র নথি-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য সনাক্ত করতে বিবেচনা করুন, যা সীমিত হতে পারে। নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং মনোযোগ ব্যবস্থার মধ্যে যোগ দিয়ে আমরা প্যারাফ-স্তরের ভাষার বিষয়বস্তু বিবেচনা করি। আমরা প্যারাফ-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং নথি স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে পার্থক্য তদন্ত করি এবং বিশাল বিদ্রূপ সংবাদ তথ্য সংক এই বিষয়টি দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল কার্যকর সংবাদ পাওয়া যাচ্ছে এবং তা প্রকাশ করে যে কোন স্তরে কি বিষয়টি গুরুত', 'af': "Satiriese nuus is aangesien as entertainment, maar dit is potensieel verleiding en skandelik. Terwyl die ingesluitde genre in die artikel, kan nie almal die satirike tekens herken en daarom glo die nuus as waar nuus. Ons bewaar dat satirike tekens dikwels in sekere paragraaf reflekteer word eerder as die hele dokument. Bestaande werke word slegs beskou dokument- vlak funksies om die satier te ontdek, wat kon beperk word. Ons beskou paragraafvlak lingwisiese eienskappe om die sateer te ontdek deur neuralnetwerk en aandag mekanisme te inkorporeer. Ons ondersoek die verskil tussen paragraafvlak eienskappe en dokumentvlak eienskappe en analyseer hulle op 'n groot satirike nuuskoppel. Die evaluasie wys dat die voorgestelde model satirike nuus effektief beskry en vertel wat funksies belangrik is op watter vlak.", 'az': 'Satirik xəbərləri əyləncə kimi hesab edilir, amma bu mümkün olaraq iftiralı və zərərlidir. Mətnədəki içərisində yazılmış genr olmasına rağmen, hər kəs satıcı nişanları tanıyamaz və buna görə də bu xəbəri haqq xəbər olaraq inanır. Biz gördük ki, satıcı işarələr bütün məsələnin yerinə bəzi paragraflarda çox sıxıntılanır. Əvvəlki işlər yalnız döküm səviyyəsi xüsusiyyətlərini təşkil etmək üçün səviyyəsini təşkil edirlər, ki bu səviyyəsi müəyyən edilə bilər. Biz paragraflı səviyyə dil özelliklərini nöral ağ və dikkat mehanizmisini birləşdirərək satiri açıq etmək üçün düşünürük. Paragraf səviyyəsi və səviyyəsi xüsusiyyətlərin arasındakı fərqliyi araşdırırıq və onları böyük satrikli xəbər veri qutusunda analiz edirik. Bu değerlendirmə göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş modellərin satrikli xəbərləri etkili olaraq tanıyır və hansı səviyyədə möhüm olan xüsusiyyətlərin nə olduğunu göstərir.', 'ca': "Satirical news is considered to be entertainment, but it is potentially deceptive and harmful.  Malgrat el gènere incorporat en l'article, no tothom pot reconèixer les indicacions satèriques i, per tant, creure que les not ícies són notícies veritables. Observem que les indicacions satèriques sovint es reflecteixen en alguns paràgrafs en comptes de tot el document. Les obres existents només consideran característiques de nivell documental per detectar el satèr, que podria ser limitat. Considerem característiques lingüístiques a nivell de paràgrafs per descobrir el satí incorporant la xarxa neural i el mecanisme d'atenció. Investiguem la diferència entre les característiques del nivell de paràgrafs i els de documents, i les analitzem en un gran conjunt de dades satèriques de notícies. L'avaluació mostra que el model proposat detecta efectivament les notícies satèriques i revela quines característiques són importants a quin nivell.", 'cs': 'Satirické zprávy jsou považovány za zábavu, ale potenciálně jsou klamavé a škodlivé. Navzdory vloženému žánru v článku, ne každý může rozpoznat satirické náznaky, a proto věřit zprávám jako pravdivé zprávy. Pozorujeme, že satirické náznaky se často odrážejí v určitých odstavcích spíše než v celém dokumentu. Stávající práce zvažují pouze vlastnosti na úrovni dokumentu k detekci satiry, která by mohla být omezena. Zvažujeme jazykové rysy na úrovni odstavců k odhalení satiry začleněním neuronové sítě a mechanismu pozornosti. Zkoumáme rozdíl mezi funkcemi na úrovni odstavců a funkcemi na úrovni dokumentů a analyzujeme je na velkém satirickém datovém souboru zpráv. Vyhodnocení ukazuje, že navržený model efektivně detekuje satirické zprávy a odhaluje, jaké rysy jsou na jaké úrovni důležité.', 'fi': 'Satiirisia uutisia pidetään viihteenä, mutta ne ovat mahdollisesti petollisia ja haitallisia. Huolimatta artikkelin upotetusta genrestä kaikki eivät voi tunnistaa satiirisia vihjeitä ja siksi uskoa uutiset oikeiksi uutisiksi. Havaitsemme, että satiiriset vihjeet näkyvät usein tietyissä kohdissa eikä koko asiakirjassa. Olemassa olevissa teoksissa satiirin havaitsemiseksi otetaan huomioon vain asiakirjatason ominaisuudet, joita voidaan rajoittaa. Käsittelemme kappaletason kielellisiä piirteitä satiirin paljastamiseksi yhdistämällä hermoverkon ja huomiomekanismin. Tutkimme kappaletason ominaisuuksien ja dokumenttitason ominaisuuksien eroa ja analysoimme niitä suuressa satiirisessa uutisaineistossa. Arviointi osoittaa, että ehdotettu malli tunnistaa satiiriset uutiset tehokkaasti ja paljastaa, mitkä ominaisuudet ovat tärkeitä millä tasolla.', 'et': 'Satiirilisi uudiseid peetakse meelelahutuseks, kuid see on potentsiaalselt petlik ja kahjulik. Vaatamata artiklis sisalduvale žanrile ei suuda kõik satiirilisi vihjeid ära tunda ja seetõttu uskuda uudiseid kui tõelisi uudiseid. Me märgime, et satiirilised vihjed kajastuvad sageli pigem teatud lõigetes kui kogu dokumendis. Olemasolevates teostes võetakse satiiri tuvastamiseks arvesse ainult dokumenditasandi omadusi, mida võib piirata. Me kaalume paragrahvi tasemel keelelisi tunnuseid satiiri paljastamiseks närvivõrgu ja tähelepanumehhanismi kaasamisega. Uurime lõigutaseme funktsioonide ja dokumenditaseme funktsioonide erinevust ning analüüsime neid suures satiirilises uudiste andmekogumis. Hindamine näitab, et kavandatud mudel tuvastab satiirilised uudised tõhusalt ja paljastab, millised omadused on olulised millisel tasandil.', 'bs': 'Satirska vijest se smatra zabavom, ali je potencijalno prevarantna i štetna. Uprkos ugrađenom genru u članku, ne mogu svi prepoznati satirske znakove i zato vjeruju u vijesti kao prave vijesti. Primijetimo da su satirske znakove često odražene u određenim odstavcima umjesto cijelog dokumenta. Postojeći radovi smatraju samo karakteristikama na nivou dokumenta da bi otkrili satir, koji bi mogao biti ograničen. Smatramo jezičke karakteristike na nivou paragrafa da otkrijemo satir uključujući neuralnu mrežu i mehanizam pažnje. Istražujemo razliku između karakteristika na nivou paragrafa i karakteristika na nivou dokumenta i analiziramo ih na velikoj satričnoj vijesti. Procjenjivanje pokazuje da predloženi model efektivno otkriva satirske vijesti i pokazuje kakve su karakteristike važne na kojoj nivou.', 'sk': 'Satirične novice veljajo za zabavo, vendar so potencialno zavajajoče in škodljive. Kljub vgrajenemu žanru v članku ne morejo vsi prepoznati satiričnih namigov in zato novice verjeti kot resnične novice. Opazujemo, da se satirični namigi pogosto odražajo v nekaterih odstavkih in ne v celotnem dokumentu. Obstoječa dela upoštevajo le značilnosti na ravni dokumenta za odkrivanje satire, ki bi jih lahko omejili. Upoštevamo jezikovne značilnosti na ravni odstavka, da razkrijemo satiro z vključitvijo nevronskega omrežja in mehanizma pozornosti. Raziskujemo razliko med funkcijami na ravni odstavka in funkcijami na ravni dokumenta ter jih analiziramo na velikem satiričnem naboru novic. Ocena kaže, da predlagani model učinkovito zaznava satirične novice in razkriva, katere značilnosti so pomembne na kateri ravni.', 'he': 'חדשות סאטיריות נחשבות כמו בידור, אבל הן פוטנציאליות רמאיות וממזיקות. Despite the embedded genre in the article, not everyone can recognize the satirical cues and therefore believe the news as true news.  We observe that satirical cues are often reflected in certain paragraphs rather than the whole document.  עבודות קיימות שוקלות רק תכונות רמת מסמכים כדי לגלות את הסאטיר, שיכול להיות מוגבל. אנחנו שוקלים תכונות שפתיות ברמה של פראגמה כדי לחשוף את הסטייר על ידי שילוב רשת עצבית ומנגנון תשומת לב. אנו חוקרים את ההבדל בין תכונות רמת הפרפס ולתכונות רמת המסמכים, ונבחן אותם על קבוצת נתונים סאטירית גדולה. הערכה מראה שהמודל המוצע מגלה חדשות סאטיריות באופן יעיל ומגלה אילו תכונות חשובות ברמה.', 'ha': "Ana gane cewa ni'anar bushãra ne, amma wannan yana da wata yaudara da wata cũtarwa. Bayyai da aka shigar da genre a cikin makala, ba kõwa iya iya gane cucuyen da aka yi na bushãra ba, kuma don haka sai ka yi ĩmãni da lãbãrin da gaskiyar. Muna ganin cewa an yi musamman da takarda ko da yawa a yi karatun cikin rubutun fulani ko kuwa dukkan takardar. Yi ƙididdige aikin da ke kai yanzu kawai game da tsarin-leveli na takardar-daraja dõmin a gane salon, wanda za'a iya ƙayyade. Tuna bincike masu tsari na lugha-daraja na rubutu da za'a buɗe filin da za'a shigar da shi a cikin zanen neural da muhimmanci. Munã jãyayya a tsakanin haske-daraja na rubutun da tsari-daraja, kuma Muke anaƙayyade su a kan zanen bayani mai girma. Ana ƙaddara yana nuna cewa misalin da aka buƙata yana gano lãbãri na bushãra mai amfani da shi kuma yana bayyana abin da tayari suke da muhimu a wace daraja.", 'jv': 'Nalika hukum sing dikarepaké diolah kanggo mbasa, nanguwis metiné kabèh lan kelamèh. Nanging kabèh sing entuk ingkang dipunangé nang artik, ora sabèh sing bisa ngomong nik akeh basa satêr lan kayané luwih apik dhéwé lan kebebasané wartané sing berarti. Awak dhéwé ngerti, akeh dadi sakjane neng dadi neng dadi paragraph kuwi bisa langgar nggawe dokumen sing gak. structural navigation Awak dhéwé isih perusahaan langgambar luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilanggar aturan tapi tambah lan nganggo perusahaan seneng nggawe gerakan. Anyone Wanggalih wong-wong kuwi model sing supoyo nggawe akeh basa satêr-wong lan mbukakipo alam sing dikarepaké sing dikarepaké ning titik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཁོང་གི་བརྡ་དོན་ཞིག་ནི་འཚོ་སྐྱོང་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེན་ཡུལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་དང་ ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་དོན་རྐྱེན་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་མི་ཚང་མས་འདུག་གིས་satirical cues ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཚང་མས་བཟོ་མའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་ལ་སྣང་བ་མངོན་ཡོད་པ་ལས་མངོན་འཆར་ཡོད། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཚོད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁོ་ན་འཆར་བཤེར་བྱེད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་རྣམས་ཁོ་ན་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པ ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན་ལག་སྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་བྱས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Fine Grained Citation Span for References in Wikipedia', 'ar': 'فترة الاقتباس ذات الحبيبات الدقيقة للمراجع في ويكيبيديا', 'es': 'Intervalo de citas detallado para referencias en Wikipedia', 'pt': 'Período de citação refinado para referências na Wikipedia', 'fr': 'Portée de citation fine pour les références dans Wikipédia', 'ja': 'Wikipediaでの参照のための細かい引用スパン', 'zh': '维基百科中参考文献细粒度引限', 'hi': 'विकिपीडिया में सन्दर्भों के लिए ठीक दानेदार उद्धरण अवधि', 'ru': 'Тонкозернистая цитата для ссылок в Википедии', 'ga': 'Réise Lua Mhín Ghrinn do Thagairtí sa Vicipéid', 'hu': 'Finom szemű idézési tartomány a Wikipédiában található hivatkozásokhoz', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εύκαμπτο εύρος παραπομπής για αναφορές στη Βικιπαίδεια', 'kk': 'Википедиядағы сілтемелер үшін дұрыс граникалық сайтының меңзері', 'it': 'Intervallo di citazione a grana fine per riferimenti in Wikipedia', 'lt': 'Nuorodoms Vikipedijoje skirtos smulkios grūdinės citacijos spaudas', 'mk': 'Фино зелено цитирање за референции во Википедија', 'ml': 'വികിപിഡിയയിലെ റെഫറന്\u200dസുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഗ്രാഫിന്\u200d സിറ്റേഷന്\u200d സ്പാന്\u200d', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Szerokoziarnisty okres cytowania dla referencji w Wikipedii', 'mn': 'Wikipedia дахь санаануудын төлөвлөгөөний сайн салбарт', 'ro': 'Intervalul de citație cu granule fine pentru referințe în Wikipedia', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Fin Grained Citation Span for References in Wikipedia', 'ms': 'Penampilan Citasi Bergabung Baik untuk Rujukan di Wikipedia', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Magaalada la xiriiray ee la xiriiray macluumaadka ee Wikipedia', 'sv': 'Finkornig citationsspann för referenser i Wikipedia', 'mt': 'Spanna ta’ Ċittazzjoni Mħawla Fina għar-Referenzi fil-Wikipedia', 'ur': 'ویکیپیڈیا میں اچھی گرینڈ سیٹیٹ سپن', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một miếng khai thác Fine cho những điều tham chiếu trên Wikipedia.', 'nl': 'Fijn korrelige citatiespanne voor verwijzingen in Wikipedia', 'bg': 'Финозърнести цитати за препратки в Уикипедия', 'da': 'Fine Grained Citation Span for Referencer i Wikipedia, den frie encyklopædi', 'hr': 'Fin Grained Citation Span for References in Wikipedia', 'de': 'Feinkörnige Zitationsspanne für Referenzen in Wikipedia', 'id': 'Fine Grained Citation Span untuk Referensi di Wikipedia', 'ko': '위키백과에서 참고 문헌의 세립도 인용 범위', 'tr': 'Wikipediadeki Çeşmeler üçin Gowy Taýda', 'fa': 'اسپان شهروندی خوبی برای ارتباطات در ویکیپدیا', 'sw': 'Hifadhi nzuri ya Miji kwa ajili ya References in Wikipedia', 'af': 'Fine Grained Citation Span vir Verwysings in Wikipedia', 'sq': 'Fine Grained Citation Span for References in Wikipedia', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়ার রেফারেন্সের জন্য সুন্দর গ্রেফিং সিটেশন স্পেন', 'az': 'Wikipediada Referanslar üçün yaxşı Grained Citation Span', 'bs': 'Fin Grained Citation Span for References in Wikipedia', 'cs': 'Jemnozrnný citovací rozsah pro reference ve Wikipedii', 'et': 'Viidete jaoks Vikipeedias peenete teradega tsiteerimise periood', 'ca': 'Fine Grained Citation Span for References a Wikipedia', 'fi': 'Hienorakeinen lainausaika viittauksille Wikipediassa', 'jv': 'Fine Graining', 'he': 'סיטת ציטוט מוצגת פינה לוויקיפדיה', 'sk': 'Fino zrnat obseg citiranja za reference v Wikipediji', 'ha': 'Fine Grained Citation Span for References in Wikipedia', 'bo': 'Wikipedia ནང་གི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་སྔོན་པོ། གྲོང་ཁྱེར་གྱི་ཕྱིར་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Verifiability is one of the core editing principles in Wikipedia, where editors are encouraged to provide citations for the added content. For a Wikipedia article determining what content is covered by a citation or the citation span is not trivial, an important aspect for automated citation finding for uncovered content, or fact assessments. We address the problem of determining the citation span in Wikipedia articles. We approach this problem by classifying which textual fragments in an article are covered or hold true given a citation. We propose a sequence classification approach where for a paragraph and a citation, we determine the citation span at a fine-grained level. We provide a thorough experimental evaluation and compare our approach against baselines adopted from the scientific domain, where we show improvement for all evaluation metrics.', 'ar': 'تعد إمكانية التحقق أحد مبادئ التحرير الأساسية في ويكيبيديا ، حيث يتم تشجيع المحررين على تقديم اقتباسات للمحتوى المضاف. بالنسبة لمقالة Wikipedia التي تحدد المحتوى الذي يتم تغطيته من خلال الاقتباس أو مدى الاقتباس ليس بالأمر التافه ، وهو جانب مهم للبحث الآلي عن الاقتباس للمحتوى غير المكشوف أو تقييمات الحقائق. نعالج مشكلة تحديد مدى الاقتباس في مقالات ويكيبيديا. نحن نتعامل مع هذه المشكلة من خلال تصنيف الأجزاء النصية في المقالة التي تمت تغطيتها أو اعتبارها صحيحة بالنظر إلى الاقتباس. نقترح نهجًا لتصنيف التسلسل حيث نحدد مدى الاقتباس على مستوى دقيق بالنسبة للفقرة والاقتباس. نحن نقدم تقييمًا تجريبيًا شاملاً ونقارن نهجنا مع الخطوط الأساسية المعتمدة من المجال العلمي ، حيث نظهر تحسنًا لجميع مقاييس التقييم.', 'es': 'La verificabilidad es uno de los principios básicos de edición de Wikipedia, donde se anima a los editores a proporcionar citas para el contenido agregado. Para un artículo de Wikipedia, determinar qué contenido cubre una cita o el período de citas no es trivial, un aspecto importante para la búsqueda automática de citas para contenido descubierto o evaluaciones de hechos. Abordamos el problema de determinar la duración de las citas en los artículos de Wikipedia. Abordamos este problema clasificando qué fragmentos textuales de un artículo están cubiertos o son verdaderos dada una cita. Proponemos un enfoque de clasificación de secuencia en el que, para un párrafo y una cita, determinamos el intervalo de citas a un nivel detallado. Proporcionamos una evaluación experimental exhaustiva y comparamos nuestro enfoque con los puntos de referencia adoptados del dominio científico, donde mostramos mejoras para todas las métricas de evaluación.', 'pt': 'A verificabilidade é um dos princípios básicos de edição na Wikipédia, onde os editores são encorajados a fornecer citações para o conteúdo adicionado. Para um artigo da Wikipedia, determinar qual conteúdo é coberto por uma citação ou o período de citação não é trivial, um aspecto importante para a busca automatizada de citações para conteúdo não descoberto ou avaliações de fatos. Abordamos o problema de determinar o intervalo de citação em artigos da Wikipédia. Abordamos esse problema classificando quais fragmentos textuais em um artigo são cobertos ou verdadeiros a partir de uma citação. Propomos uma abordagem de classificação de sequência onde, para um parágrafo e uma citação, determinamos a extensão da citação em um nível de granularidade fina. Fornecemos uma avaliação experimental completa e comparamos nossa abordagem com as linhas de base adotadas do domínio científico, onde mostramos melhorias para todas as métricas de avaliação.', 'fr': "La vérifiabilité est l'un des principes fondamentaux de l'édition de Wikipédia, où les éditeurs sont encouragés à fournir des citations pour le contenu ajouté. Pour un article Wikipédia, déterminer quel contenu est couvert par une citation ou la durée de citation n'est pas anodin, un aspect important pour la recherche automatique de citations pour un contenu non couvert, ou pour les évaluations de faits. Nous abordons le problème de la détermination de la durée des citations dans les articles Wikipédia. Nous abordons ce problème en classant les fragments de texte d'un article qui sont couverts ou qui restent vrais en fonction d'une citation. Nous proposons une approche de classification par séquence dans laquelle, pour un paragraphe et une citation, nous déterminons la plage de citation à un niveau précis. Nous fournissons une évaluation expérimentale approfondie et comparons notre approche aux bases de référence adoptées dans le domaine scientifique, où nous montrons une amélioration pour toutes les mesures d'évaluation.", 'ja': '検証可能性は、ウィキペディアの中核的な編集原則の1つであり、編集者は追加されたコンテンツの引用を提供することが奨励されています。ウィキペディアの記事では、引用または引用スパンでカバーされているコンテンツは些細なものではなく、カバーされていないコンテンツの自動引用発見、または事実評価の重要な側面であると判断しています。ウィキペディアの記事では、引用スパンを決定する問題に取り組んでいます。この問題に取り組むには、引用を考慮して、記事のどのテキストの断片がカバーされているか、それが当てはまるかを分類します。段落と引用について、引用スパンを細かいレベルで決定する配列分類アプローチを提案します。私たちは、徹底的な実験的評価を提供し、科学領域から採用されたベースラインとアプローチを比較します。ここでは、すべての評価指標の改善を示します。', 'zh': '可验证性者,维基百科之核心编法之一,劝编辑者为添引。 其于维基百科条目,定引文引文跨度所涵盖并非易事,此自见未覆事实之一要也。 臣等议定维基百科条目所引。 文本片段类,给定引用之。 立序分类之法,段落引文,定引文跨度于细粒度级。 备实验评估,以吾法与科学域基线校之,于此基线中,示诸指标进。', 'ru': 'Проверяемость является одним из основных принципов редактирования в Википедии, где редакторам рекомендуется предоставлять цитаты для добавленного контента. Для статьи в Википедии определение того, какой контент охватывается цитатой или интервал цитирования не является тривиальным, важным аспектом для автоматического поиска цитирования для непокрытого контента или оценки фактов. Мы рассматриваем проблему определения интервала цитирования в статьях Википедии. Мы подходим к этой проблеме, классифицируя, какие текстовые фрагменты в статье охвачены или верны, учитывая цитату. Мы предлагаем подход к классификации последовательностей, при котором для абзаца и цитаты мы определяем диапазон цитирования на мелкозернистом уровне. Мы проводим тщательную экспериментальную оценку и сравниваем наш подход с базовыми показателями, принятыми в научной области, где мы демонстрируем улучшение всех оценочных показателей.', 'hi': 'सत्यापनीयता विकिपीडिया के मुख्य संपादन सिद्धांतों में से एक है, जहां संपादकों को अतिरिक्त सामग्री के लिए उद्धरण प्रदान करने के लिए प्रोत्साहित किया जाता है। एक विकिपीडिया लेख के लिए यह निर्धारित करने के लिए कि किस सामग्री को एक उद्धरण या उद्धरण अवधि द्वारा कवर किया गया है, तुच्छ नहीं है, उजागर सामग्री के लिए स्वचालित उद्धरण खोज के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण पहलू, या तथ्य मूल्यांकन। हम विकिपीडिया लेखों में उद्धरण अवधि निर्धारित करने की समस्या का समाधान करते हैं। हम इस समस्या को वर्गीकृत करके इस समस्या से संपर्क करते हैं कि किसी लेख में कौन से पाठ्य टुकड़े कवर किए गए हैं या एक उद्धरण दिए गए सत्य हैं। हम एक अनुक्रम वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां एक पैराग्राफ और एक उद्धरण के लिए, हम एक ठीक-ठाक स्तर पर उद्धरण अवधि निर्धारित करते हैं। हम एक पूरी तरह से प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन प्रदान करते हैं और वैज्ञानिक डोमेन से अपनाए गए बेसलाइन के खिलाफ हमारे दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करते हैं, जहां हम सभी मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक के लिए सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá infhíoraitheacht ar cheann de na bunphrionsabail eagarthóireachta sa Vicipéid, áit a spreagtar eagarthóirí chun luanna a sholáthar don ábhar breise. Maidir le halt Vicipéide a chinneann cén t-ábhar atá clúdaithe ag lua nó nach bhfuil an réise comhlua fánach, gné thábhachtach le haghaidh aimsiú uathoibrithe lua le haghaidh ábhar neamhchumhdaithe, nó measúnaithe fíricí. Tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le raon na lua a chinneadh in ailt Vicipéid. Déileálaimid leis an bhfadhb seo trí aicmiú a dhéanamh ar na blúirí téacsacha in alt atá clúdaithe nó atá fíor i bhfianaise lua. Molaimid cur chuige aicmithe seichimh nuair a chinnimid, i gcás alt agus lua, an réimse lua ar leibhéal mín. Cuirimid meastóireacht críochnúil thurgnamhach ar fáil agus cuirimid ár gcur chuige i gcomparáid le bonnlínte arna nglacadh ón bhfearann eolaíoch, áit a léirímid feabhas do gach méadracht mheastóireachta.', 'hu': 'Az ellenőrizhetőség a Wikipédia egyik alapvető szerkesztési elve, ahol a szerkesztőket arra ösztönzik, hogy idézéseket adjanak a hozzáadott tartalomhoz. Egy Wikipédia-cikk számára annak meghatározása, hogy milyen tartalomra vonatkozik az idézés vagy az idézési tartomány, nem triviális, fontos szempont a fedetlen tartalom automatizált idézésének vagy tényértékelésének. A Wikipédia cikkeiben a hivatkozási tartomány meghatározásának problémájával foglalkozunk. Ezt a problémát úgy közelítjük meg, hogy osztályozzuk, hogy egy cikk mely szövegtöredékei vannak lefedve vagy igazak az idézés alapján. Javasolunk egy sorozatos osztályozási megközelítést, ahol egy bekezdés és egy idézés esetében finomszemcsés szinten határozzuk meg az idézési tartományt. Alapos kísérleti értékelést végzünk, és összehasonlítjuk megközelítésünket a tudományos területről alkalmazott alapvető értékekkel, ahol minden értékelési mutató javulását mutatjuk.', 'el': 'Η επαλήθευση είναι μια από τις βασικές αρχές επεξεργασίας στη Βικιπαίδεια, όπου οι συντάκτες ενθαρρύνονται να παρέχουν παραπομπές για το προστιθέμενο περιεχόμενο. Για ένα λήμμα της Βικιπαίδειας ο προσδιορισμός του περιεχομένου που καλύπτεται από μια παραπομπή ή το εύρος παραπομπής δεν είναι ασήμαντος, μια σημαντική πτυχή για την αυτοματοποιημένη εύρεση παραπομπής για ακάλυπτο περιεχόμενο ή την αξιολόγηση γεγονότων. Αντιμετωπίζουμε το πρόβλημα του προσδιορισμού της έκτασης παραπομπής στα άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας. Προσεγγίζουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα ταξινομώντας ποια κειμενικά θραύσματα ενός άρθρου καλύπτονται ή θεωρούνται αληθή με αναφορά. Προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση ταξινόμησης ακολουθίας όπου για μια παράγραφο και μια παραπομπή, προσδιορίζουμε το εύρος παραπομπής σε ένα λεπτό επίπεδο. Παρέχουμε μια εμπεριστατωμένη πειραματική αξιολόγηση και συγκρίνουμε την προσέγγισή μας με τις γραμμές βάσης που υιοθετούνται από τον επιστημονικό τομέα, όπου επιδεικνύουμε βελτίωση για όλες τις μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης.', 'ka': 'შემოწმება არის ვიკიპედიაში შუალური რედაქტირების პრინფუტების ერთი, სადაც რედაქტირები მოთხოვრებულია დამატებული შემდგომარებისთვის სიტატირება. Wikipedia წესტილისთვის, რომელსაც შემდგომარეობა უკვე სიტყვეტის შესახებ, ან სიტყვეტის სიტყვეტის სიტყვეტი არ არის ტრივიალური, მნიშვნელოვანი აპექტაქტი სიტყვეტის შესაძლებ ჩვენ ვიკიპედიაში პრობლემების განსაზღვრების პრობლემების შესახებ. ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას მივიღეთ კლასიფიკაციით, რომელიც ტექსტური ფრაქციები არსებულია ან არსებულია, რომელიც საკუთარი ფრაქტიკური ფრაქციები ჩვენ გვეძლევა კლასიფიკაციის წარმოდგენა, სადაც პრაპაგრაფიკაცია და სიტატიკაცია, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებით სიტატიკაციის განსაზღვრებით წარმოდგენით წარმოდ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტიური ექსპერიმენტიური გავამუშავებთ და ჩვენი პროგრამის შემდეგ გავამუშავებთ მეცნიერო დემონიდან, სადაც ჩვენ ყველა გავამუშავებული მეტრიკ', 'it': "La verifica è uno dei principi fondamentali di Wikipedia, dove gli editori sono incoraggiati a fornire citazioni per i contenuti aggiunti. Per un articolo di Wikipedia determinare quale contenuto è coperto da una citazione o l'intervallo di citazione non è banale, un aspetto importante per la ricerca automatica delle citazioni per contenuti scoperti, o valutazioni dei fatti. Affrontiamo il problema di determinare la portata delle citazioni negli articoli di Wikipedia. Approfondiamo questo problema classificando quali frammenti testuali di un articolo sono trattati o ritenuti veri data una citazione. Proponiamo un approccio di classificazione sequenziale in cui per un paragrafo e una citazione, determiniamo la portata della citazione a un livello a grana fine. Forniamo una valutazione sperimentale approfondita e confrontiamo il nostro approccio con le linee di base adottate dal dominio scientifico, dove mostriamo miglioramenti per tutte le metriche di valutazione.", 'lt': 'Patikrinimas yra vienas iš pagrindinių redakcijos principų Vikipedijoje, kurioje redaktoriai raginami pateikti citatus dėl pridėto turinio. Vikipedijos straipsniui, kuriame nustatoma, koks turinys yra įtrauktas į citaciją arba citacijos intervalą, nėra trivialus, svarbus aspektas automatizuotam citacijos nustatymui nenustatytam turiniui arba faktų įvertinimui. Mes sprendžiame Wikipedia straipsniuose nurodytos citacijos apimties nustatymo problem ą. Mes sprendžiame šią problem ą klasifikuodami, kurie tekstiniai straipsnio fragmentai yra įtraukti arba laikomi teisingais, atsižvelgiant į citatą. Siūlome sekos klasifikavimo metodą, pagal kurį, kai kalbama apie pastraipą ir citaciją, nustatome citacijos intervalą plono grūdo lygiu. Pateikiame išsamų eksperimentinį vertinimą ir palyginame savo požiūrį su iš mokslo srities priimtomis bazinėmis linijomis, kuriose visi vertinimo rodikliai pagerėja.', 'mk': 'Verifiability is one of the core editing principles in Wikipedia, where editors are encouraged to provide citations for the added content.  За статија од Википедија која одредува која содржина е покриена со цитата или цитата не е тривијална, важен аспект за автоматизирано пронаоѓање цитата за откриена содржина или проценка на факти. Ние го решаваме проблемот со одредувањето на вредноста на цитатите во статиите на Википедија. Ние се приближуваме до овој проблем со класификување на кои текстуални фрагменти во една статија се покриени или се одржуваат вистински со цитата. Предложуваме пристап до класификација на секвенца каде што за параграф и цитата, го одредуваме цитатниот период на фино растено ниво. Ние обезбедуваме темелна експериментална проценка и го споредуваме нашиот пристап со основните линии усвоени од научниот домен, каде што покажуваме подобрување за сите метрики на проценка.', 'ms': 'Verifiability is one of the core editing principles in Wikipedia, where editors are encouraged to provide citations for the added content.  Untuk artikel Wikipedia yang menentukan apa kandungan yang ditutup oleh citasi atau jangkauan citasi bukanlah trivial, aspek penting untuk mencari citasi automatik untuk kandungan yang tidak ditemui, atau penilaian fakta. Kami mengatasi masalah menentukan jangkauan citasi dalam artikel Wikipedia. Kami mendekati masalah ini dengan mengklasifikasikan fragmen teks mana dalam artikel ditutup atau memegang benar diberikan citasi. Kami cadangkan pendekatan kelasukan jujukan di mana untuk satu paragraf dan citasi, kita menentukan jangkauan citasi pada tahap berwarna gandum. Kami menyediakan penilaian percubaan yang teliti dan membandingkan pendekatan kita dengan garis dasar yang diterima dari domain saintifik, di mana kita menunjukkan peningkatan untuk semua metrik penilaian.', 'mn': 'Баталгаа нь Википедийн үндсэн зохиолын зарчмын нэг юм. Эдгээр захирагчид нэмэгдсэн бүтээгдэхүүнд зохиол өгөх шаардлагатай. Википедийн өгүүлбэр хэд хэдэн соёлын тухай тайлбарлаж буй вэ гэвэл хэдэн соёлын тухай тайлбарлаж буй зүйл нь бага зэрэг биш, автоматжуулагдсан соёлын тухай автоматжуулагдах чухал асуудал юм. Бид Википедийн бичлэгүүдийн хэмжээний хэмжээг тодорхойлох асуудалд тусалдаг. Бид энэ асуудлын тухай ярилцаж өгөгдсөн хэсгийг хэлбэрээр дүгнэж эсвэл үнэндээ дүгнэж байдаг. Бид дарааллын хуваалтын арга замыг санал болгож байна. Гэхдээ хэлбэрт, хэлбэрт, хэлбэрээр тодорхойлж чадна. Бид шинжлэх ухааны холбоотой суурь шугамын эсрэг шинжлэх ухааны шалгалтын үнэлгээг бүрэн судалгааны метриктикийн сайжруулалтыг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'വിക്കിപിഡിയയിലെ കൂടുതല്\u200d ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന നിയമങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരാളാണ് വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതയില്\u200d എഡിറ്ററുകള്\u200d  ഒരു വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ രേഖയില്\u200d എന്താണ് ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്നതെന്നോ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ളതെന്നോ നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതെന്ന വിക്കിപ്പീഡിയയുടെ ലേഖനങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്പാന്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്ക ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്നത് ഒരു ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d ഏത് ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d മൂടിയിരിക്കുന്നുവ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സെക്കന്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d നടപടി പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു പാര്\u200dട്ടാഫിനും ഒരു ഉല്\u200dബോധനത്തിനും വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നല ശാസ്ത്ര ജോമെയില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രേരിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി നമ്മുടെ നടപടികള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച', 'mt': 'Il-verifikabbiltà hija wieħed mill-prinċipji ewlenin tal-edizzjoni fil-Wikipedia, fejn l-edituri huma mħeġġa jipprovdu ċitazzjonijiet għall-kontenut miżjud. Għal artikolu tal-Wikipedia li jiddetermina liema kontenut huwa kopert minn ċitazzjoni jew il-firxa taċ-ċitazzjoni mhijiex trivjali, aspett importanti għas-sejba awtomatizzata taċ-ċitazzjoni għal kontenut skopert, jew valutazzjonijiet tal-fatti. We address the problem of determining the citation span in Wikipedia articles.  Aħna nindirizzaw din il-problem a billi nikklassifikaw liema frammenti testwali f’artikolu huma koperti jew jinżammu veri minħabba ċitazzjoni. Aħna nipproponu approċċ ta’ klassifikazzjoni tas-sekwenza fejn għal paragrafu u ċitazzjoni, niddeterminaw il-firxa taċ-ċitazzjoni f’livell ta’ ħbub irfinat. Aħna nipprovdu evalwazzjoni sperimentali bir-reqqa u nqabblu l-approċċ tagħna mal-linji bażi adottati mill-qasam xjentifiku, fejn nuru titjib għall-metriċi kollha tal-evalwazzjoni.', 'kk': 'Тексерілік - Википедиядағы негізгі өңдеу принципінің бірі. Енді редакторлар қосылған мазмұның таңдауларын қамтамасыз етеді. Википедия мақаласының мазмұның қандай мазмұнын келтіріп, немесе келтірілген мазмұның қандай мазмұнын келтіру үшін көпшілік емес, ол автоматты түрде табылған мазмұнын, немесе факты о Википедиядағы мақалаларды анықтау мәселесін шешу. Бұл мәселеге қандай мәтіндік фрагменттер мақаланың қай жазылған не қандай жазылғанын анықтап келеміз. Біз таңбаша және таңбаша үшін таңбашаларды таңдау кезінде, таңбашаларды таңбаша деңгейінде анықтаймыз. Біз тәжірибелі тәжірибелі бағалау және біздің тәжірибелігімізді ғылыми домендан қолданылған негізгі жолдарымызға салыстырып, барлық бағалау метрикалық жақсартул', 'pl': 'Weryfikacja jest jedną z podstawowych zasad edycji Wikipedii, gdzie redaktorzy są zachęcani do udostępniania cytatów dodanych treści. W przypadku artykułu Wikipedii określenie, jakie treści są objęte cytowaniem lub rozpiętością cytowania nie jest trywialne, ważnym aspektem zautomatyzowanego wyszukiwania cytowanych treści lub oceny faktów. Zajmujemy się problemem określenia zakresu cytowania w artykułach Wikipedii. Podchodzimy do tego problemu poprzez klasyfikację, które fragmenty tekstowe w artykule są objęte lub uważane za prawdziwe podczas cytowania. Proponujemy podejście klasyfikacji sekwencji, w którym dla akapitu i cytowania określamy zakres cytowania na poziomie drobnoziarnistym. Przeprowadzamy gruntowną ocenę eksperymentalną i porównujemy nasze podejście z liniami bazowymi przyjętymi z dziedziny naukowej, gdzie wykazujemy poprawę wszystkich wskaźników oceny.', 'ro': 'Verificarea este unul dintre principiile de editare de bază din Wikipedia, unde editorii sunt încurajați să furnizeze citate pentru conținutul adăugat. Pentru un articol Wikipedia care determină ce conținut este acoperit de o citare sau intervalul de citare nu este trivial, un aspect important pentru găsirea automată a citațiilor pentru conținutul descoperit sau evaluarea faptelor. Rezolvăm problema determinării intervalului citat în articolele Wikipedia. Abordăm această problemă prin clasificarea fragmentelor textuale dintr-un articol care sunt acoperite sau sunt adevărate, dată fiind citată. Propunem o abordare de clasificare secvențială în care, pentru un paragraf și o citare, determinăm intervalul citației la un nivel fin. Oferim o evaluare experimentală amănunțită și comparăm abordarea noastră cu liniile de referință adoptate din domeniul științific, unde prezentăm îmbunătățiri pentru toate măsurile de evaluare.', 'sr': 'Verifikacija je jedan od osnovnih principa editiranja u Wikipediji, gdje se editori ohrabruju da pruže citacije za dodatni sadržaj. Za Wikipedijski članak koji određuje šta je sadržaj pokriven ciljanjem ili procjenom cijente nije trivial, važan aspekt za automatski pronalazak cijente za otkriveno sadržanje ili procjene činjenica. Rešavamo problem određivanja razdoblja ciklusa u člancima Wikipedije. Približavamo ovom problemu klasifikacijom kojih tekstualnih delimenata u članku se pokrivaju ili držimo istinu s obzirom na cilj. Predlažemo klasifikacijski pristup sekvenciji, gde za paragraf i citaciju određujemo određeni udarac na vrhunskom nivou. Obezbeđujemo temeljnu eksperimentalnu procjenu i uspoređujemo naš pristup prema osnovnim linijama usvojenim iz znanstvenog domena, gde pokazujemo poboljšanje za sve procjene metrike.', 'no': 'Verifiseringsverktøyet er ein av kjerneredigeringsprinsippene i Wikipedia, der redigeringsverktøyet blir oppretta til å gjera sitasjonar for den lagde innhaldet. For eit Wikipedia-artikkel som avgjer kva innhald er dekket av ein sitering eller siteringsavstanden er ikkje trivial, eit viktig aspekt for automatisk siteringsfinning for oppdaga innhald eller faktiske vurdering. Vi handler problemet med å bestemme siteringsavstanden i Wikipedia-artiklar. Vi nærmer dette problemet ved å klassifisera kva tekstfragmenter i eit artikkel er dekka eller holdt sann oppgitt ein sitering. Vi foreslår ein sekvensklassifikasjonsklasseringstilnærming der for eit avsnitt og ein sitering bestemmer vi siteringstilnærminga på ein fin korn nivå. Vi tilbyr ein grunn eksperimentell evaluering og sammenligner tilnærminga vårt mot baselinjer som er godtatt frå vitenskapelige domene, der vi viser forbetringa for alle evalueringsmetrikar.', 'si': 'විකිපිඩියා වලින් සංවේදනය විකිපිඩියා වලින් සංවේදනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් එකක්, කොහෙද සංවේදකයෝ සම්බන විකිපිඩියා ලේඛනයක් නිර්ධාරණය කරනවා විකිපිඩියා ලේඛනයක් නිර්ධාරණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ කොහොමද කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කිය අපි විකිපිඩියා පිළිපතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තීරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා පැත්තක් වලින් කොහොමද පැත්තක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැත්නම් පැත් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ති අපි පරීක්ෂණ විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් විරුද්ධ විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාසික ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙ', 'so': 'Aamin ahaanshaha waa mid ka mid ah shuruudaha hagitaanka ee hoose ee Wikipedia, halkaas oo lagu dhiirrigeliyo edbiyada in lagu siiyo warqado ku qoran waxyaabaha lagu daro. Qoraalka Wikipedia ee ku qoran waxyaabaha uu ku qoran yahay tusaale ahaan ama uu ku qorayo baaritaanka, waxaa muhiim ah dhinaca aad ka heli karto dalbashada waxyaabaha la qaatay ama qiimeynta xaqiiqa ah. Dhibaatada ku saabsan go’aanka ku qoran warqadaha Wikipedia. Waxaynu u soo dhowaynaa dhibaatadan si a an u kala qeybinno qaybaha qoraalka ee warqada ah ku qoran ama aan u hayno tusaale run ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaabilaad fasax ah, meesha lagu qoro qoraal iyo tusaale, waxaynu go’aanka ku qornaa heer aad u fiican. Waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta baaritaanka oo aad u fiirsan karnaa islamarkaasna waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaab ka gees ah hababka hoose ee laga soo qaaday deegaanka cilmiga, kaas oo aynu muujinnaa horumarinta qiimeynta oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Verifierbarhet är en av de grundläggande redigeringsprinciperna i Wikipedia, där redaktörer uppmanas att tillhandahålla citeringar för det tillagda innehållet. För en Wikipedia-artikel är det inte trivialt att bestämma vilket innehåll som omfattas av en citering eller citeringsintervallet, vilket är en viktig aspekt för automatiserad citeringssökning för avslöjat innehåll, eller faktaundersökningar. Vi behandlar problemet med att bestämma citeringsintervallet i Wikipediaartiklar. Vi angriper detta problem genom att klassificera vilka textfragment i en artikel som omfattas eller är sanna med hänvisning. Vi föreslår en sekvensklassifikationsmetod där vi för ett stycke och en citering bestämmer citeringsintervallet på en finkornig nivå. Vi tillhandahåller en grundlig experimentell utvärdering och jämför vårt tillvägagångssätt mot baselines antagna från den vetenskapliga domänen, där vi visar förbättring för alla utvärderingsmetoder.', 'ta': 'விகிபிடியாவில் உள்ள மூல திருத்துதல் குறிப்புகளில் ஒன்றாகும், அதில் திருத்தியவர்கள் கூட்டப்பட்ட உள்ளடக்கத்திற்க Name நாம் விகிபிடியா கட்டுரைகளில் வரையறை ஸ்பான் தீர்மானிக்கும் பிரச்சனையை முடிவு செய்கிறோம We approach this problem by classifying which textual fragments in an article are covered or hold true given a citation.  நாம் ஒரு பின்வரிசை வகுப்பு முறைமையை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் ஒரு பதிவு மற்றும் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட செயல்பாட்டிற்கு, நாம் ஒரு நன் அறிவியல் தளத்திலிருந்து எடுக்கப்பட்ட அடிப்பகுதிகளுக்கு எதிராக எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், அங்கு நாம் அனைத்து மதிப்பும்', 'ur': 'وکیپیڈیا میں اصلی سمجھانے کی اصل میں سے ایک ہے جہاں سمجھانے والوں کو جمع ہوئے منصوبات کے لئے شہادت دینے کی رغبت دی جاتی ہے. ایک ویکیپیڈیا مقالہ کے لئے جو ایک سند کے ذریعہ سے کس چیز پر پوری ہوتی ہے یا ایک سند کے اندازے سے کمی نہیں ہے، ایک اپنا معاملہ ہے جو اپنا معاملہ آشکار نہیں ہوتا، یا حقیقت کی ارزیابی کے لئے اپنا معاملہ ہے. ہم ویکیپیڈیا لکھائیوں میں معلومات کا مقرر کرنے کے مسئلہ میں مشکل کریں گے۔ ہم اس مسئلہ کے قریب آتے ہیں کہ ایک مقالہ میں کس ٹیکسٹی ٹیکسٹی ٹیکسٹی ٹیکسٹی ٹیکسٹی ٹیکسٹ پورے ہیں یا سچی ٹیکسٹی رکھتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک سفارش طریقے کی تقریبا پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جہاں ایک پاراگراف اور ایک سفارش کے لئے، ہم ایک سفارش طریقے سے مقرر کرتے ہیں. ہم ایک عمدہ آزمائش کا ارزش دیتے ہیں اور ہماری طریقہ سائنس ڈومین سے قبول کی گئی بنسلین کے مقابلہ میں مقایسہ کرتے ہیں جہاں ہم تمام ارزش متریک کے لئے اچھی طریقہ دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info Name Biz Wikipedia maqolalarida sahifa sahifani aniqlashni muammola qilamiz. @ info Biz bir necha darajalashtirish usulini tahlil qilamiz, qayta paragraf va taʼrif qilish uchun so'zlashni yaxshi darajada qaramaymiz. Biz ilmiy domenadan olingan asboblarning asboblarga qiymatlarimizni o'rganamiz. Bu yerda biz hamma qiymatlar metriklarini yaxshi ko'ramiz.", 'vi': 'Veriphiable là một trong những nguyên tắc soạn thảo cốt trong Wikipedia, nơi các nhà xuất bản được khuyến khích ghi chú cho những nội dung thêm. Đối với một bài báo Wikipedia đã xác định nội dung của một ghi chú hay thời gian ghi chú không phải là vô giá trị, một khía cạnh quan trọng cho việc ghi chú tự động về các nội dung khám phá, hay đánh giá thực tế. Chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề định thời gian ghi danh trên Wikipedia. Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách liệt kê các mảnh ghép cấu trúc trong một bài báo được che đậy hoặc được ghi nhớ. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp phân loại dãy nơi mà cho một đoạn và một ghi chú, chúng tôi xác định thời gian ghi chú ở mức độ ổn định. Chúng tôi cung cấp một đánh giá thử nghiệm hoàn hảo và so sánh phương pháp của chúng tôi với các nền tảng từ lĩnh vực khoa học, nơi chúng tôi thấy cải thiện cho mọi âm lượng đánh giá.', 'bg': 'Верификацията е един от основните принципи на редактиране в Уикипедия, където редакторите се насърчават да предоставят цитати за добавеното съдържание. За статия в Уикипедия, определяща кое съдържание е обхванато от цитат или обхвата на цитатите, не е тривиално, важен аспект за автоматизирано намиране на цитати за открито съдържание или оценка на фактите. Ние разглеждаме проблема с определянето на обхвата на цитиране в статиите в Уикипедия. Ние подхождаме към този проблем, като класифицираме кои текстови фрагменти в дадена статия са обхванати или държат верни при дадено цитиране. Предлагаме подход за класификация на последователността, при който за абзац и цитат, ние определяме обхвата на цитиране на фино ниво. Предоставяме задълбочена експериментална оценка и сравняваме подхода си с базовите линии, възприети от научната сфера, където показваме подобрение за всички показатели за оценка.', 'nl': 'Verifieerbaarheid is een van de belangrijkste bewerkingsprincipes in Wikipedia, waar redacteuren worden aangemoedigd citaties te verstrekken voor de toegevoegde inhoud. Voor een Wikipedia-artikel is het niet triviaal om vast te stellen welke inhoud onder een citatie valt of de citatiespanne, een belangrijk aspect voor geautomatiseerde citatiefinding voor onbedekte inhoud of fact assessments. We behandelen het probleem van het bepalen van de citatiespanne in Wikipedia-artikelen. We benaderen dit probleem door te classificeren welke tekstfragmenten in een artikel worden behandeld of waar zijn bij een citaat. We stellen een sequentieclassificatiebenadering voor waarbij we voor een alinea en een citaat de citatiespanne op een fijnkorrelig niveau bepalen. We geven een grondige experimentele evaluatie en vergelijken onze aanpak met baselines uit het wetenschappelijke domein, waar we verbeteringen aantonen voor alle evaluatiestatistieken.', 'da': 'Verificerbarhed er et af de centrale redigeringsprincipper i Wikipedia, hvor redaktører opfordres til at give referencer til det tilføjede indhold. For en Wikipedia-artikel er det ikke trivielt at bestemme, hvilket indhold der er dækket af en reference eller referenceintervallet, hvilket er et vigtigt aspekt for automatiseret referencesøgning for afdækket indhold eller faktaundersøgelser. Vi løser problemet med at bestemme referenceperioden i Wikipedia artikler. Vi nærmer os dette problem ved at klassificere, hvilke tekstfragmenter i en artikel der er dækket eller holder sande givet en henvisning. Vi foreslår en sekvensklassifikationsmetode, hvor vi for et afsnit og en reference bestemmer referenceperioden på et finkornet niveau. Vi leverer en grundig eksperimentel evaluering og sammenligner vores tilgang med baselines vedtaget fra det videnskabelige domæne, hvor vi viser forbedringer for alle evalueringsmetrics.', 'hr': 'Verifikacija je jedna od osnovnih načela editiranja u Wikipediji, gdje se urednici ohrabruju pružiti citacije za dodatni sadržaj. Za članak Wikipedije koji utvrđuje što je sadržaj pokriven citacijom ili razdobljem objavljivanja nije trivial, važan aspekt za automatski pronalazak objavljivanja otkrivenih sadržaja ili procjene činjenica. Mi riješimo problem određivanja cijelog razdoblja u člancima Wikipedije. Približavamo se ovom problemu klasifikacijom kojih tekstualnih dijelova članaka pokrivaju ili držimo istinu s obzirom na cilj. Predlažemo klasifikacijski pristup sekvenciji u kojem za odstavak i citaciju određujemo određeni širok snimak na vrhunskoj razini. Mi pružamo temeljnu eksperimentalnu procjenu i uspoređujemo naš pristup s početnim linijama usvojenim iz znanstvenih domena, gdje pokazujemo poboljšanje za sve procjene metrika.', 'de': 'Verifizierbarkeit ist eines der zentralen Bearbeitungsprinzipien in Wikipedia, wo Redakteure ermutigt werden, Zitate für den hinzugefügten Inhalt bereitzustellen. Für einen Wikipedia-Artikel ist es nicht trivial zu bestimmen, welche Inhalte von einem Zitat abgedeckt werden, oder die Zitationsspanne, ein wichtiger Aspekt für die automatisierte Zitationsfindung von nicht verdeckten Inhalten oder Faktenbewertungen. Wir beschäftigen uns mit dem Problem der Bestimmung der Zitationsspanne in Wikipedia-Artikeln. Wir nähern uns diesem Problem, indem wir klassifizieren, welche Textfragmente in einem Artikel abgedeckt werden oder bei einem Zitat wahr sind. Wir schlagen einen Sequenzklassifizierungsansatz vor, bei dem wir für einen Absatz und eine Zitation die Zitationsspanne auf einer feinkörnigen Ebene bestimmen. Wir führen eine gründliche experimentelle Bewertung durch und vergleichen unseren Ansatz mit Baselines aus dem wissenschaftlichen Bereich, wo wir Verbesserungen für alle Bewertungsmetriken zeigen.', 'id': 'Verifiability adalah salah satu prinsip penyuntingan utama di Wikipedia, di mana editor didorong untuk menyediakan citasi untuk isi tambahan. Untuk artikel Wikipedia yang menentukan isi apa yang ditutup oleh citasi atau jangkauan citasi tidak trivial, aspek penting untuk penemuan citasi otomatis untuk konten yang tidak ditemukan, atau penilaian fakta. Kami mengatasi masalah menentukan jangkauan citasi dalam artikel Wikipedia. Kami mendekati masalah ini dengan mengklasifikasi fragmen teks mana dalam artikel tertutup atau tetap benar diberikan sebuah citasi. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan klasifikasi urutan di mana untuk sebuah paragraf dan sebuah citasi, kita menentukan jangkauan citasi pada tingkat gandum. Kami menyediakan evaluasi eksperimen yang teliti dan membandingkan pendekatan kita dengan garis dasar yang diadopsi dari bidang ilmiah, di mana kita menunjukkan peningkatan untuk semua metrik evaluasi.', 'sw': 'Uaminifu ni moja ya kanuni muhimu za kuhariri huko Wikipedia, ambapo wahariri wanahamasishwa kutoa maelezo kwa maudhui yanayoongezwa. Kwa makala ya Wikipedia inayoelezea maudhui yaliyoandikwa na tahadhari au maelezo hayo hayana vigumu, jambo muhimu la kutafuta maudhui yasiyoeleweka, au tafiti za ukweli. Tunaongelea tatizo la kuamua maelezo yaliyoandikwa katika makala za Wikipedia. Tunakutana na tatizo hili kwa kuelezea vipi vipi vipande vya maandishi katika makala haya vinavyoandikwa au vinaendelea vizuri. Tunazipendekeza mbinu za usambazaji wa mfululizo ambapo kwa paragraph na maelezo, tunaamua utaratibu huo unapangwa kwa kiwango kizuri. Tunatoa uchunguzi wa kina wa majaribio na kulinganisha mbinu yetu dhidi ya misingi yaliyochukuliwa kutoka kwenye maeneo ya kisayansi, ambapo tunaonyesha maboresho kwa njia zote za uchunguzi.', 'fa': 'بررسی یکی از اصولات اصلی ویکیپدیا است که ویکیپدیا را تشویق می\u200cکند که ویکیپدیا برای محتویات اضافه\u200cشده شهرت دهند. برای یک مقاله ویکیپدیا که تعیین می\u200cکند کدام محتویات را توسط یک مقاله\u200cای پوشش داده می\u200cشود یا مدت تکلیف غیر قابل توجه نیست، یک منظور مهم برای پیدا کردن پیدا کردن توسط محتویات آشکار یا ارزیابی حقیقت است. ما مشکل تعیین مدت تکرار در مقاله های ویکیپدیا را حل می کنیم. ما به این مشکل نزدیک می\u200cشویم با تشخیص دادن کدام قطعه\u200cهای متن در یک مقاله پوشیده می\u200cشوند یا به حقیقت نگه می\u200cداریم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک دستور مخفی کردن ترکیب که برای یک پاراگراف و یک ترکیب، در یک سطح دانه\u200cهای خوب تعیین می\u200cکنیم. ما یک ارزیابی آزمایش کامل را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و طریقمون را با خطوط پایین\u200cها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم که از دامنه علمی پذیرفته شده است، جایی که برای تمام متریک\u200cهای ارزیابی بهترین نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'tr': 'Däklemeler Wikipediýada esasy editlemek prinsipinden biridir, nirede editçiler eklenýän mazmunlar üçin bejermek üçin teklip edilýärler. Wikipediýa makala üçin nähili maksadyň üstüne alandygyny karar berýär ýa-da maksadyň nähili möhüm däldir. Maksadyň üstüne alandygyny otomatik alandyrmak üçin wajyp bölegi ýok. Wikipediýa makalarynda ýagtylyk döwletlerini çözmekde mesele çözýäris. Biz bu meseleňe makala içinde nähili tekst parçaklaryny ýazyp ýa-da tutuşyp tutýarys. Biz paragraf we citation (help) Biz bilim domenyndan kabul edilen baz çyzyglaryň ýagdaýyny düzümlendirip, hemme değerlendirme metrikleri üçin gelişmeleri gösterip ýöretjek deneyleri tasarruf etýäris.', 'af': "Verifiseerbaar is een van die eerste redigeringsprinsipels in Wikipedia, waar redigeerders word aanbevestig om citasies vir die bygevoeg inhoud te verskaf. Vir 'n Wikipedia artikel wat bepaal wat inhoud bedek word deur 'n sitering of die siteringsspan is nie trivial nie, 'n belangrike aspekt vir outomatiese siteringsvinding vir ontdekkende inhoud of feit-evaluerings. Ons adres die probleem van die bepaal van die siteringsspan in Wikipedia-artikels. Ons het hierdie probleem aangekom deur te klassifiseer wat tekstuele fragmente in 'n artikel oordek of hou waar gegee het 'n sitasie. Ons voorstel 'n sekvensie klasifikasie toegang waar vir 'n paragraaf en 'n sitering, ons bepaal die siteringsspan op 'n fyn-graan vlak. Ons verskaf 'n groot eksperimentale evaluering en vergelyk ons toegang teen basisline wat van die wetenskaplike domein aangeneem is, waar ons verbetering vertoon vir alle evalueringsmetries.", 'sq': 'Verifikueshmëria është një nga parimet kryesore të redaksionit në Wikipedia, ku redaktorët janë inkurajuar të japin citate për përmbajtjen e shtuar. Për një artikull të Wikipedias që përcakton se cili përmbajtje është mbuluar nga një përmbajtje ose zgjatja e përmbajtjes nuk është e vogël, një aspekt i rëndësishëm për gjetjen e përmbajtjes automatike për përmbajtje të zbuluara apo vlerësime faktesh. Ne trajtojmë problem in e përcaktimit të zgjatjes së citimit në artikujt e Wikipedias. Ne i afrohemi këtij problemi duke klasifikuar cilat fragmente tekstuale në një artikull janë mbuluar apo mbajnë të vërtetën duke dhënë një citat. Ne propozojmë një metodë klasifikimi të sekuencës ku për një paragraf dhe një përmendim, ne përcaktojmë fushën e përmendimit në një nivel të hollë. Ne ofrojmë një vlerësim eksperimental të thellë dhe krahasojmë qasjen tonë me linjat bazë të miratuara nga fusha shkencore, ku tregojmë përmirësim për të gjitha metrikat e vlerësimit.', 'am': 'አእምሮነት በWikipedia ውስጥ ካለው አካባቢ አካላት አንዱ ነው፡፡ የWikipedia ጽሑፍ በማንኛውም ማህበረሰብ ወይም የአካባቢው ስፓን ምን እንደተደላደለ ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ በWikipedia ጽሑፎች ውስጥ ግንኙነቱን ማረጋገጥ ጉዳይ እናስቸግራለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን ማንኛውን ክፍተት በተሸፈነ ወይም እውነተኛ ምሳሌ በመጠበቅ እናስቸጋለን፡፡ ለጽሑፍ እና ለጥያቄ ጥያቄን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የፍትሕት ግንኙነታችንን አካሄድን እናስተያየዋለን እና የሳይንቀሳዊ ውይይት ካደረገው መሠረት ላይ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վիքիփեդիայի կարգավորման հիմնական սկզբունքներից մեկն է, որտեղ խրախուսում են խմբագիրներին տալ մեջբերումներ ավելացված պարունակության համար: Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածի համար, որը որոշում է, թե ի՞նչ պարունակություն է ծածկված մեջբերման կամ մեջբերման տարածության միջոցով, անփոքր չէ, մեջբերման ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման կարևոր ասպեկտ է բացահայտված պարունակության կամ փաստերի գնահատման համար: Մենք լուծում ենք Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածներում գտնվող մեջբերման տարածության որոշումների խնդիրը: Մենք մոտենում ենք այս խնդիրը դասակարգելով, թե որպիսի տեքստային մասեր են հոդվածի մեջ ծածկված կամ ճշմարիտ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք հաջորդականության դասակարգման մոտեցում, որտեղ պարբերակի և մեջբերման համար մենք որոշում ենք մեջբերման տարածքը նրբագեղ մակարդակում: Մենք ապահովում ենք հիմնական փորձարկման գնահատում և համեմատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը գիտական ոլորտից ընդունված հիմնական գծերի հետ, որտեղ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս զարգացում բոլոր գնահատման չափումների համար:', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়ার মূল সম্পাদক নীতির মধ্যে একটি সুন্দর বিষয়টি যেখানে সম্পাদকদের যোগ করা বিষয়বস্তুর জন্য উৎসাহিত করা হয়েছে। উইকিপিডিয়ার একটি প্রবন্ধের জন্য একটি উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধ নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে যে একটি উল্লেখের বিষয়বস্তু কি বা উল্লেখের স্প্যান কি বিষয়বস্তু নি উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধে উইকিপিডিয়ার স্প্যানের সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণের সমস্যা আমরা বিষয়টিকে আলোচনা  একটি প্রবন্ধে কোন টেক্সচুয়াল ভাঙ্গা লেখা হয়েছে অথবা সত্যিকারের উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে আমরা এই সমস্যার সামনে যাচ্ছি। আমরা প্রস্তাব করি একটি সেকেন্ড বিভাগের ক্লাসাফিকেশনের ক্ষেত্রে যেখানে একটি প্যারাফ এবং একটি উল্লেখের জন্য, আমরা এই উল্লেখের আমরা বৈজ্ঞানিক ডোমেইন থেকে গ্রহণ করা বেসাইনের বিরুদ্ধে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার তুলনা করি, যেখানে আমরা সকল মূল্যায়ন মেটিকের উন্নতি দেখাচ্', 'az': 'Müəyyənləşdirmək Wikipediyadakı əsas düzəltmə принциplerindən biridir, orada editorlar eklənmiş məlumatı üçün sitayiş etmək məqsədilə təşkil edilirlər. Wikipedia məktubumu kimin məlumatların çəkiləcəyini belə təsdiqləyən bir məsələn üçün, yaxud məlumatların müəyyən ediləcəyini belə təsdiqləyən bir məlumat üçündür. Biz Wikipedia məktullarında müəyyən edilmə müddətini çəkirik. Biz bu problem ə yaxınlaşırıq, mətndə hansı mətn parçalarının örtülülüyünü və ya doğruluğunu təsdiqləyib. Biz bir parraf və bir məlumat üçün sıralama sıralama tərzini təbliğ edirik, bir parraf və bir məlumat tərzini yaxınlaşdırırıq. Biz həmin təcrübə müəyyən edilən təcrübə müqabiliyyətindən alınan ilmi sətirlərlə qarşılaşdırırıq və bütün təcrübə metriklərinin yaxşılıqlarını göstəririk.', 'ko': '검증 가능성은 위키백과의 핵심 편집 원칙 중 하나로 위키백과는 편집이 추가된 내용에 인용을 제공하도록 장려한다.한 편의 위키백과 글에서 인용문에 포함된 내용이나 인용문의 경계를 확정하는 것은 작은 일이 아니다. 이것은 덮어쓰지 않은 내용을 자동으로 인용하거나 사실 평가하는 중요한 부분이다.우리는 위키백과 문장에서 인용의 경계를 확정하는 문제를 해결했다.우리는 한 편의 문장에서 어떤 텍스트 부분이 인용되거나 인용이 정확한지 분류함으로써 이 문제를 해결한다.우리는 단락과 인용문에 대해 세립도 단계에서 인용문의 경계를 확정하는 서열 분류 방법을 제시했다.우리는 철저한 실험 평가를 제공했고 우리의 방법과 과학 분야가 채택한 기선을 비교했다. 과학 분야에서 우리는 모든 평가 지표의 개선을 보여 주었다.', 'ca': "La verifiabilitat és un dels principis fonamentals d'edició a Wikipedia, on els editors s s'estimen a proporcionar citacions pel contingut afegit. Per a un article de Wikipedia que determina quin contingut està cobert per una citació o l'interval de citació no és trivial, un aspecte important per a la troba automatitzada de citacions per contingut descobert, o valoracions de fets. Ens ocupem del problema de determinar l'espai de citació dels articles de Wikipedia. Ens aproximam a aquest problema classificant quins fragments textuals en un article estan coberts o tenen veritat amb una citació. Proposem un enfocament de classificació de seqüència en el qual, per un paràgraf i una citació, determinem l'interval de citació a un nivell de grans fins. Oferecem una evaluació experimental detallada i comparem el nostre enfocament amb les línies de base adoptades del domini científic, on demostram millor per a totes les mètriques d'evaluació.", 'bs': 'Verifikacija je jedna od osnovnih načela editiranja u Wikipediji, gdje se urednici ohrabruju da pruže citacije za dodatni sadržaj. Za Wikipedijski članak koji utvrđuje što je sadržaj pokriven citacijom ili procjenom ciklusa nije trivial, važan aspekt za automatski pronalazak ciklusa za otkriven sadržaj ili procjenu činjenica. Mi riješimo problem određivanja razdoblja ciljanja u člancima Wikipedije. Približavamo se ovom problemu klasifikacijom kojih tekstualnih delimenata u članku se pokrivaju ili držimo istinu s obzirom na cilj. Predlažemo klasifikacijski pristup sekvenciji gdje za paragraf i citaciju određujemo određeni udarac na vrhunskom nivou. Mi pružamo temeljnu eksperimentalnu procjenu i uspoređujemo naš pristup prema osnovnim linijama usvojenim iz znanstvenih domena, gdje pokazujemo poboljšanje za sve procjene metrika.', 'cs': 'Ověřitelnost je jedním ze základních editačních principů Wikipedie, kde jsou editoři vyzýváni, aby poskytovali citace k přidanému obsahu. Pro článek Wikipedie určení, který obsah je pokrytý citací nebo citační rozpětí není triviální, což je důležitý aspekt pro automatizované vyhledávání citací pro neodhalený obsah nebo posouzení faktů. Řešíme problém stanovení citačního rozpětí v článcích Wikipedie. K tomuto problému přistupujeme klasifikací, které textové fragmenty v článku jsou pokryty nebo považovány za pravdivé při citaci. Navrhujeme přístup klasifikace sekvencí, kde pro odstavec a citaci stanovíme rozsah citace na jemné úrovni. Poskytujeme důkladné experimentální vyhodnocení a porovnáváme náš přístup s výchozími liniemi přijatými z vědecké oblasti, kde ukazujeme zlepšení všech hodnotících metrik.', 'et': 'Kontrollitavus on üks peamisi redigeerimispõhimõtteid Wikipedias, kus toimetajaid julgustatakse lisatud sisule tsitaate esitama. Vikipeedia artikli jaoks, mis määrab kindlaks, millist sisu tsitaat või tsitaatide ulatus kaetakse, ei ole triviaalne, oluline aspekt automatiseeritud tsitaatide leidmisel avamata sisu või faktide hindamisel. Me käsitleme tsitaatide ulatuse määramise probleemi Wikipedia artiklites. Läheneme sellele probleemile liigitades, millised tekstifragmendid artiklis on kaetud või peavad tõeseks tsitaati. Me pakume välja järjestuse klassifitseerimise lähenemisviisi, kus lõigu ja tsitaati jaoks määrame tsitaatide ulatuse peenrahalisel tasandil. Pakume põhjalikku eksperimentaalset hindamist ja võrdleme oma lähenemisviisi teadusvaldkonnas kasutusele võetud lähtejoontega, kus näitame paranemist kõigi hindamismeetikate puhul.', 'fi': 'Varmistettavuus on yksi Wikipedian keskeisistä muokkausperiaatteista, joissa toimittajia kannustetaan antamaan viittauksia lisättyyn sisältöön. Wikipedia-artikkelissa ei ole vähäpätöistä määritellä, mitä sisältöä viittaus kattaa tai mitä sitaattien laajuus on, vaan se on tärkeä osa automaattista sitaattien etsimistä paljastamattomalle sisällölle tai faktojen arvioinnille. Käsittelemme Wikipedian artikkeleissa lainausajan määrittämistä koskevaa ongelmaa. Lähestymme tätä ongelmaa luokittelemalla, mitkä tekstifragmentit artikkelissa käsitellään tai pidetään paikkansa lainauksen perusteella. Ehdotamme sekvenssiluokitusmenetelmää, jossa kappaleen ja lainauksen osalta määritämme lainauksen laajuuden hienojakoisella tasolla. Teemme perusteellisen kokeellisen arvioinnin ja vertaamme lähestymistapaamme tieteen alalla omaksuttuihin lähtökohtiin, joissa osoitamme parannusta kaikissa arviointimittareissa.', 'ha': "@ title: window @ info: whatsthis Munã tambaya masu zartar da wajen rabon maganar ta cikin makala na Wikimedia. Munã kusantar da wannan mataimaki da za'a bayyana wanne takardar rubutu cikin wani makala da aka rufe su ko kuma mu riƙe wani alama da gaske. Tuna goyya da wata matsayi mai fassara na dabam, inda za'a iya samu wata na tabaka da cire, za'a ƙayyade cewa misalin ta cikin daraja mai kyau. Tuna samar jarrabi masu inganci kuma munã samfani hanyoyinmu a kanzu misãlai da aka karɓi daga akan da aka sani, a inda Muke nũna mafiya amfani ga dukkan misãlai.", 'he': 'האמת היא אחת העקרונות העורכים העיקריים בוויקיפדיה, שבו עורכים מעודדים לספק ציטוטים לתוכן המווסף. עבור מאמר ויקיפדיה שמקבל איזה תוכן מכוסה על ידי ציטוט או מגוון ציטוט אינו טריוויאלי, אפקט חשוב למצוא ציטוט אוטומטי עבור תוכן חשוב, או הערכות עובדות. אנחנו מתמודדים עם הבעיה של לקבוע את מגוון הציטור במאמרים בוויקיפדיה. אנחנו מתקרבים לבעיה הזאת בכך שאנחנו מסווגים אילו חלקיקים טקסטאליים במאמר מכוסים או מחזיקים את האמת בהתחשב בציטוט. אנו מציעים גישה מסווג רצף שבו עבור פסק וציטור, אנו קובעים את מגוון הציטור ברמה גבוהה. אנחנו מספקים עריכה ניסיונית יסודית ושווה את הגישה שלנו עם קווי הבסיס מאומצים מתחום המדעי, שבו אנחנו מראים שיפור לכל מטריות הערכה.', 'sk': 'Preverljivost je eno od temeljnih načel urejanja Wikipedije, kjer urednike spodbujamo, da navedejo navedbe za dodano vsebino. Za Wikipedijski članek, ki določa, katera vsebina je zajeta s citatom ali obseg citatov, ni trivialen, pomemben vidik za avtomatizirano iskanje citatov za odkrito vsebino ali oceno dejstev. V Wikipedijinih člankih obravnavamo problem določanja obsega citatov. Temu problemu pristopimo tako, da razvrstimo, kateri besedilni fragmenti v članku so zajeti ali veljajo glede na citat. Predlagamo pristop klasifikacije zaporedja, kjer za odstavek in citat določimo obseg citatov na drobnozrnati ravni. Zagotavljamo temeljito eksperimentalno vrednotenje in primerjamo naš pristop z osnovnimi vrednostmi, sprejetimi z znanstvenega področja, kjer pokažemo izboljšave pri vseh meritvah vrednotenja.', 'jv': 'Where editor are available Genjer neng wiipeda urip kuwi nggawe barang nggawe Ngubah apa or a tribalekan winih, Aspek dhéwé nggawe otomatik seneng nggawe barang nggawe Ndoleh nggawe ora bisa nggawe winih. Awakdhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo nggawe Ngubah nggawe geranggap kanggo Artik Wipediya. Anyone Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem Sekonder kelas barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas, kita gewiser perintah kuwi nggawe barang bonne. We nyengke sistem punika di aturan pilihan nggawe praksi karo perusahaan kelas kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas kuwi tindang Sayensi, ingkang awak dhéwé nyenggawe nggawe barang nggawe asserti Metika.', 'bo': 'ཞིབ་དག་བྱེད་རུང་ནི་Wikipedia ནང་གི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སའི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དག་གི་གཅིག་རེད། Wikipedia་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དོན་ཅི་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་བཀོད་པ་མིན་འདུག། ང་ཚོས་Wikipedia་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏོང་བ་དེ་གླེང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག We propose a sequence classification approach where for a paragraph and a citation, we determine the span at a fine-grain level. We provide a thorough experimental evaluation and compare our approach against baselines adopted from the scientific domain, where we show improvement for all evaluation metrics.'}
{'en': 'Identifying Semantic Edit Intentions from Revisions in Wikipedia', 'ar': 'تحديد نوايا التحرير الدلالية من المراجعات في ويكيبيديا', 'es': 'Identificación de intenciones de edición semántica a partir de revisiones en Wikipedia', 'fr': 'Identifier les intentions de modification sémantique à partir des révisions dans', 'pt': 'Identificando intenções de edição semântica de revisões na Wikipedia', 'ja': 'ウィキペディアの改訂からセマンティック編集の意図を特定する', 'zh': '识维基百科中语义编辑意', 'hi': 'विकिपीडिया में संशोधन से शब्दार्थ संपादन इरादों की पहचान करना', 'ru': 'Идентификация семантических намерений редактирования из редакций в Википедии', 'ga': 'Cuspóirí Eagar Séimeantach a Aithint ó Athbhreithnithe ar Vicipéid', 'el': 'Προσδιορισμός των προθέσεων της Σηματικής Επεξεργασίας από αναθεωρήσεις στη Βικιπαίδεια', 'ka': 'სემენტიკური რედაქტირების ინტენტიციების განსაზღვრება ვიკიპედიაში', 'hu': 'Szemantikus szerkesztési szándékok azonosítása a Wikipédiában', 'it': 'Identificare le intenzioni di modifica semantica dalle revisioni in Wikipedia', 'kk': 'Википедиядағы редакциялардың семантикалық өңдеу қатесін анықтау', 'lt': 'Vikipedijos peržiūrų Semantinio redagavimo ketinimų nustatymas', 'mk': 'Идентификување на семантични намери за уредување од ревизиите на Википедија', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tal-Intenzjonijiet ta’ Edizzjoni Semantika minn Reviżjonijiet fil-Wikipedia', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti niat Sunting Semantik dari Revisi di Wikipedia', 'ml': 'വിക്കിപിഡിയയിലെ റിവിഷനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമാന്റിക് ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ശ്രദ്ധ തിരിച്ചറ', 'mn': 'Википедийн шинэчлэлүүдийн Semantic Edit Intension-г мэдэх', 'pl': 'Identyfikowanie intencji edycji semantycznych z poprawek w Wikipedii', 'no': 'Identifiserer semantiske redigeringsintensjonar frå revisjonar i Wikipedia', 'ro': 'Identificarea intențiilor de editare semantică din revizii în Wikipedia', 'sr': 'Identifikovanje semantičkih redaktnih intenzija iz revizija u Wikipedia', 'sv': 'Identifiera semantiska Redigera avsikter från revideringar i Wikipedia', 'so': 'Identifying Semantic Edit Intentions from Revisions in Wikipedia', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'ویکیپیڈیا میں ریویزونशन سے سیمنٹی ویڈیٹ ایٹنسیون شناسایی کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm tỉ lệ sửa Đối tượng từ các buổi phỏng vấn trên Wikipedia.', 'da': 'Identificering af Semantiske Redigeringshensigter fra revisioner i Wikipedia, den frie encyklopædi', 'nl': 'Identificeren van semantische bewerkintenties uit herzieningen in Wikipedia', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на намеренията за семантично редактиране от ревизии в Уикипедия', 'ko': '위키백과 수정에서 의미 편집 의도를 식별하다', 'fa': 'شناسایی هوشمندانه\u200cهای ویکیپدیا ویکیپادیا', 'hr': 'Identifikacija semantičkih redaktnih intenzija iz revizija u Wikipedia', 'id': 'Identifikasi Intensi Edit Semantik dari Revisi di Wikipedia', 'tr': "Wikipedia'da Revisiýalardan Semantik Edit çi Görnömlerini tanyşdyrylýar", 'de': 'Identifizierung von semantischen Bearbeitungsabsichten aus Revisionen in Wikipedia', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i Intentioneve të Ndryshimit Semantik nga Revisionet në Wikipedia', 'am': 'በWikipedia ውስጥ የስሜናክኛ አስተካክል ማቀናጃ አስተያየት', 'az': "Wikipedia'daki Revisionl톛rd톛n Semantik D칲zenleme 캻stin톛l톛rini t톛sdiql톛yici", 'sw': 'Kutambua hisia za kuhariri kimapenzi kutoka Mapinduzi ya Wikipedia', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'উইকিপিডিয়ার রিভিশন থেকে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পাদনার অনুভূতি পরিচিত করা হবে', 'ca': "Identificar intencions d'edició Semàtica de revisions a Wikipedia", 'bs': 'Identifikacija semantičkih redaktnih intenzija iz revizija na Wikipedia', 'et': 'Semantilise redigeerimise kavatsuste tuvastamine Vikipeedia redaktsioonide põhjal', 'cs': 'Identifikace sémantických úprav z revizí ve Wikipedii', 'fi': 'Semanttisten muokkausaikomusten tunnistaminen Wikipedian versioista', 'jv': 'tutorial_basic', 'he': 'מזהה כוונות עורכת סמנטית משיקופדיה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Opredelitev namenov semantičnega urejanja iz revizij v Wikipediji', 'bo': 'Wikipedia ནང་གི་བསྐྱར་ཞིབ་ཕྱེད་ནས་semantic Edit Intension ་བསམ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Most studies on human editing focus merely on syntactic revision operations, failing to capture the intentions behind revision changes, which are essential for facilitating the single and collaborative writing process. In this work, we develop in collaboration with Wikipedia editors a 13-category taxonomy of the semantic intention behind edits in Wikipedia articles. Using labeled article edits, we build a computational classifier of intentions that achieved a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.621. We use this model to investigate edit intention effectiveness : how different types of edits predict the retention of newcomers and changes in the quality of articles, two key concerns for Wikipedia today. Our analysis shows that the types of edits that users make in their first session predict their subsequent survival as Wikipedia editors, and articles in different stages need different types of edits.', 'ar': 'تركز معظم الدراسات حول التحرير البشري فقط على عمليات المراجعة النحوية ، والفشل في التقاط النوايا الكامنة وراء تغييرات المراجعة ، والتي تعتبر ضرورية لتسهيل عملية الكتابة الفردية والتعاونية. في هذا العمل ، نطور بالتعاون مع محرري ويكيبيديا تصنيفًا من 13 فئة للنية الدلالية وراء التعديلات في مقالات ويكيبيديا. باستخدام تعديلات المقالات المصنفة ، فإننا نبني مصنفًا حسابيًا للنوايا حقق درجة F1 متوسطة الحجم تبلغ 0.621. نستخدم هذا النموذج للتحقيق في فعالية نية التحرير: كيف تتنبأ أنواع مختلفة من التعديلات بالاحتفاظ بالوافدين الجدد والتغييرات في جودة المقالات ، وهما شاغلان رئيسيان لـ Wikipedia اليوم. يوضح تحليلنا أن أنواع التعديلات التي يقوم بها المستخدمون في جلستهم الأولى تتنبأ ببقائهم التالي كمحررين على Wikipedia ، وأن المقالات في المراحل المختلفة تحتاج إلى أنواع مختلفة من التعديلات.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los estudios sobre la edición humana se centran únicamente en las operaciones de revisión sintáctica, ya que no captan las intenciones detrás de los cambios de revisión, que son esenciales para facilitar el proceso de escritura única y colaborativa. En este trabajo, desarrollamos en colaboración con los editores de Wikipedia una taxonomía de 13 categorías de la intención semántica detrás de las ediciones en los artículos de Wikipedia. Utilizando ediciones de artículos etiquetados, creamos un clasificador computacional de intenciones que logró una puntuación F1 micropromediada de 0.621. Utilizamos este modelo para investigar la eficacia de la intención de edición: cómo los diferentes tipos de ediciones predicen la retención de los recién llegados y los cambios en la calidad de los artículos, dos preocupaciones clave para Wikipedia hoy en día. Nuestro análisis muestra que los tipos de ediciones que los usuarios realizan en su primera sesión predicen su supervivencia posterior como editores de Wikipedia, y los artículos en diferentes etapas necesitan diferentes tipos de ediciones.', 'fr': "La plupart des études sur l'édition humaine se concentrent uniquement sur les opérations de révision syntaxiques, ne saisissant pas les intentions qui sous-tendent les changements de révision, qui sont essentiels pour faciliter le processus d'écriture unique et collaboratif. Dans ce travail, nous développons en collaboration avec les éditeurs de Wikipédia une taxonomie à 13 catégories de l'intention sémantique derrière les modifications dans les articles Wikipédia. À l'aide de modifications d'articles étiquetés, nous créons un classificateur informatique des intentions qui a obtenu un score F1 micro-moyen de 0,621. Nous utilisons ce modèle pour étudier l'efficacité de l'intention de modification\xa0: comment différents types de modifications prédisent la rétention des nouveaux arrivants et les changements dans la qualité des articles, deux préoccupations majeures pour Wikipédia aujourd'hui. Notre analyse montre que les types de modifications que les utilisateurs apportent lors de leur première session prédisent leur survie ultérieure en tant qu'éditeurs Wikipédia, et que les articles à différentes étapes nécessitent différents types de modifications.", 'pt': 'A maioria dos estudos sobre edição humana se concentra apenas nas operações de revisão sintática, deixando de capturar as intenções por trás das mudanças de revisão, que são essenciais para facilitar o processo de escrita única e colaborativa. Neste trabalho, desenvolvemos em colaboração com os editores da Wikipédia uma taxonomia de 13 categorias da intenção semântica por trás das edições em artigos da Wikipédia. Usando edições de artigos rotulados, construímos um classificador computacional de intenções que alcançou uma pontuação F1 micromédia de 0,621. Usamos esse modelo para investigar a eficácia da intenção de edição: como diferentes tipos de edições preveem a retenção de recém-chegados e mudanças na qualidade dos artigos, duas preocupações principais para a Wikipedia hoje. Nossa análise mostra que os tipos de edições que os usuários fazem em sua primeira sessão predizem sua sobrevivência subsequente como editores da Wikipédia, e artigos em diferentes estágios precisam de diferentes tipos de edições.', 'ja': '人間による編集に関するほとんどの研究は、単一の共同執筆プロセスを促進するために不可欠な、改訂変更の背後にある意図を捉えることができず、構文改訂操作にのみ焦点を当てている。本作では、ウィキペディアの編集者と共同で、ウィキペディアの記事の編集の背後にある意味論的意図の13カテゴリーの分類法を開発している。ラベル付けされた記事編集を使用して、0.621のマイクロ平均F 1スコアを達成した意図の計算分類器を構築します。このモデルを使用して、編集意図の効果を調査しています。さまざまなタイプの編集が新人の定着と記事の質の変化を予測する方法は、現在のウィキペディアにとって2つの重要な懸念事項です。当社の分析によると、ユーザーが最初のセッションで行った編集の種類は、ウィキペディア編集者としてのその後の生存を予測しており、異なる段階の記事には異なるタイプの編集が必要です。', 'zh': '大抵人工编辑,惟关注句法修操作,未能捕改后意,其于单一协作之要也。 此与维基百科编辑者合作开发一13类分类法,施于维基百科条目编辑背语义意。 用标文编辑,构一意计分类器,遂0.621微均F1分数。 臣等以此访辑意有效性:异类何以卜新人之存文,此今之维基百科二关键问题也。 臣等之分析表明,用户首会话中所辑为维基百科编辑者续生,而异端之文须异类。', 'hi': 'मानव संपादन पर अधिकांश अध्ययन केवल वाक्यात्मक संशोधन संचालन पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जो संशोधन परिवर्तनों के पीछे के इरादों को पकड़ने में विफल रहते हैं, जो एकल और सहयोगी लेखन प्रक्रिया को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए आवश्यक हैं। इस कार्य में, हम विकिपीडिया संपादकों के सहयोग से विकिपीडिया लेखों में संपादन के पीछे शब्दार्थ इरादे की 13-श्रेणी वर्गीकरण विकसित करते हैं। लेबल लेख संपादन का उपयोग करते हुए, हम इरादों का एक कम्प्यूटेशनल क्लासिफायर बनाते हैं जिसने 0.621 का माइक्रो-औसत F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किया। हम संपादन इरादे प्रभावशीलता की जांच करने के लिए इस मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं: कैसे विभिन्न प्रकार के संपादन नए लोगों के प्रतिधारण और लेखों की गुणवत्ता में परिवर्तन की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, आज विकिपीडिया के लिए दो प्रमुख चिंताएं हैं। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि उपयोगकर्ता अपने पहले सत्र में जो संपादन करते हैं, वे विकिपीडिया संपादकों के रूप में अपने बाद के अस्तित्व की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं, और विभिन्न चरणों में लेखों को विभिन्न प्रकार के संपादनों की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ru': 'В большинстве исследований по редактированию человеком основное внимание уделяется только синтаксическим операциям по пересмотру, но не отражены намерения, лежащие в основе изменений в пересмотре, которые имеют важное значение для облегчения единого и совместного процесса написания. В этой работе мы в сотрудничестве с редакторами Википедии разрабатываем 13-категориальную таксономию смыслового замысла правок в статьях Википедии. Используя маркированные правки статей, мы создаем вычислительный классификатор намерений, который достигает микросреднего балла F1 0,621. Мы используем эту модель для исследования эффективности намерения редактирования: как различные типы правок предсказывают удержание новичков и изменения в качестве статей, две ключевые проблемы для Википедии сегодня. Наш анализ показывает, что типы правок, которые пользователи делают на первом сеансе, предсказывают их последующее выживание, так как редакторы Википедии, а статьи на разных этапах нуждаются в разных типах правок.', 'ga': "Díríonn an chuid is mó de na staidéir ar eagarthóireacht dhaonna ar oibríochtaí athbhreithnithe comhréire amháin, gan na hintinn atá taobh thiar d'athruithe athbhreithnithe a ghabháil, rud atá riachtanach chun an próiseas scríbhneoireachta aonair agus comhoibríoch a éascú. Sa saothar seo, forbraímid i gcomhar le heagarthóirí Vicipéid tacsanomaíocht 13 chatagóir den rún shéimeantach taobh thiar d’athruithe in ailt Vicipéide. Ag baint úsáide as athruithe alt lipéadaithe, tógaimid aicmitheoir ríomhaireachtúil intinn a bhain amach scór micrea-mheánmhéid F1 de 0.621. Bainimid úsáid as an múnla seo chun iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar éifeachtúlacht rún eagarthóireachta: an chaoi a ndéanann cineálacha éagsúla athruithe a thuar coinneáil daoine nua agus athruithe ar cháilíocht na n-alt, dhá phríomhábhar imní do Vicipéid inniu. Léiríonn ár n-anailís go ndéanann na cineálacha athruithe a dhéanann úsáideoirí ina gcéad seisiún a thuar go mairfidh siad ina dhiaidh sin mar eagarthóirí Vicipéid, agus is gá cineálacha éagsúla eagarthóireacht a dhéanamh ar ailt ag céimeanna éagsúla.", 'ka': 'ბევრად ადამიანის რედაქტირებაზე მხოლოდ სინტაქტიური რედაქტირების პერაციაზე კონუქტირება, რომელიც რედაქტირების ცვლილების შემდეგ მინდომები არ შეუძლებელია, რომელიც უფრო მნი ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ვიკიპედიის რედაქტორებით ერთადერთად განვითარებთ 13-კატეგორია ტექტონომია სემონტიკური საზოგადოება ვიკიპედიაში რედაქტორების შემდეგ. ჩვენ კომპუტაციალური კლასიფიკაციაციის კლასიფიკაციას გამოყენებთ, რომელიც მიკრო საშუალური F1 წერტილის 0.621 წერტილის მიღება. ჩვენ ამ მოდელს გამოყენებთ, როგორ განსხვავებული რედაქტირების ტიპები წარმოიდგინენ ახალი მოვლენების შესახებ და შეცვლების წარმოდგინობაში, დღეს ვიკიპედიაზე ორი კლავიური დარწმუნება ჩვენი ანალიზია, რომ მომხმარებელი პირველი სეციაში გავაკეთებენ შემდეგ გადარჩენა როგორც ვიკიპედია რედაქტორები და განსხვავებული სეციაში განსხვავებული ტიპი რედაქტორები იჭირდება.', 'hu': 'Az emberi szerkesztésről szóló tanulmányok többsége pusztán a szintaktikus felülvizsgálati műveletekre összpontosít, nem tudja megragadni a felülvizsgálati változások mögötti szándékokat, amelyek elengedhetetlenek az egységes és együttműködő írási folyamat megkönnyítéséhez. Ebben a munkában a Wikipédia szerkesztőivel együttműködve kidolgozunk egy 13 kategóriás taxonómiát a Wikipédia szerkesztések mögötti szemantikai szándékokról. A címkézett cikkszerkesztések segítségével olyan számítástechnikai osztályozót készítünk, amely 0,621 mikroátlagos F1 pontszámot ért el. Ezt a modellt arra használjuk, hogy megvizsgáljuk a szerkesztési szándék hatékonyságát: hogyan jósolják meg a különböző típusú szerkesztések az újonnan érkezők megtartását és a cikkek minőségében bekövetkező változásokat, ami két kulcsfontosságú probléma ma a Wikipédia számára. Elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy a felhasználók által az első munkamenet során végzett szerkesztések típusai előrejelzik, hogy a Wikipédia szerkesztőként való további túlélésüket, és a különböző szakaszokban lévő cikkek különböző típusú szerkesztéseket igényelnek.', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες μελέτες για την ανθρώπινη επεξεργασία επικεντρώνονται μόνο σε συντακτικές διαδικασίες αναθεώρησης, αποτυγχάνοντας να αποτυπώσουν τις προθέσεις πίσω από τις αλλαγές αναθεώρησης, οι οποίες είναι απαραίτητες για τη διευκόλυνση της ενιαίας και συνεργατικής διαδικασίας γραφής. Σε αυτό το έργο, αναπτύσσουμε σε συνεργασία με τους συντάκτες της Βικιπαίδειας μια 13-κατηγορηματική ταξινομία της σημασιολογικής πρόθεσης πίσω από τις επεξεργασίες σε άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας. Χρησιμοποιώντας επεξεργασίες ετικετών άρθρων, κατασκευάζουμε έναν υπολογιστικό ταξινομητή προθέσεων που πέτυχε μια μικρομεσαία βαθμολογία F1 0.621. Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτό το μοντέλο για να διερευνήσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της πρόθεσης επεξεργασίας: πώς διαφορετικά είδη επεξεργασιών προβλέπουν τη διατήρηση νεοεισερχομένων και αλλαγές στην ποιότητα των άρθρων, δύο βασικές ανησυχίες για τη Βικιπαίδεια σήμερα. Η ανάλυση μας δείχνει ότι οι τύποι επεξεργασιών που κάνουν οι χρήστες στην πρώτη τους συνεδρία προβλέπουν την επακόλουθη επιβίωσή τους ως συντάκτες της Βικιπαίδειας και τα άρθρα σε διαφορετικά στάδια χρειάζονται διαφορετικούς τύπους επεξεργασιών.', 'it': "La maggior parte degli studi sull'editing umano si concentra solo sulle operazioni di revisione sintattica, non riuscendo a catturare le intenzioni dietro i cambiamenti di revisione, che sono essenziali per facilitare il processo di scrittura singola e collaborativa. In questo lavoro, sviluppiamo in collaborazione con gli editori di Wikipedia una tassonomia di 13 categorie dell'intenzione semantica dietro le modifiche negli articoli di Wikipedia. Utilizzando modifiche di articoli etichettati, costruiamo un classificatore computazionale delle intenzioni che ha ottenuto un punteggio F1 micro-medio di 0,621. Usiamo questo modello per indagare l'efficacia delle intenzioni di modifica: come diversi tipi di modifiche prevedano la conservazione dei nuovi arrivati e cambiamenti nella qualità degli articoli, due preoccupazioni chiave per Wikipedia oggi. La nostra analisi mostra che i tipi di modifiche che gli utenti fanno nella loro prima sessione predicono la loro successiva sopravvivenza come redattori di Wikipedia, e gli articoli in diverse fasi necessitano di diversi tipi di modifiche.", 'lt': 'Most studies on human editing focus merely on syntactic revision operations, failing to capture the intentions behind revision changes, which are essential for facilitating the single and collaborative writing process.  Šiame darbe, bendradarbiaudami su Wikipedia redaktoriais, kuriame 13 kategorijų taksonomiją, kurios semantinis ketinimas yra Wikipedia straipsniuose. Naudodami etiketėmis pažymėtus straipsnius, sukuriame skaičiavimo ketinimų klasifikatorių, kuris pasiekė mikrovidutinį F1 tašką 0,621. Naudojame šį model į ketinimų redakcijos veiksmingumui ištirti: kaip įvairių tipų redakcijos prognozuoja naujų atvykusių asmenų išlaikymą ir straipsnių kokybės pokyčius, du pagrindiniai Wikipediai rūpesčiai šiandien. Mūsų analizė rodo, kad redakcijų tipai, kuriuos vartotojai daro pirmojoje sesijoje, numato jų tolesnį išgyvenimą kaip Wikipedia redaktoriai, o skirtinguose etapuose dirbtiniams reikia skirtingų tipų redakcijų.', 'kk': 'Адам өңдеу туралы зерттеулердің көпшілігі тек синтактикалық редакциялау операцияларына көмектесіп, редакциялау өзгерістердің артындағы мақсаттарын түсінбейді. Бұл жалғыз және бі Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз Википедия редакторларымен 13 санаттық таксономиясын Википедия мақалаларындағы редакторлардың артындағы семантикалық мақсаттарының артында жасап жатырмыз. Мақаланың өңдеулерін қолданып, микро орташа F1 нөмірі 0,621 деп жеткізетін мақсаттарды есептеу классификаторын құрамыз. Біз бұл үлгісін өзгерту мақсатының эффективнілігін зерттеу үшін қолданамыз: жаңа кездерді қалай түрлі өзгертуге және мақалалардың сапатын қалай өзгертуге болады. Бүгін Википедия ү Біздің анализиямыз, пайдаланушылардың алғашқы сеанста жасаған өзгертулер түрлері Википедия редакторы ретінде өзінің кейінгі өзгертулерін алдын алады, және мақалалардың түрлері түрлі өзгертулер', 'mk': 'Повеќето студии за човечко уредување се фокусираат само на синтактичките ревизиски операции, не ги сфатија намерите зад ревизиските промени, кои се суштински за олеснување на процесот на едноставно и соработно пишување. Во оваа работа, во соработка со уредниците на Википедија развиваме таксономија од 13 категории на семантичната намера зад уредниците во статиите на Википедија. Користејќи обележани уредувања на статии, градиме компјутативни класификатори на намери кои постигнаа микро-просечна оценка F1 од 0,621. Ние го користиме овој модел за да ја испитаме ефикасноста на уредувањето на намерата: како различните типови на уредувања предвидуваат задржување на новите доаѓачи и промени во квалитетот на написите, две клучни загрижености за Википедија денес. Our analysis shows that the types of edits that users make in their first session predict their subsequent survival as Wikipedia editors, and articles in different stages need different types of edits.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ ചിട്ടപ്രകാരം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ പിന്നിലുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ഉദ്ദേശം പിടികൂടുന്നതില്\u200d മാത്രമേ  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, വിക്കിപിഡിയ എഡിറ്ററുകളുടെ കൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സഹകരിക്കുന്നു. വിക്കിപിഡിയയിലെ എഡിറ്ററുകളുടെ പിന്നിലുള്ള ഒരു 13-വിഭാഗ ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത കല്ലിക എഡിറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് 0.  ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുവാനുള്ള ഉദ്ദേശം പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എഡിറ്ററുകള്\u200d എത്ര വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം മാറ്റുന്നുണ്ടെന്നും പ്രവച Our analysis shows that the types of edits that users make in their first session predict their subsequent survival as Wikipedia editors, and articles in different stages need different types of edits.', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-istudji dwar l-edizzjoni tal-bniedem jiffokaw biss fuq operazzjonijiet ta’ reviżjoni sintattika, li ma jaqbdux l-intenzjonijiet wara l-bidliet fir-reviżjoni, li huma essenzjali għall-iffaċilitar tal-proċess uniku u kollaborattiv tal-kitba. In this work, we develop in collaboration with Wikipedia editors a 13-category taxonomy of the semantic intention behind edits in Wikipedia articles.  Bl-użu ta’ editjar ta’ oġġetti ttikkettati, a ħna nibnu klassifikatur komputattiv ta’ intenzjonijiet li kisbu punteġġ F1 mikromedjat ta’ 0.621. Aħna nużaw dan il-mudell biex ninvestigaw l-effettività tal-editjar tal-intenzjoni: kif tipi differenti ta’ editjar jipprevedu ż-żamma ta’ dawk li jkunu għadhom kif waslu u bidliet fil-kwalità tal-artikoli, żewġ tħassib ewlieni għall-Wikipedia llum. L-analiżi tagħna turi li t-tipi ta’ edits li l-utenti jagħmlu fl-ewwel sessjoni tagħhom jipprevedu s-sopravivenza sussegwenti tagħhom bħala edituri tal-Wikipedia, u l-artikoli fi stadji differenti jeħtieġu tipi differenti ta’ edits.', 'ms': 'Most studies on human editing focus merely on syntactic revision operations, failing to capture the intentions behind revision changes, which are essential for facilitating the single and collaborative writing process.  Dalam kerja ini, kami mengembangkan dalam kerjasama dengan penyunting Wikipedia taksonomi kategori 13 tujuan semantik di belakang penyunting dalam artikel Wikipedia. Dengan menggunakan edit artikel yang ditabel, kami membina pengiraan niat yang mencapai skor F1 berrata-rata mikro 0.621. Kami menggunakan model ini untuk menyelidiki keefektivitas niat edit: bagaimana jenis edit berbeza meramalkan penyimpanan orang baru dan perubahan kualiti artikel, dua masalah kunci untuk Wikipedia hari ini. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa jenis edit yang pengguna buat dalam sesi pertama mereka meramalkan keselamatan mereka berikutnya sebagai penyunting Wikipedia, dan artikel dalam tahap berbeza memerlukan jenis edit yang berbeza.', 'no': 'Dei fleste studiane om menneske redigering fokuserer berre på syntaktiske revisjon- operasjonar. Klarte ikkje henta vilkåra bak endringar av revisjon, som er viktig for å gjere enkelt og samarbeidsgrensesprosessen. I dette arbeidet utviklar vi i samarbeid med Wikipedia-redigeringar ein 13-kategoritaxonomi av den semantiske intensjonen bak redigeringar i Wikipedia-artiklar. Bruk merkelige artikkel- redigeringar, bygger vi ein dataklassifisering av vilkåra som oppnådd eit mikro gjennomsnittleg F1- poeng med 0,621. Vi bruker denne modellen for å undersøke effektiviteten for redigering: korleis ulike typar redigeringar foregår retning av nye kommander og endringar i kvaliteten av artiklar, to nøkkeloppgave for Wikipedia i dag. Analysen vårt viser at typane redigeringar som brukarar gjer i dei første økta, foregår dei etterfølgjande overlevinga som Wikipediaredigeringar, og artiklar i ulike stader treng ulike typar redigeringar.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хүн төрөлхтний редакцийн судалгаа зөвхөн синтактик шинэчлэлийн үйл ажиллагаанд анхаарлаа хандуулж, шинэчлэлийн өөрчлөлтийн дараа зорилго авахгүй байдаг. Энэ нь ганц, хамтран ажилладаг бичих үйл ажиллаг Энэ ажил дээр бид Википедийн редакторуудтай хамтран ажиллаж байна. Википедийн зохиолуудын дараах шинэ зорилго нь 13-р ангийнхаа татекономикийн санаа юм. Бид бичил дундаж F1 тоо 0.621 хүртэл хүргэсэн санаануудын тооцоологч бүтээж байна. Бид энэ загварыг хэрхэн шинэ ирсэн хүмүүсийн хадгалж, баримтуудын сайн сайн өөрчлөлт, өнөөдөр Wikipedia-д хоёр чухал асуудал гэж судалж байна. Бидний шинжилгээнд хэрэглэгчид анхны хичээл дээр хийсэн төрлийн захирагчид дараагийн үлдсэн амьдралыг Википедиа захирагчид болгож таамагладаг. Өөр хэмжээнд бичсэн бүтээлүүд өөр төрлийн захирагчид хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'Większość badań dotyczących edycji człowieka koncentruje się jedynie na składniowych operacjach rewizji, nie potrafiąc uchwycić intencji stojących za zmianami rewizji, które są niezbędne dla ułatwienia pojedynczego i współpracy procesu pisania. W niniejszej pracy opracowujemy we współpracy z redaktorami Wikipedii 13-kategoriową taksonomię semantycznej intencji stojącej za edycjami artykułów Wikipedii. Korzystając z oznaczonych edycji artykułów, budujemy obliczeniowy klasyfikator intencji, który osiągnął mikrośredni wynik F1 0,621. Wykorzystujemy ten model do zbadania efektywności intencji edycji: w jaki sposób różne rodzaje edycji przewidują utrzymanie nowych osób i zmiany w jakości artykułów, dwa kluczowe obawy dla dzisiejszej Wikipedii. Nasza analiza pokazuje, że rodzaje edycji, które użytkownicy dokonują w pierwszej sesji, przewidują ich późniejsze przetrwanie jako redaktorzy Wikipedii, a artykuły na różnych etapach wymagają różnego rodzaju edycji.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea studiilor privind editarea umană se concentrează doar pe operațiunile de revizuire sintactică, nereușind să surprindă intențiile din spatele modificărilor de revizuire, care sunt esențiale pentru facilitarea procesului de scriere unic și colaborativ. În această lucrare, dezvoltăm în colaborare cu editorii Wikipedia o taxonomie de 13 categorii a intenției semantice din spatele editărilor în articolele Wikipedia. Folosind editări de articole etichetate, construim un clasificator computațional de intenții care a obținut un scor F1 micro-mediu de 0,621. Folosim acest model pentru a investiga eficiența intenției de editare: modul în care diferite tipuri de editări prezic păstrarea noilor veniți și schimbările în calitatea articolelor, două preocupări cheie pentru Wikipedia astăzi. Analiza noastră arată că tipurile de editări pe care utilizatorii le fac în prima lor sesiune prezic supraviețuirea lor ulterioară ca editori Wikipedia, iar articolele în diferite etape necesită diferite tipuri de editări.', 'sr': 'Većina studija o ljudskom redikciju fokusirala se samo na sintaktične revizije, a nisu uspjeli uhvatiti namere iza promjena revizije, koje su ključne za olakšanje procesa jednostavnog i suradnog pisanja. U ovom poslu razvijamo u saradnji sa editorima Wikipedije taksonomiju od 13 kategorija semantičke namere iza editora u Wikipediji. Koristeći etiketirane editore članaka, izgradili smo računalnu klasifikaciju namjera koja je postigala mikroesrednji rezultat F1 od 0,621. Koristimo ovaj model da istražimo učinkovitost između redakcije: kako različite vrste editora predviđaju zadržavanje novih dolara i promjene kvalitete članaka, dva ključna briga za Wikipedia danas. Naša analiza pokazuje da vrste editora koje korisnici čine na prvoj sesiji predviđaju njihov poslednji preživljavanje kao editore Wikipedije, a članovi u različitim fazama trebaju različite vrste editora.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada badankood oo ku saabsan sawirida biniaadamka waxaa keliya ku habboon waxqabadka beddelista ee la-syntactic, mana baaqan inay qabsadaan qastiga beddelka dabadiis, taasoo muhiim u ah in la sahliyo baaritaanka qoritaanka oo kaliya iyo wadajirka ah. Markaas waxan, waxaynu horumarinaynaa wadajir la qorayo Wikipedia oo ah 13-category taxonomy la xiriira waxyaabaha ku qoran warqadaha Wikipedia. Isku isticmaalaya warqadaha la qoray, waxaynu dhisaynaa xisaab-xisaabiyeed oo qasnadaha dhamaystiran F1 koox 0.621. We use this model to investigate edit intention effectiveness: how different types of edits predict the retention of newcomers and changes in the quality of articles, two key concerns for Wikipedia today.  Analyskayagu wuxuu muujiyaa in noocyada sawirida ee isticmaalayaashu ay sameeyaan xiligooda ugu horraysay ay sii sheegeen noloshooda ka dambeeya oo ay u soo noolaadaan sida warqadaha Wikipedia oo kale, warqadaha darajada kala duduwanna waxay u baahan yihiin tahrir kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'De flesta studier om mänsklig redigering fokuserar enbart på syntaktiska revideringsoperationer, och misslyckas med att fånga intentionerna bakom revideringsförändringar, som är avgörande för att underlätta den enskilda och samarbetsbaserade skrivprocessen. I detta arbete utvecklar vi i samarbete med Wikipedias redaktörer en 13-kategoris taxonomi av den semantiska avsikten bakom redigeringar i Wikipedias artiklar. Med hjälp av märkta artikelredigeringar bygger vi en beräkningsklassificering av intentioner som uppnådde en mikrogenomsnittlig F1-poäng på 0,621. Vi använder denna modell för att undersöka hur olika typer av redigeringar förutspår kvarhållandet av nyanlända och förändringar i kvaliteten på artiklar, två viktiga frågor för Wikipedia idag. Vår analys visar att de typer av redigeringar som användare gör i sin första session förutspår deras efterföljande överlevnad som Wikipediaredaktörer, och artiklar i olika skeden behöver olika typer av redigeringar.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු සංපාදනය සඳහා ගොඩක් අධ්\u200dයානය අධ්\u200dයානය පරීක්ෂණය විතරයි, සංපාදනය සඳහා අභ්\u200dයානය වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් අභ්\u200dයානය ක මේ වැඩේ අපි විකිපිඩියා සංපාදකයෝ එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ විකිපිඩියා සංපාදකයෝ එක්ක සංවිධානයේ විකිපිඩියා ලි ලේබල් කරපු ලේඛන සංපාදනය භාවිත කරනවා, අපි පරිගණක විශේෂකයෙක් හදනවා, මායික්\u200dරෝපයක් විශේෂකයෙන් සැලසුම් කරපු F අපි මේ මොඩේලය භාවිතා කරනවා සැකසුම් අවශ්\u200dයතාව පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න: කොහොමද වෙනස් වෙනස් විදියට සංපාදනය කරනවා අළුත් ආවාර්ථකයෝ ව අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ විකිපිඩියා සංපාදකයෙක් වගේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'ta': 'மனித த தொகுப்பு மீட்சி செயல்பாடுகளை மட்டுமே தேவைப்படுத்தும் பெரும்பாலான ஆய்வுகள், மீள்செயல்பாடுகளுக்கு பின்னால் தோல்விகளை பி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் விக்கிபிடியா திருத்தியவர்களுடன் தொகுப்பாளர் குறிப்பிட்ட கட்டுரை திருத்துதலை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் ஒரு கணக்கீட்டு வகுப்பாளரை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அது 0. 621 சிறிய சாதாரண புள்ளிய நாம் இந்த மாதிரி தொகுப்பு திருத்த விருப்பத்தைத் தேர்வு செய்ய பயன்படுத்துகிறோம்: எவ்வாறு வித்தியாசமான திருத்துக்கள் புதிய வகைகளை மாற நம்முடைய ஆய்வு காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது பயனர்கள் முதல் அமர்வில் செய்யும் வகையான திருத்தங்களை விகிபிடியா திருத்தியவர்களாக பின்வரும் உயிர் வி', 'ur': 'اکثر مطالعہ انسان کے سمجھانے کے بارے میں صرف سینٹاکٹیکیسی روشن عملیات پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے، جو تغییر بدلوں کے پیچھے مطالعہ کو پکڑنے کے لئے ناکام ہوتے ہیں، جو ایک اور همکاری لکھانے کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم ویکیپیڈیا ایڈیٹروں کے ساتھ ایک سیمانٹی مطلب کی تاکسنومیت کے 13 کائٹیوں کے پیچھے ویکیپیڈیا لکھوں کے پیچھے سمانٹی مطلب کے پیچھے بڑھتے ہیں. لیبل لکھی لکھی ویڈیٹوں کے استعمال سے، ہم نے ایک کمپیوٹریشن کلاسیر بنایا ہے جو 0.621 کی میکرومتوسط F1 اسکور پہنچ گیا۔ ہم نے اس موڈل کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ ویکیپیڈیا کے لئے دو کلیدوں کی نگرانی کریں۔ ہماری تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ ان کے پہلی سशन میں استعمال کرنے والوں کی طرح ویکیپیڈیا ایڈیٹر کے طور پر زندہ رہنے کی پیش بینی کرتی ہیں، اور مختلف مرحلوں میں لکھائی مختلف طریقوں کی ضرورت ہے.', 'uz': "Inson tahrirlarining ko'pchiligi o'qituvchilari faqatgina syntactikk tizim amallarini o'zgartirish orqali o'zgarishni olib tashlab boʻlmadi. Bu bir necha va bir yordam yozish jarayonini foydalanish uchun muhim. Va shu vazifani biz Wikipedia tahrirchalari bilan 13 kategori taxonomi o'zgarishlar maqolalarining 13 kategori taxonomi bilan ishlayapmiz. Koʻrsatilgan maqola tahrirlaridan foydalanishda, biz 0.621 qismi kichkina F1 scorini olib tashlash uchun kompyuterni yaratimiz. Biz bu modelni tahrirlash natijasini qidirish uchun foydalanamiz: har xil turlari tahrirlarining turlarini qanday qilib yangi maqolalarning sifatida davomida o'zgarishni oldin va bugun Wikipedia uchun ikki muhim concernlari. Analytikizni ko'rsatadi, foydalanuvchilar birinchi seansda o'zgarishlar turlarini Wikipedia tahrirchi sifatida keyingi hayotini predictor qiladi, va har xil holatda maqolalar boshqa bir xil turlari kerak.", 'vi': 'Hầu hết các nghiên cứu về biên tập người chỉ tập trung vào các thao tác sửa chữa cấu trúc pháp, không nắm bắt được mục đích đằng sau thay đổi sửa chữa, những điều cần thiết để dễ dàng tiến trình viết văn bản đơn hợp tác. Trong tác phẩm này, chúng tôi phát triển cùng với các nhà soạn thảo Wikipedia đã cho tôi biết được bao nhiêu lần tính toán về ý định ngữ pháp đằng sau các bản thảo trên Wikipedia. Sử dụng biên bản dán nhãn, chúng tôi xây dựng một phân loại tính của mục đích đạt được vi tính trung số F1 của 0.62. Chúng tôi dùng mẫu này để nghiên cứu hiệu quả tính hiệu quả của tập tin: cách các loại soạn thảo khác nhau dự đoán việc giữ lại những người mới và thay đổi chất lượng các bài báo, hai mối quan tâm chủ chốt của Wikipedia ngày hôm nay. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy các kiểu xuất bản mà người dùng thực hiện trong phiên bản đầu tiên dự đoán sự tồn tại của họ như là nhà soạn thảo Wikipedia, và những bài viết trong nhiều giai đoạn khác nhau cần nhiều kiểu thay đổi.', 'bg': 'Повечето изследвания върху човешкото редактиране се фокусират само върху синтактичните операции за ревизия, като не успяват да уловят намеренията зад промените в ревизията, които са от съществено значение за улесняване на процеса на единно и съвместно писане. В тази работа ние разработваме в сътрудничество с редакторите на Уикипедия таксономия от 13 категории на семантичното намерение зад редакциите в статиите в Уикипедия. Използвайки етикетирани редакции на статии, ние изграждаме изчислителен класификатор на намеренията, който постига микро-среден резултат от 0,621. Използваме този модел, за да проучим ефективността на намеренията за редактиране: как различните видове редакции предвиждат задържането на новодошлите и промените в качеството на статиите, две основни притеснения за Уикипедия днес. Анализът ни показва, че видовете редакции, които потребителите правят в първата си сесия предвиждат последващото им оцеляване като редактори на Уикипедия, а статиите на различни етапи се нуждаят от различни видове редакции.', 'da': 'De fleste undersøgelser om menneskelig redigering fokuserer kun på syntaktiske revisionsoperationer, idet de ikke fanger hensigterne bag revisionændringer, som er afgørende for at lette den enkelte og samarbejdsvillige skriveproces. I dette arbejde udvikler vi i samarbejde med Wikipedias redaktører en 13-kategori taksonomi af den semantiske hensigt bag redigeringer i Wikipedias artikler. Ved hjælp af mærkede artikelredigeringer bygger vi en beregningsmæssig klassificering af intentioner, der opnåede en mikrogennemsnitlig F1 score på 0,621. Vi bruger denne model til at undersøge effektiviteten af redigeringsindsigelser: hvordan forskellige typer redigeringer forudsiger fastholdelsen af nyankomne og ændringer i kvaliteten af artikler, to vigtige bekymringer for Wikipedia i dag. Vores analyse viser, at de typer redigeringer, som brugerne foretager i deres første session, forudsiger deres efterfølgende overlevelse som Wikipedia-redaktører, og artikler i forskellige faser kræver forskellige typer redigeringer.', 'nl': 'De meeste studies over human editing richten zich alleen op syntactische revisieoperaties, waarbij de intenties achter revisiewijzigingen niet worden vastgelegd, die essentieel zijn voor het faciliteren van het enkelvoudige en collaboratieve schrijfproces. In dit werk ontwikkelen we in samenwerking met Wikipedia editors een 13-categorie taxonomie van de semantische intentie achter bewerkingen in Wikipedia artikelen. Met gelabelde artikelbewerkingen bouwen we een computationele classificator van intenties die een microgemiddelde F1 score van 0.621 bereikte. We gebruiken dit model om de effectiviteit van editintentie te onderzoeken: hoe verschillende soorten edits voorspellen het behoud van nieuwkomers en veranderingen in de kwaliteit van artikelen, twee belangrijke zorgen voor Wikipedia vandaag. Onze analyse toont aan dat de soorten bewerkingen die gebruikers maken in hun eerste sessie voorspellen dat ze later overleven als Wikipedia-editors, en artikelen in verschillende stadia hebben verschillende soorten bewerkingen nodig.', 'de': 'Die meisten Studien zum menschlichen Editieren konzentrieren sich lediglich auf syntaktische Revisionsoperationen, wobei es nicht gelingt, die Absichten hinter Revisionsänderungen zu erfassen, die für die Erleichterung des gemeinsamen Schreibprozesses unerlässlich sind. In dieser Arbeit entwickeln wir in Zusammenarbeit mit Wikipedia-Editoren eine 13-Kategorien-Taxonomie der semantischen Intention hinter Bearbeitungen in Wikipedia-Artikeln. Mit beschrifteten Artikelbearbeitungen erstellen wir einen rechnerischen Klassifikator von Intentionen, der einen mikrogemittelten F1-Score von 0.621 erreichte. Wir verwenden dieses Modell, um die Effektivität der Editintention zu untersuchen: Wie verschiedene Arten von Edits die Bindung von Newcomern und Änderungen in der Qualität von Artikeln vorhersagen, zwei zentrale Anliegen für Wikipedia heute. Unsere Analyse zeigt, dass die Arten von Bearbeitungen, die Benutzer in ihrer ersten Sitzung vornehmen, ihr späteres Überleben als Wikipedia-Editoren vorhersagen und Artikel in verschiedenen Phasen unterschiedliche Bearbeitungen benötigen.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan studi tentang penyuntingan manusia fokus hanya pada operasi revisi sintaksi, gagal menangkap niat di balik perubahan revisi, yang penting untuk memfasilitasi proses penulisan tunggal dan kollaboratif. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami berkembang dalam kolaborasi dengan editor Wikipedia sebuah taksonomi kategori 13 tujuan semantis di balik edit dalam artikel Wikipedia. Menggunakan edit artikel yang ditabel, kami membangun klasifikasi komputasi niat yang mencapai skor F1 berrata-rata mikro 0,621. Kami menggunakan model ini untuk menyelidiki efektif edit tujuan: bagaimana tipe edit berbeda memprediksi pemeliharaan orang baru dan perubahan kualitas artikel, dua masalah kunci untuk Wikipedia hari ini. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa jenis edit yang dibuat oleh pengguna dalam sesi pertama mereka memprediksi hidup mereka berikutnya sebagai editor Wikipedia, dan artikel di tahap berbeda membutuhkan jenis edit yang berbeda.', 'ko': '대부분의 인공 편집에 대한 연구는 문법 수정 작업에만 주목하고 수정 변경의 배후 의도를 포착하지 못하는데 이것은 단일과 협동 창작 과정을 추진하는 데 매우 중요하다.이 작업에서 우리는 위키백과 편집자와 합작하여 13가지 유형의 분류법을 개발하여 위키백과 문장에서 편집한 배후의 의미와 의도를 분류하였다.표시된 글 편집을 사용하여 우리는 의향 계산 분류기를 구축했는데 미시적 평균 F1 점수는 0.621이다.우리는 이 모델을 이용하여 편집 의도의 유효성을 연구한다. 서로 다른 유형의 편집이 신입사원의 보존과 문장의 질의 변화를 어떻게 예측하는지는 위키백과가 오늘 주목하는 두 가지 관건적인 문제이다.우리의 분석에 의하면 사용자가 첫 번째 세션에서 진행한 편집 유형은 그들이 위키백과 편집자로서의 후속 생존을 예측했고 서로 다른 단계의 문장은 서로 다른 유형의 편집이 필요하다고 한다.', 'sw': 'Tafiti nyingi zinazohusu kuhariri binadamu zinahusiana na shughuli za mabadiliko ya ushirikiano, na kushindwa kukubaliana na malengo ya mabadiliko ya mabadiliko, ambayo ni muhimu kwa kusaidia mchakato mmoja na ushirikiano wa kuandika. Katika kazi hii, tunaendelea kwa ushirikiano na wahariri wa Wikipedia katika makundi 13 ya utajiri wa lengo la kisiasa la kufuatia mabadiliko katika makala za Wikipedia. Kwa kutumia mabadiliko ya makala, tunajenga mwangalizi wa kompyuta wa malengo ambayo yalifanikiwa score ya F1 yenye wastani wa 0.621. Tunatumia mtindo huu kuchunguza ufanisi wa uhariri: namna aina tofauti ya wahariri inavyobashiri kukabiliana na mabadiliko ya viwango vya makala, hofu mbili za msingi kwa Wikipedia leo. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa aina ya wahariri ambao watumiaji wanatengeneza katika mkutano wao wa kwanza kutabiri maisha yao ya baadae kama wahariri wa Wikipedia, na makala katika hatua tofauti zinahitaji aina mbalimbali za kuhariri.', 'tr': 'Adamlar editlemesi barada köp öwrenmeler diňe sintaktik wersiýa operasiýasynda fokus edýär. Ýewirmeleriň arkasynda niýetleri ýok edip bilmeýär. Bu ýeke we işbirli ýazma prosesini bejermek üçin wajypdyr. Bu işde, Wikipediýa editorlary bilen birleşişmäge Wikipediýada semantik niýetleriniň 13-kategoriýaly tassyklandyrylyp gelişýäris. Etiketlenýän makala editlerden ullanýarys, biz mikro ortalamaly F1 nokat 0.621 netijesinde bir sanat klasifikatçysyny çykarýarys. Biz bu nusgany düzenlemek niýetlerini etkinleýänligi barlamak üçin ullanýarys: täze komerleriň gaýd etmäni we maýlaryň keyfiýetini üýtgetmek üçin ullanýarys, şu gün Wikipediýa üçin iki nähili aladalary bar. Biziň analýusymyz ulanylaryň ilkinji oturumda eden düzenler üçin olaryň soňky durmuşyny Wikipediýa editörleri hökmünde öňünden geçirmegi gerek bolandygyny görkezýär, we munuň dürli taýýarlarda maýlaryň düzümleri gerek.', 'hr': 'Većina ispitivanja o ljudskom redakciji usredotočila se samo na sintaktičke revizije, a nisu uspjeli uhvatiti namjere iza promjena revizije, koje su ključne za olakšanje procesa jednostavnog i suradnog pisanja. U ovom poslu razvijamo se u suradnji s editorima Wikipedije taksonom od 13 kategorija semantičke namjere iza uredova u člancima Wikipedije. Koristeći etiketirane editore članaka, izgradili smo računalnu klasifikaciju namjera koja je postigla mikroesrednji rezultat F1 od 0,621. Koristimo ovaj model da istražimo učinkovitost uredbe: kako različite vrste urednika predviđaju zadržavanje novih dolazača i promjene kvalitete članaka, dva ključna briga za Wikipedia danas. Naša analiza pokazuje da vrste editora koje korisnici čine na prvoj sesiji predviđaju njihov sljedeći preživljavanje kao editore Wikipedije, a članovi u različitim fazama trebaju različite vrste editora.', 'af': "Die meeste studie oor menslike redigeering fokus net op sintaktieke hersiening operasies, het misluk om die intensies agter hersiening veranderinge te vang, wat is nuutsaaklik vir die enkele en collaboratiewe skryfproses te vermoë. In hierdie werk ontwikkel ons in samarbeid met Wikipedia-redigeerders 'n 13-kategorie taksonomie van die semantiese intensie agter redigeerders in Wikipedia-artikels. By gebruik van etiketeerde artikel redigeerders, bou ons 'n rekenaar klassifiseerder van bedoelings wat 'n mikro- gemiddelde F1 telling van 0. 621 bereik het. Ons gebruik hierdie model om uitwerking effektiviteit te ondersoek: hoe verskillende tipes redigeerder voorsoek die houding van nuutskommers en verander in die kwaliteit van artikels, twee sleutelborde vir Wikipedia vandag. Ons analisie wys dat die tipes redigeerders wat gebruikers in hul eerste sessie maak, hulle volgende oorvloediging as Wikipedia redigeerders voorskou, en artikels in verskillende stadige benodig verskillende tipes redigeerders.", 'sq': 'Shumica e studimeve mbi redigimin njerëzor përqëndrohen thjesht në operacionet sintaktike të revizionit, duke dështuar të kapin synimet pas ndryshimeve të revizionit, të cilat janë thelbësore për lehtësimin e procesit të shkrimit të vetëm dhe bashkëpunues. Në këtë punë, ne zhvillojmë në bashkëpunim me redaktorët e Wikipedias një taksonomi 13-kategorish me qëllim semantik prapa editave në artikujt e Wikipedias. Duke përdorur editimet e etiketuara të artikujve, ne ndërtojmë një klasifikues kompjuterik të qëllimeve që arritën një pikë F1 me një mikromesatare prej 0.621. Ne përdorim këtë model për të hetuar efektshmërinë e editimit të synimeve: si llojet e ndryshme të editimeve parashikojnë mbajtjen e të rinjve dhe ndryshimet në cilësinë e artikujve, dy shqetësime kryesore për Wikipedia sot. Analiza jonë tregon se llojet e editimeve që përdoruesit bëjnë në sesionin e tyre të parë parashikojnë mbijetesën e tyre më pas si redaktorë të Wikipedias dhe artikujt në faza të ndryshme kanë nevojë për lloje të ndryshme editimesh.', 'am': 'ብዙዎቹ የሰው ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል በተቃውሞ ተግባር ላይ ብቻ ነው፣ ማስታወቂያው በኋላ ለውጦችን በመያዝ አይችሉም፤ ይህም በአንዲት እና በተማማራዊ ጽሑፍ ፕሮጀክት ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ Wikipedia አስተዳሪዎች ጋር የ13-category ክፍተት የግንኙነት አቃውሞ በWikipedia ጽሑፎች ውስጥ አስተካክል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በጽሑፍ ጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ በመጠቀም፣ የ0.621 ውጤት አካላዊ የF1 ነጥብ አካባቢ አካባቢ ክፍል ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካባቢ ጥያቄን ለመመርመር ይህንን ምሳሌ እንጠይቃለን፤ መልዕክቶች እንዴት የተለያዩ ዓይነት አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል እና የጽሑፎችን ጥያቄ እንዲለውጡ፣ ዛሬ ለWikipedia ሁለት የቁልፎች ጥያቄዎች ናቸው፡፡ Our analysis shows that the types of edits that users make in their first session predict their subsequent survival as Wikipedia editors, and articles in different stages need different types of edits.', 'fa': 'بیشتر مطالعه\u200cها در مورد ویرایش انسان فقط روی عملیات تغییر سنتاکتیک تمرکز می\u200cکنند، که نمی\u200cتوانند هدف\u200cهای پشت تغییر تغییر تغییر دهند، که برای آسانیش فرایند نوشتن تنها و همکاری مهم است. در این کار، ما در همکاری با ویکیپدییا ویکیپدیا توسعه می کنیم که یک تاکسونوم ۱۳ kategoriه از قصد semantic behind edits in Wikipedia articles. با استفاده از ویرایش\u200cهای مقاله\u200cهای برگزیده شده، ما یک راهنمایی محاسبه\u200cکننده از هدف\u200cهای کامپیوتری ساختیم که یک نمونه\u200cی F1 متوسط میکرومتوسط 0.621 را رسید. ما از این مدل استفاده می کنیم تا تحقیق فعالیت تغییر هدف تغییر دهیم: چگونه نوع تغییر تغییر دهندگان تازه را پیش بینی می کنند و تغییر دهند در کیفیت مقاله، دو نگرانی کلید برای ویکیپدیا امروز. تحلیل ما نشان می دهد که نوع تغییرات که استفاده کنندگان در اولین جلسه خود انجام می دهند در پیش بینی زنده ماندن آنها به عنوان ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا، و مقاله\u200cها در مرحله\u200cهای مختلف نیاز به نوع تغییرات مختلف دارند.', 'hy': 'Մարդկային խմբագրության ուսումնասիրությունների մեծամասնությունը կենտրոնանում է միայն սինտակտիկ վերանայման գործողությունների վրա, որոնք չեն ընկալում վերանայման փոփոխությունների հետևի նպատակները, որոնք կարևոր են միակ և համագործակցական գրողական գործընթացի հեշտ Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք զարգանում ենք Վիքիփեդիայի խմբագրողների հետ համագործակցելով Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածներում խմբագրությունների 13 կատեգորիայի տաքսոնոմիա: Օգտագործելով մարմնավորված հոդվածների խմբագրությունները, մենք կառուցում ենք հաշվարկների դասակարգիչ, որը հասավ 0.621-ի միկրոմիջին F1 գնահատականի: Մենք օգտագործում ենք այս մոդելը խմբագրման նպատակի արդյունավետության ուսումնասիրելու համար. թե ինչպես են խմբագրությունների տարբեր տեսակները կանխատեսում նոր եկել մարդկանց պահպանությունը և հոդվածների որակի փոփոխությունները, այսօր Վիքիփեդիայի երկու կարևոր խն Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ օգտագործողների առաջին սենսի ընթացքում ստեղծված խմբագրությունները կանխատեսում են իրենց հետագա գոյատևումը որպես Վիքիփեդիայի խմբագրողներ, և տարբեր աստիճանների հոդվածները տարբեր խմբագրություններ', 'az': 'ńįnsanńĪn d√ľz…ôltm…ôsi haqqńĪnda √ßox t…ôhsil edilm…ôsi yalnńĪz sintaktik yenil…ôm…ô iŇül…ôri √ľz…ôrind…ô, yenil…ônm…ôk d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrinin arxasńĪnda niyy…ôtl…ôrini alńĪnmadńĪqlarńĪ t…ôqdird…ô, bu t…ôk v…ô iŇübirlikd…ô yazma iŇül…ôri asanlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox m√∂vcuddur. Bu iŇüd…ô, Wikipedia d√ľzenleyicil…ôri il…ô birlikd…ô 13 kategoriya taxonomiyasńĪ, Wikipedia madd…ôl…ôrinin ardńĪndakńĪ d√ľzenleyicil…ôrin arxasńĪndakńĪ semantik niyy…ôtind…ô t…ôŇükil edirik. Etiketli m…ôktub editl…ôrini istifad…ô edir…ôk, mikro ortalamalńĪ F1 d…ôr…ôc…ôsini 0,621 il…ô baŇüa d√ľŇü…ôn fikirl…ôrin hesablama sńĪralayńĪcńĪsńĪ inŇüa edirik. Biz bu modeli d√ľz…ôltm…ôk niyy…ôtini t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edirik: yeni g…ôl…ônl…ôrin nec…ô f…ôrqli d√ľz…ôltm…ôl…ôri v…ô m…ôktublarńĪn keyfiyy…ôtind…ô d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri t…ôhsil edir, bu g√ľn Wikipedia √ľ√ß√ľn iki n√∂qt…ôli m…ôxluqat. Bizim analizimiz g√∂st…ôrir ki, istifad…ô√ßil…ôrin ilk seansńĪnda yaratdńĪńüńĪ edit√∂rl…ôrin sonrakńĪ h…ôyatlarńĪnńĪ Wikipedia edit√∂rl…ôri olaraq t…ômin edir, v…ô m…ôktublarńĪn m√ľxt…ôlif f…ôrql…ôrd…ô m√ľxt…ôlif d√ľz…ôltm…ôl…ôr lazńĪmdńĪr.', 'bs': 'Većina ispitivanja o ljudskom redakciji usredotočila se samo na sintaktične revizije, a nisu uspjeli uhvatiti namjere iza promjena revizije, koje su ključne za olakšanje procesa jednostavnog i suradnog pisanja. U ovom poslu razvijamo se u saradnji sa editorima Wikipedije taksonom od 13 kategorija semantičke namjere iza editora u člancima Wikipedije. Koristeći etiketirane editore članaka, izgradili smo računalnu klasifikaciju namjera koja je ostvarila mikroesrednji rezultat F1 od 0,621. Koristimo ovaj model da istražimo učinkovitost redakcije: kako različite vrste redakcija predviđaju zadržavanje novih dolara i promjene kvalitete članaka, dva ključna briga za Wikipedia danas. Naša analiza pokazuje da vrste editora koje korisnici čine na prvoj sesiji predviđaju njihov sljedeći preživljavanje kao editore Wikipedije, a članovi u različitim fazama trebaju različite vrste editora.', 'ca': "La majoria dels estudis d'edició humana es centren només en operacions de revisió sinàctica, no capturant les intencions darrere dels canvis de revisió, que són essencials per facilitar el procés d'escriptura única i col·laborativa. En aquest treball, desenvolupem en col·laboració amb els editors de Wikipedia una taxonomia de 13 categories de la intenció semàntica darrere d'edicions d'articles de Wikipedia. Utilitzant edicions d'articles etiquetats, construïm un classificador computacional de intencions que aconseguia una puntuació F1 de 0,621 micromitjana. Utilitzem aquest model per investigar l'efectivitat d'edició de l'intenció: com diferents tipus d'edicions predeixen la retenció dels nou arribants i els canvis en la qualitat dels articles, dues preocupacions clau per a Wikipedia avui dia. La nostra anàlisi mostra que els tipus d'edicions que els usuaris fan en la seva primera sesió predien la seva supervivència posterior com a editors de Wikipedia, i els articles en diferents etapes necessiten diferents tipus d'edicions.", 'bn': 'মানুষ সম্পাদনার বেশীরভাগ গবেষণা শুধুমাত্র সিন্ট্যাক্টিক সংস্কারের কার্যক্রমের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, সংস্কারের পরিবর্তনের লক্ষ্যবস্তু এই কাজে আমরা উইকিপিডিয়া সম্পাদকদের সাথে সহযোগিতায় উন্নয়ন করি উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধের সম্পাদকদের পেছনে সম্পাদনার সাম্প্রতিক উদ্দেশ্যের ১ লেবেলেটের প্রবন্ধ সম্পাদনা ব্যবহার করে, আমরা একটি গণনাত্রিক ক্লাসিফার তৈরি করি যা একটি মাইক্রোগারেড এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে ০. 621 এর। আমরা এই মডেল ব্যবহার করি সম্পাদনার উদ্দেশ্যের কার্যকলাপ তদন্ত করার জন্য: কিভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের সম্পাদক ভবিষ্যৎ করে নতুন প্রবন্ধগুলোর মানে রেগে যাওয়া  Our analysis shows that the types of edits that users make in their first session predict their subsequent survival as Wikipedia editors, and articles in different stages need different types of edits.', 'et': 'Enamik inimtoimetamise uuringuid keskendub ainult süntaktilistele versioonioperatsioonidele, ei suuda jäädvustada versioonimuutuste kavatsusi, mis on olulised üksiku ja koostööprotsessi hõlbustamiseks. Selles töös töötame koostöös Wikipedia toimetajatega välja 13-kategoorialise taksonoomika semantilisest kavatsusest Wikipedia artiklite muudatuste taga. Kasutades märgistatud artikli redigeerimist, ehitame kavatsuste arvutusliku klassifikaatori, mis saavutas mikrokeskmise F1 skoori 0,621. Me kasutame seda mudelit, et uurida redigeerimise kavatsuse efektiivsust: kuidas eri tüüpi redigeerimised ennustavad uustulnukate säilimist ja artiklite kvaliteedi muutusi, mis on kaks peamist probleemi Vikipeedia jaoks tänapäeval. Meie analüüs näitab, et kasutajate esimesel seansil tehtavad muudatused ennustavad nende edasist ellujäämist Wikipedia toimetajatena ning erinevates etappides olevad artiklid vajavad erinevat tüüpi muudatusi.', 'cs': 'Většina studií o lidské editaci se zaměřuje pouze na syntaktické revizní operace, nedokáže zachytit záměry za revizními změnami, které jsou nezbytné pro usnadnění jednotného a spolupracujícího procesu psaní. V této práci vyvíjíme ve spolupráci s editory Wikipedie 13-kategoriovou taxonomii sémantického záměru editací v článcích Wikipedie. Pomocí označených úprav článku sestavíme výpočetní klasifikátor záměrů, který dosáhl mikroprůměrného F1 skóre 0,621. Tento model používáme k prozkoumání efektivity editačních záměrů: jak různé typy editací předpovídají udržení nováčků a změny v kvalitě článků, dvě klíčové obavy dnešní Wikipedie. Naše analýza ukazuje, že typy úprav, které uživatelé provedou v první relaci, předpovídají jejich následné přežití jako editoři Wikipedie, a články v různých fázích potřebují různé typy úprav.', 'fi': 'Useimmat ihmiseditointiin liittyvät tutkimukset keskittyvät vain syntaktisiin revisiotoimiin, eikä niissä onnistuta hahmottamaan revisiotoimien taustalla olevia aikomuksia, jotka ovat välttämättömiä yksittäisen ja yhteisöllisen kirjoittamisen helpottamiseksi. Tässä työssä kehitämme yhteistyössä Wikipedian toimittajien kanssa 13 kategorian taksonomian semanttisesta tarkoituksesta Wikipedian artikkelien muokkauksen taustalla. Laadimme artikkelimuokkauksia käyttäen laskennallisen aikomusten luokittelijan, joka saavutti mikrokeskiarvon F1-pisteen 0,621. Käytämme tätä mallia tutkiaksemme muokkaustarkoituksen tehokkuutta: miten erilaiset muokkaukset ennustavat uusien tulokkaiden pysymistä ja artikkelien laadun muutoksia, jotka ovat Wikipedian keskeisiä huolenaiheita. Analyysimme osoittaa, että käyttäjien ensimmäisessä istunnossa tekemät muokkaukset ennustavat myöhempää selviytymistä Wikipedian muokkaajina, ja eri vaiheissa olevat artikkelit tarvitsevat erityyppisiä muokkauksia.', 'he': 'רוב המחקרים על העורך האנושי מתמקדים רק במבצעי שינוי סינטאקטי, שלא הצליחו לתפוס את הכוונות מאחורי שינויים שינויים שינויים, שהם חיוניים כדי להקל את תהליך הכתיבה היחיד ושותף פעולה. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מפתחים בשיתוף פעולה עם עורכי ויקיפדיה טקסונומיה של 13 קטגוריות של כוונה סמנטית מאחורי העורקים במאמרים של ויקיפדיה. באמצעות עורכות מאמרים מסוימות, אנו בונים מסווג מחשבי של כוונות שהגיעו לציון F1 בממוצע של 0.621. אנו משתמשים בדוגמא זו כדי לחקור את יעילות העורר בכוונה: איך סוגים שונים של עורכים חושפים את שמירת החדשים ושינויים באיכות המאמרים, שתי דאגות מפתחיות לוויקיפדיה היום. הניתוח שלנו מראה שהסוגים של עורכים שמשתמשים עושים בפגישה הראשונה שלהם חושפים את ההישרדות שלהם לאחר מכן כעורכי ויקיפדיה, ומאמרים בשלבים שונים זקוקים לסוגים שונים של עורכים.', 'ha': "Babu yawa karatun masu yin hagarin mutum fokus ne kawai a kan aikin canjen kure na syntactic, kuma ba su kasa riƙo tsarin bayan canza musanyawa, da kuma yana da muhimu ga amfani da aikin rubutu guda da samaki. Daga wannan aikin, Munã kwaɗayi da waharin Wikimedia a taxnomy na 13-category of the semantic goal bakin editori in Wikimedia. Yi amfani da haƙin agogon da aka rubũta shi, za'a gina wani lissafi na ƙidãyayyu da niyyar ta sami wani nau'in F1 mai tsakanin 0.631. We use this model to investigate edit intention effectiveness: how different types of edits predict the retention of newcomers and changes in the quality of articles, two key concerns for Wikipedia today.  AnalyyinMu na nũna cẽwa typi na editori da mãsu amfani da ke sami cikin zaman shawararsu na farko sun yi bayani ga tsoron su kamar waharin Wikimedia, kuma da takardar da ke cikin daraja daban, suna da wasu irin taƙaitari dabam-dabam.", 'sk': 'Večina študij o človeškem urejanju se osredotoča zgolj na sintaktične revizijske operacije in ne zajame namenov sprememb revizij, ki so bistvene za olajšanje enotnega in sodelovalnega pisanja. V tem delu smo v sodelovanju z uredniki Wikipedije razvili 13-kategorijsko taksonomijo semantičnega namena za urejanje člankov Wikipedije. Z označenimi urejanji člankov zgradimo računalniški klasifikator namenov, ki je dosegel mikropovprečno oceno F1 0,621. Ta model uporabljamo za raziskovanje učinkovitosti namena urejanja: kako različne vrste urejanja napovedujejo ohranitev novih prisotnikov in spremembe v kakovosti člankov, dve ključni problemi Wikipedije danes. Naša analiza kaže, da vrste urejanj, ki jih uporabniki opravijo v prvi seji, napovedujejo njihovo nadaljnje preživetje kot uredniki Wikipedije, članki v različnih fazah pa potrebujejo različne vrste urejanj.', 'bo': 'Most studies on human editing focus merely on syntactic revision operations, failing to capture the intentions behind revision changes, which are essential for facilitating the single and collaborative writing process. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཝི་པི་ཌི་ཡི་ཞུན་པ་ཚོར་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲུབ Using labeled article edits, we build a computational classifier of intentions that achieved a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.621. ང་ཚོས་མིག་སྔར་སྤྱད་ནས་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནུས་པ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ལེ་ཚན་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་རྐྱེན་བྱས་མིན་འདུག', 'jv': 'Dijejer-jejer sing beraksi uwong ing ngubah perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan winih, kuwi ora iso nggawe biasa mbukakipun ngubah perusahaan winih, lan akeh barang akeh lanus kanggo tukang mrogram sing beraksi lan tambahan. Nang trabah iki, kita luwih mèhku kanggo nyebutané karo editoran pangan ning acara urip i 13-kategori dadi kaé sematik entuk ingkang dipuluhayo ning acara vector maning na dipuluhayo ning sikipedya. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé nggunakake model iki kanggo nyukaké nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasai winih sing luwih apik dhéwé Awali dhéwé éntukno ngerasakno karo kalih perusahaan sing nguasakno perusahaan karo sesiyon sing perusahaan karo pawarturan kanggo nguasakno urip wiipeda, lan airem sing dipun ajeng sampeyan neng sampeyan sampeyan winih.'}
{'en': 'Accurate Supervised and Semi-Supervised Machine Reading for Long Documents', 'fr': 'Lecture automatique supervisée et semi-supervisée précise pour les documents longs', 'ar': 'قراءة دقيقة للإشراف وشبه خاضعة للإشراف للوثائق الطويلة', 'es': 'Lectura automática precisa supervisada y semisupervisada para documentos largos', 'pt': 'Leitura de máquina supervisionada e semi-supervisionada precisa para documentos longos', 'ja': '長い文書のための正確な監督と半監督の機械読み取り', 'zh': '用于长文档之精监、半监机器读取', 'hi': 'लंबे दस्तावेजों के लिए सटीक पर्यवेक्षित और अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित मशीन रीडिंग', 'ru': 'Точное контролируемое и полуконтролируемое машинное считывание для длинных документов', 'ga': 'Léamh Inneall Maoirsithe Cruinn agus Leathmhaoirsithe do Dhoiciméid Fhada', 'el': 'Ακριβής εποπτευόμενη και ημιεποπτευόμενη μηχανική ανάγνωση για μεγάλα έγγραφα', 'hu': 'Pontos felügyelt és félig felügyelt gépi olvasás hosszú dokumentumokhoz', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ დანახვა და დანახვა მაქინის კითხვა ძალიან დოკუმენტებისთვის', 'it': 'Lettura automatica controllata e semicontrollata accurata per documenti lunghi', 'lt': 'Tikrasis ilgų dokumentų apžiūrimas ir pusiau apžiūrimas mašinų skaitymas', 'ms': 'Pembacaan Mesin Terjaga dan Semi-Terjaga Tepat untuk Dokumen Panjang', 'kk': 'Құжаттар үшін дұрыс бақылау және жарты бақылау машинасы оқу', 'mk': 'Точно прегледувано и полунадгледувано читање на машина за долги документи', 'mn': 'Урт баримтуудын төлөө зөв Хэрэглэгдсэн, Хэрэглэгдсэн Машин унших', 'ml': 'നീണ്ട രേഖകള്\u200dക്കുവേണ്ടി വായിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തിനുള്ള എക്കൌണ്ട് ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമി', 'mt': 'Aqrar Akkwat ta’ Magni Sorveljati u Semi-Sorveljati għal Dokumenti Tulda', 'no': 'Akkurat oversikt og halvoversikt maskinelesing for lange dokument', 'pl': 'Dokładne nadzorowane i pół-nadzorowane odczyty maszynowe dla długich dokumentów', 'ro': 'Citire precisă a mașinilor supravegheate și semi-supravegheate pentru documente lungi', 'sr': 'Upravo nadgledano i polovično nadgledano čitanje mašine za duge dokumente', 'so': 'Heshiiska ku saabsan iyo Semi-Supered Masiinka akhriska qoraalka dukumentiyada dheer', 'si': 'හරියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සහ සම්පරික්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ.', 'ur': 'دقیق نظارت کی اور نصف نظارت کی ماشین پڑھنے کی', 'sv': 'Exakt övervakad och halvövervakad maskinläsning för långa dokument', 'ta': 'நீண்ட ஆவணங்களுக்கு படிக்கும் இயந்திரத்தை சரிபார்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பாதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chính xác khi xem phim cỗ máy theo dõi và giám sát', 'bg': 'Точно контролирано и полуконтролирано машинно четене за дълги документи', 'da': 'Nøjagtig overvåget og halvovervåget maskinlæsning til lange dokumenter', 'hr': 'Tačno nadzirano i polovično nadzirano čitanje strojeva za duge dokumente', 'nl': 'Nauwkeurig gecontroleerd en semi-gecontroleerd machinelezen voor lange documenten', 'de': 'Exaktes überwachtes und halbüberwachtes maschinelles Lesen für lange Dokumente', 'ko': '긴 문서의 정확한 감독과 반감독 기계 읽기', 'id': 'Pembacaan Mesin Terjaga dan Semi-Terjaga Tepat untuk Dokumen Panjang', 'sw': 'Mashine yanayosomwa kwa ajili ya nyaraka ndefu', 'tr': 'Ullanmış Senedler üçin gözetlenmiş we Semi-gözlenmiş Makine Okamak', 'af': 'Akkuraat Besigtig en Semi- Besigtig Masjien Lees vir Lange Dokumente', 'sq': 'Mesazhi i saktë i mbikqyrur dhe gjysmë i mbikqyrur leximi për dokumente të gjata', 'am': 'ሰነዱን እንዳለ ምረጡ', 'hy': 'Ճիշտ վերահսկված և կես վերահսկված մեքենայի կարդալը երկար փաստաթղթերի համար', 'fa': 'دقیقاً خواندن ماشین\u200cهای مراقبت و نیمه مراقبت برای سند طولانی', 'bn': 'দীর্ঘ নথিপত্রের জন্য পাঠ করা মেশিন', 'bs': 'Tačno nadgledano i polovično nadgledano čitanje strojeva za duge dokumente', 'ca': 'Llegir màquines exactes supervisades i semisupervisades per llargs documentos', 'cs': 'Přesné strojové čtení s dohledem a polovičním dohledem pro dlouhé dokumenty', 'fi': 'Tarkka valvottu ja puolivalvottu koneluku pitkille asiakirjoille', 'az': 'Uzun Dökümələr üçün İzlənmiş və Yarı-Gözlənmiş Makina Okuması', 'et': 'Täpne järelevalve ja pooljärelevalve masinlugemine pikkade dokumentide jaoks', 'jv': 'yes', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Natančno nadzorovano in polnadzorovano strojno branje za dolge dokumente', 'he': 'קריאת מכונות מדויקת שמשמרת וחצי שמשמרת על מסמכים ארוכים', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ལ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་ཀློག་འཇུག་པ་དེ་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'We introduce a hierarchical architecture for machine reading capable of extracting precise information from long documents. The model divides the document into small, overlapping windows and encodes all windows in parallel with an RNN. It then attends over these window encodings, reducing them to a single encoding, which is decoded into an answer using a sequence decoder. This hierarchical approach allows the model to scale to longer documents without increasing the number of sequential steps. In a supervised setting, our model achieves state of the art accuracy of 76.8 on the WikiReading dataset. We also evaluate the model in a semi-supervised setting by downsampling the WikiReading training set to create increasingly smaller amounts of supervision, while leaving the full unlabeled document corpus to train a sequence autoencoder on document windows. We evaluate models that can reuse autoencoder states and outputs without fine-tuning their weights, allowing for more efficient training and inference.', 'ar': 'نقدم بنية هرمية لقراءة الآلة قادرة على استخراج معلومات دقيقة من المستندات الطويلة. يقسم النموذج المستند إلى نوافذ صغيرة متداخلة ويشفر جميع النوافذ بالتوازي مع RNN. ثم يتعامل مع ترميزات النافذة هذه ، ويختصرها إلى ترميز واحد ، والذي يتم فك ترميزه في إجابة باستخدام وحدة فك ترميز التسلسل. يسمح هذا النهج الهرمي للنموذج بالتوسع في المستندات الأطول دون زيادة عدد الخطوات المتسلسلة. في إعداد خاضع للإشراف ، يحقق نموذجنا دقة فنية تبلغ 76.8 في مجموعة بيانات WikiReading. نقوم أيضًا بتقييم النموذج في إعداد شبه خاضع للإشراف عن طريق اختزال مجموعة تدريب WikiReading لإنشاء كميات أصغر بشكل متزايد من الإشراف ، مع ترك مجموعة المستندات الكاملة غير المسماة لتدريب وحدة تشفير تلقائية للتسلسل على نوافذ المستندات. نقوم بتقييم النماذج التي يمكنها إعادة استخدام حالات ومخرجات التشفير التلقائي دون ضبط أوزانها ، مما يسمح بتدريب واستدلال أكثر كفاءة.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une architecture hiérarchique pour la lecture automatique capable d'extraire des informations précises à partir de longs documents. Le modèle divise le document en petites fenêtres superposées et code toutes les fenêtres en parallèle avec un RNN. Il s'occupe ensuite de ces encodages de fenêtre, les réduisant à un seul codage, qui est décodé en une réponse à l'aide d'un décodeur de séquence. Cette approche hiérarchique permet au modèle de s'adapter à des documents plus longs sans augmenter le nombre d'étapes séquentielles. Dans un environnement supervisé, notre modèle atteint une précision de 76,8 sur le jeu de données WikiReading. Nous évaluons également le modèle dans un environnement semi-supervisé en sous-échantillonnant l'ensemble de formation WikiReading pour créer des niveaux de supervision de plus en plus réduits, tout en laissant le corpus de documents non étiquetés complet pour entraîner un encodeur automatique de séquence sur les fenêtres de document. Nous évaluons des modèles qui peuvent réutiliser les états et les sorties de l'encodeur automatique sans ajuster leur poids, ce qui permet un entraînement et une inférence plus efficaces.", 'es': 'Introducimos una arquitectura jerárquica para la lectura automática capaz de extraer información precisa de documentos largos. El modelo divide el documento en pequeñas ventanas superpuestas y codifica todas las ventanas en paralelo con una RNN. Luego, se ocupa de estas codificaciones de ventana, reduciéndolas a una única codificación, que se decodifica en una respuesta mediante un decodificador de secuencia. Este enfoque jerárquico permite que el modelo escale a documentos más largos sin aumentar el número de pasos secuenciales. En un entorno supervisado, nuestro modelo logra una precisión de vanguardia de 76.8 en el conjunto de datos de WikiReading. También evaluamos el modelo en un entorno semi-supervisado reduciendo el muestreo del conjunto de capacitación de WikiReading para crear cantidades cada vez más pequeñas de supervisión, al tiempo que dejamos todo el corpus de documentos sin etiqueta para entrenar un autocodificador de secuencias en las ventanas de documentos. Evaluamos modelos que pueden reutilizar los estados y salidas del autocodificador sin ajustar sus pesos, lo que permite un entrenamiento y una inferencia más eficientes.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma arquitetura hierárquica para leitura de máquina capaz de extrair informações precisas de documentos longos. O modelo divide o documento em pequenas janelas sobrepostas e codifica todas as janelas em paralelo com uma RNN. Em seguida, ele atende essas codificações de janela, reduzindo-as a uma única codificação, que é decodificada em uma resposta usando um decodificador de sequência. Essa abordagem hierárquica permite que o modelo seja dimensionado para documentos mais longos sem aumentar o número de etapas sequenciais. Em um ambiente supervisionado, nosso modelo atinge precisão de 76,8 no conjunto de dados WikiReading. Também avaliamos o modelo em uma configuração semi-supervisionada, reduzindo a amostragem do conjunto de treinamento do WikiReading para criar quantidades cada vez menores de supervisão, enquanto deixamos todo o corpus de documentos não rotulados para treinar um autoencoder de sequência nas janelas de documentos. Avaliamos modelos que podem reutilizar estados e saídas do autoencoder sem ajustar seus pesos, permitindo treinamento e inferência mais eficientes.', 'ru': 'Мы вводим иерархическую архитектуру машинного чтения, способную извлекать точную информацию из длинных документов. Модель разделяет документ на небольшие перекрывающиеся окна и кодирует все окна параллельно с RNN. Затем он отслеживает эти оконные кодировки, сводя их к одной кодировке, которая декодируется в ответ с помощью декодера последовательности. Такой иерархический подход позволяет масштабировать модель до более длинных документов без увеличения числа последовательных шагов. В контролируемой обстановке наша модель достигает самой современной точности 76,8 на наборе данных WikiReading. Мы также оцениваем модель в полуконтролируемой настройке, уменьшая выборку обучающего набора WikiReading для создания все меньших объемов контроля, оставляя полный немеченный корпус документа для обучения автокодера последовательности на окнах документов. Мы оцениваем модели, которые могут повторно использовать состояния и выходы автокодера без точной настройки их веса, что позволяет более эффективно обучать и делать выводы.', 'hi': 'हम मशीन पढ़ने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित वास्तुकला पेश करते हैं जो लंबे दस्तावेजों से सटीक जानकारी निकालने में सक्षम है। मॉडल दस्तावेज़ को छोटे, ओवरलैपिंग विंडो में विभाजित करता है और सभी खिड़कियों को एक RNN के साथ समानांतर में एन्कोड करता है। यह तब इन विंडो एन्कोडिंग पर भाग लेता है, उन्हें एक एकल एन्कोडिंग में कम करता है, जिसे अनुक्रम विकोडक का उपयोग करके उत्तर में डीकोड किया जाता है। यह पदानुक्रमित दृष्टिकोण मॉडल को अनुक्रमिक चरणों की संख्या में वृद्धि किए बिना लंबे समय तक दस्तावेज़ों तक स्केल करने की अनुमति देता है। एक पर्यवेक्षित सेटिंग में, हमारा मॉडल WikiReading डेटासेट पर 76.8 की कला सटीकता की स्थिति प्राप्त करता है। हम WikiReading प्रशिक्षण सेट को डाउनसैम्पलिंग करके एक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सेटिंग में मॉडल का मूल्यांकन भी करते हैं, जो तेजी से छोटी मात्रा में पर्यवेक्षण बनाने के लिए सेट करता है, जबकि दस्तावेज़ खिड़कियों पर एक अनुक्रम ऑटोएनकोडर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए पूर्ण अनलेबल दस्तावेज़ कॉर्पस को छोड़ देता है। हम उन मॉडलों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं जो ऑटोएनकोडर राज्यों और आउटपुट का पुन: उपयोग कर सकते हैं, बिना उनके वजन को ठीक किए बिना, अधिक कुशल प्रशिक्षण और अनुमान के लिए अनुमति देते हैं।', 'zh': '引入机器读取分架构,长文档取精微。 分文档为小窗,以 RNN 编码之。 然后治其窗编码,简而为编码,编码序解码器解码为对。 其法许模至更长之文档,而无加次第之数。 监督之中,WikiReading数集上至于76.8先进之准确性。 减 WikiReading 练集像素采样以质半监设中,以创益少之监督量,兼存完文档语料库,以练序自编码器于文档窗。 论者可以自编码器,而无以调其权,以成其理。', 'ja': '長い文書から正確な情報を抽出できる機械読み取り用の階層アーキテクチャをご紹介します。 モデルは、ドキュメントを小さな重なり合ったウィンドウに分割し、すべてのウィンドウをRNNと並行してエンコードします。 次いで、これらのウィンドウエンコーディングに参加し、それらを単一のエンコーディングに減らします。単一のエンコーディングは、シーケンスデコーダーを使用して応答にデコードされます。 この階層的アプローチにより、モデルは連続するステップの数を増やすことなく、より長いドキュメントにスケーリングすることができます。 監督された設定では、当社のモデルは、WikiReadingデータセットで最先端の76.8の精度を達成します。 また、WikiReadingトレーニングセットをダウンサンプリングして、ドキュメントウィンドウでシーケンスオートエンコーダーをトレーニングするための完全なラベル付けされていないドキュメントコーパスを残しながら、ますます少ない量の監督を作成し、半監督の設定でモデルを評価します。 オートエンコーダの状態と出力を微調整せずに再利用できるモデルを評価し、より効率的なトレーニングと推論を可能にします。', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach ailtireacht ordlathach don léitheoireacht meaisín atá in ann faisnéis bheacht a bhaint as doiciméid fhada. Roinneann an tsamhail an doiciméad ina fhuinneoga beaga forluiteacha agus ionchódaíonn sé gach fuinneog i gcomhthreo le RNN. Freastalaíonn sé ansin thar na hionchóduithe fuinneoige seo, á laghdú go dtí ionchódú amháin, a dhíchódaítear ina fhreagra le díchódóir seichimh. Ligeann an cur chuige ordlathach seo don mhúnla scála a dhéanamh go doiciméid níos faide gan líon na gcéimeanna seicheamhacha a mhéadú. I suíomh maoirsithe, baineann ár múnla cruinneas den scoth 76.8 amach ar thacar sonraí WikiReading. Déanaimid measúnú freisin ar an tsamhail i suíomh leath-mhaoirsithe trí thacar oiliúna WikiReading a íosshampláil chun méideanna maoirseachta atá ag éirí níos lú a chruthú, agus an corpas doiciméad neamhlipéadaithe iomlán a fhágáil chun seicheamh uathchódóir a oiliúint ar fhuinneoga doiciméad. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar shamhlacha ar féidir leo stáit agus aschuir uath-ionchódóra a athúsáid gan a gcuid meáchain a mhionchoigeartú, rud a ligeann d’oiliúint agus tátal níos éifeachtaí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევცვალოთ იერაქტიკალური აქტიქტიკური მაქანის წაკითხვის შესაძლებლობად ძირითადი ინფორმაციას ძირითადი დოკუმენტებიდან გამოყენება მოდელმა დოკუმენტის პატალელად გაყოფილი, გადატანა ფანჯრებში და ყველა ფანჯრები პერალელად RNN-ის კოდის. შემდეგ ეს ფანჯრის კოდირების შესახებ, მათ ერთი კოდირების შესახებ გამოყენება, რომელიც განსხვავებულია კოდირების გამოყენებით. ამ ჰიერაქტიკური პროგრამა მოდელს უფრო მეტი დოკუმენტებში გაზრუნდეს, რომელიც წინასწორებულ კომენტების რაოდენობა გაზრუნდეთ. ჩვენი მოდელეში 76.8 წლის მართლას WikiReading მონაცემების სახელსაწყისათვის მონაცემების მდგომარეობა. ჩვენ ასევე მოდელს დავამუშავებთ სულ დანარწმუშავებული დანარწმუშავებული მოდელში, WikiReading-ის განსწავლების გამოყენებით, რომ შექმნა უფრო პატარა მონარწმუშავებული მოდელეების ზომი, როცა საკუთარი ფანჯრებში და ჩვენ მოდელები, რომლებიც შეგიძლიათ ავტოკოდერების სტატი და გამოსახულებების გამოყენებას გავამუშავებთ, რომლებიც უფრო ეფექტიური განათლებას და ინფრენციას გავამუ', 'el': 'Εισάγουμε μια ιεραρχική αρχιτεκτονική για την ανάγνωση μηχανών ικανή να εξάγει ακριβείς πληροφορίες από μεγάλα έγγραφα. Το μοντέλο διαιρεί το έγγραφο σε μικρά, επικαλυπτόμενα παράθυρα και κωδικοποιεί όλα τα παράθυρα παράλληλα με ένα RNN. Στη συνέχεια παρακολουθεί αυτές τις κωδικοποιήσεις παραθύρων, μειώνοντας τις σε μια ενιαία κωδικοποίηση, η οποία αποκωδικοποιείται σε μια απάντηση χρησιμοποιώντας έναν αποκωδικοποιητή ακολουθίας. Αυτή η ιεραρχική προσέγγιση επιτρέπει στο μοντέλο να κλιμακώνεται σε μεγαλύτερα έγγραφα χωρίς να αυξάνεται ο αριθμός των διαδοχικών βημάτων. Σε εποπτευόμενο περιβάλλον, το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει την ακρίβεια των 76.8 στο σύνολο δεδομένων WikiReading. Επίσης αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο σε μια ημι-εποπτική ρύθμιση, μειώνοντας το εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο για να δημιουργήσουμε όλο και μικρότερες ποσότητες εποπτείας, αφήνοντας παράλληλα το πλήρες άθικτο σώμα εγγράφων για να εκπαιδεύσουμε έναν αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή ακολουθίας σε παράθυρα εγγράφων. Αξιολογούμε μοντέλα που μπορούν να επαναχρησιμοποιούν καταστάσεις και εξόδους αυτόματου κωδικοποιητή χωρίς να ρυθμίζουν τα βάρη τους, επιτρέποντας πιο αποτελεσματική εκπαίδευση και συμπεράσματα.', 'hu': 'Olyan hierarchikus architektúrát vezetünk be a gépi olvasáshoz, amely képes pontos információkat kinyerni hosszú dokumentumokból. A modell a dokumentumot kis, átfedő ablakokra osztja, és az összes ablakot RNN-vel párhuzamosan kódolja. Ezután részt vesz ezeken az ablakkódolásokon, egyetlen kódolásra csökkentve őket, amelyet egy szekvencia dekódoló segítségével dekódolnak. Ez a hierarchikus megközelítés lehetővé teszi, hogy a modell hosszabb dokumentumokra méretezze anélkül, hogy növelné a szekvenciális lépések számát. Felügyelt környezetben modellünk 76.8 pontos pontosságot ér el a WikiReading adatkészleten. Ezenkívül félig felügyelt környezetben értékeljük a modellt, úgy, hogy a WikiReading képzéskészletet leereszketjük, hogy egyre kisebb mennyiségű felügyeletet hozzon létre, miközben a teljes címke nélküli dokumentumkorpuszt hagyjuk, hogy egy szekvencia automatikus kódolót képezzen dokumentumablakokra. Olyan modelleket értékelünk, amelyek képesek újrafelhasználni az autoencoder állapotokat és kimeneteket anélkül, hogy finomhangolnák a súlyukat, lehetővé téve a hatékonyabb edzést és következtetést.', 'kk': 'Біз құжаттардан дұрыс мәліметті алып тастай алатын машинаны оқу үшін иерархиялық архитектураны таңдап береміз. Бұл үлгі құжатты кішкентай, үстінен кейінгі терезелерде бөліп, барлық терезелерді RNN параллерімен кодтайды. Содан кейін ол терезе кодтамасына қатысу үшін, оларды бір кодтамасына көшірмеледі. Бұл кодтамасы реттеу декодтамасынан жауап декодтамасы болады. Бұл иерархиялық тәсілі келесі қадамдар санын көтермей үлгі құжаттарға ұзындық өлшеміне мүмкіндік береді. Біздің моделіміз WikiReading деректер жиынындағы 76.8 деңгейінің дұрыстығын жеткізеді. Мұндай-ақ біз үлгісін жарты бақылау баптауында, WikiReading бақылау бағдарламасын төмендету үшін, құжаттың терезелерінде автокодтамасын өзгерту үшін төмендету бағдарламасын шектеп, жарты бақылау баптауларында бағалаймыз. Біз автокодердің күйін қайта қолдануға мүмкіндік беретін үлгілерді бағалаймыз. Олардың маңыздылығын түзетуге мүмкіндік береді.', 'it': "Introducemo un'architettura gerarchica per la lettura automatica in grado di estrarre informazioni precise da documenti lunghi. Il modello divide il documento in piccole finestre sovrapposte e codifica tutte le finestre in parallelo con un RNN. Poi assiste sopra queste codificazioni della finestra, riducendole a una singola codifica, che viene decodificata in una risposta utilizzando un decoder di sequenza. Questo approccio gerarchico consente al modello di scalare documenti più lunghi senza aumentare il numero di passaggi sequenziali. In un ambiente supervisionato, il nostro modello raggiunge l'accuratezza dello stato dell'arte di 76.8 sul set di dati WikiReading. Valutiamo anche il modello in un ambiente semi-supervisionato riducendo il set di addestramento WikiReading per creare quantità sempre più piccole di supervisione, lasciando l'intero corpus di documenti senza etichetta per addestrare un autocodificatore di sequenza sulle finestre dei documenti. Valutiamo modelli che possono riutilizzare gli stati e le uscite dell'autoencoder senza mettere a punto i loro pesi, consentendo un allenamento e un'inferenza più efficienti.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame hierarchinę mašinų skaitymo architektūrą, galinčią gauti tikslią informaciją iš ilgų dokumentų. Modelis padalija dokumentą į mažus, sutampančius langus ir koduoja visus langus lygiagrečiai su RNN. Tada jis dalyvauja per šiuos lango kodavimus, sumažindamas juos iki vieno kodavimo, kuris yra dekoduotas į atsakymą naudojant sekos dekoderį. Šis hierarchinis metodas leidžia modeliui išplėsti iki ilgesnių dokumentų, nesudidinant eilinių žingsnių skaičiaus. Prižiūrint mūsų model į WikiReading duomenų rinkinyje pasiektas 76.8 tikslumas. Taip pat vertiname model į pusiau prižiūrimomis aplinkybėmis, sumažindami WikiReading mokymo rinkinį, kad būtų sukurta vis mažesnė priežiūra, paliekant visą nepažymėtą dokumentų korpusą, kad būtų mokomas sekos autokodatorius dokumentų languose. Vertiname modelius, kurie gali pakartotinai naudoti autokoduojančias būkles ir rezultatus, nenustatant jų svorio, leidžiančius veiksmingiau mokytis ir daryti išvadas.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме хиерархиска архитектура за машинско читање способна да извлече прецизни информации од долги документи. Моделот го подели документот на мали, копирачки прозорци и ги кодира сите прозорци паралелно со РНН. Потоа присуствува преку овие кодирања на прозорците, намалувајќи ги на едно кодирање, кое е декодирано во одговор користејќи декодирање на секвенца. Овој хиерархички пристап му овозможува на моделот да се промени на подолги документи без зголемување на бројот на секвенцијални чекори. Во надгледувано место, нашиот модел постигнува најсовремена точност од 76,8 на WikiReading датотеката. Ние, исто така, го проценуваме моделот во полунадгледувано место со намалување на обуката за WikiReading за да создадеме сé помали количини на надзор, додека целиот неозначен документски корпус да обучува автокодер на секвенца на прозорците на документите. Ние ги проценуваме моделите кои можат повторно да ги користат состојбите и излезите на автокодерот без да ги поправиме нивните тегови, овозможувајќи поефикасна обука и конференција.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan arkitektur hierarkis untuk pembacaan mesin yang mampu mengekstrak maklumat tepat dari dokumen panjang. Model membahagi dokumen ke tetingkap kecil, bertutup dan mengekod semua tetingkap secara selari dengan RNN. Kemudian ia menghadiri pengekodan tetingkap ini, mengurangkannya kepada pengekodan tunggal, yang disedekod kepada jawapan menggunakan pengekod urutan. pendekatan hierarkis ini membolehkan model untuk skala ke dokumen yang lebih panjang tanpa meningkatkan bilangan langkah berturut-turut. Dalam seting yang diawasi, model kita mencapai ketepatan seni 76.8 pada set data WikiReading. Kami juga menilai model dalam seting setengah-mengawasi dengan mengurangkan pelatihan WikiReading seting untuk mencipta jumlah pengawasan semakin kecil, sementara meninggalkan korpus dokumen yang tidak ditandai penuh untuk melatih pengekod urutan pada tetingkap dokumen. Kami menilai model yang boleh menggunakan semula keadaan auto pengekod dan output tanpa menyesuaikan beban mereka, membolehkan latihan dan kesimpulan yang lebih efisien.', 'ml': 'നീണ്ട രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന യന്ത്ര വായിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കലിക്കല്\u200d  ഈ രേഖയെ ചെറിയ ചെറിയ ജാലകങ്ങളിലേക്ക് വിഭജിക്കുകയും, ജാലകങ്ങള്\u200d മേല്\u200dപിടിക്കുകയും, ഒരു RNN പാരായമായി എല്ലാ ജാലക പിന്നീട് അത് ഈ ജാലകത്തിന്റെ കോഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d ചേരുന്നു, ഒരു കോഡിങ്ങിലേക്ക് കുറച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് സെക ഈ ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d നടപടികളുടെ എണ്ണം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കാതെ മോഡലിന് കൂടുതല്\u200d രേഖകളിലേക്ക് വലുതാക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദി സൂക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിക്കിരിഡ്യൂട്ട് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d 76. വിക്കിരിഡിംഗ് പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചെറുതായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d വിക്കിരിഡ് സെറ്റിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മാതൃകയില്\u200d മോഡലിനെയും വില്\u200dക്ക സ്വയം കോണ്\u200dഡെര്\u200d രാജ്യങ്ങളും പുനരാജ്യങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d നമുക്ക് വിലയിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അവരുടെ തൂ', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu arkitettura ġerarkika għall-qari bil-magna li kapaċi testrezzjona informazzjoni preċiża minn dokumenti twal. Il-mudell jaqsam id-dokument fi twieqi żgħar u li jikkoinċidu u jikkodifika t-twieqi kollha b’mod parallel ma’ RNN. Imbagħad jattendi fuq dawn l-ikkodifikazzjonijiet tat-tieqa, u jnaqqas dawn għal kodifikazzjoni waħda, li hija dekodifikata f’risposta bl-użu ta’ dekodifikatur tas-sekwenza. Dan l-approċċ ġerarkiku jippermetti li l-mudell jiżdied għal dokumenti itwal mingħajr ma jiżdied in-numru ta’ passi sekwenzjali. F’ambjent sorveljat, il-mudell tagħna jikseb l-aktar preċiżjoni avvanzata ta’ 76.8 fis-sett tad-dejta WikiReading. Aħna jevalwaw ukoll il-mudell f’ambjent semi-sorveljat billi niżlu l-kampjuni tat-taħriġ WikiReading sett biex joħolqu ammonti dejjem iżgħar ta’ superviżjoni, filwaqt li jħallu l-korpus sħiħ tad-dokument mingħajr tikketta biex iħarreġ awtokoder tas-sekwenza fuq it-twieqi tad-dokumenti. Aħna jevalwaw mudelli li jistgħu jużaw mill-ġdid l-istati tal-awtokoders u l-prodotti mingħajr ma jiġu rfinuti l-piżijiet tagħhom, u b’hekk ikun hemm taħriġ u inferenza aktar effiċjenti.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy hierarchiczną architekturę odczytu maszynowego zdolną do wydobycia precyzyjnych informacji z długich dokumentów. Model dzieli dokument na małe, nakładające się okna i koduje wszystkie okna równolegle z RNN. Następnie obsługuje te kodowania okna, redukując je do pojedynczego kodowania, które jest dekodowane w odpowiedzi za pomocą dekodera sekwencji. To hierarchiczne podejście umożliwia skalowanie modelu do dłuższych dokumentów bez zwiększania liczby kolejnych kroków. W nadzorowanym otoczeniu nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejszą dokładność 76.8 na zbiorze danych WikiReading. Oceniamy również model w ustawieniu częściowo nadzorowanym poprzez redukcję zestawu szkoleniowego WikiReading w celu stworzenia coraz mniejszych ilości nadzoru, jednocześnie pozostawiając pełny nieoznakowany korpus dokumentu do trenowania autokodera sekwencji w oknach dokumentów. Oceniamy modele, które mogą ponownie używać stanów i wyjść autokodera bez dostosowywania ich wagi, co pozwala na bardziej efektywne treningi i wnioskowanie.', 'mn': 'Бид машин уншиж чадах машины архитектурыг урт баримтуудаас тодорхой мэдээллийг авах боломжтой. Загвар нь баримтыг жижиг, давхарлах цонхыг хувааж, бүх цонхыг RNN-тэй параллель шилжүүлдэг. Тэгээд энэ цонхны кодлог дээр оролцож, нэг кодлог руу багасгаж, дарааллын кодлог ашиглан хариулт болно. Энэ архитектур загвар нь дараагийн алхам тоог нэмэгдэхгүй урт баримтууд хэмжээгээр хурдан баримтууд болдог. Манай загвар нь WikiReading өгөгдлийн сангийн 76.8 оны хуулийн зөв байдлыг хүргэж байна. Бид мөн загварыг хагас удирдлагатай байгуулалт дээр WikiReading суралцах сургалтыг бага зэрэг бага хэмжээний ажиллагааг бүтээж, баримтын цонхны дараа автоматжуулагч сургалтыг автоматжуулахын тулд бүрэн бичигдэггүй баримтын корпус-г орхи Бид автокодлогч орнуудыг дахин ашиглаж чадах загварыг үнэлдэг. Тэдний жингийг сайн тодорхойлж чадахгүй, илүү үр дүнтэй суралцах болон халдварлах боломжтой.', 'ro': 'Introducem o arhitectură ierarhică pentru citirea automată capabilă să extragă informații precise din documente lungi. Modelul împarte documentul în ferestre mici, suprapuse și codează toate ferestrele în paralel cu un RNN. Acesta participă apoi peste aceste codări ferestre, reducându-le la o singură codificare, care este decodată într-un răspuns folosind un decodor secvențial. Această abordare ierarhică permite modelului să se scaleze la documente mai lungi fără a crește numărul de pași secvențiali. Într-un cadru supravegheat, modelul nostru atinge o acuratețe de ultimă oră de 76.8 pe setul de date WikiReading. De asemenea, evaluăm modelul într-un cadru semi-supravegheat prin dezamplarea setului de instruire WikiReading pentru a crea cantități din ce în ce mai mici de supraveghere, lăsând în același timp corpul complet de documente fără etichete pentru a instrui un codor automat de secvență pe ferestrele documentelor. Evaluăm modele care pot reutiliza stările și ieșirile auto-encoder fără a-și regla greutățile, permițând antrenament și inferență mai eficiente.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo hijerarhičku arhitekturu za čitanje mašine sposobne za izvlačenje preciznih informacija iz dugih dokumenta. Model podeli dokument u mali, preklapajući prozori i kodira sve prozore paralelno sa RNN-om. Onda prisustvuje kodiranju prozora, smanjuje ih na jedno kodiranje, koji se dekodira u odgovor koristeći dekoder sekvence. Ovaj hijerarhički pristup omogućava modelu da izmjeri duže dokumente bez povećanja broja sekvencijskih koraka. U nadzornom stanju, naš model postiže stanje tačnosti umjetnosti 76,8 na WikiReading dataset. Takođe procjenjujemo model u polu-nadzornom postavljanju smanjujući uzorak WikiReading obuke kako bi stvorili sve manje količine nadzora, dok ostavljamo punu nezabeliranu dokumentsku korpusu kako bi obučili sekvenčni autokoder na prozorima dokumenta. Procjenjujemo modele koji mogu ponovo iskoristiti države autokodera i rezultate bez finalnog prilagođenja njihovih težina, omogućavajući učinkovitiju obuku i infekciju.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismo hierarchical ah oo lagu akhriyo mashiinada oo awoodi karo in macluumaad qaali ah ka soo bixiyo dukumentiyada dheer. The model divides the document into small, overlapping windows and encodes all windows in parallel with an RNN.  Markaas waxay ka qeybqaadan kartaa kaararka daaqada, wuxuuna u dhigi doonaa mid kaliya codsiga, kaas oo loo qoray jawaab lagu isticmaalayo codsiga dabadeed. Dhaqdhaqaaqa hierarkiisan wuxuu sameyn karaa sameynta dukumentiyada dheer iyadoon kordhin tallaabooyin dabadeed. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa xaaladda saxda farshaxanka ee 76.8 ee ku qoran taariikhda WikiReading. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa qoraalka hoos looga ilaaliyey sawirida waxbarashada WikiReading si aan u sameyno tiro yar oo ilaaliya, isla markaasna waxaynu ka tagaynaa koobka dukumentiga oo dhan oo aan la labeyn si aan u tababarinno qoraal-korodhka iskuulka ah oo ku qoran daaqadaha dukumentiyada. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa tusaalooyin ay dib u isticmaali karaan wadamada iskaa-codsiga iyo soo bixinta oo aan si fiican u isticmaalin miisaankooda, waxaana sidoo kale u heli karnaa waxbarasho faa’iido badan iyo cayiman.', 'si': 'අපි ලොකු ලොකු දස්තාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ තොරතුරු අරගන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය කියවන්න පද්ධතියක් සිද්ධ මොඩේල් ලිපිණිය පුංචි විතරයි, විතරයි, කවුළු වලින් සියළු කවුළු RNN එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය විතරයි. ඊට පස්සේ ඒක මේ කවුළු සංකේතනයක් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනවා, ඔවුන්ව තරම් සංකේතනයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින්  මේ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වැඩ විකිරීඩිංග් දත්ත සෙට් එකේ 76.8 කුළු ස්ථානයක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා. අපි සම්පූර්ණ විකිරීඩිංග් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා විකිරීඩිංග් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා විකිරීඩිංග් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්න අපි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ස්වයංකෝඩර් ජාතිය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ඔවුන්ග', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein hierarkisk arkitektur for maskinelesing som kan pakke ut nøyaktig informasjon frå lang dokument. Modellen deler dokumentet til små, overlapping vindauge og kodar alle vindauge parallell med eit RNN. Den deltar derfor på desse vindaugskodingane, og reduserer dei til ein enkel koding, som er koda til ein svar med ein sekvendekoder. Denne hierarkiske tilnærminga lèt modellen skalera til lengre dokument utan å auka talet på sekvensiske steg. I eit oversikt innstillinga er modellen vårt nådd tilstand til kunstnøyaktighet 76,8 på WikiReading datasettet. Vi evaluerer også modellen i ein halvoversikt innstilling ved å nedlasta prøving av WikiReading-opplæringa som er sett for å laga meir mindre mengdar oversikt, mens det fullstendige dokument-korpusen som ikkje er merka til å trena ei sekvenskoding automatisk på dokumentvindauge. Vi evaluerer modeller som kan gjenoppretta automatisk koderingstilstandar og utdata utan å finne vekta sine, og tillater meir effektivt trening og infeksjon.', 'ur': 'ہم نے ماشین پڑھنے کے لئے ایک حیراتیکل معماری معماری معماری پیش کرتا ہے جو بہت سی معلومات کو طویل دکھانے سے نکالنے کے قابل ہے۔ Model divides the document into small, overlapping windows and encode all windows in parallel with an RNN. اس کے بعد وہ ان پنڈروں کے اکنوڈینڈ پر حاضر ہوتا ہے، انہیں ایک اکنوڈینڈ تک کم کر دیتا ہے، جسے ایک سطح اکنوڈر کے مطابق ایک جواب میں ڈکوڈ کیا جاتا ہے. This hierarchical approach allows the model to scale longer documents without increasing the number of sequential steps. ایک نظارت کی جگہ میں، ہماری مدل ویکیریڈینگ ڈیٹ سٹ پر 76.8 کی آرت کی دقیق موجود ہوتی ہے. ہم نے اس موڈل کو نیم نظارت کی سٹینٹ میں مطابق مطابق مطابق ویکیریڈینگ کی تطابق کے ذریعہ ڈونپل کرتا ہے کہ زیادہ چھوٹی زیادہ نظارت کی تعداد پیدا کرے، جب تک کامل غیر قابل نوشتہ دفتر کورپوس کو چھوڑ دیتا ہے کہ دفتر ویندوز ہم مدل کا ارزش کر رہے ہیں جن کی استعمال کرسکتے ہیں کہ اپنے وزن کے بغیر اٹوٹوٹوٹ کو دوبارہ استعمال کرسکتے ہیں، اور ان کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ مفید ترکین اور نازل کرنے کی اجازت دیتے ہیں.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en hierarkisk arkitektur för maskinläsning som kan extrahera exakt information från långa dokument. Modellen delar upp dokumentet i små överlappande fönster och kodar alla fönster parallellt med ett RNN. Den deltar sedan över dessa fönsterkodningar och reducerar dem till en enda kodning, som avkodas till ett svar med hjälp av en sekvensavkodare. Detta hierarkiska tillvägagångssätt gör det möjligt för modellen att skala till längre dokument utan att öka antalet sekventiella steg. I en övervakad miljö uppnår vår modell toppmodern noggrannhet på 76,8 på WikiReading datauppsättningen. Vi utvärderar också modellen i en halvövervakad miljö genom att nedsampla WikiReading träningsuppsättningen för att skapa allt mindre mängder övervakning, samtidigt som den fullständiga omärkta dokumentkorpusen lämnar för att träna en sekvensautokodare på dokumentfönster. Vi utvärderar modeller som kan återanvända autoencoder tillstånd och utgångar utan att finjustera vikterna, vilket möjliggör effektivare träning och inferens.', 'ta': 'நீண்ட ஆவணங்களிலிருந்து சரியான தகவலை வெளியேற்ற முடியும் இயந்திரம் படிப்பதற்கான ஒரு மின்னஞ்சல் அடைவு Name பிறகு அது சாளரத்தின் குறியீட்டின் மீது சேரும், ஒரு குறியீட்டிற்கு அதை குறியீடு செய்யும், அது வரிசையின் குறியீட்ட பின்வரும் படிகளின் எண்ணிக்கையை அதிகரிக்காமல் இந்த மாதிரியை நீண்ட ஆவணங்களுக்கு அளவிட அனுமதிக்கும். ஒரு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பில், எங்கள் மாதிரி விகிரிக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பில் 76. 8 கலை சரியான நிலையை பெறுகிறது. விகிரிக்கும் பயிற்சி அமைப்பை மாதிரியில் நாம் மாதிரி மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் அதிகமாக சிறிய கண்காணிப்பு உருவாக்குவதற்கு, போது முழு அறியாத ஆவண கோப்புகளை விட்டு தொடர்  தானே குறியீட்டு நாடுகள் மற்றும் வெளியீடுகளை மீண்டும் பயன்படுத்த முடியும் மாதிரிகளை நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், அதிக தேவையா', 'uz': "Biz uzun hujjatdan foydalanish mumkin boʻlgan kompyuterni o'qish uchun hierarchik arxituvchini anglatamiz. Name Name Name Koʻrsatiladigan moslamada, modelmiz WikiReading maʼlumotlar sohasida 76.8 haqida saqlash holatini bajaradi. Biz qo'shimcha supervissiya yaratish uchun WikiReading tugmasini yozib qo'yish mumkin, va dokumentar oynalarda bir necha kodlash uchun butun notoʻgʻri hujjatning kodlash qoidasini avtomatik o'rganish uchun butun ishlatmaydi. Biz avtomatik kodlash davlatlarini qaytadan foydalanadigan modellarni qiymatimiz va o'zlarining o'lchamini yaxshi ko'proq o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kiến trúc cấp cao cho việc đọc máy có khả năng lấy được thông tin chính xác từ những tài liệu dài. Mô hình chia tài liệu thành các cửa sổ nhỏ, chồng chéo nhau và mã hóa tất cả các cửa sổ song song với RNN. Nó tham gia vào các mã số cửa sổ này, giảm chúng thành một mã số duy nhất, được giải mã thành một câu trả lời bằng một mã số. Cách tiếp cận cấp cao này cho phép mô hình quy mô thành các tài liệu dài hơn mà không tăng số bước theo chuỗi. Trong một thiết lập được giám sát, mẫu của chúng ta đạt độ chính xác nghệ thuật cao của Thank.8 trên tập tin WikiLReading. Chúng tôi cũng đánh giá mô hình trong một thiết lập được giám sát gần bằng việc tải xuống phần tập luyện WikiLReading để tạo ra một số lượng giám sát càng nhỏ hơn, trong khi đó tập đoàn tài liệu đã hoàn to àn không có hiệu để huấn luyện mã hóa dãy trên các cửa sổ tài liệu. Chúng tôi đánh giá các mẫu có thể tái sử dụng trạng thái mã hóa tự động và xuất mà không cần chỉnh lại lượng, cho phép huấn luyện và suy luận hiệu quả hơn.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме йерархична архитектура за машинно четене, способна да извлича точна информация от дълги документи. Моделът разделя документа на малки, припокриващи се прозорци и кодира всички прозорци успоредно с РНН. След това той присъства над тези кодировки на прозорците, намалявайки ги до едно кодиране, което се декодира в отговор с помощта на декодер на последователност. Този йерархичен подход позволява моделът да мащабира до по-дълги документи, без да увеличава броя на последователните стъпки. В контролирана обстановка нашият модел постига най-съвременна точност от 76.8 в набора от данни на УикиРединг. Също така оценяваме модела в полу-надзорна обстановка чрез намаляване на набор от обучения за създаване на все по-малки количества надзор, като същевременно оставяме пълния незабелязан документ да обучава последователен автокодер на прозорците на документи. Ние оценяваме модели, които могат да използват повторно състоянието и изходите на автокодера без фино настройване на тежестите им, което позволява по-ефективно обучение и заключения.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een hiërarchische architectuur voor machinelezen die nauwkeurige informatie uit lange documenten kan halen. Het model verdeelt het document in kleine, overlappende vensters en codeert alle vensters parallel met een RNN. Vervolgens worden deze venstercoderingen bijgewoond, waardoor ze worden teruggebracht tot één enkele codering, die wordt gedecodeerd in een antwoord met behulp van een sequentie decoder. Deze hiërarchische aanpak maakt het mogelijk om het model te schalen naar langere documenten zonder het aantal opeenvolgende stappen te verhogen. In een begeleide omgeving bereikt ons model state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid van 76.8 op de WikiReading dataset. We evalueren het model ook in een semi-supervised setting door de WikiReading trainingsset te downsamplen om steeds kleinere hoeveelheden supervisie te creëren, terwijl het volledige ongelabelde documentcorpus wordt gelaten om een sequentie autocoder op documentvensters te trainen. We evalueren modellen die autoencoder toestanden en uitgangen kunnen hergebruiken zonder hun gewicht te verfijnen, waardoor efficiëntere training en inferentie mogelijk is.', 'de': 'Wir führen eine hierarchische Architektur für maschinelles Lesen ein, die präzise Informationen aus langen Dokumenten extrahieren kann. Das Modell teilt das Dokument in kleine, überlappende Fenster auf und codiert alle Fenster parallel zu einem RNN. Anschließend werden diese Fensterkodierungen bearbeitet und auf eine einzige Kodierung reduziert, die mit einem Sequenzdecoder in eine Antwort dekodiert wird. Dieser hierarchische Ansatz ermöglicht es, das Modell auf längere Dokumente zu skalieren, ohne die Anzahl der aufeinanderfolgenden Schritte zu erhöhen. In einer überwachten Umgebung erreicht unser Modell eine Genauigkeit von 76.8 auf dem WikiReading-Datensatz. Wir evaluieren das Modell auch in einer semi-überwachten Einstellung, indem wir das WikiReading-Trainingsset heruntersampling, um immer kleinere Mengen an Überwachung zu schaffen, während wir den gesamten unbeschrifteten Dokumentkorpus belassen, um einen Sequenz-Autoencoder an Dokumentfenstern zu trainieren. Wir evaluieren Modelle, die Autoencoder-Zustände und -Ausgänge wiederverwenden können, ohne ihre Gewichte zu verfeinern, was ein effizienteres Training und eine effizientere Inferenz ermöglicht.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan arsitektur hierarkis untuk pembacaan mesin yang mampu mengekstraksi informasi yang tepat dari dokumen panjang. Model membagi dokumen ke jendela kecil, bertindak saling bertindak dan mengkode semua jendela secara parallel dengan RNN. It then attends over these window encodings, reducing them to a single encoding, which is decoded into an answer using a sequence decoder.  pendekatan hierarkis ini memungkinkan model untuk skala ke dokumen yang lebih panjang tanpa meningkatkan jumlah langkah sekuensi. Dalam pengawasan, model kita mencapai akurasi seni 76.8 di dataset WikiReading. Kami juga mengevaluasi model dalam seting semi-mengawasi dengan mengurangi pelatihan WikiReading set untuk menciptakan jumlah pengawasan semakin kecil, sementara meninggalkan seluruh dokumen corpus tanpa label untuk melatih sebuah urutan autoencoder pada jendela dokumen. Kami mengevaluasi model yang dapat menggunakan ulang negara-negara autoencoder dan output tanpa memperbaiki berat badan mereka, memungkinkan pelatihan dan kesimpulan yang lebih efisien.', 'ko': '우리는 긴 문서에서 정확한 정보를 추출할 수 있는 기계적 읽기 차원 구조를 소개했다.이 모델은 문서를 작은 중첩 창으로 나누고 RNN을 사용하여 모든 창을 병렬 인코딩합니다.그리고 이 창 인코딩을 처리하여 단일 인코딩으로 간소화하고, 시퀀스 디코더를 사용하여 해독을 해답으로 한다.이런 층을 나누는 방법은 연속적인 단계의 수를 늘리지 않고 모델을 더 긴 문서로 확장할 수 있다.감시 환경에서 우리 모델은 위키리딩 데이터 세트에서 76.8의 최신 정밀도를 얻었다.또한 WikiReading 훈련집을 샘플링하여 점점 작아지는 감독량을 만들고 반감독 환경에서 모델을 평가하며 문서 창에 표시되지 않은 문서 자료 라이브러리를 완전하게 보존하여 시퀀스 자동 인코더를 훈련합니다.우리는 자동 인코더 상태와 출력 모델을 다시 사용할 수 있으며, 그 무게를 미세하게 조절하지 않아도 더욱 효율적인 훈련과 추리를 실현할 수 있다고 평가한다.', 'fa': 'ما یک معماری معماری معماری برای خواندن ماشین قادر به اخراج اطلاعات دقیق از مدارک طولانی معرفی می کنیم. مدل سند را به پنجره\u200cهای کوچک تقسیم می\u200cکند و تمام پنجره\u200cها را با RNN متفاوت می\u200cکند. سپس بر روی این رمزبندی پنجره حاضر می\u200cشود، آن\u200cها را به یک رمزبندی کوتاه می\u200cکند، که با استفاده از یک رمزبندی به یک پاسخ رمزبندی می\u200cشود. این دستور تدریجی به مدل اجازه می\u200cدهد تا مدل به سند\u200cهای طولانی ارزش دهد بدون افزایش تعداد قدم\u200cهای سفارشی. در یک تنظیم تحت نظر، مدل ما به وضعیت دقیق هنر 76.8 در مجموعه داده های ویکیReading رسیده است. ما همچنین مدل را در یک تنظیمات نیمه تحت نظر می\u200cگیریم با تنظیمات نمونه\u200cهای پایین\u200cاندازی مجموعه آموزش WikiReading برای ایجاد اندازه\u200cهای کوچک\u200cتر از نظر، در حالی که کل سند غیرقابل نوشته شده را ترک می\u200cکنیم تا در پنجره\u200cهای سند یک تنظیمات خود\u200cانداز ما مدل\u200cها را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتوانند دوباره استفاده از ایالت\u200cهای خودکار و نتیجه\u200cهای خودکار را بدون تنظیم وزن\u200cهایشان، که می\u200cتوانند آموزش و آلودگی\u200cهای مثبت\u200cتر استفاده کنند.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha ujenzi wa ubunifu wa mashine yanayoweza kupata taarifa sahihi kutoka kwenye nyaraka ndefu. Mfano huo unagawanya nyaraka kuwa ndogo, na kuvuka vituo vinginevyo na kuingiza vinasa vyote vilivyofanana na RNN. Kisha inahudhuria kodi hizi za равзанi, kupunguza kwa kodi moja, ambalo limekodiwa katika jibu kwa kutumia kodi ya mfululizo. Hatua hii ya kiuchumi inaruhusu modeli kupanda nyaraka za muda mrefu bila kuongeza idadi ya hatua za baadae. Katika mazingira ya kudhibitiwa, mifano yetu inafanikiwa hali ya ukweli wa sanaa ya 76.8 kwenye seti ya taarifa za WikiReading. Kadhalika tunatathmini mtindo huo katika mazingira ya kusimamiwa kwa kipindi cha sekondari kwa kutengeneza mafunzo ya WikiReading kwa ajili ya kutengeneza kiasi kidogo cha ufuatiliaji, wakati tunaacha makampuni ya nyaraka zisizoeleweka ili kufundisha kodi ya mfululizo wa mfululizo katika windowa za dokumu. We evaluate models that can reuse autoencoder states and outputs without fine-tuning their weights, allowing for more efficient training and inference.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo hijerarhičku arhitekturu za čitanje strojeva sposobne za izvlačenje preciznih informacija iz dugih dokumenta. Model podijeli dokument u male, preklapajuće prozore i kodira sve prozore paralelno s RNN-om. Onda prisustvuje preko tih kodiranja prozora, smanjuje ih na jedno kodiranje, koji se dekodira u odgovor koristeći dekoder sekvencije. Ovaj hijerarhički pristup omogućava modelu skalirati do dužih dokumenta bez povećanja broja sekvencijskih koraka. U nadzornom stanju, naš model postiže stanje točnosti umjetnosti 76,8 na WikiReading dataset. Također procjenjujemo model u polu nadzornom postavljanju smanjujući uzorak WikiReading obuke kako bi stvorili sve manje količine nadzora, dok ostavljamo punu nezabeliranu dokumentsku korpusu kako bi obučili sekvenčni autokoder na prozorima dokumenta. Procjenjujemo modele koji mogu ponovno iskoristiti države autokodera i rezultate bez finalnog prilagođenja njihovih težina, omogućavajući učinkovitiju obuku i infekciju.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en hierarkisk arkitektur til maskinlæsning, der er i stand til at udtrække præcise oplysninger fra lange dokumenter. Modellen opdeler dokumentet i små, overlappende vinduer og koder alle vinduer parallelt med et RNN. Det deltager derefter over disse vindueskodninger, reducerer dem til en enkelt kodning, som afkodes til et svar ved hjælp af en sekvens dekoder. Denne hierarkiske tilgang gør det muligt for modellen at skalere til længere dokumenter uden at øge antallet af sekventielle trin. I en overvåget indstilling opnår vores model topmoderne nøjagtighed på 76,8 på WikiReading datasættet. Vi evaluerer også modellen i en semi-overvåget indstilling ved at nedsample WikiReading træningssættet for at skabe stadig mindre mængder overvågning, samtidig med at det fulde mærkede dokumentkorpus efterlades til at træne en sekvens autoencoder på dokumentvinduer. Vi evaluerer modeller, der kan genbruge autoencoder-tilstande og -udgange uden at finjustere deres vægt, hvilket giver mulighed for mere effektiv træning og inference.', 'tr': 'Uzun senediň dogry maglumaty a çmak üçin maşynyň okamak üçin bir iýerarhiýa arhitektura girdirip bilýäris. Bu model senedi kiçik, üstekleýän äpişgelerde bölýär we hemme äpişgeleri RNN bilen parallel ködleýär. Sonra bu äpişgäniň ködlemelerini ýeke bir ködleme üçin azaltýar. Bu ýerde bir çözüm kodlemek üçin bir jogaba kodlanýar. Bu iýerarhiýa ýagdaý nusgasyny soňky adımlaryň sayyny artmazdan uzaklaşdyrmak üçin rugsat berýär. Besitlendirilen çykyş içinde, biziň modelimiz WikiReading veri setinde 76.8-njy tapylýar. Biz hem bu nusgany WikiReading okuwçysyny düşürmek üçin ýarym kontrol edilen düzümlerde deňleýäris, we bu nusgany sened korpusyny sened pencerelerinde dizi awtomatik kodeçä öwretmek üçin ullanýarys. Biz öz kodeýa döwletlerini ýene-de ulanyp biljek nusgalary çykarýarys. Ýüzerinde täsirli okuw we çykyş etmek üçin rugsat berýäris.', 'am': 'ከረጅም ሰነዶች የጽኑ መረጃዎችን ለማውጣት የሚችለውን የመረጃ መሠረት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ዓይነት It then attends over these window encodings, reducing them to a single encoding, which is decoded into an answer using a sequence decoder.  ይህም አዳራቢካዊ አካሄድ ምሳሌውን በጥምቀት ሰነዱን ለማሳደግ ይችላል፡፡ በተጠበቀው ግንኙነት፣ ሞዴላያችን በWikiReading ዳታ ማድረግ ላይ 76.8 የጥሩ ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ እና በWikiReading ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን በመቀነስ እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ የራሳቸውን የኮድ ሀገራት እና ውጤቶችን በመስመር ማድረግ የሚችሉትን ምሳሌዎች እናስተዋልታለን፤ ለጥቅም ማህበረት እና ማስጠንቀቂያውን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեքենաների կարդալու հիերարխիկ ճարտարապետություն, որը կարող է ճշգրիտ տեղեկատվություն ստանալ երկար փաստաթղթերից: Մոդելը բաժանում է փաստաթղթին փոքր պատուհաններով և կոդավորում է բոլոր պատուհանները զուգահեռ ՌՆԹ-ի հետ: Այն հետո մասնակցում է այս պատուհանի կոդավորումների վրա, նվազեցնելով դրանք միայն մեկ կոդավորում, որը կոդավորված է պատասխանի մեջ՝ օգտագործելով հաջորդականության կոդավոր: Այս հիերարխիկ մոտեցումը թույլ է տալիս մոդելը մեծացնել մինչև երկար փաստաթղթեր առանց աճելու հաջորդական քայլերի թիվը: Հետևում է մեր մոդելը հասնում է WiKiread-ի տվյալների համակարգի 76.8 լավագույն ճշգրտության: We also evaluate the model in a semi-supervised setting by downsampling the WikiReading training set to create increasingly smaller amounts of supervision, while leaving the full unlabeled document corpus to train a sequence autoencoder on document windows.  Մենք գնահատում ենք մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են վերաօգտագործել ինքնախմբավորող վիճակները և արտադրանքները առանց բարելավելու իրենց կշիռը, թույլ տալով ավելի արդյունավետ ուսումնասիրություն և եզրակացություն:', 'az': 'Biz makinelərin oxuyacağı hiyerarşik arhitektarını uzaq belgelerden münasibətli məlumatları alırıq. Model döküməni kiçik, üstünlük pəncərələrə bölər və bütün pəncərələri RNN ilə parallel kodlayır. Sonra pəncərə kodlayıcıların üstündə oturur, onları tək bir kodlayıcıya düşürür, bu da seçmə kodlayıcısı ilə bir cevaba kodlanır. Bu hiyerarşik tərzi modelinin səviyyəsini artırmadan uzun beləliklərə böyüklənməsinə imkan verir. Növbəti tərzdə, modellərimiz WikiReading veri qutusundakı 76.8 sanatın doğruluğuna yetişir. Biz həmçin in modelini yarı gözləyirik, WikiReading təcrübəsini düşürmək üçün daha kiçik təcrübəsini yaratmaq üçün modelini qədər təcrübə edirik, belə ki, bütün yazılmamış döküm korpusu döküm pəncərələrində seçmək üçün seçmə avtomatik kodlayıcısını təcrübə edir. Biz öz kodlayıcı eyaletlerini və çətinlərini düzəltmədən yenidən istifadə edə biləcək modelləri değerləşdiririk, daha müvəffəqiyyətli təhsil və təhsil edə biləcəyik.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një arkitekturë hierarkike për leximin e makinave të aftë për të nxjerrë informacion të saktë nga dokumentet e gjata. Modeli ndan dokumentin në dritare të vogla, të mbishtypura dhe kodon të gjitha dritaret në paralel me një RNN. Pastaj merr pjesë mbi këto kodifikime të dritares, duke i reduktuar ato në një kodifikim të vetëm, i cili është dekoderuar në një përgjigje duke përdorur një dekoder sekuence. This hierarchical approach allows the model to scale to longer documents without increasing the number of sequential steps.  Në një ambient të mbikqyrur, modeli ynë arrin saktësinë më të lartë të 76.8 në dataset WikiReading. We also evaluate the model in a semi-supervised setting by downsampling the WikiReading training set to create increasingly smaller amounts of supervision, while leaving the full unlabeled document corpus to train a sequence autoencoder on document windows.  Ne vlerësojmë modelet që mund të përdorin përsëri shtetet e autokoduesit dhe daljet pa rregulluar peshët e tyre, duke lejuar trajnimin dhe përfundimin më të efektshëm.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n hierarkies arkitektuur vir masjien lees wat moontlik is om presies inligting uit lang dokumente te uittrek. Die model deel die dokument in klein, oorslapping vensters en kodeer alle vensters in parallele met 'n RNN. Dit dink dan by hierdie venster enkodering, verduur hulle na 'n enkele enkodering, wat is dekodeer binne 'n antwoord deur 'n sekwensiedekoder te gebruik. Hierdie hierarchiese toegang laat toe die model om langer dokumente te skaal sonder die aantal sekwensiele stappe te vermeerder. In 'n ondersoekte instelling, ons model bereik staat van die kuns presies van 76.8 op die WikiReading datastel. Ons evalueer ook die model in 'n semi-ondersoekte instelling deur die WikiReading ondersoek te maak om meer kleiner hoeveelheid van ondersoek te skep, terwyl die volle onbesoekte dokument korpus verlaat om 'n volgorde outokoder op dokumentvensters te trein. Ons evalueer modele wat outokoder staatste en uitvoerdes hergebruik kan word sonder om hul gewigte te fin-tuneer, wat toelaat vir meer effektief onderwerking en inferensie.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo hijerarhičku arhitekturu za čitanje strojeva sposobne za izvlačenje preciznih informacija iz dugih dokumenta. Model podijeli dokument u male, preklapajuće prozore i kodira sve prozore paralelno s RNN-om. Onda prisustvuje preko tih kodiranja prozora, smanjuje ih na jedno kodiranje, koji se dekodira u odgovor koristeći dekoder sekvence. Ovaj hijerarhički pristup omogućava modelu da izmjeri duže dokumente bez povećanja broja sekvencijskih koraka. U nadzornom stanju, naš model postiže stanje točnosti umjetnosti 76,8 na WikiReading dataset. Također procjenjujemo model u polu-nadzornom postavljanju smanjujući uzorak WikiReading obuke kako bi stvorili sve manje količine nadzora, dok ostavljamo punu nezabeliranu dokumentsku korpusu kako bi obučili autokoder sekvence na prozorima dokumenta. Procjenjujemo modele koji mogu ponovno iskoristiti države autokodera i rezultate bez finalnog prilagođenja njihovih težina, omogućavajući učinkovitiju obuku i infekciju.', 'ca': "Introduïm una arquitectura jeràrquica per llegir màquines capaç d'extrair informació precisa de llargs documents. El model divideix el document en finestres petites i sovrapposibles i codifica totes les finestres parallelament amb un RNN. Després assisteix a aquestes codificacions de finestres, reduint-les a una única codificació, que es decodifica en una resposta utilitzant un decodificador de seqüència. This hierarchical approach allows the model to scale to longer documents without increasing the number of sequential steps.  En un entorn supervisat, el nostre model aconsegueix una precisió d'última generació de 76,8 a WikiReading. També evaluem el model en un entorn semisupervisat reduint el conjunt d'entrenaments WikiReading per crear cada vegada més petites quantitats de supervisió, deixant al mateix temps el corpus complet sense marca per entrenar un autocodificador de seqüència a finestres de documents. Evaluam models que poden reutilitzar estats i productes autocodificadors sense ajustar els seus pesos, permetent formació i inferència més eficients.", 'bn': 'আমরা মেশিন পড়ার জন্য একটি হিয়ারার্কিল কাঠামো পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা দীর্ঘ নথিপত্র থেকে সঠিক তথ্য পাঠ করতে সক্ষম। নথিটি ছোট, উইন্ডোর মধ্যে বিভক্ত করে এবং একটি RNN এর সাথে তুলনায় সকল উইন্ডোর সাথে এনকোড করে। তারপর এটি এই উইন্ডোর এনকোডিং এর উপর অংশগ্রহণ করে, একটি এনকোডে কমিয়ে দেয়, যা একটি সেকেন্স ডিকোডার ব্যবহার করে একটি উত্তরে ডিকোড করা হয়। This hierarchical approach allows the model to scale to longer documents without increasing the number of sequential steps.  উইকিরিডিং ডাটাসেটে আমাদের মডেল ৭৬. উইকিরিডিং প্রশিক্ষণ নির্ধারণের মাধ্যমে আমরা সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণের মডেলের মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি যেখানে বাড়তে থাকা ছোট পর্যবেক্ষণ তৈরি করার জন্য উইকিরিডিং প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয় কোডার রাষ্ট্র এবং আউটপুট পুনরায় ব্যবহার করতে পারি মডেলের মূল্য মূল্যায়ন করি, যা তাদের ওজনের ভার ব্যবস্থা ছাড়া আর', 'fi': 'Kehitämme koneenlukuun hierarkkisen arkkitehtuurin, joka pystyy poimimaan tarkkoja tietoja pitkistä asiakirjoista. Malli jakaa asiakirjan pieniin päällekkäisiin ikkunoihin ja koodaa kaikki ikkunat rinnakkain RNN:n kanssa. Sen jälkeen se käsittelee näitä ikkunakoodauksia ja vähentää ne yhdeksi koodaukseksi, joka dekoodataan vastaukseksi käyttämällä sekvenssi dekooderia. Tämä hierarkkinen lähestymistapa mahdollistaa mallin skaalautumisen pidempiin asiakirjoihin lisäämättä peräkkäisten vaiheiden määrää. Valvotussa ympäristössä mallimme saavuttaa huipputason tarkkuuden 76,8 WikiReading-aineistossa. Arvioimme mallia myös puolivalvotussa ympäristössä vähentämällä WikiReading-koulutuskokonaisuutta luomalla yhä pienempiä määriä valvontaa, samalla kun jätämme koko merkitsemättömän dokumenttikorpuksen kouluttamaan sekvenssin automaattikoodaajaa dokumenttien ikkunoissa. Arvioimme malleja, jotka voivat käyttää uudelleen automaattikooderin tiloja ja lähtöjä hienosäätämättä painoja, mikä mahdollistaa tehokkaamman harjoittelun ja päättelyn.', 'et': 'Tutvustame masinlugemise hierarhilist arhitektuuri, mis võimaldab pikkadest dokumentidest täpset teavet saada. Mudel jagab dokumendi väikesteks kattuvateks akendeks ja kodeerib kõik aknad paralleelselt RNN-iga. Seejärel osaleb see üle nende akende kodeeringute, vähendades need üheks kodeeringuks, mis dekodeeritakse vastuseks, kasutades jadadekodeerijat. Selline hierarhiline lähenemine võimaldab mudelil skaalata pikemate dokumentidega, suurendamata järjestikuste etappide arvu. Järelevalve all saavutab meie mudel WikiReadingu andmekogumi tipptasemel täpsuse 76,8. Samuti hindame mudelit pooljuhitavas keskkonnas, vähendades WikiReadingu koolituskomplekti, et luua järjest väiksemaid järelevalvekoguseid, jättes samas täieliku märgistamata dokumendikorpuse, et koolitada järjestuse automaatkodeerijat dokumendiaknas. Hindame mudeleid, mis suudavad automaatkodeerija olekuid ja väljundeid uuesti kasutada ilma kaalu peenhäälestamata, võimaldades tõhusamalt treenida ja järeldada.', 'cs': 'Představujeme hierarchickou architekturu pro strojové čtení schopnou extrahovat přesné informace z dlouhých dokumentů. Model rozděluje dokument na malá, překrývající se okna a kóduje všechna okna paralelně s RNN. Poté se účastní těchto kódování okna a redukuje je na jediné kódování, které je dekódováno do odpovědi pomocí sekvenčního dekódování. Tento hierarchický přístup umožňuje model škálovat na delší dokumenty bez zvýšení počtu postupných kroků. Ve sledovaném prostředí dosahuje náš model nejmodernější přesnosti 76.8 na datové sadě WikiReading. Model také vyhodnocujeme v polovičně dohledovém nastavení downsamplingu školicí sady WikiReading tak, abychom vytvořili stále menší množství dohledu, přičemž celý neoznačený korpus dokumentu nechali trénovat sekvenční autokodér na oknech dokumentu. Vyhodnocujeme modely, které mohou znovu použít stavy a výstupy autokodéru bez jemného ladění jejich hmotnosti, což umožňuje efektivnější trénink a odvoz.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé ngewehi sistem dijeraké kanggo basa gambar kang sampeyan iso nggawe informasi sing apik dhéwé nggawe tokkumun. Name FindOK Kernel Where's the data set? Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi nggawe model ning cara-cara sing wis nguasai nguasai perusahaan Winih Awak dhéwé éntuk model sing isa nggawe autokoder stad lan ijol-ijol sing paling nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kejahatan, iso nggawe aturan tambah sing luwih apik lan ujaran.", 'ha': "Tuna fara wani matsayi na hirariyaki wa karatun kafin da za'a iya iya iya samun takardar tsawo daga takardun aiki. @ info: whatsthis Sa'an nan yana shiga kodi na wannan tagan, yana ƙara su zuwa kodkodi guda, da kuma an kodi su zuwa jabu da ake yi amfani da kodi-kodi. Wannan aikin hirariyaki na yarda motel ya tsẽfo zuwa takardun takardun nan ƙaranci, kuma bã ya ƙara yawan hanyõyin dabam. Daga wani tsarin da aka tsare, misalinmu yana sãmu halin sanannin da ke tsari na 76.8 kan tsarin maɓallin Wikireading. Mu ƙaddara motsi cikin wani tsarin da aka yi tsaro na ƙarami, ko kuma mu samu tsari na Wikireadin da za'a iya ƙiƙiro ko ƙarami masu ƙaranci na tsari, kuma munã barin kodi cikakken takardar da ba'a rubutu ba don ya yi amfani da kode farat ɗaya kan tagogi na takardar. Tuna ƙaddara misãlai da za'a iya yin amfani da dukkan kode farat ɗaya da za'a iya gyara masu nauyi, kuma masu yarda da yin mafiya amfani da masu ƙaranci.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo hierarhično arhitekturo strojnega branja, ki omogoča pridobivanje natančnih informacij iz dolgih dokumentov. Model razdeli dokument na majhna, prekrivajoča se okna in kodira vsa okna vzporedno z RNN. Nato se udeleži teh okenskih kodiranj in jih zmanjša na eno kodiranje, ki se dekodira v odgovor z uporabo dekodirnika zaporedja. Ta hierarhični pristop omogoča modelu prilagajanje daljših dokumentov brez povečanja števila zaporednih korakov. V nadzorovanem okolju naš model doseže vrhunsko natančnost 76,8 na naboru podatkov WikiReading. Model ocenjujemo tudi v polnadzorovanem okolju tako, da zmanjšamo nabor usposabljanj WikiReading, da ustvarimo vse manjše količine nadzora, hkrati pa pustimo celoten neoznačen korpus dokumentov za usposabljanje zaporednega samokodirnika na oknih dokumentov. Ocenjujemo modele, ki lahko ponovno uporabljajo stanja in izhode samokodirnika brez natančnega nastavitve uteži, kar omogoča učinkovitejše treninge in sklepanje.', 'he': 'We introduce a hierarchical architecture for machine reading capable of extracting precise information from long documents.  הדוגמנית מחלקת את המסמך לחלונות קטנות ומסתובבות ומקודמת את כל החלונות במקביל עם RNN. ואז הוא משתתף מעבר לקודדות החלונות האלה, להפחית אותן לקודדות אחת, אשר מתפרסמת לתשובה באמצעות קידוד רצף. הגישה היררכית הזו מאפשרת למודל להתמקד למסמכים ארוכים יותר בלי להעלות את מספר צעדים רצופיים. במסגרת מבוקשת, המודל שלנו משיג מדויקת אומנות של 76.8 על קבוצת מידע WikiReading. אנו גם מעריכים את המודל במסגרת חצי-מפקחת על ידי להפיל את התאמה של WikiReading קבוצה כדי ליצור כמויות קטנות יותר ויותר של פיקוח, בעוד להשאיר את קורפוס המסמכים ללא סימנים מלא לאימון קודם אוטומטי רצף על חלונות מסמכים. אנו מעריכים דוגמנים שיכולים להשתמש מחדש במצבים של קודד אוטומטי והיציאות מבלי להתאים את המשקלים שלהם, מאפשרים לאימונים ויוצאות יעילים יותר.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་རྩིས་ཡུལ་ལ་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་པའི་བཟོ་བཀོད་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བ་ཅིག་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The model divides the document into small, overlapping windows and encodes all windows in parallel with an RNN. དེ་ནས་སྒེའུ་ཁུང་ཁུང་གི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིར་འདི་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་པ་ཡིན་ན་གཅིག་མཚོན་རྟགས་གཅིག་ལ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་མཉམ་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྡན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། ལྟ་རྟོག་ཞུགས་བྱས་པའི་སྒྲིག We also evaluate the model in a semi-supervised setting by downsampling the WikiReading training set to create increasingly smaller amounts of supervision, while leaving the full unlabeled document corpus to train a sequence autoencoder on document windows. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིར་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་ཐུག'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Examples for Evaluating Reading Comprehension Systems', 'ar': 'أمثلة الخصومة لتقييم أنظمة الفهم القرائي', 'es': 'Ejemplos contradictorios para evaluar los sistemas de comprensión lectora', 'pt': 'Exemplos Adversários para Avaliação de Sistemas de Compreensão de Leitura', 'fr': "Exemples contradictoires pour l'évaluation des systèmes de compréhension de la lecture", 'ja': '読解システムを評価するための対抗例', 'ru': 'Примеры соперничества для оценки систем понимания чтения', 'zh': '评估读解系统之对抗性示例', 'hi': 'पठन समझ प्रणालियों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए प्रतिकूल उदाहरण', 'ga': 'Samplaí Sáraíochta chun Córais Léamhthuisceana a Mheastóireacht', 'hu': 'Ellenőrző példák az olvasási értékelési rendszerek értékelésére', 'el': 'Αντίθετα παραδείγματα για την αξιολόγηση συστημάτων κατανόησης ανάγνωσης', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Esempi avversi per la valutazione dei sistemi di comprensione della lettura', 'kk': 'Оқу жүйелерін оқу үшін белсендік мысалдар', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujami skaitymo supratimo sistemų vertinimo pavyzdžiai', 'mk': 'Негативни примери за евалуирање на читањето на системите за разбирање', 'ms': 'Contoh Perlawanan untuk Evaluasi Sistem Pemahaman Pembacaan', 'mt': 'Eżempji Avversi għall-Evalwazzjoni tas-Sistemi ta’ Komprensjoni tal-qari', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉപമകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Унших шинжлэх ухааны системүүдийг үнэлэхэд тусламжтай жишээ', 'no': 'Adversarial eksemplar for evaluering av lesingskomprehensingssystemer', 'pl': 'Przykłady niekorzystne dla oceny systemów zrozumienia czytania', 'ro': 'Exemple adverse pentru evaluarea sistemelor de înțelegere a citirii', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Preporučni primjeri za procjenu sistema kompresije za čitanje', 'sv': 'Adversariska exempel på utvärdering av läsförståelse', 'so': 'Tusaale-horaadka ah ee qiimeynta nidaamka dhamaanka akhriska', 'ta': 'படித்தல் முடிப்பு அமைப்புகளை மதிப்பிட முன்னோரிய உதாரணங்கள்', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کی کمپرنسیون سیسٹم کی مطالعہ کے لئے مخالف مثالیں', 'uz': '@ info', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Рекламни примери за оценка на системите за разбиране на четенето', 'hr': 'Preporučni primjeri za procjenu sustava komprenzije za čitanje', 'nl': 'Bijwerkende voorbeelden voor het evalueren van leesbegripssystemen', 'da': 'Modsatte eksempler på evaluering af læseforståelsessystemer', 'de': 'Adversarische Beispiele für die Bewertung von Leseverständnissystemen', 'fa': 'مثالهای مخالفت برای ارزیابی سیستم\u200cهای تفکیر خواندن', 'id': 'Contoh Adversarial for Evaluating Reading Comprehension Systems', 'ko': '읽기 이해 시스템의 대항적 예를 평가하다', 'sw': 'Mfano wa Zaidi wa Kutathmini Mfumo wa Uwezeshaji Kusoma', 'af': 'Adversariale voorbeelde vir evaluering lees komprehensie stelsels', 'tr': 'Okamak Derjesini Taýýarlamak üçin döredilişi mysal', 'sq': 'Shembuj kundërshtarë për vlerësimin e sistemeve të kuptimit të leximit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Ընդհակառակ օրինակներ ընթերցման ընկալումների համակարգերի գնահատման համար', 'bn': 'পাঠক সম্পাদন সিস্টেম পরিমাণের জন্য পূর্ববর্তী উদাহরণ', 'az': 'Oxulma T톛r톛fl톛ndirm톛si Sisteml톛rini Q톛rcl톛m톛k 칲칞칲n m칲톛llif Misal', 'bs': 'Preporučni primjeri za procjenu sistema kompresije za čitanje', 'ca': 'Exemples adversaris per avaluar sistemes de comprensió de llegir', 'cs': 'Nepříznivé příklady pro hodnocení systémů rozumějících čtení', 'et': 'Kõrvaltoimed lugemissüsteemide hindamiseks', 'fi': 'Adversarial Exemples for Evaluating Reading Comprehension Systems', 'he': 'דוגמאות נוגדות להערכה מערכות ביטוי קריאה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Neželeni primeri za ocenjevanje sistemov za razumevanje branja', 'jv': 'Advertorial example for invaluing Reading Compréncion System', 'bo': 'Adversarial Examples for Evaluating Reading Comprehension Systems'}
{'en': 'Standard accuracy metrics indicate that reading comprehension systems are making rapid progress, but the extent to which these systems truly understand language remains unclear. To reward systems with real language understanding abilities, we propose an adversarial evaluation scheme for the Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Our method tests whether systems can answer questions about paragraphs that contain adversarially inserted sentences, which are automatically generated to distract computer systems without changing the correct answer or misleading humans. In this adversarial setting, the accuracy of sixteen published models drops from an average of 75 % F1 score to 36 % ; when the adversary is allowed to add ungrammatical sequences of words, average accuracy on four models decreases further to 7 %. We hope our insights will motivate the development of new models that understand language more precisely.', 'ar': 'تشير مقاييس الدقة القياسية إلى أن أنظمة فهم القراءة تحرز تقدمًا سريعًا ، لكن مدى فهم هذه الأنظمة حقًا للغة يظل غير واضح. لمكافأة الأنظمة بقدرات فهم اللغة الحقيقية ، نقترح مخطط تقييم خصامي لمجموعة بيانات الإجابة على الأسئلة في جامعة ستانفورد (SQuAD). تختبر طريقتنا ما إذا كان بإمكان الأنظمة الإجابة على أسئلة حول الفقرات التي تحتوي على جمل مدرجة بشكل متعارض ، والتي يتم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا لإلهاء أنظمة الكمبيوتر دون تغيير الإجابة الصحيحة أو تضليل البشر. في هذا الوضع العدائي ، تنخفض دقة ستة عشر نموذجًا منشورًا من متوسط 75٪ درجة F1 إلى 36٪ ؛ عندما يُسمح للخصم بإضافة متواليات غير نحوية من الكلمات ، ينخفض متوسط الدقة في أربعة نماذج أكثر إلى 7٪. نأمل أن تحفز رؤيتنا على تطوير نماذج جديدة تفهم اللغة بشكل أكثر دقة.', 'fr': "Les mesures de précision standard indiquent que les systèmes de compréhension de la lecture progressent rapidement, mais la mesure dans laquelle ces systèmes comprennent réellement la langue reste floue. Pour récompenser les systèmes ayant de réelles capacités de compréhension du langage, nous proposons un système d'évaluation contradictoire pour le Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Notre méthode teste si les systèmes peuvent répondre à des questions concernant des paragraphes contenant des phrases insérées de manière contradictoire, qui sont générées automatiquement pour distraire les systèmes informatiques sans modifier la bonne réponse ni induire en erreur les humains. Dans ce contexte contradictoire, la précision de seize modèles publiés passe d'une moyenne de 75\xa0% de score F1 à 36\xa0%\xa0; lorsque l'adversaire est autorisé à ajouter des séquences de mots non grammaticales, la précision moyenne sur quatre modèles diminue encore pour atteindre 7\xa0%. Nous espérons que nos connaissances motiveront le développement de nouveaux modèles qui comprennent la langue de façon plus précise.", 'pt': 'Métricas de precisão padrão indicam que os sistemas de compreensão de leitura estão progredindo rapidamente, mas a extensão em que esses sistemas realmente entendem a linguagem ainda não está clara. Para recompensar sistemas com habilidades reais de compreensão de linguagem, propomos um esquema de avaliação adversarial para o Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Nosso método testa se os sistemas podem responder a perguntas sobre parágrafos que contêm frases inseridas de forma adversa, que são geradas automaticamente para distrair os sistemas de computador sem alterar a resposta correta ou enganar os humanos. Nesse cenário de adversários, a precisão de dezesseis modelos publicados cai de uma média de 75% da pontuação F1 para 36%; quando o adversário pode adicionar sequências não gramaticais de palavras, a precisão média em quatro modelos diminui ainda mais para 7%. Esperamos que nossos insights motivem o desenvolvimento de novos modelos que entendam a linguagem com mais precisão.', 'es': 'Las métricas de precisión estándar indican que los sistemas de comprensión lectora están progresando rápidamente, pero aún no está claro hasta qué punto estos sistemas entienden realmente el lenguaje. Para recompensar a los sistemas con habilidades reales de comprensión del lenguaje, proponemos un esquema de evaluación contradictoria para el conjunto de datos de respuestas a preguntas de Stanford (sQuad) Nuestro método prueba si los sistemas pueden responder preguntas sobre párrafos que contienen oraciones insertadas de forma adversa, que se generan automáticamente para distraer a los sistemas informáticos sin cambiar la respuesta correcta ni engañar a los humanos. En este contexto contradictorio, la precisión de dieciséis modelos publicados cae de un promedio de 75% de puntuación F1 al 36%; cuando se permite al adversario añadir secuencias de palabras no gramaticales, la precisión promedio en cuatro modelos disminuye aún más hasta el 7%. Esperamos que nuestros conocimientos motiven el desarrollo de nuevos modelos que entiendan el lenguaje con mayor precisión.', 'ja': '標準的な精度の指標は、読解システムが急速に進歩していることを示していますが、これらのシステムが言語を本当に理解しているかどうかはまだ不明です。実際の言語理解能力を持つシステムに報酬を与えるために、スタンフォード・クエスチョン・アンサーリング・データセット（ SQuAD ）の対抗評価スキームを提案します。私たちの方法は、システムが対立的に挿入された文章を含む段落に関する質問に答えることができるかどうかをテストします。これは、正しい答えを変更したり、人間を誤解させたりすることなく、コンピュータシステムの注意をそらすために自動的に生成されます。この対立的な設定では、16の公開されたモデルの精度は、平均75 ％のF 1スコアから36 ％に低下します。対立相手が非文法的な単語のシーケンスを追加することを許可されると、4つのモデルの平均精度はさらに7 ％に低下します。私たちの洞察が、言語をより正確に理解する新しいモデルの開発の動機になることを願っています。', 'zh': '准准确性指标明,读解统正取速进,而此语之未详也。 为赏真言理解能力系统,为斯坦福问答数据集(SQuAD)发一对抗性评方。 吾法试统对对抗性插句之段落,此句自生,以散计算机系统意,而不变正误。 于此对抗性置,16已发模准确率自均75%F1得分降至36%。 当许敌加不合语法单词序,四模之均准确率更降至7%。 愿言将激劝,开语更精新。', 'hi': 'मानक सटीकता मैट्रिक्स इंगित करते हैं कि रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन सिस्टम तेजी से प्रगति कर रहे हैं, लेकिन ये सिस्टम वास्तव में भाषा को किस हद तक समझते हैं, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है। वास्तविक भाषा समझने की क्षमताओं के साथ सिस्टम को पुरस्कृत करने के लिए, हम स्टैनफोर्ड प्रश्न उत्तर डेटासेट (SQuAD) के लिए एक प्रतिकूल मूल्यांकन योजना का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि परीक्षण करती है कि क्या सिस्टम उन पैराग्राफों के बारे में सवालों के जवाब दे सकते हैं जिनमें प्रतिकूल रूप से सम्मिलित वाक्य होते हैं, जो सही उत्तर को बदलने या मनुष्यों को गुमराह किए बिना कंप्यूटर सिस्टम को विचलित करने के लिए स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न होते हैं। इस प्रतिकूल सेटिंग में, सोलह प्रकाशित मॉडल की सटीकता 75% F1 स्कोर के औसत से 36% तक गिर जाती है; जब विरोधी को शब्दों के अव्याकरणिक अनुक्रमों को जोड़ने की अनुमति दी जाती है, तो चार मॉडलों पर औसत सटीकता 7% तक कम हो जाती है। हमें उम्मीद है कि हमारी अंतर्दृष्टि नए मॉडलों के विकास को प्रेरित करेगी जो भाषा को अधिक सटीक रूप से समझते हैं।', 'ru': 'Стандартные метрики точности показывают, что системы понимания чтения быстро прогрессируют, но степень, в которой эти системы действительно понимают язык, остается неясной. Чтобы вознаградить системы, обладающие способностями к пониманию реального языка, мы предлагаем схему состязательной оценки для набора данных для ответов на вопросы Стэнфордского университета (SQuAD). Наш метод проверяет, могут ли системы отвечать на вопросы о параграфах, содержащих состязательно вставленные предложения, которые автоматически генерируются, чтобы отвлечь компьютерные системы без изменения правильного ответа или введения людей в заблуждение. В этой состязательной постановке точность шестнадцати опубликованных моделей падает от среднего балла 75% F1 до 36%; когда противнику разрешается добавлять неграмматические последовательности слов, средняя точность на четырех моделях снижается еще до 7%. Мы надеемся, что наши идеи будут мотивировать разработку новых моделей, которые лучше понимают язык.', 'ga': 'Léiríonn méadrachtaí caighdeánacha cruinnis go bhfuil dul chun cinn tapa á dhéanamh ag córais léamhthuisceana, ach ní léir cé chomh fíor agus a thuigeann na córais seo teanga. Chun luach saothair a thabhairt do chórais a bhfuil fíor-chumas tuisceana teanga acu, molaimid scéim mheastóireachta sáraíochta do Thacar Sonraí Freagraí Ceist Stanford (SQuAD). Déanann ár modh tástáil an féidir le córais ceisteanna a fhreagairt faoi mhíreanna ina bhfuil abairtí a cuireadh isteach go sáraíochta, a ghintear go huathoibríoch chun aird a tharraingt ar chórais ríomhaireachta gan an freagra ceart a athrú nó daoine a chur amú. Sa suíomh sáraíochta seo, titeann cruinneas sé mhúnla déag foilsithe ó mheánscór 75% F1 go 36%; nuair a cheadaítear don namhaid seichimh neamhghramadacha focal a chur leis, laghdaítear an meánchruinneas ar cheithre mhúnla go dtí 7%. Tá súil againn go spreagfaidh ár léargais forbairt samhlacha nua a thuigeann teanga níos beaichte.', 'ka': 'სტანდარტური წარმოდგენების მეტრიკის შესახებ, რომ კითხვის შესახებ სისტემები ძალიან წარმოდგენა, მაგრამ ამ სისტემები სინამდვილედ იცომა ენაზე არაფერი. სისტემების შესაძლებლობისთვის, რომელიც რეალური ენის შესაძლებლობისთვის გავიგებთ, ჩვენ სტანფორდის კითხვის შესაძლებლობისთვის სექმის განაკეთება (SQuAD). ჩვენი მეტი ტესტის შესაძლებელია თუ სისტემები პარაგრაფიების შესახებ, რომლებიც არაფერად დამატებული სიტყვების შესახებ, რომლებიც ავტომატურად შექმნილი კომპიუტერის სის ამ განსაკუთრებულ შესახებ, შვიდი განაკუთრებული მოდელების წარმოდგენეობა 75% F1 წარმოდგენის განსაკუთრებით 36%-დან გადასვლა; როდესაც საბოლოო მოდელის შესაძლებლობა სტრამიკალური სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა დამატება, საშუალო მართლა 4 მოდელის შესაძლებლობა დამატება 7%-ზე. ნაეწგამვ ჟვ, ფვ ნაქთრვ ოპვეგთე ღვ მჲრთგთპარ ნჲგთრვ მჲევლთ, კჲთრჲ ოჲ-ოპაგთლნჲ პაჱბთპარ ენვჟ.', 'hu': 'A szabványos pontossági mutatók azt mutatják, hogy az olvasásértő rendszerek gyors fejlődést érnek el, de ezek a rendszerek milyen mértékben értik meg a nyelvet. A valódi nyelvértési képességekkel rendelkező rendszerek jutalmazása érdekében a Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD) ellenséges értékelési rendszerét javasoljuk. Módszerünk teszteli, hogy a rendszerek képesek-e válaszolni olyan bekezdésekre vonatkozó kérdésekre, amelyek ellentmondással beszúrt mondatokat tartalmaznak, amelyek automatikusan generálódnak a számítógépes rendszerek figyelmét anélkül, hogy megváltoztatnák a helyes választ, vagy félrevezetnék az embereket. Ebben az ellentétes beállításban tizenhat publikált modell pontossága átlagosan 75%-os F1 pontszámról 36%-ra csökken; amennyiben az ellenfél számára engedélyezett szavakat adhat hozzá, négy modell átlagos pontossága tovább 7%-ra csökken. Reméljük, hogy ismereteink motiválni fogják olyan új modellek kialakítását, amelyek pontosabban megértik a nyelvet.', 'el': 'Οι τυπικές μετρήσεις ακρίβειας δείχνουν ότι τα συστήματα κατανόησης ανάγνωσης σημειώνουν ταχεία πρόοδο, αλλά ο βαθμός στον οποίο αυτά τα συστήματα κατανοούν πραγματικά τη γλώσσα παραμένει ασαφής. Για να ανταμείψουμε συστήματα με πραγματικές ικανότητες γλωσσικής κατανόησης, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα αντιπαραβολής αξιολόγησης για το σύνολο δεδομένων απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις του Στάνφορντ (SQuAD). Η μέθοδος μας εξετάζει αν τα συστήματα μπορούν να απαντήσουν σε ερωτήσεις σχετικά με παραγράφους που περιέχουν αντίθετες προτάσεις, οι οποίες δημιουργούνται αυτόματα για να αποσπάσουν την προσοχή των συστημάτων υπολογιστών χωρίς να αλλάξουν τη σωστή απάντηση ή να παραπλανήσουν τους ανθρώπους. Σε αυτό το αντίθετο περιβάλλον, η ακρίβεια των δεκαέξι δημοσιευμένων μοντέλων μειώνεται από μέσο όρο 75% βαθμολογίας F1 σε 36%· όταν ο αντίπαλος επιτρέπεται να προσθέσει μη γραμματικές ακολουθίες λέξεων, η μέση ακρίβεια σε τέσσερα μοντέλα μειώνεται περαιτέρω σε 7%. Ελπίζουμε ότι οι γνώσεις μας θα παρακινήσουν την ανάπτυξη νέων μοντέλων που κατανοούν τη γλώσσα με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια.', 'it': "Le metriche standard di accuratezza indicano che i sistemi di comprensione della lettura stanno facendo rapidi progressi, ma la misura in cui questi sistemi capiscono veramente il linguaggio rimane incerta. Per premiare i sistemi con reali capacità di comprensione del linguaggio, proponiamo uno schema di valutazione avversaria per il dataset di risposta alle domande di Stanford (SQUAD). Il nostro metodo verifica se i sistemi possono rispondere a domande su paragrafi che contengono frasi inserite in modo contrario, che vengono generate automaticamente per distrarre i sistemi informatici senza cambiare la risposta corretta o fuorviare gli esseri umani. In questa impostazione avversaria, l'accuratezza di sedici modelli pubblicati scende da una media del 75% di punteggio F1 al 36%; Quando l'avversario può aggiungere sequenze di parole non grammaticali, l'accuratezza media su quattro modelli diminuisce ulteriormente fino al 7%. Speriamo che le nostre intuizioni possano motivare lo sviluppo di nuovi modelli che comprendano il linguaggio in modo più preciso.", 'kk': 'Стандартты дұрыс метрикалық оқу жүйелерінің түсініктері жылдам жағдайды, бірақ бұл жүйелердің тілдері дұрыс түсініп тұрғанын көрсетеді. Жүйелерді шындық тілдерді түсінім мүмкіндіктеріне ұсыну үшін Станфорд сұрақ жауап беру деректер бағдарламасы (SQuAD) үшін қарсы оқу сұлбасын ұсынамыз. Біздің әдіміміз жүйелердің қарсы тіркелген сөйлемелер туралы сұрақтарды жауап беруге болады, бұл компьютер жүйелерін дұрыс жауап не қате адамдарды өзгертпей, автоматты түрде құрылад Бұл қарсы параметрде оның алты жарияланған моделдердің дұрыстығы 75% F1 нөмірінен 36% деп қалды. қарсы сөздердің неграмматикалық тізбектерін қосуға рұқсат етілгенде, төрт үлгілердің орташа дұрыстығы 7% дегенге кейін төмендетді. Біз өзіміздің түсініктеріміз тілді дұрыс түсініп, жаңа моделдерді жасауға мүмкіндік береді деп үміттенеміз.', 'lt': 'Standartiniai tikslumo rodikliai rodo, kad skaitymo supratimo sistemos daro greitą pažangą, tačiau, kiek šios sistemos tikrai supranta kalbą, vis dar neaišku. Siekiant atlyginti sistemas, turinčias tikrų kalbų supratimo gebėjimų, siūlome prieštaringo vertinimo sistemą Stanfordo atsakymų į klausimus duomenų rinkiniui (SQuAD). Mūsų metodas bando, ar sistemos gali atsakyti į klausimus dėl punktų, kuriuose yra prieštaringai įterptų sakinių, kurie automatiškai sukuriami siekiant nukreipti dėmesį į kompiuterines sistemas nekeičiant teisingo atsakymo ar klaidinant žmonių. Šiuo prieštaringu atveju šešiolika paskelbtų modelių tikslumas sumažėja nuo vidutiniškai 75 % F1 rezultato iki 36 %; kai priešininkui leidžiama pridėti neagramatines žodžių sekas, vidutinis tikslumas keturiems modeliams toliau mažėja iki 7 %. Tikimės, kad mūsų supratimai paskatins kurti naujus modelius, kurie tiksliau suprastų kalbą.', 'mk': 'Стандардните метрики на точност покажуваат дека системите за разбирање на читањето напредуваат брзо, но степенот во кој овие системи навистина го разбираат јазикот останува нејасен. За да ги наградиме системите со вистински способности за разбирање на јазикот, предложуваме противна програма за проценка на Стенфорд Датотеката за одговори на прашањата (SQuAD). Нашиот метод тестира дали системите можат да одговараат на прашања за параграфии кои содржат непријателски вметнати реченици, кои се автоматски генерирани за да ги одвлечат вниманието на компјутерските системи без да го променат правилниот одговор или Во ова непријателско место точноста на шеснаесет објавени модели се намалува од просечно 75 отсто од оценката Ф1 на 36 отсто; кога противникот може да додаде неграматични секвенции на зборови, просечната точност на четири модели понатаму се намалува на 7 отсто. Се надеваме дека нашите информации ќе го мотивираат развојот на нови модели кои попрецизно го разбираат јазикот.', 'ms': 'Metrik ketepatan piawai menunjukkan bahawa sistem pemahaman membaca membuat kemajuan cepat, tetapi jangkauan yang sistem ini benar-benar memahami bahasa tetap tidak jelas. Untuk membalas sistem dengan kemampuan pemahaman bahasa sebenar, kami melamar skema penilaian lawan untuk Set Data Jawapan soalan Stanford (SQuAD). Kaedah kami menguji sama ada sistem boleh menjawab soalan mengenai paragraf yang mengandungi kalimat yang disisipkan secara lawan, yang secara automatik dijana untuk mengalihkan perhatian sistem komputer tanpa mengubah jawapan yang betul atau menyesatkan manusia. Dalam tetapan lawan ini, ketepatan 16 model yang diterbitkan menurun dari rata-rata 75% skor F1 ke 36%; when the adversary is allowed to add ungrammatical sequences of words, average accuracy on four models decreases further to 7%.  Kami harap pandangan kita akan mendorong pembangunan model baru yang memahami bahasa dengan lebih tepat.', 'mt': "Il-metriċi standard tal-preċiżjoni jindikaw li s-sistemi ta’ komprensjoni tal-qari qed jagħmlu progress rapidu, iżda l-punt sa fejn dawn is-sistemi verament jifhmu l-lingwa għadu mhux ċar. Biex nippremjaw sistemi b’kapaċitajiet reali ta’ fehim tal-lingwa, nipproponu skema ta’ evalwazzjoni avversarja għad-Dataset ta’ Tweġibiet għall-Mistoqsijiet ta’ Stanford (SQuAD). Il-metodu tagħna jittestja jekk is-sistemi jistgħux iwieġbu mistoqsijiet dwar paragrafi li fihom sentenzi mdaħħla b’mod avversarju, li huma ġenerati awtomatikament biex is-sistemi tal-kompjuter jiġu distratti mingħajr ma jinbidlu t-tweġiba korretta jew il-bnedmin jiżgwidaw. F’dan l-isfond avversarju, il-preċiżjoni ta’ sittax-il mudell ippubblikat tonqos minn medja ta’ 75% punteġġ F1 għal 36%; meta l-avversarju jitħalla jżid sekwenzi mhux grammatiċi ta’ kliem, il-preċiżjoni medja fuq erba’ mudelli tonqos aktar għal 7 %. Nittamaw li l-għarfien tagħna jimmotiva l-iżvilupp ta' mudelli ġodda li jifhmu l-lingwa b'mod aktar preċiż.", 'ml': 'സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡേറ്റര്\u200d കൃത്യമായ മെട്രിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വേഗത്തിലേക്ക് പുരോഗതി വരുത്തുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് തെ സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡിന്റെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റിനുള്ള വിരോധമായ വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് പ് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് വിരോധമായി ചേര്\u200dത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രാപ്റ്റഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200d കുറിച്ച് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത ഈ വിരോധത്തിന്റെ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d, പതിനാറ് പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ച മോഡലുകളുടെ കൃത്യം 75% എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോരില്\u200d നിന്ന് 36% വരെ  വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ശത്രുവിന് അനുവദിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, നാല് മോഡലില്\u200d സാധാരണ കൃത്യം 7 ശതമാനത്തിലേക്ക് കുറഞ്ഞു വരും. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു, ഭാഷ കൃത്യമായി മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന പുതിയ മോഡലുകളുടെ വികസിപ്പിന് നമ്മുടെ കണ്', 'mn': 'Стандарттай шударга метрик нь унших ойлголтын системүүд хурдан хөгжүүлж байна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр системүүд хэл үнэхээр ойлгох хэмжээнд тодорхой байдаг. Үнэндээ хэлний ойлголтын чадвартай системийг шагнал авахын тулд Стэнфорд асуулт асуудал өгөгдлийн асуудал (SQuAD) болон эсрэг шагналын схемийг санал болгоно. Бидний арга хэмжээний шинжлэх ухаан нь системүүд зөв хариулт, буруу хүмүүсийг өөрчлөхөд эсрэг өргөн өгүүлбэртэй хэлбэрүүдийн тухай асуудлыг хариулж чадах эсэхийг шалгана. Энэ эсрэг тохиолдолд 16 нийтлэгдсэн загварын тохиолдол дундаж 75% F1 оноос 36% хүртэл нийтлэгддэг. Дөрвөлжингийн дайсан үг дарааллыг нэмэх боломжтой байхад дундаж 4 загварын тодорхойлолт 7%-д багасч байна. Бид ойлголт нь хэл илүү тодорхой ойлгох шинэ загваруудыг хөгжүүлэхэд урам зориулна гэж найдаж байна.', 'pl': 'Standardowe wskaźniki dokładności wskazują, że systemy rozumienia czytania robią szybki postęp, ale stopień, w jakim systemy te rzeczywiście rozumieją język, pozostaje niejasny. Aby nagradzać systemy z rzeczywistymi umiejętnościami rozumienia języka, proponujemy schemat oceny przeciwnej dla Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Nasza metoda testuje, czy systemy potrafią odpowiedzieć na pytania dotyczące akapitów zawierających przeciwnie wstawione zdania, które są automatycznie generowane w celu odwrócenia uwagi systemów komputerowych bez zmiany poprawnej odpowiedzi lub wprowadzania w błąd ludzi. W tym przeciwnym ustawieniu dokładność szesnastu opublikowanych modeli spada ze średniej 75% wyniku F1 do 36%; gdy przeciwnik może dodawać nieramatyczne sekwencje słów, średnia dokładność czterech modeli spada dalej do 7%. Mamy nadzieję, że nasze spostrzeżenia będą motywować do opracowywania nowych modeli, które dokładniej rozumieją język.', 'ro': 'Măsurătorile standard de precizie indică faptul că sistemele de înțelegere a citirii fac progrese rapide, dar măsura în care aceste sisteme înțeleg cu adevărat limbajul rămâne neclar. Pentru a recompensa sistemele cu abilități reale de înțelegere a limbii, propunem o schemă de evaluare adversară pentru setul de date Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD). Metoda noastră testează dacă sistemele pot răspunde la întrebări despre paragrafele care conțin propoziții introduse adversar, care sunt generate automat pentru a distrage atenția sistemelor informatice fără a schimba răspunsul corect sau a induce oamenii în eroare. În acest context adversar, acuratețea a șaisprezece modele publicate scade de la o medie de 75% punctaj F1 la 36%; atunci când adversarului i se permite să adauge secvențe ungrammaticale de cuvinte, precizia medie pe patru modele scade și mai mult la 7%. Sperăm că perspectivele noastre vor motiva dezvoltarea de noi modele care înțeleg limbajul mai precis.', 'no': 'Standardnøyaktighetsmetrikar tyder på at lesingsforståkingssystemet gjer rask framgang, men kor mykje desse systema verkeleg forstår språk er ikkje ukjent. For å rekna systemet med verkeleg språk-forståking, foreslår vi eit negativt evalueringsskjema for Stanford-spørsmålssvarande databaset (SQuAD). Metoden vårt testar om systemet kan svara på spørsmål om avsnitt som inneheld negativt sett setningar, som vert automatisk laga for å fjerna datasystemet utan å endra den rette svaren eller feil menneske. I denne adversarialske innstillinga avsluttar nøyaktigheten av seksten utgjevne modeller frå gjennomsnittlig 75% F1- poeng til 36%; og når det er tillatt å leggja til ungrammatiske ordsekvens, vil gjennomsnittlig nøyaktighet på fire modeller nedtrekke meir til 7%. Vi håper at utviklingane våre vil motivera utviklinga av nye modeller som forstår språk meir nøyaktig.', 'sr': 'Standardna preciznost metrika ukazuje na to da sistemi razumijevanja čitanja postižu brz napredak, ali u velikoj mjeri u kojoj se ovi sistemi zaista razumiju jezik ostaje nejasni. Da bi nagradili sisteme sa pravom sposobnošću razumevanja jezika, predlažemo neprijateljsku režimu procjene za Stanford pitanje odgovarajući datoteku (SQuAD). Naša metoda testira da li sistemi mogu odgovoriti na pitanja o paragrafima koje sadrže neprijateljski uključene rečenice, koje su automatski stvorene da bi odstranili kompjuterske sisteme bez promjene pravog odgovora ili pogrešnog ljudskog odgovora. U ovom neprijateljskom stanju, tačnost šesnaest objavljenih modela pada od prosječnog 75% rezultata F1 do 36%; kada je neprijatelju dozvoljeno dodati ungrammatične sekvence reči, prosječna tačnost na četiri modela smanjuje se na 7%. Nadamo se da će naši uvidi motivirati razvoj novih modela koji razumeju jezik tačnije.', 'so': "Qiimaha saxda ah ee caadiga ah waxay muuqataa in nidaamka akhriska ee hoos-dhigista lagu sameeyo horumar dhaqso ah, laakiin marka aad nidaamkan si dhab ah u garan karto luuqadu waa sii cad yahay. Si aan ugu abaalmariyo nidaamka aqoonta aqoonta runta ah ee luuqada, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qorshaha qiimeynta ka geesta ah ee su’aalaha Stanford (SQuAD). Imtixaanka qaababkayaga in nidaamka ay ka jawaabi karto su'aalo ku saabsan qeybaha ku jira si cadaawayaal ah, kuwaas oo si bilowga ah u dhashay in lagu qalo nidaamka kombiyuutarka oo aan beddelin jawaabta saxda ah ama khiyaaneeya dadka. Xaruntan cadaawayaasha ah saxda lix iyo toban model oo la soo daabacay waxay ka soo bixisaa qiyaastii 75 boqolkiiba ee F1 ilaa 36 boqolkiiba; marka cadaawayaashu uu u ogolaanayo inuu ku daro qalabka lammaanka ah, qiimaha ugu dhexeeya afarta modelal ayaa ka sii kordhaa 7%. Waxaan rajaynaynaa in aragyadeenu ay horumarinayo modelal cusub oo si saxda ah u garanaya luuqada.", 'si': 'ස්ථානික හරියත් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට කියවන්න ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති පද්ධතිය ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරවෘතිය කරනව ඇත්ත භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න පුළුවන් සඳහා පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියට, අපි ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්රමාණ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණයේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්න ප මේ විරෝද්ධ සැකසුමේදී, ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු මොඩේල් හතරක් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු මොඩේල් එක සාමාන්\u200dය 75% F විරෝධකට වචනය අන්ග්\u200dරාම්තික ක්\u200dරමයක් එකතු කරන්න අවසර වෙලාවට, සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් මොඩේල් හතරයි තව 7% වෙනු අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා අපේ හොයාගන්නේ අළුත් මොඩේල්ස් විකාශ කරනවා කියලා භාෂාව තව ඇත්තටම තේරු', 'sv': 'Standardnoggrannhetsmått indikerar att läsförståelsesystem gör snabba framsteg, men i vilken utsträckning dessa system verkligen förstår språket är fortfarande oklart. För att belöna system med verklig språkförståelse föreslår vi ett kontradiktoriskt utvärderingssystem för Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD). Vår metod testar om system kan svara på frågor om stycken som innehåller motsatt infogade meningar, som automatiskt genereras för att distrahera datorsystem utan att ändra rätt svar eller vilseleda människor. I denna motsägelseinställning sjunker noggrannheten hos sexton publicerade modeller från ett genomsnitt på 75% F1 poäng till 36%. När motståndaren får lägga till oremmatiska ordsekvenser minskar medelnoggrannheten på fyra modeller ytterligare till 7%. Vi hoppas att våra insikter kommer att motivera utvecklingen av nya modeller som förstår språket mer exakt.', 'ta': 'நிலையான துல்லியமான முறைமைகள் படிக்கும் தொகுதி அமைப்புகள் வேகமான முன்னேற்றம் செய்கின்றன, ஆனால் இந்த அமைப்புகள் உண்மையி உண்மையான மொழி புரிந்து புரிந்து கொள்ளும் முறைமைகளை வழங்குவதற்கு, நாம் ஸ்டான்போர்ட் கேள்வி தகவல் அமைப்புக்கு ஒரு எதிரான மத எங்கள் முறைமைகள் சரியான விடையை மாற்றாமல் அல்லது மனிதர்களை தவறாக மாற்றாமல் கணினியின் முறைமைகளில் உள்ள வாக்குகளை கொண்டுள்ள பதில் கேள்விகள் பற்றி பத இந்த எதிரியான அமைப்பில், பதினாறு வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளின் சரியான மதிப்பு 75% F1 மதிப்பெண்ணிலிருந்து 36% வரை வி எதிரியாளர் சொற்களை சேர்க்க அனுமதிக்கப்படும் போது, நான்கு மாதிரிகளில் சராசரியான சரிவு நாங்கள் நம்புகிறோம் எங்கள் குறிப்புகள் மொழியை மிகவும் சரியாக புரிந்து கொள்ளும் புதிய மாதிரிகளை உர', 'ur': 'استاندارڈ دقیق متریک دکھاتی ہے کہ پڑھنے کی سمجھ سیسٹم تیز پیشرفت کر رہے ہیں، لیکن جس طرح یہ سیسٹم حقیقت سے زبان سمجھتے ہیں وہ بے سمجھ رہے ہیں. سیستموں کو حقیقی زبان سمجھنے کے قابلیت کے ساتھ بدلہ دینے کے لئے ہم نے استنفورد سوال کے جواب دینے کے لئے (SQuAD) ایک مخالف ارزیابی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے۔ ہماری طریقہ آزمائش کرتی ہے کہ کیا سیسٹم پراگراف کے بارے میں سوال جواب دے سکتے ہیں جو مخالف طریقے سے پیدا کیے جاتے ہیں، جو کامپیوتر سیسٹم کو دھوکہ دینے کے لئے اپنا جواب یا غلط انسانوں کو بدل نہیں سکتے۔ اس مقابلہ مقابلہ میں، سارہ پیغام رسانے والی موڈل کی دقیقیت 75% F1 سکوٹ سے 36% تک پھٹ جاتی ہے۔ جب مقابلہ کی اجازت دی جاتی ہے کہ کلمات کی غیر قابل تعریف جمع کرے، چار موڈل پر متوسط دقیق 7% تک کم ہوتی ہے۔ ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ ہماری نظریں نو موڈل کی توسعہ بتائیں جو زبان کو بہت دقیق سمجھتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Andoza aniqlik metriklari aytadi, kompyuterni o'qish tizimi tez yaxshi harakat qiladi, lekin bu tizim tilni haqiqatga tushirish imkoniyatini bilmaydi. Bu tizimni haqiqiqiy tilni o'rganish imkoniyatlariga, biz Stanford savol javob beruvchi maʼlumotlar sahifasi (SQuAD) uchun bizga qiymatni qoidamiz. Tizimlar to ʻgʻri qoʻyilgan soʻzlar haqida savollar javob berishi mumkin, bu kompyuter tizimini avtomatik avtomatik avtomatik ajratish mumkin, toʻgʻri javob yoki odamlarni o'zgartirishni oʻzgartirish mumkin. Bu taʼminlovchi moslamada, sakkiz to ʻplab chiqarilgan modellarning qiymati 75% F1 qiymatidan 36%'ga chiqaradi; Xuddiy so'zlarni ungramaktik sonlarni qoʻshishga ruxsat berilganda, to'rt modeldagi qiymati 7%'ga oshadi. Biz o'ylaymiz, ko'rinlarimiz tilni aniqlashga yangi modellarni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Thiết bị đo độ chính xác chuẩn cho thấy hệ thống hiểu thấu đang tiến bộ rất nhanh, nhưng mức độ hiểu ngôn ngữ thực sự của chúng vẫn chưa rõ. Để tưởng thưởng những hệ thống có khả năng hiểu ngôn ngữ thật, chúng tôi đề xuất một kế hoạch đánh giá ngược với Bộ Dữ liệu Trả lời Hỏi của Stanford (SQurad). Theo phương pháp của chúng tôi, thử xem hệ thống có thể trả lời câu hỏi về các đoạn có chứa các câu chữ được chèn ngược nhau, được tạo ra tự động để đánh lạc hướng hệ thống máy tính mà không thay đổi câu trả lời đúng hay làm người sai lầm. Trong môi trường đối nghịch, độ chính xác của mười sáu mô-đun đã xuất bản giảm từ trung bình vi-đa. F1 ghi số chẵn với 36. khi đối thủ được phép thêm chuỗi ngôn ngữ học, độ chính xác trung bình trên bốn mô- đun giảm dần tới 7 Name Chúng tôi hy vọng kiến thức của mình sẽ thúc đẩy việc phát triển các mô hình mới hiểu rõ ngôn ngữ hơn.', 'bg': 'Стандартните показатели за точност показват, че системите за четене напредват бързо, но степента, до която тези системи наистина разбират езика, остава неясна. За да възнаградим системи с реални способности за разбиране на езика, предлагаме схема за съперническа оценка на Станфордския набор от данни за отговор на въпроси (SQuAD). Нашият метод тества дали системите могат да отговорят на въпроси относно параграфи, съдържащи противоречиви изречения, които се генерират автоматично, за да разсейват компютърните системи, без да променят правилния отговор или да заблуждават хората. В тази противоречива обстановка точността на шестнадесет публикувани модела спада от средно 75% на 36%; когато противникът може да добави неграматични последователности от думи, средната точност на четири модела намалява допълнително до 7%. Надяваме се нашите прозрения да мотивират развитието на нови модели, които разбират езика по-точно.', 'nl': 'Standaard nauwkeurigheidsmetrieken geven aan dat leesbegripssystemen snelle vooruitgang boeken, maar in hoeverre deze systemen taal echt begrijpen blijft onduidelijk. Om systemen met echt taalbegrip te belonen, stellen we een tegenstrijdig evaluatieschema voor voor de Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Onze methode test of systemen vragen kunnen beantwoorden over paragrafen die tegenstrijdig ingevoegde zinnen bevatten, die automatisch gegenereerd worden om computersystemen af te leiden zonder het juiste antwoord te veranderen of mensen te misleiden. In deze tegenstrijdige setting daalt de nauwkeurigheid van zestien gepubliceerde modellen van gemiddeld 75% F1 score naar 36%; Wanneer de tegenstander ongegrammatische woordreeksen mag toevoegen, neemt de gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid van vier modellen verder af tot 7%. We hopen dat onze inzichten de ontwikkeling van nieuwe modellen stimuleren die taal nauwkeuriger begrijpen.', 'da': 'Standard nøjagtighedsmålinger indikerer, at læseforståelsessystemer gør hurtige fremskridt, men i hvilket omfang disse systemer virkelig forstår sproget er stadig uklart. For at belønne systemer med reelle sprogforståelsesevner foreslår vi en modstridende evalueringsordning for Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQUAD). Vores metode tester, om systemer kan besvare spørgsmål om afsnit, der indeholder modsatte sætninger, som automatisk genereres for at distrahere computersystemer uden at ændre det korrekte svar eller vildlede mennesker. I denne modstridende indstilling falder nøjagtigheden af seksten offentliggjorte modeller fra et gennemsnit på 75% F1 score til 36%; Når modstanderen får lov til at tilføje ukrammatiske ordsekvenser, falder den gennemsnitlige nøjagtighed på fire modeller yderligere til 7%. Vi håber, at vores indsigt vil motivere udviklingen af nye modeller, der forstår sproget mere præcist.', 'de': 'Standardgenauigkeitsmetriken deuten darauf hin, dass Leseverständnissysteme rasche Fortschritte machen, aber inwieweit diese Systeme Sprache wirklich verstehen, bleibt unklar. Um Systeme mit echtem Sprachverständnis zu belohnen, schlagen wir ein gegensätzliches Bewertungsschema für den Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD) vor. Unsere Methode testet, ob Systeme Fragen zu Absätzen beantworten können, die gegensätzlich eingefügte Sätze enthalten, die automatisch generiert werden, um Computersysteme abzulenken, ohne die richtige Antwort zu ändern oder Menschen zu irreführen. In dieser gegensätzlichen Einstellung sinkt die Genauigkeit von sechzehn veröffentlichten Modellen von einer durchschnittlichen 75% F1-Punktzahl auf 36%; Wenn der Gegner ungrammatische Wortfolgen hinzufügen darf, sinkt die durchschnittliche Genauigkeit bei vier Modellen weiter auf 7%. Wir hoffen, dass unsere Erkenntnisse die Entwicklung neuer Modelle motivieren werden, die Sprache genauer verstehen.', 'hr': 'Standardna preciznost metrika ukazuje na to da sustavi razumijevanja čitanja postižu brz napredak, ali u razini u kojoj se ovi sustavi zaista razumiju jezik i dalje nije jasan. Da bi nagradili sisteme s pravom sposobnošću razumijevanja jezika, predlažemo rezultativnu procjenu za Stanford pitanje odgovarajući datoteku (SQuAD). Naša metoda testira da li sustavi mogu odgovoriti na pitanja o odstavcima koje sadrže negativno uključene rečenice, koje su automatski stvorene kako bi odvlačili računalne sustave bez promjene pravog odgovora ili pogrešnog čovjeka. U tom neprijateljskom stanju to čnost šesnaest objavljenih modela pada iz prosječnog 75% rezultata F1 do 36%; kada je neprijatelj dozvoljeno dodati ungrammatične sekvence riječi, prosječna preciznost na četiri modela smanjuje se na 7%. Nadamo se da će naši uvidi motivirati razvoj novih modela koji razumiju jezik preciznije.', 'id': 'Metrik akurasi standar menunjukkan bahwa sistem pemahaman pembacaan membuat kemajuan cepat, tapi sejauh mana sistem ini benar-benar memahami bahasa tetap tidak jelas. Untuk membalas sistem dengan kemampuan pemahaman bahasa nyata, kami mengusulkan skema evaluasi lawan untuk Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Metode kami menguji apakah sistem dapat menjawab pertanyaan tentang paragraf yang mengandung kalimat yang disisipkan secara bertentangan, yang secara otomatis dihasilkan untuk mengalihkan perhatian sistem komputer tanpa mengubah jawaban yang benar atau menyesatkan manusia. In this adversarial setting, the accuracy of sixteen published models drops from an average of 75% F1 score to 36%;  ketika musuh diizinkan menambah urutan kata yang tidak ramatis, akurasi rata-rata pada empat model menurun lebih jauh ke 7%. Kami berharap penglihatan kita akan mendorong pembangunan model baru yang memahami bahasa dengan lebih tepat.', 'ko': '표준 정확도 지표는 읽기 이해 시스템이 빠른 진전을 거두고 있지만 이런 시스템이 언어를 진정으로 이해하는 정도는 아직 명확하지 않다는 것을 보여준다.진정한 언어 이해 능력을 갖춘 시스템을 장려하기 위해 우리는 스탠퍼드 퀴즈 데이터 집합(STAND)에 대한 대항적 평가 방안을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 시스템이 단락과 관련된 문제에 대답할 수 있는지 테스트한다. 이 단락에는 자동으로 생성된 반삽입 문장이 포함되어 있어 컴퓨터 시스템의 주의력을 분산시키고 정답을 바꾸거나 사람을 오도하지 않는다.이런 대항적인 환경에서 16개 발표된 모델의 정확도는 평균 75%의 F1 점수에서 36%로 떨어졌다.상대방이 문법에 맞지 않는 단어 서열을 추가할 수 있도록 허락받았을 때 네 모델의 평균 정확도는 7%로 한층 낮아졌다.우리는 우리의 견해가 언어를 더욱 정확하게 이해하는 새로운 모델 개발을 추진할 수 있기를 바란다.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa uhakika wa kawaida unaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa kusoma unafanya maendeleo ya haraka, lakini kiwango ambacho mifumo haya huelewa lugha bado si wazi. Ili kulipa mifumo yenye uwezo wa kuelewa kwa lugha halisi, tunapendekeza mpango wa uchunguzi wa upinzani kwa ajili ya seti ya swali la Stanford (SQuAD). Utawala wetu unajaribu kama mifumo inaweza kujibu maswali kuhusu vipengele vinavyohusu hukumu zilizowekwa kinyume, ambavyo vimetengenezwa kwa wenyewe ili kuharibu mfumo wa kompyuta bila kubadilisha jibu sahihi au kupoteza binadamu. Katika mazingira haya ya upinzani, uhakika wa mifano sita iliyochapishwa inapungua kwa wastani wa asilimia 75 ya F1 hadi asilimia 36; pale ambapo anaruhusiwa kuongeza mfululizo wa maneno ya kiungania, kiwango cha wastani kwa mifano minne inapungua kwa asilimia 7. We hope our insights will motivate the development of new models that understand language more precisely.', 'fa': 'متریک دقیق استاندارد نشان می دهد که سیستم\u200cهای درک خواندن به سرعت پیشرفت می\u200cکنند، ولی به اندازه\u200cای که این سیستم\u200cها واقعاً زبان را درک می\u200cکنند، بی\u200cخبر است. برای پاداش دادن سیستم\u200cها با توانایی درک کردن زبان واقعی، ما یک برنامه ارزیابی دشمنی برای سوال استنفورد به پاسخ دادگان (SQuAD) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. روش ما آزمایش می\u200cکند که آیا سیستم\u200cها می\u200cتوانند سوال\u200cهای درباره\u200cی نقطه\u200cها را جواب دهند که شامل جمله\u200cهای مخالف وارد شده\u200cاند، که به طور خودکار تولید می\u200cشوند تا سیستم\u200cهای کامپیوتر را نابود کند بدون تغییر پاسخ در این تنظیمات مخالف دقیق ۶۰ مدل منتشر شده از میانگین ۷۵ درصد نقاط F1 به ۶۶ درصد فرود می\u200cآید. وقتی اجازه داده شود دشمنی به اضافه دسته\u200cهای ناگراماتیک کلمات، دقیق متوسط چهار مدل بیشتر به ۷ درصد کاهش می\u200cدهد. ما امیدواریم که مشاهده\u200cهایمان توسعه مدل\u200cهای جدید را تحریک کند که زبان را دقیقاً درک کنند.', 'tr': 'Standart dyggat metrikler okama sistemalary 챌alt 철s체힊ip 첵철re첵채ndigini g철rke첵채r, 첵철ne bu sistemalar dili hakykatdanam d체힊체n첵채n 첵agda첵a d체힊첵채r. Biz sistemalary hakyky dil d체힊체n체p biljek ukyplary bilen t채zeden 철d체llendirmek 체챌in Stanford soragy soragy soragy hasaplamaga (SQuAD) teklip edip g철r첵채ris. Bizim y철ntemimiz sistemlerimiz d체zg체n cevap veya yanl캇힊 adamlary 체첵tgeden paragraf hakk캇nda sorulara jogap berip biljegini s캇nayarlar. Bu te흫kil 챌yky힊ynda on alty nusgalary흫 dogrylygyny ortalamadan 75% F1 sany 36% tarapyndan 챌yk첵ar. gar힊y s철z dizinlerini eklemek 체챌in rugsat berildi휓inde ortalama derecede d철rt model 체zerinde 7%-e a힊캇r캇 azal캇r. Bizi흫 d체힊체njelerimiz t채ze nusgalary흫 d체zeden 챌ykyp biljek nusgalary흫 geli힊mesini motive edip biler di첵ip umyt ed첵채ris.', 'af': "Standaard waarskynlikheid metries wys dat lees verstaan stelsels vinnig vordering maak, maar die uitbreiding waarop hierdie stelsels regtig verstaan taal onbekend bly. Om stelsels te verwerp met regte taal verstaan moontlikhede, voorstel ons 'n teëstandige evalueringsskema vir die Stanford Vrag Antwoord Dataset (SQuAD). Ons metode toets of stelsels vrae kan antwoord oor paragraaf wat teenstandaarlik ingevoegde setinge bevat, wat outomaties genereer word om rekenaar stelsels te onttrek sonder om die korrekte antwoord of verkeerde mense te verander. In hierdie teenstelling, die presies van sestien gepubliseerde modele val van 'n gemiddelde van 75% F1 telling tot 36%; wanneer die teëstander toegelaat word om onrammatiese volgorde van woorde by te voeg, gemiddelde presisie op vier modele verklein word verder na 7%. Ons hoop ons insigte sal die ontwikkeling van nuwe modele wat taal meer presies verstaan.", 'sq': 'Metrikat standarde të saktësisë tregojnë se sistemet e kuptimit të leximit po bëjnë përparim të shpejtë, por shkalla në të cilën këto sisteme kuptojnë me të vërtetë gjuhën mbetet e paqartë. Për të shpërblyer sistemet me aftësi të vërtetë të kuptimit të gjuhës, ne propozojmë një skemë vlerësimi kundërshtar për SQuAD. Our method tests whether systems can answer questions about paragraphs that contain adversarially inserted sentences, which are automatically generated to distract computer systems without changing the correct answer or misleading humans.  Në këtë qëndrim kundërshtar, saktësia e gjashtëmbëdhjetë modeleve të botuara bie nga një mesatare prej 75% rezultati F1 në 36%; kur kundërshtari lejohet të shtojë sekuenca jo-grammatike fjalësh, saktësia mesatare në katër modele bie më tej në 7%. Shpresojmë se kuptimet tona do të motivojnë zhvillimin e modeleve të reja që kuptojnë gjuhën më saktësisht.', 'am': 'Standard accuracy metrics indicate that reading comprehension systems are making rapid progress, but the extent to which these systems truly understand language remains unclear.  የእውነት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስርዓት ለመዋጋት፣ ለስቴንፎርድ ጥያቄ የመልስ ድምፅ መለስ ዕቅድን (SQuAD) የተቃዋሚ የአካላዊ የአካላቢ ሽልማት ፕሮግራም እናስጀምርለታለን፡፡ ሥርዓታችን በተቃዋሚ ግንኙነት ውስጥ ያሉትን የክፍሎች ጥያቄዎችን ሊመልስ ይችላል፣ እነዚህም ኮምፒውተር ስርዓቶችን ሳይለውጡ እውነተኛውን መልስ ወይም ሰዎችን ሳታልሉ ሲፈትኑ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ በተቃዋሚ አካል ውስጥ አሥራ ስድስት የተዘረጉት ሞላት ከaverage 75 በመቶ F1 score ወደ 36 በመቶ ይወጣል፤ ተቃዋሚው የኢንተራማዊ ቃላትን ለመጨመር በተፈቀደ ጊዜ፣ የaverage እርግጠት በአራቱ ዓይነቶች ላይ ወደ7 በመቶ ያጎድላል፡፡ ቋንቋችንን በብዛት የሚያስተውሉ አዲስ ምሳሌዎች መፍጠርን እናስጠነቅቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ստանդարտ ճշգրտության չափումները ցույց են տալիս, որ կարդալու ընկալումների համակարգերը արագ առաջընթաց են կատարում, բայց այս համակարգերի իսկապես հասկանում են լեզուն դեռևս անհասկանալի է: Որպեսզի պարգևատրենք համակարգերը, որոնք ունեն իսկական լեզվի հասկանալու ունակություններ, մենք առաջարկում ենք Ստենֆորդի հարցերի պատասխանների տվյալների (SQUADի) հակառակ գնահատման ծրագիր: Մեր մեթոդը ստուգում է, թե արդյոք համակարգերը կարող են պատասխանել առանցքների մասին հարցերին, որոնք պարունակում են հակառակորեն ներդրված նախադասություններ, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծվում են համակարգչային համակարգերի շեղմանը առանց ճիշտ պատ Այս հակառակորդ պայմաններում 16 հրատարակված մոդելների ճշգրտությունը նվազում է F1-ի 75 տոկոսի միջին գնահատականից 36 տոկոսի: when the adversary is allowed to add ungrammatical sequences of words, average accuracy on four models decreases further to 7%.  Մենք հույս ունենք, որ մեր ընկալումները կխթանեն նոր մոդելների զարգացումը, որոնք լեզուն ավելի ճշգրիտ հասկանում են:', 'az': 'Standardlı doğruluq metrikləri oxunmaq sistemlərinin tez ilerlemesini göstərir, amma bu sistemlərin dillərin çox anladığı qədər də dərk deyildir. Gerçek dil anlama qabiliyyətləri ilə sistemlərini ödəmək üçün, Stanford soruşu cavab vermək məlumatının (SQuAD) müqabiliyyətini təbliğ edirik. Bizim metodlarımız sistemlərin düzgün cavabı və ya yanlış insanları dəyişmədən komputer sistemlərini fərqləmək üçün istifadə edilən paragraflar haqqında sorğulara cavab verə bilərmi. Bu düşmənçilik tərzində on altı yayınlanmış modellərin doğruluğu ortalamadan 75% F1 dəqiqəsindən 36%-ə düşər. düşmənin inamları sözlərin seçməsinə izin verildiyi zaman, dörd modellərdə ortalama ədaləti 7%-ə düşür. Biz ümid edirik ki, anlayışlarımız dili daha düzgün anlayan yeni modellərin gelişməsinə nəsib edəcək.', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্ডার্ড সঠিক পদ্ধতি নির্দেশ করছে যে সংস্করণ ব্যবস্থা পাঠ করছে তারা দ্রুত অগ্রগতি করছে, কিন্তু এই সিস্টেম যে পর্যায়ে এই ভ স্ট্যানফোর্ড প্রশ্নের উত্তর তথ্য সংক্রান্ত প্রশ্নের (স্কোয়াডি) প্রস্তাব করার জন্য বিরোধী ভাষা বুঝতে পারে ব্যবস্থাগুলোক আমাদের পদ্ধতি পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে যে সিস্টেমের প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদান করতে পারে কিনা, যার মধ্যে বিরোধীভাবে প্রবেশ করা হয়েছে, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কম্পিউ এই বিরোধী বৈশিষ্ট্যে ৬টি প্রকাশিত মডেলের সঠিকভাবে ৭৫% এফ১ স্কোর থেকে ৩৬%; যখন প্রতিপক্ষের বিরুদ্ধে শব্দ যোগ করার অনুমতি দেয়া হয়, তখন চার মডেলের মধ্যে সাধারণ সঠিকভাবে ৭ শতাংশ কমে যায়। We hope our insights will motivate the development of new models that understand language more precisely.', 'bs': 'Standardna preciznost metrika ukazuje na to da sistemi razumijevanja čitanja napreduju brz napredak, ali u velikoj mjeri u kojoj ovi sistemi zaista razumiju jezik i dalje nije jasan. Da bi nagradili sisteme sa pravom sposobnošću razumijevanja jezika, predlažemo neprijateljsku procjenu za Stanford pitanje odgovarajući datoteku (SQuAD). Naša metoda testira da li sistemi mogu odgovoriti na pitanja o paragrafima koje sadrže neprijateljski uključene rečenice, koje su automatski stvorene kako bi odstranili računalne sisteme bez promjene pravog odgovora ili pogrešnog ljudskog odgovora. U tom neprijateljskom stanju preciznost šesnaest objavljenih modela pada od prosječnog 75% rezultata F1 do 36%; kada je neprijatelju dozvoljeno dodati ungrammatične sekvence riječi, prosječna preciznost na četiri modela smanjuje se na 7%. Nadamo se da će naši uvidi motivirati razvoj novih modela koji razumiju jezik preciznije.', 'ca': "Métriques de precisió estandards indican que els sistemes de comprensió de lectura estan fent progrés ràpid, però el punt en què aquests sistemes entenen realment el llenguatge encara no és clar. Per recompensar sistemes amb habilitats reals de comprensió del llenguatge, proposem un esquema d'evaluació adversaria per al SQuAD. El nostre mètode prova si els sistemes poden respondre a preguntes sobre paràgrafs que contenen frases inseridas adversariament, que es generen automàticament per distraer els sistemes informàtics sense canviar la resposta correcta o enganyar els humans. En aquest entorn adversari, la precisió de 16 models publicats baixa d'una mitjana del 75% de puntuació F1 al 36%; quan l'adversari pot afegir seqüències ungrammàtiques de paraules, la precisió mitjana de quatre models disminueix més al 7%. Esperem que les nostres intuïcions motivin el desenvolupament de nous models que entenguin el llenguatge de manera més precisa.", 'cs': 'Standardní metriky přesnosti naznačují, že systémy porozumění čtení dosahují rychlého pokroku, ale rozsah, do jaké tyto systémy skutečně rozumí jazyku, zůstává nejasný. Abychom odměnili systémy s reálnými schopnostmi porozumění jazyku, navrhujeme kontroverzní hodnotící schéma pro Stanford Question Answering Dataset (SQuAD). Naše metoda testuje, zda systémy dokážou odpovědět na otázky týkající se odstavců, které obsahují protivně vložené věty, které jsou automaticky generovány, aby odváděly počítačové systémy, aniž by změnily správnou odpověď nebo zaváděly člověka. V tomto protivním nastavení klesá přesnost šestnácti publikovaných modelů od průměru 75% F1 skóre na 36%; Pokud může soupeř přidat negrammatické sekvence slov, průměrná přesnost čtyř modelů se dále snižuje na 7%. Doufáme, že naše poznatky budou motivovat k vývoji nových modelů, které rozumí jazyku přesněji.', 'et': 'Standardsed täpsusmõõdikud näitavad, et lugemise mõistmise süsteemid arenevad kiiresti, kuid millises ulatuses need süsteemid tõeliselt keelt mõistavad, jääb ebaselgeks. Tegeliku keeleoskusega süsteemide tasustamiseks pakume välja Stanfordi küsimustele vastamise andmekogumi (SQuAD) vastastikuse hindamise skeemi. Meie meetod testib, kas süsteemid suudavad vastata küsimustele punktide kohta, mis sisaldavad vastastikku sisestatud lauseid, mis genereeritakse automaatselt arvutisüsteemide tähelepanu hajutamiseks ilma õiget vastust muutmata või inimesi eksitamata. Selles kontradiktsioonis langeb kuueteistkümne avaldatud mudeli täpsus keskmiselt 75%-lt F1 skoorilt 36%-ni; Kui vastasel on lubatud lisada mittegrammatilisi sõnade järjestusi, väheneb nelja mudeli keskmine täpsus veelgi 7%ni. Loodame, et meie teadmised motiveerivad uute mudelite arendamist, mis mõistavad keelt täpsemalt.', 'fi': 'Standardin tarkkuusmittarit osoittavat, että lukemisen ymmärtämisjärjestelmät edistyvät nopeasti, mutta missä määrin nämä järjestelmät todella ymmärtävät kieltä, on epäselvää. Palkitsemiseksi järjestelmiä, joilla on todellisia kielitaitoja, ehdotamme Stanford Question Answering Datasetille (SQuAD). Menetelmämme testaa, pystyvätkö järjestelmät vastaamaan kysymyksiin kappaleista, jotka sisältävät vastakkaisesti lisättyjä lauseita, jotka luodaan automaattisesti häiritsemään tietokonejärjestelmiä muuttamatta oikeaa vastausta tai harhauttamatta ihmisiä. Tässä ristiriitaisessa tilanteessa 16 julkaistun mallin tarkkuus laskee keskimäärin 75%:n F1-pisteestä 36%:iin; Kun vastustaja saa lisätä epämääräisiä sanasarjoja, neljän mallin keskimääräinen tarkkuus laskee edelleen 7 prosenttiin. Toivomme oivalluksiemme motivoivan kehittämään uusia malleja, jotka ymmärtävät kieltä tarkemmin.', 'jv': 'Standard Moniker sing dipondisikno banget sapa sistem akeh pancene kuwi nggolang batasan, nguasai kapan sistem sing paling ngperakno kuwi tindang kuwi ora bisa pasang. Ngawe mbukak sistem sing karo akeh pengguna luwih apik, kita supoyo nggawe sistem dadi sing rumangsa layang kanggo Kemerdekaan Winterse Dahaset Perintah sing bisa ditambah sistem sing bisa gambaran akeh suaraning barang kapan kelangan sing isindilunge kapan kelangan winih, sing automatik dhéwé nggawe sistem komputer sing ora bisa nyimpen respon sing apik apa uwong. Nang setunggal kuwi, cah sabên tanggal teka-teka sing pirsaké model sing ditumpa isuk perusahaan 75% F1 sing dirampa-isuk kanggo 32%; politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerti pertama awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe modèl anyar sing luwih apik, nik awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan luwih apik.', 'he': 'Standard accuracy metrics indicate that reading comprehension systems are making rapid progress, but the extent to which these systems truly understand language remains unclear.  כדי לפרס מערכות עם יכולות להבין שפה אמיתיות, אנו מציעים תכנית עריכה יריבית עבור קבוצת נתונים לענות על שאלות סטנפורד (SQuAD). השיטה שלנו מבחנת אם מערכות יכולות לענות על שאלות על פריטים שמכילים משפטים מוכנים באופן נוגדי, שמוצרים באופן אוטומטי כדי להסיח את דעת מערכות המחשב מבלי לשנות את התשובה הנכונה או להטעות בני אדם. במצב הריבי הזה, מדויקת שש עשרה דוגמנים פורסמים נופלת ממוצע של 75% נקודת F1 ל-36%; כשיורשה ליריב להוסיף רצפי מילים לא רמאטיים, מדויקת ממוצע בארבע דוגמנים נוטה עוד ל-7%. אנו מקווים שהתובנות שלנו ימניע את התפתחות של דוגמנים חדשים שמבינים את השפה במיוחד יותר.', 'ha': "Tametriki na daidaita na daidaita, yana nũna cewa, tsarin karantawa na'ura na ci-gabatar da haraka, kuma amma, tsakanin da za'a fahimta harshen su da gaskiya ba. To, dõmin ka sãka wa'adin system da yana da abincin masu hankali ga harshen gaskiya, sai mu buƙata wani shirin evaluation na motsi wa Jaji na Stanford (SQuAD). Tsarin ayõyinmu, za'a iya iya karɓa wa maswali masu husu na tabasalin da ke ƙunsa da sigogi guda, da kuma an zaɓi su farat-ɗabi'a dõmin ka rarraba tsarin kwamfyuta ko kuma ba su musanya majibu mai sahiya ko kan ɓatarwa mutum. Daga wannan shirin motsi, tsarin misãlai sita wanda aka nuna shi ya sauka tsakanin nau'in watan F1 zuwa 36%; Idan an yarda mai motsi ya ƙara sauri masu sakan na daman ayuka, tsakanin sauri na sauya a ƙara zuwa 7%. Munã kwaɗayin cẽwa gannainmu za ta yi kwaɗayi na samun misãlai na dabam waɗanda ke fahimta harshen kafin da ƙayyadadde.", 'sk': 'Standardne meritve natančnosti kažejo, da sistemi razumevanja branja hitro napredujejo, vendar ostaja nejasno, v kolikšni meri ti sistemi resnično razumejo jezik. Za nagrado sistemov z resničnimi sposobnostmi razumevanja jezika predlagamo kontradiktorsko oceno za Stanfordski nabor podatkov za odgovore na vprašanja (SQuAD). Naša metoda preizkuša, ali sistemi lahko odgovarjajo na vprašanja o odstavkih, ki vsebujejo kontradiktno vstavljene stavke, ki se samodejno generirajo za zamotitev računalniških sistemov, ne da bi spremenili pravilen odgovor ali zavajali ljudi. V tem kontradiktorskem okolju se natančnost šestnajstih objavljenih modelov zmanjša s povprečnega 75-odstotnega rezultata F1 na 36%; Če je nasprotniku dovoljeno dodati ungrammatična zaporedja besed, se povprečna natančnost na štirih modelih dodatno zmanjša na 7%. Upamo, da bodo naši vpogledi motivirali razvoj novih modelov, ki natančneje razumejo jezik.', 'bo': 'Standard accuracy metrics indicate that reading comprehension systems are making rapid progress, but the extent that these systems really understand language remains unclear. སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ལྡན་པའི་མ་ལག ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ན་མ་ལག་གིས་གནད་འགའ་འགོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྐང་འཆར་འཇུག་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་ལན་གསལ་ལ། དེ་ཚོ་རང་འགུལ་ག འཆར་གཞུང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞིའི་གྲངས་ཀ་བཅུ་བཞི་པ་ཚོར་མཐའ་ནས་ས average of 75% F1་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་36%; གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀ་གི་དབྱེ་བ་ཁ་སྣོན་དགོས་པའི་སྐབས། ང་ཚོས་བསམ་ཚུལ་གྱི་མཐོང་ཚིག་དེ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་ཨ་རིའི་ལྟ་རྐྱེན་གསར་བ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'ar': 'الاستدلال بالمعرفة غير المتجانسة لفهم آلة التعميم', 'pt': 'Raciocínio com conhecimento heterogêneo para compreensão de máquina de senso comum', 'fr': 'Raisonner avec des connaissances hétérogènes pour la compréhension automatique du bon sens', 'es': 'Razonamiento con conocimiento heterogéneo para la comprensión de máquinas con sentido común', 'ja': 'コモンセンスマシン理解のための異種知識による推論', 'hi': 'कॉमनसेंस मशीन समझ के लिए विषम ज्ञान के साथ तर्क', 'zh': '因异构推理,以成常识机器解', 'ru': 'Обоснование с помощью гетерогенных знаний для понимания здравого смысла машины', 'ga': 'Réasúnaíocht le hEolas Ilchineálach le haghaidh Tuisceana Meaisín Commonsense', 'ka': 'ჰეტეროგენო მეცნიერებისთვის მიზეზი', 'el': 'Λογισμός με την ετερογενή γνώση για την κατανόηση μηχανών κοινής λογικής', 'hu': 'A heterogén tudással való érvelés a közönséges gépek megértéséhez', 'it': 'Ragionare con la conoscenza eterogena per la comprensione delle macchine commonsense', 'kk': 'Commonsense машинасының компрессиясының Heterogeneous Knowledge арқылы', 'mk': 'Разумнувањето со хетерогенското знаење за разбирање на заедничката машина', 'lt': 'Bendros mašinos supratimo heterogeninių žinių pagrindimas', 'ms': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'ml': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'mt': 'Raġuni bl-Għarfien Eteroġenju għall-Komprensjoni Komuni tal-Magna', 'mn': 'Хетерогений мэдлэгийг Commonsense Машины Төрөвшүүлэлтийн шалтгаан', 'pl': 'Rozumowanie z heterogenną wiedzą dla zrozumienia maszyn powszechnych', 'no': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'ro': 'Raționarea cu cunoștințe heterogene pentru înțelegerea mașinilor de comun sens', 'sr': 'Razlog sa Heterogeneom znanjem za kompresiju mašine Commonsense', 'so': 'Muujinta aqoonta Heterogeneous la xiriira baabuurka Mashinka Commerce', 'si': 'හෙටරෝජෙනියෝ දැනගන්න සඳහා සම්බන්ධ මැෂින් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්.', 'sv': 'Att resonera med heterogen kunskap för Commonsense Machine Förståelse', 'ta': 'பொறுப்பு இயந்திரத்தை முடிப்பதற்கான ஹெட்டர்ஜென் அறிவிப்புடன் படிக்கப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'کمنسیس ماشین کمپرینس کے لئے Heterogeneous Knowledge کے باعث', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Lý luận với sự hiểu biết hỗn loạn về tổng hợp máy móc', 'hr': 'Razlog sa Heterogeneom znanjem za komprehenziju mašine Commonsense', 'nl': 'Redenen met heterogene kennis voor het begrijpen van de Commonsense Machine', 'da': 'Begrundelse med heterogen viden til almindelig maskinforståelse', 'ko': '상식적 기계적 이해를 위한 이구적 지식 추리', 'id': 'Menyebabkan Pengetahuan Heterogen untuk Pemahaman Mesin Komunis', 'sw': 'Kutokana na maarifa ya Heterogeneous for Comprehension of Commons Mashine', 'fa': 'باعث دلیل دانش های هوتروژن برای تفکیر ماشین کمپنس', 'tr': 'Commonsense Maşynyň Üňeşmesi üçin Heterogeneous Bilgi bilen soraglary bilen', 'af': 'Reasonering met Heterogeneous kennis vir Commonsense Masjien', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bg': 'Разбиране с хетерогенни знания за разбиране на обикновените машини', 'hy': 'Հիմնական մեքենայի ընկալումների հիտերոգեն գիտելիքների արդյունքում', 'az': 'Commonsense Machine Comprehension üçün Heterogeneous Knowledge', 'de': 'Vernunft mit heterogenem Wissen für das Verständnis von Commonsense Machine', 'bn': 'কমনসেন্স মেশিন পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য হেটারজেনিয়ান জ্ঞানের সাথে পড়া হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Razlog sa Heterogeneom znanjem za komprehenziju mašine Commonsense', 'cs': 'Odůvodnění s heterogenními znalostmi pro porozumění zdravotních strojů', 'fi': 'Järjestely heterogeenisen tiedon kanssa Commonsense Machine Comprehension', 'sq': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Common Machine Comprehension', 'ca': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Common Machine Comprehension', 'et': 'Heterogeensete teadmistega mõistmine tavalise masina mõistmiseks', 'he': 'הגיון עם הידע היטרוגני להבינה של מכונות משותפות', 'jv': 'Lakok karo Heterog Nehase Bilih kanggo kompromisasi Majin', 'sk': 'Razumevanje s heterogenim znanjem za razumevanje strojev splošnega smisla', 'ha': "Akwai da Ƙara na Sani'a na Kyaushe wa Completion da Mashine na Commons", 'bo': 'Reasoning with Heterogeneous Knowledge for Commonsense Machine Comprehension'}
{'en': 'Reasoning with commonsense knowledge is critical for natural language understanding. Traditional methods for commonsense machine comprehension mostly only focus on one specific kind of knowledge, neglecting the fact that commonsense reasoning requires simultaneously considering different kinds of commonsense knowledge. In this paper, we propose a multi-knowledge reasoning method, which can exploit heterogeneous knowledge for commonsense machine comprehension. Specifically, we first mine different kinds of knowledge (including event narrative knowledge, entity semantic knowledge and sentiment coherent knowledge) and encode them as inference rules with costs. Then we propose a multi-knowledge reasoning model, which selects inference rules for a specific reasoning context using attention mechanism, and reasons by summarizing all valid inference rules. Experiments on RocStories show that our method outperforms traditional models significantly.', 'fr': "Raisonner avec des connaissances de bon sens est essentiel pour comprendre le langage naturel. Les méthodes traditionnelles de compréhension automatique par le bon sens se concentrent principalement sur un type spécifique de connaissances, négligeant le fait que le raisonnement de bon sens nécessite de considérer simultanément différents types de connaissances de bon sens. Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthode de raisonnement à connaissances multiples, qui peut exploiter des connaissances hétérogènes pour une compréhension automatique de bon sens. Plus précisément, nous explorons d'abord différents types de connaissances (y compris la connaissance narrative d'un événement, la connaissance sémantique de l'entité et la connaissance cohérente des sentiments) et les encodons sous forme de règles d'inférence avec coûts. Ensuite, nous proposons un modèle de raisonnement multi-connaissances, qui sélectionne des règles d'inférence pour un contexte de raisonnement spécifique à l'aide du mécanisme d'attention, et des raisons en résumant toutes les règles d'inférence valides. Les expériences réalisées sur RocStories montrent que notre méthode surpasse largement les modèles traditionnels.", 'ar': 'الاستدلال مع المعرفة المنطقية أمر بالغ الأهمية لفهم اللغة الطبيعية. غالبًا ما تركز الأساليب التقليدية لفهم الآلة على نوع واحد محدد من المعرفة ، متجاهلة حقيقة أن التفكير المنطقي يتطلب النظر في الوقت نفسه في أنواع مختلفة من المعرفة المنطقية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة تفكير متعددة المعارف ، والتي يمكن أن تستغل المعرفة غير المتجانسة لفهم الآلة المنطقي. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم أولاً باستخراج أنواع مختلفة من المعرفة (بما في ذلك المعرفة السردية للأحداث والمعرفة الدلالية للكيان والمعرفة المتماسكة للمشاعر) ونقوم بترميزها كقواعد استدلال مع التكاليف. ثم نقترح نموذج تفكير متعدد المعارف ، والذي يحدد قواعد الاستدلال لسياق تفكير محدد باستخدام آلية الانتباه ، والأسباب من خلال تلخيص جميع قواعد الاستدلال الصحيحة. تُظهر التجارب على RocStories أن طريقتنا تتفوق على النماذج التقليدية بشكل كبير.', 'pt': 'Raciocinar com o conhecimento do senso comum é fundamental para a compreensão da linguagem natural. Os métodos tradicionais para a compreensão da máquina de senso comum concentram-se principalmente em um tipo específico de conhecimento, negligenciando o fato de que o raciocínio de senso comum requer considerar simultaneamente diferentes tipos de conhecimento de senso comum. Neste artigo, propomos um método de raciocínio multi-conhecimento, que pode explorar o conhecimento heterogêneo para a compreensão da máquina de senso comum. Especificamente, primeiro mineramos diferentes tipos de conhecimento (incluindo conhecimento de narrativa de evento, conhecimento semântico de entidade e conhecimento coerente de sentimento) e os codificamos como regras de inferência com custos. Em seguida, propomos um modelo de raciocínio multi-conhecimento, que seleciona regras de inferência para um contexto de raciocínio específico usando mecanismo de atenção e raciocina resumindo todas as regras de inferência válidas. Experimentos em RocStories mostram que nosso método supera significativamente os modelos tradicionais.', 'es': 'Razonar con conocimiento de sentido común es fundamental para la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Los métodos tradicionales para la comprensión de máquinas de sentido común en su mayoría solo se centran en un tipo específico de conocimiento, descuidando el hecho de que el razonamiento con sentido común requiere considerar simultáneamente diferentes tipos de conocimiento de sentido común. En este artículo, proponemos un método de razonamiento de conocimiento múltiple, que puede aprovechar el conocimiento heterogéneo para la comprensión de máquinas de sentido común. Específicamente, primero extraemos diferentes tipos de conocimiento (incluido el conocimiento narrativo de eventos, el conocimiento semántico de la entidad y el conocimiento coherente de los sentimientos) y los codificamos como reglas de inferencia con costos. Luego proponemos un modelo de razonamiento de conocimiento múltiple, que selecciona reglas de inferencia para un contexto de razonamiento específico mediante el mecanismo de atención, y las razones resumiendo todas las reglas de inferencia válidas. Los experimentos en RocStories muestran que nuestro método supera significativamente a los modelos tradicionales.', 'ja': '常識的な知識を持つ推論は、自然言語を理解するために重要です。コモンセンスの機械理解の伝統的な方法は、ほとんどが特定の種類の知識にのみ焦点を当てており、コモンセンスの推論には異なる種類のコモンセンスの知識を同時に考慮する必要があるという事実を無視している。本稿では，コモンセンスマシン理解のための異種知識を活用できるマルチナレッジ推論法を提案する．具体的には、まずさまざまな種類の知識（事象の物語知識、実体の意味知識、感情の一貫性のある知識を含む）をマイニングし、コストを伴う推論規則としてエンコードします。そして、注意メカニズムを用いて特定の推論コンテキストの推論規則を選択し、すべての有効な推論規則を要約することによって理由を選択するマルチ知識推論モデルを提案する。RocStoriesの実験では、当社の方法が従来のモデルを大幅に上回っていることが示されています。', 'hi': 'सामान्य ज्ञान ज्ञान के साथ तर्क प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। कॉमनसेंस मशीन की समझ के लिए पारंपरिक तरीके ज्यादातर केवल एक विशिष्ट प्रकार के ज्ञान पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, इस तथ्य की उपेक्षा करते हुए कि कॉमनसेंस तर्क को एक साथ विभिन्न प्रकार के कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान पर विचार करने की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम एक बहु-ज्ञान तर्क विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो कॉमनसेंस मशीन समझ के लिए विषम ज्ञान का शोषण कर सकता है। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले विभिन्न प्रकार के ज्ञान (घटना कथा ज्ञान, इकाई शब्दार्थ ज्ञान और भावना सुसंगत ज्ञान सहित) का खनन करते हैं और उन्हें लागत के साथ अनुमान नियमों के रूप में एन्कोड करते हैं। फिर हम एक बहु-ज्ञान तर्क मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग करके एक विशिष्ट तर्क संदर्भ के लिए अनुमान नियमों का चयन करता है, और सभी वैध अनुमान नियमों को सारांशित करके कारणों का चयन करता है। RocStories पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि पारंपरिक मॉडल को काफी बेहतर बनाती है।', 'ru': 'Разум с здравым смыслом имеет решающее значение для понимания естественного языка. Традиционные методы машинного понимания здравого смысла в основном сосредоточены только на одном конкретном виде знаний, игнорируя тот факт, что здравое рассуждение требует одновременного рассмотрения различных видов здравого смысла. В этой статье мы предлагаем метод рассуждения с использованием нескольких знаний, который может использовать неоднородные знания для понимания машины здравого смысла. В частности, мы сначала добываем различные виды знаний (включая знания о событиях, семантические знания о сущностях и согласованные знания о чувствах) и кодируем их как правила вывода с затратами. Затем мы предлагаем модель рассуждений с множественным знанием, которая выбирает правила вывода для конкретного контекста рассуждения с использованием механизма внимания, и причины, обобщая все действительные правила вывода. Эксперименты на RocStories показывают, что наш метод значительно превосходит традиционные модели.', 'zh': '以常识推理自然语言至重。 古之常识机器多关一特定,忽于常识推理,兼思异类之实。 本文立多知推理之法,可以异构知为常识机器解。 具体来说者,先发异类(事叙事、实体语义情连),编码为本理。 然后举一多知推理模型,当用意机为特定推理上下文择其理则,总其所有效则以择之。 明于RocStories之实验,明优于旧。', 'ga': 'Tá réasúnaíocht le heolas ciallmhar ríthábhachtach chun teanga nádúrtha a thuiscint. Ní dhíríonn modhanna traidisiúnta chun tuiscint meaisín a thuiscint ach ar chineál amháin sainiúil eolais den chuid is mó, ag déanamh faillí go n-éilíonn réasúnaíocht chiallmhar ag an am céanna cineálacha éagsúla eolais ciallmhar a bhreithniú. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh réasúnaíochta ileolais, lenar féidir leas a bhaint as eolas ilchineálach chun tuiscint a fháil ar mheaisíní coitianta. Go sonrach, déanaimid mianach ar chineálacha éagsúla eolais ar dtús (lena n-áirítear eolas ar insint imeachtaí, eolas shéimeantach aonáin agus eolas comhleanúnach meon) agus ionchódaíonn muid iad mar rialacha tátal le costais. Molaimid ansin samhail réasúnaíochta ileolais, a roghnaíonn rialacha tátail do chomhthéacs réasúnaíochta ar leith ag baint úsáide as meicníocht aird, agus cúiseanna trí achoimre a dhéanamh ar na rialacha bailíochta go léir. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar RocStories go sáraíonn ár modh samhlacha traidisiúnta go mór.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv megértéséhez kulcsfontosságú a közértelmes tudással való érvelés. A hagyományos közérzeti gépi megértési módszerek többnyire csak egy adott tudástípusra összpontosítanak, figyelmen kívül hagyva azt a tényt, hogy a közérzeti érvelés egyidejűleg különböző típusú közérzeti tudást igényel. Ebben a tanulmányban egy több tudásra kiterjedő érvelési módszert javasolunk, amely a heterogén tudást hasznosíthatja a közértelmes gépi megértés érdekében. Konkrétan először különböző típusú ismereteket bányászunk (beleértve az eseménynarratív ismereteket, az entitás szemantikai ismereteit és az érzelmi koherens ismereteket), és költségekkel együtt következtetési szabályként kódoljuk őket. Ezt követően egy több tudású érvelési modellt javasolunk, amely egy adott érvelési kontextusra vonatkozó következtetési szabályokat választ ki figyelemmechanizmus segítségével, valamint indokokat az összes érvényes következtetési szabály összefoglalásával. A RocStories kísérletei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jelentősen felülmúlja a hagyományos modelleket.', 'el': 'Η λογική με τη γνώση κοινής λογικής είναι κρίσιμη για την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Οι παραδοσιακές μέθοδοι κατανόησης μηχανών κοινής λογικής επικεντρώνονται κυρίως σε ένα συγκεκριμένο είδος γνώσης, παραμελώντας το γεγονός ότι η λογική λογικής απαιτεί ταυτόχρονα να εξετάσει διαφορετικά είδη γνώσης κοινής λογικής. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο συλλογισμού πολλαπλών γνώσεων, η οποία μπορεί να εκμεταλλευτεί την ετερογενή γνώση για την κατανόηση της κοινής λογικής μηχανής. Συγκεκριμένα, πρώτα εξορύσσουμε διαφορετικά είδη γνώσης (συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αφηγηματικής γνώσης γεγονότων, της σημασιολογικής γνώσης οντότητας και της συνεκτικής γνώσης συναισθημάτων) και τις κωδικοποιούμε ως κανόνες συμπερασμάτων με κόστος. Στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο σκέψης πολλαπλών γνώσεων, το οποίο επιλέγει κανόνες συμπερασμάτων για ένα συγκεκριμένο πλαίσιο συλλογισμού χρησιμοποιώντας μηχανισμό προσοχής, και λόγους συνοψίζοντας όλους τους έγκυρους κανόνες συμπερασμάτων. Τα πειράματα σε δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα παραδοσιακά μοντέλα.', 'ka': 'საერთო სიცოცხლეების მიზეზი კრიტიკურია საერთო ენის გაგრძნობისთვის. ტრადიციონალური მეტოვები საშუალო მაქსინის გაგრძნობა უფრო მხოლოდ ერთი განსაკუთრებული მეცნიერების გადარჩენა, რომ საშუალო განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებულების განსაკუთრებულების განსაკუთ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მრავალური ცნობილების რაოდენობის მიზეზია, რომელიც შეუძლია ვკოლუქტუროთ ჰეტეროგენური ცნობილება საშუალო სინამდვილეების გაგრ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველად განსხვავებული მეცნიერების განსხვავება (გოგონების განსხვავება, განსხვავებული ცნობილება, განსხვავებული სიმენტიკური ცნობილება და სენტიმენტიკური კონექ შემდეგ ჩვენ მრავალური მეცნიერების პარამენტის მოდელს, რომელიც ამოირჩევს ინფრენციის წესები განსაკუთრებული პარამენტის კონტექსტის გამოყენებაში ინფრენციის მართლად, და მიზე პოკისტორიების გამოცდილებების გამოცდილება, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ტრადიციული მოდელები.', 'lt': 'Siekiant suprasti natūralią kalbą labai svarbu pagrįsti bendrąsias žinias. Tradiciniai bendro supratimo metodai daugiausia sutelkiami tik į vieną konkrečią žinių rūšį, neatsižvelgiant į tai, kad bendro supratimo pagrindimas reikalauja vienu metu apsvarstyti skirtingų rūšių bendro supratimo žinias. Šiame dokumente siūlome daugiakalbį pagrįstumo metodą, kuris gali pasinaudoti heterogeniškomis žiniomis bendram mašinų supratimui. Konkrečiai, pirmiausia kasime įvairių rūšių žinias (įskaitant renginių narracines žinias, subjektų semantines žinias ir jausmų nuoseklias žinias) ir koduojame jas kaip išvadų taisykles su sąnaudomis. Tuomet siūlome daugiakalbį pagrindimo model į, kuriame nustatomos išvadų taisyklės konkrečiam pagrindimo kontekstui, naudojant dėmesio mechanizmą, ir priežastis apibendrinant visas galiojančias išvadų taisykles. Eksperimentai su RocStories rodo, kad mūsų metodas gerokai viršija tradicinius modelius.', 'it': "Ragionare con conoscenze di buon senso è fondamentale per la comprensione del linguaggio naturale. I metodi tradizionali per la comprensione della macchina del buon senso si concentrano principalmente su un tipo specifico di conoscenza, trascurando il fatto che il ragionamento del buon senso richiede contemporaneamente considerare diversi tipi di conoscenza del buon senso. In questo articolo, proponiamo un metodo di ragionamento multi-conoscenza, che può sfruttare conoscenze eterogenee per la comprensione della macchina di senso comune. Nello specifico, estraiamo prima diversi tipi di conoscenza (compresa la conoscenza narrativa degli eventi, la conoscenza semantica dell'entità e la conoscenza coerente dei sentimenti) e li codifichiamo come regole di inferenza con i costi. Quindi proponiamo un modello di ragionamento multi-conoscenza, che seleziona regole di inferenza per uno specifico contesto di ragionamento utilizzando meccanismi di attenzione, e ragioni riassumendo tutte le regole di inferenza valide. Esperimenti su RocStories dimostrano che il nostro metodo supera significativamente i modelli tradizionali.", 'mk': 'Разумнувањето со заедничко знаење е критично за природното разбирање на јазикот. Традиционалните методи за заедничко разбирање на машината главно се фокусираат на еден специфичен вид на знаење, заборавајќи го фактот дека заедничкото размислување бара истовремено разгледување на различни видови на заедничко знаење. Во овој весник предложуваме метод за размислување на мултизнаење, кој може да го искористи хетерогеното знаење за заедничко разбирање на машината. Специфично, прво ги ископуваме различните видови на знаење (вклучувајќи го и инференциското знаење на настаните, семантичното знаење на ентитетите и сентименталното коерентно знаење) и ги кодираме како правила за конференција со трошоци. Потоа предложуваме модел за размислување со мултизнаење, кој ги избира правилата за инференција за специфичен контекст за размислување со употреба на механизмот за внимание, и причините со сумирање на сите валидни правила за инференција. Експериментите на RocStories покажуваат дека нашиот метод значително ги надминува традиционалните модели.', 'kk': 'Көпшілік мәліметтердің себебі табиғи тілді түсінуге көп жағдай. Көпшілік түсініктердің әдетті әдістері көпшілік түсініктерінің көпшілігі тек бір түрлі білім тәртібіне көмектеседі, көпшілік түсініктердің бір түрлі білімдерді Бұл қағазда біз көптеген білім түсіндіру әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл көптеген білім үшін көптеген мәліметті түсіндіре алады. Әдетте, біз біріншіден бір түрлі білім түрлерін (оқиғалардың оқиғаларының білімі, білім симпатикалық білім мен сезімдердің білімі және мәліметтердің білімі) қолданып,  Содан кейін біз көптеген білім түсініктеме үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл өзгерту механизмін қолдану үшін бірнеше түсініктеме ережелерін таңдайды. Барлық дұрыс түсініктеме ережеле RocStories тәжірибесінде тәжірибеміздің әдеттегі үлгілерді өте маңызды істейді.', 'ms': 'Reasoning with commonsense knowledge is critical for natural language understanding.  Kaedah tradisional untuk pemahaman mesin umum kebanyakan hanya fokus pada satu jenis pengetahuan khusus, mengabaikan fakta bahawa alasan umum memerlukan secara bersamaan mempertimbangkan jenis yang berbeza pengetahuan umum. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan kaedah pemikiran multi-pengetahuan, yang boleh mengeksploitasi pengetahuan heterogene untuk pemahaman mesin yang sama. Secara khusus, kita pertama-tama lompat jenis pengetahuan yang berbeza (termasuk pengetahuan cerita peristiwa, pengetahuan semantik entiti dan pengetahuan yang konsisten perasaan) dan mengekodkannya sebagai peraturan kesimpulan dengan kos. Kemudian kami cadangkan model pemikiran multi-pengetahuan, yang memilih peraturan kesimpulan untuk konteks pemikiran khusus menggunakan mekanisme perhatian, dan sebab dengan mengurangkan semua peraturan kesimpulan yang sah. Eksperimen pada RocStories menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melebihi model tradisional secara signifikan.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ മനസ്സിന് വേണ്ടി കാരണം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് യന്ത്രത്തിനുള്ള പാഠമായ രീതികള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ, കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് കാരണങ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പല അറിവുള്ള വിവേകത്തിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് കോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് യന്ത്രത്തിന് വേ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളായ അറിവുകള്\u200d എന്\u200dറെ വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങളാകുന്നു (സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, സെമാന്റ പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പല അറിവുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിയമങ്ങള റോക്സ്റ്റോറിസിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പാരമ്പര്യമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെ', 'mt': 'Ir-raġuni b’għarfien komuni hija kritika għall-fehim naturali tal-lingwa. Il-metodi tradizzjonali għall-fehim komuni tal-magni jiffokaw l-aktar fuq tip speċifiku wieħed ta’ għarfien, filwaqt li jinjoraw il-fatt li r-raġunament komuni jeħtieġ li jiġu kkunsidrati simultanjament tipi differenti ta’ għarfien komuni. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu metodu ta’ raġunament b’ħafna għarfien, li jista’ jisfrutta għarfien eteroġenu għall-fehim komuni tal-magni. B’mod speċifiku, l-ewwel aħna nimminaw tipi differenti ta’ għarfien (inkluż għarfien narrattiv tal-avvenimenti, għarfien semantiku tal-entità u għarfien koerenti tas-sentimenti) u nikkodifikawhom bħala regoli ta’ inferenza bl-ispejjeż. Imbagħad nipproponu mudell ta’ raġunament b’ħafna għarfien, li jagħżel regoli ta’ inferenza għal kuntest ta’ raġunament speċifiku bl-użu ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni, u raġunijiet billi niġbru fil-qosor ir-regoli ta’ inferenza validi kollha. L-esperimenti fuq RocStories juru li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż il-mudelli tradizzjonali b’mod sinifikanti.', 'mn': 'Олон ойлголттой мэдлэгтэй шалтгаан нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд чухал. Олон ойлголтын машин ойлголтын уламжлалт арга нь ихэнхдээ зөвхөн нэг төрлийн мэдлэг дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж, ихэнхдээ ойлголтын шалтгаан нь өөр төрлийн мэдлэг ойлгох хэрэгтэй гэдгийг ухамсарлах юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон мэдлэгтэй ойлголтын арга зааж өгдөг. Энэ нь ерөнхий мэдлэгтэй машин ойлголтын тухай мэдлэгийг ашиглаж чадна. Ялангуяа бид эхлээд өөр төрлийн мэдлэг (үйл явдлын түүх мэдлэг, мэдлэг, мэдрэмжтэй мэдлэг, мэдрэмжтэй мэдлэг) болон үнэтэй халдварын хууль гэж нэрлэж байна. Дараа нь бид олон мэдлэг ойлголтын загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь анхаарлын механизмийг ашиглан халдварын дүрмийг сонгож байгаа зарим шалтгаануудыг сонгож байна. RocStories-ын туршилтууд бидний арга нь уламжлалтын загваруудыг маш чухал болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Årsaken med vanleg kunnskap er kritisk for naturspråk forståking. Tradisjonale metodar for vanleg forståking av maskinen er hovudsakelig berre fokusert på ein spesifikk typen kunnskap, og avbryt faktum at vanleg forståking krev samtidig å gjera forskjellige typar vanleg kunnskap. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein fleire kunnskapselmetode, som kan bruke heterogenen kunnskap for vanleg forståelse av maskinen. Spesielt er vi først mine forskjellige typar kunnskap (inkludert hendingssnarativ kunnskap, entitetssemantisk kunnskap og sentiment koherent kunnskap) og koder dei som inferensningsreglar med kostnader. Deretter foreslår vi ein fleirkjennende rasjonsmodul, som veljer infeksjonsregular for ein spesifikk rasjonskontekst ved hjelp av oppmerksmekanismen, og grunner ved å summarisera alle gyldige infeksjonsregular. Eksperimentar på RocStories viser at metoden vårt utfører tradisjonelle modeller betydelig.', 'pl': 'Rozumowanie wiedzą zdrowego rozsądku ma kluczowe znaczenie dla zrozumienia języka naturalnego. Tradycyjne metody rozumienia maszyn zdrowego rozsądku koncentrują się głównie tylko na jednym konkretnym rodzaju wiedzy, zaniedbując fakt, że rozumowanie zdrowego rozsądku wymaga jednoczesnego rozważania różnych rodzajów wiedzy zdrowego rozsądku. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodę rozumowania wielowej wiedzy, która może wykorzystać heterogeniczną wiedzę do zrozumienia maszyn zdrowego rozsądku. W szczególności najpierw wydobywamy różne rodzaje wiedzy (w tym wiedzę narracyjną zdarzeń, wiedzę semantyczną jednostek i wiedzę spójną sentymentów) i kodujemy je jako reguły wnioskowania z kosztami. Następnie proponujemy model multi-wiedzy rozumowania, który selekcjonuje reguły wnioskowania dla konkretnego kontekstu rozumowania za pomocą mechanizmu uwagi, oraz powody poprzez podsumowanie wszystkich ważnych reguł wnioskowania. Eksperymenty na RocStories pokazują, że nasza metoda znacznie przewyższa tradycyjne modele.', 'ro': 'Raționarea cu cunoștințe de bun simț este esențială pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural. Metodele tradiționale pentru înțelegerea mașinilor de bun simț se concentrează în principal pe un anumit tip de cunoaștere, neglijând faptul că raționamentul bun simț necesită luarea simultană în considerare a diferitelor tipuri de cunoștințe de bun simț. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă de raționament multi-cunoaștere, care poate exploata cunoștințele eterogene pentru înțelegerea mașinilor de bun sens. Mai exact, extragem mai întâi diferite tipuri de cunoștințe (inclusiv cunoașterea narativă a evenimentelor, cunoașterea semantică a entităților și cunoașterea coerentă a sentimentelor) și le codăm ca reguli de deducție cu costuri. Apoi propunem un model de raționament multi-cunoaștere, care selectează regulile de inferență pentru un context specific de raționament folosind mecanismul de atenție și motivele prin rezumarea tuturor regulilor de inferență valabile. Experimentele pe RocStories arată că metoda noastră depășește semnificativ modelele tradiționale.', 'sr': 'Razlog znanja zajedničkog smisla je kritično za razumevanje prirodnog jezika. Tradicionalne metode za razumijevanje češće mašine uglavnom se fokusiraju na samo jednu specifičnu vrstu znanja, zaboravljajući činjenicu da razumijevanje češće zahteva istovremeno razmišljanje o različitim vrstama znanja zajedničkog smisla. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu razumevanja mnogih znanja, koja može iskoristiti heterogenezno znanje za razumijevanje mašine zajedničkog smisla. Posebno, mi prvo razumijemo različite vrste znanja (uključujući priče o događajima, semantičko znanje entiteta i saslušanje osjećanja) i kodiramo ih kao pravila infekcije sa troškovima. Onda predlažemo model razumljivanja mnogih znanja, koji odabere pravila infekcije za određeni kontekst razumljivanja koristeći mehanizam pažnje i razloge sažetajući sve vrijedne pravila infekcije. Eksperimenti na RocStories pokazuju da naša metoda značajno iznosi tradicionalne modele.', 'so': 'Barashada aqoonta shirkadu waxay muhiim u tahay waxgarashada afka asalka ah. Traditional methods for commonsense machine comprehension mostly only focus on one specific kind of knowledge, neglecting the fact that commonsense reasoning requires simultaneously considering different kinds of commonsense knowledge.  Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab cilmi badan oo aqoon ah, kaas oo u baahan kara aqoonta kala duduwan ee qalabka shirkadda. Si gaar ah, waxaan ugu horraynaa aqoontayda kala duduwan (sida aqoonta taariikhda, aqoonta sawirida ah iyo aqoonta kaleemeysan iyo fikradda) waxaana ugu qoraynaa sharciyada kharashka ah. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale waxyaabo badan oo aqoonta leh, kaasoo xukumaya sharciyada cudurada si gaar ah oo loo isticmaalo midiidinka daryeelka caafimaadka iyo sababaha ku saabsan sharciyada jirada oo dhan. Imtixaanka ku saabsan RocStories waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayagu uu si muhiim ah u sameeyo qaababka caadiga ah.', 'sv': 'Att resonera med allmännyttig kunskap är avgörande för förståelsen av naturligt språk. Traditionella metoder för allmännyttig maskinförståelse fokuserar mestadels bara på en specifik typ av kunskap, bortsett från det faktum att allmännyttig resonemang kräver att man samtidigt beaktar olika typer av allmännyttig kunskap. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en multi-knowledge resonement metod, som kan utnyttja heterogen kunskap för allmännyttig maskinförståelse. Specifikt bryter vi först ut olika typer av kunskap (inklusive händelseberättande kunskap, entitetssemantisk kunskap och sentimentsammanhängande kunskap) och kodar dem som inferensregler med kostnader. Sedan föreslår vi en multi-knowledge resonansmodell, som väljer inferensregler för ett specifikt resonanskontext med hjälp av uppmärksamhetsmekanism, och skäl genom att sammanfatta alla giltiga inferensregler. Experiment på RocStories visar att vår metod överträffar traditionella modeller avsevärt.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි. සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් පද්ධතිය යුද්ධ පද්ධතිය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාවක් විතරයි දන්නවට පමණ ස මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පරික්ෂ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම මගේ වෙනස් දැනගන්න විදිහට දැනගන්න (සිද්ධ විදිහට කතාවක් දැනගන්න, සිමාන්තික දැනගන්න, දැනුම ඊට පස්සේ අපි ගොඩක් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අවධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න RocStoryගේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය මෝඩේල් වලට විශේෂයි.', 'ta': 'தொழில் அறிவு கொண்டு காரணம் இயல்பான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்வது முக்கியமானது. தொழில்நுட்ப இயந்திரத்தின் பாரம்பரிய முறைமைகள் பெரும்பாலாகவே ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட அறிவு வகையில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது, தொழில்நுட்பமான காரணத்த இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல அறிவு குறிப்பு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது தொழில்நுட்ப இயந்திரத்திற்கு வெவ்வேறு அறிவ குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முதலில் என் வேறு வகையான அறிவு (நிகழ்வு செய்யும் அறிவு, உடன் பாதிப்பு அறிவு மற்றும் உணர்வு கூடிய அறிவு) பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு பல அறிவு குறிப்பிட்ட காரணங்களின் மாதிரி தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம், அது குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப் ராக்ஸ்டோரிஸ் மீது சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் முறைமை மரபார்ந்த மாதிரிகளை முக்கியமாக செய்யும்.', 'ur': 'عام سمجھنے کے ساتھ سمجھنے کا سبب طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ عام سمجھانے کے مطابق رسمی طریقے صرف ایک مخصوص طریقہ علم پر تمرکز ہوتے ہیں، اس حقیقت کو غافل کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ عام سمجھانے کے منظور ایک دوسرے طریقے سے مختلف سمجھانے کے معاملہ کی سمجھانے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک بہت سی علم منظور کا طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو عام سمجھنے کے ماشین سمجھنے کے لئے غیر عام علم کا استعمال کر سکتا ہے. مخصوص طور پر، ہم پہلے اپنے مختلف طریقے علم کو پہلے سمجھتے ہیں (حادثہ کی تعبیر کے ذریعہ) اور انہیں خرچ کے مطابق دھوکا دیتے ہیں۔ پھر ہم ایک بہت سی علم منظوری موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ایک خاص منظوری منظورت کے لئے منظوری قانون کو انتخاب کرتا ہے، ذهن منظوری مکانیسم کے مطابق، اور دلیلوں کو تمام مطابق منظوری قانون کو ذخیره کرتا ہے RocStories کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ سنتی موڈل سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Umumiy ta'rif bilan o'rganish asosiy tilni tushunishga muhim. Komponentsiya mashinasi bir necha ma'lumotga qaragan qismi usullari faqat bir foydalanuvchi ma'lumot bilan foydalanish mumkin. Komponentsiya sabablar bilan bir necha xil xizmatni o'rganish kerak. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha ma'lumot sabablar usulini talab qilamiz. Bu ko'plab ma'lumotni ko'plab o'rganadi, bu bir qanchalik ko'plab o'rganish mashinani o'rganish uchun o'zgartiradi. Specifically, we first mine different kinds of knowledge (including event narrative knowledge, entity semantic knowledge and sentiment coherent knowledge) and encode them as inference rules with costs.  Keyin biz ko'plab ilmiy sabablar modelini tahlil qilamiz. Bu bir qanday ma'lumotni tahrirlash qoidalarini foydalanishi mumkin va sabablarni hamma haqiqiqiy kasallik qoidalarini kichiklashtirish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Lý luận với kiến thức thông thường là điều quan trọng cho hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Phương pháp truyền thống cho sự thấu hiểu của máy thông thường hầu hết chỉ tập trung vào một loại kiến thức đặc biệt, bỏ qua sự thật rằng lý lẽ lẽ lẽ thường phải cân nhắc đồng thời các loại kiến thức thông thường. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất phương pháp lập luận đa kiến thức, có thể khai thác kiến thức khác nhau cho sự thấu hiểu máy thông thường. Cụ thể, chúng tôi lần đầu tiên khai thác các dạng kiến thức khác nhau (bao gồm kiến thức về sự kiện, kiến thức cơ thể theo ngữ nghĩa và cảm xúc) và mã hóa chúng như các quy tắc thừa nhận với chi phí. Rồi chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình lập luận đa kiến thức, chọn các quy tắc nhận biết cho một ngữ cảnh lý luận cụ thể, sử dụng cơ chế tập trung, và các lý do bằng cách tổng hợp tất cả các quy tắc luận có giá trị. Những thí nghiệm trên RocStories cho thấy rằng phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội so với truyền thống.', 'bg': 'Разбирането с разумни познания е от решаващо значение за разбирането на естествения език. Традиционните методи за разумно машинно разбиране се фокусират предимно върху един конкретен вид знание, пренебрегвайки факта, че разумното разсъждаване изисква едновременно разглеждане на различни видове разумно знание. В настоящата статия предлагаме метод на разсъждение с множество знания, който може да използва хетерогенно знание за разумно машинно разбиране. По-конкретно, първо добиваме различни видове знания (включително поверително знание за събития, семантично знание за същността и сантиментално съгласувано знание) и ги кодираме като правила за заключение с разходи. След това предлагаме модел на многознание, който избира правила за изводи за конкретен контекст на разсъжденията, използвайки механизъм на вниманието, и причини чрез обобщаване на всички валидни правила за изводи. Експериментите показват, че методът ни значително превъзхожда традиционните модели.', 'da': 'Fornuft med almindelig viden er afgørende for naturlig sprogforståelse. Traditionelle metoder til almindelig maskinforståelse fokuserer for det meste kun på en bestemt form for viden, idet man ignorerer det faktum, at almindelig ræsonnement kræver samtidig at overveje forskellige former for almindelig viden. I denne artikel foreslår vi en multi-viden ræsonnement metode, der kan udnytte heterogen viden til almindelig maskinforståelse. Specielt udvinder vi først forskellige former for viden (herunder begivenhedsfortælling viden, entitetssemantisk viden og sentimentsammenhængende viden) og koder dem som inference regler med omkostninger. Derefter foreslår vi en multi-viden ræsonnement model, der vælger inference regler for en bestemt ræsonnement kontekst ved hjælp af opmærksomhedsmekanisme, og årsager ved at opsummere alle gyldige inference regler. Eksperimenter med RocStories viser, at vores metode overgår traditionelle modeller betydeligt.', 'nl': 'Redenen met gezonde verstand kennis is cruciaal voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. Traditionele methoden voor het begrijpen van de machine van gezond verstand richten zich meestal alleen op één specifiek soort kennis, waarbij het feit wordt verwaarloosd dat gezond verstand redeneren gelijktijdig verschillende soorten kennis van gezond verstand vereist. In dit artikel stellen we een multi-knowledge redeneermethode voor, die heterogene kennis kan benutten voor gezond verstand van machines. Specifiek, we mijnen eerst verschillende soorten kennis (waaronder event narrative kennis, entiteitssemantische kennis en sentiment coherente kennis) en coderen deze als inferentieregels met kosten. Vervolgens stellen we een multi-knowledge redenering model voor, dat inferentieregels selecteert voor een specifieke redeneringscontext met behulp van aandachtsmechanisme, en redenen door alle geldige inferentieregels samen te vatten. Experimenten op RocStories tonen aan dat onze methode traditionele modellen aanzienlijk overtreft.', 'id': 'Reasoning with commonsense knowledge is critical for natural language understanding.  Metode tradisional untuk pemahaman mesin umum kebanyakan fokus pada satu jenis pengetahuan spesifik, mengabaikan fakta bahwa alasan umum membutuhkan secara bersamaan mempertimbangkan jenis pengetahuan umum yang berbeda. In this paper, we propose a multi-knowledge reasoning method, which can exploit heterogeneous knowledge for commonsense machine comprehension.  Secara spesifik, kita pertama menimbulkan jenis pengetahuan yang berbeda (termasuk pengetahuan cerita peristiwa, pengetahuan semantis entitas dan pengetahuan konsisten sentimen) dan mengkode mereka sebagai aturan kesimpulan dengan biaya. Kemudian kami mengusulkan model pemikiran multi-pengetahuan, yang memilih aturan kesimpulan untuk konteks pemikiran spesifik menggunakan mekanisme perhatian, dan alasan dengan mempersingkatkan semua aturan kesimpulan yang valid. Eksperimen di RocStories menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi model tradisional secara signifikan.', 'ko': '상식적인 지식으로 추리를 하는 것은 자연 언어의 이해에 매우 중요하다.전통적인 상식 기계 이해 방법은 대부분 특정한 지식에만 주목하고 상식 추리는 서로 다른 종류의 상식 지식을 동시에 고려해야 한다는 사실을 소홀히 했다.본고에서 우리는 다지식 추리 방법을 제시하여 이구지식을 이용하여 상식기계적 이해를 할 수 있다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 먼저 서로 다른 유형의 지식(사건 서사 지식, 실체 의미 지식과 감정 연관 지식 포함)을 발굴하고 이를 대가가 있는 추리 규칙으로 인코딩한다.그 다음에 우리는 다지식 추리 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 주의 메커니즘을 이용하여 특정한 추리 환경을 위해 추리 규칙을 선택하고 모든 효과적인 추리 규칙을 정리함으로써 추리를 한다.RocStories에서의 실험은 우리의 방법이 전통 모델보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'de': 'Vernunft mit gesundem Menschenverstand ist entscheidend für das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. Traditionelle Methoden des maschinellen Verständnisses von gesundem Menschenverstand konzentrieren sich meist nur auf eine bestimmte Art von Wissen und vernachlässigen die Tatsache, dass gesundem Menschenverstand gleichzeitig verschiedene Arten von gesundem Menschenverstand Wissen berücksichtigen muss. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Multi-Knowledge-Reasoning-Methode vor, die heterogenes Wissen für das maschinelle Verständnis von gesundem Menschenverstand nutzen kann. Konkret werden zunächst verschiedene Arten von Wissen (einschließlich Ereignisnarrativwissen, Entitätssemantisches Wissen und sentiment kohärentes Wissen) abgebaut und als Inferenzregeln mit Kosten kodiert. Dann schlagen wir ein Multi-Knowledge-Argumentationsmodell vor, das Inferenzregeln für einen bestimmten Argumentationskontext mittels Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus auswählt, und Gründe, indem alle gültigen Inferenzregeln zusammengefasst werden. Experimente an RocStories zeigen, dass unsere Methode traditionelle Modelle deutlich übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na maarifa ya umma ni muhimu kwa kuelewa lugha ya asili. Utawala wa kawaida wa kompyuta wa mashine ya biashara mara nyingi unajikita tu kwenye aina moja maalum ya maarifa, ukipuuza ukweli kwamba sababu za umma zinahitaji kwa wakati mmoja kuzingatia aina mbalimbali za maarifa ya wafanyakazi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu yenye ufahamu wa mambo mengi, ambayo inaweza kutumia maarifa tofauti kwa ajili ya kompyuta ya mashine ya umma. hasa, kwanza tuna maarifa tofauti (ikiwa ni pamoja na maarifa ya tukio, yenye maarifa ya kimapenzi na maarifa ya hisia pamoja) na kuingiza kama kanuni za uchungufu kwa gharama. Kisha tunapendekeza modeli inayoelezea maarifa mbalimbali, ambazo huchagua sheria za maambukizi kwa muktadha maalum unaoelezea kwa kutumia mfumo wa ufuatiliaji, na sababu kwa kuandika muhtasari wa sheria zote za ugonjwa wa magonjwa. Majaribio kwenye RocStories yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inafanya mifano ya kitamaduni kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'fa': 'دلیل دانش معمولی برای درک زبان طبیعی مهم است. روش\u200cهای سنتی برای ماشین معمولی درک بیشتر فقط روی یک نوع دانش مشخص تمرکز می\u200cکند، و در غفلت از این حقیقت که دلیل معمولی نیاز به همزمان با توجه به نوع دانش معمولی مختلف است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش منطقی از دانش\u200cهای متعدد پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند دانش\u200cهای متعدد را برای فهم ماشین\u200cهای معمولی استفاده کند. مخصوصا، ما اولین نوع دانش مختلف را منتقل می کنیم (شامل دانش داستان اتفاق، دانش شناسی و احساسات هماهنگ) و آنها را به عنوان قوانین تفاوت با هزینه\u200cها Encode می\u200cکنیم. سپس ما یک مدل دلیل منطقی چندین دانش پیشنهاد می کنیم که قانون عفونت را برای یک محیط منطقی خاص با استفاده از مکانیسم توجه انتخاب می کند، و دلایل را با جمع کردن تمام قانون عفونت قابل استفاده می کند. تجربه های روک داستان ها نشان می دهند که روش ما مدل های سنتی را به طور معنی انجام می دهد.', 'tr': 'Adatça duýdury bilen çykmak tebigy dil düşünmesi üçin wajypdyr. Däpli duýdury maşynyň düşünmesi üçin adatça diňe bir hili bilim bilen üns bermek üçin däpli duýdury düşünmesi gerek däldir. Bu kagyzda, biz birnäçe bilgili düşündirişlik yöntemi teklip edýäris. Bu maşynyň düşünmesi üçin beýleki bilimi ulanyp bilýär. Özellikle, biz ilkinji gezek çeşitli bilgileri (olaryň taryha bilgi, semantik bilgi we duyglaryň düzgün bilimi dahil edilen noktalar) içinde olaryň aşırı düzgün kurallary hökmünde kodlaýarys. Sonra biz birnäçe bilgi razylygy nusgasyna teklip edip, bu nusgasy düzgünlerini belli sebäbi düşünüp görkezme mekanismi ullanýar we ähli gürrüňli alçak düzgünlerini toplamak üçin saýlaýar. RocStories taryhyşlarynda örneklerimiziň däpli nusgalarymyzyň üstüne çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Die rede van gemeenskaplike kennis is kritiese vir natuurlike taal verstanding. Tradisjonale metodes vir gemeenskapste masjien verstaan meestal alleen fokus op een spesifieke soort kennis, en verwerp die feit dat gemeenskapste redening benodig samelewing aanneem verskillende soorte van gemeenskapste kennis. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n multikennis redekeningsmetode, wat heterogenee kennis kan gebruik vir gemeenskap masjien verstaan. Spesifieke, ons het eerste min verskillende soorte kennis (insluitend gebeurtenis narratiewe kennis, entiteit semantiese kennis en sentimente koherent kennis) en hulle as inferensie reëls met koste kodeer. Toe voorstel ons 'n multikennis redering model, wat uitkies inferensie reëls vir 'n spesifieke redening konteks deur aandag mekanisme te gebruik en redes deur alle geldige inferensie reëls te opsomming. Eksperimente op RocStories vertoon dat ons metode tradisionele modele betekeurig uitvoer.", 'sq': 'Arsyeja me njohuri të përbashkët është kritike për kuptimin natyror të gjuhës. Metodat tradicionale për kuptimin e makinës së përbashkët përqëndrohen kryesisht vetëm në një lloj të veçantë njohurie, duke harruar faktin se arsyetimi i përbashkët kërkon të konsiderohet njëkohësisht lloj të ndryshëm njohurie të përbashkët. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë arsyetimi me shumë njohuri, e cila mund të shfrytëzojë njohurinë heterogjene për kuptimin e përbashkët të makinave. Në mënyrë specifike, ne së pari minim lloje të ndryshme njohuri (duke përfshirë njohuri tregues të ngjarjeve, njohuri semantike të njësisë dhe ndjenja të njohuri koherent) dhe i kodojmë ato si rregulla përfundimi me kosto. Pastaj propozojmë një model arsyetimi me shumë njohuri, i cili zgjedh rregullat e përfundimit për një kontekst arsyetimi të caktuar duke përdorur mekanizmin e vëmendjes dhe arsyet duke përmbledhur të gjitha rregullat e vlefshme të përfundimit. Eksperimentet në RocStories tregojnë se metoda jonë tejkalon modelet tradicionale në mënyrë të konsiderueshme.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje zajedničkog znanja je kritično za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. Tradicionalne metode za razumijevanje strojeva zajedničkog smisla uglavnom se fokusiraju na samo jednu specifičnu vrstu znanja, zaboravljajući činjenicu da razumijevanje zajedničkog smisla zahtijeva istovremeno razmotriti različite vrste znanja zajedničkog smisla. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu razumljivanja mnogih znanja, koja može iskoristiti heterogenezno znanje za razumijevanje češće mašine. Posebno, mi prvo uzimamo različite vrste znanja (uključujući priče o događajima, semantičko znanje subjekta i saslušanje osjećaja) i kodiramo ih kao pravila infekcije sa troškovima. Onda predlažemo model razumljivanja višeznanja, koji odabere pravila infekcije za određeni kontekst razumljivanja koristeći mehanizam pažnje i razloge sažetajući sve vrijedne pravila infekcije. Eksperimenti na RocStories pokazuju da naša metoda značajno iznosi tradicionalne modele.', 'am': 'በአካባቢው እውቀት መብት ለፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል አዋቂ ነው፡፡ የባሕላዊ የኮምፒስነስ መሣሪያዎች ማሳሰብ አብዛኛውን በተለየ አንድ ዓይነት እውቀት ላይ ብቻ ያሳስፋል፣ የሰብዓዊ ማሰናከል በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነት የኮምፒሽነስ እውቀትን በመጠየቅ ይሻላል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የብዙ እውቀት አዋቂ ልማድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ አስቀድመን የልዩ ዓይነት እውቀት (የሁኔታ ታሪክ እውቀት፣ የስሜት እውቀት እና የአሳብ እውቀት እና በዋጋው የሳንስ እውቀት እናቆጥራቸዋለን፡፡ በኋላም የብዙ አዋቂ አዋቂዎችን ምሳሌ እናሳስባታለን፣ የግንኙነትን አካሄድ በተጠቃሚ አስተያየት እና ማስታወቂያውን በመጠቀም እና ምክንያቶችን ሁሉ የተዋበ የውይይት ሥርዓቶች ማሳሳየት ነው፡፡ በRocStories ላይ ፈተናዎች የባሕላዊ ሞዴላዎችን በኩል የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի հասկացության համար կարևոր է հասկանալ ընդհանուր գիտելիքով: Հասարակ մեքենայի հասկացության ավանդական մեթոդները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են միայն մի որոշակի տեսակի գիտելիքի վրա, անտեսելով այն փաստը, որ ընդհանուր մտածելակերպը պահանջում է միաժամանակ հաշվի առնել տարբեր տեսակի գիտելիքներ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմագիտելիքների մտածողության մեթոդ, որը կարող է օգտագործել հետերոգեն գիտելիքները ընդհանուր մեքենայի հասկացության համար: Հատկապես, մենք նախ հանում ենք տարբեր տեսակի գիտելիքներ (ներառյալ իրադարձությունների պատմությունների գիտելիքներ, էության սեմանտիկ գիտելիքներ և զգացմունքների համապատասխան գիտելիքներ) և կոդավորում դրանք որպես հետևանքային կանոններ գների հետ: Հետո մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմագիտելի մտածողական մոդել, որը ընտրում է հետևողական կանոնները որոշակի մտածողական կոնտեքստի համար, օգտագործելով ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, և պատճառները ամփոփելով բոլոր ճշգրիտ հետևողական կանոնները: ՌոքՊատմությունների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը շատ ավելի լավ է քան ավանդական մոդելները:', 'az': 'Həmçinin təbiətli dil anlaşılması üçün münasibdir. Düzgün fikirləşmək maşınının ehtiyacı yolları çox olaraq yalnız bir tür bilgi üzərində təsirləndirir, təsirli fikirləşmək müxtəlif təsirlərin elmi ilə birlikdə düşünməsi lazımdır. Bu kağızda, çoxlu bilgi müzakirə metodu təklif edirik ki, bu maşının anlaması üçün müxtəlif bilgi istifadə edə bilər. Biz ilk dəfə müxtəlif bilgilər kimi mənimləyirik (olaraq hekayətli bilgi, semantik bilgi və hisslər müxtəlif bilgi kimi) və onları xərcləmə qaydaları kimi kodlayırıq. Sonra biz çoxlu bilgi razılaşma modelini təbliğ edirik ki, bu, gözləmə mehanizmisini istifadə edərək, bütün güclü infeksiya kurallarını qeyd edərək infeksiya kurallarını seçir. RocStories təcrübələrində təcrübələrimiz nəticə modellərin çox mövcuddur.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje zajedničkog znanja je kritično za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. Tradicionalne metode za razumijevanje češće mašine uglavnom se fokusiraju na samo jednu specifičnu vrstu znanja, zaboravljajući činjenicu da razumijevanje češće zahtijeva istovremeno razmotriti različite vrste znanja češće smisla. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu razumljivanja višeznanja, koja može iskoristiti heterogenezno znanje za razumijevanje mašine zajedničkog smisla. Posebno, mi prvo uzimamo različite vrste znanja (uključujući priče o događajima, semantičko znanje entiteta i saslušanje osjećaja) i kodiramo ih kao pravila infekcije sa troškovima. Onda predlažemo model razumljivanja mnogih znanja, koji odabere pravila infekcije za određeni kontekst razumljivanja koristeći mehanizam pažnje i razloge sažetajući sve vrijedne pravila infekcije. Eksperimenti na RocStories pokazuju da naš metod značajno iznosi tradicionalne modele.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝার জন্য কমিউনেন্সেন্সের জ্ঞানের কারণে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। কমিনসেন্স মেশিনের প্রচলিত ঐতিহ্যবাহী পদ্ধতিগুলো বেশীরভাগ একটি নির্দিষ্ট ধরনের জ্ঞানের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়ে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে, যেটা উপেক্ষা করা হচ্ছে য এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি বহুজ্ঞানের কারণের প্রস্তাব করছি, যা কমিনসেন্স মেশিনের সম্পর্কে জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করতে পারে। বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথমে বিভিন্ন ধরনের জ্ঞান নিয়ে ভিন্ন ধরনের (যার মধ্যে অনুষ্ঠানের তথ্য, সেম্পেন্টিক জ্ঞান এবং অনুভূতির জ্ঞান রয়েছে তারপর আমরা একটি বহুজ্ঞানের কারণের মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যা নিয়ম নির্বাচন করে একটি নির্দিষ্ট কারণের প্রতিক্রিয়া বেছে নিয়েছে মনোযোগ মাধ্যমের ব্যবহার রোকস্টোরিসের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি ঐতিহ্যবাহী মডেলের প্রযুক্তি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ।', 'fi': 'Järjestely järkevällä tiedolla on ratkaisevan tärkeää luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämiselle. Perinteiset koneymmärryksen menetelmät keskittyvät enimmäkseen vain yhteen tietyntyyppiseen tietoon, unohtamatta sitä, että järjetön päättely edellyttää erilaisten järjetietojen samanaikaista tarkastelua. Tässä työssä ehdotamme monitieteellistä päättelymenetelmää, jonka avulla voidaan hyödyntää heterogeenistä tietoa järkevään koneymmärrykseen. Erityisesti kaivamme ensin erityyppistä tietoa (mukaan lukien tapahtumanarratiivinen tieto, entiteetin semanttinen tieto ja tunnekoherenttinen tieto) ja koodaamme ne päättelysääntöinä kustannuksin. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme monitieteellistä päättelymallia, joka valitsee päättelyn säännöt tietylle päättelykontekstille huomiomekanismin avulla ja perustelut tiivistämällä kaikki pätevät päättelysäännöt. RocStoriesilla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että menetelmämme ylittää perinteiset mallit merkittävästi.', 'ca': "Reasonar amb coneixement comú és crucial per a entendre la llengua natural. Els mètodes tradicionals per a la comprensió comú de la màquina es centren principalment en un tipus específic de coneixement, ignorant el fet que el raonament comú requereix considerar simultàneament diferents tipus de coneixement comú. En aquest paper, proposem un mètode de raonament multiconeixement, que pot explotar el coneixement heterogeni per a la comprensió comú de la màquina. Concretament, primer minem diferents tipus de coneixement (incloent coneixement narratiu d'eventos, coneixement semàntic de l'entitat i coneixement coherent del sentiment) i les codifiquem com regles de inferència amb costos. Llavors proposem un model de raonament multiconeixement, que selecciona regles de inferència per un context de raonament específic utilitzant mecanisme d'atenció, i raons resumindo totes les regles de inferència válides. Els experiments de RocStories mostren que el nostre mètode supera significativament els models tradicionals.", 'et': 'Mõistmine mõistlike teadmistega on loodusliku keele mõistmiseks kriitilise tähtsusega. Traditsioonilised meetodid lihtsa mõistuse masinast mõistmiseks keskenduvad enamasti ainult ühele konkreetsele teadmisele, jättes tähelepanuta asjaolu, et lihtsa mõistuse arutamine nõuab samaaegselt erinevate lihtsa mõistuse teadmiste arvestamist. Käesolevas töös pakume välja multiteadmistepõhise arutlusmeetodi, mis võib kasutada heterogeenseid teadmisi tavamõistuse masinate mõistmiseks. Konkreetselt kaevandame esmalt erinevaid teadmisi (sealhulgas sündmuste narratiivseid teadmisi, olemi semantilisi teadmisi ja sentimentaalseid sidusaid teadmisi) ja kodeerime need kuludega järeldusreeglitena. Seejärel pakume välja mitmete teadmiste arutlusmudeli, mis valib tähelepanumehhanismi abil järeldusreeglid konkreetse arutluskeskkonna jaoks ja põhjendused, võttes kokku kõik kehtivad järeldusreeglid. RocStories eksperimendid näitavad, et meie meetod ületab traditsioonilisi mudeleid märkimisväärselt.', 'cs': 'Rozumování se znalostmi zdravého rozumu je klíčové pro porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Tradiční metody porozumění strojů zdravého rozumu se většinou zaměřují pouze na jeden specifický druh znalostí a zanedbávají skutečnost, že zdravé rozumové uvažování vyžaduje současné zvažování různých druhů znalostí zdravého rozumu. V tomto článku navrhujeme metodu multiznalostního uvažování, která může využít heterogenní znalosti pro porozumění strojů zdravého rozumu. Konkrétně nejprve vytěžujeme různé druhy znalostí (včetně znalostí vyprávění událostí, sémantických znalostí entity a sentimentu koherentních znalostí) a zakódujeme je jako pravidla inference s náklady. Následně navrhujeme multi-knowledge argumenting model, který vybírá inferenční pravidla pro konkrétní kontext uvažování pomocí mechanismu pozornosti a důvody shrnutím všech platných inferenčních pravidel. Experimenty na RocStories ukazují, že naše metoda výrazně překonává tradiční modely.', 'ha': "Akwai da ilimi na mataimaki na muhimu wa fahimta harshen asimi. Kayya, hanyoyin ta'ura wa makaranti na komasant, yana makini kawai kan wata al'amari na ƙayyadadde, kuma yana ƙyãma da gaskiyar da bakwai ta ƙayyade a sami, kuma ana ƙayyade zane-zance dabam-dabam. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyor masu hankali masu yawa, wadda ke iya amfani da wani ilmi na dabam-dabam ga mashine ta samura. Ina ƙayyade, ko da na farko da ma'abũcin ilmi (ikin fassarar kunnufi na ƙari da sanyi) kuma ke kodi su kamar sharuya masu ƙaranci da kashi. Sa'an nan kuma muna goyya da wata misãlin masu hankali masu yawa, wanda ke zãɓi sharia'a wa muhimmada na ƙayyade, a cikin muhimmada masu husũma masu amfani da mekaninsa masu kiyaye, da saba'in da za'a ƙididdige duk sharciyar kasa. Tajararin da ke kan RocHistories yana nũna cewa metodenmu yana samar da misãlai na'ura.", 'jv': 'Lakok karo kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno dumadhi kanggo kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno. Tradisyonal sistem penting akeh perusahaan ingkang dipunanggunian kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno, ingkang dipunanggunian kuwi tindakan kesempatan akeh apik dhéwé. Nang pember iki, kita supaya biasa layanan karo akeh-layan samlah, kiye iso nguasai akeh nesalahan kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing kompleter. Sak olah, awak dhéwé sing perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno Amarok tambah kita dipoleh sistem multi-ajeng sampek, sing wis dipoleh nduwé hukum sing kelas nggawe barang nggawe layang kelas ngregani soko nggunakake operasi tentang, lan lakusul nggawe nyimpen tur angel sing apik dhéwé Perintara ono soko Rong-Tarian sing paling nggambar kuwi method sing bisa model sing berarti dadi.', 'sk': 'Razumljanje z dobrim znanjem je ključnega pomena za razumevanje naravnega jezika. Tradicionalne metode dobrega smisla strojno razumevanje se večinoma osredotočajo na eno specifično vrsto znanja, pri čemer zanemarjajo dejstvo, da dobrega smisla zahteva hkrati razmišljanje o različnih vrstah dobrega smisla. V prispevku predlagamo metodo razmišljanja z več znanji, ki lahko izkoristi heterogeno znanje za razumevanje strojev. Natančneje, najprej izkopavamo različne vrste znanja (vključno z dogodkovnim pripovednim znanjem, semantičnim znanjem entitete in sentimentalnim koherentnim znanjem) in jih kodiramo kot sklepna pravila s stroški. Nato predlagamo model razmišljanja z več znanji, ki z uporabo mehanizma pozornosti izbere pravila sklepanja za določen kontekst sklepanja in razloge s povzemom vseh veljavnih sklepnih pravil. Eksperimenti na RocStories kažejo, da naša metoda znatno presega tradicionalne modele.', 'he': 'הסיבה עם ידע משותף היא קריטית להבנה טבעית של שפה. Traditional methods for commonsense machine comprehension mostly only focus on one specific kind of knowledge, neglecting the fact that commonsense reasoning requires simultaneously considering different kinds of commonsense knowledge.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת ההיגיון של מידעים רבים, שיכולה לנצל ידע heterogeneous להבינה מכונת משמעותית. במיוחד, אנו קודם מכירים סוגים שונים של ידע (כולל ידע סיפורי אירועים, ידע סמנטי יחידה ויודע תואם רגשות) וקודים אותם כחוקי ההנחה עם עלות. Then we propose a multi-knowledge reasoning model, which selects inference rules for a specific reasoning context using attention mechanism, and reasons by summarizing all valid inference rules.  ניסויים על RocStories מראים שהשיטה שלנו מעלית מודלים מסורתיים באופן משמעותי.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་ཆེད་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ནི་རང་རིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡོད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གནད་དོན་མཁན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ངོ་མ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་ལས་གནད་འདོན་དགོས་མཚམས་འཇོག འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྣ་མང་གསལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱིན་ཡུལ་དང་པོ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རང་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཤེས་རིག་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་སྣ་མང་ཆོས་ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ཁྲོད་ཅིག་གདམ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འཛིན RocStories ཐོག་གི་ལག་ལེན་འཚོལ་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་རྒྱུན་སྲོལ་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བ་མཚུངས་གལ་ཅ'}
{'en': 'What is the Essence of a Claim? Cross-Domain Claim Identification', 'ar': 'ما هو جوهر المطالبة؟ تحديد المطالبة عبر النطاقات', 'fr': "Quelle est l'essence d'une réclamation\xa0? Identification des réclamations interdomaines", 'es': '¿Cuál es la esencia de una reclamación? Identificación de reclamos entre dominios', 'pt': 'Qual é a essência de uma reivindicação? Identificação de reivindicação entre domínios', 'ja': 'クレームの本質とは何ですか？クロスドメインクレームの識別', 'ru': 'В чем суть претензии?', 'ga': 'Cad é Bunús Éilimh? Aitheantas Éilimh Trasfhearainn', 'hi': 'एक दावे का सार क्या है? क्रॉस-डोमेन दावा पहचान', 'zh': '索赔之质何? 跨域声明标识', 'ka': 'კაკგჲ ვ ჟყჟვნუთწრა ნა კლაიმ? Name', 'el': 'Ποια είναι η ουσία ενός ισχυρισμού; Αναγνώριση διεκδικήσεων μεταξύ τομέων', 'hu': 'Mi az állítás lényege? Tartományközi igényazonosító', 'it': "Qual è l'essenza di una rivendicazione? Identificazione dei crediti cross-domain", 'kk': 'Қатынаудың сезімі не? Доменнің көпшілігін идентификациясы', 'ml': 'ആ ഭയങ്കര സംഭവം എന്താണ്? ക്രോസ്- ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ക്ലായിം തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'lt': 'Kokia yra reikalavimo esmė? Cross-Domain Claim Identification', 'mt': 'X’inhi l-Essenza ta’ Talba? Identifikazzjoni tat-Talbiet Cross-Domain', 'mk': 'Која е суштината на тврдењето? Идентификација на крстодомен барање', 'ms': 'What is the Essence of a Claim?  Pengenalan Claim Cross-Domain', 'no': 'Kva er Essensen av eit Claim? Identifikasjon for krysdomene', 'pl': 'Jaka jest istota roszczenia? Identyfikacja roszczeń międzynarodowych', 'mn': 'Үүний суурь нь юу вэ? Дөрвөлжингийн нэр тодорхойлолт', 'ro': 'Care este esenţa unei revendicări? Identificarea creanțelor între domenii', 'sr': 'Šta je Essence Claimea? Identifikacija križa domena', 'so': 'Qaarica maxay tahay. Aqoonsiga fasaxa ee iskuulka', 'sv': 'Vad är essensen av ett anspråk? Identifiering av domänöverskridande anspråk', 'ta': 'திடுக்கிடச் செய்யும் (நிகழ்ச்சி) என்ன? கிராஸ்- டோமைன் வகுப்பு அடையாளம்', 'si': 'මොකක්ද ක්ලේම් එකේ විශ්වාස? ක්\u200dරොස්- ඩොමේන් ක්\u200dලේම් පරීක්ෂණය', 'ur': 'اور کیا ہوگیا ہے قیامت کا، کرس- ڈومین کلام شناسایت', 'uz': 'Қориъату нима? Name', 'vi': 'Bài luận của một lời thú tội là gì? Nhận diện chéo miền', 'bg': 'Каква е същността на претенцията? Идентификация на претенции за междудомейни', 'nl': 'Wat is de essentie van een claim? Domeinnoverschrijdende claimidentificatie', 'hr': 'Što je Essence Claimana? Identifikacija križa domena', 'da': 'Hvad er essensen af et krav? Identifikation af krav på tværs af domæner', 'de': 'Was ist das Wesen eines Anspruchs? Domänenübergreifende Schadenerkennung', 'fa': 'Ъ†Щ‡ Ъ†ЫЊШІ Ш§ШіШҒ ШұЫЊЩ†ШҮЩ‡вЂЊШ§ЫЊШџ ШөЩ†Ш§ШіШ§ЫЊЫЊ Ъ©Щ„Щ…Щ‡ ШҮШ§Щ…Щ†ЫЊ', 'ko': '클레임의 본질은 무엇입니까?도메인 간 클레임 식별', 'id': 'Apa yang penting dari sebuah klaim? Identifikasi Claim Cross-Domain', 'sw': 'Nini Inayo gonga? Utambulisho wa Tamko la Msalaba', 'tr': 'Bir kilisenin esası nedir? Alan', 'af': "Wat is die Essence van 'n Claim? Kruisdomein Klaam Identifikasie", 'sq': 'Cili është thelbi i një pretendimi? Identifikimi i kërkesës ndërdomenale', 'am': 'ምን አስደናቂ ቆርቋሪ ናት ! ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Ի՞նչ է պնդման էությունը: Համաբնագավառ հայտարարման հայտարարությունը', 'bn': 'কি একটি মহাসংকট? ক্রস- ডোমেইন ক্লায়েম পরিচয়', 'az': 'S칬z칲n n톛dir? X톛rc Domain Claim Kimlik', 'bs': 'Koja je osnova kazne? Identifikacija zahtjeva preko domena', 'ca': "Quina és l'essència d'una reclamació? Cross-Domain Claim Identification", 'cs': 'Co je podstatou nároku? Identifikace nároku mezi doménami', 'et': 'Mis on nõude olemus? Domeenidevahelise nõude identifitseerimine', 'fi': 'Mikä on vaateen ydin? Alueiden välisen väitteen tunniste', 'ha': "Mẽnẽ ne mai ƙwanƙwasa? Shirin Jarrabi'a na KCharselect unicode block name", 'jv': 'Apa sing kok pasar kelas kuwi klaim ? structural navigation', 'sk': 'Kaj je bistvo zahtevka? Identifikacija zahtevkov med domenami', 'he': 'מה העיקר של טענה? זיהוי תביעה בין תחום', 'bo': 'སྦུ་གཏུག་ཅི་རེད་ཟེར་ན། Cross-Domain Claim Identification'}
{'en': 'Argument mining has become a popular research area in NLP. It typically includes the identification of argumentative components, e.g. claims, as the central component of an argument. We perform a qualitative analysis across six different datasets and show that these appear to conceptualize claims quite differently. To learn about the consequences of such different conceptualizations of claim for practical applications, we carried out extensive experiments using state-of-the-art feature-rich and deep learning systems, to identify claims in a cross-domain fashion. While the divergent conceptualization of claims in different datasets is indeed harmful to cross-domain classification, we show that there are shared properties on the lexical level as well as system configurations that can help to overcome these gaps.', 'ar': 'أصبح تعدين الحجج مجال بحث مشهور في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. وعادة ما يتضمن تحديد المكونات الجدلية ، على سبيل المثال الادعاءات ، كعنصر مركزي في الحجة. نجري تحليلًا نوعيًا عبر ست مجموعات بيانات مختلفة ونبين أن هذه تبدو وكأنها تصور المطالبات بشكل مختلف تمامًا. للتعرف على عواقب مثل هذه المفاهيم المختلفة للمطالبة بالتطبيقات العملية ، أجرينا تجارب مكثفة باستخدام أحدث أنظمة التعلم الغنية بالميزات والعميقة ، لتحديد المطالبات بطريقة عبر المجالات. في حين أن التصور المتباين للمطالبات في مجموعات البيانات المختلفة ضار حقًا للتصنيف عبر المجالات ، فإننا نظهر أن هناك خصائص مشتركة على المستوى المعجمي بالإضافة إلى تكوينات النظام التي يمكن أن تساعد في التغلب على هذه الفجوات.', 'pt': 'A mineração de argumentos tornou-se uma área de pesquisa popular em PNL. Normalmente inclui a identificação de componentes argumentativos, por exemplo. reivindicações, como o componente central de um argumento. Realizamos uma análise qualitativa em seis conjuntos de dados diferentes e mostramos que eles parecem conceituar reivindicações de maneira bastante diferente. Para aprender sobre as consequências de tais diferentes conceituações de reivindicação para aplicações práticas, realizamos experimentos extensivos usando sistemas de aprendizado profundo e ricos em recursos de última geração, para identificar reivindicações de forma cruzada. Embora a conceituação divergente de declarações em diferentes conjuntos de dados seja realmente prejudicial à classificação entre domínios, mostramos que existem propriedades compartilhadas no nível lexical, bem como configurações de sistema que podem ajudar a superar essas lacunas.', 'fr': "L'exploration d'arguments est devenue un domaine de recherche populaire en PNL. Elle inclut généralement l'identification de composants argumentatifs, par exemple des revendications, en tant que composant central d'un argument. Nous effectuons une analyse qualitative de six ensembles de données différents et montrons que ceux-ci semblent conceptualiser les allégations de manière très différente. Pour en savoir plus sur les conséquences de ces différentes conceptualisations de réclamation pour des applications pratiques, nous avons mené des expériences approfondies à l'aide de systèmes d'apprentissage profond et riches en fonctionnalités de pointe, afin d'identifier les réclamations d'une manière interdomaine. Bien que la conceptualisation divergente des revendications dans différents ensembles de données soit effectivement préjudiciable à la classification entre domaines, nous montrons qu'il existe des propriétés partagées au niveau lexical ainsi que des configurations système qui peuvent aider à surmonter ces lacunes.", 'ja': '論点採掘は、NLPで人気のある研究領域となっています。典型的には、引数の中心的なコンポーネントとしての引数コンポーネント、例えば、クレームの識別を含む。私たちは、6つの異なるデータセットにわたって定性的な分析を行い、これらが主張の概念化をかなり異なっているように見えることを示します。このような実用的な用途のための特許請求の範囲の異なる概念化の結果を学ぶために、私たちは最先端の機能豊富で深い学習システムを使用して、クロスドメイン方式で特許請求の範囲を識別する広範な実験を実施しました。さまざまなデータセットにおけるクレームの多様な概念化は、クロスドメイン分類にとって有害ですが、私たちは、これらのギャップを克服するのに役立つシステム構成だけでなく、語彙レベルでの共有特性があることを示しています。', 'es': 'La minería de argumentos se ha convertido en un área de investigación popular en la PNL. Por lo general, incluye la identificación de componentes argumentativos, por ejemplo, afirmaciones, como el componente central de un argumento. Realizamos un análisis cualitativo en seis conjuntos de datos diferentes y demostramos que estos parecen conceptualizar las afirmaciones de manera muy diferente. Para aprender sobre las consecuencias de conceptualizaciones tan diferentes de reclamos para aplicaciones prácticas, llevamos a cabo extensos experimentos utilizando sistemas de aprendizaje profundo y ricos en funciones de última generación, para identificar reclamos de manera multidominio. Si bien la conceptualización divergente de las afirmaciones en diferentes conjuntos de datos es realmente perjudicial para la clasificación entre dominios, mostramos que hay propiedades compartidas a nivel léxico, así como configuraciones de sistemas que pueden ayudar a superar estas brechas.', 'ru': 'Аргументация майнинга стала популярной областью исследований в NLP. Как правило, он включает определение аргументативных компонентов, например, претензий, в качестве центрального компонента аргумента. Мы проводим качественный анализ шести различных наборов данных и показываем, что они, по-видимому, концептуализируют формулы изобретения совершенно по-разному. Чтобы узнать о последствиях таких различных концептуализаций притязаний для практических применений, мы провели обширные эксперименты с использованием передовых, богатых функциями и глубоких систем обучения, для выявления притязаний в междоменном режиме. Хотя расходящаяся концептуализация утверждений в различных наборах данных действительно вредна для междоменной классификации, мы показываем, что есть общие свойства на лексическом уровне, а также системные конфигурации, которые могут помочь преодолеть эти пробелы.', 'ga': 'Tá tóir ar mhianadóireacht argóinte ina réimse taighde coitianta in NLP. Cuimsíonn sé sainaithint comhpháirteanna argóinteacha, e.g. éilimh, mar chomhpháirt lárnach d’argóint. Déanaimid anailís cháilíochtúil thar sé thacar sonraí éagsúla agus taispeánann muid go ndealraíonn sé go dtugann siad seo coincheapú ar éilimh ar bhealach éagsúil. Chun foghlaim faoi na hiarmhairtí a bhaineann le coincheapú éagsúil éilimh ar fheidhmchláir phraiticiúla, rinneamar turgnaimh fhairsing ag baint úsáide as córais den scoth a bhí saibhir i ngnéithe agus foghlama domhain, chun éilimh a aithint ar bhealach tras-fearainn. Cé go bhfuil coincheapú éagsúil éileamh i dtacair shonraí éagsúla díobhálach go deimhin d’aicmiú tras-fhearainn, léirímid go bhfuil airíonna roinnte ar an leibhéal foclóireachta chomh maith le cumraíochtaí córais ar féidir leo cabhrú leis na bearnaí sin a shárú.', 'zh': '参数掘已为NLP中受欢迎治域。 其通识论组件,如权利所求,以为论证之组件。 六集定性分析,似以全概念化索赔。 所以知异概念化之声者,用至先进之功能丰富,以博实验,以跨领而识声明。 虽异数集声概念化诚害跨域类,明于词汇级有共享之系统配置,可以助克之也。', 'hi': 'तर्क खनन एनएलपी में एक लोकप्रिय अनुसंधान क्षेत्र बन गया है। इसमें आमतौर पर तर्कसंगत घटकों की पहचान शामिल होती है, उदाहरण के लिए, एक तर्क के केंद्रीय घटक के रूप में दावे। हम छह अलग-अलग डेटासेट में एक गुणात्मक विश्लेषण करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि ये दावों को काफी अलग तरीके से अवधारणा करने के लिए प्रकट होते हैं। व्यावहारिक अनुप्रयोगों के लिए दावे की ऐसी विभिन्न अवधारणाओं के परिणामों के बारे में जानने के लिए, हमने क्रॉस-डोमेन फैशन में दावों की पहचान करने के लिए अत्याधुनिक फीचर-समृद्ध और गहरी सीखने की प्रणालियों का उपयोग करके व्यापक प्रयोग किए। जबकि विभिन्न डेटासेट में दावों की अलग-अलग अवधारणा वास्तव में क्रॉस-डोमेन वर्गीकरण के लिए हानिकारक है, हम दिखाते हैं कि लेक्सिकल स्तर के साथ-साथ सिस्टम कॉन्फ़िगरेशन पर साझा गुण हैं जो इन अंतरालों को दूर करने में मदद कर सकते हैं।', 'ka': 'აპდუმენტების მინდომირება NLP-ში პოლიპური სწავლა გახდა. რომელსაც არგუმენტიური კომპონენტების ინდიდინტიფიკაცია, მაგალითად ახალგაზრდება, როგორც არგუმენტის ცენტრალური კომპონენტები. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კვალიტატიური ანალიზი შვიდი განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ ეს კონფიგურაცია განსხვავ თუ გავისწავლოთ რაც განსხვავებული კონცეტუალიზაციების შედეგები პრაქტიკური პროგრამებისთვის, ჩვენ გავაკეთეთ განსაკუთრებული ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენებული სურათის განსაკუთრებული და დიდ სურათის სის თუმცა განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში ნამდვილად საშუალებელია კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ლექსიკალური დონეზე და', 'hu': 'Az érvbányászat népszerű kutatási területté vált az NLP-ben. Jellemzően magában foglalja az érvelő összetevők, például az állítások azonosítását, mint egy érv központi összetevőjét. Minőségi elemzést végzünk hat különböző adatkészleten, és megmutatjuk, hogy ezek az állítások teljesen másképp fogalmazzák meg. Annak érdekében, hogy megismerjük az igénylés gyakorlati alkalmazásokra vonatkozó ilyen különböző koncepcióinak következményeit, kiterjedt kísérleteket végeztünk a legkorszerűbb funkciókban gazdag és mélytanulási rendszerek segítségével, hogy azonosítsuk az igényléseket egy több területen. Bár a különböző adatkészletek állításainak eltérő koncepcionálása valóban káros a tartományok közötti osztályozásra, megmutatjuk, hogy vannak olyan megosztott tulajdonságok a lexikai szinten, valamint rendszerkonfigurációk, amelyek segíthetnek leküzdeni ezeket a hiányosságokat.', 'el': 'Η εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων έχει γίνει δημοφιλής ερευνητική περιοχή στο ΝΛΠ. Συνήθως περιλαμβάνει τον προσδιορισμό επιχειρηματολογικών στοιχείων, π.χ. αξιώσεων, ως κεντρικό στοιχείο ενός επιχειρήματος. Πραγματοποιούμε μια ποιοτική ανάλυση σε έξι διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων και αποδεικνύουμε ότι αυτά φαίνεται να εννοούν τους ισχυρισμούς εντελώς διαφορετικά. Για να μάθουμε για τις συνέπειες αυτών των διαφορετικών εννοιολογήσεων της αξίωσης για πρακτικές εφαρμογές, πραγματοποιήσαμε εκτεταμένα πειράματα χρησιμοποιώντας υπερσύγχρονα συστήματα πλούσια σε χαρακτηριστικά και βαθιά μάθηση, για να εντοπίσουμε αξιώσεις με τρόπο διεπιστημονικό. Ενώ η αποκλίνουσα αντίληψη των αξιών σε διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων είναι πράγματι επιβλαβής για την ταξινόμηση μεταξύ τομέων, αποδεικνύουμε ότι υπάρχουν κοινές ιδιότητες σε λεξικό επίπεδο καθώς και διαμορφώσεις συστημάτων που μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στην υπέρβαση αυτών των κενών.', 'it': "L'estrazione di argomenti è diventata un'area di ricerca popolare nel PNL. In genere include l'identificazione di componenti argomentativi, ad esempio affermazioni, come componente centrale di un argomento. Eseguiamo un'analisi qualitativa su sei diversi set di dati e mostriamo che questi sembrano concettualizzare le affermazioni in modo molto diverso. Per conoscere le conseguenze di tali diverse concettualizzazioni di rivendicazione per applicazioni pratiche, abbiamo condotto estesi esperimenti utilizzando sistemi di apprendimento profondo e ricco di funzionalità all'avanguardia, per identificare le rivendicazioni in modo cross-domain. Mentre la concettualizzazione divergente delle affermazioni in diversi set di dati è effettivamente dannosa per la classificazione cross-domain, mostriamo che ci sono proprietà condivise a livello lessicale così come configurazioni di sistema che possono aiutare a superare queste lacune.", 'mk': 'Работата на аргументи стана популарна истражувачка област во НЛП. Обично вклучува идентификација на аргументативните компоненти, на пример тврдењата, како централен компонент на аргументот. Правиме квалитетна анализа низ шест различни податоци и покажуваме дека овие се чини дека ги концептуализираат тврдењата сосема различно. За да дознаеме за последиците од ваквите различни концептуализации на тврдењата за практични апликации, спроведовме експерименти користејќи најсовремени системи на богато и длабоко учење, за идентификување на тврдењата на крстодоменичен начин. И покрај тоа што дивергентната концептуализација на тврдењата во различни податоци е навистина штетна за класификацијата преку домени, покажуваме дека постојат заеднички сопствености на лексичко ниво, како и системски конфигурации кои можат да помогнат во надминувањето на овие празнини.', 'kk': 'Аргументтердің балауы NLP- де мәліметті зерттеу аумағы болды. Ол әдетте аргументтік компоненттердің негізгі компонентінің идентификациясын, мысалы, аргументтің орталық компоненті ретінде көрсетеді. Алты түрлі деректер жиындарында квалификациялық анализ жасап, олар әртүрлі жағдайларды бақылау сияқты көрсетеді. Қолданбалар үшін бұл әртүрлі тәртіптердің нәтижелерін оқыту үшін біз көпшіліктердің күйі бойынша және түсінікті оқыту жүйелерін қолдану үшін көпшілікті тәжірибелерді жасадық. Басқа деректер қорларындағы жағдайлардың диверсиялық концептуализациясы бір-бірінші домендық классификациясына қауіпсіздік болса да, біз лексикалық деңгейінде және жүйелік баптауларының бөлек қасиеттері бар', 'ms': 'Perlombongan argumen telah menjadi kawasan penyelidikan terkenal di NLP. Ia biasanya termasuk pengenalan komponen argumentatif, cth. klaim, sebagai komponen pusat argumen. Kami melakukan analisis kualitatif melalui enam set data yang berbeza dan menunjukkan bahawa ini kelihatan untuk konseptualisasi klaim yang agak berbeza. Untuk belajar mengenai konsekuensi konsekuensi-konsekuensi yang berbeza untuk aplikasi praktik, kami melakukan eksperimen luas menggunakan sistem pembelajaran yang kaya dengan ciri-ciri dan dalam, untuk mengenalpasti klaim dengan cara melintasi domain. Sementara konseptualisasi berbeza klaim dalam set data yang berbeza memang berbahaya untuk klasifikasi cross-domain, kita menunjukkan bahawa terdapat ciri-ciri berkongsi pada aras leksikal serta konfigurasi sistem yang boleh membantu untuk mengatasi kekurangan ini.', 'lt': 'Argument ų kasyba tapo populiaria NLP mokslinių tyrimų sritimi. Paprastai jame nurodomi argumentaciniai komponentai, pvz., tvirtinimai, kaip pagrindinis argumento komponentas. Atliekame kokybinę šešių skirtingų duomenų rinkinių analizę ir rodome, kad šie teiginiai yra visiškai skirtingi. To learn about the consequences of such different conceptualizations of claim for practical applications, we carried out extensive experiments using state-of-the-art feature-rich and deep learning systems, to identify claims in a cross-domain fashion.  Nors skirtingas skirtingų duomenų rinkinių teiginių koncepcionalizavimas iš tiesų kenkia įvairių sričių klasifikacijai, mes parodome, kad egzistuoja bendros savybės lexiniu lygiu ir sistemos konfigūracijos, kurios gali padėti pašalinti šias spragas.', 'mt': 'It-tħaffir tal-argumenti sar żona ta’ riċerka popolari fil-NLP. Tipikament tinkludi l-identifikazzjoni ta’ komponenti argumentattivi, pereżempju pretensjonijiet, bħala l-komponent ċentrali ta’ argument. Għandna nagħmlu analiżi kwalitattiva f’sitt settijiet differenti ta’ dejta u nuru li dawn jidhru li jikkonċettwalizzaw it-talbiet b’mod pjuttost differenti. Biex nitgħallmu dwar il-konsegwenzi ta’ kunċettwalizzazzjonijiet differenti bħal dawn ta’ talbiet għal applikazzjonijiet prattiċi, għamilna esperimenti estensivi bl-użu ta’ sistemi ta’ tagħlim avvanzat u għoli fil-karatteristiċi, biex nidentifikaw talbiet b’mod transsettorjali. Filwaqt li l-kunċettwalizzazzjoni diverġenti tal-pretensjonijiet f’settijiet ta’ dejta differenti hija tabilħaqq ta’ ħsara għall-klassifikazzjoni bejn id-dominji, nuru li hemm proprjetajiet kondiviżi fil-livell lexiku kif ukoll konfigurazzjonijiet tas-sistema li jistgħu jgħinu biex jingħelbu dawn in-nuqqasijiet.', 'mn': 'Аргументийн хөрөнгө оруулалт NLP-д алдартай судалгааны талбай болсон. Энэ нь ерөнхийдөө аргументын төвшин компонентүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Бид зургаан өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжилгээ хийж, эдгээр санаанууд өөр өөр хэлбэртэй харагдаж байна. Үүний үр дүнг сурахын тулд практикийн хэрэглээний талаар олон төрлийн ойлголтын үр дүнг бид урлагийн хувьд баян, гүн гүнзгий суралцах системүүдийг ашиглан олон төрлийн арга загварын талаар туршилт хийсэн. Хэдийгээр өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд зөрчилдөөн ойлголтын тухай олон хэлбэрийн хувьд хохиромжтой байдаг ч, бид хэлбэрийн түвшинд хуваалцах чадварууд болон системийн загваруудын тулд тусалж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ് മിനിങ്ങ് NLP-ല്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരിശോധന സ്ഥലം ആയിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് സാധാരണയായി വാദിക്കുന്ന ഘടകങ്ങളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതാണ്, ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി വാദിക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റിന് ആറു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ക്വാലിറ്റിവില അന്വേഷണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഇത് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ആശയങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചു. ക്രിസ്റ്റോ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റുകളുടെ ആശയങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല', 'pl': 'Wydobycie argumentów stało się popularnym obszarem badawczym w NLP. Zazwyczaj obejmuje identyfikację składników argumentatywnych, np. roszczeń, jako centralnego składnika argumentu. Przeprowadzamy analizę jakościową w sześciu różnych zbiorach danych i pokazujemy, że wydają się one konceptualizować roszczenia zupełnie inaczej. Aby poznać konsekwencje tak różnych konceptualizacji roszczeń dla praktycznych zastosowań, przeprowadziliśmy szerokie eksperymenty z wykorzystaniem najnowocześniejszych, bogatych w funkcje i systemów głębokiego uczenia, w celu identyfikacji roszczeń w sposób międzynarodowy. Podczas gdy rozbieżna koncepcja roszczeń w różnych zbiorach danych jest rzeczywiście szkodliwa dla klasyfikacji między domenami, pokazujemy, że istnieją wspólne właściwości na poziomie leksykalicznym, a także konfiguracje systemowe, które mogą pomóc w przezwyciężeniu tych luk.', 'no': 'Argument mining er blitt eit populært forskningsområde i NLP. Det inneheld vanlegvis identifisering av argumentativ komponentar, f.eks. tvar, som sentralkomponenten av eit argument. Vi utfører ein kvalitativ analyse over seks ulike datasett og viser at desse ser ut til å konseptualisera etterspørselene ganske ulike. For å lære om konsekvensane av slike forskjellige konseptualiseringar av etterspørsel for praktiske program, har vi utført ekstra eksperimenter ved hjelp av tilstanden av kunsten-funksjonsryg og dypt læringssystemet for å identifisera etterspørseler i eit krysdomenemodus. Mens det forskjellige konseptualiseringa av tiltak i ulike datasett er verkeleg skadelig for å klassifisera krysdomenet, viser vi at det finst delte eigenskapar på leksisk nivå og systemoppsett som kan hjelpa å overføra desse avstandane.', 'ro': 'Minerirea de argumente a devenit o zonă de cercetare populară în PNL. Aceasta include, de obicei, identificarea componentelor argumentative, de exemplu afirmațiile, ca componentă centrală a unui argument. Efectuăm o analiză calitativă pe șase seturi de date diferite și arătăm că acestea par să conceptualizeze afirmațiile destul de diferit. Pentru a afla despre consecințele unor astfel de conceptualizări diferite ale revendicărilor pentru aplicații practice, am efectuat experimente extinse folosind sisteme de învățare avansată și de învățare profundă, pentru a identifica revendicările într-un mod cross-domeniu. Deși conceptualizarea divergentă a afirmațiilor din diferite seturi de date este într-adevăr dăunătoare clasificării între domenii, arătăm că există proprietăți comune la nivel lexical, precum și configurații de sistem care pot ajuta la depășirea acestor lacune.', 'sr': 'Rušenje argumenta postalo je popularno istraživanje područje u NLP-u. Obično uključuje identifikaciju argumentativnih komponenta, npr. tvrdnja, kao centralni komponent argumentacije. Izvodimo kvalitativnu analizu na šest različitih podataka i pokazujemo da se to čini da konceptualiziraju tvrdnje sasvim drugačije. Da bismo naučili o posledicama takvih različitih konceptualizacija zahteva za praktične aplikacije, proveli smo široke eksperimente koristeći sisteme bogate i duboke učenja države umjetnosti, da bismo identifikovali zahteve na prekršenom domenu. Iako je različita konceptualizacija tvrdnji u različitim podacima stvarno štetna klasifikaciji preko domena, pokazujemo da postoje zajedničke vlasništvo na leksičkoj nivou, kao i sistemske konfiguracije koje mogu pomoći da prevladamo te praznine.', 'so': 'Guriga kirada ah waxay noqotay qayb waxbarasho oo popular ah ee NLP. Sida caadiga ah waxaa ku qoran aqoonsashada qeybaha dooda, tusaale ahaan waxay codsataa qeybta dhexe e e muran. Ana sameynaa baaritaan qiyaas ah lix kooban oo macluumaad kala duduwan, waxaynu muujinaynaa in ay u muuqato inay u fekeraan dacwado si kala duwan. Si aannu u barno matokejyada ku saabsan fikrada kala duwan ee codsiga caadiga ah, waxaan sameynay imtixaamo faro badan oo ku isticmaalaya nidaamka waxbarashada aad u hodansanaysa iyo waxbarashada aad u dheer, si aan ugu caddeyno codsiga gudaha. Inta lagu jiro fikrada kala duwan ee ku saabsan macluumaadka kala duwan ayaa si dhab ah u kharriban kara fasalka gudaha, waxaynu muujinnaa in heerka leksikada iyo qaabilaada nidaamka oo caawinaya in ay ka adkayso gafafkan.', 'sv': 'Argumentbrytning har blivit ett populärt forskningsområde inom NLP. Det innefattar vanligtvis identifiering av argumenterande komponenter, t.ex. påståenden, som den centrala komponenten i ett argument. Vi utför en kvalitativ analys över sex olika datauppsättningar och visar att dessa verkar konceptualisera påståenden helt annorlunda. För att lära oss om konsekvenserna av sådana olika konceptualiseringar av anspråk för praktiska tillämpningar genomförde vi omfattande experiment med hjälp av state-of-the-art funktionsrika och djupinlärningssystem, för att identifiera anspråk på ett domänöverskridande sätt. Även om den differentierade konceptualiseringen av påståenden i olika datauppsättningar verkligen är skadlig för klassificering över domäner, visar vi att det finns delade egenskaper på lexikal nivå samt systemkonfigurationer som kan hjälpa till att övervinna dessa luckor.', 'ta': 'அருமதி குழந்தை NLP-ல் ஒரு பிரபலமான ஆராய்ச்சி பகுதியாக ஆகிவிட்டது. இது வழக்கமாக தர்க்க பொருளின் அடையாளம் சேர்க்கிறது, உ. ம். கூறுகிறது, ஒரு வார்த்தையின் மைய பகுதியாக. ஆறு வித்தியாசமான தரவுத்தளங்களில் ஒரு குறிப்பான ஆய்வு செய்து இந்த கூறுகளை மிகவும் வேறு வித்தியாசமாக கூறு இத்தகைய வேறு வித்தியாசமான கருத்துக்களின் முடிவு வேறு தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள வித்தியாசமான கருத்துப்பொருள் குறைந்து வகைப்படுத்தல் உண்மையில் குறைக்கும், நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் லெக்சிக் நிலையில்', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය NLP වල ලෝකයික පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරදේශයක් වෙලා තියෙනවා. ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, උදාහරණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන අපි වෙනස් දත්ත සැට් හතරක් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම මේවා පෙන්වන්නේ වෙනස් වෙනස් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා වෙනස් විදියට පරීක්ෂණයක් ගැන ඉගෙන ගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පද වගේම වෙනස් දත්ත සැට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් තියෙනවා වගේම, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ලෙක්සිකාල් ස්ථානයේ සහ පද්ධති සැකසුම් වල', 'ur': 'آرمونٹ مینڈنگ NLP میں ایک محبوب تحقیق منطقه ہو گیا ہے۔ اس میں معمولاً دلیل رغتوں کی شناسایی شامل ہوتی ہے، جیسے ادعا کرتے ہیں، ایک دلیل کی مرکزی رغتوں کے طور پر۔ ہم چھ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ میں ایک کیلوٹیٹی تحلیل کر رہے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ادعات کو بہت مختلف طریقے سے دکھاتے ہیں۔ اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کی تعلیم کے نتائج جاننے کے لئے ہم نے طرح طرح کی آزمائش کرلی تھی کہ اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کی تعلیم کریں۔ اگرچہ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ میں معاوضہ کی مختلف نظریات کی مختلف تعبیر کرسی ڈومین کلاسپیٹ کے لئے ضرر ہے، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ لکسیکل سطح میں اور سیستم سازواریزوں میں شریک خصوصی ہیں جو ان فاصلوں کو غالب کرنے کے لئے مدد کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Ushbu odatda argumentlar komponentini aniqlash mumkin, масалан argumentning markaziy komponenti sifatida. Biz lixda boshqa maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kvlitativ analytikni bajaramiz va ularning davlatlarini juda boshqacha o'ylab ko'rsatuvchimiz. Bu turli tashkilotlarning natijalari haqida o'rganish uchun, biz bir necha domen usulida davomida o'rganish jarayonlarini o'rganish uchun juda ko'p imtiyozni bajardik. Ko'pchilik maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi cheksiz g'oyalarni boshqa shaklga oshirish juda narsa, biz leksikal darajada va tizimning moslamalarini ushbu gaplarni almashtirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tranh luận về khai mỏ đã trở thành khu nghiên cứu nổi tiếng ở Njala. Đặc biệt nó bao g ồm việc xác định các thành phần luận tố, ví dụ như các yêu cầu, là yếu tố chủ yếu của một cuộc tranh luận. Chúng tôi thực hiện một phân tích về chất lượng trong sáu bộ dữ liệu khác nhau và cho thấy chúng có vẻ hiểu các yêu cầu khác nhau. Để tìm hiểu về hậu quả của những khái niệm khác nhau về yêu cầu cho các ứng dụng thực tế, chúng tôi đã thực hiện các thí nghiệm đầy đủ sử dụng đặc trưng và sâu sắc nghệ thuật, để xác định các yêu cầu theo một cách phổ biến. Trong khi sự phân biệt khái niệm các yêu cầu trong các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau thực sự có hại cho việc phân loại chéo miền, chúng tôi cho thấy có các thuộc tính chia sẻ trên cấp ngôn ngữ, cũng như cấu hình hệ thống có thể giúp giải quyết những khoảng trống này.', 'bg': 'Аргументите се превърнаха в популярна изследователска област в НЛП. Той обикновено включва идентифицирането на аргументативни компоненти, например твърдения, като централен компонент на даден аргумент. Извършваме качествен анализ на шест различни набора от данни и показваме, че те очевидно концептуализират твърденията съвсем различно. За да научим за последиците от такива различни концептуализации на претенции за практически приложения, проведохме обширни експерименти, използвайки най-съвременни системи за богато на функции и дълбоко обучение, за да идентифицираме претенции по междудомейнен начин. Докато различаващата се концептуализация на претенции в различни набори от данни действително е вредна за междудомейнната класификация, ние показваме, че има споделени свойства на лексикално ниво, както и системни конфигурации, които могат да помогнат за преодоляване на тези пропуски.', 'da': 'Argumentminedrift er blevet et populært forskningsområde i NLP. Det omfatter typisk identifikation af argumenterende komponenter, f.eks. påstande, som den centrale komponent i et argument. Vi udfører en kvalitativ analyse på tværs af seks forskellige datasæt og viser, at disse ser ud til at konceptualisere påstande helt anderledes. For at lære om konsekvenserne af sådanne forskellige konceptualiseringer af krav til praktiske anvendelser gennemførte vi omfattende eksperimenter ved hjælp af state-of-the-art funktionsrige og dybtgående læringssystemer, for at identificere krav på en tværs af domæner måde. Mens den divergerende konceptualisering af krav i forskellige datasæt faktisk er skadelig for klassificering på tværs af domæner, viser vi, at der er delte egenskaber på det leksikske niveau såvel som systemkonfigurationer, der kan hjælpe med at overvinde disse huller.', 'nl': 'Argument mining is uitgegroeid tot een populair onderzoeksgebied in NLP. Het omvat meestal de identificatie van argumentatieve componenten, bijvoorbeeld claims, als centrale component van een argument. We voeren een kwalitatieve analyse uit over zes verschillende datasets en laten zien dat deze claims heel anders lijken te conceptualiseren. Om te leren over de gevolgen van dergelijke verschillende conceptualisaties van claims voor praktische toepassingen, hebben we uitgebreide experimenten uitgevoerd met state-of-the-art feature-rich en deep learning systemen, om claims op een cross-domain manier te identificeren. Hoewel de divergente conceptualisering van claims in verschillende datasets inderdaad schadelijk is voor cross-domein classificatie, laten we zien dat er gedeelde eigenschappen zijn op lexicaal niveau evenals systeemconfiguraties die kunnen helpen om deze hiaten te overwinnen.', 'de': 'Argument Mining hat sich zu einem beliebten Forschungsgebiet in NLP entwickelt. Sie umfasst typischerweise die Identifizierung argumentativer Komponenten, z.B. Ansprüche, als zentrale Komponente eines Arguments. Wir führen eine qualitative Analyse über sechs verschiedene Datensätze durch und zeigen, dass diese Ansprüche ganz unterschiedlich konzeptualisieren. Um die Konsequenzen solcher unterschiedlichen Anspruchskonzepte für die praktische Anwendung zu erfahren, haben wir umfangreiche Experimente mit modernsten feature-reichen und Deep Learning Systemen durchgeführt, um Ansprüche domänenübergreifend zu identifizieren. Während die divergente Konzeptualisierung von Ansprüchen in verschiedenen Datensätzen tatsächlich schädlich für die domänenübergreifende Klassifizierung ist, zeigen wir, dass es gemeinsame Eigenschaften auf lexikalischer Ebene sowie Systemkonfigurationen gibt, die helfen können, diese Lücken zu überwinden.', 'id': 'Pertemuan argumen telah menjadi daerah penelitian populer di NLP. Biasanya termasuk identifikasi komponen argumentatif, misalnya klaim, sebagai komponen pusat dari argumen. Kami melakukan analisis kualitatif melalui enam set data yang berbeda dan menunjukkan bahwa ini tampaknya konseptualisasi klaim cukup berbeda. Untuk mempelajari konsekuensi konsekuensi dari konsekuensi-konsekuensi berbeda seperti klaim untuk aplikasi praktis, kami melakukan eksperimen ekstensif menggunakan sistem belajar yang kaya dengan karakteristik terbaik dan dalam, untuk mengidentifikasi klaim dengan cara melintasi daerah. Sementara konseptualisasi yang berbeda dari klaim dalam set data yang berbeda benar-benar berbahaya untuk klasifikasi cross-domain, kami menunjukkan bahwa ada properti berbagi pada tingkat leksik dan konfigurasi sistem yang dapat membantu untuk mengatasi celah-celah ini.', 'ko': '파라미터 발굴은 이미 자연 언어 처리에서 인기 있는 연구 분야가 되었다.그것은 통상적으로 논증 성분(예를 들어 주장)을 논점의 핵심 성분으로 확정하는 것을 포함한다.우리는 6개의 서로 다른 데이터 집합에 대해 정성 분석을 실시한 결과 이러한 데이터 집합이 클레임에 대한 개념화 정도가 현저히 다른 것 같다는 것을 알 수 있다.클레임의 서로 다른 개념화가 실제 응용에 미친 영향을 이해하기 위해 우리는 가장 선진적인 기능이 풍부한 심도 있는 학습 시스템을 이용하여 광범위한 실험을 실시하여 분야를 뛰어넘는 방식으로 클레임을 식별했다.서로 다른 데이터가 서로 다른 클레임 개념화에 집중되는 것은 분야별 분류에 해롭지만 어휘 차원과 시스템 구성에 공통된 속성이 존재하기 때문에 이러한 격차를 극복하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.', 'fa': 'اخراج آرژانس یک منطقه تحقیقات محبوب در NLP تبدیل شده است. معمولاً شامل شناسایی بخش\u200cهای دلیل، مثلاً ادعا می\u200cکند، به عنوان بخش مرکزی یک دلیل. ما یک تحلیل کیفیت را در شش مجموعه داده متفاوت انجام می دهیم و نشان می دهیم که این ها به نظر می رسند که ادعا را کاملا متفاوت می کنند. برای یاد گرفتن نتایج\u200cهای چنین فرضیه\u200cهای فرضیه\u200cای از ادعا برای کاربردهای практически، ما آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای را با استفاده از سیستم\u200cهای آموزش\u200cهای ثروتمند و عمیق ایالت هنری انجام دادیم، برای شناسایی ادعا در یک طریق متوسط دامنی انجام دادیم. در حالی که فرضیه\u200cهای متفاوتی از ادعا در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متفاوت واقعاً برای فرضیه\u200cهای متفاوت دامنه\u200cای خطرناک است، نشان می\u200cدهیم که ویژگی\u200cهای مشترک در سطح زبان\u200cشناسی و پیکربندی\u200cهای سیستم وجود دارد که می\u200cتوانند کمک کنند تا این فا', 'sw': 'Ukimwengu wa madini umekuwa eneo maarufu la utafiti nchini NLP. Kwa kawaida inajumuisha kutambua vifaa vya hoja, kwa mfano madai, kama sehemu ya katikati ya mjadala. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa tatizo katika seti sita tofauti za taarifa na kuonyesha kwamba hizi zinaonekana kuifanya madai tofauti. Ili kujifunza kuhusu matokeo ya dhana tofauti kama hizi za madai kwa matumizi ya mazingira, tulifanya majaribio makubwa kwa kutumia mifumo ya utajiri na utajiri wa sanaa, ili kutambua madai kwa njia ya ndani. Wakati dhana tofauti ya madai katika seti za takwimu tofauti ni dhahiri kwa usambazaji wa ndani, tunaonyesha kuwa kuna mali zinazosambazwa katika kiwango cha lexico pamoja na mifumo inayoweza kusaidia kushinda gaidi hizi.', 'tr': "Argumentler küýşigi NLP'da popüler bir araştyrma bölegi bolup geçdi. Bu ýer adatça argüment komponentleriniň beýlekiligini takyklaýar. Şe ýle diýip soraglaryň orta komponenti ýaly. Biz alty dürli veri setirlerinde bir görkezmelik analyza edýäris we bularyň pikirlerini düýbünden başga bir şekilde tanyşdyrýandygyny görkez. Praktik uygulamalar üçin bu nähili farklı düşünjelerin netijesini öwrenmek üçin, biz öz taryşyklaryň baý we çuly öwrenme sistemalaryny ulanan örän köp deneyleri çykyp geçirdik. Farklı veri setirlerinde üýtgeşik pikirleriniň üýtgeşikleri çykaryp-domeny klasifikasynda garşy bir şekilde hasaplanýar. Biz bu boşluklary üstüne ýetirmek üçin kömek edip biljek hasaplanýarys we sistem düzümlerniň üýtgeşikleri çykaryp bardygyny görkeýäris.", 'sq': 'Miniera e argumenteve është bërë një fushë kërkimi popullore në NLP. Ajo zakonisht përfshin identifikimin e komponenteve argumentuese, për shembull pretendimet, si komponentin qendror të një argumenti. Ne kryejmë një analizë kualitative nëpërmjet gjashtë grupeve të dhënash të ndryshme dhe tregojmë se këto duken të konceptualizojnë pretendimet mjaft ndryshe. Për të mësuar rreth pasojave të konceptualizimeve të ndryshme të kërkesave për aplikime praktike, kemi kryer eksperimente të gjerë duke përdorur sisteme të pasura me karakteristika të larta dhe të thella mësimi, për të identifikuar pretendimet në një mënyrë ndërdomenie. Ndërsa konceptualizimi i ndryshëm i pretendimeve në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme është me të vërtetë dëmtues për klasifikimin ndër-domeni, ne tregojmë se ka prona të përbashkëta në nivelin lexik si dhe konfigurimet e sistemit që mund të ndihmojnë për të kapërcyer këto mungesa.', 'am': 'አርጉም ማጎናጸፊያ በNLP ውስጥ የፍጥረት ምርመራ ክልል ሆኖአል፡፡ በተጨማሪው የክርክረ ጉዳዩ ማሳየት እንደሚያስፈልጋል፣ ምሳሌ ማዕከላዊ ጉዳይ ክፍል ነው፡፡ በስድስት ልዩ ዳታተሮች ላይ የተመሳሳይን አስተያየት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ To learn about the consequences of such different conceptualizations of claim for practical applications, we carried out extensive experiments using state-of-the-art feature-rich and deep learning systems, to identify claims in a cross-domain fashion.  በተለየ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ግንኙነት ላይ የሚደረግ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ከሌክሲካዊ ደረጃ እና እነዚህን ክፍሎች ለማሸንፍ የሚችል የስርዓት ግንኙነትን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Name Dit insluit gewoonlik die identifikasie van argumentatiewe komponente, bv. aansoek, as die sentrale komponent van 'n argument. Ons doen 'n kwaliteit analiseer oor ses verskillende datastelle en wys dat hierdie verskyn om voorskrifte te konseptualiseer heeltemal verskillende. Om te leer oor die gevolge van sodanige verskillende konseptualiserings van aanvrag vir praktiese toepassings, het ons uitgevoer uitbreidige eksperimente gebruik staat-van-die-kuns funksie-ryk en diep leersystemee, om aandrukkings in 'n kruisdomein modus te identifiseer. Alhoewel die verskillende konseptualisering van aansoek in verskillende datastelle is sekerlik skadelik vir kruisdomein klasifikasie, wys ons dat daar gedeelde eienskappe is op die leksies vlak en stelsel konfigurasies wat kan help om hierdie gapte te oorwin.", 'hy': 'Արվեստական հանքագործությունը դարձավ ՆԼՊ-ում հայտնի հետազոտության ոլորտ: Այն սովորաբար ներառում է բանավեճող բաղադրիչների, օրինակ փաստարկների, հայտարարումը որպես բանավեճի կենտրոնական բաղադրիչ: Մենք կատարում ենք որակային վերլուծություն վեց տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերում և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ դրանք կարծես այլ կերպ են ընդունում փաստարկները: Որպեսզի իմանանք այնպիսի տարբեր կոնցեպտուալիզացիաների հետևանքները պրակտիկական ծրագրերի համար, մենք կատարեցինք էքսպանցիոնալ փորձարկումներ օգտագործելով ամենաբարձր հատկանիշներ հարուստ և խորը ուսումնասիրության համակարգեր, որպեսզի բացահայտենք Մինչդեռ տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերում գտնվող հայտարարությունների տարբեր գաղափարները վնասավոր են միջոցառության դասակարգում, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ լեքսիկական մակարդակում կան ընդհանուր հատկություններ, ինչպես նաև համակարգ կազմակերպություններ, որոնք կարող են օգնել հաղ', 'az': "Argument mining NLP'də popular araştırma alanı oldu. Bu, qüvvətli dəyişiklik komponentlərin tanıdılışını, məsələn, argumentin orta komponenti olaraq daxil edir. Biz altı müxtəlif verilən qurbanlar arasında kvalitativ analizi çəkirik və bunlar dəyişiklik dəyişiklik göstərir. Praktik uyğulamalar üçün bu cür müxtəlif fikirləşdirilmələrin sonuçlarını öyrənmək üçün çox müxtəlif təcrübələr təşkil etdik, müxtəlif dəyişiklik sistemlərini istifadə etmək üçün çox geniş təcrübələr təşkil etdik. Müxtəlif veri setlərində müxtəlif fikirləşdirilmək həqiqətən, çox domain klasifikasyonuna zərər verir, biz leksik səviyyədə və sistem konfigurasiyalarının bu boşluqların üstünə gəlməsinə kömək edə biləcəyini göstəririk.", 'hr': 'Rudnja argomenata postala je popularna istraživačka područja u NLP-u. Obično uključuje identifikaciju argumentativnih komponenta, npr. tvrdnja, kao centralni komponent argumentacije. Izvodimo kvalitativnu analizu u šest različitih podataka i pokazujemo da se to čini konceptualizirati tvrdnja sasvim drugačije. Da bismo naučili o posljedicama takvih različitih konceptualizacija zahtjeva za praktične primjene, proveli smo široke eksperimente koristeći bogate i duboke sustave za učenje države umjetnosti, kako bismo identifikovali zahtjeve na preko domena. Iako je različita konceptualizacija tvrdnji u različitim podacima stvarno štetno klasifikaciji preko domena, pokazujemo da postoje zajedničke vlasništvo na leksičkoj razini, kao i konfiguracije sustava koje mogu pomoći da prevaziđuju te praznine.', 'bn': 'আর্গামেন্ট মিনিং এনএলপির জনপ্রিয় গবেষণা এলাকায় পরিণত হয়েছে। এটি সাধারণত যুক্তিগত উপাদানের চিহ্নের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যেমন যুক্তির কেন্দ্রীয় অংশ হিসেবে দাবি করে। We perform a qualitative analysis across six different datasets and show that these appear to conceptualize claims quite differently.  ব্যাক্তিগত অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য এই ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধারণার ফলাফল সম্পর্কে শিখতে পারার জন্য আমরা বিশেষ পরীক্ষা করেছি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প-সমৃদ্ধ এবং গভীর শিক্ষা ব যদিও বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটের দাবীদের বিভিন্ন ধারণার বিভিন্ন ধারণা সত্যিই ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে লেক্সিক্সিক স্তরে এবং সিস্টেম কনফিগারেশনের ব', 'cs': 'Těžba argumentů se stala oblíbenou oblastí výzkumu v NLP. Obvykle zahrnuje identifikaci argumentativních složek, např. tvrzení, jako centrální složky argumentu. Provádíme kvalitativní analýzu napříč šesti různými datovými sadami a ukazujeme, že se zdá, že tyto tvrzení konceptují zcela odlišně. Abychom se dozvěděli o důsledcích tak rozdílných konceptualizací nároku pro praktické aplikace, provedli jsme rozsáhlé experimenty s využitím nejmodernějších systémů bohatých na funkce a hlubokého učení, abychom identifikovali nároky mezi doménami. Zatímco divergentní konceptualizace tvrzení v různých datových sadách je skutečně škodlivá pro klasifikaci mezi doménami, ukazujeme, že existují sdílené vlastnosti na lexikální úrovni a systémové konfigurace, které mohou pomoci překonat tyto mezery.', 'ca': "La mineria d'arguments s'ha convertit en una àrea de recerca popular en NLP. Normalment inclou la identificació de components argumentatius, per exemple afirmacions, com a component central d'un argument. We perform a qualitative analysis across six different datasets and show that these appear to conceptualize claims quite differently.  Per aprendre sobre les conseqüències d'aquestes diferents conceptualitzacions de reclamacions per aplicacions pràctiques, vam fer experiments extensos utilitzant sistemes d'aprenentatge profund i ricas en característiques modernes, per identificar reclamacions de manera transdomínica. Mentre que la conceptualització divergent de reclamacions en diferents conjunts de dades és de fet perjudicial per la classificació transdomínica, demostram que hi ha propietats compartides a nivell lèxic i configuracions del sistema que poden ajudar a superar aquestes diferències.", 'et': 'Argumentide kaevandamine on muutunud populaarseks uurimisvaldkonnaks NLP. See hõlmab tavaliselt argumentide keskse komponendina määratlemist argumentidele, nt väidetele. Me teeme kvalitatiivse analüüsi kuue erineva andmekogumi vahel ja näitame, et need näivad väidete kontseptuaalsust üsna erinevalt. Selleks et teada saada selliste erinevate nõuete kontseptuatsioonide tagajärgedest praktilistele rakendustele, viisime läbi ulatuslikud eksperimendid, kasutades kaasaegseid funktsioonirikkaid ja sügavõppe süsteeme, et tuvastada nõuded valdkondadevahelisel moel. Kuigi erinevates andmekogumites esinevate väidete erinev kontseptuaalsus kahjustab tõepoolest valdkondadevahelist klassifikatsiooni, näitame, et leksikaalsel tasandil on jagatud omadusi ja süsteemi konfiguratsioone, mis aitavad neid lünki ületada.', 'bs': 'Rudnja argomenata postala je popularna istraživačka područja u NLP-u. Obično uključuje identifikaciju argumentativnih komponenta, na primjer tvrdnja, kao centralni komponent argumentacije. Izvodimo kvalitativnu analizu u šest različitih podataka i pokazujemo da se to čini da konceptualiziraju tvrdnja sasvim drugačije. Da bismo naučili o posljedicama takvih različitih konceptualizacija zahtjeva za praktične aplikacije, proveli smo široke eksperimente koristeći sustave bogate i duboke učenja države umjetnosti, da bismo identifikovali zahtjeve na preko domena. Iako je različita konceptualizacija tvrdnji u različitim podacima stvarno štetna klasifikaciji preko domena, pokazujemo da postoje zajedničke vlasništvo na leksičkoj razini, kao i konfiguracije sustava koje mogu pomoći da prevaziđuju te praznine.', 'fi': 'Argumentin louhinta on tullut NLP:ssä suosittu tutkimusalue. Se sisältää tyypillisesti argumentoivan komponentin, esimerkiksi väitteiden, tunnistamisen argumentin keskeiseksi komponentiksi. Teemme laadullisen analyysin kuudesta eri aineistosta ja osoitamme, että ne näyttävät käsitelleen väitteitä aivan eri tavalla. Opiaksemme näiden erilaisten väitteiden käsitteellistämisen seurauksista käytännön sovelluksiin toteutimme laajoja kokeiluja käyttäen viimeisimpiä ominaisuuksia sisältäviä ja syväoppimisjärjestelmiä väittämien tunnistamiseksi eri toimialojen välillä. Vaikka väitteiden erilaisuus eri aineistoissa on haitallista toimialueiden väliselle luokittelulle, osoitamme, että sanastotasolla on yhteisiä ominaisuuksia ja järjestelmäkokoonpanoja, jotka voivat auttaa poistamaan nämä puutteet.', 'jv': 'Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Anyone To Learn about the effects of this type of individual contextual design of argument for pratike aplications, we failed to take out expanded testing use state-of-the-arts character-wealth and deep Learning System, to ID ads in a multidomain mode. Language', 'he': 'כירות התווכחות הפכה לאזור מחקר פופולרי ב-NLP. בדרך כלל הוא מכיל את זיהוי רכיבים מתווכחים, למשל טענות, כרכיב מרכזי של טיעון. אנו מבצעים ניתוח איכותי ברחבי שש קבוצות נתונים שונות ומראים שהם נראים להבין טענות בצורה שונה לגמרי. To learn about the consequences of such different conceptualizations of claim for practical applications, we carried out extensive experiments using state-of-the-art feature-rich and deep learning systems, to identify claims in a cross-domain fashion.  למרות שהמושג המשונה של טענות במערכות נתונים שונות באמת מזיק להקליטה בין תחומות, אנו מראים שיש תכונות משותפות ברמה לקסיקה כמו גם תצורות מערכת שיכולות לעזור להתגבר על הפערים האלה.', 'ha': "Tirkiya da aka zama wata jama'a cikin shirin research na NLP. Yana ƙunsa a ɗabi'a da ganin sunan wata da za'a yi amfani da, misali, yana madaidaita, kamar compound tsakiya da wata argument. Kana tafiyar wani anayyar sifati a kokan sakan danne dabam-dabam na guda, kuma munã nuna cewa waɗannan suna fara zato-zaɓen kashfiya-dabam. Dõmin mu san ƙarshen ƙarshen zaɓen misãlai masu amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu amfani da shi, mun sami jarrabo masu yawa game da tsarin-state-of-the-art-tajiri da masu ƙari, dõmin ya gane zato a cikin tsarin-guda. Aka dai'urar da aka rarraba ɗabi'a cikin tsarin danne-daban, za'a yi amfani da shi ga fassarar-danne-daban, ko kuma muna nuna, lalle ne, there za'a sami mafiya tsari cikin daraja na kifi da tsarin tsari na'ura da za'a iya ƙara wannan gaura.", 'sk': 'Argumentno rudarjenje je postalo priljubljeno raziskovalno področje v NLP. Običajno vključuje identifikacijo argumentativnih komponent, npr. trditev, kot osrednje komponente argumenta. Izvajamo kvalitativno analizo v šestih različnih naborih podatkov in pokažemo, da se zdi, da ti trditve konceptualizirajo precej drugače. Da bi spoznali posledice takšnih različnih konceptualizacij trditve za praktične aplikacije, smo izvedli obsežne poskuse z uporabo najsodobnejših sistemov, bogatih s funkcijami in sistemov globokega učenja, da bi identificirali trditve na meddomenski način. Medtem ko je različna konceptualizacija trditev v različnih naborih podatkov dejansko škodljiva za meddomensko klasifikacijo, pokažemo, da obstajajo skupne lastnosti na leksikalni ravni in sistemske konfiguracije, ki lahko pomagajo premagati te vrzeli.', 'bo': 'NLP ནང་དུ་སྐད་བརྗོད་ཆས་ཆེ་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཞིག་ཆགས་ཡོད། It typically includes the identification of argumentative components, e.g. claims, as the central component of an argument. ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྡུད་ཚན་འདི་༦་ནང་གི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་མ་ཤར་བ། To learn about the consequences of such different conceptualizations of claim for practical applications, we carried out extensive experiments using state-of-the-art feature-rich and deep learning systems, to identify claims in a cross-domain fashion. While the divergent conceptualization of claims in different datasets is indeed harmful to cross-domain classification, we show that there are shared properties on the lexical level as well as system configurations that can help to overcome these gaps.'}
{'en': 'Identifying Where to Focus in Reading Comprehension for Neural Question Generation', 'ar': 'تحديد مكان التركيز في الفهم القرائي لتوليد الأسئلة العصبية', 'fr': 'Identifier où se concentrer en compréhension de lecture pour la génération de questions neuronales', 'es': 'Identificar dónde enfocarse en la comprensión lectora para la generación de preguntas neuronales', 'pt': 'Identificando onde focar na compreensão de leitura para geração de perguntas neurais', 'ja': 'ニューラル・クエスチョン生成のための理解の読み取りに重点を置く場所を特定する', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका प्रश्न पीढ़ी के लिए पढ़ने की समझ में कहां ध्यान केंद्रित करना है की पहचान करना', 'zh': '定于读解神经生成之位', 'ru': 'Определение того, на чем сосредоточиться при чтении для генерации нейронных вопросов', 'ga': 'Ag Aithint Cá Fócas sa Léamhthuiscint le haghaidh Giniúint Ceisteanna Néaracha', 'hu': 'Azonosítani kell, hol kell összpontosítani az olvasási megértésben a neurális kérdések generálásához', 'el': 'Προσδιορισμός Πού να εστιάσετε στην κατανόηση ανάγνωσης για τη δημιουργία νευρωνικών ερωτήσεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Identificare dove concentrarsi nella comprensione della lettura per la generazione di domande neurali', 'kk': 'Нейрондық сұрақтарды жасау үшін оқу сұрақтарының көздегенін анықтау', 'lt': 'Nustatyti, kur daugiausia dėmesio reikia skirti skaitant supratimą neurologinių klausimų generacijai', 'ml': 'Identifying Where to Focus in Reading Comprehension for Neural Question Generation', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Dimana Fokus dalam Pembacaan Pemahaman untuk Jenerasi Soalan Neural', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ Fejn tiffoka fil-Qara tal-Komprensjoni għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet Newrali', 'pl': 'Określenie, gdzie skupić się w czytaniu zrozumienia dla generowania pytań neuronowych', 'mk': 'Идентификување каде да се фокусира во читањето на разбирање за генерација на неврални прашања', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл асуулт үүсгэхэд хаана төвлөрөх вэ гэдгийг мэдэх', 'no': 'Identifiserer kor fokuserer i lesing av komprehension for generering av neirale spørsmål', 'ro': 'Identificarea unde să se concentreze în înțelegerea citirii pentru generarea de întrebări neurale', 'sr': 'Identifikacija gde da se fokusiramo u èitanju kompresije za generaciju neuroloških pitanja', 'sv': 'Identifiera var man ska fokusera i läsförståelse för generering av neural frågeställning', 'ta': 'புதிய கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்திற்கான படித்தல் முடிவில் எங்கே முன்னிறுத்துவதை அடையாளம்', 'si': 'කොහෙද කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබීමේ කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga meesha Focus in Reading Comprehension for Question Neural Generation', 'ur': 'نئورل سؤال پیدا کرنے کے لئے کہاں منظور پڑھنے کی جگہ دکھانے کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Identifying Where to Focus in Reading Comprehension for Neural Question Generation', 'vi': 'Xác định nơi tập trung vào việc hiểu rộng cho thế hệ thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Идентифициране къде да се фокусираме в разбирането за четене за генериране на неврални въпроси', 'hr': 'Identifikacija gdje se fokusirati u čitanju kompresije za generaciju neuroloških pitanja', 'da': 'Identificering af, hvor man skal fokusere i læseforståelse for generering af neural spørgsmål', 'nl': 'Identificeren waar te focussen bij het lezen van begrip voor neurale vragengeneratie', 'de': 'Identifizieren, wo man sich beim Leseverständnis für die Generierung neuronaler Fragen konzentrieren kann', 'id': 'Identifying Where to Focus in Reading Comprehension for Neural Question Generation', 'ko': '읽기 이해 중의 중점을 확정하여 신경 문제를 생성하다', 'sw': 'Utambulisha wapi Kusini katika Kusoma Uwezeshaji wa swali la Nzuri', 'fa': 'شناسایی کجا برای خواندن تفکیر برای تولید سوال عصبی تمرکز شود', 'tr': 'Nerede soragy Generatiýasy üçin fokus edilmelidigini tapylýar', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ወደ ማውጣት አቀማመጥ ለመጠየቅ ጥያቄ አቀማመጥ', 'sq': 'Identifying Where to Focus in Reading Comprehension for Neural Question Generation', 'az': 'Nöral sual Generasiyası üçün oxumaq üçün nöqtəsini təşkil edən', 'hy': 'Identifying Where to Focus in Reading Comprehension for Neural Question Generation', 'bs': 'Identificirajući gdje se fokusirati u čitanju kompresije za generaciju neuroloških pitanja', 'bn': 'নিউরেল প্রশ্ন জেনারেশনের জন্য পাঠক সম্পূর্ণরূপে কোথায় ফোকাস চিহ্নিত করা হবে', 'ca': 'Identificar on centrar-se en llegir la comprensió de la generació de preguntes neuronals', 'et': 'Kindlaksmääramine, kuhu keskenduda neuroküsimuste genereerimiseks mõistmise lugemisel', 'cs': 'Identifikace, kam se zaměřit při čtení porozumění pro generování nervových otázek', 'fi': 'Määritä, mihin keskittyä neurokysymysten muodostamiseen liittyvässä lukemisessa', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'sk': 'Ugotavljanje, kam se osredotočiti pri branju razumevanja za ustvarjanje nevronskih vprašanj', 'he': 'זיהוי היכן להתמקד בקריאה הבנה ליצירת שאלות נוירוליות', 'ha': "Yana gane inda za'a Fokus cikin karanta Completion wa Taurar da Ƙari", 'bo': 'དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཚོགས་ཀློག་འཇུག་ནང་ལ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱེད་སའི་གནས་ཡུལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'A first step in the task of automatically generating questions for testing reading comprehension is to identify question-worthy sentences, i.e. sentences in a text passage that humans find it worthwhile to ask questions about. We propose a hierarchical neural sentence-level sequence tagging model for this task, which existing approaches to question generation have ignored. The approach is fully data-driven   with no sophisticated NLP pipelines or any hand-crafted rules / features   and compares favorably to a number of baselines when evaluated on the SQuAD data set. When incorporated into an existing neural question generation system, the resulting end-to-end system achieves state-of-the-art performance for paragraph-level question generation for reading comprehension.question-worthy sentences, i.e.\n      sentences in a text passage that humans find it worthwhile to ask\n      questions about. We propose a hierarchical neural sentence-level sequence\n      tagging model for this task, which existing approaches to question\n      generation have ignored. The approach is fully data-driven — with no\n      sophisticated NLP pipelines or any hand-crafted rules/features — and\n      compares favorably to a number of baselines when evaluated on the SQuAD\n      data set. When incorporated into an existing neural question generation\n      system, the resulting end-to-end system achieves state-of-the-art\n      performance for paragraph-level question generation for reading\n      comprehension.\n    ', 'ar': 'تتمثل الخطوة الأولى في مهمة توليد الأسئلة تلقائيًا لاختبار فهم القراءة في تحديد الجمل التي تستحق الأسئلة ، أي الجمل في مقطع نصي يجد البشر أنه من المفيد طرح أسئلة عنها. نقترح نموذجًا هرميًا لعلامات التسلسل العصبي على مستوى الجملة لهذه المهمة ، والذي تجاهلته الأساليب الحالية لتوليد الأسئلة. يعتمد هذا النهج بشكل كامل على البيانات - بدون خطوط أنابيب NLP متطورة أو أي قواعد / ميزات مصنوعة يدويًا - ويقارن بشكل إيجابي بعدد من الخطوط الأساسية عند تقييمها على مجموعة بيانات SQuAD. عند دمجه في نظام توليد أسئلة عصبية موجود ، فإن النظام الشامل الناتج يحقق أداءً متطورًا لتوليد أسئلة على مستوى الفقرة لفهم القراءة.', 'es': 'Un primer paso en la tarea de generar automáticamente preguntas para probar la comprensión lectora es identificar frases dignas de pregunta, es decir, oraciones en un pasaje de texto sobre las que los humanos consideran que vale la pena hacer preguntas. Proponemos un modelo jerárquico de etiquetado de secuencias neuronales a nivel de oración para esta tarea, que los enfoques existentes para la generación de preguntas han ignorado. El enfoque se basa totalmente en los datos, sin procesos de PNL sofisticados ni reglas o características elaboradas a mano, y se compara favorablemente con una serie de líneas de base cuando se evalúa en el conjunto de datos de sQuad. Cuando se incorpora a un sistema de generación de preguntas neuronales existente, el sistema de extremo a extremo resultante logra un rendimiento de vanguardia para la generación de preguntas a nivel de párrafo para la comprensión lectora.', 'fr': "Une première étape de la génération automatique de questions pour tester la compréhension de la lecture consiste à identifier des phrases qui méritent d'être posées, c'est-à-dire des phrases dans un passage de texte sur lesquelles les humains trouvent intéressant de poser des questions. Nous proposons un modèle de marquage de séquence neuronal hiérarchique au niveau de la phrase pour cette tâche, que les approches existantes de génération de questions ont ignoré. L'approche est entièrement pilotée par les données — sans pipelines NLP sophistiqués ni règles/fonctionnalités conçues à la main — et se compare favorablement à un certain nombre de lignes de base lorsqu'elles sont évaluées sur l'ensemble de données SQuAD. Lorsqu'il est intégré à un système de génération de questions neuronales existant, le système de bout en bout qui en résulte atteint des performances de pointe pour la génération de questions au niveau du paragraphe pour la compréhension de la lecture.", 'pt': 'Um primeiro passo na tarefa de gerar automaticamente perguntas para testar a compreensão de leitura é identificar frases dignas de perguntas, ou seja, frases em uma passagem de texto sobre as quais os humanos acham que vale a pena fazer perguntas. Propomos um modelo hierárquico de marcação de sequência neural em nível de sentença para essa tarefa, que as abordagens existentes para geração de perguntas ignoraram. A abordagem é totalmente orientada a dados — sem pipelines de NLP sofisticados ou quaisquer regras/recursos artesanais — e se compara favoravelmente a várias linhas de base quando avaliadas no conjunto de dados SQuAD. Quando incorporado a um sistema de geração de perguntas neurais existente, o sistema de ponta a ponta resultante alcança desempenho de última geração para geração de perguntas em nível de parágrafo para compreensão de leitura.', 'ja': '読解力をテストするための質問を自動的に生成する作業の最初のステップは、質問に値する文章、すなわち、人間が質問する価値があると感じる文章を特定することです。このタスクのための階層的なニューラル文章レベルのタグ付けモデルを提案しますが、既存の質問生成アプローチはこれを無視しています。このアプローチは完全にデータ駆動型で、洗練されたNLPパイプラインや手作業で作成されたルール/機能はなく、SQuADデータセットで評価された場合のいくつかのベースラインと比較して有利です。既存のニューラルクエスチョン生成システムに組み込まれると、結果として生じるエンドツーエンドのシステムは、読解のためのパラグラフレベルの質問生成のための最先端のパフォーマンスを達成する。', 'zh': '自生以试读解事第一步为可问之句,即人以为可问文本段落中句也。 臣等为此一层神经句序标模,今事忽此。 其法全由数驱,无杂NLP管道及一切手工之法/功能,并于SQuAD数集上评之,可与众基线校之。 当集成神经生统中,端到端系统成最新性。', 'hi': 'पढ़ने की समझ के परीक्षण के लिए स्वचालित रूप से प्रश्न उत्पन्न करने के कार्य में पहला कदम प्रश्न-योग्य वाक्यों की पहचान करना है, यानी एक पाठ मार्ग में वाक्य जो मनुष्यों को प्रश्न पूछने के लिए सार्थक लगता है। हम इस कार्य के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित तंत्रिका वाक्य-स्तर अनुक्रम टैगिंग मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे प्रश्न पीढ़ी के लिए मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों ने अनदेखा कर दिया है। दृष्टिकोण पूरी तरह से डेटा-संचालित है - कोई परिष्कृत एनएलपी पाइपलाइनों या किसी भी हाथ से तैयार किए गए नियमों / सुविधाओं के साथ - और SQuAD डेटा सेट पर मूल्यांकन किए जाने पर कई बेसलाइनों की तुलना में अनुकूल रूप से तुलना करता है। जब एक मौजूदा तंत्रिका प्रश्न पीढ़ी प्रणाली में शामिल किया जाता है, तो परिणामी एंड-टू-एंड सिस्टम पढ़ने की समझ के लिए पैराग्राफ-स्तर के प्रश्न पीढ़ी के लिए अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Первым шагом в задаче автоматической генерации вопросов для тестирования понимания чтения является определение предложений, заслуживающих вопросов, то есть предложений в текстовом отрывке, о которых люди считают целесообразным задать вопросы. Для этой задачи мы предлагаем иерархическую модель нейронной последовательности на уровне предложений, которую игнорируют существующие подходы к формированию вопросов. Подход полностью основан на данных — без сложных трубопроводов NLP или каких-либо правил/особенностей ручной работы — и выгодно сравнивается с рядом базовых линий при оценке на наборе данных SQuAD. При включении в существующую систему генерации нейронных вопросов результирующая сквозная система достигает самой современной производительности для генерации вопросов на уровне абзаца для понимания чтения.', 'ga': 'Is é an chéad chéim sa tasc chun ceisteanna a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch chun an léamhthuiscint a thástáil ná abairtí atá fiúntach don cheist a aithint, i.e. abairtí i sliocht téacs ar fiú do dhaoine ceisteanna a chur ina dtaobh. Molaimid múnla clibeála seichimh ordlathach néar-leibhéil abairte don tasc seo, nach bhfuil neamhaird déanta ag na cuir chuige atá ann cheana maidir le giniúint ceisteanna. Tá an cur chuige bunaithe go hiomlán ar shonraí — gan aon phíblínte NLP sofaisticiúla nó aon rialacha/gnéithe lámhdhéanta — agus déantar comparáid fhabhrach le roinnt bonnlínte nuair a dhéantar meastóireacht orthu ar thacar sonraí SQuAD. Nuair a dhéantar é a ionchorprú i gcóras giniúna ceisteanna néaracha atá ann cheana féin, éiríonn leis an gcóras ceann-go-deireadh a leanann as an bhfeidhmíocht úrscothach maidir le giniúint ceisteanna ag leibhéal ailt le haghaidh léamhthuiscint.', 'hu': 'Az olvasásértés teszteléséhez szükséges automatikus kérdéseket generáló feladat első lépése, hogy azonosítsuk a kérdésre méltó mondatokat, azaz azokat a mondatokat, amelyekről az emberek érdemesnek tartják kérdéseket tenni. Ehhez a feladathoz egy hierarchikus neurális mondatszintű szekvencia címkézési modellt javasolunk, amelyet a kérdések generálásának meglévő megközelítései figyelmen kívül hagytak. A megközelítés teljes mértékben adatközpontú - kifinomult NLP-vezetékek és kézzel kidolgozott szabályok/funkciók nélkül - és kedvezően hasonlít össze számos alapvető vonallal az SQUAD adatkészleten. Ha egy meglévő neurális kérdés generáló rendszerbe építve, az így létrejött end-to-end rendszer korszerű teljesítményt ér el a bekezdés szintű kérdés generálásához az olvasásértés érdekében.', 'ka': 'პირველი ნაგულისხმები ტექსტის პროგრამაში, რომელიც ადამიანები იპოვენ საჭირო კითხვის შესაძლებლობად კითხვის შესაძლებლობა, არის იდენტიფიკაცია კითხვის მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვები, მაგალითად ტექსტის პ ჩვენ მივეღებთ იერაქტიკური ნეიროლური წესების წესების მოდელი, რომელიც ამ დავალებისთვის არსებობს წესების წესების შესახებ იგნორიცია. პროგრამა ყველაფერად მონაცემების მოწყობილობა - სპექტიკური NLP პროგრამები არა ან ყველაფერად პროგრამები/ფუნქციები არა - და მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანი მნიშვნელოვანი გამოყენება, რო როდესაც მიმდინარე ნეიროლური კითხვის განვითარების სისტემაში შეიყვანა, შესაძლებელი სისტემა დასრულებული დასრულებული სისტემა დასრულებულია წარმოდგენება პრაპაგრამის დონეზე კითხვის', 'el': 'Ένα πρώτο βήμα στο έργο της αυτόματης δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων για τη δοκιμή της κατανόησης ανάγνωσης είναι να εντοπιστούν προτάσεις που αξίζουν ερωτήσεις, δηλαδή προτάσεις σε ένα απόσπασμα κειμένου για το οποίο οι άνθρωποι θεωρούν ότι αξίζει να κάνουν ερωτήσεις. Προτείνουμε ένα ιεραρχικό μοντέλο ακολουθίας σε επίπεδο νευρωνικών προτάσεων για αυτή την εργασία, το οποίο οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για τη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων έχουν αγνοήσει. Η προσέγγιση είναι πλήρως βασισμένη σε δεδομένα, χωρίς εξελιγμένους αγωγούς ή οποιουσδήποτε χειροποίητους κανόνες/χαρακτηριστικά και συγκρίνεται ευνοϊκά με έναν αριθμό γραμμών βάσης όταν αξιολογείται στο σύνολο δεδομένων SQuAD. Όταν ενσωματωθεί σε ένα υπάρχον σύστημα δημιουργίας νευρωνικών ερωτήσεων, το προκύπτον σύστημα επιτυγχάνει υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις για τη δημιουργία ερωτήσεων σε επίπεδο παραγράφου για την κατανόηση ανάγνωσης.', 'kk': 'Оқу сұрақтарын тексеру үшін автоматты түрде жасау тапсырмасының бірінші қадамы - сұрақтар дұрыс сөздерін анықтау, мысалы, адамдардың сұрақтарын талап ету үшін мәтін жолындағы сөздерді анықтау. Біз осы тапсырманың иерархикалық невралдық сөз деңгейіндегі тегтер үлгісін ұсынамыз. Бұл сұрақ құру үшін бар жағдайларды елемеу үшін бар. Қолданысы толық деректерді қолдану үшін - жұмыс NLP құрылғысы не қолмен құрылған ережелер/ мүмкіндіктері жоқ - және SQuAD деректер жиынында бағалағанда, бірнеше негізгі жолдарды салыстырады. Невралдық сұрақтарды құру жүйесіне енгізгенде, соңындағы соңындағы жүйе оқу үшін аспан деңгейіндегі сұрақтарды жасау үшін күй- жасау әдістерін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Pirmasis žingsnis užduodant automatiškai i škelti klausimus skaitymo supratimui išbandyti yra nustatyti klausimus vertus sakinius, t. y. teksto dalis, apie kurią žmonėms verta užduoti klausimus. Siūlome hierarchinį nervinių sakinių lygio sekos ženklinimo model į šiam uždaviniui, kurio esami požiūriai į klausimų kūrimą ignoravo. The approach is fully data-driven - with no sophisticated NLP pipelines or any hand-crafted rules/features - and compares favorably to a number of baselines when evaluated on the SQuAD data set.  Įterpus ją į esamą neurologinių klausimų generavimo sistemą, gauta galutinė sistema užtikrina aukščiausio lygio klausimų generavimo rezultatus skaitymui suprasti.', 'ml': 'വായിക്കുന്നതിന് പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്വയം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു ആദ്യ പടിയാണ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത്, ചോദ് ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ സെക്കന്റ് ടാഗിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കു ഈ സമ്പ്രദായം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ്- സോഫിസ്റ്റ് എംഎല്\u200dപി പൈപ്പെല്\u200dനുകള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കൈക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d/വിശ നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d ചോദ്യ തലമുറയുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, അതിന്റെ ഫലമായ അവസാന സിസ്റ്റം വായിക്കുന്നതിനായി പാര', 'it': "Un primo passo nel compito di generare automaticamente domande per testare la comprensione della lettura è quello di identificare frasi degne di domande, cioè frasi in un passaggio di testo che gli esseri umani trovano utile porre domande. Proponiamo un modello gerarchico di sequenze neurali a livello di frase per questo compito, che gli approcci esistenti alla generazione di domande hanno ignorato. L'approccio è completamente basato sui dati - senza pipeline NLP sofisticate o regole/caratteristiche artigianali - e si confronta positivamente con una serie di linee di base se valutato sul set di dati SQUAD. Quando incorporato in un sistema di generazione di domande neurali esistente, il sistema end-to-end risultante raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia per la generazione di domande a livello di paragrafo per la comprensione della lettura.", 'mt': 'L-ewwel pass fil-kompitu li jiġu ġġenerati awtomatikament mistoqsijiet għall-ittestjar tal-komprensjoni tal-qari huwa li jiġu identifikati sentenzi li jistħoqqilhom mistoqsijiet, jiġifieri sentenzi f’passaġġ tat-test li l-bnedmin isibuha utli li jitolbu mistoqsijiet dwarhom. Aħna nipproponu mudell ġerarkiku ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza fil-livell tas-sentenzi newrali għal dan il-kompitu, li l-approċċi eżistenti għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet injoraw. L-approċċ huwa mmexxi kompletament mid-dejta - mingħajr pipelines sofistikati NLP jew kwalunkwe regoli/karatteristiċi maħduma bl-idejn - u jqabbel b’mod favorevoli ma’ għadd ta’ linji bażi meta evalwati fuq is-sett ta’ dejta SQuAD. Meta inkorporata f’sistema eżistenti ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet newrali, is-sistema li tirriżulta minn tarf sa tarf tikseb prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet fil-livell tal-paragrafu għall-komprensjoni tal-qari.', 'mn': 'Уншихын тулд автоматаар асуулт бий болгохын тулд анхны алхам бол асуулт үнэ цэнэтэй өгүүлбэрийг тодорхойлох, яг л хүмүүс асуулт асуух хэрэгтэй байдаг текст хэлбэрийн өгүүлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлох юм. Бид энэ үйл явцын төлөвлөгөө дээрх төлөвлөгөөний мэдрэлийн давхар дарааллын тагжуулах загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ асуулт үеийнхээ тулд суралцахын тулд суралцах арга барилга Энэ арга баримтууд нь өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөнтэй - NLP хоолойн шугам эсвэл гар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй байхгүй - SQuAD өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд үнэлэхэд хэрэгтэй олон суурь шугам болон харьцуулдаг. Харин одоогийн мэдрэлийн асуулт төрөлхтний системд нэгдэх үед, үр дүнд төгсгөл-төгсгөл систем унших асуулт төвшинд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Eit første steg i oppgåva for automatisk oppretting av spørsmål for å testa lesingsforståelse er å identifisera spørsmålferdige setningar, t.d. setningar i tekstpassasjon som mennesker finn det derfor å spørja spørsmål om. Vi foreslår eit hierarkisk nøyralnivå-merkingsmodul for denne oppgåva, som eksisterande tilnærmingar til oppgåva av spørsmål har ignorert. Tilnærminga er fullstendig datadrivt – utan ingen sofistikerte NLP-røyr eller kvar håndkrafta regl/funksjonar – og samanliknar favoritt med mange grunnlinjer når det er evaluert på SQuAD-datasettet. Når det er inkludert i eit eksisterande neuralspørsmål-genereringssystem, vil det resultatet ende-til-slutt-systemet gjennomgå tilstanden av kunstendigheten for oppretting av spørsmål i avsnittnivå for lesing av forståelse.', 'mk': 'Прв чекор во задачата да се генерираат автоматски прашања за тестирање на разбирање на читањето е идентификувањето на реченици вредни за прашања, т.е. реченици во текстот за кој луѓето сметаат дека вредно да поставаат прашања. Предложуваме хиерархичен модел за означување на секвенца на ниво на нервни реченици за оваа задача, кој постојните пристапи за генерација на прашања го игнорираа. Пристапот е целосно употребен од податоци - без софистицирани нафтоводи на НЛП или некои рачно направени правила/карактеристики - и се споредува со голем број бази кога се оценуваат на SQuAD податоците. Кога е вклучен во постоечкиот систем за генерација на нервни прашања, резултатот на системот од крај до крај постигнува најнова резултат за генерација на прашања од ниво на параграф за разбирање на читањето.', 'ro': 'Un prim pas în sarcina generării automate a întrebărilor pentru testarea înțelegerii citirii este identificarea propozițiilor demne de întrebare, adică propozițiile dintr-un pasaj text despre care oamenii consideră că merită să pună întrebări. Propunem un model ierarhic de etichetare a secvențelor neurale la nivel de frază pentru această sarcină, pe care abordările existente pentru generarea de întrebări l-au ignorat. Abordarea este complet bazată pe date - fără conducte NLP sofisticate sau reguli/caracteristici realizate manual - și se compară favorabil cu un număr de linii de bază atunci când este evaluată pe setul de date SQUAD. Atunci când este încorporat într-un sistem de generare a întrebărilor neurale existent, sistemul end-to-end rezultat obține performanțe de ultimă oră pentru generarea de întrebări la nivel de paragraf pentru înțelegerea citirii.', 'ms': 'Langkah pertama dalam tugas menghasilkan soalan secara automatik untuk menguji pemahaman bacaan adalah untuk mengenalpasti kalimat yang layak untuk soalan, iaitu kalimat dalam laluan teks yang manusia rasa layak untuk bertanya soalan mengenainya. Kami cadangkan model pengetikan urutan kalimat saraf hierarkis bagi tugas ini, yang pendekatan yang wujud untuk generasi soalan telah diabaikan. pendekatan adalah secara penuh pemacu-data - tanpa baris paip NLP yang canggih atau mana-mana peraturan/ciri-ciri buatan tangan - dan membandingkan dengan baik dengan sejumlah baris dasar apabila diteliti pada set data SQuAD. Apabila disertai dalam sistem generasi soalan saraf yang wujud, sistem akhir-akhir hasilnya mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art untuk generasi soalan aras-paragraf untuk pemahaman bacaan.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dය වා අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැහැ. The approach is fully data-dried - with no sohisticated NLP tube lines or any Hand-craved Rules/Featuring - and compares favor with a number of baselines on the SQuAD data set. ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියට සම්බන්ධ වුනාම, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ප්\u200dර', 'sv': 'Ett första steg i uppgiften att automatiskt generera frågor för att testa läsförståelse är att identifiera frågevärda meningar, dvs meningar i en textpassage som människor tycker det är värt att ställa frågor om. Vi föreslår en hierarkisk neural meningsnivå sekvensmärkningsmodell för denna uppgift, som befintliga metoder för frågegenerering har ignorerat. Metoden är helt datadriven - utan sofistikerade NLP-pipelines eller några handgjorda regler/funktioner - och jämförs positivt med ett antal baslinjer när den utvärderas på SQUAD-datauppsättningen. När det införlivas i ett befintligt neuralt frågegenereringssystem uppnår det resulterande end-to-end-systemet toppmodern prestanda för paragrafnivå frågegenerering för läsförståelse.', 'sr': 'Prvi korak u zadatku automatske stvaranja pitanja za testiranje razumijevanja čitanja je identifikacija rečenica vrijednih pitanja, tj. rečenica u tekstskom prolazu o kojoj ljudi nalaze vrijedno pitanja. Predlažemo hijerarhički model označavanja nivoa neuralnih rečenica za ovaj zadatak, koji postoje pristupi generaciji pitanja ignorirali su. Pristup je potpuno vođen podacima - bez sofisticiranih cijevi NLP-a ili bilo kakvih pravila/karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama - i uspoređuje favoritno sa mnogim osnovnim linijama kada se procjenjuje na setu podataka SQuAD-a. Kada se uključuje u postojeći sistem generacije neuroloških pitanja, rezultatni sistem kraja do kraja postiže postupak stanja umjetnosti za generaciju pitanja na nivou paragrafa za razumijevanje čitanja.', 'pl': 'Pierwszym krokiem w zadaniu automatycznego generowania pytań do testowania zrozumienia czytania jest identyfikacja zdań godnych pytań, czyli zdań w fragmencie tekstowym, o które ludzie uważają za warto zadawać pytania. Proponujemy hierarchiczny model tagowania sekwencji zdań neuronowych na poziomie zdań, który istniejące podejścia do generowania pytań ignorowały. Podejście to jest w pełni oparte na danych, bez wyrafinowanych rurociągów NLP lub żadnych ręcznie tworzonych reguł/funkcji i porównuje się korzystnie z wieloma liniami bazowymi podczas oceny na zbiorze danych SQuAD. Po włączeniu do istniejącego neuronowego systemu generowania pytań, powstały kompleksowy system osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność generowania pytań na poziomie akapitu w celu zrozumienia czytania.', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کی آزمائش کے لئے سوال پیدا کرنے کے لئے پہلی قدم ہے کہ سوال کے قابل احترام کی تصدیق کرنا ہے، یعنی ایک متن پھیر میں عبارت جو انسانوں نے اس کے بارے میں سوال پوچھنے کا ارزش پایا ہے. ہم نے اس کام کے لئے ایک ہیراراتیکل نئورل قول سطح کے ٹاگ نمڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو سوال کی نسل کے لئے موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہے۔ اس طریقہ پر پوری دکھائی جاتی ہے - اس طریقہ سے کوئی اپنا پیپی پی پی لین یا کسی ہاتھ کرم کے قانون/فرصت کے بغیر، اور SQuAD ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطالعہ کیا جاتا ہے تو بہترین بنیس لین کے ساتھ مطالعہ کرتا ہے. جب ایک موجود نئورل سؤال کی نسل سیسٹم میں شامل ہوتا ہے، نتیجہ پانی-پانی-پانی سیسٹم کو پڑھنے کے لئے پاراگر سؤال کی نسل کے لئے موجود ہوتا ہے.', 'so': "Shaqada ugu horeysa e e lagu sameeyo su'aalo si automatic ah oo loo sameynayo in la imtixaamo dhamaanka akhriska waa in lagu caddeeyo imtixaanka suurtagalka, kaas oo laga helaa baasabka qoraalka, in dadku ay ka helaan in ay ku habboon tahay in lagu weydiino su'aalo la xiriira. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model sawirid ah oo ku qoran sawir xiliga neurada, kaas oo ku jira u soo dhowaadaya in lagu weydiino qarniga ay ka jeedsadeen. Dhaqdhaqaaqa waa mid si buuxda ah u isticmaalaya - iyadoo aan lahayn dhaqdhaqaale NLP ama qaynuunno/xirfado ay gacanta ku qaban yihiin - wuxuuna isbarbardhigi karaa meelo saldhig ah marka lagu qiimeeyo sawirada SQuAD. Markii lagu qeybeeyo nidaamka arrimaha neurada ah ee ku jira, nidaamka ugu dambeeya dhammaadka ugu dambeeya wuxuu gaadhaa muuqashada farshaxanka farshaxanka farshaxanka farshaxanka si loo akhriyo qoraalka.", 'ta': 'தானாகவே படிக்கும் கேள்விகளை உருவாக்கும் பணியில் ஒரு முதல் படி என்பது கேள்வி பொருத்தமுள்ள வாக்கியங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க, அதாவது உரை கடவுச்சொல்லி நாங்கள் இந்த பணிக்கான முனையத்திற்கான மாதிரி வாக்கு-மட்டத்திற்கான முனையத்தை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து கேள்வி உருவாக்குதலை  இந்த முறை முழு தரவு இயக்கப்பட்டது - சுலபமான NLP கோப்புகள் அல்லது எந்த கையால் கையாளும் விதிகள்/குணங்களும் இல்லை- மற்றும் SQuAD தரவு அமைப்பில் மதிப்பிடு ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் புதிய கேள்வி உருவாக்கும் அமைப்பில் சேர்க்கப்பட்டால், முடிவு இறுதியில் முடிவு அமைப்பு குறிப்பை படிக்கும் பொரு', 'uz': 'Name Biz shu vazifa uchun hierarchik neyrolik darajasi sevimli teg modelini tahrirlash davom etishimiz mumkin. Bu savol yaratish uchun mavjud murojaat qiladi. Uskuna butun maʼlumot bajarildi - sophisticated NLP pipellar yoki qoʻllanmagan qoidalar/featurelar yoʻq - va SQuAD maʼlumot moslamalarida qiymatda bir necha asosiy satrlariga kamaytirish. Name', 'vi': 'Một bước đầu tiên trong nhiệm vụ tự động tạo ra câu hỏi để kiểm tra sự thấu hiểu là phải xác định những câu đáng hỏi, tức là câu trong một đoạn văn bản mà con người thấy đáng để đặt câu hỏi. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình phân tích dây thần kinh cấp cao phân tử cho nhiệm vụ này, mà các phương pháp liên quan đến thế hệ câu hỏi đã bỏ qua. Phương pháp này được cung cấp đầy đủ dữ liệu, không có đường ống khôn ngoan khôn ngoan Nhất.P.L. hay bất kỳ điều luật/tính năng làm thủ công nào, và có thể so sánh được với một số đường cơ bản khi đánh giá trên bộ dữ liệu sCOAD. Khi được nhập vào hệ thống phát triển câu hỏi thần kinh tồn tại, hệ thống kết quả đạt đến giới hạn tối tân nhất cho hệ thống câu hỏi cấp độ một để đọc sự thấu hiểu.', 'bg': 'Първа стъпка в задачата за автоматично генериране на въпроси за тестване на разбирането за четене е да се идентифицират изречения, достойни за въпроси, т.е. изречения в текстов пасаж, за който хората смятат, че си струва да задават въпроси. Предлагаме йерархичен невронен модел за маркиране на последователност на изречения на ниво изречение за тази задача, който съществуващите подходи за генериране на въпроси са игнорирали. Подходът е изцяло базиран на данни - без сложни тръбопроводи за НЛП или ръчно изработени правила/функции - и се сравнява благоприятно с редица базови линии, когато се оценява на набора от данни SQuAD. Когато е вградена в съществуваща система за генериране на невронни въпроси, получената система от край до край постига най-съвременни резултати за генериране на въпроси на ниво параграф за разбиране на четене.', 'nl': 'Een eerste stap in het automatisch genereren van vragen voor het testen van leesbegrip is het identificeren van vraagwaardige zinnen, dat wil zeggen zinnen in een tekstpassage waar mensen vragen over willen stellen. We stellen een hiërarchisch neurale zin-level sequence tagging model voor deze taak voor, dat bestaande benaderingen voor het genereren van vragen hebben genegeerd. De aanpak is volledig datagedreven, zonder geavanceerde NLP-pipelines of handmatige regels/functies en kan gunstig vergeleken worden met een aantal basislijnen wanneer deze worden geëvalueerd op de SQuAD-gegevensset. Wanneer het systeem wordt geïntegreerd in een bestaand neural question generation systeem, bereikt het resulterende end-to-end systeem state-of-the-art prestaties voor het genereren van vragen op alinea-niveau voor leesbegrip.', 'da': 'Et første skridt i opgaven med automatisk generering af spørgsmål til afprøvning af læseforståelse er at identificere spørgsmålsværdige sætninger, dvs. sætninger i en tekstpassage, som mennesker finder det værd at stille spørgsmål om. Vi foreslår en hierarkisk neural sætning-niveau sekvens tagging model for denne opgave, som eksisterende tilgange til spørgsmålstegnelse har ignoreret. Tilgangen er fuldt datadrevet - uden avancerede NLP-rørledninger eller håndlavede regler/funktioner - og sammenlignes positivt med en række basislinjer, når den vurderes på SQUAD-datasættet. Når det er indarbejdet i et eksisterende neuralt spørgsmål genereringssystem, opnår det resulterende end-to-end system state-of-the-art ydeevne til afsnitsniveau spørgsmål generering til læseforståelse.', 'de': 'Ein erster Schritt bei der automatischen Generierung von Fragen zum Testen des Leseverständnisses ist die Identifizierung von fragwürdigen Sätzen, also Sätzen in einer Textpassage, über die Menschen Fragen stellen können. Für diese Aufgabe schlagen wir ein hierarchisches neuronales Satzsequenz-Tagging-Modell vor, welches bisher ignoriert wurde. Der Ansatz ist vollständig datengetrieben, ohne ausgeklügelte NLP-Pipelines oder handgefertigte Regeln/Features und vergleicht sich günstig mit einer Reihe von Baselines, wenn er auf dem SQuAD-Datensatz ausgewertet wird. Wenn es in ein bestehendes neuronales Fragegenerierungssystem integriert wird, erreicht das resultierende End-to-End-System State-of-the-Art-Leistung für die Fragegenerierung auf Absatzebene zum Leseverstehen.', 'hr': 'Prvi korak u zadatku automatskog stvaranja pitanja za testiranje razumijevanja čitanja je identifikacija rečenica vrijednih pitanja, tj. rečenica u tekstskom prolazu o kojoj ljudi nalaze vrijedno pitanja. Predlažemo hijerarhički model označavanja razine neuralnih rečenica za ovaj zadatak, koji su postojeći pristupi generaciji pitanja ignorirali. Pristup je potpuno vođen podacima - bez sofisticiranih cijevi NLP-a ili bilo kakvih pravila/karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama - i uspoređuje favoritetno s brojem početnih linija kada se procjenjuje na setu podataka SQuAD-a. Kada se uključuje u postojeći sustav generacije neuroloških pitanja, rezultat sustava kraja do kraja postigne postignuće stanje umjetnosti za generaciju pitanja na razini odstavka za čitanje razumijevanja.', 'id': 'A first step in the task of automatically generating questions for testing reading comprehension is to identify question-worthy sentences, i.e. sentences in a text passage that humans find it worthwhile to ask questions about.  We propose a hierarchical neural sentence-level sequence tagging model for this task, which existing approaches to question generation have ignored.  The approach is fully data-driven - with no sophisticated NLP pipelines or any hand-crafted rules/features - and compares favorably to a number of baselines when evaluated on the SQuAD data set.  Ketika terlibat dalam sistem generasi pertanyaan saraf yang ada, sistem akhir-akhir hasilnya mencapai prestasi terbaik untuk generasi pertanyaan tingkat paragraf untuk membaca pemahaman.', 'ko': '읽기 이해 능력을 측정하는 데 사용되는 문제를 자동으로 생성하는 첫 번째 단계는 문제가 있는 문장을 식별하는 것이다. 즉, 텍스트에서 인류가 질문할 만한 문장을 식별하는 것이다.이 문제에 대해 우리는 차원화된 신경 문장급 서열 표기 모델을 제기했는데 기존의 문제 생성 방법은 모두 이 점을 소홀히 했다.이런 방법은 완전히 데이터 구동이다. 복잡한 NLP 파이프나 수동으로 작성된 규칙/기능이 없다. 팀의 데이터 집합을 평가할 때 많은 기선에 비해 유리하다.기존의 신경 문제 생성 시스템에 통합될 때 발생하는 단말기부터 단말기까지 시스템은 읽기와 이해의 단락급 문제 생성에 있어 가장 선진적인 성능에 이르렀다.', 'sw': 'Hatua ya kwanza katika jukumu la kutengeneza maswali kwa kujitegemea kwa ajili ya kujaribu kusoma ukomo ni kutambua sentence zinazostahili, yaani hukumu kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maandishi ambazo binadamu wanaona inastahili wakati wa kuuliza maswali kuhusu. Tunazipendekeza modeli ya wimbo wa kiungo cha sentenca kwa kiwango cha upande wa ubongo wa kidini kwa kazi hii, ambayo inakaribia kuuliza vizazi vinavyopuuzwa. The approach is fully data-driven - with no sophisticated NLP pipelines or any hand-crafted rules/features - and compares favorably to a number of baselines when evaluated on the SQuAD data set.  When incorporated into an existing neural question generation system, the resulting end-to-end system achieves state-of-the-art performance for paragraph-level question generation for reading comprehension.', 'tr': 'Okuma anlaması i çin soruları otomatik olarak oluşturmak için ilk adım, yani sorulara değerli cümleleri tanımmak, yani insanların soruları sormak için değerli olduğunu söylüyorlar. Biz bu zadyň üçin bir iýerarhiýa näyrarşik sözlemler derejesi taýýarlama nusgasyny teklip edip görýäris. Bu mesele üçin bar soraglaryň döredilmesine gollanýar. Bu metod tamamen veri sürüjilidir - sofistikli NLP pipelini ýöne hiç hili elimde çapılan kural/özellikler ýöne - we SQuAD veri düzeninde değerlenýän wagtlar birnäçe baselini gollaşdyrýar. Öň bar bir näurul soragy generalizasy sistemasyna girişildi bolsa, netijesi soňra-soňra sistemasy paýlaşmak üçin paragraf derejesi soragy döretmäge ýetip barýar.', 'fa': 'اولین قدم در کار تولید سوالات برای آزمایش درک خواندن است که جمله\u200cهای ارزشمند سوال، یعنی جمله\u200cهای در گذشته\u200cی متن که مردم آن را ارزشمند می\u200cیابند تا درباره\u200cی سوالات بپرسند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل نقاشی طبقه\u200cی طبقه\u200cی عصبی برای این کار، که نزدیک\u200cهای موجود برای نسل\u200cهای سوال نادیده گرفته است. دسترسی کاملاً با داده\u200cهای راهنمایی است - با هیچ خطوط لوله\u200cهای NLP متفاوت یا هیچ قوانین/ویژگی\u200cهای دستی ساخته شده - و با تعداد خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی در حالی که بر مجموعه داده\u200cهای SQuAD ارزیابی می\u200cشود با مقایسه می\u200cکند. زمانی که در سیستم نسل\u200cهای عصبی وجود دارد، سیستم پایان به پایان رسیده است که به عنوان نسل\u200cهای سؤال\u200cهای طبقه\u200cی پاراگراف برای خواندن درک می\u200cرسد.', 'af': "'n Eerste stap in die taak van automaties genereer vrae vir toets van lees verstandigheid is om vraag-waarde setinge te identifiseer, t.d. setinge in 'n teks wagwag wat mense dit waarde vind om vrae oor te vra. Ons voorstel 'n hierarkies neurale sentrale vlak sekwensie merking model vir hierdie taak, wat bestaande toegang tot vraag genereering het geïgnoreer. Die toegang is volledig data-gedryf - met geen sofistikeerde NLP-pyplyne of enige hand-krafte reëls/funksies - en vergelyk guns met 'n aantal basisline wanneer geevalueer word op die SQuAD-data stel. Wanneer in 'n bestaande neurale vraag generasie stelsel inkorporeer is, word die resultaat end-to-end stelsel bereik staat-van-kuns-prestasie vir paragraafvlak vraag generasie vir lees verstaan.", 'sq': 'Një hap i parë në detyrën e krijimit automatik të pyetjeve për testimin e kuptimit të leximit është të identifikohen fjalët e vlefshme për pyetje, pra fjalët në një kalim teksti për të cilin njerëzit e gjejnë të vlefshme të bëjnë pyetje. Ne propozojmë një model hierarkik të shënimit të sekuencës së nivelit të fjalëve nervore për këtë detyrë, të cilin metodat ekzistuese për gjenerimin e pyetjeve kanë injoruar. Përqasja është krejtësisht e drejtuar nga të dhënat - pa tubacione të sofistikuara NLP apo ndonjë rregull/karakteristikë të ndërtuar me dorë - dhe krahasohet favorisht me një numër linjash bazë kur vlerësohet në grupin e të dhënave SQuAD. Kur përfshihet në një sistem ekzistues të gjenerimit të pyetjeve nervore, sistemi përfundimtar përfundimtar arrin performancë më të lartë për gjenerimin e pyetjeve në nivelin e paragrafit për kuptimin e leximit.', 'am': 'የመጀመሪያ ደረጃ በሥርዓት ለማንበብ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፈተን የጥያቄ ቃላትን ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ የሥርዓት ደረጃ የደረጃ ተቃውሞ ማተሚያ ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የሥርዓት መግለጫ በሙሉ ዳታ-የተነካ - የNLP ፕላንዶች ወይም የሥርዓት/ምርጫዎች ሳይኖር እጆቹ እጁ/መክፈቻ ሳይኖር - እናም SQuAD ዳታ ማሰናከል በተለየ ቁጥር በመስመር ላይ በሚያሳየው ብዛት በመስመር ይታሰራል፡፡ በተገኘው የደዌብ ጥያቄ ትውልድ ስርዓት ውስጥ በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ፣ የፍጻሜው መጨረሻ ሲስተም ለጥያቄ-ደረጃ ጥያቄ ትውልድ ለመነበብ ጥያቄ ትውልድ የጥያቄ ትውልድ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Առաջին քայլը հարցեր ավտոմատ ստեղծելու գործում ընթերցման ընկալումների փորձարկումների համար հարցեր է հայտնաբերել հարցերի արժանի նախադասությունները, այսինքն, նախադասությունները տեքստի հատվածում, որոնց մասին մարդիկ արժանի են հարցեր տալ: We propose a hierarchical neural sentence-level sequence tagging model for this task, which existing approaches to question generation have ignored.  Այս մոտեցումը ամբողջովին հիմնված է տվյալների վրա, առանց բարդ ՆԼՊ խողովակաշարերի կամ ձեռքով ստեղծված կանոնների և առանձնահատկությունների, և համեմատում է SQUADի տվյալների համակարգում գնահատվող բազմաթիվ հիմնական գծերի հետ: When incorporated into an existing neural question generation system, the resulting end-to-end system achieves state-of-the-art performance for paragraph-level question generation for reading comprehension.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রশ্ন তৈরি করার জন্য প্রথম পদক্ষেপ হচ্ছে প্রশ্নের যোগ্য বাক্য চিহ্নিত করার জন্য, যেমন একটি টেক্সট পাসেজে মানুষ এটা প্রশ্ন কর আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি হিয়ারার্কিল নিউরেক্যাল বাক্য-স্তরের সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি, যা প্রশ্নের প্রজন্মের প্ এই পদ্ধতি পুরোপুরি ডাটা চালানো হয়েছে - এনএলপি পাইপেলাইন বা কোন হাতের হাতের হাতের নিয়ম/বৈশিষ্ট্য নেই- এবং SQuAD ডাটা সেটে মানানোর সময় সংখ্যা বেস যখন বিদ্যমান নিউরেল প্রশ্নের প্রজন্ম সিস্টেমে যোগ দেয়া হয়, তখন সমাপ্তি শেষ পর্যন্ত শেষ-শিল্প প প্রজন্মের জন্য প্যাপ্যারাফ-লেভ প্রশ্নের', 'az': 'Özlərini oxumaq üçün sual yaratmaq məqsədilə ilk adım - sual-qiymətli cümlələri təsdiqləmək, məqsədilə insanların soruşmaları haqqında değerli olduğunu görən mətn keçmişində sözləri təsdiqləməkdir. Biz bu işlər üçün hiyerarşik nörarşik sözlər-seviyyəti etiketləmə modeli təklif edirik, ki, sual nəsillərinin məlumatlarına gələn yaxınlıqları görmədi. Yaxınlıq tamamilə verilən məlumatlardır - sofistiklənmiş NLP boru xətirləri və hər hansı bir əl quruları/xüsusiyyətləri olmayan - və SQuAD veri quruluğunda değerləndirilən baz xətirlərin sayısına qarşılaşdırır. Mevcut bir nöral sual nəsli sisteminə daxil olunduqda, sonuç-sona qədər sistemin parraf seviyyəti sual nəslinə görə parraf-seviyyəti sual nəslinə nəsib olunur.', 'cs': 'Prvním krokem v úkolu automatického generování otázek pro testování porozumění čtení je identifikace vět hodných otázek, tj. vět v textové pasáži, na které lidé považují za vhodné položit otázky. Pro tento úkol navrhujeme hierarchický model sekvence na úrovni neuronových vět, který existující přístupy k generování otázek ignorovaly. Tento přístup je plně datově řízený a bez sofistikovaných NLP potrubí nebo ručně vytvořených pravidel/funkcí a při vyhodnocování datové sady SQuAD se příznivě srovnává s řadou základních linek. Při začlenění do stávajícího systému generování neuronových otázek dosahuje výsledný komplexní systém nejmodernějšího výkonu pro generování otázek na úrovni odstavců pro porozumění čtení.', 'ca': "Un primer pas en la tasca de generar automàticament preguntes per provar la comprensió de la lectura és identificar frases dignes de preguntes, és a dir, frases en un passage de text que els humans consideren valable fer preguntes sobre. Proposem un model jeràrquic de seqüència neuronal de següència a nivell de frases per a aquesta tasca, que els enfocaments existents en la generació de preguntes han ignorat. L'enfocament està plenament basat en les dades - sense conductes sofisticats del NLP ni cap regla/característica artificial - i es compara favorablement amb algunes línies de base quan es valora en el conjunt de dades SQuAD. Quan s'incorpora en un sistema de generació de preguntes neurals existent, el sistema final a final resultant aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat per a generar preguntes a nivell paràgraf per a entendre la lectura.", 'et': 'Esimene samm lugemise mõistmiseks automaatselt küsimuste genereerimise ülesandes on tuvastada küsimusväärsed laused ehk laused tekstilõigus, mille kohta inimesed peavad küsimusi väärtuslikuks. Pakume välja hierarhilise neuraalse lausetaseme järjestuse märgistamise mudeli, mida olemasolevad lähenemisviisid küsimuste genereerimisele on ignoreerinud. Lähenemisviis on täielikult andmepõhine – ilma keerukate NLP torujuhtmeteta või käsitsi valmistatud reeglite/funktsioonideta – ja võrreldakse SQuAD andmekogumi alusel hinnatuna soodsalt paljude lähtejoontega. Olemasolevasse närviküsimuste genereerimise süsteemi integreerimisel saavutab tulemusel lõiketasandi küsimuste genereerimise tipptasemel tulemus lugemise mõistmiseks.', 'fi': 'Ensimmäinen askel automaattisten kysymysten luomisessa lukemisen ymmärtämisen testaamiseen on kartoittaa kysymyksenvaraisia lauseita eli lauseita tekstipätsissä, joista ihmisten mielestä kannattaa kysyä. Ehdotamme tehtävään hierarkkista neurolausetason sekvenssimallia, jonka nykyiset lähestymistavat kysymysten tuottamiseen ovat jättäneet huomiotta. Lähestymistapa on täysin datapohjainen – eikä siinä ole kehittyneitä NLP-putkistoja tai käsintehtyjä sääntöjä/ominaisuuksia – ja sitä verrataan suotuisasti useisiin peruslinjoihin SQuAD-tietoaineistossa arvioitaessa. Kun se on yhdistetty olemassa olevaan neurokysymysteknologiajärjestelmään, tuloksena oleva end-to-end-järjestelmä saavuttaa huippuluokan suorituskyvyn kappaleen tason kysymysteknologiaan lukemisen ymmärtämiseksi.', 'bs': 'Prvi korak u zadatku automatskog generiranja pitanja za testiranje razumijevanja čitanja je identifikacija rečenica vrijednih pitanja, tj. rečenica u tekstskom prolazu o kojoj ljudi nalaze vrijedno pitanja. Predlažemo hijerarhički model označavanja nivoa neuralnih rečenica za ovaj zadatak, koji su postojeći pristupi generaciji pitanja ignorirali. Pristup je potpuno vođen podacima - bez sofisticiranih cijevi NLP-a ili bilo kakvih pravila/karakteristika na rukama - i uspoređuje favoritetno sa brojem početnih linija kada se procjenjuje na setu podataka SQuAD-a. Kada se uključuje u postojeći sistem generacije neuroloških pitanja, rezultat sustava kraja do kraja postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti za generaciju pitanja na nivou paragrafa za čitanje razumijevanja.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan kelompok ing nggawe layar kanggo ujian sisa luwih ame Name Defs when this is inserted in an open question question', 'ha': "Tsarin na farko a cikin aikin da aka ƙãga masu tambayar ta farat ɗaya dõmin a jarraba matsayin karãtunsa, shine kawai ya gane cewa tsarin masu inganci, misali, cikin wata takarda matsayi wanda mutum yana da amfani da shi idan an tambaye su tambayi masu tambaya. Tuna goyyar da wani misãlin tagogi na daban-daraja na hierrrchical neural wa wannan aikin, wanda yana da amfani da wajen tambayar ta ba'a ƙyale. Tsarin ya zama cikakken da data-da ba'a da sofi-lissafi na NLP ko wani shiryoyin/shiryoyin hannayen-hannayen-kuma yana daidaita da mafi kyauta zuwa wasu bango idan an ƙayyade kan data na SQuAD. Idan an haɗa shi cikin wani na'urar tsarin tsarin masu tambayar neura, tsarin ta ƙara-zuwa-ƙara ya sami babban-mai-sanar wa danna-matsalar-daraja wa karantawa.", 'sk': 'Prvi korak v nalogi avtomatičnega ustvarjanja vprašanj za testiranje bralnega razumevanja je prepoznavanje vprašanj vrednih stavkov, tj. stavkov v besedilnem odlomku, o katerih se ljudje zdijo vredni postavljati vprašanja. Za to nalogo predlagamo hierarhični model označevanja zaporedja stavkov, ki ga obstoječi pristopi k ustvarjanju vprašanj ignorirajo. Pristop je popolnoma podatkovno usmerjen – brez naprednih plinovodov NLP ali ročno izdelanih pravil/funkcij – in se pri ocenjevanju podatkovnega nabora SQuAD ugodno primerja s številnimi osnovnimi linijami. Ko je vključen v obstoječi sistem za ustvarjanje nevronskih vprašanj, nastali sistem od konca do konca doseže najsodobnejšo zmogljivost za ustvarjanje vprašanj na ravni odstavka za razumevanje branja.', 'he': 'צעד ראשון במשימה של ליצור שאלות באופן אוטומטי לבדיקת הבנה בקריאה הוא לזהות משפטים ראויים לשאלות, כלומר משפטים במעבר טקסט שבני אדם מוצאים את זה ראוי לשאול שאלות עליו. אנו מציעים דוגמא רצף משפט עצבי היררכי למשימה הזו, אשר הגישויים הקיומים לדור שאלות התעלמו ממנו. הגישה מונעת לגמרי על נתונים - בלי צינורות NLP מתוחכמים או כללי/תכונות ידיים - ומשווות באופן חיובי למספר קווי בסיס כאשר שווים על קבוצת נתונים SQuAD. כאשר נכנס למערכת דורת שאלות עצביות קיימת, מערכת הסוף לסוף משיגה ביצועים חדשים עבור דורת שאלות ברמה של פראגמה כדי להבין קריאה.', 'bo': 'ལྟ་ཀློག་ནི་ལྟ་བུ་ཚོར་བཤད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་ཐོག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ལས་གནད་དོན་དག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལྡན་པའི་ཚི ང་ཚོས་རིམ་པ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་རིགས་དབྱིབས་སྐྱེལ་གྱི་མིང་ཚིག་གི་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The approach is fully data-driven - with no sophisticated NLP pipelines or any hand-crafted rules/features - and compares favorably to a number of baselines when evaluated on the SQuAD data set. དེ་ཡང་མ་ཤེས་པའི་དུས་འཚོལ་བ་དང་ཅུང་གི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྲིད་པའི་དུས་འཚོལ་བ་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་བསྡུར་མི་སྒྲིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་འཛུགས་'}
{'en': 'Cascaded Attention based Unsupervised Information Distillation for Compressive Summarization', 'ar': 'تقطير المعلومات غير الخاضع للإشراف المستند إلى الانتباه للتلخيص الضاغط', 'es': 'Destilación de información no supervisada basada en la atención en cascada para la sumarización compresiva', 'fr': "Distillation d'informations non supervisée basée sur l'attention en cascade pour la synthèse compressive", 'pt': 'Destilação de informação não supervisionada baseada em atenção em cascata para sumarização compressiva', 'ja': '圧縮要約のための監督されていない情報蒸留に基づくカスケード注意', 'zh': '盖级联注意者无监督提炼,以压缩汇总', 'hi': 'संकुचित Summarization के लिए कैस्केडेड ध्यान आधारित असुरक्षित सूचना आसवन', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемая информационная дистилляция с каскадным вниманием для компрессионного суммирования', 'ga': 'Driogadh Faisnéise Neamh-mhaoirsithe Bunaithe ar Aird le haghaidh Achoimriú Comhbhrúiteach', 'ka': 'კომპრესიური კომპრესიფიკაციისთვის შესაძლებელი ინფორმაციის განსხვავება', 'hu': 'Kaszkádos figyelem alapú felügyelet nélküli információs desztilláció kompressziós összefoglaláshoz', 'el': 'Μη επιτηρούμενη απόσταξη πληροφοριών βασισμένη σε Cascade Προσοχή για συμπιεστική Σύνοψη', 'kk': 'Сығу тұжырымдамасының көмегімен сақталмаған мәліметтің бөлігі', 'lt': 'Kaskadinis dėmesys, grindžiamas neaprižiūrima informacijos distiliacija kompresinei santraukai', 'it': "Distillazione di informazioni non sorvegliate basata sull'attenzione a cascata per la sintesi compressiva", 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Distillasi Maklumat Tidak Dikawal Berasas Perhatian Terkadang untuk Penapisan Pemampat', 'mt': 'Distillazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Mhux Sorveljata bbażata fuq Attenzjoni Kaskata għal Sommarju Kompressiv', 'mn': 'Cascaded Attention based Unsupervised Information Distillation for Compressive Summarization', 'ml': 'കാസ്കേഡ് ചെയ്ത ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിതരണം', 'no': 'Cascaded Attention Based Unsupported Information Distillation for Compressive Summarization', 'pl': 'Kaskadowa destylacja informacji oparta na uwadze nienadzorowanej do podsumowania kompresyjnego', 'ro': 'Distilare de informații nesupravegheate bazată pe atenție în cascadă pentru sintetizare compresivă', 'sr': 'Kaskadirana pažnja na osnovu neodreðene informacije za kompresivnu sažetku', 'si': 'සම්ප්\u200dරේෂක සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා සංශ්\u200dයාපනය නැති සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා සංශ', 'so': 'Cascaded Attention based Unsupervised Information Distribution for Compressive Summary', 'sv': 'Kaskadad uppmärksamhetsbaserad icke övervakad information Destillation för kompressiv sammanfattning', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத தகவல் பகிர்வு', 'ur': 'کیسکڈ ڈھیر بنیاد غیر محافظت معلومات حفاظت', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Pha trộn tinh thần chú ý dựa trên Không giám sát, phân tách thông tin về tổng hợp.', 'bg': 'Каскадирана дестилация на неконтролирана информация въз основа на вниманието за компресивно обобщаване', 'da': 'Cascaded Attention Baseret Usovervåget Information Destillation til kompressiv summering', 'nl': 'Cascaded Attention based Unsupervised Information Distillation voor Compressieve Samenvatting', 'de': 'Cascaded Attention Based Unsupervised Information Destillation für kompressive Summarisation', 'id': 'Distillasi Informasi Tidak Tersupervisi Berdasarkan Perhatian Dikaskadi untuk Ringkasan Kompresif', 'ko': '등급 연결 주의 기반의 무감독 정보 추출 압축 요약', 'sw': 'Kushikiliwa kwa hisia zisizo na taarifa zisizoangaliwa kwa ajili ya Mkutano Mkuu wa Kushinikiza', 'hr': 'Kaskadirana pažnja temeljena na neodređenoj distribuciji informacija za kompresivnu sažetak', 'fa': 'توجه\u200cای که بر اساس محافظت اطلاعات غیرقابل حفاظت برای محافظت پیچیده', 'af': 'Cascaded Aansig gebaseer Ononderwerpende Informasie Versteling vir Kompresiewe Opsomming', 'sq': 'Distillimi i Informacionit të Pambikqyrur bazuar në vëmendjen e Cascaded për përmbledhjen kompresive', 'am': 'Unsupervised Information Distillation for Compressive Summary', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Kompressiv ToplaŇüdńĪrma m…ôlumatńĪ', 'bn': 'কমপ্রিস্টিভ সংক্রান্ত তথ্য বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে', 'tr': 'Sykyn Iňleşligi üçin Gaýd Etmeýän Maglumat', 'cs': 'Kaskádová pozornost založená na nekontrolované informační destilaci pro kompresní shrnutí', 'fi': 'Cascaded Attention based Unsupervised Information Distillation for Compression Summarization', 'bs': 'Kaskadirana pažnja bazirana na neodređenoj informaciji za kompresivnu sažetku', 'ca': "Destillació d'informació sense supervisió basada en atenció cascada", 'et': 'Kaskadeeritud tähelepanu põhinev järelevalveta teabe destillatsioon kompressiivse kokkuvõtte jaoks', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Kaskadna destilacija nenadzorovanih informacij na osnovi pozornosti za kompresivno povzemanje', 'he': 'תשומת לב מובססת דיסטילציה של מידע ללא השגחה לסיוריזציה מדכאת', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'མཆོང་རྡེབ་ཀྱི་བཅུད་སྡུད་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁྱབ་པར་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་གདོང་བསྡུར།'}
{'en': 'When people recall and digest what they have read for writing summaries, the important content is more likely to attract their attention. Inspired by this observation, we propose a cascaded attention based unsupervised model to estimate the salience information from the text for compressive multi-document summarization. The attention weights are learned automatically by an unsupervised data reconstruction framework which can capture the sentence salience. By adding sparsity constraints on the number of output vectors, we can generate condensed information which can be treated as word salience. Fine-grained and coarse-grained sentence compression strategies are incorporated to produce compressive summaries. Experiments on some benchmark data sets show that our framework achieves better results than the state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'عندما يتذكر الناس ما قرأوه ويستوعبوه لكتابة الملخصات ، فمن المرجح أن يجذب المحتوى المهم انتباههم. مستوحاة من هذه الملاحظة ، نقترح نموذجًا متسلسلًا قائمًا على الانتباه غير خاضع للإشراف لتقدير المعلومات البارزة من النص من أجل تلخيص مضغوط متعدد المستندات. يتم التعرف على أوزان الانتباه تلقائيًا من خلال إطار عمل لإعادة بناء البيانات غير الخاضع للإشراف والذي يمكن أن يبرز أهمية الجملة. من خلال إضافة قيود التباين على عدد متجهات الإخراج ، يمكننا إنشاء معلومات مكثفة يمكن معاملتها على أنها كلمة بارزة. تم دمج استراتيجيات ضغط الجمل الدقيقة والخشنة لإنتاج ملخصات مضغوطة. تظهر التجارب على بعض مجموعات البيانات المعيارية أن إطار عملنا يحقق نتائج أفضل من أحدث الأساليب.', 'es': 'Cuando las personas recuerdan y digieren lo que han leído para escribir resúmenes, es más probable que el contenido importante atraiga su atención. Inspirados por esta observación, proponemos un modelo no supervisado basado en la atención en cascada para estimar la información destacada del texto para un resumen compresivo de varios documentos. Los pesos de atención se aprenden automáticamente mediante un marco de reconstrucción de datos no supervisado que puede capturar la prominencia de la oración. Al agregar restricciones de dispersión en el número de vectores de salida, podemos generar información condensada que puede tratarse como prominencia de palabras. Se incorporan estrategias de compresión de oraciones de grano fino y grueso para producir resúmenes compresivos. Los experimentos en algunos conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que nuestro marco logra mejores resultados que los métodos más avanzados.', 'fr': "Lorsque les gens se souviennent et digèrent ce qu'ils ont lu pour rédiger des résumés, le contenu important est plus susceptible d'attirer leur attention. En nous inspirant de cette observation, nous proposons un modèle non supervisé basé sur l'attention en cascade pour estimer les informations de saillance du texte pour une synthèse compressive de plusieurs documents. Les pondérations de l'attention sont apprises automatiquement par une structure de reconstruction de données non supervisée qui peut saisir la prépondérance de la phrase. En ajoutant des contraintes de parcimonie sur le nombre de vecteurs de sortie, nous pouvons générer des informations condensées qui peuvent être traitées comme des mots saillants. Des stratégies de compression de phrases fines et grossières sont incorporées pour produire des résumés compressifs. Des expériences sur certains ensembles de données de référence montrent que notre cadre donne de meilleurs résultats que les méthodes de pointe.", 'pt': 'Quando as pessoas lembram e digerem o que leram para escrever resumos, é mais provável que o conteúdo importante atraia sua atenção. Inspirados por esta observação, propomos um modelo não supervisionado baseado em atenção em cascata para estimar as informações de saliência do texto para sumarização multidocumento compressiva. Os pesos de atenção são aprendidos automaticamente por uma estrutura de reconstrução de dados não supervisionada que pode capturar a saliência da frase. Ao adicionar restrições de esparsidade no número de vetores de saída, podemos gerar informações condensadas que podem ser tratadas como saliência de palavras. Estratégias de compressão de sentenças de granulação fina e granular grossa são incorporadas para produzir resumos de compressão. Experimentos em alguns conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que nossa estrutura alcança melhores resultados do que os métodos de última geração.', 'ja': '人々が要約を書くために読んだ内容を思い出して消化すると、重要な内容が人々の注意を引く可能性が高くなります。この観察に触発されて、圧縮的なマルチドキュメントの要約のためにテキストから顕著性情報を推定するための、監督されていないモデルに基づいたカスケード注意を提案します。注意の重みは、監督されていないデータ再構築フレームワークによって自動的に学習され、文章の顕著さをキャプチャすることができます。出力ベクトルの数に希少性の制約を追加することで、単語の顕著性として扱うことができる凝縮された情報を生成することができます。細かい粒度と粗い粒度の文章圧縮戦略が組み込まれ、圧縮サマリーが生成されます。いくつかのベンチマークデータセットの実験は、当社のフレームワークが最先端の方法よりも優れた結果を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '人忆消其所读以撰摘要时,要在注意。 受此观发,发于级联者无监模,以度文本之显著性息,以压缩多文档总之。 权重无监数框架自学,当框架得句之显著性。 输向量添疏束,生成为单词显著性压缩信息。 合细粒度粗粒度之句压缩以成压缩摘要。 盖数据集之实验,吾框架贤于先进之道也。', 'hi': 'जब लोग सारांश लिखने के लिए जो कुछ भी पढ़ते हैं, उसे याद करते हैं और पचाते हैं, तो महत्वपूर्ण सामग्री उनका ध्यान आकर्षित करने की अधिक संभावना है। इस अवलोकन से प्रेरित होकर, हम संपीड़ित बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए पाठ से स्पष्टता जानकारी का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक कैस्केडेड ध्यान आधारित असुरक्षित मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। ध्यान वजन स्वचालित रूप से एक असुरक्षित डेटा पुनर्निर्माण ढांचे द्वारा सीखा जाता है जो वाक्य को पकड़ सकता है। आउटपुट वैक्टर की संख्या पर sparsity बाधाओं को जोड़कर, हम संघनित जानकारी उत्पन्न कर सकते हैं जिसे शब्द के रूप में माना जा सकता है। संकुचित सारांश का उत्पादन करने के लिए ठीक दानेदार और मोटे दाने वाले वाक्य संपीड़न रणनीतियों को शामिल किया जाता है। कुछ बेंचमार्क डेटा सेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा ढांचा अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Когда люди вспоминают и переваривают то, что они прочитали для написания резюме, важный контент, скорее всего, привлечет их внимание. Вдохновленные этим наблюдением, мы предлагаем каскадную модель, основанную на внимании, для оценки информации о значимости из текста для сжатого краткого изложения нескольких документов. Весовые коэффициенты внимания изучаются автоматически с помощью неконтролируемой структуры восстановления данных, которая может фиксировать значимость предложения. Добавляя ограничения разреженности к количеству выходных векторов, мы можем генерировать сжатую информацию, которую можно рассматривать как выраженность слова. Для получения сжатых сводок используются мелкозернистые и крупнозернистые стратегии сжатия предложений. Эксперименты с некоторыми базовыми наборами данных показывают, что наша система дает лучшие результаты, чем современные методы.', 'ga': 'Nuair a mheabhraíonn daoine agus nuair a dhéanann siad an méid a léigh siad chun achoimrí a scríobh, is mó an seans go dtarraingeoidh an t-ábhar tábhachtach a n-aird. Spreagtha ag an bhreathnóireacht seo, molaimid múnla cascáideach aird-bhunaithe gan mhaoirseacht chun an t-eolas suntas ón téacs a mheas le haghaidh achoimre comhbhrúiteach il-doiciméad. Foghlaimítear na meáchain aird go huathoibríoch trí chreat atógála sonraí gan mhaoirseacht ar féidir leis soiléireacht na habairte a ghabháil. Trí shrianta teimhneachta a chur leis an líon veicteoirí aschuir, is féidir linn faisnéis chomhdhlúite a ghiniúint ar féidir déileáil leis mar fhollasú focal. Ionchorpraítear straitéisí comhbhrú abairtí míne agus garbh chun achoimrí comhbhrúiteacha a tháirgeadh. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar roinnt tacair sonraí tagarmharcála go mbaineann ár gcreat torthaí níos fearr amach ná na modhanna úrscothacha.', 'hu': 'Amikor az emberek visszaemlékeznek és megemésztik, amit az összefoglalók írásához olvastak, a fontos tartalom nagyobb valószínűséggel vonzza fel figyelmüket. Ennek a megfigyelésnek a inspirálására egy felügyelet nélküli, kaszkádos figyelem alapú modellt javasolunk a szövegből származó kiemelkedő információk becslésére tömörítő többdokumentumos összefoglaláshoz. A figyelem súlyát automatikusan egy felügyelet nélküli adat rekonstrukciós keretrendszer tanulja, amely képes rögzíteni a mondat hangsúlyát. A kimeneti vektorok számára vonatkozó ritkasági korlátozások hozzáadásával olyan sűrített információkat generálhatunk, amelyek szó salience-ként kezelhetők. A finom szemű és durva szemű mondat tömörítési stratégiákat alkalmazzák a tömörítő összefoglalók készítéséhez. Néhány referenciaadatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy keretrendszerünk jobb eredményeket ér el, mint a legkorszerűbb módszerek.', 'el': 'Όταν οι άνθρωποι θυμούνται και αφομοιώνουν αυτά που έχουν διαβάσει για να γράψουν περιλήψεις, το σημαντικό περιεχόμενο είναι πιο πιθανό να προσελκύσει την προσοχή τους. Εμπνευσμένοι από αυτή την παρατήρηση, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο χωρίς επιτήρηση βασισμένο σε καταρράκτες προσοχής για την εκτίμηση των πληροφοριών σημαντικότητας από το κείμενο για συμπιεστική σύνοψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων. Τα βάρη προσοχής μαθαίνονται αυτόματα από ένα πλαίσιο ανασυγκρότησης δεδομένων χωρίς επίβλεψη που μπορεί να συλλάβει τη σημασία της πρότασης. Με την προσθήκη περιορισμών λιτότητας στον αριθμό των διανυσμάτων εξόδου, μπορούμε να παράγουμε συμπυκνωμένες πληροφορίες οι οποίες μπορούν να αντιμετωπιστούν ως σημαίνοντας λέξεις. Οι λεπτόκοκκες και χονδρόκοκκες στρατηγικές συμπίεσης προτάσεων ενσωματώνονται για την παραγωγή συμπιεστικών περιλήψεων. Τα πειράματα σε ορισμένα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από τις μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'როდესაც ადამიანები შემხსენებენ და გახსენებენ, რაც კითხვა საქაღალდეებისთვის, მნიშვნელოვანი შემდგომარები უფრო უფრო შესაძლებელია, რომ მითვი ამ მონაცემების გამოყენებული, ჩვენ მოვეხსენებთ კასკადის მონაცემების დაბაზეული არსუპერვისტური მოდელს, რომ ტექსტიდან სუპერვისტურის ინფორმაციას კომპრესიური მრავალე დო აღმოჩენების სიმაღლე ავტომატურად აღწერა, რომელიც შეუძლია აღმოჩენოთ სიმაღლე. შეგვიძლია შევქმნა კონდენსტური ინფორმაცია, რომელიც სიტყვების სულისხმებით იქნება. კომპრესის სტრატიგიების კომპრესის სტრატიგიები დაყენებულია კომპრესიური კომპრესიური კომპრესიური კომპრესიური კომპრესიური კომპრესი ექსპერიმენტები მარტივის მონაცემების კონფერიმენტების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი კონფერიმენტები უკეთესი შესახებ, ვიდრე მსგავსი მეტისები', 'it': "Quando le persone ricordano e digeriscono ciò che hanno letto per scrivere riassunti, il contenuto importante è più probabile che attiri la loro attenzione. Ispirati da questa osservazione, proponiamo un modello senza supervisione basato sull'attenzione a cascata per stimare le informazioni salienti dal testo per la sintesi compressiva multi-documento. I pesi dell'attenzione vengono appresi automaticamente da un framework di ricostruzione dei dati non supervisionato che può catturare la salienza della frase. Aggiungendo vincoli di sparsità sul numero di vettori di output, possiamo generare informazioni condensate che possono essere trattate come salienza di parola. Le strategie di compressione delle frasi a grana fine e grossolana sono incorporate per produrre riassunti compressivi. Esperimenti su alcuni set di dati di benchmark dimostrano che il nostro framework raggiunge risultati migliori rispetto ai metodi più avanzati.", 'lt': 'Kai žmonės prisimena ir virškina tai, ką skaitė apibendrinant santraukas, svarbus turinys labiau pritrauks savo dėmesį. Įkvėptas iš šios pastabos, mes siūlome sutrumpintą dėmesio, pagrįstą nepastebimu modeliu, kuriuo remiantis būtų galima įvertinti tekste pateiktą informaciją apie smulkią daugiadokumentę santrauką. Atkreipiamasis svoris automatiškai mokomas naudojant nepastebimą duomenų atstatymo sistemą, kuri gali atspindėti sakinio išraišką. Pridėdami spartumo apribojimus išėjimo vektorių skaičiui, galime sukurti kondensuotą informaciją, kuri gali būti laikoma žodžio druska. Siekiant sudaryti kompresines santraukas, įtraukiamos smulkiai grūdintos ir stambiai grūdintos frazės suspaudimo strategijos. Experiments on some benchmark data sets show that our framework achieves better results than the state-of-the-art methods.', 'kk': 'Адамдар жазу үшін оқиғаларын еске салу және хабарлау үшін, маңызды мазмұны өздерінің маңызды тәртіпке жеткізеді. Бұл бақылау бойынша, біз көп құжатты жыйымдастыру үшін мәтіндегі салиент мәліметін бағалау үшін каскадтық назарды негіздеген үлгісін қолданамыз. Сөздерді қайта құру бағдарламасынан автоматты түрде оқылмайды. Бұл сөздерді қайта құруға болады. Шығыс векторлардың санына кеңістік шектеулерді қосу арқылы, сөздердің солиялығы ретінде қатынауға болатын арналған мәліметті құра аламыз. Қызықты және қарқынышты сұлбаны сығыстыру стратегиялары сығыстырылған тұлбаттарды құру үшін қолданылады. Кейбір бағдарламалық деректер жиындарының тәжірибелері, бағдарламалық жұмыс әдістерінен жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Кога луѓето се сеќаваат на тоа што го читаат за да пишуваат резултати, важната содржина најверојатно ќе го привлече нивното внимание. Инспириран од оваа набљудување, предлагаме каскадиран ненадгледуван модел базиран на внимание за проценка на информациите за славноста од текстот за компресивна мултидокументарна резултатација. Теговите на вниманието се научуваат автоматски со ненадгледувана рамка за реконструкција на податоци која може да ја прифати ослободувањето на реченицата. Со додавање на ограничувања на брзината на бројот на излезни вектори, можеме да генерираме кондензирани информации кои можат да се третираат како зборови ослободување. Стратегии за компресија на речениците се вклучени со фино зелени и грубо зелени реченици за производство на компресивни реченици. Експериментите на некои набори на податоци покажуваат дека нашата рамка постигнува подобри резултати од најсовремените методи.', 'ms': 'Apabila manusia mengingat dan menggali apa yang mereka baca untuk menulis ringkasan, kandungan penting lebih mungkin akan menarik perhatian mereka. DiInspirasikan oleh pengamatan ini, kami melaporkan sebuah model yang tidak diawasi berdasarkan perhatian yang berkacad untuk menghargai maklumat salience dari teks untuk penghuraian multi-dokumen yang memampat. The attention weights are learned automatically by an unsupervised data reconstruction framework which can capture the sentence salience.  Dengan menambah keterangan kecepatan pada bilangan vektor output, kita boleh menghasilkan maklumat berkondensasi yang boleh dianggap sebagai salience perkataan. Strategi pemampatan kalimat yang berkulit ganda dan berkulit tebal disertai untuk menghasilkan ringkasan pemampatan. Eksperimen pada beberapa set data benchmark menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kita mencapai keputusan yang lebih baik daripada kaedah-kaedah terbaik.', 'mt': 'Meta n-nies ifakkru u jiddiġeraw dak li qaraw biex jiktbu sommarji, il-kontenut importanti huwa aktar probabbli li jattira l-attenzjoni tagħhom. Inspirat minn din l-osservazzjoni, qed nipproponu mudell mhux sorveljat ibbażat fuq attenzjoni kaskata biex tiġi stmata l-informazzjoni dwar is-salienza mit-test għas-sommarju kompressiv ta’ diversi dokumenti. Il-piżijiet ta’ attenzjoni jitgħallmu awtomatikament minn qafas ta’ rikostruzzjoni tad-dejta mhux sorveljat li jista’ jaqbad is-salinza tas-sentenza. Billi żżid restrizzjonijiet ta’ sparsità fuq in-numru ta’ vetturi tal-output, nistgħu niġġeneraw informazzjoni kkondensata li tista’ tiġi ttrattata bħala salienza tal-kelma. L-istrateġiji ta’ kompressjoni tas-sentenza bil-ħbub fin u bil-ħbub groż huma inkorporati biex jipproduċu sommarji kompressivi. L-esperimenti fuq xi settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza juru li l-qafas tagħna jikseb riżultati aħjar mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'ml': 'ആളുകള്\u200d വേണ്ടി വായിക്കുന്നത് ഓര്\u200dക്കുകയും കുഴിക്കുകയും ചെയ്താല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d അവരുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാ ഈ കാഴ്ചപ്രകാരം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ശ്രദ്ധ നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. മുഴുവന്\u200d രേഖകള സൂക്ഷിച്ചില്ലാത്ത ഡേറ്റാ പുനരുമാറ്റുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം പഠിച്ച പുറപ്പെട്ട വെക്റ്ററുകളുടെ എണ്ണത്തിന്റെ സ്പെയിസിറ്റി നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്താല്\u200d നമുക്ക് കോണ്\u200dഡന്\u200dസ് ചെയ്ത സുന്ദരിതമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കാനുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ചില ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- കല', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс дундаж бичээд уншсан зүйлсийг санаж, хайрлах үед чухал тодорхойлолт нь тэдний анхаарлыг татах магадлал юм. Энэ ажиглалтаас гайхшруулсан нь бид олон баримт жинхэнэ дүгнэлт хийх текстээс дамжин мэдээллийг тооцоолох боломжгүй загварын үндсэн анхаарлыг санал болгож байна. Анхаарлын хэмжээ автоматжуулан өгөгдлийн дахин сэргээх хэлбэрээр автоматжуулан суралцдаг. Энэ нь өгөгдлийн дахин сэргээх хэлбэрээр илэрхийлж чадна. Ингээд хэдэн векторын тоо дээр жижиг хэмжээсүүдийг нэмэхэд бид үгнээс жижиг хэмжээсүүдийг бий болгож чадна. Саван тариа, саван тарианы жимс хэвлэх стратеги нь жимс нийлүүлэхэд бүрдүүлсэн. Зарим банкварт өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн туршилтууд бидний хэлбэрээс илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Når folk reknar på og koplar det dei har lesa for å skriva samandrag, er det viktige innhaldet mest sannsynleg å trekke oppmerksomheten sine. I denne observasjonen foreslår vi ein kaskadert oppmerksomhet basert på uverkjende modell for å vurdere saliensinformasjonen frå teksten for komprimering av fleire dokument. Merknadsverkene blir lært automatisk av eit ikkje oppretta datarekonstruksjonsframmeverk som kan henta setningslinjen. Ved å leggja til sparsitetsgrenser på talet på utgangsvektorar kan vi laga konsenserte informasjon som kan behandleast som ordsaliensjon. Dette er integrerte for å produsera komprimeringssamandrag med finn-korn og kryss-korn setningsstrategiar. Eksperimentar på nokre datasett for benchmarket viser at rammeverket vårt gjer bedre resultat enn kunstmetodane.', 'ro': 'Când oamenii își amintesc și digeră ceea ce au citit pentru a scrie rezumate, conținutul important este mai probabil să le atragă atenția. Inspirați de această observație, propunem un model nesupravegheat bazat pe atenție în cascadă pentru estimarea informațiilor esențiale din text pentru rezumarea compresivă multi-document. Greutatea atenției este învățată automat printr-un cadru de reconstrucție a datelor nesupravegheat, care poate capta saliența propoziției. Prin adăugarea constrângerilor de scară limitată asupra numărului vectorilor de ieșire, putem genera informații condensate care pot fi tratate ca saliență de cuvânt. Strategiile de compresie a frazelor cu granule fine și grosiere sunt încorporate pentru a produce rezumate compresive. Experimentele efectuate pe anumite seturi de date de referință arată că cadrul nostru obține rezultate mai bune decât metodele de ultimă generație.', 'pl': 'Kiedy ludzie przypominają sobie i trawią to, co przeczytały do pisania podsumowań, ważne treści są bardziej prawdopodobne, że przyciągną ich uwagę. Zainspirowany tą obserwacją proponujemy model kaskadowy oparty na uwadze bez nadzoru, aby oszacować istotność informacji z tekstu dla kompresyjnego podsumowania wielu dokumentów. Wagi uwagi uczą się automatycznie przez nienadzorowany framework rekonstrukcji danych, który może uchwycić wyraźność zdania. Dodając ograniczenia rzadkości liczby wektorów wyjściowych, możemy generować skondensowane informacje, które można traktować jako salience słowa. Drobnoziarniste i gruboziarniste strategie kompresji zdań są włączone do tworzenia podsumowań kompresyjnych. Eksperymenty na niektórych zestawach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że nasze ramy osiągają lepsze wyniki niż najnowocześniejsze metody.', 'sr': 'Kada se ljudi sjete i kopaju ono što su čitali za sažetke pisanja, važniji sadržaj je vjerojatniji da će privući njihovu pažnju. Inspirirano ovim posmatranjem, predlažemo kaskadiranu pažnju na osnovu neodređenog model a da procenimo informacije o salijanju teksta za kompresivnu sažetku višestrukog dokumenta. Težina pažnje se automatski nauči neodređen okvir za rekonstrukciju podataka koji može uhvatiti salijenciju rečenica. Dodajući ograničenja rezervnosti na broj vektora izlaza, možemo stvoriti kondenzirane informacije koje se mogu tretirati kao rečna salijencija. Стратегије компресирања приговора за добро зерно и грозно-зерно, које су включене за производ компресивних резюме. Eksperimenti na nekim grupama podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naš okvir postiže bolji rezultat od metoda stanja umjetnosti.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලියවන්න පුළුවන් දේවල් මතක් කරලා හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි ඔවුන්ගේ අවධ මේ බලාපොරොත්තුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි කැස්කේඩ් අවස්ථාවක් අධික අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාවක් නැති මො අවධානයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ නැති දත්ත නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරුණාකරණයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරම ප්\u200dරකාශ වෙක්ටර් සංඛ්යාවට ප්\u200dරතිකාශ අවධානය සම්බන්ධ කරලා අපිට පුළුවන් වෙක්ටර් සංඛ්යාවට ප්\u200dරතික හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් සහ කෝර්ස් ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් වාක්ය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ සංකීර්ණය සංකීර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා. බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත', 'sv': 'När människor minns och smälter vad de har läst för att skriva sammanfattningar är det mer sannolikt att det viktiga innehållet lockar deras uppmärksamhet. Inspirerad av denna observation föreslår vi en kaskadbaserad uppmärksamhetsbaserad oövervakad modell för att uppskatta den viktiga informationen från texten för komprimerande flerdokumentssammanfattning. Uppmärksamhet vikter lärs automatiskt av ett oövervakat datarekonstruktionsramverk som kan fånga meningen saliens. Genom att lägga till sparsitetsbegränsningar på antalet utgångsvektorer, kan vi generera kondenserad information som kan behandlas som ordsaliens. Finkorniga och grovkorniga fraskomprimeringsstrategier införlivas för att producera komprimerande sammanfattningar. Experiment på vissa referensdatauppsättningar visar att vårt ramverk ger bättre resultat än de senaste metoderna.', 'so': 'Marka dadku ay xusuustaan oo ay digtoonaadaan waxa ay akhriyeen qoraalka xagaaga ah, waxaa laga yaabaa in laga yaabaa in aad taxadar geliyo. Waxyaabahaas waxan la soo dhiibay, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qalabka aan la ilaalinayn, si aan u qiimeyno macluumaadka badbaadada ee warqadda laga soo qoro si uu u koobi karo summarinta warqada badan. The attention weights are learned automatically by an unsupervised data reconstruction framework which can capture the sentence salience.  Sida uu ku daro xaduudaha dhaqaalaha oo ku saabsan tirada wadooyinka soo baxa, waxaynu soo saari karnaa macluumaad la sameyn karo oo looga macaamiloon karo sida hadal saliid ah. Heshiiska hoos-dhigista ee qofka kooxaha lagu qabtay waxaa lagu qoraa si ay u soo saaraan xagaaga kooxaha. Imtixaanka qaar ka mid ah sawirada bangiga waxay muujiyaan in firaaqadeenu uu ka helaa mid ka wanaagsan qaababka farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'மக்கள் குறிப்பிட்ட காலத்திற்கு அவர்கள் படித்துள்ளதை நினைவில் மற்றும் அதிகமாக்கும் போது, முக்கியமான உள்ளடக் இந்த கண்காணிப்பினால் நாம் ஒரு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத மாதிரியின் கவனத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் பல- ஆவண சுருக்கம் செய்தலுக்கு உரையிலிர கவனம் எடைகள் தானாகவே காப்பாற்றப்படாத தகவல் மீட்டும் சட்டத்தால் கற்றப்பட்டுள்ளது. வாக்கு விற்பனை பிடிக்க முடியும். வெளியீட்டு வெக்டார்களின் எண்ணிக்கையில் சேர்க்கும் வெளியீட்டு வெளியீட்டு கட்டுப்பாடுகளை சேர்த்து, நாம்  நல்ல கிடைக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் தொகுதி கிடைக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கு சுருக்கம் சொருகுப்பொருளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு சேர்க்கப்பட் சில பெங்க்மார்க் தரவு அமைப்புகளில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் சிறந்த முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறது என்று தெர', 'ur': 'جب لوگوں نے اس بات کو یاد کرلیا اور دھوپ لیا ہے جو انہوں نے دھوپ لکھنے کے لئے پڑھی ہے، اس سے زیادہ مشکل ہے کہ ان کی توجہ اٹھائے جائیں۔ اس نظارت کے ذریعے ہم ایک کاسکڈ توجه کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو غیرقابل توجه کی مدل کی بنیاد رکھی گئی ہے تاکہ ایک متصل دکھانے کے لئے متصل کے متصل کی معلومات کی تقریبا کریں۔ توجه کی وزن اپنے ساتھ سکھائی جاتی ہے ایک غیر محفوظ ڈیٹا دوبارہ ساخت کرنا فرم کے ذریعہ جو مجلس کو پکڑ سکتا ہے۔ آئٹوٹ ویکتروں کی تعداد پر پرسیٹی محدودیت زیادہ کر کے، ہم کاندنسٹ معلومات پیدا کر سکتے ہیں جو کلمات سلینس کے طور پر سمجھ سکتے ہیں. پاکیزہ دانے اور کورس دانے کا مجلس کمپین استراتژی میں شامل ہوئی ہے کہ کمپین جمع کریں۔ کچھ بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے فرمود کے لحاظ سے بہتر نتائج حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Agar odamlar yozuvlar uchun o'quvchi narsalarni o'rganishni eslab qolganda, muhim tarkibi ularning eng muhim muhimligini o'ylab turadi. Bu taqdimot tomonidan imzolangan, biz qo'llanilmaydigan foydalanuvchi model asosida ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin, bir necha hujjat hisoblanuvchisini qiymatish uchun muvaffaqiyatli maʼlumotni hisoblash uchun. The attention weights are learned automatically by an unsupervised data reconstruction framework which can capture the sentence salience.  Name Name Bir nechta benchmark maʼlumot moslamalaridagi imtiyozlar esa, freymning uslubi davlatdan yaxshi natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Khi người ta nhớ lại và tiêu hóa những gì họ đã đọc để viết các bản tóm tắt, những nội dung quan trọng sẽ thu hút sự chú ý của họ hơn. Dựa trên quan sát này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tập trung dựa trên sự chú ý không giám sát để ước lượng thông tin nổi bật trong văn bản để tổng hợp các văn bản. Tập trung được học tự động bởi một cơ sở dữ liệu tái tạo mà không được giám sát có thể ghi nhận lời đề nghị. Bằng cách thêm hạn chế độ phân tán số các sinh vật có xuất, chúng ta có thể tạo ra thông tin đông đúc có thể được coi là lời nổi bật. Cấu hình các phần mềm và đoạn dày đặc được áp dụng để sản xuất các bản tóm tắt nén. Các thí nghiệm trên một số bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy khung cảnh đạt kết quả tốt hơn các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Когато хората си спомнят и смилат това, което са прочели за писане на резюмета, важното съдържание е по-вероятно да привлече вниманието им. Вдъхновени от това наблюдение, ние предлагаме каскаден модел, базиран на вниманието без надзор, за да се оцени важността на информацията от текста за компресивно многодокументално обобщаване. Тежестите на вниманието се научават автоматично от рамка за реконструкция на данни без надзор, която може да улови подчертаността на изречението. Чрез добавяне на ограничения по отношение на броя на изходните вектори, можем да генерираме кондензирана информация, която може да се третира като изразена дума. Финозърнестите и грубозърнестите стратегии за компресиране на изреченията са включени за изготвяне на компресивни резюмета. Експериментите с някои сравнителни набори от данни показват, че нашата рамка постига по-добри резултати от най-съвременните методи.', 'nl': 'Wanneer mensen onthouden en verwerken wat ze gelezen hebben voor het schrijven van samenvattingen, zal de belangrijke inhoud eerder hun aandacht trekken. Geïnspireerd door deze observatie, stellen we een cascaded attention based unsupervised model voor om de saliëntie informatie uit de tekst te schatten voor compressieve multi-document samenvatting. De aandachtsgewichten worden automatisch geleerd door een onbeheerd datareconstructieframework dat de zinssaliëntie kan vastleggen. Door sparsity beperkingen toe te voegen aan het aantal outputvectoren, kunnen we gecondenseerde informatie genereren die kan worden behandeld als woordsaliëntie. Fijn- en grofkorrelige zinnencompressiestrategieën worden verwerkt om compressieve samenvattingen te produceren. Experimenten op sommige benchmarkdatasets tonen aan dat ons framework betere resultaten behaalt dan de state-of-the-art methoden.', 'da': 'Når folk husker og fordøjer, hvad de har læst til at skrive resuméer, er det vigtige indhold mere tilbøjeligt til at tiltrække deres opmærksomhed. Inspireret af denne observation foreslår vi en kaskadebaseret opmærksomhedsbaseret model, der ikke overvåges, til at estimere de vigtigste oplysninger fra teksten til komprimerende multi-dokument resuméering. Opmærksomhedsvægtene læres automatisk af en uautoriseret datarekonstruktionsramme, der kan fange sætningens fremhævelse. Ved at tilføje spariditetsbegrænsninger på antallet af outputvektorer, kan vi generere kondenserede oplysninger, der kan behandles som ord salience. Finkornede og grovkornede sætningskompressionsstrategier er indarbejdet for at producere komprimerende resuméer. Eksperimenter med nogle benchmark datasæt viser, at vores rammer opnår bedre resultater end de nyeste metoder.', 'de': 'Wenn Menschen sich daran erinnern und verdauen, was sie gelesen haben, um Zusammenfassungen zu schreiben, ist es wahrscheinlicher, dass der wichtige Inhalt ihre Aufmerksamkeit auf sich zieht. Inspiriert von dieser Beobachtung schlagen wir ein kaskadiertes aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes unüberwachtes Modell vor, um die Salienz-Informationen aus dem Text für kompressive Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente zu schätzen. Die Aufmerksamkeitsgewichte werden automatisch von einem unbeaufsichtigten Datenrekonstruktionsframework gelernt, das die Satzsalienz erfassen kann. Durch Hinzufügen von Sparsity-Beschränkungen auf die Anzahl der Ausgabevektoren können wir kondensierte Informationen generieren, die als Wortsalienz behandelt werden können. Fein- und grobkörnige Satzkomprimierungsstrategien werden integriert, um komprimierende Zusammenfassungen zu erstellen. Experimente an einigen Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Framework bessere Ergebnisse erzielt als die modernsten Methoden.', 'id': 'Ketika orang mengingat dan menggali apa yang mereka baca untuk menulis ringkasan, isi penting lebih mungkin menarik perhatian mereka. Terinspirasi oleh pengamatan ini, kami mengusulkan perhatian yang berkaskade berdasarkan model yang tidak diawasi untuk memperkirakan informasi salinsi dari teks untuk pengumpulan kompresif multi-dokumen. Berat perhatian belajar secara otomatis oleh rangkaian rekonstruksi data yang tidak diawasi yang dapat menangkap kalimat salience. Dengan menambahkan batas kecepatan pada jumlah vektor output, kita dapat menghasilkan informasi kondensasi yang dapat diperlakukan sebagai salience kata. Strategi kompresi kalimat yang berkulit gandum dan berkulit tebal ditemukan untuk menghasilkan ringkasan kompresif. Experiments on some benchmark data sets show that our framework achieves better results than the state-of-the-art methods.', 'ko': '사람들이 총결산을 쓰기 위해 읽은 내용을 회상하고 소화할 때 중요한 내용이 더욱 그들의 주의를 끌 수 있다.이러한 관찰 결과의 계발을 받아 우리는 다중 연결의 주의를 바탕으로 하는 무감독 모델을 제시하여 텍스트의 현저한 정보를 추정하고 다중 문서의 요약을 압축하는 데 사용한다.주의권은 무감독 데이터 재구성 프레임워크에서 자동으로 학습되고 이 프레임워크는 문장의 현저성을 포착할 수 있다.출력 벡터의 수량에 희소성 제약을 추가함으로써 우리는 단어의 현저성으로 볼 수 있는 압축 정보를 생성할 수 있다.세립도와 굵은 입도의 문장 압축 전략을 이용하여 압축 요약을 생성한다.일부 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리의 구조가 가장 선진적인 방법보다 더 좋은 결과를 얻었다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'hr': 'Kada se ljudi sjete i kopaju ono što su čitali za sažetke pisanja, važniji sadržaj je vjerojatniji da će privući njihovu pažnju. Inspirirano ovim promatranjem, predlažemo kaskadiranu pažnju na osnovu neodređenog model a kako bi procijenili informacije o salijanju iz teksta za kompresivnu skupljanje višestrukog dokumenta. Težine pažnje automatski uče neodređeni okvir za rekonstrukciju podataka koji može uhvatiti salijenciju rečenica. Dodajući ograničenja rezerviteta na broj vektora izlaza, možemo stvoriti kondenzirane informacije koje se mogu tretirati kao salijanje riječi. Strategije kompresije kazne za fino zrno i krzno zrno uključene su za proizvodnju kompresivnih sažetaka. Eksperimenti na nekim grupama podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naš okvir postigne bolji rezultat od metoda stanja umjetnosti.', 'fa': 'وقتی مردم چیزی را که برای نوشتن جمع\u200cها خوانده\u200cاند یاد می\u200cآورند و می\u200cفهمند، محتوای مهم بیشتر احتمالاً توجهشان را جذب می\u200cکند. توسط این مشاهده، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل غیرقابل تحریک شده، توجه\u200cی کاسکیده\u200cای بر اساس مدل غیرقابل تحریک شده باشد تا اطلاعات استفاده از متن برای تحریک کردن مجموعه سند\u200cهای مجموعه را ارزیابی کند. وزن توجه به طور خودکار توسط یک چهارچوب بازسازی داده\u200cهای غیرقابل تحقیق یاد می\u200cگیرد که می\u200cتواند صفات جمله را بگیرد. با اضافه کردن محدودیت پارکیتی بر تعداد ویکتورهای نتیجه می\u200cتوانیم اطلاعات محدودیت را تولید کنیم که می\u200cتوانند به عنوان استفاده از کلمات درمان شوند. استراتژی\u200cهای فشار کردن جمله\u200cهای پاک\u200cدانه\u200cها و زراعت\u200cدانه\u200cها برای تولید جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای فشار جمع شده\u200cاند. تجربه\u200cهای بعضی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی نشان می\u200cدهند که چهارچوب ما نتایج بهتر از روش\u200cهای نقاشی هنر را می\u200cرساند.', 'tr': 'Adamlar öz toparyny ýazmak üçin okadyklaryny ýatlap pikir edeniňde, wajyp maksady olaryň ünsüni çekmesine köp pikir edýär. Bu observasyon tarapynda nähili möhüm-senediň jemgyýetişligi üçin metin üçin süýşiklik maglumatyny hasaplamak üçin kascada edilmedik bir nusga teklip berýäris. Diňleşme ağırlygy öz-özünden tassyklanmadyk bir maglumat ýene-inşa çerçevesi tarapyndan öwrenip bilýär. Bu sözleriň sözlerini çykyp tutup bilýär. Çıkış vektörlerinin sayısına küçük kısıtları eklerek, kelime salinsi olarak davranabilecek kanalı bilgi oluşturabiliriz. Garyp süýgüli we süýgüli sözler sykylamak strategiýasy sykylamak üçin guruldy. Käbir benchmark maglumaty düzeninde örän denetimler biziň çarpyşymyzyň sungat döwletlerinden has gowy netijelerimizi çykarýar.', 'sw': 'Wakati watu wanapokumbuka na kuheshimu kile walichokisoma kwa ajili ya kuandika kwa kiangazi cha kiangazi, maudhui muhimu yanaweza kuvutia hisia zao. Kuhamasishwa na mtazamo huu, tunapendekeza mtazamo uliofanywa na msimamo usioeleweka ili kudhani taarifa za hadhira kutoka ujumbe wa maandishi kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa nyaraka mbalimbali. Mitandiko ya kusikiliza yanajifunza kwa kujitegemea na mfumo wa ujenzi wa taarifa usiokuwa na upya ambao unaweza kuikamata hadhi ya hukumu. Kwa kuongeza vikwazo vya uchimbaji juu ya idadi ya vectori za uzalishaji, tunaweza kutengeneza taarifa zilizotengenezwa ambazo zinaweza kutekelezwa kama msaada wa maneno. Mipango ya kukandamiza hukumu iliyokuwa imejumuisha kwa ajili ya kutengeneza muhtasari wa muhtasari. Jaribio la baadhi ya seti za taarifa za bendera zinaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu unapata matokeo bora kuliko njia za sanaa.', 'af': "Wanneer mense herhaal en grawe wat hulle gelees het om opsommings te skryf, is die belangrike inhoud meer waarskynlik om hul aandag te trek. Ons bevestig deur hierdie opsomming 'n kaskadeerde aandag gebaseer ondersoekte model om die saliensinformasie van die teks te vurdering vir komprimeerde multidokument opsomming. Die aanmerksgewigte word automaties geleer deur 'n onondersteunde data rekonstruksie raamwerk wat die setsalienskap kan opneem. Deur sparsiteit beheinings by te voeg op die aantal uitset vektore, kan ons genereer kondenseerde inligting wat as woord saliens behandel kan word. Fin-graan en kors-kors-straat kompressie strategies word ingesluit om kompressiewe opsommings te produseer. Eksperimente op sommige benchmark data stelle vertoon dat ons raamwerk beter resultate bereik as die state-of-the-art metodes.", 'sq': 'Kur njerëzit kujtojnë dhe gërmojnë atë që kanë lexuar për të shkruar përmbledhje, përmbajtja e rëndësishme ka më shumë gjasa të tërheqë vëmendjen e tyre. Inspiruar nga ky vëzhgim, ne propozojmë një model të rëndësishëm të bazuar në vëmendje të pazgjidhur për të vlerësuar informacionin e rëndësishëm nga teksti për përmbledhjen kompresive të shumëdokumenteve. Peshat e vëmendjes mësohen automatikisht nga një kuadër rindërtimi i të dhënave të pazgjidhura që mund të kapë thelbësinë e fjalës. By adding sparsity constraints on the number of output vectors, we can generate condensed information which can be treated as word salience.  Strategjitë e kompresionit të frazëve me drithëra të holla dhe të mëdha janë përfshirë për të prodhuar përmbledhje kompresive. Eksperimentet në disa grupe të dhënash referuese tregojnë se kuadri ynë arrin rezultate më të mira se metodat më të moderna.', 'hy': 'Երբ մարդիկ հիշում են և խորտառում, թե ինչ են կարդացել համառոտագրությունների գրելու համար, կարևոր պարունակությունը ավելի հավանական է, որ կգրավի իրենց ուշադրությունը: Հոգեշնչված այս հետազոտությամբ, մենք առաջարկում ենք ուշադրություն կատարելու, որը հիմնված է անվերահսկված մոդելի, որպեսզի հաշվարկի տեքստի արտահայտության տեղեկատվությունը բազմափաստաթղթերի ընդգծման համար: The attention weights are learned automatically by an unsupervised data reconstruction framework which can capture the sentence salience.  Ավելացնելով արտադրման վեկտորների թիվը բազմաթիվ սահմանափակումներ, մենք կարող ենք ստեղծել կոնդենսացված տեղեկություն, որը կարելի է վերաբերել որպես բառի արտահայտություն: Պետք է ներառել ճնշող համառոտագրություններ ստեղծելու համար: Որոշ համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը ավելի լավ արդյունքներ է ստանում, քան ամենաբարձր մեթոդները:', 'am': 'ሰዎች የጽሑፉን አረንጓዴ የሚያነቡትን የሚያስቡና የሚያከብሩ ሲሆኑ፣ የሚያስፈልገው ተቃውሞ የሚያሳውቃቸው ይሻላል፡፡ ይህንን ማየት በተገኘው፣ በተጠበቀው ያልተቆጠሩ ሞዴል ላይ የድህነት መረጃዎችን ከጽሑፉ ለመቆጣጠር በብዙ ሰነድ አቃራኒ እንዲያስፈልግ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ የጥያቄው ሚዛን የፍርድ ዕድልን ለመያዝ በሚችል የዳታ መሠረት ፍሬም በራስነት ተማርተዋል፡፡ የውጤት vectors ቁጥር ላይ ግንኙነትን በመጨመር እና ቃላት ማህበረሰብ የሚችሉትን የመረጃ መረጃዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተመሳሳይ እና የቆርጠው የክፍለ አካባቢ ተቃውሞ ተቃውሞ ለመፍጠር ነው፡፡ በአንዳንዶቹ የbenchmark data setups ፍሬማችን ከሀገር-የ-አርእስት ይልቅ የበለጠ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'İnsanlar yazmaq üçün oxunduqlarını yada salıb yazdıqlarını qəbul etdikləri zaman möhüm məlumat onların dikkatini çekməyə daha mümkün olur. Bu gözləmə vasitəsilə təşkil edilmişdir, çoxlu-belədə təşkil edilmək üçün məktub təşkil edən salinsi məlumatını hesablamaq üçün kascada edilməmiş bir modeli təklif edirik. Dikkati ağırlığı öz-özündən öyrənir ki, cümlələrin salınmasını başa düşə bilər. Çıqış vektörlərin sayısına küçük müəyyənləşdirilməsi artırmaq vasitəsilə, sözlərin salınması olaraq müəyyənləşdirilmiş məlumatları yaratabiliriz. Sıxıştırıcı toplamlar ürəkləmək üçün sünbül dənələr və sünbül cümlələr kompressiya stratejiləri birləşdirilmişdir. Bazı benchmark məlumatlarının təcrübələrinə görə, çerömümüzün sanat metodlarından daha yaxşı sonuçlarını tapacağını göstərir.', 'bn': 'যখন মানুষ তাদের সামারসংক্ষিপ্ত লেখার জন্য যা পাঠ করেছে তা স্মরণ করে এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সংক্ষেপের জন্য তাদের প এই পর্যবেক্ষণের দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, আমরা একটি ক্যাস্কেডের মনোযোগ প্রস্তাব করছি অসমর্থিত মডেলের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক, যাতে তারা লেখা থে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংরক্ষিত তথ্য পুনঃনির্মাণ ফ্রেক্কারের মাধ্যমে মনোযোগ পাওয়া যায় যা এই বাক্যের বিশেষকে ধরে রা আউটপুট ভেক্টরের সংখ্যার উপর স্প্যারিসি নিয়ম যোগ করে আমরা ক্যান্ডেন্সেড তথ্য তৈরি করতে পারি যা শব্দ ব্যবস্থার হিসে ভালো গ্রেফতার এবং কোর্স-গ্রেফতার করা কৌশল সম্পূর্ণ সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ উৎপাদনের জন্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত। কিছু বেনম্যার্ক ডাটা সেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রম দেখা যাচ্ছে যে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শি', 'bs': 'Kada se ljudi sjete i kopaju ono što su pročitali za sažetke pisanja, važan sadržaj je vjerojatniji da će privući njihovu pažnju. Inspirirano ovim posmatranjem, predlažemo kaskadiranu pažnju na osnovu neodređenog model a kako bi procijenili informacije o saliciji iz teksta za sažetak kompresivnog višestrukog dokumenta. Težina pažnje se automatski nauči neodređen okvir za rekonstrukciju podataka koji može uhvatiti salijenciju rečenica. Dodajući ograničenja rezervnosti na broj vektora izlaza, možemo stvoriti kondenzirane informacije koje se mogu tretirati kao salijanje riječi. Strategije kompresije finog zrnca i krhkog zrnca priključene su za proizvodnju kompresivnih sažetaka. Eksperimenti na nekim grupama podataka o referenciji pokazuju da naš okvir postigne bolji rezultat od metoda stanja umjetnosti.', 'ca': "Quan la gent recorda i digeri el que ha llegit per escriure resumes, el contingut important és més probable que atrai la seva atenció. Inspirat per aquesta observació, proposem un model no supervisat basat en l'atenció cascada per estimar la informació de saliència del text per a una resumida compressiva multidocumental. Els pesos d'atenció s'aprenen automàticament amb un marc de reconstrucció de dades sense supervisió que pot capturar la saliència de la frase. Aggregand restriccions d'escassetat al nombre de vectors de sortida, podem generar informació condensada que pot ser tractada com saliència de paraula. Les estratègies de compressió de frases de grans fins i grossos són incorporades per a produir resumes compressius. Els experiments en alguns conjunts de dades de referència demostren que el nostre marc aconsegueix millors resultats que els mètodes més avançats.", 'cs': 'Když si lidé vzpomene a stráví to, co přečetli pro psaní souhrnů, důležitý obsah pravděpodobně upoutá jejich pozornost. Inspirováni tímto pozorováním navrhujeme kaskádový model bez dozoru založený na pozornosti k odhadu salience informací z textu pro kompresivní shrnutí více dokumentů. Váhy pozornosti se automaticky naučí bez dohledu rámec rekonstrukce dat, který dokáže zachytit významnost věty. Přidáním omezení řídkosti na počet výstupních vektorů můžeme generovat kondenzované informace, které lze považovat za slovní salienci. Jemnozrnné a hrubozrnné strategie komprese vět jsou začleněny k vytváření kompresivních souhrnů. Experimenty na některých sadách referenčních dat ukazují, že náš framework dosahuje lepších výsledků než moderní metody.', 'fi': 'Kun ihmiset muistavat ja sulattavat, mitä he ovat lukeneet tiivistelmien kirjoittamiseksi, tärkeä sisältö herättää todennäköisemmin heidän huomionsa. Tämän havainnon innoittamana ehdotamme sarjamuotoista huomiota perustuvaa valvomatonta mallia tekstin salience-informaation arvioimiseksi kompressiiviseen moniasiakirjayhteenvetoon. Huomiopainot oppivat automaattisesti valvomattomalla datan rekonstruktiokehyksellä, joka voi vangita lauseen korostumisen. Lisäämällä harvoja rajoituksia ulostulovektorien lukumäärään, voimme tuottaa tiivistettyä tietoa, jota voidaan käsitellä sanan esillepanona. Hienorakeiset ja karkeasrakeiset lauseen puristusstrategiat on sisällytetty puristusstrategioihin. Joidenkin vertailuaineistojen kokeilut osoittavat, että viitekehyksemme saavuttaa parempia tuloksia kuin uusimmat menetelmät.', 'et': 'Kui inimesed meenutavad ja seedivad, mida nad on kokkuvõtete kirjutamiseks lugenud, tõenäoliselt tõmbab oluline sisu nende tähelepanu. Sellest vaatlusest inspireerituna pakume välja kaskadeeritud tähelepanu põhineva järelevalveta mudeli, et hinnata teksti silmapaistvuse teavet kompressiivseks mitmekordseks kokkuvõtteks. Tähelepanukaalu õpib automaatselt järelevalveta andmete rekonstrueerimise raamistik, mis suudab jäädvustada lause silmapaistvuse. Lisades väljundvektorite arvule piiranguid, saame luua tihedat infot, mida saab käsitleda sõna silmapaistvusena. Peeneteralised ja jämeda teralised lausete tihendamise strateegiad on lisatud kokkuvõtete koostamiseks. Mõnede võrdlusandmekogumitega tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie raamistik saavutab paremaid tulemusi kui kaasaegsed meetodid.', 'jv': 'Léwé lang bantên terus nggawe lan digestek sing berarti kanggo nggambar resmi, ndheke sing dikarepaké sing luwih apik sing dirakno. YAccel gambar yambuk Attribute section', 'ha': "Ko da mutane suna tunãni kuma suna karatun abin da yake karatunsu na rubũtar da littattafai, yana kasancẽwa mafiya muhimmi su karɓi saunarsu. Inspired by this tsarin, Munã buɗa wani muhalli na kaskade a kan salon da ba'a tsare shi ba dõmin ya estiraye salon information daga matsayin dõmin a ƙara ƙararin multi-dokuman. An sanar nauyi wa muhalli farat ɗaya da wata firam na rekodin data wanda ba'a tsare ba, mai iya kãma salon maganar. Ga ku ƙara kanana sauri kan yawan shiryoyi na fitarwa, za'a iya ƙiƙiro information wanda za'a yi amfani da su kamar salon maganar. Ana ƙunsa da kayan da mai kyau da kuma aka sami cikin kayan danna maganar ƙara. Tajararin da ke kan wasu danne-bangon ayuka na nuna cewa firam zai sãmu mafi alhẽri matsayi daga hanyar-the-art.", 'sk': 'Ko se ljudje spomnijo in prebavijo tisto, kar so prebrali za pisanje povzetkov, je verjetneje, da bo pomembna vsebina pritegnila njihovo pozornost. Na podlagi tega opažanja predlagamo kaskadni neobzorovan model, ki temelji na pozornosti, za oceno podatkov o pomembnosti iz besedila za kompresivno večdokumentno povzetek. Uteži pozornosti se samodejno naučijo s pomočjo nenadzorovanega okvira za rekonstrukcijo podatkov, ki lahko zajame izraz stavka. Z dodajanjem omejitev redkosti na število izhodnih vektorjev lahko ustvarimo zgoščene informacije, ki jih lahko obravnavamo kot besedno izpostavljenost. Za izdelavo kompresivnih povzetkov so vključene drobnozrnate in grobozrnate strategije stiskanja stavkov. Poskusi na nekaterih naborih referenčnih podatkov kažejo, da naš okvir dosega boljše rezultate od najsodobnejših metod.', 'he': 'כאשר אנשים זוכרים ומעכלים את מה שהם קראו לכתיבת סדרות, התוכן החשוב סביר יותר למשוך את תשומת לבהם. בהשראה על ידי התבוננות הזו, אנו מציעים תשומת לב מוצגת מבוססת על מודל ללא השגחה כדי להעריך את מידע המיציאות מהטקסט לסיוריזציה מורכבת מסמכים. משקלי תשומת הלב נלמדים באופן אוטומטי על ידי מסגרת שיחזור נתונים ללא השגחה שיכולה לתפוס את מילוי המשפט. על ידי להוסיף חוסרי הידרות על מספר ווקטורי יציאה, אנחנו יכולים ליצור מידע מעורפל שאפשר להתייחס אליו כמילה מלאה. אסטרטגיות לחיצת משפטים גבוהות וגבוהות מורכבות כדי לייצר סדרות מדכאות. ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים מסוימות מראים שהמסגרת שלנו משיגה תוצאות טובות יותר מהשיטות החדשות ביותר.', 'bo': 'མི་མང་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་དང་བསྐྱེད་དུས་ལྟར་བྱེད་སྐབས་སུ། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་མིང་རྣམས་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཕ ཆེས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བདེ་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཆའི་གྲངས་ས By adding sparsity constraints on the number of output vectors, we can generate condensed information which can be treated as word salience. Fine-grained and coarse-grained sentence compression strategies are incorporated to produce compressive summaries. Experiments on benchmark data sets show that our framework achieves better results than the state-of-the-art methods.'}
{'en': 'Deep Recurrent Generative Decoder for Abstractive Text Summarization', 'ar': 'مفكك الشفرة التوليدي العميق المتكرر لتلخيص النص التجريدي', 'es': 'Decodificador generativo recurrente profundo para la sumarización abstractiva de textos', 'pt': 'Decodificador Generativo Recorrente Profundo para Sumarização de Texto Abstrativo', 'fr': 'Décodeur génératif récurrent profond pour la synthèse de texte abstrait', 'ru': 'Глубокий периодический генеративный декодер для абстрактного обобщения текста', 'ja': '抽象的なテキストの要約のための深い反復生成デコーダ', 'zh': '抽象摘要循环生解码器', 'hi': 'Abstractive पाठ Summarization के लिए गहरी आवर्तक उत्पादक विकोडक', 'ga': 'Díchódóir Giniteach Deep Athfhillteach le haghaidh Achoimriú Téacs Teibí', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიგური ტექსტის კომპანიზაციისთვის ძალიან განახლებელი განახლებელი დეკოდერი', 'el': 'Βαθύς επαναλαμβανόμενος παράγωγος αποκωδικοποιητής για περίληψη κειμένου', 'hu': 'Mély ismétlődő generált dekódoló absztrakt szövegösszefoglaláshoz', 'lt': 'Gilus pakartotinis generinis dekoderis abstrakciniam tekstui apibendrinti', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті мәтін тұжырымдамасының қайталанатын қайталанатын декодері', 'it': 'Decodificatore generativo ricorrente profondo per la sintesi astratta del testo', 'mk': 'Длабоко рекурентно генеративно декодирање за апстрактивна резервација на текстот', 'ms': 'Pendekodar Penjanaan Segera Berulang dalam untuk Penapisan Teks Abstraktif', 'mt': 'Dekodifikatur Ġenerattiv Rikorrenti Profond għas-Sommarju tat-Test Abstrattiv', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ പദാവലിയുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ജനററിവ് ഡികോഡെര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Абстрактив текст цуглуулалтын гүнзгий дахин шинэчлэгч', 'no': 'Deep gjentaande genererande dekoder for abstraktiv tekstsamandrag', 'pl': 'Głęboki powtarzający się dekoder generujący do streszczenia tekstu', 'sr': 'Duboko ponovno generativni dekoder za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta', 'ro': 'Decodor generativ recurent profund pentru rezumarea textului abstract', 'si': 'අවස්ථාවක් පාළුව සංශ්\u200dයය සඳහා ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් නිර්මාණය සංකේතකය', 'sv': 'Djup återkommande generativ avkodare för abstraktiv textsammanfattning', 'so': 'Deg Generative Decoder for Abstractive Text Summariisation', 'ta': 'ஆழமான தற்போதைய உரை சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'دھوپ ٹیکسٹ ٹیکسٹ سماریزو کے لئے عمیق دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والی ڈیکوڈر', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Bộ giải mã khuếch đại sâu cho tổng hợp văn bản', 'bg': 'Дълбоко повтарящ се генеративен декодер за обобщаване на абстрактен текст', 'hr': 'Duboki rekonstruirani dekoder generacije za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta', 'da': 'Dyb tilbagevendende genererende dekoder til abstrakt tekst summering', 'nl': 'Deep Recurrent Generative Decoder voor abstracte tekstsamenvatting', 'ko': '추상적인 텍스트 요약에 사용되는 깊이 귀속 생성 디코더', 'de': 'Deep Recurrent Generative Decoder für abstraktive Textzusammenfassung', 'id': 'Dekoder Generatif Berulang Dalam Untuk Penapisan Teks Abstraktif', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Deep Recurrent Generative Decoder for Abstractive Text Summarization', 'tr': 'Gaýd Edilmiş Metin Dolamak üçin Gadyr Ködleme', 'af': 'Deep Herhaling Genereerde Dekoder vir Abstraktiewe Teks Opsomming', 'sq': 'Dekoduesi gjenerativ i thellë i përsëritur për përmbledhjen e tekstit abstraktiv', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Abstraktiv Metin Toplaşdırması üçün qaranlıq Dönüş Dekodçu', 'bn': 'আবট্র্যাক্টিভ টেক্সট সামারিজেশনের জন্য গভীর জেনারেটিভ ডিকোডার', 'hy': 'Ապլատրատիվ տեքստի ամփոփման համար', 'bs': 'Duboki rekonstruirani dekoder generacije za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta', 'cs': 'Hluboký opakovaný generační dekodér pro shrnutí abstraktního textu', 'ca': 'Descodidor generador recurrent profund per a resumir el text abstract', 'et': 'Sügav korduv generatiivne dekooder abstraktse teksti kokkuvõtte jaoks', 'fi': 'Deep Toistuva Generative Decoder for Abstractive Text Summarization', 'jv': 'deep', 'he': 'מתקן גרציבי חוזר עמוק לסומר טקסט אסטרקטיבי', 'sk': 'Globoko ponavljajoči se generativni dekoder za povzetek besedila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ཡི་གེའི་བསྡུས་འབྲི་བ་དང་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་པོའི་རྗེས་མཁན་གྱི་བཟོ་རྩོམ་འབྲི་བ་མཚོན་པ'}
{'en': 'We propose a new framework for abstractive text summarization based on a sequence-to-sequence oriented encoder-decoder model equipped with a deep recurrent generative decoder (DRGN). Latent structure information implied in the target summaries is learned based on a recurrent latent random model for improving the summarization quality. Neural variational inference is employed to address the intractable posterior inference for the recurrent latent variables. Abstractive summaries are generated based on both the generative latent variables and the discriminative deterministic states. Extensive experiments on some benchmark datasets in different languages show that DRGN achieves improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'نقترح إطارًا جديدًا لتلخيص النص التجريدي استنادًا إلى نموذج وحدة فك ترميز ومشفّر موجه بالتسلسل إلى التسلسل ومزود بوحدة فك ترميز عميقة متكررة (DRGN). يتم التعرف على معلومات البنية الكامنة المتضمنة في الملخصات المستهدفة بناءً على نموذج عشوائي كامن متكرر لتحسين جودة التلخيص. يتم استخدام الاستدلال العصبي المتغير لمعالجة الاستدلال الخلفي المستعصي على المتغيرات الكامنة المتكررة. يتم إنشاء الملخصات التلخيصية بناءً على كل من المتغيرات الكامنة التوليدية والحالات الحتمية التمييزية. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على بعض مجموعات البيانات المعيارية بلغات مختلفة أن DRGN يحقق تحسينات على أحدث الأساليب.', 'es': 'Proponemos un nuevo marco para la sumarización abstractiva de texto basado en un modelo codificador-decodificador orientado secuencia a secuencia equipado con un decodificador generativo recurrente profundo (DRGN). La información de la estructura latente implicada en los resúmenes objetivo se aprende sobre la base de un modelo aleatorio latente recurrente para mejorar la calidad de los resúmenes. La inferencia variacional neuronal se emplea para abordar la inferencia posterior intratable para las variables latentes recurrentes. Los resúmenes abstractivos se generan en función tanto de las variables latentes generativas como de los estados deterministas discriminativos. Experimentos exhaustivos en algunos conjuntos de datos de referencia en diferentes idiomas muestran que la DRGN logra mejoras con respecto a los métodos más avanzados.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau cadre de synthèse de texte abstrait basé sur un modèle encodeur-décodeur orienté séquence à séquence équipé d'un décodeur génératif récurrent profond (DRGN). Les informations de structure latente impliquées dans les résumés cibles sont apprises sur la base d'un modèle aléatoire latent récurrent afin d'améliorer la qualité de la synthèse. L'inférence variationnelle neurale est utilisée pour traiter l'inférence postérieure insoluble pour les variables latentes récurrentes. Des résumés abstraits sont générés sur la base des variables latentes génératives et des états déterministes discriminants. Des expériences approfondies sur certains ensembles de données de référence dans différentes langues montrent que DRGN apporte des améliorations par rapport aux méthodes de pointe.", 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova estrutura para sumarização de texto abstrativa baseada em um modelo de codificador-decodificador orientado a seqüência a seqüência equipado com um decodificador generativo recorrente profundo (DRGN). As informações de estrutura latente implícitas nos resumos de destino são aprendidas com base em um modelo aleatório latente recorrente para melhorar a qualidade do resumo. A inferência variacional neural é empregada para abordar a inferência posterior intratável para as variáveis latentes recorrentes. Resumos abstrativos são gerados com base nas variáveis latentes geradoras e nos estados determinísticos discriminativos. Extensos experimentos em alguns conjuntos de dados de referência em diferentes idiomas mostram que o DRGN alcança melhorias em relação aos métodos de última geração.', 'zh': '设之于序编码器 - 解码器象摘要新框架,合之深解码器(DRGN)。 盖循环潜伏随机模形学摘要中隐潜在结构信息,以崇摘要质。 神经变分推理以决复发性伏变量棘手后验。 抽象摘要生于变量判确定性。 异言之准,广实验明,DRGN有改于先进之法。', 'ja': '深層再帰生成デコーダ（ ＤＲＧＮ ）を備えたシーケンスツーシーケンス指向のエンコーダデコーダモデルに基づく抽象的なテキスト要約のための新しいフレームワークを提案する。対象の要約に示唆される潜在構造情報は、要約の質を向上させるための繰り返し潜在ランダムモデルに基づいて学習される。神経変動推論は、再発潜伏変数の難治性後方推論に対処するために用いられる。抽象的要約は、生成的潜在変数と判別的決定論的状態の両方に基づいて生成される。異なる言語のいくつかのベンチマークデータセットに関する広範な実験は、DRGNが最先端の方法よりも改善を達成することを示しています。', 'hi': 'हम एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम उन्मुख एन्कोडर-विकोडक मॉडल के आधार पर अमूर्त पाठ सारांशीकरण के लिए एक नए ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक गहरी आवर्तक उत्पादक विकोडक (DRGN) से सुसज्जित है। लक्ष्य सारांश में निहित अव्यक्त संरचना जानकारी summarization गुणवत्ता में सुधार के लिए एक आवर्तक अव्यक्त यादृच्छिक मॉडल के आधार पर सीखा है। तंत्रिका परिवर्तनीय अनुमान को आवर्तक अव्यक्त चर के लिए असभ्य पश्च अनुमान को संबोधित करने के लिए नियोजित किया जाता है। अमूर्त सारांश दोनों उत्पादक अव्यक्त चर और भेदभावपूर्ण नियतात्मक राज्यों के आधार पर उत्पन्न होते हैं। विभिन्न भाषाओं में कुछ बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि DRGN अत्याधुनिक तरीकों पर सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Предложена новая структура абстрактного обобщения текста, основанная на модели кодер-декодер, ориентированной на последовательность, оснащенной глубоким рекуррентным генераторным декодером (DRGN). Информация о скрытой структуре, подразумеваемая в целевых сводках, извлекается на основе повторяющейся скрытой случайной модели для улучшения качества обобщения. Нейронный вариационный вывод используется для решения неразрешимого апостериорного вывода для повторяющихся скрытых переменных. Абстрактные сводки генерируются на основе как генеративных скрытых переменных, так и дискриминационных детерминированных состояний. Широкие эксперименты с некоторыми эталонными наборами данных на разных языках показывают, что DRGN достигает улучшений по сравнению с современными методами.', 'ga': 'Molaimid creat nua le haghaidh achoimre teibí ar théacs bunaithe ar shamhail ionchódóra-dhírithe seicheamh-go-seicheamh atá feistithe le díchódóir giniúna athfhillteach domhain (DRGN). Foghlaimítear faisnéis faoi struchtúr folaigh atá intuigthe sna sprioc-achoimrí bunaithe ar mhúnla randamach athfhillteach folaigh chun cáilíocht an achoimre a fheabhsú. Baintear úsáid as tátal athraitheach néaraíoch chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tátal do-chonarthach posterior do na hathróga folaigh athfhillteacha. Gintear achoimrí teibí bunaithe ar na hathróga folaigh giniúna agus ar na stáit idirdhealaitheacha cinntitheacha araon. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar roinnt tacar sonraí tagarmharcála i dteangacha éagsúla go mbaineann DRGN feabhsuithe amach ar na modhanna úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აბსტრაქტიური ტექსტის სისუმებისთვის ახალი ფრამეტრის გამოყენება, რომელიც კოდენტიური კოდენტიური მოდელზე დაბაზიან კოდენტიური რეკორენტიური რეკორენტიური რეკორენტიური რეკორენ შემდეგ სტრუქტურაციის ინფორმაცია, რომელიც მისაღების კოსუქტურაციაში იმპლექტირებულია, მოსწავლილია რეკუქტურაციული ლატენტის კოსუქტურაციის ნეიროლური გარიანციული ინფრენცია იყენება ინტერექტიური პოსტერიური ინფრენციის შესახებ რეკურენტური ლაენტიური ცვლილებისთვის. აბსტრაქტიური საზოგადოებები იქნება, რომლებიც გენერაციური ლატენტიური ცვლილებები და დისკრიმინატიური განსაზოგადოებული სტატში. განსხვავებული ენებით განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავებული ექსპერიმენტები გამოიყენება რომ DRGN მიიღება შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების განსხვავება.', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív szövegösszefoglalás új keretrendszerét javasoljuk egy szekvencia-szekvencia orientált kódoló-dekódoló modell alapján, amely egy mély visszatérő generációs dekódolóval (DRGN) felszerelt. A célösszefoglalókban szereplő későbbi struktúra információkat egy ismétlődő, látens véletlenszerű modell alapján tanuljuk meg az összefoglaló minőségének javítására. Neurális variációs következtetést alkalmaznak a visszatérő látens változók intratable posterior következtetésének kezelésére. Absztrakt összefoglalások készülnek mind a generációs látens változók, mind a diszkriminatív determinisztikus állapotok alapján. A különböző nyelveken végzett benchmark adatkészleteken végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a DRGN a legkorszerűbb módszerekhez képest fejlesztéseket ér el.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο για αφηρημένη περίληψη κειμένου βασισμένο σε ένα μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή προσανατολισμένο σε ακολουθία, εξοπλισμένο με έναν βαθύ επαναλαμβανόμενο αποκωδικοποιητή (DRGN). Οι λανθάνουσες πληροφορίες δομής που υποδηλώνονται στις περιλήψεις στόχων μαθαίνονται με βάση ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο λανθάνον τυχαίο μοντέλο για τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας σύνοψης. Το συμπέρασμα νευρωνικής παραλλαγής χρησιμοποιείται για να αντιμετωπιστεί η δυσχερής οπίσθια συμπέρασμα για τις επαναλαμβανόμενες λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές. Παράγονται αφηρημένες περιλήψεις με βάση τόσο τις γενετικές λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές όσο και τις διακριτικές determinιστικές καταστάσεις. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε ορισμένα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες δείχνουν ότι η DRGN επιτυγχάνει βελτιώσεις έναντι των σύγχρονων μεθόδων.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo framework per la sintesi astratta del testo basato su un modello encoder-decoder orientato sequenza-sequenza dotato di un decoder generativo ricorrente profondo (DRGN). Le informazioni sulla struttura latente implicite nei riassunti target vengono apprese sulla base di un modello casuale latente ricorrente per migliorare la qualità di sintesi. L'inferenza variazionale neurale è impiegata per affrontare l'inferenza posteriore intrattabile per le variabili latenti ricorrenti. Vengono generati riassunti astratti basati sia sulle variabili latenti generative che sugli stati deterministici discriminatori. Esperimenti approfonditi su alcuni set di dati di benchmark in diverse lingue dimostrano che DRGN ottiene miglioramenti rispetto ai metodi all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Біз абстрактивті мәтін тұжырымдамасының жаңа фреймін таңдаймыз. Келесіден қайталанатын қайталанатын декодер үлгісімен (DRGN) бағдарламасынан негіздеген реттегі бағытталған кодер- декодер үлгісін қо Кейінгі құрылғы мәліметі, мақсатты тұжырымдамасында, қайталанатын latent кездейсоқ моделіне негізделген, тұжырымдамасын жақсарту үшін. Нейрондық айнымалылық қайталанатын айнымалылықтардың интрактивті кейінгі қайталанатын кейінгі қайталанатын қайталанатын қайталанатын қайталанатын қайталанатын қайталанатын қайталанатын қайт Абстрактивтік тұжырымдары генеративті latent айнымалылардың негізінде және дискриминациялық deterministic күйіне негізделген. Бірнеше тілдерде кейбір банктар деректер қорларының кеңейтілген тәжірибелері DRGN өзгерту әдістерінің жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова рамка за апстрактивна резултатација на текстот базирана на модел на кодер-декодер ориентиран од секвенца до секвенца, опремен со длабоко рецидентно генеративно декодер (DRGN). Најдоцна структурна информација имплицирана во резултатите на целта се научи врз основа на рецидентниот лантен случајен модел за подобрување на квалитетот на резултатот. Неуралната варијационална инференција е употребена за решавање на неприфатливата задна инференција за рецидентните лантни променливи. Апстрактивни резултати се генерирани врз основа на генерациските лантни променливи и дискриминативните децентристички состојби. Експериментите на некои бази на податоци на различни јазици покажуваат дека ДРГН постигнува подобрувања во однос на најсовремените методи.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują sistemą abstrakčiam teksto apibendrinimui, pagrįstą eilės į eilę orientuotu kodavimo kodavimo modeliu, kuriame įrengtas gilus kartojantis kartotinis dekoderis (DRGN). Paskutinė struktūros informacija, nurodyta tikslinėse santraukose, mokoma remiantis pakartotiniu latentiniu atsitiktiniu modeliu, kuriuo siekiama pagerinti santraukų kokybę. Naudojama neurologinė variacinė išvada, skirta išspręsti intraktabilią pakaitinių latentinių kintamųjų galinę išvadą. Abstraktyvios santraukos pateikiamos remiantis tiek kartinių latentinių kintamųjų, tiek diskriminacinių lemiamųjų būklių duomenimis. Išsamūs kai kurių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai skirtingomis kalbomis rodo, kad DRGN pasiekia patobulinimų, palyginti su naujausiais metodais.', 'ms': 'Kami melamar kerangka baru untuk pengringkasan teks abstraktif berdasarkan model pengekod-pengakod orientasi-ke-urutan berdasarkan model pengekod-pengakod yang dilengkapi dengan pengekod generasi berulang-ulang yang dalam (DRGN). Maklumat struktur belakangan yang dimaksudkan dalam ringkasan sasaran dipelajari berdasarkan model rawak laten berulang untuk meningkatkan kualiti ringkasan. Keputusan variasi saraf digunakan untuk mengatasi kesimpulan belakang yang tidak boleh ditemui untuk pembolehubah tersembunyi berulang-ulang. Abstractive summaries are generated based on both the generative latent variables and the discriminative deterministic states.  Eksperimen luas pada beberapa set data tanda referensi dalam bahasa berbeza menunjukkan bahawa DRGN mencapai peningkatan atas kaedah-kaedah-state-of-the-art.', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu qafas ġdid għas-sommarju tat-test astrattiv ibbażat fuq mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder orjentat minn sekwenza għal sekwenza mgħammar b’dekoder ġenerattiv rikorrenti profond (DRGN). L-informazzjoni dwar l-istruttura reċenti implikata fis-sommarji fil-mira titgħallem abbażi ta’ mudell każwali latenti rikorrenti għat-titjib tal-kwalità tas-sommarju. Hija użata inferenza varjazzjonali newrali biex tindirizza l-inferenza posterjuri intrattabbli għall-varjabbli latenti rikorrenti. Sommarji abstrattivi huma ġġenerati abbażi kemm tal-varjabbli ġenerattivi moħbija kif ukoll tal-istati determinattivi diskriminattivi. Esperimenti estensivi fuq xi settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza f’lingwi differenti juru li DRGN jikseb titjib fuq il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുവരുന്ന ജനററിവ് ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള സെക്കന്\u200dസ്-മുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെടുത്തിയ വാചകത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d Latent structure information implied in the target summaries is learned based on a recurrent latent random model for improving the summarization quality.  ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന അവസാന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അബ്സ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു, ജനറന്റ് ലാറ്റിന്റെ മാറികളും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ നി വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ചില ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d DRGN രീതിയിലെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്ത', 'mn': 'Бид abstractive text summarization руу шинэ хэлбэрийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. sequence-to-sequence-oriented encoder-decoder загварын үндсэн гүнзгий дахин дахин дахин нээлттэй бүтээгдэхүүн (DRGN). Цагийн нийлүүлэлтийн дараагийн бүтэц мэдээлэл дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин санамсаргүй загвар дээр сурсан. Дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин халдвар нь ашигладаг. Абстрактив тодорхойлолтууд бий болдог. Ялангуяа соронзон хувьсгалтууд болон ялгаагүй тодорхойлолтуудын тулд бий болдог. Өөр хэл дээр зарим банк өгөгдлийн сангийн олон туршилтууд ДРГН урлагийн хувьд сайжруулах аргыг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt rammeverk for abstraktiv tekstsamansering basert på ein rekkjefølgjande koderingsmodell med ein dyp rekkjefølgjande genererande dekoder (DRGN). Siste strukturinformasjon implisert i målsamningane er lært basert på ein gjentakelig latent tilfeldig modell for å forbetra sammendragskvaliteten. Neuralvarisjonsinfeksjon vert brukt for å adressera den intraktabele posteriorsinfeksjonen for dei gjentaande latente variabelene. Abstraktive samandrag blir laga basert på både genererande latente variabler og dei diskriminasjonale deterministiske tilstandane. Eksempel på nokre benchmarkdatasett på ulike språk viser at DRGN gjer forbetringar over kunstmetodane.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nową strukturę abstrakcyjnego podsumowania tekstu opartą na ukierunkowanym na sekwencję modelu kodera-dekodera wyposażonym w głęboki dekoder generatywny (DRGN). Latentne informacje o strukturze implikowane w podsumowaniach docelowych są uczone na podstawie powtarzającego się utajonego modelu losowego w celu poprawy jakości podsumowania. Inferencja wariancyjna neuronalna stosuje się do rozwiązania trudnych wniosków tylnych dla nawracających zmiennych utajonych. Streszczenia są generowane zarówno na podstawie zmiennych utajonych generacji, jak i stanów deterministycznych dyskryminacyjnych. Obszerne eksperymenty na niektórych zbiorach danych referencyjnych w różnych językach pokazują, że DRGN osiąga ulepszenia w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych metod.', 'ro': 'Propunem un nou cadru pentru rezumarea abstractivă a textului bazat pe un model codificator-decodor orientat secvență-secvență echipat cu un decodor generativ recurent profund (DRGN). Informațiile de structură latentă implicate în rezumatele țintă sunt învățate pe baza unui model aleatoriu latent recurent pentru îmbunătățirea calității rezumatului. Inferenţa variabilă neurală este utilizată pentru a aborda inferenţa posterioară intratabilă pentru variabilele latente recurente. Rezumatele abstracte sunt generate atât pe baza variabilelor latente generative, cât și a stărilor deterministe discriminatorii. Experimentele extinse pe anumite seturi de date de referință în diferite limbi arată că DRGN realizează îmbunătățiri față de metodele de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta na osnovu model a orijentiranog kodera do sekvence, opremljenog dubokim rekonstruiranim generativnim dekoderom (DRGN). Poslednja strukturna informacija implicirana u ciljnim sažetkama se nauèi na osnovu rekonstruiranog latentnog sluèajnog model a za poboljšanje kvalitete sažetanja. Neuralna variacionalna infekcija je zaposlena kako bi se riješila intraktivna poslednja infekcija za povratne latentne varijacije. Abstraktivni sažetki se proizvode na temelju generičnih latentnih promjena i diskriminacijskih determinističkih država. Eksperimenti na nekim standardnim setima podataka na različitim jezicima pokazuju da DRGN postiže poboljšanje nad metodama umetnosti.', 'si': 'අපි අවස්ථාවක් පාළුව සංශ්\u200dයය සඳහා අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ ලක්ෂණ සංවේදනයේ පස්සේ සංවේදනය තොරතුරු ඉලක්කු සංවේදනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සංවේදනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරති ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200d නිර්මාණය වෙනස් සහ විශේෂ විශේෂ සාමාව නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා. වෙනස් භාෂාවලේ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් වලින් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ DRGn විශේෂ විධානයේ විස', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qoraal cusub oo la soo qoro qoraal cayiman ah oo ku saleysan qoraal kooxeed oo u jeeda koox-to-sequence, oo ay leedahay qoraal-decoder oo aad u dheer qorshaha ah (DRGN). Latent structure information implied in the target summaries is learned based on a recurrent latent random model for improving the summarization quality.  Cudurada guud ee naafada waxaa loo isticmaalaa si uu u macaamiloodo cudurada waqtiga dambe ah oo la soo socda. Qiimaha jimicsiga ah waxaa lagu saleeyaa isbedelka ugu dambeeya iyo qaybaha takoorista. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan sawirada bangiga ee luuqadaha kala duduwan ku qoran waxay muuqataa in DRGN uu kordhiyo qaababka farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett nytt ramverk för abstraktiv textsammanfattning baserat på en sekvensorienterad encoder-avkodarmodell utrustad med en djup återkommande generativ avkodare (DRGN). Latent strukturinformation som ingår i målsammanfattningarna lärs ut utifrån en återkommande latent slumpmässig modell för att förbättra sammanfattningskvaliteten. Neural variationsinferens används för att hantera den intrattabila posteriora inferensen för de återkommande latenta variablerna. Abstraktiva sammanfattningar genereras baserat på både generativa latenta variabler och diskriminerande deterministiska tillstånd. Omfattande experiment på vissa benchmarkdatauppsättningar på olika språk visar att DRGN uppnår förbättringar jämfört med de senaste metoderna.', 'ta': 'நாம் புதிய விளையாட்டை தொடர்ந்து வரிசையிலும் தொடர்ந்து வரிசையிலும் குறியீட்டு மாதிரியில் செயல்படுத்தும் உரை சுருக்கத்திற்கான சுருக்கம்  இலக்கு சுருக்கத்தில் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட சமீபத்தில் உள்ள கட்டுப்பாட்டு தகவல் சுருக்குதல் தரம் மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான முன்வரும்  தற்போது நிகழ்ந்த மாறிகளுக்கு உள்ளிருக்கக்கூடிய பின்னணி குறைவினை விளக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. பொதுவான மாறிகளும் மற்றும் வித்தியாசமான தீர்மானிப்பு நிலைகளையும் அடிப்படையில் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. வேறு மொழிகளில் சில பெங்குரிய தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் விரிவான பரிசோதனைகள் DRGN முன்னேற்றங்களின் முறைமைகளை மேம்படுத்துக', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی فرمود پیش کرتا ہے کہ آپٹراکتیو ٹیکسٹ سپورٹ کرنا (DRGN) کے ذریعہ ایک سپورٹ-تا-سپورٹ منتقل ہونے والی کوڈر-ڈکوڈر موڈل پر بنیاد رکھے۔ Target summaries میں لکھی ہوئی Latest structure information is learned on a recurrent latent random model for improving the quality. نئورل ویرائٹ یونفانس ڈیفانس کو دوبارہ لاٹینٹ ویرائیٹ کے لئے دکھانے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. آب تراکٹیوں کی جمعیت پیدا کی گئی ہے جنرائیٹ لاٹینٹ متغیرات اور تقسیم کی تصدیق کی حالت پر۔ مختلف زبانوں میں بعض بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ پر اضافہ کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ DRGN آرتی طریقے پر اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis @ info @ info: whatsthis Name Extensive experiments on some benchmark datasets in different languages show that DRGN achieves improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống tóm tắt văn bản trừu tượng mới dựa trên một mô hình mã hóa mã hóa mã hóa mã hóa mã hóa mã hóa mã hóa lập trình được trang có bộ giải nối ngược dòng (DRGN). Thông tin về cấu trúc cuối cùng trong các bản tóm tắt được học dựa trên một mô hình ngẫu nhiên tiềm ẩn thường xuyên để nâng cao chất lượng tổng quát. Tác dụng kết luận thần kinh phân phát được dùng để giải quyết hậu trường khó phát hiện cho các biến số tiềm ẩn thường xuyên. Những bản tóm tắt tích cực được tạo ra dựa trên cả các biến số tiềm năng gây ra và các bang phân biệt, bộ phân biệt. Những thí nghiệm dồi dào trên một số bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn bằng ngôn ngữ khác nhau cho thấy DRGN đã cải tiến các phương pháp hiện đại', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta na temelju model a orijentiranog kodera do sekvencije opremljenog dubokim rekonstruiranim generativnim dekoderom (DRGN). Posljednje strukturne informacije implicirane u ciljnim sažetkama uče se na temelju rekonstruiranog latentnog slučajnog model a za poboljšanje kvalitete sažetke. Neuralna variacionalna infekcija je zaposlena kako bi se riješila intraktivna posljednja infekcija za povratne latentne varijacije. Abstraktivni sažetki su proizvedeni na temelju generičnih latentnih promjena i diskriminacijskih determinističkih stanja. Prošireni eksperimenti na nekim standardnim podacima na različitim jezicima pokazuju da DRGN postigne poboljšanje u odnosu na metode stanja umjetnosti.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw framework voor abstractieve tekst samenvatting voor gebaseerd op een sequentie-naar-sequentie georiënteerd encoder-decoder model uitgerust met een deep recidiving generative decoder (DRGN). Latente structuurinformatie geïmpliceerd in de doelsamenvattingen wordt geleerd op basis van een terugkerend latent random model om de samenvattingskwaliteit te verbeteren. Neurale variantionele inferentie wordt gebruikt om de hardnekkige posteriore inferentie voor de terugkerende latente variabelen aan te pakken. Abstracte samenvattingen worden gegenereerd op basis van zowel de generatieve latente variabelen als de discriminatieve deterministische toestanden. Uitgebreide experimenten met enkele benchmark datasets in verschillende talen tonen aan dat DRGN verbeteringen bereikt ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art methoden.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny ramme for abstraktiv tekst opsummering baseret på en sekvens-til-sekvensorienteret encoder-dekoder model udstyret med en dyb tilbagevendende generativ dekoder (DRGN). Latent strukturinformation indeholdt i målresuméerne læres ud fra en tilbagevendende latent tilfældig model for at forbedre sammenfatningskvaliteten. Neural variationsinferens anvendes til at behandle den intrattabile posterior inferens for de tilbagevendende latente variabler. Abstraktive resuméer genereres baseret på både de generative latente variabler og de diskriminerende deterministiske tilstande. Omfattende eksperimenter med nogle benchmark datasæt på forskellige sprog viser, at DRGN opnår forbedringer i forhold til de nyeste metoder.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова рамка за абстрактно обобщаване на текста въз основа на модел последователност към последователност ориентиран кодер-декодер оборудван с дълбок рецидивиращ генеративен декодер (ДРГН). Информацията за латентната структура, подразбираща се в целевите резюмета, се научава въз основа на повтарящ се латентен случаен модел за подобряване качеството на обобщаване. Неврологичното вариационно заключение се използва за справяне с неразривното последващо заключение за рецидивиращите латентни променливи. Резюмета се генерират въз основа както на генеративните латентни променливи, така и на дискриминационните детерминистични състояния. Обширни експерименти с някои сравнителни набори от данни на различни езици показват, че постига подобрения в сравнение с най-съвременните методи.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan cadangan baru untuk pengiraan teks abstraktif berdasarkan model pengakod-pengakod-pengakod orientasi urutan ke urutan yang dipenuhi dengan pengakod generasi rekurensi mendalam (DRGN). Informasi struktur akhir-akhir yang dimaksudkan dalam ringkasan sasaran belajar berdasarkan model acak latent yang berkurang untuk meningkatkan kualitas ringkasan. Keputusan variasi saraf digunakan untuk mengatasi inferensi posterior yang tidak dapat diterima untuk variabel laten yang berulang-ulang. Ringkasan abstraktif dihasilkan berdasarkan kedua variabel generasi yang tertutup dan negara-negara determinis yang diskriminatif. Eksperimen luas pada beberapa set data benchmark dalam bahasa yang berbeda menunjukkan bahwa DRGN mencapai peningkatan atas metode terbaik.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neues Framework für die abstraktive Textzusammenfassung vor, das auf einem sequenz-zu-sequenz orientierten Encoder-Decoder-Modell basiert, das mit einem tiefen wiederkehrenden generativen Decoder (DRGN) ausgestattet ist. Latente Strukturinformationen, die in den Zielzusammenfassungen impliziert werden, werden auf Basis eines wiederkehrenden latenten Zufallsmodells gelernt, um die Qualität der Zusammenfassung zu verbessern. Neurale Variationsinterferenz wird verwendet, um die intratable posteriore Inferenz für die rezidivierenden latenten Variablen zu adressieren. Abstraktive Zusammenfassungen werden sowohl auf Basis der generativen latenten Variablen als auch der diskriminierenden deterministischen Zustände generiert. Umfangreiche Experimente an einigen Benchmark-Datensätzen in verschiedenen Sprachen zeigen, dass DRGN Verbesserungen gegenüber den State-of-the-Art-Methoden erzielt.', 'ko': 'DRGN(Documental Roundation Group Definition Generator)을 탑재한 새로운 시퀀스-시퀀스 기반 인코딩-디코딩 모델의 추상적인 텍스트 요약 프레임워크를 제시했습니다.잠재적 랜덤 모델 학습 목표 요약에 포함된 잠재적 구조 정보를 바탕으로 요약의 질을 향상시킨다.신경 변분 추리는 귀속 잠재 변수가 처리하기 어려운 후험 추리 문제를 해결하는 데 쓰인다.요약은 생성된 잠재적 변수와 구분된 확정적인 상태를 바탕으로 생성된 것이다.다양한 언어의 일부 기준 데이터 세트에서 진행된 대량의 실험은 DRGN이 가장 선진적인 방법보다 개선되었음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب جدید برای جمع کردن متن abstractive بر اساس یک مدل رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی عمیق (DRGN). اطلاعات ساختار تاریخی که در جمع\u200cآوری هدف مشخص شده، بر اساس یک مدل تصادفی تاریخی تاریخی تکرار یاد می\u200cگیرد برای بهتر کیفیت جمع\u200cآوری. آلودگی تغییر عصبی برای حل آلودگی پشتیبانی قابل توجه برای تغییرات latent بازگشت استفاده می\u200cشود. جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای abstractive بر اساس هر دو تغییرات latent ژنتریت و وضعیت\u200cهای تصدیق\u200cکننده جدا می\u200cشوند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای روی چند مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی در زبان\u200cهای مختلف نشان می\u200cدهد که DRGN بر روی روش\u200cهای نقاشی هنر بهبود می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'We propose a new framework for abstractive text summarization based on a sequence-to-sequence oriented encoder-decoder model equipped with a deep recurrent generative decoder (DRGN).  Taarifa za ujenzi wa hivi karibuni zinazohusishwa katika muhtasari wa malengo imejifunzwa kwa kutumia muundo wa hivi karibuni unaoendelea kwa ajili ya kuboresha kiwango cha muhtasari. Ugonjwa wa kijinsia unatumiwa kuelezea ugonjwa wa mabadiliko yanayoendelea. Ujumbe wa kutosha umetengenezwa kutokana na mabadiliko ya kijamii na mataifa ya ubaguzi. Majaribio mengi katika baadhi ya taarifa za benchmark katika lugha tofauti zinaonyesha kwamba DRGN hupata maboresho zaidi ya mbinu za sanaa.', 'tr': 'Biz abstraktiv metin holasalamak üçin täze bir çerçew teklip teklip berýäris. Diňe bir serije-täze gijesini golaýlaşdyran bir ködleme modeli (DRGN) bilen bejerilýär Mazmunlar içine netije alan soňky struktur maglumaty terjime etmek üçin bir ýygnanty nusgala täzelikde öwrenip bilýär. Nöral çeşitli hasaplanç, tekrarlanan latent çeşitlikler için intraktif bir poster hasaplamak için kullanılır. Abstraktiv toplamlar döredilýän latent üýtgewlere we diskriminetiw deterministik durumlara dayalýar Çeşitli dillerde birnäçe benchmark veri setirlerinde döredilen deneyler DRGN sanat taýýarlarynda gelişmeleri başarmaýar.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri për përmbledhjen abstraktive të tekstit bazuar në një model koduesi-dekoderi të orientuar nga sekuenca në sekuencë të pajisur me një dekoder të thellë të përsëritur gjenerativ (DRGN). Informacioni i strukturës së fundit i përfshirë në përmbledhjet e objektivit mësohet bazuar në një model të përsëritur të rastësishëm të fshehtë për përmirësimin e cilësisë së përmbledhjes. Përcaktimi i variacionit neuronal është i përdorur për të trajtuar inferencën e pamundur të pasme për variablet e përsëritura latente. Rezultatet abstraktive gjenerohen bazuar si në ndryshuesit gjenerativë të fshehtë dhe në shtetet diskriminuese përcaktuese. Eksperimentet e gjera në disa baza të dhënash në gjuhë të ndryshme tregojnë se DRGN arrin përmirësime në lidhje me metodat më të larta.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe raamwerk vir abstraktiewe teks opsomming gebaseer op 'n volgorde-na-volgorde orienteerde enkoder-dekoder model wat met 'n diep herhaalde genereerde genereerde dekoder (DRGN). Laat struktuur inligting wat in die doel opsomming ingeplaas word, word geleer gebaseer op 'n herhaalde latent willekeurige model vir die opsomming kwaliteit te verbeter. Neurale variasionale inferensie is gebruik om die intrakbaar posterior inferensie te adres vir die herhaalde latente veranderlikes. Abstraktiewe opsommings word genereer gebaseer op beide die genereerbare latente veranderlikes en die diskriminasiewe deterministiese staatste. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op sommige benchmark datastelle in verskillende tale vertoon dat DRGN verbeteringe oor die staat van die kunstensmetodes bereik word.", 'am': 'አዲስ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ አዲስ ፍሬማር ለመቆጣጠር እናስጀምራለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የኩነቶች ምርጫዎች አዲስ የፍጥረት መለያየት እና የተለያየ የውጤት ግንኙነት በመሠረት ላይ ተለይቷል፡፡ በሌላ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የbenchmark ዳታዎች የፋይል ፈተናዎች DRGN በሀገር-የ-አርእስት ልማድ እንዲሻል ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন ফ্রেম প্রস্তাব করছি এক সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স- ডেকোডার মোডেলের ভিত্তিতে আবশ্যক টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের জন্য, যা গভীর পুনরাবর্তনের সাম্প্রতিক কাঠামোর তথ্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সংক্ষেপের মান উন্নতির জন্য পুনরাবর্তনের সাম্প্রতিক অযোগ্য মডেলের ভিত্তিতে শি Neural variational inference is employed to address the intractable posterior inference for the recurrent latent variables.  জেনারেটিভ সাম্প্রতিক পরিবর্তন এবং বৈষম্যিক সিদ্ধান্তের বিভিন্ন রাষ্ট্রের ভিত্তিতে আবশ্যক সংক্ষেপ তৈরি করা  বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বেনকমার্ক ডাটাসেটের বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে ডিআরজিন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতিতে উন্নতি পায়', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր շրջանակ վերացական տեքստի համառոտագրման համար, որը հիմնված է հաջորդականությամբ հաջորդականությամբ ուղղությամբ կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելի վրա, որը կառուցված է խորը կրկնվող սերունդ կոդեր (ԴՌԳ). Վերջին կառուցվածքի տեղեկատվությունը, որը ներկայացվում է նպատակային համառոտագրություններում, սովորվում է հիմնված կրկնվող լայն պատահական մոդելի վրա, որպեսզի բարելավվի համառոտագրության որակը: Նյարդային տարբերակային եզրակացությունը օգտագործվում է վերադառնալու անբռնելի հետևի եզրակացությունը կրկնվող թաքնված փոփոխականների համար: Աբստրակտիվ համառոտագրությունները ստեղծվում են սերունդների թաքնված փոփոխականների և խտրականում որոշող վիճակների վրա: Տարբեր լեզուներում որոշ համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ԴՌԳՆ-ը հասնում է բարելավման ամենաբարձր մեթոդների դեպքում:', 'az': 'Biz abstraktiv mətn təmizlənməsi üçün yeni bir framewor təklif edirik, sequence-to-sequence oriented encoder-decoder modeli ilə təmizlənmiş derin bir yenidən genital dekoder (DRGN). Hedef toplamlarında müəyyən edilən son quruluş məlumatları təkrarlama keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün tekrarlı latent rastgele modeli üzərində öyrənir. Nöral dəyişiklik infeksiyonu yenidən latent dəyişikliklərin intraktibil sonrakı dəyişikliklərinə çəkmək üçün istifadə edilir. Abstraktiv toplamlar generiktif latent dəyişikliklərə və diskriminasiyyətli deterministik durumlara dayandırılır. Bazı benchmark veri qurularında müxtəlif dillərdə çox müxtəlif eksperimentlər DRGN sanat metodlarının vəziyyəti ilə yaxşılaşdırmasını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi okvir za sažetak abstraktivnog teksta na osnovu model a orijentiranog kodera do sekvence, opremljenog dubokim rekonstruiranim generativnim dekoderom (DRGN). Posljednje strukturne informacije implicirane u ciljnim sažetkama se uče na temelju rekonstruiranog latentnog nasumičnog model a za poboljšanje kvalitete sažetke. Neuralna variacionalna infekcija je zaposlena kako bi se riješila intraktivna poslednja infekcija za povratne latentne varijacije. Abstraktivni sažetki su proizvedeni na temelju generičnih latentnih promjena i diskriminacijskih determinističkih država. Prošireni eksperimenti na nekim bazama podataka na različitim jezicima pokazuju da DRGN postigne poboljšanje u odnosu na metode stanja umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový rámec pro abstraktivní shrnutí textu založený na sekvenčně orientovaném kodérovém a dekodérovém modelu vybaveném hlubokým recidivním generativním dekodérem (DRGN). Latentní strukturní informace implikované v cílových shrnutích jsou získány na základě recidivujícího latentního náhodného modelu pro zlepšení kvality shrnutí. Neurální variační inference se používá k řešení nestabilní posteriorní inference pro recidivující latentní proměnné. Abstrakční souhrny jsou generovány jak na základě generativních latentních proměnných, tak diskriminačních deterministických stavů. Rozsáhlé experimenty na některých referenčních datových sadách v různých jazycích ukazují, že DRGN dosahuje zlepšení oproti nejmodernějším metodám.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue abstraktse teksti kokkuvõtliku raamistiku, mis põhineb järjestusest järjestusse orienteeritud kodeerija-dekoodri mudelil, mis on varustatud sügavkorduva generatiivse dekoodriga (DRGN). Sihtkokkuvõtetes sisalduv latentstruktuuri teave saadakse korduva latentse juhusliku mudeli põhjal, et parandada kokkuvõtte kvaliteeti. Neuraalset variatsiooni järeldust kasutatakse korduvate latentsete muutujate intratabiilse hilisema järelduse lahendamiseks. Kokkuvõtted koostatakse nii generatiivsete latentsete muutujate kui ka diskrimineerivate deterministlike olekute põhjal. Põhjalikud eksperimendid mõningate võrdlusandmekogumitega erinevates keeltes näitavad, et DRGN saavutab edusamme võrreldes kaasaegsete meetoditega.', 'ca': "Proposem un nou marc per a una resumensió abstracta del text basat en un model de codificador orientat secuencia a seqüència equipat amb un profund codificador de generació recurrent (DRGN). La informació sobre l'estructura última implicada en els resums objectius s'aprèn basant en un model aleatòri latent recurrent per millorar la qualitat de la resum. Neural variational inference is employed to address the intractable posterior inference for the recurrent latent variables.  Es generen resumes abstracts basats tant en les variables latents generatives com en els estats deterministes discriminatius. Extensive experiments on some benchmark datasets in different languages show that DRGN achieves improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.", 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta kehystä abstraktiiviselle tekstinkehitykselle, joka perustuu sekvenssi-sekvenssiin orientoituneeseen kooderi-dekooderimalliin, jossa on syvä toistuva generatiivinen dekooderi (DRGN). Kohdevalmisteihin sisältyvä latenttirakenne opitaan toistuvien latenttien satunnaismallien pohjalta tiivistelmän laadun parantamiseksi. Neuroiden variaatiopäättelyä käytetään käsittelemään toistuvien piilevien muuttujien vaikeasti ratkaistavaa posteriorista päättelyä. Tiivistelmät perustuvat sekä generatiivisiin latenttimuuttujiin että diskriminatiivisiin deterministisiin tiloihin. Laajat kokeet eräillä eri kielillä toteutetuilla vertailuaineistoilla osoittavat, että DRGN:llä saavutetaan parannuksia uusimpiin menetelmiin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem anyar kanggo resumen teks absolute Laptop" and "Desktop CalItem Sample rate AllProgressBar', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov okvir za abstraktivno povzetek besedila, ki temelji na modelu zaporedja-dekoderja, usmerjenem v zaporedje, opremljenem z globokim ponavljajočim generativnim dekoderjem (DRGN). Informacije o latentni strukturi, ki so navedene v ciljnih povzetkih, se pridobijo na podlagi ponavljajočega latentnega naključnega modela za izboljšanje kakovosti povzetka. Nevralna variacijska sklepanja se uporablja za obravnavanje intraktabilne posteriorne sklepe za ponavljajoče se latentne spremenljivke. Abstraktivni povzetki so ustvarjeni na osnovi generativnih latentnih spremenljivk in diskriminativnih determinističnih stanj. Obsežni poskusi z nekaterimi referenčnimi nabori podatkov v različnih jezikih kažejo, da DRGN dosega izboljšave v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi metodami.', 'ha': "Kana goyyar da wani firam na kasa ga kurarin matsayin ta kanana, a kan wata misali na-kode-dubi'a-sequence wanda aka yi wa shirin da wata kodi mai girma na sake koma (DRGN). An sanar da information na tsari na ƙara wanda aka yi amfani da cikin ƙararin goan a baka wani motsi na da aka sake raba randa kwanan kwanan da aka sake kyautata sifar ƙararin. Ana amfani da nau'in variant na neural dõmin a yi amfani da nau'in ƙarami wanda za'a iya gaskata wa mai lokaci na guda. An ƙãga ƙararin buƙata masu ƙari da aka baka biyu masu variablewa na ƙara da kuma masu yin rabo da baƙata. KCharselect unicode block name", 'he': 'אנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה לסומריזציה טקסטית אסטרקטיבית מבוססת על מודל קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם ומוכנן עם קודם דור חוזר עמוק (DRGN). מידע המבנה המאוחר שמרמז בסרטים המטרה נלמד על בסיס מודל אקראי המאוחר ומאוחר לשפר את איכות הסרטיזציה. משתמש בהנחה שונה נוירולית כדי להתמודד עם ההנחה האחורית הבלתי אפשרית עבור המשתנים הלאוטים המחזורים. סורטים אסטרקטיביים יוצרים בהתבסס על שני המשתנים המותרים הדורתיים והמדינות הדרמטיביות. Extensive experiments on some benchmark datasets in different languages show that DRGN achieves improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.', 'bo': 'We propose a new framework for abstractive text summarization based on a sequence-to-sequence oriented encoder-decoder model equipped with a deep recurrent generative decoder (DRGN). མཐའ་མའ་རིས་དབྱིབས་གནས་སྟངས་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ རྒྱུ་དངོས་འགྱུར་བའི་དབྱིབས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པ གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བཅུད་སྡུད་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེལ་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྟོན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ལས་བཟོས་ཡོད། སྐད་རིགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་གསལ་བརྟན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Towards Automatic Construction of News Overview Articles by News Synthesis', 'ar': 'نحو البناء التلقائي لنظرة عامة على الأخبار المقالات عن طريق تجميع الأخبار', 'pt': 'Rumo à construção automática de notícias Visão geral Artigos por síntese de notícias', 'fr': 'Vers une construction automatique des articles de synthèse des actualités par News Synthesis', 'es': 'Hacia la construcción automática de artículos de resumen de noticias por síntesis de noticias', 'ja': 'ニュース合成によるニュース概要記事の自動構築に向けて', 'zh': '以新闻综成新闻概览文章自构', 'hi': 'समाचार संश्लेषण द्वारा समाचार अवलोकन लेख के स्वचालित निर्माण की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к автоматическому построению новостных обзорных статей по синтезу новостей', 'ga': 'I dTreo Tógáil Uathoibríoch ar Airteagail Forbhreathnú Nuachta ag Sintéis Nuachta', 'ka': 'ახალი სინტეზიდან ავტომატიკური შექმნა ახალგაზომის დასახებ ახალგაზომის ახალგაზომის სინტეზიდან', 'hu': 'A hírek automatikus építése felé Áttekintés Cikkek szerint Hírek Szintézis', 'el': 'Προς την αυτόματη κατασκευή ειδήσεων Επισκόπηση Άρθρα από Νέα Σύνθεση', 'it': 'Verso la costruzione automatica di notizie Panoramica Articoli per notizie Sintesi', 'lt': 'Automatinės naujienų apžvalgos kūrimo straipsniai pagal naujienų sintezę', 'mk': 'За автоматска изградба на статии за преглед на вестите од новинската синтеза', 'ml': 'വാര്\u200dത്ത സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാര്\u200dത്ത കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ സ്വയം നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം', 'kk': 'Жаңалық синтезасы бойынша жаңалық қарау мақалаларын автоматты түрде құру', 'mt': "Lejn Kostruzzjoni Awtomatika tal-Artikoli ta' Ħarsa Ġenerali tal-Aħbarijiet bis-Sintesi tal-Aħbarijiet", 'ms': 'Towards Automatic Construction of News Overview Articles by News Synthesis', 'ro': 'Către construirea automată a știrilor Prezentare generală Articole de știri Sinteză', 'mn': 'Шинэ Синтезийн автоматически зохион байгуулалт', 'sr': 'На автоматичну стројењу новинских прегледања членове новинских синтеза', 'no': 'Gå til automatisk konstruksjon av nyhetsverktøyartiklar ved nyhetsverktøy', 'pl': 'W kierunku automatycznej konstrukcji wiadomości Przegląd artykułów przez News Synthesis', 'sv': 'Mot automatisk konstruktion av nyheter Översikt Artiklar av nyheter Syntes', 'ta': 'செய்தி கூட்டிணைப்பு மூலம் தானாகவே செய்தி மேல் காட்சி கட்டுரைகள்', 'so': 'Towards Automatic Construction of News Overview Articles by News Synthesis', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සංවිධානයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය නිර්මාණය', 'ur': 'نیویس سینٹز کے ذریعے نیویس اووروی آرٹیکل کی آٹوٹ ایجاد کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hướng tới việc xây dựng bản tin tổng hợp các bài báo', 'bg': 'Към автоматично изграждане на новини Преглед Статии по Новини Синтез', 'hr': 'Prema automatskoj konstrukciji novinskog nadzora članaka novinske sinteze', 'da': 'På vej mod automatisk opbygning af nyheder Oversigt Artikler af nyheder Syntese', 'nl': 'Naar automatische nieuwsconstructie Overzicht Artikelen per nieuwssynthese', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zur automatischen Erstellung von Nachrichten Übersicht Artikel von News Synthese', 'ko': '뉴스 합성을 이용하여 뉴스 종합 서술 문장의 자동 생성을 실현하다', 'id': 'Menuju Pembangunan Otomatis Artikel Overview Berita oleh Sintesis Berita', 'fa': 'به سمت ساختن اتوماتیک مجموعه\u200cهای کنترل اخبار توسط سینتز اخبار', 'sw': 'Mjengo wa Makala ya Habari Kupitia Ufuatiliaji wa Habari', 'tr': 'Täzele Sentezi tarapyndan Awtomatik Ýarlamak', 'sq': 'Për ndërtimin automatik të artikujve të shqyrtimit të lajmeve nga Sinteza e lajmeve', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'af': 'Gaan na Outomatiese konstruksie van Nuus Oorskou Artikels deur Nuus Sintetiseer', 'hy': 'Առաջին նորությունների համակարգչային հոդվածների ավտոմատիկ կառուցվածքը նորությունների սինթեզի միջոցով', 'az': 'Haqq Sintezi il…ô Avtomatik Yapƒ±landƒ±rma M…ôtnikl…ôri', 'bn': 'সংবাদ সিন্টিসেসের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সংবাদ সার্ভিউ আর্টিকেলের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নির্মাণ', 'bs': 'Prema automatskoj konstrukciji novinskog nadzora članaka novinske sinteze', 'ca': "Vers la construcció automàtica d'artículs d'una visió general de notícies per la síntesi de notícies", 'cs': 'Směrem k automatické konstrukci novinek Přehled Články podle novinek Syntéza', 'et': 'Uudiste automaatse ehitamise suunas Ülevaade Artiklid Uudiste sünteesi järgi', 'fi': 'Kohti uutisten automaattista rakentamista Yleiskatsaus Artikkelit uutisten mukaan Synthesis', 'sk': 'Proti avtomatični gradnji novic Pregled člankov po novicah Sinteza', 'jv': 'TORDMO Automatik Konstiturasi Kebebasan Ndelengkat Artik Perancis Sentenis', 'he': 'לכיוון בנייה אוטומטית של מאמרים על תצוגת חדשות על ידי סינטזה חדשות', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Towards Automatic Construction of News Overview Articles by News Synthesis'}
{'en': 'In this paper we investigate a new task of automatically constructing an overview article from a given set of news articles about a news event. We propose a news synthesis approach to address this task based on passage segmentation, ranking, selection and merging. Our proposed approach is compared with several typical multi-document summarization methods on the Wikinews dataset, and achieves the best performance on both automatic evaluation and manual evaluation.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نحقق في مهمة جديدة تتمثل في إنشاء مقالة عامة تلقائيًا من مجموعة معينة من المقالات الإخبارية حول حدث إخباري. نقترح نهجًا لتجميع الأخبار لمعالجة هذه المهمة بناءً على تجزئة المقطع ، والترتيب ، والاختيار ، والدمج. تتم مقارنة نهجنا المقترح بالعديد من طرق تلخيص المستندات المتعددة النموذجية على مجموعة بيانات Wikinews ، ويحقق أفضل أداء في كل من التقييم التلقائي والتقييم اليدوي.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo investigamos uma nova tarefa de construir automaticamente um artigo de visão geral a partir de um determinado conjunto de notícias sobre um evento noticioso. Propomos uma abordagem de síntese de notícias para abordar essa tarefa com base na segmentação, classificação, seleção e mesclagem de passagens. Nossa abordagem proposta é comparada com vários métodos típicos de sumarização de vários documentos no conjunto de dados Wikinews e alcança o melhor desempenho tanto na avaliação automática quanto na avaliação manual.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions une nouvelle tâche consistant à créer automatiquement un article de synthèse à partir d'un ensemble donné d'articles de presse concernant un événement d'actualité. Nous proposons une approche de synthèse des actualités pour répondre à cette tâche en fonction de la segmentation, du classement, de la sélection et de la fusion des passages. Notre approche proposée est comparée à plusieurs méthodes de synthèse multi-documents typiques sur le jeu de données Wikinews, et atteint les meilleures performances à la fois en termes d'évaluation automatique et d'évaluation manuelle.", 'es': 'En este artículo investigamos una nueva tarea de construir automáticamente un artículo de resumen a partir de un conjunto determinado de artículos de noticias sobre un evento noticioso. Proponemos un enfoque de síntesis de noticias para abordar esta tarea basado en la segmentación de pasajes, la clasificación, la selección y la fusión. Nuestro enfoque propuesto se compara con varios métodos típicos de resumen de varios documentos en el conjunto de datos de Wikinews, y logra el mejor rendimiento tanto en la evaluación automática como en la evaluación manual.', 'ja': 'この論文では、ニュースイベントに関する一連のニュース記事から概要記事を自動的に構築する新しいタスクを調査します。パスセグメンテーション、ランキング、選択、およびマージに基づいて、このタスクに対処するためのニュース合成アプローチを提案します。当社の提案されたアプローチは、Wikinewsデータセット上のいくつかの典型的なマルチドキュメントの要約方法と比較され、自動評価と手動評価の両方で最高のパフォーマンスを達成します。', 'zh': '本文中,臣等考求新任,即从新闻事给定新闻文集自构概述文。 建一段落之分,排名选并之新闻,综理其事。 凡此诸法,与维基新闻数集之多文档总而校之,皆取其最佳者。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एक समाचार घटना के बारे में समाचार लेखों के दिए गए सेट से स्वचालित रूप से एक सिंहावलोकन लेख बनाने के एक नए कार्य की जांच करते हैं। हम मार्ग विभाजन, रैंकिंग, चयन और विलय के आधार पर इस कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए एक समाचार संश्लेषण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की तुलना विकिसमाचार डेटासेट पर कई विशिष्ट बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण विधियों के साथ की जाती है, और स्वचालित मूल्यांकन और मैनुअल मूल्यांकन दोनों पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы исследуем новую задачу автоматического построения обзорной статьи из заданного набора новостных статей о новостном событии. Для решения этой задачи мы предлагаем подход синтеза новостей, основанный на сегментации, ранжировании, отборе и объединении пассажей. Предлагаемый нами подход сравнивается с несколькими типичными методами обобщения нескольких документов в наборе данных Wikinews и обеспечивает наилучшую производительность как при автоматической оценке, так и при ручной оценке.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid imscrúdú ar thasc nua maidir le halt forbhreathnú a thógáil go huathoibríoch as sraith áirithe alt nuachta faoi imeacht nuachta. Molaimid cur chuige sintéise nuachta chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tasc seo bunaithe ar dheighilt pasáiste, rangú, roghnú agus cumasc. Cuirtear an cur chuige atá beartaithe againn i gcomparáid le roinnt gnáth-mhodhanna achoimre ildhoiciméid ar thacar sonraí Wikinews, agus baintear amach an fheidhmíocht is fearr ar mheastóireacht uathoibríoch agus ar mheastóireacht láimhe.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ავტომატურად ახალი დავაკეთებთ ახალი დავაკეთება ახალი დავაკეთება ახალი მოვლენტის შესახებ ახალი მოვლენტის შესახებ. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი სინტეზის მიღება ამ საქაღალდეს გადაწყვება, გადაწყვება, არჩევა და ერთადერთება. ჩვენი წარმოიდგინე პროგორმაცია ვიკინუტერის მონაცემების საზოგადოებაში მრავალური მრავალური დოკუმენტების გამოყენება და მიიღება საუკეთესო გამოყენება და მარტიკ', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία διερευνούμε ένα νέο έργο της αυτόματης κατασκευής ενός άρθρου επισκόπησης από ένα δεδομένο σύνολο άρθρων ειδήσεων σχετικά με ένα ειδησεογραφικό γεγονός. Προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση σύνθεσης ειδήσεων για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του έργου με βάση την τμηματοποίηση, την κατάταξη, την επιλογή και τη συγχώνευση των διαβατηρίων. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση συγκρίνεται με αρκετές τυπικές μεθόδους σύνοψης πολλαπλών εγγράφων στο σύνολο δεδομένων και επιτυγχάνει την καλύτερη απόδοση τόσο στην αυτόματη αξιολόγηση όσο και στη χειρωνακτική αξιολόγηση.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban azt a feladatot vizsgáljuk, hogy egy adott hírcsoportból automatikusan összeállítsuk egy áttekintő cikket egy adott eseményről. Ennek a feladatnak a megoldására hírszintézis megközelítést javasoljuk, amely a szegmentálás, rangsorolás, kiválasztás és egyesítés alapján történik. Javasolt megközelítésünket több tipikus többdokumentumos összefoglaló módszerrel hasonlítjuk össze a Wikinews adatkészleten, és a legjobb teljesítményt érjük el mind az automatikus értékelés, mind a manuális értékelés terén.', 'it': 'In questo articolo indaghiamo su un nuovo compito di costruire automaticamente un articolo di panoramica da un dato insieme di articoli di notizie su un evento di notizie. Proponiamo un approccio di sintesi delle notizie per affrontare questo compito basato sulla segmentazione dei passaggi, classifica, selezione e fusione. Il nostro approccio proposto è confrontato con diversi metodi tipici di sintesi multi-documento sul dataset Wikinews, e raggiunge le migliori prestazioni sia nella valutazione automatica che nella valutazione manuale.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда жаңа тапсырманы автоматты түрде жаңа мақаланы жаңа жаңа оқиға туралы жаңа мақаланы құру үшін тексеріп тұрмыз. Біз осы тапсырманы шектеу, реттеу, таңдау және біріктіру үшін жаңалық синтезаторының тәртібін ұсынамыз. Біздің ұсынысымыз Wikinews деректер жинақтағы көп құжатты жазылу әдістерімен салыстырылады. Бұл автоматты оқу мен қолмен оқу үшін ең жақсы жұмыс істейді.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki tugas baru untuk membina secara automatik artikel panjang dari set berita yang diberikan mengenai peristiwa berita. Kami cadangkan pendekatan sintesis berita untuk mengatasi tugas ini berdasarkan segmentasi laluan, rangkaian, pemilihan dan gabungan. Pendekatan kami diusulkan dibandingkan dengan beberapa kaedah pengringkasan multi-dokumen biasa pada set data Wikinews, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada penilaian automatik dan penilaian manual.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes tiriame naują užduotį automatiškai sukurti apžvalgos straipsnį iš tam tikrų naujienų straipsnių apie naujienų renginį. Siūlome naujienų sintezės metodą šiai užduotims spręsti, grindžiamą perėjimo segmentacija, rangu, atranka ir sujungimu. Mūsų siūlomas požiūris palyginamas su keliais tipiniais Wikinews duomenų rinkinio daugiadokumentais apibendrinimo metodais ir pasiekiamas geriausias rezultatas atliekant automatinį vertinimą ir rankinį vertinimą.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник истражуваме нова задача за автоматски изградба на статија за преглед од одреден сет новински статии за новински настан. Предложуваме пристап на новинска синтеза за решавање на оваа задача базиран на сегментација на преминот, рангирање, избор и спојување. Нашиот предложен пристап се споредува со неколку типични методи за резултат на мултидокументите на податоците на Wikinews, и постигнува најдобра резултат на автоматска и рачна евалуација.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലി അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാര്\u200dത്തകാര്യത്തെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കുറിച്ച് ഒരു  പാസ്സേജ് വിഭാഗവും, റാങ്ങിംഗ്, തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുകയും, ഒരുമിച്ച് ചേര്\u200dക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഈ ജോലി നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രായോഗ്യം വിക്കിന്വീസ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പല തരത്തിലുള്ള മുഴുവന്\u200d രീതികളോട് താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമാകുന്നു. സ്വയം', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument ninvestigaw kompitu ġdid ta’ kostruzzjoni awtomatika ta’ artikolu ta’ ħarsa ġenerali minn sett partikolari ta’ artikoli ta’ a ħbarijiet dwar avveniment ta’ aħbarijiet. Aħna nipproponu approċċ ta' sinteżi tal-a ħbarijiet biex nindirizzaw dan il-kompitu bbażat fuq is-segmentazzjoni tal-passaġġi, il-klassifikazzjoni, l-għażla u l-amalgamazzjoni. L-approċċ propost tagħna huwa mqabbel ma’ diversi metodi tipiċi ta’ sommarju b’diversi dokumenti fuq is-sett tad-dejta Wikinews, u jikseb l-aħjar prestazzjoni kemm fuq l-evalwazzjoni awtomatika kif ukoll fuq l-evalwazzjoni manwali.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдээний үйл явцын тухай мэдээллийн өгүүлбэрээс автоматаар нээлттэй бүтээх шинэ даалгаварыг судалж байна. Бид энэ ажлыг хамтдаа хамтдаа хамтдаа мэдээллийн шинжлэх ухааны аргыг санал болгож байна. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь Wikinews өгөгдлийн сангийн олон төрлийн бичиг баримтыг харьцуулж, автоматжуулалт болон гарын оюутнуудын хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo novi zadatak automatskog konstruiranja predviđenog članaka iz određenog skupa novinskih članaka o novinskom događaju. Predlažemo pristup novinskim sintezama da riješimo ovaj zadatak na osnovu segmentacije prolaza, reda, izbora i okupljanja. Naš predloženi pristup se uspoređuje sa nekoliko tipičnih metoda sažetanja multidokumenta na Wikinews podacima, i postiže najbolji učinkovit i automatske procjene i ručne procjene.', 'no': 'I denne papiret undersøker vi ei ny oppgåve om å automatisk konstruera eit oversiktartikkel frå eit gitt sett nyhetsgiver om ein nyhetsgiver. Vi foreslår ein nyhetsintetsisk tilnærming til å adressa denne oppgåva basert på passasjekmentasjon, rangering, utval og samlinga. Det første tilnærminga vår er samanlikna med fleire typiske multidokumentsamanseringsmetoder på Wikinews-datasettet, og gjer det beste utviklinga på både automatisk evaluering og manuell evaluering.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy nowe zadanie automatycznego budowania artykułu przeglądowego z danego zestawu artykułów wiadomościowych o wydarzeniu wiadomościowym. Proponujemy podejście syntezy wiadomości, aby sprostać temu zadaniu w oparciu o segmentację pasażu, ranking, selekcję i łączenie. Proponowane podejście porównuje się z kilkoma typowymi metodami podsumowywania wielu dokumentów na zbiorze danych Wikinews i osiąga najlepszą wydajność zarówno przy automatycznej ocenie, jak i ręcznej ocenie.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare investigăm o nouă sarcină de a construi automat un articol de ansamblu dintr-un anumit set de articole de știri despre un eveniment de știri. Propunem o abordare de sinteză a știrilor pentru a aborda această sarcină bazată pe segmentarea pasajelor, clasare, selecție și fuzionare. Abordarea noastră propusă este comparată cu mai multe metode tipice de rezumare a mai multor documente pe setul de date Wikinews și obține cele mai bune performanțe atât în evaluarea automată, cât și în evaluarea manuală.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் தானாகவே ஒரு புதிய செய்தி நிகழ்வு பற்றி தானாகவே ஒரு மேலாளர் கட்டுரையை உருவாக்கும் ஒரு செய்தி  நாம் இந்த செய்தியின் ஒத்திசைவு முறைமையை நிரூபிக்கவும் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் கடவுச் செல்லும் பிரிவு, ஒட் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு விக்னிவ்ஸ் தரவுத்தளத்தில் பல்வேறு ஆவண சுருக்கும் முறைகளுடன் ஒப்பிடுவது, தானாகவே மதிப்பிடுதல் மற', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අලුත් වැඩක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වගේ වාර්තාව ස අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, රේජින්, තෝරාගන්න හා එකතු වෙනුවෙන් මේ කාර්ය විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට විකින්තුරු දත්ත සූදානයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග විකින්තුරු වලින් විකින්තුරු සූදා', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats undersöker vi en ny uppgift att automatiskt konstruera en översiktsartikel från en given uppsättning nyhetsartiklar om en nyhetshändelse. Vi föreslår en nyhetssyntes metod för att hantera denna uppgift baserat på passagesegmentering, rangordning, urval och sammanslagning. Vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt jämförs med flera typiska sammanfattningsmetoder för flera dokument i Wikinews-datauppsättningen, och uppnår bästa prestanda på både automatisk utvärdering och manuell utvärdering.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku baaraynaa shaqada cusub oo a an automatic ka dhisno qoraal ka soo qoran warqado warqado la qoray oo ku saabsan dhacdooyinka warqada. Waxaannu horumarinaynaa qaabilaada warqada ah si loo sheekeysto shuqulkaas oo lagu saleynayo qeybinta baaxada, baaritaanka, doorashada iyo isku daryeelashada. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday waa la barbaran karaa qaabab badan oo kala duduwan oo qoraal ah oo lagu soo qorayo macluumaadka Wikinews, wuxuuna gaadhaa sameynta ugu wanaagsan ee ku saabsan qiimeynta bilowga ah iyo qiimeynta manual ah.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک نئی کام کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ ایک خبر حادثہ کے بارے میں ایک نئی خبروں کے مجموعہ سے ایک نئی مثال بنانے کے لئے ایک نئی کام۔ ہم نے اس کام کے بارے میں ایک خبر سینٹسی طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو مسافر سیگنٹسی، رینگ، انتخاب اور مرکز پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طرح ویکینیوز ڈیٹ سٹ پر بہت سی مختلف مثالیں دکھانے کے مطابق مقایسہ کی جاتی ہے، اور وہاں آٹوٹی ارزیابی اور مہمانی ارزیابی کے مطابق بہترین عملکرد حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz yangi vazifani avtomatik ravishda yangi xabarlarni yangi xabar yaratishimiz mumkin. Biz bu vazifani ajratish, chegara, tanlash va birlashtirish asosida yaratish uchun yangilik synthesis usulini tahlil qilamiz. Mavjud soʻzlarimiz Wikinews maʼlumotlar tarkibida bir necha ko'plab hujjatning summary usullari bilan kamaytirish va avtomatik qiymatni va qoʻlbola qiymatida eng yaxshi bajarish imkoniyatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra một nhiệm vụ mới về việc tự động hình thành một bài báo tổng quát từ một loạt các bài báo về một sự kiện tin tức. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tổng hợp tin tức để giải quyết nhiệm vụ này dựa trên phân đoạn, xếp hạng, chọn và hợp nhất. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta được so sánh với nhiều phương pháp tổng hợp đa tài liệu điển hình trên bộ dữ liệu WikiLnews, và đạt được hiệu quả tốt nhất về việc đánh giá tự động và đánh giá bằng tay.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме нова задача за автоматично изграждане на общ преглед на статия от определен набор от новини за събитие. Предлагаме подход за синтезиране на новини за справяне с тази задача въз основа на сегментация на пасажите, класиране, подбор и сливане. Нашият предложен подход се сравнява с няколко типични метода за обобщаване на множество документи в набора от данни на Уикинюз и постига най-добри резултати както при автоматична оценка, така и при ръчна оценка.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo novi zadatak automatskog konstruiranja predviđenog članaka iz određenog skupa novinskih članaka o novinskom događaju. Predlažemo pristup novinske sinteze za rješavanje ovog zadatka na temelju segmentacije prolaza, reda, izbora i okupljanja. Naš predloženi pristup se uspoređuje s nekoliko tipičnih metoda sažetka multidokumenta na Wikinews podacima i postiže najbolji učinkovit na automatskoj procjeni i ručnoj procjeni.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel onderzoeken we een nieuwe taak om automatisch een overzichtsartikel op te bouwen uit een bepaalde set nieuwsberichten over een nieuwsfeest. We stellen een nieuwssynthesebenadering voor om deze taak aan te pakken op basis van passagesegmentatie, rangschikking, selectie en samenvoeging. Onze voorgestelde aanpak wordt vergeleken met verschillende typische multi-document samenvattingsmethoden op de Wikinews dataset, en bereikt de beste prestaties op zowel automatische evaluatie als handmatige evaluatie.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi en ny opgave med automatisk at konstruere en oversigtsartikel ud fra et givet sæt nyhedsartikler om en nyhedshændelse. Vi foreslår en nyhedssyntese tilgang til at løse denne opgave baseret på passagesegmentering, rangering, udvælgelse og fusion. Vores foreslåede tilgang sammenlignes med flere typiske metoder til opsummering af flere dokumenter på Wikinews datasættet, og opnår den bedste ydeevne på både automatisk evaluering og manuel evaluering.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir eine neue Aufgabe, automatisch einen Übersichtsartikel aus einem bestimmten Satz von Nachrichtenartikeln über ein Nachrichtenereignis zu erstellen. Wir schlagen einen Nachrichtensynthese-Ansatz vor, um diese Aufgabe zu lösen, basierend auf Passagensegmentierung, Ranking, Auswahl und Zusammenführung. Unser vorgeschlagener Ansatz wird mit mehreren typischen Mehrdokumentzusammenfassungsmethoden auf dem Wikinews-Datensatz verglichen und erzielt die beste Leistung sowohl bei der automatischen Auswertung als auch bei der manuellen Auswertung.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki tugas baru untuk membangun secara otomatis artikel overview dari set berita tertentu tentang peristiwa berita. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan sintesis berita untuk mengatasi tugas ini berdasarkan segmentasi, rangkaian, seleksi dan gabungan. Pendekatan kami yang diusulkan dibandingkan dengan beberapa metode penghasilan multidokumen tipis pada set data Wikinews, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik pada evaluasi otomatis dan evaluasi manual.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک کار جدید از ساختن یک مقاله را از مجموعه\u200cهای اخبار در مورد یک اتفاق اخبار تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش تنظیم خبری برای حل کردن این کار بر اساس بخش گذاری، رشته\u200cبندی، انتخاب و جمع کردن. دستور پیشنهاد ما با چند روش جمع کردن مدارک متفاوت در مجموعه داده های ویکینویس مقایسه می شود و بهترین عملکرد در ارزیابی خودکار و ارزیابی دستی را می رساند.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 새로운 임무, 즉 주어진 뉴스 사건에 관한 뉴스 문장에서 자동으로 종합 문장을 구성하는 것을 연구했다.우리는 단락의 분할, 정렬, 선택, 통합을 바탕으로 하는 뉴스 합성 방법을 제시했다.우리가 제시한 방법은 Wikinews 데이터 세트의 몇 가지 전형적인 다중 문서 요약 방법과 비교하여 자동 평가와 수동 평가에서 가장 좋은 성능을 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunachunguza jukumu mpya la kutengeneza makala ya kudhibiti kwa kujitegemea kutoka kwenye seti maalum za makala za habari kuhusu tukio la habari. Tunazipendekeza mbinu ya usangazaji wa habari kujadili kazi hii kwa kutumia mchanganyiko wa kupigwa, upande wa rangi, uchaguzi na kuunganisha. Matokeo yetu ya pendekezo yanalinganishwa na njia kadhaa za muhtasari wa nyaraka mbalimbali kwenye seti ya taarifa za Wikinews, na hupata ufanisi bora zaidi katika maendeleo ya moja kwa moja na utafiti wa mikononi.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz täze bir täze zady täze bir bagly hadysa hakynda bir ýagdaý barada awtomatik bir manzara inşa etmek üçin bardyk. Biz bu zady geçiş segmentasiýasyna, sahypa, seçmeli we birleşmeli üçin bir ýazat teklip edip otyrys. Biziň teklip eden metodamyz Wikinews veri setirinde birnäçe dürli multi-sened toplanty yöntemleri bilen karşılaşdyrylýar we otomatik deňleýänlik we el deňleýänlik üçin iň gowy hereket edip bilýär.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የዜና ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ላይ የተሰጠ የዜና ቃላት አዲስ ስራ በራስነት ለማነጽ አዲስ ጉዳይ እናምርመራለን፡፡ ይህንን ሥራ በመግቢያ ግንኙነት፣ መግለጫ፣ ምርጫ እና ማጋራጨት የተደረገ የዜና ስርዓት መግለጫ እናስባለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓታችን በተለየ ብዙዎች የሰነድ አቁማጮች ሥርዓቶችን በሚያሳየው የWikinews ዳታተር እና በራሱ ማስታወቂያ እና በጃንደረባ ማስታወቂያ ላይ የበለጠ ጥያቄን እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier ondersoek ons 'n nuwe taak van outomaties 'n oorskou artikel van' n gegewe stel nuus artikels oor' n nuus gebeurtenis. Ons voorstel 'n nuussintezes toegang om hierdie taak te adres gebaseer op die wagsegmentasie, rangering, kies en samekoms. Ons voorgestelde toegang is vergelyk met verskeie tipiese multidokument opsomming metodes op die Wikinews datastel en bereik die beste prestasie op beide outomatiese evaluering en manuele evaluering.", 'sq': 'In this paper we investigate a new task of automatically constructing an overview article from a given set of news articles about a news event.  Ne propozojmë një qasje sinteze lajmesh për të trajtuar këtë detyrë bazuar në segmentimin e pasazheve, renditjen, zgjedhjen dhe bashkimin. Përqasja jonë e propozuar krahasohet me disa metoda tipike të përmbledhjes së shumëdokumenteve në grupin e të dhënave Wikinews dhe arrin performancën më të mirë në vlerësimin automatik dhe vlerësimin manual.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նոր խնդիրը՝ ինքնաբերաբար կառուցել մի ամբողջ հոդվածք նորությունների մասին մի հատված հոդվածներից: Մենք առաջարկում ենք նորությունների սինթեզի մոտեցում, որպեսզի լուծենք այս խնդիրը, հիմնված ընթացքի սեգրեգացիայի, դասավորման, ընտրության և միավորման վրա: Մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումը համեմատում է Wiquinw-ի տվյալների համակարգի բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման մեթոդների հետ, և հասնում է լավագույն արդյունքներին՝ ինչպես ավտոմատիկ, ինչպես նաև ձեռքի գնահատման համար:', 'bn': 'In this paper we investigate a new task of automatically constructing an overview article from a given set of news articles about a news event.  প্যাসেজ বিভাগ, রেঙ্কিং এবং নির্বাচন এবং একত্রিত ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে এই কাজের সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি সংব আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির তুলনা হচ্ছে উইকিনিউস ডাটাসেটের বেশ কয়েকটি সাধারণ মাল্টিক নথিপত্রের সংক্ষেপের মাধ্যমে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় মূল্য', 'cs': 'V tomto článku zkoumáme nový úkol automatického sestavení přehledného článku z dané sady zpravodajských článků o zpravodajské události. Pro řešení tohoto úkolu navrhujeme přístup syntézy zpráv založený na segmentaci pasáží, hodnocení, výběru a sloučení. Náš navržený přístup je porovnán s několika typickými metodami shrnutí více dokumentů na datové sadě Wikinews a dosahuje nejlepšího výkonu jak při automatickém vyhodnocování, tak i při ručním vyhodnocování.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda yeni bir məlumatı xəbər olaraq verilən bir neçə məlumatdan avtomatik olaraq inşa etmək üçün təşkil edirik. Biz bu işi seçmək, seçmək və birləşdirmək üçün xəbər sintezi tərzini təklif edirik. Bizim təklifimiz Wikinews veri qutusu ilə müxtəlif çoxlu beləliklə müəyyən edilən metodlar ilə qarşılaşdırılmışdır, və hər ikisinin automatik değerlendirməsi və əlli değerlendirməsinin ən yaxşı performansını başa çatdırır.', 'ca': "En aquest article investigam una nova tasca de construir automàticament un article d'una visió general d'un conjunt d'articles de notícies sobre un esdeveniment de notícies. Proposem un enfocament de síntesi de notícies per abordar aquesta tasca basat en la segmentació de passatges, la classificació, la selecció i la fusió. El nostre enfocament proposat es compara amb diversos mètodes típics de resum multidocumental del conjunt de dades Wikinews, i aconsegueix el millor rendiment tant en l'evaluació automàtica com en l'evaluació manual.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru istražujemo novi zadatak automatskog konstruiranja predviđenog članaka iz određenog skupa novinskih članaka o novinskom događaju. Predlažemo pristup novinske sinteze za rješavanje ovog zadatka na temelju segmentacije prolaza, ranking a, selekcije i okupljanja. Naš predloženi pristup se uspoređuje sa nekoliko tipičnih metoda sažetka multidokumenta na Wikinews podacima, i postiže najbolji učinkovit i automatske procjene i ručne procjene.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan uutta tehtävää rakentaa automaattisesti yleiskuvaartikkeli tietystä uutisartikkelisarjasta uutistapahtumasta. Tämän tehtävän ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutissynteettistä lähestymistapaa, joka perustuu läpikulkusegmentointiin, luokitteluun, valintaan ja yhdistämiseen. Ehdotettua lähestymistapaa verrataan useisiin tyypillisiin Wikinews-aineiston monidokumenttien yhteenvetomenetelmiin, ja se saavuttaa parhaan suorituskyvyn sekä automaattisessa että manuaalisessa arvioinnissa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime uut ülesannet luua automaatselt ülevaade artiklist teatud uudistesündmuse kohta. Me pakume välja uudissünteesi lähenemisviisi selle ülesande lahendamiseks, mis põhineb läbipääsu segmenteerimisel, järjestamisel, valikul ja ühendamisel. Meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi võrreldakse mitmete tüüpiliste mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtlusmeetoditega Wikinewsi andmekogumis ning saavutatakse parimad tulemused nii automaatsel kui ka käsitsi hindamisel.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו חוקרים משימה חדשה של בניית אוטומטית מאמר מסוג מסוים של מאמרים חדשות על אירוע חדשות. אנו מציעים גישה לסינטזה חדשות כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת מבוססת על סגמנציה מעבר, מעמד, בחירה ומיזוג. הגישה המוצעת שלנו שווה עם כמה שיטות ריזוריזציה מיוחדת טיפוסיות על קבוצת מידע Wikinews, ומשיגת את ההופעה הטובה ביותר על הערכה אוטומטית וגם הערכה ידנית.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, muna ƙidãya wani aikin da za'a samar da wani makala na bayani farat ɗaya daga wani set of makala na lãbãri game da wani abu. Munã buɗe wani hanyor shirin da ke haɗa wannan aiki a kan salon da aka raba shirin hanya, yin sauri, zaɓi da haɗi. Tsarinmu da aka buɗe shi yana sami da wasu hanyoyin kurarin-multi-dokuman na'ura a kan data na Wikinews, kuma yana sãmun mafi kyaun aikin ƙaddara a kan ƙaddara farat ɗaya da kake ta ƙayyade.", 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo novo nalogo samodejnega sestavljanja preglednega članka iz danega nabora novic o novinarskem dogodku. Predlagamo pristop sinteze novic za reševanje te naloge, ki temelji na segmentaciji prehodov, razvrščanju, izbiri in združevanju. Naš predlagani pristop primerjamo z več tipičnimi metodami povzemanja več dokumentov na Wikinews podatkovnem naboru in dosegamo najboljšo učinkovitost tako pri avtomatičnem kot ročnem vrednotenju.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilih iki kita yatêkake nggawe task sing otomatik nggawe ndhek bantêr artik sing ngewehke perkaraan balêr sing nganggo perkaraan balêr Monday Awak dhéwé ngéwé ngerasakno karo akeh sistem dadi nggawe multi-dokumen sing nyebutaké karo hal-nyebuturan yang cukup, lan sampek dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing gak dhéwé, suku akeh operasi layakno karo pawaran manut.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གསར་འགུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གསར་གཏོང་བྱས་ཏེ། We propose a news synthesis approach to address this task based on passage segmentation, ranking, selection and merging. Our proposed approach is compared with several typical multi-document summarization methods on the Wikinews dataset, and achieves the best performance on both automatic evaluation and manual evaluation.'}
{'en': 'When to Finish? Optimal Beam Search for Neural Text Generation (modulo beam size)', 'ar': 'متى تنتهي؟ البحث الأمثل عن الشعاع عن توليد نص عصبي (حجم شعاع معياري)', 'es': '¿Cuándo terminar? Búsqueda óptima de haces para la generación de texto neuronal (tamaño de haz de módulo)', 'fr': 'Quand terminer\xa0? Recherche de faisceau optimale pour la génération de texte neuronal (taille de faisceau modulo)', 'pt': 'Quando terminar? Pesquisa de feixe ideal para geração de texto neural (tamanho do feixe do módulo)', 'ja': 'いつ終わるのですか？ニューラルテキスト生成のための最適なビーム検索（モジュロビームサイズ）', 'hi': 'कब खत्म करें? तंत्रिका पाठ पीढ़ी के लिए इष्टतम बीम खोज (modulo बीम आकार)', 'zh': '何时成? 以成神经文本之最佳光束搜索(模光束大小)', 'ru': 'Когда заканчивать? Оптимальный поиск нейронного текста (размер луча по модулю)', 'ga': 'Cathain a Críochnaigh? Cuardach Líoma Is Fearr do Ghiniúint Téacs Néarach (méid an léasa modulo)', 'ka': 'კჲდა ეა ჱაგპქთქ? პოტიმალური ბემის ძიება ნეირალური ტექსტის შექმნა (მოდულო ბემის ზომა)', 'hu': 'Mikor fejezzük be? Optimális sugárzási keresés a neurális szöveggeneráláshoz (modulo sugárméret)', 'el': 'Πότε θα τελειώσουμε; Βέλτιστη αναζήτηση ακτίνων για τη δημιουργία νευρωνικού κειμένου (μέγεθος δέσμης modulo)', 'it': 'Quando finire? Ricerca ottimale del fascio per la generazione di testo neurale (modulo beam size)', 'kk': 'Қайда аяқтау керек? Нейрондық мәтін құру үшін оптималдық Beam іздеу (модульдің жұлдыз өлшемі)', 'lt': 'Kada baigti? Optimali šviesos paieška neurologinio teksto generacijai (modulio šviesos dydis)', 'mk': 'When to Finish?  Оптимално пребарување на неурални тексти (големина на модулот)', 'ml': 'എപ്പോഴാണ് അവസാനിക്കേണ്ടത്? നെയുറല്\u200d പദാവലി ജനിപ്പിക്കുവാനുള്ള ഓപ്റ്റിമാല്\u200d ബീമ് തിരയുക (മോഡുലോ ബീമിന്റെ വലിപ്പം)', 'mn': 'Хэдэн дуусах вэ? Сайхан бөмбөлөг мэдрэлийн текст үүсгэлийг хайх (модуль газрын хэмжээ)', 'ms': 'Bila selesai? Gelintar Kabur Optimal untuk Jenerasi Teks Neural (saiz cahaya modulo)', 'no': 'Når skal slutta? Optimal Beam- søk etter neuraltekstgenerering (modulo beam- storleik)', 'mt': 'Meta għandek titlesta? Tfittxija ottimali tar-raġġ għall-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test Newrali (daqs tar-raġġ modulu)', 'pl': 'Kiedy skończyć? Optymalne wyszukiwanie wiązki dla generowania tekstu neuronowego (rozmiar wiązki modulo)', 'ro': 'Când să terminăm? Căutare optimă a fasciculului pentru generarea de text neural (dimensiunea fasciculului modular)', 'sr': 'Kada da završimo? Optimalni zrak traži neuralnu generaciju teksta (veličina zraka modula)', 'si': 'කවදාවත් ඉවරයි? න්\u200dයුරල් පාට්ස් සිද්ධානයට හොයාගන්න (මොඩ්යුලෝ බිම් ප්\u200dරමාණය)', 'so': 'When to Finish?  Muujinta qoraalka Neural (size of modulo beam beam)', 'sv': 'När ska jag avsluta? Optimal strålsökning för generering av neural text (modulo strålstorlek)', 'ta': 'முடிக்க எப்போது? புதிய உரை உருவாக்கத்திற்கான விருப்பமான பீம் தேடு (மோடுலோ beam அளவு)', 'ur': 'کب ختم ہو جائے گا؟ نیورال ٹیکسٹ پیدائش کے لئے اپنا بئم تلاش کرنا (موڈولو بیم سائز)', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Khi nào thì kết thúc? (dò tia cực quang) Tìm cấu trúc văn bản thần kinh (kích cỡ ánh sáng)', 'bg': 'Кога да свърша? Оптимално търсене на лъч за генериране на неврален текст (размер на модулния лъч)', 'nl': 'Wanneer moet ik klaar zijn? Optimale Beam Search voor Neural Tekst Generatie (modulo Beam Size)', 'hr': 'Kada završiti? Optimalni zrak traži Neuralnu generaciju teksta (veličina zraka modula)', 'da': 'Hvornår skal jeg afslutte? Optimal strålesøgning efter generering af neural tekst (modulo strålestørrelse)', 'de': 'Wann soll ich fertig sein? Optimale Strahlsuche für die Erzeugung neuronaler Texte (Modulstrahlgröße)', 'id': 'Kapan selesai? Pencarian Beam Optimal untuk Jenerasi Teks Neural (ukuran beam modulo)', 'fa': 'کي بايد تموم بشه؟ جستجوی بیم optimal برای تولید متن عصبی (اندازه نور modulo)', 'ko': '언제 끝나요?신경 텍스트 생성에 가장 좋은 빔 검색 (모드 빔 크기)', 'tr': 'Haçan gutarmak? Optimal Hat Naýral Metin Jeşirmek üçin Ahtarýan (modulo gap ululyky)', 'sw': 'Ni lini itakapomaliza? Search for Optimal Beam for Generation of Neural Text (size of beam beam modulo)', 'af': 'Wanneer om te voltooi? Optimale Beam Soek vir Neurale Teks Genereer (modulo beam grootte)', 'sq': 'When to Finish?  Kërkim optimal për Gjenerimin e Tekstit Neural', 'am': 'መቼ ይጨርስ? ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Երբ ավարտել: Օպտիմալ ճառագայթի փնտրում նյարդային տեքստի ստեղծման համար (մոդուլլո ճառագայթի չափսը)', 'az': 'Ne zaman bit…ôc…ôk? N…ôyral Metin √únvanƒ± Axtarƒ±r', 'bn': 'কখন শেষ হবে? নিউরেল টেক্সট জেনারেশনের জন্য অপটিমেল বীম অনুসন্ধান (মোডুলো বীম আকার)', 'bs': 'Kada završiti? Optimalni zrak traži generaciju neuronskog teksta (veličina zraka modula)', 'ca': 'Quan acabar? Busca óptima al raig per a la generació de text neuronal (mida del raig módul)', 'cs': 'Kdy skončit? Optimální vyhledávání paprsku pro generování neuronového textu (modulová velikost paprsku)', 'et': 'Millal lõpetada? Optimaalne kiirte otsing neuroteksti genereerimiseks (moodulkiirte suurus)', 'fi': 'Milloin lopetetaan? Optimaalinen säteen haku neurotekstin luomiselle (modulo beam size)', 'jv': 'Kapan ora ? Optimala', 'sk': 'Kdaj končati? Optimalno iskanje žarka za ustvarjanje nevralnega besedila (velikost modulov žarka)', 'he': 'מתי לסיים? חיפוש אחר קרן אופטימי ליצירת טקסט נוירולי (גודל קרן מודולו)', 'ha': "Yaushe da za'a gabatar? @ item: inmenu Text Completion", 'bo': 'གུས་དུས་མཇུག་རྫོགས་དགོས་སམ ཕན་ཚུན་བྱང་ཆེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ལ་འཚོལ་བཤེར(འདྲ་རྩོམ་མཁན་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང)'}
{'en': 'In neural text generation such as neural machine translation, summarization, and image captioning, beam search is widely used to improve the output text quality. However, in the neural generation setting, hypotheses can finish in different steps, which makes it difficult to decide when to end beam search to ensure optimality. We propose a provably optimal beam search algorithm that will always return the optimal-score complete hypothesis (modulo beam size), and finish as soon as the optimality is established. To counter neural generation’s tendency for shorter hypotheses, we also introduce a bounded length reward mechanism which allows a modified version of our beam search algorithm to remain optimal. Experiments on neural machine translation demonstrate that our principled beam search algorithm leads to improvement in BLEU score over previously proposed alternatives.', 'es': 'En la generación de texto neuronal, como la traducción automática neuronal, el resumen y el subtitulado de imágenes, la búsqueda por haz se utiliza ampliamente para mejorar la calidad del texto de salida. Sin embargo, en el entorno de generación neuronal, las hipótesis pueden terminar en diferentes pasos, lo que dificulta decidir cuándo finalizar la búsqueda de haz para garantizar la optimización. Proponemos un algoritmo de búsqueda de haz demostrablemente óptimo que siempre devolverá la hipótesis completa de puntuación óptima (módulo beam size) y finalizará tan pronto como se establezca la optimalidad. Para contrarrestar la tendencia de la generación neuronal a hipótesis más cortas, también introducimos un mecanismo de recompensa de longitud limitada que permite que una versión modificada de nuestro algoritmo de búsqueda de haces siga siendo óptima. Los experimentos sobre la traducción automática neuronal demuestran que nuestro algoritmo de búsqueda de haces basado en principios mejora la puntuación BLEU con respecto a las alternativas propuestas anteriormente.', 'pt': 'Na geração de texto neural, como tradução automática neural, sumarização e legendagem de imagens, a pesquisa de feixe é amplamente usada para melhorar a qualidade do texto de saída. No entanto, no cenário de geração neural, as hipóteses podem terminar em diferentes etapas, o que dificulta a decisão de quando encerrar a busca de feixe para garantir a otimização. Propomos um algoritmo de busca de feixe comprovadamente ótimo que sempre retornará a hipótese completa de pontuação ótima (tamanho do feixe do módulo) e terminará assim que a otimalidade for estabelecida. Para combater a tendência da geração neural para hipóteses mais curtas, também introduzimos um mecanismo de recompensa de comprimento limitado que permite que uma versão modificada do nosso algoritmo de busca de feixe permaneça ótima. Experimentos em tradução automática neural demonstram que nosso algoritmo de busca de feixe de princípios leva a uma melhoria na pontuação BLEU em relação às alternativas propostas anteriormente.', 'ar': 'في توليد النص العصبي مثل الترجمة الآلية العصبية والتلخيص والتعليق على الصور ، يُستخدم البحث بالحزمة على نطاق واسع لتحسين جودة النص الناتج. ومع ذلك ، في إعداد التوليد العصبي ، يمكن أن تنتهي الفرضيات بخطوات مختلفة ، مما يجعل من الصعب تحديد موعد إنهاء البحث بالحزمة لضمان تحقيق الأمثل. نقترح خوارزمية بحث شعاعية مثلى يمكن إثباتها والتي ستعيد دائمًا الفرضية الكاملة ذات الدرجة المثلى (حجم حزمة النموذج) ، وتنتهي بمجرد إنشاء الأمثل. لمواجهة ميل الجيل العصبي لفرضيات أقصر ، نقدم أيضًا آلية مكافأة ذات طول محدود تسمح بإصدار معدل من خوارزمية البحث الشعاعي لدينا على النحو الأمثل. تُظهر التجارب على الترجمة الآلية العصبية أن خوارزمية بحث الحزمة المبدئية تؤدي إلى تحسين درجة BLEU مقارنة بالبدائل المقترحة سابقًا.', 'fr': "Dans la génération de texte neuronal, comme la traduction automatique neuronale, le résumé et le sous-titrage d'images, la recherche par faisceau est largement utilisée pour améliorer la qualité du texte de sortie. Cependant, dans le cadre de la génération neuronale, les hypothèses peuvent se terminer par différentes étapes, ce qui rend difficile la décision de mettre fin à la recherche de faisceau pour garantir l'optimalité. Nous proposons un algorithme de recherche de faisceau optimal qui renverra toujours l'hypothèse complète du score optimal (taille du faisceau modulo), et finira dès que l'optimalité est établie. Pour contrer la tendance de la génération neuronale pour des hypothèses plus courtes, nous introduisons également un mécanisme de récompense de longueur bornée qui permet à une version modifiée de notre algorithme de recherche de faisceau de rester optimale. Des expériences sur la traduction automatique neuronale démontrent que notre algorithme de recherche de faisceaux basé sur des principes conduit à une amélioration du score BLEU par rapport aux alternatives proposées précédemment.", 'zh': '神经机器翻译、摘要、图像字幕等神经文本生成中,波束搜索广加增输。 然于神经生置中,假令可以异步而成,此使难决何时毕光束搜索以保其最优也。 举一可证之最优光束搜索算法,当算法将终还最优分数全假设(模光束大小),并于立最优性后立成。 为驳神经生更短之势,引入一有界长奖机,许我光束索算法修改版本最佳。 神经机器翻译之实验明,比之前代方案,吾原则性光束搜索算法可以增BLEU分数。', 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳、要約、画像キャプション作成などのニューラルテキスト生成において、ビーム検索は、出力テキストの品質を向上させるために広く使用されている。しかし、ニューラル生成設定では、仮説は異なるステップで終了することができるため、最適性を確保するためにビーム検索を終了するタイミングを決定することが困難になります。最適スコア完全仮説（モジュロビームサイズ）を常に返し、最適性が確立され次第終了する、実証可能な最適ビーム探索アルゴリズムを提案します。短い仮説に対するニューラルジェネレーションの傾向に対抗するために、私たちはまた、ビーム検索アルゴリズムの修正バージョンを最適なままにすることを可能にする有界長さ報酬メカニズムを導入します。神経機械翻訳の実験は、当社の原理的なビーム検索アルゴリズムが、以前に提案された代替案よりもBLEUスコアの改善につながることを示しています。', 'ru': 'В нейронной генерации текста, такой как нейронный машинный перевод, обобщение и субтитры изображений, поиск пучка широко используется для улучшения качества выходного текста. Однако в условиях нейронной генерации гипотезы могут заканчиваться в разные этапы, что затрудняет решение о том, когда заканчивать поиск лучей для обеспечения оптимальности. Мы предлагаем доказуемо оптимальный алгоритм поиска пучка, который всегда вернет полную гипотезу оптимального балла (размер пучка по модулю) и закончит, как только будет установлена оптимальность. Чтобы противостоять тенденции нейронной генерации для более коротких гипотез, мы также вводим механизм вознаграждения ограниченной длины, который позволяет модифицированной версии нашего алгоритма поиска луча оставаться оптимальной. Эксперименты по нейронному машинному переводу показывают, что наш принципиальный алгоритм поиска лучей приводит к улучшению оценки BLEU по сравнению с ранее предложенными альтернативами.', 'hi': 'न्यूरल टेक्स्ट जनरेशन जैसे न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद, सारांशीकरण और छवि कैप्शनिंग में, बीम खोज का उपयोग व्यापक रूप से आउटपुट टेक्स्ट गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने के लिए किया जाता है। हालांकि, तंत्रिका पीढ़ी की सेटिंग में, परिकल्पनाएं विभिन्न चरणों में समाप्त हो सकती हैं, जिससे यह तय करना मुश्किल हो जाता है कि इष्टतमता सुनिश्चित करने के लिए बीम खोज को कब समाप्त किया जाए। हम एक provably इष्टतम बीम खोज एल्गोरिथ्म का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो हमेशा इष्टतम-स्कोर पूर्ण परिकल्पना (मोडुलो बीम आकार) को वापस कर देगा, और जैसे ही इष्टतमता स्थापित होती है, समाप्त हो जाती है। छोटी परिकल्पनाओं के लिए तंत्रिका पीढ़ी की प्रवृत्ति का मुकाबला करने के लिए, हम एक सीमित लंबाई इनाम तंत्र भी पेश करते हैं जो हमारे बीम खोज एल्गोरिथ्म के संशोधित संस्करण को इष्टतम रहने की अनुमति देता है। तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे सैद्धांतिक बीम खोज एल्गोरिथ्म पहले से प्रस्तावित विकल्पों पर BLEU स्कोर में सुधार की ओर जाता है।', 'ga': 'I nginiúint néar-théacs mar aistriúchán meaisín néarúil, achoimre, agus fotheidealú íomhá, úsáidtear cuardach bíoma go forleathan chun cáilíocht an téacs aschuir a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, i suíomh giniúna néarúil, féadann hipitéisí críochnú i gcéimeanna éagsúla, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé deacair cinneadh a dhéanamh cén uair is ceart deireadh a chur le cuardach bíomaí chun barrmhaitheas a chinntiú. Molaimid algartam cuardaigh léasa is fearr is féidir a thabharfaidh ar ais i gcónaí an hipitéis iomlán scór is fearr (méid an léasa modulo), agus a chríochnóidh a luaithe a bheidh an optamach bunaithe. Chun dul i ngleic le claonadh na giniúna néaracha maidir le hipitéisí níos giorra, tugaimid isteach freisin meicníocht luaíochta faid teorann a ligeann do leagan modhnaithe dár n-algartam cuardaigh léasa fanacht mar is fearr is féidir. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar aistriúchán meaisín néarach go bhfuil feabhas ar scór BLEU mar thoradh ar ár n-algartam cuardaigh léasa prionsabail i gcomparáid le roghanna eile a moladh.', 'hu': 'Az idegi szöveggenerálásban, mint például az idegi gépi fordítás, az összefoglalás és a képfeliratozás, a sugár keresést széles körben használják a kimeneti szövegminőség javítására. Azonban a neurális generációs beállításban a hipotézisek különböző lépésekben fejeződhetnek be, ami megnehezíti eldönteni, hogy mikor kell befejezni a sugárkeresést az optimalitás biztosítása érdekében. Javasolunk egy bizonyíthatóan optimális sugárkereső algoritmust, amely mindig visszaadja az optimális pontszám teljes hipotézist (modulo sugárméret), és befejezi, amint az optimalitás megállapításra került. Az idegi generáció rövidebb hipotézisekre irányuló tendenciájának ellensúlyozása érdekében bevezetünk egy korlátozott hosszúságú jutalmazási mechanizmust is, amely lehetővé teszi, hogy a sugárkereső algoritmusunk módosított verziója optimális maradjon. A neurális gépi fordítással kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy elvi sugárkereső algoritmusunk a BLEU pontszám javulását eredményezi a korábban javasolt alternatívákhoz képest.', 'el': 'Στην νευρωνική παραγωγή κειμένου όπως η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, η σύνοψη και η λεζάντα εικόνας, η αναζήτηση ακτίνων χρησιμοποιείται ευρέως για να βελτιώσει την ποιότητα κειμένου εξόδου. Ωστόσο, στο πλαίσιο της νευρωνικής γενιάς, οι υποθέσεις μπορούν να τελειώσουν σε διαφορετικά στάδια, γεγονός που καθιστά δύσκολο να αποφασίσει πότε θα τερματιστεί η αναζήτηση ακτίνων για να εξασφαλιστεί η βέλτιστη απόδοση. Προτείνουμε έναν αποδεδειγμένα βέλτιστο αλγόριθμο αναζήτησης ακτίνων που θα επιστρέφει πάντα την πλήρη υπόθεση βέλτιστης βαθμολογίας (μέγεθος δέσμης modulo), και θα τελειώνει μόλις καθοριστεί η βέλτιστη απόδοση. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί η τάση της νευρωνικής γενιάς για μικρότερες υποθέσεις, εισάγουμε επίσης έναν μηχανισμό επιβράβευσης περιορισμένου μήκους που επιτρέπει σε μια τροποποιημένη έκδοση του αλγόριθμου αναζήτησης ακτίνων μας να παραμείνει βέλτιστη. Τα πειράματα στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση καταδεικνύουν ότι ο αλγόριθμος αναζήτησης ακτίνων μας οδηγεί στη βελτίωση της βαθμολογίας σε σχέση με τις προτεινόμενες εναλλακτικές λύσεις.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ტექსტის წარმოიქმნა, როგორც ნეიროლური მაქსინის წარმოიქმნა, სიმბოლობა და გამოსახულება, სიმბოლობის ძიება საშუალოდ გამოყენება ტექსტი მაგრამ, ნეიროლური წარმოდგენის შესახებ, ჰიპოტეზები შეუძლია განსხვავებული ნაწილში დასრულება, რაც უფრო რთულია გადასრულება, როდესაც უფრო დასრულება სინა ჩვენ პროგრამიურად ოპტიმალური სინათლის ძიება ალგორიტიმი, რომელიც ყოველთვის ოპტიმალური სინათლის დასრულება (მოდულო სინათლის ზომი) და დასრულება, როდესაც ოპტიმალური სინათ ჩვენ უკეთესი ჰიპოტესებისთვის ნეიროლური წარმოდგენისთვის შეცდომარებისთვის, რომელიც ჩვენი საძიებო ალგორიტიმს შეცდომარებული ვერსია დავუყენებთ, რომელიც ჩვენი ძიებ ექსპერიმენტები ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაზე გამოცდილობას რომ ჩვენი პრინუმენტური ალგორიტიმი სინამდვილეების გაგრძელება BLEU წერტილებში წინასწინასწინას', 'it': "Nella generazione di testo neurale come la traduzione automatica neurale, la sintesi e la didascalia di immagini, la ricerca del fascio è ampiamente usata per migliorare la qualità del testo in uscita. Tuttavia, nell'impostazione della generazione neurale, le ipotesi possono finire in diversi passaggi, il che rende difficile decidere quando terminare la ricerca del fascio per garantire l'ottimalità. Proponiamo un algoritmo di ricerca del fascio dimostrabilmente ottimale che restituirà sempre l'ipotesi completa del punteggio ottimale (modulo beam size), e finirà non appena l'ottimalità è stabilita. Per contrastare la tendenza della generazione neurale ad ipotesi più brevi, introduciamo anche un meccanismo di ricompensa di lunghezza limitata che consente a una versione modificata del nostro algoritmo di ricerca del fascio di rimanere ottimale. Esperimenti sulla traduzione automatica neurale dimostrano che il nostro algoritmo di ricerca del fascio principale porta a un miglioramento del punteggio BLEU rispetto alle alternative precedentemente proposte.", 'kk': 'Невралдық мәтін құрылғанда, мысалы, невралдық компьютердің аударуы, тұжырымдамасы және кескіндің айдарында, шығыс мәтін сапасын жақсарту үшін, тұмандық іздеу ү Бірақ, невралды құру параметрінде гипотезалар әртүрлі қадамдармен аяқтауға болады. Бұл оңай қадамдарды қолдану үшін жұлдыз іздеуді қазір аяқтауға болады. Біз оптималдық жұлдыз іздеу алгоритмін ұсындық, ол әрқашанда оптималдық нөмірлерді толық гипотезаны (модульдық жұлдыз өлшемі) қайтарып, оптималдық орнатылғанда аяқтайды. Невралдық құрылғының қысқа гипотезалардың тенденциясын басқару үшін, сондай-ақ, біз жұлдыз іздеу алгоритмінің өзгертілген нұсқасын оптималдық болуға мүмкіндік береді. Невралдық компьютердің аудармасының тәжірибелері біздің негізгі жұлдыз іздеу алгоритміміз БЛЕС нөмірінде алдындағы альтернативтерді жақсарту үшін болады.', 'mk': 'Во генерацијата на нервен текст како нервен машински превод, резултат и наслов на сликата, пребарувањето по прозорец е широко употребено за подобрување на квалитетот на текстот на излезот. Сепак, во поставувањето на нервната генерација, хипотезите можат да завршат во различни чекори, што го прави тешко да се одлучи кога да се заврши потрагата по прозорец за да се осигури оптималноста. Предложуваме веројатно оптимален алгоритм за пребарување на прозорец кој секогаш ќе ја врати оптималната поени комплетна хипотеза (големина на модулот), и ќе заврши штом ќе биде утврдена оптималноста. За да се спротивстави на тенденцијата на нервната генерација за помали хипотези, ние исто така воведуваме механизам за награда на ограничена должина кој овозможува модифицирана верзија на нашиот алгоритм за пребарување на зрак да остане оптимален. Експериментите на нервен машински превод демонстрираат дека нашиот принципиран алгоритм за пребарување по зрак води до подобрување на оценката БЛЕУ во однос на претходно предложените алтернативи.', 'lt': 'Siekiant pagerinti išėjimo teksto kokybę, kuriant nervinius tekstus, pavyzdžiui, neurologinį mašinų vertimą, santrauką ir vaizdo pavadinimą, plačiai paieška šviesos spinduliuotėje. Tačiau nervų generacijos sąlygomis hipotezės gali baigtis skirtingais etapais, todėl sunku nuspręsti, kada baigti šviesos paiešką, kad būtų užtikrintas optimumas. Mes siūlome tikriausiai optimal ų šviesos paieškos algoritmą, kuris visada grąžins optimalų rezultatų visišką hipotezę (modulio šviesos dydis) ir baigs, kai tik bus nustatytas optimumas. Siekiant užkirsti kelią nervų generacijos tendencijai trumpesnėms hipotezėms, mes taip pat įvedame riboto ilgio atlyginimo mechanizmą, kuris leidžia pakeistą mūs ų šviesos paieškos algoritmo versiją išlikti optimali. Nervų mašin ų vertimo eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų pagrindinis šviesos paieškos algoritmas pagerina BLEU rezultatus, palyginti su anksčiau siūlomomis alternatyvomis.', 'ms': 'Dalam generasi teks saraf seperti terjemahan mesin saraf, ringkasan, dan captioning imej, carian cahaya digunakan secara luas untuk meningkatkan kualiti teks output. Bagaimanapun, dalam tetapan generasi saraf, hipotesis boleh selesai dalam langkah yang berbeza, yang membuat ia sukar untuk memutuskan bila untuk mengakhiri carian sinar untuk memastikan optimaliti. Kami cadangkan algoritma pencarian cahaya yang mungkin optimal yang sentiasa akan mengembalikan hipotesis lengkap skor optimal (saiz cahaya cahaya modulo), dan selesai selepas optimaliti ditetapkan. Untuk menentang kecenderungan generasi saraf untuk hipotesis yang lebih pendek, kita juga memperkenalkan mekanisme hadiah panjang terbatas yang membolehkan versi diubahsuai algoritma carian cahaya kita untuk tetap optimal. Eksperimen dalam terjemahan mesin saraf menunjukkan bahawa algoritma pencarian cahaya prinsip kita membawa kepada peningkatan pada skor BLEU daripada alternatif yang telah diusulkan sebelumnya.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷകള്\u200d, ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെയും ചിത്രത്തിന്റെയും പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും പ്രകൃതിയില്\u200d ബീമ എന്നാലും, ന്യൂറല്\u200d തലമുറതലമുറയുടെ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത ചുവടുകളില്\u200d കണക്കുകള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തീകരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, അതിനാല്\u200d ബീ സാധ്യതയുള്ള ബീമിന്റെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മം നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് എപ്പോഴും ഓപ്റ്റിമാല്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഹൈപ്പിറ്റ ന്യൂറല്\u200d തലമുറതലമുറകളുടെ സംവിധാനത്തെ എതിര്\u200dത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു അതിരുകളിലുള്ള നീളം പ്രതിഫലമുള്ള മെക്കയിനീട് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത്  ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ബീമിന്\u200d തെരച്ചില്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോ', 'mt': "Fil-ġenerazzjoni tat-test newrali bħat-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali, is-sommarju, u l-intestatura tal-immaġni, it-tiftix tar-raġġ jintuża b’mod wiesa’ biex itejjeb il-kwalità tat-test tal-output. Madankollu, fl-ambjent tal-ġenerazzjoni newrali, l-ipotesi jistgħu jispiċċaw fi stadji differenti, li jagħmilha diffiċli li wieħed jiddeċiedi meta jintemm it-tiftix tar-raġġ biex tiġi żgurata l-ottimità. Aħna nipproponu algoritmu tat-tiftix tar-raġġ probabbilment ottimali li dejjem jirritorna l-ipoteżi kompluta bl-ottimu punteġġ (daqs tar-raġġ modulu), u ntemm hekk kif tiġi stabbilita l-ottimali. Biex niġġieldu kontra t-tendenza tal-ġenerazzjoni newrali għal ipotesi iqsar, a ħna nintroduċu wkoll mekkaniżmu ta' premju ta' tul limitat li jippermetti verżjoni modifikata tal-algoritmu tagħna tat-tiftix bir-raġġ biex tibqa' ottimali. L-esperimenti dwar it-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali juru li l-algoritmu tat-tfittxija tar-raġġ prinċipali tagħna jwassal għal titjib fil-punteġġ BLEU fuq alternattivi proposti qabel.", 'no': 'I nøyrale tekstgenerering som omsetjing, sammendrag og tittel på biletet blir straumsøkt brukt for å forbetra tekstkvaliteten på utdata. I innstillinga for neuralgenerasjon kan imidlertid hypotesane avslutta i ulike steg, som gjer det vanskeleg å bestemme kvar gong avslutta søket på straum for å sikre optimalitet. Vi foreslår ein optimal søkingsalgoritme for straum som alltid returnerer fullstendig hypotese for optimal- poeng (modulo beam size) og sluttar så snart optimaliteten er oppretta. For å kontra neuralgenereringstendens for korte hypotesar, introduserer vi også ein avgrensa lengd-rekningsmekanismen som tillater at ein endra versjon av straumsøkingsalgoritmen vår blir optimal. Eksperimentar om omsetjing av neuralmaskinen viser at vår hovudsøkingsalgoritme for straum fører til forbetringa i BLEU-poeng over førre foreslått alternativer.', 'pl': 'W generowaniu tekstu neuronowego, takiego jak tłumaczenie maszynowe neuronowe, streszczenie i napisy obrazów, wyszukiwanie wiązki jest szeroko stosowane w celu poprawy jakości tekstu wyjściowego. Jednak w ustawieniu generowania neuronów hipotezy mogą kończyć się różnymi etapami, co utrudnia decyzję, kiedy zakończyć wyszukiwanie wiązki w celu zapewnienia optymalności. Proponujemy udowodniony optymalny algorytm wyszukiwania wiązki, który zawsze zwraca hipotezę kompletną o optymalnym wyniku (rozmiar wiązki modulo) i zakończy się, gdy tylko zostanie ustalona optymalność. Aby przeciwdziałać tendencji generowania neuronów do krótszych hipotez, wprowadzamy również mechanizm nagradzania ograniczonej długości, który pozwala zmodyfikowanej wersji naszego algorytmu wyszukiwania wiązki pozostać optymalny. Eksperymenty z neuronowym tłumaczeniem maszynowym pokazują, że nasz zasadniczy algorytm wyszukiwania wiązki prowadzi do poprawy wyniku BLEU w stosunku do wcześniej proponowanych alternatyw.', 'ro': 'În generarea de text neural, cum ar fi traducerea automată neurală, rezumarea și subtitrarea imaginilor, căutarea fasciculului este utilizată pe scară largă pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea textului de ieșire. Cu toate acestea, în setarea generației neurale, ipotezele se pot termina în diferite etape, ceea ce face dificil să se decidă când să se termine căutarea fasciculului pentru a asigura optimitatea. Propunem un algoritm de căutare a fasciculului dovedit optim, care va returna întotdeauna ipoteza completă a scorului optim (dimensiunea fasciculului modulo), și se va termina imediat ce optimitatea este stabilită. Pentru a contracara tendința generației neurale de a ipoteze mai scurte, introducem, de asemenea, un mecanism de recompensare cu lungime limitată care permite o versiune modificată a algoritmului nostru de căutare a fasciculului să rămână optimă. Experimentele privind traducerea automată neurală demonstrează că algoritmul nostru principial de căutare a fasciculului duce la îmbunătățirea scorului BLEU față de alternativele propuse anterior.', 'mn': 'Тархины мэдрэлийн текст үүсгэх мэт мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт, жимс хэвлэлт, зураг хайлтын тусламжтайгаар илүү сайжруулахын тулд цацраг хайх хэрэглэгддэг. Гэхдээ мэдрэлийн үеийн тохиолдолд гиптезүүд өөр алхам дээр дуусгаж чадна. Энэ нь эерэгтэй байдал байлгахын тулд цацраг хайлтыг хэзээ дуусгах нь хэцүү болгодог. Бид үргэлж эерэг тооны төгс утгыг (модуль газрын хэмжээг) буцааж, эерэг санааны төгсгөлд төгсгөл гэх мэт эерэг газрын хайлтын алгоритмыг санал болгож байна. Бага зэрэг гипотезүүдийн мэдрэлийн урт хувьсалыг эсэргүүцэхийн тулд бид мөн хязгаарлагдсан урт шагналын механизмийг илтгэнэ. Энэ нь бидний хайх алгоритмын өөрчлөгдсөн хувилбар нь сайн байх боломжтой. Нүүрстөрөгчийн хөгжлийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний анхны гадаргуу хайлтын алгоритм нь өмнө нь дэвшүүлсэн сонголтуудыг илүү сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'sr': 'U generaciji neuralnog teksta poput prevoda, sažetka i obrazovanja slika, pretraživanje zraka se široko koristi za poboljšanje kvalitete teksta. Međutim, u nastavku neuralne generacije, hipoteze mogu završiti u različitim koracima, što čini teškom odlučiti kada završiti potragu za zrakom kako bi osigurala optimalitet. Predlažemo provjerljivo optimalni algoritam pretraživanja zraka koji će uvek vratiti potpunu hipotezu optimalnog rezultata (veličina zraka modula), i završiti čim se uspostavi optimalitet. Da bi se suočavali s a tendencijom neuralne generacije za kraće hipoteze, takođe predstavljamo ograničeni mehanizam nagrade dužine koji omogućava modificiranu verziju našeg algoritma pretraživanja zraka da ostane optimalni. Eksperimenti o prevodu neuralne mašine pokazuju da naš glavni algoritam pretraživanja zraka vodi do poboljšanja rezultata BLEU-a preko prethodnih predloženih alternativa.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් පාළිස්ථානයේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය, සංවිධානය, සහ පින්තූර පින්තූර විශේෂණය, ප නමුත්, න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජීවිත සැකසුමේදී, හිතාවෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් පැත්තෙන් ඉවරයි, ඒකෙන් වෙනස් පැත්තෙන් තීරණය අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක හැමවෙලේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම-ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සම්පූර්ණ විශ්ණයක පොඩි විශ්වාස සඳහා න්\u200dයුරෝල් ප්\u200dරමාණයේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරගන්න, අපි සම්පූර්ණ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200d න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් අවවාදයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස සොයාගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක BLUE ස්කෝර්', 'so': "Muuqashada qoraalka neural ah sida tarjumaadda neural machine, summarinta iyo sawirka waxaa si badan looga baaraandegaa qoraalka soo baxa. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qarniga neurada ah, labawejiilayaashu waxay ku dhamaan karaan tallaabooyin kala duduwan, taasina waxay ka adkaan tahay in la go'aano goortii raadinta qoriga ah la dhamaado in la hubsado faa'iidada. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa algorithm raadinta ah oo macquul ah, kaas oo mar walba soo celin kara kooxda dhamaan hypothesis (tirada daboolka ee modulo), waxaana dhameynaynaa haddiiba marka uu dhamaado optimiska. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa meymisyo dheer oo mushaar ah oo aad u baahan tahay, kaas oo ku sawiri kara warqad beddelan oo qoraalka raadinta xiliga ah si ay u sii socoto optimal. Imtixaan ku saabsan tarjumaadda maskaxda neurada waxay muujiyaan in algoritkeeni kooxaha baarka ah ee ugu horeeyay uu ku hagaajiyo kooxda BLEU ee horay loo doortay.", 'sv': 'I neural textgenerering, såsom neural maskinöversättning, sammanfattning och bildtextning, används strålsökning ofta för att förbättra utskriftstextens kvalitet. Men i den neurala genereringsinställningen kan hypoteser avslutas i olika steg, vilket gör det svårt att bestämma när strålsökningen ska avslutas för att säkerställa optimalitet. Vi föreslår en bevisat optimal strålsökalgoritm som alltid kommer att returnera den optimala poänghypotesen (modulo strålstorlek), och avsluta så snart optimaliteten är fastställd. För att motverka neural generations tendens till kortare hypoteser introducerar vi också en belöningsmekanism med begränsad längd som tillåter en modifierad version av vår strålsökalgoritm att förbli optimal. Experiment på neural maskinöversättning visar att vår principiella beam search algoritm leder till förbättring av BLEU poäng jämfört med tidigare föreslagna alternativ.', 'ta': 'புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, சுருக்கல் மற்றும் பிம்ப பெட்டி போன்ற புதிய உரை உருவாக்கத்தில், வெளியீட்டு உரை தரம் மேம்படுத்த ஆனால், புதிய தலைமுறை அமைப்பில், hypothesis can finish in different steps, which makes it difficult to decide when beam search ends to ensure optimizity. நாம் ஒரு விருப்பமான தேடும் புள்ளி தேடும் algorithm, அது எப்போதும் optimal- score முழுமையான hypothesis (modulo beam size) திரும்ப முடியும் பொழுது தேர்வு நிறுவ புதிய தலைமுறையின் செயல்பாட்டை எதிர்பார்ப்பதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு வரம்பு நீளம் கூலி முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், அது எங்கள் beam தேடும் படிவத்தை மாற்றி புதிய இயந்திரத்தை மொழிமாற்றும் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது எங்கள் முதலில் இருந்த பீம் தேடும் algorithm பிலியு மதிப்பு மேம்படுத்தப்', 'ur': 'نیورال ٹیکسٹ نسل میں، جیسے نیورل ماشین ترجمہ، ترجمہ، اور تصویر کیپٹشنگ، بیم تلاش کے لئے بہت زیادہ استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. However, in the neural generation setting, hypotheses can end in different steps, which makes it difficult to decide when to end beam search for optimality. ہم ایک مضبوط اچھی بیم تلاش الگوریٹم کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جو ہمیشہ اچھی-اسکور پورا فرضی (موڈولو بیم سائز) کو لوٹائے گا اور جب اچھی مضبوطی ثابت ہوگی، ختم کریں گے۔ نیورل کی نسل کی تنظیم کو چھوٹی حدیثوں کے لئے مقابلہ کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے بھی ایک محدودہ طویل اجر مکانیسم کو معلوم کرلیا ہے جو ہمارے بیم جہاز الگوریتم کی بدل کی نسخہ کو اچھی طرح رہنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے. نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پرنسیلڈی بیم تلاش الگوریتم بلیوس سکوٹ میں پہلے سے پیش آئے ہوئے الٹرائیٹوں پر بہترین ترجمہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin neyron avlod moslamalarida, munosabatlar boshqa qadamlarda ishga tushirishi mumkin. Bu qiymatni qo'shishga qidirish qiymatni qarashga juda qiyin qiladi. Biz oddiy optimal beam qidirish algoritni taqdimiz qilamiz. У доимо optimal qiymatni toʻliq hypothesis (modulo qiymati oʻlchamini) qaytadi va optimaliyalarni aniqlashdan keyin tugatadi. Yaqinda bir necha yaxshi fikrlarni o'zgartirish uchun, biz chegara paytda o'zgartirish mechaniyasini anglatamiz, chegara qidirish algoritning o'zgarishlarimizning versiyasi optik bo'lishi mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Trong hệ thống cấu tạo văn bản thần kinh như dịch máy thần kinh, tóm tắt, và phần chọn ảnh, việc tìm kiếm chùm tia được sử dụng rộng rãi để nâng cao chất lượng văn bản xuất. Tuy nhiên, trong chế độ tạo thần kinh, các giả thuyết có thể kết thúc ở các bước khác nhau, điều đó khiến khó quyết định khi nào kết thúc việc dò tia để đảm bảo khả năng chọn lựa. Chúng tôi đề xuất một thuật toán tìm tia cực tối ưu, luôn luôn đưa lại các giả thuyết hoàn chỉnh điểm tối ưu (kích cỡ ánh sáng modulo), và kết thúc ngay sau khi xác định khả năng thuận. Để chống lại xu hướng s ản xuất dây thần kinh cho các giả thuyết ngắn hơn, chúng tôi cũng giới thiệu một cơ chế thưởng độ dài giới hạn cho phép một phiên bản đã sửa đổi của thuật to án tìm tia sáng của chúng tôi giữ tối ưu. Thí nghiệm dịch dịch cỗ máy thần kinh cho thấy rằng thuật to án tìm tia sáng nguyên tắc của chúng ta dẫn đến sự cải thiện điểm LELIU trước những phương pháp khác.', 'nl': 'Bij neurale tekstgeneratie zoals neurale machinevertaling, samenvatting en beeldondertiteling wordt straalzoeken veel gebruikt om de kwaliteit van de uitvoertekst te verbeteren. Bij de neurale generatie kunnen hypotheses echter in verschillende stappen eindigen, wat het moeilijk maakt om te beslissen wanneer het zoeken van de straal moet worden beëindigd om de optimale werking te garanderen. We stellen een aantoonbaar optimaal beam search algoritme voor dat altijd de optimale score complete hypothese (modulo beam size) retourneert en eindigt zodra de optimaliteit is vastgesteld. Om de neiging van neurale generatie om kortere hypothesen tegen te gaan, introduceren we ook een begrensd lengtebeloningsmechanisme waarmee een aangepaste versie van ons straalzoekalgoritme optimaal blijft. Experimenten op neurale machinevertaling tonen aan dat ons principieel beam search algoritme leidt tot verbetering van de BLEU score ten opzichte van eerder voorgestelde alternatieven.', 'da': 'I neural tekstgenerering såsom neural maskinoversættelse, opsummering og billedtekst, strålesøgning er meget udbredt til at forbedre output tekst kvalitet. Men i den neurale generation indstilling kan hypoteser afsluttes i forskellige trin, hvilket gør det vanskeligt at beslutte, hvornår strålesøgningen skal afsluttes for at sikre optimalitet. Vi foreslår en bevisligt optimal strålesøgning algoritme, der altid vil returnere den optimale score komplette hypotese (modulo strålestørrelse), og afslutte så snart optimaliteten er etableret. For at imødegå neural generations tendens til kortere hypoteser, introducerer vi også en begrænset længde belønningsmekanisme, som tillader en modificeret version af vores strålesøgealgoritme at forblive optimal. Eksperimenter med neural maskinoversættelse viser, at vores principielle strålesøgealgoritme fører til forbedring i BLEU score i forhold til tidligere foreslåede alternativer.', 'hr': 'U generaciji neuralnog teksta poput prevoda, sažetka i snimanja slika, potraga zraka se široko koristi za poboljšanje kvalitete teksta proizvodnje. Međutim, u postavljanju neuralne generacije, hipoteze mogu završiti u različitim koracima, što čini teškom odlučiti kada završiti potragu za zrakom kako bi osigurala optimalnost. Predlažemo provjerljivo optimalni algoritam pretraživanja zraka koji će uvijek vratiti potpunu hipotezu optimalnog rezultata (veličina zraka modula) i završiti čim se uspostavi optimalnost. Da bi se suočavali s a tendencijom neuralne generacije za kraće hipoteze, također predstavljamo ograničeni mehanizam nagrade dužine koji omogućava modificiranu verziju našeg algoritma pretraživanja zraka da ostane optimalni. Eksperimenti o prevodu neuroloških strojeva pokazuju da naš glavni algoritam pretraživanja zraka dovede do poboljšanja rezultata BLEU-a nad prethodnim predloženim alternativama.', 'bg': 'При генерирането на неврален текст като неврален машинен превод, обобщаване и надпис на изображения, търсенето на лъчи се използва широко за подобряване на качеството на изходния текст. Въпреки това, в настройката на невронното генериране, хипотезите могат да приключат в различни стъпки, което прави трудно да се реши кога да завърши търсенето на лъч, за да се гарантира оптималност. Предлагаме доказано оптимален алгоритъм за търсене на лъчи, който винаги ще върне оптималната оценка на пълна хипотеза (размер на модулния лъч) и ще завърши веднага щом оптималността бъде установена. За да противодействаме на тенденцията на невронното поколение за по-кратки хипотези, ние също въвеждаме механизъм за възнаграждение с ограничена дължина, който позволява модифицираната версия на нашия алгоритъм за търсене на лъчи да остане оптимална. Експерименти с неврален машинен превод показват, че нашият принципен алгоритъм за търсене на лъчи води до подобрение на резултата в сравнение с предложените по-рано алтернативи.', 'id': 'Dalam generasi teks saraf seperti terjemahan mesin saraf, ringkasan, dan captioning gambar, pencarian sinar digunakan secara luas untuk meningkatkan kualitas teks output. Namun, dalam setting generasi saraf, hipotesis dapat menyelesaikan dalam langkah yang berbeda, yang membuat sulit untuk memutuskan kapan untuk mengakhiri pencarian sinar untuk memastikan optimalitas. Kami mengusulkan algoritma pencarian sinar yang mungkin optimal yang akan selalu mengembalikan hipotesis lengkap skor optimal (ukuran sinar modulo), dan selesai segera setelah optimalitas ditetapkan. Untuk melawan kecenderungan generasi saraf untuk hipotesis yang lebih pendek, kita juga memperkenalkan mekanisme hadiah panjang terbatas yang memungkinkan versi modifikasi algoritma pencarian sinar kita untuk tetap optimal. Eksperimen dalam terjemahan mesin saraf menunjukkan bahwa algoritma pencarian beam prinsip kita menyebabkan peningkatan skor BLEU dibanding alternatif yang telah diusulkan sebelumnya.', 'de': 'Bei der Erzeugung neuronaler Texte wie neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung, Zusammenfassung und Bildunterschriften wird die Strahlsuche häufig verwendet, um die Qualität des Ausgabetexts zu verbessern. Bei der neuronalen Generierung können Hypothesen jedoch in verschiedenen Schritten enden, was es schwierig macht, zu entscheiden, wann die Strahlsuche beendet werden soll, um die Optimalität sicherzustellen. Wir schlagen einen nachweislich optimalen Strahlsuchalgorithmus vor, der immer die optimale Gesamthypothese (Modulo Strahlgröße) zurückgibt und beendet, sobald die Optimalität festgestellt ist. Um der Tendenz der neuronalen Generierung zu kürzeren Hypothesen entgegenzuwirken, führen wir auch einen Belohnungsmechanismus mit begrenzter Länge ein, der eine modifizierte Version unseres Strahlsuchalgorithmus erlaubt, optimal zu bleiben. Experimente zur neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung zeigen, dass unser prinzipieller Strahlsuchalgorithmus zu einer Verbesserung des BLEU-Scores gegenüber zuvor vorgeschlagenen Alternativen führt.', 'sw': 'Katika kizazi cha ujumbe mfupi kama vile utafsiri wa mashine ya ubongo, muhtasari, na kuchapisha picha, utafuta wa umeme unatumiwa sana kuboresha kiwango cha ujumbe wa matokeo. Hata hivyo, katika mazingira ya kizazi kikubwa, unafikiri unaweza kumaliza kwa hatua tofauti, ambayo inafanya vigumu kuamua ni lini kumaliza utafutaji wa umeme ili kuhakikisha uwezekano. Tunazipendekeza algorithi ya kutafuta wima yenye uwezekano wa uwezekano ambao utarudisha upande mzuri wa kipimo kamili (ukubwa wa wimbo wa modulo), na kumaliza mara moja utakapofanishwa na matumaini. Kupinga tabia ya kizazi cha ubongo kwa imani fupi, pia tunaonyesha mfumo wa muda mrefu wa ujira ambao unaruhusu toleo la utafutaji wa wimbo wetu la kutafuta wima kubaki na matumaini. Majaribio kuhusu tafsiri ya mashine ya asili yanaonyesha kuwa Algorithi yetu ya utafutaji wa umeme wa msingi unapelekea maboresho katika vipindi vya BLEU zaidi ya mabadiliko yaliyopendekezwa hapo awali.', 'fa': 'در نسل متن عصبی مثل ترجمه، جمع کردن، و عنوان تصویر، جستجوی چراغ برای بهترین کیفیت متن خروج استفاده می\u200cشود. با این حال، در تنظیم نسل عصبی، فرضیه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند در قدم\u200cهای مختلف تموم شود، که باعث می\u200cشود تصمیم بگیرند که کجا جستجوی پرده\u200cها را پایان دهند تا مطمئن optimality باشند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم الگوریتم جستجوی ابر optimal که همیشه فرضیه\u200cای کامل (اندازه\u200cی ابر modulo) را باز می\u200cگرداند و به محض اینکه بهترین ابزار ثابت شود تموم می\u200cشود. برای مقابل نقطه نسل عصبی برای فرضیه کوتاه\u200cتر، ما همچنین یک مکانیسم پاداش محدود را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که اجازه می\u200cدهد نسخه تغییر داده شده از الگوریتم جستجوی ابرغ\u200cمون optimal بماند. تجربه\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین عصبی نشان می\u200cدهند که الگوریتم جستجوی ابر اصلی ما به بهترین امتیاز BLEU بر خلاف انتخابات پیش\u200cفرض شده است.', 'ko': '신경기계 번역, 요약, 이미지 자막 등 신경 텍스트 생성에서 빔 검색은 출력 텍스트의 질을 향상시키는 데 광범위하게 사용된다.그러나 신경 생성 환경에서 서로 다른 단계에서 완성할 수 있다고 가정하면 빔 검색을 언제 끝낼지 결정하기 어렵다.우리는 증명할 수 있는 최우수 빔 검색 알고리즘을 제시했는데 이 알고리즘은 최우수 점수의 완전한 가설(모드 빔 크기)을 시종일관 되돌려주고 최우성을 확정한 후에 바로 완성할 것이다.신경 생성이 비교적 짧은 가설에 대한 경향에 대항하기 위해 우리는 유한한 길이 보상 메커니즘을 도입했다. 이 메커니즘은 개선된 빔 검색 알고리즘이 가장 우수하도록 허용한다.신경기계 번역에서의 실험은 앞서 제시된 대안과 비교해 우리의 원칙적인 빔 검색 알고리즘이 BLEU 평점에 개선되었음을 보여준다.', 'tr': 'Näyral metin döredilişinde, näyral maşynyň terjimesini, sumlaýyş we surat käpşenlerini, çizgi metin kalitesini geliştirmek üçin ullanýar. Ýöne, neural jenerasyonyň düzümlerinde, hypotezeler farklı adımlarda gutaryp biler, bu optimaliýa garamak üçin galan netijesini çözmek üçin näçe çözmelidir. Biz möhüm bir optimal gaim arama algoritmini teklip edip, ol hemişe optimal-अंश tamamlandyrylyk hypotezisini geri getirir we optimalik döredilmeden soňra gutaryp biler. Kıs a s üre hypotezi için nöral jenerasyonun gelişimini saylamak için, hem de gücümüzün arama algoritminin üýtgedilmiş bir versiyonu optimal kalmasına izin veriyoruz. Neural maşynyň terjimesinde örän gyzamy görkezilýän ýagdaýlaryň algoritmy bolan ýagdaýyny öňki öňki teklip eden seçeneklerden öňünden gelişmelere ýok edip bilýär.', 'sq': 'Në gjenerimin e tekstit nervor të tillë si përkthimi i makinës nervore, përmbledhja dhe titullimi i imazhit, kërkimi i rreze përdoret gjerësisht për të përmirësuar cilësinë e tekstit të daljes. Megjithatë, në gjeneratën nervore, hipotezat mund të përfundojnë në hapa të ndryshme, gjë që e bën të vështirë të vendosësh kur të përfundojë kërkimi i rreze për të siguruar optimalitetin. Ne propozojmë një algoritëm kërkimi optimal në rreze që gjithmonë do të kthejë hipotezën optimale të plotë (madhësia e rreze modulore) dhe do të përfundojë sapo të vendoset optimaliteti. Për të kundërshtuar prirjen e gjeneratës nervore për hipoteza më të shkurtra, ne gjithashtu futim një mekanizëm shpërblimi me gjatësi të kufizuar që lejon një version të modifikuar të algoritmit tonë të kërkimit për rreze të mbetet optimal. Eksperimentet mbi përkthimin nervor të makinave tregojnë se algoritmi ynë kryesor i kërkimit në rreze çon në përmirësim në rezultatin BLEU ndaj alternativave të propozuara më parë.', 'am': 'የጥምቀት የጽሑፍ ትውልድ እንደሆነ የናውሬል መሣሪያን ትርጉም፣ ማስታወቂያው እና ምስል ማቀናጃ በመስመር ላይ የሜኑን ምርጫዎች የጽሑፉን ጥሩ ለማሻሻል ይጠቀማል፡፡ ነገር ግን የፀሐይ ትውልድ ግንኙነት በተለየ ደረጃዎች ይጨርሳል፡፡ የብረት መረጃ መጨረሻ እንዴት እንደሚፈጸም ይችላል፡፡ ምናልባት የብረት መረጃ መፈለጊያውን መፍጠር እናስጀምራለን፡፡ የነጥብ ትውልድ ግንኙነትን ለመቀላቀል፣ የረጅም የረጅም ዋጋ አካሄዱን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ላይ ፈተናዎች አስቀድሞ በተገኘው ምርጫዎች ላይ የብሊዩን ትርጉም ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "In neurale teks genereering soos neurale masjien vertaling, opsomming en beeldtitteling, word straat soektog heeltemal gebruik om die uitset teks kwaliteit te verbeter. Maar in die neurale generasie-instelling kan hipotees in verskillende stappe voltooi, wat maak dit moeilik om te besluit wanneer beam soektog te eindig om optimaliteit te verseker. Ons voorstel 'n probably optimale trap soektog algoritme wat altyd die optimale- score volledige hipotees (modulo trap grootte) sal teruggee en voltooi soos die optimaliteit gestel is. Om neurale generasie se tendensie te tel vir korter hipotees, introduseer ons ook 'n gebrende lengte vergelde mekanisme wat toelaat 'n veranderde weergawe van ons beam soektog algoritme om optimal te bly. Eksperimente op neurale masjien vertaling bevestig dat ons prinsipelle beam soektog algoritme lei na verbetering in BLEU-score oor voorheen voorgestelde alternatiewe.", 'hy': 'In neural text generation such as neural machine translation, summarization, and image captioning, beam search is widely used to improve the output text quality.  Այնուամենայնիվ, նյարդային սերնդի միջավայրում հիպոթեզները կարող են ավարտել տարբեր քայլերով, ինչը դժվարանում է որոշել, թե երբ ավարտել ճառագայթի որոնումը, որպեսզի ապահովեն օպտիմականությունը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք հավանաբար օպտիմալ ճառագայթի որոնման ալգորիթմ, որը միշտ կվերադարձնի օպտիմալ գնահատականը ամբողջական հիպոթեզին (մոդուլո ճառագայթի չափսը), և ավարտել այն անմիջապես, երբ օպտիմալիզմը Որպեսզի հակառակվենք նյարդային սերնդի ավելի կարճ հիպոթեզների դեպքում, մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք սահմանափակ երկարության պարգևատրության մեխանիզմ, որը թույլ է տալիս մեր ճառագայթի որոնման ալգորիթմի փոփոխված տարբերակը մնալ օ Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր սկզբունքային ճառագայթի որոնման ալգորիթմը հանգեցնում է բարելավման ԲԼԵՎ-ի գնահատականների մեջ նախկինում առաջարկված այլընտրան', 'az': 'Nəyral mašin çevirimi, qeyd edilməsi və surat başlığı kimi nəyral mətn nəzəriyyətində, çıxış mətn keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün gəzm araması genişliyinə istifadə edilir. Lakin, nöral nəsil təyin edilməsində, hipotezlər müxtəlif adımlarda bitirə bilər, ki bu, yaxşılıqları təsdiqləmək üçün neçə-neçə gəmi araştırmaq üçün çətin edər. Biz həmişə optimal-score tamamlandığı hipotezi (modulo tram böyüklüyü) qaytaracaq və optimalit qurulduğunda bitirməyi təmin edirik. Neyral nəsillərin qıs a hipotezlərin tərzini saymaq üçün, həmçinin s ınırlı uzunluğun mükafatlarının mehanizmasını təşkil edirik ki, ışıq arama algoritminin dəyişdirilmiş versiyasını optimal qalmağa imkan verir. Nəyral maşın çevirilməsi təcrübələrinin ilk əvvəlcə təklif edilmiş alternatifların üstündə BLEU nöqtəsindəki yaxşılıqlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল টেক্সট প্রজন্ম, যেমন নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ, সংক্ষিপ্ত সংক্ষেপ এবং ছবি ক্যাপ্টেশনের মত, আউটপুটেক্সটেক্সটের মান উন তবে নিউরেল প্রজন্মের বিন্যাসে হিসেবে বিভিন্ন পদক্ষেপ শেষ করতে পারে, যার ফলে সিদ্ধান্ত নেয়া কঠিন যে বীম অনুসন্ধান শেষ করা হব আমরা সম্ভবত একটি অপারেমিক বীম অনুসন্ধান অ্যালগরিদম প্রস্তাব করছি যা সবসময় অপটিমাল স্কোর সম্পূর্ণ হিপাতিসেবে ফিরে আসবে (মোডুলো বীমের আকার) এবং আশার্ নিউরেল প্রজন্মের সামান্য হিসাবের প্রতিরোধের জন্য আমরা একটি সীমান্ত লম্বা পুরস্কার প্রতিষ্ঠান চিহ্নিত করি যা আমাদের বীম অনুসন্ধান অ্যালগরিদমে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে আমাদের প্রধান বীম অনুসন্ধান অ্যালগরিদম বিলিউ স্কোরে প্রস্তাবিত বিকল্পের বিষ', 'cs': 'Při generování neurálního textu, jako je neuronový strojový překlad, shrnutí a popisky obrázků, je vyhledávání paprsku široce používáno ke zlepšení kvality výstupního textu. Nicméně, v nastavení nervové generace, hypotézy mohou končit v různých krocích, což ztěžuje rozhodnutí, kdy ukončit vyhledávání paprsku pro zajištění optimality. Navrhujeme prokazatelně optimální vyhledávací algoritmus paprsku, který vždy vrátí kompletní hypotézu optimálního skóre (modulová velikost paprsku) a dokončí, jakmile je stanovena optimalita. Abychom odstranili tendenci nervové generace k kratším hypotézám, zavádíme také mechanismus odměny omezené délky, který umožňuje upravené verze našeho algoritmu vyhledávání paprsku zůstat optimální. Experimenty na neuronovém strojovém překladu ukazují, že náš principiální algoritmus vyhledávání paprsku vede ke zlepšení skóre BLEU oproti dříve navrženým alternativám.', 'bs': 'U generaciji neuralnog teksta poput prevoda, sažetka i snimanja slika, pretraživanje zraka se široko koristi za poboljšanje kvalitete teksta proizvodnje. Međutim, u postavljanju neuralne generacije, hipoteze mogu završiti u različitim koracima, što čini teškom odlučiti kada završiti potragu za zrakom kako bi osigurala optimalitet. Predlažemo provjerljivo optimalni algoritam pretraživanja zraka koji će uvijek vratiti potpunu hipotezu optimalnog rezultata (veličina zraka modula), i završiti čim se uspostavi optimalnost. Da bismo se suočili s a tendencijom neuralne generacije za kraće hipoteze, također predstavljamo ograničeni mehanizam nagrade dužine koji omogućava modificiranu verziju našeg algoritma pretraživanja zraka da ostane optimalni. Eksperimenti o prevodu neuralnih strojeva pokazuju da naš glavni algoritam pretraživanja zraka vodi do poboljšanja rezultata BLEU-a nad prethodnim predloženim alternativama.', 'ca': "In neural text generation such as neural machine translation, summarization, and image captioning, beam search is widely used to improve the output text quality.  No obstant això, en el contexte de la generació neuronal, les hipòtesis poden acabar en diferents passos, i això dificulta decidir quan acabar la cerca del raig per assegurar l'optimitat. Proposem un algoritme probablement òptimal de cerca al raig que sempre retornarà la hipòtesi completa amb puntuació òptima (mida del raig módul), i acabarà tan aviat com s'establez l'òptimal. Per a contrarrestar la tendència de la generació neuronal a hipòtesis més curtes, també introduim un mecanisme de recompensa de llargada limitada que permet que una versió modificada del nostre algoritme de cerca al raig sigui optima. Els experiments de traducció neural de màquines demostren que el nostre algoritme principal de recerca al raig porta a millorar la puntuació BLEU en comparació amb les alternatives proposades abans.", 'et': 'Närviteksti genereerimisel, näiteks neuromasintõlkes, kokkuvõtluses ja piltide pealdistes, kasutatakse kiireotsingut laialdaselt väljundteksti kvaliteedi parandamiseks. Kuid närvigeneratsiooni seadetes võivad hüpoteesid lõpetada erinevates etappides, mistõttu on raske otsustada, millal lõpetada kiirte otsing optimaalsuse tagamiseks. Pakume välja tõestatult optimaalse kiirte otsingu algoritmi, mis tagastab alati optimaalse skoori täieliku hüpoteesi (modulo kiire suurus) ja lõpetab niipea, kui optimaalsus on kindlaks tehtud. Et võidelda närvigeneratsiooni tendentsiga lühematele hüpoteesidele, tutvustame ka piiratud pikkusega preemiamehhanismi, mis võimaldab meie kiirte otsingu algoritmi modifitseeritud versiooni jääda optimaalseks. Neuraalse masintõlke eksperimendid näitavad, et meie põhimõtteline kiirte otsingu algoritm viib BLEU skoori paranemiseni võrreldes varem pakutud alternatiividega.', 'fi': 'Neurotekstin tuottamisessa, kuten neurokonekäännöksessä, yhteenvedossa ja kuvatekstityksessä, sätehakua käytetään laajalti tulosteen laadun parantamiseksi. Hermon generointiasetuksessa hypoteesit voivat kuitenkin päättyä eri vaiheissa, minkä vuoksi on vaikea päättää, milloin sädehaku lopetetaan optimaalisuuden varmistamiseksi. Ehdotamme todistetusti optimaalista säteen etsintäalgoritmia, joka palauttaa aina optimaalisen pisteen täydellisen hypoteesin (modulo beam size) ja viimeistelee heti optimaliteetin määrittämisen jälkeen. Vastataksemme neurogeneraation taipumusta lyhyempiin hypoteeseihin, esittelemme myös rajoitetun pituuden palkitsemismekanismin, jonka avulla muokattu versio säteen etsintäalgoritmista pysyy optimaalisena. Neuron konekäännöksen kokeet osoittavat, että periaatteellinen keilahankkausalgoritmimme parantaa BLEU-pisteitä aiemmin ehdotettuihin vaihtoehtoihin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Jejaring Nanging, sa kalih-winih alam-alam kuwi, supoyatan iso nggawe diunting manut, lan akeh dhéwé kuwi susahe kanggo meh nambah kejahatan kanggo ngilanggar sampek Optimalit. Awak dhéwé ngergunaké Algorithm bukané perusahaan bukané perusahaan winih-perusahaan sing bisa mbukaké suputeksi (modulo-bumi), lan basa sak sistêm nggawe nguasai perusahaan. Nyong ngomong pisan seneng pisan kelas nggawe Perintah dumadhi, kita mulai nggawe ngubah sistem sing perusahaan winih dhéwé. Ngubah dhéwé, akeh iso ngubah perusahaan versi yang cukup maning Gebudhakan langkung tarjamahan e nyerung manut anyar tentang nggawe Algorithm panggunakak bukal sing dumadhi kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerasahan kanggo diangkat oleh operasi banget.', 'ha': "In tsari na matsayin neural kamar fassarar ɗin matafiyar da kwamfyutan neural, tsorization da tsarin zane, ana yi amfani da searching ɗin yin amfani da yin ƙari ga tsarin matsayin na fitarwa. A lokacin da aka daidaita kiyayen neura, misãlai za su iya cika cikin hanyõyi dabam-dabam, da haka yana yarda da yin hukunci a lokacin da za'a ƙara shawarar kwamfyuta don a so. Tuna goyyar da wata algoriti mai iya amfani da shirin fili, wanda zai iya mayar da algoritm na da amfani da ko'a koda zai iya cika cikakken hanyoyi (girmar shirin modulo), kuma Mu cika kafin da za'a daidaita shirin ayuka. To, don ka motsa dangin na neurar da ke ƙara ga hanyarwa masu ƙaranci, za'a iya ƙara, kuma za mu ƙãga wani matsayin kirki mai shimfiɗa, wanda ya yarda a gyarar taƙalumiya na nẽman algoritmu na yi amfani da. Tajararin masu fassarar mashine na neural sun nuna cewa algoritmu mai bincike wa filin shine na ƙarami yana ƙara mafarinta in BLEU's score ko da musamman da aka buɗa a gabani.", 'he': 'בדור טקסט עצבי כמו תרגום מכונת עצבית, סאמריזציה, וכתובת התמונה, חיפוש בקרן משתמש באופן רחב כדי לשפר את איכות הטקסט של יציאה. בכל אופן, במצב הדור העצבי, היפותזיות יכולות לסיים בצעדים שונים, מה שמקשה להחליט מתי לסיים חיפוש קרן כדי להבטיח אופטימליות. אנו מציעים אלגוריתם חיפוש אופטימי כנראה שתמיד יחזיר את היפותזיה המושלמת של הציוד האופטימי (גודל קרן מודולו), ותסיים ברגע שהאופטימליות תהיה קבועה. כדי להתנגד לנטיה של דור עצבי להיפתוזים קצרות יותר, אנחנו גם מציגים מנגנון פרס ארוך מוגבל שמאפשר גרסה משתנה של אלגוריתם חיפוש הקרן שלנו להישאר אופטימלי. ניסויים על התרגום של מכונות עצביות מראים שהאלגוריתם החיפוש על קרן העיקרי שלנו מוביל לשיפור בתוצאות BLEU מעל אלטרנטיבות הציעות קודם לכן.', 'sk': 'Pri ustvarjanju nevronskega besedila, kot so nevronski strojni prevod, povzetek in napisovanje slik, se iskanje z žarkom pogosto uporablja za izboljšanje kakovosti izhodnega besedila. Vendar pa se v nastavitvi nevronske generacije hipoteze lahko končajo v različnih korakih, zaradi česar je težko odločiti, kdaj končati iskanje žarka, da se zagotovi optimalnost. Predlagamo dokazano optimalni algoritem iskanja žarka, ki bo vedno vrnil optimalno oceno celotne hipoteze (velikost modulov žarka) in končal takoj, ko bo optimalnost ugotovljena. Da bi preprečili težnjo nevronske generacije po krajših hipotezah, uvedemo tudi mehanizem nagrajevanja z omejeno dolžino, ki omogoča, da spremenjena različica našega algoritma iskanja žarkov ostane optimalna. Eksperimenti nevronskega strojnega prevajanja kažejo, da naš načelni algoritem iskanja žarkov vodi do izboljšanja rezultata BLEU v primerjavi s predhodno predlaganimi alternativami.', 'bo': "In neural text generation such as neural machine translation, summarization, and image captioning, beam search is widely used to improve the output text quality. However, in the neural generation setting, hypotheses can end in different steps, which makes it difficult to decide when to end beam search to ensure optimality. We propose a provably optimal beam search algorithm that will always return the optimal-score complete hypothesis (modulo beam size), and finish as soon as the optimality is established. To counter neural generation's tendency for shorter hypotheses, we also introduce a bounded length reward mechanism which allows a modified version of our beam search algorithm to remain optimal. Experiments on neural machine translation demonstrate that our principal beam search algorithm leads to improvement in BLEU score over previously proposed alternatives."}
{'en': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'ar': 'أسلوب إخراج التوجيه والموضوع في توليد الاستجابة العصبية', 'es': 'Dirección del estilo de salida y el tema en la generación de respuesta neuronal', 'pt': 'Orientação de estilo de saída e tópico na geração de resposta neural', 'ja': '神経応答生成におけるステアリング出力スタイルとトピック', 'zh': '神经应生成中转输风格及主题', 'ru': 'Стиль рулевого вывода и тема в генерации нейронного отклика', 'hi': 'स्टीयरिंग आउटपुट शैली और तंत्रिका प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी में विषय', 'fr': 'Style de sortie et sujet de pilotage dans la génération de réponse neuronale', 'ga': 'Stíl agus Ábhar Aschuir Stiúrtha i nGiniúint Freagra Néarach', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური პასუხის შექმნა', 'el': 'Στυλ και θέμα παραγωγής διεύθυνσης στη δημιουργία νευρωνικής απόκρισης', 'hu': 'Kormányzás kimeneti stílus és téma a neurális válasz generálásában', 'it': 'Stile e argomento di output di guida nella generazione di risposta neurale', 'kk': 'Нейрондық жауаптар жасауындағы шығыс стилі мен нақышы', 'mk': 'Стил и тема за управување со излезот во генерацијата на нервен одговор', 'lt': 'Vairavimo rezultato stilius ir tema, susijusi su neurologinio atsako generacija', 'ms': 'Gaya dan Topik Output Steering dalam Jenerasi Balasan Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d പ്രതികരണത്തിലുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള ശൈലിയും പ്രമേയം', 'mt': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл хариу үйлдлийн шүүх хэлбэр болон сэдэв', 'no': 'Styringsstil og emne i generering av neiralsvar', 'pl': 'Styl wyjścia kierowniczego i temat w generowaniu odpowiedzi neuronowej', 'ro': 'Stilul de ieșire și subiectul direcției în generarea răspunsului neural', 'sr': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'so': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'sv': 'Styrning av utgångsstil och ämne i generering av neural respons', 'ta': 'புதிய பதில் உருவாக்கத்தில் வெளியீட்டு பாணி மற்றும் தலைப்பு', 'ur': 'نیورال واکنس نسل میں استرینگ آئٹپوٹ استیل اور موضوع', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiểu kết xuất chính trong tạo phản ứng thần kinh', 'bg': 'Стил и тема на управление на изхода при генериране на неврален отговор', 'nl': 'Steering Output Style en Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'da': 'Styring Output stil og emne i generering af neural respons', 'hr': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'de': 'Steuerungs-Output-Stil und Thema in der Generierung neuronaler Reaktionen', 'ko': '신경 반응 생성 중의 제어 출력 스타일과 주제', 'fa': 'طرح خروجی و عنوان مدیریت در نسل جواب عصبی', 'id': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'tr': 'Däşer jogabat janlaýyşynda Çikgi Stili we Meýdança', 'af': 'Steer Uitset Styl en Onderwerp in Nurale Antwoord Generasie', 'sw': 'Kupiga mtindo wa Matokeo na Mada katika Uzalishaji wa Majibu ya Njerumani', 'sq': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'hy': 'Նյարդային արձագանքի ստեղծման ոճը և թեման ղեկավարումը', 'bn': 'নিউরাল প্রতিক্রিয়া জেনারেশনে আউটপুট স্টাইল এবং বিষয় চুরি করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Estil i tàpic de la sortida de direcció en la generació de resposta neuronal', 'bs': 'Steering Output Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'az': 'Nöral cavab Yenilməsində Dönüş Çıqtı Stüyü və Mevzu', 'cs': 'Styl řízení a téma výstupu v generování nervové odezvy', 'et': 'Juhtimise väljundstiil ja teema neuroreaktsiooni genereerimisel', 'fi': 'Ohjauksen tuotoksen tyyli ja aihe hermovasteen luomisessa', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Style and Topic in Neural Response Generation', 'sk': 'Slog izhodnega usmerjanja in tema pri ustvarjanju nevronskega odziva', 'bo': 'ཕྱོགས་དབུལ་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྣུམ་ཚོགས་དང་གནད་དོན'}
{'en': 'We propose simple and flexible training and decoding methods for influencing output style and topic in neural encoder-decoder based language generation. This capability is desirable in a variety of applications, including conversational systems, where successful agents need to produce language in a specific style and generate responses steered by a human puppeteer or external knowledge. We decompose the neural generation process into empirically easier sub-problems : a faithfulness model and a decoding method based on selective-sampling. We also describe training and sampling algorithms that bias the generation process with a specific language style restriction, or a topic restriction. Human evaluation results show that our proposed methods are able to to restrict style and topic without degrading output quality in conversational tasks.', 'ar': 'نقترح طرق تدريب وفك تشفير بسيطة ومرنة للتأثير على أسلوب الإخراج والموضوع في توليد اللغة القائم على وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير العصبي. هذه القدرة مرغوبة في مجموعة متنوعة من التطبيقات ، بما في ذلك أنظمة المحادثة ، حيث يحتاج الوكلاء الناجحون إلى إنتاج لغة بأسلوب معين وإنشاء استجابات يقودها محرك عرائس بشري أو معرفة خارجية. نحن نحلل عملية التوليد العصبي إلى مشاكل فرعية أسهل تجريبياً: نموذج الإخلاص وطريقة فك التشفير على أساس أخذ العينات الانتقائي. وصفنا أيضًا خوارزميات التدريب وأخذ العينات التي تحيز عملية التوليد مع تقييد نمط لغة معين ، أو تقييد الموضوع. تظهر نتائج التقييم البشري أن أساليبنا المقترحة قادرة على تقييد الأسلوب والموضوع دون التقليل من جودة المخرجات في مهام المحادثة.', 'fr': "Nous proposons des méthodes de formation et de décodage simples et flexibles pour influencer le style de sortie et le sujet dans la génération de langage basée sur un encodeur neuronal et un décodeur. Cette capacité est souhaitable dans diverses applications, y compris les systèmes conversationnels, où les agents performants doivent produire un langage dans un style spécifique et générer des réponses dirigées par un marionnettiste humain ou des connaissances externes. Nous décomposons le processus de génération neuronale en sous-problèmes empiriquement plus simples\xa0: un modèle de fidélité et une méthode de décodage basée sur l'échantillonnage sélectif. Nous décrivons également des algorithmes de formation et d'échantillonnage qui biaisent le processus de génération avec une restriction de style linguistique spécifique ou une restriction de sujet. Les résultats de l'évaluation humaine montrent que les méthodes que nous proposons sont capables de restreindre le style et le sujet sans dégrader la qualité de sortie dans les tâches conversationnelles.", 'zh': '立简灵解码法,以妨神经编码器 - 解码器语。 凡此诸用,可得而会话统也;成功者,以特定为言,以木偶师为应也。 分神经为子,忠实基于选择性采样解码。 又述训练采样算法,则特定言格、主题限以偏生。 人工评结果表明,吾法能于不降会话务输质者,限以风格主题。', 'es': 'Proponemos métodos de entrenamiento y decodificación simples y flexibles para influir en el estilo de salida y el tema en la generación de lenguaje basada en codificadores-decodificadores neuronales. Esta capacidad es deseable en una variedad de aplicaciones, incluidos los sistemas de conversación, donde los agentes exitosos necesitan producir un lenguaje con un estilo específico y generar respuestas dirigidas por un titiritero humano o por conocimiento externo. Descomponemos el proceso de generación neuronal en subproblemas empíricamente más fáciles: un modelo de fidelidad y un método de decodificación basado en el muestreo selectivo. También describimos algoritmos de entrenamiento y muestreo que sesgan el proceso de generación con una restricción de estilo de idioma específica o una restricción de tema. Los resultados de la evaluación humana muestran que nuestros métodos propuestos pueden restringir el estilo y el tema sin degradar la calidad de la salida en las tareas de conversación.', 'pt': 'Propomos métodos de treinamento e decodificação simples e flexíveis para influenciar o estilo de saída e o tópico na geração de linguagem baseada em codificador-decodificador neural. Essa capacidade é desejável em uma variedade de aplicações, incluindo sistemas de conversação, onde agentes bem-sucedidos precisam produzir linguagem em um estilo específico e gerar respostas dirigidas por um marionetista humano ou conhecimento externo. Decompomos o processo de geração neural em subproblemas empiricamente mais fáceis: um modelo de fidelidade e um método de decodificação baseado em amostragem seletiva. Também descrevemos algoritmos de treinamento e amostragem que influenciam o processo de geração com uma restrição de estilo de linguagem específica ou uma restrição de tópico. Os resultados da avaliação humana mostram que nossos métodos propostos são capazes de restringir o estilo e o tópico sem degradar a qualidade da saída em tarefas de conversação.', 'ja': '私たちは、ニューラルエンコーダデコーダベースの言語生成における出力スタイルとトピックに影響を与えるためのシンプルで柔軟なトレーニングとデコード方法を提案します。この機能は、成功したエージェントが特定のスタイルで言語を作成し、人間の操り人形師または外部の知識によって操作される応答を生成する必要がある会話システムを含むさまざまなアプリケーションで望ましい。ニューラル生成プロセスを経験的に簡単な副問題に分解します忠実度モデルと選択的サンプリングに基づくデコード方法ですまた、特定の言語スタイルの制限、またはトピックの制限で生成プロセスに偏りを与えるトレーニングとサンプリングアルゴリズムについても説明します。人間の評価結果は、私たちが提案した方法は、会話タスクの出力品質を低下させることなく、スタイルとトピックを制限することができることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Предложены простые и гибкие методы обучения и декодирования для влияния на стиль и тему вывода при генерации языка на основе нейронного кодера-декодера. Эта возможность желательна в различных приложениях, включая разговорные системы, где успешные агенты должны создавать язык в определенном стиле и генерировать ответы, управляемые человеческим кукловодом или внешними знаниями. Мы декомпозируем процесс генерации нейронов в эмпирически более простые подзадачи: модель достоверности и метод декодирования, основанный на выборочной выборке. Мы также описываем алгоритмы обучения и выборки, которые искажают процесс генерации с определенным ограничением стиля языка или ограничением темы. Результаты человеческой оценки показывают, что предлагаемые нами методы способны ограничивать стиль и тему, не ухудшая качество вывода в разговорных задачах.', 'hi': 'हम न्यूरल एनकोडर-डिकोडर आधारित भाषा पीढ़ी में आउटपुट शैली और विषय को प्रभावित करने के लिए सरल और लचीले प्रशिक्षण और डिकोडिंग विधियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह क्षमता विभिन्न अनुप्रयोगों में वांछनीय है, जिसमें संवादी प्रणालियां भी शामिल हैं, जहां सफल एजेंटों को एक विशिष्ट शैली में भाषा का उत्पादन करने और मानव कठपुतली या बाहरी ज्ञान द्वारा संचालित प्रतिक्रियाओं को उत्पन्न करने की आवश्यकता होती है। हम तंत्रिका पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया को अनुभवजन्य रूप से आसान उप-समस्याओं में विघटित करते हैं: एक वफादारी मॉडल और चयनात्मक-नमूनाकरण के आधार पर एक डिकोडिंग विधि। हम प्रशिक्षण और नमूना एल्गोरिदम का भी वर्णन करते हैं जो एक विशिष्ट भाषा शैली प्रतिबंध, या एक विषय प्रतिबंध के साथ पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया को पूर्वाग्रहित करते हैं। मानव मूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित तरीके संवादात्मक कार्यों में आउटपुट गुणवत्ता को कम किए बिना शैली और विषय को प्रतिबंधित करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ga': 'Molaimid modhanna oiliúna agus díchódaithe simplí solúbtha chun tionchar a imirt ar stíl agus ar thopaic aschuir i nginiúint teanga atá bunaithe ar ionchódóirí néaracha. Tá an cumas seo inmhianaithe i bhfeidhmchláir éagsúla, lena n-áirítear córais chomhrá, áit a gcaithfidh gníomhairí rathúla teanga a tháirgeadh i stíl shainiúil agus freagairtí a ghiniúint arna stiúradh ag puipéadóir daonna nó eolas seachtrach. Déanaimid an próiseas giniúna néaraigh a dhianscaoileadh ina fho-fhadhbanna eimpíreacha: múnla dílseachta agus modh díchódaithe bunaithe ar sampláil roghnaíoch. Déanaimid cur síos freisin ar algartaim oiliúna agus samplála a chlaonann an próiseas giniúna le srian stíl teanga ar leith, nó le srian topaice. Léiríonn torthaí meastóireachta daonna go bhfuil ár modhanna molta in ann stíl agus topaic a shrianadh gan cáilíocht an aschuir a dhíghrádú i dtascanna comhrá.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გვეძლევა გავაკეთებთ საუკეთესო და გრძნობელი განაკეთება და გამოყენება სტილის და თემის შემთხვევაში ნეიროლური კოდერის განაკეთებაში ენერგიის დამატებით ეს შესაძლებლობა სხვადასხვა პროგრამებში უნდა იქნება, სადაც წარმატებული ადვნენტები სპექტიური სტილში წარმოიქმნა და ადამიანის კოპექტიური სტილში გაუქმნა პასუხი, რომელიც ადამიანის კუპ ჩვენ ნეიროლის წარმოდგენის პროცესი ემპერიკურად უფრო მარტივი სამპრობლემებში გადაწყენებთ: დარწმუნელობის მოდელი და რეკოდირების პროცესი, რომელიც არჩე ჩვენ ასევე აღწერეთ განაკეთება და გამოყენება ალგორიტიმები, რომელიც განაკეთებული ენის სტილის განაკეთება, ან თემის განაკეთება. ადამიანის განსაზღვრების შედეგი დააჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამები შეუძლებელია სტილის და თემების დასაზღვრება, როგორც განსაზღვრებული საქმებში გამოყენება უნდა გადა', 'hu': 'Egyszerű és rugalmas képzési és dekódolási módszereket javasolunk a kimeneti stílus és téma befolyásolására neurális kódoló-dekóder alapú nyelvgenerálásban. Ez a képesség különböző alkalmazásokban kívánatos, beleértve a beszélgetési rendszereket is, ahol a sikeres ügynököknek egy adott stílusban kell nyelvet előállítaniuk, és válaszokat kell generálniuk egy emberi bábos vagy külső tudás irányításával. A neurális generációs folyamatot empirikusan egyszerűbb alproblémákká bontjuk fel: hűségmodellre és szelektív mintavételen alapuló dekódolási módszerre. Olyan képzési és mintavételi algoritmusokat is ismertetünk, amelyek egy adott nyelvi stíluskorlátozással vagy egy témaköri korlátozással befolyásolják a generálási folyamatot. Az emberi értékelés eredményei azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszereink képesek korlátozni a stílust és a témát anélkül, hogy a kimenet minőségét rontanák a beszélgetési feladatok során.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε απλές και ευέλικτες μεθόδους εκπαίδευσης και αποκωδικοποίησης για την επιρροή του στυλ και του θέματος εξόδου στην παραγωγή γλωσσών με βάση τον νευρικό κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή. Αυτή η ικανότητα είναι επιθυμητή σε ποικίλες εφαρμογές, συμπεριλαμβανομένων συστημάτων συνομιλίας, όπου οι επιτυχημένοι πράκτορες πρέπει να παράγουν γλώσσα με συγκεκριμένο στυλ και να παράγουν απαντήσεις που καθοδηγούνται από έναν ανθρώπινο μαριονέτα ή εξωτερική γνώση. Αποσπάσαμε τη διαδικασία παραγωγής νευρώνων σε εμπειρικά ευκολότερα υποπροβλήματα: ένα μοντέλο πιστότητας και μια μέθοδο αποκωδικοποίησης βασισμένη στην επιλεκτική δειγματοληψία. Περιγράφουμε επίσης αλγόριθμους εκπαίδευσης και δειγματοληψίας που προκαθορίζουν τη διαδικασία παραγωγής με συγκεκριμένο περιορισμό γλωσσικού στυλ ή περιορισμό θέματος. Τα αποτελέσματα της ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι μας είναι σε θέση να περιορίσουν το στυλ και το θέμα χωρίς να υποβαθμίζουν την ποιότητα παραγωγής σε εργασίες συνομιλίας.', 'lt': 'Siūlome paprastų ir lanksčių mokymo ir dekodinimo metodų, skirtų daryti įtaką išėjimo stiliui ir temai nervinių kodų dekoderių pagrindu grindžiamoje kalbų kūrimo srityje. Šis gebėjimas pageidautinas įvairiose programose, įskaitant konversacines sistemas, kai sėkmingi agentai turi gaminti konkrečiu būdu kalbą ir sukurti žmogaus puppeteer ar išor ės žinių vadovaujamus atsakus. Mes išskaičiuojame nervų gamybos procesą į empiriškai paprastesnes problemas: patikimumo model į ir atrankiniu mėginių ėmimu pagrįstą dekodizavimo metodą. Mes taip pat apibūdiname mokymo ir mėginių ėmimo algoritmus, kurie nukreipia į gamybos procesą su konkrečiu kalbos stiliaus apribojimu arba teminiu apribojimu. Žmogaus vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomi metodai gali apriboti stilą ir temą, nesumažindami išėjimo kokybės pokalbių metu.', 'it': "Proponiamo metodi di formazione e decodifica semplici e flessibili per influenzare lo stile di output e l'argomento nella generazione del linguaggio basato su encoder-decoder neurali. Questa capacità è desiderabile in una varietà di applicazioni, compresi i sistemi di conversazione, in cui gli agenti di successo devono produrre un linguaggio in uno stile specifico e generare risposte guidate da un burattinaio umano o conoscenze esterne. scomposiamo il processo di generazione neurale in sottoproblemi empiricamente più facili: un modello di fedeltà e un metodo di decodifica basato sul campionamento selettivo. Descriviamo anche algoritmi di formazione e campionamento che distorcono il processo di generazione con una restrizione specifica dello stile linguistico o una restrizione dell'argomento. I risultati della valutazione umana mostrano che i nostri metodi proposti sono in grado di limitare lo stile e l'argomento senza degradare la qualità dell'output nelle attività di conversazione.", 'kk': 'Біз невралдық кодерлердің тілдерін құру үшін қарапайым және гибілді оқыту және декодтау әдістерін ұсынамыз. Бұл мүмкіндік көптеген қолданбаларда, мәлімет жүйелерді қоса, жерде сәтті агенттер тілді бір стилде жасау керек және адамдардың кеңейтуші не сыртқы білім арқылы жауаптарды жасау керек. Біз невралды құру процесін империялық ішкі мәселелерге көмектесеміз: сенімдік үлгісі және таңдау үлгісіне негізделген декодтау әдісі. Біз сондай-ақ құру процесін бір тіл стилінің шектеуі немесе нақышты шектеуі болатын алгоритмдерді таңдаймыз. Адам бағалау нәтижелері келтірілген әдістеріміздің стилі мен нақыштарды айналысу тапсырмалардың шығыс сапасын шектеу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме едноставна и флексибилна обука и декодирање методи за влијание врз стилот на излез и темата во генерацијата на јазик базиран на нервен кодер-декодирач. This capability is desirable in a variety of applications, including conversational systems, where successful agents need to produce language in a specific style and generate responses steered by a human puppeteer or external knowledge.  Го разделуваме процесот на нервна генерација во емпириски полесни потпроблеми: модел на верност и метод на декодирање базиран на селективно примерување. We also describe training and sampling algorithms that bias the generation process with a specific language style restriction, or a topic restriction.  Резултатите од човечката проценка покажуваат дека нашите предложени методи можат да го ограничат стилот и темата без да го деградираат квалитетот на излезот во разговорите.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഭാഷ തലമുറയില്\u200d പ്രഭാവിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള പരിശീലനവും ക ഈ കഴിവ് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളിലും, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിലും ഉള്ള പ്രയോഗങ്ങളിലും ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നു. വിജയിച്ച ഏജന്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ശൈലിയ We decompose the neural generation process into empirically easier sub-problems: a faithfulness model and a decoding method based on selective-sampling.  പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയെ പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലനവും പരിശീലനത്തെയും പരിശീലനത്തെയും പരി മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് സ്റ്റൈ', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan latihan mudah dan fleksibel dan kaedah penyahkodan untuk mempengaruhi gaya output dan topik dalam generasi bahasa berasaskan penyahkod-penyahkod saraf. Kemampuan ini diinginkan dalam pelbagai aplikasi, termasuk sistem perbualan, di mana ejen berjaya perlu menghasilkan bahasa dalam gaya tertentu dan menghasilkan balasan yang dikendalikan oleh pemain boneka manusia atau pengetahuan luaran. Kami menghancurkan proses generasi saraf menjadi sub-masalah yang lebih mudah empirik: model kesetiaan dan kaedah penyahkodan berdasarkan pengumpulan selektif. We also describe training and sampling algorithms that bias the generation process with a specific language style restriction, or a topic restriction.  Hasil penilaian manusia menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami diusulkan mampu terhad gaya dan topik tanpa mengurangkan kualiti output dalam tugas perbualan.', 'mt': 'We propose simple and flexible training and decoding methods for influencing output style and topic in neural encoder-decoder based language generation.  Din il-kapaċità hija mixtieqa f’varjetà ta’ applikazzjonijiet, inklużi sistemi ta’ konverżjoni, fejn a ġenti ta’ suċċess jeħtieġu jipproduċu l-lingwa fi stil speċifiku u jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet immexxija minn puppeteer uman jew għarfien estern. Aħna niddekomponu l-proċess ta’ ġenerazzjoni newrali f’subproblemi empirikament aktar faċli: mudell ta’ fedeltà u metodu ta’ dekodifikazzjoni bbażat fuq kampjunar selettiv. We also describe training and sampling algorithms that bias the generation process with a specific language style restriction, or a topic restriction.  Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni mill-bniedem juru li l-metodi proposti tagħna jistgħu jirrestrinġu l-istil u s-suġġett mingħajr ma jiddegradaw il-kwalità tal-output fil-kompiti ta’ konverżjoni.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн коддоор суурилсан хэлний бүтээлтийг нөлөөлж чадах энгийн, гишүүн суралцах, хувьсгал хөгжүүлэх аргыг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Энэ чадвар олон янз бүрийн програм, харилцааны систем болон амжилттай агентууд хэл тодорхой хэлбэрээр бий болгож, хүн төрөлхтний хүүхдүүд эсвэл гадаад мэдлэгтэй удирдлагатай хариу үйлдвэрлэх хэрэгтэй. Бид мэдрэлийн төрөлхтний процессийг эзэмшигтэй амархан суб-асуудлуудад хувааж, үнэндээ итгэлтэй загвар, сонголт хэлбэрээр үндсэн загвар юм. Бид мөн урсгалын процессийг тодорхой хэлний хэлбэрийн хязгаарлалтыг эсвэл сэдвийн хязгаарлалтыг зогсоож буй сургалтын болон алгоритмыг тайлбарладаг. Хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын үр дүнд бидний санал өгсөн аргыг харилцааны ажил дээр үр дүнг багасгаж чадахгүй, хэлбэрийг хязгаарлах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy proste i elastyczne metody szkoleniowe i dekodowania wpływające na styl i temat wyjścia w generowaniu języków opartych na koderze neuronowym. Ta zdolność jest pożądana w różnych zastosowaniach, w tym w systemach konwersacyjnych, gdzie skuteczni agenci muszą produkować język w określonym stylu i generować odpowiedzi kierowane przez ludzkiego lalkarza lub wiedzę zewnętrzną. Proces generowania neuronów rozkładamy na empirycznie łatwiejsze podproblemy: model wierności oraz metodę dekodowania opartą na selektywnym próbkowaniu. Opisujemy również algorytmy szkoleniowe i próbkowania, które sprzeczają proces generowania z określonym ograniczeniem stylu językowego lub ograniczeniem tematu. Wyniki oceny ludzkiej pokazują, że proponowane przez nas metody są w stanie ograniczyć styl i temat bez obniżania jakości wyjścia w zadaniach konwersacyjnych.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår enkle og fleksibel trening og dekoding av metodar for å påvirka utdata- stil og emne i utdatakodingsbasert språk. Denne kapasiteten er ønskjer i mange program, inkludert konversjonssystemer, der suksessfulle agentar må laga språk i ein spesifikk stil og laga svarar som styrer av ein menneskelig puppeter eller ekstern kunnskap. Vi dekomprimerer neuralgenereringsprosessen til empirisk enklare underproblemer: ein godverdighetsmodell og ein dekoderingsmetode basert på selektive samling. Vi beskriver også øvingsalgoritme og prøvingssamlingar som følgjer genereringsprosessen med ein spesifikk språksstilrestriksjon, eller eit emnefunksjon. Resultatet for evaluering av menneske viser at våre foreslåde metodar kan begrensa stil og emne utan å redusera utdata-kvalitet i konvertasjonsprogrammer.', 'ro': 'Propunem metode simple și flexibile de instruire și decodare pentru influențarea stilului și subiectului de ieșire în generarea limbajului bazat pe encoder-decoder neural. Această capacitate este de dorit într-o varietate de aplicații, inclusiv sisteme de conversație, în cazul în care agenții de succes trebuie să producă limbaj într-un stil specific și să genereze răspunsuri conduse de un păpușar uman sau cunoștințe externe. Descompunem procesul de generare neurală în subprobleme mai ușoare empiric: un model de fidelitate și o metodă de decodare bazată pe eșantionare selectivă. De asemenea, descriem algoritmi de formare și eșantionare care părtinesc procesul de generare cu o restricție specifică a stilului lingvistic sau o restricție de subiect. Rezultatele evaluării umane arată că metodele noastre propuse sunt capabile să restricționeze stilul și subiectul fără a degrada calitatea producției în sarcinile conversaționale.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo jednostavne i fleksibilne metode obuke i dekodiranja za utjecanje na stil izlaza i temu u generaciji jezika na osnovu neuralnog kodera. Ova sposobnost je poželjna u raznim aplikacijama, uključujući razgovorne sisteme, gde uspešni agenti moraju proizvoditi jezik u određenom stilu i stvarati odgovore koje vodi ljudski lutkić ili vanjski znanje. Rasporedimo proces neuralne generacije u empirički lakše podprobleme: model vernosti i metod dekodiranja baziran na selektivnom uzorku. Takođe opisujemo algoritme obuke i uzoraka koji predrasude proces generacije sa određenim ograničenjem jezičkog stila ili ograničenjem teme. Rezultati ljudske procjene pokazuju da su naši predloženi metodi u stanju ograničiti stil i tema bez smanjenja kvalitete izlaza u razgovornim zadatkima.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ඩිකෝඩ් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ විදිය මේ සක්ෂමතා විවිධ විදිහට අවශ්\u200dයයි, සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, ජාතිකයන්ට විශේෂ විදිහට භාෂා නිර්මාණය කරන් අපි න්\u200dයූරල් ජීවිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා: විශ්වාසිත විධානයක් සහ විස්තර සැම්ප්ලි අපි පරීක්ෂණය සහ සැම්පුල් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් විශේෂ කරනවා කියලා විශේෂ භාෂාව සැකසීමක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය ස මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විද්\u200dයාපයක් වාර්තාවේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ වැඩවල', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa waxbarasho fudud oo fudud oo fudud iyo hababka codsiga oo saameyn ku leh qaababka soo baxa iyo mada ku saameyn karnaa qarniga luqada kookoowaad ee ku saleysan. Aqoonsadan waxaa suurtogal ah in lagu sameeyo codsiyooyin kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ku jira nidaamka hadalka, kuwaas oo ay ku baahan yihiin kuwa guulaystay ay inay af ku soo bixiyaan qaab gaar ah oo ay soo dhashaan jawaabo ay u hogaansamaan qof dhakhtar ama aqoonta dibadda ah. Shaqooyinka dhalashada neurada waxaan si fudud u dhignaa dhibaatooyinka hoose: Tusaale aaminnimada iyo qaab koodeynta ku saleysan sameynta doorashada. Sidoo kale waxaynu u qornaa tababar iyo tusaale ahaan algorityo ku habboon jardiinada qarniga, taasoo ku qoran qaab cayiman oo luuqad ah ama xadeynta arimaha. Midhaha qiimeynta dadku waxay muuqataa in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay awoodi karaan inay xadi karaan qaababka iyo mada ayan ku hoos marin karin qiimaha soo baxa ee shaqaalaha hadalka.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår enkla och flexibla utbildnings- och avkodningsmetoder för att påverka utgångsstil och ämne i neural encoder-dekoder baserad språkgenerering. Denna förmåga är önskvärd i en mängd olika tillämpningar, inklusive konversationssystem, där framgångsrika agenter behöver producera språk i en specifik stil och generera svar styrda av en mänsklig marionett eller extern kunskap. Vi bryter ner den neurala genereringsprocessen till empiriskt enklare delproblem: en trofasthetsmodell och en avkodningsmetod baserad på selektiv sampling. Vi beskriver även tränings- och samplingsalgoritmer som påverkar genereringsprocessen med en specifik språkstilsbegränsning eller ämnesbegränsning. Mänskliga utvärderingsresultat visar att våra föreslagna metoder kan begränsa stil och ämne utan att försämra outputkvaliteten i konversationsuppgifter.', 'ta': 'நாம் சுலபமான மற்றும் flexible பயிற்சி மற்றும் குறியீட்டு முறைமைகளை புதிய குறியீட்டு மொழி உருவாக்கும் பாணியில் பாதி இந்த இயல்பாக்கம் பல்வேறு பயன்பாடுகளில், பேச்சு அமைப்புகளைக் கூட தேவைப்படுகிறது, வெற்றிகரமான முகவர்கள் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட பாணில் மொழியை உருவாக்க வ நாம் புதிய உருவாக்கும் செயலை எளிதாக துணை பிரச்சனைகளாக குறைவாக்குகிறோம்: நம்பிக்கை மாதிரி மற்றும் தேர்ந்தெடுத்த மாதி நாம் பயிற்சி மற்றும் உதாரணங்களை விளக்குகிறோம் அது உருவாக்கும் செயலை குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி பாணியின் கட்டுப்பாடு Human evaluation results show that our proposed methods are able to to restrict style and topic without degrading output quality in conversational tasks.', 'ur': 'ہم نئورل کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر بنیاد زبان کی نسل میں ساده اور ہلکس ترکین اور ڈیکوڈ طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ یہ قابلیت مختلف کاربریوں میں ضروری ہے، جس میں کامیابی اگنٹوں کو ایک خاص طریقے سے زبان پیدا کرنے کی ضرورت ہے اور ایک انسان کے پپپٹیٹی یا خارجی علم سے چلتی ہوئی جواب دینے کی ضرورت ہے. ہم نے نئورل نسل پروسس کو مغربی سے آسان زیر مشکلات میں تقسیم کیا ہے: ایک اخلاقیت مدل اور ایک دکوندی طریقہ جسے انتخاب نمونل پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی تعلیم اور نمونہ الگوریتموں کی توصیف کرتی ہیں جن کی نسل پرسس کو ایک مخصوص زبان استیل محدودیت کے ساتھ بغیر تغییر دیتی ہے یا ایک موضوع محدودیت کے ساتھ۔ انسان کا ارزیابی نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقے کائنات کے کاموں میں ناکام کرنے کے بغیر استیل اور موضوع کو محدود کرنے کے قابل ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz oddiy va fleksiblik treni va kodlash usullarini neyron kodcoder asosida yaratilgan tilning natijasida ishlatish uslubini va mavzuga ishlatish usullarini talab qilamiz. Bu qobiliyat turli dasturlarda, chaqaloqlar tizimida, muvaffaqiyatlar tilni foydalanishi kerak va inson tugmalar yoki tashqi ta'lim bilan boshqaruvchi javoblarni yaratish kerak. Biz neyrolik avval jarayonini oddiy sub-muammolarga qarasamiz: faqat modeli va tanlangan samol asosida yaratish usuli. We also describe training and sampling algorithms that bias the generation process with a specific language style restriction, or a topic restriction.  Inson qiymatlari natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan vazifalarda natijalar sifatini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất các phương pháp huấn luyện và giải mã đơn giản và linh hoạt để ảnh hưởng các kiểu xuất và chủ đề trong hệ thống mã hóa thần kinh. Khả năng này đáng mong đợi trong nhiều ứng dụng khác nhau, bao gồm các hệ thống đối thoại, nơi các đặc vụ thành đạt cần sản xuất ngôn ngữ theo một kiểu đặc biệt và tạo ra các phản ứng được điều khiển bởi một người giật dây hay kiến thức bên ngoài. Chúng ta phân hủy quá trình sản sinh thần kinh thành các vấn đề ngầm dễ dàng hơn nhiều: mô hình đức tin và một phương pháp giải mã dựa trên việc chọn lọc. Chúng tôi cũng mô tả thuật toán huấn luyện và lấy mẫu mã, làm lệch tiến trình sản xuất với một hạn chế ngôn ngữ cụ thể, hoặc hạn chế về chủ đề. Kết quả đánh giá con người cho thấy các phương pháp được đề xuất có khả năng hạn chế phong cách và chủ đề mà không làm giảm chất lượng xuất trong các công việc đối thoại.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме прости и гъвкави методи за обучение и декодиране за повлияване на изходния стил и тема в генерирането на езика, базиран на невронен кодер-декодер. Тази способност е желателна в различни приложения, включително в разговорни системи, където успешните агенти трябва да произвеждат език в конкретен стил и да генерират отговори, ръководени от човек кукловод или външни знания. Разлагаме процеса на генериране на неврони на емпирично по-лесни подзадачи: модел на вярност и метод на декодиране въз основа на селективно вземане на проби. Описваме и алгоритми за обучение и вземане на проби, които наклоняват процеса на генериране с конкретно езиково ограничение или тематично ограничение. Резултатите от човешката оценка показват, че предложените от нас методи са в състояние да ограничат стила и темата, без да влошават качеството на изхода в разговорните задачи.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår enkle og fleksible trænings- og afkodningsmetoder til at påvirke output stil og emne i neural encoder-dekoder baseret sproggenerering. Denne evne er ønskelig i en række forskellige applikationer, herunder samtalesystemer, hvor succesfulde agenter skal producere sprog i en bestemt stil og generere svar styret af en menneskelig dukkedukke eller ekstern viden. Vi nedbryder den neurale genereringsproces til empirisk lettere delproblemer: en trofasthedsmodel og en afkodningsmetode baseret på selektiv sampling. Vi beskriver også trænings- og samplingsalgoritmer, der skærper genereringsprocessen med en bestemt begrænsning af sprogstil eller en emnebegrænsning. Menneskelige evalueringsresultater viser, at vores foreslåede metoder er i stand til at begrænse stil og emne uden at nedbryde outputkvaliteten i samtaleopgaver.', 'nl': 'We stellen eenvoudige en flexibele trainings- en decoderingsmethoden voor voor het beïnvloeden van outputstijl en -onderwerp in de op neurale encoder-decoder gebaseerde taalgeneratie. Deze mogelijkheid is wenselijk in een verscheidenheid van toepassingen, waaronder conversatiesystemen, waar succesvolle agenten taal in een specifieke stijl moeten produceren en reacties moeten genereren gestuurd door een menselijke poppenspeler of externe kennis. We verdelen het neurale generatieproces in empirisch eenvoudiger subproblemen: een getrouwheidsmodel en een decoderingsmethode gebaseerd op selectieve sampling. We beschrijven ook training- en sampling-algoritmes die het generatieproces beïnvloeden met een specifieke taalstijlbeperking of een topic restrictie. Menselijke evaluatieresultaten tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methoden in staat zijn om stijl en onderwerp te beperken zonder de outputkwaliteit in gesprekstaken te verminderen.', 'hr': 'Mi predlažemo jednostavne i fleksibilne metode obuke i dekodiranja za utjecanje na izlazni stil i temu u generaciji jezika na osnovu neuralnog kodera. Ova sposobnost je poželjna u raznim aplikacijama, uključujući razgovorne sustave, gdje uspješni agenti moraju proizvoditi jezik u određenom stilu i stvarati odgovore koje vodi ljudski lutkić ili vanjski znanje. Rasporedimo proces neuralne generacije u empirički lakše podprobleme: model vjernosti i metodu dekodiranja temeljenu na selektivnom uzorku. Također opisujemo algoritme obuke i uzoraka koji predstavljaju proces generacije sa određenim ograničenjem jezičkog stila ili ograničenjem teme. Rezultati procjene ljudi pokazuju da su naši predloženi metodi u mogućnosti ograničiti stil i temu bez smanjenja kvalitete proizvoda u razgovornim zadatkima.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen einfache und flexible Trainings- und Dekodierungsmethoden zur Beeinflussung des Output-Stils und Themas in der neuronalen Encoder-Decoder-basierten Sprachgenerierung vor. Diese Fähigkeit ist in einer Vielzahl von Anwendungen wünschenswert, einschließlich Gesprächssystemen, wo erfolgreiche Agenten Sprache in einem bestimmten Stil produzieren und Antworten generieren müssen, die von einem menschlichen Puppenspieler oder externem Wissen gesteuert werden. Wir zerlegen den neuronalen Erzeugungsprozess in empirisch einfachere Teilprobleme: ein Treuemodell und eine Decodiermethode basierend auf selektivem Sampling. Wir beschreiben auch Trainings- und Sampling-Algorithmen, die den Generierungsprozess mit einer bestimmten Sprachstilbeschränkung oder einer Themenbeschränkung verzerren. Menschliche Evaluationsergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagenen Methoden in der Lage sind, Stil und Thema einzuschränken, ohne die Output-Qualität in Gesprächsaufgaben zu beeinträchtigen.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan latihan sederhana dan fleksibel dan metode dekoding untuk mempengaruhi gaya keluaran dan topik dalam generasi bahasa berasaskan koder-dekoding saraf. Kemampuan ini diinginkan dalam berbagai aplikasi, termasuk sistem konversasi, di mana agen sukses perlu menghasilkan bahasa dalam gaya tertentu dan menghasilkan respon yang dikendalikan oleh seorang boneka manusia atau pengetahuan luar. Kami menghancurkan proses generasi saraf menjadi sub-masalah yang empiris lebih mudah: model kesetiaan dan metode dekoding berdasarkan pemilihan sampel selektif. Kami juga menggambarkan pelatihan dan algoritma pengambilan sampel yang bias proses generasi dengan batasan gaya bahasa spesifik, atau batasan topik. Human evaluation results show that our proposed methods are able to to restrict style and topic without degrading output quality in conversational tasks.', 'ko': '신경 코딩기를 바탕으로 하는 언어 생성에서 우리는 간단하고 유연한 훈련과 디코딩 방법을 제시하여 출력 스타일과 주제에 영향을 주었다.이런 능력은 각종 응용에서 취할 수 있는 것이다. 회화 시스템을 포함한다. 회화 시스템에서 성공한 에이전트는 특정한 스타일로 언어를 생성하고 인류 인형사나 외부 지식의 인도 아래 응답을 생성해야 한다.우리는 신경 생성 과정을 경험적으로 더욱 쉬운 하위 문제인 충성 모델과 선택적인 샘플링을 바탕으로 하는 디코딩 방법으로 분해할 것이다.우리는 또한 훈련과 샘플링 알고리즘을 묘사했는데 이런 알고리즘은 특정한 언어 스타일 제한이나 주제 제한을 사용하여 생성 과정에 편향된다.인류 평가 결과에 따르면 우리가 제시한 방법은 회화 임무의 출력 질을 낮추지 않는 상황에서 스타일과 주제를 제한할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که روش\u200cهای آموزش ساده و flexible و دکوندن برای تأثیر سبک خروجی و موضوع در نسل زبان بنیاد\u200cهای کودکور عصبی را تأثیر دهیم. این توانایی در برنامه\u200cهای مختلف، شامل سیستم\u200cهای مکالمه\u200cای است که ماموران موفقیت نیاز دارند زبان را در یک طریق خاص تولید کنند و پاسخ\u200cهایی را که توسط یک کوچک انسان یا دانش خارجی رهبری می\u200cکند تولید کنند. ما فرآیند نسل عصبی را به عنوان مشکلات زیر نظامی آسانتری تقسیم می کنیم: یک مدل اعتماد و یک روش تقسیم کردن بر اساس نمونه\u200cهای برگزیدگی. ما همچنین الگوریتم\u200cهای آموزش و نمونه\u200cگیری را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که فرایند نسل را با یک محدودیت طریق زبان خاص، یا یک محدودیت موضوع تغییر می\u200cدهد. نتایج ارزیابی انسان نشان می دهد که روش پیشنهاد ما قادر به محدودیت سبک و موضوع بدون نابود کردن کیفیت خروجی در وظیفه های مکالمه هستند.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mafunzo rahisi na yenye flexible na njia za kupunguza kwa ajili ya kuathiri mtindo wa utoaji na mada katika kizazi cha lugha yenye kuboresha taratibu. This capability is desirable in a variety of applications, including conversational systems, where successful agents need to produce language in a specific style and generate responses steered by a human puppeteer or external knowledge.  Tunaweza kupunguza mchakato wa kizazi cha neura kuwa matatizo rahisi zaidi ya subira: mtindo wa uaminifu na njia ya kupunguza kwa kutumia sampuli ya uchaguzi. Pia tunaelezea mafunzo na mifano ambayo inapinga mchakato wa kizazi na vizuizi maalum vya lugha, au vizuizi vya mada. Matokeo ya uchunguzi wa binadamu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa zinaweza kuzuia mtindo na mada bila kudhalilisha kiwango cha matunda katika kazi za mazungumzo.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë trajnim të thjeshtë dhe fleksible dhe metoda dekodimi për ndikimin e stilit të daljes dhe temës në gjeneratën e gjuhës me bazë në kodifikuesin nervor. Kjo aftësi është e dëshirueshme në një shumicë aplikimesh, duke përfshirë sisteme bisedimesh, ku agjentët e suksesshëm duhet të prodhojnë gjuhën në një stil të caktuar dhe të gjenerojnë përgjigje të drejtuara nga një marionet njerëzor apo njohuri të jashtme. Ne e dekompozojmë procesin e gjenerimit nervor në subprobleme empirikisht më të lehta: një model besnikërie dhe një metodë dekodimi bazuar në kampionat selektiv. Ne përshkruajmë gjithashtu algoritmet e trajnimit dhe të mbikqyrjes së mostrave që përkrahin procesin e gjenerimit me një kufizim specifik të stilit gjuhësor, ose një kufizim tematik. Rezultatet e vlerësimit njerëzor tregojnë se metodat tona të propozuara janë në gjendje të kufizojnë stilin dhe temën pa degraduar cilësinë e daljes në detyrat bisedimore.', 'tr': 'Biz neiral kodçylar dili döredilmesinde basit we fleksible okuw we kodlemek yöntemlerini teklip edip görýäris. Bu başaryşlar birnäçe programlarda, söhbet sistemalarda, üstünlikli ajamlaryň dilini belli bir şekilde döretmesi gerekli we adam kellesi ýa daşaryk bilgi tarapyndan ýörän jogaplary döretmesi gerekli. Nöral jenerasyonu empirik olarak kolay altı sorunlara bölüyoruz: bir dürüst modeli ve seçmeli örneklere dayanan bir dekoding metodu. Biz hem bu äpişgäniň önümlerini belli dil biçiminden çykyş we mesele çykyşlygyny tassyklaýarys. Adamlar deňleýänlik netijesi biziň teklip eden yönlerimiz çykyş uzmanlaryň içinde çykyş kwalitesini azaltmasa çykyp biljekdigini görkez.', 'am': 'የውጤት ዘይት እና ጉዳይ የሆኑትን የውጤት ዘይት እና የውጤት አካባቢ ቋንቋ ትውልድ ለማግኘት ቀላል እና አካባቢ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ይህ ስልጣን በተለያዩ ፕሮግራሞች፣ እና በተማካሪዎቹ ስርዓቶች፣ በተለየ ቋንቋ ማፍሰስ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የነጥብ ትውልድ ፕሮጀክቱን በማስተካከል ቀላል መሆኑን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እውነተኛ ሞዴል እና የተመረጠውን ምሳሌ በሚያሳየው የክድድ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ እና ትውልድ ፕሮጀክቱን በተለያዩ ቋንቋ የደረጃ ግንኙነት ወይም የጉዳይ ግንኙነት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሰው ውጤቶች ውጤቶች በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓታችን በተቃዋሚ ስርዓቶች ውስጥ ውጤትን አዋራጅ ሳይሰፍር ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz nöral kodlayıcı dil nəzəriyyətinə təsirlənmək üçün basit və fleksib təhsil və kodlama metodlarını təklif edirik. Bu qabiliyyət müxtəlif uyğulamalarda, danışma sistemləri də dahil olmaqla, müvəffəqiyyətli ajanların dili müəyyən bir şəkildə ürəkləməsi və insan puppetçisi və ya dış bilgi ilə dəstəklənməsi üçün cavab vermələri yaratması lazımdır. Biz nöral nəsil prosesini empirik olaraq daha asanlaşdırırıq: sadiqlik modeli və seçici nümunələr çəkməsinə dayanan bir dekoding metodu. Biz də təhsil və nümunə alma algoritmini təsdiqləyirik ki, nəsil prosesini müəyyən dil şəkilində müəyyən edir, ya da məsələnin müəyyən edilməsini təsdiqləyir. İnsan değerlendirməsi sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz metodlarımız danışma işlərində çıxış qiymətini əskiltmədən istifadə edə bilər.', 'hy': "Մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ և ճկուն ուսումնասիրություն և կոդավորում միջոցներ, որոնք ազդում են արտադրման ոճի և թեմայի վրա նյարդային կոդավորման-կոդավորման հիմնված լեզվի ստեղծում: Այս ունակությունը ցանկալի է տարբեր ծրագրերում, ներառյալ հաղորդակցման համակարգերում, որտեղ հաջողակ գործիչները պետք է ստեղծեն լեզու որոշակի ոճով և ստեղծեն պատասխաններ, որոնք ղեկավարվում են մարդկային մանուկների կամ արտաքին գիտելիքների կողմից: Մենք բաժանում ենք նյարդային սերունդը էմպիրիկապես ավելի հեշտ ենթախնդիրների' հավատարմության մոդելի և ընտրական նմուշների ընդունման հիմնված բաժանելու մեթոդի: Մենք նաև նկարագրում ենք ուսուցման և նմուշների ընդունման ալգորիթմներ, որոնք կողմնականում են ստեղծման գործընթացը հատուկ լեզվի ոճի սահմանափակումներով կամ թեմային սահմանափակումներով: Մարդկային գնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մեթոդները կարողանում են սահմանափակել ոճը և թեման առանց ներքևի որակը կործանցելու հաղորդակցման խնդիրներում:", 'bs': 'Predlažemo jednostavne i fleksibilne metode obuke i dekodiranja za utjecanje na izlazni stil i temu u generaciji jezika na osnovu neuralnog kodera. Ova sposobnost je poželjna u raznim aplikacijama, uključujući razgovorne sisteme, gdje uspješni agenti moraju proizvoditi jezik u određenom stilu i stvarati odgovore koje vodi ljudski lutkić ili vanjski znanje. Rasporedimo proces neuralne generacije u empirički lakše podprobleme: model vjernosti i metod dekodiranja baziran na selektivnom uzorku. Također opisujemo algoritme obuke i uzoraka koji predrasude proces generacije sa određenim ograničenjem jezičkog stila ili ograničenjem teme. Rezultati procjene ljudske procjene pokazuju da su naši predloženi metodi u stanju ograničiti stil i temu bez smanjenja kvalitete izlaganja u razgovornim zadacima.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme jednoduché a flexibilní metody školení a dekódování pro ovlivňování výstupního stylu a tématu při generování jazyků založených na neuronovém kodéru a dekódování. Tato schopnost je žádoucí v různých aplikacích, včetně konverzačních systémů, kde úspěšní agenti musí produkovat jazyk v určitém stylu a generovat reakce řízené lidským loutkářem nebo vnějšími znalostmi. Proces nervové generace rozložíme na empiricky jednodušší subproblémy: model věrnosti a dekódovací metodu založenou na selektivním vzorkování. Dále popisujeme algoritmy školení a vzorkování, které předmětují proces generace specifickým omezením jazykového stylu nebo omezením tématu. Výsledky lidského hodnocení ukazují, že naše navrhované metody jsou schopny omezit styl a téma bez zhoršení kvality výstupu v konverzačních úkolech.', 'ca': "Proposem mètodes de formació i decodificació simples i flexibles per influenciar l'estil i el tema de la producció en la generació de llenguatges basats en el decodificador neural. Aquesta capacitat és desitjable en diverses aplicacions, incloent els sistemes de conversació, on els agents exitosos han de produir llenguatge d'un estil específic i generar respostes dirigides per un marionet humà o coneixement extern. Descomprim el procés de generació neuronal en subproblemes empíricament més fàcils: un model de fidelitat i un mètode de decodificació basat en la mostra selectiva. També descrivim algoritmes d'entrenament i mostratge que desorientan el procés de generació amb una restricció específica d'estil lingüístic, o una restricció temàtica. Els resultats de l'evaluació humana mostren que els nostres mètodes proposats són capaços de limitar l'estil i el tema sense degradar la qualitat de la producció en tasques conversacionals.", 'et': 'Pakume välja lihtsaid ja paindlikke koolitus- ja dekodeerimismeetodeid, et mõjutada väljundstiili ja teemat neurokodeeri-dekoodri põhises keele genereerimises. See võime on soovitav mitmesugustes rakendustes, sealhulgas vestlussüsteemides, kus edukad agendid peavad tootma keelt konkreetses stiilis ja genereerima vastuseid, mida juhib inimnukupoiss või välisteadmised. Me lagundame närvigeneratsiooni protsessi empiiriliselt lihtsamaks alamprobleemiks: truudusmudeliks ja dekodeerimismeetodiks, mis põhineb selektiivsel proovivõtul. Samuti kirjeldame koolitus- ja proovivõtualgoritme, mis suunavad genereerimisprotsessi konkreetse keelestiili piiranguga või teemapiiranguga. Inimeste hindamise tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud meetodid suudavad piirata stiili ja teemat, halvendamata väljundi kvaliteeti vestlusülesannetes.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme yksinkertaisia ja joustavia koulutus- ja dekoodaamismenetelmiä, joilla vaikutetaan tulostustyyliin ja aiheeseen neurokooderi-dekooderipohjaisessa kielen tuottamisessa. Tämä kyky on toivottavaa erilaisissa sovelluksissa, mukaan lukien keskustelujärjestelmissä, joissa onnistuneiden agenttien on tuotettava kieltä tietyllä tyylillä ja tuotettava vastauksia ihmisnukketaiteilijan tai ulkoisen tiedon ohjaamana. Hajotamme hermogeneraatioprosessin empiirisesti helpommiksi aliongelmiksi: uskollisuusmalliksi ja selektiiviseen näytteenottoon perustuvaksi dekoodamenetelmäksi. Kuvaamme myös koulutus- ja näytteenottoalgoritmeja, jotka kohdistavat generointiprosessin tiettyyn kielityylirajoitukseen tai aiherajoitukseen. Ihmisarvioinnin tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetut menetelmät pystyvät rajoittamaan tyyliä ja aihetta heikentämättä tuotoksen laatua keskustelutehtävissä.', 'bn': 'আমরা নিউরেল কোডার-ডেকোডার ভিত্তিক ভাষার প্রজন্মে আউটপুট স্টাইল এবং বিষয়টিকে প্রভাবিত করার জন্য সহজ এবং flexible প্রশিক্ষণ এবং ক এই ক্ষমতা বিভিন্ন ধরনের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের মধ্যে প্রয়োজন, যার মধ্যে কথোপকথন ব্যবস্থা রয়েছে, যেখানে সফল এজেন্টের একটি নির্দিষ্ট ধরনে ভাষা তৈরি করতে হবে এবং ম আমরা নিউরেল প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়াকে সহজে সাব-সমস্যার সাথে কমিয়ে দিয়েছি: বিশ্বাসের মডেল এবং নির্বাচিত নমুনা ভিত্তিক একটি ডিকোডিং  আমরা প্রশিক্ষণ এবং উদাহরণের উদাহরণ বর্ণনা করি যা প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়াকে নির্দিষ্ট ভাষা শৈল্পিক সীমা দিয়ে বা বিষয়বস্তু নি মানুষের মুল্যায়নের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিগুলো কথোপকথনালীন কাজে আউটপুটের মান লাঞ্ছিত করা ছাড়', 'af': "Ons voorstel eenvoudige en fleksibele onderwerp en dekodering metodes vir influensie van uitset styl en onderwerp in neurale enkoder-dekoder gebaseerde taal generasie. Hierdie kapasiteit is desibaar in 'n verskillende aansoek, insluitend gesprekslysstelsels, waar suksesvolle agente nodig om taal in 'n spesifieke styl te produseer en reaksies wat deur 'n menslike puppeteer of eksterne kennis gestuur word. Ons dekomponeneer die neurale generasie proses in empiriese makliker subprobleme:  'n getrouheid model en 'n dekoderingmetode gebaseer op selektiewe- sampling. Ons beskryf ook onderwerp en opkyk algoritme wat die generasie proses met 'n spesifieke taal styl beperking, of 'n onderwerp beperking. Die menslike evalueringsresultate vertoon dat ons voorgestelde metodes kan beperk styl en onderwerp sonder om uitvoer kwaliteit in omskakelingstaak te verdra.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem lan ngawehi aceh lan ngawehi aceh lan ngawehi kuwi nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan lan tema kang ajeng-ajeng seneng koder-decoder. Kapan nggawe iki wis deweke nggo ngerasakno akeh aplikasi, gambar sistem conversation, ing ngupakan anyar kang ajah sing kudu nggawe alih sing kudu nggawe jeneng kesempatan lan ngelawak dhéwé ngerasakno sing nguasakno karo pak-pak sing nguasakno uwong. Genjer Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan kelas karo sampeyan Algorithm sing paling nggawe ngubah winih kanggo nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kelas urip, or a nggawe tema. Wujaring pancene uwong ngomong nik nggawe Perintah sing paling nggawe Tiilet lan tema sing bisa nggawe barang urip kuwi nggawe kaliwat urip nggawe gerarané', 'he': 'אנו מציעים שיטות אימונים פשוטות ומגמישות לפענוח על סגנון יציאה ונושא בדור שפת מבוסס על קוד-קוד עצבי. היכולת הזו רצויה במגוון של שימושים, כולל מערכות שיחה, שבו סוכנים מוצלחים צריכים ליצור שפה בסגנון מסוים ולייצר תגובות מונחות על ידי בובה אנושית או ידע חיצוני. אנחנו מפרקים את תהליך הדור העצבי לתי-בעיות קלות יותר אמפירית: דוגמא נאמנות ושיטת פיתוח מבוססת על דגימות סלקטיביות. We also describe training and sampling algorithms that bias the generation process with a specific language style restriction, or a topic restriction.  תוצאות הערכה אנושית מראות שהשיטות המוצעות שלנו מסוגלות להגביר סגנון ונושא בלי להפיל איכות יציאה במשימות שיחה.', 'ha': "Tuna goyya da shiryarwa mai sauƙi da mai lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka na fitarwa da madaidaita cikin danne-zane-kode-danne cikin neural. Wannan abinci na da ƙayyade a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka dabam-daban, kamar wasu shiryoyin ayuka da ke haɗuwa, a wurin da masu cin nasara ma'abũcin su zata lugha cikin wata salo na ƙayyade kuma ya ƙãga matsayi wanda aka yi tafiyar da wani umarni ko wani ilmi na ƙarfe. Tuna kandamtar da jarrabar kizayen neural zuwa masu sauƙi da masu ƙara masu sauƙi: misãlin gaskiyar da gaskiyar da metode kodi a kan misãlai masu shiryuwa. Tuna bayyana wa zaman shawarar da misalin algoritori, wanda ke samura da jarrabar kizazi da wani tsarin cikin harshe na ƙayyade, ko kuma wani tsarin maɓalli. Sura'arin kimar mutum na nuna cewa metoden da ake buɗe wa za'a iya ƙayyade salon da madaidaici ba idan an kunyatar da tsarin Outputi a cikin aikin da za'a yin magana.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo preproste in fleksibilne metode usposabljanja in dekodiranja za vplivanje na izhodni slog in temo pri generiranju jezika na podlagi nevronskih kodirnikov-dekodirnikov. Ta zmogljivost je zaželena v različnih aplikacijah, vključno s pogovornimi sistemi, kjer morajo uspešni agenti ustvarjati jezik v določenem slogu in ustvariti odzive, ki jih vodi človeški lutkar ali zunanje znanje. Proces nevronske generacije razgradimo v empirično lažje podprobleme: model zvestobe in metodo dekodiranja, ki temelji na selektivnem vzorčenju. Opisujemo tudi algoritme usposabljanja in vzorčenja, ki pristranski proces generacije z določeno omejitvijo sloga jezika ali tematsko omejitvijo. Rezultati ocenjevanja ljudi kažejo, da so naše predlagane metode sposobne omejiti slog in temo brez poslabšanja kakovosti izhoda v pogovornih nalogah.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་དང་གནོད་འགྱུར་ཅན་གྱི་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇགས་དང་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འཇུག་སྤྱོད་འདི་ནི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ལས་གཏམ་གླེང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ནང་དུ་མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་དོན་རིགས་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག We decompose the neural generation process into empirically easier sub-problems: a faithfulness model and a decoding method based on selective-sampling. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་སྐད་ཡིག་བཟོ་བའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་Algorithms་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མིག་གི་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལྡན་བྱས་པར་ཉེན་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བ་དེ་རྣམས་བཟོས'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Learning for Neural Dialogue Generation', 'ar': 'التعلم العدائي لجيل الحوار العصبي', 'es': 'Aprendizaje contradictorio para la generación de diálogo neuronal', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Adversarial para Geração de Diálogo Neural', 'fr': "Apprentissage contradictoire pour la génération d'un dialogue", 'ja': 'ニューラル・ダイアログ生成のための対位法的学習', 'zh': '以神经言生者对抗性学', 'ru': 'Состязательное обучение для генерации нейронного диалога', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका संवाद पीढ़ी के लिए प्रतिकूल सीखना', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Sáraíochta do Ghiniúint Agallaimh Néaraigh', 'hu': 'Adversary Learning for Neural Dialogue Generation', 'kk': 'Невралдық диалогты құру үшін белсенді оқыту', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas mokymasis neurologinio dialogo kūrimui', 'mk': 'Adversarial Learning for Neural Dialogue Generation', 'it': 'Apprendimento avverso per la generazione del dialogo neurale', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური დიალოგის შექმნა კონპერსალიური სწავლება', 'el': 'Αντίθετα μάθηση για τη δημιουργία νευρωνικού διαλόγου', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Berlawan untuk Jenerasi Dialog Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന പഠനം', 'no': 'Rekursarial læring for generering av neiraldialogen', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл диалогын төлөөлөх сэтгэл зүйн суралцах', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Adversarju għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu Newrali', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදය නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ සිහිනය', 'sr': 'Adversarialno učenje za generaciju neuronskog dijaloga', 'pl': 'Uczenie się przeciwne dla generowania dialogu neuronowego', 'ro': 'Învățarea adversă pentru generarea dialogului neural', 'sv': 'Adversarial Learning for Neural Dialogue Generation', 'ta': 'புதிய உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்திற்கான முன்னிருப்பு படிப்பு', 'so': 'Adversarial Learning for Neural Dialogue Generation', 'ur': 'نئورل ڈیلوگ پیدا کرنے کے لئے مخالف سیکھنے', 'vi': 'Học làm gương cho Thế hệ giao tiếp thần kinh', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Bijwerkend leren voor het genereren van neurale dialoog', 'da': 'Adversarial Learning for Neural Dialogue Generation', 'bg': 'Неблагоприятно обучение за генериране на неврален диалог', 'hr': 'Adversarialno učenje za generaciju neuronskog dijaloga', 'de': 'Adversariales Lernen für die Generierung neuronaler Dialoge', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Adversarial untuk Generasi Dialog Neural', 'ko': '신경 대화 생성에 사용되는 대항식 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری مخالف برای تولید محاوره عصبی', 'sw': 'Kufundisha Zaidi kwa Uzalishaji wa Dialogu ya Njerumani', 'tr': 'Neural dialogy döredişi üçin öwrenmek', 'af': 'Rekursariale leer vir neurale dialoog genereering', 'hy': 'Նյարդային դասախոսության ստեղծման հակառակ սովորելը', 'bn': 'নিউরাল ডায়ালগ জেনারেশনের জন্য পূর্ববর্তী শিক্ষা', 'az': 'N칬ral Dialoog 칖nvan캼 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'ca': 'Aprendiment adversari per a la generació de diàleg neuronal', 'sq': 'Mësimi kundërshtar për Gjenerimin e Dialogut Neural', 'cs': 'Nepříznivé učení pro generování nervového dialogu', 'et': 'Neuraalse dialoogi loomise kõrvalõpetamine', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'fi': 'Haitallinen oppiminen hermodialogin luomiseksi', 'bs': 'Adversarialno učenje za generaciju neuronskog dijaloga', 'he': 'לימוד נוגדי ליצירת דיאלוג נוירולי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Advertary Learning for Neral Dialog Generation', 'bo': 'Neural Dialog Generation པར་སྐྱོན་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ལ་བསླབ་པའི་སྒྲུང་གཏོང', 'sk': 'Neželeno učenje za ustvarjanje živčnega dialoga'}
{'en': 'We apply adversarial training to open-domain dialogue generation, training a system to produce sequences that are indistinguishable from human-generated dialogue utterances. We cast the task as a reinforcement learning problem where we jointly train two systems : a generative model to produce response sequences, and a discriminatoranalagous to the human evaluator in the Turing test to distinguish between the human-generated dialogues and the machine-generated ones. In this generative adversarial network approach, the outputs from the discriminator are used to encourage the system towards more human-like dialogue. Further, we investigate models for adversarial evaluation that uses success in fooling an adversary as a dialogue evaluation metric, while avoiding a number of potential pitfalls. Experimental results on several metrics, including adversarial evaluation, demonstrate that the adversarially-trained system generates higher-quality responses than previous baselines', 'ar': 'نحن نطبق التدريب العدائي لتوليد حوار المجال المفتوح ، وتدريب نظام لإنتاج تسلسلات لا يمكن تمييزها عن أقوال الحوار التي يولدها الإنسان. لقد صنفنا المهمة على أنها مشكلة تعلم معزز حيث نقوم بتدريب نظامين مشتركين: نموذج توليدي لإنتاج تسلسلات استجابة ، ومميز - مشابه للمقيم البشري في اختبار تورينج - للتمييز بين الحوارات التي يولدها الإنسان والآلة- ولدت منها. في هذا النهج التوليدي لشبكة الخصومة ، تُستخدم مخرجات أداة التمييز لتشجيع النظام نحو حوار أكثر شبهاً بالبشر. علاوة على ذلك ، نحن نحقق في نماذج تقييم الخصومة التي تستخدم النجاح في خداع الخصم كمقياس لتقييم الحوار ، مع تجنب عدد من المزالق المحتملة. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على العديد من المقاييس ، بما في ذلك التقييم العدائي ، أن النظام المدرب بالخصوم يولد استجابات عالية الجودة مقارنة بخطوط الأساس السابقة', 'fr': "Nous appliquons la formation contradictoire à la génération de dialogues dans un domaine ouvert, en formant un système à produire des séquences qui ne se distinguent pas des énoncés de dialogue générés par l'homme. Nous présentons la tâche comme un problème d'apprentissage par renforcement dans lequel nous entraînons conjointement deux systèmes\xa0: un modèle génératif pour produire des séquences de réponse et un discriminateur — analogue à l'évaluateur humain dans le test de Turing — pour distinguer les dialogues générés par l'homme des dialogues générés par la machine. Dans cette approche générative de réseau contradictoire, les résultats du discriminateur sont utilisés pour encourager le système vers un dialogue plus humain. En outre, nous étudions des modèles d'évaluation contradictoire qui utilisent le succès en trompant un adversaire comme mesure d'évaluation du dialogue, tout en évitant un certain nombre d'écueils potentiels. Les résultats expérimentaux sur plusieurs mesures, y compris l'évaluation contradictoire, démontrent que le système entraîné par l'adversaire génère des réponses de meilleure qualité que les niveaux de référence précédents", 'pt': 'Aplicamos o treinamento adversário à geração de diálogo de domínio aberto, treinando um sistema para produzir sequências que são indistinguíveis de enunciados de diálogo gerados por humanos. Lançamos a tarefa como um problema de aprendizado por reforço onde treinamos em conjunto dois sistemas: um modelo generativo para produzir sequências de resposta e um discriminador - análogo ao avaliador humano no teste de Turing - para distinguir entre os diálogos gerados por humanos e os diálogos de máquina. os gerados. Nesta abordagem de rede adversarial generativa, as saídas do discriminador são usadas para encorajar o sistema a um diálogo mais humano. Além disso, investigamos modelos de avaliação de adversários que usam o sucesso em enganar um adversário como uma métrica de avaliação de diálogo, evitando várias armadilhas em potencial. Resultados experimentais em várias métricas, incluindo avaliação de adversários, demonstram que o sistema treinado por adversários gera respostas de maior qualidade do que as linhas de base anteriores', 'es': 'Aplicamos el entrenamiento contradictorio a la generación de diálogos de dominio abierto, entrenando un sistema para producir secuencias que son indistinguibles de las declaraciones de diálogo generadas por el hombre. Presentamos la tarea como un problema de aprendizaje por refuerzo en el que entrenamos conjuntamente dos sistemas: un modelo generativo para producir secuencias de respuesta y un discriminador —análogo al evaluador humano en la prueba de Turing— para distinguir entre los diálogos generados por el hombre y los generados por la máquina. En este enfoque generativo de redes de confrontación, los resultados del discriminador se utilizan para alentar al sistema hacia un diálogo más humano. Además, investigamos modelos de evaluación contradictoria que utilizan el éxito en engañar a un adversario como una métrica de evaluación del diálogo, evitando al mismo tiempo una serie de posibles escollos. Los resultados experimentales de varias métricas, incluida la evaluación contradictoria, demuestran que el sistema entrenado para adversarios genera respuestas de mayor calidad que las líneas de base anteriores', 'hi': 'हम ओपन-डोमेन संवाद पीढ़ी के लिए प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण लागू करते हैं, एक प्रणाली को उन अनुक्रमों का उत्पादन करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित करते हैं जो मानव-जनित संवाद कथनों से अलग नहीं हैं। हमने कार्य को एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने की समस्या के रूप में कास्ट किया जहां हम संयुक्त रूप से दो प्रणालियों को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं: प्रतिक्रिया अनुक्रमों का उत्पादन करने के लिए एक उत्पादक मॉडल, और ट्यूरिंग परीक्षण में मानव मूल्यांकनकर्ता के लिए एक भेदभावपूर्ण-एनालॉगस- मानव-जनित संवादों और मशीन-जनित लोगों के बीच अंतर करने के लिए। इस उत्पादक प्रतिकूल नेटवर्क दृष्टिकोण में, भेदभावपूर्ण से आउटपुट का उपयोग सिस्टम को अधिक मानव-जैसे संवाद की ओर प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, हम प्रतिकूल मूल्यांकन के लिए मॉडल की जांच करते हैं जो एक विरोधी को संवाद मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक के रूप में मूर्ख बनाने में सफलता का उपयोग करता है, जबकि कई संभावित नुकसानों से बचा जाता है। प्रतिकूल मूल्यांकन सहित कई मैट्रिक्स पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम, यह दर्शाते हैं कि प्रतिकूल रूप से प्रशिक्षित प्रणाली पिछले बेसलाइन की तुलना में उच्च गुणवत्ता वाली प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करती है', 'ja': '対抗訓練をオープンドメインの対話生成に適用し、人間が生成した対話発話と区別のつかないシーケンスを生成するためのシステムを訓練します。私たちは、応答シーケンスを生成するための生成モデルと、人間が生成した対話と機械が生成した対話を区別するためのチューリングテストでの人間評価者に類似した判別者の2つのシステムを共同で訓練する強化学習問題として課題を投げかけた。この生成的対立ネットワークアプローチでは、識別子からの出力は、システムをより人間のような対話に向かうように奨励するために使用されます。さらに、いくつかの潜在的な落とし穴を避けながら、対話評価指標として敵を騙すことに成功したことを利用した対立評価のモデルを調査します。対立評価を含むいくつかの指標に関する実験結果は、対立訓練されたシステムが以前のベースラインよりも質の高い応答を生成することを示している', 'zh': '吾将对抗性教于开域之对,训统以成人之语,无以别其序。 共练二统:一生应序,一鉴别器(图灵试与人评估器相似)以别生成之对,与机器生对。 此生抗网络法,鉴别器输劝人对。 此外考对抗性评模,当以成功愚敌为对指标,兼免多陷阱。 凡对抗性估在内数指标之实验结果表明,抗训练之统,高于前基线。', 'ru': 'Мы применяем состязательную подготовку к генерации диалога в открытых доменах, обучая систему для создания последовательностей, которые неотличимы от человеческих диалоговых высказываний. Мы поставили задачу как задачу обучения подкреплению, где мы совместно обучаем две системы: генеративную модель для получения последовательностей отклика и дискриминатор-аналитик для человека-оценщика в тесте Тьюринга, чтобы отличить человеческий диалог от машинного. В этом генеративном состязательном сетевом подходе результаты от дискриминатора используются для поощрения системы к более человеческому диалогу. Кроме того, мы исследуем модели состязательной оценки, которые используют успех в обмане противника в качестве показателя оценки диалога, избегая при этом ряда потенциальных ловушек. Экспериментальные результаты по нескольким показателям, включая соперническую оценку, показывают, что обученная соперниками система генерирует ответы более высокого качества, чем предыдущие исходные данные', 'ga': 'Cuirimid oiliúint sháraíochta i bhfeidhm ar ghiniúint idirphlé fearainn oscailte, ag traenáil córas chun seichimh a tháirgeadh nach féidir a aithint ó chainteanna comhphlé a ghintear ag an duine. Chuireamar an tasc mar fhadhb foghlama atreisithe ina ndéanaimid comhthraenáil ar dhá chóras: samhail ghiniúna chun seichimh freagartha a tháirgeadh, agus idirdhealaitheoir — ar aon dul leis an meastóir daonna i dtástáil Turing — chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir na hidirphlé a ghintear leis an duine agus an meaisín- cinn ginte. Sa chur chuige líonra sáraíochta giniúna seo, úsáidtear aschuir an idirdhealaitheora chun an córas a spreagadh i dtreo idirphlé atá cosúil le daoine. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar mhúnlaí le haghaidh meastóireachta sáraíochta a úsáideann rath chun namhaid a mhealladh mar mhéadrach meastóireachta idirphlé, agus ag seachaint roinnt gaistí féideartha. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar roinnt méadracht, lena n-áirítear meastóireacht sáraíochta, go ngineann an córas atá oilte ar shár-oiliúint freagraí ar chaighdeán níos airde ná na bunlínte roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულ განსწავლებას დიალოგის განვითარებისთვის გამოყენებთ, სისტემის განსწავლებას, რომელიც ადამიანის განვითარებული დიალოგის გამოსაკუთრებისთვის შემდეგ შე ჩვენ დავწერეთ საქმე როგორც სწავლების პრობლემა, სადაც ჩვენ ერთად ორი სისტემების შემწავლობით: გენერაციური მოდელი განახლების შემწავლობისთვის, და დისკრიმინატორი ანალოგიური ადამიანის განსაზღვრებისთვის რუინგის ტეს დისკრიმინატორიდან გამოიყენება სისტემის უფრო მეტი ადამიანის განსხვავებული დიალოგიდან. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ მოდელები, რომლებიც გამოყენებს წარმატებით, რომლებიც დიალოგის გავაკეთება მეტრიკის გავაკეთებაში, რომლებიც გამოყენება რამდენიმე პოცენტალური გა ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი მეტრიკაში, როგორც ნექსპერიალური განსაზღვრება, აჩვენებს, რომ ნექსპერიალურად განსაზღვრებული სისტემა უფრო მეტრიკალური განსახულებები', 'el': 'Εφαρμόζουμε την αντίπαλη εκπαίδευση στη δημιουργία διαλόγου ανοιχτού χώρου, εκπαιδεύοντας ένα σύστημα για την παραγωγή ακολουθιών που δεν διακρίνονται από τις ομιλίες διαλόγου που δημιουργούνται από τον άνθρωπο. Θέτουμε το έργο ως ένα πρόβλημα ενίσχυσης μάθησης όπου εκπαιδεύουμε από κοινού δύο συστήματα: ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο για την παραγωγή ακολουθιών απόκρισης, και ένα διακριτικό-αναλογο για τον ανθρώπινο αξιολογητή στο τεστ Τούρινγκ- για να διακρίνουμε μεταξύ των διαλόγων που παράγονται από τον άνθρωπο και των διαλόγων που παράγονται από τη μηχανή. Σε αυτή την προσέγγιση του παραγωγικού αντικρουόμενου δικτύου, τα αποτελέσματα του ατόμου που κάνει διακρίσεις χρησιμοποιούνται για να ενθαρρύνουν το σύστημα προς έναν περισσότερο ανθρώπινο διάλογο. Περαιτέρω, διερευνούμε μοντέλα για την αντικρουστική αξιολόγηση που χρησιμοποιεί την επιτυχία στην εξαπάτηση ενός αντιπάλου ως μετρική αξιολόγησης διαλόγου, αποφεύγοντας παράλληλα μια σειρά πιθανών παγίδων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε διάφορες μετρήσεις, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αντιπαραβαλλόμενης αξιολόγησης, καταδεικνύουν ότι το αντίπαλα εκπαιδευμένο σύστημα παράγει απαντήσεις υψηλότερης ποιότητας από τις προηγούμενες γραμμές βάσης', 'hu': 'Ellenséges képzést alkalmazunk a nyílt területű párbeszéd generálására, olyan rendszert képzünk, amely olyan szekvenciákat hoz létre, amelyek megkülönböztethetetlenek az ember által generált párbeszéd kimondásoktól. A feladatot erősítő tanulási problémának tekintjük, ahol közösen két rendszert képzünk: egy generációs modellt a válaszszekvenciák előállítására, és egy diszkriminátort – analágot az emberi értékelő számára a Turing tesztben – az ember által generált párbeszédek és a gép által generált párbeszédek között. Ebben a generációs ellentétes hálózati megközelítésben a diszkriminatív eredményeit arra használják, hogy ösztönözzék a rendszert az emberiszerűbb párbeszédre. Továbbá olyan ellenfél-értékelési modelleket vizsgálunk, amelyek párbeszédértékelési metriaként használják az ellenfél sikerét, miközben elkerülik számos potenciális buktatót. Több mutatóval kapcsolatos kísérleti eredmények, beleértve az ellenséges értékelést is, azt mutatják, hogy az ellenséges képzésű rendszer magasabb minőségű válaszokat generál, mint a korábbi alapkövetelmények', 'lt': 'We apply adversarial training to open-domain dialogue generation, training a system to produce sequences that are indistinguishable from human-generated dialogue utterances.  Mes atliekame užduotį kaip stiprinimo mokymosi problem a, kai kartu rengiame dvi sistemas: kartos model į reagavimo sekoms gaminti, ir diskriminatorių-analogišką žmogaus vertintojui Turing bandyme- skirtumą tarp žmogaus sukeltų dialogų ir mechanizmų sukeltų dialogų. Šiame kartiniame prieštaringo tinklo požiūryje diskriminatoriaus rezultatai naudojami skatinant sistemą plėtoti panašų į žmogų dialogą. Be to, mes tiriame prieštaringo vertinimo modelius, kurie naudoja sėkmingą priešiško apgaulėjimą kaip dialogo vertinimo metriją ir kartu vengia tam tikrų galimų trūkumų. Kelių metrinių rodiklių eksperimentiniai rezultatai, įskaitant prieštaringą vertinimą, rodo, kad prieštaringai apmokyta sistema sukuria aukštesnės kokybės atsakus nei ankstesni baziniai rodikliai.', 'it': "Applichiamo la formazione avversaria alla generazione di dialogo a dominio aperto, addestrando un sistema per produrre sequenze indistinguibili dalle espressioni di dialogo generate dall'uomo. Abbiamo lanciato il compito come un problema di apprendimento di rinforzo in cui formiamo congiuntamente due sistemi: un modello generativo per produrre sequenze di risposta, e un discriminatore – analogo al valutatore umano nel test Turing – per distinguere tra i dialoghi generati dall'uomo e quelli generati dalla macchina. In questo approccio generativo di rete avversaria, i risultati del discriminatore sono utilizzati per incoraggiare il sistema verso un dialogo più umano. Inoltre, esaminiamo modelli di valutazione avversaria che utilizzano il successo nell'ingannare un avversario come metrica di valutazione del dialogo, evitando una serie di potenziali insidie. I risultati sperimentali su diverse metriche, compresa la valutazione avversaria, dimostrano che il sistema addestrato in maniera avversaria genera risposte di qualità superiore rispetto alle precedenti linee di riferimento", 'mk': 'Ние аплицираме противна обука на генерација на дијалог на отворен домен, обука на систем за производство на секвенции кои се неразликувачки од изразите на дијалог генерирани од човекот. Ја ставаме задачата како проблем на зајакнување на учењето каде заедно обучуваме два системи: генеративен модел за производство на секвенци на одговор, и дискриминатор-аналагус за човечкиот евалуатор во тестот Туринг- за разлика помеѓу дијалозите генерирани од човекот и оние генерирани од ма Во овој генерационален пристап на непријателската мрежа, излезите од дискриминаторот се користат за да го охрабрат системот кон почовечки дијалог. Покрај тоа, истражуваме модели за противничка проценка кои користат успех во лажењето на противникот како метрика за проценка на дијалогот, истовремено избегнувајќи голем број потенцијални падови. Експерименталните резултати на неколку метрики, вклучително и противната евалуација, покажуваат дека противно обучениот систем генерира повисоки квалитетни одговори од претходните бази', 'kk': 'Біз доменді ашу диалогын құру үшін қарсы оқыту, адамдардың құрылған диалог сөздерінен қарсы оқыту үшін жүйесін оқыту үшін. Біз тапсырманы екі жүйелерді біріктіріп оқыту мәселесі ретінде күшейту мәселесі ретінде жібердік: жауап реттеулерін жасау үшін генеративті модель, Туринг сынақтағы адам бағалаушысының аналогиясы - адам құрылған диалогтар мен машина қ Бұл жалпы қарсы желінде дискриминатордың шығысы жүйені адамдардың сәйкес диалогына көмектесу үшін қолданылады. Келесіден қарсы оқу үлгілерін зерттеп, қарсы диалогты бағалау метрикалық ретінде сәтті қолданатын қарсы оқу үлгілерін зерттеп, бірнеше мүмкіндік көпшіліктерді шешуге болады. Бірнеше метрикалық эксперименталдық нәтижелері, негатриялық оқиғаны қоса, негатриялық оқылған жүйенің алдыңғы негатриялық сызықтардан артық сапатты жауаптарды жасайды', 'ms': 'Kami melaksanakan latihan lawan untuk generasi dialog domain terbuka, melatih sistem untuk menghasilkan urutan yang tidak dapat dikenali dari ungkapan dialog yang dihasilkan oleh manusia. Kami melemparkan tugas sebagai masalah pembelajaran kuasa di mana kita bersama-sama melatih dua sistem: model generatif untuk menghasilkan urutan balas, dan diskriminator-analagous kepada penilai manusia dalam ujian Turing- untuk membezakan antara dialog yang dihasilkan oleh manusia dan dialog yang dihasilkan oleh mesin. Dalam pendekatan rangkaian musuh generatif ini, output dari diskriminator digunakan untuk mendorong sistem ke dialog yang lebih seperti manusia. Selain itu, kami menyelidiki model untuk penilaian musuh yang menggunakan kejayaan dalam menipu musuh sebagai metrik penilaian dialog, sementara mengelakkan sejumlah tekanan potensi. Keputusan eksperimental pada beberapa metrik, termasuk penilaian musuh, menunjukkan bahawa sistem dilatih musuh menghasilkan balasan kualiti lebih tinggi daripada garis dasar sebelumnya', 'mn': 'Бид эсрэг сургалтыг нээлттэй диалог үеийн төлөө ашиглаж, хүн төрөлхтний диалог өгүүлбэрээс хамаарахгүй дарааллыг бүтээх системийг сургалтын тулд ашиглаж байна. Бид үүнийг хоёр системийг хамтдаа хөгжүүлэх суралцах асуудал болгосон: хариу үйлдлийн дарааллыг бүтээх үйлдлийн загвар, Турингийн тест дахь хүн төрөлхтний шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны хувьд хүн төрөлхтний диалог болон машин бү Энэ бүтээлч эсрэг сүлжээний арга хэлбэрээр хуваарилагчдын үр дүн нь системийг илүү хүн төрөлхтний диалог руу дэмжихийн тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Дараа нь, бид эсрэг тооцоололтын загварыг судалж, эсрэг хүнийг диалогын тооцоололтын метрик болгон амжилтыг ашиглаж, олон тооцоололтыг алдах боломжтой. Өмнөх хэмжээний метрийн туршилтын үр дүнг, эсрэг дүгнэлт, эсрэг дасгал сургалтын систем өмнөх суурь шулуунаас илүү өндөр чанартай хариултыг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'We apply adversarial training to open-domain dialogue generation, training a system to produce sequences that are indistinguishable from human-generated dialogue utterances.  നമ്മള്\u200d ജോലിയെ ശക്തിപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള പ്രശ്നമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒന്നിച്ച് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഉത്തരം സംവിധാനം ഉണ്ടാക് ഈ ജനറലീവ് വിരോധമായ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d, വിവേചകനില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പുറത്തുകള്\u200d മാറ്റാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതി അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d വിരോധമായ വിലയ്ക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. വിജയത്തിന് വിജയം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് വിന്യാജ പല മെറ്റിക്കങ്ങളുടെയും പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങളില്\u200d, വിരോധമായ വിലാസപ്രകാരം ചേര്\u200dത്താല്\u200d, എതിരാളിയായ പരിശീലന സിസ്റ്റം മുമ്പുള്ള ബെസ്', 'ro': 'Aplicăm instruire adversară generarii dialogului pe domeniu deschis, instruim un sistem pentru a produce secvențe care nu pot fi diferențiate de declarațiile dialogului generate de om. Am tras sarcina ca o problemă de învățare de armare în care pregătim împreună două sisteme: un model generativ pentru a produce secvențe de răspuns și un discriminator – analog evaluatorului uman în testul Turing – pentru a distinge între dialogurile generate de om și cele generate de mașină. În această abordare generativă a rețelei adversare, rezultatele discriminatorului sunt folosite pentru a încuraja sistemul către un dialog mai uman. Mai mult, investigăm modele de evaluare adversară care utilizează succesul în păcăleala unui adversar ca metrică de evaluare a dialogului, evitând în același timp o serie de potențiale capcane. Rezultatele experimentale privind mai multe măsurători, inclusiv evaluarea adversară, demonstrează că sistemul instruit adversar generează răspunsuri de calitate superioară decât valorile de referință anterioare', 'mt': 'We apply adversarial training to open-domain dialogue generation, training a system to produce sequences that are indistinguishable from human-generated dialogue utterances.  Aħna nagħtu l-kompitu bħala problem a ta’ tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar fejn in ħarrġu b’mod konġunt żewġ sistemi: mudell ġenerattiv biex jipproduċi sekwenzi ta’ reazzjoni, u diskriminatur-analagous għall-evalwatur uman fit-test ta’ Turing- biex niddistingwu bejn id-djalogi ġġenerati mill-bniedem u dawk iġġenerati mill-magna. F’dan l-approċċ ġenerattiv tan-netwerk avversarju, ir-riżultati mid-diskriminatur jintużaw biex tinkoraġġixxi s-sistema lejn djalogu aktar simili għall-bniedem. Further, we investigate models for adversarial evaluation that uses success in fooling an adversary as a dialogue evaluation metric, while avoiding a number of potential pitfalls.  Riżultati esperimentali fuq diversi metriċi, inkluża evalwazzjoni avversarja, juru li s-sistema mħarrġa b’mod avversarju tiġġenera reazzjonijiet ta’ kwalità ogħla mil-linji bażi preċedenti', 'sr': 'Primjenjujemo neprijateljsku obuku na generaciju dijaloga otvorenog domena, obuku sistema za proizvodnju sekvencija koja je neovisna od reči dijaloga koji su proizvedeni ljudima. Izbacili smo zadatak kao problem učenja pojačanja u kojem zajednički treniramo dva sistema: generativni model za proizvodnju sekvencija odgovora, i diskriminacijski analog ljudskom procjenitelju u Turinskom testu, kako bi se razlikovali između ljudskih dijaloga i uređenih strojeva. U ovom generativnom neprijateljskom mrežnom pristupu, rezultati diskriminacije se koriste kako bi ohrabrili sistem ka više ljudskog dijaloga. Nadalje, istražujemo modele protivne procjene koji koriste uspeh u prevari protivnika kao metriku procjene dijaloga, dok izbjegavamo broj potencijalnih šteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko metrika, uključujući negativnu procjenu, pokazuju da negativno obučeni sistem stvara veće kvalitetne odgovore od prethodnih osnovnih linija', 'si': 'අපි විරෝද්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ විරෝද්ධ සංවාද ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට, පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න, මි අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට පත්තර දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට පත්තර කරනවා: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ ජීවිත විරෝධ විරෝධ ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය, විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය භ තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ විරෝධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විරෝධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විරෝධ විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න, සතුටු විරෝධ ව මෙට්\u200dරික් වලින් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්, විරෝධ විශේෂණය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂයෙන්, ප්\u200dරකාශ', 'no': 'Vi bruker oppositær opplæring til å generera dialogvindauget for opna domene, opplæring av eit system for å produsera rekkjefølgjer som er indistingabel frå menneske genererte dialoguttaler. Vi kastar oppgåva som eit problem for å forstørra læringa der vi kopla treng to systemer: ein generelt modell for å produsera svarsekvender, og ein diskriminator-analog til menneskeevalueringa i Turing-testen for å forstørra mellom menneske genererte dialogane og maskinegenererte dialogane. I denne genererte adversarialnettstilnærminga blir utdata frå diskriminatoren brukt for å oppretta systemet mot meir menneskelig dialogvindauge. I tillegg undersøker vi modeller for adversariske evaluering som brukar suksess i å forfala ein adversaris som eit dialogevalueringsmetrik, medan du unngår mange potensielle feil. Eksperimentale resultat på fleire metrikar, inkludert negativ evaluering, viser at den negativt trengte systemet generer høgare kvalitetsverdiar enn tidlegare baselinjer', 'pl': 'Stosujemy szkolenie przeciwne do generowania dialogu otwartej domeny, szkoląc system tworzenia sekwencji, których nie da się odróżnić od wypowiedzi dialogowych generowanych przez człowieka. Postrzegamy to zadanie jako problem uczenia się wzmacniającego, w którym wspólnie szkolimy dwa systemy: model generatywny do tworzenia sekwencji reakcji oraz dyskryminator – analogiczny dla ludzkiego oceniającego w testie Turinga – w celu rozróżnienia między dialogami generowanymi przez człowieka a dialogami generowanymi maszynowo. W tym generacyjnym podejściu do sieci przeciwnej, wyniki dyskryminatora są wykorzystywane do zachęcania systemu do bardziej ludzkiego dialogu. Ponadto badamy modele oceny przeciwników, które wykorzystują sukces w oszukaniu przeciwnika jako metrykę oceny dialogu, unikając jednocześnie szeregu potencjalnych pułapek. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące kilku wskaźników, w tym oceny przeciwnej, pokazują, że system przeszkolony przeciwnie generuje reakcje wyższej jakości niż poprzednie linie bazowe', 'so': 'Waxaannu u codsanaynaa waxbarasho cadaawayaasha ah si aan u furanayno sameynta dialogue-domain, waxbarido nidaam si aan u sameynno koobo ka mid ah hadallada dialogue-ka ee dadku. Waxaynu shaqada u bandhignaynaa dhibaato barashada, halkaas oo aynu ku tababarinno labada nidaam: model geneeral ah oo soo saara jibbaarada, iyo takoorida qiimeynta dadka ee turing- si aan u kala soocno labada dialog ee dadka-generay iyo machine-generated. Dhaqdhaqaaqa shabakadda cadaawayaasha ah waxaa lagu isticmaalaa inay nidaamka u dhiirrigeliyaan dialogue u eg dadka oo kale. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu baaraynaa tusaalooyin qiimeynta cadaawayaasha ah, kaas oo ku isticmaalaya liibaanshaha ku sawirida cadaawayaasha, iyadoo a an ka fogayno boolal badan oo suurtagal ah. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in nidaamka cadaawayaasha la tababaray ay ka samaysaa jawaabo sare oo qiimeeya qoraalka hore', 'sv': 'Vi tillämpar motstridig träning för att skapa dialog med öppen domän, utbildar ett system för att producera sekvenser som inte kan särskiljas från dialoguttryck som genereras av människor. Vi kastar uppgiften som ett förstärkningsinlärningsproblem där vi gemensamt tränar två system: en generativ modell för att producera responssekvenser, och en diskriminerande – analog för den mänskliga utvärderaren i Turingtestet – för att skilja mellan de mänskliga dialogerna och de maskingenererade dialogerna. I detta generativa, motstridiga nätverkstillvägagångssätt används resultaten från diskrimineraren för att uppmuntra systemet till en mer mänsklig dialog. Vidare undersöker vi modeller för kontradiktorisk utvärdering som använder framgång för att lura en motståndare som ett mätvärde för dialogutvärdering, samtidigt som vi undviker ett antal potentiella fallgropar. Experimentella resultat på flera mätvärden, inklusive kontradiktorisk utvärdering, visar att det kontradiktoriskt utbildade systemet genererar svar av högre kvalitet än tidigare basvärden', 'ur': 'ہم مخالف تعلیم کو کھولنے والی دائومین کی نسل کے لئے لازم کرتے ہیں، ایک سیستم کی تعلیم کرتا ہے کہ انسان کے پیدا کئے ہوئے دائومین کی باتوں سے ناکام ہوسکتے ہیں. ہم نے اس کام کو ایک مضبوط تعلیم مسئلہ بنایا ہے جہاں ہم دو سیستموں کے ساتھ تطارین کرتے ہیں: ایک جواب کے سطح کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے پیدا کرنے کے لئے پیدا کرنے کے لئے، اور تورینگ امتحان میں انسان کے ارزیابی کرنے والے کے برابر ایک بحثہ بحثہ بحثہ بحثہ دینے کے لئے، انسان کے پیدا ہوئے диалогوں اور ماشی اس مخالف نیٹ ورک کی تقریبا میں، تقسیم کرنے والے کی نتیجے اس سیستم کو زیادہ انسان کی طرح کی گفتگو کی طرف رغبت کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں. اور اس کے بعد، ہم مخالف ارزیابی کے لئے نمونے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو ایک دشمن کو ڈالنے کے لئے کامیابی کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں، اور بہت سی امکانات کے اندازے سے پرہیز کرتے ہیں. بہت سی میٹریک کے مطابق تجربے کا نتیجہ، مقابلہ ارزش کے ساتھ، دکھاتا ہے کہ مخالف طریقے سے تطابق کی سیسٹم پہلے سے بہت زیادہ کیفیت کا جواب پیدا کرتا ہے', 'ta': 'நாம் எதிரியான பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் திறந்த டோமைன் உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்திற்கு, ஒரு அமைப்பை பயிற்சி செய்து, மனித நாம் இந்த செயலை வலுப்படுத்தல் பிரச்சினையாக வைத்தோம் அதில் நாம் இரண்டு அமைப்புகளுக்கு ஒன்றாக பயிற்சியை பயிற்சி செய்வோம்: பதில் வரிசைகளை உருவாக்க ஒரு பொதுவான மாதிரி, மற்றும இந்த பொதுவான எதிர்பார்ப்பு வலைப்பின்னல் முறைமை மேலும், நாம் எதிர்மறை மதிப்பீட்டிற்கான மாதிரிகளை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம். இது ஒரு எதிரியாளரை வெற்றியடைக்கும் பொருள் பாடல் மதிப்ப பல மெட்ரிக்குகளின் முடிவுகள், எதிர்மறை மதிப்புகள் சேர்த்து, எதிர்மறை பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட அமைப்பு முந்தைய அடிப்படைக்குறிகளை விட', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi thực hiện huấn luyện đối thủ cho việc tạo ra các cuộc đối thoại rộng rãi, đào tạo một hệ thống để tạo ra những chuỗi không phân biệt được với những lời khai thoại nhân tạo. Chúng tôi coi nhiệm vụ này như một vấn đề củng cố học tập nơi chúng tôi cùng nhau huấn luyện hai hệ thống: một mô hình mang tính năng tạo ra để tạo ra các chuỗi phản ứng, và một cách phân biệt người đánh giá trong bài kiểm tra Turing- để phân biệt giữa các ca thoại sinh ra con người và các hệ thống máy tạo ra. Trong cách tiếp cận hệ thống phản đối này, kết quả từ người phân biệt được dùng để thúc đẩy hệ thống tiến tới một cuộc đối thoại giống con người. Còn nữa, chúng tôi điều tra các mô hình cho đánh giá đối nghịch dùng thành công trong việc lừa gạt đối thủ làm thước đo cuộc đối thoại, trong khi tránh khỏi một số cạm bẫy tiềm năng. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên nhiều âm tiết, bao gồm đánh giá ngược, cho thấy hệ thống được huấn luyện ngược tạo ra phản ứng chất lượng cao hơn so với cơ sở cơ bản trước.', 'uz': "Biz foydalanuvchi tajribani ochish uchun muloqat taʼminlovchiga qoʻllayapmiz, inson yaratilgan muloqat gapirishdan foydalanadigan soʻzlarni yaratish uchun tizimni taʼminlaydimiz. Biz vazifani o'rganish muammosi sifatida qo'shishimiz mumkin. Biz ikkita tizimni birlashtirib o'rganamiz: javob berish natijalarini yaratish uchun generativ modeli, va turing imkoniyatini ajratish uchun odamning qiymatlarini o'zgartiradi. Inson yaratilgan dialoglar va asboblar yaratilgan mashinalar orasidagi ajratish uchun. Ushbu generativ foydalanuvchi tarmoqning qismida, ta'minlovchi natijalaridan foydalaniladi, bu tizimni qo'shimcha muloqat uchun foydalanadi. Ko'rsatganda, biz tajriba qiymatning modellarini o'rganamiz, bu tajriba qiluvchiga muvaffaqiyatlarni o'rganish uchun muvaffaqiyatlarni muloqat qiymatni metrik sifatida foydalanishi mumkin, va ko'pchilik bir necha suhbatlarni saqlash Name", 'bg': 'Ние прилагаме противоречиво обучение за генериране на диалог с отворен домейн, обучавайки система за производство на последователности, които са неразличими от човешките диалогови изказвания. Изложихме задачата като проблем за усвояване, при който съвместно обучаваме две системи: генеративен модел за създаване на последователности на реакции и дискриминатор-аналагозен за човека оценител в теста на Тюринг- за разграничаване между генерираните от човека диалози и машинно генерирани диалози. В този генеративен противоречив подход на мрежата изходите от дискриминатора се използват за насърчаване на системата към по-човешки диалог. Освен това изследваме модели за съперническа оценка, които използват успеха в заблудата на противника като диалогов показател за оценка, като същевременно избягват редица потенциални капани. Експерименталните резултати по няколко показателя, включително съперническата оценка, показват, че обучената по съперничество система генерира по-качествени отговори от предишните базови линии', 'da': 'Vi anvender modstandstræning til åbent domæne dialog generation, træner et system til at producere sekvenser, der ikke kan skelnes fra menneskeskabte dialogudtalelser. Vi kaster opgaven som et forstærkningslæringsproblem, hvor vi i fællesskab træner to systemer: en generativ model til at producere responssekvenser, og en diskriminerende – analog for den menneskelige evaluator i Turing-testen – til at skelne mellem de menneskelige-genererede dialoger og de maskingenererede dialoger. I denne generative modstandsdygtige netværkstilgang bruges resultaterne fra diskriminereren til at fremme systemet mod en mere menneskelig dialog. Yderligere undersøger vi modeller for modstandsevaluering, der bruger succes til at narre en modstander som en dialogevalueringsmetric, samtidig med at vi undgår en række potentielle faldgruber. Eksperimentelle resultater på flere målinger, herunder adversiel evaluering, viser, at det adversielt uddannede system genererer reaktioner af højere kvalitet end tidligere basislinjer', 'hr': 'Primjenjujemo neprijateljsku obuku na generaciju dijaloga otvorenog domena, obuku sustava za proizvodnju sekvencija koja je neizbježna od reči dijaloga koji su proizvođeni ljudima. Prebacili smo zadatak kao problem učenja pojačanja u kojem zajednički treniramo dva sustava: generativni model za proizvodnju sekvencija odgovora, i diskriminacijski analog ljudskom procjenitelju u Turinskom testu, kako bi se razlikovali između ljudskih dijaloga i strojeva proizvedenih. U ovom generativnom neprijateljskom pristupu mreže, ishod diskriminacije se koristi za poticanje sustava ka više dijaloga sličnog ljudima. Nadalje, istražujemo modele protivne procjene koji koriste uspjeh u prevari protivnika kao metričku procjenu dijaloga, dok izbjegavamo broj potencijalnih šteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko metrika, uključujući negativnu procjenu, pokazuju da negativno obučeni sustav stvara veće kvalitetne odgovore od prethodnih početnih linija', 'nl': 'We passen adversaire training toe op het genereren van open-domein dialoog, waarbij we een systeem trainen om sequenties te produceren die niet te onderscheiden zijn van door mensen gegenereerde dialooguitingen. We beschouwen de taak als een versterkend leerprobleem waarbij we gezamenlijk twee systemen trainen: een generatief model om responssequenties te produceren, en een discriminator – analoog voor de menselijke evaluator in de Turing-test- om onderscheid te maken tussen de door mensen gegenereerde dialogen en de door machines gegenereerde dialogen. In deze generatieve, tegenstrijdige netwerkbenadering worden de outputs van de discriminator gebruikt om het systeem aan te moedigen tot meer menselijke dialoog. Verder onderzoeken we modellen voor tegenstrijdige evaluatie die succes gebruiken in het misleiden van een tegenstander als een dialoogevaluatie metric, terwijl een aantal potentiële valkuilen wordt vermeden. Experimentele resultaten op verschillende metrics, waaronder tegenstrijdige evaluatie, tonen aan dat het tegenstrijdig getrainde systeem reacties van hogere kwaliteit genereert dan eerdere baselines', 'de': 'Wir wenden feindliches Training auf die Generierung offener Dialoge an und trainieren ein System, um Sequenzen zu produzieren, die von menschlich erzeugten Dialogäußerungen nicht zu unterscheiden sind. Wir sehen die Aufgabe als Verstärkungs-Lernproblem, bei dem wir gemeinsam zwei Systeme trainieren: ein generatives Modell zur Erzeugung von Reaktionssequenzen und ein Diskriminator – analog zum menschlichen Evaluator im Turing-Test – zur Unterscheidung zwischen den vom Menschen generierten und den maschinell generierten Dialogen. In diesem generativen Ansatz des gegensätzlichen Netzwerkes werden die Ergebnisse des Diskriminierenden genutzt, um das System zu einem menschlicheren Dialog zu ermutigen. Darüber hinaus untersuchen wir Modelle für die kontradische Bewertung, die Erfolg bei der Täuschung eines Gegners als Dialogbewertungsmetrik nutzt, während eine Reihe potenzieller Fallstricke vermieden wird. Experimentelle Ergebnisse mehrerer Metriken, einschließlich der kontradiktoriellen Bewertung, zeigen, dass das kontradiktorisch trainierte System qualitativ hochwertigere Antworten generiert als frühere Baselines', 'id': 'Kami menerapkan pelatihan musuh untuk generasi dialog domain terbuka, melatih sistem untuk menghasilkan urutan yang tidak dapat dibedakan dari ucapan dialog yang dihasilkan manusia. Kami melemparkan tugas sebagai masalah pembelajaran refleksi di mana kita bersama-sama melatih dua sistem: model generatif untuk menghasilkan urutan respon, dan diskriminator-analagous untuk evaluasi manusia dalam tes Turing- untuk membedakan antara dialog yang dihasilkan manusia dan dialog yang dihasilkan mesin. Dalam pendekatan jaringan musuh generasi ini, hasil dari diskriminator digunakan untuk mendorong sistem menuju dialog yang lebih seperti manusia. Selain itu, kami menyelidiki model untuk evaluasi musuh yang menggunakan sukses dalam menipu musuh sebagai metrik evaluasi dialog, sementara menghindari sejumlah potensi pitfalls. Experimental results on several metrics, including adversarial evaluation, demonstrate that the adversarially-trained system generates higher-quality responses than previous baselines', 'ko': '우리는 대항적인 훈련을 개방역 대화 생성에 응용하고 인류가 생성한 대화 언어와 구분할 수 없는 서열을 체계적으로 생성하도록 훈련할 것이다.우리는 이 임무를 학습 문제를 강화하고 두 시스템을 연합하여 훈련할 것이다. 하나는 생성 모델이 응답 서열을 생성하고 다른 감별기는 도령 테스트에서의 인류 평가자와 유사하며 인류가 생성한 대화와 기계가 생성한 대화를 구분하는 데 사용된다.이런 생성적 대항 네트워크 방법에서 감별기의 출력은 시스템이 더욱 인성화된 대화를 하도록 장려하는 데 쓰인다.그 밖에 우리는 대항성 평가 모델을 연구했다. 이 모델은 상대방을 속이는 성공률을 대화 평가 지표로 하고 잠재적인 함정을 피했다.대항성 평가를 포함한 여러 가지 지표에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 대항성 훈련 시스템은 이전의 기선보다 더욱 높은 품질의 응답을 생성한다', 'sw': 'Tunatumia mafunzo ya upinzani kwa uzalishaji wa mazungumzo ya ndani, tukifundisha mfumo wa kutengeneza mfululizo unaohitajika na mazungumzo ya mazungumzo yanayotengenezwa kwa binadamu. Tulifanya kazi kama tatizo la kuimarisha kujifunza ambapo tunafundisha mifumo miwili kwa pamoja: mtindo wa kizalendo wa kutengeneza mfululizo wa majibu, na mchanganyiko wa kibinadamu katika mtihani wa Turing - kutofautisha kati ya mazungumzo yanayozaliwa na mashine yanayozaliwa. Katika mbinu hii ya mitandao mbadala, matokeo kutoka kwa ubaguzi yanatumiwa kuhamasisha mfumo kwenye mazungumzo yanayofanana na binadamu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachunguza mifano kwa uchunguzi wa upinzani unaotumia mafanikio katika kuifanya mchezo wa mpinzani kama mbinu ya uchunguzi wa mazungumzo, wakati ambapo tunajiepusha vifaa kadhaa vya uwezekano. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na mbinu kadhaa, ikiwa ni pamoja na uchunguzi wa upinzani, yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa mafunzo ya upinzani unaotengeneza miitikio ya juu kuliko misingi ya mwanzo uliopita', 'tr': 'Biz open-domain dialog döwletlerini a çmak üçin tehdidik okuwçysyny ulanýarys, adam döwletlerinden çykyp bolan düzgünlerden çykarmak üçin bir sisteme okuw etmek üçin. Biz bu zady iki sistemany birleşik öwrenmäge köpräk kynçylyk şeklinde guruldyk: jogap sequencelerini üretmek üçin jeneral nusga we Turing testinde ynsan çykyjynyň arasynda tapawutlamak üçin bir nusga çykardyk. Bu döwletli teňkil şebeke golaýynda diskriminatçynyň netijesi ýok adam ýaly dijaloga ýokarmak üçin ullanýar. Munuň üçin, rakibiniň üstünliklerini döwürmekde ulanan teňgalyk deňlemek üçin nusgalary barlaýarys, birnäçe mümkin döwürmekden ýok bolup bilen. Experimental results on several metrics, including adversarial evaluation, demonstrate that the adversarially-trained system generates higher quality responses than previous baselines', 'af': "Ons wend teenstandaarlike onderwerp aan open-domein dialoog generasie, onderwerp 'n stelsel om sekwensies te produseer wat onbekende is vanaf mensgenereerde dialoog uitspraak. Ons gooi die taak as 'n versterking leer probleem waar ons saamgevoer twee stelsels:  'n genereer model om reaksie sekwensies te produseer, en 'n diskrimineerder-analagous aan die menslike evalueerder in die Turing toets - om tussen die menslike genereerde dialoog en die masjien genereerde dialoog te verkies. In hierdie genereerbare teenstandaarde netwerk toegang word die uitvoerdes van die diskrimineerder gebruik om die stelsel na meer menslike dialoog te bevestig. Verder, ons ondersoek modele vir teëstandige evaluering wat sukses gebruik in die dwaal van 'n teëstander as 'n dialoog evaluasie metriek, terwyl ons 'n aantal potensiele voorspoedings verdwaal word. Eksperimentale resultate op verskeie metries, insluitend teenstandaarlike evaluering, bevestig dat die teenstandaarlik opgelei stelsel hoër-kwaliteit reaksies genereer as vorige basisline", 'fa': 'ما آموزش دشمنی را برای نسل دیalog باز دامنی استفاده می\u200cکنیم، آموزش یک سیستم برای تولید دسته\u200cهای غیرقابل تولید از سخنرانی دیalog\u200cهای انسان است. ما این کار را به عنوان مشکل یادگیری افزایش افزایش دادیم که در آن دو سیستم را با هم آموزش می دهیم: یک مدل ژنترافی برای تولید ردیابی پاسخ، و یک تفریح\u200cکننده\u200cای شبیه به ارزیابگر انسان در آزمایش تورینگ- برای تفریح بین گفتگوهای تولید شده انسان و دستگاه تولید شده\u200cاند. در این طریق شبکه مخالفت نسبتی، نتیجه\u200cهای جدایی\u200cکننده برای تشویق سیستم به سمت صحبت بیشتری مانند انسان استفاده می\u200cشود. بعلاوه، ما مدل\u200cهایی را برای ارزیابی دشمنی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که از موفقیت استفاده می\u200cکند در فریب کردن دشمنی به عنوان متریک ارزیابی محاورش، در حالی که از تعدادی از افزایش پتانسیل فرار می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی چندین متریک، شامل ارزیابی دشمنی، نشان می\u200cدهند که سیستم آموزش\u200cهای دشمنی، پاسخ\u200cهای کیفیت بالاتر از خط\u200cهای بنیادی پیشین را تولید می\u200cکند', 'sq': 'Ne aplikojmë trajnimin kundërshtar për gjenerimin e dialogut në domini të hapur, trajnimin e një sistemi për të prodhuar sekuenca që janë të pandryshuara nga shprehjet e dialogut të gjeneruar nga njerëzit. We cast the task as a reinforcement learning problem where we jointly train two systems: a generative model to produce response sequences, and a discriminator-analagous to the human evaluator in the Turing test- to distinguish between the human-generated dialogues and the machine-generated ones.  Në këtë qasje gjenerative të rrjetit kundërshtar, rezultatet nga diskriminuesi përdoren për të inkurajuar sistemin drejt dialogut më të ngjashëm me njerëzit. Për më tepër, ne hetojmë modelet për vlerësimin kundërshtar që përdorin sukses në mashtrimin e një kundërshtari si një metrik vlerësimi dialogu, duke shmangur një numër pikash të mundshme. Rezultatet eksperimentale në disa metrika, duke përfshirë vlerësimin kundërshtar, demonstrojnë se sistemi i trajnuar kundërshtarë gjeneron përgjigje cilësie më të lartë se linjat bazë të mëparshme', 'am': 'አካባቢ ትምህርት ለመክፈት የዶሜን dialog ትውልድ እናስጠጋለን፣ የሰው አካባቢ ንግግር ከንግግር እናስገድሉ፡፡ ስራውን ለመማር ጉዳይ እና ሁለትን ሲስተማርን እናስተማርከዋለን፡፡ የፍጥረት መልስ ክፍተቶችን ለማፍጠር እና በTuring ፈተና ውስጥ ለሰው አዋቂዎችን ለመለየት አዲስ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ በዚህ አወራጅ በተቃዋሚ የመረብ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ውስጥ፣ ከተለያዩት የውጤቶች ውጤቶች ሲስተማርቱት በሰው በሚመስል አካባቢ ማኅበረሰብ ይሞክራሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተቃዋሚ ማስታወቂያ ላይ የሚጠቅመውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ ማስታወሻ እና በተቃዋሚ ማሳየት የሞከር ውጤቶች ከቀድሞው መሳሪያ ይልቅ ከፍተኛ ጥሩ መልስ እንዲያሳየው ያስታያል፡፡', 'hy': "Մենք կիրառում ենք հակառակ վարժությունները բաց բնագավառի հաղորդակցման սերունդների համար, վարժեցնում ենք համակարգ ստեղծելու հաջորդականություններ, որոնք անտարբեր են մարդկային կողմից ստեղծված հաղորդակցման արտահայտություններից: Մենք առաջարկում ենք այս խնդիրը որպես ուժեղացման ուսուցման խնդիր, որտեղ մենք միասին ուսուցանում ենք երկու համակարգեր' սերունդային մոդել արձագանքի հաջորդականությունների ստեղծելու համար, և մարդկային գնահատողին Դուրինգի փորձարկում տարբերակելու համար մարդկային ստեղծված և մեքենայի ստեղծված հաջորդականություն Այս սերունդային հակառակ ցանցի մոտեցում խտրականության արդյունքները օգտագործվում են համակարգին խրախուսելու համար ավելի մարդկային նման երկխոսություն: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հակառակ գնահատման մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործում են հակառակորդին խաբելու հաջողությունը որպես հակառակորդի գնահատման մետրիկ, միաժամանակ խուսափելով մի շարք պոտենցիալ թերություններ: Բազմաթիվ չափումների փորձարկման արդյունքները, ներառյալ հակառակորդ գնահատումը, ցույց են տալիս, որ հակառակորդ վարժեցված համակարգը ստեղծում է ավելի բարձր որակային պատասխաններ, քան նախորդ հիմնական գծերը,", 'az': 'Biz insan yaratdığı dialoğu sözlərdən istifadə edilməz seçmək üçün bir sistem təhsil edirik. Biz bu işi birlikdə iki sistemi təhsil edirik: reaksiyonu seçmək üçün generativ modeli və Turing sınamasında insan değerlendiricisinə bənzər bir diskriminat modeli təhsil etdik. İnsan yaratdığı dialogların və makinelərin arasında ayırmaq üçün. Bu nütfədən düşmənçi şəbəkə tərəfində, diskriminatçının sonuçları sistemi daha çox insan kimi diyalə təşkil etmək üçün istifadə edilir. Daha sonra, bir düşməni düşmənçilik müqabiliyyətindən uzaqlaşdırmaq üçün müvəffəqiyyəti değerləşdirmək üçün modellərini incidirik, bir neçə potensial düşmənlərdən uzaqlaşdırmaq üçün müvəffəqiyyəti istifadə edir. Münafiqli təhsil edilmiş sistemin əvvəlki sətirlərdən daha yüksək kaliteli cavab verəcəyini göstərir.', 'ca': "Aplicam formació adversaria a la generació de diàleg en domini obert, formant un sistema per produir seqüències que són indistinguibles de les expressions de diàleg generades pels humans. Hem posat la tasca com un problem a d'aprenentatge de reforç on entrenem junts dos sistemes: un model generador per produir seqüències de resposta, i un discriminator-analogu per a l'evaluador humà a la prova de Turing- per distingir entre els diàlegs generats per humans i els generats per màquina. En aquest enfocament de xarxa adversaria generador, els resultats del discriminator s'utilitzen per animar el sistema cap a un diàleg més similar a l'humà. També investigam models d'evaluació adversaria que utilitzen l'èxit en enganyar un adversari com a métrica d'evaluació del diàleg, evitant al mateix temps una sèrie de possibilitats. Experimental results on several metrics, including adversarial evaluation, demonstrate that the adversarially-trained system generates higher-quality responses than previous baselines", 'bn': 'আমরা বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ প্রয়োগ করি মানুষের জন্য ডোমেইনের ডায়ালগ প্রজন্মের জন্য, একটি সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য যা মানুষের জন্ আমরা শিক্ষা শিক্ষার সমস্যা হিসেবে কাজ করি যেখানে আমরা দুটি সিস্টেম প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করি: সাড়া উৎপাদনের জন্য একটি জেনারেটিভ মডেল এবং টুরিং পরীক্ষার মানুষের মূল্যায়নের প্রতি বৈষম্য- এই জেনারেটিভ বিরোধী নেটওয়ার্ক ক্ষেত্রে বৈষম্যের আউটপুট ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে সিস্টেম বেশী মানুষের মতো ডায়ালগের দি এছাড়াও, আমরা বিরোধী মূল্যের জন্য মডেল তদন্ত করি যা বিরোধী মূল্যে ব্যবহার করে বিরোধীদের বিরুদ্ধে একটি ডায়ালগ মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক হিসেবে  বেশ কয়েকটি মেট্রিকের উপর পরীক্ষার ফলাফল, যার মধ্যে বিরোধী মূল্য রয়েছে, তারা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষিত সিস্টেম পূর্বের বে', 'cs': 'Používáme adversariální trénink na generování dialogů v otevřené doméně, trénujeme systém vytvářet sekvence, které jsou nerozlišitelné od dialogových projevů generovaných člověkem. Tento úkol považujeme za problém posilování učení, kde společně trénujeme dva systémy: generativní model pro vytváření sekvencí odezvy a diskriminační – analogní pro lidského hodnotícího v Turingově testu- rozlišující mezi lidskými a strojově generovanými dialogy. V tomto přístupu k generační nepřátelské síti jsou výstupy diskriminačního subjektu využívány k podpoře systému k lidskému dialogu. Dále zkoumáme modely pro adversariální hodnocení, které využívají úspěch při oklamání protivníka jako metriku hodnocení dialogu, přičemž se vyhýbá řadě potenciálních nástrah. Experimentální výsledky na několika metrikách, včetně kontroverzního hodnocení, ukazují, že kontroverzně trénovaný systém generuje kvalitnější reakce než předchozí základní linie', 'fi': 'Sovellamme vastakkainasettelukoulutusta avoimen verkkotunnuksen dialogin luomiseen, kouluttamalla järjestelmää tuottamaan sekvensseja, jotka ovat erottamattomia ihmisen luomasta dialogista. Luomme tehtävän vahvistuksen oppimisongelmaksi, jossa harjoittelemme yhdessä kahta järjestelmää: generatiivinen malli vastesekvenssien tuottamiseen ja diskriminaattori-analoginen ihmisen arvioijalle Turing-testissä- erottamaan ihmisen luomat dialogit ja konegeneroidut dialogit. Tässä generatiivisessa kontradiktorisessa verkostolähestymistavassa syrjijän tuotoksia käytetään kannustamaan järjestelmää kohti inhimillisempää vuoropuhelua. Lisäksi tutkimme vastakkainasettelun malleja, joissa käytetään vastakkainasettelun arviointimittarina onnistumista vastustajan huijaamisessa välttäen samalla useita mahdollisia lankoja. Kokeelliset tulokset useista mittareista, mukaan lukien kontradiktorinen arviointi, osoittavat, että kontradiktorisesti koulutettu järjestelmä tuottaa parempia vastauksia kuin aiemmat lähtöarvot', 'et': 'Me rakendame vastandlikku koolitust avatud domeeni dialoogi genereerimisele, koolitades süsteemi, mis toodab järjestusi, mis on eristamatud inimese tekitatud dialoogi väljendustest. Me loome ülesande kui tugevdamisõppe probleemi, kus me ühiselt treenime kahte süsteemi: generatiivset mudelit reaktsioonijärjestuste tootmiseks ja diskrimineerijat-analoogset Turingi testis, et eristada inimese genereeritud dialooge ja masinagenereeritud dialooge. Selles generatiivses vastastikuses võrgustikus kasutatakse diskrimineerija väljundeid, et julgustada süsteemi inimlikumale dialoogile. Lisaks uurime vastandliku hindamise mudeleid, mis kasutavad vastase lollitamisel edu dialoogi hindamismeetodina, vältides samal ajal mitmeid võimalikke lõksu. Mitme mõõdiku eksperimentaalsed tulemused, sealhulgas konkurentsivõrdluse hindamine, näitavad, et konkurentsivõrdlusega koolitatud süsteem annab kõrgema kvaliteediga vastuseid kui varasemad lähtetasemed', 'bs': 'Primjenjujemo neprijateljsku obuku na generaciju dijaloga otvorenog domena, obuku sustava za proizvodnju sekvencija koja je neovisna od reči dijaloga koji su proizvedeni ljudima. Prebacili smo zadatak kao problem učenja pojačanja u kojem zajedno treniramo dva sustava: generativni model za proizvodnju sekvencija odgovora, i diskriminacijski analog ljudskom procjenitelju u Turinskom testu, kako bi se razlikovali između ljudskih dijaloga i uređenih strojeva. U ovom generativnom neprijateljskom pristupu mreže, ishod diskriminacije se koristi za poticanje sustava ka više dijaloga sličnog ljudima. Nadalje, istražujemo modele za neprijateljsku procjenu koja koristi uspjeh u prevari neprijatelja kao metričku procjenu dijaloga, dok izbjegavamo broj potencijalnih šteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko metrika, uključujući neprijateljsku procjenu, pokazuju da negativno obučeni sistem stvara veće kvalitetne odgovore od prethodnih osnovnih linija', 'he': 'אנו משתמשים באימונים יריביים לדור דיאלוג בתחום פתוח, באימונים מערכת לייצר רצפים שלא ניתן להבחין מהמבטות של דיאלוג שנgenerו ע"י האדם. אנחנו משליכים את המשימה בתור בעיית לימוד תגבורה שבו אנו מאמן ביחד שתי מערכות: דוגמא דוורתית לייצר רצפי תגובה, ואנלאגווס-דיסקרטים למעריך האנושי במבחן טורינג - כדי להבדיל בין הדיולוגים שנgenerו ע"י האדם לבין הדיולוגים שנgenerו ע"י המכונה. באמצעות גישת רשת היריבים הדורתית הזו, התוצאות מהדיסקרטור משתמשות כדי לעודד את המערכת לדיולוג דומה יותר לאדם. חוץ מזה, אנו חוקרים דוגמנים לערכה יריבית שמשתמשים בהצלחה בטעות יריב כמטרית הערכה של דיאלוג, בזמן שממנעים מספר פיצוצים פוטנציאליים. תוצאות ניסויים על מספר מטריות, כולל עריכה יריבית, מראות שהמערכת המאמנת לריב יוצרת תגובות איכות גבוהה יותר משקולות הבסיס הקודמים', 'jv': 'We use contrastorial tutorial to open-domain dialog Generation, Learning a System to make secs that are indestributable from Human-generated dialog words. Awak dhéwé nggawe task lagi nggawe perbudhakan nggawe sistem sing dibutuhé sampeyan: model sing generic kanggo nyenggap sistem sing beraksi, lan kegangarno sistem sistem sing beraksi yang cukup maning, lan kegangarno sistem sing beraksi sing nyenggap sampeyan karo perbudhakan ing test- kanggo nggawe winih sing beraksi dumadhi winih-generated dialog dan wong iki ole Nanging dolanan tanggal kuwi tambah sing dumadhi, akeh vewih dumadhi paten sing nguasai perbudhakan kanggo nguasai sistem sing dumadhi kanggo ngilangno Daerah sing dumadhi Lakok, kéné ujian model kanggo mbanjuraké éntuk dhéwé kuwi nggawe perusahaan seneng gak dhéwé kuwi sawasaké manit kanggo kebebasan dialog duwé, ngewasek dhéwé sing bakal terus apik sing apik dhéwé. Perintah sing paling kelas karo akeh metar, gambar deweke kapan tanggal, nambah kang dadi kapan-awak dhéwé kuwi sistem sing wis disenyongno ngono perusahaan sing wis luwih apik sing katya luwih dumadhi sing paling dhéwé', 'bo': 'We apply adversarial training to open-domain dialog generation, training a system to produce sequences that are indistinguishable from human-generated dialog utterances. We cast the task as a reinforcement learning problem where we jointly train two systems: a generative model to produce response sequences, and a discriminator-analagous to the human evaluator in the Turing test- to distinguish between the human-generated dialogues and the machine-generated ones. འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གདོང Further, we investigate models for adversarial evaluation that uses success in fooling an adversary as a dialog evaluation metric, while avoiding a number of potential pitfalls. Experimental results on several metrics, including adversarial evaluation, demonstrate that the adversarially-trained system generates higher-quality responses than previous baselines', 'sk': 'Konkurzivno usposabljanje uporabljamo za ustvarjanje dialoga v odprtem domenu, usposabljamo sistem za ustvarjanje zaporedij, ki jih ni mogoče ločiti od človeških dialogskih izgovorov. Naloga smo oblikovali kot problem učenja ojačitve, kjer skupaj usposabljamo dva sistema: generativni model za proizvodnjo odzivnih sekvenc in diskriminator-analagozen za človeškega ocenjevalca v Turingovem testu- za razlikovanje med človeškimi in strojno generiranimi dialogi. V tem generativnem kontradiktorskem pristopu se rezultati diskriminatorja uporabljajo za spodbujanje sistema k bolj človeškemu dialogu. Poleg tega raziskujemo modele za kontradikcijsko vrednotenje, ki uporabljajo uspeh pri zavajanju nasprotnika kot merilo ocenjevanja dialoga, hkrati pa se izogibajo številnim potencialnim pastim. Poskusni rezultati več meritev, vključno s kontradiktorsko oceno, kažejo, da kontradiktorsko usposobljen sistem ustvarja boljše kakovosti odzivov kot prejšnje izhodiščne vrednosti', 'ha': "Tuna amfani da shirin motsi zuwa zauren zauren akwatin bayani na buɗe, kuma muna aiki na'urar na'urar zauren akwatin bayani na mutum wanda aka haife shi. Mu ƙara aikin da za'a ƙara matsalar da za'a sanar da su a haɗi: wata misãlai na dabar-daban na ƙara masu motsi, da wata masu daidaita ga masu motsi da ake samu da masu samun mutane da aka gina shi. Daga wannan masu motsi na jerin tarayya, ana yi amfani da fitarwa daga mai rarraba, don a yi wa'amar amfani da kwamfyutan tsari zuwa zauren akwatin mutane masu daidaita. Furan, munã ƙidãya misãlai ga tunkuɗe masu motsi da za'a yi amfani da babban rabo a danna wani motsi kamar tunkuɗar zauren zauren akwatin bayani, kuma idan yana nĩsanta masu ƙari masu yiwuwa. Experimental results on several metrics, including adversarial evaluation, demonstrate that the adversarially-trained system generates higher-quality responses than previous baselines"}
{'en': 'Towards Implicit Content-Introducing for Generative Short-Text Conversation Systems', 'pt': 'Em direção à introdução de conteúdo implícito para sistemas generativos de conversação de texto curto', 'ar': 'نحو المحتوى الضمني - تقديم لأنظمة محادثة نصية قصيرة التوليد', 'es': 'Hacia la introducción de contenido implícito para sistemas generativos de conversación de texto corto', 'fr': 'Vers une introduction de contenu implicite pour les systèmes génératifs de conversation en texte court', 'ja': '暗黙のコンテンツに向けて-生成的な短文会話システムのための導入', 'zh': '向隐式-生成式短文本对话系统', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित सामग्री की ओर-जेनरेटर लघु-पाठ वार्तालाप प्रणालियों के लिए परिचय', 'ru': 'На пути к неявному внедрению контента для генерирующих короткотекстовых разговорных систем', 'ga': 'I dTreo Ábhar Intuigthe - Tabhairt Isteach do Chórais Ghinearálta Chomhrá Gearrthéacs', 'ka': 'მუშაობელი შემდგომარების ინტროდისტირების მიხედვით შემდგომარებული კრეტქტური ტექსტის პარამეტრების სისტემისებისთვის', 'it': 'Verso contenuti impliciti - introduzione per sistemi di conversazione a breve termine', 'kk': 'Жасалған қысқа мәтін сөйлесу жүйелерінің мазмұнын ендіру', 'el': 'Προς την έμμεση εισαγωγή περιεχομένου για τα συστήματα συζήτησης μικρού κειμένου', 'ms': 'Ke arah Pengenalan-Kandungan Implik untuk Sistem Penukaran Teks-pendek Penjana', 'hu': 'A rövid szövegű generációs beszélgetési rendszerek Implicit tartalom felé', 'mt': "Lejn l-Introduzzjoni impliċita tal-Kontenut għal Sistemi Ġenerattivi ta' Konverżjoni b'Test Qasir", 'lt': 'Bendrųjų trumpųjų tekstų konversacijos sistemų turinio įtraukimo link', 'mk': 'За имплицитно воведување на содржина за генеративни системи за кратко текст', 'ml': 'പൊതുവാക്കുന്ന ചുരുക്ക്- പദാവലി സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിലേ', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүний богино-текст ярилцлагын системүүдэд эзэмшигтэй Content-Introduction руу', 'no': 'Gå til implementert innhald- introdusering for genererte kort tekstsamtalesystemar', 'si': 'නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පොඩි පාළුවන් කතාව පද්ධතිය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාව', 'pl': 'W kierunku dorozumianego wprowadzania treści dla generalnych systemów konwersacji krótkoterminowej', 'ro': 'Către conținut implicit - introducerea pentru sistemele generative de conversație cu text scurt', 'sr': 'На имплицитну садјање за генерацијски кратки текст разговорни системе', 'so': 'Towards Implicit Content-Introducing for Generative Short-Text Conversation Systems', 'sv': 'Mot Implicit Content – Introduktion för genererande konversationssystem för korta texter', 'ur': 'مخلوقات کوٹی ٹیکسٹ ٹیکسٹ تبلیغات سیسٹم کے لئے موجود منزل-اینٹروڈیسی کی طرف', 'ta': 'பொதுவான சிறிய உரையாடல் முறைமைகளுக்கான உள்ளடக்கத்தை மேலே செயல்படுத்து', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Giới thiệu nội dung của Hệ thống Phát triển Văn bản ngắn', 'nl': 'Naar Implicite Content-Introductie voor Generatieve Short-Text Gesprekssystemen', 'bg': 'Към имплицитно въвеждане на съдържание за генеративни системи за кратък текст за разговор', 'da': 'På vej mod implicit indhold – introduktion af genererede korttekstsamtalesystemer', 'hr': 'Prema Implicitnom sadržaju za generične kratkotekstne razgovorne sustave', 'de': 'Implizite Content-Einführung für generative Kurztext-Konversationssysteme', 'ko': '생성성 단문 세션 시스템의 스텔스 내용 가져오기', 'id': 'Menuju Implicit Content-Introduction untuk Generative Short-Text Conversation Systems', 'fa': 'به سمت محتوای عملکرد برای سیستم مکالمات کوتاه\u200cای نسخه', 'sw': 'Towards Implicit Content-Introducting for Generative Text Conversation Systems', 'tr': 'Däpli Kiçi Metin Qonuşma Systemleri üçin Mazmunlar-Işleýişe git', 'sq': 'Në drejtim të përfshirjes së përmbajtjes për sistemet gjenerative të konversimit me tekst të shkurtër', 'af': 'Gaan na Implicit Inhoud- Introducing vir Genereerde Kort- Teks Gespraak Systeme', 'am': 'Content-Introducing for Generative Short-Text Conversation Systems', 'az': 'QÄ±sqa Metin QonuÅŸma SistemlÉ™ri Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n Ä°mparatÄ±lÄ± Content-Introducing tÉ™rÉ™findÉ™', 'bn': 'প্রজন্ম সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট আলোচনার সিস্টেমের জন্য বিষয়বস্তু প্রাপ্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Միմաստ պարունակության ներկայացումը գեներատիվ կարճ տեքստի հաղորդակցման համակարգերի համար', 'et': 'Generatiivsete lühiteksti vestlussüsteemide kaudse sisu tutvustamise suunas', 'ca': "Vers l'introducció implícita de continguts per sistemes de conversació generatius de curt text", 'bs': 'Prema Implicitnom kontejneru za generične kratkotekstne razgovorne sustave', 'cs': 'Směrem k implicitnímu zavádění obsahu pro generativní konverzační systémy s krátkým textem', 'fi': 'Kohti implisiittistä sisällönkäyttöönottoa generatiivisille lyhyttekstikeskusteluille', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'K implicitnemu uvajanju vsebin za generativne sisteme za pogovor s kratkim besedilom', 'he': 'לכיוון הצגת תוכן משמעותית למערכות שיחה גנרטיביות של טקסט קצר', 'bo': 'གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་འཆར་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་ནང་དོན་འདྲེན་པ'}
{'en': 'The study on human-computer conversation systems is a hot research topic nowadays. One of the prevailing methods to build the system is using the generative Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) model through neural networks. However, the standard Seq2Seq model is prone to generate trivial responses. In this paper, we aim to generate a more meaningful and informative reply when answering a given question. We propose an implicit content-introducing method which incorporates additional information into the Seq2Seq model in a flexible way. Specifically, we fuse the general decoding and the auxiliary cue word information through our proposed hierarchical gated fusion unit. Experiments on real-life data demonstrate that our model consistently outperforms a set of competitive baselines in terms of BLEU scores and human evaluation.', 'ar': 'تعد الدراسة حول أنظمة المحادثة بين الإنسان والحاسوب موضوع بحث ساخن في الوقت الحاضر. إحدى الطرق السائدة لبناء النظام هي استخدام نموذج تسلسل إلى تسلسل (Seq2Seq) من خلال الشبكات العصبية. ومع ذلك ، فإن نموذج Seq2Seq القياسي عرضة لتوليد استجابات تافهة. في هذه الورقة ، نهدف إلى تكوين إجابة أكثر وضوحا وغنية بالمعلومات عند الإجابة على سؤال معين. نقترح طريقة ضمنية لتقديم المحتوى تدمج معلومات إضافية في نموذج Seq2Seq بطريقة مرنة. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بدمج فك التشفير العام ومعلومات كلمة التلميح المساعدة من خلال وحدة الانصهار الهرمي المقترحة. توضح التجارب على بيانات الحياة الواقعية أن نموذجنا يتفوق باستمرار على مجموعة من خطوط الأساس التنافسية من حيث درجات BLEU والتقييم البشري.', 'pt': 'O estudo sobre sistemas de conversação humano-computador é um tema de pesquisa atual. Um dos métodos predominantes para construir o sistema é usar o modelo generativo Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) por meio de redes neurais. No entanto, o modelo padrão Seq2Seq é propenso a gerar respostas triviais. Neste artigo, pretendemos gerar uma resposta mais significativa e informativa ao responder a uma determinada pergunta. Propomos um método de introdução de conteúdo implícito que incorpora informações adicionais ao modelo Seq2Seq de forma flexível. Especificamente, fundimos a decodificação geral e a informação da palavra de sinalização auxiliar por meio de nossa unidade de fusão fechada hierárquica proposta. Experimentos em dados da vida real demonstram que nosso modelo supera consistentemente um conjunto de linhas de base competitivas em termos de pontuações BLEU e avaliação humana.', 'fr': "L'étude sur les systèmes de conversation homme-machine est un sujet de recherche brûlant de nos jours. L'une des méthodes les plus utilisées pour construire le système consiste à utiliser le modèle génératif Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) par le biais de réseaux neuronaux. Cependant, le modèle Seq2Seq standard est susceptible de générer des réponses triviales. Dans cet article, nous visons à générer une réponse plus significative et plus informative lorsque vous répondez à une question donnée. Nous proposons une méthode implicite d'introduction de contenu qui intègre des informations supplémentaires dans le modèle Seq2Seq de manière flexible. Plus précisément, nous fusionnons le décodage général et les informations de mots de repère auxiliaires grâce à notre unité de fusion hiérarchique déclenchée proposée. Des expériences sur des données réelles démontrent que notre modèle surpasse constamment un ensemble de références compétitives en termes de scores UEBL et d'évaluation humaine.", 'es': 'El estudio sobre los sistemas de conversación humano-ordenador es un tema de investigación candente hoy en día. Uno de los métodos predominantes para construir el sistema es utilizar el modelo generativo de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq) a través de redes neuronales. Sin embargo, el modelo Seq2Seq estándar tiende a generar respuestas triviales. En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es generar una respuesta más significativa e informativa al responder a una pregunta determinada. Proponemos un método de introducción de contenido implícito que incorpora información adicional en el modelo Seq2Seq de manera flexible. Específicamente, fusionamos la decodificación general y la información de la palabra de referencia auxiliar a través de nuestra unidad de fusión jerárquica cerrada propuesta. Los experimentos con datos de la vida real demuestran que nuestro modelo supera sistemáticamente a un conjunto de líneas de base competitivas en términos de puntuaciones BLEU y evaluación humana.', 'ja': '人間とコンピュータの会話システムに関する研究は、今日では熱い研究テーマとなっている。システムを構築するための主な方法の１つは、ニューラルネットワークを介した生成配列対配列（ Ｓｅｑ ２ Ｓｅｑ ）モデルを使用することである。しかしながら、標準のSeq 2 Seqモデルは、わずかな応答を生成しやすい。この論文では、特定の質問に回答する際に、より有意義で情報に富んだ回答を生成することを目指しています。Seq 2 Seqモデルに追加情報を柔軟に組み込んだ暗黙のコンテンツ紹介方法を提案します。具体的には、一般的なデコードと補助的なキューワード情報を、提案されている階層ゲート化された融合ユニットを通じて融合します。実生活データの実験は、BLEUスコアと人間評価の観点から、当社のモデルが一連の競合ベースラインを一貫して上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '人机对话统者,今之热门课题也。 建统之流行方法,一因神经网络而成序(Seq2Seq)。 然则准之 Seq2Seq ,易生琐碎之应。 本文者,所以对给定生成更有意义息之报也。 设隐式引入,以便宜并信Seq2Seq中。 具体来说因分门控融合单元解码助提示词消息。 今之实验数,BLEU之分,与人终始优于竞基线。', 'hi': 'मानव-कंप्यूटर वार्तालाप प्रणालियों पर अध्ययन आजकल एक गर्म शोध विषय है। सिस्टम बनाने के लिए प्रचलित तरीकों में से एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के माध्यम से उत्पादक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) मॉडल का उपयोग कर रहा है। हालांकि, मानक Seq2Seq मॉडल तुच्छ प्रतिक्रियाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए प्रवण है। इस पेपर में, हम किसी दिए गए प्रश्न का उत्तर देते समय अधिक सार्थक और जानकारीपूर्ण उत्तर उत्पन्न करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हम एक अंतर्निहित सामग्री-परिचय विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक लचीले तरीके से Seq2Seq मॉडल में अतिरिक्त जानकारी को शामिल करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम अपने प्रस्तावित पदानुक्रमित गेटेड संलयन इकाई के माध्यम से सामान्य डिकोडिंग और सहायक क्यू शब्द जानकारी को फ्यूज करते हैं। वास्तविक जीवन डेटा पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल लगातार BLEU स्कोर और मानव मूल्यांकन के संदर्भ में प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखाओं के एक सेट को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Изучение человеко-компьютерных разговорных систем в настоящее время является горячей темой исследований. Одним из преобладающих методов построения системы является использование генеративной модели последовательности к последовательности (Seq2Seq) через нейронные сети. Однако стандартная модель Seq2Seq склонна генерировать тривиальные ответы. В настоящем документе мы стремимся дать более содержательный и информативный ответ при ответе на заданный вопрос. Мы предлагаем неявный метод введения контента, который гибко интегрирует дополнительную информацию в модель Seq2Seq. В частности, мы объединяем общее декодирование и вспомогательную информацию о киевом слове через предлагаемый нами иерархический вентилируемый блок слияния. Эксперименты с данными из реальной жизни показывают, что наша модель последовательно превосходит набор конкурентных базовых уровней с точки зрения баллов BLEU и оценки человека.', 'ga': 'Is ábhar teo taighde é an staidéar ar chórais chomhrá duine-ríomhaire sa lá atá inniu ann. Ceann de na modhanna is coitianta chun an córas a thógáil ná an tsamhail ghiniúna Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh (Seq2Seq) a úsáid trí líonraí néaracha. Mar sin féin, tá seans ann go nginfidh múnla caighdeánach Seq2Seq freagraí fánach. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn freagra níos bríonna agus níos eolasaí a ghiniúint agus muid ag freagairt ceist ar leith. Molaimid modh intuigthe chun ábhar a thabhairt isteach a ionchorpraíonn faisnéis bhreise isteach sa tsamhail Seq2Seq ar bhealach solúbtha. Go sonrach, comhleáimid an díchódú ginearálta agus an fhaisnéis chúnta focal leid tríd an aonad comhleá le geata ordlathach atá beartaithe againn. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar shonraí ón bhfíorshaol go sáraíonn ár múnla go seasta sraith bonnlínte iomaíocha i dtéarmaí scóir BLEU agus meastóireacht dhaonna.', 'hu': 'Az ember-sz찼m챠t처g챕p besz챕lget챕si rendszerekr흷l sz처l처 tanulm찼ny manaps찼g forr처 kutat찼si t챕ma. A rendszer 챕p챠t챕s챕nek egyik legfontosabb m처dszere a gener찼ci처s Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) modell neur찼lis h찼l처zatokon kereszt체l t철rt챕n흷 haszn찼lata. A szabv찼nyos Seq2Seq modell azonban hajlamos trivi찼lis v찼laszokat gener찼lni. Ebben a tanulm찼nyban arra t철reksz체nk, hogy egy adott k챕rd챕s megv찼laszol찼sakor 챕rtelmesebb 챕s informat챠vabb v찼laszt gener찼ljunk. Javasolunk egy implicit tartalombevezet흷 m처dszert, amely rugalmas m처don tov찼bbi inform찼ci처kat foglal mag찼ba a Seq2Seq modellbe. Konkr챕tan az 찼ltal찼nos dek처dol찼st 챕s a kieg챕sz챠t흷 cue sz처 inform찼ci처t egyes챠tj체k a javasolt hierarchikus kapott f첬zi처s egys챕gen kereszt체l. A val처s adatokon v챕gzett k챠s챕rletek azt mutatj찼k, hogy modell체nk k철vetkezetesen fel체lm첬lja a versenyk챕pes alapk챕szleteket a BLEU pontsz찼mok 챕s az emberi 챕rt챕kel챕s tekintet챕ben.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის-კომპიუტერის კონფიგურაციის სისტემის სწავლა დღეს არის სამყარო კონფიგურაციის თემა. სისტემის შექმნის ერთი მეტი გამოყენება წარმოდგენებული წარმოდგენება (Seq2Seq) მოდელის ნეიროლური ქსელებით. მაგრამ, სტანდარული Seq2Seq მოდელი წარმოდგენია, რომ შექმნა ტრივიალური პასუხი. ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ მინდომით უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი და ინფორმატიური პასუხის შექმნა, როდესაც მინდომის კითხვაში დასაუბრუნეთ. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ შეცდომა შეცდომა მეტი, რომელიც დამატებული ინფორმაცია Seq2Seq მოდელში გეყენებს გრაფიკური გზაში. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ყველაფერი ევკოდირება და დახმარებული სიტყვის ინფორმაციას ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ ჰიერაქტიკური დაკავშირებული ფუზიციის ერთეულის გადა რეალური სიცოცხლის მონაცემების გამოცდილებები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის მუშაობა კონპექციური ფესტური ხაზების ნაწილის შესახებ BLEU მონაცემების და ადამიანის', 'el': 'Η μελέτη των συστημάτων συνομιλίας ανθρώπου-υπολογιστή είναι ένα καυτό ερευνητικό θέμα σήμερα. Μια από τις κυρίαρχες μεθόδους για την κατασκευή του συστήματος είναι η χρήση του παραγωγικού μοντέλου ακολουθίας-σε-ακολουθίας (μέσω νευρωνικών δικτύων). Ωστόσο, το πρότυπο μοντέλο είναι επιρρεπές να δημιουργήσει ασήμαντες απαντήσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, στοχεύουμε να δημιουργήσουμε μια πιο ουσιαστική και ενημερωτική απάντηση όταν απαντάμε σε μια συγκεκριμένη ερώτηση. Προτείνουμε μια έμμεση μέθοδο εισαγωγής περιεχομένου που ενσωματώνει πρόσθετες πληροφορίες στο μοντέλο Seq2Seq με ευέλικτο τρόπο. Συγκεκριμένα, ενώνουμε την γενική αποκωδικοποίηση και τις βοηθητικές πληροφορίες της λέξης σύνθεσης μέσω της προτεινόμενης ιεραρχικής μας μονάδας σύντηξης. Τα πειράματα σε δεδομένα πραγματικής ζωής αποδεικνύουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σταθερά ένα σύνολο ανταγωνιστικών βασικών γραμμών όσον αφορά τις βαθμολογίες και την ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση.', 'it': "Lo studio sui sistemi di conversazione uomo-computer è oggi un argomento di ricerca caldo. Uno dei metodi prevalenti per costruire il sistema è l'utilizzo del modello generativo Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) attraverso reti neurali. Tuttavia, il modello standard Seq2Seq è incline a generare risposte banali. In questo articolo, miriamo a generare una risposta più significativa e informativa quando rispondiamo a una data domanda. Proponiamo un metodo implicito di introduzione dei contenuti che incorpora informazioni aggiuntive nel modello Seq2Seq in modo flessibile. Nello specifico, fonderemo la decodifica generale e le informazioni ausiliarie della parola cue attraverso la nostra unità gerarchica gated fusion proposta. Esperimenti su dati reali dimostrano che il nostro modello supera costantemente una serie di linee di base competitive in termini di punteggi BLEU e valutazione umana.", 'lt': 'The study on human-computer conversation systems is a hot research topic nowadays.  Vienas iš vyraujančių sistemos kūrimo metodų – naudojant generacinį sekos model į (Seq2Seq) per nervinius tinklus. Tačiau standartinis Seq2Seq model is greičiausiai sukelia trivialus atsakus. In this paper, we aim to generate a more meaningful and informative reply when answering a given question.  Siūlome netiesioginį turinio įvedimo metodą, kuris lanksčiai įtrauktų papildomą informaciją į Seq2Seq model į. Konkrečiai mes sujungiame bendrą dekodifikavimą ir pagalbinę žodžio informaciją per mūsų siūlomą hierarchinį vartų sintezės vienetą. Tikrojo gyvenimo duomenų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis nuosekliai viršija konkurencines bazines linijas BLEU rezultatų ir žmogaus vertinimo požiūriu.', 'ml': 'ഇന്ന് മനുഷ്യന്\u200d കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിലെ പഠനം ചൂടുള്ള പഠനത്തിന്റെ വിഷയത്തി സിസ്റ്റത്തെ പണിയാനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുകളിലൂടെ ജനറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസെക്കന്\u200dസ് എന്നാലും സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d ട്രിവില്\u200d ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുണ്ട്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, കൊടുത്ത ഒരു ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം പറയുമ്പോള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d അര്\u200dത്ഥതയും വിവരങ്ങളും ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശി സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് മോഡലിലേക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഗെറ്റിങ്ങ് ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d യൂണിറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ  യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ജീവിതത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബിലിയുവിന്റെ സ്കോര്\u200dസും മനുഷ്യരു', 'kk': 'Адам-компьютер сөйлесу жүйелерінде зерттеу - қазіргі уақытта зерттеу нақышы. Жүйені құру үшін көтерген әдістердің бірі невралды желілер арқылы генерациялық реттеу (Seq2Seq) үлгісін қолданады. Бірақ стандартты Seq2Seq үлгісі үлкен жауаптарды құру үшін тұрады. Бұл қағазда біз келтірілген сұраққа жауап бергенде маңызды және мәліметтік жауап беруді қалаймыз. Біз Seq2Seq үлгісіне қосымша мәліметті ендіру әдісін ұсынамыз. Ескерілікті, біз жалпы декодтамыз және көмектесетін мәліметті иерархиялық жинақтау бірлігіміз арқылы біріктіреміз. Шынымен өмір мәліметінің тәжірибелері біздің моделіміздің BLEU нәтижелері мен адамның оқиғаларының бірнеше тәжірибелікті негізгі жолдарды жасайды деп көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'kajian tentang sistem perbualan manusia-komputer adalah topik kajian panas hari ini. Salah satu kaedah yang berkuasa untuk membina sistem adalah menggunakan model Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) generatif melalui rangkaian saraf. Namun, model Seq2Seq piawai cenderung untuk menghasilkan balasan ringkas. Dalam kertas ini, kita bertujuan untuk menghasilkan jawapan yang lebih bermakna dan maklumat apabila menjawab soalan tertentu. Kami cadangkan kaedah perkenalan-kandungan secara implicit yang memasukkan maklumat tambahan ke dalam model Seq2Seq dengan cara fleksibel. Secara khusus, kita menghidupkan penyahkodan umum dan maklumat tanda bantuan melalui unit fusi gerbang hierarkis kami. Eksperimen pada data kehidupan sebenar menunjukkan bahawa model kita secara konsisten melampaui set garis dasar kompetitif dalam terma skor BLEU dan penilaian manusia.', 'mk': 'Студијата за човек-компјутер разговарачки системи е жешка тема на истражување денес. Еден од владејачките методи за изградба на системот е користењето на генеративниот модел Seq2Seq преку нервните мрежи. However, the standard Seq2Seq model is prone to generate trivial responses.  Во овој весник, ние имаме за цел да генерираме позначаен и информативен одговор кога ќе одговориме на одредено прашање. Предложуваме имплицитен метод за воведување на содржина кој вклучува дополнителни информации во моделот Seq2Seq на флексибилен начин. Specifically, we fuse the general decoding and the auxiliary cue word information through our proposed hierarchical gated fusion unit.  Експериментите на податоците од реалниот живот покажуваат дека нашиот модел постојано ги надминува конкурентните основни линии во поглед на оценките на БЛЕУ и човечката оценка.', 'pl': 'Badania nad systemami rozmowy człowiek-komputer są obecnie gorącym tematem badawczym. Jedną z dominujących metod budowy systemu jest wykorzystanie generacyjnego modelu sekwencji-sekwencji (Sequence-to-Sequence) poprzez sieci neuronowe. Jednak standardowy model Seq2Seq jest podatny na generowanie trywialnych odpowiedzi. W niniejszym artykule staramy się wygenerować bardziej znaczącą i informacyjną odpowiedź podczas odpowiedzi na dane pytanie. Proponujemy metodę implicietnego wprowadzania treści, która w elastyczny sposób włącza dodatkowe informacje do modelu Seq2Seq. W szczególności, łączymy ogólne dekodowanie i informacje o pomocniczym słowie wskazującym poprzez naszą proponowaną hierarchiczną jednostkę łączącą. Eksperymenty na danych rzeczywistych pokazują, że nasz model konsekwentnie przewyższa zestaw konkurencyjnych linii bazowych pod względem wyników BLEU i oceny ludzkiej.', 'mt': 'L-istudju dwar is-sistemi ta’ konverżjoni bejn il-bniedem u l-kompjuter huwa suġġett ta’ riċerka sħun illum. Wieħed mill-metodi prevalenti għall-bini tas-sistema huwa l-użu tal-mudell ġenerattiv Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) permezz tan-netwerks newrali. Madankollu, il-mudell standard Seq2Seq huwa suxxettibbli li jiġġenera risponsi trivjali. F’dan id-dokument, għandna l-għan li niġġeneraw tweġiba aktar sinifikanti u informattiva meta nwieġbu mistoqsija partikolari. Aħna nipproponu metodu impliċitu għall-introduzzjoni tal-kontenut li jinkorpora informazzjoni addizzjonali fil-mudell Seq2Seq b’mod flessibbli. Speċifikament, aħna nħallu d-dekodifikazzjoni ġenerali u l-informazzjoni awżiljarja tal-kelma cue permezz tal-unit à ta’ fużjoni ġerarkika b’gated proposta tagħna. L-esperimenti fuq id-dejta tal-ħajja reali juru li l-mudell tagħna b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż sett ta’ linji bażi kompetittivi f’termini ta’ punteġġi BLEU u evalwazzjoni umana.', 'mn': 'Хүн-компьютерийн ярилцлагын системийн судалгаа өнөөдөр халуун судалгааны сэдэв юм. Системийг бүтээх хамгийн чухал аргын нэг нь тархины сүлжээгээр бий болгон дараагийн дарааллаар (Seq2Seq) загварыг ашиглаж байна. Гэвч стандарт Seq2Seq загвар нь бага зэрэг хариулт гаргах боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг асуулт хариулах үед илүү утгатай, мэдээллийн хариулт гаргах зорилго байна. Бид Seq2Seq загварт нэмэлт мэдээллийг гишүүн аргаар нэмэлтэй хэлбэрээр нэмэлтэй content-introducing аргыг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид ерөнхий шинэчлэл болон тусламжлалтын үг мэдээллийг бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн гишүүн хамтдаа цуглуулдаг. Бодит амьдралын мэдээллийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний загвар нь BLEU оноо болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын хувьд өрсөлдөг суурь шугам дээр үргэлжилдэг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'sr': 'Studija o ljudskim kompjuterskim razgovornim sistemima danas je vruća istraživačka tema. Jedna od prevladavajućih metoda za izgradnju sistema koristi generativni model sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) kroz neuralne mreže. Međutim, standardni model Seq2Seq je spreman da stvori trivialne odgovore. U ovom papiru ciljamo da stvorimo smisleniji i informativniji odgovor na odgovor na određeno pitanje. Predlažemo implicitnu metodu uvođenja sadržaja koja uključuje dodatne informacije u model Seq2Seq na fleksibilni način. Posebno, zajednostavljamo opšte dekodiranje i informacije o pomoænoj reèi iz našeg predloženog hijerarhijskog skupljenog jedinica fuzije. Eksperimenti o podacima o realnom životu pokazuju da naš model konsekventno iznosi set konkurentnih osnovnih linija u smislu BLEU rezultata i ljudske procjene.', 'no': 'Studeret på menneske-datamaskinesamtalesystemet er eit vart forskningsemne i dag. Ein av dei prevalente metodane for bygging av systemet brukar den genererte sekvens- til- sekvens- modellen (Seq2Seq) gjennom neuralnettverket. Standardmodellen Seq2Seq er imidlertid nødvendig for å laga trivial svar. I denne papiret må vi laga ein meir mening og informativt svar når du svarar på eit oppgitt spørsmål. Vi foreslår eit implisitt innføringsmetode som inkluderer ekstra informasjon i Seq2Seq-modellen på ein fleksibel måte. Dette er spesifisert at vi fyller den generelle dekoderinga og informasjonen om hjelpemerket på ordet gjennom vår foreslått hierarkisk gated fusjonseining. Eksperimentar på data frå verkeleg liv demonstrerer at modellen vårt konsistent utfører eit sett av konkurentære baselinjer ved hjelp av BLEU-scorer og menneskelige evaluering.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු පරිගණකය සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිය ගැන අධ්\u200dයානයක් අද දැන් උණ්ඩ පරීක්ෂණ විශ්වාස ක පද්ධතිය නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරභාවිත විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් එකක් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විද්\u200dයාවය න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විද්\u200dයාවය නමුත්, ස්ථානය Seq2Seq මෝඩෙල් තියෙන්නේ ට්\u200dරිවියල් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සිද් මේ පත්තරේ අපි අදහස් කරනවා වැඩිය අදහස් සහ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් උත්තර දෙන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ විධානයක් සම්පූර්ණ තොරතුරු සම්ප විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ඩිකොඩ් එක්ක සහ උදව් කුව් වචන තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත සංවිධාන ඇත්ත ජීවිතයේ දත්තේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් බ්ලූයුස්', 'ro': 'Studiul asupra sistemelor de conversație om-computer este un subiect fierbinte de cercetare în zilele noastre. Una dintre metodele predominante de construire a sistemului este utilizarea modelului generativ Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) prin intermediul rețelelor neuronale. Cu toate acestea, modelul standard Seq2Seq este predispus să genereze răspunsuri triviale. În această lucrare, ne propunem să generăm un răspuns mai semnificativ și informativ atunci când răspundem la o anumită întrebare. Propunem o metodă implicită de introducere a conținutului care încorporează informații suplimentare în modelul Seq2Seq într-un mod flexibil. Mai exact, fuzionăm decodarea generală și informațiile auxiliare cu cuvântul cu cuvânt cu ajutorul unității noastre de fuziune ierarhică propuse. Experimentele pe date reale demonstrează că modelul nostru depășește în mod constant un set de valori de referință competitive în ceea ce privește scorurile BLEU și evaluarea umană.', 'so': "Waxbarashada ku saabsan nidaamka hadalka ee kompyuterka ee dadku waa maamul waxbarasho kulul. Mid ka mid ah hababka ugu adkaan ee lagu dhiso nidaamka wuxuu isticmaalaa qaababka geneeral-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) midowga shabakada neurada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee modelka Standarda ah ee Seq2Seq waa in loo sameeyaa jawaabo trivial ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku talo galaynaa inaannu sameyno jawaab macluumaad badan oo macluumaad leh marka aan ka jawaabno su'aal la siiyey. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab ku qoran qaab ku saabsan waxyaabaha lagu soo bandhigi karo, kaas oo ku qoran macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ku qoran modelka Seq2Seq. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku fududaynaa sawirada caadiga ah iyo macluumaadka kalluumeynta ee ku habboon, qaybteena qaxootiga lagu talo galay ee hierarkiisa. Imtixaanka macluumaadka nolosha ee runta ah waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayagu uu si joogto ah u sameeyo koob ka mid ah saldhigyo iskaashan oo ku saabsan scoraha BLEU iyo qiimeynta dadka.", 'ta': 'இந்த நேரத்தில் மனித கணினி பேச்சு முறைமைகளில் உள்ள ஆய்வு ஒரு சூடான ஆராய்ச்சி தலைப்பு. அமைப்பை உருவாக்க ஒரு முன்னேற்ற முறைமைகள் புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் மூலம் பொதுவான வரிசையில் இருக்கும் மாதிரியை பயன்படு However, standard Seq2Seq model is proven to generate trivial response. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட போது ஒரு மிகவும் அர்த்தமுள்ள மற் கூடுதல் தகவலை செக்கு2Seq மாதிரியில் சேர்க்கும் பொருள் குறிப்பிடும் முறையை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். குறிப்பிட்டு, உண்மையான வாழ்க்கை தரவுகளின் சோதனைகள் பிலியு மதிப்புகள் மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகளில் எங்கள் மாதிரி முறைமையில் தொடர்ந்து போட்டியா', 'sv': 'Studien om människa-dator konversationssystem är ett hett forskningsämne nuförtiden. En av de rådande metoderna för att bygga systemet är att använda den generativa Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) modellen genom neurala nätverk. Men den vanliga Seq2Seq modellen är benägen att generera triviala svar. I denna uppsats strävar vi efter att generera ett mer meningsfullt och informativt svar när vi besvarar en viss fråga. Vi föreslår en implicit innehållsintroduktionsmetod som på ett flexibelt sätt integrerar ytterligare information i Seq2Seq-modellen. Specifikt smälter vi den allmänna avkodningen och hjälpordsinformationen genom vår föreslagna hierarkiska gated fusionsenhet. Experiment på verkliga data visar att vår modell konsekvent överträffar en uppsättning konkurrenskraftiga baslinjer när det gäller BLEU-poäng och mänsklig utvärdering.', 'ur': 'انسان-کمپیوٹر کی بات سیسٹم کے متعلق تحقیق آج ایک گرم تحقیق موضوع ہے۔ سیسٹم بنانے کے لئے بڑی مغلوب طریقے میں سے ایک ایسی طریقہ ہے کہ نورول نیٹورک کے ذریعے پیدا کرنے والی سکوئنس-تا-سکوئنس (Seq2Seq) موڈل کو استعمال کرتا ہے. However, the standard Seq2Seq model is prone to generate trivial responses. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک سوال کی جواب دینے کے بعد اس سے زیادہ مطلوب اور اطلاعات کا جواب بنانا چاہتے ہیں. ہم ایک معلوم منصفات معلوم کرنے کے طریقے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس سے اضافہ معلومات Seq2Seq موڈل میں ایک ہلکت طریقے سے شامل ہوتی ہے. خاص طور پر، ہم نے عمومی ڈیکڈ اور مددگار کوئ کلام کی اطلاعات کو ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا حیراتیکل گیٹ فوجین یونیٹ کے ذریعے پیدا کیا ہے. حقیقی زندگی ڈیٹا کے متعلق تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل بطور مضبوط بئس لینڈ کے مطابق بلیوس سکوٹ اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے مطابق ایک مجموعہ سے زیادہ کامل ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bugun hozirda, inson kompyuterning mazmuni tizimlarida o'qituvchisi juda qiyin taʼminlovchi mavzu. Name Lekin, Seq2Seq modeli trivial javoblarni yaratish uchun ishlatiladi. Bu hujjatda, biz bir savol javobi javob berayotganda ko'proq ma'lumot va maʼlumot javob yaratishni xohlamiz. Biz qo'shimcha maʼlumot Seq2Seq modeliga qoʻshimcha maʼlumot kiritiladi. Ko'rsatilgan, biz quyidagi tub soʻzlarni quyidagi umumiy kodlash va muhimi soʻzning maʼlumotini tasdiqlashimiz mumkin. Mavjud hayot maʼlumotlaridagi tajribalar bilan modelmiz bunday o'zgarishga BLEU scorlari va inson qiymatlari bilan bir tarjima asosini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu về hệ thống đối thoại máy tính người là một chủ đề nghiên cứu nóng bỏng ngày nay. Một trong những phương pháp phổ biến để xây dựng hệ thống là sử dụng hệ thống gây ra chuỗi-thành-Chuỗi (Seq2Seq) thông qua mạng thần kinh. Tuy nhiên, kiểu dáng Seq2Seq chuẩn bị cung cấp trả lời nhẹ nhàng. Trong tờ báo này, chúng tôi muốn tạo ra một câu trả lời đầy ý nghĩa và thông tin hơn khi trả lời một câu hỏi. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tự nhiên nhập nội dung mà có thể linh hoạt thêm thông tin vào mô hình Seq2Seq. Cụ thể, chúng ta kết hợp các thiết bị giải mã chung và thông tin cơ phụ thông qua các thiết bị nhiệt hạch leo thang. Những thử nghiệm trên dữ liệu đời thực chứng minh rằng mô hình của chúng ta hoàn toàn vượt trội so với các bản mẫu cạnh tranh về điểm LEBEU và đánh giá con người.', 'bg': 'Изследването на човешко-компютърните разговорни системи е гореща изследователска тема в днешно време. Един от преобладаващите методи за изграждане на системата е използването на генеративния модел от последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq) чрез невронни мрежи. Стандартният модел обаче е склонен да генерира тривиални отговори. В настоящата статия се стремим да генерираме по-смислен и информативен отговор при отговор на даден въпрос. Предлагаме имплицитен метод за въвеждане на съдържание, който включва допълнителна информация в модела по гъвкав начин. По-конкретно, ние сливаме общото декодиране и спомагателната информация за думата чрез нашата предложена йерархична затворена синтез единица. Експериментите с данни от реалния живот показват, че нашият модел постоянно надминава набор от конкурентни базови линии по отношение на оценките и оценката на хората.', 'nl': 'Het onderzoek naar mens-computer conversatiesystemen is tegenwoordig een hot onderzoeksonderwerp. Een van de meest voorkomende methoden om het systeem te bouwen is het gebruik van het generatieve Sequence-to-Sequence (Sequence) model via neurale netwerken. Het standaard Seq2Seq model is echter geneigd om triviale reacties te genereren. In dit artikel willen we een betekenisvoller en informatiever antwoord genereren bij het beantwoorden van een bepaalde vraag. We stellen een impliciete content-introducerende methode voor die aanvullende informatie op een flexibele manier in het Seq2Seq model integreert. Specifiek, we fuseren de algemene decodering en de hulpcue-woord informatie via onze voorgestelde hiërarchische gated fusion unit. Experimenten met real-life data tonen aan dat ons model consistent presteert boven een reeks concurrerende baselines in termen van BLEU scores en menselijke evaluatie.', 'hr': 'Istraživanje o sustavima razgovora ljudskih kompjutera danas je vruća istraživanja. Jedna od prevladavajućih metoda za izgradnju sustava koristi generični model Seq2Seq kroz neurone mreže. Međutim, standardni model Seq2Seq je sklonjen proizvesti trivialne odgovore. U ovom papiru ciljamo stvoriti smisleniji i informativniji odgovor na odgovor na određeno pitanje. Predlažemo implicitnu metodu uvođenja sadržaja koja uključuje dodatne informacije u model Seq2Seq na fleksibilni način. Posebno, zajednostavljamo opće dekodiranje i informacije o pomoćnoj signalnoj riječi kroz našu predloženu hijerarhičku skupljenu fusijsku jedinicu. Eksperimenti o podacima realnog života pokazuju da naš model konsekventno iznosi skup konkurentnih osnovnih linija u smislu BLEU rezultata i ljudske procjene.', 'da': 'Undersøgelsen af menneske-computer samtalesystemer er et varmt forskningsemne i dag. En af de fremherskende metoder til at opbygge systemet er at bruge den generative Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) model gennem neurale netværk. Men den standard Seq2Seq model er tilbøjelig til at generere trivielle svar. I denne artikel søger vi at generere et mere meningsfuldt og informativt svar, når vi besvarer et givet spørgsmål. Vi foreslår en implicit indholdsindførende metode, der indarbejder yderligere information i Seq2Seq modellen på en fleksibel måde. Specielt smelter vi den generelle afkodning og den hjælpende cue word information gennem vores foreslåede hierarkiske gated fusionsenhed. Eksperimenter med data fra virkeligheden viser, at vores model konsekvent overgår et sæt konkurrencedygtige basislinjer med hensyn til BLEU scores og menneskelig evaluering.', 'de': 'Die Untersuchung von Mensch-Computer-Gesprächssystemen ist heute ein heißes Forschungsthema. Eine der vorherrschenden Methoden zum Aufbau des Systems ist die Verwendung des generativen Sequence-to-Sequence (Sequence-to-Sequence)-Modells durch neuronale Netze. Das Standard-Seq2Seq-Modell ist jedoch anfällig für triviale Antworten. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir eine aussagekräftigere und informativere Antwort auf eine bestimmte Frage generieren. Wir schlagen eine implizite Content-Introduction Methode vor, die zusätzliche Informationen flexibel in das Seq2Seq Modell integriert. Insbesondere verschmelzen wir die allgemeine Dekodierung und die Hilfsqueue-Wort-Information durch unsere vorgeschlagene hierarchische Gated Fusion Unit. Experimente mit realen Daten zeigen, dass unser Modell hinsichtlich BLEU-Scores und menschlicher Bewertung eine Reihe wettbewerbsfähiger Baselines durchweg übertrifft.', 'ko': '인간 대화 시스템에 대한 연구는 현재 연구의 이슈이다.시스템을 구축하는 유행하는 방법은 신경 네트워크를 통해 시퀀스 생성(Seq2Seq) 모델을 사용하는 것이다.그러나 표준 Seq2Seq 모델은 보잘것없는 응답을 일으키기 쉽다.본고에서 우리의 목표는 주어진 문제에 대답할 때 더욱 의미있고 정보량이 많은 대답을 만드는 것이다.우리는 추가 정보를 유연한 방식으로 Seq2Seq모델에 포함시키는 스텔스 콘텐츠 도입 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 우리가 제시한 층별 선별 융합 단원을 통해 일반 디코딩과 보조 단서어 정보를 융합시켰다.실제 데이터에 대한 실험에 의하면 우리의 모델은 BLEU 점수와 인류 평가에서 경쟁력 있는 기선보다 시종 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': 'Studi tentang sistem percakapan manusia-komputer adalah topik penelitian panas hari ini. Salah satu metode yang berkuasa untuk membangun sistem adalah menggunakan model generasi Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) melalui jaringan saraf. Namun, model Seq2Seq standar cenderung untuk menghasilkan respon trivial. Dalam kertas ini, kita bermaksud untuk menghasilkan jawaban yang lebih berarti dan informatif ketika menjawab pertanyaan tertentu. We propose an implicit content-introducing method which incorporates additional information into the Seq2Seq model in a flexible way.  Secara spesifik, kita menggabungkan dekodifikasi umum dan informasi kata cue bantuan melalui unit fusi gerarkis yang diusulkan kita. Eksperimen pada data kehidupan nyata menunjukkan bahwa model kita secara konsisten melampaui set garis dasar kompetitif dalam terma skor BLEU dan evaluasi manusia.', 'fa': 'مطالعه در سیستم مکالمات انسان و کامپیوتر امروز یک موضوع تحقیقات گرم است. یکی از روش\u200cهای فراگیر برای ساختن سیستم از طریق شبکه\u200cهای عصبی استفاده می\u200cکند که از طریق شبکه\u200cهای عصبی از طریق سطح به سطح نسبت به سطح (Seq2Seq) استفاده می\u200cکند. با این حال، مدل استاندارد Seq2Seq برای تولید پاسخ\u200cهای کوچک است. در این کاغذ، ما قصد داریم جواب معنی\u200cتر و اطلاعاتی را در جواب یک سوال داده ایم. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش معرفی محتویات غیر قابل توصیف که اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای را در مدل Seq2Seq به طریق flexible شامل می\u200cکند. به طور خاص، ما دکوندن ژنرال و اطلاعات کلمه اثرات کمک را از طریق واحد تغییر تغییر داده شده\u200cایم. تجربه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای زندگی واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما به طور کامل یک مجموعه از پایگاه\u200cهای مسابقه به عنوان نمایش\u200cهای BLEU و ارزیابی انسان بیشتر است.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa mifumo ya mazungumzo ya kompyuta ya binadamu ni mada ya utafiti yenye moto leo. One of the prevailing methods to build the system is using the generative Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) model through neural networks.  Hata hivyo, Mradi wa Standard Seq2Seq unaonyesha kutengeneza majibu ya vifupi. Katika karatasi hii, tunalenga kutengeneza jibu linalomaanisha na la taarifa pale tunapojibu swali la kipaumbele. Tunazipendekeza njia yenye maudhui yenye uhakika ambayo inajumuisha taarifa za ziada katika mtindo wa Seq2Seq kwa njia yenye uchunguzi. Kwa ujumla, tunafutilia ukodi wa jumla na taarifa za simu za mkononi kwa kupitia kituo chetu cha fumbuzi kilichopendekezwa. Majaribio kuhusu takwimu za maisha halisi yanaonyesha kuwa mifano yetu kwa ujumla unafanya mfumo wa misingi ya ushindani katika masuala ya vipimo vya BLEU na tathmini za binadamu.', 'tr': 'Adamlar-kompýuter gürleşmeleri barada öwrenmek şu wagt yst araştyrma temasy. Sistemi inşa etmek üçin önünlerinden biri näyral şebekeler bilen döredijili sıralan-täsirli (Seq2Seq) modelini ulanýar. Bu şekilde standart Seq2Seq modeli hassas cevaplar oluşturmak üzere düşmüştür. Bu kagyzda biz berilen soraga jogap berýände wajyplyk we informasiýalyk jogap döretmek amaçladyk. Biz Seq2Seq nusgasyna fleksible bir şekilde ekleýän daşary daşary taýýarlama yöntemi teklip edýäris Adatça, umumy dekodini we kömek sözleri teklif eden hijerarşik gatlanma birimi bilen birleşdirdik. Gerçek durmuş maglumatlary barada öränlerimiz nusgamyzyň BLEU अंश we adamlaryň deňleşmeleri ýaly düşmegi ýok bolýandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Die studie op die mens-rekenaar gesprekstelsels is vandag 'n warm ondersoek onderwerp. Een van die oorspronklike metodes om die stelsel te bou is die genereerbare Sequence- to- Sequence (Seq2Seq) model deur neurale netwerke te gebruik. Maar die standaard Seq2Seq model is voorspoedig om triviale antwoordes te genereer. In hierdie papier doen ons doel om 'n meer betekening en informatiewe antwoord te genereer wanneer ons 'n gegewe vraag antwoord. Ons voorstel 'n inplisite inhoud-introduksie metode wat addisionele inligting in die Seq2Seq model in 'n fleksibel manier inkluit. Spesifieke, ons maak die algemene dekodering en die hulpbordynformasie deur ons voorgestelde hierarkies versameling eenheid. Eksperimente op reël-lewensdata bevestig dat ons model konsistentlik 'n stel gemeenskaplike basisline uitvoer as gevolg van BLEU-scores en menslike evaluering.", 'sq': 'Studimi mbi sistemet e bisedës njerëzore-kompjuter është një temë kërkimi i nxehtë sot. Një nga metodat e mbizotërueshme për të ndërtuar sistemin është përdorimi i modelit gjenerativ Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) nëpërmjet rrjeteve nervore. Megjithatë, modeli standard Seq2Seq është i aftë të gjenerojë përgjigje të vogla. Në këtë letër, ne synojmë të gjenerojmë një përgjigje më të kuptueshme dhe informative kur të përgjigjemi në një pyetje të caktuar. We propose an implicit content-introducing method which incorporates additional information into the Seq2Seq model in a flexible way.  Veçanërisht, ne bashkojmë dekodimin e përgjithshëm dhe informacionin e fjalës ndihmëse nëpërmjet njësisë së propozuar hierarkike të fuzionit. Eksperimentet mbi të dhënat e jetës reale demonstrojnë se modeli ynë vazhdimisht kalon një sërë linjash bazë konkurruese lidhur me rezultatet BLEU dhe vlerësimin njerëzor.', 'am': 'ዛሬ በሰው-ኮምፒውተር የተነጋገረ ትምህርት ትኩሳት ትምህርት ነው፡፡ ሲስተምሩን ለመሥራት አንዱ የውይይት ቁጥጥር-ወደ-ስውይት (Seq2Seq) ሞዴል በኔውራዊ መረብ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የስኬብ2Seq ሞዴል ትክክል መልስ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተሰጠው ጥያቄን በመመለስ ጊዜ በጣም አዋቂ እና አስተዋይ መልስ እናደርጋለን፡፡ We propose an implicit content-introducing method which incorporates additional information into the Seq2Seq model in a flexible way.  በተለያይነት፣ የጠቅላላ ቃላትን እና የኩነቶች ቃላት መረጃ በተዘጋጀው የኢይሬርክቲካዊ የውጤት ክፍል በኩል እናስወግዳለን፡፡ እውነተኛ የሕይወት ዳታ ፈተናዎች የብሊዩን scores እና የሰው ድምፅ ማሰናከል በሙሉ የሚቃወሙትን መሳሪያ የሚያሳየው፡፡', 'bn': 'মানুষ-কম্পিউটার আলোচনা সিস্টেমের গবেষণা এখন গরম গবেষণা বিষয়। সিস্টেম নির্মাণের জন্য একটি প্রধান পদ্ধতি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে জেনারেটিভ সেকেন্স- থেকে (Seq2Seq) মডেল ব্যবহার করছে। তবে স্ট্যান্ডার্ড সেক২সেক মডেল ত্রিভিয়াল প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করার জন্য প্রমাণিত হয়েছে। In this paper, we aim to generate a more meaningful and informative reply when answering a given question.  আমরা প্রস্তাব করি একটি বিষয়বস্তু প্রযোজ্য উপায় যা সেক্ট২সেক মডেলের মধ্যে আরো তথ্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত করে। বিশেষ করে, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত হিয়েরার্কিক্যাল গেট ফ্যাশন ইউনিটের মাধ্যমে আমরা সাধারণ ডিকোডিং এবং প্রস্তাবিত কিউ শব্দের বাস্তব জীবনের তথ্যের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের মডেল বিলিউ স্কোর এবং মানুষের মূল্যের মাধ্যমে প্রতিযোগিতার বেসেলাইনের কিছু ব', 'hy': 'Մարդ-համակարգիչ խոսակցության համակարգերի ուսումնասիրությունը այսօր տաք ուսումնասիրության թեմա է: Համակարգը կառուցելու գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդներից մեկը նյարդային ցանցերի միջոցով օգտագործում է սերունդ-հաջորդականության (SeQ2SeQ) մոդելը: Այնուամենայնիվ, ստանդարտ SeQ2SeQ մոդելը հակված է ստեղծելու փոքրիկ պատասխաններ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք ստեղծել ավելի իմաստալից և ինֆորմատիվ պատասխան, երբ պատասխանում ենք տվյալ հարցին: Մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ պարունակություն ներկայացնող մեթոդ, որը ճկուն կերպ ներառում է ավելին տեղեկատվություն SeQ2SeQ մոդելի մեջ: Մասնավորապես, մենք միավորում ենք ընդհանուր կոդավորումը և օգնական ազդային բառի տեղեկատվությունը մեր առաջարկված հիերարխիկ կառավարման միավորի միջոցով: Experiments on real-life data demonstrate that our model consistently outperforms a set of competitive baselines in terms of BLEU scores and human evaluation.', 'az': 'İnsan-kompjuter müzakirə sistemlərində öyrənmək günlərdə sıcak araştırma məsəlinədir. Sistemi inşa etmək üçün böyük metodlardan birisi nöral ağları vasitəsilə generativ Seq2Seq modelini kullanır. Ancaq, standart Seq2Seq modeli üçlük cavab verə bilər. Bu kağızda, bir suala cavab verməkdə daha anlamsız və informativ bir cavab yaratmaq istəyirik. Biz Seq2Seq model in in əlavə məlumatı daxil edən müəyyən bir yolu təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz genel kodlama və köməkçi sözlərin məlumatlarını təklif etdiyimiz hiyerarşik birləşdirilmiş birləşdirilməsi üçün birləşdiririk. Gerçek həyat verilənlərin təcrübələri göstərir ki, modellərimiz BLEU nöqtələri və insan değerlendirmələri ilə müqayisədə müqayisədi baz çətinlərini daha üstün edər.', 'ca': "L'estudi sobre els sistemes de conversa entre humans i ordinadors és un tema de recerca calent avui en dia. Un dels mètodes prevalents per construir el sistema és utilitzar el model generador Seq2Seq a través de xarxes neurals. Però el model Seq2Seq està propent a generar respostes trivials. En aquest article, busquem generar una resposta més significativa i informativa quan responem a una pregunta dada. Proposem un mètode implícit d'introducció de continguts que incorpore informació adicional al model Seq2Seq d'una manera flexible. Concretament, fusionem la descodificació general i la informació auxiliar de paraules a través de la nostra unitat de fusió jeràrquica proposada. Els experiments de dades de vida real demostren que el nostre model supera constantment un conjunt de línies de base competitives en termes de puntuacions BLEU i evaluació human a.", 'bs': 'Studija o ljudskim kompjuterskim razgovornim sistemima danas je vruća istraživačka tema. Jedna od prevladavajućih metoda za izgradnju sustava koristi generativni model sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) kroz neurone mreže. Međutim, standardni model Seq2Seq je spreman da stvori trivialne odgovore. U ovom papiru ciljamo da stvorimo smisleniji i informativniji odgovor na odgovor na određeno pitanje. Predlažemo implicitnu metodu uvođenja sadržaja koja uključuje dodatne informacije u model Seq2Seq na fleksibilni način. Posebno, zbunjavamo opće dekodiranje i informacije o pomoćnoj reči iz našeg predloženog hijerarhičkog skupljenog jedinice fuzije. Eksperimenti o podacima realnog života pokazuju da naš model konsekventno nadmašuje niz konkurentnih osnovnih linija u smislu BLEU rezultata i ljudske procjene.', 'cs': 'Studium konverzačních systémů člověk-počítač je dnes žhavým výzkumným tématem. Jednou z převládajících metod budování systému je využití generativního modelu sekvence-sekvence (Sequence-to-Sequence) prostřednictvím neuronových sítí. Standardní model Seq2Seq je však náchylný k generování triviálních reakcí. V tomto článku se snažíme generovat smysluplnější a informativnější odpověď při odpovědi na danou otázku. Navrhujeme implicitní metodu zavádění obsahu, která flexibilně začlení dalších informací do modelu Seq2Seq. Konkrétně spojujeme obecné dekódování a informace o pomocném podnětovém slovu prostřednictvím naší navrhované hierarchické uzavřené fúzní jednotky. Experimenty na reálných datech ukazují, že náš model důsledně překonává soubor konkurenčních základních linií, pokud jde o skóre BLEU a hodnocení lidí.', 'et': 'Inimese-arvuti vestlussüsteemide uurimine on tänapäeval kuum uurimisteema. Üks valdavaid meetodeid süsteemi ehitamiseks on generatiivse järjestuse mudeli (Seq2Seq) kasutamine neurovõrkude kaudu. Standardne Seq2Seq mudel tekitab siiski triviaalseid vastuseid. Käesolevas töös püüame luua mõttekama ja informatiivsema vastuse konkreetsele küsimusele vastamisel. Pakume välja kaudse sisu tutvustamise meetodi, mis lisab Seq2Seq mudelisse paindlikult lisateavet. Täpsemalt ühendame üldise dekodeerimise ja lisateabe meie pakutud hierarhilise suletud fusiooni üksuse kaudu. Reaalsete andmetega tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie mudel saavutab pidevalt üle konkurentsivõimeliste lähtejoonte BLEU skoori ja inimeste hindamise osas.', 'fi': 'Ihmisen ja tietokoneen keskustelujärjestelmien tutkimus on nykyään kuuma tutkimusaihe. Yksi vallitsevista menetelmistä järjestelmän rakentamisessa on generatiivinen Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) -malli neuroverkkojen kautta. Standardi Seq2Seq-malli on kuitenkin altis tuottamaan triviaaleja vastauksia. Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme tuottamaan mielekkäämmän ja informatiivisemman vastauksen tiettyyn kysymykseen vastaamiseen. Ehdotamme implisiittistä sisältöä esittelevää menetelmää, joka sisältää lisätietoa Seq2Seq-malliin joustavasti. Erityisesti yhdistämme yleisen dekoodauksen ja apuvihkisanan informaation ehdotetun hierarkkisen suljetun fuusioyksikön kautta. Kokeet tosielämän datalla osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti yli joukon kilpailukykyisiä perusviivoja BLEU-pisteiden ja ihmisten arvioinnin osalta.', 'jv': 'Jejaring kanggo resmi sistem sing komputer mengko kuwi sawal pangkat sabanjur. Jejaring Nanging, model Seq2Seq padha sakjane kanggo nganggo gambarang. Nang mapaké iki, awak dhéwé uga luwih apik lan informasi sing mengko awak dhéwé ngomong sapa sing dianggap. Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan-nggunakake sistem sing dibutuhke informasi tambah karo model Seq2Seq ning njobho modèl Delawak dhéwé, ngédêpakan ngeralakno Gebudhakan langkung barang gambar dadi sing paling-urip kuwi nggambaran model sing ngendalikne sing gak bener tentang sing paling dolanan sing paling nggambar barang blo karo perusahaan uwong.', 'he': 'המחקר על מערכות שיחות בני אדם-מחשב הוא נושא מחקר חם בימים אלה. אחת מהשיטות הנמשכות לבנות את המערכת היא להשתמש במודל "רצף-לרצף" הדורתי (Seq2Seq) דרך רשתות עצביות. עם זאת, דוגמנית Seq2Seq הסטנדרטית נוטה לייצר תגובות טריוויאליות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתכוונים ליצור תשובה משמעותית ומידעית יותר כשעונים על שאלה מסוימת. אנו מציעים שיטה מוצגת לתוכן שמכילה מידע נוסף למודל Seq2Seq בדרך גמישה. במיוחד, אנו ממיזמים את הפענוח הכללי ואת מידע המילה הצילומית דרך יחידת הפיצוץ הייררכית המוצעת שלנו. Experiments on real-life data demonstrate that our model consistently outperforms a set of competitive baselines in terms of BLEU scores and human evaluation.', 'sk': 'Študija človeško-računalniških pogovornih sistemov je danes vroča raziskovalna tema. Ena od prevladujočih metod za gradnjo sistema je uporaba generativnega modela Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) skozi nevronska omrežja. Vendar pa je standardni model Seq2Seq nagnjen k ustvarjanju trivialnih odzivov. V prispevku želimo ustvariti smiselnejši in informativnejši odgovor na določeno vprašanje. Predlagamo implicitno metodo uvajanja vsebine, ki vključuje dodatne informacije v model Seq2Seq na fleksibilen način. Natančneje, združimo splošno dekodiranje in pomožne podatke o besedah skozi našo predlagano hierarhično zaprto fuzijsko enoto. Eksperimenti na podatkih iz resničnega življenja kažejo, da naš model dosledno presega niz konkurenčnih izhodišč v smislu rezultatov BLEU in ocenjevanja ljudi.', 'ha': "Babu karatun a kan muhallin mazaɓa na mutane a yanzu. Babu daga shiryoyin da ke samar da tsarin na'ura, yana amfani da motel mai jenaba-zuwa-Sequence (Seq2Seq) cikin zanen neura. Kayya, ana sami motsi na Seq2Seq a daidaita don ya iya ƙiƙiro majibu masu basu'i. In this paper, we aim to generate a more meaningful and informative reply when answering a given question.  Tuna goyyar da wata hanyor wanda ke cikin shirin ayuka da za'a shigar da wasu information a cikin misalin Seq2Seq. A ƙayyade, za'a sami kodi da maganar nau'i masu inganci, a bayan shirin ayukanmu da aka buƙata wajen buɗaɗen hierrarci. Fijaroyi a kan data masu rãyuwa da gaskiya sun nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya ƙaranci kowanta, a cikin muhimmada na BLEU ko da rabon mutum.", 'bo': 'ད་ལྟ་མི་ཚོགས་དང་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་མ་ལག་གི་བརྩལ་གསོག་ནི་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་གནད One of the prevailing methods to build the system is using the generative Sequence-to-Sequence (Seq2Seq) model through neural networks. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ Seq2Seq མ་དབྱིབས་གནད་མིན་པའི་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལ་མཐུན་སྐབས་གསལ་བཤད་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་གསལ་བའི་ནང་དོན དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག Experiments on real-life data demonstrate that our model consistently performs a set of competitive baselines in terms of BLEU scores and human evaluation.'}
{'en': 'Affordable On-line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'ar': 'تعلم سياسة الحوار عبر الإنترنت ميسور التكلفة', 'fr': 'Apprentissage en ligne abordable des politiques', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem de Políticas de Diálogo On-line Acessível', 'es': 'Aprendizaje sobre políticas de diálogo en línea', 'ja': '手頃な価格のオンライン対話ポリシー学習', 'ru': 'Обучение политике в рамках доступного онлайнового диалога', 'zh': '负担得起之在线,于政为学', 'hi': 'सस्ती ऑनलाइन संवाद नीति सीखना', 'ga': 'Inacmhainne Foghlaim Beartais Idirphlé Ar Líne', 'ka': 'დიალოგის პოლიტიკის შესწავლობა', 'el': 'Οικονομική εκμάθηση πολιτικής διαλόγου σε απευθείας σύνδεση', 'hu': 'Megfizethető on-line párbeszéd politikai tanulás', 'kk': 'Жолсызық диалог ережесін оқыту мүмкін', 'it': 'Apprendimento delle politiche di dialogo on-line a prezzi accessibili', 'mk': 'Прифатно научување на политика за онлајн дијалог', 'lt': 'Prieinamas internetinio dialogo politikos mokymasis', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Polisi Dialog Dalam Talian Menyayang', 'mn': 'Шинэ шулууны диалогын засгийн суралцах боломжтой', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Politika ta’ Djalogu On line Aċċessibbli', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200d ലൈന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് പോളിസി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Læring av politikk for dialogvindauget som er tilgjengeleg', 'pl': 'Nauka polityki dialogu online', 'ro': 'Învățarea politicilor de dialog on-line accesibile', 'sr': 'Добавно научавање политики диалога онлайн', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ සංවාද පාලනය ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන්', 'so': 'Affordable On-line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'sv': 'Politiskt lärande för dialog on-line till ett överkomligt pris', 'ta': 'பொருத்தமுடியாத கொள்கை கற்றல்', 'ur': 'لائن لائن ڈالیلوگ پولیسی سیکھنے کی ضرورت ہے', 'uz': 'Dialog qoidasi', 'vi': 'Công cụ giáo giáo dục', 'bg': 'Учене на политики в онлайн диалог на достъпни цени', 'hr': 'Učitanje politike o internetom dijalogu', 'da': 'Læring af politikker til en overkommelig pris for onlinedialog', 'de': 'Kostengünstige Online-Dialogpolitik lernen', 'id': 'Belajar kebijakan Dialog Dalam Talian Menyayang', 'sw': 'Kufundisha Sera ya Dialog', 'nl': 'Betaalbaar online dialoogbeleid leren', 'ko': '부담스러운 온라인 대화 정책 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری سیاست\u200cهای صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی اینترنتی لازم است', 'tr': 'Öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Affordable On-line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'hy': 'Անցանց պատմությունների քաղաքականության գնահատելի սովորելը', 'az': 'S톛tirli Dialoog Siyas캼 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bs': 'Naučenje politike o internetom dijalogu', 'am': 'የመስመር ምርጫዎች', 'ca': 'Affordable On-line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'et': 'Tasuline on-line dialoog poliitika õppimine', 'bn': 'অনলাইন ডায়ালগ পলিসি শিক্ষা প্রাপ্ত', 'af': 'Beskikbaar Oplyn dialoog Beleid Leer', 'fi': 'Edullinen verkkovuoropuhelu Politiikan oppiminen', 'cs': 'Cenově dostupné on-line dialogové učení politiky', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Cenovno dostopno učenje politik v spletnem dialogu', 'he': 'למידת מדיניות דיאלוג ברשת מרווחת', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གླེང་སྒྲུམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སློབ་རུང'}
{'en': 'The key to building an evolvable dialogue system in real-world scenarios is to ensure an affordable on-line dialogue policy learning, which requires the on-line learning process to be safe, efficient and economical. But in reality, due to the scarcity of real interaction data, the dialogue system usually grows slowly. Besides, the poor initial dialogue policy easily leads to bad user experience and incurs a failure of attracting users to contribute training data, so that the learning process is unsustainable. To accurately depict this, two quantitative metrics are proposed to assess safety and efficiency issues. For solving the unsustainable learning problem, we proposed a complete companion teaching framework incorporating the guidance from the human teacher. Since the human teaching is expensive, we compared various teaching schemes answering the question how and when to teach, to economically utilize teaching budget, so that make the online learning process affordable.', 'ar': 'المفتاح لبناء نظام حوار قابل للتطور في سيناريوهات العالم الحقيقي هو ضمان تعلم سياسة الحوار عبر الإنترنت بأسعار معقولة ، الأمر الذي يتطلب أن تكون عملية التعلم عبر الإنترنت آمنة وفعالة واقتصادية. لكن في الواقع ، بسبب ندرة بيانات التفاعل الحقيقي ، عادة ما ينمو نظام الحوار ببطء. إلى جانب ذلك ، تؤدي سياسة الحوار الأولي الضعيفة بسهولة إلى تجربة مستخدم سيئة وتتسبب في فشل جذب المستخدمين للمساهمة ببيانات التدريب ، بحيث تكون عملية التعلم غير مستدامة. لتصوير هذا بدقة ، تم اقتراح مقياسين كميين لتقييم قضايا السلامة والكفاءة. لحل مشكلة التعلم غير المستدامة ، اقترحنا إطارًا تعليميًا مصاحبًا كاملاً يشتمل على إرشادات المعلم البشري. نظرًا لأن التدريس البشري باهظ التكلفة ، قمنا بمقارنة خطط التدريس المختلفة للإجابة على السؤال كيف ومتى يتم التدريس ، من أجل استخدام ميزانية التدريس اقتصاديًا ، بحيث تجعل عملية التعلم عبر الإنترنت ميسورة التكلفة.', 'es': 'La clave para construir un sistema de diálogo evolutivo en escenarios del mundo real es garantizar un aprendizaje de políticas de diálogo en línea asequible, que requiere que el proceso de aprendizaje en línea sea seguro, eficiente y económico. Pero en realidad, debido a la escasez de datos reales de interacción, el sistema de diálogo suele crecer lentamente. Además, la mala política de diálogo inicial conduce fácilmente a una mala experiencia de usuario e incurre en la incapacidad de atraer a los usuarios para que aporten datos de capacitación, por lo que el proceso de aprendizaje es insostenible. Para describir esto con precisión, se proponen dos métricas cuantitativas para evaluar los problemas de seguridad y eficiencia. Para resolver el problema del aprendizaje insostenible, propusimos un marco de enseñanza complementario completo que incorporaba la orientación del maestro humano. Dado que la enseñanza humana es costosa, comparamos varios esquemas de enseñanza respondiendo a la pregunta de cómo y cuándo enseñar, para utilizar económicamente el presupuesto de enseñanza, de modo que el proceso de aprendizaje en línea sea asequible.', 'pt': 'A chave para construir um sistema de diálogo evolutivo em cenários do mundo real é garantir um aprendizado de políticas de diálogo on-line acessível, o que requer que o processo de aprendizado on-line seja seguro, eficiente e econômico. Mas, na realidade, devido à escassez de dados reais de interação, o sistema de diálogo geralmente cresce lentamente. Além disso, a má política de diálogo inicial facilmente leva à má experiência do usuário e incorre em uma falha em atrair usuários para contribuir com dados de treinamento, de modo que o processo de aprendizagem é insustentável. Para descrever com precisão isso, duas métricas quantitativas são propostas para avaliar questões de segurança e eficiência. Para resolver o problema de aprendizagem insustentável, propusemos uma estrutura de ensino complementar completa, incorporando a orientação do professor humano. Como o ensino humano é caro, comparamos vários esquemas de ensino respondendo à pergunta como e quando ensinar, para utilizar economicamente o orçamento de ensino, de modo a tornar o processo de aprendizagem online acessível.', 'fr': "La clé pour construire un système de dialogue évolutif dans des scénarios réels est de garantir un apprentissage abordable des politiques de dialogue en ligne, ce qui nécessite que le processus d'apprentissage en ligne soit sûr, efficace et économique. Mais en réalité, en raison de la rareté des données d'interaction réelles, le système de dialogue se développe généralement lentement. En outre, la mauvaise politique de dialogue initial conduit facilement à une mauvaise expérience utilisateur et entraîne une incapacité à attirer les utilisateurs pour qu'ils fournissent des données de formation, de sorte que le processus d'apprentissage n'est pas durable. Pour illustrer cela avec précision, deux mesures quantitatives sont proposées pour évaluer les problèmes de sécurité et d'efficacité. Pour résoudre le problème de l'apprentissage non durable, nous avons proposé un cadre pédagogique complet intégrant les conseils de l'enseignant humain. Étant donné que l'enseignement humain coûte cher, nous avons comparé différents programmes d'enseignement en répondant à la question de savoir comment et quand enseigner, afin d'utiliser économiquement le budget d'enseignement, afin de rendre le processus d'apprentissage en ligne abordable.", 'ja': '現実のシナリオで進化可能な対話システムを構築するための鍵は、オンライン学習プロセスが安全で効率的で経済的であることを必要とする、手頃な価格のオンライン対話政策学習を確保することです。しかし、現実には、実際の相互作用データが乏しいため、対話システムは通常、ゆっくりと成長します。さらに、貧弱な初期対話方針は、悪いユーザーエクスペリエンスにつながりやすく、トレーニングデータに貢献するユーザーを引き付けることができないため、学習プロセスは持続不可能である。これを正確に説明するために、安全性と効率性の問題を評価するために、2つの定量的指標が提案されています。持続不可能な学習問題を解決するために、人間の教師からの指導を取り入れた完全なコンパニオンティーチングフレームワークを提案した。人間の教育は高価であるため、オンライン学習プロセスを手頃な価格にするために、いつどのように教えるかという質問に答えるさまざまな教育スキームを比較し、経済的に教育予算を活用しました。', 'hi': 'वास्तविक दुनिया के परिदृश्यों में एक evolvable संवाद प्रणाली के निर्माण की कुंजी एक सस्ती ऑनलाइन संवाद नीति सीखने को सुनिश्चित करना है, जिसके लिए ऑनलाइन सीखने की प्रक्रिया को सुरक्षित, कुशल और किफायती होने की आवश्यकता होती है। लेकिन वास्तव में, वास्तविक इंटरैक्शन डेटा की कमी के कारण, संवाद प्रणाली आमतौर पर धीरे-धीरे बढ़ती है। इसके अलावा, खराब प्रारंभिक संवाद नीति आसानी से खराब उपयोगकर्ता अनुभव की ओर ले जाती है और उपयोगकर्ताओं को प्रशिक्षण डेटा में योगदान करने के लिए आकर्षित करने में विफलता का सामना करती है, ताकि सीखने की प्रक्रिया अस्थिर हो। इसे सटीक रूप से चित्रित करने के लिए, सुरक्षा और दक्षता के मुद्दों का आकलन करने के लिए दो मात्रात्मक मीट्रिक प्रस्तावित हैं। अस्थिर सीखने की समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हमने मानव शिक्षक से मार्गदर्शन को शामिल करते हुए एक पूर्ण साथी शिक्षण ढांचे का प्रस्ताव दिया। चूंकि मानव शिक्षण महंगा है, इसलिए हमने विभिन्न शिक्षण योजनाओं की तुलना की है जो इस सवाल का जवाब देते हैं कि कैसे और कब पढ़ाया जाए, आर्थिक रूप से शिक्षण बजट का उपयोग करने के लिए, ताकि ऑनलाइन सीखने की प्रक्रिया को सस्ती बनाया जा सके।', 'zh': '立可进化之要,保负担得起之在线,在线学之安,高效济之道也。 然实交数之稀缺,言统常长缓也。 至于初言易用户,无以致培训,学不可久也。 正言此,立二量指标以质安全性效率。 为不可久之学,举全配套以框架之,含人师之道。 人教成本,校诸方术,以应何时,以济其算,以负担得起在线学。', 'ru': 'Ключом к созданию эволюционирующей системы диалога в реальных сценариях является обеспечение доступного онлайнового процесса обучения политике диалога, который требует, чтобы онлайновый процесс обучения был безопасным, эффективным и экономичным. Но в действительности из-за нехватки данных о реальном взаимодействии система диалога обычно развивается медленно. Кроме того, неудовлетворительная политика первоначального диалога легко приводит к неудовлетворительному пользовательскому опыту и влечет за собой неспособность привлечь пользователей к предоставлению учебных данных, в результате чего процесс обучения становится неустойчивым. Для точного отражения этого предложены два количественных показателя для оценки вопросов безопасности и эффективности. Для решения проблемы неустойчивого обучения мы предложили полную структуру сопутствующего обучения, включающую в себя руководство от учителя-человека. Поскольку человеческое обучение является дорогостоящим, мы сравнили различные учебные схемы, отвечая на вопрос, как и когда преподавать, экономически использовать бюджет преподавания, чтобы сделать процесс онлайн-обучения доступным.', 'ga': 'Is í an eochair chun córas comhphlé éabhlóideach a thógáil i gcásanna fíor-dhomhanda ná foghlaim bheartais idirphlé ar líne inacmhainne a chinntiú, rud a éilíonn go mbeidh an próiseas foghlama ar líne sábháilte, éifeachtach agus eacnamaíoch. Ach i ndáiríre, mar gheall ar ghanntanas na sonraí idirghníomhaithe fíor, fásann an córas idirphlé go mall de ghnáth. Ina theannta sin, eascraíonn droch-thaithí úsáideoirí go héasca as an droch-bheartas comhphlé tosaigh agus teip ar úsáideoirí a mhealladh chun sonraí oiliúna a sholáthar, ionas go mbeidh an próiseas foghlama neamh-inbhuanaithe. Chun é seo a léiriú go beacht, moltar dhá mhéadracht chainníochtúil chun saincheisteanna sábháilteachta agus éifeachtúlachta a mheasúnú. Chun an fhadhb foghlama neamh-inbhuanaithe a réiteach, mholamar creat teagaisc compánach iomlán a chuimseodh an treoir ón múinteoir daonna. Ós rud é go bhfuil an teagasc daonna costasach, rinneamar comparáid idir scéimeanna teagaisc éagsúla ag freagairt na ceiste conas agus cathain le teagasc, chun buiséad teagaisc a úsáid go heacnamaíoch, ionas go mbeidh an próiseas foghlama ar líne inacmhainne.', 'ka': 'რეალური მსოფლიოში განვითარებელი დიალოგის სისტემის გასაქმება არის დარწმუნებელი დიალოგის პოლიტიკის შესწავლება, რომელიც მხარეს სწავლების პროცესი უნდა იყოს ბოლოდ, ეფექტიური და ეკ მაგრამ რეალურად, რეალური ინტერფექციის მონაცემების შემდეგ დიალოგური სისტემა უფრო მარტივია. დამატებით, ცოტა პირველ დიალოგის პოლიტიკის გამოცდილებას ადვილურად გამოიყენებელი გამოცდილებელი გახდება და გამოყენებელების გამოცდილებას დაკავშირება მონაცემების შესაძლებელობა, რა მართლად ამის გამოსახულებლად, ორი კოლუტატიური მეტრიკის მიზეზეზიან, რომ უფრო დარწმუნება და ეფექტიურობა პრობლემების შესახებ. ჩვენ საკუთარი სწავლებელი პრობლემების გადაწყვეტილებისთვის, ჩვენ დავიწყეთ სწავლებელი პრობლემები, რომელიც ადამიანის სწავლებელიდან მოწყვეტილება. ადამიანის სწავლება ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან საკმაოდ, ჩვენ განსხვავებული სწავლების სქემის გადასწავლა, როგორ და როდესაც სწავლა, ეკონომიკურად გამოყენება სწავლების ბიზეტი', 'el': 'Το κλειδί για την οικοδόμηση ενός εξελισσόμενου συστήματος διαλόγου σε σενάρια πραγματικού κόσμου είναι να εξασφαλιστεί μια προσιτή εκμάθηση πολιτικής διαλόγου στο διαδίκτυο, η οποία απαιτεί την ηλεκτρονική διαδικασία μάθησης να είναι ασφαλής, αποτελεσματική και οικονομική. Αλλά στην πραγματικότητα, λόγω της έλλειψης πραγματικών δεδομένων αλληλεπίδρασης, το σύστημα διαλόγου συνήθως αναπτύσσεται αργά. Εξάλλου, η κακή πολιτική αρχικού διαλόγου οδηγεί εύκολα σε κακή εμπειρία των χρηστών και οδηγεί σε αποτυχία προσέλκυσης των χρηστών να συνεισφέρουν δεδομένα κατάρτισης, έτσι ώστε η διαδικασία μάθησης να είναι μη βιώσιμη. Για να αποτυπωθεί με ακρίβεια αυτό, προτείνονται δύο ποσοτικές μετρήσεις για την αξιολόγηση των ζητημάτων ασφάλειας και αποδοτικότητας. Για την επίλυση του μη βιώσιμου μαθησιακού προβλήματος, προτείναμε ένα πλήρες πλαίσιο συνοδευτικής διδασκαλίας που ενσωματώνει την καθοδήγηση από τον ανθρώπινο δάσκαλο. Δεδομένου ότι η ανθρώπινη διδασκαλία είναι δαπανηρή, συγκρίναμε διάφορα προγράμματα διδασκαλίας απαντώντας στο ερώτημα πώς και πότε να διδάξουμε, να αξιοποιήσουμε οικονομικά τον προϋπολογισμό διδασκαλίας, έτσι ώστε να καταστεί η διαδικτυακή διαδικασία μάθησης προσιτή.', 'hu': 'A valós forgatókönyvekben kialakítható párbeszédrendszer kialakításának kulcsa a megfizethető online párbeszédpolitikai tanulás biztosítása, amely megköveteli, hogy az online tanulási folyamat biztonságos, hatékony és gazdaságos legyen. A valóságban azonban a valódi interakciós adatok hiánya miatt a párbeszédrendszer általában lassan nő. Emellett a rossz kezdeti párbeszédpolitika könnyen rossz felhasználói élményhez vezet, és nem vonzza a felhasználókat a képzési adatok hozzájárulására, így a tanulási folyamat fenntarthatatlan. Ennek pontos ábrázolása érdekében két mennyiségi mutatót javasolunk a biztonsági és hatékonysági kérdések felmérésére. A fenntarthatatlan tanulási probléma megoldása érdekében az emberi tanár útmutatását magában foglaló teljes társadalomtanítási keretrendszert javasoltunk. Mivel az emberi tanítás drága, összehasonlítottuk a különböző oktatási rendszereket, amelyek megválaszolják a kérdést, hogy hogyan és mikor tanítsuk, gazdaságosan hasznosítsuk a tanítási költségvetést, így az online tanulási folyamat megfizethető legyen.', 'it': "La chiave per costruire un sistema di dialogo evolutivo negli scenari reali consiste nel garantire un apprendimento delle politiche di dialogo on-line accessibile, che richiede che il processo di apprendimento on-line sia sicuro, efficiente ed economico. Ma in realtà, a causa della scarsità di dati reali di interazione, il sistema di dialogo di solito cresce lentamente. Inoltre, la scarsa politica di dialogo iniziale porta facilmente a una cattiva esperienza degli utenti e comporta un fallimento nell'attirare gli utenti a fornire dati di formazione, in modo che il processo di apprendimento sia insostenibile. Per descrivere con precisione ciò, vengono proposte due metriche quantitative per valutare i problemi di sicurezza ed efficienza. Per risolvere il problema di apprendimento insostenibile, abbiamo proposto un quadro completo di insegnamento complementare che incorpora la guida dell'insegnante umano. Poiché l'insegnamento umano è costoso, abbiamo confrontato vari schemi di insegnamento rispondendo alla domanda come e quando insegnare, per utilizzare economicamente il budget didattico, in modo da rendere il processo di apprendimento online accessibile.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinis veiksnys kuriant kintančią dialogo sistemą realiame pasaulyje yra užtikrinti prieinamą internetinio dialogo politikos mokymąsi, pagal kurią internetinio mokymosi procesas turi būti saugus, veiksmingas ir ekonomiškas. Tačiau iš tikrųjų dėl realių sąveikos duomenų trūkumo dialogo sistema paprastai auga lėtai. Be to, prasta pradinio dialogo politika lengvai sukelia blogą naudotojų patirtį ir nesugeba pritraukti naudotojų prie mokymo duomenų, kad mokymosi procesas nebūtų tvarus. Tam tiksliai apibūdinti siūlomi du kiekybiniai rodikliai saugos ir veiksmingumo klausimams įvertinti. Siekdami išspręsti netvarią mokymosi problem ą, pasiūlėme išsamią papildomą mokymo sistemą, į kurią būtų įtrauktos žmogaus mokytojo rekomendacijos. Kadangi žmogaus mokymas brangus, palyginome įvairias mokymo programas, atsakydamos į klausimą, kaip ir kada mokyti, ekonomiškai panaudoti mokymo biudžetą, kad internetinis mokymosi procesas būtų prieinamas.', 'mk': 'Клучот за изградба на еволуционален систем на дијалог во реалните сценарија е да се обезбеди достапно учење на политиката на онлајн дијалог, кое бара процесот на онлајн учење да биде безбеден, ефикасен и економски. Но во реалноста, поради недостатокот на вистински податоци за интеракција, дијалогот обично расте бавно. Покрај тоа, лошата политика на почетниот дијалог лесно води до лошо искуство на корисниците и не успева да ги привлече корисниците да придонесат податоци за обука, така што процесот на учење не е одржлив. За точно да се опише ова, се предложени две квантитивни метрики за проценка на прашањата на безбедноста и ефикасноста. За решавање на неодржливиот проблем со учењето, предложивме комплетна рамка за учење на друштвото, вклучувајќи го упатството од човечкиот учител. Бидејќи човечкото училиште е скапо, споредивме различни училишни шеми одговарајќи на прашањето како и кога да учиме, да економски го искористиме буџетот за училиште, за да го направиме онлајн процесот на училиште достапен.', 'kk': 'Шынымен әлемдегі сценарияларда өзгертілетін диалог жүйесін құру кілті - сызықтағы диалог ережелерін оқыту үшін, оның жүйесінде оқыту процесі қауіпсіздік, эффективні және экономикалық болу ү Бірақ шындығында, шындық интерфейс мәліметтерінің қажеттілігі себебі диалог жүйесі әдетте баяу үшін өсінеді. Бірақ бастапқы диалог ережесі, пайдаланушылардың тәжірибесін оңай көмектеседі және пайдаланушылардың оқыту деректеріне көмектесуге болмайды, сондықтан оқыту процесі дұрыс болмайды. Бұны дұрыс көрсету үшін, қауіпсіздік және эффективнік мәселелерді оқу үшін екі санативтік метрикалық қолданылады. Мәселесін шешу үшін, адамдардың мұғалімінен мәліметті ендіру үшін толық мәліметтің оқыту бағдарламасын ұсындық. Адам оқытуы бағатты болғандықтан, біз онлайн оқыту процесін қалай және қазір оқыту үшін, экономикалық бөлшектерді қолдану үшін әртүрлі оқыту сұлбаларын салыстырып, онлайн оқыту', 'ms': 'Kunci untuk membina sistem dialog yang boleh berevolusi dalam skenario dunia nyata adalah untuk memastikan pembelajaran politik dialog secara talian yang boleh diterima, yang memerlukan proses pembelajaran secara talian untuk selamat, efisien dan ekonomi. Tetapi pada kenyataannya, disebabkan kekurangan data interaksi sebenar, sistem dialog biasanya tumbuh perlahan-lahan. Selain itu, kebijakan dialog awal yang buruk mudah membawa kepada pengalaman pengguna yang buruk dan mengalami kegagalan menarik pengguna untuk menyumbang data latihan, sehingga proses belajar tidak bertahan. To accurately depict this, two quantitative metrics are proposed to assess safety and efficiency issues.  Untuk menyelesaikan masalah pembelajaran yang tidak bertahan, kami mengusulkan kerangka pengajaran rakan yang lengkap menggabungkan petunjuk dari guru manusia. Oleh kerana pengajaran manusia mahal, kami membandingkan pelbagai skema pengajaran menjawab soalan bagaimana dan kapan untuk mengajar, untuk menggunakan anggaran pengajaran secara ekonomi, sehingga proses pengajaran secara online boleh diterima.', 'mt': 'Iċ-ċavetta għall-bini ta’ sistema ta’ djalogu li tevolvi fix-xenarji tad-dinja reali hija li jiġi żgurat tagħlim ta’ politika ta’ djalogu onlajn bi prezz raġonevoli, li jeħtieġ li l-proċess ta’ tagħlim onlajn ikun sikur, effiċjenti u ekonomiku. But in reality, due to the scarcity of real interaction data, the dialogue system usually grows slowly.  Barra minn hekk, il-politika fqira tad-djalogu inizjali faċilment twassal għal esperjenza ħa żina tal-utenti u twassal għal falliment fl-attrazzjoni tal-utenti biex jikkontribwixxu għad-dejta tat-taħriġ, sabiex il-proċess tat-tagħlim ma jkunx sostenibbli. Biex dan jiġi deskritt b’mod preċiż, huma proposti żewġ metriċi kwantitattivi biex jiġu vvalutati kwistjonijiet ta’ sikurezza u effiċjenza. Biex nindirizzaw il-problem a tat-tagħlim mhux sostenibbli, ipproponejna qafas komplut ta’ tagħlim ta’ akkumpanjament li jinkorpora l-gwida mill-għalliem uman. Billi t-tagħlim tal-bniedem jiswa ħafna flus, qabblu diversi skemi ta’ tagħlim li jwieġbu għall-mistoqsija kif u meta tagħlim, biex b’mod ekonomiku jintużaw il-baġit tat-tagħlim, sabiex il-proċess tat-tagħlim onlajn ikun aċċessibbli.', 'ml': 'യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d വികസിക്കാവുന്ന ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാനുള്ള താക്കോല്\u200d എന്നതാണ് ലൈന്\u200d പഠിക്കാന But in reality, due to the scarcity of real interaction data, the dialogue system usually grows slowly.  പിന്നെ പാവപ്പെട്ട ആദ്യ ഡയലോഗ് പോളിസി മോശമായ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഇത് ശരിയായി വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d രണ്ട് പരിപാടിയുള്ള മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d സുരക്ഷിതമായ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെയും പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാദ അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത പഠിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d, മനുഷ്യന്റെ മാര്\u200dഗദര്\u200dശനില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗദര്\u200dശ മനുഷ്യന്റെ ഉപദേശം വിലയാണെന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതിയുടെ പദ്ധതിയുടെ പദ്ധതിയുടെ ഉത്തരം താല്\u200dപര്യമാക്കി താ', 'mn': 'Бодит ертөнцийн хувилбарт хөгжүүлж чадах диалог системийг бүтээх чухал нь шулууны диалог бодлого суралцах боломжтой байдал юм. Энэ нь шулууны суралцах үйл явцыг аюулгүй, үр дүнтэй, эдийн засгийн байлгах хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ жинхэнэ харилцааны өгөгдлийн талаар ярианы систем ихэвчлэн удаан өсөж байна. Үүнээс гадна ядуу эхний диалог бодлогыг амархан хэрэглэгчдийн туршлага хүргэж, хэрэглэгчдийг суралцах өгөгдлийн тусламжтайгаа хүргэж чадахгүй болгож, суралцах үйл явц үргэлжлүүлэхгүй болно. Үүнийг зөв тодорхойлохын тулд, аюулгүй байдал болон үр дүнтэй асуудлыг үнэлэх хоёр тооны метрик санал болдог. Ингэж байхгүй суралцах асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид хүний багш нарын руу зөвлөгөөг нэмсэн бүрэн хамтрагч багш нарын багш нарын багш нарын багш нарын багш нарын багш нарын ба Хүн багш заах үнэтэй учраас бид олон багш заах схемүүдийг хэрхэн, хэрхэн заах, эдийн засгийн төсөл ашиглах, онлайн суралцах үйл явцыг ашиглах боломжтой болгодог.', 'pl': 'Kluczem do budowy rozwijającego się systemu dialogu w rzeczywistych scenariuszach jest zapewnienie niedrogiej nauki polityki dialogu on-line, która wymaga bezpiecznego, skutecznego i ekonomicznego procesu uczenia się on-line. Ale w rzeczywistości, ze względu na brak rzeczywistych danych dotyczących interakcji, system dialogu zwykle rośnie powoli. Poza tym słaba polityka dialogu początkowego łatwo prowadzi do złych doświadczeń użytkowników i powoduje brak przyciągania użytkowników do udostępniania danych szkoleniowych, dzięki czemu proces uczenia się nie jest zrównoważony. Aby dokładnie to przedstawić, proponuje się dwa wskaźniki ilościowe w celu oceny kwestii bezpieczeństwa i wydajności. Aby rozwiązać problem uczenia się niezrównoważonego, zaproponowaliśmy kompletne ramy nauczania towarzyszące obejmujące wskazówki od nauczyciela ludzkiego. Ponieważ nauczanie ludzkie jest drogie, porównaliśmy różne schematy nauczania odpowiadające na pytanie, jak i kiedy uczyć, aby ekonomicznie wykorzystać budżet nauczania, aby uczynić proces nauczania online przystępny.', 'ro': 'Cheia construirii unui sistem de dialog evolutiv în scenariile reale este asigurarea unei politici de dialog on-line accesibile, care necesită ca procesul de învățare on-line să fie sigur, eficient și economic. Dar, în realitate, datorită lipsei datelor reale de interacțiune, sistemul de dialog crește de obicei lent. În plus, politica inițială slabă de dialog duce cu ușurință la o experiență proastă a utilizatorilor și duce la eșecul atragerii utilizatorilor pentru a contribui cu date de formare, astfel încât procesul de învățare să fie nesustenabil. Pentru a descrie cu exactitate acest lucru, sunt propuse două măsurători cantitative pentru a evalua aspectele de siguranță și eficiență. Pentru rezolvarea problemei nesustenabile de învățare, am propus un cadru complet de învățare însoțitor care include îndrumarea profesorului uman. Deoarece predarea umană este costisitoare, am comparat diferite scheme de predare răspunzând la întrebarea cum și când să predăm, pentru a utiliza economic bugetul predării, astfel încât procesul de învățare online să fie accesibil.', 'no': 'Nøkkelen for å bygge eit utviklingssystem for dialogvindauget i verkeleg scenario er å sikra at ein tilgjengeleg læring av dialogpolitikk på linje er tilgjengeleg, som krev at læringsprosessen på linje skal vera trygg, effektiv og økonomisk. Men i virkeligheten er det vanlegvis å vekke dialogsystemet langsomt på grunn av feil av verkeleg interaksjonsdata. I tillegg fører det dårlige oppstartsdialogen lett til dårlige brukarøvinga og fører til ein feil ved å tiltrekke brukarar til å bidra til opplæringsdata, slik at læringsprosessen er ikkje stabil. For å nøyaktig vise dette, er to kvantitative metrikar foreslått å vurdere tryggleikskontrollar og effektiviteten. For å løyse den ugjennomsiktige læringsproblemet, foreslåde vi eit fullstendig komponent læringsrammeverket som inkluderer retningane frå menneskelæraren. Siden menneskelige læring er dyp, sammenligg vi ulike læringsskjema som svarar på spørsmålet korleis og når å lære, for å bruka læringsbudsjett, slik at læringsprosessen på nettverket er tilgjengeleg.', 'sr': 'Ključ za izgradnju razvijenog dijalogovog sistema u scenarijima stvarnog sveta je osigurati dostupno učenje politike o dialogu na internetu, što zahteva da proces učenja na internetu bude siguran, efikasan i ekonomski. Ali u stvarnosti, zbog nedostatka pravih podataka o interakciji, dijalog se obično polako raste. Osim toga, siromašna inicijalna politika dijaloga lako vodi do lošeg iskustva korisnika i uzrokuje neuspjeh privlačenja korisnika da doprinesu podacima obuke, tako da je proces učenja neprestabilan. Da bi to precizno pokazalo, predloženo je dve kvantitativne metrike za procjenu pitanja sigurnosti i efikasnosti. Za rješavanje neprestabilnog problem a učenja, predložili smo potpuni okvir učenja kompanija koji uključuje vodstvo ljudskog učitelja. Budući da je ljudsko učenje skupo, usporedili smo različite šeme učenja koji odgovaraju na pitanje kako i kada da učimo, ekonomski korištenje budžeta učenja, tako da je proces učenja na internetu dostupan.', 'si': 'ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ සිනාරියෝ වලට විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් සංවාදක පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න යතුර තමයි පුළුවන් පුළුවන් සංවාදය පොලි නමුත් ඇත්තටම, ඇත්තටම සම්බන්ධ දත්තේ නැති නිසා සංවාද පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය විශාල වෙනවා. ඒ වගේම, නරක සංවාද ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය ලේසියෙන් නරක ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ අභ්\u200dයාපනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාලට ප්\u200dරධානය මේක හරියටම පෙන්වන්න, ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙකක් ආරක්ෂාවත් සහ හැකියාවත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ අස්ථිර විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි මිනිස්සු ගුරුවරුවෙන් මාර්ගයෙන් මාර්ගයෙක් ග මිනිස්සු ඉගෙනගන්න විශේෂය ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයට උත්තර දෙන්න විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කොහොමද, කොහොමද ඉ', 'so': "Luqada u ah in lagu dhiso nidaamka dialogka oo aan beddelmi karin ee dunida oo dhab ah waa in lagu xaqiijiyo barashada siyaasada dialogka ee ku habboon, kaas oo looga baahan yahay baaritaanka waxbarashada shabakadda si ammaan ah, faa’iido iyo dhaqaalaha. Laakiin xaqiiqdii, sababtoo ah baahida macluumaadka faa'iidada runta ah darteed, nidaamka dialogku sida caadiga ah si gaaban buu u kordhaa. Sidoo kale siyaasadda dialogue-ka baahida ah wuxuu si fudud u keenaa aragtida xumaa ee isticmaalayaasha, waxaana laga baaraandegay in ay isticmaalayaasha ku faa’iido macluumaadka waxbarashada, si ay baaritaanka waxbarashadu u adag tahay. To accurately depict this, two quantitative metrics are proposed to assess safety and efficiency issues.  Si aan u xallino dhibaatada waxbarashada aan awoodin, waxaynu horumarinnay qof saaxiib ah oo dhamaan waxbarashada oo hagitaan macallinka dadka. Sida darteed waxbarashada dadku waa qaali yahay, waxaynu isbarnay qorshaha waxbarashada oo kala duduwan si loo jawaabo su'aalka sida iyo goorma loo baro, si loo isticmaalo bajetarka waxbarashada dhaqaalaha, si uu uga dhigo baaritaanka waxbarashada shabakadda.", 'sv': 'Nyckeln till att bygga upp ett utvecklande dialogsystem i verkliga scenarier är att säkerställa en prisvärd online-dialog politisk inlärning, vilket kräver att online-inlärningsprocessen ska vara säker, effektiv och ekonomisk. Men i verkligheten, på grund av bristen på verkliga interaktionsdata, växer dialogsystemet vanligtvis långsamt. Dessutom leder den dåliga initiala dialogpolitiken lätt till dålig användarupplevelse och leder till att användarna inte attraheras att bidra med utbildningsdata, vilket gör inlärningsprocessen ohållbar. För att exakt beskriva detta föreslås två kvantitativa mått för att bedöma säkerhets- och effektivitetsfrågor. För att lösa det ohållbara inlärningsproblemet föreslog vi ett komplett ramverk för följeslagare med vägledning från den mänskliga läraren. Eftersom den mänskliga undervisningen är dyr jämförde vi olika undervisningssystem som besvarar frågan hur och när man ska undervisa, för att ekonomiskt utnyttja undervisningsbudgeten, så att online inlärningsprocessen blir överkomlig.', 'ta': 'உண்மையில் இருக்கும் போதுமான உரையாடல் முறைமையை உருவாக்குவதற்கான விசை என்னவென்றால் ஒரு சாத்தியமான இணைய உரையாடல் கொள்கையை கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும்,  ஆனால் உண்மையில், உண்மையில் உண்மையான இடைவெளியீட்டு தகவலின் காரணத்தால், உரையாடல் முறைமையில் மெதுவாக வளருக அதற்கும் மேலும், ஏழை ஆரம்ப உரையாடல் கொள்கையை எளிதாக மோசமான பயனர் அனுபவத்திற்கு வழிகாட்டுகிறது பயனர்களை இழுத்து பயிற்சியின் தரவை பங் இதை சரியாக வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு, இரண்டு கூற்று மெட்ரிக்கள் பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் விளைவு நிலையான கற்றல் பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய, நாம் ஒரு முழு நண்பர் பயிற்சி சட்டத்தை மனித ஆசிரியரிடமிருந்து நேர்வழி மனித கற்பிப்பு விலையானது என்பதால், நாம் பல கற்பிப்பு திட்டங்களை ஒப்பிட்டோம் கேள்விக்கு எப்படி மற்றும் எப்போது கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும் என்', 'ur': 'حقیقی دنیا کی سینارییوں میں ایک تکامل قابل گفتگو سیسٹم بنانے کی کلید یہ ہے کہ ایک قابل غیر قابل صحیح سینالیوں کی تعلیم کی اطمینان کرنا ہے، جس کی نیاز ہے کہ آنلاین کی تعلیم پرسس امن، اقتصادی اور اقتصادی ہو جائے۔ لیکن حقیقت میں، حقیقی تعاملات ڈیٹوں کی کمزوری کے باعث، ڈیلوگ سیستم معمولاً آسانی سے بڑھتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، کمزور شروع ڈالیلوگ پولیس آسانی سے برا کارساز کا تجربہ پہنچاتا ہے اور کارساز کو تعلیم دادہ کے ساتھ پکڑنے کے لئے پکڑنے کے لئے غلطی کا ذریعہ پہنچاتا ہے، اس لئے کہ تعلیم پروسس غلطی ہوتی ہے. اس کے مطابق دکھانے کے لئے دو منطقی متریک امنیت اور فعالیت مسائل کی آزمائش کے لئے پیشنهاد کیا جاتا ہے. اس غیرقابل تعلیم مشکل کو حل کرنے کے لئے ہم نے ایک کامل رفیق کی تعلیم فرمود کی پیشنهاد کی جو انسان کے معلم کی ہدایت میں شامل ہوتی ہے۔ انسان کی تعلیم گران ہے، ہم نے مختلف تعلیم طریقوں کی مقایسہ کی جو سوال کے جواب دیتے ہیں، کیسے اور کب تعلیم دیتے ہیں، اقتصادی طریقے سے تعلیم بوجٹ کا استعمال کرنا، یہاں تک کہ آنلاین کی تعلیم طریقے کو قابل ذمہ بناتے ہیں', 'uz': "Name Lekin aslida, haqiqatgina interfeys maʼlumotining kuchi sababi, muloqat tizimi oddiy sakkizda uzaydi. Ko'pchilik boshlash qoidasi yomon foydalanuvchi tajribalariga ega bo'ladi va foydalanuvchilarni taʼminlovchi maʼlumot bajarishga ishlatish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi va o'rganish jarayonini ishlatib boʻlmaydi. Buni tasavvur qilish uchun ikkita qiymati metrik muammolarni qiymatlashga talab qilinadi. Muammo o o'rganish muvaffaqiyatini o'rganish uchun biz inson o'qituvchidan qo'shilgan hamma kompyuterni o'rganish muammolarini o'rganishni talab qildik. Inson o'qituvchi qiymatdir, biz savol qanday va qanday o'rganishni o'rganish uchun muloqon qoliplariga qiymatimiz va o'rganishni o'rganish uchun o'qituvchining qismini o'rganish bajarishiga qo'llaniladik.", 'vi': 'Chìa khóa để xây dựng một hệ thống đối thoại có khả năng trong các tình huống thế giới thực là đảm bảo một cuộc học chính sách được mua chuộc trực tuyến, đòi hỏi quy trình học trực tuyến phải được an to àn, hiệu quả và kinh tế. Nhưng trong thực tế, do sự thiếu dữ liệu giao tiếp thực tế, hệ thống đối thoại thường phát triển chậm. Bên cạnh đó, một chính sách cuộc đối thoại ban đầu tồi tệ dễ dàng dẫn tới những kinh nghiệm xấu của người dùng và không thu hút người dùng để đóng góp dữ liệu về huấn luyện, vì thế tiến trình học không thể duy trì được. Để mô tả chính xác điều này, hai lượng tử được đề xuất để đánh giá các vấn đề an to àn và hiệu quả. Để giải quyết vấn đề học học không bền vững, chúng tôi đề xuất một bộ giáo dục đồng hành toàn diện, gồm sự hướng dẫn từ giáo viên con người. Bởi vì giáo dục con người rất tốn kém, chúng tôi so sánh các dự án giáo dục khác nhau trả lời câu hỏi dạy thế nào và khi nào, sử dụng ngân sách giảng dạy, để làm cho tiến trình học trực tuyến có giá trị.', 'da': 'Nøglen til at opbygge et udviklingssystem i virkelighedens scenarier er at sikre en overkommelig online dialog politisk læring, hvilket kræver, at online læringsprocessen er sikker, effektiv og økonomisk. Men i virkeligheden vokser dialogsystemet normalt langsomt på grund af manglen på reelle interaktionsdata. Desuden fører den dårlige indledende dialogpolitik let til dårlig brugeroplevelse og medfører manglende tiltrækning af brugere til at bidrage med uddannelsesdata, således at læringsprocessen ikke er bæredygtig. For nøjagtigt at beskrive dette foreslås der to kvantitative målinger for at vurdere sikkerheds- og effektivitetsspørgsmål. For at løse det uholdbare læringsproblem foreslog vi en komplet ledsagerundervisning ramme, der omfatter vejledning fra den menneskelige lærer. Da den menneskelige undervisning er dyr, sammenlignede vi forskellige undervisningsordninger, der besvarer spørgsmålet om, hvordan og hvornår man skal undervise, for økonomisk at udnytte undervisningsbudgetet, så det gør online læringsprocessen overkommelig.', 'nl': "De sleutel tot het opbouwen van een evolueerbaar dialoogsysteem in reële scenario's is om te zorgen voor een betaalbare online dialoogbeleidsvorming, waarbij het online leerproces veilig, efficiënt en economisch moet zijn. Maar in werkelijkheid, door de schaarste aan echte interactiegegevens, groeit het dialoogsysteem meestal langzaam. Bovendien leidt het slechte initiële dialoogbeleid gemakkelijk tot een slechte gebruikerservaring en leidt het ertoe dat gebruikers niet worden aangetrokken om opleidingsgegevens bij te dragen, zodat het leerproces niet duurzaam is. Om dit nauwkeurig weer te geven, worden twee kwantitatieve statistieken voorgesteld om veiligheids- en efficiëntiekwesties te beoordelen. Om het niet-duurzame leerprobleem op te lossen, hebben we een compleet begeleid onderwijskader voorgesteld dat de begeleiding van de menselijke leraar omvat. Omdat het menselijk onderwijs duur is, vergeleken we verschillende onderwijsschema's die beantwoorden aan de vraag hoe en wanneer te onderwijzen, om economisch gebruik te maken van onderwijsbudget, zodat het online leerproces betaalbaar wordt.", 'bg': 'Ключът към изграждането на развиваща се система за диалог в реални сценарии е да се осигури достъпно обучение по политика за диалог онлайн, което изисква процесът на обучение онлайн да бъде безопасен, ефективен и икономичен. Но в действителност, поради недостига на реални данни за взаимодействие, диалоговата система обикновено расте бавно. Освен това лошата политика за начален диалог лесно води до лошо потребителско преживяване и води до неуспех в привличането на потребителите да предоставят данни за обучение, така че учебният процес е неустойчив. За да се опише точно това, са предложени два количествени показателя за оценка на проблемите с безопасността и ефективността. За решаване на проблема с неустойчивото учене ние предложихме цялостна рамка за придружаващо преподаване, включваща ръководството на учителя. Тъй като човешкото преподаване е скъпо, сравнихме различни учебни схеми, отговарящи на въпроса как и кога да преподаваме, да използваме икономически бюджета за преподаване, така че да направим онлайн учебния процес достъпен.', 'de': 'Der Schlüssel zum Aufbau eines entwicklungsfähigen Dialogsystems in realen Szenarien besteht darin, ein erschwingliches Online-Dialoglernen sicherzustellen, das erfordert, dass der Online-Lernprozess sicher, effizient und wirtschaftlich ist. Aber in Wirklichkeit wächst das Dialogsystem aufgrund der Knappheit an realen Interaktionsdaten meist langsam. Außerdem führt die schlechte anfängliche Dialogpolitik leicht zu schlechter Benutzererfahrung und führt dazu, dass die Benutzer nicht dazu gebracht werden, Trainingsdaten beizusteuern, so dass der Lernprozess nicht nachhaltig ist. Um dies genau darzustellen, werden zwei quantitative Kennzahlen vorgeschlagen, um Sicherheits- und Effizienzprobleme zu bewerten. Um das nicht nachhaltige Lernproblem zu lösen, schlugen wir ein komplettes Begleitunterrichtssystem vor, das die Anleitung des menschlichen Lehrers beinhaltet. Da der menschliche Unterricht teuer ist, haben wir verschiedene Lehrpläne verglichen, um die Frage zu beantworten, wie und wann zu unterrichten, um das Lehrbudget wirtschaftlich zu nutzen, um den Online-Lernprozess erschwinglich zu machen.', 'id': 'Kunci untuk membangun sistem dialog yang bisa berevolusi dalam skenario dunia nyata adalah untuk memastikan pembelajaran kebijakan dialog on line yang pantas diterima, yang membutuhkan proses pembelajaran online untuk aman, efisien dan ekonomi. Tapi pada kenyataannya, karena kekurangan data interaksi nyata, sistem dialog biasanya tumbuh perlahan-lahan. Selain itu, kebijakan dialog awal yang buruk mudah menyebabkan pengalaman pengguna buruk dan mengalami kegagalan menarik pengguna untuk berkontribusi data pelatihan, sehingga proses belajar tidak bertahan. Untuk menggambarkan dengan akurat ini, dua metrik kuantitatif diusulkan untuk menilai masalah keselamatan dan efisiensi. Untuk memecahkan masalah pembelajaran yang tidak bertahan, kami mengusulkan cadangan pengajaran teman lengkap yang mengandung petunjuk dari guru manusia. Since the human teaching is expensive, we compared various teaching schemes answering the question how and when to teach, to economically utilize teaching budget, so that make the online learning process affordable.', 'ko': '현실 장면에서 진화 가능한 대화 시스템을 구축하는 관건은 부담스러운 온라인 대화 정책 학습을 확보하는 것이다. 이것은 온라인 학습 과정이 안전하고 효율적이며 경제적이어야 한다.그러나 현실에서는 진실한 상호작용 데이터가 부족하기 때문에 대화 시스템의 성장이 느리다.또한 엉망진창인 초기 대화 정책은 엉망진창인 사용자 체험을 초래하고 교육 데이터를 제공하지 못하기 때문에 학습 과정은 지속가능하지 않다.이 점을 정확하게 묘사하기 위해 안전과 효율을 평가하는 두 가지 정량 지표를 제시했다.지속가능하지 못한 학습 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 완전한 동반자 교육 틀을 제시하고 인류 교사의 지도를 결합시켰다.인공교학의 원가가 높기 때문에 우리는 각종 교학 방안을 비교하여 어떻게, 언제 교학할 것인가에 대한 질문에 대답하고 교학 예산을 경제적으로 활용하여 온라인 학습 과정을 부담스럽게 한다.', 'sw': 'Kifungu cha kutengeneza mfumo wa mazungumzo yanayoendelea katika hali halisi ya dunia ni kuhakikisha kujifunza sera ya mazungumzo ya mtandaoni, ambayo inahitaji mchakato wa kujifunza mtandaoni kuwa salama, ufanisi na kiuchumi. Lakini kwa kweli, kutokana na ghadhabu ya taarifa za usambazaji halisi, mfumo wa mazungumzo mara nyingi unaongezeka taratibu. Zaidi yake, sera maskini ya mazungumzo ya awali inapelekea uzoefu mbaya wa watumiaji na inashindwa kuwavutia watumiaji kuchangia taarifa za mafunzo, ili mchakato wa kujifunza hauwezekani. Ili kuonyesha kwa uhakika huu, mbinu mbili za kiasi zinapendekezwa kutathmini masuala ya usalama na ufanisi. Kwa kutatua tatizo la kujifunza lisilo na uwezekano, tulipendekeza mfumo kamili wa mshirika wa kujifundisha na muongozo wa mwalimu wa binadamu. Kwa kuwa mafunzo ya binadamu ni gharama, tulilinganisha mipango mbalimbali ya kufundisha kujibu swali jinsi na lini ya kufundisha, kutumia bajeti ya kufundisha kiuchumi, ili kuifanya mchakato wa kujifunza mtandaoni kuwa wa bure.', 'fa': 'کلیدی برای ساختن یک سیستم گفتگوی قابل توسعه در سیناریوهای دنیای واقعی این است که از یادگیری سیاست گفتگوی در خط قابل دسترسی داشته باشد، که نیاز به فرایند یادگیری آنلاین برای امن، موثرت و اقتصادی است. اما در حقیقت، به دلیل کمی داده های تعامل واقعی سیستم گفتگو معمولاً آهسته رشد می کند. علاوه بر این، سیاست اولین گفتگو ضعیف به آسانی به تجربه بدی از کاربر می\u200cرسد و شکست\u200cای از جذب کردن کاربران برای تولید داده\u200cهای آموزش، به نتیجه فرایند آموزش غیرقابل است. برای دقیقا نشان دادن این دو متری مقداری پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که مسائل امنیت و موثیت را ارزیابی کند. برای حل مشکل یادگیری غیرقابل قابل قابل استفاده، ما یک همکاری کامل پیشنهاد کردیم که چهارچوب یادگیری را از معلم انسان شامل کرده است. از آنجا که آموزش انسان گرون است، ما برنامه های آموزش مختلف را مقایسه کردیم که به سوال جواب دهند که چگونه و کی آموزش دهیم، به اقتصادی از بودجه آموزش استفاده کنیم، بنابراین فرایند آموزش آنلاین را به دسترسی می دهیم.', 'af': "Die sleutel om 'n ontwikkelbare dialoog stelsel te bou in reël-wêreld scenarios is om 'n beskikbaar op-lyn dialoog beleid leer te verseker, wat die op-lyn leerproses vereis om veilig, effektief en ekonomiese te wees. Maar in werklikheid, vanweë die skande van werklike interaksie data, groei die dialoog stelsel gewoonlik stadig. Buitend, die arme aanvanklike dialoog beleid lei maklik na sleg gebruiker erfaring en bring 'n mislukking van die aantrek van gebruikers om onderwerp data te bydra, sodat die onderwerp proses onmoontlik is. Om dit presies te vertoon, word twee kvantitatiewe metries voorgestel om veiligheid en effektiviteit-probleem te evalueer. Om die onbehoeftige leerprobleem te los, het ons 'n volledige maatskapper voorgestel wat die gids van die menslike onderwyser ingesluit het. Omdat die menslike onderring koste is, vergelyk ons verskeie onderringsskeme wat die vraag antwoord hoe en wanneer om te leer, om ekonomies te gebruik onderringsbudžet, sodat die online leersproses beskikbaar maak.", 'hr': 'Ključ za izgradnju razvijenog dijalogovog sustava u scenarijima stvarnog svijeta je osigurati dostupno učenje politike o dijalogu na internetu, što zahtijeva da proces učenja na internetu bude siguran, učinkovit i gospodarski. Ali u stvarnosti, zbog nedostatka pravih podataka o interakciji, dijalog se obično polako raste. Osim toga, siromašna početna politika dijaloga lako vodi do lošeg iskustva korisnika i uzrokuje neuspjeh privlačenja korisnika da doprinose podacima obuke, tako da je proces učenja neprestabilan. Da bi to precizno pokazalo, predlaže se dvije kvantitativne metrike za procjenu pitanja sigurnosti i učinkovitosti. Za rješavanje neprestabilnog problem a učenja, predložili smo potpuni okvir učenja kompanija koji uključuje upute ljudskog učitelja. Budući da je ljudsko učenje skupo, usporedili smo različite programe učenja koji odgovaraju na pitanje kako i kada učiti, ekonomički iskoristiti proračun učenja, tako da činimo internetski proces učenja dostupnim.', 'sq': 'The key to building an evolvable dialogue system in real-world scenarios is to ensure an affordable on-line dialogue policy learning, which requires the on-line learning process to be safe, efficient and economical.  Por në realitet, për shkak të mungesës së të dhënave reale të ndërveprimit, sistemi i dialogut zakonisht rritet ngadalë. Përveç kësaj, politika e dobët e dialogut fillestar lehtë çon në përvojë të keqe të përdoruesve dhe bën një dështim në tërheqjen e përdoruesve për të kontribuar të dhënat e trajnimit, kështu që procesi i mësimit është i paqëndrueshëm. Për të përshkruar saktësisht këtë, janë propozuar dy metrika kuantitative për të vlerësuar çështjet e sigurisë dhe efektshmërisë. For solving the unsustainable learning problem, we proposed a complete companion teaching framework incorporating the guidance from the human teacher.  Meqë mësimi njerëzor është i shtrenjtë, ne krahasuam skema të ndryshme mësimi që përgjigjen pyetjes se si dhe kur të mësojmë, të përdorim ekonomikisht buxhetin e mësimit, në mënyrë që procesi i mësimit online të bëhet i pranueshëm.', 'hy': 'Իրական աշխարհի սցենարների ընթացքում զարգացող հաղորդակցման համակարգի կառուցվածքի կարևորությունը կայանում է նրանում, որ ապահովում է առցանց հաղորդակցվող քաղաքականության ուսումնասիրություն, որը պահանջում է, որ առցանց ուսումնասիրության գործընթաց Բայց իրականում, իրական փոխազդեցության տվյալների բացակայության պատճառով, երկխոսային համակարգը սովորաբար դանդաղ է աճում: Ավելին, վատ սկզբնական քաղաքականությունը հեշտությամբ հանգեցնում է վատ օգտագործողների փորձի և ձախողվում է օգտագործողներին ներդրել ուսուցման տվյալներ, որպեսզի ուսուցման գործընթացը անկայուն լինի: Սա ճշգրիտ նկարագրելու համար առաջարկում են երկու քանակական չափով վտանգության և արդյունավետության խնդիրների գնահատելու համար: Որպեսզի լուծենք անկայուն ուսուցման խնդիրը, մենք առաջարկեցինք ամբողջական ընկերական ուսուցման շրջանակ, որը ներառում է մարդկային ուսուցչի ուղղությունը: Քանի որ մարդկային ուսուցման թանկ է, մենք համեմատեցինք տարբեր ուսուցման ծրագրեր, որոնք պատասխանում են հարցին, թե ինչպես և երբ ուսուցանել, տնտեսաբար օգտագործել ուսուցման բյուջեն, որպեսզի առցանց ուսուցման գործընթացը հասանելի լինի:', 'am': 'በዓለም ስዕይታዎች ውስጥ የማይቻለውን የdialog ስርዓት መሠረት ቁልፈት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን እውነት፣ የእውነቱ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ዳታ ምክንያት ጥቁር ሲሆን የመdialog ስርዓት እየተዘገየ ይሄዳል፡፡ በተጨማሪም የድሀ መጀመሪያ ማኅበረሰብ ፖለቲካ መጥፎ ተጠቃሚዎች እውቀት ይሄዳል፡፡ ለዚህ ማስታወቂያ፣ ሁለት ምርጫዎች የደኅንነት እና የጥቅም ጉዳይ ለመሻል ይገልጻሉ፡፡ የማይቻለውን ትምህርት መከራ ለመፍታት፣ ከሰው አስተማሪ መምሪያ እንዲያስተምር የፍጹም ጉዳይ አስተማርነው ፈትነናል፡፡ የሰው ትምህርት ሀብት ከሆነ፣ የኢንተርኔን ትምህርት መግለጫ እንዴት እና እንዴት እና መግለጫ፣ የትምህርት ግንኙነት በሀብት ለመጠቀም፣ የኢንተርኔት ትምህርት ፕሮግራሙን ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': 'Gerçek dünýäde ýetişikli bir dialog sistemasyny düzenlemek üçin wajyp şudyr. Çaltylyk sistemasynda elmäge mümkin, täsirli we ekonomik bolmagy gerek. Emma aslynda, çyndanam faýllaryň azalygyna sebäbi, dialogyň sistemasy adatça ýuwaşlyk bilen ösýär. Munuň ýagdaýynda, zavally başlangyç dialoog politikasy ýaman ýokary uly adamlaryň tecrübüni oňat getirýär we ullançylaryň muýaramçylyk maglumatyna kömekleşmegi boýunça getirýär şeýle üçin öwrenmek prosesi durmaýar. Bunu dogry görkezmek üçin, güvenlik we etkinlik meselelerini çözmek üçin iki sanat metrik teklip edildi. Durjalyk öwrenmäge kynçylygy çözmek üçin, adam mugallymynyň gurultaýyny ýazmak üçin komplette bir dost teklip etdik. Adamlar öwrenmegi gymmat bolandygyna sebäbi, biz dürli öwrenme meýdanlaryny nähili we haçan öwretmegiňe jogap berjek, ekonomiki öwrenme budžetyny ulanmak üçin, şeýle üçin internetde öwrenme prosesini mümkin edip bilýäris.', 'bn': 'বাস্তব বিশ্বের দৃশ্যের মধ্যে একটি বিবর্তনযোগ্য ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম নির্মাণের চাবিকাঠি হচ্ছে একটি অনলাইন ডায়ালগের নীতি শিক্ষা নিশ্চিত করার জন্য, যা অন কিন্তু বাস্তবতা হচ্ছে, সত্যিকারের বাস্তবতার কারণে এই ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম ধীরে ধীরে বাড়ছে। এছাড়াও, দরিদ্র প্রাথমিক ডায়ালগের নীতি সহজে খারাপ অভিজ্ঞতার কাছে নিয়ে যায় এবং ব্যবহারকারীদের আকর্ষণ করার ব্যর্থ হয়েছে প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্য সঠিকভাবে এই বিষয়টি প্রকাশ করার জন্য, দুই পরিমাণ মেট্রিক প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে নিরাপত্তা এবং কার্যকর বিষয়ের মূল্য। শিক্ষার সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য আমরা মানুষের শিক্ষকের কাছ থেকে হেদায়েতের সাথে যোগাযোগ করার প্রস্তাব দিয়েছিলাম। যেহেতু মানুষের শিক্ষা বেশী দাম, আমরা প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে বিভিন্ন শিক্ষা পরিকল্পনার তুলনা করি কিভাবে শিক্ষা দিতে এবং কখন শিক্ষা দিতে পারি, অর', 'bs': 'Ključ za izgradnju razvijenog dijalogskog sistema u scenarijima stvarnog svijeta je osigurati dostupno učenje politike o dialogu na internetu, što zahtijeva da proces učenja na internetu bude siguran, efikasan i ekonomski. Ali u stvarnosti, zbog nedostatka pravih podataka o interakciji, dijalog se obično polako raste. Osim toga, siromašna inicijalna politika dijaloga lako vodi do lošeg iskustva korisnika i uzrokuje neuspjeh privlačenja korisnika da doprinesu podacima obuke, tako da je proces učenja neprestabilan. Da bi to precizno pokazalo, predlaže se dvije kvantitativne metrike za procjenu pitanja sigurnosti i učinkovitosti. Za rješavanje neprestabilnog problem a učenja, predložili smo potpuni okvir učenja kompanija koji uključuje vodstvo ljudskog učitelja. Budući da je ljudsko učenje skupo, usporedili smo različite šeme učenja koji odgovaraju na pitanje kako i kada da učimo, ekonomski korištenjem budžeta učenja, tako da će internetski proces učenja biti dostupni.', 'ca': "La clau per construir un sistema de diàleg evolucionable en escenaris del món real és assegurar un aprenentatge de polítices de diàleg on-line abordable, que requereix que el procés d'aprenentatge on-line sigui segur, eficient i econòmic. Però en realitat, a causa de l'escassetat de dades d'interacció real, el sistema de diàleg normalment creix lentament. A més, la mala política de diàleg inicial fàcilment porta a una mala experiència d'usuari i provoca un fracàs en atraure els usuaris per aportar dades d'entrenament, de manera que el procés d'aprenentatge no és sostenible. Per descriure-ho amb precisió, es proponen dues mètriques quantitatives per avaluar problemes de seguretat i eficiència. Per resoldre el problem a d'aprenentatge insostenible, vam proposar un marc d'ensenyament company complet incorporant la orientació del professor humà. Com que l'ensenyament humà és caro, vam comparar diversos esquemes d'ensenyament responent a la pregunta com i quan ensenyar, utilitzar econòmicament el pressupost d'ensenyament, de manera que el procés d'aprenentatge en línia sigui abordable.", 'cs': 'Klíčem k budování vyvíjejícího se systému dialogu v reálném světě je zajistit cenově dostupné učení politiky on-line dialogu, které vyžaduje, aby proces on-line učení byl bezpečný, efektivní a hospodárný. Ale ve skutečnosti, vzhledem k nedostatku reálných interakčních dat, dialogový systém obvykle roste pomalu. Kromě toho špatná politika počátečního dialogu snadno vede ke špatné uživatelské zkušenosti a způsobuje selhání přilákat uživatele, aby přispívali údaje o školení, takže proces učení není udržitelný. K přesnému popisu jsou navrženy dvě kvantitativní metriky pro posouzení problémů bezpečnosti a efektivity. Pro řešení neudržitelného problému učení jsme navrhli kompletní doprovodný výukový rámec zahrnující pokyny od lidského učitele. Vzhledem k tomu, že lidská výuka je drahá, porovnali jsme různé výukové schémata odpovídající na otázku, jak a kdy učit, ekonomicky využít výukový rozpočet, aby byl on-line proces učení dostupný.', 'et': 'Areneva dialoogisüsteemi loomise võti reaalsetes stsenaariumides on tagada taskukohane on-line dialoogi poliitikaõpe, mis nõuab on-line õppeprotsessi ohutust, tõhusust ja ökonoomsust. Tegelikult aga reaalsete interaktsiooniandmete nappuse tõttu kasvab dialoogisüsteem tavaliselt aeglaselt. Lisaks põhjustab halb esialgse dialoogi poliitika kergesti halba kasutajakogemust ja ebaõnnestub meelitada kasutajaid koolitusandmeid andma, mistõttu õppeprotsess ei ole jätkusuutlik. Selle täpseks kirjeldamiseks pakutakse välja kaks kvantitatiivset mõõdikut ohutuse ja tõhususe küsimuste hindamiseks. Säästmatu õppeprobleemi lahendamiseks pakkusime välja täieliku kaasõpetamise raamistiku, mis sisaldab inimõpetaja juhiseid. Kuna inimõpetamine on kallis, võrdlesime erinevaid õpetamisskeeme, mis vastavad küsimusele, kuidas ja millal õpetada, et majanduslikult kasutada õpetamiseelarvet, et muuta online õppeprotsess taskukohaseks.', 'az': 'Gerçek dünya senaryolarında dəyişiklik sistemi in şa edə biləcək düzgün bir dəyişiklik düzgün öyrənməkdir ki, on line öyrənmə prosesinin təhlükəsizlik, etkilik və ekonomik olmasını istəyir. Amma həqiqətdə, həqiqət tərəfindən istifadə edilən məlumatların zəif olmasına görə dijalog sistemi genellikle yavaş artır. Yaxşı başlanğıç dialoğu siyasəti çox asanlıqla istifadəçilərin təcrübəsini və istifadəçilərin təcrübə məlumatlarına kömək etməsi üçün istifadəçilərin təcrübəsini təhrif etməsini fərqləndirir. Bunu doğrudan göstərmək üçün iki kvantitatlı metrik təhlükəsizlik və etkinlik məsələlərini təsdiqləmək üçün təklif edilir. Əzmətsiz öyrənmə problemini çəkmək üçün insan müəllimindən doğru yolu a çan kompleks öyrənmə framework ünü təbliğ etdik. İnsan öyrənməsi mal olduğuna görə, biz müxtəlif öyrənmə schemlarını, nə vaxt öyrənmək və nə vaxt öyrənmək, öyrənmək budžetını ekonomik olaraq istifadə etmək üçün, onlayn öyrənmə prosesini müəyyən edərik.', 'fi': 'Avain kehittyvän vuoropuhelujärjestelmän rakentamiseen reaalimaailman skenaarioissa on varmistaa kohtuuhintainen online-vuoropuhelupoliittinen oppiminen, joka edellyttää online-oppimisprosessin olevan turvallinen, tehokas ja taloudellinen. Todellisen vuorovaikutustiedon niukkuuden vuoksi dialogijärjestelmä kasvaa kuitenkin yleensä hitaasti. Lisäksi huono alustava vuoropuhelupolitiikka johtaa helposti huonoon käyttäjäkokemukseen ja epäonnistuu houkuttelemaan käyttäjiä antamaan koulutustietoja, joten oppimisprosessi on kestämätön. Tämän kuvaamiseksi ehdotetaan kahta kvantitatiivista mittaria turvallisuuden ja tehokkuuden arvioimiseksi. Kestämättömän oppimisongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotimme täydellistä rinnakkaisopetusta, johon sisältyi ihmisopettajan opastus. Koska ihmisopetus on kallista, vertasimme erilaisia opetusohjelmia vastaamaan kysymykseen miten ja milloin opettaa, hyödyntää opetusbudjettia taloudellisesti, jotta verkko-oppimisprosessi olisi edullinen.', 'sk': 'Ključ za vzpostavitev razvijajočega se sistema dialoga v realnih scenarijih je zagotoviti cenovno dostopno učenje o politiki spletnega dialoga, ki zahteva varnost, učinkovitost in ekonomičnost spletnega učenja. V resnici pa zaradi pomanjkanja dejanskih interakcijskih podatkov sistem dialoga običajno raste počasi. Poleg tega slaba politika začetnega dialoga zlahka vodi v slabo uporabniško izkušnjo in povzroči neuspeh pritegnitve uporabnikov k prispevanju podatkov o usposabljanju, tako da je učni proces netrajnosten. Da bi to natančno prikazali, sta predlagani dve kvantitativni meritvi za oceno vprašanj varnosti in učinkovitosti. Za reševanje netrajnostnega učnega problema smo predlagali celoten spremljevalni okvir učenja, ki vključuje vodenje človeškega učitelja. Ker je človeško poučevanje drago, smo primerjali različne programe poučevanja, ki so odgovorili na vprašanje, kako in kdaj poučevati, da bi ekonomsko izkoristili proračun poučevanja, tako da bi bil spletni učni proces dostopen.', 'he': 'המפתח לבניין מערכת דיאלוג מתפתחת בתרחישים בעולם האמיתי הוא להבטיח לימוד מדיניות דיאלוג באינטרנט שכיר, שדורשת את תהליך הלימוד באינטרנט להיות בטוח, יעיל ובכלכלי. אבל במציאות, בגלל חוסר נתוני אינטראקציה אמיתיים, מערכת הדיולוג בדרך כלל גדלה לאט. חוץ מזה, מדיניות הדיולוג הראשוני העלובה מובילה בקלות לניסיון משתמש רע ולא מושך כישלון למשוך משתמשים לתרום נתוני אימון, כך שהתהליך הלימודים אינו קבל. כדי לתאר את זה בצורה מדויקת, שני מטריות קונטיביות מוצעות כדי להעריך בעיות ביטחון ויעילות. כדי לפתור את בעיית הלימודים הלא קבועה, הצענו מסגרת לימוד חברה מלאה שמכילה את ההדרכה מהמורה האנושית. מכיוון שהלימוד האנושי יקר, השוונו תכניות לימוד שונות שעובדות על השאלה איך ומתי ללמד, להשתמש בכוחות כלכלית בתקציב לימוד, כך שיעשו את תהליך הלימוד באינטרנט גבוה.', 'ha': "Maɓalli wa ka gina wani tsari na zauren akwatin bayani wanda bã ya iya sãwõwa a cikin halin-duniya yana cikin shirin halin-halin shine yana kasa yin yaƙĩni da tsari ga lõkaci na zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani masu iya daidai, da kuma yana buƙata karkacin da za'a iya tsari, mai amfani da kuma kiɓalli Amma da gaskiyar, sabo da haske na danne masu husũma masu gaske, yana ƙaranci cikin zauren akwatin bayani don a yi sauri. Babu, siyar zauren zauren ta farko na zauren akwatin bayani na bayani na mai amfani da shi yana ƙara, kuma ana kasa zartar da masu amfani da shi dõmin su ƙara danne masu amfani da shi, don haka kuma an kasa yin amfani da shi. To, dõmin ka ƙayyade wannan, an buƙace kashi biyu masu ƙayyade masu aminci da fassara. To, da ya raba wa matabbata da ba za'a karɓi ba, sai muka buƙata wani kamma ma'abũcin da aka sanar da shi da shiryarwa daga ma'abũcin mutum. Kayya da abincin mutum yana da kyautar, sai mu sambata, ko da za mu yi wa'azi na shiryoyin ayuka masu bin tambayi yadda da za'a sanar da shi, kuma a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da bajetarwa masu bara na kashifa, don haka, za'a iya zama mai qiimaki ga aikin da za'a karɓi kwamfyutan ta.", 'jv': 'Apa kanggo nggawe sistem sing dialoog sing bisa akeh dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno ning dunya iki dadi kanggo ngerasakno politik sing beraksi on line Nanging ono langkung rawuh dumateng, dadi kanggo nganggo akeh operasi dadi, sistem dialog pada basa sing bisa basa dong. Yo wis malah, dialog sing diangkat sing paling dongke sampeyan sedhaya padha akeh nguasah karo ingkang sampeyan sing gak bener lan nguasah pengguna kuwi ora bisa nguasah data atuamane, dadi sampeyan sampeyan ingkang ora bisa gabung. deep Awak dhéwé nglanggar perbudhakan sing ora iso nggawe, awak dhéwé ngerusani cara-cara sing nyimpen tur angel sing nyimpen mruput. Dino sampeyan ing pancen dumadhi, kita nggawe gerakan kelas telu nggawe sistem sing nyimpen winih lan cejane sing diraluk, nggawe sistem sing nggawe sistem sistem sing na sekondi winih, lan akeh iso nggawe sistem sing na sekondi winih, dadi sing bisa nggawe sistem sing takon online iki', 'bo': 'The key to building an evolvable dialog system in real-world scenarios is to ensure an affordable on-line dialog policy learning, which requires the online learning process to be safe, efficient and economical. འོན་ཀྱང་། དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་དངོས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྷན་མེད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཌའི་ལོག་ལག་གིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནམ་གཏོང་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ཁོང་ཚོའི་འགོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་تجربན་བྱས་ཉེར་བ་དང་ནང་ འདི་ལྟར་པར་ངེས་པར་ཨང་རྩིས་ཡོད་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བདེ་འཇལ་དང་སྐྱོན་རུང་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས ང་ཚོས་མ་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་དང་། མི་མང་གི་སློབ་འཛུགས་སྟངས་དང་ལས་ཀར་ཆེ་བས། ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མི་འདྲ་རྒྱའི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་ལན་པའི་རེ་བ་དང་ཅི་སློབ་སྐབས། དཔལ་འབྱོར་གྱིས་'}
{'en': 'Generating High-Quality and Informative Conversation Responses with Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'ar': 'توليد استجابات محادثة إعلامية عالية الجودة باستخدام نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل', 'fr': 'Générer des réponses de conversation informatives et de haute qualité avec des modèles séquence-à-séquence', 'pt': 'Gerando respostas de conversa informativas e de alta qualidade com modelos de sequência a sequência', 'es': 'Generación de respuestas de conversación informativas y de alta calidad con modelos de secuencia a secuencia', 'ja': 'シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルを使用した高品質で有益な会話応答の生成', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल के साथ उच्च गुणवत्ता और जानकारीपूर्ण वार्तालाप प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करना', 'zh': '以序至序高质量而信富之应也', 'ru': 'Генерирование качественных и информативных ответов на вопросы в ходе бесед с использованием моделей последовательности в последовательности', 'ga': 'Freagraí Comhrá Ardchaighdeáin agus Faisnéiseacha a Ghiniúint le Múnlaí Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh', 'hu': 'Kiváló minőségű és információs beszélgetési válaszok generálása szekvencia-szekvencia modellekkel', 'el': 'Δημιουργία υψηλής ποιότητας και πληροφοριακών απαντήσεων συνομιλίας με μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία', 'it': 'Generare risposte di conversazione informative e di alta qualità con modelli sequenziali', 'lt': 'Generating High-Quality and Informative Conversation Responses with Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'kk': 'Жоғары сапа және мәліметті сөйлесу жауаптарын реттеу үлгілерімен құру', 'ms': 'Menjana Balasan Perbualan Kualiti Tinggi dan Informatif dengan Model Kelajuan-ke-Kelajuan', 'mk': 'Генерирање висококвалитетни и информативни одговори на конверзација со модели од секвенција до секвенција', 'ml': 'ഉയരത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും വിവരങ്ങളുമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Risponsi ta’ Kwalità Għolja u ta’ Konverżjoni Informattiva b’Mudelli ta’ Sekwenza għal Sekwenza', 'no': 'Lagar høg kvalitet og informativ samtalesvar med sekvens- til- sekvensmodeller', 'mn': 'Хамгийн өндөр чанар, мэдээллийн ярилцлагын хариулт нь дарааллаас дарааллаар загвартай', 'pl': 'Generowanie wysokiej jakości i informacyjnych odpowiedzi na rozmowy za pomocą modeli sekwencji do sekwencji', 'ro': 'Generarea de răspunsuri de conversație de înaltă calitate și informative cu modele secvență-la-secvență', 'ka': 'მაღალი კავილეტი და ინფორმაციური პარამეტრების პარამეტრების შექმნა შემდეგ შემდეგ მოდელებით', 'sr': 'Napravljanje odgovora za visoke kvalitete i informativne razgovore sa modelima sekvence do sekvence', 'si': 'උත්සත්වය සහ තොරතුරු සංවාද ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය නිර්මාණය කරනවා', 'so': 'Generating Jawaab sare iyo Informative conversation with Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'sv': 'Generera högkvalitativa och informativa konversationssvar med sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller', 'ta': 'உயர்தரம் மற்றும் தகவல் பேச்சு பதில் உருவாக்குதல் வரிசை மாதிரிகளுடன்', 'ur': 'High-Quality اور Informative Conversation Responses with Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tạo phản ứng chuyển đổi chất lượng cao và báo động với chế độ lặp', 'bg': 'Генериране на висококачествени и информативни разговорни отговори с модели последователност към последователност', 'hr': 'Generiranje odgovora za visoke kvalitete i informativne razgovore sa modelima sekvence do sekvence', 'nl': 'Hoogwaardige en informatieve gespreksreacties genereren met sequence-to-sequence modellen', 'da': 'Generering af høj kvalitet og informative samtalesvar med sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller', 'ko': '시퀀스를 사용하여 시퀀스 모델에 대해 고품질과 정보가 풍부한 대화 응답을 생성합니다', 'de': 'Generieren von qualitativ hochwertigen und informativen Gesprächsreaktionen mit Sequence-to-Sequence Modellen', 'fa': 'ایجاد پاسخ\u200cهای گفتگوی کیفیت بالا و اطلاعات با مدل\u200cهای بعدی و بعدی', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Mazungumzo ya Kuu na Mawasiliano ya Habari kwa Utawala', 'id': 'Menjana Respon Konversasi Kualitas Tinggi dan Informatif dengan Model Sekuensi-ke-Sekuensi', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'tr': 'Yüksek kaliwatly we Maglumaty Qonuşma Responseleri Squence-to-sequence Modeller bilen Bejer', 'hy': 'Գերցնում է բարձր որակի և տեղեկատվական հաղորդակցման արձագանքներ հաջորդակցման մոդելների հետ', 'az': 'Yüksek-kaliteli və Informativ Qonuşma cavabları Sequence-to-Sequence Modelləri ilə Yaratılır', 'af': 'Genereer Hoog- Kwaliteit en Informatiewe Gespraak Antwoordes met Sequence- to- Sequence Models', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i përgjigjeve të cilësisë së lartë dhe të konversimit informativ me modele të pasojë në pasojë', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেল দিয়ে উচ্চমান এবং তথ্যাত্রিক কথোপকথন প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "generar respostes d'alta qualitat i de conversa informativa amb models de seqüència a seqüència", 'cs': 'Generování vysoce kvalitních a informačních reakcí na konverzaci s modely sekvence na sekvenci', 'fi': 'Laadukkaiden ja informatiivisten keskusteluvastausten luominen sekvenssimallien avulla', 'bs': 'Napravljanje odgovora za visoke kvalitete i informativne razgovore sa modelima sekvence do sekvence', 'et': 'Kvaliteetsete ja informatiivsete vestlusvastuste genereerimine järjestusest järjestuseni mudelitega', 'jv': 'Gworongi Normal-Quality lan Informational conversations responses karo SeSeSence-to-Seyene model', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje visokokakovostnih in informativnih odzivov na pogovor z modeli od zaporedja do zaporedja', 'he': 'יוצר תגובות שיחה מיוחדות ומיודעות גבוהות עם דוגמנים של רצף למרצף', 'ha': 'Mai ƙididdige Babbar-Tsarin da Agaji', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་མཐོ་རིམ་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གཏོང་གླེང་སྒྲུམ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ལ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-sequence models have been applied to the conversation response generation problem where the source sequence is the conversation history and the target sequence is the response. Unlike translation, conversation responding is inherently creative. The generation of long, informative, coherent, and diverse responses remains a hard task. In this work, we focus on the single turn setting. We add self-attention to the decoder to maintain coherence in longer responses, and we propose a practical approach, called the glimpse-model, for scaling to large datasets. We introduce a stochastic beam-search algorithm with segment-by-segment reranking which lets us inject diversity earlier in the generation process. We trained on a combined data set of over 2.3B conversation messages mined from the web. In human evaluation studies, our method produces longer responses overall, with a higher proportion rated as acceptable and excellent as length increases, compared to baseline sequence-to-sequence models with explicit length-promotion. A back-off strategy produces better responses overall, in the full spectrum of lengths.', 'ar': 'تم تطبيق نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل على مشكلة إنشاء استجابة المحادثة حيث يكون تسلسل المصدر هو محفوظات المحادثة والتسلسل الهدف هو الاستجابة. على عكس الترجمة ، فإن الرد على المحادثة إبداعي بطبيعته. لا يزال توليد استجابات طويلة وغنية بالمعلومات ومتماسكة ومتنوعة مهمة صعبة. في هذا العمل ، نركز على إعداد المنعطف الفردي. نضيف الانتباه الذاتي إلى وحدة فك التشفير للحفاظ على الاتساق في الاستجابات الأطول ، ونقترح نهجًا عمليًا ، يسمى نموذج اللمحة ، للتوسع في مجموعات البيانات الكبيرة. نقدم خوارزمية عشوائية للبحث عن الشعاع مع إعادة ترتيب كل جزء على حدة مما يتيح لنا ضخ التنوع في وقت مبكر في عملية التوليد. لقد تدربنا على مجموعة بيانات مجمعة تضم أكثر من 2.3 مليار رسالة محادثة مستخرجة من الويب. في دراسات التقييم البشري ، ينتج عن طريقتنا استجابات أطول بشكل عام ، مع تصنيف نسبة أعلى على أنها مقبولة وممتازة مع زيادة الطول ، مقارنةً بنماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل الأساسية مع تعزيز واضح للطول. ينتج عن استراتيجية التراجع استجابات أفضل بشكل عام ، في مجموعة كاملة من الأطوال.', 'es': 'Se han aplicado modelos de secuencia a secuencia al problema de generación de respuestas de conversación donde la secuencia de origen es el historial de conversación y la secuencia de destino es la respuesta. A diferencia de la traducción, responder a una conversación es inherentemente creativa. La generación de respuestas largas, informativas, coherentes y diversas sigue siendo una tarea difícil. En este trabajo, nos centramos en la configuración de un solo giro. Añadimos autoatención al decodificador para mantener la coherencia en respuestas más largas, y proponemos un enfoque práctico, llamado modelo glimpse, para escalar a grandes conjuntos de datos. Introducimos un algoritmo estocástico de búsqueda de haces con reordenamiento segmento por segmento que nos permite inyectar diversidad antes en el proceso de generación. Entrenamos en un conjunto de datos combinados de más de 2.3 millones de mensajes de conversación extraídos de la web. En estudios de evaluación en humanos, nuestro método produce respuestas más largas en general, con una mayor proporción calificada como aceptable y excelente a medida que aumenta la longitud, en comparación con los modelos de referencia de secuencia a secuencia con promoción explícita de la longitud. Una estrategia de retroceso produce mejores respuestas en general, en todo el espectro de longitudes.', 'fr': "Des modèles de séquence à séquence ont été appliqués au problème de génération de réponse de conversation où la séquence source est l'historique de conversation et la séquence cible est la réponse. Contrairement à la traduction, la réponse à une conversation est intrinsèquement créative. La génération de réponses longues, informatives, cohérentes et diversifiées reste une tâche ardue. Dans ce travail, nous nous concentrons sur le réglage du tour unique. Nous ajoutons une attention personnelle au décodeur pour maintenir la cohérence des réponses plus longues, et nous proposons une approche pratique, appelée modèle d'aperçu, pour la mise à l'échelle à de grands ensembles de données. Nous introduisons un algorithme de recherche de faisceau stochastique avec un nouveau classement segment par segment qui nous permet d'injecter de la diversité plus tôt dans le processus de génération. Nous nous sommes entraînés sur un ensemble de données combinées de plus de 2,3 milliards de messages de conversation extraits du Web. Dans les études d'évaluation humaine, notre méthode produit globalement des réponses plus longues, avec une proportion plus élevée jugée acceptable et excellente à mesure que la longueur augmente, par rapport aux modèles séquence à séquence de base avec une promotion explicite de la longueur. Une stratégie de retrait produit de meilleures réponses dans l'ensemble, dans toute la gamme des longueurs.", 'pt': 'Modelos de sequência a sequência foram aplicados ao problema de geração de resposta de conversa, em que a sequência de origem é o histórico da conversa e a sequência de destino é a resposta. Ao contrário da tradução, a resposta à conversa é inerentemente criativa. A geração de respostas longas, informativas, coerentes e diversas continua sendo uma tarefa árdua. Neste trabalho, focamos na configuração de volta única. Adicionamos autoatenção ao decodificador para manter a coerência em respostas mais longas e propomos uma abordagem prática, chamada de modelo de vislumbre, para dimensionar para grandes conjuntos de dados. Introduzimos um algoritmo de busca de feixe estocástico com reclassificação segmento a segmento que nos permite injetar diversidade mais cedo no processo de geração. Treinamos em um conjunto de dados combinado de mais de 2,3 bilhões de mensagens de conversa extraídas da web. Em estudos de avaliação em humanos, nosso método produz respostas mais longas em geral, com uma proporção mais alta classificada como aceitável e excelente à medida que o comprimento aumenta, em comparação com os modelos de sequência a sequência de linha de base com promoção explícita de comprimento. Uma estratégia de recuo produz melhores respostas em geral, em todo o espectro de comprimentos.', 'ja': 'ソースシーケンスが会話履歴であり、ターゲットシーケンスが応答である会話応答生成問題に、シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルが適用されている。 翻訳とは異なり、会話に対応することは本質的に創造的です。 長く、情報に富み、一貫性のある、多様な応答の生成は、依然として困難な課題である。 本作ではシングルターンの設定に焦点を当てている。 より長い応答の一貫性を維持するためにデコーダーに自己注目を加え、大規模なデータセットにスケーリングするための垣間見モデルと呼ばれる実用的なアプローチを提案します。 セグメントごとの再ランキングを備えた確率的ビーム検索アルゴリズムを導入し、生成プロセスの早い段階で多様性を注入することができます。 ウェブから収集された23億以上の会話メッセージを組み合わせたデータセットについてトレーニングを行いました。 ヒト評価研究において、本方法は、明示的な長さ昇格を有するベースライン配列間シーケンスモデルと比較して、全体的に長い応答を生成し、長さが増加するにつれて許容可能で優れていると評価される高い割合を有する。 バックオフ戦略は、長さのフルスペクトルで、全体的により良い応答を生み出します。', 'ru': 'Модели последовательности-последовательности были применены к задаче генерации ответа на разговор, где исходная последовательность - это история разговора, а целевая последовательность - это ответ. В отличие от перевода, ответ на разговор по своей сути является творческим. Выработка длительных, содержательных, последовательных и разнообразных мер реагирования остается сложной задачей. В этой работе мы фокусируемся на настройке одиночного поворота. Мы добавляем самовнимание к декодеру для поддержания согласованности в более длинных ответах и предлагаем практический подход, называемый моделью проблеска, для масштабирования больших наборов данных. Мы вводим алгоритм стохастического поиска луча с сегментарным повторным ранжированием, который позволяет нам вводить разнообразие на более ранних этапах процесса генерации. Мы обучались работе с объединенным набором данных, состоящим из более чем 2.3B сообщений для бесед, добываемых из сети. В исследованиях по оценке человека наш метод дает более длинные ответы в целом, с более высокой долей, оцененной как приемлемая и отличная по мере увеличения длины, по сравнению с базовыми моделями последовательности к последовательности с явным продвижением по длине. Стратегия обратной связи дает лучшие ответы в целом, в полном спектре длин.', 'zh': '序至序已应于会话,其源序则会话历史记录,趋序则应。 与译不同,应质为创造性。 生久、息富、贯、多样化之报犹一剧也。 于是专注单圈置。 吾将自注于解码器,以长应一致性,而建一以为一瞥形之实,以广大数。 我们引入了随机波束搜索算法,该算法有逐段重排序的功能,使我们能在生成的早期注入多样性。 掘网络过23亿条合数集上训练。 凡人伦论议,与有明长之基线序于序,吾法总体而应之,随长而增之,高比例而受优焉。 退缩之策,于体有应,在诸长度之内。', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल वार्तालाप प्रतिक्रिया जनरेशन समस्या पर लागू किए गए हैं जहां स्रोत अनुक्रम वार्तालाप इतिहास है और लक्ष्य अनुक्रम प्रतिक्रिया है। अनुवाद के विपरीत, वार्तालाप प्रतिक्रिया स्वाभाविक रूप से रचनात्मक है। लंबी, जानकारीपूर्ण, सुसंगत और विविध प्रतिक्रियाओं की पीढ़ी एक कठिन काम बनी हुई है। इस काम में, हम एकल बारी सेटिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हम लंबे समय तक प्रतिक्रियाओं में सुसंगतता बनाए रखने के लिए डिकोडर पर आत्म-ध्यान जोड़ते हैं, और हम बड़े डेटासेट को स्केल करने के लिए एक व्यावहारिक दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे झलक-मॉडल कहा जाता है। हम सेगमेंट-बाय-सेगमेंट रीरैंकिंग के साथ एक स्टोकेस्टिक बीम-खोज एल्गोरिथ्म पेश करते हैं जो हमें पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया में पहले विविधता को इंजेक्ट करने देता है। हमने वेब से खनन किए गए 2.3B वार्तालाप संदेशों के संयुक्त डेटा सेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया। मानव मूल्यांकन अध्ययनों में, हमारी विधि समग्र रूप से लंबी प्रतिक्रियाओं का उत्पादन करती है, जिसमें स्पष्ट लंबाई-प्रचार के साथ बेसलाइन अनुक्रम-टू-अनुक्रम मॉडल की तुलना में लंबाई बढ़ने के रूप में स्वीकार्य और उत्कृष्ट के रूप में मूल्यांकन किए गए उच्च अनुपात के साथ। एक बैक-ऑफ रणनीति कुल मिलाकर बेहतर प्रतिक्रियाएं पैदा करती है, लंबाई के पूर्ण स्पेक्ट्रम में।', 'ga': 'Cuireadh múnlaí seicheamh-go-seicheamh i bhfeidhm ar an bhfadhb giniúna freagartha comhrá áit arb é an seicheamh foinse an stair chomhrá agus gurb é an seicheamh sprice an freagra. Murab ionann agus an t-aistriúchán, bíonn freagairt chomhrá cruthaitheach go bunúsach. Is obair chrua fós é freagairtí fada, eolasacha, comhleanúnacha agus ilchineálacha a ghiniúint. Sa obair seo, dírímid ar an socrú cas aonair. Cuirimid féin-aird ar an díchódóir chun comhleanúnachas a choinneáil i bhfreagraí níos faide, agus molaimid cur chuige praiticiúil, ar a dtugtar an tsamhail spléach, chun scálú go tacair shonraí móra. Tugaimid isteach algartam cuardaigh bíoma stochastic le hathrangú deighleog-ar-deighleog a ligeann dúinn éagsúlacht a instealladh níos luaithe sa phróiseas giniúna. Chuireamar oiliúint ar thacar sonraí comhcheangailte de níos mó ná 2.3B teachtaireachtaí comhrá a fuarthas ón ngréasán. I staidéir mheastóireachta daonna, táirgeann ár modh freagraí níos faide ar an iomlán, le céatadán níos airde rátáil mar inghlactha agus sármhaith de réir mar a mhéadaítear faid, i gcomparáid le samhlacha bonnlíne seicheamh-go-seicheamh le cur chun cinn soiléir fad. Cruthaíonn straitéis chúltaca freagraí níos fearr ar an iomlán, sa speictream iomlán faid.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία έχουν εφαρμοστεί στο πρόβλημα δημιουργίας απόκρισης συνομιλίας όπου η ακολουθία προέλευσης είναι το ιστορικό συνομιλίας και η ακολουθία προορισμού είναι η απάντηση. Σε αντίθεση με τη μετάφραση, η ανταπόκριση συνομιλίας είναι εγγενώς δημιουργική. Η δημιουργία μακροχρόνιων, ενημερωτικών, συνεκτικών και ποικίλων απαντήσεων παραμένει δύσκολο έργο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στην ενιαία ρύθμιση στροφής. Προσθέτουμε αυτοπροσοχή στον αποκωδικοποιητή για να διατηρήσουμε τη συνοχή σε μεγαλύτερες απαντήσεις, και προτείνουμε μια πρακτική προσέγγιση, που ονομάζεται μοντέλο για την κλιμάκωση σε μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων. Εισάγουμε έναν στοχαστικό αλγόριθμο αναζήτησης ακτίνων με επανακατάταξη τμημάτων-τμημάτων που μας επιτρέπει να εγχύσουμε ποικιλομορφία νωρίτερα στη διαδικασία παραγωγής. Εκπαιδευτήκαμε σε ένα συνδυασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων από πάνω από 2.3μηνύματα συνομιλίας που εξορύχθηκαν από το διαδίκτυο. Σε μελέτες αξιολόγησης σε ανθρώπους, η μέθοδος μας παράγει μεγαλύτερες απαντήσεις συνολικά, με υψηλότερη αναλογία που αξιολογείται ως αποδεκτή και εξαιρετική καθώς αυξάνεται το μήκος, σε σύγκριση με μοντέλα αλληλουχίας-αλληλουχίας βάσης με ρητή προβολή μήκους. Μια εναλλακτική στρατηγική παράγει καλύτερες απαντήσεις συνολικά, σε όλο το φάσμα των αποστάσεων.', 'hu': 'A beszélgetési válasz generálásával kapcsolatos problémára szekvenciás modelleket alkalmaztunk, ahol a forrássorozat a beszélgetési előzmények, a célsorozat pedig a válasz. A fordítással ellentétben a beszélgetésre adott válasz természetesen kreatív. Hosszú, informatív, koherens és változatos válaszok generálása továbbra is nehéz feladat. Ebben a munkában az egyszeri kanyar beállításra összpontosítunk. A hosszabb válaszok koherenciájának fenntartása érdekében önfigyelmet szentelünk a dekóderre, és egy gyakorlati megközelítést javasolunk, amit úgy nevezünk, mint a glitch-modell, a nagy adatkészletekre való skálázás. Bevezetünk egy sztochasztikus sugárkereső algoritmust, amely szegmensenként átrendezhető, és lehetővé teszi, hogy a generációs folyamat korábbi részében sokszínűséget fecskendezhessünk be. Egy több mint 2,3B beszélgetési üzenetet tartalmazó kombinált adatkészletre képeztünk, amelyet az internetről bányásztunk. Emberi értékelési vizsgálatokban a módszerünk hosszabb választ eredményez összességében, és a hossz növekedésével magasabb arányban minősül elfogadhatónak és kiválónak, mint a kiindulási szekvencia-szekvencia modellek explicit hossz-promócióval. A visszahátrányos stratégia általánosságban jobb válaszokat eredményez, a hosszúságok teljes spektrumában.', 'it': "I modelli Sequence-to-Sequence sono stati applicati al problema di generazione della risposta di conversazione in cui la sequenza sorgente è la cronologia delle conversazioni e la sequenza di destinazione è la risposta. A differenza della traduzione, la risposta alla conversazione è intrinsecamente creativa. La generazione di risposte lunghe, informative, coerenti e diversificate rimane un compito difficile. In questo lavoro, ci concentriamo sull'impostazione del singolo turno. Aggiungiamo attenzione al decoder per mantenere coerenza nelle risposte più lunghe, e proponiamo un approccio pratico, chiamato modello glimt, per scalare a grandi set di dati. Introducemo un algoritmo stocastico di ricerca del fascio con ricanking segmento per segmento che ci permette di iniettare la diversità in precedenza nel processo di generazione. Ci siamo allenati su un set di dati combinato di oltre 2.3B messaggi di conversazione estratti dal web. Negli studi di valutazione umana, il nostro metodo produce risposte più lunghe nel complesso, con una percentuale più elevata valutata come accettabile ed eccellente come aumento della lunghezza, rispetto ai modelli sequenziali di base con promozione esplicita della lunghezza. Una strategia di back-off produce risposte migliori nel complesso, nell'intero spettro delle lunghezze.", 'ka': 'შემდეგების შემდეგების მოდელები გადაყენებულია პარამეტრების შემდეგებისთვის პრობლემაში, სადაც მისი შემდეგების შემდეგები არის პარამეტრების ისტორია და მისი შემდეგები არის შეცვლის განსხვავებაში, საუბრიო პასუხი კრეატიურია. დიდი, ინფორმატიური, შესაძლებელი და განსხვავებული პასუხების შემდეგ ძალიან რთული დავალება. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ერთადერთი დაბრუნდება. ჩვენ განახლოებით განახლოებისთვის განახლოებისთვის დამატებით, რომ უფრო მეტი განახლოებისთვის დამატებით, და ჩვენ პრაქტიკური პროგრამიკური გადახლოებით, რომლებიც დანახლოების მოდელი,  ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ სტაქტიკური სინახლის ძიება ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც სეგენდონტიკური სეგენდონტიკური გადაწყენება, რომელიც უნდა ჩვენ განსხვავებას წინ შემდეგ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ საბეჭდან 2.3B პარამეტრების შეტყობინებების კომბუნური მონაცემების შესახებ. ადამიანის განსაზღვრებულებაში ჩვენი მეტი უფრო მეტი გავამუშავებს, როგორც უფრო მეტი განსაზღვრებულია და უფრო მეტი განსაზღვრებულია, როგორც სიგრძე უფრო მეტია, როგორც სიგრძე უფრო მეტია, რო სტრატიგია, რომელიც უფრო მეტი რექსპექტირება გააკეთება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სიგრძე.', 'lt': 'Sekos po sekos modeliai buvo taikomi pokalbio atsako generavimo problemai, kai šaltinio seka yra pokalbio istorija ir tikslinė seka yra atsakas. Priešingai nei vertimas, pokalbių atsakymas iš esmės yra kūrybingas. The generation of long, informative, coherent, and diverse responses remains a hard task.  In this work, we focus on the single turn setting.  Pridedame savo dėmesį prie dekoderio, kad būtų išlaikytas ilgesnių atsakymų nuoseklumas, ir siūlome praktinį požiūrį, vadinamą žvilgsnio modeliu, į didelius duomenų rinkinius. Įdiegiame stochastinį šviesos paieškos algoritmą su segmento po segmento perskirstymu, kuris leidžia mums švirkšti įvairovę anksčiau kartos procese. Mes apmokėme kombinuotą duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra daugiau kaip 2,3B pokalbių pranešimų, iškrautų iš tinklo. Žmogaus vertinimo tyrimų metu mūsų metodas bendrai sukuria ilgesnius atsakus, o didesnė dalis vertinama kaip priimtina ir puiki, kaip ilgio didėjimas, palyginti su pradiniais eilės modeliais, kurių ilgis aiškiai skatinamas. Atsarginės strategijos rezultatai iš esmės yra geresni, visame ilgumo spektre.', 'mk': 'Моделите од секвенца до секвенца се применети на проблемот со генерацијата на одговорот на разговорот каде што изворната секвенца е историјата на разговорот и целната секвенца е одговорот. За разлика од преводот, одговорот на разговорот е природно креативен. Генерацијата на долги, информативни, кохерентни и различни одговори останува тешка задача. Во оваа работа, се фокусираме на поставувањето на еден круг. We add self-attention to the decoder to maintain coherence in longer responses, and we propose a practical approach, called the glimpse-model, for scaling to large datasets.  Ние воведуваме стокастички алгоритм за пребарување на прозорец со сегмент по сегмент повторно врзување што ни овозможува да инјектираме различност претходно во процесот на генерација. Се трениравме на комбинирани податоци од пораки за разговор од страна на интернет. Во студиите за човечка евалуација, нашиот метод произведува долги одговори вкупно, со повисок процент оценет како прифатлив и одличен со зголемување на должината, во споредба со основните модели од секвенца до секвенца со експлицитна промоција на должина. Стратегијата за повлекување предизвикува подобри одговори вкупно, во целиот спектар на должини.', 'ms': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan telah dilaksanakan pada masalah generasi balas perbualan di mana urutan sumber adalah sejarah perbualan dan urutan sasaran adalah balasan. Tidak seperti terjemahan, perbualan yang menjawab adalah secara kreatif. Generasi jawapan panjang, maklumat, konsisten dan berbeza tetap tugas yang sukar. Dalam kerja ini, kita fokus pada tetapan satu pusingan. Kami menambah perhatian-diri kepada penyahkod untuk menyimpan kesamaan dalam balasan yang lebih panjang, dan kami cadangkan pendekatan praktik, dipanggil model-pandangan, untuk skala ke set data yang besar. Kami memperkenalkan algoritma pencarian cahaya stokastik dengan segmen demi segmen mengikat semula yang membolehkan kita menyuntik pelbagai pelbagai lebih awal dalam proses generasi. Kami berlatih pada set data bersama mesej perbualan lebih dari 2.3B yang dibuang dari web. In human evaluation studies, our method produces longer responses overall, with a higher proportion rated as acceptable and excellent as length increases, compared to baseline sequence-to-sequence models with explicit length-promotion.  Strategi back-off menghasilkan balasan yang lebih baik secara keseluruhan, dalam spektrum penuh panjang.', 'kk': 'Көздегі сәйкестік тарыхы және мақсатты сәйкестік жауап беру мәселесіне қолданылады. Аудармасының қасиетінде, сұрақ жауап беру қасиетінде құрылған. Уақыт, мәліметтік, тәжірибелі және түрлі жауаптарды қиын тапсырманың құрылымы. Бұл жұмыстың бір түрінде көңіл береміз. Өзімізді декодерге ұзындық жауаптарына тең қатынау үшін қолданып, үлкен деректер жиындарына масштабтау үшін, тәжірибе үлгі моделі деп аталатын практикалық тәртібін қолданамыз. Біз стохастикалық жұлдыз іздеу алгоритмін сегменттік сегменттік қайталау алгоритмін келтіреміз. Бұл біздің әртүрлі түрлерді жасау процесінде алдында инжектеуге мүмкіндік береді Біз Интернеттен 2.3B диалог хабарламаларының біріктірілген деректер жиынына үйрендік. Адам оқу зерттеулерінде, біздің әдіміміз жауап беру үшін ұзақ және ұзындығын өзгертуге арналған, ұзындығын көтеруге арналған және өте жақсы ұзындығын өзгертуге арналған, түсінікті ұзындығын өзгертуг Артық стратегия жақсы жауап береді, толық ұзындығында.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ട്രോക്കെന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.  പരിഭാഷക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായി സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് സൃഷ്ടികരാണ്. നീണ്ട, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉത്തരങ്ങളും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മറുപടികളുടെ തലമുറയാണ് കഠിനമായ ജോലി. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരേ തിരിച്ചുവരുന്നതിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. നീണ്ട പ്രതികരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധ കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രാകൃതികമായ പ്രായോഗ്രിക്കേഷന്\u200d പ്രാ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്റ്റോക്സിക്ക് ബീമിന്റെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പിന്നെ പിന്നീട് വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടും വീണ്ട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെബില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറച്ച് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dത്ത ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റ മനുഷ്യരുടെ വികസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നീണ്ട പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. നീളം കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്വീകരിക്കുന്നതും ഉത്തമമായ വിധിയുമുണ്ട്. ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d സ പിന്തിരിഞ്ഞുപോകുന്ന ഒരു ക്രമത്തിന്റെ പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200d മുഴുവനും നല്ല ഉത്തരം ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. നീളം നീ', 'mt': "Il-mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza ġew applikati għall-problema tal-ġenerazzjoni tar-rispons għall-konverżjoni fejn is-sekwenza tas-sors hija l-istorja tal-konverżjoni u s-sekwenza fil-mira hija r-rispons. Unlike translation, conversation responding is inherently creative.  Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ reazzjonijiet twal, informativi, koerenti u diversi tibqa’ kompitu diffiċli. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna niffokaw fuq l-ambjent ta’ dawran wieħed. Aħna nżidu l-attenzjoni tagħna nnifisha lid-dekoder biex in żammu koerenza f'reazzjonijiet itwal, u nipproponu approċċ prattiku, imsejjaħ mudell ta' ħarsa lejn, għall-iskala għal settijiet ta' dejta kbar. Aħna nintroduċu algoritmu stokastiku għat-tfittxija tar-raġġ b’riġlejn segment b’segment li jippermettilna ninjettaw id-diversità aktar kmieni fil-proċess ta’ ġenerazzjoni. Taħriġna fuq sett ta’ dejta kkombinat ta’ aktar minn 2.3B messaġġi ta’ konverżjoni minjiera mill-internet. Fi studji ta’ evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem, il-metodu tagħna jipproduċi risponsi itwal b’mod ġenerali, bi proporzjon ogħla kklassifikat bħala a ċċettabbli u eċċellenti hekk kif it-tul jiżdied, meta mqabbel ma’ mudelli ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza fil-linja bażi bi promozzjoni espliċita tat-tul. Strateġija retroattiva tipproduċi reazzjonijiet aħjar b’mod ġenerali, fl-ispettru sħiħ tat-tul.", 'pl': 'Modele sekwencji do sekwencji zostały zastosowane do problemu generowania odpowiedzi konwersacji, w którym sekwencją źródłową jest historia konwersacji, a sekwencją docelową jest odpowiedź. W przeciwieństwie do tłumaczenia, odpowiedź na rozmowę jest z natury kreatywna. Generowanie długich, informacyjnych, spójnych i zróżnicowanych reakcji pozostaje trudnym zadaniem. W tej pracy skupiamy się na ustawieniu pojedynczego obrotu. Dodajemy uwagę do dekodera, aby zachować spójność w dłuższych reakcjach, i proponujemy praktyczne podejście, zwane modelem przebłyskowym, do skalowania do dużych zbiorów danych. Wprowadzamy algorytm stochastycznego wyszukiwania wiązki z przestawianiem segmentów po segmentach, który pozwala nam wstrzykiwać różnorodność wcześniej w procesie generowania. Szkoliliśmy się na połączonym zestawie danych z ponad 2.3B wiadomości konwersacyjnych wydobywanych z sieci. W badaniach oceniających u ludzi nasza metoda generuje dłuższe reakcje, przy czym większy udział oceniany jest jako akceptowalny i doskonały wraz ze wzrostem długości, w porównaniu z modelami sekwencji do sekwencji podstawowych z wyraźną promocją długości. Strategia wsparcia zapewnia lepsze reakcje ogólnie, w pełnym spektrum długości.', 'ro': 'Modelele secvență-la-secvență au fost aplicate problemei de generare a răspunsului la conversație în cazul în care secvența sursă este istoricul conversației și secvența țintă este răspunsul. Spre deosebire de traducere, răspunsul la conversație este în mod inerent creativ. Generarea unor răspunsuri lungi, informative, coerente și diversificate rămâne o sarcină dificilă. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe setarea unei singure viraje. Adăugăm auto-atenție decodorului pentru a menține coerența în răspunsurile mai lungi și propunem o abordare practică, numită "glitch-model", pentru scalare la seturi de date mari. Introducem un algoritm stocastic de căutare a fasciculului cu relocare segment cu segment care ne permite să injectăm diversitatea mai devreme în procesul de generare. Ne-am antrenat pe un set combinat de date de peste 2.3B mesaje de conversație extrase de pe web. În studiile de evaluare la om, metoda noastră produce răspunsuri mai lungi în general, cu o proporție mai mare evaluată ca acceptabilă și excelentă pe măsură ce creșterea lungimii, comparativ cu modelele secvență-secvență inițiale cu promovarea explicită a lungimii. O strategie de back-off produce răspunsuri mai bune în ansamblu, în întregul spectru de lungimi.', 'mn': 'Дараагийн дарааллын загварууд ярианы хариу үйлдлийн асуудалд хэрэглэгдсэн. эх үүсвэр дарааллын ярианы түүх ба зорилготой дарааллын хариу. Түүнчлэлээс ялгаатай, ярианы хариулт нь бүтээлч байдаг. Урт, мэдээллийн, нийгмийн, олон хариулт нь хэцүү ажил байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид нэг эргэлтэй тохиолдолд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид илүү урт хариултын тулд хамааралтай байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд өөртөө анхаарлаа хандуулж, том өгөгдлийн санд шилжүүлэх боломжтой арга зам гэж нэрлэдэг. Бид сагмент-сагмент-дахин дахин эргүүлэхэд стоchastic beam-search алгоритмыг танилцуулж байна. Энэ нь бидэнд урьд олон төрлийн үйл явцдаа инжекцийг хийж чадна. Бид веб-ээс холбогдсон 2.3B ярианы мэдээллийн хэмжээнд сургалт хийсэн. Хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын судалгаанд бидний арга нь илүү урт хариулт үйлдвэрлэж, урт хугацаанд хүлээн зөвшөөрөх болон гайхалтай хувилбар нэмэгддэг. Газрын дарааллын дарааллын загвартай харьцуулахад тодорхой урт хугацаанд илүү урт Дараагийн стратеги нь ерөнхийдөө илүү сайн хариу үйлдвэрлэх болно.', 'no': 'Sequence-to-sequence-modeller er brukt til problemet for oppretting av samtalesvar der kjelderekkefølgja er samtalehistorien og målsrekkefølgja er svaret. I motsetning til omsetjinga er samtalesvar innehaldet kreativ. Generasjonen av lang, informativ, koherent og forskjellige svar er ein vanskeleg oppgåve. I denne arbeiden fokuserer vi på den enkelte omsetjinga. Vi legg til selvmerksomhet til dekoderen for å halda koherens i lengre svar, og vi foreslår ein praktisk tilnærming, kalla glimpse-modellen, for å skalera til store datasett. Vi introduserer ein stochastisk straumsøkingsalgoritme med segment-by-segment gjenoppretting som let oss injesera mangfold tidlegare i genereringsprosessen. Vi treng på ei kombinasjon datasett over 2,3B samtalemeldingar som er minert frå nettet. I menneskelige evalueringsstudiar, metoden vårt produserer lengre svar overalt, med høgare proporsjon vurdert som akseptabel og utviktig når lengda øker, sammenlignet med baseline-sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller med eksplisitt lengd-promosjon. Eit tilbake-strategi produserer bedre svar overalt i den fulle spektrum av lengden.', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinka soo dabaasha waxaa lagu codsaday dhibaatada arrimaha sameynta, meesha ay ku taalaa taariikhda hadalka iyo xilliga goalku waa jawaabta. Turjumista si kala duwan ah, sameynta hadalku waa mid abuur leh. Farcanka wakhtiga dheer, macluumaadka, isla markaasna jawaabo kala duduwan waa shaqo adag. Shaqadan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa hal jeer. Qoraalka aan isfiirsanayno si aan ugu hayno jawaabo dheer, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo la yidhaahdo tusaale-muuqashada, si aan u qiyaasto samooyin badan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa algorithm baarka raadinta ah oo ku yaala qeyb-qayb-qayb-ka-midab, kaas oo inagu diraya kala duduwan marka hore xiliga qarniga. We trained on a combined data set of over 2.3B conversation messages mined from the web.  Waxbarashada qiimeynta biniaadaha ah qaababkayagu wuxuu soo saaraa jawaabo dhaadheer oo aad u dheer, wuxuuna ku kordhaa qiimeed aad u aqbali karto oo aad u fiican sida dhererku korodo, waxaana la barbardhigay tusaalooyinka hoose-dhexe-ilaa-xiddig oo aad u sii kordhiso. Dhaqdhaqaaqa dib-u-celinta ayaa soo saara jawaabo ka wanaagsan dhammaan, si dhaadheer oo dhan.', 'sr': 'Modeli sekvence do sekvence su primjenjeni na problem generacije odgovora u razgovoru gdje je sekvencija izvora povijest razgovora i ciljna sekvencija je odgovor. Za razliku od prevođenja, odgovor razgovora je posebno kreativan. Generacija dugih, informativnih, koherentnih i različitih odgovora ostaje težak zadatak. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na jedini okret. Dodajemo samopouzdanje dekoderu kako bi održali saslušnost u dužim odgovorima, i predlažemo praktični pristup, nazvan model pogleda, za skaliranje na velike podatke. Predstavljamo algoritam pretraživanja zraka u stokastičnom zraku sa preokretanjem segment a po segmentu koji nam omogućava da ubrizgamo raznolikost ranije u procesu generacije. Trenirali smo na kombiniranom setu podataka preko 2,3B razgovornih poruka mineralnih sa mreže. U ispitivanjima ljudske procjene, naša metoda proizvodi duže odgovore ukupno, sa većom proporcijom procjenom prihvatljivog i odličnog povećanja dužine u usporedbi s modelima iz početne sekvence do sekvence sa eksplicitnim promocijom dužine. Povlačena strategija proizvodi bolji odgovor u svemu, u punom spektru dužine.', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරමාණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුලත් කරලා තියෙන සංවාදය ඉතිහාසය වාර්තාව වෙනුවෙන්, කතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන්. ලොකු වෙලාව, තොරතුරක්, සම්බන්ධතාවක්, සහ විවිධ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් අමාරු වැඩක් තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි එක්කෙන් වාර්තා සැකසුම් වලට බලන්න. අපි ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරිය අවධානයක් දිගටම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියාගන්න සැකසුම් කරගන්න ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරිය අවධානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරය අපි ස්ටොචාස්ටික් බීම් හොයාගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක සෙග්ටම් එක්ක ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒකෙන් අපිට ප්\u200dරව අපි ජාලයෙන් පිළිගත්ත 2.3B කතාව පණිවිඩයක් වඩා සම්බන්ධ දත්ත සූදානයකට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කළා. මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය අධ්\u200dයානයට, අපේ විධානය ලොකු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාසිත පිටිපස්සේ ව්\u200dයාපෘතියක් හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා, පූර්ණ විශ', 'sv': 'Sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller har tillämpats på problemet med generering av konversationssvar där källsekvensen är konversationshistoriken och målsekvensen är svaret. Till skillnad från översättning är konversationssvar i sig kreativt. Att skapa långa, informativa, sammanhängande och mångsidiga svar är fortfarande en svår uppgift. I det här arbetet fokuserar vi på inställningen för en sväng. Vi lägger till självuppmärksamhet på avkodaren för att bibehålla samstämmighet i längre svar, och vi föreslår ett praktiskt tillvägagångssätt, kallad glimt-modellen, för skalning till stora datamängder. Vi introducerar en stokastisk beam-searchalgoritm med segment för segment omräkning som låter oss injicera mångfald tidigare i genereringsprocessen. Vi tränade på en kombinerad datauppsättning med över 2,3B konversationsmeddelande hämtade från webben. I humana utvärderingsstudier ger vår metod längre svar totalt sett, med en högre andel bedömd som acceptabel och utmärkt som längdökningar, jämfört med baslinjen sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller med explicit längdfrämjande. En backoff-strategi ger bättre svar totalt sett, i hela spektrumet av längder.', 'ta': 'தொடர்ந்து வரும் மாதிரிகள் பேச்சு பதில் உருவாக்கும் பிரச்சனைக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது மூல வரிசையில் மூலம் உரையாடல் வரலாறு மற மொழிபெயர்ப்பை வித்தியாசமாக, உரையாடல் பதில் உள்ள படைப்பாக உள்ளது. நீண்ட, தகவல், ஒன்றிணைப்பு, மற்றும் வேறு பதில்கள் தலைமுறை கடினமான பணியாக இருக்கிறது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரே திரும்ப அமைப்பை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். நாம் நீண்ட பதில்களில் ஒன்றைப் பாதுகாக்க வேண்டும் குறியீட்டிற்கு தானே கவனத்தை சேர்க்கிறோம், பெரிய தகவல் அமைப்புகளை அளவிடுவதற்காக நாம் ஒரு ஸ்டாக்ஸ்டாஸ்டிக் மணி தேடும் அல்குறிப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் பின்னத்தின் துண்டு துண்டு மீண்டும் துண்டு மீ நாங்கள் இணையத்திலிருந்து குறைந்த பேச்சு செய்திகள் 2.3B க்கு மேற்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பில் பயிற்சியை பய மனித மதிப்பிடும் ஆய்வுகளில், எங்கள் முறைமையில் நீண்ட விளைவுகளை உருவாக்குகிறது, அதிக விகிதம் ஏற்றுக் கொள்ளப்படும் நீளம் அதிகமாக இருக்கும், அடிப்படையின்  ஒரு பின்னோக்கி திட்டம் மொத்தமாக சிறந்த பதில்களை உருவாக்குகிறது, நீளம் முழுவதும்.', 'ur': 'سکوئنس-ٹو-سکوئنس-ٹو-سکوئنس موڈل کو بحث جواب دینے کے مسئلہ پر لازم کیا گیا ہے جہاں سورج سکوئنس کی تاریخ ہے اور موقع سکوئنس کا جواب ہے. ترجمہ کے بغیر، بات جواب دینے کے باعث خالق ہے. درازی، خبردار، مہربانی اور مختلف جواب دینے کی نسل سخت ہے اس کام میں، ہم ایک واپس کے تنظیم پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ڈاکوڈر کے لئے اپنا توجه اضافہ کریں گے کہ دور کی جواب میں اتصال کریں اور ہم ایک قابل طریقہ پیش کریں گے، جو گلپ-موڈل کا نام ہے، بڑے ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق استعمال کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم نے ایک سیگنٹ سیگنٹ سیگنٹ سیگنٹ آلگوریٹم کو معلوم کرتا ہے جو ہمیں پہلے نسل کے پرسس میں مختلف طریقے کا ذریعہ دکھا دیتا ہے. ہم نے 2.3B سے زیادہ سخنرانی پیغامات کی ایک جمع ڈیٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی۔ انسان کے ارزیابی تحقیقات میں، ہمارا طریقہ عموماً بہت زیادہ جواب دیتا ہے، اس کے ساتھ بہت بلند مقدار ہے جس طرح طول اضافہ ہوتی ہے اور بہترین مقدار ہے جس طرح طول اضافہ ہوتی ہے، اس کے مقابلے میں baseline sequence-to-sequence models کے ساتھ صریح طول اضافہ سے۔ پیچھے پھیرنے کا استراتژی بہتر جواب دیتا ہے، سب سے زیادہ طول کے اندر.', 'uz': "Sequence-to-sequence models have been applied to the conversation response generation problem where the source sequence is the conversation history and the target sequence is the response.  Tafsilotni teng boʻlmadi, javob berish juda ijodkorlik. uzun, maʼlumot, bir xil javoblar va har xil javoblar avval juda qiyin vazifa. Bu ishda biz bir necha boshqarish moslamasini foydalanamiz. Biz uzun javoblarga birlashtirish uchun o'zimni o'zimizni qo'shishimiz, va biz juda katta maʼlumotlar tizimlariga qisqarish mumkin deb ataymiz. Biz avtomatik qidirish algorithini o'rganamiz, bir qismni o'zgartirish bilan o'rganamiz. Bu bir necha xil vazifani avval o'zgarishga ruxsat beramiz. Biz Webdan 2.3B dan ortiq xabarlarning bir necha maʼlumotni o'rganimiz. Inson taʼminlovchilarida, bizning usuli umumiy raqamli javoblarni yaratadi. Uzunlarning ko'payishi mumkin va uzoq soni ko'payishi bilan bir necha darajada ko'proq darajaga ega bo'ladi. Koʻrib chiqish strategiya umuman yaxshi javob beradi, butun uzunlik davomida.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình dãy số tới dãy đã được áp dụng vào vấn đề tạo phản ứng đối thoại nơi chuỗi gốc là lịch sử cuộc đối thoại và chuỗi đích là phản ứng. Không giống dịch, trả lời đối thoại vốn là sáng tạo. Thế hệ các phản ứng dài, thông tin, đồng cảm và đa dạng vẫn là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn. Trong công việc này, chúng ta tập trung vào chế độ xoay một. Chúng tôi thêm sự chú ý vào bộ giải mã để duy trì sự đồng bộ trong các phản ứng dài hơn, và chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp thực tế, gọi là hình mẫu ngắn, để phóng lên các tập tin lớn. Chúng tôi đưa vào hệ thống ánh sáng ngẫu nhiên, thuật toán dò lại từng đoạn một, cho phép chúng tôi tiêm đa dạng vào phần trước trong quá trình sản xuất. Chúng tôi đã được đào tạo trên một tập tin dữ liệu kết hợp với các thông điệp nói chuyện trên mạng. Trong các nghiên cứu đánh giá con người, phương pháp của chúng tôi cung cấp các phản ứng dài hơn, với tỉ lệ cao được đánh giá là có thể chấp nhận và xuất sắc khi độ dài tăng lên, so với các mô hình dãy-tới-trình nền với trường hợp được thăng tiến dài thẳng. Một chiến lược rút lui sẽ tạo ra các phản ứng tốt hơn, trong toàn bộ các chiều dài.', 'da': 'Sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller er blevet anvendt på problemet med generering af samtalesvar, hvor kildesekvensen er samtalehistorik, og målsekvensen er svaret. I modsætning til oversættelse er samtaleafgivelse i sig selv kreativ. Generationen af lange, informative, sammenhængende og forskelligartede svar er fortsat en vanskelig opgave. I dette arbejde fokuserer vi på indstillingen af et enkelt sving. Vi tilføjer selvopmærksomhed til dekoderen for at opretholde sammenhæng i længere svar, og vi foreslår en praktisk tilgang, kaldet glimt-model, til skalering til store datasæt. Vi introducerer en stokastisk beam-search algoritme med segment-for-segment re-ranking, som lader os injicere diversitet tidligere i generationsprocessen. Vi trænede på et kombineret datasæt af over 2,3B samtale beskeder udvundet fra internettet. I humane evalueringsundersøgelser producerer vores metode længere responser generelt, med en højere andel vurderet som acceptabel og fremragende som længdestigninger sammenlignet med baseline sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller med eksplicit længdestilling. En back-off strategi giver bedre reaktioner generelt i hele spektret af længder.', 'bg': 'Моделите последователност към последователност са приложени към проблема с генериране на отговор на разговора, където изходната последователност е историята на разговора, а целевата последователност е отговорът. За разлика от превода, отговорът на разговора по своята същност е творчески. Създаването на дълги, информативни, съгласувани и разнообразни отговори остава трудна задача. В тази работа се фокусираме върху настройката на единичен завой. Добавяме самовнимание към декодера, за да поддържаме съгласуваност при по-дълги отговори, и предлагаме практически подход, наречен модел на блясък, за мащабиране до големи набори от данни. Въвеждаме стохастичен алгоритъм за търсене на лъчи с пренареждане сегмент по сегмент, което ни позволява да инжектираме разнообразие по-рано в процеса на генериране. Тренирахме върху комбиниран набор от данни от над 2.3Б съобщения за разговор, извлечени от мрежата. При проучванията за оценка при хора нашият метод произвежда по-дълги отговори като цяло, с по-висок дял оценен като приемлив и отличен с увеличаване на дължината, в сравнение с базовите модели последователност към последователност с изрично насърчаване на дължината. Задължителната стратегия дава по-добри отговори като цяло, в целия спектър от дължини.', 'nl': 'Sequentiemodellen zijn toegepast op het probleem van het genereren van gespreksreacties waarbij de bronsequentie de gespreksgeschiedenis is en de doelsequentie de reactie is. In tegenstelling tot vertaling is het reageren op gesprekken inherent creatief. Het genereren van lange, informatieve, coherente en diverse reacties blijft een moeilijke taak. In dit werk richten we ons op de single turn instelling. We voegen zelfaandacht toe aan de decoder om de samenhang in langere responsen te behouden, en we stellen een praktische aanpak voor, genaamd het glimp-model, voor schaalvergroting naar grote datasets. We introduceren een stochastisch beam-search algoritme met segment-voor-segment herschikking waardoor we diversiteit eerder in het generatieproces injecteren. We hebben getraind op een gecombineerde dataset van meer dan 2.3B gespreksberichten die zijn gemikt van het web. In menselijke evaluatiestudies produceert onze methode langere responsen over het algemeen, met een hoger percentage dat als acceptabel en uitstekend wordt beoordeeld naarmate de lengte toeneemt, in vergelijking met baseline sequence-to-sequence modellen met expliciete lengte-promotie. Een back-off strategie levert over het algemeen betere reacties op, in het volledige spectrum van lengtes.', 'de': 'Sequenzmodelle wurden auf das Problem der Generierung von Konversationsantworten angewendet, bei dem die Quellsequenz der Konversationsverlauf und die Zielsequenz die Antwort ist. Im Gegensatz zu Übersetzungen ist das Reagieren von Konversationen von Natur aus kreativ. Die Generierung langer, informativer, kohärenter und vielfältiger Antworten bleibt eine schwierige Aufgabe. In dieser Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf die Single Turn Einstellung. Wir fügen dem Decoder Selbstachtung hinzu, um die Kohärenz bei längeren Reaktionen aufrechtzuerhalten, und wir schlagen einen praktischen Ansatz vor, genannt das flüchtige Modell, für die Skalierung auf große Datensätze. Wir führen einen stochastischen Strahlsuchalgorithmus mit Segment-für-Segment-Reranking ein, mit dem wir Diversität früher im Generierungsprozess injizieren können. Wir trainierten auf einem kombinierten Datensatz von über 2.3B Konversationsnachrichten, die aus dem Web gewonnen wurden. In humanen Evaluationsstudien produziert unsere Methode insgesamt längere Reaktionen, wobei ein höherer Anteil als akzeptabel und ausgezeichnet eingestuft wird, wenn die Länge zunimmt, im Vergleich zu Baseline-Sequenzmodellen mit expliziter Längenförderung. Eine Back-off-Strategie führt insgesamt zu besseren Reaktionen in allen Längen.', 'id': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan telah diterapkan untuk masalah generasi respon percakapan dimana urutan sumber adalah sejarah percakapan dan urutan sasaran adalah respon. Tidak seperti terjemahan, percakapan yang merespon secara pribadi kreatif. Generasi respon panjang, informatif, koherent, dan berbeda tetap tugas sulit. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita fokus pada setting satu putaran. Kami menambah perhatian diri pada dekoder untuk mempertahankan koherensi dalam respon yang lebih panjang, dan kami mengusulkan pendekatan praktis, yang disebut model pandangan, untuk skala ke set data besar. Kami memperkenalkan algoritma pencarian sinar stokastik dengan segmen-segmen reranking yang memungkinkan kita menyuntik diversitas lebih awal dalam proses generasi. Kami melatih dalam set data kombinasi dari lebih dari 2.3B pesan percakapan yang dibuang dari web. Dalam studi evaluasi manusia, metode kami menghasilkan respon lebih panjang secara umum, dengan proporsi yang lebih tinggi yang diterima dan baik sebagai panjang meningkat, dibandingkan dengan model rangka-ke-rangka dasar dengan eksplisit panjang-promosi. Strategi mundur menghasilkan respon yang lebih baik secara keseluruhan, dalam spektrum penuh panjang.', 'hr': 'Modeli sekvence do sekvence primjenjeni su na problem generacije odgovora u razgovoru gdje je sekvencija izvora povijest razgovora i ciljna sekvencija odgovor. Za razliku od prevoda, odgovor razgovora je u potpunosti kreativan. Generacija dugih, informativnih, usklađenih i različitih odgovora ostaje težak zadatak. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na jedinstvenu postavku okretanja. Dodajemo samopouzdanje dekoderu kako bi održali usklađenost u dužim odgovorima, i predlažemo praktični pristup, nazvan model pogleda, za skaliranje na velike podatke. Predstavljamo stochastički algoritam pretraživanja zraka s preokretanjem segment a po segmentu koji nam omogućava ubrizgati raznolikost ranije u procesu generacije. Obučavali smo kombinirane podatke o preko 2,3B razgovornih poruka mineralnih s mreže. U ispitivanjima ljudske procjene, naša metoda proizvodi duže odgovore ukupno, s većom proporcijom procjenom prihvatljivog i odličnog povećanja dužine u usporedbi s početnim modelima sekvencije do sekvencije s eksplicitnim promocijom dužine. Povlačena strategija proizvodi bolji odgovor ukupno u punom spektru dužine.', 'ko': '시퀀스부터 시퀀스 모델까지 세션 응답 생성 문제에 적용되었는데 그 중에서 원본 시퀀스는 세션 역사이고 목표 시퀀스는 응답이다.번역과 달리 대화 응답은 내재된 창조성을 지니고 있다.장기적이고 정보가 풍부하며 일관되고 다양한 응답을 하는 것은 여전히 어려운 과제이다.이 업무에서 우리는 주로 단일 라운드 설정에 주목한다.우리는 더 긴 응답에서 일치성을 유지하기 위해 디코더에 자신의 관심을 추가하고 대형 데이터 집합으로 확장하는 실용적인 방법을 제시했다.우리는 랜덤 빔 검색 알고리즘을 소개했는데 이 알고리즘은 단계별로 다시 배열하는 기능을 가지고 있어 생성 과정에서 다양성을 더욱 일찍 주입할 수 있다.우리는 인터넷에서 발굴된 23억 건이 넘는 대화 정보를 포함하는 종합 데이터 집합에서 교육을 실시했다.인류 평가 연구에서 명확한 길이가 향상된 기선 서열을 서열 모델에 비해 우리의 방법은 전체적으로 더 긴 반응을 일으키고 길이가 증가함에 따라 수용 가능하고 우수한 비율로 평가된다.전체 길이 범위 내에서 후퇴 전략은 전체적으로 더욱 좋은 호응을 얻을 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mfululizo wa mfululizo umetumiwa kwenye tatizo la kizazi cha maongezi ambapo mfululizo wa chanzo ni historia ya mazungumzo na mfululizo wa malengo ni jibu. Tofauti na tafsiri, maongezi yanayojibu ni ubunifu. Kizazi cha muda mrefu, taarifa, pamoja na miitikio mbalimbali bado ni kazi ngumu. Katika kazi hii, tunajikita kwenye kituo cha upande mmoja. Tunaongeza kujitazama kwa kadri ya kuendelea mshikamano katika majibu ya muda mrefu, na tunapendekeza mbinu za kisasa, inayoitwa muundo wa mwanga, kwa kupunguza taarifa kubwa. Tunaonyesha algorithi ya utafutaji wa wima wa utafutaji kwa upande wa sekondari ambao unaruhusu kuingiza tofauti mapema katika mchakato wa kizazi. Tumejifunza kwenye seti ya takwimu zilizounganishwa zaidi ya jumbe za mazungumzo ya 2.3B zilizotengenezwa kutoka mtandaoni. Katika tafiti za uchunguzi wa binadamu, mbinu yetu inatengeneza miitikio ya muda mrefu kwa ujumla, na kiwango kikubwa cha kiwango kinachokubalika na kinachoongezeka kwa kiwango kikubwa, ukilinganishwa na mifano ya mfumo wa mfumo wa msingi kwa kiwango kikubwa na kukuza kwa uwazi. A back-off strategy produces better responses overall, in the full spectrum of lengths.', 'fa': 'Models sequence-to-sequence are applied to the conversation response problem where the source sequence is the conversation history and the target sequence is the response. برخلاف ترجمه، پاسخ مکالمه به عنوان خلاقی است. نسل طولانی، اطلاعات، هماهنگی و جواب مختلف سختی باقی ماند. در این کار، ما روی یک تنظیم نوبت تمرکز می کنیم. ما توجه خود را به dekoder اضافه می\u200cکنیم تا هماهنگی در پاسخ\u200cهای طولانی نگه داشته باشیم، و یک روش عملی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، به نام مدل چشم\u200cبینی، برای اندازه\u200cگیری به مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ. ما الگوریتم جستجوی سیاه استاکستیک را معرفی می\u200cکنیم با بازگرداندن بخش\u200cبخش\u200cبخش\u200cها که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد پیش از این فرآیند مختلف را تزریق کنیم. ما روی مجموعه داده های ترکیب بیش از پیام های گفتگوی ۲.۳B از وب آموزش دادیم. در تحقیقات ارزیابی انسان، روش ما جواب های بیشتری را در کل تولید می کند، با مقدار بالاتری که به عنوان درازی قابل پذیرفته و عالی است، در مقایسه با مدل های اولیه خط و اولیه با توسعه طولانی مشخصی تولید می کند. استراتژی عقب، پاسخ های بهتر در کل، در تمام مدت، تولید می کند.', 'tr': 'Subtitles Terjime edilmäne meñzänokda, çykyş jogapy daşary döredijilidir. Uzun, informative, kohereket we dürli jogaplaryň döwletleri kyn zady galýar. Bu işde biz ýeke gezek düzümlerinde üns berýäris. Biz özümizi ködleme hasaplamaga uzak jogabalarda hereket etmek üçin özümize üns berýäris we uly veri setirlere mjarlamak üçin praktik bir nusga teklip edýäris. Bir neçä segment-beýleki terjime edilen stokastik beam araştyrmasynyň algoritmini tanyşdyrýarys. Bu şekilde näçe çeşitlikleri döwletlere öňki girişdirip başlaýar. Biz 2.3B sany çykyş mesajlarynyň içinde internetden boşadylýan bir birleşik maglumat setinde okadyk. İnsanlaryň değerlendirmelerinde, biziň metodamyz hemme üçin ýokary jogaplary täsir edýär, uzyrlyk bilen gowy we gowy deňlendirilýär, kellämiz boşluk düzedilerine görä terjime-de sequence modellerine deňleýär. Arkalardan geçen strategiýa, bütin uzunlukyň spektromynda gowy jogaplary üretýär.', 'af': "Sequence-to-sequence modele is aangepas na die gesprekslys reaksie-genereering probleem waar die bronkorekvensie is die gesprekslys geskiedenis en die doel volgorde is die antwoord. Ongelyks soos vertaling, die gesprekslys antwoord is onderwerp kreatief. Die geslag van lank, informatiewe, koerende en verskeie antwoordes bly 'n moeilike taak. In hierdie werk, ons fokus op die enkele skakel instelling. Ons byvoeg self-aandag aan die dekoder om koherens in langer antwoordes te hou, en ons voorstel 'n praktiese toegang, genoem die glimpse-model, om te skaleer na groot datastelle. Ons introduseer 'n stochastic beam-soektog algoritme met segment-by-segment herankering wat laat ons verskeidigheid vroeër in die generasie-proses inprop. Ons het opgelei op 'n gekombineerde data stel van oor 2.3B gesprekslys boodskappe wat van die web gemineer is. In menslike evalueringsstudies, ons metode produseer langer antwoordes totaal, met 'n hoër proporsie wat aanvaarbaar en uitgelykbaar as lengte vergroot word, vergelyk met basisline sekvens-na-sekvens modele met eksplisiese lengte-promosie. 'n Terugaf-strategie produseer beter antwoordes totaal in die volle spektrum van lengte.", 'sq': 'Sequence-to-sequence models have been applied to the conversation response generation problem where the source sequence is the conversation history and the target sequence is the response.  Ndryshe nga përkthimi, biseda që përgjigjet është natyralisht kreative. Gjenerata e përgjigjeve të gjata, informative, koherente dhe të ndryshme mbetet një detyrë e vështirë. Në këtë punë, ne përqëndrohemi në rregullimin e një kthese. Ne shtojmë vetë-vëmendje ndaj dekoderit për të mbajtur koherencën në përgjigjet më të gjata, dhe propozojmë një qasje praktike, të quajtur model-pamje, për shkallëzimin në grupe të dhënash të mëdha. Ne prezantojmë një algoritëm stokastik të kërkimit në rreze me regjistrimin segment pas segmenti që na lejon të injektojmë diversitetin më parë në procesin e gjeneratës. Kemi stërvitur në një grup të dhënash të kombinuara me mesazhe të bisedës mbi 2.3B të minave nga rrjeti. Në studimet e vlerësimit njerëzor, metoda jonë prodhon përgjigje më të gjata përgjithësisht, me një proportë më të lartë të vlerësuar si të pranueshme dhe të shkëlqyer me rritjen e gjatësisë, krahasuar me modelet bazë-sekuencë-sekuencë me promovim eksplicit të gjatësisë. Një strategji tërheqëse prodhon përgjigje më të mira përgjithësisht, në spektrin e plotë të gjatësive.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች በተለየ ትርጓሜ፣ የንግግር መልስ በአካባቢ ፍጥረት ነው፡፡ የረጅም ትውልድ፣ ማስታወቂያ፣ በአንድነት፥ ልዩ ልዩ መልስ ግን አስቸጋሪ ሥራ ይኖራል። በዚህ ስራ አንዲት ተግባር ላይ እናስማራለን፡፡ We add self-attention to the decoder to maintain coherence in longer responses, and we propose a practical approach, called the glimpse-model, for scaling to large datasets.  በክፍለ ግንኙነት አቀማመጥ እናስገራለን፡፡ በ2.3B በላይ የንግግር መልዕክቶች ከድረ ገጽ የተጠቀሙትን የዳታ ሰርቨሮች አስተማርነው ነበር፡፡ በሰው ማስታወቂያው ውስጥ ሥርዓታችን የረጅም መልስ ያሳድጋል፣ የረጅም ቁጥር እንደሚቀበል እና ከፍተኛ ቁጥጥር በሚያሳየው እና በጥቅልቅ ቁጥጥር በሚያሳየው ጥያቄ እና በሚያሳየው ጥያቄ የሥርዓት ምሳሌዎች በተደረገ ነው፡፡ የጀርባ ዘለዓለም ጥያቄ በሙሉ ቁጥጥር የበለጠ መልስ ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'bs': 'Modeli sekvence do sekvence primjenjeni su na problem generacije odgovora u razgovoru gdje je sekvencija izvora povijest razgovora i ciljna sekvencija je odgovor. Za razliku od prevođenja, odgovor razgovora je posebno kreativan. Generacija dugih, informativnih, koherentnih i različitih odgovora ostaje težak zadatak. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na jedini okret. Dodajemo samopouzdanje dekoderu kako bi održali saslušnost u dužim odgovorima, i predlažemo praktični pristup, nazvan model pogleda, za skaliranje na velike datasete. Predstavljamo stokastički algoritam pretraživanja zraka sa preokretanjem segment a po segmentu koji nam omogućava ubrizgati raznolikost ranije u procesu generacije. Trenirali smo na kombiniranom setu podataka preko 2,3B razgovornih poruka mineralnih sa mreže. U ispitivanjima ljudske procjene, naša metoda proizvodi duže odgovore ukupno, s višem proporcijom procjenom prihvatljivog i odličnog povećanja dužine u usporedbi s modelima iz početne sekvence do sekvence s eksplicitnim promocijom dužine. Povlačena strategija proizvodi bolji odgovor ukupno u punom spektru dužine.', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականություն-հաջորդականության մոդելները կիրառվել են խոսակցության արձագանքի ստեղծման խնդիրը, որտեղ աղբյուրների հաջորդականությունը խոսակցության պատմությունն է, և նպատակային հաջորդականությունը արձագանքն է: Ի տարբերություն թարգմանման, հաղորդակցման արձագանքը իրոք ստեղծագործական է: Երկար, ինֆորմատիվ, համապատասխանական և բազմազան արձագանքների սերունդը դեռևս դժվար խնդիր է: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կենտրոնանում ենք մեկ անկյունին: Մենք ավելացնում ենք ինքնաուշադրություն դեկոդերին, որպեսզի պահպանենք համապատասխանությունը երկար արձագանքների մեջ, և առաջարկում ենք պրակտիկ մոտեցում, որը կոչվում է հայացք-մոդել, մեծ տվյալների համակարգերի ընդլայնման համար: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք արձագանքային ճառագայթով փնտրվող ալգորիթմ՝ սեգմետր առ սեգմետր վերարձագանքելով, որը թույլ է տալիս մեզ ներարձագանքել բազմազանությունը ավելի վաղ սերնդի ընթացքում: Մենք ուսուցանում էինք ինտերնետից հանված ավելի քան 2.3B խոսակցության հաղորդագրությունների համադրված տվյալների համակարգում: Մարդկային գնահատման ուսումնասիրություններում մեր մեթոդը ստեղծում է ավելի երկար արձագանքներ ընդհանուր առմամբ, որտեղ ավելի բարձր չափը գնահատվում է որպես ընդունելի և հիանալի, երբ երկարությունը աճում է, համեմատած հիմնական հաջորդականության-հաջորդակ Հետադարձ ռազմավարությունը ստեղծում է ավելի լավ արձագանքներ ընդհանուր առմամբ, երկարության ամբողջ սպեկտրում:', 'bn': 'যেখানে উৎসের সংক্রান্ত আলোচনার ইতিহাস এবং লক্ষ্যবস্তুর প্রতিক্রিয়া হচ্ছে। অনুবাদের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কথোপকথনের প্রতিক্রিয়া সৃষ দীর্ঘ, তথ্য, সহযোগিতা এবং বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রজন্ম কঠিন কাজ। এই কাজে আমরা একমাত্র পরিবর্তনের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। আমরা ডেকোডারের প্রতি নিজেদের মনোযোগ যোগ করি দীর্ঘদিনের প্রতিক্রিয়ায় যোগাযোগ রাখার জন্য, আর আমরা একটি বাস্তবিক উপায় প্রস্তাব করি, যার নামে  আমরা প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়ার আগে বৈচিত্র্যের বৈচিত্র্য প্রক্রিয়ায় একটি স্টোকাস্টিক বীম-সন্ধান অ্যালগরিদমের সাথে পরিচিত করি। We trained on a combined data set of over 2.3B conversation messages mined from the web.  মানুষের মূল্যবান গবেষণায় আমাদের পদ্ধতি সারাদিকে দীর্ঘ প্রতিক্রিয়া উৎপাদন করে, যেখানে দীর্ঘ বৃদ্ধি হিসেবে বেসাইলাইনের সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্সেক্ একটি পিছনের কৌশল সারাজায় আরো ভালো প্রতিক্রিয়া উৎপাদন করে, পুরো দীর্ঘদিনের মধ্যে।', 'cs': 'Modely sekvence na sekvenci byly aplikovány na problém generování odpovědí konverzace, kdy zdrojovou sekvencí je historie konverzace a cílovou sekvencí je odpověď. Na rozdíl od překladu je reagování konverzace z podstaty kreativní. Generování dlouhých, informativních, soudržných a různorodých reakcí zůstává těžkým úkolem. V této práci se zaměřujeme na nastavení jednoho otočení. Přidáváme samostatnou pozornost dekodéru, abychom udrželi soudržnost v delších reakcích, a navrhujeme praktický přístup, nazývaný zábleskový model, pro škálování na velké datové sady. Představujeme stochastický algoritmus vyhledávání paprsků s přesměrováním segmentů po segmentu, který nám umožňuje vstříknout diverzitu dříve v procesu generace. Trénovali jsme se na kombinované datové sadě konverzačních zpráv více než 2.3B vytěžených z webu. V lidských hodnotících studiích vytváří naše metoda celkově delší odezvy, s vyšším podílem hodnocení jako přijatelné a vynikající s rostoucí délkou, ve srovnání s modely základních sekvencí k sekvenci s explicitní podporou délky. Záložní strategie přináší celkově lepší reakce v celém spektru délek.', 'ca': "Els models de seqüència a seqüència s'han aplicat al problema de la generació de resposta a la conversa on la seqüència fontal és la història de la conversa i la seqüència alvo és la resposta. A diferència de la traducció, la resposta a la conversa és inherentment creativa. La generació de respostes llargues, informatives, coherents i diverses encara és una tasca difícil. En aquesta feina, ens centrem en l'entorn d'una sola gira. Ajudem l'autoatenció al decodificador per mantenir la coherencia en respostes més llargues, i proposem un enfocament pràctic, anomenat model de mirada, per escalar a grans conjunts de dades. We introduce a stochastic beam-search algorithm with segment-by-segment reranking which lets us inject diversity earlier in the generation process.  Vam entrenar en un conjunt combinat de dades de més de 2,3B missatges de conversa extraïts de la Web. En estudis d'evaluació human a, el nostre mètode produeix respostes més llargues en general, amb una proporció més alta classificada com acceptable i excel·lent a mesura que augmenta la llargada, comparat amb models de seqüència a seqüència basal amb promoció explícita de la llargada. A back-off strategy produces better responses overall, in the full spectrum of lengths.", 'fi': 'Sekvenssi-sekvenssimalleja on sovellettu keskusteluvasteen generointiongelmaan, jossa lähdesekvenssi on keskusteluhistoria ja kohdesekvenssi on vastaus. Toisin kuin käännös, keskusteluun vastaaminen on luontaisesti luovaa. Pitkän, informatiivisen, johdonmukaisen ja monipuolisen vastauksen luominen on edelleen vaikea tehtävä. Tässä työssä keskitymme yhden käännöksen asetukseen. Lisäämme dekooderiin itsehuomiota säilyttääksemme johdonmukaisuuden pidemmissä vasteissa, ja ehdotamme käytännöllistä lähestymistapaa, jota kutsutaan välähdysmalliksi, skaalaukseen suuriksi tietokokonaisuuksiksi. Esittelemme stokastisen säteen etsintäalgoritmin segmenttikohtaisella uudelleenjärjestelyllä, jonka avulla voimme injektoida monimuotoisuutta jo aiemmin tuotantoprosessissa. Harjoittelimme yli 2,3 B:n verkkoviestien yhdistettyä datajoukkoa. Ihmisten arviointitutkimuksissa menetelmämme tuottaa kokonaisvasteet pidempään, jolloin suurempi osuus on hyväksyttävä ja erinomainen pituuden kasvaessa verrattuna lähtötason sekvenssimalleihin, joissa on eksplisiittinen pituuden edistäminen. Taustastrategian avulla saadaan aikaan parempia vastauksia koko laajuudeltaan.', 'et': 'Vestlusele reageerimise genereerimise probleemile on rakendatud jada-jada mudeleid, kus lähtejada on vestluse ajalugu ja sihtjada on vastus. Erinevalt tõlkest on vestlusele reageerimine loominguline. Pikaajaliste, informatiivsete, sidusate ja mitmekesiste vastuste loomine on endiselt raske ülesanne. Selles töös keskendume ühe pöörde seadistusele. Lisame dekoodrile enesetähelepanu, et säilitada sidusus pikemates reaktsioonides, ning pakume välja praktilise lähenemisviisi, mida nimetatakse pilgutusmudeliks, suurte andmekogumite skaleerimiseks. Tutvustame stohhaastilist kiirte otsingu algoritmi segment-by-segment ümberpaigutamisega, mis võimaldab meil süstida mitmekesisust varem generatsiooniprotsessis. Koolitasime veebist kaevandatud üle 2,3B vestlussõnumi kombineeritud andmekogumi. Inimeste hindamise uuringutes annab meie meetod üldiselt pikemad vastused, kusjuures suurem osakaal hinnatakse vastuvõetavaks ja suurepäraseks, kui pikkus suureneb, võrreldes algse järjestuse mudelitega, millel on selge pikkuse edendamine. Tagasilöögistrateegia annab üldiselt paremaid vastuseid kogu pikkuse ulatuses.', 'az': 'Sequence-to-sequence modelləri müzakirə cavab vermək nəticəsi probleminə uyğunlaşdırıldı. Kaynak sıralaması keçmişidir və məqsəd sıralaması cavab verildir. Tərcümə müqayisədə, söhbət cavab vermək həqiqətən yaradıcı idi. Uzun, informativ, müxtəlif və müxtəlif cavab vermələrinin nəsili a ğır bir işdir. Bu işdə, tək dönüş tərzinə odaqlanırıq. Biz daha uzun cavab vermək üçün dekoderə özümüzü dikkat edirik və böyük verilən qurğulara ölçmək üçün praktik bir yol təklif edirik. Biz stokastiq qüdrət araştırması algoritmi, segment-by-segment re-anking ilə təşkil edirik ki, əvvəlcə nəsil sürətində cürbəcür fəaliyyəti in şa edərik. İnternettən alınan 2.3B müzakirə ismarışlarının birləşdirilməsi üçün təhsil etdik. İnsanların değerlendirmələrində, metodumuz daha uzun cavab verər, uzunluğu artırmaq üçün daha yüksək və mükemmel bir proporsyon ilə, a çıq uzunluğu artırmaq ilə baseline sequence-to-sequence modellərlə qarşılaşdırır. Əvvəlki strateji daha yaxşı cavab verər, uzunluğun tamamında.', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog Tulung kanggo tarjamahan, nggambar respong mengko iso nggawe kreativ. Jeneng kapan langgar, informasi, coherent lan gambarang sampeyan kuwi susah-susahe Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné iso disebarke ning acara singakaké Awak dhéwé nambah perbudhakan sami nggawe ngubah dewek kanggo mbatalé luwih dumadhi, lan padha nambah ngewehke praksik, nambah model glimpse-dumadhi kanggo nggawe dataset sing apik. Awakdhéwé nggawe Algorithm karo segment-segment sing dadi nggawe ngubah batar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Awakdhéwé seneng beraksi dadi nggambar luwih 2.3 Anyone Awak dhéwé-Awak ngerti mbutuhaké sing luwih luwih apik, lan kabèh langgar barang langgar.", 'ha': 'An amfani da misalin masu sakan-zuwa-sakan zuwa matsayin mazaɓa a matsalar da ake samu a wurin da sequence na source shi ne historin mazaɓa da kuma sequence na goan ta zama majibu. @ info: whatsthis Girlar zaman, da labarai, da wadan ajirar da dabam-dabam, yana mai nauyi. A cikin wannan aikin, munã fahimta a kan daidaita guda. Munã ƙara kansa ga kode don ka tsare kodi a cikin maswali masu tsawo, kuma muna buƙata wata hanyarwa mai halin da aka kallo "misãlin-kiyaye", don ka ƙayyade zuwa tsari masu girma. Tuna fara algoriti mai yin fitina na\'ura da rabo-da-segment mai sauri da shi ke yarda da mu injista dabam\'i fara a cikin jarrabar ƙarami. Mun sanar da samun data masu haɗuwa da jumun mazaɓa na 2.3 B da aka minne daga web. Daga ƙidãya masu bincike na mutum, metodinmu yana fitar da mai karɓar sauri a jumla, da sauri mai sauri da sauri kamar an karɓi da kuma mafi kyaun tsawo da tsawo, sammenlikin misãlai na sequence-zuwa-sequence da shirin-faɗi mai bayyani. Kiki bakin-baka yana fitar da mai kyau ga majiɓinta a jumla, cikin tsammãni kamwai.', 'he': 'דוגמני רצף לרצף הופעו לבעיה של דור התגובה לשיחה שבה רצף המקור הוא היסטוריה של השיחה והרצף המטרה הוא התגובה. בניגוד לתרגום, התגובה לשיחה היא יצירתית באופן טבעי. הדור של תגובות ארוכות, מידעיות, תואם ומגווות נשאר משימה קשה. בעבודה הזו, אנו מתמקדים בסדרת הפנה היחידה. אנו מוסיפים תשומת לב עצמית לפיתוח כדי לשמור על התקבילות בתגובות ארוכות יותר, ואנחנו מציעים גישה מעשית, שנקראת מודל המבט, עבור הגדילה למערכת נתונים גדולה. אנחנו מציגים אלגוריתם חיפוש בקרן סטוקסטי עם מחדש קרישה חלק אחר חלק שמאפשר לנו להזריק מגוון מוקדם יותר בתהליך הדור. אימנו על קבוצת נתונים משולבת של הודעות שיחה מעל 2.3B מוכרות מהרשת. במחקרי הערכה האנושית, השיטה שלנו מייצרת תגובות ארוכות יותר באופן כללי, עם יחס גבוה יותר מוסמך כמקבל ומדהים כשאורך מגביר, בהשוואה לדוגמאות רצף לרצף עם קידום אורך ברור. אסטרטגיה אחורה יוצרת תגובות טובות יותר באופן כללי, בספקטרום מלא של אורך.', 'sk': 'Modeli zaporedja do zaporedja so bili uporabljeni za problem ustvarjanja odziva na pogovor, kjer je izvorno zaporedje zgodovina pogovorov, ciljno zaporedje pa odziv. Za razliko od prevajanja je odzivanje na pogovor sama po sebi ustvarjalno. Ustvarjanje dolgih, informativnih, skladnih in raznolikih odzivov ostaja težka naloga. V tem delu se osredotočamo na nastavitev enega obrata. Dekodirju dodamo samopozornost, da bi ohranili skladnost pri daljših odzivih, in predlagamo praktičen pristop, imenovan model visokega videza, za skaliranje na velike nabore podatkov. Predstavljamo stohastični algoritem za iskanje žarkov s ponovnim razporejanjem segmentov po segmentih, ki nam omogoča vbrizgavanje raznolikosti prej v procesu generacije. Usposabljali smo se na kombiniranem naboru podatkov več kot 2,3 B sporočil o pogovoru, pridobljenih iz spleta. V študijah vrednotenja ljudi naša metoda na splošno proizvaja daljše odzive, pri čemer je večji delež ocenjen kot sprejemljiv in odličen, ko se dolžina povečuje, v primerjavi z osnovnimi modeli zaporedja do zaporedja z eksplicitno promocijo dolžine. Rezervna strategija na splošno prinaša boljše odzive v celotnem spektru dolžin.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དབྱེ་རིམ་དཔེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་གཏམ་གླེང་གི་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ལ། ཡིག་སྐབས་འདིར་མི་འདྲ་བ། གཏམ་གླེང་གི་ལན་སྐོར་ནི་གཞན་དང་གསར་གཏོད་པ་ཡིན། སྔོན་མོ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་། མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ན། གནད་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤུགས་གཅིག་པ་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་བསྟན་ནུས་པ་དེ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་འདྲ་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་མཉམ་དུ་ཆོས་མཐུན་པ་ལ་ཉར་འཇོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཡུ་གྲངས་རྩིས་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་གི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་ཐོག་ནས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་མཉམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In human evaluation studies, our method produces longer responses overall, with a higher proportion rated as acceptable and excellent as length increases, compared to baseline sequence-to-sequence models with explicit length-promotion. ཕྱིར་འཐོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཡིས་རྒྱ་ཚད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་མེད་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Bootstrapping incremental dialogue systems from minimal data : the generalisation power of dialogue grammars', 'ar': 'تمهيد أنظمة الحوار التزايدية من الحد الأدنى من البيانات: قوة التعميم لقواعد الحوار', 'es': 'Arrancar sistemas de diálogo incrementales a partir de datos mínimos: el poder de generalización de las gramáticas de diálogo', 'pt': 'Bootstrapping de sistemas de diálogo incremental a partir de dados mínimos: o poder de generalização das gramáticas de diálogo', 'fr': 'Bootstrap des systèmes de dialogue incrémentiels à partir de données minimales\xa0: le pouvoir de généralisation des grammaires de dialogue', 'ja': '最小限のデータからの増分対話システムのブートストラップ：対話文法の一般化力', 'zh': '从最少之数增量对话系统:对话语法泛化力', 'hi': 'न्यूनतम डेटा से वृद्धिशील संवाद प्रणालियों को बूटस्ट्रैप करना: संवाद व्याकरणों की सामान्यीकरण शक्ति', 'ru': 'Загрузка систем инкрементного диалога из минимальных данных: обобщающая способность диалоговых грамматик', 'ga': 'Bootstrapping córais incriminteacha dialóige ó shonraí íosta: an chumhacht ginearálú na gramadach dialóige', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Η δυνατότητα γενικοποίησης των γραμματικών διαλόγων του διαλόγου', 'hu': 'Inkrementális párbeszédrendszerek indítása minimális adatokból: a párbeszédnyelvek általánosítási ereje', 'kk': 'Төменгі деректерден көптеген диалог жүйелерін түсіру: диалог граммаларының жалпы күшін', 'mk': 'Стартување на поставените дијалошки системи од минимални податоци: моќта на генерализација на граматиките на дијалогот', 'ms': 'Bootstrapping incremental dialog systems from minimal data: the generalization power of dialog grammars', 'it': 'Avviare sistemi di dialogo incrementali da dati minimi: il potere di generalizzazione delle grammatiche di dialogo', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാന്യമായ ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ബുക്ട്രാക്ട്രാപ്റ', 'no': 'Bootstrapping incremental dialog systems from minimal data: the generalisation power of dialog grammar', 'mt': 'It-trażżin ta’ sistemi ta’ djalogu inkrementali minn dejta minima: is-setgħa ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni tal-grammi ta’ djalogu', 'lt': 'Pradėti palaipsniui dialoguojančias sistemas iš minimalių duomenų: dialogo gramatikų generalizacijos galia', 'sr': 'Potaknuti sisteme povećanja dijaloga iz minimalnih podataka: energija generalizacije gramara dijaloga', 'ro': 'Pornirea sistemelor de dialog incremental din date minime: puterea de generalizare a gramaticilor de dialog', 'so': 'Boostada ku boostada nidaamka bulshada ee ku qoran macluumaadka ugu yaraan: the generalisation power of grammar dialog', 'si': 'The General Power of dialog gram', 'mn': 'Бага өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс нэмэлт диалог системүүдийг бууруулах: диалог грамм', 'sv': 'Starta upp inkrementella dialogsystem från minimal data: generaliseringskraften hos dialoggrammatiker', 'pl': 'Rozruchowe systemy dialogu przyrostowego z minimalnych danych: moc uogólniająca gramatyki dialogu', 'ta': 'குறைந்தபட்ச தரவிலிருந்து அதிகரிப்பு உரையாடல் முறைமைகளை புத்தகக்குறிப்பு', 'ur': 'نیم ڈیٹا سے اضافہ دیالوگ سیسٹم کو بوٹ ڈالنے والی بوٹ ڈالے جاتے ہیں: ڈیلوگ گرامر کی عمومی طاقت', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Khởi động hệ thống cuộc đối thoại dần từ dữ liệu tối thiểu: sức mạnh tổng quát của các tạp chí đối thoại', 'nl': "Opstappen van incrementele dialoogsystemen op basis van minimale data: de generalisatiekracht van dialooggrammatica's", 'hr': 'Potaknuti sustave povećanja dijaloga iz minimalnih podataka: generalizacija energije gramara dijaloga', 'bg': 'Стартиране на програмни диалогови системи от минимални данни: силата на обобщаване на диалоговите граматики', 'da': 'Bootstraping inkrementelle dialogsystemer fra minimale data: generaliseringseffekten af dialoggrammatik', 'id': 'Bootstrapping incremental dialog systems from minimal data: the generalization power of dialog grammars', 'de': 'Bootstrapping inkrementeller Dialogsysteme aus minimalen Daten: die Generalisierungskraft von Dialoggrammaren', 'ko': '최소 데이터에서 증량 대화 시스템 유도: 대화 문법의 범위화 능력', 'sw': 'Vitabu vya kuzuia mifumo ya mazungumzo yanayozidi kuanzia takwimu za chini: nguvu ya uzalishaji ya gramma za mazungumzo', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ افزایش از داده\u200cهای minimal: قدرت عمومی\u200cسازی گرامارهای محاورۀ محاورۀ', 'sq': 'Bootstrapping incremental dialogue systems from minimal data: the generalisation power of dialogue grammars', 'tr': 'Azyndaky maglumatlardan soňky dýaloglar sistemlerini görkezilýär: dýalogyň güýçleri', 'af': 'Bootstrap inkremensiele dialoog stelsels van minimale data: the generalisation power of dialog grammars', 'am': 'መዝገብ ቤቶች', 'bs': 'Pokretanje povećanog dijaloga iz minimalnih podataka: generalizacija energije gramara dijaloga', 'az': '∆Źnim…ôtli m…ôlumatlardan artńĪqlńĪq dijalog sisteml…ôrini dańüńĪtmaq: –ī–ł–į–Ľ–ĺ–≥ gramalarńĪnńĪn generalizasyon g√ľc√ľ', 'hy': 'Գործողական խմբախոսական համակարգերի սկսելը մինիմալ տվյալներից. խմբախոսական գրամագրությունների ընդհանուր ազդեցությունը', 'et': 'Alalise dialoogi süsteemide käivitamine minimaalsetest andmetest: dialoogi grammatika üldistamisvõime', 'fi': 'Käynnistetään vaiheittaiset dialogijärjestelmät minimaalisesta datasta: dialogin kielioppien yleistysvoima', 'bn': 'সর্বনিম্ন তথ্য থেকে অগ্রগতির ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম বুটট্র্যাপিং করা হচ্ছে: ডায়ালগ গ্রামারের জেনালেলালেশন ক', 'cs': 'Bootstrapping inkrementálních dialogových systémů z minimálních dat: generalizační síla dialogových gramatik', 'ca': 'Emportar els sistemes de diàleg incremental a partir de dades mínimas: el poder de generalització de les gramàtiques de diàleg', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Bootstrapping incremental dialogue systems from minimal data: the generalisation power of dialogue grammars', 'sk': 'Zagonski sistemi postopnega dialoga iz minimalnih podatkov: moč posploševanja slovnic dialoga', 'bo': 'ཆུང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་ཆུང་བའི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གི་ཌའི་ལོག་རིམ་ལག་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'We investigate an end-to-end method for automatically inducing task-based dialogue systems from small amounts of unannotated dialogue data. It combines an incremental semantic grammar-Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR)-with Reinforcement Learning (RL), where language generation and dialogue management are a joint decision problem. The systems thus produced are incremental : dialogues are processed word-by-word, shown previously to be essential in supporting natural, spontaneous dialogue. We hypothesised that the rich linguistic knowledge within the grammar should enable a combinatorially large number of dialogue variations to be processed, even when trained on very few dialogues. Our experiments show that our model can process 74 % of the Facebook AI bAbI dataset even when trained on only 0.13 % of the data (5 dialogues). It can in addition process 65 % of bAbI+, a corpus we created by systematically adding incremental dialogue phenomena such as restarts and self-corrections to bAbI. We compare our model with a state-of-the-art retrieval model, MEMN2N. We find that, in terms of semantic accuracy, the MEMN2N model shows very poor robustness to the bAbI+ transformations even when trained on the full bAbI dataset.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في طريقة شاملة للتحريض التلقائي لأنظمة الحوار القائمة على المهام من كميات صغيرة من بيانات الحوار غير المشروحة. فهو يجمع بين القواعد الدلالية المتزايدة - التركيب الديناميكي ونظرية النوع مع السجلات (DS-TTR) - مع التعلم المعزز (RL) ، حيث يمثل إنشاء اللغة وإدارة الحوار مشكلة قرار مشتركة. الأنظمة التي يتم إنتاجها على هذا النحو تكون تدريجية: تتم معالجة الحوارات كلمة بكلمة ، والتي تبين سابقًا أنها ضرورية في دعم الحوار الطبيعي والعفوي. افترضنا أن المعرفة اللغوية الثرية داخل القواعد يجب أن تتيح معالجة عدد كبير من الاختلافات في الحوار ، حتى عند التدريب على عدد قليل جدًا من الحوارات. تُظهر تجاربنا أن نموذجنا يمكنه معالجة 74٪ من مجموعة بيانات Facebook AI bAbI حتى عند التدريب على 0.13٪ فقط من البيانات (5 حوارات). يمكنه بالإضافة إلى ذلك معالجة 65٪ من bAbI + ، وهي مجموعة أنشأناها عن طريق إضافة ظواهر حوار تزايدي بشكل منهجي مثل عمليات إعادة التشغيل والتصحيحات الذاتية إلى bAbI. قارنا نموذجنا بنموذج استرجاع حديث ، MEMN2N. وجدنا أنه ، من حيث الدقة الدلالية ، يُظهر نموذج MEMN2N متانة ضعيفة للغاية لتحولات bAbI + حتى عند التدريب على مجموعة بيانات bAbI الكاملة.', 'es': 'Investigamos un método integral para inducir automáticamente sistemas de diálogo basados en tareas a partir de pequeñas cantidades de datos de diálogo no anotados. Combina una gramática semántica incremental - Sintaxis dinámica y teoría de tipos con registros (DS-TTR) - con el aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL), donde la generación del lenguaje y la gestión del diálogo son un problema de decisión conjunta. Los sistemas así producidos son incrementales: los diálogos se procesan palabra por palabra, lo que anteriormente se ha demostrado que son esenciales para apoyar el diálogo natural y espontáneo. Hicimos la hipótesis de que el rico conocimiento lingüístico dentro de la gramática debería permitir procesar un número combinatoriamente grande de variaciones de diálogo, incluso cuando se entrenan en muy pocos diálogos. Nuestros experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo puede procesar el 74% del conjunto de datos BaBi de la IA de Facebook incluso cuando se entrena solo con el 0,13% de los datos (5 diálogos). Además, puede procesar el 65% de BaBi+, un corpus que creamos añadiendo sistemáticamente fenómenos de diálogo incremental como reinicios y autocorrecciones a BaBi. Comparamos nuestro modelo con un modelo de recuperación de última generación, MEMN2N. Encontramos que, en términos de precisión semántica, el modelo MEMN2N muestra una robustez muy pobre a las transformaciones de BaBi+, incluso cuando se entrena en el conjunto de datos completo de BaBi.', 'pt': 'Investigamos um método de ponta a ponta para induzir automaticamente sistemas de diálogo baseados em tarefas a partir de pequenas quantidades de dados de diálogo não anotados. Combina uma gramática semântica incremental - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - com Reinforcement Learning (RL), onde a geração da linguagem e a gestão do diálogo são um problema de decisão conjunta. Os sistemas assim produzidos são incrementais: os diálogos são processados palavra-a-palavra, mostrados anteriormente como essenciais para sustentar o diálogo natural e espontâneo. Nossa hipótese é que o rico conhecimento linguístico dentro da gramática deve permitir o processamento de um grande número combinatório de variações de diálogos, mesmo quando treinados em muito poucos diálogos. Nossos experimentos mostram que nosso modelo pode processar 74% do conjunto de dados do Facebook AI bAbI mesmo quando treinado em apenas 0,13% dos dados (5 diálogos). Além disso, pode processar 65% do bAbI+, um corpus que criamos adicionando sistematicamente fenômenos de diálogo incremental, como reinícios e autocorreções ao bAbI. Comparamos nosso modelo com um modelo de recuperação de última geração, MEMN2N. Descobrimos que, em termos de precisão semântica, o modelo MEMN2N mostra uma robustez muito baixa para as transformações bAbI+ mesmo quando treinado no conjunto de dados bAbI completo.', 'fr': "Nous étudions une méthode de bout en bout permettant d'induire automatiquement des systèmes de dialogue basés sur des tâches à partir de petites quantités de données de dialogue non annotées. Il combine une grammaire sémantique incrémentielle - Syntaxe dynamique et théorie des types avec enregistrements (DS-TTR) - avec l'apprentissage par renforcement (RL), où la génération de langage et la gestion du dialogue sont un problème de décision conjointe. Les systèmes ainsi produits sont incrémentiels\xa0: les dialogues sont traités mot par mot, comme il a été démontré précédemment qu'ils étaient essentiels au soutien d'un dialogue naturel et spontané. Nous avons émis l'hypothèse que les riches connaissances linguistiques de la grammaire devraient permettre de traiter un grand nombre de variations de dialogue combinatoires, même si elles sont formées sur très peu de dialogues. Nos expériences montrent que notre modèle peut traiter 74\xa0% du jeu de données Facebook AI BABi même s'il n'est entraîné que sur 0,13\xa0% des données (5 dialogues). Il peut en outre traiter 65\xa0% de BaBi+, un corpus que nous avons créé en ajoutant systématiquement à BaBI des phénomènes de dialogue incrémentiels tels que des redémarrages et des auto-corrections. Nous comparons notre modèle avec un modèle de récupération de pointe, MEMN2N. Nous constatons qu'en termes de précision sémantique, le modèle MEMN2N montre une très faible robustesse face aux transformations BaBi+, même lorsqu'il est entraîné sur l'ensemble de données BAbi complet.", 'ja': '少量の注釈のない対話データからタスクベースの対話システムを自動的に誘発するためのエンドツーエンドの方法を調査します。 これは、増分意味文法-動的構文と型理論とレコード（ DS - TTR ） -と強化学習（ RL ）を組み合わせたもので、言語生成と対話管理は共同決定問題です。 このように生成されたシステムは、インクリメンタルである。ダイアログは単語ごとに処理され、自然で自発的な対話をサポートするために不可欠であることが以前に示されている。 文法内の豊富な言語学的知識は、非常に少ない対話で訓練されている場合でも、多数の対話バリエーションを処理できるようにするべきであると仮定した。 私たちの実験によると、私たちのモデルは、わずか0.13 ％のデータ（ 5つのダイアログ）で訓練されていても、Facebook AI bAbIデータセットの74 ％を処理できます。 さらに、bAbI +の65%を処理することができます。これは、bAbIに再起動や自己補正などの増分ダイアログ現象を体系的に追加して作成したコーパスです。 当社のモデルを最先端の検索モデルであるMEMN 2 Nと比較します。 我々は、意味的正確性の観点から、MEMN 2 Nモデルは、完全なbAbIデータセットで訓練された場合でも、bAbI +変換に対する非常に劣った堅牢性を示すことを見出す。', 'zh': '臣等考其端到端,施于少注之对,自诱其统。 以增量语义语法 - 动语法与论(DS-TTR) - 与化(RL)合,言语同决策问题。 故系统者,渐进式也;言者,逐字逐句也;前证自然,自发之要也。 设语法之言,当能多合变体,虽少习亦如之。 吾实验明74%之Facebook AI bAbI数集,虽在0.13%之数(5)习之。 此外可以理65%之bAbI +,此因系统地以益bAbI增量对(如重新启动自校)而创造之语料库也。 以我之先进MEMN2N比之。 以语义准确性言之,虽全bAbI数集上教习,MEMN2N形于bAbI +易者鲁棒性甚劣。', 'hi': 'हम स्वचालित रूप से अघोषित संवाद डेटा की छोटी मात्रा से कार्य-आधारित संवाद प्रणालियों को प्रेरित करने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड विधि की जांच करते हैं। यह एक वृद्धिशील शब्दार्थ व्याकरण को जोड़ती है - डायनेमिक सिंटैक्स और टाइप थ्योरी विद रिकॉर्ड्स (डीएस-टीटीआर) - सुदृढीकरण लर्निंग (आरएल) के साथ, जहां भाषा पीढ़ी और संवाद प्रबंधन एक संयुक्त निर्णय समस्या है। इस प्रकार उत्पादित प्रणालियां वृद्धिशील हैं: संवादों को शब्द-दर-शब्द संसाधित किया जाता है, जो पहले प्राकृतिक, सहज संवाद का समर्थन करने में आवश्यक दिखाया गया था। हमने परिकल्पना की कि व्याकरण के भीतर समृद्ध भाषाई ज्ञान को बहुत कम संवादों पर प्रशिक्षित होने पर भी बड़ी संख्या में संवाद विविधताओं को संसाधित करने में सक्षम होना चाहिए। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल फेसबुक एआई बीएबीआई डेटासेट के 74% को संसाधित कर सकता है, भले ही केवल 0.13% डेटा (5 संवाद) पर प्रशिक्षित हो। यह इसके अलावा 65% बीएबीआई + की प्रक्रिया कर सकता है, एक कॉर्पस जिसे हमने व्यवस्थित रूप से वृद्धिशील संवाद घटनाओं को जोड़कर बनाया है जैसे कि बीएबीआई में पुनरारंभ और आत्म-सुधार। हम अपने मॉडल की तुलना अत्याधुनिक पुनर्प्राप्ति मॉडल, MEMN2N के साथ करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि, शब्दार्थ सटीकता के संदर्भ में, MEMN2N मॉडल bAbI + परिवर्तनों के लिए बहुत खराब मजबूती दिखाता है, भले ही पूर्ण बीएबीआई डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया गया हो।', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем сквозной метод автоматического побуждения диалоговых систем на основе задач из небольших объемов неаннотированных диалоговых данных. Он сочетает в себе инкрементную семантическую грамматику - динамический синтаксис и теорию типов с записями (DS-TTR) - с обучением подкреплению (RL), где генерация языка и управление диалогом являются совместной проблемой принятия решений. Полученные таким образом системы являются инкрементными: диалоги обрабатываются слово за словом, что, как было показано ранее, имеет важное значение для поддержки естественного, спонтанного диалога. Мы предположили, что богатые лингвистические знания в рамках грамматики должны позволять обрабатывать комбинаторно большое количество диалоговых вариаций, даже если они обучены очень малому количеству диалогов. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наша модель может обрабатывать 74% набора данных Facebook AI bAbI даже при обучении только на 0,13% данных (5 диалогов). Кроме того, он может обрабатывать 65% bAbI+, корпуса, созданного нами путем систематического добавления в bAbI явлений инкрементного диалога, таких как перезапуск и самокоррекция. Мы сравниваем нашу модель с самой современной моделью поиска, MEMN2N. Мы обнаружили, что с точки зрения семантической точности модель MEMN2N демонстрирует очень низкую устойчивость к преобразованиям bAbI+ даже при обучении на полном наборе данных bAbI.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar mhodh ceann go ceann chun córais dialóige tascbhunaithe a aslú go huathoibríoch ó mhéideanna beaga de shonraí idirphlé gan nótaí. Comhcheanglaíonn sé gramadach shéimeantach incriminteach - Comhréir Dinimiciúla agus Teoiric Chineál le Taifid (DS-TTR) - le Foghlaim Atreisithe (RL), áit a bhfuil giniúint teanga agus bainistíocht idirphlé ina fhadhb comhchinnteoireachta. Tá na córais a tháirgtear mar sin de réir a chéile: próiseáiltear idirphlé focal ar fhocal, a léiríodh roimhe seo go bhfuil siad ríthábhachtach chun tacú le hidirphlé nádúrtha, spontáineach. Rinneamar hipitéisí gur chóir go mbeadh an t-eolas saibhir teangeolaíoch sa ghramadach in ann líon mór éagsúlachtaí idirphlé a phróiseáil, fiú agus iad oilte ar fíorbheagán comhráite. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh gur féidir lenár múnla 74% de thacar sonraí Facebook AI bAbI a phróiseáil fiú nuair nach bhfuil oiliúint déanta ach ar 0.13% de na sonraí (5 idirphlé). Ina theannta sin is féidir leis 65% de bAbI+ a phróiseáil, corpas a chruthaigh muid trí fheiniméin chomhphlé incriminteacha a chur leis go córasach amhail atosuithe agus féincheartúcháin le bAbI. Déanaimid ár múnla a chur i gcomparáid le samhail aisghabhála úrscothach, MEMN2N. Faighimid amach, maidir le cruinneas séimeantach, go léiríonn samhail MEMN2N láidreacht an-lag i leith na gclaochluithe bAbI+ fiú nuair a chuirtear oiliúint ar an tacar sonraí iomlán bAbI.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε μια ολοκληρωμένη μέθοδο για την αυτόματη ενεργοποίηση συστημάτων διαλόγου βάσει εργασιών από μικρές ποσότητες μη καταχωρημένων δεδομένων διαλόγου. Συνδυάζει μια αυξανόμενη σημασιολογική γραμματική, τη δυναμική σύνταξη και τη θεωρία τύπων με εγγραφές (όπου η δημιουργία γλωσσών και η διαχείριση διαλόγου αποτελούν κοινό πρόβλημα λήψης αποφάσεων. Τα συστήματα που παράγονται με αυτόν τον τρόπο είναι βαθμιαία: οι διάλογοι επεξεργάζονται λέξη-προς-λέξη, γεγονός που προηγουμένως αποδεικνύεται ότι είναι ουσιαστικό για την υποστήριξη του φυσικού, αυθόρμητου διαλόγου. Υποθέσαμε ότι η πλούσια γλωσσική γνώση μέσα στη γραμματική θα επιτρέψει την επεξεργασία ενός συνδυαστικά μεγάλου αριθμού παραλλαγών διαλόγου, ακόμα και όταν εκπαιδεύεται σε πολύ λίγους διαλόγους. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να επεξεργαστεί 74% του συνόλου δεδομένων του Facebook AI bAbI ακόμη και όταν εκπαιδευτεί σε μόνο 0,13% των δεδομένων (5 διαλόγοι). Επιπλέον, μπορεί να επεξεργαστεί 65% του ενός σώματος που δημιουργήσαμε προσθέτοντας συστηματικά επιπρόσθετα φαινόμενα διαλόγου όπως επανεκκινήσεις και αυτοδιορθώσεις στο bAbI. Συγκρίνουμε το μοντέλο μας με ένα μοντέλο ανάκτησης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, το MEMN2N. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι, από την άποψη της σημασιολογικής ακρίβειας, το μοντέλο δείχνει πολύ κακή ανθεκτικότητα στους μετασχηματισμούς ακόμα και όταν εκπαιδεύεται στο πλήρες σύνολο δεδομένων του bAbI.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ავტომატურად დავაკეთებთ დავაკეთებული დიალოგის სისტემებისთვის, რომელიც დავაკეთებული დავაკეთებული დიალოგის მონაცემების პატარა ზომადან. ეს კომბინემენტური სენმანტიკი გრამატი - დინამიკი სინტაქსი და ტიპის ტეორია რეკოდენტებით (DS-TTR) - სწავლებით სწავლებით (RL), სადაც ენის წარმოიქმნა და დიალოგის მენეჯერება ერთადერთი პ ასე გამოყენებული სისტემები ინტერმენტიურია: დიალოგიები გამოყენებულია სიტყვებით სიტყვებით, რომლებიც წინა ჩვენებულია, რომ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სახელსაწყ ჩვენ ვფიქრობდით, რომ გრამიკაში ბედნიერი ენგურისტიკური მეცნიერება უნდა შეუძლებელია კომბინონიტურად დიალოგიური გარიაციების რაოდენობას, როდესაც ძალიან რამდენიმე დიალოგი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია Facebook AI bAbI მონაცემების 74%-ის პროცესი გავაკეთება, მაგრამ როცა მხოლოდ 0.13% მონაცემების (5 დიალოგიები ეს შეიძლება დამატებით პროცესის 65% bAbI+-ის, რომელიც ჩვენ შექმნა სისტემატიკურად ინტერმენტური დიალოგის ფენომენების დამატებით, როგორც bAbI-ს გადავიწყება და self-correction. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებით, MEMN2N-ის მოდელით. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ მეMN2N მოდელის შესახებ ძალიან ღარიელობა bAbI+ ტრანფორმაციების შესახებ, მაგრამ როდესაც საკუთარი bAbI მონაცემების შესახებ განაკეთებულია.', 'it': "Investighiamo un metodo end-to-end per indurre automaticamente sistemi di dialogo basati su attività da piccole quantità di dati di dialogo non notati. Combina una grammatica semantica incrementale - Sintassi dinamica e Teoria del tipo con record (DS-TTR) - con Reinforcement Learning (RL), dove la generazione del linguaggio e la gestione del dialogo sono un problema decisionale congiunto. I sistemi così prodotti sono incrementali: i dialoghi vengono elaborati parola per parola, precedentemente dimostrati essenziali per sostenere il dialogo naturale e spontaneo. Abbiamo ipotizzato che la ricca conoscenza linguistica all'interno della grammatica dovrebbe consentire di elaborare un numero combinativamente elevato di variazioni di dialogo, anche quando addestrati su pochissimi dialoghi. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello può elaborare il 74% del dataset bAbI di Facebook AI anche se addestrato solo sullo 0,13% dei dati (5 dialoghi). Può inoltre elaborare il 65% di bAbI+, un corpus che abbiamo creato aggiungendo sistematicamente fenomeni di dialogo incrementali come riavvii e auto-correzioni a bAbI. Confrontiamo il nostro modello con un modello di recupero all'avanguardia, MEMN2N. Troviamo che, in termini di accuratezza semantica, il modello MEMN2N mostra una scarsa robustezza alle trasformazioni bAbI+ anche se addestrato sull'intero dataset bAbI.", 'hu': 'Egy end-to-end módszert vizsgálunk a feladatalapú párbeszédrendszerek automatikus indukálására kis mennyiségű, nem jegyzett párbeszédadat alapján. Az inkrementális szemantikai nyelvtan - dinamikus szintaxis és típuselmélet rekordokkal (DS-TTR) - ötvözi a megerősítési tanulással (RL), ahol a nyelvgenerálás és a párbeszédkezelés közös döntési probléma. Az így létrehozott rendszerek inkrementálisak: a párbeszédeket szóról szóra dolgozzák fel, amelyek korábban elengedhetetlenek a természetes, spontán párbeszéd támogatásában. Feltételeztük, hogy a nyelvtan gazdag nyelvtudásának lehetővé kell tennie egy kombinációs számú párbeszédvariáció feldolgozását, még akkor is, ha nagyon kevés párbeszédre képzett. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy modellünk képes feldolgozni a Facebook AI bAbI adatkészletének 74%-át, még akkor is, ha az adatok mindössze 0,13%-ára képzett (5 párbeszéd). Ezenkívül feldolgozhatja a bAbI+ 65%-át, amelyet azáltal hoztunk létre, hogy szisztematikusan hozzáadjuk a fokozatos párbeszédjelenségeket, például újraindításokat és önkorrekciókat a bAbI-hoz. Modellünket összehasonlítjuk egy korszerű visszakeresési modellel, a MEMN2N-vel. Úgy találjuk, hogy a szemantikai pontosság szempontjából a MEMN2N modell nagyon gyenge robusztusságot mutat a bAbI+ transzformációkkal szemben, még akkor is, ha a teljes bAbI adatkészletre képzett.', 'mk': 'We investigate an end-to-end method for automatically inducing task-based dialogue systems from small amounts of unannotated dialogue data.  Таа комбинира екстрементална семантична граматика - Динамичка синтакса и теорија на тип со рекорди (DS-TTR) - со зајакнувањето на учењето (RL), каде што генерацијата на јазици и менаџментот на дијалогот се заеднички проблем со одлуките. Така произведените системи се екстрементални: дијалозите се процесирани збор по збор, покажани претходно дека се суштински за поддршка на природниот, спонтан дијалог. We hypothesised that the rich linguistic knowledge within the grammar should enable a combinatorially large number of dialogue variations to be processed, even when trained on very few dialogues.  Our experiments show that our model can process 74% of the Facebook AI bAbI dataset even when trained on only 0.13% of the data (5 dialogues).  It can in addition process 65% of bAbI+, a corpus we created by systematically adding incremental dialogue phenomena such as restarts and self-corrections to bAbI.  Го споредуваме нашиот модел со најнов модел, MEMN2N. Најдовме дека, во поглед на семантичната прецизност, моделот MEMN2N покажува многу лоша robustness на трансформациите bAbI+ дури и кога се тренира на целосното dataset bAbI.', 'ms': 'We investigate an end-to-end method for automatically inducing task-based dialogue systems from small amounts of unannotated dialogue data.  It combines an incremental semantic grammar - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - with Reinforcement Learning (RL), where language generation and dialogue management are a joint decision problem.  The systems thus produced are incremental: dialogues are processed word-by-word, shown previously to be essential in supporting natural, spontaneous dialogue.  Kami hipotesis bahawa pengetahuan bahasa yang kaya dalam grammar sepatutnya membolehkan bilangan kombinatorial yang besar variasi dialog untuk diproses, walaupun bila dilatih pada dialog yang sangat sedikit. Our experiments show that our model can process 74% of the Facebook AI bAbI dataset even when trained on only 0.13% of the data (5 dialogues).  It can in addition process 65% of bAbI+, a corpus we created by systematically adding incremental dialogue phenomena such as restarts and self-corrections to bAbI.  Kita membandingkan model kita dengan model pemulihan terbaik, MEMN2N. Kami mendapati bahawa, dalam terma ketepatan semantik, model MEMN2N menunjukkan kekuatan yang sangat buruk kepada perubahan bAbI+ walaupun bila dilatih pada set data bAbI penuh.', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം സ്വയമായി തുടങ്ങുന്നതിനുള്ള അവസാനം അവസാനിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു രീ അത് ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഗ്രാമാറ്റര്\u200d - ഡൈനാമിക്ക് സിന്റാക്സും ടൈപ്പ് തിയറി റെക്കോര്\u200dഡുകളുമായി കൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പുനര്\u200dമ്മ പഠിപ്പിക്കു സ്വാഭാവികമായ സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്വാഭാവികമായ സംവാദത്തെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മുമ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിച്ചത് ഗ്രാമാരിലെ ധനവാന്മാരുടെ ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കണക്ടറിയല്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കേണ്ടതാണെന്നാണ്. വളരെ കുറച ഞങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഫെക്സുബിഐ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d 74% പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു.  ബിഅബില്\u200d + 65% പ്രക്രിയയോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ നാം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ബിബിയിലേ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആര്\u200dട്ട് റിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d മോഡലിനോട് തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത്, സെമാന്റിക്ക് തെളിവുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, MEMN2N മോഡല്\u200d ബിബിഐ+ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വളരെ പാവപ്പെട്ട വസ്ത്രം കാണിക്കുന്ന', 'mn': 'Бид ажил дээр суурилсан диалог системийг жижиг хэмжээний мэдээллээс автоматжуулахын тулд төгсгөл-төгсгөл аргыг судалж байна. Энэ нь нэмэгдүүлэх semantic grammar - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - Reinforcement Learning (RL) болон хэл үйлдвэрлэл болон диалог удирдах асуудалтай холбоотой. Иймээс бүтээгдэхүүний систем нь нэмэлтэй: диалогууд нь байгалийн, сэтгэл хангалттай диалогуудыг дэмжихийн тулд өмнө нь чухал байдаг. Бид грамматикийн баян хэлний мэдлэг нь хэд хэдэн диалог дээр суралцах боломжтой байх боломжтой гэж бодсон. Бидний туршилтууд бидний загвар Фейсбук AI bAbI өгөгдлийн сургалтын 74% нь өгөгдлийн 0.13%-ын сургалтын үед ч харуулж чадна. Энэ нь bAbI+-ын 65% үйл явцыг нэмэх боломжтой. Бидний систематикийн диалог үзэгдлийг дахин эхлүүлж, өөрийгөө зөвшөөрөх боломжтой. Бид загварын загварыг MEMN2N-тэй харьцуулж байна. МЕМН2N загварын тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой нь bAbI+ өгөгдлийн санд суралцах үед хүртэл маш ядуу байдал харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker ein sluttmetode for automatisk indusering av oppgåvebaserte dialogsystemer frå små mengdar av ukjente dialogdata. Det kombinerer eit inkrementalt semantisk grammar – dynamisk syntaks og typteorie med opptak (DS-TTR) - med reinforcement Learning (RL), der språk-generering og dialoghandtering er eit samanlig problem med beslutningar. Systemane slik produsert er aukande: dialogvindauge er handsama ordetter ord, som før er viktig for å støtta naturleg og spontane dialogvindauge. Vi hypotiserte at den rike lingviske kunnskapen i grammatikken skal slå på ein kombinasjonelt stor tal dialogvariasjonar som skal handterast, sjølv når det er trent på veldig få dialogar. Eksperimentane våre viser at modellen vårt kan prosessera 74% av datasettet Facebook AI bAbI sjølv når det er trent på berre 0,13% av data (5 dialogar). Det kan i tillegg leggja til prosessen 65% av bAbI+, eit korpus vi laga av systematisk legg til inkrementalt dialogfenomen som startar på nytt og selvkorreksjon til bAbI. Vi sammenliknar modellen vårt med ein tilstandsmodul for kunsthenting, MEMN2N. Vi finn at mellom semantiske nøyaktighet viser MEMN2N-modellen svært dårlig kraftighet til bAbI+ transformasjonane sjølv når det er trent på full bAbI-datasettet.', 'pl': 'Badamy kompleksową metodę automatycznego wywoływania systemów dialogowych opartych na zadaniach z niewielkich ilości niezapisanych danych dialogowych. Łączy przyrostową gramatykę semantyczną z dynamiczną składnią i teorią typu z rekordami (DS-TTR z uczeniem się wzmocnienia (RL), gdzie generowanie języków i zarządzanie dialogiem są problemem wspólnych decyzji. Stworzone w ten sposób systemy są przyrostowe: dialogi są przetwarzane słowo po słowie, co wcześniej okazało się niezbędne dla wspierania naturalnego, spontanicznego dialogu. Założyliśmy hipotezę, że bogata wiedza językowa w ramach gramatyki powinna umożliwić przetwarzanie kombinatorowo dużej liczby wariantów dialogu, nawet jeśli trenujemy na bardzo niewielu dialogach. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz model może przetwarzać 74% zbioru danych bAbI Facebooka nawet wtedy, gdy jest przeszkolony tylko na 0,13% danych (5 dialogi). Może dodatkowo przetwarzać 65% bAbI+, korpusu, który stworzyliśmy poprzez systematyczne dodawanie do bAbI zjawisk dialogu przyrostowego, takich jak restarty i autokorekcje. Porównujemy nasz model z najnowocześniejszym modelem odzyskiwania MEMN2N. Odkrywamy, że pod względem dokładności semantycznej model MEMN2N wykazuje bardzo słabą solidność transformacji bAbI+, nawet gdy jest trenowany na pełnym zbiorze danych bAbI.', 'ro': 'Investigăm o metodă end-to-end pentru inducerea automată a sistemelor de dialog bazate pe sarcini din cantități mici de date de dialog neanotate. Acesta combină o gramatică semantică incrementală - sintaxa dinamică și teoria tipului cu înregistrări (DS-TTR) - cu învățarea de consolidare (RL), unde generarea limbii și managementul dialogului sunt o problemă de decizie comună. Sistemele astfel produse sunt incrementale: dialogurile sunt procesate cuvânt cu cuvânt, dovedit anterior a fi esențiale în susținerea dialogului natural, spontan. Am presupus că bogatele cunoștințe lingvistice din cadrul gramaticii ar trebui să permită procesarea unui număr combinator mare de variații de dialog, chiar și atunci când sunt instruite pe foarte puține dialoguri. Experimentele noastre arată că modelul nostru poate procesa 74% din setul de date Facebook AI bAbI chiar și atunci când este instruit pe doar 0,13% din date (5 dialoguri). În plus, poate procesa 65% din bAbI+, un corpus pe care l-am creat prin adăugarea sistematică a fenomenelor de dialog incrementale, cum ar fi reporniri și auto-corecții la bAbI. Comparăm modelul nostru cu un model de recuperare de ultimă generație, MEMN2N. Considerăm că, în ceea ce privește acuratețea semantică, modelul MEMN2N arată o robustețe foarte slabă la transformările bAbI+ chiar și atunci când este instruit pe setul complet de date bAbI.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo metodu kraja do kraja za automatski izazivanje sistema dijaloga na temelju zadataka iz malih količina nepoznatih podataka o dijalogu. Kombinacija incrementalne semantičke gramatike - dinamička sintaksa i teorija tipa sa rekordima (DS-TTR) - sa učenjem pojačanja (RL), gdje su problem sa generacijom jezika i upravljanjem dijaloga zajednički. Ovako proizvedeni sistemi su neverovatni: dijalogi su obrađeni rijeèima po reèima, pokazali su da su ranije bitni u podršci prirodnog, spontanog dijaloga. Pretpostavili smo da bogati jezički znanje u gramatici treba omogućiti kombinacionalno veliki broj varijacija dijaloga koji će biti obrađeni, čak i kada su obučeni na veoma malo dijaloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model može procesirati 74% podataka Facebook AI bAbI čak i kada je obučen samo 0,13% podataka (5 dijaloga). Može dodatno proces 65% bAbI+, korpus koji smo stvorili sistematski dodajući incrementalne dijalogske fenomene kao što su ponovno početak i samookorekcije bAbI. Uspoređujemo naš model sa modelom povratka umetnosti, MEMN2N. Smatramo da, u smislu semantičke tačnosti, model MEMN2N pokazuje vrlo lošu robustnost bAbI+ transformaciji čak i kada je obučen na punom setu podataka bAbI.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ අවසාන විධානයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් සංවාද පද්ධතිය සංවාද පද්ධතිය පොඩි සංවාද දත්ත ප්\u200dර It combinates an Incredible semantic gram - Dinamic Synax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - with Rest Force Training (RL), where language generation and dialog management are a shared resolution error. මෙතනින් නිර්මාණය කරපු පද්ධතියක් විශේෂයි: සංවාදය සංවාදය පද්ධතිය කරපු වචන වචන වචන වචන වගේ, පෙන්වන්නේ ප අපි හිතුවා විශ්වාස කරනවා විශාල භාෂාත්මක දැනගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, සංවාද කීපයක් සම්බන්ධ විශාල සංවාද කිරීම සක අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් ෆේස්බූක් AI bAbbI දත්ත සැට 74% ක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ක ඒකට පුළුවන් bAbbI+ ෙ65% ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, අපි පද්ධතියෙන් සංවාදය සම්පූර්ණ සංවාදය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වගේම අපි අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක ස්ථානයේ ආර්ට්ට් ආරක්ෂා මඩේල් එක්ක, MEMN2N. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ඒක, සෙමැන්ටික් හරියට, MEMN2N නිර්මාණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් බැබියි+ වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් දත්ත සෙට් එක', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame metodą nuo pabaigos, pagal kurį automatiškai skatinamos užduotimis grindžiamos dialogo sistemos iš nedidelių nenotiruotų dialogo duomenų. Ji derina papildomą semantinę gramatiką – dinaminę sintakso ir tipo teoriją su įrašais (DS-TTR) – su stiprinamuoju mokymusi (RL), kur kalbų kūrimas ir dialogo valdymas yra bendro sprendimo problem a. Tokiu būdu sukurtos sistemos yra palaipsniškos: dialogai apdorojami žodžiu po žodžiu, kurie anksčiau buvo įrodyti būtini palaikant natūralų, spontaninį dialogą. Mes hipotezuojame, kad geros kalbos žinios gramatikoje turėtų sudaryti galimybę išnagrinėti daugybę dialogo variantų, net jei jie mokomi labai nedaug dialogų. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali apdoroti 74 proc. Facebook AI bAbI duomenų rinkinio net ir mokant tik 0,13 proc. duomenų (5 dialogai). Be to, ji gali procesuoti 65 % bAbI+, korpuso, kurį sukūrėme sistemingai papildant papildomus dialogo reiškinius, pvz., pakartotinius paleidimus ir savikorrekcijas bAbI. Palyginame savo model į su naujausiu atkūrimo modeliu MEMN2N. We find that, in terms of semantic accuracy, the MEMN2N model shows very poor robustness to the bAbI+ transformations even when trained on the full bAbI dataset.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker en end-to-end-metod för att automatiskt inducera uppgiftsbaserade dialogsystem från små mängder oanmälda dialogdata. Den kombinerar en inkrementell semantisk grammatik - Dynamic Syntax och Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - med Reinforcement Learning (RL), där språkgenerering och dialoghantering är ett gemensamt beslutsproblem. De system som produceras på detta sätt är inkrementella: dialoger bearbetas ord för ord, vilket tidigare visat sig vara avgörande för att stödja naturlig, spontan dialog. Vi antog att den rika språkkunskapen inom grammatiken skulle göra det möjligt att bearbeta ett kombinerat stort antal dialogvariationer, även när de tränas på väldigt få dialoger. Våra experiment visar att vår modell kan bearbeta 74% av Facebook AI bAbI datauppsättningen även när den tränas på endast 0,13% av data (5 dialoger). Den kan dessutom bearbeta 65% av bAbI+, en korpus som vi skapat genom att systematiskt lägga till inkrementella dialogfenomen som omstart och självkorrigeringar till bAbI. Vi jämför vår modell med en state-of-the-art återvinningsmodell, MEMN2N. Vi finner att MEMN2N-modellen i termer av semantisk noggrannhet visar mycket dålig robusthet mot bAbI+-transformationerna även när den tränas på hela bAbI-datauppsättningen.', 'so': "Waxaynu baaraynaa habka ugu dhamaadka si aan automatic u soo saarno nidaamka dialogka ee shaqo-ku saleysan si yar looga baaraandegayo macluumaadka diyaarinta. Waxay ku soo bandhigtaa qoraalka sawiraadka ah - Dynamic Syntax iyo Type Theori with Records (DS-TTR) - with Reinforcement Learning (RL), meesha lagu sameeyo afka iyo maamulka dialogue ay tahay dhibaato wadajir ah go'aanka. The systems thus produced are incremental: dialogues are processed word-by-word, shown previously to be essential in supporting natural, spontaneous dialogue.  Waxaynu ku fekernay in aqoonta luuqadda taajirka ah ee ku jirta qoraalka waa in ay awoodaa in la sameeyo kala duwanaansho badan oo dialog, xataa marka lagu tababariyo dialog yar. Imtixaanadeena waxay muuqan karaan in modellkayagu uu sameyn karo 74% oo ka mid ah macluumaadka Facebook AI bAbI xataa marka lagu tababaray 0.13% macluumaadka (5 dialogues). Intaas waxaa dheer oo lagu sameyn karaa 65% oo ka mid ah bAbI+, taas oo ah qof aan si rasmi ah u abuurnay, oo ku dari karo hadalka dhaqanka ah, sida bilowga iyo hagitaanka isbedelka BAbI. Tusaale ahaan waxaynu isbardhignaa sameynta xaalad-xaalad-farshaxan-u-horaadka, MEMN2N. Waxaynu helnaa in, saxda saxda ah, tusaalaha MEMN2N waxay muuqataa dhar baas ah oo u baahan tababarida bAbI+ xittaa marka lagu tababariyo sawirada buuxda bAbI.", 'ta': 'தானாகவே பணி அடிப்படையான உரையாடல் முறைமைகளை சிறிய எண்ணிக்கை இல்லாத உரையாடல் தகவல்களில் இருந்து தானாகவே உரையாடல் முறைமையை நாம அது பெருக்கலான ஒத்திசைவு வரைப்படம் - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS- TTR) - Reinforcement Learning (RL), where language generation and dialog management is a joint decision problem. ஆகையால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகள் அதிகமாக உள்ளது: உரையாடல் சொல்லாக செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, முன்னர் தெரியும் இயற்கையான, தானாகவே  We hypothesised that the rich linguistic knowledge within the grammar should enable a combinatorially large number of dialogue variations to be processed, even when trained on very few dialogues.  எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது என்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரி 74% of Facebook AI bAbI தகவல் அமைப்பை செயல்படுத்த முடியும் இது பிஅபி + செயல்களில் 65% சேர்க்க முடியும், நாம் அமைப்பாக உருவாக்கிய ஒரு குறுக்குறியீட்டை சேர்க்கலாம். பிஅபி ஐ மீண்டும் துவங்கும்  நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரியை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் ஒரு நிலையில் கலை மீட்டெடுப்பு மாதிரி, MEMN2N. நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், பிஅபி+ மாற்றங்களுக்கு மிகவும் ஏழை ஆடைகள் காட்டுகிறது முழு bAbI தரவுத்தளத்தில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட போதும்.', 'mt': 'Aħna ninvestigaw metodu minn tarf sa tarf biex jinduċu awtomatikament sistemi ta’ djalogu bbażati fuq ix-xogħol minn ammonti żgħar ta’ dejta ta’ djalogu mhux innotata. It combines an incremental semantic grammar - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - with Reinforcement Learning (RL), where language generation and dialogue management are a joint decision problem.  The systems thus produced are incremental: dialogues are processed word-by-word, shown previously to be essential in supporting natural, spontaneous dialogue.  We hypothesised that the rich linguistic knowledge within the grammar should enable a combinatorially large number of dialogue variations to be processed, even when trained on very few dialogues.  Our experiments show that our model can process 74% of the Facebook AI bAbI dataset even when trained on only 0.13% of the data (5 dialogues).  Barra minn hekk tista’ tipproċessa 65% tal-bAbI+, korpus li nħolqu billi żżid b’mod sistematiku fenomeni ta’ djalogu inkrementali bħall-bidu mill-ġdid u l-awtokorezzjonijiet għall-bAbI. We compare our model with a state-of-the-art retrieval model, MEMN2N.  Issibu li, f’termini ta’ preċiżjoni semantika, il-mudell MEMN2N juri robustezza fqira ħafna għat-trasformazzjonijiet tal-bAbI+ anki meta mħarreġ fuq is-sett sħiħ tad-dejta tal-bAbI.', 'kk': 'Біз тапсырманың негіздеген диалог жүйелерін кішкентай диалог деректерінен автоматты түрде инициализациялау үшін аяқтау- аяқтау әдісін зерттеп көрдік. Бұл көптеген семантикалық грамматиканы - динамикалық синтаксис және түрлі теориясы жазулармен (DS- TTR) - тілдерді құру және диалог басқаруының біріктірілген мәселесімен біріктіреді. Бұл үшін жасалған жүйелер көптеген: диалогтар өзгертілген сөздерді сөздерді өзгертілген, бұрын табиғи, спонтан диалогын қолдау үшін негізгі болып көрсетілген. Біз грамматикадағы баяны лингвистикалық білім білім, бірақ бұл диалогты бірнеше диалогты өзгертуге мүмкін болуы мүмкін деп ойладық, бірақ бірнеше диалогты өзгертуге болады. Біздің тәжірибеміздің моделіміз Фейсбук AI (5 диалогтар) деректер жиынының 74% дегенін көрсетеді. Бұл процестің 65% бАБИ+-нің қосымша болады. Біз жүйелік түрде бАБИ-ге қайта және өзіңіздің түзетулері секілді көптеген диалог пайдалануларын қосуға болады. Біз өзіміздің моделімізді келтіру үлгісімен салыстырып, MEMN2N. Біз семантикалық дұрыстығында MEMN2N үлгісі bAbI+ деректер жиынында тәжірибелі бақылау үшін өте қатты қиындығын көрсетеді.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک آخر-to-end طریقہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں تابع-بنیاد دیالوگ سیسٹم کو چھوٹے اندازے سے غیر معلوم ہوئے دیالوگ ڈاٹے کے لئے۔ یہ ایک اضافہ سیمانٹیک گرامر - دینامیکی سینٹکس اور ٹائپ تئوریس (DS-TTR) کے ساتھ راکورد (RL) کے ساتھ جمع کرتا ہے، جہاں زبان پیدا کرنا اور ڈالیو منظور ایک مشترک فیصلہ مشکل ہے. اس طرح پیدا کیے گئے سیستموں میں اضافہ ہیں: ڈالیوں پر کلمات پڑھی جاتی ہیں، جو پہلے دکھائی جاتی ہے تابع، سپاسٹنی ڈالیوں کی مدد کے لئے۔ ہم نے سمجھا تھا کہ گرامماری کے درمیان پوری زبان شناسی علم کی تعداد میں بہت سی مخلوقات کا کام کرنا چاہیے، اگرچہ بہت کم صحبت میں تعلیم کی جاتی تھی۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل فیس بوک ایی بیبی ڈیٹ سٹ میں 74% تکلیف کر سکتا ہے، اگرچہ صرف 0.13% ڈیٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ پرسس کے 65% bAbI+، ایک کورپوس کو ہم نے سیستماتیک طور پر پیدا کیا ہے جس طرح BAbI کو دوبارہ شروع کرنا اور اپنی اصلاح کرنا ہے۔ ہم نے ہماری مدل کو ایک ایست کی آرتی پھیرنے کی مدل سے مقایسہ کیا ہے MEMN2N۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ MEMN2N موڈل نے bAbI+ تغییرات کو بہت کمزور دچار دکھایا ہے اگرچہ پورے bAbI ڈیٹسٹ پر آموزش دی جاتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz vazifa asosida muloqat tizimini avtomatik ishga tushirish uchun tugmalar tugmasini tahrirlash usulini tahrirlash. Name Name Biz o'ylaymiz, grammatiking ichida taajir tillar haqida o'rganishni o'rganish kerak. Ko'pchilik dialoglar davomida o'rganishda ko'p muloqat o'zgarishlarni o'zgartirish kerak. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz esa bizning modelimiz Facebook AI bAbI haqida 74% bajarishi mumkin va faqat maʼlumotlarning 0.13% dan foydalanayotganda ham (5 dialoglar). Bu esa bu bAbI+ ning 65% jarayoni boshlab, biz tizimda yaratgan korpus bilan bir qanchalik muloqat oynalarni qo'shish mumkin, huddi BAbI'ga qayta ishga tushirish va o'zimni saqlash mumkin. We compare our model with a state-of-the-art retrieval model, MEMN2N.  Biz o'ylaymiz, semantik tashkilotlari bilan, MEMN2N modeli bu bAbI+ o'zgarishlarning juda yomon ko'rinishini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': "Chúng tôi điều tra phương pháp kết thúc để tự động tạo ra hệ thống đối thoại dựa trên nhiệm vụ từ một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu cuộc đối thoại không ghi chú. Nó kết hợp ngữ pháp Chờ đợi từ điển... Căn bản Y pháp động động và Định Lý Kiểu với các đĩa (DS-R) -với Việc học gia tăng lực (RL), nơi sản xuất ngôn ngữ và quản lý cuộc đối thoại là vấn đề quyết định chung. Các hệ thống được tạo ra đều là sự giải quyết: các bàn cáo cái được bàn thành từ tức, được bàn đồng hội, được cho thấy việc quan Chúng tôi giả định rằng những kiến thức ngôn ngữ giàu có trong ngữ pháp sẽ cho phép một số biến đổi hợp lý trong các cuộc đối thoại, thậm chí khi được huấn luyện về rất ít các bản thoại. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy người mẫu của chúng tôi có thể xử lý 74='của bộ dữ liệu trên Facebook AI bAbel kể cả khi được huấn luyện chỉ trên 0.13=* của dữ liệu (5). Nó có thể thêm tiến trình 85+ của tập thể chúng tôi tạo ra bằng cách thêm các hiện tượng cuộc đối thoại tăng dần như ca khúc phục hồi và sửa chữa tự động cho tập thể. Chúng tôi so sánh mô hình với mô hình phục hồi thời đại đại, MEMN2N. Chúng tôi thấy rằng, về độ chính xác theo ngữ pháp, mô hình MEMN2N cho thấy sức mạnh rất thấp so với các biến đổi trên to àn bộ tập tin bAbel+n ngay cả khi được huấn luyện trên tập tin bAbel đầy đủ.", 'bg': 'Проучваме метод от край до край за автоматично индуциране на базирани на задачи диалогови системи от малки количества неописани диалогови данни. Той съчетава постепенна семантична граматика - динамична синтаксия и теория на типа с записи (УС) - с Укрепващо обучение (РС), където генерирането на език и управлението на диалога са проблем за съвместно вземане на решения. Така създадените системи са постепенно: диалозите се обработват дума по дума, за което преди това е доказано, че са от съществено значение в подкрепа на естествения, спонтанен диалог. Поставихме хипотеза, че богатото езиково познание в граматиката би трябвало да позволи обработката на голям брой диалогови вариации, дори когато се обучават в много малко диалози. Нашите експерименти показват, че нашият модел може да обработва 74% от набора от данни дори когато е обучен само върху 0,13% от данните (5 диалога). В допълнение, той може да обработи 65% от корпус, който създадохме чрез систематично добавяне на постепенно диалогови явления като рестартиране и самокорекции към bAbI. Сравняваме нашия модел с най-съвременния модел за извличане на данни, MEMN2N. Установяваме, че по отношение на семантичната точност моделът показва много слаба устойчивост на трансформациите дори когато е обучен върху пълния набор от данни.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken een end-to-end methode voor het automatisch induceren van taakgebaseerde dialoogsystemen uit kleine hoeveelheden ongenoteerde dialooggegevens. Het combineert een incrementele semantische grammatica met Dynamic Syntax en Type Theory met Records (DS-TTR met Reinforcement Learning (RL), waarbij taalgeneratie en dialoogbeheer een gezamenlijk beslissingsprobleem zijn. De aldus geproduceerde systemen zijn incrementel: dialogen worden woord-voor-woord verwerkt, waarvan eerder is aangetoond dat ze essentieel zijn voor het ondersteunen van een natuurlijke, spontane dialoog. We veronderstelden dat de rijke taalkennis binnen de grammatica het mogelijk zou maken om een combinatorisch groot aantal dialogvariaties te verwerken, zelfs wanneer ze op zeer weinig dialogen zijn getraind. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat ons model 74% van de Facebook AI bAbI dataset kan verwerken, zelfs als het getraind is op slechts 0,13% van de data (5 dialogen). Het kan daarnaast 65% van bAbI+ verwerken, een corpus dat we hebben gecreëerd door systematisch incrementele dialoogfenomenen zoals herstarts en zelfcorrecties toe te voegen aan bAbI. We vergelijken ons model met een state-of-the-art retrieval model, MEMN2N. We vinden dat, in termen van semantische nauwkeurigheid, het MEMN2N model zeer slechte robuustheid toont aan de bAbI+ transformaties zelfs wanneer getraind op de volledige bAbI dataset.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger en end-to-end metode til automatisk at fremkalde opgavebaserede dialogsystemer fra små mængder uomtvistede dialogdata. Det kombinerer en inkrementel semantisk grammatik - dynamisk syntaks og typeteori med poster (DS-TTR) - med forstærkelseslæring (RL), hvor sproggenerering og dialog styring er et fælles beslutningsproblem. De således fremstillede systemer er trinvise: dialoger behandles ord for ord, hvilket tidligere har vist sig at være afgørende for at understøtte naturlig, spontan dialog. Vi antog, at den rige sproglige viden inden for grammatiken skulle gøre det muligt at behandle et kombineret stort antal dialogvariationer, selv når de trænede i meget få dialoger. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores model kan behandle 74% af Facebook AI bAbI datasæt, selv når den er trænet på kun 0,13% af dataene (5 dialoger). Den kan desuden behandle 65% af bAbI+, et korpus vi skabte ved systematisk at tilføje inkrementelle dialogfænomener som genstart og selvkorrektioner til bAbI. Vi sammenligner vores model med en state-of-the-art hentningsmodel, MEMN2N. Vi finder ud af, at MEMN2N modellen med hensyn til semantisk nøjagtighed viser meget dårlig robusthed over for bAbI+-transformationerne, selv når den trænes på det fulde bAbI datasæt.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo metodu kraja do kraja za automatski izazivanje sustava dijaloga na temelju zadataka iz malih količina nepoznatih podataka o dijalogu. Kombinacija povećanja semantičke gramatike - dinamička sintaksa i teorija tipa s rekordima (DS-TTR) - s učenjem pojačanja (RL), gdje su zajednički problem za odlučivanje jezika i upravljanje dijalogom. Također proizvedeni sustavi su povećani: dijalogi se obrađuju riječi po riječi, pokazuju da su ranije bitni u podršci prirodnog, spontanog dijaloga. Pretpostavili smo da bogati jezički znanje u gramatici treba omogućiti kombinacionalno veliki broj varijacija dijaloga koji će biti obrađeni, čak i kada su obučeni na vrlo malo dijaloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model može procesirati 74% podataka Facebook AI-a bAbI čak i kad je obučen samo 0,13% podataka (5 dijaloga). To može dodati proces 65% bAbI+, korpus koji smo stvorili sistematski dodajući incrementalne dijalogske fenomene poput ponovnog početka i samoporavka bAbI-u. Uspoređujemo naš model sa modelom povratka umjetnosti, MEMN2N. U smislu semantičke preciznosti, model MEMN2N pokazuje vrlo lošu snagu bAbI+ transformacije čak i kada je obučen na punom setu podataka bAbI.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen eine End-to-End Methode zur automatischen Induktion aufgabenbasierter Dialogsysteme aus kleinen Mengen nicht notierter Dialogdaten. Es kombiniert eine inkrementelle semantische Grammatik mit Dynamischer Syntax und Typentheorie mit Datensätzen (DS-TTR mit Reinforcement Learning (RL), wo Sprachgenerierung und Dialogmanagement ein gemeinsames Entscheidungsproblem sind. Die so entstehenden Systeme sind inkrementell: Dialoge werden Wort für Wort verarbeitet, was sich bisher als wesentlich erwiesen hat, um einen natürlichen, spontanen Dialog zu unterstützen. Wir haben die Hypothese aufgestellt, dass die reichhaltigen sprachlichen Kenntnisse innerhalb der Grammatik eine kombinatorisch große Anzahl von Dialogvariationen ermöglichen sollten, auch wenn nur wenige Dialoge trainiert werden. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unser Modell 74% des Facebook AI bAbI Datensatzes verarbeiten kann, auch wenn nur 0,13% der Daten trainiert werden (5 Dialoge). Es kann zusätzlich 65% von bAbI+ verarbeiten, einem Korpus, den wir durch systematisches Hinzufügen inkrementeller Dialogphänomene wie Neustarts und Selbstkorrekturen zu bAbI geschaffen haben. Wir vergleichen unser Modell mit einem State-of-the-Art Retrieval-Modell, MEMN2N. Wir stellen fest, dass das MEMN2N-Modell hinsichtlich der semantischen Genauigkeit eine sehr geringe Robustheit der bAbI+-Transformationen aufweist, selbst wenn es auf dem gesamten bAbI-Datensatz trainiert wird.', 'fa': 'ما روش پایان و پایان را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم برای تولید سیستم\u200cهای گفتگوی بر روی کار از مقدار کوچک داده\u200cهای داده\u200cهای گفتگوی ناشناخته. آن یک گرامهٔ سنتی بیشتر - سینتکس دینامیک و تئوری نوع با ثبت\u200cها (DS-TTR) - با یادگیری بیشتری (RL) ترکیب می\u200cکند، جایی که تولید زبان و مدیریت گفتگو یک مشکل تصمیم مشترک هستند. سیستم\u200cهایی که در این صورت تولید می\u200cکنند، افزایش\u200cکننده\u200cاند: گفتگو\u200cها به کلمه\u200cای پرداخته می\u200cشوند، که قبلاً در پشتیبانی گفتگو طبیعی و استفاده می\u200cشوند. ما فرض کردیم که دانش زبان\u200cشناسی ثروتمند درون گرامی باید یک تعداد بزرگی از تغییرات گفتگو را اجازه دهد، حتی هنگامی که در بسیار کمی گفتگوها آموزش داده می\u200cشود. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما می\u200cتواند 74% از مجموعه داده\u200cهای فیس\u200cبوک AI bAbI را فرایند کند حتی هنگامی که فقط 0.13% از داده\u200cها آموزش داده می\u200cشود. این می تواند به اضافه فرایند 65 درصد از bAbI+، یک جسد که توسط سیستماتیک با اضافه کردن پدیده\u200cهای گفتگوی اضافه\u200cای مانند بازآغاز و اصلاح خودخواهی به bAbI ایجاد کنیم. ما مدل خود را با مدل بازیابی موقعیت هنر، MEMN2N مقایسه می کنیم. ما فهمیدیم که با توجه به دقیقات semantic، مدل MEMN2N بسیار بدبخت به تغییرات bAbI+ حتی هنگامی که در مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای کامل bAbI آموزش داده می\u200cشود.', 'ko': '우리는 소량의 주석이 없는 대화 데이터에서 작업 기반의 대화 시스템을 자동으로 유도하는 데 사용되는 단말기부터 단말기까지의 방법을 연구했다.증량의미문법(DS-TTR)과 강화학습(RL)을 결합시킨 것으로, 그 중에서 언어 생성과 대화 관리는 공동 의사결정 문제이다.이로 인해 발생한 시스템은 점진적이다. 대화는 한 글자씩 처리된다. 이전의 연구에 의하면 이것은 자연스럽고 자발적인 대화를 지원하는 데 매우 중요하다고 한다.우리는 문법에서 풍부한 언어 지식이 대량의 대화 변체를 조합하여 처리할 수 있어야 한다고 가정한다. 설령 아주 적은 대화만 훈련했다 하더라도.우리의 실험은 페이스북 AI bAbI 데이터 세트의 74%를 처리하고, 0.13%의 데이터(5개의 대화)만 사용해도 훈련할 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.또한 65% 의 bAbI+를 처리할 수 있으며, 우리는 bAbI에 추가 대화 현상 (예를 들어 리셋, 자기 수정) 을 체계적으로 추가하여 자료 라이브러리를 만들었습니다.최신 검색 모델인 MEMN2N과 모델을 비교했습니다.우리는 의미의 정확성을 보면 완전한 bAbI 데이터 집합에서 훈련을 하더라도 MEMN2N모델이 bAbI+변환에 대한 노봉성이 매우 떨어진다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Tunachunguza mbinu za mwisho kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mifumo ya mazungumzo yenye msingi wa kazi kutoka kwa kiasi kidogo cha takwimu za mazungumzo yasiyotarajiwa. Inaunganisha mpango wa sekundi wa kuongezeka - Makala ya Dynamic Syntax na Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - na Ufunzi wa Maendeleo (RL), ambapo uzalishaji wa lugha na utawala wa mazungumzo ni tatizo la uamuzi wa pamoja. Mfumo unaotengenezwa kwa hiyo unazidi kuongezeka: mazungumzo yanaendeshwa kwa maneno, yanaonyesha hapo awali ni muhimu katika kuunga mkono mazungumzo ya asili, yenye kujitegemea. Tulifikiri kuwa maarifa ya lugha matajiri ndani ya grammani inapaswa kuwawezesha mabadiliko makubwa ya mazungumzo ya pamoja yanayoweza kuchukuliwa, hata wakati ulipofunzwa katika mazungumzo machache. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaweza kuchukua asilimia 74 ya taarifa za Facebook ya AI bAbI hata pale ilipofunzwa kwa asilimia 0.13 ya data (mazungumzo 5). Inaweza kuongeza mchakato wa asilimia 65 ya bAbI+, makampuni tuliyotengeneza kwa mfumo kuongeza mazungumzo yanayoendelea kama vile kuanza tena na kurekebisha kwa bAbI. Tunawalinganisha mtindo wetu na mtindo wa hali ya upatikanaji wa sanaa, MEMN2N. Tunapata kwamba, kwa mujibu wa usahihi wa kimapenzi, modeli ya MEMN2N inaonyesha nguo masikini sana kwa mabadiliko ya bAbI+ hata wakati ulipofundishwa kwenye seti kamili ya data ya bAbI.', 'id': 'Kami menyelidiki metode akhir-akhir untuk secara otomatis mengakibatkan sistem dialog berdasarkan tugas dari jumlah kecil data dialog yang tidak dicatat. Ini menggabungkan gramatika semantis incremental - Sintaks Dinamik dan Teori Jenis dengan Rekaman (DS-TTR) - dengan Pelajaran Penyukuran (RL), di mana generasi bahasa dan manajemen dialog adalah masalah keputusan kongsi. Sistem yang dihasilkan secara bertambah: dialog diproses kata demi kata, yang terlihat sebelumnya penting untuk mendukung dialog alami, spontan. Kami hipotesis bahwa pengetahuan bahasa yang kaya dalam gramatika seharusnya memungkinkan sejumlah kombinatorial besar variasi dialog untuk diproses, bahkan ketika dilatih dalam beberapa dialog. Our experiments show that our model can process 74% of the Facebook AI bAbI dataset even when trained on only 0.13% of the data (5 dialogues).  Hal ini dapat menambahkan proses 65% dari bAbI+, sebuah corpus yang kami ciptakan dengan menambahkan secara sistematis fenomena dialog incremental seperti restart dan self-corrections ke bAbI. Kita membandingkan model kita dengan model pemulihan terbaik, MEMN2N. Kami menemukan bahwa, dalam termasuk akurasi semantis, model MEMN2N menunjukkan kekuatan yang sangat buruk pada transformasi bAbI+ bahkan ketika dilatih pada set data bAbI penuh.', 'tr': "Biz taýýarlanmadyk dijalog maglumatynyň kiçi хэмжээsynda awtomatik taýýarlanmasy üçin bir soňra-soňrak yöntemi barlaýarys. Bu ýerde küçümsel semantik gramatika - Dynamik Sintaks we Taýpi Taýýarlar (DS-TTR) - Ködleme Öwrenmesi (RL) bilen birleşýär, nirede dil döredişi we dijal müdirimi bir çözüm meselesi. Bärde üretilen sistemler inkişaf edip görýär: dialoglar tebigy, spontaýça dijaloga desteklemek üçin esasy boldy. Biz gramatika içindeki baý lingwistiki bilgilerin işlenmelidigini çaklapdyk, ýöne birnäçe dialogda okuw edilen wagtlar bilen işlenmelidigini çaklapdyk. Biziň synagymyz munuň modimiziň Facebook AI bAbI veri setiriniň 74% sany diňe 0.13% bergi(5 dialoglar) öwrenmegi mümkin edip biljekdigini görkezýär. Bu şekilde bAbI+'nin 65% ötesinde sistematik olarak oluşturduğumuz bir korpus, bAbI'ye yeniden başlamak ve özüni düzeltmek gibi adil dialog parçalarını ekleyebilir. Bizim modelimizi MEMN2N'de bir sanat çekme modeli bilen karşılaştyrýarys. Semantik dogry ýagdaýynda MEMN2N nusgasyna görä, bAbI+ doly bAbI datasetinde üýtgeýän wagtlary örän ýigrenkliligi görkezýäris.", 'am': 'የፍጻሜ መጨረሻ ሥርዓት የስራ አካባቢ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ሲስተም ከታናሽ ጥያቄ ዳታዎችን ለመፍጠር እናምርመራለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ትውልድ እና የመስኮት ማቀናጃ በተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ትውልድ እና የመስኮት መቆጣጠር የኅብረት ትምህርት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ The systems thus produced are incremental: dialogues are processed word-by-word, shown previously to be essential in supporting natural, spontaneous dialogue.  በቋንቋው ውስጥ ባለ ጠጎች የቋንቋዊ እውቀት በጥቂት አካባቢዎች በተማራረሩ ጊዜ እንኳን በጥያቄ የሚቆጠሩ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ልውጤቶችን እንዲያስችል እናስባለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ምሳሌያችን ከፌስቡክ AI ብአቢ ዳታተር 74 በመቶ ማሳየት እንደሚችል ነው፤ ከዳራዎችን ብቻ 0.13 በመቶ ብቻ ሲያስተማሩ (5 ጥያቄዎች) ቢችሉ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም የቢአቢ+ 65 በመቶ የሚቆጠሩ አካባቢ፣ በሥርዓት ውስጥ የፈጠርነውን የጥያቄ ማኅበረሰብ አካባቢ እና የራሱን ማቀናቀል እንደሚጨምር አካባቢ ነው፡፡ ምሳሌዎቻችንን ከሀገር የዓለማት መልስ ጋር እናሳያታለን፡፡ MEMN2N የሜMN2N ሞዴል በሙሉ bAbI ዳታተር የተጠቃሚ ቢሆን እንኳ ለብአቢ+ ለውጦች በጣም ድሀ ልብስ ያሳየዋል፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne hetojmë një metodë nga fundi në fund për të induktuar automatikisht sistemet e dialogut të bazuar në detyra nga sasi të vogla të dhënash të dialogut pa shënuar. Ajo kombinon një gramatikë shtesë semantike - Sintaksi dinamike dhe Teoria e Tipit me Rekordet (DS-TTR) - me Mësimin e Mbështetjes (RL), ku gjenerimi i gjuhës dhe menaxhimi i dialogut janë një problem vendimi i përbashkët. Sistemet që prodhohen kështu janë rritëse: dialogu është i procesuar fjalë me fjalë, treguar më parë se është thelbësor në mbështetjen e dialogut natyror spontan. We hypothesised that the rich linguistic knowledge within the grammar should enable a combinatorially large number of dialogue variations to be processed, even when trained on very few dialogues.  Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të procesojë 74% të dataset bAbI të Facebook AI edhe kur është trajnuar në vetëm 0.13% të të dhënave (5 dialogues). Përveç kësaj mund të procesojë 65% të bAbI+, një korpus që krijuam duke shtuar sistematikisht fenomene të dialogut shtesë të tillë si rinisjet dhe vetë-korreksionet në bAbI. Ne e krahasojmë modelin tonë me një model tërheqjeje moderne, MEMN2N. Ne zbulojmë se, në lidhje me saktësinë semantike, modeli MEMN2N tregon shumë të dobët forcë ndaj transformimeve bAbI+ edhe kur është trajnuar në kompletin e të dhënave bAbI.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek 'n einde- na- einde metode vir outomaties induseer taak- gebaseerde dialoog stelsels van klein hoeveelheid ongebekende dialoog data. Dit kombinieer 'n inkremensielike semantiese grammatiek - Dinamiese Sintaks en Tipe Teorie met Opneem (DS- TTR) - met Verbevesting Leer (RL), waar taal generasie en dialoog bestuurder 'n saamstige besluit probleme is. Die stelsels hierdie produseerde is inkrementeel: dialoog word word word deur woord deur woord verwerp, wat voorheen gebruik word om noodsaaklik te wees in ondersteun van natuurlike, spontaneese dialoog. Ons het gehoop dat die ryk lingwisiese kennis binne die grammatiek 'n kombinasieële groot aantal dialoog veranderinge moet aktiveer word, selfs wanneer onderwerp word op baie paar dialoog. Ons eksperimente wys dat ons model kan proses 74% van die Facebook AI bAbI datastel selfs wanneer slegs 0.13% van die data (5 dialoog) onderrig is. Dit kan byvoeg 65% van bAbI+, 'n korpus wat ons geskep het deur sistematiese inkremensiele dialoog fenomene byvoeg soos herbegin en self-korreksies aan bAbI. Ons vergelyk ons model met 'n staat van die kuns ontvang model, MEMN2N. Ons vind dat, terwyl semantiese presisie, die MEMN2N model baie arme kragtigheid vertoon aan die bAbI+ transformasies selfs wanneer op die volle bAbI datastel opgelei is.", 'bs': 'Istražujemo metodu kraja do kraja za automatski izazivanje sustava dijaloga na temelju zadataka iz malih količina nepoznatih podataka o dijalogu. Kombinacija incrementalne semantičke gramatike - dinamička sintaksa i teorija tipa sa rekordima (DS-TTR) - sa učenjem pojačanja (RL), gdje su zajednički problem za odlučivanje jezika i upravljanje dijalogom. Ovako proizvedeni sustavi su povećani: dijalogi se obrađuju riječi po riječi, pokazuju da su ranije bitni u podršci prirodnog, spontanog dijaloga. Pretpostavili smo da bogati jezički znanje u gramatici treba omogućiti kombinacionalno veliki broj varijacija dijaloga koji će biti obrađeni, čak i kada su obučeni na vrlo malo dijaloga. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model može procesirati 74% podataka Facebook AI-a bAbI čak i kada je obučen samo 0,13% podataka (5 dijaloga). Može dodatno proces 65% bAbI+, korpus koji smo stvorili sistematički dodajući incrementalne dijalogske fenomene poput ponovnog početka i samoporavka bAbI. Uspoređujemo naš model sa modelom povratka umjetnosti, MEMN2N. U smislu semantičke preciznosti, model MEMN2N pokazuje vrlo lošu robustnost bAbI+ transformaciji čak i kada je obučen na punom setu podataka bAbI.', 'ca': "Investiguem un mètode de final a final per induir automàticament sistemes de diàleg basats en tasques a partir de petites quantitats de dades de diàleg no notades. Combina una gramàtica semàntica incremental - la teoria dinàmica de sintaxi i tipus amb els registres (DS-TTR) - amb l'aprenentatge de reforç (RL), on la generació de llengües i la gestió del diàleg són un problem a de decisió conjunta. Els sistemes així produïts són incrementals: els diàlegs són processats paraula a paraula, demostrats anteriorment essencials per sostenir el diàleg natural i espontà. We hypothesised that the rich linguistic knowledge within the grammar should enable a combinatorially large number of dialogue variations to be processed, even when trained on very few dialogues.  Els nostres experiments mostran que el nostre model pot processar el 74% del conjunt de dades de Facebook AI bAbI fins i tot quan està entrenat amb només el 0,13% de les dades (5 diàlegs). També pot processar el 65% de bAbI+, un corpus que vam crear afegint sistemàticament fenomens de diàleg incremental com el restart i les autocorreccions a bAbI. Comparem el nostre model amb un model de recuperació més avançat, MEMN2N. Trobem que, en termes de precisió semàntica, el model MEMN2N mostra molt poca robustet a les transformacions de bAbI+ fins i tot quan està entrenat en el conjunt complet de dades bAbI.", 'cs': 'Zkoumáme komplexní metodu automatického vyvolávání dialogových systémů založených na úlohách z malého množství nezapsaných dialogových dat. Kombinuje inkrementální sémantickou gramatiku s dynamickou syntaxí a teorií typů se záznamy (DS-TTR s Reinforcement Learning (RL), kde generování jazyků a řízení dialogu jsou problémem společného rozhodování. Takto vytvořené systémy jsou přírůstkové: dialogy jsou zpracovávány slovo po slovu, což se dříve ukázalo jako zásadní pro podporu přirozeného, spontánního dialogu. Předpokládali jsme, že bohaté jazykové znalosti v rámci gramatiky by měly umožnit zpracování kombinatorně velkého počtu variant dialogu, i když jsou trénovány na velmi málo dialogů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že náš model dokáže zpracovat 74% datové sady AI bAbI Facebooku i když je trénován pouze na 0,13% dat (5 dialogy). Kromě toho může zpracovat 65% korpusu bAbI+, který jsme vytvořili systematickým přidáváním inkrementálních dialogových jevů, jako jsou restarty a samopravy do bAbI. Porovnáváme náš model s nejmodernějším retrieval modelem MEMN2N. Zjišťujeme, že z hlediska sémantické přesnosti, model MEMN2N vykazuje velmi špatnou robustnost transformací bAbI+ i při trénování na plné datové sadě bAbI.', 'et': 'Uurime otsast otsa meetodit, mille abil automaatselt indutseerida ülesandepõhiseid dialoogisüsteeme väikeste märkimata dialoogiandmete põhjal. See ühendab täiendava semantilise grammatika - dünaamilise süntaksi ja tüübiteooria kirjetega (DS-TTR) - tugevdusõppega (RL), kus keele genereerimine ja dialoogi haldamine on ühise otsustamise probleem. Sellisel viisil loodud süsteemid on järkjärgulised: dialooge töödeldakse sõna-sõnalt, mis on varem osutunud loomuliku spontaanse dialoogi toetamisel hädavajalikuks. Me oletasime, et grammatika rikkalikud keeleoskused peaksid võimaldama töödelda kombinatsiooniliselt suurt hulka dialoogivariatsioone, isegi kui neid koolitatakse väga vähestele dialoogidele. Meie katsed näitavad, et meie mudel suudab töödelda 74% Facebooki AI bAbI andmekogumist isegi siis, kui see on koolitatud ainult 0,13% andmetest (5 dialoogi). Lisaks võib see töödelda 65% bAbI+-st, korpusest, mille loosime süstemaatiliselt lisades bAbI-le täiendavaid dialoogi nähtusi nagu taaskäivitamine ja enesekorrektsioonid. Me võrdleme oma mudelit kaasaegse tagasivõtmismudeliga MEMN2N. Leiame, et semantilise täpsuse seisukohalt näitab MEMN2N mudel bAbI+ transformatsioonide väga halba vastupidavust isegi siis, kui neid koolitatakse kogu bAbI andmekogumiga.', 'az': 'Biz işə bağlı dijalog sistemlərini küçük dəyişiklik məlumatlarından avtomatik olaraq təşkil etmək üçün end-to-end metodlarını incidirik. Bu çoxlu semantik gramatika - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - Reinforcement Learning (RL) ilə birləşdirir, where language generation and dialog management are a joint decision problem. Beləcə ürəkləndirilən sistemlər artıqlıq edir: dialoglar təbiətli, spontanlıq dialogu dəstəkləməkdə əvvəl göstərilən sözlər-sözlər işlədilər. Biz ehtiyacımız etdik ki, grammatik içindəki zengin dil bilgiləri, çox az dialoglarda təhsil edilən müxtəlif müxtəlif dəyişikliklərə müvəffəq edilməlidir. Bizim eksperimentlərimiz modellərimiz Facebook AI bAbI verilənlərin 74%-ini təhsil edə biləcəyini göstərir. Ancaq verilənlərin 0.13%-i təhsil edildiyi halda. Bu bAbI+-nin 65%-ini də artıra bilər, bAbI-nin yenidən başlatması və özünü düzəltməsi kimi sistematik olaraq yaratdığımız bir korpus. Bizim modelimizi, MEMN2N modeli ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Semantik doğruluğu ilə, MEMN2N modeli bAbI+ dəyişikliklərinə hətta tam bAbI veri qutusunda təhsil edildiyi zaman çox zəif bir qüvvət göstərir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջ-վերջ մեթոդը, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար առաջացնենք խնդիրների հիմնված հաղորդակցման համակարգերը աննկարագրված հաղորդակցման տվյալների փոքր քանակից: Այն համադրում է ավելացված սեմանտիկ գրամագրություն՝ դինամիկ սինտաքսի և տիպի թեորիա ձայնագրությունների հետ (DS-ТՌ) և ուժեղացված սովորելու (RL) հետ, որտեղ լեզվի ստեղծումը և խմբի ղեկավարումը ընդհանուր որոշումների խնդիր են: Այսպիսով ստեղծված համակարգերը բազմազան են: Առաջին հերթին ցույց է տալիս, որ դրանք կարևոր են բնական, ինքնաբուխ հաղորդակցման համար: Մենք ենթադրեցինք, որ գրամայի մեջ գտնվող լեզվաբանական հարուստ գիտելիքները պետք է հնարավորություն տան վերլուծել բազմաթիվ բազմաթիվ տարբերություններ, նույնիսկ երբ պատրաստվում են շատ քիչ տարբերություններում: Our experiments show that our model can process 74% of the Facebook AI bAbI dataset even when trained on only 0.13% of the data (5 dialogues).  Այն կարող է նաև պրոցեսել BABI+-ի 65 տոկոսը, մի կորպուս, որը մենք ստեղծեցինք, սիստեմատիկ ավելացնելով ավելացված բազմաթիվ երկխոսային երևույթներ, ինչպիսիք են վերարտադրումը և ինքնաուղղումները BABI-ին: Մենք համեմատում ենք մեր մոդելը մեծագույն վերականգնման մոդելի հետ, ՄեՄՆ2N: We find that, in terms of semantic accuracy, the MEMN2N model shows very poor robustness to the bAbI+ transformations even when trained on the full bAbI dataset.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক ডায়ালগ ব্যবস্থা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভিত্তিক ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চালু করার জন্য আমরা শেষ এটি একটি অগ্রগতির সেম্পেন্টিক গ্রাম - ডাইনামিক সিন্যাক্স এবং টাইপ টাইপ থিওরি রেকর্ড (DS-TTR) - যেখানে ভাষা প্রজন্ম এবং ডায়ালগ ব্যবস্থা একটি যৌথ সিদ্ধান্ত ন এভাবে তৈরি হয়েছে সিস্টেম বেশিরভাগ: কথাবার্তা প্রক্রিয়া করা হয়েছে, প্রাকৃতিক, স্বাভাবিক ডায়ালগ সমর্থন করার জন্য প্রাকৃতিক,  আমরা ধারণা করেছিলাম যে গ্রামগ্রামের মধ্যে সমৃদ্ধ ভাষার জ্ঞানের সম্মিলিতভাবে বিশাল ডায়ালগের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন পরিচালনা করা উচি আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল ফেসবুক এইচবিআবি ডাটাসেটের ৭৪% প্রক্রিয়া প্রক্রিয়া করতে পারে, এমনকি যখন তথ্যের মাত্র ০. It can in addition process 65% of bAbI+, a corpus we created by systematically adding incremental dialogue phenomena such as restarts and self-corrections to bAbI.  We compare our model with a state-of-the-art retrieval model, MEMN2N.  আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে, সেমান্টিক সঠিকভাবে মেমএন২N মডেল বিআবি+ পরিবর্তনের প্রতি খুব দরিদ্র পোশাক দেখাচ্ছে, এমনকি যখন পুরো বিআবি ডাটাসেটে প', 'fi': 'Tutkimme päästä päähän -menetelmää tehtäväpohjaisten dialogijärjestelmien automaattiseksi indusoimiseksi pienistä määristä merkitsemätöntä dialogitietoa. Siinä yhdistyy sekundäärinen semanttinen kielioppi - dynaaminen syntaksi ja tyyppiteoria tietueiden kanssa (DS-TTR) - ja vahvistuksen oppiminen (RL), jossa kielen luominen ja dialogin hallinta ovat yhteinen päätöksentekoongelma. Näin syntyvät järjestelmät ovat vaiheittaisia: dialogit käsitellään sana kerrallaan, mikä on aiemmin osoittautunut välttämättömäksi luonnollisen, spontaanin vuoropuhelun tukemisessa. Hypoteesimme, että kieliopin runsaan kielitaidon pitäisi mahdollistaa monipuolinen määrä dialogivaihtoehtoja, vaikka niitä olisi koulutettu hyvin harvaan dialogiin. Kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme pystyy käsittelemään 74% Facebook AI bAbI -aineistosta, vaikka se olisi koulutettu vain 0,13%:lla aineistosta (5 dialogia). Lisäksi se pystyy käsittelemään 65% bAbI+:sta, korpusesta, jonka olemme luoneet lisäämällä järjestelmällisesti lisädialogin ilmiöitä, kuten uudelleenkäynnistyksiä ja itsekorjauksia bAbI:hen. Vertaamme malliamme viimeisimpään hakumalliin MEMN2N. Havaitsemme, että semanttisen tarkkuuden kannalta MEMN2N-malli osoittaa erittäin heikkoa kestävyyttä bAbI+-muunnoksille silloinkin, kun se on koulutettu koko bAbI-aineistoon.', 'jv': 'Anyone It combs an Incular semanti gram - Dinomic Sensitive and Type theores with Writs (SS-TTR) - with Reforcement Learning (RL), Where language Generation and dialog control are a joint Resolution question. input method menu Awak dhéwé éntukno ngerasakno barêng-barêng langgambar gak dhéwé éntukno karo kesalahan kanggo mbaar éntuk kanggo mbaar éntuk Awakdhéwé éntuk perbudhakan nambah ing model sing bisa Ngubah 75% ning dataset AI bAbI nang pembalke nggo rerampungan 0.13% dadi (5 dialog). Rasané iso nambah karo perusahaan 75% bAbI+, sampeyan karo hal-sampeyan sing nggawe sistematik supoyo nambah dialog kedhuné surat kanggo nguasai mulai karo pawartos sampeyan sampeyan kanggo bAbI. Awak dhéwé nambah model nambah karo model MEMN2N Awak dhéwé ngerti, nik sematik dadi, model MEMN2N iso ngomong nik akeh pengin nguasai bAbI+, dadi piye cara-piye aturan bAbI gak dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנו חוקרים שיטה מסוף לסוף כדי לייצר אוטומטית מערכות דיאלוג מבוססת משימות ממספרים קטנים של נתוני דיאלוג ללא ניתוח. הוא משלב גרמטיקה סמנטית נוספת - תיאוריה של סינטקס דינמי וסוג עם רשומות (DS-TTR) - עם לימוד חיבור (RL), שבו יוצר שפות ומנהל דיאלוג הם בעיה של החלטה משותפת. המערכות שנוצרות ככה הן משותפות: דיאלוגים מתמודדים מילה על מילה, שנראו בעבר חיוניים בתמיכה לדיולוג טבעי, ספונטני. היפותזינו שהידע השפתי העשיר בתוך הגרמטיקה אמור לאפשר לעבד מספר גדול קומבנטורי של שווירציות דיאלוג, אפילו כשמאומנים על מעט מאוד דיאלוגים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהדוגמנית שלנו יכולה לעבד 74% מהקבוצת נתונים של פייסבוק AI bAbI אפילו כשמאומנת רק על 0.13% מהנתונים (5 דיאלוגים). בנוסף, הוא יכול לעבד 65% של bAbI+, קורפוס שנוצרנו על ידי הוספת באופן שיטתי תופעות דיאלוג משותפים כמו התחלות מחדש ותיקונים עצמיים ל bAbI. We compare our model with a state-of-the-art retrieval model, MEMN2N.  אנו מוצאים, במונחים של מדויקת סמנטית, המודל MEMN2N מראה חזקה מאוד גרועה לשינויים bAbI+ אפילו כאשר מאומנים על קבוצת נתונים מלאה bAbI.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག་ཅིག It combines an incremental semantic grammar - Dynamic Syntax and Type Theory with Records (DS-TTR) - with Reinforcement Learning (RL), where language generation and dialog management are a joint decision problem. འདི་ལྟ་མ་ལག་གིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་རིམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་ཡོད། ཌའི་ལོག་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཐོག་ལས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ང་ཚོའི་Facebook AI bAbI གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གྱི་74%སྣང་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ནི། དེ་ནི་bAbI+་གི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལས་ཀྱང་མཐུན་སྐྱེལ། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་དབུགས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རིགས་སྔར་དང་མཉམ་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད།MEMN2N འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྔར་ཆེན་བྱུང་བའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་གི་རྣམ་པ་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ནི་(MEMN2N)མ་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་ཉུང་བ་ཡིན་པས། bAbI+ ཆ་འཕ', 'ha': "We investigate an end-to-end method for automatically inducing task-based dialogue systems from small amounts of unannotated dialogue data.  It a haɗa wata grammar na ƙaranci - Narrabi na DDS-ttR - da Shirin Hazartar da Cikakken Bayanci na Dakata (DS-ttR) - a inda zaɓen harshen da zauren akwatin bayani na zaɓa na haɗi. @ action: button Mun yi na aminci cẽwa, ma'anar harshen matajiri a cikin grammar, sai ya iya amfani da wasu variantun zauren da ke koma da ɗabi'a, kuma kõ dã an sanar da shi kan zauren akwatin bayani kaɗan. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa misalinmu yana iya zartar da 74% daga data na Facebook AI bAbI, ko kuma idan an sanar da shi kawai a 0.13% na zauren zauren (zauren akwatin bayani 5). Ina iya ƙara da aikin 65% daga bAbI+, wata nau'i wanda muka halitta shi na ƙara filayen zauren akwatin bayani na bayani na guda kamar na fara da shiryarwa zuwa bAbI. Tuna samfani misalinmu da wani misali na-halin mai samu'a-mai-gaba, MEMN2N. Muna gane cewa, a cikin tsari na semanti, misalin MEMN2N na nuna nau'i mai haske zuwa musamman bAbI+ ko da aka sanar da shi a cikakken database na bAbI.", 'sk': 'Raziskujemo metodo od konca do konca za avtomatično induciranje sistemov dialoga, ki temeljijo na nalogah, iz majhnih količin neobvezanih podatkov o dialogu. Združuje postopno semantično slovnico - dinamično sintakso in teorijo tipov z zapisi (DS-TTR) - z ojačanjem učenja (RL), kjer sta ustvarjanje jezika in upravljanje dialoga problem skupnega odločanja. Tako ustvarjeni sistemi so postopni: dialogi se obdelujejo besedo za besedo, kar se je že prej izkazalo za bistvenega pomena pri podpiranju naravnega, spontanega dialoga. Predpostavljali smo hipotezo, da bi bogato jezikovno znanje znotraj slovnice omogočilo obdelavo kombinatorsko velikega števila variacij dialoga, tudi če se usposablja za zelo malo dialogov. Naši poskusi kažejo, da lahko naš model obdeluje 74% Facebook AI bAbI nabora podatkov, tudi če je treniran na samo 0,13% podatkov (5 dialogov). Poleg tega lahko obdeluje 65% bAbI+, korpusa, ki smo ga ustvarili s sistematičnim dodajanjem pojavov postopnega dialoga, kot so ponovni zagoni in samopopravki bAbI. Naš model primerjamo z najsodobnejšim modelom za iskanje, MEMN2N. Ugotavljamo, da model MEMN2N glede semantične natančnosti kaže zelo slabo robustnost transformacij bAbI+, tudi če je usposobljen za celoten nabor podatkov bAbI.'}
{'en': 'Challenges in Data-to-Document Generation', 'ar': 'التحديات في إنشاء البيانات إلى المستندات', 'pt': 'Desafios na geração de dados para documentos', 'es': 'Retos en la generación de datos a documentos', 'fr': 'Les défis de la génération de données en documents', 'ja': 'ドキュメント間データ生成の課題', 'hi': 'डेटा-टू-डॉक्यूमेंट जनरेशन में चुनौतियां', 'zh': '数至文档生挑战', 'ru': 'Проблемы, связанные с преобразованием данных в документы', 'ga': 'Dúshláin i nGiniúint Sonraí go Cáipéis', 'ka': 'მონაცემების დოკუმენტის შექმნა', 'hu': 'Kihívások az adatok dokumentumként történő létrehozásában', 'el': 'Προκλήσεις στη δημιουργία δεδομένων σε έγγραφα', 'it': 'Sfide nella generazione dati-documenti', 'kk': 'Деректерге құжатты құру шақырулары', 'lt': 'Challenges in Data-to-Document Generation', 'mk': 'Предизвики во генерацијата на податоци во документи', 'ms': 'Challenges in Data-to-Document Generation', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാ മുതല്\u200d രേഖപ്രകൃതിയിലുള്ള സങ്കേതികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Sfidi fil-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Dejta għal Dokument', 'mn': 'Документын төлөөлөлт', 'no': 'Utfordringar i generering av datatil dokument', 'pl': 'Wyzwania w generowaniu danych do dokumentów', 'sr': 'Izazovi u generaciji podataka do dokumenta', 'ro': 'Provocări în generarea de date în document', 'si': 'Data- to- Documentation නිර්මාණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'so': 'Challenges in Data-to-Document Generation', 'ta': 'தகவல்- இருந்து ஆவண உருவாக்கத்தில் சிக்கல்கள்', 'sv': 'Utmaningar vid generering av data till dokument', 'ur': 'Data-to-Document Generation میں چالج', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thử thách trong Thế Hệ Tài liệu', 'da': 'Udfordringer ved generering af data til dokument', 'hr': 'Izazovi u generaciji podataka do dokumenta', 'bg': 'Предизвикателства при генерирането на данни към документи', 'id': 'tantangan dalam Generasi Data-ke-Dokumen', 'de': 'Herausforderungen bei der Generierung von Daten zu Dokumenten', 'sw': 'Changamoto katika Generation of Data to-Document', 'tr': 'Maglumatdan Senediň döredişi', 'nl': 'Uitdagingen bij het genereren van gegevens naar documenten', 'sq': 'Sfidat në gjenerimin e të dhënave në dokument', 'ko': '데이터에서 문서 생성까지의 도전', 'fa': 'چالش در تولید داده به سند', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Տեղեկատվության դեպի փաստաթղթի ստեղծման մարտահրավերներ', 'az': 'Data-to-Document ĂśnvanÄ±nda Ă‡Ă¶zĂĽmlÉ™r', 'bn': 'তথ্য থেকে নথি প্রজন্মের চ্যালেঞ্জ', 'af': 'Opdragte in Data- to- Document Generasie', 'ca': 'Els reptes en la generació de dades a documents', 'cs': 'Výzvy při generování dat do dokumentů', 'et': 'Andmete ja dokumentide loomise väljakutsed', 'bs': 'Izazovi u generaciji podataka do dokumenta', 'fi': 'Tietojen ja asiakirjojen muodostamisen haasteet', 'jv': 'Validity nang Generasi data-to-document', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izzivi pri ustvarjanju podatkov v dokument', 'he': 'אתגרים ביצירת נתונים למסמך', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Recent neural models have shown significant progress on the problem of generating short descriptive texts conditioned on a small number of database records. In this work, we suggest a slightly more difficult data-to-text generation task, and investigate how effective current approaches are on this task. In particular, we introduce a new, large-scale corpus of data records paired with descriptive documents, propose a series of extractive evaluation methods for analyzing performance, and obtain baseline results using current neural generation methods. Experiments show that these models produce fluent text, but fail to convincingly approximate human-generated documents. Moreover, even templated baselines exceed the performance of these neural models on some metrics, though copy- and reconstruction-based extensions lead to noticeable improvements.', 'ar': 'أظهرت النماذج العصبية الحديثة تقدمًا كبيرًا في مشكلة إنشاء نصوص وصفية قصيرة مشروطة بعدد صغير من سجلات قاعدة البيانات. في هذا العمل ، نقترح مهمة إنشاء بيانات إلى نص أصعب قليلاً ، ونبحث في مدى فعالية الأساليب الحالية في هذه المهمة. على وجه الخصوص ، نقدم مجموعة جديدة واسعة النطاق من سجلات البيانات مقترنة بوثائق وصفية ، ونقترح سلسلة من طرق التقييم الاستخراجي لتحليل الأداء ، والحصول على نتائج أساسية باستخدام أساليب الجيل العصبي الحالية. تظهر التجارب أن هذه النماذج تنتج نصًا بطلاقة ، لكنها تفشل في تقريب المستندات التي أنشأها الإنسان بشكل مقنع. علاوة على ذلك ، حتى خطوط الأساس النموذجية تتجاوز أداء هذه النماذج العصبية في بعض المقاييس ، على الرغم من أن الإضافات المستندة إلى النسخ وإعادة الإعمار تؤدي إلى تحسينات ملحوظة.', 'pt': 'Modelos neurais recentes mostraram progressos significativos no problema de gerar textos descritivos curtos condicionados a um pequeno número de registros de banco de dados. Neste trabalho, sugerimos uma tarefa de geração de dados para texto um pouco mais difícil e investigamos a eficácia das abordagens atuais nessa tarefa. Em particular, apresentamos um novo corpus de registros de dados em grande escala emparelhado com documentos descritivos, propomos uma série de métodos de avaliação extrativa para analisar o desempenho e obtemos resultados de linha de base usando métodos atuais de geração neural. Experimentos mostram que esses modelos produzem texto fluente, mas falham em aproximar documentos gerados por humanos de forma convincente. Além disso, mesmo as linhas de base modeladas excedem o desempenho desses modelos neurais em algumas métricas, embora as extensões baseadas em cópia e reconstrução levem a melhorias notáveis.', 'fr': "Les modèles neuronaux récents ont montré des progrès significatifs sur le problème de la génération de textes descriptifs courts conditionnés à partir d'un petit nombre d'enregistrements de base de données. Dans ce travail, nous suggérons une tâche de génération de données en texte légèrement plus difficile et examinons l'efficacité des approches actuelles sur cette tâche. En particulier, nous introduisons un nouveau corpus d'enregistrements de données à grande échelle associé à des documents descriptifs, proposons une série de méthodes d'évaluation extractives pour l'analyse des performances et obtenons des résultats de référence en utilisant les méthodes actuelles de génération neuronale. Les expériences montrent que ces modèles produisent du texte fluide, mais ne permettent pas d'approcher de manière convaincante les documents générés par l'homme. De plus, même les lignes de base modélisées dépassent les performances de ces modèles neuronaux sur certaines métriques, bien que les extensions basées sur la copie et la reconstruction entraînent des améliorations notables.", 'es': 'Los modelos neuronales recientes han mostrado avances significativos en el problema de generar textos descriptivos cortos condicionados a un pequeño número de registros de bases de datos. En este trabajo, sugerimos una tarea de generación de datos a texto un poco más difícil e investigamos la eficacia de los enfoques actuales en esta tarea. En particular, presentamos un nuevo corpus de registros de datos a gran escala junto con documentos descriptivos, proponemos una serie de métodos de evaluación extractiva para analizar el rendimiento y obtenemos resultados de referencia utilizando los métodos actuales de generación neuronal. Los experimentos muestran que estos modelos producen texto fluido, pero no logran aproximarse de manera convincente a los documentos generados por humanos. Además, incluso las líneas base con plantillas superan el rendimiento de estos modelos neuronales en algunas métricas, aunque las extensiones basadas en copia y reconstrucción conducen a mejoras notables.', 'ja': '最近のニューラルモデルは、少数のデータベースレコードに条件付けられた短い記述的テキストを生成する問題で有意な進歩を示している。この研究では、少し難しいデータからテキストへの生成タスクを提案し、現在のアプローチがこのタスクにどの程度効果的であるかを調査します。特に，記述文書と対になった新しい大規模なデータ記録のコーパスを導入し，パフォーマンスを解析するための一連の抽出評価手法を提案し，現在のニューラル生成手法を用いてベースライン結果を得る．実験によると、これらのモデルは流暢なテキストを生成するが、人間が生成した文書を説得力をもって近似することはできないことが示されている。さらに、テンプレート化されたベースラインでさえ、いくつかの指標ではこれらのニューラルモデルのパフォーマンスを超えていますが、コピーベースの拡張機能と再構築ベースの拡張機能は顕著な改善をもたらします。', 'hi': 'हाल के तंत्रिका मॉडल ने डेटाबेस रिकॉर्ड की एक छोटी संख्या पर वातानुकूलित छोटे वर्णनात्मक ग्रंथों को उत्पन्न करने की समस्या पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रगति दिखाई है। इस काम में, हम थोड़ा अधिक कठिन डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट जनरेशन कार्य का सुझाव देते हैं, और जांच करते हैं कि इस कार्य पर वर्तमान दृष्टिकोण कितने प्रभावी हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम वर्णनात्मक दस्तावेजों के साथ जोड़े गए डेटा रिकॉर्ड का एक नया, बड़े पैमाने पर कॉर्पस पेश करते हैं, प्रदर्शन का विश्लेषण करने के लिए निष्कर्षण मूल्यांकन विधियों की एक श्रृंखला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और वर्तमान तंत्रिका पीढ़ी विधियों का उपयोग करके बेसलाइन परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि ये मॉडल धाराप्रवाह पाठ का उत्पादन करते हैं, लेकिन मानव-जनित दस्तावेजों को दृढ़ता से अनुमानित करने में विफल रहते हैं। इसके अलावा, यहां तक कि टेम्पलेट किए गए बेसलाइन कुछ मीट्रिक पर इन तंत्रिका मॉडलों के प्रदर्शन से अधिक हैं, हालांकि कॉपी- और पुनर्निर्माण-आधारित एक्सटेंशन ध्यान देने योग्य सुधार का कारण बनते हैं।', 'zh': '近神经模形数据库以少书为短描述性文本取重大进展。 于此之中,举一小难之数以成文本,而论其有效性于此。 大抵引入一新,大录语料库与描述性文档配对,列性能之提取评法,用神经生成之法基线得。 实验者,流文之本,而不可信近人之文档也。 虽模板化之基线,过于指标神经,虽复制建之广,明矣。', 'ru': 'Недавние нейронные модели показали значительный прогресс в решении проблемы генерации коротких описательных текстов на основе небольшого количества записей базы данных. В этой работе мы предлагаем несколько более сложную задачу генерации данных в текст и исследуем, насколько эффективны текущие подходы к этой задаче. В частности, мы вводим новый, крупномасштабный корпус записей данных в паре с описательными документами, предлагаем серию методов экстрактивной оценки для анализа производительности и получаем базовые результаты с использованием современных методов нейронной генерации. Эксперименты показывают, что эти модели производят свободный текст, но не могут убедительно приблизить созданные человеком документы. Более того, даже шаблонированные базовые линии превышают производительность этих нейронных моделей по некоторым метрикам, хотя расширения на основе копирования и реконструкции приводят к заметным улучшениям.', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn suntasach léirithe ag samhlacha néarúla le déanaí ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le gearrthéacsanna tuairisciúla a ghiniúint atá coinníollach ar líon beag taifead bunachar sonraí. San obair seo, molaimid tasc giniúna sonraí-go-téacs atá beagán níos deacra, agus fiosrímid cé chomh héifeachtach is atá cur chuige reatha maidir leis an tasc seo. Go háirithe, tugaimid isteach corpas nua, mórscála de thaifid sonraí atá péireáilte le doiciméid tuairisciúla, molaimid sraith de mhodhanna measúnaithe eastóscacha chun anailís a dhéanamh ar fheidhmíocht, agus faighimid torthaí bonnlíne ag baint úsáide as modhanna giniúna néaracha reatha. Léiríonn turgnaimh go dtáirgeann na samhlacha seo téacs líofa, ach go dteipeann orthu gar-dhoiciméid a ghineann daoine a dhéanamh go diongbháilte. Ina theannta sin, sáraíonn fiú bonnlínte teimpléid feidhmíocht na múnlaí néaracha seo ar roinnt méadrachta, cé go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha as síntí bunaithe ar chóip agus ar atógáil.', 'hu': 'A közelmúltbeli neurális modellek jelentős előrelépést mutattak a rövid leíró szövegek előállításának problémájában, amelyek kis számú adatbázis rekordon alapulnak. Ebben a munkában egy kissé nehezebb adat-szöveg generálási feladatot javasolunk, és megvizsgáljuk, hogy milyen hatékonyak a jelenlegi megközelítések ebben a feladatban. Különösen egy új, nagyszabású adatrögzítő dokumentumokkal párosított adatrögzítő korpuszt vezetünk be, javasoljuk a teljesítmény elemzésére szolgáló extraktív értékelési módszerek sorozatát, és a jelenlegi neurális generálási módszerek alkalmazásával érjük el az alapvető eredményeket. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy ezek a modellek folyékony szöveget készítenek, de nem tudják meggyőzően közelíteni az ember által generált dokumentumokat. Továbbá, még a tempolált alapértékek is meghaladják ezen neurális modellek teljesítményét bizonyos metrikákon, bár a másolás és rekonstrukció alapú kiterjesztések észrevehető javulást eredményeznek.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα νευρωνικά μοντέλα έχουν δείξει σημαντική πρόοδο στο πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας σύντομων περιγραφικών κειμένων που βασίζονται σε μικρό αριθμό εγγραφών βάσης δεδομένων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια ελαφρώς πιο δύσκολη εργασία δημιουργίας δεδομένων σε κείμενο, και διερευνούμε πόσο αποτελεσματικές είναι οι τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις σε αυτό το έργο. Ειδικότερα, εισάγουμε ένα νέο, μεγάλης κλίμακας σώμα εγγραφών δεδομένων σε συνδυασμό με περιγραφικά έγγραφα, προτείνουμε μια σειρά μεθόδων εξαγωγικής αξιολόγησης για την ανάλυση των επιδόσεων και αποκτούμε αποτελέσματα βάσης χρησιμοποιώντας τις τρέχουσες μεθόδους παραγωγής νευρώνων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι αυτά τα μοντέλα παράγουν άπταιστο κείμενο, αλλά αποτυγχάνουν να προσεγγίσουν πειστικά έγγραφα που παράγονται από τον άνθρωπο. Επιπλέον, ακόμη και οι προσομοιωμένες γραμμές βάσης υπερβαίνουν την απόδοση αυτών των νευρωνικών μοντέλων σε ορισμένες μετρήσεις, αν και οι επεκτάσεις που βασίζονται σε αντιγραφή και ανακατασκευή οδηγούν σε αξιοσημείωτες βελτιώσεις.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მოდელები გაჩვენეთ მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი პრობლემის შექმნა პატარა აღწერების ტექსტის შექმნა, რომელიც მარტივი ბაზატური record-ის ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ უფრო ძალიან რთული მონაცემები ტექსტის დავიწყება და განსხვავება თუ როგორ ეფექტიური მონაცემები აქვს ამ სამუშაოში. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ახალი, დიდი განზომილებული მონაცემების კოპპუსი, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული დოკუმენტებით გადავიყენებთ, განზომილებების განზომილების სერვერი ექსტრაქტური განზომილების მეტოვების ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ ეს მოდელები წარმოიქმნა ტექსტის შექმნა, მაგრამ ადამიანის შექმნილი დოკუმენტები არ შეუძლებელია გადარწმუ დამატებით, კიდევ ქმპლინტებული ფესტური ხაზები უფრო მეტრიკაში ამ ნეიროლური მოდელების გამოსახულება, მაგრამ კოპლინტების და რესტრუქტურაციის გამოსახულება იქნება', 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais neurologiniais modeliais nustatyta didelė pažanga kuriant trumpus aprašomuosius tekstus, priklausančius nuo nedidelio duomenų bazės įrašų skaičiaus. Šiame darbe siūlome šiek tiek sudėtingesnę duomenų ir tekstų kūrimo užduotį ir tiriame, kaip veiksmingi dabartiniai požiūriai į šią užduotį. Visų pirma įvedame naują, didelio masto duomenų rinkinį su aprašomaisiais dokumentais, siūlome keletą ekstraktyvių vertinimo metodų veiksmingumui analizuoti ir gauname pradinius rezultatus naudojant dabartinius nervų generacijos metodus. Eksperimentai rodo, kad šiuose modeliuose pateikiamas lankstus tekstas, tačiau neįmanoma įtikinamai suderinti žmogaus sukurtų dokumentų. Be to, net modeliuotos bazinės linijos viršija šių nervinių modelių veiksmingumą kai kuriose metrijose, nors dėl kopijų ir atstatymo pagrįstų išplėtimų pastebimai pagerėja.', 'it': "Recenti modelli neurali hanno mostrato progressi significativi sul problema della generazione di brevi testi descrittivi condizionati da un piccolo numero di record di database. In questo lavoro, suggeriamo un compito di generazione dati-testo leggermente più difficile e analizziamo quanto siano efficaci gli approcci attuali in questo compito. In particolare, introduciamo un nuovo corpus di dati su larga scala abbinato a documenti descrittivi, proponiamo una serie di metodi di valutazione estrattiva per analizzare le prestazioni e otteniamo risultati di base utilizzando gli attuali metodi di generazione neurale. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che questi modelli producono testo fluente, ma non riescono ad approssimare in modo convincente i documenti generati dall'uomo. Inoltre, anche le linee di base template superano le prestazioni di questi modelli neurali su alcune metriche, anche se le estensioni basate su copia e ricostruzione portano a notevoli miglioramenti.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы невралдық үлгілер деректер қорының жазуларының кішкентай саны жазылған қысқа түсінікті мәтінді құру мәселесінде маңызды жағдай көрсетілді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз мәтінді құру тапсырмасын бақылап, назардағы қанша әсер етілгендерді зерттеп береміз. Мысалы, біз жаңа, үлкен масштабтағы деректер жазуының корпусын таңдап, қазіргі невралды құру әдістерімен біріктіріп, шығыс оқу әдістерін анализиялау үшін бірнеше ең жақсы оқу әдістерін таңда Тәжірибелер бұл үлгілер жылдамдық мәтін жасайды, бірақ адамдар құрылған құжаттарды қабылдауға болмайды. Кейбір метрикалық үлгі негізгі сызықтарда да, көшірме және қайта құрылу негізгі кеңейтулерді көрінетін жақсартуларға көмектесетін невралдық моделдерінің істеуіне артық болады.', 'ms': 'Model saraf baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan kemajuan yang signifikan pada masalah menghasilkan teks deskriptif pendek berkundisi pada bilangan kecil rekod pangkalan data. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan tugas generasi data-ke-teks yang sedikit lebih sukar, dan menyelidiki bagaimana pendekatan semasa berkesan pada tugas ini. Secara khususnya, kami memperkenalkan sebuah korpus baru, skala besar rekod data berpasangan dengan dokumen deskriptif, melamar siri kaedah penilaian ekstraktif untuk menganalisis prestasi, dan mendapatkan keputusan asas menggunakan kaedah generasi saraf semasa. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model ini menghasilkan teks fluent, tetapi gagal untuk meyakinkan kira-kira dokumen yang dihasilkan manusia. Selain itu, walaupun garis dasar templat melebihi prestasi model saraf ini pada beberapa metrik, walaupun sambungan berdasarkan salinan- dan pembangunan-semula membawa kepada peningkatan yang dapat dilihat.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാബേസ് റെക്കോര്\u200dഡുകളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ചെറിയ വിശദീകരണവാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കുറച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d കഠിനമായ ഡേറ്റാ തലമുറപ്പാക്കുന്ന പണിയാണ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത്, ഈ ജോല പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന രേഖകളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dന്ന ഡേറ്റാ റെക്കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെ ഒരു പുതിയ വലിയ പ്രധാന കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് നാം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്ത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നത്, പക്ഷെ മനുഷ്യര്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ രേഖകള്\u200d വിശ്വസി പിന്നെയും കുറച്ചു മെട്രിക്കങ്ങളിലുള്ള ഈ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മാന്യമാക്കിയിട്ടുണ്ട്, പകര്\u200dപ്പിക്ക', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните нервни модели покажаа значителен напредок во проблемот со генерирање кратки описни тексти, условени со мал број на податоци. Во оваа работа, предлагаме малку потешка задача за генерација на податоци во текст и истражуваме колку ефикасни се актуелните пристапи на оваа задача. Посебно, воведуваме нов, голем корпус на податочни записи парирани со описни документи, предложуваме серија методи на екстрактивна евалуација за анализирање на резултатите и добиваме основни резултати користејќи ги актуелните методи на нервна генерација Експериментите покажуваат дека овие модели произведуваат течен текст, но не успеваат убедливо да се приближуваат документите генерирани од човек. Покрај тоа, дури и шаблонираните основни линии ја надминуваат ефективноста на овие нервни модели на некои метрики, иако проширувањата базирани на копија и реконструкција водат до значителни подобрувања.', 'mt': 'Mudelli newrali riċenti wrew progress sinifikanti fuq il-problem a tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ testi deskrittivi qosra kkundizzjonati fuq numru żgħir ta’ reġistri tad-database. F’din il-ħidma, issuġġerixxu kompitu ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ dejta bit-test kemmxejn aktar diffiċli, u ninvestigaw kemm huma effettivi l-approċċi attwali dwar dan il-kompitu. B’mod partikolari, a ħna nintroduċu korpus ġdid, fuq skala kbira ta’ rekords tad-dejta flimkien ma’ dokumenti deskrittivi, nipproponu serje ta’ metodi ta’ evalwazzjoni estrattivi għall-analiżi tal-prestazzjoni, u niksbu riżultati fil-linja bażi bl-użu ta’ metodi attwali ta’ ġenerazzjoni newrali. L-esperimenti juru li dawn il-mudelli jipproduċu test fluwenti, iżda jonqsu milli jqarrbu b’mod konvinċenti d-dokumenti ġġenerati mill-bniedem. Barra minn hekk, anke linji bażi mudelli jaqbżu l-prestazzjoni ta’ dawn il-mudelli newrali fuq xi metriċi, għalkemm estensjonijiet ibbażati fuq il-kopja u r-rikostruzzjoni jwasslu għal titjib notevoli.', 'mn': 'Саяхан мэдрэлийн загварууд бага хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сан дээр тодорхойлогдсон богино тайлбарлалтын текст үүсгэх асуудалд маш чухал хөгжлийг харуулсан. Энэ ажлын тулд бид бага зэрэг илүү хэцүү өгөгдлийн баримт бий болгох үйл ажиллагааг санал болгож, одоогийн хэрхэн үр дүнтэй арга баримт байгааг судалж байна. Ялангуяа бид шинэ, том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн бичил баримтуудтай холбогдсон мэдээллийн бичил баримтуудыг танилцуулж, үйл ажиллагааг шинжилгээ хийх болон орчин үеийн мэдээллийн үйл ажиллагааны аргыг ашиглан суурь шугам үр дүнг гарга Эдгээр загварууд шингэн текст бий болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ хүн төрөлхтний бичсэн баримтуудыг ойролцоогоор итгэлгүй болдог. Мөн зарим метрик дээр эдгээр мэдрэлийн загварын үйл ажиллагааг дамжуулсан суурь шулуунууд ч илүү өндөр байдаг. Хэдийгээр хууль болон сэтгэл хөгжлийн нэмэлт нь ойлгомжтой сайжруулах боломжтой.', 'no': 'Nyleg brukte neuralmodeller har vist betydelig framgang på problemet med å laga kort skildring av tekstar som er conditionert på ein liten tal databaseopptak. I dette arbeidet foreslår vi ein litt vanskeleg oppgåve for generering av data-til-tekst, og undersøk kor effektiv gjeldande tilnærmingar er på denne oppgåva. I særskilt introduserer vi ein ny, stor, stor korpus av dataopptak som er parert med beskrivelige dokument, foreslår vi ein serie av ekstraktiv evalueringsmetodar for å analysera utviklingar, og få baseline resultat med gjeldande neuralgenereringsmetoder. Eksperimentar viser at desse modelane produserer flytande tekst, men klarer ikkje å overbevise omtrent menneskelige dokument. I tillegg til og med malerte grunnlinjer overstyrer utviklinga av desse neuralmodelane på noen metriske, men kopi- og rekonstruksjonsbaserte utvidingar fører til merkelige forbetringar.', 'pl': 'Najnowsze modele neuronowe wykazały znaczący postęp w kwestii generowania krótkich tekstów opisowych uwarunkowanych niewielką liczbą rekordów bazy danych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nieco trudniejsze zadanie generowania danych do tekstu i zbadamy, jak skuteczne są obecne podejścia do tego zadania. W szczególności wprowadzamy nowy, duży korpus rekordów danych połączony z dokumentami opisowymi, proponujemy serię ekstrakcyjnych metod oceny wydajności oraz uzyskujemy wyniki bazowe przy użyciu obecnych metod generowania neuronów. Eksperymenty pokazują, że modele te produkują płynny tekst, ale nie potrafią przekonująco przybliżyć dokumentów generowanych przez człowieka. Co więcej, nawet szablonowe linie bazowe przekraczają wydajność tych modeli neuronowych w niektórych miernikach, chociaż rozszerzenia oparte na kopiowaniu i rekonstrukcji prowadzą do zauważalnych ulepszeń.', 'ro': 'Modelele neurale recente au arătat progrese semnificative în problema generării de texte descriptive scurte condiționate de un număr mic de înregistrări de baze de date. În această lucrare, sugerăm o sarcină ușor mai dificilă de generare date-text și investigăm cât de eficiente sunt abordările actuale în această sarcină. În special, introducem un nou corpus de înregistrări de date la scară largă asociat cu documente descriptive, propunem o serie de metode de evaluare extractivă pentru analiza performanței și obținem rezultate de bază utilizând metodele actuale de generare neurală. Experimentele arată că aceste modele produc text fluent, dar nu reușesc să aproxime convingător documentele generate de om. Mai mult decât atât, chiar și liniile de bază template depășesc performanța acestor modele neurale pe unele măsurători, deși extensiile bazate pe copiere și reconstrucție duc la îmbunătățiri vizibile.', 'sr': 'Nedavni neuralni modeli pokazali su značajan napredak u problemu stvaranja kratkih opisivnih tekstova pod uslovom malog broja podataka. U ovom poslu predlažemo malo teži zadatak generacije podataka na tekst i istražujemo kako su stručni pristupi na ovom zadatku. Posebno, predstavljamo novi, veliki korpus podataka povezan sa opisivnim dokumentima, predlažemo seriju ekstraktivnih metoda procjene za analiziranje učinka i dobiti početne rezultate koristeći trenutne metode neuralne generacije. Eksperimenti pokazuju da ovi modeli proizvode tekući tekst, ali nisu uvjerljivi približavajući ljudske dokumente. Osim toga, čak i templirane osnovne linije nadmašuju učinkovitost ovih neuralnih modela na nekim metrikama, iako produženja na kopiji i rekonstrukciji vode do primjetljivih poboljšanja.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා තව ටිකක් අමාරුයි දත්ත ලැබීමේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න, සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ මේ වැඩේ කොච්චර ප්\u200dර විශේෂයෙන්, අපි අළුත්, ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ තොරතුරු ලිපිනය සමග සම්බන්ධ විස්තර විස්තර කරන්න, ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂනය කරන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරම පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල් සුදුසුම් පාළුවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා නමුත් මිනිස්සු නිර්මාණය කරපු ල ඒ වගේම, මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් මෙම්ටර් වලින් මූලික විදියට තියෙන්නේ මෙම්ටර් වලින් මූලික විදියට වඩා තියෙන්නේ, නමුත', 'so': 'Tusaalada neurada ee ugu dambeeyey waxay muuqatay horumar aad u weyn oo ku saabsan dhibaatada soo saaridda qoraalka qoraalka oo gaaban oo lagu sharrajiyey warqado yar oo lagu qoray diiwaanka database. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shaqo aad u adag oo macluumaad ku saabsan farshaxan, waxaana baaritaannaa sidoo kale qaabilo faa’iido ah oo ku saabsan shaqadaas. Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaa koob cusub oo waaweyn oo taariikhda ah oo ku yaal dukumentiyada qoraalka, waxaana soo bandhignaynaa koorasyo qiimeyn ah oo ku sawiraya tababarka, waxaana helaynaa resulto ku saabsan isticmaalka qaababka dhalashada neurada. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in tusaalahan ay soo saaraan qoraal macaan, laakiin waxay ku socon waayeen inay si aamin ah ugu dhawdahay dukumentiyada soo saaray dadka. Intaas waxaa dheer in xittaa qoraal-hoose lagu qoray ay ay ka badan yihiin samooyinkaas cudurada neurada, in kastoo ay qoraalka koobiyo- iyo dhismaha ku saleysan, waxay horumarisaa beddelmo la arko.', 'sv': 'Nya neurala modeller har visat betydande framsteg på problemet med att generera korta beskrivande texter beroende på ett litet antal databasposter. I detta arbete föreslår vi en något svårare data-to-text generering uppgift, och undersöker hur effektiva nuvarande metoder är på denna uppgift. I synnerhet introducerar vi en ny, storskalig korpus av dataposter ihopkopplade med beskrivande dokument, föreslår en serie extraktiva utvärderingsmetoder för att analysera prestanda och erhåller baslinjeresultat med hjälp av nuvarande neurala genereringsmetoder. Experiment visar att dessa modeller producerar flytande text, men misslyckas med att övertygande närma människogenererade dokument. Dessutom överträffar även templated baselines prestandan för dessa neurala modeller på vissa mätvärden, även om kopierings- och rekonstruktionsbaserade förlängningar leder till märkbara förbättringar.', 'ur': 'اچھی نئورل نمڈلوں نے ایک چھوٹی ڈیٹابیس ریکورڈ پر کونسیٹ کی تھوڑی تعداد کی نسبت کونسیٹ ٹیکسٹ پیدا کرنے کے مسئلہ میں اہم پیشرفت دکھائی ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک تھوڑا مشکل ڈیٹا-ٹیکسٹ-ٹیکسٹ نسل کے کام کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں اور اس کام میں تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح موجود موجود طریقے ہیں۔ مخصوصا، ہم نے ایک نو، بڑی اسکیل کے دکھانے کے ساتھ جوڑے ہوئے دکھانے کے ریکورڈوں کی کورپوس کو معلوم کیا ہے، عملکرد کا تحلیل کرنے کے لئے اضافہ کے ارزیابی طریقوں کا ایک سری پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، اور موجود نیورل نسل طریقوں کے مطابق بنسس لین تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ موڈلے پلیٹ ٹیکسٹ پیدا کرتے ہیں، لیکن انسان کے پیدا کئے دفتروں کو مطمئن نہ کریں گے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، اگرچہ ٹیپلٹی بنسٹ لینٹ بھی ان نیورال نمڈلوں کی عملکرد بعض متریک پر زیادہ ہے، اگرچہ کپی اور دوبارہ ساخت کی بنیاد کی اضافہ اضافہ اضافہ اضافہ اضافہ ہوتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் புதிய புதிய மாதிரிகள் சிறிய தரவுத்தளத்தின் பதிவுகளில் சிறிய விவரித்திருப்பு உருவாக்கும் பிரச்சனையில் ம இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு சிறிது கடினமான தகவல்-to-text உருவாக்கும் பணியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், மற்றும் இந்த பணியில் எவ்வாறு செ In particular, we introduce a new, large-scale corpus of data records paired with descriptive documents, propose a series of extractive evaluation methods for analyzing performance, and obtain baseline results using current neural generation methods.  சோதனைகள் இந்த மாதிரிகள் தெளிவான உரையை உருவாக்குகிறது, ஆனால் நம்பிக்கையில் தோல்வியடைந்தது மனித உருவாக்கப்பட மேலும், வார்ப்புரு கோடுகள் சில மெட்ரிக்களில் இந்த புதிய மாதிரிகளின் செயல்முறையை விட அதிகமாக இருக்கிறது, ஆனால் நகல்- மற்றும் மீண்ட', 'uz': "Yaqinda yangi neyrol modellari maʼlumot bazasi yozuvlarida qisqa qisqa descriptiv matnlarni yaratish muammosida juda muhim darajada koʻrsatiladi. Bu vazifanda, biz ma'lumotni matn yaratishga juda qisqarli vazifani talab qilamiz, va bu vazifani qanday ishlayotganligini aniqlash. Shunday qilib, biz taʼrifi hujjatlar bilan bir yangi katta maʼlumot raqamlarini aniqlashni anglatamiz, bajarishni analyzer uchun bir necha qiymati usullarini anglatamiz va joriy neyrol yaratish usullarini ishlatish uchun bir nechta qiymatni tasavvur qilamiz. Name Koʻrsatilgan, bu neyrolik modellarining bajarishidan ko'proq o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi, ammo nusxa- va qayta tuzuvchi kengaytmalar taʼminlovchi o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình thần kinh gần đây đã cho thấy tiến triển đáng kể về vấn đề tạo ra các văn bản ngắn gọn được tạo ra nhờ một số lượng nhỏ các hồ sơ dữ liệu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một nhiệm vụ truyền dữ liệu sang văn bản hơi khó khăn hơn một chút, và điều tra xem phương pháp hiện tại hiệu quả thế nào về nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập đoàn dữ liệu mới, rộng lớn kết hợp với các tài liệu mô tả, đề xuất một loạt các phương pháp đánh giá khai thác để phân tích năng lượng, và kết quả dựa trên các phương pháp truyền tải thần kinh. Thí nghiệm cho thấy những mẫu này sản xuất văn bản lưu loát, nhưng không được mô tả mô tả chính xác của con người. Thậm chí những đường cơ bản được chỉnh sửa còn vượt quá khả năng của các mô hình thần kinh trên một số đo tử, mặc dù phần mở rộng sang và tái tạo dẫn đến cải tiến đáng chú ý.', 'bg': 'Последните невронни модели показват значителен напредък по проблема с генерирането на кратки описателни текстове, обусловени на малък брой записи в базата данни. В тази работа предлагаме малко по-трудна задача за генериране на данни към текст и изследваме колко ефективни са настоящите подходи по тази задача. По-специално, ние въвеждаме нов мащабен корпус от записи от данни, съчетан с описателни документи, предлагаме серия от екстрактивни методи за оценка за анализ на ефективността и получаваме базови резултати, използвайки съвременни методи за генериране на неврони. Експериментите показват, че тези модели произвеждат плавен текст, но не успяват убедително да приближат документите, генерирани от човека. Освен това, дори моделираните базови линии надвишават производителността на тези невронни модели при някои показатели, въпреки че разширенията, базирани на копиране и реконструкция, водят до забележими подобрения.', 'da': 'Nyere neurale modeller har vist betydelige fremskridt med problemet med at generere korte beskrivende tekster betinget af et lille antal databaseposter. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en lidt vanskeligere data-til-tekst generering opgave, og undersøger, hvor effektive nuværende tilgange er på denne opgave. Især introducerer vi et nyt omfattende korpus af dataposter parret med beskrivende dokumenter, foreslår en række ekstraktive evalueringsmetoder til analyse af ydeevne og opnår baseline resultater ved hjælp af nuværende neurale genereringsmetoder. Eksperimenter viser, at disse modeller producerer flydende tekst, men ikke overbevisende tilnærmelse af menneskeskabte dokumenter. Desuden overstiger selv templerede baselines ydeevnen af disse neurale modeller på nogle metrics, selvom kopi- og rekonstruktionsbaserede udvidelser fører til mærkbare forbedringer.', 'nl': 'Recente neurale modellen hebben aanzienlijke vooruitgang laten zien op het probleem van het genereren van korte beschrijvende teksten gebaseerd op een klein aantal databaserecords. In dit werk stellen we een iets moeilijkere data-to-text generatie taak voor, en onderzoeken we hoe effectief de huidige benaderingen op deze taak zijn. In het bijzonder introduceren we een nieuw, grootschalig corpus van gegevensrecords gekoppeld aan beschrijvende documenten, stellen een reeks extractieve evaluatiemethoden voor het analyseren van prestaties voor en verkrijgen we baseline resultaten met behulp van huidige neurale generatiemethoden. Experimenten tonen aan dat deze modellen vloeiende tekst produceren, maar geen overtuigende benadering bieden van door mensen gegenereerde documenten. Bovendien overtreffen zelfs templated baselines de prestaties van deze neurale modellen op sommige metrics, hoewel copy- en reconstructiegebaseerde extensies leiden tot merkbare verbeteringen.', 'hr': 'Nedavni neuronski modeli pokazali su značajan napredak u problemu stvaranja kratkih opisivnih tekstova pod uvjetom malih broja podataka baze podataka. U ovom poslu predlažemo malo teži zadatak generacije podataka na tekst i istražujemo kako su učinkoviti trenutni pristupi na ovom zadatku. Posebno, predstavljamo novi, veliki korpus podataka povezan s opisivnim dokumentima, predlažemo niz ekstraktivnih metoda procjene za analiziranje učinka i dobiti početne rezultate koristeći trenutne metode neuralne generacije. Eksperimenti pokazuju da ovi modeli proizvode tekući tekst, ali nisu uvjerljivi približavajući ljudski dokumenti. Osim toga, čak i templirane osnovne linije nadmaže učinkovitost tih neuralnih modela na nekim metrikama, iako produženja na temelju kopije i rekonstrukcije dovede do primjetljivih poboljšanja.', 'id': 'Model saraf baru-baru ini menunjukkan kemajuan yang signifikan pada masalah menghasilkan teks pendek deskriptif berkonditionasi pada sejumlah kecil catatan database. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menyarankan tugas generasi data-ke-teks sedikit lebih sulit, dan menyelidiki seberapa efektif pendekatan saat ini pada tugas ini. Terutama, kami memperkenalkan sebuah korpus baru, skala besar catatan data yang berpasangan dengan dokumen deskriptif, mengusulkan serangkaian metode ekstraktif untuk menganalisa prestasi, dan mendapatkan hasil dasar menggunakan metode generasi saraf saat ini. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model ini menghasilkan teks fluent, tetapi gagal untuk meyakinkan mendekati dokumen yang dihasilkan manusia. Moreover, even templated baselines exceed the performance of these neural models on some metrics, though copy- and reconstruction-based extensions lead to noticeable improvements.', 'de': 'Neuere neuronale Modelle haben erhebliche Fortschritte bei der Erstellung kurzer beschreibender Texte gezeigt, die auf einer kleinen Anzahl von Datenbankdatensätzen basieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine etwas schwierigere Data-to-Text-Generierungsaufgabe vor und untersuchen, wie effektiv aktuelle Ansätze für diese Aufgabe sind. Insbesondere stellen wir einen neuen, großen Korpus von Datensätzen vor, gepaart mit deskriptiven Dokumenten, schlagen eine Reihe extraktiver Auswertungsmethoden zur Leistungsanalyse vor und erhalten Grundlagenergebnisse mit aktuellen neuronalen Generierungsmethoden. Experimente zeigen, dass diese Modelle fließenden Text produzieren, aber keine überzeugende Annäherung an menschengenerierte Dokumente schaffen. Darüber hinaus übertreffen sogar templierte Baselines die Leistung dieser neuronalen Modelle in einigen Metriken, obwohl copy- und rekonstruktionsbasierte Erweiterungen zu spürbaren Verbesserungen führen.', 'ko': '최근의 신경모델은 소량의 데이터베이스 기록을 조건으로 하는 간단한 설명 텍스트를 만드는 데 큰 진전을 거두었다.이 작업에서 우리는 약간 어려운 텍스트 생성 임무를 제기했고 현재의 방법이 이 임무에서의 유효성을 연구했다.특히 우리는 새로운, 대규모의 데이터 기록 자료 라이브러리와 묘사적인 문서를 도입하여 성능 분석에 사용되는 추출 평가 방법을 제시하고 기존의 신경 생성 방법을 사용하여 기선 결과를 얻었다.실험에 따르면 이 모델들은 유창한 텍스트를 만들 수 있지만 인공적으로 만들어진 문서와 믿을 수 없다.그 밖에 템플릿 기선이 일부 지표에서도 이러한 신경 모델의 성능을 초과했다. 복제와 재건을 바탕으로 하는 확장이 현저한 개선을 가져왔음에도 불구하고.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای عصبی اخیرا پیشرفت مهم در مسئله تولید کردن متن\u200cهای توصیف کوتاه در تعداد ثبت داده\u200cهای داده\u200cهای کوچک نشان داده\u200cاند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک کار کمی سخت\u200cتر برای نسل داده\u200cهای متن، و تحقیق کنیم که چقدر روش\u200cهای فعلی در این کار هستند. مخصوصا، ما یک قالب مقیاس جدید و بزرگ از ثبت داده\u200cها را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که با مدارک توضیح می\u200cدهند، یک سری از روش\u200cهای ارزیابی خارجی برای تحلیل کاربرد، و نتیجه\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط را با استفاده از روش\u200cهای نسل عصبی فعلی می\u200c تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این مدل\u200cها متن روان را تولید می\u200cکنند، ولی به طور قابل قانع کردن نسخه\u200cهای تولید بشر شکست نمی\u200cدهند. علاوه بر این، حتی خطوط پایه\u200cهای معبدی از عملکرد این مدل\u200cهای عصبی بر بعضی از متریک\u200cها بیشتر از آن می\u200cشود، با وجود اینکه افزایش\u200cهای کپی و بازسازی بنیاد دارند، به بهترین مشاهده می\u200cرسند.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa neura wa hivi karibuni umeonyesha maendeleo makubwa kuhusu tatizo la kutengeneza ujumbe mfupi wa maelezo yaliyowekwa kwenye rekodi ndogo ya database. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kazi ngumu zaidi ya taarifa za vizazi vya maandishi, na kuchunguza namna mbinu za sasa zinazotokana na kazi hii. In particular, we introduce a new, large-scale corpus of data records paired with descriptive documents, propose a series of extractive evaluation methods for analyzing performance, and obtain baseline results using current neural generation methods.  Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifano hizi huzalisha ujumbe wa mafanikio, lakini hushindwa kushindwa na uhakika wa nyaraka zilizotengenezwa kwa binadamu. Zaidi ya hayo, hata misingi ya ubora yanazidi kuongezeka kwa mifano haya ya ubongo katika baadhi ya mitindo, ingawa maendeleo yanayotokana na nusura na ujenzi yanasababisha maboresho yanayotazama.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda näral modelleriň gysga tassyklan metinleri oluşamakda has baglany täze bir sany databank kaydediklerinde durulýan meselede görkezilip bardylar. Bu işde, biz biraz kynçylyk bermek üçin metin döredilmesini maslahat berýäris we şu işiňde nähili täsirli hereketleriň nähili täsirli hereketleriň bardygyny maslahat berýäris. Özellikle, biz tassyklanan sened bilen birleşmiş, täze, uly ölçekli data kayıtlaryň korpusyny tanıtıp, performans analizi üçin birnäçe ekstra değerlendirme yöntemlerini teklif edip, we häzirki neiral üretim yöntemlerini ulanarak basit çözümlerini tapdyrıp başladyk. Experiments hatlaryň bu nusgalar howply metin edip bilýändigini görkezýär, ýöne adamlaryň üretilen senedi ýakynda ynandyrmak başarmady. Hatta, hatta örnekli esaslar çizgileri bu nöral modellerin käbir metrikde etkinlik ukyplaryndan üstün gelýär. Bu şekilde kopya ve tekrar inşa etmäge tabanlı uzatlar möhüm gelişmelere yol açarlar.', 'sq': 'Modelet nervore të fundit kanë treguar përparim të rëndësishëm në problemin e krijimit të teksteve të shkurtra përshkrimuese të kushtuar nga një numër i vogël të regjistrimeve të bazës së dhënave. Në këtë punë, sugjerojmë një detyrë pak më të vështirë të gjenerimit të të dhënave në tekst dhe hetojmë se sa efektive janë qasjet aktuale në këtë detyrë. Në veçanti, ne futim një korpus të ri, në shkallë të madhe të regjistrimeve të të dhënave të palëzuar me dokumente përshkrimuese, propozojmë një seri metodash ekstraktive për analizimin e performancës dhe marrim rezultate bazë duke përdorur metodat aktuale të gjenerimit nervor. Eksperimentet tregojnë se këto modele prodhojnë tekst fluent, por nuk arrijnë të qarkullojnë me bindje dokumentet e gjeneratuar nga njerëzit. Përveç kësaj, edhe linjat bazë të modeluara kapërcejnë performancën e këtyre modeleve neuronale në disa metrika, megjithëse zgjerimet e bazuara në kopje dhe rindërtim çojnë në përmirësime të dukshme.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս նյարդային մոդելները ցույց են տվել, որ կարճ նկարագրական տեքստեր ստեղծելու խնդիրը նշանակալի առաջընթաց է, որը կախված է մի փոքր քանակությամբ տվյալների ձայնագրություններից: In this work, we suggest a slightly more difficult data-to-text generation task, and investigate how effective current approaches are on this task.  Հատկապես, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր, մեծ մասշտաբով տվյալների ձայնագրությունների մի խումբ, որը զուգավորվում է նկարագրական փաստաթղթերի հետ, առաջարկում ենք արդյունավետության վերլուծության արտադրողական մեթոդներ և ստանում հիմնական արդյունքներ՝ օգտագործելով ներկայիս նյա Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մոդելները ստեղծում են հեշտ տեքստ, բայց չեն կարողանում համոզել մարդկային ստեղծված փաստաթղթերը: Moreover, even templated baselines exceed the performance of these neural models on some metrics, though copy- and reconstruction-based extensions lead to noticeable improvements.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የጠለላዊ ሞዴላዎች በጥቂት የዳታ መቀመጫዎች ላይ አካላቢ ጽሑፎችን በመፍጠር ላይ የሚያሳየፉ ግንኙነትን የሚያሳየፉ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ለጽሑፍ ትውልድ ማድረግ የሚጨነቅ የዳታ ትውልድ ስራ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ አዲስ የበለጠ የዳታ ሰነድ ሰነዶች የሚቆጠሩ አዲስ ሰርቨሮች እናስጠጋለን፣ የአሁኑን የናቡር ትውልድ ሥርዓት በማስተዋል የውጤት ምርጫዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች የፍላጎት ጽሑፎችን እንዲያሳዩ ያሳያል፤ ነገር ግን የሰው አካባቢ ሰነዱን በማስተካከል አይጎድልበትም፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የነጥብ መሠረት መተላለፊያ በአንዳንዶች ማተሚያዎች ላይ የሚደረገውን አካባቢ እንኳ፣ የቅጂ- እና የመሠረት ግንኙነቶች የሚታወቅ ትክክል ማድረግ ይሻላል፡፡', 'af': "Onlangse neurale modele het betekende vordering vertoon op die probleem van genereer kort beskrywing teks wat op 'n klein aantal databasis opneem beteken is. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n bietjie harder data-to-text generasie taak en ondersoek hoe effektief huidige toegang op hierdie taak is. In besonderhede, introduseer ons 'n nuwe, groot-skaal korpus van data opneem met beskryfbare dokumente, voorstel 'n reeks van ekstraktiewe evalueringsmetodes vir analisering van prestasie en kry basisline resultate met gebruik van huidige neurale generasie metodes. Eksperimente vertoon dat hierdie modele fluidelike teks produseer, maar misluk om te oordeel omtrent mensgenereerde dokumente te oordeel. Ook, selfs gemaakte basisline oorsaak die prestasie van hierdie neurale modele op sommige metries, alhoewel kopie- en rekonstruksie-gebaseerde uitbreidings lei na aanmerkbere verbeteringe.", 'az': 'Son nöral modelləri bir neçə databank kayıtlarında müəyyən edilmiş qısa təsvir mətnlərini yaratmaq problemində möhkəm tədbir göstərdilər. Bu işdə, bir az daha çətin verilən məlumatlar təhsil etməyi təklif edirik və bu işdə nə qədər müvəffəqiyyətli təhsil edildiyini incidirik. Özellikle, biz yeni, böyük ölçülü məlumat kayıtlarının korpusu təşkil edirik, tədbirlik analizi üçün ekstraktif değerlendirmə metodlarının bir serisini təşkil edirik və a ğımdaki nöral nəsil metodlarını istifadə edirik. Həqiqətən, bu modellərin sıxıntılı metinləri yaratdığını göstərir, amma insan yaratdığı məsələlər tərəfindən ikna edilmədi. Daha sonra, bu nöral modellərin bəzi metriklərdə hətta məxluqat səhifələrindən çox yüksək göstərilir. Halbuki kopiya və yeni inşaat tabanlı uzaqlaşdırmaları gözəl düzəltmələrə yol göstərir.', 'bs': 'Nedavni neuronski modeli pokazali su značajan napredak u problemu stvaranja kratkih opisivnih tekstova pod uvjetom malih broja podataka. U ovom poslu predlažemo malo teži zadatak generacije podataka na tekst, i istražujemo kako su učinkoviti trenutni pristupi na ovom zadatku. Posebno, predstavljamo novi, veliki korpus podataka povezan s opisivnim dokumentima, predlažemo niz ekstraktivnih metoda procjene za analiziranje učinka i dobiti početne rezultate koristeći trenutne metode neuralne generacije. Eksperimenti pokazuju da ovi modeli proizvode tekući tekst, ali nisu uvjerljivi približavajući ljudske dokumente. Osim toga, čak i templirane osnovne linije nadmađuju učinkovitost tih neuralnih modela na nekim metrikama, iako produženja na temelju kopije i rekonstrukcije dovede do značajnih poboljšanja.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক নিউরেল মডেল সংখ্যা ডাটাবেস রেকর্ডে সংক্ষিপ্ত সংখ্যার সংখ্যায় সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সট তৈরি করার সমস্যায় গুরুত এই কাজে আমরা একটু কঠিন তথ্য থেকে টেক্সট প্রজন্মের কাজ পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি এবং এই কাজে কি কার্যকর প্রতিযোগিতায় বর্তমান প্রাপ্তি বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি নতুন বিশাল, বিশাল তথ্য রেকর্ডের প্রস্তাব দেখাচ্ছি যা ডাটা রেকর্ড দ্বারা জোড়া হয়েছে, বর্তমান নিউরেল প্রজন্মের পদ্ধতি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি সিরিজ ব পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে এই মডেলগুলো ফ্লায়েন্ট লেখা তৈরি করে, কিন্তু বিশ্বাস করতে ব্যর্থ হচ্ছে মানুষের ত এছাড়াও, কিছু মেট্রিকের উপর নিউরেল মডেলের প্রাপ্তির বেশী বেশী, যদিও কপি এবং পুনঃনির্মাণের ভিত্তিক উন্নয়নের ফলে দেখা যায়।', 'ca': "Models neuronals recents han demostrat progrés significatius en el problem a de generar curts textos descriptius condicionats amb un petit nombre de registres de bases de dades. In this work, we suggest a slightly more difficult data-to-text generation task, and investigate how effective current approaches are on this task.  En particular, introduïm un nou cos de registres de dades a gran escala parellat amb documents descriptius, proposem una sèrie de mètodes d'evaluació extractiva per analitzar el rendiment, i obtenim resultats basals fent servir mètodes actuals de generació neuronal. Els experiments demostren que aquests models produeixen text fluent, però no aproximan convinciblement els documents generats per a l'home. A més, fins i tot les línies de base modelades superen el rendiment d'aquests models neuronals en algunes mètriques, encara que les extensions basades en còpia i reconstrucció porten a millores notables.", 'cs': 'Nedávné neuronové modely ukázaly významný pokrok v problematice generování krátkých popisných textů podmíněných na malém počtu databázových záznamů. V této práci navrhujeme o něco obtížnější úlohu generování dat na text a zkoumáme, jak efektivní jsou současné přístupy k tomuto úkolu. Konkrétně představujeme nový, rozsáhlý korpus datových záznamů spárovaných s popisnými dokumenty, navrhujeme řadu extraktivních metod hodnocení pro analýzu výkonnosti a získáváme výsledky základních výsledků pomocí současných metod neuronové generace. Experimenty ukazují, že tyto modely produkují plynulý text, ale nedokážou přesvědčivě přiblížit dokumenty generované člověkem. Navíc i templované základní linie překračují výkon těchto neuronových modelů v některých metrikách, ačkoli rozšíření založená na kopírování a rekonstrukci vedou k znatelným zlepšením.', 'et': 'Hiljutised närvimudelid on näidanud märkimisväärset edu lühikeste kirjeldavate tekstide genereerimise probleemis, mis on tingitud väikesest arvust andmebaasi kirjetest. Käesolevas töös pakume välja veidi keerulisema andmete loomise ülesande ning uurime, kui efektiivsed on praegused lähenemisviisid sellele ülesandele. Eelkõige tutvustame uut, ulatuslikku andmekirjete korpust, mis on seotud kirjeldavate dokumentidega, pakume välja rea ekstraktiivseid hindamismeetodeid jõudluse analüüsimiseks ja saame algtulemusi, kasutades praeguseid neurogeneratsiooni meetodeid. Katsed näitavad, et need mudelid toodavad sujuvat teksti, kuid ei suuda veenvalt lähendada inimese loodud dokumente. Veelgi enam, isegi modelleeritud lähtejooned ületavad mõnede mõõdikute puhul nende närvimudelite jõudlust, kuigi kopeerimisel ja rekonstrueerimisel põhinevad laiendused viivad märgatavate paranemisteni.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset hermomallit ovat osoittaneet merkittävää edistystä lyhyiden kuvailevien tekstien tuottamisessa, jotka perustuvat pieneen määrään tietokantatietueita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme hieman vaikeampaa datan tuottamista tekstiksi ja selvitämme, miten tehokkaita nykyiset lähestymistavat ovat tässä tehtävässä. Erityisesti esittelemme uuden, laajamittaisen tietoaineiston, joka on yhdistetty kuvaileviin asiakirjoihin, ehdotamme joukon ekstraktiivisia arviointimenetelmiä suorituskyvyn analysointiin ja hankimme lähtötilanteen tuloksia käyttämällä nykyisiä neurogeneraation menetelmiä. Kokeet osoittavat, että nämä mallit tuottavat sujuvaa tekstiä, mutta eivät onnistu vakuuttavasti lähentämään ihmisen tuottamia asiakirjoja. Lisäksi jopa mallinnetut lähtöviivat ylittävät näiden hermomallien suorituskyvyn joissakin mittareissa, vaikka kopiointi- ja rekonstruktiopohjaiset laajennukset johtavat huomattaviin parannuksiin.', 'ha': "Modellun neural na yanzu suka nuna mafariko mai girma a matsalar ta ƙiƙiro rubutu masu nau'in descriptive da aka ƙayyade shi a kan wani abu kaɗan na rubutun database. Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙayyade wani aikin data-zuwa-matsayi mai tsanani zuwa wani abu, kuma munã ƙidãya yadda masu amfani da hanyokan yanzu suke cikin wannan aikin. Kayya, za mu introduce wata takardar data masu girma da aka haɗa takardar kwamfyuta na faɗa ɗaɗɗawa, sai Mu buɗa wasu shiryoyin evaluation masu yin anadi ga fassarar, kuma za'a sami fassarar a ƙarƙashin da ke amfani da hanyoyin kizalin na yanzu. Fijaroyi na nuna cewa waɗannan misalin su sami matsayin mai ruwan aiki, kuma amma ba ya kasa yin yaƙĩni da tsakanin takardun da aka halitta mutum. Da haka, kuma, kõ dã layin da aka tsumare shi yana ƙaranci mafiya cikakken waɗannan misãlai na neural kan wasu mitori, ingawa, cire-kofi da ake rubutu-na'ura zasu ƙara mafiya tsari.", 'he': 'מודלים עצביים לאחרונה הראו התקדמות משמעותית על הבעיה של ליצור טקסטים תיאורים קצרים בהתאם למספר קטן של רשומות נתונים. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציעים משימה של דור מידע לטקסט קצת יותר קשה, ולחקור עד כמה הגישות הנוכחיות יעילות על המשימה הזאת. במיוחד, אנחנו מכירים גוף חדש, בקנה מידה גדולה של רשומות נתונים זוגות עם מסמכים תיאורים, מציעים סדרה של שיטות עריכה חיצונית לניתוח ביצועים, ולהשיג תוצאות בסיסית באמצעות שיטות דור עצבי הנוכחיות. ניסויים מראים שהדוגמנים האלה יוצרים טקסט נוזל, אך הם לא מסוגלים לשכנע מסמכים יוצרים ע"י אדם. חוץ מזה, אפילו קווי הבסיס מודפסים מעליים את ההפעלה של הדוגמנים העצביים האלה על כמה מטריות, למרות שהתרחיבות המבוססות על העתקים ובניתוח מחדש מובילות לשיפורים נראים.', 'sk': 'Nedavni nevronski modeli so pokazali pomemben napredek pri problemu ustvarjanja kratkih opisnih besedil, pogojenih z majhnim številom zapisov baze podatkov. V tem delu predlagamo nekoliko težjo nalogo ustvarjanja podatkov v besedilo in raziskujemo, kako učinkoviti so sedanji pristopi pri tej nalogi. Predvsem predstavljamo nov obsežen korpus podatkovnih zapisov, združen z opisnimi dokumenti, predlagamo vrsto ekstraktivnih metod evalvacije za analizo učinkovitosti in pridobimo osnovne rezultate z uporabo sedanjih metod nevronske generacije. Poskusi kažejo, da ti modeli ustvarjajo tekoče besedilo, vendar ne morejo prepričljivo približati dokumentov, ki jih ustvari človek. Poleg tega celo modelirane osnovne linije presegajo zmogljivost teh nevronskih modelov pri nekaterih metrikah, čeprav razširitve, ki temeljijo na kopiranju in rekonstrukciji, vodijo do opaznih izboljšav.', 'jv': 'text-decorationtextattr Nang gunggo iki, kita suggerusan dak kelas kuwi susahe data-to-text nggambar, lan saka sisadi cara sing apik dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang iki. Genjer-Genjer politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་བྱུང་ཚད་སྟོན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་པས། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ཕར་མེད་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་དང་། ལས་ཀྱང་ད་ལྟོའི་ཐབ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གསལ་བཤད་པའི་ཡིག ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་འདི་དག་དུ་ཕལ་མེད་ཡིག་གེ་བཟོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ནའང་། མིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ Moreover, even templated baselines exceed the performance of these neural models on some metrics, though copy- and reconstruction-based extensions lead to noticeable improvements.'}
{'en': 'All that is English may be Hindi : Enhancing language identification through automatic ranking of the likeliness of word borrowing in social media', 'ar': 'كل ما هو باللغة الإنجليزية قد يكون هنديًا: تحسين التعرف على اللغة من خلال الترتيب التلقائي لإمكانية استعارة الكلمات في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'pt': 'Tudo o que é inglês pode ser hindi: aprimorando a identificação do idioma por meio da classificação automática da probabilidade de empréstimo de palavras nas mídias sociais', 'es': 'Todo lo que es inglés puede ser hindi: mejorar la identificación del idioma mediante la clasificación automática de la probabilidad de que se tomen prestadas palabras en las redes sociales', 'fr': "Tout ce qui est en anglais peut être en hindi\xa0: amélioration de l'identification de la langue grâce au classement automatique de la probabilité d'emprunter des mots sur les réseaux sociaux", 'ja': '英語はヒンディー語である可能性があります：ソーシャルメディアでの単語借用の可能性を自動的にランク付けすることで、言語の識別を強化します', 'ru': 'Английский язык может быть только хинди: улучшение идентификации языка посредством автоматического ранжирования вероятности заимствования слов в социальных сетях', 'hi': 'जो कुछ भी अंग्रेजी है वह हिंदी हो सकता है: सोशल मीडिया में शब्द उधार लेने की समानता की स्वचालित रैंकिंग के माध्यम से भाषा की पहचान बढ़ाना', 'zh': '凡英语皆印地语:因自动排名社交媒体中单词借能以强言识', 'ga': 'Seans gur Hiondúis é an t-ainm atá ar an mBéarla: Sainaithint teanga a fheabhsú trí rangú uathoibríoch a dhéanamh ar chosúlacht na hiasachta focal sna meáin shóisialta', 'ka': 'ყველაფერი ანგლისური შეიძლება იყოს ჰინდური: სიტყვის ინდენტიფიკაცია სოციალური მედიაში ავტომატური რენექტირება', 'el': 'Όλα όσα είναι Αγγλικά μπορεί να είναι Χίντι: Ενίσχυση της γλωσσικής ταυτοποίησης μέσω της αυτόματης ταξινόμησης της πιθανότητας δανεισμού λέξεων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'hu': 'Minden ami angol lehet hindi: A nyelvazonosítás javítása a közösségi médiában a szókölcsönzés valószínűségének automatikus rangsorolásával', 'kk': 'Ағылшын тілінің барлығы хинди болуы мүмкін: әлеуметтік медиақтағы сөздерді автоматты түрде ұстау ықтималдығын көтеру', 'it': "Tutto ciò che è inglese può essere hindi: Migliorare l'identificazione della lingua attraverso il ranking automatico della probabilità di prestito di parole nei social media", 'ml': 'ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ എല്ലാം ഹിന്ദിയായിരിക്കാം: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d കടം ചെയ്യുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പോലുള്ള രാങ്ങിങ്ങില്\u200d സ', 'lt': 'Viskas, kas yra anglų kalba, gali būti Hindi: pagerinti kalbos identifikavimą automatiškai klasifikuojant žodžių skolinimosi social in ėje žiniasklaidoje tikimybę', 'mk': 'Се што е англиски може да биде хиндиски: подобрување на идентификацијата на јазикот преку автоматско рангирање на веројатноста на позајмувањето на зборови во социјалните медиуми', 'ms': 'Semua bahasa Inggeris mungkin Hindi: meningkatkan pengenalan bahasa melalui rangkaian automatik kebarangkalian pinjaman perkataan dalam media sosial', 'mt': 'L-Ingliż kollu jista’ jkun l-Indjan: It-titjib tal-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa permezz tal-klassifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-probabbiltà tas-self tal-kliem fil-midja soċjali', 'mn': 'Англи хэлний бүх зүйл бол Хинди: Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийг автоматаар хуваалцах үгийн магадлалыг нэмэгдүүлэх нь', 'no': 'Alle som er engelsk kan vera Hindi: Forstørra språk-identifisering gjennom automatisk rangering av sannsynligheten på ordlåsing i sosiale media', 'pl': 'Wszystko, co jest angielski, może być hindi: poprawa identyfikacji języka poprzez automatyczny ranking prawdopodobieństwa pożyczania słów w mediach społecznościowych', 'si': 'ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ හැම දෙයක්ම හින්දී වෙන්න පුළුවන්: සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මකයේ වචන අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dර', 'so': 'Dhammaan ingiriisiga waxaa laga yaabaa in uu yahay Hindi: Horumarinta aqoonsiga luqada, si automati ah loo sameynayo qoraalka amaahda ku qoran shabakadda bulshada', 'sr': 'Sve što je engleski možda Hindi: Pojačanje identifikacije jezika automatskim redovima vjerojatnosti pozajmljivanja reči u društvenim medijima', 'ro': 'Tot ceea ce este limba engleză poate fi hindi: Îmbunătățirea identificării limbii prin clasificarea automată a probabilității împrumutului de cuvinte în rețelele sociale', 'sv': 'Allt som är engelska kan vara hindi: Förbättra språkidentifieringen genom automatisk rankning av sannolikheten för ordlån i sociala medier', 'ur': 'یہ سب انگلیسی ہے ممکن ہے ہینڈی: زبان کی شناسایی مہربانی کرنا سوسیل میڈیا میں قرض لینے والی کلمات کی امکانات کے ذریعہ', 'ta': 'ஆங்கிலம் அனைத்தும் ஹின்டி இருக்கலாம்:', 'uz': "Inglizcha tili hammasi Hindi bo'lishi mumkin: Jami shaxsiy media'da borilgan so'zlarni avtomatik ravishda aniqlash mumkin", 'vi': 'Tất cả tiếng Anh có thể là tiếng Ấn: Tăng khả năng nhận diện ngôn ngữ bằng cách xếp hạng tự động kiểu vay mượn từ trên mạng xã hội', 'bg': 'Всичко, което е английски може да е хинди: Подобряване на езиковата идентификация чрез автоматично класиране на вероятността от заемане на думи в социалните медии', 'nl': 'Alles wat Engels is kan Hindi zijn: Verbetering van taalidentificatie door automatische rangschikking van de waarschijnlijkheid van woordlening in sociale media', 'da': 'Alt, hvad der er engelsk, kan være hindi: Forbedring af sprogidentifikation gennem automatisk rangering af sandsynligheden for ordoptagelse i sociale medier', 'hr': 'Sve što je engleski može biti Hindi: Pojačanje identifikacije jezika automatskim redovima vjerojatnosti pozajmljivanja riječi u društvenim medijima', 'de': 'Alles, was Englisch ist, mag Hindi sein: Verbesserung der Sprachidentifikation durch automatisches Ranking der Wahrscheinlichkeit der Wortausleihe in sozialen Medien', 'ko': '모든 영어는 인디언일 수 있다. 소셜 미디어에서 단어를 빌릴 가능성을 자동으로 정렬함으로써 언어 식별 능력을 강화한다.', 'sw': 'Kila Kiingereza kinaweza kuwa Kihindi: Kuboresha utambulisho wa lugha kwa njia ya kujitegemea kuongezeka kwa mfano wa maneno yanayokopeshwa katika mitandao ya kijamii', 'af': 'Alles wat Engels is kan Hindi wees: Verbeter taal identifikasie deur outomatiese rangering van die waarskynlik van woord in sosiale media', 'id': 'All that is English may be Hindi: Enhancing language identification through automatic ranking of the likeliness of word borrowing in social media', 'fa': 'تنها چیزی که انگلیسی هستند ممکن است هندی باشد: افزایش شناسایی زبان را از طریق رشته\u200cهای اتوماتیک احتمال قرض کردن کلمات در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی', 'am': 'እንግሊዘኛ ያለው ሁሉ የኪንዲ ሊሆን ይችላል፤ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የቃላትን ብጤት በመግለጽ አካባቢ ማድረግ ማድረግ እና ቋንቋን ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Անգլերենը կարող է լինել հինդին. լեզվի ճանաչելու բարելավումը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում բառերի փոխառման հավանականության ավտոմատիկ դասավորման միջոցով', 'bn': 'ইংরেজি যা ইংরেজী হতে পারে তা হলে হিন্দি: সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষার পরিচয়পত্রের মাধ্যমে স্বয়ংক্রি', 'tr': 'Iňlisçe hemme zady Hindistança bolup biler: sosyal medýýatlarda wagtyň ýetişikliklerini awtomatik derejesi bilen', 'ca': 'All that is English may be Hindi: Enhancing language identification through automatic ranking of the likeliness of word borrowing in social media', 'bs': 'Sve što je engleski možda Hindi: Pojačanje identifikacije jezika automatskim redovima vjerojatnosti pozajmljivanja riječi u društvenim medijima', 'az': 'İngilizci olaraq Hindi ola bilər: Sosyal media içində ödünç alınan sözlərin mümkünlüyünü avtomatik dərəcəsinə görə dil kimliğini artırmaq', 'fi': 'Kaikki mikä on englantia voi olla hindi: Parannetaan kielen tunnistamista automaattisella järjestyksellä sanalainauksen todennäköisyydestä sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'sq': 'Gjithçka që është anglisht mund të jetë Hindi: Përmirësimi i identifikimit të gjuhës nëpërmjet renditjes automatike të gjatësisë së huazimit të fjalëve në media sociale', 'cs': 'Vše, co je angličtina, může být hindština: zlepšení identifikace jazyka prostřednictvím automatického hodnocení pravděpodobnosti půjčování slov v sociálních médiích', 'et': 'Kõik, mis on inglise keel, võib olla hindi: keele identifitseerimise parandamine sotsiaalmeedias sõna laenamise tõenäosuse automaatse järjestuse kaudu', 'he': 'כל מה שהוא אנגלי יכול להיות הינדי: שיפור זיהוי שפה דרך הדרגה אוטומטית של סבירות הלוואה של מילים במדיה חברתית', 'ha': 'All da ke cikin Ingiriya ana iya iya zama Hindu: Ka ƙara bayani ga harshen na farat ɗaya na danganta kamar misãlan maganar da aka yi harbouwa a cikin mitanda ƙarami', 'sk': 'Vse, kar je angleščina, je lahko hindujščina: Izboljšanje identifikacije jezika s samodejnim razvrščanjem podobnosti izposojanja besed v socialnih omrežjih', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། ཨིན་ཇིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིན་ཚུལ་བརྗོད་མིན་ཡིན། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ', 'jv': 'Lah sing nganggo Inggris bisa kuwi gris: nglanggar sampeyan urip kuwi mau secara awak dhéwé, kuwi ngregani uwong kelas nang media sothik'}
{'en': 'n this paper, we present a set of computational methods to identify the likeliness of a word being borrowed, based on the signals from social media. In terms of Spearman’s correlation values, our methods perform more than two times better (0.62) in predicting the borrowing likeliness compared to the best performing baseline (0.26) reported in literature. Based on this likeliness estimate we asked annotators to re-annotate the language tags of foreign words in predominantly native contexts. In 88 % of cases the annotators felt that the foreign language tag should be replaced by native language tag, thus indicating a huge scope for improvement of automatic language identification systems.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مجموعة من الأساليب الحسابية لتحديد مدى احتمالية استعارة كلمة ، بناءً على الإشارات الواردة من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. فيما يتعلق بقيم ارتباط سبيرمان ، فإن طرقنا تؤدي أداءً أفضل بأكثر من مرتين (0.62) في توقع احتمالية الاقتراض مقارنةً بخط الأساس الأفضل أداءً (∼ 0.26) المبلغ عنه في الأدبيات. بناءً على تقدير التشابه هذا ، طلبنا من المعلقين إعادة شرح علامات اللغة للكلمات الأجنبية في السياقات التي يغلب عليها الطابع الأصلي. في 88٪ من الحالات ، شعر المعلقون بضرورة استبدال علامة اللغة الأجنبية بعلامة اللغة الأصلية ، مما يشير إلى وجود مجال كبير لتحسين أنظمة تحديد اللغة التلقائية.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un conjunto de métodos computacionales para identificar la probabilidad de que una palabra sea prestada, en función de las señales de las redes sociales. En términos de valores de correlación de Spearman, nuestros métodos funcionan más de dos veces mejor (∼ 0.62) en la predicción de la probabilidad de endeudamiento en comparación con el mejor valor de referencia (∼ 0.26) reportado en la literatura. Basándonos en esta estimación de probabilidad, pedimos a los anotadores que volvieran a anotar las etiquetas de idioma de las palabras extranjeras en contextos predominantemente nativos. En el 88% de los casos, los anotadores consideraron que la etiqueta de idioma extranjero debería sustituirse por la etiqueta de idioma nativo, lo que indica un enorme margen de mejora de los sistemas de identificación automática de idiomas.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um conjunto de métodos computacionais para identificar a probabilidade de uma palavra ser emprestada, com base nos sinais das mídias sociais. Em termos de valores de correlação de Spearman, nossos métodos têm um desempenho mais de duas vezes melhor (∼ 0,62) na previsão da probabilidade de empréstimo em comparação com a linha de base de melhor desempenho (∼ 0,26) relatada na literatura. Com base nessa estimativa de probabilidade, pedimos aos anotadores para anotar novamente as tags de idioma de palavras estrangeiras em contextos predominantemente nativos. Em 88% dos casos, os anotadores acharam que a etiqueta de língua estrangeira deveria ser substituída pela etiqueta de língua nativa, indicando assim um enorme escopo para melhoria dos sistemas de identificação automática de idiomas.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un ensemble de méthodes informatiques permettant d'identifier la probabilité qu'un mot soit emprunté, sur la base des signaux provenant des médias sociaux. En termes de valeurs de corrélation de Spearman, nos méthodes sont plus de deux fois plus performantes (∼ 0,62) dans la prévision de la probabilité d'emprunt par rapport à la base de référence la plus performante (∼ 0,26) rapportée dans la littérature. Sur la base de cette estimation de probabilité, nous avons demandé aux annotateurs d'annoter à nouveau les balises de langue des mots étrangers dans des contextes principalement natifs. Dans 88\xa0% des cas, les annotateurs ont estimé que l'étiquette de langue étrangère devrait être remplacée par une étiquette de langue maternelle, ce qui indique un énorme potentiel d'amélioration des systèmes d'identification automatique de la langue.", 'ja': '本稿では、ソーシャルメディアからの信号に基づいて、借用されている単語の可能性を識別するための一連の計算方法を提示する。Spearmanの相関値では、我々の方法は、文献で報告されている最も優れたパフォーマンスのベースライン（≒ 0.26 ）と比較して、借用の可能性を予測するのに2倍以上優れています（≒ 0.62 ）。この尤度推定に基づいて、私たちは注釈者に主にネイティブの文脈で外国語の言語タグを再注釈するように依頼しました。注釈者の88 ％は、外国語タグを母語タグに置き換えるべきだと感じたため、自動言語識別システムの改善の余地が大きいことを示しています。', 'zh': '于本文中,设组算法,以识借单词之单词。 斯皮尔曼之相关,与文献之最善者基线(∼0.26),吾道倍于占借可用之表(∼0.62)。 此可能度,要注者于大母语上下文中重注外来单词语。 在88%例中,注者以为外语签当为母语所代,明自语言识别系统大改空间也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम सोशल मीडिया से संकेतों के आधार पर उधार लिए जा रहे शब्द की समानता की पहचान करने के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल तरीकों का एक सेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं। स्पीयरमैन के सहसंबंध मूल्यों के संदर्भ में, हमारे तरीके साहित्य में रिपोर्ट किए गए सर्वोत्तम प्रदर्शन बेसलाइन (~ 0.26) की तुलना में उधार लेने की समानता की भविष्यवाणी करने में दो गुना से अधिक बेहतर (~ 0.62) प्रदर्शन करते हैं। इस समानता अनुमान के आधार पर हमने एनोटेटरों से मुख्य रूप से देशी संदर्भों में विदेशी शब्दों के भाषा टैग को फिर से एनोटेट करने के लिए कहा। 88% मामलों में एनोटेटरों ने महसूस किया कि विदेशी भाषा टैग को मूल भाषा टैग द्वारा प्रतिस्थापित किया जाना चाहिए, इस प्रकार स्वचालित भाषा पहचान प्रणालियों में सुधार के लिए एक बड़ी गुंजाइश का संकेत मिलता है।', 'ru': 'в этой статье мы представляем набор вычислительных методов для определения вероятности заимствования слова на основе сигналов из социальных сетей. Что касается значений корреляции Спирмена, наши методы работают более чем в два раза лучше (0,62 фунта стерлингов) в прогнозировании вероятности заимствования по сравнению с наилучшим базовым уровнем (0,26 фунта стерлингов), описанным в литературе. На основе этой оценки вероятности мы попросили аннотаторов повторно аннотировать языковые теги иностранных слов в преимущественно нативных контекстах. В 88% случаев аннотаторы считали, что тег иностранного языка должен быть заменен тегом родного языка, что указывает на огромные возможности для улучшения автоматических систем идентификации языка.', 'ga': 'n an páipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair sraith de mhodhanna ríomhaireachtúla chun an chosúlacht a bhaineann le focal a fháil ar iasacht a aithint, bunaithe ar na comharthaí ó na meáin shóisialta. I dtéarmaí luachanna comhghaolaithe Spearman, éiríonn lenár modhanna níos mó ná dhá uair níos fearr (∼ 0.62) chun cosúlacht na hiasachta a thuar i gcomparáid leis an mbunlíne is fearr feidhmíochta (∼ 0.26) a tuairiscíodh sa litríocht. Bunaithe ar an meastachán cosúlachta seo d’iarramar ar anótálaithe clibeanna teanga na bhfocal iasachta a athanótáil i gcomhthéacsanna dúchais den chuid is mó. In 88% de na cásanna bhraith na anótóirí gur cheart an chlib teanga dhúchais a chur in ionad na clibeanna teanga iasachta, rud a léirigh scóip ollmhór chun córais uathaitheanta teanga a fheabhsú.', 'ka': 'n ამ გვერდის, ჩვენ კომპუტაციალური მეტირების რაოდენობა, რომელიც საშუალური მედიაში დავწყებული სიტყვების შესაბამისება. სპერმანის კორელაციის მნიშვნელობების შესახებ, ჩვენი მეტოვები ორჯერ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო ამ შესაბამისი შესაბამისი განსაზღვრებაზე, ჩვენ მოთხოვრებით ანტოტოტორიები, რომ განსხვავებული სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შე 88% წლის შემთხვევაში, ანტოტორიები იფიქრობენ, რომ გარეშე ენის ნიშანი უნდა დაცვლა დედაქალური ენის ნიშანის ნიშანით, რადგან აჩვენებენ დიდი სივრცე ავტომატური ენის ინდიდინტიფი', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban számítástechnikai módszereket mutatunk be a kölcsönvett szó valószínűségének azonosítására, a közösségi média jelei alapján. A Spearman korrelációs értékei tekintetében módszereink több mint kétszer jobban teljesítenek ( 0,62) a hitelfelvételi valószínűség előrejelzésében a legjobb teljesítményű kiindulási értékhez képest ( 0,26). Ezen valószínűségi becslés alapján megkértük a kommentátorokat, hogy túlnyomórészt anyanyelvi kontextusokban tegyék újra az idegen szavak nyelvi címkéit. Az esetek 88%-ában a megjegyzők úgy érezték, hogy az idegen nyelvű címkét anyanyelvű címkével kell helyettesíteni, ami óriási lehetőséget jelent az automatikus nyelvazonosító rendszerek fejlesztésére.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύνολο υπολογιστικών μεθόδων για τον προσδιορισμό της πιθανότητας δανεισμού μιας λέξης, με βάση τα σήματα από τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Όσον αφορά τις τιμές συσχέτισης του Σπίαρμαν, οι μέθοδοι μας αποδίδουν περισσότερο από δύο φορές καλύτερες(0.62) στην πρόβλεψη της πιθανότητας δανεισμού σε σύγκριση με την καλύτερη απόδοση βάσης αναφοράς που αναφέρεται στη βιβλιογραφία. Με βάση αυτή την εκτίμηση της πιθανότητας ζητήσαμε από τους σχολιαστές να ξανασχολιάσουν τις γλωσσικές ετικέτες ξένων λέξεων σε κυρίως εγγενή πλαίσια. Σε 88% των περιπτώσεων οι σχολιαστές θεώρησαν ότι η ετικέτα ξένης γλώσσας πρέπει να αντικατασταθεί από ετικέτα μητρικής γλώσσας, υποδεικνύοντας έτσι ένα τεράστιο πεδίο βελτίωσης των συστημάτων αυτόματης αναγνώρισης γλωσσών.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме сет компјутерски методи за идентификување на веројатноста на позајмување на збор, базиран на сигналите од социјалните медиуми. Во поглед на корелациските вредности на Спирман, нашите методи изведуваат повеќе од двапати подобро (  0,62) во предвидувањето на веројатноста на позајмување во споредба со најдобрата резултатна основа (  0,26) објавена во литературата. На основа на оваа проценка на веројатноста побаравме од анотаторите повторно да ги анотираат јазичните ознаки на странски зборови во претежно родни контексти. Во 88 отсто од случаите анотаторите сметаа дека ознаката на странски јазик треба да биде заменета со ознаката на родниот јазик, што покажува огромна можност за подобрување на системите за автоматска идентификација на јазикот.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo una serie di metodi computazionali per identificare la probabilità di una parola presa in prestito, sulla base dei segnali provenienti dai social media. In termini di valori di correlazione di Spearman, i nostri metodi funzionano più di due volte meglio ( 0,62) nella previsione della probabilità di indebitamento rispetto al basale più performante ( 0,26) riportato in letteratura. Sulla base di questa stima di probabilità abbiamo chiesto agli annotatori di ri-annotare i tag linguistici delle parole straniere in contesti prevalentemente nativi. Nell'88% dei casi gli annotatori hanno ritenuto che il tag in lingua straniera dovesse essere sostituito da tag in lingua madre, indicando così un enorme margine di miglioramento dei sistemi di identificazione automatica delle lingue.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiame skaičiavimo metodų rinkinį, skirtą nustatyti, ar galima pasiskolinti žodį, remiantis socialinių žiniasklaidos signalais. Kalbant apie Spearmano koreliacijos vertes, mūs ų metodai atlieka daugiau kaip du kartus geriau ( 0,62) prognozuojant skolinimosi tikimybę, palyginti su geriausiai veiksminga bazine verte ( 0,26), nurodyta literatūroje. Remiantis šiuo tikimybės įvertinimu, paprašėme anotatorių iš naujo anotuoti užsienio žodžių kalbinius ženklus daugiausia gimtose aplinkybėse. 88 % atvejų anotatoriai laikėsi nuomonės, kad užsienio kalbos ženklas turėtų būti pakeistas gimtąja kalba ženklu, taip parodant didelę galimybę patobulinti automatinės kalbos identifikavimo sistemas.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз, әлемдік медиақтардың сигналдарына негізделген сөздің ықтималдығын анықтау үшін компьютерлік әдістерін таңдаймыз. Спеармандың кореляциялық мәндерінің қасиетінде, әдістеріміз литературадағы ең жақсы жұмыс жолымен салыстыру үшін екі рет артық (0, 62) жұмыс істейді. Бұл ықтималдық бағалауына негізделген біз жазбалардың тіл тегтерін қайта белгілеуін сұрадық. 88% жаңалықтарда ағылшын тілдер тегті негізгі тілдер тегті арқылы алмастыру керек деп ойлады, сондықтан автоматты тілдер идентификациялау жүйелерін жақсарту үшін үлкен маңызды маңызды болад', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടികൂട്ടിയ കണക്കാണിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. സോഷ്യല്\u200d മേധ്യയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സ സ്പെയ്മാന്റെ ബന്ധപൂര്\u200dണ്ണവിലയ്ക്കുള്ള വിലയ്ക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ളില്\u200d, സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്ത ഏറ്റവും നല്ല അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതികള്\u200d രണ്ടു  Based on this likeliness estimate we asked annotators to re-annotate the language tags of foreign words in predominantly native contexts.  88% കേസുകളില്\u200d വിദേശ ഭാഷയുടെ ടാഗ് മാറ്റേണ്ടതാണെന്ന് അറിയിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d തോന്നിയപ്പോള്\u200d സ്വയം ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം മെച്ചപ്പ', 'ms': 'n kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan set kaedah pengiraan untuk mengenalpasti kemungkinan perkataan yang dipinjam, berdasarkan isyarat dari media sosial. Dalam terma nilai korelasi Spearman, kaedah kita melaksanakan lebih dari dua kali lebih baik (  0.62) dalam meramalkan kemungkinan pinjaman dibandingkan dengan dasar yang paling baik (  0.26) dilaporkan dalam literatur. Berdasarkan anggaran kemungkinan ini, kami minta pengannotor untuk anotasi semula tag bahasa perkataan asing dalam konteks terutama asli. Dalam 88% kes annotator merasa bahawa tag bahasa asing patut diganti dengan tag bahasa asli, sehingga menunjukkan skop besar untuk peningkatan sistem pengenalpasti bahasa automatik.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw sett ta’ metodi komputattivi biex nidentifikaw il-probabbiltà ta’ kelma li tintalab, abbażi tas-sinjali mill-midja soċjali. F’termini tal-valuri ta’ korrelazzjoni ta’ Spearman, il-metodi tagħna jwettqu aktar minn darbtejn aħjar (  0.62) fit-tbassir tal-probabbiltà tas-self meta mqabbel mal-linja bażi bl-aħjar prestazzjoni (  0.26) irrappurtata fil-letteratura. Abbażi ta’ din l-istima tal-probabbiltà talbna lill-annotaturi biex janataw mill-ġdid it-tikketti lingwistiċi ta’ kliem barrani f’kuntesti primarjament nattivi. F’88 % tal-każijiet l-annotaturi ħassew li t-tikketta tal-lingwa barranija għandha tiġi sostitwita bit-tikketta tal-lingwa nattiva, u b’hekk jindikaw ambitu enormi għat-titjib tas-sistemi ta’ identifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-lingwa.', 'no': 'i denne papiret presenterer vi eit sett datamaskinemetodar for å identifisera sannsynligheten på eit ord som er lånt, basert på signalene frå sosiale media. I tillegg til korrelasjonsverdiane til Spearman utfører metodane våre meir enn to ganger bedre (« 0, 62 ») i forhåndsvising av långslikenheten sammenlignet med den beste utføringslinja (« 0, 26 ») som er rapportert i litteratur. Basert på denne sannsynlighetsstasjonen, me spurte merknader om å merke på nytt språk merknaden til eksterne ord i hovudsakelig lokale kontekstar. I 88% av tilfellene følte merknadene at den fremde språk-merkelappen skal bytast ut med den motspråk-merkelappen, slik at det viser ein stor område for forbetring av automatiske språk-identifikasjonssystemet.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy zestaw metod obliczeniowych służących identyfikacji prawdopodobieństwa wypożyczania słowa na podstawie sygnałów z mediów społecznościowych. Pod względem wartości korelacji Spearmana, nasze metody działają ponad dwa razy lepiej.(0.62) w przewidywaniu prawdopodobieństwa zaciągania kredytów w porównaniu z najlepszą wyniką bazową opisaną w literaturze. Na podstawie tego oszacowania prawdopodobieństwa poprosiliśmy adnotatorów o ponowne adnotacje znaczników językowych słów obcych w głównie natywnych kontekstach. W 88% przypadków adnotatorzy uznali, że znacznik języka obcego powinien zostać zastąpiony znacznikiem języka ojczystego, wskazując tym samym na ogromne możliwości ulepszenia systemów automatycznej identyfikacji języka.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un set de metode computaționale pentru identificarea probabilității unui cuvânt împrumutat, pe baza semnalelor de pe social media. În ceea ce privește valorile corelației Spearman, metodele noastre performează de mai mult de două ori mai bine ( 0,62) în previziunea probabilității de împrumut comparativ cu valorile de referință cele mai performante ( 0,26) raportate în literatura de specialitate. Pe baza acestei estimări de probabilitate am cerut adnotatorilor să re-adnoteze etichetele lingvistice ale cuvintelor străine în contexte predominant native. În 88% din cazuri adnotatorii au considerat că eticheta de limbă străină ar trebui înlocuită cu eticheta de limbă maternă, ceea ce indică o mare posibilitate de îmbunătățire a sistemelor automate de identificare a limbilor.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид нийгмийн мэдээллийн сигналуудын үндсэн хэмжээний тооцооллын аргыг тодорхойлдог. Спеарманын холбоотой утгын хувьд бидний арга нь уран зохиолын хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэх суурь шулуунтай харьцуулахад хоёр дахин илүү (0.62) илүү дээр хийдэг. Энэ бага зэрэг тооцоололтой байдалд бид хүмүүст гадаад үгийн тэмдэгүүдийг ихэвчлэн орон нутгийн нөхцөлд дахин анзааруулахыг хүссэн. 88% нь гадаад хэлний тэмдэглэгчид ээж хэлний тэмдэглэгчид өөрчлөх ёстой гэж боддог. Иймээс автоматик хэлний тодорхойлолтын системийн сайжруулах маш том талаар харуулж байна.', 'sr': 'u ovom papiru predstavljamo niz računalnih metoda da identifikujemo verovatnost pozajmljene reči, n a osnovu signala društvenih medija. S obzirom na korelacijske vrijednosti Spearmana, naše metode izvršavaju više od dvaput bolje (0,62) u predviđanju vjerojatnosti pozajmljivanja u usporedbi sa najboljom izvodnjom početnoj liniji ( 0,26) prijavljenom u literaturi. Na osnovu ove verovatne procjene, tražili smo annotatore da ponovo annotiraju jezičke etikete stranih re či u uglavnom domaćim kontekstima. U 88% slučajeva annotatori su smatrali da je oznake stranog jezika trebalo zamijeniti oznakem jezika, što ukazuje na ogromnu opciju za poboljšanje automatskih jezika identifikacijskih sustava.', 'so': "warqaddan, waxaan keenaynaa qaabab xisaab ah si a a n u aqoonsanno noocyada hadalka la amaaheyo oo ku saleysan sawirada mitandada bulshada. Qiimaha xiriirka ee Spearman, qaababkayagu waxay sameeyaan wax ka badan labo jeer oo ka wanaagsan ('0.62) si ay wax amaahdaas u sheegto, iyadoo la barbarbaro qoraalka ugu wanaagsan oo la qoray qoraalka qoraalka. Sida lagu saleyn karo noocyada, waxaynu weyddiinnay kuwa wax dhibta ah inay mar kale ku cusboonaysiiyaan alaabta afka dibadda ee ku qoran xaaladaha hooyo. In 88% of cases the annotators felt that the foreign language tag should be replaced by native language tag, thus indicating a huge scope for improvement of automatic language identification systems.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en uppsättning beräkningsmetoder för att identifiera sannolikheten för att ett ord lånas, baserat på signaler från sociala medier. När det gäller Spearmans korrelationsvärden presterar våra metoder mer än två gånger bättre ( 0,62) när det gäller att förutsäga lånessannolikheten jämfört med den bäst presterande baslinjen ( 0,26) som rapporterats i litteraturen. Baserat på denna sannolikhetsuppskattning bad vi kommentatorer att kommentera språktaggarna för främmande ord i övervägande inhemska sammanhang. I 88% av fallen ansåg kommentatorerna att den främmande språktaggen borde ersättas av modersmålstaggen, vilket tyder på stora möjligheter att förbättra systemen för automatisk språkidentifiering.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි පරිගණනය විධානයක් පෙන්වනවා සමාජික මිඩියාවෙන් සංඥාවක් අඳුරගන්න. ස්පෙර්මාන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ අගය, අපේ විධානය දෙකක් වඩා හොඳයි (  0.62) විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් වැඩියි (  0.62) බේර්මාන්ගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක්  මේ වගේම අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස නිර්මාණය විසින් අපි කිව්වා කියලා ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන විසින් භාෂාවක් ටැග්  88% විදිහට ආරංචිකයෝ දැනගෙන හිතුවා විදිහයි භාෂා ටැග් ස්ථාපනය කරන්න ඕනි කියලා, එහෙම නිසා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාෂා ප', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு கணக்கீட்டு முறைகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், சமூக ஊடகங்களில் இருந்து குறியீடுகளை அடிப்படையில் கடன் சொல் ஸ்பெர்மானின் இணைப்பு மதிப்புகளை குறிப்பிட்டு, நாங்கள் கடன் செய்தல் சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டு அடிப்படை வரிசையில் அறிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது ( 0. 26) முறையில் இரண்டு ம இந்த போன்ற வகைகளின் அடிப்படையில் நாம் வெளிநாட்டு வார்த்தைகளின் மொழிக் குறிகளை மீண்டும் வெளியேற்ற வேண்டும் என்று  88% விஷயங்களில் அறிவிப்பாளர்கள் உணர்ந்தார்கள் நாட்டு மொழி அடையாளம் குறியீடு மாற்றப்பட வேண்டும் என்று, அதனால் தானாகவே மொழி அடையாளம் முறைம', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مجموعہ کمپیوٹریشن طریقے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک لکھی ہوئی لکھی ہوئی بات کی نسبت معلوم کریں، سوسیل میڈیا کے سیگنالوں پر۔ اسپیرمن کی تعلق ارزش کے مطابق، ہمارے طریقے دو بار زیادہ بہتر (0.62) کر رہے ہیں (0.26) قرض لینے کی نسبت قرض لینے کے مطابق بہترین بنسٹلین (0.26) کے مطابق۔ اس احتمال کے مطابق ہم نے اپنا اظہار کرنے والوں سے پوچھا کہ غریب کلمات کی زبان ٹاگٹوں کو دوبارہ اظہار کریں۔ 88% کے مطابق انٹیٹوروں نے سمجھا تھا کہ خارجی زبان کی ٹاگ کو ماں زبان کی ٹاگ سے بدل دینا چاہیے، یہاں تک کہ اپنی زبان کی شناسایی سیسٹموں کی تدبیر کے لئے بہت بڑی سطح دکھائی جاتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy n ày, chúng tôi giới thiệu một loạt các phương pháp tính để xác định sự dễ chịu của một từ bị mượn, dựa trên các tín hiệu từ truyền thông xã hội. Theo những giá trị tương quan của Spearman, chúng ta tiến hành nhiều hơn hai lần tốt hơn (0.62) trong việc dự đoán hòa thuận vay mượn so với cơ s ở thực hiện tốt nhất (0.26) được trình báo trong văn học. Dựa trên khả năng đánh giá này, chúng tôi đã yêu cầu nhà chú thích chép lại các thẻ ngôn ngữ của ngôn ngữ ngoại ngữ ở các địa phương. Các nhà bác sĩ cho rằng thẻ ngôn ngữ ngoại quốc phải được thay thế bằng thẻ ngôn ngữ bẩm sinh, và cho thấy một khả năng lớn để cải tiến hệ thống nhận dạng ngôn ngữ tự động.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz bilan biz jamiyat media signallarining asosida so'zni o'zgartirish uchun bir necha kompyuterni o'rganamiz. Spearman bog'liq qiymatlari qiymatlari bilan, littatatda hisoblangan eng yuqori bajarish asosiy ( 0. 26) bilan bir marta yaxshi ko'proq o'xshash usullarni koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu misollar asosida, biz cheksiz so'zlar tilning taglarini qayta tajriba qilishni talab qildik, eng asosiy native xizmatlarida. 88% roʻyxatida taʼminlovchilar natijasida tilning tagi orqali oʻzgartirishi kerak, shunday qilib, avtomatik tillar identification tizimini oshirish uchun juda katta scope belgilaydi.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we een reeks rekenmethoden om de waarschijnlijkheid van een geleend woord te identificeren, gebaseerd op de signalen van sociale media. In termen van Spearman's correlatiewaarden presteren onze methoden meer dan twee keer beter н0.62) in het voorspellen van de leeningswaarde vergeleken met de best presterende baseline н0.26) gerapporteerd in de literatuur. Op basis van deze waarschijnlijkheidsschatting vroegen we annotators om de taaltags van vreemde woorden in overwegend native contexten opnieuw te annoteren. In 88% van de gevallen waren de annotatoren van mening dat de vreemde taal tag vervangen moet worden door een moedertaal tag, wat een enorme ruimte voor verbetering van automatische taal identificatiesystemen aangeeft.", 'hr': 'u ovom papiru predstavljamo niz računalnih metoda da identificiramo vjerojatnost pozajmljene riječi n a temelju signala društvenih medija. S obzirom na korelacijske vrijednosti Spearmana, naše metode izvršavaju više od dva puta bolje (0,62) u predviđanju vjerojatnosti pozajmljivanja u usporedbi s najboljim izvođačkim početnim linijom ( 0,26) prijavljenim u literaturi. Na temelju ovog procjene vjerojatnosti tražili smo annotatore da ponovno annotiraju jezičke etikete stranih riječi u uglavnom domaćim kontekstima. U 88% slučajeva annotatori smatrali su da je oznake stranog jezika trebalo zamijeniti oznakem jezika, što ukazuje na ogromnu opseg za poboljšanje automatskih sustava identifikacije jezika.', 'bg': 'в настоящата статия представяме набор от изчислителни методи за идентифициране на вероятността дума да бъде заимствана въз основа на сигналите от социалните медии. По отношение на корелационните стойности на Спиърман, нашите методи се представят повече от два пъти по-добре ( 0,62) при предвиждането на вероятността за заемане в сравнение с най-добре представящите се изходни стойности ( 0,26), докладвани в литературата. Въз основа на тази оценка за вероятност помолихме анотаторите да пренастроят езиковите тагове на чужди думи в предимно родни контексти. В 88% от случаите анотаторите смятат, че етикетът на чужд език трябва да бъде заменен с етикет на роден език, което показва огромен обхват за подобряване на системите за автоматична идентификация на езика.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi et sæt beregningsmetoder til at identificere sandsynligheden for et ord, der bliver lånt, baseret på signaler fra sociale medier. Med hensyn til Spearmans korrelationsværdier yder vores metoder mere end to gange bedre ( 0,62) med hensyn til at forudsige lånrisikoen sammenlignet med den bedst præsterende baseline ( 0,26) rapporteret i litteraturen. Baseret på dette estimat af sandsynlighed bad vi kommentatorer om at gentage sprogmærkerne for fremmede ord i overvejende indfødte sammenhænge. I 88% af tilfældene mente kommentatorerne, at fremmedsprogsmærket burde erstattes af modersprogsmærket, hvilket indikerer, at der er store muligheder for forbedring af automatiske sprogidentifikationssystemer.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Reihe von computergestützten Methoden vor, um die Wahrscheinlichkeit eines ausgeliehenen Wortes anhand der Signale aus sozialen Medien zu identifizieren. In Bezug auf Spearmans Korrelationswerte schneiden unsere Methoden bei der Vorhersage der Kreditwahrscheinlichkeit mehr als doppelt so gut wie in der Literatur berichtet. Basierend auf dieser Wahrscheinlichkeitsschätzung haben wir Annotatoren gebeten, die Sprachtags von Fremdwörtern in überwiegend nativen Kontexten neu zu kommentieren. In 88% der Fälle waren die Annotatoren der Auffassung, dass das fremdsprachige Tag durch das muttersprachliche Tag ersetzt werden sollte, was auf einen großen Verbesserungsspielraum für automatische Spracherkennungssysteme hindeutet.', 'sw': 'katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mfululizo wa njia za kompyuta ili kutambua aina ya neno linaloborwa, kwa kutumia ishara kutoka kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Kuhusu thamani za mahusiano ya Spearman, mbinu zetu zinafanya zaidi ya mara mbili bora ((0.62) kwa kutabiri misaada ya deni ikilinganishwa na msingi bora wa kufanya kazi ( &gt; 0.26) ulioandikwa kwa fasihi. Kutokana na namna hii tunakadiria kuwa tuliwaomba wachochezi kuvutiwa tena alama za lugha za maneno ya kigeni katika mashindano ya wenyeji. Katika asilimia 88 ya kesi waandishi walihisi kuwa alama ya lugha ya kigeni ni lazima kubadilishwa kwa alama ya lugha ya asili, kwa hiyo inaonyesha kiwango kikubwa cha kuboresha mfumo wa utambulisho wa lugha za kujitegemea.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 소셜 미디어 신호를 바탕으로 한 계산 방법을 제시하여 단어가 빌려 쓸 가능성을 식별했다.스필만 관련치에 따르면 우리의 방법은 차관 가능성을 예측하는 데 있어서 문헌에서 보고한 가장 좋은 기선(0.26)보다 두 배(0.62)가 낫다.이런 유사도 평가를 토대로 우리는 주석자가 모국어를 위주로 하는 언어 환경에서 외래어의 언어 라벨을 다시 주석하도록 요구한다.88%의 상황에서 주석자들은 외국어 표기가 모국어 표기로 대체되어야 한다고 생각하는데 이것은 자동 언어 식별 시스템에 아직도 많은 개선 공간이 있음을 나타낸다.', 'id': 'n kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan set metode komputasi untuk mengidentifikasi kemungkinan kata yang dipinjam, berdasarkan sinyal dari media sosial. Dalam hal nilai korelasi Spearman, metode kami melakukan lebih dari dua kali lebih baik ( 0,62) dalam memprediksi kemungkinan peminjam dibandingkan dengan dasar yang paling baik ( 0,26) dilaporkan dalam literatur. Berdasarkan perkiraan kemungkinan ini kami meminta annotator untuk menganoterasi ulang tags bahasa kata asing dalam konteks terutama asli. In 88% of cases the annotators felt that the foreign language tag should be replaced by native language tag, thus indicating a huge scope for improvement of automatic language identification systems.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzyň içinde, sosyal medýdanyň signallelerine daýa n ýa n bir söz döredilmesini tanamak üçin bir topar sany hasaplanýan yöntemleri görkeýäris. Spearmanyň korelaciýasynyň mykdarlaryna görä, biziň metodlarymyz edebiýatynda berilen iň gowy hereket eden üýtgeşik(0.62)-dan köp gowy hereket etýär (  0.26). Bu ýaramazlyk ynamyna görä, biz daşary sözlerin etiketlerini owadan metinlerinde täze duýdurmagy soradyk. 88% ýagdaýdaky tägleriň daşary dil tägleriň ene dil tägleri bilen ewez edilmelidigini duýýarlar, şonuň üçin awtomatik diller tanyşdyrma sistemlerini geliştirmek üçin örän uly bölegi görkezýär.', 'af': "n hierdie papier, ons stel 'n stel van rekenaar metodes om die gelykheid van 'n woord te identifiseer, gebaseer op die signale van sosiale media. In terms of Spearman se korrelasie waardes, ons metodes uitvoer meer as twee maal beter ( 0. 62) in die voorskou van die lêer gelykenis vergelyk met die beste uitvoerde basislien (  0. 26) wat in literaat verkondig is. Op hierdie gelykheidsestimatie het ons annotators gevra om die taal etikette van vreemde woorde te herkennis in voordekende natiewe kontekste. In 88% van gevalle het die annotators gevoel dat die vreemde taal etiket deur die taal etiket moet vervang word, sodat dit 'n groot omvang vir verbetering van outomatiese taal identifikasie stelsels aanwys.", 'hy': 'n this paper, we present a set of computational methods to identify the likeliness of a word being borrowed, based on the signals from social media.  Սփիրմանի հաղորդակցման արժեքների առումով մեր մեթոդները ավելի քան երկու անգամ ավելի լավ են աշխատում ( 0.62) փոխառման հավանականության կանխատեսման մեջ, համեմատած գրականության մեջ հայտարարված լավագույն արդյունավետ հիմքի ( 0.26) հետ: Հիմնվելով այս հավանականության գնահատման վրա, մենք խնդրեցինք annoտորներին վերագրել օտար բառերի լեզվի նշանները հիմնականում բնիկ կոնտեքստներում: Նոտորատորների 88 տոկոսի դեպքում կարծում էին, որ օտար լեզվի նշանը պետք է փոխարինվի բնիկ լեզվի նշանով, ինչը ցույց է տալիս մեծ տարբերակ լեզվի ինքնաբացահայտության համակարգերի զարգացման համար:', 'am': 'ከዚህም ገጽ፣ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሚደረገውን የቃልን ምሳሌ ለማረጋገጥ የቁጥጥር ሥርዓቶችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ የSpearman ግንኙነት ዋጋ በሚያሳየው የሁለት እጥፍ የበለጠ (0.62) ሥርዓታችን በጽሕፈት የተዘጋጀውን የበለጠ የጥያቄ መስመር (0.26) በሚያሳየው ብሔራዊ ክፍል በሚያሳየቱ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ ምሳሌ በተመሳሳይ፣ የቋንቋ ቃላትን መግለጫ በመጀመሪያ የአገር ግንኙነት ውስጥ የቋንቋ ቃላትን ለመነስ ጠየቅን፡፡ In 88% of cases the annotators felt that the foreign language tag should be replaced by native language tag, thus indicating a huge scope for improvement of automatic language identification systems.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک مجموعه از روش\u200cهای محاسباتی را برای شناسایی شباهت یک کلمه که قرض گرفته می\u200cشود، بر اساس سیگنال\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. در مورد ارزشهای ارتباطی اسپرمن، روش\u200cهای ما بیشتر از دو بار بهتر (0.62) انجام می\u200cدهند در پیش\u200cبینی احتمال قرض\u200cگیری در مقایسه با بهترین خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cگذاری (0.26) که در ادبیات گزارش شده است. بر اساس این تخمین احتمالی، ما از نویسندگان خواستیم که نقاشی زبان خارجی را دوباره توضیح دهند در بیشترین موقعیت متحدی. در ۸۸ درصد پرونده\u200cها نویسنده\u200cکنندگان احساس کردند که برچسب زبان خارجی باید با برچسب زبان مادری جایگزین شود، بنابراین نشان می\u200cدهد یک منطقه بزرگی برای بهترین سیستم شناسایی زبان\u200cهای خودکار.', 'sq': 'n this paper, we present a set of computational methods to identify the likeliness of a word being borrowed, based on the signals from social media.  Në lidhje me vlerat e korrelacionit të Spearmanit, metodat tona bëjnë më shumë se dy herë më të mira (  0.62) në parashikimin e mundësisë s ë huazimit krahasuar me bazën më të mirë të performimit (  0.26) të raportuar në letërsi. Bazuar në këtë vlerësim të mundësisë i kërkuam anotatorëve të rinotajnë etiketat gjuhësore të fjalëve të huaja në kontekstet kryesisht vendase. Në 88% të rasteve anotatorët ndjenë se etiketa e gjuhës së huaj duhet të zëvendësohet me etiketën e gjuhës natyrore, duke treguar kështu një fushë të madhe për përmirësimin e sistemeve automatike të identifikimit të gjuhës.', 'az': "Bu kağıt, sosyal media sinyallərindən istifadə edilən sözlərin münasibətini tanıtmaq üçün hesap metodların ı göstəririk. Spearman'ın korrelasyon qiymətlərini sayəsində, bizim metodlarımız literaturda müəyyən edilən ən ən yaxşı müəyyən s əhifələri ilə müqayisədə borc olaraq iki dəfə daha yaxşı ( “ 0.62 ”) işlədir. Bu münasibət təcrübələrinə baxmayaraq, əksəriyyətli məsələlərdə yabancı sözlərin dil etiketlərini yenidən bildirmələrini istədik. 88% vəziyyətdə annotatorlar həmçinin dış dil etiketi yerli dil etiketi ilə əvəz edilməlidir və bu səbəbdən otomatik dil tanımlama sistemlərinin düzəltməsi üçün böyük bir məlumat göstərir.", 'bn': "এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের সিগন্যালের ভিত্তিতে নির্ধারণ করে একটি শব্দের মতো চিহ্নিত করার জন্য এক গণনামূলক উপায় উপ In terms of Spearman's correlation values, our methods perform more than two times better (  0.62) in predicting the borrowing likeliness compared to the best performing baseline (  0.26) reported in literature.  এই ধরনের ভিত্তিতে আমরা বিদেশী শব্দের ভাষার ট্যাগ পুনরায় বিরক্ত করার আহ্বান জানিয়েছি। ৮৮% কেসের মধ্যে বিদেশী ভাষার ট্যাগ স্থানীয় ভাষা ট্যাগ দ্বারা প্রতিস্থাপন করা উচিত, যার ফলে স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষা পরিচয় সিস্টেমের উন্নতির জন", 'bs': 'u ovom papiru predstavljamo niz računalnih metoda da identifikujemo vjerojatnost pozajmljene riječi n a temelju signala društvenih medija. S obzirom na korelacijske vrijednosti Spearmana, naše metode izvršavaju više od dvaput bolje (0,62) u predviđanju vjerojatnosti pozajmljivanja u usporedbi sa najboljom izvodnjom početnom linijom ( 0,26) prijavljenom u literaturi. Na temelju ovog procjene vjerojatnosti, tražili smo annotatore da ponovo annotiraju jezičke etikete stranih riječi u uglavnom domaćim kontekstima. U 88% slučajeva annotatori su smatrali da je oznake stranog jezika trebalo zamijeniti oznakem jezika, a to ukazuje na ogromnu opciju poboljšanja automatskih jezika identifikacijskih sustava.', 'ca': "en aquest article, presentem un conjunt de mètodes computacionals per identificar la probabilitat de que una paraula sigui empréstata, basat en els senyals dels mitjans socials. En termes de valors de correlació de Spearman, els nostres mètodes es produeixen més de dos vegades millor ( 0,62) en predir la probabilitat de prendre préstec en comparació amb la basa de millor rendiment ( 0,26) que es rapporta en la literatura. Sobre la base d'aquesta estimació de probabilitat, vam demanar als anotators que tornassin a anotar les etiquetes de llenguatge de paraules estrangeres en contextes predominantement natius. En el 88% dels casos, els anotadors pensaven que l'etiqueta de llenguatge estranger hauria de ser substituïda per etiqueta de llenguatge natiu, indicant així un gran punt de vista per a millorar els sistemes d'identificació automàtica de llenguatge.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame sotsiaalmeedia signaalide põhjal arvutuslikke meetodeid laenatava sõna tõenäosuse tuvastamiseks. Spearmani korrelatsiooniväärtuste põhjal on meie meetodid laenuvõtmise tõenäosuse prognoosimisel rohkem kui kaks korda paremad (0,62) kui kirjanduses kirjeldatud parima tulemusega algväärtused (0,26). Selle tõenäosuse hinnangu põhjal palusime annotatoritel võõrasõnade keelesilte ümber anoteerida valdavalt emakeelses kontekstis. 88% juhtudest leidsid annotaatorid, et võõrkeelse märgise tuleks asendada emakeelse märgisega, mis näitab suurt võimalust automaatse keele identifitseerimise süsteemide täiustamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään joukko laskennallisia menetelmiä lainattavan sanan todennäköisyyden tunnistamiseksi sosiaalisen median signaalien perusteella. Spearmanin korrelaatioarvojen osalta menetelmämme suoriutuvat yli kaksi kertaa paremmin (0,62) lainanottoluvuuden ennustamisessa kuin kirjallisuudessa raportoitu parhaiten suoriutuva lähtötilanne (0,26). Tämän todennäköisyysarvion perusteella pyysimme selittäjiä kirjoittamaan vierasten sanojen kielitunnisteet uudelleen pääasiassa äidinkielen kontekstissa. 88 prosentissa tapauksista selittäjät katsoivat, että vieraskielinen tunniste olisi korvattava äidinkielen tunnisteella, mikä osoittaa, että automaattisten kielten tunnistusjärjestelmien parantamisen mahdollisuudet ovat valtavat.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme soubor výpočetních metod pro identifikaci pravděpodobnosti vypůjčeného slova na základě signálů ze sociálních médií. Pokud jde o Spearmanovy korelační hodnoty, naše metody mají více než dvakrát lepší výkonnost.(0,62) při predikci pravděpodobnosti půjček ve srovnání s nejlepším výkonným výchozím výchozím bodem popsaným v literatuře. Na základě tohoto odhadu pravděpodobnosti jsme požádali anotátory, aby znovu anotovali jazykové značky cizích slov v převážně nativních kontextech. V 88% případů se anotátoři domnívali, že značka cizího jazyka by měla být nahrazena značkou rodného jazyka, což naznačuje obrovský prostor pro zlepšení systémů automatické identifikace jazyka.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo niz računalniških metod za prepoznavanje verjetnosti izposojene besede na podlagi signalov iz družbenih medijev. V smislu Spearmanovih korelacijskih vrednosti so naše metode pri napovedovanju verjetnosti izposojanja več kot dvakrat boljše ( 0,62) v primerjavi z najbolj uspešno izhodiščno vrednostjo ( 0,26), poročano v literaturi. Na podlagi te ocene verjetnosti smo zaprosili opozorilce, naj ponovno označijo jezikovne oznake tujih besed v pretežno maternih kontekstih. V 88% primerov so opozorili, da je treba oznako tujega jezika nadomestiti z oznako maternega jezika, kar kaže na veliko možnosti za izboljšanje sistemov avtomatske identifikacije jezika.', 'ha': "kan wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wasu hanyõyi n a lissafa ko misãlan maganar a yi ɗaukar da shi, a kan da misalin ayuka daga mitandai na jamii. Babu masu inganci na Spearman, hanyoyinmu za'a samar da shi sau biyu mafi alhẽri ('0.63) a kan basĩri da misãlai na ƙari da aka yi fasahan littafan (0.26). Basan da wannan misãlan na kamata, ba mu tambayi masu taƙaita wa sunayen harsunan na baka cikin muhimman mataimaka. Dakata 88% daga kassala, mai taƙaita sun yi zaton a canza tagon harshen na'ura da za'a musanya shi da tagon harshen na native, don haka yana nuna wani matsayi mai girma wa improve tsarin shaidar na'ura farat ɗaya.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים קבוצה של שיטות חישובים לזהות את סבירות של מילה שנשאלה, מבוססת על האות ממדיה חברתית. In terms of Spearman's correlation values, our methods perform more than two times better (  0.62) in predicting the borrowing likeliness compared to the best performing baseline (  0.26) reported in literature.  Based on this likeliness estimate we asked annotators to re-annotate the language tags of foreign words in predominantly native contexts.  ב-88 אחוז מהמקרים, המכתבים חשו שהתווית לשפה זרה צריכה להחליף על ידי תווית שפה מקומית, כך מצביע על אפשרות עצומה לשיפור של מערכות זיהוי שפה אוטומטיות.", 'jv': 'n kuwi iki, awake nambah sistem sing sampeyan karo perusahaan sampeyan kanggo ngilanggar alih sing nganggo gambaran, dadi sing sabên seneng nggambar barang komunisi. Alpha Balita kanggo kowé nggunakake iki dadi we ngubah tarjamahan kanggo ngubah ujaran langkung pawaran etiket karo pawaran mbuh sing dumadhi. Ato', 'bo': "འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག In terms of Spearman's correlation values, our methods perform more than two times better (  0.62) in predicting the borrowing likeliness compared to the best performing baseline (  0.26)reported in literature. ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྣམས་གྲངས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་གཞི་ཡིན་པས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག སྐབས་བརྗོད་མཁན་88% ནང་དུ་ཕྱི་ཡིག"}
{'en': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'ar': 'تضمين ميزة المستخدم متعدد العرض غير الخاضع للإشراف للتنبؤ باستخدام المواد المستندة إلى الوسائط الاجتماعية', 'fr': 'Intégration de fonctionnalités utilisateur non supervisées multi-vues pour la prédiction de la consommation de substances basée sur les réseaux sociaux', 'pt': 'Incorporação de recursos de usuário não supervisionado de várias visualizações para previsão de uso de substâncias com base em mídia social', 'es': 'Incorporación de funciones de usuario no supervisado de múltiples vistas para la predicción del consumo de sustancias basada en redes sociales', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアベースの物質使用予測のためのマルチビューの監視されていないユーザー機能の埋め込み', 'zh': '用于社交媒体物用占者多视图无监督用户特徵嵌之', 'hi': 'मल्टी-व्यू असुरक्षित उपयोगकर्ता सुविधा एम्बेडिंग के लिए सामाजिक मीडिया-आधारित पदार्थ उपयोग भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Встраивание неконтролируемых пользовательских функций в нескольких проекциях для прогнозирования употребления психоактивных веществ на основе социальных сетей', 'ga': 'Leabú Gné Úsáideora Neamhmhaoirsithe Il-Amharc le haghaidh Réamh-mheastacháin Úsáide Substaintí Bunaithe ar na Meáin Shóisialta', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაზე გადაყენებული მომხმარებელი ფექტურის გარეშე', 'hu': 'Többnézet felügyelet nélküli felhasználói funkciók beágyazása a közösségi média alapú anyaghasználat előrejelzéséhez', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση χαρακτηριστικών χρήστη χωρίς επιτήρηση πολλαπλών προβολών για πρόβλεψη χρήσης ουσιών με βάση τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'kk': 'Жалпы медиаға негізделген нысандарды қолдану үшін көп- көрініс қолданбаған пайдаланушының қасиеттерін ендіру', 'it': "Embedding di funzionalità utente non supervisionate multi-view per la previsione dell'uso di sostanze basate sui social media", 'mk': 'Предвид за користење на супстанции базирани на социјалните медиуми', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Karakteristik Pengguna Tak Disupervisi Berberbilang-Papar untuk Prediksi Penggunaan Susunan Berasas Media Sosial', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വിഷയത്തിനുള്ള ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വിശിഷ്ടമുള്ള എംബെഡിങ്ങ് ഉപയോഗ', 'mt': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн суурь суурь зүйлсийн хэрэглэгчдийн олон-харуулах боломжгүй хэрэглэгчдийн хөрөнгө оруулалт', 'no': 'Innebygd for ulike visingsfunksjonar for sosiale mediabaserte substantar Bruk forhåndsvising', 'pl': 'Wielofunkcyjne wbudowanie funkcji użytkownika nienadzorowanych dla prognozowania użytkowania substancji opartych na mediach społecznościowych', 'ro': 'Încorporarea caracteristicilor de utilizator nesupravegheate pentru predicția utilizării substanțelor bazate pe rețelele sociale', 'si': 'සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමය අධාරිත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න', 'sr': 'Višestruki pogled neodređene korisničke funkcije uključene za predviđenje upotrebe supstanci na društvenim medijima', 'so': 'Isticmaal Prediction', 'sv': 'Inbäddning av icke övervakad användarfunktion för sociala medier-baserad substansanvändning', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகத்தின் சார்ந்த பொருள்', 'ur': 'Multi View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'lt': 'Daugiažiūris neįžiūrimas naudotojo savybės įterpimas į socialinės žiniasklaidos medžiagų naudojimo prognozę', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ xâm phạm đa khung xem Nhúng vào sản phẩm chứa phương tiện chủ nghĩa xã hội', 'bg': 'Вградяване на потребителски функции с множество изгледи без надзор за прогнозиране на употребата на вещества в социалните медии', 'hr': 'Višestruki pogled neodređene korisničke funkcije uključene za predviđenje uporabe supstanci na društvenim medijima', 'da': 'Multi-View Uservated User Feature Embedding for Social Media-baseret stofbrug Forudsigelse', 'nl': 'Multi-View Onbewaakte gebruikersfunctie Embedden voor op sociale media gebaseerde voorspelling van het gebruik van stoffen', 'de': 'Einbettung von nicht überwachten Multi-View-Benutzerfunktionen für die Vorhersage der Substanznutzung in sozialen Medien', 'id': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'ko': '소셜 미디어의 물질 사용 예측을 바탕으로 하는 다시도 무감독 사용자 특징 삽입', 'fa': 'ویژه\u200cهای کاربر بسیاری از نمایش\u200cهای زیادی برای استفاده از پیش\u200cبینی مواد رسانه اجتماعی', 'sw': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'af': 'Veelvuldige Besigtig Ononderhouerde Gebruiker Funksie Inbêer vir Sosiale Media-gebaseerde Substance Gebruik Voorskou', 'tr': "Sosial Media'da Mazmunlar Ga첵d Etmek 체챌in K철p-G철rn철힊 Mazmunlar Etilmeleri", 'hy': 'Բազմատեսված օգտագործողի առանձնահատուկ հատկությունը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հիմնված նյութի օգտագործման կանխատեսման համար', 'sq': 'Përmbajtja e Përdoruesit të Pambikqyrur me Shumë Shfaqje për parashikimin e përdorimit të Substancës bazuar në Media Social', 'am': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'bn': 'সামাজিক মিডিয়া ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তু ব্যবহার করার জন্য অন্যান্য-ভিউ অনলাইন করা ব্যবহারকারীর বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার', 'az': 'Sosyal Mediya-tabanlı Üstünlük Qullanıcı Özünün Üstünlüyü Cənnətlə Görüş', 'bs': 'Višestruki pogled neodređene korisničke funkcije uključene za predviđenje uporabe supstanci na društvenim medijima', 'ca': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media Based Substance Use Prediction', 'cs': 'Vkládání uživatelských funkcí s vícezobrazením pro predikci použití látek založené na sociálních médiích', 'et': 'Mitme vaate järelevalveta kasutajafunktsioonide manustamine sotsiaalmeediapõhise ainete kasutamise prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'User-View valvomattoman käyttäjäominaisuuden upotus sosiaaliseen mediaan perustuvan päihteiden käytön ennuste', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'Multi-View Unsupervised User Feature Embedding for Social Media-based Substance Use Prediction', 'sk': 'Vgradnja nenadzorovanih uporabniških funkcij z več pogledi za napoved uporabe snovi na podlagi družbenih omrežij', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལྟ་སྟངས་སུ་ཉར་མེད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཆོས་ཁོངས་བསྡུས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we demonstrate how the state-of-the-art machine learning and text mining techniques can be used to build effective social media-based substance use detection systems. Since a substance use ground truth is difficult to obtain on a large scale, to maximize system performance, we explore different unsupervised feature learning methods to take advantage of a large amount of unsupervised social media data. We also demonstrate the benefit of using multi-view unsupervised feature learning to combine heterogeneous user information such as Facebook likes and status updates to enhance system performance. Based on our evaluation, our best models achieved 86 % AUC for predicting tobacco use, 81 % for alcohol use and 84 % for illicit drug use, all of which significantly outperformed existing methods. Our investigation has also uncovered interesting relations between a user’s social media behavior (e.g., word usage) and substance use.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نوضح كيف يمكن استخدام أحدث تقنيات التعلم الآلي والتعدين النصي لبناء أنظمة فعالة قائمة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي للكشف عن استخدام المواد. نظرًا لأنه من الصعب الحصول على الحقيقة الأساسية لاستخدام المواد المخدرة على نطاق واسع ، لزيادة أداء النظام إلى أقصى حد ، فإننا نستكشف طرقًا مختلفة لتعلم الميزات غير الخاضعة للإشراف للاستفادة من كمية كبيرة من بيانات الوسائط الاجتماعية غير الخاضعة للإشراف. نوضح أيضًا فائدة استخدام ميزة التعلم متعدد العروض غير الخاضعة للإشراف للجمع بين معلومات المستخدم غير المتجانسة مثل "إبداءات الإعجاب" على Facebook و "تحديثات الحالة" لتحسين أداء النظام. بناءً على تقييمنا ، حققت أفضل النماذج لدينا 86٪ AUC للتنبؤ بتعاطي التبغ ، و 81٪ لتعاطي الكحول و 84٪ لتعاطي المخدرات غير المشروع ، وكلها تفوقت بشكل كبير على الأساليب الحالية. كشف تحقيقنا أيضًا عن علاقات مثيرة للاهتمام بين سلوك المستخدم على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (على سبيل المثال ، استخدام الكلمات) وتعاطي المخدرات.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous montrons comment les techniques d'apprentissage automatique et d'exploration de texte de pointe peuvent être utilisées pour créer des systèmes efficaces de détection de la consommation de substances sur les réseaux sociaux. Étant donné qu'une vérité de base sur la consommation de substances est difficile à obtenir à grande échelle, afin de maximiser les performances du système, nous explorons différentes méthodes d'apprentissage des fonctionnalités non supervisées afin de tirer parti d'une grande quantité de données non supervisées sur les réseaux sociaux. Nous démontrons également l'avantage de l'utilisation de l'apprentissage des fonctionnalités multi-vues non supervisé pour combiner des informations utilisateur hétérogènes telles que les «\xa0J'aime\xa0» de Facebook et les «\xa0mises à jour de statut\xa0» afin d'améliorer les performances du système. Sur la base de notre évaluation, nos meilleurs modèles ont obtenu une ASC de 86\xa0% pour la prévision de la consommation de tabac, 81\xa0% pour la consommation d'alcool et 84\xa0% pour la consommation de drogues illicites, ce qui représente tous des résultats nettement supérieurs aux méthodes existantes. Notre enquête a également révélé des relations intéressantes entre le comportement d'un utilisateur sur les réseaux sociaux (par exemple, l'utilisation de mots) et la consommation de substances.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, demonstramos como as técnicas de aprendizado de máquina e mineração de texto de última geração podem ser usadas para construir sistemas eficazes de detecção de uso de substâncias baseados em mídia social. Como é difícil obter uma verdade básica do uso de substâncias em grande escala, para maximizar o desempenho do sistema, exploramos diferentes métodos de aprendizado de recursos não supervisionados para aproveitar uma grande quantidade de dados de mídia social não supervisionados. Também demonstramos o benefício de usar o aprendizado de recursos não supervisionados de várias visualizações para combinar informações heterogêneas do usuário, como “curtidas” e “atualizações de status” do Facebook para melhorar o desempenho do sistema. Com base em nossa avaliação, nossos melhores modelos alcançaram 86% de AUC para prever o uso de tabaco, 81% para uso de álcool e 84% para uso de drogas ilícitas, todos os quais superaram significativamente os métodos existentes. Nossa investigação também descobriu relações interessantes entre o comportamento de mídia social de um usuário (por exemplo, uso de palavras) e uso de substâncias.', 'es': 'En este artículo, demostramos cómo se pueden utilizar las técnicas de vanguardia de aprendizaje automático y minería de textos para crear sistemas eficaces de detección del uso de sustancias basados en las redes sociales. Dado que es difícil obtener información sobre el uso de sustancias a gran escala, para maximizar el rendimiento del sistema, exploramos diferentes métodos de aprendizaje de funciones sin supervisión para aprovechar una gran cantidad de datos de redes sociales no supervisados. También demostramos el beneficio de usar el aprendizaje de funciones multivista no supervisado para combinar información heterogénea de los usuarios, como «me gusta» y «actualizaciones de estado» de Facebook para mejorar el rendimiento del sistema. Según nuestra evaluación, nuestros mejores modelos alcanzaron un 86% de AUC para predecir el consumo de tabaco, un 81% para el consumo de alcohol y un 84% para el consumo de drogas ilícitas, todos los cuales superaron significativamente los métodos existentes. Nuestra investigación también ha revelado relaciones interesantes entre el comportamiento de un usuario en las redes sociales (por ejemplo, el uso de palabras) y el uso de sustancias.', 'ja': '本稿では、最先端の機械学習とテキストマイニング技術を使用して、効果的なソーシャルメディアベースの物質使用検出システムを構築する方法を示します。物質を使用したグラウンドの真実は大規模には得にくいため、システムのパフォーマンスを最大限に高めるために、監督されていないソーシャルメディアデータを大量に活用するための異なる監督されていない特徴学習方法を探求します。また、マルチビューの監視されていない機能学習を使用して、Facebookの「いいね」や「ステータス更新」などの異種ユーザー情報を組み合わせてシステムパフォーマンスを向上させる利点も示しています。当社の評価に基づき、当社のベストモデルは、タバコの使用を予測するための86 ％のAUC、アルコール使用のための81 ％、違法薬物使用のための84 ％を達成し、すべてが既存の方法を大幅に上回っています。当社の調査では、ユーザーのソーシャルメディアの行動（例えば、単語の使用）と物質の使用との間の興味深い関係も発見されました。', 'zh': '于本文中,展最先进机器学文掘术,以立效于社交媒体物。 物用本难大得,所以大修统性,求其不同者,以利用无监社交媒体数也。 示用多视图无监学以合异构用户息(如Facebook"好"、"状新")以崇其善。 以吾评估,吾之至法,烟草之86%AUC,酒精用之至81%,非法之药用至84%,凡此皆明优于今也。 察用户之社交媒体行(如,单词用)物之有趣也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि कैसे अत्याधुनिक मशीन लर्निंग और टेक्स्ट माइनिंग तकनीकों का उपयोग प्रभावी सोशल मीडिया-आधारित पदार्थ उपयोग का पता लगाने की प्रणाली बनाने के लिए किया जा सकता है। चूंकि एक पदार्थ का उपयोग जमीनी सच्चाई बड़े पैमाने पर प्राप्त करना मुश्किल है, सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन को अधिकतम करने के लिए, हम बड़ी मात्रा में असुरक्षित सोशल मीडिया डेटा का लाभ उठाने के लिए विभिन्न असुरक्षित सुविधा सीखने के तरीकों का पता लगाते हैं। हम सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन को बढ़ाने के लिए विषम उपयोगकर्ता जानकारी जैसे कि Facebook "पसंद" और "स्थिति अपडेट" को संयोजित करने के लिए बहु-दृश्य असुरक्षित सुविधा सीखने का उपयोग करने के लाभ को भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं। हमारे मूल्यांकन के आधार पर, हमारे सर्वश्रेष्ठ मॉडल ने तंबाकू के उपयोग की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए 86% एयूसी, शराब के उपयोग के लिए 81% और अवैध नशीली दवाओं के उपयोग के लिए 84% हासिल किया, जिनमें से सभी ने मौजूदा तरीकों को काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया। हमारी जांच ने उपयोगकर्ता के सोशल मीडिया व्यवहार (जैसे, शब्द उपयोग) और पदार्थ के उपयोग के बीच दिलचस्प संबंधों को भी उजागर किया है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы демонстрируем, как современные методы машинного обучения и майнинга текстов могут быть использованы для создания эффективных систем обнаружения употребления веществ на основе социальных сетей. Поскольку наземную истину об употреблении психоактивных веществ трудно получить в большом масштабе, чтобы максимизировать производительность системы, мы исследуем различные неконтролируемые методы обучения функциям, чтобы воспользоваться большим количеством неконтролируемых данных в социальных сетях. Мы также демонстрируем преимущество использования многопроекционного неконтролируемого обучения функциям для комбинирования гетерогенной пользовательской информации, такой как «лайки» Facebook и «обновления статуса» для повышения производительности системы. Основываясь на нашей оценке, наши лучшие модели достигли 86% AUC для прогнозирования потребления табака, 81% для употребления алкоголя и 84% для употребления незаконных наркотиков, все из которых значительно превзошли существующие методы. Наше исследование также выявило интересные отношения между поведением пользователя в социальных сетях (например, употребление слов) и употреблением психоактивных веществ.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, léirímid conas is féidir na teicnící foghlama meaisín agus mianadóireachta téacs den scoth a úsáid chun córais braite úsáide substaintí atá bunaithe ar na meáin shóisialta éifeachtacha a thógáil. Ós rud é go bhfuil sé deacair fírinne talún maidir le húsáid substaintí a fháil ar scála mór, chun feidhmíocht an chórais a uasmhéadú, déanaimid iniúchadh ar mhodhanna foghlama gné éagsúla gan mhaoirseacht chun leas a bhaint as líon mór sonraí meán sóisialta gan mhaoirseacht. Léirímid freisin an tairbhe a bhaineann le foghlaim gné ilamhairc gan mhaoirseacht a úsáid chun faisnéis úsáideora ilchineálach a chur le chéile mar “is maith” agus “nuashonruithe stádais” Facebook chun feidhmíocht an chórais a fheabhsú. Bunaithe ar ár meastóireachta, bhain ár múnlaí is fearr amach 86% AUC chun úsáid tobac a thuar, 81% d’úsáid alcóil agus 84% d’úsáid aindleathach drugaí, agus d’fheidhmigh gach ceann acu go suntasach níos fearr ná na modhanna reatha. Nocht ár n-imscrúdú freisin caidreamh suimiúil idir iompar úsáideora ar na meáin shóisialta (m.sh. úsáid focal) agus úsáid substaintí.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε πώς οι προηγμένες τεχνικές μηχανικής μάθησης και εξόρυξης κειμένου μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την κατασκευή αποτελεσματικών συστημάτων ανίχνευσης χρήσης ουσιών στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Δεδομένου ότι μια βασική αλήθεια χρήσης ουσιών είναι δύσκολο να ληφθεί σε μεγάλη κλίμακα, για να μεγιστοποιηθεί η απόδοση του συστήματος, εξερευνούμε διαφορετικές μεθόδους εκμάθησης χωρίς επίβλεψη χαρακτηριστικών για να εκμεταλλευτούμε ένα μεγάλο ποσό χωρίς επίβλεψη δεδομένων κοινωνικών μέσων. Επιδεικνύουμε επίσης το όφελος της χρήσης της εκμάθησης πολλαπλών λειτουργιών χωρίς επίβλεψη για να συνδυάσουμε ετερογενείς πληροφορίες χρηστών όπως "αρέσουν" και "ενημερώσεις κατάστασης" για να βελτιώσουμε την απόδοση του συστήματος. Με βάση την αξιολόγησή μας, τα καλύτερα μοντέλα μας πέτυχαν 86% AUC για την πρόβλεψη της χρήσης καπνού, 81% για τη χρήση αλκοόλ και 84% για την παράνομη χρήση ναρκωτικών, τα οποία όλα ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους. Η έρευνά μας έχει επίσης αποκαλύψει ενδιαφέρουσες σχέσεις μεταξύ της συμπεριφοράς ενός χρήστη στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης (π.χ. χρήση λέξεων) και της χρήσης ουσιών.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk, hogyan lehet a legkorszerűbb gépi tanulási és szövegbányászati technikákat használni hatékony közösségi média alapú anyagfelhasználás detektáló rendszerek kialakítására. Mivel az anyagfelhasználás alapjait nagymértékben nehéz megszerezni, a rendszer teljesítményének maximalizálása érdekében különböző felügyelet nélküli funkciótanulási módszereket vizsgálunk fel, hogy nagy mennyiségű felügyelet nélküli közösségi média adatot használhassunk ki. Bemutatjuk továbbá, hogy milyen előnyös a felügyelet nélküli többnézetes funkciótanulás a heterogén felhasználói információk, mint például a Facebook "tetszik" és "állapotfrissítések" kombinálása a rendszer teljesítményének javítása érdekében. Értékelésünk alapján a legjobb modelleink 86%-os AUC-t értek el a dohányfogyasztás előrejelzésére, 81%-os alkoholfogyasztásra és 84%-os tiltott drogfogyasztásra, amelyek mindegyike jelentősen felülmúlta a meglévő módszereket. Vizsgálatunkban a felhasználó közösségi média viselkedése (pl. szóhasználat) és az anyaghasználat közötti érdekes kapcsolatokat is feltártuk.', 'ka': "ამ წიგში ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, როგორ შეიძლება გამოყენება სოციალური მედიაში გამოყენებული სოციალური მედიაში გამოყენებული სოციალური მედიაში გამოყენებული სოციალური მედიაში გამოყენებული რადგან სამყარო გამოყენება სამყარო სიმართლეში ძალიან რთული იყო, რომ სისტემის გამოყენებას მაქსიმურად გავაკეთოთ, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებული არსხვავებული ფუნქციების სწავლების მეტივები ჩვენ ასევე გამოყენებთ მრავალური ხელსაწყოთა განსხვავებული ფუნქციების გამოყენება, როგორც ჰეტეროგენური მომხმარებელი ინფორმაცია, როგორც Facebook 'მიყვარს' და 'სტატუსის აუდილება ჩვენი განსაზღვრებაზე, ჩვენი ყველაზე საუკეთესო მოდელები 86% AUC გავაკეთეთ, 81% ალკოჰოლური გამოყენებაში და 84% უკეთესო ნაპირების გამოყენებაში, რომლებიც ყველაფერი ძალიან გავაკეთებულია ს ჩვენი განსხვავება ასევე აღმოჩენა ინტერესო შესახებ სოციალური მედია ქცევის (მაგალითად, სიტყვების გამოყენება) და სოციალური გამოყენება.", 'it': 'In questo articolo, mostriamo come le tecniche di machine learning e text mining all\'avanguardia possano essere utilizzate per costruire efficaci sistemi di rilevamento dell\'uso di sostanze basati sui social media. Poiché la verità di base sull\'uso di sostanze è difficile da ottenere su larga scala, per massimizzare le prestazioni del sistema, esploriamo diversi metodi di apprendimento delle funzionalità non supervisionati per sfruttare una grande quantità di dati sui social media non supervisionati. Dimostriamo anche il vantaggio di utilizzare l\'apprendimento non supervisionato di funzionalità multi-view per combinare informazioni eterogenee degli utenti come "mi piace" e "aggiornamenti di stato" di Facebook per migliorare le prestazioni del sistema. Sulla base della nostra valutazione, i nostri migliori modelli hanno raggiunto l\'86% di AUC per la previsione del consumo di tabacco, l\'81% per il consumo di alcol e l\'84% per il consumo di droghe illecite, tutti risultati significativamente superiori ai metodi esistenti. La nostra indagine ha anche scoperto interessanti relazioni tra il comportamento di un utente sui social media (ad esempio, l\'uso di parole) e l\'uso di sostanze.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente parodomi, kaip moderniausi mašinų mokymosi ir tekstų gavybos metodai gali būti naudojami siekiant sukurti veiksmingas socialinės žiniasklaidos medžiagų naudojimo aptikimo sistemas. Kadangi cheminių medžiagų naudojimas yra sunku pasiekti esminę tiesą plačiu mastu, siekiant maksimaliai padidinti sistemos veiksmingumą, mes tiriame skirtingus nepastebimus savybių mokymosi metodus, kad pasinaudotume dideliu nepastebimų socialinių žiniasklaidos duomenų kiekiu. Mes taip pat parodome naudą naudojant daugialypį nepastebimą savybių mokymąsi derinant įvairialypę naudotojų informaciją, pavyzdžiui, Facebook "patinka" ir "statuso atnaujinimą", siekiant pagerinti sistemos veiksmingumą. Remiantis mūsų vertinimu, mūsų geriausi modeliai pasiekė 86 % AUC tabako vartojimui prognozuoti, 81 % alkoholio vartojimui ir 84 % neteisėtam narkotikų vartojimui, kurie visi gerokai viršijo esamus metodus. Mūs ų tyrimas taip pat atskleidė įdomius ryšius tarp vartotojo socialinės žiniasklaidos elgesio (pvz., žodžių naudojimo) ir medžiagų naudojimo.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ние демонстрираме како најсовременото машинско учење и техники за минирање текст може да се користат за изградба на ефикасни системи за детекција на користење супстанции базирани на социјалните медиуми. Бидејќи користењето на супстанциите е тешко да се добие на голем степен вистината, за да се максимализира системската перформанса, ние ги истражуваме различните ненадгледувани методи на учење на карактеристики за да се искористи голема количина ненадгледувани социјални медиуми Ние, исто така, ја демонстрираме бенефицијалноста од користењето на мултипоглед ненадгледувано учење на карактеристики за комбинирање хетерогенски кориснички информации како што се „сакаат“ на Фејсбук и „ажурирања на статусот“ за подобру На основа на нашата проценка, нашите најдобри модели постигнаа 86 отсто АСК за предвидување на употребата на тутун, 81 отсто за употребата на алкохол и 84 отсто за нелегалната употреба на дрога, сите кои значително ги надминаа постоечките методи. Нашата истрага, исто така, откри интересни односи помеѓу однесувањето на корисникот на социјалните медиуми (на пример, употребата на зборови) и употребата на супстанции.', 'kk': "Бұл қағазда, біз механизмтің оқытуы мен мәтін балау техникаларын әсер етілген социалдық медиаға негізделген материаларды анықтау жүйелерін құру үшін қалай қолданылатынын көрсетедік. Бірақ математиканың қолдануы үлкен масштабтағы жүйелік әрекеттерін көбейту үшін жүйелік көмегімен көбейту қиын болып, біз әртүрлі өзгертілмеген мүмкіндіктерді оқу әдістерін зерттеп, к Мұндай-ақ біз жүйелік жылдамдығын өзгерту үшін бірнеше көрініс өзгертілмеген мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру үшін бірнеше көрініс мәліметін, мысалы, Facebook 'жақсы' және 'күй жаңар Біздің оқиғамыздың негізінде, табақ қолдануды бақылау үшін 86% AUC үшін, 81% алкохолды қолдану үшін және 84% негізгі наркотты қолдану үшін, бұл барлығы барлық әдістердің әдістерінен артық болды. Біздің зерттеулеріміз де пайдаланушылардың социалдық медиа әрекеттерінің (мысалы, сөздерді қолдану) және материаларды қолдану арасындағы қызықтық қатынастарды табылды.", 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan bagaimana teknik pembelajaran mesin terbaik dan penambangan teks boleh digunakan untuk membina sistem pengesan bahan yang berasaskan media sosial yang efektif. Oleh kerana penggunaan bahan kebenaran tanah adalah sukar untuk mendapatkan pada skala besar, untuk maksimumkan prestasi sistem, kami mengeksplorasi kaedah pembelajaran fitur yang berbeza tidak diawasi untuk mengambil keuntungan dari jumlah besar data media sosial tidak diawasi. Kami juga menunjukkan keuntungan menggunakan pembelajaran ciri-ciri tanpa pengawasan berbilang-pandangan untuk menggabungkan maklumat pengguna heterogene seperti Facebook 'suka' dan 'kemaskini status' untuk meningkatkan prestasi sistem. Berdasarkan penilaian kami, model terbaik kami mencapai 86% AUC untuk meramalkan penggunaan tembakau, 81% untuk penggunaan alkohol dan 84% untuk penggunaan dadah haram, semua yang jauh melebihi kaedah yang ada. Penyelidikan kami juga telah menemukan hubungan menarik antara perilaku media sosial pengguna (cth., penggunaan kata) dan penggunaan bahan.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു എങ്ങനെയാണ് സാമൂഹ്യ മെഷിന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതെന്നും ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മൈനിങ്ങ് ടെക്സ്റ്റിങ് ടെക Since a substance use ground truth is difficult to obtain on a large scale, to maximize system performance, we explore different unsupervised feature learning methods to take advantage of a large amount of unsupervised social media data.  സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിലേക്ക് 'ഇഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്നു' എന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനായി 'സ്റ്റേറ്റാസ് പുതുക്കുന്നതിന നമ്മുടെ പരിഗണനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത്, നമ്മുടെ മികച്ച മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനായി 86% AUC നേടിയിരുന്നു. മദ്യപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി 81% മയക്കുമരുന്ന ഞങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d", 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu xhieda ta’ kif jistgħu jintużaw it-tekniki ta’ tagħlim tal-magni u ta’ tħaffir tat-testi avvanzati biex jinbnew sistemi effettivi ta’ detezzjoni tal-użu tas-sustanzi bbażati fuq il-midja soċjali. Minħabba li huwa diffiċli li tinkiseb verżjoni tal-art dwar l-użu ta’ sustanzi fuq skala kbira, biex tiġi massimizzata l-prestazzjoni tas-sistema, nistudjaw metodi differenti ta’ tagħlim tal-karatteristiċi mhux sorveljati biex niksbu vantaġġ minn ammont kbir ta’ dejta tal-midja soċjali mhux sorveljata. Jiġu murija wkoll il-benefiċċju tal-użu ta' tagħlim ta' karatteristiċi mhux sorveljati b'ħafna viżijiet biex nikkombinaw informazzjoni eteroġena tal-utenti bħall-'likes' tal-Facebook u 'aġġornamenti tal-istatus' biex itejbu l-prestazzjoni tas-sistema. Based on our evaluation, our best models achieved 86% AUC for predicting tobacco use, 81% for alcohol use and 84% for illicit drug use, all of which significantly outperformed existing methods.  L-investigazzjoni tagħna żvelat ukoll relazzjonijiet interessanti bejn l-imġiba tal-midja soċjali tal-utent (pereżempju l-użu tal-kliem) u l-użu tas-sustanza.", 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi korleis kunstmaskinelæring og tekstminingsteknikken kan brukast til å bygge effektiv sosiale mediebasert substitusjonsbruk av oppdagingssystemar. Sidan ein grunnsannheit er vanskeleg å få fram på ein stor skala, for å maksimere systemutviklingar, så utforskar vi ulike ulike utviklingsmetoder for å lære funksjonar for å ta fordel av stor stor mengd informasjon om sosiale medier. Vi viser også fordel til å bruka ulike funksjonslæring for å kombinerera heterogenene brukarinformasjon som Facebook « liker » og « status oppdateringar » for å forbetra systemutvikling. Basert på evalueringa vår, har våre beste modeller oppnådd 86% AUC for å foregå bruk av tabakkar, 81% for alkoholbruk og 84% for illegale bruk av narkotika, alle som er betydelig over eksisterande metoder. Forsøket vårt har også oppdaga interessante forhold mellom brukaren sin sosiale media-oppførsel (f.eks. ordbruk) og substitusjonsbruk.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule pokazujemy, w jaki sposób najnowocześniejsze techniki uczenia maszynowego i eksploracji tekstu mogą być wykorzystane do budowy skutecznych systemów wykrywania zużycia substancji opartych na mediach społecznościowych. Ponieważ trudno jest uzyskać na dużą skalę prawdę o zastosowaniu substancji, aby zmaksymalizować wydajność systemu, badamy różne metody uczenia się funkcji bez nadzoru, aby wykorzystać dużą ilość danych bez nadzoru w mediach społecznościowych. Pokazujemy również korzyści płynące z wykorzystania wielu widoków bez nadzoru funkcji uczenia się w celu łączenia heterogenicznych informacji użytkowników, takich jak "polubienia" Facebooka i "aktualizacje statusu", aby zwiększyć wydajność systemu. W oparciu o naszą ocenę, nasze najlepsze modele osiągnęły 86% AUC dla przewidywania spożywania tytoniu, 81% dla spożywania alkoholu i 84% dla nielegalnego zażywania narkotyków, które znacznie przewyższyły istniejące metody. Nasze dochodzenie odkryło również interesujące związki między zachowaniem użytkownika w mediach społecznościowych (np. używaniem słów) a używaniem substancji.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, demonstrăm modul în care tehnicile de învățare automată de ultimă oră și de extragere a textului pot fi utilizate pentru a construi sisteme eficiente de detectare a utilizării substanțelor bazate pe rețelele sociale. Deoarece adevărul de bază al utilizării substanțelor este dificil de obținut la scară largă, pentru a maximiza performanța sistemului, explorăm diferite metode de învățare a caracteristicilor nesupravegheate pentru a profita de o cantitate mare de date nesupravegheate din rețelele sociale. De asemenea, demonstrăm beneficiul utilizării învățării caracteristicilor nesupravegheate cu mai multe vizualizări pentru a combina informații eterogene ale utilizatorilor, cum ar fi "like-urile" și "actualizările de stare" Facebook, pentru a îmbunătăți performanța sistemului. Pe baza evaluării noastre, cele mai bune modele au atins 86% ASC pentru previziunea consumului de tutun, 81% pentru consumul de alcool și 84% pentru consumul ilicit de droguri, toate acestea depășind semnificativ metodele existente. Investigația noastră a descoperit, de asemenea, relații interesante între comportamentul unui utilizator social media (de exemplu, utilizarea cuvintelor) și utilizarea substanțelor.', 'mn': "Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэрхэн урлагийн машин суралцах болон текст цэвэрлэх техникуудыг хэрхэн ашиглаж болох вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Магадгүй эдийн засаг хэрэглэдэг жинхэнэ үнэнийг маш их хэмжээнд авч, системийн үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэхэд хэцүү болсон учраас бид өөр өөр чадваргүй үйл ажиллагааны суралцах аргыг судалж, нийгмийн мэдээллийн маш их хэмжээ Мөн бид олон үзэгдлийн шинжлэх ухааны хэрэглэгчийн мэдээллийг Facebook-ийн дуртай 'дуртай' болон 'статус шинжлэх ухаан' гэх мэт олон үзэгдлийн шинжлэх ухааны ашиг ашиглах хэрэгтэй. Хамгийн сайн загварууд маань таван хэрэглээний хувьд 86% АС гарч ирсэн. 81% алкогийн хэрэглээний хувьд, 84% бус эм хэрэглээний хувьд, эдгээр бүх зүйлс суурилсан арга загваруудын хувьд үнэхээр үр дүнтэй. Бидний судалгаанд хэрэглэгчийн нийгмийн хэвлэлийн үйл ажиллагааны хоорондох сонирхолтой харилцаа (жишээ нь үг хэрэглээ) болон материалуудын хэрэглээ нээлттэй болсон.", 'sr': "U ovom papiru, mi pokazujemo kako se tehnike za rudarstvo teksta može iskoristiti za izgradnju efektivnih sustava za detekciju materijala na društvenim medijima. Budući da je materijalna istina teško dobiti na velikoj skali, maksimalizirati sistemsku funkciju, istražujemo različite neodređene metode učenja karakteristika da iskoristimo veliku količinu neodređenih podataka o društvenim medijima. Takoðe pokazujemo korist od koristi multi-poglednog neodređenog učenja funkcija za kombinaciju heterogeneznih informacija korisnika poput Facebook 'voli' i 'aktualizacija statusa' za poboljšanje funkcije sistema. Na temelju naše procjene, naši najbolji modeli su postigli 86% AUC za predviđanje uporabe duhana, 81% za uporabu alkohola i 84% za ilegalnu uporabu droge, sve što su značajno iznosile postojeće metode. Naša istraga je takođe otkrila interesantne odnose između ponašanja socijalnih medija korisnika (npr. korištenja reči) i upotrebe tvari.", 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen visar vi hur den senaste tekniken för maskininlärning och textutvinning kan användas för att bygga effektiva system för detektering av substanser baserade på sociala medier. Eftersom en substansanvändning är svår att få fram i stor skala, för att maximera systemets prestanda, utforskar vi olika icke övervakade funktionsinlärningsmetoder för att dra nytta av en stor mängd oövervakad data från sociala medier. Vi demonstrerar också fördelen med att använda multi-view oövervakad funktionsinlärning för att kombinera heterogen användarinformation som Facebook "gillar" och "statusuppdateringar" för att förbättra systemets prestanda. Baserat på vår utvärdering uppnådde våra bästa modeller 86% AUC för att förutsäga tobaksanvändning, 81% för alkoholanvändning och 84% för olaglig narkotikaanvändning, vilket alla signifikant överträffade befintliga metoder. Vår undersökning har också avslöjat intressanta relationer mellan en användares beteende på sociala medier (t.ex. ordanvändning) och substansanvändning.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu muujinnaa siduu u isticmaali karo barashada machadka farshaxanka iyo teknikada wax lagu kaydiyo qoraalka si ay u dhisto isticmaalka isticmaalka alaabta bulshada. Sida darteed runta dhulka lagu isticmaalo waa adag tahay in aad u hesho si aad u weyn, si aan u kordhiyo sameynta nidaamka, waxaynu baaraynaa qaabab waxbarasho oo kala duduwan oo aan la ilaalinayn si aan u isticmaalno macluumaadyo badan oo aan la ilaalinayn sooshaalka bulshada. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa faa'iidada isticmaalka aragtida badan oo aan la ilaalinayn barashada si aad u soo wadatid macluumaadka isticmaalayaasha guud, tusaale ahaan Facebook'likes' iyo 'status updates' si ay u kordhiso tababarka nidaamka. Qiimeynteena lagu saleyn karo, qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan waxay gaadhay 86% AUC si loo hormariyo isticmaalka tobankada, 81% isticmaalka khamriga iyo 84% isticmaalka dawooyinka ee sharci ah, kuwaas oo dhamaantoodna aad u sameeyay qaababka joogta ah. Baaritaankeenna wuxuu sidoo kale muujiyey xiriir xiiso leh oo u dhexeeya dabeecada macluumaadka bulshada (tusaale ahaan isticmaalka hadalka) iyo isticmaalka maandooriyaha.", 'si': 'මේ පත්තරයේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද කියලා කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න පුළුවන් සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරික්ෂණ විශේෂයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ඇත්ත විශාල විශාල විශාල විදිහට අමාරුයි, පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශාල කරන්න, අපි විවිධිය නැති  අපි වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බොහොම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය විසින්, අපේ හොඳම මෝඩේල් 86% AUC වැඩ කරලා තුබාකුව භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන්, 81% ඇල්කෝල් භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන්, 84% අනියෝජිත වි අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ සාමාජික මිඩියාගේ භාවිතාවක් අතර සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் எவ்வாறு தெரிவிக்கிறோம் என்று காண்பிக்கிறோம் கலை இயந்திரம் கற்றல் மற்றும் உரை கடைசி தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத் ஒரு பொருள் பயன்படுத்தும் பூமியின் உண்மையை பெரிய அளவில் பெறுவதற்கு கடினமாக இருக்கிறது, அமைப்பு செயல்பாட்டை அதிகப்படுத்த, நாம் வேறு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்பட நாம் பல காட்சிகள் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத தன்மைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் பயன்படுத்தும் பயன்படுத்தும் பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுகிறோம் முறைமை செயல்பாட்டை மே எங்கள் மதிப்பினை அடிப்படையில், எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரிகள் ஏய்சி முறையாக அடைந்தது, பூக்கு பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு, மதுப்பிற்கு 81% மற்றும் வெறுப்பு மருந்து பயன்படுத்த 84 எங்கள் விசாரணையும் ஒரு பயனரின் சமூக ஊடகங்களின் நடைமுறையில் சுவாரஸ்யமான தொடர்புகளையும் வெளிப்படுத்தியுள்ளது. உதாரணமாக', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کیسے آرتی ماشین سکھانے اور ٹیکسٹ مینی ٹیکنیک استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں تابع سوسیال میڈیا بنیادی مواد کا استعمال کرنا سیسٹم کے لئے۔ اس وجہ سے کہ ایک موجود زمین کی حقیقت کا استعمال کرنا بڑے مقدار پر مشکل ہے، سیسٹم کی فعالیت کو بڑھانے کے لئے، ہم مختلف غیر قابل تعلیم کے طریقے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ بہت سے زیادہ غیر قابل تعلیم رسمی ڈیٹا کا فائدہ اٹھائیں۔ ہم نے بھی بہت سی نظر کے مطابق فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے کارساز معلومات کو ترکیب کرنے کے لئے بہت سی نظر کے مطابق مطابق غیر قابل استفاده کریں۔ ہمارے ارزیابی پر، ہمارے بہترین نمونڈل توباک استعمال کی پیش بینی کے لئے 86% AUC پہنچ گئے، 81% الکل استعمال کے لئے اور 84% غیرقانونی داروک استعمال کے لئے، ان سب کو بہت اہم طریقے سے زیادہ انجام دیا گیا۔ ہماری تحقیقات نے بھی ایک کارساز کے سوسیل میڈیا رفتار (جیسے کلمات استعمال) اور مواد استعمال کے درمیان دلچسپ رابطہ آشکار کی ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz shaxsiy mashinalar o'rganish holati va matn mining texnologiyani qanday foydalanishimizni ko'rsatdik. Bu qogʻozda qo'shish tizimini ishlatish uchun foydalanish mumkin. Chunki ma'lumotni ishlatish uchun, tizim bajarishini ko'paytirish juda qiyin, biz xavfsiz qilmagan xavfsiz imkoniyatlarni o'rganish usullarini o'rganamiz. Koʻproq xavfsiz bulmagan jamiyat media maʼlumotidan foydalanish uchun ko'proq foydalanish mumkin. Biz bu foydalanuvchining ko'pchilik haqida xavfsiz qilmagan imkoniyatlarning foydalanishini ko'rsatamiz. Foydalanuvchining foydalanuvchining foydalanuvchini foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchini foydalanishimiz mumkin. Bizning qiymatlarimiz asosida, bizning eng yaxshi modellarimiz esa sotuq ishlatish uchun 86% AUC topildi, alkohol foydalanish uchun 81% va hech qanday narsa foydalanish uchun 84% bajardi. Buning hammasi juda muhim mavjud usullarni bajardi. Bizning qidirishimiz foydalanuvchi shaxsiy medya xususiyatlarining (масалан so'z foydalanish) va mavzu foydalanuvchilari орасида qiziqarli aloqalarni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chứng minh làm thế nào để tạo ra hệ thống phát hiện các chất kích thích có tác dụng trên mạng xã hội. Vì một chất dùng chân lý khó đạt được trên quy mô lớn, để tối đa hóa khả năng hệ thống, chúng tôi khám phá các phương pháp học tính năng không giám sát khác để tận dụng một lượng lớn dữ liệu mạng không giám sát. Chúng tôi cũng thể hiện lợi ích của việc sử dụng chương trình không giám sát nhiều người để kết hợp thông tin người dùng khác nhau như Facebook "thích" và "cập nhật trạng thái" để tăng hiệu suất hệ thống. Dựa trên đánh giá của chúng tôi, phương pháp tốt nhất đã đạt được 86 Rất lớn AUC để dự đoán việc sử dụng thuốc lá, 81=\'cho rượu chè và 84+ cho việc buôn bán ma túy trái phép, tất cả đều đã vượt qua được các phương pháp tồn tại. Cuộc điều tra của chúng tôi cũng tìm ra mối quan hệ thú vị giữa hành vi xã hội của người dùng (ví dụ, s ử dụng từ) và sử dụng chất.', 'bg': 'В тази статия демонстрираме как най-съвременните техники за машинно обучение и текстово добиване могат да бъдат използвани за изграждане на ефективни системи за откриване на употребата на вещества, базирани в социалните медии. Тъй като основната истина за употребата на вещества е трудно да се получи в голям мащаб, за да се максимизира производителността на системата, ние изследваме различни методи за изучаване на функции без надзор, за да се възползваме от голямо количество ненадзорни данни в социалните медии. Също така демонстрираме ползата от използването на многообразно безнадзорно обучение на функции, за да комбинираме хетерогенна потребителска информация като "харесвания" и "актуализации на състоянието", за да подобрим производителността на системата. Въз основа на нашата оценка, нашите най-добри модели постигнаха 86% AUC за прогнозиране на употребата на тютюн, 81% за употреба на алкохол и 84% за употреба на незаконни наркотици, всички от които значително надминаха съществуващите методи. Нашето разследване също така откри интересни връзки между поведението на потребителя в социалните медии (например употребата на думи) и употребата на вещества.', 'nl': "In dit artikel laten we zien hoe de state-of-the-art machine learning en text mining technieken kunnen worden gebruikt om effectieve op sociale media gebaseerde detectiesystemen voor substantiegebruik te bouwen. Omdat het moeilijk is om op grote schaal een grondslag voor het gebruik van substanties te verkrijgen, onderzoeken we verschillende onbeheerde leermethoden om te profiteren van een grote hoeveelheid onbeheerde sociale media-gegevens om de systeemprestaties te maximaliseren. We demonstreren ook het voordeel van het gebruik van multi-view onbeheerde feature learning om heterogene gebruikersinformatie zoals Facebook 'likes' en 'status updates' te combineren om de systeemprestaties te verbeteren. Op basis van onze evaluatie bereikten onze beste modellen 86% AUC voor het voorspellen van tabaksgebruik, 81% voor alcoholgebruik en 84% voor illegaal drugsgebruik, die allemaal significant overtroffen de bestaande methoden. Ons onderzoek heeft ook interessante verbanden ontdekt tussen het gedrag van een gebruiker op social media (bijvoorbeeld woordgebruik) en het gebruik van substanties.", 'da': "I denne artikel demonstrerer vi, hvordan de avancerede teknikker til maskinlæring og tekstmining kan bruges til at opbygge effektive sociale medier-baserede stofbrugsdetekteringssystemer. Da det er svært at opnå en grundlæggende sandhed for stofbrug i stor skala, for at maksimere systemets ydeevne, undersøger vi forskellige ikke-overvågede funktionsindlæringsmetoder for at drage fordel af en stor mængde ikke-overvågede data på sociale medier. Vi demonstrerer også fordelene ved at bruge multi-view uden opsyn funktioner til at kombinere heterogene brugeroplysninger som Facebook 'synes godt om' og 'statusopdateringer' for at forbedre systemets ydeevne. Baseret på vores evaluering opnåede vores bedste modeller 86% AUC for at forudsige tobaksbrug, 81% for alkoholbrug og 84% for ulovlig narkotikabrug, hvilket alle var betydeligt bedre end eksisterende metoder. Vores undersøgelse har også afdækket interessante relationer mellem en brugers adfærd på sociale medier (f.eks. ordbrug) og stofbrug.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru pokazujemo kako se tehnike za rudarstvo teksta koriste za izgradnju učinkovitih sustava otkrivanja tvari na društvenim medijima. Budući da je teško dobiti istinu podzemne tvari na velikoj skali, maksimalizirati učinkovitost sustava, istražujemo različite neodređene metode učenja osobina kako bi iskoristili veliku količinu neodređenih podataka o društvenim medijima. Također pokazujemo korist korištenja učenja multivizualnih neodređenih karakteristika za kombinaciju heterogeneznih informacija korisnika poput Facebook 'voli' i 'aktualizacija statusa' kako bi poboljšali funkciju sustava. Na temelju naše procjene, naši najbolji modeli postigli su 86% AUC za predviđanje primjene duhana, 81% za primjenu alkohola i 84% za ilegalnu primjenu lijeka, od kojih su sve značajno nadmašile postojeće metode. Naša istraga je također otkrila zanimljive odnose između ponašanja socijalnih medija korisnika (npr. uporabe riječi) i uporabe tvari.", 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menunjukkan bagaimana cara mesin terbaik belajar dan teknik penambangan teks dapat digunakan untuk membangun sistem deteksi substansi berdasarkan media sosial yang efektif. Karena penggunaan substansi kebenaran tanah sulit untuk mendapatkan pada skala besar, untuk memaksimalkan prestasi sistem, kami mengeksplorasi metode belajar karakteristik yang berbeda yang tidak diawasi untuk mengambil keuntungan dari jumlah besar data media sosial yang tidak diawasi. Kami juga menunjukkan keuntungan dari menggunakan pemilihan karakteristik multipandangan yang tidak diawasi untuk menggabungkan informasi pengguna heterogene seperti Facebook 'suka' dan 'status update' untuk meningkatkan prestasi sistem. Berdasarkan evaluasi kami, model terbaik kami mencapai 86% AUC untuk memprediksi penggunaan tembakau, 81% untuk penggunaan alkohol dan 84% untuk penggunaan narkoba ilegal, semua yang signifikan melebihi metode yang ada. Penyelidikan kami juga menemukan hubungan menarik antara perilaku media sosial pengguna (contohnya, penggunaan kata) dan penggunaan substansi.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag zeigen wir, wie mit Hilfe modernster Machine Learning- und Text Mining-Techniken effektive Social Media-basierte Substanzerkennungssysteme aufgebaut werden können. Um die Systemleistung zu maximieren, untersuchen wir verschiedene Methoden zum Lernen von Funktionen ohne Aufsicht, um eine große Menge an unbeaufsichtigten Social-Media-Daten zu nutzen. Wir demonstrieren auch den Nutzen der Verwendung von Multi-View unüberwachten Feature Learning, um heterogene Benutzerinformationen wie Facebook "Gefällt mir" und "Status Updates" zu kombinieren, um die Systemleistung zu verbessern. Basierend auf unserer Bewertung erreichten unsere besten Modelle 86% AUC für die Vorhersage des Tabakkonsums, 81% für den Alkoholkonsum und 84% für den illegalen Drogenkonsum, die alle die bisherigen Methoden deutlich übertrafen. Unsere Untersuchung hat auch interessante Zusammenhänge zwischen dem Social-Media-Verhalten eines Nutzers (z.B. Wortgebrauch) und dem Substanzgebrauch aufgedeckt.', 'ko': "본고에서 우리는 가장 선진적인 기계 학습과 텍스트 발굴 기술을 어떻게 사용하여 효과적인 소셜 미디어 기반의 물질 사용 검측 시스템을 구축하는지 보여줄 것이다.대규모로 물질 사용의 기본적인 사실을 얻기 어려우므로 시스템 성능을 최대한 향상시키기 위해 우리는 서로 다른 무감독 특징 학습 방법을 모색하여 대량의 무감독 소셜미디어 데이터를 이용했다.Google은 또한 다중 보기 무감독 기능 학습을 사용하여 다양한 사용자 정보(예를 들어 페이스북의'좋아요'와'상태 업데이트'를 조합하여 시스템 성능을 향상시키는 장점도 보여 주었다.우리의 평가에 따르면 우리의 최적 모델은 담배가 사용하는 AUC를 86%, 알코올이 사용하는 AUC를 81%, 불법 약물이 사용하는 AUC를 84%로 예측했는데 이 모든 것이 기존 방법보다 현저히 낫다.우리의 조사에서 사용자의 소셜 미디어 행위(예를 들어 단어 사용)와 물질적 사용 사이에 흥미로운 관계가 있음을 발견했다.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه آموزش ماشین هنر و تکنیک ذخیره کردن متن برای ساختن مواد مواد موثری که بنیاد رسانه اجتماعی از سیستم شناسایی استفاده می کنند استفاده می شود. چون مواد استفاده از حقیقت زمینی در مقیاس بزرگ، برای افزایش عملکرد سیستم سخت است، ما روش یادگیری ویژه\u200cهای متفاوتی متفاوت را برای استفاده از مقدار زیادی از داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی غیرقابل تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما همچنین سودی از استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای مختلف دیدگاه\u200cها را نشان می\u200cدهیم تا یادگیری از ویژه\u200cهای غیرقابل استفاده برای ترکیب اطلاعات کاربر مختلف مثل فیس\u200cبوک » دوست دارد » و » روزگاری\u200cهای وضعیت » برای افزایش بر اساس ارزیابی ما، بهترین مدل\u200cهای ما 86% AUC را برای پیش\u200cبینی استفاده از tabaک رسید، 81% برای استفاده از الکل و 84% برای استفاده از داروهای غیرقانونی، که همگی از روش\u200cهای موجود به طور معنی بیشتر انجام داده است. تحقیقات ما همچنین رابطه های جالبی بین رفتار رسانه های اجتماعی یک کاربر (مثال استفاده از کلمات) و استفاده از مواد کشف کرده است.', 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha jinsi hali ya elimu ya mashine ya sanaa na mbinu za madini za madini zinavyoweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kutengeneza mfumo wa matumizi yenye vyombo vya habari vya kijamii. Kwa kuwa kifaa kinachotumia ukweli wa ardhi ni vigumu kupatikana kwa kiwango kikubwa, kwa kuongeza ufanisi wa mfumo, tunachunguza mbinu tofauti za kujifunza za kutumia huduma kubwa za taarifa za mitandao ya kijamii zisizo hifadhiwa. Pia tunaonyesha faida ya kutumia utambulisho wa maoni mbalimbali usio na uhakika wa kujifunza kuunganisha taarifa za watumiaji wa kijinsia kama vile Facebook 'wanapenda' na 'taarifa mpya za hali' ili kuongeza utendaji wa mfumo. Kutokana na tathmini zetu, mifano yetu bora ilipata AUC 86% kwa kutabiri matumizi ya tumbaku, asilimia 81 kwa matumizi ya alkohol na asilimia 84 kwa matumizi ya madawa isiyo halali, ambazo zote zilifanya njia zilizopo kwa kiasi kikubwa. Utafiti wetu umegundua mahusiano ya kuvutia kati ya tabia za mitandao ya kijamii (kwa mfano matumizi ya maneno) na matumizi ya vifaa.", 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne demonstrojmë se si mund të përdoren teknikat e mësimit të makinave më të moderne dhe të minierave të tekstit për të ndërtuar sisteme efektive të zbulimit të substancave bazuar në media sociale. Meqenëse një përdorim i substancave e vërteta tokësore është e vështirë për të arritur në një shkallë të madhe, për të maksimizuar performancën e sistemit, ne eksplorojmë metoda të ndryshme të mësimit të karakteristikave të pazgjidhura për të përfituar nga një sasi e madhe e të dhënave të media sociale të pazgjidhura. Ne gjithashtu demonstrojmë përfitimin e përdorimit të mësimit të karakteristikave shumë-pamje të pazgjidhura për të kombinuar informacionin heterogjene të përdoruesve të tillë si Facebook 'pëlqen' dhe 'përditësimet e statusit' për të përmirësuar performancën e sistemit. Bazuar në vlerësimin tonë, modelet tona më të mira arritën 86% AUC për parashikimin e përdorimit të duhanit, 81% për përdorimin e alkoholit dhe 84% për përdorimin e drogës së paligjshme, të gjitha të cilat tejkaluan ndjeshëm metodat ekzistuese. Hetimi ynë ka zbuluar gjithashtu marrëdhënie interesante midis sjelljes s ë një përdoruesi të media s social e (për shembull përdorimi i fjalëve) dhe përdorimit të substancave.", 'hy': "In this paper, we demonstrate how the state-of-the-art machine learning and text mining techniques can be used to build effective social media-based substance use detection systems.  Քանի որ նյութերի օգտագործման հիմնական ճշմարտությունը դժվար է հասնել մեծ մասշտաբով, մեծացնել համակարգի արդյունքները, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր անվերահսկված հատկանիշների ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք բազմաթիվ անվերահսկված սո We also demonstrate the benefit of using multi-view unsupervised feature learning to combine heterogeneous user information such as Facebook 'likes' and 'status updates' to enhance system performance.  Հաշվի առնելով մեր գնահատման վրա, մեր լավագույն մոդելները հասան ծխածի օգտագործման կանխատեսման 86 տոկոսի ԱՍՔ-ի, 81 տոկոսի ալկոհոլ օգտագործման և 84 տոկոսի անօրինական թմրանյութերի օգտագործման համար, որոնք բոլորը նշանակալի են Our investigation has also uncovered interesting relations between a user's social media behavior (e.g., word usage) and substance use.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz sungatçy enjamyň öwrenmesi we metin taýýarlama tekniklerini etkinji mediýaly çarpyşma sistemalaryny gurmak üçin ullanýarys. Bir zat ýerlik dogryny ulanmak uly derejede bolmak kyn üçin sistemiň eserini azaltmak üçin, biz dürlik taýýarlanmadyk çykyş metodlaryny gözləýäris we sosyal medýä maglumatyny ulanmak üçin beýleki taýýarlanmadyk. Biz hem sistem eserini geliştirmek üçin "halan" we "durum güncellemeleri" diýip ýeterlik etmek üçin multi-görnüş üýtgetmeli özellikleri öwrenmek üçin ýeterlik ýerini görkez. Taýýarlanmamyza görä, iň gowy nusgalarymyz 86% AUC tabak ulanmagyny önlemek üçin, 81% alkohol ulanmagyny üçin we 84% täsirli narkotik ulanmagyny üçin ýetdi, hemme bu nusgalaryň bar ýagdaýda möhüm ýüze çykyp bardyr. Biziň soragymyz hem ullançylaryň sosial mediýaly hereketleriň arasynda gyzykly baglaşyklary a çdyr (meselâ, s özleriň ulanmasy) we maddeler ulanmasy bardyr.', 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রদর্শন করি কিভাবে শিল্প-শিল্প মেশিন শিক্ষা এবং টেক্সট মিনিয়ন কৌশল ব্যবহার করা যায় কার্যকর সামাজিক মিডিয়ার ভিত্তিক যেহেতু একটি বস্তু ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে ভূমির সত্য বিশাল পর্যায়ে পাওয়া কঠিন, সিস্টেমের প্রভাব বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য, আমরা বিভিন্ন সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের তথ্যে আমরা মাল্টিভিউ ব্যবহার করে অরক্ষিত বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহারের সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করি যেমন ফেসবুক 'পছন্দ' এবং 'স্ট্যাটাস আপডেট' সিস্টেমের অনুষ্ঠানের ব আমাদের মূল্যের ভিত্তিতে আমাদের সেরা মডেল ৮৬% এউসি পেয়েছে টাক্কো ব্যবহারের জন্য, মদ্যকহল ব্যবহারের জন্য ৮১% এবং অবৈধ মাদক ব্যবহারের জন্য ৮৪% অর্জন করেছে, যার Our investigation has also uncovered interesting relations between a user's social media behavior (e.g., word usage) and substance use.", 'am': "በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የዓላማ መሳናት ትምህርት እና የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል ማቀናጃ እና የማኅበራዊ አውታር የተመሳሳይ የሀብት ግንኙነትን ለመሥራት እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ አካባቢ መሬት እውነቱን ለመግኘት በብዛት ስርዓት ማግኘት ከችግር ነው፣ የስርዓቱን ትክክል ማግኘት፣ የተጠበቀው የባሕላዊ ማህበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን ለመጠቀም በተለየ ትምህርት ሥርዓት እንፈልጋለን፡፡ እናም የፌስቡክ 'ወድደዋል' እና'ስታወስ' ለስርዓት አካባቢ ስርዓት ማድረግ ለማድረግ የሚጠቅመውን የብዙ ዓይነትን ያልጠበቀው የአፍላጎት መረጃዎችን ለመማር ጥቅም እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በአመሳሳይነታችን ላይ የተሻለሙ ምሳሌዎቻችን የቱክ ጥቅም ለመቀበል 86 በመቶ የአዩሲ መቶ አግኝቷል፥ 81 በመቶ ለመጠቀም እና 84 በመቶ የተፈቀደ አካል ለመጠቀም አግኝቷል፡፡ ምርመራችን የጦማሪያው ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ድርጊት (ለምሳሌ ቃላት ተጠቃሚ) እና የሀብት ተጠቃሚ ግንኙነት ገልጦአል፡፡", 'ca': "In this paper, we demonstrate how the state-of-the-art machine learning and text mining techniques can be used to build effective social media-based substance use detection systems.  Com que l'ús de substàncies és difícil d'obtenir la veritat terrestre a gran escala, per maximitzar el rendiment del sistema, explorem diferents mètodes d'aprenentatge de característiques sense supervisió per aprofitar una gran quantitat de dades de mitjans socials sense supervisió. També demostram el benefici d'utilitzar aprenentatge de característiques no supervisades a múltiples vistes per combinar informació heterogène d'usuari com Facebook 'agrada' i 'actualitzacions d'estatus' per millorar el rendiment del sistema. Sobre la base de la nostra evaluació, els nostres millors models van aconseguir l'AUC del 86% per predir l'ús de tabac, el 81% per l'ús d'alcohol i l'84% per l'ús ilícit de drogues, tots els quals superaven significativament els mètodes existents. La nostra investigació també ha descobert relacions interessants entre el comportament dels mitjans social s d'un usuari (per exemple, l'ús de paraules) i l'ús de substàncies.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku demonstrujeme, jak lze využít nejmodernější techniky strojového učení a textového dolování k vytvoření efektivních systémů detekce užívání látek založených na sociálních médiích. Vzhledem k tomu, že základní pravdu o užívání látek je obtížné získat ve velkém měřítku, abychom maximalizovali výkon systému, zkoumáme různé metody učení bez dozoru, abychom využili velkého množství dat o sociálních médiích bez dozoru. Také demonstrujeme výhody používání vícezobrazených funkcí bez dohledu k kombinaci heterogenních uživatelských informací, jako jsou "líbí se mi" na Facebooku a "aktualizace stavu", abychom zvýšili výkon systému. Na základě našeho hodnocení naše nejlepší modely dosáhly 86% AUC pro predikci užívání tabáku, 81% pro užívání alkoholu a 84% pro nedovolené užívání drog, což všechny výrazně překonaly stávající metody. Naše šetření rovněž odhalilo zajímavé vztahy mezi chováním uživatele na sociálních médiích (např. používáním slov) a užíváním látek.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös näitame, kuidas kaasaegseid masinõppe ja tekstikaevandamise tehnikaid saab kasutada tõhusate sotsiaalmeediapõhiste ainete tuvastamise süsteemide loomiseks. Kuna ainete kasutamise põhitõde on raske saavutada suures ulatuses, uurime süsteemi jõudluse maksimeerimiseks erinevaid järelevalveta funktsioonide õppe meetodeid, et kasutada ära suurt hulka järelevalveta sotsiaalmeedia andmeid. Samuti näitame, kui kasulik on kasutada mitmevaadet järelevalveta funktsiooniõpet, et kombineerida heterogeenset kasutajateavet, nagu Facebooki meeldimised ja olekuvärskendused, et parandada süsteemi jõudlust. Meie hinnangu põhjal saavutasid meie parimad mudelid 86% AUC tubaka tarbimise prognoosimisel, 81% alkoholi tarbimisel ja 84% ebaseaduslike uimastite tarbimisel, mis kõik ületasid oluliselt olemasolevaid meetodeid. Uurimine on avastanud ka huvitavaid seoseid kasutaja sotsiaalmeedia käitumise (nt sõnakasutus) ja ainete kasutamise vahel.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa demonstroimme, miten viimeisimpiä koneoppimis- ja tekstilouhintatekniikoita voidaan käyttää tehokkaiden sosiaalisen median aineiden käytön tunnistusjärjestelmien rakentamiseen. Koska päihteiden käytön pohjatotuutta on vaikea saada laajassa mittakaavassa, järjestelmän suorituskyvyn maksimoimiseksi tutkimme erilaisia valvomattomia ominaisuusoppimismenetelmiä hyödyntääksemme suurta määrää valvomatonta sosiaalisen median dataa. Osoitamme myös hyödyn siitä, että monitoroimattoman ominaisuusoppimisen avulla yhdistetään heterogeeniset käyttäjätiedot, kuten Facebookin tykkäykset ja tilapäivitykset, järjestelmän suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Arvioinnin perusteella parhaat mallit saavuttivat 86%:n AUC-arvon tupakankäytön ennustamisessa, 81%:n alkoholinkäytön ja 84%:n laittomien huumeiden käytön ennustamisessa, mikä kaikki ylitti merkittävästi olemassa olevat menetelmät. Tutkimuksemme on myös paljastanut mielenkiintoisia suhteita käyttäjän sosiaalisen median käyttäytymisen (esim. sanan käyttö) ja päihteiden käytön välillä.', 'az': "Bu kağızda, sanat makinelərin öyrənməsi və metin madenci tekniklərinin faydalı sosyal media vasitəsilə istifadə etmə sistemlərinin necə istifadə ediləcəyini göstəririk. Bir maddi istifadə etmək çox böyük ölçüdə istifadə etmək, sistem performansını maximizləşdirmək üçün çətin olaraq, müxtəlif təhsil edilməmiş təhsil öyrənmə metodlarını təhsil edirik ki, böyük müəyyən edilməmiş sosyal media məlumatlarından faydalanmayaq üçün. Biz həmçinin çoxlu görünüşlü fərqli öyrənmək üçün fərqli istifadəçi məlumatlarını Facebook kimi 'sevən' və 'status updates' kimi sistem performansını artırmaq üçün birləşdirmək üçün çoxlu fərqli öyrənmək üçün faydasını göstəririk. Bizim değerlendirməyimizə baxmayaraq, ən yaxşı modellərimiz Təmdak istifadəsini təmin etmək üçün 86% AUC qəbul etdi, 81% alkol istifadəsi üçün və 84% illik ilaç istifadəsi üçün, bunların hamısı mövcuddur metodlarından daha çox üstün oldu. Bizim araştırmalarımız də istifadəçinin sosyal media davranışı (məs ələn, sözlərin istifadəsi) və substance istifadəsi arasında maraqlı ilişkiler a çıldı.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons wys hoe die staat van die kuns masjien leer en teks mining teknike gebruik kan word om effektief sosiale media-gebaseerde substantie gebruik beskrywing stelsels te bou. Omdat 'n substantie gebruik grond waarheid is moeilik om op 'n groot skaal te kry, om stelsel prestasie te maksimaliseer, ondersoek ons verskillende ondersoekte funksie leer metodes om voordeel te neem van 'n groot hoeveelheid ondersoekte sosiale media data te neem. Ons wys ook die voordeel van die gebruik van multi- view ondersoekte funksie leer om heterogeneese gebruikerinformasie soos Facebook 'hou' en 'status opdaterings' te kombinerer om stelsel uitvoerings te verbeter. Op ons evaluasie het ons beste modele 86% AUC bereik vir voorskou van tabakkgebruik, 81% vir alkohol gebruik en 84% vir illegale narkotikabruk, almal wat betekenlik uitgevoer het bestaande metodes. Ons ondersoek het ook gevind interessante relasies tussen 'n gebruiker s e sosiale media gedrag (bv. woord gebruik) en substantiewegebruik ontdek.", 'bs': "U ovom papiru, mi pokazujemo kako se tehnike rudarstva i naučenja umjetnih mašina koriste za izgradnju efektivnih sustava otkrivanja materijala na društvenim medijima. Budući da je stvarnost koja koristi zemlju teško dobiti na velikoj skali, maksimalizirati sistemsku funkciju, istražujemo različite metode učenja neodređenih karakteristika kako bi iskoristili veliku količinu neodređenih podataka o društvenim medijima. Također pokazujemo korist korištenja učenja multivizualnih neodređenih karakteristika za kombinaciju heterogeneznih informacija korisnika poput Facebook 'voli' i 'aktualizacija statusa' kako bi poboljšali funkciju sistema. Na temelju naše procjene, naši najbolji modeli su postigli 86% AUC za predviđanje primjene duhana, 81% za primjenu alkohola i 84% za ilegalnu primjenu lijeka, a svi su značajno nadmašili postojeće metode. Naša istraga je također otkrila interesantne odnose između ponašanja socijalnih medija korisnika (npr. uporabe riječi) i uporabe tvari.", 'jv': "Nang pember iki, kita mulasah piye isakno akeh sistem layang-layang lan gampang teknik sing bisa nguasai nggawe barang nggampang sistem sing bisa nguasai supayat media susahe Sampeyan bener Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan pengaturan kanggo nggambar Multi-view kuwi ora bisa nguasai perusahaan karo nggawe informasi sistem sing berarti tambah 'lik' lan 'status Updates' Mungkin nggunakake tuaweke, model sing paling dhéwé nggawe barang nggunakake tuaweke supoyo karo hal-iwak, aku wis barang kanggo kalakno ning acara supoyo ingkang 6%, lan uwong sing paling dhéwé, sing paling dhéwé nggawe barang langgar sampeyan. Awakdhéwé mengko perusahaan anyar neng akeh operasi sing dibenakno ning barang media sotiki (tilp, gambar uwis) lan gambar barang bakal nggunakake gambar.", 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנו מראים כיצד שימוש טכניקות מכרות ומכרות טקסטים מוקדמות ביותר מאחר ששימוש בסמים אמת קרקעית קשה להשיג בקנה מידה גדולה, כדי למקסימום ביצועי מערכת, אנו חוקרים שיטות למידה של תכונות שונות ללא שמוראות כדי לנצל כמות גדולה של נתונים של תקשורת חברתית ללא שמוראות. We also demonstrate the benefit of using multi-view unsupervised feature learning to combine heterogeneous user information such as Facebook 'likes' and 'status updates' to enhance system performance.  בהתבסס על הערכה שלנו, הדוגמנים הטובים ביותר שלנו השיגו 86% AUC לחזוי שימוש טבק, 81% לשימוש אלכוהול ו-84% לשימוש סמים בלתי חוקים, כולם ביצעו שיטות קיימות באופן משמעותי. החקירה שלנו גילה גם יחסים מעניינים בין התנהגות של משתמש בתקשורת חברתית (למשל שימוש במילים) ושימוש בסמים.", 'ha': "Ga wannan takarda, Munã nũna jinsi da za'a iya amfani da abincin zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane Dõmin an buƙata wani abu da ake amfani da bakin gaskiyar ta yi nauyi a sami girma, dõmin a maximize mafarin na'urar system, za mu nẽmi hanyoyin mutane na tsari da ba'a tsare su ba, ko kuma za mu yi amfani da ko ko ko ko yawa na tsare data na mitandai na jamii. We also demonstrate the benefit of using multi-view unsupervised feature learning to combine heterogeneous user information such as Facebook 'likes' and 'status updates' to enhance system performance.  Basan da kakasarsa, misalinmu masu kyãwo sun sãmu 86% AUC dõmin ya yi bayani ga amfani da tumbakwai, da 81% wa amfani da alkoholi da 84% wa isticmin narki haram, dukansu sun aikata na hanyoyin wanda ke iya ƙayyade. Kayan ƙidãyinMu ya nuna danganiya mai sha'awa a tsakanin aikin mitandaki na mai amfani da shi (misali, isticmin magana) da amfani da abun abu.", 'sk': "V prispevku predstavljamo, kako se lahko najsodobnejše tehnike strojnega učenja in besedilnega rudarjenja uporabljajo za gradnjo učinkovitih sistemov za odkrivanje uživanja snovi na družbenih omrežjih. Ker je resnico o uporabi snovi težko doseči v velikem obsegu, da bi povečali učinkovitost sistema, raziskujemo različne metode učenja funkcij brez nadzora, da bi izkoristili veliko količino podatkov o družbenih omrežjih brez nadzora. Prikazujemo tudi prednost uporabe več ogledov nenadzorovanega učenja funkcij za združevanje heterogenih informacij o uporabnikih, kot sta Facebook 'všeč' in 'posodobitve stanja', da bi izboljšali delovanje sistema. Na podlagi naše ocene so naši najboljši modeli dosegli 86% AUC za napovedovanje uživanja tobaka, 81% za uživanje alkohola in 84% za uživanje prepovedanih drog, kar je bistveno preseglo obstoječe metode. Naša raziskava je odkrila tudi zanimive odnose med vedenjem uporabnika na družbenih omrežjih (npr. uporabo besed) in uporabo snovi.", 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྩལ་བ་འདིའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་། ལས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག Since a substance use ground truth is difficult to obtain on a large scale, to maximize system performance, we explore different unsupervised feature learning methods to take advantage of a large amount of unsupervised social media data. We also demonstrate the benefit of using multi-view unsupervised feature learning to combine heterogeneous user information such as Facebook 'likes' and 'status updates' to enhance system performance. ང་ཚོའི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྩལ་བ་ནི་86% སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་དེ་དག་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དང་བྱ་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་དང་།"}
{'en': 'Demographic-aware word associations', 'pt': 'Associações de palavras com reconhecimento demográfico', 'es': 'Asociaciones de palabras con conciencia demográfica', 'ar': 'جمعيات الكلمات المهتمة بالديموغرافيا', 'fr': 'Associations de mots sensibles à la démographie', 'ja': '人口統計学的に認識される単語の関連付け', 'zh': '口计感知词关', 'ru': 'Демографически осведомленные ассоциации слов', 'hi': 'जनसांख्यिकीय-जागरूक शब्द संघों', 'ga': 'Cumainn focal atá feasach ar dhéimeagrafach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Συνδέσεις λέξεων με δημογραφική συνείδηση', 'hu': 'Demográfiailag ismert szótársulások', 'it': 'Associazioni di parole a conoscenza demografica', 'kk': 'Демографиялық мәліметтер қосымшалары', 'lt': 'Demografiškai žinomos žodžių asociacijos', 'mk': 'Здруженија на зборови со демографска свест', 'ms': 'Persatuan perkataan yang sedar-demografik', 'ml': 'ഡെമോഗ്രാഫിക് അറിയുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kliem demografiċi konxji', 'mn': 'Демографик мэдэх үгний холбоо', 'no': 'Ordassociasjonar med demografikk', 'ro': 'Asociații de cuvinte conștiente de demografie', 'pl': 'Skojarzenia słów demograficznych', 'sr': 'Демографски свестни речни ассоциации', 'so': 'Ururada hadalka dadku-aqoonsan', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරජාතික වචන සම්බන්ධය', 'sv': 'Demografiskt medvetna ordassociationer', 'ta': 'தெரியும் வார்த்தை இணைப்புகள்', 'ur': 'نماگرافیک جاننے والی کلمات متحد', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Demografske pridruživanja riječi', 'bg': 'Демографски наясно изразени асоциации', 'nl': 'Demografisch bewuste woordassociaties', 'da': 'Demografiske ordsammenslutninger', 'de': 'Demographisch bewusste Wortassoziationen', 'id': 'Asosiasi kata yang sadar demografi', 'fa': 'ارتباطات کلمه\u200cهای آگاهی دموگرافیک', 'ko': '인구통계학 인지 어휘 연상', 'sw': 'Demographic-aware word associations', 'tr': 'Sözler baglaşyklary görkez', 'sq': 'Shoqatat e fjalëve të ndërgjegjshme demografike', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Դեմոգրաֆիկ գիտակցած բառերի կապեր', 'am': 'የዲሞግራፊ ቃላት ማኅበረሰብ', 'az': 'Demographic-aware s칬z birlikl톛ri', 'bn': 'ডেমোগ্রাফিক-সচেতন শব্দ সংস্থা', 'ca': 'associacions demogràfiques de paraules', 'bs': 'Demografske svesne asocijacije riječi', 'cs': 'Slovní asociace s demografickým vědomím', 'et': 'Demograafilised sõnaseadmed', 'fi': 'Väestötietoiset sanayhdistykset', 'jv': 'Asociations', 'sk': 'Demografsko ozaveščena besedna združenja', 'he': 'ארגונות מילים מודעות לדמוגרפיה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྟོབས་བཞག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་འབྲེལ་ས།'}
{'en': 'Variations of word associations across different groups of people can provide insights into people’s psychologies and their world views. To capture these variations, we introduce the task of demographic-aware word associations. We build a new gold standard dataset consisting of word association responses for approximately 300 stimulus words, collected from more than 800 respondents of different gender (male / female) and from different locations (India / United States), and show that there are significant variations in the word associations made by these groups. We also introduce a new demographic-aware word association model based on a neural net skip-gram architecture, and show how computational methods for measuring word associations that specifically account for writer demographics can outperform generic methods that are agnostic to such information.', 'es': 'Las variaciones de las asociaciones de palabras entre los diferentes grupos de personas pueden proporcionar información sobre la psicología de las personas y su visión del mundo. Para capturar estas variaciones, introducimos la tarea de asociaciones de palabras con conciencia demográfica. Creamos un nuevo conjunto de datos estándar de oro que consiste en respuestas de asociación de palabras para aproximadamente 300 palabras de estímulo, recopiladas de más de 800 encuestados de diferentes géneros (hombres/mujeres) y de diferentes lugares (India/Estados Unidos), y mostramos que hay variaciones significativas en las asociaciones de palabras realizados por estos grupos. También presentamos un nuevo modelo de asociación de palabras con conciencia demográfica basado en una arquitectura de salto-grama de red neuronal, y mostramos cómo los métodos computacionales para medir las asociaciones de palabras que tienen en cuenta específicamente los datos demográficos de los escritores pueden superar a los métodos genéricos que son agnósticos a dicha información.', 'pt': 'Variações de associações de palavras em diferentes grupos de pessoas podem fornecer insights sobre a psicologia das pessoas e suas visões de mundo. Para capturar essas variações, introduzimos a tarefa de associações de palavras com conhecimento demográfico. Construímos um novo conjunto de dados padrão-ouro que consiste em respostas de associação de palavras para aproximadamente 300 palavras de estímulo, coletadas de mais de 800 respondentes de diferentes gêneros (masculino/feminino) e de diferentes locais (Índia/Estados Unidos), e mostramos que existem variações significativas nas associações de palavras feitas por esses grupos. Também apresentamos um novo modelo de associação de palavras com reconhecimento demográfico baseado em uma arquitetura de rede neural skip-gram e mostramos como os métodos computacionais para medir associações de palavras que levam em conta especificamente a demografia do escritor podem superar os métodos genéricos que são agnósticos a essas informações.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن توفر الاختلافات في ارتباطات الكلمات عبر مجموعات مختلفة من الناس رؤى حول نفسية الناس ووجهات نظرهم للعالم. لالتقاط هذه الاختلافات ، نقدم مهمة جمع الكلمات الديموغرافية. نحن نبني مجموعة بيانات قياسية ذهبية جديدة تتكون من استجابات ارتباط الكلمات لما يقرب من 300 كلمة تحفيزية ، تم جمعها من أكثر من 800 مشارك من جنس مختلف (ذكر / أنثى) ومن مواقع مختلفة (الهند / الولايات المتحدة) ، ونظهر أن هناك اختلافات كبيرة في كلمة الجمعيات التي قدمتها هذه المجموعات. نقدم أيضًا نموذجًا جديدًا لترابط الكلمات مع مراعاة الديموغرافيا استنادًا إلى بنية الشبكة العصبية للتخطي ، ونبين كيف يمكن للطرق الحسابية لقياس ارتباطات الكلمات التي تفسر على وجه التحديد التركيبة السكانية للكاتب أن تتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب العامة التي لا تراعي مثل هذه المعلومات.', 'fr': "Les variations des associations de mots entre différents groupes de personnes peuvent fournir un aperçu de la psychologie des personnes et de leur vision du monde. Pour saisir ces variations, nous introduisons la tâche des associations de mots sensibles à la démographie. Nous créons un nouveau jeu de données standard composé de réponses d'association de mots pour environ 300 mots de stimulation, collectées auprès de plus de 800 personnes de sexe différent (homme/femme) et de différents endroits (Inde/États-Unis), et montrons qu'il existe des variations significatives dans les associations de mots réalisés par ces groupes. Nous introduisons également un nouveau modèle d'association de mots sensible à la démographie basé sur une architecture de diagramme de saut de réseau neuronal, et montrons comment les méthodes de calcul pour mesurer les associations de mots qui tiennent compte spécifiquement de la démographie des auteurs peuvent surpasser les méthodes génériques qui ne tiennent pas compte de ces informations.", 'zh': '异类之单词,可以资心世界观之见。 为此变化,引入人计感知词所思也。 立一新金格数集,其中包出800多不同性别(男性/女性)与地点(印度/美国)受访者者约300刺激词单词相应,并明群体单词联有显异。 又引入一种神经网络跳过语法架构人口计感单词关联模样,并展示用测量专计人口统计数据的单词关联的计算法如何优于此信息无关通用。', 'hi': 'लोगों के विभिन्न समूहों में शब्द संघों की विविधताएं लोगों की मनोविज्ञान और उनके विश्व विचारों में अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान कर सकती हैं। इन विविधताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए, हम जनसांख्यिकीय-जागरूक शब्द संघों के कार्य का परिचय देते हैं। हम लगभग 300 उत्तेजना शब्दों के लिए शब्द संघ प्रतिक्रियाओं से मिलकर एक नया स्वर्ण मानक डेटासेट बनाते हैं, जो विभिन्न लिंग (पुरुष / महिला) के 800 से अधिक उत्तरदाताओं और विभिन्न स्थानों (भारत / संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिका) से एकत्र किया जाता है, और दिखाता है कि इन समूहों द्वारा किए गए शब्द संघों में महत्वपूर्ण भिन्नताएं हैं। हम एक तंत्रिका नेट स्किप-ग्राम आर्किटेक्चर के आधार पर एक नया जनसांख्यिकीय-जागरूक शब्द एसोसिएशन मॉडल भी पेश करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि विशेष रूप से लेखक जनसांख्यिकी के लिए खाते वाले शब्द संघों को मापने के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल तरीके सामान्य तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं जो इस तरह की जानकारी के लिए अज्ञेयवादी हैं।', 'ru': 'Различия в ассоциациях слов между различными группами людей могут дать представление о психологиях людей и их мировоззрениях. Чтобы охватить эти вариации, мы вводим задачу демографических ассоциаций слов. Мы создаем новый набор данных золотого стандарта, состоящий из ответов ассоциаций слов для приблизительно 300 стимулирующих слов, собранных из более чем 800 респондентов различного пола (мужчины/женщины) и из разных мест (Индия/Соединенные Штаты), и показываем, что существуют значительные различия в ассоциациях слов, сделанных этими группами. Мы также вводим новую модель ассоциаций демографических слов, основанную на архитектуре нейронных чистых пропусков, и показываем, как вычислительные методы для измерения ассоциаций слов, которые конкретно учитывают демографию автора, могут превосходить общие методы, которые являются агностическими для такой информации.', 'ja': 'さまざまな人々のグループにわたる言葉の関連付けのバリエーションは、人々の心理と彼らの世界観についての洞察を提供することができます。これらのバリエーションを取り込むために、人口統計学的に認識される単語の関連付けのタスクを紹介します。私たちは、さまざまな性別（男性/女性）とさまざまな場所（インド/米国）の800人以上の回答者から収集された約300の刺激ワードのワード関連応答からなる新しいゴールド標準データセットを構築し、これらのグループによって行われたワード関連に有意な変動があることを示します。また、ニューラルネットスキップグラムアーキテクチャに基づく新しい人口統計認識ワード関連モデルを導入し、ライター人口統計学を具体的に考慮したワード関連を測定するための計算手法が、そのような情報に不可知論的な一般的な手法を上回ることができることを示した。', 'ga': 'Is féidir le héagsúlachtaí ar chomhcheangail focal thar ghrúpaí éagsúla daoine léargais a sholáthar ar shíceolaíochtaí daoine agus ar a ndearcaí domhanda. Chun na héagsúlachtaí seo a ghabháil, tugaimid isteach an tasc a bhaineann le cumainn focal atá feasach ar dhéimeagrafach. Tógann muid tacar sonraí caighdeánach óir nua ina bhfuil freagraí comhlachais focal do thart ar 300 focal spreagtha, a bhailítear ó níos mó ná 800 freagróir d’inscne éagsúil (fireann / baineann) agus ó áiteanna éagsúla (An India/Stáit Aontaithe Mheiriceá), agus léirímid go bhfuil éagsúlachtaí suntasacha ann. sa bhfocal cumainn a dhéanann na grúpaí seo. Tugaimid isteach freisin samhail comhlachais focal atá feasach déimeagrafach bunaithe ar ailtireacht néar-scip-gram glan, agus taispeánann muid conas is féidir le modhanna ríomhaireachtúla chun comhlachais focal a thomhas a thugann cuntas sonrach ar dhéimeagrafaic na scríbhneoirí feidhmiú níos fearr ná modhanna cineálacha atá agnostic le faisnéis den sórt sin.', 'hu': 'A szóasszociációk különböző csoportok közötti változatai betekintést nyújthatnak az emberek pszichológiájába és világnézeteibe. E változatok megragadásához bemutatjuk a demográfiai szótársulások feladatát. Új aranyszabású adatkészletet építünk, amely körülbelül 300 stimuláló szóra adott válaszokból áll, amelyeket több mint 800 különböző nemű (férfi/nő) és különböző helyekről (India/Egyesült Államok) válaszadótól gyűjtöttünk össze, és azt mutatjuk, hogy ezek a csoportok jelentős eltérések vannak a szóasszociációkban. Bevezetünk egy új demográfiai tudatos szóasszociációs modellt, amely egy neurális hálózati skip-gram architektúrán alapul, és bemutatjuk, hogy a szóasszociációk mérésére szolgáló számítástechnikai módszerek, amelyek kifejezetten az író demográfiáját figyelembe veszik, hogyan teljesíthetnek túl általános módszereket, amelyek agnosztikusak az ilyen információkhoz.', 'el': 'Οι παραλλαγές των συσχετισμών λέξεων μεταξύ διαφορετικών ομάδων ανθρώπων μπορούν να παρέχουν πληροφορίες για τις ψυχολογίες των ανθρώπων και τις απόψεις τους για τον κόσμο. Για να συλλάβουμε αυτές τις παραλλαγές, εισάγουμε το έργο των δημογραφικών συσχετισμών λέξεων. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο χρυσό πρότυπο σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από απαντήσεις συσχέτισης λέξεων για περίπου 300 λέξεις ερεθίσματος, που συλλέγονται από περισσότερους από 800 ερωτηθέντες διαφορετικού φύλου (αρσενικό/θηλυκό) και από διαφορετικές τοποθεσίες (Ινδία/Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες), και δείχνουν ότι υπάρχουν σημαντικές διακυμάνσεις στις ενώσεις λέξεων που γίνονται από αυτές τις ομάδες. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης ένα νέο δημογραφικό μοντέλο συσχέτισης λέξεων βασισμένο σε μια αρχιτεκτονική νευρικού δικτύου και δείχνουμε πώς οι υπολογιστικές μέθοδοι για τη μέτρηση συσχετισμών λέξεων που αφορούν συγκεκριμένα τα δημογραφικά γραφήματα συγγραφέων μπορούν να ξεπεράσουν τις γενικές μεθόδους που είναι αγνωστικές σε τέτοιες πληροφορίες.', 'ka': 'ადამიანების სხვადასხვა ჯგუფების სიტყვების შეცვლები შეუძლიათ ადამიანების ფსიკოლოგიების და სამყაროს ხედვალების შესახებ. ამ გარიაციების შესახებ, ჩვენ დემოგრაფიკური შესახებ სიტყვების შესახებ დავიწყებთ. ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი მონაცემების სტანდარტური მონაცემების სტანდარტული დანაცემები, რომელიც ახალი სიტყვების შესახებ 300 სტიმულური სიტყვებისთვის, რომელიც 800-ზე მეტი განსხვავებული გენდერი (მაკაცი/ქალი) და განსხვავებული ადგი ჩვენ ასევე ახალი დემოგრაფიკური ახალი სიტყვების ახასუციაციის მოდელი, რომელიც ნეიროლური ნეიროლური ინტერქტიკური გადასვლა და როგორ კომპუტიკაციური მეტი სიტყვების ახასუციაციების განზომილებისთვის, რომელიც განსაკ', 'it': "Variazioni di associazioni di parole tra diversi gruppi di persone possono fornire approfondimenti sulle psicologiche delle persone e sulle loro visioni del mondo. Per cogliere queste variazioni, introduciamo il compito di associazioni di parole consapevoli della popolazione. Costruiamo un nuovo dataset gold standard composto da risposte di associazione di parole per circa 300 parole di stimolo, raccolte da più di 800 intervistati di sesso diverso (maschio/femmina) e da diverse località (India/Stati Uniti), e mostriamo che ci sono variazioni significative nelle associazioni di parole fatte da questi gruppi. Introduciamo anche un nuovo modello di associazione di parole demografica basato su un'architettura di skip-gram della rete neurale, e mostriamo come i metodi computazionali per misurare le associazioni di parole che specificamente tengono conto della demografia degli scrittori possano superare i metodi generici agnostici a tali informazioni.", 'lt': 'Skirtingos žodžių asociacijos įvairiose žmonių grupėse gali suteikti supratimą apie žmonių psichologiją ir jų pasaulinį požiūrį. Siekiant išsaugoti šiuos skirtumus, įvedame demografiškai suprantamų žodžių asociacijų užduotį. Mes sukuriame naują aukso standartinį duomenų rinkinį, sudarytą iš žodžių asociacijos atsakymų apie 300 stimuliavimo žodžių, surinktų iš daugiau kaip 800 skirtingos lyties (vyrų ir moterų) ir skirtingų vietų (Indijos ir Jungtinių Amerikos Valstijų) respondentų, ir rodome, kad šių grupių žodžių asociacijos labai skiriasi. Taip pat įvedame naują demografiškai žinomą žodžių asociacijos model į, pagrįstą neuraline tinklo skip-gram architektūra, ir parodysime, kaip skaičiavimo metodai žodžių asociacijų matavimui, kurie konkrečiai atspindi rašytojų demografiją, gali viršyti bendruosius metodus, kurie yra agnostiniai tokiai informacijai.', 'mk': 'Разни зборни здруженија во различни групи луѓе можат да обезбедат информации за психологијата на луѓето и нивните светски погледи. За да ги фатиме овие варијации, ја воведуваме задачата на демографските зборни здруженија. Ние изградуваме нов златен стандарден податок кој се состои од одговори на зборовите асоцијација за околу 300 зборови стимул, собрани од повеќе од 800 испитаници од различни полови (маж/жена) и од различни локации (Индија/САД), и покажуваме дека постојат значителни варијации во зборовите асоцијации направени We also introduce a new demographic-aware word association model based on a neural net skip-gram architecture, and show how computational methods for measuring word associations that specifically account for writer demographics can outperform generic methods that are agnostic to such information.', 'kk': 'Адамдардың әртүрлі топтарындағы сөздердің айнымалылығы адамдардың психологиясына және әлемдік көрінісіне қарай алады. Бұл өзгерістерді түсіндіру үшін, демографиялық сөздер қосымшаларының тапсырмасын таңдаймыз. Біз жаңа алтын стандартты деректер жиынын құрамыз, сол жерде 300 стимул сөздерінің жауаптары бар. Бұл топтардың 800 көп жауаптарынан (эркек/әйел) және түрлі жергіліктерінен (Индия/АҚШ) сәйкестіктерінен сәйкестіктерінің жауаптары Мұндай-ақ біз жаңа демографикалық түсініктер үлгісін негізделген невралдық желі ауыстыру архитектурасына келтіріп, жазушылардың демографиялық тіркелгісінің негізделген сөздерді өлшеу әдістерін көрсету әдістерін көрсету әдістері', 'mt': 'Varjazzjonijiet ta’ assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kliem bejn gruppi differenti ta’ nies jistgħu jipprovdu għarfien dwar il-psikoloġiji tan-nies u l-fehmiet tad-dinja tagħhom. Biex inqabdu dawn il-varjazzjonijiet, aħna nintroduċu l-kompitu ta’ assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kliem li huma konxji mid-demografija. Aħna nibnu sett ġdid ta’ dejta standard tad-deheb li jikkonsisti minn reazzjonijiet ta’ assoċjazzjoni tal-kliem għal madwar 300 kelma stimulus, miġbura minn aktar minn 800 persuna li wieġbu ta’ sess differenti (irġiel/nisa) u minn postijiet differenti (Indja/Stati Uniti), u nuru li hemm varjazzjonijiet sinifikanti fl-assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kliem magħmula minn dawn il-gruppi. Aħna nintroduċu wkoll mudell ġdid ta’ assoċjazzjoni tal-kelmiet li jkun konxju mid-demografija bbażat fuq arkitettura ta’ skip-gram tan-netwerk newrali, u nuru kif metodi komputattivi għall-kejl tal-assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kelmiet li jikkunsidraw speċifikament id-demografija tal-kittieb jistgħu jwettqu metodi ġeneriċi li huma agnostiċi għal tali informazzjoni.', 'ms': 'Perubahan persekutuan perkataan di antara kumpulan-kumpulan yang berbeza orang boleh memberikan pandangan tentang psikologi orang dan pandangan dunia mereka. Untuk menangkap variasi ini, kita memperkenalkan tugas persekutuan kata-kata yang sedar-demografik. Kami membina set data piawai emas baru yang terdiri dari jawapan persekutuan perkataan untuk kira-kira 300 perkataan stimulus, dikumpulkan dari lebih dari 800 respondent dari jenis yang berbeza (lelaki/perempuan) dan dari lokasi yang berbeza (India/Amerika Syarikat), dan menunjukkan bahawa terdapat variasi yang signifikan dalam persekutuan perkataan yang dibuat oleh kumpulan-kumpulan ini. Kami juga memperkenalkan model persekutuan perkataan yang sedar-demografi yang baru berdasarkan arkitektur jaringan saraf skip-gram, dan menunjukkan bagaimana kaedah pengiraan untuk mengukur persekutuan perkataan yang secara khusus akaun demografik penulis boleh melampaui kaedah generik yang agnostik kepada maklumat seperti itu.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ സംഘങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ജനങ്ങളുടെ സൈക്കോളജികളിലും അവരുടെ ലോകത്തിലുള് ഈ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡെമോഗ്രാഫിക് വാക്കുകളുടെ ജോലി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ സ്റ്റാര്\u200dഡാറ്റാണ്ടാല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഏകദേശം 300 വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികളില്\u200d ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റ് സ്പിപ്പ്-ഗ്രാമ് സ്കൂട്ടിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു പുതിയ ഡെമോഗ്രാഫിക് വാക്ക് സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകയും കാണിക്കുന്', 'pl': 'Zmiany skojarzeń słowowych w różnych grupach ludzi mogą zapewnić wgląd w psychologię ludzi i ich światopoglądy. Aby uchwycić te odmiany, wprowadzamy zadanie demograficznych skojarzeń słowowych. Stworzyliśmy nowy zestaw danych złotego standardu składający się z odpowiedzi na skojarzenia słów dla około 300 słów bodźców, zebranych od ponad 800 respondentów różnej płci (mężczyzna/kobieta) i z różnych lokalizacji (Indie/Stany Zjednoczone), i pokazujemy, że istnieją znaczące różnice w skojarzeniach słów dokonywanych przez te grupy. Wprowadzamy również nowy demograficzny model skojarzeń słowowych oparty na architekturze skip-gramu sieci neuronowej i pokazujemy, jak metody obliczeniowe do pomiaru skojarzeń słowowych, które specjalnie uwzględniają demografię autorów, mogą przewyższyć ogólne metody agnostyczne dla takich informacji.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн олон хэсэгт хэлбэрүүдийн өөрчлөлт хүмүүсийн психологи болон ертөнцийн үзэл бодлогыг харуулж чадна. Эдгээр өөрчлөлтийг авахын тулд бид ардчилсан үг холбоонуудын ажил илтгэдэг. Бид шинэ алтын стандарт өгөгдлийн сангуудыг бүтээж, ойролцоогоор 300 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үгүүдийн хариулт, 800 гаруй олон хүний (эрчүүд/эмэгтэйчүүд) болон өөр орнуудаас (Энэтхэг/АНУ) цуглуулсан бөгөөд эдгээр бүлгүүдийн холбоотой үгүүдийн туха Мөн бид сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний архитектур дээр суурилсан шинэ демографик ойлгомжтой үг хамтын загварыг тайлбарлаж, зохиолчдын демографикийн хувьд ямар тооны архивчлалыг хэмжих вэ гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Variațiile asociațiilor de cuvinte în diferite grupuri de oameni pot oferi perspective asupra psihologiilor oamenilor și viziunile lor asupra lumii. Pentru a surprinde aceste variații, introducem sarcina asociațiilor de cuvinte conștiente de demografie. Construim un nou set de date gold standard constând în răspunsuri de asociere a cuvintelor pentru aproximativ 300 de cuvinte stimulare, colectate de la mai mult de 800 de respondenți de sex diferit (bărbat/femeie) și din locații diferite (India/Statele Unite), și arată că există variații semnificative în asocierile cuvintelor făcute de aceste grupuri. Introducem, de asemenea, un nou model de asociere demografică bazat pe o arhitectură neuronală de tip "skip-gram" și arătăm cum metodele computaționale de măsurare a asocierilor de cuvinte care explică în mod specific demografia scriitorilor pot depăși metodele generice care sunt agnostice pentru astfel de informații.', 'no': 'Variasjonar av ordsamlingar i ulike grupper av menneske kan gjere innsyningar i menneske psihologi og verdenssyningar. For å få opp desse variasjonane, introduserer vi oppgåva av demografiske ordsamlingar. Vi bygger eit nytt gullsstandard dataset som inneheld av ordsamordsvar for omtrent 300 stimulatorord, samla frå meir enn 800 respondentar av ulike seks (menn/kvinne) og frå ulike stader (India/USA), og viser at det er signifikante variasjonar i ordsamlingane som er lagt av desse gruppene. Vi introduserer også ein ny demografisk merkelig ordassosisjonsmodell basert på ein neuralt nettskip-gram-arkitektur, og viser korleis datamaskinelle metodar for å måle ordassosisjonane som spesielt konto for skrivedemografikk kan utføre generelle metodar som er agnostisk til slike informasjon.', 'sr': 'Razlika reèi asocijacija u raznim grupama ljudi mogu pružiti uvid u ljudske psihologije i njihove svetske poglede. Da bi uhvatili ove varijacije, predstavljamo zadatak demografskih svesnih udruženja riječi. Napravili smo novu standardnu podatku zlata koja se sastoji od odgovora na reči asocijacije za približno 300 reči stimulus a, prikupljenih od više od 800 odgovornika različitih spola (muškarac/žena) i iz različitih lokacija (Indija/Sjedinjene Države), i pokazuju da postoje značajne razlike reči koje su napravljene ovim grupama. Takoðe predstavljamo novi model asocijacije reèi na osnovu arhitekture neuralne mreže preskoèi i pokažemo kako raèunalne metode za mjerenje asocijacija reèi koje posebno raèunaju za demografiju pisaca mogu izvršiti generiène metode koje su agnostične na takve informacije.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන්ගේ වෙනස් කණ්ඩායම් වචන සම්බන්ධයක් වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ මානසික විද්\u200dයාව සහ මේ වෙනස් විදියට අල්ලගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරජාතික වචන සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගැන ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා. අපි නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ අලුත් රත්තර ස්ථානය දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක වචනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් වචනය 300 stimulans වචනය, සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් 800 ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ස අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරජාතිකාරය සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට අධාරිත විදියට පෙනුම් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂණ විදියට පෙනුම් කරනවා කිය', 'sv': 'Variationer av ordassociationer mellan olika grupper av människor kan ge insikter i människors psykologier och deras världssyn. För att fånga upp dessa variationer introducerar vi uppgiften med demografiska ord associationer. Vi bygger en ny guldstandard datauppsättning bestående av ordassociationssvar för cirka 300 stimulansord, insamlade från mer än 800 respondenter av olika kön (man/kvinna) och från olika platser (Indien/USA), och visar att det finns betydande variationer i ordassociationer gjorda av dessa grupper. Vi introducerar också en ny demografisk medveten ordassocieringsmodell baserad på en neuralt nät hoppa-gram arkitektur, och visar hur beräkningsmetoder för att mäta ordassociationer som specifikt redovisar författardemografi kan överträffa generiska metoder som är agnostiska till sådan information.', 'ta': 'வேறு குழுக்களில் உள்ள வார்த்தை இணைப்புகளின் மாறுபாடுகள் மக்களின் மனநிறைவுகள் மற்றும் உலக பார்வைகளை கொடுக்க இந்த மாறுபாடுகளை பிடிப்பதற்கு, நாம் குறிப்பிட்டுவிட்ட வேலையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய தங்கக் தரவுத்தளத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் சொல்லும் இணைப்பு வார்த்தைகளுக்கு பதில்கள் கூடிய 300 வார்த்தைகளில் உள்ளது, வேறு ஆண்/பெண்களில் இருந்து சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள் நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தை சம்பந்தம் மாதிரி அடிப்படையில் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது போன்ற தகவல்களுக்கு குறிப்பிட்ட கணக்கிடும் முறைகளை காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'so': 'Ururada hadalka kala duduwan ee kooxo kala duduwan oo dadka ka mid ah waxay ka heli karaan aragtida dhimirka dadka iyo aragtida adduunka. Si aan u qabno isbedelyadan, waxaynu u sameynaa ururada hadalka ee dadku yaqaan. Waxaynu dhisnaa koox cusub oo u dhow 300 hadal oo iskuul ah oo ka mid ah qofka ka shaqeeya 800 ka badan jinsi (lab/dhaddig) iyo meelo kala duduwan (Hindiya/Mareykanka), waxaana muujinaynaa inay leedahay is-beddelooyin aad u badan oo ka mid ah ururada ereyga ee ay kooxdaas sameeyeen. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa tusaale cusub oo ay ku saleysan dhismaha internetka ee neurada ah ee boogo-gram, waxaana tusnaa sidoo kale qaabab xisaab ah oo lagu qiyaaso ururada hadalka, kuwaas oo gooni ah xisaabta qofka qoraya ku qoran karo waxay sameyn karaan qaababka caadiga ah oo macluumaadkaas ku saabsan.', 'ur': 'لوگوں کے مختلف گروہوں میں کلمات کے متفرق متفرق لوگوں کے روانشناسی اور دنیا کی نظر میں بصیرت حاصل کرسکتے ہیں. یہ تغییرات کو پکڑنے کے لئے، ہم دموگرافیک واقف لفظوں کے کام کو معلوم کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نوی سوندی استاندارد ڈاٹ سٹ بنایا ہے جس میں حدود 300 کلمات کے ساتھ شرکت کی جواب دینے والی ہے، جو 800 سے زیادہ مختلف جنس (مرد/عورت) اور مختلف جگہ (هند/ایالات متحدہ) سے جمع کئے گئے ہیں، اور دکھا دیتے ہیں کہ ان کلمات کی شرکتوں میں بہت اہم تغییر ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نئورل نیٹ اسکیپ-گرم معماری پر بنیاد رکھا ہے اور کس طرح کامپیوترال طریقے لکھنے کے لئے مطابق لکھنے والوں کے لئے حساب کرسکتے ہیں جو لکھنے والوں کی دموگرافیکوں کے لئے مخصوص حساب کرسکتے ہیں جو اس طرح کی اطلاعات کے لئے اگنستیک طریقے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Boshqa guruhlar guruhida so'zlar o'zgarishlari odamning psykologi va dunyo ko'rinishiga ko'rinishi mumkin. Ushbu varianlarni qabul qilish uchun, biz demografik so'zlar tashkilotlarini o'rganamiz. Biz yangi gull стандарт маълумотларни бино қилмоқдамиз, bu guruhlar bilan bir necha so'zlardan 800 dan ortiq xil (эркак/аёл) javob beradigan va har xil joylardan (Hindiston/АQSHларда) guruhlar yaratilgan so'zgarishlar mavjud. Biz yangi demographik soʻzni taʼminlovchi so'zlar bilan yangi foydalanuvchi modelini ishlatamiz va bu maʼlumot uchun qanday kompyuterni o'tirish usullarini ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu haqida yozuvchi demografikga muhit hisoblash uchun umumiy usullarni bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự biến đổi các liên lạc từ trong các nhóm người khác nhau có thể cung cấp hiểu biết về tâm lý học của người khác và quan điểm thế giới. Để nắm bắt được những biến đổi này, chúng tôi giới thiệu nhiệm vụ của các từ ngữ dân số. Chúng tôi xây dựng một bộ dữ liệu mẫu bằng vàng mới, gồm các câu trả lời từ liên kết với khoảng 300 từ kích thích, thu thập từ nhiều hơn 800 những người bình dân khác nhau (nam/nữ) và từ nhiều địa điểm khác nhau (Ấn Độ/Hoa Kỳ) và cho thấy có những biến đổi đáng kể trong các cụm từ liên kết của các nhóm này. Chúng tôi cũng sẽ giới thiệu một mô hình nhận dạng từ dân số mới dựa trên kiến trúc hạt và biểu hiện cách tính to án các cách đo các từ liên kết mà đặc biệt tính toán cho nhà văn có thể sử dụng các phương pháp ngoại ngữ chung mà vẫn chẩn đoán cho thông tin đó.', 'bg': 'Вариациите на думичните асоциации в различните групи хора могат да осигурят прозрения за психологията на хората и техните виждания за света. За да уловим тези вариации, ние въвеждаме задачата за демографски съзнателни словни асоциации. Изграждаме нов златен стандарт набор от данни, състоящ се от думи асоциации за приблизително 300 стимулни думи, събрани от повече от 800 анкетирани от различен пол (мъж/жена) и от различни места (Индия/САЩ), и показваме, че има значителни вариации в думичните асоциации, направени от тези групи. Въвеждаме и нов демографски ориентиран модел на асоцииране на думи, базиран на архитектура на невронна мрежа и показваме как изчислителните методи за измерване на асоциации на думи, които конкретно отчитат демографията на писателите, могат да надминат генеричните методи, които са агностични към такава информация.', 'da': 'Variationer af ordforeninger på tværs af forskellige grupper af mennesker kan give indsigt i folks psykologier og deres verdenssyn. For at fange disse variationer introducerer vi opgaven med demografiske bevidste ordforeninger. Vi bygger et nyt guldstandard datasæt bestående af ordassociationssvar for ca. 300 stimulus ord, indsamlet fra mere end 800 respondenter af forskelligt køn (mandlige/kvindelige) og fra forskellige steder (Indien/USA), og viser, at der er betydelige variationer i ordassociationer lavet af disse grupper. Vi introducerer også en ny demografisk bevidst ordassociationsmodel baseret på en neural net skip-gram arkitektur, og viser, hvordan beregningsmetoder til måling af ordassociationer, der specifikt beregner forfatterdemografi, kan overgå generiske metoder, der er agnostiske til sådanne oplysninger.', 'nl': 'Variaties van woordassociaties tussen verschillende groepen mensen kunnen inzicht geven in de psychologie van mensen en hun wereldbeeld. Om deze variaties vast te leggen, introduceren we de taak van demografisch bewuste woordassociaties. We bouwen een nieuwe gouden standaard dataset bestaande uit woordassociatiereacties voor ongeveer 300 stimuluswoorden, verzameld van meer dan 800 respondenten van verschillend geslacht (man/vrouw) en van verschillende locaties (India/Verenigde Staten), en tonen aan dat er significante variaties zijn in de woordassociaties gemaakt door deze groepen. We introduceren ook een nieuw demografisch bewust woordassociatiemodel gebaseerd op een neuraal net skip-gram architectuur, en laten zien hoe computationele methoden voor het meten van woordassociaties die specifiek rekening houden met schrijversdemografie, generische methoden kunnen overtreffen die agnostisch zijn voor dergelijke informatie.', 'de': 'Variationen von Wortassoziationen über verschiedene Personengruppen hinweg können Einblicke in die Psychologien und ihre Weltanschauungen geben. Um diese Variationen zu erfassen, führen wir die Aufgabe demografischer Wortassoziationen ein. Wir erstellen einen neuen Goldstandard-Datensatz bestehend aus Wortassoziationsantworten für etwa 300-Stimuluswörter, gesammelt von mehr als 800-Befragten unterschiedlichen Geschlechts (männlich/weiblich) und von verschiedenen Orten (Indien/USA), und zeigen, dass es signifikante Unterschiede in den Wortassoziationen dieser Gruppen gibt. Außerdem stellen wir ein neues demografisch-bewusstes Wortassoziationsmodell vor, das auf einer neuronalen Netz-Skip-Gram-Architektur basiert und zeigen, wie computergestützte Methoden zur Messung von Wortassoziationen, die speziell für Schreibdemographie verantwortlich sind, generische Methoden übertreffen können, die für solche Informationen agnostisch sind.', 'ko': '서로 다른 사람들 사이의 단어 연상의 변화는 사람들의 심리와 세계관에 대한 통찰을 제공할 수 있다.이러한 변화를 포착하기 위해 우리는 인구 통계가 어휘를 감지하고 연상하는 임무를 도입했다.우리는 약 300개의 자극적인 어휘 연상 반응을 포함한 새로운 금 표준 데이터 집합을 구축했는데 800여 명의 성별(남성/여성)과 장소(인도/미국)의 응답자 중에서 수집한 결과 이들 단체의 어휘 연상에 현저한 차이가 있음을 나타냈다.우리는 또한 새로운 신경 네트워크 구조를 바탕으로 하는 인구 통계 감지어 관련 모델을 소개하고 저자의 인구 통계를 전문적으로 묘사하는 단어 관련 측정 계산 방법이 이런 정보에 대해 알 수 없는 통용적인 방법보다 어떻게 우수한지 보여 주었다.', 'id': 'Variasi dari asosiasi kata di antara kelompok-kelompok yang berbeda orang dapat memberikan pengetahuan tentang psikologi orang dan pandangan dunia mereka. Untuk menangkap variasi ini, kami memperkenalkan tugas dari asosiasi kata yang sadar demografis. Kami membangun dataset standar emas baru yang terdiri dari respons asosiasi kata untuk sekitar 300 kata stimulus, dikumpulkan dari lebih dari 800 responden dari jenis yang berbeda (laki-laki/perempuan) dan dari lokasi yang berbeda (India/Amerika Serikat), dan menunjukkan bahwa ada variasi signifikan dalam asosiasi kata yang dibuat oleh kelompok-kelompok ini. Kami juga memperkenalkan model asosiasi kata demografi baru berdasarkan arsitektur jaringan saraf skip-gram, dan menunjukkan bagaimana metode komputasi untuk mengukur asosiasi kata yang spesifik menganggap demografi penulis dapat melampaui metode generik yang agnostik untuk informasi seperti itu.', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya makundi ya maneno katika makundi mbalimbali ya watu yanaweza kutoa maoni ya kisaikolojia na maoni yao ya dunia. To capture these variations, we introduce the task of demographic-aware word associations.  Tunaweza kutengeneza seti mpya ya taarifa za dhahabu yenye majibu ya jumuiya ya neno kwa takribani maneno 300 ya msimulizi, zilizokusanyika kutoka zaidi ya majibu 800 ya jinsia tofauti (wanaume/wanawake) na kutoka maeneo mbalimbali (India/Marekani), na kuonyesha kuwa kuna tofauti kubwa katika mashirika ya neno yaliyofanywa na makundi haya. Pia tunaonyesha muundo mpya wa ushirikiano wa neno maarufu wa demokrasia unaofahamika na ujenzi wa mtandao wa ubongo wa kuteketeza picha za gram, na kuonyesha namna mbinu za kompyuta za kuhesabu mashirika ya neno ambazo hususani kwa ajili ya uandishi wa demokrasia wanaweza kutengeneza njia za kawaida za taarifa hizo.', 'tr': 'Adamlaryň üýtgeşikleriniň üýtgeşikleri birnäçe toparda adamlaryň psihologiýasyna we dünýäleriniň pikirlerine üýtgedip biler. Bu üýtgeşmeleri çykmak üçin demografik bilen habarlaşyan söz baglaşyklarynyň işini tanyşdyrýarys. Biz 300 sany stimulus sözlerinde täze bir altyn standart veri setirmegi ýa şaýarys, 800 sanyndan köp adam (erkek/aýal) we farklı ýerlerden (Indiýa/ABŞ) toplanýan sözlerinde üýtgeşmeler bar we bu toparda eden sözlerin üýtgeşmeleri bar. Biz hem täze demografik bilen habarlanýan söz baglaşma nusgasyny neural net skip-gram arhitekturyna daýanýar we şol şekilde agnostik ýazmak üçin söz baglaşmalarynyň ölçüsi üçin hasaplanjak yöntemlerini görkez.', 'fa': 'تغییرات اتصال کلمات در گروه\u200cهای مختلف مردم می\u200cتوانند درباره روانشناسی مردم و دیدگاه جهانی آنها مشاهده دهند. برای اینکه این تغییرات را بگیریم، ما وظیفه اتصال کلمات را به دموگرافیک معرفی می کنیم. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای استاندارد طلا جدید ساخته\u200cایم که از پاسخ\u200cهای ارتباط کلمات برای حدود ۳۰۰ کلمات تحریک، از بیش از ۸۰۰ پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cهای جنسی متفاوت (مرد/زن) و از محل متفاوت (هند/ایالات متحده) جمع می\u200cشود، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که تغییرات بزرگی در تر ما همچنین یک مدل ارتباط کلمات جدید را با دانش دموگرافیک معرفی می کنیم که بر اساس یک معماری از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی پرتاب می\u200cکند، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که چگونه روش\u200cهای محاسباتی برای اندازه ارتباط\u200cهای کلمات را می\u200cتوانند مخصوصاً حساب\u200cهای دموگرافیک نویسنده\u200cها بتوانند روش', 'sq': 'Variatat e shoqatave të fjalëve nëpër grupe të ndryshme njerëzish mund të ofrojnë kuptime në psikologjinë e njerëzve dhe pikëpamjet e tyre botërore. Për të kapur këto variacione, ne prezantojmë detyrën e shoqatave të fjalëve të ndërgjegjshme demografike. Ne ndërtojmë një grup të ri të dhënash të standartit të artë që përbëhet nga përgjigjet e shoqërimit të fjalëve për rreth 300 fjalë stimuluese, të mbledhura nga më shumë se 800 të përgjigjur të gjinisë së ndryshme (mashkull/femër) dhe nga vende të ndryshme (India/Shtetet e Bashkuara) dhe tregojmë se ka ndryshime të rëndësishme në shoqërimet e fjalëve të bërë nga këto grupe Ne gjithashtu futim një model të ri të shoqërimit me fjalë të ndërgjegjshme demografike bazuar në një arkitekturë të rrjetit nervor skip-gram dhe tregojmë se si metodat kompjuterike për matjen e shoqërimit me fjalë që llogariten specifikisht për demografinë e shkrimtarëve mund të kalojnë metodat gjenerale që janë agnostike për të tillë informacioni.', 'af': "Veranderinge van woord asosiasies oor verskillende groepe van mense kan insigte verskaf in mense se psykologies en hulle wêreldsaansigte. Om hierdie veranderinge te vang, introduseer ons die taak van demografiese-bekende woord assosiasies. Ons bou 'n nuwe goue standaard datastel wat bestaan van woord assosiasie reaksies vir omtrent 300 stemmingswoorde, versamel van meer as 800 respondente van verskillende geneem (manne/vrou) en van verskillende liggings (Indië/Vereenigde Staatste), en wys dat daar betekende veranderinge is in die woord assosiasies wat deur hierdie groepe gemaak is. Ons introduseer ook 'n nuwe demografiese-bewyse woord assosiasie model gebaseer op 'n neurale net skip-gram-arkitektuur, en wys hoe rekenaasie metodes vir die maat van woord assosiasies wat spesifieke rekening vir skrywer demografies kan uitvoer genereeke metodes wat agnostik is vir sodanige inligting.", 'hy': 'Մարդկանց տարբեր խմբերի բառերի կապերի տարբերակները կարող են մարդկանց հոգեբանության և աշխարհի տեսանկյունից բացահայտել: Այս տարբերությունները նկարահանելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք դեմոգրաֆիկ գիտակցած բառերի կապերի խնդիրը: We build a new gold standard dataset consisting of word association responses for approximately 300 stimulus words, collected from more than 800 respondents of different gender (male/female) and from different locations (India/United States), and show that there are significant variations in the word associations made by these groups.  Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք նոր դեմոգրաֆիկ-գիտակցած բառերի կապվածության մոդել, որը հիմնված է նյարդային ցանց բաց-գրամ ճարտարապետության վրա, և ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես են բառերի կապվածությունների չափման հաշվարկների մեթոդները, որոնք հատկապես հաշվարկում են գրողների դեմոգրաֆի', 'am': 'የንግግር ማኅበረሰብ በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች መካከል የህዝቦች ሲኮሎጂ እና የዓለማዊ መልዕክቶች ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ እነዚህን መለያየት ለመያዝ፣ የዴሞግራፊ ቃላት ማኅበረሰቦችን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ከ800 በላይ የሴት (ወንድ/ሴት) መልዕክቶች እና ከሌሎች ቦታዎች (ህንድ/አሜሪካ) እና የሕንድ/አሜሪካ (ህንድ/አሜሪካ) የተለየ ቃላት ተቃውሞ የሚቆጠሩ አዲስ የወርቅ ድርጅት መዳረጃዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ አዲስ የዴሞግራፊ ቃላት ማኅበረሰብ የናቡራዊ መረብ ከግራም መሠረት የተመሠረተውን እናሳየዋለን፤ ለጻፊ አካባቢ የዲሞግራፊ ቃላት ማሰናከል የተደረገውን የቋንቋ ማኅበረሰቢያ እንዴት እንደምናስፈልገው ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন গ্রুপের বিভিন্ন দলের শব্দ সংস্থার বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে মানুষের মনোভাব এবং তাদের বিশ্বের দৃ এই ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গ্রেফতার করার জন্য আমরা গণতান্ত্রিক শব্দ সংস্থার কাজ পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। আমরা একটি নতুন সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ডেটাসেট তৈরি করি যেখানে প্রায় ৩০০ টি উৎসাহিত শব্দের প্রতিক্রিয়া রয়েছে, যেখানে বিভিন্ন লিঙ্গ (পুরুষ/মহিলা) এবং বিভিন্ন স্থান থেকে ৮ আমরা একটি নিউরুল নেট স্পিপ-গ্রাম স্কিটারের ভিত্তিতে একটি নতুন গণগ্রাফিক শব্দের সংস্থার মোডেল চিহ্নিত করে দেখাচ্ছি এবং কিভাবে শব্দ সংস্থার মাপ পরিমাপের জন্য গণতান্ত্', 'az': 'İnsanların müxtəlif dəstələrindəki s öz birliklərinin dəyişiklikləri insanların psihologiyalarına və dünyanın görünüşünə nəzər verə bilər. Bu dəyişiklikləri yakalamaq üçün, demografik bilikli söz birliklərinin işini tanıyırıq. Biz yeni qızıl standart verilənlərin qurulduğu qədər 300 stimulus sözlərinin cavab verməsi üçün istifadə edirik, 800-dən çox müxtəlif cins (erkək/qadın) və müxtəlif məqamların (Hindistan/ABŞ) tərəfindən toplanmış və bu qrupların əlaqələrində möhkəm dəyişikliklər olduğunu göstəririk. Biz də nöral a ğ atlama arhitektarına dayanan yeni demografik bilən söz birlikləri modelini təşkil edirik və bu məlumatlara agnostik olaraq yazıcı demografik üçün müəyyən edilən söz birliklərinin ölçüsünün necə hesabını çəkdiyini göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Razlika riječiju udruženja u različitim grupama ljudi mogu pružiti uvid u ljudske psihologije i njihove svjetske poglede. Da bi uhvatili ove varijacije, predstavljamo zadatak demografskih svesnih udruženja riječi. Napravili smo novu standardnu podatku zlata koja se sastoji od odgovora na riječi asocijacije za približno 300 reči stimulus a, prikupljenih od više od 800 odgovornika različitih spola (muškarac/žena) i iz različitih lokacija (Indija/Sjedinjene Države), i pokazuju da postoje značajne razlike u riječima koje su napravljene ovim grupama. Također predstavljamo novi model asocijacije riječi koji su demografički svjesni na temelju arhitekture neuralne mreže preskočivanja i pokazujemo kako računalne metode za mjerenje asocijacija riječi koje posebno računaju za demografiju pisaca mogu izvršiti generične metode koje su agnostične na takve informacije.', 'ca': "Variacions d'associacions de paraules entre grups diferents de persones poden proporcionar informació sobre la psicologia de la gent i la seva visió mundial. Per capturar aquestes variacions, introduim la tasca d'associacions de paraules demogràfics conscients. Construim un nou conjunt de dades d'or estàndard que consisteix en respostes d'associació de paraules per aproximadament 300 paraules d'estímul, recollides de més de 800 respostes de gènere diferent (home/dona) i de llocs diferents (Índia/Estats Units), i mostra que hi ha variacions significatives en les associacions de paraules fetes per aquests grups. També introduïm un nou model d'associació demogràfica de paraules basat en una arquitectura neuronal net skip-gram, i mostram com els mètodes computacionals per mesurar associacions de paraules que explicen la demogràfica de l'escriptor poden superar els mètodes genèrics que són agnòstics a aquesta informació.", 'hr': 'Raznolikosti riječnih udruženja u različitim grupama ljudi mogu pružiti uvid u ljudske psihologije i njihove svjetske mišljenje. Da bi uhvatili ove varijacije, predstavljamo zadatak demografskih svjesnih udruženja riječi. Napravili smo novu standardnu podatku zlata koja se sastoji od odgovora na riječi asocijacije za približno 300 riječi stimulus a, prikupljenih od više od 800 odgovornika različitih spola (muškarac/žena) i iz različitih lokacija (Indija/Sjedinjene Države), i pokazuju da postoje značajne razlike u riječima asocijacija koje su napravljene ovim grupama. Također predstavljamo novi model pridruživanja riječima koji su demografički svjesni na temelju arhitekture neuronskih mrežnih preskočivanja i pokazujemo kako računalne metode za mjerenje udruženja riječima koje posebno računaju za demografiju pisaca mogu izvršiti generične metode koje su agnostične na takve informacije.', 'cs': 'Variace slovních asociací napříč různými skupinami lidí mohou poskytnout pohled na psychologii lidí a jejich názory na svět. Pro zachycení těchto variací představujeme úkol demograficky orientovaných slovních asociací. Vytvořili jsme nový zlatý standard dat sestávající z odpovědí na asociaci slov pro přibližně 300 stimulační slova, shromážděných od více než 800 respondentů různého pohlaví (muž/žena) a z různých lokalit (Indie/Spojené státy), a ukazujeme, že existují významné rozdíly ve slovních asociacích těchto skupin. Představujeme také nový demografický model asociace slov založený na architektuře skip-gramu neuronové sítě a ukazujeme, jak výpočetní metody pro měření asociace slov, které konkrétně zohledňují demografii autorů, mohou překonat obecné metody, které jsou agnostické k těmto informacím.', 'et': 'Erinevate inimrühmade sõnaseoste variatsioonid võivad anda ülevaate inimeste psühholoogiast ja nende maailmavaatest. Nende variatsioonide jäädvustamiseks tutvustame demograafiliste sõnaseoste ülesannet. Ehitame uue kuldstandardi andmekogumi, mis koosneb umbes 300 stiimulisõnale vastavastusest sõnasõnale, mis on kogutud enam kui 800 vastajalt erinevast soost (mees/naine) ja erinevatest asukohtadest (India/Ameerika Ühendriigid), ning näitame, et nende rühmade sõnasuhted on märkimisväärselt erinevad. Samuti tutvustame uut demograafilist teadlikku sõnaseostumudelit, mis põhineb neurovõrgu skip-gram arhitektuuril ja näitame, kuidas arvutuslikud meetodid sõnaseoste mõõtmiseks, mis arvestavad spetsiaalselt kirjaniku demograafikat, võivad ületada üldisi meetodeid, mis on sellise teabe suhtes agnostilised.', 'fi': 'Sanayhdistelmien vaihtelut eri ihmisryhmissä voivat antaa oivalluksia ihmisten psykologioihin ja maailmankatsomuksiin. Näiden variaatioiden havaitsemiseksi esittelemme demografisesti tietoisen sanayhteyden tehtävän. Rakennamme uuden kultaisen standardin aineiston, joka koostuu noin 300 ärsykesanan sanaassosiaatiovasteista, jotka on kerätty yli 800 eri sukupuolen vastaajalta (mies/nainen) ja eri paikoista (Intia/Yhdysvallat), ja osoitamme, että näiden ryhmien sanaassosiaatioissa on merkittäviä eroja. Esittelemme myös uuden demografisesti tietoisen sanaassosiointimallin, joka perustuu neuroverkon skip-gram-arkkitehtuuriin, ja näytämme, miten laskennalliset menetelmät sanaassosioinnin mittaamiseksi, jotka erityisesti huomioivat kirjoittajan demografiikkaa, voivat olla parempia kuin geneeriset menetelmät, jotka ovat agnostisia tällaiselle tiedolle.', 'jv': 'Waring Ditawak dh챕w챕 ngerasakno karo hal-hal iki, awak dh챕w챕 nggawe barang langgambar barang nggambar barang. Awak dh챕w챕 nggawe awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk awak dh챕w챕 sing nyebutak챕 awak karo awak dh챕w챕 karo awak dh챕w챕 karo awak dh챕w챕, ngregani awak dh챕w챕 karo 8 apa sing luwih karo sing sampek (manuk/manuk) lan sak sampek kaya sak sampek (dagatan/Yukono) lan wong-wong kuwi nggawe barang langgar sampek Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk nambah model sing dibenalke pawang nggambar daeograf sing isin챕 supoyo sak architecture Neral net bukisak챕 nggambar, lan nambah sak sistem komputasi kanggo meh operasi pawang sing dipun nggambar akun kanggo ngakun tarjamahan', 'sk': 'Različice besednih združenj v različnih skupinah ljudi lahko zagotovijo vpogled v psihologijo ljudi in njihove poglede na svet. Za zajem teh variacij predstavljamo nalogo demografsko ozaveščenih besednih asociacij. Zgradili smo nov nabor podatkov zlatih standardov, sestavljen iz odzivov na združevanje besed za približno 300 stimulacijskih besed, zbranih od več kot 800 anketirancev različnih spolov (moški/ženska) in iz različnih lokacij (Indija/Združene države Amerike), ter pokazali, da obstajajo znatne razlike v združevanju besed v teh skupinah. Predstavljamo tudi nov demografsko ozaveščen model združevanja besed, ki temelji na arhitekturi nevronske mreže skip-gramov, in pokažemo, kako lahko računalniške metode za merjenje besednih združenj, ki posebej upoštevajo demografijo pisateljev, presežejo generične metode, ki so agnostične do takih informacij.', 'he': "Variations of word associations across different groups of people can provide insights into people's psychologies and their world views.  כדי לתפוס את ההחלטות האלה, אנחנו מציגים את המשימה של ארגוני מילים מודעים לדמוגרפיה. אנו בונים קבוצת מידע סטנדרטית זהב חדשה שמכילה תשובות של איגוד מילים בערך 300 מילים גירוי, שנאספו מעל 800 מגיבים של מין שונה (גבר/נשים) וממקומות שונים (הודו/ארצות הברית), ומראים שיש שונות משמעותיות באגודות מילים שנעשו על ידי הקבוצות הללו. אנחנו גם מציגים מודל חדש של איגוד מילים מודע לדמוגרפיה המבוסס על ארכיטקטורה רשת עצבית של דיקופ-גרם, ולהראות איך שיטות מחשבים למדוד איגודים מילים שמספציפים במיוחד לדמוגרפיה של סופרים יכולים להתגבר על שיטות גנרליות שאגנוסטיות למידע כזה.", 'ha': "Wasu'ar mutane da ke cikin ƙungiyõyi dabam-dabam daga mutane, yana iya iya ga gannai ga mutane da kalmõmi duniya. Domin ka kãma wannan variant, za mu fara aikin mutane da ke fahimta maganar da aka sani. Munã samar da wani danne na nau'in zĩnãriya wanda ke samun masĩfun mutane da ke samun su ga taki 300 maganar muhimmi, wanda aka samu daga ma'abũcin jini (namiji/mace) da kuma daga wurãre dabam-dabam (India/United Marekani), kuma munã nuna cewa akwai varianto mai girma a cikin maganar musamman da waɗannan ƙungiyõyi suka aikata. Tuna nuna wani misãlai na samun mutumari mai fahimta maganar mutane, a kan karatun matsayin na jerin sama-gram, kuma Mu nuna yadda na lissafa hanyoyin lissafi ga lissafa masu saurãre associations da ke ƙayyade kwamfyutan mutumci na rubũtar mutumci, za ta sami hanyoyin zartar da shiryoyin gijeni wanda ke samu ga wannan information.", 'bo': 'མི་མང་གི་ཚོ་ཁག་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་ཐོག་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་པའི་མི་དང་མི་མང་གི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་། ང་ཚོས་མི་སྟོན་པའི་ཁྱད་པར་འདི་དག་ལ་བཤད་ན་ང་ཚོས་རྩ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཁག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་བཤད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་གྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མི་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་པ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ཚོགས་ལ་ཁག་ཅིག་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་demographic-aware་ཡིག་གཟུགས་སྡུད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསརཔ་དང་སྟོན་དགོས་པ་ལྟར་རྩིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཚུ་ རྩིས'}
{'en': 'A Factored Neural Network Model for Characterizing Online Discussions in Vector Space', 'ar': 'نموذج شبكة عصبية عامل لتوصيف المناقشات عبر الإنترنت في فضاء المتجهات', 'es': 'Un modelo de red neuronal factorizado para caracterizar las discusiones en línea en el espacio vectorial', 'pt': 'Um modelo de rede neural fatorada para caracterizar discussões on-line no espaço vetorial', 'fr': "Un modèle de réseau neuronal factoriel pour caractériser les discussions en ligne dans l'espace vectoriel", 'ja': 'ベクトル空間でのオンラインディスカッションを特徴付けるための要因付きニューラルネットワークモデル', 'zh': '一以表征向量空中在线论因子神经网络模形', 'hi': 'वेक्टर अंतरिक्ष में ऑनलाइन चर्चा की विशेषता के लिए एक फैक्टरेड न्यूरल नेटवर्क मॉडल', 'ru': 'Факторизованная модель нейронной сети для характеристики онлайн-обсуждений в векторном пространстве', 'ga': 'Samhail Líonra Néarach Fachtóireach chun Cainteanna Ar Líne a Thréithriú sa Veicteoir Spás', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Tényezős neurális hálózati modell az online tárgyalások jellemzéséhez vektortérben', 'el': 'Ένα Παράγοντας Νευρικό Δίκτυο Μοντέλο για τον Χαρακτηρισμό των διαδικτυακών συζητήσεων στο Διανυσματικό Χώρο', 'it': 'Un modello di rete neurale fattorizzato per caratterizzare le discussioni online nello spazio vettoriale', 'kk': 'Вектор орындағы онлайн дискуссияларды таңдау үшін факторияланған неврал желі моделі', 'lt': 'Vektorinės erdvės diskusijų internetu charakteristikų nustatymo faktorių neutralaus tinklo modelis', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസില്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഫാക്ടറെഡ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d ശൃംഖല മോഡല്\u200dName', 'mt': 'Mudell tan-Netwerk Newrali Fatturat għall-Karatterizzazzjoni tad-Diskussjonijiet Onlajn fl-Ispazju tal-Vetturi', 'mn': 'Вектор орон зайд онлайн дискуссийг харьцуулахын тулд Факторд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Czynnikowy model sieci neuronowej do charakteryzowania dyskusji online w przestrzeni wektorowej', 'ro': 'Un model de rețea neurală factorat pentru caracterizarea discuțiilor online în spațiul vectorial', 'sr': 'Faktorirani model neuromreže za karakterizaciju online diskusija u vektorskom prostoru', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Factored Neural Network Model for Charactering Online Discussions in Vector Space', 'sv': 'En faktorerad neural nätverksmodell för karaktärisering av onlinediskussioner i vektorutrymme', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình mạng thần kinh đại nhân tạo cho việc vẽ tranh luận trực tuyến trong không gian Vector*.', 'bg': 'Модел на факторна неврална мрежа за характеризиране на онлайн дискусиите във векторното пространство', 'da': 'En faktoreret neural netværksmodel til karakterisering af online diskussioner i vektorrum', 'hr': 'Generirani model neuromreže za karakteriziranje online diskusija u vektorskom prostoru', 'nl': 'Een Factor Neural Netwerk Model voor het Karakteriseren van Online Discussies in Vectorruimte', 'de': 'Ein faktoriertes neuronales Netzwerkmodell zur Charakterisierung von Online-Diskussionen im Vektorraum', 'id': 'Model Rangkaian Neural Faktor untuk Menentukan Diskusi Online dalam Ruang Vektor', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Mtandao wa Neural kwa ajili ya Kuhusisha Mazungumzo ya Mtandaoni katika Sehemu ya Vector', 'ko': '벡터 공간에서 온라인 토론을 표징하는 인자 신경 네트워크 모델', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një model rrjeti neuronal faktorizuar për karakterizimin e diskutimeve në internet në hapësirën e vektorëve', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk diskusiýany vektör seleňinde karakterlerlemek üçin bir Taýral Hat nusgasy', 'am': 'Name', 'hy': 'Վեկտորային տարածքում առցանց քննարկումների առանձնահատկությունը', 'ca': "Un model de xarxa neuronal factor per caracteritzar les discussions en línia en l'espai vector", 'bn': 'অনলাইন আলোচনার জন্য ফ্যাক্টরেড নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল', 'cs': 'Faktorový neuronový síťový model pro charakterizaci online diskusí ve vektorovém prostoru', 'az': '敖瑫牯䄠慲쑬쒱쒟溱慤쐠溰整湲瑥䴠볃慺楫쥲沙駉楲楮䬠牡歡整楲決駉摮物쥭殙쌠쎼쎧溼䘠歡潴\u2072⁁鿄䴠摯汥੩', 'bs': 'Model Neuralne mreže za karakteriziranje online diskusija u vektorskom prostoru', 'fi': 'Factored Neural Network Model for Characterized Online Discussions in Vector Space', 'et': 'Faktoriga neurovõrgu mudel online arutelude iseloomustamiseks vektoriruumis', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Model faktorskega živčnega omrežja za karakterizacijo spletnih razprav v vektorskem prostoru', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་བསྟུན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་སྟོང་ནང་གི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྩོམ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'We develop a novel factored neural model that learns comment embeddings in an unsupervised way leveraging the structure of distributional context in online discussion forums. The model links different context with related language factors in the embedding space, providing a way to interpret the factored embeddings. Evaluated on a community endorsement prediction task using a large collection of topic-varying Reddit discussions, the factored embeddings consistently achieve improvement over other text representations. Qualitative analysis shows that the model captures community style and topic, as well as response trigger patterns.', 'ar': 'نحن نطور نموذجًا عصبيًا جديدًا مُعَوِّلًا يتعلم حفلات الزفاف بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة تستفيد من هيكل السياق التوزيعي في منتديات المناقشة عبر الإنترنت. يربط النموذج السياق المختلف بعوامل اللغة ذات الصلة في مساحة التضمين ، مما يوفر طريقة لتفسير عمليات التضمين المُصنَّعة. تم تقييمها بناءً على مهمة تنبؤ بالتأييد المجتمعي باستخدام مجموعة كبيرة من مناقشات Reddit المتغيرة للموضوع ، حيث تحقق الزخارف المصنّعة في العوامل تحسينًا باستمرار على تمثيلات النص الأخرى. يُظهر التحليل النوعي أن النموذج يلتقط أسلوب المجتمع وموضوعه ، بالإضافة إلى أنماط تحفيز الاستجابة.', 'es': 'Desarrollamos un modelo neuronal factorizado novedoso que aprende la incorporación de comentarios de forma no supervisada aprovechando la estructura del contexto distributivo en los foros de discusión en línea. El modelo vincula diferentes contextos con factores lingüísticos relacionados en el espacio de incrustación, proporcionando una forma de interpretar las incrustaciones factorizadas. Evaluadas en una tarea de predicción de respaldo de la comunidad utilizando una gran colección de discusiones de Reddit de diferentes temas, las incrustaciones factorizadas logran una mejora constante con respecto a otras representaciones de texto. El análisis cualitativo muestra que el modelo captura el estilo y el tema de la comunidad, así como los patrones de activación de la respuesta.', 'fr': "Nous développons un nouveau modèle neuronal factoriel qui apprend les intégrations de commentaires de manière non supervisée en tirant parti de la structure du contexte distributionnel dans les forums de discussion en ligne. Le modèle associe différents contextes à des facteurs linguistiques connexes dans l'espace d'intégration, fournissant ainsi un moyen d'interpréter les intégrations pondérées. Évalués sur une tâche de prédiction d'approbation de la communauté à l'aide d'une vaste collection de discussions Reddit sur différents sujets, les intégrations pondérées obtiennent constamment une amélioration par rapport aux autres représentations textuelles. L'analyse qualitative montre que le modèle saisit le style et le sujet de la communauté, ainsi que les modèles de déclenchement des réponses.", 'pt': 'Desenvolvemos um novo modelo neural fatorado que aprende a inserção de comentários de maneira não supervisionada, aproveitando a estrutura do contexto distribucional em fóruns de discussão online. O modelo vincula diferentes contextos com fatores de linguagem relacionados no espaço de incorporação, fornecendo uma maneira de interpretar as incorporações fatoradas. Avaliadas em uma tarefa de previsão de endosso da comunidade usando uma grande coleção de discussões do Reddit de tópicos variados, as incorporações fatoradas alcançam consistentemente melhorias em relação a outras representações de texto. A análise qualitativa mostra que o modelo captura o estilo e o tópico da comunidade, bem como os padrões de gatilho de resposta.', 'ja': '私たちは、オンラインのディスカッションフォーラムで分布コンテキストの構造を活用して、監督されていない方法でコメントの埋め込みを学ぶ、新しい因数分解ニューラルモデルを開発します。モデルは、埋め込みスペース内の関連する言語要素と異なるコンテキストをリンクし、係数付き埋め込みを解釈する方法を提供します。様々なトピックのRedditディスカッションの大規模なコレクションを使用して、コミュニティの推奨予測タスクで評価された要素付き埋め込みは、他のテキスト表現よりも一貫して改善を達成します。定性的分析は、モデルがコミュニティのスタイルとトピック、そして応答トリガーパターンを取り込むことを示しています。', 'zh': '开新因子神经模,在线论坛中布上下文,以无监督学注嵌。 其上下文与嵌空相关语言因子,供一说因子嵌之法。 用大Reddit议于社区,以子嵌终改于他文。 定性分析明,该模获社区风格及主题,及应触发模式。', 'hi': 'हम एक उपन्यास factored तंत्रिका मॉडल है कि एक unsupervised तरीके से ऑनलाइन चर्चा मंचों में वितरण संदर्भ की संरचना का लाभ उठाने में टिप्पणी embeddings सीखता है विकसित करते हैं. मॉडल एम्बेडिंग स्पेस में संबंधित भाषा कारकों के साथ विभिन्न संदर्भों को जोड़ता है, जो फैक्टर किए गए एम्बेडिंग की व्याख्या करने का एक तरीका प्रदान करता है। विषय-अलग Reddit चर्चाओं के एक बड़े संग्रह का उपयोग करके एक सामुदायिक समर्थन भविष्यवाणी कार्य पर मूल्यांकन किया गया, फैक्टर किए गए एम्बेडिंग लगातार अन्य पाठ अभ्यावेदनों पर सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं। गुणात्मक विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि मॉडल सामुदायिक शैली और विषय को कैप्चर करता है, साथ ही साथ प्रतिक्रिया ट्रिगर पैटर्न भी।', 'ru': 'Мы разрабатываем новую факторизованную нейронную модель, которая изучает вложения комментариев неконтролируемым образом, используя структуру распределительного контекста на онлайн дискуссионных форумах. Модель связывает различный контекст с родственными языковыми факторами в пространстве вложений, обеспечивая способ интерпретации факторизованных вложений. Оцениваемые по задаче прогнозирования одобрения сообщества с использованием большой коллекции варьирующихся по темам обсуждений Reddit, факторизованные вставки последовательно достигают улучшения по сравнению с другими текстовыми представлениями. Качественный анализ показывает, что модель захватывает стиль и тему сообщества, а также паттерны срабатывания ответа.', 'ga': 'Forbróimid múnla néarúil fachtóirithe úrnua a fhoghlaimíonn neadú tráchta ar bhealach gan maoirsiú agus leas á bhaint as struchtúr an chomhthéacs dáileacháin i bhfóraim phlé ar líne. Ceanglaíonn an tsamhail comhthéacs difriúil le fachtóirí teanga gaolmhar sa spás leabaithe, ag soláthar bealach chun na leabaithe fachtóirí a léirmhíniú. Déantar measúnú ar thasc tuar formhuinithe pobail ag baint úsáide as cnuasach mór de phlé Reddit a athraíonn ábhair, agus éiríonn leis na leabaithe fachtóirí feabhsú go seasta thar léirithe téacs eile. Léiríonn anailís cháilíochtúil go n-áirítear sa tsamhail stíl agus topaic phobail, chomh maith le patrúin spreagaithe freagartha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვითარებთ პრომენტის ფექტურული ნეიროლური მოდელი, რომელიც კომენტურების შემოწმების შემოწმების შემოწმების შემოწმება, რომელიც ინტერნეტიური დისუზიციის ფორმულში გადა მოდელი განსხვავებული კონტექსტის შესაბამისი ენის ფაქტორებით დაკავშირებული სივრცეში, რომელიც განსხვავებული ინტერფექტირებული ინტერფექტირების შესაბამისა საზოგადოებო სამუშაო მომხმარების გადაწყვეტილება, გამოყენებული დიდი ტექსტის განსხვავებული რედიტის განსხვავებების კოლექციაში, ფაქტორებული ინბექციები სხვა ტექსტის განსხვავებები კალგატიტური ანალიზი ჩვენებს, რომ მოდელმა საზოგადოებო სტილის და ტემისტის შესახებ, და რეაქტიური მოწყობილობა.', 'hu': 'Kifejlesztünk egy új faktorozott neurális modellt, amely felügyelet nélkül tanulja meg a kommentek beágyazását a disztribúciós kontextus struktúráját az online vitafórumokon. A modell összekapcsolja a különböző kontextusokat a beágyazási térben lévő kapcsolódó nyelvi tényezőkkel, így lehetővé teszi a faktorozott beágyazások értelmezését. Egy közösségi jóváhagyási előrejelzési feladat alapján értékelve a Reddit témakörben változó viták nagy gyűjteményével, a faktorozott beágyazások következetesen javulnak a többi szövegreprezentációhoz képest. A minőségi elemzés azt mutatja, hogy a modell rögzíti a közösségi stílust és témát, valamint a válasz aktiváló mintákat.', 'el': 'Αναπτύσσουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό μοντέλο που μαθαίνει την ενσωμάτωση σχολίων χωρίς επίβλεψη αξιοποιώντας τη δομή του κατανεμητικού πλαισίου σε διαδικτυακά φόρουμ συζήτησης. Το μοντέλο συνδέει διαφορετικό πλαίσιο με σχετικούς γλωσσικούς παράγοντες στο χώρο ενσωμάτωσης, παρέχοντας έναν τρόπο ερμηνείας των παραγόντων ενσωμάτωσης. Αξιολογούνται σε μια εργασία πρόβλεψης έγκρισης της κοινότητας χρησιμοποιώντας μια μεγάλη συλλογή συζητήσεων ποικίλων θεμάτων, οι ενσωματωμένες ενσωματώσεις επιτυγχάνουν σταθερά βελτίωση σε σχέση με άλλες αναπαραστάσεις κειμένου. Η ποιοτική ανάλυση δείχνει ότι το μοντέλο αποτυπώνει το στυλ και το θέμα της κοινότητας, καθώς και τα μοτίβα ενεργοποίησης απόκρισης.', 'it': "Sviluppiamo un nuovo modello neurale fattorizzato che impara l'incorporazione dei commenti in modo non supervisionato sfruttando la struttura del contesto distributivo nei forum di discussione online. Il modello collega diversi contesti con fattori linguistici correlati nello spazio di incorporazione, fornendo un modo per interpretare le incorporazioni fattoriali. Valutate in base a un'attività di previsione dell'approvazione della comunità utilizzando un'ampia raccolta di discussioni Reddit variabili su argomenti, le incorporazioni fattorizzate ottengono costantemente miglioramenti rispetto ad altre rappresentazioni di testo. L'analisi qualitativa mostra che il modello cattura lo stile e l'argomento della comunità, così come i modelli di trigger di risposta.", 'kk': 'Біз онлайн дискуссиялық форумында тарату контекстің құрылымын өзгерту үшін түсініктерді ендіру үшін оқытын романдық факториялық невралдық моделін құрамыз. Бұл үлгі ендіру орындағы тіл факторлармен басқа контексті сілтемелейді. Бұл факторлық ендіру үшін мәлімет береді. Жалпы мәтін таңбаларының үлкен жинақтарын қолдану тапсырмасының бақылау тапсырмасына бақылады. Бұл жалпы мәтін таңбаларының үлкен жинақтарын қолдану үшін, жалпы ендіру үшін бас Сапаттылық анализ үлгісі қоғамдық стилі мен нақышты, және жауап жегу үлгілерін алып тастайды.', 'lt': 'Sukuriame naują veiksnius turintį neurologinį model į, kuris išmoko komentarų įtraukimą nepastebimu būdu, suteikdamas svertą platinimo konteksto struktūrai internetiniuose diskusijų forumuose. Modelis susieja skirtingus kontekstus su susijusiais kalbos veiksniais įterpimo erdvėje ir suteikia galimybę aiškinti įterpiamus faktorius. Įvertintas bendruomenės pritarimo prognozavimo uždavinys, naudojant didelį teminių Reddit diskusijų rinkinį, su kuriais susiję elementai nuosekliai siekia geresnių rezultatų nei kiti tekstai. Kokybinė analizė rodo, kad modelis apima bendruomenės stilą ir temą, taip pat reagavimo skatinimo modelius.', 'mk': 'Развиваме нов факториран нервен модел кој научи да коментира внатрешни коментари на ненадгледуван начин, користејќи ја структурата на дистрибуционалниот контекст во онлајн дискусии форуми. Моделот го поврзува различен контекст со поврзаните јазички фактори во вставниот простор, обезбедувајќи начин за интерпретација на факторираните вставувања. Оценети во врска со задачата за предвидување на поддршката на заедницата користејќи голема колекција различни дискусии за Редит, факторираните вградувања постојано постигнуваат подобрување во однос на другите текстови претставувања. Квалитативната анализа покажува дека моделот го прифаќа стилот и темата на заедницата, како и моделите за активирање на одговорот.', 'ms': 'Kami mengembangkan model saraf faktor baru yang mempelajari penyampaian komentar dalam cara yang tidak diawasi menggunakan struktur konteks distribusi dalam forum diskusi online. Model paut konteks yang berbeza dengan faktor bahasa berkaitan dalam ruang penyampaian, menyediakan cara untuk menerangkan penyampaian faktor. Dihargai pada tugas prediksi sokongan komuniti menggunakan koleksi besar diskusi Reddit yang berbeza-topik, penerbangan faktor secara konsisten mencapai peningkatan atas perwakilan teks lain. Analisis kualitif menunjukkan bahawa model menangkap gaya komuniti dan topik, serta corak pemicu balas.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അഭിപ്രായം പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d വിതരണ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളുട ഇംബെഡിങ്ങ് സ്പെയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയുടെ ഫാക്ട്രിങ്ങുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി മോഡല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒരു വലിയ വിഷയത്തിലുള്ള റെഡിഡിറ്റ് ചര്\u200dച്ചകങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു സമൂഹത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഖ്യാപനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പേരില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണ മോഡല്\u200d സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ രീതിയിലും വിഷയത്തിലും പിടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നും പ്രതികരിക്കുന്ന രീതികളിലും', 'mt': 'Aħna niżviluppaw mudell newroloġiku fatturat ġdid li jitgħallem l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kummenti b’mod mhux sorveljat li jinbena l-istruttura tal-kuntest distributtiv f’forums ta’ diskussjoni onlajn. Il-mudell jorbot kuntest differenti ma’ fatturi lingwistiċi relatati fl-ispazju ta’ inkorporazzjoni, u jipprovdi mod kif jiġu interpretati l-inkorporazzjonijiet fatturati. Evalwat fuq kompitu ta’ tbassir ta’ approvazzjoni komunitarja bl-użu ta’ ġabra kbira ta’ diskussjonijiet dwar Reddit li jvarjaw skont is-suġġetti, l-inkorporazzjonijiet fatturati b’mod konsistenti jiksbu titjib fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet oħra tat-testi. Analiżi kwalitattiva turi li l-mudell jaqbad l-istil u s-suġġett tal-komunità, kif ukoll ix-xejriet li jistimulaw ir-rispons.', 'mn': 'Бид онлайн ярилцлагын форумуудад тархины байдлын бүтэц нөлөөлдөг шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй сэтгэл зүйн загварыг сурдаг. Загвар нь хоорондоо холбоотой хэл хүчин зүйлсийг холбоотой байрлалтай холбоотой. Энэ загвар нь хүчин зүйлсийг тодорхойлох аргыг олгодог. Нийгмийн санал дэмжих таамаглалтын даалгаварын талаар тодорхойлогдсон. Reddit-ын ярилцлагуудыг ашиглаж том цуглуулалт хийдэг. Сайн чанартай шинжилгээ нь нийгмийн хэлбэрийг, сэдэв, хариу үйлдвэрлэлийн загварыг нь барьж авдаг.', 'no': 'Vi utviklar eit romant faktorisert neuralmodell som lærer innbygging av kommentarar på ein ugjennomsiktig måte å levera strukturen av distribusjonskontekst i nettdiskusjonsformar. Modellen lenkjer ulike kontekst med tilhøyrande språkfaktorer i innbyggingsrommet, og tilbyr ein måte å tolka dei faktorerte innbygginga. Evaluert på eit forhåndsvisningsoppgåve med store samling av diskusjonar med omsetjingar som varierer på Reddit, og den faktorerte innbygginga gjer konsekvent forbedring over andre tekstrepresentasjonar. Kvalitativ analyse viser at modellen inneheld samanhetsstil og emne, og mønsterelement for utløysing av svar.', 'pl': 'Opracowujemy nowy model neuronowy, który uczy się osadzania komentarzy w sposób bez nadzoru, wykorzystując strukturę kontekstu dystrybucyjnego na forach dyskusyjnych online. Model łączy różny kontekst z powiązanymi czynnikami językowymi w przestrzeni osadzania, zapewniając sposób interpretacji osadzeń współczynnikowych. Ocenione na zadaniu prognozowania poparcia społeczności przy użyciu dużej kolekcji różnych tematów dyskusji Reddit, osadzenia uwzględnione czynnikami konsekwentnie osiągają poprawę nad innymi reprezentacjami tekstowymi. Analiza jakościowa pokazuje, że model uwzględnia styl i temat społeczności, a także wzorce wyzwalania odpowiedzi.', 'ro': 'Dezvoltăm un nou model neural factored care învață încorporarea comentariilor într-un mod nesupravegheat, valorificând structura contextului distribuțional în forumurile de discuții online. Modelul leagă contextul diferit cu factorii lingvistici asociați în spațiul de încorporare, oferind o modalitate de interpretare a încorporărilor factorizate. Evaluate pe baza unei sarcini de predicție a aprobării comunității utilizând o colecție largă de discuții Reddit care variază subiectele, încorporările factorizate obțin în mod constant îmbunătățiri față de alte reprezentări de text. Analiza calitativă arată că modelul surprinde stilul comunității și subiectul, precum și modelele de declanșare a răspunsului.', 'sr': 'Mi razvijamo roman faktorizirani neuralni model koji nauèi integraciju komentara na neodređen način uticaja na strukturu distribucijskog konteksta u internetskim forumima. Model povezuje različite kontekste sa vezanim jezičkim faktorima u ugrađenom prostoru, pružajući način za interpretaciju faktoriranih ugrađenja. Procjenjeno na zadatku predviđanja podrške zajednice koristeći veliku kolekciju raznih diskusija o Reddit-ovim temama, faktorirani integraciji stalno postižu poboljšanje preko drugih tekstskih predstavljanja. Kvalitativna analiza pokazuje da model uhvati društveni stil i tema, kao i obrazac okidača odgovora.', 'so': 'Waxaynu horumarinaynaa model neurada ah oo ku barta commentarka ka mid ah si a an u ilaalinayn qaab aan u soo dirno dhismaha kooxaha kala qaybsan ee ku qoran jardiinada hadalka internetka. Tusaale wuxuu ku xiriiraa noocyo kala duduwan oo la xiriira arrimaha luuqada ee ku jira goobta gudaha, kaas oo leh qaab lagu turjumo qalabka lagu soo bandhigay. Evaluated on a community endorsement prediction task using a large collection of topic-varying Reddit discussions, the factored embeddings consistently achieve improvement over other text representations.  Shahaadada takhasusku wuxuu muujiyaa in modelku qabsadaa qaababka bulshada iyo mada, sidoo kale qaababka dib u dhigta.', 'sv': 'Vi utvecklar en ny faktorerad neural modell som lär sig kommentarsinbäddningar på ett oövervakat sätt och utnyttjar strukturen i distributionskontext i online diskussionsforum. Modellen kopplar samman olika sammanhang med relaterade språkfaktorer i inbäddningsutrymmet, vilket ger ett sätt att tolka faktorerade inbäddningar. De faktorerade inbäddningarna utvärderas utifrån en prediktionsuppgift för communityn med hjälp av en stor samling av ämnesvarierande Reddit-diskussioner och förbättrar konsekvent jämfört med andra textrepresentationer. Kvalitativ analys visar att modellen fångar community stil och ämne, samt responstriggermönster.', 'ta': 'We develop a novel factored neural model that learns comment embeddings in an unsupervised way leveraging the structure of distributional context in online discussion forums.  Name ஒரு சமுதாயத்திற்கு ஆதரிப்பு முன்வார்ப்பு பணியில் மதிப்பு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஒரு பெரிய தலைப்பு விளக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்தி, காரணிக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீ தரமான ஆராய்ச்சி மாதிரி சமூகத்தின் பாணி மற்றும் தலைப்புகளை பிடித்துக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது, மற்றும் பதில் து', 'si': 'අපි නිර්මාණයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් එකක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා ඒක අන්තර්ජනය කතා කරනවා කියලා කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නො මොඩේල් සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව සඳහා වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සඳහා සමාජ විශ්වාස කරනවා විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩේල් එක සමාජ විදේශය සහ විදේශය, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්ණ', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک روزنامہ کائنال کی تصویر کی نائرول موڈل کی پیدائش کی ہے جس نے توضیح کی مثالیں آنلاین بحث فورموں میں تقسیم کی ساختار کی تدبیریوں کے مطابق غیرقابل طریقے سے سکھائی ہیں۔ Model links different context with related language factors in the embedding space, providing a way to interpret the factored embedding. ایک کمونٹی کی تصدیق کی پیش بینی کا کام پر ایک بڑی سرگوشی کی مختلف سرگوشیوں کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے، فناکٹ کیے ہوئے انڈینگ دوسرے ٹیکسٹ نمونٹ کے ذریعے بہترین ترجیح حاصل کرتے ہیں. کیلوٹیٹیو تحلیل دکھاتا ہے کہ موڈل کمونٹی طریقے اور ٹوپ کو پکڑتا ہے، اور جواب ٹریگر پٹرنے کو بھی پکڑتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz yangi neyrolik modelini yaratishimiz, bu izohni saqlash muvaffaqiyatli tarqatish muvaffaqiyatlarida o'rganadi. Name Evaluated on a community endorsement prediction task using a large collection of topic-varying Reddit discussions, the factored embeddings consistently achieve improvement over other text representations.  Qualitatik analytika modeli jamiyat uslubi va mavzuni qabul qiladi va javob ishga tushirishni boshlaydi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình thần kinh nhân tạo mới học được sự nhúng góp ý của các lời bình luận trong một cách không giám sát dùng cấu trúc của ngữ cảnh phân phát trong các diễn đàn thảo online. Mô hình liên kết ngữ cảnh khác với các yếu tố ngôn ngữ liên quan trong khoảng không lắp ghép, cung cấp một cách để diễn tả sự nhúng phụ. Đánh giá dựa trên một nhiệm vụ dự đoán của cộng đồng dựa trên một loạt các cuộc thảo luận về dư bản khác nhau về chủ đề, Sự nhân tạo luôn đạt được cải thiện hơn các văn bản khác. Phân tích chất lượng cho thấy mô hình nắm bắt kiểu cộng đồng và chủ đề, cũng như các mô hình kích hoạt phản ứng.', 'da': 'Vi udvikler en ny faktoreret neural model, der lærer kommentarindlejringer på en uautoriseret måde ved at udnytte strukturen i distributionsmæssig kontekst i online diskussionsfora. Modellen forbinder forskellige kontekster med relaterede sprogfaktorer i indlejringsrummet, hvilket giver en måde at fortolke faktorerede indlejringer. Evalueret på grundlag af en forudsigelsesopgave for fællesskabsgodkendelse ved hjælp af en stor samling af emneområdevarierende Reddit-diskussioner, opnår faktorerede indlejringer konsekvent forbedringer i forhold til andre tekstrepræsentationer. Kvalitativ analyse viser, at modellen indfanger fællesskabsstil og emne samt responstriggermønstre.', 'nl': 'We ontwikkelen een nieuw factored neuraal model dat zonder toezicht commentaar insluitingen leert door gebruik te maken van de structuur van distributiecontext in online discussiefora. Het model koppelt verschillende context met verwante taalfactoren in de insluitruimte, waardoor een manier wordt geboden om de gefabriceerde insluitingen te interpreteren. De factored embeddings worden geëvalueerd op basis van een predictie-taak van de community met behulp van een grote verzameling van onderwerpen variërende Reddit-discussies en bereiken consistent verbetering ten opzichte van andere tekstrepresentaties. Kwalitatieve analyse toont aan dat het model communitystijl en onderwerp vastlegt, evenals responstriggerpatronen.', 'bg': 'Разработваме нов факториран невронен модел, който изучава вграждането на коментари по ненадзорен начин, използвайки структурата на дистрибуционния контекст в онлайн дискусионни форуми. Моделът свързва различен контекст със свързаните езикови фактори в вграденото пространство, осигурявайки начин за интерпретиране на факторните вграждания. Оценени по задача за прогнозиране на одобрението на общността, използвайки голяма колекция от дискусии в Редит, факторираните вграждания постоянно постигат подобрение в сравнение с други текстови представяния. Качественият анализ показва, че моделът улавя стила и темата на общността, както и моделите на задействане на реакциите.', 'hr': 'Razvijamo nov faktorizirani neuralni model koji uči uključenje komentara na neodređen način utjecaja na strukturu distribucijskog konteksta u internetskim forumima. Model povezuje različite kontekste s povezanim jezičkim faktorima u ugrađenom prostoru, pružajući način za tumačenje faktoriranih ugrađenja. Procjenjeno na zadatku predviđanja potpore zajednice koristeći veliku kolekciju raznih rasprava o Reddit-u u temi, faktorirani integraciji stalno postižu poboljšanje nad drugim tekstskim predstavljanjem. Kvalitativna analiza pokazuje da model uhvati društveni stil i temu, kao i obrazac okidača odgovora.', 'id': 'Kami mengembangkan model neural faktor baru yang mempelajari komentar dalam cara yang tidak diawasi menggunakan struktur konteks distribusi dalam forum diskusi online. Model menghubungkan konteks yang berbeda dengan faktor bahasa yang berhubungan di ruang penyampilan, menyediakan cara untuk menerjemahkan penyampilan faktor. Dievaluasi pada tugas prediksi pendukung komunitas menggunakan koleksi besar diskusi Reddit yang berbeda topik, pembangunan faktor secara konsisten mencapai peningkatan atas rappresentasi teks lain. Analisi kualitas menunjukkan bahwa model menangkap gaya komunitas dan topik, serta pola pemicu respon.', 'de': 'Wir entwickeln ein neuartiges faktoriertes neuronales Modell, das die Einbettung von Kommentaren auf unbeaufsichtigte Weise erlernt und die Struktur des Verteilungskontextes in Online-Diskussionsforen nutzt. Das Modell verknüpft verschiedene Kontexte mit verwandten Sprachfaktoren im Einbettungsraum und bietet eine Möglichkeit, die faktorierten Einbettungen zu interpretieren. Die faktorierten Einbettungen werden anhand einer großen Sammlung thematisch variierender Reddit-Diskussionen im Rahmen einer Community-Vorhersageaufgabe ausgewertet und erzielen eine konsistente Verbesserung gegenüber anderen Textrepräsentationen. Die qualitative Analyse zeigt, dass das Modell Community Style und Thema sowie Response Trigger Muster erfasst.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 인자신경모델을 개발하여 온라인 포럼의 분포식 상하문 구조를 이용하여 무감독의 방식으로 주석을 삽입하는 것을 배웠다.이 모델은 서로 다른 언어 환경과 공간에 삽입된 관련 언어 요소를 연결시켜 요소를 해석하는 삽입 방법을 제공한다.다양한 주제의 Reddit 토론을 사용하여 커뮤니티 지원 예측 작업을 평가할 때 고려 요소의 삽입은 항상 다른 텍스트 표현보다 우수합니다.정성 분석에 따르면 이 모델은 지역사회 스타일과 주제, 그리고 응답 트리거 모델을 포착했다.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل عصبی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که توسعه\u200cهای توضیح را در یک راهی غیرقابل تحمل ساختار محیط تقسیم در فرموم\u200cهای بحث آنلاین یاد می\u200cگیرد. مدل موقعیت متفاوت با faktورهای زبان مربوط به فضای وارد کردن را ارتباط می\u200cدهد، راهی برای تعبیر کردن ابزارهای فعال شده است. با استفاده از کلکسyon بزرگی از بحث\u200cهای Reddit متفاوت\u200cتر از موضوع تغییر عنوان تغییر عنوان تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر داده شده، محل تغییر تغییر تغییر داده شده\u200cها به طور مساوی بهترین تحلیل کیفیت نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل سبک و موضوع جامعه و الگوهای فشار پاسخ را گرفته است.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mtindo wa kisasa wa neurali unaoelekezwa na kujifunza maoni yanayoingia katika njia isiyo na usalama wa muundo wa mazingira ya usambazaji katika majukwaa ya majadiliano ya mtandaoni. Mradi huo unaunganisha muktadha tofauti na sababu zinazohusiana na lugha katika eneo la ndani, na kutoa njia ya kutafsiri vifaa vinavyotokea. Tathmini juu ya jukumu la kutabiri la jamii kwa kutumia mkusanyiko mkubwa wa majadiliano yanayotofautiana na mada Reddit, mabadiliko yaliyosababishwa yanaendelea kupata maboresho zaidi ya uwakilishi wengine wa maandishi. Uchambuzi wa sifa unaonyesha kuwa mtindo huo unachukua mtindo wa jamii na mada, pamoja na miundo ya majibu yanayoanza.', 'tr': 'Biz esasy taýýarlanmadyk, faktörlü neural nusgasyny çykaryp, hatlary online diskusiýa forumlarda daýat etmeýän bir nusgasynda täsirleýän bir nusgasyny öwredýäris. Baglançy tenzim faktörleri bilen beýleki kontekstleri baglaýar. Toplumaty taýýarlanmagy täze bir topar üýtgeşmeleri üçin Taýýarlanmagy täze bir topar üýtgeşmelerini ullanýar. Ýükselişik analizi jemgyýet tarzıny we temasyny çekip görkezilýäni görkez.', 'af': "Ons ontwikkel 'n roman gefabrikeerde neural model wat leer kommentaar inbettings in 'n onverondersteunde manier wat die struktuur van verspreidingskonteks in onlinene diskusingsforums verwyder. Name Geevalueer op 'n gemeenskapsondersteunde voorskou taak met gebruik van 'n groot versameling van onderwerp verskillende Reddit diskusies, die gefabrikeerde inbêdings het konsistentlik verbetering oor ander teks voorstellings bereik. Kvalitatiewe analisie vertoon dat die model gemeenskapstyl en onderwerp opneem, en ook antwoord-teken patrone.", 'sq': 'Ne zhvillojmë një model neural të faktorizuar të ri që mëson të komentojmë përfshirjet në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur duke përdorur strukturën e kontekstit shpërndarës në forumet e diskutimit online. Modeli lidh kontekstin e ndryshëm me faktorët e lidhur me gjuhën në hapësirën e përfshirjes, duke ofruar një mënyrë për të interpretuar përfshirjet e faktorëve. E vlerësuar në një detyrë parashikimi të miratimit të komunitetit duke përdorur një koleksion të madh diskutimesh Reddit të ndryshme në temë, përfshirjet e faktorizuara arrijnë vazhdimisht përmirësim lidhur me përfaqësimet e tjera të tekstit. Analiza kualitative tregon se modeli përfshin stilin dhe temën e komunitetit si dhe modelet e shkaktuesve të reagimit.', 'am': 'የነዌብ አካባቢ ሞዴል በመስመር ውይይት በተጠበቀው የባሕላዊ ግንኙነትን በመስመር ውይይት በተቃውሞ ውይይት ውስጥ ለመቀበል የሚችል ትክክል ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴል በተጨማሪው ቋንቋ አካባቢዎች በክፍለ ስፍራው ውስጥ የተለየ የቋንቋ አካባቢዎችን ያያይዛል፡፡ የውይይት ውይይት በተለየ የሬዲድድ ውይይቶች የተለየ ትልቅ ጉዳይ የተሰኘ የውይይት አካባቢዎች በሌላ የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች ላይ ማሻሻሻል፡፡ የጥያቄ ትምህርት ምሳሌው ማኅበረሰብ እና ጉዳይ እና መልስ ማሰናከል እንደሆነ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bs': 'Razvijamo roman faktorizirani neuralni model koji uči ugrađenje komentara na neodređen način utjecaja na strukturu distribucijskog konteksta u internetskim diskusijskim forumima. Model povezuje različite kontekste sa povezanim jezičkim faktorima u ugrađenom prostoru, pružajući način za tumačenje faktoriranih ugrađenja. Procjenjeno na zadatku predviđanja podrške zajednice koristeći veliku kolekciju raznih diskusija o Reddit-ovim temama, faktorirani integraciji stalno postižu poboljšanje na drugim tekstskim predstavljanjima. Kvalitativna analiza pokazuje da model uhvati društveni stil i temu, kao i obrazac okidača odgovora.', 'bn': 'অনলাইন আলোচনা ফোরামে বিতরণের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিতরণের কাঠামো প্রদান করার জন্য মন্তব্য শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে। মোডেল বিভিন্ন ভাষার কারণের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রেক্ষাপটের সাথে লিঙ্ক করে, যার ফলে ফ্যাক্টরেডিং ব একটি বিশাল বিষয়ের বিভিন্ন রেডিড আলোচনা ব্যবহার করে একটি সম্প্রদায়ের সমর্থন প্রতিষ্ঠানের কাজে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, যারা বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়বস বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে মডেল সম্প্রদায়ের শৈল্প এবং বিষয়টিকে তুলে ধরে, এবং সাথে প্রতিক্রিয়া ত্রিগ', 'ca': "Desenvolvem un nou model neuronal fet que aprenga a incorporar comentaris d'una manera sense supervisió aprofitant l'estructura del context distribucional en foros de debat on-line. El model vincula diferents contextos amb factors lingüístics relacionats a l'espai d'incorporació, proporcionant una manera d'interpretar les incorporacions fetes. Evaluat en una tasca de predicció de l'aprobació de la comunitat utilitzant una gran col·lecció de debats sobre Reddit variant en temes, les incorporacions fetes conseqüentment aconsegueixen millora sobre altres representacions de text. L'anàlisi qualitativa mostra que el model captura l'estil i el tema de la comunitat, així com patrons de desencadenament de resposta.", 'hy': 'Մենք զարգանում ենք նոր գործոնավոր նյարդային մոդել, որը սովորում է մեկնաբանությունների ներգրավումը անվերահսկված կերպով, օգտագործելով տարածական կոնտեքստի կառուցվածքը առցանց քննարկումների ֆորմերում: Մոդելը կապում է տարբեր կոնտեքստներ ներդրման տարածքում կապված լեզվային գործոնների հետ, որոնք պարտադրում են գործոնավոր ներդրումների մեկնաբանելու միջոց: Արժեցված համայնքի աջակցության կանխատեսման խնդրի վրա՝ օգտագործելով թեմայով տարբեր Reddit-ի քննարկումների մեծ հավաքածու, գործոնավոր ներդրումները մշտապես բարելավում են այլ տեքստի ներկայացումների նկատմամբ: Կալիտիվ վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մոդելը ներառում է համայնքի ոճը և թեման, ինչպես նաև արձագանքի խթանիչ կաղապարները:', 'cs': 'Vyvíjíme nový faktorový neuronový model, který se naučí vložení komentářů bez dohledu a využívá struktury distribučního kontextu v online diskusních fórech. Model propojuje různé kontexty se souvisejícími jazykovými faktory v vloženém prostoru a poskytuje způsob interpretace faktorových vložení. Vyhodnocené na úkolu predikce komunitní podpory s využitím velké sbírky diskusí v Redditu s různými tématy, faktorové vložení důsledně dosahuje zlepšení oproti ostatním reprezentacím textu. Kvalitativní analýza ukazuje, že model zachycuje styl komunity a téma, stejně jako vzorce spouštěcí reakce.', 'az': 'Biz onlayn müzakirə forumlarında dağıtılma məsələlərinin strukturlarını müəyyən etməyi öyrənən yeni fabrikatlı nöral modeli təhsil edirik. Model içərisində bağlı dil faktörləri ilə fərqli məlumatları bağlayır, faktörlük məlumatları yorumlamaq üçün bir yol göstərir. Üstəlik müxtəlif Reddit müzakirələrinin böyük bir koleksiyonu istifadə edərək toplum təsdiqlənməsi tədbirlərinin önlənməsi işində değerlendirilmişdir. Qıymetli analizi göstərir ki, modellərin toplum stilini və məsələni, həmçinin reaksiya başlayıcı modellərini də tutar.', 'et': 'Töötame välja uuendusliku faktoriga neuromudeli, mis õpib kommentaaride manustamist järelevalveta viisil, võimendades distributsioonikonteksti struktuuri online-arutelufoorumites. Mudel ühendab erineva konteksti seotud keelteguritega manustamisruumis, pakkudes võimalust faktoriga manustamist tõlgendada. Hinnatud kogukonna toetuse prognoosimise ülesande puhul, kasutades suurt kogumikku teemade erinevaid Redditi arutelusid, saavutavad faktorid põimitud manustamised pidevalt paremat võrreldes teiste tekstiesitlustega. Kvalitatiivne analüüs näitab, et mudel hõlmab kogukonna stiili ja teemat, samuti vastuse käivitamise mustreid.', 'fi': 'Kehitämme uudenlaisen faktorineuromallin, joka oppii kommenttien upottamista valvomattomalla tavalla hyödyntämällä jakelukontekstin rakennetta verkkokeskustelufoorumeilla. Malli linkittää eri kontekstin upotustilan kielitekijöihin ja tarjoaa tavan tulkita faktoriupotuksia. Arvioitu yhteisön tuen ennustustehtävä käyttäen suurta kokoelmaa aiheita vaihtelevia Reddit-keskusteluja, faktoidut upotukset saavuttavat johdonmukaisesti parannuksia muihin tekstiesityksiin verrattuna. Laadullinen analyysi osoittaa, että malli kuvaa yhteisötyyliä ja aihepiiriä sekä vastaustrigger-malleja.', 'ha': "Tuna buɗe wani salon da aka sanar da littafin neural da ke ƙara buƙata cikin a shirin da ba'a tsare da shi ba da tsaro ga rasilin da tarawa cikin jujjuya masu husũma masu shawara. @ info: whatsthis An ƙayyade wa wani aikin tabbatarwa na jamii da ya yi amfani da mai haɗa kayan cire-jayayyuta masu sãɓa da RedRededit, kuma an sami marubucin da aka bada mafiya kyau a kan wasu matabbata. Qualitative analysis shows that the model captures community style and topic, as well as response trigger patterns.", 'he': 'אנחנו מפתחים מודל עצבי מופעל חדש שלמד התערבות תוכניות בדרך ללא השגחה The model links different context with related language factors in the embedding space, providing a way to interpret the factored embeddings.  מוערך על משימה חיזוי התאמה הקהילתית באמצעות אוסף גדול של דיון רדיט שונה נושאים, ההערכות המעובדות משיגות שיפור באופן קבוע מעל מייצגים טקסטים אחרים. ניתוח איכותי מראה שהמודל מכיל סגנון קהילתי ונושא, כמו גם דפוסי גירום תגובה.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe nyumbang kelompok nggawe model sing itéparan anyar tentang karo perusahaan komentar dumateng kuwi nggawe nguasai nggawe nguasai sistem kebutuhan winih kanggo nggawe tarjamahan online Tulung anyari nggo langkung sampeyan ing nggo barang nggo ingkang dipun @title: column Pesetasi kaliterasi maneh da model kuwi nggawe stil komunitas lan tema, lan nganggo gambaran modèl', 'sk': 'Razvijamo nov faktorski nevronski model, ki se nauči vključevanja komentarjev na nenadzorovan način in izkorišča strukturo distribucijskega konteksta v spletnih forumih za razpravo. Model povezuje različne kontekste s povezanimi jezikovnimi dejavniki v prostoru za vdelavo in zagotavlja način interpretacije faktorskih vdelav. Ocenjene na opravilu napovedovanja podpore skupnosti z uporabo velike zbirke tematskih razprav o Redditu, faktorske vdelave dosledno dosegajo izboljšave v primerjavi z drugimi predstavitvami besedila. Kvalitativna analiza kaže, da model zajema slog in temo skupnosti ter vzorce sprožilcev odzivov.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་བཟོ་བརྩོན་བྱས་པའི་མི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ སྔོན་དབྱིབས་གནས་ཡུལ་ནང་དུ་མཐུད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་འབྲེལ་མ་འདྲ་བ་སྦྲེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ། ཚོགས་སྡེར་གྱི་རྗེས་ཁག་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་སྔོན་འཚོལ་ཁག་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་བསྟུན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བ་རེད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་མ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་དང་གནད་དོན་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Dimensions of Interpersonal Relationships : Corpus and Experiments', 'ar': 'أبعاد العلاقات الشخصية: المجموعة والتجارب', 'es': 'Dimensiones de las relaciones interpersonales: corpus y experimentos', 'fr': 'Dimensions des relations interpersonnelles\xa0: corpus et expériences', 'pt': 'Dimensões das Relações Interpessoais: Corpus e Experimentos', 'ja': '対人関係の次元：コーパスと実験', 'zh': '人际维度:语料库与实验', 'hi': 'पारस्परिक संबंधों के आयाम: कॉर्पस और प्रयोग', 'ru': 'Измерения межличностных отношений: корпус и эксперименты', 'ga': 'Toisí an Chaidrimh Idirphearsanta: Corpas agus Turgnaimh', 'ka': 'ინტერპერიონიკალური შესახებების განზომილება: კორპუს და ექსპერიმენტები', 'el': 'Διαστάσεις των διαπροσωπικών σχέσεων: Σώμα και πειράματα', 'hu': 'A személyek közötti kapcsolatok dimenziói: Corpus és kísérletek', 'mk': 'Dimensions of Interpersonal Relations: Corpus and Experiments', 'it': 'Dimensioni delle relazioni interpersonali: Corpus ed esperimenti', 'kk': 'Жеке қатынастарының өлшемі: Корпус және эксперименттер', 'lt': 'Asmeninių santykių aspektai: korpusas ir eksperimentai', 'ms': 'Dimensi Hubungan Antara Peribadi: Corpus dan Eksperimen', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപരമായ ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ വ്യവസ്ഥ: കോര്\u200dപ്പുസും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും', 'mt': 'Dimensjonijiet tar-Relazzjonijiet Interpersonali: Corpus u Esperimenti', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн харилцааны хэмжээсүүд: хувьд болон туршилт', 'no': 'Dimensjonar på Interpersonlege relasjonar: korpus og eksperimenter', 'pl': 'Wymiary relacji międzywosobowych: korpus i eksperymenty', 'ro': 'Dimensiunile relatiilor interpersonale: Corpus si experimente', 'sr': 'Dimenzije međuosobnih odnosa: korpus i eksperimenti', 'si': 'අන්තර්ජාතික සම්බන්ධ විශාල: කොර්පුස් සහ පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Xiriirka xiriirka shakhsiyadda: Korpus iyo imtixaanka', 'sv': 'Dimensioner av mellanpersonliga relationer: Corpus och experiment', 'ta': 'தனிப்பட்ட தொடர்புகளின் அளவுகள்:', 'ur': 'Interpersonal Relationships: Corpus and Experiments', 'uz': 'Shaxsiy aloqalarni oʻzgartirish: Corpus va eksport', 'vi': 'Kích thước mối quan hệ cá nhân: Tập đoàn và thử nghiệm', 'bg': 'Размери на междуличностните отношения: корпус и експерименти', 'nl': 'Dimensies van interpersoonlijke relaties: korpus en experimenten', 'da': 'Dimensioner af tværpersonlige relationer: Corpus og eksperimenter', 'hr': 'Dimenzije međuosobnih odnosa: korpus i iskustva', 'de': 'Dimensionen interpersonaler Beziehungen: Korpus und Experimente', 'ko': '인간관계 차원: 어료 라이브러리와 실험', 'fa': 'اندازه رابطه\u200cهای بین شخصی: کورپوس و تجربه\u200cها', 'sw': 'Dimensions of Interpersonal Relationships: Corpus and Experiments', 'af': 'Dimensies van Interpersonal Relationships: Corpus and Experiments', 'sq': 'Dimensione të marrëdhënieve ndërpersonale: Korpus dhe eksperimente', 'id': 'Dimensi Hubungan Interpersonal: Corpus dan Eksperimen', 'am': 'የኩነቶች ግንኙነት', 'tr': 'Kişisel ilişkilerin ölçüleri: Beden ve deneyler', 'bn': 'ইন্টারনেট ব্যক্তিগত সম্পর্কের পরিমাণ: কোর্পাস এবং পরীক্ষা', 'bs': 'Dimenzije međuosobnih odnosa: korpus i iskustva', 'hy': 'Միջինանձնական հարաբերությունների չափերը. Կորպուսը և փորձերը', 'az': 'İnterşəxsi İlişkilərin ölçüləri: Corpus və Experiments', 'ca': 'Dimensions de les Relacions Interpersonals: Corpus i Experiments', 'fi': 'Henkilökohtaisten suhteiden ulottuvuudet: Corpus ja kokeet', 'cs': 'Rozměry meziosobních vztahů: Korpus a experimenty', 'et': 'Isikuvaheliste suhete mõõtmed: korpus ja eksperimendid', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'long', 'he': 'Dimensions of Interpersonal Relations: Corpus and Experiments', 'sk': 'Dimenzije medosebnih odnosov: korpus in eksperimenti', 'bo': 'རང་དབང་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཚོའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དག་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a corpus and experiments to determine dimensions of interpersonal relationships. We define a set of dimensions heavily inspired by work in social science. We create a corpus by retrieving pairs of people, and then annotating dimensions for their relationships. A corpus analysis shows that dimensions can be annotated reliably. Experimental results show that given a pair of people, values to dimensions can be assigned automatically.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة مجموعة وتجارب لتحديد أبعاد العلاقات الشخصية. نحدد مجموعة من الأبعاد مستوحاة بشكل كبير من العمل في العلوم الاجتماعية. نقوم بإنشاء مجموعة من خلال استرداد أزواج من الأشخاص ، ثم وضع تعليقات توضيحية على أبعاد علاقاتهم. يُظهر تحليل المجموعة أنه يمكن وضع تعليقات توضيحية على الأبعاد بشكل موثوق. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أنه في ظل وجود زوج من الأشخاص ، يمكن تعيين قيم للأبعاد تلقائيًا.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un corpus y experimentos para determinar las dimensiones de las relaciones interpersonales. Definimos un conjunto de dimensiones fuertemente inspiradas en el trabajo de las ciencias sociales. Creamos un corpus recuperando parejas de personas y luego anotando las dimensiones de sus relaciones. Un análisis de corpus muestra que las dimensiones se pueden anotar de forma fiable. Los resultados experimentales muestran que, dado un par de personas, los valores a las dimensiones se pueden asignar automáticamente.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um corpus e experimentos para determinar dimensões das relações interpessoais. Definimos um conjunto de dimensões fortemente inspiradas no trabalho em ciências sociais. Criamos um corpus recuperando pares de pessoas e anotando dimensões para seus relacionamentos. Uma análise de corpus mostra que as dimensões podem ser anotadas de forma confiável. Os resultados experimentais mostram que, dado um par de pessoas, os valores das dimensões podem ser atribuídos automaticamente.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un corpus et des expériences visant à déterminer les dimensions des relations interpersonnelles. Nous définissons un ensemble de dimensions fortement inspirées des travaux en sciences sociales. Nous créons un corpus en récupérant des paires de personnes, puis en annotant les dimensions de leurs relations. Une analyse de corpus montre que les dimensions peuvent être annotées de manière fiable. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent qu'à partir d'une paire de personnes, les valeurs des dimensions peuvent être attribuées automatiquement.", 'ja': '本稿では、対人関係の次元を決定するためのコーパスと実験を紹介する。私たちは、社会科学の仕事から大きなインスピレーションを受けた一連の次元を定義します。人々のペアを取得し、それらの関係のディメンションに注釈を付けてコーパスを作成します。コーパス分析は、次元が確実に注釈を付けることができることを示しています。実験結果は、一組の人が与えられた場合、ディメンションに値を自動的に割り当てることができることを示しています。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлен корпус и эксперименты по определению размеров межличностных отношений. Мы определяем набор измерений, сильно вдохновленных работой в области социальных наук. Мы создаем корпус, извлекая пары людей, а затем аннотируя измерения для их отношений. Анализ корпуса показывает, что размеры могут быть надежно аннотированы. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что при наличии пары людей значения измерений могут присваиваться автоматически.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर पारस्परिक संबंधों के आयामों को निर्धारित करने के लिए एक कॉर्पस और प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करता है। हम सामाजिक विज्ञान में काम से प्रेरित आयामों के एक सेट को परिभाषित करते हैं। हम लोगों के जोड़े को पुनः प्राप्त करके, और फिर उनके संबंधों के लिए आयामों को एनोटेट करके एक कॉर्पस बनाते हैं। एक कॉर्पस विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि आयामों को मज़बूती से एनोटेट किया जा सकता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि लोगों की एक जोड़ी को देखते हुए, आयामों के मूल्यों को स्वचालित रूप से असाइन किया जा सकता है।', 'zh': '本文发一语料库实验,以定人事之维度。 定义了一组社会科学深为开维度。 检索成对者,然后为之注释维度以创一语料库。 语料库分析表明,维度可凭注。 实验结果表明,给定一人,得自分维度直。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair corpas agus turgnaimh chun toisí na gcaidreamh idirphearsanta a chinneadh. Sainmhínímid tacar toisí atá spreagtha go mór ag obair san eolaíocht shóisialta. Cruthaímid corpas trí phéirí daoine a aisghabháil, agus ansin toisí dá gcaidrimh a nótáil. Léiríonn anailís corpais gur féidir toisí a anótáil go hiontaofa. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir luachanna go toisí a shannadh go huathoibríoch nuair a chuirtear péire daoine.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლობა კორპუსს და ექსპერიმენტების განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებას. ჩვენ სოციალური მეცნიერებაში სამუშაო სამუშაო მეცნიერებაზე ძალიან ინტექსურებული განზომილებების ნაწილის განსაზღვრება. ჩვენ კორპუსს შექმნით ადამიანების ორივე და შემდეგ განზომილებების შესახებ. კორპუსს ანალიზია, რომ განზომილებები შეიძლება იყოს დარწმუნებელად. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენებს, რომ საერთო ადამიანი, განზომილებების მნიშვნელობა შეიძლება ავტომატურად დააყენება.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány egy korpuszt és kísérleteket mutat be az interperszonális kapcsolatok dimenzióinak meghatározására. Olyan dimenziókat határozunk meg, amelyeket erősen a társadalomtudományi munka ihletett. Egy korpuszt hozunk létre úgy, hogy visszakeressük az emberek párját, majd megjegyzések dimenzióit a kapcsolataikhoz. A korpusz elemzése azt mutatja, hogy a dimenziók megbízhatóan jegyzetelhetők. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy egy pár ember esetében a dimenziók értékei automatikusan hozzárendelhetők.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα σώμα και πειράματα για τον προσδιορισμό των διαστάσεων των διαπροσωπικών σχέσεων. Καθορίζουμε ένα σύνολο διαστάσεων που εμπνέονται έντονα από την εργασία στην κοινωνική επιστήμη. Δημιουργούμε ένα σώμα ανακτώντας ζεύγη ανθρώπων, και στη συνέχεια σχολιάζοντας διαστάσεις για τις σχέσεις τους. Μια ανάλυση σώματος δείχνει ότι οι διαστάσεις μπορούν να σχολιαστούν αξιόπιστα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι δεδομένου ενός ζευγαριού ατόμων, οι τιμές στις διαστάσεις μπορούν να αντιστοιχιστούν αυτόματα.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas korpusas ir eksperimentai tarpasmeninių santykių matmenims nustatyti. Mes apibrėžiame socialinių mokslų srityje labai įkvėptas matmenų rinkinį. We create a corpus by retrieving pairs of people, and then annotating dimensions for their relationships.  Korpus analizė rodo, kad matmenis galima patikimai pažymėti. Experimental results show that given a pair of people, values to dimensions can be assigned automatically.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un corpus ed esperimenti per determinare le dimensioni delle relazioni interpersonali. Definiamo un insieme di dimensioni fortemente ispirate dal lavoro nelle scienze sociali. Creiamo un corpus recuperando coppie di persone, e poi annotando dimensioni per le loro relazioni. Un'analisi del corpus mostra che le dimensioni possono essere annotate in modo affidabile. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che data una coppia di persone, i valori alle dimensioni possono essere assegnati automaticamente.", 'mk': 'This paper presents a corpus and experiments to determine dimensions of interpersonal relationships.  Ние дефинираме сет димензии многу инспирирани од работа во социјалната наука. Ние создаваме корпус со собирање парови луѓе, а потоа анотираме димензии за нивните врски. Анализата на корпусот покажува дека димензиите можат да се анотираат доверливо. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека со оглед на неколку луѓе, вредностите на димензиите можат автоматски да бидат доделени.', 'ms': 'This paper presents a corpus and experiments to determine dimensions of interpersonal relationships.  Kami menentukan set dimensi yang sangat diinspirasi oleh kerja dalam sains sosial. Kami menciptakan mayat dengan mengambil pasangan manusia, kemudian mencatat dimensi untuk hubungan mereka. Analisis corpus menunjukkan bahawa dimensi boleh dicatat dengan yakin. Experimental results show that given a pair of people, values to dimensions can be assigned automatically.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന് ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പസും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും കൊടുക്കുന്നു വ്യക്തിപരമായ ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ മീനം നിര്\u200dണയിക്കാന സാമൂഹിക ശാസ്ത്രത്തിലെ ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വളരെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുള്ള ഒരു കൂട്ടം ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d നാം നിര ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് നാം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരില്\u200d നിന്ന് രണ്ട് ഇണകളെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ അവരുടെ ബന്ധങ് ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നു വിശ്വാസത്തില്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d വിഷമമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയു പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു രണ്ടു പേര്\u200d കൊടുത്തിട്ടുണ്ട്, മൂല്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മൂല്ല്യങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം നിയന്ത്', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз қорпус және тәжірибелер қатынастың өлшемдерін анықтау үшін көрсетеді. Біз социаллық ғылымдарда жұмыс істеген бірнеше өлшемдерді анықтаймыз. Біз корпус құрып, адамдардың екеуін алу арқылы, содан кейін олардың қатынастарының өлшемдерін жаңарту арқылы. Корпус анализиясы өлшемдерді сенімді түсіндіруге болады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер бірнеше адам берілген, өлшемдерге мәндері автоматты түрде таңдауға болады.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta korpus u esperimenti biex jiddeterminaw id-dimensjonijiet tar-relazzjonijiet interpersonali. We define a set of dimensions heavily inspired by work in social science.  Aħna nħolqu korpus billi nġibu l-pari ta’ nies, u mbagħad ninnotaw dimensjonijiet għar-relazzjonijiet tagħhom. Analiżi corpus turi li d-dimensjonijiet jistgħu jiġu annotati b’mod affidabbli. Riżultati esperimentali juru li meta jingħataw żewġ persuni, il-valuri għad-dimensjonijiet jistgħu jiġu assenjati awtomatikament.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хоорондын харилцааны хэмжээсүүдийг тогтоохын тулд корпус болон туршилтыг харуулдаг. Бид нийгмийн шинжлэх ухааны ажил дээр маш их урам зориулсан хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Бид хоёр хүмүүсийг авч, тэдний харилцааны хэмжээсүүдийг анзаараад корпус бүтээж байна. Корпус шинжилгээнд хэмжээсүүд итгэлтэй байдлаар анзаарагдаж чадна. Эмчилгээний үр дүн нь хоёр хүн, хэмжээсүүдэд үнэ цэнийг автоматжуулж болно гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein korpus og eksperimenter for å bestemme dimensjonar av interpersonlege forhold. Vi definerer eit sett dimensjonar som er sterkt inspirert av arbeid i sosiale vitenskap. Vi oppretter ein korpus ved å henta par av menneske, og deretter annoterar dimensjonar for deres forholdet. Eit korpusanalyse viser at dimensjonar kan verta merka på sikkert. Eksperimentale resultat viser at gitt ei par menneske, verdiar til dimensjonar kan bli tildelt automatisk.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono korpus i eksperymenty mające na celu określenie wymiarów relacji międzyludzkich. Definiujemy zestaw wymiarów silnie inspirowanych pracą w naukach społecznych. Tworzymy korpus poprzez pobieranie par ludzi, a następnie adnotację wymiarów ich relacji. Analiza korpusu pokazuje, że wymiary mogą być niezawodnie adnotacjonowane. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że dana para osób, wartości do wymiarów mogą być przypisywane automatycznie.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă un corpus și experimente pentru determinarea dimensiunilor relațiilor interpersonale. Definim un set de dimensiuni puternic inspirate de munca in stiinta sociala. Creăm un corpus prin recuperarea perechilor de oameni și apoi adnotarea dimensiunilor pentru relațiile lor. O analiză a corpului arată că dimensiunile pot fi adnotate în mod fiabil. Rezultatele experimentale arată că, dată fiind o pereche de persoane, valorile dimensiunilor pot fi atribuite automat.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja korpus i eksperiment za određivanje dimenzija međuosobnih odnosa. Definiramo niz dimenzija koje je teško inspirisan radom u socijalnoj nauci. Stvaramo korpus povlačenjem par ljudi, a zatim annotiramo dimenzije njihovih odnosa. Analiza korpusa pokazuje da dimenzije mogu da budu pouzdane. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, s obzirom na par ljudi, vrijednosti dimenzija se mogu automatski odrediti.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ කොර්පුස් සහ පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා පුද්ගලික සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න. අපි සාමාජික විද්\u200dයානයේ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි මිනිස්සුන්ගේ දෙකක් අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් කොර්පස් එකක් හදනවා, ඊට පස්සේ ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන කොර්පුස් විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මිනිස්සු දෙන්න, විශාලාවට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන', 'so': 'Warqaddaas waxaa ku qoran baaritaanka iyo imtixaanka si ay u caddeyso qaybaha xiriirka gaarka ah. Waxaannu qornaa noocyo kala duduwan oo aad looga xiisoodo shaqada cilmiga bulshada. Waxaannu abuurnaa jinsi, oo dadkana laba nooc ka soo bixiyey, markaasaan dhibaynaa dhibaato kala duduwan qaraabada. Analyska korpus wuxuu muujiyaa in qaybaha lagu dhibi karo si aamin ah. Arimaha imtixaanka waxaa laga muujin karaa in qof labo qof ah lagu siiyo qiimaha isbedelka.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en korpus och experiment för att bestämma dimensioner av interpersonella relationer. Vi definierar en uppsättning dimensioner starkt inspirerade av arbete inom samhällsvetenskap. Vi skapar en korpus genom att hämta par människor och sedan kommentera dimensioner för deras relationer. En korpusanalys visar att dimensioner kan kommenteras tillförlitligt. Experimentella resultat visar att ett par personer kan tilldelas värden till dimensioner automatiskt.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் தனிப்பட்ட உறவுகளின் பரிமாற்றங்களை தீர்மானிக்க ஒரு கோர்ப்ஸ் மற்றும் சோதனைகளை கூடுகிறது. We define a set of dimensions heavily inspired by work in social science.  நாம் ஒரு கொதியை உருவாக்கினோம், அதனால் மனிதர்களை மீண்டும் ஜோடி செய்கிறோம், பின்னர் உறவினர்களுக்கு நாம் விஷ ஒரு கோர்பாஸ் ஆராய்ச்சி தெரியும் அளவுகள் நம்பிக்கை குறைக்க முடியும். பரிசோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک کورپوس اور آزمائش پیش کرتا ہے کہ تعداد شخصی رابطہ کا اندازہ مقرر کرے۔ ہم ایک مجموعہ کی تعریف کر رہے ہیں جو سوسیل سائنس میں کام کے ذریعہ بوجھ اٹھائی جاتی ہے۔ اور ہم نے ایک جسد پیدا کیا ہے کہ لوگوں کے جوڑے پیدا کریں پھر ان کے رشتہ داروں کے لئے اندازے بیان کریں ایک کورپوس تحلیل دکھاتا ہے کہ اندازے مطمئن طور پر اظہار کر سکتے ہیں۔ Experimental results show that given a pair of people, values to dimensions can be assigned automatically.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz shaxsiy munosabatlarning chegarasini aniqlash uchun corpus va tajribalarni beradi. Biz jamiyat ilmiy fanda ishlash orqali juda qiziqarli darajalarni aniqlaysiz. Биз нутфадан яратдик ва ундан одамларни жуфт-жуфт қилиб яратдик ва қариндошлар орасида насаб-насиҳат қилдик. Албатта, бунда ақл юратадиган қавм учун оят-белгилар бордир. Korpus analyzeri o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi, chegaralarni ishonch qila oladi. Tajriba natijalari bir necha odamni ko'rsatilgan qiymatni avtomatik qo'shish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này là vật thể và thí nghiệm để xác định các kích thước quan hệ cá nhân. Chúng tôi xác định một tập thể kích thích sâu đậm từ công việc khoa học xã hội. Chúng ta tạo ra một tập thể bằng cách lấy lại cặp người, và sau đó ghi chú các kích thước cho mối quan hệ của họ. Phân tích y tế cho thấy rằng kích thước có thể được ghi chú đáng tin cậy. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy dựa trên một cặp người, các giá trị với kích thước có thể được chỉ định tự động.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een corpus en experimenten om dimensies van interpersoonlijke relaties te bepalen. We definiëren een reeks dimensies die sterk geïnspireerd zijn op werk in de sociale wetenschappen. We creëren een corpus door paren van mensen op te halen en vervolgens dimensies voor hun relaties te annoteren. Een corpusanalyse laat zien dat dimensies betrouwbaar geannoteerd kunnen worden. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat aan een paar personen automatisch waarden aan dimensies kunnen worden toegewezen.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt einen Korpus und Experimente zur Bestimmung der Dimensionen zwischenmenschlicher Beziehungen vor. Wir definieren eine Reihe von Dimensionen, die stark von sozialwissenschaftlicher Arbeit inspiriert sind. Wir erstellen einen Korpus, indem wir Paare von Personen abrufen und dann Dimensionen für ihre Beziehungen kommentieren. Eine Korpusanalyse zeigt, dass Dimensionen zuverlässig kommentiert werden können. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass bei einem Personenpaar automatisch Werte zu Dimensionen zugewiesen werden können.', 'bg': 'Статията представя корпус и експерименти за определяне на измеренията на междуличностните взаимоотношения. Определяме набор от измерения, силно вдъхновени от работата в социалните науки. Създаваме корпус, като извличаме двойки хора и след това анотираме измеренията за техните взаимоотношения. Корпусният анализ показва, че измеренията могат да бъдат анотирани надеждно. Експерименталните резултати показват, че при дадена двойка хора стойностите към измеренията могат да бъдат присвоени автоматично.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer et korpus og eksperimenter til at bestemme dimensioner af interpersonelle relationer. Vi definerer et sæt dimensioner, der er stærkt inspireret af arbejde inden for samfundsvidenskab. Vi skaber et korpus ved at hente par mennesker og derefter notere dimensioner for deres relationer. En korpusanalyse viser, at dimensioner kan annoteres pålideligt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at værdier til dimensioner kan tildeles automatisk ved et par personer.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja korpus i eksperimente za određivanje dimenzija međuosobnih odnosa. Definiramo niz dimenzija koje je teško inspirisan radom u socijalnoj nauci. Stvaramo korpus povlačenjem par ljudi, a zatim annotiramo dimenzije njihovih odnosa. Analiza korpusa pokazuje da se dimenzije mogu pouzdano annotirati. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, s obzirom na par ljudi, vrijednosti dimenzija se mogu automatski odrediti.', 'ko': '본고는 인간관계의 차원을 정하기 위해 언어 자료 라이브러리와 실험을 제시했다.우리는 사회 과학 사업의 계발을 많이 받은 그룹을 정의했다.우리는 짝을 지은 사람을 검색한 다음에 그들의 관계에 차원을 표시해서 자료 라이브러리를 만듭니다.어료 라이브러리 분석에 의하면 차원 표시는 믿을 만하다.실험 결과 한 쌍을 정하면 차원치가 자동으로 분배된다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک کورپوس و آزمایش را برای تعیین اندازه رابطه\u200cهای بین شخصی نشان می\u200cدهد. ما یک مجموعه از اندازه\u200cها را توسط کار در علم اجتماعی تحریک می\u200cکنیم. ما جسد را با جسد مردم آفریدیم، سپس اندازه\u200cهایی برای رابطه\u200cهایشان آشکار می\u200cکنیم. یک تحلیل کورپوس نشان می دهد که اندازه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند به طور قابل توضیح داده شوند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که به عنوان یک جفت از مردم، ارزش\u200cها به اندازه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند خودکار تعیین شوند.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n korpus en eksperimente om dimensies van interpersoonlike verhouding te bepaal. Ons definieer 'n stel dimensies swaar inspireer deur werk in sosiale wetenskap. Ons skep 'n korpus deur paar van mense te ontvang, en dan annotering dimensies vir hul verhouding. 'n Corpus analisie vertoon dat dimensies vertroulik kan word. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat 'n paar mense gegee het, waardes na dimensies kan outomaties toewys word.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz kişisel baglaýyşyň ölçülerini bejermek üçin korpus we experimentalary görkezýär. Biz sosyal bilim sistemasynda ýüze-ýüze alýan ölçümleri takyklaýarys. Adamlaryň çift sanyny almak üçin bir korpus döredip, soňra olaryň baglaşyklarynyň üçin ölçülerini duýdurýarys. Korpus analyzasynda ölçüleriň ynamly şekilde duýgulanabilir diýip görkezýär. Aramanyň netijeleri birnäçe adam berildigini, ölçüliklere öz-özüne berilebilir.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mempersembahkan sebuah corpus dan eksperimen untuk menentukan dimensi hubungan antar pribadi. Kami mendefinisikan set dimensi yang sangat diinspirasi oleh pekerjaan dalam ilmu sosial. Kami menciptakan mayat dengan mengambil pasangan orang, dan kemudian mencetak dimensi untuk hubungan mereka. Analisis corpus menunjukkan bahwa dimensi dapat dicatat dengan yakin. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa diberikan pasangan orang, nilai ke dimensi dapat ditugaskan secara otomatis.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaleta makampuni na majaribio ya kutambua kiwango cha mahusiano binafsi. Tunaweza kufafanua a in a mbalimbali yenye hamasa kubwa na kazi katika sayansi ya kijamii. Tunaitengeneza chumvi kwa kutengeneza watu wawili na wawili, na kisha tunaudhi ulimwengu kwa ajili ya uhusiano wao. A corpus analysis shows that dimensions can be annotated reliably.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa kwa kuwapa watu wawili, thamani kwa utofauti unaweza kutengenezwa moja kwa moja.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër paraqet një korpus dhe eksperimente për të përcaktuar dimensionet e marrëdhënieve ndërpersonale. Ne përcaktojmë një sërë dimensionesh shumë të frymëzuar nga puna në shkencën sociale. Ne krijojmë një trup duke marrë çifte njerëzish, dhe pastaj duke shënuar dimensionet për marrëdhëniet e tyre. Një analizë e korpusit tregon se dimensionet mund të anotohen në mënyrë të besueshme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se duke dhënë një çift njerëzish, vlerat dimensioneve mund të caktohen automatikisht.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ግንኙነትን ለማረጋገጥ የቆርፓስ እና ፈተናዎችን ያቀርባል፡፡ ማኅበራዊ እውቀት ውስጥ በሥራ በሚያሳየው ብዙዎችን አካላንት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሰውን ሁለት ዓይነቶችን እናስወግዳለን እና ግንኙነትን እናስጨንቃለን፡፡ የኮርፓስ አካላቢ ግንኙነቶችን በመታመን ይነግራሉ፡፡ የፈተና ውጤቶች ሁለት ዓይነቶችን ሰጥተዋል፣ ዋጋውን ለክፍሎች በራስነት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մարմին և փորձեր միջանձնական հարաբերությունների չափերի որոշումների համար: Մենք սահմանում ենք մի շարք չափեր, որոնք շատ ոգեշնչված են սոցիալական գիտության աշխատանքից: Մենք ստեղծում ենք մարմին՝ վերցնելով մարդկանց զույգեր և հետո նկարագրելով նրանց հարաբերությունների չափերը: Կորպուսի վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ չափերը կարող են վստահելի կերպով գրանցվել: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մի զույգ մարդկանց տրամադրելով, չափերի արժեքները կարող են ինքնաբերաբար դասավորվել:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ব্যক্তিগত সম্পর্কের মাত্রা নির্ধারণ করার জন্য একটি কোর্পাস এবং পরীক্ষা প্রদান করেছে। আমরা সামাজিক বিজ্ঞানের কাজের দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত বিভিন্ন মানবগুলো নির্ধারণ করি। আমরা একটা কোর্পাস তৈরি করি মানুষের দ্বারা জোড়া পুনরুদ্ধারের মাধ্যমে আর তারপর তাদের সম্পর্কের জন্য বিরক্তিকর বিষয় একটি কোর্পাস বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে মাত্রা বিশ্বাসভাবে বিরক্ত হতে পারে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কয়েকজন মানুষ দিয়ে মূল্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিতরণ করা যাবে।', 'ca': 'This paper presents a corpus and experiments to determine dimensions of interpersonal relationships.  Definim un conjunt de dimensions fortament inspirades pel treball en ciència social. Creem un corpus recuperant parelles de persones i anotant les dimensions de les seves relacions. Una anàlisi del corpus mostra que les dimensions es poden anotar de manera fiable. Els resultats experimentals mostren que, dada un parell de persones, els valors a les dimensions poden ser asignats automàticament.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje korpus a experimenty pro určení dimenzí mezilidských vztahů. Definujeme soubor dimenzí silně inspirovaných prácí v sociálních vědách. Vytvoříme korpus načtením párů lidí a poté anotací dimenzí pro jejich vztahy. Korpusová analýza ukazuje, že dimenze lze spolehlivě anotovat. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že při páru lidí lze hodnoty rozměrům automaticky přiřadit.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse korpus ja eksperimendid inimestevaheliste suhete mõõtmete kindlaksmääramiseks. Me määratleme mõõtmete kogumi, mis on tugevalt inspireeritud tööst sotsiaalteadustes. Me loome korpuse inimeste paaride leidmisega ja nende suhete mõõtmete märkimisega. Korpuse analüüs näitab, et mõõtmeid saab usaldusväärselt märkida. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kui paar inimest, saab mõõtmetele väärtusi määrata automaatselt.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään corpus ja kokeilut ihmissuhteiden ulottuvuuksien määrittämiseksi. Määrittelemme joukon ulottuvuuksia, jotka ovat vahvasti inspiroituneet yhteiskuntatieteiden työstä. Luomme korpusen noutamalla ihmispareja ja sitten kirjoittamalla ulottuvuuksia heidän suhteisiinsa. Korpusanalyysi osoittaa, että ulottuvuudet voidaan merkitä luotettavasti. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että tiettyä ihmistä kohden mitat voidaan määrittää automaattisesti.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt interpersonal ilişkilerin ölçülərini təyin etmək üçün korpus və eksperimenti göstərir. Biz sosyal elmdə çalışmaq üçün a ğır təhrif edilən ölçülərdən bir takım belə tanımlıyıq. Biz bir korpus yaratdıq, insanların iki nəfərini geri qaytaraq, sonra da onların qohumlarının ölçülərini göstərdik. Korpus analizi göstərir ki, ölçülərin güvenilir olaraq bildirilebilir. Eksperiment sonuçları bir çift insana verilmiş, ölçülərə qiymətlər avtomatik olaraq təyin edilə bilər.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja korpus i eksperiment za određivanje dimenzija međuosobnih odnosa. Definiramo niz dimenzija koje je teško inspirisan radom u socijalnoj nauci. Mi stvorimo korpus po povlačenju par ljudi, a onda označavamo dimenzije njihovih odnosa. Analiza korpusa pokazuje da se dimenzije mogu pouzdano annotirati. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, s obzirom na par ljudi, vrijednosti dimenzija mogu biti automatski određene.', 'jv': 'Bino kuwi nggawe karo perbudhakan lan gewuraning kanggo ngerasai tanggal karo perbudhakan Awak dhéwé éntuk akèh milih dimensi sing luwih nêmên ning acara Sayensi sotiki. Awak dhéwé nggawe karo perusahaan kanggo ngilanggar-perusahaan iki dadi, lan ngilanggar-perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang-barêng. Una dipoles coro menehi wong-wong kuwi dimensi iso dianggawe diolah Kernel', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen korpus in eksperimenti za določitev dimenzij medosebnih odnosov. Definiramo niz dimenzij, ki jih močno navdihuje delo v družboslovju. Ustvarimo korpus tako, da pridobimo pare ljudi in nato označujemo dimenzije njihovih odnosov. Analiza korpusa kaže, da je dimenzije mogoče zanesljivo označiti. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da se lahko glede na par ljudi vrednosti dimenzijam dodelijo samodejno.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג קורפוס וניסויים כדי לקבוע מימדים של יחסים בין אישיים. אנחנו מגדירים קבוצה של מימדים שמושראים מאוד בעבודה במדע חברתי. אנחנו יוצרים קורפוס על ידי להשיג זוגות אנשים, ואז מצביעים מימדים למערכות היחסים שלהם. ניתוח קורפוס מראה שמימדים יכולים להציג בהאמנות. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות כי בהתחשב בזוג של אנשים, ערכים למימדים יכולים לקבוע באופן אוטומטי.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da wata takarda da jarrabo dõmin su ƙayyade girgije na danganta masu husũma. Munã bayyana wasu misãlai mai nauyi da aikin da ke aikin aikin da ke cikin ilmi. Lalle ne, Mũ, Mun halitta guda daga jini, sa'an nan Muka halitta shi nau'i-nau'i, sa'an nan kuma Muka sanya ma'abũcin zumunta daidai a gare su. Ana yi anayyar nau'in na nuna cewa za'a zartar da girgije a yi aminci. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa an sami kimar biyu ga mutane, za'a raba kima zuwa girgije farat ɗaya.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མི་དང་སྒེར་གྱི་རྩིས་ཆོས་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་སྟོན་གནང་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཚན་རིག་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱས་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་མི་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ནས་དབང་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསླབས་པའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཞིག་ཡོད། སྒུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཅིག་ཡིད་པས་ཆེ་ཆུང་དག་རྟོགས་པ་ཡིན་པས་ཡིད་རྟོན་དང་། ངལ་ཚོགས་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་དག་དེས་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་། རིན་ཐང་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Argument Mining on Twitter : Arguments, Facts and Sources', 'ar': 'Argument Mining على Twitter: الحجج والحقائق والمصادر', 'es': 'Minería de argumentos en Twitter: argumentos, hechos y fuentes', 'pt': 'Mineração de argumentos no Twitter: argumentos, fatos e fontes', 'ja': 'Twitterでの論点採掘：論点、事実、情報源', 'fr': "L'exploration d'arguments sur Twitter\xa0: arguments, faits et sources", 'hi': 'चहचहाना पर तर्क खनन: तर्क, तथ्यों और स्रोतों', 'ru': 'Argument Mining в Twitter: аргументы, факты и источники', 'zh': '推特上论掘:论据,事实来源', 'ga': 'Mianadóireacht Argóint ar Twitter: Argóintí, Fíricí agus Foinsí', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Argument Bányászat a Twitteren: érvek, tények és források', 'el': 'Εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων στο Twitter: επιχειρήματα, γεγονότα και πηγές', 'kk': 'Твиттердегі аргументтер бағалау: Arguments, facts and sources', 'it': 'Argomento Mining su Twitter: Argomenti, fatti e fonti', 'mk': 'Аргумент минирање на Твитер: Аргументи, факти и извори', 'lt': 'Argument ų gavyba Twitter: Argumentai, faktai ir šaltiniai', 'mt': 'Argument Mining fuq Twitter: Argumenti, Fatti u Sorsi', 'ms': 'Menyembah Argumen di Twitter: Argumen, Fakta dan Sumber', 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d അര്\u200dഗ്ഗമെന്റ് മൈനിംഗ്: ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റുകള്\u200d, ഫാക്റ്റുകളും സ്രോതസ്സുകളും', 'mn': 'Твиттерийн аргументын салбар: Аргумент, Үнэндээ, эх үүсвэр', 'pl': 'Argument Mining na Twitterze: Argumenty, fakty i źródła', 'no': 'Argumentmining på Twitter: Argument, faktar og kilder', 'ro': 'Argument Mining pe Twitter: Argumente, fapte și surse', 'sr': 'Argument Miniranje na Twitter: Argumenti, činjenice i izvori', 'si': 'ට්විටර් වල ප්\u200dරතිචාරය මනින්: ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, ඇත්ත සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය', 'sv': 'Argument Mining på Twitter: Argument, fakta och källor', 'so': 'Argument Mining on Twitter: Arguments, Faces and Sources', 'ta': 'தொடர்பில் குறிப்பு', 'ur': 'توئیٹر پر آرکومٹ مینینگ: Arguments, facts and sources', 'uz': 'Twitterda Argument Mining: Arguments, Facts and Sources', 'vi': 'Tranh luận nho nhỏ trên Twitter: Arguments, Facts and sources.', 'nl': 'Argument Mining op Twitter: Argumenten, feiten en bronnen', 'da': 'Argument Mining på Twitter: Argumenter, fakta og kilder', 'bg': 'Аргументи в Туитър: аргументи, факти и източници', 'hr': 'Argument Miniranje na Twitter: Argumenti, činjenice i izvori', 'de': 'Argument Mining auf Twitter: Argumente, Fakten und Quellen', 'id': 'Argument Mining di Twitter: Argumen, Fakta dan Sumber', 'fa': 'آرژومین توئیتر: آرژومی، حقیقت و منبع', 'sw': 'Mapendekezo kwenye mtandao wa Twita:', 'tr': 'Argumentler Ködleme', 'af': 'Argument Mining op Twitter: Argumente, Fakte en Bronne', 'sq': 'Argumenti Mining në Twitter: Argumente, fakte dhe burime', 'am': 'በትዊተር ላይ አርጉም ማስታወቂያ: አርጉም፣ ውይይቶች እና ምንጮች', 'az': 'T√∂vratdakƒ± Argument Mining: Argumentl…ôr, Fayl…ôr v…ô Kaynaklar', 'bn': 'টুইটারে আর্গুমেন্ট মিনিং: আর্গুমেন্ট, Facts and Sources', 'ko': '트위터의 논거 발굴: 논거, 사실과 출처', 'hy': 'Թվիթերում բանավեճեր, փաստեր և աղբյուրներ', 'bs': 'Argument Miniranje na Twitter: Argumenti, činjenice i izvori', 'ca': 'Argument Mining a Twitter: Arguments, Facts and Sources', 'cs': 'Argument Mining na Twitteru: Argumenty, fakta a zdroje', 'et': 'Argumenti kaevandamine Twitteris: argumendid, faktid ja allikad', 'fi': 'Argumentin louhinta Twitterissä: argumentit, faktat ja lähteet', 'sk': 'Argument Rudarjenje na Twitterju: Argumenti, dejstva in viri', 'jv': 'Validity', 'ha': 'Argument Mining on Twitter: Argument, Faces and Sources', 'he': 'Argument Mining on Twitter: Arguments, Facts and Sources', 'bo': 'ཌིས་ཌིར་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་བྱེད་སྤྱོད་མཁན་པ：Arguments, Facts and Sources'}
{'en': 'Social media collect and spread on the Web personal opinions, facts, fake news and all kind of information users may be interested in. Applying argument mining methods to such heterogeneous data sources is a challenging open research issue, in particular considering the peculiarities of the language used to write textual messages on social media. In addition, new issues emerge when dealing with arguments posted on such platforms, such as the need to make a distinction between personal opinions and actual facts, and to detect the source disseminating information about such facts to allow for provenance verification. In this paper, we apply supervised classification to identify arguments on Twitter, and we present two new tasks for argument mining, namely facts recognition and source identification. We study the feasibility of the approaches proposed to address these tasks on a set of tweets related to the Grexit and Brexit news topics.', 'ar': 'تقوم وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي بجمع ونشر الآراء الشخصية والحقائق والأخبار المزيفة وجميع أنواع المعلومات التي قد يهتم بها المستخدمون على الويب. يعد تطبيق أساليب التنقيب عن الحجج على مصادر البيانات غير المتجانسة هذه مسألة بحث مفتوحة صعبة ، لا سيما بالنظر إلى خصوصيات اللغة تستخدم لكتابة رسائل نصية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تظهر قضايا جديدة عند التعامل مع الحجج المنشورة على مثل هذه المنصات ، مثل الحاجة إلى التمييز بين الآراء الشخصية والحقائق الفعلية ، واكتشاف المصدر الذي ينشر المعلومات حول هذه الحقائق للسماح بالتحقق من المصدر. في هذه الورقة ، نطبق التصنيف الخاضع للإشراف لتحديد الحجج على تويتر ، ونقدم مهمتين جديدتين للتنقيب في الجدل ، وهما التعرف على الحقائق وتحديد المصدر. ندرس جدوى الأساليب المقترحة لمعالجة هذه المهام على مجموعة من التغريدات المتعلقة بموضوعات أخبار خروج بريطانيا من الاتحاد الأوروبي وبريكست.', 'pt': 'As mídias sociais coletam e divulgam na Web opiniões pessoais, fatos, notícias falsas e todo tipo de informação que possa interessar aos usuários. Aplicar métodos de mineração de argumentos a fontes de dados tão heterogêneas é uma questão desafiadora de pesquisa aberta, especialmente considerando as peculiaridades da linguagem usado para escrever mensagens de texto nas mídias sociais. Além disso, surgem novas questões ao lidar com os argumentos postados em tais plataformas, como a necessidade de fazer uma distinção entre opiniões pessoais e fatos reais, e detectar a fonte que divulga informações sobre tais fatos para permitir a verificação de procedência. Neste artigo, aplicamos a classificação supervisionada para identificar argumentos no Twitter e apresentamos duas novas tarefas para mineração de argumentos, a saber, reconhecimento de fatos e identificação de fonte. Estudamos a viabilidade das abordagens propostas para abordar essas tarefas em um conjunto de tweets relacionados aos tópicos de notícias do Grexit e do Brexit.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアは、ウェブ上で個人的な意見、事実、フェイクニュース、およびユーザーが興味を持つ可能性のあるあらゆる種類の情報を収集し、拡散します。そのような異種データソースに引数マイニング方法を適用することは、特にソーシャルメディア上でテキストメッセージを書くために使用される言語の特異性を考慮すると、オープン研究の課題であり、困難である。また、このようなプラットフォームに掲載された議論を扱う際に、個人的な意見と実際の事実を区別し、そのような事実に関する情報を発信しているソースを検出して、出所の検証を可能にする必要があるなど、新たな課題が浮上してくる。この論文では、Twitter上の議論を識別するために監視分類を適用し、議論マイニングのための2つの新しいタスク、すなわち事実認識とソース識別を提示します。私たちは、GrexitとBrexitのニューストピックに関連する一連のツイートで、これらのタスクに対処するために提案されたアプローチの実現可能性を研究しています。', 'zh': '社交媒体于网络上采传个人观点、事实、假新闻、用户可感者。 掘参数宜用此类异构数据源乃一挑战性开究,特思所以社交媒体文本语言之特殊性。 此外平台发论,当有新问,分别事实,传其息源,以验出处。 于本文中,当以督类识Twitter,并建二论发掘之务,即事实识之。 臣等考希腊退欧、英脱欧新闻题相关者,推其可行性。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया वेब पर व्यक्तिगत राय, तथ्यों, नकली समाचारों और सभी प्रकार की जानकारी एकत्र करने और फैलाने में रुचि रखता है, जिसमें उपयोगकर्ता रुचि रखते हैं। इस तरह के विषम डेटा स्रोतों पर तर्क खनन विधियों को लागू करना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण खुला शोध मुद्दा है, विशेष रूप से सोशल मीडिया पर पाठ्य संदेश लिखने के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषा की ख़ासियत पर विचार करना। इसके अलावा, ऐसे प्लेटफार्मों पर पोस्ट किए गए तर्कों से निपटने के दौरान नए मुद्दे उभरते हैं, जैसे कि व्यक्तिगत राय और वास्तविक तथ्यों के बीच अंतर करने की आवश्यकता, और ऐसे तथ्यों के बारे में जानकारी प्रसारित करने वाले स्रोत का पता लगाने के लिए उद्गम सत्यापन की अनुमति देने के लिए। इस पेपर में, हम ट्विटर पर तर्कों की पहचान करने के लिए पर्यवेक्षित वर्गीकरण लागू करते हैं, और हम तर्क खनन के लिए दो नए कार्य प्रस्तुत करते हैं, अर्थात् तथ्यों की पहचान और स्रोत पहचान। हम Grexit और Brexit समाचार विषयों से संबंधित ट्वीट्स के एक सेट पर इन कार्यों को संबोधित करने के लिए प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोणों की व्यवहार्यता का अध्ययन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Социальные сети собирают и распространяют в Интернете личные мнения, факты, фейковые новости и любую информацию, которая может заинтересовать пользователей. Применение методов интеллектуального анализа аргументов к таким разнородным источникам данных является сложным вопросом открытых исследований, в частности, учитывая особенности языка, используемого для написания текстовых сообщений в социальных сетях. Кроме того, при рассмотрении аргументов, размещаемых на таких платформах, возникают новые вопросы, такие, как необходимость проводить различие между личными мнениями и фактическими фактами и выявлять источник, распространяющий информацию о таких фактах, с тем чтобы можно было проверить их происхождение. В этой статье мы применяем контролируемую классификацию для выявления аргументов в Twitter и представляем две новые задачи для изучения аргументов, а именно: распознавание фактов и идентификация источника. Мы изучаем осуществимость предложенных подходов к решению этих задач на наборе твитов, связанных с темами новостей Grexit и Brexit.', 'ga': 'Bailíonn agus scaipeann na meáin shóisialta ar an nGréasán tuairimí pearsanta, fíricí, nuacht bhréige agus gach cineál faisnéise a d’fhéadfadh suim a bheith ag úsáideoirí. Is ceist taighde oscailte dhúshlánach í modhanna mianadóireachta argóinte a chur i bhfeidhm ar fhoinsí sonraí ilchineálacha den sórt sin, go háirithe ag cur san áireamh tréithe na teanga. a úsáidtear chun teachtaireachtaí téacs a scríobh ar na meáin shóisialta. Ina theannta sin, tagann saincheisteanna nua chun cinn agus argóintí a chuirtear suas ar ardáin den sórt sin á bplé, amhail an gá atá le idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir tuairimí pearsanta agus fíorais iarbhír, agus an fhoinse a bhrath a scaipeann faisnéis faoi fhíorais den sórt sin chun bunáitíocht a fhíorú. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid aicmiú faoi mhaoirseacht i bhfeidhm chun argóintí a aithint ar Twitter, agus cuirimid dhá thasc nua i láthair maidir le mianadóireacht argóintí, is iad sin aithint fíricí agus sainaithint foinse. Déanaimid staidéar ar fhéidearthacht na gcur chuige atá beartaithe chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na tascanna seo ar shraith tweets a bhaineann le hábhair nuachta Grexit agus Brexit.', 'es': 'Las redes sociales recopilan y difunden en la Web opiniones personales, hechos, noticias falsas y todo tipo de información que pueda interesar a los usuarios. La aplicación de métodos de minería de argumentos a fuentes de datos tan heterogéneas es un tema de investigación abierta desafiante, en particular teniendo en cuenta las peculiaridades del lenguaje utilizado para escribir mensajes de texto en las redes sociales. Además, surgen nuevos problemas al tratar los argumentos publicados en dichas plataformas, como la necesidad de hacer una distinción entre opiniones personales y hechos reales, y detectar la fuente que difunde información sobre dichos hechos para permitir la verificación de procedencia. En este artículo, aplicamos la clasificación supervisada para identificar argumentos en Twitter y presentamos dos nuevas tareas para la minería de argumentos, a saber, el reconocimiento de hechos y la identificación de fuentes. Estudiamos la viabilidad de los enfoques propuestos para abordar estas tareas en un conjunto de tuits relacionados con los temas de noticias sobre el Grexit y el Brexit.', 'fr': "Les réseaux sociaux collectent et diffusent sur le Web des opinions personnelles, des faits, des fausses nouvelles et toutes sortes d'informations susceptibles d'intéresser les utilisateurs. L'application de méthodes d'exploration d'arguments à de telles sources de données hétérogènes est une question de recherche ouverte difficile, compte tenu en particulier des particularités du langage utilisé pour écrire des messages textuels sur les réseaux sociaux. En outre, de nouvelles questions apparaissent lorsque l'on traite des arguments publiés sur de telles plateformes, comme la nécessité de faire une distinction entre les opinions personnelles et les faits réels, et de détecter la source diffusant des informations sur ces faits afin de permettre la vérification de la provenance. Dans cet article, nous appliquons une classification supervisée pour identifier les arguments sur Twitter, et nous présentons deux nouvelles tâches pour l'exploration d'arguments, à savoir la reconnaissance des faits et l'identification de la source. Nous étudions la faisabilité des approches proposées pour répondre à ces tâches sur une série de tweets liés aux sujets d'actualité du Grexit et du Brexit.", 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში ინტერესტირება შეიძლება იყოს სოციალური მედიაში, პირადი მნიშვნელობებში, ფაქტებში, ფაქტებში, ფაქტირებში და ყველა ტიპის ინფორმაციის მომ არგუმენტის მინდომის მეტოვების გამოყენება ასეთი ჰეტეროგენური მონაცემების გამოყენება არის გახსნილი პრობლემა, განსაკუთრებით, სოციალური მედიაში ტექსტულ შეტყობინებების განსაკუთრე დამატებით, ახალი პრობლემები იქნება, როდესაც ახალი პრობლემენტებით ახალი პრობლემენტებით ახალი პრობლემენტებით და რეალური ფაქტის განსხვავებას, და იქნება წყალი, რომელიც ამ ფაქტის შესახებ ინფორმა ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ დავაკეთებული კლასიფიკაცია Twitter-ში არგუმენტების განსაზღვრებისთვის, და ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ორი ახალი დავაკეთება არგუმენტის მიღებისთვის, ანუ ფაქტის ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ შესაძლებლობა, რომელსაც პროგრამების შესაძლებლობა, რომ ამ საქმების შესახებ გადაწყენოთ რამდენიმე ტივიტებზე, რომელიც გრექტის და ბრექტის ნუტაციის', 'el': 'Τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης συλλέγουν και διαδίδουν στο διαδίκτυο προσωπικές απόψεις, γεγονότα, ψεύτικα νέα και κάθε είδους πληροφορίες που μπορεί να ενδιαφέρουν τους χρήστες. Η εφαρμογή μεθόδων εξόρυξης επιχειρημάτων σε τέτοιες ετερογενείς πηγές δεδομένων αποτελεί ένα δύσκολο ανοικτό ερευνητικό ζήτημα, ιδίως λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τις ιδιαιτερότητες της γλώσσας που χρησιμοποιείται για τη συγγραφή κειμένων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Επιπλέον, προκύπτουν νέα ζητήματα κατά την αντιμετώπιση επιχειρημάτων που δημοσιεύονται σε τέτοιες πλατφόρμες, όπως η ανάγκη να γίνει διάκριση μεταξύ προσωπικών απόψεων και πραγματικών γεγονότων, και να ανιχνευθεί η πηγή που διαδίδει πληροφορίες σχετικά με αυτά τα γεγονότα, ώστε να καταστεί δυνατή η επαλήθευση προέλευσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εφαρμόζουμε εποπτευμένη ταξινόμηση για τον εντοπισμό επιχειρημάτων στο Twitter, και παρουσιάζουμε δύο νέα καθήκοντα για την εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων, δηλαδή την αναγνώριση γεγονότων και τον προσδιορισμό πηγής. Μελετάμε τη σκοπιμότητα των προσεγγίσεων που προτείνονται για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των καθηκόντων σε ένα σύνολο tweets σχετικά με τα θέματα ειδήσεων Grexit και Brexit.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média gyűjti és terjeszti az interneten személyes véleményeket, tényeket, hamis híreket és mindenféle információt, amelyek a felhasználókat érdekelhetik. Az argumentumbányászati módszerek alkalmazása ilyen heterogén adatforrásokra kihívást jelent, nyílt kutatási kérdés, különösen figyelembe véve a szöveges üzenetek közösségi médiában történő írásához használt nyelv sajátosságait. Ezenkívül új kérdések merülnek fel az ilyen platformokon közzétett érvekkel kapcsolatban, mint például a személyes vélemények és a tényleges tények közötti különbség megkülönböztetésének szükségessége, valamint az ilyen tényekről szóló információkat terjesztő forrás felderítése a származás ellenőrzése érdekében. Ebben a tanulmányban felügyelt osztályozást alkalmazunk az érvek Twitteren történő azonosítására, és bemutatunk két új feladatot az érvek bányászatához, nevezetesen a tények felismeréséhez és a források azonosításához. Az e feladatok megoldására javasolt megközelítések megvalósíthatóságát a Grexit és Brexit hírekkel kapcsolatos tweeteken vizsgáljuk.', 'it': "I social media raccolgono e diffondono sul Web opinioni personali, fatti, fake news e tutti i tipi di informazioni a cui gli utenti possono essere interessati. Applicare metodi di argument mining a fonti di dati così eterogenee è una sfida aperta di ricerca, in particolare considerando le peculiarità del linguaggio utilizzato per scrivere messaggi testuali sui social media. Inoltre, emergono nuovi problemi quando si tratta di argomenti pubblicati su tali piattaforme, come la necessità di fare una distinzione tra opinioni personali e fatti reali e di individuare la fonte che diffonde informazioni su tali fatti per consentire la verifica della provenienza. In questo articolo, applichiamo la classificazione supervisionata per identificare argomenti su Twitter, e presentiamo due nuovi compiti per il mining degli argomenti, vale a dire il riconoscimento dei fatti e l'identificazione delle fonti. Studiamo la fattibilità degli approcci proposti per affrontare questi compiti su una serie di tweet relativi ai temi di Grexit e Brexit.", 'kk': 'Жалпы мәліметтер, жалпы жаңалықтар және әр түрлі мәліметтің пайдаланушылары интернетте көмектеседі. Аргументтің балау әдістерін бұл гетероген деректер көзіне қолдану - әлеуметтік медиақтарда мәтіндік хаттарды жазу үшін қолданылатын тілдің қасиеттерін өзгертуге көмектеседі. Қосымша, бұл платформаларда жіберілген аргументтермен қатынау кезінде жаңа мәселелер жазылады, мысалы, жеке мәліметтер мен шындық факттар арасында айырмашылық керек, және бұл факттар туралы мәліметті тарату үшін құқықта Бұл қағазда біз Твиттерде аргументтерді анықтау үшін бақылау және аргументті құру үшін екі жаңа тапсырманы келтіреміз, бұл - факттерді анықтау мен көзінің идентификациясы. Біз бұл тапсырмаларды Grexit және Brexit жаңалық тақырыптарына қатынау үшін қолданатын әрекеттердің мүмкіндігін зерттейміз.', 'ms': 'Social media collect and spread on the Web personal opinions, facts, fake news and all kind of information users may be interested in.  Melakukan kaedah perlombongan argumen kepada sumber data yang heterogen ini adalah isu penyelidikan terbuka yang mencabar, terutama mempertimbangkan keanehan bahasa yang digunakan untuk menulis mesej teks pada media sosial. Selain itu, isu-isu baru muncul apabila berurusan dengan argumen yang diposisikan pada platform-platform tersebut, seperti perlukan untuk membuat perbezaan antara pendapat peribadi dan fakta sebenar, dan untuk mengesan sumber menyebarkan maklumat mengenai fakta-fakta tersebut untuk membolehkan pengesahan keberadaan. Dalam kertas ini, kami melaksanakan kelasukan yang diawasi untuk mengenalpasti argumen di Twitter, dan kami memperkenalkan dua tugas baru untuk perlombongan argumen, iaitu pengenalan fakta dan pengenalan sumber. Kami mempelajari kemungkinan pendekatan yang diusulkan untuk mengatasi tugas ini pada set tweet berkaitan dengan topik berita Grexit dan Brexit.', 'lt': 'Social in ės žiniasklaidos tinklalapyje gali būti suinteresuotos asmeninės nuomonės, faktai, suklastotos žinios ir visų rūšių informacijos naudotojai. Argumentų gavybos metodų taikymas tokiems heterogeniniams duomenų šaltiniams yra sudėtingas atvirų mokslinių tyrimų klausimas, visų pirma atsižvelgiant į kalbos, naudojamos tekstinėms žiniasklaidoje rašyti, ypatumus. Be to, sprendžiant tokiose platformose pateiktus argumentus kyla naujų klausimų, pavyzdžiui, poreikis atskirti asmenines nuomones ir faktinius faktus ir nustatyti šaltinį, skleidžiantį informaciją apie tokius faktus, kad būtų galima patikrinti kilmę. Šiame dokumente naudojame prižiūrėtą klasifikaciją siekiant nustatyti argumentus Twitter ir pristatome du naujus argument ų gavybos uždavinius, būtent faktų pripažinimą ir šaltinio identifikavimą. We study the feasibility of the approaches proposed to address these tasks on a set of tweets related to the Grexit and Brexit news topics.', 'ml': 'Social media collect and spread on the Web personal opinions, facts, fake news and all kind of information users may be interested in.  ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള ഹെറോജെന്റ് ഡേറ്റാ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമിനിങ്ങ് രീതികള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് തുറന്ന പരിശോധന വിഷയത്തില്\u200d വ കൂടാതെ, പുതിയ വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d പുറപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന വാദങ്ങളുമായി പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പുതിയ വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d പുറപ്പെടുന്നു. അത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d വാദികള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വാദിക്കുന്നതിന ഗ്രെക്സിറ്റും ബ്രെക്സിറ്റ് വാര്\u200dത്തകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ഈ ജോലികള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്', 'mt': 'Il-midja soċjali tiġbor u tifrex fuq l-Internet opinjonijiet personali, fatti, aħbarijiet foloz u kull tip ta’ informazzjoni li jistgħu jkunu interessati fihom. L-applikazzjoni ta’ metodi ta’ tħaffir ta’ argumenti għal sorsi ta’ dejta eteroġeni bħal dawn hija kwistjoni ta’ riċerka miftuħa ta’ sfida, b’mod partikolari meta jitqiesu l-ispeċifiċitajiet tal-lingwa użata għall-kitba ta’ messaġġi testwali fuq il-midja soċjali. Barra minn hekk, jinħolqu kwistjonijiet ġodda meta jiġu ttrattati l-argumenti mqiegħda fuq pjattaformi bħal dawn, bħall-ħtieġa li ssir distinzjoni bejn l-opinjonijiet personali u l-fatti attwali, u li jinstab is-sors li jxerred informazzjoni dwar tali fatti biex jippermetti verifika tal-provenjenza. F’dan id-dokument, aħna napplikaw klassifikazzjoni sorveljata biex nidentifikaw l-argumenti fuq Twitter, u nippreżentaw żewġ kompiti ġodda għat-tħaffir tal-argumenti, jiġifieri r-rikonoxximent tal-fatti u l-identifikazzjoni tas-sors. Aħna nistudjaw il-fattibbiltà tal-approċċi proposti biex jiġu indirizzati dawn il-kompiti fuq sett ta’ tweets relatati mas-suġġetti tal-a ħbarijiet Grexit u Brexit.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид интернет хувийн үзэл, үнэндээ, хуурамч мэдээ, бүх төрлийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид сонирхолтой байж болно. Аргументийн сүлжээний аргументыг ийм төрлийн мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрт хэрэглэх нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн салбарт textual messages бичих үед хэрэглэгдсэн хэлний тухай сонирхолтой асуудал юм. Үүнээс гадна шинэ асуудлууд ийм хэлбэрээр тайлбарласан аргументуудыг олох үед гарч ирнэ. Жишээ нь хувийн ойлголт болон жинхэнэ үнэний хоорондын ялгааг гаргах хэрэгтэй, мөн ийм үнэний талаар мэдээллийг тараах эх үүсвэр нь баталгаа шалгах болом Энэ цаасан дээр бид Твиттерийн аргументыг тодорхойлдохын тулд удирдлагатай хуваалцааныг ашиглаж, аргументын сүлжээний хоёр шинэ задалга явуулж байна. Бид Грекст болон Брекст мэдээллийн сэдэвтэй холбоотой tweets дээр эдгээр ажиллагааны тухай ярилцах боломжтой арга барилгыг судалж байна.', 'no': 'Samla og spre sosiale media på nettet personlege tankar, faktar, falske nyhetar og alle typar informasjonsbrukarar kan interesserast i. Å bruka argumentminingsmetodar til slike heterogenere datakjelder er eit vanskeleg opna forskningsproblem, særskilt ved å sjå på kva spesialitet språket brukt til å skriva tekstmeldingar på sosiale medier. I tillegg oppstår nye oppgaver når du arbeider med argumenter poste på slike plattformer, slik som må gjera ein skilnad mellom personlege tankar og faktar, og å finna kjelde som sprettar informasjon om slike faktar for å tillata verifikasjon av provenance. I denne papiret bruker vi kontrollerte klassifikasjon for å identifisera argumenter på Twitter, og vi presenterer to nye oppgåver for å bruka argument-mining, som er faktisk gjenkjenning og kjeldeidentifikasjon. Vi studerer feilighet for tilnærmingane som foreslått å handtera desse oppgåvene på eit sett tweet som er relatert til Grexit- og Brexit- nyhetsstema.', 'pl': 'Media społecznościowe gromadzą i rozpowszechniają w sieci osobiste opinie, fakty, fałszywe wiadomości i wszelkiego rodzaju informacje, którymi mogą być zainteresowani użytkownicy. Zastosowanie metod argument mining do tak heterogenicznych źródeł danych jest wyzwaniem otwartym zagadnieniem badawczym, w szczególności biorąc pod uwagę specyfikę języka używanego do pisania wiadomości tekstowych w mediach społecznościowych. Ponadto pojawiają się nowe kwestie podczas rozpatrywania argumentów publikowanych na takich platformach, takie jak konieczność rozróżnienia pomiędzy opiniami osobistymi a faktami rzeczywistymi oraz wykrycia źródła rozpowszechniającego informacje o tych faktach, aby umożliwić weryfikację pochodzenia. W niniejszym artykule stosujemy nadzorowaną klasyfikację do identyfikacji argumentów na Twitterze i przedstawiamy dwa nowe zadania dla argument mining, a mianowicie rozpoznawanie faktów i identyfikację źródeł. Badamy wykonalność proponowanych podejść do rozwiązania tych zadań na zestawie tweetów związanych z tematami wiadomości Grexit i Brexit.', 'sr': 'Društveni mediji skupljaju i šire se na Web ličnim mišljenjima, činjenicama, lažnim vijestima i svim vrstama korisnika informacija mogu zainteresovati. Primjenjivanje metoda rudarstva argumenata takvim heterogenenim izvorima podataka je izazovno otvoreno istraživanje, posebno s obzirom na posebnost jezika korištenog za pisanje tekstualnih poruka na društvenim medijima. Osim toga, pojavljuju se novi pitanja kada se bave argumentima postavljenim na takvim platformama, kao što je potrebno da se razlikuje između ličnih mišljenja i stvarnih činjenica, i da se otkrije izvor koji širi informacije o takvim činjenicama kako bi omogućio da se proveri dokaz. U ovom papiru primjenjujemo nadzornu klasifikaciju da identifikujemo argumente na Twitter, i predstavljamo dva nove zadatke za rudarstvo argumenta, a to je priznanje činjenica i identifikacija izvora. Proučavamo mogućnost pristupa koji su predložili da riješimo ove zadatke na setu tweeta povezanih sa temama vesti Grexit a i Brexita.', 'ro': 'Rețelele sociale colectează și răspândesc pe Web opinii personale, fapte, știri false și tot felul de informații de care utilizatorii ar putea fi interesați. Aplicarea metodelor de mining de argumente la astfel de surse de date eterogene este o problemă deschisă provocatoare de cercetare, în special având în vedere particularitățile limbajului folosit pentru a scrie mesaje textuale pe rețelele de socializare. În plus, apar probleme noi atunci când se abordează argumentele postate pe astfel de platforme, cum ar fi necesitatea de a face o distincție între opiniile personale și faptele reale și de a detecta sursa care difuzează informații despre astfel de fapte pentru a permite verificarea provenienței. În această lucrare, aplicăm clasificarea supravegheată pentru identificarea argumentelor pe Twitter și prezentăm două noi sarcini pentru mineritul argumentelor, și anume recunoașterea faptelor și identificarea sursei. Studiem fezabilitatea abordărilor propuse pentru abordarea acestor sarcini pe un set de tweet-uri legate de subiectele de știri Grexit și Brexit.', 'mk': 'Социјалните медиуми собираат и шират лични мислења, факти, лажни вести и секакви видови информации кои можат да бидат заинтересирани. Примената на методите на рудање аргументи на вакви хетерогени извори на податоци претставува предизвикувачки отворено истражување, особено со оглед на особеноста на јазикот кој се користи за пишување текстуални пораки на социјалните медиуми. Покрај тоа, се појавуваат нови прашања кога се справуваат со аргументите поставени на ваквите платформи, како што е потребата да се направи разлика помеѓу личните мислења и вистинските факти, и да се детектира изворот на ширење информации за ваквите факти за да се овозможи верификација на потеклото Во овој документ, аплицираме надгледувана класификација за идентификување на аргументите на Твитер, и претставуваме две нови задачи за рудање аргументи, имено препознавање на факти и идентификување на изворот. Ние ја проучуваме физибилитетот на пристапите предложени за решавање на овие задачи на сет твитови поврзани со новинските теми Грексит и Брексит.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka bulshada waxaa laga yaabaa in aad ka xiisayso macluumaadka isticmaalayaasha macluumaadka oo dhan bogga internetka ka soo bandhigaan aragtida shakhsiga ah, xaqiiqyada, warbixinta been ah iyo isticmaalayaasha macluumaadka oo dhan. Ka codsashada qaababka qiimeynta ku saabsan noocyada macluumaadka ee kala duduwan waa arin dhibaato daran oo la xiriira waxbarashada furan, khusuusan ka fiirsashada aqoonta luqada ee loogu isticmaali karo warqadaha qoraalka ah ee shabakadda bulshada. Waxaa kaloo soo socda arrimaha cusub marka ay ka macaamiloodaan warqadaha looga soo bandhigay jardiinada, tusaale ahaan baahida u baahan inuu kala soocaa fikirka shakhsiga ah iyo xaqiiqyada, iyo in laga ogaado in sourceadu ay macluumaadka ku faafiyaan waxyaabaha kale si uu u ogolaado xaqiijinta. In this paper, we apply supervised classification to identify arguments on Twitter, and we present two new tasks for argument mining, namely facts recognition and source identification.  Waxaynu baranaynaa suurtagalka arimahan lagu talo galay shaqaalahaas oo ku saabsan warqado la xiriira Grexit iyo Brexit.', 'sv': 'Sociala medier samlar in och sprider på webben personliga åsikter, fakta, fake news och all slags information användare kan vara intresserade av. Att tillämpa argumentbrytningsmetoder på sådana heterogena datakällor är en utmanande öppen forskningsfråga, särskilt med tanke på särdragen i språket som används för att skriva textmeddelanden på sociala medier. Dessutom uppstår nya frågor när man behandlar argument som läggs upp på sådana plattformar, såsom behovet av att göra en åtskillnad mellan personliga åsikter och faktiska fakta och att upptäcka källan som sprider information om sådana fakta för att möjliggöra härkomstkontroll. I denna uppsats tillämpar vi övervakad klassificering för att identifiera argument på Twitter, och vi presenterar två nya uppgifter för argumentmining, nämligen faktakidentifikation och källidentifiering. Vi studerar genomförbarheten av de metoder som föreslås för att ta itu med dessa uppgifter på en uppsättning tweets relaterade till Grexit och Brexit nyhetsämnen.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමත්වය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වෙබ් පෞද්ගලික විශ්වාස, ඇත්ත, බොරු වාර්තාවක් සහ හැම විදියම තො සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ ඒවගේම, අළුත් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලි මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කළා තියෙන්නේ ට්විටර් වල තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි අලුත් වැඩක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න අපි ග්\u200dරෙක්සිට් සහ බ්\u200dරෙක්ස්ට් වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට තියෙන්න පුළුවන් අව', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்கள் இணைய தனிப்பட்ட கருத்துக்கள், உண்மைகள், பொய் செய்திகள் மற்றும் அனைத்து வகையான தகவல் பயனர்களுக்கு ஆர்வமாக இருக்கலா இத்தகைய அடர்த்திய தரவு மூலத்திற்கு வாய்ப்பு முறைகளை பயன்படுத்துவது திறந்த ஆராய்ச்சி பிரச்சனையாகும், குறிப்பாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழி மேலும், புதிய விஷயங்கள் புதிய தளங்களில் போன்ற வார்த்தைகளை பொருத்தும் போது, தனிப்பட்ட கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் உண்மையில் உள்ள வித்தியாசமாக்க வேண்டும் என்பது  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பாட்டை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து தருமதிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், வார்த்தை  நாம் இந்த பணிகளை முன்னோக்க முடியும் முன்னேற்றத்தின் செயல்களின் தன்மையை படிக்கவும் கிரெக்ஸிட் மற்றும் பிரெக்ஸிட் ச', 'ur': 'سوسیلی میڈیا ویب شخصی نظریں، حقیقت، جھوٹی خبریں اور ہر طرح کی اطلاعات کارساز پر علاقه مند ہو سکتے ہیں. اس طرح طریقے کے ذریعے ڈیٹا سروروں کے ذریعہ مٹانے کے مطابق مٹانے کے مطابق ایک کھلی تحقیقات مسئلہ ہے، مخصوصاً سوسیل میڈیا میں متن پیغام لکھنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے زبان کی تعریفیت کی توقع کرنا ہے اور اس کے علاوہ، نو مسائل ظاہر ہوتے ہیں جب ایسے پٹروم پر پوسٹ کیے ہوئے دلیل کے ساتھ بحث کرنے لگے، جیسے شخصی نظریں اور حقیقی حقیقت کے درمیان تفریق کرنے کی ضرورت ہے اور اس طرح کی حقیقت کے بارے میں اطلاعات پھیلانے والی سورج کو پہچان سکتے ہیں کہ ثابت کی تصدیق اس کاغذ میں، ہم توئیٹر کے ارتباطوں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے supervised classification کو لازم کرتے ہیں، اور ہم arguments mining کے لئے دو نو کام پیش کرتے ہیں، یعنی facts recognition and source identification. ہم نے اس طریقے کے مطابق پڑھنے کی امکانات کی تحقیق کی کہ یہ کاموں کو ایک مجموعہ ٹویٹ کے بارے میں دکھائیں جو گریکست اور بریکسٹ خبروں کے بارے میں متعلق ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Bu yerda hech qanday taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar manbasiga qoʻllash uchun ochiq taf-qidirish muammosi, hususiyat, til uchun matn xabarlarni social media yozish uchun ishlatilgan oddiy taʼminot muammosidir. Qo'shimcha, shunday platformda postlangan argumentlar bilan boshqarish kerak, shaxsiy g'oyalarni va haqiqida ajratish kerak, va suhbat haqida maʼlumotni aniqlash kerak. Bu hujjatda, biz Twitterda argumentlarni aniqlash uchun taʼminlovchi darajasini qoʻllamiz va biz argumentni qidirish uchun ikkita yangi vazifalarni hosil qilamiz, haqiqiqiylik va manba identifikasini ishlatamiz. Biz bu vazifalarni boshqarish talab qiladigan usullarning imkoniyatlarini o'rganamiz Grexit va Brexit xabar mavzulari haqida bog'langan Twittlarda.", 'vi': 'Các phương tiện thông tin xã hội thu thập và lan truyền trên mạng ý kiến cá nhân, dữ kiện, tin giả và mọi loại thông tin người dùng có thể quan tâm. Việc áp dụng phương pháp khai thác các luận về nguồn dữ liệu khác nhau như vậy là một vấn đề nghiên cứu mở đầy thử thách, đặc biệt là khi cân nhắc các đặc điểm của ngôn ngữ dùng để viết các thông điệp văn bản trên phương tiện xã hội. Thêm vào đó, những vấn đề mới được đưa ra khi đối phó với những lý luận được đăng trên các bục đó, như là cần phải phân biệt giữa quan điểm cá nhân và thực tế, và phát hiện nguồn cung cấp thông tin về các dữ kiện đó để có thể kiểm tra nguồn gốc. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi áp dụng mật khẩu giám sát để xác định các lý lẽ trên Twitter, và chúng tôi giới thiệu hai nhiệm vụ mới cho khai thác các vấn đề, là nhận diện sự kiện và nhận dạng nguồn tin. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu khả năng của các phương pháp đề xuất để giải quyết các nhiệm vụ này trên một loạt các tweet liên quan đến các tin tức phát xít và Brexit.', 'bg': 'Социалните медии събират и разпространяват в интернет лични мнения, факти, фалшиви новини и всякакъв вид информация, от която потребителите могат да се интересуват. Прилагането на методи за извличане на аргументи към такива хетерогенни източници на данни е предизвикателен открит изследователски въпрос, по-специално предвид особеностите на езика, използван за писане на текстови съобщения в социалните медии. Освен това възникват нови проблеми при разглеждането на аргументи, публикувани на такива платформи, като необходимостта да се направи разграничение между личните мнения и действителните факти и да се открие източникът, разпространяващ информация за такива факти, за да се даде възможност за проверка на произхода. В настоящата статия прилагаме надзорна класификация за идентифициране на аргументи в Туитър и представяме две нови задачи за извличане на аргументи, а именно разпознаване на факти и идентифициране на източника. Изследваме осъществимостта на предложените подходи за справяне с тези задачи на набор от туитове, свързани с новините за Грекзит и Брекзит.', 'da': 'Sociale medier indsamler og spreder på internettet personlige meninger, fakta, fake news og alle former for information brugerne kan være interesseret i. Anvendelse af argument mining metoder til sådanne heterogene datakilder er et udfordrende åbent forskningsspørgsmål, især i betragtning af de særlige forhold ved det sprog, der anvendes til at skrive tekstbeskeder på sociale medier. Derudover opstår der nye spørgsmål, når man behandler argumenter, der offentliggøres på sådanne platforme, såsom behovet for at skelne mellem personlige meninger og faktiske kendsgerninger og for at afsløre kilden, der formidler oplysninger om sådanne kendsgerninger for at gøre det muligt at verificere oprindelsen. I denne artikel anvender vi overvåget klassificering til at identificere argumenter på Twitter, og vi præsenterer to nye opgaver for argument mining, nemlig fakta anerkendelse og kildeidentifikation. Vi undersøger gennemførligheden af de foreslåede tilgange til at løse disse opgaver på et sæt tweets relateret til Grexit og Brexit nyheder emner.', 'nl': "Sociale media verzamelen en verspreiden op het web persoonlijke meningen, feiten, nepnieuws en allerlei informatie die gebruikers kunnen interesseren. Het toepassen van argument mining methodes op dergelijke heterogene gegevensbronnen is een uitdagend open onderzoeksvraagstuk, met name gezien de eigenaardigheden van de taal die wordt gebruikt om tekstberichten op sociale media te schrijven. Daarnaast ontstaan er nieuwe problemen bij het behandelen van argumenten die op dergelijke platforms worden gepost, zoals de noodzaak om onderscheid te maken tussen persoonlijke meningen en feitelijke feiten, en om de bron te detecteren die informatie over dergelijke feiten verspreidt om herkomstverificatie mogelijk te maken. In dit artikel passen we supervised classification toe om argumenten op Twitter te identificeren en presenteren we twee nieuwe taken voor argument mining, namelijk facts recognition en bronidentificatie. We bestuderen de haalbaarheid van de voorgestelde benaderingen om deze taken aan te pakken op een reeks tweets met betrekking tot de Grexit en Brexit nieuwsthema's.", 'hr': 'Društveni mediji mogu prikupiti i širiti lične mišljenje, činjenice, lažne vijesti i sve vrste korisnika informacija. Primjenjivanje metoda rudarstva argumenata takvim heterogenenim izvorima podataka je izazovno otvoreno istraživanje, posebno s obzirom na posebnost jezika korištenog za pisanje tekstualnih poruka na društvenim medijima. Osim toga, pojavljuju se nove pitanja kada se bave argumentima postavljenim na takvim platformama, kao što je potrebna razlika između ličnih mišljenja i stvarnih činjenica i otkrivanje izvora širenja informacija o takvim činjenicama kako bi omogućila proverenje dokaza. U ovom papiru, primjenjujemo nadzornu klasifikaciju za identifikaciju argumenata na Twitter-u, i predstavljamo dva nove zadatke za rudarstvo argumenata, a to je priznanje činjenica i identifikacija izvora. Proučavamo mogućnost pristupa predloženih za rješavanje ovih zadataka na skupu tweeta povezanih s temama o vijestima Grexit a i Brexita.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어는 인터넷에서 개인의 관점, 사실, 가짜 뉴스와 사용자가 흥미를 느낄 수 있는 각종 정보를 수집하고 전파한다.파라미터 발굴 방법을 이런 이구적 데이터 원본에 응용하는 것은 도전적인 개방적인 연구 문제이다. 특히 소셜 미디어에서 텍스트 메시지를 작성하는 데 사용되는 언어의 특수성을 고려한다.그 밖에 이런 플랫폼에서 발표된 논점을 처리할 때 새로운 문제가 발생했다. 예를 들어 개인의 관점과 실제 사실을 구분하고 이런 사실 정보를 전파하는 출처를 검측하여 출처를 검증해야 한다.본고에서 우리는 트위터의 논점을 식별하는 데 분류하는 것을 감독하고 두 가지 새로운 논점 발굴 임무, 즉 사실 식별과 출처 식별을 제시했다.우리는 그리스 브렉시트와 브렉시트 뉴스 주제와 관련된 트윗에서 이러한 임무를 해결하기 위해 제시한 방법의 타당성을 연구했다.', 'de': 'Soziale Medien sammeln und verbreiten im Web persönliche Meinungen, Fakten, Fake News und alle Arten von Informationen, die Benutzer interessieren könnten. Die Anwendung von Argument Mining Methoden auf solche heterogenen Datenquellen ist ein herausforderndes offenes Forschungsthema, insbesondere angesichts der Besonderheiten der Sprache, mit der Textnachrichten in sozialen Medien geschrieben werden. Darüber hinaus ergeben sich neue Probleme beim Umgang mit Argumenten, die auf solchen Plattformen veröffentlicht werden, wie die Notwendigkeit, zwischen persönlichen Meinungen und tatsächlichen Fakten zu unterscheiden und die Quelle zu erkennen, die Informationen über solche Fakten verbreitet, um eine Provenienzüberprüfung zu ermöglichen. In diesem Beitrag wenden wir überwachte Klassifizierung an, um Argumente auf Twitter zu identifizieren, und wir stellen zwei neue Aufgaben für Argument Mining vor, nämlich Facts Recognition und Source Identification. Wir untersuchen die Machbarkeit der vorgeschlagenen Ansätze, um diese Aufgaben in einer Reihe von Tweets zu den Grexit- und Brexit-Nachrichtenthemen anzugehen.', 'fa': 'رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی در نظر شخصی وب، حقیقت، خبرهای دروغ و تمام نوع کاربران اطلاعات ممکن است علاقه\u200cمند باشند. استفاده از روش ذخیره کردن arguments به چنین منبع اطلاعات متفاوتی یک مسئله تحقیقات باز مشکل است، مخصوصا با توجه به ویژگی\u200cهای زبانی که برای نوشتن پیام\u200cهای متن در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی استفاده می\u200cشود. علاوه بر این، موضوعات جدید در مورد بحث\u200cهایی که روی این platformها قرار داده شده\u200cاند، به عنوان نیاز برای تفاوت بین نظریه\u200cهای شخصی و حقیقت\u200cهای واقعی، و برای شناسایی منابع اطلاعاتی که در مورد این حقیقت\u200cها پراکنده می\u200cشود، می\u200cرود. در این کاغذ، ما کلیسازی تحت نظر نظر برای شناسایی مجادله\u200cها در توئیتر استفاده می\u200cکنیم، و ما دو کار جدید برای خریدن حکومت، یعنی شناسایی حقیقت و شناسایی منبع را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما موفقیت روش\u200cهایی را که پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند در مجموعه\u200cای از توئیت\u200cهایی که مربوط به موضوع اخبار گریکست و بریکست هستند تحقیق می\u200cکنیم.', 'id': 'Media sosial mengumpulkan dan menyebar di Web pendapat pribadi, fakta, berita palsu dan semua jenis pengguna informasi mungkin tertarik. Menggunakan metode penambangan argumen untuk sumber data yang heterogene adalah masalah penelitian terbuka yang menantang, terutama mempertimbangkan keanehan bahasa yang digunakan untuk menulis pesan teks di media sosial. Selain itu, masalah baru muncul ketika berurusan dengan argumen yang dipublikasikan pada platform tersebut, seperti kebutuhan untuk membuat perbedaan antara pendapat pribadi dan fakta sebenarnya, dan untuk mendeteksi sumber penyebaran informasi tentang fakta tersebut untuk memungkinkan verifikasi keberuntungan. Dalam kertas ini, kami menerapkan klasifikasi yang diawasi untuk mengidentifikasi argumen di Twitter, dan kami mempersembahkan dua tugas baru untuk pertambangan argumen, yaitu pengenalan fakta dan identifikasi sumber. Kami mempelajari feasibilitas pendekatan yang diusulkan untuk mengatasi tugas-tugas ini pada set tweet berkaitan dengan topik berita Grexit dan Brexit.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ya kijamii yanakusanya na kusambaza maoni binafsi kwenye mtandao wa intaneti, ukweli, habari potofu na watumiaji wa habari kila namna wanaweza kuvutiwa. Kutumia njia za uchimbaji madini kwa vyanzo vya taarifa kama hizi vinavyojitokeza ni suala la utafiti huru, hasa kuzingatia utafiti wa lugha ambazo zilitumika kuandika ujumbe wa maandishi kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Zaidi ya hayo, masuala mapya yanatokea pale yanapohusiana na hoja zilizowekwa kwenye majukwaa kama vile haja ya kutofautisha kati ya mawazo binafsi na ukweli halisi, na kutambua chanzo cha kusambaza taarifa kuhusu ukweli kama hizi ili kusaidia kuthibitishwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunatumia utangazaji uliothibitishwa ili kutambua hoja kwenye mtandao wa Twita, na tunaweka kazi mbili mpya kwa ajili ya uchimbaji madini, yaani kutambuliwa ukweli na utambulisho wa vyanzo vya habari. Tunafundisha uwezekano wa hatua zinazopendekezwa kuzungumzia kazi hizi kwenye seti ya twiti zinazohusiana na mada za habari za Grexit na Brexit.', 'tr': 'Sosyal medýdanlar web-de şahsy düşünjeler, hakykatlar, ýalňyş täzelikler we ähli görnüşler gyzyklanýar. Öňe bir faýl maglumat çeşmelerine argümentlerini küçürmek yöntemlerini ýazmak üçin sosyal medýýatlarda metin mesajlary ýazmak üçin ullanýan diliň nähili möhümliklerini gözlemekdir. Munuň üçin, şeýle platformlarda gönderilen argümatlar bilen çykyşyp täze mesele bolýar, Şahsy pikirler bilen hakyky faktalar arasynda bir a ýlaşyk etmeli bolýar we şol faktalar hakynda daşyk barlamak üçin çeşme hasaplamak üçin uly mesele çykýar. Bu kagyzda, Twitter-yň argümlerini tanamak üçin gözlemli klasifikasynda uygulaýarys we argüment taýýarlamak üçin iki täze zady täzeýäris, diýmek üçin faktlary tanamak we çeşme kimligini tassyklaýarys. Biz bu zadlary Grexit we Brexit täzelikleri bilen baglanýan täzeliklerde çözmek üçin teklip eden ýazmaklaryň mümkinçiligini öwrenýärdik.', 'sq': 'Media sociale mbledh dhe përhapet në internet opinionet personale, faktet, lajmet e rreme dhe të gjitha llojet e përdoruesve të informacionit mund të jenë të interesuar. Applying argument mining methods to such heterogeneous data sources is a challenging open research issue, in particular considering the peculiarities of the language used to write textual messages on social media.  Përveç kësaj, çështje të reja shfaqen kur merren me argumentet e vëna në platforma të tilla, të tilla si nevoja për të bërë një dallim midis opinioneve personale dhe fakteve aktuale dhe për të zbuluar burimin që përhap informacion rreth fakteve të tilla për të lejuar verifikimin e provencës. Në këtë letër, ne aplikojmë klasifikimin e mbikqyrur për të identifikuar argumentet në Twitter dhe paraqesim dy detyra të reja për minierën e argumenteve, veçanërisht njohjen e fakteve dhe identifikimin e burimit. Ne studiojmë realizueshmërinë e qasjeve të propozuara për të trajtuar këto detyra në një sërë tweeteve lidhur me temat e lajmeve Greksit dhe Brexit.', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች የራሳቸውን አሳብ፣ ውሸቶች፣ የሐሰት ዜና እና የዓይነት ዓይነት መረጃ ተጠቃሚዎች በመስጠት እና መዘጋጀት ይችላል፡፡ የቋንቋው የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ ለመጻፍ የሚደረገውን የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች በተቃወሙ የቋንቋ ትምህርት ግንኙነት በመስጠት የሚዘጋጀውን የድምፅ ማህበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሚቃወሙትን የመግለጫ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ እንደነዚህ ባለው ፕላፖርቶች ላይ በተለየ አዲስ ጉዳዮች ሲቆሙ፣ የራሳቸውን አሳብ እና እውነተኛውን ነገር መለየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የተጠበቀውን ክፍል በትዊተር ላይ አጋራጮችን ለማግኘት እናስጠጋለን፤ እናም ሁለት አዲስ ጉዳዮችን እና እውነቱን ማወቅ እና ምንጭ ማውቀት እና እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የግሪክት እና የብሪክቲ ዜና ጉዳዮች ላይ በተለየ ትዊተሮች ላይ ለመቀላቀል የተዘጋጀውን የደረጃዎች ግንኙነት እናስተምራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները հավաքում և տարածում են վեբ-կայքում անձնական կարծիքներ, փաստեր, կեղծ նորություններ և ցանկացած տեսակի ինֆորմացիայի օգտագործողներ կարող են հետաքրքրվել: Այսպիսի հետերոգեն տվյալների աղբյուրների համար արգելքների հանքային մեթոդներ կիրառելը բաց հետազոտության խնդիր է, հատկապես հաշվի առնելով սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գրվող գրական հաղորդագրությունների տարօրինակությունները: Ավելին, նոր խնդիրներ են առաջանում այս պլատֆորմերի վրա տեղադրված բանավեճերի հետ, ինչպիսիք են անձնական կարծիքների և իրական փաստերի միջև տարբերակելու կարիքը և հայտնաբերելու աղբյուրը, որը տարածում է տեղեկատվություն նման փաստերի մասին, որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի ստու In this paper, we apply supervised classification to identify arguments on Twitter, and we present two new tasks for argument mining, namely facts recognition and source identification.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք Գրեքսիթի և Բրեքսիթի նորությունների թեմաների հետ կապված այս խնդիրների լուծման համար առաջարկված մոտեցումների իրականացվությունը:', 'bs': 'Društveni mediji skupljaju i šire se na internet ličnim mišljenjima, činjenicama, lažnim vijestima i svim vrstama korisnika informacija mogu zainteresovati. Primjenjivanje metoda rudarstva argumenata takvim heterogenenim izvorima podataka je izazovno otvoreno istraživanje, posebno s obzirom na posebnost jezika korištenog za pisanje tekstualnih poruka na društvenim medijima. Osim toga, pojavljuju se novi pitanja kada se bave argumentima postavljenim na takvim platformama, kao što je potrebna razlika između ličnih mišljenja i stvarnih činjenica, i otkrivanje izvora koji širi informacije o takvim činjenicama kako bi omogućili provjeru dokaza. U ovom papiru primjenjujemo nadzornu klasifikaciju za identifikaciju argumenata na Twitter-u, i predstavljamo dva nove zadatke za rudarstvo argumenata, a to je priznanje činjenica i identifikacija izvora. Proučavamo mogućnost pristupa koji su predloženi da riješimo ove zadatke na setu tweeta povezanih sa temama o vijestima Grexit a i Brexita.', 'az': "İnternet şəxsi fikirləri, həqiqətləri, sahte xəbərlər və hər cür məlumat istifadəçilərinin interesi olar. Argument minik metodlarını böyük heterogenel veri kaynaqlarına uyğunlaşdırmaq, sosyal media içində textual mesajlar yazmaq üçün istifadə edilən dilin özlərini baxmaq çətin bir araştırma meselesidir. Bəlkə, bu platformlarda göndərilən argumentlər barəsində yeni məsələlər, kişilər fikirlərin və həqiqi faktların arasında fərqlənmək lazımdır və bu faktlar haqqında məlumatları dağıtmaq üçün məlumatları tanımaq üçün yeni məsələlər ortaya çıxdı. Bu kağızda, Twitter'da argumentləri təsdiqləmək üçün gözləyirik klasifikasyonu uygulayırıq. Biz argumenti qurmaq üçün iki yeni işi təsdiqləyirik, həmçinin həqiqətləri tanıma və mənbə kimliğini təsdiqləyirik. Biz bu işləri Grexit və Brexit xəbərləri məsələləri ilə bağlı bir sürü tweet üzerində çəkmək üçün təklif edilən tərzlərin müvəffəqiyyətini öyrənirik.", 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম ওয়েবের ব্যক্তিগত মতামত, সত্য, মিথ্যা সংবাদ এবং সকল ধরনের তথ্য ব্যবহারকারীরা হয়ত আগ্রহী হতে পারে। এই ধরনের উজ্জ্বল তথ্য উৎসের জন্য যুক্তি মিনিটিং পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করা হচ্ছে একটি উন্মুক্ত গবেষণা বিষয়, বিশেষ করে সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় লেখার জন্য ভাষ এছাড়াও নতুন বিষয়ের সাথে যখন এই ধরনের প্ল্যাটফর্মে পোস্ট করা যুক্তি নিয়ে আলোচনা করা হয়, যেমন ব্যক্তিগত মতামত এবং সত্যিকারের মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন করার প্রয়োজন এবং সূর্যের তথ্য এই কাগজটিতে আমরা টুইটারে যুক্তি চিহ্নিত করার জন্য পর্যবেক্ষণ করা পর্যবেক্ষণের ব্যাপারে প্রয়োগ করি, আর আমরা যুক্তি মিনিটের জন্য দুটি নতুন কা গ্রেক্সিট এবং ব্রেক্সিট সংবাদ বিষয়ের সাথে সম্পর্কিত কিছু টুইটের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাবিত এই কাজের ব্যাপারে আমরা পড়তে পারি যে', 'ca': "Els mitjans socials recollen i difunden opinions personals, fets, notícies falses i tots tipus d'informació que els usuaris poden interessar. Applying argument mining methods to such heterogeneous data sources is a challenging open research issue, in particular considering the peculiarities of the language used to write textual messages on social media.  A més, apareixen nous problemes al tractar-se d'arguments publicats en aquestes plataformes, com la necessitat de distingir les opinions personals i els fets reals, i detectar la font que difunde informació sobre aquests fets per poder verificar la proveniència. En aquest paper, aplicam una classificació supervisada per identificar arguments a Twitter, i presentem dues noves tasques per a la mineria d'arguments, a saber, el reconeixement de fets i l'identificació de fonts. Estudem la viabilitat dels enfocaments proposats per abordar aquestes tasques en un conjunt de tweets relacionats amb els temes de notícies Grexit i Brexit.", 'cs': 'Sociální média shromažďují a šíří na webu osobní názory, fakta, falešné zprávy a všechny druhy informací, které mohou uživatelé zajímat. Aplikace metod argument miningu na takové heterogenní zdroje dat je náročná otevřená výzkumná otázka, zejména s ohledem na zvláštnosti jazyka používaného k psaní textových sdělení na sociálních médiích. Kromě toho se při řešení argumentů uveřejněných na těchto platformách objevují nové problémy, jako je nutnost rozlišovat osobní názory a skutečné skutečnosti a odhalit zdroj šíření informací o těchto skutečnostech, aby bylo možné ověřit provenienci. V tomto článku používáme kontrolovanou klasifikaci k identifikaci argumentů na Twitteru a představujeme dva nové úkoly pro argument mining, a to rozpoznávání faktů a identifikaci zdrojů. Studujeme proveditelnost navržených přístupů k řešení těchto úkolů na sadě tweetů souvisejících s tématy Grexitu a Brexitu.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia kogub ja levitab veebis isiklikke arvamusi, fakte, valeuudiseid ja igasugust teavet, millest kasutajad võivad huvi tunda. Argumentide kaevandamise meetodite rakendamine sellistele heterogeensetele andmeallikatele on keeruline avatud uurimisteema, eelkõige arvestades sotsiaalmeedias tekstsõnumite kirjutamisel kasutatava keele eripära. Lisaks tekivad sellistel platvormidel postitatud argumentidega tegelemisel uued küsimused, näiteks vajadus eristada isiklikke arvamusi ja tegelikke fakte ning tuvastada allikas, mis levitab selliste faktide kohta teavet, et võimaldada päritolu kontrollimist. Käesolevas töös rakendame järelevalve all klassifitseerimist argumentide tuvastamiseks Twitteris ning esitame kaks uut argumentide kaevandamise ülesannet, nimelt faktide tuvastamine ja allika tuvastamine. Uurime nende ülesannete lahendamiseks kavandatud lähenemisviiside teostatavust Grexiti ja Brexiti uudisteemadega seotud säutsides.', 'af': "Soziale media versamel en versprei op die Web persoonlike besonderhede, fakte, falske nuus en al soort inligting gebruikers kan geinteresseer word. Die toepassing van argumente mining metodes aan sodanige heterogeneese data bronne is 'n pragtige oop ondersoek probleem, in besonderhede van die eienskappe van die taal wat gebruik word om tekstuele boodskappe op sosiale media te skryf. In addition, new issues emerge when dealing with arguments posted on such platforms, such as the need to make a distinction between personal opinions and actual facts, and to detect the source disseminating information about such facts to allow for provenance verification. In hierdie papier, ons aanwend superviseerde klasifikasie om argumente op Twitter te identifiseer, en ons voorsien twee nuwe opdragte vir argument mining, beteken fakties herken en bron identifiseering. Ons ondersoek die feilikheid van die toegang wat voorgestel het om hierdie taak te adres op 'n stel tweet wat verwanter is met die Grexit en Brexit nuusonderwerpe.", 'fi': 'Sosiaalinen media kerää ja levittää verkossa henkilökohtaisia mielipiteitä, faktoja, valeuutisia ja kaikenlaista tietoa, josta käyttäjät saattavat olla kiinnostuneita. Väitteenlouhimenetelmien soveltaminen tällaisiin heterogeenisiin tietolähteisiin on haastava avoin tutkimuskysymys erityisesti sosiaalisen median tekstiviestien kirjoittamiseen käytetyn kielen erityispiirteiden vuoksi. Lisäksi tällaisilla alustoilla julkaistujen väitteiden käsittelyssä esiin nousee uusia kysymyksiä, kuten tarve erottaa toisistaan henkilökohtaiset mielipiteet ja tosiasiat ja havaita lähde, joka levittää tietoja tällaisista seikoista alkuperän todentamiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa sovellamme valvottua luokittelua argumenttien tunnistamiseen Twitterissä, ja esittelemme kaksi uutta tehtävää argumenttien louhintaan, nimittäin faktojen tunnistamiseen ja lähteen tunnistamiseen. Tutkimme näiden tehtävien hoitamiseen ehdotettujen lähestymistapojen toteutettavuutta Grexit- ja Brexit-uutisaiheisiin liittyvissä tweeteissä.', 'he': 'התקשורת החברתית אוספת ומפשטת על האינטרנט דעות אישיות, עובדות, חדשות מזויפות וכל סוג של משתמשים במידע עשויים להיות מעוניינים. שימוש שיטות מינוי טיעונים למקורות נתונים היטרוגניים כזה הוא בעיה מחקר פתוח מאתגרת, במיוחד בהתחשב במיוחד במיוחדים של השפה שמשתמשת לכתוב הודעות טקסטיות על תקשורת חברתית. בנוסף, נושאים חדשים מתגלים כשמתמודדים עם ויכוחים שפורסמים על platforms כאלה, כמו הצורך לבצע הבדל בין דעות אישיות לעובדות אמיתיות, ולגלות את המקור שמפיץ מידע על עובדות כאלה כדי לאפשר לבדוק מקור. בעיתון הזה, אנו משתמשים בהקלטה מבוקרת כדי לזהות ויכוחים בטוויטר, ואנחנו מציגים שתי משימות חדשות למכרות טיעונים, כלומר זיהוי עובדות ומקור זיהוי. We study the feasibility of the approaches proposed to address these tasks on a set of tweets related to the Grexit and Brexit news topics.', 'ha': "Suna samun mutane da ke samun su cikin fikon mutane, da gaskiyar, da lãbãri na ƙarya da duk abubuwa masu amfani da shi. Aka amfani da shiryoyin kungiya zuwa wannan sourcen data masu tsakiya, yana mai zartar da matsayi masu buɗa ɗãwa, hususanci, a kan littãfin da ake amfani da wajen rubutun littãfi a kan mitandan jamii. Da wannan, masu sãbuwa za'a fita idan an yi jãyayya da argument wanda aka poste a kan wurãren kwamfyutan, kamar misali, ana buƙata a tsakanin mawaƙo masu shakka da gaskiyar, kuma dõmin a gane sourcen da za'a bayyana information about wannan fakta don ya yarda da tabbatar gaskiyar. Ga wannan takardan, muna amfani da fassarar tsari dõmin su gane argument a kan Twitter, kuma munã gabatar da aikin biyu masu buɗawa wa kungizo, sunan gaskiyar gaskiya da sune-zane-yanzu. We study the feasibility of the approaches proposed to address these tasks on a set of tweets related to the Grexit and Brexit news topics.", 'sk': 'Družbeni mediji zbirajo in širijo na spletu osebna mnenja, dejstva, lažne novice in vse vrste informacij, ki jih lahko zanimajo uporabniki. Uporaba metod rudarjenja argumentov za tako heterogene vire podatkov je zahtevno odprto raziskovalno vprašanje, zlasti glede na posebnosti jezika, ki se uporablja za pisanje besedilnih sporočil na družbenih omrežjih. Poleg tega se pojavljajo nova vprašanja pri obravnavi argumentov, objavljenih na takih platformah, kot je potreba po razlikovanju med osebnimi mnenji in dejanskimi dejstvi ter odkrivanju vira, ki širi informacije o takih dejstvih, da se omogoči preverjanje porekla. V prispevku uporabljamo nadzorovano klasifikacijo za identifikacijo argumentov na Twitterju in predstavljamo dve novi nalogi za rudarjenje argumentov, in sicer prepoznavanje dejstev in identifikacijo vira. Izvedljivost predlaganih pristopov za reševanje teh nalog preučujemo na nizu tweetov, povezanih z novicami o Grexitu in Brexitu.', 'jv': 'media sothik entekake lan ijol-ijol sing nganggo persilangan web perbudhakan, hak-kowe, balik sing gak bener lan kabèh sistem informasi sing bisa diandelaké sak ngerasakno politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang paper iki, kita aplike dipileksi perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo Kemerdekaan argument nang Google, lan nambah dhéwé nggawe winih dhéwé kanggo kelas nggunggo dolanan argument, nambah tanggal nggunaké karo Kemerdekaan Karo Kemerdekaan Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan kanggo kalaman nganggo pawartos nggawe gerakan karo nganggo mulalaman sing gawe bitawak dhéwé karo hal-alaman sing nggawe Grayx karo Brexte.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་བཞིན་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཕན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ནི་གནད་དོན་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་སྟངས་པར་གཏོང་ དེ་ལས་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་དག་གི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བའི་སྐབས་སུ། In this paper, we apply supervised classification to identify arguments on Twitter, and we present two new tasks for argument mining, namely facts recognition and source identification. ང་ཚོས་གྲོས་ལམ་ལུགས་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་བློ་གཏད་ཆེན་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ་འདི་ཚོ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Distinguishing Japanese Non-standard Usages from Standard Ones', 'ar': 'التمييز بين الاستخدامات اليابانية غير القياسية والاستخدامات القياسية', 'es': 'Distinguir los usos japoneses no estándar de los usos estándar', 'fr': 'Distinguer les usages japonais non standard des usages standard', 'pt': 'Distinguindo os usos não padronizados japoneses dos padrões', 'ja': '日本の非標準的な使用と標準的な使用の区別', 'hi': 'जापानी गैर-मानक उपयोगों को मानक लोगों से अलग करना', 'zh': '分日语非标准用法与法与法', 'ru': 'Отличие японских нестандартных видов использования от стандартных', 'ga': 'Idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir Úsáidí Neamhchaighdeánacha Seapánacha agus Úsáidí Caighdeánacha', 'hu': 'A japán nem szabványos használatok megkülönböztetése a szabványos használatoktól', 'el': 'Διακρίνοντας τις ιαπωνικές μη τυποποιημένες χρήσεις από τις τυποποιημένες', 'ka': 'სტანდარტური სტანდარტულებიდან წაპონიური არსტანდარტური გამოყენება', 'kk': 'Стандартты қолданбалардан жапон стандартты емес қолданбаларын шектеу', 'it': 'Distinguere usi giapponesi non standard da quelli standard', 'mk': 'Различувачки јапонски нестандардни употреби од стандардни', 'lt': 'Japonijos nenormalūs naudojimai skiriami nuo standartinių naudojimų', 'ms': 'Mengjelaskan Penggunaan Bukan-piawai Jepun dari Penggunaan Piawai', 'mt': 'Użu mhux standard Ġappuniż li jiddistingwi minn Użu Standard', 'no': 'Avdelingar ikkje standard brukar på japansk', 'mn': 'Японы стандарт биш стандарт хэрэглээ', 'pl': 'Odróżnianie japońskich niestandardowych zastosowań od standardowych', 'ro': 'Distinguerea utilizărilor non-standard japoneze de cele standard', 'sr': 'Odvajanje japanskih neostandardnih korištenja od standardnih korištenja', 'si': 'ජාපානිය නොප්\u200dරමාණික භාවිතාවය ප්\u200dරමාණය', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡാര്\u200dഡ് ഓണ്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നും ജപ്പാനീസ് സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വെട്ടിമാറ്', 'so': 'Distribution of Japanese Non-standard Uses from Standard Ones', 'sv': 'Skilja japanska icke-standardiserade användningar från standardanvändningar', 'ta': 'இயல்பான ஒன்றிலிருந்து ஜப்பானிய இயல்பான பயன்பாடுகளை பிரித்துவிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'جاپانی غیر استاندارڈ استعمال کو استاندارڈ اون سے تقسیم کرنے والا ہے', 'vi': 'Khác tiêu chuẩn của Nhật so với tiêu chuẩn', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Het onderscheiden van Japanse Niet-standaard Gebruiken van Standaard Gebruiken', 'de': 'Unterscheidung japanischer Nicht-Standard-Verwendungen von Standard-Verwendungen', 'bg': 'Различаване на японските нестандартни употреби от стандартните', 'id': 'Mengerikan penggunaan Jepang bukan standar dari penggunaan standar', 'hr': 'Odvajanje japanskih neostandardnih korištenja iz standardnih korištenja', 'da': 'Forskel mellem japanske ikke-standard brug og standard brug', 'fa': 'استفاده\u200cهای غیراستاندارد ژاپنی از استاندارد', 'tr': 'Ýaponiýanyň standartdan ulanylaryny taýýarlamak', 'af': 'Verwyder Japaanse nie-standaard gebruik vanaf Standaard Ones', 'sw': 'Kukataa matumizi yasiyo ya kawaida ya Japani kutoka kwa Standard Ones', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i përdorimeve jo-standarde japoneze nga ato standarde', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Ճապոնական ոչ ստանդարտ օգտագործման տարբերակումը ստանդարտ մեկներից', 'az': 'Standardl캼 N칬vl톛rd톛n Yaponca Standardl캼 캻stifad톛칞il톛ri ay캼rmaq', 'bs': 'Odvajanje japanskih neostandardnih korištenja iz standardnih korištenja', 'ca': 'Els diferents usos no estàndard japonès dels Standards', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্ডার্ড অনলাইন থেকে জাপানী ব্যবহার বিচ্ছিন্ন করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Jaapani mittestandardsete kasutusviiside eristamine standardsetest kasutusviisidest', 'ko': '일본의 비표준용법과 표준용법의 차이', 'cs': 'Rozlišování japonských nestandardních použití od standardních použití', 'fi': 'Japanin epätavanomaisten käyttötapojen erottaminen tavallisista käyttötapoista', 'jv': 'Ngubah Jepang-Jepang kuwi ora bisa Standard Senes', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Razlikovanje japonskih nestandardnih uporab od standardnih', 'he': 'משימות יפניות לא סטנדרטיות מבחינה סטנדרטית', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལས་ཉེ་ཧོང་གི་བྱ་རིམ་མེད་པའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཞིན'}
{'en': 'We focus on non-standard usages of common words on social media. In the context of social media, words sometimes have other usages that are totally different from their original. In this study, we attempt to distinguish non-standard usages on social media from standard ones in an unsupervised manner. Our basic idea is that non-standardness can be measured by the inconsistency between the expected meaning of the target word and the given context. For this purpose, we use context embeddings derived from word embeddings. Our experimental results show that the model leveraging the context embedding outperforms other methods and provide us with findings, for example, on how to construct context embeddings and which corpus to use.', 'ar': 'نحن نركز على الاستخدامات غير القياسية للكلمات الشائعة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. في سياق وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، أحيانًا يكون للكلمات استخدامات أخرى مختلفة تمامًا عن الأصل. في هذه الدراسة ، نحاول التمييز بين الاستخدامات غير القياسية على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي والاستخدامات القياسية بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة. فكرتنا الأساسية هي أنه يمكن قياس اللامعيارية من خلال التناقض بين المعنى المتوقع للكلمة الهدف والسياق المحدد. لهذا الغرض ، نستخدم زخرفة السياق المستمدة من زخرفة الكلمات. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن النموذج الذي يستفيد من تضمين السياق يتفوق على الأساليب الأخرى ويزودنا بالنتائج ، على سبيل المثال ، حول كيفية إنشاء عمليات تضمين السياق وأي مجموعة يجب استخدامها.', 'es': 'Nos centramos en usos no estándar de palabras comunes en las redes sociales. En el contexto de las redes sociales, las palabras a veces tienen otros usos que son totalmente diferentes de su original. En este estudio, intentamos distinguir los usos no estándar en las redes sociales de los usos estándar de una manera no supervisada. Nuestra idea básica es que la falta de estandarización se puede medir por la inconsistencia entre el significado esperado de la palabra objetivo y el contexto dado. Para este propósito, utilizamos incrustaciones de contexto derivadas de incrustaciones de palabras. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que el modelo que aprovecha la incrustación de contexto supera a otros métodos y nos proporciona hallazgos, por ejemplo, sobre cómo construir incrustaciones de contexto y qué corpus utilizar.', 'pt': 'Nós nos concentramos em usos não padronizados de palavras comuns nas mídias sociais. No contexto das mídias sociais, as palavras às vezes têm outros usos totalmente diferentes de seu original. Neste estudo, tentamos distinguir os usos não padronizados nas mídias sociais dos padrões de maneira não supervisionada. Nossa ideia básica é que a não padronização pode ser medida pela inconsistência entre o significado esperado da palavra alvo e o contexto dado. Para isso, utilizamos embeddings de contexto derivados de embeddings de palavras. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram que o modelo que alavanca a incorporação de contexto supera outros métodos e nos fornece descobertas, por exemplo, sobre como construir incorporações de contexto e qual corpus usar.', 'fr': "Nous nous concentrons sur les usages non standard des mots courants sur les réseaux sociaux. Dans le contexte des réseaux sociaux, les mots ont parfois d'autres usages totalement différents de leur original. Dans cette étude, nous tentons de distinguer les usages non standard sur les réseaux sociaux des usages standard de manière non supervisée. Notre idée de base est que le non-standard peut être mesuré par l'incohérence entre le sens attendu du mot cible et le contexte donné. À cette fin, nous utilisons des intégrations de contexte dérivées des intégrations de mots. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle utilisant l'intégration du contexte surpasse les autres méthodes et nous fournissent des résultats, par exemple, sur la façon de construire des intégrations de contexte et sur le corpus à utiliser.", 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアでの共通語の非標準的な使用に焦点を当てています。ソーシャルメディアの文脈では、言葉には本来の意味とはまったく異なる他の用法があることがあります。この研究では、ソーシャルメディア上の非標準的な使用法と標準的な使用法を監督されていない方法で区別しようとします。私たちの基本的な考えは、非標準性は、対象単語の期待される意味と与えられた文脈との間の矛盾によって測定することができるということです。この目的では、ワード埋め込みから派生したコンテキスト埋め込みを使用します。私たちの実験結果は、コンテキスト埋め込みを活用したモデルが他の方法よりも優れており、コンテキスト埋め込みを構築する方法や使用するコーパスなどの知見を提供してくれることを示しています。', 'zh': '注于社交媒体上常用词者非标准用法。 社交媒体之背景,单词有与始单词异者。 以此论之,吾试以无监督之法分社交媒体上之非标准用法。 吾道者,非标准性之所以期单词与给定上下文之间异也。 为用从词嵌派生之上下文嵌。 吾实验结果表明,以上下文嵌模优于他法,为我发之,如构上下文嵌及所用语料库。', 'hi': 'हम सोशल मीडिया पर आम शब्दों के गैर-मानक उपयोगों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। सोशल मीडिया के संदर्भ में, शब्दों में कभी-कभी अन्य उपयोग होते हैं जो उनके मूल से पूरी तरह से अलग होते हैं। इस अध्ययन में, हम सोशल मीडिया पर गैर-मानक उपयोगों को एक असुरक्षित तरीके से मानक लोगों से अलग करने का प्रयास करते हैं। हमारा मूल विचार यह है कि गैर-मानकता को लक्ष्य शब्द के अपेक्षित अर्थ और दिए गए संदर्भ के बीच असंगतता द्वारा मापा जा सकता है। इस उद्देश्य के लिए, हम शब्द एम्बेडिंग से व्युत्पन्न संदर्भ एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि संदर्भ एम्बेडिंग का लाभ उठाने वाला मॉडल अन्य तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है और हमें निष्कर्ष प्रदान करता है, उदाहरण के लिए, संदर्भ एम्बेडिंग का निर्माण कैसे करें और किस कॉर्पस का उपयोग करें।', 'ru': 'Мы фокусируемся на нестандартном использовании общих слов в социальных сетях. В контексте социальных сетей слова иногда имеют другие привычки, которые полностью отличаются от их оригинала. В этом исследовании мы пытаемся отличить нестандартные виды использования в социальных сетях от стандартных в неконтролируемой манере. Наша основная идея заключается в том, что нестандартность может быть измерена несоответствием между ожидаемым значением целевого слова и данным контекстом. Для этого мы используем контекстные вложения, полученные из вложений слов. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что модель, использующая встраивание контекста, превосходит другие методы, и предоставляют нам выводы, например, о том, как строить встраивания контекста и какой корпус использовать.', 'ga': 'Dírímid ar úsáidí neamhchaighdeánacha focal coitianta ar na meáin shóisialta. I gcomhthéacs na meán sóisialta, uaireanta bíonn úsáidí eile ag focail atá iomlán difriúil óna gcuid bunaidh. Sa staidéar seo, déanaimid iarracht úsáidí neamhchaighdeánacha ar na meáin shóisialta a idirdhealú ó úsáidí caighdeánacha ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht. Is é an bunsmaoineamh atá againn ná gur féidir neamhchaighdeánacht a thomhas tríd an neamhréireacht idir brí ionchais an spriocfhocail agus an comhthéacs a thugtar. Chun na críche sin, úsáidimid leabaithe comhthéacs a dhíorthaítear ó leabaithe focal. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go n-éiríonn níos fearr leis an tsamhail a luann an leabú comhthéacs ná modhanna eile agus go dtugann sé torthaí dúinn, mar shampla, maidir le conas leabú comhthéacs a thógáil agus cén corpas le húsáid.', 'el': 'Εστιάζουμε σε μη τυποποιημένες χρήσεις κοινών λέξεων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Στο πλαίσιο των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, οι λέξεις μερικές φορές έχουν άλλες χρήσεις που είναι εντελώς διαφορετικές από την αρχική τους. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, προσπαθούμε να διακρίνουμε τις μη τυποποιημένες χρήσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης από τις συνηθισμένες με τρόπο χωρίς επίβλεψη. Η βασική μας ιδέα είναι ότι η μη τυπικότητα μπορεί να μετρηθεί από την ασυνέπεια μεταξύ της αναμενόμενης έννοιας της λέξης-στόχου και του συγκεκριμένου πλαισίου. Για το σκοπό αυτό, χρησιμοποιούμε ενσωματώσεις περιβάλλοντος που προέρχονται από ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο που αξιοποιεί την ενσωμάτωση περιβάλλοντος ξεπερνά άλλες μεθόδους και μας παρέχει ευρήματα, για παράδειγμα, σχετικά με το πώς να κατασκευάσουμε ενσωμάτωση περιβάλλοντος και ποιο σώμα πρέπει να χρησιμοποιήσουμε.', 'hu': 'A közösségi médiában a közös szavak nem szabványos használatára összpontosítunk. A közösségi média összefüggésében a szavaknak néha más használati módjaik vannak, amelyek teljesen eltérnek az eredetitől. Ebben a tanulmányban felügyelet nélkül próbáljuk megkülönböztetni a nem szabványos használatokat a közösségi médiában a szabványos használatoktól. Alapgondolatunk az, hogy a nem szabványosság a célszó várható jelentése és az adott kontextus közötti ellentmondás alapján mérhető. Ebből a célból szóbeágyazásokból származó kontextusbeágyazásokat használunk. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a kontextus beágyazását használó modell más módszereket felülmúlja, és megállapítja, hogy hogyan lehet kontextus beágyazásokat építeni és milyen korpuszokat használni.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ სოციალური მედიაში საერთო სიტყვების გამოყენებას არ სტანდარტური გამოყენებაზე დავყენებთ. სოციალური მედიახის კონტექსტში, სიტყვები ზოგჯერ აქვს სხვა გამოყენება, რომელიც ისინი ორიგინალური განსხვავებულია. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ მოვცდილობთ სოციალური მედიაში სტანდარტური გამოყენებების განსხვავებას სტანდარტურად განსხვავება სტანდარტურად. ჩვენი ფესტური იდეა არის, რომ არ არის სტანდარტურებულობა შეიძლება იზრდება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას ამ მიზეზისთვის, ჩვენ კონტექსტური დავყენებთ სიტყვებისგან. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებს, რომ მოდელი, რომელიც კონტექსტურის შემდეგ შემდეგ გავაკეთებს სხვა მეტისებს და ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ, მაგალითად, როგორ შემდეგ კონტექს', 'lt': 'Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame neįprastam bendrų žodžių naudojimui socialinėje žiniasklaidoje. Socialinės žiniasklaidos srityje žodžiai kartais vartojami kitais būdais, kurie visiškai skiriasi nuo originalo. Šiame tyrime bandome neatsižvelgiant į standartinius socialinių žiniasklaidų naudojimus atskirti nuo standartinių. Mūsų pagrindinė idėja yra ta, kad nenuoseklumas gali būti matuojamas nenuoseklumu tarp tikėtinos tikslinio žodžio reikšmės ir nurodyto konteksto. Šiuo tikslu naudojame konteksto įdėjimus, gautus iš žodžių įdėjimų. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad modelis, kuriame naudojamas kontekstas, atitinka kitus metodus ir suteikia mums išvadas, pavyzdžiui, kaip sukurti konteksto sudedamąsias dalis ir kokią korpusą naudoti.', 'it': "Ci concentriamo su usi non standard di parole comuni sui social media. Nel contesto dei social media, le parole a volte hanno altri usi che sono totalmente diversi dal loro originale. In questo studio, cerchiamo di distinguere gli usi non standard sui social media da quelli standard in modo non supervisionato. La nostra idea di base è che la non-standard può essere misurata dall'incoerenza tra il significato atteso della parola target e il contesto dato. A questo scopo, utilizziamo incorporazioni di contesto derivate da incorporazioni di parole. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano che il modello che sfrutta il context embedding supera altri metodi e ci fornisce risultati, ad esempio, su come costruire context embedding e quale corpus utilizzare.", 'kk': 'Біз әлемдік медиақтардағы жалпы сөздерді стандартты емес қолдануға көмектесеміз. Әлеуметтік медиақтардың контексті сөздер кейбірде басқа пайдаланулары бар, олардың басқа әріптерінен бөлек. Бұл зерттеулерде, әлеуметтік медиақтардың стандартты қолданбаларын стандартты түрлерден таңдауға тырыстық. Біздің негізгі идеямыз - стандарттық емес сөздің мәліметі мен келтірілген контекстің арасындағы мәліметінің қайсылықтығын өлшеп алады. Бұл мақсат үшін сөздерді ендіру үшін контексті ендіруді қолданамыз. Тәжірибелік нәтижелеріміздің контексті ендіру үлгісі басқа әдістерді жасап, мысалы, контексті ендіру және корпус қалай қолданылатын табуларды көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Се фокусираме на нестандардните употреби на заеднички зборови на социјалните медиуми. Во контекст на социјалните медиуми, зборовите понекогаш имаат други употреби кои се сосема различни од нивниот оригинал. Во оваа студија, се обидуваме да ги разликуваме нестандардните употреби на социјалните медиуми од стандардните на ненадгледуван начин. Нашата основна идеја е дека нестандардноста може да се мери со несогласувањето помеѓу очекуваното значење на зборот на целта и дадениот контекст. За оваа цел, користиме контекстни вградувања кои се извлечени од зборови вградувања. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека моделот кој го вложува контекстот кој го вклучува надминува други методи и ни обезбедува откритија, на пример, како да изградиме контекстни вложувања и кој корпус да се користи.', 'ms': 'Kami fokus pada penggunaan perkataan biasa bukan piawai pada media sosial. In the context of social media, words sometimes have other usages that are totally different from their original.  Dalam kajian ini, kami cuba untuk membezakan penggunaan bukan piawai pada media sosial daripada yang piawai dengan cara yang tidak diawasi. Idea asas kita adalah bahawa ketidakstandar boleh diukur oleh ketidakkonsistensi antara makna dijangka perkataan sasaran dan konteks yang diberikan. Untuk tujuan ini, kita menggunakan penyembedding konteks yang berasal dari penyembedding perkataan. Hasil percubaan kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang menggunakan konteks yang memasukkan melampaui cara lain dan memberikan kami penemuan, misalnya, bagaimana untuk membina penyembahan konteks dan mana corpus untuk digunakan.', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേറെ ഉപയോഗങ്ങളുണ്ട്. അവയുടെ മൂലം  ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d, സാമൂഹ്യമിഷ്ഠമായ ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സാമൂഹ്യമല്ലാത്ത ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചു  നമ്മുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ആശയം എന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യ വാക്കിന്റെയും കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്ന സംസ്കാരത്തിന്റെയും അ അതിനുവേണ്ടി, വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d മറ്റു രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിന', 'mt': "Aħna niffokaw fuq użu mhux standard ta' kliem komuni fuq il-midja soċjali. Fil-kuntest tal-midja soċjali, xi kultant il-kliem għandu użi oħra li huma totalment differenti mill-oriġinali tagħhom. F’dan l-istudju, qed nippruvaw niddistingwu l-użi mhux standard fuq il-midja soċjali minn dawk standard b’mod mhux sorveljat. L-idea bażika tagħna hija li n-nuqqas ta’ standard jista’ jitkejjel mill-inkonsistenza bejn it-tifsira mistennija tal-kelma fil-mira u l-kuntest partikolari. Għal dan il-għan, aħna nużaw inkorporazzjonijiet fil-kuntest derivati minn inkorporazzjonijiet fil-kliem. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li l-mudell li jinbena l-kuntest li jinkorpora jwassal għal metodi oħra u jipprovdilna b’sejbiet, pereżempju, dwar kif jinbnew l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kuntest u liema korpus għandu jintuża.", 'no': 'Vi fokuserer på ikkje-standard bruk av vanlege ord på sosiale media. I konteksten av sosiale media har ord noen gong andre brukar som er totalt ulike frå originalen. I denne studien prøver vi å forstå ikkje-standard brukar på sosiale medier frå standardane på ein ukjend måte. Grunnleggjande ideen vårt er at ikkje-standardisjonen kan måles av den inkonsistenten mellom den forventa meningen av målsordet og den oppgjevne konteksten. For dette målet bruker vi kontekstinnbygging som er avhengig frå ordinnbygging. Eksperimentale resultat våre viser at modellen som leverer kontekstinnbygginga utfører andre metodar og gjer oss med finning, for eksempel, om korleis kontekstinnbygging skal konstruerast og kva korpus skal brukast.', 'pl': 'Skupiamy się na niestandardowym użyciu powszechnych słów w mediach społecznościowych. W kontekście mediów społecznościowych słowa mają czasami inne zastosowania, które zupełnie różnią się od ich oryginału. W niniejszym opracowaniu staramy się odróżnić niestandardowe zastosowania w mediach społecznościowych od standardowych w sposób bez nadzoru. Naszą podstawową ideą jest to, że niestandardowość można mierzyć przez niespójność między oczekiwanym znaczeniem słowa docelowego a danym kontekstem. W tym celu używamy osadzeń kontekstowych pochodzących z osadzeń słowowych. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że model wykorzystujący osadzenie kontekstu przewyższa inne metody i dostarcza nam wniosków, na przykład, jak skonstruować osadzenia kontekstu i jaki korpus należy użyć.', 'mn': 'Бид нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр нийтлэг үгнүүдийг стандарт бус хэрэглээнд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн нөхцөлд заримдаа үг нь өөр өөр өөр ашигладаг. Энэ судалгаанд бид нийгмийн хэвлэлийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээний стандарт биш стандарттай хэрэглээнийг өөрчлөх гэж хичээдэг. Бидний үндсэн санаа бол стандарт бус байдал нь зорилготой үгийг болон өгөгдсөн тохиолдолын хоорондын тэгш байдлыг хэмжиж болно. Энэ зорилготой тулд бид үг нэвтрүүлэхээс гаргасан контекст нэвтрүүлэгүүдийг ашиглаж байна. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд харагдаж байгаа зүйл нь нөхцөл байдлыг ашиглах загвар бусад арга загварыг ашиглаж, жишээлбэл нөхцөл байдлыг хэрхэн бүтээж, хэрхэн корпус ашиглах вэ?', 'ro': 'Ne concentrăm pe utilizările non-standard ale cuvintelor comune pe rețelele de socializare. În contextul rețelelor sociale, cuvintele au uneori alte utilizări care sunt total diferite de originalul lor. În acest studiu, încercăm să distingem într-un mod nesupravegheat utilizările non-standard pe rețelele de socializare de cele standard. Ideea noastră de bază este că non-standarditatea poate fi măsurată prin inconsecvența dintre sensul așteptat al cuvântului țintă și contextul dat. În acest scop, folosim încorporări de context derivate din încorporări de cuvinte. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul care utilizează încorporarea contextului depășește alte metode și ne oferă descoperiri, de exemplu, despre cum să construim încorporări contextuale și ce corpuri să utilizăm.', 'si': 'අපි සාමාජික මිඩියාවට සාමාන්\u200dය වචන වර්තනයක් නොප්\u200dරමාණික භාවිත විදිහට බලන්න. සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ සංවේදනයෙන්, වචන් සමහරවෙලාවට වෙනස් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා ඒ වග මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි උත්සාහ කරනවා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණික ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැති ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නොවිශ්ව අපේ මූලික අදහසක් තමයි නොස්ටාන්ඩර්ස්ටාන්ඩර්ස්ටාන්ඩර්ස්ට් එක්ක අනතුරු වෙන්න පුළුවන් ඉලක්ක වචනය සහ මේ අදහස් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණ සම්බන්ධයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා වචන සම්බන්ධයක් වලින්. අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිච', 'so': 'Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa isticmaalka hadallada caadiga ah ee ku saabsan shabakada bulshada. Hadalka bulshada qaarkood waxey leeyihiin isticmaalo kale oo aad u kala duwan yihiin asalkiisa. Waxbarashadan waxaynu isku dayaynaa in aan isticmaalka caalamka ah ka kala soocno isticmaalka shabakada bulshada si caadi ah oo aan la ilaalin. Fikiradayada aasaasiga ah waa in lagu qiyaasi karo mid aan isku qiimo lahayn oo u dhexeeya micneheeda la rajaynayo ee hadalka goalka iyo mukhtarka la siiyey. Sababtaas darteed waxaynu isticmaalnaa qalabka hoose ee ka soo baxay hadalka. Imtixaankayada waxaa tusaale ah in modelka ku socoshada daboolka ka soo baxa uu sameeyaa qaabab kale, wuxuuna na siiyaa tusaale ahaan si aan u dhisno qalabka qalabka iyo qofka lagu isticmaalayo.', 'sv': 'Vi fokuserar på icke-standardanvändning av vanliga ord på sociala medier. I samband med sociala medier har ord ibland andra användningsområden som skiljer sig helt från originalet. I denna studie försöker vi på ett obevakat sätt skilja icke-standardanvändning på sociala medier från standardanvändning. Vår grundidé är att icke-standard kan mätas genom inkonsekvensen mellan målordets förväntade betydelse och det givna sammanhanget. För detta ändamål använder vi kontextinbäddningar som härrör från ordinbäddningar. Våra experimentella resultat visar att modellen som utnyttjar kontextinbäddning presterar bättre än andra metoder och ger oss fynd, till exempel, på hur man konstruerar kontextinbäddning och vilken korpus som ska användas.', 'sr': 'Fokusiramo se na neostandardnu upotrebu zajedničkih reèi na društvenim medijima. U kontekstu društvenih medija, reči ponekad imaju druge upotrebe koje su potpuno drugačije od njihovih originala. U ovoj studiji pokušavamo da razlikujemo neustandardne korištenje na društvenim medijima od standardnih na neodređen način. Naša osnovna ideja je da se ne standardnost može izmjeriti sa neskladnošću između očekivanog značenja ciljne riječi i određenog konteksta. Za ovu svrhu koristimo kontekstske integracije iz reèi ugraðenja. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da model koji utiče na kontekst uključujući iznosi druge metode i pruža nam nalaze, na primjer, o tome kako izgraditi kontekstske integracije i koje korpuse treba koristiti.', 'ta': 'நாம் நிலையான பயன்பாடுகளை பொதுவான வார்த்தைகளில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். சமூக ஊடகங்களின் மூலம், சில நேரங்களில் வார்த்தைகள் முழுமையாக மாறுபட்ட பயன்பாடுகள் உள்ளன. இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் நிலைமையான பயன்பாடுகளை சமூக ஊடகங்களில் பிரித்துக் கொள்ள முயற்சி செய்கிறோம் நிலைமையா நம்முடைய அடிப்படை யோசனை என்னவென்றால் நிலையில்லாத சொல்லின் எதிர்பார்த்த அர்த்தத்திற்கும் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மூலமும இந்த காரணத்திற்கு, நாம் வார்த்தையிலிருந்து கொண்டுள்ள உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'ہم سوسیل میڈیا پر مشترک کلمات کی غیر استاندارڈ استعمال پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ سوسیل میڈیا کے متعلق، کلمات بعض وقت دوسرے استعمال ہیں جو ان کی اصلی سے کامل مختلف ہیں۔ اس مطالعہ میں، ہم نے سوسیل میڈیا میں غیر استاندارڈ استفاده کرنے کی کوشش کی ہے ایسے استاندارڈ سے غیر استاندارڈ استفاده کرنے کی طرح۔ ہماری بنیادی نظر یہ ہے کہ غیر استاندارڈیٹ کا اندازہ مقرر کر سکتا ہے موقع لفظ اور مقررہ منظور کے درمیان غیر قابل تعبیر کے ذریعہ سے۔ اس کے لئے، ہم متوسط ایمبڈینگ استعمال کرتے ہیں جو کلمات ایمبڈینگ سے پائی جاتی ہیں۔ ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ موڈل جو متوسط میں جمع کرتا ہے اور دوسرے طریقے سے کام کرتا ہے اور ہم کو اچھے نتیجے کے ذریعے پیش کرتا ہے، مثال، کیسے متوسط ایمبڈینگ بنانا اور کون کورپوس کا استعمال کرنا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz jamiyat media'da umumiy so'zlarning umumiy foydalanuvchiga foydalanamiz. Socket media muhitida so'zlar ba'zi marta boshqa foydalanuvchilar asl asl aslida o'xshash. Bu taʼminotda, biz sosial media uchun standard foydalanuvchilarni andoza tomonidan foydalanishga harakat qilamiz. Bizning asosiy fikrimimiz, oddiylik emas, jadvaldagi so'zning tarkibi va koʻrsatilgan tarkibi tarkibini aniqlash mumkin. Bu sababda, biz so'zlar ichiga kelib chiqarilgan tarkiblardan foydalanamiz. Bizning tajriba natijalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, modelni ajratish boshqa usullarni bajaradi va bizga tushunish imkoniyatlarini qanday ishlab chiqarish va qanday qo'shni ishlatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi tập trung vào cách dùng những từ phổ biến khác nhau trên mạng xã hội. Trong giới truyền thông xã hội, đôi khi từ ngữ có nhiều cách sử dụng khác hoàn toàn với bản gốc của nó. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi cố gắng phân biệt không-tiêu chuẩn sử dụng trên phương tiện xã hội với phương tiện thông thường một cách không giám sát. Lý tưởng cơ bản của chúng ta là sự không chuẩn mực có thể được đo bằng sự mâu thuẫn giữa ý nghĩa mong đợi của từ đích và ngữ cảnh cụ thể. Vì mục đích này, chúng tôi sử dụng sự gắn kết ngữ cảnh từ sự nhúng tay. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình dùng để thao túng ngữ cảnh này thực hiện các phương pháp khác và cung cấp cho chúng tôi các kết quả, ví dụ, về cách xây dựng sự nhúng ghép ngữ cảnh và tập kết hợp để sử dụng.', 'bg': 'Фокусираме се върху нестандартните употреби на общи думи в социалните медии. В контекста на социалните медии думите понякога имат други употреби, които са напълно различни от първоначалния им. В настоящото проучване се опитваме да разграничим нестандартните употреби в социалните медии от стандартните по ненадзорен начин. Основната ни идея е, че нестандартността може да бъде измерена чрез несъответствието между очакваното значение на целевата дума и дадения контекст. За тази цел използваме контекстни вграждания, получени от вграждания на думи. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че моделът, използващ вграждането на контекста, превъзхожда други методи и ни предоставя открития, например, как да изградим вграждания на контекста и кой корпус да използваме.', 'hr': 'Fokusiramo se na neostandardnu upotrebu zajedničkih riječi na društvenim medijima. U kontekstu društvenih medija, riječi ponekad imaju druge upotrebe koje su potpuno drugačije od njihovih originala. U ovom ispitivanju pokušavamo razlikovati neuobičajene primjene na društvenim medijima od standardnih na neodređen način. Naša osnovna ideja je da se ne standardnost može mjeriti neskladnošću između očekivanog značenja ciljne riječi i određenog konteksta. Za ovu svrhu koristimo kontekstske integracije iz ugrađenja riječi. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da model koji utječe na kontekst uključujući iznosi druge metode i pruža nam nalaze, na primjer, o tome kako izgraditi kontekstske integracije i koje korpus treba koristiti.', 'da': 'Vi fokuserer på ikke-standard brug af almindelige ord på sociale medier. I forbindelse med sociale medier har ord nogle gange andre anvendelser, der er helt anderledes end deres oprindelige. I denne undersøgelse forsøger vi at skelne ikke-standard brug på sociale medier fra standard brug på en uautoriseret måde. Vores grundlæggende idé er, at manglende standard kan måles ved inkonsekvensen mellem målordets forventede betydning og den givne kontekst. Til dette formål bruger vi sammenhængsindlejringer afledt af ordindlejringer. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at modellen, der udnytter kontekst indlejring, overgår andre metoder og giver os resultater, for eksempel, om hvordan man konstruerer kontekst indlejringer, og hvilket korpus der skal bruges.', 'nl': 'We richten ons op niet-standaard gebruik van algemene woorden op sociale media. In de context van sociale media hebben woorden soms andere toepassingen die totaal anders zijn dan hun origineel. In deze studie proberen we niet-standaard gebruik op sociale media te onderscheiden van standaard gebruik op een onbeheerde manier. Ons basisidee is dat niet-standaard gemeten kan worden aan de inconsistentie tussen de verwachte betekenis van het doelwoord en de gegeven context. Hiervoor gebruiken we context embeddings afgeleid van woord embeddings. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het model dat gebruik maakt van de context embedding beter presteert dan andere methoden en ons inzichten verschaft, bijvoorbeeld over hoe context embeddings te construeren en welk corpus we moeten gebruiken.', 'de': 'Wir konzentrieren uns auf die nicht standardmäßige Verwendung gängiger Wörter in sozialen Medien. Im Kontext sozialer Medien haben Wörter manchmal andere Verwendungen, die sich völlig von ihrem Original unterscheiden. In dieser Studie versuchen wir, nicht-standardisierte Nutzungen in sozialen Medien von Standard-Nutzungen unbeaufsichtigt zu unterscheiden. Unsere Grundidee ist, dass Nichtstandardität an der Inkonsistenz zwischen der erwarteten Bedeutung des Zielwortes und dem gegebenen Kontext gemessen werden kann. Dazu verwenden wir Kontexteinbettungen, die aus Worteinbettungen abgeleitet sind. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das Modell, das die Kontexteinbettung nutzt, andere Methoden übertrifft und uns Erkenntnisse liefert, zum Beispiel, wie Kontexteinbettungen konstruiert werden können und welches Korpus verwendet werden soll.', 'fa': 'ما روی استفاده های غیر استاندارد کلمات مشترک در رسانه های اجتماعی تمرکز می کنیم. در محیط رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، کلمات بعضی وقتها استفاده\u200cهای دیگری دارند که کاملاً از اصلی آنها متفاوت هستند. در این مطالعه، ما سعی می\u200cکنیم که استفاده\u200cهای غیر استاندارد را در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی از استاندارد\u200cها به طریق غیر قابل استاندارد جدا کنیم. ایده\u200cی بنیادی ما این است که غیر استانداردهایی می\u200cتواند با اختلاف بین معنی انتظار کلمه هدف و محیط داده شود. برای این هدف، ما از وسیله\u200cهای محیط استفاده می\u200cکنیم که از وسیله\u200cهای کلمه\u200cای استفاده می\u200cشود. نتیجه آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که مدل تحت تاثیر قرار گرفتن محیط بیشتر از روش های دیگر انجام می دهد و برای مثال، به ما نشان می دهد که چگونه ساختن محیط محیط و کدام کورپوس برای استفاده از آن استفاده کنیم.', 'id': 'Kita fokus pada penggunaan kata-kata yang tidak standar pada media sosial. Dalam konteks media sosial, kata terkadang memiliki penggunaan lain yang benar-benar berbeda dari aslinya. Dalam studi ini, kami mencoba untuk membedakan penggunaan bukan standar di media sosial dari yang standar dalam cara yang tidak diawasi. Ide dasar kita adalah bahwa ketidakstandar dapat diukur oleh ketidakkonsistensi antara arti yang diharapkan dari kata sasaran dan konteks yang diberikan. Untuk tujuan ini, kita menggunakan konteks embedding yang berasal dari kata embedding. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang menggunakan konteks yang menggabungkan menghasilkan metode lain dan memberikan kami penemuan, misalnya, tentang bagaimana membangun konteks yang menggabungkan dan corpus yang mana untuk digunakan.', 'sw': 'Tunakatiza matumizi yasiyo ya kawaida ya maneno ya kawaida kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Katika muktadha wa mitandao ya kijamii, maneno mengine yana matumizi mengine yanayotofautiana na asili yao. Katika utafiti huu, tunajaribu kutofautisha matumizi yasiyo ya kawaida kwenye mitandao ya kijamii kwa njia isiyo na usalama. Wazo wetu wa msingi ni kwamba kutokuwepo kwa usawa unaweza kupigwa na kutokuwepo kwa ukosefu kati ya maana ya kutarajiwa ya neno la lengo na muktadha unaotumiwa. For this purpose, we use context embeddings derived from word embeddings.  Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wa kuingia muktadha unafanya njia nyingine na kutupatia matokeo, kwa mfano, jinsi ya kujenga mazingira ya muktadha na makampuni gani ya kutumia.', 'sq': 'Ne përqëndrohemi në përdorimin jo-standard të fjalëve të përbashkëta në media sociale. Në kontekstin e medias sociale, fjalët ndonjëherë kanë përdorime të tjera që janë krejtësisht të ndryshme nga origjinalet e tyre. Në këtë studim, ne përpiqemi të dallojmë përdorimet jo-standarde në mediat sociale nga ato standarde në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur. Ideja jonë thelbësore është se mosstandardizmi mund të matet nga moskonsistenca midis kuptimit të pritur të fjalës objektive dhe kontekstit të dhënë. Për këtë qëllim, ne përdorim përfshirje konteksti të nxjerra nga përfshirje fjalësh. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli që përfshin kontekstin përfshin metoda të tjera dhe na ofron gjetje, për shembull, se si të ndërtojmë përfshirje konteksti dhe se cilin korpus të përdorim.', 'tr': 'Biz sosial medýdançalaryň umumy sözleriniň adatça ulanmaklaryna üns berýäris. Sosyal medýdanlaryň barynda käwagt başga sözleriň özleriniň başga görnüşleri bar. Bu okuwda, sosyal medialarda standart ulanmaklaryny ukypsyz şeklinde tapawutlandyrmak synanyşýarys. Biziň esasy pikirimiz şudyr, maksadyň sözüň we berilen kontekstyň arasyndaky aýratylyklaryň netijesi bilen ölçürilip biler. Bu maksada üçin sözleriň içinden netijeli kontekst ködlemeleri ulanýarys. Deneysel netijelerimiz nusgalarymyz daşarylan kontekst çykyşynyň başga yönlerden çykyp barýandygyny görkez we örän çykyşymyz, kontekst integrlerini nädip gurmalydygyny we hangi korpusy ulanmalydygyny düşünýär.', 'am': 'በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የተጠቃሚ ቃላትን በማስተካከል እናስከትናለን፡፡ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ አንዳንድ ጊዜ ቃላት ከመጀመሪያው የተለየ ሌሎች ተጠቃሚ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ ያልተቃውሞ ተጠቃሚዎችን በማይለይ ይሞክራለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው አሳቤያችን ግን የአካባቢው ቃል እና በተሰጠው ግንኙነት መካከል በተስፋው ግንኙነት ሳይሆን ይለካል፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት ከንግግር አካባቢ መሆኑን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን የግንኙነታችንን አካባቢ እና የትኛውን ኮርፓስ ለመሥራት እና የትኛውን ፍጥረት ማድረግ የሚችል ሞዴል ሌሎችን ሥርዓቶች እንዲያሳየን እና ፍጥረት እንዲያሳየን ነው፡፡', 'af': "Ons fokus op nie-standaard gebruik van gemeenskaplike woorde op sosiale media. In die konteks van sosiale media het woorde soms ander gebruike wat totaal anders is van hul oorspronklike. In hierdie studie probeer ons om nie-standaard gebruikte op sosiale media te verkies van standaard een op 'n onverondersteunde manier nie. Ons basiese idee is dat nie-standaardskap kan gemeet word deur die inkonsistensie tussen die verwagte betekening van die doelwoord en die gegewe konteks. Vir hierdie doel gebruik ons konteks inbêding wat van woord inbêding afgelei word. Ons eksperimentale resultate wys dat die model wat die konteks inbêring uitvoer ander metodes en verskaf ons met vindings, byvoorbeeld, op hoe om konteks inbêding te konstrukteer en wat korpus te gebruik.", 'hy': 'Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների ոչ ստանդարտ բառերի օգտագործման վրա: Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների կոնտեքստում բառերը երբեմն ունեն այլ օգտագործումներ, որոնք լիովին տարբերվում են իրենց սկզբնական օգտագործումներից: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք փորձում ենք առանձնացնել սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների ոչ ստանդարտ օգտագործումը ստանդարտ լրատվամիջոցներից անվերահսկված կերպով: Մեր հիմնական գաղափարն այն է, որ անստանդարտությունը կարելի է չափել նպատակային բառի ակնկալվող իմաստի և տվյալ կոնտեքստի անհամապատասխանության միջև: Այս նպատակով մենք օգտագործում ենք կոնտեքստի ներդրումներ, որոնք ստացվում են բառերի ներդրումից: Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մոդելը, որը օգտագործում է կոնտեքստը ներառող կոնտեքստը, արտադրում է այլ մեթոդներ և տալիս է մեզ հայտնաբերություններ, օրինակ, այն մասին, թե ինչպես կառուցել կոնտեքստի ներառումներ և որպիսի կո', 'ko': '우리는 소셜 미디어에서 자주 사용하는 단어의 비표준적인 용법에 주목한다.소셜 미디어의 언어 환경에서 단어는 때때로 원래와 완전히 다른 용법이 있을 수 있다.이 연구에서 우리는 소셜 미디어의 비표준적인 용법과 표준적인 용법을 무감독적인 방식으로 구분하려고 한다.우리의 기본적인 관점은 비표준성은 목표어의 예상적 의미와 주어진 언어 환경 간의 불일치를 통해 평가할 수 있다는 것이다.이를 위해, 우리는 단어로부터 파생된 상하문 삽입을 사용합니다.우리의 실험 결과는 상하문 삽입을 이용한 모델이 다른 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈고 상하문 삽입을 어떻게 구축하고 어떤 어료 라이브러리를 사용하는지에 대한 발견을 제공했다.', 'bn': 'আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে সাধারণ শব্দ ব্যবহারের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করি। সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্রেক্ষাপটে, মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে শব্দ অন্যান্য ব্যবহার রয়েছে যা তাদ এই গবেষণায় আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে স্বাভাবিক ব্যবহারকারীদের স্বাভাবিক ভাবে বিচ্ছিন্ন করার চেষ্টা করছি স্থানান আমাদের মৌলিক চিন্তা হচ্ছে যে টার্গেট শব্দ এবং প্রদত্ত কন্টেক্সটেন্টের মধ্যে প্রত্যাশিত মানের মধ্যে অসম্পর্কের ম এই উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য আমরা কন্টেক্সটেক্সটেন্ট ব্যবহার করি শব্দ থেকে প্রবেশ করা হয়েছে। আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রেক্ষাপটের বাইরে যাওয়ার মডেল অন্যান্য পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করে এবং উদাহরণস্বরূপ, কিভাবে প্রেক্ষিত বিভিন্ন প্', 'ca': "Ens centrem en l'ús no estàndard de paraules comunes als mitjans socials. En el context dels mitjans socials, a vegades les paraules tenen altres usos totalment diferents del seu original. In this study, we attempt to distinguish non-standard usages on social media from standard ones in an unsupervised manner.  La nostra idea bàsica és que la no-normalitat pot ser mesurada per l'inconsistencia entre el significat esperat de la paraula alvo i el context dada. Per aquest propòsit, utilitzem integracions contextuals derivades d'integracions de paraules. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que el model que aprofita el context que incorpora surt altres mètodes i ens proporciona descobriments, per exemple, sobre com construir els contextos incorporats i quin corpus utilitzar.", 'cs': 'Zaměřujeme se na nestandardní používání běžných slov na sociálních médiích. V kontextu sociálních médií mají slova někdy jiná použití, která se zcela liší od původního. V této studii se snažíme odlišit nestandardní využití na sociálních médiích od standardních bez dohledu. Naší základní myšlenkou je, že nestandardnost může být měřena rozporem mezi očekávaným významem cílového slova a daným kontextem. Za tímto účelem používáme kontextové vložení odvozené z vložení slov. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že model využívající kontextové vložení překonává ostatní metody a poskytuje nám poznatky, například o tom, jak konstruovat kontextové vložení a jaký korpus použít.', 'et': 'Me keskendume tavaliste sõnade mittestandardsele kasutamisele sotsiaalmeedias. Sotsiaalmeedia kontekstis on sõnadel mõnikord teistsugune kasutusviis, mis on täiesti erinev nende originaalist. Käesolevas uuringus püüame eristada sotsiaalmeedias mittestandardseid kasutusviise standardsetest kasutusviisidest järelevalveta. Meie põhimõte on, et mittestandardsust saab mõõta sihtsõna oodatava tähenduse ja antud konteksti vahelise vastuoluga. Selleks kasutame konteksti manustamist, mis tuleneb sõna manustamisest. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et konteksti integreerimist kasutav mudel ületab teisi meetodeid ja annab meile järeldusi näiteks selle kohta, kuidas luua konteksti integreerimist ja millist korpust kasutada.', 'fi': 'Keskitymme tavallisten sanojen epätavalliseen käyttöön sosiaalisessa mediassa. Sosiaalisessa mediassa sanoilla on joskus muita käyttötapoja, jotka poikkeavat täysin alkuperäisestä. Tässä tutkimuksessa pyrimme erottamaan epästandardien sosiaalisen median käytöstä valvomattomalla tavalla. Perusideamme on, että epästandardia voidaan mitata kohdesanan odotetun merkityksen ja tietyn kontekstin välisestä epäjohdonmukaisuudesta. Tätä tarkoitusta varten käytämme sanaupotuksista johdettuja kontekstikohdatuksia. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että kontekstin upottamista hyödyntävä malli päihittää muut menetelmät ja antaa meille havaintoja esimerkiksi kontekstin upottamisesta ja mitä korpusta käytetään.', 'az': 'Biz sosyal medya ilə ortaq sözlərin istifadə edilməsini standart deyil. Sosyal media məlumatının məlumatında, bəzən sözlər özlərinin orijinalindən tamamilə farklı istifadələri vardır. Bu təhsil içində, sosyal mediyalarda standartlardan istifadə edilməyə çalışırıq. Bizim temel fikrimiz, standartların olmadığı məlumatın və məlumatın gözlədiyi məlumatın arasında müəyyən edilməsi ilə ölçülür. Bu məqsədilə, sözlərin içərisindən alınan məlumatları istifadə edirik. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, məsələn, məsələlərimizin məsələlərini yaratmaq və hansı korpus istifadə etmək üçün modellərin başqa metodlarını etmişdir.', 'bs': 'Fokusiramo se na neostandardnu upotrebu zajedničkih riječi na društvenim medijima. U kontekstu društvenih medija, riječi ponekad imaju druge upotrebe koje su potpuno drugačije od njihovih originala. U ovoj studiji pokušavamo da razlikujemo neustandardne korištenje na društvenim medijima od standardnih na neodređen način. Naša osnovna ideja je da se ne standardnost može izmjeriti sa neskladnošću između očekivanog značenja ciljne riječi i određenog konteksta. Za ovu svrhu koristimo kontekstske integracije iz ugrađenja riječi. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da model koji utiče na kontekst uključujući iznosi druge metode i pruža nam nalaze, na primjer, o tome kako izgraditi kontekstske integracije i koji korpus treba koristiti.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno awak-awak dhéwé éntukno ing bebasan gambaran ning media sotiki. Nang kontèks media sampeyan, sira-sangane saiki kelas liyane mungkin usahan liyane sing wis nguasai mulai sing larang sampeyan liyane Nang ujaran iki, kéné saiki nggalakno kanggo ngerasakno usaha luwih-luwih liyo lan media sithik kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi kudu nggawe barang apik. Awak dhéwé sistem punika dipun-ne Awak dhéwé iki bakal êjer-nesaturan tambah kuwi nggawe barang seneng kabèh dumadhakan kelompok word nggawe lan kontèks sing nyimpen Erlanggar wii, kita ngubah akeh embedding context sing menehi gambar Rejalaké awak dhéwé éntukno ngomong nik model sing nggawe barang-barang nggawe Metdodo sing ujaran kanggo nyebuté awak dhéwé, sampek, ngono kakéwé nggawe barang-ujaran iki bakal sampek trus.', 'ha': "Munã kiyãye wa'anar magana masu kawaici a kan mitandai da jamii. A cikin muhimmin mitandai da jamii, wasu mutane na da amfani da wasu mutane waɗanda ke da kamfata bã da sãɓãni ba daga asalinsu. Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã jarraba ka rarraba amfani da ba-da-kawai a kan mitandai da jamii daga masu tsari da tsari. Fikiratinmu na bincike ne, za'a iya ƙayyade nau'i a tsakanin maganar da aka yi amfani da wanda aka ƙayyade. For this purpose, we use context embeddings derived from word embeddings.  Matarinmu za'a nũna cewa, misãlin mai tsari da mazaɓa na guda yana samar da wasu hanyoyi na daban kuma yana azurta mu da misali, don ka sami bakin ayuka masu fitarwa da kuma wanne nauyi da za'a yi amfani da.", 'sk': 'Osredotočamo se na nestandardno uporabo skupnih besed na družbenih omrežjih. V kontekstu družbenih medijev imajo besede včasih drugačne uporabe, ki so popolnoma drugačne od njihovega izvirnika. V tej študiji poskušamo nenadzorovano razlikovati nestandardne uporabe na družbenih omrežjih od standardnih. Naša osnovna ideja je, da nestandardnost lahko merimo z neskladnostjo med pričakovanim pomenom ciljne besede in danim kontekstom. V ta namen uporabljamo kontekstne vdelave, ki izhajajo iz besednih vdelav. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da model, ki uporablja vključevanje konteksta, presega druge metode in nam daje ugotovitve, na primer, kako graditi vključevanje konteksta in kateri korpus uporabiti.', 'he': 'אנחנו מתמקדים בשימושים לא סטנדרטיים של מילים נפוצות בתקשורת חברתית. In the context of social media, words sometimes have other usages that are totally different from their original.  In this study, we attempt to distinguish non-standard usages on social media from standard ones in an unsupervised manner.  הרעיון הבסיסי שלנו הוא שאין סטנדרנות ניתן למדוד על ידי אי-תואמות בין המשמעות הצפויה של המילה המטרה לקשר הנתון. למטרה זו, אנו משתמשים בתערוכות קונטקסט שנוצרו מתערוכות מילים. התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו מראות שהמודל שמשתמש בקשר שמכיל את הקשר משתמש בשיטות אחרות ומספק לנו מציאות, לדוגמא, על איך לבנות קונטקסט מקשרים ואיזה קורפוס להשתמש.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐུན་རྟགས་མིན་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩིས་མེད་པའི་གྲངས སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་ཕལ་ཆེར་ཐོག་ལས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གཞན་ཞིག་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མི་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་གཞི་རྩ་བའི་བསམ དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཁོར་ཡུག་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་འདི་བེད་སྤྱོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འཚོལ་བྱ་བ་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཁུངས་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་སྐྱོན་བྱེད་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Connotation Frames of Power and Agency in Modern Films', 'ar': 'دلالة أطر القوة والوكالة في الأفلام الحديثة', 'es': 'Marcos de connotación de poder y agencia en el cine moderno', 'fr': "Cadres de connotation du pouvoir et de l'agence dans les films modernes", 'pt': 'Quadros de conotação de poder e agência em filmes modernos', 'ja': '現代映画におけるパワーとエージェンシーのコノテーションフレーム', 'zh': '今世电影权能动性涵框架', 'ru': 'Коннотационные кадры власти и агентства в современных фильмах', 'hi': 'आधुनिक फिल्मों में शक्ति और एजेंसी के अर्थ फ्रेम्स', 'ga': 'Frámaí Connotation Cumhachta agus Gníomhaireacht i Scannáin Nua-Aimseartha', 'it': 'Cornici di connotazione di potere e agenzia nei film moderni', 'el': 'Πλαίσια σύνδεσης δύναμης και πρακτορείας στις σύγχρονες ταινίες', 'hu': 'A hatalom és az ügynökség összekapcsolási keretei a modern filmekben', 'ka': 'მოდინარე ფილმებში ძალიან და ადგინტის კონოტაციის ფრამები', 'ms': 'Bingkai Konnotasi Kuasa dan Agensi dalam Film Modern', 'kk': 'Қуатты фильмдерде қуатты және агентияның коннотация фреймдері', 'mk': 'Конотациски рамки на моќта и агенцијата во модерните филмови', 'lt': 'Modernių filmų galios ir agentūros konstatavimo sistemos', 'ml': 'ആദ്യ ഫിലിമ്മുകളിലുള്ള ശക്തിയുടെയും എജന്\u200dസിയുടെയും ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Qafas ta’ Konnotazzjoni tal-Potenza u l-Aġenzija fil-Films Moderni', 'pl': 'Konotacyjne ramy władzy i agencji w nowoczesnych filmach', 'ro': 'Cadre de conotare a puterii și agenției în filmele moderne', 'si': 'Name', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн кинонд хүчирхэг болон агентлагийн коннотация Фрейм', 'no': 'Konnotasjonsramme for kraft og byrået i moderne filmar', 'so': 'Connotation Frames of Power and Agency in Modern Films', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய படங்களில் மின்சக்தி மற்றும் செயல்பாட்டின் இணைப்பு சட்டங்கள்', 'sr': 'Konnotacioni okvir moći i agencije u modernim filmovima', 'ur': 'اڈرنڈ فیلموں میں پاور اور ایجنسیٹ کی کنٹیشن فرمز', 'sv': 'Sammankopplingsramar av makt och byrå i moderna filmer', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết cấu hình điện và cơ quan trong phim hiện đại', 'bg': 'Конотационни рамки на властта и агенцията в съвременните филми', 'da': 'Konotation Rammer af magt og agentur i moderne film', 'hr': 'Konnotacioni okvir moći i agencije u modernim filmovima', 'de': 'Connotation Frames of Power and Agency in Modern Films', 'nl': 'Connotatiekamers van macht en agentschap in moderne films', 'id': 'Bingkai Konnotasi Kekuatan dan Agensi dalam Film Modern', 'sw': 'Connotation Frames of Power and Agency in Modern Films', 'af': 'Konnotasie Raams van Krag en Agensie in Moderne Filme', 'fa': 'Frames Connotation of Power and Agency in Modern Films', 'sq': 'Kornizat e Konnotacionit të Fuqisë dhe Agjensisë në Filmat Moderne', 'tr': 'Günorta Filmlerde güç we Agentisiýanyň hatlary', 'ko': '현대 영화에서 권력과 대리의 내포 틀', 'hy': 'Հիմացած ֆիլմերում', 'am': 'አገናኝ', 'az': 'Modern Filml톛rd톛 g칲c칲 v톛 a캮ent콞ru', 'bn': 'আধুনিক চলচ্চিত্রের ক্ষমতা এবং এজেন্সির সংযোগ ফ্রেম', 'bs': 'Konnotacioni okvir moći i agencije u modernim filmovima', 'cs': 'Konotační rámy moci a agentury v moderních filmech', 'ca': 'Marcs de connotació de poder i agència en películes modernes', 'et': 'Võimu- ja agentuuriraamid kaasaegsetes filmides', 'fi': 'Voiman ja agentuurin kehyksiä nykyelokuvissa', 'jv': 'Konnotetion frame of Power and Ajén nang Film Moderno', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מסגרי זיהוי של כוח וסוכנות בסרטים מודרניים', 'sk': 'Konotacijski okviri moči in agencije v sodobnih filmih', 'bo': 'Modern Films ནང་གི་ནུས་ཤུགས་དང་ཨ་རིས་གཞུང་སྟོན་པར་ཆས།'}
{'en': 'The framing of an action influences how we perceive its actor. We introduce connotation frames of power and agency, a pragmatic formalism organized using frame semantic representations, to model how different levels of power and agency are implicitly projected on actors through their actions. We use the new power and agency frames to measure the subtle, but prevalent, gender bias in the portrayal of modern film characters and provide insights that deviate from the well-known Bechdel test. Our contributions include an extended lexicon of connotation frames along with a web interface that provides a comprehensive analysis through the lens of connotation frames.', 'ar': 'يؤثر تأطير العمل على كيفية إدراكنا لممثليه. نقدم أطر دلالة للسلطة والوكالة ، وهي شكلية براغماتية منظمة باستخدام التمثيلات الدلالية للإطار ، لنمذجة كيفية عرض المستويات المختلفة للسلطة والوكالة ضمنيًا على الفاعلين من خلال أفعالهم. نحن نستخدم القوة الجديدة وإطارات الوكالة لقياس التحيز الجنسي الخفي ، ولكن السائد ، في تصوير شخصيات الأفلام الحديثة وتقديم رؤى تنحرف عن اختبار Bechdel المعروف. تتضمن مساهماتنا معجمًا موسعًا لإطارات الدلالات جنبًا إلى جنب مع واجهة الويب التي توفر تحليلاً شاملاً من خلال عدسة إطارات الدلالات.', 'fr': "Le cadrage d'une action influence la façon dont nous percevons son acteur. Nous introduisons des cadres de connotation du pouvoir et de l'agence, un formalisme pragmatique organisé à l'aide de représentations sémantiques de cadres, pour modéliser la façon dont les différents niveaux de pouvoir et d'agence sont implicitement projetés sur les acteurs à travers leurs actions. Nous utilisons les nouveaux cadres de pouvoir et d'agence pour mesurer les préjugés sexistes subtils mais répandus dans la représentation des personnages de films modernes et fournir des informations qui s'écartent du célèbre test de Bechdel. Nos contributions comprennent un lexique étendu de cadres de connotation ainsi qu'une interface Web qui fournit une analyse complète sous l'angle des cadres de connotation.", 'pt': 'O enquadramento de uma ação influencia a forma como percebemos seu ator. Introduzimos quadros de conotação de poder e agência, um formalismo pragmático organizado usando representações semânticas de quadros, para modelar como diferentes níveis de poder e agência são implicitamente projetados nos atores por meio de suas ações. Usamos os novos quadros de poder e agência para medir o sutil, mas predominante, viés de gênero na representação de personagens de filmes modernos e fornecer insights que se desviam do conhecido teste de Bechdel. Nossas contribuições incluem um extenso léxico de quadros de conotação juntamente com uma interface web que fornece uma análise abrangente através da lente dos quadros de conotação.', 'es': 'El encuadre de una acción influye en cómo percibimos a su actor. Introducimos marcos de connotación de poder y agencia, un formalismo pragmático organizado mediante representaciones semánticas de marcos, para modelar cómo los diferentes niveles de poder y agencia se proyectan implícitamente en los actores a través de sus acciones. Utilizamos los nuevos marcos de poder y agencia para medir el sesgo de género sutil, pero prevalente, en la representación de los personajes cinematográficos modernos y proporcionar ideas que se desvían de la conocida prueba de Bechdel. Nuestras contribuciones incluyen un léxico ampliado de marcos de connotación junto con una interfaz web que proporciona un análisis exhaustivo a través de la lente de los marcos de connotación.', 'ja': 'アクションの枠組みは、その俳優の捉え方に影響を与えます。権力とエージェンシーの意味づけの枠組みを紹介します。これは、フレームの意味論的表現を使用して構成された実用的な形式主義であり、異なるレベルの権力とエージェンシーがアクターの行動を通じてどのように暗黙のうちにアクターに投影されるかをモデル化します。私たちは、新しいパワーとエージェンシーのフレームを使用して、現代の映画キャラクターの描写における微妙でありながら一般的なジェンダーバイアスを測定し、有名なBechdelテストから逸脱した洞察を提供します。私たちの貢献には、意味づけフレームの拡張辞書と、意味づけフレームのレンズを通して包括的な分析を提供するウェブインターフェイスが含まれます。', 'hi': 'एक कार्रवाई का फ्रेमिंग प्रभावित करता है कि हम इसके अभिनेता को कैसे देखते हैं। हम शक्ति और एजेंसी के अर्थ फ्रेम पेश करते हैं, एक व्यावहारिक औपचारिकता जो फ्रेम शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके आयोजित की जाती है, मॉडल करने के लिए कि कैसे शक्ति और एजेंसी के विभिन्न स्तरों को उनके कार्यों के माध्यम से अभिनेताओं पर स्पष्ट रूप से पेश किया जाता है। हम आधुनिक फिल्म पात्रों के चित्रण में सूक्ष्म, लेकिन प्रचलित, लिंग पूर्वाग्रह को मापने के लिए नई शक्ति और एजेंसी फ्रेम का उपयोग करते हैं और अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं जो प्रसिद्ध बेचडेल परीक्षण से विचलित होते हैं। हमारे योगदान में एक वेब इंटरफ़ेस के साथ अर्थ फ्रेम का एक विस्तारित शब्दकोश शामिल है जो अर्थ फ्रेम के लेंस के माध्यम से एक व्यापक विश्लेषण प्रदान करता है।', 'zh': '一动之框架,何以观其优也? 引入权能动性之涵框架,一用框架语义征之实形式主义,以拟层次之权能动性何以行者隐而射之? 吾以新权摄框架,量今世电影角色刻画微妙而普遍存在性别偏见,并给离众所周知Bechdel试之见。 贡献包框架之广词典及涵框架之镜头,备析其Web界面。', 'ru': 'Кадры действия влияют на то, как мы воспринимаем его актера. Мы вводим коннотационные фреймы власти и агентства, прагматический формализм, организованный с использованием фреймовых семантических представлений, чтобы смоделировать, как различные уровни власти и агентства имплицитно проецируются на актеров своими действиями. Мы используем новые силовые и агентские кадры для измерения тонкой, но преобладающей гендерной предвзятости в изображении современных киноперсонажей и предоставляем идеи, которые отклоняются от хорошо известного теста Bechdel. Наш вклад включает расширенный лексикон фреймов коннотации наряду с веб-интерфейсом, который обеспечивает всесторонний анализ через призму фреймов коннотации.', 'ga': 'Bíonn tionchar ag leagan amach gnímh ar an dóigh a mbreathnaímid ar a ghníomhaí. Tugaimid isteach frámaí brí na cumhachta agus na gníomhaireachta, foirmiúlacht phragmatach a eagraítear ag baint úsáide as léiriúcháin shéimeantacha fráma, chun samhail a dhéanamh den chaoi a ndéantar leibhéil éagsúla cumhachta agus gníomhaireachta a réamh-mheasta go hintuigthe ar ghníomhaithe trína gcuid gníomhartha. Bainimid úsáid as na frámaí cumhachta agus gníomhaireachta nua chun an claonadh inscne caolchúiseach ach forleithne i léiriú carachtair scannán nua-aimseartha a thomhas agus chun léargais a sholáthar a chlaonann ó thástáil aitheanta Bechdel. I measc ár ranníocaíochtaí tá foclóir sínte de fhrámaí connotation mar aon le comhéadan gréasáin a sholáthraíonn anailís chuimsitheach trí lionsa na frámaí connotation.', 'el': 'Η πλαισίωση μιας δράσης επηρεάζει τον τρόπο με τον οποίο αντιλαμβανόμαστε τον ηθοποιό της. Εισάγουμε πλαίσια συμβολισμού εξουσίας και πρακτορικότητας, έναν πραγματιστικό φορμαλισμό που οργανώνεται χρησιμοποιώντας σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις πλαισίων, για να μοντελοποιήσουμε πώς τα διαφορετικά επίπεδα εξουσίας και πρακτορικότητας προβάλλονται έμμεσα στους ηθοποιούς μέσω των ενεργειών τους. Χρησιμοποιούμε τα νέα πλαίσια δύναμης και πρακτορείων για να μετρήσουμε την λεπτή, αλλά επικρατούσα, προκατάληψη φύλου στην απεικόνιση των σύγχρονων κινηματογραφικών χαρακτήρων και να παράσχουμε ιδέες που αποκλίνουν από το γνωστό τεστ Μπέτσντελ. Οι συνεισφορές μας περιλαμβάνουν ένα εκτεταμένο λεξικό των πλαισίων συμβολισμού μαζί με μια διεπαφή που παρέχει μια ολοκληρωμένη ανάλυση μέσω του φακού των πλαισίων συμβολισμού.', 'ka': 'მოქმედების სტრუმენტი იქნება როგორ ჩვენ მისი აკტერის აღმოჩენებთ. ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ ძალიან და ადვნენტის კონნოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაცია, პრაგმატი ჩვენ ახალი ძალიან და ადვნენტის ფრამების გამოყენებთ, მაგრამ ძალიან ძალიან მარტივის, მაგრამ ძალიან გარჩენებული, გენდური ფრამების პორტრეაციაში ჩვენ მივიღებთ მონაცემები, რომელიც უცნობილი ჩვენი დამატებით კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტაციის კონოტიკონის ელექსიკონი, რომელიც სამუშაო ინტერფექტის კონოტიკონის კონოტი', 'hu': 'Egy cselekvés keretezése befolyásolja, hogyan érzékeljük a szereplőjét. Bevezetjük a hatalom és az ügynökség konnotációs kereteit, egy pragmatikus formalizmust, amelyet keretszematikus reprezentációk segítségével szervezünk, hogy modellezzük, hogy a különböző hatalom és ügynökség szintjei miként vetítenek implicit módon a szereplőkre cselekvéseik révén. Az új erő- és ügynökségi kereteket használjuk arra, hogy mérjük a modern filmszereplők ábrázolásának finom, de elterjedt nemi elfogultságát, és olyan betekintéseket nyújtsunk, amelyek eltérnek a jól ismert Bechdel teszttől. Közreműködésünk tartalmazza a konnotációs keretek kiterjesztett lexikonját, valamint egy webes felületet, amely átfogó elemzést nyújt a konnotációs keretek lencséjén keresztül.', 'lt': 'Veiksmo struktūra daro įtaką veikėjo suvokimui. Įdiegiame įgaliojimų ir agentūrų konnotacijos sistemą, pragmatišką formalumą, organizuotą naudojant semantinius atstovavimus, siekiant modeliuoti, kaip per savo veiksmus subjektams netiesiogiai prognozuojami skirtingi įgaliojimų ir agentūrų lygiai. Naujame naujas galias ir agentūrų sistemas, kad išmatuotume subtilų, bet paplitusį, lyčių pusiausvyrą šiuolaikinių film ų personažų vaizdavime ir suteiktume įžvalgas, nukrypstančias nuo gerai žinomo Bechdel testo. Mūsų įnašai apima išplėstą konnotacijos rėmų lexikoną ir internetinę sąsają, kuri teikia išsamią analizę per konnotacijos rėmų lęšiuką.', 'it': "L'inquadratura di un'azione influenza il modo in cui percepiamo il suo attore. Introduciamo cornici di connotazione di potere e agenzia, un formalismo pragmatico organizzato utilizzando rappresentazioni semantiche di cornice, per modellare come diversi livelli di potere e di agenzia sono implicitamente proiettati sugli attori attraverso le loro azioni. Usiamo i nuovi quadri di potere e agenzia per misurare il sottile, ma prevalente, pregiudizio di genere nella rappresentazione dei personaggi del cinema moderno e fornire approfondimenti che si discostano dal noto test Bechdel. I nostri contributi includono un lessico esteso dei fotogrammi di connotazione insieme a un'interfaccia web che fornisce un'analisi completa attraverso la lente dei fotogrammi di connotazione.", 'ms': 'Bingkai tindakan mempengaruhi bagaimana kita menyaksikan pelakon. Kami memperkenalkan bingkai konnotasi kuasa dan agensi, formalisme pragmatik yang diatur menggunakan perwakilan semantik bingkai, untuk model bagaimana tahap kekuatan dan agensi berbeza secara implicit dirancang pada pelakon melalui tindakan mereka. Kami menggunakan kuasa dan bingkai agensi baru untuk mengukur bias jenis yang halus, tetapi terkemuka dalam gambar aksara filem modern dan menyediakan pandangan yang berbeza dari ujian Bechdel yang terkenal. Our contributions include an extended lexicon of connotation frames along with a web interface that provides a comprehensive analysis through the lens of connotation frames.', 'kk': 'Әрекеттің фреймі оның актерін қалай түсінуге әсер етеді. Біз қуатты және агенциялардың коннотациялау фреймдерін, фрейм semantic representations арқылы жұмыс істеген прагматикалық формализмін, қуатты және агенциялардың әртүрлі деңгейлерінің әрекеттері арқылы қалай түрлі деңгейл Біз жаңа қуатты және агенциялық фреймдерді көзгерту үшін қолданамыз, бірақ көзгертілген, гендерлік көзгертілген, көзгертілген фильм таңбаларының порттрауларында және Бехдел сынақтан айналысат Біздің көмегімізде коннотациялау фреймдерінің кеңейтілген лексиконы веб интерфейсімізмен бірге, коннотациялау фреймдерінің линзиясы арқылы толық анализ береді.', 'mt': 'It-tfassil ta’ azzjoni jinfluwenza l-perċezzjoni tal-attur tiegħu. Aħna nintroduċu oqfsa ta’ konnotazzjoni ta’ setgħa u a ġenzija, formaliżmu prammatiku organizzat bl-użu ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi ta’ qafas, biex nimmudellaw kif livelli differenti ta’ setgħa u aġenzija huma impliċitament proġettati fuq l-atturi permezz tal-azzjonijiet tagħhom. Aħna nużaw l-oqfsa ġodda tal-poter u l-aġenziji biex tkejjel il-preġudizzju subtil, iżda prevalenti, bejn is-sessi fir-ritratt tal-karattri tal-films moderni u nipprovdu fehmiet li jiddevjaw mit-test Bechdel magħruf sew. Il-kontribuzzjonijiet tagħna jinkludu lexicon estiż ta’ oqfsa ta’ konnotazzjoni flimkien ma’ interfaċċja tal-internet li tipprovdi analiżi komprensiva permezz tal-lenti ta’ oqfsa ta’ konnotazzjoni.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d അതിന്\u200dറെ നടത്തിക്കാരനെ എങ്ങനെ കണ്ടെത്തുന്നുവെ ശക്തിയുടെയും സംഘത്തിന്റെയും കുറിച്ചുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സംഘടിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രാമാന്റിക് ഫ്രെയിമാന്\u200dറ നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ശക്തിയും എജന്\u200dസിയുടെ ഫ്രെയിമുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായി അളന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, പക്ഷെ മുന്\u200dഗണനായ, സംവിധാന പ നമ്മുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കൊപ്പം ഒരു വെബ്ബ് ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസിനോടൊപ്പം നീട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കു', 'mk': 'Рамката на акција влијае на тоа како го перцепираме неговиот актер. Ние воведуваме конотациски рамки на моќ и агенција, прагматски формализам организиран со користење на рамки семантични претставувања, за да моделираме како различни нивоа на моќ и агенција се имплицитно проектирани на актерите преку нивните дејства. Ние ги користиме новите моќни и агенциски рамки за мерење на суптилната, но превивентната, полова предрасуда во прикажувањето на модерните филмски карактери и обезбедување информации кои одбиваат од познатиот Бехдел тест. Нашите придонеси вклучуваат проширен лексикон на конотациски рамки заедно со веб-интерфејс кој обезбедува комплетна анализа преку lenteта на конотациски рамки.', 'pl': 'Ramowanie akcji wpływa na to, jak postrzegamy jej aktora. Wprowadzamy ramy konotacji władzy i agencji, pragmatyczny formalizm zorganizowany przy użyciu ram semantycznych reprezentacji, aby modelować, w jaki sposób różne poziomy władzy i agencji są ukryte na aktorów poprzez ich działania. Wykorzystujemy nowe ramy mocy i agencji do mierzenia subtelnych, ale powszechnych, uprzedzeń płciowych w przedstawianiu nowoczesnych postaci filmowych i dostarczania spostrzeżeń odbiegających od znanego testu Bechdela. Nasze wkłady obejmują rozszerzony leksykon ram konotacyjnych wraz z interfejsem internetowym, który zapewnia kompleksową analizę przez soczewkę ram konotacyjnych.', 'no': 'Biletet på ei handling påvirkar korleis vi oppfattar aktoren sin. Vi introduserer konnotasjonsramme på straum og agentisjon, eit pragmatisk formalisme organisert ved hjelp av ramme semantiske representasjonar, for å modellere korleis forskjellige nivåar av straum og agentisjon er implisitt prognosert på aktivarar gjennom handlingane sine. Vi bruker dei nye kraftene og aģentyrrammene for å måle den subtelle, men utbreidde, seks-forsiktigheten i portretningen av moderne filmteikn og tilbyr innsyningar som forsvinner frå den kjende Bechdel-testen. Bidragar våre inneheld eit utvida leksikon av konnotasjonsrammer saman med eit nettgrensesnitt som tilbyr ei komplett analyse gjennom lensen av konnotasjonsrammer.', 'ro': 'Încadrarea unei acțiuni influențează modul în care percepem actorul său. Introducem cadre de conotație ale puterii și agenției, un formalism pragmatic organizat folosind reprezentări semantice de cadru, pentru a modela modul în care diferite niveluri de putere și agenție sunt proiectate implicit asupra actorilor prin acțiunile lor. Folosim noile cadre de putere și agenție pentru a măsura prejudecățile subtile, dar predominante, de gen în portretizarea personajelor din filmul modern și pentru a oferi perspective care deviază de la binecunoscutul test Bechdel. Contribuțiile noastre includ un lexicon extins al cadrelor de conotație împreună cu o interfață web care oferă o analiză cuprinzătoare prin lentilele cadrelor de conotație.', 'sr': 'Okviranje akcije utièe na to kako oseæamo njegovog glumca. Predstavljamo konnotacione okvire moći i agencije, pragmatičnog formalizma organizovanog korištenjem semantičkih predstavljanja okvira, kako bi modeli kako se različite nivoe moći i agencije implicitno proglašavaju na glumce kroz njihove akcije. Koristimo nove okvire moći i agencije kako bi izmjerili suptilne, ali prevalente, spolne predrasude u predstavljanju modernih filmskih likova i pružili uvide koje se odvajaju od poznatog Behdela testa. Naši doprinosi uključuju prošireni leksikon konnotacijskih okvira zajedno sa web interfejsom koji pruža sveobuhvatnu analizu kroz lentu konnotacijskih okvira.', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqa waxqabadka ayaa saameyn ku leh sida aynu u aragno qofkiisa. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa kooxaha xoogga iyo shaqaalaha, qaab caadiga ah oo lagu soo qabanqaabinayo isticmaalka noocyada semantika ee frame, si aan u sameynno sida heerarka xoogga iyo saraakiisha loogu soo bandhigayo falimahooda. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qashinka cusub ee xoogga iyo saraakiisha si aan u qiyaasto caqliga, laakiin sida loo eego sawirka sawirada filimada ee hore, waxaana siinaynaa waxyaabaha ka leexda imtixaanka Bechdel. Our contributions include an extended lexicon of connotation frames along with a web interface that provides a comprehensive analysis through the lens of connotation frames.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн үйл ажиллагааны дүрслэл нь бидний тоглогчийг хэрхэн ойлгохыг нөлөөлдөг. Бид эрх мэдэл болон агентлагийн коннотацийн фрэймүүдийг танилцуулж, прагматикийн официализм, фрэйм semantic үзүүлэлтийг ашиглан зохион байгуулагдсан, хүч болон агентлагуудын өөр түвшинд хэрхэн ажиллаж байгааг загварчлах зохион байгуулагдс Бид шинэ эрх мэдэл болон агентлагын фрэймүүдийг хэрэглэдэг. Гэхдээ орчин үеийн киноны дүрсийн харилцааны тухай уламжлалтай, гендер хүрээлэн буй зүйлсийг хэмжээнд ашигладаг. Бидний үүрэгтэй нь коннотацийн фрэймүүд болон веб интерфейстэй хамтран өргөн хэлбэрээр дүүрэн шинжилгээ гаргадаг.', 'ta': 'ஒரு செயல்பாட்டின் வரைபடம் அதன் நடிகரை எப்படி பார்க்கிறது என்பதை பாதிக்கும். நாம் சக்தி மற்றும் நிறுவனத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட சட்டங்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், சட்டத்தின் semantic குறிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு புதிய வடிவமைப்பு, வித்திய புதிய சக்தி மற்றும் நிறுவனம் சட்டங்களை நாம் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் சிறியத்தை அளக்க, ஆனால் முன்னிலையான பெக்டெல் சோதனையிலிருந்து வெளியேறும எங்கள் பங்குகள் குறிப்பிடும் சட்டங்கள் மூலம் ஒரு இணைய இடைமுகத்துடன் ஒரு நீட்டப்பட்ட லெக்சிக்சியன் உள்ளது இது ஒரு முழுமையான ஆய்வு க', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරියාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කොහොමද අපි ඒකේ නියෝජකය බලන්නේ කියලා. අපි බලය සහ ඇජෙන්ජිටිස්ටියාගේ කොනෝනෝටේෂන් ෆ්\u200dරේම්ස් එක්ක, ප්\u200dරාග්මතික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික ප්\u200dරතිනිධා අපි අළුත් බලය සහ ඇජෙන්ජින් ෆ්\u200dරේම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, නමුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, ජෙන්ඩර් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, අධ්\u200dයතික චිත්\u200dරප අපේ සම්බන්ධයක් සම්බන්ධ විශාලනයක් තියෙන්නේ සම්බන්ධ වෙබ් අන්තර්ගයක් සමඟ සම්බන්ධ විශාලනයක් සම්බන්ධ වි', 'sv': 'Inramningen av en handling påverkar hur vi uppfattar dess skådespelare. Vi introducerar konnotationsramar för makt och agency, en pragmatisk formalism organiserad med hjälp av ramsemantiska representationer, för att modellera hur olika nivåer av makt och agency implicit projiceras på aktörerna genom deras handlingar. Vi använder de nya makt- och agenturramarna för att mäta den subtila men utbredda könsbiasen i porträtteringen av moderna filmkaraktärer och ge insikter som avviker från det välkända Bechdel-testet. Våra bidrag inkluderar ett utökat lexikon av konnotationsramar tillsammans med ett webbgränssnitt som ger en omfattande analys genom linsen av konnotationsramar.', 'ur': 'ایک کام کا فریمینگ کس طرح ہم اس کا اثر دیکھتے ہیں۔ ہم طاقت اور ایجنسی کے کنٹیشن فرموں کو معلوم کرتے ہیں، ایک پراگرماتیک فرمولیسم، جو فرموں کی سیمنٹی روشنی کے مطابق طریقے سے سازما کی گئی ہے، کہ ان کے عمل کے ذریعے قدرت اور ایجنسی کے مختلف سطح کی مدل کریں کہ ان کے عمل کے ذریعے اہ ہم نے نئی طاقت اور انجینٹی فرموں کا استعمال کیا ہے کہ دھوپ کے اندازے سے ناپ کریں، لیکن بہت زیادہ، جنس کی مخالفت آزمائش فیلم شخصیٹوں کی تصویر میں ہے اور جان رکھتے ہیں جو بہتر جانے والے بکدل آزمائش سے منحرف ہوتے ہیں. ہماری مدد میں ایک پھیلائی لکسون ہے جو ایک ویب انٹرنیفس کے ساتھ ایک پھیلائی لکسون ہے جو کانوٹ فرموں کی لنس کے ذریعہ ایک گھیری تحلیل دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu amalning tashkilotlarini qanday qilishimizni ko'rsatadi. Biz tashkilotlar va tashkilotning tashkilotlarini, frame semantik representations yordamida qo'llaniladigan pragmatik formatlarini ko'rsamiz. Bu shakllarning amallari orqali qanday boshqa darajada kuch va tashkilotning boshqa darajalari qo'llangan amallar bilan ishlab chiqaradi. Biz yangi elektr va tashkilotlar chegarasini aniqlash uchun ishlatimiz, lekin yangi film shakllarining taqdimotidagi qismlarni o'rganamiz va taxminan Bechdel tizimdan chiqqan ko'rinishini anglatamiz. Bizning qandaydir bir kengaytirish cheksiz va veb interfeys bilan kengaytirilgan leksision va bir nechta qo'shish chegaralari orqali muhimiy analyzer qiladi.", 'vi': 'Khung tranh ảnh hưởng đến cách chúng ta cảm nhận diễn viên của nó. Chúng tôi giới thiệu những khung thống về quyền lực và cơ quan, một chính thức thực tế được tổ chức dựa trên biểu tượng ngữ văn hoá khung, để mô tả cách mà những khía cạnh của quyền lực và cơ quan có phần bị vạch trần bằng hành động của họ. Chúng tôi sử dụng những khung hình quyền lực và cơ quan mới để đo đạc sự thiên vị giới tính tinh tế, nhưng phổ biến trong bức tranh của các nhân vật phim hiện đại và cung cấp những nhận thức lệch khỏi bài kiểm tra xứng đáng. Những đóng góp của chúng tôi bao gồm một ngôn ngữ hạn rộng, cùng với một giao diện web cung cấp cho kết quả phân tích toàn diện qua ống kính của các khung dẫn độ.', 'bg': 'Рамкирането на едно действие влияе върху начина, по който възприемаме неговия актьор. Въвеждаме конотационни рамки на властта и агенцията, прагматичен формализъм, организиран чрез рамкови семантични представи, за да моделираме как различните нива на властта и агенцията имплицитно се проектират върху актьорите чрез техните действия. Използваме новите рамки за власт и агенция, за да измерим финото, но преобладаващо, полово пристрастие в изобразяването на съвременните филмови герои и да предоставим прозрения, които се отклоняват от добре познатия тест Бечдел. Нашите приноси включват разширен лексикон на конотационните рамки заедно с уеб интерфейс, който осигурява изчерпателен анализ чрез обектива на конотационните рамки.', 'da': 'Indramningen af en handling påvirker, hvordan vi opfatter dens aktør. Vi introducerer konnotationsrammer af magt og agentur, en pragmatisk formalisme organiseret ved hjælp af rammesemantiske repræsentationer, for at modellere, hvordan forskellige niveauer af magt og agentur implicit projiceres på aktører gennem deres handlinger. Vi bruger de nye magt- og bureaukratiske rammer til at måle den subtile, men fremherskende kønsfordel i portrætteringen af moderne filmfigurer og give indsigt, der afviger fra den velkendte Bechdel-test. Vores bidrag omfatter et udvidet leksikon af konnotationsrammer sammen med en webgrænseflade, der giver en omfattende analyse gennem linsen af konnotationsrammer.', 'nl': 'De kadering van een actie beïnvloedt hoe we de acteur waarnemen. We introduceren connotatiekaders van macht en agentschap, een pragmatisch formalisme georganiseerd met behulp van frame semantische representaties, om te modelleren hoe verschillende niveaus van macht en agentschap impliciet worden geprojecteerd op actoren door hun acties. Met de nieuwe power- en agency-frames meten we de subtiele, maar overheersende gender bias in de weergave van moderne filmpersonages en geven we inzichten die afwijken van de bekende Bechdel-test. Onze bijdragen omvatten een uitgebreid lexicon van connotatie frames samen met een webinterface die een uitgebreide analyse biedt door de lens van connotatie frames.', 'hr': 'Okviranje akcije utječe na način kako osjećamo njegovog glumca. Predstavljamo konnotacione okvire moći i agencije, pragmatičnog formalizma organiziranog korištenjem semantičkih predstavljanja okvira kako bi modelili kako se različite razine moći i agencije implicitno proglašavaju na glumce kroz njihove akcije. Koristimo nove okvire moći i agencije kako bi izmjerili suptilne, ali prevalentne, spolne predrasude na pokazivanju modernih filmskih likova i pružili uvide koje se odvajaju od poznatih Bechdel test. Naši doprinosi uključuju prošireni leksikon konnotacijskih okvira zajedno s internetskim interfejsom koji pruža sveobuhvatnu analizu kroz lente konnotacijskih okvira.', 'id': 'Bingkai aksi mempengaruhi bagaimana kita menyadari aktornya. Kami memperkenalkan bingkai konnotasi kekuatan dan agensi, formalisme pragmatis yang terorganisasi menggunakan represensi semantis bingkai, untuk model bagaimana tingkat kekuatan dan agensi berbeda secara implisit proyeksi pada aktor melalui tindakan mereka. Kami menggunakan kuasa dan bingkai agensi baru untuk mengukur bias jenis yang halus, tetapi prevalent dalam gambar karakter film modern dan menyediakan penglihatan yang berbeda dari tes Bechdel yang terkenal. Kontribusi kami termasuk leksikon ekstensif dari bingkai konnotasi bersama dengan antarmuka web yang menyediakan analisis komprensif melalui lens a bingkai konnotasi.', 'de': 'Die Rahmung einer Handlung beeinflusst, wie wir ihren Akteur wahrnehmen. Wir führen Konnotationsrahmen von Macht und Handlung ein, einen pragmatischen Formalismus, der anhand von semantischen Rahmendarstellungen organisiert wird, um zu modellieren, wie verschiedene Ebenen von Macht und Handlung implizit auf Akteure durch ihre Handlungen projiziert werden. Mit den neuen Power- und Agenturrahmen messen wir den subtilen, aber vorherrschenden Gender-Bias in der Darstellung moderner Filmcharaktere und liefern Einblicke, die vom bekannten Bechdel-Test abweichen. Unsere Beiträge umfassen ein erweitertes Lexikon von Konnotationsrahmen sowie eine Web-Oberfläche, die eine umfassende Analyse durch die Linse von Konnotationsrahmen ermöglicht.', 'ko': '하나의 동작의 틀은 우리가 그것의 참여자를 어떻게 보는지에 영향을 줄 것이다.우리는 권력과 대리의 내포 틀을 도입했다. 이것은 틀의 의미를 이용하여 조직된 실용 형식주의를 나타내고 서로 다른 등급의 권력과 대리가 어떻게 행위를 통해 행위자에게 은밀하게 투사되는지를 모의한다.우리는 현대 영화 인물 묘사에 미묘하지만 보편적으로 존재하는 성별 편견을 평가하기 위해 새로운 권력과 기구 구조를 사용하고, 모두가 알고 있는 베하델 테스트와 다른 견해를 제공한다.우리의 공헌은 확장된 내포 프레임워크 사전과 내포 프레임워크 렌즈를 통해 전면적인 분석을 제공하는 웹 인터페이스를 포함한다.', 'tr': 'Bir hereket çizimi biziň aktörimizi nähili düşünýändigimize täsirleýär. Güç we ajaýyp görkezilişi framlary, pragmatik formalizmi fraým semantik temsilleri ulanyp düzenlenýäris we güç we ajaýyp işlerini görkezmek üçin düzenlenýäris. Biz täze güç we agenciýa çerçevelerini alçak çykarmak üçin ulanýarys, ýöne modern filmiň karakterleriniň portrayalynda hem bilinen Behdel testinden çykyp bolan pikirleri berip bilýäris. Bizim katkımlarımız, konnotasyon çerçevelerin lenslerini tarafından bütünlü bir analiz sağlayan web arayüzü ile uzaklaştırılmış bir leksikon vardır.', 'sw': 'Kuchochea kwa hatua inaathiri jinsi tunavyoweza kumwona mwendeshaji wake. Tunawasilisha mfumo wa utangazaji wa madaraka na taasisi, utaratibu wa utaratibu ulioandaliwa kwa kutumia uwakilishi wa mifumo ya semantic, ili kuelezea jinsi viwango tofauti vya nguvu na taasisi vinavyotumiwa kwa watendaji kupitia vitendo vyao. Tunatumia miundombi mpya ya nguvu na taasisi ili kupunguza vizuri, lakini upendeleo wa jinsia katika picha ya wahusika wa filamu za kisasa na kutoa maoni yanayojitenga na jaribio la Bechdel linalofahamika. Michango yetu ni pamoja na lexico lenye mifumo ya mahusiano pamoja na mtandao wa intaneti inayotoa uchambuzi wa kina kupitia mistari ya mifumo ya mahusiano.', 'fa': 'فرم\u200cسازی یک عمل چگونه بازیگرش را می\u200cفهمیم تأثیر می\u200cدهد. ما فرم\u200cهای ارتباطی قدرت و آژانس را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، فرم\u200cهای فرم\u200cگیری که با استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای semantic فرم\u200cگیری سازمان می\u200cشوند، برای مدل کردن سطح\u200cهای مختلف قدرت و آژانس\u200cها به طور اخلاقی بر روی بازیگران از طریق کارهایشان پرو ما از برق و سازمان جدید استفاده می کنیم تا آن را اندازه گیری کنیم، ولی در نمایش شخصیت های فیلم مدرن، حواسطه جنسی و جنسی\u200cها در نمایش فیلم مدرن و مشاهده\u200cهایی که از آزمایش بسدل شناخته می\u200cشوند را تغییر دهیم. دسترسی\u200cهای ما شامل یک زبان گسترده\u200cای از فرم\u200cهای پیوند\u200cگیری با یک interface ی وب است که یک تحلیل کامل را از طریق لینک\u200cهای فرم\u200cهای پیوند\u200cگیری می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Die raam van 'n aksie beïnvloor hoe ons sy akteur aanvaar. Ons introduseer konnotasie rame van krag en agencie, 'n pragmatiske formalisme wat gebruik raam semantiese voorstellings, om te model hoe verskillende vlakke van krag en agencie inplisite op aktiewers deur hul aksies geprojeseer word. Ons gebruik die nuwe krag en agenciese rame om die subteel te maak, maar oorvloedig, gender bias in die portrayal van moderne film karakters en verskaf inligtings wat van die bekende Bechdel toets afwyk het. Ons bydraaiïngs insluit 'n uitgebreide leksikon van konnotasie raamme saam met 'n web koppelvlak wat 'n kompleks analisie verskaf deur die lense van konnotasie raamme.", 'am': 'የሥራ መሳሰል እራሱን እንዴት እንደምናውቅ ያስባል፡፡ የሥልጣን እና አካባቢ ፍሬም፣ የፍሬም semantic መልዕክቶች የተደረገውን የሥልጣን እና አካል እንዴት ልዩ ደረጃዎች በሥልጣናው ላይ በተግባራቸው ላይ በተለየ ተሟጋቾች እንዴት እንደሆኑ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ ኃይል እና አካባቢ ፍሬም አዲስ ስልጣንን ለመለካት እናጠይቃለን፣ ነገር ግን የአሁኑ የውይይት የፊልም ፊደል አካላት እና ከተታወቁት ቤክdel ፈተና የሚለዩትን አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን በተጨማሪው የበይነመረብ ኢንተርኔት ላይ በተጨማሪው የበይነመረብ ፍሬዎችን በመጠቀም በቁጥጥር አካባቢ የሚያስተምር ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Korniza e një veprimi ndikon në mënyrën se si ne perceptojmë aktorin e tij. Ne futim korniza konnotative të pushtetit dhe agjensisë, një formalizëm pragmatik të organizuar duke përdorur korniza përfaqësimesh semantike, për të modeluar se si nivele të ndryshme të pushtetit dhe agjensisë janë parashikuar implicitisht mbi aktorët nëpërmjet veprimeve të tyre. Ne përdorim kuadrin e ri të fuqisë dhe agjensisë për të matur paragjykimin subtil, por mbizotërues të gjinisë në fotografinë e personazheve moderne të filmit dhe për të ofruar kuptime që devijojnë nga testi i mirënjohur i Bexhdel. Kontributet tona përfshijnë një lexikon të zgjeruar të kornizave të konnotacionit së bashku me një interfaqe interneti që ofron një analizë komplekse nëpërmjet lentave të kornizave të konnotacionit.', 'hy': "Աշխատի կառուցվածքը ազդում է նրա դերասան ընկալության վրա: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ուժի և գործակալության կոնոտացիոն շրջանակներ, պրագմատիկ ֆորմալիզմ, որը կազմակերպված է օգտագործելով շրջանակի սեմանտիկ ներկայացումներ, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք, թե ինչպես են ուժի և գործակալության տարբեր մակարդակները ենթադր Մենք օգտագործում ենք նոր ուժերի և գործակալության շրջանակներ' չափելու նրբագեղ, բայց գոյություն ունեցող, գենդերային կողմնականությունը ժամանակակից ֆիլմի կերպարների նկարահանման մեջ և ապահովում ենք ընկալումներ, որոնք շեղում են հայտնի Բեքդելի թեստից: Մեր ներդրումները ներառում են կոնոտացիայի շրջանների ընդլայնված լեքսիկոն, միասին վեբ ինտերֆեյսի հետ, որը պարունակում է ընդհանուր վերլուծություն կոնոտացիայի շրջանների ոսպնյակի միջոցով:", 'bn': 'একটা কাজের প্রতিরোধের প্রভাব ফেলেছে আমরা কিভাবে তার অভিনেতা দেখতে পাচ্ছি। আমরা ক্ষমতা এবং সংস্থার নির্দিষ্ট ফ্রেমের সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে একটি প্রাক্মান্টিক ফ্রেমের সংগঠনের ক্ষেত্রে উপস্থাপন করি, যাতে ত আমরা নতুন ক্ষমতা এবং সংস্থার ফ্রেম ব্যবহার করি সাবটিল পরিমাপের জন্য, কিন্তু আধুনিক চলচ্চিত্রের চরিত্রের প্রদর্শনে লিঙ্গের প্রতিযোগিতার প্রথম আমাদের অংশগ্রহণের মধ্যে একটি ওয়েব ইন্টারফেসের সাথে বিস্তৃত লেক্সিকোর একটি বিস্তৃত লেক্সিকোর সাথে রয়েছে যা কোন বিশ্লেষণের লেন', 'az': 'Bir eylemin çerçivi onun aktörünü necə hiss edirik. Biz qüvvət və a ğançılığın konnotasyon framlarını təşkil edirik, bir pragmatik formalizmi, fotogramların semantik göstərişlərini istifadə edərək, güc və ağançılığın müxtəlif səviyyələrinin necə təşkil edildiyini göstəririk. Biz yeni gücü və aģentəçilik çerçimlərini çəkmək üçün istifadə edirik, amma çox geniş, cins bias, moderni film karakterlərinin göstərilməsində və tanıdıqları Behdel sınamasından ayrılan fikirləri təmin edirik. Bizim sərbəstlərimiz, konnotasyon çerçimlərinin genişlənmiş leksikonu ilə birlikdə, konnotasyon çerçimlərinin lensi vasitəsilə bütün analizi sağlayan web interfisini təmin edir.', 'ca': "L'organització d'una acció influeix en com percebem el seu actor. Introduïm marcs de connotació de poder i agència, un formalisme pragmàtic organitzat fent servir representacions semàntiques marcs, per modelar com els diferents nivells de poder i agència són implícitament projectats als actors a través de les seves accions. We use the new power and agency frames to measure the subtle, but prevalent, gender bias in the portrayal of modern film characters and provide insights that deviate from the well-known Bechdel test.  Les nostres contribucions inclouen un lexicó estensiu de marcs de connotació juntament amb una interfície web que proporciona una an àlisi completa a través de la lent de marcs de connotació.", 'cs': 'Rámování akce ovlivňuje, jak vnímáme jejího herce. Představujeme konotační rámce moci a agentury, pragmatický formalismus organizovaný pomocí rámových sémantických reprezentací, abychom modelovali, jak jsou různé úrovně moci a agentury implicitně promítány na aktéry prostřednictvím jejich činnosti. Nové síly a agenturní rámy využíváme k měření subtilních, ale převládajících genderových zaujatostí při zobrazování moderních filmových postav a poskytnutí poznatků, které se odlišují od známého Bechdelova testu. Naše příspěvky zahrnují rozšířený slovník konotačních rámců spolu s webovým rozhraním, které poskytuje komplexní analýzu objektivem konotačních rámců.', 'et': 'Tegevuse raamimine mõjutab seda, kuidas me tajume selle näitlejat. Tutvustame võimu ja agentuuri konnotatsiooniraamistikke, pragmaatilist formalismi, mis on organiseeritud raamsemantiliste representatsioonide abil, et modelleerida, kuidas erinevad võimu ja agentuuri tasemed on kaudselt projitseeritud osalejatele nende tegevuse kaudu. Kasutame uusi võimu- ja agentuuriraame, et mõõta kaasaegsete filmitegelaste kujutamisel peent, kuid valdav sooline eelarvamus ning pakkuda teadmisi, mis erinevad tuntud Bechdeli testist. Meie panus hõlmab laiendatud konnotatsiooniraamide leksikoni koos veebiliidega, mis pakub põhjalikku analüüsi konnotatsiooniraamide läätse kaudu.', 'bs': 'Okviranje akcije utječe na to kako osjećamo njegovog glumca. Predstavljamo konnotacione okvire moći i agencije, pragmatičnog formalizma organiziranog korištenjem semantičkih predstavljanja okvira, kako bi modelili kako se različite nivoe moći i agencije implicitno proglašavaju na glumce kroz njihove akcije. Koristimo nove okvire moći i agencije kako bi izmjerili suptilne, ali prevalente, spolne predrasude u predstavljanju modernih filmskih likova i pružili uvide koje se odvajaju od poznatog Bechdel testa. Naši doprinosi uključuju prošireni leksikon konnotacijskih okvira zajedno s internetskim interfejsom koji pruža sveobuhvatnu analizu kroz lente konnotacijskih okvira.', 'fi': 'Toiminnan kehystäminen vaikuttaa siihen, miten hahmotamme sen toimijan. Esittelemme vallan ja toimijuuden konnotaatiokehyksiä, pragmaattista formalismia, joka on järjestetty kehyssentiikan avulla, mallintaaksemme, miten eri vallan ja toimijuuden tasot implisiittisesti projisoidaan toimijoihin heidän toimiensa kautta. Käytämme uusia voima- ja agentuurikehyksiä mittaamaan hienovaraista, mutta vallitsevaa sukupuolivääristymää modernien elokuvahahmojen esittämisessä ja tarjoamaan näkemyksiä, jotka poikkeavat tunnetusta Bechdelin testistä. Työhömme kuuluu laajennettu konnotaatiokehysten sanasto sekä web-käyttöliittymä, joka tarjoaa kattavan analyysin konnotaatiokehysten linssin kautta.', 'ha': "Juyin wani aikin yana yin amfani da yadda muke ganin actorinsa. Tuna ƙara firam na ƙarfi da shirin sa'an nan, wata fasafanci mai amfani da masu motsi na firam semantic, dõmin ka motsa jinsi da daraja za'a buƙata ƙarfi da shirin su ba da aikin su. Munã amfani da firam na new power da ajali don mu iya iya ƙayyade masu rauni, kuma amma taƙaitacce, watannin mutane a cikin shirin karatun filamu na yanzu kuma tuna gannai da ke kange daga jarrabin da aka sani. HangiyinMu na include an shimfiɗa leksikon wa firam na connotation sami da wata intake ta samu da shi wanda ke samar da rabon Anayi ta sami cikin fassarar fanikin.", 'jv': 'Refs Awak dhéwé nggawe éntuk sistem connotetion of power lan a énsiti, pragmacik formalizasi nggawe gambar semanti representations, nggawe modèl pas kuwi tindakan sistem gawe nguasai perbudhakan lan caénsiti sing paling-perbudhakan uwong sing nyeasakno operasi alam dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gawe lan ajeng-sistem kanggo kuwi nggambar aturan karo hal-hal, supoyo bias karo segala macem kuwi nggambar aturan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan lan mbukakipun ajeng-ajeng seneng nggawe ngubah ujaran kanggo masara awak dhéwé batir bekh. Nambah dhéwé nganggo akeh luwih-luwih dumadhi aturan karo aturan conetisi karo Internet', 'sk': 'Okvirjanje akcije vpliva na to, kako dojemamo njegovega igralca. Predstavljamo konotacijske okvire moči in agencije, pragmatični formalizem, organiziran z okvirnimi semantičnimi reprezentacijami, da bi modelirali, kako so različne ravni moči in agencije implicitno projicirane na akterje skozi njihova dejanja. Nove okvire moči in agencije uporabljamo za merjenje subtilne, a prevladujoče spolne pristranskosti pri upodobitvi sodobnih filmskih likov in zagotavljanje vpogledov, ki odstopajo od znanega Bechdelovega testa. Naši prispevki vključujejo razširjen leksikon konotacijskih okvirjev skupaj s spletnim vmesnikom, ki omogoča celovito analizo skozi objektiv konotacijskih okvirjev.', 'he': 'המסגרת של פעולה משפיעה על איך אנו מתייחסים לשחקן שלה. אנו מציגים מסגרות קונוטציה של כוח וסוכנות, רשמיות פרגמטית מאורגנת באמצעות מייצגים סמנטיים מסגרות, כדי לדוגמא איך רמות שונות של כוח וסוכנות מוצפות באופן מיותר על שחקנים דרך פעולותיהם. אנו משתמשים במסגרות הכוח והסוכנות החדשות כדי למדוד את ההתמחות המינית העדינה, אך שפולטת, בתמונה של דמויות סרטים מודרניות ולספק תובנות ששונות מבחן בקדל הידוע ביותר. התרומות שלנו כוללות לקסיקון מורחב של מסגרות קונוטציה יחד עם ממשק אינטרנט שמספק ניתוח מקסים דרך העדשה של מסגרות קונוטציה.', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་ཅིག་གི་པར་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ནི་ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་གི་རྩོམ་པ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ནུས་ཡོད། We introduce connotation frames of power and agency, a pragmatic formalism organized using frame semantic representations, to model how different levels of power and agency are implicitly projected on actors through their actions. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་དང་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་བཀོད་སྟངས་གསར་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་ཁྱད་ཆེ་རྐྱེན་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་རྣམ་པ་གཟུགས་ ང་ཚོའི་གོ་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'Controlling Human Perception of Basic User Traits', 'ar': 'السيطرة على الإدراك البشري لسمات المستخدم الأساسية', 'es': 'Control de la percepción humana de los rasgos básicos del usuario', 'fr': 'Maîtriser la perception humaine des traits de base de', 'pt': 'Controlando a percepção humana de características básicas do usuário', 'ja': '基本的なユーザー特性に対する人間の認識の制御', 'zh': '制人用户感知', 'hi': 'बुनियादी उपयोगकर्ता लक्षणों की मानव धारणा को नियंत्रित करना', 'ru': 'Управление восприятием человеком основных черт пользователя', 'ga': 'Braistint Daonna ar Thréithe Bunúsacha Úsáideora a Rialú', 'el': 'Έλεγχος της ανθρώπινης αντίληψης των βασικών χαρακτηριστικών του χρήστη', 'hu': 'Az alapvető felhasználói tulajdonságok emberi érzékelésének ellenőrzése', 'ka': 'ადამიანის პროცენტების კონტროლირება', 'kk': 'Негізгі пайдаланушылардың пайдаланушыларының пайызын бақылау', 'it': "Controllo della percezione umana dei tratti di base dell'utente", 'mk': 'Controlling Human Perception of Basic User Traits', 'lt': 'Pagrindinių vartotojų teisių suvokimo žmogui kontrolė', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтөн үндсэн хэрэглэгчийн дагуулын хувьд', 'ml': 'അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ട്രേറ്റുകളുടെ മനുഷ്യന്റെ പ്രെഷന്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്', 'no': 'Kontrollerer menneskeperspektiv på grunnleggjande brukarstraktar', 'pl': 'Kontrolowanie ludzkiego postrzegania podstawowych cech użytkownika', 'ro': 'Controlul percepției umane a trăsăturilor de bază ale utilizatorilor', 'sr': 'Kontroliranje ljudskih procenata osnovnih korisnika', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාලනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'so': 'Ruqsada isticmaalaha aasaasiga ah', 'sv': 'Kontroll av människans uppfattning om grundläggande användaregenskaper', 'ta': 'அடிப்படை பயனர் தட்டுகளின் மனிதன் அனுமதியை கட்டுப்படுத்து', 'mt': 'Il-Kontroll tal-Perċezzjoni tal-Bniedem ta’ Traits Bażiċi tal-Utenti', 'ms': 'Mengkawal Perception Manusia Trait Pengguna Asas', 'ur': 'بنیادی کارساز تریٹوں کی انسان کی تصور کنترل کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Điều khiển nhận thức người dùng cơ bản', 'da': 'Kontrol af menneskelig opfattelse af grundlæggende brugeregenskaber', 'nl': 'Controle van de menselijke perceptie van basisgebruikerseigenschappen', 'bg': 'Контролиране на човешкото възприемане на основните потребителски черти', 'de': 'Kontrolle der menschlichen Wahrnehmung grundlegender Benutzereigenschaften', 'id': 'Mengontrol Perception Manusia dari Trait Pengguna dasar', 'ko': '기본 사용자 특성에 대한 인간의 감지 제어', 'sw': 'Kudhibiti Perizo ya Binadamu ya Matukio ya Mtumiaji Msingi', 'fa': 'کنترل فرصت انسان از تریتهای کاربر بنیادی', 'sq': 'Kontrollimi i perceptimit njerëzor të trashëgimeve bazë të përdoruesve', 'hr': 'Kontroliranje ljudske procjene osnovnih korisnika', 'am': 'Control', 'hy': 'Օգտագործողի հիմնական հատվածների մարդկային ընկալումը կառավարելը', 'af': 'Kontroleer menslike Perspeksie van Basiese Gebruiker Laaie', 'az': 'ńįnsanńĪn …ôsl istifad…ô√ßi d…ôyiŇüikl…ôrinin ehtiyacńĪ', 'bn': 'মানুষের নিয়ন্ত্রণের মৌলিক ব্যবহারকারীর ট্র্যাট', 'bs': 'Kontroliranje ljudske procjene osnovnih korisnika', 'cs': 'Řízení lidského vnímání základních uživatelských vlastností', 'et': 'Põhiliste kasutajate omaduste inimese tajumise kontrollimine', 'tr': 'Adamyň esasy Ullançy Jakynyň Görnüşini Kontrol edýär', 'fi': 'Ihmisen käsityksen ohjaaminen peruskäyttäjän ominaisuuksista', 'ca': 'Controllar la percepció humana dels càrrecs bàsics dels usuaris', 'sk': 'Nadzor človeškega dojemanja osnovnih uporabniških lastnosti', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Ngubah Human', 'he': 'שליטה בתפיסה האנושית של עקבות משתמשים בסיסיות', 'ha': 'Controlling Human Perception of Basic User Traits', 'bo': 'རྨང་གཞུང་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཚད་འཛིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Much of our online communication is text-mediated and, lately, more common with automated agents. Unlike interacting with humans, these agents currently do not tailor their language to the type of person they are communicating to. In this pilot study, we measure the extent to which human perception of basic user trait information   gender and age   is controllable through text. Using automatic models of gender and age prediction, we estimate which tweets posted by a user are more likely to mis-characterize his traits. We perform multiple controlled crowdsourcing experiments in which we show that we can reduce the human prediction accuracy of gender to almost random   an over 20 % drop in accuracy. Our experiments show that it is practically feasible for multiple applications such as text generation, text summarization or machine translation to be tailored to specific traits and perceived as such.', 'ar': 'تتم معظم اتصالاتنا عبر الإنترنت بوساطة نصية ، وفي الآونة الأخيرة ، أصبحت أكثر شيوعًا مع الوكلاء الآليين. على عكس التفاعل مع البشر ، لا يصمم هؤلاء العملاء حاليًا لغتهم وفقًا لنوع الشخص الذي يتواصلون معه. في هذه الدراسة التجريبية ، نقيس مدى إمكانية التحكم في الإدراك البشري لمعلومات سمات المستخدم الأساسية - الجنس والعمر - من خلال النص. باستخدام نماذج تلقائية للتنبؤ بالجنس والعمر ، نقدر التغريدات التي ينشرها المستخدم والتي من المرجح أن تسيء وصف سماته. نجري تجارب متعددة للتعهيد الجماعي الخاضع للرقابة حيث نظهر أنه يمكننا تقليل دقة التنبؤ البشري للجنس إلى عشوائي تقريبًا - انخفاض في الدقة بنسبة تزيد عن 20٪. تُظهر تجاربنا أنه من الممكن عمليًا أن يتم تصميم تطبيقات متعددة مثل إنشاء النص أو تلخيص النص أو الترجمة الآلية وفقًا لسمات محددة ويُنظر إليها على هذا النحو.', 'pt': 'Grande parte de nossa comunicação online é mediada por texto e, ultimamente, mais comum com agentes automatizados. Ao contrário de interagir com humanos, esses agentes atualmente não adaptam sua linguagem ao tipo de pessoa com quem estão se comunicando. Neste estudo piloto, medimos até que ponto a percepção humana de informações básicas de características do usuário – gênero e idade – é controlável por meio de texto. Usando modelos automáticos de previsão de gênero e idade, estimamos quais tweets postados por um usuário são mais propensos a descaracterizar suas características. Realizamos vários experimentos de crowdsourcing controlados nos quais mostramos que podemos reduzir a precisão da previsão humana de gênero para quase aleatória – uma queda de mais de 20% na precisão. Nossos experimentos mostram que é praticamente viável que múltiplas aplicações, como geração de texto, sumarização de texto ou tradução automática, sejam adaptadas a características específicas e percebidas como tal.', 'es': 'Gran parte de nuestra comunicación en línea está mediada por texto y, últimamente, es más común con los agentes automatizados. A diferencia de la interacción con los humanos, estos agentes actualmente no adaptan su idioma al tipo de persona con la que se comunican. En este estudio piloto, medimos hasta qué punto la percepción humana de la información básica de los rasgos del usuario (género y edad) se puede controlar a través del texto. Utilizando modelos automáticos de predicción de género y edad, estimamos qué tuits publicados por un usuario tienen más probabilidades de caracterizar erróneamente sus rasgos. Realizamos múltiples experimentos de crowdsourcing controlados en los que demostramos que podemos reducir la precisión de la predicción humana del género a casi al azar, lo que supone una caída de más del 20% en la precisión. Nuestros experimentos muestran que es prácticamente factible que múltiples aplicaciones, como la generación de textos, el resumen de texto o la traducción automática, se adapten a características específicas y se perciban como tales.', 'fr': "La plupart de nos communications en ligne sont transmises par texto et, dernièrement, plus courantes avec des agents automatisés. Contrairement aux interactions avec les humains, ces agents n'adaptent actuellement pas leur langage au type de personne avec laquelle ils communiquent. Dans cette étude pilote, nous mesurons dans quelle mesure la perception humaine des informations de base sur les caractéristiques de l'utilisateur — sexe et âge — est contrôlable par le biais du texte. À l'aide de modèles automatiques de prédiction du sexe et de l'âge, nous estimons quels tweets postés par un utilisateur sont les plus susceptibles de mal caractériser ses traits. Nous menons de multiples expériences contrôlées de crowdsourcing dans lesquelles nous montrons que nous pouvons réduire la précision des prédictions humaines du genre à une précision presque aléatoire, soit une baisse de plus de 20\xa0% de la précision. Nos expériences montrent qu'il est pratiquement possible d'adapter plusieurs applications telles que la génération de texte, le résumé de texte ou la traduction automatique à des caractéristiques spécifiques et perçues comme telles.", 'ja': '当社のオンラインコミュニケーションの多くはテキスト媒介であり、最近では自動化されたエージェントにより一般的になっています。人間とのやり取りとは異なり、これらのエージェントは現在、コミュニケーションをとっている人のタイプに合わせて言語を調整していません。このパイロット研究では、基本的なユーザー特性情報（性別と年齢）に対する人間の認識がテキストを通じて制御可能である程度を測定します。性別と年齢の自動予測モデルを使用して、ユーザーが投稿したツイートのうち、どのツイートが自分の特性を誤って特徴づける可能性が高いかを推定します。私たちは複数の制御されたクラウドソーシングの実験を行い、そこで私たちはジェンダーの人間の予測精度をほぼランダムに減らすことができることを示します–精度は20 ％以上低下します。私たちの実験は、テキスト生成、テキスト要約、または機械翻訳などの複数のアプリケーションが、特定の形質に合わせて調整され、そのように認識されることは、実際的に実行可能であることを示しています。', 'zh': '大抵在线通书皆文本中介,最近,于自动化摄中更为常见。 与人互动异,不以方信定言。 于此考之,量人用户信(性别年),感于多大程度,可以文本制也。 用性别与年自模,度用户所发推文更可谬述。 三受控众包实验,可降性他人准确性几随 - 准确性降20%以上。 臣等实验明,文本生成,文本摘要机器翻译,特定制而知之,可也。', 'hi': 'हमारे ऑनलाइन संचार का अधिकांश पाठ-मध्यस्थता है और, हाल ही में, स्वचालित एजेंटों के साथ अधिक आम है। मनुष्यों के साथ बातचीत करने के विपरीत, ये एजेंट वर्तमान में अपनी भाषा को उस व्यक्ति के प्रकार के अनुरूप नहीं करते हैं जिससे वे संवाद कर रहे हैं। इस पायलट अध्ययन में, हम उस हद तक मापते हैं कि मूल उपयोगकर्ता विशेषता जानकारी की मानव धारणा - लिंग और उम्र - पाठ के माध्यम से नियंत्रणीय है। लिंग और उम्र की भविष्यवाणी के स्वचालित मॉडल का उपयोग करते हुए, हम अनुमान लगाते हैं कि उपयोगकर्ता द्वारा पोस्ट किए गए कौन से ट्वीट्स उसके लक्षणों को गलत तरीके से चिह्नित करने की अधिक संभावना रखते हैं। हम कई नियंत्रित क्राउडसोर्सिंग प्रयोग करते हैं जिसमें हम दिखाते हैं कि हम लिंग की मानव भविष्यवाणी सटीकता को लगभग यादृच्छिक रूप से कम कर सकते हैं - सटीकता में 20% से अधिक की गिरावट। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि यह पाठ पीढ़ी, पाठ सारांशीकरण या मशीन अनुवाद जैसे कई अनुप्रयोगों के लिए व्यावहारिक रूप से संभव है, जो विशिष्ट लक्षणों के अनुरूप है और इस तरह के रूप में माना जाता है।', 'ru': 'Большая часть нашего онлайн-общения опосредована текстом и, в последнее время, более распространена среди автоматизированных агентов. В отличие от взаимодействия с людьми, эти агенты в настоящее время не адаптируют свой язык к типу человека, с которым они общаются. В этом пилотном исследовании мы измеряем степень, в которой восприятие человеком базовой информации об особенностях пользователя – пола и возраста – контролируется с помощью текста. Используя автоматические модели прогнозирования пола и возраста, мы оцениваем, какие твиты, размещенные пользователем, с большей вероятностью будут неверно характеризовать его черты. Мы проводим несколько контролируемых экспериментов по краудсорсингу, в которых мы показываем, что мы можем снизить точность предсказания пола человека почти до случайной величины – более чем 20% -ное падение точности. Наши эксперименты показывают, что практически возможно, чтобы несколько приложений, таких как генерация текста, краткое изложение текста или машинный перевод, были адаптированы к конкретным признакам и воспринимались как таковые.', 'ga': 'Tá cuid mhór dár gcumarsáid ar líne trí mheán téacs agus, le déanaí, níos coitianta le gníomhairí uathoibrithe. Murab ionann agus idirghníomhú le daoine, faoi láthair ní chuireann na gníomhairí seo a dteanga in oiriúint don chineál duine a mbíonn siad i mbun cumarsáide leo. Sa staidéar píolótach seo, tomhaisimid a mhéid is féidir dearcadh an duine ar fhaisnéis bhunúsach faoi shaintréithe úsáideora – inscne agus aois – a rialú trí théacs. Agus úsáid á baint againn as samhlacha uathoibríocha tuar inscne agus aoise, measaimid cé na tvuíteanna a phostálann úsáideoir is dóichí a dhéanfadh míshonrú ar a chuid tréithe. Déanaimid iliomad turgnaimh sluafhoinsithe rialaithe ina léirímid gur féidir linn cruinneas tuartha daonna inscne a laghdú go dtí beagnach randamach – titim os cionn 20% ar chruinneas. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfuil sé indéanta go praiticiúil go ndéanfaí feidhmchláir iolracha ar nós giniúint téacs, achoimre téacs nó aistriúchán meaisín a chur in oiriúint do shaintréithe agus a bhrath amhlaidh.', 'hu': 'Online kommunikációnk nagy része szöveges közvetítéssel történik, és az utóbbi időben gyakoribb az automatizált ügynökökkel. Az emberekkel való kölcsönhatással ellentétben ezek az ügynökök jelenleg nem igazítják a nyelvüket annak a személynek a típusához, akivel kommunikálnak. Ebben a kísérleti tanulmányban azt mérjük, hogy az emberi érzékelés milyen mértékben irányítható a felhasználói tulajdonságokra vonatkozó alapvető információkról - nemről és korról - szövegen keresztül. A nem és életkor előrejelzésének automatikus modelljeit használva becsljük meg, hogy egy felhasználó által közzétett tweetek melyek nagyobb valószínűséggel jellemzik félreértve a jellemzőit. Több ellenőrzött crowdsourcing kísérletet végezünk, amelyekben megmutatjuk, hogy az emberi nemek előrejelzési pontosságát szinte véletlenszerűre tudjuk csökkenteni - a pontosság több mint 20%-os csökkenését. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy gyakorlatilag megvalósítható több alkalmazás, mint például a szöveggenerálás, a szövegösszefoglalás vagy a gépi fordítás, hogy speciális tulajdonságokhoz igazítsuk és így érzékeljük őket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი ინტერნეტი კომუნიკაციის ბევრი ტექსტის მედიაციაცია და ახლა უფრო საერთო ადვნენტებით. ადამიანებისთვის შესახებ, ეს ადამიანტები ახლა ისინი ენერგიას ადამიანებისთვის კომუნიკაციას არ აკეთებენ. ამ პილოტის კვლევაში, ჩვენ განზომილებით, რომელიც ადამიანის აღმოჩენება მანძილური მომხმარებელი ინფორმაციის ინფორმაციას - გენდერი და ასე - ტექსტის გარეშე გენდრის და ასეთის პროგრამების ავტომატური მოდელების გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოყენებელი გაგზავნილი ტივიტები უფრო შესაძლებელია შეცდომის განსაზღვრებას შეუძლებელია. ჩვენ მრავალი კონტროლურად კონტროლურად კონტროლურად გავაკეთებთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომელსაც ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ჩვენ ადამიანის წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენები ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ ეს პრაქტიკურად შესაძლებელია რამდენიმე პროგრამებისთვის, როგორც ტექსტის წარმოქმება, ტექსტის სისუმიზაცია ან მაქინის გაგრძ', 'it': "Gran parte della nostra comunicazione online è mediata dal testo e, ultimamente, più comune con gli agenti automatici. A differenza dell'interazione con gli esseri umani, questi agenti attualmente non adattano il loro linguaggio al tipo di persona con cui stanno comunicando. In questo studio pilota, misuriamo in che misura la percezione umana delle informazioni di base sui tratti dell'utente - sesso ed età - è controllabile attraverso il testo. Utilizzando modelli automatici di previsione del genere e dell'età, stimiamo quali tweet pubblicati da un utente sono più propensi a caratterizzare male i suoi tratti. Eseguiamo molteplici esperimenti di crowdsourcing controllati in cui dimostriamo di poter ridurre l'accuratezza delle predizioni umane del genere a quasi casuale - con un calo di oltre il 20% di accuratezza. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che è praticamente fattibile che molteplici applicazioni come la generazione del testo, la sintesi del testo o la traduzione automatica siano adattate a tratti specifici e percepite come tali.", 'lt': 'Dauguma mūsų internetinių ryšių yra tarpininkaujama tekstu ir pastaruoju metu dažniau naudojamasi automatiniais agentais. Skirtingai nuo sąveikos su žmonėmis, šie veiksniai šiuo metu savo kalbos nekeičia prie asmens, su kuriuo jie bendrauja. Šiame bandomajame tyrime išmatuojame, kokiu mastu žmogaus požiūris į pagrindinę vartotojo savybių informaciją - lytį ir amžių - gali būti kontroliuojamas tekstu. Using automatic models of gender and age prediction, we estimate which tweets posted by a user are more likely to mis-characterize his traits.  Atliekame daugelį kontroliuojamų visuomenės išteklių eksperimentų, kuriuose parodomi, kad galime sumažinti žmonių lyties prognozės tikslumą iki beveik atsitiktinio - daugiau kaip 20 proc. sumažėjusio tikslumo. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad praktiškai įmanoma pritaikyti įvairias programas, pavyzdžiui, teksto kūrimą, teksto santrauką arba mašininį vertimą, atsižvelgiant į konkrečias savybes ir jas suvokiant.', 'kk': 'Біздің онлайн коммуникациямыздың көпшілігі мәтін медиақталған және соңғы уақытта автоматтық агенттермен көптеген. Адамдармен байланыстыруға сәйкес, бұл агенттер, қазіргі уақытта, олардың тілдерін адамдарға байланыстырып тұрған адамдардың түріне өзгертпейді. Бұл пилот зерттеулерінде, адамдардың негізгі пайдаланушылардың мәліметі - гендер мен жас - мәтін арқылы бақылауға болады. Біз гендер мен жас таңдаудың автоматты үлгілерін қолдану үшін пайдаланушының таңдауды қайталап таңдау үшін оның қасиеттерін қайталау мүмкіндігін бағалаймыз. Біз бірнеше контроллерді көпшілік көпшілік тәжірибелерін жасаймыз. Біз адамдардың таңдау тәжірибесін кездеспейді деп көрсетеді. 20% ден артық дұрыс. Біздің тәжірибеміз, мәтін құрылуы, мәтін құрылуы немесе машинаның аударуы үшін бірнеше қолданбалар үшін мүмкіндікті болады деп көрсетеді.', 'el': 'Μεγάλο μέρος της ηλεκτρονικής επικοινωνίας μας είναι μέσω κειμένου και, τελευταία, πιο συχνό με αυτοματοποιημένους πράκτορες. Σε αντίθεση με την αλληλεπίδραση με ανθρώπους, αυτοί οι πράκτορες σήμερα δεν προσαρμόζουν τη γλώσσα τους στο είδος του ατόμου με το οποίο επικοινωνούν. Σε αυτή την πιλοτική μελέτη, μετράμε τον βαθμό στον οποίο η ανθρώπινη αντίληψη των βασικών χαρακτηριστικών του χρήστη σχετικά με το φύλο και την ηλικία είναι ελεγχόμενη μέσω κειμένου. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτόματα μοντέλα πρόβλεψης φύλου και ηλικίας, εκτιμούμε ποια tweets δημοσιεύονται από έναν χρήστη είναι πιο πιθανό να παρεξηγήσουν τα χαρακτηριστικά του. Εκτελούμε πολλαπλά ελεγχόμενα πειράματα στα οποία αποδεικνύουμε ότι μπορούμε να μειώσουμε την ανθρώπινη ακρίβεια πρόβλεψης του φύλου σε σχεδόν τυχαία πτώση πάνω από 20% στην ακρίβεια. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι είναι πρακτικά εφικτό οι πολλαπλές εφαρμογές όπως η δημιουργία κειμένου, η σύνοψη κειμένου ή η μηχανική μετάφραση να προσαρμόζονται σε συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά και να γίνονται αντιληπτές ως τέτοιες.', 'mk': 'Многу од нашата онлајн комуникација е посредена со текст и, во последно време, почесто со автоматизираните агенти. За разлика од интеракцијата со луѓето, овие агенти моментално не го прилагодуваат својот јазик на типот на личност со која комуницираат. Во оваа пилотна студија, го мериме степенот во кој човечката перцепција на основните информации за корисничките предмети - полот и возраст - може да се контролира преку текст. Користејќи автоматски модели на предвидување на полот и возраст, проценуваме кои твитови поставени од корисник се поголеми веројатности да ги лошираат неговите карактеристики. Ние спроведуваме повеќе контролирани експерименти за пулсурсирање во кои покажуваме дека можеме да ја намалиме прецизноста на човечките предвидувања на полот на речиси случајно - намалување на прецизноста од повеќе од 20 отсто. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека е практично фезибилно за повеќе апликации како што се генерацијата на текст, резултатот на текстот или машинскиот превод да бидат приспособени на специфични предмети и перцепирани како такви.', 'mt': "Ħafna mill-komunikazzjoni onlajn tagħna hija medjata bit-test u, dan l-aħħar, aktar komuni ma’ aġenti awtomatizzati. Għall-kuntrarju tal-interazzjoni mal-bnedmin, dawn l-aġenti bħalissa ma jfasslux il-lingwa tagħhom skont it-tip ta’ persuna li qed jikkomunikaw magħha. F’dan l-istudju pilota, kejluna sa liema punt il-perċezzjoni umana tal-informazzjoni bażika dwar il-karatteristiċi tal-utent - is-sess u l-età - hija kontrollabbli permezz tat-test. Bl-użu ta’ mudelli awtomatiċi ta’ previżjoni tas-sess u l-età, nistmaw liema tweets ippubblikati minn utent huma aktar probabbli li jikkaratterizzaw ħa żin il-karatteristiċi tiegħu. Għandna nagħmlu diversi esperimenti kkontrollati ta' crowdsourcing li fihom nuru li nistgħu jnaqqsu l-preċiżjoni tat-tbassir uman tas-sess għal kważi każwali - tnaqqis ta' aktar minn 20% fil-preċiżjoni. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li huwa prattikament fattibbli li applikazzjonijiet multipli bħall-ġenerazzjoni tat-test, is-sommarju tat-test jew it-traduzzjoni bil-magna jkunu mfassla għal karatteristiċi speċifiċi u meqjusa bħala tali.", 'mn': 'Бидний онлайн харилцааны ихэнх нь текст төвлөрүүлсэн ба сүүлийн үед автоматжуулан агентуудтай илүү ихэвчлэн байдаг. Хүн төрөлхтний харилцааны ялгаа, эдгээр агентууд одоо хоорондоо харилцаж байгаа хүн төрөлхтний хэл дээр өөрсдийгөө зохицуулж чадахгүй. Энэ туршилтын судалгаанд бид хүн хэрэглэгчдийн үндсэн мэдээллийг хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх хэмжээг хэмжээгээр хэмжээгээр хэмжээгээр нь хүн төрөлхтний мэдээллийг - гендер, нас - текст руу Хувь болон насны хугацааны автоматик загваруудыг ашиглан хэрэглэгчийн хууль нь ямар tweets гаргасан талаар өөрийнхөө чанарыг буруу дүрслэх боломжтой. Бид олон хүн төрөлхтний хөрөнгө оруулах туршилтыг хийдэг. Бид хүн төрөлхтний тодорхойлолтын зөв байдлыг бараг санамсаргүй болгон багасгаж чадна. Бидний туршилтууд текст бүтээгдэхүүн, текст жишээлбэл эсвэл машины хөрөнгө оруулалт тодорхой чанар болон иймэрхүү ойлголтын тулд олон програм ашиглах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Banyak komunikasi dalam talian kita adalah mediasi teks dan, akhir-akhir ini, lebih biasa dengan ejen automatik. Tidak seperti berinteraksi dengan manusia, ejen-ejen ini tidak menyesuaikan bahasa mereka kepada jenis orang yang mereka berkomunikasi dengan. Dalam kajian pilot ini, kita mengukur ke mana perasaan manusia terhadap maklumat sifat pengguna asas - jenis dan usia - boleh dikawal melalui teks. Dengan menggunakan model automatik ramalan jenis dan usia, kami memperkirakan tweet mana yang diterbitkan oleh pengguna lebih mungkin untuk menyalahkan ciri-cirinya. Kami melakukan eksperimen crowdsourcing yang dikawal berbilang di mana kami menunjukkan bahawa kita boleh mengurangkan persamaan ramalan manusia jenis kepada hampir rawak - lebih 20% kurang persamaan. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa ia praktikal boleh dilakukan untuk aplikasi berbilang seperti generasi teks, ringkasan teks atau terjemahan mesin untuk disesuaikan kepada ciri-ciri tertentu dan dianggap sebagai seperti itu.', 'no': 'Mange av våre online kommunikasjonar er tekstmediert og siste meir vanleg med automatiske agentar. I motsetning av samarbeid med menneske, er desse agentane ikkje tilpassa språket sine til typen personer dei kommuniserer til. I denne pilotstudien målar vi kor mykje menneskelige oppfatting av grunnleggjande brukareigenskap - seks og alder - kan kontrollere gjennom tekst. Bruk automatiske modeller for følgjande og aldersforhåndsvising, vurderer vi kva tweeter som ein brukar sende av er meir sannsynleg å feil karakterisera eigenskapane hans. Vi utfører fleire kontrollerte crowdsourcing-eksperimenter som vi viser at vi kan redusere menneskelige forhåndsvising av seks til nesten tilfeldig - en over 20% nedfall i nøyaktighet. Eksperimentane våre viser at det er praktisk feilig for fleire program, slik som tekstgenerering, tekstsamansering eller maskinsomsetjing, som skal justerast til spesifikke eigenskapar og oppfattast som slike.', 'pl': 'Większość naszej komunikacji online jest pośredniczona tekstem, a ostatnio bardziej powszechna w przypadku zautomatyzowanych agentów. W przeciwieństwie do interakcji z ludźmi, agenci ci obecnie nie dostosowują swojego języka do typu osoby, z którą się komunikują. W tym badaniu pilotażowym mierzymy, w jakim stopniu ludzkie postrzeganie podstawowych cech użytkownika w zależności od płci i wieku jest kontrolowane poprzez tekst. Korzystając z automatycznych modeli przewidywania płci i wieku, oszacowujemy, które tweety publikowane przez użytkownika są bardziej prawdopodobne, że błędnie charakteryzują jego cechy. Przeprowadzamy wiele kontrolowanych eksperymentów crowdsourcingowych, w których pokazujemy, że możemy zmniejszyć ludzką dokładność przewidywania płci do niemal losowego a ponad 20% spadku dokładności. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że praktycznie możliwe jest dostosowanie wielu zastosowań, takich jak generowanie tekstu, podsumowanie tekstu czy tłumaczenie maszynowe do konkretnych cech i postrzeganie jako takie.', 'ro': 'O mare parte din comunicarea noastră online este mediată de text și, în ultima vreme, mai frecventă cu agenții automatizați. Spre deosebire de interacțiunea cu oamenii, acești agenți în prezent nu își adaptează limbajul la tipul de persoană cu care comunică. În acest studiu pilot, măsurăm măsurarea în care percepția umană a informațiilor de bază privind trăsăturile utilizatorului - sex și vârstă - este controlată prin text. Folosind modele automate de predicție a sexului și vârstei, estimăm care tweet-uri postate de un utilizator sunt mai probabil să-i caracterizeze greșit trăsăturile. Efectuăm mai multe experimente controlate de crowdsourcing în care arătăm că putem reduce precizia predicției umane a sexului la aproape aleatoriu - o scădere de peste 20% a preciziei. Experimentele noastre arată că este practic fezabil ca aplicații multiple, cum ar fi generarea de text, rezumarea textului sau traducerea automată să fie adaptate la trăsături specifice și percepute ca atare.', 'ml': 'നമ്മുടെ ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d ധാരാളം ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മെഡിറ്റ് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം സ്വയമായ ആജ്ഞറ മനുഷ്യരുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, ഈ ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d ഇപ്പോള്\u200d അവരുടെ ഭാഷ പിന്തുടര്\u200dന്നിട്ടില്ലാത്ത വ്യക്ത ഈ പൈലറ്റ് പഠനത്തില്\u200d, അടിസ്ഥാനപരമായ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ട്രായിറ്റ് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ മനുഷ്യന്റെ കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വ്യക്ത പ്രായത്തിന്റെയും പ്രായമായ പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെയും സ്വയമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d പോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്ത ട്രീ ഒരുപാട് നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആളുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. അതിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രവചനങ്ങളുട നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്, ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയോ, ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കിപ്പിടിക്ക', 'sr': 'Mnoga naša online komunikacija je posredovana tekstom i, u poslednje vreme, češće sa automatskim agentima. Za razliku od interakcije sa ljudima, ovi agenti trenutno ne prate svoj jezik tipu osobe kojoj komuniciraju. U ovom pilotskom studiju, mjerimo koliko je ljudska percepcija osnovne informacije o osobinama korisnika - spol i doba - kontrolirana kroz tekst. Koristeći automatske modele predviđanja spola i dobi, procjenjujemo koji su tweets postavljeni korisnikom vjerojatnije da će pogrešno karakterizirati njegove osobine. Izvodimo višestruki kontrolirani eksperimenti za crowdsourcing u kojima pokažemo da možemo smanjiti tačnost predviđanja ljudskih predviđanja spola na skoro slučajno - smanjiti tačnost preko 20%. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je praktično moguće za višestruke aplikacije kao što su generacija teksta, sažetka teksta ili prevod mašine da se prilagodi specifičnim karakteristikama i smatraju takvim.', 'so': 'Wargelinta internetka qaarkood waa mid u dhexdhexeeya qoraal-qoraal, ugu dambaystana waa mid ka caadi ah macaamiisha maamulka ah. Si kala duwan loola xiriiro biniaadaha, dhaqaalahaas hada ma dabarayaan luqadooda nooca qof ay ula xiriirayaan. In this pilot study, we measure the extent to which human perception of basic user trait information - gender and age - is controllable through text.  Isku isticmaalaya qaababka bilowga ah oo la sii sheego jinsiga iyo cimriga, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa in tweetiyada uu isticmaalayo uu isticmaalayo uu si ka badan u kharribgeliyo dhibaatadiisa. Waxaynu sameynaa jirrabo badan oo la ilaaliyey kooxo badan, taasoo aan ku tusno in aynu saxda la sii sheegi karno jinsiga si gaar ah ugu hoosaysiin karno qiyaastii labaatan boqolkiiba si saxda ah. Imtixaankayada waxay muuqataa in si dhab ah loo suurtowdo codsiyo badan, tusaale ahaan farshaxan qoraal ah, qoraalka qoraalka ama turjumista machine in lagu koobi karo baabuur cayiman oo lagu garto tusaale ahaan.', 'sv': 'Mycket av vår onlinekommunikation är textmedierad och på senare tid vanligare med automatiserade agenter. Till skillnad från att interagera med människor skräddarsyr dessa agenter för närvarande inte sitt språk till den typ av person de kommunicerar med. I denna pilotstudie mäter vi i vilken utsträckning människans uppfattning av grundläggande information om användaregenskaper - kön och ålder - kan kontrolleras genom text. Med hjälp av automatiska modeller av kön och ålder förutsägelse uppskattar vi vilka tweets som publiceras av en användare är mer benägna att misskaraktärisera hans egenskaper. Vi utför flera kontrollerade crowdsourcingsexperiment där vi visar att vi kan minska den mänskliga förutsägelsenoggrannheten av kön till nästan slumpmässigt - en minskning av noggrannheten över 20%. Våra experiment visar att det är praktiskt möjligt att flera applikationer som textgenerering, textsammanfattning eller maskinöversättning skräddarsys efter specifika egenskaper och uppfattas som sådana.', 'si': 'අපේ ඇන්ලයින් සම්බන්ධය ගොඩක් අන්තර්ජාත්මක් තමයි පාළුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, අන්තිම මිනිස්සුන්ට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන්, මේ නියෝජිතයෝ දැන් ඔවුන්ගේ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ නෑ මේ පයිලෝට් අධ්\u200dයානයේ අපි මිනිස්සු බලන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පරීක්ෂණය සහ වයස් තොරතුරු ගැන මිනිස්සු බලන්න පුළුවන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සහ වර්ෂය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය මදුල් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි අනුමාන කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක් පැත්ත තුවක් වලි අපි වඩා පාලනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අනු අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂතාවට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, පාළ ප්\u200dරවෘතිය, පාළු', 'ta': 'Much of our online communication is text-mediated and, lately, more common with automated agents.  மனிதர்களுடன் தொடர்பு மாறுபட்டால், இந்த மென்டர்கள் தற்போது அவர்கள் தொடர்பு கொள்கிறார்கள் வகையில் தங்கள் மொழியை பின்பற இந்த பைலட்டு ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் அடிப்படையான பயனர் தட்டு தகவலின் மனிதன் பார்வையை அளவிடுகிறோம் - பெண்ணின் மற்றும் வயது உரைய பெண்கள் மற்றும் வயது முன்னோட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி தானாகவே மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி, பயனர் அனுப்பிய தொடர்கள் யார் என்பதை தவறாக எழுதுவது என்பத நாம் பல கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம் அதில் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் பெண்ணின் முன்வார்வை சரியை குறைக்க முடியும் என்ற எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது உரை உருவாக்கி, உரை சுருக்குதல் அல்லது இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு போன்ற பல பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு இது சாத்தி', 'ur': 'ہماری بہت سی آنلاین کی تعاملات متن میڈیٹ ہے اور اچھے وقت، آٹوٹ ایجنٹ کے ساتھ زیادہ مشترک ہے. انسانوں کے ساتھ اپنا معاملہ بغیر، یہ اگنٹ اکنون اپنے زبان کو کس طرح کی طرف متصل نہیں کر رہے ہیں جس سے وہ رابطہ کرتے ہیں. اس پایلوٹ کی تحقیق میں، ہم اس اندازہ سے اندازہ لیتے ہیں کہ انسان کی نظر بنیادی کارساز ویژہ معلومات - جنس اور عمر - کی طرف سے متن سے کنترل قابل ہے. جنس اور عمر کی پیش بینی کی آٹوٹی موڈل کے استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم اس کا اندازہ لیتے ہیں کہ کون ٹویٹ یوسٹر کے ذریعے پیدا کئے گئے ہیں اس کے ویسٹوں کی غلط تعریف کرنے کی زیادہ احتمال ہے. ہم بہت سی کنٹرولٹی جماعت سورس کی آزمائش کرتے ہیں جن میں ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہم جنس کی نسل کی تصدیق کو تقریباً تصدیق کے ساتھ کم کر سکتے ہیں - ایک 20% سے زیادہ دھوپ ہے۔ ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ یہ بہت سی کاربریوں کے لئے واقعی قابل ہے جیسے پیغام پیدا کرنا، پیغام پیدا کرنا یا ماشین پیدا کرنا اور اس طرح سمجھنا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Phần lớn thông tin trực tuyến của chúng tôi là truyền hình văn bản và gần đây phổ biến hơn với các đặc vụ tự động. Không giống giao tiếp với con người, các đặc vụ hiện nay không phù hợp ngôn ngữ với loại người mà họ đang giao tiếp. Trong nghiên cứu phi công này, chúng tôi đóng được cách mà người có thể kiểm soát được thông tin cơ bản về dạng người trên người Sử dụng các mô hình tự động của tính giới tính và phép đoán tuổi tác, chúng tôi ước đoán những dòng tweet được đăng bởi người dùng có nhiều khả năng sai đặc điểm của anh ta. Chúng tôi thực hiện nhiều thí nghiệm đông đúc được kiểm soát nhiều lần trong đó chúng tôi cho thấy rằng chúng tôi có thể giảm độ chính xác dự đoán của giới tính con người thành gần như ngẫu nhiên. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy nó gần như khả thi cho nhiều ứng dụng như sản xuất văn bản, tổng kết văn bản hay dịch cỗ máy được phù hợp với các đặc điểm cụ thể và được cảm nhận như vậy.', 'uz': "Onlayn aloqalarimizning ko'pchiligi matn taʼminlovchisi va oxirida avtomatik tashkilotlar bilan ko'proq narsalar. Ushbu amallar hozirda ular bilan bog'liq boshqa odamning turini o'zgartiradi. Bu pilot taʼminotida, biz oddiy foydalanuvchining asosiy qismlari haqida qo'llanmalarning asosiy maʼlumotini ko'rsatuvchimiz - jini va yosh - matn orqali boshqaruvchi. Biz foydalanuvchi bilan avto-aniqlash modellaridan foydalanishni anglatamiz, foydalanuvchi bilan xabarlar qo'shilgan xabarlarni xato qilish mumkin. Biz ko'pchilik boshqaruvchi maqsadlar jarayonlarini bajaramiz. Bu bilan biz ko'pchilik ko'plab o'rganish imkoniyatini ko'rsatamiz, biz inson hisoblanuvchisining haqiqatgina tezlikni tez qilishimiz mumkin - 20% dan ortiq qo' Our experiments show that it is practically feasible for multiple applications such as text generation, text summarization or machine translation to be tailored to specific traits and perceived as such.", 'bg': 'Голяма част от нашата онлайн комуникация е текстово-медиирана и напоследък е по-често срещана с автоматизираните агенти. За разлика от взаимодействието с хората, тези агенти понастоящем не адаптират езика си към типа на човека, с когото комуникират. В това пилотно проучване измерваме степента, до която човешкото възприемане на основната потребителска характеристика информация - пол и възраст - е контролирано чрез текст. Използвайки автоматични модели за прогнозиране на пола и възрастта, изчисляваме кои туитове, публикувани от потребителя, са по-склонни да погрешно характеризират неговите черти. Извършваме множество контролирани експерименти с crowdsourcing, в които показваме, че можем да намалим точността на прогнозирането на пола до почти случаен - над 20% спад в точността. Нашите експерименти показват, че е практически възможно множество приложения като генериране на текст, обобщаване на текст или машинен превод да бъдат адаптирани към специфични черти и възприети като такива.', 'hr': 'Mnoga naša online komunikacija je posredovana tekstom i, u posljednje vrijeme, češće s automatskim agentima. Za razliku od interakcije s ljudima, ovi agenti trenutno ne prilagođavaju svoj jezik tipu osobe kojoj komuniciraju. U ovom pilotskom ispitivanju, mjerimo mjeru u kojoj je ljudska percepcija osnovne informacije o osobama korisnika - spol i doba - kontrolirana kroz tekst. Koristeći automatske modele predviđanja spola i dobi, procjenjujemo koji su tweets postavljeni korisnikom vjerojatnije da će pogrešno karakterizirati njegove osobine. Izvodimo višestruki kontrolirani eksperimenti crowdsourcing u kojima pokazujemo da možemo smanjiti tačnost predviđanja ljudskih predviđanja spola na skoro slučajno - smanjenje tačnosti preko 20%. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je praktično moguće za višestruke aplikacije poput proizvodnje teksta, sažetka teksta ili prevoda strojeva prilagođena specifičnim karakteristikama i smatraju se takvim.', 'da': 'Meget af vores online kommunikation er tekstmedieret og på det seneste mere almindeligt hos automatiserede agenter. I modsætning til at interagere med mennesker skræddersyer disse agenter i øjeblikket ikke deres sprog til den type person, de kommunikerer med. I denne pilotundersøgelse måler vi i hvilket omfang menneskelig opfattelse af grundlæggende oplysninger om brugertræk - køn og alder - kan kontrolleres gennem tekst. Ved hjælp af automatiske modeller af køn- og aldersforudsigelse vurderer vi, hvilke tweets, der er mere tilbøjelige til at miskarakterisere hans træk. Vi udfører flere kontrollerede crowdsourcing eksperimenter, hvor vi viser, at vi kan reducere den menneskelige forudsigelses nøjagtighed af køn til næsten tilfældig - et fald på over 20% i nøjagtighed. Vores eksperimenter viser, at det er praktisk talt muligt, at flere applikationer som tekstgenerering, tekst resuméering eller maskinoversættelse bliver skræddersyet til specifikke træk og opfattet som sådan.', 'de': 'Ein Großteil unserer Online-Kommunikation ist textvermittelt und in letzter Zeit häufiger bei automatisierten Agenten. Im Gegensatz zur Interaktion mit Menschen passen diese Agenten ihre Sprache derzeit nicht an die Art der Person an, mit der sie kommunizieren. In dieser Pilotstudie messen wir, inwieweit die menschliche Wahrnehmung grundlegender Benutzermerksamkeitsinformationen nach Geschlecht und Alter durch Text steuerbar ist. Anhand automatischer Modelle der Geschlechts- und Altersvorhersage schätzen wir ab, welche Tweets, die von einem Nutzer gepostet werden, eher seine Merkmale falsch charakterisieren. Wir führen mehrere kontrollierte Crowdsourcing-Experimente durch, in denen wir zeigen, dass wir die menschliche Vorhersagegenauigkeit des Geschlechts auf fast zufällig mit über 20% Abfall der Genauigkeit reduzieren können. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass es praktisch möglich ist, mehrere Anwendungen wie Textgenerierung, Textzusammenfassung oder maschinelle Übersetzung auf spezifische Merkmale zugeschnitten und als solche wahrgenommen zu werden.', 'nl': 'Veel van onze online communicatie is tekstgemedieerd en, de laatste tijd, vaker gebruikelijk bij geautomatiseerde agenten. In tegenstelling tot interactie met mensen, passen deze agenten hun taal momenteel niet aan het type persoon aan waarmee ze communiceren. In deze pilotstudie meten we in hoeverre de menselijke perceptie van basisinformatie over gebruikerskenmerken met betrekking tot geslacht en leeftijd beheersbaar is via tekst. Met behulp van automatische modellen van gender- en leeftijdsvoorspelling schatten we in welke tweets een gebruiker eerder zijn eigenschappen verkeerd karakteriseren. We voeren meerdere gecontroleerde crowdsourcing experimenten uit waarin we laten zien dat we de menselijke voorspellingsnauwkeurigheid van geslacht kunnen verminderen tot bijna willekeurig en meer dan 20% daling in nauwkeurigheid. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat het praktisch haalbaar is om meerdere toepassingen zoals tekstgeneratie, tekstsamenvatting of machinevertaling op specifieke kenmerken af te stemmen en als zodanig te ervaren.', 'ko': '우리의 대부분 온라인 교류는 텍스트를 매개체로 하는데, 최근에는 자동화 에이전트가 더욱 흔하다.인간과 상호작용하는 것과 달리 이 대리들은 현재 그들과 교류하는 사람들의 유형에 따라 그들의 언어를 조정하지 않는다.이 초보적인 연구에서 우리는 인류가 기본 사용자 특징 정보(성별과 나이)에 대한 감지가 어느 정도에 텍스트를 통해 제어할 수 있는지 측정했다.성별과 나이 예측의 자동 모델을 사용하면 사용자가 발표한 어떤 추문이 그 특징을 잘못 묘사할 수 있는지 추측할 수 있다.우리는 여러 가지 통제받는 패키지 실험을 실시한 결과, 우리는 인간의 성별에 대한 예측 정확도를 거의 무작위 수준인 정확도를 20% 이상 낮출 수 있다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리의 실험은 텍스트 생성, 텍스트 요약 또는 기계 번역 등 다양한 응용에 있어 특정한 특징에 따라 맞춤형과 감지를 하는 것이 확실하고 실행할 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'id': 'Sebagian besar komunikasi online kita adalah mediasi teks dan, akhir-akhir ini, lebih umum dengan agen otomatis. Tidak seperti interaksi dengan manusia, agen-agen ini saat ini tidak menyesuaikan bahasa mereka kepada jenis orang yang mereka komunikasikan. Dalam penelitian pilot ini, kita mengukur ke mana persepsi manusia dari informasi dasar sifat pengguna - jenis dan usia - dapat dikontrol melalui teks. Menggunakan model otomatis prediksi jenis dan usia, kami memperkirakan tweet mana yang diposisikan oleh pengguna lebih mungkin untuk salah-karakterisasi cirinya. Kami melakukan eksperimen multikontrol crowdsourcing di mana kami menunjukkan bahwa kita dapat mengurangi akurasi prediksi manusia dari jenis ke hampir acak - lebih dari 20% kurang akurasi. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa praktis mungkin untuk aplikasi berbilang seperti generasi teks, penglihatan teks atau terjemahan mesin untuk disesuaikan untuk ciri-ciri spesifik dan diperhitung sebagai seperti itu.', 'sw': 'Mawasiliano mengi ya mtandaoni yametolewa na hivi karibuni, yanajumuisha zaidi na maafisa wa kujitegemea. Tofauti na kuwasiliana na binadamu, maafisa hawa kwa sasa hawafuati lugha yao kwa aina ya mtu wanaowasiliana nao. Katika utafiti huu wa pili, tunapima kiasi gani mtazamo wa binadamu wa taarifa za usafiri wa msingi - jinsia na umri - unaweza kudhibitiwa kupitia ujumbe wa maandishi. Kwa kutumia mifano ya kujitegemea ya utabiri wa kijinsia na umri wa miaka, tunakadiria twiti zipi zilizowekwa na mtumiaji inawezekana kuwa na uwezekano wa kutokuelewana na tabia zake. Tunafanya majaribio mbalimbali yanayodhibitiwa na vyanzo vya umma ambapo tunaonyesha kwamba tunaweza kupunguza ukweli wa utabiri wa binadamu wa jinsia hadi karibu asilimia 20 kwa uhakika. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa ni muhimu kwa matumizi mengi kama vile kizazi cha maandishi, muhtasari wa maandishi au tafsiri ya mashine yanayoweza kuchapishwa kwa mabadiliko maalum na yanaonekana kama vile.', 'sq': 'Shumica e komunikimit tonë online është i ndërmjetësuar me tekst dhe, së fundmi, më i zakonshëm me agjentët e automatizuar. Ndryshe nga ndërveprimi me njerëzit, këta agjentë aktualisht nuk e përshtaten gjuhën e tyre sipas tipit të personit me të cilin komunikojnë. Në këtë studim pilot, ne matëm sa perceptimi njerëzor i informacionit bazë të përdoruesit - gjinisë dhe moshës - është i kontrollueshëm nëpërmjet tekstit. Using automatic models of gender and age prediction, we estimate which tweets posted by a user are more likely to mis-characterize his traits.  Ne kryejmë eksperimente të shumëfishta të kontrolluara crowdsourcing në të cilat tregojmë se mund të reduktojmë saktësinë e parashikimit njerëzor të gjinisë në pothuajse të rastësishme - një rënie mbi 20% në saktësinë. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se është praktikisht e mundur që aplikimet e shumta të tilla si gjenerimi i tekstit, përmbledhja e tekstit apo përkthimi i makinave të përshtaten ndaj traditave specifike dhe të perceptohen si të tilla.', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነታችን ብዙዎች የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል እና በቅርቢቱ ዘመን በተመሳሳይ ተሟጋቾች ጋር አብዛኛል፡፡ ከሰው ጋር በተለያዩ፣ እነዚህ ተሟጋቾች ቋንቋቸውን ወደማነጋገሩበት ዓይነት አያሳልፉም፡፡ በዚህ የፕላይት ትምህርት ውስጥ የሰው የጥያቄ መረጃ - የሴት እና ሽማግሌ - በጽሑፍ የሚቆጣበት ቁጥር እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የሴት እና የዕድሜ ትንቢት እና የሽማግሌ ምሳሌዎች በመጠቀም፣ በተጠቃሚ የTwitters ጉዳዩን መሳሰል የሚቻል ነው፡፡ የሰውን የውይይት የውይይት ውይይት በቁጥጥር እንዲያጎድል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ Our experiments show that it is practically feasible for multiple applications such as text generation, text summarization or machine translation to be tailored to specific traits and perceived as such.', 'fa': 'بسیاری از ارتباطات آنلاین ما متن و اخیراً با ماموران خودکار مشترک تر است. برخلاف ارتباط با انسانها، این ماموران در حال حاضر زبان خود را به نوع شخصی که با آن ارتباط می کنند تغییر نمی دهند. در این مطالعه خلبان، ما به اندازه اندازه\u200cگیری می\u200cکنیم که درک انسان از اطلاعات ویژه\u200cهای بنیادی کاربر - جنس و سن - از طریق متن کنترل قابل است. با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای خودکار پیش\u200cبینی جنسی و سن، تقریبا می\u200cکنیم که کدام توئیت\u200cهایی که توسط یک کاربر فرستاده شده\u200cاند احتمال بیشتری است که ویژگی\u200cهایش را اشتباه\u200cتردید کند. ما آزمایش\u200cهای بسیاری کنترل کنترل گروهی را انجام می\u200cدهیم که در آن نشان می\u200cدهیم که می\u200cتوانیم دقیقات پیش بینی انسان را به تقریباً تصادفی کاهش دهیم - یک کاهش بیش از ۲۰ درصد دقیقات. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که برای کاربردهای متعدد مثل تولید متن، جمع کردن متن یا ترجمه ماشین به ویژه\u200cهای خاصی تغییر داده می\u200cشود و به عنوان این گونه تغییر داده می\u200cشود.', 'af': "Baie van ons online kommunikasie is teks-mediateer en, laaste, meer gemeenskap met outomatiese agente. Ongelyks van interaksie met mense, hierdie agente wat huidiglik hul taal nie verstel nie aan die tipe persoon wat hulle kommunikasieer. In hierdie pilot studie, maak ons die uitbreiding waarop die menslike aandag van basiese gebruiker eienskap inligting - geneem en ouderdom - kan kontroleer deur teks. By die gebruik van outomatiese modele van geneem en oudervoorskou, is ons bereken wat tweets deur 'n gebruiker gestel is meer waarskynlik om sy eienskappe te miskarakteriseer. Ons doen veelvuldige kontroleerde skapsourcing eksperimente waarin ons wys dat ons die menslike voorskou presisie van geneem kan reduseer tot amper willekeurige - 'n meer as 20% afval in presisie. Ons eksperimente wys dat dit prakties moontlik is vir veelvuldige toepassings soos teks genereering, teks opsomming of masjien vertaling om te verander na spesifieke eienskappe en as so aangeneem word.", 'tr': 'Biziň online sazymyzyň köpüsi tekst bilen baglanýan we soňky wagtlary awtomatik aģentleriň bilen köpüsi. Adamlar bilen aýlanma ýaly, bu ajamlar häzirki wagtlar bilen habarlaşýan adamlary bilen dillerini üýtgetmeýärler. Bu pilot öwrenmesinde, adamlaryň düşünüşiniň esasy maglumaty - jens we ýaşy - metin bilen kontrol edilýändigini ölçüp barýarys. Jens we ýa ş öňünden otomatik nusgalary ullanýarys, ullançylaryň haýsy tweetleriniň özüniň hasaplaryny ýalňyşlyk bilen meňzeşdirjek boljagyny tahmin edip bilýäris. Biz birnäçe kontrol eden köp taýýarlama deneylerini edip, adamyň tanyşylygynyň dogrylygyny ýagdaýa düşürip biljekdigini görkezip bileris. Biziň deneylerimiz metin döredilmesi, metin jemgyýetlenmesi ýa-da maşynyň has özelliklerine taýýarlanmasy we görnüşi ýaly birnäçe uygulamalar üçin ullanýandygyny görkez.', 'az': 'İnternettə əlaqələrimizin çoxu mətn ortalaması və, son zamanlarda, avtomatik aģentləri ilə daha ortaqdır. İnsanlarla qarşılaşmasına bənzər, bu agentlar halda onların dilini bildikləri kişilərə uydurmaz. Bu pilot öyrənməsində, insanların əsas istifadəçi xüsusiyyətlərinin - cins və yaş - məktub vasitəsilə müdafiə edə biləcəyini ölçürük. Cənnət və yaş tədbirlərinin avtomatik modellərini istifadə edirik ki, istifadəçinin nələr tweets göndərildiyini daha çox yanlış təsəvvür edir. Biz çoxlu kontrol edilmiş qüvvətli qüvvətli təcrübələr etdik ki, insanların təcrübəsinin cins təcrübəsini neredeyse rastlaşdırmağa qadir olarıq - 20%-dən çox düşüşür. Bizim təcrübələrimiz, mətn nəzəriyyəti, mətn qurğulaması və maşına çevirilməsi kimi çoxlu proqramlar üçün əsl olaraq mümkün olduğunu göstərir.', 'bs': 'Mnoga naša online komunikacija je posredovana tekstom i, u poslednje vrijeme, češće sa automatskim agentima. Za razliku od interakcije sa ljudima, ovi agenti trenutno ne prilagođavaju svoj jezik tipu osobe kojoj komuniciraju. U ovom pilotskom ispitivanju, mjerimo koliko je ljudska percepcija osnovne informacije o osobama korisnika - spol i doba - kontrolirana kroz tekst. Koristeći automatske modele predviđanja spola i dobi, procjenjujemo koji su tweets postavljeni korisnikom vjerojatnije da će pogrešno karakterizirati njegove osobine. Izvodimo višestruki kontrolirani eksperimenti crowdsourcing u kojima pokazujemo da možemo smanjiti tačnost predviđanja ljudskih predviđanja spola na skoro slučajno - smanjenje tačnosti preko 20%. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je praktično moguće za višestruke aplikacije kao što su generacija teksta, sažetka teksta ili prevod mašine da se prilagodi specifičnim karakteristikama i smatraju takvim.', 'bn': 'আমাদের অনলাইন যোগাযোগের বেশীরভাগ টেক্সট মাধ্যম এবং সম্প্রতি স্বয়ংক্রিয় এজেন্টের সাথে আরো সাধারণ। মানুষের সাথে মানুষের সাথে যোগাযোগের সাথে বিপরীত, বর্তমানে এজেন্টরা তাদের ভাষাকে তাদের সাথে যোগাযোগ করে  এই পাইলট গবেষণায় আমরা মানুষের মৌলিক ব্যবহারকারীর ট্র্যাট তথ্যের মাধ্যমে মানুষের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পরিমাপ করি- লিঙ্গ এবং বয়স লিঙ্গ এবং বয়সের ভবিষ্যতের স্বয়ংক্রিয় মডেল ব্যবহার করে আমরা ধারণা করি কোন টুইট ব্যবহারকারী পোস্ট করেছেন তার ব্যাপারটি ভুল করে দেখ আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি নিয়ন্ত্রিত জনসোর্সিং পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি যেখানে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমরা লিঙ্গের মানব ভবিষ্যৎবাণী সঠিকভাবে প্রায় ২০ আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে বেশ কিছু অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য এটা সম্ভব, যেমন টেক্সট প্রজন্ম, লেখা সংক্ষেপ অথবা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য', 'cs': 'Velká část naší online komunikace je zprostředkována textem a v poslední době je častější u automatizovaných agentů. Na rozdíl od interakce s lidmi, tito agenti v současné době svůj jazyk nepřizpůsobují typu osoby, se kterou komunikují. V této pilotní studii měříme, do jaké míry je lidské vnímání základních informací o uživatelských vlastnostech vztahujících se k pohlaví a věku ovládáno textem. Pomocí automatických modelů predikce pohlaví a věku odhadujeme, které tweety zveřejněné uživatelem s větší pravděpodobností nesprávně charakterizují jeho vlastnosti. Provádíme několik kontrolovaných crowdsourcingových experimentů, ve kterých ukazujeme, že můžeme snížit přesnost lidské predikce pohlaví na téměř náhodnou a více než 20% pokles přesnosti. Naše experimenty ukazují, že je prakticky možné, aby více aplikací, jako je generování textu, shrnutí textu nebo strojový překlad, byly přizpůsobeny specifickým vlastnostem a vnímány jako takové.', 'et': 'Suur osa meie internetisuhtlusest on tekstivahendatud ja viimasel ajal tavalisem automatiseeritud agentidega. Erinevalt inimestega suhtlemisest ei kohandata need agendid praegu oma keelt inimese tüübile, kellega nad suhtlevad. Selles pilootuuringus mõõdame, mil määral on inimese arusaam kasutaja põhiteabest - sugu ja vanus - kontrollitav teksti kaudu. Kasutades soo ja vanuse prognoosimise automaatseid mudeleid, hindame, millised kasutaja postitatud säutsud tõenäolisemalt tema tunnuseid valesti kirjeldavad. Me teeme mitmeid kontrollitud ühishankimise katseid, kus me näitame, et saame vähendada inimese soo prognoositavust peaaegu juhuslikult - üle 20% langus täpsuses. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et praktiliselt on võimalik, et mitmeid rakendusi, nagu teksti genereerimine, teksti kokkuvõte või masintõlge, kohandada konkreetsetele omadustele ja tajuda sellisena.', 'fi': 'Suuri osa verkkoviestinn채st채mme on tekstiv채litteist채 ja viime aikoina yleisemp채채 automatisoitujen agenttien kanssa. Toisin kuin vuorovaikutuksessa ihmisten kanssa, n채m채 agentit eiv채t t채ll채 hetkell채 r채채t채l철i kielt채채n sen tyypin mukaan, jolle he kommunikoivat. T채ss채 pilottitutkimuksessa mitataan, miss채 m채채rin ihmisen k채sitys k채ytt채j채n perusominaisuuksista - sukupuolesta ja i채st채 - on hallittavissa tekstin avulla. K채ytt채m채ll채 automaattisia sukupuolen ja i채n ennustamismalleja arvioimme, mitk채 k채ytt채j채n l채hett채m채t tweetit todenn채k철isesti v채채ristelev채t h채nen piirteit채채n. Suoritamme useita kontrolloituja joukkohankintakokeita, joissa osoitamme, ett채 voimme v채hent채채 ihmisen sukupuolen ennustuksen tarkkuutta l채hes satunnaiseksi - yli 20% tarkkuuden laskuun. Kokeet osoittavat, ett채 useiden sovellusten, kuten tekstintuotannon, tekstin yhteenvedon tai konek채채nt채misen, r채채t채l철inti ja hahmottaminen sellaisiksi on k채yt채nn철ss채 mahdollista.', 'hy': "Much of our online communication is text-mediated and, lately, more common with automated agents.  Unlike interacting with humans, these agents currently do not tailor their language to the type of person they are communicating to.  Այս փորձարկվող ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք չափում ենք, թե որքանով է մարդկային ընկալումը օգտագործողի հիմնական հատկանիշների մասին' սեռի և տարիքի միջոցով կարելի վերահսկել տեքստի միջոցով: Օգտագործելով գենդերային և տարիքային կանխատեսման ավտոմատիկ մոդելներ, մենք հաշվարկում ենք, թե որն է օգտագործողի տեղադրված թվիթերը ավելի հավանական է, որ սխալ կերպով բացահայտեն իր հատկանիշները: We perform multiple controlled crowdsourcing experiments in which we show that we can reduce the human prediction accuracy of gender to almost random - an over 20% drop in accuracy.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ շատ ծրագրեր, ինչպիսիք են տեքստի ստեղծումը, տեքստի համառոտագրությունը կամ մեքենային թարգմանումը, իրականացնելի են համապատասխանում հատուկ հատկանիշներին և ընկալում են որպես այդպիսի:", 'ca': "Much of our online communication is text-mediated and, lately, more common with automated agents.  A diferència d'interactuar amb els humans, aquests agents actualment no adapten la seva llengua al tipus de persona amb la qual estan comunicant. En aquest estudi pilota, mesurem el punt en què la percepció humana de la informació bàsica sobre el tret d'usuari - gènere i edat - és controlable a través del text. Utilitzant models automàtics de predicció de gènere i edat, estimam quins tweets publicats per un usuari tenen més probabilitat de malcaracterizar els seus trets. Fem múltiples experiments de crowdsourcing controlats en els quals demostrem que podem reduir la precisió de la predicció humana del gènere a gairebé aleatori - una disminució de la precisió del 20%. Els nostres experiments demostren que és pràcticament viable que múltiples aplicacions, com la generació de text, la resumida de text o la traducció màquina, siguin adaptades a trets específics i perceptides com tal.", 'jv': 'online lah, lah. Nang ujaran pilot iki, kita kuwi nggambar kapan ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan pancene informasi uwong mabungan kuwi kesempatan - lah lan alas- iso nguasai wae nguasai tèks. Ngawe ngubah sistem otomatik model ning lah sampek karo perbudhakan sampek, awak dhéwé njaluké tuytes menehi nggawe ngubah usukaké ora bisa pasar-pasar winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan langgar-wong liyane dadi kawit kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé iso nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngomong nik kabèh perusahaan kanggo aplikasi yang kat luwih, gambaran teks, gambaran teks nggambar tarjamahan karo perusahaan sing beraksi kanggo kalaman surat sing beraksi lan alam sing koyo ngono koyo ngono.', 'sk': 'Večina naše spletne komunikacije je besedilno posredovana in v zadnjem času bolj pogosta pri avtomatiziranih agencijah. Za razliko od interakcije z ljudmi ti agenti trenutno ne prilagajajo svojega jezika vrsti osebe, s katero komunicirajo. V pilotni študiji merimo, v kolikšni meri je mogoče človeško zaznavanje osnovnih informacij o uporabniških lastnostih – spolu in starosti – nadzorovati prek besedila. Z uporabo avtomatskih modelov napovedovanja spola in starosti ocenimo, kateri tweeti, ki jih objavi uporabnik, bodo bolj verjetno napačno označili njegove lastnosti. Izvajamo več kontroliranih množičnih eksperimentov, v katerih pokažemo, da lahko zmanjšamo človeško natančnost napovedi spola na skoraj naključno – več kot 20% padec natančnosti. Naši poskusi kažejo, da je praktično izvedljivo, da je več aplikacij, kot so ustvarjanje besedila, povzetek besedila ali strojno prevajanje, prilagojeno specifičnim značilnostim in zaznavanje kot take.', 'ha': "Jami'a masu haɗi da shirinmu masu shawara ne da matsayin, kuma a yanzu, yana da mafiya yawan jama'a da mataimaki masu farat ɗaya. Di motsi da masu yin husũma da mutum, waɗannan ajalinsu a yanzu bã su taimaki harshen su zuwa irin mutane da suke yi musu magana da shi. Daga wannan littãfin na ƙari, Munã ƙayyade ko da za'a iya lissafa ko da mutum na gane wa misalin misalin abubuwan masu bastarwa - jinin da tsohon - za'a yi bincike da tsohon - ana iya lissafa a matsayin. Yi amfani da mis ãlai farat ɗaya na bayani ga jinsi da tsohon, tuna ƙaddara, wanne Twitter na posted by mai amfani da shi yana kasancẽwa mafiya kusa su yi ƙarya ga hanyarsa. Munã jarraba jarrabai masu da aka lissafa wa mutane da shi, inda Muke nũna wa kandamin abin da ke iya ƙarantawa na mutane zuwa bakin rabo-karne 20% da ke saukarwa da taƙaitacce. Kayan jarrabõnmu sun nuna cewa, mai yiwuwa ne ga wasu shiryoyin ayukan misali kamar ƙarin matsayi, masu ƙararin matsayi, ko kuma fassarar ɗin ayuka da za'a tailori zuwa masu takarda da aka gane su kamar wannan.", 'he': 'רוב התקשורת האינטרנט שלנו מתייחסת לטקסט, ואחרונה יותר נפוצה עם סוכנים אוטומטיים. בניגוד לאינטראקציה עם בני אדם, הסוכנים האלה לא מתאימים לשפה שלהם לסוג האדם שהם מתקשרים אליו. במחקר טייסי הזה, אנחנו מדדים את המידה שבה התפיסה האנושית של מידע משתמש בסיסי - מין וגיל - ניתן לשלוט באמצעות טקסט. באמצעות דוגמנים אוטומטיים של צפוי מין וגיל, אנו מעריכים אילו טוויטים שפורסמים על ידי משתמש הם יותר סבירים להסביר את תכונותיו הלא נכונות. אנו מבצעים ניסויים רבים בשליטה במקורי קהל שבו אנו מראים שאנחנו יכולים להפחית את מדויקת החזוי האנושי של מין כמעט אקראי - ירידה של יותר מ-20% בדיוק. הניסויים שלנו מראים שזה אפשרי למעשה עבור שימושים רבים כמו דור טקסט, סאמריזציה טקסט או תרגום מכונת שיתאים לתכונות ספציפיות ונראים כאלה.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་ཡིག་གེ་འཇུག་ཟམ་པ་དང་། དུས་མཚམས་ནས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ མི་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མེད་པར། ད་ལྟ་བུ་འདི་དག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་འབྲེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་པའི་མིང་ལ འུ་ཅག་གི་pilot སྐོར་གྱི་བརྡ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མིའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གང་ཡིན་པ་དང་། སྐྱེན་བུས་དང་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ སྒེར་གྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་སྣུམ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྲུལ་བཞིན་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མང་ཙམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རུང་བ་ཡིན་པས། མིག'}
{'en': 'Assessing Objective Recommendation Quality through Political Forecasting', 'fr': 'Évaluation de la qualité des recommandations objectives par le biais de prévisions politiques', 'ar': 'تقييم جودة التوصية الموضوعية من خلال التنبؤ السياسي', 'pt': 'Avaliação da qualidade da recomendação objetiva por meio de previsão política', 'ja': '政治予測による客観的な推奨品質の評価', 'es': 'Evaluación de la calidad de las recomendaciones objetivas mediante pronósticos', 'ru': 'Оценка объективного качества рекомендаций с помощью политического прогнозирования', 'zh': '以政占估客观所荐', 'hi': 'राजनीतिक पूर्वानुमान के माध्यम से उद्देश्य सिफारिश गुणवत्ता का आकलन', 'ga': 'Cáilíocht Cuspóir Molta a Mheas trí Thuar Polaitíochta', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας αντικειμενικής σύστασης μέσω πολιτικών προβλέψεων', 'hu': 'Az objektív ajánlás minőségének értékelése politikai előrejelzéssel', 'ka': 'პოლიტიკური პროგრამაციის გამოყენება', 'kk': 'Мақсатты таңдау саясаты бағдарламасы арқылы мақсатты сапатты оқу', 'lt': 'Objektyvios rekomendacijos kokybės vertinimas politinėmis prognozėmis', 'ms': 'Mengevaluasi Kualiti Rakmandaan Objektif melalui Rakmandaan Politik', 'ml': 'രാഷ്ട്രീയ മുന്നറിയിപ്പുകളിലൂടെ ഉപദേശിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഗുണവിശേഷം', 'it': 'Valutazione della qualità delle raccomandazioni oggettive attraverso le previsioni politiche', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на квалитетот на објективната препорака преку политичка прогноза', 'mt': 'Valutazzjoni tal-Kwalità tar-Rakkomandazzjoni Objettiva permezz tat-Tbassir Politiku', 'no': 'Assesserer objektiv anbefalingskvalitet gjennom politiske forecasting', 'mn': 'Улс төрийн таамаглалтаар зорилготой таамаглалтын чадварыг үнэлэх', 'ro': 'Evaluarea calității recomandărilor obiective prin previziuni politice', 'pl': 'Ocena jakości obiektywnych zaleceń poprzez prognozowanie polityczne', 'so': 'Assessing Objective Recommendation Quality via Siasal Forecasting', 'si': 'රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Bedömning av objektiv rekommendations kvalitet genom politisk prognos', 'ta': 'பொருள் பரிந்துரையின் தரம்', 'ur': 'سیاسی پیش بینی کے ذریعے موجود سفارش کی کیفیت کا ارزش کرنا', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete ciljne preporuke putem političkog proglašavanja', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá Chất lượng tiến sĩ theo mục tiêu qua dự đoán chính trị', 'nl': 'Beoordeling van de kwaliteit van objectieve aanbevelingen door middel van politieke prognoses', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete ciljne preporuke putem političkog proglašavanja', 'bg': 'Оценка на качеството на обективните препоръки чрез политически прогнози', 'de': 'Bewertung objektiver Empfehlungsqualität durch politische Prognosen', 'da': 'Vurdering af objektiv anbefalingskvalitet gennem politiske prognoser', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi Kualitas Rekomendasi Objektif melalui Persoalan Politis', 'ko': '정치 예측을 통해 객관적 추천의 질을 평가하다', 'fa': 'ارزیابی کیفیت پیشنهاد هدف با طریق پیشنهاد سیاسی', 'tr': 'Görniş Taýýarlama Görkezilişi Görkezilişi Görkezilişi', 'af': 'Besluit Objektiewe Aanvaring Kwaliteit deur Politiese Voorskou', 'sw': 'Tutatizi Utawala wa Mapendekezo kwa kupitia Utangazaji wa Siasa', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i cilësisë së rekomandimit objektiv nëpërmjet parashikimit politik', 'bn': 'রাজনৈতিক প্রদর্শনের মাধ্যমে বস্তুর পরামর্শের মান', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete ciljne preporuke putem političkog proglašavanja', 'hy': 'Օբյեկտիվ խորհուրդների որակը քաղաքական կանխատեսումների միջոցով գնահատելը', 'az': 'Siyasi t톛xmin톛 vasit톛sil톛 N칬vb톛 T칬vsiy톛 Q칲dr톛tini', 'cs': 'Hodnocení kvality objektivního doporučení prostřednictvím politických prognóz', 'ca': 'Evaluar la qualitat de la recomanació objectiva a través de les previsions polítiques', 'et': 'Objektiivsete soovituste kvaliteedi hindamine poliitiliste prognooside kaudu', 'fi': 'Tavoitteellisten suositusten laadun arviointi poliittisten ennusteiden avulla', 'jv': 'Ombudhakan Kelangan Objectu Kelangan', 'he': 'Assessing Objective Recommendation Quality through Political Forecasting', 'sk': 'Ocena kakovosti ciljnih priporočil s političnimi napovedi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཆབ་སྲིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚང་བའི་བསམ་འཆར་བར་སྤྲོད་རྒྱུ་དངོས་རྫོགས་གནང་བ'}
{'en': 'Recommendations are often rated for their subjective quality, but few researchers have studied comment quality in terms of objective utility. We explore recommendation quality assessment with respect to both subjective (i.e. users’ ratings) and objective (i.e., did it influence? did it improve decisions?) metrics in a massive online geopolitical forecasting system, ultimately comparing linguistic characteristics of each quality metric. Using a variety of features, we predict all types of quality with better accuracy than the simple yet strong baseline of comment length. Looking at the most predictive content illustrates rater biases ; for example, forecasters are subjectively biased in favor of comments mentioning business transactions or dealings as well as material things, even though such comments do not indeed prove any more useful objectively. Additionally, more complex sentence constructions, as evidenced by subordinate conjunctions, are characteristic of comments leading to objective improvements in forecasting.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يتم تصنيف التوصيات وفقًا لجودتها الذاتية ، ولكن القليل من الباحثين درسوا جودة التعليقات من حيث المنفعة الموضوعية. نحن نستكشف تقييم جودة التوصيات فيما يتعلق بكل من المقاييس الذاتية (أي تقييمات المستخدمين) والموضوعية (أي ، هل أثرت؟ هل حسنت القرارات؟) في نظام التنبؤ الجيوسياسي الهائل عبر الإنترنت ، في نهاية المطاف مقارنة الخصائص اللغوية لكل مقياس جودة. باستخدام مجموعة متنوعة من الميزات ، نتوقع جميع أنواع الجودة بدقة أفضل من خط الأساس البسيط والقوي لطول التعليق. إن النظر إلى المحتوى الأكثر تنبؤية يوضح تحيزات المقيم ؛ على سبيل المثال ، ينحاز المتنبئون بشكل شخصي إلى التعليقات التي تشير إلى المعاملات التجارية أو المعاملات وكذلك الأشياء المادية ، على الرغم من أن هذه التعليقات لا تثبت بالفعل أي فائدة موضوعية أكثر. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن إنشاءات الجمل الأكثر تعقيدًا ، كما يتضح من حالات العطف الثانوية ، هي سمة من سمات التعليقات التي تؤدي إلى تحسينات موضوعية في التنبؤ.', 'pt': 'As recomendações são frequentemente classificadas por sua qualidade subjetiva, mas poucos pesquisadores estudaram a qualidade dos comentários em termos de utilidade objetiva. Exploramos a avaliação da qualidade da recomendação com relação a métricas subjetivas (ou seja, classificações dos usuários) e objetivas (ou seja, influenciou? Usando uma variedade de recursos, prevemos todos os tipos de qualidade com melhor precisão do que a linha de base simples, porém forte, do tamanho do comentário. Observar o conteúdo mais preditivo ilustra as tendências do avaliador; por exemplo, os analistas são subjetivamente tendenciosos em favor de comentários que mencionem transações ou negócios comerciais, bem como coisas materiais, mesmo que tais comentários não se mostrem de fato mais úteis objetivamente. Além disso, construções de frases mais complexas, evidenciadas por conjunções subordinadas, são características de comentários que levam a melhorias objetivas na previsão.', 'fr': "Les recommandations sont souvent évaluées en fonction de leur qualité subjective, mais peu de chercheurs ont étudié la qualité des commentaires en termes d'utilité objective. Nous explorons l'évaluation de la qualité des recommandations en termes de subjectivité (évaluation des utilisateurs) et objective (c.-à-d., a-t-elle influencé\xa0? est-ce que cela a amélioré les décisions\xa0?) métriques dans un vaste système de prévisions géopolitiques en ligne, qui compare finalement les caractéristiques linguistiques de chaque métrique de qualité. À l'aide de diverses fonctionnalités, nous prévoyons tous les types de qualité avec une précision supérieure à la base simple mais solide de la longueur des commentaires. L'examen du contenu le plus prédictif illustre les biais des évaluateurs\xa0; par exemple, les prévisionnistes sont subjectivement biaisés en faveur de commentaires mentionnant des transactions commerciales ou des transactions ainsi que des éléments matériels, même si de tels commentaires ne se révèlent en effet pas plus utiles objectivement. De plus, des constructions de phrases plus complexes, comme en témoignent les conjonctions subordonnées, sont caractéristiques des commentaires conduisant à des améliorations objectives des prévisions.", 'es': 'Las recomendaciones a menudo se califican por su calidad subjetiva, pero pocos investigadores han estudiado la calidad de los comentarios en términos de utilidad objetiva. Exploramos la evaluación de la calidad de las recomendaciones con respecto a lo subjetivo (es decir, las calificaciones de los usuarios) y objetivo (es decir, ¿influyó? ¿mejoró las decisiones?) métricas en un sistema masivo de pronóstico geopolítico en línea, que en última instancia compara las características lingüísticas de cada métrica de calidad. Utilizando una variedad de funciones, predecimos todos los tipos de calidad con mayor precisión que la base de referencia simple pero sólida de la longitud de los comentarios. Observar el contenido más predictivo ilustra los sesgos de los evaluadores; por ejemplo, los pronosticadores están sesgados subjetivamente a favor de los comentarios que mencionan transacciones comerciales o transacciones, así como cosas materiales, a pesar de que dichos comentarios no demuestran ser más útiles objetivamente. Además, las construcciones de oraciones más complejas, como lo demuestran las conjunciones subordinadas, son características de los comentarios que conducen a mejoras objetivas en la predicción.', 'ja': '推奨事項は主観的な品質で評価されることが多いが、客観的な有用性の観点からコメント品質を研究した研究者はほとんどいない。 私たちは、大規模なオンライン地政学予測システムにおける主観的（すなわち、ユーザーの評価）と客観的（すなわち、それが影響したか、意思決定を改善したか）の両方に関する推奨品質評価を探求し、最終的に各品質指標の言語的特徴を比較します。 さまざまな機能を使用して、コメント長の単純で強力なベースラインよりも正確にすべての種類の品質を予測します。 最も予測的なコンテンツを見ると、評価者のバイアスが示されます。たとえば、予測者は、ビジネス取引や取引だけでなく重要なものにも言及するコメントに主観的に偏っていますが、そのようなコメントは実際にはそれ以上の有用性を客観的に証明するものではありません。 さらに、従属接続詞によって証明されるように、より複雑な文の構築は、予測の客観的な改善につながるコメントの特徴です。', 'zh': '荐常以其主评级,然鲜有治人之论。 探大在线地缘之统(用户评级)与客(,其可否?其可否?)指标之举评,终较质量指标言。 用诸特征,吾占一切之量,较简而强论长基线为正。 案最具预测性者,评分之偏见也。 如预测者主观偏于商贾交易及要物之论,虽在客观,实无征验。 又杂句结构,如从连词所证,致客观改进注之征也。', 'hi': 'सिफारिशों को अक्सर उनकी व्यक्तिपरक गुणवत्ता के लिए रेट किया जाता है, लेकिन कुछ शोधकर्ताओं ने उद्देश्य उपयोगिता के संदर्भ में टिप्पणी की गुणवत्ता का अध्ययन किया है। हम व्यक्तिपरक (यानी उपयोगकर्ताओं की रेटिंग) और उद्देश्य (यानी, क्या यह प्रभावित करता है? क्या यह निर्णय ों में सुधार करता है?) दोनों के संबंध में सिफारिश गुणवत्ता मूल्यांकन का पता लगाते हैं? सुविधाओं की एक किस्म का उपयोग करते हुए, हम टिप्पणी लंबाई के सरल अभी तक मजबूत आधार रेखा की तुलना में बेहतर सटीकता के साथ गुणवत्ता के सभी प्रकार की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। सबसे अधिक भविष्यवाणी सामग्री को देखते हुए रेटर पूर्वाग्रहों को दर्शाता है; उदाहरण के लिए, पूर्वानुमानकर्ता व्यावसायिक लेनदेन या लेन-देन के साथ-साथ भौतिक चीजों का उल्लेख करने वाली टिप्पणियों के पक्ष में व्यक्तिपरक रूप से पक्षपाती हैं, भले ही ऐसी टिप्पणियां वास्तव में निष्पक्ष रूप से किसी भी अधिक उपयोगी साबित न हों। इसके अतिरिक्त, अधिक जटिल वाक्य निर्माण, जैसा कि अधीनस्थ संयोजनों द्वारा प्रमाणित किया गया है, टिप्पणियों की विशेषता है जो पूर्वानुमान में उद्देश्य सुधार के लिए अग्रणी हैं।', 'ru': 'Рекомендации часто оцениваются по их субъективному качеству, но мало кто из исследователей изучил качество комментариев с точки зрения объективной полезности. Мы изучаем оценку качества рекомендаций в отношении как субъективных (т.е. рейтингов пользователей), так и объективных (т.е. повлияло ли это на «улучшило ли оно решения?») показателей в массивной онлайн-системе геополитического прогнозирования, в конечном итоге сравнивая лингвистические характеристики каждого показателя качества. Используя различные функции, мы прогнозируем все типы качества с лучшей точностью, чем простая, но сильная базовая линия длины комментария. Взгляд на наиболее прогностический контент иллюстрирует предвзятость оценщиков; например, прогнозисты субъективно предвзято относятся к комментариям, в которых упоминаются деловые операции или сделки, а также существенные вещи, даже несмотря на то, что такие комментарии действительно не оказываются более полезными объективно. Кроме того, более сложные конструкции предложений, о чем свидетельствуют подчиненные союзы, характерны для комментариев, приводящих к объективным улучшениям в прогнозировании.', 'ga': "Is minic a rátáiltear moltaí maidir lena gcáilíocht shuibiachtúil, ach is beag taighdeoirí a rinne staidéar ar cháilíocht na dtuairimí i dtéarmaí fóntais oibiachtúla. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar mheasúnú cáilíochta molta maidir le méadracht suibiachtúil (i.e. rátálacha úsáideoirí) agus oibiachtúil (i.e., an raibh tionchar aige? ar fheabhsaigh sé cinntí?) i gcóras ollmhór réamhaisnéise geopolitical ar líne, ag déanamh comparáide sa deireadh le tréithe teanga gach méadrach cáilíochta. Ag baint úsáide as gnéithe éagsúla, táimid ag tuar gach cineál cáilíochta le cruinneas níos fearr ná an bonnlíne simplí fós láidir d'fhad tuairimí. Léiríonn breathnú ar an ábhar is réamhaithrisí laofachtaí rátaitheora; mar shampla, tá réamhaisnéiseoirí claonta go suibiachtúil i bhfabhar tuairimí ina luaitear idirbhearta gnó nó déileálacha chomh maith le nithe ábhartha, cé nach bhfuil na tuairimí sin níos úsáidí go hoibiachtúil. Ina theannta sin, tá tógálacha abairtí níos casta, mar is léir ó fho-chomhcheangail, ina saintréith de chuid tuairimí as a dtagann feabhsuithe oibiachtúla sa réamhaisnéis.", 'hu': 'Az ajánlásokat gyakran szubjektív minőségük alapján értékelik, de kevés kutató tanulmányozta a kommentek minőségét objektív hasznosság szempontjából. Az ajánlások minőségértékelését vizsgáljuk szubjektív (azaz a felhasználók értékelései) és objektív (azaz befolyásolta-e, javította-e a döntéseket?) Egy hatalmas online geopolitikai előrejelzési rendszerben végzett mutatók, amelyek végső soron összehasonlítják az egyes minőségmérők nyelvi jellemzőit. A különböző funkciók használatával minden típusú minőséget jobb pontossággal jósolunk meg, mint a megjegyzések hosszának egyszerű, mégis erős alapja. A legelőrejelzőbb tartalom megvizsgálása az arányosabb elfogultságokat mutatja be; Az előrejelzők például szubjektíven elfogultak az üzleti tranzakciókról vagy üzletekről, valamint az anyagi dolgokról szóló megjegyzések mellett, bár az ilyen megjegyzések objektív szempontból nem bizonyulnak hasznosabbnak. Továbbá a bonyolultabb mondatszerkezetek, amint azt alárendelt kötőhárítások is bizonyítják, jellemzők azokra a megjegyzésekre, amelyek objektív javulást eredményeznek az előrejelzésben.', 'ka': 'პროცემენტებები ბევრად იქნება მისი სუბექტიური კაalitეტებისთვის, მაგრამ რამდენიმე პროცემენტები უფრო კომენტური კაalitეტების შესახებ მივისწავ ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსაკუთრებულობის კოლექტურის განსაკუთრება, რომელიც ორივე სუბექტიური (მაგალითად მომხმარებელი რეტენტირების) და მიზეზი (მაგალითად, ეს იქნება? ეს გაუფრო მეტრიკის მასიური ინტერნეტიკური გეოპოლიტიკური პროგრამეტური სისტემაში, საბოლოოდ ყველა კაalitეტიკური მეტრიკის ლუნგური პროგრამეტურების შესაბამი განსხვავებული ფუნქციების გამოყენება, ჩვენ ყველა ტიპის კალიტურის განსაზღვრება უკეთესია, ვიდრე უფრო მარტივია, მაგრამ ძალიან კომენტური სიგრძე. უკეთესი წარმოდგენებული შემდგენება რეტერის წარმოდგენება; მაგალითად, პროგრამეტრები სუბექტიურად გადარჩენებულია სამუშაო კომენტრებისთვის, რომელიც სამუშაო სამუშაო ტრანქციები ან სამუშაო, მაგრამ ეს კომენტრები დამატებით, უფრო კომპლექსიური სიტყვების კონფიგურაცია, როგორც სუპორდინატური კონფიგურაციებით, არის კომენტური კონფიგურაციების პროგრამეტრები, რომლებ', 'el': 'Οι συστάσεις αξιολογούνται συχνά για την υποκειμενική τους ποιότητα, αλλά λίγοι ερευνητές έχουν μελετήσει την ποιότητα σχολίων από άποψη αντικειμενικής χρησιμότητας. Εξετάζουμε την αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας των συστάσεων όσον αφορά τόσο την υποκειμενική (δηλαδή τις αξιολογήσεις των χρηστών) όσο και την αντικειμενική (δηλαδή, επηρέασε; βελτίωσε τις αποφάσεις;) μετρήσεις σε ένα μαζικό διαδικτυακό γεωπολιτικό σύστημα πρόβλεψης, συγκρίνοντας τελικά γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά κάθε μετρικής ποιότητας. Χρησιμοποιώντας μια ποικιλία χαρακτηριστικών, προβλέπουμε όλους τους τύπους ποιότητας με καλύτερη ακρίβεια από την απλή αλλά ισχυρή βάση του μήκους σχολίων. Η εξέταση του πιο προβλέψιμου περιεχομένου δείχνει προκατάληψη των κριτών. Για παράδειγμα, οι προβλέψεις είναι υποκειμενικά προκατειλημμένοι υπέρ των σχολίων που αναφέρουν επιχειρηματικές συναλλαγές ή συναλλαγές καθώς και ουσιώδη πράγματα, παρόλο που τα σχόλια αυτά δεν αποδεικνύονται πραγματικά πιο χρήσιμα αντικειμενικά. Επιπροσθέτως, πιο πολύπλοκες κατασκευές προτάσεων, όπως αποδεικνύονται από δευτερεύουσες συνδέσεις, είναι χαρακτηριστικές των σχολίων που οδηγούν σε αντικειμενικές βελτιώσεις στην πρόβλεψη.', 'lt': 'Rekomendacijos dažnai vertinamos atsižvelgiant į jų subjektyvią kokybę, tačiau nedaug mokslininkų išnagrinėjo komentarų kokybę objektyvios naudos požiūriu. Tiriame rekomendacijų kokybės vertinimą tiek subjektyviais (t. y. naudotojų reitingais) tiek objektyviais (t. y. ar jis turėjo įtakos? ar jis pagerino sprendimus?). metrics in a massive online geopolitical forecasting system, ultimately comparing linguistic characteristics of each quality metric.  Naudodami įvairias savybes, mes prognozuojame visų rūšių kokybę tiksliau nei paprastas, bet tvirtas komentaro ilgio pradinis rodiklis. Žvelgiant į labiausiai prognozuojamą turinį paaiškėja, kad rodikliai yra nukreipti; Pavyzdžiui, prognozuotojai yra subjektyviai šališki komentarams, kuriuose minimi verslo sandoriai ar sandoriai, taip pat esminiams dalykams, nors tokios pastabos iš tikrųjų nėra naudingesnės objektyviai. Be to, sudėtingesnės sakinių konstrukcijos, kaip rodo subordinuotos jungtys, yra pastabų, dėl kurių objektyviai pagerinamos prognozės.', 'it': 'Le raccomandazioni sono spesso valutate per la loro qualità soggettiva, ma pochi ricercatori hanno studiato la qualità dei commenti in termini di utilità oggettiva. Esaminiamo la valutazione della qualità delle raccomandazioni sia soggettiva (vale a dire valutazioni degli utenti) che oggettiva (vale a dire, ha influenzato o migliorato le decisioni?) metriche in un massiccio sistema di previsione geopolitica online, confrontando infine le caratteristiche linguistiche di ogni metrica di qualità. Utilizzando una varietà di funzionalità, prevediamo tutti i tipi di qualità con maggiore precisione rispetto alla semplice ma solida base di riferimento della lunghezza dei commenti. Osservare i contenuti più predittivi illustra i pregiudizi dei tassi; Ad esempio, i forecaster sono soggettivamente pregiudizievoli a favore di commenti che menzionano transazioni commerciali o affari nonché cose materiali, anche se tali commenti non si rivelano effettivamente più utili obiettivamente. Inoltre, costruzioni di frasi più complesse, come evidenziato dalle congiunzioni subordinate, sono caratteristiche dei commenti che portano a miglioramenti oggettivi nella previsione.', 'mk': 'Recommendations are often rated for their subjective quality, but few researchers have studied comment quality in terms of objective utility.  Истражуваме проценка на квалитетот на препораките во однос на субјективните (т.е. рејтингот на корисниците) и објективните (т.е. дали влијаеше тоа? дали ги подобри одлуките?) метрика во огромен онлајн систем на геополитички прогнози, на крајот споредувајќи ги јазичните карактеристики на секоја квалитетна метрика. Користејќи различни карактеристики, предвидуваме сите видови квалитет со подобра точност од едноставната, но силна основа на должината на коментарот. Погледнувајќи ја најпредвидливата содржина ги илустрира предрасудите на рејтерот; На пример, предвидувачите се субјективно пристрасни во корист на коментарите кои споменуваат бизнис транзакции или договори, како и материјални работи, иако ваквите коментари всушност не се покажуваат покорисни објективно. Additionally, more complex sentence constructions, as evidenced by subordinate conjunctions, are characteristic of comments leading to objective improvements in forecasting.', 'kk': 'Сұраулар көбінесе оның негізгі сапасы үшін бағалайды, бірақ бірнеше зерттеушілер мақсатты утилитаға арналған түсініктердің сапасы зерттеді. Біз мақсатты (т.е. пайдаланушылардың рейтинг) және мақсатты (т.е. ол әсер етеді бе? шешімдерді жақсарту керек пе?) деген рекомендациялардың сапатты бағалауын зерттейміз. Метрика онлайн геополитикалық прогноз жүйесінде, ең соңында әр сапатты метрикалық лингвистикалық қасиеттерін салыстырады. Бірнеше мүмкіндіктерді қолдану үшін, мәліметтердің ұзындығынан қарапайым және күшті негізгі сызықтың ұзындығынан артық түрлерді таңдап аламыз. Ең бақылайтын мазмұнын қарау оқиғалардың өзіндігін көрсетеді; мысалы, бұл түсініктемелер көмектеспейді. Сонымен қатар, көп комплекс сөздер құрылымы, тәсілімдердің көмегімен көрсетілген, мәліметтердің қасиеттері болады.', 'ms': 'Rakmandaan sering dicatat untuk kualiti subjektif mereka, tetapi beberapa peneliti telah mempelajari kualiti komentar dalam terma utiliti objektif. Kami mengeksplorasi penilaian kualiti rekomendasi terhadap kedua-dua subjektif (iaitu penilaian pengguna) dan objektif (iaitu, adakah ia mempengaruhi? adakah ia meningkatkan keputusan?) metrik dalam sistem ramalan geopolitik secara talian yang besar, akhirnya membandingkan ciri-ciri bahasa setiap metrik kualiti. Menggunakan pelbagai ciri-ciri, kita meramalkan semua jenis kualiti dengan lebih tepat daripada garis dasar sederhana tetapi kuat panjang komentar. Melihat kandungan yang paling ramalkan memaparkan bias penentu; Contohnya, para ramalan secara subjektif biased untuk komen yang menyebutkan transaksi bisnes atau perjanjian serta perkara-perkara bahasa, walaupun ulasan seperti itu tidak benar-benar membuktikan apa-apa yang lebih berguna secara objektif. Additionally, more complex sentence constructions, as evidenced by subordinate conjunctions, are characteristic of comments leading to objective improvements in forecasting.', 'ml': 'കുറച്ചു ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടി ആലോചിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് വിശിഷ്ടമുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളുടെയും കാര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെയും കാര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെയും കാര്യത്തില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു (അത് മുന ഒരു വലിയ ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ജോരാഷ്ട്രീയ മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലുള്ള മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d, അവസാനം ഓരോ ഗുണവിശേഷത്തിന്റെയും  വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ നീളവിനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ല വി ഏറ്റവും പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന ഉള്ളടക്കം നോക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഏറ്റവും പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പ്രകട ഉദാഹരണത്തിന് ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി, ബിസിനസ് ഇടപാടുകളെക്കുറിച്ചും ഇടപാടുകളെക്കുറിച്ചും പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന വ കൂടാതെ, കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്, സബ്വാധീനമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടുന്നത് പോലെ കൂടു', 'mt': 'Ir-rakkomandazzjonijiet spiss jiġu kklassifikati għall-kwalità soġġettiva tagħhom, iżda ftit riċerkaturi studjaw il-kwalità tal-kummenti f’termini ta’ utilità oġġettiva. Aħna nesploraw il-valutazzjoni tal-kwalità tar-rakkomandazzjoni fir-rigward kemm tal-klassifikazzjonijiet soġġettivi (jiġifieri l-klassifikazzjonijiet tal-utenti) kif ukoll tal-objettivi (jiġifieri, influwenzat? tejbet id-deċi żjonijiet?) metriċi f’sistema ta’ tbassir ġeopolitiku onlajn massiva, li fl-a ħħar mill-aħħar tqabbel il-karatteristiċi lingwistiċi ta’ kull metrika ta’ kwalità. Bl-użu ta’ varjetà ta’ karatteristiċi, a ħna nipprojbixxu t-tipi kollha ta’ kwalità b’preċiżjoni aħjar mil-linja bażi sempliċi iżda b’saħħitha tat-tul tal-kummenti. Meta wieħed iħares lejn l-aktar kontenut prevedibbli juri l-preġudizzji tar-rati; pereżempju, dawk li jbassru huma soġġettivament preġudizzjati favur kummenti li jsemmu tranżazzjonijiet jew negozji tan-negozju kif ukoll affarijiet materjali, anki jekk kummenti bħal dawn ma juru l-ebda oġġettività aktar utli. Additionally, more complex sentence constructions, as evidenced by subordinate conjunctions, are characteristic of comments leading to objective improvements in forecasting.', 'no': 'Tilrådd blir ofte ratert for subjectivt kvalitet, men få forskere har studiert kommentarkvalitet i uttrykket av objektiv verktøy. Vi utforsker anbefalingskvalitetevalueringa med hensyn til både subjektiv (t.d. brukarane) og målsetting (t.d. har det påvirka? forbedra det avgjøringar?) metrikar i eit massivt geopolitisk forecastingssystem på nettverket, og til slutt samanliknar lingviske karakteristikk av kvar kvalitet metrisk. Bruk ulike funksjonar, forventar vi alle typar kvalitetar med betre nøyaktighet enn den enkle, men sterke baselinja med kommentar. Når du ser på den mest foregåande innhaldet, illustrerer fargeovergangar. For eksempel, forhåndsvisningar er subjektivt gjennomsikt på kommentarar som mener forretningar eller handlingar og materiale ting, selv om slike kommentarar ikkje virkelig viser noko nyttige objektiv. I tillegg er meir komplekse setningar, som viser av underordna samlingar, karakteristika av kommentarar som fører til objektive forbetringar i forecasting.', 'mn': 'Баталгаа нь ихэвчлэн сурагчийн чанарын төлөвлөгөөтэй байдаг. Гэхдээ хэд хэдэн судлаачид зорилготой хэрэглээний тухай илтгэл тайлбар чанарыг судалсан. Бид хоёр субъектив (т.е. хэрэглэгчийн шагналын) болон зорилготой (т.е. хэрэглэгчийн шагналын) талаар зөвшөөрөл чанарын үнэлгээг судалж байна уу? шийдвэр гаргасан уу? Томоохон онлайн геоулс төрийн таамаглалтын системийн метрик. Эцэст нь хэл бүрийн метрикийн хэлний чанарыг харьцуулдаг. Бид олон төрлийн төрлийн чанарыг ашиглан, бид бүх төрлийн төрлийн тодорхойлолтой илүү зөв байдалтай таамаглаж байдаг. Хамгийн тодорхойлолтой бүтээгдэхүүнийг харах нь үнэтэй урвалыг харуулдаг. Жишээлбэл, судлаачид бизнесийн худалдааны эсвэл худалдааны, материаллын зүйлсийг хэлэхдээ илүү ашигтай зүйлсийг илэрхийлж чадахгүй байсан ч гэсэн иймэрхүү өргөмжүүдийн хувьд сэтгэл хандлагатай байдаг. Мөн илүү төвөгтэй өгүүлбэрүүдийг бүтээх нь төвөгтэй холбоотой байдлаар илүү төвөгтэй хэлбэрүүдийн тодорхойлолтой байдаг.', 'pl': 'Zalecenia są często oceniane pod względem subiektywnej jakości, ale niewielu badaczy badało jakość komentarzy pod względem obiektywnej użyteczności. Badamy ocenę jakości rekomendacji zarówno w odniesieniu do subiektywnych (tj. ocen użytkowników) jak i obiektywnych (tj. czy wpływała na to? czy poprawiła decyzje?) wskaźniki w ogromnym systemie prognozowania geopolitycznego online, ostatecznie porównując cechy językowe każdej metryki jakości. Korzystając z różnych funkcji, przewidujemy wszystkie rodzaje jakości z lepszą dokładnością niż prosta, ale silna baza długości komentarza. Patrzenie na najbardziej predykcyjne treści ilustruje uprzedzenia oceniające; Na przykład prognozowie są subiektywnie uprzedzeni na korzyść komentarzy wspominających transakcje lub transakcje biznesowe, a także rzeczy istotne, chociaż takie komentarze rzeczywiście nie okazują się bardziej użyteczne obiektywnie. Dodatkowo bardziej złożone konstrukcje zdań, o czym świadczą podrzędne spojówki, charakterystyczne są dla komentarzy prowadzących do obiektywnej poprawy prognozowania.', 'ro': 'Recomandările sunt adesea evaluate pentru calitatea lor subiectivă, dar puțini cercetători au studiat calitatea comentariilor în termeni de utilitate obiectivă. Analizăm evaluarea calității recomandărilor atât în ceea ce privește subiectivul (adică evaluările utilizatorilor) cât și obiectivul (adică, a influențat sau a îmbunătățit deciziile?) metrice într-un masiv sistem de prognoză geopolitică online, comparand în cele din urmă caracteristicile lingvistice ale fiecărei metrice de calitate. Folosind o varietate de caracteristici, prezicem toate tipurile de calitate cu o precizie mai bună decât baza simplă, dar puternică a lungimii comentariilor. Privind conținutul cel mai predictiv ilustrează prejudecățile ratelor; De exemplu, previzorii sunt subiectiv părtinitori în favoarea comentariilor care menționează tranzacții sau tranzacții de afaceri, precum și lucruri materiale, chiar dacă astfel de comentarii nu se dovedesc într-adevăr mai utile în mod obiectiv. În plus, construcțiile de propoziții mai complexe, așa cum demonstrează conjuncțiile subordonate, sunt caracteristice comentariilor care duc la îmbunătățiri obiective în prognoză.', 'so': "Inta badan talo bixinta waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qiimaha la xiriiro, laakiin wax yar oo cilmi-baarayaashu waxay ku baran jireen qiimo muuqashada xagga faa'iidada waxyaabaha la jeedo. Waxaynu baaraynaa qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeeya e e la xiriira labada maaduudood (tusaale ahaan fasaxa isticmaalayaasha) iyo waxyaabaha la jeedo (ma saameyn ku leedahay? ma bedeshay go'aanka?) metrici aad u badan shabakadda joojisyo-siyaasadeed, ugu dambaysta isbarbardhigta takhasuska luuqada ee metric walba. Isku isticmaalno tayooyin kala duduwan, waxaynu wax ka sii sheegaynaa noocyo kasta oo qiimo ah oo aad u sahlan si ka fiican inta fudud ee ka sii xoogaysan dhererka commentarka. Looking at the most predictive content illustrates rater biases;  Tusaale ahaan qofka horay u soo bandhigaya waxay si gaar ah u leeyihiin arrimaha ku saabsan ganacsiga ama ganacsiga iyo alaabta waxyaabaha lagu sameeyo, in kastoo ay ka muuqaneyso arrimaha faa’iido badan. Sidoo kale dhismo qallafsan oo ka qallafsan kaliga ah, sida loo caddeeyey xidhiidhka hoose ah, waxay leeyihiin muuqashada soo jeedidda, kaas oo ku hagaajiya horumarinta horumarinta.", 'sr': 'Preporuke se često procjenjuju za njihovu subjektivnu kvalitet, ali nekoliko istraživača su proučavali kvalitet komentara u smislu objektivnog korisnosti. Istražujemo procjenu kvalitete preporuke u odnosu na subjektivne (tj. ocjene korisnika) i objektivne (tj. da li je to uticalo? da li je poboljšala odluke?) metrika u ogromnom sistemu geopolitičkog predviđanja na internetu, konačno uspoređujući lingvističke karakteristike svake kvalitetne metrike. Koristeći razne karakteristike, predviđamo sve vrste kvalitete sa boljom preciznošću od jednostavne, ali jake početne linije dužine komentara. Gledajući najpredvidljiviji sadržaj ilustruje predrasude ratera; Na primer, predviđači su subjektivno predrasudeni u korist komentara spominjanja poslovnih transakcija ili poslova, kao i materijalnih stvari, iako takvi komentari zaista ne dokazuju ništa korisnije objektivnije. Osim toga, kompleksnije konstrukcije rečenice, kao što je pokazalo podordenatnim kombinacijama, karakteristične su komentari koji vode do objektivnih poboljšanja predviđanja.', 'ta': 'பரிந்துரைகள் பெரும்பாலும் அவர்களுடைய சொந்த தரமுக்கு விகிதமாக இருக்கும், ஆனால் சில ஆராய்ச்சிகள் குறிப்பிடும்  நாம் பரிந்துரையின் தரம் மதிப்பீட்டை பார்க்கலாம் இருவரும் குறிப்பிட்ட விகிதம் (அதாவது, அது தீர்ப்புகளை மேம்படுத்தினாரா?) metrics in a massive online geopolitical forecasting system, ultimately comparing linguistic characteristics of each quality metric.  பல்வேறு குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி, குறிப்பு நீளத்தை விட சிறந்த சரிவுடன் அனைத்து வகைகளையும் நாம் முன்கூறுகிறோம். மிகவும் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட உள்ளடக்கங்களை பார்க்கும் பொருள் விகிதமான பிரச்சனைகளை குறிப்ப எடுத்துக்காட்டாக, பார்வையாளர்கள் வியாபாரத்தை அல்லது வியாபாரத்தை மற்றும் பொருள் விஷயங்களை குறிப்பிடும் குறிப்பிடும் குறிப் கூடுதலாக, மிகவும் சிக்கலான வாக்கியம் கட்டமைப்பு, துணை இணைப்புகள் மூலம் தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டது, குறிப்புரைகளின் சிக்கலாகும், முன்னோட்', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශානයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය සඳහා ගණන් කරනවා, නමුත් පරීක්ෂකයෝ ටිකක්  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන (ඉතින් ප්\u200dරශ්ණකයෝ රේටින්ස මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් අන්තර්ජාතික භාවිත්\u200dයාත්මක පද්ධතියක්, අන්තර්ජාතික විශේෂ මෙට්\u200dරික් වල භාවිත්\u200dයා විවිධ වර්ගයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, අපි හැම වර්ගයක්ම හොඳ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ඒත් සාමාන්\u200dය ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් රේටර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා; උදාහරණයෙන්, ව්\u200dයාපාර සහ ව්\u200dයාපාර සඳහා ව්\u200dයාපාර සඳහා ව්\u200dයාපාර සඳහා ව්\u200dයාපාර සඳහා ව්\u200dයාපාර සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ දේවල් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ තවත්, වඩා සංශ්\u200dය වාක්ෂාව නිර්මාණය, සංශ්\u200dය සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පිළිබඳු විදිහට, ප්\u200dරත', 'ur': 'سفارش اغلب ان کے معاملہ کیفیت کے لئے منتخب ہوتے ہیں، لیکن بہت کم تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے ذریعہ استعمال کے مطابق توضیح کیفیت کو پڑھا ہے. ہم سفارش کی کیفیت کی ارزیابی کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں (یعنی کارساز کی راتینگ) اور موضوع کے بارے میں (یعنی کیا یہ اثر دیتا ہے؟ کیا یہ فیصلے بہتر کر رہا ہے؟) متریک ایک بڑی آنلاین جیوپالیسی پیش\u200cکاسٹ سیسٹم میں، بالآخر ہر کیفیت متریک کی زبان شناسی خصوصیات کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ہر طرح کی گوناگون گوناگون کے استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم ہر طرح کی گوناگونی کی پیش بینی کرتے ہیں جو بہترین سمجھ کے ساتھ سادگی اور قوی کمٹر کی طول سے بہتر ہے۔ سب سے زیادہ پیش بینی موجود کی طرف نظر کرتا ہے کہ راٹر کی مخالفت کو دکھاتا ہے۔ مثال یہ ہے کہ پیش بینی کرنے والوں نے تجارت یا معاملات اور موجود چیزوں کا ذکر کیا ہے، اگرچہ ایسے مثالیں یقیناً کچھ بھی فائدہ اٹھانے کے ساتھ ثابت نہیں کر سکتے۔ اور اضافہ، زیادہ پیچیدہ جماعت کی ساختگی، جسے زیادہ پیچیدہ جماعت کے ذریعہ دکھائی جاتی ہے، ان کی تعلیمات کی خصوصی ہے جو پیش بینی میں مقررہ improvements کی پیش بینی کرتی ہیں.', 'sv': 'Rekommendationer värderas ofta för sin subjektiva kvalitet, men få forskare har studerat kommentarkvaliteten i termer av objektiv användbarhet. Vi undersöker rekommendationskvalitetsbedömning med avseende på både subjektiva (dvs användarnas betyg) och objektiva (dvs påverkade det? förbättrade det besluten?) mätvärden i ett massivt geopolitiskt prognossystem online, som slutligen jämför språkliga egenskaper för varje kvalitetsmätare. Med hjälp av en mängd olika funktioner förutspår vi alla typer av kvalitet med bättre noggrannhet än den enkla men ändå starka baslinjen för kommentarslängd. Att titta på det mest förutsägbara innehållet illustrerar raters fördomar; Till exempel är prognosmakare subjektivt partiska till förmån för kommentarer som nämner affärstransaktioner eller affärer samt materiella saker, även om sådana kommentarer faktiskt inte visar sig vara mer användbara objektivt. Dessutom är mer komplexa meningskonstruktioner, vilket framgår av underordnade konjunktioner, karakteristiska för kommentarer som leder till objektiva förbättringar i prognosen.', 'uz': "Mavzu sifatida talab qilinadi, lekin qidiruvchilar obʼektlar foydalanuvchining imkoniyatini o'rganadi. Biz ma'lumotga murakkab foydalanuvchilar qiymatlarini ko'rib chiqaramiz (balki foydalanuvchilar qiymatlariga) va obʼekt haqida qiymatni ko'rib chiqqamiz (shunday, u o'zgarishga qaramadi?) shaxsiy har bir xillik metrikning fikrlarini o'xshash ko'rsatadi. Ko'pchilik xususiyatlarni ishlatishda, biz oddiy va kichkina izoh soʻzning asosiy chegarasini bajarilamiz. Ko'rib chiqqan tarkibini ko'rib chiqishga o'xshaydi va Masalan, taʼminlovchilar faqat qanday foydalanuvchi narsalarni yoki ta'minlovchi narsalarni va material narsalarni taqdim qilishga qaramaydi. Koʻrsatilgan, ko'proq murakkab so'zlar tuzuvlari, tub xizmatlar bilan ishlatilganligini tasdiqlash imkoniyatining obʼekt o'zgarishga sabab boʻladi.", 'vi': 'Lời khuyên được đánh giá dựa trên phẩm chất chủ quan của họ, nhưng ít nhà nghiên cứu về chất lượng bình luận về tiện ích đích. Chúng tôi tìm hiểu đánh giá chất lượng đề nghị về cả phẩm chất chủ quan (tức là đánh giá người dùng) và mục tiêu (tức là nó có tác động không? Nó có cải thiện quyết định không? đo lường trong một hệ thống dự đoán chính trị hàng loạt trên mạng, so sánh các đặc điểm ngôn ngữ của mỗi hệ thống đo chất lượng. Sử dụng các tính năng khác nhau, chúng tôi dự đoán mọi loại chất lượng với độ chính xác hơn so với đường hầm đơn giản nhưng mạnh của độ dài bình luận. Nhìn vào nội dung dự đoán nhiều hơn là điển hình. Ví dụ như, người dự đoán luôn thiên vị theo chủ kiến của những nhận xét mà đề cập đến các giao dịch kinh doanh hay các thương vụ cũng như vật chất, mặc dù những nhận xét đó không có gì có ích hơn một cách khách quan. Thêm vào đó, cấu trúc án phức tạp hơn, như được chứng minh bởi những kết quả phụ thuộc, là đặc trưng của những ghi chú dẫn tới cải tiến mục tiêu trong dự đoán.', 'da': 'Anbefalinger vurderes ofte for deres subjektive kvalitet, men få forskere har studeret kommentarkvaliteten med hensyn til objektiv nytte. Vi undersøger anbefalingernes kvalitetsvurdering med hensyn til både subjektive (dvs. brugernes vurderinger) og objektive (dvs. påvirkede det? forbedrede det beslutningerne?) målinger i et massivt online geopolitisk prognosesystem, der i sidste ende sammenligner sproglige karakteristika for hver kvalitetsmetric. Ved hjælp af en række funktioner forudsiger vi alle typer kvalitet med bedre nøjagtighed end den enkle, men stærke baseline for kommentarlængden. Når man ser på det mest forudsigende indhold, illustreres rater fordomme; For eksempel er prognoserne subjektivt fordomsfulde til fordel for kommentarer om forretningstransaktioner eller handler samt materielle ting, selv om sådanne kommentarer faktisk ikke viser sig mere nyttige objektivt. Desuden er mere komplekse sætningskonstruktioner, som det fremgår af underordnede konjunktioner, karakteristiske for kommentarer, der fører til objektive forbedringer i prognoser.', 'nl': 'Aanbevelingen worden vaak beoordeeld op hun subjectieve kwaliteit, maar weinig onderzoekers hebben commentaarkwaliteit bestudeerd in termen van objectief nut. We onderzoeken de beoordeling van de kwaliteit van aanbevelingen met betrekking tot zowel subjectieve (d.w.z. gebruikersbeoordelingen) als objectieve (d.w.z. beïnvloedde het? verbeterde het beslissingen?) Metrics in een enorm online geopolitieke voorspellingssysteem, waarbij uiteindelijk taalkundige kenmerken van elke kwaliteitsmetriek worden vergeleken. Met behulp van een verscheidenheid aan functies voorspellen we alle soorten kwaliteit met een betere nauwkeurigheid dan de eenvoudige maar sterke baseline van de reactielengte. Kijken naar de meest voorspellende inhoud illustreert vooroordelen van de rater; Forecasters zijn bijvoorbeeld subjectief bevooroordeeld voor opmerkingen waarin zowel zakelijke transacties of transacties als materiële zaken worden vermeld, hoewel dergelijke opmerkingen objectief niet nuttiger blijken. Daarnaast zijn complexere zinsconstructies, zoals blijkt uit ondergeschikte conjuncties, kenmerkend voor commentaren die leiden tot objectieve verbeteringen in de voorspelling.', 'hr': 'Preporuke se često procjenjuju za subjektivnu kvalitet, ali malo istraživača ispitivalo je kvalitet komentara u smislu objektivnog korisnosti. Istražujemo procjenu kvalitete preporuke u pogledu subjektivnih (tj. ocjena korisnika) i objektivnih (tj. da li je utjecala na to? da li je poboljšala odluke?) metrike u ogromnom sistemu geopolitičkog predviđanja na internetu, konačno uspoređujući jezičke karakteristike svake kvalitetne metrike. Koristeći razne karakteristike, predviđamo sve vrste kvalitete s boljom preciznošću nego jednostavnom, ali jakom početnom linijom dužine komentara. Gledajući najpredvidljiviji sadržaj ilustruje predrasude ratera; Na primjer, predviđači su subjektivno predrasudeni u korist komentara spominjanih poslovnih transakcija ili poslova, kao i materijalnih stvari, iako takvi komentari zaista ne dokazuju ništa korisnije objektivnije. Osim toga, kompleksnije konstrukcije rečenica, kao što je dokazano podordenatnim kombinacijama, karakteristične su komentari koji vode do objektivnih poboljšanja predviđanja.', 'de': 'Empfehlungen werden oft nach ihrer subjektiven Qualität bewertet, aber nur wenige Forscher haben die Kommentarqualität hinsichtlich objektiver Nützlichkeit untersucht. Wir untersuchen die Bewertung der Empfehlungsqualität sowohl hinsichtlich subjektiver (d.h. Nutzerbewertungen) als auch objektiver (d.h. Einfluss? Verbesserung der Entscheidungen?) Metriken in einem massiven geopolitischen Online-Prognosesystem, das letztlich linguistische Merkmale jeder Qualitätsmetrik vergleicht. Mit einer Vielzahl von Funktionen prognostizieren wir alle Arten von Qualität mit besserer Genauigkeit als die einfache, aber starke Basis der Kommentarlänge. Der Blick auf die prädiktivsten Inhalte zeigt Verzerrungen der Bewerter; Zum Beispiel sind Prognosen subjektiv voreingenommen zugunsten von Kommentaren, die Geschäftsvorgänge oder Geschäfte sowie materielle Dinge erwähnen, obwohl solche Kommentare objektiv nicht nützlicher sind. Darüber hinaus sind komplexere Satzkonstruktionen charakteristisch für Kommentare, die zu objektiven Verbesserungen in der Prognose führen.', 'id': 'Recommendations are often rated for their subjective quality, but few researchers have studied comment quality in terms of objective utility. Kami mengeksplorasi penilaian kualitas rekomendasi dalam hal subjektif (i.e. nilai pengguna) dan objektif (i.e., apakah itu mempengaruhi? apakah itu memperbaiki keputusan?) metrik dalam sistem prognosis geopolitik online yang besar, akhirnya membandingkan karakteristik bahasa setiap metrik kualitas. Menggunakan berbagai ciri-ciri, kita memprediksi semua jenis kualitas dengan akurasi yang lebih baik daripada dasar dasar sederhana namun kuat panjang komentar. Melihat isi yang paling prediksif menunjukkan bias rater; contohnya, para prediksi secara subyektif biased untuk komentar yang menyebutkan transaksi bisnis atau perdagangan serta hal-hal materi, meskipun komentar tersebut tidak benar-benar membuktikan lebih berguna secara objektif. Selain itu, konstruksi kalimat yang lebih kompleks, seperti yang terbukti oleh kongsi subordinat, adalah karakteristik komentar yang mengarah kepada peningkatan objektif dalam prediksi.', 'bg': 'Препоръките често се оценяват за тяхното субективно качество, но малко изследователи са проучили качеството на коментарите по отношение на обективната полезност. Проучваме оценката на качеството на препоръките както по отношение на субективната (т.е. оценката на потребителите), така и обективната (т.е. повлияла ли е? подобрила ли е решенията?) измервания в масивна онлайн геополитическа прогнозна система, в крайна сметка сравнявайки езиковите характеристики на всеки показател за качество. Използвайки различни функции, ние предвиждаме всички видове качество с по-добра точност от простата, но силна базова линия на дължината на коментарите. Разглеждането на най-предсказуемото съдържание илюстрира пристрастията на оценителите; Например, прогнозиращите са субективно предубедени в полза на коментари, споменаващи бизнес сделки или сделки, както и материални неща, въпреки че такива коментари действително не се оказват по-полезни обективно. Освен това, по-сложните конструкции на изреченията, както се доказва от подчинените конюнкции, са характерни за коментарите, водещи до обективни подобрения в прогнозирането.', 'ko': '추천은 보통 주관적인 품질에 따라 등급을 평가하지만 연구원들이 객관적인 효용의 측면에서 평론의 질을 연구하는 경우는 드물다.우리는 주관(즉 사용자 평점)과 객관(즉 그것이 영향을 미쳤는가? 결정을 개선했는가) 두 방면에서 추천 품질 평가를 검토했다.대규모 온라인 지연 정치 예측 시스템의 지표는 최종적으로 모든 품질 지표의 언어 특징을 비교한다.여러 가지 특징을 사용하여 우리는 모든 유형의 품질을 예측하는데 간단하지만 강력한 평론 길이의 기선보다 더욱 정확하다.가장 예측적인 내용을 보면 평점자의 편견을 설명할 수 있다.예를 들어 예측자는 주관적으로 상업 거래나 거래, 물질적 사물을 언급하는 평론에 치우친다. 비록 이런 평론이 객관적으로 더 유용하다는 것을 증명하지 못했지만.그 밖에 더욱 복잡한 문장 구조, 예를 들어 종속연사가 증명한 것은 평론의 특징으로 예측의 객관적인 개선을 초래했다.', 'sw': 'Mapendekezo mara nyingi yanavumiwa kwa kiwango cha ubora wao, lakini watafiti wachache wamesoma ubora wa maoni kwa sababu ya matumizi ya malengo. Tunafahamu tathmini za kiwango cha ubora kwa kuhusiana na viwango vyote vya watumiaji (yaani, iliathiri? Je, ilikuwa imebadilisha maamuzi?) mitindo makubwa ya mfumo wa utabiri wa kisiasa wa mtandaoni, hatimaye ukilinganisha tabia za lugha za kila mtiririko wa sifa. Kwa kutumia tabia mbalimbali, tunatabiri aina zote za ubora wenye uhakika bora kuliko msingi wa maoni rahisi na yenye nguvu. Looking at the most predictive content illustrates rater biases;  Kwa mfano, watabiri wanachukuliwa kwa upendo wa maoni yanayotaja biashara au biashara pamoja na mambo mengi, ingawa maoni kama hayo hayajathibitisha lengo lolote linalofaa zaidi. Zaidi ya hayo, ujenzi wa hukumu tata zaidi, kama ilivyothibitishwa na ushirikiano wa chini, ni utaalam wa maoni yanayopelekea maboresho ya malengo ya kutabiri.', 'tr': 'Maslahatlar (maslahatlar) olaryň subjektiv kwaliteti üçin köplenç üns berilýär, ýöne az ylgamçylar maksady hökmünde terjime etmek kwaliteti okadylar. Biz maslahatlaryň howpsuzlyk hasaplamasyny hem subjektiv (meýhili ullançylaryň derejesi) we maksady (meýhili, ol etmäge mejbur boldy? kararlary düzeltdimi?) metrikler online jeopolitik önlenme sistemasynda, iň soňunda her kwalitet metrikleriniň lingwistiki özelliklerini karşılaştyrýar. Birnäçe üýtgewlerden ullanýarys, biz ähli näçe kaliwatlary düzgün, ýöne basit we güýçli terjime edeniň uzlyklaryndan has gowy öňünden geçirýäris. Iň täsirli maslahatlara seredeniň düzlikli üýtgeşmeleri görkezýär; mysal. Taýýarlaryň biznes transaksiýalary ýa-da materiýal zatlary diňleýän terjimeleri hakykatdan hem bu terjimeler hiç hili faydaly maksady bolmaýandygyny bilmeýändirler. Diňe-de, köp karmaşık sözler tanamalary, subordinat birleşmeler tarapyndan tanyşdyrylýan töwürler bolup gözden gelişmelere yönlendirýän töwürler hasaplanyr.', 'af': "Aanvarings word dikwels belangrik vir hul subjektiewe kwaliteit, maar sommige ondersoekers het kommentaar-kwaliteit ingevolge objektiewe nutsprogram ondersoek. Ons ondersoek aanbevelingskwaliteit evaluering met betrekking tot beide subjektiewe (i.e. gebruikers se reitings) en objektief (i.e. het dit influens? het dit besluitings verbeter?) metries in 'n groot online geopolitiese voorskoustelsel, in die einde vergelyking van lingvisse karakteristieke van elke kwaliteit metriek. Gebruik ons 'n verskillende funksies, voorskou ons alle tipes van kwaliteit met beter presisie as die eenvoudige nog sterk basisline van kommentaar lengte. Kyk na die mees voorskoude inhoud illustreer rater voorspoedies; byvoorbeeld, voorskouers is subjektief voorspoedig in genade van kommentaar wat besigheidse transaksies of handelings as ook materiële dinge bepaal, selfs al sodanige kommentaar nie sekerlik enige meer gebruiklike objektief bevestig nie. In addition, more complex sentence constructions, as evidenced by subordinate conjunctions, are characteristic of comments leading to objective improvements in forecasting.", 'sq': 'Kërkesat shpesh vlerësohen për cilësinë subjektive të tyre, por pak kërkues kanë studiuar cilësinë e komenteve lidhur me shërbimin objektiv. Ne eksplorojmë vlerësimin e cilësisë së rekomandimit lidhur me vlerësimet subjektive (pra vlerësimet e përdoruesve) dhe objektive (pra, a ndikoi ajo? a përmirësoi vendimet?) metrika në një sistem masiv gjeopolitik online parashikimesh, duke krahasuar përfundimisht karakteristikat gjuhësore të çdo metrike cilësie. Using a variety of features, we predict all types of quality with better accuracy than the simple yet strong baseline of comment length.  Shikimi i përmbajtjes më parashikuese ilustron paragjykimet e normuesve; Për shembull, parashikuesit janë subjektivisht të paragjykuar në favor të komenteve që përmendin transaksionet e biznesit apo marrëdhëniet si dhe gjëra materiale, edhe pse komentet e tilla nuk vërtetohen më të dobishme objektivisht. Përveç kësaj, ndërtimet më komplekse të dënimeve, siç duket nga lidhjet e nënshtruara, janë karakteristike të komenteve që shpien në përmirësime objektive në parashikimet.', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد اغلب برای کیفیت موضوع آنها ارزش داده می\u200cشود، ولی کمی محققان کیفیت توضیح را در مورد استفاده هدف مطالعه کرده\u200cاند. ما ارزیابی کیفیت پیشنهاد را در مورد هر دو مقدار (یعنی مقدار\u200cهای کاربر) و هدف (یعنی آیا تاثیر داده است؟ آیا تصمیم\u200cها را بهتر کرده است؟) متریک در یک سیستم پیش\u200cبینی زیست\u200cسیاسی بزرگ آنلاین، بالاخره ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی از هر کیفیت متریک مقایسه می\u200cکند. با استفاده از ویژه های مختلف، ما همه نوع کیفیت را پیش بینی می کنیم با دقیق بهتر از خط بنیادی ساده و قوی از طول توضیح ها. نگاه کردن به محتوای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cترین پیش\u200cبینی، پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای ارزشمند را نشان می\u200cدهد. برای مثال، پیشنهاد\u200cکننده\u200cها به عنوان توضیح\u200cها که در مورد تجارت\u200cها یا تجارت\u200cها و چیزهای موجود و موجود موجود می\u200cباشند، با وجود اینکه این توضیح\u200cها واقعاً هیچ مفید\u200cتر را به هدف ثابت نمی\u200cکنند. اضافه\u200cای، ساختار جمله\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cتر، به عنوان توسط اتحادیه\u200cهای پایین\u200cترین نشان داده می\u200cشود، ویژه\u200cهای توضیح\u200cها که به سوی بهترین\u200cهای هدف در پیش\u200cبینی رخ می\u200cدهند.', 'am': 'Recommendations are often rated for their subjective quality, but few researchers have studied comment quality in terms of objective utility.  የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ማስታወቂያውን እና አካባቢ (ምናልባት ተጠቃሚዎች ቁጥር) እና አካባቢ (ምናልባት ይህ ማስታወቂያ ነው? ይህ ማስታወቂያው አሻራለችን?) የኢንተርኔት የፖለቲካ ብሔራዊ የፖለቲካ ቅድሚያ ስርዓት፣ በመጨረሻው የቋንቋዊ ስርዓት የሙሉ ትክክል እውቀት ይተካክላል፡፡ በተለያዩ ምርጫዎች በተጠቀምን፣ ከቀላል ነገር ግን የበረታች የአስታይነት መደገፊያ ርዝመት ይልቅ የሚሻለውን ጥሩ ሁሉ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የሚታወቀው ትርጉም መሆኑን በመመለከት ላይ የሚታወቅ ሁኔታዎችን ያሳያል፡ ለምሳሌ፣ የንግድ ንግድ ወይም ጉዳይ እና የሀብት ነገሮች በማስታወቂያው ምክንያት በተቃውሞው ላይ የተቃውሞ አዋቂዎች ቢሆኑ እንኳ እንደዚህ ያሉ አስተያየት ከዚያ ወዲያ የሚጠቅመውን አቃውሞ ምንም አይገልጹም፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አካባቢ አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን እንደሚገልጽ የውይይት ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢ ማድረግ የሚያሳየው ትርጉም ግንኙነት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաճախ խորհուրդները գնահատվում են իրենց սուբյեկտիվ որակի համար, բայց քիչ հետազոտողներ ուսումնասիրել են մեկնաբանության որակը օբյեկտիվ օգտակարության առումով: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք խորհուրդների որակի գնահատման վերաբերյալ նաև սուբյեկտիվ (այսինքն՝ օգտագործողների գնահատականները) և օբյեկտիվ (այսինքն, արդյոք դա ազդեց՞ այն, արդյոք այն բարելավեց որոշումները?) մետրիկները հսկայական առցանց երկրաքաղաքական կանխատեսման համակարգում, վերջապես համեմատելով յուրաքանչյուր որակային մետրիկայի լեզվաբանական հատկությունները: Օգտագործելով տարբեր առանձնահատկություններ, մենք կանխատեսում ենք բոլոր տեսակի որակը ավելի ճշգրիտ, քան մեկնաբանության պարզ, բայց ուժեղ հիմքը: Ամենականխատեսելի պարունակությունը ցույց է տալիս գնահատողների կողմնականությունները, Օրինակ, կանխատեսողները սուբյեկտիվ կողմնականում են բիզնես գործարքների կամ գործարքների, ինչպես նաև նյութական բաների մասին նշելու համար, չնայած որ նման մեկնաբանությունները իրականում առավել օգտակար չեն ապացուցում: Ավելին, ավելի բարդ նախադասությունների կառուցվածքները, ինչպես ապացուցում են ենթակապակցված հաղորդակցվածքները, բնորոշ են մեկնաբանությունների, որոնք հանգեցնում են օբյեկտիվ բարելավման կանխատեսման մեջ:', 'bn': 'প্রায়শই তাদের বিশেষ মানের জন্য পরামর্শ হারানো হয়, কিন্তু কয়েকজন গবেষকেরা লক্ষ্য ব্যবহারের ব্যাপারে মন্তব্যের মা আমরা সুপারিশ মানের মান বিষয়বস্তু (যেমন ব্যবহারকারীর রেজ) এবং উদ্দেশ্য (যেমন এটা কি প্রভাবিত হয়েছে? এটি কি সিদ্ধান্ত উন্নত করেছে?) অনলাইনের ব্যাপক ভূমিরাজনৈতিক প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেমের মেট্রিক, অবশেষে প্রত্যেক মানের মানের ভাষার ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিভিন্ন ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে, আমরা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করি সকল ধরনের মানের ব্যাপারে সঠিকভাবে সঠিকভাবে বিশেষ পরিস্থি সবচেয়ে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী বিষয়বস্তুর দিকে তাকিয়ে দেখা যাচ্ছে তারা বেশী বৈষম্যশীল; উদাহরণস্বরূপ, প্রাক্তন মন্তব্যের পক্ষে ব্যবসা বা ব্যবসা বা চুক্তির কথা উল্লেখ করা মন্তব্যের বিষয়বস্তুর পক্ষে বিবেচনা করা হয়েছে, যদিও এই মন্তব্য Additionally, more complex sentence constructions, as evidenced by subordinate conjunctions, are characteristic of comments leading to objective improvements in forecasting.', 'ca': "Les recomanacions sovint es valoren per la seva qualitat subjectiva, però pocs investigadors han estudiat la qualitat de comentaris en termes d'utilitat objectiva. Exploram l'evaluació de la qualitat de la recomendació en relació tant a la subjectiva (és a dir, a les puntuacions dels usuaris) com a l'objectiu (és a dir, influïa? millorava les decisions?) les mètriques d'un massiu sistema de previsió geopolítica en línia, comparant finalment les característiques lingüístices de cada mètric de qualitat. Utilitzant una varietat de característiques, predim tots els tipus de qualitat amb millor precisió que la simple però forta línia de llargada del comentari. Mirant el contingut més preditiu il·lustra les tendències dels puntualitzadors; per exemple, les previsions són subjectivament biasades en favor de comentaris que mencionen transaccions de negocis o negocis i coses materials, encara que aquests comentaris no resultin més útils objectivament. A més, les construccions de frases més complexes, com evidenciaven conjunccions subordinades, són característices de comentaris que porten a millores objectives en les previsions.", 'az': 'Tövsiyələr çox dəyişiklik qiymətlərinə müəyyən edilir, amma az araştırmacılar müəyyən faydalarına görə komentar qiymətini öyrəndilər. Biz həmçinin həmçinin subjektiv (ya da istifadəçilərin qiyməti) və məqsədilə olan təsirlərin qiyməti təcrübəsini keşfetirik (ya da bu təcrübəsini etmişdi? Bu təcrübələrini yaxşılaşdırdı mı?) metrikləri online geosiyasi təcrübə sistemində, sonunda hər kaliteli metriklərin dil özelliklərini karşılaşdırır. Müxtəlif xüsusiyyətlərdən istifadə edirək, hər cür tərzlərin şəkillərin uzunluğundan daha düzgün və daha qüvvətli tərzlərini təmin edirik. Ən tədbirli məlumatlara baxmaq müəyyən edilən tədbirləri göstərir. Misal olaraq, proqramlar biznes transaksiyonlarını, ticarətləri və materyal şeyləri danışan şəhadətlərə layiqlik edirlər. Halbuki bu şəhadətlər həqiqətən də daha faydalı olaraq kanıtlanmırlar. Əksinə, daha kompleks cümlələr in şalları, subordinat birlikləri ilə tanıdıqları kimi, proqramların müəyyən edilməsi üçün məqsədil yaxşılıqlarına yol göstərən şəkillərin əlaqəsidir.', 'cs': 'Doporučení jsou často hodnocena pro jejich subjektivní kvalitu, ale málo vědců studovalo kvalitu komentářů z hlediska objektivní užitečnosti. Zkoumáme hodnocení kvality doporučení s ohledem na subjektivní (tj. hodnocení uživatelů) a objektivní (tj. ovlivnilo? zlepšilo rozhodnutí?) Metriky v masivním on-line geopolitickém prognózním systému, nakonec porovnávající jazykové charakteristiky každé metriky kvality. Pomocí různých funkcí předpovídáme všechny typy kvality s lepší přesností než jednoduchý, ale silný základ délky komentáře. Pohled na nejvíce prediktivní obsah ilustruje předsudky hodnocení; Prognózovatelé jsou například subjektivně zaujatí ve prospěch komentářů zmiňujících obchodní transakce nebo jednání, stejně jako hmotné věci, i když tyto komentáře skutečně nejsou objektivně užitečnější. Kromě toho jsou charakteristické složitější větové konstrukce, o nichž svědčí podřízené spojky, pro komentáře vedoucí k objektivnímu zlepšení prognózy.', 'bs': 'Preporuke se često procjenjuju za njihovu subjektivnu kvalitet, ali nekoliko istraživača studiralo je kvalitet komentara u smislu objektivnog korisnosti. Istražujemo procjenu kvalitete preporuke u odnosu na subjektivne (tj. ocjene korisnika) i objektivne (tj. da li je utjecala na to? da li je poboljšala odluke?) metrike u ogromnom sistemu geopolitičkog predviđanja na internetu, konačno uspoređujući lingvističke karakteristike svake kvalitetne metrike. Koristeći razne karakteristike, predviđamo sve vrste kvalitete sa boljom preciznošću nego jednostavnom, ali jakom početnom linijom dužine komentara. Gledajući najpredvidljiviji sadržaj ilustruje predrasude ratera; Na primjer, proglasnici su subjektivno predrasudeni u korist komentara koji spominju poslovne transakcije ili poslove, kao i materijalne stvari, iako takve komentare zaista ne dokazuju ništa korisnije objektivnije. Osim toga, kompleksnije konstrukcije rečenica, kao što je pokazalo podordenatnim kombinacijama, karakteristične su komentari koji vode do objektivnih poboljšanja predviđanja.', 'fi': 'Suositukset luokitellaan usein subjektiivisen laadun perusteella, mutta harvat tutkijat ovat tutkineet kommenttien laatua objektiivisen hyödyllisyyden näkökulmasta. Tutkimme suositusten laadunarviointia sekä subjektiivisen (eli käyttäjien luokituksen) että objektiivisen (eli vaikuttiko se? paransiko se päätöksiä?) mittakaavassa geopoliittisessa ennustejärjestelmässä vertaillaan lopulta kunkin laatumittarin kielellisiä ominaisuuksia. Erilaisten ominaisuuksien avulla ennustamme kaikentyyppisen laadun paremmin kuin yksinkertaisen mutta vahvan kommentin pituuden perusaikataulun. Ennustettavimman sisällön tarkastelu havainnollistaa arvioijien harhaluuloja. Esimerkiksi ennustajat ovat subjektiivisesti puolueellisia sellaisten kommenttien puolesta, joissa mainitaan liiketoimia tai liiketoimia sekä aineellisia asioita, vaikka tällaiset kommentit eivät todellakaan ole objektiivisesti hyödyllisempiä. Lisäksi monimutkaisemmat lauserakenteet, kuten alemmat sidekalvot osoittavat, ovat ominaisia kommenteille, jotka johtavat objektiivisiin parannuksiin ennusteessa.', 'et': 'Soovitusi hinnatakse sageli subjektiivse kvaliteedi järgi, kuid vähesed teadlased on uurinud kommentaaride kvaliteeti objektiivse kasulikkuse seisukohalt. Uurime soovituste kvaliteedi hindamist nii subjektiivse (st kasutajate hinnangu) kui objektiivse (st kas see mõjutas või parandas otsuseid?) mõõdikud massiivses geopoliitilises prognoosisüsteemis, võrreldes lõpuks iga kvaliteedimõõdiku keelelisi omadusi. Kasutades erinevaid funktsioone, prognoosime igat tüüpi kvaliteeti parema täpsusega kui lihtne, kuid tugev algjoon kommentaaride pikkus. Kõige prognoosivama sisu vaatamine illustreerib hindajate kallakusi; Näiteks prognoosijad on subjektiivselt erapooletud nii äritehinguid või tehinguid kui ka materiaalseid asju käsitlevate kommentaaride kasuks, kuigi sellised kommentaarid ei osutu objektiivselt enam kasulikuks. Lisaks on kommentaaridele iseloomulikud keerukamad lausekonstruktsioonid, mida tõendavad allkonjunktsioonid, mis viivad prognoosimise objektiivse paranemiseni.', 'he': 'המלצות לעתים קרובות מוערכות לאיכות הסוביקטיבית שלהן, אך מעט חוקרים למדו איכות תגובה במונחים של שימוש אובייקטיבי. אנו חוקרים את הערכת איכות המלצה בנוגע לשני הציונים הסביביקטיביים (כלומר הציונים של המשתמשים) ובאובייקטיביים (כלומר, האם זה השפיע? האם זה משפר את ההחלטות?) מטריקה במערכת חיזוי גאופוליטית מסיבית באינטרנט, שבסופו של דבר משווה את האופיינים הלשוניים של כל מטריקה איכותית. בשימוש במגוון של תכונות, אנו חושפים את כל סוגי איכות עם מדויקת טובה יותר מאשר רקע המרכזי הפשוט, אך חזק, של אורך ההערות. בהסתכל על התוכן הכי צפוי מציג חיזוקים של מערכת המחיר; לדוגמא, המצפים מועמדים באופן סוביקטיבי לטובת ההערות שמזכירות עסקים או עסקים כמו גם דברים חומרים, למרות שהערכות האלה לא מוכיחות שום דבר שימושי באופן אוביקטיבי יותר. חוץ מזה, בניית משפטים מורכבות יותר, כפי שהוכיחו על ידי תחבורות מתורבות, הם אופיינים של תגובות שמובילות לשיפורים אובייקטיביים בתחזויות.', 'jv': 'Mix Radio Awak dhéwé nglanggar tarjamahan kaliwat nggawe barang nggawe aturan sak sujih (i.e. tarjamahan pengguna) lan ngono nggawe aksi (i.e.wis, njuk metungi ? njaluke luwih apik dhéwé?) meter Ngawe ngubah akèh kaliwati yang sampeyan, kita tahirbah tanggal gawe kaliwati sing apik dhéwé, dadi sing apik dhéwé kuwat kesempatan tambah apik tambah apik dhéwé. Jejaring Ballot Mungkin ndi, nggunakake luwih-luwih akeh nggawe geraksi, dadi kaé mpungan kelas telu nggawe barang, dadi kaé karo pertualangan kanggo ngerasai supayano tarjamahan.', 'sk': 'Priporočila so pogosto ocenjena glede na subjektivno kakovost, vendar je malo raziskovalcev proučilo kakovost komentarjev z vidika objektivne uporabnosti. Preučujemo oceno kakovosti priporočil tako glede subjektivne (tj. ocene uporabnikov) kot objektivne (tj. ali je vplivala na odločitve?) v obsežnem spletnem geopolitičnem sistemu napovedovanja, ki na koncu primerja jezikovne značilnosti vsake meritve kakovosti. Z uporabo različnih funkcij napovedujemo vse vrste kakovosti z boljšo natančnostjo kot preprosta, a močna osnovna osnova dolžine komentarjev. Glede na najbolj napovedno vsebino ponazarja pristranskost ocenjevalcev; Napovedovalci so na primer subjektivno pristranski v korist komentarjev, ki omenjajo poslovne transakcije ali posle ter materialne stvari, čeprav se takšne komentarje objektivno ne izkažejo za nič bolj koristne. Poleg tega so kompleksnejše stavkovne konstrukcije, kot dokazujejo podrejene veznice, značilne za komentarje, ki vodijo do objektivnih izboljšav napovedovanja.', 'ha': "Ana ƙayyade masu shawara ko da yawa a kamata wa sifar masu bukãtarsa, kuma amma kaɗan na karatun ma'anar matsayi a cikin misalin abun bayani. Munã ɗau muhimmin ƙaddara masu nau'i da shawarar masu bukãta (misali, ma'anar masu amfani da amfani) da objective (ko kuma, ya gyara rabo?) mitrics in a massive system of geopolitical pre-warning, a ƙarshen su sami karatun linguistic na kowace metric. Yi amfani da wasu shiryoyi dabam-dabam, munã gabanin duk nau'i da tsari mafi alhẽri ko kuma mafi daidaita layin kalma mai ƙarfi. Aka dũbi zuwa mafi kyaun kayan da ake yi na fatawa, yana bayyana mafiya sauri; Misali, misali, misãlai, misãlai, za'a faɓa bayani ga mataimako da za'a ambaci sunãye masu shagala da fatauci da masu da matsayi, kuma kõ dã wannan mawaƙo ba ta gaskata wani abu na da amfani ba. Furan haka, tsarin kalma mai tsanani, kamar an gaskata shi da haɗuwa masu ƙarƙashinsu, sune ƙayyade masu ƙaranci da za'a gabatar da mazaɓa cikin gabanin.", 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། སྟོན་བཤད་ཚོར་རང་གི་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་ལ་རྐྱེན་ཐལ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་ཞིབ་པ་ཉུང་ཀྱིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་སྤྱོད་ཀ ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རིམ་པ་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལ་ཉེན་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚོགས་ཚད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། metrics in a massive online geopolitical forecasting system, ultimately comparing linguistic characteristics of each quality metric. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྟངས་འདྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་རྣམས་མེད་སྟབས་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་རེད། གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་མང་ཤོས་མི་ལྟ་བ་དེ་ལྟར་མཁན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་རིས་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། དཔེར་ན། རྩ་མེད་པ་ཚོ་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་མཆན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ཡོད། ད་དུང་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་མཐོང་བ་བཟོས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Never Abandon Minorities : Exhaustive Extraction of Bursty Phrases on Microblogs Using Set Cover Problem', 'ar': 'لا تتخلى أبدًا عن الأقليات: الاستخراج الشامل للعبارات المتقطعة في المدونات الصغيرة باستخدام مشكلة الغلاف', 'fr': "Ne jamais abandonner les minorités\xa0: Extraction exhaustive de phrases en rafale sur des microblogs à l'aide du problème de couverture fixe", 'pt': 'Nunca abandone as minorias: extração exaustiva de frases em rajadas em microblogs usando o problema da capa do conjunto', 'es': 'Nunca abandones a las minorías: Extracción exhaustiva de frases explosivas en microblogs usando el problema de la portada de set', 'ja': '決して少数派を捨てない：セットカバー問題を使用したマイクロブログ上の破裂的なフレーズの徹底的な抽出', 'zh': '永不舍少族裔:用封尽取微博上之爆裂短语', 'hi': 'अल्पसंख्यकों को कभी न छोड़ें: सेट कवर समस्या का उपयोग करके माइक्रोब्लॉग्स पर बर्स्टी वाक्यांशों का संपूर्ण निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Никогда не отказывайтесь от меньшинств: исчерпывающее извлечение всплесков фраз в микроблогах с использованием проблемы с набором обложек', 'ga': 'Ná Tréig Mionlaigh choíche: Baint Uileghabhálach Frásaí Bursty ar Mhicreabhloganna ag Úsáid Fhadhb Clúdaigh Socraithe', 'it': 'Non abbandonare mai le minoranze: estrazione estenuante di frasi bursty sui microblog utilizzando il problema della copertina set', 'kk': 'Кеңістіктерді ешқашан қалдырмасын: Майкроблогтардың аяқтау мәселесін қолдану', 'ka': 'არასდროს გადატოვება მინიორიტები: გამოიყენება მიკრობლოგების გამოყენება საკუთარი პრობლემა', 'lt': 'Niekada neatsisakyti mažumų: labai ištraukti prastos frazės mikrobloguose, naudojant nustatytą viršelio problemą', 'el': 'Ποτέ μην εγκαταλείπετε τις μειονότητες: εξαντλητική εξαγωγή των έντονων φράσεων σε μικροblogs χρησιμοποιώντας το πρόβλημα του σετ εξώφυλλου', 'hu': 'Soha ne hagyjuk el a kisebbségeket: A súlyos kifejezések kimerítő kivonása mikroblogokon a beállított borító probléma használatával', 'mt': 'Qatt ma Jibgħu Minoritajiet: Estrazzjoni Eżawriva ta’ Frażijiet Bursty fuq Mikroblogs bl-Użu ta’ Problema ta’ Kopertura Setta', 'ms': 'Jangan pernah Abandon Kekurangan: Ekstraksi Exhaustive of Bursty Phrases on Microblogs Using Set Cover Problem', 'no': 'Aldri forlatt minoriteter: Utpakk av avslutningsfraser på mikroblogar ved bruk av oppsett omslagsproblem', 'pl': 'Nigdy nie porzucaj mniejszości: wyczerpująca ekstrakcja burstych fraz na mikroblogach przy użyciu zestawu okładek', 'mk': 'Никогаш не се откажувајте од малцинствата: Изгубена екстракција на бурни фрази на микроблоговите користејќи проблем со поставувањето на покривка', 'ml': 'ചെറുതായ ചെറുപ്പക്കാരെ ഉപേക്ഷിക്കരുത്: മൈക്രോബ്ലോഗുകളില്\u200d ബുര്\u200dസ്റ്റി വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുക', 'sr': 'Nikad ne napuštaj manjine: Ekstrastivno izvlačenje rasporeda o mikroblogu korištenje problema sa pokrivanjem', 'mn': 'Хэдийгээр бага зэрэг үлдэхгүй: Микроблог дээр булчин хэлбэрүүдийг хадгалах хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглах', 'so': 'Ha ka tagin dadka tirada ah: Isticmaal Extraction of Bursty Phrases on microblogs using Set Cover Problems', 'ro': 'Niciodată nu abandonați minoritățile: Extragerea epuizantă a frazelor îngrozitoare pe microbloguri folosind problema acoperirii setului', 'ta': 'சிறியவற்றை விட்டுவிடவேண்டாம்: மைக்ரோப்போலாக்கள் மைக்ரோப்போக்களில் புரட்டி வாக்கியங்களை வெளியேற்றுதல் ப', 'ur': 'میکروبلوگ پر بورستی فریزوں کا اخراج کبھی نہ کرنا', 'si': 'කවදාවත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතාරින්නේ නැහැ: මයික්රොබ්ලෝග් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න', 'sv': 'Aldrig överge minoriteter: uttömmande extraktion av bursty fraser på mikrobloggar med hjälp av Set Cover Problem', 'uz': "Miniatyuranlarni hech qachon bekor qilmagan: Microblogs' dan foydalanish muvaffaqiyatlaridan foydalanish", 'vi': 'Không bao giờ bỏ phụ huynh: tháo ra vẻ ngoài các cụm từ Chôn trên Microblog Dùng tập ảnh nền tập tin ảnh', 'bg': 'Никога не изоставяйте малцинствата: изчерпателно извличане на изгорели фрази в микроблогове с помощта на проблема с капака на комплекта', 'nl': 'Nooit verlaten minderheden: uitputtende extractie van barsty zinnen op microblogs met behulp van set cover probleem', 'id': 'Jangan pernah Abandon Minorities: Ekstraksi Exhaustive of Bursty Phrases on Microblogs Using Set Cover Problem', 'de': 'Minderheiten niemals verlassen: Umfangreiche Extraktion von knackigen Phrasen auf Microblogs mit Set Cover Problem', 'da': 'Aldrig opgive mindretal: Udmattende udtrækning af bursty sætninger på mikroblogs ved hjælp af Set Cover Problem', 'hr': 'Nikad ne napuštaj manjine: Ekstrastivno izvlačenje rasporeda o mikroblogu koristeći problem sa pokrivanjem', 'ko': '소수 단체를 영원히 포기하지 마라: 집합 덮어쓰기 문제를 사용하여 마이크로 블로그에서 돌발 단어를 철저히 추출한다', 'fa': 'هرگز ذره\u200cای را رها نکنید: اخراج\u200cکننده\u200cای از جمله\u200cهای برستی در میکروبلاگ استفاده از مشکل تنظیم پوشش', 'tr': 'Küçükler taşlama: Mikrobloglarda garşy kesişmelerini açmak üçin janlaşdyr', 'sq': 'Kurrë mos heq dorë nga pakicat: nxjerrje ekstensive e frazave të shpërthyer në mikroblog duke përdorur problem të vendosur mbulesë', 'sw': 'Usiwaacha Minority: Kutokana na Tatizo la Kutengeneza Habari za Bursty kwenye Microblogs kwa Kutumia Makala ya Habari', 'am': 'Minorities: Exist Extraction of Bursty Phrases on Microblogs using Set Cover Problem', 'af': 'Nie verlaat Minoriteite: Uitvoer Uitvoer van Bursty Frase op Mikroblogs gebruik Stel Omslag Probleme', 'bs': 'Nikad ne napuštaj manjine: Ekstrastivna izvlačenja rasporeda o mikroblogu koristeći problem sa pokrivanjem', 'az': 'K칲칞칲kl칲kl톛ri 톛sla t톛rk etm톛: Miqrobloglarda S톛hv Problemini istifad톛 etm톛k 칲칞칲n S톛hv Problemini 쿮laq톛t Etm톛', 'hy': 'Միկրոբլոգերի վրա, օգտագործելով սահմանափակում խնդիր', 'bn': 'সংখ্যালঘুদের কখনোই উপেক্ষা করো না: মাইক্রোব্লগ ব্যবহার করে বার্স্টি ভাষণের বাইরে বের করে ফেলা হবে', 'ca': 'Mai deixar les minories: Extracció exhaustiva de frases de burst en microblogs utilitzant un problema de cobertura', 'cs': 'Nikdy neopustíte menšiny: vyčerpávající extrakce drsných frází na mikroblogech pomocí problému Set Cover', 'et': 'Mitte kunagi hüljata vähemusi: lõhkevate fraaside ammendav ekstraheerimine mikroblogides, kasutades komplekti kaane probleemi', 'fi': '횆l채 koskaan hylk채채 v채hemmist철j채: tyhjent채v채채 purkautumista mikroblogeissa k채ytt채m채ll채 Set Cover -ongelmaa', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Ngubah batir Minoriti: ex-persestive extract of Bursty', 'he': 'לעולם לא להיפטר מינוסים: מחלץ מיוחד של פרזים ברסים על מיקרובלוגים בשימוש בעיית כיסוי קבוע', 'sk': 'Nikoli ne opustite manjšin: izčrpno ekstrakcijo bursty fraz na mikroblogih z uporabo Set Cover problem', 'bo': 'ནམ་ཡང་ཆུང་ཆུང་ལ་བཞག་མི་ཐུབ། ཕྱིར'}
{'en': 'We propose a language-independent data-driven method to exhaustively extract bursty phrases of arbitrary forms (e.g., phrases other than simple noun phrases) from microblogs. The burst (i.e., the rapid increase of the occurrence) of a phrase causes the burst of overlapping N-grams including incomplete ones. In other words, bursty incomplete N-grams inevitably overlap bursty phrases. Thus, the proposed method performs the extraction of bursty phrases as the set cover problem in which all bursty N-grams are covered by a minimum set of bursty phrases. Experimental results using Japanese Twitter data showed that the proposed method outperformed word-based, noun phrase-based, and segmentation-based methods both in terms of accuracy and coverage.', 'ar': 'نقترح طريقة تعتمد على البيانات تعتمد على اللغة لاستخراج العبارات المتقطعة للأشكال التعسفية (على سبيل المثال ، عبارات غير عبارات الأسماء البسيطة) من المدونات الصغيرة. يتسبب الاندفاع (أي الزيادة السريعة في الحدوث) لعبارة ما في انفجار تداخل N-grams بما في ذلك الجرامات غير المكتملة. بعبارة أخرى ، إن جرامات النيتروجين غير المكتملة تتداخل حتمًا مع العبارات المتقطعة. وبالتالي ، فإن الطريقة المقترحة تؤدي استخراج العبارات المتقطعة كمشكلة غلاف المجموعة التي يتم فيها تغطية جميع N-grams المتقطعة بواسطة مجموعة دنيا من العبارات المتقطعة. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية باستخدام بيانات Twitter اليابانية أن الطريقة المقترحة تفوقت على الأساليب القائمة على الكلمات ، والقائمة على العبارة الاسمية ، والقائمة على التجزئة من حيث الدقة والتغطية.', 'pt': 'Propomos um método baseado em dados independente de linguagem para extrair exaustivamente frases em rajadas de formas arbitrárias (por exemplo, frases que não sejam frases nominais simples) de microblogs. A rajada (isto é, o rápido aumento da ocorrência) de uma frase causa a rajada de N-gramas sobrepostos, incluindo os incompletos. Em outras palavras, N-gramas incompletos em rajadas inevitavelmente se sobrepõem a frases em rajadas. Assim, o método proposto realiza a extração de frases em rajadas como o problema de cobertura de conjuntos em que todos os N-gramas em rajadas são cobertos por um conjunto mínimo de frases em rajadas. Resultados experimentais usando dados do Twitter japonês mostraram que o método proposto superou os métodos baseados em palavras, frases nominais e baseados em segmentação, tanto em termos de precisão quanto de cobertura.', 'es': 'Proponemos un método basado en datos independiente del idioma para extraer exhaustivamente frases explosivas de formas arbitrarias (por ejemplo, frases que no sean frases nominales simples) de microblogs. La ráfaga (es decir, el rápido aumento de la aparición) de una frase provoca la ráfaga de N-gramas superpuestos, incluidos los incompletos. En otras palabras, los N-gramas incompletos a ráfagas se superponen inevitablemente a frases explosivas Por lo tanto, el método propuesto realiza la extracción de frases con ráfagas como el problema de cobertura del conjunto en el que todos los N-gramas con ráfagas están cubiertos por un conjunto mínimo de frases con ráfagas. Los resultados experimentales con datos japoneses de Twitter mostraron que el método propuesto superó a los métodos basados en palabras, frases nominales y segmentaciones, tanto en términos de precisión como de cobertura.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une méthode basée sur les données indépendante de la langue pour extraire de manière exhaustive des phrases en rafale de formes arbitraires (par exemple, des phrases autres que de simples phrases nominales) à partir de microblogs. La rafale (c'est-à-dire l'augmentation rapide de l'occurrence) d'une phrase provoque l'éclatement de N-grammes qui se chevauchent, y compris ceux qui sont incomplets. En d'autres termes, les N-grammes incomplets en rafale chevauchent inévitablement des phrases en rafale. Ainsi, le procédé proposé exécute l'extraction de phrases en rafales en tant que problème de couverture d'ensemble dans lequel tous les N-grammes en rafales sont couverts par un ensemble minimum de phrases en rafales. Les résultats expérimentaux utilisant des données Twitter japonaises ont montré que la méthode proposée surpassait les méthodes basées sur les mots, les phrases nominales et les méthodes basées sur la segmentation, tant en termes de précision que de couverture.", 'ja': '私たちは、マイクロブログから任意の形式の破裂フレーズ（例えば、単純名詞フレーズ以外のフレーズ）を徹底的に抽出するための、言語に依存しないデータ駆動型の方法を提案します。フレーズのバースト（すなわち、発生の急速な増加）は、不完全なものを含む重複するＮグラムのバーストを引き起こす。言い換えれば、破裂不完全N - gramは必然的に破裂フレーズを重ね合わせる。したがって、提案された方法は、すべてのバーストＮグラムがバーストフレーズの最小セットによってカバーされるセットカバー問題としてバーストフレーズの抽出を実行する。日本語のTwitterデータを用いた実験結果では、提案された方法は、正確さとカバレッジの両方で、単語ベース、名詞フレーズベース、セグメンテーションベースの方法よりも優れていることが示されました。', 'hi': 'हम एक भाषा-स्वतंत्र डेटा-संचालित विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि मनमाने ढंग से रूपों (जैसे, सरल संज्ञा वाक्यांशों के अलावा अन्य वाक्यांशों) को माइक्रोब्लॉग्स से पूरी तरह से निकालने के लिए फटने वाले वाक्यांशों को निकाला जा सके। एक वाक्यांश का फटना (यानी, घटना की तेजी से वृद्धि) अपूर्ण लोगों सहित अतिव्यापी एन-ग्राम के फटने का कारण बनता है। दूसरे शब्दों में, bursty अधूरा एन-ग्राम अनिवार्य रूप से bursty वाक्यांशों ओवरलैप. इस प्रकार, प्रस्तावित विधि सेट कवर समस्या के रूप में फटने वाले वाक्यांशों के निष्कर्षण को निष्पादित करती है जिसमें सभी बर्स्टी एन-ग्राम बर्स्टी वाक्यांशों के न्यूनतम सेट द्वारा कवर किए जाते हैं। जापानी ट्विटर डेटा का उपयोग करने वाले प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चला है कि प्रस्तावित विधि ने सटीकता और कवरेज दोनों के संदर्भ में शब्द-आधारित, संज्ञा वाक्यांश-आधारित और विभाजन-आधारित विधियों को पछाड़ दिया।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем независимый от языка метод, основанный на данных, для исчерпывающего извлечения из микроблогов лопнувших фраз произвольных форм (например, фраз, отличных от простых именных фраз). Всплеск (т.е. быстрое увеличение встречаемости) фразы вызывает всплеск перекрывающихся N-грамм, включая неполные. Другими словами, лопнувшие неполные N-граммы неизбежно перекрывают лопнувшие фразы. Таким образом, предлагаемый метод выполняет извлечение лопнувших фраз в качестве задачи множественного покрытия, в которой все лопнувшие N-граммы охватываются минимальным набором лопнувших фраз. Экспериментальные результаты с использованием японских данных Twitter показали, что предлагаемый метод превосходит основанные на словах, существительных, фразах и сегментации методы как с точки зрения точности, так и охвата.', 'zh': '条上无关数术,微博中尽取任意短语(如简名词短语外短语)。 短语之发(,其疾也)重N-gram之发,不完之N-gram也。 换句话说,突发性不完者N-gram不免与突发短语重叠。 故其法以突发短语者为合覆,其N-gram皆小者短语覆。 用日语Twitter数之实验结果表明,准确性覆盖率优于单词,名词短语基于分割。', 'ga': 'Molaimid modh bunaithe ar shonraí teanga-neamhspleách chun frásaí pléasctha d’fhoirmeacha treallacha (m.sh. frásaí seachas frásaí ainmfhocail shimplí) a bhaint go cuimsitheach as micreabhlag. De bharr pléasctha (i.e., méadú gasta ar tharlú) frása is cúis le pléasctha N-ghram forluiteacha lena n-áirítear cinn neamhiomlán. I bhfocail eile, bíonn forluí dosheachanta ag N-gramanna bursty neamhiomlán frásaí bursty. Mar sin, is é an modh atá beartaithe feidhm as eastóscadh frásaí pléasctha mar fhadhb an chlúdaigh socraithe ina gcumhdaítear gach N-gram pléasctha le híosmhéid frásaí pléasctha. Léirigh torthaí turgnamhacha ag baint úsáide as sonraí Twitter na Seapáine go raibh an modh molta níos fearr ná modhanna focal-bhunaithe, frása-bhunaithe ainmfhocail, agus modhanna deighilte i dtéarmaí cruinnis agus clúdach.', 'it': "Proponiamo un metodo basato sui dati indipendente dal linguaggio per estrarre esaurientemente frasi bursty di forme arbitrarie (ad esempio frasi diverse da semplici frasi sostantive) da microblog. Lo scoppio (cioè, il rapido aumento dell'occorrenza) di una frase provoca lo scoppio di N-grammi sovrapposti compresi quelli incompleti. In altre parole, gli N-grammi incompleti bursty si sovrappongono inevitabilmente alle frasi bursty. Pertanto, il metodo proposto esegue l'estrazione di frasi bursty come il problema di copertura set in cui tutti i N-grammi bursty sono coperti da una serie minima di frasi bursty. I risultati sperimentali che utilizzano dati Twitter giapponesi hanno mostrato che il metodo proposto ha superato i metodi basati su parole, frasi sostantive e segmentazione sia in termini di accuratezza che copertura.", 'kk': 'Біз тілден тәуелсіз деректер әдісін микроблогтардан таңдау әдісін (мысалы, қарапайым мәліметтерден басқа мәліметтерді) таңдау үшін таңдаймыз. Бір сөздің жылдам көтерілуі (мысалы, N- граммалардың тез көтерілуі) бір нәрсені толық болмайды. Басқа сөздермен, N- граммалар толық емес бұрышты сөздердің үстінен айналдырылады. Сонымен, келтірілген әдіс сүйреу сөздерін түсіру мәселесі ретінде, барлық N- граммалардың сүйреу мәселесі шегіндіреді. Жапон Твиттер деректерін қолданатын эксперименталдық нәтижелері сөздерді негіздеген, атаулық сөздерді негіздеген, және сегментациялық негіздеген әдістер дұрыс және мәтіндік тәртібін көрсе', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια γλωσσική ανεξάρτητη μέθοδο βασισμένη στα δεδομένα για την εξαντλητική εξαγωγή έντονων φράσεων αυθαίρετης μορφής (π.χ., φράσεων εκτός από απλές ουσιαστικές φράσεις) από μικροblogs. Η έκρηξη (δηλαδή η ταχεία αύξηση της εμφάνισης) μιας φράσης προκαλεί την έκρηξη επικαλυπτόμενων Ν-γραμμάτων συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ελλιπών. Με άλλα λόγια, τα ακατάλληλα ελλιπή Ν-γραμμάρια αναπόφευκτα επικαλύπτουν τις ακατάλληλες φράσεις. Έτσι, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος εκτελεί την εξαγωγή των περιεκτικών φράσεων ως το πρόβλημα του συνόλου κάλυψης στο οποίο όλα τα περιεκτικά Ν-γραμμάρια καλύπτονται από ένα ελάχιστο σύνολο περιεκτικών φράσεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα με χρήση ιαπωνικών δεδομένων έδειξαν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνούσε τις μεθόδους που βασίζονται στις λέξεις, τις ουσιαστικές φράσεις και τις μεθόδους τμηματοποίησης τόσο όσον αφορά την ακρίβεια όσο και την κάλυψη.', 'hu': 'Egy nyelvfüggetlen adatközpontú módszert javasolunk, amely kimerítően kivonja önkényes formákból (pl. egyszerű főnévkifejezésektől eltérő kifejezéseket) a mikroblogokból. Egy kifejezés kitörése (azaz az előfordulás gyors növekedése) az átfedő N-gramm kitörését okozza, beleértve a hiányos N-grammokat is. Más szóval, a robbanós, nem teljes N-gramm elkerülhetetlenül átfedi a robbanós kifejezéseket. Így a javasolt módszer végzi a repesztő kifejezések kivonását, mint a készletborító probléma, amelyben minden repesztő N-grammot minimális repesztő kifejezések fednek le. A japán Twitter adatokat használó kísérleti eredmények azt mutatták, hogy a javasolt módszer a pontosság és a lefedettség tekintetében egyaránt felülmúlta a szó-, főnévkifejezés- és szegmentációs módszereket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მუშაობით ენის განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების მეტი, რომელიც მიკიბლოგებიდან გამოყენება არბრიტური ფორმების გამოყენება (მაგალითად, სხვა ფრაზები განსაზღვრებული სიტყვებით). ფრაზის ბრძნობა (მაგალითად, ბრძნობითი წარმოდგენების) წარმოდგენა N-გრამის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენა. სხვა სიტყვებით, N-გრამები უკეთესი შემდეგ გადაწყვეტის ტრაზები. ამიტომ, პროგრამის გამოყენებული პროგრამის გამოყენება ბურსტის ფრაზების გამოყენება, როგორც განსაზღვრებული ბურსტის პრობლემა, რომელიც ყველა N- გრამის გამოყენება მინიმულ ბურ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი, რომელიც ჯაპონეთის Twitter მონაცემებით გამოყენებული მონაცემები გამოიყენება, რომ მონაცემები სიტყვებით, სიტყვებით დაბათებული, და სექმენტიური', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan kaedah data-dipandu secara bebas bahasa untuk mengekstrak secara mengesankan frasa-frasa terbongkar bentuk arbitrari (cth., frasa-frasa selain frasa nama sederhana) dari mikroblog. The burst (i.e., the rapid increase of the occurrence) of a phrase causes the burst of overlapping N-grams including incomplete ones.  Dengan kata lain, pukulan N-gram tidak lengkap tidak dapat ditutup frasa pukulan. Oleh itu, kaedah yang diusulkan melaksanakan ekstraksi frasa pecah sebagai masalah penyamaran set di mana semua N-gram pecah ditutup oleh set minimum frasa pecah. Hasil percubaan menggunakan data Twitter Jepun menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan melampaui kaedah berdasarkan perkataan, berdasarkan frasa nama, dan kaedah berdasarkan segmentasi kedua-dua dalam terma akurat dan penyamaran.', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме метод кој е независен од јазикот за податоци за исцрпувачки да се извлечат расипани фрази на арбитрални форми (на пример, фрази други од едноставните фрази со името) од микроблоговите. Разнесувањето (т.е. брзото зголемување на појавата) на фразата предизвикува експлозија на преплавувачки N-грами, вклучувајќи и некомплетни. Со други зборови, нецелосни N-грами неизбежно се преплавуваат преплавувачки фрази. Затоа, предложениот метод го изведува извлекувањето на фразите кои се разнесуваат како проблем со копчето во кој сите разнесени N-грами се покриени со минимален сет разнесени фрази. Експерименталните резултати со користење на јапонските податоци на Твитер покажаа дека предложениот метод ги надмина методите базирани на зборови, базирани на фрази со името и сегментација, како во поглед на прецизноста и покривањето.', 'ml': 'മൈക്രോബ്ലോഗില്\u200d നിന്നും സാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ-സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ ഡേറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതി ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ പൊട്ടി (അതായത്, സംഭവിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വേഗത്തില്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്) പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമില്ലാത്ത ഒന്നുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത മറ്റൊരു വാക്കുകളില്\u200d, ബ്രെസ്റ്റി എന്\u200d ഗ്രാമില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മൂല്യമാക്കുക. അതുകൊണ്ട്, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d ബ്രെസ്റ്റി വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d എല്ലാ ബ ജപ്പാനീസ് ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ, വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu metodu bbażat fuq id-dejta indipendenti mil-lingwa biex jiġu estratti b’mod e żawrjenti frażijiet imċajpra ta’ forom arbitrarji (pereżempju frażijiet g ħajr frażijiet sempliċi b’isem) mill-mikroblogs. It-tifqigħa (jiġifieri ż-żieda mgħa ġġla tal-okkorrenza) ta’ frażi tikkawża t-tifqigħa ta’ N-grammi li jikkoinċidu inklużi dawk mhux kompluti. Fi kliem ieħor, frażijiet bursty N-grammi mhux kompluti inevitabbilment jikkoinċidu. Għalhekk, il-metodu propost iwettaq l-estrazzjoni ta’ frażijiet imfarrka peress li s-sett ikopri l-problem a li fiha l-N-grammi kollha mfarrka huma koperti minn sett minimu ta’ frażijiet imfarrka. Riżultati esperimentali bl-użu tad-dejta Ġappuniża fuq Twitter urew li l-metodu propost wettaq metodi bbażati fuq il-kliem, ibbażati fuq in-nomi, u bbażati fuq is-segmentazzjoni kemm f’termini ta’ preċiżjoni kif ukoll kopertura.', 'mn': 'Бид микроблогоос өөр хэл дээр хамааралтай өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөнтэй аргыг микроблогоос бүрэн сүйрсэн хэлбэрүүдийг (жишээлбэл, энгийн нэр хэлбэрээс өөр хэлбэрүүдийг) татах гэсэн санал өгдөг. Үүний хурдан нэмэгдэх (т.е. тохиолдол) нь Н-граммыг дутагдаж, бүтэлгүйтгэлийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Өөрөөр хэлбэл, Н-граммын төгсгөлгүй хэлбэрүүдийг эзэмшигтэй үгүйсгэдэг. Тиймээс, санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь бүх N-граммыг хамгийн бага булчин хэлбэрээр дамжуулан булчин хэлбэрүүдийг авах бодлого болно. Япон Твиттерийн мэдээллийг ашиглаж байгаа туршилтын үр дүнг нь хэлний үндсэн, нэр хэлний үндсэн, хэлбэрийн үндсэн аргыг зөв байдал, хэлбэрийн үндсэн аргыг харуулсан.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein språk-uavhengig data-driving metode for å ekstrahera utbreidde frasar av tilfeldige formar (f.eks. frasar andre enn enkle namn-frasar) frå mikroblogar. Brytinga (t.d. rask økning av skjeddinga) av ein frase fører til å fjerna overlapping av N-gramar, inkludert ufullstene. Etter andre ord, brenner ikkje fullstendige N-gramer uavhengig over brennefrasar. Dette første metoden utfører utpakkinga av brytingsfraser som det sette omslagsproblemet der alle N-gramar som blir dekka av ein minimal sett brytingsfraser. Eksperimentale resultat ved bruk av japanske Twitter-data viste at den foreslåde metoden utførte ordbasert, namnbasert, og segmenteringsbaserte metodar både med nøyaktighet og dekking.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy niezależną od języka metodę opartą na danych umożliwiającą wyczerpującą ekstrakcję zwrotów o dowolnych formach (np. zwrotów innych niż zwroty rzeczownika) z mikroblogów. Burst (czyli szybki wzrost występowania) frazy powoduje wybuch nakładających się na siebie N-gramów, w tym niepełnych. Innymi słowy, bursty niekompletne N-gramy nieuchronnie nakładają bursty frazy. Zatem proponowana metoda wykonuje ekstrakcję fraz bursty jako problem okładki zbioru, w którym wszystkie bursty N-gramy są objęte minimalnym zbiorem fraz bursty. Wyniki eksperymentalne z wykorzystaniem japońskich danych Twittera pokazały, że proponowana metoda przewyższała metody oparte na słowach, rzeczownikach i segmentacji zarówno pod względem dokładności, jak i zasięgu.', 'lt': 'We propose a language-independent data-driven method to exhaustively extract bursty phrases of arbitrary forms (e.g., phrases other than simple noun phrases) from microblogs.  Dėl frazės sprogimo (t. y. greito pasikartojimo padidėjimo) atsiranda dubliuojanči ų N-gramų, įskaitant neišsamius, sprogimas. In other words, bursty incomplete N-grams inevitably overlap bursty phrases.  Taigi pasiūlytas metodas atlieka išspaustų frazių ekstrahavimą, nes rinkinys apima problem ą, kai visiems išspaustų N-gramų atveju taikomas mažiausias išspaustų frazių rinkinys. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai naudojant Japonijos Twitter duomenis parodė, kad siūlomas metodas viršijo žodžiu grindžiamus, pavadinimu grindžiamus ir segmentacija grindžiamus metodus tiek tikslumo, tiek aprėpties požiūriu.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab aan luqada u xoreen oo lagu wado si aad looga baahdo hadalka burburka (tusaale ahaan hadallada kale oo aan sahlan hadalka microblogyada). Isburka (tusaale ahaan korodka degdegta ah) ayaa sabab ka dhiga burburka qoraalka N-grams, kuwaas oo ka mid ah kuwa aan dhamayn. Hadalka kale oo aan dhamaan N-gram-ka soo jaban ayaa si fudud ugu qoran hadalka burburka ah. Sidaa darteed qaabka la soo jeeday ayaa soo saara hadalka burburka ah sida dhibaatada daboolka ah oo ay ku daboolaan dhammaan N-gram oo ay ku qoran yihiin hadal burbur ah oo ugu yaraan. Imtixaanka lagu isticmaalay macluumaadka Twitterka Japanese waxay muuqatay in qaabkii la soo jeeday ay ay ka soo bandhigtay hadal ku saleysan, oo aan ku qornayn hadal, iyo hababka ku saabsan qeybta iyo saxda iyo qarsoodiga.', 'si': 'අපි භාෂාව-ස්වයංගත දත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා මයික්රොබ්ලෝග් වලින් බුර්ස්ටි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා. ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වේගයෙන් වැඩ කරන්න (ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වේගයෙන් වැඩ කරන්න) N-ග්\u200dරාම්ස් වලින් අනිපූර්ණ වලින් වැඩ අනිත් වචනයෙන්, N-ග්\u200dරාම්ස් නිර්භාවිත වාර්තාවක් විනාශ කරනවා. ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වගේම සැකසුම් කවපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේම, සියලුම N-ග්\u200dරාම්  ජාපාන් ට්විටර් දත්ත භාවිතා විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විදිහට පත්ත', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en språkoberoende datadriven metod för att uttömmande extrahera bursty fraser av godtyckliga former (t.ex. fraser andra än enkla substantivfraser) från mikrobloggar. Sprusten (dvs den snabba ökningen av förekomsten) av en fras orsakar utbrottet av överlappande N-gram inklusive ofullständiga. Med andra ord, bursty ofullständig N-gram oundvikligen överlappar bursty fraser. Således utför den föreslagna metoden extraktion av bursty fraser som uppsättningen täckproblem där alla bursty N-gram täcks av en minsta uppsättning bursty fraser. Experimentella resultat med japanska Twitter-data visade att den föreslagna metoden överträffade ordbaserade, substantivfrasbaserade och segmenteringsbaserade metoder både när det gäller noggrannhet och täckning.', 'ta': 'நாம் மைக்ரோப்லோக்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்ற வார்த்தைகளை வெளியேற்ற முறையில் மொழி சுதந்த தரவு இயக்கிய முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். வாக்கியத்தின் வெடிப்பு (அதாவது, வேகமான அதிகரிப்பு) முழுமையான ஒன்றுகளையும் சேர்க்கும் N- grams உடைய வெடிப்பை காரணமாக்குகிறது. வேறு வார்த்தைகளில், பிரிஸ்டி முழுமையான N- கிராம் அதனால், முந்தைய முறைமை சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் ஜப்பானிய தொடர் தரவை பயன்படுத்தி தெரிவித்தது சரிபார்வையும் மற்றும் கவனத்தையும் கொண்டு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட சொல்லை அட', 'ro': 'Propunem o metodă bazată pe date independentă pe limbă pentru extragerea exhaustivă a frazelor dure de forme arbitrare (de exemplu, fraze altele decât frazele simple de substantiv) din microbloguri. Izbucnirea (adică creșterea rapidă a apariției) unei fraze provoacă izbucnirea de N-grame suprapuse, inclusiv cele incomplete. Cu alte cuvinte, N-grame incomplete bursty suprapun inevitabil fraze bursty. Astfel, metoda propusă efectuează extragerea frazelor bursty ca problemă de acoperire a setului în care toate N-gramele bursty sunt acoperite de un set minim de fraze bursty. Rezultatele experimentale folosind datele Twitter japoneze au arătat că metoda propusă a depășit metodele bazate pe cuvinte, pe expresii substantive și pe segmentare atât în ceea ce privește acuratețea, cât și acoperirea.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک زبان-مستقبل ڈیٹا چلنے والی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ میکروبلوگ سے بغیر سادہ نوم فریزوں کے بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر بغیر ب ایک فرض کی جلدی اضافہ کی وجہ سے N-گرم کی دھوپ کی وجہ سے غلط باتیں شامل ہوتی ہیں۔ اور دوسری باتوں سے، ناکامل N-گرم پھوٹ گئے ہیں جو بغیر ضروری سے پھوٹ پھوٹ دیے جاتے ہیں. اسی طرح، پیشنهاد کی طریقہ بورستی فوریز کے اٹھانے کو سٹی کاور مسئلہ کے طور پر عمل کرتا ہے جس میں تمام بورستی N-گرم کے ذریعہ کم بورستی فوریز کے لپٹے ہیں. جپانین ٹویٹر ڈیٹا کے مطابق تجربے کا نتیجہ دکھایا گیا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کلمات پر بنیاد ہے، نون فریز پر بنیاد ہے، اور سقمیٹ پر بنیاد ہوئی طریقے دونوں دقیق اور پورٹ کے مطابق.', 'sr': 'Предлагамо метод независимог језика, који се води податки, да искључи избушљени фрази произволних форма (например, фразе, исключени од простих именних фраза) из микроблога. Razbijanje (tj. brzo povećanje pojave) fraze uzrokuje razbijanje preklapanja N-grama uključujući nepotpune. Drugim rečima, nepotpuni N-grami neizbežno preklapaju razbijene rečenice. Zato je predložena metoda izvlačila izvlačenje slomljenih fraza kao problem sa pokrivanjem u kojem su svi N-grami pokriveni minimalnim setom slomljenih fraza. Eksperimentalni rezultati korištenja japanskih podataka o Twitter pokazali su da je predložena metoda iznenađena na reèima, na reèima bazirana na reèima, i na segmentaciji bazirane metode kako u smislu taènosti i pokrivanja.', 'uz': "Biz mikrobloglardan foydalanuvchi rasmlarni (m.eks. oddiy soʻzlardan boshqa oddiy nuqta so'zlar emas) bilan bir tilni boshqaruvchi maʼlumot metodini chiqarishni talab qilamiz. Name Boshqa so'zlar bilan bir narsa notoʻgʻri N-gram so'zlarni koʻchirish mumkin. Shunday qilib, talab qilingan usul bir qatlam soʻzlarni ajratish muvaffaqiyatini bajaradi. Bu yerda hamma qanchalik N-gram bir kichik bir soʻzlarni qo'yish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp dựa trên dữ liệu độc lập ngôn ngữ để trích các cụm từ bùng nổ của các dạng ngẫu nhiên (ví dụ, các cụm từ khác những từ đơn giản) từ microblogs. Sự bùng nổ (tức là sự gia tăng nhanh của sự phát) của một cụm từ gây ra sự bùng nổ chồng chéo nhau của N-grams, gồm cả những đoạn chưa hoàn thiện. N ói cách khác, N-grams không ngừng bùng nổ nên không thể trộn lẫn. Do đó, phương pháp được đề nghị thực hiện việc trích các cụm từ nóng như là vấn đề vỏ đã đặt trong đó tất cả các biểu N bùng nổ được phủ đầy bởi một số cụm từ tào lao tối thiểu. Kết quả thử nghiệm nhờ dữ liệu trên Twitter của Nhật cho thấy phương pháp được áp dụng bằng từ, từ ngữ, từ ngữ, và cách phân chia các phương pháp có cả về độ chính xác và bao quát.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме независим от езика метод за изчерпателно извличане на изрази от произволни форми (например фрази, различни от прости съществителни фрази) от микроблоговете. Поривът (т.е. бързото увеличаване на появата) на фраза причинява избухване на припокриващи се Н-грамове, включително непълни. С други думи, пълни непълни Н-грамове неизбежно се припокриват пълни фрази. По този начин, предложеният метод извършва извличането на фрази за набиране като задача за покриване на комплекта, при която всички N-грамове са покрити с минимален набор от фрази за набиране. Експерименталните резултати, използващи японски данни от Туитър, показват, че предложеният метод превъзхожда методите, базирани на думи, съществителни фрази и сегментация, както по отношение на точността, така и по отношение на обхвата.', 'nl': 'We stellen een taalonafhankelijke datagestuurde methode voor om uitputtend bursty zinnen van willekeurige vormen (bijvoorbeeld andere zinnen dan eenvoudige zelfstandige zinnen) uit microblogs te extraheren. De burst (d.w.z. de snelle toename van het voorkomen) van een frase veroorzaakt de burst van overlappende N-grammen inclusief onvolledige. Met andere woorden, bursty incomplete N-grammen overlappen onvermijdelijk bursty zinnen. Zo voert de voorgestelde methode de extractie van bursty zinnen uit als het verzamelomslagprobleem waarbij alle bursty N-grammen worden gedekt door een minimum set bursty zinnen. Experimentele resultaten met behulp van Japanse Twitter-gegevens toonden aan dat de voorgestelde methode beter presteerde dan op woord gebaseerde, op zelfstandig naamwoord gebaseerde en op segmentatie gebaseerde methoden, zowel qua nauwkeurigheid als dekking.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en sproguafhængig datadrevet metode til at udtømmende udtrække bursty sætninger af vilkårlige former (f.eks. sætninger ud over simple substantivsætninger) fra mikroblogs. Udbruddet (dvs. den hurtige stigning i forekomsten) af en sætning forårsager udbrud af overlappende N-gram, herunder ufuldstændige. Med andre ord overlapper bursty ufuldstændig N-gram uundgåeligt bursty sætninger. Således udfører den foreslåede metode ekstraktion af bursty sætninger som det sæt cover problem, hvor alle bursty N-gram er dækket af et minimum sæt bursty sætninger. Eksperimentelle resultater ved hjælp af japanske Twitter-data viste, at den foreslåede metode var bedre end ordbaserede, substantivbaserede og segmenterede metoder både med hensyn til nøjagtighed og dækning.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo metodu podataka koji vodi jezik nezavisne podatke kako bi isključivo izvukao fraze proizvoljnih oblika (npr. fraze osim jednostavnih imenskih fraza) iz mikrobloga. Razbijanje (tj. brzo povećanje pojave) fraze uzrokuje razbijanje preklapanja N-grama uključujući nepotpune. Drugim riječima, nepotpuni N-grami neizbježno preklapaju razbijene fraze. Stoga je predložena metoda izvlačila izvlačenje slomljenih fraza kao problem sa pokrivanjem u kojem su svi N-grami pokriveni minimalnim setom slomljenih fraza. Eksperimentalni rezultati koristeći japanske podatke o Twitter pokazali su da je predložena metoda nadmažena na riječima, na temelju imenskih fraza i na temelju segmentacije metode kako u smislu preciznosti i pokrivanja.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan metode data-driven independen bahasa untuk mengekstrak secara kelelahan frasa-frasa terbongkar bentuk arbitrar (contohnya frasa-frasa selain frasa nama sederhana) dari mikroblog. Ledakan (i.e., meningkat cepat kejadian) frasa menyebabkan letupan N-gram yang meliputi termasuk yang belum lengkap. Dengan kata lain, pukulan N-gram tidak lengkap tidak dapat menghindari salib pukulan frasa. Thus, the proposed method performs the extraction of bursty phrases as the set cover problem in which all bursty N-grams are covered by a minimum set of bursty phrases.  Hasil eksperimental menggunakan data Twitter Jepang menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan melampaui batas kata, batas frasa nama, dan metode berbasis segmentasi baik dalam terma akurasi maupun penyamaran.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش با داده\u200cهای مستقل به زبان برای اخراج کردن کلمه\u200cها از فرم\u200cهای تصادفی (مثال جمله\u200cهای غیر از جمله\u200cهای اسم ساده) از میکروبلاگ\u200cها. فشار (یعنی افزایش سریع اتفاق افتاد) یک جمله باعث می\u200cشود که فشار غیر پایان\u200cگرم\u200cهای N را از جمله\u200cی غیرپایان می\u200cکند. به عبارت دیگر، نقطه\u200cهای غیر کامل ناکام به طور غیرقابل تغییر داده می\u200cشود. بنابراین، این روش پیشنهاد برای اخراج از جمله\u200cهای شکسته به عنوان مشکل پوشش مجموعه\u200cای انجام می\u200cدهد که همه\u200cی N-گرم\u200cهای شکسته\u200cشده\u200cاند با یک مجموعهٔ مجموعه\u200cی جمله\u200cهای شکسته\u200cای پوشش می\u200cشوند. نتایج تجربی با استفاده از داده های توئیتر ژاپن نشان داده است که روش پیشنهاد بر اساس کلمه، عبارت اسم و روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cی جدایی هر چند به عنوان دقیق و پوشش پایه\u200cای انجام شده است.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine sprachunabhängige datengetriebene Methode vor, um bursty Phrasen beliebiger Formen (z.B. andere Phrasen als einfache Substantivphrasen) vollständig aus Mikroblogs zu extrahieren. Der Burst (d.h. die schnelle Zunahme des Auftretens) einer Phrase verursacht den Burst von überlappenden N-Gramm einschließlich unvollständiger. Mit anderen Worten, bursty unvollständige N-Gramm überlappen unvermeidlich bursty Phrasen. Daher führt die vorgeschlagene Methode die Extraktion von Bursty Phrasen als das Set Cover Problem durch, bei dem alle Bursty N-Gramm von einem Minimum Satz Bursty Phrasen abgedeckt sind. Experimentelle Ergebnisse mit japanischen Twitter-Daten zeigten, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode wortbasierte, substantive phrase-basierte und segmentierungsbasierte Methoden sowohl in Bezug auf Genauigkeit als auch Abdeckung übertraf.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mbinu huru ya data inayoendeshwa kwa lugha kuondoa maneno yaliyotokana na kiholela (kwa mfano, maneno mengine mengine yasiyo rahisi) kutoka kwenye microblogo. Mlipuko (yaani, kuongezeka kwa haraka la msemo) unasababisha kupasuka kwa vifaa vya juu pamoja na zile zisizo kamili. Kwa maneno mengine, matumizi yasiyo na matumizi ya N-gram hayana uwezekano wa kuvuka. Kwa hiyo, mbinu zilizopendekezwa inafanya utekelezaji wa maneno ya mlipuko kama tatizo la habari ambalo vipande vyote vidogo vinavyofungwa na maneno ya chini ya utoaji. Matokeo ya majaribio kwa kutumia taarifa za Twita za Japani yalionyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zilifanya maneno yenye msingi wa maneno, yenye msingi wa maneno, na mbinu za kujitenga zote kwa usahihi na taarifa za habari.', 'ko': '우리는 언어에 독립된 데이터 구동 방법을 제시하여 웨이보에서 임의의 형식의 돌발적인 단어(예를 들어 간단한 명사 단어를 제외한 단어)를 철저히 추출했다.짧은 말의 갑작스런 출현(즉 출현 횟수의 급속한 증가)은 중첩된 N-칸의 갑작스러운 출현을 초래할 수 있으며, 불완전한 N-칸을 포함한다.다시 말하면 돌발적인 불완전한 N-gram은 돌발적인 단어와 겹칠 수밖에 없다.따라서 이 방법은 돌발성 단어의 추출을 집합 덮어쓰기 문제로 실행하는데 그 중에서 모든 돌발성 N-gram은 가장 작은 돌발성 단어로 덮어씌운다.일본 트위터 데이터를 이용한 실험 결과 이 방법은 정확성과 범위에서 단어 기반, 명사 기반, 단락 기반의 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë të pavarur nga gjuha të të dhënave për të nxjerrë në mënyrë të tërheqëse frazat e shpërthyer të formulave arbitrare (për shembull, frazat e tjera përveç frazave të thjeshta me emra) nga mikroblogët. Shpërthimi (pra, rritja e shpejtë e ndodhjes) e një fraze shkakton shpërthimin e N-grameve të mbishtypura duke përfshirë ato jo të plota. Me fjalë të tjera, të shpërthejnë N-gram të pakompletuar, pa u shmangur të kapërcejnë fraza të shpërthejshme. Thus, the proposed method performs the extraction of bursty phrases as the set cover problem in which all bursty N-grams are covered by a minimum set of bursty phrases.  Rezultatet eksperimentale duke përdorur të dhënat japoneze të Twitter treguan se metoda e propozuar kaloi metodat bazuar në fjalë, bazuar në fraza me emra dhe bazuar në segmentim si në lidhje me saktësinë dhe mbulimin.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ነፃ የዳታ-ነፃ ሥርዓት ከሚክሮቦቦሎጂዎች የተለየ የአርባሪካዊ ፎርማቶች (ምሳሌ ቀላል አንዳች ቃላት በቀር አንዳች ቃላት) ለመውጣት እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የንግግር ቁጥር (ምናልባት ፈጥኖ እጥፍ እጥፍ) በሌላ ንግግር፣ የ-ግራም ብሬት ፍላጻ የማይፈጸም የብሬት ንግግር ስለዚህም በተገኘው ሥርዓት የብሬት ጽሑፎችን ለመውጣት የደረጃ መክፈቻ ነው፡፡ የጃፓን ትዊተር ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የተፈተና ውጤቶች፣ የቃላት መሠረት፣ የቋንቋ መሠረት እና የግንኙነት ሥርዓት እና የቁጥጥር ክፍል በማድረግ እንደተፈጸመ ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Mikroblogdan daşary çykarmak üçin dili boýunça hasaplanýan bir yöntemi maslahat berýäris. Senediň tiz üsümi (yani, geleniniň çalt üsümi) nö-gramleriň üstünde incompler bilen üsümi getirýär. Başga sözleriň soňra, ymykly N-gramleriň ýanyň sözlerini daňlap bilmez. Şol sebäpli, teklip eden täze sanlaryň çykyş meselesi bolup geçirilýär. Bu ähli iň goýup geçen N-gramlaryň iň az sany syýahat sanlarynyň içine çykylýar. Ýapon Twitter maglumatyny ullanýan örän netijeler ýagdaýynyň teklip eden yöntemiň sözlerine daýan, substilä daýan we segmentasyýa daýan yöntemlerine degişli ýagdaýyny görkezilýär.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք լեզվից անկախ տվյալների վրա հիմնված մեթոդ, որպեսզի միկրոբլոգերից ամբողջովին դուրս բերենք կամավոր ձևերի (օրինակ, այլ արտահայտություններ, բացի պարզ անվանումների արտահայտություններից): Ֆրանսի պայթյունը (այսինքն, արագ աճը) պատճառ է հանդիսանում N-գրամամների, ներառյալ անկատարյալ, պայթյունը: Այլ կերպ ասած, փչացված անկատարյալ N-գրամը անխուսափելիորեն կապում է փչացված արտահայտություններ: Այսպիսով, առաջարկված մեթոդը կատարում է պայթյուն ունեցող արտահայտությունների վերացումը, որպես համակարգչային ծածկումների խնդիր, որտեղ բոլոր պայթյուն ունեցող N-գրամերը ծածկում են պայթյուն ունեցող արտահայտությունների միմինիմաստային համակարգով: Փորձարկման արդյունքները, որոնք օգտագործում են ճապոնական Թվիթերի տվյալները, ցույց տվեցին, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը գերազանցել է բառերի հիմնված, անվանումների հիմնված և սեգրեմացիայի հիմնված մեթոդները ճշգրտության և ծածկության առումով', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি ভাষার স্বাধীন তথ্য-চালানো পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে সাধারণ মাইক্রোব্লগগুলো থেকে ব্রাস্টি ব্রাস্টি শব্দগুলো বের করে আনতে পারে (যে একটি বাক্যের দ্রুত বৃদ্ধি হচ্ছে বিস্ফোরণ, যার মধ্যে অসম্পূর্ণ ব্যাপার ছিল N-গ্রামের বিস্ফোরণ। অন্যান্য কথায়, ব্রাস্টি অসম্পূর্ণ N-গ্রাম ব্রেস্টি ব্রেস্টি বাক্যের কথা অতিরিক্ত করা যায়। তাই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ব্রেস্টি ব্রেস্টি বাক্যের বের করার ব্যাক্তিগুলোকে সেট কাভারের সমস্যা হিসেবে প্রকাশ করে, যেখানে সব ব্রেস্ জাপানি টুইটারের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি শব্দ ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক, কোন বাক্য ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক এবং যৌন', 'bs': 'Predlažemo metodu podataka koji vodi jezik nezavisne podatke kako bi isključivo izvukli razbijene fraze arbitrarnih oblika (npr. fraze osim jednostavnih imenskih fraza) iz mikrobloga. Rasprskanje (tj. brzo povećanje pojave) fraze uzrokuje rasprskanje preklapanja N-grama uključujući nepotpune. Drugim riječima, razbijanje nepotpunih N-grama neizbježno preklapanje razbijenih fraza. Stoga, predložena metoda izvlači izvlačenje slomljenih fraza kao problem sa pokrivanjem u kojem su svi N-grami pokriveni minimalnim setom slomljenih fraza. Eksperimentalni rezultati koristeći japanske podatke o Twitter pokazali su da je predložena metoda iznenađena na riječima, na temelju imenskih fraza i na temelju segmentacije metode kako u smislu tačnosti i pokrivanja.', 'ca': "Proposem un mètode basat en dades independents del llenguatge per extreure exhaustivament frases de formes arbitràries (per exemple frases que no són noms simples) dels microblogs. The burst (i.e., the rapid increase of the occurrence) of a phrase causes the burst of overlapping N-grams including incomplete ones.  En altres paraules, els N-grams incomplets s'escampan inevitablement de frases escampades. Thus, the proposed method performs the extraction of bursty phrases as the set cover problem in which all bursty N-grams are covered by a minimum set of bursty phrases.  Els resultats experimentals que utilitzaven les dades japoneses de Twitter mostraven que el mètode proposat superava els mètodes basats en paraules, en frases en noms i en segmentació tant en termes de precisió com cobertura.", 'et': 'Pakume välja keelesõltumatu andmepõhise meetodi, et ammendavalt ekstraheerida meelevaldsete fraaside (nt fraasid, mis ei ole lihtsad substantiivfraasid) mikroblogidest. Fraasi purunemine (st esinemissageduse kiire suurenemine) põhjustab kattuvate N-grammide purunemist, sealhulgas mittetäielike. Teisisõnu kattuvad purskavad mittetäielikud N-grammid paratamatult purskavad fraasid. Seega teostab kavandatud meetod bursty fraaside ekstraheerimist komplekti katteprobleemina, kus kõik bursty N-grammid on kaetud minimaalse bursty fraaside komplektiga. Jaapani Twitteri andmeid kasutavad eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitasid, et kavandatud meetod oli täpsuse ja katvuse poolest parem kui sõnapõhised, nimisõnafraasipõhised ja segmenteerimispõhised meetodid.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n taal-onafhanklike data-gedrywe metode om uitgebrek frase van willekeurige vorms (bv. frase ander as eenvoudige noufrase) uit mikroblogs uit te trek. Die verskrikking (i.e. die vinnige verhoog van die voorkoms) van 'n frase veroorsaak die verskrikking van oorvloediging n-gramme insluitend onvollede een. In ander woorde, onvolledige N-grame het onbepaalde oorvloedig verbrande frase. Daarom, die voorgestelde metode uitvoer die uitvoering van verbrande frase as die stel omslag probleem waarin alle verbrande N-gramme bedek word deur 'n minimale stel verbrande frase. Eksperimentale resultate gebruik Japaanse Twitter data het vertoon dat die voorgestelde metode uitgevoer word-gebaseerde, noun frase-gebaseerde, en segmentasie-gebaseerde metodes beide in terms van presisie en dekking.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme jazykově nezávislou datovou metodu, která vyčerpává extrahování bursty fráze libovolných forem (např. fráze jiné než jednoduché podstatné fráze) z mikroblogů. Burst (tj. rychlý nárůst výskytu) fráze způsobuje výbuch překrývajících se N-gramů včetně neúplných. Jinými slovy, bursty neúplné N-gramy nevyhnutelně překrývají bursty fráze. Navrhovaná metoda tedy provádí extrakci bursty fráze jako problém krytí sady, při kterém jsou všechny bursty N-gramy pokryty minimální sadou bursty frází. Experimentální výsledky použití japonských dat na Twitteru ukázaly, že navržená metoda předčila metody založené na slovních, podstatných frázích a segmentaci jak z hlediska přesnosti, tak pokrytí.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme kielestä riippumatonta datavetoista menetelmää, jolla voidaan tyhjentävästi poimia mielivaltaisia lauseita (esim. lauseita muita kuin yksinkertaisia substantiivilauseoita) mikroblogeista. Lausekkeen puhkeaminen (eli esiintymisen nopea lisääntyminen) aiheuttaa päällekkäisten N-grammien puhkeamisen, mukaan lukien epätäydelliset. Toisin sanoen bursty keskeneräiset N-grammat väistämättä päällekkäin bursty lauseet. Näin ollen ehdotettu menetelmä suorittaa bursty lauseiden erottamisen sarjakansiongelmana, jossa kaikki bursty N-grammat on katettu vähimmäisjoukko bursty lauseita. Japanin Twitter-aineistoa hyödyntävät kokeelliset tulokset osoittivat, että ehdotettu menetelmä suoriutui sekä sana-, substantiivi- että segmentointipohjaisista menetelmistä tarkkuuden että kattavuuden suhteen.', 'az': 'Biz mikrobloglardan çəkilmək üçün dildən bağımsız verilən metod təklif edirik. Bir sözlərin fırtına gəlməsinin tez artması nqramların dağılmasına bənzəyir. Başqa sözlərə görə, qeyri-mütləq N-gramların parçalanmış sözlərini daşıyır. Beləliklə, təklif edilən metod burst frazlərin çıxarılmasını, bütün burst N-gramların minimal burst frazlərin örtüsü kimi çəkilir. Yaponca Twitter veriləri ilə istifadə edən təcrübə sonuçları təcrübə edilən metodların sözlərə dayanan, ismi frazlərə dayanan və segmentasiya dayanan metodların hər ikisinin doğruluğu və örtüyü ilə istifadə etdiyini göstərdi.', 'jv': 'Anyone Awak dhéwé Wurung liyane, nggo N-gram kuwi nggawe barang apik. Speaking Perintah sing paling-perintah sing gambar dadi Tuter japané wong pada nggawe sapa perusahaan sing katêpakan, pangan-akhir sing basa, lan sampek-akèh sing basa dipunangé akèh lan ujaran.', 'ha': 'Munã buɗa wata hanyor da aka tafiyar da cikin harshe-da-ba-da-harshe don ya wadãtar da sauri mai sauri daga micrologogi. The burst (i.e., the rapid increase of the occurrence) of a phrase causes the burst of overlapping N-grams including incomplete ones.  Da wasu kalmõmi, bireta, ba da cikakken N-gram ba da hakki ya rufe rubutun bakwai. Kamar wannan ne, shirin da aka buɗe shi, yana tafiyar da cire masu fitarwa kamar matabbata ta da ke daidaita duk tsumarni na N-gram da aka rufe su da kuma da ƙallaya masu buɗe. Matariyan jarrabai da ke amfani da data na Twitter na Japane ya nuna cewa metoden da aka yi niyyar da ya bajari magana-based, na-banne da, da shiryoyin-segment-based, both cikin tsari da coverup.', 'he': 'We propose a language-independent data-driven method to exhaustively extract bursty phrases of arbitrary forms (e.g., phrases other than simple noun phrases) from microblogs.  הפיצוץ (כלומר, הגידול המהיר של התרחשות) של ביטוי גורם לפיצוץ של N-גרם מתקפלים כולל אלה לא מלאים. במילים אחרות, N-גרם לא מושלם התפוצצו באופן בלתי נמנע משפטים התפוצצו. ככה, השיטה המוצעת מבצעת את החילוץ של משפטים מתפוצצים כבעיית הכיסוי המערכת שבה כל N-גרם מתפוצצים מכוסים על ידי קבוצה מינימלית של משפטים מתפוצצים. תוצאות ניסויים באמצעות נתוני טוויטר היפנים הראו שהשיטה המוצעת עברה שיטות מבוססות על מילים, מבוססות על שמות, ומבוססות על סגמנציה גם בנוגע לדיוקת וכיסוי.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo jezikovno neodvisno podatkovno usmerjeno metodo za izčrpno ekstrakcijo bursty stavkov poljubnih oblik (npr. stavkovnih stavkov razen preprostih samostalniških stavkov) iz mikroblogov. Izbruh (tj. hitro povečanje pojavnosti) fraze povzroči izbruh prekrivajočih se N-gramov, vključno z nepopolnimi. Z drugimi besedami, bursty nepopolni N-grami neizogibno prekrivajo bursty fraze. Tako predlagana metoda izvede ekstrakcijo bursty stavkov kot problem kompleta pokrova, pri katerem so vsi bursty N-grami pokriti z minimalnim naborom bursty stavkov. Eksperimentalni rezultati z uporabo japonskih Twitter podatkov so pokazali, da je predlagana metoda boljša od besednih, samostalniških fraz in segmentacijskih metod tako v smislu natančnosti kot pokritosti.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་རང་བཞིན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ཚིག་རྟགས་མ་འདུག མགོ་འགྲམ་ཡོད། མ་བརྗོད་པ་གཞན་ཞིག་ནི། N-རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་ཕར་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་དགོས། དེར་བརྟེན། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཚིག་གི་ཕྱིར་འདོན Experimental results using Japanese Twitter data show that the proposed method outperformed word-based, noun phrase-based, and segmentation-based methods both in accuracy and coverage terms.'}
{'en': 'Maximum Margin Reward Networks for Learning from Explicit and Implicit Supervision', 'ar': 'شبكات مكافأة الهامش القصوى للتعلم من الإشراف الصريح والضمني', 'pt': 'Redes de Recompensa de Margem Máxima para Aprender com Supervisão Explícita e Implícita', 'fr': 'Réseaux de récompense de marge maximale pour apprendre de la supervision explicite et implicite', 'es': 'Redes de recompensa de máximo margen para aprender de la supervisión explícita e implícita', 'ja': '明示的および黙示的な監督から学ぶための最大マージン報酬ネットワーク', 'zh': '自显性、隐性监学者最保证金奖网络', 'hi': 'स्पष्ट और अंतर्निहित पर्यवेक्षण से सीखने के लिए अधिकतम मार्जिन इनाम नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Сети вознаграждений за максимальную маржу для обучения под явным и неявным надзором', 'ga': 'Líonraí Luaíochta Coigríche Uasta chun Foghlama ó Mhaoirseacht Shonrach agus Intuigthe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Δίκτυα ανταμοιβής μέγιστου περιθωρίου για μάθηση από ρητή και έμμεση εποπτεία', 'hu': 'Maximális margin jutalom hálózatok a kifejezett és implicit felügyeletből származó tanuláshoz', 'it': 'Reti di premio massimo per il margine per imparare dalla supervisione esplicita e implicita', 'lt': 'Didžiausias atlyginimo dydis už aiškios ir netiesioginės priežiūros mokymąsi', 'kk': 'Экспликатты және импликатты бақылау үшін оқыту желінің шегін қайтару', 'mk': 'Максимална маргина на награда на мрежите за учење од јасна и имплицитна надзора', 'ml': 'എക്സ്പ്ലിക്റ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും അംപ്ലിക്റ്റ് സൂപ്പരിഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Hadiah Margin Maksimum untuk Belajar dari Supervisi Jelas dan Implicit', 'mt': 'In-Netwerks tal-Marġni Massimu ta’ Ħlas għat-Tagħlim minn Superviżjoni Espliċita u Impliċita', 'mn': 'Тодорхой болон эзэмшигтэй хүлээн зөвлөх суралцах хамгийн их хэмжээсүүд', 'no': 'Høgste marge tilbake nettverk for læring frå eksplisitt og implisitt oversikt', 'pl': 'Sieci nagród maksymalnych marży za uczenie się z wyraźnego i dorozumianego nadzoru', 'ro': 'Rețelele de recompensă cu marjă maximă pentru învățarea din supravegherea explicită și implicită', 'so': 'Maximum Margin Reward Network for Learning from Explicit and Implicit Supervision', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න සඳහා විශ්වාසිත ජාලය', 'sv': 'Nätverk med maximal marginalbelöning för lärande från explicit och implicit övervakning', 'ur': 'مفصل اور مفصل نظر سے تعلیم کرنے کے لئے سب سے زیادہ مضبوط نیٹورک جاری کریں', 'ta': 'அதிகபட்ச ஓரம் மீண்டும் வலைப்பின்னல்களிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கான கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளது மற்றும் ச', 'sr': 'Maksimalna marža nagrada mreža za učenje iz eksplicita i Implicitnog nadzora', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mạng lưới lưới đắc đa tối đa để học từ "khả năng" và "khả năng giám sát"', 'da': 'Maksimal margin belønningsnetværk for læring fra eksplicit og implicit tilsyn', 'bg': 'Мрежи за максимална награда за маржин за обучение от изричен и имплицитен надзор', 'nl': 'Netwerken voor maximale marge beloning voor leren van expliciet en impliciet toezicht', 'hr': 'Maksimalna marža povlačenja mreža za učenje iz eksplicitnog i implicitnog nadzora', 'id': 'Jaringan Hadiah Margin Maksimum untuk Belajar dari Supervisi Jelas dan Implik', 'fa': 'Maximum Margin Reward Networks for Learning from Explicit and Implicit Supervision', 'de': 'Netzwerke für maximale Margen-Belohnung für das Lernen aus expliziter und impliziter Aufsicht', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Higher Reward Network for Learning from Explicit and Implicit Supervision', 'tr': 'Explicit we Implicit Gözlemden öwrenmek üçin iň kop gabdaly gaýd et', 'ko': '현성과 잠재적 감독에서 배운 최대 이윤 보답 네트워크', 'af': 'Maksimum Margin Herstel Netwerke vir Leer van Explicit en Implicit Supervision', 'sq': 'Rrjetet maksimale të shpërblimit për mësimin nga mbikqyrje e qartë dhe implicitete', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Մաքսիմալ արժեքի վարձի ցանցերը բացահայտ և աննշանակալի վերահսկողության ուսումնասիրության համար', 'az': 'Gözləşdirilmək və İpliktik Gözləşdirilmək üçün ən böyük Marjin Qeyd Netikləri', 'bn': 'এক্সপ্লিকিট এবং ইম্পিলিকিট সাপার্ভিশন থেকে শিক্ষার জন্য সর্বোচ্চ মার্জিন পুনরায় নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Maksimalna marža nagrada mreža za učenje iz eksplicitnog i implicitnog nadzora', 'ca': 'Redes màximas de recompensa per aprendre a partir de supervisió explícita i implícita', 'cs': 'Sítě odměn maximální marže pro učení se z explicitního a implicitního dohledu', 'et': 'Maksimaalse marginaali preemia võrgustikud selgesõnalise ja kaudse järelevalve käigus õppimise eest', 'fi': 'Maksimaalinen marginaalipalkkio Networks for Learning from Explicit and Implicit Supervision', 'jv': 'Marjin Reward', 'he': 'Maximum Margin Reward Networks for Learning from Explicit and Implicit Supervision', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'Mreže za nagrado najvišjih marž za učenje z eksplicitnim in implicitnim nadzorom', 'bo': 'གསལ་བཤད་དང་འཕགས་རིས་ལྟ་རྟོག་པར་སྦྱར་བའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆེ་ཤོས'}
{'en': 'Neural networks have achieved state-of-the-art performance on several structured-output prediction tasks, trained in a fully supervised fashion. However, annotated examples in structured domains are often costly to obtain, which thus limits the applications of neural networks. In this work, we propose Maximum Margin Reward Networks, a neural network-based framework that aims to learn from both explicit (full structures) and implicit supervision signals (delayed feedback on the correctness of the predicted structure). On named entity recognition and semantic parsing, our model outperforms previous systems on the benchmark datasets, CoNLL-2003 and WebQuestionsSP.', 'pt': 'As redes neurais alcançaram desempenho de última geração em várias tarefas de previsão de saída estruturada, treinadas de maneira totalmente supervisionada. No entanto, exemplos anotados em domínios estruturados são muitas vezes caros para obter, o que limita as aplicações das redes neurais. Neste trabalho, propomos Maximum Margin Reward Networks, um framework baseado em redes neurais que visa aprender tanto com sinais de supervisão explícitos (estruturas completas) quanto implícitos (feedback atrasado sobre a correção da estrutura prevista). Em reconhecimento de entidade nomeada e análise semântica, nosso modelo supera sistemas anteriores nos conjuntos de dados de referência, CoNLL-2003 e WebQuestionsSP.', 'ar': 'حققت الشبكات العصبية أداءً متطورًا في العديد من مهام التنبؤ بالمخرجات المنظمة ، وتم تدريبها بأسلوب خاضع للإشراف الكامل. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما يكون الحصول على الأمثلة المشروحة في المجالات المهيكلة مكلفًا ، مما يحد من تطبيقات الشبكات العصبية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح شبكات مكافآت الهامش القصوى ، وهي إطار عمل قائم على الشبكة العصبية يهدف إلى التعلم من إشارات الإشراف الصريحة (الهياكل الكاملة) والضمنية (التعليقات المتأخرة حول صحة الهيكل المتوقع). في التعرف على الكيان المحدد والتحليل الدلالي ، يتفوق نموذجنا على الأنظمة السابقة في مجموعات البيانات المعيارية ، CoNLL-2003 و WebQuestionsSP.', 'es': 'Las redes neuronales han logrado un rendimiento de vanguardia en varias tareas de predicción de resultados estructurados, entrenadas de manera totalmente supervisada. Sin embargo, los ejemplos anotados en dominios estructurados suelen ser costosos de obtener, lo que limita las aplicaciones de las redes neuronales. En este trabajo, proponemos redes de recompensa de margen máximo, un marco basado en redes neuronales que tiene como objetivo aprender de las señales de supervisión tanto explícitas (estructuras completas) como implícitas (retroalimentación retrasada sobre la corrección de la estructura predicha). En cuanto al reconocimiento de entidades nombradas y el análisis semántico, nuestro modelo supera a los sistemas anteriores en los conjuntos de datos de referencia, ConLL-2003 y WebQuestionSSP.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones ont atteint des performances de pointe sur plusieurs tâches de prédiction de sortie structurée, entraînées de manière entièrement supervisée. Cependant, les exemples annotés dans des domaines structurés sont souvent coûteux à obtenir, ce qui limite les applications des réseaux de neurones. Dans ce travail, nous proposons Maximum Margin Reward Networks, un framework basé sur un réseau de neurones qui vise à apprendre à la fois des signaux de supervision explicites (structures complètes) et implicites (rétroaction retardée sur l'exactitude de la structure prédite). En ce qui concerne la reconnaissance d'entités nommées et l'analyse sémantique, notre modèle surpasse les systèmes précédents sur les ensembles de données de référence, ConLL-2003 et WebQuestionSSP.", 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークは、完全に監視された方法でトレーニングされた、いくつかの構造化出力予測タスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成しています。しかしながら、構造化ドメインにおける注釈付きの例は、多くの場合、取得するのに費用がかかるため、ニューラルネットワークのアプリケーションを制限する。この研究では、明示的（完全な構造）と暗黙的な監督信号（予測される構造の正しさに関する遅延フィードバック）の両方から学ぶことを目的としたニューラルネットワークベースのフレームワークであるMaximum Margin Reward Networksを提案します。名前付きエンティティ認識とセマンティック解析では、当社のモデルは、ベンチマークデータセットCoNLL -2003およびWebQuestionsSPの以前のシステムよりも優れています。', 'zh': '神经网络于数结构化输占最先进之性,而以全督教之。 然结构化域中注示例常取成本高昂,以限神经网络之用。 于此之中,大保证金奖网络,盖一基于神经网络之框架,旨在显式(完构)与隐式督信(迟正确性反馈)学。 名实识语义解析,模则集CoNLL-2003,WebQuestionsSP优于前统。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका नेटवर्क ने कई संरचित-आउटपुट पूर्वानुमान कार्यों पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है, जो पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित फैशन में प्रशिक्षित है। हालांकि, संरचित डोमेन में एनोटेटेड उदाहरण अक्सर प्राप्त करने के लिए महंगे होते हैं, जो इस प्रकार तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के अनुप्रयोगों को सीमित करते हैं। इस काम में, हम अधिकतम मार्जिन रिवार्ड नेटवर्क, एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित रूपरेखा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसका उद्देश्य स्पष्ट (पूर्ण संरचनाओं) और अंतर्निहित पर्यवेक्षण संकेतों (अनुमानित संरचना की शुद्धता पर देरी से प्रतिक्रिया) दोनों से सीखना है। नामित एंटिटी मान्यता और शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग पर, हमारा मॉडल बेंचमार्क डेटासेट, CoNLL-2003 और WebQuestionsSP पर पिछले सिस्टम को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Нейронные сети достигли самой современной производительности по нескольким задачам прогнозирования структурированного выхода, обученные полностью контролируемым образом. Тем не менее, аннотированные примеры в структурированных доменах часто являются дорогостоящими для получения, что, таким образом, ограничивает применение нейронных сетей. В этой работе мы предлагаем сети вознаграждений с максимальной маржой, нейронный сетевой фреймворк, который стремится учиться как на явных (полные структуры), так и на неявных сигналах наблюдения (отсроченная обратная связь о правильности прогнозируемой структуры). При распознавании и семантическом синтаксическом разборе именованных сущностей наша модель превосходит предыдущие системы на базовых наборах данных, CoNLL-2003 и WebQuestionsSP.', 'ga': 'Tá feidhmíocht úrscothach bainte amach ag líonraí néaracha ar roinnt tascanna struchtúrtha-aschuir réamh-mheasta, oilte ar bhealach lán-mhaoirsithe. Mar sin féin, is minic a bhíonn sé costasach samplaí anótáilte i bhfearainn struchtúrtha a fháil, rud a chuireann srian ar fheidhmiú líonraí néaracha. San obair seo, molaimid Líonraí Luaíochta Corrlaigh Uasta, creat néar-bhunaithe líonra a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige foghlaim ó chomharthaí soiléire (iomlána) agus ó chomharthaí maoirseachta intuigthe (aiseolas moillithe ar cheart an struchtúir thuartha). Maidir le haithint aonán ainmnithe agus parsáil shéimeantach, tá feidhmíocht ár samhail níos fearr ná na córais roimhe seo ar na tacair sonraí tagarmharcála, CoNLL-2003 agus WebQuestionsSP.', 'hu': 'A neurális hálózatok több strukturált kimeneti előrejelzési feladatban is korszerű teljesítményt értek el, teljes körűen felügyelt módon. A strukturált tartományokban megjegyzett példák azonban gyakran költséges beszerzése, ami korlátozza az ideghálózatok alkalmazását. Ebben a munkában a Maximum Margin Reward Networks-t javasoljuk, egy neurális hálózat alapú keretrendszert, amely célja, hogy tanuljon mind explicit (teljes struktúrák), mind implicit felügyeleti jelekből (késleltetett visszajelzés az előrejelzett struktúra helyességére). A megnevezett entitások felismerésével és szemantikai elemzésével modellünk felülmúlja a benchmark adatkészletek korábbi rendszereit, a CoNLL-2003 és a WebQuestionsSP.', 'el': 'Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα έχουν επιτύχει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε διάφορες εργασίες πρόβλεψης δομημένων εξόδων, εκπαιδευμένες με πλήρως εποπτευμένο τρόπο. Ωστόσο, σχολιασμένα παραδείγματα σε δομημένους τομείς είναι συχνά δαπανηρά στην απόκτηση, γεγονός που περιορίζει τις εφαρμογές των νευρωνικών δικτύων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε δίκτυα ανταμοιβής μέγιστου περιθωρίου, ένα πλαίσιο βασισμένο σε νευρωνικό δίκτυο που στοχεύει στην εκμάθηση τόσο από ρητά (πλήρεις δομές) όσο και από έμμεσα σήματα εποπτείας (καθυστερημένη ανατροφοδότηση σχετικά με την ορθότητα της προβλεπόμενης δομής). Όσον αφορά την αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων και τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση, το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα προηγούμενα συστήματα στα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, CoNLL-2003 και WebQuestionsSP.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ქსელები უკვე სტრუქტურული გამოსახულების წარმოდგენა, რომლებიც უფრო დანარწმუნებული მონახულებით. მაგრამ, სტრუქტურებული დიომენტებში მონიშნული მაგალითები ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან საკმაოდ იქნება, რომელიც ამიტომ მიზედნენ ნეიროლური ქსელების მომხმარე ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მაქსიმური მარჯინი შემდეგ ქსელების მიზეზეზება, ნეიროლური ქსელის ფრამეტრი, რომელიც უნდა ვისწავლოთ ორივე განსაკუთრებული (ყველა სტრუქტურაციის) და იმპლიციტური მონაცემებ სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობაზე და სემენტიკის განაცნობაზე, ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო გავაკეთება წინახალი სისტემების განაცნობაში, CoNLL-2003 და WebQuestionsSP.', 'it': "Le reti neurali hanno raggiunto prestazioni all'avanguardia su diversi compiti di previsione strutturati, formati in modo completamente supervisionato. Tuttavia, esempi annotati in domini strutturati sono spesso costosi da ottenere, il che limita quindi le applicazioni delle reti neurali. In questo lavoro, proponiamo Maximum Margin Reward Networks, un framework basato su reti neurali che mira a imparare sia dai segnali di supervisione espliciti (strutture complete) che impliciti (feedback ritardato sulla correttezza della struttura prevista). Sul riconoscimento delle entità nominate e sull'analisi semantica, il nostro modello supera i sistemi precedenti sui set di dati di benchmark, CoNLL-2003 e WebQuestionsSP.", 'lt': 'Neuraliniai tinklai pasiekė pažangiausius rezultatus keliose struktūrizuotų rezultatų prognozavimo užduotyse, kurios buvo parengtos visiškai prižiūrint. Tačiau užrašyti pavyzdžiai struktūrizuotose srityse dažnai yra brangūs, todėl ribojamas nervų tinklų taikymas. Šiame darbe siūlome maksimalius atlyginimo dydžio tinklus – neuraliniu tinklu grindžiamą sistemą, kuria siekiama pasimokyti iš aiškių (visiškų struktūrų) ir netiesioginių priežiūros signalų (vėluojamos grįžtamosios informacijos apie numatomos struktūros teisingumą). Kalbant apie vardinį subjekto pripažinimą ir semantinį analizavimą, mūsų modelis atitinka ankstesnes lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių, CoNLL-2003 ir WebQuestionsSP sistemas.', 'mk': 'Неуралните мрежи постигнаа најнови резултати на неколку структурни предвидувачки задачи, обучени на целосно надгледуван начин. Сепак, анотираните примери во структурираните домени честопати се скапи за добивање, што ги ограничува апликациите на нервните мрежи. Во оваа работа, предложуваме Максимална маргина на награди на мрежите, неурална мрежна рамка која има за цел да научи од експлицитни (целосни структури) и имплицитни сигнали за надзор (одложени реакции за точноста на предвидената структура). Во врска со именуваното препознавање на ентитетите и семантичното анализирање, нашиот модел ги надминува претходните системи на базите на податоци, CoNLL-2003 и WebQuestionsSP.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық желілер бірнеше құрылған шығару тапсырмаларының күй- жайы жұмыс істеуіне жеткізді, толық бақылау тәсілді. Бірақ құрылған домендердің жаңалық мысалдары көбінде алу үшін көп маңызды, бұл невралдық желінің қолданбаларын шектеп береді. Бұл жұмыстың максимумыз Margin Reward желілерін, невралдық желінің негіздеген қоршауын қолданамыз. Бұл түсінікті (толық құрылымдардан) және басқару сигналдардан оқыту үшін мақсат етіледі. Аталған нысандарды анықтау және semantic талдау үшін, біздің үлгіміз алдыңғы бағдарламалар деректер қорларында, CoNLL- 2003 және WebQuestionsSP бағдарламаларында болады.', 'ms': 'Rangkaian saraf telah mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada beberapa tugas ramalan-output struktur, dilatih dengan cara yang diawasi sepenuhnya. Namun, contoh yang dicatat dalam domain struktur sering mahal untuk dicapai, yang mengakhiri aplikasi rangkaian saraf. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan Rangkaian Hadiah Margin Maksimum, kerangka berasaskan rangkaian saraf yang bertujuan untuk belajar dari kedua-dua isyarat pengawasan eksplicit (struktur penuh) dan implicit (balas balik terlambat tentang kebaikan struktur yang dijangka). Pada pengenalan entiti bernama dan penghuraian semantik, model kami melampaui sistem terdahulu pada set data benchmark, CoNLL-2003 dan WebQuestionsSP.', 'mt': 'In-netwerks newrali kisbu prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fuq diversi kompiti ta’ tbassir ta’ produzzjoni strutturata, imħarrġa b’mod kompletament sorveljat. Madankollu, eżempji annotati f’oqsma strutturati spiss jiswew ħafna flus biex jinkisbu, u b’hekk jillimitaw l-applikazzjonijiet tan-netwerks newrali. In this work, we propose Maximum Margin Reward Networks, a neural network-based framework that aims to learn from both explicit (full structures) and implicit supervision signals (delayed feedback on the correctness of the predicted structure).  Fir-rigward tar-rikonoxximent tal-entitajiet imsemmija u l-analiżi semantika, il-mudell tagħna jwettaq riżultati akbar mis-sistemi preċedenti dwar is-settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza, CoNLL-2003 u WebQuestionsSP.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു- പുറത്തുള്ള പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ  എങ്കിലും സ്ഥാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡൊമെനുകളില്\u200d കുറ്റപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ന്യ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാര്\u200dജിന്\u200d വീണ്ടും നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമായ ഒരു നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നു. അത് രണ്ട് പ്രത്യേക പേരിലുള്ള വസ്തുവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയും സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങും പേരില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d മു', 'mn': 'Шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд бүтээгдэхүүний хэдэн бүтээгдэхүүний даалгаварын төлөвлөгөө гаргасан. Бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүний даалгаварын төлөвлөгөө бүтээгдэхүүний төлөвлөгөөтэй. Гэхдээ бүтээгдэхүүний жишээ нь ихэвчлэн үнэтэй байдаг. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хэрэглээ хязгаарладаг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид Максимум Маргин Reward Networks-г, мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суралцах гэсэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хэлбэрээс суралцах зорилготой (бүрэн бүтээгдэхүүнээс) болон эзэмшигтэй хариу үзүүлэлтийн сигналуудыг санал болгож байна. Бидний загварын нэр тодорхойлолт болон semantic хуваалцах үед бидний загвар нь өмнөх системүүдийг багц өгөгдлийн санд, CoNLL-2003 болон WebQuestionsSP дээр гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Sieci neuronowe osiągnęły najnowocześniejszą wydajność w zakresie kilku zadań przewidywania strukturyzowanych wyników, przeszkolonych w pełni nadzorowanych. Jednak adnotacje w domenach strukturalnych są często kosztowne w uzyskaniu, co ogranicza zastosowanie sieci neuronowych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy Maximum Margin Reward Networks, framework oparty na sieci neuronowej, którego celem jest uczenie się zarówno na wyraźnych (pełnych struktur) jak i ukrytych sygnałach nadzoru (opóźnionych informacjach zwrotnych na temat poprawności przewidywanej struktury). W zakresie rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek i parsowania semantycznego, nasz model przewyższa poprzednie systemy na zbiorach danych referencyjnych, CoNLL-2003 i WebQuestionsSP.', 'no': 'Neuralnettverk har oppnådd status-of-the-art-performance på fleire strukturerte-utgangsspråver, trent på ein fullstendig oversikt måte. Dette er ofte kostnad for å få merke eksemplar i strukturerte domene, som derfor begrenser programmet for neuralnettverk. I denne arbeida foreslår vi maksimum Margin Reward Nettverk, eit neuralnettverksbasert rammeverk som mål lære frå både eksplisitt (fulle struktur) og implisitt overvåkingssignal (delagt tilbakemelding om korrektet av forventa struktur). På gjenkjenning av namnet entitet og semantisk tolking utfører modellen vårt tidlegare systemar på benchmarkdatasetta, CoNLL-2003 og WebQuestionsSP.', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale au obținut performanțe de ultimă generație în mai multe sarcini structurate de predicție a ieșirii, instruite într-un mod complet supravegheat. Cu toate acestea, exemplele adnotate în domenii structurate sunt adesea costisitoare de obținut, ceea ce limitează astfel aplicațiile rețelelor neurale. În această lucrare, propunem Rețelele de recompensă pentru marjă maximă, un cadru bazat pe rețea neurală care își propune să învețe atât din semnalele explicite (structuri complete) cât și implicite de supraveghere (feedback întârziat asupra corectitudinii structurii preconizate). În ceea ce privește recunoașterea entităților denumite și analizarea semantică, modelul nostru depășește sistemele anterioare din seturile de date de referință, CoNLL-2003 și WebQuestionsSP.', 'sr': 'Neuralne mreže su postigle stanje umjetnosti na nekoliko zadataka za predviđanje structuriranog izlaza, obučenih u potpunom nadzornom načinu. Međutim, napomenuti primjeri u strukturiranim domenama često su skupi za dobivanje, što tako ograničava primjene neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu predlažemo Maximum Margin Reward Networks, neuralnu mrežu baziranu okvir koji cilja naučiti od objektivnih (punih struktura) i implicitnih signala nadzora (odgođena reakcija o ispravnosti predviđene strukture). Na priznanju entiteta i semantičkom analizu, naš model iznosi prethodne sisteme na standardnim podacima, CoNLL-2003 i WebQuestionsSP.', 'so': 'Shabakada naadiga ah waxay ku dhamaadeen xaalad farshaxan oo ku saabsan shaqooyin la hor-dhigo oo kala duduwan, oo lagu tababaray qaab aad u ilaalisan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalooyin la sharciyey oo ku qoran goobaha la dhisay waa qaali inta badan in la helo, taas oo ku xadgudba codsiga shabakada naafada ah. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa habka ugu badnaanta u soo celinta Network, kaas oo ku qoran shabakad neurada ah oo ku qoran inuu ka barto cadcad (dhamaan dhismaha) iyo sawirada ilaalinta (dib u dhigtay feedback ku saabsan saxda dhismaha la 预测y). Markii lagu magacaabay aqoonsashada iyo baaritaanka semantika ah, modelkayagu wuxuu ka sameynayaa nidaam hore oo ku qoran taariikhda benchmark, CoNLL-2003 iyo WebQueonsSP.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයේ ස්ථිතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, සංස්ථාපනය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙ නමුත්, සංස්ථාපනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙන උදාහරණ උදාහරණයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් ලැබෙන්න, ඒකෙන් න මේ වැඩේදී, අපි Maximum Margin Reward Netwarks ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, නියර්ල ජාලයේ අධ්\u200dයාපනයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (සම්පූර්ණ සංකේතය) සහ අ නම් නම් අයිතිය අඳුරණය සහ සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා, අපේ මොඩල් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සේට් වල ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියක්', 'ta': 'புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் சில கட்டமைப்பு- வெளியீட்டு முன்னோட்டம் பணிகளில் உள்ள- கலை செயல் நிலையில் பெற்றுவிட்டன, முழுவதும ஆனால், அடுக்கப்பட்ட களங்களில் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட உதாரணங்கள் பெறுவதற்கு பெரும்பாலாகவே செலவு செய்கிறது, அதனால் புதிய இந்த வேலையில், நாம் அதிகபட்ச விளையாட்டு மீண்டும் வலைப்பின்னல்களை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம், ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள சட்டத்தை வெளிப்படையாக கற்றுக் க Name', 'sv': 'Neurala nätverk har uppnått state-of-the-art prestanda på flera strukturerade prognosuppgifter, utbildade på ett fullt övervakat sätt. Dock är kommenterade exempel i strukturerade domäner ofta kostsamma att få fram, vilket begränsar tillämpningen av neurala nätverk. I detta arbete föreslår vi Maximum Margin Reward Networks, ett neuralt nätverksbaserat ramverk som syftar till att lära av både explicita (fulla strukturer) och implicita övervakningssignaler (fördröjd återkoppling på korrektheten av den förutsedda strukturen). På namngiven entitetsigenkänning och semantisk tolkning överträffar vår modell tidigare system på benchmarkdatauppsättningarna CoNLL-2003 och WebQuestionsSP.', 'ur': 'نئورل نیٹورک نے بہت سی ساخترال-آئٹ-آئٹ-آئٹ-آئٹ-آئٹ کی پیش بینی کے کاموں پر استعمال کی ہے، پورے نظارت کی طرح تعلیم کی ہے. However, annotated examples in structures domains are often costly to obtain, which thus limits the applications of neural networks. اس کام میں ہم نے Maximum Margin Reward Networks کی پیشنهاد کی ہے، ایک نیورل نیٹورک کی بنیاد رکھی ہوئی فرم جس کا ارادہ ہے کہ دونوں کھول کھول ساختاروں سے (پوری ساختاروں سے) اور اپنا نظر نظر سیگنالوں سے سیکھنا چاہے (پیش بینی ساختار کی اصلاح کے بارے میں پیچھے پھیر دیا گیا ہے)۔ نام داری شناسایی اور سیمانٹی پارسینگ پر ہماری مدل بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ، CoNLL-2003 اور WebQuestionsSP پر پہلے سیستموں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, quyidagi domenning tadbirlik misollarida ko'p o'zgarishga qiymatdir, shunday qilib neyrol tarmoqlarining dasturlarini chegara qiladi. Bu vazida, biz bir necha tarmoq asosida yangi tarmoq asosiy freymni tahlil qilamiz. Bu ikkita tashkilotlar (to ʻliq tuzuvchidan) va supervissiya signallarini ishlatish mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Hệ thần kinh đã đạt được hiệu suất hiện đại trên nhiều công việc dự đoán sản xuất cấu trúc, được huấn luyện theo một cách được giám sát hoàn toàn. Tuy nhiên, các ví dụ được ghi chú trong khu vực được cấu trúc thường rất tốn kém để đạt được, do đó giới hạn các ứng dụng của mạng thần kinh. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị "Mạng lưới mức Lề Tối đa". Một bộ khung dựa vào mạng thần kinh, nhằm học hỏi từ các tín hiệu giám sát rõ ràng (cấu trúc đầy đủ) và ngụ ý (phản hồi chậm về sự sửa chữa của cấu trúc dự đoán). Về việc nhận dạng thực thể tên và phân tích ngữ pháp, mẫu của chúng ta hoàn thiện hệ thống trước trên các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, Codnell-okay và WebQuestions.', 'bg': 'Невралните мрежи са постигнали най-съвременни резултати по няколко структурирани задачи за прогнозиране, обучени по напълно надзорен начин. Въпреки това, анотираните примери в структурирани домейни често са скъпи за получаване, което по този начин ограничава приложението на невронните мрежи. В тази работа предлагаме мрежите с максимална печалба, базирана на невронна мрежа рамка, която има за цел да се учи както от изрични (пълни структури) така и от имплицитни сигнали за надзор (забавена обратна връзка за правилността на прогнозираната структура). При разпознаване на наименовани обекти и семантичен анализ нашият модел надминава предишните системи в сравнителните набори от данни CoNLL-2003 и WebQuestionsSP.', 'hr': 'Neuralne mreže postigle su stanje umjetnosti na nekoliko strukturiranih predviđanja izlaza, obučenih u potpunom nadzornom načinu. Međutim, navedeni primjeri u strukturiranim domenama često su skupi za dobivanje, što stoga ograničava primjene neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu predlažemo Maximum Margin Reward Networks, okvir na osnovu neurone mreže koji cilja naučiti od objektivnih (punih struktura) i implicitnih signala nadzora (odgođena reakcija o ispravnosti predviđene strukture). Na priznanju i semantičkom analizu imena entiteta, naš model iznosi prethodne sustave na standardnim podacima, CoNLL-2003 i WebQuestionsSP.', 'da': 'Neurale netværk har opnået state-of-the-art ydeevne på flere strukturerede output forudsigelsesopgaver, uddannet på en fuldt overvåget måde. Men annoterede eksempler i strukturerede domæner er ofte dyre at få fat i, hvilket begrænser anvendelsen af neurale netværk. I dette arbejde foreslår vi Maximum Margin Reward Networks, en neural netværksbaseret ramme, der har til formål at lære af både eksplicitte (fulde strukturer) og implicitte overvågningssignaler (forsinket feedback på korrektheden af den forudsigede struktur). På navngivet entitetsgenkendelse og semantisk parsing overgår vores model tidligere systemer på benchmark datasæt, CoNLL-2003 og WebQuestionsSP.', 'nl': 'Neurale netwerken hebben state-of-the-art prestaties bereikt bij verschillende gestructureerde output voorspellingstaken, opgeleid op een volledig begeleide manier. Echter, geannoteerde voorbeelden in gestructureerde domeinen zijn vaak kostbaar om te verkrijgen, wat de toepassingen van neurale netwerken beperkt. In dit werk stellen we Maximum Margin Reward Networks voor, een op neuraal netwerk gebaseerd raamwerk dat wil leren van zowel expliciete (volledige structuren) als impliciete supervisie signalen (vertraagde feedback op de juistheid van de voorspelde structuur). Op named entity herkenning en semantische parsing presteert ons model beter dan eerdere systemen op de benchmark datasets, CoNLL-2003 en WebQuestionsSP.', 'de': 'Neuronale Netzwerke haben bei mehreren strukturierten Output-Vorhersageaufgaben modernste Leistung erreicht, die vollständig überwacht trainiert werden. Allerdings sind annotierte Beispiele in strukturierten Domänen oft kostspielig zu erhalten, was die Anwendungen neuronaler Netze begrenzt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir Maximum Margin Reward Networks vor, ein neuronales Netzwerk-basiertes Framework, das sowohl aus expliziten (Vollstrukturen) als auch impliziten Überwachungssignalen (verzögertes Feedback zur Korrektheit der vorhergesagten Struktur) lernen soll. Bei der Erkennung benannter Entitäten und semantischem Parsen übertrifft unser Modell bisherige Systeme auf den Benchmark-Datensätzen CoNLL-2003 und WebQuestionsSP.', 'id': 'Neural networks have achieved state-of-the-art performance on several structured-output prediction tasks, trained in a fully supervised fashion.  Namun, contoh yang dicatat dalam domain strukturasi sering mahal untuk mendapatkan, yang sehingga membatasi aplikasi jaringan saraf. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan Jaringan Hakim Margin Maksimum, sebuah rangkaian berasaskan jaringan saraf yang bertujuan untuk belajar dari both eksplicit (full structures) and implicit supervision signals (delayed feedback on the correctness of the predicted structure). Dalam pengenalan entitas bernama dan penghuraian semantis, model kami melampaui sistem sebelumnya pada set data benchmark, CoNLL-2003 dan WebQuestionsSP.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ya kijamii imefanikiwa kuwa na hali ya sanaa katika kazi kadhaa za kutabiri mazao yenye ujenzi, zilizofundishwa kwa namna ya kudhibitiwa. Hata hivyo, mifano yenye kuchanganyikiwa katika maeneo yaliyojengwa mara nyingi hugharimu kupata, ambayo kwa hiyo inazuia matumizi ya mitandao ya kijamii. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza Mtandao wa Margin Reward, mfumo wa mtandao wa neura unaotarajiwa kujifunza kutoka kwenye miundombinu ya wazi (miundombinu kamili) na kuhakikisha ishara za ufuatiliaji (kuchelewa maoni juu ya uhakika wa muundo unaotabiriwa). Kwenye jina la kutambuliwa na wimbo wa kimapenzi, mwelekeo wetu unafanya mifumo ya zamani kwenye seti za bendera, CoNLL-2003 na WebQueonsSP.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی روی چند کار پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای ساخته\u200cشده\u200cای به حالت هنر رسیده\u200cاند، که در یک طریق کامل تحت نظر آموزش داده\u200cاند. با این حال، مثالهای مشخص شده در دامنهای ساخته شده اغلب برای رسیدن به ارزش ارزش دارند، که به همین دلیل کاربردهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی را محدود می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما بزرگترین شبکه\u200cهای مرجین ردوارد را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک چهارچوب\u200cهای شبکه عصبی که هدف دارد از سیگنال\u200cهای کامل (ساختارهای کامل) و نظارت\u200cکننده یاد بگیریم (بازگشت بر درستی ساختار پیش\u200cبینی تأخیر شده). در مورد شناسایی و تجزیه\u200cهای semantic entities نامیده شده، مدل ما سیستم\u200cهای قبلی را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سنجیر، CoNLL-2003 و WebQuestionsSP انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '신경 네트워크는 몇 가지 구조화된 출력 예측 임무에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었고 완전한 감독 방식으로 훈련을 진행했다.그러나 구조화 분야의 주석 예시들은 대가가 높아 신경 네트워크의 응용을 제한한다.이 작업에서 우리는 최대 한계 보수 네트워크를 제시했다. 이것은 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 구조로 현식(완전한 구조)과 은식 감독 신호(구조의 정확성을 예측하는 지연 피드백)에서 배우기 위한 것이다.명명된 실체 식별과 의미 해석에 있어 우리 모델은 기준 데이터 집합인 CoNLL-2003과 WebQuestions SP에서 이전 시스템보다 성능이 우수하다.', 'tr': "Nöral şebekeler birnäçe strukturly-çykyş öňünden geçirmek täzeliklerine ýetdi, doly gözlemli şekilde öwrenmeli. Ýöne strukturýan alanlarda nähili möhüm eserler almak üçin örän wajypdyr. Bu sebäpli näyral şebekeleriň uygulamalaryny çykarýar. Bu işde, biz Maksimum Margin Reward Networks'i, näyral şebekeden bir çerçewçiliki hem a çık (doly strukturlardan) we bellenen gözetleme signallerden öwrenmek üçin teklip edýäris. Adyndaky zatlary tanamak we semantik tanamak üçin, modelimiz geçen sistemlerden, CoNLL-2003 we WebQuestionsSP'da çykarýar.", 'sq': 'Rrjetet neuronale kanë arritur shfaqje më të larta në disa detyra parashikimi të prodhimit të strukturuar, të trajnuara në një mënyrë plotësisht të mbikqyrur. Megjithatë, shembuj të shënuar në fusha të strukturuara shpesh janë të kushtueshëm për të marrë, gjë që kështu kufizon aplikimet e rrjeteve nervore. Në këtë punë, propozojmë Rrjetet Maksimale të Shpërblimeve të Margin ës, një kuadër të bazuar në rrjetin nervor që synon të mësojë si nga sinjalet eksplicite (struktura të plota) ashtu edhe nga sinjalet implicite të mbikqyrjes (feedback të vonuar mbi saktësinë e strukturës së parashikuar). Në njohjen e emëruar të njësisë dhe analizën semantike, modeli ynë paraqet sistemet e mëparshme në bazat e të dhënave, CoNLL-2003 dhe WebQuestionsSP.', 'am': 'የነዌብ መረብ በሙሉ ተጠባባቂው በሥርዓት-አርእስት ሥርዓት ላይ በተመሠረተ የውጤት ቅድሚያ ስራዎችን ለማግኘት አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ አዳራቢዎች ላይ የሚደረጉ ምሳሌዎች ብዙ ጊዜ ለማግኘት ዋጋዎች ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የጠቅላላ ማርጊን መለስ መረብ መሠረት፣ ከሁሉም ግልጽን (ሙሉ structures) እና የስልጣኑን ስልክ ማግኘት የሚችል የኔትዎር መረብ ፍሬማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተባለው አካባቢ ማውቀትና የsemantic ማዘጋጀት፣ ሞዴላያችን የቀድሞውን የbenchmark ዳታዎችን፣ CoNLL-2003 እና የዌብ QuestionsSP ስርዓት ያሳርፋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերը հասել են ամենաբարձր արդյունքների մի քանի կառուցվածքային արդյունքների կանխատեսման խնդիրների վրա, որոնք ամբողջովին վերահսկված են: Այնուամենայնիվ, կառուցվածքավորված ոլորտներում գրված օրինակները հաճախ թանկ են ստանալու, ինչը սահմանափակում է նյարդային ցանցերի կիրառումը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք Մաքսիմալ Մարգան Վճարձ ցանցեր, նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված շրջանակ, որը նպատակն է սովորել բացատրական (ամբողջ կառուցվածքներից) և ենթարկված վերահսկողության ազդանշաններից (կանխատեսված կառուցվածքի ճ Մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է նախկին համակարգերը համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի, CONSL-2003 և WEB-Հարցքների SP վերաբերյալ:', 'af': "Neurale netwerke het state-of-the-art-performance ontvang op verskeie struktureerde-uitset-voorskou opdragte, onderwerp in 'n volledige onderwerp modus. Maar aangetelde voorbeelde in struktureerde domeine is dikwels kosbaar om te kry, wat daarom beperk die toepassings van neurale netwerke. In hierdie werk voorstel ons Maximum Margin Reward Netwerke, 'n neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde raamwerk wat doel om te leer van beide eksplisiese (volle strukture) en implisiete supervisie-signale (verlaat terugkeer op die korrekheid van die voorskoude struktuur). Op genaamde entiteiterkening en semantiese verwerking, ons model uitvoer vorige stelsels op die benchmarkdatastelle, CoNLL-2003 en WebQuestionsSP.", 'az': "Nöral a ğları müəyyən edilən bir neçə strukturlu-çıxış tədbir işlərində müəyyən edilmiş, tamamilə təhsil edilmiş şəkildə təhsil etdilər. Halbuki, strukturlu alanlarda müəyyən edilmiş nümunələr çox dəyərlidir ki, bu halda nöral ağların uyğulamalarını sınırlayır. Bu işdə, biz Maximum Margin Reward Networks'i təklif edirik, nöral a ğ tərəfindən təklif edilən bir çerçive, hər ikisinin açıq-aydın (bütün yapılardan) və implicit supervizyon sinyallərindən öyrənməsini istəyirik. Adlı entitə tanıması və semantik analizi üzərində modelimiz, benchmark veri qurularında, CoNLL-2003 və WebQuestionsSP'da əvvəlki sistemlərdən üstün gəlir.", 'bn': 'Neural networks have achieved state-of-the-art performance on several structured-output prediction tasks, trained in a fully supervised fashion.  তবে কাঠামো ডোমেইনের বিস্তারিত উদাহরণ প্রায়শ মূল্য পাওয়ার জন্য, যার ফলে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের অ্যাপলিকেশন সীমাবদ এই কাজে আমরা সর্বোচ্চ মার্জিন পুনরায় ওয়ার্ড নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করছি, যা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক কাঠামো থেকে বিস্তারিত (পূর্ণ কাঠামো থেকে শিখতে চায়) এবং সার্ভিশন নামের বস্তুর স্বীকৃতি এবং সেমেন্টিক পার্জিং নামে আমাদের মডেল বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট, কএনএল-২০০৩ এবং ওয়েব প্রশ্ন এসপি-এর পূর্বে', 'bs': 'Neuralne mreže su postigle postupak stanja umjetnosti na nekoliko zadataka za predviđanje structuriranog izlaza, obučenih na potpuno nadzirani način. Međutim, navedeni primjeri u strukturiranim domenama često su skupi za dobivanje, što stoga ograničava primjene neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu predlažemo Maximum Margin Reward Networks, okvir na neuronskoj mreži koji cilja naučiti od objektivnih (punih struktura) i implicitnih signala nadzora (odgođene reakcije o ispravnosti predviđene strukture). Na priznanju entiteta i semantičkom analizu, naš model iznosi prethodne sustave na bazama podataka, CoNLL-2003 i WebQuestionsSP.', 'ca': "Les xarxes neuronales han aconseguit un rendiment més avançat en diverses tasques de predicció de producció estructurada, capacitades de manera plenament supervisada. No obstant això, exemples anotats en dominis estructurats sovint són costosos d'obtenir, i això limita les aplicacions de les xarxes neurals. En aquesta feina, proposem les xarxes de màxim marge de recompensa, un marc basat en la xarxa neural que té l'objectiu aprendre de senyals de supervisió explícits (estructures completas) i implícits (feedback retardat sobre la correctesa de l'estructura prevista). En el reconeixement d'entitats anomenades i l'analització semàntica, el nostre model supera els sistemes anteriors dels conjunts de dades de referència, CoNLL-2003 i WebQuestionsSP.", 'cs': 'Neurální sítě dosáhly nejmodernějšího výkonu při několika strukturovaných predikčních úlohách, trénovaných plně pod dohledem. Avšak anotované příklady ve strukturovaných doménách jsou často nákladné na získání, což omezuje aplikace neuronových sítí. V této práci navrhujeme sítě Maximum Margin Reward Networks, rámec založený na neuronové síti, který se snaží učit z explicitních (plných struktur) i implicitních signálů dohledu (zpožděná zpětná vazba o správnosti predikované struktury). V oblasti rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit a sémantického parsování náš model překonává předchozí systémy na benchmarkových datových sadách CoNLL-2003 a WebQuestionsSP.', 'fi': 'Neuroverkostot ovat saavuttaneet huipputason suorituskyvyn useissa strukturoiduissa tuotosten ennustamistehtävissä, jotka on koulutettu täysin valvotusti. Huomattujen esimerkkien hankkiminen strukturoiduilla toimialueilla on kuitenkin usein kallista, mikä rajoittaa neuroverkkojen sovelluksia. Tässä työssä ehdotamme Maximum Margin Reward Networks -verkostoa, joka pyrkii oppimaan sekä eksplisiittisistä (täydet rakenteet) että implisiittisistä valvontasignaaleista (viivästynyt palaute ennustetun rakenteen oikeellisuudesta). Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamisessa ja semanttisessa jäsentämisessä mallimme on parempi kuin aiemmat järjestelmät vertailuaineistoissa CoNLL-2003 ja WebQuestionSP.', 'et': 'Neuraalsed võrgustikud on saavutanud tipptasemel jõudluse mitmetes struktureeritud väljundite prognoosimise ülesannetes, mida on koolitatud täielikult järelevalve all. Siiski on struktureeritud domeenides märgitud näidete hankimine sageli kulukas, mis piirab neurovõrkude rakendusi. Käesolevas töös pakume välja Maximum Margin Reward Networks, neurovõrgupõhise raamistiku, mille eesmärk on õppida nii selgesõnalistest (täisstruktuuridest) kui ka kaudsetest järelevalvesignaalidest (hilinenud tagasiside prognoositava struktuuri õigsuse kohta). Nimetatud olemi tuvastamisel ja semantilisel parsimisel on meie mudel võrdlusandmekogumite CoNLL-2003 ja WebQuestionSP varasematest süsteemidest parem.', 'jv': 'structural-output politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gunakake maximum Marin Reward netwark, nambah kang netwark sing basa gambar nggawe ngulinakake sistem sing bisa digambut karo kesalakno (sampeyan luwih) lan bebasan sampeyan (langgar tarjamahan kelas mbuh dumadhi kapan pangan). Nanging nambah kelas atis karo semanti atis, model nambah dhéwé butawake sistem sing ngendalikno bench dataset, CoNLL-2003 lan webResolution', 'sk': 'Živčna omrežja so dosegla najsodobnejše delovanje pri več strukturiranih napovedovalnih nalogah, usposobljenih na popolnoma nadzorovan način. Vendar pa je pridobitev označenih primerov v strukturiranih domenah pogosto draga, kar omejuje uporabo nevronskih omrežij. V tem delu predlagamo Maximum Margin Reward Networks, okvir, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju, katerega cilj je učenje iz eksplicitnih (polnih struktur) in implicitnih nadzornih signalov (zakasnjene povratne informacije o pravilnosti predvidene strukture). Pri prepoznavanju imenovanih entitet in semantičnem razčlenitvi naš model presega prejšnje sisteme v referenčnih naborih podatkov CoNLL-2003 in WebQuestionsSP.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin neural sun sami babban-mai-kunna kan aikin bashirin birnin-gabanin, wanda aka yi wa tsaro da shi cikakken tsaro. Kayya, misãlai da aka sanar a cikin wurãre da aka saka shi yana da yawa a kamata, don haka ana ƙayyade shiryoyin ayukan ayuka na tsari. In this work, we propose Maximum Margin Reward Networks, a neural network-based framework that aims to learn from both explicit (full structures) and implicit supervision signals (delayed feedback on the correctness of the predicted structure).  Yana da sunan ganin abun ayuka da yin haramtawa na semantic, misalinmu yana tafiyar da tsari na zaman a kan danne-bangon ayuka, CoNLL-2003 da Web Malã'in SP.", 'he': 'רשתות עצביות השיגו ביצועים חדשים במספר משימות צפייה מובנות, מאומנות באופן מושלם. בכל אופן, דוגמאות מוצבעות בתחומים מובנים לעתים קרובות יקרות להשיג, מה שמגביל את התוכניות של רשתות עצביות. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים רשתות גבוהה מקסימומית, מסגרת מבוססת רשת עצבית שמתכוונת ללמוד גם מאותם סימני פיקוח (מבנים מלאים) וגם מאותם סימני פיקוח מרושעים (חזרה מאוחרת על התקנות של המבנה הנצפה). בנוגע לזהות ישויות בשם ומחקר סמנטי, הדוגמא שלנו מובילה מערכות קודמות על קבוצת נתונים של רנטרל, CoNLL-2003 ו WebQuestionsSP.', 'bo': 'Neural networks have achieved state-of-the-art performance on several structured-output prediction tasks, trained in a fully supervised fashion. ཡིན་ནའང་། བཟོ་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་འཛམ་གླིང་ནང་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་དང་། འདིས་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ In this work, we propose Maximum Margin Reward Networks, a neural network-based framework that aims to learn from both explicit (full structures) and implicit supervision signals (delayed feedback on the correctness of the predicted structure). མིང་དང་དབྱིབས་རྩལ་འཛུགས་དང་semantic མིང་དཔྱད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་ཧེ་མའི་མ་ལག་སྟངས་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་མིང་།'}
{'en': 'The Impact of Modeling Overall Argumentation with Tree Kernels', 'ar': 'تأثير النمذجة الشاملة مع بذور الشجرة', 'fr': "L'impact de la modélisation d'une argumentation globale avec des noyaux d'arbres", 'pt': 'O impacto da modelagem de argumentação geral com kernels de árvore', 'es': 'El impacto de modelar la argumentación general con núcleos de árbol', 'ja': 'ツリーカーネルによる全体的な議論のモデリングの影響', 'hi': 'ट्री कर्नेल के साथ समग्र तर्क मॉडलिंग का प्रभाव', 'ru': 'Влияние моделирования общей аргументации с ядрами деревьев', 'zh': '用树内核建模', 'ga': 'Tionchar na Samhaltú Argóint Foriomlán le Eithne Crann', 'hu': 'Az általános érvelés modellezésének hatása a fa magokkal', 'ka': 'სამყარო აპდუმენტაციის მოდელირების გამოსახულება', 'el': 'Ο αντίκτυπος της μοντελοποίησης συνολικής επιχειρηματολογίας με πυρήνας δέντρων', 'it': "L'impatto della modellazione dell'argomentazione globale con i kernel degli alberi", 'kk': 'Бұтақ деректерінің жалпы аргументациясын үлгілеу нәтижесі', 'lt': 'Bendro argumentavimo su medžio branduoliais modeliavimo poveikis', 'mk': 'Влијанието на моделирањето на целокупната аргументација со јадрото на дрвото', 'ml': 'മരത്തിന്റെ കെര്\u200dനെല്\u200dസുമായി മോഡലിങ് മൊത്തം ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റേഷന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം', 'mn': 'Модель загварын бүх аргументуудын нөлөө', 'mt': 'L-Impatt tal-Immudellar tal-Argumentazzjoni Globali mal-Kernels tas-Siġar', 'no': 'Impekten av modellering av alltid argument med trekjerner', 'pl': 'Wpływ modelowania ogólnej argumentacji z jądrami drzew', 'ms': 'Impak Argumentasi Umum Modelan dengan Kernel Pohon', 'ro': 'Impactul modelării argumentării globale cu boabele de copac', 'sr': 'Impekt modelovanja ukupne argumentacije sa drvetnim kernelima', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Impact of Modeling Overall Argumentation with Tree Kernels', 'sv': 'Effekten av modellering av övergripande argumentation med trädkärnor', 'ur': 'درخت کرنلز کے ساتھ سارے ارڈمنٹ کی مدل کرنے کا اثر', 'ta': 'மரத்து கெர்னல்களுடன் மாதிரியும் மொத்த அளவுருவின் விளைவு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tác động tranh luận toàn diện với hạt nhân cây', 'da': 'Effekten af modellering af overordnet argumentation med trækerner', 'bg': 'Влиянието на моделирането на цялостната аргументация с дървесни ядра', 'nl': 'Het effect van het modelleren van algehele argumentatie met boomkernen', 'de': 'Die Auswirkungen der Modellierung von Gesamtargumentationen mit Baumkernen', 'id': 'Impak dari Modeling Argumentasi Umum dengan Kernel Pohon', 'sw': 'Matokeo ya Uchaguzi Mkuu na Mti Kernels', 'ko': '트리 핵 모델링이 전체 논증에 미친 영향', 'hr': 'Učinak modelovanja cjelokupne argumentacije s drvećem kernelima', 'fa': 'اثر مدل کل ارتباطات با کرنل درخت', 'sq': 'Ndikimi i modelimit të argumentit të përgjithshëm me bërthamat e drurit', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Մոդելինգի ընդհանուր բանավեճի ազդեցությունը ծառի միջուկների հետ', 'tr': 'Taryh Kernelleri bilen Umumy Argumentasyny Modellenen Etkisi', 'bs': 'Učinak modela cjelokupne argumentacije sa drvetnim kernelima', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'cs': 'Dopad modelování celkové argumentace s jádrem stromů', 'bn': 'গাছ কেরেন্সের সাথে মডেলিং সার্বভাবে আর্গুমেন্টেশনের প্রভাব', 'az': 'Ağaç Kerneləri ilə bütün Argumentasyonu Modelləndirmək Etkisi', 'fi': 'Kokonaisargumentoinnin mallintamisen vaikutus puuytimellä', 'ca': "L'impacte de modelar l'argumentació global amb els núcles d'arbres", 'et': 'Üldise argumenteerimise modelleerimise mõju puutuumadega', 'jv': 'Kernels Jaring', 'ha': 'Aiki na Nuna Mai Motsi Dukkan Argument na Tree Kernls', 'sk': 'Vpliv modeliranja splošnega argumentacije z drevesnimi jedri', 'he': 'ההשפעה של הדוגמניות התווכחות כללית עם גזרי עץ', 'bo': 'སྡོང་བོའི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་རྟགས་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Several approaches have been proposed to model either the explicit sequential structure of an argumentative text or its implicit hierarchical structure. So far, the adequacy of these models of overall argumentation remains unclear. This paper asks what type of structure is actually important to tackle downstream tasks in computational argumentation. We analyze patterns in the overall argumentation of texts from three corpora. Then, we adapt the idea of positional tree kernels in order to capture sequential and hierarchical argumentative structure together for the first time. In systematic experiments for three text classification tasks, we find strong evidence for the impact of both types of structure. Our results suggest that either of them is necessary while their combination may be beneficial.', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح عدة مناهج لنمذجة إما البنية التسلسلية الصريحة للنص الجدلي أو هيكله الهرمي الضمني. حتى الآن ، ما زالت كفاية هذه النماذج للحجج الشاملة غير واضحة. تسأل هذه الورقة عن نوع الهيكل المهم بالفعل لمعالجة المهام النهائية في الجدل الحسابي. نقوم بتحليل الأنماط في النقاش العام للنصوص من ثلاث مجموعات. بعد ذلك ، نقوم بتكييف فكرة حبات الشجرة الموضعية من أجل التقاط بنية جدلية متسلسلة وهرمية معًا لأول مرة. في التجارب المنهجية لثلاث مهام لتصنيف النص ، وجدنا أدلة قوية على تأثير كلا النوعين من البنية. تشير نتائجنا إلى أن أيًا منهما ضروري بينما قد يكون الجمع بينهما مفيدًا.', 'pt': 'Várias abordagens têm sido propostas para modelar a estrutura sequencial explícita de um texto argumentativo ou sua estrutura hierárquica implícita. Até agora, a adequação desses modelos de argumentação geral permanece obscura. Este artigo pergunta que tipo de estrutura é realmente importante para lidar com tarefas posteriores na argumentação computacional. Analisamos padrões na argumentação global de textos de três corpora. Em seguida, adaptamos a ideia de núcleos de árvores posicionais para capturar a estrutura argumentativa sequencial e hierárquica pela primeira vez. Em experimentos sistemáticos para três tarefas de classificação de texto, encontramos fortes evidências do impacto de ambos os tipos de estrutura. Nossos resultados sugerem que qualquer um deles é necessário, enquanto sua combinação pode ser benéfica.', 'fr': "Plusieurs approches ont été proposées pour modéliser soit la structure séquentielle explicite d'un texte argumentatif, soit sa structure hiérarchique implicite. Jusqu'à présent, l'adéquation de ces modèles d'argumentation globale reste floue. Cet article demande quel type de structure est réellement important pour aborder les tâches en aval dans l'argumentation informatique. Nous analysons les tendances dans l'argumentation globale des textes de trois corpus. Ensuite, nous adaptons l'idée de noyaux d'arbres positionnels afin de capturer ensemble pour la première fois une structure argumentative séquentielle et hiérarchique. Dans des expériences systématiques portant sur trois tâches de classification de texte, nous avons trouvé des preuves solides de l'impact des deux types de structure. Nos résultats suggèrent que l'un ou l'autre est nécessaire alors que leur combinaison peut être bénéfique.", 'es': 'Se han propuesto varios enfoques para modelar la estructura secuencial explícita de un texto argumentativo o su estructura jerárquica implícita. Hasta ahora, la adecuación de estos modelos de argumentación general sigue sin estar clara. En este artículo se pregunta qué tipo de estructura es realmente importante para abordar las tareas posteriores en la argumentación computacional. Analizamos patrones en la argumentación general de textos de tres cuerpos. Luego, adaptamos la idea de los núcleos de árboles posicionales para capturar juntos por primera vez la estructura argumentativa secuencial y jerárquica. En experimentos sistemáticos para tres tareas de clasificación de textos, encontramos pruebas sólidas del impacto de ambos tipos de estructura. Nuestros resultados sugieren que cualquiera de ellos es necesario, mientras que su combinación puede ser beneficiosa.', 'ja': '引数テキストの明示的な順序構造またはその暗黙的な階層構造のいずれかをモデル化するためのいくつかのアプローチが提案されている。現在のところ、これらのモデルの総合的な議論の妥当性は不明である。この論文では、計算論証における下流のタスクに取り組むために、実際にどのような構造が重要かを問います。3つのコーパスからのテキストの全体的な議論のパターンを分析します。そして、シーケンシャルおよび階層的な引数構造を初めて一緒に取り込むために、位置ツリーカーネルのアイデアを適応させます。3つのテキスト分類タスクのための体系的な実験では、両方のタイプの構造の影響の強力な証拠を発見します。私たちの結果は、それらの組み合わせが有益である一方で、それらのいずれかが必要であることを示唆しています。', 'zh': '已建数法模拟论证文本显式次第构隐式层次结构。 至于目前为止,总体论证之充分性未详也。 本文探讨了哪种结构于决定计算论证中的下流实重。 析三语料库文本论式。 然后调其树核名,以次论结。 三文实验中,见二证也。 吾之治结果表明,其一必矣,其合可得而益也。', 'ru': 'Было предложено несколько подходов для моделирования либо явной последовательной структуры аргументативного текста, либо его имплицитной иерархической структуры. До сих пор адекватность этих моделей общей аргументации остается неясной. В этой статье задается вопрос о том, какой тип структуры на самом деле важен для решения последующих задач в вычислительной аргументации. Мы анализируем закономерности в общей аргументации текстов из трех корпусов. Затем мы адаптируем идею ядра позиционного дерева, чтобы впервые захватить последовательную и иерархическую аргументативную структуру вместе. В систематических экспериментах по трем задачам классификации текста мы находим убедительные доказательства влияния обоих типов структуры. Наши результаты показывают, что любой из них необходим, в то время как их сочетание может быть полезным.', 'hi': 'एक तर्कसंगत पाठ की स्पष्ट अनुक्रमिक संरचना या इसकी अंतर्निहित पदानुक्रमित संरचना को मॉडल करने के लिए कई दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं। अब तक, समग्र तर्क के इन मॉडलों की पर्याप्तता अस्पष्ट बनी हुई है। यह पेपर पूछता है कि कम्प्यूटेशनल तर्क में डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों से निपटने के लिए किस प्रकार की संरचना वास्तव में महत्वपूर्ण है। हम तीन कॉर्पोरेट से ग्रंथों के समग्र तर्क में पैटर्न का विश्लेषण करते हैं। फिर, हम पहली बार अनुक्रमिक और पदानुक्रमित तर्कसंगत संरचना को एक साथ कैप्चर करने के लिए स्थितीय पेड़ गुठली के विचार को अनुकूलित करते हैं। तीन पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों के लिए व्यवस्थित प्रयोगों में, हमें दोनों प्रकार की संरचना के प्रभाव के लिए मजबूत सबूत मिलते हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि उनमें से कोई भी आवश्यक है जबकि उनका संयोजन फायदेमंद हो सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tá roinnt cur chuige molta chun struchtúr seicheamhach follasach téacs argóinteach nó a struchtúr ordlathach intuigthe a shamhaltú. Go dtí seo, níl leorgacht na múnlaí argóinte foriomlána seo soiléir. Fiafraítear sa pháipéar seo cén cineál struchtúir atá fíorthábhachtach chun dul i ngleic le tascanna iartheachtacha san argóint ríomhaireachtúil. Déanaimid anailís ar phatrúin san argóint fhoriomlán ar théacsanna ó thrí chorparáid. Ansin, déanaimid oiriúnú ar an smaoineamh maidir le heithne crann suímh chun struchtúr argóinteach seicheamhach agus ordlathach a ghabháil le chéile den chéad uair. I dturgnaimh chórasacha do thrí thasc aicmithe téacs, aimsímid fianaise láidir ar thionchar an dá chineál struchtúir. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios go bhfuil gá le ceachtar acu cé go bhféadfadh a dteaglaim a bheith tairbheach.', 'hu': 'Számos megközelítést javasoltak egy érvelő szöveg explicit szekvenciális struktúrájának modellezésére vagy implicit hierarchikus struktúrájának modellezésére. Az általános érvelési modellek megfelelősége eddig nem egyértelmű. Ez a tanulmány azt kérdezi, milyen típusú struktúra fontos valójában a downstream feladatok kezeléséhez a számítástechnikai érvelésben. A mintákat elemezzük a három korpusz szövegeinek általános érvelésében. Ezután adaptáljuk a pozíciós famag gondolatát annak érdekében, hogy először együtt rögzítsük a szekvenciális és hierarchikus érvelési struktúrát. Három szövegosztályozási feladatra vonatkozó szisztematikus kísérletekben erőteljes bizonyítékot találunk mindkét típusú struktúra hatására. Eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy bármelyikük szükséges, miközben kombinációjuk előnyös lehet.', 'ka': 'რამდენიმე დახმარება მოძლევულია მოდელისთვის ან არგუმენტიური ტექსტის განსხვავებული სკენტიური სტრუქტურა ან მისი ინფლიციური იერაქტიური სტრუქტურა. მიმდინარე, ამ მოდელების შესაძლებლობა ყველა არგუმენტაციის შესაძლებლობა უცნობიერია. ეს დოკუტურაში მოითხოვს, რა ტიპი სტრუქტურაცია მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ კომპუტურაციონალური არგუმენტაციაში დაკავშიროთ კომპუტურ ჩვენ სამუშაობის ტექსტის სამუშაო არგორმაციაში ანალიზებთ. შემდეგ, ჩვენ პოზიციალური ხელის კერნელის იდეოს აეპტიფიკურებთ, რომ პირველად დავწეროთ სკენტიალური და hiერაქტიკური არგუმენტიური სტრუქტურა ერთად. სამი ტექსტიკური კლასიფიკაციის დავალებისთვის სისტემატიკური ექსპერიმენტებში ჩვენ ძალიან წარმოდგენება ორივე ტიპის სტრუქტურის შედეგის შე ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ოპვეოჲლადაარ, ფვ ვეთნ ჲრ რწჳ ვ ნსზვნ, ეჲკარჲ რწჳ კჲმბთნაუთწ მჲზვ ეა ვ ბვჱოჲლჱთრვლნა.', 'el': 'Έχουν προταθεί διάφορες προσεγγίσεις για την μοντελοποίηση είτε της ρητής διαδοχικής δομής ενός επιχειρηματολογικού κειμένου είτε της σιωπηρής ιεραρχικής δομής του. Μέχρι στιγμής, η επάρκεια αυτών των μοντέλων γενικής επιχειρηματολογίας παραμένει ασαφής. Η παρούσα εργασία ρωτά ποιο είδος δομής είναι πραγματικά σημαντικό για την αντιμετώπιση μεταγενέστερων εργασιών στην υπολογιστική επιχειρηματολογία. Αναλύουμε μοτίβα στη συνολική επιχειρηματολογία κειμένων από τρία σώματα. Στη συνέχεια, προσαρμόζουμε την ιδέα των πυρήνων δέντρου θέσης, προκειμένου να συλλάβουμε διαδοχική και ιεραρχική επιχειρηματολογική δομή μαζί για πρώτη φορά. Σε συστηματικά πειράματα για τρεις εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένων, βρίσκουμε ισχυρά στοιχεία για την επίδραση και των δύο τύπων δομών. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι οποιοδήποτε από αυτά είναι απαραίτητο ενώ ο συνδυασμός τους μπορεί να είναι ευεργετικός.', 'it': "Diversi approcci sono stati proposti per modellare la struttura sequenziale esplicita di un testo argomentativo o la sua struttura gerarchica implicita. Finora, l'adeguatezza di questi modelli di argomentazione generale rimane incerta. Questo articolo chiede quale tipo di struttura è effettivamente importante per affrontare compiti a valle nell'argomentazione computazionale. Analizziamo modelli nell'argomentazione generale dei testi di tre corpora. Quindi, adattiamo l'idea di kernel di albero posizionali al fine di catturare insieme per la prima volta la struttura argomentativa sequenziale e gerarchica. In esperimenti sistematici per tre compiti di classificazione del testo, troviamo forti prove dell'impatto di entrambi i tipi di struttura. I nostri risultati suggeriscono che uno di essi è necessario mentre la loro combinazione può essere utile.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше аргументтік мәтін немесе негізгі иерархиялық құрылғының түсінікті түсінікті құрылғысын үлгілеу үшін ұсынылды. Бұл үлгілер жалпы аргументация үлгілерінің адекциясы білмейді. Бұл қағаз компьютер аргументациясындағы тапсырмаларды қалай құрылғының түрі маңызды деп сұрады. Біз үш корпорадан жалпы мәтін аргументінің үлкен үлгілерін анализирақ. Содан кейін бірінші рет бойынша және иерархикалық аргументациялық құрылғыны түсіру үшін бойынша ағаш қыршақтарының идеясын адаптап тастаймыз. Үш мәтін классификациялау тапсырмаларының жүйелік тәжірибелерінде екі түрлерінің құрылымының әсері үшін күшті құпия табылады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз олардың екеуі қажетті болуы мүмкін.', 'lt': 'Buvo pasiūlyta taikyti keletą metodų, pagal kuriuos būtų modeliuojama aiški argumentacinio teksto eilinė struktūra arba jo netiesioginė hierarchinė struktūra. Iki šiol šių bendrų argumentų modelių tinkamumas vis dar neaiškus. Šiame dokumente klausiama, kokios struktūros iš tikrųjų yra svarbios siekiant spręsti tolesnes užduotis skaičiavimo argumentuose. Analizuojame trijų korporų tekstų argumentavimo modelius. Tada pritaikome pozicinių medžio branduolių idėją, kad pirmą kartą surinktume eilinę ir hierarchinę argumentacinę struktūrą. Atliekant sisteminius bandymus dėl trijų tekstų klasifikavimo užduočių, turime tvirtų įrodymų dėl abiejų tipų struktūros poveikio. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad bet kuri iš jų yra būtina, o jų derinys gali būti naudingas.', 'mk': 'Неколку пристапи се предложени за моделирање на експлицитната секвенцијална структура на аргументативен текст или нејзината имплицитна хиерархиска структура. Досега, соодветноста на овие модели на целокупната аргументација останува нејасна. Овој документ прашува кој вид на структура е всушност важен за решавање на понатамошните задачи во компјутерската аргументација. Ние ги анализираме шемите во целокупната аргументација на текстовите од три капори. Потоа, ја адаптираме идејата за позиционални дрвја јадра со цел да ја фатиме секвенцијалната и хиерархичната аргументативна структура заедно за прв пат. In systematic experiments for three text classification tasks, we find strong evidence for the impact of both types of structure.  Нашите резултати покажуваат дека било кој од нив е неопходен додека нивната комбинација може да биде корисна.', 'ms': 'Beberapa pendekatan telah diusulkan untuk model sama ada struktur sekuensi eksplicit teks argumensif atau struktur hierarkis implicit. Sejauh ini, keperluan model ini dari argumen keseluruhan masih tidak jelas. Kertas ini bertanya jenis struktur apa yang sebenarnya penting untuk menangani tugas turun dalam argumen pengiraan. We analyze patterns in the overall argumentation of texts from three corpora.  Kemudian, kita menyesuaikan idea kernel pokok kedudukan untuk menangkap struktur argumentatif urutan dan hierarkis bersama-sama untuk pertama kalinya. In systematic experiments for three text classification tasks, we find strong evidence for the impact of both types of structure.  Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa salah satu daripada mereka diperlukan sementara kombinasi mereka mungkin berguna.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റിറ്റീവ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അതിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഹീറാരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഘടനയുടെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ഇതുവരെ ഈ മൊത്തം തര്\u200dക്കിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ മതിയാണ് വ്യക്തമായിരിക്കുന്നത്. This paper asks what type of structure is actually important to tackle downstream tasks in computational argumentation.  മൂന്നു കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളുടെ മൊത്തം വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷത്തിന്\u200dറെ കെര്\u200dണലുകളുടെ ആശയം മാറ്റുന്നു. ആദ്യമായി ആദ്യം ഒരുമിച്ച് ആദ്യം കൂടി  മൂന്നു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് സിസ്റ്റമിക്കല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമുക്ക് രണ്ട് തരം തരത്തിലുള് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു, അവരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ആരെയും ആവശ്യമാണെന്ന്.', 'no': 'Dei fleire tilnærmingane er foreslått å modellere anten eksplisitt sekvensisk struktur av ein argumentativ tekst eller den implisitte hierarkiske strukturen. Til dag er adekviteten av desse modelane av overalt argumentasjon uventa. Denne papiret spør kva type strukturen er faktisk viktig for å handsama nedstrømmeoppgåver i datamaskina. Vi analyserer mønsterelement i den generelle argumentasjonen av tekstar frå tre korpora. Så tilpassar vi ideen om posisjonelle trekjerner for å henta sekvensielle og hierarkiske argumentativ struktur sammen for første gang. I systematiske eksperimenter for tre tekstklassifikasjonsprogrammer finn vi sterke beviser for effekten av begge typar struktur. Resultatet våre tyder på at eitt av dei er nødvendig mens kombinasjonen sine kan vera nyttig.', 'pl': 'Zaproponowano kilka podejść do modelowania wyraźnej struktury sekwencyjnej tekstu argumentatywnego lub jego ukrytej struktury hierarchicznej. Do tej pory adekwatność tych modeli ogólnej argumentacji pozostaje niejasna. W artykule zadawano pytanie, jaki rodzaj struktury jest rzeczywiście ważny do rozwiązywania dalszych zadań w argumentacji obliczeniowej. Analizujemy wzorce w ogólnej argumentacji tekstów z trzech korpusów. Następnie dostosowujemy ideę jądra drzewa pozycjonalnego, aby po raz pierwszy uchwycić sekwencyjną i hierarchiczną strukturę argumentacyjną. W systematycznych eksperymentach dla trzech zadań klasyfikacji tekstów znajdujemy silne dowody na wpływ obu typów struktury. Nasze wyniki sugerują, że każdy z nich jest konieczny, a ich połączenie może być korzystne.', 'mn': 'Зарим арга баримтын тодорхой бүтцийг загварчлахын тулд хэд хэдэн арга баримтыг санал болгож байна. Одоогийн үед эдгээр загваруудын адилхан загвар нь тодорхой байдаг. Энэ цаас компьютерийн аргументын доорх үйл ажиллагааг зохиохын тулд ямар төрлийн бүтэц чухал вэ гэдгийг асуудаг. Бид гурван корпораос гарсан бичиг баримтуудын нийт аргументаар дүрслэгддэг. Дараа нь бид анхны удаа дараагийн болон дүрслэлийн аргументын бүтэц хамтдаа байрлалтай модны цэцэгүүдийн санааг зохицуулдаг. Хоёр төрлийн бүтээгдэхүүний нөлөө үзүүлэх систематикийн туршилтууд бид хүчтэй баталгаа олж байна. Бидний үр дүн нь тэдний хоёр нь хэрэгтэй гэдгийг сануулдаг. Тэдний холбоотой нь ашигтай байж магадгүй.', 'ro': 'Au fost propuse mai multe abordări pentru a modela fie structura secvențială explicită a unui text argumentativ, fie structura ierarhică implicită a acestuia. Până în prezent, caracterul adecvat al acestor modele de argumentare generală rămâne neclar. Această lucrare întreabă ce tip de structură este de fapt important pentru abordarea sarcinilor din aval în argumentarea computațională. Analizăm modele în argumentarea generală a textelor din trei corpore. Apoi, adaptăm ideea de sâmburi de copac poziționale pentru a capta împreună structura argumentativă secvențială și ierarhică pentru prima dată. În experimentele sistematice pentru trei sarcini de clasificare a textelor, găsim dovezi puternice pentru impactul ambelor tipuri de structură. Rezultatele noastre sugerează că oricare dintre ele este necesar în timp ce combinația lor poate fi benefică.', 'sr': 'Предлаган је неколико подхода за модел или експризитне последователне структуре аргументивного текста или њене импулитне хиерархическе структуре. Do sada, adekvatnost ovih modela ukupne argumentacije ostaje neobična. Ovaj papir pita kakva je vrsta strukture zapravo važna za rješavanje potpunih zadataka u kompjuterskoj argumentaciji. Analiziramo obrasce u ukupnoj argumentaciji teksta iz tri korporacije. Onda prilagodimo ideju pozicionalnih kernela drveta kako bi prvi put uhvatili sekvencijsku i hijerarhičku argumentativnu strukturu zajedno. U sistematičkim eksperimentima za tri klasifikacije teksta nalazimo jake dokaze za utjecaj obje vrste strukture. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da je bilo koji od njih neophodan dok njihova kombinacija može biti korisna.', 'si': 'කිහිපයක් අවස්ථාවක් සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණ පාළුවක් නැත්තම් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ පරීක්ෂණ සංයූ දැනටමත්, මේ මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ. මේ පත්තර පුළුවන් අහනවා ඇත්තටම මොන වර්ගයක් හරි වැදගත් වෙන්නේ කියලා පණිවිඩයේ පණිවිඩයේ වැඩ කරන් අපි කොර්පෝරා තුන්ගෙන් පාළුවන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා. ඊට පස්සේ, අපි ස්ථානය ගස් කර්නල් ගැන අදහස් අනුවෙන් පළමුවෙනි වෙලාවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ සංවිධාන පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණාවක් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණ විශේෂණ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණාවක් තියෙන්න, අපිට ප අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙලාව', 'mt': 'Ġew proposti diversi approċċi li jimmudellaw jew l-istruttura sekwenzjali espliċita ta’ test argumentattiv jew l-istruttura ġerarkika impliċita tiegħu. S’issa, l-adegwatezza ta’ dawn il-mudelli ta’ argumentazzjoni ġenerali għadha mhux ċara. Dan id-dokument jistaqsi liema tip ta’ struttura hija effettivament importanti biex jiġu indirizzati l-kompiti downstream fl-argumentazzjoni komputattiva. Aħna nianalizzaw xejriet fl-argumentazzjoni ġenerali tat-testi minn tliet korpi. Imbagħad, aħna nadattaw l-idea tal-qalba tas-siġar pożizzjonali sabiex inqabdu l-istruttura argumentattiva sekwenzjali u ġerarkika flimkien għall-ewwel darba. F’esperimenti sistematiċi għal tliet kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-testi, isibu evidenza qawwija għall-impatt taż-żewġ tipi ta’ struttura. Ir-riżultati tagħna jissuġġerixxu li waħda minnhom hija meħtieġa filwaqt li l-kombinazzjoni tagħhom tista’ tkun ta’ benefiċċju.', 'so': "Waxaa la soo jeeday in loo sameynayo tusaale ahaan dhismaha muuqashada muuqda ee qoraalka warqadda ah ama dhismaha hierarkiisa la xiriira. Hada la joogo, ku filan qaababkan hadalka oo dhan waa sii cad yihiin. Warqaddaas wuxuu weydiinayaa nooca dhismaha ay muhiim u tahay in aad ka qabsato hawlaha hoosta webiga ee ku saabsan heshiiska xisaabta. Waxaynu wax ka baaraynaa noocyada qoraalka oo dhan ee saddex shirkad ka yimid. Markaas waxaynu isbedelinnaa fikrada qoyan oo geed ah si aan u qabno dhismaha hagitaanka xilliga iyo hierarkiisa marka ugu horeysay. Imtixaanka nidaamka ah ee saddex shaqooyin tababarid ah, waxaan helaynaa caddeyn xoog leh oo saameyn ku leh labada nooc oo dhismo ah. Abaalkayaga waxaa loola jeedaa in mid ka mid ah uu u baahan yahay, marka wadajirkoodu ay faa'iido u leeyihiin.", 'sv': 'Flera tillvägagångssätt har föreslagits för att modellera antingen den explicita sekventiella strukturen i en argumenterande text eller dess underförstådda hierarkiska struktur. Hittills är lämpligheten hos dessa modeller för övergripande argumentation oklar. Denna uppsats frågar sig vilken typ av struktur som faktiskt är viktig för att hantera nedströmsuppgifter i beräknings argumentation. Vi analyserar mönster i den övergripande argumentationen av texter från tre korpor. Sedan anpassar vi idén om positionella trädkärnor för att fånga sekventiell och hierarkisk argumentationsstruktur tillsammans för första gången. I systematiska experiment för tre textklassificeringsuppgifter finner vi starka belägg för påverkan av båda typerna av struktur. Våra resultat tyder på att någon av dem är nödvändig medan deras kombination kan vara fördelaktig.', 'ta': 'ஒரு வார்த்தையாட்டு உரையின் வெளிப்படையான பின்னணி அமைப்பை மாதிரிக்க சில வழிகள் அல்லது அதில் உள்ள வெளிப்படையான முறைமை உருவம இந்த மொத்த வாக்காரத்தின் மாதிரிகளின் தேவையான அளவு தெளிவாக இருக்கிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தை கேட்கிறது கணிப்பான வாக்கியத்தில் கீழ்நோக்கி பணிகளை எத்தனை அமைப்பு முக்கியமானது என்று. நாம் மூன்று நிறுவனத்தில் இருந்து உரையாடல் மொத்த வார்த்தைகளை ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம். பிறகு, நாம் நிலையான மரத்தின் கருவிகளை ஏற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம் முதல் முறையாக பிடித்துக் கொள்ள வேண்டிய வார்த்தையாட்டு  மூன்று உரை வகுப்பு பணிகளுக்கான முறைமையான சோதனைகளில், நாம் கட்டுமையின் விளைவுகளுக்கு உறுதியான ஆதாரங்களை கண்டு நம்முடைய முடிவுகள் அவைகளில் ஒன்று தேவையானது என்று தெரிவிக்கிறது அவர்களுடைய இணைப்பு பயன்படும் போது.', 'ur': 'بہت سی طریقے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں کہ ایک دلیل کے متن یا اس کی مختلف طریقے کی مدل کریں یا اس کی مختلف طریقے کی تصویر کریں. یہاں تک، ان سارے بحث کی مدلکوں کی adequacy نہیں ہے۔ یہ کاغذ پوچھتا ہے کہ کس طرح کی ساختار واقعی ضرورت ہے کہ کمپیوٹریشن ارڈمنٹ میں ڈونسٹریم کے کاموں کو حل کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم تین کورپور سے پیغام کے سارے بحث میں بحث کرتے ہیں۔ پھر ہم پہلی بار ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ سفارشی اور سفارشی جھگڑنے کی ساختار کو پکڑنے کے لئے موقعیت درخت کرنل کی نظر اضافہ کرتے ہیں. تین ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کے کاموں کے لئے سیستمائی آزمائش میں، ہم دونوں جوڑوں کی تأثیر کے لئے قوی دلیل پاتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے یہ سمجھتے ہیں کہ ان میں سے دونوں ضروری ہے اور ان کی ترکیب فائدہ بھی ہو سکتی ہے', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik usullari argumentative matnning bir xil qisqa tuzuvni yoki uning muhim hierarchik structuriyasini modellash uchun talab qilindi. So far, the adequacy of these models of overall argumentation remains unclear.  Bu qogʻoz kompyuterning murakkablarida qanday tuzuvlar muhim bo'lgan narsalarni talab qiladi. Biz uchta kompaniyadan barcha matnlar haqida o'zgarishni analyzemiz. Keyin biz birinchi marta birinchi marta o'rganish va hierarchik argumentlar tizimini birga qo'yish uchun tasavvur qilamiz. Uch matn darajalashtirish vazifalari uchun tizim tizim tajribalarida, biz ikkita tuzil turlarining effekti uchun juda katta hujjatni topamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz ularning birinchisi kerakligi kerak. Ularning birikmasi foydali bo'lishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Đã có nhiều phương pháp được đề nghị mô hình cấu trúc theo chuỗi dạng rõ ràng của một văn bản luận văn hay cấu trúc cấp dưới ngầm của nó. Cho tới nay, mức độ xứng đáng của các mô hình luận lý tổng hợp vẫn chưa rõ. Tờ giấy này đề nghị xem loại cấu trúc nào thực sự quan trọng để giải quyết các công việc xuôi dòng trong chương trình đo tính. Chúng tôi phân tích các mô hình trong các chương trình luận văn bản từ ba hạ sĩ. Sau đó, chúng ta điều chỉnh ý tưởng về các hạt nhân cây vị trí để lần đầu tiên nắm bắt các cấu trúc nhà khoa học theo quy trình. Trong các thử nghiệm có hệ thống ba việc phân loại văn bản, chúng tôi tìm được chứng cứ mạnh mẽ về tác động của hai loại cấu trúc. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy một trong hai là cần thiết, trong khi sự kết hợp của chúng có thể hữu ích.', 'bg': 'Предложени са няколко подхода за моделиране или на експлицитната последователна структура на аргументативен текст, или на имплицитната йерархична структура. Досега адекватността на тези модели на цялостна аргументация остава неясна. Тази статия пита какъв тип структура е всъщност важна за справяне с задачите надолу по веригата в изчислителната аргументация. Анализираме модели в цялостната аргументация на текстове от три корпора. След това адаптираме идеята за позиционни дървесни ядра, за да уловим последователната и йерархичната аргументативна структура заедно за първи път. При систематични експерименти за три задачи за класификация на текста откриваме силни доказателства за въздействието и на двата вида структури. Нашите резултати предполагат, че всеки от тях е необходим, докато комбинацията им може да бъде полезна.', 'nl': 'Er zijn verschillende benaderingen voorgesteld om ofwel de expliciete sequentiële structuur van een argumentatieve tekst ofwel de impliciete hiërarchische structuur ervan te modelleren. Tot nu toe is de adequaatheid van deze modellen van algemene argumentatie onduidelijk. Dit artikel vraagt welk type structuur eigenlijk belangrijk is om downstreamtaken in computationele argumentatie aan te pakken. We analyseren patronen in de algehele argumentatie van teksten uit drie corpora. Vervolgens passen we het idee van positieboomkernels aan om sequentiële en hiërarchische argumentatieve structuur samen voor het eerst vast te leggen. In systematische experimenten voor drie tekstclassificatietaken vinden we sterk bewijs voor de impact van beide soorten structuur. Onze resultaten suggereren dat elk van hen noodzakelijk is, terwijl hun combinatie nuttig kan zijn.', 'da': 'Flere tilgange er blevet foreslået til at modellere enten den eksplicitte sekventielle struktur af en argumenterende tekst eller dens implicitte hierarkiske struktur. Indtil videre er tilstrækkeligheden af disse modeller for overordnet argumentation stadig uklar. Denne artikel spørger, hvilken type struktur der faktisk er vigtig for at tackle downstream opgaver i beregningsmæssig argumentation. Vi analyserer mønstre i den overordnede argumentation af tekster fra tre korpora. Derefter tilpasser vi ideen om positionerede trækerner for at fange sekventiel og hierarkisk argumentationsstruktur sammen for første gang. I systematiske eksperimenter med tre tekstklassifikationsopgaver finder vi stærke beviser for virkningen af begge typer struktur. Vores resultater tyder på, at en af dem er nødvendig, mens deres kombination kan være gavnlig.', 'id': 'Beberapa pendekatan telah diusulkan untuk model sama ada struktur sekuensi eksplicit dari teks argumensif atau struktur hierarkis implicit. So far, the adequacy of these models of overall argumentation remains unclear.  Kertas ini bertanya jenis struktur apa yang sebenarnya penting untuk mengatasi tugas turun dalam argumen komputasi. Kami menganalisis pola dalam keseluruhan argumen teks dari tiga korpora. Kemudian, kita menyesuaikan ide dari kernel pohon posisional untuk menangkap struktur argumentatif sekuensial dan hierarkis bersama-sama untuk pertama kalinya. Dalam eksperimen sistematis untuk tiga tugas klasifikasi teks, kami menemukan bukti yang kuat untuk dampak kedua jenis struktur. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa salah satu dari mereka diperlukan sementara kombinasi mereka mungkin berguna.', 'de': 'Es wurden verschiedene Ansätze vorgeschlagen, um entweder die explizite sequenzielle Struktur eines argumentativen Textes oder seine implizite hierarchische Struktur zu modellieren. Bisher ist die Angemessenheit dieser Modelle der Gesamtargumentation unklar. Dieser Beitrag fragt, welche Art von Struktur tatsächlich wichtig ist, um nachgelagerte Aufgaben in der computergestützten Argumentation anzugehen. Wir analysieren Muster in der Gesamtargumentation von Texten aus drei Korpora. Anschließend passen wir die Idee der Positionsbaumkernel an, um sequentielle und hierarchische Argumentationsstrukturen erstmals gemeinsam zu erfassen. In systematischen Experimenten für drei Textklassifikationsaufgaben finden wir starke Hinweise auf die Auswirkungen beider Strukturtypen. Unsere Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass eine von ihnen notwendig ist, während ihre Kombination vorteilhaft sein kann.', 'sw': 'Matokeo kadhaa yamependekezwa kuonyesha muundo wa wazi wa mfumo wa maandishi ya hoja au muundo wake wa kiuchumi. Mpaka sasa, usawa wa mifano hii ya mazungumzo ya jumla bado si wazi. This paper asks what type of structure is actually important to tackle downstream tasks in computational argumentation.  Tunafanya uchambuzi katika mazungumzo ya jumla ya maandishi kutoka makampuni matatu. Kisha, tunabadilisha wazo la vifaa vya miti vizuri ili kuikamata muundo wa mazungumzo yaliyofuata na mijadala kwa mara ya kwanza. Katika majaribio ya mfumo kwa kazi tatu za usambazaji wa maandishi, tunapata ushahidi wenye nguvu kwa athari ya aina mbili za muundo. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa moja kati yao ni muhimu wakati muungano wao unaweza kuwa na faida.', 'ko': '사람들은 이미 몇 가지 방법을 제시하여 논문의 현식 순서 구조나 은식 차원 구조를 모의하였다.지금까지 이 전체 논증 모델의 충분성은 아직 명확하지 않다.본고는 계산 논증에서 어떤 구조가 하류 임무를 해결하는 데 진정으로 중요한지 탐구했다.우리는 세 개의 자료 라이브러리에서 텍스트 전체 논증의 모델을 분석했다.그리고 우리는 위치수핵의 사상을 채택하여 처음으로 순서와 차원의 변론 구조를 결합시켰다.세 가지 텍스트 분류 임무의 시스템 실험에서 우리는 두 가지 구조의 영향에 대한 유력한 증거를 발견했다.우리의 연구 결과에 의하면, 둘 다 필요한 것이고, 그것들의 결합은 유익할 수도 있다.', 'hr': 'Predloženo je nekoliko pristupa za modelu ili pojasnu sekvencijsku strukturu argumentativnog teksta ili njegove implicitne hijerarhijske strukture. Do sada, adekvatnost ovih modela ukupne argumentacije još uvijek nije jasna. Ovaj papir pita kakva je vrsta strukture zapravo važna za rješavanje potpunih zadataka u računalnoj argumentaciji. Analiziramo obrasce u ukupnoj argumentaciji teksta iz tri korporacije. Onda prilagodimo ideju pozicionalnih kernela drveta kako bi prvi put uhvatili sekvencijsku i hijerarhičku argumentativnu strukturu zajedno. U sistematičkim eksperimentima za tri zadatka klasifikacije teksta nalazimo jake dokaze za utjecaj obje vrste strukture. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da je bilo koji od njih neophodan dok njihova kombinacija može biti korisna.', 'fa': 'چندتا دستور پیشنهاد شده که برای مدل ساختار مخصوص یک متن مثالی یا ساختار مخصوص مخصوص آن مدل کند. تا حالا، قابليت اين مدل هاي کلي بحث ها مشخص نيست. این کاغذ سؤال می\u200cکند که چه نوع ساختار در واقع مهم است برای حل کار های پایین در توضیح محاسبه. ما الگوها را در کل بحث متن\u200cهای سه شرکت تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. سپس، ما ایده\u200cی کرن\u200cهای درخت موقعیت را برای اولین بار برای گرفتن ساختار مکالمه\u200cهای سفارشی و سفارشی با هم تغییر می\u200cدهیم. در تجربه\u200cهای سیستماتیک برای سه وظیفه\u200cی مختصات متن، مدرک قوی برای تاثیر هر دو نوع ساختار پیدا می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که هر کدام از آنها نیازمند است در حالی که ترکیب آنها ممکن است سودمند باشد.', 'af': "Verskeie toegang is voorgestel om die eksplisiese sekwensiele struktuur van 'n argumentatiewe teks of sy inplisite hierarkiese struktuur te model. Toe toe, die adekuasie van hierdie modele van die hele argumentasie bly onbekend. Hierdie papier vra wat tipe struktuur is eintlik belangrik om onderstreem opdragte in rekenaar argumentasie te trek. Ons analiseer patrone in die hele argumentasie van tekste van drie korpora. Dan, ons adapteer die idee van posisionele boom kernels om sekwensiele en hierarkiese argumentatiewe struktuur saam te vang vir die eerste keer. In sistematiese eksperimente vir drie teks klassifikasie taak, vind ons sterk getuienis vir die effek van beide tipes struktuur. Ons resultate stel voorstel dat enige van hulle nodig is terwyl hulle kombinasie voordeel kan wees.", 'sq': 'Disa qasje janë propozuar për të modeluar ose strukturën ekzekuenciale eksplicite të një teksti argumentues ose strukturën e saj hierarkike implicite. So far, the adequacy of these models of overall argumentation remains unclear.  Kjo letër pyet se çfarë lloj strukture është në fakt e rëndësishme për të trajtuar detyrat poshtë rrjedhës në argumentet kompjuterike. Ne analizojmë modelet në argumentet e përgjithshme të teksteve nga tre korpra. Pastaj, ne përshtatemi idenë e bërthamës pozitive të pemës me qëllim që të kapim strukturën sekuencuese dhe hierarkike argumentuese së bashku për herë të parë. Në eksperimente sistematike për tre detyra klasifikuese teksti, gjejmë prova të forta për ndikimin e të dy tipeve të strukturës. Our results suggest that either of them is necessary while their combination may be beneficial.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe gollanşyk görkezildi ýa-da görkezilişi metin ýa-da görkezilişi hijerarhiýa strukturuny nusgala etmek üçin teklip edildi. Şimdiye kadar, bu bütün tartışma modellerinin yeterliği açık da değildir. Bu kagyz maňa haýsy ýagdaýyň düşürmek üçin nähili strukturyň has möhümdigini soraýar. Üç korporadan metin tüm tartışmasında örnekleri çözüyoruz. Sonra, birinji gezek soňky we hijerarşik pikirleri birleştirmek üçin ýerleşýän agaç kerneleriniň pikirini üýtgederis. 3 metin klasifikasiýasynyň täsiri üçin sistematik deneylerde, biz her iki tipiň strukturyň täsiri üçin güýçli kanıtlary tapýarys. Näme netijelerimiz olaryň ikisi hemmesi gerekli bolandygyny maslahat berýär.', 'bn': 'বেশ কয়েকটি পদক্ষেপ প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে যে কোন যুক্তিগত টেক্সটের ব্যাপারে পরিস্কারিত কাঠামোর মডেল করা হয় অথবা তার প্রাপ্ত হি এদিকে পর্যন্ত, সাধারণ যুক্তির মডেলের যথেষ্ট পরিষ্কার। এই প্রবন্ধটি জিজ্ঞেস করেছে যে কোন ধরনের কাঠামো আসলেই নিচে যাওয়ার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। আমরা তিনটি কর্পোরা থেকে টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে বিশ্লেষণ করি। তারপর আমরা ইতিবাচক গাছের কার্নেলের ধারণাকে প্রথমবারের জন্য একসাথে আটকে রাখার জন্য। তিন টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশন কাজের জন্য সিস্টেমিক পরীক্ষায়, আমরা দুটো ধরনের কাঠামোর প্রভাবের জন্য শক্তিশালী প্রমাণ প Our results suggest that either of them is necessary while their combination may be beneficial.', 'am': 'ብዙዎች ተቃውሞ የግልፅ አካባቢ ጽሑፍ ወይም የግልፅ አዳራሲ መሠረት ማሳየት ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ የዚህ ሙሉ ክርክር ምሳሌዎች ብልሃት ግን አይታወቅም፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም ከውጭው ውስጥም ስራዎችን ለመቀናቀል ምን ዓይነት እንደሆነ ይጠይቃል፡፡ ከሦስት ኮፖርት የጽሑፎችን ውይይት እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ በኋላም የዛፍ የኩነቶች አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና የመጀመሪያ ተግባር አካባቢዎችን ለመያዝ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በሦስት የጽሑፍ ክፍል ስራዎችን በሥርዓት ፈተናዎች ውስጥ የሁለቱን ዓይነት ክፍል የሚያስፈልገውን ብርቱ ማስረጃ እናገኛለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን ማንኛቸው የሚጠቅመው ሲሆን ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Շատ մոտեցումներ են առաջարկվել կամ բանավեճող տեքստի բացատրական հաջորդականության կառուցվածքի մոդելավորման համար, կամ դրա ենթարկված հիերարխիկ կառուցվածքի համար: Այս ընդհանուր բանավեճի մոդելների բավարարությունը դեռևս անհասկանալի է: Այս հոդվածը հարցնում է, թե ինչ տեսակի կառուցվածք է իրականում կարևոր հաշվարկվող բանավեճերի մեջ վերաբերվելու համար: Մենք վերլուծում ենք երեք մարմնի տեքստների ընդհանուր բանավեճի կաղապարները: Այնուհետև մենք հարմարեցնում ենք ծառի դիրքավորման միջուկների գաղափարը, որպեսզի առաջին անգամ միասին վերցնենք հաջորդական և հիերարխիկ բանավեճող կառուցվածքը: Երեք տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների սիստեմատիկ փորձարկումներում մենք գտնում ենք ուժեղ ապացույցներ երկու տեսակի կառուցվածքի ազդեցության մասին: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ դրանցից յուրաքանչյուրը անհրաժեշտ է, մինչդեռ նրանց համադրումը կարող է օգտակար լինել:', 'az': 'Bir neçə tərəflər müəyyən edilmişdir ya argumentativ metin, ya da müəyyən hiyerarşik quruluğunun açıq-aydın sonrakı quruluğunu model etmək üçün. Şimdiye qədər, bütün argumentlərin modellərin uyğunluğu açıq deyildir. Bu kağıt bilgisayar arqümanlarında nə növ strukturya həqiqətən nə cür möhüm olduğunu soruşur. Üç korporadan yazılmış mətnlərin bütün müzakirələrində örtükləri analiz edirik. Sonra, ilk dəfə birlikdə yerli ağaç çörəklərinin fikrini uydurduq ki, sıradan və hiyerarşik argumentativ strukturlarını birlikdə tutmaq üçün. Üç metin klasifikasyonu işlərinin sistematik təcrübələrində, ikisinin strukturların etkisi üçün qüvvətli dəlillər tapırıq. Bizim sonuçlarımız hər ikisinin birləşdirilməsi faydalı olaraq lazımdır.', 'bs': 'Predloženo je nekoliko pristupa da bi modeliralo pojasnu sekvencijsku strukturu argumentativnog teksta ili njegovu implicitnu hijerarhičku strukturu. Za sada, adekvatnost ovih modela ukupne argumentacije ostaje nesvjesna. Ovaj papir pita kakva je vrsta strukture zapravo važna za rješavanje potpunih zadataka u računalnoj argumentaciji. Analiziramo obrasce u ukupnoj argumentaciji teksta iz tri korporacije. Onda se prilagođavamo ideji položajnih kernela drveta kako bi prvi put uhvatili sekvencijsku i hijerarhičku argumentativnu strukturu zajedno. U sistematičkim eksperimentima za tri zadatka klasifikacije teksta nalazimo jake dokaze za utjecaj obje vrste strukture. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da je bilo koji od njih neophodno dok njihova kombinacija može biti korisna.', 'cs': 'Bylo navrženo několik přístupů k modelování explicitní sekvenční struktury argumentativního textu nebo jeho implicitní hierarchické struktury. Přiměřenost těchto modelů celkové argumentace zatím zůstává nejasná. Tento článek se ptá, jaký typ struktury je skutečně důležitý pro řešení následných úkolů ve výpočetní argumentaci. Analyzujeme vzorce v celkové argumentaci textů ze tří korpusů. Následně upravujeme myšlenku pozičních stromů, abychom poprvé společně zachytili sekvenční a hierarchickou argumentativní strukturu. V systematických experimentech pro tři úlohy klasifikace textů nalezneme silné důkazy o vlivu obou typů struktury. Naše výsledky naznačují, že jeden z nich je nezbytný, zatímco jejich kombinace může být prospěšná.', 'ca': "S'han proposat diversos enfocaments per modelar o l'estructura seqüencial explícita d'un text argumentatiu o la seva estructura jeràrquica implícita. Fins ara, l'adequació d'aquests models d'argumentació global encara no és clara. Aquest article pregunta quin tipus d'estructura és realment important per abordar tasques avall en l'argumentació computacional. Analitzem patrons en l'argumentació global dels textos de tres corpores. Després, adaptem la idea de núcles d'arbre positius per capturar per primera vegada l'estructura argumentativa seqüencial i jeràrquica. En experiments sistemàtics per tres tasques de classificació de textos, trobem fortes proves de l'impacte dels dos tipus d'estructura. Els nostres resultats suggereixen que qualsevol d'ells és necessari mentre la seva combinació pot ser beneficiosa.", 'et': 'On välja pakutud mitmeid lähenemisviise, et modelleerida kas argumentatiivse teksti selgesõnalist järjestikust struktuuri või selle kaudset hierarhilist struktuuri. Seni on nende üldise argumenteerimise mudelite piisavus ebaselge. Käesolevas dokumendis küsitakse, millist tüüpi struktuur on tegelikult oluline järgmiste ülesannete lahendamiseks arvutuslikus argumenteerimises. Analüüsime mustreid kolmest korpusest pärit tekstide üldises argumentatsioonis. Seejärel kohandame positsioonipuu tuumade ideed, et esimest korda koos jäädvustada järjestikune ja hierarhiline argumentatiivne struktuur. Kolme teksti klassifitseerimisülesande süstemaatilistes eksperimentides leiame tugevaid tõendeid mõlemat tüüpi struktuuri mõju kohta. Meie tulemused näitavad, et kumbki neist on vajalik, samas kui nende kombinatsioon võib olla kasulik.', 'fi': 'Argumentatiivisen tekstin eksplisiittisen peräkkäisen rakenteen tai implisiittisen hierarkkisen rakenteen mallintamiseen on ehdotettu useita lähestymistapoja. Tähän mennessä näiden yleisen argumentoinnin mallien riittävyys on edelleen epäselvä. Tässä artikkelissa kysytään, minkälainen rakenne on todella tärkeää laskennallisen argumentoinnin loppupään tehtävissä. Analysoimme kolmen korporan tekstien kokonaisargumentoinnin malleja. Tämän jälkeen mukautamme ideaa paikkapuuytimestä, jotta voimme kuvata peräkkäisen ja hierarkkisen argumentatiivisen rakenteen yhdessä ensimmäistä kertaa. Kolmelle tekstiluokittelutehtävälle tehdyistä systemaattisista kokeista löytyy vahvaa näyttöä molempien rakenteiden vaikutuksesta. Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että jompikumpi niistä on tarpeen, vaikka niiden yhdistelmä voi olla hyödyllistä.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Punika, akeh adalah model iki dadi, akeh sabanjuré awak dhéwé. Laptop" and "Desktop Anyone politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Slacky Rejalaké awakdhéwé ngerasakno kanggo sabané karo hal-sabané iki apa bener.', 'ha': "An buƙata wasu hanyõyi dõmin a motsar ko wani matsayin bayani na bayani na wani matsayin da ake yi musu magana ko da shi na ƙunsa da hierorchical. Ga yanzu, ma'ishin waɗannan misãlai na samun jayayya yana da baya. Wannan takardan yana tambaya nau'in rubutu ne da muhimu zuwa ka yi haɗa aikin downstram cikin muhimmin da za'a lissafa. Ana anayya misãlai a cikin jumla da ke faɗi takardar littafa daga makampuni uku. Sa'an nan kuma, za mu sami idãnar kernel na itãce na matabbata dõmin mu kãma bakin da na bakwai da bakwai masu husũma ta farkon. Aka cikin jarrabo na'ura wa aikin matsayin turu uku, za'a sãmu shaidar mai ƙarfi wa matsayin biyu. MatamayinMu na gaya cewa ɗayansu da ake bukãta a lokacin da komahansu ya kasance mai amfani.", 'he': 'הציעו מספר גישות כדי לדוגמא או את מבנה רצפי המפורסם של טקסט טועני או את מבנה הייררכי המפורסם שלו. עד כה, התאימה של הדוגמנים האלה של טיעון כללי נשארת לא ברורה. העבודה הזאת שואלת איזה סוג של מבנה הוא בעצם חשוב להתמודד עם משימות מתחתיות בטיעון מחשבי. אנו מנתחים דפוסים בתווכחות הכלליות של טקסטים משלושה גופרות. ואז, אנחנו מתאימים את הרעיון של גרעיני עצים מקומיים כדי לתפוס מבנה רצופי וייררכי ביחד בפעם הראשונה. בניסויים שיטתיים לשלושה משימות מסווג טקסט, אנחנו מוצאים ראיות חזקות להשפיעה של שני סוגי מבנה. התוצאות שלנו מציעות שאחד מהם הכרחי בזמן שהשילוב שלהם עשוי להיות מועיל.', 'sk': 'Predlaganih je bilo več pristopov za modeliranje eksplicitne zaporedne strukture argumentativnega besedila ali njegove implicitne hierarhične strukture. Do zdaj je ustreznost teh modelov splošne argumentacije še vedno nejasna. V prispevku se sprašuje, katera vrsta strukture je dejansko pomembna za reševanje nadaljnjih nalog v računalniški argumentaciji. Analiziramo vzorce v celotni argumentaciji besedil iz treh korpusov. Nato prilagodimo idejo pozicijskih drevesnih jedrc, da bi prvič skupaj ujeli zaporedno in hierarhično argumentativno strukturo. V sistematičnih eksperimentih za tri naloge klasifikacije besedil najdemo močne dokaze o vplivu obeh vrst struktur. Naši rezultati kažejo, da je kateri koli od njih potreben, medtem ko je njihova kombinacija lahko koristna.', 'bo': 'Several approaches have been proposed to model either the explicit sequential structure of an argumentative text or its implicit hierarchical structure. ད་ལྟ། སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ཚང་མཁན་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་འདི་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡང་མི་ཤེས་པ་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རྩིས་སྒྲིག་གི་རིགས་དངོས་ཡོད་ལག་ལེན་གལ་ཆེན་ཡིན་པ ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གེ་ཚིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག དེ་ནས་འུ་ཅག་གིས་གནས་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ཁང་པ་ཚོའི་དོན་ལྟར་གྱི་རྩིས་པ་དང་མཐའ་དབུགས་སྔོན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་ དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གསུམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་རིགས་དབྱེ་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་བསམ་ ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་དག་པས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐབས་ལ།'}
{'en': 'Learning Generic Sentence Representations Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ar': 'تعلم تمثيلات الجملة العامة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية', 'fr': "Apprentissage de représentations de phrases génériques à l'aide de réseaux neuronaux", 'pt': 'Aprendendo representações de sentenças genéricas usando redes neurais convolucionais', 'es': 'Aprender representaciones de oraciones genéricas mediante redes neuronales convolucionales', 'ja': '畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した一般的な文章表現の学習', 'zh': '用卷积神经网络学通句', 'ru': 'Изучение общих представлений предложений с использованием сверточных нейронных сетей', 'hi': 'सीखना सामान्य वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर', 'ga': 'Léirithe Pianbhreithe Cineálacha a Fhoghlaim ag Úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite', 'ka': 'სწავლობა გენერიკური სიტყვების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Általános mondatábrázolások tanulása Konvolúciós Neurális Hálózatok segítségével', 'el': 'Μάθηση γενικών αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων χρησιμοποιώντας τα εξελικτικά νευρωνικά δίκτυα', 'it': 'Imparare la rappresentazione generica delle frasi usando reti neurali convoluzionali', 'lt': 'Mokymasis bendrųjų sakinių atstovavimais naudojant konvolucinius nervinius tinklus', 'kk': 'Жалпы сөз таңбаларын үйрену', 'mk': 'Научи генерални реченици со користење на конволуционални неврални мрежи', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Perwakilan Sentensi Generik menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Convolutional', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സാധാരണ വിധി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ Sentenzi Ġeneriċi bl-Użu ta’ Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali', 'mn': 'Сургуулийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж', 'no': 'Læring av generelle uttrykk ved bruk av konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk', 'pl': 'Uczenie się ogólnych reprezentacji zdań za pomocą konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentărilor generice ale sentințelor folosind rețelele neuronale convoluționale', 'sr': 'Naučenje generalnih predstavljanja kazne koristeći konvolucionalne neuronske mreže', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Barista xuquuqda ciqaabka caadiga ah ee isticmaalka shabakadda diiwaanka', 'sv': 'Lär dig allmänna meningsrepresentationer med hjälp av konvulutionella neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'Learning Generic Sentence Representations Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ur': 'سیکھنے کی جرانیک سنٹنس نمایش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học những phái tri chung dùng mạng thần kinh có liên kết', 'hr': 'Naučenje generalnih predstavljanja kazne koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'nl': 'Generieke zinsvertegenwoordigingen leren met behulp van convolutionele neurale netwerken', 'de': 'Lernen generischer Satzrepräsentationen mit Hilfe von Convolutional Neuroral Networks', 'id': 'Belajar Perwakilan Sentensi Generik Menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konvelusional', 'fa': 'استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معمولی', 'bg': 'Изучаване на общи изрази чрез използване на конвелуционни неврални мрежи', 'da': 'Læring af generiske sætningsrepræsentationer ved hjælp af konvulutive neurale netværk', 'af': 'Onderleer Generiese Sagtel voorstellings deur gebruik van Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke', 'ko': '권적 신경 네트워크로 일반 문장 표징을 학습하다', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Maandamano ya Kiujumla kwa kutumia mitandao ya kiserikali', 'tr': 'Umumy söz temsilleri öwrenmek', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të dënimeve gjenerale duke përdorur rrjetet nervore konvolutive', 'hy': 'Learning Generic Sentence Representations Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'az': 'Ăśnvolucional NĂ¶ral AÄźlarÄ±nÄ± istifadÉ™ etmÉ™k', 'bn': 'কনভোলেশনের নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে সাধারণ শিক্ষা প্রতিনিধি', 'et': 'Üldiste lauseesituste õppimine konvolutsioonivõrkude abil', 'bs': 'Naučenje generalnih predstavljanja kazne koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'cs': 'Učení se obecných reprezentací vět pomocí konvelučních neuronových sítí', 'ca': 'Aprendre representacions de sentences genètiques utilitzant xarxes neurals convolutives', 'fi': 'Yleisten lauseesitteiden oppiminen konvolutionaalisten hermoverkkojen avulla', 'sk': 'Učenje generičnih predstavitev stavkov z uporabo konvolucijskih živčnih omrežij', 'he': 'ללמוד מייצגים של גזרים גנרליים באמצעות רשתות עצביות משתנות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Ngubah Gambar Keterangan Generik', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚོར་བརྗོད་སྟོན་པ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་དྲ་བ་'}
{'en': 'We propose a new encoder-decoder approach to learn distributed sentence representations that are applicable to multiple purposes. The model is learned by using a convolutional neural network as an encoder to map an input sentence into a continuous vector, and using a long short-term memory recurrent neural network as a decoder. Several tasks are considered, including sentence reconstruction and future sentence prediction. Further, a hierarchical encoder-decoder model is proposed to encode a sentence to predict multiple future sentences. By training our models on a large collection of novels, we obtain a highly generic convolutional sentence encoder that performs well in practice. Experimental results on several benchmark datasets, and across a broad range of applications, demonstrate the superiority of the proposed model over competing methods.', 'ar': 'نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لوحدة فك التشفير لتعلم تمثيلات الجملة الموزعة القابلة للتطبيق على أغراض متعددة. يتم تعلم النموذج باستخدام شبكة عصبية تلافيفية كمشفّر لتعيين جملة إدخال في ناقل مستمر ، واستخدام شبكة عصبية متكررة للذاكرة طويلة المدى كمفكك تشفير. يتم النظر في العديد من المهام ، بما في ذلك إعادة بناء الجملة والتنبؤ بالجمل في المستقبل. علاوة على ذلك ، تم اقتراح نموذج ترميز وفك تشفير هرمي لترميز جملة للتنبؤ بجمل مستقبلية متعددة. من خلال تدريب نماذجنا على مجموعة كبيرة من الروايات ، نحصل على مشفر جملة تلافيفي عام للغاية يعمل جيدًا في الممارسة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على العديد من مجموعات البيانات المعيارية ، وعبر مجموعة واسعة من التطبيقات ، تفوق النموذج المقترح على الطرق المنافسة.', 'es': 'Proponemos un nuevo enfoque de codificador-decodificador para aprender representaciones de oraciones distribuidas que son aplicables a múltiples propósitos. El modelo se aprende mediante el uso de una red neuronal convolucional como codificador para mapear una oración de entrada en un vector continuo, y mediante el uso de una red neuronal recurrente de memoria a corto plazo a largo plazo como decodificador. Se consideran varias tareas, incluida la reconstrucción de oraciones y la predicción de sentencias futuras. Además, se propone un modelo de codificador-decodificador jerárquico para codificar una oración para predecir múltiples oraciones futuras. Al entrenar a nuestros modelos en una gran colección de novelas, obtenemos un codificador de oraciones convolucionales altamente genérico que funciona bien en la práctica. Los resultados experimentales en varios conjuntos de datos de referencia y en una amplia gama de aplicaciones demuestran la superioridad del modelo propuesto sobre los métodos de la competencia.', 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova abordagem codificador-decodificador para aprender representações de sentenças distribuídas que são aplicáveis a múltiplos propósitos. O modelo é aprendido usando uma rede neural convolucional como um codificador para mapear uma sentença de entrada em um vetor contínuo e usando uma rede neural recorrente de memória de longo prazo como um decodificador. Várias tarefas são consideradas, incluindo reconstrução de sentenças e previsão de sentenças futuras. Além disso, um modelo hierárquico de codificador-decodificador é proposto para codificar uma sentença para prever várias sentenças futuras. Ao treinar nossos modelos em uma grande coleção de romances, obtemos um codificador de sentença convolucional altamente genérico que funciona bem na prática. Resultados experimentais em vários conjuntos de dados de referência e em uma ampla gama de aplicações demonstram a superioridade do modelo proposto sobre os métodos concorrentes.', 'ja': '私たちは、複数の目的に適用可能な分散文表現を学習するための新しいエンコーダデコーダアプローチを提案します。このモデルは、畳み込みニューラルネットワークをエンコーダとして使用して、入力文を連続ベクトルにマッピングし、長い短期記憶再帰ニューラルネットワークをデコーダとして使用することによって学習される。文章の再構築や将来の文章予測など、いくつかのタスクが検討されている。さらに、階層エンコーダ－デコーダモデルは、複数の将来の文章を予測するために文章をエンコードするために提案される。大規模な小説のコレクションでモデルをトレーニングすることで、実践で優れたパフォーマンスを発揮する非常に一般的な畳み込み文エンコーダを入手します。いくつかのベンチマークデータセット、および幅広い用途での実験結果は、提案されたモデルが競合する方法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle approche encodeur-décodeur pour apprendre les représentations de phrases distribuées applicables à de multiples fins. Le modèle est appris en utilisant un réseau neuronal convolutif comme codeur pour mapper une phrase d'entrée dans un vecteur continu, et en utilisant un réseau neuronal récurrent à mémoire longue et à court terme comme décodeur. Plusieurs tâches sont envisagées, notamment la reconstruction de phrase et la prédiction de phrases futures. En outre, un modèle codeur-décodeur hiérarchique est proposé pour coder une phrase afin de prédire de multiples phrases futures. En entraînant nos modèles sur une grande collection de romans, nous obtenons un codeur de phrase convolutif très générique qui fonctionne bien dans la pratique. Les résultats expérimentaux sur plusieurs ensembles de données de référence et dans un large éventail d'applications démontrent la supériorité du modèle proposé par rapport aux méthodes concurrentes.", 'zh': '建一新编码器 - 解码器以学分布式句。 其法以卷积神经网络为编码器将输句映射连向量,而以长短期记递归神经网络为解码器学。 思虑数事,兼句重建及未来句占。 此外立一层编码器-解码器模形以编码一句,以测数来之句。 练我以小说,得在实践中高卷积编码器。 于数集广泛应用上实验结果表明,所立模优于竞法。', 'hi': 'हम वितरित वाक्य अभ्यावेदन सीखने के लिए एक नया एन्कोडर-डिकोडर दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित करते हैं जो कई उद्देश्यों पर लागू होते हैं। मॉडल एक निरंतर वेक्टर में एक इनपुट वाक्य को मैप करने के लिए एक एन्कोडर के रूप में एक कनवल्शनल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके सीखा जाता है, और एक डिकोडर के रूप में एक दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक मेमोरी आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करता है। कई कार्यों पर विचार किया जाता है, जिसमें वाक्य पुनर्निर्माण और भविष्य की वाक्य भविष्यवाणी शामिल है। इसके अलावा, एक पदानुक्रमित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल को कई भविष्य के वाक्यों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक वाक्य को एन्कोड करने का प्रस्ताव है। उपन्यासों के एक बड़े संग्रह पर हमारे मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करके, हम एक अत्यधिक सामान्य convolutional वाक्य एन्कोडर प्राप्त करते हैं जो व्यवहार में अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करता है। कई बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम, और अनुप्रयोगों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में, प्रतिस्पर्धी तरीकों पर प्रस्तावित मॉडल की श्रेष्ठता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новый подход кодер-декодер для изучения распределенных представлений предложений, которые применимы для нескольких целей. Модель изучают с помощью сверточной нейронной сети в качестве кодера для отображения входного предложения в непрерывный вектор и с помощью рекуррентной нейронной сети с длинной кратковременной памятью в качестве декодера. Рассматривается несколько задач, включая реконструкцию предложения и прогнозирование будущего предложения. Кроме того, предлагается иерархическая модель кодировщик-декодер для кодирования предложения для прогнозирования множества будущих предложений. Обучая наши модели на большой коллекции романов, мы получаем высокоуровневый сверточный кодировщик предложений, который хорошо работает на практике. Экспериментальные результаты по нескольким эталонным наборам данных и по широкому спектру применений демонстрируют превосходство предлагаемой модели над конкурирующими методами.', 'ga': 'Molaimid cur chuige nua ionchódóra-díchódóra chun léiriú abairtí dáilte a fhoghlaim a bhaineann le cuspóirí iolracha. Foghlaimítear an tsamhail trí úsáid a bhaint as líonra néarúil comhraonta mar ionchódóir chun abairt ionchuir a mhapáil i veicteoir leanúnach, agus trí líonra néarach athfhillteach cuimhne gearrthéarmach fada a úsáid mar dhíchódóir. Breathnaítear ar roinnt tascanna, lena n-áirítear atógáil pianbhreithe agus réamh-mheas pianbhreithe amach anseo. Ina theannta sin, moltar samhail ordlathach ionchódóra-díchódóra chun abairt a ionchódú chun abairtí iolracha amach anseo a thuar. Trí oiliúint a chur ar ár múnlaí ar bhailiúchán mór úrscéalta, faighimid ionchódóir abairtí comhbheartaithe an-chineálach a fheidhmíonn go maith go praiticiúil. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar roinnt tacar sonraí tagarmharcála, agus thar raon leathan feidhmchlár, sármhaitheas na samhla molta thar modhanna iomaíocha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი კოდირების რესპექტირებას გავისწავლოთ გაყოფილი სიტყვების რესპექტირება, რომელიც მრავალ მიზეზებისთვის მოსაძლებელია. მოდელის გამოყენებით კონგულური ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენებით, როგორც კონკორეტორი გადაყენების სიტყვების შესახებ მუშაობელი გვეკტორიში, და სიტყვებული სიტყვების გამოყენებას რამდენიმე დავარჩენება, რომელიც წესების რექსტრუქცია და მომავალე წესების წარმოდგენა. დამატებით, ჰიერაქტიკური კოდირების მოდელის კოდირების მოწყობინება, რომ მრავალ მომავალე სიტყვების კოდირება. ჩვენი მოდელების შემდეგ დიდი პრომენტების კოლექციაზე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ძალიან გენერიკური კონგულოციალური კონკორექტის კონკორექტი, რომელიც მსგავ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი რამდენიმე ბენქმარკური მონაცემების შესახებ და პროგრამების უფრო დიდი დისპექტის შესახებ მოწყობინებული მოდელის უფრო მეტი შესა', 'hu': 'Javasolunk egy új kódoló-dekódoló megközelítést, hogy megtanulják az elosztott mondatok reprezentációit, amelyek több célra alkalmazhatók. A modellt úgy tanuljuk meg, hogy egy konvuluációs neurális hálózatot használunk kódolóként, hogy feltérképezzük a bemeneti mondatot egy folyamatos vektorrá, és egy hosszú rövid távú memória visszatérő neurális hálózatot használunk dekódolóként. Számos feladatot figyelembe vesznek, beleértve a mondat rekonstrukcióját és a jövőbeli mondat előrejelzését. Továbbá, egy hierarchikus kódoló-dekódoló modell javasolt egy mondat kódolására több jövőbeli mondat előrejelzésére. Modelljeink nagy regénygyűjteményre való kiképzésével egy rendkívül általános konvolúciós mondatkódolót kapunk, amely jól teljesít a gyakorlatban. A kísérleti eredmények több referenciaadatkészleten és az alkalmazások széles skáláján mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell felsőbbrendű a versenytárs módszerekkel szemben.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για την εκμάθηση κατανεμημένων αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων που εφαρμόζονται σε πολλαπλούς σκοπούς. Το μοντέλο μαθαίνεται χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνθετο νευρικό δίκτυο ως κωδικοποιητή για να χαρτογραφήσει μια πρόταση εισόδου σε ένα συνεχές διάνυσμα, και χρησιμοποιώντας ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρικό δίκτυο μακράς βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης ως αποκωδικοποιητή. Εξετάζονται διάφορες εργασίες, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ανασυγκρότησης προτάσεων και της πρόβλεψης μελλοντικών προτάσεων. Επιπλέον, προτείνεται ένα ιεραρχικό μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για να κωδικοποιήσει μια πρόταση για να προβλέψει πολλαπλές μελλοντικές προτάσεις. Εκπαιδεύοντας τα μοντέλα μας σε μια μεγάλη συλλογή μυθιστορημάτων, αποκτούμε έναν ιδιαίτερα γενικό κωδικοποιητή σύνθετων προτάσεων που αποδίδει καλά στην πράξη. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς και σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εφαρμογών καταδεικνύουν την υπεροχή του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου έναντι των ανταγωνιστικών μεθόδων.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo approccio encoder-decoder per imparare rappresentazioni di frasi distribuite che sono applicabili a molteplici scopi. Il modello viene appreso utilizzando una rete neurale convoluzionale come encoder per mappare una frase di input in un vettore continuo, e utilizzando una rete neurale ricorrente a lungo termine come decoder. Sono presi in considerazione diversi compiti, tra cui la ricostruzione delle frasi e la previsione delle frasi future. Inoltre, un modello gerarchico encoder-decoder è proposto per codificare una frase per predire più frasi future. Allenando i nostri modelli su una vasta collezione di romanzi, otteniamo un codificatore di frasi convoluzionali altamente generico che funziona bene nella pratica. I risultati sperimentali su diversi set di dati di riferimento e su un'ampia gamma di applicazioni dimostrano la superiorità del modello proposto rispetto ai metodi concorrenti.", 'kk': 'Біз бірнеше мақсаттарға қолданылатын үлестірілген мәліметтерді оқыту үшін жаңа кодтамасыз декодтамасының қасиетін ұсынамыз. Бұл үлгі құрылғылық невралды желі кодер ретінде келтірілген сөзді тұрақты векторға картап, ұзын уақыт жады қайталанатын невралды желі декодер ретінде қолданылады. Кейбір тапсырмалар қайта құрылған және келесі сөйлеменің алдындағы тапсырмалары сұралады. Келесіден, бірнеше келесі сөздерді таңдау үшін иерархиялық кодтау үлгісі қолданылады. Өзіміздің үлкен романдардың жинақтауын оқыту арқылы, әрекетте жақсы жұмыс істейтін жалпы жалпы жұмыс сөз кодерін аламыз. Бірнеше бағдарламалар деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері және көпшілік қолданбалардың көпшілігі бойынша ұсынылған моделінің көпшілігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują kodavimo kodavimo metodą, skirtą išmokti paskirstytus sakinius, kurie taikomi keliems tikslams. Modelis mokomas naudojant konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą kaip kodą įvesties sakiniui paversti į nuolatinį vektorių ir ilgalaikį trumpalaikį atminties kartotinį nervinį tinklą kaip dekoderį. Apsvarstomos kelios užduotys, įskaitant sakinių atkūrimą ir būsimų sakinių prognozavimą. Be to, siūlomas hierarchinis kodavimo kodavimo model is, kuriuo būtų koduojamas sakinys, siekiant numatyti kelis būsimus sakinius. Mokydami savo modelius dideliame romanų rinkinyje, gauname labai generinį konvoliucinį sakinių kodą, kuris gerai veikia praktikoje. Eksperimentiniai kelių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių ir įvairių programų rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis yra pranašesnis už konkuruojančius metodus.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нов пристап на кодер-декодер за да се научи дистрибуирани реченици кои се применливи за повеќе цели. Моделот се научи со користење на конволуционална нервна мрежа како кодер за да се мапира вводната реченица во континуиран вектор, и со користење на долгорочна нервна мрежа на короткорочна меморија како декодер. Размислуваат неколку задачи, вклучувајќи ја и реконструкцијата на речениците и идното предвидување на речениците. Покрај тоа, се предложува хиерархичен модел на кодер-декодер за кодирање на реченица за предвидување на повеќе идни реченици. Со обуката на нашите модели на голема колекција романи, добиваме високо генеричен кодер на конволуционални реченици кој функционира добро во практиката. Експерименталните резултати на неколку бази на податоци, и низ широк опсег на апликации, ја покажуваат супериорноста на предложениот модел над конкурентните методи.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan pendekatan pengekod-pengekod baru untuk belajar mewakili kalimat yang disebarkan yang berlaku untuk tujuan berbilang. Model belajar dengan menggunakan rangkaian saraf konvolutional sebagai pengekod untuk peta kalimat input ke dalam vektor terus menerus, dan menggunakan rangkaian saraf yang berulang jangka pendek panjang sebagai pengekod. Beberapa tugas dianggap, termasuk pembinaan semula kalimat dan ramalan kalimat masa depan. Lagipun, model pengekod-pengekod hierarkis diusulkan untuk mengekod kalimat untuk meramalkan kalimat masa depan berbilang. Dengan melatih model kita pada koleksi besar novel, kita mendapatkan pengekod kalimat konvolusi yang sangat generik yang berjalan dengan baik dalam latihan. Hasil percubaan pada beberapa set data benchmark, dan di seluruh julat yang luas aplikasi, menunjukkan ketinggalan model yang diusulkan daripada kaedah yang bersaing.', 'ml': 'പല ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പുതിയ കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d വഴ ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d ആയി ഒരു ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വെക്റ്റരിലേക്ക് വാക്ക് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു നീണ്ട മെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുനരുമാറ്റുന്നതും ഭാവിയുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രവചനം കൂടിയും പല ജോലികളെയും വിചാരിക്കുന് അതിനുശേഷം, ഭാവിയിലെ പല വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു വാക്ക് എന്\u200dകോഡ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഒരു ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200d  ഒരു വലിയ നോവലുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലുകളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് നമുക്ക് ഒരു സാധാരണ വാക്കിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200d ക പല ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും ഒരു വിശാലമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളിലും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu approċċ ġdid ta' kodifikatur-dekoder biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet ta' sentenzi distribwiti li huma applikabbli għal skopijiet multipli. Il-mudell jitgħallem bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali bħala kodifikatur biex tiġi mmappjata sentenza ta’ input f’vettur kontinwu, u bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali rikorrenti ta’ memorja fit-tul fuq medda qasira ta’ żmien bħala dekoder. Qed jiġu kkunsidrati diversi kompiti, inkluż ir-rikostruzzjoni tas-sentenzi u t-tbassir tas-sentenzi futuri. Barra minn hekk, huwa propost mudell ġerarkiku ta’ kodifikatur li jikkodifika sentenza biex jipprevedi sentenzi futuri multipli. Permezz tat-taħriġ tal-mudelli tagħna dwar ġabra kbira ta’ romanzi, inkisbu kodifikatur tas-sentenzi konvoluzzjonali ġeneriku ħafna li jwassal tajjeb fil-prattika. Riżultati esperimentali fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza, u fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ applikazzjonijiet, juru s-superjorità tal-mudell propost fuq metodi kompetittivi.", 'mn': 'Бид олон зорилго дээр хэрэглэгддэг хэлбэрийн илтгэлийг сурах шинэ кодлогч-онгоцлогч арга зам зааж байна. Загвар нь холбогдолтой мэдрэлийн сүлжээг шинэ коддогч болгоход суралцдаг. Үүнийг үргэлжлүүлэх вектор руу зуралцаж, урт хугацааны санамжийн сэтгэл санамжийн дахин сэтгэл сүлжээг шинэ коддогч бол Олон даалгавар, өгүүлбэр дахин бүтээж, ирээдүйн өгүүлбэрийн таамаглал гэх мэт санагддаг. Дараа нь, олон ирээдүйн өгүүлбэрүүдийг таамаглах үед хэлбэрийг шинэчлэх гэсэн үг юм. Манай загваруудыг маш их зохиолын цуглуулалтын тухай сургалтын тулд бид дасгал дээр сайн ажиллаж байгаа ерөнхий дундаж өгүүлбэрийн коддогч авдаг. Хэдэн хэдэн салбарын өгөгдлийн сангуудын туршилтын үр дүнд, олон олон программын олон хэсэгт дамжуулан өрсөлдөг арга загварын өндөр байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein ny koderingstilnærming til å lære distribuert setningar som er tilgjengeleg for fleire mål. Modellen blir lært ved å bruka eit konvolusjonell neuralnettverk som eit koder for å kartera eit innsetjing inn i ein kontinuerleg vektor, og bruka ein lang kortmann minne gjentaande neuralnettverk som dekoder. Mange oppgåver vert betra, inkludert rekonstruksjon av setningar og framtidige setningar. Eit hierarkisk koderingsmodell er foreslått å koda eit setning for å foregå fleire framtidige setningar. Ved å opplære modellen våre på eit stor samling av romanar, får vi eit veldig generiskt konvolusjonell setkoder som utfører godt i praksis. Eksperimentale resultat på fleire benchmarkdatasett og gjennom eit brett område av programmer viser overhøgda av den foreslåde modellen over konkurransmetoder.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowe podejście kodera-dekodera do nauki rozproszonych reprezentacji zdań, które mają zastosowanie do wielu celów. Model uczy się poprzez wykorzystanie konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej jako kodera do mapowania zdania wejściowego na wektor ciągły, a także przy użyciu powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej jako dekodera długoterminowej pamięci krótkoterminowej. Rozważa się kilka zadań, w tym rekonstrukcję zdania i przewidywanie przyszłych zdań. Ponadto proponuje się hierarchiczny model kodera-dekodera, aby zakodować zdanie w celu przewidzenia wielu przyszłych zdań. Szkoląc nasze modele na dużej kolekcji powieści, uzyskujemy bardzo ogólny koder zdań konwolucyjnych, który sprawdza się w praktyce. Wyniki eksperymentalne na kilku zbiorach danych referencyjnych oraz w szerokim zakresie zastosowań pokazują przewagę proponowanego modelu nad konkurencyjnymi metodami.', 'ro': 'Propunem o nouă abordare codificator-decodor pentru a învăța reprezentările propozițiilor distribuite care sunt aplicabile în mai multe scopuri. Modelul este învățat prin utilizarea unei rețele neuronale convoluționale ca encoder pentru a cartografia o propoziție de intrare într-un vector continuu, și utilizarea unei rețele neurale recurente pe termen scurt pe termen lung ca decodor. Sunt luate în considerare mai multe sarcini, inclusiv reconstrucția propozițiilor și predicția viitoare a propozițiilor. Mai mult, un model ierarhic codificator-decodor este propus pentru a codifica o propoziție pentru a prezice mai multe propoziții viitoare. Prin instruirea modelelor noastre pe o colecție largă de romane, obținem un codificator de propoziții convoluționale extrem de generic, care funcționează bine în practică. Rezultatele experimentale pe mai multe seturi de date de referință și pe o gamă largă de aplicații demonstrează superioritatea modelului propus față de metodele concurente.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novi pristup kodera-dekodera da naučimo raspodjeljene rečenice koje su primjenjene na višestruke svrhe. Model se nauči koristeći konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu kao koder kako bi mapirao ulaznu rečenicu u kontinuirani vektor, i koristeći dugoročnu memoriju ponovnu neuralnu mrežu kao dekoder. Smatraju se nekoliko zadataka, uključujući rekonstrukciju rečenica i predviđanje buduće rečenice. Dalje, predlaže se hijerarhički model dekodera za kodiranje rečenice da predvidi više budućih rečenica. Trenirajući naše modele o velikoj kolekciji romana, dobijamo veoma generičan konvolucionalni koder rečenice koji dobro izvodi na praksi. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko standardnih seta podataka i širom niza aplikacija pokazuju nadvišenost predloženog model a na konkurentnim metodama.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qaab cusub oo codcodsiga ah si aan u barno noocyada qeyb-qaybsan, kuwaas oo u habboon sababo kala duduwan. Tusaalada waxaa lagu baraa shabakadda neurada oo kamid ah, si uu u karo qoraalka input oo uu u noqdo vector joogtada ah, sidoo kale waxaa lagu isticmaalaa shabakadda xubnaha ee wakhti dheer oo xasuusta ah oo ku soo socda. Shaqooyin badan waxaa laga xisaabiyaa, kuwaas oo ka mid ah dhisidda ereyga iyo wixii la sii sheegay ciqaabka mustaqbalka. Furthermore, waxaa laga jeedaa model qodi-decoder oo hierarchical ah in uu qoro eray la soo qoro si uu wax u sii sheego erayo badan oo mustaqbalka ah. Markaas waxaynu ku baranaynaa qaababkayaga warqadaha aad u badan, waxaynu helaynaa qodob dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo si wanaagsan u shaqeeya. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda kooxo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan sawirada bangiga iyo codsashada ballaadhan, waxay ka muuqataa mid ka sareeya qaababka la soo jeedo oo ku saabsan qaababka iskutallaabta.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් කෝඩාර් ඩිකෝඩර් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විතරයි, ඒ මොඩේල් ඉගෙන ගත්තා සම්පූර්ණ න්යුරෝල ජාලය භාවිත කරන්න සංකේතකයෙක් විදිහට ඇතුළු වෙක්ටර් වලින් ඇතුළු වෙක්ටර් වලට, සහ වාක්ය සහ අනාගතය සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් කිහිපයක් සැකසුම් කරනවා. ඊට පස්සේ, වාර්තාවික සංකේතකය- ඩිකෝඩර් මොඩේල් එකක් සැකසුම් කරනවා වාර්තාවක් කෝඩ කරන්න අනාගතයේ වාක්ය අපේ මොඩල් සංවේදනයේ ලොකු සංවේදනයක් විදියට, අපි ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය සංවේදනයක් ලැබෙනවා, ඒක හොඳට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් වලින් පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශාල ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය කරනව', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny encoder-dekoder metod för att lära sig distribuerade meningsrepresentationer som är tillämpliga för flera ändamål. Modellen lär sig genom att använda ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk som kodare för att kartlägga en inmatning mening till en kontinuerlig vektor, och använda ett långvarigt korttidsminne återkommande neuralt nätverk som avkodare. Flera uppgifter beaktas, inklusive meningsredskonstruktion och framtida meningsförutsägelse. Vidare föreslås en hierarkisk encoder-dekoder modell för att koda en mening för att förutsäga flera framtida meningar. Genom att träna våra modeller på en stor samling romaner får vi en mycket generisk konvulutiv meningskoder som fungerar bra i praktiken. Experimentella resultat på flera benchmarkdatauppsättningar, och över ett brett spektrum av tillämpningar, visar att den föreslagna modellen är överlägset jämfört med konkurrerande metoder.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டாளர் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். பல காரணங்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும் வா இந்த மாதிரி தொடர்ந்து வெக்டரில் உள்ளீட்டு வாக்கியத்தை வரைபடத்திற்கு ஒரு குறியீட்டாக ஒரு சாதாரண புதிய பிணையத்தின் பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்தி கற்றுக் க வாக்கியத்தை மீண்டும் மற்றும் எதிர்கால வாக்கியத்தை முன்னோட்டத்துடனும் சேர்க்கப்படுகிறது. Further, a hierarchical encoder-decoder model is proposed to encode a sentence to predict multiple future sentences.  எங்கள் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்து ஒரு பெரிய புதிய நிரல் தொகுப்பில், நாம் ஒரு மிகவும் பொதுவான பொதுவாக்கிய வாக்கு கு சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் பல பென்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் மற்றும் ஒரு விரிவான நிரல்கள் முழுவதும், முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் ம', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی کوڈر ڈیکوڈر طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ تقسیم ہوئی جماعت کی تصاویرات کو سکھائیں جو بہت سی هدف کے لئے لازم ہیں. Model is learned by using a convolutional neural network as an encoder to map an input sentence in a continuous vector, and using a long-term memory recurrent neural network as a decoder. بہت سے کام سمجھے جاتے ہیں، جماعت دوبارہ ساخت کرنا اور آینده جماعت کی پیش بینی کے ساتھ۔ اور اس کے بعد، ایک حیراتریک اکوڈر ڈیکوڈر موڈل کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے کہ بہت سی آینده جماعتوں کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے ایک جماعت کا کوڈ کرے۔ ہمارے مدلکوں کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ ایک بڑی کمل کائنال کے ذریعہ، ہم ایک بہت زیادہ عمدہ مشترک جماعت کا اکنور حاصل کرتے ہیں جو اچھی طرح عمل کرتا ہے۔ بہت سے بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ، اور بہت وسیع طریقے پر کاربریوں میں، پیشنهاد مدل کی زیادتی دکھاتی ہے جنگ طریقے پر۔', 'uz': "Biz bir nechta sabablar uchun tarqatish so'zlarni o'rganish uchun yangi kodlash kodlash usulini tahrirlash. Name Bir necha vazifalar esa so'zni qayta tiklash va kelajak gaplarning oldini ko'rsatiladi. Kodlash usuli kelajakdagi bir nechta maxfiy soʻzlarni koʻrsatish uchun maxfiy soʻzni kodlash talab qilinadi. Bizning modellarimizni katta romanalar tarkibida o'rganish orqali, biz juda yaxshi bajaradigan bir geneziy bir maxfiy soʻzni kodlash qoidaga olib kelamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mã hóa mới để học các biểu tượng hình phạt được phân phát có liên quan đến nhiều mục đích. Mô hình được học bằng cách sử dụng một mạng thần kinh rối loạn như một bộ mã hóa để vẽ bản đồ một câu nhập vào một véc- tơ liên tục, và sử dụng một mạng thần kinh tái tạo của bộ nhớ ngắn hạn như một bộ giải mã. Một số công việc được cân nhắc, gồm việc tái tạo án và dự đoán án tương lai. Thêm nữa, một mô hình bộ mã hóa cấp cao được đề nghị mã hóa để mã hóa một câu để dự đoán nhiều câu tương lai. Bằng cách đào tạo các mô hình của chúng tôi về một bộ sưu tập tiểu thuyết lớn, chúng tôi nhận được một hộp mã hóa hình đủ chung có hiệu quả tốt trong thực tế. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên nhiều bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, và trong một loạt các ứng dụng rộng, chứng minh khả năng ưu việt của mô hình đề nghị hơn các phương pháp cạnh tranh.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novi pristup kodera-dekodera kako bi naučili raspodjeljene predstave kazne koje su primjenjene na višestruke svrhe. Model se nauči koristeći konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu kao koder kako bi mapirao ulaznu rečenicu u kontinuirani vektor i koristio dugoročnu rekonstruiranu neuralnu mrežu memorije kao dekoder. Smatraju se nekoliko zadataka, uključujući rekonstrukciju rečenica i predviđanje buduće rečenice. Dalje, predlaže se hijerarhički model dekodera za kodiranje rečenice za predviđanje višestrukih budućih rečenica. Obučavajući naše modele o velikoj kolekciji romana, dobijemo visoko generični konvolucionalni koder kazne koji dobro izvodi na praksi. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko standardnih seta podataka i širom niza aplikacija pokazuju nadvišenost predloženog model a nad konkurentnim metodama.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов кодер-декодер подход за изучаване на разпределени изображения на изречения, които са приложими за множество цели. Моделът се научава чрез използване на конволюционна невронна мрежа като кодер за картографиране на входно изречение в непрекъснат вектор и използване на дългосрочна краткосрочна памет рецидивираща невронна мрежа като декодер. Разглеждат се няколко задачи, включително реконструкция на присъдата и предсказване на бъдещите присъди. Освен това е предложен йерархичен кодер-декодер модел за кодиране на изречение за предсказване на множество бъдещи изречения. Чрез обучението на нашите модели върху голяма колекция от романи, ние получаваме високо генеричен конволюционален кодер на изречения, който се представя добре на практика. Експерименталните резултати върху няколко сравнителни набора от данни и в широк спектър от приложения демонстрират превъзходството на предложения модел спрямо конкурентните методи.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe encoder-decoder benadering voor om gedistribueerde zinsrepresentaties te leren die toepasbaar zijn voor meerdere doeleinden. Het model wordt geleerd door een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk als encoder te gebruiken om een invoerzin in een continue vector in kaart te brengen, en door een langdurig kortetermijngeheugen terugkerend neuraal netwerk als decoder te gebruiken. Verschillende taken worden overwogen, waaronder zinsreconstructie en toekomstige zinsvoorspelling. Verder wordt een hiërarchisch encoder-decoder model voorgesteld om een zin te coderen om meerdere toekomstige zinnen te voorspellen. Door onze modellen te trainen op een grote verzameling romans, verkrijgen we een zeer generieke convolutionele zinnencoder die goed presteert in de praktijk. Experimentele resultaten op verschillende benchmarkdatasets en in een breed scala aan toepassingen tonen de superioriteit van het voorgestelde model ten opzichte van concurrerende methoden aan.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny encoder-dekoder tilgang til at lære distribuerede sætningsrepræsentationer, der kan anvendes til flere formål. Modellen læres ved at bruge et konvulutivt neuralt netværk som en encoder til at kortlægge en input sætning til en kontinuerlig vektor, og ved at bruge et langtids korttidshukommelse tilbagevendende neuralt netværk som en dekoder. Flere opgaver overvejes, herunder genopbygning af sætninger og fremtidig sætning forudsigelse. Derudover foreslås en hierarkisk encoder-dekoder model til at kode en sætning for at forudsige flere fremtidige sætninger. Ved at træne vores modeller på en stor samling romaner, får vi en meget generisk konvulutiv sætningskoder, der fungerer godt i praksis. Eksperimentelle resultater på flere benchmarkdatasæt og på tværs af en bred vifte af applikationer viser den foreslåede models overlegenhed i forhold til konkurrerende metoder.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen einen neuen Encoder-Decoder-Ansatz vor, um verteilte Satzdarstellungen zu lernen, die für mehrere Zwecke anwendbar sind. Das Modell wird erlernt, indem ein convolutionales neuronales Netzwerk als Encoder verwendet wird, um einen Eingangssatz in einen kontinuierlichen Vektor abzubilden, und indem ein rezidivierendes neuronales Netzwerk mit Langzeitgedächtnis als Decoder verwendet wird. Mehrere Aufgaben werden berücksichtigt, darunter Satzkonstruktion und zukünftige Satzvorhersage. Weiterhin wird ein hierarchisches Encoder-Decoder-Modell vorgeschlagen, um einen Satz zu kodieren, um mehrere zukünftige Sätze vorherzusagen. Durch das Training unserer Modelle auf einer großen Sammlung von Romanen erhalten wir einen sehr generischen Faltungssatz Encoder, der in der Praxis gut funktioniert. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an mehreren Benchmark-Datensätzen und in einem breiten Anwendungsspektrum belegen die Überlegenheit des vorgeschlagenen Modells gegenüber konkurrierenden Methoden.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan pendekatan koder-dekoder baru untuk belajar representation kalimat yang disebarkan yang berlaku untuk berbagai tujuan. Model ini dipelajari dengan menggunakan jaringan saraf konvolusi sebagai pengekode untuk memetakan kalimat masukan ke dalam vektor terus menerus, dan menggunakan jaringan saraf rekuren ingatan jangka pendek panjang sebagai pengekode. Beberapa tugas dipertimbangkan, termasuk rekonstruksi kalimat dan prediksi kalimat masa depan. Selain itu, model pengkode-dekoder hierarkis diusulkan untuk mengkode kalimat untuk memprediksi beberapa kalimat masa depan. Dengan melatih model kita pada koleksi besar novel, kita mendapatkan pengkode kalimat konvolusi yang sangat generik yang berhasil dalam praktek. Hasil eksperimental pada beberapa set data benchmark, dan di seluruh jangkauan lebar aplikasi, menunjukkan superioritas model yang diusulkan daripada metode yang bersaing.', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش جدید برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای تقسیم شده که برای هدف\u200cهای چندین قابل استفاده می\u200cشوند. این مدل از طریق استفاده از شبکه عصبی به عنوان یک رمزگذاری برای نقشه\u200cگذاری یک جمله وارد در یک vektor دائمی یاد می\u200cشود، و از شبکه عصبی کوتاه\u200cای به عنوان یک dekoder استفاده می\u200cکند. تعدادی از وظیفه\u200cها به نظر گرفته می\u200cشود، شامل ساختن مجازات و پیش\u200cبینی مجازات آینده. بعلاوه، یک مدل رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی قانونی پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که یک جمله را برای پیش\u200cبینی کردن جمله\u200cهای زیادی آینده رمزبندی کند. با آموزش مدلهای ما در یک جمع\u200cآوری بزرگ از رمانی، ما یک رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی جمع\u200cآوری بسیار عمومی را دریافت می\u200cکنیم که در تمرین خوب انجام می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی چندین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقاشی و در یک مجموعه وسیع کاربرد، بیشتر از مدل پیشنهاد بر روش\u200cهای رقابت نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'We propose a new encoder-decoder approach to learn distributed sentence representations that are applicable to multiple purposes.  Mradi huo unajifunza kwa kutumia mtandao wa taratibu ya kikatili kama mfululizo wa kuweka ramani ya sentenca ya input into a continuous vector, na kwa kutumia Mtandao wa kumbukumbu wa muda mrefu unaoendelea kama ukipungua. Kazi kadhaa zinachukuliwa, ikiwa ni pamoja na hukumu ya upya na utabiri wa hukumu ya baadaye. Zaidi ya hayo, muundo wa kodi-decodi unapendekezwa kuingia hukumu ya kutabiri hukumu kadhaa za baadaye. Kwa kufundisha mifano yetu katika mkusanyiko mkubwa wa riwaya, tunapata kiwango kikubwa cha hukumu ya kimapenzi kinachofanya vizuri katika mazoea. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti kadhaa za bendera, na katika maeneo mengi ya matumizi, yanaonyesha ukubwa wa muundo wa pendekezo juu ya njia za ushindani.', 'tr': 'Biz birnäçe maksada uygun bölünen sözleşmeleri öwrenmek üçin täze bir kodçödleme metodasyny teklip edýäris. Bu model, gelişmiş neiral a ğ kullanarak gelişmiş bir vektöre giriş sözlerini sürekli bir vektöre haritalandırmak için ve uzun zamanlı bir an ı tekrarlayan neiral ağ olarak kullanarak öğrenilir. Çözümler ýene-täzeden we gelejekde sözler öňünden hem birnäçe zady maslahat edilýär. Mundan başga, birnäçe gezek sözleri önlemek üçin bir iýerarhiýa ködleme nusgasy teklip edildi. Biziň modellerimizi uly romanlaryň birleşmesinde okuwçylarak, praktika gowy eden iň köp şeklinde bir şekilde cödleme ködleme alýarys. Birnäçe benchmark veri setirlerinde, we birnäçe köp görnüşler bilen teklip eden nusganyň üstini ýakynlaşyk ýunlarda görkez.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe enkoder- dekoder toegang om verspreidige setnings te leer wat toewenbaar is vir veelvuldige doels. Die model is geleer deur 'n konvolusielike neuralnetwerk te gebruik as 'n enkoder om 'n invoer seting in' n voortdurende vektor te kaart, en gebruik 'n lang- term geheue herhaalde neuralnetwerk as 'n dekoder. Verskeie opdragte word aangeneem, insluitend setinge herkonstruksie en toekomstige setvoorskou. Verder word 'n hierarkies enkoder- dekoder model voorgestel om 'n seting te kodeer om veelvuldige toekomstige setinge te voorskou. Deur ons modele op 'n groot versameling van romane te onderwerp, kry ons 'n baie generieke konvolusionele setkoder wat goed in praksie uitvoer. Eksperimentale resultate op verskeie benchmarkdatastel en deur 'n breë reek van toepassings, wys die hoogheid van die voorgestelde model oor konkurreende metodes.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një metodë të re kodues-dekoder për të mësuar përfaqësime të përhapura të fjalëve që janë të aplikueshme për qëllime të shumta. Modeli mësohet duke përdorur një rrjet nervor konvolutiv si një kodues për të hartuar një fjalim të hyrjes në një vektor të vazhdueshëm dhe duke përdorur një rrjet nervor të përsëritur të kujtesës afat-shkurtër si një dekoder. Disa detyra konsiderohen, duke përfshirë rindërtimin e dënimeve dhe parashikimin e dënimeve të ardhshme. Për më tepër, një model hierarkik kodues-dekoder propozohet për të koduar një fjalim për të parashikuar shumë fjalime të ardhshme. By training our models on a large collection of novels, we obtain a highly generic convolutional sentence encoder that performs well in practice.  Rezultatet eksperimentale në disa grupe të dhënash referenciale dhe nëpër një gamë të gjerë aplikimesh, demonstrojnë superioritetin e modelit të propozuar ndaj metodave konkurruese.', 'am': 'አዲስ የፊደል ኮድ-አዲስ አካባቢ አካሄድ ለመማር እናስጀምራለን፡፡ ሞዴልዱን በጥምቀት የናውሬል መረብ በመጠቀም የሚማር ሆኖ የሚኖረውን የinput sentence በዘወትር vector ለማሳመር እና የረጅም ጊዜ ማስታወስ የሚቆጠር የኔural መረብ እንደ decoder በመጠቀም ይማራል፡፡ በርካታ ሥርዓት መሠረት እና የቀድሞው የፍርድ ቅድሚያ ውይይት ይታሰናሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የፊደል የፊደል ቅርጽ-አካባቢ ሞዴል ብዙዎችን የፊደል ቃላትን ለመቀበል ይዘረጋል፡፡ መተላለፊያዎቻችንን በታላቅ የመረጃዎች ጉዳይ በማስተማርን፣ በሥርዓት መልካም የሚሠራውን የውይይት የውይይት የውይይት የፍርድ ኮድ አግኝተናል፡፡ በብዙ benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ የተፈተና ውጤቶች እና በተሰፋው ፕሮግራሞች ላይ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ላይ በተዋጋው ሥርዓቶች ላይ የበለጠ ማግኘት ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կոդեր-կոդեր մոտեցում, որպեսզի սովորենք բաշխված նախադասությունների ներկայացումներ, որոնք կիրառվում են բազմաթիվ նպատակների համար: Մոդելը սովորվում է, օգտագործելով կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանց որպես կոդեր, որպեսզի քարտեզագրենք ներմուծի նախադասությունը շարունակական վեկտորի մեջ, և օգտագործելով երկար կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության կրկնվող նյարդայի Շատ խնդիրներ են համարվում, ներառյալ նախադասությունների վերականգնումը և ապագա նախադասությունների կանխատեսումը: Ավելին, հիերարխիկ կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելը առաջարկում է կոդավորել նախադասությունը ապագա բազմաթիվ նախադասությունների կանխատեսելու համար: Մեր մոդելները վարժեցնելով վեպերի մեծ հավաքածուի վրա, մենք ստանում ենք շատ ընդհանուր կոդավոր նախադասություններ, որոնք լավ աշխատում են իրականության մեջ: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները մի քանի համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի վրա և տարբեր ծրագրերում ցույց են տալիս առաջարկած մոդելի գերազանցությունը մրցակցության մեթոդների նկատմամբ:', 'ko': '우리는 다양한 용도에 적용되는 분포식 문장 표시를 배우기 위해 새로운 인코더 - 디코더 방법을 제시했다.이 모델은 볼륨 신경 네트워크를 인코더로 사용하여 입력 문장을 연속 벡터로 비추고, 장단 기억 귀속 신경 네트워크를 인코더로 사용하여 학습한다.본고는 문장 재건과 미래 문장 예측을 포함한 몇 가지 임무를 고려했다.또한 한 문장을 인코딩하여 미래의 여러 문장을 예측하는 층별 인코딩-디코딩 모델도 제시했다.대량의 소설집에서 우리의 모형을 훈련함으로써 우리는 실천에서 잘 표현되는 고도로 통용되는 권적 문장 인코더를 얻었다.여러 개의 기준 데이터 집합과 광범위하게 응용되는 실험 결과에 의하면 제시된 모델이 다른 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নতুন এনকোডার-ডেকোডার প্রস্তাব করছি বিতরণ করা বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিদের শিখার জন্য যা বেশ কিছু উদ্দেশ্যে প্রয়োজন এই মডেলটি ক্রমাগত ভেক্টরে একটি ইনপুটের বাক্য মানচিত্র এবং দীর্ঘ মেমরি পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক হিসেবে ব্যবহার করে একটি এনকোডার হিসেবে শিখিয়েছে। বেশ কিছু কাজ বিবেচনা করা হয়, যার মধ্যে বাক্য পুনর্গঠন এবং ভবিষ্যতের বাক্য ভবিষ্যৎ। এছাড়াও, একটি হিরেরাক্কিল কোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে ভবিষ্যতের বিভিন্ন বাক্যের ভবিষ্যতের বাক্যের প আমাদের মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে একটি বিশাল সংগ্রহের ব্যাপারে আমরা খুব জেনারিক বিশ্বাসের কোডার পেয়েছি যা প্রাক্তনে  বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের বেশ কয়েকটি পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং ব্যাপক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের সাথে প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের উপর প্রতিযোগিতার মাধ্যমে প্', 'ca': "Proposem un nou enfocament codificador-decodificador per aprendre representacions de frases distribuïdes que s'apliquen a múltiples propòsits. El model es aprene utilitzant una xarxa neural convolucionada com un codificador per a mapejar una frase d'entrada en un vector continu, i utilitzant una xarxa neural recurrent de memòria a curt termini com un decodificador. Es consideran diverses tasques, com la reconstrucció de frases i la previsió futura de frases. També es proposa un model de codificador jeràrquic per codificar una frase per predir múltiples frases futures. Treinant els nostres models en una gran col·lecció de novels, obtenim un codificador de frases convolucionades molt genèric que funciona bé en la pràctica. Els resultats experimentals de diversos conjunts de dades de referència, i a través d'una amplia gama d'aplicacions, demostren la superioritat del model proposat en comparació amb els mètodes competidors.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový přístup ke zkódování a dekódování distribuovaných reprezentací vět, které jsou použitelné pro více účelů. Model je naučen pomocí konvoluční neuronové sítě jako kodéru pro mapování vstupní věty do kontinuálního vektoru a pomocí rekurentní neuronové sítě s dlouhodobou krátkodobou pamětí jako dekodéru. Zvažuje se několik úkolů, včetně rekonstrukce věty a predikce budoucích vět. Dále je navržen hierarchický kodér-dekódový model pro kódování věty pro předpověď několika budoucích vět. Školením našich modelů na rozsáhlé sbírce románů získáme vysoce generický kódovač konvolučních vět, který se v praxi dobře výkonuje. Experimentální výsledky na několika referenčních datových sadách a v široké škále aplikací ukazují nadřazenost navrhovaného modelu oproti konkurenčním metodám.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta kooderi-dekooderia, jolla opitaan hajautettuja lauseesityksiä, joita voidaan soveltaa moniin tarkoituksiin. Malli opitaan käyttämällä konvolutionaalista neuroverkkoa koodaajana syöttämään lause jatkuvaan vektoriin ja käyttämällä dekooderina pitkäkestoista lyhytaikaista toistuvaa neuroverkkoa. Harkitaan useita tehtäviä, kuten lauseiden rekonstruktiota ja tulevaisuuden lauseiden ennustamista. Lisäksi ehdotetaan hierarkkista koodaaja-dekooderimallia lauseen koodaamiseksi ennustamaan useita tulevia lauseita. Kouluttamalla malleja laajasta romaanikokoelmasta saamme erittäin geneerisen konvolutionaalisen lausekooderin, joka toimii hyvin käytännössä. Kokeelliset tulokset useista vertailuaineistoista ja erilaisista sovelluksista osoittavat ehdotetun mallin paremmuuden kilpaileviin menetelmiin nähden.', 'az': 'Biz çoxlu məqsədilə uyğunlaşan dağıtılmış cümlələr təsirlərini öyrənmək üçün yeni kodlayıcı-dekoder approach təklif edirik. Model, əvvəlki vektora giriş cümləsini yaratmaq üçün konvolucional nöral a ğ kullanmaq üçün öyrənir və uzun-müddətli yaddaşlar tekrarlanan nöral ağ sistemini dekoder olaraq istifadə edir. Cümlələr yenidən inşallaşdırılması və gələcək cümlələr tədbir edilməsi dahil olmaqla bir neçə iş görülür. Daha sonra, bir hiyerarşik kodlayıcı modeli çoxlu gələcək cümlələri öndərmək üçün cümləni kodlamaq üçün təklif edilir. Bizim modellərimizi böyük bir roman koleksiyonundan təhsil edirək, praksiyada yaxşı işlədən çox generik bir cümləli kodlayıcı alırıq. Müxtəlif benchmark veri qurularında və geniş bir çox uyğulamalar arasında, təklif edilmiş modelinin üstünlüyünü təsdiqləyici metodların üstünlüyünü göstərir.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novi pristup kodera-dekodera da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave rečenice koje su primjenjene na višestruke svrhe. Model se nauči koristeći konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu kao koder kako bi mapirao ulaznu rečenicu u kontinuirani vektor, i koristeći dugoročnu memoriju ponovnu neuralnu mrežu kao dekoder. Smatraju se nekoliko zadataka, uključujući rekonstrukciju kazne i predviđanje buduće kazne. Dalje, predlaže se hijerarhički model dekodera za kodiranje rečenice za predviđanje višestrukih budućih rečenica. Trenirajući naše modele o velikoj kolekciji romana, dobijamo veoma generičan konvolucionalni koder kazne koji dobro izvodi na praksi. Eksperimentalni rezultati na nekoliko standardnih seta podataka i širom niza aplikacija pokazuju nadvišenost predloženog model a nad konkurentnim metodama.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uue kodeerija-dekooderi lähenemisviisi, et õppida mitmel eesmärgil kohaldatavaid hajutatud lauseesitusi. Mudeli õppimiseks kasutatakse konvolutsioonilist närvivõrku kodeerijana sisendlause kaardistamiseks pidevasse vektorisse ning dekooderina kasutatakse pikaajalist mälu korduvat närvivõrku. Kaaletakse mitmeid ülesandeid, sealhulgas karistuste rekonstrueerimist ja tulevaste karistuste ennustamist. Lisaks pakutakse välja hierarhiline kodeerija-dekooder mudel lause kodeerimiseks, et ennustada mitut tulevast lauset. Koolitades oma mudeleid suure romaanide kollektsiooniga, saame väga üldise konvolutsioonilise lausekodeerija, mis toimib praktikas hästi. Mitme võrdlusandmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused ja mitmesugused rakendused näitavad kavandatud mudeli paremust konkureerivate meetoditega võrreldes.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem koder-decoder anyar kanggo ngerasah dilanjelajah perangkat dilanjelajah The model is Learned by Using a convolution Neral network as an koder to map an input string to a continue vector, and use a long-time reminder recurring Neral network as a decoder. section politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Amarok nyong ditumpa model kita nganggo akeh akeh pisan dumadhi, awak dhéwé butakon karo koder sing ditambah bantuan ngono konvolusi sing wis ana in praksi. Menu item', 'he': 'אנו מציעים גישה חדשה לקודר-מפענח כדי ללמוד מייצגים משפטים מרוחקים שמתאימים למטרות רבות. הדוגמא נלמדת על ידי השימוש ברשת עצבית משתנה כקודד כדי למפות משפט כניסה לוקטור ממשיך, ושימוש ברשת עצבית משתנה ארוכה לטווח קצר בתור קודד. שוקלים מספר משימות, כולל בניית משפטים וחזוי משפטים בעתיד. חוץ מזה, מודל היררכי של קודד-קידור מוצע כדי לקוד משפט כדי לחזות משפטים עתידים רבים. על ידי אימון הדוגמנים שלנו על אוסף גדול של רומנים, אנו מקבלים קודם משפטים משתנים גנרלי ביותר שמופיע היטב באימון. תוצאות ניסיוניות על מספר קבוצות מידע רמזים, וברחבי מגוון רחב של שימושים, מראות את העליון של המודל המוצע מעל שיטות מתחרות.', 'ha': "Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi na kode-kode-koda dõmin ka sanar da masu tsari da aka raba maganar da su masu da amfani da masu yawa. Ana sanar da shirin ayuka da ya yi amfani da wani shirin neural na ɗabi'a ko-kode zuwa wani matsayi na shigar a cikin hanya mai daidai, kuma ya yi amfani da wata jerin memory mai lokacin da aka lokace na tsakanin neurar. Ana ƙaddara wasu aikin da ke ƙara, kamar yadda an canza tsarin maganar da kuma babu wani kalma na gaba. Furan haka, aka buƙata wata motsi na kode-koda-na-hiera don ya kodi da wata kalma dõmin ya yi birnin da wasu cire masu gaba. Ga mu yi kõri ga misãlai masu cikin kashi mai girma na takardar ayuka, za'a sami kodi mai ƙidãya ga kalma na dabam'a wanda ke aiki mai kyau. Tajararin matsala ta kan wasu danne-bangon ayuka, da kuma a tsakanin wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu tsawo, ya nuna mafi kyauta ga shirin da aka buyar da shi a kan hanyoyin yin competiti.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov pristop kodirnika-dekoderja za učenje porazdeljenih stavkov, ki se uporabljajo za več namenov. Model se nauči z uporabo konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja kot kodirnika za mapiranje vhodnega stavka v kontinuiran vektor, in z uporabo dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilniškega ponovnega živčnega omrežja kot dekodirnika. Obravnava se več nalog, vključno s rekonstrukcijo stavkov in napovedovanjem prihodnjih stavkov. Poleg tega je predlagan hierarhični model kodirnika-dekodirnika za kodiranje stavka za napoved več prihodnjih stavkov. Z usposabljanjem naših modelov na veliki zbirki romanov dobimo zelo generičen kodirnik konvolucijskih stavkov, ki dobro deluje v praksi. Poskusni rezultati na več referenčnih naborih podatkov in v številnih aplikacijah kažejo, da je predlagani model boljši od konkurenčnih metod.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཚོན་རྟགས་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་སྟོན་རུང་། The model is learned by using a convolutional neural network as an encoder to map an input sentence into a continuous vector, and using a long-term memory recurrent neural network as a decoder. ཚིག་རྐང་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་དང་མ་འོངས་པའི་ཚིག་རྗེས་སུ་ཚིག་ཚང་ལ་མང་ཙམ་ཞིག་བསམ་ཡོད་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་། སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གསལ་བྱེད་པའི་མིག ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་གཏོང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་དུ་འཇུག Experimental results on several benchmark datasets, and across a wide range of applications, demonstrate the superiority of the proposed model over competing methods.'}
{'en': 'Repeat before Forgetting : Spaced Repetition for Efficient and Effective Training of Neural Networks', 'ar': 'كرر قبل النسيان: التكرار المتباعد للتدريب الفعال والفعال للشبكات العصبية', 'es': 'Repetir antes de olvidar: Repetición espaciada para un entrenamiento eficiente y efectivo de las redes neuronales', 'pt': 'Repetir antes de esquecer: repetição espaçada para treinamento eficiente e eficaz de redes neurais', 'fr': "Répéter avant d'oublier\xa0: répétition espacée pour un entraînement efficace des réseaux de neurones", 'zh': '忘前复:间复,以高效训神经网络', 'ja': '忘れる前に繰り返す：ニューラルネットワークの効率的で効果的なトレーニングのための間隔のある繰り返し', 'hi': 'भूलने से पहले दोहराएं: तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के कुशल और प्रभावी प्रशिक्षण के लिए स्पेस्ड पुनरावृत्ति', 'ru': 'Повторять до забывания: интервальное повторение для эффективного и действенного обучения нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'Déan roimh Dhearmad: Athrá spásáilte le haghaidh Oiliúint Éifeachtach agus Éifeachtach ar Líonraí Néaracha', 'ka': 'დაბრუნდეს წინ განმეორება: მსოფლიო განმეორება ეფექტიური და ეფექტიური განმეორება ნეიროლური ქსელების', 'hu': 'Ismételje meg a felejtés előtt: Térbeli ismétlés az ideghálózatok hatékony és hatékony képzéséhez', 'el': 'Επαναλάβετε πριν ξεχάσετε: Διαστημική επανάληψη για αποτελεσματική και αποτελεσματική εκπαίδευση νευρωνικών δικτύων', 'it': 'Ripetere prima di dimenticare: ripetizione spaziale per una formazione efficiente ed efficace delle reti neurali', 'lt': 'Pakartokite prieš pamiršus: Neuralinių tinklų veiksmingo ir veiksmingo mokymo patalpų pakartojimas', 'mk': 'Повторувам пред да заборавам: вселенско повторување за ефикасно и ефикасно обука на невралните мрежи', 'ms': 'Repeat before Forgetting: Spaced Repetition for Efficient and Effective Training of Neural Networks', 'kk': 'Өткеннен алдында қайталау: Невралдық желілердің эффективті және эффективті оқытуы', 'ml': 'മറന്നുപോകുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുക: സ്പെയിസ് റിപ്പിറ്റിഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെ പ്', 'mn': 'Бүтээхээс өмнө дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин давтах', 'no': 'Gjenta før du glemmer: Avstand gjentakinga for effektiv og effektiv trening av neiralnettverk', 'pl': 'Powtórz przed zapomnieniem: Przestrzenna powtórka dla efektywnego i efektywnego szkolenia sieci neuronowych', 'ro': 'Repetați înainte de a uita: Repetiția spațială pentru instruirea eficientă și eficientă a rețelelor neurale', 'mt': 'Irrepeti qabel ma tinsa: Ripetizzjoni Spazjali għal Taħriġ Effiċjenti u Effettiv tan-Netwerks Newrali', 'sr': 'Ponavljam pre zaboravljanja: prostorna ponavljanja za efikasno i efikasno obučenje neuronskih mreža', 'so': 'Repeat before Forget: Spaced Repetition for Efficient and Effective Training of Neural Network', 'ta': 'மறந்து விடுவதற்கு முன் திரும்ப திரும்பச் செய்: வெற்றி மீட்டெடுப்பு பயனுள்ள மற்றும் விளைவான பயிற்சி', 'si': 'අමතක කරන්න කලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න: ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාලවාර්ක්ස් සඳහා ස්ථ', 'ur': 'بھول جانے سے پہلے دوبارہ تکرار کریں: فعال اور اثر فعال ترین نیروں کے لئے دوبارہ تکرار کریں', 'sv': 'Upprepa innan du glömmer: Rymd repetition för effektiv och effektiv utbildning av neurala nätverk', 'vi': 'Lặp lại trước khi quên: Lặp lại khoảng thời gian cho hiệu quả và hiệu quả đào tạo các mạng thần kinh', 'uz': 'Avto- saqlash orqali takrorlash: Spaced Repetition for Effective and Effective Training of Neural Network', 'bg': 'Повторете преди да забравите: Пространствено повторение за ефективно и ефективно обучение на неврални мрежи', 'hr': 'Ponavljam prije zaboravljanja: prostorna ponovnost za učinkovito i učinkovito obučenje neuronskih mreža', 'da': 'Gentag før du glemmer: Spaced Repetition for effektiv og effektiv træning af neurale netværk', 'nl': 'Herhalen voor het vergeten: Gerelateerde herhaling voor efficiënte en effectieve training van neurale netwerken', 'de': 'Wiederholen vor Vergessen: Spaced Repetition für effizientes und effektives Training neuronaler Netzwerke', 'fa': 'تکرار قبل از فراموش کردن: تکرار محلی برای آموزش شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200c', 'tr': 'Unutmadan önce tekrarlanan: Nöral şebekeler üçin etkisel ve etkisel eğitim', 'af': 'Herhaal voor vergeet: Spasieer Herhaal vir Effektiewe en Effektiewe Oefening van Neurale Netwerke', 'id': 'Ulangi sebelum Lupakan: Pengulangan Ruang untuk Pelatihan Efisien dan Efisien Rangkaian Neural', 'sq': 'Përsëris përpara Harrimit: Përsëritje në hapësirë për trajnimin e efektshëm dhe të efektshëm të rrjeteve neuronale', 'ko': '잊어버리기 전 중복: 간격 중복, 신경 네트워크 훈련에 효과적', 'sw': 'Pia mara kabla ya kusahau: Repetition Spaced for Effective and Effective Training of Neural Network', 'bn': 'ভুলে যাওয়ার আগে পুনরায় প্রত্যাবর্তন করুন: নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য স্পেস প্রতিন', 'bs': 'Ponavljam prije zaboravljanja: prostorna ponavljanja za učinkovito i efikasno obučenje neuronskih mreža', 'am': 'Spaced Repetition for Effectient and Effective Training of Neural Network', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերի արդյունավետ և արդյունավետ պատրաստման համար', 'az': 'Unutmadan 톛vv톛l tekrar edin: N칬ral Netikl톛rin faydal캼 v톛 efektiv t톛hsil edilm톛si 칲칞칲n', 'ca': 'Repeat before Forgetting: Spaced Repetition for Efficient and Effective Training of Neural Networks', 'cs': 'Opakování před zapomenutím: mezerová opakování pro efektivní a efektivní trénink neuronových sítí', 'et': 'Korda enne unustamist: ruumikorraldus neurovõrkude tõhusaks ja efektiivseks koolituseks', 'fi': 'Toista ennen unohtamista: Välillinen toisto hermoverkkojen tehokkaaseen ja tehokkaaseen koulutukseen', 'jv': 'Lakok keng paling: Tarjamahan punika terakhi kanggo titik lan efekat terurin Neral Network', 'ha': 'Reposition for Effective and Effective Training of Neural Networks', 'sk': 'Ponovite, preden pozabite: Prostorsko ponovitev za učinkovito in učinkovito usposabljanje nevronskih omrežij', 'bo': 'སྣང་བརྗེད་མ་དགོས་པའི་སྔོན་ལ་བསྐྱར', 'he': 'Repeat before Forgetting: Spaced Repetition for Efficient and Effective Training of Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'We present a novel approach for training artificial neural networks. Our approach is inspired by broad evidence in psychology that shows human learners can learn efficiently and effectively by increasing intervals of time between subsequent reviews of previously learned materials (spaced repetition). We investigate the analogy between training neural models and findings in psychology about human memory model and develop an efficient and effective algorithm to train neural models. The core part of our algorithm is a cognitively-motivated scheduler according to which training instances and their reviews are spaced over time. Our algorithm uses only 34-50 % of data per epoch, is 2.9-4.8 times faster than standard training, and outperforms competing state-of-the-art baselines. Our code is available at.scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/. ', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة جديدة لتدريب الشبكات العصبية الاصطناعية. نهجنا مستوحى من أدلة واسعة في علم النفس تُظهر أن المتعلمين من البشر يمكنهم التعلم بكفاءة وفعالية من خلال زيادة الفواصل الزمنية بين المراجعات اللاحقة للمواد التي تم تعلمها سابقًا (التكرار المتباعد). نحن نحقق في التشابه بين تدريب النماذج العصبية والنتائج في علم النفس حول نموذج الذاكرة البشرية وتطوير خوارزمية فعالة وفعالة لتدريب النماذج العصبية. الجزء الأساسي من الخوارزمية لدينا هو برنامج جدولة ذو دوافع معرفية وفقًا لحالات التدريب و "تقييماتهم" التي يتم تباعدها بمرور الوقت. تستخدم الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا فقط 34-50٪ من البيانات لكل فترة ، وهي أسرع بـ 2.9-4.8 مرة من التدريب القياسي ، وتتفوق في الأداء على أحدث خطوط الأساس المنافسة. الكود الخاص بنا متاح في <scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque novedoso para el entrenamiento de redes neuronales artificiales. Nuestro enfoque se inspira en una amplia evidencia en psicología que demuestra que los estudiantes humanos pueden aprender de manera eficiente y efectiva al aumentar los intervalos de tiempo entre revisiones posteriores de materiales previamente aprendidos (repetición espaciada). Investigamos la analogía entre el entrenamiento de modelos neuronales y los hallazgos en psicología sobre el modelo de memoria humana y desarrollamos un algoritmo eficiente y efectivo para entrenar modelos neuronales. La parte central de nuestro algoritmo es un programador motivado cognitivamente según el cual las instancias de entrenamiento y sus «revisiones» se espacian a lo largo del tiempo. Nuestro algoritmo utiliza solo del 34 al 50% de los datos por época, es de 2,9 a 4,8 veces más rápido que el entrenamiento estándar y supera a las líneas base de vanguardia de la competencia. Nuestro código está disponible en <scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une nouvelle approche pour l'entraînement des réseaux de neurones artificiels. Notre approche est inspirée par de nombreuses preuves en psychologie qui montrent que les apprenants humains peuvent apprendre de manière efficace et efficiente en augmentant les intervalles de temps entre les révisions ultérieures de matériaux précédemment appris (répétition espacée). Nous étudions l'analogie entre les modèles neuronaux d'entraînement et les découvertes en psychologie sur le modèle de mémoire humaine et développons un algorithme efficace pour entraîner des modèles neuronaux. La partie centrale de notre algorithme est un planificateur cognitif selon lequel les instances de formation et leurs «\xa0évaluations\xa0» sont espacées dans le temps. Notre algorithme n'utilise que 34 à 50\xa0% des données par époque, est 2,9 à 4,8 fois plus rapide que la formation standard et surpasse les niveaux de référence de pointe concurrents. Notre code est disponible à l'adresse <scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma nova abordagem para o treinamento de redes neurais artificiais. Nossa abordagem é inspirada por amplas evidências em psicologia que mostram que aprendizes humanos podem aprender de forma eficiente e eficaz aumentando os intervalos de tempo entre as revisões subsequentes de materiais aprendidos anteriormente (repetição espaçada). Investigamos a analogia entre o treinamento de modelos neurais e descobertas em psicologia sobre o modelo de memória humana e desenvolvemos um algoritmo eficiente e eficaz para treinar modelos neurais. A parte central do nosso algoritmo é um escalonador motivado cognitivamente de acordo com o qual as instâncias de treinamento e suas “revisões” são espaçadas ao longo do tempo. Nosso algoritmo usa apenas 34 a 50% dos dados por época, é 2,9 a 4,8 vezes mais rápido que o treinamento padrão e supera as linhas de base de última geração concorrentes. Nosso código está disponível em <scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ja': '人工ニューラルネットワークを訓練するための新たなアプローチを提示します。私たちのアプローチは、以前に学習した教材のその後のレビューの間の時間間隔（間隔の繰り返し）を増やすことによって、人間の学習者が効率的かつ効果的に学習できることを示す心理学の広範な証拠に触発されています。私たちは、ニューラルモデルのトレーニングと人間の記憶モデルに関する心理学の知見との間のアナロジーを調査し、ニューラルモデルをトレーニングするための効率的で効果的なアルゴリズムを開発します。私たちのアルゴリズムの中核部分は、認知的に動機づけられたスケジューラであり、トレーニングインスタンスとその「レビュー」は時間の経過とともに間隔を空けられます。当社のアルゴリズムは、エポック当たりのデータのわずか34 ～ 50%を使用しており、標準的なトレーニングよりも2.9 ～ 4.8倍速く、競合する最先端のベースラインを上回っています。コードはで入手でき<scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>ます。', 'zh': '建新法于人工神经网络。 吾法开心理学博证,此证明白,学者可以增前学续审之间(间隔重复)以效学焉。 考之神经心理学,比于人伦,发一高效,以习神经形。 我们算法的核心是一个识动机的调度程序,据该调度程序,训练实例及"评论"会随时推移间隔。 臣等算法,每 epoch 用 34-50% 之数,倍于率 2.9-4.8 ,而优于竞争性之先进基线。 吾代码可<scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>。', 'hi': 'हम कृत्रिम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के प्रशिक्षण के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण मनोविज्ञान में व्यापक सबूतों से प्रेरित है जो दिखाता है कि मानव शिक्षार्थी पहले से सीखी गई सामग्रियों (स्पेस्ड पुनरावृत्ति) की बाद की समीक्षाओं के बीच समय के अंतराल को बढ़ाकर कुशलतापूर्वक और प्रभावी ढंग से सीख सकते हैं। हम मानव स्मृति मॉडल के बारे में मनोविज्ञान में प्रशिक्षण तंत्रिका मॉडल और निष्कर्षों के बीच सादृश्य की जांच करते हैं और तंत्रिका मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक कुशल और प्रभावी एल्गोरिथ्म विकसित करते हैं। हमारे एल्गोरिथ्म का मुख्य हिस्सा एक संज्ञानात्मक रूप से प्रेरित शेड्यूलर है जिसके अनुसार प्रशिक्षण उदाहरण और उनकी "समीक्षा" समय के साथ जगह बनाई जाती है। हमारा एल्गोरिथ्म प्रति युग केवल 34-50% डेटा का उपयोग करता है, मानक प्रशिक्षण की तुलना में 2.9-4.8 गुना तेज है, और प्रतिस्पर्धी अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं को मात देता है। हमारा कोड <scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/> पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Представлен новый подход к обучению искусственных нейронных сетей. Наш подход вдохновлен широкими доказательствами в психологии, которые показывают, что учащиеся могут учиться эффективно и результативно, увеличивая интервалы времени между последующими обзорами ранее изученных материалов (интервальное повторение). Мы исследуем аналогию между обучающими нейронными моделями и выводами в психологии о модели памяти человека и разрабатываем эффективный и действенный алгоритм обучения нейронным моделям. Ядром нашего алгоритма является когнитивно мотивированный планировщик, согласно которому обучающие мероприятия и их «отзывы» распределяются по времени. Наш алгоритм использует только 34-50% данных за эпоху, в 2,9-4,8 раза быстрее, чем стандартное обучение, и превосходит конкурирующие современные базовые линии. Наш код доступен по адресу<scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid cur chuige nua i láthair chun líonraí néaracha saorga a oiliúint. Tá ár gcur chuige spreagtha ag fianaise leathan sa tsíceolaíocht a thaispeánann gur féidir le foghlaimeoirí daonna foghlaim go héifeachtach agus go héifeachtach trí eatraimh ama a mhéadú idir athbhreithnithe ina dhiaidh sin ar ábhair a foghlaimíodh cheana (athrá spásáilte). Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an analaí idir samhlacha néaracha a thraenáil agus torthaí na síceolaíochta faoi mhúnla cuimhne an duine agus forbróimid algartam éifeachtach agus éifeachtúil chun samhlacha néaracha a oiliúint. Is é an chuid lárnach dár n-algartam sceidealóir spreagtha go cognaíoch a bhfuil spásáil idir cásanna oiliúna agus a gcuid “athbhreithnithe” de réir a chéile. Ní úsáideann ár n-algartam ach 34-50% de shonraí in aghaidh na haga, tá sé 2.9-4.8 uair níos tapúla ná an oiliúint chaighdeánach, agus sáraíonn sé bonnlínte iomaíocha den scoth. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag <scholar.harvard.edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ka': "ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ახალგაზრულ ნეიროლური ქსელების განაკეთებაში. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია ფსიკოლოგიაში ჩვენი ძალიან ძალიან წარმოდგენა, რომელიც მხოლოდ ადამიანის სწავლებელების შესაძლებელია ეფექტიურად და эფექტიურად სწავლათ, რომელიც შემდეგ წინ სწავლილი ჩვენ განვიწყებთ ანალოგიას ნეიროლური მოდელების განვიწყება და ფსიკოლოგიაში ადამიანის მეხსიერის მოდელზე შესახებ და განვიწყებთ ეფექტიური და ეფექტიური ალგორიტიმის განვიწ ჩვენი ალგორიტიმის მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილი არის კონციგურად მოტივირული სიგრძნე, რომელიც განაკეთებული ინსტუნციები და მათი 'განაკეთებები' გაყოფილი დროში. ჩვენი ალგორიტიმი გამოყენება მხოლოდ 34-50% მონაცემების პირველი ეპოფოში, 2.9-4.8-ჯერ უფრო სიჩქარე სტანდარტული განაცემებისთვის, და უფრო გავაკეთება კონკრენტირებული ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია <სწავლებელში. ჳაპგაპე. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a mesterséges neurális hálózatok kiképzésének új megközelítését. Megközelítésünket a pszichológia széles körű bizonyítékai inspirálják, amelyek azt mutatják, hogy az emberi tanulók hatékonyan és hatékonyan tanulhatnak a korábban megtanult anyagok későbbi felülvizsgálatai közötti időintervallumok növelésével (térközös ismétlés). Vizsgáljuk a neurális modellek képzése és az emberi memória modellek pszichológiai megállapításai közötti analógiát, és hatékony és hatékony algoritmust dolgozunk ki neurális modellek képzésére. Algoritmusunk alapvető része egy kognitív motivációjú ütemező, amely szerint a képzési példányok és azok "értékelései" idővel eltérnek. Az algoritmusunk korszakonként mindössze 34-50%-ot használ fel, 2,9-4,8-szor gyorsabb a hagyományos edzésnél, és felülmúlja a versenyző legkorszerűbb alapvonalakat. A kódunk elérhető a <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για την εκπαίδευση τεχνητών νευρωνικών δικτύων. Η προσέγγισή μας είναι εμπνευσμένη από ευρείες ενδείξεις στην ψυχολογία που δείχνουν ότι οι μαθητές μπορούν να μάθουν αποτελεσματικά και αποτελεσματικά αυξάνοντας τα χρονικά διαστήματα μεταξύ των επόμενων αναθεωρήσεων των προηγουμένως διδαχθέντων υλικών (επανάληψη σε διαστήματα). Ερευνούμε την αναλογία μεταξύ εκπαιδευτικών νευρωνικών μοντέλων και ευρημάτων στην ψυχολογία σχετικά με το μοντέλο ανθρώπινης μνήμης και αναπτύσσουμε έναν αποτελεσματικό και αποτελεσματικό αλγόριθμο για την εκπαίδευση νευρωνικών μοντέλων. Το βασικό μέρος του αλγόριθμου μας είναι ένας προγραμματιστής με γνωστικά κίνητρα σύμφωνα με τον οποίο οι εκπαιδευτικές περιπτώσεις και οι "αναθεωρήσεις" τους διαχωρίζονται με την πάροδο του χρόνου. Ο αλγόριθμος μας χρησιμοποιεί μόνο 34-50% δεδομένων ανά εποχή, είναι 2.9-4.8 φορές γρηγορότερος από την κανονική εκπαίδευση και ξεπερνά τις ανταγωνιστικές γραμμές βάσης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Ο κώδικας μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο <gelehrteς. Χάρβαρντ. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'kk': 'Біз әртүрлі невралды желілерді оқыту үшін романдық тәртібін таңдаймыз. Біздің қасиетіміз психологиялық көпшіліктерінің көпшілікті құқықтарын көрсетеді. Адам оқытушыларының көпшілікті және ефективні оқыту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Біз психологиялық психология үшін невралдық моделдерді оқыту мен психология үшін аналогияны зерттеп, невралдық моделдерді оқыту үшін ефективті және эффективті алгоритм жасап Алгоритміздің негізгі бөлігі - күнтізбен мотивирован жоспарлаушы. Олардың оқыту мерзімі және "редакциялары" уақытта орындалады. Алгоритміз тек 34-50% деректерді епошта көмегімен қолданады, 2,9-4,8 рет стандартты оқытудан тез болады, және әртүрлі жұмыс күйінің негізгі жолдарының шығысы. Біздің кодмыз <scholar> дегенде бар. Харвард. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'it': 'Presentiamo un nuovo approccio per la formazione di reti neurali artificiali. Il nostro approccio è ispirato da ampie prove in psicologia che dimostrano che gli studenti umani possono imparare in modo efficiente ed efficace aumentando gli intervalli di tempo tra le revisioni successive di materiali precedentemente appresi (ripetizione spaziata). Investighiamo l\'analogia tra l\'addestramento di modelli neurali e i risultati in psicologia sul modello della memoria umana e sviluppiamo un algoritmo efficiente ed efficace per formare modelli neurali. La parte centrale del nostro algoritmo è uno scheduler cognitivamente motivato in base al quale le istanze di formazione e le loro "recensioni" sono spaziate nel tempo. Il nostro algoritmo utilizza solo il 34-50% dei dati per epoca, è 2,9-4,8 volte più veloce dell\'allenamento standard e supera le linee di base concorrenti all\'avanguardia. Il nostro codice è disponibile su <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame naują požiūrį į dirbtinių nervų tinklų mokymą. Our approach is inspired by broad evidence in psychology that shows human learners can learn efficiently and effectively by increasing intervals of time between subsequent reviews of previously learned materials (spaced repetition).  Mes tiriame neurologinių modelių mokymo ir psichologijos rezultatų apie žmogaus atminties model į analogiją ir parengiame veiksmingą ir veiksmingą neurologinių modelių mokymo algoritmą. Pagrindinė mūsų algoritmo dalis yra kognityviai motyvuotas tvarkaraštis, pagal kurį mokymo atvejai ir jų "apžvalgos" laiko bėgant. Mūsų algoritmas naudoja tik 34–50 proc. kiekvienos epokos duomenų, yra 2,9–4,8 karto greitesnis nei standartinis mokymas, o rezultatai yra aukščiausio lygio konkuruojančios bazinės linijos. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas <moksleiviui. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'mk': 'Презентираме нов пристап за обука на вештачките нервни мрежи. Нашиот пристап е инспириран од широки докази во психологијата кои покажуваат дека учениците од човештвото можат да научат ефикасно и ефикасно со зголемување на интервалите на време помеѓу последните прегледувања на претходно научените материјали (вселенско We investigate the analogy between training neural models and findings in psychology about human memory model and develop an efficient and effective algorithm to train neural models.  Главниот дел од нашиот алгоритм е когнитивно мотивиран распоредувач според кој инцидентите на тренинг и нивните „рецензии“ се проширени со текот на времето. Нашиот алгоритм користи само 34-50 отсто од податоците за една епоха, е 2,9-4,8 пати побрз од стандардната обука, и надминува конкурентни најсовремени бази линии. Нашиот код е достапен на <научник. Харвард. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ml': "നമ്മള്\u200d കൃത്രിമിക്കല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്ററുകള്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വഴിയെ ക മനുഷ്യര്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുവാനും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താനും കഴിയുന്ന സമയത്തിനുള്ള ഇടവേള കൂടുതല്\u200d കാലം കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ക ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും സൈക്കോളജിയിലെ കണ്ടെത്തികള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള അന്യായോജ്യം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരുടെ മോഡലിനെക്കുറിച നമ്മുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലെ ഭാഗമാണ് പരിശീലന നടപടികളും അവയുടെ 'പരിശീലികള്\u200d' സമയത്തേക്കാള്\u200d വിശാലമാക്കുന്നത്. ഞങ്ങളുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം എപ്പോക്കില്\u200d 34-50% ഡേറ്റാ മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ. ഞങ്ങളുടെ കോഡ് <സ്കൂളില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാണ്. ഹാര്\u200dവാര്\u200dഡ്. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'ms': "Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk melatih rangkaian saraf buatan. Our approach is inspired by broad evidence in psychology that shows human learners can learn efficiently and effectively by increasing intervals of time between subsequent reviews of previously learned materials (spaced repetition).  Kami menyelidiki analogi antara latihan model saraf dan penemuan dalam psikologi mengenai model memori manusia dan mengembangkan algoritma efisien dan efektif untuk melatih model saraf. Bahagian utama algoritma kita ialah jadual yang bermotif secara kognitif menurut mana kejadian latihan dan 'ulasan' mereka terpisah sepanjang masa. Algoritma kita hanya menggunakan 34-50% data per epok, adalah 2.9-4.8 kali lebih cepat daripada latihan piawai, dan melampaui garis dasar state-of-the-art yang bersaing. Kod kami tersedia di <scholar. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'mn': 'Бид уран бүтээлч мэдрэлийн сүлжээний сургалтын шинэ арга зам өгсөн. Бидний ойлголт сэтгэл зүйн судлаачид хүний сурагчид үр дүнтэй болон эффективно суралцаж чадна. Өмнө сурсан материалуудын дараагийн судалгааны хооронд цаг хугацааны хугацаа нэмэгдүүлж чадна. Бид сэтгэл санамж загварын сэтгэл зүйн загварын сургалт болон сэтгэл зүйн бодлогын тухай аналогийг судалж, сэтгэл зүйн загварын тухай үр дүнтэй, үр дүнтэй алгоритм боловсруулдаг. Бидний алгоритмын гол хэсэг нь мэдлэгтэй урам зориулагч юм. Тэдний сургалтын үйл ажиллагаа болон "шинжилгээ" нь цаг хугацаанд оршигддог. Бидний алгоритм нь зөвхөн 34-50% өгөгдлийн хувьд хэрэглэдэг. Энэ нь стандарт сургалтын сургалтыг 2.9-4.8 удаа хурдан ашиглаж байна. Бидний код нь сургуулийн эрдэмтэд байдаг. Харвард. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ ġdid għat-taħriġ tan-netwerks newrali artifiċjali. L-approċċ tagħna huwa ispirat minn evidenza wiesgħa fil-psikoloġija li turi li l-istudenti umani jistgħu jitgħallmu b’mod effiċjenti u effettiv billi jiżdiedu l-intervalli ta’ żmien bejn ir-reviżjonijiet sussegwenti ta’ materjali li ttieħdu qabel (ripetizzjoni spazjata). Aħna ninvestigaw l-analogja bejn it-taħriġ tal-mudelli newrali u s-sejbiet fil-psikoloġija dwar il-mudell tal-memorja umana u niżviluppaw algoritmu effiċjenti u effettiv għat-taħriġ tal-mudelli newrali. Il-parti ewlenija tal-algoritmu tagħna hija skedar motivat b’mod konjittiv li skontu l-istanzi ta’ taħriġ u r-‘reviżjonijiet’ tagħhom huma spazjati maż-żmien. L-algoritmu tagħna juża biss 34-50% tad-dejta għal kull epoka, huwa 2.9-4.8 darbiet aktar mgħaġġel mit-taħriġ standard, u jwassal għal linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati li jikkompetu. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq <studjant. il-ħsad. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein roman tilnærming for å trenja kunstiske neuralnettverk. Tilnærminga vårt er inspirert av brede beviser i psykologi som viser at menneske lærarane kan lære effektivt og effektivt ved å øke intervaller av tid mellom førre lærte undersøkingar av førre lærte materialer (mellomrom gjentaking). Vi undersøker analogien mellom trening av neuralmodeller og finning i psykologi om menneskelig minnemodul og utviklar ein effektiv og effektiv algoritme for å trene neuralmodeller. Kjardelen av algoritmen vår er ein kognitivt motivert planleggar etter kva treningsinstanser og deres «reviewer» er plassert over tid. Algoritmen vårt bruker berre 34-50% av data per epoch, er 2,9-4,8 ganger raskare enn standard trening, og utfører konkurrente baselinjer. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på <scholar. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o abordare nouă pentru instruirea rețelelor neurale artificiale. Abordarea noastră este inspirată de dovezi ample în psihologie care arată că elevii umani pot învăța eficient și eficient prin creșterea intervalelor de timp între revizuirile ulterioare ale materialelor învățate anterior (repetiție spațială). Investigăm analogia dintre formarea modelelor neurale și descoperirile în psihologie despre modelul memoriei umane și dezvoltăm un algoritm eficient și eficient pentru formarea modelelor neurale. Partea de bază a algoritmului nostru este un programator motivat cognitiv conform căruia instanțele de formare și "recenziile" acestora sunt spațiate în timp. Algoritmul nostru folosește doar 34-50% din date pe epocă, este de 2,9-4,8 ori mai rapid decât antrenamentul standard și depășește liniile de bază concurente de ultimă generație. Codul nostru este disponibil la <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy nowatorskie podejście do treningu sztucznych sieci neuronowych. Nasze podejście jest inspirowane szerokimi dowodami psychologicznymi, które pokazują, że uczący się człowieka mogą uczyć się skutecznie i efektywnie poprzez zwiększenie odstępów czasu między kolejnymi przeglądami wcześniej nauczonych materiałów (powtórzenie w przestrzeni). Badamy analogię pomiędzy treningiem modeli neuronowych a odkryciami w psychologii modelu pamięci człowieka oraz opracowujemy efektywny i skuteczny algorytm treningu modeli neuronowych. Podstawową częścią naszego algorytmu jest poznawczo zmotywowany harmonogram, zgodnie z którym instancje treningowe i ich "recenzje" są rozmieszczone w czasie. Nasz algorytm wykorzystuje zaledwie 34-50% danych na epokę, jest 2,9-4,8 razy szybszy niż standardowe treningi i przewyższa konkurencyjne najnowocześniejsze linie bazowe. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo novi pristup obuci umjetne neuralne mreže. Naš pristup je inspirisan širom dokazima u psihologiji koji pokazuju da ljudski učenici mogu učiti efikasno i efikasno povećanjem intervala vremena između poslednjih pregleda prethodno naučenih materijala (prostornog ponavljanja). Istražujemo analogiju između obuke neuralnih modela i nalaza u psihologiji o modelu ljudskog pamćenja i razvijamo efikasan i efikasan algoritam za obuku neuralnih modela. Osnovni deo našeg algoritma je kognitivno motivisan raspored, prema kojem se trening instanci i njihovi "pregledi" raspoređuju tokom vremena. Naš algoritam koristi samo 34-50% podataka po epochu, je 2,9-4,8 puta brže od standardnog treninga, i nadmašuje konkurentne osnovne linije. Naš kod je dostupan na <učenju. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'si': "අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාතික ජාතික ජාතික විද්\u200dයාපනයක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා. අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල සාක්ෂිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මිනිස්සුන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් හැකියාවක් ව අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේල් එක්ක සහ මිනිස්සු මතක මොඩේල් එක්ක හොයාගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක ප්\u200d අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම්ගේ මුළු කොටසක් තමයි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ 'පරීක්ෂණය'  අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් දත්ත 34-50% විතරයි ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ, ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් 2.9-4.8 වතාවක් වේගයෙන් වේ අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන්. හර්වර්ඩ්. ed/had/RbF/>.", 'so': 'Waxaynu keenaynaa qaab warqad ah oo u tababarinta shabakada neurada ee farsamada ah. Our approach is inspired by broad evidence in psychology that shows human learners can learn efficiently and effectively by increasing intervals of time between subsequent reviews of previously learned materials (spaced repetition).  Anagaa baaraynaa sawirada u dhexeeya waxbarashada modelalka neurada iyo helitaanka cilmi-cilmi ku saabsan tusaale xusuusta biniaadamka iyo horumarinta algorithm faa’iido leh oo faa’iido leh si aan u tababarino modelalka neurada. Qaybta kooxa ah ee algoritheena waa qorshaha la hagaajiyey oo aqoonta leh, taasoo lagu qorayo dhacdooyinka waxbarashada iyo ka horeysa horumarinta. Algorithmeteenu wuxuu isticmaalaa 34-50% oo macluumaad ku saabsan epoch oo kaliya, waa 2.9-4.8 jeer oo ka dhaqso waxbarashada standardka, wuxuuna sameynaa qorshaha farshaxanka. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa <iskuul. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för utbildning av artificiella neurala nätverk. Vårt tillvägagångssätt är inspirerat av breda bevis inom psykologi som visar att mänskliga elever kan lära sig effektivt och effektivt genom att öka tidsintervallen mellan efterföljande granskningar av tidigare inlärda material (spaced repetition). Vi undersöker analogin mellan träning av neurala modeller och fynd inom psykologi kring mänsklig minnesmodell och utvecklar en effektiv algoritm för att träna neurala modeller. Kärnan i vår algoritm är en kognitivt motiverad schemaläggare enligt vilken utbildningsinstanser och deras "recensioner" fördelas över tid. Vår algoritm använder endast 34-50% av data per epok, är 2,9-4,8 gånger snabbare än standardträning och överträffar konkurrerande toppmoderna baslinjer. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ta': "நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய செயல்பாட்டு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு புதிய செயல்பாட்டை  நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு தெளிவான தெளிவான அத்தாட்சிகளால் தெரிவிக்கப்படுகிறது அது மனித கற்றல்களை காண்பிக்கும் முன்பு கற்ற பொருட்களின் மீண்டும் பின நாம் புதிய மாதிரிகளையும் கண்டுபிடிப்பதையும் மனித நினைவு மாதிரியைப் பற்றிய கண்டுபிடிப்புகளையும் இடையே ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் மற்றும்  எங்கள் ஆல்goritm மூல பகுதியின் மூல பகுதி ஒரு அறிந்து கொள்ளும் திட்டமாகும் பயிற்சி நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் 'முன்னோக்கு' நேரத்திற்க எங்கள் ஆல்gorithm ஒவ்வொரு எப்போக்கும் 34-50% தகவலை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, 2.9-4.8 முறை நிலையான பயிற்சியை விட வேகமாக இருக்கும், மற்றும் போராடும் கல <scholar இல் எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும். ஹார்வார்ட். edu/hadi/RbF />.", 'ur': "ہم نئورل نیٹورل کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ روانشناسی میں وسیع شہادت کے ذریعہ الهام کی جاتی ہے جو لوگوں کی تعلیم کرنے والوں کو اثرات اور اثرات کے ذریعہ سے سکھا سکتا ہے کہ اس کے بعد پہلے علم کی مواد کے درمیان زمانہ کی مدت بڑھنے کے ذریعہ سے۔ ہم نے نئورل موڈلز کی تعلیم اور روانشناسی میں انسان کے ذکر موڈلہ کے بارے میں تلاش کی آنالوژی کی تحقیق کریں اور نئورل موڈلز کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک مفید اور اثبات الگوریٹم کی تولید کریں۔ ہمارے الگوریتم کا اصلی حصہ ایک معلوم طریقے سے منتظر ہے جس کے مطابق تدریس حادثوں اور ان کی 'ریونڈیز' کو وقت پر پھیلایا جاتا ہے. ہمارا الگوریتم صرف 34-50% ڈیٹا پر اپنا اپنا استعمال کرتا ہے، 2.9-4.8 دفعہ استاندارڈ ترین سے زیادہ سریع ہے، اور آهنت کی بنسٹ لین کے مسابقه سے زیادہ سریع ہے. ہمارا کڈ <scholar> میں موجود ہے. ہروارد۔ edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'uz': "Biz ijodkorlik neyron tarmoqlarini tahrirlash uchun novel usulni hozir qilamiz. Bizning usuli psykologiyatda ko'p obʼektlarni ko'rsatadi, odamlar o'qituvchilari keyingi o'rgangan materiallarning keyingi o'rganishlarini o'rganishdan foydali va effektiv o'rganishi mumkin. Biz neyrolik modellari va psykologiyatda o'rganish natijalarini o'rganamiz va inson xotira modelini o'rganish uchun tashqi va effektiv algoritni o'rganamiz. Algoritmizning asosiy bir qismi bilan tashkilotga harakat qiladigan dastur, shunday qilib, ta'lim holatlari va 'taʼminlovchi' xususiyatlari vaqt ichida joylashadi. Our algorithm uses only 34-50% of data per epoch, is 2.9-4.8 times faster than standard training, and outperforms competing state-of-the-art baselines.  Bizning kodi <maktabda mavjud. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp mới để huấn luyện mạng thần kinh nhân tạo. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi được truyền cảm hứng từ những bằng chứng về tâm lý rộng lớn cho thấy những học sinh con người có thể học hỏi hiệu quả và hiệu quả bằng cách tăng dần thời gian giữa các bài kiểm tra sau. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu so sánh giữa huấn luyện các mô hình thần kinh và các phát hiện về mô hình trí nhớ con người và phát triển một thuật to án hiệu quả và hiệu quả để huấn luyện các mô hình thần kinh. Phần cốt lõi của thuật to án của chúng ta là một cài đặt được nhận thức dựa trên đó các trường hợp đào tạo và "đánh giá" được phân chia qua thời gian. Thuật toán của chúng ta chỉ sử dụng 34-50=* của dữ liệu cho mỗi khoảng thời gian, là 2.9-4.8 thời gian nhanh hơn huấn luyện thông thường, và hoàn thành các nền tảng đang cạnh tranh. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở harvard! Edu/hadi/RbF.-.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов подход за обучение на изкуствени невронни мрежи. Нашият подход е вдъхновен от широки доказателства в психологията, които показват, че обучаемите хора могат да учат ефективно и ефективно чрез увеличаване на интервалите от време между последващите прегледи на предварително научени материали (интервали от повторение). Проучваме аналогията между тренировъчните невронни модели и откритията в психологията за модела на човешката памет и разработваме ефективен и ефективен алгоритъм за обучение на невронни модели. Основната част на нашия алгоритъм е когнитивно мотивиран график, според който тренировъчните инстанции и техните "прегледи" са разпределени във времето. Нашият алгоритъм използва само 34-50% от данните за епоха, е 2,9-4,8 пъти по-бърз от стандартното обучение и надминава конкурентните най-съвременни базови линии. Кодът ни е достъпен на <scholar. Харвард. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup vježbanju umjetničkih nervnih mreža. Naš pristup je inspirisan širom dokazima u psihologiji koji pokazuju da ljudski učenici mogu učiti učinkovito i učinkovito povećanjem intervala vremena između sljedećih ispitivanja prethodno naučenih materijala (prostorno ponavljanje). Istražujemo analogiju između obuke neuronskih modela i nalaza u psihologiji o modelu ljudskog sjećanja i razvijamo učinkovit i učinkovit algoritam za obuku neuronskih modela. Osnovni dio našeg algoritma je kognitivno motivirani raspored, prema kojem se trening instanci i njihovi "pregledi" rasprostruju tijekom vremena. Naš algoritam koristi samo 34-50% podataka po epochu, je 2,9-4,8 puta brže od standardnog treninga i nadmašuje konkurentne osnovne linije. Naš kod je dostupan na <učenju. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'nl': "We presenteren een nieuwe aanpak voor het trainen van kunstmatige neurale netwerken. Onze aanpak is geïnspireerd op breed bewijs in de psychologie dat aantoont dat menselijke leerlingen efficiënt en effectief kunnen leren door tussentijdse intervallen tussen latere beoordelingen van eerder aangeleerde materialen te verlengen (spaced repetition). We onderzoeken de analogie tussen het trainen van neurale modellen en bevindingen in de psychologie over menselijk geheugenmodel en ontwikkelen een efficiënt en effectief algoritme om neurale modellen te trainen. Het kerndeel van ons algoritme is een cognitief gemotiveerde planner volgens welke trainingsinstanties en hun 'reviews' over de tijd worden verdeeld. Ons algoritme gebruikt slechts 34-50% van data per tijdperk, is 2,9-4,8 keer sneller dan standaard training en presteert beter dan concurrerende state-of-the-art baselines. Onze code is beschikbaar op <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'da': "Vi præsenterer en ny tilgang til træning af kunstige neurale netværk. Vores tilgang er inspireret af brede beviser inden for psykologi, der viser, at menneskelige elever kan lære effektivt og effektivt ved at øge tidsintervallerne mellem efterfølgende gennemgang af tidligere lærte materialer (distance repetition). Vi undersøger analogien mellem træning af neurale modeller og fund i psykologi omkring human hukommelse model og udvikler en effektiv algoritme til træning af neurale modeller. Kernen i vores algoritme er en kognitivt motiveret planlægger, ifølge hvilken træningsinstanser og deres 'anmeldelser' er fordelt over tid. Vores algoritme bruger kun 34-50% af data pr. epoke, er 2,9-4,8 gange hurtigere end standard træning, og overgår konkurrerende state-of-the-art basislinjer. Vores kode er tilgængelig på <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen neuartigen Ansatz für das Training künstlicher neuronaler Netzwerke. Unser Ansatz ist inspiriert von breiten Erkenntnissen in der Psychologie, die zeigen, dass menschliche Lernende effizient und effektiv lernen können, indem sie die Zeitintervalle zwischen nachfolgenden Überprüfungen von zuvor erlernten Materialien verlängern (spaced repetition). Wir untersuchen die Analogie zwischen dem Training neuronaler Modelle und Erkenntnissen in der Psychologie über das menschliche Gedächtnismodell und entwickeln einen effizienten und effektiven Algorithmus, um neuronale Modelle zu trainieren. Kernstück unseres Algorithmus ist ein kognitiv motivierter Scheduler, nach dem Trainingsinstanzen und deren "Reviews" über die Zeit verteilt werden. Unser Algorithmus verwendet nur 34-50% der Daten pro Epoche, ist 2,9-4,8-mal schneller als Standardtraining und übertrifft konkurrierende State-of-the-Art Baselines. Unser Code ist unter <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ko': "우리는 새로운 인공 신경 네트워크 훈련 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 심리학의 광범위한 증거의 계발을 받았다. 이러한 증거에 의하면 인류 학습자는 후속 복습 전 학습 자료의 시간 간격(간격 중복)을 늘려 효율적인 학습을 할 수 있다.우리는 훈련신경모델과 심리학에서 인류기억모델에 대한 발견 간의 유사성을 연구하고 효율적인 알고리즘을 개발하여 신경모델을 훈련시켰다.우리의 알고리즘의 핵심 부분은 동기를 인지하는 스케줄러인데 이에 따라 훈련 실례와'평론'은 시간 간격에 따라 이루어진다.우리의 알고리즘은 매 역원마다 34-50%의 데이터만 사용하고 표준 훈련보다 2.9-4.8배 빠르며 경쟁이 가장 선진적인 기선보다 우수하다.우리의 코드는 다음 사이트에서 얻을 수 있습니다:.하버드?edu/hadi/RbF/>。", 'id': "We present a novel approach for training artificial neural networks.  pendekatan kita diinspirasi oleh bukti yang luas dalam psikologi yang menunjukkan para pelajar manusia dapat belajar secara efisien dan efektif dengan meningkatkan interval waktu antara penelitian berikutnya dari materi yang telah belajar sebelumnya (repetition luas). We investigate the analogy between training neural models and findings in psychology about human memory model and develop an efficient and effective algorithm to train neural models.  Bagian utama dari algoritma kita adalah jadwal yang bermotivasi kognitif menurut mana kejadian pelatihan dan 'resensi' mereka terpisah melalui waktu. Algoritma kita hanya menggunakan 34-50% data per epok, 2.9-4.8 kali lebih cepat dari pelatihan standar, dan melampaui batas dasar yang berkompetisi state-of-the-art. Kode kami tersedia di <scholar. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'fa': 'ما روش نویسی برای آموزش شبکه\u200cهای عصبی مصنوعی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. دستور ما توسط مدرک گسترده در روانشناسی الهام می\u200cشود که نشان می\u200cدهد که دانش\u200cآموزان انسان می\u200cتوانند با افزایش مدرک زمان بین تحقیقات بعدی از مواد\u200cهای دانش\u200cآموز پیش (تکرار فضایی) موثرت و موثرت یاد بگیرند. ما анаلوژی بین آموزش مدل عصبی و پیدا کردن در روانشناسی درباره مدل حافظه انسان تحقیق می کنیم و یک الگوریتم موثرت و موثرت برای آموزش مدل عصبی توسعه می کنیم. بخش اصلی الگوریتم ما یک برنامه\u200cنویس\u200cکننده\u200cی منفجر به شناختی است که بر اساس آن مواقع آموزش و تحقیقات آنها در طول زمان منتشر می\u200cشوند. الگوریتم ما فقط 34-50 درصد از داده\u200cهای هر ایپوچ استفاده می\u200cکند، 2.9-4.8 بار سریعتر از آموزش استاندارد است و پایگاه\u200cهای هنری رقابت می\u200cکند. کد ما در دانشمند موجود است. هارورد edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'sw': "We present a novel approach for training artificial neural networks.  Hatua yetu inahamasishwa na ushahidi mkubwa wa kisaikolojia unaoonyesha wanafunzi wa binadamu wanaweza kujifunza kwa ufanisi na kwa ufanisi kwa kuongeza muda kati ya tathmini za vifaa vilivyojifunza hivi karibuni (kurudisha nafasi). Tunafahamu uchambuzi kati ya mafunzo ya mifano ya neurali na matokeo ya kisaikolojia kuhusu modeli ya kumbukumbu za binadamu na kutengeneza algorithi yenye ufanisi na ufanisi wa kufundisha mifano ya neurali. The core part of our algorithm is a cognitively-motivated scheduler according to which training instances and their 'reviews' are spaced over time.  Ualgorithi wetu unatumia asilimia 34-50 tu ya data kwa kila epochi, ni mara 2.9-4.8 haraka zaidi ya mafunzo ya kawaida, na inaonyesha misingi ya aina ya sanaa inayoshindana. Utawala wetu unapatikana kwenye <shule. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'tr': 'Biz sungaty neural a ýtlary okuw etmek üçin roman ýazşyny görkeýäris. Biziñ golymyz psikologiýada örän köp kanıtlar tarapyndan esinlendirilýär we adamlaryň öwrenmegi etkinlik we täsirli bolup öwrenip biljekdigini görkezýär. Biz neural modellerini öwretmek we psikologiýada adam yada hatyrlama nusgasynda tapmaklaryň arasynda analogiýany barýarys we neural modellerini öwretmek üçin etkinlik we täsirli algoritmus geliştirdik. Algoritmynyň esasy bölegi, bilim sistemasynda görkezilýän sahypalaryň we olaryň "resetleri" wagtyň üstünde ýerleşýän sahypalardyr. Biziň algoritmimiz diňe 34-50% depok hatlaryny ulanýar, 2.9-4.8 çarp standart okuwçysyndan çalt we sungatçylyklaryň durumyny üstüne çykýar. Biziň kodymyz <bilim adamlarynda bar. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'af': 'Ons stel \'n nuwe toegang voor kunstenaar neuralnetwerke te oefen. Ons toegang is inspireer deur breë getuienisse in psykologie wat wys menslike leerders effektief en effektief kan leer deur die vergroot intervale van tyd tussen volgende hersiening van voorheen geleerde materiale (spasieer herhaal). Ons ondersoek die analogie tussen oefening van neurale modelles en vindings in psykologie oor menslike geheue model en ontwikkel \'n effektief en effektief algoritme om neurale modelles te oefen. Die koorddeel van ons algoritme is \'n kognitief-motiveerde skeduleerder volgens wat onderwerp voorkoms en hul "hersienings" is deur tyd uitgebruik. Ons algoritme gebruik slegs 34-50% van data per epoch, is 2.9-4.8 maal vinniger as standaard onderwerking, en uitvoer die mededingste status-of-kuns basisline. Ons kode is beskikbaar by <scholar. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'sq': "Ne paraqesim një qasje të re për trajnimin e rrjeteve nervore artificiale. Përqasja jonë frymëzohet nga prova të gjera në psikologji që tregon se mësuesit njerëzor mund të mësojnë efektivisht dhe efektivisht duke rritur intervalet e kohës midis shqyrtimeve të mëparshme të materialeve të mësuara më parë (përsëritje në hapësirë). Ne hetojmë analogjinë midis trajnimit të modeleve neuronale dhe gjetjeve në psikologji rreth modelit të kujtesës njerëzore dhe zhvillojmë një algoritëm të efektshëm dhe të efektshëm për trajnimin e modeleve neuronale. Pjesa kryesore e algoritmit tonë është një planifikues i motivuar në mënyrë kognitive sipas të cilit rastet e trajnimit dhe 'revizionet' e tyre janë hapur gjatë kohës. Algoritmi ynë përdor vetëm 34-50% të dhënave për epokë, është 2.9-4.8 herë më i shpejtë se stërvitja standarte, dhe ekzekuton linjat bazë konkurruese më të larta. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion tek <shkencëtari. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'am': 'አዲስ የደቡብ ነጥብ መረብ ለማስተማር የኖሮውን መንገድ እናቀርባለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን በሲኮሎጂ ሰብአዊ ተማሪዎችን በጥቅም እና በጥቅም በማሳየቱ በሚያስተማሩ ዘመን በሚያሳየው የቀድሞው ተማረ ዕቃዎች (ተቃውሞ መደጋጋገሚያ) በሚያሳየው ሰዓት ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ የናውሮል ሞላት እና የሲኮሎጂ ፍላጎቶችን በሚያስተምር እናሳይናለን፤ የሰው ማስታወስ ሞዴል እና በጥቅም እና በጥያቄ አሌጎሪትምን ለማስተምር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአልጎሪክም የኩነቱ ክፍል በብልሃት የተመሳሳይ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ አሌጎራትማችን በኤፉክ የሚኖሩት 34-50 በመቶ ዳታ ብቻ ይጠቅማል፤ ከደካማነት ትምህርት ይልቅ 2.9-4.8 እጥፍ ፈጥኖ ነው፤ የዓለማዊ-የዓለማት መሠረት ግንኙነት ላይ የሚዋጋ ነው፡፡ ኮዱን በ <ተማሪ ነው። ሃርvard edu/hadi/RbF/>', 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք արհեստական նեյրոնային ցանցերի ուսուցման նոր մոտեցում: Մեր մոտեցումը ոգեշնչվում է հոգեբանության լայն ապացույցներով, որոնք ցույց են տալիս, որ մարդիկ սովորողները կարող են արդյունավետ և արդյունավետ սովորել' աճելով ժամանակի անգամները նախկինում սովորված նյութերի հետագա վերլուծումների միջև (տարածված կրկնվելու Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նյարդային մոդելների ուսումնասիրության և հոգեբանության մեջ հայտնաբերությունների համանմանությունը մարդկային հիշողության մոդելի մասին և զարգանում ենք արդյունավետ և արդյունավետ ալգորիթմ նյարդային մոդելների ուսումնասիրու Մեր ալգորիթմի հիմնական մասը ճանաչողական մոտիվացված ծրագրավորումն է, ըստ որի ուսուցման օրինակները և նրանց «վերլուծումները» ժամանակի ընթացքում տարածվում են: Մեր ալգորիթմն օգտագործում է միայն 34-50 տոկոսը տվյալների յուրաքանչյուր դարաշրջանում, 2.9-4.8 անգամ ավելի արագ է, քան ստանդարտ ուսումնասիրությունը, և արտադրում է մրցակցող ամենաբարձր հիմքերը: Մեր կոդը հասանելի է հնձում: Edu", 'az': "Biz sanatlı nöral a ğlarını təhsil etmək üçün yeni bir yol göstəririk. Bizim tərəfimiz psikolojiyada geniş dəlillərdən ilham verilmişdir ki, insanların öyrəndiklərinin daha əvvəl öyrənmiş maddələr arasındakı müəyyən vaxt müddətlərini artıraraq faydalı və etkili olaraq öyrənə bilər. Biz nürol modellərin təhsil etməsini və psikolojiyada insan yaddaş modeli haqqında keşfetməsini araşdırırıq və nöral modellərini təhsil etmək üçün effektiv və effektiv algoritmi təhsil edirik. Algoritimizin ən böyük hissəsi kognitiv motivatlı planlayıcıdır. Buna görə təhsil olaraq və onların 'reviews' vaxtı boyunca uzaqlaşdırılır. Bizim algoritmimiz yalnız epoch tərzində 34-50% verilər istifadə edir, standart təhsil etməsindən 2.9-4.8 kat daha hızlı və sanat təhsil səhifələrindən mübahisə edir. Bizim kodumuz <bilim adamlarında mövcuddur. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'bn': "আমরা শৈল্পিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য একটি উপন্যাস উপস্থাপন করছি। মানসিক বিশাল প্রমাণের মাধ্যমে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে যা দেখাচ্ছে যে মানুষ শিক্ষার্থীরা কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর ভাবে শিখতে পারে এর পরে আমরা মানুষের মেমরি মডেল সম্পর্কে প্রশিক্ষণের নিউরেল মডেল এবং সাইকোলজিতে খুঁজে বিশ্লেষণের মধ্যে তদন্ত করি এবং নিউরেল মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য কা আমাদের অ্যালগরিদমের মূল অংশ হচ্ছে একটি চিন্তাভাবে উদ্দেশ্য প্রচারিত পরিকল্পনাকারী, যেখানে প্রশিক্ষণের ঘটনা এবং তাদের 'পর্যবেক্ষণ'  Our algorithm uses only 34-50% of data per epoch, is 2.9-4.8 times faster than standard training, and outperforms competing state-of-the-art baselines.  আমাদের কোড <স্কুলারে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে। হার্ভার্ড। edu/hadi/RbF/>", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo novi pristup obuci umjetne neuromreže. Naš pristup je inspirisan širom dokazima u psihologiji koji pokazuju da ljudski učenici mogu učiti efikasno i efikasno povećanjem intervala vremena između sljedećih pregleda prethodno naučenih materijala (prostornog ponavljanja). Istražujemo analogiju između obuke neuralnih modela i nalaza u psihologiji o modelu ljudskog sjećanja i razvijamo efikasan i efikasan algoritam za obuku neuralnih modela. Glavni dio našeg algoritma je kognitivno motivirani raspored, prema kojem se trening instanci i njihovi "pregledi" raspoređuju tijekom vremena. Naš algoritam koristi samo 34-50% podataka po epochu, je 2,9-4,8 puta brže od standardnog treninga, i nadmašuje konkurentne osnovne linije. Naš kod je dostupan na <učenju. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'et': 'Esitleme uudset lähenemisviisi kunstlike närvivõrkude koolitamiseks. Meie lähenemisviis on inspireeritud psühholoogia laiaulatuslikest tõenditest, mis näitavad, et inimõppijad saavad õppida tõhusalt ja tõhusalt, suurendades ajavahemikke varasemalt õppitud materjalide järgnevate ülevaadete vahel (vahekorraldus). Uurime analoogiat neuromudelite koolitamise ja psühholoogia leidude vahel inimmälu mudeli kohta ning töötame välja tõhusa ja efektiivse algoritmi neuromudelite koolitamiseks. Meie algoritmi põhiosa on kognitiivselt motiveeritud planeerija, mille kohaselt koolitused ja nende "ülevaated" on aja jooksul paigutatud. Meie algoritm kasutab ainult 34-50% andmetest epohhi kohta, on 2,9-4,8 korda kiirem kui tavaline treening ja ületab võistlevaid tipptasemel baassündmusi. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'cs': 'Představujeme nový přístup k tréninku umělých neuronových sítí. Náš přístup je inspirován širokými důkazy v psychologii, které ukazují, že lidé se mohou učit efektivně a efektivně prodloužením časových intervalů mezi následnými recenzemi dříve naučených materiálů (mezerové opakování). Zkoumáme analogii mezi tréninkovými neuronovými modely a poznatky v psychologii o modelu lidské paměti a vyvíjíme efektivní a efektivní algoritmus pro trénink neuronových modelů. Hlavní částí našeho algoritmu je kognitivně motivovaný plánovač, podle kterého jsou tréninkové instance a jejich "recenze" rozděleny v čase. Náš algoritmus využívá pouze 34-50% dat na jednu epochu, je 2,9-4,8 krát rychlejší než standardní trénink a překonává konkurenční nejmodernější základní linie. Náš kód je k dispozici na <scholar. Harvarde. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'fi': "Esittelemme uudenlaisen lähestymistavan keinotekoisten hermoverkkojen kouluttamiseen. Lähestymistapamme perustuu psykologian laajaan näyttöön, joka osoittaa, että oppijat voivat oppia tehokkaasti ja tehokkaasti lisäämällä aikavälejä aiemmin opittujen materiaalien myöhempien tarkistusten välillä (välillinen toisto). Tutkimme analogiaa neuromallien harjoittelun ja psykologian havaintojen välillä ihmisen muistimallista ja kehitämme tehokkaan algoritmin neuromallien kouluttamiseen. Algoritmimme ydinosa on kognitiivisesti motivoitunut aikatauluttaja, jonka mukaan harjoitusinstanssit ja niiden 'arvostelut' jakautuvat ajan mittaan. Algoritmimme käyttää vain 34-50% datasta per epoch, on 2,9-4,8 kertaa nopeampi kuin normaali koulutus ja ylittää kilpailevat huipputason perusviivat. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament nou per formar xarxes neurals artificials. El nostre enfocament està inspirat d'una gran evidència en psicologia que mostra que els alumnes humans poden aprendre eficientment i efectivament augmentant intervals de temps entre les revisions posteriors de materials abans aprenguts (repetició espacial). Investiguem la analogia entre entrenar models neurals i descobriments en psicologia sobre el model de memòria humana i desenvolupem un algoritme eficient i efectiu per entrenar models neurals. La part essencial del nostre algoritme és un programador motivat cognitivament segons el qual les instances d'entrenament i les seves 'recenses' estan espaciades amb el temps. El nostre algoritme només utilitza un 34-50% de dades per època, és 2,9-4,8 vegades més ràpid que l'entrenament normal, i supera les línies de base més avançades en competició. Our code is available at <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk dadi nganggo dolanan sing nggawe netah artikse netah kuwi. Awakdhéwé éntuk kelamèh dumadhi akéwé éntuk akéwé ning ngerasai perbudhakan winih dhéwé kuwi maun kelamèh lan ijol-ijolan winih dhéwé, ngono nggawe ngupakan tarjamahan kanggo nguasai perusahaan mrisuk aturan sak susahé supoyatan. Awak dhéwé éntuk karbote sistem ana ing nggawe model alat karo ngono nggawe barang kelangan anyar tentang karo model kuwi memperbudhakan kuwi nggawe sistem an luwih-sistem sing gawe nguasai model alat karo ngono nggawe model alat. Algorithmu bener Algorithmus iku kelompok 34 -5% dadi kanggo epok diangkat diangkat oleh Awakdhéwé nggo kowé nang <acaré> bookmarks edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani matsayi na yanzu ga wa'adin zangaron neura na bakwai. Tsarakanmu na aiko da dalili mai girma a cikin aikoloji, yana nũna wa masu sani kan su iya fahimta da mai amfani, kuma da ƙara tsakanin lokaci a bayan takardar masu da aka sani (dubi'in fili). Ina ƙidãya analogi a tsakanin mafarin misãlai na neura da fasanni a cikin aikoloji masu husu'ar misalin hukarin mutum kuma tuna algoritm mai da amfani ga ya sanar da misãlai na neura. Babban algoritmu yana da wani shirin da aka yi amfani da shi, da kuma an buɗe wasu shiryoyin ayuka da 'matsayin' a bayan lokaci. Yagoniyarmu na yi amfani da 34-50% na data kowace applet, yana 2.9-4.8 sau mafi kashi kasi da zaman shawara mai daidaita, kuma yana ƙaranci fassarar-al'arshi. Kowanmu yana da <scholar. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov pristop za usposabljanje umetnih nevronskih omrežij. Naš pristop je navdihnjen s širokimi dokazi iz psihologije, ki kažejo, da se človeški učenci lahko učijo učinkovito in učinkovito s povečevanjem časovnih intervalov med nadaljnjimi pregledi predhodno učenih materialov (presledki ponavljanja). Raziskovali smo analogijo med treningom nevronskih modelov in ugotovitvami psihologije o modelu človeškega spomina ter razvili učinkovit in učinkovit algoritem za trening nevronskih modelov. Osrednji del našega algoritma je kognitivno motiviran načrtovalec, v skladu s katerim so primeri usposabljanja in njihovi "pregledi" razporejeni skozi čas. Naš algoritem uporablja samo 34-50% podatkov na epoh, je 2,9-4,8-krat hitrejši od standardnega treninga in presega konkurenčne najsodobnejše osnovne linije. Naša koda je na voljo na <scholar. Harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה חדשה לאימון רשתות עצביות מלאכותיות. Our approach is inspired by broad evidence in psychology that shows human learners can learn efficiently and effectively by increasing intervals of time between subsequent reviews of previously learned materials (spaced repetition).  אנחנו חוקרים את האנלוגיה בין אימון מודלים עצביים וממצאים בפסיכולוגיה על מודל זיכרון אנושי ופתחים אלגוריתם יעיל ויעיל לאימון מודלים עצביים. החלק העיקרי של האלגוריתם שלנו הוא לוח זמנים מוטיבציה קוגניטיבית לפי מה מקרים אימונים ו -"ביקורות" שלהם מתרחשים במהלך הזמן. האלגוריתם שלנו משתמש רק 34-50% מהנתונים בכל תקופה, הוא 2.9-4.8 פעמים מהר יותר מאימונים סטנדרטיים, ויוציא מעל קווי הבסיס המתחרים של המדינה האמנותית. הקוד שלנו זמין ב <מלמד. harvard. edu/hadi/RbF/>.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་བའི་དཔུད་རིགས་དྲ་བ་ལ་བཟོ་བརྩོན་འབྲི་ཚིག་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྐོར་ལ་psychology་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བ་དག་གིས་མི་རྣམས་ལྟ་བུ་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་དང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་རྒྱས་ཁབ ང་ཚོས་ཀླད་པའི་དཔེ་དབུས་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་དབུས་མཐུན The core part of our algorithm is a cognitively-motivated scheduler according to which training instances and their 'reviews' are spaced over time. ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་པར་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྡུད་ལས་ཀྱང་34-50%monལས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་འདི་<scholar། སྒྲ་བརྙན། edu/hadi/RbF/>."}
{'en': 'Part-of-Speech Tagging for Twitter with Adversarial Neural Networks', 'ar': 'وضع علامات على جزء من الكلام لتويتر باستخدام الشبكات العصبية العدائية', 'fr': 'Marquage de parties de discours pour Twitter avec des réseaux de neurones antagonistes', 'pt': 'Marcação de parte do discurso para Twitter com redes neurais adversas', 'es': 'Etiquetado de parte del discurso para Twitter con redes neuronales adversarias', 'ja': '対立ニューラルネットワークを使用したTwitterの一部言語タグ付け', 'zh': '用对抗性神经网络为 Twitter 添词性标记', 'hi': 'Adversarial Neural Networks के साथ चहचहाना के लिए पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग', 'ru': 'Тегирование части речи для Twitter с помощью соперничающих нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'Clibeáil Pháirt-Urlabhra le haghaidh Twitter le Líonraí Néaracha Sárscéimhe', 'hu': 'Beszédrész-címkézés a Twitteren Adversarial Neural Networks segítségével', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σηματοποίηση μέρους ομιλίας για το Twitter με αντίπαλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα', 'lt': 'Twitter kalbos ženklinimo su prieštaringais neuroniais tinklais dalis', 'it': 'Tagging Part-of-Speech per Twitter con Reti Neurali Adversariali', 'kk': 'Твиттердің сөйлеу бөлігі үшін конверсариялық невралдық желілер', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ ഭാഗം', 'mt': 'Tagging ta’ Parti mill-kelma għal Twitter b’Netwerks Newrali Adversarjali', 'mn': 'Твиттерийн хэсэг хэсэг нь тусламжтай сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээ', 'no': 'Delt av talemerking for Twitter med rekursariale neuralnettverk', 'pl': 'Tagowanie części mowy dla Twittera z przeciwnymi sieciami neuronowymi', 'ro': 'Etichetare Part-of-Speech pentru Twitter cu Rețele Neurale Adversariale', 'sr': 'Dio govora označavanja za Twitter sa rekonstruacijskim nervnim mrežama', 'so': 'Qayb ka mid ah baayacsiga hadalka ee Twitterka oo la xiriira shabakada naafada', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Part-of-Speech Tagging för Twitter med Adversarial Neural Networks', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ٹویٹر کے لئے بات کا حصہ ٹاگنگ جو آدفارساری نیورال نیٹورک کے ساتھ ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết trực tiếp trên Twitter với mạng thần kinh trở lại', 'da': 'Part-of-Speech Tagging til Twitter med adversarial neural netværk', 'de': 'Part-of-Speech Tagging für Twitter mit Adversarial Neural Networks', 'bg': 'Част от речта маркиране за Туитър с рекламни неврални мрежи', 'id': 'Name', 'hr': 'Dio govora označavanja za Twitter sa poručnim neuronskim mrežama', 'nl': 'Part-of-Speech Tagging voor Twitter met Adversarial Neural Networks', 'ko': '대항성 신경 네트워크 기반 트위터 단어 표기', 'fa': 'قسمت سخنرانی برای توئیتر با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی مخالف', 'sw': 'Sehemu ya Uzungumzaji kwa ajili ya Twita na Mtandao wa Utawala', 'tr': 'Týuter üçin sözleýän bölümi Nural Networks bilen etiketleýän', 'am': 'የንግግር ማተሚያ በተቃውሞ የኔural መረብ', 'af': 'Deel van spraak etiket vir Twitter met Adversariale Neurale Netwerke', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Tagging pjesë e fjalës për Twitter me rrjete neuronale kundërshtare', 'bn': 'টুইটারের বিভাগের অংশ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে টুইটারের ট্যাগিং', 'ca': "Una part de l'etiqueta per Twitter amb xarxes neuronals adversaries", 'cs': 'Tagování části řeči pro Twitter s nepřátelskými neuronovými sítěmi', 'et': 'Kõneosa sildistamine Twitteris kõrvalseisvate neuraalsete võrkudega', 'az': 'T칬vrat 칲칞칲n T칬vrat캼n bir par칞as캼 N칬ral Netikl톛ri il톛', 'fi': 'Osa-puheen tagging Twitterissä Adversarial Neural Networks', 'bs': 'Dio govora označavanja za Twitter sa rekonstruacijskim nervnim mrežama', 'jv': 'Split-of-Speaking', 'sk': 'Del govora označevanje za Twitter z neželenimi živčnimi omrežji', 'he': 'החלק מהתג של דיבור לטוויטר עם רשתות עצביות נוגדיות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Twitter ཡི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་བའི་དཔེ་གཏོང་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་གི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ཤས་ཤོག་བྱས་པ'}
{'en': 'In this work, we study the problem of part-of-speech tagging for Tweets. In contrast to newswire articles, Tweets are usually informal and contain numerous out-of-vocabulary words. Moreover, there is a lack of large scale labeled datasets for this domain. To tackle these challenges, we propose a novel neural network to make use of out-of-domain labeled data, unlabeled in-domain data, and labeled in-domain data. Inspired by adversarial neural networks, the proposed method tries to learn common features through adversarial discriminator. In addition, we hypothesize that domain-specific features of target domain should be preserved in some degree. Hence, the proposed method adopts a sequence-to-sequence autoencoder to perform this task. Experimental results on three different datasets show that our method achieves better performance than state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، ندرس مشكلة وضع علامات على جزء من الكلام في التغريدات. على عكس المقالات الإخبارية ، عادةً ما تكون التغريدات غير رسمية وتحتوي على العديد من الكلمات خارج المفردات. علاوة على ذلك ، هناك نقص في مجموعات البيانات المسماة على نطاق واسع لهذا المجال. لمواجهة هذه التحديات ، نقترح شبكة عصبية جديدة للاستفادة من البيانات المسمى خارج المجال ، والبيانات داخل المجال غير المسماة ، والبيانات داخل المجال المصنفة. مستوحاة من الشبكات العصبية العدائية ، تحاول الطريقة المقترحة تعلم السمات المشتركة من خلال أداة تمييز الخصومة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نفترض أنه يجب الحفاظ على الميزات الخاصة بالمجال للمجال الهدف إلى حد ما. ومن ثم ، فإن الطريقة المقترحة تتبنى وحدة تشفير تلقائية من التسلسل إلى التسلسل لأداء هذه المهمة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات مختلفة أن طريقتنا تحقق أداءً أفضل من الأساليب الحديثة.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, estudamos o problema de marcação de parte do discurso para Tweets. Ao contrário dos artigos de notícias, os Tweets são geralmente informais e contêm várias palavras fora do vocabulário. Além disso, há uma falta de conjuntos de dados rotulados em grande escala para este domínio. Para enfrentar esses desafios, propomos uma nova rede neural para fazer uso de dados rotulados fora do domínio, dados não rotulados no domínio e dados rotulados no domínio. Inspirado em redes neurais adversas, o método proposto tenta aprender características comuns através do discriminador adversarial. Além disso, hipotetizamos que as características específicas do domínio do domínio alvo devem ser preservadas em algum grau. Assim, o método proposto adota um autoencoder seqüência-a-seqüência para realizar esta tarefa. Resultados experimentais em três conjuntos de dados diferentes mostram que nosso método alcança melhor desempenho do que métodos de última geração.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous étudions le problème du balisage des parties du discours pour les Tweets. Contrairement aux articles de fil de presse, les Tweets sont généralement informels et contiennent de nombreux mots hors vocabulaire. De plus, il existe un manque de jeux de données étiquetés à grande échelle pour ce domaine. Pour relever ces défis, nous proposons un nouveau réseau de neurones utilisant des données étiquetées hors domaine, des données dans le domaine non étiquetées et des données internes étiquetées dans le domaine. Inspirée des réseaux de neurones antagonistes, la méthode proposée tente d'apprendre des caractéristiques communes par le biais d'un discriminateur contradictoire. En outre, nous émettons l'hypothèse que les caractéristiques spécifiques au domaine du domaine cible devraient être préservées dans une certaine mesure. Par conséquent, le procédé proposé adopte un encodeur automatique séquence à séquence pour effectuer cette tâche. Les résultats expérimentaux sur trois ensembles de données différents montrent que notre méthode est plus performante que les méthodes de pointe.", 'es': 'En este trabajo, estudiamos el problema del etiquetado de parte del discurso para los Tweets. A diferencia de los artículos de noticias, los Tweets suelen ser informales y contienen numerosas palabras fuera del vocabulario. Además, hay una falta de conjuntos de datos etiquetados a gran escala para este dominio. Para hacer frente a estos desafíos, proponemos una nueva red neuronal para utilizar datos etiquetados fuera del dominio, datos dentro del dominio no etiquetados y datos dentro del dominio etiquetados. Inspirado en las redes neuronales adversarias, el método propuesto trata de aprender las características comunes a través del discriminador contradictorio. Además, planteamos la hipótesis de que las características específicas del dominio del dominio objetivo deben preservarse en cierto grado. Por lo tanto, el método propuesto adopta un autocodificador de secuencia a secuencia para realizar esta tarea. Los resultados experimentales en tres conjuntos de datos diferentes muestran que nuestro método logra un mejor rendimiento que los métodos más avanzados.', 'ja': 'この作品では、ツイートの音声部分タグ付けの問題を研究しています。ニュースワイヤの記事とは対照的に、ツイートは通常非公式であり、多数の語彙外の単語が含まれています。さらに、このドメインの大規模なラベル付けされたデータセットが不足しています。これらの課題に対処するために、私たちは、ドメイン外ラベル付きデータ、非ラベル付きドメイン内データ、およびラベル付きドメイン内データを利用するための新しいニューラルネットワークを提案します。対立ニューラルネットワークに触発されて、提案された方法は、対立識別子を通じて共通の特徴を学習しようとする。さらに、標的ドメインのドメイン固有の特徴は、ある程度保持されるべきであると仮定する。したがって、提案された方法は、このタスクを実行するためにシーケンスツーシーケンスオートエンコーダを採用する。3つの異なるデータセットの実験結果は、当社の方法が最先端の方法よりも優れたパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しています。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम Tweets के लिए भाग के भाषण टैगिंग की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। न्यूज़वायर लेखों के विपरीत, ट्वीट्स आमतौर पर अनौपचारिक होते हैं और इसमें कई आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली शब्द होते हैं। इसके अलावा, इस डोमेन के लिए बड़े पैमाने पर लेबल किए गए डेटासेट की कमी है। इन चुनौतियों से निपटने के लिए, हम आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन लेबल डेटा, अनलेबल इन-डोमेन डेटा और इन-डोमेन डेटा लेबल का उपयोग करने के लिए एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रतिकूल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क से प्रेरित होकर, प्रस्तावित विधि प्रतिकूल भेदभावपूर्ण के माध्यम से सामान्य विशेषताओं को सीखने की कोशिश करती है। इसके अलावा, हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि लक्ष्य डोमेन की डोमेन-विशिष्ट विशेषताओं को कुछ हद तक संरक्षित किया जाना चाहिए। इसलिए, प्रस्तावित विधि इस कार्य को करने के लिए एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ऑटोएनकोडर को अपनाती है। तीन अलग-अलग डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы изучаем проблему тегирования части речи для твитов. В отличие от новостных статей, твиты обычно носят неформальный характер и содержат многочисленные внесловные слова. Кроме того, для этого домена не хватает крупномасштабных маркированных наборов данных. Чтобы решить эти проблемы, мы предлагаем новую нейронную сеть для использования внедоменных меченых данных, немеченых внутридоменных данных и меченых внутридоменных данных. Вдохновленный состязательными нейронными сетями, предлагаемый метод пытается выучить общие черты с помощью состязательного дискриминатора. Кроме того, мы предполагаем, что специфические для домена особенности целевого домена должны быть сохранены в некоторой степени. Следовательно, в предлагаемом способе используется автокодировщик последовательности к последовательности для выполнения этой задачи. Экспериментальные результаты по трем различным наборам данных показывают, что наш метод обеспечивает лучшую производительность, чем современные методы.', 'zh': '于是考之推文词性纪。 比新闻通讯社之文,推文常是非,多词汇量不足之单词。 此外,此域阙大标数据集。 为此挑战,立新神经网络,以用域外标数,不记域内数、表记域内数。 启对抗性神经网络,试对抗性鉴别器以学之。 此外假设域域特定特徵宜在某种程度上。 故所陈用序自编码器以行之。 三集上之实验结果表明,先进有善。', 'ga': 'Sa saothar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le clibeáil pháirteach cainte le haghaidh Tweets. I gcodarsnacht le hailt nuachtscannáin, is iondúil go mbíonn Tweetanna neamhfhoirmiúil agus bíonn go leor focail as an bhfoclóir iontu. Ina theannta sin, tá easpa tacar sonraí lipéadaithe ar mhórscála don fhearann seo. Chun dul i ngleic leis na dúshláin seo, molaimid gréasán néarúil nua chun úsáid a bhaint as sonraí lipéadaithe lasmuigh den fhearann, sonraí neamh-lipéadaithe san fhearann, agus sonraí in-fearainn lipéadaithe. Spreagtha ag líonraí néarúla sáraíochta, déanann an modh atá beartaithe iarracht gnéithe coitianta a fhoghlaim trí idirdhealaitheoir sáraíochta. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid hipitéis gur cheart gnéithe sainiúla fearainn den spriocfhearann a chaomhnú go pointe áirithe. Mar sin, glacann an modh atá beartaithe uathchódóir seicheamh-go-seicheamh chun an tasc seo a dhéanamh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thrí thacar sonraí difriúla go mbaineann ár modh feidhmíocht níos fearr amach ná modhanna úrscothacha.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában a Tweetek beszédrészleges címkézésének problémáját tanulmányozzuk. A hírekkel ellentétben a tweetek általában informálisak és számos szókincsen kívüli szót tartalmaznak. Ezenkívül hiányzik a nagyméretű címkézett adatkészletek ehhez a tartományhoz. E kihívások kezelése érdekében egy új neurális hálózatot javasolunk, amely a domain kívüli címkézett adatokat, a domain nélküli adatokat és a domain belüli címkézett adatokat használja fel. Az ellenséges neurális hálózatok által inspirált módszer az ellenséges diszkriminátor segítségével próbálja megtanulni a közös jellemzőket. Ezenkívül feltételezzük, hogy a céltartomány domain-specifikus jellemzőit bizonyos mértékben meg kell őrizni. Ezért a javasolt módszer egy szekvencia-szekvencia automatikus kódolót alkalmaz a feladat elvégzéséhez. Három különböző adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jobb teljesítményt ér el, mint a legkorszerűbb módszerek.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της επισήμανσης μέρους ομιλίας για τουίτετ. Σε αντίθεση με τα άρθρα ειδήσεων, τα tweets είναι συνήθως ανεπίσημα και περιέχουν πολλές λέξεις εκτός λεξιλογίου. Επιπλέον, υπάρχει έλλειψη συνόλων δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας για αυτόν τον τομέα. Για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προκλήσεων, προτείνουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό δίκτυο που θα χρησιμοποιεί δεδομένα εκτός πεδίου, δεδομένα χωρίς ετικέτα εντός πεδίου και δεδομένα εντός πεδίου. Εμπνευσμένη από τα αντίπαλα νευρωνικά δίκτυα, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος προσπαθεί να μάθει κοινά χαρακτηριστικά μέσα από τον αντίπαλο διαχωριστή. Επιπλέον, υποθέτουμε ότι τα συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά του τομέα-στόχου θα πρέπει να διατηρηθούν σε κάποιο βαθμό. Ως εκ τούτου, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος υιοθετεί έναν αυτόματο κωδικοποιητή ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία για να εκτελέσει αυτό το έργο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε τρία διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει καλύτερη απόδοση από τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვისწავლით საუბრის პრობლემა, რომელიც საუბრის სიტყვებისთვის შესახებ. სიტყვებლის შეცდომაში, Tweets უბრალოდ ინფორმალურია და მრავალი სიტყვებლის სიტყვების შეცდომა. დამატებით, ამ დემომინის დიდი მაგალითის მონაცემები არსებობს. ამ გამოცდილებების შესახებ, ჩვენ პრომენტის ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება, რომელიც დიომენის გარეშე მინიშნული მონაცემების გამოყენება, საკუთარი დიომენის მონაცემების გარეშე, და საკ პროგრამიური ნეიროლური ქსელებისთვის გადაწყვეტილი მეთოდი უნდა გავისწავლა საერთო ფუნქციები განსაკუთრებული დისკრიმინატორისთვის. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჰიპოტესტიზებთ, რომ მიზემის დემომინის განსაკუთრებული ფუნქციები უნდა იყოს სხვა დროში. ამიტომ, მინდომა პროგრამა, ამ დავალების გავაკეთება სკენესკენესტი-დან-სკენესტის ავტოკენესტი. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი სამი განსხვავებული მონაცემების შედეგი ჩვენი მეტი უკეთესი გამოყენება, ვიდრე სამყარო მონაცემების მეტიდან.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыстың бөлігін Твиттер үшін белгілеу мәселесін зерттейміз. Жаңалық мақалаларға қарсы, Tweets кәдімгі мәлімет емес және көптеген сөздердің көптеген сөздері бар. Сонымен қатар, осы доменге үлкен масштабтағы деректер қорлары жоқ. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, доменге жазылмаған деректерді қолдану үшін, доменге жазылмаған, доменге жазылмаған, жазылмаған невралдық желі қолданатын. Невралдық невралдық желілерден ұсынылған әдіс қарсы дискриминатор арқылы жалпы мүмкіндіктерді оқытуға тырысты. Қосымша, біз мақсатты доменнің доменнің ерекше мүмкіндіктерін кейбір градуста сақтау керек деп ойлаймыз. Бұл тапсырманы орындау үшін sequence- to- sequence автокодерді қолданады. Үш түрлі деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері, әдіміздің әдісіміздің әдістерінен жақсы жұмыс істеу әдістерін көрсетеді.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, studiamo il problema del tag part-of-speech per Tweet. A differenza degli articoli di newswire, i Tweet sono solitamente informali e contengono numerose parole fuori vocabolario. Inoltre, vi è una mancanza di set di dati etichettati su larga scala per questo dominio. Per affrontare queste sfide, proponiamo una nuova rete neurale per utilizzare dati etichettati fuori dominio, dati non etichettati in dominio e dati etichettati in dominio. Ispirato dalle reti neurali avversarie, il metodo proposto cerca di imparare caratteristiche comuni attraverso il discriminatore avversario. Inoltre, ipotizziamo che le caratteristiche specifiche del dominio di destinazione dovrebbero essere conservate in una certa misura. Quindi, il metodo proposto adotta un encoder automatico sequenza-sequenza per eseguire questo compito. I risultati sperimentali su tre diversi set di dati mostrano che il nostro metodo raggiunge prestazioni migliori rispetto a metodi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Šiame darbe mes tiriame klausimą, susijusią su kalbos dalies ženklinimu Tweets. Priešingai nei žiniasklaidos straipsniai, Tweets paprastai yra neoficialūs ir jame yra daug žodžių be žodyno. Be to, šioje srityje trūksta didelio masto pažymėtų duomenų rinkinių. Siekdami spręsti šiuos uždavinius, siūlome naują neurologinį tinklą, kuriuo būtų galima naudotis ne domeno duomenimis, ne domeno duomenimis ir ne domeno duomenimis. Siūlomas metodas, pagrįstas priešingais nervų tinklais, bando pasimokyti bendrų savybių pasitelkiant priešingą diskriminatorių. Be to, mes hipotezuojame, kad tikslinės srities ypatybės tam tikru mastu turėtų būti išsaugotos. Todėl šiam uždaviniui atlikti siūlomas metodas priima iš eilės į eilę automatinį koduotoją. Eksperimentiniai trijų skirtingų duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas užtikrina geresnius rezultatus nei moderniausi metodai.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа го проучуваме проблемот со означувањето на дел од говорот на Твит. За разлика од весниците, твитовите се обично неформални и содржат бројни зборови надвор од зборовите. Покрај тоа, постои недостаток на голем степен обележани податоци за овој домен. За да се справиме со овие предизвици, предложуваме нова неурална мрежа за користење на податоци кои се означуваат надвор од доменот, неозначени податоци во доменот и означени податоци во доменот. Инспириран од непријателските нервни мрежи, предложениот метод се обидува да научи заеднички карактеристики преку непријателски дискриминатор. Покрај тоа, хипотезираме дека специфичните карактеристики на доменот на целта треба да се зачуваат во одреден степен. Затоа предложениот метод усвои автокодер од секвенца до секвенца за извршување на оваа задача. Експерименталните резултати на три различни податоци покажуваат дека нашиот метод постигнува подобра перформанса отколку најдобрите методи.', 'ms': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempelajari masalah penandaan sebahagian dari ucapan untuk Tweets. In contrast to newswire articles, Tweets are usually informal and contain numerous out-of-vocabulary words.  Selain itu, terdapat kekurangan set data yang ditabel skala besar untuk domain ini. Untuk menghadapi cabaran ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian saraf baru untuk menggunakan data yang ditabel luar domain, data dalam domain yang tidak ditabel, dan data dalam domain yang ditabel. Terinspirasi oleh rangkaian saraf musuh, kaedah yang diusulkan cuba untuk belajar ciri-ciri umum melalui diskriminator musuh. Selain itu, kita hipotesis bahawa ciri-ciri domain-spesifik domain sasaran patut disimpan dalam beberapa darjah. Oleh itu, kaedah yang diusulkan mengadopsi pengekod secara urutan-ke-urutan untuk melakukan tugas ini. Hasil eksperimen pada tiga set data yang berbeza menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik daripada kaedah-kaedah terbaik.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ടൂട്ടിക്ക് വേണ്ടി സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഭാഗം ടാഗിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠി പുതിയ ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമായി ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി അനുവാദമില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഈ ഡൊമെയിനുള്ള വലിയ സ്കേല്\u200d ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ കുറവുണ്ട്. To tackle these challenges, we propose a novel neural network to make use of out-of-domain labeled data, unlabeled in-domain data, and labeled in-domain data.  എതിരാളിയായ നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ര അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഡൊമെയിനുള്ള പ്രത്യേക ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d ചില ഡിഗ്രിയില്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കേ അതുകൊണ്ട്, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d ഈ ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസിന് മുമ്പ് സെക്കന്\u200dസ മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തേക്കാള്\u200d മെച്', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, nistudjaw il-problema tat-tikkettar ta’ parti mid-diskors għal Tweets. B’kuntrast mal-artikoli tal-newswire, it-Tweets normalment huma informali u fihom bosta kliem barra mill-vokabulari. Barra minn hekk, hemm nuqqas ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ttikkettati fuq skala kbira għal dan id-dominju. Biex nindirizzaw dawn l-isfidi, nipproponu netwerk newrali ġdid biex nużaw dejta ttikkettata barra d-dominju, dejta mhux ittikkettata fid-dominju, u dejta ttikkettata fid-dominju. Inspirat minn netwerks newrali avversarji, il-metodu propost jipprova jitgħallem karatteristiċi komuni permezz ta’ diskriminatur avversarju. Barra minn hekk, aħna niipotesizzaw li karatteristiċi speċifiċi għad-dominju tad-dominju fil-mira għandhom jiġu ppreservati f’ċertu grad. Għalhekk, il-metodu propost jadotta awtokoder minn sekwenza għal sekwenza biex iwettaq dan il-kompitu. Riżultati esperimentali fuq tliet settijiet differenti ta’ dejta juru li l-metodu tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni aħjar mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын тухай бид Твиттийн хэсэг хэсэг ярианы асуудлыг судалж байна. Шинэ сэтгүүлийн баримтуудын эсрэг, Твитт нь ихэвчлэн үндсэн, олон үг биш байдаг. Дараа нь, энэ холбоотой маш том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангууд байхгүй. Эдгээр сорилтуудыг зогсоохын тулд бид шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээний шинэ мэдээллийг ашиглах, домгийн мэдээллээр бичигдээгүй, домгийн мэдээллээр бичигдсэн, домгийн мэдээллээр бичигдсэн. Дөрсөлдөг мэдрэлийн сэтгэл сүлжээгээр сэтгэл хөдлөл санал болгосон арга нь эсрэг ялгаагчид ашиглан нийтлэг чанарыг сурах гэж хичээдэг. Мөн бид зорилготой холбооны тодорхой тодорхойлолтуудыг зарим хэмжээнд хадгалах ёстой гэж боддог. Тиймээс, санал өгсөн арга нь энэ ажлыг хийх үед дарааллаар-дарааллаар автокодлогчийг ашигладаг. Гурван өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь урлагийн арга зэрэг илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'I denne arbeiden studerer vi problemet med å merke på ein del av tale for tweets. I contrast to newswire articles, Tweets are usually informal and contain many out-of-vocabulary words. I tillegg er det ein mangling av store skala merket datasett for denne domenet. For å løse desse utfordringane, foreslår vi eit nytt neuralnettverk for å bruka ut-domenet merkelige data, ikkje merkelige i domenedata og merkelige i domenedata. Inspirert av adversariske neuralnettverk, prøver den foreslåde metoden å lære felles funksjonar gjennom adversariske diskriminator. I tillegg kan vi hypotisere at domenespesifikke funksjonar for målgområdet skal lagrast i nokre grad. Dette er derfor den foreslåde metoden godta ein autokoding for sequence-to-sequence for å utføra denne oppgåva. Eksperimentale resultat på tre ulike datasett viser at metoden vårt gjer bedre utvikling enn kunstmetodar.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, studiem problema etichetării parțiale a discursului pentru Tweets. Spre deosebire de articolele de știri, Tweeturile sunt de obicei informale și conțin numeroase cuvinte ieșite din vocabular. Mai mult decât atât, există o lipsă de seturi de date etichetate la scară largă pentru acest domeniu. Pentru a face față acestor provocări, propunem o rețea neurală nouă pentru a utiliza date etichetate în afara domeniului, date fără etichete în domeniu și date etichetate în domeniu. Inspirată de rețelele neuronale adversare, metoda propusă încearcă să învețe trăsături comune prin discriminatorul adversar. În plus, presupunem că trăsăturile specifice domeniului țintă ar trebui păstrate într-o anumită măsură. Prin urmare, metoda propusă adoptă un autoencoder secvență-la-secvență pentru a efectua această sarcină. Rezultatele experimentale pe trei seturi de date diferite arată că metoda noastră obține performanțe mai bune decât metodele de ultimă generație.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy badamy problem tagowania części mowy dla Tweetów. W przeciwieństwie do artykułów z wiadomości, tweety są zwykle nieformalne i zawierają liczne słowa poza słownictwem. Ponadto brakuje dużej skali oznaczonych zbiorów danych dla tej domeny. Aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom, proponujemy nową sieć neuronową, która wykorzystuje dane oznakowane poza domeną, nieoznakowane dane wewnątrz domeny i oznakowane wewnątrz domeny. Zainspirowana przeciwnymi sieciami neuronowymi, proponowana metoda stara się poznać wspólne cechy poprzez dyskryminator przeciwny. Ponadto zakładamy hipotezę, że specyficzne cechy domeny domeny docelowej powinny zostać w pewnym stopniu zachowane. Stąd proponowana metoda przyjmuje autokoder sekwencji do sekwencji do wykonania tego zadania. Wyniki eksperymentalne na trzech różnych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasza metoda osiąga lepszą wydajność niż nowoczesne metody.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි ට්විට්ස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා. වාර්තාවියර් පැත්තට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, ට්විට් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන් වචනය සම්බන්ධ වෙ ඒවගේම, මේ ඩෝමේන් වෙනුවෙන් ලේබල් කරපු ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නෑ. මේ අභ්\u200dයානයක් සටන් කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයෙක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න, ප්\u200dරවේශ කරලා තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න, ඩොමේන් දත් විරෝධ න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විරෝධ විශ්වා ඒ වගේම, අපි හිතාගන්නවා මෙහෙයුමේ ලක්ෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයේ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ අ ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විධානයක් මේ වැඩ කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරීයාවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය කරනවා. වෙනස් දත්ත සැටි තුනක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචා', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu, proučavamo problem deo govornog oznake za Tweets. Za razliku od novinskih članaka, Tweets su obično neobični i sadrže brojne izrečene riječi. Osim toga, nedostaje velike skale označene podatke za ovu domenu. Da bi se riješili ovih izazova, predlažemo novu neuralnu mrežu da bi iskoristili podatke označene izvan domena, podatke u domenu bez imenovanih i označene podatke u domenu. Inspiran od neprijateljskih neuralnih mreža, predložena metoda pokušava naučiti zajedničke karakteristike putem neprijateljskog diskriminacije. Osim toga, pretpostavljamo da bi specifične karakteristike domena ciljne domene trebale biti zaštićene na nekom stupnju. Stoga, predložena metoda usvoji autokoder sekvence do sekvence kako bi izvršio ovaj zadatak. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri različita seta podataka pokazuju da naša metoda postigne bolju izvršnost nego metode umetnosti.', 'sv': 'I det här arbetet studerar vi problemet med delmärkning för tweets. Till skillnad från nyhetsartiklar är tweets vanligtvis informella och innehåller många ord utanför ordförrådet. Dessutom saknas det storskaliga märkta datauppsättningar för denna domän. För att ta itu med dessa utmaningar föreslår vi ett nytt neuralt nätverk för att använda utomdomänmärkta data, omärkta in-domain data och märkta in-domain data. Inspirerad av motståndareliga neurala nätverk försöker den föreslagna metoden lära sig gemensamma drag genom motståndarelig diskriminering. Dessutom hypoteser vi att domänspecifika egenskaper hos måldomänen bör bevaras i viss mån. Därför antar den föreslagna metoden en sekvens-till-sekvens autoencoder för att utföra denna uppgift. Experimentella resultat på tre olika datauppsättningar visar att vår metod uppnår bättre prestanda än toppmoderna metoder.', 'so': 'Shaqadaas, waxaynu baranaynaa dhibaatada qeybta hadalka ee Tweetka. Inta ka duwan warqadaha cusub, Tweetkada inta badan waa kuwa aan rasmi ahayn, waxayna ku jiraan erayo badan oo aan qoraal ahayn. Sidoo kale gurigan waxaa laga baahan yahay koob macluumaad ah oo ballaadhan oo lagu qoray. Si aan u tacliino dhibaatooyinkaas, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa shabakad neuro ah si aan u isticmaalno macluumaad aan aheyn domain-ka-domen-ka, iyo macluumaad ku qoran. Shabakada neurada ee ka geesta ah ayaa lagu soo dhiibay qaababka la soo jeeday wuxuu isku dayaa in lagu baro takoorida caadiga ah. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu tijaabin nahay in lagu dhawro shahaado gaar ah oo domain ku yaal. Sidaa darteed qaababka la soo jeeday ayaa soo qaadaa mid aad u baahan karto si loo sameeyo shaqadaas. Imtixaanka waxaa ka mid ah saddex kooban oo macluumaad kala duduwan, waxayna muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu helo mid ka wanaagsan shaqeynta hababka farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பேச்சின் பகுதி குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனையை படிக்கிறோம். புதிய கட்டுரைகளுக்கு எதிராக இருந்தால், கட்டுரைகள் வழக்கமாக அனுமதியாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் சொல்லசொல்லாத வார்த்தை மேலும், இந்த தளத்திற்கான பெரிய அளவு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்புகள் குறைந்தது. இந்த சவால்களை எதிர்பார்க்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய பிணையத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் டோமைன் வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு, குறிப்பிட எதிரிய புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்களால் ஆச்சரியப்படுத்தப்பட்டது, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் பொதுவான தன்மைகளை கற்ற கூடுதலாக, நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட ட டொமைனின் குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்களை சில டிகிரியில் சேமிக்க வேண்டும். Hence, the proposed method adopts a sequence-to-sequence autoencoder to perform this task.  மூன்று வித்தியாசமான தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது நம் முறைமையில் சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறத', 'ur': 'اس کام میں ہم ٹویٹ کے لئے ٹیگ کرنے کے حصہ کے مشکل کی تلاش کرتے ہیں۔ نیوزویر لکھوں کے مقابلہ میں، ٹیوٹ معمولاً غیر معمولی ہیں اور بہت سی لکھوں میں لگتی ہیں. اس کے علاوہ، اس ڈومین کے لئے بڑے اسکیل کے لابلیٹ ڈاٹ سٹ کی کمی ہے. ان چالوں کے ساتھ ہم ایک نور نیورل نیٹورک کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ باہر ڈومین کے لابلیٹ ڈاٹ سے استعمال کریں، ڈومین کے دائٹ میں نامزد نہ کریں، اور ڈومین کے دائٹ میں لابلیٹ کریں. مخالف نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کے ذریعہ مشغول ہونے والی طریقہ کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ مخالف تقسیم کرنے والے کے ذریعہ مشترک خصوصوں کی تعلیم کریں. اور ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ موقع ڈومین کے ڈومین کے ڈومین کے خاص خصوصے کو کچھ درجے میں حفاظت کرنا چاہیے۔ لہٰذا، پیشنهاد کی طریقہ یہ کام کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ سفارش-تا-سفارشی اتوکوڈر کو قبول کرتا ہے. تین مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ بہتر عملکرد حاصل کرتا ہے', 'uz': "Bu ishda biz Twitterlar uchun gapirish qismini o'rganamiz. Yangi maqolalar bilan boshqacha, Twitterlar odatda haqiqiy emas va soʻzlardan ko'p so'zlar mavjud. Ko'rib, bu domen uchun katta taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibi mavjud emas. Bu muammolarni taklif qilish uchun, biz domen maʼlumotdan foydalanish uchun novel neyrolik tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz. Aniqlik tarmoq tarmoqlari tomonidan imzolangan, ilova qilingan usuli taqdim qiluvchi boʻyicha umumiy xususiyatlarni o'rganishni boshlaydi. Ko'pchilik, biz qanday darajada foydalanishimiz mumkin. Bu vazifani bajarish uchun avtomatik kodlash usulini foydalanadi. Uch boshqa maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari shunday ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning usuli davlat usulida yaxshi bajarishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề biểu ngữ phần thời trang Tweet. Ngược lại các bài báo, Tweet thường là những từ không chính thức và chứa nhiều từ ngoài từ vựng. Hơn nữa, không có các tập tin trên quy mô lớn được đánh dấu cho miền này. Để giải quyết những thử thách này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng thần kinh mới để sử dụng các dữ liệu được đánh dấu ngoài miền, chưa được cài đặt vào, và được đánh dấu dữ liệu trong miền. Dựa trên các mạng thần kinh thù địch, phương pháp được đề nghị cố học các đặc điểm thông qua kẻ tình nghi. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi giả định rằng những tính năng đặc trưng của miền đích sẽ được bảo quản một phần nào đó. Do đó, phương pháp đã đề nghị dùng một mã hóa tự động lặp lại để thực hiện nhiệm vụ này. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên ba bộ dữ liệu khác nhau cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt hiệu quả tốt hơn phương pháp hiện đại.', 'nl': 'In dit werk bestuderen we het probleem van part-of-speech tagging voor Tweets. In tegenstelling tot nieuwsberichten zijn Tweets meestal informeel en bevatten ze tal van woorden die buiten de woordenschat vallen. Bovendien is er een gebrek aan grootschalige gelabelde datasets voor dit domein. Om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw neuraal netwerk voor om gebruik te maken van out-of-domain gelabelde data, niet gelabelde in-domain data en gelabelde in-domain data. Geïnspireerd door tegenstrijdige neurale netwerken, probeert de voorgestelde methode gemeenschappelijke kenmerken te leren door middel van tegenstrijdige discriminator. Daarnaast stellen we de hypothese dat domeinspecifieke kenmerken van het doeldomein in zekere mate behouden moeten blijven. Vandaar dat de voorgestelde methode een sequence-to-sequence autoencoder gebruikt om deze taak uit te voeren. Experimentele resultaten op drie verschillende datasets tonen aan dat onze methode betere prestaties levert dan state-of-the-art methoden.', 'bg': 'В тази работа изучаваме проблема с маркирането на част от речта за туитове. За разлика от статиите в новините, туитовете обикновено са неформални и съдържат множество думи извън речника. Освен това липсват широкомащабни набори от данни за този домейн. За да се справим с тези предизвикателства, предлагаме нова невронна мрежа, която да използва маркирани извън домейна данни, немаркирани в домейна данни и маркирани в домейна данни. Вдъхновен от съпернически невронни мрежи, предложеният метод се опитва да научи общи характеристики чрез съпернически дискриминатор. В допълнение, ние предполагаме, че специфичните за домейна характеристики на целевия домейн трябва да бъдат запазени в известна степен. Следователно, предложеният метод приема автокодер последователност към последователност за изпълнение на тази задача. Експерименталните резултати на три различни набора от данни показват, че нашият метод постига по-добра производителност от най-съвременните методи.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde studerer vi problemet med delmærkning af tweets. I modsætning til nyhedsartikler er tweets normalt uformelle og indeholder talrige ord uden for ordforråd. Desuden mangler der store mærkede datasæt for dette domæne. For at tackle disse udfordringer foreslår vi et nyt neuralt netværk til at gøre brug af mærkede data uden for domænet, mærkede in-domæne data og mærkede in-domæne data. Inspireret af adversarial neurale netværk, forsøger den foreslåede metode at lære fælles træk gennem adversarial diskriminering. Derudover antager vi, at domænespecifikke træk i måldomænet bør bevares i en vis grad. Derfor vedtager den foreslåede metode en sekvens-til-sekvens autoencoder til at udføre denne opgave. Eksperimentelle resultater på tre forskellige datasæt viser, at vores metode opnår bedre ydeevne end state-of-the-art metoder.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu, proučavamo problem dijelogovornog oznake za Tweets. U suprotnost novinskim člancima, Tweets su obično neobični i sadrže brojne riječi bez riječi. Osim toga, postoji nedostatak velike skale označenih podataka za ovu domenu. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo novu neuralnu mrežu kako bi iskoristili podatke označene izvan domena, podatke u domenu bez imenovanih i označene podatke u domenu. Uhvaćen adversarnim nervnim mrežama, predložena metoda pokušava naučiti zajedničke karakteristike putem neprijateljskog diskriminacije. Osim toga, pretpostavljamo da bi na neki način trebale čuvati specifične karakteristike domena ciljne domene. Stoga je predložena metoda usvojila autokoder sekvence do sekvence kako bi izvršila ovaj zadatak. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri različite podatke pokazuju da naša metoda postigne bolju učinku nego metode stanja umjetnosti.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir das Problem des Part-of-Speech Tagging für Tweets. Im Gegensatz zu Newswire-Artikeln sind Tweets meist informell und enthalten zahlreiche Wörter, die außerhalb des Wortschatzes liegen. Darüber hinaus fehlt es an großflächig markierten Datensätzen für diese Domäne. Um diese Herausforderungen zu bewältigen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges neuronales Netzwerk vor, das außerhalb der Domäne markierte Daten, nicht markierte In-Domänen-Daten und markierte In-Domänen-Daten verwendet. Inspiriert von adversarialen neuronalen Netzen versucht die vorgeschlagene Methode, gemeinsame Merkmale durch adversarialen Diskriminator zu erlernen. Darüber hinaus gehen wir davon aus, dass domänenspezifische Merkmale der Zieldomäne in gewissem Maße erhalten bleiben sollten. Daher verwendet die vorgeschlagene Methode einen Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Autoencoder, um diese Aufgabe auszuführen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an drei verschiedenen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unsere Methode eine bessere Leistung erzielt als moderne Methoden.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 트위터의 어성 표기 문제를 연구했다.뉴스 전선의 문장과 달리 추문은 보통 비공식적이며 대량의 어휘표 밖의 단어를 포함한다.이 분야는 대규모 표기 데이터 집합이 부족하다.이러한 도전에 대응하기 위해 우리는 새로운 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 역외 표기 데이터, 역내 표기 데이터와 역내 표기 데이터를 활용했다.대항식 신경 네트워크의 계발을 받아 이 방법은 대항식 감별기를 통해 공통된 특징을 학습하고자 한다.그 밖에 우리는 목표역의 특정 영역 특징이 어느 정도 보존되어야 한다고 가정한다.따라서 본고가 제시한 방법은 서열에서 서열까지의 자동 인코더를 이용하여 이 임무를 완성하였다.세 개의 서로 다른 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 기존의 방법보다 더 좋은 성능을 가지고 있음을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunasoma tatizo la sehemu ya lugha ya kujieleza kwa ajili ya Twita. Tofauti na makala mpya, Twita mara nyingi huwa si rasmi na huwa ina maneno mengi isiyo na lugha. Moreover, there is a lack of large scale labeled datasets for this domain.  Ili kukabiliana na changamoto hizi, tunapendekeza mtandao wa kisasa ili kutengeneza matumizi ya taarifa za nje ya ndani, ambazo hazijapata taarifa za ndani, na kuweka taarifa za ndani. Kuhamishwa na mitandao ya ubongo wa upinzani, mbinu zilizopendekezwa inajaribu kujifunza vipengele vya kawaida kupitia ubaguzi wa kinyume. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafikiri kuwa taswira maalum za ndani ya maeneo ya malengo ni lazima zihifadhiwe kwa daraja fulani. Kwa hiyo, mbinu zilizopendekezwa inachukua kodi ya mfululizo kwa mara mbili ili kufanya kazi hii. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti tatu tofauti zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inafanikiwa ufanisi bora kuliko mbinu za sanaa.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempelajari masalah tagging bagian dari pidato untuk Tweets. Berbeda-beda dengan artikel kabel berita, Tweets biasanya informal dan mengandung banyak kata-kata luar-dari-vocabulari. Selain itu, terdapat kekurangan skala besar dataset label untuk domain ini. Untuk mengatasi tantangan-tantangan ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan saraf yang baru untuk menggunakan data yang ditabel luar domain, data yang tidak ditabel dalam domain, dan data yang ditabel dalam domain. Inspired by adversarial neural networks, the proposed method tries to learn common features through adversarial discriminator.  Selain itu, kita hipotesis bahwa fitur domain-spesifik domain target harus disimpan dalam beberapa derajat. Oleh karena itu, metode yang diusulkan mengadopsi sebuah rangkaian-ke-rangkaian autoencoder untuk melakukan tugas ini. Hasil eksperimen pada tiga set data yang berbeda menunjukkan bahwa metode kita mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik daripada metode terbaik.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما مشکل قسمت سخنرانی را برای توئیت مطالعه می کنیم. در مقابل مقاله\u200cهای روزنامه، تویتها معمولاً معمولاً غیرمعمولی هستند و کلمات غیر کلمات زیادی را دارند. علاوه بر این، کمبود مقیاس داده\u200cهای بزرگی برای این دامنه وجود دارد. برای حل این چالش\u200cها، ما یک شبکه عصبی جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا از اطلاعات نامیده شده خارج از دومین استفاده کنیم، اطلاعات دامنی نامیده شده و اطلاعات دامنی نامیده شده. توسط شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دشمنی، روش پیشنهاد سعی می\u200cکند ویژه\u200cهای مشترک را از طریق جدایی دشمنی یاد بگیرد. علاوه بر این، ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که ویژگی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از دامنه هدف باید در مقدار درجه حفظ شود. بنابراین، روش پیشنهاد برای انجام این وظیفه یک رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی خودکار به دنبال\u200cبندی می\u200cگیرد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای مختلف نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما به انجام بهتر از روش\u200cهای هنر رسیده است.', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ የንግግር ግንኙነት የTweets ጉዳይ እናስተምራለን፡፡ አዲስ ጽሑፎች በተለየ፣ ትዊተሮች በተለየ ጊዜ የተለየ ክፍል ናቸው እናም የቋንቋ-ቋንቋዎች ብዙዎች ናቸው፡፡ ደግሞም ለዚህ ዶሜን የደረጃ የመረጃ ዳታዎችን የጎደለው ነው፡፡ እነዚህን ጥላቻዎች ለመቀበል፣ የኖሜን ዳታዎችን ለማጠቀም የውጭ የውጤት የውጤት መረጃዎችን እና የዶሜን ዳታዎችን እና በዶሜን ዳታዎችን ለመጠቀም እና ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ የናውሬት መረብ ላይ በተቃዋሚው ብሔራዊ ጥያቄ በተቃዋሚው ብሔራዊ ጥያቄዎችን ለመማር ይፈልጋል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የዶሜን-አካላዊ የዶሜን ምርጫዎች በአንዳንድ ደረጃ እንዲጠበቅ እናስባለን፡፡ ስለዚህ የተፈጸመ ሥርዓት ይህ ስራ ለመፈጸም የግንኙነቱን የግንኙነት የግንኙነት የኮድ ኮድዶችን ይወስዳል፡፡ የሦስት የተለየ ዳታተሮች ፍሬዎች የሥርዓት-የ-አርድ ዘዴዎች የሚሻለውን ጥያቄን እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu işde Tweets üçin ýazylýan çykyş meselesini öwrenýärdik. Täzelikleriň ýagdaýynda, Täzelikler adatça resmi bolup, birnäçe sözleriň daşary ýok sözleridir. Ykdan hem, bu domyň üçin golaý derejesi ýazylýan veri setirleri ýok. Bu çözümleri çözmek için, biz yeni bir nöral şebeke etiketli verileri, domenin verilerinde yazılmadığı ve domenin verilerinde etiketlenmeyi teklif ediyoruz. Nägarşy neural şebekeler tarapyndan alyglanýar, teklip eden yöntem düşman diskriminatçy tarapyndan orta özellikleri öwrenmäge synanyşýar. Ayrıca, hedef domeninin domain özelliklerinin birkaç derecede koruması gerektiğini tahmin ediyoruz. Şol sebäpli, teklip eden yöntem bu işi başarmak üçin sequence-to-sequence awtomatik ködlemeni kabul edir. Durumyň üç dürli veri setiriniň netijesi ukyplarynda biziň metodamyzyň ýagdaýynyň durumyndan gowy ukyplaryny çykarýandygyny görkez.', 'af': "In hierdie werk, ondersoek ons die probleem van deel-van-spreek merking vir tweets. In contrast to newswire articles, Tweets are usually informale and contain numerous out-of-vocabulary words. Maar daar is 'n ontbreek van groot skaal gemerkte datastel vir hierdie domein. Om hierdie uitdagings te probeer, voorstel ons 'n nuwe neuralnetwerk om uit-van-domein gemerkte data te gebruik, ongeabelde in-domein data, en in-domein data te merk. Inspirasie deur teëstandariewe neuralnetwerke, probeer die voorgestelde metode om gemeenskappe funksies te leer deur teëstandariewe diskrimineerder. In addition, we hypothesize that domain-specific features of target domain should be preserved in some degree. Daarom, die voorgestelde metode aanvaar 'n sequence- to- sequence autoencoder na uitvoer hierdie taak. Eksperimentale resultate op drie verskillende datastel vertoon dat ons metode beter uitvoering bereik as state-of-the-art metodes.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք Թվիթերի խոսքի մասի նշանակման խնդիրը: Ի հակադրություն նորությունների հոդվածների, թվիթերը սովորաբար ոչ տեղեկատվական են և պարունակում են բազմաթիվ բառեր, որոնք չեն բառերում: Ավելին, այս բնագավառի համար բացակայում է մեծ մասշտաբով պիտակուցված տվյալների համակարգեր: To tackle these challenges, we propose a novel neural network to make use of out-of-domain labeled data, unlabeled in-domain data, and labeled in-domain data.  Հոգեշնչված հակառակ նյարդային ցանցերով, առաջարկված մեթոդը փորձում է սովորել ընդհանուր հատկանիշներ հակառակ խտրականության միջոցով: Ավելին, մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ նպատակային տիեզերքի մասնավոր հատկությունները պետք է որոշ չափով պահպանվեն: Այսպիսով, առաջարկված մեթոդը օգտագործում է այս խնդիրը կատարելու համար հեռավորություն-հեռավորություն ավտոկոդեր: Երեք տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը ավելի լավ արդյունք է ստանում, քան ամենաբարձր մեթոդները:', 'az': 'Bu işdə, Tweets üçün sözlərin bir hissəsinin problemini öyrənirik. Gazeteçi məktullarına baxmayaraq, Tweets normally informal və çoxlu sözlər içərir. Bu domain üçün böyük ölçüdə etiket edilmiş veri quruları yoxdur. Bu çətinliklərə çəkilmək üçün yeni nöral a ğ təklif edirik ki, domenin məlumatlarını istifadə etmək üçün, domenin məlumatlarında yazılmamış və domenin məlumatlarını etiketlənmiş. Düşmənçilik nöral ağları tarafından təşkil edilmişdir, təşkil edilmiş metod düşmənçilik diskriminatoru vasitəsilə ortaq xüsusiyyətləri öyrənməyə çalışır. Əvvəlcə, məqsəd domeninin domain-specific özelliklərinin bəzi dərəcədə saxlanılmasını iddia edirik. Beləliklə, təklif edilən metod bu işi yerinə yetirmək üçün sequence-to-sequence avtomatik kodlayıcını qəbul edir. Üç müxtəlif veri setlərində təcrübə sonuçları təcrübə metodumuzun daha xeyirli performansını art ırmağını göstərir.', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu, proučavamo problem dijelogovornog oznake za Tweets. Za suprotnost novinskim člancima, Tweets su obično neoficialni i sadrže brojne izjavne riječi. Osim toga, nedostaje velike skale označene podatke za ovu domenu. Da bi se riješili ovih izazova, predlažemo novu neuralnu mrežu da se iskoristi podaci označenih van domena, podaci u domenu bez imenovanih i označeni podaci u domenu. Inspiran od neprijateljskih nervnih mreža, predložena metoda pokušava naučiti zajedničke karakteristike putem neprijateljskog diskriminacije. Osim toga, pretpostavljamo da bi na neki način trebale čuvati specifične karakteristike domena ciljne domene. Stoga je predložena metoda usvojila autokoder sekvence do sekvence kako bi izvršila ovaj zadatak. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri različite podatke pokazuju da naša metoda postigne bolju izvršnost nego metode države umjetnosti.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা টুইটারে ভাষণের অংশের ট্যাগিং এর সমস্যা পড়ি। In contrast to newswire articles, Tweets are usually informal and contain numerous out-of-vocabulary words.  এছাড়াও, এই ডোমেইনের জন্য বিশাল স্ক্যালেট লেবেলেটের অভাব রয়েছে। এই চ্যালেঞ্জের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি নভেল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে ডোমেইনের বাইরে লেবেল করা ডাটা ব্যবহার করা যায়, ডোমেইনের তথ্য ন বিরোধী নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি বৈষম্যের মাধ্যমে সাধারণ বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখার চেষ তাছাড়াও, আমরা হিসাবে মিথ্যাবাদী করছি যে টার্গেট ডোমেইনের নির্দিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী কিছু ডিগ্রীর মধ্যে সংরক তাই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি এই কাজ করার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ব্যবহার করে। তিনটি ভিন্ন ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পদ্ধতির চেয়ে ভালো কাজ অর', 'ca': "En aquest treball estudiem el problema de l'etiqueta de part de la xerrada de Tweets. A diferència dels artículs de newswire, Tweets són normalment informals i contenen moltes paraules fora de vocabulari. A més, hi ha falta de conjunts de dades etiquetats a gran escala per aquest domini. Per abordar aquests reptes, proposem una nova xarxa neuronal per utilitzar dades etiquetades fora de domini, dades no etiquetades en domini i dades etiquetades en domini. Inspirat per les xarxes neurals adversaries, el mètode proposat intenta aprendre característiques comunes a través del discriminator adversari. A més, suposem que les característiques específices del domini d'objectiu haurien de ser conservades d'alguna manera. Per tant, el mètode proposat adopta un autocodificador seqüència a seqüència per a fer aquesta tasca. Experimental results on three different datasets show that our method achieves better performance than state-of-the-art methods.", 'sq': "Në këtë punë, ne studiojmë problemin e shënimit të pjesës së fjalimit për Tweets. Në kundërshtim me artikujt e lajmeve, Tweets janë zakonisht jozyrtarë dhe përmbajnë fjalë të shumta jashtë fjalorit. Përveç kësaj, ka mungesë të grupeve të dhënash të etiketuara në shkallë të madhe për këtë domeni. Për t'i trajtuar këto sfida, propozojmë një rrjet neural të ri për të përdorur të dhënat jashtë domenit, të dhënat jashtë domenit dhe të dhënat jashtë domenit. Inspiruar nga rrjetet nervore kundërshtare, metoda e propozuar përpiqet të mësojë karakteristika të përbashkëta nëpërmjet diskriminuesit kundërshtar. In addition, we hypothesize that domain-specific features of target domain should be preserved in some degree.  Kështu, metoda e propozuar miraton një autokodues sekuencë-në-sekuencë për të kryer këtë detyrë. Rezultatet eksperimentale në tre grupe të dhënash të ndryshme tregojnë se metoda jonë arrin performancë më të mirë se metodat më të larta.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime kõneosa sildistamise probleemi tweetide jaoks. Erinevalt uudisteartiklitest on tweetid tavaliselt mitteametlikud ja sisaldavad arvukalt sõnavara väljaspool. Lisaks puuduvad selles valdkonnas suured märgistatud andmekogumid. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja uue närvivõrgu, et kasutada domeeniväliseid märgistatud andmeid, märgistamata domeenisiseseid andmeid ja märgistatud domeenisiseseid andmeid. Inspireerituna konkureerivatest närvivõrkudest, püüab kavandatud meetod õppida ühiseid tunnuseid konkureerivate diskrimineerijate kaudu. Lisaks eeldame, et sihtdomeeni domeenispetsiifilisi tunnuseid tuleks teatud määral säilitada. Seega võtab kavandatud meetod selle ülesande täitmiseks kasutusele järjestusest järjestuseni automaatkodeerija. Kolme erineva andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod saavutab parema tulemuse kui kaasaegsed meetodid.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä tutkitaan puheen osan taggingin ongelmaa tweeteille. Toisin kuin uutiskirjeartikkelit, tweetit ovat yleensä epävirallisia ja sisältävät lukuisia sanaston ulkopuolisia sanoja. Lisäksi tällä alalla ei ole laajamittaisia merkittyjä tietokokonaisuuksia. Näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta neuroverkkoa, joka hyödyntää verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolisia merkittyjä tietoja, merkitsemättömiä verkkotunnuksen sisäisiä tietoja ja merkittyjä verkkotunnuksen sisäisiä tietoja. Konvertariaalisten hermoverkkojen innoittamana ehdotettu menetelmä pyrkii oppimaan yhteisiä piirteitä konvertariaalisen diskriminaattorin avulla. Lisäksi otaksumme, että kohdeverkkotunnuksen toimialueekohtaiset ominaisuudet pitäisi säilyttää jossain määrin. Näin ollen ehdotettu menetelmä käyttää sekvenssi-sekvenssiin-automaattikooderin suorittaakseen tämän tehtävän. Kokeelliset tulokset kolmesta eri aineistosta osoittavat, että menetelmämme saavuttaa paremman suorituskyvyn kuin uusimmat menetelmät.', 'cs': 'V této práci se zabýváme problematikou tagování části řeči pro tweety. Na rozdíl od novinových článků jsou tweety obvykle neformální a obsahují mnoho slov mimo slovní zásobu. Kromě toho existuje nedostatek rozsáhlých označených datových sad pro tuto doménu. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme novou neuronovou síť, která využívá data označená mimo doménu, data bez označení v doméně a data označená v doméně. Navržená metoda se inspirovaná adversariálními neuronovými sítěmi snaží naučit se společné rysy prostřednictvím adversariálního diskriminátoru. Dále se domníváme, že doménově specifické vlastnosti cílové domény by měly být do určité míry zachovány. Proto navržená metoda přijímá k provedení tohoto úkolu autokodér sekvence na sekvenci. Experimentální výsledky na třech různých datových sadách ukazují, že naše metoda dosahuje lepšího výkonu než moderní metody.', 'he': 'בעבודה הזו, אנו לומדים את הבעיה של תג חלק מהנאום לטוויטים. בניגוד למאמרי חדשות, טוויטים בדרך כלל לא רשמיים ומכילים מספר מילים מחוץ למילים. חוץ מזה, יש חוסר קבוצת נתונים על מידה גדולה לתחום הזה. כדי להתמודד עם האתגרים האלה, אנו מציעים רשת עצבית חדשה כדי להשתמש במידע מחוץ לתחום, מידע מחוץ לתחום, ומתווים בתחום. השיטה המוצעת מנסה ללמוד תכונות משותפים באמצעות דיסקרטים נוגדיים. בנוסף, אנו מניחים שהתכונות ספציפיות לתחום של התחום המטרה צריכות לשמור במידה מסוימת. לכן, השיטה המוצעת מאמץ קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם קודם כדי לבצע את המשימה הזאת. תוצאות ניסויים על שלושה קבוצות נתונים שונות מראות שהשיטה שלנו משיגה ביצועים טובים יותר משיטות חדשות.', 'ha': "In this work, we study the problem of part-of-speech tagging for Tweets.  @ info: whatsthis Za kuma, ana ƙari da matsayin tsari mai girma wa wannan Domen. To, don mu buɗa masu motsi da waɗannan hanyõyin, muna buƙata wani zanen neural na yanzu don su yi amfani da wasu data, waɗanda ba'a yi amfani da shi ba-Domen, da kuma ba'a rubutu data cikin-Domen. An Inspire shi da zanen neural masu motsi, na'urar da aka buƙata, yana jarraba yin fahimta masu hushi na ɗabi'a kan bakin da za'a yi rabo. Ina ƙara, munã yi zaton a tsare wasu tsari na Domen masu ƙayyade cikin kwanan daraja. Kayya, shirin da aka buƙata, yana ɗau wata kode farat-biyu farat ɗaya dõmin ya cika wannan aikin. Mataimakin jarrabawa a kan tsari uku daban-dabam, yana nũna cewa metodenmu yana da mafiya alhẽri ga aikin da-mazaɓa-na-art.", 'sk': 'V tem delu preučujemo problem označevanja dela govora za tweete. V nasprotju s članki iz novic so tweeti običajno neformalni in vsebujejo številne besede, ki niso v besedišču. Poleg tega za to področje primanjkuje obsežnih označenih naborov podatkov. Za reševanje teh izzivov predlagamo novo nevronsko omrežje za uporabo zunaj domenskih označenih podatkov, neoznačenih domenskih podatkov in označenih domenskih podatkov. Predlagana metoda, ki jo navdihujejo kontradiarne nevronske mreže, poskuša spoznati skupne značilnosti s kontradiarnim diskriminatorjem. Poleg tega predpostavljamo, da je treba domensko specifične značilnosti ciljne domene ohraniti v določeni meri. Zato predlagana metoda za izvedbo te naloge sprejme samokodirnik od zaporedja do zaporedja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na treh različnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da naša metoda dosega boljšo učinkovitost od najsodobnejših metod.', 'jv': 'Nang dhéwé éntuk iki, kita jewis ngeremus seneng pisan-pakan banget kanggo tuwit. Raylan In this domain, there is a shortage of big scale label dataset for this domain. To Tackle this shots, we proposal a new Neral network to make use of out-of-domain label data, Unlabated in-domain data, and label in-domain data. Isobahan seneng tambah pakan Neral Nyutar, supoyo nggunakake method seneng pisan mulai cara-cara sing wis ana karo Diskripunêr sing apik. In Addition, we theorhese that domain-special settings of goal domain should be protected in some degrees. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness section', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གླེང་སྒྲུང་བརྗོད་པའི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེབ་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། དྲ་ཚིག་བརྗོད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མིན་འདུག་དང་ནང་དུ་འདུག Moreover, there is a lack of large scale labeled datasets for this domain. To tackle these challenges, we propose a novel neural network to make use of out-of-domain labeled data, unlabeled in-domain data, and labeled in-domain data. གདོང་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མ་དངུལ་དྲ་བ་གྱིས་དམ་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་དེ་སྤྲོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་གདོང་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཙོ་བ་སྤྱོ In addition, we hypothesize that domain-specific features of target domain should be preserved in some degree. དེར་བརྟེན། དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་sequence-to-sequence་རིམ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པ་འདི་ལས་ཀྱང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental results on three different datasets show that our method achieves better performance than state-of-the-art methods.'}
{'en': 'Investigating Different Syntactic Context Types and Context Representations for Learning Word Embeddings', 'fr': "Étude de différents types de contextes syntaxiques et de représentations contextuelles pour l'apprentissage de l'intégration de mots", 'es': 'Investigación de diferentes tipos de contexto sintáctico y representaciones de contexto para aprender a incorporar palabras', 'pt': 'Investigando diferentes tipos de contexto sintático e representações de contexto para aprender incorporações de palavras', 'ar': 'التحقيق في أنواع السياق النحوية المختلفة وتمثيلات السياق لتعلم تضمين الكلمات', 'ja': '学習ワード埋め込みのためのさまざまな構文コンテキストタイプとコンテキスト表現の調査', 'zh': '治以学词嵌异句法上下文与上下文为表里', 'hi': 'Word Embeddings सीखने के लिए विभिन्न वाक्यात्मक संदर्भ प्रकार और संदर्भ अभ्यावेदन की जांच करना', 'ru': 'Изучение различных синтаксических типов контекста и контекстных представлений для встраивания учебных слов', 'ga': 'Ag Fiosrú Cineálacha Comhthéacs Comhréire Éagsúla agus Léirithe Comhthéacs chun Leabú Focal a Fhoghlaim', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული სინტექტიკური კონტექსტის ტიპები და კონტექსტის გამოსახულებების განსხვავება', 'hu': 'Különböző szintaktikus kontextustípusok és kontextusreprezentációk vizsgálata a szóbeágyazások tanulásához', 'it': 'Indagine di diversi tipi di contesto sintattico e rappresentazioni di contesto per imparare le incorporazioni di parole', 'el': 'Διερεύνηση διαφορετικών τύπων συντακτικού πλαισίου και αναπαραστάσεων περιβάλλοντος για την εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων', 'lt': 'Tiriant skirtingus sintaktinio konteksto tipus ir konteksto atstovavimus mokymosi žodžių įterpimui', 'kk': 'Сөздерді үйрену үшін әртүрлі синтактикалық контекстің түрлерін және контексті таңбаларын зерттеу', 'mk': 'Истражување на различни типови на синтактички контекст и контекстни претставувања за учење на вградувања на зборови', 'ms': 'Menyelidiki Jenis Konteks Sintaktik berbeza dan Persembahan Konteks untuk Mempelajari Penjelmaan Kata', 'mt': 'Investigazzjoni ta’ Tipi ta’ Kuntest Sintattiku Differenti u Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ Kuntest għal Tagħlim', 'no': 'Investigerer ulike syntaktiske konteksttypar og kontekstrepresentasjonar for læring av tekstinnbygging', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത സിന്റാക്റ്റിക് വികസിക്കുന്ന തരത്തിലും ഉള്ളിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Өөр төрлийн синтактикийн контекст төрлүүд болон контекст үзүүлэлтийг судалж байна.', 'pl': 'Badanie różnych typów kontekstów syntaktycznych i reprezentacji kontekstów dla nauki osadzeń słowa', 'ro': 'Investigarea diferitelor tipuri de context sintattic și reprezentări de context pentru învățarea încorporărilor Word', 'so': 'Baaritaanka noocyada qalabka la xiriira isku qabsiga ee kala duduwan iyo xuquuqda gudaha ee qoraalka barashada', 'sr': 'Istraživanje različitih tipa sintaktičkog konteksta i predstavljanja konteksta za učenje integracije reči', 'sv': 'Undersökning av olika syntaktiska kontexttyper och kontextrepresentationer för att lära sig Word Embeddings', 'ta': 'வேறு வித்தியாசமான ஒத்திசைவு உள்ளடக்கங்கள் மற்றும் வார்த்தை உடைவுகளுக்கான உள்ளடக்க பிரிவுகளை ஆராயிக்கிறது', 'si': 'වෙනස් සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ වර්ගය සහ සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය', 'ur': 'ویڈ ایمبڈینگ سکھانے کے لئے مختلف سینٹاکسی کنٹکسٹ ٹائیپ اور کنٹکسٹ ریسپینسٹ', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu các Kiểu ngữ pháp khác nhau và Diễn viên ngữ cảnh để nhập vào ngôn ngữ học.', 'hr': 'Istraživanje različitih tipa sintaktičkog konteksta i predstavljanja konteksta za učenje uključenja riječi', 'bg': 'Проучване на различни синтактически контекстни типове и контекстни представяния за изучаване на вграждания на думи', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af forskellige syntaktiske konteksttyper og kontekstrepræsentationer til læring af Word Embeddings', 'id': 'Menyelidiki Tipe Konteks Sintaktik Berbeda dan Representasi Konteks untuk Mempelajari Embedding Kata', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar verschillende syntactische contexttypen en contextrepresentaties voor het leren van woordinsluitingen', 'de': 'Untersuchung verschiedener syntaktischer Kontexttypen und Kontextdarstellungen zum Lernen von Word-Einbettungen', 'sw': 'Inachunguza aina tofauti za Mitandao ya KiSyntactic na Representations of Content for Learning Word', 'fa': 'تحقیق مختلف نوع محیط تنظیمی و نمایش محیط برای یادگیری داخل کلمات', 'tr': 'Kelimi Ewez etmek üçin Başga Sentaktik Kontekst Taýplary we Kontekst Namaýyşlyklary', 'ko': '서로 다른 문법적 언어 환경 유형과 언어 환경 표징을 연구하여 단어의 삽입을 학습하다', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Hetimi i llojeve të ndryshme të kontekstit sintaktik dhe përfaqësimeve të kontekstit për mësimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Տարբեր սինտակտիկ կոնտեքստի տեսակների և խոսքի ընդգրկումների ուսումնասիրելը', 'az': 'S칬zl칲k 캻fad톛l톛rini 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n M칲xt톛lif Sintaktik Kontekst T칲rl톛ri v톛 Kontext T칲rl톛ri', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বিষয়বস্তুর ধরন এবং বিষয়বস্তুর প্রতিনিধি অনুসন্ধান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Istraživanje različitih tipa sintaktičkog konteksta i predstavljanja konteksta za učenje integracije riječi', 'ca': 'Investigating Different Syntactic Context Types and Context Representations for Learning Word Embeddings', 'cs': 'Zkoumání různých typů syntaktického kontextu a kontextových reprezentací pro učení se vložení slov', 'et': 'Erinevate süntaktiliste kontekstitüüpide ja konteksti esituste uurimine sõnade manustamise õppimiseks', 'fi': 'Eri syntaktisten kontekstityyppien ja konteksti-esitysten tutkiminen sanaupotusten oppimiseen', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'חוקר סוגי קונטקסט סינטקטי שונים ומצגות קונטקסט ללמוד מילים', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje različnih sintetičnih kontekstnih vrst in kontekstnih predstavitev za učenje besednih vdelav', 'bo': 'ཁྱད་དུ་དབྱིབས་སྟངས་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རིགས་དང་ཁུལ་ཡུག་གི་Representations for Learning Word Embedding'}
{'en': 'The number of word embedding models is growing every year. Most of them are based on the co-occurrence information of words and their contexts. However, it is still an open question what is the best definition of context. We provide a systematical investigation of 4 different syntactic context types and context representations for learning word embeddings. Comprehensive experiments are conducted to evaluate their effectiveness on 6 extrinsic and intrinsic tasks. We hope that this paper, along with the published code, would be helpful for choosing the best context type and representation for a given task.', 'es': 'El número de modelos de incrustación de palabras crece cada año. La mayoría de ellos se basan en la información de coocurrencia de las palabras y sus contextos. Sin embargo, sigue siendo una pregunta abierta cuál es la mejor definición de contexto. Proporcionamos una investigación sistemática de 4 tipos de contexto sintáctico diferentes y representaciones de contexto para aprender la incrustación de palabras. Se realizan experimentos exhaustivos para evaluar su eficacia en 6 tareas extrínsecas e intrínsecas. Esperamos que este documento, junto con el código publicado, sea útil para elegir el mejor tipo de contexto y representación para una tarea determinada.', 'fr': "Le nombre de modèles d'intégration de mots augmente chaque année. La plupart d'entre eux sont basés sur les informations de co-occurrence des mots et de leurs contextes. Cependant, la question de savoir quelle est la meilleure définition du contexte reste ouverte. Nous proposons une étude systématique de 4 types de contextes syntaxiques et de représentations contextuelles différents pour l'apprentissage de l'intégration de mots. Des expériences complètes sont menées pour évaluer leur efficacité sur 6 tâches extrinsèques et intrinsèques. Nous espérons que ce document, ainsi que le code publié, seront utiles pour choisir le meilleur type de contexte et la meilleure représentation pour une tâche donnée.", 'ar': 'يتزايد عدد نماذج تضمين الكلمات كل عام. يعتمد معظمها على معلومات التكرار للكلمات وسياقاتها. ومع ذلك ، لا يزال السؤال مفتوحًا ما هو أفضل تعريف للسياق. نحن نقدم تحقيقًا منهجيًا لأربعة أنواع مختلفة من السياق النحوي وتمثيلات السياق لتعلم تضمين الكلمات. يتم إجراء تجارب شاملة لتقييم فعاليتها في 6 مهام خارجية وجوهرية. نأمل أن تكون هذه الورقة ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع الكود المنشور ، مفيدة في اختيار أفضل نوع سياق وتمثيل لمهمة معينة.', 'pt': 'O número de modelos de incorporação de palavras está crescendo a cada ano. A maioria deles é baseada na informação de coocorrência de palavras e seus contextos. No entanto, ainda é uma questão em aberto qual é a melhor definição de contexto. Fornecemos uma investigação sistemática de 4 diferentes tipos de contexto sintático e representações de contexto para aprender a incorporação de palavras. Experimentos abrangentes são conduzidos para avaliar sua eficácia em 6 tarefas extrínsecas e intrínsecas. Esperamos que este artigo, juntamente com o código publicado, seja útil para escolher o melhor tipo de contexto e representação para uma determinada tarefa.', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल की संख्या हर साल बढ़ रही है। उनमें से अधिकांश शब्दों और उनके संदर्भों की सह-घटना जानकारी पर आधारित हैं। हालांकि, यह अभी भी एक खुला सवाल है कि संदर्भ की सबसे अच्छी परिभाषा क्या है। हम शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए 4 अलग-अलग वाक्यात्मक संदर्भ प्रकारों और संदर्भ अभ्यावेदन की एक व्यवस्थित जांच प्रदान करते हैं। 6 बाह्य और आंतरिक कार्यों पर उनकी प्रभावशीलता का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए व्यापक प्रयोग किए जाते हैं। हम आशा करते हैं कि यह पेपर, प्रकाशित कोड के साथ, किसी दिए गए कार्य के लिए सर्वोत्तम संदर्भ प्रकार और प्रतिनिधित्व चुनने के लिए सहायक होगा।', 'ru': 'Количество моделей встраивания слов растет с каждым годом. Большинство из них основаны на информации о совпадении слов и их контекстах. Вместе с тем остается открытым вопрос о том, что является наилучшим определением контекста. Мы обеспечиваем систематическое исследование 4 различных синтаксических типов контекста и контекстных представлений для обучения вложений слов. Проводятся комплексные эксперименты по оценке их эффективности по 6 внешним и внутренним задачам. Мы надеемся, что этот документ, наряду с опубликованным кодом, будет полезен для выбора наилучшего типа контекста и представления для данной задачи.', 'ja': 'ワード埋め込みモデルの数は年々増加しています。それらのほとんどは、単語の共起情報とその文脈に基づいています。しかし、コンテキストの最良の定義とは何かというのは、未だに未解決の問題である。私たちは、単語埋め込みを学習するための4つの異なる構文コンテキストタイプとコンテキスト表現の体系的な調査を提供します。6つの外因性および内因性タスクに対するそれらの有効性を評価するために、包括的な実験が実施される。この論文は、公開されたコードとともに、特定のタスクに最適なコンテキストタイプと表現を選択するのに役立つことを願っています。', 'zh': '词嵌模形数岁长。 其大抵皆单词上下文之共现也。 然则上下文之至义,犹一悬而未决也。 吾系统地究4种异句法上下文形与上下文,以学词嵌之。 综而实验之,以论6个外内之有效性。 愿本文及已发之代码有助于给定者,择其上下文类而表之。', 'ga': 'Tá líon na múnlaí leabú focal ag fás gach bliain. Tá an chuid is mó acu bunaithe ar eolas comhtharlaitheach na bhfocal agus a gcomhthéacsanna. Mar sin féin, is ceist oscailte í fós cad é an sainmhíniú is fearr ar chomhthéacs. Cuirimid imscrúdú córasach ar fáil ar 4 chineál comhthéacs comhréire éagsúil agus léiriúcháin comhthéacs chun leabú focal a fhoghlaim. Déantar turgnaimh chuimsitheacha chun a n-éifeachtacht ar 6 thasc eistreach agus intreacha a mheas. Tá súil againn go mbeadh an páipéar seo, mar aon leis an gcód foilsithe, ina chuidiú chun an cineál comhthéacs agus an ionadaíocht is fearr a roghnú do thasc ar leith.', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazási modellek száma évről évre növekszik. A legtöbbjük a szavak és kontextusaik egyidejű előfordulási információján alapul. Azonban még mindig nyitott kérdés, hogy mi a legjobb meghatározás a kontextusnak. 4 különböző szintaktikus kontextustípus és kontextusreprezentáció rendszeres vizsgálatát végezzük a szóbeágyazások tanulásához. Átfogó kísérleteket végeznek a hatékonyságuk értékelésére 6 külső és belső feladaton. Reméljük, hogy a közzétett kóddal együtt ez a cikk segítségével kiválaszthatja az adott feladat legjobb kontextustípusát és ábrázolását.', 'el': 'Ο αριθμός των μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων αυξάνεται κάθε χρόνο. Τα περισσότερα από αυτά βασίζονται στην πληροφορία συνύπαρξης λέξεων και των πλαισίων τους. Ωστόσο, παραμένει ανοικτό το ερώτημα ποιος είναι ο καλύτερος ορισμός του πλαισίου. Παρέχουμε μια συστηματική διερεύνηση τεσσάρων διαφορετικών συντακτικών τύπων περιβάλλοντος και αναπαραστάσεων περιβάλλοντος για την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων εκμάθησης. Εκτελούνται ολοκληρωμένα πειράματα για την αξιολόγηση της αποτελεσματικότητάς τους σε 6 εξωτερικές και εγγενείς εργασίες. Ελπίζουμε ότι αυτή η εργασία, μαζί με τον δημοσιευμένο κώδικα, θα ήταν χρήσιμη για την επιλογή του καλύτερου τύπου περιβάλλοντος και αναπαράστασης για μια δεδομένη εργασία.', 'it': "Il numero di modelli di incorporazione di parole cresce ogni anno. La maggior parte di essi si basa sulle informazioni di co-occorrenza delle parole e dei loro contesti. Tuttavia, è ancora una questione aperta quale sia la migliore definizione di contesto. Forniamo un'indagine sistematica di 4 diversi tipi di contesto sintattico e rappresentazioni di contesto per imparare le incorporazioni di parole. Vengono condotti esperimenti completi per valutare la loro efficacia su 6 compiti estrinseci ed intrinseci. Speriamo che questo articolo, insieme al codice pubblicato, sia utile per scegliere il tipo di contesto e la rappresentazione migliore per un determinato compito.", 'ka': 'ყველა წლის სიტყვების მოდელების რაოდენობა ხდება. უფრო მეტი მათი სიტყვების და თავისი კონტექსტის შესახებ დაბაზიან. მაგრამ ეს კითხვა უკეთესი კონტექსტის საუკეთესი განსაზღვრება. ჩვენ 4 განსხვავებული სინტექტიკური კონტექსტური ტიპის და კონტექსტური გამოსახულებების სისტემატიკური გამოყენებას გვეყენებთ. ყველაფერი ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთება 6 ექსტრინული და ინტერენტიური საქმებზე. ნაეწგამვ ჟვ, ფვ რჲჱთ გვстნთკ, ოსბლთკრთპან კჲე, ღვ ვ ოჲმჲდნარ ეა თჱბვპვ ნაი-ეჲბპთწ კჲნრვკრთო რთო თ ოპვეჟრაგა ჱა ეაევნ პაბჲრ.', 'ms': 'Bilangan model penyembedding perkataan tumbuh setiap tahun. Kebanyakan dari mereka berdasarkan maklumat sambungan perkataan dan konteks mereka. Namun, ia masih soalan terbuka apa definisi konteks yang terbaik. Kami menyediakan penyelidikan sistemik 4 jenis konteks sintaktik yang berbeza dan perwakilan konteks untuk mempelajari penyambungan perkataan. Eksperimen komprensif dilakukan untuk menilai keefektivitas mereka pada 6 tugas luar dan dalam. Kami harap kertas ini, bersama dengan kod yang diterbitkan, akan membantu untuk memilih jenis konteks yang terbaik dan mewakili untuk tugas tertentu.', 'kk': 'Ендіру үлгілерінің саны әрбір жыл өскен. Олардың көпшілігі сөздер мен мәзірлерінің біріктіру мәліметіне негізделген. Бірақ бұл әлі қазір ашық сұрақ - контекстің ең жақсы анықтамасы. Біз 4 әртүрлі синтактикалық контексті түрлерді жүйелік зерттеуді және контексті сөздерді ендіру үшін көрсетедік. Шығыс және ішкі тапсырмалардың эффективнігін 6 сыртқы және ішкі тапсырмаларда оқу үшін толық тәжірибелер істейді. Біз бұл қағаз, басып шығарылған кодымен бірге, келтірілген тапсырманың ең жақсы контексті түрін таңдау үшін пайдалы болады деп үміттенеміз.', 'lt': 'Kiekvienais metais didėja žodžių įterpimo modelių skaičius. Dauguma jų grindžiama žodžių ir jų kontekstų bendra informacija. However, it is still an open question what is the best definition of context.  Mes sistemingai tiriame keturis skirtingus sintetinius konteksto tipus ir konteksto aprašymus mokymosi žodžių įtraukimui. Siekiant įvertinti jų veiksmingumą atliekant 6 išorines ir vidines užduotis, atliekami išsamūs eksperimentai. Tikimės, kad šis dokumentas kartu su paskelbtu kodeksu padės pasirinkti geriausią konkrečios užduoties konteksto tipą ir atstovavimą.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ എണ്ണം വര്\u200dഷം മോഡലുകള്\u200d വളരുന്നു. അവയില്\u200d അധികപേരും വാക്കുകളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും സഹജമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്. എന്നാലും, ഇത് ഇപ്പോഴും ഒരു തുറന്ന ചോദ്യം തന്നെയാണ്, അതിന്\u200dറെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച വിശദീകരണത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഏറ്റവ നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക് കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റിക്ക് ടൈപ്പുകളുടെയും പ്രതിനിധികളുടെയും വാക്ക് അകത് 6 വെളിച്ചപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളിലും അവരുടെ പ്രകൃതിയെ പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണപരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തി പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിച്ച കോഡുകളോടൊപ്പം ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും നല്ല കോ', 'mk': 'Бројот на модели за вградување на зборови расте секоја година. Повеќето од нив се базирани на информациите за соопштеност на зборовите и нивните контексти. Сепак, сé уште е отворено прашање која е најдобрата дефиниција на контекст. Ние обезбедуваме систематска истрага на 4 различни синтактички типови на контекст и контекстни претставувања за учење на зборови вградени. Сеопфатни експерименти се спроведуваат за проценка на нивната ефективност на 6 надворешни и внатрешни задачи. Се надеваме дека овој весник, заедно со објавениот код, ќе помогне во изборот на најдобриот вид на контекст и претставување на одредена задача.', 'no': 'Talet på ord innebygde modeller aukar kvar år. Dei fleste er basert på samtidige informasjonen om ord og kontekstane sine. Det er likevel eit opna spørsmål kva er det beste definisjonen av kontekst. Vi gjev eit systematisk undersøking av 4 ulike syntaktiske konteksttypar og kontekstrepresentasjonar for læring av ord innebygging. Kompleksive eksperimenter er gjennomført for å evaluera effektiviteten på 6 ekstrinsic og intrinsiske oppgåver. Vi håper at denne papiret, saman med den publikerte koden, vil vera nyttig for å velja den beste konteksttypen og representasjonen for ei oppgåve.', 'pl': 'Liczba modeli osadzania słów rośnie z roku na rok. Większość z nich opiera się na informacjach o współwystępowaniu słów i ich kontekstach. Pozostaje jednak otwarte pytanie, jaka jest najlepsza definicja kontekstu. Zapewniamy systematyczne badanie czterech różnych typów kontekstu składni i reprezentacji kontekstu dla nauki osadzeń słów. Przeprowadzane są kompleksowe eksperymenty w celu oceny ich skuteczności na 6-ciu zadaniach zewnętrznych i wewnętrznych. Mamy nadzieję, że ten artykuł wraz z opublikowanym kodem będzie pomocny w wyborze najlepszego rodzaju kontekstu i reprezentacji dla danego zadania.', 'mn': 'Жил бүр нэмэгдсэн үг загваруудын тоо өсөж байна. Тэдний ихэнх нь үг болон нөхцөл байдлын хамтын мэдээлэл дээр суурилсан. Гэвч энэ нь харьцааны хамгийн сайн тодорхойлолтой асуулт юм. Бид 4 өөр шинжлэх ухааны төрлийн синтактикийн тухай систематикийн шинжлэх ухаан өгдөг. Шинжлэх туршилтууд 6 гадна болон дотоод даалгаварын үр дүнг үнэлэхэд хийгдсэн. Бид энэ цаас, хэвлэгдсэн кодын хамт, хамгийн сайн контекст төрлийг сонгоход тусалдаг гэдэгт итгэдэг.', 'mt': "L-għadd ta’ mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem qed jikber kull sena. Il-biċċa l-kbira minnhom huma bbażati fuq l-informazzjoni dwar il-kookkorrenza tal-kliem u l-kuntesti tagħhom. Madankollu, għadha kwistjoni miftuħa x’inhi l-aħjar definizzjoni ta’ kuntest. Aħna nipprovdu investigazzjoni sistematika ta’ erba’ tipi differenti ta’ kuntest sintattiku u rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ kuntest għat-tagħlim tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. Comprehensive experiments are conducted to evaluate their effectiveness on 6 extrinsic and intrinsic tasks.  Nittamaw li dan id-dokument, flimkien mal-kodiċi ppubblikat, ikun ta' għajnuna għall-għa żla tal-aħjar tip ta' kuntest u rappreżentazzjoni għal kompitu partikolari.", 'si': 'අවුරුද්දක් වචනය සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරනවා. ඔවුන්ගේ ගොඩක් දේවල් වචන සහ ඔවුන්ගේ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු අධාරණය කරනවා. ඒත්, ඒක තවමත් විවෘත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ හොඳම විවෘත විව අපි පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණයක් හතර වෙනස් සංකේතික සංවේදනය වර්ගයක් සහ සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් දෙනවා ව සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණාවල් ඔවුන්ගේ පරීක්ෂණත්වය 6 ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් සහ ඇතුළත් වැඩක් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා මේ පත්තර, ප්\u200dරකාශිත කෝඩ් එක්ක, හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් හා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් තෝරාග', 'ro': 'Numărul de modele de încorporare a cuvintelor este în creștere în fiecare an. Cele mai multe dintre ele se bazează pe informațiile de co-apariție ale cuvintelor și contextul lor. Cu toate acestea, este încă o întrebare deschisă care este cea mai bună definiție a contextului. Oferim o investigare sistematică a 4 tipuri de context sintactice diferite și reprezentări de context pentru învățarea încorporărilor de cuvinte. Experimente cuprinzătoare sunt efectuate pentru a evalua eficacitatea lor pe 6 sarcini extrinsice și intrinsece. Sperăm că această lucrare, împreună cu codul publicat, va fi utilă pentru alegerea celui mai bun tip de context și reprezentare pentru o anumită sarcină.', 'so': "Lambarka hadalka sameynta ayaa koraya sanad kasta. Intooda badankood waxay ku saleysan yihiin macluumaad la xiriira hadallada iyo qoraalkooda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay weli tahay su'aal furan ee ay tahay sawir ugu wanaagsan daboolka. We provide a systematical investigation of 4 different syntactic context types and context representations for learning word embeddings.  Imtixaanka aasaasiga ah waxaa lagu sameeyaa si loo qiimeeyo waxyaabahooda ku saabsan 6 shaqooyinka dibadda iyo gudaha ah. Waxaynu rajaynaynaa in warqaddan, kaas oo la wadata codsiga la soo daabacay, ay caawinaysaa in loo doorto nooca ugu wanaagsan iyo wakiilka shaqada la siiyey.", 'sr': 'Broj modela uključenih reèi raste svake godine. Većina njih je zasnovana na informacijama o saradnji događaja riječi i njihovih konteksta. Međutim, to je još uvek otvoreno pitanje šta je najbolja definicija konteksta. Mi obezbeđujemo sistematsku istragu četiri različite tipa sintaktičkog konteksta i kontekstske predstave za učenje reči integracije. Uhvatljivi eksperimenti su provedeni kako bi procenili njihovu učinkovitost na 6 izvanzemaljskih i unutrašnjih zadataka. Nadamo se da će ovaj papir, zajedno sa objavljenim kodom, biti od koristi za biranje najboljeg tipa konteksta i predstavljanje određenog zadatka.', 'sv': 'Antalet ordinbäddningsmodeller ökar varje år. De flesta av dem är baserade på samtidig förekomst information av ord och deras sammanhang. Det är dock fortfarande en öppen fråga vad som är den bästa definitionen av sammanhang. Vi tillhandahåller en systematisk undersökning av 4 olika syntaktiska kontexttyper och kontextrepresentationer för att lära ordinbäddningar. Omfattande experiment utförs för att utvärdera deras effektivitet på 6 yttre och inre uppgifter. Vi hoppas att denna uppsats, tillsammans med den publicerade koden, skulle vara till hjälp för att välja den bästa kontexttypen och representationen för en viss uppgift.', 'ta': 'ஒவ்வொரு ஆண்டும் உள்ளிடும் வார்த்தைகளின் எண்ணிக்கை அவர்களில் பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய நிகழ்வுகளின் இணைய தகவல் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளன ஆனால், இது இன்னும் திறந்த கேள்வி என்ன சிறந்த வரையறை என்பது. நாம் 4 வேறு வித்தியாசமான ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் சூழல் வகைகள் மற்றும் சூழல் குறிப்பிடும் வார்த்தை பொருள்  6 வெளிப்படையில் மற்றும் உள்ளிருக்கும் பணிகளில் அவர்களுடைய விளைவை மதிப்பிட முழுமையான சோதனைகள் செய்யப்பட்டது. நாங்கள் நம்புகிறோம், இந்த காகிதத்துடன், வெளியிட்ட குறியீடுகளுடன், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பணிக்கு சிறந்த சூழல் வகையையும் ப', 'ur': 'ہر سال کلمات میں مہینڈ موڈل کی تعداد بڑھتی ہے۔ ان میں سے اکثر کلمات اور ان کی موقعیت کی شروع کی اطلاعات پر بنے ہوئے ہیں لیکن یہ اب بھی ایک کھلی پوچھ ہے کہ کائنات کی بہترین تعریف کیا ہے۔ ہم نے 4 مختلف سینٹکسیٹیک کنٹکسیٹ ٹائیپ اور کنٹکسیٹ نمایش کا سیستماتیک تحقیق دیا ہے لفظ ابڈینگ کی تعلیم کے لئے۔ 6 خارجی اور داخلی کاموں پر ان کی فعالیت کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے کامل آزمائش کیا جاتا ہے. ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ یہ کاغذ، پیغام کی کوڈ کے ساتھ، ایک کام کے لئے بہترین کنٹکس ٹائپ اور نمایش کا انتخاب کرنے کے لئے مددگار ہوگا۔', 'uz': "Har yil ichki so'zlar soni ko'payadi. Ularning ko'pchiligi so'zlar va o'zlarining taʼminotlari bilan bir nechta maʼlumot asosida. Lekin, bu ko'p ochiq savol - ma'lumotning eng yaxshi ma'lumot. Biz so'zlarni o'rganish uchun 4 turli syntactic turlari va context representlarini tizim qilamiz. Umumiy tajribalar 6 ta tashkilotga va ichki vazifalarning effektini qidirish uchun bajarildi. Bu qogʻoz nashrilgan kodlar bilan ko'rsatilgan foydalanishini ishonamiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Số mẫu ghép từ đang tăng lên mỗi năm. Hầu hết đều dựa trên các thông tin liên quan của các từ ngữ. Tuy nhiên, vẫn là một câu hỏi mở, đó là định nghĩa hoàn cảnh tốt nhất. Chúng tôi cung cấp một cuộc điều tra hệ thống về bốn kiểu ngữ cảnh khác nhau và các biểu tượng ngữ cảnh để học từ ngữ nhân tạo. Nghiên cứu to àn diện được tiến hành để đánh giá hiệu quả của chúng với 6 các công việc tứ kiệt và nội tạng. Chúng tôi hy vọng rằng tờ báo này, cùng với mã đã xuất bản, sẽ có ích cho việc chọn ngữ cảnh phù hợp nhất và đại diện cho một nhiệm vụ cụ thể.', 'da': 'Antallet af ordindlejringsmodeller vokser hvert år. De fleste af dem er baseret på samtidig forekomstinformation af ord og deres sammenhænge. Men det er stadig et åbent spørgsmål, hvad der er den bedste definition af kontekst. Vi leverer en systematisk undersøgelse af 4 forskellige syntaktiske konteksttyper og kontekstrepræsentationer til læring af ord indlejringer. Omfattende eksperimenter udføres for at vurdere deres effektivitet på 6 ekstrene og iboende opgaver. Vi håber, at denne artikel sammen med den offentliggjorte kode vil være nyttig til at vælge den bedste konteksttype og repræsentation for en given opgave.', 'nl': 'Het aantal woord embedding modellen groeit elk jaar. De meeste van hen zijn gebaseerd op de co-incident informatie van woorden en hun contexten. Het is echter nog steeds een open vraag wat de beste definitie van context is. We bieden een systematisch onderzoek naar vier verschillende syntactische contexttypen en contextrepresentaties voor het leren van woord embeddings. Uitgebreide experimenten worden uitgevoerd om hun effectiviteit op 6 extrinsieke en intrinsieke taken te evalueren. We hopen dat dit document, samen met de gepubliceerde code, nuttig zou zijn voor het kiezen van het beste contexttype en de beste representatie voor een bepaalde taak.', 'bg': 'Броят на моделите за вграждане на думи нараства всяка година. Повечето от тях се основават на съвместната информация на думите и техните контексти. Все пак остава отворен въпрос кое е най-доброто определение на контекста. Предлагаме систематично изследване на 4 различни синтактични контекстни типа и контекстни представяния за изучаване на вграждането на думи. Провеждат се изчерпателни експерименти, за да се оцени тяхната ефективност при 6 външни и вътрешни задачи. Надяваме се, че тази статия, заедно с публикувания код, ще бъде полезна за избора на най-добрия тип контекст и представяне за дадена задача.', 'de': 'Die Anzahl der Wort-Einbettungsmodelle wächst von Jahr zu Jahr. Die meisten von ihnen basieren auf der Koexistenzinformation von Wörtern und ihren Kontexten. Es ist jedoch immer noch eine offene Frage, was die beste Definition von Kontext ist. Wir bieten eine systematische Untersuchung von vier verschiedenen syntaktischen Kontexttypen und Kontextdarstellungen für lernende Worteinbettungen. Umfangreiche Experimente werden durchgeführt, um ihre Wirksamkeit auf 6 extrinsische und intrinsische Aufgaben zu bewerten. Wir hoffen, dass dieses Papier zusammen mit dem veröffentlichten Code hilfreich sein wird, um den besten Kontexttyp und die beste Darstellung für eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuwählen.', 'hr': 'Broj modela uključujući riječi raste svake godine. Većina njih je temeljena na podacima o saradnji događaja riječi i njihovih konteksta. Međutim, to je još uvijek otvoreno pitanje što je najbolja definicija konteksta. Mi pružamo sistematsku istragu četiri različite vrste sintaktičkog konteksta i predstavljanja konteksta za učenje riječi o integraciji. Uhvaćeni su eksperimenti provedeni kako bi procijenili njihovu učinkovitost na 6 vanjskih i unutrašnjih zadataka. Nadamo se da će ovaj papir, zajedno s objavljenim kodom, biti od koristi za biranje najboljeg tipa konteksta i predstavljanje određenog zadatka.', 'id': 'The number of word embedding models is growing every year.  Kebanyakan dari mereka berdasarkan informasi sambungan kata-kata dan konteks mereka. Namun, ini masih pertanyaan terbuka apa definisi konteks terbaik. Kami menyediakan penyelidikan sistematis dari 4 tipe konteks sintaktik yang berbeda dan rappresentasi konteks untuk mempelajari embedding kata. Eksperimen komprensif dilakukan untuk mengevaluasi efektivitas mereka pada 6 tugas ekstrinsik dan intrinsik. Kami berharap bahwa kertas ini, bersama dengan kode yang diterbitkan, akan membantu untuk memilih tipe konteks terbaik dan representation untuk tugas tertentu.', 'ko': '단어가 모형에 박히는 수량이 해마다 증가하고 있다.그 중 대부분은 단어와 상하문에 기반한 공현 정보이다.그러나 언어 환경의 가장 좋은 정의가 무엇인지는 여전히 현안으로 남아 있다.우리는 네 가지 서로 다른 문법적 언어 환경 유형과 언어 환경 표시에 대해 체계적인 연구를 진행하여 단어의 삽입을 배웠다.종합 실험을 통해 그들의 6가지 외적 임무와 내적 임무의 유효성을 평가하다.우리는 본고와 이미 발표된 코드가 주어진 임무에 가장 좋은 상하문 유형과 표시를 선택하는 데 도움이 되기를 바란다.', 'fa': 'تعداد مدل\u200cهای استفاده از کلمات هر سال رشد می\u200cکند. بیشتر آنها بر اطلاعات همکاری از کلمات و وضعیت\u200cهایشان بنیاد دارند. ولی این هنوز یک سوال باز است که بهترین تعریف محیط چیست. ما یک تحقیقات سیستماتیک از چهار نوع موقعیت متفاوت سنتاکتیک و نمایش\u200cهای محیط برای یاد گرفتن کلمه\u200cهای داخلی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای کامل برای ارزیابی عملکرد آنها در شش کار خارجی و داخلی انجام می\u200cشود. امیدواریم این کاغذ، همراه با کد منتشر شده، برای انتخاب بهترین نوع محیط و نمایش برای یک کار معلوم کمک کند.', 'sw': 'Idadi ya mitindo ya maneno yanayokuwa inaongezeka kila mwaka. Wengi wao wanategemea taarifa zinazotokea kwa pamoja za maneno na matatizo yao. Hata hivyo, bado ni swali la wazi ni tafsiri bora ya muktadha. Tunatoa uchunguzi wa mfumo wa aina nne tofauti za muktadha na uwakilishi wa mazingira kwa ajili ya kujifunza maneno. Majaribio makubwa yanafanywa ili kutathmini ufanisi wao kwenye kazi 6 za nje na za ndani. Tunatumaini kwamba gazeti hili, pamoja na sheria iliyochapishwa, litasaidia kuchagua aina bora ya muktadha na uwakilishi kwa kazi fulani.', 'tr': 'Her ýyl gutlanýan nusgalaryň sany. Olaryň köp bölegi sözler we jemgyýetleri bilen daýanýar. Ýöne bu henizem açyk soragy kontekstiň iň gowy tanyşdyrylygy. Biz 4 dürli sintaktik kontekst türlerini we kelime integrlerini öwrenmek üçin sistematik barlag bererik. Tüm derejeler 6 aşagy we iç zadynda etkinliklerini çykarmak üçin edildi. Biz bu kagyz, seredeniň kody bilen birlikde, berilen täze üçin iň gowy kontekst türüni we suraty saýlamak üçin kömek bolar diýip umyt edýäris.', 'sq': 'Numri i modeleve të përfshirjes së fjalëve po rritet çdo vit. Shumica e tyre janë bazuar në informacionin e bashkëndodhjes së fjalëve dhe konteksteve të tyre. However, it is still an open question what is the best definition of context.  Ne ofrojmë një hetim sistematik të 4 llojeve të ndryshme të kontekstit sintaktik dhe përfaqësimeve të kontekstit për mësimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve. Eksperimente të përgjithshme zhvillohen për të vlerësuar efektshmërinë e tyre në 6 detyra ekstreme dhe të brendshme. Shpresojmë se ky dokument, së bashku me kodin e botuar, do të jetë i dobishëm për zgjedhjen e tipit më të mirë të kontekstit dhe përfaqësimit për një detyrë të caktuar.', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներառման մոդելների թիվը ամեն տարի աճում է: Նրանցից շատերը հիմնված են բառերի և նրանց կոնտեքստի համապատասխան տեղեկատվության վրա: Սակայն դեռևս բաց հարց է, թե ինչ է կոնտեքստի լավագույն սահմանումը: We provide a systematical investigation of 4 different syntactic context types and context representations for learning word embeddings.  Ամբողջ փորձեր են կատարվում, որպեսզի գնահատեն նրանց արդյունավետությունը 6 արտաքին և ներքին առաջադրանքների վրա: Մենք հույս ունենք, որ այս աշխատանքը, միասին հրատարակված կոդի հետ, կօգնի ընտրել որոշ խնդիրների լավագույն կոնտեքստի տեսակը և ներկայացումը:', 'am': 'የቃላት ቁጥር በየዓመቱ ያድጋል፡፡ አብዛኞቻቸውም የቃላቸውና የግንኙነታቸው መረጃ በመሠረት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ግን የክፍለኛ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ 4 የተለየ የሲንተርካዊ ጽሑፍ ዓይነቶች እና የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች ለመማር ቃላትን ለማስተማርን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ሙሉ ፈተናዎች በ6 ውጭ እና ውጤታዊ ስራ ላይ ውጤታቸውን ለማስተዋል ነው፡፡ ይህች ገጽ በተለወጠው ጽሑፍ የተሻለ የሥርዓት ዓይነት እና የተሰጠውን ስራ ለመምረጥ የሚረዳ እንዲሆን ተስፋ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Die aantal woord inbetering modele groei elke jaar. Die meeste van hulle is gebaseer op die samewerkomsinligting van woorde en hul kontekste. Maar dit is nog 'n oop vraag wat is die beste definisie van konteks. Ons verskaf 'n sistematiese ondersoek van 4 verskillende sintaktike konteks tipes en konteks verteenwoordes vir onderring van woord inbêring. Kompleksiewe eksperimente word gedoen om hulle effektiviteit op 6 ekstrinsies en intrinsiese taak te evalueer. Ons hoop dat hierdie papier, saam met die gepubliseerde kode, hulp sal wees vir die kies van die beste kontekstipe en voorstelling vir 'n gegewe taak.", 'az': 'İçində olan modellərin sayı hər il artır. Onların əksəriyyəti sözlərin və məsələlərinin istifadə məlumatına dayanılır. Ancaq bu hələ açıq bir sual məlumatın ən yaxşı tanımlaması nədir. Biz 4 müxtəlif sintaktik məlumat türünü və məlumatlarını öyrənmək üçün sistematik təşkil edirik. Müxtəlif təcrübələr 6 ekstrinsic və içəri işlər yaratmaq üçün təşkil edilir. Biz ümid edirik ki, bu kağıt, yayınlanmış kodu ilə birlikdə, müəyyən edilmiş iş üçün ən yaxşı kontekst türünü və göstəricisini seçmək üçün fayda verər.', 'bn': 'প্রতি বছর শব্দের সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি হচ্ছে। তাদের বেশীরভাগ শব্দ এবং তাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার তথ্যের উপর ভিত্তিত। তবে এটা এখনো একটি উন্মুক্ত প্রশ্ন যা প্রেক্ষাপটের সবচেয়ে ভালো বিবরণ কী। আমরা ৪ ভিন্ন ভিন্ন সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কন্টেক্সটিকেন্ট ট টাইপ এবং প্রতিনিধিত্বের একটি ব্যবস্থাগত তদন্ত প্রদান করি  ৬টি বিদেশী এবং অভ্যন্তরীণ কাজের উপর তাদের কার্যকর পরীক্ষা মূল্য করার জন্য সম্পূর্ণ পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে। আমরা আশা করি প্রকাশিত কোডের সাথে এই পত্রিকাটি একটি প্রকাশিত কাজের জন্য সেরা প্রতিনিধিত্ব বেছে নিতে সাহায্য করবে।', 'bs': 'Broj modela uključenih riječi raste svake godine. Većina njih je zasnovana na podacima o saradnji događaja riječi i njihovih konteksta. Međutim, to je još uvijek otvoreno pitanje koja je najbolja definicija konteksta. Mi pružamo sistematičku istragu četiri različite tipa sintaktičkog konteksta i predstavljanja konteksta za učenje rečenica. Uhvaćeni su eksperimenti za procjenu njihove učinkovitosti na 6 izvanzemaljskih i unutrašnjih zadataka. Nadamo se da će ovaj papir, zajedno sa objavljenim kodom, biti od koristi za biranje najboljeg tipa konteksta i predstavljanje određenog zadatka.', 'ca': "El nombre de models d'incorporació de paraules està creixent cada any. La majoria està basada en la informació de coincidència de paraules i els seus contextos. Però encara és una pregunta oberta quina és la millor definició del context. Oferecem una investigació sistemàtica de quatre tipus de context sinàctic diferents i representacions de context per aprendre integració de paraules. Es fan experiments complets per avaluar la seva eficacia en 6 tasques extrínseques i intrínsecs. Esperem que aquest paper, juntament amb el codi publicat, sigui útil per triar el millor tipus de context i representar una tasca determinada.", 'cs': 'Počet modelů pro vložení slov roste každým rokem. Většina z nich je založena na informacích o koexistenci slov a jejich kontextu. Je však stále otevřenou otázkou, jaká je nejlepší definice kontextu. Poskytujeme systematické vyšetřování čtyř různých syntaktických kontextových typů a kontextových reprezentací pro učení slovních vložení. Pro hodnocení jejich účinnosti na šesti extrinsických a intrinsických úlohách jsou prováděny komplexní experimenty. Doufáme, že tento článek spolu s publikovaným kódem bude užitečný při výběru nejlepšího typu kontextu a reprezentace pro daný úkol.', 'et': 'Sõnade manustamise mudelite arv kasvab igal aastal. Enamik neist põhineb sõnade ja nende kontekstide koosesinemise teabel. Siiski on veel lahtiseks küsimuseks, milline on konteksti parim määratlus. Pakume süstemaatilist uurimist 4 erineva süntaktilise konteksti tüübi ja konteksti esituste kohta sõna manustamise õppimiseks. Põhjalikud katsed viiakse läbi, et hinnata nende efektiivsust kuuel välisel ja sisemisel ülesandel. Loodame, et käesolev dokument koos avaldatud koodiga aitaks valida konkreetse ülesande jaoks parima kontekstitüübi ja esituse.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusmallien määrä kasvaa joka vuosi. Suurin osa niistä perustuu sanojen ja niiden kontekstien samanaikaistietoon. On kuitenkin vielä avoinna kysymys, mikä on paras kontekstin määritelmä. Tarjoamme systemaattisen tutkimuksen neljästä eri syntaktisesta kontekstityypistä ja kontekstivaiheista sanan upottamisen oppimiseen. Kattavia kokeita tehdään niiden tehokkuuden arvioimiseksi kuudessa ulkoisessa ja luontaisessa tehtävässä. Toivomme, että tämä artikkeli yhdessä julkaistun koodin kanssa auttaisi valitsemaan parhaan kontekstityypin ja esitystavan tiettyyn tehtävään.', 'ha': 'The number of word embedding models is growing every year.  Babu mafi yawansu yana kan samuran lãbãri na maganar da matsayinsu. A lokacin da, wannan yana wani tambayi bayyananne ne mafi kyaun fassarar mazaɓa. Tuna samar da shirin zartarwa a cikin shirin ayuka 4 daban-daban syntactic da mazaɓan muhimmanci wa karanta maganar da aka shigar da shi. Ana tafiyar jarrabai da kamfata dõmin su evaluate aikin 6 na bakin da ke cikin. Tuna fatan cẽwa, wannan takarda, da samun kodi da aka faɗa shi, zai yi amfani da in zãɓi mafi kyakkyawan mazaɓa da mai nuna wa wani aikin da aka ba.', 'sk': 'Število modelov za vgradnjo besed vsako leto narašča. Večina izmed njih temelji na informacijah o soobstoju besed in njihovih kontekstov. Vendar pa je še vedno odprto vprašanje, katera je najboljša opredelitev konteksta. Zagotavljamo sistematično preiskavo 4 različnih sintaktičnih kontekstnih tipov in kontekstnih reprezentacij za učenje vgradnje besed. Izvedeni so celoviti poskusi za oceno njihove učinkovitosti pri 6 zunanjih in intrinzičnih nalogah. Upamo, da bo ta prispevek skupaj z objavljeno kodo koristil pri izbiri najboljše vrste konteksta in predstavitve za določeno nalogo.', 'he': 'מספר הדוגמנים של המילים מתגדלים בכל שנה. רובם מבוססים על מידע התרחשות המשותפת של מילים והקשרים שלהם. עם זאת, זו עדיין שאלה פתוחה מה ההגדרה הטובה ביותר של הקשר. אנחנו מספקים חקירה מערכתית של 4 סוגי קונטקסט סינטאקטי שונים ומצגות קונטקסט ללמוד מילים קישורים. ניסויים מלאים מתבצעים כדי להעריך את היעילות שלהם על 6 משימות חיצונייות ופנימיות. אנו מקווים שהנייר הזה, יחד עם הקוד המפורסם, יעזור בבחירה של סוג הקשר הטוב ביותר והייצוג למשימה מסוימת.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_string Bocah-bocah sing dipunangé karo informasi sing dikarolan kelangan karo contexturané Nanging, iki gayet mbukak kesempatan kanggo masalah sing luwih apik kara kontèks. Name Wang Awak dhéwé bakal sing paling iki, lan akeh kode publika, iso ngéwangi nggo langgar sewisa sistem sing luwih apik lan reparasi kanggo nggawe task.', 'bo': 'ལོ་རེར་བཞིན་པའི་ནང་འཇུག་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་གི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་ནར་ཡོད། ཁོང་ཚོ་མང་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་ཡི་གེ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་མཉམ་དུ་རྟེན་ནས་བྱུང་བ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དེ་ཡང་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་དོན་ཅི་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ཁ་ཡུག་གི་རིགས་ལ་མ་འདྲ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་བཞིན་མ་འདུག མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དག་གིས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་ནུས་པ་གཞན་དང་ནང་འཁོར་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཚོར་ཞིབ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱས་འདི་དང་བྲིས་དཔར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་ཨང་ཀིའི་མཉམ་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྲོད་ཡུལ་ཡོད་པའི་རིགས་དང་བྱས་པའི་བྱ་'}
{'en': 'Does syntax help discourse segmentation? Not so much', 'ar': 'هل يساعد بناء الجملة في تجزئة الخطاب؟ ليس كثيرا', 'pt': 'A sintaxe ajuda na segmentação do discurso? Não muito', 'es': '¿La sintaxis ayuda a la segmentación del discurso? No tanto', 'fr': 'La syntaxe aide-t-elle à segmenter le discours\xa0? Pas tant que ça', 'ja': '構文は話し言葉のセグメンテーションに役立ちますか？それほど多くはありません', 'zh': '语法有助于言乎? 未之有也', 'hi': 'क्या वाक्यविन्यास प्रवचन विभाजन में मदद करता है? इतना नहीं', 'ru': 'Помогает ли синтаксис сегментации дискурса? Не так много', 'ga': 'An gcuidíonn an chomhréir le deighilt dioscúrsa? Níl an oiread sin', 'ka': 'სინტაქქსის დახმარება დისკურსის სეგუმენტირებას? ნვ რჲლკჲგა.', 'hu': 'A szintaxis segít a diskurzus szegmentálásában? Nem annyira.', 'el': 'Βοηθά η σύνταξη στην τμηματοποίηση του λόγου; Όχι τόσο πολύ.', 'kk': 'Синтаксис дискурстың сегментациясын көмектесетін бе? Көп емес', 'it': 'La sintassi aiuta la segmentazione del discorso? Non tanto', 'lt': 'Ar sintaksas padeda diskurso segmentacijai? Ne taip daug.', 'mk': 'Дали синтаксијата помага во дискурсната сегментација? Не многу.', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ് സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ? അധികമൊന്നുമില്ല', 'no': 'Har syntaks hjelp til diskursering av segmentasjon? Ikkje så mykje', 'ms': 'Does syntax help discourse segmentation?  Tidak begitu banyak', 'pl': 'Czy składnia pomaga segmentacji dyskursu? Nie tak bardzo', 'mt': 'Is-sintaks jgħin fis-segmentazzjoni tad-diskors? Mhux daqshekk', 'mn': 'Синтаксис загварын тухай туслах уу? Тийм ч биш.', 'ro': 'Sintaxa ajută la segmentarea discursului? Nu atât de mult', 'sr': 'Da li sintaksa pomaže diskusiji o segmentaciji? Ne toliko.', 'sv': 'Hjälper syntax diskurssegmentering? Inte så mycket', 'si': 'වාක්ෂික වාක්ෂික වාක්ෂාව විශේෂය කරනවද? ගොඩක් නෑ', 'so': 'Ma caawiya qeybinta arrimaha shaqada? wax badan ma aha', 'ta': 'தொடர்ந்து பேசும் பிரிவு பிரிவு உதவி இருக்கிறதா? மிகவும் இல்லை', 'ur': 'کیا سینٹکس سکیٹمنٹ کی باتوں کی مدد کرتی ہے؟ زیادہ نہیں', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu ko'p emas", 'vi': 'Có phải cú pháp giúp phân đoạn? Không nhiều lắm.', 'bg': 'Синтаксисът помага ли за сегментирането на дискурсите? Не толкова много.', 'nl': 'Helpt syntaxis discourssegmentatie? Niet zo veel', 'da': 'Hjælper syntaks diskurssegmentering? Ikke så meget', 'hr': 'Da li sintaksa pomaže diskusiji o segmentaciji? Ne toliko.', 'de': 'Hilft Syntax bei der Segmentierung von Diskursen? Nicht so sehr', 'id': 'Apakah sintaks membantu segmentasi diskors? Tidak begitu banyak', 'ko': '문법은 문장의 분할에 도움이 됩니까?그렇게 많지 않다', 'tr': 'Sentaks sözlemegine kömek edip barmy? Köp değil', 'sw': 'Je, ushirikiano unasaidia kupambana na mazungumzo? Sio sana', 'fa': 'آیا سنتاکس به سخنرانی جدایی کمک می\u200cکند؟ نه خيلي', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s እጅግ አይደለም", 'af': 'Het sintaks hulp diskursie segmentasie? Nie so baie nie', 'sq': 'A ndihmon sintaksi segmentimin e diskursit? Jo aq shumë.', 'hy': 'Արդյո՞ք սինտաքսը օգնում է խոսակցության սեգմետրացիա: Ոչ այնքան', 'az': 'Sintaks s칬hb톛t segmentasiyas캼na k칬m톛k edir? 칂ox deyil', 'bs': 'Da li sintaksa pomaže diskusiji o segmentaciji? Ne toliko.', 'bn': 'সিন্ট্যাক্সের সাহায্য কি বক্তব্যের বিভাগে সাহায্য করে? এতো না', 'cs': 'Pomáhá syntaxe segmentaci diskurzu? Ne tak moc.', 'ca': 'La sintaxi ajuda a la segmentació del discurs? No tant', 'et': 'Kas süntaks aitab diskursuse segmenteerimist? Mitte nii palju.', 'fi': 'Auttaako syntaksi diskurssin segmentointia? Ei niin paljon.', 'jv': 'Label Ora kok ibut', 'sk': 'Ali sintaksa pomaga segmentaciji diskurza? Ne toliko.', 'ha': 'Shin, yana da rabon magana cikin shirin taɓa? QDialogButtonBox', 'he': 'האם סינטקס עוזר לחלקת דיבורים? לא כל כך הרבה.', 'bo': 'syntax help discourse segmentation? མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་མེད།'}
{'en': 'Discourse segmentation is the first step in building discourse parsers. Most work on discourse segmentation does not scale to real-world discourse parsing across languages, for two reasons : (i) models rely on constituent trees, and (ii) experiments have relied on gold standard identification of sentence and token boundaries. We therefore investigate to what extent constituents can be replaced with universal dependencies, or left out completely, as well as how state-of-the-art segmenters fare in the absence of sentence boundaries. Our results show that dependency information is less useful than expected, but we provide a fully scalable, robust model that only relies on part-of-speech information, and show that it performs well across languages in the absence of any gold-standard annotation.', 'ar': 'تجزئة الخطاب هي الخطوة الأولى في بناء محللي الخطاب. لا تتسع معظم الأعمال المتعلقة بتجزئة الخطاب إلى تحليل الخطاب في العالم الحقيقي عبر اللغات ، وذلك لسببين: (1) تعتمد النماذج على الأشجار المكونة ، و (2) اعتمدت التجارب على تحديد المعيار الذهبي للجملة وحدود الرمز المميز. لذلك فإننا نتحرى إلى أي مدى يمكن استبدال المكونات بتبعية عالمية ، أو استبعادها تمامًا ، وكذلك كيفية أداء أحدث التقسيمات في غياب حدود الجملة. تُظهر نتائجنا أن معلومات التبعية أقل فائدة مما كان متوقعًا ، لكننا نقدم نموذجًا قويًا وقابل للتطوير بالكامل يعتمد فقط على معلومات جزء من الكلام ، ويظهر أنه يعمل بشكل جيد عبر اللغات في غياب أي تعليق توضيحي بمعيار ذهبي.', 'fr': "La segmentation du discours est la première étape de la création d'analyseurs de discours. La plupart des travaux sur la segmentation du discours ne s'adaptent pas à l'analyse du discours dans le monde réel entre les langues, pour deux raisons\xa0: (i) les modèles reposent sur des arbres constitutifs, et (ii) les expériences se sont appuyées sur l'identification de référence des limites de phrases et de jetons. Nous étudions donc dans quelle mesure les constituants peuvent être remplacés par des dépendances universelles, ou complètement exclus, ainsi que la façon dont les segments de pointe s'en sortent en l'absence de limites de phrases. Nos résultats montrent que les informations de dépendance sont moins utiles que prévu, mais nous proposons un modèle robuste et entièrement évolutif qui ne repose que sur des informations de partie du discours et montre qu'il fonctionne bien dans toutes les langues en l'absence d'annotation standard.", 'pt': 'A segmentação de discurso é o primeiro passo na construção de analisadores de discurso. A maioria dos trabalhos sobre segmentação de discurso não se adapta à análise do discurso do mundo real entre linguagens, por duas razões: (i) os modelos dependem de árvores constituintes e (ii) os experimentos se baseiam na identificação padrão-ouro de limites de sentenças e tokens. Portanto, investigamos até que ponto os constituintes podem ser substituídos por dependências universais, ou deixados completamente de fora, bem como como os segmentadores de última geração se saem na ausência de limites de sentença. Nossos resultados mostram que as informações de dependência são menos úteis do que o esperado, mas fornecemos um modelo totalmente escalável e robusto que depende apenas de informações de parte da fala e mostra que ele funciona bem em todas as linguagens na ausência de qualquer anotação padrão-ouro.', 'es': 'La segmentación del discurso es el primer paso en la creación de analizadores del discurso. La mayor parte del trabajo sobre la segmentación del discurso no se escala al análisis del discurso del mundo real a través de los idiomas, por dos razones: (i) los modelos se basan en árboles constituyentes, y (ii) los experimentos se han basado en la identificación estándar de los límites de oraciones y fichas. Por lo tanto, investigamos hasta qué punto los constituyentes pueden ser reemplazados por dependencias universales, o excluidos por completo, así como cómo les va a los segmentadores de última generación en ausencia de límites de sentencia. Nuestros resultados muestran que la información de dependencia es menos útil de lo esperado, pero proporcionamos un modelo sólido y totalmente escalable que solo se basa en la información de la parte del discurso y demuestra que funciona bien en todos los idiomas sin ninguna anotación de referencia.', 'ja': 'ディスカッションセグメンテーションは、ディスカッションパーサーを構築するための最初のステップです。言説のセグメンテーションに関するほとんどの研究は、（ i ）モデルは構成木に依存し、（ ii ）実験は文とトークンの境界の金本位制の識別に依存している。したがって、私たちは、構成要素がどの程度普遍的な依存関係に置き換えられるか、または完全に排除されるか、そして最先端のセグメンテーターが文章の境界がない場合にどのように運営されるかを調査します。私たちの結果は、依存情報は予想よりも有用性が低いことを示していますが、完全にスケーラブルで堅牢なモデルを提供しています。このモデルは音声情報の一部にのみ依存しており、ゴールドスタンダードな注釈がない場合には、言語間で優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。', 'ru': 'Сегментация дискурса является первым шагом в построении парсеров дискурса. Большая часть работы по сегментации дискурса не масштабируется до реального синтаксического анализа дискурса между языками по двум причинам: (i) модели опираются на составляющие деревья и (ii) эксперименты опираются на идентификацию золотого стандарта границ предложения и токена. Поэтому мы исследуем, в какой степени составляющие могут быть заменены универсальными зависимостями или полностью исключены, а также, как работают современные сегменты при отсутствии границ предложения. Наши результаты показывают, что информация о зависимостях менее полезна, чем ожидалось, но мы предоставляем полностью масштабируемую, надежную модель, которая полагается только на информацию о части речи, и показывают, что она хорошо работает в разных языках при отсутствии каких-либо аннотаций золотого стандарта.', 'zh': '语分者,构语解析器之首也。 大抵言分之事,皆不能及跨语言世界语解析,有二:(i)依于成树,及(ii)实验依于句令牌界黄金。 故考之于多大程度,可以遍依赖性易省略分,及于无句界最先进之细分器。 吾之的结果表明,恃信不如有用,而吾资一足以广之,壮者赖词性息,明其跨辞善于无金也。', 'hi': 'प्रवचन विभाजन प्रवचन पार्सर के निर्माण में पहला कदम है। प्रवचन विभाजन पर अधिकांश काम दो कारणों से भाषाओं में पार्सिंग वास्तविक दुनिया के प्रवचन के लिए स्केल नहीं करता है: (i) मॉडल घटक पेड़ों पर भरोसा करते हैं, और (ii) प्रयोगों ने वाक्य और टोकन सीमाओं की सोने के मानक पहचान पर भरोसा किया है। इसलिए हम जांच करते हैं कि किस हद तक घटकों को सार्वभौमिक निर्भरताओं के साथ प्रतिस्थापित किया जा सकता है, या पूरी तरह से छोड़ दिया जा सकता है, साथ ही साथ वाक्य सीमाओं की अनुपस्थिति में अत्याधुनिक सेगमेंटर्स कैसे किराया करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि निर्भरता जानकारी अपेक्षा से कम उपयोगी है, लेकिन हम एक पूरी तरह से स्केलेबल, मजबूत मॉडल प्रदान करते हैं जो केवल आंशिक रूप से भाषण जानकारी पर निर्भर करता है, और दिखाता है कि यह किसी भी स्वर्ण-मानक एनोटेशन की अनुपस्थिति में भाषाओं में अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Is é deighilt dioscúrsa an chéad chéim chun parsálaithe dioscúrsa a thógáil. Ní bhaineann an chuid is mó den obair ar dheighilt dioscúrsa le parsáil dioscúrsa an fhíorshaoil thar theangacha, ar dhá chúis: (i) bíonn samhlacha ag brath ar chomhchrainn, agus (ii) bhí turgnaimh ag brath ar shainaithint caighdeán óir teorainneacha abairtí agus comharthaí. Fiosróimid, mar sin, cé chomh mór agus is féidir spleáchais uilíocha a chur in ionad comhábhair, nó iad a fhágáil amach go hiomlán, chomh maith le conas a éiríonn le deighleálaithe úrscothacha in éagmais teorainneacha pianbhreithe. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí nach bhfuil an fhaisnéis spleáchais chomh húsáideach ná a rabhthas ag súil leis, ach cuirimid múnla láidir inscálaithe ar fáil a bhraitheann ar eolas cuid de chaint amháin, agus a thaispeánann go bhfeidhmíonn sé go maith trasna teangacha in éagmais nótaí órchaighdeán.', 'ka': 'დისკურსი სეგუმენტირება არის პირველი ნაწილი დისკურსი პანსერების შექმნაში. ბევრი სამუშაო დისკურსების სექმენტაციაზე მუშაო სამყარო დისკურსების პარასუზაციაში არ გახდება, ორი მიზეზებისთვის: i) მოდელები დარწმუნდება კონსტენტიური ხელებზე, და ii) ექსპერიმენ ამიტომ ჩვენ შევხედავთ, რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებელები შეიძლება გადაცვლა უნიველური განსაზღვრებელებით, ან ყველაფერად გადარჩენა, და რამდენიმე განსაზღვრებელების განსაზღვრებელების განსაზღვრე ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ჩვენი ინფორმაცია უფრო მხოლოდ გამოსახულებელია, მაგრამ ჩვენ უფრო სკეალურად, ძალიან მოდელია, რომელიც მხოლოდ საუკეთესო ინფორმაციის ნაწილად დაახლოდება და გამოჩვენება, რომ', 'el': 'Η κατακερματισμός λόγου είναι το πρώτο βήμα για την κατασκευή αναλύσεων λόγου. Οι περισσότερες εργασίες σχετικά με την κατάτμηση του λόγου δεν κλιμακώνονται στην ανάλυση του λόγου στον πραγματικό κόσμο μεταξύ των γλωσσών, για δύο λόγους: (i) τα μοντέλα βασίζονται σε συστατικά δέντρα, και (ii) τα πειράματα έχουν βασιστεί στο χρυσό πρότυπο ταυτοποίησης των ορίων των προτάσεων και των σημάτων. Ερευνούμε λοιπόν σε ποιο βαθμό τα συστατικά μπορούν να αντικατασταθούν με καθολικές εξαρτήσεις, ή να παραλειφθούν εντελώς, καθώς και πώς τα πάνε τα σύγχρονα τμήματα ελλείψει ορίων προτάσεων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι οι πληροφορίες εξάρτησης είναι λιγότερο χρήσιμες από ό,τι αναμενόταν, αλλά παρέχουμε ένα πλήρως κλιμακωτό, ισχυρό μοντέλο που βασίζεται μόνο σε πληροφορίες μερικής ομιλίας και δείχνει ότι αποδίδει καλά σε όλες τις γλώσσες, ελλείψει οποιουδήποτε χρυσού προτύπου σχολιασμού.', 'it': "La segmentazione del discorso è il primo passo nella costruzione di parser del discorso. La maggior parte dei lavori sulla segmentazione del discorso non si scala all'analisi del discorso nel mondo reale attraverso le lingue, per due ragioni: (i) i modelli si basano su alberi costituenti, e (ii) gli esperimenti si sono basati sull'identificazione gold standard delle frasi e dei confini dei token. Esaminiamo quindi fino a che punto i costituenti possono essere sostituiti con dipendenze universali, o completamente esclusi, così come se la cavano i segmentatori all'avanguardia in assenza di confini di frase. I nostri risultati mostrano che le informazioni sulla dipendenza sono meno utili del previsto, ma forniamo un modello completamente scalabile e robusto che si basa solo su informazioni part-of-speech e mostrano che funzionano bene in tutte le lingue in assenza di annotazioni gold-standard.", 'hu': 'A diskurzus szegment찼ci처 az els흷 l챕p챕s a diskurzus elemz흷k kialak챠t찼s찼ban. A diskurzusszegment찼ci처val kapcsolatos munka t철bbs챕ge nem a val처s vil찼gbeli diskurzus-elemz챕sre terjed ki a nyelveken, k챕t okb처l: (i) a modellek alkot처f찼kra t찼maszkodnak, 챕s (ii) a k챠s챕rletek a mondatok 챕s a jelk챕pes hat찼rok aranyszab찼s첬 azonos챠t찼s찼ra t찼maszkodtak. Ez챕rt azt vizsg찼ljuk, hogy az alkot처elemek milyen m챕rt챕kben helyettes챠thet흷k univerz찼lis f체gg흷s챕gekkel, vagy teljesen kihagyhat처k, valamint hogyan viselkednek a korszer킥 szegment찼l처k mondatkorl찼tok hi찼ny찼ban. Eredm챕nyeink azt mutatj찼k, hogy a f체gg흷s챕gi inform찼ci처k kev챕sb챕 hasznosak a v찼rtn찼l, de egy teljesen sk찼l찼zhat처, robusztus modellt k챠n찼lunk, amely csak a besz챕dr챕szes inform찼ci처kra t찼maszkodik, 챕s azt mutatja, hogy j처l teljes챠t a nyelvek k철z철tt aranyszab찼s첬 jegyzetek hi찼ny찼ban.', 'lt': 'Diskurso segmentavimas yra pirmasis diskurso analizatorių kūrimo žingsnis. Dauguma diskurso segmentacijos darbų netaikoma realiajam diskurso analizavimui įvairiose kalbose dėl dviejų priežasči ų: i) modeliai grindžiami sudedamosiomis medžiais ir ii) eksperimentai grindžiami standartiniu žodžių ir žymenų nustatymu auksu. We therefore investigate to what extent constituents can be replaced with universal dependencies, or left out completely, as well as how state-of-the-art segmenters fare in the absence of sentence boundaries.  Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad informacija apie priklausomybę yra mažiau naudinga nei tikėtasi, tačiau mes pateikiame visiškai skaliuojamą ir patikimą model į, kuris grindžiamas tik kalbos dalimi ir rodo, kad ji veikia gerai įvairiose kalbose, jei nėra jokių aukso standartinių anotacijų.', 'ms': 'Segmen diskursus adalah langkah pertama dalam membina penghurai diskursus. Kebanyakan pekerjaan pada segmen diskors tidak memasukkan ke penghuraian diskors dunia nyata melalui bahasa, untuk dua alasan: (i) model bergantung pada pokok-pokok konstitusi, dan (ii) eksperimen bergantung pada pengenalan piawai emas kalimat dan sempadan token. Oleh itu, kami menyelidiki seberapa banyak komponen boleh diganti dengan dependensi universal, atau dibuang sepenuhnya, serta bagaimana segmen state-of-the-art berjalan dalam ketiadaan sempadan kalimat. Keputusan kami menunjukkan bahawa maklumat dependensi lebih berguna daripada yang dijangka, tetapi kami menyediakan model yang boleh skala sepenuhnya, kuat yang hanya bergantung pada maklumat sebahagian-dari-ucapan, dan menunjukkan bahawa ia berfungsi dengan baik di seluruh bahasa tanpa sebarang anotasi piawai emas.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ആദ്യ പടിയാണ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നത്. സംസാരം സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും ലോകത്തെ സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിലേക്ക് പാടില്ല. രണ്ടു കാരണങ്ങളാല്\u200d: (i) മോഡലുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് പ്രപഞ്ചത്തിലെ ആശ്രയിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും ഉപേക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, ശിക്ഷയുടെ അതിരുകളില്\u200d ഇല് പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നില്ലെന്ന് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ സ്വര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Is-segmentazzjoni tad-diskors hija l-ewwel pass fil-bini tal-analizzaturi tad-diskors. Il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol fuq is-segmentazzjoni tad-diskors ma jaqbiżx l-analiżi tad-diskors fid-dinja reali bejn il-lingwi, għal żewġ raġunijiet: (i) il-mudelli jiddependu fuq siġar kostitwenti, u (ii) l-esperimenti jiddependu fuq l-identifikazzjoni standard tad-deheb tas-sentenzi u l-limiti tat-tokens. Għalhekk ninvestigaw sa liema punt il-kostitwenti jistgħu jiġu sostitwiti b’dipendenzi universali, jew jitħallew barra kompletament, kif ukoll kif is-segmentaturi l-aktar avvanzati jimxu fl-assenza ta’ limiti tas-sentenza. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-informazzjoni dwar id-dipendenza hija anqas utli milli mistennija, iżda nagħtu mudell sħiħ li jista’ jiġi skalat u robust li jiddependi biss fuq informazzjoni ta’ parti mid-diskors, u nagħtu prova li tagħmel tajjeb fil-lingwi fin-nuqqas ta’ kwalunkwe annotazzjoni standard tad-deheb.', 'mk': 'Сегментацијата на дискурсот е првиот чекор во изградбата на дискурсни анализатори. Повеќето од работите на дискурсната сегментација не се размеруваат на реалниот свет на дискурсна анализа низ јазиците, од две причини: (i) моделите се потпираат на конституционалните дрвја, и (ii) експериментите се потпираат на златна стандардна идентификација на речениците и границите Затоа истражуваме во каков степен може да се замени конститутите со универзални зависности, или да се остави целосно надвор, како и како се однесуваат најсовремените сегментери во отсуството на граници на речениците. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека информациите за зависност се помалку корисни отколку што се очекуваше, но ние обезбедуваме целосно скалиран, силен модел кој се потпира само на дел од информациите за говорот, и покажуваат дека тие функционираат добро низ јазиците во отсуство на било која златна стандардна', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн хэвлэл бол ярианы хэвлэлчид бүтээх анхны алхам юм. Ихэнх нь ярианы загварын талаар ажиллаж байгаа зүйл нь бодит ертөнцийн яриаг хэл дээр хуваалцах хоёр шалтгаанаас хуваалцахгүй: i) загвар нь загварын мод дээр байдаг. ii) туршилтууд өгүүлбэр болон тэмдэглэх хязгаарын алт стандарт тодорхойлдог. Иймээс бид ертөнцийн хамааралтай байдлыг хэр хэмжээнд орлуулж, эсвэл бүрэн үлдээж, урлагийн хэмжээний хэмжээний загваруудыг өгүүлбэр хязгаарлагдахгүй байх үед хэр үргэлжлүүлж чадах вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Бидний үр дүнд хамааралтай мэдээлэл хүлээж байгаагаас бага хэрэгтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бид зөвхөн ярианы хэсгийн мэдээлэл дээр хамааралтай, хүчтэй загвар өгдөг. Алтан стандарт нотолгоо байхгүй байх үед хэл дээр сайн ажилладаг.', 'ro': 'Segmentarea discursului este primul pas în construirea parserelor discursului. Cele mai multe lucrări privind segmentarea discursului nu se extind la analizarea discursului în lumea reală în limbi, din două motive: (i) modelele se bazează pe copaci constituenți și (ii) experimentele s-au bazat pe identificarea standard auriu a frazelor și limitelor simbolice. Prin urmare, investigăm în ce măsură constituenții pot fi înlocuiți cu dependențe universale sau lăsați complet afară, precum și cum se descurcă segmentatorii de ultimă generație în absența limitelor propozițiilor. Rezultatele noastre arată că informațiile despre dependență sunt mai puțin utile decât ne așteptam, dar oferim un model complet scalabil, robust, care se bazează doar pe informații parțiale de vorbire și arată că performează bine în toate limbile în absența oricărei adnotări standard aur.', 'pl': 'Segmentacja dyskursu jest pierwszym krokiem w budowaniu parserów dyskursu. Większość prac nad segmentacją dyskursu nie skaluje się do analizy dyskursu w świecie rzeczywistym między językami, z dwóch powodów: (i) modele opierają się na drzewach składowych, a (ii) eksperymenty opierały się na złotym standardzie identyfikacji granic zdań i tokenów. W związku z tym badamy, w jakim stopniu składniki można zastąpić uniwersalnymi zależnościami lub całkowicie pominąć, a także jak radzą sobie nowoczesne segmenty w przypadku braku granic zdań. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że informacje o zależności są mniej użyteczne niż oczekiwano, ale dostarczamy w pełni skalowalny, solidny model, który opiera się tylko na informacjach o części mowy i pokazuje, że działa dobrze we wszystkich językach przy braku jakiejkolwiek adnotacji standardowej.', 'si': 'කතාව නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පැත්තක්. භාෂාවක් වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ කරන්න බැරි විශේෂ විශේෂ කරන්නේ භාෂාවක් වලින් භාෂාවක් වලින්, හේතු අපි ඉතින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොච්චර විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල විශාල වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, නැත්තම් සම්පූර අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ විශ්වාස තොරතුරු බලාපොරොත්තු වඩා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැහැ, නමුත් අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, සාම', 'so': "Heshiiska arrintu waa marka ugu horeysa baaritaanka hadalka. Shaqo badan oo ku saabsan qeybaha hadalka caalamiga ah ma kala duwan karto hadalka caalamiga ah oo ku hadla afafka oo dhan, labo sabab dartood: (i) modellada waxay ku tiirsan yihiin geedaha guud, oo (ii) jirrabaadyada waxay ku kalsoonaadaan aqoonsiga qoriga ah ee caadiga ah iyo xuduudaha calaamada. Sidaa darteed waxaynu baaraynaa in qofka dooranaya lagu beddeli karo xiriirka caalamiga ah, ama in ay dhammaan ka bixi karto, iyo sidoo kale sida ay xaaladda farshaxanku ugu socon karaan xuduudaha xafiiska. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in macluumaadka ku xiran ee la rajaynayo ay faa'iido ka yar tahay wixii la rajaynayo, laakiin waxaynu siinaynaa model aad u sahlan, oo isku halleeya macluumaad ku saabsan hadalka, waxaana muujinaynaa in uu si wanaagsan ugu shaqeeyo luuqadaha oo dhan iyadoon la jirin wax caadi ah oo kale oo caadi ah oo dahab ah.", 'sv': 'Diskurssegmentering är det första steget i att bygga diskurstolkare. De flesta arbeten med diskurssegmentering skalas inte till verklig diskurstolkning över språk, av två skäl: (i) modeller förlitar sig på konstituerande träd, och (ii) experiment har förlitat sig på guldstandard identifiering av meningar och symboliska gränser. Vi undersöker därför i vilken utsträckning beståndsdelar kan ersättas med universella beroenden, eller helt utelämnas, samt hur toppmoderna segmenterare klarar sig i avsaknad av meningsgränser. Våra resultat visar att beroendeinformation är mindre användbar än förväntat, men vi tillhandahåller en fullt skalbar, robust modell som bara förlitar sig på deltal information, och visar att den presterar bra över språk i avsaknad av guldstandard anteckningar.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av segmentasjon er den første stegen i bygging av diskursanalsar. Dei fleste arbeida på diskurssegmentasjonen skalerer ikkje til rekkelige verdsdiskursar med tolking på språk, for to grunner: i) modeller rely on constituent trees, and ii) experiments have relied on gold standard identification of sentence and token boundaries. Vi undersøker derfor kva storleik konstitusjonane kan erstattast med universelle avhengighet, eller forlatt ut helt, og korleis tilstanden av kunstsegmenterer går i uttrykket av setningsgrensene. Resultatet våre viser at avhengighetsinformasjon er mindre nyttig enn forventa, men vi gir ein fullstendig, sterkt modell som berre dependerer på ein del av taleinformasjon, og viser at det utfører godt på språk i absence av eit gullstandard annotasjon.', 'ta': 'பேச்சு பார்சர்களை உருவாக்கும் முதல் படியாகும். பேச்சு பிரிவில் பெரும்பாலான வேலை உண்மையான உலக பேச்சு மொழிகளுக்கு அளவிடாது, இரண்டு காரணங்களாக:(i) மாதிரிகள் உறுப்பினர் மரங்கள் மீது நம்பிக்கை கொள்கிறது,  ஆகையால் நாம் தேர்வு செய்ய வேண்டும் பொதுவான சார்பு அல்லது முழுமையாக விட்டு மாற்றப்பட முடியும், மற்றும் வாக்கு எல்லைகள் இல்லாமல் நிலையில் கல நம் முடிவு', 'kk': 'Дискурс сегментациясы - дискурс талдаушыларының бірінші қадамы. Дискурстардың сегментациясының көпшілігі тілдерді талдау үшін шын әлемдегі дискурстардың талдауына көмектеспейді. Екі себептен: (i) моделдері соңғы ағаштарда тұрады, және ii) эксперименттер сұлбаны мен таңдау шектерінің Сондықтан біз бөлімдердің қанша көмегімен әлемдік тәуелдіктермен, немесе толық тәуелдіктермен, және сұлбаның шектері жоқ болғанда, әлемдік сегменттердің қанша күйінде қалай тәуелді. Біздің нәтижелеріміз тәуелдік мәліметі күтпегеннен аз пайдалы дегенді көрсетеді, бірақ біз толық масштабтау үлгісін келтіреміз. Бұл тек сөйлеу мәліметіне тәуелді, ол алтын стандартты жаңалықтарды жо', 'sr': 'Segmentacija diskursa je prvi korak u izgradnji diskursnih parsera. Većina radova na segmentaciji diskursa ne skala se na razmatranje rečnog svijeta na razmatranje jezika, iz dva razloga: i) modeli se oslanjaju na sastavne drveće, i ii) eksperimenti se oslanjaju na zlatnu standardnu identifikaciju rečenice i granice znakova. Stoga istražujemo u kolikoj mjeri komponenti mogu biti zamijenjeni univerzalnim ovisnostima ili potpuno ostavljeni, kao i kako državni segmenteri umjetnosti idu u odsustvu granica kazne. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su informacije o zavisnosti manje korisne od očekivanih, ali pružamo potpuno skalabilan, roban model koji se oslanja samo na informacije o dijelom govora i pokazuje da dobro izvodi na jezicima u odsustvu bilo kojeg zlatnog standardnog annotacije.', 'ur': 'صحیح سپٹمنٹ کی بنانے میں پہلی قدم ہے. اکثر گفتگو سقمیٹ پر کام نہیں کرتا حقیقی دنیا کی گفتگو کو زبانوں سے پارس کرنے کے لئے، دو دلیل کے سبب سے: لہٰذا ہم تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح معاملات کی جگہ واحد اعتباری کے ساتھ بدل سکتے ہیں یا پوری طرح باہر چھوڑ دیتے ہیں، اور یہ کہ مجلس حدوں کے بغیر معاملات کی جگہ کے معاملات کے معاملات کے معاملات کے معاملات میں کس طرح ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ اعتماد کی اطلاعات انتظار سے کم فائدہ ہے، لیکن ہم ایک کامل مہربان، مضبوط مدل دیتے ہیں جو صرف بات کی اطلاعات پر اعتماد کرتا ہے، اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ زبانوں میں بہت اچھی طرح عمل کرتا ہے، سونے کی استاندارڈ اظہار نہیں ہوتی', 'uz': "Birinchi darajada, talab parserlarni yaratish uchun birinchi qadam. Ko'pchilik suhbatlarda haqiqiqiy dunyo tilida gapiradigan so'zlar tartib kelmaydi, ikki sabablar sababi uchun: (i) modellar taqdim daraxtlarga ishlatadi ва (ii) ta'lim soʻzlari va teg chegaralariga gullning andoza aniqlashga ishonadi. Шундай қилиб, биз сайловчилар умумий таваккалларга ўзгартириш ёки бутунлай ажратиб чиқиш мумкин, ва ҳукумат чегаралари мавжуд ҳосил ҳосиллари ҳозиргача ҳукумат параметрларни кўриб турамиз. Mana natijalarimiz kutilgan, ishonch haqida qo'shimcha maʼlumot juda foydali emas, lekin biz faqat gapirish haqida ishlatadigan hamma gapir maʼlumotga ishlatadigan hamma tillarga ishonch hosil qilyapmiz, va bu o'zlarning davomida gold-standard taʼminot yoʻq maʼlumotga bajarishini ko'rsa", 'vi': 'Chuỗi phân loại Discourse là bước đầu tiên của các nhà phân tích xây dựng. Hầu hết các công việc phân chia thuyết trình không dựa trên thuyết trình phân tách các ngôn ngữ trên thế giới thực, vì hai lý do: Điều tra xem các thành phần có thể bị thay thế bởi các tình huống phổ biến, hoặc bị bỏ rơi hoàn to àn, cũng như các phân biệt thời trang có thể đạt được cách nào khi không có ranh giới hạn bản án. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy thông tin phụ thuộc là ít có ích hơn dự kiến, nhưng chúng tôi cung cấp một mô hình đầy đủ đáng sợ, vững chắc mà chỉ dựa trên thông tin thường, và cho thấy nó hoạt động được xuyên qua các ngôn ngữ mà không có ghi chú chuẩn bằng vàng.', 'da': 'Diskurssegmentering er det første skridt i opbygningen af diskursfortolkere. De fleste arbejder med diskurssegmentering skalerer ikke til den virkelige diskurs parsing på tværs af sprog, af to grunde: (i) modeller er afhængige af konstituerende træer, og (ii) eksperimenter har baseret sig på guldstandard identifikation af sætning og symbolske grænser. Vi undersøger derfor, i hvilket omfang vælgere kan erstattes med universelle afhængigheder, eller udelades helt, samt hvordan state-of-the-art segmentere klarer sig uden sætningsgrænser. Vores resultater viser, at afhængighedsoplysninger er mindre nyttige end forventet, men vi leverer en fuldt skalerbar, robust model, der kun er afhængig af dele af tale oplysninger, og viser, at de fungerer godt på tværs af sprog uden nogen guldstandard annotation.', 'nl': 'Discurse segmentatie is de eerste stap in het bouwen van discours parsers. Het meeste werk over discourssegmentatie schaalt niet op naar het echte discoursparsen tussen talen, om twee redenen: (i) modellen vertrouwen op constitutionele bomen, en (ii) experimenten zijn gebaseerd op gouden standaard identificatie van zin- en tokengrenzen. We onderzoeken daarom in hoeverre componenten kunnen worden vervangen door universele afhankelijkheden, of volledig weggelaten, en hoe state-of-the-art segmenters het doen zonder zinnengrenzen. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat afhankelijkheidsinformatie minder nuttig is dan verwacht, maar we bieden een volledig schaalbaar, robuust model dat alleen gebaseerd is op informatie over delen van spraak, en laten zien dat het goed presteert in alle talen zonder enige gouden standaard annotatie.', 'hr': 'Segmentacija diskursa je prvi korak u izgradnji razmatrača diskursa. Većina radova na segmentaciji diskursa ne mjeri se na razmatranje diskursa u stvarnom svijetu na razmatranje jezika, iz dva razloga: i) modeli se oslanjaju na određene drveće, a ii) eksperimenti se oslanjaju na standardnu identifikaciju kazne i granice znakova zlata. Stoga istražujemo u kolikoj mjeri komponenti mogu zamijeniti univerzalnim ovisnostima ili potpuno ostaviti, kao i kako državni segmenteri umjetnosti idu u odsustvu granica kazne. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su informacije o zavisnosti manje korisne od očekivanih, ali pružamo potpuno skalabilan, roban model koji se oslanja samo na informacije o dijelom govora i pokazuje da dobro izvodi na jezicima u odsustvu bilo kojeg zlatnog standardnog annotacije.', 'de': 'Diskurssegmentierung ist der erste Schritt beim Aufbau von Diskursparsern. Die meisten Arbeiten zur Diskurssegmentierung skalieren nicht auf reale Diskursparsen über Sprachen, aus zwei Gründen: (i) Modelle basieren auf konstituierenden Bäumen und (ii) Experimente basieren auf Goldstandard-Identifikation von Satz- und Tokengrenzen. Wir untersuchen daher, inwieweit Bestandteile durch universelle Abhängigkeiten ersetzt oder komplett ausgelassen werden können, sowie wie moderne Segmenter ohne Satzgrenzen zurechtkommen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Abhängigkeitsinformationen weniger nützlich sind als erwartet, aber wir stellen ein vollständig skalierbares, robustes Modell zur Verfügung, das sich nur auf Sprachteilinformationen stützt und zeigen, dass sie in allen Sprachen ohne Goldstandard-Anmerkungen gut funktionieren.', 'fa': 'قطعه\u200cبندی صحبت اولین قدم در ساختن بازرسان صحبت است. بیشتر کارهای روی جدایی سخنرانی به گفتگوهای دنیای واقعی برای جدایی کردن زبانها مقیاس نمی\u200cکند، به دلیل دو دلیل: (i) مدلها بر درختان محیط استفاده می\u200cکنند و (ii) آزمایشات بر شناسایی استاندارد طلا از جمله\u200cها و مرزهای معجزه\u200cها اعتماد دارند. بنابراین ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که چقدر محدودیت می\u200cتوانند با بستگی جهانی جایگزین شوند، یا کاملاً بیرون روند، و چگونه محدودیت هنری در غیر محدودیت مجازات می\u200cشوند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که اطلاعات بستگی کمتر از انتظار داشته است، ولی ما یک مدل کاملا قابل مقیاس و استوار را می\u200cدهیم که تنها بر اطلاعات قسمتی سخنرانی بستگی می\u200cکند، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که در غیر از هر نویسند طلا استاندارد خوب انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'bg': 'Сегментацията на дискурса е първата стъпка в изграждането на дискурсни анализатори. Повечето работи по сегментацията на дискурса не се мащабират до анализиране на дискурса в реалния свят по две причини: (i) моделите разчитат на съставни дървета, и (ii) експериментите разчитат на златен стандарт идентифициране на границите на изреченията и символите. Затова изследваме до каква степен съставните елементи могат да бъдат заменени с универсални зависимости или напълно изоставени, както и как съвременните сегментиращи се справят при липса на граници на изреченията. Нашите резултати показват, че информацията за зависимостта е по-малко полезна от очакваното, но ние предоставяме напълно мащабируем, здрав модел, който разчита само на информация за част от речта и показва, че той се представя добре в различните езици при липса на анотация със златен стандарт.', 'ko': '문장 절분은 문장 분석기를 구축하는 첫걸음이다.대부분의 문장 구분에 대한 연구가 언어를 뛰어넘는 진실한 문장 분석으로 확대되지 않은 이유는 두 가지가 있다. (i)모델은 성분 트리에 의존하고 (ii)실험은 문장과 경계를 표시하는 금표준 식별에 의존한다.따라서 우리는 성분이 어느 정도에 보편적으로 의존하여 대체되거나 완전히 무시될 수 있는지, 그리고 문장의 경계가 없는 상황에서 가장 선진적인 분사기가 어떻게 작동하는지 연구한다.우리의 결과는 정보에 의존하는 것이 예상보다 유용하지 않다는 것을 보여 주지만, 우리는 완전히 확장되고 건장한 모델을 제공했다. 이 모델은 단어적 정보에만 의존하고, 어떠한 금표준 주석도 없는 상황에서 크로스 언어에서 양호하게 나타난다.', 'sw': 'Kupambana na mazungumzo ni hatua ya kwanza katika kujenga wabunge wa mazungumzo. Most work on discourse segmentation does not scale to real-world discourse parsing across languages, for two reasons: (i) models rely on constituent trees, and (ii) experiments have relied on gold standard identification of sentence and token boundaries.  Kwa hiyo tunachunguza kwa kiasi gani wapiga kura wanaweza kubadilishwa kwa matumaini ya ulimwengu, au kuondoka kabisa, pamoja na namna ambavyo wanachama wa sanaa wanavyobadilika bila mipaka ya hukumu. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa taarifa za kutegemea hazina manufaa zaidi ya kutarajiwa, lakini tunatoa mtindo mzuri wa kuchochea, unaotegemea tu sehemu ya taarifa za hotuba, na kuonyesha kwamba inafanya vizuri katika lugha mbalimbali bila matatizo yoyote ya kawaida ya dhahabu.', 'af': "Skakel segmentasie is die eerste stap in bou diskursie verwerkers. Die meeste werk op diskursie segmentasie skaal nie na reël-wêreld diskursie verwerking oor tale nie, vir twee rede: (i) modele vertrou op konstituent bome, en (ii) eksperimente het op goud standaard identifikasie van seting en token grense gelê. Ons dan ondersoek na watter uitbreidingskonstituents kan vervang word met universele afhanklikhede, of heeltemal verlaat word, en hoe staat-van-kuns-segmenters verwag in die absence van setgrense. Ons resultate wys dat afhanklikheid inligting minder nuttig is as verwagte, maar ons verskaf 'n volledige skalerbare, robust model wat slegs op deel van spraak inligting verlig en wys dat dit goed uitvoer oor tale in die absence van enige goud-standaard annotasie.", 'tr': 'Diskusiýa tanyşçylary gurmakda ilkinji adım. Diskusiýa segmentasynda köp i ş dünýäde diller arasynda parslemek üçin deňlemeýär. 2 sebäpden üçin: (i) nusgalar konstituent agaçlara ynanýarlar, we (ii) deneyler sözleriň we token çyzygynyň standartdan tapylmagyna ynanýarlar. Şol sebäpli biz esaslaşdyrýarys, uniwersal baglançlyk bilen nähili möhüm bilen üýtgedilip, ýöne doly çykyp gitmelidiris, sanat segmentleriniň durumynyň sözleşmeleri ýok bolmadykda nähili üýtgediklerini soradyk. Biziň netijelerimiz garaşylyk maglumatyň garaşylykdan azajyk ýok bolandygyny görkezýär, ýöne biz diňe güýçli, güýçli bir nusga berip, diňe sözleriniň bir bölümine güýçli we dilleriň ýok bolmadygyny görkez.', 'sq': 'Discourse segmentation is the first step in building discourse parsers.  Shumica e punës në segmentimin e diskursit nuk shkallohet në analizimin e diskursit në botën reale nëpërmjet gjuhëve për dy arsye: (i) modelet mbështeten në pemët përbërëse dhe (ii) eksperimentet mbështeten në identifikimin standard të artë të fjalëve dhe kufijve të shenjave. Kështu ne hetojmë në se sa gradë përbërësit mund të zëvendësohen me varësitë universale, ose të lënë jashtë krejtësisht, si dhe se si segmentuesit më të lartë shkojnë në mungesë të kufijve të dënimit. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se informacioni i varësisë është më pak i dobishëm sesa pritet, por ne ofrojmë një model plotësisht të shkallëzuar, të fortë që mbështetet vetëm në informacionin pjesë të fjalimit dhe tregon se ajo funksionon mirë nëpër gjuhë në mungesë të ndonjë anotacioni të standartit të artë.', 'id': 'Discourse segmentation is the first step in building discourse parsers.  Kebanyakan pekerjaan pada segmentasi diskors tidak berkembang ke diskors dunia nyata menghurai berbagai bahasa, untuk dua alasan: (i) model bergantung pada pohon konstitusi, dan (ii) eksperimen bergantung pada identifikasi standar emas kalimat dan batas token. Oleh karena itu, kami menyelidiki seberapa besar kostituen dapat diganti dengan dependensi universal, atau benar-benar dilupakan, serta bagaimana segmenter state-of-the-art berjalan tanpa batas kalimat. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa informasi ketergantuan kurang berguna dari yang diharapkan, tapi kami menyediakan model yang dapat dipercaya dan kuat yang hanya bergantung pada informasi bagian dari kata-kata, dan menunjukkan bahwa ia bekerja dengan baik di berbagai bahasa tanpa anotasi standar emas.', 'hy': 'Discourse segmentation is the first step in building discourse parsers.  Իսկ խոսակցության սեգմետրացիայի վրա աշխատանքի մեծ մասը չի ընդլայնվում իրական աշխարհի խոսակցությանը լեզուների միջև, երկու պատճառով. i) մոդելները հիմնված են ընդհանուր ծառերի վրա, և II) փորձերը հիմնված են արտահայտության և նշանի սահմանների ոսկու ստանդարտ ճա Հետևաբար մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով կարող ենք բաղադրիչները փոխարինվել համընդհանուր կախվածությամբ, կամ ամբողջովին դուրս մնալ, ինչպես են ամենաբարձր սեգմերները աշխատում նախադասության սահմանների բացակայության դեպքում: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ կախվածության ինֆորմացիան ավելի քիչ օգտակար է, քան ակնկալվում է, բայց մենք ապահովում ենք լիովին ընդլայնելի, ուժեղ մոդել, որը հիմնված է միայն խոսքի մասի ինֆորմացիայի վրա և ցույց է տալիս, որ այն լավ է աշխատում լեզուների միջև, երբ ոսկու', 'bn': 'কথোপকথন পার্সার বানানোর প্রথম পদক্ষেপ। বেশীরভাগ কথোপকথনের বিভিন্ন ভাষায় কথোপকথন পাওয়া যায় না, দুই কারণে: (i) মডেল সংস্থার বৃক্ষের উপর নির্ভর করে এবং (ii) পরীক্ষার উপর সোনার স্বাভাবিক সীমান্ত পরিচয় এবং  তাই আমরা বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভরশীল দ্বারা প্রতিস্থাপন করতে পারি, অথবা পুরোপুরি বাইরে যেতে পারি, এবং শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি কি ভাবে শাস্তির সীমানার অভ আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রত্যাশিত তথ্যের চেয়ে নির্ভরিত তথ্য কম, কিন্তু আমরা একটি পুরোপুরি স্ক্যালেবাল, রোবস্ট মডেল প্রদান করি যা কেবল ভাষণের তথ্যের', 'bs': 'Segmentacija diskursa je prvi korak u izgradnji razmatrača diskursa. Većina radova na segmentaciji diskusija ne skala se na razmatranje diskusija u stvarnom svijetu na razmatranje jezika, iz dva razloga: i) modeli se oslanjaju na određene drveće, i ii) eksperimenti se oslanjaju na standardnu identifikaciju kazne i granice znakova zlata. Stoga istražujemo u kolikoj mjeri komponenti mogu zamijeniti univerzalnim ovisnostima ili potpuno ostaviti, kao i kako državni segmenteri umjetnosti idu u odsustvu granica kazne. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su informacije o zavisnosti manje korisne od očekivanih, ali pružamo potpuno skalabilan, roban model koji se oslanja samo na informacije o dijelom govora i pokazuje da dobro izvodi na jezicima u odsustvu bilo kojeg zlatnog standardnog annotacije.', 'am': 'የውይይት ግንኙነት የመጀመሪያ ደረጃ ነው፡፡ ብዙዎቹ በንግግር ክፍል ላይ የሚሠራ የዓለም ንግግር ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ለመቀላቀል አይደረግም፤ ከሁለት ምክንያት:(i) ምሳሌዎች በተካፈሉት ዛፎች ላይ ይታመናሉ (ii) ፈተናዎችም የፍርድ ድጋፍ እና ምልክት ዳርቻ ላይ የወርቅ ድምፅ ማረጋገጥ ታምረዋል፡፡ ስለዚህ ብሔራዊ ተሟጋቾች በዓለማዊ ተሟጋቾች እንዴት እንደምትለውጡ ወይም ሙሉ እንዲወጡ እና ከፍርድ ድንበር ውስጥም እንዴት እንደተቃወሙ የምንመረምር ነው፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን በተስፋት የሚታመኑት መረጃዎች ከተስፋ አይጠቅሙም፣ ነገር ግን በአካባቢው የንግግር መረጃ ብቻ የሚታመነ እና በወርቅ-standard ማስታወቂያ ሳይኖር በቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ጥሩ እንዲያደርግ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'ca': "La segmentació del discurs és el primer pas en construir analitzadors de discurs. La majoria de la feina en la segmentació del discurs no s'escala a l'analització del discurs en el món real a través de les llengües, per dues raons: (i) els models es basan en arbres constituents, i (ii) els experiments s s'han basat en la identificació d'or standard de les frases i límits de fitxes. Per tant investigam fins a quin punt els constituents poden ser substituïts per dependencies universals, o deixats fora completament, i com són els segmentadors d'última generació sense fronteres de frases. Els nostres resultats demostren que la informació sobre la dependència és menys útil del que s'esperava, però proporcionem un model totalment escalable i robust que només confia en una part de la informació de la xerrada, i demostren que funciona bé a través de llengües sense anotació d'or.", 'az': 'Söhbət segmentasyonu ilk adımdır. Söhbətlər segmentasiyasında çox i şlər həqiqət dünya dillərinin ayırılmasına tərəf çəkməz, iki səbəbi ilə: i) modellər müəyyən ağaclara təvəkkül edir, ii) sınaqlar sözlərin və token sınırlarının altın standart tanımasına təvəkkül edir. Buna görə də müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müddətlərlə əvəz ediləcək və ya tamamilə tərk ediləcək müəyyən müəyyən müddətlərə, həmçin in müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müddətlərinin müəyyən edilməsində Sonuçlarımız təvəkküllük məlumatının gözlədiyindən daha az faydalı olduğunu göstərir, amma biz tamamilə ölçülük, qüvvətli bir modeli təmin edirik ki, yalnız söz məlumatının bir parçasına təvəkkül edir və hər bir qızıl-standart məlumatı yoxduğunda dillərdə çox yaxşı işlər edir.', 'cs': 'Segmentace diskurzů je prvním krokem při budování diskurzních parserů. Většina práce na segmentaci diskursu se neměří na analýzu diskursu v reálném světě napříč jazyky, a to ze dvou důvodů: (i) modely spoléhají na součástečné stromy a (ii) experimenty se spoléhaly na zlatý standard identifikace hranic vět a tokenů. Proto zkoumáme, do jaké míry lze složky nahradit univerzálními závislostmi, nebo zcela vynechat, a jak si vedou moderní segmentáři bez větových hranic. Naše výsledky ukazují, že informace o závislosti jsou méně užitečné, než se očekávalo, ale poskytujeme plně škálovatelný, robustní model, který se spoléhá pouze na informace o části řeči, a ukazuje, že funguje dobře napříč jazyky bez jakékoli anotace zlatého standardu.', 'et': 'Diskursuse segmenteerimine on esimene samm diskursuse parserite loomisel. Enamik diskursuse segmenteerimist käsitlevaid töid ei ulatu reaalse maailma diskursuse parsimiseni keelte vahel kahel põhjusel: (i) mudelid tuginevad koostispuudele ja (ii) eksperimendid on tuginenud lause- ja märgipiiride kuldstandardile. Seetõttu uurime, mil määral saab komponente asendada universaalsete sõltuvustega või täielikult välja jätta, samuti kuidas kaasaegsed segmenteerijad toimivad lausepiiride puudumisel. Meie tulemused näitavad, et sõltuvusteave on oodatust vähem kasulik, kuid pakume täielikult skaleeritavat ja tugevat mudelit, mis tugineb ainult osalisele kõneteabele ja näitab, et see toimib hästi kõigis keeltes ilma kuldstandardite annotatsioonita.', 'fi': 'Diskurssisegmentointi on ensimmäinen askel diskurssiparsereiden rakentamisessa. Suurin osa diskurssisegmentoinnista ei skaalaudu todellisen maailman diskurssin jäsentämiseen eri kielillä kahdesta syystä: (i) mallit perustuvat rakennepuihin ja (ii) kokeet ovat luottaneet lauseiden ja merkkien rajojen kultaiseen tunnistamiseen. Siksi tutkimme, missä määrin äänestäjät voidaan korvata yleismaailmallisilla riippuvuuksilla tai jättää kokonaan pois, sekä miten uusimmat segmentoijat pärjäävät lauserajojen puuttuessa. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että riippuvuustiedot ovat odotettua vähemmän hyödyllisiä, mutta tarjoamme täysin skaalautuvan ja vankan mallin, joka perustuu vain puheen osaan ja osoittaa, että se toimii hyvin kaikilla kielillä ilman kultaisia merkintöjä.', 'jv': 'command Diwong yang wong liyane Awak dhéwé isih perusahaan segala pakan dengané sampeyan ingkang dipunangé karo universel dipunangé, ora basa punika dipunangé, dadi piye soko perusahaan-perusahaan langkung sampeyan ketahan Awak dhéwé ngomong nik informasi dipunangé kuwi nggawe luwih apik tenan karo awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé ngewehku nggawe model sing apik dhéwé, ejeh-tenan iki bakal terus informasi sing bakal terus-bakal sing bisa awak dhéwé, lan wong-wong kuwi ngewehku dilawak dhéwé kuwi', 'he': 'סגמנציה של דיסקורס היא הצעד הראשון בבניין חוקרי דיסקורס. Most work on discourse segmentation does not scale to real-world discourse parsing across languages, for two reasons: (i) models rely on constituent trees, and (ii) experiments have relied on gold standard identification of sentence and token boundaries.  לכן אנו חוקרים עד כמה נבנים יכולים להחליף בהתלויות אוניברסליות, או להשאיר לחלוטין, כמו גם כיצד סגמנטים מוקדמים מסתדרים בהיעדרות גבולות משפטים. התוצאות שלנו מראות כי מידע התלויה פחות שימושי משציפים, אבל אנחנו מספקים מודל מלא אפשרי למידה, חזק שמסומך רק על חלק מידע של הנאום, ולהראות שהוא מתפקד היטב בכל שפות בהיעדרות של כל ציון סטנדרטי זהב.', 'ha': "Tsarawa na cũtarwa na farkon hanyõyi a samar mazaɓa na mazaɓa. Babu yawa masu aiki a kan rabon magana bã ya kamata zuwa magana masu cikin duniya da aka yi fassarwa a cikin harsunan, sababi biyu: (i) misalin sunã dõgara a kan itãce wanda ke ƙunci, kuma (ii) jarrabai sun dõgara a kan shaidar kalma na zĩnãriya da grensa na alama. Saboda haka, Munã tambaye ka ga yadda za a musanya abõkan matsayin su da bakan universal, ko kuwa za'a fita cikakken, da jinsi halin-sanar ke aiki a gaba ga grensa. MatamayinMu na nuna cewa, information masu inganci bã ta da amfani ba daga abin da ake ƙayyade, kuma amma muna gaura wata misali mai cikakken aibu, wanda ke dõgara kawai kan rabon lãbãri na magana, kuma ka nuna cewa, ya yi aiki mai kyau a tsakanin harsunan da ba wani alama na daidaita na zĩnãriya ba.", 'sk': 'Segmentacija diskurza je prvi korak pri gradnji razčlenjevalnikov diskurza. Večina dela na področju segmentacije diskurza ne obsega na razčlenitev diskurza v resničnem svetu v različnih jezikih iz dveh razlogov: (i) modeli se zanašajo na sestavna drevesa in (ii) eksperimenti so se zanašali na zlati standard identifikacije stavkov in žetonov meja. Zato raziskujemo, v kolikšni meri lahko sestavne dele nadomestimo z univerzalnimi odvisnostmi ali jih popolnoma izpustimo, in kako delujejo najsodobnejši segmentarji brez meja stavkov. Naši rezultati kažejo, da so informacije o odvisnosti manj koristne od pričakovanega, vendar zagotavljamo popolnoma razširljiv in robusten model, ki se zanaša samo na informacije o delu govora in kaže, da uspešno deluje v vseh jezikih brez kakršnih koli zlatih standardov opombe.', 'bo': 'Discourse segmentation is the first step in building discourse parsers. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཕྱོགས་སུ་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདི་ལས་ཕར་སྟོན་པའི་ནང་ལས་ཕར་སྟོན་བཞག་མིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་དག་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཕན་ཚུན་རྩལ་གཞུང་ཚབ་ཏུ་བཅུག་ནི་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་མིན་ཐད་ཡོད་པས། གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་རྟེན་དང་ཕྱི་ཁར་ནས་བསྡད་བྱས་ན། དཔེར་ན། ག ང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་མེད་པར། ཡིན་ནའང་ངེད་ཚོའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པའི་མིང་འཕྲིན་ཡ'}
{'en': 'Deal or No Deal? End-to-End Learning of Negotiation Dialogues', 'ar': 'إتفقنا أم لا؟ التعلم الشامل لحوارات التفاوض', 'fr': 'Deal ou No Deal\xa0? Apprentissage de bout en bout des dialogues de négociation', 'es': '¿Trato o no trato? Aprendizaje integral de los diálogos de negociación', 'pt': 'Com ou sem acordo? Aprendizado de Diálogos de Negociação de ponta a ponta', 'ja': '取引するか、しないか？交渉対話のエンドツーエンドの学習', 'zh': '成交与无成交? 端到端学谈对', 'hi': 'सौदा या कोई सौदा नहीं? बातचीत संवादों के एंड-टू-एंड सीखना', 'ru': 'Сделка или нет? Сквозное обучение переговорным диалогам', 'ga': 'Déileáil nó Gan Margadh? Foghlaim ó Dheireadh go Deireadh na gComhphlé Caibidlíochta', 'ka': 'ჟევლკა თლთ ნვ ჟევლკა? ბოლოდან დასრულებული შესწავლის დიალოგების დასრულება', 'el': 'Συμφωνία ή όχι συμφωνία; Ολοκληρωμένη μάθηση των διαλόγων διαπραγμάτευσης', 'hu': 'Alkut vagy nincs alku? A tárgyalási párbeszédek teljes körű tanulása', 'it': 'Deal or No Deal? Apprendimento completo dei dialoghi negoziali', 'kk': 'Deal не Deal жоқ ма? Терістеу диалогтарының аяқтау- аяқтау', 'lt': 'Sutartis ar ne? Derybų dialogų mokymasis nuo pabaigos', 'mk': 'Договорено или не? Дијалози за преговори од крај до крај', 'ms': 'Deal atau No Deal? Mempelajari Dialog Negosiasi Akhir-Akhir', 'mn': 'Deal or no Deal? Зөрчилдөөний диалогуудын төгсгөл-төгсгөл суралцах', 'ml': 'ഡീല്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഡീല്\u200d ഇല്ലേ? End-to-End Learning of Negotiation Dialogues', 'mt': 'Negozju jew Ebda Negozju? End-to-End Learning of Negotiation Dialogues', 'sr': 'Dogovor ili bez dogovora? Konačno do kraja učenje pregovornih dijaloga', 'ro': 'Înţelegere sau fără înţelegere? Învățarea completă a dialogurilor de negociere', 'no': 'Del eller ikkje dela? Slutt til slutt læring av negasjonsdialogar', 'pl': 'Deal czy No Deal? Całościowe uczenie się dialogów negocjacyjnych', 'ta': 'சீட்டு அல்லது இல்லை சீட்டு? தொடர்பு உரையாடலின் முடிவுக்கு முடிவு', 'si': 'ගණුදෙනුවක් නැද්ද ගණුදෙනුවක් නැද්ද? අවසානය සංවාදය සඳහා අවසානය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Deal or No Deal? Slut-till-slut lärande av förhandlingsdialoger', 'so': "Dambaal ama wax la'aan? Dhammaan-dhamaadka waxbarashada diyaariyada baayacsiga", 'ur': 'Deal or no Deal? Negotiation Dialogs', 'uz': 'Deal or No Deal?  Comment', 'vi': 'Thoả thuận hay không thỏa thuận? Chương trình đàm phán cuối cùng', 'da': 'Aftale eller ingen aftale? Endelig læring af forhandlingsdialoger', 'bg': 'Сделка или без сделка? Обучение от край до край на диалозите по преговорите', 'hr': 'Dogovor ili bez dogovora? Konačno do kraja učenje razgovornih dijaloga', 'nl': 'Deal of No Deal? End-to-End leren van onderhandelingsdialogen', 'de': 'Deal oder No Deal? End-to-End Lernen von Verhandlungsdialogen', 'id': 'Deal atau No Deal? Belajar dari akhir ke akhir dari dialog negosiasi', 'ko': '거래가 성립됩니까 아니면 성립되지 않습니까?담판 대화의 끝에서 끝까지의 학습', 'fa': 'معامله يا معامله؟ یادگیری پایان و پایان گفتگوهای مذاکره', 'tr': 'Gürlenmek ýa-da sözleşik ýok? Mazmunlar Dialoglaryny Ahyrdan soňra öwrenmek', 'sw': 'Hatua au Hakuna Sheria? Kufundisha Kuhusu Mazungumzo ya Ujadala', 'af': 'Deal of geen Deal? Einde na Einde Leer van Negatiering Dialoog', 'am': 'Deal or No Deal? የመስጠት ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Marrëveshje apo jo? Mësimi nga fundi në fund i dialogeve të negociatave', 'hy': 'Մի՞թե ոչ: Բազմակերպման պատուհանների վերջ-վերջ սովորելը', 'bs': 'Dogovor ili bez dogovora? Konačno do kraja učenje dialoga o pregovorima', 'az': 'Deal ya da No Deal? M칲zakir톛 Dialoglar캼n son-to-end 칬yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'Deal or no Deal? সমাপ্তি থেকে শেখার শেখা', 'cs': 'Dohoda nebo žádná dohoda? Kompletní učení dialogů o vyjednávání', 'ca': 'Deal o No Deal? Aprendiment final a final dels diàlegs de negociació', 'et': 'Kokkulepe või kokkulepe? Läbirääkimiste dialoogide täielik õppimine', 'fi': 'Deal vai No Deal? Neuvottelukeskustelujen kattava oppiminen', 'jv': 'Distribusi ora ono Deloh ? Fin-Fin', 'ha': 'QDialogButtonBox KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Deal or No Deal?  שיחות משא ומתן', 'sk': 'Dogovor ali brez dogovora? Celostno učenje pogajalskih dialogov', 'bo': 'བཀྲམ་སྤྱད་ན་ཡང་ན་བཀྲམ་སྤྱད་མི་ཐུབ་པ ཤེས་མོལ་དཔྱད་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་མཐའ་མཇུག་མ་ཟད།'}
{'en': 'Much of human dialogue occurs in semi-cooperative settings, where agents with different goals attempt to agree on common decisions. Negotiations require complex communication and reasoning skills, but success is easy to measure, making this an interesting task for AI. We gather a large dataset of human-human negotiations on a multi-issue bargaining task, where agents who can not observe each other’s reward functions must reach an agreement (or a deal) via natural language dialogue. For the first time, we show it is possible to train end-to-end models for negotiation, which must learn both linguistic and reasoning skills with no annotated dialogue states. We also introduce dialogue rollouts, in which the model plans ahead by simulating possible complete continuations of the conversation, and find that this technique dramatically improves performance. Our code and dataset are publicly available.', 'ar': 'يحدث الكثير من الحوار البشري في بيئات شبه تعاونية ، حيث يحاول الفاعلون بأهداف مختلفة الاتفاق على قرارات مشتركة. تتطلب المفاوضات مهارات اتصال واستدلال معقدة ، ولكن من السهل قياس النجاح ، مما يجعل هذه مهمة مثيرة للاهتمام للذكاء الاصطناعي. نجمع مجموعة بيانات كبيرة من المفاوضات بين الإنسان والبشر حول مهمة مساومة متعددة القضايا ، حيث يجب على الوكلاء الذين لا يستطيعون مراقبة وظائف المكافأة لبعضهم البعض التوصل إلى اتفاق (أو صفقة) عبر حوار اللغة الطبيعية. لأول مرة ، نظهر أنه من الممكن تدريب نماذج شاملة للتفاوض ، والتي يجب أن تتعلم المهارات اللغوية والاستدلالية بدون حالات حوار مشروحة. نقدم أيضًا عمليات طرح للحوار ، حيث يخطط النموذج مسبقًا من خلال محاكاة عمليات الاستمرارية الكاملة الممكنة للمحادثة ، ونجد أن هذه التقنية تعمل على تحسين الأداء بشكل كبير. كودنا ومجموعة البيانات متاحة للجمهور.', 'es': 'Gran parte del diálogo humano ocurre en entornos semicooperativos, donde los agentes con diferentes objetivos intentan ponerse de acuerdo en decisiones comunes. Las negociaciones requieren habilidades complejas de comunicación y razonamiento, pero el éxito es fácil de medir, lo que hace que sea una tarea interesante para la IA. Reunimos un amplio conjunto de datos de negociaciones entre humanos y humanos sobre una tarea de negociación multitemática, en la que los agentes que no pueden observar las funciones de recompensa de los demás deben llegar a un acuerdo (o un acuerdo) a través del diálogo en lenguaje natural. Por primera vez, demostramos que es posible entrenar modelos de negociación de principio a fin, que deben aprender habilidades lingüísticas y de razonamiento sin estados de diálogo anotados. También presentamos lanzamientos de diálogo, en los que el modelo planifica el futuro simulando posibles continuaciones completas de la conversación, y descubrimos que esta técnica mejora drásticamente el rendimiento. Nuestro código y conjunto de datos están disponibles públicamente.', 'fr': "Une grande partie du dialogue humain se déroule dans des environnements semi-coopératifs, où des agents ayant des objectifs différents tentent de s'entendre sur des décisions communes. Les négociations nécessitent des compétences complexes en matière de communication et de raisonnement, mais le succès est facile à mesurer, ce qui en fait une tâche intéressante pour l'IA. Nous rassemblons un vaste ensemble de données de négociations entre humains et humains sur une tâche de négociation multi-questions, où les agents qui ne peuvent pas observer les fonctions de récompense de l'autre doivent parvenir à un accord (ou à un accord) via un dialogue en langage naturel. Pour la première fois, nous montrons qu'il est possible de former des modèles de négociation de bout en bout, qui doivent acquérir à la fois des compétences linguistiques et de raisonnement sans états de dialogue annotés. Nous introduisons également des déploiements de dialogue, dans lesquels le modèle planifie à l'avance en simulant d'éventuelles suites complètes de la conversation, et constatons que cette technique améliore considérablement les performances. Notre code et notre jeu de données sont accessibles au public.", 'pt': 'Grande parte do diálogo humano ocorre em ambientes semi-cooperativos, onde agentes com objetivos diferentes tentam chegar a um acordo sobre decisões comuns. As negociações exigem habilidades complexas de comunicação e raciocínio, mas o sucesso é fácil de medir, tornando esta uma tarefa interessante para a IA. Reunimos um grande conjunto de dados de negociações humano-humano em uma tarefa de barganha de várias questões, onde os agentes que não podem observar as funções de recompensa uns dos outros devem chegar a um acordo (ou um acordo) por meio de diálogo em linguagem natural. Pela primeira vez, mostramos que é possível treinar modelos de negociação de ponta a ponta, que devem aprender habilidades linguísticas e de raciocínio sem estados de diálogo anotados. Também introduzimos lançamentos de diálogo, nos quais o modelo planeja com antecedência simulando possíveis continuações completas da conversa e descobrimos que essa técnica melhora drasticamente o desempenho. Nosso código e conjunto de dados estão disponíveis publicamente.', 'ja': '人間の対話の多くは、異なる目標を持つエージェントが共通の決定に同意しようとする半協力的な場面で行われます。交渉には複雑なコミュニケーションスキルと推論スキルが必要ですが、成功は簡単に測定でき、AIにとって興味深い課題となります。私たちは、マルチイシュー交渉タスクに関する人間と人間の交渉の大きなデータセットを収集します。ここでは、お互いの報酬機能を観察できないエージェントは、自然言語の対話を通じて合意（または取引）に達する必要があります。初めて、注釈付きの対話状態なしで言語スキルと推論スキルの両方を学ばなければならない、交渉のためのエンドツーエンドのモデルをトレーニングすることが可能であることを示します。また、会話の可能な完全な連続をシミュレートすることでモデルが先行して計画するダイアログ展開を導入し、このテクニックがパフォーマンスを劇的に向上させることがわかります。当社のコードとデータセットは一般に公開されています。', 'hi': 'अधिकांश मानव संवाद अर्ध-सहकारी सेटिंग्स में होता है, जहां विभिन्न लक्ष्यों वाले एजेंट सामान्य निर्णयों पर सहमत होने का प्रयास करते हैं। बातचीत के लिए जटिल संचार और तर्क कौशल की आवश्यकता होती है, लेकिन सफलता को मापना आसान है, जिससे यह एआई के लिए एक दिलचस्प काम बन जाता है। हम एक बहु-मुद्दे सौदेबाजी कार्य पर मानव-मानव वार्ता का एक बड़ा डेटासेट इकट्ठा करते हैं, जहां एजेंट जो एक-दूसरे के इनाम कार्यों का निरीक्षण नहीं कर सकते हैं, उन्हें प्राकृतिक भाषा संवाद के माध्यम से एक समझौते (या एक सौदे) तक पहुंचना चाहिए। पहली बार, हम दिखाते हैं कि बातचीत के लिए एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करना संभव है, जिसे बिना किसी एनोटेट संवाद राज्यों के साथ भाषाई और तर्क कौशल दोनों सीखना चाहिए। हम संवाद रोलआउट भी पेश करते हैं, जिसमें मॉडल बातचीत की संभावित पूर्ण निरंतरता का अनुकरण करके आगे की योजना बनाता है, और पाते हैं कि यह तकनीक नाटकीय रूप से प्रदर्शन में सुधार करती है। हमारे कोड और डेटासेट सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Большая часть человеческого диалога происходит в условиях полусотрудничества, когда агенты с разными целями пытаются договориться об общих решениях. Переговоры требуют сложных навыков общения и мышления, но успех легко измерить, что делает эту задачу интересной для ИИ. Мы собираем большой массив данных человеко-человеческих переговоров по многопрофильной переговорной задаче, где агенты, которые не могут наблюдать за функциями вознаграждения друг друга, должны прийти к соглашению (или сделке) посредством диалога на естественном языке. Впервые мы показываем возможность обучения сквозным моделям ведения переговоров, которые должны обучаться как языковым, так и логическим навыкам без аннотированных диалоговых состояний. Мы также вводим развертывание диалога, в котором модель планирует вперед, моделируя возможные полные продолжения разговора, и обнаруживаем, что эта техника резко улучшает производительность. Наш код и набор данных являются общедоступными.', 'zh': '大抵言生于半合作,异趣者代理人试而同之。 夫言须杂通理巧,而成功易量,此人工智能之趣也。 臣等采摭众事之人,议论之多端,其不可观彼此奖能者代理人必因自然语言成议(与交易)。 吾首示训练端到端言模可也,必学言语推理,而无注释之对。 我们还引入对话推出,其中模样模拟对话的完全延续来提前计算,并看见这技术可以显著性能。 吾代码数集是明矣。', 'ga': 'Tarlaíonn go leor den idirphlé daonna i suíomhanna leath-chomhoibríocha, áit a ndéanann gníomhairí le spriocanna éagsúla iarracht teacht ar chomhaontú ar chinntí coitianta. Teastaíonn scileanna casta cumarsáide agus réasúnaíochta le hidirbheartaíochtaí, ach is furasta an rath a thomhas, rud a fhágann gur tasc suimiúil é seo don AI. Bailímid tacar sonraí mór de chaibidlíochtaí daonna-daonna ar thasc margála il-shaincheisteanna, áit a gcaithfidh gníomhairí nach féidir leo feidhmeanna luach saothair a chéile a urramú teacht ar chomhaontú (nó ar chomhaontú) trí chomhphlé teanga nádúrtha. Don chéad uair, léirímid gur féidir múnlaí ceann-go-deireadh a oiliúint le haghaidh caibidlíochta, a chaithfidh scileanna teanga agus réasúnaíochta araon a fhoghlaim gan aon stáit idirphlé anótáilte. Tugaimid isteach freisin rolladh amach idirphlé, ina bpleanálann an tsamhail chun cinn trí leanúintí iomlána féideartha den chomhrá a insamhlú, agus aimsímid go gcuireann an teicníc seo feabhas mór ar fheidhmíocht. Tá ár gcód agus ár dtacar sonraí ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'ბევრი ადამიანის დიალოგი ხდება polუკოპერაციური პარამეტრებში, სადაც ადამიანტები განსხვავებული მიზეზებით სხვადასხვა მიზეზების შესაძლებლობად დაწყვება საერთო შესაბამისი შესაბამისი კომპლექსი კომუნიკაცია და პარამენტის მეცნიერები უნდა მოჭირდება, მაგრამ წარმატება მარტივია, რომ ეს AI-ის ინტერესური საქ ჩვენ ადამიანის-ადამიანის შესაბამისათვის დიდი მონაცემების შესაბამისათვის მრავალური შესაბამისათვის, სადაც ადამიანტები, რომლებიც ვერ შეუძლიათ ერთმანეთის შესაბამისათვის ფუნქციების შესაბამისა პირველი ჯერ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ შესაძლებელია მოდელების დასასრულებლად გავისწავლა, რომელიც უნდა ვისწავლოთ ენგუმისტიკური და რეგაციური მეცნიერები, რომელიც არ აჩვენებული დიალო ჩვენ ასევე დავიყვანეთ დიალოგის გარეშე, რომელიც მოდელის გარეშე პლანეულება შესაძლებელი კონფიგურაციის მუშაობის გარეშე და დავიყვანეთ, რომ ეს ტექნოგია დირამატიკურად ჩვენი კოდი და მონაცემების სახელსაწყოფილი არიან.', 'hu': 'Az emberi párbeszéd nagy része félig együttműködő környezetben zajlik, ahol a különböző célokkal rendelkező ügynökök megpróbálnak megegyezni a közös döntésekben. A tárgyalások komplex kommunikációs és érvelési készségeket igényelnek, de a siker könnyen mérhető, így ez érdekes feladat az AI számára. Ember-ember tárgyalások széles adatát gyűjtjük össze egy több kérdéses alkudozási feladatról, ahol az ügynököknek, akik nem tudják megfigyelni egymás jutalmazási funkcióit, természetes nyelvi párbeszéden keresztül megállapodást (vagy alkut) kell kötniük. Most először mutatjuk be, hogy lehetséges a tárgyalásokhoz végpontos modellek képzése, amelyeknek meg kell tanulniuk mind a nyelvi, mind az érvelési készségeket jegyzetelt nélkül. Bemutatjuk a párbeszéd bevezetését is, amelyben a modell előre tervezi a beszélgetés lehetséges teljes folytatásának szimulálásával, és úgy találjuk, hogy ez a technika drasztikusan javítja a teljesítményt. A kódunk és adatkészletünk nyilvánosan hozzáférhető.', 'el': 'Μεγάλο μέρος του ανθρώπινου διαλόγου πραγματοποιείται σε ημι-συνεργατικά περιβάλλοντα, όπου πράκτορες με διαφορετικούς στόχους προσπαθούν να συμφωνήσουν σε κοινές αποφάσεις. Οι διαπραγματεύσεις απαιτούν πολύπλοκες δεξιότητες επικοινωνίας και συλλογισμού, αλλά η επιτυχία είναι εύκολο να μετρηθεί, καθιστώντας αυτό ένα ενδιαφέρον έργο για την τεχνητή νοημοσύνη. Συγκεντρώνουμε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων των διαπραγματεύσεων ανθρώπου-ανθρώπου για ένα πολυθεματικό διαπραγματευτικό έργο, όπου οι πράκτορες που δεν μπορούν να παρακολουθήσουν ο ένας τις λειτουργίες ανταμοιβής του άλλου πρέπει να καταλήξουν σε συμφωνία (ή συμφωνία) μέσω του διαλόγου φυσικής γλώσσας. Για πρώτη φορά, δείχνουμε ότι είναι δυνατόν να εκπαιδεύσουμε ολοκληρωμένα μοντέλα διαπραγμάτευσης, τα οποία πρέπει να μάθουν γλωσσικές και συλλογιστικές δεξιότητες χωρίς σχολιασμένες καταστάσεις διαλόγου. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης τις επεκτάσεις διαλόγου, στις οποίες το μοντέλο σχεδιάζει μπροστά προσομοιώνοντας πιθανές ολοκληρωμένες συνεχείς της συνομιλίας, και διαπιστώνουμε ότι αυτή η τεχνική βελτιώνει δραματικά την απόδοση. Ο κώδικας και τα δεδομένα μας είναι δημόσια διαθέσιμα.', 'it': "Gran parte del dialogo umano avviene in contesti semi-cooperativi, dove agenti con obiettivi diversi tentano di concordare decisioni comuni. Le trattative richiedono complesse capacità di comunicazione e ragionamento, ma il successo è facile da misurare, rendendo questo un compito interessante per l'IA. Raccogliamo un ampio set di dati di trattative uomo-uomo su un compito di contrattazione multi-questione, in cui gli agenti che non possono osservare le funzioni di ricompensa reciproca devono raggiungere un accordo (o un accordo) attraverso il dialogo del linguaggio naturale. Per la prima volta, mostriamo che è possibile formare modelli end-to-end per la negoziazione, che devono imparare sia capacità linguistiche che di ragionamento senza stati di dialogo annotati. Introduciamo anche dialoghi rollout, in cui il modello pianifica in futuro simulando possibili continue continue conversazioni, e scopriamo che questa tecnica migliora notevolmente le prestazioni. Il nostro codice e il nostro set di dati sono disponibili pubblicamente.", 'mk': "Многу човечки дијалог се случува во половина соработка, каде агентите со различни цели се обидуваат да се согласат за заеднички одлуки. Преговорите бараат комплексни комуникациски и размислувачки вештини, но успехот е лесен да се мери, што го прави ова интересна задача за ИИ. We gather a large dataset of human-human negotiations on a multi-issue bargaining task, where agents who cannot observe each other's reward functions must reach an agreement (or a deal) via natural language dialogue.  За прв пат покажуваме дека е возможно да се обучат модели од крај до крај за преговори, кои мора да научат јазични и размислувачки вештини без анотирани дијалошки држави. Ние, исто така, воведуваме дијалози, во кои моделот планира напред со симулирање на можните комплетни продолжувања на разговорот, и откриваме дека оваа техника драматично ја подобрува изведбата. Нашиот код и податоците се јавно достапни.", 'lt': 'Much of human dialogue occurs in semi-cooperative settings, where agents with different goals attempt to agree on common decisions.  Derybose reikalingi sudėtingi ryšių ir pagrįstumo įgūdžiai, tačiau sėkmę lengva įvertinti, todėl tai paverčia įdomią užduotį AI. Mes renkame didelį žmogaus ir žmogaus derybų duomenų rinkinį dėl daugelio klausimų derybų užduoties, kur agentai, kurie negali vykdyti vienas kito atlyginimo funkcijų, turi pasiekti susitarimą (arba susitarimą) per dialogą natūraliomis kalbomis. Pirmą kartą parodome, kad derybų modeliai gali būti rengiami iš pabaigos į pabaigą, kurie turi mokytis tiek kalbinių, tiek pagrįstų įgūdžių be jokių užrašytų dialogo valstybių. Taip pat pradėsime dialogą, kuriame modelis planuoja ateityje simuliuodamas galimus visiškus pokalbių tęsimus, ir nustatome, kad šis metodas labai pagerina rezultatus. Mūsų kodas ir duomenų rinkinys yra viešai prieinami.', 'kk': 'Адам диалогының көпшілігі жарым-кооперациялық параметрлерінде болады. Бірнеше мақсаттардың агенттері жалпы шешімдерге қатынау әрекеттері болады. Сәйкестіктері комплекс байланысты және түсініктіру мүмкіндіктерін талап етеді, бірақ сәттілік өлшемі оңай, бұл AI үшін қызықты тапсырманы жасау ү Біз көптеген мәселелерді бір-біріне қарай алмайтын агенттер көптеген мәселелердің көптеген мәселелердің көптеген мәселелердің үлкен деректер жиынын жинақтаймыз. Бұл жерде табиғи тіл диалогы арқылы Бірінші рет, біз мәлімет үшін аяқтау үлгілерін оқыту мүмкін болады. Бұл лингвистикалық және тәуелдік күйлерін оқыту мүмкін емес диалог күйлері жоқ. Мұндай-ақ бұл диалог жалғастырылуын келтіріп, бұл үлгі жалғастыру мүмкіндігін біріктіріп, бұл техниканы драматикалық істеу үшін жасайды. Код мен деректер жиынымыз көпшілікті қол жеткізеді.', 'ms': 'Banyak dialog manusia berlaku dalam tetapan semi-kooperatif, di mana ejen dengan tujuan berbeza cuba untuk setuju pada keputusan umum. Negosiasi memerlukan keterampilan komunikasi kompleks dan pemikiran, tetapi sukses mudah diukur, menjadikan ini tugas menarik bagi AI. Kami mengumpulkan set data yang besar dari negosiasi manusia-manusia mengenai tugas negosiasi berbilang isu, di mana ejen yang tidak dapat memerhatikan fungsi hadiah satu sama lain mesti mencapai perjanjian (atau perjanjian) melalui dialog bahasa semulajadi. Untuk pertama kalinya, kita menunjukkan ia adalah mungkin untuk melatih model akhir-akhir untuk negosiasi, yang mesti belajar kedua-dua kemampuan bahasa dan alasan tanpa keadaan dialog yang dicatat. Kami juga memperkenalkan permulaan dialog, di mana rancangan model di hadapan dengan simulasi kemungkinan perlengkapan lengkap perbualan, dan mencari bahawa teknik ini meningkatkan prestasi secara dramatis. Kod dan set data kita tersedia secara umum.', 'ml': 'സെമി- സഹകരിക്കുന്ന സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്റെ സംസാരം വളരെ സംഭവിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ത തീരുമാനങ്ങളില്\u200d സാധാരണമായ മെ കച്ചവടമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് കുറച്ചുപേരുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളും വിവേകവുമുള്ള കഴിവുകളും ആവശ്യമാണ്. പക്ഷെ വിജയം അളക്കാന്\u200d എളു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പല കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ വാങ്ങാനുപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d നാം ഒരു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാറ ആദ്യത്തേതിന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല, അത് ഭാഷകങ്ങളിലും വിവേക സംസാരത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ തുടര്\u200dച്ചയ്ക്കുള്ള പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ തുടര്\u200dച്ചയ്ക്ക് മുന്നില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്ലാന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഡയല നമ്മുടെ കോഡും ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും പ്രസിദ്ധമാണ്.', 'pl': 'Duża część ludzkiego dialogu odbywa się w środowiskach półwspółpracy, gdzie agenci o różnych celach próbują uzgodnić wspólne decyzje. Negocjacje wymagają złożonych umiejętności komunikacji i rozumowania, ale sukces jest łatwy do zmierzenia, co czyni to interesującym zadaniem dla AI. Gromadzimy duży zestaw danych negocjacji człowieka-człowieka dotyczących wielozadaniowego zadania negocjacyjnego, w którym agenci, którzy nie mogą obserwować wzajemnie swoich funkcji nagradzania, muszą osiągnąć porozumienie (lub porozumienie) poprzez dialog językowy naturalny. Po raz pierwszy pokazujemy, że możliwe jest szkolenie kompleksowych modeli negocjacji, które muszą nauczyć się zarówno umiejętności językowych, jak i rozumowania bez adnotacji stanów dialogu. Wprowadzamy również rollouty dialogowe, w których model planuje przyszłość symulując możliwe pełne kontynuacje rozmowy i stwierdzając, że technika ta dramatycznie poprawia wydajność. Nasz kod i zestaw danych są publicznie dostępne.', 'mt': "Ħafna djalogu uman iseħħ f’ambjenti semikooperattivi, fejn aġenti b’għanijiet differenti jippruvaw jaqblu dwar deċiżjonijiet komuni. In-negozjati jeħtieġu ħiliet kumplessi ta’ komunikazzjoni u raġunament, iżda s-suċċess huwa faċli biex jitkejjel, u dan isir kompitu interessanti għall-AI. Niġbru sett kbir ta’ dejta ta’ negozjati bejn il-bniedem u l-bniedem dwar kompitu ta’ negozjar b’diversi kwistjonijiet, fejn a ġenti li ma jistgħux josservaw il-funzjonijiet ta’ premju ta’ xulxin iridu jilħqu ftehim (jew ftehim) permezz ta’ djalogu lingwistiku naturali. For the first time, we show it is possible to train end-to-end models for negotiation, which must learn both linguistic and reasoning skills with no annotated dialogue states.  Aħna nintroduċu wkoll it-tnedija tad-djalogu, li fih il-mudell jippjana 'l quddiem billi ninsimulaw kontinwazzjonijiet kompleti possibbli tal-konverżjoni, u nsibu li din it-teknika ttejjeb b'mod drammatiku l-prestazzjoni. Il-kodiċi u s-sett tad-dejta tagħna huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.", 'no': 'Mange menneskelige dialogvindauge skjer i semikooperativ innstillingar, der agentar med ulike mål prøver å samordna med felles avgjøring. Negasjonar krev komplekse kommunikasjon og rasjonsverktøy, men suksess er lett å måle, og gjør dette eit interessant oppgåve for AI. Vi samler ein stor dataset av menneske-menneske forhandlingar om eit multiproblembarning-oppgåve, der agentar som ikkje kan observera rekningsfunksjonar for kvarandre må nå ein avtale (eller eit avtale) via naturspråkdialog. For første gong viser vi det mulig å trene sluttmodeller for forhandlingar, som må lære både lingviske og rasjonskonstillingar med ingen merke dialogtilstandar. Vi introduserer også dialogområde, der modellen planlegger fram ved å simulera mulig fullstendig fortsett av samtalen, og finne at denne teknikken dramatisk forbetrar utviklinga. Koden og dataset våre er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний диалог нь хамтран хамтран ажиллаж буй байгууллагууд байдаг. Тэнд өөр зорилготой агентууд нийтийн шийдвэр гаргахыг хичээдэг. Хоролцох нь комплекс харилцаа, урам зориулах чадвар хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ амжилт нь хэмжих амархан, үүнийг AI-д сонирхолтой ажил болгох нь амархан. Бид олон асуудал дээр хүн-хүн төрөлхтний зөвлөгөөний маш их өгөгдлийн сангуудыг цуглуулдаг. Харин нэгнийг харж чадахгүй агентууд байгалийн хэл диалогын аргаар зөвлөгөө (эсвэл договор) хүрэх хэрэгтэй. Эхлээд бид хэлэлцээний төгсгөлд зогсох загваруудыг сурах боломжтой болно. Энэ нь хэлний хэлний болон бодлого чадварыг сурах хэрэгтэй. Бид мөн диалог дамжуулалтыг танилцуулдаг. Энэ загвар нь ярианы бүрэн үргэлжлүүлэх боломжтой төлөвлөгөөтэй. Энэ техник үйл ажиллагааг үнэхээр сайжруулдаг. Бидний код болон өгөгдлийн сангууд олон нийтэд хангалттай.', 'so': 'Much of human dialogue occurs in semi-cooperative settings, where agents with different goals attempt to agree on common decisions.  Heshiiska waxaa loola baahan yahay xirfadaha la xiriira oo adag iyo aqoonta waxgarashada, laakiin liibaanka waa fudud in la qiyaaso, wuxuuna ka dhigaa shaqada xiiso leh AI. Waxaannu soo ururinnaa macluumaad badan oo ku saabsan arrimo ka baaraandegista arimaha kala duduwan, kaas oo ay dhaqaalaha a an midka kale fiirin karin hawlaha mushaarka, waa in ay heshiis ku gaadhaan (ama heshiis) ku qoraalka luuqada dabiicadda ah. Marka ugu horeysay waxaynu muujinnaa in lagu tababaro qaabab ugu dhammaad dhammaadka hadalka, taas oo waa in la baro aqoonta luqada iyo waxyaabaha ku saabsan, iyadoon lahayn hadal dhibaataysan. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaa qoraalka diyaarinta, kaas oo modelku horay u qorsheyno qoraalka sameynta suurtagal ah oo dhamaadka hadalka, waxaynu ognahay in teknikadan si gaar ah u bedeshaa muuqashada. Qoidayada iyo macluumaadkayagu waxay si bayaan ah u helaan.', 'ro': 'O mare parte a dialogului uman are loc în cadre semi-cooperative, unde agenții cu scopuri diferite încearcă să ajungă de acord asupra deciziilor comune. Negocierile necesită abilități complexe de comunicare și raționament, dar succesul este ușor de măsurat, ceea ce face ca aceasta să fie o sarcină interesantă pentru AI. Colectăm un set larg de date de negocieri om-om cu privire la o sarcină de negociere multichestiune, în care agenții care nu pot observa reciproc funcțiile de recompensare trebuie să ajungă la un acord (sau la o înțelegere) prin intermediul dialogului limbajului natural. Pentru prima dată, demonstrăm că este posibil să se instruiască modele end-to-end pentru negociere, care trebuie să învețe atât abilități lingvistice, cât și abilități de raționament fără să fie adnotate stări de dialog. De asemenea, introducem lansări de dialog, în care modelul planifică înainte prin simularea posibilelor continuări complete ale conversației și constatăm că această tehnică îmbunătățește dramatic performanța. Codul și setul nostru de date sunt disponibile public.', 'sv': 'Mycket av den mänskliga dialogen sker i halvsamarbetsmiljöer, där agenter med olika mål försöker komma överens om gemensamma beslut. Förhandlingar kräver komplexa kommunikations- och resonemangsförmåga, men framgång är lätt att mäta, vilket gör detta till en intressant uppgift för AI. Vi samlar in en stor datauppsättning mänskliga-mänskliga förhandlingar om en flerfrågeförhandlingsuppgift, där agenter som inte kan observera varandras belöningsfunktioner måste nå en överenskommelse (eller en överenskommelse) via naturlig språkdialog. För första gången visar vi att det är möjligt att träna heltäckande förhandlingsmodeller, som måste lära sig både språkliga och resonemässiga färdigheter utan kommenterade dialogstater. Vi introducerar också dialoglanseringar, där modellen planerar framåt genom att simulera möjliga fullständiga fortsatta samtal, och finner att denna teknik dramatiskt förbättrar prestanda. Vår kod och dataset är offentligt tillgängliga.', 'sr': 'Mnogo ljudskog dijaloga se dešava u polu-saradnjivim nastavama, gde agenti sa različitim ciljevima pokušavaju da se slažu o zajedničkim odlukama. Pregovori zahtevaju kompleksno komunikacije i razumljive vještine, ali uspjeh je lako mjeriti, čineći to zanimljivim zadatkom za AI. Skupljamo veliku skupu podataka o ljudskim i ljudskim pregovorima o zadatku o pregovaranju s a mnogim pitanjima, gde agenti koji ne mogu da posmatraju funkcije nagrade jedni druge moraju postići sporazum (ili sporazum) putem prirodnog jezičkog dijaloga. Prvi put pokažemo da je moguće trenirati modele kraja do kraja pregovora, koje moraju naučiti i jezičke i razumne vještine bez annotiranih država dijaloga. Također predstavljamo izveštaj dijaloga, u kojem model planira ispred, simulirajući moguće potpune nastavke razgovora, i saznajemo da ova tehnika dramatično poboljšava izvršnost. Naš kod i set podataka su javno dostupni.', 'ta': 'பொது தீர்ப்புகளை ஒப்புக்கொள்ள முயற்சி மனித உரையாடல் பெரும்பாலான நிகழ்கிறது. தொடர்புகளுக்கு சிக்கலான தொடர்பு மற்றும் தெளிவான திறமைகள் தேவைப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் வெற்றியம் எடுக்க எளிதாகும், இதை AI நாம் பல பிரச்சினைகளின் வாங்குதல் செயல்பாட்டில் மனித மனித உரையாடல் பெரிய தகவல் அமைப்பை சேகரிக்கிறோம், அங்கு ஒருவர் மற்றொருவருக்கு வாங்கும் ச முதல் முறைக்கு, நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் பேச்சு முடிவு மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய முடியும். இது மொழியிலும் விளக்கமுடியாத உரையாடல் மாந பேச்சின் முழுமையான தொடர்புகளை பார்த்து முன்னால் மாதிரி திட்டங்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இந்த த தொழில்நுட்பம் செயல்பாட்டை  எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் தகவல் அமைப்பு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු සංවාදය ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, වෙනස් ඉල්ලම් එක්ක සමා සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඒත් සමහර විශ්වාස විශ අපි මිනිස්සු-මිනිස්සු සම්බන්ධයක් ගැන ලොකු දත්ත සූදානයක් සංවේදනය කරනවා, මෙතන මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි මුලින්ම වතාවෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අවසානයට අවසානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ඒ වගේම භාෂාවාද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ හිතාවික වි අපි සමහරවිට සංවාදය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, මොඩේල් සැලසුම් ඉදිරියට පුළුවන් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා ක අපේ කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත සැට් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන්.', 'ur': 'انسان کی بہت سی گفتگو نصف-همکاری سیٹیوں میں ہوتی ہے جہاں مختلف موجودات کے مطابق اگنٹوں نے مشترک فیصلے کے بارے میں موافقت کی کوشش کی ہے. مذاکرات پیچیدہ ارتباط اور بحث کی طاقتوں کی ضرورت ہے، لیکن موفقیت اندازے کے لئے آسان ہے، اس کو AI کے لئے جالب کام بنانا ہے. ہم انسان اور انسان کی مذاکرات کے ایک بڑے ڈیٹسٹ کو ایک متعدد مسئلہ کے بارے میں جمع کرتے ہیں، جہاں ایسے اگنٹ جو ایک دوسرے کے اجر کا کام نہیں دیکھ سکتے، ایک معاملہ (یا معاملہ) کو طبیعی زبان کی گفتگو کے ذریعے پہنچ سکتے ہیں۔ ہم پہلی بار دکھاتے ہیں کہ مذاکرات کے لئے آخر و آخر مدل کی تعلیم کرنا امکان ہے، جو زبان اور منطقی کے قابلیت یاد کرنا چاہیے بغیر مذاکرات کی حالت کے. ہم نے بھی ڈالیلوٹ رولوٹ کو معلوم کرلیا ہے جہاں موڈل آگے کی تدبیر کرتی ہے کہ مکالمات کی پوری ادامه کی سیمولیٹ کرتی ہے اور اس تکنیک کو معلوم کرتی ہے کہ یہ تدبیر عملکرد کو اچھی طرح بہتر کرتی ہے۔ ہمارا کوڈ اور ڈیٹ سٹ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik muloqat oynasi qayta qo'llanmalar davomida sodir bo'ladi. Bu yerda boshqa maqola bilan ajratishni harakat qiladi. Aloqalarni murakkab aloqa va aqlli bo'lish kerak, lekin muvaffaqiyatli o'zgartirishga oson, bu AI uchun qiziqarli vazifani yaratish oddiy. Biz bir necha muammolar suhbat vazifasida inson talabalarini bir necha narsa qilamiz. Bu yerda bir-бирларини савоб funksiyatlarini ko'rib chiqib boʻlmaydigan agentlar, o'sha narsalarning tabiiy muloqat orqali aloqa orqali (yoki aloqa) bilan aloqa qilishi kerak. Birinchi marta, biz talab qilish uchun oxirigi modellarni o'rganish mumkin. Bu gapiruvchi muloqat holatlari emas, tillar va aqlli darajada o'rganish kerak. Biz oynalarni ko'rib chiqaramiz. Bu yerda model suhbat davomida davomida davomida davom etish mumkin. Bu teknologiya dramatik bajarishni bajaradi. Kodlash va maʼlumot sahifasi faqat mavjud.", 'vi': 'Phần lớn cuộc đối thoại con người diễn ra trong môi trường bán hợp tác, nơi các đặc vụ với mục đích khác nhau cố gắng đạt được quyết định chung. Thương lượng đòi hỏi kĩ năng thông tin và lập luận phức tạp, nhưng thành công thì dễ đo, và làm thế là một nhiệm vụ thú vị cho AI. Chúng tôi thu thập một bộ dữ liệu lớn về thương lượng đa cấp, nơi những đặc vụ không thể quan s át các chức năng thưởng của nhau phải đạt được thỏa thuận (hoặc thỏa thuận) thông qua cuộc đối thoại ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Lần đầu tiên, chúng tôi cho thấy có thể huấn luyện các phương pháp đàm phán cuối cùng, mà phải học cả kĩ năng ngôn ngữ và lý luận mà không có các bang được ghi chú. Chúng tôi cũng tiến hành các tua cuộc đối thoại, trong đó các mô hình sẽ tiến hành bằng cách mô phỏng các liên tục hoàn chỉnh của cuộc nói chuyện, và thấy rằng kỹ thuật này đã kịch bản cải thiện hiệu suất. Mật mã và bộ dữ liệu của chúng tôi công khai.', 'hr': 'Mnogo ljudskog dijaloga se događa u polu-saradničkim nastavama, gdje agenti s različitim ciljevima pokušavaju složiti se o zajedničkim odlukama. Pregovori zahtijevaju kompleksno komunikacije i razumljive vještine, ali uspjeh je lako mjeriti, čineći to zanimljivim zadatkom za AI. Skupljamo veliku skupu podataka o ljudskim i ljudskim pregovorima o zadatku o pregovaranju mnogim pitanjima, gdje agenti koji ne mogu pratiti funkcije nagrade jedni drugima moraju postići sporazum (ili sporazum) putem prirodnog dijaloga jezika. Prvi put pokazujemo da je moguće trenirati modele kraja do kraja pregovora, koje moraju naučiti i jezičke i razumne vještine bez annotiranih država dijaloga. Također predstavljamo raspored dijaloga, u kojem model planira ispred, simulirajući moguće potpune nastavke razgovora, i otkrijemo da ta tehnika dramatično poboljšava učinkovitost. Naš kod i set podataka su javno dostupni.', 'bg': 'Голяма част от човешкия диалог се осъществява в полукооперативни условия, където агенти с различни цели се опитват да постигнат съгласие за общи решения. Преговорите изискват сложни умения за комуникация и разсъждаване, но успехът е лесен за измерване, което прави това интересна задача за изкуствения интелект. Събираме голям набор от данни от преговори между човек и човек по многопроблемна договаряща задача, при която агенти, които не могат да спазват функциите за възнаграждение един на друг, трябва да постигнат споразумение (или сделка) чрез диалог с естествен език. За първи път показваме, че е възможно да се обучават модели от край до край за преговори, които трябва да научат езикови и логически умения без анотирани диалогови състояния. Също така въвеждаме въвеждане на диалогови разработки, в които моделът планира напред, като симулира възможни цялостни продължения на разговора, и откриваме, че тази техника драстично подобрява производителността. Нашият код и набор от данни са публично достъпни.', 'da': 'Meget af den menneskelige dialog foregår i semi-samarbejdsmiljøer, hvor agenter med forskellige mål forsøger at blive enige om fælles beslutninger. Forhandlinger kræver komplekse kommunikations- og ræsonnementfærdigheder, men succes er let at måle, hvilket gør dette til en interessant opgave for AI. Vi indsamler et stort datasæt af menneske-menneske forhandlinger om en multi-issue forhandlingsopgave, hvor agenter, der ikke kan observere hinandens belønningsfunktioner, skal nå til enighed (eller en aftale) via naturlig sprogdialog. For første gang viser vi, at det er muligt at uddanne end-to-end modeller til forhandling, der skal lære både sproglige og ræsonnementsmæssige færdigheder uden kommenterede dialogstater. Vi introducerer også dialogudrulninger, hvor modellen planlægger fremad ved at simulere mulige komplette fortsættelser af samtalen, og finder ud af, at denne teknik dramatisk forbedrer ydeevnen. Vores kode og datasæt er offentligt tilgængelige.', 'nl': 'Een groot deel van de menselijke dialoog vindt plaats in semi-coöperatieve omgevingen, waar agenten met verschillende doelen proberen overeenstemming te bereiken over gemeenschappelijke beslissingen. Onderhandelingen vereisen complexe communicatie- en redeneringsvaardigheden, maar succes is gemakkelijk te meten, waardoor dit een interessante taak is voor AI. We verzamelen een grote dataset van mens-mens onderhandelingen over een multi-issue onderhandelingstaak, waarbij agenten die elkaars beloningsfuncties niet kunnen observeren, via dialoog in natuurlijke taal tot een akkoord (of een deal) moeten komen. Voor het eerst laten we zien dat het mogelijk is om end-to-end modellen voor onderhandelingen te trainen, die zowel taalkundige als redeneringsvaardigheden moeten leren zonder geannoteerde dialoogstaten. We introduceren ook dialoogrollouts, waarbij het model vooruit plant door mogelijke volledige vervolgingen van het gesprek te simuleren, en merken dat deze techniek de prestaties drastisch verbetert. Onze code en dataset zijn openbaar beschikbaar.', 'de': 'Ein Großteil des menschlichen Dialogs findet in halbkooperativen Umgebungen statt, in denen Agenten mit unterschiedlichen Zielen versuchen, sich auf gemeinsame Entscheidungen zu einigen. Verhandlungen erfordern komplexe Kommunikations- und Denkfähigkeiten, aber Erfolg ist leicht zu messen, was dies zu einer interessanten Aufgabe für KI macht. Wir sammeln einen großen Datensatz von Mensch-Mensch-Verhandlungen über eine multi-issue Verhandlungsaufgabe, bei der Agenten, die die Belohnungsfunktionen des anderen nicht wahrnehmen können, eine Einigung (oder einen Deal) über den Dialog in natürlicher Sprache erzielen müssen. Zum ersten Mal zeigen wir, dass es möglich ist, End-to-End-Modelle für Verhandlungen zu trainieren, die sowohl sprachliche als auch argumentative Fähigkeiten ohne annotierte Dialogzustände erlernen müssen. Wir führen auch Dialogrollouts ein, bei denen das Modell vorausplant, indem es mögliche vollständige Fortsetzungen des Gesprächs simuliert, und stellen fest, dass diese Technik die Leistung dramatisch verbessert. Unser Code und Datensatz sind öffentlich zugänglich.', 'id': 'Banyak dialog manusia terjadi dalam persediaan semi-kooperatif, di mana agen dengan tujuan yang berbeda mencoba untuk setuju pada keputusan umum. Negosiasi memerlukan komunikasi kompleks dan keterampilan pemikiran, tapi sukses mudah diukur, membuat ini tugas menarik bagi AI. Kami mengumpulkan dataset besar negosiasi manusia-manusia tentang tugas negosiasi multi-isu, di mana agen yang tidak dapat mengamati fungsi hadiah satu sama lain harus mencapai kesepakatan (atau kesepakatan) melalui dialog bahasa alam. Untuk pertama kalinya, kita menunjukkan mungkin untuk melatih model akhir-akhir untuk negosiasi, yang harus belajar kedua keterampilan bahasa dan alasan tanpa negara-negara dialog yang dicatat. Kami juga memperkenalkan roll-outs dialog, di mana model rencana di depan dengan simulasi kemungkinan penuh lanjutan percakapan, dan menemukan bahwa teknik ini dramatis meningkatkan prestasi. Kode dan dataset kami tersedia publik.', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo mengi ya binadamu yanatokea katika mazingira ya ushirikiano wa sekondari, ambapo watumishi wenye malengo mbalimbali yanajaribu kukubaliana na maamuzi yanayofanana. Mijadala inahitaji mawasiliano ya tata na ujuzi wa kueleweka, lakini mafanikio ni rahisi kufanya kazi hii ya kuvutia kwa AI. Tunakusanya takwimu kubwa ya majadiliano ya binadamu kwenye kazi ya kibinadamu katika masuala mengi ya kibinadamu, ambapo madaktari ambao hawawezi kuangalia kazi za malipo kwa wao lazima zifikie makubaliano (au mkataba) kupitia mazungumzo ya lugha ya asili. Kwa mara ya kwanza, tunaonyesha inawezekana kufundisha mifano ya mwisho wa majadiliano, ambayo ni lazima kujifunza ujuzi wa lugha na wenye akili bila mazungumzo yasiyoeleweka. Tunaweza pia kutangaza mabadiliko ya mazungumzo, ambapo mipango hiyo inapanga mbele kwa kuelezea uwezekano wa kuendeleza mabadiliko ya mazungumzo hayo, na kutambua kuwa teknolojia hii kwa kiasi kikubwa inaboresha utendaji wa mazungumzo. Kodi na taarifa zetu zinapatikana wazi.', 'fa': 'بسیاری از گفتگوهای انسان در تنظیمات نیم همکاری اتفاق می افتد، جایی که ماموران با هدف های مختلف تلاش می کنند که در تصمیمات مشترک موافق باشند. مذاکرات به ارتباط پیچیده و مهارت منطقی نیاز دارند، ولی موفقیت برای اندازه اندازه\u200cگیری آسان است، این کار جالبی برای AI انجام می\u200cدهد. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات بزرگ از مذاکرات انسان و انسان را در یک کار تجارت بسیاری از مسائل متحد جمع می\u200cکنیم، جایی که ماموران که نمی\u200cتوانند عملکرد پاداش یکدیگر را مشاهده کنند باید از طریق محاورۀ زبان طبیعی به یک توافق (یا معامله) رسید برای اولین بار، ما نشان می دهیم که ممکن است مدل های پایان و پایان را برای مذاکره آموزش دهیم، که باید مهارت زبان شناسی و منطقی را بدون هیچ وضعیت مذاکره مشخص یاد بگیریم. ما همچنین بازگشت\u200cهای گفتگوی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که مدل پیش از آن با شبیه\u200cسازی ادامه\u200cهای کامل مکالمه\u200cای ممکن است، نقشه\u200cهای پیش از آن می\u200cکند، و پیدا می\u200cکنیم که این تکنیک عملکرد را به شدت زیادی بهتر می کد و مجموعه اطلاعات عموما در دسترس هستند.', 'ko': '대부분의 인류 대화는 반합작적인 환경에서 발생하는데 이런 환경에서 서로 다른 목표를 가진 대리인이 공동의 결정에 대해 일치를 이루려고 한다.협상은 복잡한 의사소통과 추리 기능을 필요로 하지만 성공은 평가하기 쉬워 인공지능에 흥미로운 임무다.우리는 다의제 협상 임무에 관한 대량의 인류 협상 데이터를 수집했는데 이런 협상 임무에서 서로의 장려 함수를 관찰할 수 없는 대리인은 반드시 자연 언어 대화를 통해 협의(또는 거래)를 달성해야 한다.협상 훈련을 위한 단도직입적 모델의 가능성을 보여준 것은 이번이 처음이며, 대화상태를 주석하지 않고 언어와 추리 기술을 배워야 한다.우리는 대화의 전개를 소개했는데 그 중에서 모델은 대화를 모의하여 가능한 완전한 연장 계획을 앞당겼고 이런 기술이 성능을 현저히 향상시켰다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 코드와 데이터 집합은 공개된 것이다.', 'tr': 'Adamlar dialogynyň köp bölegi ýarym-birleşişik düzümlerinde bolýar, nähili maksadlary bilen ajaýyp maksadlary barada ylalaşmaga synanyşýarlar. Döwşemeler karmaşık komunikaciýa we razylyk ukyplary gerek, ýöne başarnygy ölçürmek aňsatdyr, bu işi AI üçin gyzykly bir zady etmek üçin aňsatdyr. Biz insan-ynsan görüşmeleriniň köp meselede bir görkezilişi bilen uly maglumatlary toplaýrys. Bu ýerde bir-biriniň baýramçylygynyň funksiýasyny gözleyemeýän ajamlar tebigy dil dialogynda bir anlaşma (ýa-da bir anlaşma) ýetmeli bolmaly. Ilkinji gezek, biz müzakerelemek üçin soňunda soňunda nusgalary öwrenmäge mümkin däldigini görkeýäris. Bu ikisi de lingwistiki we düşündürmek ukyplary däldigine täsir etmeli. Biz hem dialogyň çykyşlaryny tanyşdyrýarys, bardaky nusgalaryň hem dowamyny bejermek üçin öňki nusgalaryny görkezip, we bu teknikiýa etkinleşigini örän gowuraýar. Biziň ködlerimiz we veri setirmelerimiz publika bar.', 'sq': 'Much of human dialogue occurs in semi-cooperative settings, where agents with different goals attempt to agree on common decisions.  Negociatat kërkojnë aftësi komplekse komunikimi dhe arsyetimi, por suksesi është i lehtë për të masuar, duke e bërë këtë një detyrë interesante për AI. Ne mbledhim një grup të madh të dhënash të bisedimeve njerëzore-njerëzore mbi një detyrë negociuese me shumë çështje, ku agjentët që nuk mund të vëzhgojnë funksionet e shpërblimit të njëri-tjetrit duhet të arrijnë një marrëveshje (ose një marrëveshje) nëpërmjet dialogut natyror të gjuhës. Për herë të parë, ne tregojmë se është e mundur të trajnohet modele nga fundi në fund për negociime, të cilat duhet të mësojnë si aftësitë gjuhësore ashtu edhe arsyetimi pa shtete të anotuar të dialogut. Ne gjithashtu futim fillimet e dialogut, në të cilat modeli planifikon përpara duke simuluar vazhdimet e mundshme të plota të bisedës dhe zbulojmë se kjo teknikë përmirëson dramatikisht performancën. Kodi ynë dhe dataset janë në dispozicion publik.', 'af': "Baie menslike dialoog kom in semi-kooperative instellings, waar agente met verskillende doels probeer om te ooreenkomstig op gemeenskaplike besluite. Negaties vereis kompleks kommunikasie en redekende kunstenaars, maar sukses is maklik om te maak, maak dit 'n interessante taak vir AI. Ons versamel 'n groot datastel van menslike-menslike ooreenkoms op 'n veelvuldige oorwinning-taak, waar agente wat nie mekaar se loon funksies kan observeer nie, moet 'n ooreenkoms (of 'n ooreenkoms) deur natuurlike taal dialoog bereik word. Vir die eerste keer vertoon ons dit moontlik is om einde-tot-einde modele te tref vir verhandling, wat moet leer beide lingwisiese en redekende kunstenaars met geen aanmerkte dialoog staat nie. Ons introduseer ook dialoog rolouwers waarin die model voor planne deur moontlik volledige voortgaande van die gesprek te simuleer en vind dat hierdie tekniks dramatiese prestasie verbeter. Ons kode en datastel is openlik beskikbaar.", 'hy': 'Մարդկային երկխոսության մեծ մասը տեղի է ունենում կիսահամագործակցության միջավայրում, որտեղ տարբեր նպատակներով գործիչները փորձում են համաձայնվել ընդհանուր որոշումների մասին: Բազմակերպությունները պահանջում են բարդ հաղորդակցման և մտածողության հմտություններ, բայց հաջողությունը հեշտ է չափել, դարձնելով դա ԱԲ-ի համար հետաքրքիր խնդիր: Մենք հավաքում ենք մարդկային-մարդկային բանակցությունների մեծ տվյալներ բազմահարաբերությունների վերաբերյալ, որտեղ գործիչները, ովքեր չեն կարող հետևել միմյանց վարձի գործառույթներին, պետք է հասնեն համաձայնություն (կամ գործարք) բնական լեզվի միջոցով: Առաջին անգամ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հնարավոր է վերջ-վերջ մոդելներ ուսուցանել բանակցության համար, որոնք պետք է սովորեն լեզվաբանական և մտածողական հմտություններ առանց նշումնավոր երկրների: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք խոսակցության սկիզբները, որտեղ մոդելը պլանավորում է առաջ, սիմուլյալով խոսակցության հնարավոր ամբողջ շարունակությունը, և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ այս տեխնիկան դրամական բարելավում է արտադրողությունը: Մեր կոդը և տվյալների համակարգը հանրային հասանելի են:', 'az': 'İnsan dialogların çoxu yarı-kooperativ qurğuları içində yaşanır. Müxtəlif məqsədilə müxtəlif agentlər ortaq kararlar barəsində razılaşmağa çalışırlar. Müzakirələr kompleks iletişim və razılıq yetkinlikləri lazımdır, amma başarılı ölçüdə asandır, bunu AI üçün ilginç bir iş edər. Biz insan-insan müzakirələrinin çoxlu məs ələlər barəsində çoxlu məsələlər barəsində böyük bir veri toplayırıq ki, bir-birinin ödül funksiyalarını görə bilməyən ajanlar təbiətli dil dialoğu vasitəsilə müzakirə etməlidirlər. İlk dəfə müzakirə üçün son-son modelləri təhsil etmək mümkün olduğunu göstərdik. Bu, dillərin və razılıq yetkinliklərini öyrənmək lazımdır. Biz də məlumatlarını tanıdırıq ki, bu məlumatların mümkün tamamlanmasını simulatəşdirərək öndəkilərin modeli planlarını və bu teknikin performansını dəhşətli yaxşılaşdırır. Bizim kodumuz və veri qurğumuz açıq-aşkar mövcuddur.', 'am': 'ብዙ የሰው ማኅበረሰብ በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች በተቃውሞ ማስታወቂያዎች ላይ ለመስማማት ሲሞክሩ ነው፡፡ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነት እና አስተዋይ እውቀት ያስፈልጋል፤ ነገር ግን ማሰናከል ቀላል ነው፣ ይህንም ለAI የሚጠያየቅ ስራ ያደርጋል፡፡ የደመወዝ ሥራ በማይጠበቅ የሚችሉትን ተሟጋቾች (ወይም ዋጋው) በመፍጠር ቋንቋ ማኅበረሰብ ማኅበረሰብ ማግኘት (ወይም ዋጋት) የሚደርሱትን የሰው አካባቢ ጉዳይ ላይ ትልቅ ድራሻ እናከማቻለን፡፡ ለመጀመሪያ ጊዜ፣ የመጨረሻውን የፍጻሜውን ምሳሌ ማሳየት ይችላል፤ በቋንቋዊ እና በአሳማሚ እውቀት እና በማስተካከል ጥያቄ ሳይኖር መማር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ እና የጦማሪያን ቀለበቶች እናስጠጋለን፣ በዚህም ሞዴል የሚቻለውን የውይይት ሁኔታዎችን በማሳመር እና ይህች ቴክክኖክን በጥቅልቅ የሚያሳድገውን እናግኛለን፡፡ የኮድማችን እና ዳራሲሳዊ ግልፅ ተገልጦአል፡፡', 'bs': 'Mnogo ljudskog dijaloga se događa u polu-kooperativnim nastavama, gdje agenti sa različitim ciljevima pokušavaju da se slažu o zajedničkim odlukama. Pregovori zahtijevaju kompleksno komunikacije i razumljive vještine, ali uspjeh je lako mjeriti, čineći to zanimljivim zadatkom za AI. Skupljamo veliku skupu podataka o ljudskim i ljudskim pregovorima o zadatku o pregovaranju mnogim pitanjima, gdje agenti koji ne mogu da posmatraju funkcije nagrade jedni druge moraju postići sporazum (ili sporazum) putem prirodnog dijaloga jezika. Prvi put pokažemo da je moguće trenirati modele kraja do kraja pregovora, koje moraju naučiti i jezičke i razumne vještine bez annotiranih država dijaloga. Također predstavljamo raspored dijaloga, u kojem model planira ispred, simulirajući moguće potpune nastavke razgovora, i otkrijemo da ta tehnika dramatično poboljšava izvođenje. Naš kod i set podataka su javno dostupni.', 'ca': "Molt diàleg humà es produeix en entorns semi-cooperatius, on agents amb diferents objectius intenten acordar sobre decisions comunes. Les negociacions necessiten habilitats complexes de comunicació i raonament, però l'èxit és fàcil de mesurar, fent que això sigui una tasca interessant per a l'AI. Recollim un gran conjunt de dades de negociacions entre human s i humans sobre una tasca de negociació multiqüestional, on els agents que no poden observar les funcions de recompensa dels altres han d'aconseguir un acord (o un acord) mitjançant el diàleg de llenguatges naturals. Per primera vegada, demostram que és possible entrenar models de final a final per a negociar, que han d'aprendre tant habilitats lingüístices com raonament sense estats de diàleg anotats. També introduïm inicis de diàleg, en els quals el model planifica cap endavant simulant possibles continuacions completas de la conversa, i descobrim que aquesta tècnica millora dramàticament el rendiment. El nostre codi i conjunt de dades estan disponibles al públic.", 'cs': 'Velká část lidského dialogu probíhá v polo-kooperativním prostředí, kde se agenti s různými cíli snaží dohodnout na společných rozhodnutích. Vyjednávání vyžaduje komplexní komunikační a uvažovací dovednosti, ale úspěch je snadno měřitelný, což z toho dělá zajímavý úkol pro umělou inteligenci. Shromažďujeme velký soubor dat o člověk-člověk vyjednávání o víceproblémovém vyjednávacím úkolu, kde agenti, kteří nemohou dodržovat své odměňovací funkce, musí dosáhnout dohody (nebo dohody) prostřednictvím dialogu v přirozeném jazyce. Poprvé ukazujeme, že je možné trénovat end-to-end modely pro vyjednávání, které se musí naučit jak jazykové, tak uvažovací dovednosti bez anotovaných dialogových stavů. Představujeme také dialogové rollouty, ve kterých model plánuje dopředu simulací možných úplných pokračování konverzace, a zjišťujeme, že tato technika výrazně zlepšuje výkon. Náš kód a datová sada jsou veřejně dostupná.', 'bn': 'সাধারণ সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে একমত হওয়ার চেষ্টা করে অনেক মানুষের ডায়ালগ সংঘটিত হয়। কিন্তু সফলতা পরিমাপের জন্য সহজ, এটা AI এর জন্য একটি মজার কাজ করার জন্য। আমরা মানুষের বিশাল তথ্য সংগ্রহ করি একটি বহুবিষয় বিনিময় কাজের উপর, যেখানে এজেন্ট যারা একে অপরকে পুরস্কার দেখতে পারে না তাদের অবশ্যই প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রথমবারের জন্য আমরা দেখাচ্ছি এটা সম্ভব যে আলোচনার শেষ পর্যন্ত শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করতে পারে, যা অবশ্যই ভাষার ভাষা এবং যুক্তিগত দক্ষতা শিখতে  আমরা ডায়ালগ রোলাউটের সাথে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যেখানে মডেলের পরিকল্পনা সামনে আলোচনার সম্ভাব্য পূর্ণ চলতে পারে এবং এই প্রযুক্তিটি ন্যায়েক আমাদের কোড এবং ডাটাসেট প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'fi': 'Suuri osa ihmisten vuoropuhelusta tapahtuu puoliyhteistyﾃｶtilanteissa, joissa eri tavoitteet omaavat agentit pyrkivﾃ､t sopimaan yhteisistﾃ､ pﾃ､ﾃ､tﾃｶksistﾃ､. Neuvottelut vaativat monimutkaisia viestintﾃ､- ja pﾃ､ﾃ､ttelytaitoja, mutta onnistumista on helppo mitata, mikﾃ､ tekee tﾃ､stﾃ､ mielenkiintoisen tekoﾃ､lyn tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n. Kerﾃ､ﾃ､mme laajan aineiston ihmisen ja ihmisen vﾃ､lisistﾃ､ neuvotteluista monimuotoisesta neuvottelutehtﾃ､vﾃ､stﾃ､, jossa agenttien, jotka eivﾃ､t pysty seuraamaan toistensa palkitsemistoimintoja, on pﾃ､ﾃ､stﾃ､vﾃ､ sopimukseen (tai sopimukseen) luonnollisen kielen vuoropuhelun kautta. Ensimmﾃ､istﾃ､ kertaa osoitamme, ettﾃ､ on mahdollista kouluttaa kokonaisvaltaisia neuvottelumalleja, joiden on opittava sekﾃ､ kielellisiﾃ､ ettﾃ､ pﾃ､ﾃ､ttelytaitoja ilman huomautuksia. Esittelemme myﾃｶs dialogirullauksia, joissa malli suunnittelee eteenpﾃ､in simuloimalla mahdollisia keskustelujen tﾃ､ydellisiﾃ､ jatkoja ja huomaamme, ettﾃ､ tﾃ､mﾃ､ tekniikka parantaa merkittﾃ､vﾃ､sti suorituskykyﾃ､. Koodimme ja tietomme ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'et': 'Suurem osa inimdialoogist toimub poolkoostöös, kus erinevate eesmärkidega agendid püüavad ühistes otsustes kokku leppida. Läbirääkimised nõuavad keerukaid suhtlemis- ja arutlusoskusi, kuid edu on lihtne mõõta, mistõttu on see AI jaoks huvitav ülesanne. Kogume suure andmekogumi inim-inim läbirääkimistest mitmeküsimusliku läbirääkimisülesande üle, kus agendid, kes ei suuda üksteise preemiafunktsioone jälgida, peavad jõudma kokkuleppele (või kokkuleppele) looduskeele dialoogi kaudu. Esmakordselt näitame, et on võimalik koolitada läbirääkimiste lõpmudeleid, mis peavad õppima nii keele- kui ka arutlusoskusi ilma märgitud dialoogi seisukohtadeta. Lisaks tutvustame dialoogide juurutamist, kus mudel kavatseb edasi simuleerida võimalikku täielikku vestluse jätkumist, ning leiame, et see tehnika parandab oluliselt jõudlust. Meie kood ja andmekogum on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'he': "הרבה דיאלוג אנושי מתרחש במסגרות חצי שיתוף פעולה, שבו סוכנים עם מטרות שונות מנסים להסכים על החלטות משותפות. משא ומתן דורש כישורי תקשורת מורכבים ומגיון, אבל הצלחה קלה למדוד, הופך את זה למשימה מעניינת עבור AI. We gather a large dataset of human-human negotiations on a multi-issue bargaining task, where agents who cannot observe each other's reward functions must reach an agreement (or a deal) via natural language dialogue.  בפעם הראשונה, אנחנו מראים שזה אפשרי לאמן דוגמנים מסוף לסוף למתן משא ומתן, אשר חייב ללמוד כישורים שפתיים וגיוניים ללא מדינות דיאלוג מוסרות. אנחנו גם מציגים שינויים של דיאלוג, שבהם המודל מתכנן קדימה על ידי סימולציה של המשיכות מושלמות אפשריות של השיחה, ומצאים שטכניקה זו משפר דרמטית את ההופעה. הקוד והקבוצת המידע שלנו זמינות לציבור.", 'ha': 'Babu yawa na samun zauren mutum cikin kewayi-samaki, a inda madaidaita masu da goani dabam-daban sunã jarraba su yarda da saurin zaɓen sauri. Haƙĩƙa yana da abinci masu adadi na haɗi da abinci masu hankali, kuma amma succeki yana da sauƙi ga a ƙaddara, kuma ya sanya wannan wani aikin mai amfani na AI. Munã tãra takarda masu yawa na danganta masu mutane a kan wani aikin fatauci na masu yawa, inda madaidaita waɗanda bã su iya gani wa aikin ijãriyar ɗayan, sai ya kai ga wani alkawari (ko wata ƙunci) a kan zauren akwatin harshen. Ko da na farkon, za mu nuna shi yana iya tafiyar da misalin ƙari zuwa ƙarami wa mazaɓa, wanda za ta lazimta ta sanar da labarai cikin harshen da masu hankali, kuma bã da daidai masu cikin zauren akwatin bayani. Tuna fara jujjuyawan zauren akwatin bayani, a cikinsa misalin ayuka na gaba a gaba, ko kuma mu sami tsari masu iya cikakken daidai na mazaɓa, kuma ka gane cewa wannan tekinci na kanana mai kyau ga fassarar. Ana iya ƙayyade kodi da danne-danne.', 'sk': 'Veliko človeškega dialoga poteka v polsodelovalnih okoljih, kjer se agenti z različnimi cilji poskušajo dogovoriti o skupnih odločitvah. Pogajanja zahtevajo kompleksne sposobnosti komuniciranja in razmišljanja, vendar je uspeh enostavno meriti, zaradi česar je to zanimiva naloga za umetno inteligenco. Zbiramo velik nabor podatkov o pogajanjih med človekom in človekom o večtematski pogajalski nalogi, kjer morajo agenti, ki ne morejo opazovati funkcij nagrajevanja drug drugega, doseči dogovor (ali dogovor) prek dialoga o naravnem jeziku. Prvič pokažemo, da je mogoče usposabljati celovite modele za pogajanja, ki se morajo naučiti tako jezikovnih kot različnih veščin brez označevanja dialoga. Predstavljamo tudi vzpostavitve dialoga, v katerih model načrtuje vnaprej s simuliranjem možnih popolnih nadaljevanj pogovora, in ugotovimo, da ta tehnika dramatično izboljšuje zmogljivost. Naša koda in nabor podatkov so javno dostopni.', 'jv': 'dialog Rasane dipun ajeng kelompok komunikasi lan akeh sampeyan nesaturan, njuk susahe gampang kanggo meh, nggawe iki task sing apik kanggo AI. Awak dhéwé pisan akeh dataset sing nggawe perusahaan-wong liyane karo negoro multi-perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang dagatan, winih dhéwé ngubah apakno sing or a bisa nguasai perusahaan karo perusahaan winih sing kudu nggawe ngubah barêng langkung Awak dhéwé, kita ngomong nik akeh iso nggawe model sing beraksi merupa-merupa kanggo pisan negoro, olèhku kudu isih tindang karo akeh basa sing apik dhéwé, ora tau ngerasakno sing apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntukno nggawe dialog dolanan, ning akeh model sing beraksi perusahaan kanggo nguasai barang nggawe barang nggawe, lan ijol-ijol kuwi teknik iki dadi apik sing bisa dianggap kanggo dianggap. Awak dhéwé karo dataset kang publik gawe', 'bo': 'མིའི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་ཕྱོགས་མཐུན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་agents with different goals try to agree on common decisions. Negatiations requires complex communication and reasoning skills, but success is easy to measure, making this a interesting task for AI. ང་ཚོས་མི་དང་མི་རྣམས་ལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཆ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་དགོས། སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་གཏོང་ནི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་སྣང་གླེང་མོལ་ལས་མིང་དཔེ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཅིག་གསར་གཏོང་བྱེད་པའི་མི་རྣམས་ལས་འགྲོ་སྣང་ཡ ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN for Safe and Efficient On-line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'fr': "DQN de décrochage sensible à l'agent pour un apprentissage des politiques de dialogue en ligne sûr et efficace", 'pt': 'DQN de abandono consciente do agente para aprendizado de políticas de diálogo on-line seguro e eficiente', 'es': 'DQN de abandono consciente de los agentes para un aprendizaje seguro y eficiente de políticas de diálogo en línea', 'ru': 'DQN для безопасного и эффективного обучения политике онлайнового диалога', 'zh': '摄感知 Dropout DQN,用于安高效之在线', 'ar': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN من أجل تعلم نهج الحوار عبر الإنترنت بشكل آمن وفعال', 'ja': '安全で効率的なオンライン対話ポリシー学習のためのエージェント意識のあるドロップアウトDQN', 'hi': 'एजेंट-जागरूक ड्रॉपआउट DQN सुरक्षित और कुशल ऑनलाइन संवाद नीति सीखने के लिए', 'ga': 'DQN Fágtha Amach Gníomhaire le haghaidh Foghlama Beartais Idirphlé Ar Líne atá Sábháilte agus Éifeachtúil', 'ka': 'ადგინტის დააცნობა DQN დასრულებელი და ეფექტიური დიალოგის პოლიტიკის სწავლებისთვის', 'el': 'Για ασφαλή και αποτελεσματική εκμάθηση πολιτικής διαλόγου σε απευθείας σύνδεση', 'hu': 'Az ügynöktudatos DQN bevezetése a biztonságos és hatékony online párbeszéd irányelvek tanulásáért', 'it': 'Dropout DQN consapevole degli agenti per un apprendimento sicuro ed efficiente delle politiche di dialogo on-line', 'mk': 'ДКН за безбедно и ефикасно учење на онлајн дијалог', 'lt': 'Agent ų sąmoningas nepakankamas DQN saugiam ir veiksmingam dialogo politikos mokymuisi internete', 'ms': 'Comment', 'ml': 'സുരക്ഷിതമായ ഡിക്യൂണിനും സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് പോളിസി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും ഏജന്\u200dറ് അറിയുന്ന ഡിക', 'mn': 'Агент-Aware Dropout DQN for Safe and Effective On line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'no': 'Læring av politikk for trygg og effektiv online dialogvindauge', 'pl': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN dla bezpiecznego i skutecznego uczenia się polityki dialogu online', 'ro': 'Dezvoltarea DQN conștientă de agenți pentru învățarea politicilor de dialog on-line sigură și eficientă', 'kk': 'Желіде қауіпсіздік және әсер етпейтін диалог ережесін оқыту', 'sr': 'DQN za učenje politike o bezbednoj i efikasnoj online dijalogu', 'si': 'ආරක්ෂාත්මක සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජක සංවාදය පොලිසි ඉගෙනගන්න නියෝජිත විස්තර DQN', 'so': 'Agent-aware Dropout DQN for Safe and Effective On-line Dialog Learning', 'sv': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN för säker och effektiv online dialog policy lärande', 'ta': 'பாது', 'mt': 'Id-DQN tat-Tagħlim tal-Politika dwar id-Djalogu Onlajn Sikur u Effiċjenti li Jingħata Għarfien mill-Aġenziji', 'ur': 'ایجنٹ-Aware Dropout DQN for Safe and Efficient On line Dialog Policy Learning', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Đặc vụ-Biết bỏ QN cho chương trình ngôn ngữ an toàn và hiệu quả', 'nl': 'Agent-aware Dropout DQN voor veilig en efficiënt online dialoogbeleid leren', 'da': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN for sikker og effektiv online dialog politik læring', 'bg': 'Отказване на ДКН за безопасен и ефективен онлайн диалог Учене на политики', 'id': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN for Safe and Efficient On-line Dialogue Policy Learning', 'de': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN für sicheres und effizientes Online-Dialoglernen', 'ko': '안전하고 효율적인 온라인 채팅 정책 학습을 위한 에이전트 인식 중퇴 DQN', 'tr': 'Güvenlik we ýeterlik online Dialoog Politiki öwrenmek üçin Ajan-Saýlaw', 'hr': 'DQN za učenje politike o sigurnoj i učinkovitoj online dijalogu', 'sw': 'DQN kwa ajili ya ulinzi na Kusaidia Sera ya Dialogu Mtandaoni', 'af': 'Agent- Aware Dropout DQN for Safe and Efficient On- line Dialog Policy Learning', 'sq': 'DQN e njohur nga agjenti për mësimin e politikës së dialogut në internet të sigurtë dhe efikase', 'fa': 'DQN برای یادگیری سیاست\u200cهای صندوق صندوق امن و فعال در خط', 'am': 'የመስጠት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'নিরাপদ এবং কার্যকর অনলাইন ডায়ালগ নীতি শিক্ষার জন্য এজেন্ট- ওয়াক্ট ডিকিউএন ডিপুট ডিকিউএন', 'cs': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN pro bezpečné a efektivní on-line dialogové učení politiky', 'ca': "L'Agent Aware Dropout DQN per aprendre política de diàleg on-line segura i eficient", 'et': 'Agent-teadlik loobumine DQN ohutu ja tõhusa on-line dialoogi poliitika õppimine', 'fi': 'Agenttitietoinen luopuminen DQN:stä turvalliseen ja tehokkaaseen online-dialogiin Politiikan oppimiseen', 'bs': 'DQN za učenje politike o bezbednoj i učinkovitoj online dijalogu', 'az': 'Agent-Aware Dropout DQN t톛hl칲k톛sizlik v톛 effektiv online Dialog Siyas캼 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n', 'he': 'DQN מודע לסוכן הוריד ללמוד מדיניות שיחה ברשת בטוחה ויעילה', 'ha': 'QN', 'sk': 'DQN, ki se zaveda agentov za varno in učinkovito učenje politik v spletnem dialogu', 'bo': 'ཚགས་མོ་སྟོང་པ་ནི་བདེ་འཇགས་དང་སྐྱོན་རུང་བའི་DQN', 'jv': 'Ajan-Awar DroPout DqN kanggo Keamanan lan Efeffent online Dialog policy Learning'}
{'en': 'Hand-crafted rules and reinforcement learning (RL) are two popular choices to obtain dialogue policy. The rule-based policy is often reliable within predefined scope but not self-adaptable, whereas RL is evolvable with data but often suffers from a bad initial performance. We employ a companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialogue policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a teacher and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards. A novel agent-aware dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) is proposed to address the problem of when to consult the teacher and how to learn from the teacher’s experiences. AAD-DQN, as a data-driven student policy, provides (1) two separate experience memories for student and teacher, (2) an uncertainty estimated by dropout to control the timing of consultation and learning. Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safetyand efficiency of on-line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialogue corpus.companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialogue policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a “teacher” and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards. A novel agent-aware dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) is proposed to address the problem of when to consult the teacher and how to learn from the teacher’s experiences. AAD-DQN, as a data-driven student policy, provides (1) two separate experience memories for student and teacher, (2) an uncertainty estimated by dropout to control the timing of consultation and learning. Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safety\n\nand efficiency of on-line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialogue corpus. ', 'ar': 'القواعد المصممة يدويًا والتعلم المعزز (RL) هما خياران شائعان للحصول على سياسة الحوار. غالبًا ما تكون السياسة المستندة إلى القواعد موثوقة ضمن نطاق محدد مسبقًا ولكنها غير قابلة للتكيف ذاتيًا ، في حين أن RL قابلة للتطور مع البيانات ولكنها غالبًا ما تعاني من الأداء الأولي السيئ. نحن نستخدم إطارًا تعليميًا مصاحبًا لدمج المقاربتين لتعلم سياسة الحوار عبر الإنترنت ، حيث تعمل السياسة القائمة على القواعد المحددة مسبقًا كـ "مدرس" وتوجه نظام RL المستند إلى البيانات من خلال إعطاء أمثلة على الإجراءات وكذلك مكافآت إضافية. تم اقتراح برنامج Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) المبتكر المدرك للوكيل لمعالجة مشكلة وقت استشارة المعلم وكيفية التعلم من تجارب المعلم. توفر AAD-DQN ، كسياسة طلابية تعتمد على البيانات ، (1) ذكريات تجربة منفصلة للطالب والمعلم ، (2) حالة عدم يقين تقدر بالتسرب للتحكم في توقيت الاستشارة والتعلم. أظهرت تجارب المحاكاة أن النهج المقترح يمكن أن يحسن بشكل كبير كلاً من سلامة وكفاءة تحسين السياسة عبر الإنترنت مقارنةً بمناهج التعلم المصاحبة الأخرى بالإضافة إلى التدريب المسبق الخاضع للإشراف باستخدام مجموعة الحوار الثابت.', 'es': 'Las reglas hechas a mano y el aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL) son dos opciones populares para obtener una política de diálogo. La política basada en reglas a menudo es confiable dentro de un alcance predefinido, pero no se puede adaptar a sí misma, mientras que la RL puede evolucionar con los datos, pero a menudo sufre de un mal rendimiento inicial. Empleamos un marco de aprendizaje complementario para integrar los dos enfoques para el aprendizaje de políticas de diálogo en línea, en el que una política predefinida basada en reglas actúa como «maestra» y guía un sistema de RL basado en datos al dar acciones de ejemplo y recompensas adicionales. Se propone una novedosa Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) para abordar el problema de cuándo consultar al maestro y cómo aprender de las experiencias del maestro. La AAD-DQN, como política estudiantil basada en datos, proporciona (1) dos recuerdos de experiencias diferentes para el estudiante y el profesor, (2) una incertidumbre estimada por la deserción escolar para controlar el momento de la consulta y el aprendizaje. Los experimentos de simulación mostraron que el enfoque propuesto puede mejorar significativamente tanto la seguridad como la eficiencia de la optimización de políticas en línea en comparación con otros enfoques de aprendizaje complementarios, así como la capacitación previa supervisada mediante el uso de un corpus de diálogo estático.', 'fr': "Les règles artisanales et l'apprentissage par renforcement (RL) sont deux choix populaires pour obtenir une politique de dialogue. La stratégie basée sur des règles est souvent fiable dans un périmètre prédéfini mais n'est pas auto-adaptable, tandis que RL peut évoluer avec les données mais souffre souvent de mauvaises performances initiales. Nous utilisons un cadre d'apprentissage complémentaire pour intégrer les deux approches pour l'apprentissage des politiques de dialogue en ligne, dans lequel une politique prédéfinie basée sur des règles agit comme un «\xa0enseignant\xa0» et guide un système de RL basé sur les données en donnant des exemples d'actions ainsi que des récompenses supplémentaires. Un nouveau réseau Deep Q-DQN (AAD-DQN) est proposé pour résoudre le problème du moment où consulter l'enseignant et de la manière d'apprendre de ses expériences. L'AAD-DQN, en tant que politique des étudiants axée sur les données, fournit (1) deux souvenirs d'expérience distincts pour l'étudiant et l'enseignant, (2) une incertitude estimée par l'abandon afin de contrôler le moment de la consultation et de l'apprentissage. Des expériences de simulation ont montré que l'approche proposée peut améliorer considérablement la sécurité et l'efficacité de l'optimisation des politiques en ligne par rapport à d'autres approches d'apprentissage complémentaires ainsi qu'à la pré-formation supervisée utilisant un corpus de dialogue statique.", 'pt': 'Regras artesanais e aprendizado por reforço (RL) são duas escolhas populares para obter uma política de diálogo. A política baseada em regras geralmente é confiável dentro do escopo predefinido, mas não é autoadaptável, enquanto a RL pode evoluir com dados, mas geralmente sofre com um desempenho inicial ruim. Empregamos uma estrutura de aprendizado complementar para integrar as duas abordagens para o aprendizado de políticas de diálogo on-line, em que uma política predefinida baseada em regras atua como um “professor” e orienta um sistema de RL orientado por dados, dando exemplos de ações, bem como recompensas adicionais. Uma nova Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) de abandono consciente do agente é proposta para resolver o problema de quando consultar o professor e como aprender com as experiências do professor. AAD-DQN, como uma política estudantil orientada por dados, fornece (1) duas memórias de experiência separadas para aluno e professor, (2) uma incerteza estimada pela desistência para controlar o tempo de consulta e aprendizado. Experimentos de simulação mostraram que a abordagem proposta pode melhorar significativamente a segurança e a eficiência da otimização de políticas on-line em comparação com outras abordagens de aprendizado complementares, bem como o pré-treinamento supervisionado usando corpus de diálogo estático.', 'ja': '手作りのルールと強化学習（ RL ）は、対話方針を得るための2つの人気のある選択肢です。 ルールベースのポリシーは、多くの場合、事前定義された範囲内で信頼性がありますが、自己適応性はありません。一方、RLはデータを使用して進化可能ですが、多くの場合、初期パフォーマンスが悪いことがあります。 私たちは、事前に定義されたルールベースのポリシーが「教師」として機能し、例示的なアクションと追加の報酬を与えることによってデータ駆動型RLシステムを導く、オンライン対話ポリシー学習のための2つのアプローチを統合するためのコンパニオンラーニングフレームワークを採用しています。 エージェントを意識した新規のドロップアウトDeep Q - Network （ AAD - DQN ）は、教師に相談するタイミングと、教師の経験から学ぶ方法の問題に対処するために提案されている。 AAD - DQNは、データ主導型の学習者ポリシーとして、（ 1 ）学習者と教師のための2つの別々の経験記憶、（ 2 ）相談と学習のタイミングを制御するために中退によって推定される不確実性を提供する。 シミュレーション実験では、提案されたアプローチは、他のコンパニオンラーニングアプローチと比較して、オンラインポリシー最適化の安全性と効率性の両方と、静的対話コーパスを使用した監視された事前トレーニングの両方を大幅に向上させることができることが示された。', 'zh': '手工之法,与化学(RL)得对策之二行也。 盖规矩之策,常于定义之内可恃,而不能自应,而RL可随数而至,常被不良之始。 吾用配套学框架以整合在线二术,其预定义之政为师,因示例操作及额外奖励以导数驱RL之统。 立新知辍学者Deep Q-Network(AAD-DQN)以决问师及所受业。 AAD-DQN以数驱生之政,供两独立之记,(2)辍学度之不确定性,以制咨习之期。 仿真实验明,比于他学,所以昭著在线策优化之安全性效率,及以静对语料库监预训练。', 'hi': 'हाथ से तैयार किए गए नियम और सुदृढीकरण सीखने (आरएल) संवाद नीति प्राप्त करने के लिए दो लोकप्रिय विकल्प हैं। नियम-आधारित नीति अक्सर पूर्वनिर्धारित दायरे के भीतर विश्वसनीय होती है, लेकिन आत्म-अनुकूलनीय नहीं होती है, जबकि आरएल डेटा के साथ evolvable है, लेकिन अक्सर खराब प्रारंभिक प्रदर्शन से ग्रस्त होती है। हम ऑनलाइन संवाद नीति सीखने के लिए दो दृष्टिकोणों को एकीकृत करने के लिए एक साथी सीखने के ढांचे को नियोजित करते हैं, जिसमें एक पूर्व-परिभाषित नियम-आधारित नीति "शिक्षक" के रूप में कार्य करती है और उदाहरण कार्यों के साथ-साथ अतिरिक्त पुरस्कार देकर डेटा-संचालित आरएल सिस्टम का मार्गदर्शन करती है। एक उपन्यास एजेंट-जागरूक ड्रॉपआउट डीप क्यू-नेटवर्क (एएडी-डीक्यूएन) को इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है कि शिक्षक से कब परामर्श करना है और शिक्षक के अनुभवों से कैसे सीखना है। AAD-DQN, एक डेटा-संचालित छात्र नीति के रूप में, (1) छात्र और शिक्षक के लिए दो अलग-अलग अनुभव यादें प्रदान करता है, (2) परामर्श और सीखने के समय को नियंत्रित करने के लिए ड्रॉपआउट द्वारा अनुमानित अनिश्चितता। सिमुलेशन प्रयोगों से पता चला है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण अन्य साथी सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के साथ-साथ स्थैतिक संवाद कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके पर्यवेक्षित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण की तुलना में ऑनलाइन नीति अनुकूलन की सुरक्षा और दक्षता दोनों में काफी सुधार कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Правила, разработанные вручную, и обучение подкреплению (RL) являются двумя популярными вариантами политики диалога. Политика, основанная на правилах, часто является надежной в заранее определенных рамках, но не может быть адаптирована самостоятельно, в то время как RL развивается с помощью данных, но часто страдает от плохой первоначальной производительности. Мы используем систему сопутствующего обучения для интеграции двух подходов к обучению политике онлайн-диалога, в которой заранее определенная основанная на правилах политика действует в качестве «учителя» и направляет систему RL, основанную на данных, предоставляя примеры действий, а также дополнительные вознаграждения. Для решения проблемы, когда консультироваться с учителем и как учиться на опыте учителя, предлагается новая Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN). AAD-DQN, как политика учащихся, основанная на данных, обеспечивает (1) два отдельных воспоминания об опыте для студента и учителя, (2) неопределенность, оцениваемую по отсеву, чтобы контролировать время консультаций и обучения. Эксперименты по моделированию показали, что предлагаемый подход может значительно повысить как безопасность, так и эффективность оптимизации политики в режиме онлайн по сравнению с другими методами сопутствующего обучения, а также контролируемого предварительного обучения с использованием корпуса статического диалога.', 'ga': 'Dhá rogha a bhfuil an-tóir orthu chun beartas idirphlé a fháil is ea rialacha lámhdhéanta agus foghlaim atreisithe. Is minic a bhíonn an beartas atá bunaithe ar rialacha iontaofa laistigh de raon feidhme réamhshainithe ach níl sé féin-inoiriúnaithe, ach is féidir RL a athrú le sonraí ach is minic a bhíonn drochfheidhmíocht tosaigh aige. Bainimid úsáid as creat foghlama compánach chun an dá chur chuige d’fhoghlaim beartais idirphlé ar líne a chomhtháthú, ina bhfeidhmíonn beartas réamhshainithe bunaithe ar rialacha mar “mhúinteoir” agus a threoraíonn córas RL bunaithe ar shonraí trí ghníomhaíochtaí eiseamláireacha a thabhairt chomh maith le. luach saothair breise. Táthar ag moladh go n-íosfadh an gníomhaire Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) nua chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb maidir le cathain is ceart dul i gcomhairle leis an múinteoir agus conas foghlaim ó thaithí an mhúinteora. Soláthraíonn AAD-DQN, mar bheartas mac léinn atá bunaithe ar shonraí, (1) dhá chuimhní taithí ar leith don mhac léinn agus don mhúinteoir, (2) éiginnteacht a mheastar ag titim amach chun uainiú an chomhairliúcháin agus na foghlama a rialú. Léiríodh i dturgnaimh ionsamhlúcháin gur féidir leis an gcur chuige atá beartaithe feabhas suntasach a chur ar shábháilteacht agus ar éifeachtúlacht bharrfheabhsú beartais ar líne i gcomparáid le cineálacha cur chuige comhfhoghlama eile chomh maith le réamhoiliúint maoirsithe ag baint úsáide as corpas idirphlé statach.', 'ka': 'პრობლური წესები და სწავლების სწავლება (RL) არის ორი პობლური მონიშნე დიალოგის პოლიტიკის მიღება. პოლიტიკის განსაზღვრებული პოლიტიკი ძალიან დარწმუნებელია წინ განსაზღვრებული სკოფონტში, მაგრამ არა თავიდასაზღვრებელია, მაგრამ RL მონაცემებით განვითარებელია, მა ჩვენ მომხმარებელი სწავლის ფრამეტრის გამოყენება, რომელიც წინ განსაზღვრებული პოლიტიკის სწავლებისთვის ორი პროგრამის ინტერგურაციას, რომელიც წინ განსაზღვრებული პოლიტიკის პოლიტიკის განსაზღვრებული პოლიტიკის პ პრომენტური ადვნენტის აცნობიერებელი დიდი Q-ქსელი (AAD-DQN) უნდა წარმოიდგინოთ პრობლემას, როდესაც მასწავლებელი კონსონტურაციას და როგორ მასწავლებელი გამოცდილებებიდა AAD-DQN, როგორც მონაცემების სტუდენტის პოლიტიკა, უნდა (1) ორი განსხვავებული მოცემები სტუდენტის და სტუდენტის მოცემებისთვის, 2) სტუდენტის და სტუდენტის განსხვავებული მოცემების სიმულაციის ექსპერიმენტები გაჩვენეთ, რომ პროგრამები შეუძლია მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფ', 'hu': 'A kézzel készített szabályok és a megerősítő tanulás (RL) két népszerű választás a párbeszédpolitika megszerzéséhez. A szabályalapú politika gyakran előre meghatározott hatályban megbízható, de nem önalkalmazkodó, míg az RL adatokkal fejleszthető, de gyakran rossz kezdeti teljesítménytől szenved. Az online párbeszédpolitikai tanulás két megközelítésének integrálására egy kísérő tanulási keretet alkalmazunk, amelyben egy előre meghatározott szabályalapú politika "tanárként" működik, és példaintézkedésekkel és további jutalmakkal irányítja az adatközpontú RL rendszert. A Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) egy új ügynöktudatos kilépést javasolt, amely megoldja, hogy mikor kell konzultálni a tanárral, és hogyan kell tanulni a tanár tapasztalataiból. Az AAD-DQN, mint adatközpontú hallgatói politika (1) két különálló tapasztalatemléket biztosít a hallgató és a tanár számára, (2) a lemaradás által becsült bizonytalanságot a konzultáció és a tanulás időzítésének szabályozása érdekében. A szimulációs kísérletek azt mutatták, hogy a javasolt megközelítés jelentősen javíthatja az online szakpolitikai optimalizálás biztonságát és hatékonyságát más társ tanulási megközelítésekhez képest, valamint statikus párbeszédkorpusz segítségével felügyelt előképzést.', 'el': 'Οι χειροποίητοι κανόνες και η ενισχυτική μάθηση είναι δύο δημοφιλείς επιλογές για την επίτευξη πολιτικής διαλόγου. Η πολιτική που βασίζεται σε κανόνες είναι συχνά αξιόπιστη εντός προκαθορισμένου πεδίου, αλλά δεν είναι αυτοπροσαρμόσιμη, ενώ η RL είναι εξελισσόμενη με δεδομένα, αλλά συχνά πάσχει από κακή αρχική απόδοση. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα πλαίσιο συνοδευτικής μάθησης για να ενσωματώσουμε τις δύο προσεγγίσεις για την εκμάθηση πολιτικής διαλόγου σε απευθείας σύνδεση, στο οποίο μια προκαθορισμένη πολιτική βασισμένη σε κανόνες ενεργεί ως "δάσκαλος" και καθοδηγεί ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στα δεδομένα δίνοντας παραδειγματικές δράσεις καθώς και πρόσθετες ανταμοιβές. Προτείνεται να αντιμετωπιστεί το πρόβλημα του πότε πρέπει να συμβουλευτείτε τον δάσκαλο και πώς να μάθετε από τις εμπειρίες του εκπαιδευτικού. Το AAD-DQN, ως μια βασισμένη σε δεδομένα πολιτική φοιτητών, παρέχει (1) δύο ξεχωριστές αναμνήσεις εμπειρίας για τον μαθητή και τον δάσκαλο, (2) μια αβεβαιότητα που εκτιμάται από την εγκατάλειψη για τον έλεγχο του χρόνου διαβούλευσης και μάθησης. Τα πειράματα προσομοίωσης έδειξαν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση μπορεί να βελτιώσει σημαντικά τόσο την ασφάλεια όσο και την αποτελεσματικότητα της βελτιστοποίησης της πολιτικής σε σχέση με άλλες προσεγγίσεις συνοδευτικής μάθησης, καθώς και την εποπτευόμενη προεκπαίδευση χρησιμοποιώντας στατικό σώμα διαλόγου.', 'kk': 'Қол құрылған ережелер және оқыту (RL) деңгейі - диалог ережелерін алу үшін екі таңдау. Еректер негіздеген саясаты көбінесе алдын- ала анықталған сәйкестіктерде сенімді, бірақ өзінің өзінің адаптациясы болмайды, бірақ RL деректермен өзгертуге болады, бірақ көбінесе баста Біз онлайн диалог ережесін оқыту үшін екі арқылы біріктіру үшін біріктірушілер оқыту бағдарламасын қолданамыз. Бұл үшін алдын- ала анықталған ережелер негіздеген ережелер "мұғалім" ретінде әрекет етіп, мәселелер мен қо Роман агенттің түсінікті түсінікті Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) мұғалімінің тәжірибесінен қазір оқыту және мұғалім тәжірибесінен оқыту мәселесін шешуге болады. АAD-DQN, деректерді бағыттау студенттердің саясаты ретінде (1) студенттер мен мұғалім үшін екі бөлек тәжірибе жады береді, (2) консультациялау мен оқыту уақытын басқару үшін бағытталған тәжірибесін Симуляциялау тәжірибелері таңдалған тәжірибе жұмыс саясаттарының қауіпсіздігін және ең әсер ететін оптимизациясын басқа компаниялық оқыту арқылы және статикалық диалог корпус арқылы бақылау арқылы', 'lt': 'Rankinės praktikos taisyklės ir mokymosi stiprinimas yra du populiarūs dialogo politikos pasirinkimai. Taisyklėmis grindžiama politika dažnai yra patikima iš anksto apibrėžtoje taikymo srityje, tačiau nepritaikytina savarankiškai, o RL kinta naudojant duomenis, tačiau dažnai kenčia nuo prastų pradinių rezultatų. Mes naudojame partnerių mokymosi sistemą, kad integruotume du internetinio dialogo politikos mokymosi metodus, kuriuose iš anksto apibrėžta taisyklėmis grindžiama politika veikia kaip „mokytojas“ ir vadovauja duomenų grindžiamai RL sistemai, pavyzdžiui, teikiant veiksmus ir papildomą atlygį. Siekiant spręsti klausimą, kada konsultuotis su mokytoju ir kaip mokytis iš mokytojo patirties, siūloma sukurti naują „gilaus Q“ tinklą (AAD-DQN). AAD-DQN, kaip duomenų grindžiama student ų politika, suteikia (1) dvi atskiras patirties atmintis studentams ir mokytojams, (2) neapibrėžtį, apskaičiuotą baigiant mokytis, siekiant kontroliuoti konsultacijų ir mokymosi laikotarpį. Simuliaciniai eksperimentai parodė, kad siūlomas metodas gali gerokai pagerinti internetinės politikos optimizacijos saugą ir veiksmingumą, palyginti su kitais partnerių mokymosi metodais, taip pat prižiūrimą pasirengimą mokymui naudojant statinį dialogo korpusą.', 'it': 'Le regole artigianali e l\'apprendimento di rinforzo (RL) sono due scelte popolari per ottenere una politica di dialogo. La politica basata su regole è spesso affidabile all\'interno di un ambito predefinito, ma non auto-adattabile, mentre RL è evolvibile con i dati, ma spesso soffre di cattive prestazioni iniziali. Utilizziamo un framework di apprendimento complementare per integrare i due approcci per l\'apprendimento delle politiche di dialogo on-line, in cui una politica predefinita basata su regole agisce da "insegnante" e guida un sistema RL basato sui dati fornendo azioni di esempio e ricompense aggiuntive. Viene proposto un nuovo dropout consapevole dell\'agente Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) per affrontare il problema di quando consultare l\'insegnante e come imparare dalle esperienze dell\'insegnante. AAD-DQN, come politica degli studenti basata sui dati, fornisce (1) due memorie di esperienza separate per studente e insegnante, (2) un\'incertezza stimata dall\'abbandono per controllare i tempi della consultazione e dell\'apprendimento. Gli esperimenti di simulazione hanno dimostrato che l\'approccio proposto può migliorare significativamente sia la sicurezza che l\'efficienza dell\'ottimizzazione delle politiche on-line rispetto ad altri approcci di apprendimento complementare, sia la pre-formazione supervisionata utilizzando corpus di dialogo statico.', 'mk': "Ручните правила и зајакнувањето на учењето (РЛ) се два популарни избори за добивање политика на дијалог. Политиката базирана на правилата честопати е доверлива во преддефинираниот опфат, но не самоадаптабилна, додека РL е еволуцирана со податоци, но честопати страда од лоша иницијална перформанса. We employ a companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialogue policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a 'teacher' and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards.  Предложено е ново отпуштање на длабоката Q-Network (AAD-DQN) со свесност на агентот за решавање на проблемот со тоа кога да се консултира со професорот и како да се научи од искуствата на професорот. ААД-ДКН, како политика на студенти подготвена од податоци, обезбедува (1) две одделни спомени за искуство за студентите и учителите, (2) несигурност проценета со прекинување на контролата на времето на консултацијата и учењето. Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safetyand efficiency of on-line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialogue corpus.", 'ms': "Peraturan buatan tangan dan pembelajaran penyokong (RL) adalah dua pilihan popular untuk mendapatkan polisi dialog. Polisi berdasarkan peraturan sering boleh dipercayai dalam skop terdefinisi tetapi tidak boleh menyesuaikan diri sendiri, manakala RL boleh berevolusi dengan data tetapi sering menderita dari prestasi awal yang teruk. We employ a companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialogue policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a 'teacher' and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards.  Rangkaian Q-Deep (AAD-DQN) ditolak untuk mengatasi masalah bila untuk berkonsultasi dengan guru dan bagaimana untuk belajar dari pengalaman guru. AAD-DQN, sebagai kebijakan pelajar dipandu data, menyediakan (1) dua kenangan pengalaman terpisah untuk pelajar dan guru, (2) ketidakpastian yang diharapkan oleh keluar untuk mengawal masa konsultasi dan belajar. Eksperimen simulasi menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan boleh meningkatkan keselamatan dan efisiensi optimasi polisi on line dibandingkan dengan pendekatan pelajaran rakan lain serta pralatihan yang diawasi menggunakan korpus dialog statik.", 'ml': 'കൈകൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള നിയമങ്ങളും പഠനത്തിന്റെ ശക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുവാനും (RL) രണ്ടു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നിയമപ്രകാരം മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്കോപ്പില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടുകാരന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഒരു നിയമവിധി നിയമപരിശീല പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രണ്ട് വഴികള്\u200d ഒന്നിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഏജന്\u200dറ് അറിയുന്ന ആഴത്തിലെ ക്യൂ-നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് (AAD-DQN) പ്രശ്നം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ടീച്ചറുടെ അനുഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും എങ്ങനെ പഠിക്കാന AAD-DQN വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന പോലീസിയായി വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിയും ടീച്ചരും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d  സിമുലേഷന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രായോഗ്രിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത് ലൈന്\u200d പോലീസിയുടെ സുരക്ഷിതമാ', 'mt': "Ir-regoli maħduma bl-idejn u t-tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar (RL) huma żewġ għażliet popolari biex tinkiseb politika ta’ djalogu. Il-politika bbażata fuq ir-regoli ta’ spiss hija affidabbli fi ħdan ambitu ddefinit minn qabel iżda mhux awtoadaptabbli, filwaqt li l-RL hija evolvibbli bid-dejta iżda spiss tbati minn prestazzjoni inizjali ħa żina. Aħna nużaw qafas ta' tagħlim ta' akkumpanjament biex nintegraw iż-żewġ approċċi għat-tagħlim tal-politika ta' djalogu onlajn, li fihom politika bbażata fuq ir-regoli definita minn qabel taġixxi bħala 'għalliema' u tiggwida sistema ta' RL immexxija mid-dejta billi tagħti eżempju ta' azzjonijiet kif ukoll premjijiet addizzjonali. Qed jiġi propost li jitwaqqaf netwerk ta’ kwestjonijiet profondi (AAD-DQN) ġdid li jkun konxju mill-aġenti biex jindirizza l-problema ta’ meta wieħed għandu jikkonsulta lill-għalliema u kif wieħed jitgħallem mill-esperjenzi tal-għalliema. AAD-DQN, as a data-driven student policy, provides (1) two separate experience memories for student and teacher, (2) an uncertainty estimated by dropout to control the timing of consultation and learning.  L-esperimenti ta’ simulazzjoni wrew li l-approċċ propost jista’ jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti kemm is-sikurezza kif ukoll l-effiċjenza tal-ottimizzazzjoni tal-politika onlajn meta mqabbel ma’ approċċi oħra ta’ tagħlim ta’ akkompanjament kif ukoll taħriġ minn qabel sorveljat bl-użu ta’ korpus ta’ djalogu statiku.", 'mn': "Гараа бүтээгдэхүүний хууль болон суралцах (RL) нь диалог бодлогыг олох хоёр алдартай сонголт юм. Хувьсгал дээр суурилсан бодлого ихэвчлэн өмнө тодорхойлогдсон хэмжээнд итгэлтэй байдаг, гэхдээ өөртөө зохицуулж чадахгүй байдаг. Гэхдээ РЛ өгөгдлийн хувьд хөгжүүлж чадах ч ихэвчл Бид хамтрагчдын суралцах системийг ашиглан шулууны диалог бодлогын суралцах хоёр арга замыг нэгтгэхэд хэрэглэдэг. Үүнээс урьд тодорхойлсон дүрмийн үндсэн бодлого нь 'багш' гэж ажиллаж, өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөнтэй РЛ системийг жишээ, нэмэлт Шинэ агент мэддэг гүн гүнзгий Q-Network (AAD-DQN) багш нарын туршлагаас хэрхэн зөвшөөрөх болон багш нарын туршлагаас суралцах асуудлыг хэлэхэд санал өгсөн. АAD-DQN, өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөнтэй оюутнуудын бодлогын хувьд, оюутнууд болон багш нарын хоёр ялгаатай туршлагатай дурсамж (1) гаргадаг, (2) зөвлөгөө болон суралцах цаг хянахын тулд тодорхойгүй байдал юм. Тайлбарлах туршилтууд нь санал өгсөн арга зам нь шулууны бодлогын аюулгүй байдал болон үр дүнтэй сайжруулах боломжтой байдал, бусад хамтрагчдын суралцах арга зам болон статикийн диалог корпус ашигласнаас харьцуулахын тулд хамгийн", 'no': 'Håndkopla reglar og stipringslæring (RL) er to populære val for å få dialogpolitikk. Regelbaserte politikken er ofte tiltrulig i føredefinerte område, men ikkje sjølvtilpassabil, mens RL er utviklare med data, men ofte løysar frå ein dårlig oppstartsfunksjon. Vi bruker eit komponentslæringsrammeverk for å integrere dei to tilnærmingane for læring av dialogpolitikk på nettverk, der ein regelbasert politikk fungerer som ein «lærar» og returnerer ein datadrivt RL-system ved å gi eksempel-handlingar og tillegg. Eit novel agent-aware dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) er foreslått å handtera problemet på når læraren skal konsultera med læraren og korleis læra frå læraren sine erfaringar. AAD-DQN, som ein datadrivt studentpolitikk, tilbyr (1) to separate experience memories for student and teacher, (2) ein usikkerhet estimert av dropout for å kontrollera tiden for konsultasjon og læring. Simulasjonseksperimenter viste at den foreslåde tilnærminga kan betydelig forbedra både tryggleikskopi og effektiviteten av optimalisering på nettverkspolitikk i sammenlignet med andre tilnærmingar for læring av samarbeidsgradene og overvåking av føreøving ved bruk av statisk dialogkorpus.', 'pl': 'Ręcznie tworzone reguły i uczenie się wzmacniające (RL) to dwa popularne wybory w celu uzyskania polityki dialogu. Polityka oparta na regułach jest często wiarygodna w predefiniowanym zakresie, ale nie może się samodzielnie dostosowywać, natomiast RL może ewoluować w oparciu o dane, ale często cierpi na złe wyniki początkowe. Stosujemy ramy uczenia się towarzyszące, aby zintegrować dwa podejścia do uczenia się polityki dialogu on-line, w których wstępnie zdefiniowana polityka oparta na regułach działa jako "nauczyciel" i kieruje systemem RL opartym na danych poprzez podanie przykładowych działań oraz dodatkowych nagród. Proponuje się nową świadomą agentów rzucającą Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN), aby rozwiązać problem, kiedy należy skonsultować się z nauczycielem i jak uczyć się na doświadczeniach nauczyciela. AAD-DQN, jako polityka oparta na danych dla studentów, zapewnia (1) dwie oddzielne wspomnienia doświadczeń dla ucznia i nauczyciela, (2) niepewność oszacowaną przez końców w celu kontrolowania czasu konsultacji i uczenia się. Eksperymenty symulacyjne wykazały, że proponowane podejście może znacząco poprawić zarówno bezpieczeństwo, jak i efektywność optymalizacji polityki on-line w porównaniu z innymi metodami uczenia się towarzyszącego, jak również nadzorowane przedszkolenia przy użyciu statycznego korpusu dialogu.', 'sv': 'Handgjorda regler och förstärkt lärande (RL) är två populära val för att uppnå dialogpolitik. Den regelbaserade policyn är ofta tillförlitlig inom fördefinierad räckvidd men inte självanpassningsbar, medan RL kan utvecklas med data men ofta lider av dåliga initiala resultat. Vi använder ett ramverk för kompletterande lärande för att integrera de två tillvägagångssätten för online dialog policy learning, där en fördefinierad regelbaserad policy fungerar som en "lärare" och vägleder ett datadrivet RL-system genom att ge exempel åtgärder och ytterligare belöningar. Ett nytt agentmedvetet dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) föreslås för att ta itu med problemet med när läraren ska konsulteras och hur man lär sig av lärarens erfarenheter. AAD-DQN, som en datadriven studentpolicy, ger (1) två separata upplevelseminnen för elev och lärare, (2) en osäkerhet som uppskattas av avhopp för att kontrollera tidpunkten för samråd och lärande. Simuleringsexperiment visade att det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet avsevärt kan förbättra både säkerheten och effektiviteten i on-line policyoptimering jämfört med andra kompletterande inlärningsmetoder samt övervakad pre-training med hjälp av statisk dialogkorpus.', 'ro': 'Regulile realizate manual și învățarea de consolidare (RL) sunt două opțiuni populare pentru obținerea politicii de dialog. Politica bazată pe reguli este adesea fiabilă în cadrul domeniului de aplicare predefinit, dar nu se auto-adaptează, în timp ce RL poate evolua cu date, dar suferă adesea de o performanță inițială proastă. Utilizăm un cadru de învățare însoțitor pentru a integra cele două abordări pentru învățarea politicilor de dialog on-line, în care o politică predefinită bazată pe reguli acționează ca un "profesor" și ghidează un sistem RL bazat pe date, oferind exemplu de acțiuni, precum și recompense suplimentare. O nouă rețea Q profundă (AAD-DQN) este propusă pentru a aborda problema când să consulte profesorul și cum să învețe din experiențele profesorului. AAD-DQN, ca politică bazată pe date a studenților, oferă (1) două amintiri separate de experiență pentru elev și profesor, (2) o incertitudine estimată prin abandon pentru a controla timpul consultării și învățării. Experimentele de simulare au arătat că abordarea propusă poate îmbunătăţi semnificativ atât siguranţa, cât şi eficienţa optimizării politicilor on-line în comparaţie cu alte abordări de învăţare însoţitoare, cât şi cu pregătirea supravegheată folosind corpus de dialog static.', 'so': "Waxbarashada gacmaha ku shaqeeya iyo horumarinta waxbarashada (RL) waa laba doorasho oo aad u hesho siyaasadda dialogue. Ceymiska sharciga ku saleysan inta badan waa mid lagu aamin karo xiliga hore, laakiin ma suurtagal karo, waayo, RL wuxuu ku bedelaa macluumaad, laakiin inta badan wuxuu ku xanuunsadaa sameynta hore. Waxaan shaqaynaynaa iskuul waxbarasho oo saaxiib ah si aan u qabsato labada qaab oo ku habboon barashada qoraalka shabakadda, kaas oo uu horay u qoran siyaasada qaynuunka oo hore u qoran yahay 'macallin' oo lagu hago nidaamka RL-da lagu wado tusaale ahaan iyo abaalmarin dheeraad ah. Dalka warqada ee warqadda aqoon ka bixinaya Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) waxaa laga soo jeedaa in la sheekaysto dhibaatada goorma la talin karo macallinka iyo sida loo barto arimaha macallinka. AAD-DQN, sida siyaasada ardayda ee loo wado macluumaadka, wuxuu u fidiyaa (1) labo xasuus oo kala duduwan ee ardayda iyo macallinka, (2) taas oo lagu qiimeynayaa in la ilaaliyo waqtiga talobixinta iyo barashada. Imtixaanka similarintu waxay muuqatay in qaababka la soo jeeday ay aad u hagi karto ammaanka iyo faa’iidada kordhiska siyaasadda-line, barbarka waxbarashada kale ee iskuulka saaxiibka ah iyo sidoo kale korsashada iskuulka horumarinta ee isticmaalka diyaarinta ah.", 'sr': "Ručno napravljena pravila i učenje pojačanja (RL) su dva popularna izbora za dobivanje politike dijaloga. Pravilna politika je često pouzdana u predodređenoj oblasti, ali ne samouprilagodljiva, dok je RL evoluirala podacima, ali često pati od lošeg početnog izvođenja. Koristimo okvir učenja društva da integrišemo dva pristupa učenju politike o internetskom dijalogu, u kojem preddefinirana politika koja se temelji na pravilima čini kao 'učitelj' i vodi sistem RL podataka dajući primjerne akcije i dodatne nagrade. Predloženo je da se riješi problem kada da se konsultuju sa učiteljem i kako da nauči iz iskustva učitelja. AAD-DQN, kao studentska politika koja vodi podatke, pruža (1) dve odvojene uspomene iskustva za studente i učitelja, (2) nesigurnost koju procenjuje dropout da kontrolira vrijeme konsultacije i učenja. Simulacioni eksperimenti pokazali su da predloženi pristup može značajno poboljšati bezbednost i učinkovitost optimizacije politike na internetu u usporedbi s drugim pristupima učenja društva, kao i praćenim predobukom korpusom staničnog dijaloga.", 'si': 'Hand-craft නියෝජනය සහ උපදේශනය ඉගෙනීම (RL) දෙකක් තමයි සංවාද පාලනය ලැබීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිත විකල්පය දෙකක්  නීති අධාරිත පාලනය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙයි, ඒත් ස්වයංග්\u200dරායාත්මක වෙන්න පුළුවන් නෑ අපි යාළුවෙක් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් භාවිත කරනවා සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශයක් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශ අයිතිකාරියක් දැනගෙන හිටියේ ගුරුවර්ගේ අභිවේදනයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ කොහොමද ඉගෙන ගන්නේ. AAD-DQN, දත්ත ප්\u200dරධාන විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයා සිමුලේෂන් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් අනිත් සමාගමින් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළ', 'ur': "ہاتھ پیدا ہوئے قوانین اور مدد کی تعلیم (RL) دو محبوب انتخاب ہیں جنہیں دیالوگ پولیس حاصل کرنے کے لئے۔ قانون کی بنیاد پالیس کثرت سے پہلے مقرر کی سطح میں یقین رکھنے والی ہے لیکن خود اپنا اچھا اچھا نہیں ہے، حالانکہ RL ڈاٹا کے ساتھ تکامل کرنے والی ہے لیکن کثرت وقت برا پہلی عملکرد سے پڑتا ہے. ہم ایک ساتھی سیکھنے کا فرم استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ان دونوں طریقوں کو آنلاین ڈالیٹ پولیس سیکھنے کے لئے متصل کریں، جہاں ایک قانون بنیاد پالیس ایک 'استاد' کے طور پر عمل کرتا ہے اور ایک ڈیٹ چلنے والی RL سیستم کی ہدایت کرتا ہے مثال کے مطابق عمل اور اضافہ اجر دیتا ہے. ایک نو اگنٹ جاننے والے ڈروپوٹ ڈیپ کیو نیٹ ورک (AAD-DQN) کی مسئلہ کا جواب دینے کے لئے پیشنهاد کیا گیا ہے کہ جب استاد کی مشورت کریں اور استاد کے تجربے سے کیسے سیکھیں۔ AAD-DQN، ایک ڈیٹا چلنے والی طالبی پولیس کے طور پر، استاد اور استاد کے لئے دو مختلف تجربہ یاد کرتا ہے، 2) مشورات اور تعلیم کے وقت کا کنٹرول کرنے کے لئے ڈروپوٹ کے ذریعے ایک غیر قطعی مقرر کیا گیا ہے۔ Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safety and efficiency of on line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialog corpus.", 'ta': 'Hand-crafted rules and reinforcement learning (RL) are two popular choices to obtain dialogue policy.  விதிமுறையில் அடிப்படையான கொள்கை எப்பொழுதும் முன் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட தோற்றத்திற்குள் நம்பிக்கை இருக்கிறது, ஆனால் RL தரவுடன் மாற்ற நாங்கள் ஒரு நண்பர் கற்றல் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் இணைய உரையாடல் கொள்கையை கற்றுக்கான இரண்டு வழிகளை ஒன்றாக்குவதற்கு, அதில் ஒரு முன் விதிமுறையாக்கப்பட்ட விதிமுறை க ஒரு புதிய முகவர் ஆழம் Q- வலைப்பின்னல் (AAD- DQN) ஆசிரியருடன் ஆசிரியருடன் ஆசிரியரிடம் பேசும் பொழுது எப்படி கற்றுக் கொள்வது என்பது பிரச்சனையை  AAD-DQN, ஒரு தரவு இயக்கப்பட்ட மாணவர் கொள்கையாக, மாணவனுக்கும் ஆசிரியருக்கும் இரண்டு தனிப்பட்ட அனுபவம் நினைவுகளை வழங்குகிறது (1) ஒரு அறியாத வெளியேற் பாவனைப்படுத்தல் சோதனைகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது நிலையான உரையாடல் குறிப்பை பயன்படுத்தி பாதுகாப்பும் தேர்வுகளையும் மேம்படுத்தலாம் என்பது மற்ற நண்பர் கற', 'vi': "Quy tắc thủ công và học tập củng cố (RL) là hai lựa chọn phổ biến để đạt được chính sách đối thoại. Thông thường, chính sách dựa trên quy định là đáng tin cậy trong phạm vi đã xác định nhưng không thích ứng được, trong khi RL có khả năng phát triển bằng dữ liệu nhưng thường bị ảnh hưởng bởi một khả năng ban đầu tồi tệ. Chúng tôi sử dụng một cơ sở dạy kèm để nhập hai phương pháp học chính sách trực tuyến đàm thoại, trong đó một chính sách được định sẵn làm'giáo viên'và hướng dẫn một hệ thống RL dựa trên dữ liệu, bằng cách cho ví dụ hành động và những phần thưởng thêm. Một điệp viên mới nhận thức việc rớt ra Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) được đề xuất để xử lý vấn đề khi nào thì hỏi thầy giáo và học hỏi từ kinh nghiệm của thầy giáo. AAD-DQN, như một chính sách học sinh dựa trên dữ liệu, cung cấp (1) hai bộ nhớ kinh nghiệm riêng cho học sinh và giáo viên (2) một khoảng trống được đánh giá dựa trên việc bỏ học để kiểm soát thời gian tư vấn và học tập. Mô phỏng thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị có thể cải thiện đáng kể cả an to àn và hiệu quả của việc cải thiện chính sách trực tuyến so với các phương pháp học tập đồng hành khác cũng như việc được giám sát trước khi sử dụng tập thể tích cực.", 'uz': "Name Qoidalar asosida oddiy qoidalar oldin tayyorlangan chegarada ishlatadi, ammo o o'zimga mos kelmaydi, ammo RL maʼlumot bilan mavjud emas, lekin ko'p doim yomon ishlatiladi. Biz bir kompyuterni o'rganishni o'rganish qoidaga ikkita qoidalarni birlashtirish uchun ishlayapmiz. Bu yerda qoidadan oldin qoidagi qoidalar 'tahrirchi' deb ataladi va masalan amallar va qoidagi qoidalar bilan boshqarish uchun maʼlumot boshqaruvchisi RL tizimini boshqarish mumkin. Name AAD-DQN, maʼlumot boshqaruvchi o'quvchi qoidasi sifatida, o'qituvchi va o'qituvchiga (1) ikkita alohida tajriba xotira beradi, (2) talab qilish va o'rganish vaqtini boshqarishga haqiqiqiy emas. Simulasiya tajribalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan usulning boshqa kompyuterning o'rganish usullarida o'rganish imkoniyatlarini va statik dialog qoidasini ishlatishdan oldin taʼminlovchi soʻzlarni bajarishi mumkin.", 'da': 'Håndlavede regler og forstærket læring (RL) er to populære valg for at opnå dialogpolitik. Den regelbaserede politik er ofte pålidelig inden for foruddefineret anvendelsesområde, men ikke selvtilpasningsdygtig, mens RL kan udvikles med data, men ofte lider af dårlige indledende resultater. Vi anvender en ledsagende læringsramme til at integrere de to tilgange til online dialog politik læring, hvor en foruddefineret regelbaseret politik fungerer som "lærer" og vejleder et datadrevet RL-system ved at give eksempler på handlinger såvel som yderligere belønninger. En ny agentbevidst dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) foreslås for at løse problemet med, hvornår man skal konsultere læreren, og hvordan man lærer af lærerens erfaringer. AAD-DQN giver som datadrevet elevpolitik (1) to separate oplevelsesminder for studerende og lærer, (2) en usikkerhed, der skønnes ved frafald for at styre tidspunktet for konsultation og læring. Simuleringsforsøg viste, at den foreslåede fremgangsmåde kan forbedre både sikkerheden og effektiviteten af on-line-politikooptimering betydeligt sammenlignet med andre ledsagerlæringstilgange samt overvåget førtiltræning ved hjælp af statisk dialog korpus.', 'bg': 'Ръчно изработените правила и обучението за подсилване са два популярни избора за постигане на политика за диалог. Политиката, основана на правила, често е надеждна в предварително определен обхват, но не може да се адаптира самостоятелно, докато РС може да се развие с данни, но често страда от лошо първоначално представяне. Използваме рамка за съпътстващо обучение, за да интегрираме двата подхода за учене на политиката за онлайн диалог, в която предварително определена политика, основана на правила, действа като "учител" и ръководи система за РС, основана на данни, като дава примерни действия, както и допълнителни награди. Предложена е нова, осъзната за агентите отпадаща от системата, за да се справи с проблема кога да се консултира с учителя и как да се учи от опита на учителя. Като ориентирана към данни студентска политика предоставя (1) два отделни спомена за опит за ученика и учителя, (2) несигурност, оценена от отпадането, за да се контролира времето за консултация и обучение. Симулационните експерименти показаха, че предложеният подход може значително да подобри безопасността и ефективността на оптимизирането на политиките в интернет в сравнение с други подходи за съпътстващо обучение, както и надзорно предобучение, използвайки статичен диалог.', 'nl': "Handgemaakte regels en versterking learning (RL) zijn twee populaire keuzes om dialoogbeleid te verkrijgen. Het regelgebaseerde beleid is vaak betrouwbaar binnen vooraf gedefinieerde reikwijdte, maar niet zelfaanpasbaar, terwijl RL evolueerbaar is met data, maar vaak last heeft van een slechte aanvangsprestatie. We gebruiken een begeleid leerkader om de twee benaderingen voor online dialoogbeleid te integreren, waarbij een vooraf gedefinieerd regelgebaseerd beleid fungeert als een 'leraar' en een datagedreven RL-systeem begeleidt door voorbeeldacties en aanvullende beloningen te geven. Een nieuwe agent-aware drop-out Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) wordt voorgesteld om het probleem aan te pakken wanneer de leraar moet worden geraadpleegd en hoe te leren van de ervaringen van de leraar. AAD-DQN, als datagedreven studentenbeleid, biedt (1) twee aparte ervaringsherinneringen voor student en docent, (2) een onzekerheid geschat door drop-out om de timing van consult en leren te controleren. Simulatie experimenten toonden aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak zowel de veiligheid als de efficiëntie van online beleidsoptimalisatie aanzienlijk kan verbeteren in vergelijking met andere begeleide leerbenaderingen en begeleide pre-training met behulp van een statisch dialoogcorpus.", 'hr': "Ručno napravljena pravila i učenje pojačanja (RL) su dva popularna izbora za dobivanje dijalogske politike. Politika temeljena na pravilima često je pouzdana u predodređenoj oblasti, ali ne samoporavljiva, dok je RL evoluirala podacima ali često pati od lošeg početnog učinka. Koristimo okvir učenja društva kako bi integrirali dva pristupa učenju politike o internetskom dijalogu, u kojem predodređena politika temeljena na pravilima djeluje kao 'učitelj' i vodi sustav RL podataka dajući primjerne akcije i dodatne nagrade. Predlaže se novi agent-aware dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) riješiti problem kada se konsultirati s učiteljem i kako naučiti iz iskustva učitelja. AAD-DQN, kao politiku učenika koji vodi podatke, pruža (1) dvije odvojene uspomene iskustva učenika i učitelja, (2) neodređenost koju procjenjuje dropout kako bi kontrolirao vrijeme konsultacije i učenja. Simulacioni eksperimenti pokazali su da predloženi pristup može značajno poboljšati bezbjednost i učinkovitost optimizacije on line politika u usporedbi s drugim pristupima učenja društva, kao i nadzornim predobukom koristeći statički dijalogski korpus.", 'de': 'Handgefertigte Regeln und Verstärkungslernen (RL) sind zwei beliebte Optionen, um Dialogpolitik zu erhalten. Die regelbasierte Politik ist oft innerhalb eines vordefinierten Umfangs zuverlässig, aber nicht selbstanpassbar, während RL mit Daten weiterentwickelt werden kann, jedoch häufig unter einer schlechten Anfangsleistung leidet. Zur Integration der beiden Ansätze für das Online-Dialogpolitik-Lernen nutzen wir ein begleitendes Lernframework, bei dem eine vordefinierte regelbasierte Politik als "Lehrer" fungiert und ein datengesteuertes RL-System durch Beispielaktionen sowie zusätzliche Belohnungen leitet. Ein neuartiges agentenbewusstes Drop-out Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) wird vorgeschlagen, um das Problem anzugehen, wann der Lehrer konsultiert werden muss und wie man aus den Erfahrungen des Lehrers lernen kann. AAD-DQN bietet als datengesteuerte Schülerpolitik (1) zwei separate Erfahrungsspeicher für Schüler und Lehrer, (2) eine Unsicherheit, die durch Abbrecher geschätzt wird, um den Zeitpunkt der Beratung und des Lernens zu steuern. Simulationsexperimente zeigten, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz sowohl die Sicherheit als auch die Effizienz der Online-Politikoptimierung signifikant verbessern kann im Vergleich zu anderen Begleitlernansätzen sowie überwachten Vortrainings mit statischem Dialogkorpus.', 'ko': "수동 규칙과 강화 학습(RL)은 대화 전략을 얻는 두 가지 유행 선택이다.규칙 기반 정책은 일반적으로 미리 정의된 범위 내에서 믿을 만하지만 적응성이 없고 RL은 데이터에 따라 진화할 수 있지만 초기 성능은 매우 떨어진다.우리는 동반 학습 프레임워크를 이용하여 온라인 대화 정책 학습을 통합시키는 두 가지 방법을 사용한다. 그 중에서 미리 정의된 규칙 기반 정책은'교사'를 충당하고 예시적인 조작과 추가 보상을 제공함으로써 데이터 구동을 지도하는 RL 시스템이다.에이전트 기반의 중퇴 심도 Q네트워크(AAD-DQN)를 통해 언제 교사에게 문의하고 어떻게 교사의 경험에서 배울 수 있는지에 대한 새로운 문제를 제시했다.AAD-DQN은 데이터로 구동되는 학생 정책으로 학생과 교사에게 (1) 두 가지 독립된 경험 기억을 제공하고 (2) 중퇴자들이 추정하는 불확실성을 제공하여 상담과 학습 시간을 통제한다.모의 실험에 의하면 다른 동반자 학습 방법에 비해 이 방법은 온라인 전략 최적화의 안전성과 효율을 현저히 높일 수 있고 정적 대화 자료 라이브러리를 이용하여 감독하는 예비 훈련을 할 수 있다.", 'sw': "Sheria zilizotumwa mikononi na kujifunza kwa nguvu (RL) ni chaguo mbili maarufu kupata sera ya mazungumzo. Sera inayohusiana na sheria mara nyingi hutegemea ndani ya kipindi kilichotanguliwa lakini siyo kujiendelea kujiendelea, wakati RL inaendelea na taarifa lakini mara nyingi huguswa na utendaji mbaya wa mwanzo. Tutumia mfumo wa kujifunza mwenzake ili kuunganisha njia mbili za kujifunza sera za mazungumzo ya mtandaoni, ambapo sera zilizoelezwa kabla ya msingi wa sheria kama 'mwalimu' na kuongoza mfumo wa RL inayoendeshwa na taarifa kwa kutoa hatua hizo pamoja na malipo ya ziada. Mtengenezaji wa riwaya anayetambua kuachia Kwenye Mtandao wa Kimasomo (AAD-DQN) anapendekezwa kutangaza tatizo la lini la kuwasiliana na mwalimu na jinsi ya kujifunza kutoka kwa uzoefu wa mwalimu. AAD-DQN, kama sera ya wanafunzi inayoendeshwa na taarifa, inatoa (1) kumbukumbu mbili tofauti kwa wanafunzi na mwalimu, (2) isiyo na uhakika inayokadiriwa kufutiliwa kudhibiti wakati wa ushauri na kujifunza. Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safetyand efficiency of on-line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialogue corpus.", 'id': "Aturan yang dibuat tangan dan pemerintahan belajar (RL) adalah dua pilihan populer untuk mendapatkan kebijakan dialog. Kebijakan berdasarkan aturan sering dipercaya dalam jangkauan yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya tapi tidak dapat diadaptasi sendiri, sementara RL dapat berevolusi dengan data tetapi sering menderita dari prestasi awal yang buruk. Kami menggunakan cadangan belajar teman untuk mengintegrasikan dua pendekatan untuk belajar kebijakan dialog on line, di mana kebijakan berdasarkan peraturan terdefinisi bertindak sebagai 'guru' dan memimpin sistem RL berdasarkan data dengan memberikan contoh tindakan serta hadiah tambahan. Sebuah agen baru yang sadar meninggalkan Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) diusulkan untuk mengatasi masalah kapan untuk konsultasi guru dan bagaimana untuk belajar dari pengalaman guru. AAD-DQN, sebagai kebijakan mahasiswa berdasarkan data, menyediakan (1) dua kenangan pengalaman terpisah untuk mahasiswa dan guru, (2) ketidakpastian yang diharapkan oleh berhenti untuk mengendalikan waktu konsultasi dan belajar. Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safetyand efficiency of on-line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialogue corpus.", 'sq': "Rregullat e krijuara me dorë dhe forcimi i mësimit (RL) janë dy zgjedhje popullore për të marrë politikën e dialogut. Politika e bazuar në rregulla është shpesh e besueshme brenda fushës së paracaktuar por jo e përshtatshme vetë-vetë, ndërsa RL është e zhvillueshme me të dhëna por shpesh vuan nga një paraqitje e keqe fillestare. Ne përdorim një kuadër mësimi shoqëror për të integruar dy qasjet për mësimin e politikës së dialogut on line, në të cilat një politikë e përcaktuar me rregulla vepron si një 'mësues' dhe udhëzon një sistem RL të bazuar në të dhëna duke dhënë shembuj veprimesh si dhe shpërblime shtesë. A novel agent-aware dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) is proposed to address the problem of when to consult the teacher and how to learn from the teacher's experiences.  AAD-DQN, as a data-driven student policy, provides (1) two separate experience memories for student and teacher, (2) an uncertainty estimated by dropout to control the timing of consultation and learning.  Eksperimentet e simulimit treguan se qasja e propozuar mund të përmirësojë ndjeshëm si sigurinë ashtu edhe efektshmërinë e optimizimit të politikës on line krahasuar me qasjet e tjera të mësimit shoqëror si dhe parastërvitjen e mbikqyrur duke përdorur korpus të dialogut statik.", 'af': "Handgebreekte reëls en versterking leer (RL) is twee populêre keuses om dialoog beleid te kry. Die reël-gebaseerde beleid is dikwels vertroubaar binne vooraf gedefinieerde omvang maar nie self-aanpasbare nie, terwyl RL is ontwikkelbaar met data maar dikwels lyf van 'n slegte aanvanklike uitganging. Ons gebruik 'n gemeenskap leer raamwerk om die twee toegang vir on line dialoog beleid leer te integreer, waarin 'n voorafgedefinieerde reël-gebaseerde beleid soos 'n onderwyser' en gids 'n data-gedrywe RL stelsel deur voorbeeld aksies en addisionele vergelde te gee. 'n Nuwe agent-bewus dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) is voorgestel om die probleem van wanneer die onderwyser te besluit en hoe te leer van die onderwyser se erfarings. AAD-DQN, as 'n data-driven student beleid, verskaf (1) twee aparte erfaring geheue vir studente en onderwyser, (2) â\x80\x99n onbevestigheid wat deur dropout gespesifiseer word om die tyd van konsultasie en leer te beheer. Simulasie eksperimente het gewys dat die voorgestelde toegang kan betekenlik sekuriteit en effektiviteit van on line beleid optimaliseering verbeter, vergelyk met ander gemeenskappe onderwerp toepassings en voor-onderwerp met statiese dialoog korpus.", 'am': 'እጅግ-እጁ ያሉት ሥርዓቶች እና ማስተማር (RL) የጥያቄ ፖሊሲ ለማግኘት ሁለት የሕዝብ ምርጫዎች ናቸው። የሥርዓቱ ፖለቲካ ብዙ ጊዜ በተወሰነ ቦታዎች ውስጥ ግን ራሳቸውን ለመጠቀም አይችልም፤ RL ከዳራዎች ጋር ተለይቷል ነገር ግን ብዙ ጊዜ ከክፉ የመጀመሪያ ስርዓት መከራ ይታያል። የሥርዓት ቀዳሚ ፖሊሲ ትምህርት እንዲያስተማር እና የዳታ-driven RL ስርዓት ምሳሌ እና የበዛ ዋጋ እንዲያሳየው የሥርዓት ቀዳሚ ፖሊሲ ተሳትኖ የሚደረገውን ሁኔታ ለመማር እና የዳታ-driven RL ስርዓት መግለጫ እና አብዛኛውን ዋጋ እንዲያሳየው እንሠራለን፡፡ መምህሩን ለመጠየቅ እና የትምህርት መሆኑን እንዴት ለመማር የሚችሉትን ጉዳይ ለመጠየቅ የሚታወቀው የመረጃ ተቃውሞ (AAD-DQN) የሚዘጋጀው ነው፡፡ AAD-DQN እንደ ዳታ-driven ተማሪ ፖሊሲ (1) ለተማሪ እና አስተማሪው ሁለት የተለየ እውቀት ማስታወቂያዎችን (2) የምክር ምክር እና ትምህርት ሰዓት ለመቆጣጠር የሚቆጠር የማይታወቅ ነገር ነው፡፡ የስምምሳሌል ፈተናዎች በተለየ ጥያቄ እና የኢንተርኔት ፖሊሲ ማድረግ እና ከሌሎች ባልንጀራዎች ትምህርት ማግኘት ጥያቄን እና የቅድሚያ ጥያቄ በመጠቀም የተዘጋጀው የጥያቄ ማህበረሰብ ማድረግ እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': "Ձեռքով ստեղծված կանոնները և ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրությունը երկու հայտնի ընտրություն են, որպեսզի կարողանանք ստանալ խոսակցության քաղաքականությունը: Կարոններով հիմնված քաղաքականությունը հաճախ վստահելի է նախասահմանափակ մասում, բայց ոչ ինքնահարմարեցվող, մինչդեռ ՌL-ը զարգացվում է տվյալների հետ, բայց հաճախ տառապում է վատ սկզբնական արդյունքներից: We employ a companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialogue policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a 'teacher' and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards.  Նոր գործիչների գիտակցությամբ դուրս գալու Deep Q-Net (AAD-DQN) առաջարկում է լուծել ուսուցչի խորհուրդը և ուսուցչի փորձառություններից սովորելու խնդիրը: AAD-DQN-ը, որպես տվյալներով հիմնված ուսանողների քաղաքականություն, ապահովում է (1) ուսանողների և ուսուցիչների երկու առանձին փորձառության հիշողություններ, (2) անորոշություն, որը հաշվարկվում է դադարեցնելու միջոցով, որպեսզի կառավարի խորհուր Սիմուլյացիայի փորձերը ցույց տվեցին, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը կարող է նշանակալիորեն բարելավել նաև առցանց քաղաքականության օպտիմացիայի ապահովությունը, ինչպես նաև արդյունավետությունը, համեմատած այլ ընկերական ուսումնական մոտեցումների հետ, ինչպես նաև վերահսկված", 'bn': 'হ্যান্ডক্রান্ত নিয়ম এবং শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করার (আরএল) দুটি জনপ্রিয় পছন্দ হচ্ছে ডায়ালগ নীতি পাওয়ার জন্য। নিয়মের ভিত্তিক নীতি প্রায়শই আগে নির্ধারিত স্কোপের মধ্যে বিশ্বস্ত, কিন্তু নিজেকে আত্মসমর্পণযোগ্য নয়, যদিও আরএল তথ্য দিয়ে বিবর আমরা একটি সহযোগী শিক্ষা শিক্ষা কার্যক্রম চালিয়েছি যাতে আমরা অনলাইন ডায়ালগের নীতি শিক্ষার জন্য দুটি পদক্ষেপ একত্রিত করতে পারি, যেখানে একটি পূর্বে নির্ধারিত নীতি নী একজন উপযুক্ত এজেন্টের ডিপ কিউ-নেটওয়ার্ক (AAD-DQN) প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে শিক্ষকের সাথে কথোপকথন করা এবং শিক্ষকের অভিজ্ঞতা থেকে কিভাবে শিক্ষকের ডাটা চালানো ছাত্র নীতি হিসেবে AAD-DQN (১) ছাত্র এবং শিক্ষকের জন্য দুটি বিভিন্ন অভিজ্ঞতা স্মৃতি প্রদান করেছে, (২) পরামর্শ এবং শিক্ষার সময় নিয়ন্ত সিমুলেশন পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখিয়েছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপের নিরাপত্তা এবং নীতির সুবিধার কার্যকলাপের সাথে অন্যান্য সহযোগীদের শিক্ষা শিক্ষা প্র', 'fa': 'قانون ساخته شده دست و یادگیری پشتیبانی (RL) دو انتخاب محبوب برای پیدا کردن سیاست گفتگو است. سیاست بر اساس قانون اغلب در منطقه پیش تعریف شده قابل اعتماد است ولی خود قابل تغییر قابل توسعه نیست، در حالی که RL با داده ها تکامل قابل توسعه است ولی اغلب از عملکرد شروع بد رنج می دهد. ما از یک چهارچوب یادگیری همکاری استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا دو دستور برای یادگیری سیاست\u200cهای صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی یک مامور آگاهی دانسته از مامور نویسی عمیق شبکه Q (AAD-DQN) پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که مشکل آن را حل کند که زمانی مشورت معلم و چگونه از تجربه معلم یاد بگیرد. AAD-DQN، به عنوان یک سیاست دانش آموزان راهنمایی به داده، دو خاطره تجربه جدا برای دانش آموزان و معلمان (۱) ارائه می\u200cدهد؛ ۲) یقینی که توسط ناتوان تخمین شده است تا زمان مشورت و یادگیری را کنترل کند. تجربه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cسازی نشان داده است که این روش پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند با استفاده از شرکت\u200cهای صحیح گفتگو در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای یادگیری\u200cهای دیگر همکاران و پیش\u200cآموزش\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموزش را با استفاده از شرکت\u200cهای صحیح\u200cصحیح بهتر کند.', 'tr': "Elleriniň ýöredilmiş kurallar we dynç almak üçin (RL) öwrenmek üçin iki sany meşhur seçenekdir. Döwlet-daýanýan politika köplenç öň-belirlenýän sahypalarda ynamly, ýöne özi-özüne uyandyrylmaz, ýöne RL maglumatlar bilen gelişmäge mümkin, ýöne köplenç erbet başlangyç netijesinden çykýar. Biz ähli kömekçilik öwrenmegi üçin bir arkadaşyk öwrenmegi frameworkyny çyzgyly çyzgyly çyzgylyş politika öwrenmesine mejbur edýäris we onuň içinde önden tanyş edilen düzgün politika 'mugallym' bolup işleýär we munuň üstüne örnekler we ekleme tölegi berip berýän bir RL sistemini görke AAD-DQN (AAD-DQN) mugallymyň tejribelerinden haçan soragyny we mugallymyň tejribelerinden nähili öwrenmegi soramaga meýilleşdirýär. AAD-DQN, data-driven okuwçylar politikasy bolan, okuwçy we mugallymy üçin 2 üýtgeşik tejribeler ýagdaýyny (1) berýär, (2) konsultasyon we öwrenme wagtyny kontrol etmek üçin çarpan tapylmadygy. Simülasyon deneyleri teklip eden ýagdaýyň sistemasy sistemasy sistemasy we çyzgyly politika optimizasiýasynyň hem gorkunçylygy başga arkadaşyň öwrenmegi ýa-da statik диалог korpusyny ulanan öňünden öňünden howply bolup biljekdigini görkezildi.", 'ca': 'Regles artificials i aprenentatge de reforç són dues opcions populars per obtenir política de diàleg. La política basada en les regles és sovint fiable dins un camp de aplicació predefinit però no auto-adaptable, mentre que la RL és evolucionable amb dades però sovint pateix un mal desempeny inicial. We employ a companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialogue policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a \'teacher\' and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards.  Es propone una nova "Deep Q-Network" (AAD-DQN), conscient d\'un agent, per abordar el problema de quan consultar el professor i com aprendre de les experiències del professor. AAD-DQN, com a política d\'estudiants basada en dades, proporciona (1) dos records d\'experiència separats per a estudiants i professors, (2) una incertitud estimada per abandonar-se per controlar el temps de la consulta i l\'aprenentatge. Els experiments de simulació van demostrar que l\'enfocament proposat pot millorar significativament la seguretat i l\'eficiència de l\'optimització de la política on-line en comparació amb altres enfocaments d\'aprenentatge de companyia, així com la pré-capacitació supervisada utilitzant un corpus de diàleg estàtic.', 'cs': 'Ručně vytvořená pravidla a posilovací učení (RL) jsou dvě oblíbené volby, jak získat politiku dialogu. Politika založená na pravidlech je často spolehlivá v předem definovaném rozsahu, ale není samostatně adaptabilní, zatímco RL se vyvíjí s daty, ale často trpí špatným počátečním výkonem. Používáme rámec doprovodného učení k integraci obou přístupů pro učení politiky on-line dialogu, v němž předem definovaná politika založená na pravidlech funguje jako "učitel" a řídí systém RL řízený datem tím, že poskytuje příklady akcí a dodatečné odměny. Nový agent-aware drop-out Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) je navržen k řešení problému, kdy konzultovat učitele a jak se učit ze zkušeností učitele. AAD-DQN, jako datově řízená studentská politika, poskytuje (1) dvě oddělené zkušenosti pro studenta a učitele, (2) nejistotu odhadovanou ukončením pro kontrolu načasování konzultací a učení. Simulační experimenty ukázaly, že navržený přístup může výrazně zlepšit bezpečnost a efektivitu optimalizace on-line politiky ve srovnání s ostatními přístupy doprovodného učení i s dohledem předškolením pomocí statického dialogového korpusu.', 'et': 'Käsitsi valmistatud reeglid ja tugevdusõpe (RL) on kaks populaarset valikut dialoogipoliitika saavutamiseks. Reeglitel põhinev poliitika on sageli eelnevalt määratletud ulatuses usaldusväärne, kuid mitte isekohandatav, samas kui RL on andmetega arendatav, kuid sageli kannatab halva esialgse tulemuslikkuse all. Me kasutame täiendõppe raamistikku, et integreerida kaks lähenemisviisi on-line dialoogi poliitika õppimiseks, kus eelnevalt määratletud reeglitel põhinev poliitika toimib õpetajana ja juhib andmepõhist RL süsteemi, andes näidismeetmeid ja lisatasusid. Uuenduslik agenditeadlik väljalangemine Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) on tehtud ettepaneku lahendada probleem, millal õpetajaga konsulteerida ja kuidas õppida õpetaja kogemustest. AAD-DQN kui andmepõhine üliõpilaspoliitika annab (1) õpilasele ja õpetajale kaks eraldi kogemuste mälestust, (2) koolist väljalangemise hinnanguline ebakindlus, et kontrollida konsultatsiooni ja õppimise ajastust. Simuleerimiskatsed näitasid, et kavandatud lähenemisviis võib oluliselt parandada veebipõhise poliitika optimeerimise ohutust ja tõhusust võrreldes teiste kaasõppe lähenemisviisidega, samuti staatilise dialoogi korpuse abil juhendatud eelkoolitusega.', 'fi': 'Käsintehdyt säännöt ja vahvistuskoulutus (RL) ovat kaksi suosittua valintaa vuoropuhelupolitiikan saavuttamiseksi. Sääntöön perustuva käytäntö on usein luotettava ennalta määritellyn soveltamisalan puitteissa, mutta ei itsesäätyvä, kun taas RL on muokattavissa datan avulla, mutta se kärsii usein huonosta alkusuorituskyvystä. Käytämme oheisopimuksen kehystä yhdistääksemme kaksi lähestymistapaa online-dialogipolitiikkaoppimiseen, jossa ennalta määritelty sääntöpohjainen politiikka toimii "opettajana" ja ohjaa datavetoista RL-järjestelmää antamalla esimerkillisiä toimia ja lisäpalkintoja. Uusi agenttitietoinen Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) on ehdotettu käsittelemään ongelmaa siitä, milloin opettajaa on kuultava ja miten opettajan kokemuksista oppia. AAD-DQN tarjoaa datavetoisena opiskelijapolitiikkana (1) kaksi erillistä kokemusmuistia oppilaalle ja opettajalle, (2) keskeyttämisen arvioiman epävarmuuden konsultoinnin ja oppimisen ajoituksen hallitsemiseksi. Simulointikokeet osoittivat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa voi merkittävästi parantaa online-politiikan optimoinnin turvallisuutta ja tehokkuutta verrattuna muihin oheisopimukseen sekä valvottuun esikoulutukseen staattisella dialogikorpuksella.', 'az': "Əl yaradılmış qaydalar və öyrənmək öyrənmək (RL) iki məşhur seçimdir. Bu qayda-tabanlı siyasət çox əvvəlcə təyin edilmiş sahələrdə güvenilir, amma özü-özünə uyğunlaşdırılabilir, lakin RL məlumatları ilə dəyişə bilər, amma çox sıxıntılar pis başlanğıç performansından çəkilir. Biz həmçin in şəriəti öyrənmək üçün iki yol öyrənmək üçün yoldaş öyrənmək üçün bir öyrənmək framework ünü istifadə edirik, ki içində əvvəlcə təyin edilmiş qayda-təmin siyasəti 'müəllimdir' kimi işləyir və məsələlər və əlavə mükafatlar verməklə verilən RL sistemini yönəldir. Bir yeni agent-aware dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN) müəllimə nə vaxt danışmaq və müəllimin təcrübələrindən öyrənmək üçün problemlərini çəkmək üçün təbliğ edilir. AAD-DQN, məlumatları tələbən siyasəti kimi, öğrenci və müəllimin üçün iki ayrı təcrübə an ı təmin edir, (2) məlumatların və öyrənmələrin vaxtını kontrol etmək üçün dəyişdirilmiş təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizlik təhrif edir. Simulasyon təcrübələri göstərdilər ki, təcrübə olunmuş təcrübə də, həmçinin on line politika optimizasiyasının təhlükəsizliğini digər yoldaşların öyrənməsi yaxınlıqları ilə, həmçinin statik dialog korpusu vasitəsilə təcrübə edilmiş öndə təcrübə ilə mütləq daha tə", 'bs': "Ručno napravljena pravila i učenje pojačanja (RL) su dva popularna izbora za dobivanje politike dijaloga. Pravilna politika je često pouzdana u predodređenoj oblasti, ali ne samouprilagodljiva, dok je RL evoluirala podacima, ali često pati od lošeg početnog izvođenja. Koristimo okvir učenja kompanija kako bi integrirali dva pristupa učenju politike o internetom dijalogu, u kojem preddefinirana politika koja se temelji na pravilima čini kao 'učitelj' i vodi sustav RL koji se vodi podacima dajući primjerne akcije i dodatne nagrade. Predloženo je da se riješi problem kada se konsultuje sa učiteljem i kako nauči iz iskustva učitelja. AAD-DQN, kao studentska politika koja vodi podatke, pruža (1) dvije odvojene uspomene iskustva za učenike i učitelje, (2) nesigurnost koju procjenjuje dropout da kontrolira vrijeme konsultacije i učenja. Simulacioni eksperimenti pokazali su da predloženi pristup može značajno poboljšati bezbjednost i učinkovitost optimizacije politike na internetu u usporedbi s drugim pristupima učenja kompanija, kao i nadzornim predobukom koristeći statički dijalogski korpus.", 'jv': "Nambah-nambah hukum lan nguasai nggawe sawar (RL) iki populer kebijakan kanggo ngerasai politik sing dibenakno. Siji-Siji sing dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke punika dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke punika dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke ditambah, lan ki RL kuwi iso dianggap daftar dad Awak dhéwé éntuk kamuran sing beraksi karo sistem sing beraksi kanggo nyebute iki dadi sing beraksi kanggo nggawe sistem sing nyebute on line, ning kedhano sistem sing wis dipolehasno hukum sing gabung nggawe 'guru' lan mudherek sistem sing wis dianggawe RL nganggep dino sing bisa dianggap dadi tambah lan mbugal dumadhi sing dumadhi. Perintah sing dipunangé, Drop q-Network (AED-DqN) sing nyenggawe kanggo ngerasakno perbudhakan kanggo nggunakake guru kudu nggunakake tresnani karo perangkat sapa guru guru. AED-DqN, nganggep politik sing data-drived kuwi, Ngenyarno (1) padha padha sing rumangsa alam kuwi mau karo guru lan guru alih (2) awak dhéwé ngerasakno Simulasi éntuk sing nggawe bener yèn akeh panelusuran ngono nggawe kesempatan kanggo langgar nggawe layakno ning keamanan ngono nggawe layakno hukum sistem sing nyimpen karo perusahaan liyan ngono nggawe gerakan akeh sampeyan liyan ngono nggawe layakno-sistem sing gawe nguasai cara-teka.", 'he': 'חוקים מיוחדים והלימוד התגבור (RL) הם שתי בחירות פופולריות כדי להשיג מדיניות דיאלוג. מדיניות המבוססת על החוקים היא לעתים קרובות אמינה בתוך סקופ מוגדר מראש, אך לא מתאימה לעצמך, בעוד RL מתפתח עם נתונים, אך לעתים קרובות סובלת ממופע ראשון רע. אנו משתמשים במסגרת לימוד חברים כדי להשתלב בשני גישות ללימוד מדיניות דיאלוג ברשת, שבה מדיניות מבוססת על חוקים מוגדרת מראש פועלת כמורה ומדריך מערכת RL מבוססת על נתונים על ידי לתת פעולות דוגמאות כמו גם פרסים נוספים. מוצע שיעזוב את רשת Q-עמוקה (AAD-DQN) של סוכנים מודעים לרומן כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה של מתי להתייעץ עם המורה ואיך ללמוד מהחוויות של המורה. AAD-DQN, בתור מדיניות סטודנטים מונעת על נתונים, מספקת (1) שני זיכרונות ניסיון נפרדים לסטודנטים ומורה, (2) אי-בטוחות שמערכת על ידי הפסקה לשלוט בזמן הייעוץ וללמד. ניסויים סימוליציה הראו שהגישה המוצעת יכולה לשפר באופן משמעותי את ביטחון והיעילות של אופטימיזציה של מדיניות באינטרנט בהשוואה ליגשות הלימודים של חברים אחרים, כמו גם התאמנות מראשית מבוקשת באמצעות גופוס דיאלוג סטטי.', 'bo': "ལག་བྲིས་བཟོས་པའི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་དང་མཐུན་རྗེས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཡིན། The rule-based policy is often reliable within predefined scope but not self-adaptable, whereas RL is evolvable with data but often suffering from a bad initial performance. We employ a companion learning framework to integrate the two approaches for on-line dialog policy learning, in which a pre-defined rule-based policy acts as a 'teacher' and guides a data-driven RL system by giving example actions as well as additional rewards. གསར་གཏོད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ dropout Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN)ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཁག་ཅིག་གནད་དོན་དག་གནད་དོན་དག་གཙོ་རིགས་ལ་སྟོན་དང་ རང་ཉིད་ལ་གནད་དོན་དབང་ paper size Simulation experiments showed that the proposed approach can significantly improve both safety and efficiency of on-line policy optimization compared to other companion learning approaches as well as supervised pre-training using static dialog corpus.", 'sk': 'Ročno oblikovana pravila in okrepitveno učenje (RL) sta dve priljubljeni izbiri za pridobitev politike dialoga. Politika, ki temelji na pravilih, je pogosto zanesljiva znotraj vnaprej določenega področja uporabe, vendar ni samoprilagodljiva, medtem ko se RL lahko razvija s podatki, vendar pogosto trpi zaradi slabe začetne uspešnosti. Uporabljamo okvir spremljevalnega učenja za vključitev dveh pristopov za učenje politike spletnega dialoga, v katerem vnaprej določena politika, ki temelji na pravilih, deluje kot "učitelj" in vodi sistem RL, ki temelji na podatkih, tako da daje zgledne ukrepe in dodatne nagrade. Predlagana je nova mreža Deep Q-Network (AAD-DQN), ki se zaveda agentov, da bi obravnavala problem, kdaj se je treba posvetovati z učiteljem in kako se učiti iz učiteljevih izkušenj. AAD-DQN kot podatkovno usmerjena študentska politika zagotavlja (1) dva ločena spomina na izkušnje za učenca in učitelje, (2) negotovost, ocenjena z opustitvijo šolanja, da se nadzoruje čas posvetovanja in učenja. Simulacijski poskusi so pokazali, da lahko predlagani pristop bistveno izboljša varnost in učinkovitost optimizacije spletnih politik v primerjavi z drugimi pristopi spremljevalnega učenja ter nadzorovano predusposabljanje z uporabo statičnega dialoga.', 'ha': "Rukuman aiki da hannayen da aka ƙara karanta (RL) sun kasance zaɓaɓɓa biyu masu motsa ga zauren akwatin bayani. @ item: inmenu Tuna aiki wani firam na abõkan da ke karanta matsayin da za'a haɗa hanyõyin biyu dõmin a iya karanta lissafi na zauren zauren akwatin bayanin zauren akwatin bayani, a cikinsa, yana karatun wata na gaba-defined rayuwar 'macalli' kuma yana shirya wata na'asalin da aka yi tafiyar da shi na tsari na RL da misali da sakamakon ƙaranci. An goyya da wani mai gaskatãwa mai fahimta ta Depe Q-Network s (AAD-DQN) dõmin ya tambayi wa'adin a lokace wa ya yi mãkirci ga macallin da jini zai iya karanta daga abincin macallin. AAD-DQN, kamar wata lissafa na karatun da aka tafiyar da data, yana bãyar da karatun biyu dabam-dabam ga karatun ɗan macallin da macallin, (2) an ƙaddara wani hakar da aka yi shi domin tsarin lokacin da aka yi wa shirin da karantawa. Tajararin masu motsi na Simulan ya nuna cewa hanyor da aka goyya, yana iya ƙara tsari da fassarar kwamfyutan-line da sammenfani da masu ƙarai da amfani da nau'in zauren akwatin bayani na fasalin."}
{'en': 'Towards Debate Automation : a Recurrent Model for Predicting Debate Winners', 'pt': 'Rumo à automação do debate: um modelo recorrente para prever os vencedores do debate', 'ar': 'نحو أتمتة المناظرة: نموذج متكرر للتنبؤ بالفائزين في المناظرة', 'fr': "Vers l'automatisation des débats\xa0: un modèle récurrent pour prédire les gagnants d'un débat", 'es': 'Hacia la automatización del debate: un modelo recurrente para predecir los ganadores del debate', 'zh': '迈向辩自动化:占获胜者反覆', 'ja': 'ディベートの自動化に向けて：ディベートの勝者を予測するための繰り返しモデル', 'ru': 'На пути к автоматизации дебатов: периодическая модель прогнозирования победителей дебатов', 'hi': 'बहस स्वचालन की ओर: बहस विजेताओं की भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक आवर्तक मॉडल', 'ga': 'I dTreo Uathoibriú Díospóireachta: Samhail Athfhillteach chun Buaiteoirí Díospóireachta a Thuar', 'hu': 'A vitaautomatizálás felé: ismétlődő modell a vitagyőztesek előrejelzésére', 'el': 'Προς την αυτοματοποίηση συζητήσεων: ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο μοντέλο για την πρόβλεψη νικητών συζητήσεων', 'it': "Verso l'automazione del dibattito: un modello ricorrente per prevedere i vincitori del dibattito", 'kk': 'Жөндеу автоматты түрде қайталанатын үлгі', 'mk': 'За автоматизација на дебатата: Повторен модел за предвидување на победниците на дебатата', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്ക് സ്വയം വ്യതിയാസപ്പെടുത്തുക: വിജയികള്\u200dക്ക് വീണ്ടും പുനരുത്ഥാന മോഡല്\u200d', 'ka': 'განბზიმის ავტომატიკაცია: განბზიმის მოდელი', 'lt': 'Diskusijų automatizavimo link: pakartotinis diskusijų laimėtojų prognozavimo modelis', 'mt': 'Lejn l-Awtomazzjoni tad-Diskussjoni: Mudell Rikorrenti għat-Tbassir tar-Rebbieħa tad-Diskussjoni', 'mn': 'Debate Automation руу: Debate Winners-ийн дахин загвар', 'ro': 'Către automatizarea dezbaterilor: un model recurent pentru predicția câștigătorilor dezbaterilor', 'pl': 'W kierunku automatyzacji debat: powtarzający się model przewidywania zwycięzców debat', 'ms': 'Ke arah Automatisi Debat: Model Berulang untuk Prediksi Pemenang Debat', 'so': 'Towards Debate Automation: a Recurrent Model for Preparing Debate Winners', 'sv': 'Mot debattautomation: en återkommande modell för att förutse debattvinnare', 'ta': 'மேலே தானியங்கி விவாதம்:', 'sr': 'Prema automatskoj raspravi: ponovni model za predviđanje pobednika debata', 'no': 'Gå til debattautomatisering: ein gjentaande modell for forhåndsvising av debattvinner', 'ur': 'ڈیبٹ اتوماٹیشن کی طرف: ڈیبٹ وینروں کی پیش آنے کے لئے ایک دوبارہ موڈل', 'si': '@ info: tooltip', 'uz': 'Avtomatik avtomatik boshlash', 'vi': 'Hướng tới thao tác Debate: một kiểu phục hồi tính trước người thắng cuộc Debs', 'hr': 'Prema automatskoj raspravi: ponovni model za predviđanje pobjednika rasprave', 'da': 'På vej mod debat automatisering: en tilbagevendende model til forudsigelse af debat vindere', 'bg': 'Към автоматизация на дебатите: повтарящ се модел за прогнозиране на победителите в дебатите', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zur Debatte Automation: ein wiederkehrendes Modell zur Vorhersage von Debatte Winnern', 'nl': 'Naar Debatautomatisering: een recurrent model voor het voorspellen van debatwinnaars', 'id': 'Menuju Otomasi Debat: Model ulang untuk membayangkan Pemenang Debat', 'ko': '변론 자동화로 나아가다: 변론 승자를 예측하는 순환 모델', 'tr': 'Ýabşyrma Otomatik Gaýd Edilmek üçin bir Täzelikli Model', 'sw': 'Kuzungumzia Automation: a Recurrent Model for Preparing Debate Windows', 'sq': 'Për automatizimin e debatit: një model i përsëritur për parashikimin e fituesve të debatit', 'af': "Gaan na Debate Automaties: ' n Herhaling Model vir voorskou Debate Winners", 'fa': 'به سمت اتوماتیک Debate: یک مدل دوباره برای پیش\u200cبینی برنده\u200cهای مذاکره', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিতর্ক করো', 'hy': 'Դեբատի ավտոմատիացման ուղղությամբ: A Re-Again մոդել for Forecast Discut հաղթերին', 'az': 'Debat Otomatisiyas캼 t톛r톛find톛: Debat Qazananlar캼n캼 t톛dbir etm톛k 칲칞칲n yenid톛n bir Model', 'am': 'አውቶማቲክ', 'cs': 'K automatizaci debat: opakovaný model pro predikci vítězů debat', 'bs': 'Prema automatskoj raspravi: ponovni model za predviđanje pobjednika debata', 'et': 'Arutelude automatiseerimise suunas: korduv mudel aruteluvõitjate prognoosimiseks', 'ca': "cap a l'automàtica de debat: un model recurrent per predir els guanyadors de debat", 'fi': 'Kohti keskustelun automatisointia: toistuva malli väittelyn voittajien ennustamiseen', 'jv': 'Tulungan Debate Automation', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Towards Debate Automation: a Recurrent Model for Predicting Debate Winners', 'sk': 'Proti avtomatizaciji razprav: ponavljajoči se model za napovedovanje zmagovalcev razprav', 'bo': 'Towards Debate Automation: a Recurrent Model for Predicting Debate Winners'}
{'en': 'In this paper we introduce a practical first step towards the creation of an automated debate agent : a state-of-the-art recurrent predictive model for predicting debate winners. By having an accurate predictive model, we are able to objectively rate the quality of a statement made at a specific turn in a debate. The model is based on a recurrent neural network architecture with attention, which allows the model to effectively account for the entire debate when making its prediction. Our model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy on a dataset of debate transcripts annotated with audience favorability of the debate teams. Finally, we discuss how future work can leverage our proposed model for the creation of an automated debate agent. We accomplish this by determining the model input that will maximize audience favorability toward a given side of a debate at an arbitrary turn.', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذه الورقة خطوة أولى عملية نحو إنشاء وكيل نقاش آلي: نموذج تنبؤي متكرر حديث للتنبؤ بالفائزين في المناقشة. من خلال وجود نموذج تنبؤي دقيق ، يمكننا أن نقيم بشكل موضوعي جودة البيان الذي يتم الإدلاء به في منعطف معين في المناقشة. يعتمد النموذج على بنية شبكة عصبية متكررة مع الانتباه ، مما يسمح للنموذج بحساب الجدل بأكمله بشكل فعال عند إجراء التنبؤ. يحقق نموذجنا دقة متطورة في مجموعة بيانات من نصوص المناظرات المشروحة مع تفضيل الجمهور لفرق المناقشة. أخيرًا ، نناقش كيف يمكن للعمل المستقبلي الاستفادة من نموذجنا المقترح لإنشاء وكيل نقاش آلي. نحقق ذلك من خلال تحديد مدخلات النموذج التي ستزيد من تفضيل الجمهور تجاه جانب معين من النقاش في منعطف تعسفي.', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos un primer paso práctico hacia la creación de un agente de debate automatizado: un modelo predictivo recurrente de última generación para predecir los ganadores del debate. Al contar con un modelo predictivo preciso, podemos calificar objetivamente la calidad de una declaración hecha en un momento específico de un debate. El modelo se basa en una arquitectura de red neuronal recurrente con atención, que permite al modelo dar cuenta de manera efectiva de todo el debate al hacer su predicción. Nuestro modelo logra una precisión de vanguardia en un conjunto de datos de transcripciones de debates anotadas con la preferencia de la audiencia de los equipos de debate. Finalmente, discutimos cómo el trabajo futuro puede aprovechar nuestro modelo propuesto para la creación de un agente de debate automatizado. Logramos esto al determinar la entrada del modelo que maximizará la favorabilidad de la audiencia hacia un lado dado de un debate en un giro arbitrario.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une première étape pratique vers la création d'un agent de débat automatisé\xa0: un modèle prédictif récurrent de pointe pour prédire les gagnants d'un débat. En disposant d'un modèle prédictif précis, nous sommes en mesure d'évaluer objectivement la qualité d'une déclaration faite à un moment précis d'un débat. Le modèle est basé sur une architecture de réseau de neurones récurrente avec attention, ce qui permet au modèle de tenir compte efficacement de l'ensemble du débat lors de sa prédiction. Notre modèle atteint une précision de pointe sur un ensemble de données de transcriptions de débats annotées en fonction de la préférence du public des équipes de débat. Enfin, nous discutons de la façon dont les travaux futurs peuvent tirer parti de notre modèle proposé pour la création d'un agent de débat automatisé. Pour ce faire, nous déterminons l'entrée du modèle qui maximisera la préférence du public envers un côté donné d'un débat à une tournure arbitraire.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um primeiro passo prático para a criação de um agente de debate automatizado: um modelo preditivo recorrente de última geração para prever vencedores de debates. Por ter um modelo preditivo preciso, podemos avaliar objetivamente a qualidade de uma declaração feita em um momento específico de um debate. O modelo é baseado em uma arquitetura de rede neural recorrente com atenção, o que permite que o modelo efetivamente dê conta de todo o debate ao fazer sua previsão. Nosso modelo alcança precisão de última geração em um conjunto de dados de transcrições de debates anotados com a preferência do público das equipes de debate. Por fim, discutimos como trabalhos futuros podem alavancar nosso modelo proposto para a criação de um agente de debate automatizado. Conseguimos isso determinando a entrada do modelo que maximizará a preferência do público em relação a um determinado lado de um debate em um turno arbitrário.', 'ja': 'この論文では、自動討論エージェントの作成に向けた実用的な最初のステップを紹介します。これは、討論の勝者を予測するための最先端の定期予測モデルです。正確な予測モデルを持つことで、議論の特定のターンでの発言の質を客観的に評価することができます。このモデルは、注意を払って再帰的なニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャに基づいており、モデルが予測を行うときに議論全体を効果的に説明することができます。当社のモデルは、ディベートチームの聴衆の好意性を注釈したディベートトランスクリプトのデータセットで最先端の精度を実現します。最後に、自動ディベートエージェントを作成するために提案されたモデルを今後どのように活用できるかについて説明します。私たちは、任意のターンで議論の特定の側面に対する視聴者の好ましさを最大化するモデル入力を決定することによってこれを達成します。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем первый практический шаг к созданию автоматического агента дебатов: современной рекуррентной прогностической модели для прогнозирования победителей дебатов. Имея точную прогностическую модель, мы можем объективно оценить качество заявления, сделанного на определенном этапе прений. Модель основана на рекуррентной архитектуре нейронной сети с вниманием, что позволяет модели эффективно учитывать всю дискуссию при составлении своего прогноза. Наша модель достигает самой современной точности на наборе данных стенограмм дебатов, аннотированных с благоприятностью аудитории для дискуссионных команд. Наконец, мы обсуждаем, как будущая работа может использовать нашу предлагаемую модель для создания автоматического агента для дебатов. Мы достигаем этого, определяя входные данные модели, которые будут максимизировать благоприятствование аудитории к заданной стороне дебатов на произвольном повороте.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एक स्वचालित बहस एजेंट के निर्माण की दिशा में एक व्यावहारिक पहला कदम पेश करते हैं: बहस विजेताओं की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक अत्याधुनिक आवर्तक भविष्यवाणी मॉडल। एक सटीक भविष्यवाणी मॉडल होने से, हम एक बहस में एक विशिष्ट मोड़ पर किए गए बयान की गुणवत्ता को निष्पक्ष रूप से रेट करने में सक्षम हैं। मॉडल ध्यान के साथ एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर पर आधारित है, जो मॉडल को अपनी भविष्यवाणी करते समय पूरी बहस के लिए प्रभावी ढंग से खाते की अनुमति देता है। हमारा मॉडल बहस टीमों के दर्शकों की अनुकूलता के साथ एनोटेट किए गए बहस टेपों के डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक सटीकता प्राप्त करता है। अंत में, हम चर्चा करते हैं कि भविष्य का काम एक स्वचालित बहस एजेंट के निर्माण के लिए हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल का लाभ कैसे उठा सकता है। हम मॉडल इनपुट का निर्धारण करके इसे पूरा करते हैं जो एक मनमाने ढंग से मोड़ पर बहस के किसी दिए गए पक्ष की ओर दर्शकों की अनुकूलता को अधिकतम करेगा।', 'zh': '本文,我们介介了自己辩论的实用第一步:所以测量辩论获胜者的最先进的循环测测模样。 以有正占,论特定转折处陈。 盖有意力之递归神经网络架构,使占候有效而说争论也。 臣等模形于辩录数据集上得最先进之准确性,当数集带有辩队观众好感度。 最后,我们议论了未来的事情怎么用我们的模样来创造自己辩论。 吾因定模输以成之,当输将任曲而增之受众对辩中给定一方之好感度。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid isteach céad chéim phraiticiúil i dtreo gníomhaire díospóireachta uathoibrithe a chruthú: samhail thuarthach athfhillteach den scoth chun buaiteoirí díospóireachta a thuar. Trí mhúnla cruinn tuar a bheith againn, táimid in ann cáilíocht ráitis a dhéantar ag casadh sonrach i ndíospóireacht a rátáil go hoibiachtúil. Tá an tsamhail bunaithe ar ailtireacht líonra néarach athfhillteach le haird, a ligeann don mhúnla cuntas éifeachtach a thabhairt don díospóireacht iomlán agus a thuar á dhéanamh aige. Baineann ár múnla cruinneas den scoth amach ar thacar sonraí de thras-scríbhinní díospóireachta atá anótáilte le fabhair lucht féachana na bhfoirne díospóireachta. Ar deireadh, pléimid conas is féidir le hobair amach anseo ár múnla atá beartaithe a ghiaráil chun gníomhaire díospóireachta uathoibrithe a chruthú. Bainimid é seo amach trí ionchur eiseamláireach a chinneadh a uasmhéadóidh fabhair an lucht éisteachta i dtreo taobh ar leith de dhíospóireacht ar bhonn treallach.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία εισάγουμε ένα πρακτικό πρώτο βήμα προς τη δημιουργία ενός αυτοματοποιημένου παράγοντα συζήτησης: ένα σύγχρονο επαναλαμβανόμενο μοντέλο πρόβλεψης για την πρόβλεψη νικητών συζήτησης. Έχοντας ένα ακριβές προβλέψιμο μοντέλο, είμαστε σε θέση να αξιολογήσουμε αντικειμενικά την ποιότητα μιας δήλωσης που γίνεται σε μια συγκεκριμένη στροφή σε μια συζήτηση. Το μοντέλο βασίζεται σε μια επαναλαμβανόμενη αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικών δικτύων με προσοχή, η οποία επιτρέπει στο μοντέλο να λογοδοτεί αποτελεσματικά όλη τη συζήτηση κατά την πρόβλεψή του. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων μεταγραφών συζήτησης που σχολιάζονται με την ευνοϊκότητα του κοινού των ομάδων συζήτησης. Τέλος, συζητάμε πώς η μελλοντική εργασία μπορεί να αξιοποιήσει το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία ενός αυτοματοποιημένου φορέα συζήτησης. Αυτό επιτυγχάνουμε με τον προσδιορισμό της πρότυπης εισόδου που θα μεγιστοποιήσει την ευνοϊκότητα του κοινού προς μια δεδομένη πλευρά μιας συζήτησης σε μια αυθαίρετη στροφή.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo un primo passo pratico verso la creazione di un agente di dibattito automatizzato: un modello predittivo ricorrente all'avanguardia per la previsione dei vincitori del dibattito. Grazie ad un modello predittivo accurato, siamo in grado di valutare oggettivamente la qualità di una dichiarazione fatta ad una svolta specifica in un dibattito. Il modello si basa su un'architettura di rete neurale ricorrente con attenzione, che consente al modello di rendere conto efficacemente dell'intero dibattito durante la sua previsione. Il nostro modello raggiunge l'accuratezza dello stato dell'arte su un set di dati di trascrizioni di dibattito annotati con la preferenza del pubblico dei team di dibattito. Infine, discutiamo di come il lavoro futuro possa sfruttare il nostro modello proposto per la creazione di un agente di dibattito automatizzato. Realizziamo questo determinando l'input del modello che massimizza la preferenza del pubblico verso un dato lato di un dibattito a una svolta arbitraria.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az első gyakorlati lépést egy automatizált vitaügynök létrehozása felé: egy korszerű, visszatérő prediktív modell a viták győzteseinek előrejelzésére. Egy pontos prediktív modell segítségével objektíven értékelhetjük a vita egy adott fordulójában tett kijelentések minőségét. A modell egy visszatérő ideghálózati architektúrán alapul, figyelemmel, amely lehetővé teszi a modell számára, hogy hatékonyan elszámolja az egész vita előrejelzésekor. Modellünk korszerű pontosságot biztosít a vitaátiratok adatkészletén, amelyeket a vitacsoportok közönség kedvezőségével jegyzetelünk meg. Végezetül megvitatjuk, hogy a jövőbeli munka hogyan használhatja ki javasolt modellünket egy automatizált vitaügynök létrehozására. Ezt úgy érjük el, hogy meghatározzuk azt a modellbemenetet, amely tetszőleges fordulatban maximalizálja a közönség előnyben részesíthetőségét egy adott vita felé.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ პრექტიკური პირველი ნაწილის შექმნა ავტომატიკური დიბატის ადვნენტის შექმნა: სამყარო რეკურენტიური მოდელი განსაზღვრება დიბატის მობედნენტების გა მარტივი პროგრამეტური მოდელეში, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულია. მოდელი განახლებული ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიკურაზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც მოდელს ეფექტიურად აღმოჩენა ყველა დიბატის განახლებაზე, როდესაც მისი წინასწარმოდგენ ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების ტრანსკრიპტების მონაცემების მონაცემებით, რომლებიც აუდიტორიების მოსახულებელობაზე დიბატის ჯგუფის მოსახულებელობა. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ვისაუბრობთ თუ როგორ მომავალე სამუშაო მუშაო შეუძლებელია ჩვენი მოდელეში ავტომატიური დიბატი ადვნენტის შექმნა. ჩვენ ამას გავაკეთებთ მოდელური მონაცემების განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც აუდისონტების საკუთარი მნიშვნელობას გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრების მხარეს.', 'mk': 'In this paper we introduce a practical first step towards the creation of an automated debate agent: a state-of-the-art recurrent predictive model for predicting debate winners.  By having an accurate predictive model, we are able to objectively rate the quality of a statement made at a specific turn in a debate.  Моделот е базиран на рецидентна архитектура на нервната мрежа со внимание, која му овозможува на моделот ефикасно да ја одговара целата дебата кога го прави своето предвидување. Our model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy on a dataset of debate transcripts annotated with audience favorability of the debate teams.  Конечно, разговараме за тоа како идната работа може да го искористи нашиот предложен модел за создавање автоматизиран агент за дебата. Ние го постигнуваме ова со одредување на моделот на влог кој ќе ја максимализира услугата на публиката кон одредена страна на дебатата на арбитрален потег.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വയമായ വിവാദത്തിന്റെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനു മുന്നിലേക്ക് ഒരു പ്രാകൃതിക മുന്നില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വിവാദ ഒരു വിശിഷ്ടമായ പ്രവചന മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയതിനാല്\u200d, ഒരു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച തിരിച്ചുവരുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു വിവരത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യക്തിത്ത ഈ മോഡല്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലയുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രവചനം വരുത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിവാദക്കാരുടെ പ്രിയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിവാദക്കാരുടെ പ്രിയപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റിറ അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത് ഭാവിയുടെ ജോലി എങ്ങനെയാണ് നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d സ്വതന്ത്രി We accomplish this by determining the model input that will maximize audience favorability toward a given side of a debate at an arbitrary turn.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument nintroduċu l-ewwel pass prattiku lejn il-ħolqien ta’ a ġent ta’ dibattitu awtomatizzat: mudell ta’ tbassir rikorrenti avvanzat għat-tbassir tar-rebbieħa tad-dibattitu. Billi għandna mudell preċiż ta’ tbassir, nistgħu naraw b’mod oġġettiv il-kwalità ta’ dikjarazzjoni magħmula f’dawra speċifika f’dibattitu. Il-mudell huwa bbażat fuq arkitettura rikorrenti tan-netwerk newrali b’attenzjoni, li tippermetti li l-mudell jikkunsidra b’mod effettiv id-dibattitu kollu meta jagħmel it-tbassir tiegħu. Our model achieves state-of-the-art accuracy on a dataset of debate transcripts annotated with audience favorability of the debate teams.  Fl-aħħar nett, niddiskutu kif ix-xogħol futur jista' jagħti spinta lill-mudell propost tagħna għall-ħolqien ta' aġent ta' dibattitu awtomatizzat. Aħna nilħqu dan billi niddeterminaw il-mudell ta' input li se jimmassimizza l-favorabbiltà tal-udjenza lejn naħa partikolari ta' dibattitu f'dawra arbitrarja.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome pirmąjį praktinį žingsnį kuriant automatizuotą diskusijų agent ą: naujausią nuolatinį prognozuojamąjį model į diskusijų laimėtojams prognozuoti. Turėdami tikslų nuspėjamąjį model į, galime objektyviai įvertinti pareiškimo kokybę konkrečiu metu diskusijose. Šis modelis grindžiamas nuolatine neuralinio tinklo architektūra, kuri suteikia galimybę modeliui veiksmingai atskaityti visas diskusijas rengiant prognozes. Mūsų modelis pasiekia naujausią tikslumą diskusijų transkripcijų duomenų rinkinyje, pažymėtame, kad diskusijų grupės palankiai vertina auditoriją. Galiausiai diskutuojame apie tai, kaip būsimas darbas gali paskatinti mūsų siūlomą model į sukurti automatizuotą diskusijų agent ą. We accomplish this by determining the model input that will maximize audience favorability toward a given side of a debate at an arbitrary turn.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan langkah pertama praktik menuju penciptaan ejen debat automatik: model ramalan yang berkembang untuk meramalkan pemenang debat. By having an accurate predictive model, we are able to objectively rate the quality of a statement made at a specific turn in a debate.  The model is based on a recurrent neural network architecture with attention, which allows the model to effectively account for the entire debate when making its prediction.  Model kita mencapai ketepatan terbaik pada set data transkrip debat yang dicatat dengan keuntungan penonton pasukan debat. Finally, we discuss how future work can leverage our proposed model for the creation of an automated debate agent.  Kami mencapai ini dengan menentukan input model yang akan maksimumkan keuntungan penonton terhadap sisi tertentu debat pada giliran arbitrari.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид автоматжуулсан өрсөлдөөний агент үүсгэх дээр практикийн анхны алхам бий болгож тайлбарлаж байна: өрсөлдөөний ялагчдыг таамаглах үед урлагийн дахин дахин таамаглах загвар юм. Яг тодорхой таамаглалтын загвар байхдаа бид тухай ярилцлаганд тодорхой хэлэлцээний сайн чанарыг зорилготой хэмжээнд тодорхойлох боломжтой болно. Энэ загвар нь анхаарал хангалттай дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний архитектур дээр суурилсан. Энэ загвар нь таамаглах үед бүх ярилцлагуудыг үр дүнтэй тодорхойлж чадна. Бидний загварын загвар нь зөрчилдөөний багийн дуртай үзэгчдийн өгөгдлийн хэлбэрүүдийн давтамжтайгаар дэмжигдсэн өгөгдлийн хувьд урлагийн үндсэн зөв байдлыг хүргэж чадна. Эцэст нь, бид ирээдүйн ажлын загварыг автоматжуулан өрсөлдөөн агентын бүтээх загварын тулд хэрхэн нөлөөлж чадах талаар ярилцдаг. Бид үүнийг зөрчилдөөний тухай ярилцлагын нэг талд хүмүүсийн нөлөөлөлтийг нэмэгдүүлэх загварын оролцоог тодорхойлох болно.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз автоматты дискуссия агентін құру үшін практикалық бірінші қадам келтіреміз: дискуссия жетілдірушілерді бақылау үшін қайталау үлгісі. Дәл дұрыс таңдау үлгісі бар, бұл дебаттың мақсатты сапасын өзгертуге болады. Бұл үлгі қайталанатын невралдық желінің архитектурасына негізделген. Бұл үлгі өзінің бақылау кезінде бүкіл дебаттарды тәуелдіруге мүмкіндік береді. Біздің үлгіміз дебаттау тобындағы аудиториялардың көмектесілігі жақсы дебаттау транскрипттерінің деректер қорларында дұрыс жеткізеді. Соңында, біз болашақ жұмыс істеу үшін автоматты дискуссия агентін құру үшін қолданылатын үлгілерімізді қалай көмектесе алатын талқылаймыз. Біз бұл үлгі келтіру үлгісін анықтап, аудиториялардың көмектесілігін келтірілген дискуссияның бір жағына көмектеседі.', 'no': 'I denne papiret introduserer vi ein praktisk første steg mot opprettinga av ein automatisk debattagent: ein rekursiv modell for å forventa debattvinner. Ved å ha eit nøyaktig prediktiv modell, kan vi objektiv vurdere kvaliteten til eit uttale som er lagt på ein spesifikk snu i ein debatt. Modellen er basert på ein rekurserande neuralnettverkstarkitektur med oppmerksomhet, som tillater modellen å faktisk kontakte for heile debatt når det gjer forhåndsvising. Modellen vårt gjer nøyaktighet for kunsten på ein datasett av debatt-transkript som er merkt med publikatoren for debatt-gruppene. I slutt diskuterer vi korleis framtidige arbeid kan levera vår foreslått modell for oppretting av ein automatisk debattagent. Vi fullfører dette ved å bestemme inndata i modellen som vil maksimere favoritet for publikum til ein gjeven side av ein debatt på ein tilfeldig snu.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm un prim pas practic spre crearea unui agent de dezbatere automat: un model predictiv recurent de ultimă generație pentru predicția câștigătorilor dezbaterii. Având un model predictiv precis, suntem capabili să evaluăm în mod obiectiv calitatea unei declarații făcute la un anumit rând într-o dezbatere. Modelul se bazează pe o arhitectură de rețea neurală recurentă cu atenție, care permite modelului să explice în mod eficient întreaga dezbatere atunci când face predicția sa. Modelul nostru obține acuratețe de ultimă oră pe un set de date de transcrieri de dezbateri adnotate cu favorizarea publicului echipelor de dezbatere. În cele din urmă, discutăm cum activitatea viitoare poate valorifica modelul propus pentru crearea unui agent de dezbatere automat. Realizăm acest lucru prin determinarea intrării modelului care va maximiza favorizarea publicului față de o anumită parte a unei dezbateri la o cotitură arbitrară.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy praktyczny pierwszy krok w kierunku stworzenia zautomatyzowanego agenta debaty: najnowocześniejszego powtarzającego się modelu predykcyjnego do przewidywania zwycięzców debaty. Posiadając dokładny model predykcyjny, jesteśmy w stanie obiektywnie ocenić jakość oświadczenia złożonego na konkretnym zwrotu debaty. Model oparty jest na powtarzającej się architekturze sieci neuronowej z uwagą, co pozwala modelowi skutecznie uwzględnić całą debatę przy dokonywaniu jej przewidywania. Nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejszą dokładność na zbiorze danych transkrypcji debaty z adnotacją publiczności zespołów debaty. Na koniec omówimy, w jaki sposób przyszłe prace mogą wykorzystać nasz proponowany model stworzenia zautomatyzowanego agenta debaty. Osiągamy to poprzez określenie modelu wejścia, który zmaksymalizuje korzystność publiczności wobec danej strony debaty w dowolnym zakresie.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරධාන පළමු පැත්තක් පෙන්වන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක කතාව නිර්මාණය කරනවා: ප්\u200dරධාන සිද්ධානයක් පුරාවන්න හරියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අපිට පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ විදිහට කතාවක් කරලා  මොඩේල් අධිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ජාතික විද්\u200dයාපයක් අධිකාරයෙන් ඉන්නවා, ඒකෙන් මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය අපේ නිර්මාණය සම්බන්ධතාවක් ලැබෙනවා වාර්තා කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් එක්ක ප්\u200dරධාන කණ්ඩායම් ගැන දත්ත සූද්ධතාවක් ගැ අන්තිමට, අපි කතා කරනවා අනාගතයේ වැඩේ කොහොමද අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් ක අපි මේක අවස්ථාවන් කරනවා මොඩේල් ඇතුළු නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ අවස්ථාවක් විශාල කරන්න පුළුවන් වි', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo praktični prvi korak prema stvaranju automatskog agent a debata: ponavljajući predviđavajući model za predviđanje pobjednika debata. Imajući tačan predviđavajući model, možemo objektivno procijeniti kvalitet izjave koja je napravljena na određenom okviru u debati. Model je zasnovan na recidivnoj arhitekturi neuralne mreže sa pažnjom, što omogućava modelu da se efikasno računa na cijelu raspravu kada se predviđa. Naš model postiže tačnost države umjetnosti na sastavu podataka o prepistima debata koji su annotirani uslugnošću publike debata tima. Konačno razgovaramo o tome kako budući rad može uticati na naš predloženi model za stvaranje automatskog debatnog agenta. To ćemo postići odlučujući model ulaza koji će maksimalizirati uslugu publike prema određenoj strani debati na proizvodnjem okviru.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa tallaabo caafimaad ah oo ugu horeysa abuuridda dal debab ah oo automatic ah: qoraal-state-of-the-art-recurring model of predictive-art for predictive winners debaasho. Markaan sameynayo qaab sax ah oo la sii sheegayo, waxaynu awoodi karnaa si toos ah u qiimeynayno qiimaha hadalka lagu sheegay marka lagu soo wareejiyo debaar gaar ah. Tusaalada waxaa ku saleysan dhismaha shabakadda neurada ee soo socda, kaas oo dhaqdhaqaaqi kara inuu si faa’iido ah u xisaabiyo debaanka oo dhan marka uu soo hor dhigo. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu ku gaadhaa saxda xaaladda farshaxanka ah oo ku qoran qoraalka debaasho oo la dhibaataysan dhaqaalaha daryeelka kooxda debaanka. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu ka sheekeynaynaa sida shaqada mustaqbalka ah uu u sameyn karo modelalka la soo jeeday in loo abuuro dal debaar ah oo automatic ah. Waxan baannu ku dhammaynaa qoraalka sameynta, kaas oo dhaqdhaqaalaha dhaqaalaha dhaqaalaha u kordhin kara dhinaca debaar lagu qorayo marka lagu soo wareejiyo xaalada sharaf ah.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats introducerar vi ett praktiskt första steg mot skapandet av en automatiserad debattagent: en state-of-the-art återkommande prediktiv modell för att förutsäga debattvinnare. Genom att ha en korrekt prediktiv modell kan vi objektivt värdera kvaliteten på ett uttalande som görs vid en specifik vändning i en debatt. Modellen bygger på en återkommande neuralt nätverksarkitektur med uppmärksamhet, vilket gör att modellen effektivt kan redogöra för hela debatten när den gör sin förutsägelse. Vår modell uppnår toppmodern noggrannhet på en dataset av debattavskrifter kommenterade med publikens fördel av debattgrupperna. Slutligen diskuterar vi hur framtida arbete kan utnyttja vår föreslagna modell för skapandet av en automatiserad debattagent. Vi uppnår detta genom att bestämma den modell input som kommer att maximera publikens gynnsamhet mot en given sida av en debatt vid en godtycklig vändning.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு தானியங்கிய விவாதத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கு முதல் படி அடையாளம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம்: விவாதத்தில் வெற்றியடைந்த வெற்ற ஒரு விவாதத்தில் செய்யப்பட்ட ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட முறையில் ஒரு விவாதத்தில் செய்த ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட முறையில் ஒரு கூற்ற இந்த மாதிரி மீண்டும் திரும்பப் புதிய பிணையத்தின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, அது மாதிரி முழு விவாதத்திற்கும் முழு விவாதத்திற்கு எங்கள் மாதிரி விவாதத்தின் பார்வையாளர் குழுக்களின் பிடிப்புக்குரிமையில் தகவல் குறிப்புகளை பெறுகிறது. Finally, we discuss how future work can leverage our proposed model for the creation of an automated debate agent.  கொடுக்கப்பட்ட விவாதத்தின் பக்கத்தில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி உள்ளீட்டை தீர்மானித்தால் இதை நிறைவேற்றுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک اٹوٹی بحث اہینٹ کی پیدائش کی طرف ایک پاکیزہ پہلی قدم پیش آتے ہیں: ایک دوبارہ پیش آیندہ موڈل جو بحث غالب کرنے والوں کی پیش آئی ہے۔ ایک دقیق پیش بینی موڈل کے ذریعہ، ہم ایک بحث میں ایک مقررہ تبدیل میں ایک بات کی کیفیت کا ذریعہ مقرر کر سکتے ہیں. موڈل ایک دوبارہ نیورل نیٹ ورک معماری پر بنیاد ہے جس کی توجه کے ساتھ موڈل کو مفید طور پر حساب کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے جب اس کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے۔ ہماری مدل بحث گروہوں کے ڈیٹ سٹ پر ایک دھوپ کے ٹرنسکرپٹوں کی دھوپ کی دھوپ کی مہربانی کے ساتھ آواز دی گئی ہے. آخر میں ہم بحث کر رہے ہیں کہ آگے کے کام کس طرح ہمارے پیشنهاد کی مدل کو آزاد کرسکتے ہیں ایک آٹوٹی بحث ایجنٹ کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم یہ کام کر رہے ہیں کہ مدل ورود کا مقرر کریں جو ایک بحث کے ایک مقررہ کنارے پر اہلِ نظر کی مہربانی کو بڑھائے گا۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz avtomatik boshqaruvchi debar agentini yaratishga birinchi qadam beramiz: davom etish uchun davom etish muvaffaqiyatli modeli. Ko'rib chiqish modeli bo'lishi bilan biz bir hodisa muddatda bir javob turgan so'zning sifatini ko'paytirish mumkin. Name Bizning modelimiz murojaat guruhlarining taʼminlovchilari bilan taʼminlov qiladigan maʼlumot tarkibini aniqlashga ega bo'ladi. Endi biz kelajakdagi ishni qanday qilishimizni o'ylab turishimiz mumkin, biz avtomatik boshlangan debate agentini yaratish uchun. Biz buni arbitrat turi bilan taqdim qiladigan muammolar yordamida qo'shiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ đưa ra bước đầu tiên thực sự dẫn đến việc tạo ra một nhân viên tranh luận tự động: một mô hình dự đoán hàng đầu tiên hàng đầu tiên tiên tiên tiên tiên tiên về người chiến thắng. Bằng cách có một mô hình dự đoán chính xác, chúng ta có thể đánh giá khách quan chất lượng của một lời tuyên bố được đưa ra ở một bước ngoặt đặc biệt trong một cuộc tranh luận. Mô hình dựa trên một cấu trúc dây thần kinh thường xuyên, với sự chú ý, cho phép mô hình có khả năng giải thích to àn bộ cuộc tranh luận khi dự đoán. Mô hình của chúng tôi đạt được độ chính xác cao nhất trên một tập tin ghi chép tranh luận được ghi chú với sự ưa thích của các đội tranh luận. Cuối cùng, chúng ta bàn bạc về cách làm việc tương lai có thể cải thiện mô hình đề xuất để tạo một nhân viên tranh luận tự động. Chúng ta đạt được điều này bằng cách quyết định các mẫu nhập mà sẽ tối đa số lượng khán giả ưa thích đối với một mặt rõ ràng của cuộc tranh luận tại một khúc rẽ ngẫu nhiên.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме практическа първа стъпка към създаването на автоматизиран дебат агент: най-модерен повтарящ се модел за предсказване на победителите в дебати. Като разполагаме с точен прогнозен модел, ние сме в състояние обективно да оценим качеството на изявление, направено в конкретен обрат в дебат. Моделът се основава на повтаряща се невронна мрежа архитектура с внимание, което позволява на модела ефективно да отчита целия дебат при изготвянето на прогнозите си. Нашият модел постига най-съвременна точност на набор от данни от транскрипции на дебати, анотирани с предпочитание на публиката от отборите по дебати. И накрая, обсъждаме как бъдещата работа може да използва нашия предложен модел за създаване на автоматизиран дебат агент. Ние постигаме това, като определим входа на модела, който ще увеличи благоприятността на аудиторията към дадена страна на дебата при произволен обрат.', 'da': 'I denne artikel introducerer vi et praktisk første skridt mod skabelsen af en automatiseret debat agent: en state-of-the-art tilbagevendende prædiktiv model til forudsigelse af debat vindere. Ved at have en præcis prædiktiv model er vi i stand til objektivt at vurdere kvaliteten af en udtalelse, der er fremsat på et bestemt tidspunkt i en debat. Modellen er baseret på en tilbagevendende neural netværksarkitektur med opmærksomhed, som gør det muligt for modellen effektivt at redegøre for hele debatten, når den laver sin forudsigelse. Vores model opnår state-of-the-art nøjagtighed på et datasæt af debatudskrifter annoteret med publikums favorisering af debatholdene. Endelig drøfter vi, hvordan det fremtidige arbejde kan udnytte vores foreslåede model til oprettelse af en automatiseret debat agent. Vi opnår dette ved at bestemme den model input, der vil maksimere publikums gunstighed over for en given side af en debat på en vilkårlig vending.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel introduceren we een praktische eerste stap naar de creatie van een geautomatiseerde debat agent: een state-of-the-art recidivierend voorspellend model voor het voorspellen van debat winnaars. Door een nauwkeurig voorspellend model te hebben, zijn we in staat om objectief de kwaliteit van een verklaring te beoordelen die wordt afgelegd op een specifieke wending in een debat. Het model is gebaseerd op een terugkerende neurale netwerkarchitectuur met aandacht, waardoor het model effectief rekening kan houden met het hele debat bij het maken van zijn voorspelling. Ons model bereikt state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid op een dataset van debat transcripts geannoteerd met de gunstigheid van het publiek van de debat teams. Tot slot bespreken we hoe toekomstig werk gebruik kan maken van ons voorgestelde model voor het creëren van een geautomatiseerde debat agent. We bereiken dit door het bepalen van de model input die de gunstigheid van het publiek ten opzichte van een bepaalde kant van een debat op een willekeurige wending maximaliseert.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen praktischen ersten Schritt zur Schaffung eines automatisierten Debatte Agents vor: ein State-of-the-Art wiederkehrendes Vorhersagemodell zur Vorhersage von Debatte Gewinner. Durch ein genaues Vorhersagemodell können wir objektiv die Qualität einer Aussage beurteilen, die an einer bestimmten Wende in einer Debatte abgegeben wurde. Das Modell basiert auf einer wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerkarchitektur mit Aufmerksamkeit, die es dem Modell ermöglicht, die gesamte Debatte bei der Vorhersage effektiv zu berücksichtigen. Unser Modell erreicht State-of-the-Art Genauigkeit auf einem Datensatz von Debatte Transkripten, die mit der Publikumsbegünstigung der Debatte Teams kommentiert sind. Abschließend diskutieren wir, wie zukünftige Arbeiten unser vorgeschlagenes Modell zur Schaffung eines automatisierten Debatte Agents nutzen können. Wir erreichen dies, indem wir den Modellinput bestimmen, der die Gunst des Publikums gegenüber einer bestimmten Seite einer Debatte bei einer willkürlichen Wendung maximiert.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo praktični prvi korak prema stvaranju automatskog agent a rasprave: ponavljajući predviđavajući model za predviđanje pobjednika debata. Imajući precizan predviđavajući model, možemo objektivno procijeniti kvalitet izjave koja je napravljena na određenom okviru u raspravi. Model se temelji na rekonstruiranoj arhitekturi neuralne mreže s pažnjom, što omogućava model da učinkovito računa cijelu raspravu kada predviđa. Naš model postiže tačnost države umjetnosti o skupini podataka o prepistima debata koji su navodili usluge publike debatnih tima. Konačno razgovaramo o tome kako budući rad može utjecati na naš predloženi model za stvaranje automatskog debatnog agenta. To ćemo postići utvrđivanjem model a uloga koji će maksimalizirati usluge publike prema određenoj strani rasprave na proizvodnjem okviru.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan langkah pertama praktis menuju penciptaan agen debat otomatis: model prediksi yang berkurang state-of-the-art untuk memprediksi pemenang debat. By having an accurate predictive model, we are able to objectively rate the quality of a statement made at a specific turn in a debate.  Model ini berdasarkan arsitektur jaringan saraf yang berulang-ulang dengan perhatian, yang memungkinkan model untuk secara efektif memperhitungkan seluruh debat ketika membuat prediksinya. Model kita mencapai akurasi state-of-the-art pada set data transkrip debat yang dicatat dengan keuntungan penonton tim debat. Akhirnya, kita mendiskusikan bagaimana pekerjaan masa depan bisa menggunakan model kami yang diusulkan untuk menciptakan agen debat otomatis. Kami mencapai ini dengan menentukan input model yang akan memaksimalkan keuntungan penonton menuju sisi tertentu dari debat pada giliran secara arbitrar.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 자동 변론 대리인을 만드는 실제 첫 번째 단계인 변론 승자를 예측하는 데 사용되는 가장 선진적인 순환 예측 모델을 소개했다.정확한 예측 모델을 구축함으로써 우리는 변론 중의 특정한 전환점의 진술 품질을 객관적으로 평가할 수 있다.이 모델은 주의력을 가진 귀속 신경 네트워크 구조를 바탕으로 이 모델이 예측을 할 때 전체 변론을 효과적으로 해석할 수 있다.우리의 모델은 변론 기록 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 정확성을 실현했고 변론 팀의 관중 선호도를 나타냈다.마지막으로, 우리는 미래의 업무가 우리가 제시한 모델을 어떻게 이용하여 자동 변론 대리인을 만드는지 토론할 것이다.우리는 모델 입력을 확정함으로써 이 점을 실현한다. 이 모델 입력은 임의로 방향을 바꿀 때 관중들이 변론에 대한 지지도를 최대한 높일 것이다.', 'sw': 'In this paper we introduce a practical first step towards the creation of an automated debate agent: a state-of-the-art recurrent predictive model for predicting debate winners.  Kwa kuwa na mifano sahihi ya kutabiri, tunaweza kwa lengo la kuongeza kiwango cha tamko lililotengenezwa katika mjadala fulani. Mfano huu unajikita na ujenzi wa mtandao unaoendelea kwa makini, ambalo unaruhusu mtindo wa kutoa hisia kwa ufanisi wa mjadala huo mzima unapofanya utabiri wake. Mfano wetu umefanikiwa ukweli wa hali ya sanaa juu ya seti ya taarifa za mijadala iliyokuwa ikidhihirishwa na ustawi wa timu za mjadala. Mwisho, tunajadili jinsi kazi ya baadaye inavyoweza kutumikia mtindo wetu wa pendekezo wa kutengeneza mkakati wa mjadala wa kujitegemea. Tunaitimiza hili kwa kuamua kituo hicho kinachoweza kuongeza uwezekano wa hadhira kwenye upande given wa mjadala katika upande wa kiholela.', 'af': "In hierdie papier introduseer ons 'n praktiese eerste stap teenoor die skepping van 'n outomatiese debat agent:  'n staat van die kuns herhaalde voorskou model vir voorskou van debat winsters. Deur 'n presies voorskou model te hê, kan ons objektief die kwaliteit van 'n opdrag waarmee in 'n spesifieke skakel in 'n debatting gemaak word. Die model is gebaseer op 'n herhaalde neuralnetwerk arkitektuur met aandag, wat die model toelaat om effektief rekening vir die hele debatting te doen wanneer sy voorskou maak. Ons model bereik staat-van-kunsten-presies op 'n datastel van debat-transkripte wat aangeteken is met publieksie-favoriteit van die debat-teams. Eindelik bespreek ons hoe toekomstige werk ons voorgestelde model kan verwys vir die skepping van 'n outomatiese debattagent. Ons doen dit voldoen deur die model invoer te bepaal wat publiekerheidsmoontlikheid tot 'n gegewe kant van 'n debat op 'n willekeurige draai sal maksimaliseer.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne paraqesim një hap praktik të parë drejt krijimit të një agjenti të debatit të automatizuar: një model parashikues të përhershëm më të lartë për parashikimin e fituesve të debatit. Duke pasur një model të saktë parashikues, ne jemi në gjendje të vlerësojmë objektivisht cilësinë e një deklarate të bërë në një kthesë të caktuar në një debat. Modeli bazohet në një arkitekturë të përsëritur të rrjetit nervor me vëmendje, e cila lejon modelin të llogarisë efektivisht për të gjithë debatin kur bën parashikimet e tij. Modeli ynë arrin saktësinë më të lartë në një sërë të dhënash të transkripteve të debatit të anotuar me favorabilitetin e publikut të ekipave të debatit. Më në fund, diskutojmë se si puna e ardhshme mund të përdorë modelin tonë të propozuar për krijimin e një agjenti të debatit automatik. We accomplish this by determining the model input that will maximize audience favorability toward a given side of a debate at an arbitrary turn.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም የተለየ ውይይት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢን ለመፍጠር የፊተኛውን እርምጃን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተፈጸመ የውይይት ዓይነት በመኖር፣ በተለያዩ ውይይት ውስጥ የተደረገውን የውይይት ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሞዴላው የሚቀጠል የደዌብ መረብ መሠረት መሠረት ላይ ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የዓለማዊ ሥርዓት ግንኙነት የዳታ ጽሑፎችን በተቃውሞ የውይይት መድረክ ላይ አግኝቷል፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ የመጨረሻው ሥራ እንዴት እንደሚችል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን አካባቢ ዘወትር በተደረገው ክርክር ላይ የተሰኘውን የድምፅ ጥያቄን በማረጋገጥ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک قدم اولین کاری را به سوی ایجاد یک مامور بحث خودکار معرفی می کنیم: یک مدل پیش بینی دوباره پیش بینی\u200cکننده هنر برای پیش بینی برنده\u200cهای بحث. با یک مدل دقیق پیش بینی داشتن، ما قادر هستیم که با هدفی مقدار کیفیت یک گزارش را در یک تبدیل خاص در یک بحث مقرر کنیم. این مدل بر اساس یک معماری شبکه عصبی بازگشت با توجه است که به مدل اجازه می دهد که موقع پیش بینی آن برای کل بحث موثر حساب کند. مدل ما دقیقات وضعیت هنری را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای بحث می\u200cرساند که با خوشبختی از گروه\u200cهای بحث به مردم نشان داده شده است. بالاخره، ما در مورد این صحبت می کنیم که چگونه کار آینده می تواند مدل پیشنهاد ما را برای ایجاد یک مامور بحث خودکار تأثیر دهد. ما این را با تعیین کردن ورودی مدل انجام می دهیم که به سمت یک طرف داده شده از بحث در یک تبدیل تصادفی بیشتر خواهد کرد.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք առաջին պրակտիկ քայլը ավտոմատիկ քննարկումների գործակալի ստեղծման ուղղությամբ՝ ամենաբարձր նորից կանխատեսող մոդել, որը կանխատեսում է քննարկումների հաղթերին: Ճշմարիտ կանխատեսողական մոդել ունենալով, մենք կարող ենք օբյեկտիվ գնահատել քննարկության ընթացքում արված հայտարարության որակը: Մոդելը հիմնված է կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետության վրա, որն ուշադրություն ունի, որը թույլ է տալիս, որ մոդելը արդյունավետ հաշվի առնի ամբողջ քննարկումները իր կանխատեսման ընթացքում: Մեր մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր ճշգրտությունը քննարկումների վերագրությունների տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որոնք նշում են լսարանի խորախությունը: Վերջապես, մենք քննարկում ենք, թե ինչպես ապագա աշխատանքը կարող է օգտագործել մեր առաջարկված մոդելը ավտոմատիկ քննարկության գործակալի ստեղծման համար: We accomplish this by determining the model input that will maximize audience favorability toward a given side of a debate at an arbitrary turn.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz otomatik debat ajaýyny bejermek üçin praktik bir adım tanyşýarys: debat gazananlaryny öňünden öňünden gelen täsirli durum. Dogry öngörümli nusga bar bolsak, debatyň üstünde edilen a ýdyşyň howpsuzlygyny maksadly derejä edip bileris. Bu nusga üns berilýän bir tekrarly näral şebeke arhitektegine daýanýar. Bu nusga bütin debatlary öňünden geçirmek üçin täsirli bir hasaplamaga mümkin edýär. Biziň modelimiz debat toparlaryň gowy görkezilýän dataýa çözümleri hakykatdanam başarýar. Soňunda, gelejekde işlerimiziň özüni otomatik debat ajaýyny bejermek üçin nusgasymyzyň nähili etkinleşendigini gürrüň edýäris. Biz bu şekilde başarıyoruz, bilinçlerin bir tartışma tarafından verilen bir şekilde gözdesini azaltmak için modeli girişini tanımlayarak.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, mübahisədə qalib gələnləri tədbir etmək üçün tədbir edilən tədbir a ğacının yaratmasına ilk dəfə praktik bir adım təşkil edirik. Doğru tədbir modeli sahibi olaraq, mübahisədə müəyyən edilmiş bir ifadənin keyfiyyətini müəyyən edə bilərik. Model tədbir etdiyi zaman modeli bütün müzakirələrə müvafiq olaraq hesab etməyə imkan verir. Bizim modellərimiz müzakirə ekiplerinin gözəlliğini göstərən müzakirə qurğuları ilə verilən bir dəyişiklik transkriptlərin dəyişiklik dəyişikliyinə istinad edir. Sonunda, gələcək işimizin özünüzə təklif edilmiş modellərimizi automatlı müzakirə ağacının yaratması üçün necə yaradılacağını tartışırıq. Biz bunu mübahisədə mübahisədə olan bir tərəfə göstərilən modeli girişini təsdiqləyib edərik.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিতর্কের সৃষ্টির প্রতি প্রথম পদক্ষেপ চিহ্নিত করেছি: বিতর্কের বিরুদ্ধে বিতর্কের প্রতি প্রত্যাবর্তনে একটি সঠিক ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী মডেল থাকার মাধ্যমে আমরা বিতর্কে নির্দিষ্ট এক বিবৃতির মান হারাতে সক্ষম। মডেলটি পুরো বিতর্কের জন্য কার্যকর করে প্রত্যাবর্তনের নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, যেটি ভবিষ্যৎবাণী করার সময় মডেলের জন আমাদের মডেল এই বিতর্ক দলের দর্শকদের পছন্দের দ্বারা বিতর্কের একটি ডাটা ট্রান্স্ক্রিপ্টগুলোতে রাষ্ট্রের পরিস্থিতি অর্জন করে। অবশেষে, আমরা আলোচনা করি ভবিষ্যতের কাজ কিভাবে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল তৈরি করতে পারে স্বয়ংক্রিয় বিতর্কের এজেন্ট তৈর আমরা এটা সম্পূর্ণ করি মডেল ইনপুট নির্ধারণের মাধ্যমে যা বিতর্কের একটি দিকে শ্রবণকারীদের প্রিয় পছন্দ বৃদ্ধি করবে।', 'ca': "En aquest paper introduïm un primer pas pràctic cap a la creació d'un agent de debat automatitzat: un model predictiu recurrent de l'última generació per predir els guanyadors de debat. Tenint un model predictiu precis, podem valorar objectivament la qualitat d'una declaració feta a un voltant específic en un debat. El model es basa en una arquitectura recurrent de xarxa neural amb atenció, que permet que el model explici efectivament tot el debat quan fa la seva predicció. El nostre model aconsegueix la precisió més moderna en un conjunt de dades de transcripcions de debat anotats amb la favorabilitat del públic dels equips de debat. Finalment, discutem com el futur treball pot aprofitar el nostre model proposat per crear un agent de debat automatitzat. We accomplish this by determining the model input that will maximize audience favorability toward a given side of a debate at an arbitrary turn.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme praktický první krok směrem k vytvoření automatizovaného debatního agenta: nejmodernějšího opakovaného prediktivního modelu pro predikci vítězů debaty. Díky přesnému prediktivnímu modelu jsme schopni objektivně hodnotit kvalitu prohlášení učiněného při konkrétním obratu diskuse. Model je založen na recidivující architektuře neuronové sítě s pozorností, což umožňuje modelu efektivně zohlednit celou debatu při provádění predikce. Náš model dosahuje nejmodernější přesnosti na datové sadě přepisů debat anotovaných s příznivostí publika debatních týmů. Na závěr diskutujeme, jak budoucí práce může využít náš navrhovaný model pro vytvoření automatizovaného debatního agenta. Toho dosáhneme určením modelového vstupu, který maximalizuje příznivost publika k dané straně debaty při libovolném zatáčení.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme käytännön ensimmäisen askeleen kohti automaattisen keskusteluagentin luomista: uusinta toistuvia ennustemalleja väittelyn voittajien ennustamiseen. Tarkan ennustemallin avulla voimme objektiivisesti arvioida keskustelun tietyssä käänteessä annetun lausunnon laatua. Malli perustuu toistuvaan hermoverkkoarkkitehtuuriin, jonka avulla malli pystyy tehokkaasti huomioimaan koko keskustelun ennustettaessa. Mallimme saavuttaa huipputason tarkkuuden väittelytiedostojen aineistossa, johon on merkitty väittelytiimien suosio. Lopuksi pohdimme, miten tulevaisuuden työ voi hyödyntää ehdotettua mallia automaattisen keskusteluagentin luomiseksi. Saavutamme tämän määrittämällä mallin panoksen, joka maksimoi yleisön suosion tiettyä puolta keskustelussa mielivaltaisesti.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame praktilist esimest sammu automatiseeritud aruteluagendi loomise suunas: kaasaegset korduvat ennustusmudelit aruteluvõitjate prognoosimiseks. Täpse ennustusmudeli abil saame objektiivselt hinnata arutelu konkreetses pöördes tehtud avalduse kvaliteeti. Mudel põhineb korduval närvivõrgu arhitektuuril, mis võimaldab mudelil prognoosi tegemisel tõhusalt arvestada kogu arutelu. Meie mudel saavutab kaasaegse täpsuse arutelude transkriptsioonide andmekogumil, mis on märgitud arutelumeeskondade publiku soodsusega. Lõpuks arutame, kuidas tulevane töö saab kasutada meie pakutud mudelit automatiseeritud aruteluagendi loomiseks. Me saavutame selle, määrates mudeli sisendi, mis maksimeerib publiku soodsuse arutelu teatud poole suhtes suvalises pöördes.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo praktični prvi korak prema stvaranju automatskog agent a debata: ponavljajući predviđavajući model za predviđanje pobjednika debata. Imajući precizan predviđavajući model, možemo objektivno procijeniti kvalitet izjave koja je napravljena na određenom okviru u debati. Model se temelji na recidivnoj arhitekturi neuralne mreže sa pažnjom, što omogućava model da učinkovito računa cijelu debatu kada predviđa. Naš model postiže tačnost države umjetnosti na skupini podataka o prepistima debata koji su annotirani uslugnošću publike debatnih tima. Konačno, razgovaramo o tome kako budući rad može uticati na naš predloženi model za stvaranje automatskog debatnog agenta. To ćemo postići odlučujući model ulaganja koji će maksimalizirati uslugu publike prema određenoj strani rasprave na proizvodnjem okviru.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo praktičen prvi korak k oblikovanju avtomatiziranega debatnega agenta: najsodobnejši ponavljajoči se napovedovalni model za napovedovanje zmagovalcev debate. Z natančnim napovednim modelom lahko objektivno ocenimo kakovost izjave, podane na določenem obratu v razpravi. Model temelji na ponavljajoči se arhitekturi nevronskega omrežja s pozornostjo, kar omogoča modelu učinkovito upoštevanje celotne debate pri napovedovanju. Naš model dosega najsodobnejšo natančnost na naboru podatkov prepisov debate, označenih z ugodnostjo občinstva debatnih ekip. Na koncu razpravljamo o tem, kako lahko prihodnje delo izkoristi naš predlagani model za oblikovanje avtomatiziranega debatnega agenta. To dosežemo tako, da določimo vnos modela, ki bo povečal priljubljenost občinstva do dane strani debate v poljubnem obratu.', 'jv': '@a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello! Dadine nganggo model sing apik dadi, kita iso iso nggawe kesempatan deweke ngomong nik nggawe tarjamahan model sing saben ngesaben Arkturaturanan Neral sing sampek, awak dhéwé iso nggunakake model sing apik tenan kanggo debian sing wis nguasai perbudhakan sampek. modellu dhéwé iso nglanggar langgar -state-of-the-are Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé pisan segala macem depan nêmên iso nggawe model sing nyimpen kanggo nggawe barang otomatik debatar iki. Awak dhéwé nggawe iki dadi sing nêmên anyar tentang dadi bisa nguasai perkoro sing luwih apik kanggo masalah sing ngedol', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takarda, Munã ƙara wata hango na farko zuwa a ƙiƙiro wani mai husũma na farat ɗaya: a state-of-the-art-re-retaining misalin ya yi bayani ga zaman jayaya. Ina iya sami da wani misãlai mai ƙayyade gafaka, za mu iya iya ƙayyade sifar maganar da aka faɗa a a cikin jayayya. An daidaita shirin ayuka a kan wani matsayin tsarin tarakin neural wanda ya sake da aikin aiki, wanda ya yarda motsi ya zama mai amfani da amfani da kwamfyutan jayaya idan an yi bayani da shi. Misalinmu ya sãmu halin-halin-sanar a kan wani matsayin taɓallun mutane da aka yi wa karatun saurãre da umarnin mutane. Haƙĩƙa, Munã jãyayya a kan jinsi aikin gabani zai iya samar da misalinmu wanda aka buɗa wa'adin wani mai husũma na farat ɗaya. Munã cika wannan da Muke ƙayyade cikin shirin ayuka wanda zai fi girma wa saurãre zuwa wani wuri wanda aka yi wa jayayya a cikin turɓãya.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים צעד ראשון מעשי לכיוון יצירת סוכן דיון אוטומטי: מודל צפוי חד-אופן מצפון לחזות מנצחים דיון. על ידי מודל צפוי מדויק, אנחנו מסוגלים להעריך באופן אובייקטיבי את איכות ההצהרה שנעשה בתור מסוים בתוך דיון. הדוגמא מבוססת על ארכיטקטורת רשת עצבית חוזרת עם תשומת לב, שמאפשר לדוגמא לחשבון באופן יעיל לכל הדיון כשעושה את החיווי שלה. המודל שלנו משיג מדויקת מוקדמת על קבוצת נתונים של תוצאות דיון שנעטפו עם חיובי הקהל של צוותי הדיון. סוף סוף, אנחנו מדברים איך העבודה העתידית יכולה להשתמש במודל המוצע שלנו לייצור סוכן דיון אוטומטי. אנחנו מצליחים להשיג את זה על ידי לקבוע את הכניסה המודל שיגביר למקסימום את החיובות של הקהל לכיוון צד מסוים של דיון בתור רציני.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་བགོ་སློང་བྱེད་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་དང་པོ་ཞིག་གསར་གཏོང་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་ཕལ་ཆེན་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་གྲངས་སུ་བཏང་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྣམས་ཐལ་ཡོད། མཐའ་མར་དེ། ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བགོ་སློང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་མིག ང་ཚོས་བྱ་བ་རེད་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་གི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་རྣམས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕར་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Further Investigation into Reference Bias in Monolingual Evaluation of Machine Translation', 'ar': 'مزيد من التحقيق في التحيز المرجعي في التقييم أحادي اللغة للترجمة الآلية', 'fr': "Étude approfondie du biais de référence dans l'évaluation monolingue de la traduction automatique", 'es': 'Investigación adicional sobre el sesgo de referencia en la evaluación monolingüe de la traducción automática', 'pt': 'Investigação adicional sobre viés de referência na avaliação monolíngue da tradução automática', 'ja': '機械翻訳の単語評価における参照バイアスのさらなる調査', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद के मोनोलिंगुअल मूल्यांकन में संदर्भ पूर्वाग्रह में आगे की जांच', 'zh': '机器翻译单语评估中参校偏差者更加探讨', 'ru': 'Дальнейшее исследование эталонной систематической ошибки в одноязычной оценке машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Imscrúdú Breise ar Laofacht Tagartha i Meastóireacht Aonteangach ar Aistriúchán Meaisín', 'ka': 'მეორე ინტერგურაცია რეფერენციის ბიაში მონოლინგური განსაზღვრებაში მაქსინის განსაზღვრებას', 'hu': 'Referencia Bias további vizsgálata a gépi fordítás egynyelvű értékelésében', 'el': 'Περαιτέρω διερεύνηση των προκαταλήψεων αναφοράς στη μονογλωσσική αξιολόγηση της μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'kk': 'Машин аудармасының бірнеше тілді оқу үшін сілтеме бияларына қарап зерттеу', 'it': 'Ulteriori indagini sui bias di riferimento nella valutazione monolingue della traduzione automatica', 'lt': 'Tolesnis tyrimas, susijęs su orientaciniais kliūtimis, susijusiais su mašin ų vertimo vertimu monolingu vertinimu', 'ms': 'penyelidikan lanjut ke dalam Bias Rujukan dalam Evaluasi Monolingual Terjemahan Mesin', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള മോണോളില്\u200d പരിഗണന ബിയാസിലേക്കുള്ള അന്വേഷണം', 'mt': 'Investigazzjoni ulterjuri fil-Bias ta’ Referenza fl-Evalwazzjoni Monolingwali tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'mn': 'Дараагийн судалгаа нь Машин хөрөнгө оруулалтын монолингийн хэлний оюутнуудад', 'pl': 'Dalsze badanie tendencji referencyjnych w jednojęzycznej ocenie tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'no': 'Further Investigation into Reference Bias in Monolingual Evaluation of Machine Translation', 'ro': 'Investigații suplimentare privind bias de referință în evaluarea monolingvă a traducerii automate', 'sr': 'Daljnja istraga u referentnim bijama u monolingviskoj procjeni prevoda mašine', 'so': 'Faahfaahin dheeraad ah ka baaraandegista reference-as ee ku qoran kaartaynta afka maskinen', 'sv': 'Ytterligare undersökning av referensbias vid enspråkig utvärdering av maskinöversättning', 'mk': 'Понатамошна истрага за референтни непријатности во монолингвалната евалуација на машинскиот превод', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ کی مولی زبان کی ارزیابی میں علائم تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tiếp tục điều tra tham chiếu Sách A', 'da': 'Yderligere undersøgelse af reference Bias i ensproget evaluering af maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Nader onderzoek naar referentiebias bij eentalige evaluatie van machinevertaling', 'ko': '단어 평가에서의 참조 편차 문제 재검토', 'hr': 'Daljnje istraživanje u referentnim bijama u monojezičkoj procjeni prevoda strojeva', 'id': 'Penyelidikan Lanjutan Kecelakaan Referensi dalam Evaluasi Monolingual dari Translation Mesin', 'fa': 'تحقیقات بیشتری درباره بیس\u200cهای تعریف در ارزیابی یک نوع زبان ترجمه ماشین', 'bg': 'По-нататъшно изследване на референтните наклонности в едноезичната оценка на машинния превод', 'tr': 'Monolingul Taýýarlama Maşynyň Çevirmesi', 'af': 'Verdere Investigasie in Verwysing Bias in Monolinguele Evaluering van Masjien Vertaling', 'de': 'Weitere Untersuchungen zu Referenzverzerrungen bei der einsprachigen Bewertung maschineller Übersetzung', 'sq': 'Hetimi i mëtejshëm në dëmet e referimit në vlerësimin monolingual të përkthimit të makinave', 'sw': 'Tafiti zaidi ya Kufuatilia Makala katika Uthibitisho wa Kimataifa wa Utafiti wa Mashine', 'am': 'በሞሎንቋል ማስታወቂያ የመኪን ትርጉም ውስጥ የፍሬስ ቢas', 'hy': 'Հետագա հետազոտությունը մեքենայի թարգմանման միալեզու գնահատման հարցում', 'bn': 'ম্যাশিন অনুবাদের মোনোলোলাঙ্গাল পরীক্ষায় রেফারেন্স বিয়াসে আরো তদন্ত', 'az': 'Makinat 칂evirm톛sinin Monoli Dili Q톛rcl톛nm톛sind톛 Q톛rcl톛nm톛 Biyas캼na 쿮lav톛 Et', 'ca': 'Further Investigation into Reference Bias in Monolingual Evaluation of Machine Translation', 'cs': 'Další zkoumání referenčních předpokladů v monojazyčném hodnocení strojového překladu', 'et': 'Masintõlke ühekeelse hindamise viitesuundumuste edasine uurimine', 'fi': 'Jatkotutkimus konekäännöksen monikielisen arvioinnin viitebiasta', 'bs': 'Daljnja istraga u referentnim bijama u monolingvisnoj ocjeni prevoda strojeva', 'jv': 'Terus', 'he': 'חקירה נוספת על סבלנות רמזים בערכה מונולינגולית של תרגום מכונות', 'sk': 'Nadaljnja preiskava referenčnih pristranskosti pri enojezičnem evalvaciji strojnega prevajanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Further Investigation into Reference Bias in Monolingual Evaluation of Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Monolingual evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) aims to simplify human assessment by requiring assessors to compare the meaning of the MT output with a reference translation, opening up the task to a much larger pool of genuinely qualified evaluators. Monolingual evaluation runs the risk, however, of bias in favour of MT systems that happen to produce translations superficially similar to the reference and, consistent with this intuition, previous investigations have concluded monolingual assessment to be strongly biased in this respect. On re-examination of past analyses, we identify a series of potential analytical errors that force some important questions to be raised about the reliability of past conclusions, however. We subsequently carry out further investigation into reference bias via direct human assessment of MT adequacy via quality controlled crowd-sourcing. Contrary to both intuition and past conclusions, results for show no significant evidence of reference bias in monolingual evaluation of MT.', 'ar': 'يهدف التقييم أحادي اللغة للترجمة الآلية (MT) إلى تبسيط التقييم البشري من خلال مطالبة المقيّمين بمقارنة معنى مخرجات الترجمة الآلية مع ترجمة مرجعية ، مما يفتح المهمة أمام مجموعة أكبر بكثير من المقيّمين المؤهلين حقًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن التقييم أحادي اللغة ينطوي على خطر التحيز لصالح أنظمة الترجمة الآلية التي تصادف أنها تنتج ترجمات مشابهة ظاهريًا للمرجع ، وتماشياً مع هذا الحدس ، خلصت التحقيقات السابقة إلى أن التقييم أحادي اللغة متحيز بشدة في هذا الصدد. عند إعادة فحص التحليلات السابقة ، نحدد سلسلة من الأخطاء التحليلية المحتملة التي تفرض طرح بعض الأسئلة المهمة حول مصداقية الاستنتاجات السابقة. نجري بعد ذلك مزيدًا من التحقيقات في التحيز المرجعي من خلال التقييم البشري المباشر لمدى كفاية الترجمة الآلية من خلال التعهيد الجماعي الخاضع للرقابة. على عكس كل من الحدس والاستنتاجات السابقة ، لا تظهر نتائج البحث أي دليل مهم على التحيز المرجعي في التقييم أحادي اللغة لـ MT.', 'fr': "L'évaluation monolingue de la traduction automatique (MT) vise à simplifier l'évaluation humaine en obligeant les évaluateurs à comparer la signification du résultat de la traduction automatique avec une traduction de référence, ce qui ouvre la tâche à un plus grand nombre d'évaluateurs réellement qualifiés. L'évaluation monolingue risque cependant d'être biaisée en faveur des systèmes de traduction automatique qui produisent des traductions superficiellement similaires à la référence et, conformément à cette intuition, des recherches antérieures ont conclu que l'évaluation monolingue était fortement biaisée à cet égard. En réexaminant les analyses passées, nous identifions une série d'erreurs analytiques potentielles qui forcent toutefois certaines questions importantes à se poser quant à la fiabilité des conclusions passées. Nous menons ensuite une enquête plus approfondie sur le biais de référence via une évaluation humaine directe de l'adéquation de la MT via un crowd-sourcing contrôlé de qualité. Contrairement à l'intuition et aux conclusions antérieures, les résultats de ne montrent aucune preuve significative de biais de référence dans l'évaluation monolingue de la MT.", 'pt': 'A avaliação monolíngue da tradução automática (TA) visa simplificar a avaliação humana, exigindo que os avaliadores comparem o significado da saída da TA com uma tradução de referência, abrindo a tarefa para um grupo muito maior de avaliadores genuinamente qualificados. A avaliação monolíngue corre o risco, no entanto, de viés em favor de sistemas de TA que produzem traduções superficialmente semelhantes à referência e, de acordo com essa intuição, investigações anteriores concluíram que a avaliação monolíngue é fortemente tendenciosa a esse respeito. No reexame de análises passadas, identificamos uma série de potenciais erros analíticos que forçam algumas questões importantes a serem levantadas sobre a confiabilidade das conclusões anteriores. Em seguida, realizamos uma investigação mais aprofundada sobre o viés de referência por meio de avaliação humana direta da adequação do MT por meio de crowdsourcing controlado de qualidade. Ao contrário da intuição e das conclusões anteriores, os resultados para não mostram evidências significativas de viés de referência na avaliação monolíngue da MT.', 'es': 'La evaluación monolingüe de la traducción automática (MT) tiene como objetivo simplificar la evaluación humana al exigir a los evaluadores que comparen el significado del resultado de la MT con una traducción de referencia, lo que abre la tarea a un grupo mucho mayor de evaluadores genuinamente cualificados. Sin embargo, la evaluación monolingüe corre el riesgo de sesgo a favor de los sistemas de MT que producen traducciones superficialmente similares a la referencia y, de acuerdo con esta intuición, investigaciones anteriores han concluido que la evaluación monolingüe está fuertemente sesgada a este respecto. Sin embargo, al volver a examinar los análisis anteriores, identificamos una serie de posibles errores analíticos que obligan a plantearse algunas preguntas importantes sobre la fiabilidad de las conclusiones pasadas. Posteriormente, llevamos a cabo más investigaciones sobre el sesgo de referencia a través de la evaluación humana directa de la adecuación de la MT a través de la colaboración colectiva de calidad Contrariamente a la intuición y a las conclusiones del pasado, los resultados no muestran evidencia significativa de sesgo de referencia en la evaluación monolingüe de MT.', 'ja': '機械翻訳（ MT ）のモノリンガル評価は、評価者がMTアウトプットの意味を参照翻訳と比較することを要求することにより、人間の評価を簡素化することを目的としており、真に適格な評価者のはるかに大きなプールにタスクを開放している。 しかし、モノリンガル評価は、参照と表面的に類似した翻訳を生み出すMTシステムに有利な偏見のリスクを伴い、この直感と一致して、以前の調査は、この点で強く偏っていると結論づけています。 しかし、過去の分析の再検討では、過去の結論の信頼性についていくつかの重要な質問を強制する一連の潜在的な分析誤りを特定します。 その後、品質管理されたクラウドソーシングを介したMT妥当性の直接的な人間による評価を介して、参照バイアスのさらなる調査を実施します。 直観と過去の結論の両方に反して、の結果は、MTの単一言語評価における参照バイアスの有意な証拠を示さない。', 'zh': '机器翻译(MT)之单语估旨在于估员输机器翻译之义,与参译校之,以简人工,开其务于多真合格者。 然单语估有偏机器翻译之险,而MT统适生外似参考文献之译,且与此直觉同,前勘得其实,单语估于此有大偏见。 然重察曩时,列而失之,使人有可靠性于往时者。 既而质制之众包,直MT足性,更加参校。 与直觉旧相反,结果显示,于MT单语评无显参证据。', 'ru': 'Одноязычная оценка машинного перевода (МП) направлена на упрощение оценки человеком, требуя от оценщиков сравнения значения результата МП с эталонным переводом, открывая задачу гораздо большему пулу действительно квалифицированных оценщиков. Однако одноязычная оценка сопряжена с риском смещения в пользу систем МП, которые, как оказалось, производят переводы, внешне схожие с эталоном, и в соответствии с этой интуицией предыдущие исследования пришли к выводу, что одноязычная оценка в этом отношении сильно смещена. Однако при повторном рассмотрении прошлых анализов мы выявляем ряд потенциальных аналитических ошибок, которые заставляют поднять некоторые важные вопросы относительно надежности прошлых выводов. Впоследствии мы проводим дальнейшее исследование стандартной систематической ошибки посредством непосредственной человеческой оценки адекватности MT с помощью краудсорсинга с контролем качества. Вопреки как интуитивным, так и прошлым выводам, результаты для не показывают существенных доказательств эталонной систематической ошибки при одноязычной оценке MT.', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) के मोनोलिंगुअल मूल्यांकन का उद्देश्य मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं को संदर्भ अनुवाद के साथ एमटी आउटपुट के अर्थ की तुलना करने की आवश्यकता के लिए मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं की आवश्यकता के द्वारा मानव मूल्यांकन को सरल बनाना है, जो कार्य को वास्तव में योग्य मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं के बहुत बड़े पूल में खोलता है। मोनोलिंगुअल मूल्यांकन जोखिम चलाता है, हालांकि, एमटी सिस्टम के पक्ष में पूर्वाग्रह का जो संदर्भ के समान सतही रूप से अनुवाद का उत्पादन करने के लिए होता है और, इस अंतर्ज्ञान के अनुरूप, पिछली जांच ने इस संबंध में दृढ़ता से पक्षपाती होने के लिए मोनोलिंगुअल मूल्यांकन का निष्कर्ष निकाला है। पिछले विश्लेषणों की फिर से परीक्षा पर, हम संभावित विश्लेषणात्मक त्रुटियों की एक श्रृंखला की पहचान करते हैं जो पिछले निष्कर्षों की विश्वसनीयता के बारे में उठाए जाने वाले कुछ महत्वपूर्ण प्रश्नों को मजबूर करते हैं, हालांकि। हम बाद में गुणवत्ता नियंत्रित भीड़-सोर्सिंग के माध्यम से एमटी पर्याप्तता के प्रत्यक्ष मानव मूल्यांकन के माध्यम से संदर्भ पूर्वाग्रह में आगे की जांच करते हैं। अंतर्ज्ञान और पिछले निष्कर्षों दोनों के विपरीत, एमटी के मोनोलिंगुअल मूल्यांकन में संदर्भ पूर्वाग्रह का कोई महत्वपूर्ण सबूत नहीं दिखाने के लिए परिणाम।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag meastóireacht aonteangach ar Aistriúchán Meaisín (MT) measúnú daonna a shimpliú trí éileamh ar mheasúnóirí brí an aschuir MT a chur i gcomparáid le haistriúchán tagartha, ag oscailt an tasc do linn i bhfad níos mó de mheastóirí fíorcháilithe. Tá an baol ann, áfach, ó mheastóireacht aonteangach, go mbeadh an claonadh i bhfabhar córais MT a tháirgeann aistriúcháin atá cosúil go díreach leis an tagairt agus, ag teacht leis an intleacht seo, tá cinneadh déanta ag imscrúduithe roimhe seo go bhfuil measúnú aonteangach claonta go láidir ina leith seo. Tar éis anailísí a rinneadh san am a chuaigh thart a athscrúdú, sainaithnímid sraith earráidí anailíse a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann a chuireann iachall ar roinnt ceisteanna tábhachtacha a ardú faoi iontaofacht conclúidí san am a chuaigh thart, áfach. Déanaimid imscrúdú breise ina dhiaidh sin ar chlaonadh tagartha trí mheasúnú daonna díreach a dhéanamh ar leordhóthanacht MT trí sluafhoinsiú rialaithe cáilíochta. Murab ionann agus conclúidí an intuigthe agus na conclúidí roimhe seo, ní léiríonn na torthaí le haghaidh aon fhianaise shuntasach de chlaonadh tagartha i meastóireacht aonteangach ar MT.', 'el': 'Η μονογλωσσική αξιολόγηση της μηχανικής μετάφρασης (ΜΤ) αποσκοπεί στην απλούστευση της ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης, απαιτώντας από τους αξιολογητές να συγκρίνουν τη σημασία της παραγωγής ΜΤ με μια μετάφραση αναφοράς, ανοίγοντας το έργο σε μια πολύ μεγαλύτερη ομάδα πραγματικά καταρτισμένων αξιολογητών. Ωστόσο, η μονογλωσσική αξιολόγηση διατρέχει τον κίνδυνο προκατάλειψης υπέρ συστημάτων ΜΤ που τυχαίνει να παράγουν μεταφράσεις επιφανειακά παρόμοιες με την αναφορά και, σύμφωνα με αυτή τη διαίσθηση, προηγούμενες έρευνες κατέληξαν στο συμπέρασμα ότι η μονογλωσσική αξιολόγηση είναι έντονα προκατειλημμένη από αυτή την άποψη. Όσον αφορά την επανεξέταση των προηγούμενων αναλύσεων, εντοπίζουμε μια σειρά πιθανών αναλυτικών σφαλμάτων που αναγκάζουν να τεθούν ορισμένα σημαντικά ερωτήματα σχετικά με την αξιοπιστία των προηγούμενων συμπερασμάτων, ωστόσο. Στη συνέχεια διεξάγουμε περαιτέρω έρευνα σχετικά με την προκατάληψη αναφοράς μέσω άμεσης ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης της επάρκειας των ΜΤ μέσω ποιοτικού ελέγχου πλήθους. Σε αντίθεση με τη διαίσθηση και τα συμπεράσματα του παρελθόντος, τα αποτελέσματα δεν δείχνουν σημαντικές ενδείξεις προκατάλειψης αναφοράς στην μονογλωσσική αξιολόγηση της ΜΤ.', 'hu': 'A Gépi Fordítás (MT) egynyelvű értékelése célja, hogy egyszerűsítse az emberi értékelést azáltal, hogy az értékelők összehasonlítsák a MT kimenet jelentését egy referencia fordítással, így a feladatot a valóban képzett értékelők sokkal nagyobb csoportja előtt nyitják meg. Az egynyelvű értékelés azonban fennáll az elfogultság kockázata a MT rendszerek javára, amelyek véletlenül a referenciához hasonló fordításokat készítenek, és ennek az intuíciónak megfelelően a korábbi vizsgálatok arra a következtetésre jutottak, hogy az egynyelvű értékelés e tekintetben erőteljesen elfogult. A korábbi elemzések felülvizsgálata során azonban számos olyan potenciális analitikai hibát azonosítunk, amelyek fontos kérdéseket vetnek fel a korábbi következtetések megbízhatóságával kapcsolatban. Ezt követően további vizsgálatot végezünk a referencia-elfogultság tekintetében a MT megfelelőségének közvetlen emberi értékelésével, minőségellenőrzött közösségi források révén. Ellentétben mind az intuícióval, mind a korábbi következtetésekkel, az eredmények nem mutatnak jelentős bizonyítékot a MT egynyelvű értékelésében.', 'ka': 'მაქსინის შეცვლის (MT) მონოლინგულური განსაზღვრებას მინდა ადამიანის განსაზღვრებას განსაზღვრებას, რომელიც მუშაობელების შესაძლებლობა MT გამოსვლის განსაზღვრების შესახებ განსაზღვრებით, დავახსნა რაოდენობას დიდი მაგრამ მონოლინგულური განსაზღვრება იმუშაობს, რომელიც MT სისტემების მხოლოდ, რომელიც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ განსაზღვრებას ძალიან სხვადასხვა განსაზღვრებას და, რომელიც ამ ინტეუციის მხოლოდ, წინა განსწავლება მონოლინგულ მიმდინარე ანალიზების შესახებ, ჩვენ განვიცნობით პოცენტალური ანალიზიტური შეცდომები, რომელიც უნდა გავაკეთოთ რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანი კითხვები, რომელიც წინა გადაწ შემდეგ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ უფრო მეტად განსხვავებას რეფერენციო მსოფლიოს შესახებ MT ადამიანის შესახებ გავაკეთება კონტროლურად კონტროლურად მსო შესახებ ინტეუციის და წინასწარმოდგენების შესახებ, შესახებ MT-ის მონოლენგური განსაზღვრებაში არ მოჩვენებს მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენება.', 'it': "La valutazione monolingue della traduzione automatica (MT) mira a semplificare la valutazione umana imponendo ai valutatori di confrontare il significato dell'output MT con una traduzione di riferimento, aprendo il compito a un pool molto più ampio di valutatori realmente qualificati. La valutazione monolingue corre tuttavia il rischio di bias a favore di sistemi MT che producono traduzioni superficialmente simili al riferimento e, coerentemente con questa intuizione, precedenti indagini hanno concluso che la valutazione monolingue è fortemente biasimata in questo senso. Nel riesaminare le analisi passate, identifichiamo una serie di potenziali errori analitici che costringono tuttavia a sollevare alcune importanti domande sull'affidabilità delle conclusioni passate. Successivamente eseguiamo ulteriori indagini sul bias di riferimento attraverso la valutazione umana diretta dell'adeguatezza della MT tramite crowdsourcing controllato dalla qualità. Contrariamente all'intuizione e alle conclusioni passate, i risultati non mostrano alcuna evidenza significativa di bias di riferimento nella valutazione monolingue della MT.", 'lt': 'Monolingual evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) aims to simplify human assessment by requiring assessors to compare the meaning of the MT output with a reference translation, opening up the task to a much larger pool of genuinely qualified evaluators.  Tačiau vienakalbis vertinimas kelia riziką, kad MT sistemos gali būti sąžiningos, o vertimai paviršiaus atžvilgiu yra panašūs į nuorodą, ir, atsižvelgiant į šią intuiciją, ankstesniuose tyrimuose buvo padaryta išvada, kad vienakalbis vertinimas šiuo atžvilgiu yra labai sąžiningas. Peržiūrėdami praeities analizes, nustatome keletą galimų analitinių klaidų, dėl kurių kyla svarbių klausimų dėl praeities išvadų patikimumo. Vėliau atliekame tolesnį orientacinių pusiausvyrų tyrimą tiesiogiai vertindami MT adekvatumą žmogui naudojant kokybiškai kontroliuojamus visuomenės išteklius. Priešingai nei intuicija, nei anksčiau padarytos išvados, gauti rezultatai neturi reikšmingų orientacinių nuokrypių vertinant MT vienkalbį.', 'kk': 'Машин аудармасының бірнеше тілі бағалауы (MT) адамның бағалауын қарапайым көмегімен MT шығысының мәліметін сілтеме аудармасымен салыстыру үшін, тапсырманы шындық квалификациялық бағалаушылардың көп үлкен басып ашу Бірнеше тілі бағалау, бірақ MT жүйелерінің жақсы аудармаларды жасайтын тәртіпсіздіктерінің тәртіпсіздігін жеткізеді. Бұл тәртіпсіздігіне сәйкес, алдыңғы зерттеулердің бір тіліпсіздік бағалауын бұл сәйкестікт Соңғы анализдерді қайта тексергенде, біз бірнеше мүмкін аналитикалық қателерді анықтаймыз. Бірақ кейбір маңызды сұрақтарды өткен нәтижелердің сенімділігі туралы көмектеседі. Содан кейін, MT адамдардың адамдардың адамдардың адамдардың қасиетті бақылау арқылы көпшілік көпшіліктерді бақылау көзінің көпшілігін бақылау арқылы қосым Интуициялық және өткен соңғы нәтижелеріне қарсы, MT-дің бір тілдік оқу үшін сілтемелердің көмегімен бірнеше нәтижелері көрсетілмейді.', 'ms': 'Evaluasi Monolingual Machine Translation (MT) bertujuan untuk mempermudahkan penilaian manusia dengan memerlukan penilai untuk membandingkan makna output MT dengan terjemahan rujukan, membuka tugas kepada kumpulan yang jauh lebih besar penilai yang benar-benar berkwalifikasi. Evaluasi monolingwa menjalankan risiko, bagaimanapun, bias untuk sistem MT yang berlaku menghasilkan terjemahan secara permukaan yang serupa dengan rujukan dan, konsisten dengan intuisi ini, penyelidikan terdahulu telah mengakhiri penilaian monolingwa yang sangat bias dalam hal ini. Pada pemeriksaan semula analisis masa lalu, kami mengenalpasti satu siri ralat analitik yang berpotensi yang memaksa beberapa soalan penting untuk dibangkitkan mengenai kepercayaan kesimpulan masa lalu, bagaimanapun. Kemudian kami melakukan penyelidikan lanjut terhadap bias rujukan melalui penilaian langsung manusia tentang keperluan MT melalui kualiti kawal crowd-sourcing. Berlawan dengan kedua-dua intuisi dan kesimpulan masa lalu, keputusan untuk menunjukkan tiada bukti yang signifikan bias rujukan dalam penilaian monobahasa MT.', 'mk': 'Монолингуалната евалуација на Машинската транслекција (МТ) има за цел да ја поедностави човечката оценка со барање од оценувачите да го споредат значењето на MT излезот со референциски превод, отворајќи ја задачата за многу поголем груп на вистински квалификувани оценувачи. Сепак, монолингуалната проценка го води ризикот на пристрасност во корист на МТ системите кои случајно произведуваат преводи површно слични на референцијата и, во согласност со оваа интуиција, претходните истраги заклучија дека монојазичната проценка е силно пристрасна во оваа врска. Во врска со преиспитувањето на минатите анализи, идентификуваме серија потенцијални аналитички грешки кои принудуваат некои важни прашања да се поставуваат за доверливоста на минатите заклучоци, сепак. We subsequently carry out further investigation into reference bias via direct human assessment of MT adequacy via quality controlled crowd-sourcing.  Во спротивност на интуицијата и минатите заклучоци, резултатите за кои не покажуваат значителни докази за референциска пристрасност во монојазичката проценка на МТ.', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ മൊണോളില്\u200dഭാഷ വിലാസപുലര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ഉദ്ദേശം എംടി പുട്ടിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം മാറ്റാന്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെടുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ലളിതമാക്ക മോണോളില്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d എംടി സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രേരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അപകടത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയാണ് സംഭവിക്കുന്നത്. ഈ നിര കഴിഞ്ഞ അന്വേഷണങ്ങളുടെ വീണ്ടും പരിശോധിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കിട്ടിയ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d അന്യായോന്യ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു. അത് പൂ പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് എംടി നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ജനങ്ങളുടെ സോര്\u200dസ്സിനുമുഖേന നേരിട്ട് മനുഷ്യരു ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയും കഴിഞ്ഞ അവസാനത്തിനും വിരോധമാണ്, എംടിയുടെ മോനോളില്\u200dഭാഷയുടെ വിശ്വാസത്തില്\u200d രേഖപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രത', 'mt': 'L-evalwazzjoni monolingwa tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni (MT) għandha l-għan li tissimplifika l-valutazzjoni umana billi teħtieġ li l-valutaturi jqabblu t-tifsira tal-output MT ma’ traduzzjoni ta’ referenza, billi tiftaħ il-kompitu għal grupp ferm akbar ta’ evalwaturi ġenwinament ikkwalifikati. L-evalwazzjoni monolingwa, madankollu, għandha r-riskju ta’ preġudizzju favur is-sistemi MT li jiġru li jipproduċu traduzzjonijiet superfiċjalment simili għar-referenza u, konsistenti ma’ din l-intwizzjoni, investigazzjonijiet preċedenti kkonkludew valutazzjoni monolingwa li hija preġudizzjata b’mod qawwi f’dan ir-rigward. Meta nħarsu mill-ġdid l-analiżi tal-passat, nidentifikaw serje ta’ żbalji analitiċi potenzjali li jġiegħlu tqajmu xi mistoqsijiet importanti dwar l-affidabbiltà tal-konklużjonijiet tal-passat, madankollu. Sussegwentement nagħmlu aktar investigazzjoni dwar il-preġudizzju ta’ referenza permezz ta’ valutazzjoni diretta tal-bniedem tal-adegwatezza tal-MT permezz ta’ crowd sourcing ikkontrollat tal-kwalità. Għall-kuntrarju kemm tal-intwizzjoni kif ukoll tal-konklużjonijiet tal-passat, ir-riżultati ma juru l-ebda evidenza sinifikanti ta’ preġudizzju ta’ referenza fl-evalwazzjoni monolingwistika tal-MT.', 'no': 'Monolinguelt evaluering av maskinsomsetjing (MT) mål å forenkla menneskelige evaluering ved å påkrava vurderingar for å sammenligne betydninga av MT-utdata med ein referansomsetjing, og opna oppgåva til ein mykje større pool av faktisk kvalifiserte evalueringar. Monolinguelt evaluering køyrer imidlertid risikoen for å forbetra MT-systemet som skjer å produsera omsetjingar som er superficielt liknande med referansen, og, samanlikt med denne intuitjonen, har tidlegare undersøkingar slått av monolinguelt vurdering som skal vere sterkt biased i denne hendinga. På gjenoppretting av tidlegare analyser identifiserer vi ei rekkje av potensielle analyske feil som tvinger nokre viktige spørsmål til å bli oppdaga om tiltruddeligheten til tidlegare konklusjonar. I tillegg utfører vi lenger undersøking om referanse gjennom direkte menneskelige vurdering av MT-tilgjengelighet gjennom kvalitetkontrollerte menneskelighet. I motsetning til både intuisjon og siste konklusjonar, vil resultatet for å vise ingen betydelige beviser om referanseforsjon i monospråk-evaluering av MT.', 'mn': 'Машин хөгжлийн монолингийн үнэлгээ (MT) нь хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээг хялбарчлах зорилго гэсэн үг. МТ гаригийн утгыг батлан харьцуулахын тулд батлан хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээг батлан хялбарчлах зорилго юм. Гэхдээ одоогийн хэлний дүгнэлт нь MT системийн тусламжтайгаар илүү төстэй хөрөнгө оруулах эрсдэлтэй байдаг. Өмнөх судалгааны шалгалт нь нэг хэлний дүгнэлтийг энэ талаар маш хүндрэлтэй болгодог. Өнгөрсөн шинжилгээний дахин судалгааны дараа бид олон потенциал шинжилгээний алдаа олж мэднэ. Гэхдээ өнгөрсөн шинжилгээний итгэл үнэ цэнэтэй талаар зарим чухал асуултуудыг суралцах болно. Үүний дараа бид хүн төрөлхтний сайн хандлагатай байдлын төлөвлөгөөс шууд хүн төрөлхтний оюун шалгалтын тулд илүү олон судалгаа хийсэн. Өмнөх бодол болон түүний дарааллын эсрэг, MT-ийн ганц хэлний оюутнуудын харилцааны харилцааны чухал харилцаа харагдахгүй.', 'pl': 'Jednojęzyczna ocena tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT) ma na celu uproszczenie oceny przez człowieka poprzez wymaganie od oceniających porównania znaczenia wyników MT z tłumaczeniem referencyjnym, otwierając zadanie na znacznie większą pulę rzeczywiście wykwalifikowanych oceniających. Ocena jednojęzyczna wiąże się jednak z ryzykiem uprzedzenia na korzyść systemów MT, które zdarzają się wytwarzać tłumaczenia powierzchownie podobne do odniesienia i zgodnie z tą intuicją, wcześniejsze badania wykazały, że ocena jednojęzyczna jest w tym względzie silnie uprzedzona. Przy ponownym zbadaniu przeszłych analiz identyfikujemy szereg potencjalnych błędów analitycznych, które wymuszają jednak podniesienie kilku ważnych pytań dotyczących wiarygodności wcześniejszych wniosków. Następnie przeprowadzamy dalsze badania dotyczące tendencji referencyjnych poprzez bezpośrednią ludzką ocenę adekwatności MT poprzez kontrolowany jakość crowdsourcing. Wbrew zarówno intuicji, jak i wcześniejszym wnioskom, wyniki nie wykazują istotnych dowodów na tendencje referencyjne w jednojęzycznej ocenie MT.', 'ro': 'Evaluarea monolingvă a traducerii automate (MT) vizează simplificarea evaluării umane prin solicitarea evaluatorilor să compare semnificația rezultatelor MT cu o traducere de referință, deschizând sarcina unui grup mult mai mare de evaluatori cu adevărat calificați. Evaluarea monolingvă prezintă însă riscul unei părtiniri în favoarea sistemelor MT care se întâmplă să producă traduceri similare superficial cu referința și, în concordanță cu această intuiție, investigațiile anterioare au concluzionat că evaluarea monolingvă este puternic părtinitoare în acest sens. La reexaminarea analizelor anterioare, identificăm o serie de potențiale erori analitice care forțează, totuși, unele întrebări importante cu privire la fiabilitatea concluziilor anterioare. Ulterior, efectuăm investigații suplimentare în ceea ce privește părtinirea referinței prin evaluarea directă a adecvării MT prin intermediul unui crowdsourcing controlat de calitate. Contrar atât intuiției, cât și concluziilor anterioare, rezultatele pentru studii nu prezintă dovezi semnificative de părtinire de referință în evaluarea monolingvă a MT.', 'si': 'Monolingual evalution of machine translation (MT) seeks to minimise the Human evalution by Requring Assssors to compare the means of the MT Outlook with a referendum translation, open up the job to a lot more Large pool of truly classified evalutants. Monolingual evalution runs the අවධානය, but, of beas in favor of MT systems that coin to make translation superflually Simal to the references and, composent with this Intuition, the preceding investigation have ended Monlanguage evalution to be loudly biosed in this account. අතින් විශ්ලේෂණ ගැන ආයෙත් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප අපි පස්සේ පස්සේ වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මිනිස්සු විශේෂතාවට MT අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් පාලන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අතිත් අවස්ථාවක් වලට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, MT විශ්වාසයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන', 'sr': 'Monolingualna procjena prevoda mašine (MT) je cilj da pojednostavi ljudsku procjenu zahtevajući proceniteljima da usporede smisao proizvoda MT-a sa referentnim prevodom, otvarajući zadatak mnogo većem bazenu pravilno kvalifikovanih procenitelja. Međutim, monojezička procjena vodi rizik predrasude u korist MT-ovih sustava koji se događaju da proizvode prevode površno slične referenciji i, u skladu s tim intuicijom, prethodne istrage zaključile su monojezičku procjenu da se u tom pogledu jače predrasude. Nakon ponovnog ispitivanja prošlih analiza, identifikujemo niz potencijalnih analitičkih grešaka koji prisiljavaju da se podignu neke važne pitanja o pouzdanosti prošlih zaključaka. Posle toga provodimo daljnju istragu o referentnim pristrasnostima putem direktne ljudske procjene adekvatnosti MT-a putem kvalitetnog kontroliranog izvora publika. Za razliku od intuicije i prošlih zaključaka, rezultati ne pokazuju značajne dokaze referentnih predrasuda u monojezičkoj procjeni MT-a.', 'so': "Monolingual evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) aims to simplify human assessment by requiring assessors to compare the meaning of the MT output with a reference translation, opening up the task to a much larger pool of genuinely qualified evaluators.  Qiimeynta afka ayaa khatar ah, habase yeeshee baaritaanka ka shaqeeya nidaamka MT ee ku soo dhaca tarjumaadyo si aad u eg afka loo soo jeedo, isla markaasna qiimeyntii hore waxay ku dhamaadeen qiimeynta afka hooyo si aad u qalloocan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee baaritaanka baaritaanka baaritaanka hore, waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa qaar khalad ah oo khalad ah oo ku qasbaya su'aalo muhiim ah in la sameeyo aaminnimada dhamaadka hore. Markaas kadibna waxaynu baaritaanka sii wadannaa baaritaanka dadka si toos ah u qiimeynaya qiimeynta ku filan ee MT-da sida ay u sameyneyso suurtagalka kooxaha la ilaaliyo. Si ka duwan labada garashada iyo dhamaadka hore, sababtoo ah waxey tusi waayaan caddeynta qofka ka mid ah qiimeynta afka MT.", 'sv': 'Enspråkig utvärdering av maskinöversättning (MT) syftar till att förenkla mänsklig bedömning genom att kräva att bedömarna jämför innebörden av MT-resultatet med en referensöversättning, vilket öppnar upp uppgiften för en mycket större pool av verkligt kvalificerade utvärderare. Enspråkig utvärdering riskerar dock att gynna MT-system som råkar producera översättningar ytligt liknande referensen, och i enlighet med denna intuition har tidigare undersökningar kommit fram till att enspråkig bedömning är starkt partisk i detta avseende. Vid omprövning av tidigare analyser identifierar vi en rad potentiella analytiska fel som tvingar vissa viktiga frågor att ställa om tillförlitligheten hos tidigare slutsatser. Vi genomför därefter ytterligare utredning av referensbias genom direkt mänsklig bedömning av MT adekvat genom kvalitetskontrollerad crowdsourcing. I motsats till både intuition och tidigare slutsatser visar resultaten inte några signifikanta bevis på referensbias i enspråkig utvärdering av MT.', 'ta': 'இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் (MT) மதிப்பை எளிதாக்க வேண்டும் என்பது MT வெளியீட்டின் அர்த்தத்தை பொருளால் ஒப்பிட வேண்டும், உண்மையில் தகுதியான மதிப மோனோலிங்கூச்சு மதிப்பு ஏபத்தை இயக்குகிறது, எனினும், எம்டி முறைமைகளுக்கு ஆதரவாக இருக்கும் பொருட்டு மொழிமாற்றங்களை உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும், இந்த உணர்வு பொருத்தும முந்தைய ஆய்வுகளை மீண்டும் சோதிக்கும் போது, நாம் ஒரு சில சாத்தியமான ஆராய்ச்சி பிழைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். ஆனால் சில முக்க அதற்குப் பின்னர் நாம் குறிப்பு பியேஸ் மூலம் மூலம் நேரடியாக MT சரியான மதிப்பினை செய்து கொண்டு மேலும் விசாரணையை செய தெரியும் முந்தைய முடிவுகளுக்கும் எதிர்பார்க்கப்படும், முடிவுகளுக்கு முக்கியமான குறிப்புகள் எதுவும் காட்டும் ம', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمن (MT) کی مولی زبان کی ارزیابی کا مطابق ہے کہ انسان کی ارزیابی سادھا کرے اس کے ذریعہ سے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطا لیکن مولی زبان کی ارزیابی MT سیستموں کے فائدہ کے خطرے ہیں جن کو ترجمہ کے مطابق زیادہ مشابہ ہے اور پہلے کی تحقیقات کے مطابق ایک زبان کی ارزیابی کے مطابق اس کے مطابق مضبوط ہوتی ہے۔ اگلوں کی تحقیقات کے بارے میں ہم ایک سری امکانات تحقیقات کی خطائیں پہچان رہے ہیں جن کے ذریعہ بعض اہم سوال کو پہلے کے نتیجے کے قابل اعتماد کے بارے میں سوال کیا جائے گا۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے مٹی کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق قابل تحقیق کے ذریعے اضافہ کی تحقیق کرلیا۔ ان دونوں بصیرت اور پچھلے نتیجے کے مقابلہ میں، MT کی ایک زبان کی ارزیابی میں کوئی معتبر دلیل نہیں دکھائے گا.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik qiymatlari MT tizimlarini qo'shish uchun xavfsizni bajaradi va bu fikr bilan bir xil tarjimalarni ajratish mumkin. Oldingi qidirishlar bu haqida qiymatni bir qiymatga qiymatga qaror qildi. Oldingi analytiklarni qaytadan tasdiqlashda, biz bir necha narsa analytik xatolarini aniqlashimiz mumkin, bu bir necha muhim savollarni o'ylab beradi, balki oldingi murakkablarining ishoniga ishonchini ishlatadi. Keyingi biz bir qanday qidirishni boshqarishni boshqarish uchun MT tashkilotni toʻgʻri qo'llashga bajaramiz. Ikkita tashkilotga murakkab bo'lgan narsalarni ko'rsatish natijalari MT'ning monolik tilini qiymatda hech qanday qiymatni ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bản đánh giá ngôn ngữ riêng của Machine Translation (MTV) nhằm làm đơn giản hóa đánh giá nhân loại bằng cách yêu cầu nhà đánh giá giám định so sánh ý nghĩa của MTV với một bản dịch tham khảo, mở nhiệm vụ này ra thành một nhóm đánh giá có trình độ cao hơn nhiều. Tuy nhiên, tỷ lệ đánh giá ngôn ngữ có thể gây thiên vị cho hệ thống MTV, thì sản xuất bản dịch cực kì giống với cái này, và, phù hợp với trực giác này, các điều tra trước đây đã kết luận rằng đánh giá ngôn ngữ học cho thấy bị bóp méo nghiêm ngặt về việc này. Tuy nhiên, khi xét nghiệm lại các phân tích cũ, chúng tôi xác định một loạt các lỗi phân tích tiềm năng buộc phải đặt ra vài câu hỏi quan trọng về tính tin cậy của kết luận trước đây. Sau đó chúng tôi tiến hành điều tra thêm về khuynh hướng tham khảo trực tiếp xác định Cơ quan Giao thông qua nguồn hàng đông có kiểm soát chất lượng. Trái với trực giác và kết luận trước đây, kết quả cho thấy không có dấu hiệu khả quan trọng trong việc đánh giá kênh giảng.', 'bg': 'Едноезичната оценка на машинния превод (МТ) има за цел да опрости оценката на хората, като изисква от оценителите да сравнят значението на продукцията на МТ с референтен превод, което отваря задачата за много по-голям кръг от истински квалифицирани оценители. Едноезичната оценка обаче рискува от пристрастяване в полза на системите за МТ, които случайно произвеждат повърхностно подобни на препратката преводи и, в съответствие с тази интуиция, предишните проучвания заключават, че едноезичната оценка е силно пристрастна в това отношение. При преразглеждане на минали анализи обаче идентифицираме серия от потенциални аналитични грешки, които принуждават да бъдат повдигнати някои важни въпроси относно надеждността на миналите заключения. Впоследствие извършваме допълнително разследване на референтните отклонения чрез пряка човешка оценка на адекватността на МТ чрез контролирано качество групово снабдяване. Противно както на интуицията, така и на предишните заключения, резултатите за не показват значими доказателства за референтна пристрастност при едноезичната оценка на МТ.', 'hr': 'Monolingualna procjena prevoda strojeva (MT) je cilj pojednostaviti ljudsku procjenu zahtijevajući ocjenjivateljima da usporede smisao proizvoda MT-a s referentnim prevodom, otvarajući zadatak mnogo većem bazenu pravilno kvalificiranih procjenjivatelja. Međutim, monojezička procjena vodi rizik predrasude u korist MT-ovih sustava koji se događaju proizvoditi prevode površno slične referenciji i, u skladu s tim intuicijom, prethodne istrage zaključile su monojezičku procjenu da se u tom pogledu jako predrasude. Nakon ponovnog ispitivanja prošlih analiza, identificiramo niz potencijalnih analitičkih grešaka koje tjeraju da se neka važna pitanja podignu o pouzdanosti prošlih zaključaka. Nakon toga provodimo daljnju istragu o referentnim pristrasnostima putem izravne ljudske procjene adekvatnosti MT-a putem kvalitetnog kontroliranog izvora crowd-sourcing. Pored intuicije i prošlih zaključaka rezultati ne pokazuju značajne dokaze referentnih pristrasnosti u monojezičkoj procjeni MT-a.', 'id': 'Evaluasi Monolingual dari Translation Machine (MT) bertujuan untuk mempersederhanakan penilaian manusia dengan memerlukan penilai untuk membandingkan arti output MT dengan sebuah transliasi referensi, membuka tugas untuk sekumpulan yang jauh lebih besar dari penilai yang benar-benar kualifikasi. Evaluasi monolingual menjalankan risiko, bagaimanapun, bias untuk sistem MT yang terjadi untuk menghasilkan terjemahan secara superficial yang mirip dengan referensi dan, konsisten dengan intuisi ini, penyelidikan sebelumnya telah menyelesaikan penilaian monolingual yang sangat bias dalam hal ini. Pada pemeriksaan ulang analisis masa lalu, kami mengidentifikasi seri kesalahan analitis potensial yang memaksa beberapa pertanyaan penting untuk dibangkitkan tentang kepercayaan dari kesimpulan masa lalu, bagaimanapun. Kemudian kami melakukan penyelidikan lebih lanjut terhadap bias referensi melalui penilaian langsung manusia tentang keperluan MT melalui kualitas kontrol crowd-sourcing. Berbeda dengan intuisi dan kesimpulan masa lalu, hasil untuk menunjukkan tidak ada bukti signifikan bias referensi dalam evaluasi monobahasa MT.', 'ko': '기계번역의 단어평가(MT)는 평가원에게 기계번역 출력의 의미와 참고 번역문을 비교하도록 요구함으로써 인류 평가를 간소화하고 진정으로 합격한 평가원에게 임무를 제공하기 위한 것이다.그러나 단어 평가는 기계 번역 시스템에 편향될 위험이 존재한다. 이런 시스템은 참고 문헌과 표면이 비슷한 번역이 생겼다. 이런 직감과 일치한다. 이전의 조사에서 단어 평가는 이 방면에 심각한 편향이 존재한다는 결론을 얻었다.그러나 과거의 분석을 재검토할 때 우리는 일련의 잠재적인 분석 오류를 발견했다. 이런 오류는 사람들로 하여금 과거 결론의 신뢰성에 대해 중요한 문제를 제기하게 했다.그 다음에 우리는 품질 제어 하청을 통해 기계 번역의 충분성에 대해 직접적인 인위적인 평가를 하고 참고 편차에 대해 진일보한 조사를 한다.직감과 과거의 결론과는 반대로 기계번역의 단어 평가에서 뚜렷한 참고 편차 증거가 없었다.', 'da': 'Ensproget evaluering af maskinoversættelse (MT) har til formål at forenkle menneskelig vurdering ved at kræve, at bedømmerne sammenligner betydningen af MT-output med en referenceoversættelse, hvilket åbner opgaven for en langt større pulje af reelt kvalificerede bedømmere. Ensproget evaluering indebærer imidlertid en risiko for skævhed til fordel for MT-systemer, der tilfældigvis producerer oversættelser, der overfladisk svarer til referencen, og i overensstemmelse med denne intuition har tidligere undersøgelser konkluderet, at ensproget vurdering er stærkt skævhed i denne henseende. Ved gennemgang af tidligere analyser identificerer vi dog en række potentielle analytiske fejl, der tvinger til at rejse vigtige spørgsmål om pålideligheden af tidligere konklusioner. Efterfølgende foretager vi yderligere undersøgelser af referencebias via direkte menneskelig vurdering af MT-tilstrækkelighed via kvalitetskontrolleret crowdsourcing. I modsætning til både intuition og tidligere konklusioner viser resultaterne ikke nogen signifikant dokumentation for referencebias i ensproget evaluering af MT.', 'nl': 'Eentalige evaluatie van Machine Translation (MT) beoogt de menselijke beoordeling te vereenvoudigen door beoordelaars te verplichten de betekenis van de MT-output te vergelijken met een referentievertaling, waardoor de taak wordt opengesteld voor een veel grotere groep echt gekwalificeerde beoordelaars. Eentalige evaluatie loopt echter het risico dat er sprake is van een bias ten gunste van MT-systemen die toevallig oppervlakkig soortgelijke vertalingen produceren als de referentie en, in overeenstemming met deze intuïtie, hebben eerdere onderzoeken geconcludeerd dat eentalige beoordeling in dit opzicht sterk bevooroordeeld is. Bij het opnieuw onderzoeken van eerdere analyses identificeren we een reeks potentiële analytische fouten die ertoe dwingen belangrijke vragen te stellen over de betrouwbaarheid van eerdere conclusies. Vervolgens voeren we verder onderzoek uit naar referentiebias via directe menselijke beoordeling van MT adequaatheid via kwaliteitsgecontroleerde crowdsourcing. In tegenstelling tot zowel intuïtie als eerdere conclusies tonen resultaten voor MT geen significant bewijs van referentiebias in monolinguale evaluatie van MT.', 'fa': 'ارزیابی مولی زبان ترجمه ماشین (MT) هدف دارد که ارزیابی انسانی را با نیاز به ارزیابی کنندگان ساده سازی کند تا معنی خروجی MT را با ترجمه ارزیابی مقایسه کنند، و این کار را به یک استخراج بزرگتر از ارزیابی\u200cکنندگان واقعی قابل ارزیابی باز کند. اما ارزیابی مولی زبان ریسک را به سوی سیستم\u200cهای MT که اتفاق می\u200cافتد به صورت طبیعی شبیه به این ارزیابی می\u200cافتد و با این ارزیابی، تحقیقات قبلی ارزیابی تک زبان را به شدت در این ارزش پایان داده است. با تحقیق دوباره تحلیل گذشته، ما یک سری از اشتباه\u200cهای تحلیل پتانسیل را شناسایی می\u200cکنیم که چند سوال مهم را مجبور می\u200cکند در مورد اعتماد نتیجه گذشته بزرگ شود. بعدش تحقیقات بیشتری را با طریق ارزیابی مستقیم انسانها از طریق کیفیت کنترل جمعیت انجام می دهیم. بر خلاف both intuition and past conclusions, results for showing no significant evidence of reference bias in single language evaluation of MT.', 'de': 'Die einsprachige Bewertung der maschinellen Übersetzung (MT) zielt darauf ab, die menschliche Beurteilung zu vereinfachen, indem die Prüfer die Bedeutung der MT-Ausgabe mit einer Referenzübersetzung vergleichen müssen, wodurch die Aufgabe einem viel größeren Pool von wirklich qualifizierten Bewertern zugänglich wird. Eine einsprachige Evaluation birgt jedoch das Risiko, dass sie zugunsten von MÜ-Systemen verzerrt wird, die zufällig oberflächlich ähnliche Übersetzungen wie die Referenz produzieren, und gemäß dieser Intuition haben frühere Untersuchungen zu dem Schluss geführt, dass die einsprachige Bewertung diesbezüglich stark verzerrt ist. Bei der Überprüfung vergangener Analysen identifizieren wir eine Reihe möglicher Analysefehler, die jedoch einige wichtige Fragen zur Zuverlässigkeit vergangener Schlussfolgerungen aufwerfen. Anschließend führen wir weitere Untersuchungen des Referenzbias durch, indem wir die Angemessenheit der MT direkt vom Menschen durch qualitätskontrolliertes Crowdsourcing beurteilen. Entgegen der Intuition und den Schlussfolgerungen der Vergangenheit zeigen die Ergebnisse keine signifikanten Hinweise auf Referenzbias in der monolingualen Bewertung von MT.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa lugha za utafsiri wa mashine (MT) unakusudia kuwezesha utafiti wa binadamu kwa kuwahitaji watafiti kulinganisha maana ya matokeo ya MT kwa tafsiri ya maoni, kufungua juhudi hiyo kwa kiwango kikubwa cha watafiti wenye sifa halisi. Utafiti wa lugha za kiMonolilugha unaendesha hatari, hata hivyo, kwa upendeleo wa mifumo ya MT yanayotokea kutafsiri kwa kiasi kikubwa yanayofanana na mtazamo huo na, kwa mujibu wa mtazamo huu, uchunguzi wa zamani umehitimisha tathmini za lugha za kiutamaduni ili kuwa na upendeleo mkali katika suala hili. Katika kuchunguzwa tena kwa uchambuzi uliopita, tunatambua mfululizo wa makosa ya uchambuzi yanayowezekana yanayolazimisha maswali muhimu ya kuaminika kwa hitimisho lililopita, hata hivyo. We subsequently carry out further investigation into reference bias via direct human assessment of MT adequacy via quality controlled crowd-sourcing.  Tofauti na maelezo yaliyopita, matokeo ya kuonyesha hakuna ushahidi mkubwa wa upendeleo wa maoni katika uchunguzi wa utamaduni wa MT.', 'tr': "Ma힊yny흫 terjime edilmesini흫 (MT) Monoli 챌철z체mlenmegi maksady 챌yky힊lyklary흫 MT netijesini흫 ni첵etini 챌yky힊 terjime bilen gurlap etmek 체챌in adam 챌철z체mlenmegi 첵e흫lemek 체챌in hedef ed첵채r. 횦철ne, Monoli 챌철z체mleme MT sistemalary흫 체st체nde terjime edilen t채sirlere mejbur g철r체n첵채n t채sirlere gola첵la첵ar. 횜흫ki 챌철z체mler bu sy첵asy bilen gurlan첵ar, 철흫ki 챌철z체mler monolingual 챌철z체mleme 체챌in gaty bir terjime edilmeli kararyna 챌yk첵ar. Ge챌mi힊 analyzlary흫 첵ene-de synany힊da ge챌en 챌철z체mlerin ynamlylygy barada birn채챌e m철h체m soraglary ukypla힊dyrmak 체챌in belirtdik. Sonrasynda MT adetlerini흫 첵체z체ni g철rkezil첵채n kalam kaynaklaryny흫 첵체z체nden 챌yky힊lygyna d체z체mle힊m채ge 첵체ze 챌yky힊ymyzy 챌ekdik. T채zelikleri흫 hem ge챌en 챌철z체mlerini흫 tersine, MT'y흫 monodil 챌철z체mlenmesinde hi챌 hili m철h체m kan캇tlary g철rkezmez.", 'sq': 'Vlerësimi monolingual i Translacionit të Makinës (MT) synon të thjeshtojë vlerësimin njerëzor duke kërkuar që vlerësimtarët të krahasojnë kuptimin e prodhimit të MT-së me një përkthim referimi, duke hapur detyrën për një grup shumë më të madh vlerësimtarësh me të vërtetë të kualifikuar. Vlerësimi monolingual drejton rrezikun, megjithatë, të paragjykimit në favor të sistemeve MT që ndodhin të prodhojnë përkthime sipërfaqësisht të ngjashme me referencën dhe, në përputhje me këtë intuicion, hetimet e mëparshme kanë përfunduar vlerësimin monolingual për të qenë të paragjykimit të fortë në këtë lidhje. Në rishqyrtimin e analizave të kaluara, ne identifikojmë një seri gabimesh analitike të mundshme që detyrojnë të ngrihen disa pyetje të rëndësishme rreth besueshmërisë së përfundimeve të kaluara megjithatë. We subsequently carry out further investigation into reference bias via direct human assessment of MT adequacy via quality controlled crowd-sourcing.  Kundër intuicionit dhe përfundimeve të kaluara, rezultatet për të treguar asnjë provë të rëndësishme të paragjykimit të referimit në vlerësimin monogjuhësor të MT.', 'am': 'የመኪን ትርጉም (MT) ማስረጃዎችን በማስተካከል የሚያስፈልገውን የMT ውጤት በማስተካከል እና በማስተካከል ትርጓሜውን ለማስተካከል በሚያስፈልገው፣ ስራውን ወደ በጣም ትልቅ ጉዳይ መክፈት ለመክፈት በሚያስፈልገው አካሄዶችን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ በሞሎንቋል ማስታወቂያው ግን የMT ስርዓቶች በተመሳሳይ ትርጓሜዎችን በሚያሳየው የድጋፍ ጉዳይ ይነካል፡፡ ባለፉት ትምህርት ግንኙነት ላይ በተመለሱ ጊዜ፣ የቻይለኛ ትምህርት ስህተቶችን እናውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የብሔራዊ ድብፅ አውታር በመቀናቀል በሚያስፈልገው አዲስ የሰው አካላት በማድረግ ግንኙነት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተቃውሞው እና ባለፉት ፍጻሜዎች፣ የፍላጎት ግንኙነት የኢሜተርኔት ግንኙነት በማስተካከል ማስረጃ ምንም አይታየውም፡፡', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի թարգմանման (MT) մոնալեզու գնահատման նպատակն է պարզաբանել մարդկային գնահատումը, պարտադրելով գնահատողներին համեմատել MT արտադրության իմաստը համեմատության վերաբերյալ թարգմանման հետ, բացելով առաջադրանքը իրականում որակավորված գնահատողների շատ ավելի մեծ խմբին Մոնոլինգուալ գնահատումը, այնուամենայնիվ, վտանգ է հանդիսանում ՄԹ համակարգերի օգնությամբ, որոնք հանդիսանում են գետնին հաղորդակցման նմանատիպ թարգմանություններ և, համաձայն այս ինտուիցիային, նախորդ հետազոտությունները եզրակացրել են միալեզվով գնահատումը, որ այս Անցյալ վերլուծությունների վերանայման ժամանակ մենք բացահայտում ենք մի շարք պոտենցիալ վերլուծության սխալներ, որոնք ստիպում են առաջարկել որոշ կարևոր հարցեր անցյալ եզրակացությունների վստահության մասին: Հետո մենք հետագայում հետազոտություն ենք կատարում վերաբերյալ կողմնականության մասին, մարդկային ուղղակի գնահատելու միջոցով MT-ի արդյունավետության մասին որակի կառավարման միջոցով: Հակառակ ինտուիցիային և անցյալ եզրակացություններին, MT-ի միալեզու գնահատման արդյունքները ոչ մի նշանակալի վկայություն չեն ցույց տալիս հաղորդակցման կողմնականության մասին:', 'af': "Monolinguele evaluasie van Masjien Vertaling (MT) doel doen om menslike evaluasie te eenvoudig deur die aansoekers nodig om die betekening van die MT uitvoer te vergelyk met 'n verwysing vertaling, die taak te oopmaak na 'n baie groter pool van genadig kwalifiseerde evaluiteerders. Monolinguele evaluering loop egter die risiko van voorspoedigheid in guns van MT-stelsels wat gebeur om vertalings te produseer oorspoedig soos die verwysing en, ooreenkomstig met hierdie intuisie, die vorige onderspoedighede het monolinglike evaluering gesluit om in hierdie respek sterk te voorspoedig te word. Op herondersoek van verlede analiserings, identifiseer ons 'n reeks van potensiele analiseerde foute wat 'n paar belangrike vrae versterk om verhoog te word oor die betroubaarheid van verlede conclusies, egter. Ons het daarna verdere ondersoek uitgevoer na verwysing voorskou deur direkte menslike evaluering van MT-adekuasie deur kwaliteit beheer die skare-voorskou. In teenstelling tot beide intuisie en verlede conclusie, resultate vir geen betekende getuienis van verwysing voorskyning in monolinglike evaluering van MT vertoon nie.", 'bn': 'ম্যাশিন অনুবাদের মোনোলিভাল মূল্যের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে মানুষের মূল্য সুস্পষ্ট করার মাধ্যমে এমটির আউটপুটের মান তুলনা করার প্রয়োজনীয় পরিমাণকারীদের সাথে রেফারেন্স অনুবাদ Monolingual evaluation runs the risk, however, of bias in favour of MT systems that happen to produce translations superficially similar to the reference and, consistent with this intuition, previous investigations have concluded monolingual assessment to be strongly biased in this respect.  অতীত বিশ্লেষণের পুনরায় পরীক্ষা করার পর, আমরা সম্ভাব্য বিশ্লেষণীয় ভুল চিহ্নিত করি যা অতীতের সমাপ্তির বিশ্বাস নিয়ে কিছু গুরুত্বপূর পরবর্তীতে আমরা মানুষের মানুষের পরিমাপের মাধ্যমে সরাসরি মানুষের মূল্যের মাধ্যমে আরো তদন্ত করেছি মানুষের মাধ্যমে। বুদ্ধিমত্তা এবং অতীত সমাপ্তির বিরুদ্ধে, এমটির মানুষ ভাষার মূল্যের কোন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রমাণ দেখানো যায় না।', 'bs': 'Monolingualna procjena prevoda mašine (MT) je cilj pojednostaviti ljudsku procjenu zahtijevajući ocjenjivateljima da usporede smisao proizvoda MT-a sa referentnim prevodom, otvarajući zadatak mnogo većem bazenu stvarno kvalifikovanih ocjenjivatelja. Međutim, monojezička procjena vodi rizik predrasude u korist MT-ovih sustava koji se dogodi da proizvode prevode površno slične referenciji i, u skladu s tim intuicijom, prethodne istrage zaključile su monojezičku procjenu da se u tom pogledu jako predrasude. Nakon ponovnog ispitivanja prošlih analiza, identificiramo niz potencijalnih analitičkih grešaka koje primoravaju neke važne pitanja da se podignu o pouzdanosti prošlih zaključaka. Nakon toga provodimo daljnju istragu o referentnim pristrasnostima putem direktne ljudske procjene adekvatnosti MT-a putem kvalitetnog kontroliranog izvora publika. Za razliku od intuicije i prošlih zaključaka, rezultati ne pokazuju značajne dokaze referentnih predrasuda u monojezičkoj procjeni MT-a.', 'ca': "L'evaluació monolíngua de la traducció màquina (MT) mira a simplificar l'evaluació humana exigint que els assessors comparin el significat de la producció MT amb una traducció de referència, obrint la tasca a un grup molt més gran d'assessors genuinement qualificats. Però l'evaluació monolíngua corre el risc de bias en favor de sistemes MT que produeixen traduccions superficialment semblants a la referència i, en consonència amb aquesta intuïció, investigacions anteriors han concluït que l'evaluació monolíngua és fortament bias en aquest sentit. Al reexaminar els anàlisis del passat, identificem una sèrie d'errors analítics potencials que obligan a plantejar algunes preguntes importants sobre la fiabilitat de les conclusions del passat, no obstant això. Després, fem una investigació ulterior sobre el bias de referència mitjançant una evaluació humana directa de l'adequació de la MT mitjançant la qualitat de la crowd sourcing controlada. Contrariament a la intuïció i a les conclusions del passat, els resultats no mostran cap evidència significativa de bias de referència en l'evaluació monolingüística del MT.", 'az': 'Machine Translation (MT) Monolingual Assessment aims to simplify human assessment by requiring assessors to compare the meaning of the MT output with a reference translation, opening the task to a much larger pool of genuinely qualified evaluators. Monoli dil deńüerlendirm…ôsi, amma, MT sisteml…ôrinin istifad…ôsin…ô g√∂r…ô t…ôrzd…ô t…ôrzd…ô istifad…ô edir ki, bu t…ôrzd…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn t…ôrzd…ô istifad…ô edir v…ô …ôvv…ôlki araŇütńĪrmalar bu t…ôrzd…ô m√∂hk…ôm t…ôrzd…ô t…ôrzd…ô edilm…ôlidir. Ge√ßmiŇü analizl…ôrin yenid…ôn sńĪnamasńĪnda, …ôvv…ôlki sonu√ßlarńĪn g√ľvenilińüi haqqńĪnda bazńĪ m√∂h√ľm suallarńĪ t…ôŇükil ed…ôn potensial analitik hatalarńĪnńĪ tanńĪyńĪrńĪq. Sonradan, MT adequacy qiym…ôti kontrol edilmiŇü q√∂vm√ľn√ľn istifad…ô edilm…ôsi vasit…ôsil…ô daha √ßox x…ôb…ôrdarlńĪq t…ôrzl…ôrin…ô istifad…ô etdik. T√∂vsiy…ô v…ô ke√ßmiŇü sonu√ßlarńĪna baxmayaraq, MT-nin monodil deńüerlendirm…ôsind…ô he√ß bir d…ôlil g√∂st…ôrm…ôy…ô imkansńĪz d…ôlil yoxdur.', 'cs': 'Jednojazyčné hodnocení strojového překladu (MT) má za cíl zjednodušit hodnocení lidí tím, že vyžaduje, aby hodnotitelé porovnali význam výstupu MT s referenčním překladem, čímž se úkol otevře mnohem většímu fondu skutečně kvalifikovaných hodnotitelů. Jednojazyčné hodnocení však představuje riziko zaujatosti ve prospěch MT systémů, které náhodou produkují překlady povrchně podobné referenci, a v souladu s touto intuicí předchozí šetření dospělo k závěru, že jednojjazyčné hodnocení je v tomto ohledu silně zaujaté. Při přezkoumání minulých analýz však identifikujeme řadu potenciálních analytických chyb, které nutí vznést některé důležité otázky ohledně spolehlivosti minulých závěrů. Následně provádíme další šetření referenčního biasu prostřednictvím přímého lidského posouzení adekvátnosti MT prostřednictvím kvalitně kontrolovaného crowdsourcingu. Na rozdíl od intuice i dřívějších závěrů, výsledky pro MT nevykazují žádný významný důkaz referenčního biasu v monojazyčném hodnocení MT.', 'et': 'Masintõlke ühekeelse hindamise eesmärk on lihtsustada inimeste hindamist, nõudes hindajatelt, et nad võrdlevad MT väljundi tähendust viitetõlkega, avades ülesande palju suuremale tõeliselt kvalifitseeritud hindajate hulgale. Ühekeelne hindamine võib siiski kaasa tuua eelarvamuse selliste MT-süsteemide kasuks, mis juhtuvad tootma tõlkeid pealiskaudselt sarnaselt viitega, ja kooskõlas selle intuitsiooniga on varasemates uuringutes järeldatud, et ühekeelne hindamine on selles suhtes tugevalt eelarvamatu. Varasemate analüüside uuesti läbivaatamisel selgitame välja rea võimalikke analüütilisi vigu, mis sunnivad siiski tõstatama olulisi küsimusi varasemate järelduste usaldusväärsuse kohta. Seejärel teostame täiendavaid uuringuid võrdluseelsuse kohta, hinnates otseselt MT piisavust kvaliteedikontrollitud ühishangete kaudu. Vastupidiselt nii intuitsioonile kui ka varasematele järeldustele ei näita tulemused märkimisväärseid tõendeid viite kalduvuse kohta monokeelses hindamises MT.', 'fi': 'Konekäännöksen yksikielisen arvioinnin tavoitteena on yksinkertaistaa ihmisten arviointia vaatimalla arvioijia vertaamaan MT-tuotoksen merkitystä viitekäännökseen, mikä avaa tehtävän paljon laajemmalle aidosti pätevien arvioijien joukolle. Yksikielisessä arvioinnissa on kuitenkin vaarana, että siinä suositaan sellaisia MT-järjestelmiä, jotka sattuvat tuottamaan viittauksen kaltaisia käännöksiä pinnallisesti, ja tämän intuition mukaisesti aiemmat tutkimukset ovat johtaneet siihen, että yksikielinen arviointi on tältä osin vahvasti puolueellinen. Aiempia analyysejä tarkasteltaessa tunnistamme joukon mahdollisia analyyttisiä virheitä, jotka pakottavat kuitenkin esittämään tärkeitä kysymyksiä aikaisempien päätelmien luotettavuudesta. Tämän jälkeen tutkimme referenssivääristymiä suoraan ihmisten arvioimalla MT:n riittävyyttä laadunvalvonnan avulla. Toisin kuin intuitio ja aiemmat johtopäätökset, tulokset eivät näytä merkitsevää näyttöä viiteharhasta monokielisessä MT:n arvioinnissa.', 'jv': 'Monolngual Awak dhéwé, nggunakake punika dipunangé karo perusahaan, yen karo biasané karo sistem MT sing dadi kapan kanggo tarjamahan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan lan, segala karo perusahaan nyong, dibujuhé perusahaan kawit sumulakno yang sumulakno sing katêpakan banget dadi. Nang-kene mulai pergunian karo depasasi sing liwat, kéné dadi kawit perusahaan kelas nang rak cara-salamat sing nggawe gerakan akeh bantuan nggawe gerakan sampek dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tambah nuné perusahaan nuné dianggawe barang-tambah aturan tambah karo nggawe barang-tambah kuwi tambah bantêr. Genjer-Genjer', 'ha': "Ana ƙaddara na Fassari na Kiki (MT) don ya yi amfani da sauƙin bincike mutum, yana son ka kamata ma'anar fitarwa na MT da fassarar fassarar, kuma ya buɗe aikin zuwa wata ƙara mafi girma na gaskiyar masu inganci da gaskiyar. Taƙalumi na Monoli na tafiyar da risiko, kuma amma, za'a iya faɓa wa tsarin MT's system waɗanda ke iya ƙara fassarar ta sami da sifahan maganar, kuma, da daidai da wannan kashfa, an ƙara bayani na ƙidãyayn tafarkin na farko da za'a yi ta samar hanyarwa a cikin wannan. Ga bayan rabo-bincike na farko, muna gane wasu misãlai masu yiwuwa na yi analyki, da kuma za a lazimta su tambayi wasu masu muhimu da za'a iya aminci ga fassarar farko. Haƙĩƙa, za mu yi aiki suna ƙaranci bayani zuwa misalin mutane, tunkuɗe mutane da inganci na MT daga mutane-sourcen da aka Control. Tãshin gaskiyar da ta farko, matsala za'a nuna wani dalili mai muhimma wa misalin mutane cikin ƙidãya na MT.", 'he': 'הערכה מונולינגולית של התרגום של מכונות (MT) מטרה לפשט הערכה האנושית על ידי הדרישה של המערכים להשוות את המשמעות של יציאת MT עם התרגום התייחסות, לפתוח את המשימה לבריכת הרבה יותר גדולה של מערכים מוכשרים באמת. הערכה מונולינגולית מנהלת את הסיכון, בכל אופן, של ההתמחות לטובת מערכות MT אשר במקרה יוצרים תרגומות שטחיות דומות לתייחס, ובתואמת לאינטואיציה הזו, חקירות קודמות סיימו הערכה מונולינגולית להיות בהתמחות חזקה בנוגע לזה. על בדיקה מחדש של ניתוחים בעבר, אנחנו מזהה סדרה של טעויות אנליטיות פוטנציאליות שגורמות לשאול כמה שאלות חשובות לגבי אמינות המסקנות בעבר, עם זאת. לאחר מכן אנו מבצעים חקירה נוספת בעניין התייחסות דרך הערכה אנושית ישירה של מתאימות MT דרך מקורות קהל שולטים באיכות. בניגוד גם לאינטואיציה וגם למסקנות שעברות, התוצאות לא מראות שום ראיות משמעותיות של התייחסות בהערכה מונושפתית של MT.', 'sk': 'Cilj enojezičnega ocenjevanja strojnega prevajanja (MT) je poenostaviti ocenjevanje ljudi, saj od ocenjevalcev zahteva, da primerjajo pomen rezultata MT z referenčnim prevodom, kar omogoča veliko večji nabor resnično usposobljenih ocenjevalcev. Pri enojezičnem ocenjevanju pa obstaja tveganje pristranskosti v korist sistemov MT, ki slučajno proizvajajo prevode površinsko podobne referenčnemu, in v skladu s to intuicijo so predhodne preiskave zaključile, da je enojezična ocena v zvezi s tem močno pristranska. Pri ponovnem pregledu preteklih analiz pa ugotavljamo vrsto potencialnih analitičnih napak, zaradi katerih je treba postaviti nekaj pomembnih vprašanj o zanesljivosti preteklih sklepov. Nato izvajamo nadaljnje raziskave referenčne pristranskosti z neposredno človeško oceno ustreznosti MT prek kakovostnega nadzorovanega množičnega nabora. V nasprotju z intuicijo in preteklimi sklepi rezultati ne kažejo pomembnih dokazov referenčne pristranskosti pri enojezičnem ocenjevanju MT.', 'bo': 'Monolingual evaluation of Machine Translation (MT) aims to simplify human assessment by requiring assessors to compare the meaning of the MT output with a reference translation, opening up the task to a much larger pool of genuinely qualified evaluators. Monolingual evaluation runs the risk, however, of bias in favour of MT systems that happen to produce translations superficially similar to the reference and, consistent with this intuition, previous investigations have concluded monolingual assessment to be strongly biased in this respect. འདས་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བསྐྱར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་གྱིས་ཐོག་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ་ཅིག་དག་གཏོང དབྱེ་བཟོས་ན། ང་ཚོས་མི་རྣམས་ལས་དབུགས་གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞི་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐད་ཚོར་དང་འདས་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ན། གྲུབ་འབྲས་མཐོང་གི་ཉེན་ལུགས་གནད་ཅིག་མ'}
{'en': 'A Challenge Set Approach to Evaluating Machine Translation', 'ar': 'نهج مجموعة التحدي لتقييم الترجمة الآلية', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem de conjunto de desafios para avaliar a tradução automática', 'fr': 'Une approche axée sur les défis pour évaluer la traduction automatique', 'es': 'Un enfoque de desafíos para evaluar la traducción automática', 'ja': '機械翻訳を評価するためのチャレンジセットのアプローチ', 'zh': '评估机器翻译挑战集法', 'ru': 'Подход к оценке машинного перевода', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक चुनौती सेट दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Tacar Dúshláin chun Aistriúchán Meaisín a Mheasúnú', 'el': 'Μια προσέγγιση συνόλου προκλήσεων για την αξιολόγηση της μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'hu': 'Kihíváskészletes megközelítés a gépi fordítás értékeléséhez', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Компьютерді оқу үшін қатынау жағдайын бақылау', 'it': 'Un approccio complesso di sfide per valutare la traduzione automatica', 'lt': 'Iššūkių rinkinio metodas vertinant mašinų vertimą', 'mk': 'A Challenge Set Approach to Evaluating Machine Translation', 'ms': 'A Challenge Set Approach to Evaluating Machine Translation', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള സങ്കേതം സജ്ജീകരിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө дүгнэх шаардлагатай ойлголт', 'mt': 'Approċċ għas-Sett ta’ Sfidi għall-Evalwazzjoni tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Podejście do oceny tłumaczeń maszynowych', 'ro': 'O abordare a setului de provocări pentru evaluarea traducerii automate', 'sr': 'Izazovanje postavljanje pristupa procjenama prevoda mašine', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Challenge Set Approach to evaluating machine turjumaan', 'sv': 'En utmanande metod för att utvärdera maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ایک چالینگ سٹ تقریبا مشین ترجمہ کا ارزیابی کرنے کے لئے', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp đặt cược để đánh giá máy dịch', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Подход за оценка на машинния превод с предизвикателства', 'nl': 'Een uitdagende aanpak voor het evalueren van machinevertaling', 'da': 'En udfordringssæt tilgang til evaluering af maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Izazov postavi pristup procjenama prevoda stroja', 'id': 'A Challenge Set Approach to Evaluate Machine Translation', 'de': 'Ein Herausforderungsansatz zur Bewertung der maschinellen Übersetzung', 'ko': '기계 번역의 도전 집합 방법을 평가하다', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Challenge wa Kupitia Tafsiri ya Mashiniki', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjimesine gollanmak üçin bir kynçylyk düzeni', 'sq': 'A Challenge Set Approach to Evaluating Machine Translation', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Խնդիրների համակարգը մեքենայի թարգմանման գնահատման մոտեցում է', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Makinat Tərcüməsinə Yaxınlaşdırma Əlavəsi', 'ca': "Un enfocament del conjunt de reptes a la traducció de la màquina d'evaluació", 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ মূল্যায়ন করার জন্য একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ নির্ধারণ', 'cs': 'Přístup k hodnocení strojového překladu', 'bs': 'Izazovanje postavljanje pristupa procjeni prevoda mašine', 'fi': 'Haastejoukko lähestymistapa konekäännöksen arviointiin', 'et': 'Masintõlke hindamise väljakutsetega seotud lähenemisviis', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'הגישה של קבוצת אתגרים לערכת התרגום של מכונות', 'sk': 'Pristop nabora izzivov za ocenjevanje strojnega prevajanja', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་བརྗོད་ལ་ཉེ་གནང་བ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ་འཛུགས་པ'}
{'en': 'Neural machine translation represents an exciting leap forward in translation quality. But what longstanding weaknesses does it resolve, and which remain? We address these questions with a challenge set approach to translation evaluation and error analysis. A challenge set consists of a small set of sentences, each hand-designed to probe a system’s capacity to bridge a particular structural divergence between languages. To exemplify this approach, we present an English-French challenge set, and use it to analyze phrase-based and neural systems. The resulting analysis provides not only a more fine-grained picture of the strengths of neural systems, but also insight into which linguistic phenomena remain out of reach.', 'ar': 'تمثل الترجمة الآلية العصبية قفزة مثيرة إلى الأمام في جودة الترجمة. ولكن ما هي نقاط الضعف الطويلة الأمد التي تحلها ، وأيها تبقى؟ نعالج هذه الأسئلة بنهج مجموعة التحدي لتقييم الترجمة وتحليل الأخطاء. تتكون مجموعة التحدي من مجموعة صغيرة من الجمل ، كل منها مصمم يدويًا لاستكشاف قدرة النظام على سد تباعد هيكلي معين بين اللغات. لتوضيح هذا النهج ، نقدم مجموعة تحديات إنجليزية-فرنسية ، ونستخدمها لتحليل الأنظمة القائمة على العبارات والأنظمة العصبية. لا يوفر التحليل الناتج صورة أكثر دقة عن نقاط قوة الأنظمة العصبية فحسب ، بل يوفر أيضًا نظرة ثاقبة حول الظواهر اللغوية التي تظل بعيدة المنال.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal representa un emocionante avance en la calidad de la traducción. Pero, ¿qué debilidades de larga data resuelve y cuáles siguen existiendo? Abordamos estas preguntas con un enfoque de desafíos para la evaluación de la traducción y el análisis de errores. Un conjunto de desafíos consiste en un pequeño conjunto de oraciones, cada una diseñada a mano para probar la capacidad de un sistema para salvar una divergencia estructural particular entre idiomas. Para ejemplificar este enfoque, presentamos un conjunto de desafíos en inglés y francés, y lo utilizamos para analizar sistemas neuronales y basados en frases. El análisis resultante no solo proporciona una imagen más detallada de las fortalezas de los sistemas neuronales, sino también una visión de qué fenómenos lingüísticos permanecen fuera de nuestro alcance.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural representa um salto empolgante na qualidade da tradução. Mas que fraquezas de longa data ele resolve e quais permanecem? Abordamos essas questões com uma abordagem de conjunto de desafios para avaliação de tradução e análise de erros. Um conjunto de desafios consiste em um pequeno conjunto de sentenças, cada uma projetada à mão para sondar a capacidade de um sistema de superar uma divergência estrutural particular entre linguagens. Para exemplificar essa abordagem, apresentamos um conjunto de desafios inglês-francês e o usamos para analisar sistemas neurais e baseados em frases. A análise resultante fornece não apenas uma imagem mais detalhada dos pontos fortes dos sistemas neurais, mas também uma visão sobre quais fenômenos linguísticos permanecem fora de alcance.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale représente une avancée passionnante en matière de qualité de traduction. Mais quelles sont les faiblesses de longue date résolues et lesquelles subsistent encore\xa0? Nous abordons ces questions avec une approche de défi pour l'évaluation de la traduction et l'analyse des erreurs. Un ensemble de défis consiste en un petit ensemble de phrases, chacune conçue à la main pour sonder la capacité d'un système à combler une divergence structurelle particulière entre les langues. Pour illustrer cette approche, nous présentons un ensemble de défis anglais-français, et nous l'utilisons pour analyser les systèmes basés sur les phrases et les systèmes neuronaux. L'analyse qui en résulte fournit non seulement une image plus fine des forces des systèmes neuronaux, mais également un aperçu des phénomènes linguistiques qui restent hors de portée.", 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳は、翻訳品質の興奮的な飛躍を表しています。しかし、どのような長年の弱点が解決され、どの弱点が残っていますか？私たちは、翻訳評価とエラー分析へのチャレンジセットアプローチでこれらの質問に対処します。チャレンジセットは、小さな文のセットで構成され、各文は、言語間の特定の構造的乖離を埋めるためにシステムの能力を探るように手動で設計されています。このアプローチを例に挙げると、英仏のチャレンジセットを提示し、それを使用してフレーズベースのシステムとニューラルシステムを分析します。結果として得られた分析は、神経系の強みのより細かいイメージを提供するだけでなく、どの言語現象が手の届かないところに残っているかについての洞察を提供する。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता में एक रोमांचक छलांग का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। लेकिन यह किन लंबे समय से चली आ रही कमजोरियों को हल करता है, और कौन सी बनी हुई है? हम अनुवाद मूल्यांकन और त्रुटि विश्लेषण के लिए एक चुनौती सेट दृष्टिकोण के साथ इन प्रश्नों को संबोधित करते हैं। एक चुनौती सेट में वाक्यों का एक छोटा सा सेट होता है, प्रत्येक हाथ से भाषाओं के बीच एक विशेष संरचनात्मक विचलन को पुल करने के लिए एक प्रणाली की क्षमता की जांच करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। इस दृष्टिकोण का उदाहरण देने के लिए, हम एक अंग्रेजी-फ्रांसीसी चुनौती सेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और वाक्यांश-आधारित और तंत्रिका प्रणालियों का विश्लेषण करने के लिए इसका उपयोग करते हैं। परिणामी विश्लेषण न केवल तंत्रिका प्रणालियों की ताकत की एक अधिक बारीक तस्वीर प्रदान करता है, बल्कि अंतर्दृष्टि भी प्रदान करता है जिसमें भाषाई घटनाएं पहुंच से बाहर रहती हैं।', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод представляет собой захватывающий скачок вперед в качестве перевода. Но какие давние слабости он устраняет и какие остаются? Мы решаем эти вопросы с помощью комплексного подхода к оценке перевода и анализу ошибок. Набор задач состоит из небольшого набора предложений, каждое из которых разработано вручную для определения способности системы преодолевать определенные структурные расхождения между языками. Для иллюстрации этого подхода мы представляем английско-французский набор задач и используем его для анализа фразеологических и нейронных систем. Результирующий анализ дает не только более тонкую картину сильных сторон нейронных систем, но и понимание того, какие лингвистические явления остаются недосягаемыми.', 'zh': '神经机器翻译者,译质惊人飞跃也。 然其所以久存者,与其所以存者何弱? 以挑战性译评谬分析方法以决之。 挑战集由一小组句成,句皆手工所设,以探统弥合言语之间特定结构异能。 为此法者,举一英语 - 法语以挑战,以论短语之统神经系统。 由此言之,非徒神经系统势之细粒度图片也,又供其言之不可及也。', 'ga': 'Is ionann aistriúchán meaisín néarach agus céim spreagúil chun cinn i gcaighdeán an aistriúcháin. Ach cad iad na laigí fadbhunaithe a réitíonn sé, agus cé na laigí atá fós ann? Tugaimid aghaidh ar na ceisteanna seo le cur chuige dúshlánach maidir le measúnú aistriúcháin agus anailís earráide. Is éard atá i dtacar dúshlán ná tacar beag abairtí, gach ceann díobh deartha le cumas córais a iniúchadh chun éagsúlacht struchtúrach ar leith idir teangacha a líonadh. Mar eiseamláir den chur chuige seo, cuirimid dúshlán Béarla-Fraincis i láthair, agus úsáidimid é chun anailís a dhéanamh ar chórais frása-bhunaithe agus néarchóras. Ní hamháin go dtugann an anailís a eascraíonn as seo pictiúr níos míne ar láidreachtaí na néarchóras, ach tugann sé léargas freisin ar na feiniméin teangeolaíocha atá fós as teacht.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქინის გადაწყვეტილება გადაწყვეტილებელი გადაწყვეტილებელი გადაწყვეტილება. მაგრამ რამდენიმე განმავლობაში სიმაღლეები გადაწყენებს და რამდენიმე დარჩენება? ჩვენ ამ კითხვების შესახებ შეცდომა და შეცდომა ანალიზაციისთვის შეცდომა დავწყებთ. განსაზღვრების ნაწილი არის პატარა სიტყვების ნაწილიდან, რომელიც ყოველ ხელიდან განსაზღვრებულია სისტემის შესაძლებლობას გავაკეთოთ განსაზღვრებული სტრუქტურული განსხვავება ენ ამ პროგრამის გამოსახულებლად, ჩვენ ინგლისური-ფრანგური გამოსახულებას გამოყენებთ და გამოყენებთ ფრაზების და ნეირალური სისტემის ანალიზაციისთვის. შემდეგ ანალიზია არა მხოლოდ ნეიროლური სისტემის ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გამოსახულებული სურათი, მაგრამ მიხედვით, რომელიც ლენგურისტიკური ფენომენები არ შეიძლება.', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás izgalmas előrelépést jelent a fordítási minőség terén. De milyen régóta fennálló gyengeségeket old meg, és melyek maradnak még? Ezeket a kérdéseket a fordítások értékelésére és hibaelemzésére vonatkozó kihíváskészített megközelítéssel kezeljük. A kihíváskészlet egy kis mondatcsomagból áll, amelyeket mindegyik kézzel arra terveztek, hogy felmérjék a rendszer képességét, hogy áthidalja a nyelvek közötti különböző strukturális eltéréseket. Ennek a megközelítésnek a példájához bemutatunk egy angol-francia kihíváskészletet, amelyet kifejezésalapú és neurális rendszerek elemzésére használunk. Az eredményekből származó elemzés nemcsak finomabb képet ad az idegrendszerek erősségeiről, hanem betekintést nyújt arra is, hogy mely nyelvi jelenségek maradnak elérhetetlenek.', 'el': 'Η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση αντιπροσωπεύει ένα συναρπαστικό άλμα προς τα εμπρός στην ποιότητα της μετάφρασης. Αλλά ποιες μακροχρόνιες αδυναμίες επιλύει και ποιες παραμένουν; Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτά τα ερωτήματα με μια προσέγγιση που θέτει προκλήσεις στην αξιολόγηση της μετάφρασης και την ανάλυση σφαλμάτων. Ένα σύνολο προκλήσεων αποτελείται από ένα μικρό σύνολο προτάσεων, κάθε χέρι σχεδιασμένη για να εξετάσει την ικανότητα ενός συστήματος να γεφυρώσει μια συγκεκριμένη δομική απόκλιση μεταξύ γλωσσών. Για να παραδειγματιστεί αυτή η προσέγγιση, παρουσιάζουμε ένα αγγλο-γαλλικό σύνολο προκλήσεων, και το χρησιμοποιούμε για την ανάλυση φράσεων και νευρωνικών συστημάτων. Η ανάλυση που προκύπτει παρέχει όχι μόνο μια πιο λεπτή εικόνα των δυνατοτήτων των νευρωνικών συστημάτων, αλλά και μια εικόνα για τα γλωσσικά φαινόμενα που παραμένουν εκτός εμβέλειας.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica neurale rappresenta un emozionante salto in avanti nella qualità della traduzione. Ma quali debolezze di lunga data risolve e quali rimangono? Affrontiamo queste domande con un approccio complesso di sfide alla valutazione della traduzione e all'analisi degli errori. Un set di sfide consiste in una piccola serie di frasi, ognuna progettata a mano per sondare la capacità di un sistema di colmare una particolare divergenza strutturale tra le lingue. Per esemplificare questo approccio, presentiamo un set di sfide inglese-francese, e lo usiamo per analizzare sistemi basati su frasi e neurali. L'analisi risultante fornisce non solo un quadro più sottile dei punti di forza dei sistemi neurali, ma anche una visione di quali fenomeni linguistici rimangono fuori portata.", 'kk': 'Нейрондық компьютердің аудармасы аудармасының сапасы үшін көңіл жұмыс іске асыратын болады. Бірақ ол қанша ұзындық зақымдарды шешу және қанша қалды? Біз бұл сұрақтарды аудармаларды және қате анализиясының арқылы жауап беріп тұрамыз. Тілдер арасындағы структуралық диверензиясын өзгерту үшін әрбір қол құрылған сөздердің кішкентай жиынынан тұрады. Бұл тәсілді мысалдыру үшін ағылшын-французша шақыру жиынын таңдап, сөздерді негізделген және невралдық жүйелерді анализ үшін қолданамыз. Бұл анализ тек невралдық жүйелердің күштерінің күштерінің көмегімен жақсы суретін емес, сондай-ақ лингвистикалық пайдалануларының қай түсініктері жеткізілмейді.', 'lt': 'Neuralinis mašin ų vertimas reiškia įdomų žingsnį į priekį vertimo kokybės srityje. Bet kokių ilgalaikių trūkumų ji išspręsia ir kurie lieka? Mes sprendžiame šiuos klausimus taikant iššūkius nustatytą vertimo raštu vertinimo ir klaidų analizės metodą. Iššūkių rinkinį sudaro nedidelis sakinių rinkinys, kiekvienas rankomis suprojektuotas ištirti sistemos gebėjimą užkirsti kelią tam tikram struktūriniam kalbų skirtumui. Norėdami pavyzdį išdėstyti šį požiūrį, pristatome anglų ir prancūzų iššūkių rinkinį ir naudojame jį analizuojant frazėmis pagrįstas ir nervines sistemas. Atlikus analizę pateikiamas ne tik išsamesnis vaizdas apie nervų sistemų stiprumus, bet ir supratimas, kokių kalbinių reiškinių negalima pasiekti.', 'mk': 'Превод на неврални машини претставува возбудлив скок напред во квалитетот на превод. Но какви долготрајни слабости ги решава и кои остануваат? Ние ги решаваме овие прашања со пристап поставен со предизвици за проценка на преводот и анализа на грешки. Составот на предизвици се состои од мал набор реченици, секоја рачно дизајнирана за истражување на капацитетот на системот за преместување на одредена структурна разлика помеѓу јазиците. За да го примериме овој пристап, претставуваме набор англиско-француски предизвици и го користиме за анализирање на фрази и нервни системи. Резултатот на анализата не само што обезбедува пофина слика на силите на невровните системи, туку и разбирање во кои јазички феномени остануваат надвор од достап.', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe stanowi ekscytujący skok naprzód w zakresie jakości tłumaczeń. Ale jakie słabości od dawna rozwiązuje, a które pozostają? Odpowiadamy na te pytania za pomocą podejścia do oceny tłumaczeń i analizy błędów. Zestaw wyzwań składa się z małego zestawu zdań, z których każda ręka została zaprojektowana, aby zbadać zdolność systemu do pokonywania szczególnej strukturalnej rozbieżności między językami. Aby uzyskać przykład tego podejścia, przedstawiamy angielsko-francuski zestaw wyzwań i wykorzystujemy go do analizy systemów opartych na frazach i neuronach. Wynikająca z nich analiza daje nie tylko bardziej precyzyjny obraz mocnych stron układów neuronowych, ale także wgląd w to, które zjawiska językowe pozostają poza zasięgiem.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതു് പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഒരു ആശ്വാസകരമായ ലിപ്പ് മുന്\u200dപോട എന്നാല്\u200d എന്ത് ദീര്\u200dഘായ ദുര്\u200dബലങ്ങളാണ് അത് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നത്, എന്നിട്ടും താമസിക്കുന്നത്? ഈ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഭാഷയുടെ പരിശോധനയും പിശക് അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി വെല്ലുവെക്കുന്ന ഒരു സജ്ജീകരണത ഒരു ചെറിയ വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്, ഓരോ കൈകള്\u200dക്കും സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കഴിവുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയ ഈ വഴിയെ ഉദാഹരണമാക്കാന്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഫ്രെഞ്ച് വ്യാല്\u200dവെല്ലുകള്\u200d സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്നു, വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന അതിന്റെ അന്വേഷണം ന്യൂറല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ശക്തികളുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്ല ഒരു ചിത്രം മാത്രമേ നല്\u200dകുന്നുള്ളൂ.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală reprezintă un pas interesant înainte în ceea ce privește calitatea traducerii. Dar ce slăbiciuni de lungă durată rezolvă și care rămân? Abordăm aceste întrebări printr-o abordare a evaluării traducerii și a analizei erorilor. Un set de provocări constă într-un set mic de propoziții, fiecare proiectată manual pentru a investiga capacitatea unui sistem de a elimina o anumită divergență structurală între limbi. Pentru a exemplifica această abordare, vă prezentăm un set de provocări engleză-franceză, pe care îl folosim pentru a analiza sistemele bazate pe fraze și neuronale. Analiza rezultată oferă nu numai o imagine mai fină a punctelor forte ale sistemelor neuronale, ci și o perspectivă asupra fenomenelor lingvistice care rămân inaccesibile.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf mewakili lompatan yang menarik ke hadapan dalam kualiti terjemahan. But what longstanding weaknesses does it resolve, and which remain?  Kami mengatasi soalan ini dengan pendekatan ditetapkan cabaran untuk penilaian terjemahan dan analisis ralat. Satu set cabaran terdiri dari set kalimat kecil, setiap reka-tangan untuk mengesan kapasitas sistem untuk menyambungkan perbezaan struktur tertentu antara bahasa. Untuk mewakili pendekatan ini, kami memperkenalkan set cabaran Inggeris-Perancis, dan menggunakannya untuk menganalisis sistem berasaskan frasa dan saraf. Analisis hasilnya tidak hanya memberikan gambar yang lebih baik dari kekuatan sistem saraf, tetapi juga pemahaman yang mana fenomena bahasa tetap tidak terjangkit.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali tirrappreżenta qabża eċċitanti ’l quddiem fil-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni. Iżda liema dgħufijiet ilhom jeżolvu, u liema jibqgħu? Aħna nindirizzaw dawn il-mistoqsijiet b’approċċ stabbilit b’sfida għall-evalwazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni u l-analiżi tal-iżbalji. Sett ta’ sfidi jikkonsisti f’sett żgħir ta’ sentenzi, kull waħda mfassla bl-idejn biex tinvestiga l-kapaċità ta’ sistema li tgħaqqad diverġenza strutturali partikolari bejn il-lingwi. Biex nagħmlu eżempju ta’ dan l-approċċ, qed nippreżentaw sett ta’ sfidi Ingliż-Franċiż, u nużawh biex nianalizzaw sistemi bbażati fuq frażi u newrali. L-analiżi li tirriżulta mhux biss tipprovdi stampa aktar fina tal-qawwiet tas-sistemi newrali, iżda wkoll għarfien dwar liema fenomeni lingwistiċi jibqgħu mhux milħuqa.', 'no': '@ info Men kva lange tyrke løyser det, og kva blir? Vi adresserer desse spørsmålene med eit utfordring sett tilnærming til oversettelsevaluering og feilanalysing. Eit utfordringssett inneheld ein liten setning av setningar, kvar hand-designert for å prøve systemkapasiteten til å bridge eit spesielt strukturforskjellig mellom språk. For eksempel på denne tilnærminga, presenterer vi eit utfordring med engelsk- fransk og bruker det for å analysera frasebaserte og neuralsystem. Dette resultatet analysen gjev ikkje berre eit meir fylte bilete av styrkene på nervalsystemet, men også innsyning av kva språkstiske fenomenar ikkje er nådd.', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн машин хөгжүүлэлт нь хөгжүүлэх чадвартай сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн илэрхийлдэг. Гэхдээ энэ нь ямар урт хугацааны сул байдал шийдвэрлэж, хэн үлдэх вэ? Бид эдгээр асуудлуудыг даалгавар өгөх болон алдааны шинжилгээнд зориулсан арга зам өгсөн. Сорилт нь хэлний хооронд тодорхой бүтэц ялгааг шалгахын тулд жижиг хэлбэрүүдийн жижиг хэлбэрүүдийн хэмжээнд байдаг. Энэ арга баримтыг жишээлбэл бид Англи-Французын сорилт хэмжээг илэрхийлдэг, мэдрэлийн системийг шинжилгээд ашиглаж байна. Үүний үр дүнд шинжилгээ нь зүгээр л мэдрэлийн системийн хүчирхэг чадваруудын илүү сайхан зураг биш, мөн хэлний үзэгдэл нь хэзээ ч хүрэхгүй байгааг ойлгох боломжтой.', 'sr': 'Neuralni prevod mašine predstavlja uzbudljiv skok napred u kvaliteti prevoda. Ali kakve dugogodišnje slabosti reši i koje ostaju? Razgovaramo sa ovim pitanjima sa izazovom postavljenim pristupom procjeni prevoda i analizu greške. Izazovni set se sastoji od malih set a rečenica, svake ruke dizajnirane kako bi istražili kapacitet sustava da prekrši posebnu strukturnu razliku između jezika. Da bi primerili ovaj pristup, predstavljamo set engleskog-francuskog izazova i koristimo ga da analiziramo fraze-bazirane i neuralne sisteme. U rezultatnoj analizi pruža ne samo lepšu sliku snage nervnih sistema, nego i uvid u koje jezičke fenomene ostaju izvan dostupnosti.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය ප්\u200dරදේශයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා පරිවර්තනයේ විශේෂ ක්\u200dරමතාවක ඒත් මොන දිගටම දුර්වලක්ද ඒක විශ්වාස කරන්නේ, මොන දෙයක්ද ඉන්නේ? අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අවශ්\u200dයාවක් සමග අවශ්\u200dයාවක් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dයාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය ස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ පුංචි වචනයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, හැම අත්තයක්ම සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ පද්ධතියේ ක්\u200dරි මේ විදිහට උපදේශ කරන්න, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරේෂි-ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සූදානම් කරනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරණය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විතරක් නෙවෙයි, න්\u200dයුරෝල් පද්ධතියේ ශක්තිමත් වල පින්තූරයක් විතරක් නෙවෙය', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning är ett spännande steg framåt när det gäller översättningskvalitet. Men vilka långvariga svagheter löser den, och vilka återstår? Vi tar itu med dessa frågor med ett utmanande förhållningssätt till översättningsutvärdering och felanalys. En utmaning uppsättning består av en liten uppsättning meningar, var och en hand utformad för att undersöka ett systems förmåga att överbrygga en viss strukturell skillnad mellan språk. För att exemplifiera detta tillvägagångssätt presenterar vi en engelsk-fransk utmaning uppsättning, och använder den för att analysera frasbaserade och neurala system. Den resulterande analysen ger inte bara en mer finkornig bild av styrkorna i neurala system, utan också insikt i vilka språkliga fenomen som förblir utom räckhåll.', 'so': 'Turjumista neural machine translation represents an exciting leap forward in quality of translation. Laakiin itaaldarrada dulqaadashada maxay u xajisaa oo sii jiraysaa? Maswaliyadan waxaannu ka sheekeysanaynaa qaabab qallafsan oo loo qorayo baaritaanka iyo baaritaanka qaladka. Iska tartanka waxaa ka mid ah fursad yar, mid kasta oo gacanta loo qoray inay sameyn karto awoodda nidaamka si ay u kala duwanaato kala duwan rasmiga oo kala duduwan luqadaha. Tusaale ahaan qaababkan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa koox dhibaato af Ingiriis-Faraansiis ah, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa si aan u analysno nidaamka cudurka iyo neurada ku saleysan. Baaritaanka dhamaadkeedu wuxuu fidiyaa sawir aad u fiican oo kaliya nidaamka neurada, laakiin wuxuu sidoo kale ka muuqanayaa waxyaabaha luqada ku jirta oo ay ka baahan yihiin.', 'ta': '@ info But what longstanding weaknesses does it resolve, and which remain?  நாம் இந்த கேள்விகளை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மதிப்பு மற்றும் பிழை ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு சவால் அமைப்பு முறைமை ஒரு சவால் அமைப்பு சிறிய வாக்கியங்களில் உள்ளது, ஒவ்வொரு கையிலும் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள கணினியின் இயல்பாக்கத்தை சிறப்பு கட்டுமை இந்த முறையை எடுத்துக்காட்டுவதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு ஆங்கிலம்- பிரெஞ்சு சவால் அமைப்பை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், மற்றும் சொற்றொடர் அட முடிவு ஆராய்ச்சி புதிய முறைமைகளின் வலிமைகள் மட்டுமே ஒரு நல்ல பிடிப்பு படத்தை வழங்குவதில்லை, ஆனால் எந்த மொழிமொழியில் இருக்கும் போ', 'ur': 'نائورل ماشین ترجمہ کی ترجمہ کی کیفیت میں ایک اثر انگیز لپیٹ آگے دکھاتا ہے. اور وہ کس قدر کمزوری کا فیصلہ کرتا ہے اور کس قدر باقی رہتا ہے؟ ہم ان سوالوں کو ایک چال سے جواب دیتے ہیں جو ترجمہ کا ارزش اور خطا کا تحلیل کے لئے مقرر کیا گیا ہے۔ ایک چال مجموعہ میں ایک چھوٹی مجموعہ ہے، ہر ہاتھ کی طراحی کی ہے کہ ایک سیستم کی قابلیت تحقیق کرے کہ زبانوں کے درمیان ایک مختلف ساختہ اختلاف کو دکھائے۔ اس طریقہ کی مثال کے لئے ہم انگلیسی-فرانسوی چالیس کے ایک مجموعہ پیش کرتے ہیں اور اس کا استعمال کرتے ہیں فریز-بنیاد اور نیورال سیسٹم کو تحقیق کرنے کے لئے۔ نتیجہ تحلیل صرف نیورال سیسٹم کی قوت کی ایک زیادہ دھوپ کی تصویر نہیں دیتا، بلکہ یہ بھی دیکھ رہا ہے کہ کدوم زبان کی روشنی کا اتفاق حاصل نہیں ہوتا۔', 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh là một bước tiến thú vị trong chất lượng dịch. Nhưng nó có giải quyết những yếu điểm cũ nào và còn lại? Chúng tôi giải quyết những câu hỏi này bằng cách thách thức xác định đánh giá dịch và phân tích lỗi. Một thách thức được đặt ra là một tập nhỏ các câu, mỗi tay được thiết kế để thăm dò khả năng của hệ thống để vượt qua s ự khác biệt cấu trúc cụ thể giữa các ngôn ngữ. Để ví dụ cách tiếp cận này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập thử thách Anh-Pháp, và dùng nó để phân tích hệ thần kinh từ cụm từ và thần kinh. Kết quả phân tích cung cấp không chỉ một bức tranh sắc màu hơn về sức mạnh của hệ thần kinh, mà còn một cái nhìn sâu về những hiện tượng ngôn ngữ còn ngoài tầm với.', 'uz': "translation Lekin qancha qancha davomida qo'llab qoladi va davom etadi? @ info Name Bu usulni masalan qilish uchun biz ingliz- fransuzcha murakkab tarqalmoqni koʻrsatimiz va biz bir so'zlar asosida va neyrolik tizimlarini analyzlashga ishlatamiz. The resulting analysis provides not only a more fine-grained picture of the strengths of neural systems, but also insight into which linguistic phenomena remain out of reach.", 'nl': 'Neuronale machinevertaling betekent een spannende sprong voorwaarts in vertaalkwaliteit. Maar welke zwakke punten van oudsher worden opgelost en welke blijven er bestaan? We pakken deze vragen aan met een challenge set benadering van vertaalevaluatie en foutanalyse. Een uitdaging set bestaat uit een kleine set zinnen, elk met de hand ontworpen om de capaciteit van een systeem te onderzoeken om een bepaalde structurele divergentie tussen talen te overbruggen. Om deze aanpak te illustreren presenteren we een Engels-Franse challengeset, die we gebruiken om frase-based en neurale systemen te analyseren. De resulterende analyse geeft niet alleen een fijner beeld van de sterktes van neurale systemen, maar ook inzicht in welke linguïstische fenomenen buiten bereik blijven.', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse repræsenterer et spændende spring fremad i oversættelseskvaliteten. Men hvilke mangeårige svagheder løser den, og hvilke der er tilbage? Vi behandler disse spørgsmål med en udfordringssæt tilgang til oversættelsesvurdering og fejlanalyse. Et udfordringssæt består af et lille sæt sætninger, der hver hånd er designet til at undersøge et systems evne til at bygge bro over en bestemt strukturel divergens mellem sprog. For at eksemplificere denne tilgang præsenterer vi et engelsk-fransk udfordringssæt, og bruger det til at analysere sætningsbaserede og neurale systemer. Den resulterende analyse giver ikke blot et mere finkornet billede af neurale systemers styrker, men også indsigt i, hvilke sproglige fænomener der forbliver uden for rækkevidde.', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung stellt einen spannenden Sprung nach vorn in der Übersetzungsqualität dar. Aber welche Schwachstellen löst sie, und welche bleiben? Wir adressieren diese Fragen mit einem Herausforderungsansatz zur Übersetzungsbewertung und Fehleranalyse. Ein Herausforderungsset besteht aus einem kleinen Satz Sätze, von denen jede Hand entworfen wurde, um die Fähigkeit eines Systems zu untersuchen, eine bestimmte strukturelle Divergenz zwischen Sprachen zu überbrücken. Um diesen Ansatz zu veranschaulichen, stellen wir ein englisch-französisches Challengeset vor und nutzen es zur Analyse phrasenbasierter und neuronaler Systeme. Die daraus resultierende Analyse liefert nicht nur ein detaillierteres Bild der Stärken neuronaler Systeme, sondern auch einen Einblick, welche sprachlichen Phänomene außer Reichweite bleiben.', 'bg': 'Невровият машинен превод представлява вълнуващ скок напред в качеството на превода. Но какви дългогодишни слабости решава той и кои остават? Отговаряме на тези въпроси с подхода за оценка на превода и анализ на грешките. Комплектът предизвикателства се състои от малък набор от изречения, всяко ръчно проектирано да изследва способността на системата да преодолее определена структурна дивергия между езиците. За да покажем този подход, представяме англо-френски набор от предизвикателства и го използваме за анализ на фразата и невронните системи. Полученият анализ дава не само по-фина картина на силните страни на невронните системи, но и представа за това кои лингвистични явления остават недостъпни.', 'hr': 'Neuralni prevod uređaja predstavlja uzbudljiv skok naprijed u kvaliteti prevoda. Ali kakve dugogodišnje slabosti riješi i koje ostaju? Razgovaramo s tim pitanjima sa izazovom postavljenim pristupom procjeni prevoda i analizi greške. Izazovni set se sastoji od malih set a rečenica, svake ruke dizajnirane za istraživanje kapaciteta sustava za prekid određene strukturne razlike između jezika. Da bismo primjerili ovaj pristup, predstavljamo set engleskog-francuskog izazova i koristili ga za analiziranje fraza-baziranih i neuralnih sustava. U rezultatnoj analizi pruža ne samo finozorniju sliku snage nervnih sustava, nego i uvid u koje jezičke fenomene ostaju izvan dostupnosti.', 'ko': '신경 기계 번역은 번역의 질에 대한 흥분된 비약을 대표한다.그러나 그것은 어떤 장기적으로 존재하는 약점을 해결했고, 어떤 것이 여전히 존재하는가?우리는 도전집의 번역 평가와 오류 분석 방법으로 이 문제들을 해결한다.도전집은 한 조의 문장으로 구성되어 있으며 모든 손은 하나의 시스템이 언어 사이에 특정한 구조 차이의 다리를 놓는 능력을 탐색하기 위한 것이다.이런 방법을 예를 들어 설명하기 위해 우리는 영어-프랑스어 도전집을 제시했고 이를 이용하여 단어와 신경계통을 바탕으로 분석했다.이로 인해 발생한 분석은 신경계의 강점에 대해 더욱 세밀한 묘사를 제공할 뿐만 아니라 어떤 언어 현상이 여전히 미처 미칠 수 없는지 깊이 있게 이해했다.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf mewakili lompatan menarik maju dalam kualitas terjemahan. Tetapi kelemahan apa yang telah lama ia selesaikan, dan yang tersisa? Kami mengatasi pertanyaan ini dengan pendekatan set tantangan untuk evaluasi terjemahan dan analisis kesalahan. Satu set tantangan terdiri dari set kalimat kecil, masing-masing direncanakan tangan untuk menyelidiki kapasitas sistem untuk menyambung perbedaan struktur tertentu antara bahasa. Untuk memberikan contoh pendekatan ini, kami mempersembahkan set tantangan Inggris-Perancis, dan menggunakannya untuk menganalisis sistem berdasarkan frasa dan saraf. Analisis hasilnya tidak hanya memberikan gambar yang lebih baik dari kekuatan sistem saraf, tetapi juga penglihatan ke mana fenomena bahasa tetap di luar jangkauan.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine ya asili inawakilisha jumba la kusisimua mbele katika sifa za tafsiri. Lakini udhaifu gani wa kusubiri utatua, na unabaki? We address these questions with a challenge set approach to translation evaluation and error analysis.  Mpango wa changamoto unajumuisha seti ndogo ya hukumu, kila mikono inayolengwa kuthibitisha uwezo wa mfumo wa kutangaza tofauti maalum kati ya lugha. Kwa mfano huu, tunaweka kituo cha changamoto cha Kiingereza na Kifaransa, na tunatumia uchambuzi wa mifumo ya msingi na neura. Uchambuzi wa matokeo hayo hautoi picha tu yenye ufanisi mzuri zaidi ya nguvu za mfumo wa neura, bali pia inaonyesha jinsi ambavyo mambo ya lugha yanabaki kutokuwepo.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی یک قدم هیجان انگیز در کیفیت ترجمه را نشان می دهد. و چه ضعیفه\u200cای طولانی است که آن را حل می\u200cکند و چه باقی می\u200cماند؟ ما این سوالات را با یک چالش طریق تنظیم برای ارزیابی ترجمه و تحلیل خطا درباره\u200cی تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. یک مجموعه چالش از یک مجموعه کوچک از جمله\u200cهای جمله است، هر دستی طراحی شده تا توانایی سیستم را تحقیق کند تا یک تفاوت ساختاری خاصی بین زبانها را برابر کند. برای مثال این روش، ما یک مجموعه چالش انگلیسی-فرانسوی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و از آن استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا سیستم\u200cهای عصبی بر اساس عبارت و عبارت تحلیل کنیم. این تحلیل نتیجه فقط تصویر نیروهای سیستم\u200cهای عصبی\u200cتر را پیشنهاد نمی\u200cدهد، بلکه مشاهده می\u200cکند که در کدام پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بیرون می\u200cماند.', 'af': "Neurale masjien vertaling verteenwoordig 'n opkomstige spring voort in vertaling kwaliteit. Maar watter lankmoedige swakhede bepaal dit en wat bly? Ons adres hierdie vrae met 'n uitdrukking stel toegang tot oorspronklike evaluering en fout analisie. 'n Uitdrukkstel bestaan van 'n klein stel van setings, elke hand-ontwerp om 'n stelsel se kapasiteit te probeer om 'n spesifieke strukturele verskil tussen tale te brui. Om hierdie toegang te voorbeeld, laat ons 'n Engelse-Franse uitdrukking voorsien en dit gebruik om frase-gebaseerde en neurale stelsels te analyseer. Die resultateerde analisie verskaf nie net 'n meer fyn-koring prent van die sterkte van neurale stelsels nie, maar ook insig waarin lingvisse fenomene uitgebruik word nie.", 'tr': 'N철ral ma힊yny흫 terjimesi terjime etmek 체챌in heyecanlyk 첵itir. 횦철ne bu 첵erde n채hili uzak zay캇flatlyk 챌철zer we n채hili bolar? Biz bu soraglary terjime etmek we hata analizi 체챌in kyn챌ylyk bilen 챌yk첵arys. Bir kyn챌ylyk d체z체mleri s 철zleri흫 ki챌i bir toparynda, her el sistemini흫 dilleri흫 arasyndaky bir d체z체m 체첵tgetmek 체챌in tasarlan첵ar. Bu 첵agda첵y 철r채n eserlemek 체챌in, i흫lis챌e-fransuz챌a kyn챌ylyk d체zenini g철rkez we fraz sistemlerini 챌철z체mlemek 체챌in ullan첵arys. N채me 체챌in 챌yky힊 analyzasynda di흫e n채ral sistemalary흫 g체챌lerini흫 첵okary 첵ok suratyny d채l, 첵철ne bu 첵erde lingwistiki par챌alary흫 ha첵sy 첵erinde galmadygyny d체힊체n첵채r.', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinës nervore përfaqëson një hap emocionues përpara në cilësinë e përkthimit. Por cilat dobësi zgjidhin dhe cilat mbeten? We address these questions with a challenge set approach to translation evaluation and error analysis.  Një s ërë sfida përbëhet nga një sërë e vogël fjalësh, secila e dizajnuar me dorë për të hetuar aftësinë e një sistemi për të mbushur një dallim të veçantë strukturor midis gjuhëve. Për të shembulluar këtë qasje, ne paraqesim një sërë sfida anglo-franceze, dhe e përdorim për të analizuar sistemet e bazuar në fraza dhe nervore. Analiza rezultuese ofron jo vetëm një imazh më të hollë të fortësive të sistemeve nervore, por gjithashtu një kuptim në se cilat fenomene gjuhësore mbeten jashtë arritjes.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը ներկայացնում է հետաքրքիր քայլ առաջ թարգմանության որակի մեջ: Բայց ի՞նչ երկար թույլ է այն լուծում, և ո՞րն են մնում: Մենք լուծում ենք այս հարցերը թարգմանման գնահատման և սխալների վերլուծության խնդիրների հետ: Խնդիրների համակարգը կազմված է մի փոքրիկ նախադասություններից, որոնք յուրաքանչյուր ձեռք են կազմված, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրեն համակարգի ունակությունը լեզուների միջև որոշակի կառուցվածքային տարբերությունները հաղթահարելու Այս մոտեցումը օրինակելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք անգլերեն-ֆրանսերեն մարտահրավեր և օգտագործում ենք այն արտահայտությամբ հիմնված և նյարդային համակարգերի վերլուծության համար: Արդյունքում ստացված վերլուծությունը պարունակում է ոչ միայն նյարդային համակարգերի ուժեղությունների ավելի լավ պատկեր, այլ նաև հասկացություն այն մասին, թե ինչպիսի լեզվաբանական երևույթներ չեն հասնում:', 'bn': 'অনুবাদের মানে একটি উত্তেজিত লিপের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে। কিন্তু দীর্ঘ দুর্বলতা কি সমাধান করবে, আর কি থাকবে? অনুবাদ এবং ত্রুটি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য একটি চ্যালেঞ্জের মাধ্যমে আমরা এই প্রশ্নের সাথে কথা বলি। একটি চ্যালেঞ্জের সেটের মধ্যে ছোট একটি বিভিন্ন কারাদণ্ড রয়েছে, প্রত্যেক হাতের ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে ভাষার মধ্যে একটি বিশেষ কাঠামোর বি এই পদক্ষেপের উদাহরণের জন্য আমরা ইংরেজী ফ্রেঞ্চ চ্যালেঞ্জের সেট উপস্থাপন করি এবং বাক্য ভিত্তিক এবং নিউরেল সিস্টেম বিশ্ ফলাফলের বিশ্লেষণ শুধুমাত্র নিউরেল সিস্টেমের শক্তির ক্ষেত্রে আরো সুন্দর ছবি প্রদান করে না, কিন্তু তারা অনুভূতি প্রদান করেছে যে ভাষাগত বি', 'am': 'translation ነገር ግን የትዕግሥት ድካም ምን ይቆማል? ማንም ይኖራል? እነዚህን ጥያቄዎች ለመተርጓሜ እና የስህተት ትርጓሜ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የውጤት ግንኙነት በቋንቋዎች መካከል የተለየውን የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ የሚቻለውን የስርዓት ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ ነው፡፡ ለምሳሌ ለመግለጽ እንግሊዘኛ-ፈረንሳይ የፍሪንሳይ ምርጫዎችን እናቀርባታለን እና ቃላትን በመሠረት እና የደኅንነት ስርዓቶች ለማስተምር እናጠጋዋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቱም የቋንቋዊ አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን እና በቋንቋዊው አካባቢ የሚደርስበትን ጥረት ብቻ አይደለም፡፡', 'ca': "La traducció neuromàquina representa un salt emocionant cap endavant en la qualitat de la traducció. Però quines debilitats durant molt de temps resol·la, i quines queden? Afectem aquestes preguntes amb un enfocament definit per desafiar l'evaluació de traducció i l'anàlisi d'errors. Un conjunt de reptes consisteix en un petit conjunt de frases, cada una dissenyada a mà per investigar la capacitat d'un sistema per superar una divergència estructural particular entre les llengües. Per exemplificar aquest enfocament, presentem un conjunt de reptes anglo-francès, i l'utilitzem per analitzar sistemes basats en frases i neurones. L'anàlisi resultant no només proporciona una imatge més fina de les forces dels sistemes neurals, sinó també una idea sobre quins fenomens lingüístics encara no s'aconsegueixen.", 'az': 'Nöral maşın çevirimi tərcümə keyfiyyətində heyecan verici tərcümə göstərir. Amma bu nə qədər uzun zəiflik çəkir və nə də qalar? Biz bu sualları çətinliklərə çevirilən tərzdə və xəta analizi ilə çəkirik. Bir çətinlik qurduğu kiçik cümlələrdən olub, hər bir əl sistemin qabiliyyətini dillərin arasındakı müxtəlif quruluş müxtəlif fərqliyini təsdiqləmək üçün hazırlanmışdır. Bu fikrini örnək etmək üçün, biz İngilizce-Fransız çətinlikləri təyin edirik və fraz sistemini analizə etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Sonuç analizi ancaq nöral sistemlərin güclüyünün ən yaxşı dənəli fotoğrafını təsdiqləyir, ancaq dil göstəricilərinin haradan uzaqlaşılmasını təsdiqləyir.', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad představuje vzrušující skok vpřed v kvalitě překladu. Jaké dlouhodobé slabiny však řeší a které zůstávají? Tyto otázky řešíme pomocí výzvy stanoveného přístupu k hodnocení překladu a analýze chyb. Soubor výzev se skládá z malé sady vět, z nichž každá ruka je navržena tak, aby zkoumala schopnost systému překonat konkrétní strukturální divergenci mezi jazyky. Jako příklad tohoto přístupu představujeme anglicko-francouzskou výzvu, kterou používáme k analýze frázových a neuronových systémů. Výsledná analýza poskytuje nejen jemnější obraz o silných stránkách neuronových systémů, ale také pohled na to, které jazykové jevy zůstávají mimo dosah.', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge on põnev hüpe tõlkekvaliteedis edasi. Kuid milliseid pikaajalisi nõrkusi see lahendab ja millised jäävad alles? Nende küsimuste lahendamiseks kasutame väljakutsetega seotud lähenemisviisi tõlke hindamisele ja veaanalüüsile. Väljakutsekomplekt koosneb väikestest lausetest, mis on mõeldud käsitsi uurima süsteemi suutlikkust ületada konkreetseid struktuurilisi erinevusi keelte vahel. Selle lähenemisviisi näiteks esitame inglise-prantsuse väljakutsete komplekti ning kasutame seda fraasipõhiste ja närvisüsteemide analüüsimiseks. Tulemuse analüüs annab mitte ainult täpsema pildi närvisüsteemide tugevustest, vaid ka ülevaate sellest, millised keelelised nähtused jäävad kättesaamatuks.', 'bs': 'Neuralni prevod mašine predstavlja uzbudljiv skok naprijed u kvaliteti prevoda. A kakve slabosti će se riješiti i ostati? Razgovaramo s tim pitanjima sa izazovom postavljenim pristupom procjeni prevoda i analizi greške. Izazovni set se sastoji od malih set a rečenica, svake ruke dizajnirane za istraživanje kapaciteta sustava za predstavljanje određene strukturne razlike između jezika. Da bi primjerili ovaj pristup, predstavljamo set engleskog-francuskog izazova i koristimo ga za analizu fraze-baziranih i neuralnih sustava. U rezultatnoj analizi pruža ne samo finozorniju sliku snage nervnih sustava, nego i uvid u koje jezičke fenomene ostaju izvan dostupnosti.', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös on jännittävä askel eteenpäin käännöksen laadussa. Mutta mitä pitkäaikaisia heikkouksia se ratkaisee ja mitkä ovat jäljellä? Käsittelemme näitä kysymyksiä haastavalla lähestymistavalla käännösten arviointiin ja virheiden analysointiin. Haastesarja koostuu pienistä lauseista, joista jokainen on suunniteltu käsin tutkimaan järjestelmän kykyä kuroa umpeen tietty rakenteellinen ero kielten välillä. Esimerkkinä tästä lähestymistavasta esittelemme englannin-ranskan haasteen ja käytämme sitä fraasipohjaisten ja hermojärjestelmien analysointiin. Tuloksena oleva analyysi antaa paitsi tarkemman kuvan hermostojärjestelmien vahvuuksista, myös käsityksen siitä, mitkä kielelliset ilmiöt ovat ulottumattomissa.', 'ha': "translation To, mẽne ne zai yi haƙuri a kansa? We address these questions with a challenge set approach to translation evaluation and error analysis.  Kila kansalar ta ƙunsa da matsayin nan kaɗan, ko da hannun aka designe wa ya zama abincin na'urar da ya sami diffdi na'urar da bakin ayuka. To, dõmin misali wannan hanyarwa, muna halatar da wani na'urar-faransa na Ingiriya-Faransa, kuma munã amfani da shi dõmin ya yi analyza a kan salon da na'urar-na'ura. Ana ƙarshen ta ba da wani suro mai kyau kawai na sami da ƙarfin na'ura na'urar neura, kuma yana fahimta a inda abubuwa na lugha na tsare ta.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Nanging, opo sing paling langkung apa ora bisa ditambah, lan mungkin ora bisa ? Awak dhéwé pisan iki karo perbudhakan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo kelikno tarjamahan karo kalih kanggo terjamahan Wis Ngawe ngerawak dhéwé ngerti diangkat iki, kita mulai perbudhakan Inggris-Perancis kuwi nggawe lan ijol-ijol kuwi nggunakake sistem sing bisa basa gambaran karo sistem Neral. Ndahli dipoleh sing beraksi kuwi nggawe larang langkung penting bisa nggawe sistem sing nggawe gerakan, dadi mau piye mbelanga sing paling maneh sing paling maneh.', 'he': "התרגום של מכונות נוירות מייצג קפיצה מרגשת קדימה באיכות התרגום. אבל אילו חולשות ארוכות זה פותר, ואיזה נשאר? אנו מתייחסים לשאלות האלה עם גישה קבועה באתגר לערכת התרגום וניתוח שגיאות. A challenge set consists of a small set of sentences, each hand-designed to probe a system's capacity to bridge a particular structural divergence between languages.  כדי להדגים את הגישה הזו, אנו מציגים קבוצת אתגרים אנגלי-צרפתית, ולהשתמש בה כדי לנתח מערכות מבוססות ביטויים ומערכות עצביות. הניתוח הנוצא מספק לא רק תמונה מעודפת יותר של כוחות מערכות עצביות, אלא גם תובנה לאיזה תופעות שפתיים נשארות מחוץ לשיטה.", 'sk': 'Nevralno strojno prevajanje predstavlja vznemirljiv korak naprej pri kakovosti prevajanja. Toda katere dolgoletne slabosti odpravlja in katere ostajajo? Ta vprašanja obravnavamo z izzivom postavljenim pristopom k ocenjevanju prevodov in analizi napak. Sklop izzivov je sestavljen iz majhnega sklopa stavkov, vsak ročno oblikovan tako, da preuči sposobnost sistema za premostitev določene strukturne razlike med jeziki. Za primer tega pristopa predstavljamo angleško-francoski nabor izzivov, ki ga uporabljamo za analizo fraznih in nevronskih sistemov. Rezultatna analiza ne daje le natančnejše slike prednosti nevronskih sistemov, temveč tudi vpogled v to, kateri jezikovni pojavi ostajajo nedosegljivi.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་སྒྱུར་བརྗོད་ནི་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་ནང་དུ་ཧ་ཅང་གཏོང་གཏོང་མཁན་ལུ་ཡོད་པ འོན་ཀྱང་། རྒྱུན་རིང་བའི་ཞན་ཆ་གང་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནམ།དེ་ལས་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་འདི་དག་ལ་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག གདོང་ལེན་བཀོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཆ་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཡོད་པ་རེ་རེ་བ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་འབད་ནི་ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ན། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གནད་ཅིག་སྒྲིག དབྱངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དེ་ནི་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་གཅིག་ལས་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་མིན་པར།'}
{'en': 'Knowledge Distillation for Bilingual Dictionary Induction', 'ar': 'تقطير المعرفة لتحريض القاموس ثنائي اللغة', 'fr': "Distillation des connaissances pour l'introduction d'un", 'es': 'Destilación del conocimiento para la inducción del diccionario biling', 'pt': 'Destilação de Conhecimento para Indução de Dicionário Bilíngue', 'ja': 'バイリンガル辞書紹介のための知識蒸留', 'zh': '双语词典归纳知识提炼', 'hi': 'द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण के लिए ज्ञान आसवन', 'ru': 'Дистилляция знаний для введения в двуязычный словарь', 'ga': 'Driogadh Eolais d’Ionduchtú Foclóir Dátheangach', 'el': 'Αποστάγωση γνώσης για επαγωγή δίγλωσσου λεξικού', 'hu': 'Tudás desztilláció a kétnyelvű szótár indukciójához', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Distillazione della conoscenza per induzione del dizionario bilingue', 'kk': 'Қосымша сөздік индукциясының білім бөлімі', 'lt': 'Žinių distiliacija dvikalbio žodyno gamybai', 'mk': 'Distillation of Knowledge for Bilingual Dictionary Induction', 'ms': 'Distillasi Pengetahuan untuk Induksi Kamus Bilingual', 'ml': 'ബിലിങ്കുള്ള നിഘണ്ടുനിര്\u200dണ്ണയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി അറിവ് ഡിസ്ട്രിലേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Knowledge Distillation for Bilingual Dictionary Induction', 'mn': 'Хоёрдугаар бичиг зохиолын мэдлэг халдвар', 'pl': 'Destylacja wiedzy dla indukcji dwujęzycznego słownika', 'ro': 'Distilarea cunoștințelor pentru inducția dicționarului bilingv', 'sr': 'Distilacija znanja za objektivni dizajner', 'si': 'Bilingual ශබ්ධකාරිය අන්තිරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දැනගන්න විශාලනය', 'so': 'Qaybinta aqoonta ee muuqashada luqada luuqadaha', 'sv': 'Kunskapsdestillation för tvåspråkig ordbok Induktion', 'no': 'Kjentenstillinga for bølgjande ordbokinduksjon', 'ta': 'பில்லிங்கல் அகராதி செயலுக்கான அறிவு விளிம்பு', 'ur': 'Bilingual Dictionary Induction کے لئے علم Distillation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự phân tách ngôn ngữ', 'nl': 'Kennisdestillatie voor tweetalige woordenboek Inductie', 'bg': 'Дестилация на знанието за индукция на двуезичен речник', 'da': 'Vidensdestillation til induktion af tosproget ordbog', 'hr': 'Distilacija znanja za objektivni dizajner', 'ko': '이중 언어 사전 귀납적 지식 추출', 'de': 'Wissensdestillation für zweisprachige Wörterbuchinduktion', 'fa': 'تغییر دانش برای تغییر دستورالعمل دوگانه', 'sw': 'Tofauti ya maarifa kwa ajili ya ujenzi wa Lugha za Kiingereza', 'tr': 'Bilgi Namaýyşçysy', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Գիտության դիստիլացիան երկլեզու բառարանի արտադրման համար', 'id': 'Distillasi pengetahuan untuk Induksi Kamus Bilingual', 'az': 'Bilim Sözlük Induksyonu', 'bn': 'বালিভাষী অভিধান নির্মাণের জন্য জ্ঞান ডিস্টিলেশন', 'ca': "Distillació del coneixement per a l'inducció del diccionari bilingüe", 'bs': 'Distilacija znanja za objektivni dizajner', 'sq': 'Distillimi i njohurive për induksionin e fjalëkalimit dygjuhësor', 'cs': 'Destilace znalostí pro indukci dvojjazyčného slovníku', 'et': 'Teadmiste destillatsioon kahekeelse sõnaraamatu induktsiooni jaoks', 'fi': 'Tiedon tislaus kaksikielisen sanakirjan induktiota varten', 'jv': 'Distilkasyon Bilingual Diwurung Bukak', 'sk': 'Destilacija znanja za indukcijo dvojezičnega slovarja', 'he': 'דיסטילציה מידע לייצור מילון משולש', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Bilingual Dictionary Induction for Knowledge Distillation for Bilingual Dictionary Induction'}
{'en': 'Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction. However, methods using this approach have not yet achieved high accuracy on the task. In this paper, we propose a bridging approach, where our main contribution is a knowledge distillation training objective. As teachers, rich resource translation paths are exploited in this role. And as learners, translation paths involving low resource languages learn from the teachers. Our training objective allows seamless addition of teacher translation paths for any given low resource pair. Since our approach relies on the quality of monolingual word embeddings, we also propose to enhance vector representations of both the source and target language with linguistic information. Our experiments on various languages show large performance gains from our distillation training objective, obtaining as high as 17 % accuracy improvements.', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من التعلم بدون طلقة لتعلم وظائف رسم الخرائط بين مسافات متجه للغات مختلفة هو نهج واعد لتحريض القاموس ثنائي اللغة. ومع ذلك ، فإن الطرق التي تستخدم هذا النهج لم تحقق بعد دقة عالية في المهمة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا تجسيرًا ، حيث تكون مساهمتنا الرئيسية هي هدف تدريب تقطير المعرفة. كمعلمين ، يتم استغلال مسارات ترجمة الموارد الغنية في هذا الدور. وكمتعلمين ، تتعلم مسارات الترجمة التي تتضمن لغات قليلة الموارد من المعلمين. يسمح هدفنا التدريبي بإضافة مسارات ترجمة للمعلمين بشكل سلس لأي زوج من الموارد منخفضة الموارد. نظرًا لأن نهجنا يعتمد على جودة حفلات الزفاف أحادية اللغة ، فإننا نقترح أيضًا تعزيز تمثيلات المتجهات لكل من اللغة المصدر واللغة الهدف بالمعلومات اللغوية. تُظهر تجاربنا على لغات مختلفة مكاسب كبيرة في الأداء من هدف التدريب على التقطير ، حيث حصلت على تحسينات تصل إلى 17٪ في الدقة.', 'fr': "L'utilisation de l'apprentissage zero-shot pour apprendre les fonctions de mappage entre les espaces vectoriels de différentes langues est une approche prometteuse pour l'introduction de dictionnaires bilingues. Cependant, les méthodes utilisant cette approche n'ont pas encore atteint une grande précision sur la tâche. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche de transition, où notre principale contribution est un objectif de formation à la distillation des connaissances. En tant qu'enseignants, les parcours de traduction riches en ressources sont exploités dans ce rôle. En tant qu'apprenants, les parcours de traduction impliquant des langues à faibles ressources apprennent auprès des enseignants. Notre objectif de formation permet l'ajout transparent de parcours de traduction pour les enseignants pour chaque paire de ressources faibles. Puisque notre approche repose sur la qualité de l'intégration de mots monolingues, nous proposons également d'améliorer les représentations vectorielles de la langue source et de la langue cible avec des informations linguistiques. Nos expériences sur différents langages montrent des gains de performance importants par rapport à notre objectif de formation à la distillation, obtenant des améliorations de précision allant jusqu'à 17\xa0%.", 'es': 'Aprovechar el aprendizaje de tiro cero para aprender las funciones de mapeo entre espacios vectoriales de diferentes idiomas es un enfoque prometedor para la inducción de diccionarios bilingües. Sin embargo, los métodos que utilizan este enfoque aún no han logrado una alta precisión en la tarea. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque puente, en el que nuestra principal contribución es un objetivo de formación para la destilación del conocimiento. Como profesores, en esta función se aprovechan las rutas de traducción de recursos enriquecidos. Y como estudiantes, las rutas de traducción que involucran idiomas de escasos recursos aprenden de los profesores. Nuestro objetivo de formación permite añadir sin problemas las rutas de traducción de los profesores para cualquier par dado de escasos recursos. Dado que nuestro enfoque se basa en la calidad de la incrustación de palabras monolingües, también proponemos mejorar las representaciones vectoriales del idioma de origen y de destino con información lingüística. Nuestros experimentos en varios idiomas muestran grandes mejoras en el rendimiento de nuestro objetivo de capacitación en destilación, obteniendo mejoras de precisión de hasta un 17%.', 'pt': 'Aproveitar o aprendizado de tiro zero para aprender funções de mapeamento entre espaços vetoriais de diferentes idiomas é uma abordagem promissora para a indução de dicionário bilíngue. No entanto, os métodos que utilizam essa abordagem ainda não alcançaram alta precisão na tarefa. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem de ponte, onde nossa principal contribuição é um objetivo de treinamento de destilação de conhecimento. Como professores, caminhos de tradução de recursos ricos são explorados nesta função. E como aprendizes, os caminhos de tradução que envolvem idiomas com poucos recursos aprendem com os professores. Nosso objetivo de treinamento permite a adição perfeita de caminhos de tradução de professores para qualquer par de recursos baixos. Como nossa abordagem se baseia na qualidade das incorporações de palavras monolíngues, também propomos aprimorar as representações vetoriais do idioma de origem e do idioma de destino com informações linguísticas. Nossos experimentos em vários idiomas mostram grandes ganhos de desempenho de nosso objetivo de treinamento de destilação, obtendo melhorias de precisão de até 17%.', 'ja': 'ゼロショット学習を活用して、異なる言語のベクトル空間間のマッピング関数を学習することは、バイリンガル辞書誘導の有望なアプローチです。しかしながら、このアプローチを用いた方法は、タスクでの高精度をまだ達成していない。本稿では、知識蒸留訓練目標を主な貢献とするブリッジアプローチを提案する。教師として、豊富なリソース翻訳パスがこの役割で活用されています。そして学習者として、低資源言語に関わる翻訳経路は教師から学ぶ。当社のトレーニング目標では、特定の低リソースペアに教師の翻訳パスをシームレスに追加できます。私たちのアプローチは単一言語の単語埋め込みの品質に依存しているため、言語情報でソース言語とターゲット言語の両方のベクトル表現を強化することも提案します。さまざまな言語での実験では、蒸留トレーニングの目標から大きなパフォーマンスの向上が見られ、最大17%の精度向上が得られます。', 'zh': '因零镜头学以学异言者向量空中映射函数双语词典归之有道也。 然用此术未高精度。 本文有桥接法,贡献知培训趣。 为师者,富资译路于此角色。 为学者,涉低资源语译径受业于师。 吾培训许为一切给定低资源无缝添师译路。 吾道赖单语词嵌之质,又议以语言增强源言语向量。 百言之实验,蒸馏练致大,准确性崇17%', 'hi': 'विभिन्न भाषाओं के वेक्टर रिक्त स्थान के बीच मैपिंग कार्यों को सीखने के लिए शून्य-शॉट सीखने का लाभ उठाना द्विभाषी शब्दकोश प्रेरण के लिए एक आशाजनक दृष्टिकोण है। हालांकि, इस दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करने वाली विधियों ने अभी तक कार्य पर उच्च सटीकता हासिल नहीं की है। इस पेपर में, हम एक ब्रिजिंग दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जहां हमारा मुख्य योगदान एक ज्ञान आसवन प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य है। शिक्षकों के रूप में, इस भूमिका में समृद्ध संसाधन अनुवाद पथ का शोषण किया जाता है। और शिक्षार्थियों के रूप में, कम संसाधन भाषाओं को शामिल करने वाले अनुवाद पथ शिक्षकों से सीखते हैं। हमारे प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य किसी भी दिए गए कम संसाधन जोड़ी के लिए शिक्षक अनुवाद पथ के निर्बाध अतिरिक्त की अनुमति देता है। चूंकि हमारा दृष्टिकोण मोनोलिंगुअल शब्द एम्बेडिंग की गुणवत्ता पर निर्भर करता है, इसलिए हम भाषाई जानकारी के साथ स्रोत और लक्ष्य भाषा दोनों के वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व को बढ़ाने का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विभिन्न भाषाओं पर हमारे प्रयोगहमारे आसवन प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य से बड़े प्रदर्शन लाभ दिखाते हैं, 17% सटीकता सुधार के रूप में उच्च प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Использование обучения с нулевым выстрелом для изучения функций отображения между векторными пространствами различных языков является перспективным подходом к индукции двуязычного словаря. Однако методы, использующие этот подход, еще не достигли высокой точности в поставленной задаче. В этой статье мы предлагаем переходный подход, где нашим основным вкладом является цель обучения дистилляции знаний. Как учителя, богатые пути перевода ресурсов эксплуатируются в этой роли. И как учащиеся, пути перевода с использованием языков с низким уровнем ресурсов учатся у учителей. Наша цель обучения позволяет беспрепятственно добавлять пути перевода учителя для любой пары с низким уровнем ресурсов. Поскольку наш подход опирается на качество вложений одноязычных слов, мы также предлагаем усилить векторные представления как исходного, так и целевого языка лингвистической информацией. Наши эксперименты на различных языках показывают большой рост производительности от нашей цели обучения дистилляции, получая повышение точности на 17%.', 'ga': 'Is cur chuige a bhfuil gealladh fúthu maidir le hionduchtú foclóir dátheangach a ghiaráil chun feidhmeanna mapála a fhoghlaim idir spásanna veicteoirí de theangacha éagsúla. Mar sin féin, níl ardchruinneas bainte amach go fóill ag modhanna a úsáideann an cur chuige seo sa tasc. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige idirlinne, agus is é an príomh-rannchuidiú atá againn ná cuspóir oiliúna driogtha eolais. Mar mhúinteoirí, baintear leas as bealaí saibhre aistriúcháin acmhainne sa ról seo. Agus mar fhoghlaimeoirí, foghlaimíonn na múinteoirí bealaí aistriúcháin a bhaineann le teangacha íseal-acmhainne. Ligeann ár gcuspóir oiliúna bealaí aistriúcháin múinteoirí a chur leis gan uaim d’aon phéire acmhainní ísle. Ós rud é go mbraitheann ár gcur chuige ar cháilíocht leabaithe focal aonteangacha, tá sé beartaithe againn freisin léiriúcháin veicteoireach den fhoinse agus den sprioctheanga a fheabhsú le faisnéis teanga. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar theangacha éagsúla gnóthachain feidhmíochta móra ónár gcuspóir oiliúna driogtha, ag baint amach feabhsuithe cruinnis chomh hard le 17%.', 'ka': '0-სტრიქტის სწავლება, რომელიც განსხვავებული ენების განსხვავებული გვქტორის შორის მარტივის ფუნქციების მარტივის შესწავლობა, არის ორიენგური სიტუნქტის ინდიქციის გა მაგრამ ამ პროგრამის გამოყენებაში მეტი უკვე უფრო დიდი წარმოდგენა. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მინდომებით წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინეთ, სადაც ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგინეთ უცნობების განსწავლების მიზ როგორც მასწავლებელი, ბედნიერი რესურსების გარგზავნა გზები ამ პროლეში იქნება. და როგორც მესწავლებელი, შეცვლელების სარგუნო გეზები, რომლებიც მასწავლებელიდან გასწავლებელია. ჩვენი სწავლების მიზეზი უფრო მუშაობელი დამატება სწავლებელი დამატებას ყველა მიზეზი რესურსების დამატება. ჩვენი წარმოდგენა მონოლენგური სიტყვის კოლეტურაზე დარწმუნდება, ჩვენ ასევე გვეუნდებით, რომ ვიზრუნოთ გვეკტორის გამოსახულებების გამოსახულება, რომლებიც სიტყვის ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები განსხვავებული ენაში ჩვენი განსხვავებული განსწავლების მიღება დისტალაციის განსწავლების მიღება, რომლებიც 17% უფრო დისტალაციის განსწავლება.', 'el': 'Η αξιοποίηση της μάθησης μηδενικού πυροβολισμού για την εκμάθηση λειτουργιών χαρτογράφησης μεταξύ διανυσματικών χώρων διαφορετικών γλωσσών είναι μια ελπιδοφόρα προσέγγιση για την επαγωγή δίγλωσσων λεξικών. Ωστόσο, οι μέθοδοι που χρησιμοποιούν αυτή την προσέγγιση δεν έχουν επιτύχει ακόμη υψηλή ακρίβεια στο έργο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση γεφυρώματος, όπου η κύρια συμβολή μας είναι ένας στόχος εκπαίδευσης απόσταξης γνώσης. Ως δάσκαλοι, οι πλούσιες διαδρομές μετάφρασης πόρων αξιοποιούνται σε αυτόν τον ρόλο. Και ως μαθητές, οι μεταφραστικές διαδρομές που περιλαμβάνουν γλώσσες χαμηλού δυναμικού μαθαίνουν από τους εκπαιδευτικούς. Ο εκπαιδευτικός μας στόχος επιτρέπει την απρόσκοπτη προσθήκη μεταφραστικών διαδρομών για κάθε δεδομένο ζευγάρι χαμηλών πόρων. Δεδομένου ότι η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στην ποιότητα των μονογλωσσών ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, προτείνουμε επίσης να ενισχυθούν οι διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις τόσο της γλώσσας προέλευσης όσο και της γλώσσας στόχου με γλωσσικές πληροφορίες. Τα πειράματά μας σε διάφορες γλώσσες δείχνουν μεγάλα κέρδη απόδοσης από τον εκπαιδευτικό μας στόχο απόσταξης, επιτυγχάνοντας βελτιώσεις ακρίβειας έως 17% έως και.', 'hu': 'A nulla lövéses tanulás kihasználása a különböző nyelvek vektorterei közötti térképezési funkciók megtanulására ígéretes megközelítés a kétnyelvű szótár indukciójának. Az ilyen megközelítést alkalmazó módszerek azonban még nem értek el nagy pontosságot a feladatban. Ebben a tanulmányban egy áthidaló megközelítést javasolunk, ahol a fő hozzájárulásunk a tudás desztillációs képzés célja. Tanárként ebben a szerepben gazdag erőforrások fordítási útvonalakat használnak ki. Tanulóként pedig az alacsony erőforrású nyelveket magában foglaló fordítási útvonalak tanulnak a tanároktól. Képzési célunk lehetővé teszi a tanári fordítási útvonalak zökkenőmentes hozzáadását minden adott alacsony erőforrás-párhoz. Mivel megközelítésünk az egynyelvű szóbeágyazások minőségére támaszkodik, javasoljuk a forrás- és célnyelv vektoros reprezentációjának javítását nyelvi információkkal. A különböző nyelveken végzett kísérleteink jelentős teljesítménynövekedést mutatnak a desztillációs tréning célkitűzéseinkből, és akár 17%-os pontossági javulást is elérnek.', 'it': "Sfruttare l'apprendimento zero-shot per imparare le funzioni di mappatura tra spazi vettoriali di lingue diverse è un approccio promettente all'induzione bilingue del dizionario. Tuttavia, i metodi che utilizzano questo approccio non hanno ancora raggiunto un'elevata precisione nel compito. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio bridging, in cui il nostro contributo principale è un obiettivo di formazione sulla distillazione della conoscenza. Come insegnanti, in questo ruolo vengono sfruttati percorsi di traduzione ricchi di risorse. E come studenti, i percorsi di traduzione che coinvolgono lingue a basso contenuto di risorse imparano dagli insegnanti. Il nostro obiettivo formativo consente l'aggiunta senza soluzione di continuità di percorsi di traduzione degli insegnanti per qualsiasi coppia di risorse basse. Poiché il nostro approccio si basa sulla qualità delle incorporazioni monolingue di parole, proponiamo anche di migliorare le rappresentazioni vettoriali sia della lingua di origine che di destinazione con informazioni linguistiche. I nostri esperimenti su varie lingue mostrano grandi guadagni di performance dal nostro obiettivo di formazione sulla distillazione, ottenendo fino al 17% di miglioramenti di precisione.", 'mk': 'Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction.  Сепак, методите кои го користат овој пристап сé уште не постигнаа висока прецизност во врска со задачата. Во овој документ предложуваме преместувачки пристап, каде што нашиот главен придонес е цел на обука за дистилација на знаење. Како професори, богатите патишта за превод на ресурси се искористени во оваа улога. Како ученици, патиштата за превод вклучувајќи ниски ресурси учат од учителите. Нашата обукова цел овозможува безглупаво додавање на патиштата за превод на учителите за секој даден пар ниски ресурси. Бидејќи нашиот пристап се зависи од квалитетот на монојазичните зборови вградени, ние, исто така, предлагаме подобрување на векторните претставувања на изворот и на јазикот на целта со јазични информации. Нашите експерименти на различни јазици покажуваат големи придобивки од нашата цел на обука за дестилација, добивајќи до 17 отсто подобрувања во точноста.', 'lt': 'Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction.  Tačiau metodai, taikantys šį metodą, dar nepasiekė didelio tikslumo užduotyje. Šiame dokumente siūlome pereinamąjį požiūrį, kuriame pagrindinis mūsų indėlis yra žinių distiliavimo mokymo tikslas. Tokiu vaidmeniu mokytojai naudojasi turtingais vertimo ištekliais būdais. Ir kaip mokytojai, vertimo keliai, kuriuose dalyvauja mažai išteklių turinčios kalbos, mokosi iš mokytojų. Mūsų mokymo tikslas leidžia nenutrūkstamai papildyti mokytojų vertimo keliais bet kuriai mažai išteklių turinčiai porai. Kadangi mūsų požiūris grindžiamas vienakalbių žodžių įterpimo kokybe, mes taip pat siūlome sustiprinti tiek šaltinio, tiek tikslinės kalbos, kuriose pateikiama kalbinė informacija, atstovavimą vektoriams. Mūsų eksperimentai įvairiomis kalbomis rodo didelį našumą įgyvendinant mūsų distiliavimo mokymo tikslą, siekdami iki 17 % tikslumo pagerinimo.', 'ms': 'Mengangkat pembelajaran tembakan sifar untuk belajar fungsi pemetaan antara ruang vektor bahasa berbeza adalah pendekatan yang berjanji untuk induksi kamus dua bahasa. Namun, kaedah menggunakan pendekatan ini belum mencapai ketepatan tinggi pada tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan penutup, di mana kontribusi utama kami adalah tujuan latihan pengetahuan. Sebagai guru, laluan terjemahan sumber kaya dieksploitasi dalam peran ini. Dan sebagai pelajar, laluan terjemahan yang melibatkan bahasa sumber rendah belajar dari guru. Objektif latihan kami membolehkan tambahan terus-menerus laluan terjemahan guru untuk setiap pasangan sumber rendah yang diberikan. Oleh kerana pendekatan kita bergantung pada kualiti penyambungan perkataan monobahasa, kita juga melamar untuk meningkatkan perwakilan vektor dari sumber dan bahasa sasaran dengan maklumat bahasa. Our experiments on various languages show large performance gains from our distillation training objective, obtaining as high as 17% accuracy improvements.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിന്റുകള്\u200d എന്നാലും ഈ നടപടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d വളരെ കൃത്യമായിട്ടില്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങ് വഴിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട ടീച്ചര്\u200d ആയിരുന്നു സമ്പന്നര്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d ഈ ഭാഗത്ത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പഠിക്കുന്നവരെപ്പോലെ, കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d. Our training objective allows seamless addition of teacher translation paths for any given low resource pair.  നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം മോനോളില്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഗുണമായി ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതുകൊണ്ട്, വെക്റ്ററിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളും ഭാഷ വിവരങ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ ഫല', 'mt': 'Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction.  Madankollu, il-metodi li jużaw dan l-approċċ għadhom ma kisbux preċiżjoni għolja dwar il-kompitu. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ta’ pont, fejn il-kontribut ewlieni tagħna huwa għan ta’ taħriġ dwar id-distillazzjoni tal-għarfien. Bħala għalliema, f’dan ir-rwol jiġu sfruttati rotot ta’ traduzzjoni tar-riżorsi rikki. U bħala studenti, il-mogħdijiet ta’ traduzzjoni li jinvolvu lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi jitgħallmu mill-għalliema. L-għan tat-taħriġ tagħna jippermetti ż-żieda bla xkiel ta’ rotot ta’ traduzzjoni tal-għalliema għal kwalunkwe par ta’ riżorsi baxxi partikolari. Billi l-approċċ tagħna jiddependi fuq il-kwalità tal-inkorporazzjonijiet monolingwi tal-kliem, qed nipproponu wkoll li jissaħħu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi kemm tas-sors kif ukoll tal-lingwa fil-mira bl-informazzjoni lingwistika. Our experiments on various languages show large performance gains from our distillation training objective, obtaining as high as 17% accuracy improvements.', 'kk': 'Басқа тілдердің вектор бос орындарының арасындағы картаптау функцияларын оқыту үшін нөл- сүрлі оқыту - екі тіл сөздік индукциясының арқылы үміттелген жа Бірақ бұл тәсілді қолданатын әдістер тапсырманың дұрыстығын білмейді. Бұл қағазда біз көмектесу тәртібін таңдаймыз. Біздің негізгі көмектесіміз білім бөлімінің оқыту мақсаты. Мұғалімдер болса, ресурстарды аудару жолдары осы рөлінде қолданылады. Оқытушылар болса, мұғалімдерден төмен ресурс тілдерін оқыту жолдары. Біздің оқыту мақсатымыз мұғалім аудару жолдарын кез-келген төмен ресурстар екеуіне қосуға мүмкіндік береді. Біздің тәсіліміз монолингілік сөздерді ендіру сапасына тәуелді, сондай-ақ біз лингвистикалық мәліметтермен көзі мен мақсатты тілдердің вектордың түсініктерін жақсарту үші Әртүрлі тілдер туралы тәжірибелеріміз біздің дистриляциялау оқыту мақсатымыздан, 17% деген дұрыс жақсартылығының жетілдігін көрсетеді.', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie zero-shot learning do nauki funkcji mapowania między przestrzeniami wektorowymi różnych języków jest obiecującym podejściem do indukcji dwujęzycznego słownika. Jednak metody stosujące to podejście nie osiągnęły jeszcze wysokiej dokładności w realizacji zadania. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy podejście mostowe, w którym naszym głównym wkładem jest szkolenie destylacji wiedzy. Jako nauczyciele, bogate ścieżki tłumaczenia zasobów są wykorzystywane w tej roli. A jako uczący się, ścieżki tłumaczeniowe obejmujące niskie zasoby języków uczą się od nauczycieli. Nasz cel szkoleniowy umożliwia bezproblemowe dodawanie ścieżek tłumaczenia nauczycieli dla każdej danej pary niskich zasobów. Ponieważ nasze podejście opiera się na jakości jednojęzycznych osadzeń słów, proponujemy również wzmocnienie wektorowych reprezentacji języka źródłowego i docelowego o informacje językowe. Nasze eksperymenty na różnych językach pokazują duży wzrost wydajności dzięki naszemu celowi szkoleniowemu destylacji, uzyskując nawet 17% poprawy dokładności.', 'mn': 'Зуун зураг суралцах нь өөр хэл болон вектор орон зайн хоорондын газрын зураг суралцах зүйл бол хоёр хэл хэлний бичиг үйлдвэрлэх арга юм. Гэхдээ энэ аргыг ашиглах арга нь ажил дээр өндөр тодорхойлолтой байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хамгийн гол зорилго нь мэдлэг сайжруулах сургалтын зорилго юм. Багш нарын хувьд баян боловсролын хөрөнгө оруулалтын зам нь энэ үүрэгт хэрэглэгддэг. Сурагчдын хувьд багш нараас суралцах бага баялаг хэлний оролцооны зам юм. Бидний сургалтын зорилго багш нарын хөрөнгө оруулах замыг багасгал хөрөнгө оруулах боломжтой болгодог. Бидний ойлголт нь нэг хэл хэлний хэлний нэвтрүүлэлтийн чанарын тулд хамааралтай болсон учраас бид мөн хэлний мэдээллээр эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой хэлний хувилбарыг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой болно. Бидний олон хэл дээрх туршилтууд бидний тархалтын дасгал хөгжүүлэх зорилгоос 17% зөв сайжруулалт гарч ирдэг.', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktig læring av nullsatt for å lære karteringsfunksjonar mellom vektormellomrom av ulike språk er ein promessant tilnærming til induksjon av bilinguelt ordbok. Men metodar som brukar denne tilnærminga har enno ikkje oppnådd høg nøyaktig på oppgåva. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein brytingstilnærming, der vår hovudbidrag er eit opplæringsmål for kunnskap. Som lærarar, er råge ressursomsetjingslinjene eksplodert i denne rolen. Og som lærarar, lærer omsetjingstigar som involverer låge ressursspråk frå lærarane. Målet vårt opplæring tillèt å leggja til læringsomsetjingslinjene for alle oppgjevne låge ressurspar. Sidan tilnærminga vår er avhengig av kvaliteten på monospråk innbygging, foreslår vi også å å forbetra vektorrepresentasjonar av både kjeldespråket og målspråket med språk. Eksperimentane våre på forskjellige språk viser stor utvikling frå målet vårt destilasjonstrening, og får så høg som 17% nøyaktig forbedringar.', 'ro': 'Utilizarea învățării zero-shot pentru a învăța funcții de cartografiere între spațiile vectoriale ale diferitelor limbi este o abordare promițătoare a inducției dicționarului bilingv. Cu toate acestea, metodele care utilizează această abordare nu au obținut încă o precizie ridicată a sarcinii. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare de punte, în care contribuția noastră principală este un obiectiv de instruire în distilarea cunoștințelor. În calitate de profesori, căile bogate de traducere a resurselor sunt exploatate în acest rol. În calitate de elevi, traseele de traducere care implică limbi cu resurse reduse învață de la profesori. Obiectivul nostru de formare permite adăugarea perfectă a căilor de traducere a profesorilor pentru orice pereche de resurse reduse. Deoarece abordarea noastră se bazează pe calitatea încorporărilor monolingve de cuvinte, propunem, de asemenea, să îmbunătățim reprezentările vectoriale atât ale limbii sursă, cât și ale limbii țintă cu informații lingvistice. Experimentele noastre pe diferite limbi arată câștiguri mari de performanță în urma obiectivului nostru de instruire în distilare, obținând îmbunătățiri de precizie de până la 17%.', 'sr': 'Uèinjenje od nulog snimka da nauèi mapiranje funkcija izmeðu vektorskih prostora razlièitih jezika je obeæavajuæi pristup indukciji dvojezičkog rečnika. Međutim, metode korištenja ovog pristupa još nisu postigle visoke tačnosti na zadatku. U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup mostovanja, gdje je naš glavni doprinos cilj obuke znanja destilacije. Kao nastavnici, bogati putevi prevoda resursa su iskorišteni u ovoj ulozi. I kao učenici, putevi prevođenja uključujući jezike niskih resursa uče od učitelja. Naš cilj treninga omogućava beznačajno dodavanje puteva predavanja učitelja za bilo koji mali par resursa. Budući da se naš pristup oslanja na kvalitetu integracije monojezičkih reči, takođe predlažemo da poboljšamo predstavljanja vektora izvora i ciljnog jezika sa jezičkim informacijama. Naši eksperimenti na različitim jezicima pokazuju velike dobitke učinka iz našeg cilja obuke destilacije, dobivajući najviše od 17% poboljšanja tačnosti.', 'si': 'වෙනස් භාෂාවන්ගේ වෙක්ටර් ස්ථානයක් අතර ඉගෙන ගන්න ශූන්ය ශෝන්තියක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දුවන්ත භ නමුත්, මේ විදියට භාවිතා කරන විදියට තවමත් මේ වැඩේ හොඳ සැකසුම් ලැබුනේ නෑ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ දන්නවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ගුරුවන් වලින්, ප්\u200dරශ්ණ සම්පූර්ණ පරිවර්තනය විදිහට මේ භාවිතාවයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනව ඉගෙනගන්න පුද්ගලිකාරයෙක් විදියට අනුවාදන ක්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂාවක් අඩුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න. අපේ ප්\u200dරධානය අරමුණ අවධානය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ගුරුත්තර අවශ්\u200dය වාර්තාව අවශ්\u200dය අපේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් එක භාෂාවික වචන සම්බන්ධයක් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය වෙනුවෙන් අපි භාෂාවික තොරතුරු සමග වෙක්ට අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විවිධ භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉලක්ෂණයෙන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප', 'so': "Baritaanka barashada nuurka ah ee barashada kartooyinka oo u dhexeeya goobaha luuqadaha kala duduwan ee vector waa qaab ballan ah oo u baahan karta labada luqadood. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, qaababka isticmaalka qaababkan weli ma gaadhin saxda aad u weyn ee shaqada. In this paper, we propose a bridging approach, where our main contribution is a knowledge distillation training objective.  Sida macallimiin, jidadka turjumidda taajirka ah waxaa lagu isticmaalaa qaybtan. Sida ay wax u bartaan, waxay macallimiinta ka bartaan wadooyin turjuman oo ku saabsan luqadaha hoose ee noocyada badan. Waqtigayaga waxbarashadu waxay leedahay in lagu daro waddooyinka turjumidda macallinka oo aan xad lahayn lagu daro labada nooc oo noocyo yar. Sida darteed dhaqdhaqaalahayagu waxay ku xiran tahay tayada hadalka afka ah ee muuqashada, waxaynu sidoo kale soo jeedaynaa in horumarinta qaabilaadda wadanka iyo luqadda ku qoran macluumaadka luuqadaha. Imtixaanadayada luuqadaha kala duduwan waxay muujiyaan faa'iidooyin faro badan oo ku saabsan hagitaankeena waxbarashada kala duduwan, waxayna kordhaan koritaanka saxda ah 17% oo saxda ah.", 'sv': 'Att utnyttja noll-skott lärande för att lära sig kartläggningsfunktioner mellan vektorutrymmen i olika språk är ett lovande tillvägagångssätt för tvåspråkig ordbok induktion. Metoder som använder detta tillvägagångssätt har dock ännu inte uppnått hög noggrannhet i uppgiften. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett överbryggande tillvägagångssätt, där vårt huvudsakliga bidrag är ett kunskapsdestillationsutbildningsmål. Som lärare utnyttjas rika resursöversättningsvägar i denna roll. Och som elever lär sig översättningsvägar med lågresursspråk av lärarna. Vårt utbildningsmål möjliggör sömlöst tillägg av läraröversättningsvägar för ett givet par med låga resurser. Eftersom vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på kvaliteten på enspråkiga ordinbäddningar föreslår vi också att förbättra vektorrepresentationer av både käll- och målspråket med språklig information. Våra experiment på olika språk visar stora prestationsvinster från vårt mål för destillationsträning, vilket ger så höga som 17% noggrannhetsförbättringar.', 'ta': 'வெக்டர் வெக்டார் இடைவெளிகளில் உள்ள வரைப்படம் செயல்பாடுகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள பூஜ்ஜியமாக்குவது இரு மொழி அகராதி செயல்பாடுகளுக்க ஆனால், இந்த வழிமுறையை பயன்படுத்தும் முறைகள் பணியில் அதிக சரியாக அடையவில்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பிரிட்டிங் செயல்பாடு, எங்கள் முக்கிய பங்கீடு ஒரு அறிவு பிரிப்பு பயிற்சி காட் ஆசிரியர்களாக, வளர்ந்த மொழிமாற்றி பாதைகள் இந்த பங்கில் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகின்றன. கற்றுக்கொள்பவர்களாக, குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளை பற்றி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பாதைகள் ஆசிரியர்களிடம் இருந்து  எங்கள் பயிற்சி பொருள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட எந்த குறைந்த வளங்கள் ஜோடிக்கும் ஆசிரியர் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பாதைகளை க எங்கள் அணுக்கம் மொழியில் உள்ள சொல்லின் தரம் சார்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் போது, நாங்கள் மூலத்தின் பிரதிநிதிகளை மேலும் மொழியின் இலக பல மொழிகளில் எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகள் பெரிய செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவுகளை காட்டுகிறது, எங்கள் பிரிவினை பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டின்', 'ur': 'مختلف زبانوں کے ویکتور جگہ کے درمیان صفر-شٹ کی تعلیم سکھانے کے لئے صفر-شٹ کی تعلیم لینے کا ایک وعدہ دینے والا تقریبا ہے دو زبان ویکتوری اینڈک کے لئے. However, methods using this approach have not yet reached high accuracy on the task. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک دھوپ کی تقریبا پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جہاں ہمارا اصل حصہ علم کی تعلیم کا موقع ہے. استاد کے طور پر، ثروت سرمایہ کا ترجمہ راستہ اس رول میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے۔ اور یادگاروں کی طرح، ترجمہ طریقے کے ذریعہ سے کم سرمایہ زبانیں استاد سے سیکھتے ہیں۔ ہماری تعلیم کا مقصد ہر کم منطقی جوڑے کے لئے استاد کی ترجمہ مسیروں کی کمی زیادہ تعلیم دیتا ہے. ہمارے تقریبا کے باعث ایک زبان کی کلمات کی کیفیت پر اعتماد ہوتی ہے، ہم بھی زبان کی معلومات کے ساتھ سورج اور موجود زبان کی کیفیت کے ساتھ ویکتوروں کی تصویریں مزید کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ہمارے مختلف زبانوں کی آزمائش ہمارے ٹیٹلیٹ کی آموزش موضوع سے بہت بڑی کامیابی کا فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں، جو 17% دقیق کامیابی کے مطابق اضافہ ہوتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction.  Lekin, bu usulni ishlatishda foydalanish usullari vazifani juda yaxshi tizim topilmadi. Bu qogʻozda biz bir murakkab usulni talab qilamiz. Bu yerda bizning asosiy qanday qismimiz ilmiy ta'limni ajratish muhimdir. O'qituvchilar deb o'qituvchi bo'lsangiz, taxminan manbalar tarjima yordamlari bu amalga oshadi. Va o'rganishlar bilan o'rganishda, ko'p manbalar tilida o'rganish yoʻllari o'qituvchilaridan o'rganadi. Bizning taʼminlovchi maqsadimiz o'qituvchi o'qituvchi yoʻllarini qoʻshishga ruxsat beradi. Chunki bizning fikrimiz monolik so'zlarining sifatiga ishlatadi, biz o'z paytda vektorning xususiyatlarini o'zgartirish va tillarning tillarini tillik maʼlumoti bilan foydalanishini talab qilamiz. Ko'pchilik tildagi taʼminlovchimizmiz bir necha tillardan ko'proq taʼminlovchi maqsadimizdan katta ta'minlovchi muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatadi, 17% foydalanish imkoniyatini oshirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Học cách bắn súng bằng không để học các chức năng vẽ bản đồ giữa các khoảng vector của ngôn ngữ khác nhau là một phương pháp hứa hẹn cho tiến hóa từ điển. Tuy nhiên, phương pháp dùng phương pháp này vẫn chưa đạt được độ chính xác cao về nhiệm vụ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp kết nối, nơi đóng góp chính là mục tiêu huấn luyện nấu ăn. Với tư cách giáo viên, nhiều phương pháp dịch chuyển tài nguyên được khai thác. Và với tư cách đệ tử, các đường dẫn dịch liên quan đến ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên học từ giáo viên. Mục tiêu huấn luyện của chúng tôi cho phép sự bổ sung hoàn hảo các đường dẫn dịch giáo viên cho bất kỳ cặp tài nguyên thấp nào. Do phương pháp của chúng ta phụ thuộc vào chất lượng của sự nhúng vào từ ngôn ngữ, chúng ta cũng đề nghị cải thiện các biểu tượng vector của cả nguồn và ngôn ngữ đích với thông tin ngôn ngữ. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi trên nhiều ngôn ngữ khác nhau cho thấy hiệu quả lớn từ mục tiêu huấn luyện chưng cất đạt độ chính xác cao khó khăn khó khăn.', 'bg': 'Използването на нулево обучение за изучаване на функциите за картографиране между векторни пространства на различни езици е обещаващ подход към двуезичната индукция на речника. Методите, използващи този подход, все още не са постигнали висока точност на задачата. В настоящата статия предлагаме мост подход, при който основният ни принос е цел обучение по дестилация на знания. Като учители в тази роля се използват богати ресурси за превод. И като обучаеми, пътищата за превод, включващи езици с нисък ресурс, се учат от учителите. Нашата цел за обучение позволява безпроблемно добавяне на пътища за превод на учители за всяка дадена двойка с ниски ресурси. Тъй като нашият подход разчита на качеството на едноезичните вграждания на думи, предлагаме също така да подобрим векторните представи както на изходния, така и на целевия език с лингвистична информация. Нашите експерименти на различни езици показват големи резултати от нашата цел за обучение по дестилация, постигайки до 17% подобрения на точността.', 'hr': 'Učivanje nulotvornog učenja da nauči mapiranje funkcija između vektorskih prostora različitih jezika je obećavajući pristup indukciji dvojezičkog rečnika. Međutim, metode koristeći ovaj pristup još nisu postigle visoke preciznosti na zadatku. U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup mostovanja, gdje je naš glavni doprinos cilj obuke znanja destilacije. Kao nastavnici, bogati putevi prevoda resursa koriste se u ovoj ulozi. Kao učenici, putevi prevoda uključujući jezike niskih resursa uče od učitelja. Naš cilj vježbe omogućava beznačajno dodavanje puteva za prevod učitelja za bilo koji mali par resursa. Budući da se naš pristup oslanja na kvalitetu integracije monojezičkih riječi, također predlažemo poboljšati predstavljanja vektora izvora i ciljnog jezika s jezičkim informacijama. Naši eksperimenti na različitim jezicima pokazuju velike dobitke učinka iz našeg cilja obuke destilacije, dobivajući najviše od 17% poboljšanja preciznosti.', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af nul-shot læring til at lære kortlægningsfunktioner mellem vektorrum på forskellige sprog er en lovende tilgang til tosproget ordbogindusktion. Metoder, der anvender denne fremgangsmåde, har dog endnu ikke opnået høj nøjagtighed på opgaven. I denne artikel foreslår vi en bridging tilgang, hvor vores vigtigste bidrag er et mål om videndedestillation. Som lærere udnyttes rige ressourceoversættelsesstier i denne rolle. Og som elever lærer oversættelsesstier, der involverer sprog med lav ressource, af lærerne. Vores uddannelsesmål giver mulighed for problemfri tilføjelse af læreroversættelsesstier for et givet lavt ressourcepar. Da vores tilgang er afhængig af kvaliteten af ensprogede ordindlejringer, foreslår vi også at forbedre vektorrepræsentationer af både kilde- og målsproget med sproglig information. Vores eksperimenter på forskellige sprog viser store præstationsgevinster fra vores mål om destillationstræning, hvilket opnår helt op til 17% nøjagtighedsforbedringer.', 'nl': 'Het gebruik van zero-shot learning om kaartfuncties te leren tussen vectorruimten van verschillende talen is een veelbelovende benadering van tweetalige woordenboek inductie. De methoden die deze aanpak gebruiken, hebben echter nog geen hoge nauwkeurigheid bereikt op de taak. In dit document stellen we een overbruggingsaanpak voor, waarbij onze belangrijkste bijdrage een trainingsdoelstelling voor kennisdestillatie is. Als docenten worden rijke vertaalpaden benut in deze rol. En als leerling leren vertaalpaden waarbij talen met weinig middelen worden gebruikt, van de leraren. Onze trainingsdoelstelling maakt het mogelijk om vertaalpaden voor docenten naadloos toe te voegen voor elk gegeven paar met weinig resources. Aangezien onze aanpak gebaseerd is op de kwaliteit van eentalige woordinbeddingen, stellen we ook voor om vectorrepresentaties van zowel de bron- als doeltaal te verbeteren met taalkundige informatie. Onze experimenten met verschillende talen tonen grote prestatiewinsten uit onze distillatietrainingsdoelstelling, waarbij we tot 17% nauwkeurigheidsverbeteringen behalen.', 'id': 'Menyerangkan belajar zero-shot untuk belajar fungsi pemetaan antara ruang vektor bahasa yang berbeda adalah pendekatan yang berjanji untuk induksi kamus dua bahasa. However, methods using this approach have not yet achieved high accuracy on the task.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan bergegas, di mana kontribusi utama kami adalah tujuan latihan pengetahuan destilasi. Sebagai guru, jalur terjemahan sumber daya kaya dieksploitasi dalam peran ini. Dan sebagai pelajar, jalur terjemahan yang melibatkan bahasa sumber daya rendah belajar dari guru. Objektif pelatihan kami memungkinkan tambahan tanpa henti jalur terjemahan guru untuk setiap pasangan sumber daya rendah yang diberikan. Karena pendekatan kita bergantung pada kualitas penerbangan kata-kata monobahasa, kita juga mengusulkan untuk meningkatkan representation vektor dari sumber dan bahasa sasaran dengan informasi bahasa. Eksperimen kami di berbagai bahasa menunjukkan keuntungan besar prestasi dari tujuan latihan destilasi kami, mendapatkan 17% peningkatan akurasi.', 'ko': '영포를 이용하여 서로 다른 언어의 벡터 공간 사이의 반사 함수를 학습하는 것은 전도가 유망한 이중 언어 사전 귀납 방법이다.그러나 이런 방법을 사용하는 방법은 이 임무에서 아직 높은 정확성에 이르지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 일종의 교차 방법을 제시했는데 그 중에서 우리의 주요 공헌은 지식 추출 교육 목표이다.교사로서 풍부한 자원 번역 경로가 이 역할에서 이용되었다.학습자로서 저자원 언어와 관련된 번역 경로를 교사에게 배운다.우리의 교육 목표는 주어진 저자원에 교사 번역 경로를 빈틈없이 추가할 수 있도록 한다.우리의 방법은 단어 삽입의 질에 의존하기 때문에 언어 정보를 사용하여 원시 언어와 목표 언어의 벡터 표시를 강화하는 것을 권장합니다.우리의 각종 언어에서의 실험은 우리의 증류 훈련 목표가 성능을 크게 향상시켰고 정확도가 17퍼센트 높아졌다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'fa': 'تحت تأثیر یادگیری صفر شلیک برای یاد گرفتن عملکرد نقشه\u200cسازی بین فضای ویکتور از زبان\u200cهای مختلف یک روش قول\u200cدهنده برای تولید دوزبانی\u200cها است. ولی روش\u200cهای استفاده از این دستور هنوز دقیقات بالا در این کار به دست نیاورده است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش پل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، جایی که دسترسی اصلی ما یک هدف تمرین علم جدایی است. به عنوان معلم، مسیر ترجمه منابع ثروتمند در این نقش استفاده می\u200cشوند. و به عنوان دانش آموزان، راه\u200cهای ترجمه با زبانهای کم منابع از معلمان یاد می\u200cگیرند. هدف آموزش ما اجازه می دهد که مسیر ترجمه معلم را برای هر جفت منابع کم داده باشد. از آنجایی که دستور ما بر کیفیت کلمات تک زبانی استفاده می\u200cکند، ما همچنین پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نمایش\u200cهای ویکتوری از منبع و زبان هدف با اطلاعات زبانی بیشتر شود. آزمایش های ما در زبان های مختلف به هدف آموزش آموزش های جدایی ما پیروزی بزرگی را نشان می دهند که به اندازه ۱۷ درصد بهترین دقیق را دریافت می کنند.', 'de': 'Die Nutzung des Zero-Shot-Lernens, um Mapping-Funktionen zwischen Vektorräumen verschiedener Sprachen zu erlernen, ist ein vielversprechender Ansatz zur zweisprachigen Wörterbuchinduktion. Allerdings haben Methoden mit diesem Ansatz noch keine hohe Genauigkeit bei der Aufgabe erreicht. In diesem Papier schlagen wir einen Brückenansatz vor, bei dem unser Hauptbeitrag ein Trainingsziel zur Wissensdestillation ist. Als Lehrer werden in dieser Rolle umfangreiche Ressourcen-Übersetzungspfade ausgenutzt. Und als Lernende lernen Übersetzungspfade mit geringen Ressourcen Sprachen von den Lehrern. Unser Schulungsziel ermöglicht das nahtlose Hinzufügen von Übersetzungspfaden für Lehrer für jedes beliebige Paar mit geringen Ressourcen. Da unser Ansatz auf der Qualität von einsprachigen Worteinbettungen beruht, schlagen wir vor, Vektordarstellungen sowohl der Ausgangs- als auch der Zielsprache mit linguistischen Informationen zu verbessern. Unsere Experimente an verschiedenen Sprachen zeigen große Leistungszuwächse durch unser Destillationstrainingsziel, das bis zu 17% Genauigkeitsverbesserungen erzielt.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kazi za ramani isiyo na sifa za kujifunza kati ya maeneo mbalimbali ya lugha tofauti ni njia ya kuahidini kwa ajili ya sekta ya lugha mbili. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kutumia mbinu hii bado hazijapata uhakika mkubwa katika kazi hiyo. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za daraja, ambapo mchango wetu mkuu ni lengo la mafunzo ya ufahamu. Kama walimu, njia za kutafsiri rasilimali zinatumiwa katika jukumu hili. Na kama wanajifunza, njia za kutafsiri zinazohusisha lugha ndogo za rasilimali zinajifunza kutoka kwa walimu. Lengo letu la mafunzo linaruhusu kuongezea njia za tafsiri za walimu kwa ajili ya viwili vinavyopewa rasilimali duni. Kwa kuwa mtazamo wetu unategemea kiwango cha maneno ya lugha ya kiutamaduni, pia tunapendekeza kuongeza uwakilishi wa vector wa chanzo hicho na lugha inayolenga kwa taarifa za lugha. Majaribio yetu katika lugha mbalimbali yanaonyesha mafanikio makubwa kutoka kwa lengo letu la mafunzo ya kutofautisha, na kupata maendeleo ya sahihi zaidi ya asilimia 17.', 'am': 'Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction.  ምንም እንኳን፣ ይህንን ሥርዓት የሚጠቀም ሥርዓት ገና ለስራ ትክክል አላገኙም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የዋነታችን አካባቢ የእውቀት ትምህርት አካባቢ ነው፡፡ አስተማሪዎች እንደሚሆኑ ሀብታሞች የድህነት ትርጉም መንገዶች በዚህ ክፍል ተጠቃሚዎች ናቸው፡፡ ተማሪዎችም እንደተማሩ፣ የዝቅተኛ የክፍል ቋንቋዎች በሚያስተማሩ መንገዶች ከአስተማሪዎች ይማራሉ፡፡ ትምህርታችን አካባቢነታችን ለትንሽ የክፍለ ሀብት ሁለትን ለአስተማሪው ትርጉም መንገዶች መጨመር ይችላል፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ቃላትን ጥሩ በማድረግ ምክንያት፣ የዌctor መልዕክት እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ መረጃዎችን ለማድረግ እናስመክራለን፡፡ በልዩ ቋንቋዎች ያሉ ፈተናዎቻችን የመለየ ትልቅ የግንኙነታችንን አካባቢ ትልቅ ትርፍን ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Name Maar metodes wat hierdie toegang gebruik het, het nog nie hoë presisie op die taak bereik nie. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n bruidingstoegang waar ons hoofdeel bydraai is 'n kennis-destilasie onderwerking doel. As onderwysers, ryk hulpbron vertaling pad word in hierdie rol uitgebruik. En as leerders, vertalingspaaie wat die lae hulpbron tale invoer, leer van die onderwysers. Ons onderwerp objekte laat toe sondelik byvoeg van onderwerp vertaling pad vir enige gegewe lae hulpbron paar. Omdat ons toegang verlig op die kwaliteit van monolinglike woord inbettings, voorstel ons ook om vektorvoorstellings van beide die bron en doel taal met lingvisiese inligting te verbeter. Ons eksperimente op verskeie tale wys groot prestasie verskaffings van ons destilasie-onderwerking-doel, wat so hoog as 17% presies verbeteringe verkry word.", 'sq': 'Shkatërrimi i mësimit zero-shot për të mësuar funksione hartimi midis hapësirave vektorë të gjuhëve të ndryshme është një qasje premtuese për induksionin e fjalorit dygjuhës. Megjithatë, metodat që përdorin këtë qasje ende nuk kanë arritur saktësi të lartë në detyrë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një qasje lidhjeje, ku kontributi ynë kryesor është një objektiv trajnimi i distillacionit të njohurive. Si mësues, rrugët e pasura të përkthimit të burimeve shfrytëzohen në këtë rol. Dhe si mësues, rrugët e përkthimit që përfshijnë gjuhë me burime të ulëta mësojnë nga mësuesit. Objektivi ynë i trajnimit lejon shtimin e paqëndrueshëm të rrugëve të përkthimit të mësuesve për çdo çift të dhënë burimesh të ulëta. Since our approach relies on the quality of monolingual word embeddings, we also propose to enhance vector representations of both the source and target language with linguistic information.  Eksperimentet tona në gjuhë të ndryshme tregojnë fitime të mëdha performancë nga objektivi ynë i trajnimit të distillacionit, duke marrë deri në 17% përmirësime të saktësisë.', 'tr': 'Farklı diller arasyndaky vektör seleňleri arasynda maplama fonksiyonlaryny öwrenmek üçin nul atly öwrenmek iki dil sözlük induksiýasyna söz berjek nusgasydir. Ýöne bu ýagdaýy ulanan yöntemler işiň üstünde degişlik başarmady. Bu kagyzda, biziň esasy gaýdyşymyz bilim taýýarlanmagyň maksady bolan teklip etmegi teklip edýäris. Mugallymlar bolsa, baý resurslar terjime ýolunlary bu rolde ulanýar. We öwredýänler bolsa, mugallymlardan azajyk ressurs dillerini öwrenýän terjime yollary. Biziň bilim maksadymyz mugallymlaryň terjime edilen ýokdugy iki çeşit üçin beýleki ýolmuşy goşmagyna mümkin edýär. Bizim yaklaşymyz monolingual söz integrlerin keyfiyetine dayanarak, biz hem vektörlerin, dillerin hem çeşme hem hedefi dillerini dil bilgisi bilen güçlendirmesini teklif edip görýäris. Çeşitli dillerimizde örän deneylerimiz tapawutlandyrma maksadymyzdan uly täsirler gazanýar, 17% dogrudylyk gelişmelerinden ýokary gazanýar.', 'hy': 'Երկուլեզու բառարանի ինդուկցիայի խոստումնալից մոտեցում է, որպեսզի սովորենք քարտեզագրման ֆունկցիաներ տարբեր լեզուների վեկտորների տարածքների միջև: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոտեցումը օգտագործող մեթոդները դեռևս չափազանց ճշգրիտ չեն հասել խնդիրը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք կապի մոտեցում, որտեղ մեր հիմնական ներդրումը գիտելիքի դիսլիլացիայի ուսումնասիրության նպատակն է: Որպես ուսուցիչներ, այս դերի մեջ օգտագործվում են հարուստ ռեսուրսների թարգմանման ճանապարհները: Եվ որպես ուսանողներ, թարգմանման ճանապարհները, որոնք ներառում են ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուներ, ուսուցիչներից են սովորում: Մեր ուսուցման նպատակը թույլ է տալիս անընդհատ ավելացնել ուսուցիչների թարգմանման ուղիները ցանկացած ցածր ռեսուրսների զույգի համար: Քանի որ մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է միալեզու բառերի ներդրման որակի վրա, մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք բարելավել նաև աղբյուրի և նպատակային լեզվի ներկայացումները լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվությամբ: Մեր տարբեր լեզուների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս մեծ արդյունավետություն մեր դիսլիլացիայի ուսումնասիրության նպատակից, հասնելով 17 տոկոսի ճշգրտության բարելավման:', 'az': 'Farklı dillərin vektör məsafələri arasındakı xərcləmə funksiyalarını öyrənmək üçün sıfır-shot öyrənmək iki dil sözlük induksyonuna söz verici bir tərzidir. Ancaq bu metodları istifadə etmək üçün bu işdə hələ yüksək doğruluğu başa düşmədi. Bu kağızda, bizim ən böyük qismətimiz elmdən ayrılma təhsil etmək məqsədilədir. Müəllimlər kimi, bu roldə zəngin mənbə çeviri yolları istifadə edilir. Və öyrənənənlər kimi, qeyri-müəllimlərdən öyrənən düşük ressurs dilləri ilə birlikdə tercümə yolları var. Bizim təhsil məqsədimiz, müəllimin təhsil yollarını hər bir düşük ressurs çift üçün istifadə edər. Yaxınlığımız monodil sözlərin inşallarının keyfiyyətinə təvəkkül edir, biz də dil məlumatları ilə mənbənin və məqsəd dilinin vektoru göstərişlərini daha da artırmağı təklif edirik. Müxtəlif dillərdə olan eksperimentlərimiz distillasyon təhsil məqsədimizdən böyük performanslıq qazandığını göstərir, 17% ədalətli düzəltmələri qədər yüksək olaraq.', 'bn': 'ভেক্টরের বিভিন্ন ভাষার মধ্যে মানচিত্রের কার্যক্রম শিখতে শিখতে শুরু করা শুরু করা শুরু হচ্ছে দুই ভাষার অভিধান শিল্পের প্রতি  তবে এই পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করার পদ্ধতি এখনো কাজের ব্যাপারে উচ্চপরিস্থিতি অর্জন করেনি। In this paper, we propose a bridging approach, where our main contribution is a knowledge distillation training objective.  শিক্ষক হিসেবে, ধনী সম্পদ অনুবাদের পথ এই ভূমিতে ব্যবহৃত হয়েছে। আর শিক্ষার্থীদের হিসেবে অনুবাদের রাস্তাগুলো শিক্ষকদের কাছ থেকে শিক্ষার্থীদের শিক্ষা দেয়। আমাদের প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্যে যে কোন নিম্ন সম্পদ জোড়ার জন্য শিক্ষক অনুবাদের পথ যোগাযোগ করতে পারে। যেহেতু আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা মানুষ ভাষার মানের উপর নির্ভর করে, আমরা ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রস্তাব করি উৎস এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষার সাথে ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষায় আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে আমাদের বিচ্ছিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের লক্ষ্য থেকে বিশাল প্রদর্শনীর ফলাফল, যা ১৭% পরি', 'ca': "Ampliar l'aprenentatge de fotografies zero per aprendre funcions de mapeament entre espais vector is de diferents llengües és un enfocament prometedor a l'inducció bilingüe del diccionari. Però els mètodes que utilitzen aquest enfocament encara no han aconseguit una gran precisió en la tasca. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament de pont, on la nostra contribució principal és un objectiu d'entrenament de destilació del coneixement. Com a professors, en aquest paper es fan explotar els camins de traducció de recursos rics. I com a alumnes, els camis de traducció que impliquen llengües de baix recursos aprenen dels professors. El nostre objectiu d'entrenament permet afegir senzillament camins de traducció dels professors per a qualsevol parell de baixos recursos. Com que el nostre enfocament depèn de la qualitat de l'incorporació de paraules monolingües, també proposem millorar les representacions vectorals de la font i del llenguatge alvo amb informació lingüística. Our experiments on various languages show large performance gains from our distillation training objective, obtaining as high as 17% accuracy improvements.", 'cs': 'Využití nulového učení k učení se mapovacích funkcí mezi vektorovými prostory různých jazyků je slibným přístupem k indukci dvojjazyčného slovníku. Metody používající tento přístup však dosud nedosáhly vysoké přesnosti v daném úkolu. V tomto článku navrhujeme mostový přístup, kde naším hlavním přínosem je cíl školení znalostní destilace. Jako učitelé jsou v této roli využívány bohaté cesty překladu zdrojů. A jako studenti se překladatelské cesty zahrnující nízké zdroje jazyků učí od učitelů. Náš cíl školení umožňuje bezproblémové přidávání překladatelských tras učitelů pro jakýkoliv daný pár nízkých zdrojů. Vzhledem k tomu, že náš přístup je založen na kvalitě jednojjazyčných vložení slov, navrhujeme také posílit vektorové reprezentace zdrojového i cílového jazyka o jazykové informace. Naše experimenty na různých jazycích ukazují velké zvýšení výkonu při našem cíli destilace, dosahující až 17% zlepšení přesnosti.', 'et': 'Nullshot õppe kasutamine kaardistamisfunktsioonide õppimiseks eri keelte vektoriruumide vahel on paljutõotav lähenemine kakskeelsele sõnastiku induktsioonile. Sellist lähenemisviisi kasutavad meetodid ei ole siiski saavutanud ülesande suurt täpsust. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja sillameetodi, kus meie peamine panus on teadmiste destilleerimise koolituse eesmärk. Õpetajatena kasutatakse selles rollis rikkalikke ressursitõlketeesid. Õppijatena õpivad vähese ressursiga keeli hõlmavad tõlketeed õpetajatelt. Meie koolituse eesmärk võimaldab õpetajate tõlketeede sujuvat lisamist iga vähese ressursipaari jaoks. Kuna meie lähenemisviis tugineb ühekeelsete sõnade manustamise kvaliteedile, teeme ettepaneku parandada nii lähte- kui sihtkeele vektorikujutisi keelelise teabe abil. Meie eksperimendid erinevates keeltes näitavad meie destilleerimise koolituse eesmärgist suurt jõudlust, saavutades kuni 17% täpsuse paranemist.', 'bs': 'Učivanje nulotvornog učenja da nauči mapiranje funkcija između vektorskih prostora različitih jezika je obećavajući pristup indukciji dvojezičkog rečnika. Međutim, metode koristeći ovaj pristup još nisu postigle visoke preciznosti na zadatku. U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup mostovanja, gdje je naš glavni doprinos cilj treninga destilacije znanja. Kao nastavnici, bogati putevi prevoda resursa koriste se u ovoj ulozi. I kao učenici, putevi prevođenja uključujući jezike niskih resursa uče od učitelja. Naš cilj obuke omogućava beznačajno dodavanje puteva predavanja učitelja za bilo koji mali par resursa. Budući da se naš pristup oslanja na kvalitetu integracije monojezičkih riječi, također predlažemo da poboljšamo predstavljanja vektora izvora i ciljnog jezika sa jezičkim informacijama. Naši eksperimenti na različitim jezicima pokazuju velike dobitke učinka iz našeg cilja obuke destilacije, dobivajući najviše od 17% poboljšanja preciznosti.', 'fi': 'Nollashot-oppimisen hyödyntäminen erilaisten kielten vektoriavaruuksien välisten kartoitustoimintojen oppimiseen on lupaava lähestymistapa kaksikieliseen sanakirjan induktioon. Tätä lähestymistapaa käyttävät menetelmät eivät kuitenkaan ole vielä saavuttaneet suurta tarkkuutta tehtävässä. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotamme sillanratkaisua, jossa tärkein panoksemme on tietämyksen tislauksen koulutustavoite. Opettajina hyödynnetään tässä roolissa monipuolisia käännösreittejä. Oppijoina myös vähän resursseja käyttävien kielten käännösreitit oppivat opettajilta. Koulutustavoitteemme mahdollistaa opettajien käännösten saumattoman lisäämisen mihin tahansa vähäresurssipariin. Koska lähestymistapamme perustuu monikielisten sanaupotusten laatuun, ehdotamme myös vektorin esittämistä sekä lähde- että kohdekielestä kielellisen tiedon avulla. Kokeemme eri kielillä osoittavat suurta suorituskykyä tislauskoulutustavoitteemme ansiosta, jolloin tarkkuus paranee jopa 17%.', 'jv': 'Learn Mode Nanging, kuwi ngerasah sistem iki dadi nggawe ora ono wektu nggawe gerakan sing apik dadi. Awak dhéwé nggunakake kuwi, nik nggunakake tarjamahan kanggo ngerasah tarjamahan ning awak dhéwé ngerti nggawe barang nggawe Warsa barêng-barêng, kuwi tindang kuwi alat-barêng, kuwi kayané piujuran lan sekolah iki banget. Punika-punika ingkang alih, tukang-tukang, lan akeh basa gampang ning manut karo guru kudu. goal Sugger ono diangkat dhéwé nglanggar kuwi kaluwalhi ingkang sampeyan ingkang, kita ngubah wihhapit supaya bantuan vector nggawe kelompok tarjamahan karo perusahaan lan tarjamahan ingkang karo informasi ingkang. Awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan kanggo langgar-wong liya sing ngomong nik nggawe gerakan kanggo tukang nggawe tarjamahan sing rumangsa, ingkang sampek kanggo ngerasahan kanggo kalagayut kanggo langgar-sistem sing liwih sabanjuré', 'ha': "Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction.  A lokacin da, metoden su yi amfani da wannan hanyowa ba za'a isa tsari mai girma a kan aikin ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãtar da wani matsayi ya samu, inda ma'auninmu na ƙari ko wani abu ne da za'a rarrabe da ilmi. Kama macallin, za'a yi amfani da hanyõyi na fassarar resource matajiri a cikin wannan aikin. Kuma kamar sun sanar, tafarki masu fassarar da ke cikin lugha masu ƙaranci na masu bari daga macallin. Bayanin mafarinta na yarda a ƙara hanyõyi na masu fassari ga duk nau'i biyu na fassarar. Tana da hanyarmu ke dõgara ga tsarin maganar da aka shigar da shi na ƙanshi, sai muna goyya da in ƙari masu motsi na masu motsi da maganar harshen. Kayan jarrabõyinmu da ke cikin harshen dabam'a, za'a nuna mafaniki mai girma daga managi mafarinta na rarrabe, a tsakanin taƙaita 17%.", 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje ničelnega učenja za učenje funkcij kartiranja med vektorskimi prostori različnih jezikov je obetaven pristop k indukciji dvojezičnega slovarja. Vendar metode, ki uporabljajo ta pristop, še niso dosegle visoke natančnosti naloge. V prispevku predlagamo premostitveni pristop, kjer je naš glavni prispevek cilj usposabljanja na področju destilacije znanja. Kot učitelji se v tej vlogi izkoriščajo poti prevajanja bogatih virov. Kot učenci se prevajalske poti, ki vključujejo jezike z nizkimi viri, učijo od učiteljev. Naš cilj usposabljanja omogoča brezhibno dodajanje poti prevajanja učiteljev za vsak par z nizkimi viri. Ker naš pristop temelji na kakovosti enojezičnih besednih vdelav, predlagamo tudi vektorske reprezentacije izvornega in ciljnega jezika z jezikovnimi informacijami. Naši poskusi na različnih jezikih kažejo veliko večjo zmogljivost pri našem cilju usposabljanja za destilacijo, pri čemer smo dosegli kar 17% izboljšave natančnosti.', 'he': 'להעלות לימוד אפס-יריות ללמוד פעילויות מיפות בין מרחבי ויקטורים של שפות שונות הוא גישה מבטיחה לייצור מילון שתיים שפתיים. עם זאת, שיטות בשימוש בגישה זו עדיין לא השיגו מדויקה גבוהה על המשימה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה גשר, היכן התרומה הראשית שלנו היא מטרה אימון מיזוק ידע. As teachers, rich resource translation paths are exploited in this role.  וכלומדים, דרכים התרגום שמעניינים שפות משאבים נמוכות לומדים מהמורים. אובייקטיב האימון שלנו מאפשר להוסיף ללא הפרעה של דרכי התרגום המורים לכל זוג משאבים נמוכים נתון. מאחר שהגישה שלנו מסמכת על איכות המילים המונושפות, אנחנו גם מציעים לשפר את מייצגות הוקטורים של המקור וגם שפת המטרה עם מידע שפתי. הניסויים שלנו על שפות שונות מראים שיפורים גדולים ביצועים מאמצעי אימון הדיסילה שלנו, להשיג שיפורים מדויקים עד 17%.', 'bo': 'Leveraging zero-shot learning to learn mapping functions between vector spaces of different languages is a promising approach to bilingual dictionary induction. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལ་ལས་དུས་མཐུན་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་མ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བསམ་འཆར། ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་ནི་ཤེས སློབ་མཁན་དག་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་རྒྱུ་ནུས་ཁུངས་བསླབ་པའི་འགྲུལ་ལམ་དེ་འདིའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་exploited་ཡོད། སློབ་པ་དང་ཤེས་པ་ལྟར། སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ནི་སློབ་འཛུགས་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཁ་སྐོང་མེད་པར། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣེ་བར་གྱི་བརྟག་བསྟར་ན་ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལས་ཕར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་པོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Machine Translation, it’s a question of style, innit? The case of English tag questions', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية ، إنها مسألة أسلوب ، أليس كذلك؟ حالة أسئلة العلامة الإنجليزية', 'fr': "La traduction automatique, c'est une question de style, non\xa0? Le cas des questions sur les balises en anglais", 'es': 'Traducción automática, es una cuestión de estilo, ¿no? El caso de las preguntas sobre etiquetas en inglés', 'pt': 'Tradução automática, é uma questão de estilo, não é? O caso das perguntas de tag em inglês', 'ja': '機械翻訳、それはスタイルの問題ですよね？英語のタグの質問のケース', 'zh': '机器翻译者,风也,innit? 英文标签事例', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद, यह शैली का एक सवाल है, innit? अंग्रेजी टैग प्रश्नों का मामला', 'ru': 'Машинный перевод, это вопрос стиля, не так ли? Случай вопросов по английским тегам', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín, is ceist stíle í, innit? Ceist na gclibeanna Béarla', 'ka': 'მაქსინური შეტყობინება, ეს სტილის კითხვა, არა? ანგლისური ჭდეების შესახებ', 'el': 'Η μηχανική μετάφραση, είναι θέμα στυλ, έτσι; Η περίπτωση των ερωτήσεων αγγλικής ετικέτας', 'hu': 'Gépi Fordítás, ez stílus kérdése, nem? Az angol tag kérdések esete', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica, è una questione di stile, no? Il caso delle domande sul tag inglese', 'lt': 'Mašinos vertimas, tai stiliaus klausimas, ar ne? Anglų etiketės klausimų atveju', 'kk': 'Машина аудармасы - стильдің сұрақ, немесе? Ағылшын тегтерінің үлкен- кішілігі', 'mk': 'Машински превод, прашање е за стил, нели? Случајот на англиски прашања', 'ms': 'Terjemahan Mesin, ia adalah soalan gaya, bukan? Kes soalan tag Inggeris', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ, ഇതൊരു ശൈലിയുടെ ചോദ്യം ആണ്, മനസ്സിലായോ? ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടാഗ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ കേസ്', 'mt': "It-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna, hija kwistjoni ta' stil, mhux? Il-każ ta’ mistoqsijiet dwar it-tikketti Ingliżi", 'mn': 'Машин орчуулалт, энэ бол хэлбэрийн асуулт, тийм үү? Англи хэлний тэмдэгтийн асуулт', 'pl': 'Tłumaczenie maszynowe to kwestia stylu, prawda? Przypadek pytań o znaczniki angielskie', 'no': 'Maskineoversettelse, er det eit spørsmål om stil, sant? Spørsmål om engelsk merkelapp', 'ro': 'Traducere automată, e o chestiune de stil, nu? Cazul întrebărilor cu etichete în limba engleză', 'si': 'මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය, ඒක විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, නේද? ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ටැග් ප්\u200dරශ්න ගැන', 'sr': 'To je pitanje stila, zar ne? Slučaj engleskog znaka pitanja', 'so': "Turjumista mashiinka, waa su'aal dabeecada, inni? Shafeeyinka warqada ingiriiska", 'sv': 'Maskinöversättning, det är en fråga om stil, eller hur? Fallet med frågor om engelska taggar', 'ta': 'இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, இது பாணியின் கேள்வி, உள்ளீடு? ஆங்கிலம் ஒட்டு கேள்விகளின் விஷயம்', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ، یہ ایک سؤال ہے، نہیں؟ انگلیسی ٹاگ سوال کے کیس', 'uz': 'Name Inglizcha tag soĘ»zlari', 'vi': "Machine Translation, it's a question of style, not? Câu hỏi về thẻ Anh", 'bg': 'Машинен превод, това е въпрос на стил, нали? Случаят с английските етикети', 'hr': 'To je pitanje stila, zar ne? Slučaj engleskog značka pitanja', 'da': 'Maskinoversættelse, det er et spørgsmål om stil, ikke? Tilfældet med engelske tag spørgsmål', 'nl': 'Machine Translation, het is een kwestie van stijl, nietwaar? Het geval van Engelse tag vragen', 'de': 'Maschinelle Übersetzung, das ist eine Frage des Stils, nicht wahr? Der Fall der englischen Tag Fragen', 'id': 'Mesin Translation, itu pertanyaan gaya, bukan? Kasus pertanyaan tag Inggris', 'ko': '스타일 문제 아닙니까?영어 추가 의문문', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین، این یک سوال شیوه است، مگه نه؟ پرونده سوالات انگلیسی', 'sw': "Machine Translation, it's a question of style, innit?  Kesi ya maswali ya alama ya Kiingereza", 'tr': 'Makin terjimesi, bu stiliň soragy, şeýle dälmi? Iňlisçe tägler soraglarynyň kiçi', 'af': "Masjien Vertaling, dis 'n vraag van styl, nie? Die Kas van Engels etiket vrae", 'sq': "Machine Translation, it's a question of style, innit?  Çështja e pyetjeve të etiketave angleze", 'am': 'የመኪን ትርጓሜ፣ የዓይነት ጥያቄ ነው፣ አወቅስ? የእንግሊዝኛ ምልክት ጥያቄ', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի թարգմանություն, դա ոճի հարց է, չէ՞: Անգլերեն տակ հարցերի դեպքում', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদ, এটা স্টাইলের একটা প্রশ্ন, ইনিট? ইংরেজী ট্যাগ প্রশ্নের কেস', 'az': 'Makinel…ôrin terc√ľm…ôsi, bu tarzńĪn bir sualńĪdńĪr, deńüil mi? ńįngiliz…ô etiketl…ôrin suallarńĪ', 'ca': "La traducció màquina, és una qüestió d'estil, no? El cas de preguntes d'etiquetes angleses", 'bs': 'To je pitanje stila, zar ne? Slučaj engleskog značka pitanja', 'cs': 'Strojový překlad, je to otázka stylu, ne? Případ otázek anglických značek', 'et': 'Masintõlge, see on stiili küsimus, eks? Inglise sildi küsimuste juhtum', 'fi': 'Konekäännös on tyylikysymys. English tag questions', 'jv': 'Jenengan pengaturan, kuwi keujuhé stil, tho ? Case', 'he': 'תרגום מכונות, זו שאלה של סגנון, לא? המקרה של שאלות תוויות אנגלית', 'ha': 'Tafsiri na Mashin Kikak, yana da wani tambayi cikin salon, ka sani? Babu masu tambayar tagin Ingiriya', 'sk': 'Strojni prevod je vprašanje stila, kajne? Primer vprašanj angleških oznak', 'bo': 'འདི་ནི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་མིན་འདུག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བུ་ཡིན་ནམ། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we address the problem of generating English tag questions (TQs) (e.g. it is, is n’t it?) in Machine Translation (MT). We propose a post-edition solution, formulating the problem as a multi-class classification task. We present (i) the automatic annotation of English TQs in a parallel corpus of subtitles and (ii) an approach using a series of classifiers to predict TQ forms, which we use to post-edit state-of-the-art MT outputs. Our method provides significant improvements in English TQ translation when translating from Czech, French and German, in turn improving the fluidity, naturalness, grammatical correctness and pragmatic coherence of MT output.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نتناول مشكلة إنشاء أسئلة علامات باللغة الإنجليزية (TQs) (على سبيل المثال ، أليس كذلك؟) في الترجمة الآلية (MT). نقترح حلاً بعد الإصدار ، بصياغة المشكلة كمهمة تصنيف متعددة الفئات. نقدم (1) التعليق التوضيحي التلقائي لمصادر الجودة الشاملة باللغة الإنجليزية في مجموعة موازية من الترجمات و (2) نهج يستخدم سلسلة من المصنفات للتنبؤ بأشكال TQ ، والتي نستخدمها بعد تحرير أحدث مخرجات الترجمة الآلية. توفر طريقتنا تحسينات كبيرة في ترجمة TQ الإنجليزية عند الترجمة من التشيكية والفرنسية والألمانية ، مما يؤدي بدوره إلى تحسين الانسيابية والطبيعية والصحّة النحوية والتماسك العملي لمخرجات الترجمة الآلية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de la génération de questions de balises en anglais (TQ) (par exemple, c'est le cas, n'est-ce pas\xa0?) en traduction automatique (MT). Nous proposons une solution post-édition, en formulant le problème sous la forme d'une tâche de classification multiclasse. Nous présentons (i) l'annotation automatique des QT anglais dans un corpus parallèle de sous-titres et (ii) une approche utilisant une série de classificateurs pour prédire les formes de QT, que nous utilisons pour post-éditer les sorties MT de pointe. Notre méthode apporte des améliorations significatives à la traduction TQ en anglais lors de la traduction du tchèque, du français et de l'allemand, améliorant ainsi la fluidité, le naturel, la correction grammaticale et la cohérence pragmatique de la production de traduction automatique.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, abordamos o problema de gerar perguntas de tag em inglês (TQs) (por exemplo, é, não é?) em Tradução automática (MT). Propomos uma solução de pós-edição, formulando o problema como uma tarefa de classificação multiclasse. Apresentamos (i) a anotação automática de TQs em inglês em um corpus paralelo de legendas e (ii) uma abordagem usando uma série de classificadores para prever formas de TQ, que usamos para pós-editar saídas de MT de última geração. Nosso método fornece melhorias significativas na tradução de TQ em inglês ao traduzir do tcheco, francês e alemão, melhorando a fluidez, naturalidade, correção gramatical e coerência pragmática da saída da TA.', 'es': 'En este artículo, abordamos el problema de generar preguntas de etiqueta (TQ) en inglés (por ejemplo, lo es, ¿no?) en Traducción automática (MT). Proponemos una solución posterior a la edición, formulando el problema como una tarea de clasificación multiclase. Presentamos (i) la anotación automática de los TQ en inglés en un corpus paralelo de subtítulos y (ii) un enfoque que utiliza una serie de clasificadores para predecir formas de TQ, que utilizamos para editar posteriormente los resultados de MT de última generación. Nuestro método proporciona mejoras significativas en la traducción de inglés TQ al traducir del checo, el francés y el alemán, lo que a su vez mejora la fluidez, la naturalidad, la corrección gramatical y la coherencia pragmática de la producción de MT.', 'ja': 'この論文では、機械翻訳（ MT ）における英語タグの質問（ TQ ）の生成（例：そうではないか？ ）の問題に取り組む。ポストエディションソリューションを提案し、マルチクラス分類タスクとして問題を定式化します。（ i ）英語のTQの自動アノテーションを字幕の並列コーパスで提示し、（ ii ） TQフォームを予測するための一連の分類子を使用したアプローチを提示します。これを使用して、最先端のMT出力を事後編集します。当社の方法は、チェコ語、フランス語、ドイツ語から翻訳する際に、英語のTQ翻訳を大幅に改善し、MT出力の流動性、自然性、文法的正確性、および実用的な一貫性を向上させます。', 'zh': '于本文之中,决于机器翻译(MT)英语标签(TQs)之问(如之,不亦)乎? 吾举一后版解决方案,以为多类。 臣等条(i)于字幕并行语料库中自注英语TQ,及(ii)一用一系分类器以测TQ法,以其后辑最先进MT输之。 自捷克语、法语、德语翻译,吾法著入英语 TQ 译,以重机器翻译输之流畅性、自然性、语法正确性、用一致性。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) में अंग्रेजी टैग प्रश्न (टीक्यू) उत्पन्न करने की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, यह है, है ना?)। हम एक पोस्ट-एडिशन समाधान का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो समस्या को बहु-वर्ग वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में तैयार करता है। हम (i) उपशीर्षक के समानांतर कॉर्पस में अंग्रेजी टीक्यू के स्वचालित एनोटेशन को प्रस्तुत करते हैं और (ii) टीक्यू रूपों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए क्लासिफायरकी एक श्रृंखला का उपयोग करके एक दृष्टिकोण, जिसका उपयोग हम स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट एमटी आउटपुट को पोस्ट-एडिट करने के लिए करते हैं। हमारी विधि चेक, फ्रेंच और जर्मन से अनुवाद करते समय अंग्रेजी टीक्यू अनुवाद में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्रदान करती है, बदले में तरलता, स्वाभाविकता, व्याकरणिक शुद्धता और एमटी आउटपुट की व्यावहारिक सुसंगतता में सुधार करती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы рассмотрим проблему генерации вопросов по английским тегам (TQ) (например, это так, не так ли?) в машинном переводе (MT). Предложено пост-издательское решение, формулирующее задачу как многоклассовую классификационную задачу. Мы представляем (i) автоматическую аннотацию английских TQ в параллельном корпусе субтитров и (ii) подход, использующий ряд классификаторов для прогнозирования форм TQ, которые мы используем для пост-редактирования современных выходов MT. Наш метод обеспечивает значительные улучшения в переводе TQ на английский язык при переводе с чешского, французского и немецкого языков, что, в свою очередь, улучшает текучесть, естественность, грамматическую корректность и прагматическую согласованность результатов MT.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le ceisteanna clibe Béarla (TQanna) a ghiniúint (m.sh. atá, nach ea?) in Aistriúchán Meaisín (MT). Molaimid réiteach iar-eagrán, ag cruthú na faidhbe mar thasc aicmithe ilranga. Cuirimid i láthair (i) anótáil uathoibríoch TQanna Béarla i gcorpas comhthreomhar d’fhotheidil agus (ii) cur chuige a úsáideann sraith aicmitheoirí chun foirmeacha TQ a thuar, a úsáidimid chun aschuir MT den scoth a iarchur in eagar. Soláthraíonn ár modh feabhsuithe suntasacha ar aistriúchán Béarla TQ nuair a bhíonn aistriúchán ón tSeicis, ón bhFraincis agus ón nGearmáinis, rud a fheabhsaíonn sreabhach, nádúrthacht, cruinneas gramadaí agus comhleanúnachas pragmatach an aschuir MT.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων Αγγλικών ετικετών (π.χ. είναι, έτσι δεν είναι;) στη μηχανική μετάφραση (MT). Προτείνουμε μια λύση μετά την έκδοση, διατυπώνοντας το πρόβλημα ως εργασία ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών κλάσεων. Παρουσιάζουμε (i) την αυτόματη σχολιασμό των Αγγλικών σε παράλληλο σώμα υποτίτλων και (ii) μια προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιεί μια σειρά ταξινομητών για την πρόβλεψη μορφών ΤQ, τις οποίες χρησιμοποιούμε για την μετα-επεξεργασία των σύγχρονων εξόδων ΜΤ. Η μέθοδος μας παρέχει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην αγγλική μετάφραση κατά τη μετάφραση από τα τσεχικά, τα γαλλικά και τα γερμανικά, βελτιώνοντας με τη σειρά της τη ρευστότητα, τη φυσικότητα, τη γραμματική ορθότητα και την πραγματιστική συνοχή της παραγωγής ΜΤ.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban az angol tag kérdések (TQ) generálásának problémájával foglalkozunk (pl. az, nem igaz?) in Machine Translation (MT). Javasolunk egy kiadás utáni megoldást, amely többosztályú osztályozási feladatként fogalmazza meg a problémát. Bemutatjuk (i) az angol TQ-k automatikus jegyzetelését párhuzamos feliratokból álló korpuszban és (ii) a TQ-formák előrejelzésére szolgáló megközelítést, amelyet a legkorszerűbb MT kimenetek utószerkesztésére használunk. Módszerünk jelentős javítást nyújt az angol TQ fordításban a cseh, francia és német fordításnál, ezáltal javítva az MT kimenet folyamatosságát, természetességét, nyelvtani helyességét és pragmatikus koherenciáját.', 'it': "In questo articolo, affrontiamo il problema della generazione di domande sui tag inglesi (TQs) (per esempio lo è, no?) in Machine Translation (MT). Proponiamo una soluzione post-edizione, formulando il problema come un compito di classificazione multi-classe. Presentiamo (i) l'annotazione automatica dei TQ inglesi in un corpus parallelo di sottotitoli e (ii) un approccio che utilizza una serie di classificatori per predire le forme TQ, che utilizziamo per post-editare output MT all'avanguardia. Il nostro metodo fornisce miglioramenti significativi nella traduzione TQ inglese quando si traduce dal ceco, francese e tedesco, migliorando a sua volta la fluidità, la naturalezza, la correttezza grammaticale e la coerenza pragmatica dell'output MT.", 'lt': "In this paper, we address the problem of generating English tag questions (TQs) (e.g. it is, isn't it?)  mašin ų vertimu (MT). Siūlome sprendimą po redakcijos, kuriame problem a būtų formuluojama kaip daugiakalassinė klasifikavimo užduotis. Mes pateikiame i) automatinę anglų TQ anotaciją lygiagrečiu subtitlų korpusu ir ii) metodą, naudojantį klasifikatorių seriją TQ formoms prognozuoti, kurią naudojame naujausiems MT rezultatams po redakcijos. Mūsų metodas gerokai pagerina anglų kalbos TQ vertimą iš čekų, prancūzų ir vokiečių, o MT produkcijos skystumą, natūralumą, gramatinį teisingumą ir pragmatinę nuoseklumą.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ние го решаваме проблемот со генерирање англиски прашања (ТК) (на пример, така е, нели?) во машински превод (MT). Предложуваме пост-издание решение, кое го формулира проблемот како мултикласификациска задача. Презентираме (i) автоматска анотација на англиски ТК во паралелен корпус субтитули и (ii) пристап користејќи серија класификатори за предвидување на ТК форми, кои ги користиме за постуредување на најсовремените MT излези. Нашиот метод обезбедува значителни подобрувања во англискиот превод на ТК кога се преведува од чешки, француски и германски, на своја страна подобрувајќи ја течноста, природноста, граматичката коректност и прагматичката кохеренција на производот на МТ.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah menghasilkan soalan tag Inggeris (TQs) (contohnya ia, bukan?) dalam Terjemahan Mesin (MT). Kami cadangkan penyelesaian selepas edisi, membentuk masalah sebagai tugas kelas berbilang. Kami perkenalkan (i) anotasi automatik TQ Inggeris dalam korpus selari subtitle dan (ii) pendekatan menggunakan siri klasifikasi untuk meramalkan bentuk TQ, yang kami gunakan untuk post-edit state-of-the-art output MT. Kaedah kami menyediakan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam terjemahan TQ bahasa Inggeris apabila terjemahan dari Czech, Perancis dan Jerman, secara bertukar meningkatkan kecairan, kebiasaan, kebijaksanaan grammatik dan persatuan pragmatik output MT.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടാഗ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d (MT). ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പിന്തുടര്\u200dച്ചയ്ക്കുള്ള പരിഹാരം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പല-ക്ലാസ്സിലെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d (i) ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടിക്യൂസിന്\u200dറെ സ്വയമായി വിചാരിക്കുന്നത് സബ്\u200cതലക്കെട്ടിലുള്ള ഒരു തുല്യമായ കോര്\u200dപ്പസില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു (ii) ടിക്യൂ രൂപങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന് ചെക്ക്, ഫ്രെഞ്ച്, ജര്\u200dമ്മനില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടിക്യൂ പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മികച്ച മെച്ചപ്', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw il-problema tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet dwar it-tikketti Ingliżi (TQs) (pereżempju huwa, mhux?) fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni (MT). Aħna nipproponu soluzzjoni ta' wara l-edizzjoni, li tifforma l-problem a bħala kompitu ta' klassifikazzjoni ta' diversi klassijiet. Aħna nippreżentaw (i) l-annotazzjoni awtomatika tat-TQs Ingliżi f’korpus parallel ta’ subtitli u (ii) approċċ li juża serje ta’ klassifikaturi biex jipprevedu l-formoli tat-TQ, li a ħna nużaw biex niddedikaw l-aħħar riżultati tal-MT. Il-metodu tagħna jipprovdi titjib sinifikanti fit-traduzzjoni tat-TQ bl-Ingliż meta jiġi tradott miċ-Ċek, il-Franċiż u l-Ġermaniż, min-naħa l-oħra jtejjeb il-fluwidità, in-naturalità, il-korrettezza grammatika u l-koerenza prammatika tal-produzzjoni MT.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Англи хэлбэрийн асуултыг бий болгох асуудлыг (TQs) (жишээ нь, тийм биз дээ?) Машин хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгж Бид дараагийн хэвлэлийн шийдвэр гаргаж, асуудлыг олон ангид хэвлэлийн ажил болгон тодорхойлж байна. Бид (i) Англи хэлний TQ-ийн автоматжуулалтыг багш нарын корпус болон (ii) хэдэн хэлбэрийг ашиглаж TQ хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлдох аргыг ашиглаж байна. Бидний арга нь Чех, Француз, Германы хэлснээр Англи хэлний ТQ хэлснээр маш чухал сайжруулалт гаргадаг. МТ гаргасан шингэн, натуралист, грамматикийн зөв болон прагматикийн үр дүнг сайжруулахад бидний арга нь илүү сайжруулаг', 'no': 'I denne papiret adresserer vi problem e t med å laga spørsmål om engelsk merkelapp (TQs) (for eksempel er det, er det ikkje?) i maskineoversettelsa (MT). Vi foreslår eit løysing etter utgangspunkt, som formerer problemet som eit multiklassisk klassifikasjonsprogram. Vi presenterer i) automatisk annotasjon av engelske TQs i eit parallell korpus av subtitler og ii) ein tilnærming ved å bruka ei serie klassifikatorar for å foregå TQ-formar, som vi brukar til å redigera MT-utgåver etter kunsttilstanden. Metoden vårt gjev signifikante forbedringar i engelsk TQ-omsetjing når det vert omsetjinga frå tsjekkisk, fransk og tysk, i turn forbedra fluiditet, naturalitet, gramatisk korrektur og pragmatisk koherens av MT-utdata.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule poruszamy problem generowania angielskich pytań tagowych (TQs) (np. jest, prawda?) w tłumaczeniu maszynowym (MT). Proponujemy rozwiązanie poedycyjne, formułujące problem jako wieloklasowe zadanie klasyfikacyjne. Przedstawiamy (i) automatyczną adnotację angielskich TQs w równoległym korpusie napisów oraz (ii) podejście wykorzystujące serię klasyfikatorów do przewidywania form TQ, które wykorzystujemy do post-edycji najnowocześniejszych wyjść MT. Nasza metoda zapewnia znaczące ulepszenia w tłumaczeniu TQ z języka czeskiego, francuskiego i niemieckiego, z kolei poprawiając płynność, naturalność, poprawność gramatyczną i pragmatyczną spójność wyników MT.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ინგლისური ტეგექტის კითხვების შექმნა პრობლემას გადავწყენებთ (TQs) (მაგალითად, არა?) მაქსინური შეცვლაში (MT). ჩვენ დავიწყებთ პოსტუმენტის გარეშე, პრობლემის ფორმალუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალება. ჩვენ (i) ანგლისური TQs-ის ავტომატური ანოტაციას სტატიტულების პარალელი კორპუსში და (ii) პროგრამის გამოყენება კლასიფიკაციების სერვერის გამოყენება TQ ფორმებს, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოყენებთ შემდეგ რედაქტირების MT ჩვენი პროცემი შეუძლებელია გასაკეთესებელი ინგლისური TQ-ის გასაგულისხმებში, როდესაც ფექური, ფრანგური და გერმანური გასაგულისხმებით გასაგულისხმებით, ჩემი გასაგულისხმებით, დარაგ', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, abordăm problema generării de întrebări cu etichete engleze (TQ) (de exemplu, este, nu-i așa?) in Machine Translation (MT). Propunem o soluție post-editie, formulând problema ca o sarcină de clasificare multi-clasă. Prezentăm (i) adnotarea automată a TQ-urilor în limba engleză într-un corpus paralel de subtitrări și (ii) o abordare folosind o serie de clasificatori pentru a prezice formele TQ, pe care le folosim pentru a post-edita rezultate MT de ultimă generație. Metoda noastră oferă îmbunătățiri semnificative în traducerea TQ în limba engleză atunci când traducem din cehă, franceză și germană, îmbunătățind la rândul său fluiditatea, naturalețea, corectitudinea gramaticală și coerența pragmatică a rezultatelor MT.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, ағылшын тегтерінің сұрақтарын жасау мәселесін (TQs) (мысалы, бұл емес пе?) Машина аудармасында (MT). Мәселеді көп класс класс классификациялау тапсырмасы ретінде формулау керек. Біз (i) ағылшын тілінің TQ түрлерін бағыттау үшін бірнеше классификаторларды қолдану үшін параллель айдарлардың корпусында автоматты түрде жазбаларды және (ii) таңдаймыз. Бұл TQ түрлерін бағыттау үшін бірнеше классификаторларды Біздің әдіміміз Чех, француз және неміс тілінен аударғанда, ағылшын тілінің ТQ аудармасында маңызды жақсартылығын жасайды, MT шығысының жылдамдығын, натуралдығын, грамматикалық түзету және праг', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ටැග් ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය කරන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා (TQs) (උදාහරණයෙන්, ඒක, නේද?) මැෂින් පරිවර්තන (MT) වලින්. අපි පිටිපස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, වඩා  අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි TQs ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරනවා (i) ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරනවා (i) ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සහ (i)  අපේ පද්ධතියේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය TQ භාවිතයේ විශේෂ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා චෙක්, ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් සහ ජර්මන් වලින් භාවිතයෙන් අනුවාර්ථා කර', 'so': "In this paper, we address the problem of generating English tag questions (TQs) (e.g. it is, isn't it?)  Turjumidda Mashinka (MT). Waxaynu horumarinaynaa xal ka gaarista, si aan dhibaatada u sameynno shaqo fasalka kala duduwan. Waxaynu isticmaalaynaa qaab aad u isticmaaleyso koorasyo kala duduwan oo a an ka hor dhigno noocyada TQ, taasoo aan u isticmaalno post-edit state-of-the-art MT Output. Metalkayada ayaa hagaajiya tarjumaadka Ingiriis TQ, marka lagu turjumo qoraalka Czech, Faraansiis iyo Jarmalka, marka lagu beddelo kordhinta faa'iidada, dabiicadda, saxda grammatika iyo saxda midhaha MT.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats tar vi upp problemet med att generera engelska taggfrågor (TQs) (t.ex. det är, eller hur?) i maskinöversättning (MT). Vi föreslår en post edition lösning där problemet formuleras som en flerklassklassificeringsuppgift. Vi presenterar (i) automatisk notering av engelska TQ i en parallell korpus av undertexter och (ii) ett tillvägagångssätt med hjälp av en serie klassificerare för att förutsäga TQ-former, som vi använder för att efterredigera state-of-the-art MT-utgångar. Vår metod ger betydande förbättringar i engelsk TQ översättning vid översättning från tjeckiska, franska och tyska, vilket i sin tur förbättrar fluiditeten, naturligheten, grammatisk korrekthet och pragmatisk samstämmighet i MT output.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem stvaranja pitanja engleskih etiketa (TQs) (npr. jeste, zar ne?) u mašinskom prevodu (MT). Predlažemo rešenje nakon izdavanja, formirajući problem kao multiklasni klasifikacijski zadatak. Predstavljamo i) automatsku annotaciju engleskih TQs u paralelnom korpusu podtitla i ii) pristup korištenjem serije klasifikatora da predviđamo forme TQ, koje koristimo za posteditanje rezultata MT-a. Naš metod pruža značajne poboljšanje u prevodu engleskog TQ kada se prevodi sa češkog, francuskog i njemačkog, u okviru poboljšanja tečnosti, prirodnosti, gramatičke ispravnosti i pragmatske saskaņonosti MT-a.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஆங்கிலம் குறிப்பு கேள்விகளை உருவாக்குவதின் பிரச்சனையை விளக்குகிறோம் (உதாரணமாக, அது அல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் (MT). பின்தொகுதி தீர்வு தீர்வு நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், பிரச்சனையை பல வகுப்பு பணியாக வடிவமைக்கிறது. நாம் (i) ஆங்கிலத்தின் டிகியூஸ் தானாகவே அறிவிப்பை துணை தலைப்புகளின் ஒப்பிட்ட கோப்புகளில் கொண்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் (ii) ஒரு சில வகுப்பாளர்களை பயன்படுத்தி TQ வடிவங்களை முன் எங்கள் முறைமையில் MT வெளியீட்டின் மொழிப்பெயர்ப்பை மொழிபெயர்ப்பில், செக்கு, பிரெஞ்சு மற்றும் ஜெர்மன் இருந்து மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் முக்கியமான மேம', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم انگلیسی ٹاگ سوال جوڑنے کے مسئلہ میں مشکل کریں گے (مثال یہ ہے، نہیں؟) مشین ترجمہ (MT) میں۔ ہم ایک پوسٹ ایڈیسیٹ کے حل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، مشکل کو multi-class classification task کے طور پر فرمول کرتے ہیں. ہم نے (i) انگلیسی TQs کے اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اظہار بنا دیا ہے اور (ii) ایک طریقہ کے مطابق ایک سری کلاسیر کے مطابق TQ فرموں کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے، جسے ہم نے اپنا اظہار کے ہمارا طریقہ انگلیسی ٹی کیو کی ترجمہ میں بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے جبکہ چک, فرانسوی اور جرمن سے ترجمہ کرتا ہے، اس کے بعد ٹی آئٹ کے مالک، طبیعت، گراماتیکی سیدھی اور پراگٹیکی سیدھی سیدھی تعمیر کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz ingliz tag soʻzlarini yaratish muammolarini boshqaramiz (TQs) (masalan, bu emas?) Mashine tarjima (MT). Biz bir necha darajadagi darajadagi muammolarni ko'plab-darajadagi muammolar sifatida yaratishni talab qilamiz. We present (i) the automatic annotation of English TQs in a parallel corpus of subtitles and (ii) an approach using a series of classifiers to predict TQ forms, which we use to post-edit state-of-the-art MT outputs.  Bizning usuli ingliz tilidagi TQ tarjima tarjima qilayotganda, Czech, Fransuz va Olmonchadan tarjima qilayotganda muhim o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. MT tashkilotlarini o'zgartirishga, tabiiy, grammatikal toʻgʻri va pragmatikk birlashtirishni oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong t ờ giấy này, chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề tạo ra câu hỏi về thẻ Anh (TQs (v.v. d. là nó, phải không? Dịch cỗ máy (MTV). Chúng tôi đề xuất một giải pháp sau phiên bản, đưa ra vấn đề như một nhiệm vụ phân loại nhiều hạng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu (i) bản ghi chú tự động của kênh TQs Anh trong một tập kết song của phụ đề và (II) một phương pháp sử dụng hàng loạt các phân loại để dự đoán mẫu TQ, mà chúng tôi sử dụng để hậu chỉnh kết xuất kênh MTV hiện thời. Cách của chúng tôi có thể tiếp tục TQ bằng cách thông báo của đạo, Pháp và Đức, để có thể giúp tốt động hoạt động, chúng tôi có sự tục, và hợp tục với tiề', 'da': "I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med at generere engelske tag spørgsmål (f.eks. det er, er det ikke?) i maskinoversættelse (MT). Vi foreslår en post-edition løsning, der formulerer problemet som en klassifikationsopgave i flere klasser. Vi præsenterer (i) automatisk annotering af engelske TQ'er i et parallelt korpus af undertekster og (ii) en tilgang ved hjælp af en række klassifikationer til at forudsige TQ-former, som vi bruger til at efterredigere state-of-the-art MT output. Vores metode giver betydelige forbedringer i engelsk TQ oversættelse, når du oversætter fra tjekkisk, fransk og tysk, hvilket igen forbedrer flydenheden, naturligheden, grammatisk korrekthed og pragmatisk sammenhæng i MT output.", 'nl': "In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van het genereren van Engelse tagvragen (TQ's) (bijvoorbeeld is het, of niet?) in machinevertaling (MT). We stellen een post-edition oplossing voor, waarbij het probleem wordt geformuleerd als een multi-class classificatietaak. We presenteren (i) de automatische annotatie van Engelse TQ's in een parallel corpus van ondertitels en (ii) een aanpak met behulp van een reeks classificatoren om TQ-vormen te voorspellen, die we gebruiken om state-of-the-art MT outputs na te bewerken. Onze methode biedt aanzienlijke verbeteringen in de Engelse TQ-vertaling bij vertalingen uit het Tsjechisch, Frans en Duits, waardoor de vloeibaarheid, natuurlijkheid, grammaticale correctheid en pragmatische samenhang van MT-output wordt verbeterd.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem stvaranja pitanja engleskih etiketa (TQs) (npr. jeste, zar ne?) u prevodu stroja (MT). Predlažemo rješenje nakon izdavanja, formulirajući problem kao multiklasični zadatak klasifikacije. Predstavljamo i) automatsku annotaciju engleskih TQs u paralelnom korpusu podtitla i ii) pristup korištenjem niza klasifikatora za predviđanje oblika TQ-a, koje koristimo za posteditanje stanja MT-a. Naš metod pruža značajne poboljšanje u prevodu engleskog TQ pri prevodu od čeških, francuskih i njemačkih, u okviru poboljšanja tekućine, prirodnosti, gramatičke ispravnosti i pragmatske saskaņonosti MT-a.', 'bg': 'В тази статия разглеждаме проблема с генерирането на въпроси по английски таг (напр. това е, нали?) в машинен превод (MT). Предлагаме решение след изданието, формулиращо проблема като многокласна класификационна задача. Представяме (i) автоматичната анотация на английските ТК в паралелен корпус от субтитри и (ii) подход, използващ серия от класификатори за предсказване на ТК форми, които използваме за пост-редактиране на най-съвременните МТ изходи. Нашият метод осигурява значителни подобрения в превода на английски език при превод от чешки, френски и немски, като от своя страна подобрява плавността, естествеността, граматическата коректност и прагматичната съгласуваност на продукцията на МТ.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem der Generierung englischer Tag-Fragen (TQs) (z.B. ist es, oder?) in maschineller Übersetzung (MT). Wir schlagen eine post-edition Lösung vor, die das Problem als Mehrklassenklassifikationsaufgabe formuliert. Wir präsentieren (i) die automatische Annotation englischer TQs in einem parallelen Korpus von Untertiteln und (ii) einen Ansatz, der eine Reihe von Klassifikatoren verwendet, um TQ-Formen vorherzusagen, mit denen wir modernste MT-Outputs nachbearbeiten. Unsere Methode bietet signifikante Verbesserungen in der englischen TQ-Übersetzung bei Übersetzungen aus dem Tschechischen, Französischen und Deutschen, was wiederum die Fließfähigkeit, Natürlichkeit, grammatische Korrektheit und pragmatische Kohärenz der MT-Ausgabe verbessert.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah menghasilkan pertanyaan tag Inggris (TQ) (contohnya, bukan?) dalam Translation Mesin (MT). Kami mengusulkan solusi setelah edisi, membentuk masalah sebagai tugas klasifikasi multi-kelas. Kami mempersembahkan (i) anotasi otomatis dari TQ Inggris dalam korpus paralel dari subtitles dan (ii) pendekatan menggunakan seri klasifikasi untuk memprediksi bentuk TQ, yang kami gunakan untuk post-edit state-of-the-art MT output. Our method provides significant improvements in English TQ translation when translating from Czech, French and German, in turn improving the fluidity, naturalness, grammatical correctness and pragmatic coherence of MT output.', 'ko': '본문에서 우리는 영어 부가 의문문(TQ)을 생성하는 문제(예를 들어 그것이 옳고 그름?)를 토론했다.기계 번역(MT)에서우리는 문제를 여러 가지 분류 임무로 묘사하는 뒷부분의 해결 방안을 제시했다.우리는 (i)가 평행자막 어료 라이브러리에서 영어 TQ를 자동으로 주석하고 (ii)는 일련의 분류기를 사용하여 TQ 형식을 예측하는 방법을 제시했다. 우리는 이런 분류기를 사용하여 가장 선진적인 기계 번역 출력을 후기 편집한다.우리의 방법은 체코어, 프랑스어, 독일어의 영어 TQ 번역에 현저한 개선을 제공하여 기계 번역 출력의 유동성, 자연성, 문법의 정확성과 어용의 일관성을 향상시켰다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل تولید سوالات انگلیسی (TQs) را حل می\u200cکنیم، مگه نه؟ در ترجمه ماشین (MT). ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک راه حل بعد از تولید، مشکل را به عنوان یک کار جدید کلاس فرمول کنیم. ما با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای مختلفی برای پیش\u200cبینی فرم\u200cهای TQ استفاده می\u200cکنیم، که برای بعد از ویرایش\u200cکردن وضعیت\u200cهای MT هنری استفاده می\u200cکنیم. روش ما در ترجمه TQ انگلیسی بهترین ترجمه\u200cهای بزرگی را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد وقتی از ترجمه\u200cهای چک، فرانسوی و آلمان، در حالی که مایع، طبیعت، درستی گراماتیک و هماهنگی پراگرماتیک نتیجه MT را بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunazungumzia tatizo la kutengeneza maswali ya kiingereza (TQs) (kwa mfano, ni, si?) katika Tafsiri ya Mashine (MT). Tunazipendekeza suluhisho la baada ya kuhariri, kutengeneza tatizo kama kazi ya kutangaza darasa nyingi. Tunaonyesha (i) matangazo ya TQ ya Kiingereza yenyewe kwa kiasi kikubwa cha vichwa vya habari na (ii) namna ya kutumia mfululizo wa wataalamu kutabiri a in a ya TQ, ambazo tunatumia kuhariri matokeo ya hali ya sanaa ya MT. Utawala wetu unatoa maendeleo makubwa katika tafsiri ya TQ ya Kiingereza wakati wa kutafsiri kutoka Kizech, Kifaransa na Kijerumani, badala ya kuboresha ujasiri, asili, uhakika wa taratibu na ushirikiano wa utoaji wa MT.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz iňlisçe t ägler soraglary döretmäge mesele çözýäris (meseläm, şe ýle dälmi?) Maşynyň terjimesinde (MT). Biz çykyş soňra çözüm teklip edip, meseläni bir multi-sınıf klasifikasy täblisasy hökmünde formlaýarys. Biz (i) Iňlisleriň TQlarynyň otomatik duşuşygyny parallel suratlaryň korpusynda we (ii) TQ biçimlerini öňden geçirmek üçin bir süri klasifikatçylary ulanýarys. Bu şekilde MT çizgileriň durumyny öňden geçirmek üçin ullanýarys. Biziň ýüregimiz, Iňlisçe TQ terjimelerinde Çehiýadan, fransuzça we Almanýadan terjime edeniňde, iňlisçe, dabarlyk, gramatik dogrylyk we pragmatik netijesini gowlaşdyrýar.', 'af': "In hierdie papier adres ons die probleem van die genereer van Engels etiket vrae (TQs) (bv. dit is, is dit nie?) in Masjien Vertaling (MT). Ons voorstel 'n post- edition oplossing, formeer die probleem as 'n multiklasklasklassifikasie taak. Ons stel (i) die outomatiese annotasie van Engelse TQs in 'n parallele korpus van subtitles en (ii) ' n toegang te gebruik met 'n reeks klassifiseerders om TQ vorms te voorskou, wat ons gebruik om te post-redigeer staat-van-die-kunstens MT uitvoers te voorskou. Ons metode verskaf betekeurige verbeteringe in Engelske TQ vertaling wanneer vertaling van Tscheeske, Frans en Duitse, om die fluiditeit, natuurlikheid, grammatiese korrektheid en pragmatiske koherens van MT uitvoer te verbeter.", 'sq': 'Në kët ë letër, ne trajtojmë problemin e gjenerimit të pyetjeve të etiketave angleze (TQ) (për shembull është, apo jo?) në përkthimin e makinave (MT). We propose a post-edition solution, formulating the problem as a multi-class classification task.  Ne paraqesim (i) anotacionin automatik të TQ-ve angleze në një korpus paralel të nëntitujve dhe (ii) një qasje duke përdorur një seri klasifikues për të parashikuar format TQ, të cilat ne përdorim për të postedituar daljet më të larta të MT-së. Metoda jonë ofron përmirësime të rëndësishme në përkthimin anglez TQ kur përkthehet nga çeke, franceze dhe gjermane, nga ana tjetër përmirësimin e fluiditetit, natyrshmërisë, korrektësisë grammatike dhe koherencës pragmatike të prodhimit MT.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ እንግሊዘኛ የቴክዩን ጥያቄዎችን መፍጠር ጉዳይ እናቀርባለን (የቴክዩን ጥያቄ ነው፣ አይደለም?) በመኪን ትርጉም (MT) We propose a post-edition solution, formulating the problem as a multi-class classification task.  እና (i) የኢንግሊዝኛ ቴክዩን በተለይ አካባቢዎች እና (ii) የTQ ዓይነቶችን ለመቀበል በተለየ ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የንግግሊዘኛ፣ ፈረንሳይ እና ጀርመን በመትረጉም ጊዜ በንግግሊዝኛ TQ ትርጓሜ የተለየ ትክክል ማድረግ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք անգլերեն տակ հարցեր ստեղծելու խնդիրը (օրինակ, այդպես չէ՞)։ մեքենայի թարգմանության (MT) մեջ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք հետխմբագրության լուծում, որտեղ խնդիրը ձևավորվում է որպես բազմադասական դասակարգման խնդիր: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք (i) անգլերենի TQ-ների ավտոմատիկ annoտացիան զուգահեռ կորպոսում ենթագծեր և (i) մոտեցում օգտագործելով մի շարք դասակարգեր TQ-ի ձևերի կանխատեսելու համար, որոնք մենք օգտագործում ենք MT-ի ամենաբարձր արդյունքների հետխմբագրման համար: Մեր մեթոդը նշանակալի բարելավումներ է տրամադրում անգլերեն TQ-ի թարգմանման մեթոդներում, երբ թարգմանվում է Չեխուսից, Ֆրանսերենից և գերմաներենից, փոխարեն բարելավելով MT-ի արտադրության հեղությունը, բնական կարողությունը,', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা ইংরেজী ট্যাগ প্রশ্ন তৈরি করার সমস্যা নিয়ে আলোচনা করি (টিকিউস) (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, তাই না? মেশিন অনুবাদ (MT)। আমরা একটি পোস্ট সমাধানের প্রস্তাব করছি, যারা এই সমস্যাকে বহুশ্রেণীর বিভাগের কাজ হিসেবে তৈরি করে। আমরা (ই) ইংরেজি টিকিউর স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিবৃতি দেখাচ্ছি সাবটাইটেলের একটি প্যারালেল কোর্পাসে এবং (ই) টিকিউ ফর্ম ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য একটি প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করেছি, যা  আমাদের পদ্ধতি ইংরেজি টিকিউ অনুবাদে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি প্রদান করে, যখন চেক, ফরাসী এবং জার্মান থেকে অনুবাদ করা হয়, এমটি আউটপুটের ফ্লুইডি, স্বাভাবিক, গ্র', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru rješavamo problem stvaranja pitanja engleskih etiketa (TQs) (npr. jeste, zar ne?) u mašinskom prevodu (MT). Predlažemo rješenje nakon izdavanja, formirajući problem kao multiklasični zadatak klasifikacije. Predstavljamo i) automatsku annotaciju engleskih TQs u paralelnom korpusu podtitla i ii) pristup korištenjem serije klasifikatora za predviđanje oblika TQ-a, koje koristimo za posteditanje postupnih rezultata MT-a. Naš metod pruža značajne poboljšanje u prevodu engleskog TQ kada se prevodi iz češkog, francuskog i njemačkog, u okviru poboljšanja tekućine, prirodnosti, gramatičke ispravnosti i pragmatske saskaņonosti MT-a.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda İngilizə etiket suallarını t əşkil etmək problemlərini çəkirik (TQs) (məsələn, bu deyil, deyil mi?) maşına çevirildi. Biz çoxlu sınıf klasifikasiya görevi olaraq problemi çoxlu çətinliklərə təklif edirik. Biz İngilizə TQlərin avtomatik bildirilməsini, həmçin in altyazıların paralelə korpusında və i i) TQ formlarını təmin etmək üçün TQ formlarını təmin etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim metodumuz Çehir, Fransız və Almanca çevirində İngiliz TQ çevirisində mövcud uzlaşmaları təmin edir, MT çıxışının sıvısını, doğallığını, gramatik düzəltməsini və pragmatiski müvafiqliyini yaxşılaşdırır.', 'ca': "En aquest article, ens ocupem del problema de generar preguntes d'etiquetes angleses (per exemple, sí, no?) a la traducció màquina (MT). Proposem una solució post-edició, formulant el problem a com a tasca de classificació multiclasse. Presentam (i) l'anotació automàtica de QT anglès en un cos paral·lel de subtítles i (ii) un enfocament utilitzant una sèrie de classificadors per predir formes de QT, que utilitzem per posteditar les últimes produccions MT. El nostre mètode proporciona millores significatives en la traducció de QT en anglès quan es tradueix de cec, francès i alemany, a la vegada millorant la fluiditat, la naturalesa, la correctesa gramàtica i la coherencia pragmàtica de la producció de MT.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou generování anglických tagových otázek (TQs) (např. je, že?) v strojovém překladu (MT). Navrhujeme postediční řešení, které formuluje problém jako vícetřídní klasifikační úlohu. Představujeme (i) automatickou anotaci anglických TQ v paralelním korpusu titulků a (ii) přístup využívající řadu klasifikátorů k predikci TQ tvarů, které používáme k posteditaci nejmodernějších MT výstupů. Naše metoda zajišťuje výrazné zlepšení v anglickém TQ překladu při překladu z češtiny, francouzštiny a němčiny, čímž zlepšuje plynulost, přirozenost, gramatickou správnost a pragmatickou koherenci výstupu MT.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis käsitleme probleemi genereerida inglise tag küsimused (TQs) (nt see on, kas pole?) masintõlkes (MT). Pakume välja trükisejärgse lahenduse, sõnastades probleemi mitmeklassilise klassifikatsiooni ülesandena. Esitleme (i) inglise keele TQde automaatset annoteerimist paralleelses subtiitrite korpuses ja (ii) lähenemisviisi, mis kasutab klassifitseerijate seeriat TQ vormide prognoosimiseks, mida kasutame kaasaegsete MT väljundite redigeerimiseks. Meie meetod võimaldab tšehhi, prantsuse ja saksa keelest tõlkimisel oluliselt parandada inglise keele tõlkimist, parandades omakorda MT väljundi sujuvust, loomulikkust, grammatilist korrektsust ja pragmaatilist sidusust.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme ongelmaa luoda englanninkielisiä tunnistekysymyksiä (TQs) (esim. se on, eikö olekin?) Machine Translation (MT). Ehdotamme jälkipainoksen ratkaisua, jossa ongelma muotoillaan moniluokkaisena luokittelutehtävänä. Esitämme (i) englanninkielisten TQ-lukujen automaattisen annotoinnin rinnakkaisessa tekstityskorpuksessa ja (ii) menetelmän, jossa käytetään TQ-muotojen ennustamiseen käytettäviä luokittelijoita, joita käytämme muokattaessa viimeisimpiä MT-tuotoksia. Menetelmämme tarjoaa merkittäviä parannuksia englanninkieliseen TQ-käännökseen tšekistä, ranskasta ja saksasta käännettäessä, mikä puolestaan parantaa MT-tuotoksen sujuvuutta, luonnollisuutta, kieliopillista oikeellisuutta ja käytännönläheistä johdonmukaisuutta.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתייחסים לבעיה של ליצור שאלות טגים אנגליות (TQs) (לדוגמא, זה נכון?) בתרגום מכונות (MT). אנחנו מציעים פתרון לאחר הדורה, מייצב את הבעיה כמשימה מסווג רבים. אנו מציגים (i) הערות אוטומטית של TQs אנגלית בקורפוס מקביל של תווים (ii) גישה בשימוש בסדרה של קלאסיפורים כדי לחזות טופסים TQ, שאנחנו משתמשים בהוצאות MT מצוינות לאחר העורך. Our method provides significant improvements in English TQ translation when translating from Czech, French and German, in turn improving the fluidity, naturalness, grammatical correctness and pragmatic coherence of MT output.', 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, kita diwurung perusahaan kanggo ngilanggar sapa pangan Inggris Nang Manculin Terjamahan (MT). We proposal a after-editing question, forming the question as a multi-category category task. Awak dhéwé nggunakake (i) ngerasakno ampungatan kanggo ngilangno-nggambar tarjamahan kanggo tarjamahan karo (i) dadi nyong seneng dolanan kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing dipolehasar kanggo ngerasakno Ko (T) sing wis nambah nambah dhéwé iso nguasakno sistem dadi nggawe barang-karang MT. Nalika dhéwé éntuk sing nglanggar bantuan kanggo tarjamahan kanggo Ketchika, Perancis lan alam kuwi etik, lan basa sing nggawe gerakan sampek kapan pasakno, pribadhaka, gram-itik lan pragmatik sing bakal terus tambah bantuan MT sing nyengkuyung.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã tambayar a matsalar ta samun su'a tagin Ingiriya (TQs) (misali, ne?) @ info: whatsthis Tuna goyyar da wata suluya a bayan-edition, mai bayyana matsayin kamar wani aikin mai daraja mai yawa. Tuna halatar da shirin farat ɗaya na TQs na Ingiriya cikin fanel na rubutu na subtitle da (i i) wata hanyoyi ta yi amfani da wasu fassara masu tsari dõmin ka yi bayani ga tsarin TQ, da za mu yi amfani da matsayin-bayan-edit state-of-the-art MT Outputs. @ item Spelling dictionary", 'sk': 'V prispevku obravnavamo problem generiranja angleških vprašanj oznak (TQs) (npr. je, kajne?) v strojnem prevajanju (MT). Predlagamo rešitev po izdaji, ki problem oblikuje kot nalogo večrazredne klasifikacije. Predstavljamo (i) avtomatsko označevanje angleških TQ-jev v vzporednem korpusu podnapisov in (ii) pristop z uporabo serije klasifikatorjev za napovedovanje TQ-jev, ki jih uporabljamo za urejanje najsodobnejših MT-izhodov. Naša metoda zagotavlja znatne izboljšave angleškega prevoda TQ pri prevajanju iz češčine, francoščine in nemščine, kar izboljšuje tekočost, naravnost, slovnično pravilnost in pragmatično koherenco MT izdelkov.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་གསར་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་བཤད་ཡོད། འདི་ནང་འཁོར་ཆས་ལུགས་པ(MT)ནང་དུ་འདུག ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག Our method provides significant improvements in English TQ translation when translating from Czech, French and German, in turn improving the fluidity, naturalness, grammatical correctness and pragmatic coherence of MT output.'}
{'en': 'Deciphering Related Languages', 'ar': 'فك رموز اللغات ذات الصلة', 'pt': 'Decifrando Idiomas Relacionados', 'fr': 'Déchiffrer les langues associées', 'es': 'Descifrar idiomas relacionados', 'ja': '関連言語の解読', 'ru': 'Расшифровка связанных языков', 'zh': '破译相关语', 'hi': 'संबंधित भाषाओं को समझना', 'ga': 'Teangacha Gaolmhara a Dhíscaipeadh', 'hu': 'Kapcsolódó nyelvek dekódolása', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αποκωδικοποίηση σχετικών γλωσσών', 'kk': 'Тілдерді шешіру', 'it': 'Decifrare lingue correlate', 'lt': 'Deciphering Related Languages', 'mk': 'Дешифрирање на поврзани јазици', 'ms': 'Menghapuskan Bahasa Terkait', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകള്\u200d ഡിസിപ്പാര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Id-deċifrazzjoni tal-lingwi relatati', 'mn': 'Хамааралтай хэлнүүдийг шийдвэрлэх', 'no': 'Desifering av tilhøyrande språk', 'pl': 'Odszyfrowanie języków pokrewnych', 'ro': 'Decriperea limbilor conexe', 'sr': 'Dešifracija vezanih jezika', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවන් විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Qaybinta luqadaha la xiriira', 'ta': 'தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளை குறைக்கிறது', 'sv': 'Avkoda relaterade språk', 'ur': 'Related Languages Decrypting', 'uz': 'BogĘ»liq tillarni yigĘ»ish', 'vi': 'Giải mã Ngôn ngữ liên quan', 'nl': 'Gerelateerde talen ontcijferen', 'da': 'Afkodning af relaterede sprog', 'bg': 'Дешифриране на свързани езици', 'hr': 'Dešifracija vezanih jezika', 'de': 'Entschlüsselung verwandter Sprachen', 'id': 'Menghapus Bahasa Terhubung', 'ko': '관련 언어를 해독하다.', 'sw': 'Lugha zinazohusiana', 'fa': 'کشف زبانهای مربوط به', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e gjuhëve të lidhura', 'af': 'Verwyder Verwante Taal', 'tr': 'Diller çykarmak', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች', 'bn': 'সম্পর্কিত ভাষা অবতরণ করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'ńįliŇükili Dill…ôri S…ôhifl…ôt', 'hy': 'Համաբերված լեզուների բացահայտումը', 'cs': 'Dešifrování souvisejících jazyků', 'bs': 'Dešifracija vezanih jezika', 'ca': 'Descifrar llengües relacionades', 'et': 'Seotud keelte dekifreerimine', 'fi': 'Aiheeseen liittyvien kielten purkaminen', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'sk': 'Dešifriranje sorodnih jezikov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Deciphering Related Languages', 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་བཤིག་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a method for translating texts between close language pairs. The method does not require parallel data, and it does not require the languages to be written in the same script. We show results for six language pairs : Afrikaans / Dutch, Bosnian / Serbian, Danish / Swedish, Macedonian / Bulgarian, Malaysian / Indonesian, and Polish / Belorussian. We report BLEU scores showing our method to outperform others that do not use parallel data.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة لترجمة النصوص بين أزواج اللغات المتقاربة. لا تتطلب الطريقة بيانات متوازية ولا تتطلب كتابة اللغات بنفس النص. نعرض نتائج ستة أزواج من اللغات: الأفريكانية / الهولندية ، البوسنية / الصربية ، الدنماركية / السويدية ، المقدونية / البلغارية ، الماليزية / الإندونيسية ، والبولندية / البيلاروسية. نُبلغ عن نتائج BLEU التي توضح طريقتنا في التفوق في الأداء على الآخرين الذين لا يستخدمون البيانات المتوازية.', 'es': 'Presentamos un método para traducir textos entre pares de idiomas cercanos. El método no requiere datos paralelos y no requiere que los idiomas estén escritos en el mismo alfabeto. Mostramos los resultados para seis pares de idiomas: afrikaans/holandés, bosnio/serbio, danés/sueco, macedonio/búlgaro, malasio/indonesio y polaco/bielorruso. Presentamos puntuaciones BLEU que muestran nuestro método para superar a otros que no utilizan datos paralelos.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um método para tradução de textos entre pares de idiomas próximos. O método não requer dados paralelos e não requer que as linguagens sejam escritas no mesmo script. Mostramos resultados para seis pares de idiomas: africâner/holandês, bósnio/sérvio, dinamarquês/sueco, macedônio/búlgaro, malaio/indonésio e polonês/bielorrusso. Relatamos pontuações BLEU mostrando que nosso método supera outros que não usam dados paralelos.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une méthode de traduction de textes entre des paires de langues proches. La méthode ne nécessite pas de données parallèles et ne nécessite pas que les langues soient écrites dans le même script. Nous affichons les résultats pour six paires de langues\xa0: afrikaans/néerlandais, bosniaque/serbe, danois/suédois, macédonien/bulgare, malaisien/indonésien et polonais/biélorusse. Nous rapportons les scores de l'UEBL montrant que notre méthode surpasse les autres qui n'utilisent pas de données parallèles.", 'ja': '密接な言語ペア間でテキストを翻訳する方法を提示します。メソッドは並列データを必要とせず、言語を同じスクリプトで書く必要もありません。アフリカーンス語/オランダ語、ボスニア語/セルビア語、デンマーク語/スウェーデン語、マケドニア語/ブルガリア語、マレーシア語/インドネシア語、ポーランド語/ベロルシア語の6つの言語ペアの結果を示します。並列データを使用しない他社を上回る方法を示すBLEUスコアを報告します。', 'zh': '我们出了一种密密的话对译文本的方法。 其法不须并行数据,亦不求用同脚本编语。 示六语:南非荷兰语/荷兰语,波斯尼亚语/塞尔维亚语,丹麦语/瑞典语,马其顿语/保加利亚语,马来西亚语/印度尼西亚语波兰语/白俄罗斯语。 吾告BLEU分数,示优于不用并行数据也。', 'hi': 'हम करीबी भाषा जोड़े के बीच ग्रंथों का अनुवाद करने के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। विधि को समानांतर डेटा की आवश्यकता नहीं है, और इसे भाषाओं को एक ही स्क्रिप्ट में लिखे जाने की आवश्यकता नहीं है। हम छह भाषा जोड़े के लिए परिणाम दिखाते हैं: अफ्रीकी / डच, बोस्नियाई / सर्बियाई, डेनिश / स्वीडिश, मैसेडोनियन / बल्गेरियाई, मलेशियाई / इंडोनेशियाई, और पोलिश / बेलोरूसियन। हम BLEU स्कोर की रिपोर्ट करते हैं जो समानांतर डेटा का उपयोग नहीं करने वाले अन्य लोगों को पछाड़ने के लिए हमारी विधि दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Предложен способ перевода текстов между близкими языковыми парами. Метод не требует параллельных данных и не требует, чтобы языки были написаны одним и тем же скриптом. Мы показываем результаты для шести языковых пар: африкаанс/голландский, боснийский/сербский, датский/шведский, македонский/болгарский, малайзийский/индонезийский и польский/белорусский. Мы сообщаем о баллах BLEU, показывающих, что наш метод превосходит другие, которые не используют параллельные данные.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair modh chun téacsanna a aistriú idir péirí teangacha dlúth. Ní éilíonn an modh sonraí comhthreomhara, agus ní éilíonn sé go mbeadh na teangacha scríofa sa script chéanna. Léiríonn muid torthaí do shé phéire teanga: Afracáinis/Ollainnis, Boisnis/Seirbis, Danmhairgis/Sualainnis, Macadóinis/Bulgáiris, Malaeisia/Indinéisis, agus Polainnis/Bealarúisis. Tuairiscímid scóir BLEU a thaispeánann ár modh le bheith níos fearr ná cinn eile nach n-úsáideann sonraí comhthreomhara.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ტექსტის გადატვირთვას დახურების ზოგების შორის მეტი. პროცემი არ იჭირდება პარალელური მონაცემები, და ის არ უნდა იგივე სკრიპტში წერა ენები. ჩვენ ქვсть ენის ზოგების შედეგები ჩვენებთ: აფრიკანეთი/დონდენეთი, ბოსნეთი/სერბი, დენური/შვედიანი, მაკედონეთი/ბულდარიი, მალაიზიან/ინედონეთი და პოლიქური/ბელორსური ჩვენ შეგვიყვანეთ BLEU წერტილებები, რომლებიც ჩვენი მეთოდის გამოყენება სხვებს, რომლებიც არ გამოყენებენ პარალელური მონაცემები.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο για τη μετάφραση κειμένων μεταξύ κοντινών γλωσσικών ζευγαριών. Η μέθοδος δεν απαιτεί παράλληλα δεδομένα και δεν απαιτεί να γραφτούν οι γλώσσες στην ίδια γραφή. Παρουσιάζουμε αποτελέσματα για έξι γλωσσικά ζεύγη: Αφρικανικά/Ολλανδικά, Βοσνιακά/Σερβικά, Δανικά/Σουηδικά, Μακεδονικά/Βουλγαρικά, Μαλαισία/Ινδονησιακά και Πολωνικά/Λευκορωσικά. Αναφέρουμε βαθμολογίες που δείχνουν τη μέθοδο μας να ξεπεράσουμε άλλους που δεν χρησιμοποιούν παράλληλα δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a közeli nyelvpárok közötti szövegfordítási módszert. A módszer nem igényel párhuzamos adatokat, és nem igényli, hogy a nyelveket ugyanabban a parancsfájlban írják. Hat nyelvpárra vonatkozó eredményeket mutatunk: afrikaans/holland, bosnyák/szerb, dán/svéd, macedón/bolgár, maláj/indonéz és lengyel/belorusz. Jelentjük a BLEU pontszámokat, amelyek azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk van felülmúlni mások teljesítményét, akik nem használnak párhuzamos adatokat.', 'kk': 'Мәтіндерді жабу тілдерінің арасында аудару әдісін таңдаймыз. Әдісі параллель деректерді талап етпейді, және ол тілдерді бір скриптте жазуға талап етпейді. Алты тіл екі нәтижелерін көрсету керек: Африкан/голландша, Босния/сербша, Дания/Швед, Македония/Болгарша, Малайзия/Индонезия және Польша/Белорусша. Біз BLEU нәтижелерімізді параллель деректерді қолданбаған басқалардың әдісінен шығаруын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame tekstų vertimo tarp artimų kalbų porų metodą. Šis metodas nereikalauja lygiagrečių duomenų ir nereikalauja, kad kalbos būtų rašomos tame pačiame scenarijuje. Rodome rezultatus šešioms kalbų poroms: afrikiečiams/olandų, bosnijos/serbų, danų/švedų, makedonų/bulgarų, malaizijos/Indonezijos ir lenkų/belorusų. Mes pranešame apie BLEU rezultatus, rodančius metodą, kaip atlikti kitus, kurie nenaudoja lygiagrečių duomenų, rezultatus.', 'it': 'Presentiamo un metodo per tradurre testi tra coppie linguistiche vicine. Il metodo non richiede dati paralleli e non richiede che le lingue siano scritte nello stesso script. Vengono mostrati i risultati per sei coppie di lingue: Afrikaans/Olandese, Bosniaco/Serbo, Danese/Svedese, Macedone/Bulgaro, Malese/Indonesiano e Polacco/Bielorussia. Riportiamo punteggi BLEU che mostrano il nostro metodo per superare gli altri che non utilizzano dati paralleli.', 'mk': 'Презентираме метод за преведување на текстови помеѓу блиски јазички парови. Методот не бара паралелни податоци и не бара јазиците да бидат напишани во истиот скрипт. Прикажуваме резултати за шест парови јазици: африканци/холандски, босански/српски, дански/шведски, македонски/бугарски, малезиски/индонезиски и полски/белоруски. Ние известуваме за оценките на БЛЕУ кои го покажуваат нашиот метод за надминување на другите кои не користат паралелни податоци.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത ഭാഷയുടെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d ഞങ The method does not require parallel data, and it does not require the languages to be written in the same script.  ആറു ഭാഷ ഇണകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു; ആഫ്രിക്കാന്\u200dസ്/ഡച്ച്, ബോസ്നിയന്\u200d/സെര്\u200dബിയന്\u200d, ഡാനിഷ്/സ്വീഡിയന്\u200d, മാസിഡോണിയന്\u200d, ബ നമ്മള്\u200d ബ്ലെയു സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ രീതികള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് മറ്റുള്ളവരെ പാര', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw metodu għat-traduzzjoni tat-testi bejn pari lingwistiċi qrib. The method does not require parallel data, and it does not require the languages to be written in the same script.  Aħna nuru riżultati għal sitt pari lingwistiċi: Afrikani/Olandiżi, Bosnjani/Serbi, Daniżi/Svediżi, Maċedoniżi/Bulgari, Malasjani/Indoneżjani, u Pollakki/Belorussi. Aħna nirrappurtaw punteġġi BLEU li juru l-metodu tagħna biex inqabżu oħrajn li ma jużawx dejta parallela.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan kaedah untuk menerjemahkan teks antara pasangan bahasa dekat. Kaedah ini tidak memerlukan data selari, dan ia tidak memerlukan bahasa untuk ditulis dalam skrip yang sama. Kami menunjukkan keputusan untuk enam pasangan bahasa: Afrikaan/Belanda, Bosnia/Serbia, Danish/Swedish, Macedonian/Bulgarian, Malaysia/Indonesia, dan Polish/Belorussia. Kami laporkan skor BLEU menunjukkan kaedah kami untuk melampaui cara lain yang tidak menggunakan data selari.', 'mn': 'Бид ойрхон хэл хоёр хоорондоо текстүүдийг орлуулах арга загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Учир нь параллел өгөгдлийн шаардлагагүй, тэр нь хэл ижил скрипт дээр бичих шаардлагагүй. Бид зургаан хэл хоёрын үр дүнг харуулж байна: Африк/Дач, Босны/Серб, Дан/Швед, Македон/Болгари, Малайзийн/Индонезийн, Польшин/Белорус. Бид БЛЕУ-ын оноо нь параллел өгөгдлийг ашиглахгүй бусад хүмүүсээс илүү ашиглах аргыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein metode for å oversette tekstar mellom lukka språkparar. Metoden krev ikkje parallelle data, og det krev ikkje at språka skal skrivast i det same skriptet. Vi viser resultat for seks språkport: Afrikaans/nederland, bosnisk/serbisk, dansk/svensk, Makedonsk/bulgarsk, malaysisk/Indonesisk og polsk/belorussisk. Vi rapporterer BLEU-poeng som viser metoden vårt for å utføra andre som ikkje brukar parallelle data.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o metodă de traducere a textelor între perechi strânse de limbi. Metoda nu necesită date paralele și nu necesită ca limbile să fie scrise în același script. Afișăm rezultate pentru șase perechi de limbi: afrikaans/olandeză, bosniacă/sârbă, daneză/suedeză, macedoneană/bulgară, malaeziană/indoneziană și poloneză/belorusă. Raportăm scorurile BLEU care arată metoda noastră de a depăși performanțele altora care nu utilizează date paralele.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo metodu za prevod tekstova između bliskih jezičkih parova. Metod ne zahteva paralelne podatke, i ne zahteva da se jezici napišu u istom skriptu. Mi pokazujemo rezultate za šest jezičkih parova: afrikanci/holandski, bosanski/srbijanski, danski/švedski, Makedonski/bugarski, malajski/Indonezijski i poljski/belorusijanci. Prijavljujemo rezultate BLEU-a koji pokazuju našu metodu da izvedemo druge koji ne koriste paralelne podatke.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy metodę tłumaczenia tekstów pomiędzy bliskimi parami językowymi. Metoda ta nie wymaga równoległych danych i nie wymaga, aby języki były napisane w tym samym skryptie. Pokazujemy wyniki dla sześciu par językowych: afrykański/holenderski, bośniacki/serbski, duński/szwedzki, macedoński/bułgarski, malezyjski/indonezyjski oraz polski/białoruski. Raportujemy wyniki BLEU pokazujące naszą metodę przewyższania innych, którzy nie korzystają z danych równoległych.', 'si': 'අපි පිළිබඳු භාෂාවක් අතර පරිවර්තනය කරන්න විධානයක් තියෙනවා. විධානය සමාන්\u200dය දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ, ඒ වගේම භාෂාව එකම ස්ක්\u200dරිප්ටයෙන් ලියවන්න අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ. අපි භාෂාව හතරක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ: අෆ්\u200dරිකාන්ස්/ඩච්ච්, බොස්නියාන්/සෙර්බියාන්, ඩැනිෂ්/ස්වීඩිෂ්, මැ අපි බ්ලූයුස් ප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධාන ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරයෝජන කරන්න අනිත් දේවල් ප්\u200dරයෝජන නොකරන', 'so': 'Waxaynu keennaa qaab ay ku turjumaan qoraalka u dhexeeya labo af dhow. Midabka looma baahna macluumaad isku mid ah, loomana baahna in luqadaha lagu qoro isku skript. We show results for six language pairs: Afrikaans/Dutch, Bosnian/Serbian, Danish/Swedish, Macedonian/Bulgarian, Malaysian/Indonesian, and Polish/Belorussian.  Waxaannu wargelinaynaa kooxaha BLEU oo tusaya qaababka aan u sameynno kuwa kale oo aan isticmaalin macluumaad lambarka ah.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en metod för att översätta texter mellan nära språkpar. Metoden kräver inte parallella data och det kräver inte att språken skrivs i samma skript. Vi visar resultat för sex språkpar: afrikaans/nederländska, bosniska/serbiska, danska/svenska, makedonska/bulgariska, malaysiska/indonesiska och polska/vitryska. Vi rapporterar BLEU-poäng som visar vår metod att överträffa andra som inte använder parallella data.', 'ta': 'நாம் மொழி ஜோடிகளுக்கிடையே மொழிகளை மொழிபெயர்ப்பதற்கு ஒரு முறையை கொண்டுள்ளோம். The method does not require parallel data, and it does not require the languages to be written in the same script.  ஆறு மொழி ஜோடிகளுக்கு நாம் முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறோம்: ஆப்ரிக்கா/டச், போஸ்னியன்/செர்பியன், டானிஷ்/ஸ்வீடியன், மாசிடோனியன்/புலேகிரியா நாங்கள் பிலியு மதிப்பெண்களை அறிவிக்கிறோம் இணைய தரவை பயன்படுத்தாது மற்றவர்களை விட முறையில் காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم نزدیک زبان جوڑوں کے درمیان مترجم کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں۔ اس طریقہ کی پارالی ڈیٹا کی ضرورت نہیں ہے، اور اس کے لئے ایک ہی سکرپٹ میں لکھنے کی زبانیں نہیں کی ضرورت ہے. ہم چھ زبان جوڑوں کے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں: آفریقکان/ڈچ، بوسنی/سربین، دنی/سوئدی، مکڈونی/بلغارین، مالسی/انڈونزین، اور پولیش/بلرورسی. ہم BLEU اسکوروں کو راپورت کرتے ہیں کہ ہمارے طریقے کو دکھاتے ہیں اور دوسروں کو جو مشابل ڈیٹا استعمال نہیں کرتے۔', 'uz': "Biz yaxshi tilning ikki xil qo'llari orasidagi matnlarni tarjima qilish usulini hosil qilamiz. Uskuna parallel maʼlumot kerak emas, va bitta skriptda yozish uchun tillar kerak emas. Biz sakkizcha tillar uchun natijalarini ko'rsamiz: Afrika/Dutch, Bosniya/Serbcha, Danish/Sweden, MakedoniyaName Biz BLEU'ning qiymatlarini ko'rsatishimiz usulini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, balki parametrlarni ishlatilmagan boshqalarni bajarishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp dịch văn bản giữa cặp ngôn ngữ gần. Phương pháp này không yêu cầu dữ liệu song song, và nó không yêu cầu ngôn ngữ được viết bằng cùng một văn lệnh. Chúng tôi có kết quả về sáu cặp ngôn ngữ: Africans/Dutch, Bosnia/Serbia, Đan Mạch/Thụy Điển, Macedonia/Bulgaria, Malaysia/Indonesia, và Ba Lan/Belem. Chúng tôi báo cáo các điểm của đại diện cho phương pháp của chúng tôi để vượt trội các loại không dùng dữ liệu song song.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo metodu prevoda teksta između bliskih jezičkih parova. Metod ne zahtijeva paralelne podatke i ne zahtijeva da se jezici napišu u istom skriptu. Mi pokazujemo rezultate za šest jezičkih parova: Afrikaans/Dutch, Bosnian/Serbian, Danish/Swedish, Makedonski/Bugarski, Malajski/Indonezijski i poljski/Belorusijski. Prijavljujemo rezultate BLEU-a koji pokazuju našu metodu nadmaženja drugih koji ne koriste paralelne podatke.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een methode voor het vertalen van teksten tussen nauwe taalparen. De methode vereist geen parallelle gegevens en het vereist niet dat de talen in hetzelfde script worden geschreven. We tonen resultaten voor zes taalparen: Afrikaans/Nederlands, Bosnisch/Servisch, Deens/Zweeds, Macedonisch/Bulgaars, Maleisisch/Indonesisch en Pools/Wit-Russisch. We rapporteren BLEU scores die onze methode laten zien om beter te presteren dan anderen die geen parallelle gegevens gebruiken.', 'bg': 'Представяме метод за превод на текстове между близки езикови двойки. Методът не изисква паралелни данни и не изисква езиците да бъдат написани в един и същ скрипт. Показваме резултати за шест езикови двойки: африкански/холандски, босненски/сръбски, датски/шведски, македонски/български, малайзийски/индонезийски и полски/белоруски. Ние отчитаме резултати, показващи нашия метод да надмине други, които не използват паралелни данни.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine Methode zur Übersetzung von Texten zwischen engen Sprachpaaren. Die Methode erfordert keine parallelen Daten und erfordert nicht, dass die Sprachen in demselben Skript geschrieben werden. Wir zeigen Ergebnisse für sechs Sprachpaare: Afrikaans/Niederländisch, Bosnisch/Serbisch, Dänisch/Schwedisch, Mazedonisch/Bulgarisch, Malaysisch/Indonesisch und Polnisch/Weißrussisch. Wir melden BLEU-Scores, die unsere Methode zeigen, andere zu übertreffen, die keine parallelen Daten verwenden.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan metode untuk menerjemahkan teks antara pasangan bahasa dekat. Metode ini tidak membutuhkan data paralel, dan tidak membutuhkan bahasa untuk ditulis dalam skrip yang sama. Kami menunjukkan hasil untuk enam pasangan bahasa: Afrikaans/Belanda, Bosnia/Serbia, Danish/Swedish, Macedonian/Bulgaria, Malaysia/Indonesia, dan Polandia/Belarus. Kami melaporkan skor BLEU menunjukkan metode kami untuk melampaui cara lain yang tidak menggunakan data paralel.', 'ko': '우리는 긴밀한 언어 대조 사이에서 텍스트를 번역하는 방법을 제시했다.이 방법은 병렬 데이터도 필요 없고 같은 스크립트에서 언어를 작성할 필요도 없다.우리는 남아프리카 네덜란드어/네덜란드어, 보스니아어/세르비아어, 덴마크어/스웨덴어, 마케도니아어/불가리아어, 말레이시아어/인도네시아어와 폴란드어/백러시아어 여섯 가지 언어를 맞춘 결과를 보여 주었다.우리는 평행 데이터를 사용하지 않는 다른 방법보다 BLEU 점수를 보고했습니다.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش برای ترجمه کردن متن بین جفت زبان نزدیک را نشان می دهیم. این روش نیاز به داده\u200cهای متفاوتی نیست، و نیاز به زبانها در یک نوشته نوشته شود. ما نتیجه\u200cهای شش جفت زبان را نشان می\u200cدهیم: آفریقایی/هلندی، بوسنی/سربی، دانش/سوئدی، مایکدونی/بلگاری، مالایزی/اندونیزی و لهستانی/بلوروسی. ما گزارش دادیم امتیاز BLEU که روش ما را نشان می دهد تا بیشتر از بقیه که از داده های متفاوتی استفاده نمی کنند.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka njia ya kutafsiri maandishi kati ya wanandoa wa lugha za karibu. Utawala hauhitaji taarifa za usambazaji, na haihitaji lugha za kuandikwa katika manuscript moja. Tunaonyesha matokeo kwa wanaume sita wa lugha: Waafrika/Dutch, Bosnia/Serbia, Danish/Sweden, Kimasedonia/Bulgaria, Malaysia/Indonesia, na Polish/Belorussia. We report BLEU scores showing our method to outperform others that do not use parallel data.', 'tr': 'Biz ýakyn dil çiftleri arasynda metinleri terjime etmek üçin bir täze görkeýäris. Metin parallel maglumaty gerek däl we ol dilleriň bir skriptde ýazmagyny gerek däl. Alty dil çift üçin netijeleri görkezýäris: Afrikaans/Dutch, Bosniýa/Serbça, Dança/Şwedçe, Makedonça/Bulgarça, Maleziýa/Indoneziýa we Polonça/Belorusça. Biz BLEU sanlarymyzy parallel maglumatlaryny ulanmaýan başgalarymyzy üstün etmäge görkezýäris.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një metodë për përkthimin e teksteve midis çifteve të ngushta gjuhësh. Metoda nuk kërkon të dhëna paralele dhe nuk kërkon që gjuhët të shkruhen në të njëjtin script. Ne tregojmë rezultate për gjashtë çifte gjuhësh: afrikanët/hollandezët, boshnjakët/serbët, danezët/suedezët, maqedonasit/bullgarët, malaizianët/Indonezianët dhe polakët/beloruzët. Ne raportojmë rezultatet e BLEU-së që tregojnë metodën tonë për të kaluar të tjerët që nuk përdorin të dhëna paralele.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n metode om teks te vertaling tussen toemaak taal paar. Die metode benodig nie parallele data nie, en dit benodig nie die tale om in dieselfde skrip te skryf nie. Ons wys resultate vir ses taal paar: Afrikaans/Dutch, Bosniese/Serbiese, Daniese/Swedese, Makedoniese/Bulgarse, Maleise/Indonées en Poles/Belorussie. Ons rapporteer BLEU-punte wat ons metode wys om ander te uitvoer wat nie parallele data gebruik nie.", 'am': "የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሁለት መካከለኛ ጽሑፎችን ለመትረጉም ልማድ እናቀርባለን፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ለስድስት ቋንቋ ዓይነቶች ፍሬቶችን እናሳየዋለን: አፍሪካውያን/ድል፣ ቦስኒያዊ/ሰርቢያን፣ ዳንስ/ስዊድን፣ ማዶዶንያ/ቡልጋሪያን፣ ማሎሻዊ/印ንዶኒያዊ፣ ፖሊሽ/ቤሎሩሽኛ፡፡ የብልዩን ደረጃዎች እናሳየዋለን እናስታውቃለን፡፡", 'az': 'Yaxın dil çiftləri arasında metinləri tercümə etmək üçün bir yolu göstəririk. Bu metod paralel məlumatlarına ehtiyacı yoxdur, və dillərin aynı skriptdə yazılmasına ehtiyacı yoxdur. Biz altı dil çift sonuçlarını göstəririk: Afrikaans/Dutch, Bosnian/Serbian, Danish/Swedish, Macedonian/Bulgarian, Malaysian/Indonezian və Polonyan/Belorussian. Biz BLEU nöqtələrini bildiririk ki, paralel məlumatları istifadə etməyən başqalarından üstün olmaq üçün metodumuzu göstərir.', 'bn': 'We present a method for translating texts between close language pairs.  এই পদ্ধতি প্যারালেল ডাটা প্রয়োজন নেই এবং একই স্ক্রিপ্টে লেখার জন্য ভাষা প্রয়োজন নেই। আমরা আফ্রিকান/ডাচ, বোস্নিয়ান/সার্বিয়ান, ড্যানিশ/সুইডিয়া, ম্যাসেডোনিয়ান/বুলগেরিয়ান/মালয়েশিয়া/ইন্দোনেশিয়ান এবং পোলিশ/বেলোর আমরা বিলিউ স্কোর প্রতিবেদন করছি যেখানে অন্যান্যদের প্যারালেল ডাটা ব্যবহার করে না তাদের প্রদর্শন করা আমাদের পদ্ধ', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo metodu za prevod tekstova između bliskih jezičkih parova. Metod ne zahtijeva paralelne podatke, i ne zahtijeva da se jezici napišu u istom skriptu. Mi pokazujemo rezultate za šest jezičkih parova: Afrikaans/Dutch, Bosnian/Serbian, Danish/Swedish, Makedonski/Bugarski, Malajski/Indonezijanski i poljski/Belorusijanski. Prijavljujemo rezultate BLEU-a koji pokazuju našu metodu nadmaženja drugih koji ne koriste paralelne podatke.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք հաղորդագրություններ թարգմանելու մեթոդ մոտ լեզվի զույգերի միջև: Մեթոդը պահանջում է զուգահեռ տվյալներ, և չի պահանջում, որ լեզուները գրվեն նույն գրվածքում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս վեց լեզվի զույգերի արդյունքները՝ աֆրիկացի, հոլանդացի, բոսնիացի, սերբի, դանիացի, շվեդիացի, մաքսեդոնացի, բուլերենի, մալազիացի, ինդոնեզիացի և պոլանդի և բելորուսացի համար: Մենք զեկուցում ենք ԲԼԵՎ-ի գնահատականները, որոնք ցույց են տալիս մեր մեթոդը, որպեսզի դուրս գանք ուրիշներին, ովքեր զուգահեռ տվյալներ չեն օգտագործում:', 'ca': 'Presentam un mètode de traducció de textos entre parelles de llenguatges estrets. El mètode no requereix dades paralleles i no requereix que les llengües siguin escrites en la mateixa escriptura. Mostrem resultats per sis parells de llengües: africans/holandeses, bosnians/sèrbics, danès/suec, macedònic/búlgric, malàsia/Indonèsia i polac/belorussia. Informem de puntuacions BLEU que mostren el nostre mètode per superar altres que no utilitzen dades paralleles.', 'cs': 'Představujeme metodu překladu textů mezi blízkými jazykovými páry. Metoda nevyžaduje paralelní data a nevyžaduje, aby jazyky byly psány ve stejném skriptu. Ukazujeme výsledky pro šest jazykových párů: afrikánština/nizozemština, bosenština/srbština, dánština/švédština, makedonština/bulharština, malajština/indonéština a polština/běloruština. Nahlásíme skóre BLEU ukazující naši metodu překonat ostatní, kteří nepoužívají paralelní data.', 'et': 'Esitleme meetodit tekstide tõlkimiseks lähedaste keelepaaride vahel. Meetod ei nõua paralleelseid andmeid ega nõua keelte kirjutamist samas skriptis. Näitame tulemusi kuue keelepaari kohta: afrikaani/hollandi, bosnia/serbia, taani/rootsi, makedoonia/bulgaaria, malaia/indoneesia ja poola/valgevene keel. Raporteerime BLEU skoorid, mis näitavad meie meetodit ületada teisi, kes ei kasuta paralleelseid andmeid.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme menetelmän kääntää tekstejä läheisten kieliparien välillä. Menetelmä ei vaadi rinnakkaisia tietoja, eikä se vaadi kielien kirjoittamista samalla skriptillä. Näytetään tulokset kuudelle kieliparille: afrikaans/hollanti, bosnia/serbia, tanska/ruotsi, makedonia/bulgaria, malesia/indonesia ja puola/valkovenäjä. Raportoimme BLEU-pisteet, jotka osoittavat menetelmämme suoriutua paremmin kuin muut, jotka eivät käytä rinnakkaisia tietoja.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en metode til oversættelse af tekster mellem tætte sprogpar. Metoden kræver ikke parallelle data, og det kræver ikke, at sprogene skal skrives i samme script. Vi viser resultater for seks sprogpar: afrikaans/hollandsk, bosnisk/serbisk, dansk/svensk, makedonsk/bulgarsk, malaysisk/indonesisk og polsk/belarussisk. Vi rapporterer BLEU-resultater, der viser vores metode til at overgå andre, der ikke bruger parallelle data.', 'jv': 'text Perintah sing ora disimpen data yang paraleling, dan akeh ora nyatakake dilané surat kanggo sampeyan seng. Awak dhéwé menehi kayat telas karo nganggo urip: Afrika kaans/Daulan, Bokse/Sarbiya, Danis/Sued, Makeduwan/Bolgari, malasi/Ndoles, Nyoleh/Bihorusian. Awak dhéwé ngertuan Neri-Neri kanggo ngerasakno tentang kanggo ngerasakno Perintah sing ora nggambar barang sampek dadi nyong.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים שיטה לתרגם טקסטים בין זוגות שפות קרובות. השיטה לא דורשת נתונים מקבילים, והיא לא דורשת שכתוב את השפות באותו תסריט. אנחנו מראים תוצאות לשישה זוגות שפות: אפריקאים/הולנדים, בוסנים/סרביים, דנים/שוודים, מקדונים/בולגרים, מלזיים/אינדונזיים, ופולנים/בלורוסים. אנחנו מדווחים על נקודות BLEU שמראות את השיטה שלנו להעביר אחרים שלא משתמשים במידע מקביל.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo metodo prevajanja besedil med tesnimi jezikovnimi pari. Metoda ne zahteva vzporednih podatkov in ne zahteva, da so jeziki napisani v isti pisavi. Prikazujemo rezultate za šest jezikovnih parov: afrikaans/nizozemski, bosanski/srbski, danski/švedski, makedonski/bolgarski, malezijski/indonezijski in poljski/beloruski. Poročamo rezultate BLEU, ki kažejo našo metodo, da presežemo druge, ki ne uporabljajo vzporednih podatkov.', 'ha': "Tuna zuwa wani hanyoyi wa fassarar littãfi a tsakanin nau'i-nau'i. @ info: whatsthis Tuna nũna matsala wa nau'i 6-harshe: Afrikaansa/Duch, Boshaniya/Sarbiyan, Danish/Iswidish, Macedonian/Bulgaria, Malasian/Indoneziya, kuma Polish/Belorussian. Muna buga wani akan BLEU na nuna hanyoyinmu da za'a sami wasu waɗanda ba su yi amfani da data masu daidaita.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྒོ་རྒྱག་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་འདུག The method does not require parallel data, and it does not require the languages to be written in the same script. ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་མངོན་འཆར་བྱུང་། ཨཕ་རི་ཀཱན་/Dutch, Bosnian/Serbian, Danish/Swedish, Macedonian/Bulgarian, Malaysian/Indonesian, and Polish/Belorussian. ང་ཚོས་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་པ་ཡིག་ཚང་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Identifying Cognate Sets Across Dictionaries of Related Languages', 'ar': 'تحديد المجموعات المماثلة عبر قواميس اللغات ذات الصلة', 'es': 'Identificación de conjuntos afines en diccionarios de idiomas relacionados', 'fr': "Identification d'ensembles apparentés dans les dictionnaires de langues associées", 'pt': 'Identificando conjuntos cognatos em dicionários de idiomas relacionados', 'ja': '関連する言語の辞書間でのコグネイトセットの識別', 'zh': '跨相关语言词典识同源集', 'hi': 'संबंधित भाषाओं के शब्दकोशों में संज्ञानात्मक सेट की पहचान करना', 'ru': 'Определение когнатных наборов в словарях родственных языков', 'ga': 'Tacair Ghaolmhara a Aithint Trasna Foclóirí de Theangacha Gaolmhara', 'hu': 'Kongnitált készletek azonosítása a kapcsolódó nyelvek szótáraiban', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση γνωστών συνόλων σε λεξικά σχετικών γλωσσών', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Сәйкес тілдердің сөздіктерінің біріктіру', 'it': 'Identificazione di insiemi cognitivi in dizionari di lingue correlate', 'mk': 'Идентификување на поставувања на коњи низ речниците на поврзаните јазици', 'ml': 'ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ നിഘണ്ടുകളില്\u200d കോഗ്നേറ്റ് സെറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Tetapan Cognate Melalui Kamus Bahasa Terhubung', 'lt': 'Susijusių kalbų žodynų duomenų rinkinių nustatymas', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ settijiet ta’ kunjetti bejn id-Dikjanarji ta’ Lingwi Relatati', 'mn': 'Cognate Sets-г холбоотой хэлнүүдийн хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлох', 'ro': 'Identificarea seturilor Cognate în dicționare de limbi conexe', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Identyfikowanie zestawów kognitnatów w słownikach języków pokrewnych', 'sr': 'Identifikacija kogneta postavlja preko rečnika povezanih jezika', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවන්ගේ සංවිධානය සැකසුම් සංවිධානය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Identifiera kognitiva uppsättningar över ordlistor med relaterade språk', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada koorsooyinka luqadaha la xiriira', 'ta': 'தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளின் அகராதிகளை அடையாளமாக்கு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Xác định Cognate Đặt Vượt xúc Từ điển của Ngôn ngữ liên quan', 'hr': 'Identifikacija kognate postavlja preko riječi povezanih jezika', 'nl': 'Identificeren van cognate sets in woordenboeken van verwante talen', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на конгатни набори в речници на сродни езици', 'da': 'Identificering af Cognate-sæt på tværs af ordbøger med beslægtede sprog', 'ko': '관련 언어 사전의 동원어집을 식별하다', 'fa': 'شناسایی مجموعه\u200cهای کوگناتی در کلمات\u200cهای زبان ارتباط قرار می\u200cدهد', 'de': 'Identifizieren von Cognate Sets in Wörterbüchern verwandter Sprachen', 'id': 'Identifikasi Sets Cognate Melalui Kamus Bahasa Terhubung', 'sw': 'Kutambua Ushirika', 'tr': 'Cognat Dilleriň sözlerni tanyşdyrylýar', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i përcaktimeve nëpërmjet fjalorëve të gjuhëve të lidhura', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Համաբերված լեզուների բառարանների միջև տեղեկացված ճանաչում', 'bn': 'সম্পর্কিত ভাষার অভিভাবকগুলোর পরিচয় চিহ্নিত করা হবে', 'az': 'İlişkilərin Sözlüklərindən Cognate Setlərini tanıma', 'bs': 'Identifikacija kognata postavlja preko riječi povezanih jezika', 'cs': 'Identifikace kognitních sad napříč slovníky souvisejících jazyků', 'et': 'Cognite komplektide tuvastamine seotud keelte sõnaraamatutes', 'ca': 'Identificar connexions a través dels diccionaris de llengües relacionades', 'fi': 'Kogniittijoukkojen tunnistaminen eri kielisanakirjoissa', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'Identifying Cognate Sets Across Dictionaries of Related Languages', 'sk': 'Identifikacija naborov kongnatov v slovarjih sorodnih jezikov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'མཉམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'We present a system for identifying cognate sets across dictionaries of related languages. The likelihood of a cognate relationship is calculated on the basis of a rich set of features that capture both phonetic and semantic similarity, as well as the presence of regular sound correspondences. The similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word. When tested on the Algonquian language family, our system detects 63 % of cognate sets while maintaining cluster purity of 70 %.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un système permettant d'identifier des ensembles apparentés dans des dictionnaires de langues connexes. La probabilité d'une relation apparentée est calculée sur la base d'un ensemble riche de caractéristiques qui capturent à la fois la similitude phonétique et sémantique, ainsi que la présence de correspondances sonores régulières. Les scores de similarité sont utilisés pour regrouper des mots de différentes langues qui peuvent provenir d'un proto-mot commun. Lorsqu'il est testé sur la famille de langues algonquiennes, notre système détecte 63\xa0% des ensembles apparentés tout en maintenant une pureté des clusters de 70\xa0%.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um sistema para identificar conjuntos cognatos em dicionários de idiomas relacionados. A probabilidade de uma relação cognata é calculada com base em um rico conjunto de características que capturam semelhanças fonéticas e semânticas, bem como a presença de correspondências sonoras regulares. As pontuações de similaridade são usadas para agrupar palavras de diferentes idiomas que podem se originar de uma protopalavra comum. Quando testado na família de linguagem algonquiana, nosso sistema detecta 63% dos conjuntos cognatos, mantendo a pureza do cluster de 70%.', 'ja': '関連する言語の辞書間で同族集合を識別するためのシステムを提示します。同族関係の可能性は、音韻的および意味的類似性の両方、ならびに規則的な音対応の存在を取り込む豊富な特徴のセットに基づいて計算される。類似性スコアは、共通のプロトワードに由来する可能性のある異なる言語の単語をクラスター化するために使用されます。Algonquian言語ファミリーでテストすると、当社のシステムはクラスターの純度を70 ％維持しながら、63 ％のコグネイトセットを検出します。', 'zh': '发一以识相关语言词典同源合统。 同源者,因其类而计之,得语音与语义之相似性,则声应之存焉。 相似性分数用于可能源常见原始单词异言之单词聚类。 试Algonquian言家,统检63%源,同时70%簇纯度。', 'hi': 'हम संबंधित भाषाओं के शब्दकोशों में संज्ञानात्मक सेट की पहचान करने के लिए एक प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एक संज्ञेय संबंध की संभावना की गणना उन विशेषताओं के एक समृद्ध सेट के आधार पर की जाती है जो ध्वन्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ समानता दोनों को कैप्चर करते हैं, साथ ही साथ नियमित ध्वनि पत्राचार की उपस्थिति भी। समानता स्कोर का उपयोग विभिन्न भाषाओं के शब्दों को क्लस्टर करने के लिए किया जाता है जो एक सामान्य प्रोटो-शब्द से उत्पन्न हो सकते हैं। जब Algonquian भाषा परिवार पर परीक्षण किया जाता है, तो हमारी प्रणाली 70% की क्लस्टर शुद्धता को बनाए रखते हुए 63% संज्ञानात्मक सेट का पता लगाती है।', 'ru': 'Представляем систему идентификации родственных наборов в словарях родственных языков. Вероятность родственных связей рассчитывается на основе богатого набора признаков, которые фиксируют как фонетическое, так и семантическое сходство, а также наличие регулярных звуковых соответствий. Оценки сходства используются для кластеризации слов из разных языков, которые могут происходить от общего прото-слова. При тестировании на алгонкском языке наша система обнаруживает 63% родственных наборов при сохранении чистоты кластера 70%.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair córas chun tacair ghaolmhara a aithint thar fhoclóirí teangacha gaolmhara. Ríomhtar an dóchúlacht go mbeidh caidreamh gaolmhar ar bhonn sraith shaibhir gnéithe a ghabhann cosúlachtaí foghraíochta agus shéimeantacha araon, chomh maith le comhfhreagras rialta fuaime a bheith ann. Úsáidtear na scóir chosúlachta chun focail a chnuasach ó theangacha éagsúla a d’fhéadfadh teacht ó fhréamhfhocal coitianta. Nuair a dhéantar tástáil ar theaghlach teanga Algonquian, aimsíonn ár gcóras 63% de na tacair ghaolmhara agus coinníonn sé íonacht bhraisle de 70%.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظامًا لتحديد المجموعات المماثلة عبر قواميس اللغات ذات الصلة. يتم حساب احتمالية وجود علاقة مشابهة على أساس مجموعة غنية من الميزات التي تلتقط التشابه اللفظي والدلالي ، بالإضافة إلى وجود مراسلات صوتية منتظمة. تُستخدم درجات التشابه لتجميع الكلمات من لغات مختلفة والتي قد تنشأ من كلمة أولية مشتركة. عند اختباره على عائلة لغة ألغونكويان ، يكتشف نظامنا 63٪ من المجموعات المماثلة مع الحفاظ على نقاء الكتلة بنسبة 70٪.', 'es': 'Presentamos un sistema para identificar conjuntos afines en diccionarios de idiomas relacionados. La probabilidad de una relación afín se calcula sobre la base de un rico conjunto de características que capturan la similitud fonética y semántica, así como la presencia de correspondencias sonoras regulares. Las puntuaciones de similitud se utilizan para agrupar palabras de diferentes idiomas que pueden provenir de una protopalabra común. Cuando se prueba en la familia de lenguas algonquinas, nuestro sistema detecta el 63% de los conjuntos afines y, al mismo tiempo, mantiene la pureza de los grupos del 70%.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევაჩვენეთ სისტემა, რომელიც კონონატის სისტემის განსაზღვრებისთვის შესაძლებელია. კონენტიური შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობა გამოწერა ფონენტიური და სემონტიური განსხვავებულებების ბაზაზე, რომელიც ფონენტიური და სემონტიური შესაძლებლობა, და რედაქტიური ხმების კონპორესტე similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word. როდესაც ალგონკური ენის სახლის ტესტის შესახებ, ჩვენი სისტემა აღმოჩნდება 63% კონკონტაქტის კონტაქტის კონტაქტის უფლება 70%.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy rendszert a kapcsolódó nyelvek szótáraiban található felismert halmazok azonosítására. A kognált kapcsolat valószínűségét olyan gazdag jellemzők alapján számítják ki, amelyek rögzítik a fonetikai és szemantikai hasonlóságot, valamint a rendszeres hangmegfelelőségek jelenlétét. A hasonlósági pontszámokat különböző nyelvekből származó szavak csoportosítására használják, amelyek egy közös proto-szóból származhatnak. Az algonquiai nyelvcsaládon végzett tesztelés során rendszerünk a kognált halmazok 63%-át észleli, miközben fenntartja a klaszter tisztaságát 70%.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα για τον προσδιορισμό συγγενικών συνόλων σε λεξικά σχετικών γλωσσών. Η πιθανότητα μιας γνωστής σχέσης υπολογίζεται με βάση ένα πλούσιο σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών που συλλαμβάνουν τόσο φωνητική όσο και σημασιολογική ομοιότητα, καθώς και την παρουσία τακτικών ηχητικών αντιστοιχιών. Οι βαθμολογίες ομοιότητας χρησιμοποιούνται για να ομαδοποιήσουν λέξεις από διαφορετικές γλώσσες που μπορεί να προέρχονται από μια κοινή πρωτολέξη. Όταν δοκιμάζεται στην οικογένεια γλωσσών Αλγκόνκι, το σύστημά μας ανιχνεύει 63% συγγενών συνόλων διατηρώντας παράλληλα την καθαρότητα των σμήνων 70%.', 'it': 'Presentiamo un sistema per identificare insiemi cognitivi attraverso dizionari di lingue correlate. La probabilità di una relazione cognitiva è calcolata sulla base di un ricco insieme di caratteristiche che catturano sia la somiglianza fonetica che semantica, così come la presenza di regolari corrispondenze sonore. I punteggi di somiglianza sono usati per raggruppare parole provenienti da lingue diverse che possono derivare da una proto-parola comune. Quando testato sulla famiglia di lingue algonquiane, il nostro sistema rileva il 63% dei set cognitivi mantenendo la purezza dei cluster del 70%.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan sistem untuk mengenalpasti set kognat melalui kamus bahasa berkaitan. Kemungkinan hubungan kenalan dihitung berdasarkan set fitur yang kaya yang menangkap persamaan fonetik dan semantik, serta kehadiran korespondenci bunyi biasa. Skor persamaan digunakan untuk kumpulkan perkataan dari bahasa yang berbeza yang mungkin berasal dari perkataan-proto biasa. Apabila diuji pada keluarga bahasa Algonquian, sistem kita mengesan 63% set kognat sementara menjaga kebersihan kumpulan 70%.', 'mk': 'Презентираме систем за идентификација на когнатите низ речниците на поврзани јазици. The likelihood of a cognate relationship is calculated on the basis of a rich set of features that capture both phonetic and semantic similarity, as well as the presence of regular sound correspondences.  Резултатите за сличност се користат за групирање на зборови од различни јазици кои може да потекнуваат од обичен прото-збор. Кога се тестираат на семејството на алгонкуански јазик, нашиот систем детектира 63 отсто од когнатите додека се одржува чистоста на групите од 70 отсто.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame sistemą pažįstamų kalbų rinkinių identifikavimui tarp susijusių kalbų žodynų. Žinių santykio tikimybė apskaičiuojama remiantis turtingu foninio ir semantinio panašumo požymių rinkiniu, taip pat reguliarių garso korespondencijų buvimu. The similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word.  Bandant algonquian kalbų šeimą, mūsų sistema aptinka 63 proc. kognatų rinkinių ir išlaiko 70 proc. klasterio grynumą.', 'kk': 'Біз тілдердің тілдерінің сөздіктерін анықтау жүйесін таңдаймыз. Беймәлім қатынасының мүмкіндігі, фонетикалық және семантикалық ұқсас қатынасын, әдетті дыбыс қатынасының негізінде есептеледі. Бұл ұқсас нәтижелері жалпы протосөзден басқа тілден сөздерді кластерлеу үшін қолданылады. Алгонкиялық тіл үйлерінде сынақталғанда, жүйеміз 70% деген кластердің тазалығын сақтау кезінде 63% табылған баптауларын анықтайды.', 'ml': 'കോഗ്നേറ്റ് സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം നമ്മള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവന്നിരിക്കുന് ഒരു കോഗ്നേറ്റ് ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഫോണെറ്റിക്കും സെമാന്റിക്കും സാധാരണ ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തും പിടിക്കുന ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രോട്ടോ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് തുടങ്ങുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്ട്രൂട്ട് ച അല്\u200dഗോങ്ക്വിയാന്\u200d ഭാഷ കുടുംബത്തില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 63% കോഗ്നേറ്റ് സെറ്റുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്ത', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw sistema għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ settijiet ta’ konoti bejn id-dikjaraturi ta’ lingwi relatati. Il-probabbiltà ta’ relazzjoni magħrufa hija kkalkulata abbażi ta’ sett għoli ta’ karatteristiċi li jaqbdu kemm similarità fonetika kif ukoll semantika, kif ukoll il-preżenza ta’ korrispondenzi regolari tal-ħoss. Il-punteġġi ta’ similarità jintużaw biex jingħaqdu kliem minn lingwi differenti li jistgħu joriġinaw minn proto-kelma komuni. Meta ttestjati fuq il-familja tal-lingwa Alkonkwjana, is-sistema tagħna tidentifika 63% tas-settijiet tal-konġenati filwaqt li żżomm il-purità tal-raggruppament ta’ 70%.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit system for identifisering av kjennomsiktssett over ordbokar av tilhøyrande språk. Sannsynligheten for ein kognitiv forhold blir rekna ut på grunn av ein rikt sett av funksjonar som får både fonetisk og semantisk liknande, og tilstand av vanlege lydkomponentar. Simlaritetspoeng blir brukt til å klostera ord frå ulike språk som kan originalisere frå eit vanleg protoordet. Når det er testet på Algonquian språkfamilien, oppdager systemet vårt 63 % av kjennende sett medan det beholder klostrenhet på 70 %.', 'mn': 'Бид холбоотой хэлний үгийг мэдэх системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Хүний мэдэх харилцааны магадлал нь фонетик болон семантик адилхан харилцааны баян харилцааны баян хэлбэрээр тооцогддог. Үүнтэй адилхан тоонууд нь ерөнхий протоүгээс эхлүүлж болох өөр хэлээс үг цуглуулахад ашигладаг. Альгонкий хэл гэр бүлийн туршилтын дараа бидний систем 70% гэсэн цэвэр цэвэрлэлийг хадгалах үед', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy system identyfikacji zbiorów pokrewnych w słownikach języków pokrewnych. Prawdopodobieństwo powiązania jest obliczane na podstawie bogatego zestawu cech, które uchwycają zarówno podobieństwo fonetyczne, jak i semantyczne, a także obecność regularnych korespondencji dźwiękowych. Wyniki podobieństwa są używane do grupowania słów z różnych języków, które mogą pochodzić ze wspólnego proto-słowa. Po przetestowaniu na rodzinie języków algonquiańskich, nasz system wykrywa 63% pokrewnych zestawów przy zachowaniu czystości klastra 70%.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un sistem pentru identificarea seturilor de cunoaștere în dicționare de limbi conexe. Probabilitatea unei relații cognitive este calculată pe baza unui set bogat de caracteristici care captează atât similitudinea fonetică, cât și semantică, precum și prezența corespondențelor sonore regulate. Scorurile de similitudine sunt folosite pentru a grupa cuvinte din diferite limbi care pot proveni dintr-un proto-cuvânt comun. Atunci când este testat pe familia lingvistică algonquiană, sistemul nostru detectează 63% din seturile de cunoaștere, menținând în același timp puritatea cluster-ului de 70%.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo sistem za identifikaciju kognitivnih setova u rečenicima povezanih jezika. Vjerojatnost kognitivne veze se računa na osnovu bogatog set a karakteristika koji uključuju i fonetičku i semantičku sličnost, kao i prisustvo redovnih zvukova. Rezultati sličnosti se koriste za skupljanje riječi iz različitih jezika koje mogu da izađu iz obične protoriječi. Kada su testirani na Alžonkijskoj jezičkoj porodici, naš sistem otkriva 63% kognitivnih setova dok održava čistoću skupine od 70%.', 'si': 'අපි පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවන්ගේ භාෂාවක් වලින් පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරෝටෝවර්ඩ් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිදේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිදේශයක් වෙනස් භාෂාවන් වචන වචන සංවිධානය කරන් ඇල්ගෝන්කියාන් භාෂාව පවුලේ පරීක්ෂා කලොත්, අපේ පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් 63% ක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, 70% ක්ලාස්ටර් ස', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa nidaam aqoonsashada kooxaha luqadaha la xiriira. Xiriirka heshiiska waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa sawir hodan ah oo qabsada isbedelka iyo isbedelka iyo weliba joogista warqadaha joogtada ah. Isu eg lambarka waxaa loo isticmaalaa inay hadalo ka soo jeedaan luuqado kala duduwan oo laga soo billaabi karo hadal sameynta. Marka lagu imtixaamo qoyska luqada Algonquian, nidaamkayagu wuxuu ogaanayaa 63% oo ka mid ah kooxaha jiilaalka, iyadoo ay u haystaan daahirta clusterada ee 70 boqolkiiba.', 'ta': 'நாம் தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளின் அகராதிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு அமைப்பை கொண்டுள்ளோம். ஒரு கூட்டிணைப்பு இணைப்பின் வாய்ப்பு போன்டிக் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைக்கு சமமாக இருக்கும் செல்லும் சாதாரண ஒலிக்குறிப்புகள் இருக்கும் பொத ஒரு பொதுவான நெறிமுறை- சொல்லிலிருந்து துவங்கும் வேறு மொழிகளிலிருந்து வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு  அல்கோங்குவியன் மொழி குடும்பத்தில் சோதிக்கப்பட்ட போது, எங்கள் அமைப்பு 70% குள்ளிஸ்டர் பரிசுத்தம் வைத்துக் கொண்டு 63', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett system för att identifiera kognitiva uppsättningar över ordböcker för relaterade språk. Sannolikheten för en kognitiv relation beräknas på grundval av en rik uppsättning funktioner som fångar både fonetisk och semantisk likhet, liksom förekomsten av regelbundna ljudkorrespondenser. Likhetspoängen används för att klustra ord från olika språk som kan komma från ett gemensamt protoord. När det testas på den algonquianska språkfamiljen upptäcker vårt system 63% av kognitiva uppsättningar samtidigt som klustrets renhet bibehålls på 70%.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سیسٹم کو رابطہ دار زبانوں کے لکھنے کے لئے پہچان کرنے کے لئے پیش کرتے ہیں۔ ایک معلوم رابطہ کا احتمال ایک مالدار مجموعہ پر محاسبہ کیا جاتا ہے جو فونیک اور سیمانٹی برابری کو پکڑتا ہے اور رابطہ آواز رابطہ کے موجود ہے Similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word. جب آلگونکی زبان خاندان پر آزمائش کی جاتی ہے، ہماری سیستم نے 70% کی پاکیزگی کی حفاظت کی حالت میں 63% پیدا کیا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz bog'liq tillar uchun kognat tizimini aniqlash uchun tizimni koʻrsatimiz. Bu munosabatlarning imkoniyati telefon va semantik huddi va oddiy tovush javoblar mavjudligini olib tashlash mumkin. The similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word.  Algonquian tili oilida sinab ko'rib chiqqatganda, bizning tizimmiz 70%-ga qo'shlik davomida 63% foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống nhận diện các bộ răng nanh trong các ngôn ngữ liên quan. Khả năng của một mối quan hệ răng nanh được tính ra dựa trên một loạt các tính năng giàu có thu được cả hai điểm giống nhau cơ và ngữ nghĩa, cũng như sự có liên hệ âm thanh đều đặn. Điểm tương đồng được dùng để cụm từ từ từ ngôn ngữ khác nhau có thể bắt nguồn từ một nguyên từ phổ biến. Khi được thử nghiệm trên gia đình ngôn ngữ Algonquian, hệ thống của chúng tôi sẽ phát hiện 63=. các bộ răng nanh và bảo vệ độ tinh khiết của bộ tộc 70Name', 'nl': 'We presenteren een systeem voor het identificeren van cognate sets in woordenboeken van verwante talen. De waarschijnlijkheid van een verwante relatie wordt berekend op basis van een rijke reeks kenmerken die zowel fonetische als semantische overeenkomsten vastleggen, evenals de aanwezigheid van regelmatige geluidscorrespondenties. De vergelijkingsscore wordt gebruikt om woorden uit verschillende talen te clusteren die afkomstig kunnen zijn van een gemeenschappelijk protowoord. Wanneer getest op de Algonquiaanse taalfamilie, detecteert ons systeem 63% van verwante sets met behoud van clusterzuiverheid van 70%.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et system til identificering af kognitive sæt på tværs af ordbøger af beslægtede sprog. Sandsynligheden for et kognitivt forhold beregnes på grundlag af et rigt sæt funktioner, der fanger både fonetisk og semantisk lighed samt tilstedeværelsen af regelmæssige lydkorrespondancer. Lighedspunkterne bruges til at klynge ord fra forskellige sprog, der kan stamme fra et fælles proto-ord. Når vores system testes på den algonquianske sprogfamilie, registrerer 63% af de kognitive sæt, samtidig med at klyngens renhed bevares på 70%.', 'bg': 'Представяме система за идентифициране на познати набори в речници на сродни езици. Вероятността за позната връзка се изчислява въз основа на богат набор от характеристики, които улавят както фонетично, така и семантично сходство, както и наличието на редовни звукови кореспонденции. Скоростите за сходство се използват за групиране на думи от различни езици, които могат да произхождат от обща прото-дума. Когато се тества на алгонкийското езиково семейство, нашата система открива 63% от познатите набори, като същевременно поддържа чистота на клъстера от 70%.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sistem untuk mengidentifikasi set kognat melalui kamus bahasa yang berhubungan. Kemungkinan hubungan kenalan dihitung berdasarkan set karakteristik yang kaya yang menangkap persamaan fonetik dan semantik, serta kehadiran korespondensi suara biasa. Skor persamaan digunakan untuk mengumpulkan kata-kata dari bahasa yang berbeda yang mungkin berasal dari kata-kata proto umum. Ketika diuji pada keluarga bahasa Algonquia, sistem kita mendeteksi 63% dari set kognat sementara mempertahankan kemurnian kluster 70%.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo sustav za identifikaciju kognitivnih setova u riječima povezanih jezika. Vjerojatnost kognitivne veze se računa na osnovu bogatih skupina karakteristika koji uključuju i fonetičku i semantičku sličnost, kao i prisutnost redovnih zvukovnih dopisnika. Pogledi sličnosti se koriste za skupljanje riječi iz različitih jezika koje mogu proizići iz obične protoriječi. Kada su testirani na obitelji Algonquiana jezika, naš sustav otkriva 63% kognitivnih kompleta dok održava čistoću skupine od 70%.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein System zur Identifizierung von verwandten Mengen in Wörterbüchern verwandter Sprachen. Die Wahrscheinlichkeit einer verwandten Beziehung wird auf der Grundlage einer reichen Reihe von Merkmalen berechnet, die sowohl phonetische als auch semantische Ähnlichkeit erfassen, sowie das Vorhandensein regelmäßiger Klangkorrespondenzen. Die Ähnlichkeitswerte werden verwendet, um Wörter aus verschiedenen Sprachen zu gruppieren, die von einem gemeinsamen Protowort stammen können. Bei Tests mit der Algonquian Sprachfamilie erkennt unser System 63% der verwandten Sätze bei gleichzeitiger Aufrechterhaltung der Clusterreinheit von 70%.', 'ko': '우리는 관련 언어 사전의 동원어집을 식별하는 시스템을 제시했다.동원 관계의 가능성은 하나의 풍부한 특징을 바탕으로 계산된 것으로 이러한 특징은 음성과 의미의 유사성을 포착할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 규칙적인 음성 대응 관계도 포착할 수 있다.유사성 점수는 서로 다른 언어에서 온 단어를 분류하는 데 사용되는데, 이 단어들은 공통된 원형어에서 나올 수 있다.알칸 거문고 어계에서 테스트를 할 때, 우리 시스템은 63%의 동원 집합을 검출하였으며, 동시에 70%의 집합 순도를 유지하였다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mfumo wa kutambua michoro katika lugha zinazohusiana. Pengine la mahusiano ya ushirikiano unahesabiwa kwa kutumia seti tajiri zinazofanana na simu za mkononi pamoja na kuwepo kwa mawasiliano ya mara kwa mara. Takwimu hizo zinatumiwa kuunganisha maneno kutoka lugha tofauti ambazo zinaweza kuanzia maneno ya protoko ya kawaida. Wakati ulipojaribiwa kwenye familia ya lugha ya Algonquian, mfumo wetu unagundua asilimia 63 ya makongo wakati wa kuendelea usafi wa viungo vya viwanda kwa asilimia 70.', 'tr': 'Biz öz dilleriň arasynda tanyş düzlerni tanamak üçin bir sistemi bar. Bilen baglaýyşyň mümkinçiligi fonetik we semantik meňzeşliklerini we düzgün sesli meňzeşliklerini alan baýlyk bir takmynanyň esasynda hasaplanýar. Täzelikler proto-sözden başlanan dillerden soňra sözleri çykarmak üçin ullanılýar. Algonküýan dil maşgalasynda barlananda sistemamyz 70% arasynda tanyş halklaryň 63%-ini tanaýar.', 'af': "Ons voorsien 'n stelsel vir identifiseer konnekteer stelle oor woordeboeke van verwante tale. Die waarskynlik van 'n koenete verhouding is bereken op die basis van 'n ryk stel van funksies wat beide fonetiese en semantiese gelykenis opneem, en ook die voorsiening van gewone klank ooreenstemmende. Die gelykheidstelling word gebruik om woorde uit verskillende tale te cluster wat dalk van 'n gemeenskaplike protowoord oorspronklik kan word. Wanneer toets op die Algonquiane taal familie, ontdek ons stelsel 63% van konnekteer stelle terwyl klaster reinheid van 70% onderhou.", 'fa': 'ما یک سیستم برای شناسایی مجموعه شناسایی در کلمات\u200cهای زبان رابطه پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. احتمال یک رابطه شناخته بر اساس یک مجموعه ثروتمندی از ویژه\u200cها محاسبه می\u200cشود که هر دو شبیه\u200cای تلفنی و semantic را می\u200cگیرند، و همچنین وجود ارتباطات صدا معمولی است. نمونه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیز برای جمع کردن کلمات از زبان\u200cهای مختلف استفاده می\u200cشود که ممکن است از یک نمونه\u200cکلمات مشترک تولید شود. وقتی در خانواده زبان الگونکیان آزمایش می\u200cشود، سیستم ما 63 درصد مجموعه شناخته می\u200cشود در حالی که پاکیزه\u200cی کلاستر 70 درصد محافظت می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'We present a system for identifying cognate sets across dictionaries of related languages.  Lidhësia e një marrëdhënie të njohur llogaritet në bazë të një grupi të pasur karakteristike që kapin si ngjashmërinë fonetike ashtu edhe semantike si dhe praninë e korrespondencave të rregullta të tingullit. Rezultatet e ngjashmërisë përdoren për të grupuar fjalët nga gjuhë të ndryshme që mund të origjinojnë nga një fjalë e përbashkët. Kur testohet në familjen e gjuhës algonquiane, sistemi ynë zbulon 63% të grupeve të njohur ndërsa mban pastërsinë e grupeve prej 70%.', 'am': 'የኮኖት ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች በኩል የሚያውቅ ስርዓት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የውይይት ግንኙነት ምናልባት የፎንnetic እና የsemantic ብጤቶች እና የድምፅ መልዕክቶች በመቀናኘት ባለ ሀብታም ብዛት የተቆጠረ ነው፡፡ በተለያዩ የፕሮሮግራም ቃላት ከልዩ ቋንቋዎች ቃላትን ለመቀጠል ይጠቀማል። በአልጎንኪያም ቋንቋ ቤተሰብ ላይ በተፈተና ጊዜ፣ ስርዓታችን የ70 በመቶ ንጹሕነት በመጠበቅ ጊዜ 63 በመቶ የሚቆጠሩ ኮንጋኖችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք համակարգ, որպեսզի ճանաչողական համակարգերը հայտնաբերենք կապված լեզուների բառարաններում: Գիտացած հարաբերության հավանականությունը հաշվարկվում է հարուստ հատկանիշների հիմնականությամբ, որոնք արտացոլում են հեռախոսական և սեմանտիկ նմանությունը, ինչպես նաև սովորական ձայնային հաղորդակցվածքների առկայությունը: Նմանության գնահատականները օգտագործվում են տարբեր լեզուներից բառերի խմբագրելու համար, որոնք կարող են առաջացնել ընդհանուր նախաբառից: Երբ փորձարկում ենք ալգոնքիայի լեզվի ընտանիքի վրա, մեր համակարգը հայտնաբերում է ճանաչողական համակարգերի 63 տոկոսը, մինչդեռ պահպանում է խմբերի մաքությունը 70 տոկոսով:', 'az': 'Biz müxtəlif dillərin sözlərini tanıtmaq üçün sistemi göstəririk. Bilən ilişkisinin mümkünlüyü fonetik və semantik kimiliğini, həmçinin düzgün səs müəyyənlərinin varlığı ilə hesablanır. Similat nöqtələri müxtəlif dillərdən sözləri toplamaq üçün istifadə edilir ki, bu müxtəlif proto-sözdən təşkil olar. Alqonkiya dil ailəsində sınamaq üçün sistemimiz 70%-dən istifadə edərkən tanıdıqların 63%-ini öyrənir.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo sistem za identifikaciju kognitivnih setova u riječima povezanih jezika. Vjerojatnost kognitivne veze se računa na osnovu bogatih skupina karakteristika koje uključuju i fonetičku i semantičku sličnost, kao i prisustvo redovnih zvukova. Rezultati sličnosti se koriste za skupljanje riječi iz različitih jezika koje mogu proizići iz obične protoriječi. Kada su testirani na Algonquianskoj porodici jezika, naš sistem otkriva 63% kognitivnih setova dok održava čistoću skupine od 70%.', 'ca': "Presentam un sistema per identificar conjunts de coneixements entre diccionaris de llengües relacionades. La probabilitat d'una relació cognata es calcula sobre la base d'un conjunt ric de característiques que capturen la similitud fonètica i semàntica, i la presença de corresponències sonores regulars. Les puntuacions de similitud s'utilitzen per agrupar paraules de diferents llengües que poden originar d'una proto-paraula comú. Quan es testen en la família algonquiana, el nostre sistema detecta el 63% dels conjunts de cognats mantenint la puritat del grup del 70%.", 'cs': 'Představujeme systém pro identifikaci souvisejících množin napříč slovníky příbuzných jazyků. Pravděpodobnost kognitivního vztahu je vypočítána na základě bohaté sady rysů, které zachycují fonetickou a sémantickou podobnost, stejně jako přítomnost pravidelných zvukových korespondencí. Skóre podobnosti se používají k shlukování slov z různých jazyků, které mohou pocházet z běžného proto-slova. Při testování na algonquijské jazykové rodině náš systém detekuje 63% souvisejících množin při zachování čistoty clusteru 70%.', 'bn': 'আমরা সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষার সাথে কোক্নেট সেট চিহ্নিত করার একটি সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করি। একটি কোক্নেট সম্পর্কের সম্ভাবনা হিসেবে গণনা করা হচ্ছে সমৃদ্ধ বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যের ভিত্তিতে, যা ফোনেটিক এবং সেমেন্টিক সংবাদের একই সাথে গ্রেফত একই ধরনের স্কোর ব্যবহার করা হয় বিভিন্ন ভাষা থেকে শব্দ স্থাপন করার জন্য যা সাধারণ প্রোটো- শব্দ থেকে উৎপাদন করা যা যখন আলগঙ্কুয়ান ভাষার পরিবারের উপর পরীক্ষা করা হয়, তখন আমাদের সিস্টেম ৭০ শতাংশের পরিষ্কার রাখার সময় আমাদের ক্লাস্টারের পবিত্', 'fi': 'Esittelemme järjestelmän, jolla tunnistetaan kogniattijoukot toisiinsa liittyvien kielten sanakirjoissa. Kognitiivisen suhteen todennäköisyys lasketaan rikkaiden ominaisuuksien perusteella, jotka kuvaavat sekä foneettista että semanttista samankaltaisuutta sekä säännöllisten äänivastaavuuksien läsnäoloa. Samankaltaisuuspisteitä käytetään yhdistämään sanoja eri kieliltä, jotka voivat olla peräisin yhteisestä protosanasta. Algonkian kieliperheellä testattuna järjestelmämme havaitsee 63% kongaattisarjoista säilyttäen klusterin puhtauden 70%.', 'et': 'Tutvustame süsteemi, mille abil tuvastatakse sarnaste keelte sõnaraamatud kogumid. Kognitiivse seose tõenäosus arvutatakse rikkaliku funktsioonide kogumi põhjal, mis hõlmavad nii foneetilist kui semantilist sarnasust, samuti regulaarsete helivastavuste olemasolu. Sarnasuse skoori kasutatakse erinevatest keeltest pärit sõnade koondamiseks, mis võivad pärineda tavalisest protosõnast. Algonkia keele perekonnas testides tuvastab meie süsteem 63% kongaatidest, säilitades klastri puhtuse 70%.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sistem kanggo nambah kang sampeyan luwih Saiki perusahaan ning resmi saben dadi, akeh dumadhi iki dadi nggawe perusahaan kelas Punika sing dipunangé sampeyan nêmên kanggo kelalakno nang langa sing wis dipunangé proto-word gak ngêmên. Awak dhéwé ngewat ujian karo alèhku Algonque, sistem dhéwé kuwi ono wektu basa sing seperakan tuaweke kalang-asai sing katêpakan nerimo basa sing seperakan tuaweke kalang-asai.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sistem za identifikacijo spoznanih naborov v slovarjih sorodnih jezikov. Verjetnost priznanega razmerja se izračuna na podlagi bogatega nabora značilnosti, ki zajemajo tako fonetično kot semantično podobnost, pa tudi prisotnost rednih zvočnih korespondenc. Ocene podobnosti se uporabljajo za združevanje besed iz različnih jezikov, ki lahko izvirajo iz skupne protobesede. Pri testiranju na algonkijski jezikovni družini naš sistem zazna 63% kongatnih naborov, hkrati pa ohranja 70% čistosti grozda.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מערכת לזהות קבוצות קוגנייטים מעבר למילונים של שפות קשורות. סבירות מערכת יחסים מוכרת נחשבת על בסיס קבוצה עשירה של תכונות שמתפסות גם דומות פונטיות וגם סמנטיות, כמו גם נוכחות התכתבות קול רגילות. נקודות הדמיון משתמשים כדי לאסוף מילים משפות שאולי יוצאות ממילה פרוטו משותפת. כשנבחן על משפחת שפת אלגונקויה, המערכת שלנו מגלה 63% מהקבוצות קוגנייטים בזמן שמירה טהור קבוצה של 70%.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani na'ura wa gane kokote masu cikin takardar harshe masu husũma. Ana ƙaddara wa haɗi na samurai, a kan karatun wasu fassarai mai riki, waɗanda ke kãma duk mutane da ke daidaita, da kuma a sami da presence of sauti mai daidai. The similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word.  A lokacin da aka jarraba shi kan jama'ar Algonquian, na'uranmu yana gane 63% na kogonte da kuma yana tsare tsarin clust na 70%.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་འཇུག་ཟམ་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཅིག་འཆར་ཡོད་པ སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བྲལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་རྩིས་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྩིས་གཞི་རྩིས་བསྐྲད་ཡོད། Similarity scores are used to cluster words from different languages that may originate from a common proto-word. གལ་སྲིད་ཆེན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Learning Language Representations for Typology Prediction', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de representaciones lingüísticas para predicción de tipología', 'fr': 'Apprentissage des représentations linguistiques pour la prédiction typologique', 'pt': 'Aprendendo Representações de Linguagem para Previsão de Tipologia', 'ar': 'تمثيلات تعلم اللغة للتنبؤ بالتصنيفات', 'zh': '学语言以类型学占', 'ja': 'タイプ予測のための学習言語表現', 'hi': 'टाइपोलॉजी भविष्यवाणी के लिए भाषा प्रतिनिधित्व सीखना', 'ru': 'Представления языка изучения для прогнозирования типологии', 'ga': 'Léiriúcháin Teanga a Fhoghlaim le hAghaidh Tuar na Tíopeolaíochta', 'ka': 'ტიპოლოგიის წინაწერების შესწავლება', 'el': 'Εκπροσωπήσεις γλώσσας εκμάθησης για την πρόβλεψη τυπολογίας', 'hu': 'Tanulás nyelvi reprezentációk a tipológia előrejelzéséhez', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni linguistiche per la previsione tipologica', 'lt': 'Mokymasis kalbomis Tipologijos prognozės atstovybės', 'mk': 'Учење на јазик претставувања за предвидување на типологија', 'ms': 'Belajar Perwakilan Bahasa untuk Prediksi Tipologi', 'ml': 'ടൈപ്പോളോഗിയുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനത്തിനുള്ള ഭാഷ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-Tagħlim tal-Lingwa għat-Tbassir tat-Tipoloġija', 'mn': 'Холын төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөө сурах', 'pl': 'Uczenie się języka reprezentacji dla prognozowania typologii', 'ro': 'Reprezentanțe lingvistice de învățare pentru predicția tipologiei', 'sr': 'Naučenje predstavljanja jezika za predviđanje tipologije', 'so': 'Waxbarashada u soo jeedista luqada', 'sv': 'Lärande av språk representationer för typologi förutsägelse', 'ta': 'மொழியின் முன்னிருப்பு மாற்றங்களை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறது', 'kk': 'Типологиялық таңдау үшін тілдерді үйрену', 'no': 'Læring språk- representasjonar for typologisk forhåndsvising', 'si': 'භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'ur': 'ٹائیپولوژی پیشدیکت کے لئے زبان کی روشنی سکھائی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học Ngôn ngữ đại diện cho quy định khoa học', 'bg': 'Учебни езикови представи за прогнозиране на типологията', 'da': 'Læringssprogrepræsentationer for typologi forudsigelse', 'hr': 'Naučenje predstavljanja jezika za predviđanje tipologije', 'de': 'Lernsprache Repräsentationen für Typologie Vorhersage', 'id': 'Mempelajari Perwakilan Bahasa untuk Prediksi Tipologi', 'ko': '유형 예측 학습 언어 표징', 'nl': 'Leren Taalrepresentaties voor typologische voorspellingen', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایش زبانی برای پیشنهاد نوع شناسی', 'tr': 'Tipiologiýa bejermek üçin dil temsilleri öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer Taal voorstellings vir Tippologie voorstelling', 'sw': 'Kujifunza maoni ya lugha kwa Utawala wa Utoaji', 'am': 'ቋንቋ ምረጡ', 'az': 'Tikoloji 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n dil g칬st톛ricil톛ri 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuese të gjuhës për parashikimin e tipologjisë', 'bs': 'Naučenje predstavljanja jezika za predviđanje tipologije', 'ca': 'Aprendre llenguatges representacions per a la predicció de tipologia', 'bn': 'টাইপলোগি পছন্দের জন্য ভাষার প্রতিনিধি শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Լեզու սովորելը տիպոլոգիայի կանխատեսման համար', 'cs': 'Výukové jazykové reprezentace pro předpověď typologie', 'et': 'Õppekeele esindused tüpoloogia prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'Oppimiskieliset representaatiot typologian ennustamiseen', 'jv': 'Learn Language', 'sk': 'Učenje jezikovnih predstavitev za napoved tipologije', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་ཤེས་འཇུག་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ།', 'he': 'לימוד מייצגים לשפה לטיפולוגיה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'One central mystery of neural NLP is what neural models know about their subject matter. When a neural machine translation system learns to translate from one language to another, does it learn the syntax or semantics of the languages? Can this knowledge be extracted from the system to fill holes in human scientific knowledge? Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages. Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases. Experiments show that the proposed method is able to infer not only syntactic, but also phonological and phonetic inventory features, and improves over a baseline that has access to information about the languages geographic and phylogenetic neighbors.', 'ar': 'أحد الألغاز المركزية في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية العصبية هو ما "تعرفه" النماذج العصبية عن موضوعها. عندما يتعلم نظام الترجمة الآلية العصبية الترجمة من لغة إلى أخرى ، فهل يتعلم بناء الجملة أو دلالات اللغات؟ هل يمكن استخلاص هذه المعرفة من النظام لسد الثغرات في المعرفة العلمية البشرية؟ تحتوي قواعد البيانات النمطية الموجودة على مواصفات ميزات كاملة نسبيًا لبضع مئات من اللغات فقط. من خلال استغلال وجود نصوص متوازية بأكثر من ألف لغة ، قمنا ببناء نظام NMT ضخم متعدد إلى واحد من 1017 لغة إلى اللغة الإنجليزية ، ونستخدم هذا للتنبؤ بالمعلومات المفقودة من قواعد البيانات النمطية. تظهر التجارب أن الطريقة المقترحة قادرة على الاستدلال ليس فقط على السمات النحوية ، ولكن أيضًا ميزات الجرد الصوتية والصوتية ، وتتحسن على خط الأساس الذي لديه إمكانية الوصول إلى معلومات حول اللغات المجاورة للتطور الجغرافي والتطور.', 'es': 'Un misterio central de la PNL neuronal es lo que los modelos neuronales «saben» sobre su tema. Cuando un sistema de traducción automática neuronal aprende a traducir de un idioma a otro, ¿aprende la sintaxis o la semántica de los idiomas? ¿Se puede extraer este conocimiento del sistema para llenar vacíos en el conocimiento científico humano? Las bases de datos tipológicas existentes contienen especificaciones de características relativamente completas para solo unos pocos cientos de idiomas. Aprovechando la existencia de textos paralelos en más de mil idiomas, construimos un sistema NMT masivo de varios a uno de 1017 idiomas al inglés, y lo utilizamos para predecir la información que falta en las bases de datos tipológicas. Los experimentos muestran que el método propuesto es capaz de inferir no solo características de inventario sintácticas, sino también fonológicas y fonéticas, y mejora con respecto a una línea de base que tiene acceso a información sobre los idiomas vecinos geográficos y filogenéticos.', 'fr': "L'un des principaux mystères de la PNL neuronale est ce que les modèles neuronaux «\xa0savent\xa0» sur leur sujet. Lorsqu'un système de traduction automatique neuronale apprend à traduire d'une langue à une autre, apprend-il la syntaxe ou la sémantique des langues\xa0? Ces connaissances peuvent-elles être extraites du système pour combler les lacunes des connaissances scientifiques humaines\xa0? Les bases de données typologiques existantes contiennent des spécifications de fonctionnalités relativement complètes pour quelques centaines de langues seulement. En exploitant l'existence de textes parallèles dans plus d'un millier de langues, nous construisons un énorme système NMT «\xa0plusieurs-à-un\xa0» à partir de 1017 langues vers l'anglais, et nous l'utilisons pour prédire les informations manquantes dans les bases de données typologiques. Les expériences montrent que la méthode proposée est capable d'inférer des caractéristiques d'inventaire non seulement syntaxiques, mais aussi phonologiques et phonétiques, et qu'elle est améliorée par rapport à une base de référence qui a accès à des informations sur les langues voisines géographiques et phylogénétiques.", 'pt': 'Um mistério central da PNL neural é o que os modelos neurais “sabem” sobre seu assunto. Quando um sistema de tradução automática neural aprende a traduzir de um idioma para outro, ele aprende a sintaxe ou a semântica dos idiomas? Esse conhecimento pode ser extraído do sistema para preencher lacunas no conhecimento científico humano? Os bancos de dados tipológicos existentes contêm especificações de recursos relativamente completas para apenas algumas centenas de idiomas. Explorando a existência de textos paralelos em mais de mil idiomas, construímos um sistema NMT massivo de muitos para um de 1017 idiomas para o inglês e usamos isso para prever informações ausentes em bancos de dados tipológicos. Experimentos mostram que o método proposto é capaz de inferir não apenas características de inventário sintático, mas também fonológico e fonético, e melhora sobre uma linha de base que tem acesso a informações sobre as línguas vizinhas geográficas e filogenéticas.', 'ja': '神経ＮＬＰの中心的な謎の１つは、神経モデルがその主題について「知っている」ことである。神経機械翻訳システムがある言語から別の言語への翻訳を学ぶとき、その言語の構文や意味論を学びますか？この知識は、人間の科学知識の穴を埋めるために、システムから抽出することができますか？既存のタイプデータベースには、数百の言語のみの比較的完全な機能仕様が含まれています。1000以上の言語で並行テキストが存在することを利用して、1017の言語から英語に大量の1対1のNMTシステムを構築し、これを使用してタイプデータベースから欠落している情報を予測します。実験は、提案された方法が構文だけでなく、音声学的および音声学的目録の特徴を推論することができ、地理的および系統発生学的隣接言語に関する情報にアクセスできるベースラインよりも改善されることを示している。', 'zh': '神经NLP之一心谜团神经形之所知也。 当神经机器译者,从一言翻译成一言时,学语言语法语义否? 此可以取诸统,补人科学知识之空乎? 今之类数据库唯几百种言语之全也。 因千余言而文本存焉,吾构一1017种语至英语者,大多系于一NMT,而用之占类型学数据库之阙失也。 实验之所言,非徒能推句法也,又能推断出语音之清单也,又能访言语地理、系统发育邻信息之基线有所提高。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका एनएलपी का एक केंद्रीय रहस्य यह है कि तंत्रिका मॉडल अपने विषय के बारे में "जानते" हैं। जब एक तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणाली एक भाषा से दूसरी भाषा में अनुवाद करना सीखती है, तो क्या यह भाषाओं के वाक्यविन्यास या शब्दार्थ सीखती है? क्या मानव वैज्ञानिक ज्ञान में छेद भरने के लिए इस ज्ञान को प्रणाली से निकाला जा सकता है? मौजूदा टाइपोलॉजिकल डेटाबेस में केवल कुछ सौ भाषाओं के लिए अपेक्षाकृत पूर्ण सुविधा विनिर्देश होते हैं। एक हजार से अधिक भाषाओं में समानांतर ग्रंथों के अस्तित्व का शोषण करते हुए, हम अंग्रेजी में 1017 भाषाओं से एक बड़े पैमाने पर कई-से-एक एनएमटी सिस्टम का निर्माण करते हैं, और इसका उपयोग टाइपोलॉजिकल डेटाबेस से गायब जानकारी की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि न केवल वाक्यात्मक, बल्कि ध्वन्यात्मक और ध्वन्यात्मक इन्वेंट्री सुविधाओं का भी अनुमान लगाने में सक्षम है, और एक बेसलाइन पर सुधार करती है जिसमें भौगोलिक और फाइलोजेनेटिक पड़ोसियों की भाषाओं के बारे में जानकारी तक पहुंच है।', 'ru': 'Одна из центральных тайн нейронной NLP заключается в том, что нейронные модели «знают» о своем объекте. Когда система нейронного машинного перевода учится переводить с одного языка на другой, она изучает синтаксис или семантику языков? Можно ли извлечь эти знания из системы, чтобы заполнить пробелы в человеческих научных знаниях? Существующие типологические базы данных содержат относительно полные характеристики только для нескольких сотен языков. Используя существование параллельных текстов на более чем тысяче языков, мы строим массивную многофункциональную систему NMT с 1017 языков на английский и используем ее для прогнозирования информации, отсутствующей в типологических базах данных. Эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемый метод способен вывести не только синтаксические, но и фонологические и фонетические признаки инвентаризации и улучшается по сравнению с базовой линией, которая имеет доступ к информации о географических и филогенетических соседях языков.', 'ga': 'Mystery lárnach amháin de NLP néarúil is ea a bhfuil a fhios ag samhlacha néaracha faoina n-ábhar. Nuair a fhoghlaimíonn córas néar-aistriúcháin meaisín aistriúchán ó theanga amháin go teanga eile, an bhfoghlaimíonn sé comhréir nó séimeantaic na dteangacha? An féidir an t-eolas seo a bhaint as an gcóras chun poill a líonadh in eolas eolaíoch daonna? Níl sonraíochtaí measartha iomlána i mbunachair shonraí tíopeolaíochta atá ann faoi láthair ach do chúpla céad teanga. Agus leas á bhaint as téacsanna comhthreomhara i níos mó ná míle teanga, tógaimid córas NMT lán-le-duine ollmhór ó 1017 teanga go Béarla, agus úsáidimid é seo chun faisnéis atá in easnamh ó bhunachair shonraí tíopeolaíochta a thuar. Léiríonn turgnaimh go bhfuil an modh atá beartaithe in ann tátal a bhaint as ní amháin gnéithe comhréire, ach freisin gnéithe fardail fóineolaíochta agus foghraíochta, agus go bhfeabhsaítear é thar bhunlíne a bhfuil rochtain aige ar fhaisnéis faoi theangacha na gcomharsan geografacha agus fíolaigineacha.', 'el': 'Ένα κεντρικό μυστήριο του νευρικού ΝΛΠ είναι το τι τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα "γνωρίζουν" για το θέμα τους. Όταν ένα νευρωνικό σύστημα μηχανικής μετάφρασης μαθαίνει να μεταφράζει από τη μία γλώσσα στην άλλη, μαθαίνει τη σύνταξη ή τη σημασιολογία των γλωσσών; Μπορεί αυτή η γνώση να εξαχθεί από το σύστημα για να γεμίσει τρύπες στην ανθρώπινη επιστημονική γνώση; Οι υπάρχουσες τυπολογικές βάσεις δεδομένων περιέχουν σχετικά πλήρεις προδιαγραφές χαρακτηριστικών μόνο για μερικές εκατοντάδες γλώσσες. Αξιοποιώντας την ύπαρξη παράλληλων κειμένων σε περισσότερες από χίλιες γλώσσες, κατασκευάζουμε ένα τεράστιο σύστημα από 1017 γλώσσες στα αγγλικά, και το χρησιμοποιούμε για να προβλέψουμε πληροφορίες που λείπουν από τυπολογικές βάσεις δεδομένων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος είναι σε θέση να συναχθεί όχι μόνο συντακτικά, αλλά και φωνολογικά και φωνητικά χαρακτηριστικά απογραφής, και βελτιώνεται σε σχέση με μια γραμμή που έχει πρόσβαση σε πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις γλώσσες γεωγραφικούς και φυλογενείς γείτονες.', 'hu': 'Az idegi NLP egyik központi rejtélye az, hogy az idegi modellek mit "tudnak" a tárgyukról. Amikor egy idegi gépi fordító rendszer megtanulja lefordítani egyik nyelvről a másikra, megtanulja a nyelvek szintaxisát vagy szemantikáját? Ki lehet-e vonni ezt a tudást a rendszerből, hogy kitöltse az emberi tudományos ismeretek lyukait? A meglévő tipológiai adatbázisok viszonylag teljes jellemzőket tartalmaznak mindössze néhány száz nyelvre vonatkozóan. A párhuzamos szövegek létezését kihasználva több mint ezer nyelven, hatalmas, sok-az-egy NMT rendszert építünk 1017 nyelvről angolra, és ezt használjuk fel a tipológiai adatbázisokból hiányzó információk előrejelzésére. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer nem csak szintaktikus, hanem fonológiai és fonetikai leltározási jellemzőket is képes következtetni, és javul egy olyan alapnál, amely hozzáfér a nyelvek földrajzi és filogenetikai szomszédaival kapcsolatos információkhoz.', 'it': 'Un mistero centrale della PNL neurale è quello che i modelli neurali "sanno" del loro soggetto. Quando un sistema di traduzione automatica neurale impara a tradurre da una lingua all\'altra, impara la sintassi o la semantica delle lingue? Questa conoscenza può essere estratta dal sistema per riempire buchi nella conoscenza scientifica umana? Le banche dati tipologiche esistenti contengono specifiche di funzionalità relativamente complete per poche centinaia di lingue. Sfruttando l\'esistenza di testi paralleli in più di mille lingue, costruiamo un enorme sistema NMT multi-to-one da 1017 lingue all\'inglese, e usiamo questo per prevedere le informazioni mancanti dai database tipologici. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il metodo proposto è in grado di dedurre non solo caratteristiche sintattiche, ma anche fonologiche e fonetiche di inventario, e migliora rispetto a una base di riferimento che ha accesso alle informazioni sui linguaggi vicini geografici e filogenetici.', 'lt': 'Viena iš pagrindinių neuralinio NLP paslapčių yra tai, ką neuraliniai modeliai "žino" apie jų dalyką. Kai nervinė mašinų vertimo sistema mokosi vertti iš vienos kalbos į kitą, ar ji mokosi kalbų sintaksą ar semantiką? Can this knowledge be extracted from the system to fill holes in human scientific knowledge?  Esamose tipologinėse duomenų bazėse yra palyginti išsamios tik kelių šimtų kalbų specifikacijos. Naudodamiesi lygiagrečių tekstų egzistavimu daugiau kaip tūkstančiu kalbų, sukuriame didžiulę daugelio vienam NMT sistemą iš 1017 kalbų į anglų kalbą ir naudojame ją, kad būtų galima prognozuoti trūkstamą informaciją iš tipologinių duomenų bazių. Eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gali daryti išvadą ne tik sintaktinėms, bet ir fonologinėms bei fonetinėms inventorizacijos savybėms ir pagerina bazinę informaciją apie geografinius ir filogenetinius kaimynus.', 'mk': 'Една централна мистерија на нервната НЛП е она што нервните модели го знаат за нивната тема. When a neural machine translation system learns to translate from one language to another, does it learn the syntax or semantics of the languages?  Може ли ова знаење да се извлече од системот за да се пополнат дупки во човечкото научно знаење? Постојачките типологички бази на податоци содржат релативно целосни спецификации за само неколку стотици јазици. Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  Експериментите покажуваат дека предложениот метод е во можност да се заклучи не само синтактичките, туку и фонолошките и фонетичките карактеристики на инвенторијата, и се подобрува во однос на основата која има пристап до информации за јазиците географски и филогенетски соседи.', 'ms': "Salah satu misteri pusat NLP saraf adalah apa yang model saraf 'tahu' tentang subjek mereka. Apabila sistem terjemahan mesin saraf belajar untuk terjemahan dari satu bahasa ke bahasa lain, adakah ia belajar sintaks atau semantik bahasa? Boleh pengetahuan ini dikeluarkan dari sistem untuk mengisi lubang dalam pengetahuan saintifik manusia? Pangkalan data tipologi yang wujud mengandungi spesifikasi ciri-ciri relatif penuh untuk hanya beberapa ratus bahasa. Menggunakan kewujudan teks selari dalam lebih dari seribu bahasa, kita membina sistem NMT yang besar dari 1017 bahasa ke bahasa Inggeris, dan gunakan ini untuk meramalkan maklumat yang hilang dari pangkalan data tipologi. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang direncanakan mampu menyimpulkan bukan hanya ciri-ciri sintaktik, tetapi juga ciri-ciri inventori fonologi dan fonetik, dan memperbaiki atas dasar yang mempunyai akses kepada maklumat mengenai bahasa jiran geografik dan filogenetik.", 'ml': "ന്യൂറല്\u200d NLP-ന്റെ ഒരു മദ്ധ്യ രഹസ്യം എന്താണ് അവരുടെ കാര്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് 'അറിയുന്നത്' എന്നാണ്. ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ സിസ്റ്റം ഒരു ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും മറ്റൊരു ഭാഷയിലേക്കും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d പഠിക്കുമ്പ ഈ അറിവ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുമോ മനുഷ്യന്റെ ശാസ്ത്ര ജ്ഞാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള ടൈപ്പോളിക്കല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാബേസില്\u200d കുറച്ച് നൂറു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രതിഫലങ്ങളുട ആയിരം ഭാഷകളില്\u200d അധികമായി പരാലില്\u200d പദാവലികളുടെ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, 1017 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്ക് ഒരു വലുതായി NMT സിസ്റ്റം നാം പണിയുകയും, ട പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക്ക് മാത്രമല്ല, ഫോളോളജിക്കും ഫോണെറ്റിക് നിരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും", 'mt': "Misteriju ċentrali wieħed ta’ NLP newrali huwa dak li mudelli newrali 'jafu' dwar is-suġġett tagħhom. Meta sistema ta’ traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali titgħallem tittraduċi minn lingwa għal oħra, titgħallem is-sintaks jew is-semantika tal-lingwi? Dan l-għarfien jista’ jiġi estratt mis-sistema biex jimla toqob fl-għarfien xjentifiku tal-bniedem? Il-bażijiet tad-dejta tipoloġiċi eżistenti fihom speċifikazzjonijiet tal-karatteristiċi relattivament sħa ħ għal ftit mijiet biss ta’ lingwi. Fl-isfruttar tal-eżistenza ta’ testi paralleli f’aktar minn eluf ta’ lingwi, a ħna nibnu sistema NMT massiva ħafna għal kull wieħed minn 1017-il lingwa għall-Ingliż, u nużaw din biex nipprojbixxu informazzjoni nieqsa minn bażijiet ta’ dejta tipoloġiċi. L-esperimenti juru li l-metodu propost huwa kapaċi jikkonkludi mhux biss karatteristiċi sintetiċi, iżda wkoll karatteristiċi fonoloġiċi u fonetiċi tal-inventarju, u jtejjeb fuq linja bażi li għandha a ċċess għal informazzjoni dwar il-lingwi ġirien ġeografiċi u filoġenetiċi.", 'no': 'Ein sentralt mysterium av nøyrale NLP er kva nøyrale modeller «vet» om temaet deres. Når eit neuralmaskinsk omsetjingssystem lærer å omsetja frå ein språk til ein annan, lærer det syntaksen eller semantikk av språka? Kan denne kunnskapen verta pakka ut frå systemet for å fylle hull i menneske vitenskapelige kunnskap? Den eksisterande typologiske databasene inneheld relativt fulle funksjonsspesifikasjonar for berre nokre hundre språk. Dersom vi eksploderer eksisterende parallelle tekstar i meir enn tusen språk, bygger vi eit massivt NMT-system frå 1017 språk til engelsk, og bruker dette for å foregå informasjon manglar frå typologiske databaser. Eksperiment viser at den foreslåde metoden kan ikkje berre innføre syntaktiske, men også fonologiske og fonetiske inventeringsfunksjonar, og forbedrar over ein grunnlinje som har tilgang til informasjon om språka geografiske og filogenetiske naboane.', 'pl': 'Centralną tajemnicą neuronowego NLP jest to, co modele neuronowe "wiedzą" o swojej tematyce. Kiedy neuronowy system tłumaczenia maszynowego uczy się tłumaczyć z jednego języka na drugi, czy uczy się składni lub semantyki języków? Czy wiedza ta może zostać wydobyta z systemu, aby wypełnić luki w wiedzy naukowej człowieka? Istniejące bazy danych typologicznych zawierają stosunkowo pełne specyfikacje funkcji tylko dla kilkuset języków. Wykorzystując istnienie tekstów równoległych w ponad tysiącu językach, budujemy ogromny system wiele-do-jednego NMT z języków 1017 na angielski i wykorzystujemy go do przewidywania informacji brakujących w bazach danych typologicznych. Eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowana metoda jest w stanie wywnioskować nie tylko składnię, ale także funkcje fonologiczne i fonetyczne inwentaryzacji, a także poprawia się nad bazą bazową, która ma dostęp do informacji o językach geograficznych i filogenetycznych sąsiadów.', 'ro': 'Un mister central al PNL neural este ceea ce modelele neurale "știu" despre subiectul lor. Când un sistem neural de traducere automată învață să traducă dintr-o limbă în alta, învață sintaxa sau semantica limbilor? Poate aceste cunoștințe să fie extrase din sistem pentru a umple găuri în cunoștințele științifice umane? Bazele de date tipologice existente conțin specificații relativ complete de caracteristici pentru doar câteva sute de limbi. Profitând de existența textelor paralele în mai mult de o mie de limbi, construim un masiv sistem NMT multi-to-one din 1017 limbi în limba engleză și folosim acest lucru pentru a prezice informațiile care lipsesc din bazele de date tipologice. Experimentele arată că metoda propusă este capabilă să deducă nu numai caracteristicile sintactice, ci și de inventar fonologic și fonetic, și se îmbunătățește peste o bază de referință care are acces la informații despre limbile geografice și filogenetice vecine.', 'ka': "ნეიროლური NLP-ის ერთი ცენტრალური მთესტერია არის ის, რომელიც ნეიროლური მოდელები 'ვიცით' მათი საქმე შემთხვევაზე. როდესაც ნეიროლური მაქანის გარგულისხმების სისტემა ვისწავლის ერთი ენაზე გარგულისხმების შესახებ, ისინი ისწავლის სინტაქსი ან სიმენტიკის შესახებ? შეიძლება ეს ცნობიერება სისტემიდან გამოყენება, რომ ადამიანის მეცნიერო ცნობიერებაში გადარჩენა? Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages. პარალელური ტექსტის არსებობას ათასიდან მეტი ენაში, ჩვენ შევქმნით მასტივი NMT სისტემა 1017 ენაზე ანგლისურად, და გამოყენეთ ეს, რაიპოლოგიური მონაცემების ინფორმაციას წარმოიდგინოთ. ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ მინდომარებული მეტი შეუძლია არა მხოლოდ სინტაქტიური, მაგრამ ფონოლოგიური და ფონონეტიური ინტექტორიური ფუნქციების ფუნქციების ფუნქციების ფუნქციური ფუ", 'sr': 'Jedna centralna misterija neuralnog NLP je ono što neuralni modeli znaju o svojoj temi. Kada sistem prevoda neuralne mašine nauči prevoditi od jednog jezika na drugo, da li nauči sintaks ili semantiku jezika? Može li ovo znanje biti izvučeno iz sistema da napuni rupe ljudskih naučnih znanja? Postoje tipološke baze podataka sadrže relativno pune specifikacije za samo nekoliko stotina jezika. Eksplozirajući postojanje paralelnih tekstova na više od hiljadu jezika, izgradili smo masivni sistem NMT od 1017 jezika na engleski, i koristili smo to da predvidimo informacije koje nedostaju iz tipoloških baze podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je predložena metoda sposobna da se inficira ne samo sintaktična, već i fonološka i fonetička inventarna karakteristika, i poboljšava se preko početne linije koja ima pristup informacijama o jezicima geografskih i filogenetičkih suseda.', 'si': "න්\u200dයුරෝල් NLP එකේ මධ්\u200dයම රහස්සාවක් තමයි ඔවුන්ගේ විද්\u200dයාව ගැන 'දන්න' න්\u200dයුරෝල් මෝඩේල් එක. න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් පද්ධතියක් එක භාෂයෙන් එක භාෂයෙන් එක භාෂයෙන් එක භාෂයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තාම, ඒක භාෂාව මේ දන්න පුළුවන්ද මිනිස්සු විද්\u200dයාඥාන දන්නවත් බුරුවක් පුරවන්න? ඉතින් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශික දත්ත බේස්තුව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා භාෂාවක් කිහිපයක් වි සාමාන්\u200dය පාළුවන්ගේ තියෙන්නේ භාෂාවක් 1000ක් වඩා වඩා වැඩි භාෂාවක්, අපි 1017 භාෂාවෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාවෙන් ගොඩක් නැති NMT පද්ධති පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට සංවිධානය විතරක් නෙවෙයි, ඒත් ෆෝනොලෝජික සහ ෆෝනෝටික් සංවිධානය සඳ", 'mn': 'Нэг мэдрэлийн NLP-ийн төвөгтэй нууц нь сэдвийн талаар мэддэг мэдрэлийн загвар юм. Нэг хэл дээр орчуулахын тулд мэдрэлийн машин орчуулах систем суралцах үед хэлний синтаксис эсвэл синтаксис суралцах уу? Энэ мэдлэг хүний шинжлэх ухааны мэдлэгийг дүүргэхэд системээс гаргаж чадах уу? Үүний бичлэгийн өгөгдлийн сангууд зөвхөн хэдэн зуун хэлний хувьд харьцангуй бүрэн тодорхойлолтой байдаг. Мянга мянган хэл дээр параллел текстүүдийн оршиж байгааг судалж, 1017 хэл дээс нэг-нэг NMT системийг англи хэл рүү бий болгож, типтологийн өгөгдлийн санаас алдагдсан мэдээллийг тодорхойлдохын тулд ашиглаж байна. Үүний талаар санал өгсөн арга нь зөвхөн синтактик биш, мөн фонологик, фонологик зохион бүтээлч чанарыг нэмэгдүүлж, географик болон филогенетик хөршүүдийн талаар мэдээллийг ашиглах суурь шугам дээр сайжруулж байна.', 'so': 'Qarsoodiga ugu dhexeeya ee NLP waa waxa ku saabsan qaababka neurada ee ku saabsan arrintaas. Marka qoraalka turjumista maskinada neurada ah uu baranayo in lagu turjumo luuqad hal ilaa mid, ma waxay barataa kaalmada ama semantika luuqadaha? Aqoontan miyaa laga soo saari karaa nidaamka in lagu buuxiyo holo aqoonta cilmiga biniaadamka? Qeybaha macluumaadka la xiriira waxaa ku jira qeybo kamid ah oo ku qoran karo boqol oo luuqadood oo kaliya. Si aad u baahan tahay qoraal siman oo ku qoran kun luuqadood, waxaynu dhisnaa nidaam aad u badan oo NMT ah tan iyo 1017 luuqadood ilaa Ingiriis, waxaadna u isticmaalaynaa si aan u sii sheegno macluumaad ka baahan macluumaadka macluumaadka macluumaadka qoraalka ah. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in qaabka la soo jeeday ay ay sameyn karto oo kaliya, laakiin waxaa kaloo sameyn kara qalabka qoyo-nolojiga iyo telefonetka, wuxuuna kordhin karaa macluumaadka ku saabsan deriska jiografiga iyo phylogenetka.', 'kk': 'Невралдық NLP- тың ортасындағы бір тақырыбы - невралдық үлгілері оның тақырыбы туралы біледі. Невралдық компьютердің аудару жүйесі бір тілден басқа тілде аудару үйренгенде, тілдердің синтаксисін не семантикалығын үйренеді бе? Бұл білім жүйеңізден адамдардың ғылыми білімдерін толтыруға болады ба? Бар типтологиялық деректер қорларында тек бірнеше жүздегі тілдер үшін сәйкес толық қасиеттердің белгілері бар. Мылған тілден артық параллель мәтіндердің барлығын ағылшын тілдерінен 1017 тілден бірнеше NMT жүйесін құрып, типтологиялық деректер қорларынан жоқ мәліметті таңдау үшін қолданамыз. Тәжірибелер таңдалған әдісі тек синтактикалық емес, сондай-ақ фонологиялық және фонетикалық инвентациялық мүмкіндіктерді жасауға болады, және географиялық және филогенетикалық қоршаулар туралы мәліметтер', 'ta': "புதிய NLP என்ற ஒரு நடுநிலை இரகசியம் என்னவென்றால் 'தெரியும்' என்று பாதுகாப்பு மாதிரி மாதிரி. ஒரு புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்ற மொழியிலிருந்து மற்றொரு மொழிக்கு மொழியை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் போது,  இந்த அறிவு கணினியிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட முடியுமா மனித அறிவியல் அறிவியல் குளிகளை நிரப்புவதற்கு? இருக்கும் வகையான தரவுத்தளங்களில் சில நூறு மொழிகளுக்கு மட்டும் முழு குணங்கள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது. ஆயிரத்திற்கும் மேற்பட்ட மொழிகளில் இணைப்பு உரைகள் இருப்பதை விரைவில் நாம் 1017 மொழிகளில் இருந்து ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்து ஒரு பெரிய அணு முறைமையை உருவா பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் மட்டும் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது என்பது தெரியும் முறையாகும், போன்டியல் மற்றும் தொலைநோக்கி தேடு", 'sv': 'Ett centralt mysterium med neuralt NLP ﾃ､r vad neurala modeller "vet" om sitt ﾃ､mne. Nﾃ､r ett neuralt maskinﾃｶversﾃ､ttningssystem lﾃ､r sig ﾃｶversﾃ､tta frﾃ･n ett sprﾃ･k till ett annat, lﾃ､r det sig sprﾃ･kens syntax eller semantik? Kan denna kunskap utvinnas ur systemet fﾃｶr att fylla hﾃ･l i mﾃ､nsklig vetenskaplig kunskap? Befintliga typologiska databaser innehﾃ･ller relativt fullstﾃ､ndiga specifikationer fﾃｶr endast nﾃ･gra hundra sprﾃ･k. Genom att utnyttja fﾃｶrekomsten av parallella texter pﾃ･ mer ﾃ､n tusen sprﾃ･k bygger vi ett massivt mﾃ･nga-till-ett NMT-system frﾃ･n 1017 sprﾃ･k till engelska, och anvﾃ､nder detta fﾃｶr att fﾃｶrutsﾃ､ga information som saknas i typologiska databaser. Experiment visar att den fﾃｶreslagna metoden kan hﾃ､rleda inte bara syntaktiska, utan ocksﾃ･ fonologiska och fonetiska inventeringsfunktioner, och fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttras jﾃ､mfﾃｶrt med en baslinje som har tillgﾃ･ng till information om sprﾃ･ken geografiska och fylogenetiska grannar.', 'ur': 'NLP کی ایک مرکزی راز یہ ہے کہ ان کے موضوع کے بارے میں نئورل موڈل جانتے ہیں۔ جب ایک نیورال ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم ایک زبان سے دوسری زبان تک ترجمہ کرنا سکھتا ہے، کیا یہ زبانوں کی سینٹکس یا سیمانٹیک سیکھتا ہے؟ کیا یہ علم سیسٹم سے نکالی جاتی ہے کہ انسان کے علم میں شہروں کو بھر جائے؟ Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages. ہزار زبانوں سے زیادہ مشابہ لکھوں کی موجودگی کا تحقیق کرتا ہے، ہم 1017 زبانوں سے ایک بڑی NMT سیستم بناتے ہیں، اور اس کا استعمال کرتا ہے تایپولوژیکی ڈیٹابیز سے گم ہونے کے لئے۔ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ صرف سینٹکتیک نہیں بلکہ فونالوژیکی اور فونیٹیکی اختلاف کے علائم بھی، اور ایک بنیس لین پر بہتر ہوتی ہے جس کی زبانوں کے بارے میں جغرافیک اور فیلوگنیٹیکی مسافروں کے بارے میں معلومات کی دسترسی رکھتی ہے.', 'uz': "Neural NLP'ning bir markaziy siri - ma'lumot modellari ularning ma'lumotlari haqida haqida ma'lum. Name Bu maʼlumot inson ilmiy илм haqida qo'llanib olish uchun tizimdan olib tashlanami? Name Kimga mingdan ortiq so'zlar uchun parallel matnlar mavjudligini aniqlash uchun, biz 1017 tillardan bir necha NMT tizimni Inglizchaga yaratimiz va bu narsalarni yordam maʼlumotlar bazasidan oldingan ko'pchilik tizimni ishlatish uchun foydalanamiz. Tasavvur qilingan usulni faqat syntactik va fonetik va fonetik inventori xususiyatlarini kamaytirish mumkin, va o'z tilning geografi va phylogenetik neighbourlari haqida maʼlumotga murojaat qiladigan asboblar tarkibida bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Một bí ẩn trung tâm của đài phát ngôn thần kinh là những người mẫu thần kinh biết về vật chất của họ. Khi hệ thống dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh học cách dịch từ ngôn ngữ này sang ngôn ngữ khác, nó có học được cấu trúc hay ngữ pháp của ngôn ngữ không? Có thể loại bỏ kiến thức này từ hệ thống để lấp đầy những lỗ hổng kiến thức khoa học của loài người? Các cơ sở dữ liệu in có đầy đủ chứa chỉ vài trăm ngôn ngữ. Sử dụng khả năng tồn tại các văn bản song song trong hơn một ngàn ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi xây dựng một hệ thống NMT khổng lồ từ 1017 sang tiếng Anh, và dùng nó để dự đoán thông tin thiếu trong các cơ sở dữ liệu tiêu chữ. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị không chỉ có khả năng ám chỉ từ pháp thuật, mà còn tính năng kiểm kê âm thanh và ngữ âm, và cải thiện hơn một cơ sở có thể truy cập thông tin về ngôn ngữ địa lý và phong phú láng giềng.', 'hr': 'Jedna centralna misterija neuralnog NLP je ono što neuralni modeli znaju o svojoj temi. Kada sustav prevoda neuroloških strojeva uči prevoditi od jednog jezika na drugi, da li uči sintaks ili semantiku jezika? Može li ova znanja biti izvučena iz sustava da napuni rupe ljudskih znanstvenih znanja? Postoje tipološke baze podataka sadrže relativno pune specifikacije karakteristike za samo nekoliko stotina jezika. Eksplozirajući postojanje paralelnih tekstova na više od tisuću jezika, izgradili smo ogroman sustav NMT od 1017 jezika na engleski jezik, i koristili smo to kako bi predvidjeli informacije koje nedostaju iz tipoloških baze podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je predložena metoda u stanju inficirati ne samo sintaktične, već i fonološke i fonetičke karakteristike inventara i poboljšati se preko početne linije koja ima pristup informacijama o jezicima geografskim i filogenetičkim susjedima.', 'bg': 'Една централна мистерия на невронното НЛП е това, което невронните модели "знаят" за предмета си. Когато невронната система за машинен превод се научи да превежда от един език на друг, тя научава ли синтаксиса или семантиката на езиците? Може ли това знание да бъде извлечено от системата за запълване на дупки в човешкото научно знание? Съществуващите типологични бази данни съдържат сравнително пълни спецификации за функции само за няколко стотин езика. Използвайки съществуването на паралелни текстове на повече от хиляда езика, ние изграждаме масивна система от 1017 езика на английски и използваме това, за да предскажем липсващата информация от типологичните бази данни. Експериментите показват, че предложеният метод е в състояние да заключи не само синтактични, но и фонологични и фонетични инвентаризационни характеристики и се подобрява спрямо базовата линия, която има достъп до информация за езиците географски и филогенетични съседи.', 'nl': "Een centraal mysterie van neurale NLP is wat neurale modellen 'weten' over hun onderwerp. Wanneer een neuraal machinevertaalsysteem leert vertalen van de ene taal naar de andere, leert het dan de syntaxis of semantiek van de talen? Kan deze kennis uit het systeem worden gehaald om gaten in menselijke wetenschappelijke kennis op te vullen? Bestaande typologische databases bevatten relatief volledige specificaties voor slechts een paar honderd talen. Door gebruik te maken van het bestaan van parallelle teksten in meer dan duizend talen, bouwen we een enorm many-to-one NMT systeem van 1017 talen naar Engels, en gebruiken dit om informatie te voorspellen die ontbreekt in typologische databases. Experimenten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode niet alleen syntactische, maar ook fonologische en fonetische inventariskenmerken kan afleiden, en verbetert ten opzichte van een baseline die toegang heeft tot informatie over de geografische en fylogenetische buren van de talen.", 'da': "Et centralt mysterium i neural NLP er, hvad neurale modeller 'ved' om deres emne. Når et neuralt maskinoversættelsessystem lærer at oversætte fra et sprog til et andet, lærer det så sprogets syntaks eller semantik? Kan denne viden udvindes fra systemet for at udfylde huller i den menneskelige videnskabelige viden? Eksisterende typologiske databaser indeholder relativt fulde funktionsspecifikationer for kun få hundrede sprog. Udnytter eksistensen af parallelle tekster på mere end tusind sprog, bygger vi et massivt mange-til-en NMT system fra 1017 sprog til engelsk, og bruger dette til at forudsige information mangler fra typologiske databaser. Eksperimenter viser, at den foreslåede metode er i stand til at udlede ikke kun syntaktiske, men også fonologiske og fonetiske opgørelsesfunktioner, og forbedres i forhold til en baseline, der har adgang til oplysninger om sprogene geografiske og fylogenetiske naboer.", 'de': 'Ein zentrales Rätsel des neuronalen NLP ist, was neuronale Modelle über ihre Materie "wissen". Wenn ein neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungssystem lernt, von einer Sprache in eine andere zu übersetzen, lernt es dann die Syntax oder Semantik der Sprachen? Kann dieses Wissen aus dem System extrahiert werden, um Lücken im wissenschaftlichen Wissen des Menschen zu füllen? Bestehende typologische Datenbanken enthalten relativ vollständige Funktionsspezifikationen für nur wenige hundert Sprachen. Unter Ausnutzung der Existenz von parallelen Texten in mehr als tausend Sprachen bauen wir ein massives Many-to-One-NMT-System von 1017-Sprachen ins Englische und nutzen dieses, um Informationen vorherzusagen, die in typologischen Datenbanken fehlen. Experimente zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode in der Lage ist, nicht nur syntaktische, sondern auch phonologische und phonetische Inventarmerkmale abzuleiten, und verbessert sich gegenüber einer Basislinie, die Zugang zu Informationen über die geographischen und phylogenetischen Nachbarn der Sprachen hat.', 'id': "One central mystery of neural NLP is what neural models 'know' about their subject matter.  Ketika sistem terjemahan mesin saraf belajar menerjemahkan dari satu bahasa ke bahasa lain, apakah itu belajar sintaks atau semantik bahasa? Bisakah pengetahuan ini dikeluarkan dari sistem untuk mengisi lubang dalam pengetahuan ilmiah manusia? Pangkalan data tipologi yang ada mengandung spesifikasi fitur relatif lengkap hanya untuk beberapa ratus bahasa. Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan dapat menyimpulkan tidak hanya sintaksi, tetapi juga karakteristik inventori fonologi dan fonetik, dan memperbaiki atas dasar yang memiliki akses ke informasi tentang bahasa tetangga geografi dan filogenetik.", 'ko': "신경 NLP의 핵심 미스터리 중 하나는 신경 모형이 그 주제에 대한'이해'다.신경기계번역시스템이 한 언어에서 다른 언어로 번역되는 것을 배울 때, 그것은 이러한 언어의 문법이나 의미를 배웠습니까?시스템에서 이 지식들을 추출하여 인류 과학 지식의 빈틈을 메울 수 있습니까?기존의 유형 데이터베이스는 수백 가지 언어의 상대적으로 완전한 특성 규범만 포함한다.1000여 개 언어 중 평행 텍스트의 존재를 이용하여 우리는 1017개 언어에서 영어까지 대규모 다대일 NMT 시스템을 구축했고 이 시스템을 이용하여 유형 데이터베이스에 없는 정보를 예측했다.실험에 따르면 이 방법은 문법적 특징을 추정할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 음성과 음성 리스트 특징도 추정할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 언어 지리와 시스템 발육의 이웃 정보를 얻을 수 있는 기선보다 개선되었다.", 'fa': 'یک راز مرکزی از NLP عصبی چیزی است که مدل عصبی در مورد موضوع آنها می داند. وقتی سیستم ترجمه ماشین عصبی از یک زبان به یک زبان تعلیم می\u200cکند، آیا سینتکس یا سیمانتیک زبان را یاد می\u200cگیرد؟ آیا این دانش از سیستم خارج می شود تا سوراخ های علمی انسان را پر کند؟ پایگاه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نوع\u200cشناسی وجود دارد که جز چند صد زبان تعریف\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای کامل را دارد. با توجه به وجود متن parallel در بیشتر از هزار زبان، سیستم NMT بسیار بزرگ از ۱۰۰۷ زبان به انگلیسی ساختیم، و از این استفاده کنیم تا اطلاعات که از پایگاه داده های تایپولوژیک گم شده را پیش بینی کنیم. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این روش پیشنهاد قادر است که نه تنها ویژه\u200cهای جغرافیک و فیلوژنتیک را آزمایش کند، بلکه ویژه\u200cهای اختراع\u200cسازی فون\u200cولوژیک و فونیک را آزمایش کند، و بر یک خط پایین بهبود می\u200cکند که دسترسی به اطلاعات درباره', 'tr': "NLP'yň orta gizemli nuýral modelleri olaryň temasy hakynda näme bilen bilýän nuýral modelleridir. Näyral maşynyň terjime sistemi bir dilden başga dile terjime etmegi öwrendikde, dillerin sintaksy ýa-da semantiklerini öwrenip bilýärmi? Bu bilim sistemadan ýüklenip adamlary bilgi bilen gaplary doldurmak üçin barmy? Öň bar typolojik databaseler diňe bir näçe ýüz diller üçin gaty möhüm hasaplamalary bar. Müňlerden köp dilde parallel metinler bar we 1017 dilinden iňlisçe köp iňlisçe bir NMT sistemasyny barýarys we şuny tapylamak üçin ýok maglumatlary önlemek üçin ullanyň. Denminatlar teklip eden yönteminiň diňe sintaktik däl, ýöne fonolojik we fonetik inventarlar üpjüňlerini daşyrýar we gürrüňleýär çünki diller geografik we filogenetik goňşgalar hakynda maglumatlara erişip biljek bir üýtgedigini görkezýär.", 'sq': "Një mister qendror i NLP-së neuronale është ajo që modelet neuronale 'dinë' për çështjen e tyre. Kur një sistem përkthimi i makinave nervore mëson të përkthehet nga një gjuhë në tjetrën, a mëson sintaksin apo semantikën e gjuhëve? A mund të nxirret kjo njohuri nga sistemi për të mbushur vrima në njohuri shkencore njerëzore? Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages.  Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  Experiments show that the proposed method is able to infer not only syntactic, but also phonological and phonetic inventory features, and improves over a baseline that has access to information about the languages geographic and phylogenetic neighbors.", 'am': 'የኔሩአዊ NLP ምሥጢር በጉዳዩ ነገር የሚያውቀው የደዌብ ሞላት ነው፡፡ አንዲት ቋንቋ ወደ ሌላ መተርጓሜ ሲማር፣ የቋንቋዎች ሲንካስብ ወይም semantics ይማራልን? ይህ እውቀት ከሰው እውቀት ውሃትን ለመሞላ ከሲስተም ይወጣ ይችላልን? Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages.  Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  ፈተናዎች የሞከሩ ሥርዓት ለቋንቋዎች የጂዮግራፍ እና የፊልogenetic ጎረቤቶች መረጃዎችን ለመግኘት የሚችል የፎሎጂ እና የፎንnetic ጉዳይ ማሳየት ብቻ አይደለም ማለት እንዲችል ነው፡፡', 'sw': "Tafsiri moja ya msingi wa NLP ni kile ambacho mifano ya uraia 'wanajua' kuhusu suala lao. Wakati mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo unapojifunza kutafsiri kutoka lugha moja hadi nyingine, je, inajifunza mfumo au nusu ya lugha? Je, maarifa haya yanaweza kuondolewa kutoka mfumo ili kuzijaza vifaa vya kisayansi vya binadamu? Mitandao ya taarifa za kawaida zina vipengele vya utaalamu kamili kwa lugha chache tu. Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hiyo inayopendekezwa inaweza kuathiri sio tu viungo, bali pia vifaa vya uzalishaji wa kifolojia na simu za mkononi, na pia kuboresha zaidi ya mitandao ya msingi ambayo ina upatikanaji wa taarifa kuhusu lugha za vijiografia na jirani za phylogeneti.", 'af': 'Een sentrale mysterie van neurale NLP is wat neurale modele "weet" oor hul onderwerp saak. Wanneer \'n neurale masjien vertaling stelsel leer om van een taal na \'n ander te vertaling, leer dit die sintaks of semantiek van die tale? Kan hierdie kennis van die stelsel uitpak word om holle in menslike wetenskaplike kennis te vul? Bestaande tipologiese databasis bevat relativief volle funksie spesifikasie vir slegs \'n paar honderd taal. Deur die bestaande van parallele tekste in meer as \'n duisend tale te verduidelik, bou ons \'n massiewe baie na een NMT stelsel van 1017 tale na Engels, en gebruik hierdie om inligting te voorskou wat ontbreek van tipologiese databasis. Eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde metode nie alleen sintaktika kan infer nie, maar ook fonologiese en fonetiese inventoriese funksies en verbeter oor \'n basisline wat toegang tot inligting oor die tale geografiese en phylogeneetiese naboeste het.', 'az': 'NLP nöral modellərinin məsələsi haqqında "bilirlər" məsələsi olan məsələdir. Nöral maşın çevirim sistemi bir dildən başqa dilə çevirilmeyi öyrəndiyi zaman dillərin sintaksi və semantik öyrənir? Bu elm sistemdən insan elmi elmi ilə dənələri doldurmaq üçün çıxarılabilir mi? Bütün typolojik veri tabanları ancaq bir neçə yüz dil üçün çox müxtəlif xüsusiyyətlər barəsindədir. Minlərdən çox dillərdə paralel metinlərin varlığını təsdiqləyici kimi, 1017 dildən bir çox NMT sistemini İngilizce dilə in şallaşdırırıq və bu məlumatları typolojik veri tabanlarından çıxmış məlumatları təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edirik. Tərəbələr ancaq sintaktik, fakat fonolojik və fonetik inşaatçı özelliklərini təşkil edə bilər və dillərin ģeogrāfiski və filogenetik qoşunları haqqında məlumatların istifadəsi barəsində təşkil edilən ilk səhifələrin üstündə yaxşılaşdırır.', 'hy': "One central mystery of neural NLP is what neural models 'know' about their subject matter.  When a neural machine translation system learns to translate from one language to another, does it learn the syntax or semantics of the languages?  Can this knowledge be extracted from the system to fill holes in human scientific knowledge?  Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages.  Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  Experiments show that the proposed method is able to infer not only syntactic, but also phonological and phonetic inventory features, and improves over a baseline that has access to information about the languages geographic and phylogenetic neighbors.", 'bs': 'Jedna centralna misterija neuralnog NLP je ono što neuralni modeli znaju o svojoj temi. Kada sistem prevoda neuroloških strojeva nauči prevoditi od jednog jezika na drugi, da li nauči sintaks ili semantiku jezika? Može li ovo znanje biti izvučeno iz sistema da napuni rupe ljudskih naučnih znanja? Postoje tipološke baze podataka sadrže relativno pune specifikacije za samo nekoliko stotina jezika. Eksplozirajući postojanje paralelnih tekstova na više od hiljadu jezika, izgradili smo ogroman sistem NMT od 1017 jezika na engleski jezik, i koristili smo to da predvidimo nestale informacije iz tipoloških baze podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je predložena metoda sposobna da se inficira ne samo sintaktički, već i fonološki i fonetički izum, te poboljša preko početne linije koja ima pristup informacijama o jezicima geografskim i filogenetičkim susjedima.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল এনএলপির একটি কেন্দ্রীয় রহস্য হচ্ছে নিউরেল মডেল তাদের বিষয়বস্তুর ব্যাপারে। যখন একটি নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম একটি ভাষা থেকে অন্য ভাষায় অনুবাদ করতে শিখতে পারে, এটি কি ভাষার সিন্ক্যাক্স অথবা সেমেন এই জ্ঞান কি মানুষের বৈজ্ঞানিক জ্ঞানে গর্ত পূর্ণ করার জন্য সিস্টেম থেকে বের করা হবে? বিদ্যমান টাইপোলিকাল ডাটাবেসের মধ্যে শুধুমাত্র কয়েক শত ভাষার জন্য পূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশেষ বিশেষ ১০৭ ভাষা থেকে ইংরেজি ভাষায় প্যারালেল টেক্সটের অস্তিত্ব ব্যবহার করি এবং টাইপোলিকাল ডাটাবেস থেকে অনুপস্থিত তথ্য প্রত্যাখ্যান করার জন্য। Experiments show that the proposed method is able to infer not only syntactic, but also phonological and phonetic inventory features, and improves over a baseline that has access to information about the languages geographic and phylogenetic neighbors.', 'cs': 'Jednou z centrálních záhad neuronového NLP je to, co neuronové modely "vědí" o svém předmětu. Když se neuronový strojový překlad naučí překládat z jednoho jazyka do druhého, naučí se syntaxi nebo sémantiku jazyků? Lze tyto znalosti získat ze systému, aby vyplnily díry v lidských vědeckých poznatcích? Stávající typologické databáze obsahují relativně plné specifikace funkcí pouze pro několik set jazyků. Využíváme existenci paralelních textů ve více než tisíci jazycích a vytvoříme masivní mnoho-na-jednoho NMT systém z 1017 jazyků do angličtiny, který používá k predikci informací chybějících v typologických databázích. Experimenty ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda je schopna odvozovat nejen syntaktické, ale také fonologické a fonetické inventářní prvky a zlepšuje se nad základní linií, která má přístup k informacím o geografických a fylogenetických sousedech jazyků.', 'ca': "One central mystery of neural NLP is what neural models 'know' about their subject matter.  When a neural machine translation system learns to translate from one language to another, does it learn the syntax or semantics of the languages?  Can this knowledge be extracted from the system to fill holes in human scientific knowledge?  Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages.  Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases.  Experiments show that the proposed method is able to infer not only syntactic, but also phonological and phonetic inventory features, and improves over a baseline that has access to information about the languages geographic and phylogenetic neighbors.", 'fi': 'Neurologisen NLP:n keskeinen mysteeri on se, mit채 neuromallit "tiet채v채t" aiheesta. Kun neurokonek채채nn철sj채rjestelm채 oppii k채채nt채m채채n kielelt채 toiselle, oppiiko se kielten syntaksin tai semantiikan? Voidaanko t채m채 tieto poimia j채rjestelm채st채 t채ytt채m채채n aukkoja ihmisen tieteellisess채 tiet채myksess채? Nykyiset typologiset tietokannat sis채lt채v채t suhteellisen t채ydelliset ominaisuudet vain muutamalle sadalle kielelle. Hy철dynn채mme rinnakkaisten tekstien olemassaoloa yli tuhannella kielell채, rakennamme massiivisen monikielisen NMT-j채rjestelm채n 1017 kielest채 englanniksi ja k채yt채mme sit채 ennustamaan typologisista tietokannoista puuttuvia tietoja. Kokeet osoittavat, ett채 ehdotettu menetelm채 kykenee p채채ttelem채채n paitsi syntaktisia, my철s fonologisia ja foneettisia inventaarioominaisuuksia, ja se paranee l채ht철tilanteessa, jossa on p채채sy tietoihin kielist채 maantieteellisist채 ja fylogeettisist채 naapureista.', 'et': 'NLP-i üks keskne müsteerium on see, mida närvimudelid "teavad" oma teemast. Kui neuraalne masintõlkesüsteem õpib tõlkima ühest keelest teise, kas ta õpib keelte süntaksit või semantikat? Kas neid teadmisi saab süsteemist välja võtta, et täita auke inimeste teaduslikes teadmistes? Olemasolevad tüpoloogilised andmebaasid sisaldavad suhteliselt täielikke funktsioonide spetsifikatsioone vaid mõnesaja keele kohta. Kasutades paralleelsete tekstide olemasolu enam kui tuhandes keeles, ehitame massiivse mitmekülgse NMT süsteemi 1017 keelest inglise keelde ja kasutame seda tüpoloogilistest andmebaasidest puuduva teabe prognoosimiseks. Eksperimentid näitavad, et kavandatud meetod suudab järeldada mitte ainult süntaktilisi, vaid ka fonoloogilisi ja foneetilisi inventuuri tunnuseid ning paraneb võrreldes lähtetasemega, millel on juurdepääs teabele keelte geograafiliste ja fülogeneetiliste naabrite kohta.', 'sk': 'Ena od osrednjih skrivnosti nevronske NLP je, kaj nevronski modeli "vedo" o svoji tematiki. Ko se nevronski strojni prevajalski sistem nauči prevajati iz enega jezika v drugega, se nauči sintakse ali semantike jezikov? Ali je mogoče to znanje pridobiti iz sistema, da bi zapolnili luknje v človeškem znanstvenem znanju? Obstoječe tipološke zbirke podatkov vsebujejo relativno popolne specifikacije funkcij za le nekaj sto jezikov. Z izkoriščanjem obstoja vzporednih besedil v več kot tisoč jezikih zgradimo obsežen NMT sistem več na eno od 1017 jezikov v angleščino in s tem napovedujemo manjkajoče informacije iz tipoloških baz podatkov. Eksperimenti kažejo, da je predlagana metoda sposobna sklepati ne samo sintaktične, temveč tudi fonološke in fonetične inventarne značilnosti, in se izboljša v primerjavi z osnovno osnovo, ki ima dostop do informacij o geografskih in filogenetičnih sosednjih jezikih.', 'ha': "Bayan gaibi na tsakanin NLP ne abin da misãlai na'a sani' a kan masu buƙatan al'amarinsu. Idan ana iya amfani da fassarar ɗin maɓallin neural zuwa wani harshen zuwa wani harshe, shin, yana jin suntaki ko semantiki na harshen? Shin, za'a iya fito wannan ilmi daga shirin system dõmin ya cika fili cikin ma'anan mutum? Ana ƙunsa da kayan danna ɗin takardar da ke gaba, yana da cikakken halin wa'ura kaɗan kawai. Ga lokacin da za'a da mistakardar takardar harshen, za'a samar da wasu na'urar NMT masu yawa daga harshen 1017 zuwa Ingiriya, kuma mu yi amfani da wannan dõmin ka yi bayani ga maɓalli wanda ba'a mana daga database na typogi. Tajararin na nuna cewa metoden da aka buƙata, yana iya iya zartar da su, ba masu iya ƙaranci kowaciya kawai, kuma amma masu tsari na jerin folojiki da fomat, kuma yana ƙaranci a kan salon wanda yana da amfani da ma'anar lãbãri a kan harsunan geographic da na faylognet.", 'jv': 'Imagene cap Kapan sistem itoleh sistem Neral kuwi nggunakake ing saben lengkang sampeyan, opo ngerti sinaksi apa sematik bangsane? Kapan olèhmu iki iso butuh-butuh ning sistem kanggo rerampungan hol kanggo ngerasai sak uwong? text Awakdhéwé éntuk karo texting paraleling kanggo tinik luwih akeh luwih Getama winih dhéwé nggawe sapa sistem sing bisa nggawe ujaran nggawe sistem sing butuh nggambar sistem sing sampeyan, macem nggambar kebudhak paraknologik lan kelangan pangan, lan uga bantêk dhéwé bakal terus nggawe informasi alamat sak barêng langgambar kapungot lan banjuré.', 'bo': 'NLP ཡི་དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་གཅིག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་དོན་དག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་གཞུང་གིས་ཤེས་པ་ཞིག་ When a neural machine translation system learns to translate from one language to another, does it learn the syntax or semantics of the languages? འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག་ནས་ཕྱིར་འདོན་ཐབས་མེད་དམ། Existing typological databases contain relatively full feature specifications for only a few hundred languages. Exploiting the existence of parallel texts in more than a thousand languages, we build a massive many-to-one NMT system from 1017 languages into English, and use this to predict information missing from typological databases. Experiments show that the proposed method is able to infer not only syntactic but also phonological and phonetic inventory features, and improves over a baseline that has access to information about the languages geographic and phylogenetic neighbors.', 'he': "תעלומה מרכזית אחת של NLP עצבי היא מה דוגמנים עצביים 'יודעים' על הנושא שלהם. When a neural machine translation system learns to translate from one language to another, does it learn the syntax or semantics of the languages?  Can this knowledge be extracted from the system to fill holes in human scientific knowledge?  בסיסי נתונים טיפולוגיים קיימים מכילים ספציפי תכונות מלאים יחסית רק לכמה מאות שפות. ניצלנו את הקיום של טקסטים מקבילים במשך יותר מאלף שפות, אנו בונים מערכת NMT מסיבית רבות לאחד מ-1017 שפות לאנגלית, ושתמשו בזה כדי לחזות מידע חסר מבסיסי נתונים טיפולוגיים. ניסויים מראים שהשיטה המוצעת מסוגלת להוציא לא רק תכונות מילוי סינטקטיים, אלא גם תכונות מילוי פונולוגיים ופונטיים, ושתפר מעל מראש שיש לו גישה למידע על השפות הגאוגרפיות ופילוגנטיות שכנים."}
{'en': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'pt': 'Tradução barata para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em vários idiomas', 'ar': 'ترجمة رخيصة للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة عبر اللغات', 'es': 'Traducción barata para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas en varios idiomas', 'fr': "Traduction bon marché pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées multilingues", 'ja': 'クロスリンガルな名前付きエンティティ認識のための安価な翻訳', 'zh': '语言实体识廉价译', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल नामित एंटिटी पहचान के लिए सस्ता अनुवाद', 'ru': 'Дешевый перевод для межъязыкового распознавания именованных сущностей', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Cheap le haghaidh Aitheantas Trastheangacha Aonáin Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Olcsó fordítás a nyelvközi nevezett entitások elismeréséhez', 'it': 'Traduzione economica per il riconoscimento cross-lingual delle entità denominate', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды түсінбеу үшін тұтас аудармасыName', 'lt': 'Lengvas vertimas tarpkalbiniam subjekto vardu pripažinimui', 'el': 'Φτηνή μετάφραση για την αναγνώριση γλωσσικής ονομασίας οντότητας', 'mk': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'ml': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'ms': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'mt': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'no': 'Omsetjing for krysslingsgjenkjenning med namn på einingar', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэлбэрийн нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition-ын Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'pl': 'Tanie tłumaczenie dla rozpoznawania między językami', 'ro': 'Traducere ieftină pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite între limbi', 'sr': 'Jeftin prevod za prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanog entiteta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Turjumista furan ee iskuul-luqada magaceeda Entity Recognition', 'ur': 'Cross-Lingual نام دار انٹیٹی پتپذیر کے لئے چیپ ترجمہ', 'sv': 'Billig översättning för Cross-Language Named Entity Recognition', 'ta': 'க்ராஸ்- Lingual பெயரிடப்பட்ட Entity Recognition', 'vi': 'Rẻ tiền dịch cho Nhận dạng ngôn ngữ chữ thập', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'bg': 'Евтин превод за разпознаване на междулингвистично наименувано лице', 'hr': 'Jeftin prevod za prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanog entiteta', 'nl': 'Goedkope vertaling voor Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'da': 'Billig oversættelse til tværsproget navngivet enhedsanerkendelse', 'id': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'de': 'Günstige Übersetzung für Cross-Lingual Named Entity Anerkennung', 'fa': 'ترجمه کلی برای شناسایی واحد نامیده شده\u200cی کلی زبان', 'ko': '다중 언어 명칭 실체 식별의 저렴한 번역', 'sw': 'Tafsiri bure for Cross-Lingua Named Entity Recognition', 'tr': 'Çapraz Diller Taýýarlanan Bir Taýram üçin Çatylyş', 'af': 'Skaap Vertaling vir Cross- Lingual Genaamde Eenheidrekening', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i lirë për njohjen e njësisë me emër ndërgjuhës', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'hy': 'Անվճար թարգմանություն միջլեզվային անհատականության ճանաչման համար', 'ca': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'cs': 'Levný překlad pro rozpoznávání mezi jazyky jmenovaných entit', 'az': 'Üstünlük Dilli Adlı Entity Recognition üçün Peyğəmbər Tərcümə', 'bn': 'ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়াল নামের এন্টিটি পরিচিতির জন্য সোজা অনুবাদ', 'et': 'Odav tõlge keeleülese nimega üksuse tunnustamise jaoks', 'bs': 'Jeftin prevod za prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanog entiteta', 'fi': 'Halpa käännös kielienväliseen nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamiseen', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'sk': 'Poceni prevod za medjezikovno priznavanje imenovanih subjektov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Chep Terjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan Entité sing nganggep', 'bo': 'Cheap Translation for Cross-Lingual Named Entity Recognition'}
{'en': 'Recent work in NLP has attempted to deal with low-resource languages but still assumed a resource level that is not present for most languages, e.g., the availability of Wikipedia in the target language. We propose a simple method for cross-lingual named entity recognition (NER) that works well in settings with very minimal resources. Our approach makes use of a lexicon to translate annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there. Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results ; we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5 % F1 points. With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.very minimal resources. Our approach makes use of a lexicon to “translate” annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there. Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results; we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points. With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur. ', 'fr': "Des travaux récents dans le domaine de la PNL ont tenté de traiter les langues à faibles ressources, mais ont toujours supposé un niveau de ressources qui n'est pas présent pour la plupart des langues, par exemple la disponibilité de Wikipédia dans la langue cible. Nous proposons une méthode simple de reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) multilingue qui fonctionne bien dans des environnements avec très peu de ressources. Notre approche utilise un lexique pour «\xa0traduire\xa0» les données annotées disponibles dans une ou plusieurs langues à ressources élevées dans la langue cible, et y apprend un modèle NER monolingue standard. De plus, lorsque Wikipédia est disponible dans la langue cible, notre méthode peut améliorer les méthodes basées sur Wikipédia pour produire des résultats NER de pointe\xa0; nous évaluons dans 7 langues différentes, améliorant ainsi la technologie de pointe d'une moyenne de 5,5\xa0% de points F1. Avec les ressources minimales requises, il s'agit d'une approche NER multilingue extrêmement portable, comme l'illustre l'utilisation d'un langage à faibles ressources, l'ouïghour.", 'pt': 'Trabalhos recentes em PNL tentaram lidar com linguagens de poucos recursos, mas ainda assumiram um nível de recursos que não está presente para a maioria das linguagens, por exemplo, a disponibilidade da Wikipédia no idioma de destino. Propomos um método simples para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) em vários idiomas que funciona bem em configurações com recursos mínimos. Nossa abordagem faz uso de um léxico para “traduzir” dados anotados disponíveis em um ou vários idiomas de alto recurso para o idioma de destino e aprende um modelo NER monolíngue padrão lá. Além disso, quando a Wikipédia está disponível no idioma de destino, nosso método pode aprimorar os métodos baseados na Wikipédia para produzir resultados NER de última geração; avaliamos em 7 idiomas diferentes, melhorando o estado da arte em uma média de 5,5% pontos F1. Com os recursos mínimos necessários, esta é uma abordagem NER multilíngue extremamente portátil, conforme ilustrado usando um idioma realmente de poucos recursos, o uigur.', 'ar': 'حاول العمل الأخير في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التعامل مع اللغات منخفضة الموارد ولكن لا يزال يفترض أن مستوى الموارد غير موجود لمعظم اللغات ، على سبيل المثال ، توفر ويكيبيديا في اللغة الهدف. نقترح طريقة بسيطة للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة عبر اللغات (NER) والتي تعمل بشكل جيد في الإعدادات ذات الحد الأدنى من الموارد. يستخدم نهجنا معجمًا "لترجمة" البيانات المشروحة المتاحة بلغة واحدة أو عدة لغات ذات موارد عالية إلى اللغة الهدف ، ويتعلم نموذج NER أحادي اللغة هناك. علاوة على ذلك ، عندما تكون ويكيبيديا متاحة باللغة الهدف ، يمكن أن تعزز طريقتنا الأساليب القائمة على ويكيبيديا للحصول على نتائج NER الحديثة ؛ نقوم بتقييم 7 لغات متنوعة ، وتحسين الدولة من بين الفن بمتوسط 5.5٪ F1 نقطة. مع الحد الأدنى من الموارد المطلوبة ، يعد هذا نهج NER متعدد اللغات قابل للنقل للغاية ، كما هو موضح باستخدام لغة منخفضة الموارد حقًا ، الأويغور.', 'es': 'Un trabajo reciente en PNL ha intentado tratar con idiomas de bajos recursos, pero aun así se ha asumido un nivel de recursos que no está presente para la mayoría de los idiomas, por ejemplo, la disponibilidad de Wikipedia en el idioma de destino. Proponemos un método simple para el reconocimiento de entidades con nombre (NER) multilingüe que funciona bien en entornos con recursos mínimos. Nuestro enfoque utiliza un léxico para «traducir» los datos anotados disponibles en uno o varios idiomas de alto nivel de recursos al idioma de destino, y allí se aprende un modelo de NER monolingüe estándar. Además, cuando Wikipedia está disponible en el idioma de destino, nuestro método puede mejorar los métodos basados en Wikipedia para obtener resultados de NER de última generación; evaluamos en 7 idiomas diferentes, mejorando el estado de la técnica en un promedio de 5,5% de puntos F1. Con los recursos mínimos necesarios, se trata de un enfoque de NER multilingüe extremadamente portátil, como se ilustra con un idioma de recursos realmente bajos, el uigur.', 'ja': 'NLPにおける最近の研究は、低資源言語を扱うことを試みているが、依然としてほとんどの言語に存在しないリソースレベルを想定している。例えば、ターゲット言語のウィキペディアの利用可能性などである。私たちは、非常に最小限のリソースで設定された環境でうまく機能する、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）のための単純な方法を提案します。私たちのアプローチは、1つまたは複数の高リソース言語で利用可能な注釈付きデータをターゲット言語に「翻訳」するために辞書を使用し、そこで標準的な単一言語NERモデルを学習します。さらに、Wikipediaがターゲット言語で利用可能な場合、当社の方法はWikipediaベースの方法を強化して最先端のNER結果をもたらすことができます。私たちは7つの多様な言語で評価し、最先端のF 1ポイントを平均5.5%向上させます。必要最小限のリソースで、これは真に低いリソース言語であるウイグル語を使用して示されているように、非常にポータブルなクロスリンガルNERアプローチです。', 'zh': 'NLP近事试处低资源语,然犹设多言无资,如维基百科在语言之可用性。 简言名实识(NER)法,其法在资源甚少。 吾法用词典将一种或数种高资言语的注数"译"为的言语,并在那里学习的单语NER模形。 维基百科以趋言,可以益维基百科,以生先进之NER。 7异言而料之,先进之术,均5.5%F1积分。 资源最少,此非常便携跨语NER法,若用真低资源语维吾尔语所示。', 'ru': 'Недавняя работа в NLP пыталась справиться с языками с низким уровнем ресурсов, но все еще предполагала уровень ресурсов, который отсутствует для большинства языков, например, доступность Википедии на целевом языке. Мы предлагаем простой метод для межязычного распознавания именованных сущностей (NER), который хорошо работает в условиях с очень минимальными ресурсами. Наш подход использует лексикон для «перевода» аннотированных данных, доступных на одном или нескольких языках с высоким уровнем ресурсов, на целевой язык и изучает стандартную одноязычную модель NER. Кроме того, когда Википедия доступна на целевом языке, наш метод может улучшить методы, основанные на Википедии, чтобы получить современные результаты NER; мы оцениваем на 7 различных языках, улучшая современный в среднем на 5,5% F1 пунктов. При минимальных ресурсах это чрезвычайно портативный межъязыковой подход NER, что иллюстрируется использованием действительно малоресурсного языка уйгурского языка.', 'hi': 'एनएलपी में हाल के काम ने कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं से निपटने का प्रयास किया है, लेकिन फिर भी एक संसाधन स्तर माना जाता है जो अधिकांश भाषाओं के लिए मौजूद नहीं है, उदाहरण के लिए, लक्ष्य भाषा में विकिपीडिया की उपलब्धता। हम क्रॉस-लिंगुअल नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) के लिए एक सरल विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो बहुत कम संसाधनों के साथ सेटिंग्स में अच्छी तरह से काम करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण लक्ष्य भाषा में एक या कई उच्च संसाधन भाषा (ओं) में उपलब्ध एनोटेट डेटा का "अनुवाद" करने के लिए एक शब्दकोश का उपयोग करता है, और वहां एक मानक मोनोलिंगुअल एनईआर मॉडल सीखता है। इसके अलावा, जब विकिपीडिया लक्षित भाषा में उपलब्ध होता है, तो हमारी विधि विकिपीडिया आधारित विधियों को अत्याधुनिक एनईआर परिणामों को प्राप्त करने के लिए बढ़ा सकती है; हम 7 विविध भाषाओं पर मूल्यांकन करते हैं, 5.5% F1 अंकों के औसत से अत्याधुनिक में सुधार करते हैं। आवश्यक न्यूनतम संसाधनों के साथ, यह एक बेहद पोर्टेबल क्रॉस-लिंगुअल एनईआर दृष्टिकोण है, जैसा कि वास्तव में कम संसाधन भाषा, उइघुर का उपयोग करके सचित्र है।', 'ga': 'Tá iarracht déanta ag obair le déanaí sa NLP déileáil le teangacha íseal-acmhainne ach fós glacadh leis go bhfuil leibhéal acmhainne ann nach bhfuil ann don chuid is mó de na teangacha, m.sh. fáil ar Vicipéid sa sprioctheanga. Molaimid modh simplí chun aonán ainmnithe tras-teangach a aithint (NER) a oibríonn go maith i suíomhanna le hacmhainní fíorbheaga. Úsáideann ár gcur chuige foclóir chun sonraí anótáilte atá ar fáil i dteanga nó i dteangacha ard-acmhainne amháin nó níos mó a “aistriú go dtí an sprioctheanga, agus foghlaimíonn sé múnla caighdeánach aonteangach NER ansin. Ina theannta sin, nuair a bhíonn Vicipéid ar fáil sa sprioctheanga, is féidir lenár modh modhanna bunaithe ar Vicipéid a fheabhsú chun torthaí NER den scoth a bhaint amach; déanaimid meastóireacht ar 7 dteanga éagsúla, ag feabhsú an úrscothacht faoi 5.5% ar an meán de phointe F1. Agus na hacmhainní íosta atá ag teastáil, is cur chuige NER tras-teanga thar a bheith iniompartha é seo, mar a léirítear ag baint úsáide as teanga fíor-íseal acmhainní, Uyghur.', 'ka': "NLP-ში ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო რესურსის ენათების შესახებ, მაგრამ უკვე მივიღეთ რესურსის დონე, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ენათების შესახებ არ არის, მაგალითად, სკი ჩვენ გვეძლევა ერთადერთი პროცემი, რომელიც ძალიან მინიმალური რესურსებით მუშაობაში მუშაობაში მუშაობაში მუშაობაში გამოცნობა ინტერტიკის მიღება ჩვენი პროგრამის გამოყენება ლექსიკონის გამოყენება 'translate' ანოტატირებულ მონაცემებისთვის ერთ ან რამდენიმე მაღალი რესურსის ენაში და მიმდინარე ენაში სტანდარტული მონოლენგური NE დამატებით, როდესაც ვიკიპედია მინიშვნელოვანი ენაში იქნება, ჩვენი მინიშვნელოვანი შეუძლია ვიკიპედიაში დაბათებული მეტოვები გაიზრუნოთ, რომ გაიზრუნოთ წარმოდგ ჩვენ 7 განსხვავებული ენებით გავამუშავებთ, სურათების განსაზღვრებით 5,5% F1 წუთების განსაზღვრებით. მინიმალური რესურსების შესაძლებლობად, ეს არის ძალიან დაკავშირებელი კრესიენგური NER პროგრამი, როგორც გამოყენებულია მართლაც კი რესურსური ენათის გამოყენებაში, სიგური", 'hu': 'Az NLP-ben végzett közelmúltbeli munkák megpróbálták kezelni az alacsony erőforrású nyelveket, de még mindig olyan erőforrásszintet feltételeztek, amely nem jelen van a legtöbb nyelven, például a Wikipédia elérhetősége a célnyelven. Javasolunk egy egyszerű módszert a többnyelvű elnevezett entitás felismerésére (NER), amely jól működik nagyon minimális erőforrásokkal rendelkező beállításokban. Megközelítésünk egy lexikont használ arra, hogy egy vagy több nagy erőforrású nyelven rendelkezésre álló jegyzetelt adatokat "lefordítsunk" a célnyelvre, és ott tanulunk egy standard egynyelvű NER modellt. Továbbá, ha a Wikipédia elérhető a célnyelven, módszerünk javíthatja a Wikipédia alapú módszereket, hogy a legkorszerűbb NER eredményeket hozzon; 7 különböző nyelven értékelünk, átlagosan 5,5%-os F1 ponttal javítva a korszerűséget. A szükséges minimális erőforrások mellett ez egy rendkívül hordozható, többnyelvű NER megközelítés, amint azt egy valóban alacsony erőforrású nyelven, az ujguron illusztrálják.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εργασίες στο NLP έχουν προσπαθήσει να ασχοληθούν με γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους, αλλά εξακολουθούν να υποθέτουν ένα επίπεδο πόρων που δεν υπάρχει για τις περισσότερες γλώσσες, π.χ. η διαθεσιμότητα της Βικιπαίδειας στη γλώσσα-στόχο. Προτείνουμε μια απλή μέθοδο για τη διακρατική αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων που λειτουργεί καλά σε ρυθμίσεις με πολύ ελάχιστους πόρους. Η προσέγγισή μας χρησιμοποιεί ένα λεξικό για να "μεταφράσει" σχολιασμένα δεδομένα διαθέσιμα σε μία ή περισσότερες γλώσσες υψηλού πόρου στη γλώσσα-στόχο, και μαθαίνει ένα τυποποιημένο μονογλωσσικό μοντέλο εκεί. Επιπλέον, όταν η Βικιπαίδεια είναι διαθέσιμη στη γλώσσα-στόχο, η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να βελτιώσει μεθόδους βασισμένες στη Βικιπαίδεια για να αποφέρουν αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. αξιολογούμε σε επτά διαφορετικές γλώσσες, βελτιώνοντας την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας κατά μέσο όρο 5,5% σημείων F1. Με τους ελάχιστους πόρους που απαιτούνται, αυτή είναι μια εξαιρετικά φορητή διεπαγγελματική προσέγγιση NER, όπως απεικονίζεται χρησιμοποιώντας μια πραγματικά γλώσσα χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους, την Ουιγούρικη.', 'kk': "Жуырдағы NLP жұмыс көп тілдер үшін, мысалы, нақты тілде Википедия қол жеткізілікті тілдерінің көпшілігі жоқ ресурстар деңгейін қалады. Біз тілдерді көп тілдер аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) арқылы қарапайым әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл өте кіші ресурстар баптауларында жақсы жұмыс істейді. Біздің тәсіліміз бір немесе бірнеше ресурс тілінде қол жеткізетін деректерді 'translate' деген лексиконды қолдану үшін қолданып, онда стандартты монолингі NER үлгісін үйренеді. Келесіден, Wikipedia мақсатты тілде қол жеткізгенде, біздің әдіміміз Wikipedia негізделген әдістерді NER нәтижелерін жеткізу үшін күй- жағдайды күй- жағдайды жасауға болад 7 әртүрлі тілдерді бағалаймыз. Суреттің күйін 5,5% F1 нүктесінен орташа жақсарту. Керек ресурстар үшін бұл өте көп тілді NER көпшілігі. Бұл өте төмен ресурстар тілді, Уигур көпшілігімен көрсетілген.", 'it': 'Il recente lavoro in NLP ha cercato di trattare lingue a basso contenuto di risorse, ma ha comunque assunto un livello di risorse che non è presente per la maggior parte delle lingue, ad esempio, la disponibilità di Wikipedia nella lingua di destinazione. Proponiamo un metodo semplice per il riconoscimento cross-lingual named entity (NER) che funziona bene in ambienti con risorse molto minime. Il nostro approccio utilizza un lessico per "tradurre" i dati annotati disponibili in una o più lingue ad alta risorsa nella lingua di destinazione, e impara un modello NER monolingue standard. Inoltre, quando Wikipedia è disponibile nella lingua di destinazione, il nostro metodo può migliorare i metodi basati su Wikipedia per ottenere risultati NER all\'avanguardia; Valutiamo su 7 lingue diverse, migliorando lo stato dell\'arte di una media del 5,5% punti F1. Con le risorse minime necessarie, questo è un approccio NER multilingue estremamente portatile, come illustrato utilizzando un linguaggio veramente a basso contenuto di risorse, l\'Uiguro.', 'ms': "Recent work in NLP has attempted to deal with low-resource languages but still assumed a resource level that is not present for most languages, e.g., the availability of Wikipedia in the target language.  We propose a simple method for cross-lingual named entity recognition (NER) that works well in settings with very minimal resources.  Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there.  Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results;  we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points.  With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.", 'ml': "Recent work in NLP has attempted to deal with low-resource languages but still assumed a resource level that is not present for most languages, e.g., the availability of Wikipedia in the target language.  കുറച്ച് വിഭവങ്ങളുള്ള സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d വളരെ ചെറുതായ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാധാരണ ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വേണ നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം ഒരു ലെക്സിക്സിയോണ്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് 'പരിഭാഷ' ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒന്നോ കൂടുതല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results;  7 വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു, 5.5% F1 പോയിന്റുകളില്\u200d സാധാരണ സ്ഥാനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. ചെറിയ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെടുന്നത് കൊണ്ട്, ഇത് വളരെ പോര്\u200dട്ടെടുക്കാന്\u200d പറ്റുന്ന ഒരു നെയിന്\u200d സാധ്യതയാണ്. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിഭവഭാഷ ഉപയോഗ", 'mt': "Xogħol reċenti fil-NLP ipprova jittratta l-lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi iżda g ħadu jassumi livell ta’ riżorsi li mhuwiex preżenti għall-biċċa l-kbira tal-lingwi, pereżempju d-disponibbiltà tal-Wikipedia fil-lingwa fil-mira. Aħna nipproponu metodu sempliċi għar-rikonoxximent interlingwistiku tal-entità msejħa (NER) li jaħdem tajjeb f’ambjenti b’riżorsi minimi ħafna. Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there.  Barra minn hekk, meta l-Wikipedia tkun disponibbli fil-lingwa fil-mira, il-metodu tagħna jista’ jtejjeb il-metodi bbażati fuq il-Wikipedia biex jagħti riżultati NER l-aktar avvanzati; we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points.  With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.", 'mn': 'NLP-ийн саяхан ажиллах нь бага боловсролын хэлний талаар ажиллаж, гэхдээ ихэнх хэлний хувьд оршиж чадахгүй боловсролын түвшинд л байдаг. Бид хэл хэлний нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөх энгийн арга зам (NER) гэдэг нь маш бага нөөц болон сайн ажилладаг. Бидний арга баримтууд нэг эсвэл олон өндөр боловсролын хэл(с) дээр ашиглаж байгаа өгөгдлийг зорилготой хэл(с) руу орлуулж, тэнд стандарт ганц хэлний NER загвар сурдаг. Дараа нь, Wikipedia нь зориулагдсан хэл дээр байх үед бидний арга нь Wikipedia-ын үндсэн арга замыг нэмэгдүүлж чадна. бид 7 төрлийн хэл дээр үнэлгээ, урлагийн төвшин байдлыг дундаж 5.5% F1 цэг дээр сайжруулж байна. Хамгийн бага баялаг боловсрол шаардлагатай тул энэ нь үнэхээр бага боловсролын хэл Уйгур хэлээр илэрхийлэгддэг хэл юм.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie prace w NLP próbowały poradzić sobie z językami niskimi zasobami, ale nadal zakładały poziom zasobów, który nie jest obecny w większości języków, np. dostępność Wikipedii w języku docelowym. Proponujemy prostą metodę wielojęzycznego rozpoznawania nazwanych entit (NER), która sprawdza się w ustawieniach z bardzo minimalnymi zasobami. Nasze podejście wykorzystuje leksykon do "tłumaczenia" adnotacji danych dostępnych w jednym lub kilku językach o wysokich zasobach na język docelowy i uczy się tam standardowego jednojęzycznego modelu NER. Ponadto, gdy Wikipedia jest dostępna w języku docelowym, nasza metoda może ulepszyć metody oparte na Wikipedii, aby uzyskać najnowocześniejsze wyniki NER; Oceniamy na siedmiu różnych językach, poprawiając state-of-the-art średnio 5,5% punktów F1. Przy minimalnych wymaganych zasobach jest to niezwykle przenośne podejście wielojęzyczne NER, jak ilustrowano przy użyciu naprawdę niskich zasobów języka ujgurskiego.', 'lt': "Neseniai atliktas NLP darbas bandė spręsti mažai išteklių turinčias kalbas, tačiau vis dar numatė išteklių lygį, kuris daugumai kalbų nėra, pvz., Wikipedia prieinama tiksline kalba. Siūlome paprastą tarpkalbinio vardinio subjekto pripažinimo (NER) metodą, kuris gerai veikia aplinkybėse, kuriose yra labai maži ištekliai. Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there.  Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results;  we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points.  Turint būtinus minimalius išteklius, tai yra itin nešiojamas tarpkalbinis NER metodas, kaip parodyta naudojant iš tikrųjų mažai išteklių turinčią kalbą Uygur.", 'mk': "Неодамнешната работа во НЛП се обиде да се справи со јазиците со ниски ресурси, но сé уште претпоставува ниво на ресурси кое не е присутно за повеќето јазици, на пример достапноста на Википедија на јазикот на целта. Ние предложуваме едноставен метод за прекујазичко препознавање на ентитетите (NER) кој функционира добро во поставувања со многу минимални ресурси. Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there.  Покрај тоа, кога Википедија е достапна на јазикот на целта, нашиот метод може да ги зголеми методите базирани на Википедија за да даде најсовремени резултати на НЕР; we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points.  With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.", 'ro': 'Lucrările recente în PNL au încercat să se ocupe de limbi cu resurse reduse, dar au presupus încă un nivel de resurse care nu este prezent pentru majoritatea limbilor, de exemplu, disponibilitatea Wikipedia în limba țintă. Propunem o metodă simplă pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite între limbi (NER), care funcționează bine în setări cu resurse foarte minime. Abordarea noastră utilizează un lexicon pentru a "traduce" date adnotate disponibile într-una sau mai multe limbi cu resurse mari în limba țintă și învață un model standard de NER monolingv acolo. Mai mult, atunci când Wikipedia este disponibilă în limba țintă, metoda noastră poate îmbunătăți metodele bazate pe Wikipedia pentru a obține rezultate NER de ultimă generație; Evaluăm pe 7 limbi diferite, îmbunătățind stadiul de ultimă oră cu o medie de 5,5% puncte F1. Cu resursele minime necesare, aceasta este o abordare NER translingvistică extrem de portabilă, după cum este ilustrată folosind un limbaj cu adevărat redus de resurse, uigura.', 'no': 'Nyleg arbeidet i NLP har prøvd å handsama med låg ressursspråk, men fortsatt anta eit ressursnivå som ikkje er tilgjengeleg for dei fleste språka, f.eks. tilgjengeleg Wikipedia i målspråket. Vi foreslår ein enkel metode for å gjenkjenne fleirspråk entitet (NER) som fungerer godt i innstillingar med svært minimale ressursar. Tilnærminga vårt gjer bruk av eit leksikon til å « translate » merke data tilgjengelege i ein eller fleire høg ressursspråk( ar) i målspråket, og lærer eit standard monolingual NER- modell der. I tillegg, når Wikipedia er tilgjengeleg i målspråket, kan metoden vårt forbetra Wikipediabaserte metodar for å få tilstanden av kunsten NER-resultat. vi evaluerer på 7 forskjellige språk, forbetra kunsttilstanden med gjennomsnittlig 5,5 % F1-punkt. Med dei minimale ressursane som krevst, er dette eit ekstremt portabilt krysspråksmålsk NER-tilnærming, som illustrert med ein verkeleg låg ressursspråk, Uyghur.', 'so': 'Shaqo ugu dambeysay e e NLP wuxuu isku dayay inuu kala macaamilo luqadaha hoose-resource laakiin wuxuu weli u maleeyay heer rasmi ah oo aan ku jirin luuqadaha badan, tusaale ahaan helitaanka Wikipedia luqada targetka ah. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa qaab fudud oo ku qoran luqada lagu magacaabay aqoonsiga entity (NER) oo si fiican u shaqeeya marka lagu sameeyo hababka aad u yaraan. Dhaqdhaqaalkayaga ayaa isticmaalaya leksikan si uu u turjumo macluumaad la caddeeyey oo ay ku jiraan luqada aad u badan ee luqada koowaad ee noocyada ah ee nooca ah ee NER. Furthermore, marka Wikipedia lagu helo luqada goalka ah, qaabkanagu wuxuu kordhin karaa qaababka ku saleysan Wikipedia si uu u soo bixiyo midhaha NER-ka-art; Waxaynu ku qiimeynaynaa 7 luuqado oo kala duduwan, horumarinayno xaaladda farshaxanka, qiyaastii 5.5 boqolkiiba F1. Inta ugu yaraan hantida loo baahan yahay, taasi waa qaab aad u adag oo luqadaha NER ah, sida loo soo bandhigay isticmaalka luqada aad u hooseeya, Uygur.', 'sv': 'Det senaste arbetet i NLP har försökt ta itu med lågresursspråk men antagit fortfarande en resursnivå som inte finns för de flesta språk, t.ex. tillgängligheten av Wikipedia på målspråket. Vi föreslår en enkel metod för flerspråkig namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER) som fungerar bra i miljöer med mycket minimala resurser. Vårt tillvägagångssätt använder sig av ett lexikon för att "översätta" kommenterade data tillgängliga på ett eller flera språk med hög resurs till målspråket, och lär sig en standardenspråkig NER-modell där. Vidare, när Wikipedia är tillgänglig på målspråket, kan vår metod förbättra Wikipedia baserade metoder för att ge state-of-the-art NER resultat; Vi utvärderar på 7 olika språk, vilket förbättrar det senaste med i genomsnitt 5,5% F1 poäng. Med de minimala resurser som krävs är detta en extremt portabel cross-lingual NER metod, vilket illustreras med hjälp av ett verkligt lågresursspråk, uiguriska.', 'ta': "அண்மையில் NLP வேலை குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளை நிர்வகிக்க முயற்சி செய்துள்ளது ஆனால் இன்னும் சேர்ந்த மொழிகளுக்கு கிடைக்கவில்லை என்று எண்ணி மிகவும் குறைந்தபட்ச வளங்களுடன் செயல்படும் அமைப்புகளில் நாம் ஒரு சுலபமான மொழிக்காட்டிற்கான முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக எங்கள் வழிமுறையாக 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பு' அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தகவலை ஒரு அல்லது பல உயர்ந்த மூலத்தின் மொழி( கள்) கிடைக்கும் மொழியில் பயன்படுத்தும், அங்கு ஒரு நி மேலும், விக்கிபிடியா இலக்கு மொழியில் கிடைக்கும்போது, எங்கள் முறைமையை விகிபிடியா அடிப்படையிலான முறைகளை அதிகரிக்க முடியு 7 வெவ்வேறு மொழிகளில் நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், 5.5% F1 புள்ளிகளின் சராசரி நிலையை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம். குறைந்தபட்ச வளங்கள் தேவைப்படும் பொழுது, இது மிகவும் குறைந்த நிலையான மொழியின் முறையாகும், உண்மையில் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் ம", 'sr': "Nedavno rad u NLP pokušao je da se suoči sa jezicima niskih resursa, ali ipak je pretpostavio nivo resursa koja nije prisutna većini jezika, npr. dostupnost Wikipedije na ciljnom jeziku. Predlažemo jednostavnu metodu za prejezičku priznanje entiteta (NER) koja dobro funkcioniše u postavima sa veoma minimalnim resursima. Naš pristup koristi leksikon za 'prevod' annotirane podatke dostupne na jednom ili nekoliko visokih jezika resursa na ciljnom jeziku, i tamo nauči standardni monojezički model NER. Dalje, kada je Wikipedia dostupna na ciljnom jeziku, naša metoda može poboljšati metode bazirane na Wikipediji kako bi dobili rezultate stanja umjetnosti NER-a; procjenjujemo na 7 različitih jezika, poboljšavamo stanje umjetnosti prosječnim 5,5% bodova F1. Sa minimalnim sredstvima potrebnim, ovo je izuzetno prijenosni preko jezika NER-a, kao što je ilustrirano koristeći istinski jezik niskog resursa, Uyghur.", 'si': 'NLP වලින් අලුත් වැඩේ අඩුම භාෂාවක් සමඟ වැඩ කරන්න උත්සාහ කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් තාමත් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සමඟ විකිපිඩියාගේ ලැබ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශාල භාෂාවක් නම් අනුවර්ථක අඳුරණය (NER) සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක්. ඒක හොඳට වැඩ කරන Name ඉතින්, විකිපිඩියාව ලක්ෂ භාෂාවට පුළුවන් වෙනකොට, අපේ විද්\u200dයාව විකිපිඩියාව අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාවට පුළුවන් වික අපි වෙනස් භාෂාවල් 7 වල විශේෂ කරනවා, ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරමාණය 5.5% F1 පින්තූර වලින් වැඩ කරනවා. අඩුම භාෂාවක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල භාෂාවක් වගේ, ඇත්තටම අඩුම භාෂාවක්', 'ur': "NLP میں اچھا کام کم منبع زبانوں کے ساتھ تلاش کی ہے لیکن اب بھی ایک منبع سطح سمجھ رہا ہے جو اکثر زبانوں کے لئے موجود نہیں ہے، جیسے کہ موجود زبان میں ویکیپیڈیا کا موجود ہے. ہم ایک ساده طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں گے جن کا نام ایک ٹیٹی شناسایی (NER) ہے جو بہت ہی کم سرمایہ کے ساتھ بہت اچھا کام کرتا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ ایک لکھی زبان میں استعمال کرتا ہے کہ 'ترجمہ' کے لئے ایک یا بہت سے اچھے سراسر زبان میں موجود ہونے والی اطلاعات کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے اور وہاں ایک ایسی سیکھی سیکھی جاتی ہے کہ ایک سیکھی سیکھی NER موڈل۔ اور جب ویکیپیڈیا موجود زبان میں موجود ہوتا ہے، ہمارا طریقہ ویکیپیڈیا کی بنیاد رسانی طریقوں کو زیادہ کر سکتا ہے کہ ان کی حالت-of-the-art NER نتیجے حاصل کریں، ہم 7 مختلف زبانوں پر مطابق کریں گے، آرتی کی حالت کو آسانی سے 5.5% F1 پوینٹوں کے مطابق. کمی منابع کے ساتھ یہ بہت زیادہ قابل تحریک زبان کی NER طریقہ ہے جس طرح ایک حقیقت کم منبع زبان کے مطابق دکھائی گئی ہے، یوگhur.", 'uz': "NLP'da yangi ishni kichik manba tillarini boshqarishga harakat qildi, ammo, ko'pchilik tillari uchun mavzu darajaga e g a emas, m. m. tilda Wikipedia mavjud. Biz bir oddiy tilni tasdiqlash (NER) qo'llanmalar bilan juda kichkina rasmlar bilan ishlayapti. Bizning usuli, bir yoki bir necha yuqori manbaning tilida 'tarjima' maʼlumotdan foydalanadi, va bu yerda standard monolingual NER modelini o'rganadi. Davom etilganda, Wikipedia shaxsiy tilda mavjud bo'lganda, bizning usuli Wikipedia asosiy usullarni oshirish mumkin, va xavfsiz NER natijalarini bajarishi mumkin; 7 turli tillarda qiymatmiz, barcha holatini 5.5% F1 nuqtning o'rtasida o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Bu juda qisqa manbalar kerak boʻlgan narsalar bilan, bu juda juda juda qisqa tildagi NER usuli. Bu haqiqiqiy kam manbaning tillari yordamida o'zgartirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Công việc g ần đây tại Njala đã có ý định xử lý các ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên nhưng vẫn đã có một cấp tài nguyên không có sẵn cho hầu hết các ngôn ngữ, ví dụ như việc Wikipedia có sẵn trong ngôn ngữ tiêu điểm. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp đơn giản cho việc nhận dạng thực thể tên xuyên ngôn ngữ (NER) mà hoạt động tốt trong thiết lập với nguồn tài nguyên rất tối thiểu. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta dùng ngôn ngữ văn bản để "dịch" dữ liệu ghi chú có s ẵn trong một hoặc nhiều ngôn ngữ có tài nguyên lớn vào ngôn ngữ đích, và học một mô hình tảng ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ vô ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ chuẩn ở đó. Thêm nữa, khi Wikipedia đã được phát tán trong ngôn ngữ tiêu biểu, phương pháp của chúng tôi có thể nâng cấp phương pháp căn cứ của Wikipedia để có những kết quả tối tân nhất. Chúng tôi đánh giá các ngôn ngữ 7-khác nhau, nâng cao trạng thái nghệ thuật bằng trung bình 55.5=. F1. Với mức độ tối thiểu cần thiết, đây là một cách tiếp cận ngôn ngữ rộng mở cực kỳ di động, như ví dụ sử dụng ngôn ngữ yếu kém, Uyghur.', 'bg': 'Последната работа в НЛП се опитва да се справи с езици с нисък ресурс, но все още приема ниво на ресурс, което не присъства за повечето езици, например наличието на Уикипедия на целевия език. Предлагаме прост метод за междуезично разпознаване на имена (НЕР), който работи добре в настройки с много минимални ресурси. Нашият подход използва лексикон за "превеждане" на анотирани данни на един или няколко езика с висок ресурс на целевия език и научава стандартен монолингов модел. Освен това, когато Уикипедия е достъпна на целевия език, нашият метод може да подобри базираните на Уикипедия методи, за да даде най-съвременни резултати от НЕР; Ние оценяваме на 7 различни езика, подобрявайки съвременните технологии със средно 5,5% точки. С минималните необходими ресурси това е изключително преносим междуезичен подход, както е илюстрирано с помощта на един наистина нисък ресурс език - уйгур.', 'da': "Seneste arbejde i NLP har forsøgt at beskæftige sig med lav ressource sprog, men stadig antaget et ressourceniveau, der ikke er til stede for de fleste sprog, f.eks. tilgængeligheden af Wikipedia på målsproget. Vi foreslår en enkel metode til tværsproget navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER), der fungerer godt i indstillinger med meget minimale ressourcer. Vores tilgang gør brug af et leksikon til at 'oversætte' annoterede data tilgængelige på et eller flere sprog med høj ressource til målsproget, og lærer en standard ensproget NER model der. Endvidere, når Wikipedia er tilgængelig på målsproget, kan vores metode forbedre Wikipedia baserede metoder til at give state-of-the-art NER resultater; Vi evaluerer på 7 forskellige sprog, hvilket forbedrer state-of-the-art med et gennemsnit på 5,5% F1 point. Med de minimale ressourcer, der kræves, er dette en ekstremt bærbar tværsproget NER tilgang, som illustreret ved hjælp af et virkelig lav ressource sprog, Uyghur.", 'nl': "Recent werk in NLP heeft geprobeerd om te gaan met low-resource talen, maar nog steeds verondersteld een resource niveau dat niet aanwezig is voor de meeste talen, bijvoorbeeld de beschikbaarheid van Wikipedia in de doeltaal. We stellen een eenvoudige methode voor cross-lingual named entity recognition (NER) voor die goed werkt in omgevingen met zeer minimale middelen. Onze aanpak maakt gebruik van een lexicon om geannoteerde gegevens die beschikbaar zijn in een of meerdere high resource talen te 'vertalen' naar de doeltaal, en leert daar een standaard monolingual NER model. Verder, wanneer Wikipedia beschikbaar is in de doeltaal, kan onze methode Wikipedia gebaseerde methoden verbeteren om state-of-the-art NER resultaten te leveren; We evalueren op zeven verschillende talen en verbeteren de state-of-the-art met een gemiddelde van 5,5% F1 punten. Met de minimale middelen die nodig zijn, is dit een uiterst draagbare cross-lingual NER-benadering, zoals geïllustreerd wordt met behulp van een echt low-resource taal, het Oeigoers.", 'hr': "Nedavni rad u NLP-u pokušao je riješiti jezike niskih resursa, ali ipak je pretpostavio nivo resursa koji nije prisutna većini jezika, npr. dostupnost Wikipedia na ciljnom jeziku. Predlažemo jednostavnu metodu za prejezičnu priznanje entiteta (NER) koja dobro funkcionira u postavima s vrlo minimalnim resursima. Naš pristup koristi leksikon za 'prevoditi' annotirane podatke dostupne na jednom ili nekoliko visokih jezika resursa na ciljnom jeziku i uči standardni monojezički model NER-a tamo. Dalje, kada je Wikipedia dostupna na ciljnom jeziku, naša metoda može poboljšati metode bazirane na Wikipediji kako bi dobili rezultate stanja umjetnosti NER-a; procjenjujemo 7 različitih jezika, poboljšavajući stanje umjetnosti prosječnim 5,5% bodova F1. S minimalnim sredstvima potrebnim, ovo je izuzetno prenosiv preko jezika NER-a, kao što je ilustrirano koristeći istinski jezik niskog resursa, Uyghur.", 'de': 'Neuere Arbeiten in NLP haben versucht, sich mit ressourcenarmen Sprachen zu befassen, aber immer noch ein Ressourcenniveau angenommen, das für die meisten Sprachen nicht vorhanden ist, z.B. die Verfügbarkeit von Wikipedia in der Zielsprache. Wir schlagen eine einfache Methode zur sprachübergreifenden Named Entity Recognition (NER) vor, die in Umgebungen mit sehr minimalen Ressourcen gut funktioniert. Unser Ansatz nutzt ein Lexikon, um annotierte Daten, die in einer oder mehreren High Resource Languages verfügbar sind, in die Zielsprache "zu übersetzen", und lernt dort ein standardisiertes einsprachiges NER-Modell. Wenn Wikipedia in der Zielsprache verfügbar ist, kann unsere Methode außerdem Wikipedia-basierte Methoden verbessern, um state-of-the-art NER-Ergebnisse zu liefern; Wir bewerten sieben verschiedene Sprachen und verbessern den Stand der Technik um durchschnittlich 5,5% F1 Punkte. Mit den minimalen Ressourcen, die benötigt werden, ist dies ein extrem portabler, sprachübergreifender NER-Ansatz, wie anhand einer wirklich ressourcenarmen Sprache, Uigurisch, veranschaulicht wird.', 'id': "Pekerjaan baru-baru ini di NLP telah mencoba untuk menangani bahasa sumber daya rendah tetapi masih menganggap tingkat sumber daya yang tidak hadir untuk kebanyakan bahasa, misalnya, disponibilitas Wikipedia dalam bahasa sasaran. Kami mengusulkan metode sederhana untuk pengenalan entitas bernama saling bahasa (NER) yang bekerja dengan baik dalam pengaturan dengan sumber daya yang sangat minimal. pendekatan kami menggunakan sebuah leksikon untuk 'terjemahkan' data anotasi tersedia dalam satu atau beberapa bahasa sumber daya tinggi ke bahasa sasaran, dan belajar model NER standar monobahasa di sana. Selain itu, ketika Wikipedia tersedia dalam bahasa sasaran, metode kita dapat meningkatkan metode berdasarkan Wikipedia untuk memberikan hasil NER yang terbaik; kami mengevaluasi pada 7 bahasa yang berbeda, meningkatkan state-of-the-art dengan rata-rata 5,5% titik F1. With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.", 'tr': "NLP'de ýakyn wagtlarda iň azy ressurs dilleri bilen çykarmak synanyşdy, ýöne heniz hem bolsa ýene-de birnäçe diller üçin bolmadyk ressurs derejesi, meselâ maksada dilinde Wikipediýanyň bar. Biz dillerden çarpaz dilli bir taýýarlama (NER) üçin ýeňil bir yöntem teklip edýäris ki bu iň az resurslar bilen gowy işleýär. Biziň ýaryşymyz bir ýa-da birnäçe ýokary çeşme dili(ler) içine 'terjime' edilen hasaplanýan maglumatlary üçin bir leksiýany ulanýar we ol ýerde standart monodil NER modelini öwredýär. Mundan soňra, Wikipediýa maksady dilinde bar bolsa, biziň metodamyz Wikipediýa daşary ýagdaý täzelikleri NER netijelerini getirmek üçin üýtgebilir; 7 dürli dilde çykyş edip, sanat meýdançasyny 5.5% F1 noktalaryna görä gowlaýarys. Açkyn çeşmeler gerekli bolsa, bu ýer iň köp dilli NER ýagdaýynda adatça taýýarlanan bir nusga, Uyghur dilini iň az resurslar dilinde ulanyp görkezilýär.", 'ko': "NLP의 최근 작업은 저자원 언어를 처리하려고 시도했지만, 대부분의 언어에 자원 수준이 없다고 가정합니다. 예를 들어 목표 언어의 위키백과 사용 가능성입니다.우리는 자원이 매우 적은 환경에서 잘 작동하는 간단한 다중 언어 명칭 실체 식별(NER) 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 사전을 이용하여 한 가지 또는 몇 가지 고자원 언어에서 사용할 수 있는 주석 데이터를 목표 언어에'번역'하고 그곳에서 표준적인 단어 NER 모델을 배운다.또한 위키백과가 목표 언어로 제공될 때 우리의 방법은 위키백과 기반의 방법을 강화하여 가장 선진적인 NER 결과를 창출할 수 있다.우리는 7개 언어를 평가해 평균 5.5%의 F1 점수를 올렸다.필요한 자원이 가장 적은 상황에서 이것은 이식하기 쉬운 다중 언어 NER 방법이다. 예를 들어 진정한 저자원 언어인 위구르어를 사용하는 것과 같다.", 'fa': 'کارهای اخیر در NLP سعی کرد با زبانهای کم منبع کند ولی هنوز سطح منابع را تصور کرد که برای بیشتر زبانها وجود ندارد، مثال دسترسی ویکیپدیا در زبان هدف است. ما یک روش ساده برای شناسایی واحد\u200cهای مختلف زبان (NER) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در تنظیمات با منابع بسیار کم کار می\u200cکند. دستور ما از زبان هدف استفاده می\u200cکند تا داده\u200cهای نوشته شده\u200cای که در یک یا چند زبان(ها) منابع بالا در یک زبان هدف می\u200cباشد و یک مدل NER استاندارد را یاد می\u200cگیرد. بعلاوه، هنگامی که ویکیپدیا در زبان هدف دسترسی داشته باشد، روش ما می تواند روش\u200cهای بنیاد ویکیپدیا را برای نتیجه\u200cهای حالت هنری NER بیشتر کند. ما در ۷ زبان مختلف ارزیابی می کنیم، با توجه به حدود ۵.۵ درصد نقطه\u200cهای F1 بهبود می\u200cکنیم. با منابع کمینی که لازم دارد، این یک روش NER متوسط زبان بسیار قابل حمل است، همانطور که با استفاده از زبان واقعا کم منابع، Uyghur نشان داده شده است.', 'sq': 'Puna e fundit në NLP ka përpjekur të trajtojë gjuhët me burime të ulëta, por ende ka marrë një nivel burimesh që nuk është i pranishëm për shumicën e gjuhëve, për shembull dispozicionin e Wikipedias në gjuhën objektive. We propose a simple method for cross-lingual named entity recognition (NER) that works well in settings with very minimal resources.  Përqasja jonë përdor një lexikon për të përkthyer të dhënat e anotuara në dispozicion në një apo disa gjuhë të larta burimesh në gjuhën e objektivit dhe mëson një model standard monogjuhës NER atje. Për më tepër, kur Wikipedia është në dispozicion në gjuhën e objektivit, metoda jonë mund të përmirësojë metodat e bazuara në Wikipedia për të dhënë rezultate të larta NER; ne vlerësojmë në 7 gjuhë të ndryshme, duke përmirësuar gjendjen e teknologjisë me një mesatare prej 5.5% pikësh F1. With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.', 'sw': "Kazi za hivi karibuni nchini NLP imejaribu kukabiliana na lugha ndogo ya rasilimali lakini bado ilidhani kuwa kiwango cha rasilimali ambacho hakipo kwa lugha nyingi, kwa mfano, upatikanaji wa Wikipedia katika lugha inayolenga. Tunazipendekeza njia rahisi kwa lugha inayoitwa kutambua entity (NER) inayofanya kazi vizuri katika mazingira yenye rasilimali madogo sana. Hatua yetu inatumia ukosekani kwa 'kutafsiri' taarifa zinazopatikana kwa lugha moja au kadhaa za rasilimali za juu katika lugha ya lengo, na kujifunza modeli ya msingi wa lugha ya kimapenzi nchini humo. Zaidi, pale Wikipedia inapopatikana kwa lugha ya lengo, mbinu yetu inaweza kuongeza mbinu zilizoko kwenye Wikipedia ili kutoa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa ya NNE; tunapitia lugha 7 mbalimbali, kuboresha hali ya sanaa kwa wastani wa asilimia 5.5 ya F1. Kwa kiasi kikubwa cha rasilimali zinazohitajika, hii ni mbinu yenye uwezekano mkubwa zaidi ya lugha ya NER, kama ilivyoelezwa kwa kutumia lugha yenye rasilimali duni, Uyghur.", 'az': "NLP'də son işlər düşük ressurs dilləri ilə çəkinməyə çalışır, amma hələ də çox dillər üçün olmayan ressurs seviyesini, məsələn, məqsəd dilində Wikipedianin faydalanmasını hesab etdi. Biz çox az qüvvətli qüvvətlər ilə yaxşı işlədən çox dilli entitə tanıması üçün asan bir yol təklif edirik. Bizim tərzimiz bir ya da bir çox yüksək kaynaq dilində faydalanır və orada standart monodilli NER modeli öyrənir. Daha sonra, Wikipedia məqsəd dilində faydalandığında, bizim metodumuz Wikipedia tabanlı metodları NER sonuçlarını təhsil etmək üçün art ıra bilər; 7 müxtəlif dillərdə müəyyən edirik, sanatın vəziyyətini ortalama 5,5% F1 noktaları ilə yaxşılaşdırırıq. Uyghur dilini istifadə etdiyi kimi, bu çox düşük-kaynaq dilini istifadə edir.", 'af': "Onlangste werk in NLP het probeer om met lae hulpbron tale te behandel, maar nog nog 'n hulpbron vlak aangeneem wat nie voorsien is vir meeste tale, bv. die beskikbaarheid van Wikipedia in die doel taal. Ons voorstel 'n eenvoudige metode vir kruistale genaamde entiteit herken (NER) wat goed werk in instellings met baie minimale hulpbronne. Ons toegang maak gebruik van 'n leksikon na 'translate' annotated data beskikbaar in een of veelvuldige hoë hulpbron taal( s) binne in die doel taal, en leer 'n standaard monotale NER model daar. Verder, wanneer Wikipedia in die doel taal beskikbaar is, kan ons metode Wikipedia gebaseerde metodes verbeter om state-of-the-art NER resultate te gee; ons evalueer op 7 verskillende tale, verbeter die staat van die kuns deur 'n gemiddelde van 5.5% F1 punte. Met die minimale hulpbronne wat benodig is, is dit 'n ekstrem draagbare kruistale NER-toegang, soos illustreer deur 'n regtig lae hulpbronne taal, Uyghur.", 'bn': 'এনএলপিতে সাম্প্রতিক কাজ কম সম্পদ ভাষার সাথে চুক্তি করার চেষ্টা করেছে কিন্তু এখনো মনে করা হয়েছে একটি সম্পদ স্তর যা বেশীরভাগ ভাষার জন্য উপস্থিত না, যেমন লক্ষ্য আমরা বিভিন্ন ভাষার জন্য একটি সহজ পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যার নাম প্রতিষ্ঠান স্বীকার (নিউ আর) যা খুব কম সম্পদের সাথে ব্যবস্থা করা  আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা একটি লেক্সিকোর ব্যবহার করে একটি বা বেশ কিছু উচ্চ সম্পদ ভাষায় অনুবাদ করার তথ্য ব্যবহার করে লক্ষ্য ভাষায় পাওয়া যায় এবং সেখানে একটি স্ট্ এছাড়াও, যখন উইকিপিডিয়া টার্গেট ভাষায় পাওয়া যায়, তখন আমাদের পদ্ধতি উইকিপিডিয়ার ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি বাড়িয়ে দিতে পারে যার ফলাফলের ফলাফল আমরা ৭টি বিভিন্ন ভাষায় মূল্য প্রদান করি, সাধারণ ৫. নিম্নলিখিত সম্পদের মাধ্যমে এটা একটি অত্যন্ত প্রস্থানীয় ক্রস-ভাষায় প্রকাশিত নতুন প্রতিক্রিয়া, যেমনটা সত্যিকারের কম সম্পদ ভাষা ব্যবহার', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ በNLP ውስጥ የሚደረገውን ሥራ ከታናሹ resource ቋንቋዎች ለመቀናቀል ሞክሮአል፤ ነገር ግን ገና ለብዙዎቹ ቋንቋዎች ያልተሰጠው የክፍተት ደረጃን ነው፤ ለምሳሌ Wikipedia በአካባቢው ቋንቋ መጠቀም ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ማውቀት (NER) በተለየ በጣም ትንሽ ሀብት በተደረገው ማሰናከል የሚደረገውን ቀላል ልማድ እናስጀራለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን ለሌክሲኮን ‘ትርጓም’ የተጠቃቀለ ዳታዎችን በአንድ ወይም በብዙ ከፍተኛ resource ቋንቋ(s) ወደ ተቃውሞ ቋንቋ እና ወደዚያ የተመሳሳይ የአንድራዊ ነፃ አዲስ ሞዴል ትማራለች፡፡ Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results;  we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points.  ይህ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካላዊ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ነው፡፡', 'hy': "ՆԼՊ-ի վերջին աշխատանքը փորձել է վերաբերվել ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուների հետ, բայց դեռևս ենթադրել է ռեսուրսների մակարդակ, որը գոյություն չունի լեզուների մեծ մասում, օրինակ՝ Վիքիփեդիայի հասանելիությունը նպատակային լեզուում: We propose a simple method for cross-lingual named entity recognition (NER) that works well in settings with very minimal resources.  Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there.  Ավելին, երբ Վիքիփեդիան հասանելի է նպատակային լեզվով, մեր մեթոդը կարող է բարելավել Վիքիփեդիայի հիմնված մեթոդները, որպեսզի ստանան նորագույն ՆԵՌ արդյունքները: մենք գնահատում ենք 7 տարբեր լեզուներով, բարելավելով տեխնոլոգիան միջինում 5.5 տոկոսով F1 միավորով: With the minimal resources required, this is an extremely portable cross-lingual NER approach, as illustrated using a truly low-resource language, Uyghur.", 'bs': "Nedavni rad u NLP-u pokušao je riješiti jezike niskih resursa, ali ipak je pretpostavio nivo resursa koja nije prisutna većinom jezika, na primjer dostupnost Wikipedia na ciljnom jeziku. Predlažemo jednostavnu metodu za prejezičnu priznanje entiteta (NER) koja dobro funkcioniše u postavima sa vrlo minimalnim resursima. Naš pristup koristi leksikon za 'prevoditi' annotirane podatke dostupne na jednom ili nekoliko visokih jezika resursa na ciljni jezik, i tamo nauči standardni monojezički model NER-a. Dalje, kada je Wikipedia dostupna na ciljnom jeziku, naša metoda može poboljšati metode bazirane na Wikipediji kako bi dobili rezultate NER-a iz stanja umjetnosti; procjenjujemo na 7 različitih jezika, poboljšavamo stanje umjetnosti prosječnom od 5,5% F1 bodova. Sa minimalnim resursima potrebnim, ovo je izuzetno prenosiv preko jezika NER-a, kao što je ilustrurano koristeći istinski jezik niskog resursa, Uyghur.", 'fi': 'Viimeaikainen työ NLP:ssä on yrittänyt käsitellä vähävaraisia kieliä, mutta oletuksena on kuitenkin resurssien taso, joka ei ole läsnä useimmilla kielillä, esimerkiksi Wikipedian saatavuus kohdekielellä. Ehdotamme yksinkertaista menetelmää monikieliseen nimettyyn entiteettitunnistukseen (NER), joka toimii hyvin asetuksissa, joissa resurssit ovat hyvin vähäiset. Lähestymistapamme käyttää sanastoa "kääntämään" yhdellä tai useammalla korkean resurssin kielellä (kielillä) saatavilla olevaa merkintää kohdekielelle, ja oppii siellä vakiomuotoisen yksikielisen NER-mallin. Lisäksi, kun Wikipedia on saatavilla kohdekielellä, menetelmämme voi parantaa Wikipediaan perustuvia menetelmiä tuottaakseen huippuluokan NER-tuloksia; Arvioimme seitsemällä eri kielellä parantaen tekniikan tasoa keskimäärin 5,5% F1-pisteellä. Tarvittavilla resursseilla tämä on erittäin kannettava monikielinen NER-lähestymistapa, kuten havainnollistetaan käyttämällä todella vähävaraista kieltä, uiguuria.', 'ca': "La feina recent en NLP ha intentat tractar amb llengües de baix recursos però encara ha assumit un nivell de recursos que no està present per a la majoria de llengües, per exemple la disponibilitat de Wikipedia en el llenguatge d'objectiu. Proposem un mètode simple per al reconeixement interlingüístic d'entitats anomenades (NER) que funciona bé en entorns amb recursos molt mínimos. Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there.  També, quan la Wikipedia està disponible en el llenguatge d'objectiu, el nostre mètode pot millorar els mètodes basats en la Wikipedia per donar resultats NER més avançats; valorem en 7 llengües diverses, millorant l'estat d'última generació d'una mitjana del 5,5% de punts F1. Amb els recursos mínimos requerits, aquest és un enfocament NER translingüístic extremadament portable, com s'ilustra utilitzant un llenguatge realment de baix recursos, Uyghur.", 'cs': 'Nedávná práce v NLP se pokusila vypořádat s nízkými zdroji jazyků, ale přesto předpokládala úroveň zdrojů, která není přítomna pro většinu jazyků, např. dostupnost Wikipedie v cílovém jazyce. Navrhujeme jednoduchou metodu rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER), která funguje dobře v nastavení s minimálními zdroji. Náš přístup využívá slovník k "překladu" anotovaných dat dostupných v jednom nebo několika jazycích s vysokými zdroji do cílového jazyka a učí se tam standardní monojazyčný model NER. Pokud je Wikipedie dostupná v cílovém jazyce, může naše metoda vylepšit metody založené na Wikipedii, aby dosáhla nejmodernějších NER výsledků; Hodnotíme na sedmi různých jazycích, zlepšujeme stav techniky o průměr 5,5% F1 bodů. S minimálními potřebami zdrojů je to extrémně přenosný přístup mezi jazyky NER, jak je ilustrováno pomocí skutečně nízkých zdrojů, ujgurštiny.', 'et': 'Hiljutine töö NLP-s on püüdnud tegeleda madala ressursiga keeltega, kuid siiski eeldas ressursitaseme, mida enamikus keeltes ei esine, nt Wikipedia kättesaadavus sihtkeeles. Pakume välja lihtsa meetodi keeleüleseks nimega olemite tuvastamiseks (NER), mis toimib hästi seadistustes väga minimaalsete ressurssidega. Meie lähenemisviis kasutab sõnavara, et tõlkida märgitud andmeid ühes või mitmes suure ressursiga keeles sihtkeelde ning õpib seal standardse ühekeelse NER mudeli. Kui Vikipeedia on kättesaadav sihtkeeles, võib meie meetod täiustada Vikipeediapõhiseid meetodeid, et anda kaasaegseid NER-tulemusi; Hindame 7 erinevat keelt, parandades tehnika taset keskmiselt 5,5% F1 punkti võrra. Minimaalsete ressurssidega on tegemist äärmiselt kaasaskantava keeleülese NER-lähenemisviisiga, nagu on näidatud tõeliselt vähese ressursiga keeles uõguur.', 'ha': "Yin aikin na NLP ya yi jarraba su yi aiki da harshen na ƙasan-resource, kuma amma yana da zato wata daraja wadda ba ya halarce wa masu yawa na harshen, misali, da Tilayan Wikimedia cikin lugha na goan. Tuna goyya da wata hanyo mai sauƙi wa sunan-nau'in-nau'in da aka ambaci sunan shaidar abuni (NER) wanda ke aiki da amfani da kayan daidaita masu ƙaranci. Tsarakanmu na amfani da wani leksisi zuwa 'taɓa' da aka sanar da data masu fassara cikin lugha guda ko wasu masu sarrafa na resource(s) zuwa harshen maganar aimakin, kuma yana sanar da wata motel na daidaita na GNOME na farko a inda. Furtheran, idan an iya samar da Wikimedia cikin harshen wanda aka ƙayyade shi, zaɓen hanyoyinmu yana iya ƙaranci shiryoyin Wikimedia da za'a nuna state-of-the-art NER fassarar; Ina ƙayyade cikin harshen 7-turu, kuma Muke kyautata halin-sanar da gwargwadon pointi 5.5% F1. Ga da kima da aka ƙayyade, wannan wata mataimaki mai baya na fassarar-harshen na NER, kamar an bayyana shi a yi amfani da harshen gaskiya na wuri-resource, Uighur.", 'sk': 'Nedavno delo v NLP je poskušalo obravnavati jezike z nizkimi viri, vendar je še vedno prevzelo raven virov, ki ni prisotna za večino jezikov, npr. razpoložljivost Wikipedije v ciljnem jeziku. Predlagamo preprosto metodo za medjezično prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER), ki dobro deluje v nastavitvah z zelo minimalnimi viri. Naš pristop uporablja leksikon za "prevajanje" označenih podatkov, ki so na voljo v enem ali več jezikih z visokimi viri, v ciljni jezik in se tam nauči standardnega enojezičnega modela NER. Poleg tega, ko je Wikipedija na voljo v ciljnem jeziku, lahko naša metoda izboljša metode, ki temeljijo na Wikipediji, da prinese najsodobnejše rezultate NER; Ocenjujemo na 7 različnih jezikih in izboljšamo najsodobnejšo vrednost za povprečno 5,5% F1 točk. Z minimalnimi potrebnimi viri gre za izjemno prenosni večjezični pristop NER, kot je prikazano z uporabo jezika z nizkimi viri, ujgurščina.', 'he': 'Recent work in NLP has attempted to deal with low-resource languages but still assumed a resource level that is not present for most languages, e.g., the availability of Wikipedia in the target language.  אנו מציעים שיטה פשוטה לזהות ישויות בשם חוצה שפה (NER) שעובדת היטב במסדרות עם משאבים מינימליים מאוד. הגישה שלנו משתמשת בלקסיקון כדי לתרגם נתונים נכתבים זמינים בשפה(ים) אחת או מספר משאבים גבוהים לשפה המטרה, וללמד שם מודל NER monolingual סטנדרטי. Further, when Wikipedia is available in the target language, our method can enhance Wikipedia based methods to yield state-of-the-art NER results;  we evaluate on 7 diverse languages, improving the state-of-the-art by an average of 5.5% F1 points.  עם המשאבים המינימליים הנדרשים, זו גישה חד-שפתית נושאית ביותר NER, כפי שנראה באמצעות שפת משאבים ממש נמוכה, אויגור.', 'jv': "biasa Awak dhéwé ngerbah sistem sing sampeyan kanggo kelas-sampeyan anyar tentang (NIR) iki dadi apik dhéwé ning aturan sing paling apik. Ndoleh dhéwé nggawe ngubah kelikon kanggo 'translation' dadi nggawe data sing wis ana dadi sabanjuré supoyo nggawe barang nggawe Language(s) kanggo Ketokan kanggo ngeratan language, lan lesanjut model singa-ingkang NeR Lahor tambah, kelalen winipediya sing wis ana ing tarjamahan luwih, kita ngubah njaluk pediya sing basa manut kanggo ngerasakno state-of-the-arts NUR seneng diputaaken langgar tarjamahan; Ning awak dhéwé kalih-kalih kanggo 7 ulih luwih, njaluk bantuan kanggo langgar tarjamahan kanggo 5.5% F1 puntu. Ingo perusahaan minimal sing kudu nggawe, iki dadi diangkat langkung pakan-pakan bangsa PIR, asla sampeyan seneng nggambar aturan akeh bantuan, UYgur.", 'bo': "NLP ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱེད་འདོད་ཡིན་ནའང་སྐད་རིགས་ཕལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་རྣམས་མེད་པའ ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་གཅིག་གི་དབང་ཆ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྟབས་བདེ་བ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our approach makes use of a lexicon to 'translate' annotated data available in one or several high resource language(s) into the target language, and learns a standard monolingual NER model there. མ་ཟད། Wikipedia་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་Wikipedia་བརྟེན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པར་state-of-the-art NER རྒྱལ་ཁ ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་དེ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད། ཆུང་བའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཆུང་དག་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་འདི་ནུས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐོར་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Cross-Lingual Induction and Transfer of Verb Classes Based on Word Vector Space Specialisation', 'ar': 'الاستقراء عبر اللغات ونقل فئات الفعل بناءً على تخصص مساحة متجه الكلمات', 'pt': 'Indução interlinguística e transferência de classes verbais com base na especialização em espaço vetorial de palavras', 'fr': "Induction multilingue et transfert de classes de verbes basées sur la spécialisation de l'espace vectoriel de mots", 'es': 'Inducción multilingüe y transferencia de clases de verbos basadas en la especialización Word Vector Space', 'ja': 'ワードベクトル空間特化に基づく動詞クラスのクロスリンガル誘導と転送', 'zh': '盖词向量间特化动词类之跨言归移也', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल प्रेरण और वर्ड वेक्टर स्पेस विशेषज्ञता के आधार पर क्रिया कक्षाओं का स्थानांतरण', 'ru': 'Межязыковая индукция и перенос классов глаголов на основе специализации Word Vector Space', 'ga': 'Ionduchtú Trastheangach agus Aistriú Aicmí Briathra Bunaithe ar Speisialtóireacht Spáis Veicteoir Focal', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű indukció és verbosztályok átadása a Word Vector Space Specialisation alapján', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσική επαγωγή και μεταφορά τάξεων ρήμων με βάση την εξειδίκευση διανυσματικού διαστήματος λέξεων', 'it': 'Induzione interlinguistica e trasferimento di classi di verbi basate sulla specializzazione dello spazio vettoriale di parole', 'lt': 'Žodžių klasių tarpkalbinė indukcija ir perdavimas pagal žodžių vektorių erdvės specializaciją', 'kk': 'Сөздің вектор бос орын специализациясына негізделген Verb классының бірнеше тіл индукциясы және транспорттауы', 'mk': 'Крослингвална индукција и трансфер на класи на зборови врз основа на специјализација на векторниот простор', 'ms': 'Penyulitan dan Pemindahan Kelas Verb Berdasarkan Spesialisasi Ruang Vektor Perkataan', 'ml': 'Name', 'mn': 'Үг векторын орон зай төлөвлөгөө дээр үндсэн хэлбэрийн индукцион болон тайлбарлах', 'no': 'Krysslingsinduksjon og overføring av verbklasser basert på ordvektorromspesialisering', 'pl': 'Interjęzyczna indukcja i transfer zajęć czasowników opartych na specjalizacji przestrzeni wektorowej słowa', 'mt': 'L-Induzzjoni u t-Trasferiment Cros-Lingwali tal-Klassijiet tal-Verbi bbażati fuq Speċjalizzazzjoni tal-Ispazju tal-Vetturi tal-Kliem', 'ro': 'Inducția interlingvistică și transferul claselor de verbe bazate pe specializarea spațiului vector Word', 'sr': 'KrozLingualna indukcija i prebacivanje klasa verba temeljena na specijalizaciji svemira riječi vektora', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Induction and Transfer of Verb classes based on word Vector Space Specialisation', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig induktion och överföring av verbklasser baserat på Word Vector Space Specialisering', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Word Vector Space Specialisation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết ngôn ngữ rộng và truyền đạt các giai điệu Verbis Based on Từ Vectror Space Professors.', 'da': 'Tværsproget induktion og overførsel af verbklasser baseret på Word Vector Space Specialisering', 'bg': 'Междулингвистична индукция и трансфер на класове глаголи въз основа на специализация в пространството на вектора на думи', 'hr': 'KrozLingualna indukcija i prebacivanje klasa verba temeljena na specijalizaciji prostora riječi vektora', 'nl': 'Cross-linguale inductie en overdracht van werkwoordenklassen op basis van woordvectorruimte specialisatie', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende Induktion und Transfer von Verbklassen basierend auf Word Vector Space Spezialisierung', 'id': 'Induksi dan Transfer Salib Bahasa Kelas Verb Berdasarkan Spesialisasi Ruang Vektor Kata', 'ko': '벡터 공간을 바탕으로 전문화된 동사류의 다중 언어 귀납과 이동', 'sw': 'Utengenezaji na Uhamiaji wa darasa la Kimataifa', 'tr': 'Gejim vektör spesifikatyna dayalýan', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Բառերի դասակարգերի խաչլեզվային ինդուկցիան և փոխանցումը, հիմնված բառերի վիկտորի տարածության մասնագիտացման վրա', 'fa': 'تغییرات و انتقال کلاس\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای متوسط زبان بر اساس ویژگی فضای ویکتور کلمه\u200cها', 'az': 'Kelimi Vektör Boşluğuna dayanan Kelimi Sınıfların İşləndirməsi və Kelimi Sınıfların İşləndirməsi', 'af': 'Kruis- Linguale Induksie en Oordrag van Verb Klasse gebaseer op Woord Vektor Spasie Spesialisasie', 'bn': 'শব্দ ভেক্টরের স্পেশাল বিশেষজ্ঞ ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক ভার্ব ক্লাসের ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়াল ইন্ডিনেশন এবং পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'KrozLingualna indukcija i prebacivanje klasa verba na temelju specijalizacije svemira riječi vektora', 'cs': 'Interlingvální indukce a přenos slovesníkových tříd založených na specializaci Slovových vektorových prostorů', 'sq': 'Induktimi dhe transferimi i klasave të verbëve në mes të gjuhës bazuar në specializimin e hapësirës së vektorit të fjalëve', 'et': 'Sõnavaktoriruumi spetsialiseerumisel põhinevate verbiklasside keeleülene induktsioon ja ülekandmine', 'fi': 'Verbiluokkien monikielinen induktio ja siirto sanavektoritilan erikoistumiseen perustuen', 'ca': 'Cross-Lingual Induction and Transfer of Verb Classes Based on Word Vector Space Specialisation', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Medjezikovna indukcija in prenos glagolnih razredov na podlagi specializacije prostora besednih vektorjev', 'he': 'Cross-Lingual Induction and Transfer of Verb Classes Based on Word Vector Space Specialisation', 'bo': 'Cross-Lingual Induction and Transfer of Verb Classes Based on Word Vector Space Specialisation'}
{'en': 'Existing approaches to automatic VerbNet-style verb classification are heavily dependent on feature engineering and therefore limited to languages with mature NLP pipelines. In this work, we propose a novel cross-lingual transfer method for inducing VerbNets for multiple languages. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first study which demonstrates how the architectures for learning word embeddings can be applied to this challenging syntactic-semantic task. Our method uses cross-lingual translation pairs to tie each of the six target languages into a bilingual vector space with English, jointly specialising the representations to encode the relational information from English VerbNet. A standard clustering algorithm is then run on top of the VerbNet-specialised representations, using vector dimensions as features for learning verb classes. Our results show that the proposed cross-lingual transfer approach sets new state-of-the-art verb classification performance across all six target languages explored in this work.', 'ar': 'تعتمد الأساليب الحالية لتصنيف الفعل التلقائي على غرار VerbNet اعتمادًا كبيرًا على هندسة الميزات ، وبالتالي فهي تقتصر على اللغات ذات خطوط معالجة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الناضجة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة نقل جديدة عبر اللغات لتحفيز شبكات VerbNets للغات متعددة. على حد علمنا ، هذه هي الدراسة الأولى التي توضح كيف يمكن تطبيق البنى لتعلم زخارف الكلمات على هذه المهمة النحوية الدلالية الصعبة. تستخدم طريقتنا أزواج الترجمة عبر اللغات لربط كل لغة من اللغات المستهدفة الست في مساحة متجه ثنائية اللغة مع اللغة الإنجليزية ، وتخصص بشكل مشترك التمثيلات لترميز المعلومات العلائقية من VerbNet الإنجليزية. يتم بعد ذلك تشغيل خوارزمية تجميع قياسية أعلى تمثيلات VerbNet المتخصصة ، باستخدام أبعاد المتجه كميزات لتعلم فئات الفعل. تظهر نتائجنا أن نهج التحويل عبر اللغات المقترح يحدد أداء تصنيف الأفعال الجديد عبر جميع اللغات الست المستهدفة التي تم استكشافها في هذا العمل.', 'es': 'Los enfoques existentes para la clasificación automática de verbos al estilo de Verbnet dependen en gran medida de la ingeniería de características y, por lo tanto, se limitan a lenguajes con canalizaciones En este trabajo, proponemos un novedoso método de transferencia multilingüe para inducir VerbNET para varios idiomas. Hasta donde sabemos, este es el primer estudio que demuestra cómo las arquitecturas para el aprendizaje de incrustaciones de palabras se pueden aplicar a esta desafiante tarea sintáctico-semántica. Nuestro método utiliza pares de traducción multilingüe para vincular cada uno de los seis idiomas de destino en un espacio vectorial bilingüe con el inglés, especializando conjuntamente las representaciones para codificar la información relacional de VerbNet en inglés. A continuación, se ejecuta un algoritmo de agrupamiento estándar sobre las representaciones especializadas en VerbNet, utilizando dimensiones vectoriales como características para aprender clases de verbos. Nuestros resultados muestran que el enfoque de transferencia multilingüe propuesto establece un nuevo rendimiento de clasificación de verbos de última generación en los seis idiomas de destino explorados en este trabajo.', 'pt': 'As abordagens existentes para a classificação automática de verbos no estilo VerbNet são fortemente dependentes da engenharia de recursos e, portanto, limitadas a idiomas com pipelines de NLP maduros. Neste trabalho, propomos um novo método de transferência multilíngue para induzir VerbNets para vários idiomas. Até onde sabemos, este é o primeiro estudo que demonstra como as arquiteturas para aprender a incorporação de palavras podem ser aplicadas a essa tarefa sintático-semântica desafiadora. Nosso método usa pares de tradução multilíngue para vincular cada um dos seis idiomas de destino em um espaço vetorial bilíngue com o inglês, especializando conjuntamente as representações para codificar as informações relacionais do inglês VerbNet. Um algoritmo de agrupamento padrão é então executado em cima das representações especializadas em VerbNet, usando dimensões vetoriais como recursos para aprender classes de verbos. Nossos resultados mostram que a abordagem de transferência multilíngue proposta estabelece um novo desempenho de classificação de verbos de última geração em todas as seis línguas-alvo exploradas neste trabalho.', 'fr': "Les approches existantes de classification automatique des verbes de style VerbNet dépendent fortement de l'ingénierie des fonctionnalités et sont donc limitées aux langages avec des pipelines NLP matures. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode de transfert interlinguistique pour induire des réseaux VerbNET pour plusieurs langues. À notre connaissance, il s'agit de la première étude qui démontre comment les architectures d'apprentissage de l'intégration de mots peuvent être appliquées à cette tâche syntaxique-sémantique complexe. Notre méthode utilise des paires de traductions multilingues pour lier chacune des six langues cibles dans un espace vectoriel bilingue avec l'anglais, en spécialisant conjointement les représentations pour coder les informations relationnelles de l'anglais VerbNet. Un algorithme de clustering standard est ensuite exécuté sur les représentations spécialisées VerbNet, en utilisant les dimensions vectorielles comme fonctionnalités pour l'apprentissage des classes de verbes. Nos résultats montrent que l'approche de transfert interlinguistique proposée établit de nouvelles performances de pointe en matière de classification des verbes dans les six langues cibles explorées dans ce travail.", 'ja': '自動VerbNetスタイルの動詞分類への既存のアプローチは、フィーチャーエンジニアリングに大きく依存しているため、成熟したNLPパイプラインを持つ言語に限定されています。 この研究では、複数の言語のVerbNetsを誘導するための新しいクロスリンガル転送方法を提案します。 私たちの知る限りでは、これは、単語埋め込みを学習するためのアーキテクチャをこの困難な構文-セマンティックタスクにどのように適用できるかを示す最初の研究です。 私たちの方法は、クロスリンガル翻訳ペアを使用して、6つのターゲット言語のそれぞれを英語とのバイリンガルベクトル空間に結び付け、英語VerbNetからの関係情報をエンコードするための表現を共同で専門化します。 次に、標準的なクラスタリングアルゴリズムをVerbNet専用の表現の上で実行し、ベクトルディメンションを動詞クラスを学習するための機能として使用します。 私たちの結果は、提案されたクロスリンガル転送アプローチが、この研究で探求された6つのターゲット言語すべてにわたる最新の動詞分類パフォーマンスを設定することを示しています。', 'zh': '今自 VerbNet 风格动词分类赖于大功,故止于成熟 NLP 管道之言。 于此一新跨语言移法,以诱多种语言之VerbNets。 以吾所知,此第一项究之,所以示学词嵌者架构宜用于此有挑战性之句法语义也。 吾法用跨语译对将六种语言中每一种绑定到有英语的双语向量空间,共使专门化以编码来英语VerbNet信息。 然后 VerbNet 以表示法上行法聚类析算法,以向量维度为学动词类。 臣等之的结果表明,所建跨语移法于此者,凡六者设新最先进动词类性能。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित VerbNet-शैली क्रिया वर्गीकरण के लिए मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग पर बहुत अधिक निर्भर हैं और इसलिए परिपक्व एनएलपी पाइपलाइनों वाली भाषाओं तक सीमित हैं। इस काम में, हम कई भाषाओं के लिए VerbNets को प्रेरित करने के लिए एक उपन्यास क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह पहला अध्ययन है जो दर्शाता है कि शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए आर्किटेक्चर को इस चुनौतीपूर्ण वाक्यात्मक-शब्दार्थ कार्य पर कैसे लागू किया जा सकता है। हमारी विधि अंग्रेजी के साथ एक द्विभाषी वेक्टर अंतरिक्ष में छह लक्ष्य भाषाओं में से प्रत्येक को बांधने के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल अनुवाद जोड़े का उपयोग करती है, संयुक्त रूप से अंग्रेजी VerbNet से संबंधपरक जानकारी को एन्कोड करने के लिए अभ्यावेदन को विशेषज्ञता प्रदान करती है। एक मानक क्लस्टरिंग एल्गोरिथ्म तब VerbNet-विशेष प्रतिनिधित्व के शीर्ष पर चलाया जाता है, क्रिया कक्षाओं को सीखने के लिए सुविधाओं के रूप में वेक्टर आयामों का उपयोग करता है। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर दृष्टिकोण इस काम में खोजी गई सभी छह लक्ष्य भाषाओं में नए अत्याधुनिक क्रिया वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन को सेट करता है।', 'ru': 'Существующие подходы к автоматической классификации глаголов в стиле VerbNet сильно зависят от проектирования функций и, следовательно, ограничены языками со зрелыми трубопроводами NLP. В этой работе мы предлагаем новый межъязыковой метод передачи для индукции VerbNets для нескольких языков. Насколько нам известно, это первое исследование, которое демонстрирует, как архитектуры для изучения вложений слов могут быть применены к этой сложной синтаксическо-семантической задаче. Наш метод использует межъязыковые пары перевода, чтобы связать каждый из шести целевых языков в двуязычное векторное пространство с английским, совместно специализируя представления для кодирования реляционной информации из английской VerbNet. Стандартный алгоритм кластеризации затем запускается поверх специализированных представлений VerbNet, используя векторные измерения в качестве признаков для изучения классов глаголов. Наши результаты показывают, что предлагаемый межъязыковой подход к передаче устанавливает новую современную эффективность классификации глаголов по всем шести целевым языкам, изученным в этой работе.', 'ga': 'Braitheann na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin maidir le haicmiú briathar ar stíl VerbNet go mór ar ghné-innealtóireacht agus mar sin teoranta do theangacha a bhfuil píblínte aibí NLP iontu. Sa saothar seo, molaimid modh aistrithe trasteanga úr chun VerbNets a spreagadh le haghaidh teangacha iolracha. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é seo an chéad staidéar a thaispeánann conas is féidir na hailtireachtaí chun leabú focal a fhoghlaim a chur i bhfeidhm ar an tasc dúshlánach comhréire-shéimeantach seo. Úsáideann ár modh péirí aistriúcháin tras-teangacha chun gach ceann de na sé sprioctheanga a cheangal isteach i spás veicteoir dátheangach leis an mBéarla, ag speisialú i gcomhpháirt ar na huiríll chun an fhaisnéis choibhneasta a ionchódú ó English VerbNet. Ansin reáchtáiltear gnáth-algartam cnuasaithe ar bharr na léiriúcháin speisialaithe VerbNet, ag baint úsáide as toisí veicteoirí mar ghnéithe chun ranganna briathar a fhoghlaim. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go leagann an cur chuige aistrithe tras-teanga atá beartaithe feidhmíocht úrscothach maidir le rangú na mbriathra amach thar na sé sprioctheanga ar fad a scrúdaítear san obair seo.', 'ka': 'არსებობს ავტომატიკური VerbNet სტილის ვებ კლასიფიკაციაზე გადარჩენებული ფუნქციების ინზინეციაზე და ამიტომ განსაზღვრებულია ენების განსაზღვრებული NLP ფუნქციაზე. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პრომენტის კრასი ენგური გადატანსტის მეტი VerbNets-ს მრავალ ენგურათებისთვის მოვიწყებთ. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ეს არის პირველი სწავლა, რომელიც გამოჩვენებს თუ როგორ სწავლას სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებელია ამ შესაძლებელი სინტაქტიული-სმენტიკური დავალებ ჩვენი მეთოდი გამოყენება შვიდი მინიშვნელოვანი ენების ყველაფერი გვექტორის შორის ადგილზე, ანგლისური ადგილზე, რომელიც ერთადერთად სპექციალურად გამოყენებული რესპექტირებების შესახებ ინგლის სტანდარტური კლასტერის ალგორიტიმი შემდეგ VerbNet-სპეციალური გამოსახულებების ზემოთ გამოყენება, ვიქტორის განზომილებების გამოყენება როგორც გერბის კლასების შესწავლების ჩვენი შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ საკუთარი კრისიფიკაციის კონფიგურაციის ახალი სახელსაწყისი გერბის კლასიფიკაციის კონფიგურაცია ყველა ქვსი მისაღების ენაში, რომელიც ამ საქ', 'hu': 'Az automatikus VerbNet-stílusú igék osztályozásának meglévő megközelítései nagymértékben függnek a funkciótervezéstől, ezért az érett NLP-vezetékekkel rendelkező nyelvekre korlátozódnak. Ebben a munkában egy új, többnyelvű transzfer módszert javasolunk a VerbNets több nyelvre történő indukálására. Legjobb tudásunk szerint ez az első tanulmány, amely bemutatja, hogyan alkalmazhatók a szóbeágyazások tanulására szolgáló architektúrák erre a kihívást jelentő szintaktikai-szemantikai feladatra. Módszerünk többnyelvű fordítási párokat használ arra, hogy a hat célnyelv mindegyikét egy kétnyelvű vektortérbe kösse az angol nyelvvel, közösen specializálva a reprezentációkat az angol VerbNet kapcsolati információinak kódolására. Ezután egy szabványos fürtözési algoritmus fut a VerbNet-speciális reprezentációk tetején, vektordimenziókat használva igék osztályok tanulásához. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt többnyelvű transzfer megközelítés új, korszerű igék osztályozási teljesítményt hoz létre mind a hat célnyelven, amelyeket ebben a munkában feltártak.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την αυτόματη ταξινόμηση ρήμων τύπου εξαρτώνται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από τη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών και ως εκ τούτου περιορίζονται σε γλώσσες με ώριμους αγωγούς NLP. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς για την εισαγωγή VerbNets για πολλές γλώσσες. Από ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, αυτή είναι η πρώτη μελέτη που καταδεικνύει πώς οι αρχιτεκτονικές για την εκμάθηση των λέξεων ενσωμάτωσης μπορούν να εφαρμοστούν σε αυτό το δύσκολο συντακτικό-σημασιολογικό έργο. Η μέθοδος μας χρησιμοποιεί δίγλωσσα ζεύγη μετάφρασης για να συνδέσει κάθε μία από τις έξι γλώσσες-στόχους σε ένα δίγλωσσο διανυσματικό χώρο με τα Αγγλικά, ειδικεύοντας από κοινού τις αναπαραστάσεις για να κωδικοποιήσει τις σχεσιακές πληροφορίες από το Αγγλικό. Στη συνέχεια, ένας τυποποιημένος αλγόριθμος ομαδοποίησης εκτελείται πάνω από τις εξειδικευμένες αναπαραστάσεις χρησιμοποιώντας διανυσματικές διαστάσεις ως χαρακτηριστικά για την εκμάθηση τάξεων ρήματος. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς θέτει νέες επιδόσεις ταξινόμησης ρήματος σε όλες τις έξι γλώσσες-στόχους που διερευνήθηκαν στην παρούσα εργασία.', 'kk': 'VerbNet стилінің автоматты түрде бар вербо классификациясының қасиеттері инженерлікке тәуелді, сондықтан NLP құлақтарымен тілдерге шектелген. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, бірнеше тілдер үшін VerbNets тілдерін көпшілік тілдерге көпшілік аудару әдісін ұсынамыз. Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, бұл бірінші зерттеу - сөздерді ендіру архитектураларының қалай қолданылатынын көрсетеді. Біздің әдіміміз алты мақсатты тілдерді ағылшын тілінен екі тіл вектор бос орынға қосып, ағылшын VerbNet тілінен қатынастық мәліметті кодтамасыз үшін түрлі тілдерді ағылшын тілінен қосып Стандартты кластерингі алгоритм VerbNet арнаулы кескіндерінің үстінен орындалады. Верб классын оқыту үшін вектор өлшемдерін қолданады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз бұл жұмыс істеген алты мақсатты тілдердің барлық алты тілдерінде жаңа күй- жағдай верб классификациясының істерін көрсетеді.', 'it': "Gli approcci esistenti alla classificazione automatica dei verbi in stile VerbNet dipendono fortemente dall'ingegneria delle funzionalità e quindi limitati ai linguaggi con pipeline NLP mature. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di trasferimento cross-lingual per indurre VerbNets per più lingue. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questo è il primo studio che dimostra come le architetture per l'apprendimento delle incorporazioni di parole possano essere applicate a questo impegnativo compito sintattico-semantico. Il nostro metodo utilizza coppie di traduzioni cross-lingual per legare ciascuna delle sei lingue target in uno spazio vettoriale bilingue con l'inglese, specializzando congiuntamente le rappresentazioni per codificare le informazioni relazionali da English VerbNet. Un algoritmo di clustering standard viene quindi eseguito sopra le rappresentazioni specializzate in VerbNet, utilizzando le dimensioni vettoriali come funzionalità per l'apprendimento delle classi verbali. I nostri risultati mostrano che l'approccio proposto per il trasferimento multilingue stabilisce nuove prestazioni di classificazione dei verbi all'avanguardia in tutte e sei le lingue di destinazione esplorate in questo lavoro.", 'lt': 'Dabartiniai metodai automatiniam VerbNet stiliui naudojamų žodžių klasifikavimui labai priklauso nuo savybių inžinerijos, todėl jie taikomi tik kalboms su brandiais NLP vamzdynais. Šiame darbe siūlome naują tarpkalbinį perdavimo metodą, skirtą VerbNet sukūrimui įvairioms kalboms. Mūsų žiniomis tai pirmasis tyrimas, kuriame parodoma, kaip mokymosi žodžių įtraukimo architektūros gali būti taikomos šiai sudėtingai sintaktiškai semantinei uždavinei. Mūsų metodas naudoja tarpkalbines vertimo poras, kad kiekviena iš šešių tikslinių kalbų būtų sujungta į dvikalbį vektorių erdvę su anglų kalba, kartu specializuojant atstovavimus, koduojant santykinę informaciją iš anglų VerbNet. A standard clustering algorithm is then run on top of the VerbNet-specialised representations, using vector dimensions as features for learning verb classes.  Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas tarpkalbinis perdavimo metodas nustato naujausius pažangiausių žodžių klasifikavimo rezultatus visose šešiose šiame darbe nagrinėjamose tikslinėse kalbose.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം വെര്\u200dബ്നെറ്റ്- ശൈലിയുടെ വിഭാഗത്തിനുള്ള സമ്മാനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനീഞ്ചനിജ്ഞിനില്\u200d വളരെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് പൂര്\u200dണ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും വെര്\u200dബ്\u200cനെറ്റുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ്  നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിനായി ഇതാണ് ആദ്യത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്. വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഈ വ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആറു ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഓരോരുത്തരെയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസിലേക്ക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഡിമെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വേര്\u200dബ് ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിശേഷതകളുടെ മുകളില്\u200d വെര്\u200dബ്നെറ്റിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധ Our results show that the proposed cross-lingual transfer approach sets new state-of-the-art verb classification performance across all six target languages explored in this work.', 'ms': 'pendekatan yang wujud untuk klasifikasi verb gaya VerbNet secara automatik sangat bergantung pada teknik ciri dan oleh itu terbatas kepada bahasa dengan baris paip NLP dewasa. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan kaedah pemindahan saling bahasa untuk mengakibatkan VerbNets untuk berbagai bahasa. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah kajian pertama yang menunjukkan bagaimana arkitektur untuk mempelajari penyelesaian kata boleh dilaksanakan pada tugas sintaktik-semantik yang menantang ini. Kaedah kami menggunakan pasangan terjemahan salib bahasa untuk mengikat setiap dari enam bahasa sasaran ke ruang vektor dua bahasa dengan bahasa Inggeris, secara kongsi menentukan perwakilan untuk mengekodkan maklumat relatif dari VerbNet Inggeris. A standard clustering algorithm is then run on top of the VerbNet-specialised representations, using vector dimensions as features for learning verb classes.  Keputusan kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan pemindahan saling bahasa yang diusulkan menetapkan prestasi klasifikasi verb state-of-the-art baru di seluruh enam bahasa sasaran yang dieksplorasi dalam kerja ini.', 'mk': 'Постојаните пристапи до автоматска класификација на вербнет стил се многу зависни од инженерството на функциите и, затоа, ограничени на јазици со зрели нафтоводи на НЛП. In this work, we propose a novel cross-lingual transfer method for inducing VerbNets for multiple languages.  За најдобро од нашето знаење, ова е првата студија која демонстрира како архитектурите за учење на зборови вградени може да се применат на оваа предизвикувачка синтактичко-семантична задача. Нашиот метод користи крстојазични парови превод за да ги врзува секој од шестте јазици на целта во двојјазичен векторен простор со англиски, заеднички специјализирајќи ги претставувањата за кодирање на односните информации од англискиот VerbNet. Стандардниот алгоритм за групирање потоа се води на врвот на специјализираните претставувања на VerbNet, користејќи ги векторните димензии како карактеристики за учење на класи на вектори. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека предложениот крстојазичен пристап на трансфер поставува нови најсовремени резултати на класификацијата на јазиците во сите шест метни јазици истражувани во оваа работа.', 'mn': 'VerbNet-н хэлбэрээр автоматжуулан хэлбэрийн хэлбэрээр оршиж байгаа арга барилгууд нь өөрчлөлтийн инженерийн хувьд маш их хамааралтай бөгөөд тэгэхээр NLP хоолойн хоолой хэл дээр хязгаарлагддаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид VerbNets-г олон хэл дээр зориулах шинэ олон хэлний шилжүүлэлтийн арга замыг санал болгож байна. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь, энэ нь анхны судалгаа юм. Энэ нь суралцах үг нэвтрүүлэх архитектуруудыг хэрхэн хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэдгийг харуулдаг. Бидний арга нь хэлний олон хэлний орчуулалтын хоорондоо зургаан зориулагдсан хэлний хоорондоо Англи хэлний хоёр хэлний вектор орон зайд холбогдож, Англи хэлний VerbNet-ээс харилцааны мэдээллийг кодлох боломжтой тө Стандарттай кластерингийн алгоритм нь VerbNet-ийн мэргэжлийн үзүүлэлтийн дээд ажилладаг. Вектор хэмжээсүүд нь verb хичээлийн хичээл сурах боломжтой болно. Бидний үр дүнд хэлний шилжүүлэх арга зам нь энэ ажлын судалгааны зургаан зорилготой хэл дээр шинэ хэлний хуваалцааны үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'mt': 'Existing approaches to automatic VerbNet-style verb classification are heavily dependent on feature engineering and therefore limited to languages with mature NLP pipelines.  F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta’ trasferiment translingwi għall-induzzjoni ta’ VerbNets għal diversi lingwi. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, dan huwa l-ewwel studju li juri kif l-arkitetturi għat-tagħlim tal-integrazzjoni tal-kliem jistgħu jiġu applikati għal dan il-kompitu sintattiku-semantiku ta’ sfida. Il-metodu tagħna juża pari ta’ traduzzjoni translingwi biex jgħaqqad kull waħda mis-sitt lingwi fil-mira ma’ spazju ta’ vetturi billingwi mal-Ingliż, u b’mod konġunt jispeċjalizza r-rappreżentazzjonijiet biex jikkodifikaw l-informazzjoni relattiva mill-English VerbNet. Imbagħad jitħaddem algoritmu standard ta’ raggruppament fuq ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet speċjalizzati fil-VerbNet, bl-użu tad-dimensjonijiet tal-vetturi bħala karatteristiċi għat-tagħlim tal-klassijiet tal-verbi. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-approċċ ta’ trasferiment translingwi propost jistabbilixxi prestazzjoni ġdida ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-verbs l-aktar avvanzata fis-sitt lingwi fil-mira kollha esplorati f’dan ix-xogħol.', 'pl': 'Istniejące podejścia do automatycznej klasyfikacji czasowników w stylu VerbNet są w dużej mierze zależne od inżynierii funkcji i dlatego ograniczone do języków z dojrzałymi rurociągami NLP. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nową metodę transferu wielojęzycznego służącą indukcji VerbNetów dla wielu języków. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy jest to pierwsze badanie, które pokazuje, w jaki sposób architektury nauki osadzeń słów mogą być zastosowane do tego trudnego zadania składnikowo-semantycznego. Nasza metoda wykorzystuje pary tłumaczeń wielojęzycznych, aby powiązać każdy z sześciu języków docelowych w dwujęzyczną przestrzeń wektorową z językiem angielskim, wspólnie specjalizując reprezentacje w zakodowaniu informacji relacyjnych z angielskiego VerbNet. Standardowy algorytm klastrowania jest następnie uruchamiany na wierzchu specjalistycznych reprezentacji VerbNet, wykorzystując wymiary wektorowe jako funkcje do uczenia się klas czasowników. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że proponowane podejście transferu między językami ustanawia nową klasyfikację czasowników we wszystkich sześciu językach docelowych badanych w niniejszej pracy.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande tilnærmingane til VerbNet-stil-verbklassifikasjon er sterkt avhengig av funksjonsengineering og derfor begrenset til språk med ferdige NLP-røyr. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit novel krysspråk overføringsmetode for å indusera VerbNets for fleire språk. Dette er den første studien som viser korleis arkitekturen for læring av ord innebygging kan brukast til denne vanskeleg syntaktiske semantiske oppgåva. Metoden vårt bruker krysspråkspar for å binda kvar av dei seks målspråvene til eit bilinguelt vektorrom med engelsk, og spesialiserer representasjonane for å koda relasjonale informasjonen frå engelsk VerbNet. Ein standard klasseringsalgoritme køyrer så på toppen av VerbNet-spesialiserte representasjonane, brukar vektordimensjonar som funksjonar for læring av verbklasser. Resultatet våre viser at den foreslåde krysspråkstilnærminga setter nye verbklassifikasjonsfunksjonsfunksjonen på alle seks målspråk som er utforska i denne arbeidet.', 'ro': 'Abordările existente pentru clasificarea automată a verbelor în stil VerbNet sunt foarte dependente de ingineria caracteristicilor și, prin urmare, limitate la limbile cu conducte NLP mature. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă nouă de transfer translingvistic pentru inducerea VerbNets pentru mai multe limbi. Din câte știm, acesta este primul studiu care demonstrează modul în care arhitecturile pentru învățarea încorporărilor de cuvinte pot fi aplicate acestei sarcini sintactic-semantice provocatoare. Metoda noastră folosește perechi de traducere translingvistică pentru a lega fiecare dintre cele șase limbi țintă într-un spațiu vectorial bilingv cu limba engleză, specializând împreună reprezentările pentru codificarea informațiilor relaționale din limba engleză VerbNet. Un algoritm standard de clusterizare este apoi rulat deasupra reprezentărilor specializate VerbNet, utilizând dimensiuni vectoriale ca caracteristici pentru învățarea claselor verbe. Rezultatele noastre arată că abordarea propusă de transfer interlingv stabilește noi performanțe de clasificare a verbelor de ultimă generație în toate cele șase limbi țintă explorate în această lucrare.', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqyada joogtada ah oo aad u isticmaalaya qoraalka qoraalka ee VerbNet, waxay ku xiran yihiin dhibaato badan oo ku saabsan qoraalka jaamacadda, taas darteed waxay ku xadan yihiin luuqadaha ay ku qoran yihiin baaritaanka NLP oo da’da ah. Markaas waxan waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab ku wareejinta luuqadaha kala duduwan oo ku saabsan in lagu kordhiyo VerbNet oo luqado kala duduwan. Tani waa waxbarashada ugu horreeya ee aqoontayada, taas oo muujiyaya sida loo codsan karo dhismaha barashada hadalka ku baxa ee qasabkaas oo dhibaataysan la qabto. Metalkeenu wuxuu isticmaalaa laba nooc oo turjumista luqada ah si uu ugu xidho lixda luqadood oo af kasta oo luqada ah goob laba luqadood oo af Ingiriis ku qoro, wuxuuna si wadajir ah u bandhigayaa wakiilayaasha si ay ugu kooban macluumaadka xiriirka ee Ingiriis VerbNet. Algorithm caadiga ah oo la soo bandhigi karo waxaa lagu kor socon karaa qeybaha gaarka ah ee VerbNet, waxaana lagu isticmaalaa kooxo barashada fasalka qoraalka ah. Mataaradeenna waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday in lagu wareejiyo luqadaha kala duwan uu sameeyo xaalada cusub ee farshaxanka farshaxanka oo dhan oo lix luqadood oo la gaadhay oo la qoray.', 'sv': 'Befintliga metoder för automatisk verbklassificering i VerbNet-stil är starkt beroende av funktionsteknik och begränsas därför till språk med mogna NLP-pipelines. I detta arbete föreslår vi en ny tvärspråklig överföringsmetod för att inducera VerbNets för flera språk. Så vitt vi vet är detta den första studien som visar hur arkitekturerna för att lära ordinbäddningar kan tillämpas på denna utmanande syntaktisk-semantiska uppgift. Vår metod använder korspråkiga översättningspar för att knyta vart och ett av de sex målspråken till ett tvåspråkigt vektorutrymme med engelska, och gemensamt specialisera representationerna för att koda relationsinformationen från engelska VerbNet. En standardklusteralgoritm körs sedan ovanpå VerbNet-specialiserade representationer, med vektordimensioner som funktioner för att lära sig verbklasser. Våra resultat visar att den föreslagna tvärspråkliga överföringsmetoden sätter ny toppmodern verbklassificering över alla sex målspråk som utforskas i detta arbete.', 'sr': 'Postoje pristupi automatskoj klasifikaciji verbNet stila teško zavise od inženjeringa funkcija i stoga ograničeni na jezike sa zrelim NLP cijevima. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu međujezičku metodu prebacivanja VerbNeta za višestruke jezike. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prva studija koja pokazuje kako se arhitektura za učenje reči uključuje na ovaj izazovni sintaktički semantički zadatak. Naš metod koristi preko jezičkih prevoda par da povežemo svaku od šest ciljnih jezika u dvojezički vektorski prostor sa engleskim jezicima, zajedno specijalizujući predstave za kodiranje odnošnih informacija sa engleskog VerbNet a. Standardni skustering algoritam se onda pokreće na vrhu specijalizovanih predstavljanja VerbNeta, koristeći dimenzije vektora kao karakteristike za učenje klasa verba. Naši rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup preko jezika postavlja nove klasifikacije države umjetnosti na svih šest ciljnih jezika istraženih na ovom radu.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක VerbNet-style වාර්තාවක් වාර්තාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය සඳහා භාෂාවක් සීමාවි මේ වැඩේ අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා VerbNets විශාල භාෂාවක් සඳහා වි අපේ දන්නවයේ හොඳම විදියට, මේක තමයි පළමු පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා වචන සිද්ධාවක් ඉගෙන ගන අපේ විද්\u200dයාව භාෂාවික භාෂාවික භාෂාවක් භාෂා කරනවා ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් දෙවල් භාෂාවික භාෂාවක් වල හැම භාෂාවක්ම හරි භ ප්\u200dරමාණික අල්ගෝරිතම් අල්ගෝරිතම් පස්සේ VerbNet-විශේෂිත ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ඉහළට දුන්නේ, වෙක්ටර් විශේෂණය භාවිත අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනය අළුත් ජාතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂණය සැකසුම් කරන්න', 'ta': 'Existing approaches to automatic VerbNet-style verb classification are heavily dependent on feature engineering and therefore limited to languages with mature NLP pipelines.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பல மொழிகளுக்கான ஒரு புதிய மொழி மாற்ற முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். எங்கள் அறிவின் மிக சிறந்த படிப்பாகும், இது தான் முதல் ஆய்வு, வார்த்தை பொருட்களுக்கான அட்டவணைகள் எப்படி பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காட்டு எங்கள் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி ஒவ்வொரு ஆறு இலக்கு மொழிகளிலும் ஒவ்வொரு மொழிகளையும் ஒரு இரு மொழி வெக்டார் வெக்டார் இடைவெளியில் கட்டுவதற்கு பயன்படுத் வெக்டார் பரிமாற்றங்களை விவர்ப்நெட்- குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதிகள் மேல் இயக்கப்படும் ஒரு இயல்பான குறிப்புகள்  நம்முடைய முடிவு', 'ur': 'اوٹوٹوٹ استیل ورب کلاسپیٹ کے مطابق موجود موجود مطابق موجود مطابق ویٹوٹ کلاسپیٹ کے مطابق فوجینٹ انجینجینر پر زیادہ مستقل ہیں اور لہٰذا عمدہ NLP پیپ لین کے مطاب اس کام میں ہم ایک نئی کرس-زبان ترنسفور طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ VerbNets کو بہت سی زبانوں کے لئے پیدا کریں۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے، یہ سب سے پہلی تحقیق ہے جو دکھاتا ہے کہ کلمات ابڈینگ کی تعلیم کے معمار کس طرح استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں اس مشکل سینٹکتیک-semantic کام پر۔ ہمارا طریقہ مختلف زبان کی ترجمہ جوڑوں کو استعمال کرتا ہے کہ چھ موجود زبانوں میں سے ہر ایک کو دو زبان کی ویکتور جگہ میں انگلیسی کے ساتھ بند کریں، اور انگلیسی VerbNet سے رابطہ معلومات کے ساتھ مختلف طریقے سے مختلف طریقے سے مختلف ایک استاندارڈ کلاسٹرینگ الگوریٹم اس کے بعد VerbNet کی مخصوص نمایش پر چل رہا ہے، ویکتور اندازے کے طور پر ویکتور کلاسوں کی تعلیم کے لئے ویکتوروں کی استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کرسی زبان ترافرست کا طریقہ اس کام میں جہاد کی ہر چھ موجود زبانوں میں نئی موجود کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name In this work, we propose a novel cross-lingual transfer method for inducing VerbNets for multiple languages.  Bizning eng eng yaxshi aniqligimizga, bu birinchi o'rganish soʻzni o'rganish uchun maktablarni qanday qo'llash mumkin. Bu tashkilotlarni sintaktik-semantik vazifasiga qo'llash mumkin. Bizning usuli eng tildan bir necha tillarni ingliz tilida bir necha vektorning joyiga bog'lash uchun bir necha tildan foydalanadi. Ingliz VerbNetdan bog'liq maʼlumotni kodlash uchun bir nechta tarjima qiladi. Name Bizning natijalarimiz shu vazifa ichki tillar tarkibini o'rganish uchun yangi holatni bir xil soʻzning tarkibini o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp tồn tại để phân loại các động từ theo kiểu Verbit tự động phụ thuộc về việc có tính năng và do đó giới hạn tới ngôn ngữ có những đường ống chính xác. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp chuyển giao ngôn ngữ khác nhau mới để tạo thành ngôn ngữ ngắn cho nhiều ngôn ngữ. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất của chúng ta, đây là nghiên cứu đầu tiên chứng minh cách các kiến trúc để học những từ ngữ mới được áp dụng cho nhiệm vụ phấn đấu này. Phương pháp của chúng tôi dùng hai cặp dịch ngữ khác nhau để kết nối hai ngôn ngữ sáu đích thành một đa số vector với Anh, đặc biệt phối hợp các biểu tượng để mã hóa các thông tin liên quan từ Verbit. Một thuật toán gắn bó tiêu chuẩn được chạy trên đỉnh các biểu tượng của Verbit-chuyên nghiệp, sử dụng kích thước vector như tính năng để học các lớp động từ. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp chuyển nhượng ngôn ngữ khác nhau đề xuất hiệu suất phân loại động từ hiện đại nhất trên tất cả sáu ngôn ngữ được khám phá trong công trình này.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите подходи за автоматична класификация на глаголи в стил са силно зависими от инженерството на характеристиките и следователно ограничени до езици с зрели тръбопроводи за НЛП. В тази работа предлагаме нов междуезичен трансферен метод за индуциране на глаголни мрежи за множество езици. Доколкото знаем, това е първото изследване, което демонстрира как архитектурите за изучаване на вграждането на думи могат да бъдат приложени към тази предизвикателна синтактично-семантична задача. Нашият метод използва междуезични преводни двойки, за да обвърже всеки от шестте целеви езика в двуезично векторно пространство с английски език, съвместно специализирайки представянето за кодиране на релационната информация от английски. След това се изпълнява стандартен алгоритъм за клъстериране върху специализираните представи, използвайки векторни измерения като функции за изучаване на класове глаголи. Резултатите ни показват, че предложеният подход за междуезичен трансфер определя нови постижения за класификация на глаголите във всичките шест целеви езика, изследвани в тази работа.', 'nl': 'Bestaande benaderingen voor automatische VerbNet-stijl werkwoordenclassificatie zijn sterk afhankelijk van feature engineering en daarom beperkt tot talen met volwassen NLP-pipelines. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe cross-lingual transfer methode voor het induceren van VerbNets voor meerdere talen voor. Voor zover wij weten, is dit de eerste studie die aantoont hoe de architecturen voor het leren van woord embeddings kunnen worden toegepast op deze uitdagende syntactisch-semantische taak. Onze methode maakt gebruik van meertalige vertaalparen om elk van de zes doeltalen in een tweetalige vectorruimte met het Engels te binden, waarbij de representaties gezamenlijk gespecialiseerd zijn om de relationele informatie uit het Engels VerbNet te coderen. Een standaard clustering algoritme wordt vervolgens uitgevoerd bovenop de VerbNet-gespecialiseerde representaties, waarbij vectordimensies worden gebruikt als functies voor het leren van werkwoordklassen. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde cross-lingual transfer benadering nieuwe state-of-the-art werkwoordenclassificatieprestaties voor alle zes doeltalen die in dit werk worden onderzocht, creëert.', 'da': 'Eksisterende tilgange til automatisk VerbNet-stil verb klassificering er stærkt afhængig af feature engineering og derfor begrænset til sprog med modne NLP pipelines. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny tværsproget overførselsmetode til at inducere VerbNets til flere sprog. Så vidt vi ved, er dette den første undersøgelse, der viser, hvordan arkitekturerne til indlæring af ord kan anvendes til denne udfordrende syntaktisk-semantiske opgave. Vores metode bruger tværsprogede oversættelsespar til at binde hvert af de seks målsprog til et tosproget vektorrum med engelsk, hvilket i fællesskab specialiserer repræsentationerne til at kode relationelle oplysninger fra engelsk VerbNet. En standard klyngelalgoritme køres derefter oven på VerbNet-specialiserede repræsentationer, ved hjælp af vektordimensioner som funktioner til at lære verbeklasser. Vores resultater viser, at den foreslåede tilgang til tværsproget overførsel sætter nye state-of-the-art udsagnsordsklassificering på tværs af alle seks målsprog, der udforskes i dette arbejde.', 'hr': 'Postoje pristupi automatskoj klasifikaciji verbNet stila teško zavise od inženjeringa funkcija i stoga ograničeni na jezike s zrelim NLP cijevima. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu međujezičku metodu prebacivanja VerbNeta za višestruke jezike. Najbolje od naših znanja, ovo je prvo ispitivanje koje pokazuje kako se arhitektura za učenje riječi uključuje na ovaj izazovni sintaktički semantički zadatak. Naš metod koristi prekogranične prevodne parove kako bi povezali svaku od šest ciljnih jezika u dvojezički vektorski prostor s engleskim jezikom, zajedno specijalizirali predstave kako bi kodirali odnošne informacije iz engleskog VerbNet a. Standardni skustering algoritam se onda pokreće na vrhu specijaliziranih predstavljanja VerbNeta, koristeći dimenzije vektora kao karakteristike učenja klasa verba. Naši rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup preko jezika postavlja nove klasifikacije države umjetnosti na svih šest ciljnih jezika istraženih u ovom radu.', 'de': 'Bestehende Ansätze zur automatischen Verbklassifizierung im VerbNet-Stil sind stark vom Feature Engineering abhängig und daher auf Sprachen mit ausgereiften NLP-Pipelines beschränkt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine neuartige, sprachübergreifende Transfermethode zur Induktion von VerbNets für mehrere Sprachen vor. Nach bestem Wissen ist dies die erste Studie, die zeigt, wie die Architekturen für lernende Worteinbettungen auf diese anspruchsvolle syntaktisch-semantische Aufgabe angewendet werden können. Unsere Methode verwendet mehrsprachige Übersetzungspaare, um jede der sechs Zielsprachen mit Englisch in einen zweisprachigen Vektorraum zu binden und die Repräsentationen gemeinsam auf die Codierung der relationalen Informationen aus dem englischen VerbNet zu spezialisieren. Ein Standard-Clustering-Algorithmus wird dann auf den VerbNet-spezialisierten Darstellungen ausgeführt, wobei Vektordimensionen als Features zum Erlernen von Verbklassen verwendet werden. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene crosslinguale Transfer-Ansatz neue state-of-the-art Verbklassifizierungsleistungen für alle sechs in dieser Arbeit untersuchten Zielsprachen setzt.', 'ko': '기존의 VerbNet 스타일 동사 자동 분류 방법은 특징 프로젝트에 심각하게 의존하기 때문에 성숙한 NLP 파이프라인을 가진 언어에만 한정된다.이 작업에서, 우리는 여러 언어의 VerbNet을 귀납하는 데 사용되는 새로운 다중 언어 이동 방법을 제시했다.우리가 알기로는 이것은 첫 번째 연구로 단어가 삽입된 구조가 이 도전적인 문법-어의 임무에 어떻게 응용되는지 배웠다.우리의 방법은 6개 목표 언어 중의 모든 언어를 영어와 하나의 이중 언어 벡터 공간에 연결하고 영어VerbNet에서 온 관계 정보를 인코딩하는 것을 공동으로 전문화하는 것이다.그리고 VerbNet 전용 표시를 토대로 표준적인 분류 알고리즘을 실행하고 벡터 차원을 학습 동사류의 특징으로 사용한다.우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 제시된 다중 언어 이동 방법은 본고에서 연구한 모든 6가지 목표 언어 중에서 가장 선진적인 동사 분류 성능을 가진다.', 'id': 'Pendekatan yang ada untuk klasifikasi verb gaya VerbNet secara otomatis sangat tergantung pada teknik fitur dan oleh itu terbatas pada bahasa dengan pipa NLP yang dewasa. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode trans-bahasa untuk menginduksi VerbNet untuk berbagai bahasa. Menurut yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah penelitian pertama yang menunjukkan bagaimana arsitektur untuk belajar pembangunan kata dapat diaplikasikan untuk tugas sintaks-semantis yang menantang ini. Metode kami menggunakan pasangan terjemahan saling bahasa untuk mengikat setiap dari enam bahasa sasaran ke ruang vektor dua bahasa dengan bahasa Inggris, secara kongsi spesialisasi perwakilan untuk mengkode informasi relatif dari English VerbNet. Algoritma klastering standar kemudian dijalankan di atas representation spesialisasi VerbNet, menggunakan dimensi vektor sebagai fitur untuk belajar kelas verb. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan trans-bahasa yang diusulkan menetapkan prestasi klasifikasi verb terbaru di seluruh enam bahasa sasaran yang dieksplorasi dalam pekerjaan ini.', 'sw': 'Matokeo yanayopo kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa aina ya aina ya mtandaoni ya VerbNet yanategemea sana kwa ubunifu na kwa hiyo yanazungukwa kwa lugha zenye mabomu ya NLP yenye umri mkubwa. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya usafiri wa lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kuingiza VerbNet kwa lugha nyingi. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, huu ni utafiti wa kwanza unaoonyesha jinsi majengo ya kujifunza maneno yanavyoweza kutumika katika kazi hii ya changamoto ya ushirikiano wa kimkakati. Utawala wetu unatumia wawili wa kutafsiri lugha mbalimbali kuiunga kila mmoja wa lugha sita zinazolenga kuwa sehemu ya vector mbili yenye lugha ya Kiingereza, wakishirikiana na uwakilizaji ili kuweka taarifa za uhusiano kutoka Kiingereza VerbNet. Ualgorithi wa kiwango cha kawaida unaendeshwa juu ya uwakilishi maalumu wa VerbNet, kwa kutumia utofauti wa vector kama vipengele vya kujifunza darasa la verb. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu za usafirishaji wa lugha zilizopendekezwa zinatengeneza utendaji wa hali mpya wa aina ya sanaa katika lugha sita zinazotumiwa katika kazi hii.', 'fa': 'نزدیک\u200cهای موجود به عنوان مجموعه\u200cهای ویربنت به سبک خودکار بستگی دارند به عنوان مهندسی ویژه\u200cها و به همین دلیل محدود به زبانها با خط\u200cهای لوله\u200cهای NLP بزرگ است. در این کار، ما یک روش انتقال کلی زبان نویسی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای تولید VerbNets برای زبان\u200cهای متعدد باشد. برای بهترین دانش ما، این اولین مطالعه است که نشان می دهد که چگونه معماری برای یادگیری کردن کلمه\u200cها می\u200cتواند بر این کار سنتاکتیک و سنتاتیک مشکل کاربرد شود. روش ما از جفت ترجمه\u200cهای مختلف زبان استفاده می\u200cکند تا هر کدام از شش زبان هدف را به یک فضای ویکتور دو زبان با انگلیسی بسازد، و با هم نمایش\u200cهای مختلف برای رمزش اطلاعات ارتباطی از VerbNet انگلیسی تخصص دهد. الگوریتم استاندارد کلاسترینگ، سپس روی نمایش\u200cهای ویژه VerbNet اجرا می\u200cشود، با استفاده از اندازه\u200cهای ویکتور به عنوان ویژه\u200cهایی برای یادگیری کلاسهای ویژه. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که پیشنهاد دستور انتقال کلی زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی اجرای جدید کلی\u200cهای هنری را در تمام شش زبان هدف که در این کار کشف شده\u200cاند قرار می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Existing approaches to automatic VerbNet-style verb classification are heavily dependent on feature engineering and therefore limited to languages with mature NLP pipelines.  Në këtë punë, propozojmë një metodë të re transferimi ndërgjuhësor për induktimin e VerbNets për gjuhë të shumta. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, ky është studimi i parë që tregon se si arkitekturat për mësimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve mund të aplikohen në këtë detyrë sintaktike-semantike të sfidueshme. Metoda jonë përdor çifte përkthimi ndërgjuhës për të lidhur secilën nga gjashtë gjuhët shënjestra në një hapësirë vektori dy gjuhësh me Anglishtin, duke specializuar së bashku përfaqësimet për të koduar informacionin lidhës nga English VerbNet. Një algoritëm standard grupimi futet pastaj në krye të përfaqësimeve të specializuara me VerbNet, duke përdorur dimensionet e vektorit si karakteristika për mësimin e klasave të verb ëve. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se qasja e propozuar e transferit ndërgjuhësor vendos performancë të reja klasifikuese të verb ëve më të lartë në të gjashtë gjuhët objektive të eksploruara në këtë punë.', 'af': "Bestaande toegang tot outomatiese VerbNet-styl verb klasifikasie is swaar afhanklik van funksie inženiering en daarom beperk na tale met vermeerde NLP-pipelyne. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n roman kruistale oordragmetode om VerbNets te induseer vir veelvuldige tale. Op die beste van ons kennis, is dit die eerste studie wat wys hoe die arkitektuur vir die leer van woord inbêding kan aanwend word na hierdie vanskelige sintaktika-semantiese taak. Ons metode gebruik kruistale vertalingspaar om elke van die ses teiken tale in 'n twee tale vektorruimte te bind met Engels, saamstig die vertalings te spesialiseer om die relasionele inligting van Engels VerbNet te kodeer. 'n Standaard klasteringsalgoritme is dan hardloop op die boonste van die VerbNet-spesialiseerde voorstellings, gebruik vektordimensies as funksies vir leer van verb klasse. Ons resultate wys dat die voorgestelde kruistale oordrag toegang stel nuwe staat-van-die-kunste verb klasifikasie uitvoering oor alle ses doel tale wat in hierdie werk uitgevoer is.", 'tr': "VerbNet stili avtomatik gaýşartmak üçin bar ýakynlaşyklar özellikler enjiniýerasynda gaty baglanýar we şonuň üçin NLP pipeliniň uly hatlary bilen çykarylýar. Bu işde, VerbNets'i birnäçe diller üçin önderlemek üçin çarpaz dilli transfers yöntemi teklip edýäris. Bilgimiziň iň gowy bolsa, bu ilkinji araşdyrma, söz integrasy üçin arhitekturmalaryň nähili täsirli syntaktik-semantik täblisine uygulanabilirini görkezýär. Biziň metodamyz alty maksady dillerini iňlisçe bilen bilim vektör seleňine baglamak üçin bilim dillerden ullanýar. Iňlisçe VerbNet'den baglanyş maglumatlary kodlamak üçin gurultylarymyzy bilen birleştirilýär. Sonra standart kopyalama algoritmi VerbNet özelliklerinin üstünde çalışır ve vektör ölçümlerini verb sınıflarını öğrenmek için özellikler olarak kullanır. netijelerimiz çykyş diller arasyndaky çykyş taslaýyşynyň şu işiň ähli bolan 6 maksady dillerinde täze bir durum çykyşlygyny tassyklaýar.", 'am': 'የVerbNet-style verb መግለጫዎች በአስቸኳይ የፊደል ኢንጂንጂንጂንጂር ላይ በሚያስመካ እና ስለዚህም በቋንቋዎች ላይ በተጨማሪው የNLP ፕላንዶች ጋር ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የመለስ ዘዴ ለብዙዎች ቋንቋዎች መግለጫ እናስባለን፡፡ ወደምናውቀታችን ለመሻለል፣ ይህ የመጀመሪያ ትምህርት ነው፤ ለትምህርት ቃላት መዝገብ የሚያስተምር መሠረት ለዚህ ተቃዋሚው ለስናታኪ-semantic ስራ እንዴት እንዲጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የስድስቱ ቋንቋ ትርጉም ዓይነቶችን እያንዳንዳቸው የስድስቱን መግለጫ ቋንቋዎች በንግግሊዝኛ ቦታ እና እንግሊዘኛ ቦታ እንዲያስቀምጥ እና በተለያዩ የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን ከኢንጂል VerbNet ለማክበር ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ A standard clustering algorithm is then run on top of the VerbNet-specialised representations, using vector dimensions as features for learning verb classes.  ፍጥረታችን የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መተላለፊያ ሥርዓት በዚህ ስድስት ተቃውሞ ቋንቋዎች በሚጠይቁት አዲስ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መግለጫ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ያሳየዋል፡፡', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভার্ব- নেট-শৈল্পিক ভার্ব ব্লাসাফিকেশনের উপস্থিত উপায় বেশী নির্ভর করে বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যুতিক ইঞ্জিনিয়েনিয়ে  এই কাজে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ভার্ব ভাষায় ভাষায় ভার্ভুয়াল ট্রান্সফার্সিং পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালো কাজের জন্য এই প্রথম গবেষণা যা প্রদর্শন করে কিভাবে শব্দ শিক্ষার জন্য কাঠামো শিক্ষা প্রদান করা যাবে এই চ্যালেঞ আমাদের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে প্রত্যেকটি ছয়টি লক্ষ্য ভাষাকে ইংরেজি ভেক্টরের সাথে একটি দুই ভেক্টর স্থানে বাঁধানোর জন্য, যারা ইংরেজি ভার্ব নেট থেকে  ভেক্টরের ডিমেনশন ব্যবহার করে ভার্ব নেট-বিশেষ প্রতিনিধিদের উপরে একটি স্ট্যান্ডার্টিং অ্যালগরিদম ব্যবহার করা হয় ভার্ব ক্লাস শিক্ষার জন আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রস্তাবিত ক্রস-ভাষার পরিবর্তনের পদ্ধতি এই কাজে ছয় টার্গুলো ভাষায় বিস্ফোরণ করা হয়েছে।', 'az': "Əvvəlki VerbNet-stili verb klasifikasiyasının avtomatik tərzlərinə bağlı olan tərzlərin mühendisiyyətinə çox bağlı və buna görə də böyük NLP pipelines ilə dillərə sınırlı. Bu işdə, çoxlu dillərə VerbNets'i təşkil etmək üçün yeni çoxlu dilli transfer metodu təklif edirik. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına gəldikdə, bu ilk təhsil edir ki, sözləri öyrənmək üçün müəyyən edilən sintaktik-semantik işlərə necə uygulanabilir. Bizim metodumuz altı məqsəd dillərindən hər birini İngilizce dili ilə iki dil vektor alanına bağlamaq üçün çox dilli çeviriş çiftlərini istifadə edir, İngilizce VerbNet-dən ilişkili məlumatları kodlamaq üçün təsirlərini birlikdə təhsil edir. Standardlı clustering algoritmi VerbNet-dən xüsusiyyətli göstəricilərin üstündə çalışır, verb sınıflarını öyrənmək üçün vektor ölçülərini işləyir. Bizim sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, bu işdə keşfedilmiş altı məqsəd dilində təkrar dillərin təkrar təkrar təkrar təkrar təkrarlığının yeni təkrar təkrarlığını təkrar edir.", 'ca': "Els enfocaments existents a la classificació automàtica de verbs d'estil VerbNet depenen fortament de l'enginyeria de característiques i, per tant, es limitan a llengües amb tubacions matures NLP. En aquest treball, proposem un nou mètode de transfer ència translingüística per induir VerbNets per múltiples llengües. Per millor del nostre coneixement, aquest és el primer estudi que demostra com les arquitectures d'aprenentatge d'integració de paraules poden ser aplicades a aquesta tasca sinàctica-semàntica desafiadora. El nostre mètode utilitza parells de traducció translingüística per vincular cada una de les sis llengües alvo a un espai vector bilingüe amb l'anglès, especialitzant conjuntament les representacions per codificar la informació relacional de VerbNet anglès. Un algoritme de agrupament està executat a sobre de les representacions especialitzades en VerbNet, utilitzant les dimensions dels vectors com característiques per aprendre classes de verbs. Our results show that the proposed cross-lingual transfer approach sets new state-of-the-art verb classification performance across all six target languages explored in this work.", 'bs': 'Postojeći pristupi automatskoj klasifikaciji VerbNet stila vrlo zavisi od inženjeringa karakteristika i stoga ograničeni na jezike sa zrelim NLP cijevima. U ovom poslu predlažemo novu međujezičku metodu prebacivanja VerbNeta za višestruke jezike. Najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prva studija koja pokazuje kako se arhitektura za učenje riječi uključuje na ovaj izazovni sintaktički semantički zadatak. Naš metod koristi preko jezičkih prevoditelja par da povežemo svaku od šest ciljnih jezika u dvojezički vektorski prostor sa engleskim jezicima, zajedno specijalizirajući predstave kako bi kodirali odnose informacije iz engleskog VerbNet a. Standardni skustering algoritam se onda pokreće na vrhu specijalizovanih predstavljanja VerbNeta, koristeći dimenzije vektora kao karakteristike za učenje klasa verba. Naši rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup preko jezika postavlja nove klasifikacije države umjetnosti na svih šest ciljnih jezika istraženih u ovom radu.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները բայերի ավտոմատիկ դասակարգման «ԲարբNet» ոճով շատ կախված են հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտության վրա, և այդ պատճառով սահմանափակվում են լեզուների վրա, որոնք ունեն հասուն ՆԼՊ խողովակա Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր փոխլեզվով փոխանցման մեթոդ բազմալեզուների համար «Վերբերնեթ» ինդուկցիայի համար: Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից սա առաջին ուսումնասիրությունն է, որը ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես կարելի է կիրառել բառերի ընդգրկումների ճարտարապետական կառուցվածքները այս բարդ սինտակտիկ-սեմանտիկ խնդիրը: Մեր մեթոդը օգտագործում է երկլեզվով թարգմանվող զույգեր, որպեսզի կապեն 6 նպատակային լեզուներից յուրաքանչյուրը երկլեզվով վեկտորների տարածքում անգլերենի հետ, միասին մասնագիտացնելով ներկայացումները, որպեսզի կոդավորեն անգլերեն Բա Ապա ստանդարտ խմբավորումների ալգորիթմը կատարվում է ՎերբերNet-ի մասնագիտական ներկայացումների վրա, օգտագործելով վեկտորի չափերը որպես բայերի դասերի սովորելու առանձնահատկություններ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված երկլեզվային փոխանցման մոտեցումը նոր լավագույն բայերի դասակարգման արդյունք է սահմանում այս աշխատանքում ուսումնասիրված բոլոր վեց նպատակային լեզուներում:', 'et': 'Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid VerbNet-stiilis tegusõnade automaatsele klassifitseerimisele sõltuvad suuresti funktsioonide insenerist ja seetõttu piirduvad keeltega, millel on küpsed NLP torustikud. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse keeleülekande meetodi VerbNets indutseerimiseks mitme keele jaoks. Meie teadmiste kohaselt on tegemist esimese uuringuga, mis näitab, kuidas sõnade manustamise õppimise arhitektuure saab rakendada sellele keerulisele süntaktilisele semantilisele ülesandele. Meie meetod kasutab keeleüleseid tõlkepaare, et siduda iga kuuest sihtkeelest kakskeelsesse vektoriruumi inglise keelega, spetsialiseerudes ühiselt esitustele, et kodeerida suhtelist teavet inglise VerbNetist. Seejärel käivitatakse VerbNeti spetsialiseerunud esituste peal standardne klastrite algoritm, kasutades vektorimõõtmeid verbiklasside õppimisel. Meie tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud keeleülese siirde lähenemisviis seab kõigis kuues käesolevas töös uuritud sihtkeeles uue taseme tegusõnade klassifitseerimisele.', 'fi': 'Nykyiset lähestymistavat automaattiseen VerbNet-tyyliseen verbiluokitukseen riippuvat suuresti ominaisuuksien suunnittelusta ja siksi rajoittuvat kieliin, joissa on kypsiä NLP-putkia. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta monikielistä siirtomenetelmää VerbNetien indusoimiseksi useille kielille. Tietojemme mukaan tämä on ensimmäinen tutkimus, joka osoittaa, miten sanaupotusten oppimisarkkitehtuuria voidaan soveltaa tähän haastavaan syntaktis-semanttiseen tehtävään. Menetelmässämme käytetään monikielisiä käännöspareja sitomaan jokainen kuudesta kohdekielestä kaksikieliseksi vektoriavaruudeksi englannin kanssa, jotka yhdessä erikoistuvat representaatioihin englanninkielisen VerbNetin relaatioinformaation koodaamiseen. Tavallinen klusterointialgoritmi suoritetaan sitten VerbNet-spesialististen esitysten päälle käyttäen vektoridimensioita verbiluokkien oppimiseen. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että ehdotettu monikielinen siirtomenetelmä asettaa uuden huipputason verbiluokituksen kaikille kuudelle tässä työssä tutkitulle kohdekielelle.', 'cs': 'Stávající přístupy k automatické klasifikaci slovesů ve stylu VerbNet jsou silně závislé na funkčním inženýrství a proto omezeny na jazyky se zralými NLP potrubími. V této práci navrhujeme novou metodu přenosu mezi jazyky pro indukci VerbNetů pro více jazyků. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí je to první studie, která ukazuje, jak lze aplikovat architektury pro výuku vložení slov na tento náročný syntakticko-sémantický úkol. Naše metoda používá křížové překladové páry k propojení každého ze šesti cílových jazyků do dvojjazyčného vektorového prostoru s angličtinou a společně se specializuje reprezentace na kódování relačních informací z anglického VerbNet. Standardní algoritmus shlukování je pak spuštěn na vrcholu VerbNet-specializovaných reprezentací, používající vektorové dimenze jako funkce pro učení tříd slovesa. Naše výsledky ukazují, že navržený přístup k transferu mezi jazyky nastavuje nový state-of-the-art klasifikaci slovesa ve všech šesti cílových jazycích zkoumaných v této práci.', 'jv': 'Learn Mode Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita mulunge kuwi nyumbang kelangen banter-lengkang kanggo ingkang Verbnets kanggo tinik lenggal. Awakdhéwé éntuk awak dhéwé, iki ing mbéwé kuwi mêng ngomong nik awak dhéwé Arkita kanggo kelas word embedding Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sistem karo akeh-dilanjut tarjamahan kanggo wong liyane sing isih tarjamahan kanggo wong liyane karo ingkang. section Rejalekan dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan langkung karo nggawe gerakan tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan anyar sampek kanggo ngilangno limo sing gawe nguasakno iki.', 'sk': 'Obstoječi pristopi k avtomatični klasifikaciji glagolov v slogu VerbNet so močno odvisni od inženiringa funkcij in zato omejeni na jezike z zrelimi cevovodi NLP. V tem delu predlagamo novo metodo medjezičnega prenosa za indukcijo VerbNets za več jezikov. Po našem znanju je to prva študija, ki prikazuje, kako lahko arhitekture učenja vgradnje besed uporabimo pri tej zahtevni sintaktično-semantični nalogi. Naša metoda uporablja medjezične prevajalske pare za povezovanje vsakega od šestih ciljnih jezikov v dvojezični vektorski prostor z angleščino in skupaj specializira reprezentacije za kodiranje relacijskih informacij iz angleškega VerbNet. Na vrhu predstavitev, specializiranih za VerbNet, se nato izvaja standardni algoritem grozdenja, ki uporablja vektorske dimenzije kot značilnosti za učenje glagolov. Naši rezultati kažejo, da predlagani pristop medjezičnega prenosa določa novo najsodobnejšo klasifikacijo glagolov v vseh šestih ciljnih jezikih, raziskanih v tem delu.', 'he': 'Existing approaches to automatic VerbNet-style verb classification are heavily dependent on feature engineering and therefore limited to languages with mature NLP pipelines.  בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים שיטת העברה דרך שפות חדשה כדי לייצר VerbNets לשפות רבות. לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, זה המחקר הראשון שמוכיח איך הארכיטקטורות ללמוד מילים תואמות למשימה סינטאקטית-סמנטית מאתגרת זו. השיטה שלנו משתמשת בזוגות תרגום בין שפות כדי לקשור כל אחד מששת שפות המטרה לחלל ווקטור בין שפות עם אנגלית, המתמחה ביחד בין היציגות כדי לקוד את המידע היחסי מ VerbNet אנגלי. אלגוריתם קבוע סטנדרטי הופעל על גבי ההצגות המומחיות בוורבנט, בשימוש במימדים ווקטורים כתכונות ללמוד שיעורי אוברים. התוצאות שלנו מראות שגישת העברה דרך שפתיים מוצעת מצביעה ביצועים חדשים במסגרת איברים חדשים בכל ששת שפות המטרה שנחקרו בעבודה הזאת.', 'ha': "@ action: button Daga wannan aikin, muna goyyade wata hanyon transfer ta cikin takardar-linguin da ke ƙara VerbNets wa masu yawa. Ga mafi kyaun sanyinmu, wannan na farkon lõkaci ne da ke nũna jinsi an karɓi makõmin da za'a sanar da maganar da ke cikin wannan na yi wa'adin taratiki-semantic. @ info: whatsthis An tafiyar da algoritm na ɗabi'a mai ƙaranci, sa'an nan kuma a tafiyar da kan sama na masu ƙayyade VerbNet, yana yi amfani da girgije masu shiryuwa da shiryoyin hanyoyi kamar tayari wa zane wa zane-dangane na verb. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa, hanyarwa da aka goyi wa transfer cikin lugha-na'ura, yana daidaita wani halin-mai fassarar-kunna cikin duk harshen sita cikin wannan aikin.", 'bo': 'Existing approaches to automatic VerbNet-style verb classification are heavily dependent on feature engineering and therefore limited to languages with mature NLP pipelines. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་འདྲ་བའི་སྐྱེལ་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་གཏོང་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཤེས་པའི་གྲངས་ཤེས་ཚད་དེ་ལ་མཐའ་ཤོས་པ་ཡིན་ན། འདི་ནི་སྔོན་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་སྟངས་ནང་གི་སྒྲིག་རིགས་གནས་སྟངས་གནད་མེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ Our method uses cross-lingual translation pairs to tie each of the six target languages into a bilingual vector space with English, jointly specializing the representations to encode the relational information from English VerbNet. A standard clustering algorithm is then run on the top of the VerbNet-specialized representations, using vector dimensions as features for learning verb classes. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བ་དག་གིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་གསར་པ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Classification of telicity using cross-linguistic annotation projection', 'ar': 'تصنيف التليفزيون باستخدام الإسقاط التوضيحي متعدد اللغات', 'pt': 'Classificação de telicidade usando projeção de anotação interlinguística', 'fr': "Classification de la télicité à l'aide d'une projection d'annotation multiling", 'es': 'Clasificación de la telicidad mediante proyección de anotación interlingüística', 'ja': 'クロスリンガリスティック注釈投影を使用したテリシティの分類', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषाई एनोटेशन प्रक्षेपण का उपयोग करके टेलिसिटी का वर्गीकरण', 'zh': '用跨语注投影对 telicity 分类', 'ru': 'Классификация вежливости с использованием кросс-лингвистической аннотационной проекции', 'ga': 'Telicity a rangú ag baint úsáide as teilgean nótaí tras-teangacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση τηλικότητας με τη χρήση γλωσσικής προβολής σχολίων', 'hu': 'A telicitás osztályozása nyelvközi megjegyzések kivetítésével', 'it': 'Classificazione della telicità mediante proiezione di annotazioni cross-linguistiche', 'lt': 'Klasifikuojamas teliškumas naudojant tarpkalbinę anotacijos projekciją', 'mk': 'Класификација на телицитетот користејќи проекција на прекујазична анотација', 'ml': 'ക്രിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊജക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടെലിസ്റ്റിയുടെ ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni tat-teliċità bl-użu ta’ projezzjoni ta’ annotazzjoni translingwistika', 'ms': 'Pengklasifikasi telicity menggunakan projeksi anotasi saling bahasa', 'kk': 'Қос- лингвистикалық жазбалар проекциясын қолдану үшін телециттік классификациясы', 'ro': 'Clasificarea telicității utilizând proiecția adnotării interlingvistice', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja teliczności przy użyciu projekcji adnotacji między językami', 'si': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хөгжим хэлний давтамжлалтын төсөөллийг ашиглаж', 'no': 'Name', 'sv': 'Klassificering av telicitet med hjälp av tvärspråklig annoteringsprojektion', 'ta': 'முழு மொழி அறிவிப்பு திட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி தேவையின் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'Cross-linguistic annotation projection', 'so': 'Kalluumeysiga daryeelka isticmaalka baaraandegista luqada', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija teliciteta koristeći projekciju kroz jezičke annotacije', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình các địa chỉ', 'da': 'Klassificering af telicitet ved hjælp af tværsproget annoteringsprojektion', 'nl': 'Classificatie van teliciteit met behulp van crosslinguïstische annotatieprojectie', 'bg': 'Класификация на теличността чрез проекция на междулингвистична анотация', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija teliciteta koristeći projekciju kroz jezičke annotacije', 'id': 'Klasifikasi telicity menggunakan proyeksi anotasi saling bahasa', 'fa': 'قطعه تلویزیتی با استفاده از پروژه\u200cهای نویسندگی متوسط زبان\u200cشناسی', 'sw': 'Classification of telicity using cross-linguistic annotation projection', 'tr': 'cross-linguistic annotation projection', 'de': 'Klassifizierung der Telizität mittels sprachübergreifender Annotationsprojektion', 'af': 'Klassifikasie van telisiteit met gebruik van kruislingwisiese annotasie projeksie', 'ko': '다중 언어 표기 투영에 기반한 영어 어휘 분류', 'am': 'Classification of telicity using cross-linguistic annotation projection', 'az': 'Daha 칞ox dilli n칬qt톛l톛r projeksiyonu istifad톛 ed톛r톛k telitik klasifikasyonu', 'hy': 'Տարբեր լեզվաբանական նոտացիայի պրոեկցիա օգտագործելով', 'bn': 'Classification of telicity using cross-linguistic annotation projection', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i telicitetit duke përdorur projektimin e anotacionit ndërgjuhësor', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija teliciteta koristeći projekciju kroz jezičke annotacije', 'ca': "Classificació de la telicitat utilitzant projecció d'anotació translingüística", 'et': 'Telilisuse klassifitseerimine keeleülese annotatsiooni abil', 'cs': 'Klasifikace telicity pomocí crosslingvistické anotace projekce', 'fi': 'Telisiteetin luokittelu kielienvälisen annotointiprojektion avulla', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'Banner page', 'sk': 'Razvrstitev teličnosti z uporabo medjezikovne napovedi', 'he': 'שימוש של טליסיטי באמצעות פרוייקציה של ציונים שפתיים', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འདི་བསྡུས་པའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་བཟོས།'}
{'en': 'This paper addresses the automatic recognition of telicity, an aspectual notion. A telic event includes a natural endpoint (she walked home), while an atelic event does not (she walked around). Recognizing this difference is a prerequisite for temporal natural language understanding. In English, this classification task is difficult, as telicity is a covert linguistic category. In contrast, in Slavic languages, aspect is part of a verb’s meaning and even available in machine-readable dictionaries. Our contributions are as follows. We successfully leverage additional silver standard training data in the form of projected annotations from parallel English-Czech data as well as context information, improving automatic telicity classification for English significantly compared to previous work. We also create a new data set of English texts manually annotated with telicity.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة التعرف التلقائي على التخاطب ، وهو مفهوم جانبي. يتضمن حدث الاتصالات نقطة نهاية طبيعية ("مشيت إلى المنزل") ، بينما لا يتضمن الحدث الأتليكي ("كانت تتجول"). يعتبر التعرف على هذا الاختلاف شرطًا أساسيًا لفهم اللغة الطبيعية للوقت. في اللغة الإنجليزية ، تعتبر مهمة التصنيف هذه صعبة ، حيث أن الاتصالات الإلكترونية هي فئة لغوية سرية. في المقابل ، في اللغات السلافية ، الجانب هو جزء من معنى الفعل وحتى متاح في القواميس التي يمكن قراءتها آليًا. مساهماتنا هي على النحو التالي. لقد نجحنا في الاستفادة من بيانات التدريب القياسية الفضية الإضافية في شكل تعليقات توضيحية متوقعة من البيانات الإنجليزية-التشيكية المتوازية بالإضافة إلى معلومات السياق ، مما أدى إلى تحسين التصنيف التلقائي للتكنولوجيا عن بُعد للغة الإنجليزية بشكل كبير مقارنة بالعمل السابق. نقوم أيضًا بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات جديدة من النصوص الإنجليزية التي تم شرحها يدويًا باستخدام عن بُعد.', 'pt': 'Este artigo aborda o reconhecimento automático da telicidade, uma noção aspectual. Um evento télico inclui um ponto final natural (“ela voltou para casa”), enquanto um evento télico não (“ela caminhou”). Reconhecer essa diferença é um pré-requisito para a compreensão temporal da linguagem natural. Em inglês, essa tarefa de classificação é difícil, pois a telicidade é uma categoria linguística encoberta. Em contraste, nas línguas eslavas, o aspecto faz parte do significado de um verbo e até está disponível em dicionários legíveis por máquina. Nossas contribuições são as seguintes. Alavancamos com sucesso dados de treinamento padrão prata adicionais na forma de anotações projetadas de dados paralelos inglês-tcheco, bem como informações de contexto, melhorando significativamente a classificação automática de telicidade para inglês em comparação com trabalhos anteriores. Também criamos um novo conjunto de dados de textos em inglês anotados manualmente com telicity.', 'es': 'Este artículo aborda el reconocimiento automático de la telicidad, una noción aspectual. Un evento télico incluye un punto final natural («ella caminó a casa»), mientras que un evento atélico no lo hace («ella caminó alrededor»). Reconocer esta diferencia es un requisito previo para la comprensión temporal del lenguaje natural. En inglés, esta tarea de clasificación es difícil, ya que la telicidad es una categoría lingüística encubierta. Por el contrario, en las lenguas eslavas, el aspecto forma parte del significado de un verbo e incluso está disponible en diccionarios legibles por máquina. Nuestras contribuciones son las siguientes. Aprovechamos con éxito los datos adicionales de capacitación estándar de plata en forma de anotaciones proyectadas a partir de datos paralelos inglés-checo, así como información de contexto, mejorando la clasificación automática de telicidad para el inglés de manera significativa en comparación con trabajos anteriores. También creamos un nuevo conjunto de datos de textos en inglés anotados manualmente con telicidad.', 'fr': "Cet article traite de la reconnaissance automatique de la télicité, une notion d'aspect. Un événement télique comprend un point final naturel («\xa0elle est rentrée à pied\xa0»), alors qu'un événement atélique ne le fait pas («\xa0elle s'est promenée\xa0»). La reconnaissance de cette différence est une condition préalable à la compréhension du langage naturel temporel. En anglais, cette tâche de classification est difficile, car telicity est une catégorie linguistique secrète. En revanche, dans les langues slaves, l'aspect fait partie du sens d'un verbe et est même disponible dans des dictionnaires lisibles par machine. Nos contributions sont les suivantes. Nous exploitons avec succès des données de formation Silver Standard supplémentaires sous la forme d'annotations projetées à partir de données anglais-tchèque parallèles ainsi que d'informations contextuelles, améliorant ainsi la classification automatique de telicity pour l'anglais de manière significative par rapport aux travaux précédents. Nous créons également un nouvel ensemble de données de textes en anglais annotés manuellement avec telicity.", 'zh': '本文讨telicity之自动识别,此其大略也。 telic事一自然终("彼行归矣"),一atelic事则不("彼来去")。 知此异者,时自然语言解之先也。 英语之中,其类难,telicity隐言也。 斯拉夫言语之中,动词义之一体,可得于机器可读之字典。 贡献如下。 成功用额外银格训练数据,以来自并行英语 - 捷克语数之投影注释及上下文信息之文,比之前事,显改善英语自远程性类。 又创一新英语文本数据集,手动注telicity。', 'ja': '本稿では、アスペクト的な概念であるテリシティの自動認識について述べる。テリックイベントには、自然エンドポイント（「彼女は家に歩いた」）が含まれるが、アテリックイベントには含まれない（「彼女は歩き回った」）。この違いを認識することは、時間的に自然言語を理解するための前提条件である。英語では、telicityは隠れた言語学的カテゴリーであるため、この分類タスクは難しい。対照的に、スラブ諸語では、アスペクトは動詞の意味の一部であり、機械可読辞書でさえ利用可能である。当社の貢献は以下のとおりです。並列の英語-チェコ語データと文脈情報から投影された注釈の形で追加の銀の標準トレーニングデータを活用し、英語の自動テリシティ分類を前作と比較して大幅に向上させました。また、テリシティで手動でアノテーションされた英語テキストの新しいデータセットも作成します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर टेलिसिटी की स्वचालित मान्यता को संबोधित करता है, एक पहलू धारणा। एक टेलिक घटना में एक प्राकृतिक समापन बिंदु शामिल है ("वह घर चला गया"), जबकि एक एटेलिक घटना नहीं करती है ("वह चारों ओर चली गई")। इस अंतर को पहचानना अस्थायी प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए एक शर्त है। अंग्रेजी में, यह वर्गीकरण कार्य कठिन है, क्योंकि टेलिसिटी एक गुप्त भाषाई श्रेणी है। इसके विपरीत, स्लाव भाषाओं में, पहलू एक क्रिया के अर्थ का हिस्सा है और यहां तक कि मशीन-पठनीय शब्दकोशों में भी उपलब्ध है। हमारा योगदान इस प्रकार है। हम समानांतर अंग्रेजी-चेक डेटा के साथ-साथ संदर्भ जानकारी से अनुमानित एनोटेशन के रूप में अतिरिक्त चांदी मानक प्रशिक्षण डेटा का सफलतापूर्वक लाभ उठाते हैं, पिछले काम की तुलना में अंग्रेजी के लिए स्वचालित टेलीसिटी वर्गीकरण में काफी सुधार करते हैं। हम अंग्रेजी ग्रंथों का एक नया डेटा सेट भी बनाते हैं जो मैन्युअल रूप से टेलीसिटी के साथ एनोटेट किया गया है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе рассматривается автоматическое признание телесности, аспектное понятие. Телическое событие включает естественную конечную точку («она шла домой»), в то время как ателическое событие - нет («она шла вокруг»). Признание этого различия является необходимым условием для понимания естественного языка во времени. В английском языке эта классификационная задача является сложной, поскольку теличность является скрытой лингвистической категорией. Напротив, в славянских языках аспект является частью значения глагола и даже доступен в машиночитаемых словарях. Мы вносим следующий вклад. Мы успешно используем дополнительные данные обучения серебряного стандарта в виде прогнозируемых аннотаций из параллельных англо-чешских данных, а также контекстную информацию, улучшая автоматическую классификацию телесити для английского языка значительно по сравнению с предыдущей работой. Мы также создаем новый набор данных английских текстов вручную с аннотацией telicity.', 'ga': "Déileálann an páipéar seo le haithint uathoibríoch telicity, nóisean gnéitheach. Áiríonn imeacht telic críochphointe nádúrtha (“shiúil sí abhaile”), agus ní bhíonn imeacht aitileach (“shiúil sí thart”). Is réamhriachtanas é an difríocht seo a aithint chun teanga nádúrtha a thuiscint go ham. Sa Bhéarla, is deacair an tasc aicmithe seo, toisc gur catagóir theangeolaíoch ceilte í an telicity. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, i dteangacha Slavacha, tá gné mar chuid de bhrí briathar agus fiú ar fáil i bhfoclóirí atá inléite ag meaisín. Is iad seo a leanas ár ranníocaíochtaí. D'éirigh linn sonraí breise oiliúna caighdeánacha airgid a ghiaráil i bhfoirm nótaí réamh-mheasta ó shonraí comhthreomhara Béarla-Seice chomh maith le faisnéis comhthéacs, rud a chuir feabhas suntasach ar aicmiú uathoibríoch teiliseachta don Bhéarla i gcomparáid le hobair roimhe seo. Cruthaímid freisin tacar sonraí nua de théacsanna Béarla arna n-anótáil de láimh le tíogair.", 'ka': "ეს წიგნი აღმოჩნდება ტელეციტის ავტომატური განაცნობა, აპექტუალური განაცნობა. ტელიკური მოვლენტი შეიყვანა ნაირადი დასრულება ('ის გადასვლა სახლში'), მაგრამ ტელიკური მოვლენტი არ არის ('ის გადასვლა'). ამ განსხვავებას უცნობილობა არის თავსუფალური თავისუფალური თავისუფალური ენების განსხვავება. ანგლისურად, ეს კლასიფიკაციის დავალება ძალიან რთულია, რადგან ტელისტი არის კურნალი ენგლიგური კატეგორია. კონტრასტურად, სლავისური ენაში, აპექტი ვერბის ნიშნალის ნაწილი და კიდევ ხელმისაწყებელი სიტყვანში. ჩვენი დამატება იგივეა. ჩვენ წარმოდგენით დამატებული სერველი სტანდარტვინის მონაცემების ფორმაში პროექტირებულ ინგლისურ- ფექური მონაცემების ფორმაში და კონტექური ინფორმაციის შესაძლებლობა, ანგლისური კლასიფიკაცი ჩვენ ასევე ინგლისური ტექსტის ახალი მონაცემები შექმნა, რომელიც ტელექტირებით ახალი მონაცემები.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a telicitás automatikus felismerésével foglalkozik, egy aspektuális fogalommal. Egy telikus esemény magában foglalja a természetes végpontot ("hazasétált"), míg egy műtermi esemény nem ("körbejárta"). E különbség felismerése az időbeli természetes nyelv megértésének előfeltétele. Angolul ez a besorolási feladat nehéz, mivel a telicitás titkos nyelvi kategória. Ezzel szemben a szláv nyelvekben az aspektus egy ige jelentésének része, és még géppel olvasható szótárakban is elérhető. Hozzájárulásaink a következők: Sikeresen hasznosítjuk a további ezüst szabványos képzési adatokat párhuzamos angol-cseh adatokból, valamint kontextusinformációkból származó előrejelzések formájában, így jelentősen javítjuk az angol telicitás automatikus osztályozását a korábbi munkákhoz képest. Továbbá létrehozunk egy új, telicitással ellátott angol szövegből álló adatkészletet.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία πραγματεύεται την αυτόματη αναγνώριση της τελικότητας, μια οπτική έννοια. Ένα τελικό γεγονός περιλαμβάνει ένα φυσικό τελικό σημείο ("περπάτησε σπίτι"), ενώ ένα ατελικό γεγονός όχι ("περπάτησε γύρω"). Η αναγνώριση αυτής της διαφοράς αποτελεί προϋπόθεση για την κατανόηση της χρονικής φυσικής γλώσσας. Στα αγγλικά, αυτό το καθήκον ταξινόμησης είναι δύσκολο, καθώς η telicity είναι μια κρυφή γλωσσική κατηγορία. Αντίθετα, στις σλαβικές γλώσσες, η πτυχή είναι μέρος της έννοιας ενός ρήματος και διατίθεται ακόμη και σε μηχανικά αναγνώσιμα λεξικά. Οι συνεισφορές μας είναι οι εξής. Αξιοποιούμε με επιτυχία πρόσθετα ασημένια τυποποιημένα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης με τη μορφή προγραμματισμένων σχολίων από παράλληλα αγγλικά-τσεχικά δεδομένα καθώς και πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος, βελτιώνοντας σημαντικά την αυτόματη ταξινόμηση τηλικότητας για τα αγγλικά σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες εργασίες. Επίσης δημιουργούμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων αγγλικών κειμένων με χειροκίνητα σχόλια με telicity.', 'lt': "Šis dokumentas skirtas automatiniam telicito pripažinimui – aspektinei sąvokai. A telic event includes a natural endpoint ('she walked home'), while an atelic event does not ('she walked around').  Šio skirtumo pripažinimas yra būtina sąlyga laikinai suprasti natūralią kalbą. Anglų kalba ši klasifikavimo užduotis sudėtinga, nes telicity yra slapta kalbų kategorija. In contrast, in Slavic languages, aspect is part of a verb's meaning and even available in machine-readable dictionaries.  Mūsų indėlis yra toks: We successfully leverage additional silver standard training data in the form of projected annotations from parallel English-Czech data as well as context information, improving automatic telicity classification for English significantly compared to previous work.  We also create a new data set of English texts manually annotated with telicity.", 'it': 'Questo articolo affronta il riconoscimento automatico della telicità, una nozione aspectuale. Un evento telico include un endpoint naturale ("ha camminato a casa"), mentre un evento atelier no ("ha camminato in giro"). Riconoscere questa differenza è un prerequisito per la comprensione temporale del linguaggio naturale. In inglese, questo compito di classificazione è difficile, in quanto la telicity è una categoria linguistica segreta. Al contrario, nelle lingue slave, l\'aspetto è parte del significato di un verbo e persino disponibile in dizionari leggibili meccanicamente. I nostri contributi sono i seguenti. Sfruttamo con successo ulteriori dati di formazione standard argento sotto forma di annotazioni proiettate da dati paralleli inglese-cechi e informazioni di contesto, migliorando significativamente la classificazione automatica della telicità per l\'inglese rispetto ai lavori precedenti. Creiamo anche un nuovo set di dati di testi inglesi annotati manualmente con telicity.', 'mk': "Овој документ се обраќа на автоматското препознавање на телицитот, аспектуална идеја. A telic event includes a natural endpoint ('she walked home'), while an atelic event does not ('she walked around').  Recognizing this difference is a prerequisite for temporal natural language understanding.  In English, this classification task is difficult, as telicity is a covert linguistic category.  За разлика од тоа, на словачките јазици, аспектот е дел од значењето на јазикот и дури и достапен во машински читливи речници. Нашите придонеси се следни. Успешно ги искористуваме дополнителните сребрени стандардни податоци за обука во форма на проектирани анотации од паралелни англиско-чешки податоци, како и контекстни информации, подобрувајќи ја автоматската класификација на телицит за англиски значително во според Ние, исто така, создаваме нови податоци од англиски тексти рачно анотирани со телицит.", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз телеситеттерді автоматты түрде анықтау, аспекті түсінікті. Телекті оқиға табиғи аяқтау нүктесі (ол үйге қайтып жүрген) болады. Телекті оқиға болмайды ('ол жүрген'). Бұл айырмашылығын түсіну - уақытша тәуелді тілді түсіну үшін алдындағы қажет. Ағылшын тілінде бұл классификациялау тапсырмасы қиын, себебі телесциялық лингвистикалық санаты. Әртүрлі, славич тілдерінде, бөлім вербоның мағынасының бөлігі және компьютердің оқуға мүмкін сөздіктерінде да бар. Біздің қатынасыз осылай. Біз жалғыз ағылшын- Чех деректерінен және контексті мәліметтерден, ағылшын тілдерінің автоматты телеситтік классификациясын алдыңғы жұмысына салыстыру үшін қосымша құлас стандартты оқыту деректерін жасап Мұндай-ағылшын мәтіндерінің жаңа деректер жиынын қолмен құрамыз.", 'ms': "Kertas ini mengarahkan pengenalan automatik telicity, sebuah konsep aspektual. Peristiwa telik termasuk titik akhir semulajadi ('dia berjalan pulang'), sementara peristiwa atelik tidak ('dia berjalan sekeliling'). Pengetahuan perbezaan ini adalah syarat awal untuk pemahaman bahasa alam sementara. Dalam bahasa Inggeris, tugas klasifikasi ini sukar, kerana telicity adalah kategori bahasa rahasia. Sebaliknya, dalam bahasa Slavic, aspek adalah sebahagian dari makna verb dan walaupun tersedia dalam kamus boleh dibaca mesin. kontribusi kita adalah seperti ini. Kami berjaya menggunakan data latihan piawai perak tambahan dalam bentuk anotasi projeksi dari data Inggeris-Cek selari serta maklumat konteks, meningkatkan klasifikasi teliti automatik untuk Inggeris secara signifikan dibandingkan dengan kerja sebelumnya. Kami juga mencipta set data baru teks Inggeris yang dicatat secara manual dengan telicity.", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jindirizza r-rikonoxximent awtomatiku tat-teliċità, kunċett aspettwali. Avveniment teliku jinkludi punt ta' tmiem naturali ('hi mixi d-dar'), filwaqt li avveniment ateliku ma jagħmilx ('hi mixi madwar'). Ir-rikonoxximent ta’ din id-differenza huwa prerekwiżit għall-fehim temporali tal-lingwa naturali. In English, this classification task is difficult, as telicity is a covert linguistic category.  B’kuntrast ma’ dan, fil-lingwi Slavi, l-aspett huwa parti mit-tifsira ta’ verb u anke disponibbli f’dikjararji li jinqraw bil-magna. Il-kontribuzzjonijiet tagħna huma kif ġej. Aħna nħelbu b’suċċess dejta addizzjonali ta’ taħriġ standard tal-fidda fil-forma ta’ annotazzjonijiet proġettati minn dejta parallela Ingliż-Ċeka kif ukoll informazzjoni ta’ kuntest, li ttejjeb il-klassifikazzjoni awtomatika tat-teliċità għall-Ingliż b’mod sinifikanti meta mqabbla max-xogħol preċedenti. Aħna nħolqu wkoll sett ġdid ta’ dejta ta’ testi Ingliżi annotati manwalment bit-teliċità.", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł dotyczy automatycznego rozpoznawania teliczności, pojęcia aspektowego. Zdarzenie teliczne obejmuje naturalny punkt końcowy ("ona poszła do domu"), podczas gdy wydarzenie ateliczne nie ("ona chodziła dookoła"). Rozpoznanie tej różnicy jest warunkiem wstępnym czasowego zrozumienia języka naturalnego. W języku angielskim to zadanie klasyfikacji jest trudne, ponieważ telicity jest tajną kategorią językową. Natomiast w językach słowiańskich aspekt jest częścią znaczenia czasownika, a nawet dostępny w słownikach nadających się do odczytu maszynowego. Nasze wkłady są następujące: Z powodzeniem wykorzystujemy dodatkowe srebrne standardowe dane szkoleniowe w postaci projekcyjnych adnotacji z równoległych danych angielsko-czeskich oraz informacji kontekstowych, znacząco ulepszając automatyczną klasyfikację telicity dla języka angielskiego w porównaniu z poprzednimi pracami. Tworzymy również nowy zestaw danych tekstów angielskich ręcznie adnotacyjnych telicity.', 'no': "Denne papiret adresserer automatisk gjenkjenning av telicitet, eit aspektivt notis. Ein telisk hending inkluderer ein naturleg sluttpunkt (« hun gått heime »), mens ein atelisk hending ikkje (« hun gått rundt »). Kjenning av denne forskjellen er eit førehandsvising for tidlegare naturspråk. I engelsk er denne klassifikasjonen vanskeleg, sidan telicitet er eit dekket lingvisk kategori. I contrast, in Slavic languages, aspect is part of a verb's meaning and even available in machine-readable dictionaries. Bidragar våre er så følgjande. Vi har suksessfull levert ekstra silver standard opplæringsdata i form av prosjekte notasjonar frå parallelle engelske- tsjekkiske data og kontekstinformasjon, og forbetra automatisk telisitetsklassifikasjon for engelsk betydelig samanlikning med førre arbeid. Vi lager også ei ny data set med engelsk tekstar manuelt merkt med telicitet.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаас холбоотой байдлыг автоматжуулан танихыг харуулдаг. Телектик үйл явц нь байгалийн төгсгөл цэг (тэр гэртээ явж байсан) байдаг. Харин телектик үйл явц нь (тэр тойроод явж байсан) биш. Энэ ялгааг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нь цаг хугацааны байгалийн хэл ойлгох шаардлагатай. Англи хэлний хэлээр энэ хуваалцааны ажил хэцүү, учир нь холбоотой нь хэлний хэлбэртэй. Харамсалтай нь, славик хэл дээр хариу нь хэлний утгын нэг хэсэг бөгөөд машины уншиж чаддаг үгүйлтийн хэлбэрүүд ч байдаг. Бидний хөрөнгө оруулалт ингэж байна. Бид амжилттай Англи-Чех өгөгдлийн параллел хэлний мэдээллээс болон орчин үеийн мэдээллээс нэмэлт нүдний стандарт сургалтын өгөгдлийг ашиглаж, Англи хэлний хувьд автоматжуулалтын хуваалтыг өмнө ажилтай харьцуулахад өөр Мөн бид англи хэлний текст шинэ мэдээлэл бүтээж байгаа юм.', 'sr': "Ovaj papir se obraæa automatski priznanje teliciteta, aspektualna ideja. Teletički događaj uključuje prirodnu krajnju tačku ('ona je otišla kući'), dok atelijski događaj ne radi ('ona šeta okolo'). Priznavanje te razlike je predviđenje za privremeno prirodno razumevanje jezika. Na engleskom jeziku, ovaj klasifikacijski zadatak je težak, jer televizija je tajna lingvistička kategorija. Za suprotno, na slavičkim jezicima, aspekt je deo značenja verb a i čak dostupno u uređajima čitajućim rečenicima. Naši doprinosi su slijedeći. Uspjelo smo uticati na dodatne srebrne standardne podatke o obuci u obliku proglašenih annotacija iz paralelnih engleskih i čeških podataka, kao i kontekstske informacije, poboljšanje klasifikacije automatske teliciteta za engleski značajno u usporedbi s prethodnim radom. Takoðe stvorimo novi set podataka engleskih tekstova ruèno annotiranog telicitetom.", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ടെലിസ്റ്റിയുടെ സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ടെലിക് സംഭവത്തില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ അവസാനത്തിന്റെ ('അവള്\u200d വീട്ടിലേക്ക് നടന്നു') ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു  ഈ വ്യത്യാസം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് സമയത്തേക്കാള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ മനസ്സിലാക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു ആവശ ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ഈ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലി ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ്. ടെലിസ്റ്റി ഭാഷ വ്യവസ്ഥയാണ്. വിരോധത്തില്\u200d, സ്ലാവിക് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d, വാര്\u200dബിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം ഒരു ഭാഗമാണ്. യന്ത്ര വായിക്കാവുന്ന നിഘണ്ടികളില്\u200d പോലും ലഭ്യമ നമ്മുടെ പങ്കുകള്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്നു വരുന്നതാണ്. We successfully leverage additional silver standard training data in the form of projected annotations from parallel English-Czech data as well as context information, improving automatic telicity classification for English significantly compared to previous work.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടെലിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d കൈയ്യില്\u200d വിഷമമുണ്ടാക്കി", 'ro': 'Această lucrare abordează recunoașterea automată a telicității, o noțiune aspectuală. Un eveniment telic include un punct final natural ("a mers pe jos acasă"), în timp ce un eveniment atelier nu ("a mers pe jos"). Recunoașterea acestei diferențe este o condiție prealabilă pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural temporal. În limba engleză, această sarcină de clasificare este dificilă, deoarece telicitatea este o categorie lingvistică ascunsă. În schimb, în limbile slavă, aspectul face parte din semnificația unui verb și chiar este disponibil în dicționare care pot fi citite automat. Contribuţiile noastre sunt următoarele. Utilizăm cu succes date suplimentare de instruire standard argintiu sub formă de adnotări proiectate din date paralele engleză-cehă, precum și informații de context, îmbunătățind semnificativ clasificarea automată a telicității pentru limba engleză comparativ cu lucrările anterioare. Creăm, de asemenea, un nou set de date de texte în limba engleză adnotate manual cu telicitate.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar det automatiska erkännandet av telicitet, ett aspekt begrepp. En telisk händelse inkluderar en naturlig slutpunkt ("hon gick hem"), medan en ateliehändelse inte gör det ("hon gick runt"). Att erkänna denna skillnad är en förutsättning för tidsmässig förståelse av naturligt språk. På engelska är denna klassificeringsuppgift svår, eftersom telicitet är en dold språkkategori. På slaviska språk är aspekt däremot en del av ett verbs betydelse och även tillgänglig i maskinläsbara ordböcker. Våra bidrag är följande. Vi utnyttjar framgångsrikt ytterligare utbildningsdata i silver standard i form av projicerade anteckningar från parallella engelsk-tjeckiska data samt kontextinformation, vilket förbättrar automatisk telicitetsklassificering för engelska avsevärt jämfört med tidigare arbete. Vi skapar också en ny datauppsättning engelska texter manuellt kommenterade med telicitet.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ku qoran yahay aqoonsiga korontada, fikrada hore. Dhacdooyinka telikh waxaa ka mid ah barta ugu dambaysta dabiicadda ah (waxay ku socotay guriga), marka dhacdooyinka caadiga ah aysan aheyn (iyadoo ku wareegsan). Aqoonsashada kala duwanaanshadan waa u baahan tahay waxgarashada luuqada asalka ah ee ku meelgaarka ah. Luqada Ingiriiska shaqadu waa adag tahay, waayo, korontu waa kooxo luqada qarsoon. Isku xiriir, afka Slavic waxaa ka mid ah qeyb ka mid ah macluumaadka afka iyo xataa waxaa laga heli karaa luqadaha machine-aqri karo. Kharashadaadu waa sida soo socda. Waxaannu ku liibaanaynaa macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan waxbarashada lacagta ah oo ku qoran qaab la soo saaray oo laga soo jeedo macluumaadka afka Ingiriiska-Czech, sidoo kale macluumaadka kooxaha, horumarinta fasaxa koritaanka barashada afka Ingiriiska si weyn looga dhigo shaqadii hore. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa koox macluumaad cusub oo qoraal Ingiriis ah oo ay si dhakhtar ah ugu dhibaataysan.', 'ta': "இந்த தாள் தானாகவே தேவையின் அடையாளம், ஒரு விகிதமான கருத்து. ஒரு டெலிக் நிகழ்வு இயற்கையான முடிவு புள்ளியில் உள்ளது ('அவள் வீட்டில் நடந்தாள்' என்று கூறினார்), ஆனால் ஒரு நிகழ Recognizing this difference is a prerequisite for temporal natural language understanding.  ஆங்கிலத்தில், இந்த வகைப்படுத்தல் செயல் கடினமானது, அதிர்வு ஒரு மொழிமொழி வகையாகும். மாறாக, ஸ்லாவிக் மொழிகளில், விளிம்பு ஒரு வார்த்தையின் அர்த்தம் மற்றும் இயந்திரம் படிக்கக்கூடிய அகராதிகளில் கிடைக எங்கள் பங்குகள் பின்வரும். நாம் வெற்றிகரமாக கூடுதல் வெள்ளி நிலையான பயிற்சியின் தகவல்களை இணைப்பு ஆங்கிலத்திலிருந்து செக்கு தகவல் மற்றும் சூழல் தகவல்களிலிருந்து திட்டமிடப் நாம் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பு ஆங்கிலத்தின் உரைகளை கைமுறையாக கொண்டு குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளோம்.", 'si': "මේ පත්තුව ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක අඳුරන්න, ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ අදහසක්. ටෙලික් අවස්ථාවක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ස්වාභාවික අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා ('ඇය ගෙදර ඇවිල්ලා'), ඒ වගේම සිද්ධ මේ වෙනස් අඳුරගන්න පුළුවන් අවශ්\u200dය භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න. ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින්, මේ විශේෂණ වැඩක් අමාරුයි, ඒ වගේම ටෙලිසිටිටික් වලින් භාෂාවික වර්ගයක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයෙන්, ස්ලාවික් භාෂාවයේදී, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමය වාර්තාවක් අදහස් කරනවා ඒ වගේම පණිවිඩය පාළින්න පු අපේ සම්පූර්ණය පස්සේ වෙන්නේ. අපි සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-චෙක් දත්ත සහ සමාන්\u200dයය තොරතුරු වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඉංග්\u200dරී අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ලිපියුම් අලුත් දත්ත සූදානයක් තියෙන්නේ අලුත් තියෙන්නේ.", 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ تلویزیٹی کی آگاہ کرتی ہے، ایک منظور نظر. ایک ٹیلیک ایڈینٹ میں ایک طبیعی انڈینٹ پوینٹ شامل ہے (وہ گھر چلتی تھی) حالانکہ ایک ٹیلیک ایڈینٹ نہیں ہے (وہ چلتی تھی)۔ اس تفاوت کو پہچان لینا ایک موقتی طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے ایک ضرورت ہے۔ انگلیسی میں، یہ کلاسیفوں کا کام مشکل ہے، کیونکہ ٹیلیسیٹی ایک پورٹ زبان کاٹی ہے. مخالف، اسلاویک زبانوں میں، الگو ایک کلام کی معنی کا ایک حصہ ہے اور حتی ماشین پڑھنے کے قابل صحبت میں بھی موجود ہے. ہمارا حصہ اسی طرح ہے ہم موفق طور پر اضافہ چاندی استاندارڈ ترینسی ڈیٹے کو انگلیسی-چک ڈیٹے اور کنٹنسیٹ معلومات کے شکل میں پروژیٹ کیے گئے ہیں، انگلیسی کے لئے اضافہ ترینسیتی کا کلیسیٹ زیادہ اضافہ کردیا گیا ہے، جو پہلے کاروں کے مق ہم نے انگلیسی ٹیکسٹ کے نو ڈیٹ سٹ بنایا ہے جو ٹیلیسیٹی کے ذریعہ مضبوط ہے.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến việc nhận diện tự động... về... biến hình. Một sự kiện telic bao gồm một kết thúc tự nhiên "cô ta đi bộ về nhà". Trong khi một sự kiện nghệ thuật thì không "cô ta đi bộ xung quanh". Nhận ra sự khác biệt này là điều kiện cần thiết để hiểu ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Nói tiếng Anh, nhiệm vụ phân loại này rất khó, vì lâu đài là một loại ngôn ngữ ngầm. Ngược lại, trong ngôn ngữ Slavic, khía cạnh là một phần của từ ngữ và thậm chí còn có trong từ điển máy đọc. Chúng tôi đóng góp như sau. Chúng tôi có thể sử dụng thêm dữ liệu đào tạo bằng bạc tiêu chuẩn dưới dạng ghi chú dự kiến từ dữ liệu Anh-Séc song song cũng như thông tin ngữ cảnh, nâng cao mức độ biến-sản của người Anh so với công việc trước. Chúng tôi cũng tạo ra một nhóm dữ liệu mới của văn bản Anh được ghi chú bằng trang web.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz bogʻliq fikrlarni avtomatik ravishda aniqlash. Telik hodisada tabiiy oxirgi pochta (uy uyiga boradi) mavjud. Aks atrik hodisa ('У юриб кетган') emas. Recognizing this difference is a prerequisite for temporal natural language understanding.  Ingliz tilida, bu sinflik vazifasi qiyin, chunki huddi tillarda qarshi kategori. Ko'pchilik, Slavic tilida, aspekt verb ma'nosidagi qismi va xato mashinalar oʻqib boʻladigan lugʻatlarda mavjud. Biz qanday paytlarimiz quyidagi. @ info Biz bir yangi ingliz tili textlarini qo'llab qo'llab qo'llangan yangi maʼlumot tarkibini yaratishmiz.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда автоматичното разпознаване на теличността, аспектуално понятие. Теличното събитие включва естествена крайна точка ("тя се прибра пеша"), докато ателично събитие не ("тя се разхожда"). Разпознаването на тази разлика е предпоставка за разбирането на времевия естествен език. На английски език тази задача за класификация е трудна, тъй като теличността е скрита езикова категория. За разлика от това, в славянските езици аспектът е част от значението на глагола и дори е достъпен в машинно четими речници. Нашите приноси са както следва. Успешно използваме допълнителни данни от сребърния стандарт за обучение под формата на прогнозирани анотации от паралелни английски-чешки данни, както и контекстна информация, подобрявайки значително автоматичната телесна класификация на английски език в сравнение с предишната работа. Създаваме и нов набор от данни от английски текстове ръчно анотирани с теличност.', 'nl': "Dit artikel behandelt de automatische herkenning van telicity, een aspectueel begrip. Een telic event omvat een natuurlijk eindpunt ('ze liep naar huis'), terwijl een atelic event dat niet doet ('ze liep rond'). Het herkennen van dit verschil is een voorwaarde voor temporeel begrip van natuurlijke taal. In het Engels is deze classificatietaak moeilijk, aangezien telicity een verborgen taalcategorie is. In Slavische talen daarentegen is aspect onderdeel van de betekenis van een werkwoord en zelfs beschikbaar in machineleesbare woordenboeken. Onze bijdragen zijn als volgt. We gebruiken met succes aanvullende zilveren standaard trainingsgegevens in de vorm van geprojecteerde annotaties uit parallelle Engels-Tsjechische gegevens en contextinformatie, waardoor de automatische teliciteitsclassificatie voor Engels aanzienlijk wordt verbeterd ten opzichte van eerdere werkzaamheden. We maken ook een nieuwe dataset van Engelse teksten handmatig geannoteerd met telicity.", 'da': 'Denne artikel omhandler automatisk anerkendelse af telicitet, et aspekt begreb. En telisk begivenhed omfatter et naturligt slutpunkt ("hun gik hjem"), mens en atelierbegivenhed ikke gør ("hun gik rundt"). At erkende denne forskel er en forudsætning for tidsmæssig forståelse af naturligt sprog. På engelsk er denne klassifikationsopgave vanskelig, da telicitet er en skjult sprogkategori. På slaviske sprog er aspekt derimod en del af et verbs betydning og endda tilgængelig i maskinlæsbare ordbøger. Vores bidrag er som følger. Vi udnytter med succes yderligere sølvstandard træningsdata i form af projicerede noteringer fra parallelle engelsk-tjekkiske data samt kontekstoplysninger, hvilket forbedrer automatisk telicitetsklassificering for engelsk betydeligt sammenlignet med tidligere arbejde. Vi skaber også et nyt datasæt af engelske tekster manuelt annoteret med telicitet.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschäftigt sich mit der automatischen Erkennung von Telizität, einem aspektuellen Begriff. Ein telisches Ereignis beinhaltet einen natürlichen Endpunkt ("sie ging nach Hause"), während ein atelisches Ereignis es nicht tut ("sie ging herum"). Das Erkennen dieses Unterschieds ist Voraussetzung für das zeitliche Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. Im Englischen ist diese Klassifikationsaufgabe schwierig, da Telizität eine verdeckte linguistische Kategorie ist. Im Gegensatz dazu ist Aspekt in slawischen Sprachen Teil der Bedeutung eines Verbs und sogar in maschinenlesbaren Wörterbüchern verfügbar. Unsere Beiträge sind wie folgt: Wir nutzen erfolgreich zusätzliche silberne Standard-Trainingsdaten in Form von projizierten Annotationen aus parallelen englisch-tschechischen Daten sowie Kontextinformationen und verbessern so die automatische Telizitätsklassifizierung für Englisch im Vergleich zu früheren Arbeiten signifikant. Außerdem erstellen wir einen neuen Datensatz englischer Texte, die manuell mit telicity kommentiert werden.', 'id': "Kertas ini mengarahkan pengenalan otomatis telicit, sebuah konsep aspektual. Sebuah peristiwa telik termasuk titik akhir alami ('dia berjalan pulang'), sementara peristiwa atelik tidak ('dia berjalan sekitar'). Mengakui perbedaan ini adalah syarat awal untuk pemahaman bahasa alami sementara. Dalam bahasa Inggris, tugas klasifikasi ini sulit, karena telicity adalah kategori bahasa rahasia. Sebaliknya, dalam bahasa Slavic, aspek adalah bagian dari arti sebuah verb dan bahkan tersedia dalam kamus yang dapat dibaca mesin. Kontribusi kami adalah seperti ini. Kami berhasil menggunakan data pelatihan standar perak tambahan dalam bentuk anotasi proyeksi dari data paralel Inggris-Cek serta informasi konteks, meningkatkan klasifikasi teliti otomatis untuk Inggris secara signifikan dibandingkan dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya. Kami juga menciptakan set data baru dari teks Inggris secara manual yang dicatat dengan telicity.", 'ko': "본고는 체개념telicity의 자동 식별을 토론하였다.telic 사건은 자연의 종점 ('그녀는 집으로 돌아간다 ') 을 포함하지만, atelic 사건은 포함되지 않는다.이런 차이를 인식하는 것이 시제 자연어를 이해하는 선결 조건이다.영어에서 이런 분류 임무는 매우 어렵다. 왜냐하면 텔레비전은 은폐된 언어 범주이기 때문이다.그에 비해 슬라브어에서 체는 동사의 의미의 일부이며 기계가 읽을 수 있는 사전에서도 찾을 수 있다.우리의 공헌은 아래와 같다.우리는 평행영어-체코어 데이터와 상하문 정보의 투영 주석 형식의 추가 은 표준 훈련 데이터를 성공적으로 활용하여 이전의 작업에 비해 영어의 자동telicity 분류를 현저히 개선하였다.우리는 텔레시티로 수동으로 주석을 달 수 있는 새로운 영어 텍스트 데이터 집합을 만들었다.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ به شناسایی خودکار تلویزیتی، یک نظر منطقی درباره\u200cی خودکار صحبت می\u200cکند. یک حادثه تلیک شامل یک نقطه طبیعی است («او به خانه رفت») در حالی که یک حادثه تلیک (او در اطراف راه رفت) نیست. شناختن این تفاوت یک پیش\u200cنیاز برای درک زبان طبیعی موقتی است. در انگلیسی، این کار جدایی سخت است، زیرا تلویزیتی یک نوع زبان پوشیده است. در مقابل، در زبانهای اسلاویک، نقطه بخشی از معنی یک کلمه است و حتی در کلمه\u200cهای قابل خواندن ماشین موجود است. کمک های ما همینطوری هستند. ما با موفقیت اطلاعات آموزش استاندارد نقره اضافه\u200cای را در شکل نوشته\u200cهای پروژه\u200cشده از داده\u200cهای پارال انگلیسی- چک و اطلاعات محیط، بهتر کردن فرآیندۀ تلویزیتی خودکار برای انگلیسی در مقایسه با کار قبلی، به طور معنی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم ما همچنین یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید از متن های انگلیسی را به دستگیری آشکار می کنیم.', 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea kutambuliwa kwa urahisi wa umeme, wazo la namna fulani. Tukio la televisheni linajumuisha hatua ya mwisho ya asili ('alikua akitembea nyumbani'), wakati tukio la kutetea haliwezi ('alitembea'). Kutambua tofauti hii ni muhimu wa kuelewa lugha ya muda mfupi. Kwa Kiingereza, kazi hii ya kutangaza ni ngumu, kwa sababu umeme ni aina ya lugha. In contrast, in Slavic languages, aspect is part of a verb's meaning and even available in machine-readable dictionaries.  Mchango wetu ni kama ifuatavyo. Tumefanikiwa kutumia taarifa za mafunzo ya kiwango cha fedha kwa namna ya matangazo yanayopendekezwa kutoka data za Kiingereza-Czech pamoja na taarifa za muktadha, kuboresha usambazaji wa umeme kwa Kiingereza kwa kiasi kikubwa ukilinganishwa na kazi iliyopita. Pia tunatengeneza seti ya taarifa mpya ya maandishi ya Kiingereza yanayovutiwa na umeme.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz televisiýasynyň awtomatik tanyşyny, aspekt näme üçin berilýär. Telesik sahypalarynda tebigy bir soňky bar (ol öýüne gezelenip ýörän) geçirmeýär. Bu tapawutlary tanamak wagtyň tebigat dili düşünmesi üçin öň gerekli däldir. Iňlisçe, bu syýasatçylyk işi kyn, ýöne telesik dilleriniň garaşylyk kategoriýasy. Müstehçe, Slawiça dillerde, aspekt bir verbiň niýetiniň bir bölegidir we hatda maşynyň okalabilir s özlerinde hem bar. Biziň rugsatlarymyz şol ýaly. Biz diňe parallel iňlis-çe maglumatlardan we kontekst maglumatlardan gelen ýaly gümüş standart maglumatlaryny bejerdik. Öňki işe görä awtomatik terjimeleri Iňlis dilini gowlaşdyrmak üçin has gowurak terjime edip bileris. Biz hem Täze Maglumat setirini iňlisçe metinleri telicite duýýarys.', 'sq': "Kjo letër adreson njohjen automatike të telicitetit, një koncept aspektual. Një ngjarje telike përfshin një pikë përfundimtare natyrore ('ajo shkoi në shtëpi'), ndërsa një ngjarje a telic nuk ('ajo shkoi rreth'). Duke njohur këtë ndryshim është një parakusht për kuptimin e përkohshëm të gjuhës natyrore. Në anglisht, kjo detyrë klasifikimi është e vështirë, pasi telicity është një kategori gjuhësore e fshehtë. Në ndryshim, në gjuhët sllave, aspekti është pjesë e kuptimit të një verbi dhe madje në dispozicion në fjalorë të lexueshëm nga makina. Kontributet tona janë si pason. We successfully leverage additional silver standard training data in the form of projected annotations from parallel English-Czech data as well as context information, improving automatic telicity classification for English significantly compared to previous work.  We also create a new data set of English texts manually annotated with telicity.", 'af': "Hierdie papier adres die outomatiese herken van telisiteit, 'n aspektiewe notie. 'n Teliese gebeurtenis insluit 'n natuurlike eindpunt ('sy gewandel huis'), terwyl 'n ateliese gebeurtenis nie ('sy gewandel rondom'). Herken hierdie verskil is 'n voorspoediging vir tydelike natuurlike taal verstanding. In Engels is hierdie klassifikasie taak moeilik, want telisiteit is 'n dekke lingwisiese kategorie. In contrast, in Slavic languages, is aspek deel van 'n verb se betekening en selfs beskikbaar in masjien-leesbaarde woordeboeke. Ons bydraai is so volgende. Ons het suksesvol addisionele silwer standaard onderwerking data in die vorm van projekteerde notasies van parallele Engelse-Tschekiske data en konteks inligting verwyder, die automatiese telisiteit klasifikasie vir Engels betekeurig vergelyk met vorige werk. Ons skep ook 'n nuwe data stel van Engelse teks hand aangetrek met telisiteit.", 'am': "ይህ ፕሮግራም የድህነትን ማወቅ በራሱ ማውቀት፣ የቅርብ አሳብ ይጨምርበታል፡፡ የቴሌክኛ ጉዳይ የፍጥረት መጨረሻ ነጥብ (የቤት እየተመላለሰች)፣ የጣሊክ ጉዳይ ሳይሆን ('ተመላለሰች')፡፡ ይህ ልዩነት ማወቅ የጊዜው የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ነው፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ ይህ መግለጫ ሥራ አስቸጋሪ ነው፣ ድህነት የቋንቋው ክፍል ነው፡፡ በተለካ፣ በSlavic ቋንቋዎች፣ ጉዳዩ የቋንቋ ቃላት ማድረግ ትክክል ነው፡፡ አካሄዳችን እንዳለ ነው፡፡ በተለየ እንግሊዝኛ-ቻክክ ዳታ እና የግንኙነት መረጃ በተለየ የብር የድጋፍ ትምህርት ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ አቀረብን፡፡ አዲስ የኢንግሊዝኛ ጽሑፎችን በጥቅምት እናስገራለን፡፡", 'hy': "Այս թղթին դիտարկում է հեղինակության ավտոմատիկ ճանաչումը, առանձնահատուկ գաղափար: Տելիկական իրադարձությունը ներառում է բնական վերջնական կետ ('նա տուն էր քայլում'), մինչդեռ աթելիկական իրադարձությունը չի ('նա քայլում է'): Այս տարբերությունը ճանաչելը ժամանակական բնական լեզվի հասկացության նախապայման է: Անգլերենում այս դասակարգման խնդիրը դժվար է, քանի որ հելիսիթը գաղտնի լեզվաբանական կատեգորիա է: Դրան հակառակ, սլավիական լեզուներում ասպեկտը բայի իմաստի մասն է, և նույնիսկ հասանելի է մեքենան կարդալի բառարաններում: Մեր ներդրումը հետևյալն է: Մենք հաջողությամբ օգտագործում ենք ավելացյալ արծաթյա ստանդարտ ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ' նախագծված նոտացիաների տեսքով անգլերեն-ցեխական տվյալներից, ինչպես նաև կոնտեքստի ինֆորմացիայից, որոնք մեծ չափով բարելավում են անգ Մենք նաև ստեղծում ենք անգլերեն հաղորդագրությունների նոր տվյալներ, որոնք ձեռքով գրված են հելիսիտով:", 'az': "Bu kağıt telistik və aspekt fikrinin otomatik tanımasını təsdiqləyir. Bir telik olaraq təbiətli nişan nöqtəsi (o evdə gəzib dolandı), bir atelik olaraq ('o etrafda gəzib dolandı') deyildir. Bu fərqliyi tanıtmaq temporal təbiətli dil anlaşılması üçün əvvəlcə münasibdir. İngilizce dilində bu klasifikasiya görevi çətin, çünki telistik gizli dil kategoriyasıdır. Əksinə, Slavic dillərində, aspekt bir s özlərin anlamının bir parçasıdır və hətta maşna oxuyabilən sözlərdə faydalanır. Bizim sədəqəmiz böyükdür. Biz müvəffəqiyyətli İngilis-Çək verilənlərin və məlumatların paralil məlumatlarından və məlumatların məlumatlarından artıq gümüş standart təhsil verilən məlumatlarını təmin edirik, əvvəlki işə qarşılaşdığı qədər İngilis dilində avtomatik telistik klasifikasyonu daha yaxşılaşdırı Biz də məlumatları İngilizə məlumatlarının yeni bir quruluğu yaratdıq.", 'bn': "এই পত্রিকাটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে টেলিস্ট্রীটির স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করে, একটি দৃশ্যমান ধারণা। একটি টেলিক অনুষ্ঠানের মধ্যে একটি প্রাকৃতিক শেষ বিন্দুর মধ্যে রয়েছে ('তিনি বাড়িতে হেঁটেছিলেন'), যেখানে একটি অ্যা Recognizing this difference is a prerequisite for temporal natural language understanding.  ইংরেজি ভাষায় এই শ্রেণীবিভাগের কাজ কঠিন, কারণ টেলিভিস্টিক বিভাগ। বিপরীতে, স্লাভিক ভাষায়, একটি ভার্বের অর্থের অংশ এবং এমনকি মেশিন-পাঠযোগ্য অভিধানে পাওয়া যায়। Our contributions are as follows.  আমরা সফলভাবে প্রজেক্ট ট্রেনিং ইংরেজী ও চেকের তথ্য থেকে প্রস্তুত বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়বস্তুর মাধ্যমে আরো স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বাভাবিক টেলিস্ট্রাফিক আমরা একটি নতুন তথ্য তৈরি করি ইংরেজি টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে টেলিস্টের মাধ্যমে বিরক্তিত।", 'bs': "Ovaj papir se obraća na automatsko priznanje teliciteta, aspektualnu ideju. Teletički događaj uključuje prirodnu krajnju tačku ('ona je otišla kući'), dok atelijski događaj ne radi ('ona šeta okolo'). Priznavanje te razlike je predviđanje vremenskog razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. Na engleskom jeziku, ovaj zadatak klasifikacije je težak, jer je telicitet pokrivena lingvistička kategorija. Za suprotno, na slavičkim jezicima, aspekt je dio značenja verb a i čak dostupno u uređajima čitajućim riječima. Naši doprinosi su slijedeći. Uspjelo smo uticati na dodatne srebrne standardne podatke o obuci u obliku prognoženih annotacija iz paralelnih engleskih i čeških podataka, kao i kontekstske informacije, poboljšanje klasifikacije automatskih teliciteta za engleski značajno u usporedbi s prethodnim radom. Također stvorimo novi set podataka engleskih tekstova ručno annotiranog telicitetom.", 'ca': "Aquest article aborda el reconeixement automàtic de la telicitat, una noció aspectual. Un esdeveniment tèlic inclou un punt final natural ('ella va caminar a casa'), mentre un esdeveniment atèlic no ('ella va caminar al voltant'). Recognir aquesta diferència és una condició previa per a entendre la llengua natural temporal. En anglès, aquesta tasca de classificació és difícil, perquè la telicitat és una categoria lingüística secreta. En canvi, en les llengües eslàviques, l'aspecte és part del significat d'un verb i fins i tot disponible en diccionaris llegibles per màquina. Les nostres contribucions són les següents. Hem aconseguit aprofitar amb èxit dades adicionals d'entrenament estandard d'argent en forma de anotacions projectades a partir de dades paralleles anglo-ceques i informació contextual, millorant significativament la classificació automàtica de telicitat en anglès comparada amb la feina anterior. We also create a new data set of English texts manually annotated with telicity.", 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá automatickým rozpoznáváním telicity, aspektuálním pojmem. Telická událost zahrnuje přirozený koncový bod ("šla domů"), zatímco atelická událost ne ("šla kolem"). Rozpoznání tohoto rozdílu je předpokladem pro časové porozumění přirozenému jazyku. V angličtině je tento úkol klasifikace obtížný, protože telicita je skrytá jazyková kategorie. Naproti tomu ve slovanských jazycích je aspekt součástí významu slovesa a dokonce dostupný ve strojově čitelných slovnících. Naše příspěvky jsou následující. Úspěšně využíváme další stříbrná standardní tréninková data v podobě projektovaných anotací z paralelních anglicko-českých dat a kontextových informací, čímž výrazně zlepšujeme automatickou klasifikaci telicity angličtiny ve srovnání s předchozími pracemi. Vytváříme také novou datovou sadu anglických textů ručně anotovaných telicitou.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli käsittelee telicityn automaattista tunnustamista, aspectual käsite. Telic tapahtuma sisältää luonnollisen päätepisteen ("hän käveli kotiin"), kun taas atelic tapahtuma ei ("hän käveli ympäriinsä"). Tämän eron tunnistaminen on edellytys ajalliselle luonnolliselle kielelle. Englanniksi tämä luokittelutehtävä on vaikea, koska telicity on salainen kieliluokka. Sitä vastoin slaavin kielillä aspekti on osa verbin merkitystä ja saatavilla jopa koneluettavissa sanakirjoissa. Meidän panoksemme ovat seuraavat. Hyödynnämme menestyksekkäästi hopeatason koulutustietoja ennakoitujen huomautusten muodossa rinnakkaisista englanti-tšekki-tiedoista sekä kontekstitiedoista, mikä parantaa englannin automaattista telicity-luokitusta merkittävästi aikaisempaan työhön verrattuna. Luomme myös uuden aineiston englanninkielisistä teksteistä, joissa on manuaalinen selitys telicityllä.', 'et': 'Käesolev raamat käsitleb automaatset tunnustamist telicity, aspectual mõiste. Teliline sündmus hõlmab loomulikku tulemusnäitajat ("ta jalutas koju"), ateljeesündmus aga mitte ("ta jalutas ringi"). Selle erinevuse äratundmine on ajalise loodusliku keele mõistmise eeltingimus. Inglise keeles on see klassifitseerimisülesanne keeruline, kuna telicity on varjatud keeleline kategooria. Seevastu slaavi keeltes on aspekt osa tegusõna tähendusest ja saadaval isegi masinloetavates sõnaraamatutes. Meie panus on järgmine. Me kasutame edukalt täiendavaid hõbedase standardi koolitusandmeid paralleelsetest inglise-tšehhi andmetest ja kontekstiteabest prognoositud annotatsioonide kujul, parandades inglise keele automaatset telelisuse klassifikatsiooni oluliselt võrreldes varasemate töödega. Samuti loome uue ingliskeelsete tekstide andmekogumi, millel on käsitsi telicityga märgitud.', 'hr': "Ovaj papir se obraća na automatsko priznanje teliciteta, aspektualnu ideju. Teletički događaj uključuje prirodnu krajnju točku ('otišla kući'), dok atelijski događaj ne radi ('šetala okolo'). Priznavanje te razlike je predviđanje vremenskog razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. Na engleskom jeziku, ovaj zadatak klasifikacije je težak, jer je telicitet pokrivena jezička kategorija. U suprotno, na slavičkim jezicima, aspekt je dio značenja verb a i čak dostupan u uređajima čitajućim riječima. Naši doprinosi su slijedeći. Uspjelo smo primjenjivati dodatne srebrne standardne podatke za obuku u obliku proglašenih oznake iz paralelnih engleskih i čeških podataka, kao i kontekstske informacije, poboljšati automatsku klasifikaciju teliciteta za engleski značajno u usporedbi s prethodnim radom. Također stvorimo novi skup podataka engleskih tekstova koji su ručno annotirani telicitetom.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek obravnava avtomatsko prepoznavanje teličnosti, aspektivnega pojma. Telični dogodek vključuje naravno končno točko ("hodila je domov"), atelični dogodek pa ne ("hodila je"). Prepoznavanje te razlike je predpogoj za razumevanje časovnega naravnega jezika. V angleščini je ta klasifikacijska naloga težka, saj je teličnost tajna jezikovna kategorija. Nasprotno pa je v slovanskih jezikih vidik del pomena glagola in celo na voljo v strojno berljivih slovarjih. Naši prispevki so naslednji. Uspešno izkoriščamo dodatne podatke o usposabljanju srebrnega standarda v obliki projekcijskih opomb iz vzporednih angleško-čeških podatkov in kontekstnih informacij, kar pomembno izboljša avtomatsko klasifikacijo telesnosti za angleščino v primerjavi s prejšnjim delom. Ustvarjamo tudi nov podatkovni niz angleških besedil, ročno označenih s teličnostjo.', 'he': "הנייר הזה מתייחס לזהות אוטומטית של טליסיטי, רעיון מבחינה. אירוע טליק כולל נקודת סוף טבעית ('היא הלכה הביתה'), בעוד אירוע אטליק לא ('היא הלכה סביב'). להכיר את ההבדל הזה הוא התנאי מראשי להבנה טבעית זמנית של שפה. באנגלית, המשימה הזאת קשה, כיוון שהטליסיטי היא קטגוריה שפתית סוודה. בניגוד לזה, בשפות סלאביות, האפקט הוא חלק מהמשמעות של איבר ואפילו זמין במילונים קראים במכונות. Our contributions are as follows.  אנו משתמשים בהצלחה בנתונים נוספים של אימון סטנדרטי כסף בצורה של ציונים מתוכננים ממידע מקביל אנגלי-צ'קי, כמו גם מידע הקשר, משפר את שיעור טליסיטי אוטומטי לאנגלית בהשוואה משמעותית לעבודה קודמת. אנחנו גם יוצרים קבוצת נתונים חדשה של טקסטים אנגליים שמשמעות ביד עם טליסיטי.", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na yi amfani da sunan na farat ɗaya, wani zaɓi na daban. Ana ƙunsa da wani abu na ƙarama (ta yi tafiya zuwa gida), da kuma wata alama ta teliki ba ta shiga ('ta yi tafiya'). Suna gane wannan difwalta yana da wani muhimu wa fahimtar harshen masu lokaci. @ item license (short name) In contrast, in Slavic languages, aspect is part of a verb's meaning and even available in machine-readable dictionaries.  Kuma hanyõyinmu na kama da waɗannan. @ info: status Kayya, Munã samun wani matsayi na takarda littafan Ingiriya da ake zartar da umarni da hannunsa.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Alternate Rasané mungkahi iki dadi akeh sabanjuré kanggo kelas pribadi. Inggris Inga contrast, in Slave Ndoleh sing dibutuhke tarjamah podho. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tambah sing perusahaan langgar-sistem sing dibutuhke dolanan ingkang dipun dadi sing dikanggambar kanggo nyengke dolanan ingkang dhéwé lan informasi kontext Awak dhéwé éntuk data sing gawe nggambar texting Inggris manut nang telité.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྙིང་རིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པ་དང་མཐུན་གྱི་དོན་དག་ལ་ཁ་ཤས་ཡོད། སྒྲ་བརྙན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་དེ་ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་མཐའ་འཁོར་ཞིག་ཡོད། དབྱེ་རིགས་འདི་ལ་རྟོགས་ནི་དུས་མཚམས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་རེད། དབྱིན་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འདི་ལས་ཀར་ཆེན་ཡིན། སྙན་རིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། གདོང་ཚུལ་ནི། སྡེབ་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་ནི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཚིག ང་ཚོའི་གུས་ཐུག་ལས་ཀྱང་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་རེད། We successfully leverage additional silver standard training data in the form of projected annotations from parallel English-Czech data as well as context information, improving automatic telicity classification for English significantly compared to previous work. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་ལག་ནས་སྦྲེལ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Improving Slot Filling Performance with Attentive Neural Networks on Dependency Structures', 'ar': 'تحسين أداء ملء الفتحات باستخدام الشبكات العصبية اليقظة على هياكل التبعية', 'es': 'Mejora del rendimiento de llenado de ranuras con redes neuronales atentas en estructuras de dependencia', 'fr': 'Améliorer les performances de remplissage des créneaux grâce à des réseaux de neurones attentifs', 'pt': 'Melhorando o desempenho de preenchimento de slots com redes neurais atentas em estruturas de dependência', 'ja': '依存構造上の注意深いニューラルネットワークによるスロット充填性能の向上', 'zh': '因恃结构之细心神经网络增槽充性', 'ru': 'Повышение производительности заполнения слотов с помощью внимательных нейронных сетей на структурах зависимостей', 'hi': 'निर्भरता संरचनाओं पर चौकस तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ स्लॉट भरने के प्रदर्शन में सुधार', 'ga': 'Feidhmíocht Líonadh Sliotán a Fheabhsú le Líonraí Néaracha Aireach ar Struchtúir Spleáchais', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της απόδοσης πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων με προσεκτικά νευρωνικά δίκτυα σε δομές εξάρτησης', 'hu': 'A nyerőgépek töltési teljesítményének javítása figyelmes ideghálózatokkal a függőségi struktúrákon', 'it': 'Migliorare le prestazioni di riempimento delle slot con reti neurali attente sulle strutture di dipendenza', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік құрылғыларындағы нақты невралдық желілерді толтыру жұмысын жақсарту', 'lt': 'Laikotarpių užpildymo veiksmingumo gerinimas aktyviais nerviniais tinklais priklausomybės struktūrose', 'mk': 'Подобрување на резултатот на полнување на часовниците со активни неврални мрежи на структурите на зависност', 'ml': 'ആശ്രയിച്ച നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'ms': 'Perbaikan Performasi Penisi Slot dengan Rangkaian Neural Menarik pada Struktur Dependensi', 'mt': 'Titjib fil-prestazzjoni tal-mili tas-Slots b’Netwerks Newrali Attenzivi fuq Strutturi ta’ Dipendenza', 'mn': 'Slot Filling Performance with Attentive Neural Networks on Dependency Structures', 'no': 'Forbetra plassfilteringsfunksjon med delvis neuralnettverk på avhengighetsstrukturer', 'pl': 'Poprawa wydajności wypełniania gniazd dzięki uważnym sieciom neuronowym na strukturach zależności', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea performanței de umplere a sloturilor cu rețele neurale atente pe structuri de dependență', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje funkcije ispunjavanja slota sa pažljivim neuronskim mrežama o strukturama zavisnosti', 'si': 'ස්ලෝට් පූර්ණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ විදියට අවධානය න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලතාව', 'so': 'Improving Slot buuxing Performance with Attentive Neural Network on Dependence Structures', 'sv': 'Förbättra prestanda för fyllning av slots med uppmärksamma neurala nätverk på beroendestrukturer', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'ڈیفاندنستی ساختاروں پر مواظب نائرول نیٹورک کے ساتھ Slot Filling Performance improvement', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng hiệu ứng chạm chấm với các mạng thần kinh trẻ quan trọng về cấu trúc phụ thuộc', 'da': 'Forbedring af slot fyldning ydeevne med opmærksomme neurale netværk på afhængighedsstrukturer', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de prestaties van het vullen van sleuven met attente neurale netwerken op afhankelijkheidsstructuren', 'bg': 'Подобряване на производителността на запълване на слотове с внимателни неврални мрежи на зависими структури', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje učinkovitosti napunjenja slota s pažljivim neuronskim mrežama o strukturama ovisnosti', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Slot-Füllleistung mit aufmerksamen neuronalen Netzwerken auf Abhängigkeitsstrukturen', 'id': 'Improving Slot Filling Performance with Attentive Neural Networks on Dependency Structures', 'fa': 'افزایش عملکرد پر کردن Slot با شبکه های عصبی مواظب بر ساختارهای بستگی', 'ko': '구조에 의존하는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 틈새 충전 성능 개선', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Ujadala wa Kujaza Uwezeshaji na Mtandao wa Neurali wa Miundombinu ya Kutegemea', 'af': 'Verbeter Slot Opvulling Performasie met Aangaande Neurale Netwerke op Afhanklikheid strukture', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i performancës së mbushjes së ngadalësive me rrjetet nervore tërheqëse në strukturat e varësisë', 'tr': 'Dependensiýa strukturlary bilen jogap dolmaky ukyplary gowylaşdyrma', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Անկախությունների կառուցվածքների նյարդային ցանցերի օգնությամբ բարելավելը', 'bs': 'Poboljšavanje funkcije napunjenja slota sa pažljivim neuronskim mrežama o strukturama ovisnosti', 'az': 'Bağlamlıq strukturları üzərində gözəl nöral ağları ilə Slot Filling Performance Improvement', 'bn': 'নির্ভরিত ক্ষেত্রে অ্যাটেন্টেন্টিভ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে স্লোট পূর্ণ করার সুযোগ সম্ভব', 'ca': 'millorar el rendiment del rellenç de les intervals amb xarxes neurals atentives sobre estructures de dependencies', 'cs': 'Zlepšení výkonu plnění slotů pomocí pozorných neuronových sítí na závislostních strukturách', 'fi': 'Parannetaan aukkojen täyttötehokkuutta tarkkaavaisilla hermoverkoilla riippuvuusrakenteissa', 'et': 'Töökohtade täitmise jõudluse parandamine sõltuvusstruktuuride tähelepanelike närvivõrkudega', 'he': 'שיפור ביצועי מילוי תאריכים עם רשתות עצביות משוכנעות על מבנים תלויות', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje zmogljivosti polnjenja rež s pozornimi živčnimi omrežji na odvisnih strukturah', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'bo': 'Improving Slot Filling Performance with Attentive Neural Networks on Dependency Structures'}
{'en': 'Slot Filling (SF) aims to extract the values of certain types of attributes (or slots, such as person : cities_of_residence) for a given entity from a large collection of source documents. In this paper we propose an effective DNN architecture for SF with the following new strategies : (1). Take a regularized dependency graph instead of a raw sentence as input to DNN, to compress the wide contexts between query and candidate filler ; (2). Incorporate two attention mechanisms : local attention learned from query and candidate filler, and global attention learned from external knowledge bases, to guide the model to better select indicative contexts to determine slot type. Experiments show that this framework outperforms state-of-the-art on both relation extraction (16 % absolute F-score gain) and slot filling validation for each individual system (up to 8.5 % absolute F-score gain).', 'ar': 'يهدف ملء الفتحات (SF) إلى استخراج قيم أنواع معينة من السمات (أو الفتحات ، مثل شخص: Cities_of_residence) لكيان معين من مجموعة كبيرة من المستندات المصدر. في هذه الورقة نقترح بنية DNN فعالة لـ SF مع الاستراتيجيات الجديدة التالية: (1). خذ مخطط تبعية منظم بدلاً من جملة أولية كمدخل إلى DNN ، لضغط السياقات الواسعة بين الاستعلام وحشو المرشح ؛ (2). قم بدمج آليتين للانتباه: الاهتمام المحلي المستفاد من الاستعلام وحشو المرشح ، والاهتمام العالمي المكتسب من قواعد المعرفة الخارجية ، لتوجيه النموذج لاختيار السياقات الإرشادية بشكل أفضل لتحديد نوع الفاصل الزمني. تظهر التجارب أن هذا الإطار يتفوق على أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا في كل من استخراج العلاقة (16٪ كسب مطلق لدرجة F) والتحقق من صحة ملء الفتحة لكل نظام فردي (حتى 8.5٪ اكتساب مطلق لدرجة F).', 'es': 'Slot Filling (SF) tiene como objetivo extraer los valores de ciertos tipos de atributos (o slots, como person:cities_of_residence) para una entidad determinada de una gran colección de documentos fuente. En este artículo proponemos una arquitectura DNN efectiva para SF con las siguientes estrategias nuevas: (1). Tome un gráfico de dependencia regularizado en lugar de una oración sin procesar como entrada a DNN, para comprimir los contextos amplios entre la consulta y el relleno candidato; (2). Incorporar dos mecanismos de atención: la atención local aprendida de la consulta y el rellenador de candidatos, y la atención global aprendida de bases de conocimiento externas, para guiar el modelo para seleccionar mejor los contextos indicativos para determinar el tipo de franja horaria. Los experimentos muestran que este marco supera al estado de la técnica tanto en la extracción de relaciones (ganancia de puntuación F absoluta del 16%) como en la validación de llenado de ranuras para cada sistema individual (hasta un 8,5% de ganancia de puntuación F absoluta).', 'fr': "Slot Filling (SF) vise à extraire les valeurs de certains types d'attributs (ou d'emplacements, tels que person:cities_of_residence) pour une entité donnée à partir d'une vaste collection de documents sources. Dans cet article, nous proposons une architecture DNN efficace pour SF avec les nouvelles stratégies suivantes\xa0: (1). Prendre un graphe de dépendance régularisé au lieu d'une phrase brute comme entrée dans DNN, pour compresser les contextes étendus entre la requête et le candidat\xa0; (2). Intégrez deux mécanismes d'attention\xa0: l'attention locale apprise par la requête et le candidat, et l'attention globale tirée de bases de connaissances externes, afin de guider le modèle afin de mieux sélectionner les contextes indicatifs afin de déterminer le type de créneau. Les expériences montrent que ce cadre surpasse les performances les plus récentes en matière d'extraction de relation (gain de score F absolu de 16\xa0%) et de validation du remplissage des créneaux pour chaque système individuel (gain de score F absolu allant jusqu'à 8,5\xa0%).", 'pt': 'O Slot Filling (SF) visa extrair os valores de certos tipos de atributos (ou slots, como person:cities_of_residence) para uma determinada entidade de uma grande coleção de documentos de origem. Neste artigo propomos uma arquitetura DNN efetiva para SF com as seguintes novas estratégias: (1). Pegue um gráfico de dependência regularizado em vez de uma sentença bruta como entrada para DNN, para compactar os amplos contextos entre a consulta e o preenchimento candidato; (2). Incorpore dois mecanismos de atenção: atenção local aprendida a partir de consulta e preenchimento de candidatos e atenção global aprendida de bases de conhecimento externas, para orientar o modelo a selecionar melhor contextos indicativos para determinar o tipo de slot. Experimentos mostram que essa estrutura supera o estado da arte tanto na extração de relação (ganho absoluto de 16% no F-score) quanto na validação de preenchimento de slot para cada sistema individual (ganho absoluto de até 8,5% no F-score).', 'ja': 'スロット塗りつぶし(SF)は、ソースドキュメントの大規模なコレクションから、特定のエンティティの特定のタイプの属性(またはスロット、例: person: cities_of_residence)の値を抽出することを目的としています。本稿では，次のような新たな戦略を用いて， SFに効果的なDNNアーキテクチャを提案する． DNNへの入力として、生の文章の代わりに正規化された依存関係グラフを使用して、クエリと候補のフィラー間の広いコンテキストを圧縮します。（ 2 ）。クエリと候補者のフィラーから学んだローカルな注意と、外部の知識ベースから学んだグローバルな注意という2つの注意メカニズムを組み込んで、スロットタイプを決定するための指示的なコンテキストをより適切に選択するようにモデルを導きます。実験によると、このフレームワークは、関係抽出（ 16 ％の絶対Fスコアゲイン）と個々のシステムのスロット充填検証（最大8.5 ％の絶対Fスコアゲイン）の両方で、最先端のフレームワークよりも優れていることが示されています。', 'zh': '槽填 (SF) 旨取给定体于众文档,如(槽,如 person:cities_of_residence)之直。 本文中,臣等立SF DNN架构有效者,以下新策略:(1).用正则化者图之,非原始句为DNN输,以压缩询填充物之上下文。 (2).合二注:询选填充物中学所注,及外知识库全局关注,以指导模形,择性上下文以定槽形。 实验明框架于关系(16%绝F分益)与统位充验(达8.5%之绝对F分)皆优于先进之性。', 'ru': 'Заполнение слотов (SF) предназначено для извлечения значений определенных типов атрибутов (или слотов, таких как person:cities_of_residence) для данной сущности из большой коллекции исходных документов. В этой статье мы предлагаем эффективную архитектуру DNN для SF со следующими новыми стратегиями: (1). Возьмите регуляризованный график зависимости вместо необработанного предложения в качестве входных данных для DNN, чтобы сжать широкий контекст между запросом и заполнителем-кандидатом; (2). Включите два механизма внимания: местное внимание, полученное из запроса и заполнителя-кандидата, и глобальное внимание, полученное из внешних баз знаний, чтобы направлять модель для лучшего выбора ориентировочных контекстов для определения типа слота. Эксперименты показывают, что этот каркас превосходит современный как по экстракции отношения (16% абсолютное усиление F-показателя), так и по валидации заполнения слотов для каждой отдельной системы (до 8,5% абсолютное усиление F-показателя).', 'hi': 'स्लॉट फिलिंग (SF) का उद्देश्य स्रोत दस्तावेज़ों के एक बड़े संग्रह से किसी दिए गए एंटिटी के लिए कुछ प्रकार की विशेषताओं (या स्लॉट, जैसे व्यक्ति:cities_of_residence) के मानों को निकालना है. इस पेपर में हम निम्नलिखित नई रणनीतियों के साथ SF के लिए एक प्रभावी DNN आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: (1). क्वेरी और उम्मीदवार भराव के बीच व्यापक संदर्भों को संपीड़ित करने के लिए DNN के लिए इनपुट के रूप में एक कच्चे वाक्य के बजाय एक नियमित निर्भरता ग्राफ लें; (2). दो ध्यान तंत्र शामिल करें: क्वेरी और उम्मीदवार भराव से सीखा गया स्थानीय ध्यान, और बाहरी ज्ञान आधारों से सीखा गया वैश्विक ध्यान, स्लॉट प्रकार निर्धारित करने के लिए संकेतक संदर्भों का बेहतर चयन करने के लिए मॉडल का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि यह ढांचा संबंध निष्कर्षण (16% पूर्ण एफ-स्कोर लाभ) और प्रत्येक व्यक्तिगत प्रणाली (8.5% पूर्ण एफ-स्कोर लाभ तक) के लिए स्लॉट भरने वाले सत्यापन दोनों पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': "Tá sé mar aidhm ag Líonadh Sliotán (SF) luachanna cineálacha áirithe tréithe (nó sliotáin, mar person:cities_of_residence) d'aonán ar leith a bhaint as bailiúchán mór doiciméad foinseach. Sa pháipéar seo molaimid ailtireacht éifeachtach DNN do SF leis na straitéisí nua seo a leanas: (1). Glac graf spleáchais rialta in ionad abairt amh mar ionchur do DNN, chun na comhthéacsanna leathana idir líon na gceisteanna agus líontóirí an iarrthóra a chomhbhrú; (2). Ionchorprú dhá mheicníocht aire: aird áitiúil a foghlaimíodh ó cheist agus líon na n-iarrthóirí, agus aird dhomhanda a foghlaimíodh ó bhoinn seachtracha eolais, chun an tsamhail a threorú chun comhthéacsanna táscacha a roghnú níos fearr chun an cineál sliotán a chinneadh. Léiríonn turgnaimh go sáraíonn an creat seo an creat úrscothach maidir le hastarraingt gaol (16% de ghnóthachan absalóideach F-scór) agus bailíochtú líonadh sliotán do gach córas ar leith (suas go dtí 8.5% gnóthachan iomlán scóir F).", 'ka': 'სტრიქონტის დაყენება (SF) მინიშნავს განსაკუთრებული ატრიბუტების (ან სტრიქონტის) მნიშვნელობების გამოყენება, როგორც ადამიანი:cities_of_residence) განსაკუთრებული ელემენტისთვის დიდი ფორ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ განვითარებთ ეფექტიური DNN არქტიქტიკური SF-ს შემდეგ ახალი სტრატიქტიკურებით: რეგილურად დადარწმუნებული განსახულებელობის გრაფიკის გარეშე, როგორც DNN-ს შეტყობინება, რომ კითხვა და კანდიდენტის შეტყობინებელის შორის უფრო დიდი კონტექსტები (2). ჩვენ შეიყვანეთ ორი ინტერნექციური მექანსი: ლოკალური ინტერნექცია კითხვის და კანდიდენტების შესახებ, და გლობალური ინტერნექციის გარეშე ინტერნექციური ინტერნექციების გადასწავ ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ეს ფრამეტრი გამოყენება განსხვავებული განსხვავებაზე (16% აბსოლუტური F- score gain) და ყველა ინდიველური სისტემის განსხვავება (8,5% აბსოლუტური F- score gain).', 'it': "Slot Filling (SF) mira ad estrarre i valori di alcuni tipi di attributi (o slot, come person:cities_of_residence) per una data entità da una vasta collezione di documenti sorgente. In questo articolo proponiamo un'efficace architettura DNN per SF con le seguenti nuove strategie: (1). Prendere un grafico di dipendenza regolarizzato invece di una frase grezza come input in DNN, per comprimere gli ampi contesti tra query e filler candidato; (2).  Incorporare due meccanismi di attenzione: attenzione locale appresa da query e candidate filler, e attenzione globale appresa da basi di conoscenza esterne, per guidare il modello a selezionare meglio i contesti indicativi per determinare il tipo di slot. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che questo framework supera lo stato dell'arte sia per l'estrazione delle relazioni (guadagno assoluto del 16% F) che per la convalida del riempimento degli slot per ogni singolo sistema (guadagno assoluto del punteggio F fino all'8,5%).", 'lt': 'Laikotarpių užpildymo (SF) tikslas – išimti tam tikrų tipų požymių (arba laiko tarpsnių, pvz., asmens:gyvenamosios vietos_miestų) vertes iš didelio šaltinio dokumentų rinkinio. Šiame dokumente siūlome veiksmingą DNR architektūrą, skirtą SF su šiomis naujomis strategijomis: (1). paimti reguliuojamą priklausomybės grafiką, o ne žaliavinį sakinį kaip DNN įrašą, kad būtų suspaustas platus klausimo ir kandidato užpildymo kontekstas; (2). Įtraukti du dėmesio mechanizmus: vietinį dėmesį, įgytą iš paklausos ir kandidatų užpildymo, ir pasaulinį dėmesį, įgytą iš išorinių žinių bazių, siekiant orientuoti model į į geresnį orientacinį kontekstą laiko tarpsnių tipui nustatyti. Eksperimentai rodo, kad šios sistemos rezultatai yra geriausiai pažangi tiek santykių ekstrahavimo (16 % absoliutaus F taško padidėjimo) tiek laiko tarpsnių užpildymo patvirtinimo kiekvienai atskirai sistemai (iki 8,5 % absoliutaus F taško padidėjimo).', 'kk': 'Слотты толтыру (SF) керек атрибуттар (немесе слоттар, мысалы, адам:cities_of_residence) үлкен құжаттар жинағынан келтірілген нысандарды тарқату мақсаты. Бұл қағазда SF үшін эффективті DNN архитектурасын келесі жаңа стратегиялар қолданып тастаймыз: (1). Сұраныс мен кандидатты толтырушылар арасындағы жазылған тәуелсіздік графикасын DNN- ге келтірілген сөйлеменің орнына үлгі тәуелсіздік графикасын алып тастау үшін. (2). Екі қызықтық механизмін құру: сұраныс мен кандидаттарды толтырушыдан оқылған жергілікті қатынас, және сыртқы білім негізінен оқылған жалпы қатынас, моделі слот түрін анықтау үшін көрсетілетін контексттерді Тәжірибелер бұл қоршауын әрбір жүйе жұмыс ішінде қатынау күйінде (16% абсолютті F- нөмірлерін жетілдіру) және жұмыс ішінде жұмыс ішінде орындалатын слоттарды дұрыстыру (8, 5% абсолютті F- нөмірле', 'mk': 'Заполнувањето на слотови (SF) има за цел извлекување на вредностите на одредени типови на атрибути (или слотови, како што е личноста:cities_of_residence) за одреден ентитет од голема колекција изворни документи. Во овој весник предложуваме ефикасна архитектура на ДНН за СФ со следните нови стратегии: (1). Земете регуларизиран граф за зависност наместо сурова реченица како влог во DNN, за да ги компресирате широките контексти помеѓу прашањето и кандидатскиот исполнувач; (2). Incorporate two attention mechanisms: local attention learned from query and candidate filler, and global attention learned from external knowledge bases, to guide the model to better select indicative contexts to determine slot type.  Експериментите покажуваат дека оваа рамка ги надминува најновите резултати на екстракцијата на односите (16 отсто апсолутно добивање на F-оценката) и валидацијата на полнувањето на слотови за секој индивидуален систем (до 8,5 отсто апсолутно добивање на F-оценката).', 'hu': 'A Slot Filling (SF) célja, hogy egy adott entitás bizonyos típusú attribútumainak (vagy résidők, például person:cities_of_residence) értékeit kivonja a forrásdokumentumok nagy gyűjteményéből. Jelen tanulmányban egy hatékony DNN architektúrát javasolunk SF számára a következő új stratégiákkal: (1). A DNN bemenetként egy szabályozott függőségi grafikont használjon nyers mondat helyett a lekérdezés és a jelölt töltő közötti széles környezetek tömörítéséhez; (2).  Két figyelemre méltó mechanizmust foglaljon magába: a lekérdezésből és a jelölt töltőből tanult helyi figyelem, valamint a külső tudásbázisokból tanult globális figyelem, hogy irányítsa a modell indikatív kontextusok jobb kiválasztását a réstípus meghatározásához. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy ez a keretrendszer mind a relatív extrakció (16%-os abszolút F pontszám nyereség), mind a slot töltés validálása mind az egyes rendszerek esetében (akár 8,5%-os abszolút F pontszám nyereség).', 'el': 'Η πλήρωση αυλακώσεων (ΣΦ) στοχεύει στην εξαγωγή των τιμών ορισμένων τύπων χαρακτηριστικών (ή αυλακώσεων, όπως πρόσωπο:πόλεις_κατοικίας) για μια δεδομένη οντότητα από μια μεγάλη συλλογή εγγράφων προέλευσης. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε μια αποτελεσματική αρχιτεκτονική DNN για το SF με τις ακόλουθες νέες στρατηγικές: (1). Πάρτε ένα κανονικό γράφημα εξάρτησης αντί μιας ακατέργαστης πρότασης ως εισαγωγή στο DNN, για να συμπιέσετε τα ευρεία πλαίσια μεταξύ ερωτήματος και υποψήφιου συμπλέκτη. (2).  Ενσωματώστε δύο μηχανισμούς προσοχής: τοπική προσοχή που μαθαίνεται από το ερώτημα και τον υποψήφιο πληρωτή, και παγκόσμια προσοχή που μαθαίνεται από εξωτερικές βάσεις γνώσεων, για να καθοδηγήσει το μοντέλο για να επιλέξει καλύτερα ενδεικτικά πλαίσια για να καθορίσει τον τύπο αυλακώσεων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι αυτό το πλαίσιο ξεπερνά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας τόσο στην εξαγωγή σχέσεων (16% απόλυτο κέρδος σκορ F) όσο και στην επικύρωση πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων για κάθε μεμονωμένο σύστημα (έως 8,5% απόλυτο κέρδος σκορ F).', 'ml': 'സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മൂല്യങ്ങള്\u200d (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സ്ലോട്ടുകള്\u200d, ഉദാഹരണമായ മനുഷ്യര്\u200d: cities_ of_ residence) ഒരു വലിയ ഉറവിട രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു സൂക്ഷിക്ക ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d എസ്\u200cഎഫിന്റെ ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട DNN ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കേറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. പുതിയ ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഫയല്\u200dക്കുമിടയിലുള്ള വിശിഷ്ടമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും പകരം നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആശ് (2). രണ്ടു ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് ചെയ്യുക: ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഫയലില്\u200d നിന്നും ലോക്കല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ പഠിച്ചി Experiments show that this framework outperforms state-of-the-art on both relation extraction (16% absolute F-score gain) and slot filling validation for each individual system (up to 8.5% absolute F-score gain).', 'ms': 'Penisi Slot (SF) bermaksud mengekstrak nilai jenis tertentu atribut (atau slots, seperti person:cities_of_residence) untuk entiti yang diberi dari koleksi besar dokumen sumber. Dalam kertas ini kami cadangkan arkitektur DNN yang berkesan untuk SF dengan strategi baru berikut: (1). Ambil graf dependensi yang ditetapkan selain dari kalimat mentah sebagai input ke DNN, untuk memaksa konteks luas antara pertanyaan dan penuhi calon; (2).  Sertakan dua mekanisme perhatian: perhatian setempat belajar dari pertanyaan dan penuhi calon, dan perhatian global belajar dari pangkalan pengetahuan luaran, untuk memimpin model untuk pilih konteks indikatif lebih baik untuk menentukan jenis slot. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kerangka ini melampaui keadaan-state-of-the-pada kedua-dua ekstraksi hubungan (16% keuntungan F-skor mutlak) dan pengesahihan mengisi slot bagi setiap sistem individu (sehingga 8.5% keuntungan F-skor mutlak).', 'mn': 'Слот дүүргэх (SF) нь томоохон бүтээгдэхүүний томоохон баримт баримтуудаас өгөгдсөн нэгэн бүтээгдэхүүний (эсвэл слотуудын) утгыг гаргах зорилго юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид SF-ийн эффективны DNN архитектурыг дараагийн шинэ стратегийг тайлбарлаж байна: (1). Хувь өгүүлбэрийг DNN руу оруулахын оронд энгийн хамааралтай график аваад, query болон candidate filler хоорондын өргөн нөхцөл байдлыг шингээх болно. (2). Хоёр анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм бий болгож байна: орон нутгийн анхаарлын төвлөрүүлэгчээс сурсан анхаарлын төвлөрүүлэгч, гадаад мэдлэг суурь дээр сурсан дэлхийн анхаарлын төвлөрүүлэлт, загварыг слотын төрлийг тодорх Үүний туршилт нь хоёр холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байдал (F-score нэмэлт 16%) болон хувийн систем бүрт дүүргэх слотын шалгалтыг харуулж байна (F-score нэмэлт 8,5% хүртэл нэмэлт).', 'no': 'Slåtfilting (SF) måtar å pakka ut verdiane av nokre typar attributtar (eller plassar, som person:cities_of_residence) for eit gitt entitet frå eit stor samling av kjeldedokument. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit effektivt DNN-arkitektur for SF med desse nye strategiene: (1). Ta eit regulert avhengighetsgraf i staden for ei råsetning som inndata til DNN, for å komprimera breidde kontekstane mellom spørjinga og kandidatfyller. (2). Inkorporar to oppmerksmekanisme: lokal oppmerksomhet lært frå spørjing og kandidatfyller, og globalt oppmerksomhet lært frå eksterne kunnskapsbaser, for å hjelpa modellen til å bestemme indikative kontekstar for å bestemme slotttype. Eksperimentar viser at dette rammeverket utfører tilstanden til kunsten på både forandringar (16% absolutt fjerning av F- poeng) og valeringa av plass for kvar enkelt system (opp til 8,5% absolutt fjerning av F- poeng).', 'mt': 'Slot Filling (SF) aims to extract the values of certain types of attributes (or slots, such as person:cities_of_residence) for a given entity from a large collection of source documents.  F’dan id-dokument nipproponu arkitettura effettiva tad-DNN għall-SF bl-istrateġiji l-ġodda li ġejjin: (1). Ħu graff tad-dipendenza regolat minflok sentenza mhux ipproċessata bħala input għad-DNN, biex tikkompressa l-kuntesti wiesgħa bejn il-mistoqsija u l-filler kandidat; (2). Tinkorpora żewġ mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni: l-attenzjoni lokali li titgħallem mill-mistoqsija u l-kandidat li jimla, u l-attenzjoni globali li titgħallem mill-bażijiet esterni tal-għarfien, biex tiggwida l-mudell biex jagħżel aħjar kuntesti indikattivi biex jiġi ddeterminat it-tip ta’ slot. L-esperimenti juru li dan il-qafas huwa l-aktar avvanzat kemm fl-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni (żieda assoluta fil-punteġġ F ta’ 16%) kif ukoll fil-validazzjoni tal-mili tas-slots għal kull sistema individwali (żieda assoluta fil-punteġġ F ta’ 8.5%).', 'ro': 'Slot Filling (SF) are ca scop extragerea valorilor anumitor tipuri de atribute (sau sloturi, cum ar fi person:cities_of_residence) pentru o anumită entitate dintr-o colecție mare de documente sursă. În această lucrare propunem o arhitectură DNN eficientă pentru SF cu următoarele strategii noi: (1). Luați un grafic de dependență regularizat în loc de o propoziție brută ca intrare în DNN, pentru a comprima contextele largi dintre interogare și filler candidat; (2).  Încorporează două mecanisme de atenție: atenția locală învățată de la interogarea și completarea candidatului și atenția globală învățată de la bazele de cunoștințe externe, pentru a ghida modelul pentru a selecta mai bine contextele indicative pentru a determina tipul slot. Experimentele arată că acest cadru depășește performanțele de ultimă generație atât în ceea ce privește extragerea relațiilor (16% câștig absolut al scorului F), cât și validarea umplerii sloturilor pentru fiecare sistem individual (până la 8,5% câștig absolut al scorului F).', 'sr': 'Punjenje slota (SF) je cilj da izvuče vrijednosti određenih vrsta atributa (ili slota, poput osobe:cities_of_residence) za određenu entitetu iz velike kolekcije izvornih dokumenta. U ovom papiru predlažemo efikasnu arhitekturu DNN za SF sa sljedećim novim strategijama: (1). Uzmite regularizirani grafik zavisnosti umjesto sirovine rečenice kao ulaz u DNN, kako bi kompresirali široke kontekste između ispitivanja i ispunjavanja kandidata; (2). Uključujte dva mehanizma pažnje: lokalna pažnja naučena od ispitivanja i ispunjavanja kandidata, i globalna pažnja naučena od stranih baza znanja, da bi model vodio do boljeg izabranja indikativnih konteksta za određivanje tipa slota. Eksperimenti pokazuju da ovaj okvir nadmašuje state-of-the-art na izvlačenju odnosa (16% absolutnog dobitka F-score) i validaciju slota ispunjavanja za svaki pojedinačni sistem (do 8,5% absolutnog dobitka F-score).', 'pl': 'Slot Filling (SF) ma na celu wyodrębnienie wartości określonych typów atrybutów (lub slotów, takich jak person:cities_of_residence) dla danego podmiotu z dużego zbioru dokumentów źródłowych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy efektywną architekturę DNN dla SF z następującymi nowymi strategiami: (1). Weź regularyzowany wykres zależności zamiast surowego zdania jako wejście do DNN, aby skompresować szerokie konteksty między zapytaniem a wypełniaczem kandydatów; (2).  Włącz dwa mechanizmy uwagi: lokalną uwagę uczoną z zapytania i wypełniacza kandydatów oraz globalną uwagę uczoną z zewnętrznych baz wiedzy, aby poprowadzić model do lepszego wyboru orientacyjnych kontekstów w celu określenia typu slotu. Eksperymenty pokazują, że framework ten przewyższa najnowocześniejszy zarówno w zakresie ekstrakcji relacji (16% bezwzględnego zysku F-score), jak i walidacji wypełniania slotów dla każdego systemu (do 8,5% bezwzględnego zysku F-score).', 'sv': 'Slot Filling (SF) syftar till att extrahera värdena för vissa typer av attribut (eller slots, till exempel person:cities_of_residence) för en given enhet från en stor samling källdokument. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en effektiv DNN-arkitektur för SF med följande nya strategier: (1). Ta en regelbunden beroendegraf istället för en obehandlad mening som inmatning till DNN, för att komprimera de breda kontexterna mellan fråga och kandidatfyllning; (2).  Inkludera två uppmärksamhetsmekanismer: lokal uppmärksamhet som lärts från fråge- och kandidatfyllare, och global uppmärksamhet som lärts från externa kunskapsbaser, för att vägleda modellen för att bättre välja vägledande kontexter för att bestämma korttyp. Experiment visar att detta ramverk överträffar state-of-the-art på både relationsextraktion (16% absolut F-score gain) och slot fyllning validering för varje enskilt system (upp till 8,5% absolut F-score gain).', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பொருளின் பெரிய மூல ஆவணங்களிலிருந்து கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சில குணங்களின் மதிப்பு இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பின்வரும் புதிய துறைகளுடன் SF க்கான ஒரு விருப்பமான DNN கட்டுப்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்க கேள்வி மற்றும் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பான் கோப்பு மற்றும் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் முறையில் உள்ளீட்டிற்கு பதிலாக ஒரு சிறிதாக்கப்பட்ட (2). இரண்டு கவனம் முறைமைகளை சேர்க்கவும்: கேள்வி மற்றும் சார்ந்திருப்பவரிடமிருந்து உள்ள கவனத்தை கற்றுக் கொண்டது, மற்றும் வெளி அறிவு அடிப்படைகளிலிருந்து  சோதனை', 'ur': 'Slot Filling (SF) کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ایک بڑے سراسر دکھانے کے لکھنے کے لئے ایک واحد کے لئے (یا اسلوٹ کے مطابق شخص:cities_of_residence) مقرر کیے جاتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے SF کے لئے ایک اثرات DNN معماری پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ نیچے نئی استراتژی کے ساتھ: (1). سؤال اور کڈینڈیٹ فیلر کے درمیان وسیع کنٹکسٹس کو کمپٹ کرنے کے لئے ایک قابل تعلق کے بغیر رئو ویز کے گراف کو لے لو۔ (2). دو متوجہ مکانیزوں میں شامل کریں: سؤرٹ اور کڈینڈیٹ پر سے سیکھا گیا ہے، اور بیرونی علم بنسس سے سیکھا گیا ہے، موڈل کو اچھی طرح سیکھانے کے لئے سیکھا گیا ہے کہ اسلوٹ ٹائپ کا مقرر کرنے کے لئے سیکھا گیا ہے. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ فرمود ہر فرمود سیسٹم کے لئے پورا پورا کرتا ہے (8.5% مطلق F-score gain پر) دونوں ارتباط کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'so': "Dhaqaalaha aad buuxiso (SF) waxaa loola jeedaa in ay ka soo bixiso qiimaha noocyada cayiman (ama saqafka qalabka, tusaale ahaan qof:magaalooyin_degenaanshaha) oo laga soo ururiyo dukumentiyada noocyada badan. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa dhismo faa’iido leh oo DNN ah oo SF ku qoran qoraal cusub: (1). Qaad xaraf ku saabsan oo ku qoran qoraalka ku saabsan, taasoo aan ka bedelan qoraal fudud oo u qoran DNN, si aad u saxariiro qoraal ballan ah oo u dhexaysa qoraalka iyo filaylka kandida ah; (2). Isboorti labada meymisyo oo aad u fiiriso: booqashada deegaanka ayaa laga bartay wargelinta iyo fililayaasha kandida ah, isla markaasna waxaa laga bartay warqada aqoonta ee dibadda ah, si uu u hago modelka si ay u doorato qaababka muusikada si ay u ogaato nooca sawirro. Imtixaanka waxay muuqataa in jardiinadu ay ka muuqato xaalad-farshaxan oo ku saabsan soo bixinta labada xiriir (16% absolute faa'iido F-score) iyo sidoo kale uu buuxiyo xaqiiqnimo oo buuxiya nidaam kasta (ugu badnaan 8.5% oo absolute F-score faa'iido).", 'si': 'Slot Full (SF) ලක්ෂණය යුද්ධයෙන් විශේෂතාවන් වර්ගය (නැත්තම් ස්ලෝට්, වගේම මිනිස්සු:City_of_resize) ලොකු සංග්රහනයේ ලොකු සංග්රහනයෙන මේ පත්තරේ අපි SF වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත DNN ස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා පස්සේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්ණාපනය ස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුළත් වාක්ය DNN වලට ඇතුළත් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් ගන්න, ප්\u200dර (2). ස්ථානික අවධානය දෙකක් අවධානය කරන්න: ස්ථානික අවධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ස්ථානික අවධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ පරීක්ෂණය ස්ථානය-of-the-art දෙන්නම් සම්බන්ධතාව (16% නිශ්පූර්ණ F-score ගන්න) සහ හ හැම ප්\u200dරතිකාර පද්ධතිය සඳහා ස්ලෝට්', 'vi': 'Bộ giáp Slot (SF) nhằm lấy ra giá trị của một số loại thuộc tính (hay các khe hở, như là người:các thành phố). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cấu trúc DNS hiệu quả cho SF với các chiến lược mới sau đây: Lấy một đồ thị phụ thuộc theo quy định thay vì một câu thô để nhập cho DNS, để nén các hoàn cảnh rộng rãi giữa câu hỏi và ứng viên filter; (2) Có hai cơ chế chú ý: chú ý địa phương học từ câu hỏi và ứng viên filter, và chú ý to àn cầu được học từ các căn cứ kiến thức bên ngoài, để hướng dẫn mô hình cho việc chọn ngữ cảnh đáng chú ý hơn để xác định kiểu thời gian rảnh. Các thử nghiệm cho thấy khung này hoàn thiện trạng thái cao nhất về cả hai giải thoát tương quan (16=.=) lợi tuyệt đối F-score) và giải mã lấp suất suất suất cho mỗi hệ thống cá nhân (tới 8.5=) lợi nhuận tuyệt đối của F-score).', 'uz': 'Koʻrsatilgan rasm Bu hujjatda biz SF uchun tashkilotli DNN struktureni quyidagi yangi strategiyalar bilan talab qilamiz: (1). Name (2). Name Name', 'bg': 'Попълването на слотове (СФ) има за цел да извлече стойностите на определени видове атрибути (или слотове, като например лице:градове_на_пребиваване) за дадено предприятие от голяма колекция от изходни документи. В настоящата статия предлагаме ефективна архитектура на ДНН за СФ със следните нови стратегии: (1). Вземете регулируема графика на зависимост вместо сурово изречение като вход към за компресиране на широките контексти между заявката и кандидата за пълнене; (2).  Включете два механизма за внимание: местно внимание, научено от заявка и кандидат пълнител, и глобално внимание, научено от външни бази знания, за да насочите модела за по-добър избор на индикативни контексти за определяне на типа слот. Експериментите показват, че тази рамка превъзхожда най-съвременните резултати както при извличане на релации (16% абсолютна печалба от F-score), така и при валидиране на запълване на слотове за всяка отделна система (до 8,5% абсолютна печалба от F-score).', 'da': 'Slot Filling (SF) har til formål at udtrække værdierne af visse typer attributter (eller slots, såsom person:cities_of_residence) for en given enhed fra en stor samling af kildedokumenter. I denne artikel foreslår vi en effektiv DNN arkitektur for SF med følgende nye strategier: (1). Tag en reguleret afhængighedsgraf i stedet for en rå sætning som input til DNN, for at komprimere de brede sammenhænge mellem forespørgsel og kandidatfyld; (2).  Indbygge to opmærksomhedsmekanismer: lokal opmærksomhed lært fra forespørgsels- og kandidatfyldstof og global opmærksomhed lært fra eksterne videnbaser, for at vejlede modellen til bedre at vælge vejledende sammenhænge for at bestemme slot type. Eksperimenter viser, at denne ramme overgår state-of-the-art på både relation ekstraktion (16% absolut F-score gevinst) og slot fyldning validering for hvert enkelt system (op til 8,5% absolut F-score gevinst).', 'nl': 'Slot Filling (SF) is bedoeld om de waarden van bepaalde typen attributen (of slots, zoals person:cities_of_residence) voor een bepaalde entiteit te extraheren uit een grote verzameling brondocumenten. In dit artikel stellen we een effectieve DNN architectuur voor SF voor met de volgende nieuwe strategieën: (1). Neem een geregulariseerde afhankelijkheidsgrafiek in plaats van een ruwe zin als invoer voor DNN, om de brede contexten tussen query en kandidaat filler te comprimeren; (2).  Neem twee aandachtsmechanismen op: lokale aandacht geleerd van query en kandidaat filler, en globale aandacht geleerd van externe kennisdatabases, om het model te begeleiden om indicatieve contexten beter te selecteren om het type slot te bepalen. Experimenten tonen aan dat dit framework de state-of-the-art overtreft op zowel relatieontwikkeling (16% absolute F-score gain) als slotvulling validatie voor elk afzonderlijk systeem (tot 8,5% absolute F-score gain).', 'hr': 'Zapunjenje slota (SF) cilja je izvući vrijednosti određenih vrsta atributa (ili slota, poput osobe:cities_of_residence) za određenu entitetu iz velike kolekcije izvornih dokumenta. U ovom papiru predlažemo učinkovitu arhitekturu DNN za SF s sljedećim novim strategijama: (1). Uzmite regularizirani grafik ovisnosti umjesto sirovine rečenice kao ulaz u DNN, kako bi kompresirali široke kontekste između ispitivanja i ispunjavača kandidata; (2). Uključiti dva mehanizma pažnje: lokalna pažnja naučena od ispitivanja i ispunjavanja kandidata i globalna pažnja naučena iz vanjskih znanja baza, kako bi modela vodila do boljeg izabranja indikativnih konteksta za određivanje vrsta slota. Eksperimenti pokazuju da ovaj okvir iznosi stanje umjetnosti na izvlačenju odnosa (16% dobit absolutnog F-rezultata) i validaciju slota ispunjavanja za svaki pojedinačni sustav (do 8,5% dobit absolutnog F-rezultata).', 'id': 'Penisi Slot (SF) bermaksud mengekstrak nilai dari tipe tertentu atribut (atau slots, seperti person:cities_of_residence) untuk entitas tertentu dari koleksi besar dokumen sumber. Dalam kertas ini kami mengusulkan arsitektur DNN yang efektif untuk SF dengan strategi baru berikut: (1). Ambil grafik ketergantuan terregularisasi bukannya kalimat raw sebagai input ke DNN, untuk mengkompresi konteks lebar antara pertanyaan dan penuhi kandidat; (2). Memasukkan dua mekanisme perhatian: perhatian lokal belajar dari pertanyaan dan penuhi kandidat, dan perhatian global belajar dari dasar pengetahuan luar, untuk memimpin model untuk memilih konteks indikasif lebih baik untuk menentukan tipe slot. Experiments show that this framework outperforms state-of-the-art on both relation extraction (16% absolute F-score gain) and slot filling validation for each individual system (up to 8.5% absolute F-score gain).', 'de': 'Slot Filling (SF) zielt darauf ab, die Werte bestimmter Arten von Attributen (oder Slots, wie person:cities_of_residence) für eine bestimmte Entität aus einer großen Sammlung von Quelldokumenten zu extrahieren. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine effektive DNN-Architektur für SF mit folgenden neuen Strategien vor: (1). Nehmen Sie einen regularisierten Abhängigkeitsdiagramm anstelle eines rohen Satzes als Eingabe für DNN, um die weiten Zusammenhänge zwischen Abfrage und Kandidatenfüller zu komprimieren; (2).  Integrieren Sie zwei Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen: lokale Aufmerksamkeit, die von Abfragen und Kandidatenfüllern gelernt wird, und globale Aufmerksamkeit, die von externen Wissensbanken gelernt wird, um das Modell zu leiten, indikative Kontexte besser auszuwählen, um den Slot-Typ zu bestimmen. Experimente zeigen, dass dieses Framework sowohl bei der Beziehungsextraktion (16% absoluter F-Score-Gewinn) als auch bei der Validierung der Slot-Füllung für jedes einzelne System (bis zu 8,5% absoluter F-Score-Gewinn) den Stand der Technik übertrifft.', 'fa': 'پر کردن (SF) نقطه\u200cای را هدف می\u200cدهد که ارزش\u200cهای گونه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها (یا نقطه\u200cها، مثل شخص:cities_of_residence) برای یک واحد داده از یک مجموعه\u200cی بزرگ سند منبع خارج شود. در این کاغذ ما یک معماری DNN موثر برای SF پیشنهاد می کنیم با استراتژی های جدید بعدی: (۱). یک گراف بستگی معمولی را به جای یک جمله خاکستری به عنوان ورودی به DNN بردارید تا محتویات گسترده بین پرسیدن و پر کاندیداتی را فشار دهید. (۲). دو مکانیسم توجه را جمع کنید: توجه محلی از پرسیدن و پر کردن کاندیدات یاد گرفته شده و توجه جهانی از پایگاه دانش خارجی یاد گرفته شده است تا مدل را هدایت کند تا بهتر محیط نشان دهنده را انتخاب کند تا نوع slot را تعیین کند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که این چهارچوب در مورد استخراج دو رابطه\u200cای (۱۶ درصد بهره\u200cی ثبت\u200cهای کامل F) و ثابت\u200cکننده\u200cی ثابت\u200cکننده\u200cی نقطه\u200cای برای هر سیستم شخصی انجام می\u200cدهد (تا ۸.۵ درصد بهره\u200cی ثبت\u200cهای کامل F).', 'ko': '틈새 채우기(SF)는 대량의 원본 문서에서 주어진 실체의 특정한 유형 속성(예를 들어person:cities of residence)의 값을 추출하는 데 목적을 둔다.본고에서 우리는 SF에 대한 효과적인 DNN 체계 구조를 제시했고 다음과 같은 새로운 전략을 채택했다. (1).원본 문장을 정규화된 의존도로 대체하여 DNN의 입력으로 하고 조회와 후보 충전어 간의 광범위한 상하문을 압축한다.(2). 두 가지 주의 메커니즘을 결합시킨다. 조회와 후보 충전에서 배운 부분적인 주의, 그리고 외부 지식 라이브러리에서 배운 전체적인 주의를 결합시켜 지도 모델이 지시적인 상하문을 더욱 잘 선택하여 틈새 유형을 확정한다.실험에 따르면 이 프레임워크는 관계 추출(16%의 절대 F 점수 이득)과 각 시스템의 슬롯 충전 검증(8.5%의 절대 F 점수 이득)에서 최신 기술보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sq': 'Përmbushja e Slot (SF) synon të nxjerrë vlerat e disa llojeve të atributeve (ose slots, të tilla si person:cities_of_residence) për një njësi të caktuar nga një koleksion i madh dokumentesh burimi. In this paper we propose an effective DNN architecture for SF with the following new strategies: (1).  Merr një grafik të rregulluar të varësisë në vend të një fjalimi të papërpunuar si hyrje në DNN, për të kompresuar kontekstet e gjera midis pyetjes dhe mbushjes së kandidatëve; (2). Përfshin dy mekanizma vëmendjeje: vëmendje lokale e mësuar nga pyetja dhe mbushja e kandidatëve dhe vëmendje globale e mësuar nga bazat e jashtme të njohurive, për të udhëzuar modelin për të zgjedhur më mirë kontekstet tregues për të përcaktuar llojin e slot. Eksperimentet tregojnë se ky kuadër ekziston më së miri në nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve (16% fitim absolut i rezultatit F) dhe validacionin e mbushjes së slots për çdo sistem individual ë (deri në 8.5% fitim absolut i rezultatit F).', 'sw': 'Jalala la kura (SF) linalenga kuondoa thamani za aina fulani (au mistari, kama vile mtu:cities_of_residence) kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko mkubwa wa nyaraka za vyanzo. Katika gazeti hili tunapendekeza ujenzi wenye ufanisi wa DNN kwa ajili ya SF na mbinu mpya ifuatayo: (1). Chukua picha ya kudhibitiwa ya kutegemea badala ya hukumu mbaya kama inavyoingizwa kwa DNN, ili kuendesha michango makubwa kati ya utafiti na filamu wa mgombea; (2). Unaweza kuunganisha mfumo miwili wa ufuatiliaji: mtazamo wa ndani ulijifunza kutokana na utafiti na filamu wa mgombea, na usikilizaji wa kimataifa ulifunza kutoka kwenye misingi ya maarifa ya nje, kuongoza mifano bora ya kuchagua miradi ya kuonyesha mijadala ya kuamua aina ya slot. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mifumo hii inaonyesha hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa mahusiano yote (asilimia 16% yenye faida ya F-score) na bango linalojaza uhakika kwa kila mfumo (hadi asilimia 8.5% yenye faida ya F-score).', 'tr': "Slot Filling (SF) bir görnöş senediň ululyk bilelikden berilen bir zadyň (ýada ýerler ýaly adam:cities_of_residence) üçin belli hilli häsiýetlerini a çmak amalydy. Bu kagyzda SF üçin täsirli bir DNN arhitektegi teklip edip görýäris: Hat sözlerini DNN'e girdirmek üçin düzenli baglanylyk grafisini al, soragy we kandidat doldurmacy arasynda döwletleri sykmak üçin; (2). Iki üns meýdançasyny dahyl et: ýerli üns soragy we candidat doldurucından öwrenmeli we dünýädäki üns daşaryk bilgi tabanlardan öwrenmeli, nusgasyny slot tipini takyklamak üçin gowy görkezmek üçin görkez. Testler bu framlaýyň durumyny iki baglaýyşyň çykarmasynda (16% absolut F-score gazanmasynda) we her sistem üçin slot doldurulýandygyny görkezýär (8,5% Absolut F-score gazanmasynda).", 'af': "Slot Filling (SF) doel doen om die waardes van sekere tipes eienskappe (of slots, soos persoon:cities_of_residence) uit te pak vir 'n gegewe entiteit uit' n groot versameling van bron dokumente. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n effektief DNN arkitektuur vir SF met die volgende nuwe strategies: (1). Neem 'n regulariseerde afhanklikheidsgraf in plaas van 'n raai seting as invoer na DNN, om die wyde konteks tussen navraag en kandidatievuller te komprimeer; (2). Inkorporeer twee aanmerking mekanisme: plaaslike aanmerking leer van navraag en kandidatievuller, en globaal aanmerking leer van eksterne kennisbasis, om die model te lei na beter indikatiewe konteks te kies om slot tipe te bepaal. Eksperimente vertoon dat hierdie raamwerk uitvoer status-of-the-art op beide verwanting uitvoer (16% absolute F- score gain) en slot opvul geldigheid vir elke individuele stelsel (tot 8.5% absolute F- score gain).", 'am': 'undo-type In this paper we propose an effective DNN architecture for SF with the following new strategies: (1).  በጥያቄ እና በአዳራጆች መካከል ሰፊውን ግንኙነት ለመጨመር ክፍል እንደሚገባ ወደ DNN ይምረጡ። (2) ሁለትን የጥያቄ ምርጫዎች ማሳየት: የግቢያ ተጠቃሚዎች ከጭራሽ እና የአካባቢ ስህተት መማር እና የውጭ እውቀት መቀመጫዎች ተማርተዋል፤ ሞዴላውን ለመምረጥ ጥያቄዎችን ለመምረጥ የግንኙነት ጉዳይ ዓይነት ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ ፈተናዎች ይህ ፍሬማር የ-የ-አርእስትን በሁለቱም ግንኙነት ላይ የሚያሳድግ (16% absolute F-score ጥቅም) እና ስክሮት ለሁሉም ስርዓት ማድረግ እንዲሞላ ነው (እስከ 8.5% absolute F-score ጥቅም)', 'hy': 'Առևտրի լրացումը (SF) նպատակն է հանել որոշ տիպի առանձնահատկությունների (կամ արևտրերի, ինչպիսիք են մարդ:Citys_of_Home) արժեքները որոշ անհատականությունների համար աղբյուր փաստաթղթերի մեծ հավաքածուց: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ԴՆԹ-ի արդյունավետ ճարտարապետություն ՍՖ-ի համար, որն ունի հետևյալ նոր ստրատեգիաներ: (1). Վերցրեք ընդհանուր կախվածության գրաֆիկը, որպես ներմուծք ԴՆԹ-ի մեջ, որպեսզի ճնշում եք հարցի և թեկնածու լրացման լայն կոնտեքստները: (2). Incorporate two attention mechanisms: local attention learned from query and candidate filler, and global attention learned from external knowledge bases, to guide the model to better select indicative contexts to determine slot type.  Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս շրջանակը գերազանցում է հարաբերությունների վերացման (16 տոկոսի բացարձակ F-գնահատականի շահույթ) և անհատական համակարգի ժամանակահատականների լրացման հավասարումը (մինչև 8,5 տոկոսի բացարձակ F-գնահատականի շա', 'az': 'Slot Filling (SF) müəyyən edir ki, böyük mənbə dökümələrindən verilən məsələlər üçün bəzi növlərin (ya da slot, kişilər:cities_of_residence) qiymətlərini çıxartmaq istəyir. Bu kağızda SF üçün effektiv DNN arhitektüsü təbliğ edirik: 1. Qısqa cümlənin DNN girişi yerinə düzgün müvəffəqiyyət grafisini alın, soruşma və kandidat doldurucu arasındakı geniş müxtəlifləri sıkıştırmaq üçün; (2). İki məlumat mehanizmilərini inkorporat edin: məlumat seçmək üçün səhifələri seçmək üçün yerli məlumat soruşmaqdan öyrənmiş və kandidát doldurmaqdan öyrənmişdir, və qlobal məlumat daxilindən öyrənmişdir. Həqiqətən, təcrübələr hər birinin sistemi üçün bu frameworkin hər ikisinin əlaqəsi çəkilməsində (16% absolut F-score kazanlığı) və slot dolduracağını göstərər (8,5% absolut F-score kazanlığı qədər).', 'bn': 'স্লোট ফিল্ট (এসএফ) এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে কিছু ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মান (অথবা স্লোট, যেমন ব্যক্তি: শহর_অব_বাস্থান) একটি বিশাল উৎস নথি সংগ্রহের জন্য। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এসএফের জন্য কার্যকর ডিএনএন কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করছি নিম্নলিখিত নতুন কৌশলের সাথে: (১)। অনুসন্ধান এবং প্রার্থী ফোল্ডারের মধ্যে বিস্তৃত প্রতিযোগিতা সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য ডিএনএন-এর পরিবর্তে একটি নিয়মিত নির্ভরিত গ্রাফ গ্ (২) দুই মনোযোগ ব্যবস্থাকে অন্তর্ভুক্ত করুন: অনুসন্ধান এবং প্রার্থী ফোল্ডার থেকে স্থানীয় মনোযোগ শিখেছেন এবং বাইরের জ্ঞানের বেস থেকে বিশ্বের মনোযোগ পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এই ফ্রেমের স্টেট-শিল্প উভয় সম্পর্ক বের করার (১৬% সম্পূর্ণ F- স্কোর লাভ) এবং প্রত্যেক ব্যক্তিগত সিস্টেমের জন্য স্লোট বৈধ বৈধ', 'cs': 'Slot Filling (SF) má za cíl extrahovat hodnoty určitých typů atributů (nebo slotů, jako je person:cities_of_residence) pro danou entitu z velké sbírky zdrojových dokumentů. V tomto článku navrhujeme efektivní architekturu DNN pro SF s následujícími novými strategiemi: (1). Vezměte regularizovaný graf závislosti namísto surové věty jako vstup do DNN, abyste komprimovali široké kontexty mezi dotazem a kandidátským vyplňovačem; (2).  Začleňte dva mechanismy pozornosti: lokální pozornost získaná z dotazů a kandidátů a globální pozornost získaná z externích znalostních bází, aby model lépe vybral orientační kontexty pro určení typu slotu. Experimenty ukazují, že tento framework překonává nejmodernější stav jak extrakce vztahů (16% absolutní zisk F-skóre) tak validaci výplně slotů pro každý jednotlivý systém (až 8,5% absolutní zisk F-skóre).', 'bs': 'Punjenje slota (SF) cilja je izvući vrijednosti određenih vrsta atributa (ili slota, poput osobe:cities_of_residence) za određenu entitetu iz velike kolekcije izvornih dokumenta. U ovom papiru predlažemo efikasnu arhitekturu DNN za SF sa sljedećim novim strategijama: (1). Uzmite regularizirani grafik zavisnosti umjesto sirovine rečenice kao ulaz u DNN, kako bi kompresirali široke kontekste između ispitivanja i ispunjavanja kandidata; (2). Uključujte dva mehanizma pažnje: lokalna pažnja naučena od ispitivanja i ispunjavanja kandidata, i globalna pažnja naučena iz vanjskih baza znanja, kako bi model vodio do boljeg izabranja indikativnih konteksta za određivanje tipa slota. Eksperimenti pokazuju da ovaj okvir nadmašuje state-of-the-art na izvlačenju odnosa (16% absolutnog dobitka F-score) i validaciju slota ispunjavanja za svaki pojedinačni sistem (do 8,5% absolutnog dobitka F-score).', 'et': 'Slot Filling (SF) eesmärk on ekstraheerida teatud tüüpi atribuutide (või teenindusaegade, näiteks person:cities_of_residence) väärtused antud olemi suurest lähtedokumentide kogumist. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja tõhusa DNN arhitektuuri SF jaoks järgmiste uute strateegiatega: (1). Võtke DNN-i sisendina töötlemata lause asemel korrigeeritud sõltuvusgraafik, et tihendada päringu ja kandidaadi täiteaine laia konteksti; (2).  Sisaldada kaks tähelepanumehhanismi: päringu ja kandidaadi täitmise käigus õppitud kohalik tähelepanu ning välistest teadmistebaasidest õppitud globaalne tähelepanu, et suunata mudelit paremini valima soovitusliku konteksti pesa tüübi määramiseks. Katsed näitavad, et see raamistik ületab tehnika taseme nii seoste ekstraheerimisel (16% absoluutne F-skoori kasv) kui ka pesade täitmise valideerimisel iga süsteemi puhul (kuni 8,5% absoluutne F-skoori kasv).', 'ca': "El rellenç d'intervals (SF) té l'objectiu d'extrair els valors de certs tipus d'atributs (o intervals, com la person a:cities_of_residence) per a una entitat determinada d'una gran col·lecció de documents fonts. En aquest paper proposem una arquitectura efectiva del DNN per a la SF amb les següents noves estratègies: (1). Preneu un gràfic de dependencia regularitzat en lloc d'una frase bruta com entrada a DNN, per comprimir els contextos amplis entre la consulta i el llençador de candidats; (2). Incorporar dos mecanismes d'atenció: l'atenció local aprenent de la consulta i el candidat, i l'atenció global aprenent de les bases externes de coneixements, per guiar el model per seleccionar millor contextos indicatius per determinar el tipus de slot. Els experiments demostren que aquest marc és més avançat en l'extracció de relacions (guanya absoluta de puntuació F del 16%) i en la validació del rellenç de slots per cada sistema individual (guanya absoluta de puntuació F del 8,5%).", 'fi': 'Slot Filling (SF) pyrkii poimimaan tietyn kokonaisuuden tietyntyyppisten attribuuttien (tai lähtöpaikkojen, kuten henkilö:cities_of_residence) arvot suuresta lähdeasiakirjojen kokoelmasta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme tehokasta DNN-arkkitehtuuria SF:lle seuraavilla uusilla strategioilla: (1). Ota DNN:n syötteenä säännöstelty riippuvuuskaavio raakarauseen sijaan, jotta kyselyn ja ehdokastäytteen väliset laajat kontekstit voidaan tiivistää; (2).  Sisällytetään kaksi huomiomekanismia: kyselyn ja ehdokkaan täyttölaitteesta opittu paikallinen huomio ja ulkoisista tietokantoista opittu globaali huomio, jotta malli voi valita paremmin ohjeellisia konteksteja slotin tyypin määrittämiseksi. Kokeet osoittavat, että tämä viitekehys on huippuluokkaa sekä suhteessa uuttamisessa (16% absoluuttinen F-pisteen voitto) että slotin täyttö validoinnissa kussakin yksittäisessä järjestelmässä (jopa 8,5% absoluuttinen F-pisteen voitto).', 'jv': 'slot fill Nang pepulan iki kita supoyo architecture DNN efek kanggo RF iki dadi akèh basa sing dibujuhke.(1). Jejaring (2). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Wang', 'he': 'מילוי הפסקות (SF) מטרה לחלץ את ערכים של סוגים מסויימים של תכונות (או מפסקות, כמו person:cities_of_residence) עבור יחידה מסויימת מאסף גדול של מסמכי מקור. בעיתון הזה אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה יעילה של DNN עבור SF עם האסטרטגיות החדשות הבאות: (1). קחו גרף תלויות קבוע במקום משפט חום כתוצאה לדנ"א, כדי ללחוץ את הקשר הרחב בין השאלה למלא מועמד; (2). מכיל שני מנגנונים תשומת לב: תשומת לב מקומית למדת מבקש וממלא מועמדים, ותשומת לב גלובלית למדת מבסיסי ידע חיצוניים, כדי להדריך את הדוגמא לבחור טוב יותר תקשורות מדעיות כדי לקבוע סוג של מקום. ניסויים מראים שהמסגרת הזאת מובילה את המצב המיוחד ביותר בשני היחסים החילוץ (16% רווח מוחלט של נקודת F) ושל מילוי קופסאות עבור כל מערכת פרטית (עד 8.5% רווח מוחלט של נקודת F).', 'sk': 'Namen polnjenja slotov (SF) je izvleči vrednosti določenih vrst atributov (ali slotov, kot je oseba:mesta_rezidence) za določeno entiteto iz velike zbirke izvornih dokumentov. V prispevku predlagamo učinkovito arhitekturo DNN za SF z naslednjimi novimi strategijami: (1). Vzemite urejeni graf odvisnosti namesto surovega stavka kot vnos v DNN, da stisnete široke kontekste med poizvedbo in kandidatnim polnilom; (2).  Vključite dva mehanizma pozornosti: lokalno pozornost, pridobljeno iz poizvedbe in polnilnika kandidatov, ter globalno pozornost, pridobljeno iz zunanjih baz znanja, da usmerite model za boljšo izbiro okvirnih kontekstov za določitev vrste reže. Eksperimenti kažejo, da je ta okvir boljši od najsodobnejših pri ekstrakciji relacij (16% absolutnega dobička F-score) in validaciji polnjenja rež za vsak posamezni sistem (do 8,5% absolutnega dobička F-score).', 'ha': "@ action: button Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyade wani matsayi mai inganci na DNN wa SF da wasu takwai na daban: (1). Ka ɗau graphi da aka ƙayyade ɗabi'a, don ka sami magana mai raw kamar an shigar da DNN, don ka samu duran aiki tsakanin tambayar da filin mai goyi; (2). Yi haɗi shiryoyin labarai: muhalli na lokaci wanda aka sanar daga canza tambayar da filin mai goyi, kuma masu amfani da mazaɓa ya sanar da shi daga salon maɓallin ilmi na ƙarƙashin, don ya shiryar da shirin ayuka don ya fi canza zaɓi matsayin alama don ya ƙayyade nau'in slot. Fijaroyi na nuna cewa wannan firam yana tafiyar da halin-sanar kan duk masu nuna danganta (mai amfani da amfani da kwamfyutan F-score) da kuma ana cika slot mai inganci wa kõwace na'ura (up to 8.5% da kima cikakken F-score).", 'bo': 'Slot Filling (SF)དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རིགས་ཀྱི་རིན་ཐང་དག་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པ འོག DNN ནང་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་སྐབས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ། (2) Incorporate two attention mechanisms: local attention learned from query and candidate filler, and global attention learned from external knowledge bases, to guide the model to better select indicative contexts to determine slot type. Experiments show that this framework outperforms state-of-the-art on both relation extraction (16% absolute F-score gain)and slot filling validation for each individual system (up to 8.5% absolute F-score gain).'}
{'en': 'Identifying Products in Online Cybercrime Marketplaces : A Dataset for Fine-grained Domain Adaptation', 'ar': 'تحديد المنتجات في أسواق الجرائم الإلكترونية عبر الإنترنت: مجموعة بيانات لتكييف المجال الدقيق', 'pt': 'Identificando produtos em mercados de crimes cibernéticos on-line: um conjunto de dados para adaptação de domínio refinada', 'fr': 'Identification des produits sur les marchés de la cybercriminalité en ligne\xa0: un ensemble de données pour une adaptation précise des domaines', 'es': 'Identificación de productos en los mercados de delitos cibernéticos en línea: un conjunto de datos para una adaptación detallada del dominio', 'ja': 'オンラインサイバー犯罪マーケットプレイスでの製品の特定：細かいドメインの適応のためのデータセット', 'zh': '识在线网络罪市物:施于细粒度域应之数集', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन साइबर अपराध मार्केटप्लेस में उत्पादों की पहचान: ठीक-ठाक डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए एक डेटासेट', 'ru': 'Выявление продуктов на онлайн-рынках киберпреступлений: набор данных для тонкой адаптации домена', 'ga': 'Táirgí a Aithint i Margaí Cibearchoireachta Ar Líne: Tacar Sonraí le haghaidh Oiriúnú Fearainn Mhion-ghráin', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός προϊόντων σε διαδικτυακές αγορές εγκλήματος στον κυβερνοχώρο: Ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την λεπτή προσαρμογή του τομέα', 'hu': 'Termékek azonosítása az online számítástechnikai bűnözési piacokon: adatkészlet a finomszemcsés domain adaptációhoz', 'it': "Identificare i prodotti nei mercati online della criminalità informatica: un set di dati per l'adattamento dei domini a grana fine", 'lt': 'Produktų identifikavimas internetinėse elektroninių nusikalstamų veikų rinkose: duomenų rinkinys, skirtas smulkių grūdų domeno pritaikymui', 'kk': 'Онлайн киберпрестік маркеттерінде таңдау продукттары: Домен адаптациясы үшін деректер бағдарламасы', 'mk': 'Идентификување на производите на онлајн пазарите на кибер криминал: Папка на податоци за адаптација на домените со фино жито', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Produk dalam Pasar Jenayah Sibernetik Online: Satu Peti Data untuk Penyesuaian Domain Terbenih', 'mn': 'Онлайн Цибер гэмт хэрэг маркеттплейс дээрх бүтээгдэхүүнүүдийг тодорхойлох: Сайн тарианы газрын адаптацийн өгөгдлийн сан', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni tal-Prodotti fis-Swieq Online taċ-Ċiberkriminalità: Sett ta’ Dejta għall-Adattament tad-Dominju b’Ħruġ Fin', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സൈബെര്\u200dക്രിമിനല്\u200d മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റുകളിലുള്ള പ്രൊട്ടെക്റ്റുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുക: ഫൈന്\u200d ഗ്രേഡ് ഡൊമെയിന', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av produktar i nettverkskriminalitet- markeringar: ein databaset for tilpassing av domene', 'ro': 'Identificarea produselor în piețele online ale criminalității cibernetice: un set de date pentru adaptarea domeniilor cu granulație fină', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja produktów na internetowych rynkach cyberprzestępczości: zestaw danych dla precyzyjnej adaptacji domen', 'sr': 'Identifikacija proizvoda u online kiberkriminalnom tržištu: Databanka za adaptaciju domena finog zrnca', 'si': 'අන්ලයින් සයිබර් අපරාධ මාර්ක්ට්ප්ලේස් වල ප්\u200dරදේශයක් පරිශ්නය කරනවා: හොඳ ක්\u200dරීන්ඩ් ඩොමේන් අනුමාණ', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga dhaqamaha internetka: A Dataset for Fine-grained Adaptation Domain', 'sv': 'Identifiera produkter på onlinemarknader för cyberbrottslighet: Ett dataset för finkornig domänanpassning', 'ta': 'இணைய சைப்பர் குறிப்பு விளையாடுகளில் உள்ள பொருள்களை அடையாளம் செய்', 'ur': 'اولاین سایر گناہ مارکیٹ پلیس میں پروڈیٹ شناسایی کرتا ہے: اچھی دانے ڈومین اڈپٹ', 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm các sản phẩm trên mạng ở thị trường tội phạm mạng: Bộ dữ liệu cho Thích nghi miền fine', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на продукти в онлайн пазари за киберпрестъпност: набор от данни за фина адаптация на домейните', 'nl': 'Identificeren van producten op online cybercriminaliteitsmarkten: een dataset voor fijngranige domeinaanpassing', 'da': 'Identificering af produkter på onlinemarkedspladser for cyberkriminalitet: Et datasæt til finkornet domænetilpasning', 'hr': 'Identifikacija proizvoda u internetskoj tržištu kiberkriminala: Datacija za prilagodbu domena s finom zrenom', 'id': 'Identifikasi Produk di Pasar Cybercrime Online: Sebuah Dataset untuk Adaptasi Domain Berbiji-Pucat', 'ko': '사이버 범죄 시장의 제품 식별: 세립도 영역에 적응하는 데이터 집합', 'fa': 'شناسایی محصولات در مارکتپلیس\u200cهای جرم سایبر آنلاین: یک داده\u200cبندی برای تغییرات دامنه\u200cهای خوب دانه', 'de': 'Identifizierung von Produkten auf Online-Märkten für Cyberkriminalität: Ein Datensatz für feingranulare Domain-Anpassung', 'tr': 'Çevrimiçi Cybercrime Marketplasları içinde üretler belirlenmek: Küçük damlar için bir veri', 'sw': 'Kutambua Matengeneo katika Masoko ya Makosa ya Mtandao ya Mtandao: Taarifa kwa ajili ya Adaptation ya Domain', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Identifying Products in Online Cybercrime Marketplaces: A Dataset for Fine-grained Domain Adaptation', 'hy': 'Identifying Products in Online Cybercrime Marketplaces: A Dataset for Fine-grained Domain Adaptation', 'az': 'Online Cybercrime Marketplaslar캼ndak캼 Produktlar캼 t톛sdiql톛yici: 캻yi-d톛n톛li Domain Adaptasyonu 칲칞칲n veril톛n', 'bn': 'অনলাইন সাইবার অপরাধ মার্কেটস্থানে প্রজেক্টগুলোকে পরিচিতি করা: ফাইন গ্রেফতার ডোমেইন আড্যাপ্টেশনের জন্য একটি', 'bs': 'Identifikacija proizvoda u online kiberkriminalnom tržištu: Databanka za adaptaciju domena finog zrnca', 'cs': 'Identifikace produktů na internetových trzích s kyberkriminalitou: sada dat pro jemnou adaptaci domén', 'ca': 'Identificar Productes in Online Cybercrime Markets: A Dataset for Fine-Grained Domain Adaptation', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'et': 'Toodete tuvastamine küberkuritegevuse veebipõhistes turgudes: andmekogum peenrahalise domeeni kohandamiseks', 'fi': 'Tuotteiden tunnistaminen verkkorikollisuuden markkinapaikoilla: tietojoukko hienojakoista verkkotunnusten mukauttamista varten', 'jv': 'ID', 'ha': 'Identifying Products in Online Cybercrime Marketplaces: A Dataset for Fine-grained Domain Adaptation', 'sk': 'Identifikacija izdelkov na spletnih trgih kibernetskega kriminala: nabor podatkov za natančno prilagajanje domen', 'he': 'מזהה מוצרים בשוק הפשע האינטרנט: קבוצת נתונים לטיפול בתחום מוגזם', 'bo': 'དྲ་བའི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚོགས་ཆས་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ། ཆད་པ་ལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཚང་སྒྲིག་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data. In this work, we study the task of identifying products being bought and sold in online cybercrime forums, which exhibits particularly challenging cross-domain effects. We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums. Each of these forums constitutes its own fine-grained domain in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime. We characterize these domain differences in the context of a learning-based system : supervised models see decreased accuracy when applied to new forums, and standard techniques for semi-supervised learning and domain adaptation have limited effectiveness on this data, which suggests the need to improve these techniques. We release a dataset of 1,938 annotated posts from across the four forums.', 'es': 'Una debilidad de los modelos de PNL de aprendizaje automático es que, por lo general, tienen un rendimiento deficiente en los datos fuera del dominio. En este trabajo, estudiamos la tarea de identificar los productos que se compran y venden en foros de ciberdelincuencia en línea, lo que presenta efectos cruzados particularmente desafiantes. Formulamos una tarea que representa un híbrido de extracción de información de llenado de espacios y reconocimiento de entidades nombradas y anotamos datos de cuatro foros diferentes. Cada uno de estos foros constituye su propio «dominio detallado» en el sentido de que los foros cubren diferentes sectores del mercado con diferentes propiedades, a pesar de que todos los foros están en el amplio dominio de la ciberdelincuencia. Caracterizamos estas diferencias de dominio en el contexto de un sistema basado en el aprendizaje: los modelos supervisados ven una precisión menor cuando se aplican a nuevos foros, y las técnicas estándar para el aprendizaje semisupervisado y la adaptación de dominios tienen una eficacia limitada en estos datos, lo que sugiere la necesidad de mejorarlos técnicas. Publicamos un conjunto de datos de 1.938 publicaciones comentadas de los cuatro foros.', 'ar': 'تتمثل إحدى نقاط الضعف في نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التي يتم تعلمها آليًا في أنها عادةً ما تعمل بشكل سيئ على البيانات خارج المجال. في هذا العمل ، ندرس مهمة تحديد المنتجات التي يتم شراؤها وبيعها في منتديات الجرائم الإلكترونية عبر الإنترنت ، والتي تعرض تأثيرات عبر المجالات صعبة بشكل خاص. نقوم بصياغة مهمة تمثل مزيجًا من استخراج معلومات ملء الفتحات والتعرف على الكيانات المسماة وشرح البيانات من أربعة منتديات مختلفة. يشكل كل من هذه المنتديات "المجال الدقيق" الخاص به حيث تغطي المنتديات قطاعات مختلفة من السوق بخصائص مختلفة ، على الرغم من أن جميع المنتديات تقع في المجال الواسع للجرائم الإلكترونية. نحن نصنف اختلافات المجال هذه في سياق نظام قائم على التعلم: النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف ترى الدقة المنخفضة عند تطبيقها على المنتديات الجديدة ، والتقنيات القياسية للتعلم شبه الخاضع للإشراف والتكيف مع المجال لها فعالية محدودة على هذه البيانات ، مما يشير إلى الحاجة إلى تحسين هذه التقنيات. أصدرنا مجموعة بيانات من 1938 منشورًا مشروحًا عبر المنتديات الأربعة.', 'fr': "L'une des faiblesses des modèles de NLP appris par machine est qu'ils fonctionnent généralement mal sur les données hors domaine. Dans ce travail, nous étudions la tâche consistant à identifier les produits achetés et vendus sur les forums de cybercriminalité en ligne, ce qui présente des effets interdomaines particulièrement difficiles. Nous formulons une tâche qui représente un hybride d'extraction d'informations de remplissage d'emplacements et de reconnaissance d'entités nommées et annotons des données provenant de quatre forums différents. Chacun de ces forums constitue son propre «\xa0domaine précis\xa0» en ce sens qu'ils couvrent différents secteurs de marché avec des propriétés différentes, même si tous les forums relèvent du vaste domaine de la cybercriminalité. Nous caractérisons ces différences de domaine dans le contexte d'un système basé sur l'apprentissage\xa0: les modèles supervisés constatent une baisse de précision lorsqu'ils sont appliqués à de nouveaux forums, et les techniques standard pour l'apprentissage semi-supervisé et l'adaptation de domaines ont une efficacité limitée sur ces données, ce qui suggère la nécessité d'améliorer ces techniques. Nous publions un ensemble de données de 1 938 publications annotées provenant des quatre forums.", 'pt': 'Um ponto fraco dos modelos de PNL aprendidos por máquina é que eles normalmente têm um desempenho ruim em dados fora do domínio. Neste trabalho, estudamos a tarefa de identificar produtos que estão sendo comprados e vendidos em fóruns online de crimes cibernéticos, que exibem efeitos entre domínios particularmente desafiadores. Formulamos uma tarefa que representa um híbrido de extração de informações de preenchimento de slots e reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas e anotamos dados de quatro fóruns diferentes. Cada um desses fóruns constitui seu próprio “domínio refinado”, pois os fóruns cobrem diferentes setores de mercado com propriedades diferentes, embora todos os fóruns estejam no amplo domínio do cibercrime. Caracterizamos essas diferenças de domínio no contexto de um sistema baseado em aprendizado: modelos supervisionados apresentam menor precisão quando aplicados a novos fóruns, e técnicas padrão para aprendizado semi-supervisionado e adaptação de domínio têm eficácia limitada nesses dados, o que sugere a necessidade de melhorar essas técnicas. Lançamos um conjunto de dados de 1.938 postagens anotadas de todos os quatro fóruns.', 'ja': '機械学習NLPモデルの弱点の1つは、通常、ドメイン外データではパフォーマンスが低いことです。 本作では、特に厳しいクロスドメイン効果を示すオンラインサイバー犯罪フォーラムで売買されている製品を特定する作業を研究しています。 私たちは、スロット充填情報抽出と名前付きエンティティ認識のハイブリッドを表すタスクを策定し、4つの異なるフォーラムからのデータに注釈を付けます。 これらの各フォーラムは、すべてのフォーラムがサイバー犯罪の広範な領域にあるにもかかわらず、さまざまな特性を持つさまざまな市場セクターをカバーするという点で、独自の「細かいドメイン」を構成しています。 私たちは、学習ベースのシステムの文脈でこれらのドメインの違いを特徴づけています。監視されたモデルは、新しいフォーラムに適用されると精度が低下し、半監督学習とドメイン適応の標準的なテクニックは、このデータに対する有効性が限られているため、これらのテクニックを改善する必要があることを示唆しています。 4つのフォーラムで1,938件の注釈付き投稿のデータセットをリリースしています。', 'zh': '机器学NLP形之一弱,常在域外数不佳。 于此论知在线网络罪论坛货殖之任,论坛特有挑战性之跨域效也。 吾制一事,当为插槽填取、名实识混合体,注四论坛之数。 此论坛之所以为细粒度域者,论坛涵盖异性者也,虽论坛皆网络罪之域也。 表其域异:监于新论坛见准确性降,而半监于学域之有效性有限,明须改入也。 发数集,四论坛之1,938带注帖。', 'hi': 'मशीन-सीखे गए एनएलपी मॉडल की एक कमजोरी यह है कि वे आमतौर पर आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डेटा पर खराब प्रदर्शन करते हैं। इस काम में, हम ऑनलाइन साइबर अपराध मंचों में खरीदे और बेचे जाने वाले उत्पादों की पहचान करने के कार्य का अध्ययन करते हैं, जो विशेष रूप से चुनौतीपूर्ण क्रॉस-डोमेन प्रभाव प्रदर्शित करता है। हम एक ऐसा कार्य तैयार करते हैं जो स्लॉट-भरने वाली जानकारी निष्कर्षण के हाइब्रिड का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है और इकाई मान्यता का नाम देता है और चार अलग-अलग मंचों से डेटा को एनोटेट करता है। इन मंचों में से प्रत्येक अपने स्वयं के "ठीक-ठाक डोमेन" का गठन करता है जिसमें मंच विभिन्न गुणों के साथ विभिन्न बाजार क्षेत्रों को कवर करते हैं, भले ही सभी मंच साइबर अपराध के व्यापक डोमेन में हों। हम एक सीखने-आधारित प्रणाली के संदर्भ में इन डोमेन मतभेदों को चिह्नित करते हैं: पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल नए मंचों पर लागू होने पर कम सटीकता देखते हैं, और अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने और डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए मानक तकनीकों में इस डेटा पर सीमित प्रभावशीलता होती है, जो इन तकनीकों को बेहतर बनाने की आवश्यकता का सुझाव देती है। हम चार मंचों से 1,938 एनोटेट किए गए पदों का डेटासेट जारी करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Одним из слабых мест машинообучаемых моделей NLP является то, что они, как правило, плохо работают с внедоменными данными. В этой работе мы изучаем задачу выявления продуктов, которые покупаются и продаются на онлайн-форумах по киберпреступности, что демонстрирует особенно сложные междоменные эффекты. Мы формулируем задачу, которая представляет собой гибрид извлечения информации о заполнении слотов и распознавания именованных сущностей и аннотирования данных с четырех различных форумов. Каждый из этих форумов представляет собой свою собственную «мелкозернистую область» в том смысле, что форумы охватывают различные рыночные секторы с различными свойствами, даже несмотря на то, что все форумы относятся к широкой области киберпреступности. Мы характеризуем эти различия областей в контексте системы, основанной на обучении: контролируемые модели видят снижение точности при применении к новым форумам, а стандартные методы полуконтролируемого обучения и адаптации областей имеют ограниченную эффективность на этих данных, что указывает на необходимость улучшения этих методов. Мы выпускаем набор данных из 1938 аннотированных постов из всех четырех форумов.', 'ga': 'Laige amháin a bhaineann le samhlacha meaisín-fhoghlaim NLP ná go bhfeidhmíonn siad go dona go hiondúil ar shonraí lasmuigh den fhearann. Sa obair seo, déanaimid staidéar ar an tasc a bhaineann le táirgí atá á gceannach agus á ndíol a aithint i bhfóraim chibearchoireachta ar líne, a léiríonn éifeachtaí tras-fearainn atá thar a bheith dúshlánach. Déanaimid tasc a fhoirmliú a sheasann do hibrideach d’eastóscadh faisnéise faoi líonadh sliotán agus d’aithint aonáin ainmnithe agus déanaimid anótáil ar shonraí ó cheithre fhóram éagsúla. Is ionann gach ceann de na fóraim seo agus a “fhearann mínitheach” féin sa mhéid is go gclúdaíonn na fóraim earnálacha margaidh éagsúla a bhfuil airíonna éagsúla acu, cé go bhfuil gach fóram i réimse leathan na cibearchoireachta. Tréithrímid na difríochtaí fearainn seo i gcomhthéacs córais atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim: feictear go bhfuil cruinneas laghdaithe ag samhlacha maoirsithe nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm iad ar fhóraim nua, agus tá éifeachtacht theoranta ag teicnící caighdeánacha don fhoghlaim leath-mhaoirsithe agus d’oiriúnú fearainn ar na sonraí seo, rud a thugann le tuiscint go bhfuil gá le feabhsú. na teicníochtaí seo. Eisímid tacar sonraí de 1,938 post anótáilte ó na ceithre fhóram.', 'ka': "მაქინის შესწავლილი NLP მოდელების ერთი სინამდვილეობა არის ის, რომ ისინი ტიპოლურად ცოტა მონაცემების გარეშე მონაცემებში. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვისწავლით სამუშაო პროდუმენტების იდენტიფიკაცია, რომელიც ინტერნეტი საიბერ კრიმინტების ფორმებში იმუშაობენ, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულად ჩვენ ვაფორმულებთ რაოდენობა, რომელიც იყოს შორის განსხვავებული ფორმულების ჰიბრიდის ინფორმაციის ექსტრექცია და სახელი ინტერტიკის განაცნობა და ინტორტიკის მონაცნობა. ყოველ ამ ფორმების განსაკუთრებულია თავისი 'საკუთრებული დემომინი' რომელიც ფორმები განსხვავებული ბაზეტის საკუთრებით განსხვავებული განსაკუთრებულია, მაგრამ ყველა ფორმები კიბერ-კ ჩვენ ამ დიომინის განსხვავებების კონტექსტში განსხვავება სწავლის განსაკუთრებით: მოდელები მონაცემულებული მოდელები ხედავთ შემცირებული წარმოდგენება, როდესაც ახალი ფორმულებში გამოყენებულია, და სტანდარტული ტექნოგიები სწავლის და ჩვენ მივიღებთ 1 938 მონაცემების მონაცემების სექტი, რომელიც მონაცემებულია 4 ფორმების განმავლობაში.", 'el': 'Μια αδυναμία των μηχανομαθημένων μοντέλων είναι ότι συνήθως αποδίδουν άσχημα σε δεδομένα εκτός πεδίου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετούμε το καθήκον του εντοπισμού προϊόντων που αγοράζονται και πωλούνται σε διαδικτυακά φόρουμ εγκλήματος στον κυβερνοχώρο, τα οποία παρουσιάζουν ιδιαίτερα προκλητικές επιπτώσεις μεταξύ των τομέων. Σχεδιάζουμε μια εργασία που αντιπροσωπεύει ένα υβρίδιο εξαγωγής πληροφοριών γεμίσματος αυλακώσεων και αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων και σχολιασμού δεδομένων από τέσσερα διαφορετικά φόρουμ. Κάθε ένα από αυτά τα φόρουμ αποτελεί το δικό του "λεπτόκοκκο τομέα", δεδομένου ότι τα φόρουμ καλύπτουν διαφορετικούς τομείς της αγοράς με διαφορετικές ιδιότητες, παρόλο που όλα τα φόρουμ ανήκουν στον ευρύ τομέα του εγκλήματος στον κυβερνοχώρο. Χαρακτηρίζουμε αυτές τις διαφορές τομέα στο πλαίσιο ενός μαθησιακού συστήματος: τα εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα βλέπουν μειωμένη ακρίβεια όταν εφαρμόζονται σε νέα φόρουμ, και οι τυποποιημένες τεχνικές για ημι-εποπτευόμενη μάθηση και προσαρμογή τομέα έχουν περιορισμένη αποτελεσματικότητα σε αυτά τα δεδομένα, γεγονός που υποδηλώνει την ανάγκη βελτίωσης αυτών των τεχνικών. Δημοσιεύουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με σχόλια 1.938 από τα τέσσερα φόρουμ.', 'hu': 'A géppel megtanult NLP modellek egyik gyengesége, hogy általában rosszul teljesítenek a tartományon kívüli adatokon. Ebben a munkában tanulmányozzuk az online számítógépes bűnözési fórumokon vásárolt és értékesített termékek azonosításának feladatát, amelyek különösen kihívást jelentenek a domain közötti hatásoknak. Olyan feladatot dolgozunk ki, amely a résidő-kitöltő információk kivonásának és a nevezett entitások felismerésének hibridjét képviseli négy különböző fórum adatainak jegyzetelését. Ezek a fórumok mindegyike saját "finom szemű tartományt" képez, mivel a fórumok különböző piaci ágazatokat fednek le különböző tulajdonságokkal, még akkor is, ha minden fórum a számítástechnikai bűnözés széles körébe tartozik. Ezeket a domain különbségeket egy tanulásalapú rendszer kontextusában jellemezzük: a felügyelt modellek új fórumokon való alkalmazásakor csökkentek a pontosság, a félig felügyelt tanulás és a domain adaptáció standard technikái pedig korlátozottan hatékonyak ezekre az adatokra, ami arra utal, hogy ezeket a technikákat fejleszteni kell. A négy fórumon 1 938 jegyzetelt bejegyzést tartalmazó adatkészletet bocsátunk ki.', 'it': 'Una debolezza dei modelli NLP appresi da macchine è che in genere funzionano male sui dati fuori dominio. In questo lavoro, studiamo il compito di identificare i prodotti acquistati e venduti nei forum di cybercrime online, che presentano effetti cross-domain particolarmente impegnativi. Formuliamo un compito che rappresenta un ibrido di estrazione di informazioni di riempimento di slot e riconoscimento di entità con nome e annotazione di dati da quattro forum diversi. Ciascuno di questi forum costituisce un proprio "dominio a grana fine" in quanto i forum coprono diversi settori di mercato con proprietà diverse, anche se tutti i forum sono nell\'ampio dominio della criminalità informatica. Caratterizzamo queste differenze di dominio nel contesto di un sistema basato sull\'apprendimento: i modelli supervisionati vedono una minore accuratezza quando applicati a nuovi forum, e le tecniche standard per l\'apprendimento semi-supervisionato e l\'adattamento del dominio hanno un\'efficacia limitata su questi dati, il che suggerisce la necessità di migliorare queste tecniche. Rilasciamo un set di dati di 1.938 post annotati da tutti i quattro forum.', 'lt': "Vienas iš mašinomis išmokytų NLP modelių trūkumų yra tas, kad jie paprastai blogai veikia ne srities duomenimis. Šiame darbe mes tiriame užduotį nustatyti internetiniuose elektroninių nusikaltimų forumuose perkamus ir parduodamus produktus, kurie turi ypač sunkų tarpusavio poveikį. Suformuojame užduotį, kuri sudaro laiko tarpsnių užpildymo informacijos mišinį ir pavadinimus atitinkantį subjekto pripažinimą ir užrašo duomenis iš keturių skirtingų forumų. Each of these forums constitutes its own 'fine-grained domain' in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime.  Šiuos srities skirtumus apibūdiname mokymosi pagrindu grindžiamos sistemos kontekste: prižiūrimi modeliai, kai taikomi naujiems forumams, mato mažesnį tikslumą, o standartiniai pusiau prižiūrimo mokymosi ir srities pritaikymo metodai šiems duomenims yra ribotai veiksmingi, o tai rodo poreikį tobulinti šiuos metodus. Išduodame 1 938 užrašytų postų rinkinį iš visų keturių forumų.", 'mk': 'One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data.  Во оваа работа ја проучуваме задачата да ги идентификуваме производите кои се купуваат и продаваат на онлајн форуми за кибер криминал, кои покажуваат особено предизвикувачки преку домени ефекти. Ние формулираме задача која претставува хибрид на извлекување информации за полнување на слотови и препознавање на ентитетите именувани и анотираме податоци од четири различни форуми. Секој од овие форуми претставува свој „фино-населен домен“ во тоа што форумите покриваат различни пазарни сектори со различни имотности, иако сите форуми се во широкиот домен на кибер-криминалот. Ги карактеризираме овие разлики во домените во контекст на системот базиран на учење: надгледуваните модели гледаат намалена точност кога се применуваат на новите форуми, и стандардните техники за полунадгледувано учење и адаптација на домените имаат ограничена ефективност на овие податоци, што укажува на потр We release a dataset of 1,938 annotated posts from across the four forums.', 'ms': "Salah satu kelemahan model NLP yang dipelajari oleh mesin adalah bahawa mereka biasanya melakukan yang buruk pada data luar domain. Dalam kerja ini, kami mempelajari tugas mengenali pengenalan produk yang dibeli dan dijual dalam fora kejahatan siber online, yang menunjukkan kesan melintasi-domain yang mencabar. Kami membentuk tugas yang mewakili hibrid ekstraksi maklumat penuh slot dan pengenalan entiti bernama dan anotasi data dari empat forum yang berbeza. Setiap forum ini membentuk 'domain-fine grained' sendiri dalam bahawa forum menutupi sektor pasar berbeza dengan ciri-ciri berbeza, walaupun semua forum berada dalam domain luas kejahatan siber. Kami mewahyukan perbezaan domain ini dalam konteks sistem berdasarkan pembelajaran: model yang dikendalikan melihat kecukupan apabila dilaksanakan pada forum baru, dan teknik piawai untuk pembelajaran setengah dikendalikan dan penyesuaian domain mempunyai kegunaan terhad pada data ini, yang menunjukkan keperluan untuk meningkatkan teknik ini. We release a dataset of 1,938 annotated posts from across the four forums.", 'ml': "One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d വാങ്ങുകയും വില്\u200dക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന സൈബെര്\u200d ക്രിമിനല്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d നിരീക് സ്ലോട്ട് നിറയ്ക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ജോലി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. നാല് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫ Each of these forums constitutes its own 'fine-grained domain' in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime.  പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളെ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d പുതിയ ഫോര്\u200dമുകള്\u200dക്ക് കുറഞ്ഞു കാണുന്ന നമ്മള്\u200d നാല് ഫോറമുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിചാരിച്ച ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d വിടുന്നു.", 'mt': "One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data.  F’dan ix-xogħol, nistudjaw il-kompitu li nidentifikaw il-prodotti li qed jinxtraw u jinbiegħu f’fora onlajn dwar iċ-ċiberkriminalità, li juru effetti interdomestiċi partikolarment diffiċli. We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums.  Each of these forums constitutes its own 'fine-grained domain' in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime.  We characterize these domain differences in the context of a learning-based system: supervised models see decreased accuracy when applied to new forums, and standard techniques for semi-supervised learning and domain adaptation have limited effectiveness on this data, which suggests the need to improve these techniques.  Aħna nħarġu sett ta' dejta ta' 1,938 post annotat minn madwar l-erba' fora.", 'pl': 'Jedną z słabości modeli NLP uczonych maszynowo jest to, że zazwyczaj słabo działają na danych poza domeną. W niniejszej pracy badamy zadanie identyfikacji produktów kupowanych i sprzedawanych na internetowych forach cyberprzestępczości, które wykazują szczególnie trudne efekty między domenami. Formułujemy zadanie, które reprezentuje hybrydę ekstrakcji informacji o wypełnianiu slotów oraz rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek i adnotacji danych z czterech różnych forów. Każde z tych forów stanowi własną "precyzyjną domenę", ponieważ fora obejmują różne sektory rynku o różnych właściwościach, chociaż wszystkie fora należą do szerokiej dziedziny cyberprzestępczości. Charakteryzujemy te różnice domen w kontekście systemu opartego na uczeniu się: modele nadzorowane widzą zmniejszoną dokładność stosowane na nowych forach, a standardowe techniki uczenia się pół-nadzorowanego i adaptacji domen mają ograniczoną skuteczność w stosunku do tych danych, co sugeruje konieczność udoskonalenia tych technik. Wydajemy zbiór danych z komentarzami 1.938 z czterech forów.', 'ro': 'O slăbiciune a modelelor NLP învățate automat este că, de obicei, performează slab pe datele din afara domeniului. În această lucrare, studiem sarcina identificării produselor cumpărate și vândute în forumurile online de crimă cibernetică, care prezintă efecte deosebit de provocatoare cross-domeniu. Formulăm o sarcină care reprezintă un hibrid între extragerea informațiilor de umplere a sloturilor și recunoașterea entităților denumite și adnotarea datelor din patru forumuri diferite. Fiecare dintre aceste forumuri constituie propriul său "domeniu fin", în sensul că forumurile acoperă diferite sectoare de piață cu proprietăți diferite, chiar dacă toate forumurile se află în domeniul larg al criminalității cibernetice. Caracterizăm aceste diferențe de domeniu în contextul unui sistem bazat pe învățare: modelele supravegheate văd o precizie scăzută atunci când sunt aplicate pe forumuri noi, iar tehnicile standard pentru învățare semi-supravegheată și adaptarea domeniului au o eficacitate limitată asupra acestor date, ceea ce sugerează necesitatea îmbunătățirii acestor tehnici. Lansăm un set de date de 1.938 de postări adnotate din cele patru forumuri.', 'kk': 'Машина үйренген NLP үлгілерінің бірінші қауіпсіздігі - олар әдетте доменге шығыс деректерінде жаман істейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, онлайн киберпрестіктер форумында сатылған продукттарды анықтау жұмысын зерттейміз. Бұл онлайн көпшіліктердің көпшілікті көпшілікті эффекттерін көрсетеді Біз слотты толтыру мәліметтің гибридін түсіру және аталған нысандарды анықтау және белгілеу деректерін төрт түрлі форумдан таңдайтын тапсырманы формуладық. Бұл форумдардың әрбірі өзінің "тұтас домені" деп аталады. Форумдар басқа рынк секторларының қасиеттері мен түрлі қасиеттері бар форумдарының көпшілігі көпшілік доменінде болса да. Біз осы доменді үйрену жүйесіне негізделген айырмашылықтарды таңдаймыз: бақылау үлгілері жаңа форумға қолданғанда дұрыстығын азайтып көреді, және жарты бақылау және доменге қолдану үшін стандартты техникалар бұл деректерді шектеу мүмкіндігін ше Біз төрт форумдан 1 938 жазылған жазбаларды тастаймыз.', 'mn': 'Машин сурсан NLP загварын нэг хүчтэй зүйл бол тэд ихэвчлэн холбоотой мэдээлэл дээр буруу байдаг. Энэ ажлын тухай бид онлайн сайтын гэмт хэрэг үйлдвэрлэлд худалдан авсан, худалдан авсан бүтээгдэхүүнүүдийг тодорхойлдог ажлыг судалж байна. Энэ нь ялангуяа хэцүү олон хэмжээний нөлөөг үзүүлдэг. Бид слотын дүүргэх мэдээллийн шинжлэх ухааны гибрид үүсгэдэг, нэрлэгдсэн бүтээгдэхүүний хүлээн зөвшөөрөл, дөрвөн өөр форумын өгөгдлийг илэрхийлж чадна. Эдгээр форумууд бүр өөр өөр зах зээлийн хэсэгт өөр өөр чанартай байдаг. Хэдийгээр бүх форумууд цайбрийн гэмт хэрэгцээнд байдаг. Бид суралцах системийн тухай эдгээр зохиолын ялгааг харуулж байна: удирдагдсан загварууд шинэ форумууд ашиглах үед тодорхойлолтыг багасгаж байна, хагас удирдах суралцах болон домагийн адаптацийн стандарт техникууд энэ өгөгдлийн тухай хязгаарлагддаг, энэ техникуудыг сайжруулах хэр Бид дөрвөн форумаас 1,938 анзаарсан өгөгдлийн санг нээж өгдөг.', 'sr': "Jedna slabost modela NLP-a naučenih mašina je da se obično loše izvršavaju na podacima izvan domena. U ovom poslu proučavamo zadatak identifikacije proizvoda koje se kupuju i prodaju u internetskim forumima kiberkriminala, koji pokazuje posebno izazovne efekte preko domena. Formirali smo zadatak koji predstavlja hibrid izvlačenja informacija o punjenju slot a i priznanje entiteta i annotiranje podataka iz četiri različita foruma. Svaki od tih foruma predstavlja svoju vlastitu 'fino zrno domenu' u tome što forumi pokrivaju različite tržišne sektore sa različitim vlasništvom, iako su svi forumi u širom domenu sajber kriminala. Mi karakteriziramo te razlike domena u kontekstu sustava na osnovu učenja: nadzorni modeli vide smanjenu tačnost kada se primjenjuju na nove forume, a standardne tehnike za polu nadzorno učenje i adaptaciju domena imaju ograničenu efikasnost na ovim podacima, što ukazuje na potrebu poboljšavanja tih tehnika. Puštamo set podataka od 1.938 annotiranih postaja preko četiri foruma.", 'no': 'Ein tykkhet av maskinelærte NLP-modeller er at dei vanlegvis utfører slik dårlig på uten domenedata. I denne arbeiden studerer vi oppgåva for å identifisera produktar som vert kjøpt og selgte i nettverkskriminalformar, som viser spesielt vanskeleg krysdomeneffekt. Vi formerer eit oppgåve som representerer ein hybrid av ekstraksjon av informasjon som fyller plass og gjenkjenning av namnet entitet og oppmerking av data frå fire ulike forume. Kvar av desse forumenene gjev sine eigne «fine-grained domain» i at forumenene dekkar ulike markedssektorar med ulike eigenskapar, selv om alle forume er i den brede domenet av cybercrime. Vi karakteriserer desse domeneforskjellingane i konteksten av eit læringsbasert system: oversikte modeller ser mindre nøyaktighet når det er brukt på nye forummer, og standard teknikk for semioversikt læring og domenetilpassing har begrenset effektivitet på denne data, som tyder på at må forbedra desse teknikka. Vi publiserer ei datasett med 1.938 oppmerkte e-post frå dei fire foruma.', 'sv': 'En svaghet hos maskinlärda NLP-modeller är att de vanligtvis presterar dåligt på data utanför domänen. I detta arbete studerar vi uppgiften att identifiera produkter som köps och säljs i onlineforum för cyberbrottslighet, vilket uppvisar särskilt utmanande gränsöverskridande effekter. Vi formulerar en uppgift som representerar en hybrid av informationsutvinning och namngiven entitetsigenkänning och kommentera data från fyra olika forum. Var och en av dessa forum utgör sin egen "finkorniga domän" genom att forumen täcker olika marknadssektorer med olika egenskaper, även om alla forum är inom den breda domänen cyberbrottslighet. Vi karaktäriserar dessa domänskillnader i samband med ett lärbaserat system: övervakade modeller ser minskad noggrannhet när de tillämpas på nya forum, och standardtekniker för semi-övervakat lärande och domänanpassning har begränsad effektivitet på dessa data, vilket tyder på behovet av att förbättra dessa tekniker. Vi släpper en datauppsättning med 1 938 kommenterade inlägg från de fyra forumen.', 'so': 'Mid cudur ah oo muusikada NLP ee machine-ka lagu bartay waa in sida caadiga ah ay macluumaad aad u baahan sameeyaan oo aan ka bixinayn. Shaqadaas waxaynu ku baranaynaa shaqada aqoonsashada alaabta lagu iibiyo oo lagu iibiyo shabakadda dembiga ah, taas oo muuqata khaas ahaan dhibaatooyin ku saabsan waxyaabaha Internetka. We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums.  Junuunnadan mid kastaaba wuxuu ka dhigaa gurigiisa deyr leh, taasoo ku qoran jardiinaduhu waxay ku qariyaan qeybaha suuqa kala duduwan, in kastoo kooxooyinka oo dhammu ay ku yaalaan meesha internetka dembiga oo ballaadhan. Isku-bedelka deegaankana waxaan ka dhignaa nidaamka waxbarashada hoos u dhigay: noocyada la ilaaliyey waxay arkaan si saxda ah marka lagu codsaday safarka cusub, iyo qalabka caadiga ah oo lagu beddelo barashada iyo beddelka gudaha ah waxay leedahay faa’iido xad ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadkan, taasoo looga jeedaa in loo baahdo in lagu beddelo qalabkan. Waxaannu ka bixinnaa koorasyo warqado lagu dhibay 1,938 oo afarta jardiino oo dhan.', 'si': 'යන්ත්\u200dරයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත NLP මොඩල් එක්ක දුර්වලය තමයි ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම වැරදි විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ නැ මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අන්ලයින් සයිබර් අපරාධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් වික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අන්තර්ජනය කර අපි ස්ලෝට් පුරවන්න තොරතුරු පිළිගන්න හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති හතරක් තොරතුරු පිළි හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම තමයි වෙනස් විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ, හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සයිබර් අපරාධ විශේෂයේ විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ. අපි ක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා මේ ඩෝමේන් වෙනස් අධික පද්ධතියේ ඉගෙනීම් පද්ධතියේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට: supervised මොඩේල්ස් දැක්කා අළුත් පද්ධතියෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විදියට අ අපි දත්ත සූදානයක් පිළිබඳ කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ හතරක් වලින් පොස්ටල් 1,938 වලින්.', 'ta': "இயந்திரம் கற்றப்பட்ட NLP மாதிரிகளில் ஒரு பலஹீனம் என்னவென்றால் அவர்கள் வழக்கமாக வெளியே உள்ள தகவலில் தவறான செயல்படுகிறது. இந்த வேலையில், நாங்கள் பொருள்கள் வாங்கப்பட்டு விற்கப்படும் மற்றும் விற்கப்பட்டுள்ள பொருட்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பணியை படிக்க நாம் ஒரு செயலை உருவாக்குகிறோம் அது சுருக்கு நிரப்பும் தகவல் பெறுதல் மற்றும் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளம் மற்றும் நான்கு வேற ஒவ்வொரு குறிப்புகளும் அதன் சொந்த 'நன்றாக கிடைக்கப்பட்ட களம்' என்பதை உருவாக்குகிறது, அதனால் குறிப்புகள் வேறு வித்தியாசமான சந்தை துணைகளை மூடுகி We characterize these domain differences in the context of a learning-based system: supervised models see decreased accuracy when applied to new forums, and standard techniques for semi-supervised learning and domain adaptation have limited effectiveness on this data, which suggests the need to improve these techniques.  நாங்கள் நான்கு குறிப்புகள் முழுவதும் நான்கு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட பதிப்புகளில் 1,938 தகவல் அமைப்பை வெளி", 'ur': 'ماشین سکھایا گیا NLP موڈل کی ایک کمزوری یہ ہے کہ وہ اکثر غیر دومین ڈیٹوں پر کمزور عمل کرتے ہیں۔ ہم اس کام میں پڑھتے ہیں کہ ایسے مواد کو پہچان سکتے ہیں جو آنلاین سایر کریمٹ فورمز میں خریدے جاتے ہیں اور بیچ دیئے جاتے ہیں، جو مخصوصا کریمٹ ڈمین کے اثرات میں مشکل ہے۔ ہم ایک کام کو فرمول کرتے ہیں جو چار مختلف فرموموموں سے لٹ بھرنے والی اطلاعات اضافہ کی ایک ہیبریڈ کی نشانی کرتا ہے ان فرموموں میں سے ہر ایک اپنے "نیک دانے ڈومین" کی تعریف کرتا ہے جس میں فرموم مختلف بازاروں کے گروہوں کو مختلف خصوصی کے ساتھ چھپاتے ہیں، اگرچہ تمام فرموم سایر گناه کے وسیع ڈومین میں ہیں۔ ہم نے ان ڈومین کی تفاوتوں کو ایک سیستم کی محیط میں تعلیم دینے والی اختلافات کی تعریف کرتا ہے: نظارت کیے ہوئے موڈلیوں نے نئی فورموں کے بارے میں کم دقیق دیکھا ہے، اور نیم نظارت کی تعلیم اور ڈومین اضافہ کے لئے استاندارڈ ٹیکنیکوں نے اس ڈاٹ پر محدودہ اثرات رکھی ہے، جو ان تکنی ہم نے چار فورمز سے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ منتشر کیا ہے جو 1,938 منتشر کئے گئے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Ushbu vazifanda, biz Online kriminal forumlarida o'z narsalarni aniqlash va o'zgartirish vazifasini o'rganamiz. Bu shaxsiy interdomen effektlarini ko'rsatadi. Biz bir vazifani yaratib, boshqa bir forumlardan hech qanday jadvalni toʻliq olib tashlash va tashkilotni tasdiqlash va to'rtta forumdan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni tahlil qilamiz. Har bir forumlar o'zida quyidagi “гўзал grammatika domen” deb ataladi, chunki forumlar har xil suqqa qismlarini boshqa xossalari bilan qaraydi. Agar hamma forumlar cyber犯罪ning katta domain. Biz o'rganish tizimning asosida bu domen o'zgarishlarini tahrirlash mumkin: taʼminlovchi modellar yangi forumlarga qoʻllanilganda aniqlikni kamaytirish mumkin, va semi-saqlangan o'rganish va domen adaptarining standard teknologiya bu maʼlumotga qo'llanmalar, bu tugmalarni yaxshirishi kerakligini anglatadi. Biz to'rt forumlardan bir 1,938 ta'siri postlarni chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Một điểm yếu của mô hình lập trình NLP là nó thường làm việc rất tệ khi cung cấp dữ liệu ngoài miền. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu nhiệm vụ xác định các sản phẩm được mua và bán trong các diễn đàn tội phạm mạng online, mang đến những hiệu ứng xuyên lục địa đầy thử thách. Chúng tôi mô tả một nhiệm vụ đại diện cho một hỗn hợp của việc khai thác thông tin khai thác khe hở và nhận diện thực thể tên và ghi chú dữ liệu từ bốn diễn đàn khác nhau. Mỗi diễn đàn là một "khu vực được trang điểm" riêng trong khi các diễn đàn bao gồm các lĩnh vực thị trường khác nhau với các đặc tính khác nhau, mặc dù mọi diễn đàn đều thuộc diện rộng của tội phạm mạng. Chúng tôi mô tả những khác biệt miền trong một hệ thống học tập: các mô hình giám sát thấy độ chính xác giảm khi áp dụng cho các diễn đàn mới, và kỹ thuật tiêu chuẩn cho việc học tập và phục hồi miền bị giám sát có hiệu quả hạn chế trong dữ liệu này, điều đó cho thấy cần cải thiện kỹ thuật này. Chúng tôi công bố dữ liệu của kênh 1,938. Những bài viết được ghi chú từ khắp các diễn đàn.', 'bg': 'Една слабост на машинно изучаваните модели е, че те обикновено се представят зле на данни извън домейна. В тази работа изследваме задачата за идентифициране на продукти, които се купуват и продават в онлайн форуми за киберпрестъпност, които показват особено предизвикателни междудомейнови ефекти. Формулираме задача, която представлява хибрид от извличане на информация за запълване на слотове и разпознаване на имена на обекти и анотиране на данни от четири различни форума. Всеки един от тези форуми представлява свой собствен "фин-зърнест домейн", тъй като форумите обхващат различни пазарни сектори с различни свойства, въпреки че всички форуми са в широкия обхват на киберпрестъпността. Характеризираме тези домейнни различия в контекста на обучителна система: надзорните модели виждат намалена точност при прилагане на нови форуми, а стандартните техники за полу-надзорно обучение и адаптация на домейна имат ограничена ефективност върху тези данни, което предполага необходимостта от подобряване на тези техники. Ние публикуваме набор от данни от 1 938 анотирани публикации от четирите форума.', 'da': 'En svaghed ved maskinlærte NLP-modeller er, at de typisk fungerer dårligt på data uden for domænet. I dette arbejde undersøger vi opgaven med at identificere produkter, der købes og sælges i online cyberkriminalitet fora, som udviser særligt udfordrende tværgående effekter. Vi formulerer en opgave, der repræsenterer en hybrid af udtrækning af oplysninger om slot-fyldning og navngivet entitetsgenkendelse og notere data fra fire forskellige fora. Hvert af disse fora udgør sit eget "finkornede domæne", idet foraene dækker forskellige markedssektorer med forskellige egenskaber, selv om alle fora er inden for cyberkriminalitet. Vi karakteriserer disse domæneforskelle i forbindelse med et læringsbaseret system: overvågede modeller ser nedsat nøjagtighed, når de anvendes på nye fora, og standardteknikker til semi-overvåget læring og domænetilpasning har begrænset effektivitet på disse data, hvilket tyder på behovet for at forbedre disse teknikker. Vi udgiver et datasæt med 1.938 kommenterede indlæg fra tværs af de fire fora.', 'nl': "Een zwakte van machine-learning NLP modellen is dat ze meestal slecht presteren op out-of-domain data. In dit werk bestuderen we de taak van het identificeren van producten die worden gekocht en verkocht in online cybercrime forums, die bijzonder uitdagende cross-domein effecten vertonen. We formuleren een taak die een hybride vertegenwoordigt van slot-vulling informatie extractie en benoemde entiteitsherkenning en annoteren gegevens van vier verschillende forums. Elk van deze forums vormt zijn eigen 'fine-granined domain' in die zin dat de forums verschillende marktsectoren bestrijken met verschillende eigenschappen, hoewel alle forums binnen het brede domein van cybercriminaliteit vallen. We karakteriseren deze domeinverschillen in de context van een leergebaseerd systeem: begeleide modellen zien een verminderde nauwkeurigheid wanneer toegepast op nieuwe fora, en standaardtechnieken voor semi-supervised leren en domeinaanpassing hebben beperkte effectiviteit op deze gegevens, wat suggereert dat deze technieken moeten worden verbeterd. We geven een dataset van 1.938 geannoteerde berichten uit de vier forums.", 'hr': "Jedna slabost modela NLP-a naučenih strojeva je da obično loše izvršavaju podatke o izvan domena. U ovom poslu proučavamo zadatak identifikacije proizvoda koje se kupuju i prodaju u internetskim forumima za kiberkriminal, koji pokazuje posebno izazovne učinke preko domena. Formiramo zadatak koji predstavlja hibrid izvlačenja informacija o ispunjavanju slot a i priznanje entiteta i annotiranje podataka iz četiri različite foruma. Svaki od tih foruma predstavlja svoju vlastitu 'zgodnu domenu' u tome što forumi pokrivaju različite tržišne sektore s različitim vlasništvom, iako su svi forumi u širom dometu sajber kriminala. Oblikavamo te razlike domena u kontekstu sustava na osnovu učenja: nadzorni modeli vide smanjenu preciznost kada se primjenjuju na nove forume, a standardne tehnike za polu nadzorno učenje i adaptaciju domena imaju ograničenu učinkovitost na ovim podacima, što ukazuje na potrebu poboljšavanja tih tehnika. Puštamo skup podataka od 1.938 annotiranih mjesta preko četiri foruma.", 'de': 'Eine Schwäche maschinell erlernter NLP-Modelle besteht darin, dass sie in der Regel schlecht auf Daten außerhalb der Domäne funktionieren. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir die Aufgabe, Produkte zu identifizieren, die in Online-Foren für Cyberkriminalität gekauft und verkauft werden, die besonders herausfordernde domänenübergreifende Effekte aufweisen. Wir formulieren eine Aufgabe, die eine Hybride aus Slot-Filling-Informationsextraktion und Named Entity-Erkennung darstellt und Daten aus vier verschiedenen Foren annotiert. Jedes dieser Foren stellt seine eigene "feinkörnige Domäne" dar, da die Foren verschiedene Marktsektoren mit unterschiedlichen Eigenschaften abdecken, obwohl alle Foren im weiten Bereich der Cyberkriminalität liegen. Wir charakterisieren diese Domänenunterschiede im Kontext eines lernbasierten Systems: Supervised Models sehen eine verringerte Genauigkeit, wenn sie auf neue Foren angewendet werden, und Standardtechniken für semi-supervisives Lernen und Domänenanpassung haben begrenzte Effektivität auf diese Daten, was die Notwendigkeit nahelegt, diese Techniken zu verbessern. Wir veröffentlichen einen Datensatz von 1.938 kommentierten Beiträgen aus den vier Foren.', 'ko': "머신러닝 NLP 모델의 단점 중 하나는 일반적으로 도메인 밖 데이터에서 좋지 않다는 것이다.이 작업에서 우리는 온라인 인터넷 범죄 포럼에서 매매되는 제품을 식별하는 임무를 연구했는데 이것은 특히 도전적인 크로스 효과를 나타낸다.우리는 플러그인 충전 정보 추출, 명명 실체 식별, 주석 네 개의 서로 다른 포럼에서 온 데이터의 혼합을 대표하는 임무를 제정했다.이 포럼 중의 하나하나는 모두 자신의'세립도역'을 구성했다. 왜냐하면 이 포럼들은 서로 다른 속성을 가진 서로 다른 시장 부문을 포괄하기 때문이다. 비록 모든 포럼은 인터넷 범죄의 광범위한 분야에 속하지만.우리는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 시스템에서 이러한 분야의 차이를 묘사했다. 새로운 포럼에 적용될 때 감독 모델의 정확성이 떨어지고 반감독 학습과 분야에 적응하는 표준 기술이 이런 데이터에 대한 유효성에 한계가 있기 때문에 이러한 기술을 개선해야 한다는 것을 보여준다.우리는 네 개의 포럼에서 온 1938편의 주석이 달린 게시물 데이터 집합을 발표했다.", 'sw': "One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data.  Katika kazi hii, tunasoma jukumu la kutambua bidhaa zinazonunuliwa na kuuzwa kwenye jukwaa la uhalifu wa mtandaoni, ambalo linaonyesha hasa changamoto kubwa na athari za ndani. Tunaweza kutengeneza jukumu ambalo linawakilisha mfumo wa utambulisho wa taarifa zinazojaza sawia na jina la kutambuliwa na kutangaza taarifa kutoka majukwaa minne tofauti. Jukwaa hizi zimekuwa ni 'eneo lililopangwa vizuri' ambapo jukwaa hizo zinazungumzia sekta tofauti za soko na vifaa tofauti, ingawa jukwaa zote zimo katika maeneo mengi ya uhalifu wa mtandaoni. Tunawahusisha tofauti hizi za ndani katika muktadha wa mfumo wa kujifunza: mifano inayofuatiliwa inaonekana kupungua kwa ufanisi unapotumika kwa majukwaa mpya, na mbinu za kawaida kwa ajili ya kujifunza na kuboreshwa kwa sekunde imekuwa na ufanisi mkubwa katika taarifa hii, ambayo inapendekeza kuboresha mbinu hizi. Tunaweza kuachia seti ya takwimu ya makala 1,938 zilizotajwa kutoka kwenye vyumba nne.", 'fa': 'یک ضعیف مدل NLP به دستگاه یاد گرفته شده است که معمولاً در داده های خارج از دومین بد انجام می دهند. در این کار، ما وظیفه شناسایی محصول\u200cهایی را که در فورم\u200cهای جرم\u200cهای سایبر آنلاین خریده می\u200cشوند و فروخته می\u200cشوند، مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که مخصوصاً اثرات مختلف دامنه\u200cهای مشکل است. ما یک وظیفه را فرمول می\u200cکنیم که نشان می\u200cدهد یک هیبرید از اخراج اطلاعات پر کردن slot و شناسایی entity نام و داده\u200cهای چهار فرموم متفاوت را نشان می\u200cدهد. هر کدام از این فرعوم\u200cها در این زمینه\u200cهای خودش «دانه\u200cهای خوش\u200cخرد» است که فرعوم\u200cها بخش\u200cهای بازار متفاوتی را با ویژه\u200cهای متفاوتی پوشانده می\u200cکنند، هر چند همه فرعوم\u200cها در حوزه\u200cهای وسیع جرم سایبر هستند. ما این تفاوت\u200cهای دامنی را در محیط یک سیستم بر اساس یادگیری characterize می\u200cکنیم: مدل\u200cهای نظارت شده دقیق کاهش را می\u200cبینند وقتی به فرموم\u200cهای جدید کاربرد می\u200cکنند، و تکنیک\u200cهای استاندارد برای یادگیری و تعمیر\u200cسازی دامنی\u200cهای نیمه\u200cنظارت بر این داده\u200cها محدودیت دارند، که نیاز به ما یک مجموعه داده ای از ۱.938 پست\u200cهای نوشته شده از چهار فرموم آزاد می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Makine öwrenmiş NLP modelleriniň bir zayıflığı adatça domeny daşynda ýaman bir şekilde işleýärler. Bu işde, internetde satyn alan we satyn alan önümleri tanamak üçin täsirini öwrenýärdik. Bu şekilde birnäçe domena täsirlerini añsat döredip görünýär. Biz slot doldurucu bilgi çıkarmasını ve ismini bir tek tanımlamasını ve dört farklı forumlardan verileri ifade eden bir görevi çözüyoruz. Bu forumlardan her biri farklı özellikleri bilen örgütlendirdi. Her bir forum kibercrime döwletiniň geniş sahnesinde hem. Biz öwrenme sistemasynda bu domenyň üýtgeşiklerini karakterlerimize görýäris: gözetli modeller täze forumlara uygulanan wagtlar dogrylygyny azaltýar, we semi-kontrol öwrenme we domeny adaptasy üçin standart teknikleriň bu maglumatlarda etkinlik ýok edýärler, bu şekilde bu teknikleriň gelişmegi gerektiğini kabul ediyor. Biz dört forumlardan 1.938 hasaplanýan poçtalary çykarýarys.', 'af': "Een swakheid van masjien-leer NLP modele is dat hulle tipies swaar uitvoer op buite-domein-data. In hierdie werk, ondersoek ons die taak van die identifiseer van produkte wat gekoop word en verkoop word in online syberkrimineforme, wat spesiaal die belangrike kruisdomein effekte vertoon. Ons formeer 'n taak wat verteenwoordig 'n hibrid van slot-opvulling inligting uitvoer en genoem entiteit herken en annoteer data van vier verskillende forume. Elke van hierdie forume bestuur sy eie 'fine-grained domein' in dat die forume verskillende marksektore met verskillende eienskappe oordek, selfs al al die forume is in die breë domein van sybermisdaad. Ons karakteriseer hierdie domein verskille in die konteks van 'n leer-gebaseerde stelsel: ondersoekte modele sien verklein presisiteit wanneer toegepas word na nuwe forums, en standaard tekenieke vir semi-ondersoekte leer en domein-aanpassing het beperk effektiviteit op hierdie data, wat voorstel die benodig om hierdie tekenieke te verbeter. Ons verlos 'n datastel van 1,938 aangetekende pos van die vier forums.", 'am': 'የNLP ዓይነቶች የሚተማሩ አንዱ ድካም ከውጭ ከዶሜን ዳታዎች የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ የኢንተርኔት ኀጢአት ጦማሪያዎች የሚሸጡትንና የሚሸጡትን ዕቃ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የአራቱ ክፍሎች ላይ የሚታወቅ እና ዳራዎችን ማሳሰል እና በአራቱ ክፍል የሚታወቅበት እና ማሳሰል የሚያደርገውን ስራ እናደርጋለን፡፡ እነዚህም የጦማሪያዎች ሁሉ የኢንተርኔት ወንጀል ውስጥ ቢሆን የጦማሪያው ሰፊ ክፍሎች በተለያዩ የገበያ ክፍሎች ይሸፍናሉ፡፡ እነዚህን ዶሜን ልዩነትን በተማርክ ስርዓት ውስጥ እናደርጋለን፤ የተጠበቁ ሞዴዎች በአዲስ ፎርማቶች ላይ ሲያሳዩ እርግጠኛ አካሄዱን እና ለስሜት የተጠበቀው ትምህርት እና ዶሜን ማቀናቀል ስርዓት የዚህ መረጃዎች ላይ ጥቅሟቸውን አካባቢ ነው፡፡ 1,938 የአራቱ ፎርማኖቹ የደብዳቤዎችን እናስወግዳለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մեքենայով սովորված ՆԼՊ մոդելների թույլ մեկն այն է, որ նրանք սովորաբար վատ են աշխատում արտաքին տվյալների վրա: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք այն խնդիրը, որ բացահայտենք այն ապրանքները, որոնք գնվում և վաճառում են առցանց համացանցային հանցագործության ֆորմերում, ինչը ցույց է տալիս հատկապես դժվար միջոցային էֆեկտներ: Մենք ձևավորում ենք մի խնդիր, որը ներկայացնում է անկյունների լրացման տեղեկատվության հիբրիդ և անվանելով անհատների ճանաչման և նշում 4 տարբեր ֆորմերի տվյալները: Այս ֆորմերից յուրաքանչյուրը կազմում է իր սեփական "գեղեցիկ բնույթը", որովհետև ֆորմերը ծախսում են տարբեր շուկայի հատկություններով տարբեր հատկություններ, չնայած, որ բոլոր ֆորմերը համացանցային հանցագործության լայն բնույթներում են: Մենք բնորոշում ենք այս տիեզերական տարբերությունները ուսուցման հիմնված համակարգի կոնտեքստում. վերահսկված մոդելները տեսնում են նվազեցված ճշգրիտությունը, երբ կիսավերահսկված ուսուցման և տիեզերական ադապտացիայի ստանդարտ տեխնիկաները, որոնք սահմանափակ արդյունավետություն ունեն այս տվյալ We release a dataset of 1,938 annotated posts from across the four forums.', 'bn': "মেশিন-শিক্ষিত এনএলপি মডেলের একটি দুর্বলতা হচ্ছে যে তারা সাধারণত ডোমেইনের তথ্য বাইরে খারাপ কাজ করে। এই কাজে আমরা অনলাইনের সাইবার অপরাধ ফোরামে পণ্য কিনে এবং বিক্রি করা হয়েছে জিনিষের কাজ পড়াশোনা করেছি, যা বিশেষ করে বিশেষ করে ক্রিয়ার আমরা একটি কাজ তৈরি করি যার প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হচ্ছে স্লোট-ফোরামের একটি হাইব্রিড এবং চারটি ভিন্ন ফোরাম থেকে স্বীকৃতি এবং তথ্য বি এদের প্রত্যেক ফোরাম তাদের নিজেদের নিজেদের 'সুন্দর গ্রেফতার ডোমেইন' সংবাদ প্রদান করেছে যেখানে ফোরাম বিভিন্ন বাজারের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈ We characterize these domain differences in the context of a learning-based system: supervised models see decreased accuracy when applied to new forums, and standard techniques for semi-supervised learning and domain adaptation have limited effectiveness on this data, which suggests the need to improve these techniques.  আমরা চারটি ফোরাম থেকে একটি ডাটাসেট ১,৯৩৮ পোস্ট প্রকাশ করি।", 'az': 'Makinelə öyrənmiş NLP modellərin bir zəifliyi sıradan domena verilən məlumatlarda pis işlədikləri idi. Bu işdə, internette sajber kriminal forumlarında satılan və satılan proqramları təsdiqlənmək və bu proqramı özlərinə çox çətin bir domain etkisini göstərir. Biz slot dolduran məlumatları çıxartmaq və adı olan entitə tanıması və dörd müxtəlif forumlardan məlumatları göstərən bir işi formüləyirik. Bu forumlardan hər biri öz "fin-grain domeini" ürəkləndirir ki, forumlar fərqli pazar sektorlarını fərqli özellikləri ilə örtülür. Halbuki bütün forumlar sajber kriminlərin genişliyində olsa belə. Biz bu domenin öyrənməsi sistemi ilə müxtəlif fərqlərini təsbit edirik: gözləyirli modellər yeni forumlara istifadə edildiyi zaman düşürülmüş nöqsanlığı görür, və yarı-gözləyirli öyrənmə və domenin uyğulaması üçün standart teknikləri bu məlumatların üstündə müəyyən etkinlik sahibi olduğunu göstərər, ki bu teknikləri yaxşılaşdır Biz dörd forumların arasından 1.938 məlumatlı məlumatı yayındırırıq.', 'bs': "Jedna slabost modela NLP-a naučenih strojeva je da se obično loše izvršavaju na podacima izvan domena. U ovom poslu proučavamo zadatak identifikacije proizvoda koje se kupuju i prodaju u internetskim forumima kiberkriminala, koji pokazuje posebno izazovne efekte preko domena. Formiramo zadatak koji predstavlja hibrid izvlačenja informacija o punjenju slot a i priznanje entiteta i annotiranje podataka iz četiri različita foruma. Svaki od tih foruma predstavlja svoju vlastitu 'fino zrncanu domenu' u tome što forumi pokrivaju različite tržišne sektore s različitim vlasništvom, iako su svi forumi u širokoj oblasti sajber kriminala. Oblikavamo te razlike domena u kontekstu sustava na osnovu učenja: nadzorni modeli vide smanjenu preciznost kada se primjenjuju na nove forume, a standardne tehnike za polu nadzorno učenje i adaptaciju domena imaju ograničenu učinkovitost na ovim podacima, što ukazuje na potrebu poboljšavanja tih tehnika. Puštamo skup podataka od 1.938 annotiranih mjesta preko četiri foruma.", 'cs': 'Jednou z nedostatků strojově učených modelů NLP je, že obvykle mají špatný výkon na mimo doménu dat. V této práci studujeme úkol identifikace produktů, které jsou nakupovány a prodávány na online fórech kyberkriminality, které vykazují obzvláště náročné efekty mezi doménami. Formulujeme úkol, který představuje hybrid extrakce informací o vyplňování slotů a rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit a anotování dat ze čtyř různých fór. Každé z těchto fór tvoří svou vlastní "jemnou doménu", protože fóra pokrývají různé tržní sektory s různými vlastnostmi, i když všechna fóra patří do široké oblasti kyberkriminality. Tyto doménové rozdíly charakterizujeme v kontextu systému založeného na učení: supervizované modely vidí sníženou přesnost při aplikaci na nová fóra a standardní techniky pro semi-supervizované učení a adaptaci domén mají omezenou účinnost na těchto údajích, což naznačuje potřebu zlepšit tyto techniky. Vydáváme datovou sadu 1,938 anotovaných příspěvků z napříč čtyřmi fóry.', 'et': 'Masinaõppitud NLP mudelite üks nõrkus on see, et need toimivad tavaliselt halvasti väljaspool domeeni asuvate andmete puhul. Käesolevas töös uurime ülesannet tuvastada küberkuritegevuse foorumites ostetavad ja müüdavad tooted, millel on eriti keerulised domeenidevahelised efektid. Me sõnastame ülesande, mis esindab teenindusaegade täitmise teabe ekstraheerimist ja nimetatud olemi tuvastamist ning andmete annoteerimist neljast erinevast foorumist. Iga neist foorumitest moodustab oma "peenrahalise domeeni", sest foorumid hõlmavad erinevaid turusektoreid erinevate omadustega, kuigi kõik foorumid kuuluvad laialdasesse küberkuritegevuse valdkonda. Me iseloomustame neid valdkonna erinevusi õppepõhise süsteemi kontekstis: juhendatud mudelid näevad uutele foorumitele rakendamisel väiksemat täpsust ning pooljuhitatud õppe ja domeenikohandamise standardmeetodid on nende andmete suhtes piiratud, mis viitab vajadusele neid tehnikaid täiustada. Avaldame andmekogumi 938 kommenteeritud postitusest neljalt foorumilt.', 'fi': 'Koneoppimattomien NLP-mallien heikkous on se, että ne toimivat yleensä huonosti verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolisessa datassa. Tässä työssä tutkitaan verkkorikollisuuden foorumeilla ostettavien ja myytävien tuotteiden tunnistamista, sillä niillä on erityisen haastavia verkkotunnusten välisiä vaikutuksia. Laadimme tehtävän, joka edustaa hybridiä slot-filling-informaation poimintaa ja nimettyä entiteettitunnistusta ja huomautuksia neljältä eri foorumilta. Jokainen näistä foorumeista muodostaa oman "hienojakoisen verkkotunnuksensa", sillä foorumit kattavat eri markkinasektoreita, joilla on erilaiset ominaisuudet, vaikka kaikki foorumit ovat laajalti tietoverkkorikollisuuden alalla. Näitä toimialueen eroja luonnehdimme oppimispohjaisen järjestelmän kontekstissa: valvottujen mallien tarkkuus heikkenee uusilla foorumeilla sovellettaessa, ja standarditekniikat puoliohjattuun oppimiseen ja toimialueen sopeutumiseen ovat rajallisia, mikä viittaa tarpeeseen parantaa näitä tekniikoita. Julkaisemme aineiston 1 938 kommentoidusta viestistä neljältä foorumilta.', 'id': "Salah satu kelemahan dari model NLP yang dipelajari oleh mesin adalah bahwa mereka biasanya melakukan yang buruk pada data luar domain. In this work, we study the task of identifying products being bought and sold in online cybercrime forums, which exhibits particularly challenging cross-domain effects.  We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums.  Each of these forums constitutes its own 'fine-grained domain' in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime.  Kami menggambarkan perbedaan domain ini dalam konteks sistem berdasarkan belajar: model yang diawasi melihat kecurangan akurasi ketika diterapkan pada forum baru, dan teknik standar untuk belajar semi-mengawasi dan adaptasi domain memiliki efektifitas terbatas pada data ini, yang menunjukkan kebutuhan untuk meningkatkan teknik ini. Kami melepaskan dataset 1.938 pos yang dicatat dari seberang empat forum.", 'sq': "One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data.  Në këtë punë, ne studiojmë detyrën e identifikimit të prodhimeve që janë blerë dhe shitur në forume interneti të kriminalit kibernetik, që ekspozon efekte veçanërisht sfiduese ndër-domeni. We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums.  Each of these forums constitutes its own 'fine-grained domain' in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime.  Ne karakterizojmë këto dallime në fushë në kontekstin e një sistemi të bazuar në mësim: modelet e mbikqyrur shohin pakësimin e saktësisë kur aplikohen në forume të reja dhe teknikat standarde për mësimin gjysmë-mbikqyrur dhe përshtatjen e fushës kanë efektivitet të kufizuar në këto të dhëna, që sugjerojnë nevojën për përmirësimin e këtyre teknikave Ne lëshojmë një grup të dhënash prej 1,938 postimeve të anotuara nga të katër forumet.", 'ca': 'One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data.  En aquesta feina estudiem la tasca d\'identificar productes que es compren i venen en fòrums de cibercriminalitat on-line, que mostra efectes transdomínics particularment desafiants. We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums.  Cada un d\'aquests fòrums constitueix el seu propi domini "fins grains" en que els fòrums cobreixen diferents sectors de mercat amb propietats diferents, encara que tots els fòrums estàn en el domini ampli de la cibercriminalitat. We characterize these domain differences in the context of a learning-based system: supervised models see decreased accuracy when applied to new forums, and standard techniques for semi-supervised learning and domain adaptation have limited effectiveness on this data, which suggests the need to improve these techniques.  We release a dataset of 1,938 annotated posts from across the four forums.', 'sk': 'Ena slabost strojno učenih modelov NLP je, da običajno slabo delujejo na zunajdomenskih podatkih. V tem delu preučujemo nalogo identifikacije izdelkov, ki se kupujejo in prodajajo na spletnih forumih kibernetskega kriminala, ki kažejo posebej zahtevne meddomenske učinke. Oblikujemo nalogo, ki predstavlja hibrid pridobivanja informacij o polnjenju rež in prepoznavanja imenovanih entitet ter opombe podatkov iz štirih različnih forumov. Vsak od teh forumov predstavlja svojo "drobnozrnato domeno", saj forumi pokrivajo različne tržne sektorje z različnimi lastnostmi, čeprav so vsi forumi na širokem področju kibernetskega kriminala. Te domenske razlike smo označili v kontekstu učnega sistema: nadzorovani modeli vidijo zmanjšano natančnost pri uporabi novih forumov, standardne tehnike za polnadzorovano učenje in domensko prilagajanje pa imajo omejeno učinkovitost teh podatkov, kar kaže na potrebo po izboljšanju teh tehnik. Objavljamo podatkovni nabor 1.938 objav z oznakami iz štirih forumov.', 'ha': "Babu wani rauni daga misãlai na NLP wanda aka sanar da shi na mashine yana cẽwa, ana yi amfani da su a bayan bayani kan data wanda ba ya fita ba. Daga wannan aikin, Munã karanta aikin su gane manunukan an sayar da su kuma an sayar da su a cikin jukwarar makorari masu miteten mitandaki, da abin da ke nuna masu hasara ga fassarar-mutane. Mu ƙiƙira wani aikin wanda ke wakinsa da wata hibri na samun shiryarwa da ake cikawa information kuma ana sunan shaidar abun da ke gane da kuma za'a zartar da data daga wasu jama'a huɗu daban. Ga kõwa daga waɗannan jujjuyawa yana da `haihuwa' da yake, a cikinsa, jama'a sunã rufe shugabanni dabam-daban, kuma kõ da yaushe dukkan jama'a sun cikin dukkan halin na cyberta. Kana ƙayyade waɗannan diffuka cikin muhalli na tsari a kan wani tsari mai amfani da shi: misalin da aka tsare su suna ƙara tsari idan an applied zuwa zanen kwanan, kuma masu shiryi masu daidaita matsayin da aka tsare wa lõkaci na ƙara-da-tsari, sun ƙayyade zai yi amfani da shi kan wannan zaluman, yana son ya ƙara amfani da waɗancan technical. Munã sakar da takardar da aka sanar da 1,938 daga duk jama'a huɗu.", 'jv': "One weakness of device-Learn NLP modes is that we often do pool on out-of-domain data. Nang iki trabah, kita sijenis arep nggambar obah-obahan kanggo ngilanggar nggambar obah-obahan sing nyimpen lan winih online We formate a task that represents a HyBridge of slot-filling information extract and Named Enty All of this forams are the same 'Fin-cered domain' in that the forams Cover Variable Merch sektores with Variable Quality, ATANH, all forams are in the expanded domain of cibercrime. We character this domain gaps in the context of a Learn-basic System: super Vised modes see minimed exactness when used to new forns, and Standard Methods for semi Awak dhéwé ngembukake dataset sing 1.", 'he': 'חולשה אחת של דוגמני NLP ללמודים מכונות היא שהם בדרך כלל מבצעים רע על נתונים מחוץ לתחום. בעבודה הזו, אנו לומדים את המשימה של לזהות מוצרים שקונים ומוכרים בפורומים של פשע סייברנטי באינטרנט, אשר מראה תופעות מעבר לתחום מאתגרות במיוחד. אנו מייצגים משימה שמייצגת היבריד של חיפוש מידע מילוי קופסאות ושם זיהוי ישות ומציג מידע מארבעה פורמים שונים. כל אחד מהפורמות האלה מייצר את התחום שלה של "עגבנים יפים" שבה הפורמות מכילים מגזרים שונים בשוק עם תכונות שונות, למרות שכל הפורמות נמצאים בתחום הרחב של פשע סייבר. אנו מאפיינים את ההבדלים האלה בתוך הקשר של מערכת מבוססת ללמוד: דוגמנים מבוקשים רואים מדויקת מופחדת כאשר הופעלה לפורומים חדשים, וטכניקות סטנדרטיות ללמוד חצי מבוקשת אנחנו משחררים קבוצת נתונים של 1,938 משימות מוסרות מעבר לארבע הפורומים.', 'bo': "One weakness of machine-learned NLP models is that they typically perform poorly on out-of-domain data. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་འཐབ་ལམ་གྱི་གྲོང་ཁྱེར་ནང་གི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་བསླད་ཐུབ་པའི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དང་། འདི་གིས་ཁྱད་པར་གན We formulate a task that represents a hybrid of slot-filling information extraction and named entity recognition and annotate data from four different forums. Each of these forums constitutes its own 'fine-grained domain' in that the forums cover different market sectors with different properties, even though all forums are in the broad domain of cybercrime. We characterize these domain differences in the context of a learning-based system: supervised models see decreased accuracy when applied to new forums, and standard techniques for semi-supervised learning and domain adaptation have limited effectiveness on this data, which suggests the need to improve these techniques. ང་ཚོས་བྲིས་ཆ་ཕྲན་ཞིག་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་མཁའ་དབུགས་ཆ་༡༣༨་ཡིན་པས།"}
{'en': 'Labeling Gaps Between Words : Recognizing Overlapping Mentions with Mention Separators', 'ar': 'وضع العلامات على الفجوات بين الكلمات: التعرف على الإشارات المتداخلة باستخدام فواصل الإشارة', 'es': 'Etiquetar brechas entre palabras: reconocer menciones superpuestas con separadores de menciones', 'pt': 'Rotulando lacunas entre palavras: reconhecendo menções sobrepostas com separadores de menção', 'fr': 'Étiquetage des espaces entre les mots\xa0: reconnaissance des mentions superposées avec des séparateurs de mention', 'ja': '単語間のギャップのラベル付け：メンションセパレーターで重複するメンションを認識する', 'zh': '标单词间:用提及分隔符识重提', 'hi': 'शब्दों के बीच अंतराल लेबलिंग: उल्लेख विभाजक के साथ अतिव्यापी उल्लेखों को पहचानना', 'ru': 'Маркировка пробелов между словами: распознавание перекрывающихся упоминаний с помощью разделителей упоминаний', 'ga': 'Bearnaí a Lipéadú Idir Focail: Ag Aithint Luaithreacha Forluiteacha le Deighilteoirí Lua', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შორის მარცხენა: მენუსის განყოფილებელი მენუსების განაცნობა', 'hu': 'Szavak közötti hiányosságok címkézése: Az átfedő említések felismerése említési elválasztókkal', 'el': 'Επισήμανση κενών μεταξύ λέξεων: Αναγνώριση επικαλυπτόμενων αναφορών με διαχωριστές αναφορών', 'it': 'Gaps tra le parole: riconoscere le menzioni sovrapposte con i separatori di menzioni', 'lt': 'Žymėjimo skirtumai tarp žodžių: paminėjimų viršijimo pripažinimas paminėjimų atskyrimu', 'mk': 'Обележувањето на разлики помеѓу зборовите: признавање на спомените кои се прекриваат со спомените со разделувачи', 'kk': 'Сөздер арасындағы белгілеу аралығы: Мәзір бөлгішілерден қайталанатын мәзірлерді таңдау', 'ms': 'Labeling Gaps Between Words: Recognizing Overlapping Mention with Mention Separators', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d ഗാപ്സുകള്\u200d: മെനേഷന്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് മെനുവിനുള്ള വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d മേ', 'mn': 'Өөр хоорондын загвар тэмдэглэх: Цэсийн хуваагдагчидтай давхарлах цэсийг танихыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх', 'no': 'Merkingsmellomrom mellom ord: Kjenner overlapping- menyane med menyskilder', 'mt': 'Nuqqasijiet fit-tikkettar bejn il-kliem: Ir-rikonoxximent ta’ Menzjonijiet li jaqbżu s-Separaturi tal-Menzjoni', 'pl': 'Etykietowanie luk między słowami: rozpoznawanie nakładających się wymienień za pomocą separatorów wymienień', 'ro': 'Diferențele de etichetare între cuvinte: recunoașterea mențiunilor suprapuse cu separatorii de mențiuni', 'sr': 'Обележујући помеђу речи: признавајући помене прекрепљивања са разделеницима помена', 'sv': 'Märkningsgap mellan ord: känna igen överlappande omnämnanden med omnämningsseparatorer', 'so': 'Aqoonshaha qoraalka ah ee hadallada dhexe: Aqoonshaha Overlapping Menus with Mention Separators', 'si': 'වචන අතර ලේබෙලින් ස්ථානය: මතක වෙනස් සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න', 'ta': 'வார்த்தைகளுக்கிடையில் வரிசைப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'کلمات کے درمیان لیبلینگ گاپ کرتا ہے: ذکر جدائی کرنے والوں کے ساتھ اوپر لپ کرنے والے منسونوں کو پہچان لیتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Vị trí nhãn giữa các từ: nhận dạng trí nhớ hở ra với phân tách tâm thần', 'bg': 'Етикетиране на пропасти между думите: разпознаване на припокриващи се споменания с разделители за споменаване', 'da': 'Mærkning af kløft mellem ord: Genkendelse af overlappende omtaler med nævnelsesseparatorer', 'nl': 'Labeling Gaps tussen woorden: Overlappende vermeldingen herkennen met vermeldingsscheiders', 'hr': 'Označenje otpora između riječi: prepoznavanje razmišljanja o preklapanju s razdvajateljima pamćenja', 'id': 'Labeling Gaps Between Words: Recognizing Overlapping Mentions with Mention Separators', 'de': 'Beschriftungslücken zwischen Wörtern: Erkennen überlappender Erwähnungen mit Erwähnungstrennern', 'ko': '단어 사이의 간격 표시: 언급 구분자를 사용하여 겹치는 언급을 식별합니다', 'fa': 'برچسب\u200cهای بین کلمات: شناختن غوراوی تغییر\u200cزدن با جداکندگان یادآوری', 'tr': 'sözler arasynda ýazmak Gaýtalary: Menüň Aýratçylar bilen Iňlap Menüleri tanamak', 'sw': 'Gazeti la kudhalilisha Mitandao ya maneno: Kutambua Mawazo ya Kuzunguka kwa Kutofautiana na Mengo', 'af': 'Labeling Gappe tussen woorde: Herkenning Oorvloei Kieslysse met Kieslys Skeier', 'sq': 'Labeling Gaps Between Words: Recognizing Overlapping Mentions with Mention Separators', 'am': 'ቃላት', 'hy': 'Բառերի միջև գտնվող պիտակների բացահայտումները. հայտնաբերելով հիշողությունների բաժանիչների միջև գտնվող հիշողությունները', 'az': 'Sözlər arasındakı etiketlər: Məktub ayırıcıları ilə aşağılıq Menülərini tanıyır', 'bn': 'শব্দের মধ্যে লেবেলিং গ্যাপস: মেনু বিভাগের সাথে মেনুষগুলোকে স্বীকার করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Etiketa između riječi: prepoznavanje prijedloga preklapanja sa sjećanjima', 'ca': 'Etiquetar les diferències entre les paraules: Recognir les mencions sobrepassades amb separadors de mencions', 'cs': 'Popisování mezer mezi slovy: Rozpoznání překrývajících se zmínek s oddělovači zmínek', 'et': 'Märgistamine Lõhed sõnade vahel: ülekaaluliste märkuste äratundmine mainimise eraldajatega', 'fi': 'Etiketing Gaps Between Words: Ylimääräisten mainintojen tunnistaminen mainintojen erottimilla', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'גיבוי חסרות בין מילים: זיהוי זיכרונות מעטפים עם מפרדי זיכרונות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Označevanje vrzeli med besedami: prepoznavanje prekrivanja omenitev z ločevalniki omenitev', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་གི་བར་སྟོང་པར། ཡི་གེ་དབར་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་། Mention Separators་དང་མཚོན་རྟགས་བསུབ་ཀྱི་འདེམས་ཐོ་དང་འབྲེལ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a new model that is capable of recognizing overlapping mentions. We introduce a novel notion of mention separators that can be effectively used to capture how mentions overlap with one another. On top of a novel multigraph representation that we introduce, we show that efficient and exact inference can still be performed. We present some theoretical analysis on the differences between our model and a recently proposed model for recognizing overlapping mentions, and discuss the possible implications of the differences. Through extensive empirical analysis on standard datasets, we demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا قادرًا على التعرف على الإشارات المتداخلة. نقدم مفهومًا جديدًا لفواصل الإشارة التي يمكن استخدامها بشكل فعال لالتقاط كيفية تداخل الإشارات مع بعضها البعض. علاوة على تمثيل متعدد الرسوم الجديد الذي نقدمه ، نظهر أنه لا يزال من الممكن إجراء الاستدلال الفعال والدقيق. نقدم بعض التحليلات النظرية حول الاختلافات بين نموذجنا والنموذج المقترح مؤخرًا للتعرف على الإشارات المتداخلة ، ومناقشة الآثار المحتملة للاختلافات. من خلال التحليل التجريبي الشامل على مجموعات البيانات القياسية ، نظهر فعالية نهجنا.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo modelo que es capaz de reconocer menciones superpuestas. Presentamos una noción novedosa de separadores de menciones que se pueden utilizar eficazmente para captar cómo las menciones se superponen entre sí. Además de una novedosa representación multigráfica que presentamos, mostramos que aún se puede realizar una inferencia eficiente y exacta. Presentamos algunos análisis teóricos sobre las diferencias entre nuestro modelo y un modelo propuesto recientemente para reconocer las menciones superpuestas, y discutimos las posibles implicaciones de las diferencias. A través de un amplio análisis empírico de conjuntos de datos estándar, demostramos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um novo modelo capaz de reconhecer menções sobrepostas. Apresentamos uma nova noção de separadores de menção que podem ser efetivamente usados para capturar como as menções se sobrepõem umas às outras. Além de uma nova representação multigrafada que apresentamos, mostramos que inferências eficientes e exatas ainda podem ser realizadas. Apresentamos algumas análises teóricas sobre as diferenças entre nosso modelo e um modelo recentemente proposto para reconhecer menções sobrepostas e discutimos as possíveis implicações das diferenças. Por meio de extensa análise empírica em conjuntos de dados padrão, demonstramos a eficácia de nossa abordagem.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau modèle capable de reconnaître les mentions qui se chevauchent. Nous introduisons une nouvelle notion de séparateurs de mentions qui peut être utilisée efficacement pour saisir la façon dont les mentions se chevauchent les unes avec les autres. En plus de la nouvelle représentation multigraphique que nous présentons, nous montrons qu'il est toujours possible d'effectuer une inférence efficace et exacte. Nous présentons une analyse théorique des différences entre notre modèle et un modèle récemment proposé pour reconnaître les mentions qui se chevauchent, et nous discutons des implications possibles de ces différences. Grâce à une analyse empirique approfondie sur des ensembles de données standard, nous démontrons l'efficacité de notre approche.", 'ja': '本稿では、重複する言及を認識できる新たなモデルを提案する。我々は、言及が互いに重なり合う方法を取り込むために効果的に使用できる、言及セパレータの新しい概念を紹介します。私たちが紹介する新規のマルチグラフ表現に加えて、効率的で正確な推論がまだ実行できることを示しています。私たちは、私たちのモデルと最近提案された重複する言及を認識するためのモデルとの間の違いについていくつかの理論的分析を提示し、その違いの可能性のある影響について議論します。標準データセットに関する広範な実証的分析を通じて、私たちはアプローチの有効性を実証します。', 'zh': '在本文中,我们发出一种能识别重重提及的新模样。 引入一新提及分隔符概,可以效用。 新颖多重图,吾证犹可推。 吾于吾形与近者别重提之异,而论其异者或可及也。 以数论之,以验其有效性。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक नए मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो ओवरलैपिंग उल्लेखों को पहचानने में सक्षम है। हम उल्लेख विभाजकों की एक उपन्यास धारणा पेश करते हैं जिसका उपयोग प्रभावी रूप से कैप्चर करने के लिए किया जा सकता है कि उल्लेख एक दूसरे के साथ ओवरलैप कैसे होता है। एक उपन्यास मल्टीग्राफ प्रतिनिधित्व के शीर्ष पर जो हम पेश करते हैं, हम दिखाते हैं कि कुशल और सटीक अनुमान अभी भी किया जा सकता है। हम ओवरलैपिंग उल्लेखों को पहचानने के लिए हमारे मॉडल और हाल ही में प्रस्तावित मॉडल के बीच के अंतर पर कुछ सैद्धांतिक विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और मतभेदों के संभावित निहितार्थों पर चर्चा करते हैं। मानक डेटासेट पर व्यापक अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण के माध्यम से, हम अपने दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы предлагаем новую модель, которая способна распознавать перекрывающиеся упоминания. Мы вводим новое понятие разделителей упоминания, которые могут быть эффективно использованы для захвата того, как упоминания перекрываются друг с другом. На вершине романного представления multigraph которое мы вводим, мы показываем что эффективное и точное заключение все еще может быть выполнено. Мы представляем теоретический анализ различий между нашей моделью и недавно предложенной моделью для распознавания перекрывающихся упоминаний и обсуждаем возможные последствия различий. Благодаря обширному эмпирическому анализу стандартных наборов данных мы демонстрируем эффективность нашего подхода.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla nua atá in ann tagairtí forluiteacha a aithint. Tugaimid isteach coincheap úr de dheighilteoirí lua ar féidir a úsáid go héifeachtach chun a fháil amach conas a fhorluíonn tagairtí lena chéile. Anuas ar léiriú ilghraf úrnua a thugaimid isteach, léirímid gur féidir tátal éifeachtach beacht a dhéanamh fós. Cuirimid roinnt anailíse teoiriciúil i láthair ar na difríochtaí idir ár múnla agus múnla a moladh le déanaí chun tagairtí forluiteacha a aithint, agus pléimid impleachtaí féideartha na ndifríochtaí. Trí anailís eimpíreach fhairsing ar thacair sonraí caighdeánacha, léirímid éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új modellt javasolunk, amely képes felismerni az átfedő említéseket. Bevezetjük az említési elválasztók új fogalmát, amelyek hatékonyan felhasználhatók arra, hogy rögzítsük, hogy az említések miként átfednek egymással. Az általunk bemutatott új multigráf ábrázolás mellett megmutatjuk, hogy hatékony és pontos következtetés még mindig elvégezhető. Bemutatunk néhány elméleti elemzést a modellünk és egy nemrégiben javasolt modell közötti különbségekről az átfedő említések felismerésére, és megvitatjuk a különbségek lehetséges következményeit. A standard adatkészletek kiterjedt empirikus elemzésével bizonyítjuk megközelítésünk hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο που είναι ικανό να αναγνωρίσει επικαλυπτόμενες αναφορές. Εισάγουμε μια νέα έννοια διαχωριστών αναφορών που μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν αποτελεσματικά για να καταγράψουν πώς επικαλύπτονται οι αναφορές μεταξύ τους. Πάνω από μια νέα αναπαράσταση πολλαπλών γραφημάτων που εισάγουμε, δείχνουμε ότι η αποτελεσματική και ακριβής συνάρτηση μπορεί ακόμα να εκτελεστεί. Παρουσιάζουμε μια θεωρητική ανάλυση των διαφορών μεταξύ του μοντέλου μας και ενός πρόσφατα προτεινόμενου μοντέλου αναγνώρισης επικαλυπτόμενων αναφορών και συζητάμε τις πιθανές επιπτώσεις των διαφορών. Μέσω εκτεταμένης εμπειρικής ανάλυσης σε τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων, καταδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naują model į, galintį pripažinti sutampančias mintis. Įdiegiame naują minčių atskyrimo sąvoką, kuri gali būti veiksmingai naudojama apibūdinant, kaip mintys tarpusavyje sutampa. Be naujos daugiagrafinės nuorodos, kurią pristatome, rodome, kad vis dar galima daryti veiksmingą ir tikslią išvadą. We present some theoretical analysis on the differences between our model and a recently proposed model for recognizing overlapping mentions, and discuss the possible implications of the differences.  Atlikus išsamią empirinę standartinių duomenų rinkinių analizę, įrodome savo požiūrio veiksmingumą.', 'it': "In questo articolo proponiamo un nuovo modello capace di riconoscere le menzioni sovrapposte. Introducemo una nuova nozione di separatori di menzioni che possono essere utilizzati efficacemente per catturare come le menzioni si sovrappongono tra loro. Oltre a una nuova rappresentazione multigrafica che introduciamo, mostriamo che l'inferenza efficiente ed esatta può ancora essere eseguita. Presentiamo alcune analisi teoriche sulle differenze tra il nostro modello e un modello recentemente proposto per riconoscere menzioni sovrapposte, e discutiamo le possibili implicazioni delle differenze. Attraverso un'ampia analisi empirica su set di dati standard, dimostriamo l'efficacia del nostro approccio.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаздың жаңа үлгісін табуға мүмкін. Біз бір-бірімізге қалай айналысатыны түсіндіру үшін қолданылатын жаңа бөлгіштердің түсіндіріміз. Біз келтірген романдық көп графикалық түсініктердің жоғарында, әлі ефективті және дұрыс түсініктердің жұмыс істеуге болады. Біз моделіміздің түрлендіріміздің теориялық анализ және жаңа ұсынылған үлгілеріміздің түрлендіріміздің түрлендірілігін таңдап, түрлендіріміздің мүмкіндігін талқылап Стандартты деректер қорларының көптеген эмпирикалық анализ арқылы, өзіміздің әсерілігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник предложуваме нов модел кој е способен да ги препознае прекривачките спомени. Ние воведуваме нова идеја за споменување на сепаратори кои може ефикасно да се користат за да се сфати како спомените се прекриваат меѓусебно. On top of a novel multigraph representation that we introduce, we show that efficient and exact inference can still be performed.  Презентираме некоја теоретска анализа за разликите помеѓу нашиот модел и неодамна предложен модел за признавање на прекривачки спомени, и разговараме за можните импликации на разликите. Со екстремна емпириска анализа на стандардните податоци, ја покажуваме ефикасноста на нашиот пристап.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model baru yang mampu mengenali sebutan yang meliputi. Kami memperkenalkan idea baru tentang pemisah sebutan yang boleh digunakan secara efektif untuk menangkap bagaimana sebutan saling berkumpul. Di atas mewakili multigraf novel yang kami perkenalkan, kami menunjukkan bahawa kesimpulan yang efisien dan tepat masih boleh dilakukan. Kami memperkenalkan beberapa analisis teori tentang perbezaan antara model kami dan model yang baru-baru ini direncanakan untuk mengenali sebutan yang meliputi, dan membincangkan implikasi kemungkinan perbezaan. Melalui analisis empirik yang luas pada set data piawai, kita menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan kita.', 'mt': "In this paper, we propose a new model that is capable of recognizing overlapping mentions.  Aħna nintroduċu kunċett ġdid ta’ separaturi ta’ referenza li jistgħu jintużaw b’mod effettiv biex jinqabdu kif issemmi jikkoinċidu ma’ xulxin. Minbarra rappreżentanza multigrafika ġdida li nintroduċu, nuru li għadha tista’ ssir inferenza effiċjenti u eżatta. Aħna nippreżentaw xi analiżi teoretika dwar id-differenzi bejn il-mudell tagħna u mudell propost reċentement għar-rikonoxximent ta' menzjonijiet li jikkoinċidu, u niddiskutu l-implikazzjonijiet possibbli tad-differenzi. Permezz ta’ analiżi empirika estensiva dwar settijiet ta’ dejta standard, nippruvaw l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ загварыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой. Бид өөрсдийгөө хэрхэн дурдаж байгааг ойлгохын тулд хэрэглэгдэж болно гэсэн үг хуваагдагчдын шинэ санааг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний танилцуулсан шинэ олон график зураг дээр бид үр дүнтэй, яг л инфекцийн үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид загварын хоорондох ялгаа болон саяхан дэвшүүлсэн загварын хоорондох теоретикийн шинжилгээг тайлбарлаж, өөрчлөлтийн боломжтой нөлөөлөлүүдийг харуулж байна. Стандарттай өгөгдлийн сангийн маш их эмперикийн шинжилгээнд бид өөрсдийн арга баримтын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് മുകളിലുള്ള ഉദ്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴ വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്ന വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയുന്നവരെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ഒരു നോവലിനെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് പ്ര നമ്മള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു നോവലിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, അതിന്റെ ശക്തിയും കൃത്യമായ അപകടത്തിനും പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെയും അടുത്തുതന്നെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമിടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന സാധാരണ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ വിശാലമായ ശ്രദ്ധ കൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചുക', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ახალი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც შეუძლებელია აღმოჩნოთ შესაძლებელი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ პრომენტის აღწერა, რომელიც შეიძლება ეფექტიურად გამოიყენება, როგორ ამბობენ ერთმანეთს გადარჩენა. პრომენტის მულტიგრაფიური გამოსახულებაზე, რომელიც ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოსახულებთ, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეფექტიური და დარწმუნებული ინფრენცია იქნება. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის განსხვავებას და ახლა მხოლოდ მოდელის განსხვავებას ჩვენ თეორეტიკური ანალიზაციას ჩვენ მოდელის განსხვავებას და განსხვავებების შესაძლებელი განსხვავებას გან უფრო დიდი ემპერიკალური ანალიზაციით სტანდარტული დეტატისტებზე, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობა.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy model, który jest w stanie rozpoznać nakładające się wzmianki. Wprowadzamy nowe pojęcie separatorów wzmianek, które można skutecznie wykorzystać do uchwycenia sposobu nakładania się wzmianek. Oprócz nowej reprezentacji wielograficznej, którą wprowadzamy, pokazujemy, że efektywne i dokładne wnioskowanie nadal można wykonać. Przedstawiamy teoretyczną analizę różnic między naszym modelem a ostatnio zaproponowanym modelem rozpoznawania nakładających się wzmianek oraz omówimy możliwe implikacje tych różnic. Poprzez szeroką analizę empiryczną standardowych zbiorów danych demonstrujemy skuteczność naszego podejścia.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi eit ny modell som kan gjenkjenne overlapping. Vi introduserer eit nytt notat på minningsverdiar som kan brukast til å henta korleis minningar overlappar med ein annan. På toppen av eit nytt multigraf-representasjon vi introduserer, viser vi at effektivt og nøyaktig infeksjon kan fortsatt utførast. Vi presenterer nokre teoretiske analyse om forskjellene mellom vårt modell og eit nyleg foreslått modell for å gjenkjenne overlapping minningar, og diskuterer dei mulige implikasjonane av forskjellene. Med utvida empirisk analyse på standardsetar viser vi effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem un nou model capabil să recunoască mențiunile suprapuse. Introducem o noțiune nouă de separatori de mențiuni care pot fi utilizate eficient pentru a surprinde modul în care mențiunile se suprapun unul cu altul. Pe lângă o nouă reprezentare multigrafică pe care o introducem, arătăm că inferența eficientă și exactă poate fi încă efectuată. Prezentăm o analiză teoretică a diferențelor dintre modelul nostru și un model propus recent pentru recunoașterea mențiunilor suprapuse și discutăm posibilele implicații ale diferențelor. Prin analiza empirică amplă a seturilor de date standard, demonstrăm eficacitatea abordării noastre.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපි කොහොමද කියන්නේ කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ විදිහට සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම සහ හැකිය අපි අපේ මොඩල් අතර වෙනස් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා අවස්ථ ස්ථානික දත්ත සැට් ගැන විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාව', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model koji je sposoban prepoznati spomena preklapanja. Predstavljamo novu ideju o razdvajateljima spominjanja koja se može efektivno iskoristiti da uhvatimo kako se spominje preoklapaju jedni sa drugima. Na vrhu romanske multigrafske predstave koje predstavljamo pokazujemo da se još uvek može izvršiti efikasna i tačna infekcija. Predstavljamo teoretičku analizu o razlicama između našeg model a i nedavno predloženog modela za priznanje spomena o preklapanju i razgovaramo o mogućim implikacijama razlika. Kroz ogromnu empiričku analizu standardnih podataka, pokazujemo efikasnost našeg pristupa.', 'so': "Warqadan waxan ka soo jeedaynaa model cusub oo awoodi kara inuu aqoonsado macluumaadka kor-qaadashada. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa fikrada warqada ah oo ku saabsan dadka kala soocaya, taas oo si faa’iido ah u isticmaali karta sida ay isugu daboolaan hadalka. Qoraalka warqada badan ee aan soo bandhijino, waxaynu muujinnaa in dhibaato faa’iido leh oo saxda ah weli la sameyn karo. Waxaannu sameynaa baaritaanka cilmiga ah oo ku saabsan kala duwanaanshaha modellkayaga iyo model la soo jeeday ee la aqoonsado kalluumeynta kor-qaadashada, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa saamaynta kala duwan ee suurtagalka ah. Analyo faa'iido dheer ah oo ku saabsan sawirada standardka, waxaynu muujinnaa shaqaalaha qaababkayaga.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny modell som kan erkänna överlappande omnämnanden. Vi introducerar ett nytt begrepp om omnämningsseparatorer som effektivt kan användas för att fånga hur omnämningar överlappar varandra. Utöver en ny multigrafrepresentation som vi introducerar visar vi att effektiv och exakt inferens fortfarande kan utföras. Vi presenterar en teoretisk analys av skillnaderna mellan vår modell och en nyligen föreslagen modell för att erkänna överlappande omnämnanden, och diskuterar eventuella konsekvenser av skillnaderna. Genom omfattande empirisk analys av standarddataset visar vi hur effektivt vårt tillvägagångssätt är.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது மேல் பெரிய குறிப்புகளை அறிந்து கொ பிரிப்பாளர்களை குறிப்பிடுவதை நாம் ஒரு புதிய நினைவூட்டலை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது எவ்வாறு குறிப்புகள் ஒருவர் மற் நாம் அறிவிக்கிறோம் என்று ஒரு புதையத்தின் மேல் பல்கட்டாரத்தின் பிரதிநிதியத்தில், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அது தேவையான நாங்கள் எங்கள் மாதிரி மற்றும் சமீபத்தில் ஒரு மாதிரியின் வேறுபாடுகளை அறிந்து கொள்ள சில தியூரியல் ஆய்வுகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், மற்றும நிலையான தரவுத்தளத்தின் விரிவான உச்சரிப்பு மூலம், நாம் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو اورلپ پڑھنے کے ذکر پہچان سکتی ہے۔ ہم ایک نئی نظریہ پیش کریں گے جو ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ مفصل کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ایک نومین متلیگراف نمایش کے اوپر جو ہم معرفی کرتے ہیں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ اثبات اور دقیق غلطی ابھی بھی کر سکتے ہیں. ہم نے ہمارے مدل کے درمیان تفریق کے بارے میں بہت سی نظریاتی تحلیل پیش کیے ہیں اور ایک اخیر پیش کیے ہوئے مدل کے بارے میں اورلپ پینگ کے ذکر کو پہچان لینے کے لئے اور اختلاف کے ممکن اثرات کے بارے میں بحث کریں۔ استاندارد ڈاٹسٹ کے بارے میں بہت زیادہ امپریکل تحلیل کے ذریعہ، ہم اپنے طریقے کے اقتدار کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz bir yangi modelni ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz ajratuvchilar haqida yangi g'oyalarni anglatamiz. Bu o'ylab, bir-бирлари bilan birga qanday qo'llanilish mumkin. Ko'pchilik darajadagi ko'pchilik tashkilotlarida, biz ko'rinishimizni ko'rsatdik, cheksiz va haqiqiqiy kasallik hamda bajarishi mumkin. Biz modelmizning orasidagi o'zgarishlarimiz va yaqinda o'ylangan modelni aniqlash uchun bir necha teoretikal analyzerni hozir qilamiz va o'zgarishlar muvaffaqiyatlarini qidirish mumkin. Andoza maʼlumotlar tarkibida juda katta muvaffaqiyatli aniqlash orqali biz usulning effektligini ko'rsatdik.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mới có khả năng nhận ra sự chồng chéo đề cập. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một khái niệm mới về các phân tách đề cập có thể được dùng để nắm bắt cách nói về sự chồng chéo. Bên cạnh các mô tả đa đồ tiểu sử mà chúng tôi giới thiệu, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng kết quả hiệu quả và chính xác vẫn có thể được thực hiện. Chúng tôi đưa ra một số bài phân tích lý thuyết về sự khác biệt giữa mô hình của chúng tôi và một mô hình vừa đề xuất để nhận ra sự chồng chéo, và thảo luận về những tác động có thể của sự khác biệt. Bằng một phân tích đầy kinh nghiệm về các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn, chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả phương pháp này.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw model voor dat overlappende vermeldingen kan herkennen. We introduceren een nieuw concept van vermeldingsscheiders die effectief kunnen worden gebruikt om vast te leggen hoe vermeldingen elkaar overlappen. Bovenop een nieuwe multigraph representatie die we introduceren, laten we zien dat efficiënte en nauwkeurige inferentie nog steeds kan worden uitgevoerd. We presenteren een theoretische analyse van de verschillen tussen ons model en een recent voorgesteld model voor het herkennen van overlappende vermeldingen, en bespreken de mogelijke implicaties van de verschillen. Door uitgebreide empirische analyse van standaard datasets tonen we de effectiviteit van onze aanpak aan.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny model, der er i stand til at anerkende overlappende omtaler. Vi introducerer et nyt begreb om nævnelsesseparatorer, der effektivt kan bruges til at fange, hvordan nævnelser overlapper hinanden. Ud over en ny multigrafrepræsentation, som vi introducerer, viser vi, at effektiv og præcis udledning stadig kan udføres. Vi præsenterer nogle teoretiske analyser af forskellene mellem vores model og en nyligt foreslået model til anerkendelse af overlappende omtaler, og diskuterer de mulige konsekvenser af forskellene. Gennem en omfattende empirisk analyse af standarddatasæt demonstrerer vi effektiviteten af vores tilgang.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neues Modell vor, das in der Lage ist, überlappende Erwähnungen zu erkennen. Wir stellen einen neuartigen Begriff von Erwähnungstrennern vor, mit dem effektiv erfasst werden kann, wie Erwähnungen sich überlappen. Zusätzlich zu einer neuartigen Multigraphendarstellung, die wir einführen, zeigen wir, dass effiziente und exakte Inferenzen immer noch durchgeführt werden können. Wir präsentieren einige theoretische Analysen zu den Unterschieden zwischen unserem Modell und einem kürzlich vorgeschlagenen Modell zur Erkennung überlappender Erwähnungen und diskutieren die möglichen Implikationen der Unterschiede. Durch umfangreiche empirische Analysen an Standarddatensätzen demonstrieren wir die Effektivität unseres Ansatzes.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model baru yang mampu mengakui hal-hal yang berlapis. Kami memperkenalkan gagasan baru tentang pembisah menyebutkan yang dapat digunakan secara efektif untuk menangkap bagaimana menyebutkan saling bergabung. Di atas sebuah representation multigrafi novel yang kami perkenalkan, kami menunjukkan bahwa kesimpulan efisien dan tepat masih dapat dilakukan. Kami mempersembahkan beberapa analisis teori tentang perbedaan antara model kami dan model yang baru-baru ini diusulkan untuk mengakui perbedaan menyebutkan, dan mendiskusikan implikasi kemungkinan perbedaan. Melalui analisis empiris ekstensif pada set data standar, kita menunjukkan efektif pendekatan kita.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که قادر به شناسایی اشاره\u200cهای متفاوت است. ما یک مفهوم رمانی از جدا کنندگان یادآوری را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند به طور موثر استفاده شود تا بگیریم که چگونه اشاره می\u200cکنند با یکدیگر متفاوت می\u200cشوند. بالای یک نمایش چند گراف روانی که ما معرفی می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که هنوز آلودگی موثر و دقیق می\u200cتواند انجام شود. ما برخی از تحلیل نظریه\u200cای در مورد تفاوت بین مدل ما و یک مدل پیشنهاد اخیرا برای شناسایی اشاره\u200cهای تفاوت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و درباره\u200cی اثرات ممکن تفاوت\u200cها بحث می\u200cکنیم. از طریق تحلیل عمومی وسیع در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد، فعالیت روش ما را نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 중첩된 언급을 식별할 수 있는 새로운 모델을 제시했다.우리는 언급 구분자에 대한 새로운 개념을 도입하여 언급 간의 중첩을 효과적으로 포착할 수 있다.우리가 소개한 새로운 다중 도표 표시법을 토대로 우리는 여전히 효과적이고 정확한 추리를 할 수 있음을 증명하였다.우리는 우리의 모델과 최근에 제기된 식별이 중첩되어 언급된 모델 간의 차이에 대해 이론적 분석을 하고 이러한 차이가 가져올 수 있는 영향에 대해 토론했다.표준 데이터 집합에 대한 광범위한 실증 분석을 통해 우리는 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model koji je sposoban priznati spomena preklapanja. Predstavljamo novu ideju o razdvajateljima spominjanih koji se mogu učinkovito iskoristiti da uhvatimo kako se spominje preklapaju jedni drugima. Na vrhu novog višegrafskog predstavljanja koje predstavljamo pokazujemo da se još uvijek može provesti učinkovita i tačna infekcija. Predstavljamo teorijsku analizu o razlikama između našeg model a i nedavno predloženog modela za prepoznavanje spomena o preklapanju i raspravljamo o mogućim posljedicama razlika. Kroz ogromnu empiričku analizu o standardnim podacima pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме нов модел, способен да разпознава припокриващите се споменания. Въвеждаме ново понятие за разделители на споменавания, което може ефективно да се използва, за да се улови как споменаванията се припокриват помежду си. На върха на новото мултиграфно представяне, което въвеждаме, ние показваме, че ефективно и точно заключение все още може да се извърши. Представяме теоретичен анализ на разликите между нашия модел и наскоро предложен модел за разпознаване на припокриващи се споменания и обсъждаме възможните последици от разликите. Чрез обширен емпиричен анализ на стандартни набори от данни ние демонстрираме ефективността на нашия подход.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza muundo mpya ambao una uwezo wa kutambua majina ya juu. We introduce a novel notion of mention separators that can be effectively used to capture how mentions overlap with one another.  Kusini juu ya uwakilishi wa riwaya mbalimbali tunaoonyesha, tunaonyesha kuwa maambukizi yenye ufanisi na hasa bado yanaweza kutekelezwa. Tunatoa uchambuzi wa kidini kuhusu tofauti kati ya mifano yetu na modeli iliyopendekezwa hivi karibuni kwa kutambua majina ya juu, na kujadili matokeo yanayoweza tofauti. Kwa kupitia uchambuzi mkubwa wa hali ya msimamo wa taarifa za kawaida, tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu.', 'sq': 'NĂ« kĂ«tĂ« letĂ«r, ne propozojmĂ« njĂ« model tĂ« ri qĂ« Ă«shtĂ« nĂ« gjendje tĂ« njohĂ« pĂ«rmendime tĂ« mbishtypura. Ne paraqesim njĂ« koncept tĂ« ri pĂ«r tĂ« pĂ«rmendur separatorĂ«t qĂ« mund tĂ« pĂ«rdoren efektivisht pĂ«r tĂ« kapur se si pĂ«rmendet kapĂ«rcehen me njĂ«ri-tjetrin. NĂ« krye tĂ« njĂ« pĂ«rfaqĂ«simi tĂ« ri multigrafik qĂ« ne e prezantojmĂ«, ne tregojmĂ« se pĂ«rfundimi efektiv dhe ekzakt mund tĂ« kryehet ende. Ne paraqesim disa analiza teorike mbi dallimet midis modelit tonĂ« dhe njĂ« modeli tĂ« propozuar kohĂ«t e fundit pĂ«r njohjen e pĂ«rmendimeve tĂ« mbishtypura dhe diskutojmĂ« pasojat e mundshme tĂ« dallimeve. NĂ«pĂ«rmjet analizave tĂ« gjera empirike mbi tĂ« dhĂ«nat standarde, ne demonstrojmĂ« efektshmĂ«rinĂ« e qasjes sonĂ«.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe model wat is in staat om oorvloei mentione te herken. Ons introduseer 'n nuwe nodiging van minnerskeier wat effektief gebruik kan word om te neem hoe minneringe oorvloei met mekaar. Op die boonste van 'n roman multigraaf voorstelling wat ons voorstel, wys ons dat effektief en presies inferensie nog steeds kan uitgevoer word. Ons stel 'n paar teorieese analisie op die verskille tussen ons model en 'n onlangs voorgestelde model vir herken van oorvloediging mentione en bespreek die moontlike implikasies van die verskille. Deur uitbreidige empiriese analisie op standaard datastelle, wys ons die effektiviteit van ons toegang.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոդել, որը կարողանում է ճանաչել համեմատություններ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նշելու բաժանիչների նոր գաղափար, որը կարող է արդյունավետ օգտագործվել, որպեսզի հասկանանք, թե ինչպես են նշելները փոխկապակցվում միմյանց հետ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր բազմագծագրական ներկայացումի վրա ցույց ենք տալիս, որ արդյունավետ և ճշգրիտ եզրակացությունը դեռևս կարող է իրականացվել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք որոշ տեսական վերլուծություններ մեր մոդելի և վերջերս առաջարկված մոդելի տարբերությունների մասին, որպեսզի ճանաչենք համապատասխանող հիշողությունները և քննարկենք տարբերությունների հնարավոր հետևանքները: Through extensive empirical analysis on standard datasets, we demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda yeni bir modeli təbliğ edirik ki, a şağılıqlarını tanıyabilir. Biz yeni bir fikir göstəririk ki, bir-birimizlə növbənöv yazıldığını yaxınlaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Biz tanıdırdığımız yeni çoxlu grafik göstəricisinin üstündə, hələ də müvəffəqiyyəti və dəyişiklik a şağılığı göstəririk. Biz modelimiz arasındakı fərqlərdə və yenidən təklif edilmiş modelimiz arasındakı fərqlər barəsində teoriki analizi göstəririk və fərqlənənlərin mümkün müsəlmanlarını mübahisə edirik. Standart veri quruları barəsində böyük empirik analizi ilə, bizim tərəfimizin etkinliğini göstəririk.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যা মানুষকে অতিরিক্ত স্বীকার করতে সক্ষম। বিচ্ছিন্ন বিভাজনের কথা উল্লেখ করা একটি উপন্যাসের ধারণা আমরা উপস্থাপন করি যা কার্যকর ভাবে একে অপরের সাথে কিভাবে মানুষগু একটি উপন্যাসের মাল্টিগ্রাফের প্রতিনিধিত্বের উপরে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কার্যকর এবং সঠিক আক্রান্তি এখনও করা যাবে। আমরা আমাদের মডেলের মধ্যে পার্থক্য এবং সম্প্রতি প্রস্তাবিত একটি মডেল স্বীকৃতি জানানোর জন্য কিছু ততিত্ত্বিক বিশ্লেষণ উপস্থাপন করি এবং পার Through extensive empirical analysis on standard datasets, we demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model koji je sposoban prepoznati spomena preklapanja. Predstavljamo novu ideju o razdvajateljima spominjanja koja se može učinkovito iskoristiti da uhvatimo kako se spominje preoklapaju jedni sa drugima. Na vrhu romanske multigrafske predstave koje predstavljamo pokazujemo da se još uvek može izvršiti efikasna i tačna infekcija. Predstavljamo teoretsku analizu o razlicama između našeg model a i nedavno predloženog modela za priznanje spomena o preklapanju i raspravljamo o mogućim implikacijama razlika. Kroz ogromnu empiričku analizu o standardnim podacima, pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, üstüne geçmegi tanamak üçin täze bir nusga teklip edýäris. Biz a ňry bir ýagdaýda nähili ýagdaýynyň üstine geçirip biljek ýagdaýlary taýýarlamak üçin ullanýan täze bir düşünjeleri tanyşdyrýarys. Biz tanıdığımız bir multigrafik romanyň üstünde etkinlik we düzgün hasaplamak hala edip biljek şekilde gösteriyoruz. Biz modelimiz we ýakynda teklip eden çykyşlaryny tanamak üçin teoriýa analýusiýasyny we çykyşlaryň mümkin täsirlerini çykarýarys. Standart veri setirlerinde örän köp empirik analyzasyndan, özümiziň ýaryşymyzyň etkinliýetini görkezýäris.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም አዲስ ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተለየፉትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጠቅላላ ብዙኃን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በዓይነታችን እና በቅርብ ዘመን በሞዴል መካከል ያለውን ልዩነት እና የተዘጋጀውን ዓይነት ማወቅ እና የልዩነታችንን ማስታወቂያ የሚቻለውን ጥያቄ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪው የዳታ መስመር ማረፊያ፣ የሥርዓታችንን ጥያቄ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme nový model, který je schopen rozpoznat překrývající se zmínky. Představujeme nový pojem oddělovačů zmínek, které lze efektivně použít k zachycení toho, jak se zmínky vzájemně překrývají. Na vrcholu nové multigrafové reprezentace, kterou představujeme, ukazujeme, že efektivní a přesné odvození lze stále provádět. Předkládáme teoretickou analýzu rozdílů mezi naším modelem a nedávno navrženým modelem pro rozpoznání překrývajících se zmínek a diskutujeme možné důsledky těchto rozdílů. Prostřednictvím rozsáhlé empirické analýzy standardních datových sad demonstrujeme efektivitu našeho přístupu.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem un nou model capaç de reconèixer mencions sovrapposibles. We introduce a novel notion of mention separators that can be effectively used to capture how mentions overlap with one another.  A més d'una nova representació multigràfica que introduim, demostram que encara es pot fer una inferència eficient i exact a. Presentam alguna anàlisi teòrica sobre les diferències entre el nostre model i un model proposat recentment per reconèixer mencions sovrapposibles i discutir les possible implicacions de les diferències. A través d'una extensa anàlisi empírica dels conjunts de dades estàndard, demostram l'eficacia del nostre enfocament.", 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja uue mudeli, mis suudab ära tunda kattuvaid mainimisi. Me tutvustame uudset mõistet mainimise eraldajad, mida saab tõhusalt kasutada, et tabada, kuidas mainimised kattuvad üksteisega. Lisaks uudsele multigraafilisele esitusele, mida me tutvustame, näitame, et tõhusat ja täpset järeldust saab veel teha. Esitame teoreetilist analüüsi meie mudeli ja hiljuti välja pakutud mudeli erinevuste kohta kattuvate mainimiste tuvastamiseks ning arutame erinevuste võimalikke tagajärgi. Standardsete andmekogumite ulatusliku empiirilise analüüsi kaudu näitame oma lähenemisviisi efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta mallia, joka pystyy tunnistamaan päällekkäiset maininnat. Esittelemme uuden käsitteen mainintojen erottelijoista, joita voidaan tehokkaasti käyttää kuvaamaan, miten maininnat päällekkäistyvät keskenään. Esittelemme uuden monigraafisen esityksen lisäksi näytämme, että tehokas ja tarkka päätelmä voidaan vielä tehdä. Esitämme teoreettista analyysiä mallimme ja hiljattain ehdotetun mallin eroista päällekkäisten mainintojen tunnistamiseksi ja keskustelemme eroiden mahdollisista vaikutuksista. Standardiaineistojen laaja empiirinen analyysi osoittaa toimintamme tehokkuuden.', 'jv': 'Nanging mapang iki, kita supaya model sing gawe ngubah berkas dianggap Awak dhéwé nggunaké pertualangan anyari bagian nggawe geraluk Yuta neng pisan neng pisan neng dadi sing nyebatasané, kita ngomong nik pakan efes lan pakan barang sing bisa diangkat candi. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo hal-hal akeh theoretik banjuré itépak model nambah karo model sing gak dhéwé nggawe gerakan ingkang ngerasakno, karo perusahaan ngerasakno Dhewe ono wektu nggambar sistem empirhik kanggo awak dhéwé, kita ngomongke efekasi kanggo langgambar barang awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל חדש שיכול לזהות זיכרונות מתקפלים. We introduce a novel notion of mention separators that can be effectively used to capture how mentions overlap with one another.  בנוסף לייצג רומן multigraph שאנחנו מציגים, אנו מראים שהתוצאה יעילה ומדויקת עדיין יכולה להיות מבצעת. אנחנו מציגים כמה ניתוח תיאורטי על ההבדלים בין המודל שלנו ומודל הציע לאחרונה לזהות זיכרונות מתקפלים, ולדיון על השלכות האפשריות של ההבדלים. Through extensive empirical analysis on standard datasets, we demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata shekara mai iya iya ganin sunayen samu. Tuna fara wani littafi da za'a faɗa separator, da za'a iya amfani da su iya gane jinsi taɓallu za'a rufe da ɗayan. Saman wani mataimaki na nan masu ƙaranci da Muke nuna, za'a iya iya aikin zartar da kafaffi da haske. Tuna halatar da wani abu na littafi a kan sãɓãni tsakanin misalinmu da wata misãli wanda aka buƙata a yanzu-yanzu ya gane wa misãlai masu samu'in da za'a iya sani masu samu'in da za'a samu, kuma mu yi jayayya masu yiwuwa masu husu'a ga sãɓãni. Ga ƙidãya masu amfani da akan danna'a, za mu nuna mafiya amfani ga hanyarmu.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo nov model, ki je sposoben prepoznati prekrivajoče se omembe. Predstavljamo nov pojem ločevalcev omenitev, ki ga je mogoče učinkovito uporabiti za zajem, kako se omembe prekrivajo med seboj. Poleg novega večgrafskega predstavitve, ki ga predstavljamo, pokažemo, da je učinkovit in natančen sklep še vedno mogoče izvesti. Predstavljamo teoretično analizo razlik med našim modelom in nedavno predlaganim modelom prepoznavanja prekrivajočih se omemb ter razpravljamo o možnih posledicah razlik. Z obsežno empirično analizo standardnih naborov podatkov dokazujemo učinkovitost našega pristopa.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་དཔེ་གཞི་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ལ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་རྟོགས ང་ཚོས་བརྗེད་ཆས་པ་ཞིག་གི་དུས་ཚོད་གཞན་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པའི་བརྗེད་བྱ་ཚིག་གསར་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་གསར་བརྗོད་དུ་ཆ་རྩིས་བ་ཞིག་གི་ཐོག་ཏུ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་དུས་མཐུན་དང་ཁྱད་པར་བྱུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་བ་ ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་དང་ཉེ་ཆར་བ་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིག་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འཆར་བ་དང་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་སྤྲོད་བྱས་པའི་མིག་དཔ ཚད་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་ནས་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation with Local Neural Attention', 'ar': 'إزالة الغموض العميق للكيان المشترك مع الاهتمام العصبي المحلي', 'fr': 'Désambiguïsation des entités articulaires profondes avec attention neuronale locale', 'es': 'Desambiguación profunda de entidades conjuntas con atención neuronal local', 'pt': 'Desambiguação de entidade conjunta profunda com atenção neural local', 'ja': '局所的な神経への注意を伴う深部共同体の曖昧さ解消', 'zh': '有局神经深关节消歧', 'ru': 'Глубокая дезинтеграция совместной сущности с локальным нейронным вниманием', 'hi': 'स्थानीय तंत्रिका ध्यान के साथ गहरी संयुक्त इकाई disambiguation', 'ga': 'Diabhrís dhomhain Chomhaonán le Aird Néar Áitiúil', 'ka': 'ძალიან ერთადერთი ინტერტის განსხვავება ლოკალური ნეირალური დაახლოებით', 'el': 'Βαθιά Αποκάλυψη Ενότητας των Κοινοτήτων με Τοπική Νευρική Προσοχή', 'hu': 'Mély közös entitás szétbontás a helyi idegi figyelemmel', 'it': "Disambiguazione profonda dell'entità congiunta con attenzione neurale locale", 'kk': 'Жергілікті нейралық қатынау арқылы біріктірілген нысандарды бұғаттау', 'lt': 'Gilus bendro subjekto nedviprasmiškumas su vietos neurologiniu dėmesiu', 'mk': 'Длабоко раздвојување на заедничкиот ентитет со локално нервно внимание', 'ms': 'Entiti Perkongsian Dalam Pengambiguasi dengan Perhatian Neural setempat', 'mt': 'Diżambigwarazzjoni profonda tal-Entità Konġunta b’Attenzjoni Newrali Lokali', 'mn': 'Зөвхөн сэтгэл зүйн санаагаар гүнзгий нийлбэр байрлал', 'no': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation with Local Neural Attention', 'pl': 'Rozproszenie podmiotów głębokich stawów z lokalną uwagą neuronową', 'ro': 'Deambiguizarea profundă a entității comune cu atenția neuronală locală', 'sr': 'Duboko zajedničko disambiguacija sa lokalnom neurološkom pažnjom', 'si': 'ස්ථානික න්\u200dයුරල් අවධානය සමග ග ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ අවධානය අවධානය', 'so': 'Heeganka deegaanka ee wadajirka ah', 'sv': 'Djup gemensam enhet Disambiguation med lokal neural uppmärksamhet', 'ta': 'ஆழமான இணைப்பு உள்ளார்ந்த புதிய கவனத்துடன் குழப்பம்', 'ur': 'عمیق جوئنٹ اینتیٹ ڈاممبیوٹ', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ യൂണ്ടെന്റിറ്റിയുടെ ഡിസ്പിമിഷന്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക', 'uz': 'Disambition with Local Neural Attention', 'vi': 'Sự sụp đổ nghiêm trọng với các thần kinh', 'bg': 'Диамбигуация на дълбоките съединения с локално неврално внимание', 'nl': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation met lokale neurale aandacht', 'hr': 'Duboko zajedničko disambiguacija s lokalnom neurološkom pažnjom', 'da': 'Dyb fælles enhed Disambiguation med lokal neural opmærksomhed', 'id': 'Entitas Bersama Dalam Pengambiguasi dengan Perhatian Neural Lokal', 'ko': '국부 신경의 주의를 바탕으로 하는 깊은 관절 실체의 분열 제거', 'fa': 'تغییر فعالیت عمیق با توجه عصبی محلی', 'de': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation mit lokaler neuronaler Aufmerksamkeit', 'sw': 'Kushindwa kwa Umoja wa Intaneti wa Ndani', 'af': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation with Local Neural Attention', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i thellë i njësisë së përbashkët me vëmendjen lokale nervore', 'am': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation with Local Neural Attention', 'tr': 'Nerel Saýlaw bilen Golubyk Golubyk Entity Disambiguation', 'bn': 'স্থানীয় নিউরেল মনোযোগের সাথে গভীর যুক্ত এন্টিটি বিভ্রান্ত', 'bs': 'Duboko zajedničko disambiguacija s lokalnom neurološkom pažnjom', 'hy': 'Միացյալ միավորի խորը բացահայտությունը տեղական նյարդային ուշադրության հետ', 'ca': "Desambiguació profunda de l'Entitat Conjunta amb atenció neuronal local", 'az': 'Yerli Nöral Dikkati ilə Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation', 'cs': 'Disambiguace hlubokých kloubů entity s lokální neurální pozorností', 'et': 'Sügav ühenduse disambiguatsioon kohaliku neuroaalse tähelepanuga', 'fi': 'Syvä yhteinen kokonaisuus disambigointi paikallisella hermokiinnityksellä', 'jv': 'deep Joint Entty Desmbiguation with lokal Neral Attention', 'sk': 'Disambiguacija globokega skupnega subjekta z lokalno nevronsko pozornostjo', 'he': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation with Local Neural Attention', 'ha': 'Deep Joint Entity Disambiguation with Local Neural Attention', 'bo': 'རྩིས་པོ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་མཚུངས་ནུས་པ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'We propose a novel deep learning model for joint document-level entity disambiguation, which leverages learned neural representations. Key components are entity embeddings, a neural attention mechanism over local context windows, and a differentiable joint inference stage for disambiguation. Our approach thereby combines benefits of deep learning with more traditional approaches such as graphical models and probabilistic mention-entity maps. Extensive experiments show that we are able to obtain competitive or state-of-the-art accuracy at moderate computational costs.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا للتعلم العميق لإزالة الغموض المشترك على مستوى الكيان ، والذي يعزز التمثيلات العصبية المكتسبة. المكونات الرئيسية هي عمليات دمج الكيانات ، وآلية انتباه عصبية على نوافذ السياق المحلي ، ومرحلة استدلال مشتركة قابلة للتفاضل لإزالة الغموض. وبالتالي ، فإن نهجنا يجمع بين فوائد التعلم العميق مع الأساليب التقليدية مثل النماذج الرسومية وخرائط كيان الإشارة الاحتمالية. تظهر التجارب المكثفة أننا قادرون على الحصول على دقة تنافسية أو دقة متطورة بتكاليف حسابية معتدلة.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un nouveau modèle d'apprentissage profond pour la désambiguïsation conjointe des entités au niveau du document, qui exploite les représentations neuronales apprises. Les composants clés sont l'intégration d'entités, un mécanisme d'attention neuronale sur des fenêtres contextuelles locales et une étape d'inférence conjointe différenciable pour la désambiguïsation. Notre approche combine ainsi les avantages du deep learning avec des approches plus traditionnelles telles que les modèles graphiques et les cartes probabilistes mention-entité. Des expériences approfondies montrent que nous sommes en mesure d'obtenir une précision compétitive ou de pointe à des coûts de calcul modérés.", 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo novedoso de aprendizaje profundo para la desambiguación conjunta de entidades a nivel de documento, que aprovecha las representaciones neuronales aprendidas. Los componentes clave son la incorporación de entidades, un mecanismo de atención neuronal sobre ventanas de contexto local y una etapa de inferencia conjunta diferenciable para la desambiguación. Por lo tanto, nuestro enfoque combina los beneficios del aprendizaje profundo con enfoques más tradicionales, como modelos gráficos y mapas probabilísticos de menciones y entidades. Los experimentos exhaustivos demuestran que podemos obtener una precisión competitiva o de vanguardia a costos computacionales moderados.', 'pt': 'Propomos um novo modelo de aprendizado profundo para desambiguação de entidade conjunta em nível de documento, que aproveita as representações neurais aprendidas. Os principais componentes são a incorporação de entidades, um mecanismo de atenção neural sobre janelas de contexto local e um estágio de inferência conjunta diferenciável para desambiguação. Nossa abordagem combina os benefícios do aprendizado profundo com abordagens mais tradicionais, como modelos gráficos e mapas probabilísticos de entidades de menção. Extensos experimentos mostram que somos capazes de obter precisão competitiva ou de última geração a custos computacionais moderados.', 'ja': '私たちは、学習されたニューラル表現を活用した、共同文書レベルのエンティティの曖昧さ解消のための新しいディープラーニングモデルを提案します。主要なコンポーネントは、エンティティ埋め込み、ローカルコンテキストウィンドウ上のニューラルアテンションメカニズム、および曖昧さ解消のための差別化可能な関節推論ステージである。それによって、私たちのアプローチは、ディープラーニングの利点を、グラフィカルモデルや確率的言及-エンティティマップなどのより伝統的なアプローチと組み合わせる。広範囲にわたる実験は、中程度の計算コストで競争力のあるまたは最先端の精度を得ることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '举一以合文档消歧者新型深学之,因其神经也。 要组件实体嵌、本地上下文窗口之神经,注意机制及用于消歧义者,微分合理。 是以深学之势,与更古之法(图形概率映)合。 博实验明,以度计算成本得竞争力先进之准确性。', 'hi': 'हम संयुक्त दस्तावेज़-स्तर की इकाई बहुविकल्पी के लिए एक उपन्यास गहरे सीखने के मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो सीखा तंत्रिका प्रतिनिधित्व का लाभ उठाता है। प्रमुख घटक इकाई एम्बेडिंग, स्थानीय संदर्भ खिड़कियों पर एक तंत्रिका ध्यान तंत्र, और बहुविकल्पीयता के लिए एक अलग संयुक्त अनुमान चरण हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण इस प्रकार ग्राफिकल मॉडल और संभाव्य उल्लेख-इकाई मानचित्र जैसे अधिक पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोणों के साथ गहरी शिक्षा के लाभों को जोड़ता है। व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हम मध्यम कम्प्यूटेशनल लागतों पर प्रतिस्पर्धी या अत्याधुनिक सटीकता प्राप्त करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем новую модель глубокого обучения для совместной дезактивации сущностей на уровне документов, которая использует изученные нейронные представления. Ключевыми компонентами являются вложения сущностей, механизм нейронного внимания над окнами локального контекста и дифференцируемая стадия совместного вывода для устранения неоднозначности. Таким образом, наш подход сочетает преимущества глубокого обучения с более традиционными подходами, такими как графические модели и вероятностные карты сущностей упоминания. Обширные эксперименты показывают, что мы можем получить конкурентоспособную или современную точность при умеренных вычислительных затратах.', 'ga': 'Molaimid múnla domhain foghlama úrnua le haghaidh dí-athbhrí ar aonáin ar leibhéal doiciméad, a ghiaráil léiriúcháin néaracha foghlamtha. Is iad na príomh-chomhpháirteanna ná leabú aonáin, meicníocht aire néaraigh thar fhuinneoga comhthéacs áitiúla, agus comhchéim tátail dhifreáilte le haghaidh dí-athbhrí. Ar an gcaoi sin comhcheanglaíonn ár gcur chuige na buntáistí a bhaineann le foghlaim dhomhain le cineálacha cur chuige níos traidisiúnta ar nós samhlacha grafacha agus léarscáileanna aonáin lua dóchais. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing go bhfuil muid in ann cruinneas iomaíoch nó úrscothach a fháil ar chostais measartha ríomhaireachta.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης για κοινή αποσαφήνιση οντοτήτων σε επίπεδο εγγράφων, το οποίο αξιοποιεί τις διδαγμένες νευρωνικές αναπαραστάσεις. Βασικά συστατικά είναι η ενσωμάτωση οντοτήτων, ένας μηχανισμός νευρωνικής προσοχής πάνω από τοπικά παράθυρα περιβάλλοντος και ένα διαφοροποιημένο κοινό στάδιο συμπερασμάτων για αποσαφήνιση. Έτσι, η προσέγγισή μας συνδυάζει τα οφέλη της βαθιάς μάθησης με πιο παραδοσιακές προσεγγίσεις όπως γραφικά μοντέλα και πιθανολογικοί χάρτες αναφοράς-οντότητας. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι είμαστε σε θέση να επιτύχουμε ανταγωνιστική ή υπερσύγχρονη ακρίβεια με μέτριο υπολογιστικό κόστος.', 'hu': 'Egy új mélytanulási modellt javasolunk a közös dokumentumszintű entitások egyértelműsítésére, amely a tanult neurális reprezentációkat használja. A kulcsfontosságú összetevők az entitások beágyazása, a helyi kontextus ablakok feletti idegi figyelem mechanizmusa és a megkülönböztethető közös következtetési szakasz az egyértelműsítéshez. Megközelítésünk ezáltal kombinálja a mélytanulás előnyeit a hagyományosabb megközelítésekkel, mint például a grafikus modellek és a valószínűsíthető említőentitás térképek. A kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy versenyképes vagy korszerű pontosságot érünk el mérsékelt számítási költségek mellett.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტის დიბოლო სწავლების მოდელს ერთადერთი დოკუმენტის განსხვავებაზე, რომელიც გავისწავლა ნეიროლური გამოსახულებები. კლავის კომპონენტები არის ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური მექანსი, ლოკალური კონტექსტური ფანჯრებზე და განსხვავებელი სხვადასხვა ინტერენციის გან ჩვენი მოხმარება ამის გამოყენება ძალიან სარგებლო სწავლების გამოსახულებები, როგორც გრაფიკალური მოდელები და შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისათვის კაპრატები. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენ შეგვიძლია კონპექტიური ან სახელსაწყისი წარმოდგენა მომედირებული კომპუტაციალური პასუხისთვის.', 'it': "Proponiamo un nuovo modello di deep learning per la disambiguazione congiunta di entità a livello di documento, che sfrutta le rappresentazioni neurali apprese. Componenti chiave sono le incorporazioni di entità, un meccanismo di attenzione neurale sulle finestre di contesto locale e uno stadio di inferenza congiunta differenziabile per la disambiguazione. Il nostro approccio combina quindi i vantaggi del deep learning con approcci più tradizionali come modelli grafici e mappe probabilistiche delle entità di menzione. Esperimenti approfonditi dimostrano che siamo in grado di ottenere precisione competitiva o all'avanguardia a costi computazionali moderati.", 'kk': 'Біз жалпы құжат деңгейіндегі жалпы деңгейіндегі бағдарламаларды өзгерту үшін жаңа терең оқыту үлгісін ұсынамыз. Бұл невралды түсініктерді үйрену ү Кілттер компоненттері - нысандарды ендіру, жергілікті контексті терезелерде нейрондық назарды механизм және бұл баптау үшін айырмашылық біріктіру кезегі. Біздің тәсіліміз, графикалық моделдер және маңызды мәліметтер карталары секілді дәстүрлі оқытудың артықшылығын біріктіреді. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер біз бағдарламалық немесе өзіміздің дұрыстығын бағалай аламыз дегенді көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Siūlome naują gilaus mokymosi model į, skirtą bendram dokumentų lygmens subjektų nedviprasmiškumui, kuris sutelkia įgytą neurologinį atstovavimą. Pagrindinės sudedamosios dalys yra subjektų įterpimas, neurologinio dėmesio mechanizmas vietos kontekstinių langų atžvilgiu ir diferencijuojamas sąnarių išvados etapas, skirtas nedviprasmiškumui. Mūsų požiūris derina gilaus mokymosi naudą su tradiciniais požiūriais, pavyzdžiui, grafiniais modeliais ir tikėtinais minčių subjektų žemėlapiais. Išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad mes galime gauti konkurencinį ar moderniausią tikslumą vidutinėmis skaičiavimo sąnaudomis.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нов модел за длабоко учење за заедничка дебабигуација на ентитетот на документно ниво, која влијае на научените нервни претставувања. Клучните компоненти се вградувањата на ентитетите, механизам на нервно внимание над локалните прозорци на контекст, и различен стадиум на заедничка инференција за дејамбигуација. Нашиот пристап со тоа ги комбинира бенефициите од длабоко учење со потрадиционални пристапи како што се графичните модели и веројатните мапи на спомен-ентитет. Експериментите покажуваат дека можеме да добиеме конкурентна или најсовремена точност со умерени пресметки.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model belajar dalam baru untuk penyelesaian entiti aras dokumen kongsi, yang mempengaruhi perwakilan saraf belajar. Komponen kunci ialah penyembedding entiti, mekanisme perhatian saraf di atas tetingkap konteks setempat, dan tahap kesimpulan kongsi yang boleh berbeza untuk tidak ambiguasi. Pendekatan kami menggabungkan keuntungan belajar dalam dengan pendekatan yang lebih tradisional seperti model grafik dan peta kemungkinan-nama-entiti. Eksperimen luas menunjukkan bahawa kita mampu mendapatkan ketepatan kompetitif atau state-of-the-art dengan biaya pengiraan sederhana.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കാനുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദാനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. കൂട്ടുകെട്ട രേഖയുടെ നിലപാട് പ്രതിനിധികള കീ ഘടകം ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d അതുവഴി കൂടുതല്\u200d പാരമ്പര്യമായ നടപടികളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലുകളും  വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമുക്ക് മത്സരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ആധുനികമായ കണക്കൂട്', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu mudell ġdid ta' tagħlim profond għad-diżambigwazzjoni konġunta bejn entitajiet fil-livell tad-dokumenti, li jagħti spinta lir-rappreżentazzjonijiet newrali miksuba. Il-komponenti ewlenin huma l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ entitajiet, mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni newrali fuq twieqi ta’ kuntest lokali, u stadju differenzjabbli ta’ inferenza konġunta għad-diżambigwazzjoni. Our approach thereby combines benefits of deep learning with more traditional approaches such as graphical models and probabilistic mention-entity maps.  Esperimenti estensivi juru li nistgħu niksbu preċiżjoni kompetittiva jew l-aktar avvanzata bi spejjeż komputattivi moderati.", 'mn': 'Бид нэг баримт түвшинд суралцах шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварыг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг суралцах боломжтой. Олон төрлийн компонентүүд нь биетийн нэгдэл, мэдрэлийн анхаарлын механизм юм. Олон төрлийн цонхны дээр өөр өөр нэгдэл халдварын нэгдэл. Иймээс бидний арга барилга нь гүн гүнзгий суралцах хэрэгцээг график загвар болон магадлалын нэр төрийн зураг зэрэг уламжлалтай арга барилгатай холбоотой. Ихэнх туршилтууд бид өрсөлдөөн эсвэл урлагийн төвшин зөв тооцооллын үнэтэй тэнцүү байдлыг авч чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit nytt dypt læringsmodell for å forstørra samanløve dokumentnivåentitet, som leverer lærte neuralrepresentasjonar. Nøkkelkomponentar er innbygging av einingar, ein neuraloppmerksmekanisme over lokale kontekstvindauge, og ein forskjellig felles infeksjonsfunksjon for disambiguasjon. Denne tilnærminga kombinerer fordel av dypt læring med fleire tradisjonelle tilnærmingar, slik som grafiske modeller og sannsynlige avtalekart. Ekstra eksperimenter viser at vi er i stand til å få sammenhengig eller sammenhengig med moderne datakostnader.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nowy model głębokiego uczenia dla wspólnego rozłączania jednostek na poziomie dokumentu, który wykorzystuje nauczone reprezentacje neuronowe. Kluczowymi składnikami są osadzenia jednostek, mechanizm uwagi neuronowej nad lokalnymi oknami kontekstowymi oraz możliwy do zróżnicowania etap wnioskowania wspólnego dla rozróżnicowania. Nasze podejście łączy w ten sposób korzyści płynące z głębokiego uczenia z bardziej tradycyjnymi podejściami, takimi jak modele graficzne i prawdopodobne mapy wspomnień. Obszerne eksperymenty pokazują, że jesteśmy w stanie uzyskać konkurencyjną lub najnowocześniejszą dokładność przy umiarkowanych kosztach obliczeniowych.', 'ro': 'Propunem un nou model de învățare profundă pentru dezambiguizarea entităților comune la nivel de document, care valorifică reprezentările neurale învățate. Componentele cheie sunt încorporările entităților, un mecanism de atenție neurală asupra ferestrelor contextului local și o etapă de inferență comună diferențiabilă pentru dezambiguizare. Abordarea noastră combină astfel beneficiile învățării profunde cu abordări mai tradiționale, cum ar fi modelele grafice și hărțile probabilistice ale entităților menționate. Experimentele ample arată că suntem capabili să obținem o precizie competitivă sau de ultimă generație la costuri de calcul moderate.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo nov model dubokog učenja za disambiguaciju zajedničkog entiteta na nivou dokumenta, koji utiče na naučene neuralne predstave. Ključni komponenti su integracija entiteta, mehanizam neurološke pažnje preko lokalnih kontekstskih prozora i razlièitim zajedničkim fazama infekcije za disambigaciju. Naš pristup tako kombinira koristi dubokog učenja sa tradicionalnijim pristupima poput grafičkih modela i verovatnih mapa spominjanja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da smo u stanju da dobijemo konkurentnu preciznost ili državu umjetnosti na umjerenim računalnim troškovima.', 'so': "Waxaan soo jeedaynaa muusiko waxbarasho aad u dheer oo aad u baraneyso si ay u baabba'aan dhamaadka heerka dukumentiga ee wadajirka ah, taas oo dhamaadka lagu barto wakiilada neurada. Heeganka furayaashu waa qalabka, meymisyo caqliga ah oo ka sarreeya daaqadaha hoose-dhexe iyo goobaha isbedelka oo kala duduwan. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu ku soo ururiyaa faa'iidada waxbarashada moolka dheer, waxaana la wadaa qaabab caadi ah, tusaale ahaan qaababka sawiraadka iyo kartooyinka suurtagalka lagu sheego. Imtixaano dheeraad ah waxay muuqan kartaa inaannu awoodi karno qiimaha xisaabta hoose u dhexeeya ee iskutallaabta ama xaaladda farshaxanka.", 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny modell för djupinlärning för gemensam dokumentnivå entitet disambiguation, som utnyttjar lärda neurala representationer. Nyckelkomponenter är entitetsinbäddningar, en neural uppmärksamhetsmekanism över lokala kontextfönster, och ett differentierat gemensamt inferensstadium för disambiguation. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kombinerar därmed fördelarna med djuplärande med mer traditionella tillvägagångssätt som grafiska modeller och sannolika omnämnande-entitetskartor. Omfattande experiment visar att vi kan uppnå konkurrenskraftig eller toppmodern noggrannhet till måttliga beräkningskostnader.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் மாதிரியை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம், ஒரு சேர்ந்த ஆவண- மட்டத்திற்கான பொருள் ப விசை பொருள்கள் உட்பொருள் உள்ளடக்கங்கள், உள்ளூர் சூழல் சாளரங்கள் மேல் புதுப்பாக்கியமான கவனம் முறைமை, மற்றும் வேறுபாடான இணைய பாதி நமது அணுகல் அதனால் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பயன்பாடுகளை மேலும் மரபார்ந்த வழிமுறைகளுடன் சேர்க்கிறது, வரைகலை மாதிரிகள் மற்ற விரிவான சோதனைகள் மதுதிய கணிப்பான விலைகளில் நாம் தேவையான அல்லது கலை நிலையின் சரியை பெற முடியும்.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපාරයක් සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාපාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉග යතුරු භාගයක් තත්වය සංවිධානයක්, ස්ථානික සංවිධානය කවුළු වල සංවිධානයක්, සහ අසංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ අපේ විදියට ඒකෙන් ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සමග ග ග්\u200dරාෆික් මෝඩේල් සහ සංභාවිත විදියට අනුව විශාල පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපිට පුළුවන් තර්ජනයක් නැත්නම් කාර්යාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئی سیکھنے کی مدل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک دکھانے کے سطح سطح انٹیجیٹ کی نامبیواٹی کے لئے ایک نئی سیکھنے کی مدل کرتا ہے، جسے نئورل کی تعلیمات سکھائی جاتی ہے۔ Key components are entity embeddings, a neural attention mechanism over local context windows, and a differentiable joint inference stage for disambiguation. اس کے ذریعہ ہماری تقریبا عمیق تعلیم کا فائدہ اس کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ سنتی طریقے کے ساتھ جمع کرتا ہے جیسے گرافیک مدل اور احتمالات ذکر انٹیٹی نقشه. اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہم عام کمپیوٹریشن قیمت کے مطابق رقابت یا ایٹیٹ کی دقیق حاصل کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz birinchi hujjat darajadagi obʼektlarni ajratish uchun novel o'rganish modelini rivojlanamiz. Bu yerda qo'llanmalar neyrol representarini o'rganadi. Name Biz shunday qilib o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarimiz o'rganish imkoniyatlarini birlashtiradi. Grafik modellari va eng muhimi narsalar haqida o'rganish kerak. Koʻproq tajribalarni ko'rsatishimiz, biz o'rtacha kompyuterning qiymatlariga rivojlanishimiz yoki shaxsiyatlarning holatini aniqlashga ega bo'ladimiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình học sâu mới cho việc phân bổ các cơ thể bằng văn bản, điều khiển các biểu tượng thần kinh học. Các thành phần chính là sự nhúng bộ phận, cơ chế gây chú ý thần kinh trên các cửa sổ ngữ cảnh địa phương, và một giai đoạn phát sinh khớp khác nhau cho sự biến đổi. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi kết hợp lợi ích của việc học sâu sắc với các phương pháp truyền thống hơn như đồ họa và bản đồ nơi được liệt kê. Những thí nghiệm dồi dào cho thấy chúng ta có thể đạt được độ chính xác cạnh tranh hoặc hiện đại với mức chi phí tổng tính vừa phải.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме нов модел за дълбоко учене за съвместно разграничаване на обекти на ниво документ, който използва научените невронни представи. Ключови компоненти са вграждането на обекти, механизъм на невронно внимание над локалните контекстни прозорци и диференцируем етап на съвместно заключение за разграничаване. По този начин нашият подход съчетава ползите от дълбокото обучение с по-традиционни подходи като графични модели и вероятностни карти за споменаване на единици. Обширни експерименти показват, че сме в състояние да постигнем конкурентна или най-съвременна точност при умерени изчислителни разходи.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuw deep learning model voor gezamenlijke eenduidigheid op documentniveau voor, dat gebruikmaakt van geleerde neurale representaties. Belangrijke componenten zijn entiteitsinsluitingen, een neuraal aandachtsmechanisme over lokale contextvensters en een differentieerbare gezamenlijke inferentiefase voor verduidelijking. Onze aanpak combineert daarmee de voordelen van deep learning met meer traditionele benaderingen zoals grafische modellen en probabilistische vermeldingsentiteitskaarten. Uitgebreide experimenten tonen aan dat we concurrerende of state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid kunnen verkrijgen tegen matige rekenkosten.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo nov model dubokog učenja za disambiguaciju zajedničkog entiteta na razini dokumenta, koji utiče na naučene neuralne predstave. Ključni komponenti su integracija entiteta, mehanizam neurološke pažnje preko lokalnih kontekstskih prozora i različitim stupanjem zajedničke infekcije za disambigaciju. Naš pristup tako kombinira koristi dubokog učenja sa više tradicionalnih pristupa kao što su grafički modeli i vjerojatno mape spominjanja. Prošireni eksperimenti pokazuju da možemo dobiti konkurentnu preciznost ili državu umjetnosti na umjerenim računalnim troškovima.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny dyb læringsmodel til fælles dokumentniveau entitet disambiguation, som udnytter lærte neurale repræsentationer. Nøglekomponenter er enhedsindlejringer, en neural opmærksomhedsmekanisme over lokale kontekstvinduer, og en differentierelig fælles inference fase for forståelse. Vores tilgang kombinerer derved fordelene ved dyb læring med mere traditionelle tilgange såsom grafiske modeller og sandsynligvis nævnelsesenhedskort. Omfattende eksperimenter viser, at vi er i stand til at opnå konkurrencedygtig eller state-of-the-art nøjagtighed til moderate beregningsomkostninger.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein neuartiges Deep Learning Modell für die gemeinsame Entitätsdisambiguation auf Dokumentenebene vor, das erlernte neuronale Repräsentationen nutzt. Schlüsselkomponenten sind Entitäteneinbettungen, ein neuronaler Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus über lokalen Kontextfenstern und eine differenzierbare gemeinsame Inferenzstufe zur Disambiguation. Unser Ansatz kombiniert dabei die Vorteile von Deep Learning mit traditionelleren Ansätzen wie grafischen Modellen und probabilistischen Erwähnungs-Entity-Karten. Umfangreiche Experimente zeigen, dass wir wettbewerbsfähige oder hochmoderne Genauigkeit bei moderaten Rechenkosten erzielen können.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 깊이 있는 학습 모델을 제시했는데 연합문 등급의 실체 분리에 사용되고 이 모델은 학습된 신경 표시를 이용한다.관건적인 부품은 실체 삽입, 국부 상하문 창의 신경 주의 메커니즘과 분리에 사용되는 미세한 연합 추리 단계를 포함한다.따라서 우리의 방법은 깊이 있게 학습하는 장점과 더욱 전통적인 방법, 예를 들어 도형 모델과 확률 실체도를 결합시킨다.대량의 실험을 통해 우리는 적당한 계산 원가로 경쟁력이 있거나 가장 선진적인 정밀도를 얻을 수 있음을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'ما یک مدل یادگیری عمیق روزنامه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای تغییر معامله\u200cهای سطح سند، که باعث تغییر دادن نمایش\u200cهای عصبی یاد گرفته است. بخش\u200cهای کلیدی\u200cها ساخته\u200cهای عناصر هستند، یک مکانیسم توجه عصبی بر پنجره\u200cهای محلی، و یک مرحله\u200cی آلودگی متفاوتی برای ناآلودگی متفاوت است. روش ما با این ترکیب منافع یادگیری عمیق را با روش\u200cهای سنتی بیشتری مثل مدل\u200cهای گرافیک و نقشه\u200cهای احتمالات ذکر\u200cگرافیک ترکیب می\u200cکند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده نشان می\u200cدهند که ما می\u200cتوانیم دقیقاً مسابقه\u200cای یا وضعیت هنری را با هزینه\u200cهای محاسباتی متوسط دریافت کنیم.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan model belajar dalam yang baru untuk penyelesaian entitas tingkat dokumen kongsi, yang mempengaruhi pelajaran representation saraf. Komponen kunci adalah penerbangan entitas, mekanisme perhatian saraf di atas jendela konteks lokal, dan tahap inferensi kongsi yang berbeda untuk tidak ambiguasi. Pendekatan kami dengan demikian menggabungkan manfaat belajar dalam dengan pendekatan yang lebih tradisional seperti model grafis dan peta kemungkinan menyebut-entitas. Eksperimen yang luas menunjukkan bahwa kita mampu mendapatkan akurasi kompetitif atau state-of-the-art dengan biaya komputasi moderat.', 'tr': 'Biz bir sened derejesi çykarmak üçin taýdan derin öwrenmek nusgasyny teklip edip, näyral täsirlerini öwrendirdik. Aç zatlar birnäçe guramlar, ýerli kontekst äpişgeleri üzerinde näyral üns meýdançasyndyr we çykyşlyk üçin üýtgeşiklik sahypasy. Biziň ýaryşymyz bu şekilde gaty öwrenmegiň adatça nusgalary grafik nusgalary we olaryň görnüş-taýýarlaryň mapalary bilen birleşýär. Ýuwaşky deneyler biziň rekabetçilikli ýa-da sagat taýýarlygymyzy ýa-da ýuwaşlyk hasaplamagymyzda mümkin edip biljegimizi görkeýärler.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe diep leer model vir joint document-vlak entiteit ontsammings, wat die neurale voorstellings geleer het. Sleutel komponente is entiteite inbêding, 'n neurale aandag mekanisme oor plaaslike konteksvensters en 'n verskillende koppelige inferensie stadium vir ontwikkeling. Ons toegang daarmee kombinieer voordele van diep leer met meer tradisionele toegange soos grafiese modele en waarskynlik verplig-entiteitkaarte. Ekstensiewe eksperimente wys dat ons in staat kan rekenaar of staat-van-kuns-presies by moderate rekenaar koste kry.", 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mtindo wa kujifunza kwa kiwango cha pamoja cha vifaa vya dokumentari, ambavyo vifaa vinavyojifunza uwakilishi wa uraia. Vifaa muhimu ni viungo vya habari, mfumo wa usimamizi wa kisasa juu ya vinasa vya ndani, na jukwaa ambalo ni tofauti la kutokuwepo kwa mgonjwa wa pamoja. Hatua yetu kwa hiyo inaunganisha faida za kujifunza kwa kina na njia nyingine za kitamaduni kama vile mifano ya picha na ramani za kutambua vifaa. Majaribio mengi yanaonyesha kuwa tunaweza kupata ushindani au uhakika wa hali ya sanaa kwa gharama za wastani za wastani.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդել փաստաթղթի մակարդակի միավորների բացահայտության համար, որը ազդում է սովորված նյարդային ներկայացումներին: Հիմնական բաղադրիչները միավորների ներդրումն են, նյարդային ուշադրության մեխանիզմը տեղական կոնտեքստի պատուհանների վրա, և տարբերակավոր հատվածային եզրակացության փուլը բացատրելու համար: Մեր մոտեցումը միավորում է խորը ուսումնասիրության առավելությունները ավելի ավանդական մոտեցումների հետ, ինչպիսիք են գրաֆիկ մոդելները և հավանական նշելու-էության քարտեզները: Մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մենք կարողանում ենք ստանալ մրցակցության կամ ամենաբարձր ճշգրտությունը չափազանց հաշվարկների վրա:', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model të ri të mësimit të thellë për çambiguacionin e njësisë së përbashkët në nivelin e dokumentit, që nxjerr përfaqësime të mësuara neuronale. Komponentët kryesorë janë përfshirjet e njësisë, një mekanizëm vëmendjeje nervore mbi dritaret e kontekstit lokal dhe një fazë diferenciale inference të përbashkët për çambiguacion. Përqasja jonë bashkon kështu përfitimet e mësimit të thellë me përqasje më tradicionale të tilla si modelet grafike dhe hartat probabiliste të njësisë përmendimore. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara tregojnë se ne jemi në gjendje të fitojmë saktësinë konkurruese apo më të lartë me kosto kompjuterike të moderuara.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যোগ্য নথিপত্র-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিভ্রান্তির জন্য, যেখানে লেভারজেরা নি কী (Key) উপাদান হচ্ছে প্রতিষ্ঠান, স্থানীয় প্রেক্ষিত উইন্ডোর উপর নিউরেল মনোযোগের মাধ্যম, এবং বিভ্রান্তির জন্য একটি পার্থক্য য যোগা এর মাধ্যমে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া গভীর শিক্ষার সুবিধার সাথে আরো ঐতিহ্যবাহী উপায় যেমন গ্রাফিক্যাল মডেল এবং সম্ভবত উল্লেখ বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমরা প্রতিযোগিতা বা শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করতে পারি।', 'az': 'Biz yeni dərin öyrənmə modelini təbliğ edirik ki, bu da öyrəndiyi nöral təsirlərini dəyişdirir. Anahtar komponentlər məlumatları, yerli məlumatlar pəncərələrinin üstündə nöral dikkati mehanizmidir və müxtəlif müxtəlif birləşdirilmək sahəsidir. Bizim tərzimiz bu olaraq çətin öyrənmənin faydalarını grafik modellər və mümkün olaraq çəkilmə-entitə haritaları kimi daha çox nəticəli tərzlərlə birləşdirir. Əlavə təcrübələr bizim müqayisədə və ya müqayisədə-müqayisədə-müqayisədə hesaplama maliyyəti ilə müqayisədə əldə edə biləcəyimizi göstərir.', 'am': 'We propose a novel deep learning model for joint document-level entity disambiguation, which leverages learned neural representations.  የቁልፍ አካባቢዎች አካባቢ፣ የግንኙነት ምዕራብ ማሰናከል እና የተለየ የግንኙነት ማሰናከል እና የተለየ የግንኙነት ነጥብ ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ ይሄንን የጥልቅ ትምህርት ጥቅሞችን እና እንደግራፊካዊ ምሳሌዎች እና የስህተት ማህበረሰብ ማህበረሰብ አብስቷል፡፡ የስፋት ፈተናዎች በመካከለኛ ቁጥጥር ውሳኔዎችን ማግኘት እናችላለን፡፡', 'ca': "Proposem un nou model d'aprenentatge profund per a la desambiguació conjunta entre entitats a nivell de documents, que aprofita representacions neuronals aprengutes. Els components clau són l'incorporació d'entitats, un mecanisme d'atenció neuronal sobre finestres de contexte local, i un escenari diferenciable de inferència articular per desambiguació. El nostre enfocament combina així els beneficis de l'aprenentatge profund amb enfocaments més tradicionals com els models gràfics i els mapes probabilistes de mentió-entitat. Els extensos experiments demostren que som capaços d'obtenir la precisió competitiva o moderada a costos computacionals moderats.", 'et': 'Pakume välja uuendusliku sügavõppe mudeli ühiseks dokumenditasemel olemite eristamiseks, mis võimendab õppinud närvirepresentatsioone. Põhikomponendid on olemite manustamine, neurotähelepanu mehhanism kohaliku konteksti akende üle ja diferentseeritav ühise järelduse etapp selgitamiseks. Meie lähenemisviis ühendab seega sügavõppe eelised traditsioonilisemate lähenemisviisidega, nagu graafilised mudelid ja tõenäosuslikud nimetusüksuste kaardid. Laiaulatuslikud katsed näitavad, et oleme võimelised saavutama konkurentsivõimelise või kaasaegse täpsuse mõõdukate arvutuskuludega.', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme nový model hlubokého učení pro společné rozlišování entit na úrovni dokumentů, který využívá naučené neuronové reprezentace. Klíčovými složkami jsou vkládání entit, neuronový mechanismus pozornosti nad lokálními kontextovými okny a diferencovatelná společná fáze závěrů pro rozcestnění. Náš přístup tak kombinuje výhody hlubokého učení s tradičnějšími přístupy, jako jsou grafické modely a pravděpodobnostní mapy zmiňovacích entit. Rozsáhlé experimenty ukazují, že jsme schopni získat konkurenční nebo nejmodernější přesnost při mírných výpočetních nákladech.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo nov model dubokog učenja za disambiguaciju zajedničkog entiteta na nivou dokumenta, koji utiče na naučene neuralne predstave. Ključni komponenti su integracija entiteta, mehanizam neurološke pažnje preko lokalnih kontekstskih prozora i različitim zajedničkim fazama infekcije za disambigaciju. Naš pristup tako kombinira koristi dubokog učenja sa tradicionalnijim pristupima poput grafičkih modela i verovatnih mapa spominjanja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da možemo dobiti konkurentnu preciznost ili državu umjetnosti na umjerenim računalnim troškovima.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta syväoppimisen mallia dokumenttitason kokonaisuuden yhteiseen erottamiseen, joka hyödyntää opittuja neuroesityksiä. Keskeisiä komponentteja ovat entiteettiupotukset, neurohuomiomekanismi paikallisten konteksti-ikkunoiden yli ja erottuva yhteinen päättelyvaihe. Lähestymistapamme yhdistää syväoppimisen edut perinteisiin lähestymistapoihin, kuten graafisiin malleihin ja todennäköisiin maininta-entiteettikarttoihin. Laajat kokeet osoittavat, että pystymme saavuttamaan kilpailukykyisen tai huipputason tarkkuuden kohtuullisilla laskentakustannuksilla.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunaké model sing nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe basa gambar nggawe Dokumen kuwi nggawe barang, kuwi nggawe nyimpen kuwi tindakan Neral. Sampeyan sing dipun Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan tapi nggambar luwih dumadhi Lan Ngucap Cino', 'he': 'אנו מציעים מודל למידה עמוקה חדש עבור ניתוח משותף בידות ברמה של מסמכים, אשר משתמש בידידות עצביות למדות. מרכיבים מפתחים הם שילוי יחידות, מנגנון תשומת לב עצבית מעל חלונות הקשר המקומיים, ובשלב משותף שונה לניקוי. הגישה שלנו משלבת כך יתרונות של הלימודים העמוקים עם גישות מסורתיות יותר כמו דוגמנים גרפיים ומפות ישויות הזכרות הסבירויות. ניסויים רחבים מראים שאנחנו מסוגלים להשיג מדויקת תחרותית או מוקדמת במחיר חישובי מוקדם.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo nov model globokega učenja za skupno razjasnitev entitet na ravni dokumenta, ki izkorišča učene nevronske reprezentacije. Ključne komponente so vgradnje entitet, mehanizem nevronske pozornosti nad lokalnimi kontekstnimi okni in stopnja diferencialne skupne sklepe za razločitev. Naš pristop tako združuje prednosti globokega učenja z bolj tradicionalnimi pristopi, kot so grafični modeli in verjetnostni zemljevidi omenjenih entitet. Obsežni poskusi kažejo, da smo sposobni doseči konkurenčno ali najsodobnejšo natančnost pri zmernih računalniških stroških.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da wani motel mai da aka sanar da noveli mai ƙaranci wa bambanci da abun-daraja na wadangan hujjar-daraja, wanda da ake amfani da shi ya sanar da wakillan neural. Ƙaramiwa na maɓallin sunan fitarwa da, mai amfani da neura kan tagogi na lokal, da kuma wata daraja na daban-daban da aka yi rabo da cire-nau'in haɗi wa rabo. TaurayinMu na haɗa amfani da masu ƙari da masu shiryuwa na zamani kamar misãlai na grafi da karmapi masu ambato. Akwai jarrabi masu ƙaranci za'a iya iya samun komai da taƙaitacce ko na-halin-sanar a sami komai.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབུགས་རིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གསར་གཏོང་གི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། Key components are entity embeddings, a neural attention mechanism over local context windows, and a differentiable joint inference stage for disambiguation. Our approach thereby combines benefits of deep learning with more traditional approaches such as graphical models and probabilistic mention-entity maps. རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་སྟངས་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་དེ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'MinIE : Minimizing Facts in Open Information Extraction', 'ar': 'MinIE: تقليل الحقائق في استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة', 'pt': 'MinIE: Minimizando Fatos na Extração de Informações Abertas', 'es': 'MiniE: Minimizar los hechos en la extracción abierta de información', 'fr': "MiniE\xa0: Minimiser les faits dans l'extraction d'informations ouvertes", 'ja': 'MinIE ：オープン情報抽出における事実の最小化', 'zh': 'MinIE:取最小化于开信', 'hi': 'MinIE: खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण में तथ्यों को कम से कम करना', 'ru': 'MinIE: Минимизация фактов при извлечении открытой информации', 'ga': 'MinIE: Fíricí a Íoslaghdú in Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ελαχιστοποίηση των γεγονότων στην ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών', 'hu': 'MinIE: A tények minimalizálása a nyílt információk kivonásában', 'it': "MinIE: Minimizzare i fatti nell'estrazione di informazioni aperte", 'lt': 'MinIE: atviros informacijos gavimo faktų mažinimas', 'kk': 'MinIE: Ашық мәліметті тарқатуда факттерді кішірейту', 'ms': 'MinIE: Mengurangi Fakta dalam Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka', 'ml': 'തുറക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സ്പ്രാക്ട്രേക്ഷനില്\u200d ഫാക്റ്റുകള്\u200d ചെറുതാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'MinIE: Fatti minimizzati fl-Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa', 'mn': 'MinIE: Open Information Extraction', 'pl': 'MinIE: Minimalizacja faktów w otwartej ekstrakcji informacji', 'no': 'MinIE: Minsk faktorer i opna informasjonspakking', 'ro': 'MinIE: Minimizarea faptelor în extragerea informațiilor deschise', 'sr': 'MinIE: Minimiziranje činjenica u izvlačenju otvorene informacije', 'si': 'MinIE: විවෘත තොරතුරු නිර්මාණයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අඩුම් කරන්න', 'mk': 'MinIE: минимизирање на фактите во извлекувањето на отворена информација', 'so': 'MinIE: Minimizing Factory in Furan Information Extraction', 'sv': 'MinIE: Minimera fakta i utvinning av öppen information', 'ta': 'குறைந்த IE: திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டில் காரணிகளை சிறிதாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'MinIE: کھولتا ہوا معلومات اخراج میں حقیقت کم کر رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Mini IE: Ochiq maʼlumot ajratishda faqatlarni kamaytirish', 'vi': 'Minh: Nắm rõ các phái trong giải cứu thông tin', 'bg': 'Минимизиране на фактите при извличането на открита информация', 'da': 'MinIE: Minimering af fakta i åben information udvinding', 'nl': 'MinIE: Het minimaliseren van feiten in open informatie extractie', 'hr': 'MinIE: Minimiziranje činjenica u izvlačenju otvorenih informacija', 'de': 'MinIE: Minimierung von Fakten bei der Open Information Extraction', 'id': 'MinIE: Mengminimalisasi Fakta dalam Ekstraksi Informasi Buka', 'ko': 'Minie: 개방된 정보 추출에서 사실 최소화', 'sw': 'MinIE: Minimizing Facts in Open Information Extraction', 'fa': 'MinIE: ذخیره کردن حقیقت در اخراج اطلاعات باز', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'MinIE: Minimizimi i fakteve në nxjerrjen e informacionit të hapur', 'am': 'view-action', 'hy': 'Minie. Անվազեցնել փաստերը բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանման մեջ', 'az': 'MinIE: Açıq Malümatı Açırmasında Faylıları Minimalize', 'bn': 'MinIE: Minimizing Facts in Open Information Extraction', 'bs': 'MinIE: Minimiziranje činjenica u izvlačenju otvorene informacije', 'ca': "MinIE: Minimitzar els fets en l'extracció d'informació oberta", 'cs': 'MinIE: Minimalizace faktů v otevřené extrakci informací', 'et': 'MinIE: Faktide minimeerimine avatud teabe väljavõtmisel', 'fi': 'MinIE: Faktojen minimointi avoimessa tiedonhankinnassa', 'tr': 'MinIE: Açmak Maglumaty Açmak içinde Faýllary Küçükleýär', 'jv': 'MinSE: Ngawe Perintah kang Open Info extract', 'ha': 'ﺋ»aramiSize', 'sk': 'MinIE: Zmanjšanje dejstev pri odprtem pridobivanju informacij', 'he': 'MinIE: מינימום עובדות בחזרת מידע פתוח', 'bo': 'MinIE:ཆ་འཕྲིན་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ནང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཆུང་ཚད་ཆུང་ཤོས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'The goal of Open Information Extraction (OIE) is to extract surface relations and their arguments from natural-language text in an unsupervised, domain-independent manner. In this paper, we propose MinIE, an OIE system that aims to provide useful, compact extractions with high precision and recall. MinIE approaches these goals by (1) representing information about polarity, modality, attribution, and quantities with semantic annotations instead of in the actual extraction, and (2) identifying and removing parts that are considered overly specific. We conducted an experimental study with several real-world datasets and found that MinIE achieves competitive or higher precision and recall than most prior systems, while at the same time producing shorter, semantically enriched extractions.', 'ar': 'الهدف من Open Information Extraction (OIE) هو استخراج العلاقات السطحية وحججها من نص بلغة طبيعية بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة ومستقلة عن المجال. في هذا البحث ، نقترح MinIE ، وهو نظام تابع لمنظمة OIE يهدف إلى توفير عمليات استخلاص مفيدة ومضغوطة بدقة عالية واسترجاع. تقترب MinIE من هذه الأهداف من خلال (1) تمثيل معلومات حول القطبية والطريقة والإسناد والكميات مع التعليقات التوضيحية الدلالية بدلاً من الاستخراج الفعلي ، و (2) تحديد وإزالة الأجزاء التي تعتبر محددة بشكل مفرط. لقد أجرينا دراسة تجريبية مع العديد من مجموعات البيانات الواقعية ووجدنا أن MinIE يحقق دقة تنافسية أو أعلى واسترجاعًا من معظم الأنظمة السابقة ، بينما ينتج في نفس الوقت عمليات استخلاص أقصر ومُثبَّتة لغويًا.', 'pt': 'O objetivo da Extração de Informação Aberta (OIE) é extrair relações de superfície e seus argumentos de texto em linguagem natural de maneira não supervisionada e independente de domínio. Neste artigo, propomos o MinIE, um sistema OIE que visa fornecer extrações úteis e compactas com alta precisão e revocação. O MinIE aborda esses objetivos (1) representando informações sobre polaridade, modalidade, atribuição e quantidades com anotações semânticas em vez de na extração real e (2) identificando e removendo partes consideradas excessivamente específicas. Conduzimos um estudo experimental com vários conjuntos de dados do mundo real e descobrimos que o MinIE alcança precisão e recuperação competitivas ou mais altas do que a maioria dos sistemas anteriores, ao mesmo tempo em que produz extrações mais curtas e semanticamente enriquecidas.', 'es': 'El objetivo de la Extracción Abierta de Información (OIE) es extraer las relaciones superficiales y sus argumentos del texto en lenguaje natural de manera no supervisada e independiente del dominio. En este artículo, proponemos MiniE, un sistema de la OIE que tiene como objetivo proporcionar extracciones útiles y compactas con alta precisión y recuperación. MiniE aborda estos objetivos (1) representando información sobre polaridad, modalidad, atribución y cantidades con anotaciones semánticas en lugar de en la extracción real, y (2) identificando y eliminando partes que se consideran demasiado específicas. Realizamos un estudio experimental con varios conjuntos de datos del mundo real y descubrimos que MiniE logra una precisión y recuperación competitivas o más altas que la mayoría de los sistemas anteriores, mientras que al mismo tiempo produce extracciones más cortas y enriquecidas semánticamente.', 'fr': "L'objectif de l'Open Information Extraction (OIE) est d'extraire les relations de surface et leurs arguments à partir de textes en langage naturel d'une manière non supervisée et indépendante du domaine. Dans cet article, nous proposons MiniE, un système de l'OIE qui vise à fournir des extractions utiles et compactes avec une précision et un rappel élevés. MiniE aborde ces objectifs en (1) représentant des informations sur la polarité, la modalité, l'attribution et les quantités avec des annotations sémantiques au lieu de l'extraction réelle, et (2) en identifiant et en supprimant les parties considérées comme trop spécifiques. Nous avons mené une étude expérimentale avec plusieurs ensembles de données du monde réel et avons constaté que MiniE atteint une précision et un rappel compétitifs ou supérieurs à ceux de la plupart des systèmes précédents, tout en produisant des extractions plus courtes et enrichies sémantiquement.", 'ja': 'オープン情報抽出（ OIE ）の目標は、監督されていない、ドメインに依存しない方法で、自然言語のテキストから表面関係とその引数を抽出することです。本稿では、有用でコンパクトな抽出を高精度かつリコールで提供することを目的としたOIEシステムであるMinIEを提案する。MinIEは、（ 1 ）実際の抽出ではなく、極性、モダリティ、帰属、および量に関する情報をセマンティックアノテーションで表現し、（ 2 ）過度に特異的と見なされる部分を特定して削除することによって、これらの目標にアプローチします。私たちは、いくつかの現実のデータセットを用いた実験的研究を行い、MinIEが以前のほとんどのシステムよりも競争力のある、または高い精度とリコールを達成すると同時に、より短く、意味的に豊かな抽出を生成することを発見しました。', 'hi': 'ओपन इन्फॉर्मेशन एक्सट्रैक्शन (OIE) का लक्ष्य सतह संबंधों और उनके तर्कों को प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ से एक असुरक्षित, डोमेन-स्वतंत्र तरीके से निकालना है। इस पेपर में, हम MinIE, एक OIE प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसका उद्देश्य उच्च परिशुद्धता और याद के साथ उपयोगी, कॉम्पैक्ट निष्कर्षण प्रदान करना है। MinIE इन लक्ष्यों को (1) द्वारा वास्तविक निष्कर्षण के बजाय शब्दार्थ एनोटेशन के साथ ध्रुवीयता, रूपरेखा, एट्रिब्यूशन और मात्राओं के बारे में जानकारी का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है, और (2) उन भागों की पहचान और निष्कासन करता है जिन्हें अत्यधिक विशिष्ट माना जाता है। हमने कई वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट के साथ एक प्रयोगात्मक अध्ययन किया और पाया कि MinIE अधिकांश पूर्व प्रणालियों की तुलना में प्रतिस्पर्धी या उच्च परिशुद्धता और याद प्राप्त करता है, जबकि एक ही समय में छोटे, शब्दार्थ रूप से समृद्ध निष्कर्षण का उत्पादन करता है।', 'ru': 'Целью извлечения открытой информации (OIE) является извлечение поверхностных отношений и их аргументов из текста на естественном языке неконтролируемым, независимым от домена образом. В этой статье мы предлагаем MinIE, систему МЭБ, которая направлена на обеспечение полезных, компактных экстракций с высокой точностью и отзывом. MinIE подходит к этим целям, (1) представляя информацию о полярности, модальности, атрибуции и количествах с семантическими аннотациями вместо фактического извлечения, и (2) идентифицируя и удаляя части, которые считаются чрезмерно специфичными. Мы провели экспериментальное исследование с несколькими наборами данных реального мира и обнаружили, что MinIE достигает конкурентоспособной или более высокой точности и запоминаемости, чем большинство предыдущих систем, в то же время производя более короткие, семантически обогащенные извлечения.', 'zh': '开信取(OIE)者,以无监独立于自然语言文本而外论也。 本文有MinIE,此OIE系统,指供有用,紧凑提取,高精度召率也。 MinIE以下成之:(1)以语义注,不以言极性,模态,归因数之息,及(2)识删以为过也。 于数世界数集实验研究,MinIE得比大多前系统更具竞争力或更高精度及召率,同时更短者,语义丰取。', 'ga': 'Is é an sprioc atá ag Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte (OIE) ná caidreamh dromchla agus a n-argóintí a bhaint as téacs i dteanga nádúrtha ar bhealach neamh-mhaoirsithe, fearainn-neamhspleách. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid MinIE, córas OIE a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige eastóscadh úsáideach, dlúth a sholáthar le cruinneas ard agus le haisghairm. Tugann MinIE aghaidh ar na spriocanna seo trí (1) faisnéis a léiriú maidir le polaraíocht, módúlacht, sannadh, agus cainníochtaí le nótaí shéimeantacha seachas san eastóscadh iarbhír, agus (2) páirteanna a mheastar a bheith ró-shonrach a shainaithint agus a bhaint. Rinneamar staidéar turgnamhach le go leor tacair sonraí ón bhfíorshaol agus fuaireamar amach go mbaineann MinIE beachtas agus aisghairm iomaíoch nó níos airde amach ná an chuid is mó de na córais roimhe seo, agus ag an am céanna astarraingtí níos giorra, saibhrithe go séimeantach a tháirgeadh.', 'el': 'Στόχος της Ανοικτής Εκχύλισης Πληροφοριών (ΟΕΕ) είναι η εξαγωγή επιφανειακών σχέσεων και των επιχειρημάτων τους από φυσικό κείμενο με τρόπο χωρίς επίβλεψη, ανεξάρτητο από τομέα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που στοχεύει στην παροχή χρήσιμων, συμπαγών εξαγωγών με υψηλή ακρίβεια και ανάκληση. Προσεγγίζει αυτούς τους στόχους (1) αναπαράγοντας πληροφορίες σχετικά με την πολικότητα, την τροπικότητα, την απόδοση και τις ποσότητες με σημασιολογικά σχόλια αντί για την πραγματική εξαγωγή, και (2) προσδιορίζοντας και αφαιρώντας μέρη που θεωρούνται υπερβολικά συγκεκριμένα. Πραγματοποιήσαμε μια πειραματική μελέτη με διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου και διαπιστώσαμε ότι το επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστική ή υψηλότερη ακρίβεια και ανάκληση από τα περισσότερα προηγούμενα συστήματα, ενώ παράλληλα παράγει μικρότερες, σημασιολογικά εμπλουτισμένες εξαγωγές.', 'hu': 'Az Open Information Extraction (OIE) célja, hogy felügyelet nélkül, domain-független módon kivonja a felületi kapcsolatokat és érveiket a természetes nyelvű szövegből. Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk a MinIE rendszert, amelynek célja, hogy hasznos, kompakt kivonatokat biztosítson nagy pontossággal és visszahívással. A MinIE úgy közelíti meg ezeket a célokat, hogy (1) a polaritásról, a módszerről, a hozzárendelésről és a mennyiségekről szóló információkat szemantikus megjegyzésekkel jeleníti meg a tényleges kivonás helyett, és (2) azonosítja és eltávolítja a túlságosan specifikus részeket. Kísérleti tanulmányt végeztünk több valós adatkészlettel, és megállapítottuk, hogy a MinIE versenyképes vagy nagyobb pontosságot és visszahívást ér el, mint a legtöbb korábbi rendszer, ugyanakkor rövidebb, szemantikailag gazdagított extrakciókat eredményez.', 'ka': 'გახსნილი ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქციის მიზეზი არის სამყარო დაკავშირება და ისინი არგუმენტები თავისუფლიო ენის ტექსტიდან განსხვავება განსხვავებული, დემომინის განსხვავებული გარე ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ მინIE, OIE-ის სისტემა, რომელიც უნდა გამოიყენოთ საჭირო, კომპექტური ექსპექციები, რომელიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია და დახმარება MinIE მიიღება ამ მიზეზების შესახებ (1) გამოსახულებული ინფორმაცია პოლარიტება, მოდიალობა, ატრიბუცია და მრავალები, რომლებიც სიმენტიკური ანოტრაციების შესახებ რეალური ექსტრაქციაში და (2) განსახულება და გამოყენ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტიური სწავლა, რამდენიმე რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების კონპექციური ან უფრო მარტივი სისტემების შესაძლებლობა და დავხმარება, როგორც იგივე დროში უფრო კონპექციურ', 'it': "L'obiettivo dell'Open Information Extraction (OIE) è estrarre le relazioni superficiali e i loro argomenti dal testo in lingua naturale in modo non supervisionato e indipendente dal dominio. In questo articolo proponiamo MinIE, un sistema OIE che mira a fornire estrazioni utili e compatte con elevata precisione e richiamo. MinIE si avvicina a questi obiettivi (1) rappresentando informazioni su polarità, modalità, attribuzione e quantità con annotazioni semantiche invece che nell'estrazione effettiva, e (2) identificando e rimuovendo parti considerate eccessivamente specifiche. Abbiamo condotto uno studio sperimentale con diversi set di dati del mondo reale e abbiamo scoperto che MinIE raggiunge precisione e richiamo competitivi o superiori rispetto alla maggior parte dei sistemi precedenti, producendo allo stesso tempo estrazioni più brevi e semanticamente arricchite.", 'lt': 'Atviros informacijos ekstrakcijos (OIE) tikslas – nepastebimu, nepriklausomu nuo srities ištraukti paviršiaus santykius ir jų argumentus iš natūralios kalbos teksto. Šiame dokumente siūlome OIE sistemą „MinIE“, kurios tikslas – suteikti naudingas, kompaktines ekstrakcijas su dideliu tikslumu ir atšaukimu. MinIE approaches these goals by (1) representing information about polarity, modality, attribution, and quantities with semantic annotations instead of in the actual extraction, and (2) identifying and removing parts that are considered overly specific.  Atlikome eksperimentinį tyrimą su keliais realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkiniais ir nustatėme, kad MinIE pasiekia konkurencinį arba didesnį tikslumą ir at šaukimą nei dauguma ankstesnių sistemų, tuo pačiu metu gaminant trumpesnius, semantiškai praturtintus ekstrahavimus.', 'mk': 'The goal of Open Information Extraction (OIE) is to extract surface relations and their arguments from natural-language text in an unsupervised, domain-independent manner.  In this paper, we propose MinIE, an OIE system that aims to provide useful, compact extractions with high precision and recall.  MinIE ги приближува овие цели со (1) претставување на информации за поларитетот, моделноста, припишувањето и количините со семантични анотации наместо во вистинската екстракција, и (2) идентификување и отстранување на делови кои се сметаат за премногу специфични. Ние спроведовме експериментална студија со неколку податоци од реалниот свет и откривме дека MinIE постигнува конкурентна или повисока прецизност и потсетување од повеќето претходни системи, истовремено произведувајќи пократки, семантично богати екстракции.', 'kk': 'Ашылған мәліметті тарқату (OIE) мақсаты - табиғи тілді мәтіннен, доменге тәуелді тәртіпсіздік тәртіпсіздік аргументтерін тарқату. Бұл қағазда MinIE- ті, пайдалы, дәл дәл-дәл және еске салуға мақсатты OIE жүйесін ұсынып тастаймыз. MinIE бұл мақсаттарға (1) деген бұл мақсаттарды полярлық, күй- жайы, қатынасы және семантикалық жазбалар туралы мәліметті келтіреді. Бұл мақсаттарға (2) жеткілікті тарқату және өзгертілген бөліктерді аны Біз бірнеше шын әлемдегі деректер жинақтарымен тәжірибелі зерттеуді істеп, MinIE бұрынғы жүйелердің көптеген немесе артық дәрежесіне жеткізеді, бірақ бір уақытта қысқа және семантикалық түрлендірімізді жасап', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം സ്വാഭാവ വിഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും അവരുടെ വാദ്യാഭാഷയുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത, ഡ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മിനിയെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഉപയോഗപ്പെടുത്തുവാനും, ഉയര്\u200dന്ന പ്രിസിഷനും ഓര്\u200dമ്മയുമായി പ പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം സെമാന്റിക് അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതിനി We conducted an experimental study with several real-world datasets and found that MinIE achieves competitive or higher precision and recall than most prior systems, while at the same time producing shorter, semantically enriched extractions.', 'ms': 'Tujuan Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka (OIE) adalah untuk mengekstrak hubungan permukaan dan argumen mereka dari teks bahasa-semulajadi dengan cara yang tidak diawasi, bebas domain. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar MinIE, sistem OIE yang bertujuan untuk menyediakan ekstraksi yang berguna, kompak dengan ketepatan dan pengingatan tinggi. MinIE mendekati tujuan ini dengan (1) mewakili maklumat mengenai polariti, modaliti, atribut, dan kuantiti dengan anotasi semantik selain daripada dalam ekstraksi sebenar, dan (2) mengenali dan membuang bahagian yang dianggap terlalu spesifik. Kami melakukan kajian percubaan dengan beberapa set data dunia nyata dan mendapati bahawa MinIE mencapai ketepatan kompetitif atau lebih tinggi dan pengingatan daripada kebanyakan sistem sebelumnya, sementara pada masa yang sama menghasilkan ekstraksi yang lebih pendek dan semantik.', 'mt': 'L-għan tal-Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa (OIE) huwa li r-relazzjonijiet mal-wiċċ u l-argumenti tagħhom jiġu estratti mit-test tal-lingwa naturali b’mod mhux sorveljat u indipendenti mid-dominju. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu lill-MinIE, sistema tal-OIE li għandha l-għan li tipprovdi estrazzjonijiet utli u kompatti bi preċiżjoni għolja u b’ġbir lura. MinIE tilħaq dawn l-għanijiet billi (1) tirrappreżenta informazzjoni dwar il-polarità, il-modalità, l-attribuzzjoni, u kwantitajiet b’annotazzjonijiet semantiċi minflok fl-estrazzjoni attwali, u (2) tidentifika u tneħħi partijiet li huma kkunsidrati speċifikament wisq. Saru studju sperimentali b’diversi settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali u sabu li MinIE tikseb preċiżjoni u tfakkir kompetittivi jew ogħla minn ħafna sistemi preċedenti, filwaqt li fl-istess ħin tipproduċi estrazzjonijiet iqsar u arrikkiti semantikament.', 'mn': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) зорилго нь гадаргуу холбоотой болон тэдний аргументуудыг байгалийн хэл-хэлний текстээс хадгалах юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид MinIE-г, хэрэглэгч, нарийн тодорхойлолтой, санамсаргүй OIE системийг сануулдаг. MinIE нь эдгээр зорилгоонуудыг (1) хэлбэрээр илэрхийлж байгаа бөгөөд хэт тодорхой хэсгийг тодорхойлж, хэт хэмжээний тухай мэдээллийг илэрхийлж байна. Бид олон бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангуудтай туршилтын судалгаа хийсэн ба MinIE нь урьдын системээс илүү өрсөлдөгч, өндөр тодорхойлолт, санамсартай байдаг гэдгийг олж мэдсэн.', 'no': 'Målet for opna informasjon-ekstraksjon (OIE) er å ekstrahera overflatesrelasjonar og argumentene sine frå naturspråk-teksten på ein ukjend, domeneuavhengig måte. I denne papiret foreslår vi MinIE, eit OIE- systemet som mål å gi nyttig, komprimert utpakking med høg nøyaktig og rekommering. MinIE nærmer disse målene med (1) som representerer informasjon om polarisitet, modalitet, attribusjon og kvantitetar med semantiske annotasjonar i staden for det faktiske utpakkinga, og (2) identifiserer og fjernar deler som vert kalla som overspesifikke. Vi oppførte ein eksperimentell studie med fleire datasett i verda og funne at MinIE oppnår konkurrentivt eller høgare presisjon og rekna ut enn dei fleste førre systema, mens samtidig produserer korte, semantisk røyde ekstraksjonar.', 'ro': 'Scopul Extracției Informațiilor Deschise (OIE) este de a extrage relațiile de suprafață și argumentele acestora din textul limbajului natural într-un mod nesupravegheat, independent de domeniu. În această lucrare, propunem MinIE, un sistem OIE care își propune să ofere extracții utile, compacte, cu precizie și rechemare ridicată. MinIE abordează aceste obiective prin (1) reprezentând informații despre polaritate, modalitate, atribuire și cantități cu adnotări semantice în loc de extracție reală, și (2) identificând și eliminând părți care sunt considerate prea specifice. Am realizat un studiu experimental cu mai multe seturi de date din lumea reală și am constatat că MinIE obține o precizie competitivă sau mai mare și rechemare decât majoritatea sistemelor anterioare, producând în același timp extracții mai scurte, semantic îmbogățite.', 'pl': 'Celem Open Information Extraction (OIE) jest wyodrębnienie relacji powierzchniowych i ich argumentów z tekstu naturalnego w sposób bez nadzoru, niezależny od domeny. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy MinIE, system OIE, którego celem jest zapewnienie użytecznych, kompaktowych ekstrakcji z wysoką precyzją i odzyskiwaniem. MinIE podchodzi do tych celów poprzez (1) reprezentowanie informacji o polaryzacji, modalności, atrybucji i ilościach za pomocą adnotacji semantycznych zamiast w rzeczywistej ekstrakcji oraz (2) identyfikację i usuwanie części, które są uważane za zbyt specyficzne. Przeprowadziliśmy badanie eksperymentalne z kilkoma rzeczywistymi zbiorami danych i stwierdziliśmy, że MinIE osiąga konkurencyjną lub wyższą precyzję i odzyskiwanie niż większość poprzednich systemów, jednocześnie produkując krótsze, wzbogacone semantycznie ekstrakcje.', 'sr': 'Cilj izvlačenja otvorene informacije (OIE) je izvlačenje površinskih odnosa i njihovih argumenata iz teksta prirodnog jezika na neodređen, domenički nezavisni način. U ovom papiru predlažemo MinIE, sistem OIE-a koji ima cilj da pruži korisne, kompaktne ekstrakcije sa visokom preciznošću i sećanja. MinIE se približava ovim ciljevima od (1) koji predstavljaju informacije o polarnosti, modalitetu, privlačnosti i količinama sa semantičnim annotacijom umjesto stvarne ekstrakcije, i (2) identifikacije i uklanjanje delova koje se smatraju previše specifičnim. Provodili smo eksperimentalnu studiju sa nekoliko podataka o stvarnom svijetu i otkrili da MinIE postiže konkurentnu ili veću preciznost i seća se od većih prethodnih sistema, dok u isto vreme proizvodi kraće, semantički bogate ekstrakcije.', 'sv': 'Målet med Open Information Extraction (OIE) är att extrahera ytrelationer och deras argument från naturspråkig text på ett obevakat, domänoberoende sätt. I denna uppsats föreslår vi MinIE, ett OIE-system som syftar till att tillhandahålla användbara, kompakta extraktioner med hög precision och återkallelse. MinIE närmar sig dessa mål genom att (1) representera information om polaritet, modalitet, attribution och kvantiteter med semantiska anteckningar istället för i själva extraktionen, och (2) identifiera och ta bort delar som anses alltför specifika. Vi genomförde en experimentell studie med flera verkliga datauppsättningar och fann att MinIE uppnår konkurrenskraftig eller högre precision och återkallelse än de flesta tidigare system, samtidigt som vi producerar kortare, semantiskt berikade extraktioner.', 'si': 'The object of Open Info Extraction (OIE) is to extract the surf සම්බන්ධය සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරාකෘතිය-භාෂාව පාළුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත පාළුවක් නැතුවක්, domain මේ පැත්තේ, අපි MinIE විශ්වාස කරනවා, OIE පද්ධතියක්, උපයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ස MinIE approach this Goals by (1) represizing data on polability, mode, atribution, and quantity with semantic annuitions replaced by the true extraction, and (2) ID and remove parties that are deem overly esperified. අපි ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සේට් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් කරලා හොයාගත්තා මිනිIE ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැත්තම් වැඩි පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතිවලට වඩා වඩ', 'so': 'Ujeedada soo saarista macluumaadka furan (OIE) waa in laga soo bixiyo xiriirka surfa iyo warqadooda uu ka soo bixiyo qoraalka afka dabiicadda ah, si aan loo ilaalin oo aan xor lahayn. Warqadan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa MinIE, nidaam OIE ah oo ku talo gala in la siiyo alaab faa’iido leh oo la soo jiidiyo xisaabta aad u sahlan iyo xusuusta. MinIE wuxuu u soo dhowaadaa meelahaas (1) oo ka muuqata macluumaad ku saabsan baaritaanka, qaabka, tababarka, iyo qiimaha la xiriira xaaladaha kaleemeyska, taas oo ka bedela goobta la soo bixiyo xaaladaha si dhabta ah, iyo (2) aqoonsashada iyo dhaqaajinta qaybaha aad u gaaran. Waxbarasho baaritaanka ah ayaannu sameynay qaar kamid ah oo dunida oo dhab ah, waxaana ogaanay in MinIE uu helo iskutaar ama si ka sareeya, isla markaasna aan xusuusnayn nidaamka hore, isla waqtigaas oo soo bixinaya wado gaaban, si qayb ah loo hodanayo.', 'ta': 'திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீடு (OIE) குறிப்பு திறந்த மூலத்தின் தொடர்பு இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு OIE அமைப்பை நினைவூட்டுகிறோம். அது பயனுள்ளது, உயர் துள்ளிவில் மற்றும் நினைவு கொண்டு பிரித குறிப்பிட்ட பெருக்கத்திற்கு பதிலாக குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல்களைக் குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு பதிலாக குறிப்பிடும் தூய்மையைக் குறிப்பிடும் தகவல் We conducted an experimental study with several real-world datasets and found that MinIE achieves competitive or higher precision and recall than most prior systems, while at the same time producing shorter, semantically enriched extractions.', 'ur': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) کا موقع یہ ہے کہ سطح رابطہ اور ان کی ارائیوں کو طبیعی زبان کے متن سے ایک غیر محفوظ، ڈومین-مستقل طریقے سے نکالیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم MinIE کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک OIE سیستم جو فائدہ پہنچانے کا ارادہ رکھتا ہے، بہت سی دقیق اور یاد رکھنے کے ساتھ پیدا کرنا چاہتا ہے. MinIE ان موجودات کو (1) کے ذریعے پہنچا رہا ہے جو کھولتی، موجودات، تعریف اور موجودات کے بارے میں معلومات کی تصویر کرتی ہیں، اور ان موجودات کے ذریعے جو حقیقی اخراج کے بدلے سمantic annotations ہیں، اور (2) کو معلوم کرتا ہے اور مٹا دیتا ہے جو بہت خاص ہیں۔ ہم نے بہت سی حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ایک آزمائش کی تحقیق کی اور دیکھا کہ MinIE آزمائش یا زیادہ دقیق حاصل کرتا ہے اور بہت سے پہلے سیستموں سے بھی یاد کرتا ہے، اور اس کے ساتھ چھوٹی، سیماٹی طور پر ثروت حاصل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ochiq maʼlumot ajratish (OIE) maqola - sayt aloqalarini va asl tildagi qiymatlarni saqlab boʻlmaydi, domen emas boʻlmaydi. Bu qogʻozda biz MinIE, OIE tizimini ishlatish uchun foydalanuvchi, qismlarni ko'proq aniqlash va eslab qolish uchun ishlatiladigan. MinIE quyidagi narsalarni aniqlashga ega bo'lgan narsalarni (1) aniqlash va maxsus bo'lgan qismlarni aniqlash va olib tashlash mumkin. Biz bir necha dunyo haqiqatgina maʼlumotlar tarkibini bajardik va MinIE ishlab chiqqan ko'proq aniqligini amalga oshirishni topdik va bir necha tizimlardan ham eslab qolganmiz, va shu paytida esa, kamida qisqa, semantik taxminan soʻzlarni yaratish.", 'vi': 'Mục đích của việc khai thác thông tin (OPE) là chiết xuất các quan hệ trên bề mặt và lý lẽ của chúng từ văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên theo một cách riêng biệt không giám sát. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất bộ phim "Mine", một hệ thống giàn khoan nguyên tố nguyên chất nhằm cung cấp các chiết xuất có ích, gọn và độ chuẩn cao. Minuie tiếp cận với những mục tiêu này bằng cách: 1) đại diện cho thông tin về các tình huống, chi tiết, hay tỷ lệ, và số lượng có ghi chú theo ngữ pháp thay vì vào thực tế khai thác, và (2) xác định và gỡ bỏ những phần được xem là quá đặc biệt. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện một nghiên cứu thử nghiệm với nhiều nhà dữ liệu thế giới thực và phát hiện ra rằng bộ phim này đạt độ chính xác và hồi phục cao hơn hầu hết các hệ thống trước, cùng với việc cung cấp khai quật ngắn gọn, theo ngữ nghĩa.', 'bg': 'Целта на откритото извличане на информация (OIE) е да извлече повърхностните връзки и техните аргументи от текста на естествен език по ненадзорен, независим от домейна начин. В настоящата статия предлагаме система на OIE, която има за цел да осигури полезни, компактни екстракции с висока точност и изземване. МинIE подхожда към тези цели като (1) представя информация за полярност, модалност, приписване и количества със семантични анотации вместо в действителното извличане, и (2) идентифицира и премахва части, които се считат за твърде специфични. Проведохме експериментално проучване с няколко набора от данни от реалния свят и установихме, че постига конкурентна или по-висока прецизност и отзоваване от повечето предишни системи, като същевременно произвежда по-кратки, семантично обогатени екстракции.', 'hr': 'Cilj izvlačenja otvorene informacije (OIE) je izvući površine odnose i njihove argumente iz teksta prirodnog jezika na neodređen način neovisnog domena. U ovom papiru predlažemo MinIE, sustav OIE-a koji cilja pružiti korisne, kompaktne ekstrakcije sa visokom preciznošću i sjećanja. MinIE se približava ovim ciljevima od (1) koji predstavljaju informacije o polarnosti, modalitetu, privlačnosti i količinama s semantičkim annotacijom umjesto stvarnog izvlačenja, i (2) identifikacije i uklanjanje dijelova koje se smatraju previše specifičnim. Provodili smo eksperimentalno ispitivanje s nekoliko podataka o stvarnom svijetu i otkrili da MinIE postiže konkurentnu ili veću preciznost i sjeća se nego najprije, dok istovremeno proizvodi kraće, semantički bogate ekstrakcije.', 'da': 'Målet med Open Information Extraction (OIE) er at udtrække overfladebeforhold og deres argumenter fra natursproget tekst på en uafhængig og uafhængig måde. I denne artikel foreslår vi MinIE, et OIE-system, der har til formål at levere nyttige, kompakte udvindinger med høj præcision og tilbagekaldelse. MinIE nærmer sig disse mål ved at (1) repræsentere oplysninger om polaritet, modalitet, tilskrivning og mængder med semantiske noteringer i stedet for i den faktiske ekstraktion, og (2) identificere og fjerne dele, der betragtes som alt for specifikke. Vi gennemførte en eksperimentel undersøgelse med flere virkelige datasæt og fandt ud af, at MinIE opnår konkurrencedygtig eller højere præcision og tilbagekaldelse end de fleste tidligere systemer, samtidig med at vi producerer kortere, semantisk berigede ekstraktioner.', 'nl': 'Het doel van Open Information Extraction (OIE) is om oppervlakterelaties en hun argumenten op een onbeheerde, domeinonafhankelijke manier uit natuurtaaltekst te extraheren. In dit artikel stellen we MinIE voor, een OIE-systeem dat tot doel heeft nuttige, compacte extracties met hoge precisie en terugroepactie te leveren. MinIE benadert deze doelen door (1) informatie over polariteit, modaliteit, attributie en hoeveelheden weer te geven met semantische annotaties in plaats van in de eigenlijke extractie, en (2) delen te identificeren en te verwijderen die als te specifiek worden beschouwd. We voerden een experimenteel onderzoek uit met verschillende real-world datasets en ontdekten dat MinIE concurrerende of hogere precisie en recall bereikt dan de meeste eerdere systemen, terwijl tegelijkertijd kortere, semantisch verrijkte extracties produceert.', 'de': 'Ziel der Open Information Extraction (OIE) ist es, Oberflächenbeziehungen und deren Argumente aus natursprachlichem Text unbeaufsichtigt und domänenunabhängig zu extrahieren. In diesem Papier schlagen wir MinIE vor, ein OIE-System, das darauf abzielt, nützliche, kompakte Extraktionen mit hoher Präzision und Rückruf bereitzustellen. MinIE nähert sich diesen Zielen, indem (1) Informationen über Polarität, Modalität, Attribution und Größen mit semantischen Annotationen anstatt in der eigentlichen Extraktion dargestellt und (2) Teile identifiziert und entfernt werden, die als übermäßig spezifisch angesehen werden. Wir führten eine experimentelle Studie mit mehreren realen Datensätzen durch und fanden heraus, dass MinIE konkurrenzfähige oder höhere Präzision und Rückruf erreicht als die meisten vorherigen Systeme, während gleichzeitig kürzere, semantisch angereicherte Extraktionen erzeugt werden.', 'id': 'Tujuan Ekstraksi Informasi Buka (OIE) adalah mengekstraksi hubungan permukaan dan argumen mereka dari teks bahasa alami dengan cara yang tidak diawasi, secara independen domain. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan MinIE, sistem OIE yang bertujuan untuk menyediakan ekstraksi berguna, kompakt dengan presisi tinggi dan pengingatan. MinIE mendekati tujuan ini dengan (1) mewakili informasi tentang polaritas, modalitas, atribut, dan jumlah dengan anotasi semantis bukan dalam ekstraksi sebenarnya, dan (2) mengidentifikasi dan menghapus bagian yang dianggap terlalu spesifik. Kami melakukan sebuah studi percobaan dengan beberapa set data dunia nyata dan menemukan bahwa MinIE mencapai kepekatan kompetitif atau lebih tinggi dan ingatan dari kebanyakan sistem sebelumnya, sementara pada saat yang sama menghasilkan ekstraksi yang lebih pendek, semantis kaya.', 'ko': 'OIE(Open Information Reference)의 목표는 감독되지 않고 영역이 독립된 방식으로 자연 언어 텍스트에서 표면 관계식과 매개변수를 추출하는 것입니다.본고에서 우리는 유용하고 치밀하며 높은 정밀도와 리콜율 추출을 제공하는 OIE 시스템을 제시했다.Minie는 (1) 실제 추출에서 극성, 정태, 속성과 수량에 대한 정보를 표시하지 않고 의미로 주석하고 (2) 지나치게 구체적으로 여겨지는 부분을 식별하고 삭제함으로써 이러한 목표를 실현한다.우리는 몇 개의 실제 세계의 데이터 집합을 실험 연구한 결과 Minie가 대부분의 이전 시스템보다 경쟁적이거나 높은 정확도와 리콜율을 가지며 더욱 짧고 의미가 풍부한 추출을 하는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'هدف اخراج اطلاعات باز (OIE) رابطه\u200cهای سطح و ارائه\u200cهایشان از متن زبان طبیعی به طریق غیرقابل تحریک و مستقل به دامنی است. در این کاغذ، ما MinIE را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک سیستم OIE که هدف می\u200cدهد که استخراج\u200cهای مفید را با دقیق و یادآوری بالا بدهد. MinIE به این هدف نزدیک می\u200cشود با (1) نشان دادن اطلاعات درباره\u200cی قطعیت، روش\u200cاندازی، تعریف و مقدار\u200cهایی که به جای استخراج حقیقی دارند، و (2) تعریف و استخراج بخش\u200cهایی که خیلی خاص می\u200cشوند. ما یک مطالعه آزمایشی با چندین مجموعه داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی انجام دادیم و فهمیدیم که MinIE دقیقات رقابتی یا بالاتر را می\u200cرساند و یاد می\u200cگیرد از بیشترین سیستم\u200cهای قبلی، در حالی که در آن زمان اضافه\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cتر و semantically ثروتمند می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Lengo la kutengeneza taarifa za wazi (OIE) ni kuondoa mahusiano ya surfe na hoja zao kutoka kwenye maandishi ya asili ya lugha kwa njia isiyo na usalama wa ndani. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza MinIE, mfumo wa OIE ambao una lengo la kutoa utoaji wa manufaa, makubaliano yenye uhakika mkubwa na kukumbuka. MinIE inaingilia malengo haya kwa (1) wakiwakilisha taarifa kuhusu uchafuzi, utaratibu, hisia, na kiasi kikubwa na matatizo ya kimapenzi badala ya kuchukuliwa kwa ukweli, na (2) kutambua na kuondoa sehemu ambazo zinaonekana kuwa ni mahsusi. Tulifanya utafiti wa majaribio na seti za data halisi za dunia na tukagundua kuwa MinIE inapata ufanisi wa ushindani au kiasi kikubwa na kukumbuka zaidi ya mifumo ya awali, wakati huo huo huo unaotengeneza uchaguzi mdogo, utajiri wa kimapenzi.', 'af': "Die doel van Open Information Extraction (OIE) is om oorspronklike verbindings en hulle argumente uit natuurlike-taal teks uit te pak in 'n ononderwerpende, domein-onafhanklike manier. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons MinIE, 'n OIE stelsel wat doel om nuttige, kompakte uitpakkinge te verskaf met hoë presisie en herhaal. MinIE naby hierdie doels deur (1) te verteenwoordig inligting oor polariteit, modaliteit, toetrekking en hoeveelheid met semantiese notasies in plaas van in die werklike uittrekking, en (2) te identifiseer en verwyder dele wat oorvloedig spesifieke word. Ons het 'n eksperimentale studie gedoen met verskeie regte wêreld datastelle en gevind dat MinIE rekenaar of hoër presisie en rekenaar as mees voorheede stelsels, terwyl op dieselfde tyd kort, semantiek verryk uitvoering produseer.", 'sq': 'Qëllimi i nxjerrjes së informacionit të hapur (OIE) është të nxjerrë marrëdhëniet e sipërfaqes dhe argumentet e tyre nga teksti në gjuhën natyrore në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur, të pavarur nga domeni. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë MinIE, një sistem OIE që synon të ofrojë ekstraksione të dobishme, kompakte me saktësi të lartë dhe tërheqje. MinIE i afrohet këtyre qëllimeve duke (1) përfaqësuar informacionin rreth polaritetit, modalitetit, atribucionit dhe sasive me anotacione semantike në vend të ekstraktimit aktual dhe (2) identifikimin dhe heqjen e pjesëve që konsiderohen tepër specifike. Ne kryem një studim eksperimental me disa grupe të dhënash të botës reale dhe gjetëm se MinIE arrin saktësi konkurruese apo më të lartë dhe kujtim se shumica e sistemeve të mëparshëm, ndërsa në të njëjtën kohë prodhon ekstraksione më të shkurtra dhe të pasura semantikisht.', 'tr': "Açmak Maglumaty Açmak (OIE) maksady - ýeri baglaýyşlaryny we öz argymlaryny tebigy-dil metinden garşyrylmady, domençy-garaşsyz bir şekilde çykarmakdyr. Bu kagyzda MinIE'i, faydaly bir OIE sistemasyny saýlamak üçin nusgalan, ýokary derejesi we hatyrlamak üçin goşulan şekilde teklip edýäris. MinIE bu hedeflere (1) köp polaritet, modalitet, hasaplanja we semantik sözleşmeler hakynda maglumatlar ifade edip bilýär. Gerçek sözleriň ýerine, we (2) aşa spesifik bolan bölekleri tanamak we çykarmak bilen golaýar. Biz birnäçe sanat dünýä veri setirli bilen experimental bir araştyrymy etdik we MinIE öňki sistemalardan döwüräsi ýa-da has dogry ýagdaýy ýetip bilýär we munuň ýagdaýynda birnäçe kiçi, semantik bilen baýramçylyklary bar.", 'hy': "Բաց տեղեկատվության վերացման նպատակն է վերացնել մակերեսային հարաբերությունները և նրանց փաստարկները բնական լեզվի տեքստից անկախ, անկախ բնույթից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք «Minie»-ին, որը նպատակն է օգտակար, համակարգ հանելու համար բարձր ճշգրտությամբ և հիշողությամբ: Minie-ը մոտենում է այս նպատակներին' ներկայացնելով (1) տեղեկատվությունը կողմնականության, մեթոդիայի, պատասխանատվության և քանակությամբ սեմանտիկ նշումների փոխարեն, և (2) բացահայտելով և վերացնելով մասեր, որոնք համարվում են չափազանց հատուկ: Մենք մի փորձարկման ուսումնասիրություն կատարեցինք մի քանի իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի միջոցով և հայտնաբերեցինք, որ Minie-ը հասնում է մրցակցության կամ ավելի ճշգրտության և հիշողության, քան նախորդ համակարգերի մեծ մասը, միաժամանակ արտադրում է ավելի կարճ, սեմանտիկ", 'am': 'The goal of Open Information Extraction (OIE) is to extract surface relations and their arguments from natural-language text in an unsupervised, domain-independent manner.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የኦআই ሲስተም፣ ጥቅም፣ ከፍተኛ ቁጥር እና ማስታወስ ለመስጠት የሚያስፈልገውን የኦআই ስርዓት መቆጣጠርን እናስባለን፡፡ MinIE በአካባቢው ውጤት በሚያሳየው፣ (2) በተለየ ክፍል ላይ የሚታወቁትን የርኵሰት፣ መልዕክት፣ አካባቢ እና ቁጥር በሚያሳየቁበት ወሬ (1) እና (2) የሚታወቅና የሚያስወግድ ክፍሎች እና ማስወገድ ነው፡፡ ብዙ እውነተኛ ዓለምን ዳታተሮች ጋር ፈተና አደረግነው፤ MinIE ተቃዋሚውን ወይም ከፍተኛ አግኝታ እንዲያገኝ እና ከቀድሞው ስርዓቶች ይልቅ አስታሰብ፣ በዚያውም ሰዓት አነስተኛ ስርዓት አነስተኛዊ ባለጠጎች ምርጫዎች እንዲያገኙ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'bn': 'ওপেন তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাক্ট্র্যাকশনের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা লেখা থেকে তাদের যুক্তিগুলো বের করে আনতে পারে, সংরক্ষিত, ডোমেইন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মিনিয়াকে প্রস্তাব করি, একটি অআইE সিস্টেম, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ব্যবহার, বিনিময়ের সুনির্দিষ্ট বিষয়বস্তু দি মিনিয়াই এই লক্ষ্যের মাধ্যমে (১) প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছে দূষণ, মৌলিক, বিনিময়, এবং প্রতিনিধিত্বের পরিবর্তে সেমেন্টিক বিরক্তির পরিবর্তে তথ্যের প্রতিনিধিত্ব কর আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বাস্তব বিশ্বের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার গবেষণা করেছি এবং পেয়েছি যে মিনিয়াই প্রতিযোগিতা বা উচ্চপদস্থিতি অর্জন করেছে এবং বেশীরভাগ পূর্ব', 'ca': "L'objectiu de l'Extracció d'Informació Oberta (OIE) és extrair les relacions de superfície i els seus arguments del text de llenguatge natural d'una manera no supervisada, independent de domini. En aquest paper, proposem a MinIE, un sistema de l'OIE que busca proporcionar extraccions útils i compactes amb alta precisió i recordació. MinIE aborda aquests objectius representant (1) informació sobre polaritat, modalitat, atribució i quantitats amb anotacions semàntiques en lloc de l'extracció real, i (2) identificant i eliminant parts considerades excessivament específiques. Vam fer un estudi experimental amb diversos conjunts de dades del món real i vam descobrir que MinIE aconsegueix precisió competitiva o més alta i recuperació que la majoria dels sistemes anteriors, produint alhora extraccions més curtes i enriquecidas semànticament.", 'bs': 'Cilj izvlačenja otvorene informacije (OIE) je izvlačenje površinskih odnosa i njihovih argumenata iz teksta prirodnog jezika na neodređen način neovisnog domena. U ovom papiru predlažemo MinIE, sistem OIE koji je cilj pružati korisne, kompaktne ekstrakcije sa visokom preciznošću i sjećanja. MinIE se približava ovim ciljevima od (1) koji predstavljaju informacije o polarnosti, modalitetu, privlačnosti i količinama sa semantičnim annotacijom umjesto stvarne ekstrakcije, i (2) identifikacije i uklanjanje dijelova koje se smatraju previše specifičnim. Provodili smo eksperimentalno ispitivanje s nekoliko realnog svijeta podataka i otkrili da MinIE postigne konkurentnu ili veću preciznost i sjeća se od najprethodnijih sustava, dok u isto vrijeme proizvodi kraće, semantički bogate ekstrakcije.', 'cs': 'Cílem Open Information Extraction (OIE) je extrahovat povrchové vztahy a jejich argumenty z textu přirozeného jazyka bez dohledu, doménově nezávislým způsobem. V tomto článku navrhujeme MinIE, OIE systém, jehož cílem je poskytnout užitečné, kompaktní extrakce s vysokou přesností a odvoláním. MinIE k těmto cílům přistupuje tím, že (1) reprezentuje informace o polaritě, modalitě, atribuci a veličinách pomocí sémantických anotací namísto vlastní extrakce a (2) identifikuje a odstraňuje části, které jsou považovány za příliš specifické. Provedli jsme experimentální studii s několika skutečnými datovými sadami a zjistili, že MinIE dosahuje konkurenční nebo vyšší přesnosti a odvolání než většina předchozích systémů, přičemž zároveň produkuje kratší, sémanticky obohacené extrakce.', 'et': 'Avatud informatsiooni väljavõtmise (OIE) eesmärk on ekstraheerida pinnasuhteid ja nende argumente looduskeelsest tekstist järelevalveta, domeenist sõltumatul viisil. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja MinIE, OIE süsteemi, mille eesmärk on pakkuda kasulikke, kompaktseid ekstraheerimisi suure täpsusega ja tagasivõtmisega. MinIE läheneb nendele eesmärkidele (1) esitades teavet polaarsuse, modaalsuse, atributsiooni ja koguste kohta semantiliste annotatsioonidega tegeliku ekstraheerimise asemel ning (2) tuvastades ja eemaldades osad, mida peetakse liiga spetsiifiliseks. Me viisime läbi eksperimentaalse uuringu mitmete reaalmaailma andmekogumitega ja leidsime, et MinIE saavutab konkurentsivõimelise või suurema täpsuse ja tagasikutsumise kui enamik varasemaid süsteeme, samal ajal tootes lühemaid semantiliselt rikastatud ekstraktsioone.', 'fi': 'Avoimen tiedonhaun (OIE) tavoitteena on poimia pintasuhteita ja niiden argumentteja luonnollisesta tekstistä valvomattomalla, verkkotunnuksesta riippumattomalla tavalla. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme MinIE:tä, OIE:n järjestelmää, jonka tavoitteena on tuottaa hyödyllisiä, kompakteja uuttoja erittäin tarkasti ja takaisinkutsulla. MinIE lähestyy näitä tavoitteita (1) esittämällä polariteettia, modaalisuutta, attribuuttia ja määriä koskevia tietoja semanttisilla huomautuksilla varsinaisen ekstraktion sijaan ja (2) tunnistamalla ja poistamalla osia, joita pidetään liian spesifisinä. Toteutimme kokeellisen tutkimuksen useilla reaalimaailman datakokonaisuuksilla ja totesimme, että MinIE saavuttaa kilpailukykyisen tai paremman tarkkuuden ja takaisinkutsun kuin useimmat aiemmat järjestelmät, samalla kun tuottaa lyhyempiä, semanttisesti rikastettuja uuttoja.', 'az': 'Açıq Malümat Extraction (OIE) məqsədi səbəb ilişkilerini və argumentlərini təbiətli dil metindən təhsil edilməyən, domain-bağımsız bir şekildə çıxartmaqdır. Bu kağızda MinIE, faydalı bir OIE sistemi təklif edirik, yüksək dəqiqliyyat və yada salmaq istəyirik. MinIE bu məqsədilə (1) olaraq polarlıq, modaliyyət, attribution haqqında məlumat göstərir, və həqiqət təkrarlama yerinə semantik təkrarlama və (2) təkrarlama və təkrarlama məlumatları təkrarlayır. Biz bir neçə real dünya verilənləri ilə təcrübə təhsil etdik və MinIE müqayisədə və daha yüksək dəqiqliyi və daha əvvəlki sistemlərdən daha az, semantik dövlətli əlaqələri ürəkləndirdik.', 'jv': 'The goal of Open information extract Nang pemilih iki, kita nggunakake MinINI, sistem OINI nggawe barang pengguna luwih apik, paket kesempakan ngono nggawe barang apik. MinSE kang diandelah bukane iki dadi (1) kang dianggawe informasi ning polarity, modalité, attribution, lan unversi barêng semanti angan tanggal gawe ngilangno dhéwé, lan (2) kang dianggawe lan mbutuhake ndéwé sing paling nggawe kesempaké. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk kelas telébudhak karo akeh dataset sing berarti barêng-barêng kanggo nyengke MinSE kuwi nggawe barang penggunan sing luwih apik dhéwé, winih ngono nggawe sistem sing isih sing luwih apik, sampeyan ngono nggawe barang langgar sampeyan pakan.', 'sk': 'Cilj odprtega izvlečka informacij (OIE) je izvleči površinske relacije in njihove argumente iz besedila v naravnem jeziku na neodvisen, neodvisen od domene način. V tem članku predlagamo MinIE, sistem OIE, katerega cilj je zagotoviti uporabne, kompaktne ekstrakcije z visoko natančnostjo in odpoklicem. MinIE pristopi k tem ciljem tako, da (1) predstavi informacije o polarnosti, modalnosti, dodeljevanju in količinah s semantičnimi opombami namesto v dejanskem ekstrakciji ter (2) identificira in odstrani dele, ki veljajo za preveč specifične. Izvedli smo eksperimentalno študijo z več resničnimi nabori podatkov in ugotovili, da MinIE dosega konkurenčno ali večjo natančnost in odpoklic kot večina prejšnjih sistemov, hkrati pa proizvaja krajše, semantično obogatene ekstrakcije.', 'he': 'המטרה של מחלץ מידע פתוח (OIE) היא לחלץ מערכות יחסים על פני השטח והטיעונים שלהם מתוך טקסט שפה טבעית באופן לא משגיח, עצמאי על שטח. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים MinIE, מערכת OIE שמתכוונת לספק חטיפות שימושיות, חדות עם מדויק גבוה ולזכור. MinIE מתקרב למטרות האלה על ידי (1) מייצג מידע על קוטביות, מודיאליות, מחויבות, וכמות עם ציונים סמנטיים במקום בחזרה האמיתית, ו (2) זיהוי ומסיר חלקים שנחשבו ספציפיים מדי. ביצענו מחקר ניסוי עם מספר קופסאות נתונים בעולם האמיתי ומצאנו שמיני איי משיגה מדויקה תחרותית או גבוהה יותר ותזכורת מאשר רוב המערכות הקודמות, ובאותו הזמן מייצרת יצירות קצרות ומעשרות סמנטית.', 'ha': "Gabon da Ka Extraɗa Agaji na bayani (OIU) shine ka fitar masu haɗi na fuskar ƙasa da argument daga matsayin harshen asimi cikin wata tsaro, don da kuma ba'a tsare shi ba. Ga wannan takardan, Muke bukãtar da MinIU, wata na'urar OIU wanda ke so da za'a iya samar da amfani, kuma masu samu'i da haske da kuma tuna. MinIU yana kusantar da waɗannan goal da (1) ke gaya lãbãri game da talauci na ƙayyade nau'i, gwargwadon da za'a yi taƙaita na canjen cema musamman, kuma (2) yana gane da kowace masu ƙayyade da ke ƙayyade. Mun samun wani jarrabi da akan data masu cikin duniya masu gaskiya, kuma Muka gane MinIU yana sãmu ma'aunin yin jihãdi ko da ya fi girma, kuma tuna mafi yawansa na'ura da suka zaman, da kuma a lokacin da muka samu masu ƙaranci, na sami da kashfiyar da kashẽwa masu kashi na semantiki.", 'bo': 'The goal of Open Information Extraction (OIE) is to extract surface relations and their arguments from natural-language text in an unsupervised, domain-independent manner. འོག MinIE approaches these goals by (1) representing information about polarity, modality, attribution, and quantities with semantic annotations instead of in the actual extraction, and (2) identifying and removing parts that are considered overly specific. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་འཇིག་རྟེན་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་ཅན་ཅིག་གི་བརྩལ་བ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་པས། MinIE་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཚད་ལས་དཔལ་འབྱོར་དང་མཐོ་རྩལ་མང་ཙམ་ཐོབ་ར'}
{'en': 'Scientific Information Extraction with Semi-supervised Neural Tagging', 'ar': 'استخلاص المعلومات العلمية باستخدام العلامات العصبية شبه الخاضعة للإشراف', 'es': 'Extracción de información científica con etiquetado neuronal semisupervisado', 'fr': "Extraction d'informations scientifiques avec marquage neuronal semi-supervisé", 'pt': 'Extração de informações científicas com marcação neural semi-supervisionada', 'ja': '半監督型ニューラルタギングによる科学的情報抽出', 'zh': '以半监神经标科学信息取之', 'ru': 'Извлечение научной информации с полуконтролируемой нейронной маркировкой', 'hi': 'अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित तंत्रिका टैगिंग के साथ वैज्ञानिक जानकारी निष्कर्षण', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Faisnéise Eolaíoch le Clibeáil Néarach Leath-mhaoirsithe', 'ka': 'მეცნიერო ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქცია პრომენტი დანახვა ნეიროლური ჭდეებით', 'el': 'Εκχύλισμα επιστημονικών πληροφοριών με ημιεπιτηρημένη νευρωνική σήμανση', 'hu': 'Tudományos információk kivonása félig felügyelt neurális címkézéssel', 'it': 'Estrazione di informazioni scientifiche con etichettatura neurale semi-supervisionata', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Mokslinės informacijos ekstrahavimas su pusiau prižiūrimu neurologiniu ženklinimu', 'kk': 'Жарты бақылаған нейрондық тегтермен ғылым мәліметті тарқату', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Maklumat Saintifik dengan Tagging Neural Semi-Dikawal', 'ml': 'സെമി- നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട നെയുറല്\u200d ടാഗിങ്ങിനുമായി ശാസ്ത്ര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുക', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Xjentifika b’Tagging Newrali Semi-Sorveljat', 'no': 'Utpakking av vitenskapelige informasjon med halvoversikt neuromerking', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны мэдээлэл хамтдаа ажилладаг сэтгэл судлаачид', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja informacji naukowych z pół-nadzorowanym oznaczeniem neuronowym', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor științifice cu etichetare neurală semi-supravegheată', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija naučnih informacija sa polovičnim nadzornim neuronskim etiketama', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාණික තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න', 'so': 'Ka soo saarista macluumaadka cilmiga ah', 'sv': 'Extraktion av vetenskaplig information med halvövervakad neural märkning', 'ta': 'அறிவியல் தகவல் வெளியீடு', 'ur': 'نصف-supervised Neural Tagging کے ساتھ سائنس معلومات اخراج', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sơ tán thông tin khoa học bằng thẻ thần kinh được giám sát', 'bg': 'Извличане на научна информация с полунадзорен неврален етикет', 'da': 'Ekstraktion af videnskabelig information med halvovervåget neural mærkning', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija znanstvenih informacija s polovičnim nadzornim nervnim oznakem', 'nl': 'Extractie van wetenschappelijke informatie met semi-supervised neural tagging', 'id': 'Scientific Information Extraction with Semi-supervised Neural Tagging', 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات علمی با نقاشی عصبی نصف نظارت شده', 'tr': 'Ilmi Maglumat Çikgi', 'sw': 'Kutolewa kwa taarifa za kisayansi kwa alama inayofuatiliwa na ngono za kisasa', 'af': 'Wetenskaplike inligting uitpak met semi- superviseer neurale etiket', 'sq': 'Scientific Information Extraction with Semi-supervised Neural Tagging', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Գիտական տեղեկությունների արտահանումը կիսակառավարվող նյարդային նշաններով', 'de': 'Wissenschaftliche Informationsextraktion mit halbüberwachten neuronalen Markierungen', 'ko': '반감독 신경 표기에 기초한 과학적 정보 추출', 'bn': 'সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা নিউরাল ট্যাগিং দ্বারা বৈজ্ঞানিক তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija znanstvenih informacija sa polovično nadziranom neuronskom etiketom', 'az': 'Yarı-gözləyirli nöral etiketi ilə Bilim Malümatı Çıqış', 'cs': 'Extrakce vědeckých informací s polovičně kontrolovaným neuronovým značením', 'ca': "Extracció d'informació científica amb etiqueta neuronal semisupervisada", 'et': 'Teadusliku teabe ekstraheerimine pooljärelevalvega neuroalsete märgistustega', 'fi': 'Tieteellisen tiedon uuttaminen puolivalvotulla hermomerkinnällä', 'jv': 'tutorial_basic', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje znanstvenih informacij s polnadzorovanim živčnim označevanjem', 'he': 'הוציאה מידע מדעי עם תווית נוירולית שמבוטחת בחצי', 'ha': 'Extractin Agaji na Zani da Taganin na Naural da aka tsare', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་བྱས་པའི་ཚན་རིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper addresses the problem of extracting keyphrases from scientific articles and categorizing them as corresponding to a task, process, or material. We cast the problem as sequence tagging and introduce semi-supervised methods to a neural tagging model, which builds on recent advances in named entity recognition. Since annotated training data is scarce in this domain, we introduce a graph-based semi-supervised algorithm together with a data selection scheme to leverage unannotated articles. Both inductive and transductive semi-supervised learning strategies outperform state-of-the-art information extraction performance on the 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE task.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة مشكلة استخراج العبارات الرئيسية من المقالات العلمية وتصنيفها على أنها تتوافق مع مهمة أو عملية أو مادة. نحن نلقي بالمشكلة على أنها تمييز تسلسلي ونقدم طرقًا شبه خاضعة للإشراف إلى نموذج العلامات العصبية ، والذي يعتمد على التطورات الحديثة في التعرف على الكيانات المسماة. نظرًا لندرة بيانات التدريب المشروحة في هذا المجال ، فإننا نقدم خوارزمية شبه خاضعة للإشراف تعتمد على الرسم البياني جنبًا إلى جنب مع مخطط اختيار البيانات للاستفادة من المقالات غير الموضح بها. تتفوق كل من استراتيجيات التعلم الاستقرائي والتحويلي شبه الخاضع للإشراف على أداء استخراج المعلومات الحديث في مهمة 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'pt': 'Este artigo aborda o problema de extrair frases-chave de artigos científicos e categorizá-las como correspondentes a uma tarefa, processo ou material. Lançamos o problema como marcação de sequência e introduzimos métodos semi-supervisionados em um modelo de marcação neural, que se baseia em avanços recentes no reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas. Como os dados de treinamento anotados são escassos neste domínio, apresentamos um algoritmo semi-supervisionado baseado em grafos juntamente com um esquema de seleção de dados para alavancar artigos não anotados. As estratégias de aprendizado semissupervisionado indutivo e transdutivo superam o desempenho de extração de informações de última geração na tarefa 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'es': 'Este artículo aborda el problema de extraer frases clave de artículos científicos y clasificarlas como correspondientes a una tarea, proceso o material. Presentamos el problema como el etiquetado de secuencias e introducimos métodos semi-supervisados en un modelo de etiquetado neuronal, que se basa en los avances recientes en el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas. Dado que los datos de entrenamiento anotados son escasos en este dominio, introducimos un algoritmo semisupervisado basado en gráficos junto con un esquema de selección de datos para aprovechar los artículos no anotados. Tanto las estrategias de aprendizaje semisupervisado inductivo como transductivo superan el rendimiento de extracción de información de última generación en la tarea 2017 de SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'fr': "Cet article aborde le problème de l'extraction de phrases clés d'articles scientifiques et de leur classification en fonction d'une tâche, d'un processus ou d'un matériau. Nous présentons le problème comme le marquage de séquences et introduisons des méthodes semi-supervisées dans un modèle de marquage neuronal, qui s'appuie sur les récentes avancées en matière de reconnaissance d'entités nommées. Étant donné que les données d'entraînement annotées sont rares dans ce domaine, nous introduisons un algorithme semi-supervisé basé sur des graphiques ainsi qu'un schéma de sélection de données pour tirer parti des articles non annotés. Les stratégies d'apprentissage semi-supervisé inductives et transductives surpassent les performances d'extraction d'informations de pointe de la tâche 10 ScienceIE 2017 du SemEval.", 'ja': '本稿では、科学的記事からキーフレーズを抽出し、タスク、プロセス、または材料に対応するものとして分類する問題について述べる。シーケンスタグ付けとして問題を投げかけ、名前付きエンティティ認識の最近の進歩に基づいたニューラルタグモデルに半監督方法を導入しました。注釈付きトレーニングデータはこのドメインでは乏しいため、注釈なしの記事を活用するためのデータ選択スキームと共に、グラフベースの半監督アルゴリズムを導入します。2017年のSemEval Task 10 ScienceIEタスクでは、帰納的学習と半監督的学習の両方が最先端の情報抽出パフォーマンスを上回っています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर वैज्ञानिक लेखों से keyphrases निकालने और उन्हें एक कार्य, प्रक्रिया या सामग्री के अनुरूप के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने की समस्या को संबोधित करता है। हमने समस्या को अनुक्रम टैगिंग के रूप में कास्ट किया और एक तंत्रिका टैगिंग मॉडल के लिए अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित विधियों को पेश किया, जो नामित इकाई मान्यता में हाल ही में हुई प्रगति पर बनाता है। चूंकि एनोटेट प्रशिक्षण डेटा इस डोमेन में दुर्लभ है, इसलिए हम एक ग्राफ-आधारित अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित एल्गोरिथ्म पेश करते हैं, साथ ही साथ एक डेटा चयन योजना के साथ-साथ अननोटेटेड लेखों का लाभ उठाने के लिए। दोनों आगमनात्मक और transductive अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित सीखने की रणनीतियों 2017 SemEval कार्य 10 ScienceIE कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक जानकारी निष्कर्षण प्रदर्शन से आगे निकल जाते हैं।', 'zh': '科学文取要短语分类为务,事材相应。 以事为序,以半监入神经,立于名最新进展之上。 以注数在领稀缺,故引入图形之半监算法及数择方案,以利用未注释之文。 归转导半监督学习策略在2017年SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE任中均优于先进。', 'ru': 'В данной работе рассматривается проблема извлечения ключевых фраз из научных статей и категоризации их как соответствующих задаче, процессу или материалу. Мы бросаем эту проблему как метку последовательности и вводим полунадзорные методы в модель нейронной метки, которая основана на недавних достижениях в распознавании именованных сущностей. Поскольку аннотированных обучающих данных в этой области мало, мы вводим полунадзорный алгоритм на основе графа вместе со схемой выбора данных для использования неаннотированных статей. Как индуктивные, так и трансдуктивные полунаблюдаемые стратегии обучения превосходят современные показатели извлечения информации в задаче 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le heochairfhrásaí a bhaint as earraí eolaíocha agus iad a chatagóiriú mar nithe a fhreagraíonn do thasc, do phróiseas nó d’ábhar. Réitímid an fhadhb mar chlibeáil seichimh agus tugaimid isteach modhanna leath-mhaoirsithe ar shamhail chlibeála néaraigh, a chuireann leis an dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí maidir le haitheantas aonáin ainmnithe. Ós rud é go bhfuil sonraí oiliúna anótáilte gann sa réimse seo, tugaimid isteach algartam leath-mhaoirsithe graf-bhunaithe mar aon le scéim roghnúcháin sonraí chun earraí gan nótaí a ghiaráil. Sáraíonn straitéisí foghlama leathmhaoirseachta ionduchtach agus trasductive araon feidhmíocht asbhainte faisnéise den scoth ar thasc 10 ScienceIE Tasc SemEval 2017.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a tudományos cikkekből kivont kulcskifejezések problémájával foglalkozik, és azokat feladatnak, folyamatnak vagy anyagnak megfelelőként kategorizálja. A problémát szekvencia címkézésként vetjük, és félig felügyelt módszereket vezetünk be egy neurális címkézési modellbe, amely a nevezett entitások felismerésének legutóbbi fejlődésére épül. Mivel ezen a területen kevés a jegyzetelt képzési adatok, bevezetünk egy grafikon alapú, félig felügyelt algoritmust, valamint egy adatválasztási sémát a jegyzetlen cikkek kihasználására. Mind az induktív, mind a transzduktív félig felügyelt tanulási stratégiák meghaladják a legkorszerűbb információkinyerési teljesítményt a 2017-es SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE feladatban.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εξετάζει το πρόβλημα της εξαγωγής φράσεων κλειδιά από επιστημονικά άρθρα και της κατηγοριοποίησης τους ως αντιστοιχούν σε μια εργασία, διαδικασία ή υλικό. Θέτουμε το πρόβλημα ως ακολουθία ετικετών και εισάγουμε ημι-εποπτευμένες μεθόδους σε ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικής σήμανσης, το οποίο βασίζεται στις πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων. Δεδομένου ότι τα σχολιασμένα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης είναι σπάνια σε αυτόν τον τομέα, εισάγουμε έναν αλγόριθμο ημι-εποπτευμένο με βάση το γράφημα μαζί με ένα σχέδιο επιλογής δεδομένων για να αξιοποιήσουμε τα μη σημειωμένα άρθρα. Τόσο οι επαγωγικές όσο και οι μεταγωγικές ημι-εποπτικές στρατηγικές μάθησης ξεπερνούν την απόδοση εξαγωγής πληροφοριών τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στην εργασία 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს კლავიფრაზების გარეშე მეცნიერო არქეტებიდან და მათ კატეგორიზების გარეშე, როგორც კონფიგურაცია, პროცესი, ან მატერიალთან. ჩვენ პრობლემა, როგორც წერტილის ჩვენება და ნახევარჯერებული მეტოვების ჩვენება ნეიროლური ჩვენება მოდელზე, რომელიც ახლა ახალი წინასწორებაში დავიწყება სახელ ინტერტის განაც ამ დემომინში არაფერი მონაცემები არაფერი იქნება, ჩვენ დავაყენეთ გრაფიკური ნახევად დანარწმუნებული ალგორიტიმი და მონაცემების არჩევის სქემი, რომელიც არაფერი არაფერი იქნება. თნექსკრთგნთ თ რპანექსკრთგნთ ოჲლჲგნაევპნთ სფთრვლნთ ჟრპარვდთთ თჱეყპზაგარ თნტპაკუთჲნჟკთ თნტპაკუთჲნჟკთ თნტპაკუთჲნჟკთ თჱეყპზვნთწ ოპაგ', 'it': "Questo articolo affronta il problema di estrarre frasi chiave da articoli scientifici e categorizzarle come corrispondenti a un compito, processo o materiale. Abbiamo lanciato il problema come tag di sequenza e introdotto metodi semi-supervisionati a un modello di tag neurale, che si basa sui recenti progressi nel riconoscimento di entità nominate. Poiché i dati di formazione annotati sono scarsi in questo settore, introduciamo un algoritmo semi-supervisionato basato su grafici insieme a uno schema di selezione dei dati per sfruttare gli articoli non notati. Sia le strategie di apprendimento induttive che trasttive semi-supervisionate superano le prestazioni di estrazione delle informazioni all'avanguardia nel compito SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE 2017.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бір тапсырма, процес, немесе материалға сәйкес келген кілт сөздерді ғылыми мақалалардан тарқату мәселесін жасайды. Біз мәселеді реттеу тегтері ретінде және жарты бақылау әдістерін невралдық тегтері үлгісіне келтіріп, аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін жаңа бағдарламаларды қолдануға болады. Бұл доменде белгіленген оқыту деректері жеткілікті емес себебі, біз график негіздеген жарты бақылау алгоритмін бірге белгіленмеген мақалаларды көмектесу үшін деректерді таңдау сұлбасын келтіріп бер 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE тапсырмасындағы индуктивті және аударылық жарты бақылау стратегиялары күй- жайындағы мәліметті тарқату әрекетінен шығарылады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama problem a, susijusi su pagrindinių frazių išėmimu iš mokslinių straipsnių ir jų klasifikavimu kaip atitinkančių užduotį, procesą ar medžiagą. Mes sukeliame problem ą kaip sekos žymėjimą ir įvedame pusiau prižiūrimus metodus neurologinio žymėjimo modeliui, kuris grindžiamas naujausia pažanga vardinio subjekto pripažinimo srityje. Kadangi anotuoti mokymo duomenys šioje srityje yra nedaug, mes įvedame grafiniu būdu pagrįstą pusiau prižiūrimą algoritmą kartu su duomenų atrankos schema, kad būtų užtikrintas svertas nenotiruotiems straipsniams. Ir skatinamosios, ir transdukcinės pusiau prižiūrimos mokymosi strategijos viršija pažangiausius informacijos gavimo rezultatus 2017 m. pusiau vertinamosios užduoties 10 „ScienceIE“ užduotyje.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го решава проблемот со извлекувањето клучни фрази од научните статии и категоризирањето на нив како одговара на задача, процес или материјал. Го ставаме проблемот како секвенциско означување и воведуваме полунадгледувани методи на нервен модел на означување, кој се базира на неодамнешните напредоци во препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет. Since annotated training data is scarce in this domain, we introduce a graph-based semi-supervised algorithm together with a data selection scheme to leverage unannotated articles.  Двајцата индуктивни и трансдуктивни полунадгледувани стратегии за учење ги надминуваат најсовремените изведувања на информации во врска со задачата на Семевал задача 10 ScienceIE 2017 година.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്ര രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ജോലി, പ്രക്രിയയോ  നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രശ്നം സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് എന്ന പ്രശ്നം ആക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് മോഡലിലേക്ക് മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെട ഈ ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് കുറച്ചുമില്ലാത്തതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സെമി-സൂക്ഷിച്ച ആല്\u200dഗ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ടാസ്ക്ക് 10 ശാസ്ത്രീയിയുടെ ജോലിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സ', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengarahkan masalah mengekstrak frasa kunci dari artikel saintifik dan mengkategorikannya sebagai sepadan dengan tugas, proses, atau bahan. Kami melemparkan masalah sebagai tag urutan dan memperkenalkan kaedah setengah-mengawasi kepada model tag saraf, yang membina pada kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pengenalan entiti bernama. Oleh kerana data latihan yang dicatat adalah jarang dalam domain ini, kami memperkenalkan algoritma setengah-mengawasi berdasarkan graf bersama dengan skema pemilihan data untuk menggunakan artikel yang tidak dicatat. Kedua-dua strategi pembelajaran induktif dan transduktif semi-mengawasi melampaui prestasi pengekstrakan maklumat terbaik pada tugas SemEval 10 ScienceIE 2017.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jindirizza l-problem a tal-estrazzjoni tal-frażijiet ewlenin minn artikoli xjentifiċi u l-kategorizzazzjoni tagħhom bħala li jikkorrispondu għal kompitu, proċess jew materjal. Aħna nagħtu l-problem a bħala tikkettar tas-sekwenza u nintroduċu metodi semisuperviżi għal mudell tat-tikkettar newrali, li jibni fuq avvanzi reċenti fir-rikonoxximent tal-entità msemmija. Minħabba li d-dejta ta’ taħriġ annotata hija skarsa f’dan il-qasam, a ħna nintroduċu algoritmu semisuperviż ibbażat fuq il-grafika flimkien ma’ skema ta’ għażla tad-dejta biex ninfurzaw oġġetti mhux innotati. Kemm l-istrateġiji ta’ tagħlim induttiv kif ukoll dawk transduttivi semisorveljati jaqbżu l-prestazzjoni ta’ estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fuq il-kompitu ta’ SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE tal-2017.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас шинжлэх ухааны өгүүлбэрээс түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг гаргаж, ажил, процесс, материалтай харьцуулах асуудлыг харуулдаг. Бид энэ асуудлыг дарааллын тэмдэглэх болон тархины тэмдэглэх загвар руу дамжуулж, эсийн тэмдэглэх загвар руу дамжуулдаг. Энэ нь сүүлийн үед нэрлэгдсэн бүтээгдэхүүний танихын тулд хөгжүүлэх арга за Дасгал хөдөлгөөн өгөгдлийн мэдээллүүд энэ холбоонд бага байдаг учраас бид график дээр хагас удирдлагатай алгоритм болон өгөгдлийн сонголтын төлөвлөгөөтэй танихгүй баримтуудыг ашиглан танилцуулдаг. 2017 оны SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE-ийн ажлын тухай хоёр сэтгэл хөдлөл болон шинжлэх ухааны стратеги нь 2017 оны SemEval Task 10-ын шинжлэх ухааны төлөө мэдээлэл татах үйл ажиллагааг илүүтэй болгодог.', 'no': 'Denne papiret adresserer problemet med å pakka ut nøkkelfrasar frå vitenskapelige artiklar og kategorisera dei som tilsvarar ei oppgåve, prosess eller materialet. Vi kastar problem som sekvensmerking og introduserer semioversikte metodar til eit neuralmerking modell, som bygger på nyleg avansert i gjenkjenning av entitet. Sidan oppmerkingsdata er minskeleg i denne domenet, introduserer vi ein algoritme med halvoversikt på grafen sammen med eit datautval- skjema for å levera utviklingane av ulike artiklar. Både induktive og transduktiv semioversikte læringsstrategier utfører utpakkinga av informasjon om tilstanden til kunsten på semiEval Task 10 ScienceIE-oppgåva 2017.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł porusza problem wydobycia fraz kluczowych z artykułów naukowych i kategoryzowania ich jako odpowiadających zadaniu, procesowi lub materiałowi. Ujmujemy problem jako tagowanie sekwencji i wprowadzamy metody pół-nadzorowane do modelu tagowania neuronowego, który opiera się na ostatnich postępach w rozpoznawaniu nazwanych jednostek. Ponieważ w tej dziedzinie dane szkoleniowe są rzadkie, wprowadzamy algorytm oparty na wykresie pół-nadzorowany wraz z schematem wyboru danych, aby wykorzystać niezapisane artykuły. Zarówno indukcyjne, jak i transduktywne pół-nadzorowane strategie uczenia się przewyższają najnowocześniejsze wydajności ekstrakcji informacji w zadaniu 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare abordează problema extragerii frazelor cheie din articole științifice și clasificării lor ca corespunzătoare unei sarcini, procese sau materiale. Noi aruncăm problema ca etichetare secvențială și introducem metode semi-supravegheate unui model de etichetare neurală, care se bazează pe progresele recente în recunoașterea entităților numite. Deoarece datele de instruire adnotate sunt rare în acest domeniu, introducem un algoritm semi-supravegheat bazat pe grafice împreună cu o schemă de selecție a datelor pentru a valorifica articolele neanotate. Atât strategiile de învățare semi-supravegheate inductive, cât și transductive depășesc performanțele de ultimă generație de extragere a informațiilor în sarcina SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE 2017.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem izvlačenja ključnih fraza iz naučnih članaka i kategoriziranja ih kao odgovarajuće zadatku, procesu ili materijalu. Postavljamo problem kao označavanje sekvence i predstavljamo polu nadzorne metode modelu neuralnog označavanja, koji se temelji na nedavnim napredovima u priznanju entiteta. Budući da je u ovom domenu nedostatak annotiranih podataka o obuci, predstavljamo algoritam na grafiku pod polu nadzorom zajedno sa šemom selekcije podataka kako bi uticali na neobične članke. I induktivne i transduktivne polu-nadzorne studijske strategije iznose izvlačenje informacija o izvlačenju stanja umjetnosti na zadatku za semiEval Task 10 ScienceIE 2017.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu dhibaatada ku saabsan soo saaridda hadallada saynuunka ka soo baxa warqadaha cilmiga ah, wuxuuna u kala qeybinayaa si u eg shaqo, baaraandegista ama qalabka. Waxaynu dhibaatada u soo bandhignaynaa qalabka halka lagu soo ilaaliyo, kaas oo ku dhisaya horumarinta ugu dambeeya ee lagu magacaabay aqoonsiga entity. Sida darteed macluumaadka waxbarashadu waa yaraan tahay meeshan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa algorithm lagu soo jeeday sawirkan, waxaana la soo bandhigayaa qorshaha doorashada macluumaadka si aan loo soo saarin warqadaha aan la aqoonin. Shaqooyinka waxbarashada ee la ilaaliyo semi-ilaaliyey iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha labadoodaba waxay sameeyaan dhacdooyinka xaaladda la soo bixiyo macluumaadka ee shaqada SemEval 10 cilmiyeed IE ee 2017.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar problemet med att extrahera nyckelfraser från vetenskapliga artiklar och kategorisera dem som motsvarande en uppgift, process eller material. Vi kastar problemet som sekvenstaggning och introducerar halvövervakade metoder till en neural taggmodell, som bygger på de senaste framstegen inom namngiven entitetsigenkänning. Eftersom kommenterade träningsdata är knappa inom denna domän introducerar vi en grafbaserad halvövervakad algoritm tillsammans med ett datavalsschema för att utnyttja oannoterade artiklar. Både induktiva och transduktiva semi-övervakade inlärningsstrategier överträffar toppmodern informationsutvinning på SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE-uppgiften 2017.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் அறிவியல் கட்டுரைகளிலிருந்து விசைத்தொடர்களை வெளியேற்றுவதின் பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்கிறது மற்றும் செயல், செயல் அல்லது  நாம் பிரச்சனையை தொடர்ந்து குறிக்கும் மற்றும் ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பு முறைமையில் பாது கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முறைகளை அறிவிக்கும், அது சமீபத குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி தகவல் இந்த களத்தில் குறைவானதாக இருக்கும் போது, நாம் வரைப்படத்தில் அரை கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி முறைமையைக் கொண்டு  செயல்படுத்துபவர் மற்றும் transductive semi-கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட படிக்கை திட்டங்கள் இருவரும் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது 2017 செம்Eval பணியின் 10 அறிவியல் IE பணியில்.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අරගෙන යන්න සහ විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ටැග් විදිහට දාන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කර මේ ඩෝමේන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක අධාරිත අධාරිත අධාරිත අල්ගෝරිධම් එක්ක දත්ත ත දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිසා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ 2017 සෙම්වල් කාර්ය 10 සිසි', 'ur': 'This paper addresses the problem of extracting keyphrases from scientific articles and categorizing them as a task, process, or material. ہم نے اس مسئلہ کو سطح ٹاگ کے طور پر ڈال دیا اور نیورل ٹاگ موڈل کے لئے نیویرول ٹاگ موڈل کے ذریعہ نیویرول ٹاگ کے طریقے سے معلوم کر دیا، جو اچھی طریقے پر نام داری پہچان کرنے کے لئے بناتا ہے. اس وجہ سے کہ یہ ڈومین میں مضبوط ترینسی ڈیٹا کم ہے، ہم نے ایک گراف کی بنیادی نصف نظر والی الگوریتم کو ایک ڈیٹا انتخاب طریقہ کے ساتھ معلوم کیا ہے جو غیر معلوم ہو سکتے ہیں. ۲۰۱۷ سیانسی کی تاسک ۱۰ سیانسی کی تاسک پر سیانسی کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں کی استراتژیکوں سے زیادہ کام کرتی ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat ilmiy maqoladan kalitlarni chiqarish muammolarini tanlang va ularni vazifa, jarayon yoki materialga mos keladigan deb turadi. @ info: status Taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar bu domen juda qisqa emas, biz grafik asosida qismi taʼminlovchi algoritni bir maʼlumot tanlash qolipini bir maʼlumot bajariladigan maqolalarni yozib qo'yish mumkin. 2017 SemEval Vazifa 10 ilmiy IE vazifasini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến vấn đề lấy các cụm từ từ khoa học và phân loại chúng tương ứng với một nhiệm vụ, một quá trình, hoặc một vật liệu. Chúng tôi phân tích vấn đề như hiệu ứng chuỗi và đưa ra các phương pháp giám sát gần với mô hình kích thích thần kinh, nó dựa trên những tiến bộ gần đây trong việc nhận dạng thực thể tên. Vì dữ liệu huấn luyện được ghi chú rất hiếm trong lĩnh vực này, chúng tôi sẽ nhập một thuật to án phân giám sát theo đồ thị dựa vào đồ thị cùng với một kế hoạch chọn dữ liệu để sử dụng các bài báo không ghi. Cả truyền dẫn và chuyển động, gần giám sát học cách hoạt động để đạt được thành quả khai thác thông tin hiện đại trong nhiệm vụ 97 SemEvl 10 Khoa học.', 'bg': 'Тази статия разглежда проблема с извличането на ключови фрази от научни статии и категоризирането им като съответстващи на задача, процес или материал. Ние поставяме проблема като последователно маркиране и въвеждаме полунадзорни методи в неврален модел за маркиране, който се основава на скорошните постижения в разпознаването на имена на обекти. Тъй като анотираните данни за обучение са оскъдни в тази област, ние въвеждаме графичен алгоритъм, базиран на полунадзор, заедно със схема за подбор на данни, за да използваме неописани статии. Както индуктивните, така и трансдуктивните полу-надзорни стратегии за обучение превъзхождат най-съвременните резултати за извличане на информация по задачата за 2017 г.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel behandelt het probleem van het extraheren van sleutelzinnen uit wetenschappelijke artikelen en het categoriseren ervan als corresponderend met een taak, proces of materiaal. We beschouwen het probleem als sequentie tagging en introduceren semi-supervised methodes in een neuraal tagging model, dat voortbouwt op recente vooruitgang in naamloze entiteiten herkenning. Aangezien geannoteerde trainingsgegevens schaars zijn in dit domein, introduceren we een grafiekgebaseerd semi-supervised algoritme samen met een gegevensselectieschema om ongenoteerde artikelen te gebruiken. Zowel inductieve als transductieve semi-supervised leerstrategieën presteren beter dan state-of-the-art informatie extractie prestaties op de 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE taak.', 'da': 'Denne artikel omhandler problemet med at udtrække nøglesætninger fra videnskabelige artikler og kategorisere dem som svarende til en opgave, proces eller materiale. Vi kaster problemet som sekvens tagging og introducerer semi-overvågede metoder til en neural tagging model, som bygger på nylige fremskridt inden for navngivet entitet genkendelse. Da annoterede træningsdata er knappe på dette område, introducerer vi en grafbaseret semi-overvåget algoritme sammen med en datavalgsordning for at udnytte ubestemte artikler. Både induktive og transduktive semi-overvågede læringsstrategier overgår state-of-the-art informationsudvinding ydeevne på SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE opgaven 2017.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem izvlačenja ključnih fraza iz znanstvenih članaka i kategoriziranja ih kao odgovarajuće zadatku, procesu ili materijalu. Prebacili smo problem kao označavanje sekvencije i uvodili polu nadzorne metode u model neuralnog označavanja, koji se temelji na nedavnim napredovima u priznanju imena entiteta. Budući da je u ovom domenu nedostatak annotiranih podataka o obuci, predstavljamo algoritam na grafiku pod polu nadzorom zajedno s šemom izbora podataka kako bi uticali na neobične članke. I induktivne i transduktivne polu-nadzorne studijske strategije iznose učinkovitost izvlačenja informacija o izvlačenju stanja umjetnosti na zadatku "ScienceIE" za polu-Eval zadatak 2017.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag befasst sich mit dem Problem, Schlüsselphrasen aus wissenschaftlichen Artikeln zu extrahieren und als einer Aufgabe, einem Prozess oder einem Material entsprechend zu kategorisieren. Wir betrachten das Problem als Sequenz-Tagging und führen semi-überwachte Methoden in ein neuronales Tagging-Modell ein, das auf jüngsten Fortschritten in der Erkennung benannter Entitäten aufbaut. Da annotierte Trainingsdaten in diesem Bereich selten sind, führen wir einen graphenbasierten semi-überwachten Algorithmus zusammen mit einem Datenauswahl-Schema ein, um nicht notierte Artikel zu nutzen. Sowohl induktive als auch transduktive semi-überwachte Lernstrategien übertreffen die State-of-the-Art Informationsextraktionsleistung bei der 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE Aufgabe.', 'ko': '본고는 과학 문장에서 관건적인 단어를 추출하여 임무, 과정 또는 재료와 대응하는 문제로 분류하였다.우리는 문제를 서열 표기로 귀결시키고 반감독 방법을 명명 실체 식별을 바탕으로 최신 진전된 신경 표기 모델에 도입할 것이다.주석이 달린 훈련 데이터가 이 분야에서 희귀하기 때문에 우리는 그림을 바탕으로 하는 반감독 알고리즘과 데이터 선택 방안을 도입하여 주석이 없는 글을 이용했다.2017년의 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE Task에서 귀납과 귀납 반감독 학습 전략은 가장 선진적인 정보 추출 성능보다 우수했다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengatasi masalah mengekstrak frasa kunci dari artikel ilmiah dan mengkategorisasi mereka sebagai sesuai dengan tugas, proses, atau bahan. Kami melemparkan masalah sebagai penandaian urutan dan memperkenalkan metode semi-supervised ke model penandaian saraf, yang dibangun pada kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pengenalan entitas bernama. Karena data pelatihan yang dicatat jarang di domain ini, kami memperkenalkan algoritma semi-supervised berdasarkan grafik bersama dengan skema pemilihan data untuk menggunakan artikel yang tidak dicatat. Kedua strategi pembelajaran induktif dan transduktif yang semi-supervisional melebihi prestasi ekstraksi informasi terbaik pada tugas SemEval 10 ScienceIE 2017.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشکل استخراج کلید از مقاله های علمی و تقسیم کردن آنها به عنوان یک کار، فرایند، یا مواد ارتباط به کار می دهد. ما مشکل را به عنوان نقاشی ترکیب گذاشتیم و روش\u200cهای نیمه\u200cنظارت را به یک مدل نقاشی ترکیب عصبی معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که بر پیشرفتهای اخیر در شناسایی عنوان متحد ساخته می\u200cشود. چون اطلاعات آموزش یادآوری در این دامنه کم است، ما یک الگوریتم نصف نظارت بر گراف با یک برنامه انتخاب داده برای تأثیر مقاله\u200cهای غیر شناخته معرفی می\u200cکنیم. هر دو استراتژی یادگیری که نیمه تحت تاثیر و تغییر\u200cپذیر است بیشتر از عملکرد استراتژی اطلاعات استخراج امر هنری در کار ۱۰ دانشگاه ۲۰۰۷ انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linahusu tatizo la kutengeneza maneno kutoka makala za kisayansi na kuwagawanya kama yanayohusiana na kazi, mchakato, au vifaa. Tunatuweka tatizo kama alama za mfululizo na kutambulisha njia zilizofuatiliwa kwa nusu kwa mtindo wa wimbo wa ubongo, ambao unajenga katika maendeleo ya hivi karibuni kwa jina la kutambuliwa kwa entity. Kwa kuwa takwimu za mafunzo hazina vigumu katika eneo hili, tunaonyesha utambulisho wa a in a inayofuatiliwa na picha pamoja na mpango wa uchaguzi wa data kwa kutumia makala zisizoeleweka. Both inductive and transductive semi-supervised learning strategies outperform state-of-the-art information extraction performance on the 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE task.', 'af': "Hierdie papier adreseer die probleem van uitpakking van sleutelfrase van wetenskaplike artikels en kategoriseer hulle as ooreenstemmende aan 'n taak, proses, of materiaal. Ons gooi die probleem as sekwensiemerking en introduseer semi-ondersoekte metodes aan 'n neurale merking model, wat bou op onlangse vorderings in genoem entiteiterkenning. Omdat aangetekende onderwerp data skaars is in hierdie domein, introduseer ons 'n graafgebaseerde semi-onderwerp algoritme saam met 'n data kies skema om onbekende artikels te verwyder. Beid induktiewe en transduktive semi-superviseerde leer strategies uitvoer state-of-the-art informasie uitvoer uitvoer uitvoering op die 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE taak.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument trajton problemin e nxjerrjes së frazave kyçe nga artikujt shkencore dhe kategorizimit të tyre si të barabartë me një detyrë, proces apo material. Ne e hedhim problem in si shembull të etiketave dhe futim metoda gjysmë-mbikqyrura në një model të etiketave nervore, i cili mbështetet në përparimet e fundit në njohjen e emëruar të njësisë. Meqë të dhënat e trajnimit të anotuar janë të pakta në këtë fushë, ne futim një algoritëm gjysmë-mbikqyrur me bazë grafike së bashku me një skemë zgjedhjeje të të dhënave për të përdorur artikujt e pa-notuar. Si strategjitë nxitëse ashtu edhe transduktive të mësimit gjysmë-mbikqyrura kapërcejnë shfaqjen e nxjerrjes së informacionit më të lartë në detyrën e SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE 2017.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ylmy makalaglardan a çmak we olaryň täblisasy, proses we materiýaly ýaly kategoriýalaşdyrmak meselesini çykýar. Biz meseleni terjime etiketlemek we ýarym-gözlemli yöntemleri näral etiketlemek nusgasyna taýýarlapdyk. Bu iň soňky ösümliklere taýýarlanan ösümliklerde bar. Bu domaýda tanyş edilen eğitim maglumaty ýetmezdir sebäbi, grafik tabanly semi-kontrol algoritmi bilen tanyş edilmedik maddeleri üçin daşary saýlamak üçin bir rejime girdirip başladyk. Etkileşimli we terjime edilen semi-supervisor öwrenme stratejikleri 2017-nji ýylda SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE zady barada çykyp ýöredýär', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը լուծվում է գիտական հոդվածներից հանելու և դրանք դասակարգելու խնդիրը որպես համապատասխանող խնդիրներին, գործընթացներին կամ նյութերին: Մենք խնդիրը դիտարկում ենք որպես հաջորդականության նշաններ և ներկայացնում ենք կես-վերահսկված մեթոդներ նյարդային նշանների մոդելի մեջ, որը հիմնված է վերջին առաջընթացների վրա անվանված էության ճանաչության մեջ: Քանի որ գրված ուսումնասիրության տվյալները այս ոլորտում հազվադեպ են, մենք ներկայացնում ենք գրաֆիկի վրա հիմնված կիսավերահսկված ալգորիթմ միասին տվյալների ընտրության ծրագրի հետ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք անգրված հոդվածներ: Նույնիսկ ինդուկտիվ և տրանսուկտիվ կիսակառավարվող ուսումնական ռազմավարությունները գերազանցում են 2017 թվականի "Գիտություն 10"-ի "Գիտություն"-ի "Գիտություն"-ի "Գիտություն":', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ከሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፎች የቁልፎችን ማውጣት ጉዳይ እና ለስራ፣ ሥርዓት ወይም ማህበረሰብ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ ጉዳዩን በሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እና የተጠበቀውን የናውሬው ተቃውሞ ሞዴል እናገልጣለን፡፡ በዚህ ዶሜን ውስጥ የተጠቃቀለ የግንኙነት ዳታ ጥቂት ሲሆን፣ የgraph-based semi-supervised algorithm እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በ2017 የሴmEval ስራ 10 ሳይንኒስIE ስራ ላይ የ-የ-አርፍ መረጃ ውጤት አካባቢ እና ተሟጋቾች የsemi-ተማሪ ተማሪ strategies አብልጦ ይደረጋሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি বৈজ্ঞানিক প্রবন্ধ থেকে কীবোর্ড বের করার সমস্যা এবং তাদের কাজ, প্রক্রিয়া অথবা উপাদানের সাথে যুক্ত করার সাথে বিভাগের আমরা সমস্যাটিকে সেকেন্ড ট্যাগিং হিসেবে প্রকাশ করি এবং একটি নিউরুল ট্যাগিং মডেলে সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতি নির্মাণ করি, যা প্রতিষ্ঠানের নামের যেহেতু এই ডোমেইনে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য খুব কম, আমরা একটি গ্রাফ-ভিত্তিক সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা অ্যালগরিদমের সাথে একটি ডাটা নির্বাচন বিন্যাসের পরিকল্পনা  Both inductive and transductive semi-supervised learning strategies outperform state-of-the-art information extraction performance on the 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE task.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt elmi maddələrdən anahtar sözlərini çıxartmaq və onları bir iş, proses və ya materyalə uyğun kimi kategoriyalandırmaq problemlərini çəkir. Biz bu problemi seçmə etiketi olaraq və yarı-gözləyirli metodları nöral etiketi modeli ilə təşkil edirik ki, bu, yeni dəyişikliklər adlandırılmış entitə tanımasında in şa edir. Bu domeində təhsil verilən məlumatlar çox az olduğundan sonra, biz grafik-tabanlı yarı-gözləyirli algoritmi ilə məlumatlar seçmə taslağıyla birlikdə tanıyırıq. İkisi də induktiv və transduktiv yarı-gözləyirli öyrənmə stratejiləri 2017-ci SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE işində istifadə edir.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá problematikou extrahování klíčových frází z vědeckých článků a jejich kategorizace jako odpovídající úkolu, procesu nebo materiálu. Problém uvádíme jako sekvenční tagování a představujeme metody semi-supervisované do neuronového tagovacího modelu, který staví na nedávných pokrocích v rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit. Vzhledem k tomu, že anotovaná tréninková data jsou v této oblasti vzácná, představujeme grafový semi-supervisovaný algoritmus společně se schématem výběru dat pro využití nezapsaných článků. Indukční i transduktivní semi-supervisované strategie učení překonávají nejmodernější výkon extrakce informací na úkolu 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis käsitletakse võtmesõnade väljatõmbamise probleemi teaduslikest artiklitest ja nende kategoriseerimise probleemi vastavalt ülesandele, protsessile või materjalile. Me kasutame probleemi järjestuse sildistamisena ja tutvustame pooljuhitatud meetodeid neuraalsele sildistamismudelile, mis põhineb hiljutistel edusammudelitel nimega olemite tuvastamisel. Kuna selles valdkonnas on anoteeritud koolitusandmeid vähe, kasutame graafikapõhist pooljuhitavat algoritmi koos andmete valimise skeemiga märkimata artiklite kasutamiseks. Nii induktiivsed kui ka transduktiivsed pooljuhitatud õppestrateegiad ületavad 2017. aasta SemEval ülesande 10 ScienceIE ülesande tipptasemel teabe kaevandamise tulemuslikkust.', 'ca': "This paper addresses the problem of extracting keyphrases from scientific articles and categorizing them as corresponding to a task, process, or material.  Nosaltres posem el problem a com a etiqueta de seqüència i introduïm mètodes semisupervisats a un model d'etiqueta neuronal, que s'basa en avanços recents en el reconeixement d'entitats anomenades. Com que les dades d'entrenament anotats són escases en aquest domini, introduim un algoritme semisupervisat basat en gràfics juntament amb un esquema de selecció de dades per aprofitar articles no anotats. Tant les estratègies d'aprenentatge inductiu com transdutiu semisupervisades superen el rendiment d'extracció d'informació més avançat en la tasca ScienceIE 10 de SemEval del 2017.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään avainlauseiden poimimista tieteellisistä artikkeleista ja luokittelua tehtävään, prosessiin tai materiaaliin liittyviksi. Laadimme ongelman sekvenssitaggaukseksi ja esittelemme puolivalvottuja menetelmiä neuromerkintämalliin, joka perustuu nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamisen viimeaikaisiin edistysaskeliin. Koska huomautuksia sisältävää koulutustietoa on tällä alalla vähän, otamme käyttöön graafisen puolivalvotun algoritmin sekä tiedon valintajärjestelmän, joka hyödyntää merkitsemättömiä artikkeleita. Sekä induktiiviset että transduktiiviset puoliohjatut oppimisstrategiat ylittävät huipputason tiedonkeruun suorituskyvyn vuoden 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE -tehtävässä.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem izvlačenja ključnih fraza iz naučnih članaka i kategoriziranja ih kao odgovarajuće zadatku, procesu ili materijalu. Postavljamo problem kao označavanje sekvence i predstavljamo polu nadzorne metode modelu neuralnog označavanja, koji se temelji na nedavnim napredovima u priznanju entiteta. Budući da je u ovom domenu nedostatak annotiranih podataka o obuci, predstavljamo algoritam na grafiku pod polu nadzorom zajedno sa šemom selekcije podataka kako bi uticali na neoznačene članke. I induktivne i transduktivne polu-nadzorne studijske strategije iznose izvlačenje informacija o izvlačenju stanja umjetnosti na zadatku "ScienceIE" za polu-Eval zadatak 2017.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk kesemplan nganggep sistem sing wis ana, dadi nambah, ngono nggawe sistem sing apik matat-oblihan kanggo modèl tagging nêrung, kiye nggawe nguasai diagram sing tapi iki ngono nambah. Since anntatid tutorial data is collapse in this domain, we insert a graphed semi-super Vised Algorithm together with a data select scheme to raise unangoted Artiles. Sampeyan effectu lan kelompok semi-super-spis kanggo kelas sistem sing bisa diutag state-of', 'ha': "Wannan takardar ta tambayar zartar da masu fitarwa kalmõmi daga makala na sayansi kuma ya categore su kamar mai daidai da wani aikin, aikin aiki, da kuma abun. Mu jẽfa problemati kamar tagogi masu ƙaranci kuma Mu introduce shiryoyin-tsaro zuwa wata motel mai tagogi na ƙarura, wanda ke samar da kan taƙaitãwa na ƙaran da aka suna sunan abun-abun. Dõmin da data na amfani da shi bai zama kaɗan ba a cikin wannan Domen, za mu ƙara wata algoritm wanda aka danne na grafi-baka, sami da wani shirin zaɓa ɓen data zuwa ga iyarwa da takardar da ba'a sani ba. Both inductive and transductive semi-supervised learning strategies outperform state-of-the-art information extraction performance on the 2017 SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE task.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתייחסת לבעיה של החולץ משפטים מפתחים ממאמרים מדעיים ולהקטגוריזם אותם בתאים למשימה, תהליך או חומר. אנו מוציאים את הבעיה כתוויות רצף והציגנו שיטות חצי-מפקחות למודל של תוויות עצביות, שמבונה על התקדמות האחרונות בזיהוי ישויות בשם. Since annotated training data is scarce in this domain, we introduce a graph-based semi-supervised algorithm together with a data selection scheme to leverage unannotated articles.  גם אסטרטגיות לימוד חצי מפקחות induktivות וגם טרנסודקטיביות יוצאות מעל ביצועי חיפוש מידע מוקדם ביותר בתפקיד "SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE" של 2017.', 'sk': 'Prispevek obravnava problem pridobivanja ključnih fraz iz znanstvenih člankov in njihove kategorizacije kot ustrezajoče nalogi, procesu ali gradivu. Težavo obravnavamo kot označevanje zaporedja in vpeljemo polnadzorovane metode v nevronski model označevanja, ki temelji na nedavnih napredkih pri prepoznavanju imenovanih entitet. Ker je na tem področju omejenih podatkov o usposabljanju na tem področju malo, uvajamo polnadzorovan algoritem, ki temelji na grafu, skupaj s shemo izbire podatkov za izkoriščanje neopisovanih člankov. Tako induktivne kot transduktivne polnadzorovane učne strategije presegajo najsodobnejše zmogljivosti pridobivanja informacij pri nalogi SemEval Task 10 ScienceIE 2017.', 'bo': 'This paper addresses the problem of extracting keyphrases from scientific articles and categorizing them as a task, process, or material. ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དཔྱད་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Since annotated training data is scarce in this domain, we introduce a graph-based semi-supervised algorithm together with a data selection scheme to leverage unannounced articles. སྒྲུབ་ཅན་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་པ་དེ་ལས་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱོན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང'}
{'en': 'NITE : A Neural Inductive Teaching Framework for Domain Specific NER', 'ar': 'المركز القطري للامتحانات والتقييم: إطار تعليمي استقرائي عصبي لمجال معين NER', 'es': 'NITE: Un marco de enseñanza inductiva neuronal para NER de dominio específico', 'pt': 'NITE: Uma Estrutura de Ensino Neural Indutiva para NER Específico de Domínio', 'fr': "NITE\xa0: Un cadre d'enseignement neuronal inductif pour le NER spécifique à un domaine", 'ja': 'NITE ：ドメイン固有のNERのための神経誘導教授フレームワーク', 'zh': 'NITE:特定域NER神经归纳教框架', 'hi': 'NITE: डोमेन विशिष्ट एनईआर के लिए एक तंत्रिका आगमनात्मक शिक्षण फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'NITE: нейронная индуктивная учебная основа для NER, специфичного для домена', 'ga': 'NITE: Creat Néar-Ionduchtach Teagaisc le haghaidh NER a Bhaineann go Sonrach le Fearainn', 'ka': 'NITE: ნეიროლური ინდექტუტიური სწავლების ფრამები დიომენის განსაკუთრებული NER', 'el': 'ΝΗΤE: Ένα Νευρικό επαγωγικό Διδακτικό Πλαίσιο για τον Ειδικό Τομέα ΝΕΡ', 'hu': 'NITE: Neurális induktív tanítási keretrendszer a Domain Specifikus NER számára', 'it': 'NITE: un quadro di insegnamento induttivo neurale per il NER specifico del dominio', 'kk': 'NITE: Domain Specific NER үшін нейралық индуктивті оқыту фрейміComment', 'lt': 'NITE: Neurologinio skatinamojo mokymo sistema konkrečiai sričiai NER', 'mk': 'НИТЕ: Неурална индуктивна научна рамка за специфични домени НЕР', 'ms': 'NITE: Sebuah kerangka Guru Induktif Neural untuk NER Khusus Domain', 'mt': 'NITE: Qafas ta’ Tagħlim Induttiv Newrali għal NER Speċifiku għad-Dominju', 'ml': 'NITE: ഡൊമെയിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച നെയുറല്\u200d നിരീക്ഷണ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെമ്മെയി', 'mn': 'ДОХ: Доминийн төвөгтэй NER-ийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сургалтын хөтөлбөр', 'ro': 'NITE: Un cadru de predare inductiv neural pentru NER specific domeniului', 'no': 'NITE: Ein neiralinduktiv læringsrammeverk for domenespesifikke NER', 'pl': 'NITE: Neuronowe indukcyjne ramy nauczania dla specyficznego NER', 'sr': 'NITE: Neuralno induktivno učenje okvira za specijalnu domenu NER', 'si': 'NITES: ඩොමේන් විශේෂ NER වෙනුවෙන් න්\u200dයූරාලික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'NITE: A Neural Inductive Teaching Framework for Domain Specific NER', 'sv': 'NITE: En neural induktiv undervisningsram för domänspecifik NER', 'ta': 'NITE: Domain குறிப்பிட்ட NER குறிப்பிட்ட புதிய குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி சட்டம்', 'ur': 'نیٹ: ڈومین مخصوص نیر کے لئے ایک نیورال انڈاکٹیٹیو سیکھانے والی فرارمورک', 'uz': 'NITE: Domen uchun foydalanuvchi nazar ishlatuv freymi', 'vi': 'NITE: Một bộ truyền giáo về thần kinh dẫn đầu cho miền miền Nam', 'bg': 'НИТЕ: Неврологична индуктивна учебна рамка за специфични домейни нерви', 'da': 'NITE: En neural induktiv undervisningsramme for domænespecifikke NER', 'nl': 'NITE: Een neuronaal inductief onderwijskader voor domeinspecifieke NER', 'hr': 'NITE: Neuralno Induktivno učenje okvira za specifični domeni NER', 'de': 'NITE: Ein neuronaler induktiver Lehrrahmen für domänenspezifische NER', 'fa': 'NITE: یک چهارچوب آموزش عصبی برای NER مخصوص دامنه', 'sw': 'NITE: Mfumo wa Kiongozi wa Nzuri wa Kufundisha kwa ajili ya Domain maalumu NNE', 'tr': 'NITE: Domain A ýratyn NER üçin bir näral Induktive Öwrenme Framework', 'ko': 'NITE: 특정 영역에 대한 신경 귀납 교육의 틀', 'af': "NITE: ' n Neurale Induktiewe Ondersoek Raamwerk vir Domein Spesifieke NER", 'id': 'Sebuah Framework Pemajaran Induktif Neural untuk NER Spesifik Domain', 'sq': 'Një kuadër mësimi induktiv neuronal për NER specifike në domeni', 'az': 'NITE: Domain Specific NER üçün nöral Induktiv Öyrətmə Framework', 'am': 'NITE: የኔural Inductive Teaching Framework for Domain Specific NER', 'hy': 'ՆԻԹԵ՝ Նեյրոնային ինդուկտիվ ուսուցման շրջանակը բնագավառի մասնավոր ՆԵՌ-ի համար', 'bn': 'NITE: ডোমেইনের জন্য নিউরেল ইন্ডিয়েটিভ শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ফ্রেম', 'ca': "NITE: Un marc d'ensenyament neural inductiu per a NER específic de domini", 'cs': 'NITE: Neuronový induktivní výukový rámec pro doménově specifický NER', 'et': 'NITE: Neuraalne induktiivne õpetamisraamistik domeenispetsiifilise NER jaoks', 'bs': 'NITE: Neuralno Induktivno učenje okvira za specijalni NER domena', 'fi': 'NITE: Neuraalinen induktiivinen opetuskehys verkkotunnuskohtaiselle NER:lle', 'he': 'מסגר לימוד נוירולי אינדוקטיבי לתחום ספציפי NER', 'jv': 'NITOR', 'sk': 'NITE: Živčni induktivni učni okvir za domensko specifične NER', 'ha': 'NATI: A Neural Inducive Teaching Frame for Domen Specific NER', 'bo': 'NITE: Domain Specific NER'}
{'en': 'In domain-specific NER, due to insufficient labeled training data, deep models usually fail to behave normally. In this paper, we proposed a novel Neural Inductive TEaching framework (NITE) to transfer knowledge from existing domain-specific NER models into an arbitrary deep neural network in a teacher-student training manner. NITE is a general framework that builds upon transfer learning and multiple instance learning, which collaboratively not only transfers knowledge to a deep student network but also reduces the noise from teachers. NITE can help deep learning methods to effectively utilize existing resources (i.e., models, labeled and unlabeled data) in a small domain. The experiment resulted on Disease NER proved that without using any labeled data, NITE can significantly boost the performance of a CNN-bidirectional LSTM-CRF NER neural network nearly over 30 % in terms of F1-score.', 'ar': 'في NER الخاص بالمجال ، نظرًا لعدم كفاية بيانات التدريب المسمى ، تفشل النماذج العميقة عادةً في التصرف بشكل طبيعي. في هذه الورقة ، اقترحنا إطارًا جديدًا للتدريس الاستقرائي العصبي (NITE) لنقل المعرفة من نماذج NER الحالية الخاصة بالمجال إلى شبكة عصبية عميقة تعسفية بطريقة تدريب المعلم والطالب. المركز القطري للامتحانات والتقييم (NITE) هو إطار عام يعتمد على نقل التعلم والتعلم متعدد الأمثلة ، والذي لا ينقل المعرفة بشكل تعاوني إلى شبكة طلابية عميقة فحسب ، بل يقلل أيضًا من الضوضاء الصادرة عن المعلمين. يمكن للمركز القطري للامتحانات والتقييم أن يساعد في طرق التعلم العميق للاستفادة الفعالة من الموارد الموجودة (أي النماذج والبيانات المصنفة وغير المصنفة) في مجال صغير. أسفرت التجربة عن Disease NER أثبت أنه بدون استخدام أي بيانات مصنفة ، يمكن أن يعزز NITE بشكل كبير أداء شبكة CNN ثنائية الاتجاه LSTM-CRF NER العصبية بنسبة تزيد عن 30 ٪ تقريبًا من حيث درجة F1.', 'fr': "Dans les NER spécifiques au domaine, en raison de l'insuffisance des données d'entraînement étiquetées, les modèles profonds ne se comportent généralement pas normalement. Dans cet article, nous avons proposé un nouveau cadre d'enseignement inductif neuronal (NITE) pour transférer les connaissances provenant de modèles NER spécifiques à un domaine existant dans un réseau neuronal profond arbitraire dans le cadre d'une formation enseignant-étudiant. NITE est un cadre général qui repose sur l'apprentissage par transfert et l'apprentissage par instances multiples, qui permet non seulement de transférer les connaissances à un réseau d'étudiants approfondi, mais également de réduire le bruit des enseignants. NITE peut aider les méthodes d'apprentissage profond à utiliser efficacement les ressources existantes (c'est-à-dire les modèles, les données étiquetées et non étiquetées) dans un petit domaine. L'expérience résultant de Disease NER a prouvé que, sans utiliser de données marquées, le NITE peut considérablement augmenter les performances d'un réseau neuronal LSTM-CRF NER bidirectionnel CNN de près de 30\xa0% en termes de score F1.", 'es': 'En la NER específica de un dominio, debido a la insuficiencia de los datos de entrenamiento etiquetados, los modelos profundos generalmente no se comportan con normalidad. En este artículo, propusimos un novedoso marco de enseñanza inductiva neuronal (NITE) para transferir el conocimiento de los modelos de NER específicos de dominio existentes a una red neuronal profunda arbitraria en una forma de capacitación de profesores y estudiantes. NITE es un marco general que se basa en el aprendizaje por transferencia y el aprendizaje de múltiples instancias, que de manera colaborativa no solo transfiere el conocimiento a una profunda red de estudiantes, sino que también reduce el ruido de los profesores. NITE puede ayudar a los métodos de aprendizaje profundo a utilizar eficazmente los recursos existentes (es decir, modelos, datos etiquetados y no etiquetados) en un dominio pequeño. Los resultados del experimento sobre la enfermedad NER demostraron que, sin utilizar ningún dato etiquetado, NITE puede aumentar significativamente el rendimiento de una red neuronal LSTM-CRF NER bidireccional de CNN casi más del 30% en términos de puntuación F1.', 'pt': 'Em NER específico de domínio, devido a dados de treinamento rotulados insuficientes, os modelos profundos geralmente não se comportam normalmente. Neste artigo, propusemos uma nova estrutura de ensino indutivo neural (NITE) para transferir conhecimento de modelos NER específicos de domínio existentes para uma rede neural profunda arbitrária de maneira de treinamento de professor-aluno. O NITE é uma estrutura geral que se baseia no aprendizado de transferência e no aprendizado de várias instâncias, que de forma colaborativa não apenas transfere conhecimento para uma rede profunda de alunos, mas também reduz o ruído dos professores. O NITE pode ajudar os métodos de aprendizado profundo a utilizar efetivamente os recursos existentes (ou seja, modelos, dados rotulados e não rotulados) em um pequeno domínio. O experimento resultou em Disease NER provou que, sem usar nenhum dado rotulado, o NITE pode aumentar significativamente o desempenho de uma rede neural LSTM-CRF NER bidirecional CNN em quase 30% em termos de pontuação F1.', 'ja': 'ドメイン固有のNERでは、ラベル付けされたトレーニングデータが不十分なため、DEEPモデルは通常、正常に動作しません。この論文では、既存のドメイン固有のNERモデルからの知識を、教師と学生のトレーニング方法で任意の深層ニューラルネットワークに転送するための新規のニューラル誘導TEachingフレームワーク（ NITE ）を提案した。NITEは、転送学習と複数のインスタンス学習に基づいて構築される一般的なフレームワークであり、知識を深い学習者ネットワークに共同で転送するだけでなく、教師からの騒音を低減します。NITEは、小さなドメイン内の既存のリソース（すなわち、モデル、ラベル付けされたデータおよびラベル付けされていないデータ）を効果的に利用するための深層学習方法を支援することができます。疾患ＮＥＲで生じた実験は、任意の標識データを使用することなく、ＮＩＴＥがＣＮＮ双方向ＬＳＴＭ － ＣＲＦ ＮＥＲニューラルネットワークのパフォーマンスをＦ１スコアに関して３ ０ ％近く大幅に向上させることができることを証明した。', 'hi': 'डोमेन-विशिष्ट एनईआर में, अपर्याप्त लेबल प्रशिक्षण डेटा के कारण, गहरे मॉडल आमतौर पर सामान्य रूप से व्यवहार करने में विफल रहते हैं। इस पेपर में, हमने एक उपन्यास का प्रस्ताव रखा न्यूरल इंडक्टिव टीईचिंग फ्रेमवर्क (नाइट) मौजूदा डोमेन-विशिष्ट एनईआर मॉडल से ज्ञान को शिक्षक-छात्र प्रशिक्षण तरीके से एक मनमाने ढंग से गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क में स्थानांतरित करने के लिए। नाइट एक सामान्य ढांचा है जो स्थानांतरण सीखने और कई उदाहरण सीखने पर बनाता है, जो सहयोगात्मक रूप से न केवल एक गहरे छात्र नेटवर्क में ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करता है, बल्कि शिक्षकों से शोर को भी कम करता है। NITE एक छोटे से डोमेन में मौजूदा संसाधनों (यानी, मॉडल, लेबल और बिना लेबल वाले डेटा) का प्रभावी ढंग से उपयोग करने के लिए गहरी सीखने के तरीकों में मदद कर सकता है। रोग एनईआर के परिणामस्वरूप प्रयोग ने साबित कर दिया कि किसी भी लेबल किए गए डेटा का उपयोग किए बिना, नाइट एक सीएनएन-द्विदिश एलएसटीएम-सीआरएफ एनईआर तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के प्रदर्शन को काफी बढ़ावा दे सकता है जो एफ 1-स्कोर के मामले में लगभग 30% से अधिक है।', 'zh': '特定于域之 NER ,标数不足,深则无常。 本文中,设一新神经感应TEACHING框架(NITE),以师生训练,移特定域NER模形于任意深神经网络中。 NITE一基于迁徙通用框架,不惟可以协移深网络,又可以省师噪音。 NITE可以助深学效用小域中见有资源(即模形,标记与未标之数)。 NER之实验验,无所表数,NITE显CNN双向LSTM-CRF NER神经网络之性,近30%F1评分。', 'ru': 'В доменах NER из-за недостаточности отмеченных обучающих данных, модели глубокой глубины обычно не ведут себя нормально. В этой статье мы предложили новый нейронный индуктивный каркас TEaching (NITE) для передачи знаний из существующих домен-специфичных моделей NER в произвольную глубокую нейронную сеть в форме обучения учителя-студента. NITE - это общая структура, основанная на обучении передаче и обучении с несколькими экземплярами, которая не только совместно передает знания в глубокую студенческую сеть, но и снижает шум от учителей. NITE может помочь методам глубокого обучения для эффективного использования существующих ресурсов (т.е. моделей, маркированных и немаркированных данных) в небольшой области. Результат эксперимента на Disease NER доказал, что без использования каких-либо меченых данных, NITE может значительно повысить производительность CNN двунаправленной LSTM-CRF NER нейронной сети почти на 30% с точки зрения оценки F1.', 'ga': 'I NER a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann, mar gheall ar shonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe neamhleor, ní gnách go n-iompraítear samhlacha domhain de ghnáth. Sa pháipéar seo, mholamar creat nua um Theagasc Ionduchtach Néarach (NITE) chun eolas a aistriú ó mhúnlaí NER a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann atá ann cheana féin go líonra néaránach domhain treallach ar mhodh oiliúna múinteoirí-mac léinn. Is creat ginearálta é NITE a thógann ar fhoghlaim aistrithe agus ar fhoghlaim ilchéimeanna, a aistríonn eolas go comhoibríoch go líonra domhain mac léinn ach a laghdaíonn an torann ó mhúinteoirí freisin. Is féidir le NITE cabhrú le modhanna foghlama domhain chun úsáid éifeachtach a bhaint as acmhainní atá ann cheana féin (i.e. samhlacha, sonraí lipéadaithe agus neamhlipéadaithe) i bhfearann beag. Mar thoradh ar an turgnamh ar Galar NER cruthaíodh gur féidir le NITE, gan úsáid a bhaint as aon sonraí lipéadaithe, cur go suntasach le feidhmíocht líonra néaránach LSTM-CRF NER CNN-déthreo beagnach os cionn 30% i dtéarmaí F1-scór.', 'el': 'Στο συγκεκριμένο τομέα, λόγω ανεπαρκών δεδομένων κατάρτισης, τα βαθιά μοντέλα συνήθως αποτυγχάνουν να συμπεριφέρονται κανονικά. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείναμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο Νευρικής Επαγωγικής Διδασκαλίας (ΝΗΤE) για τη μεταφορά γνώσεων από υπάρχοντα μοντέλα ΝΕΡ σε ένα αυθαίρετο βαθύ νευρωνικό δίκτυο με τρόπο εκπαίδευσης δασκάλου-μαθητή. Το ΙΤΕ είναι ένα γενικό πλαίσιο που βασίζεται στη μάθηση μεταφοράς και στη μάθηση πολλαπλών περιπτώσεων, το οποίο συνεργάζεται όχι μόνο μεταφέρει τη γνώση σε ένα βαθύ δίκτυο μαθητών αλλά μειώνει επίσης τον θόρυβο από τους εκπαιδευτικούς. Το NITE μπορεί να βοηθήσει τις μεθόδους βαθιάς μάθησης να αξιοποιήσουν αποτελεσματικά τους υπάρχοντες πόρους (π.χ. μοντέλα, δεδομένα με ετικέτα και χωρίς ετικέτα) σε έναν μικρό τομέα. Το πείραμα που προέκυψε στη νόσο απέδειξε ότι χωρίς τη χρήση ετικετών δεδομένων, το NITE μπορεί να αυξήσει σημαντικά την απόδοση ενός δικατεύθυνσης νευρικού δικτύου σχεδόν πάνω από 30% όσον αφορά την βαθμολογία F1.', 'hu': 'A tartományspecifikus NER-ben a címkézett edzési adatok hiánya miatt a mélymodellek általában nem viselkednek normálisan. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új Neural Inductive TEAching keretrendszert (NITE) javasoltunk, amely a meglévő domain-specifikus NER modellekből származó ismeretek önkényes mélyneurális hálózatba történő átadására tanár-diák képzési módon. A NITE egy olyan általános keretrendszer, amely a transzfertanulásra és a többpéldányos tanulásra épül, amely együttműködve nemcsak a tudást átadja egy mély diákhálózatba, hanem csökkenti a tanárok zaját is. A NITE segíthet a mélytanulási módszerekben a meglévő erőforrások (modellek, címkézett és címke nélküli adatok) hatékony felhasználásában egy kis területen. A Disease NER vizsgálatával végzett kísérlet bebizonyította, hogy jelölt adatok használata nélkül a NITE jelentősen növelheti a CNN-kétirányú LSTM-CRF NER neurális hálózat teljesítményét F1-pontszám szempontjából közel 30%-kal.', 'ka': 'დემომინის განსაკუთრებული NER-ში, მუშაობელი მონაცემების შესახებ, დიდი მოდელები უბრალოდ ნორმალურად არ მოქმედება. ამ დომენში, ჩვენ პრომენტის ნეიროლური ინდექტიური TEaching ფრამეტრი (NITE) გადავიტანოთ ცნობილების მსგავსი დიომინური განსაკუთრებული NER მოდელებიდან არბრიტური დიბოლო ნეიროლური ქსელში NITE არის საერთო ფრამეტრი, რომელიც განსწავლების და მრავალ ინსტენსტის სწავლების შემდეგ დააყენებს, რომელიც მხოლოდ არა მხოლოდ მსგავსი სტუდენტების ქსელისთვის გადატვირდება NITE შეუძლია დახმარება ძალიან სწავლების მეტოვები ძალიან გამოყენებელი რესურსების გამოყენებას (მაგალითად, მოდელები, მარტიკური და უცნობილი მონაცემები) მალკ ექსპერიმენტი შეიძლება დაავადებული NER-ზე გამოიყენება, რომ არ გამოყენებული მონაცემების გამოყენება, NITE შეიძლება მნიშვნელოვანად გაუფეთქოთ CNN-bidirectional LSTM-CRF NER ნეიროლური ქსელი F1-სოფლიოს შე', 'it': "Nel NER specifico per il dominio, a causa di dati di allenamento etichettati insufficienti, i modelli profondi di solito non si comportano normalmente. In questo articolo, abbiamo proposto un nuovo framework Neural Inductive TEAching (NITE) per trasferire le conoscenze dai modelli NER esistenti specifici del dominio in una rete neurale profonda arbitraria in un modo di formazione insegnante-studente. NITE è un framework generale che si basa sull'apprendimento di trasferimento e sull'apprendimento di istanze multiple, che in collaborazione non solo trasferisce le conoscenze a una rete di studenti profonda, ma riduce anche il rumore degli insegnanti. NITE può aiutare i metodi di deep learning ad utilizzare efficacemente le risorse esistenti (ad esempio modelli, dati etichettati e non etichettati) in un piccolo dominio. L'esperimento risultato su Disease NER ha dimostrato che senza utilizzare alcun dato etichettato, NITE può aumentare significativamente le prestazioni di una rete neurale CNN bidirezionale LSTM-CRF NER quasi oltre il 30% in termini di F1-score.", 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į nepakankamus pažymėtus mokymo duomenis konkrečiai sričiai skirtame NER, gilūs modeliai paprastai nesielgia įprastai. Šiame dokumente pasiūlėme naują neuroinduktyvinio mokymosi sistemą (NITE), skirtą žinioms iš esamų konkrečiai sričiai skirtų NER modelių perkelti į savavališką gilų neurologinį tinklą mokytojų ir student ų mokymo būdu. NITE yra bendra sistema, grindžiama mokymosi perdavimu ir mokymu įvairiomis instancijomis, kuri bendradarbiaujant ne tik perduoda žinias giliam student ų tinklui, bet ir mažina mokytojų triukšmą. NITE gali padėti gilaus mokymosi metodams veiksmingai panaudoti esamus i šteklius (pavyzdžiui, modelius, pažymėtus ir pažymėtus duomenis) mažoje srityje. Eksperimentas, atliktas naudojant ligą NER, įrodė, kad nenaudojant jokių pažymėtų duomenų, NITE gali reikšmingai padidinti CNN-dvikryptinio LSTM-CRF NER nervinio tinklo veiksmingumą beveik daugiau kaip 30 % F1 balais.', 'kk': 'Доменге ерекше NER дегенде, мәліметті жеткілікті оқыту деректерінің себебі, қалыпты үлгілер кәдімгі әдімгі қасиеті болмайды. Бұл қағазда, біз мұғалім-студенттердің оқыту тәсілінде білім беру үшін романдық нейрондық индуктивті тейкес қоршауын (NITE) ұсындық. NITE - оқыту мен бірнеше инстанцияларды оқыту үшін жалпы жұмыс бағдарламасы. Бұл білімді тек түсінікті студенттер желіне ауыстыруға емес, сондай-ақ мұғалімдерден дыбысты азайтады NITE бар ресурстарды (мысалы, үлгілер, жарлықталмаған және жарлықталмаған деректерді) көмектесе алады. Тәжірибе NER болып тұрған аурулар кез келген деректерді қолданбай, NITE CNN- bidirectional LSTM- CRF NER невралдық желі F1- нөмірінің жағдайында жақын 30% жұмысын көтеруге болады.', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d - പ്രത്യേകിച്ച NER-ല്\u200d, പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d, ആഴത്തെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d - പ്രത്യേകിച്ച നെയിന്\u200d- മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അറിവ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ എനിറ്റി ഒരു പൊതുവായ ഫ്രെയിമേര്\u200dക്കാണ് പഠനം മാറ്റുന്നതിനും പല ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും മാറ്റുന്നത്. അത് ഒരു ആഴത്തിലെ വിദ്യാര്\u200dത നിലവിലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d NITE ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. ഒരു ച രോഗത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലമായി തെളിയിച്ചുകൊടുത്തു. ഒരു ലേബല്\u200d ഡേറ്റായി ഉപയോഗിച്ചിട്ടില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d NITE F1- സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടിനുള്ള സിഎ', 'ms': 'Dalam NER spesifik domain, disebabkan data latihan yang tidak cukup ditabel, model dalam biasanya gagal bertindak biasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka TEaching Induktif Neural (NITE) yang baru untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari model NER yang ada secara khusus domain ke rangkaian neural yang mendalam secara arbitrari dalam cara latihan guru-pelajar. NITE adalah kerangka umum yang membina pada pembelajaran pemindahan dan pembelajaran contoh berbilang, yang secara kerjasama tidak hanya memindahkan pengetahuan ke rangkaian pelajar yang dalam tetapi juga mengurangkan bunyi dari guru. NITE boleh membantu kaedah belajar dalam untuk menggunakan sumber sedia ada (iaitu model, data yang ditabel dan tidak ditabel) secara efektif dalam domain kecil. Eksperimen yang menghasilkan penyakit NER membuktikan bahawa tanpa menggunakan mana-mana data labeled, NITE boleh meningkatkan prestasi rangkaian saraf LSTM-CRF NER dua arah CNN hampir lebih dari 30% dalam terma skor F1.', 'mk': 'Во доменски специфични НЕР, поради недоволните обележани податоци за обука, длабоките модели обично не се однесуваат нормално. Во овој весник, предложивме нова рамка за неурална индуктивна технологија (НИТЕ) за пренесување на знаење од постоечките доменски специфични модели на НЕР во арбитрална длабока неурална мрежа на начин на обука учител-студент. НИТЕ е генерална рамка која се базира на трансфер на учење и учење на повеќе инстанции, која не само што го трансфера знаењето на длабока студентска мрежа, туку и ја намалува бучавата од учителите. NITE може да помогне во методите на длабоко учење за ефикасно искористување на постојните ресурси (т.е. модели, означени и неозначени податоци) во мал домен. The experiment resulted on Disease NER proved that without using any labeled data, NITE can significantly boost the performance of a CNN-bidirectional LSTM-CRF NER neural network nearly over 30% in terms of F1-score.', 'mt': 'F’NER speċifika għad-dominju, minħabba dejta ta’ taħriġ ittikkettata insuffiċjenti, mudelli profondi normalment jonqsu milli jaġixxu b’mod normali. In this paper, we proposed a novel Neural Inductive TEaching framework (NITE) to transfer knowledge from existing domain-specific NER models into an arbitrary deep neural network in a teacher-student training manner.  NITE huwa qafas ġenerali li jibni fuq it-trasferiment tat-tagħlim u t-tagħlim b’diversi istanzi, li b’mod kollaborattiv mhux biss jittrasferixxi l-għarfien lil netwerk ta’ studenti profond iżda wkoll inaqqas l-istorbju mill-għalliema. NITE jista’ jgħin metodi ta’ tagħlim profond biex jintużaw b’mod effettiv ir-riżorsi e żistenti (jiġifieri mudelli, dejta ttikkettata u mingħajr tikketta) f’qasam żgħir. L-esperiment irriżulta fuq il-Marda NER wera li mingħajr l-użu ta’ dejta ttikkettata, NITE jista’ jsaħħa ħ b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni ta’ netwerk newrali ta’ LSTM-CRF NER CNN-bidirezzjonali kważi aktar minn 30% f’termini ta’ punteġġ F1.', 'pl': 'W NER specyficznym dla danej domeny, ze względu na niewystarczającą ilość etykietowanych danych treningowych, głębokie modele zwykle nie zachowują się normalnie. W niniejszym artykule zaproponowaliśmy nowy system neuronowego indukcyjnego nauczania (NITE) w celu przeniesienia wiedzy z istniejących modeli NER specyficznych dla domeny do dowolnej głębokiej sieci neuronowej w sposób szkolenia nauczyciela-ucznia. NITE to ogólne ramy, które opierają się na uczeniu się transferowym i uczeniu się wielu instancji, które wspólnie nie tylko przekazują wiedzę do głębokiej sieci uczniów, ale także redukują hałas ze strony nauczycieli. NITE może pomóc metodom głębokiego uczenia w efektywnym wykorzystaniu istniejących zasobów (tj. modeli, dane etykietowane i nieoznakowane) w małej domenie. Wynikiem eksperymentu na chorobie NER jest, że bez użycia jakichkolwiek znakowanych danych NITE może znacząco zwiększyć wydajność CNN-dwukierunkowej sieci neuronowej LSTM-CRF NER niemal ponad 30% pod względem wyniku F1.', 'ro': 'În cadrul NER specific domeniului, din cauza datelor insuficiente de antrenament etichetate, modelele profunde de obicei nu se comportă normal. În această lucrare, am propus un nou cadru Neural Inductive TEAching (NITE) pentru a transfera cunoștințe de la modelele NER existente specifice domeniului într-o rețea neurală adâncă arbitrară într-o manieră de formare profesor-elev. NITE este un cadru general care se bazează pe învățarea prin transfer și învățarea în mai multe instanțe, care în colaborare nu numai transferă cunoștințe către o rețea profundă de studenți, ci reduce și zgomotul din partea profesorilor. NITE poate ajuta metodele de învățare profundă să utilizeze eficient resursele existente (adică modele, date etichetate și neetichetate) într-un domeniu mic. Experimentul rezultat pe Disease NER a demonstrat că fără a utiliza date etichetate, NITE poate crește semnificativ performanța unei rețele neuronale bidirecționale LSTM-CRF NER CNN aproape peste 30% în ceea ce privește scorul F1.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн тодорхойлолтой НЕР-д, тэмдэглэгдсэн сургалт өгөгдлийн шалтгаан, гүн загварууд ихэвчлэн энгийн байдлаар ажиллахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид багш оюутнуудын сургалтын аргаар мэдлэгийг НЕР загвараас шилжүүлэхэд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөл (NITE) шинэ сэтгэл санал болгосон. NITE бол суралцах болон олон тохиолдол суралцах үйл ажиллагааны ерөнхий хэлбэр юм. Энэ нь мэдлэг зөвхөн гүнзгий оюутнуудын сүлжээнд шилжүүлдэг биш, бас багш нараас чимээ багасгадаг. NITE нь суралцах арга замыг жижиг хэсэгт ашиглах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ туршилтын үр дүнд НЕР өвчин нь ямар ч нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийг ашиглахгүй гэдгийг баталсан. NITE нь СНЕР-хоёр давхар LSTM-CRF NER мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлж чадна. F1-нүдний хувьд бараг 30% өндөр', 'no': 'I domenespesifikk NER, fordi ikkje er nok merkelig opplæringsdata, kan dype modeller vanlegvis ikkje behalda normalt. I denne papiret foreslåde vi eit nytt neural Inductive TEaching Framework (NITE) for å overføra kunnskap frå eksisterande domenespesifikke NER-modeller til eit tilfeldig dyp neuralnettverk på ein lærer-student øvingsmåte. NITE er eit generell rammeverk som bygger etter læring av overføringar og læring av fleire instansar, som samarbeidleg ikkje bare overfører kunnskap til ein dyp studentnettverk, men også reduserer støyet frå lærarar. NITE kan hjelpa dype læringsmetodar for å bruka dei eksisterande ressursane (t.d. modeller, merke og ikkje merke data) i eit lite domene. Eksperimentet resulterte på sykdommen NER viste at utan å bruka nokon merkelige data, NITE kan betydelig styra utviklinga av ein CNN-bidireksjonal LSTM-CRF NER-neuralnettverk nesten over 30% i F1-poeng.', 'sr': 'U specifičnom domenu NER, zbog nedovoljnih označenih podataka o obuci, duboki modeli obično se ne ponašaju normalno. U ovom papiru smo predložili nov Neuralni Induktivni okvir TEaching (NITE) da prenese znanje iz postojećih modela NER-a u proizvodnu duboku neuralnu mrežu na način obuke učitelja i učitelja. NITE je opći okvir koji se izgradi na učenju i učenju više instacija, koji sarađuje ne samo da prebaci znanje na duboku studentsku mrežu, nego i smanjuje buku od učitelja. NITE može pomoći dubokim metodama učenja da se efikasno iskoristi postojeći resursi (npr. modeli, etiketirani i neoznačeni podaci) u malom domenu. Eksperiment je rezultat bolesti NER dokazao da bez upotrebe bilo kakvih označenih podataka, NITE može značajno povećati učinkovitost CNN-bidirektivne nervne mreže LSTM-CRF NER skoro preko 30% u smislu F1-rezultata.', 'so': "Inta caadiga ah dhaqdhaqaalaha NER ee gudaha ku qoran, sababtoo ah macluumaad ku filan tababarida shaqo la'aanta darteed, tusaale mool dheer sida caadiga ah uma dhaqdhaqaajin karo. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeednay warqad qoraal ah oo ku qoran qoraal ah ee dhaqanka shaqada (NITE) si a an aqoonta uga wareejinno noocyada gaarka ah ee domain-specific NER, si aan u bedeli karno shabakadda neuro-geer oo aad u cadaadin tahay sida waxbarasho-ardayda. NITE waa shirkad caadiga ah oo dhisaya marka lagu wareejiyo barashada waxbarashada iyo tusaalooyin kala duduwan, taas oo si wada wadajir ah aqoonta looma beddelo shabakadda ardayda mool dheer, laakiin codka ayaa macallimiinta ka hooseeya. NITE wuxuu ka caawin karaa hababka waxbarashada e e aad u dheer si ay uga faa’iido u isticmaalaan hantida joogta (tusaale ahaan models, labo labo iyo labo la'aan) gudaha yar. Imtixaanka ku saabsan cudurka NER ayaa xaqiijiyey in aan isticmaalin macluumaad la’aan ah, NITE wuxuu si weyn u boorrin karaa shabakadda neurada ee CNN-bideer LSTM-CRF NER in ka badan 30 boqolkiiba ee F1-score.", 'sv': 'På grund av otillräckliga märkta träningsdata i domänspecifika NER fungerar djupa modeller vanligtvis inte normalt. I denna uppsats föreslog vi ett nytt Neural Inductive TEAching framework (NITE) för att överföra kunskap från befintliga domänspecifika NER-modeller till ett godtyckligt djupt neuralt nätverk på ett lärar-elevutbildningssätt. NITE är ett generellt ramverk som bygger på transfer learning och multipel instans learning, vilket tillsammans inte bara överför kunskap till ett djupt studentnätverk utan också minskar bullret från lärare. NITE kan hjälpa djupinlärningsmetoder att effektivt utnyttja befintliga resurser (t.ex. modeller, märkta och omärkta data) i en liten domän. Experimentet som resulterade i Disease NER visade att NITE utan att använda någon märkt data kan avsevärt öka prestandan hos ett CNN-dubbelriktat LSTM-CRF NER neuralt nätverk nästan över 30% i termer av F1-poäng.', 'si': 'ඩොමේන් විශේෂ NER වලින්, සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් ලේබල් කරපු ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත නොහැකි නිසා, ගොඩක් මොඩේ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කළා න්\u200dයූරාල් ඉන්දුක්ෂිත TEaching පත්තර (NITET) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විශ NITI තමයි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරකාරයක් විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න හා විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට දැ NITE ට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න විදිහට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විදිහට තියෙන්න තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dර පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය NER වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ලේබල් තොරතුරු භාවිතා කරලා නැති කියලා, NITE ට CNN-Biirection LSTM-CRF NER neural network එකේ ප්\u200dර', 'ta': 'போதுமான குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சியின் தரவு காரணத்தால், ஆழம் மாதிரிகள் வழக்கமாக இயங்க இயலாது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய நியூரல் சுட்டுதல் திட்டம் (NITE) அறிவை ஏற்படுத்தினோம் இருக்கும் களம் குறிப்பிட்ட NER மாதிரிகளிலிருந்து அறிவை மா NITE என்பது ஒரு பொது சட்டத்தால் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பல நிகழ்வுகள் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் போது கட்டமைக்கிறது, அது ஒரு ஆழமாக மாணவர்களின் வலைப்பின்னல்லாமல்  NITE முறைமையில் உள்ள வளங்களை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டிய ஆழமான கற்றல் முறைகளை உதவ முடியும் (உதாரணமாக, மாதிரிகள், குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் குறிப Name', 'ur': 'ڈومین کے مطابق NER میں، ناکافی لابلیٹ ڈیٹی کی وجہ سے، عمیق موڈل معمولاً عادی طرح عمل نہیں کرتے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک نور نائرل انڈاکٹیٹیو ٹیٹ کینگ فرمیک (NITE) کی پیشنهاد کی کہ موجود دامین کے مطابق NER مدلکوں سے علم کو معلوم کرنے کے لئے ایک عمدہ عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک میں ایک استاد-طالب تدریس طریقے NITE ایک عمومی فرم ہے جو تعلیم اور تعلیم کی تعلیم پر بناتا ہے، جو صرف ایک عمیق طالب نیٹورک کی طرف علم کو تبدیل نہیں کرتا بلکہ استاد سے صدا بھی کم کرتا ہے. NITE ایک چھوٹے ڈومین میں موجود موجود منبع (یعنی نمڈل، لابلیٹ اور نامبریٹ ڈاٹ) کے لئے عمیق سیکھنے کے طریقے کی مدد کر سکتا ہے۔ اس آزمائش کے نتیجہ میں بیماری NER کے ذریعے ثابت ہوا کہ کوئی لابلیٹ ڈاٹ کے استعمال کے بغیر، NITE ایک سین-بیڈیریٹریکیشن LSTM-CRF نیورل نیورل نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی عملکرد F1-Score کے اندر تقریباً 30% سے زیادہ ہے۔', 'uz': "In domain-specific NER, due to insufficient labeled training data, deep models usually fail to behave normally.  Bu qogʻozda biz mavjud domen-specific NER modellaridan ilmiyni o'zgartirishni o'qituvchi o'qituvchi o'qituvchi taʼminlovchi darajada arbitratli neyrolik tarmoqga o'zgartirish uchun novel Neural Inductive TE chiqarish framedir (NITE). NITE - o'rganish va bir nechta misol o'rganishda o'rganish amalni yaratadi. Bu alohida faqat juda ham aqlliq tarmoqni o'rganish tarmoqga o'zgartiradi, balki o'qituvchilardan ham yozuvni kamaytirish mumkin. Name Name", 'vi': 'Về mặt miền, bởi vì chưa có dữ liệu huấn luyện được dán nhãn, các mô- đun sâu thường không hoạt động bình thường. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất một bộ phận dẫn đầu thần kinh mới (NITE) để chuyển tri thức từ các mô hình tối giao lãnh thổ đã tồn tại vào một mạng thần kinh chặt chẽ theo một cách huấn luyện giáo viên-sinh viên. NITE là một khung hình chung dựa trên việc học chuyển nhượng và học nhiều trường, mà cộng tác không chỉ truyền kiến thức cho một mạng lưới sinh viên sâu mà còn giảm tiếng ồn từ các giáo viên. NITE có thể giúp phương pháp học sâu để sử dụng các phương pháp tồn tại (ví dụ, mô hình, ghi và dữ liệu không được dán trên) trong một miền nhỏ. Thí nghiệm này đã đưa ra dự án "Disease NER" đã chứng minh rằng không sử dụng bất kỳ dữ liệu nào được dán nhãn, NITE có thể tăng cường khả năng hiệu quả của một kênh trung ương trung ương LSTM-CRF nằm trong môi trường thần kinh gần hơn ba mươi.', 'bg': 'При специфичния за домейна нервен нерв, поради недостатъчни обозначени данни за обучение, дълбоките модели обикновено не се държат нормално. В тази статия ние предложихме нова рамка за невронно индуктивно учене (НИТИ) за прехвърляне на знания от съществуващи домейн-специфични модели в произволна дълбока невронна мрежа по начин на обучение на учител-ученик. Това е обща рамка, която се основава на трансферно обучение и многоинстанционно обучение, което съвместно не само прехвърля знания към дълбока студентска мрежа, но и намалява шума от учителите. НИТЕ може да помогне на методите за дълбоко обучение да използват ефективно съществуващите ресурси (т.е. модели, етикетирани и неетикетирани данни) в малка област. Експериментът показа, че без да се използват никакви маркирани данни, NITE може значително да увеличи производителността на невронната мрежа на CNN-двупосочна LSTM-CRF почти над 30% по отношение на F1-score.', 'da': 'I domænespecifikke NER opfører dybe modeller sig normalt ikke normalt på grund af utilstrækkelige mærkede træningsdata. I denne artikel foreslog vi en ny Neural Inductive TEAching framework (NITE) til at overføre viden fra eksisterende domænespecifikke NER modeller til et vilkårligt dybt neuralt netværk på en lærer-studerende uddannelse måde. NITE er en generel ramme, der bygger på transferlæring og multiple instance learning, som i samarbejde ikke kun overfører viden til et dybt elevnetværk, men også reducerer støjen fra lærere. NITE kan hjælpe deep learning metoder til effektivt at udnytte eksisterende ressourcer (f.eks. modeller, mærkede og ikke-mærkede data) på et lille domæne. Forsøget resulterede på Disease NER viste, at uden at bruge nogen mærkede data, NITE kan øge ydeevnen af et CNN-todirektivt LSTM-CRF NER neuralt netværk betydeligt over 30% i form af F1-score.', 'nl': 'In domeinspecifieke NER gedragen diepe modellen zich door onvoldoende gelabelde trainingsgegevens meestal niet normaal. In dit artikel hebben we een nieuw Neural Inductive Teaching framework (NITE) voorgesteld om kennis van bestaande domeinspecifieke NER modellen over te dragen naar een willekeurig diep neuraal netwerk op een docent-student training manier. NITE is een algemeen raamwerk dat voortbouwt op transfer learning en multiple instance learning, dat gezamenlijk niet alleen kennis overdraagt aan een diep studentennetwerk, maar ook het lawaai van docenten vermindert. NITE kan deep learning methodes helpen om bestaande resources (zoals modellen, gelabelde en niet-gelabelde data) effectief te gebruiken in een klein domein. Het experiment dat resulteerde op Disease NER toonde aan dat zonder gebruik van gelabelde gegevens NITE de prestaties van een CNN-bidirectioneel LSTM-CRF NER neuraal netwerk aanzienlijk kan verbeteren in termen van F1-score.', 'id': 'Dalam NER spesifik domain, karena data pelatihan yang tidak cukup, model dalam biasanya gagal berperilaku normal. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan TEaching Induktif Neural (NITE) yang baru untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari model NER spesifik domain yang ada ke jaringan neural yang mendalam secara arbitrar dalam cara pelatihan guru-siswa. NITE is a general framework that builds upon transfer learning and multiple instance learning, which collaboratively not only transfers knowledge to a deep student network but also reduces the noise from teachers.  NITE dapat membantu metode belajar dalam untuk memanfaatkan sumber daya yang ada (i.e., model, data yang ditabel dan tidak ditabel) secara efektif di domain kecil. Eksperimen yang mengakibatkan penyakit NER membuktikan bahwa tanpa menggunakan data labeled apapun, NITE dapat meningkatkan prestasi dari jaringan neural LSTM-CRF NER dua arah CNN hampir lebih dari 30% dalam termasuk skor F1.', 'hr': 'U specifičnom domenu NER, zbog nedovoljnih označenih podataka o obuci, duboki modeli obično se ne ponašaju normalno. U ovom papiru smo predložili nov Neuralni Induktivni okvir TEaching (NITE) da prenese znanje iz postojećih modela NER-a u proizvodnu duboku neuralnu mrežu na način obuke učitelja i učitelja. NITE je opći okvir koji se temelji na učenju prijenosa i učenju više instacija, koji sarađuje ne samo prebacuje znanje na duboku studentsku mrežu, već i smanjuje buku od učitelja. NITE može pomoći dubokim metodama učenja da učinkovito iskoristi postojeće resurse (tj. modele, etiketirane i neoznačene podatke) u malom domenu. Eksperiment je rezultat bolesti NER dokazao da bez primjene označenih podataka, NITE može značajno povećati učinkovitost CNN-bidirektivne LSTM-CRF NER neuralne mreže skoro preko 30% u smislu F1-rezultata.', 'ko': '특정 영역의 NER에서는 표시된 훈련 데이터가 부족해 심도 모형이 정상적으로 작동하지 않는 경우가 많다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 신경귀납교학틀(NITE)을 제시하여 교사와 학생의 교육 방식으로 지식을 기존의 특정 영역의 NER모델에서 임의의 깊이의 신경망으로 옮겼다.NITE는 이동 학습과 다실례 학습을 바탕으로 한 유니버설 프레임워크로 지식을 깊은 학생 네트워크로 옮길 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 교사로부터의 소음도 줄일 수 있다.NITE는 깊이 있는 학습 방법을 도와 작은 영역에서 기존 자원(즉 모델, 표기 및 표기되지 않은 데이터)을 효과적으로 활용할 수 있다.질병 NER에서 진행된 실험은 어떤 표기 데이터도 사용하지 않은 상태에서 NITE가 CNN 쌍방향 LSTM-CRF NER 신경 네트워크의 성능을 현저하게 향상시켜 F1 점수에서 30% 가까이 높일 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'de': 'Bei domänenspezifischen NER verhalten sich tiefe Modelle aufgrund unzureichender markierter Trainingsdaten meist nicht normal. In dieser Arbeit haben wir ein neuartiges Neural Inductive Teaching Framework (NITE) vorgeschlagen, um Wissen aus bestehenden domänenspezifischen NER-Modellen in ein beliebiges tiefes neuronales Netzwerk zu übertragen. NITE ist ein allgemeines Framework, das auf Transfer Learning und Multiple Instance Learning aufbaut, das gemeinsam nicht nur Wissen an ein tiefes Schülernetzwerk überträgt, sondern auch den Lärm von Lehrern reduziert. NITE kann Deep-Learning-Methoden dabei unterstützen, vorhandene Ressourcen (z.B. Modelle, beschriftete und nicht beschriftete Daten) in einer kleinen Domäne effektiv zu nutzen. Das Experiment mit Disease NER zeigte, dass NITE ohne Verwendung von markierten Daten die Leistung eines CNN-bidirektionalen LSTM-CRF NER neuronalen Netzwerks signifikant steigern kann, was den F1-Score betrifft.', 'sw': 'Katika NER maalum ya ndani, kwa sababu ya data za mafunzo yasiyosha, mifano ya ndani mara nyingi hushindwa kutenda kawaida. Katika gazeti hili, tulipendekeza mradi wa TEKNO wa Neural Neural (NITE) kuhamisha maarifa kutoka kwa mifano maalum ya NNE ya ndani katika mtandao wa kiserikali wa neura katika njia ya mafunzo ya wanafunzi. NITE ni mfumo wa jumla unaoanzisha wakati wa kuhamisha kujifunza na namna nyingi za kujifunza, ambazo kwa ushirikiano siyo tu kuhamisha maarifa kwenye mtandao wa wanafunzi wa ndani lakini pia hupunguza sauti kutoka kwa walimu. NITE inaweza kusaidia njia za kujifunza vizuri kwa ufanisi kutumia rasilimali zilizopo (yaani mifano, taarifa zisizotambuliwa na zisizoeleweka) katika sehemu ndogo. Tatizo hilo lilitokana na ugonjwa wa NER lilithibitisha kuwa bila kutumia taarifa yoyote inayoonyesha, NITE inaweza kuongeza ufanisi wa mtandao wa neura wa LSTM-CRF wa CNN kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya asilimia 30 kwa ajili ya score za F1.', 'tr': "Aýratyn hasaplanýan NER'de, etiket edilen eğitim maglumaty ýeterlik sebäbi, derin nusgalar adatça adatça bir şekilde davranmaýar. Bu kagyzda biz Nural Inductive TEaching frameworkyny (NITE) öwretmek-okuwçy okuwçy şeklinde bilimi bar domynyň häzirki NER modellerinden alymy gatnaşmak üçin bir nural şebekesine teklip etdik. NITE öwrenmek we köp öwrenmek üçin umumy çerçewdir. Ol diňe bilimi derin okuwçylar şebekesine göçürýär ýöne mugallymlaryň sesini azaltýar. NITE bir kiçi domanda bar resurslary ulanmak üçin derin öwrenme yöntemlerine kömek edip biler. Bu synagyň netijesi NER ýagdaýynyň etiket edilen maglumaty ulanmasa, NITE CNN-iň bidireksiyonal LSTM-CRF NER netijesiniň netijesini F1 düzgün şeklinde näçe 30% üstünde köpräk edip biler.", 'fa': 'به دلیل اطلاعات آموزشی که نامیده شده\u200cاند، مدل\u200cهای عمیق معمولاً عادی رفتار نمی\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد دادیم یک چهارچوب تغییر عصبی (NITE) برای انتقال علم از مدل های NER مخصوص دامنه موجود به شبکه عصبی عمیق تصادفی در یک طریق آموزش معلم و دانش آموزشی. NITE یک چهارچوب عمومی است که بر روی تعلیم یادگیری و یادگیری چندین فصل ساخته می شود، که با همکاری نه تنها علم را به شبکه دانش آموزان عمیق انتقال می دهد، بلکه صدا را از معلمان کاهش می دهد. NITE می\u200cتواند روش یادگیری عمیق را کمک کند تا در یک دامنه کوچک از منابع موجود استفاده کند (یعنی مدل\u200cها، برچسب\u200cشده و نامزد\u200cنشده داده\u200cها). این آزمایش به نتیجه از NER بیماری ثابت کرد که بدون استفاده از داده\u200cهای etiket، NITE می\u200cتواند عملکرد شبکه عصبی LSTM-CRF NER را به طور کلی بیش از ۳۰ درصد به عنوان نقطه\u200cی F1 بیشتر از ۳۰ درصد بیشتر از آن فعالیت کند.', 'sq': 'Në NER specifike në domeni, për shkak të të dhënave të pamjaftueshme të trajnimit të etiketuar, modelet e thella zakonisht dështojnë të sillen normalisht. Në këtë letër, ne propozuam një kuadër të ri të mësimit nervor induktiv (NITE) për të transferuar njohuritë nga modelet ekzistuese të NER specifike në domeni në një rrjet nervor arbitrar të thellë në një mënyrë treinimi mësues-student ësh. NITE është një kuadër i përgjithshëm që mbështetet në transferimin e mësimit dhe mësimin në raste të shumta, e cila bashkëpunon jo vetëm transferon njohuritë në një rrjet student ësh të thellë por gjithashtu redukton zhurmën nga mësuesit. NITE can help deep learning methods to effectively utilize existing resources (i.e., models, labeled and unlabeled data) in a small domain.  Eksperimenti rezultoi në sëmundjen NER provoi se pa përdorur ndonjë të dhënë të etiketuar, NITE mund të rritë ndjeshëm performancën e një rrjeti nervor CNN-bidireksional LSTM-CRF NER gati mbi 30% lidhur me rezultatin F1.', 'hy': 'Բոլոր բնագավառներում հատուկ ՆԵՌ-ում, բավարար մարզիչ տվյալների պատճառով, խորը մոդելները սովորաբար չեն վարվում սովորաբար: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկեցինք նոր նյարդային ինդուկտիվ TEACH-ի (ՆԻԹ) շրջանակը, որպեսզի տեղափոխվի գիտելիքը գոյություն ունեցող բնագավառի մասնավոր ՆԵՌ-ի մոդելներից կամավոր խորը նյարդային ցանց ուսուցիչ-ուսան ՆիԹԵ-ն ընդհանուր շրջանակ է, որը հիմնված է ուսուցման փոխանցման և բազմաթիվ օրինակների ուսուցման վրա, որոնք համագործակցել են ոչ միայն գիտելիքները փոխանցում խորը ուսանողների ցանց, այլ նաև նվազում են ուսուցիչների աղմուկը: ՆԻԹԵ-ն կարող է օգնել խորը ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներին արդյունավետ օգտագործել գոյություն ունեցող ռեսուրսները (օրինակ, մոդելներ, պիտակ և անպիտակ տվյալներ) փոքր ոլորտում: Փորձը հիվանդության ՆԵՌ-ի արդյունքում ապացուցեց, որ առանց որևէ պիտակուցված տվյալներ օգտագործելու, ՆԵԹ-ը կարող է նշանակալի բարձրացնել CNN-երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT-ԿՌՖ ՆԵՌ նյարդային ցանցի արդյունքը F1-գնահատականի տեսքով մոտ 30 տոկո', 'af': "In domein-spesifieke NER, vanweë onvoldoende etiketeerde onderwerp data, het diep modele gewoonlik misluk om normale te behandel. In hierdie papier het ons 'n nuwe neurale instruktiewe tekeningsraamwerk (NITE) voorgestel om kennis van bestaande domein-spesifieke NER modele te oordra na 'n willekeurige diep neurale netwerk in 'n onderwyser-studente onderwyseling manier. NITE is 'n algemene raamwerk wat bou op oordrag leer en veelvuldige voorbeeld leer, wat collaborativeer nie net kennis oordrag na 'n diep studentnetwerk nie, maar ook verduur die ruis van onderwysers. NITE kan help diep leer metodes om bestaande hulpbronne effektief te gebruik (i.e. modele, etiketeerde en ongeabelde data) in 'n klein domein. Die eksperiment het op Sykdom NER bevestig dat sonder om enige etiketeerde data te gebruik, NITE kan betekeurig die prestasie van 'n CNN-bidirectional LSTM-CRF NER neural netwerk byna oor 30% in terms van F1-score vergroot.", 'az': 'Domenin müəyyən edilmiş NER-də, etiketli təhsil məlumatlarına görə, derin modellər genellikle normal davranmır. Bu kağızda, müəllimlərə təhsil etmək üçün yeni nöral Induktiv TEaching framework ünü (NITE) təklif etdik ki, mevcut domain-specific NER modellerindən elmi göndərmək üçün müəllimlərə təhsil etmək üçün nöral a ğı təhsil etdik. NITE öyrənmək və çoxlu instansi öyrənmək üzərində inşa edən genel bir framewordur. Bu elmi sadəcə dərin öyrənmək şəbəkəsinə dəyişdirir, amma müəllimlərin səsini də azaldırır. NITE, küçük bir domandan mövcud mənzillər (modellər, etiketli və etiketsiz məlumatlar) istifadə etmək üçün dərin öyrənmə metodlarına kömək edə bilər. Bu təcrübə NER hastalığı üzərində təcrübə edilən məlumatları istifadə etmədən, NITE CNN-bidirectional LSTM-CRF NER nöral şəbəkəsinin F1-score üzərində az qala 30%-dən artığını göstərdi.', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট NER-এ যথেষ্ট ট ট্রেনিং ডাটার কারণে গভীর মডেল স্বাভাবিকভাবে আচরণ করতে ব্যর্থ। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস নিউরাল ইন্ডিয়েটিভ টেচিং ফ্রেম (এনআইটি) প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম, যাতে বিদ্যমান ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট নিউ এর মডেল থেকে জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করা  এনআইটি একটি সাধারণ কার্যক্রম যা শিক্ষা এবং বেশ কয়েকটি উদাহরণ শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের সময় তৈরি করে, যা সহযোগিতায় শুধুমাত্র গভীর শিক্ষার্থী নেটওয়ার্কে জ্ঞ NITE can help deep learning methods to effectively utilize existing resources (i.e., models, labeled and unlabeled data) in a small domain.  এই পরীক্ষার ফলে রোগের নেটরের কারণে প্রমাণিত হয়েছে যে কোন লেবেলেড ডাটা ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া এনআইটি একটি সিএনএন-বাইডিয়ারেক্টরেন্ট এলসিএম-সিআরএফ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের প', 'am': 'በዶሜን-በተለየ NER፣ በተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ ማህበረሰብ ዳታ ምክንያት፣ ጥልቅ ዓይነቶች በተለመደው ይደሰታሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአሁኑን ዳሜን-የተለየ NER ሞዴላዎችን ከዋነኛ ጥልቅ የኔትራዊ ነጥብ መረብ ለመለስ (NITE) የተማሪ ተማሪ ተማሪ ተማሪ ማኅበረሰብ በመስጠት ለመዘጋጀት አቅራቢያ ጥያቄ አሻገርነው፡፡ NITE ትምህርትን ለመለወጥ እና በብዛት ምሳሌ ትምህርትን ለመለወጥ የሚሠራ የጠቅላቅ ተማሪ መረብ ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን ድምፅን ከአስተማሪዎች ጋር ያጎድላል፡፡ የNITE ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ ሥርዓት በጥቂት ዶሜን ውስጥ የአሁኑን ሀብት (ምሳሌ፣ መተላለፊያ እና ያልታወቀ ዳታ) በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ከድካም አርእስት የተደረገው ፈተና በአፍሪካዊ ነጥብ የCNN-ብዳራዊ LSTM-CRF NER መረብ በ30 በመቶ ያበዛል፡፡', 'cs': 'V doménově specifickém NER se hluboké modely obvykle kvůli nedostatečnému označení tréninkových dat nechovají normálně. V tomto článku jsme navrhli nový neuronový indukční výukový framework (NITE) pro přenos znalostí ze stávajících doménově specifických NER modelů do libovolné hluboké neuronové sítě způsobem školení učitele-studenta. NITE je obecný rámec, který staví na transferovém učení a více instancích učení, které společně nejen přenáší znalosti do hluboké sítě studentů, ale také snižuje hluk ze strany učitelů. NITE může pomoci metodám hlubokého učení efektivně využívat stávající zdroje (tj. modely, označená a neoznačená data) v malé doméně. Experiment vyplývající z onemocnění NER prokázal, že bez použití označených dat NITE může výrazně zvýšit výkon CNN-obousměrné LSTM-CRF NER neuronové sítě téměř přes 30% z hlediska F1-skóre.', 'et': 'Piisavate märgistatud koolitusandmete tõttu ei käitu sügavamudelid tavaliselt normaalselt valdkonnaspetsiifilises NER-is. Käesolevas töös pakkusime välja uudse neuroinduktiivse õpetamise raamistiku (NITE), et edastada teadmisi olemasolevatest domeenispetsiifilistest NER mudelitest meelevaldsesse sügavasse neurovõrku õpetaja-õpilase koolitusel. NITE on üldine raamistik, mis põhineb siirdeõppel ja mitmeastmelisel õppel, mis mitte ainult ei edasta teadmisi sügavale õpilaste võrgustikule, vaid vähendab ka õpetajate müra. NITE aitab sügavõppe meetoditel tõhusalt kasutada olemasolevaid ressursse (nt mudeleid, märgistatud ja märgistamata andmeid) väikeses valdkonnas. Katse tulemuseks oli Disease NER, mis tõestas, et ilma märgistatud andmeteta võib NITE märkimisväärselt suurendada CNN-kahesuunalise LSTM-CRF NER neurovõrgu jõudlust peaaegu üle 30% F1-skoori osas.', 'ca': "En NER específic per domini, a causa d'insuficients dades d'entrenament etiquetats, els models profunds normalment no es comporten normalment. In this paper, we proposed a novel Neural Inductive TEaching framework (NITE) to transfer knowledge from existing domain-specific NER models into an arbitrary deep neural network in a teacher-student training manner.  NITE és un marc general que es basa en l'aprenentatge de transfer ència i l'aprenentatge de múltiples instances, que col·laborativament no només transfereix el coneixement a una xarxa profunda d'estudiants, sinó també redueix el soroll dels professors. NITE pot ajudar els mètodes d'aprenentatge profund a utilitzar eficaçment els recursos existents (i.e., models, dades etiquetades i no etiquetades) en un petit domini. L'experiment va resultar en Disease NER va demostrar que sense utilitzar dades etiquetades, NITE pot augmentar significativament el rendiment d'una xarxa neural LSTM-CRF NER bidireccional CNN gairebé més del 30% en termes de puntuació F1.", 'bs': 'U specifičnom domenu NER, zbog nedovoljnih označenih podataka o obuci, duboki modeli obično se ne ponašaju normalno. U ovom papiru smo predložili nov Neuralni Induktivni okvir TEaching (NITE) da prenese znanje iz postojećih modela NER-a u proizvodnu duboku neuralnu mrežu na način obuke učitelja i učitelja. NITE je opći okvir koji se izgradi na učenju prijenosa i učenju više instacija, koji sarađuje ne samo da prebaci znanje na duboku studentsku mrežu, već i smanjuje buku od učitelja. NITE može pomoći dubokim metodama učenja da se efikasno iskoristi postojeći resursi (tj. modeli, etiketirani i neizbiljni podaci) u malom domenu. Eksperiment je rezultat bolesti NER dokazao da bez primjene bilo kakvih označenih podataka, NITE može značajno povećati učinkovitost CNN-bidirektivne LSTM-CRF NER neuralne mreže skoro preko 30% u smislu F1-rezultata.', 'fi': 'Aluekohtaisessa NER:ssä syvämallit eivät yleensä toimi normaalisti, koska niissä ei ole riittävästi merkittyjä harjoitustietoja. Tässä työssä ehdotimme uutta Neural Inductive TEaching -kehystä (NITE), jonka avulla voidaan siirtää tietoa olemassa olevista toimialueekohtaisista NER-malleista mielivaltaiseen syvään neuroverkkoon opettaja-oppilas-koulutuksella. NITE on siirtooppimiseen ja moniinstanssioppimiseen pohjautuva yleinen viitekehys, joka ei ainoastaan siirrä tietoa syvälle opiskelijaverkostoon vaan myös vähentää opettajien melua. NITE voi auttaa syväoppimisen menetelmiä hyödyntämään tehokkaasti olemassa olevia resursseja (eli malleja, merkittyä ja merkitsemätöntä dataa) pienellä alueella. Testin tulos Disease NER osoitti, että ilman merkittyä dataa NITE voi merkittävästi parantaa CNN-kaksisuuntaisen LSTM-CRF NER -hermoverkon suorituskykyä lähes yli 30% F1-pisteen suhteen.', 'jv': 'In domain In this paper, we proposal a rome Neral Inructative MEaring frame (NIte) to transfer information from current domain NIT kuwi nggawe sistem sing paling nggawe ngupakan kelas karo ingkang sampeyan karo akeh operasi sing nyimpen, kuwi nggawe layanan kuwi tindakan dhuwur kuwi tambah apik sing nyimpen karo aturan sing paling guru. NIte can help deep Learning Methods to Effectly use current tools (i.e. modes, label and unbleed data) in a small domain. Wang Jaringan bungke bukane DER seneng sak sawetara dadi, NIte iso nggambar nggawe dadi wis etiket dadi, sawetara tuaweke nggawe sawetara sistem sing atara basa sing tarjamahan nggo Ulot-sistem KST-CIF NeR neto sing mesthi atus 30% kanggo ditambara F1-leteng.', 'sk': 'Pri domenskem NER se globoki modeli zaradi nezadostnih označenih podatkov o usposabljanju običajno ne obnašajo normalno. V prispevku smo predlagali nov Nevral Inductive Teaching Framework (NITE) za prenos znanja iz obstoječih domensko specifičnih modelov NER v poljubno globoko nevronsko omrežje na način usposabljanja učiteljev-učencev. NITE je splošni okvir, ki temelji na prenosnem učenju in večkratnem učenju, ki skupaj ne prenaša le znanja v globoko študentsko mrežo, ampak tudi zmanjšuje hrup učiteljev. NITE lahko pomaga metodam globokega učenja pri učinkoviti uporabi obstoječih virov (npr. modelov, označenih in neoznačenih podatkov) na majhnem področju. Rezultat eksperimenta je bil Disease NER, ki je dokazal, da lahko NITE brez uporabe kakršnih koli označenih podatkov bistveno poveča zmogljivost CNN-dvosmernega živčnega omrežja LSTM-CRF NER skoraj več kot 30% v smislu rezultata F1.', 'he': 'במידע NER ספציפי לתחום, בגלל נתוני אימון בלתי מספיק, דוגמנים עמוקים בדרך כלל לא מתנהגים באופן רגיל. בעיתון הזה הצענו מסגרת טקסט נוירואלית אינדוקטיבית (NITE) חדשה כדי להעביר ידע ממודלים NER ספציפיים לתחום קיימים לתוך רשת עצבית עמוקה רצינית בדרך אימון מור-סטודנט. NITE היא מסגרת כללית שמבונה על ההעברה ללימודים ומספר מדרגות, אשר משתף פעולה לא רק להעביר ידע לרשת תלמידים עמוקה, אלא גם להפחית את הרעש מהמורים. NITE יכול לעזור שיטות למידה עמוקה להשתמש באופן יעיל במשאבים קיימים (כלומר דוגמנים, מידע מסוים ולא מסוימים) בתחום קטן. הניסוי הוביל על מחלה NER הוכיח שבלי להשתמש במידע מסוים, NITE יכול לגביר באופן משמעותי את ההפעה של רשת עצבית LSTM-CRF NER בערך מעל 30% במונחים של נקודת F1.', 'ha': "In domain-specific NER, due to insufficient labeled training data, deep models usually fail to behave normally.  A cikin wannan takardan, muka buɗa wani bango na Neural Indurative Tehitki (NItU) dõmin a transfer da ilmi daga misãlai masu ƙayyade na Domen-Specific NER zuwa wata arbitrar tarayya na'urar neura cikin a cikin tsarin mai macallin. NINT wata firam mai jumla ne wanda yake samar ta samun ta shige karatun da za'a iya amfani da kwamfyuta masu yawa, da ake saka sanar da ilmi zuwa zane-taran masĩfi guda, kuma amma yana ƙarantar sauri daga ma'abũta. NINT yana iya amfani da metode masu ƙaranci da za'a yi amfani da amfani da amfani da ressursu masu jira (misali, misali, misãlai, da aka rubũta da kuma ba'a rubuta ba) cikin wani wuri kaɗan. jarrabar ta ƙara kan Sigon NER ya jarraba cewa, bã da amfani da wani data ba na rubutu, NATU zai iya ƙara aikin mai gabatar da shirin LNN-bajaran LTRM-CRF NER na ƙaranci 30% in da aka rubuta F1-score.", 'bo': 'In domain-specific NER, due to insufficient labeled training data, deep models usually fail to behave normally. In this paper, we proposed a novel Neural Inductive TEaching framework (NITE) to transfer knowledge from existing domain-specific NER models into an arbitrary deep neural network in a teacher-student training manner. NITE is a general framework that builds on transfer learning and multiple instance learning, which collaboratively not only transfers knowledge to a deep student network but also reduces the noise from teachers. NITE can help deep learning methods to effectively utilize existing resources (i.e., models, labeled and unlabeled data) in a small domain. The experiment resulted in Disease NER proved that without using any labeled data, NITE can significantly boost the performance of a CNN-bidirectional LSTM-CRF NER neural network nearly over 30% in terms of F1-score.'}
{'en': 'Speeding up Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction Training using Asynchronous Methods', 'ar': 'تسريع التدريب على استخلاص المعلومات المعزز القائم على التعلم باستخدام طرق غير متزامنة', 'pt': 'Acelerando o treinamento de extração de informações baseado em aprendizado por reforço usando métodos assíncronos', 'es': 'Aceleración de la capacitación en extracción de información basada en el aprendizaje de refuerzo mediante métodos asíncronos', 'fr': "Accélérer la formation à l'extraction d'informations basée sur l'apprentissage par renforcement à l'aide de méthodes asynchrones", 'ja': '非同期方式による強化学習型情報抽出トレーニングのスピードアップ', 'zh': '用异步之法,速于强化之学', 'hi': 'एसिंक्रोनस विधियों का उपयोग करके सुदृढीकरण सीखने-आधारित सूचना निष्कर्षण प्रशिक्षण को तेज करना', 'ru': 'Ускорение обучения извлечению информации на основе обучения подкреплению с использованием асинхронных методов', 'ga': 'Treisiú Foghlaim-Bhunaithe a Dhéanamh Oiliúint um Eastóscadh Faisnéise ag úsáid Modhanna Asioncrónacha', 'ka': 'სწავლების დამატებული ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის განათლების გამოყენება', 'it': "Allenamento basato sull'apprendimento basato sull'estrazione delle informazioni utilizzando metodi asincroni", 'el': 'Επιτάχυνση της εκπαίδευσης εξαγωγής πληροφοριών βασισμένης στη μάθηση με ασύγχρονες μεθόδους', 'hu': 'A tanuláson alapuló információkinyerési képzés felgyorsítása Aszinkron módszerek segítségével', 'mk': 'Побрзање на обуката за екстракција на информации базирана на зајакнување со асинхронизирани методи', 'lt': 'Greitesnis mokymasis ekstrahuoti informaciją, pagrįstą mokymu, naudojant azinkroninius metodus', 'ms': 'Menyegerakkan Pelatihan Ekstraksi Maklumat Berasas Pempelajaran Mengguna Kaedah Asynchronous', 'kk': 'Ассинхрон әдістерін қолданып, оқыту негізінде мәліметті тарқату оқыту', 'ml': 'ആസിന്\u200dക്രോണിസ് മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വേഗത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വികസിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വേഗത', 'mt': 'Speeding up Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction Training using Asynchronous Methods', 'mn': 'Сургууль суралцах сургалтын үндсэн мэдээлэл татах дасгал хөдөлгөөн', 'no': 'Snøggtast for utviklingsbasert informasjonsutpakking ved hjelp av Asynchronous Methods', 'pl': 'Przyspieszenie szkoleń w zakresie ekstrakcji informacji opartych na uczeniu się opartym na uczeniu się z wykorzystaniem metod asynchronicznych', 'ro': 'Accelerarea pregătirii bazate pe extragerea informațiilor bazate pe învățare folosind metode asincrone', 'so': 'Soo degdegaanka waxbarasho-based information extraction using Asynchronous Methods', 'sv': 'Snabba på Förstärkning Lärande baserad informationsutvinning utbildning med asynkrona metoder', 'ta': 'வேகமாக விரைவில் படிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் வெளியேறுதல் பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'آسینکرونوس طریقے سے استعمال کرتا ہے', 'sr': 'Ubrzavanje pojačanja, osnovana na učenju, obuka ekstrakcije informacija koristeći Asynchronous Methods', 'si': 'අසින්ක්\u200dරෝන් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ආධාරිත තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng tốc Tăng cường chương trình đào tạo thông tin', 'da': 'Fremskyndelse af forstærkning Læringsbaseret informationsudtræning ved hjælp af asynkrone metoder', 'de': 'Beschleunigung des Verstärkungslerns-basierten Informationsextraktionstrainings mit asynchronen Methoden', 'bg': 'Ускоряване на обучението по извличане на информация въз основа на обучение чрез асинхронни методи', 'nl': 'Versnelling van versterking Learning-based Information Extraction Training met behulp van asynchrone methoden', 'hr': 'Ubrzavanje pojačanja na učenju obuke izvlačenja informacija koristeći Asynchronous Methods', 'ko': '비동기적인 방법을 이용하여 학습 강화에 기반한 정보 추출 훈련을 가속화하다', 'sw': 'Ufunzo wa Uhamiaji wa Kujifunza kwa ajili ya Mafunzo ya Habari Kutokana na Uzazi kwa kutumia njia za Asynchronous', 'id': 'Menyegerakkan Penyelesaikan Informasi Berdasarkan Pelatihan Ekstraksi Dengan Metode Asynchronous', 'fa': 'سرعت افزایش آموزش استخراج اطلاعات بر پایه آموزش', 'af': 'Vinnige versterking onderwerp-gebaseerde inligting uittrekking deur Asynchronous Metodes te gebruik', 'sq': 'Shpejtimi i forcimit të trajnimit të nxjerrjes së informacionit bazuar në mësimin duke përdorur metodat asikrone', 'tr': 'Asynchronous Mettler ullanýan Jawany Ewez Et', 'bn': 'শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক তথ্য বিস্তারিত প্রশিক্ষণ ব্যবহার করে পুনরায় তথ্য প্রশিক্ষণ ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Գործողության ուժեղացման արագացումը սովորելով հիմնված տեղեկատվության արտահանման ուսուցումը օգտագործելով ասինխրոն մեթոդներ', 'az': '䅳祮捨牯湯畳⁍整桯摳⁶慳楴즙獩泉餠쎶祲즙湭즙欭瑡扡湬쒱⁍慬쎼浡瓄넠쎇쒱歡牭愠䗄齩瑩浩⁈쒱穬慮擄녲浡焊', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Ubrzavanje pojačanja na osnovu učenja obuke izvlačenja informacija koristeći Asynchronous Methods', 'cs': 'Urychlení školení extrakce informací založeného na učení založeném na posílení pomocí asynchronních metod', 'ca': "Accelerar l'entrenament d'extracció d'informació basat en l'aprenentatge de reforç fent servir mètodes asincronosos", 'et': 'Õppepõhise teabekogumise koolituse kiirendamine asünkroonsete meetodite abil', 'fi': 'Nopeutetaan oppimiseen perustuvaa tiedonkeruukoulutusta epäsynkronisilla menetelmillä', 'jv': 'Speeding up', 'sk': 'Pospešitev usposabljanja za pridobivanje informacij na podlagi krepitve učenja z asinhronskimi metodami', 'he': 'מאיץ את המהירות של התגבורת מידע מבוסס על לימוד אימון להוציא מידע באמצעות שיטות אסינכרוניות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Speeding up Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction Training using Asynchronous Methods'}
{'en': 'RLIE-DQN is a recently proposed Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) technique which is able to incorporate external evidence during the extraction process. RLIE-DQN trains a single agent sequentially, training on one instance at a time. This results in significant training slowdown which is undesirable. We leverage recent advances in parallel RL training using asynchronous methods and propose RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C trains multiple agents in parallel and is able to achieve upto 6x training speedup over RLIE-DQN, while suffering no loss in average accuracy.', 'ar': 'RLIE-DQN هي تقنية استخلاص المعلومات القائمة على التعلم المعزز (IE) التي تم اقتراحها مؤخرًا وهي قادرة على دمج الأدلة الخارجية أثناء عملية الاستخراج. تقوم RLIE-DQN بتدريب وكيل واحد بالتتابع ، والتدريب على مثيل واحد في كل مرة. ينتج عن هذا تباطؤ كبير في التدريب وهو أمر غير مرغوب فيه. نحن نستفيد من التطورات الحديثة في تدريب RL الموازي باستخدام طرق غير متزامنة ونقترح RLIE-A3C. تقوم RLIE-A3C بتدريب عدة وكلاء بشكل متوازٍ وهي قادرة على تحقيق تسريع تدريب يصل إلى 6x على RLIE-DQN ، مع عدم تعرضها لخسارة في متوسط الدقة.', 'es': 'RLIE-DQN es una técnica de extracción de información (IE) basada en el aprendizaje por refuerzo propuesta recientemente que es capaz de incorporar evidencia externa durante el proceso de extracción. RLIE-DQN capacita a un solo agente de forma secuencial, capacitando en una instancia cada vez. Esto da como resultado una ralentización significativa del entrenamiento, lo que no es deseable. Aprovechamos los avances recientes en la formación paralela de RL utilizando métodos asíncronos y proponemos RLIE-A3C. El RLIE-A3C entrena a múltiples agentes en paralelo y es capaz de lograr una aceleración de entrenamiento de hasta 6 veces mayor que el RLIE-DQN, sin perder precisión media.', 'pt': 'RLIE-DQN é uma técnica de extração de informação baseada em aprendizado por reforço (IE) proposta recentemente que é capaz de incorporar evidências externas durante o processo de extração. O RLIE-DQN treina um único agente sequencialmente, treinando uma instância por vez. Isso resulta em uma desaceleração significativa do treinamento, o que é indesejável. Aproveitamos os avanços recentes no treinamento de RL paralelo usando métodos assíncronos e propomos RLIE-A3C. O RLIE-A3C treina vários agentes em paralelo e é capaz de atingir uma velocidade de treinamento de até 6x em relação ao RLIE-DQN, sem perder a precisão média.', 'fr': "RLIE-DQN est une technique récemment proposée d'extraction d'informations basée sur l'apprentissage par renforcement (IE) qui est capable d'intégrer des preuves externes pendant le processus d'extraction. RLIE-DQN entraîne un agent unique de manière séquentielle, en s'entraînant sur une instance à la fois. Cela entraîne un ralentissement important de l'entraînement, ce qui n'est pas souhaitable. Nous tirons parti des récentes avancées de la formation RL parallèle à l'aide de méthodes asynchrones et proposons RLIE-A3C. Le RLIE-A3C forme plusieurs agents en parallèle et est capable de multiplier par 6 l'accélération de l'entraînement par rapport au RLIE-DQN, tout en ne subissant aucune perte de précision moyenne.", 'ja': 'RLIE - DQNは、最近提案された強化学習ベースの情報抽出（ IE ）テクニックで、抽出プロセス中に外部エビデンスを取り入れることができます。RLIE - DQNは、1人のエージェントを順次訓練し、1つのインスタンスで1回ずつ訓練します。これは、望ましくないトレーニングの著しい減速をもたらします。非同期法を用いた並列RLトレーニングの最近の進歩を活用し、RLIE - A 3 Cを提案します。RLIE - A 3 Cは複数のエージェントを並行してトレーニングし、平均精度の損失を受けずに、RLIE - DQNを上回る最大6倍のトレーニングスピードアップを達成することができます。', 'hi': 'RLIE-DQN एक हाल ही में प्रस्तावित सुदृढीकरण सीखने-आधारित सूचना निष्कर्षण (IE) तकनीक है जो निष्कर्षण प्रक्रिया के दौरान बाहरी सबूतों को शामिल करने में सक्षम है। RLIE-DQN एक एकल एजेंट को क्रमिक रूप से प्रशिक्षित करता है, एक समय में एक उदाहरण पर प्रशिक्षण देता है। इसके परिणामस्वरूप महत्वपूर्ण प्रशिक्षण मंदी होती है जो अवांछनीय है। हम अतुल्यकालिक विधियों का उपयोग करके समानांतर आरएल प्रशिक्षण में हाल की प्रगति का लाभ उठाते हैं और RLIE-A3C का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। RLIE-A3C समानांतर में कई एजेंटों को प्रशिक्षित करता है और RLIE-DQN पर 6x प्रशिक्षण स्पीडअप तक प्राप्त करने में सक्षम है, जबकि औसत सटीकता में कोई नुकसान नहीं उठाता है।', 'zh': 'RLIE-DQN者,近言强学之息取(IE)术,能合外证也。 RLIE-DQN 以次教摄,一以例教之。 此大练速减慢,不可取也。 用异步并行RL教最新进展,发RLIE-A3C。 RLIE-A3C 并行训练数席,且能倍 RLIE-DQN 6 训练,均精不损。', 'ru': 'RLIE-DQN - это недавно предложенный метод извлечения информации на основе обучения подкреплению (IE), который способен включать внешние доказательства во время процесса извлечения. RLIE-DQN обучает одного агента последовательно, обучая по одному экземпляру за раз. Это приводит к значительному замедлению обучения, что нежелательно. Мы используем последние достижения в параллельном обучении RL с использованием асинхронных методов и предлагаем RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C тренирует несколько агентов параллельно и способен достичь до 6-кратного ускорения тренировки по сравнению с RLIE-DQN, при этом не страдая от потери средней точности.', 'ga': 'Is teicníc í RLIE-DQN a moladh le déanaí maidir le Foghlaim Neartú um Eastóscadh Faisnéise (IE) atá in ann fianaise sheachtrach a ionchorprú le linn an phróisis asbhainte. Déanann RLIE-DQN gníomhaire amháin a thraenáil go seicheamhach, ag oiliúint ar chás amháin ag an am. Bíonn moilliú suntasach oiliúna mar thoradh air seo, rud nach bhfuil inmhianaithe. Déanaimid giaráil chun cinn le déanaí in oiliúint RL chomhthreomhar ag baint úsáide as modhanna asincrónacha agus molaimid RLIE-A3C. Traenálann RLIE-A3C gníomhairí iolracha ag an am céanna agus tá sé in ann luas suas le 6x traenála a bhaint amach thar RLIE-DQN, agus ní fhulaingíonn sé aon chaillteanas sa mheánchruinneas.', 'ka': 'RLIE-DQN არის მხოლოდ განახლებული ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქცია (IE) ტექნექცია, რომელიც შეუძლია გარეშე კოდენობა ექსტრაქციის პროცესში ჩვენება. RLIE-DQN გაგრძნობა ერთი ადვნენტის სწორედ, რომელიც ერთი ინსტანციაში გაგრძნობა. ეს შეიძლება მნიშვნელოვანი განსწავლება, რომელიც არ უნდა იყოს. ჩვენ შემდეგ პრალელური RL-ის განსწავლების გამოყენებით აცინფრონური მეტივების გამოყენება და შეგიძლიათ RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C მრავალ ადვნენტები პარალელად გაგზავნენ და შეუძლია 6x სწრაფად გაგზავნდეთ RLIE-DQN-ზე, როცა საშუალო წარმოდგენა სიმართლეში.', 'el': 'Το RLIE-DQN είναι μια πρόσφατα προτεινόμενη τεχνική εξόρυξης πληροφοριών με βάση τη μάθηση ενίσχυσης, η οποία είναι σε θέση να ενσωματώσει εξωτερικά στοιχεία κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας εξαγωγής. Η RLIE-DQN εκπαιδεύει έναν μόνο πράκτορα διαδοχικά, εκπαιδεύοντας σε μία περίπτωση κάθε φορά. Αυτό έχει ως αποτέλεσμα σημαντική επιβράδυνση της προπόνησης η οποία είναι ανεπιθύμητη. Αξιοποιούμε τις πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην παράλληλη εκπαίδευση χρησιμοποιώντας ασύγχρονες μεθόδους και προτείνουμε το RLIE-A3C. Το εκπαιδεύει πολλαπλούς πράκτορες παράλληλα και είναι σε θέση να επιτύχει έως 6εξάχρονη επιτάχυνση εκπαίδευσης πέρα από το χωρίς απώλεια μέσης ακρίβειας.', 'hu': 'Az RLIE-DQN egy nemrégiben javasolt Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) technika, amely képes külső bizonyítékokat beépíteni az extrakciós folyamat során. Az RLIE-DQN egy ügynököt szekvenciálisan edz, egyszerre egy példányban. Ez jelentős lassulást eredményez, ami nem kívánatos. Az aszinkron módszereket alkalmazó párhuzamos RL-képzés legutóbbi fejlődését használjuk, és javasoljuk az RLIE-A3C-t. Az RLIE-A3C párhuzamosan több ügynököt képez, és képes akár 6-szoros edzési sebességet elérni RLIE-DQN-en keresztül, miközben nem szenved veszteséget az átlagos pontosságban.', 'it': "RLIE-DQN è una tecnica di estrazione delle informazioni basata sull'apprendimento di rinforzo (IE) recentemente proposta che è in grado di incorporare prove esterne durante il processo di estrazione. RLIE-DQN addestra un singolo agente in sequenza, allenandosi su un'istanza alla volta. Ciò si traduce in un significativo rallentamento dell'allenamento che è indesiderabile. Facciamo leva sui recenti progressi nella formazione RL parallela utilizzando metodi asincroni e proponiamo RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C allena più agenti in parallelo ed è in grado di raggiungere velocità di allenamento fino a 6x su RLIE-DQN, senza subire perdite di precisione media.", 'mk': 'RLIE-DQN е неодамна предложена техника за екстракција на информации (IE) базирана на зајакнување на научувањето, која може да вклучи надворешни докази за време на процесот на екстракција. RLIE-DQN тренира еден агент секвенцијално, тренирајќи на една инстанција по една. Ова резултира со значително забавување на обуката, што е нежелно. We leverage recent advances in parallel RL training using asynchronous methods and propose RLIE-A3C.  РЛИ-А3Ц обучува повеќе агенти паралелно и е во можност да постигне до 6 пати поголема брзина на обука над РЛИ-ДКН, додека не страда од загуба на просечната точност.', 'kk': 'RLIE- DQN - жуырда білім беру негізіндегі мәліметті тарқату процесінде сыртқы дәліметті қосу мүмкіндігі болады. RLIE- DQN бір агентті келесіден бір инстанциясында оқыту керек. Бұл көмектеспейтін оқыту үшін маңызды баяу болады. Ассинхрондық әдістерді қолданып, RLIE-A3C жуырдағы параллел RL оқытуына жаңа жағдайларды көмектесеміз. RLIE-A3C бірнеше агенттерді параллельде жұмыс істеп, RLIE-DQN арқылы 6x оқыту жылдамдығына жеткізе алады, орташа дұрыс жоғалуға болмайды.', 'lt': 'RLIE-DQN yra neseniai pasiūlytas informacijos gavimo, pagrįsto mokymosi stiprinimu (IE), metodas, kuris gali įtraukti išorinius įrodymus gavimo proceso metu. RLIE-DQN moko vieną agent ą iš eilės, moko vieną instanciją iš karto. Dėl to labai sulėtėja mokymas, o tai yra nepageidaujama. Naudodamiesi asinkroniniais metodais, mes sutelkiame pastarojo meto pažangą lygiagrečiame mokyme RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C vienu metu traukia kelis veiksnius ir gali pasiekti iki 6 kartų didesnį mokymo greitį, palyginti su RLIE-DQN, tačiau vidutinio tikslumo netenka.', 'ms': 'RLIE-DQN is a recently proposed Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) technique which is able to incorporate external evidence during the extraction process.  RLIE-DQN melatih ejen tunggal secara berturut-turut, melatih pada satu kejadian pada masa. Ini mengakibatkan perlahan latihan yang signifikan yang tidak diinginkan. Kami mengambil keuntungan baru-baru ini dalam latihan RL selari menggunakan kaedah asynchronous dan melamar RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C melatih pelbagai ejen secara paralel dan mampu mencapai kecepatan latihan 6x melalui RLIE-DQN, sementara tidak mengalami kerugian dalam ketepatan rata-rata.', 'ml': 'RLIE-DQN അടുത്തുചേര്\u200dന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്രോക്ട്രേക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ പുറത്തുള്ള തെളിവുകള്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയി RLIE-DQN ഒരു ഏജന്\u200dറിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു സമയത്ത് ഒരു അവസ്ഥയില്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത്തുന്നു. ഇത് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കുറച്ച് പതുക്കെ കൊടുക്കും. അസാധ്യമല്ല. നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d പരാതില്\u200d RL പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്നു RLIE-A3C പല ഏജന്\u200dറുകളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പാരാളലില്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d RLIE-DQN നേരെ 6x ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേഗത്തില', 'mt': 'RLIE-DQN hija teknika ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni (IE) ibbażata fuq it-Tagħlim ta’ Rinfurzar proposta reċentement li tista’ tinkorpora evidenza esterna matul il-proċess ta’ estrazzjoni. RLIE-DQN trains a single agent sequentially, training on one instance at a time.  Dan iwassal għal tnaqqis sinifikanti fit-taħriġ li mhuwiex mixtieq. Aħna nixprunaw l-avvanzi reċenti fit-taħriġ parallelu dwar l-RL bl-użu ta’ metodi asinkroni u nipproponu r-RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C iħarreġ diversi aġenti b’mod parallel u huwa kapaċi jilħaq veloċità ta’ taħriġ sa 6x fuq RLIE-DQN, filwaqt li ma jsofri l-ebda telf fil-preċiżjoni medja.', 'mn': 'RLIE-DQN бол саяхан суралцах сургалтын сургалтын үндсэн мэдээлэл татах (IE) техник юм. Энэ нь хадгалах процессийн үед гадаад баталгааг бүрдүүлж чадна. RLIE-DQN цорын ганц агент дагуулдаг. Нэг тохиолдолд сургалт хийдэг. Энэ нь маш чухал сургалтыг багасгах боломжтой болгодог. Бид саяхан RL сургалтын тулд асинхрон арга ашиглаж, RLIE-A3C сургалтын тулд хөгжлийг ашиглаж байна. RLIE-A3C олон агентуудыг параллель дагуулж, RLIE-DQN дээр 6x дасгал хөдөлгөөн хүртэл хүргэж чадна. Гэхдээ дундаж зөв байдалд алдаагүй.', 'no': 'RLIE-DQN er ein nyleg foreslått teknikk for reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) som kan inkludere eksterne beviser under utpakkingsprosessen. RLIE-DQN treng ei enkelt agent følgjande, treng på ein instans på ein gong. Dette resulterer i signifikante trening nedtrekking som er ugyldig. Vi leverer nyleg avansert i parallelle RL-trening med asynkronske metodar og foreslår RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C treng fleire agentar i parallell og kan oppnå opp til 6x opplæringshastighet over RLIE-DQN, mens ingen tap i gjennomsnittlig nøyaktig.', 'pl': 'RLIE-DQN jest niedawno proponowaną techniką Enforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE), która jest w stanie uwzględnić zewnętrzne dowody podczas procesu ekstrakcji. RLIE-DQN szkoli kolejno pojedynczego agenta, szkoląc na jednej instancji naraz. Skutkuje to znacznym spowolnieniem treningu, co jest niepożądane. Wykorzystujemy najnowsze postępy w szkoleniu równoległym RL metodami asynchronicznymi i proponujemy RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C szkoli równolegle wielu agentów i jest w stanie osiągnąć sześciokrotną przyspieszenie treningu ponad RLIE-DQN, przy jednoczesnym braku utraty średniej dokładności.', 'ro': 'RLIE-DQN este o tehnică recent propusă de Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE), care este capabilă să includă dovezi externe în timpul procesului de extracție. RLIE-DQN antrenează un singur agent secvențial, antrenându-se pe o instanță la un moment dat. Acest lucru duce la o încetinire semnificativă a antrenamentului, care este nedorit. Folosim progresele recente în formarea RL paralelă folosind metode asincrone și propunem RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C antrenează mai mulți agenți în paralel și este capabil să atingă o viteză de antrenament de până la 6x peste RLIE-DQN, fără a suferi pierderi de precizie medie.', 'sr': 'RLIE-DQN je nedavno predložena tehnika izvlačenja informacija na osnovu učenja pojačanja (IE), koja može uključiti vanjske dokaze tokom procesa izvlačenja. RLIE-DQN vozi jednog agent a sekvencijalno, treniranje na jednom trenutku po jednom trenutku. To je rezultat značajnog usporavanja treninga koji je neophodno. Približavamo nedavne napredke u paralelnoj obuci RL koristeći asynchronske metode i predlažemo RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C vozi višestruke agente paralelno i može postići do 6x obuke ubrzano preko RLIE-DQN, dok ne pati gubitak prosječne tačnosti.', 'so': 'RLIE-DQN waa teknikada lagu talo galay cusboonaysiinta macluumaadka soo saarista (IE) ee uu ku qori karo caddeynta dibadda marka lagu soo bixiyo. RLIE-DQN wuxuu marka isku mar wax ku tababaridaa hal dhaqaale. Taas waxay sababtaa waxbarasho aad u weyn, taas oo aan la suurtobi karin. Waxaynu sameynaa horumarinta ugu dambeysay ee u barbaarinta RL, isticmaalka qaababka asynchronous iyo soo jeedinaynaa RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C waxey ku tababaraan midiidinnada kala duduwan, waxayna gaadhi karaan ilaa 6x waxbarasho oo ka kordhaya RLIE-DQN, isagoo aan khasaareyn saxda ugu dhexeeya.', 'sv': 'RLIE-DQN är en nyligen föreslagen Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) teknik som kan införliva externa bevis under extraktionsprocessen. RLIE-DQN tränar en enda agent sekventiellt och tränar på en instans i taget. Detta resulterar i betydande träningsavmattning vilket är oönskat. Vi utnyttjar de senaste framstegen inom parallell RL utbildning med asynkrona metoder och föreslår RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C tränar flera agenter parallellt och kan uppnå upp till 6x träningshastighet över RLIE-DQN, utan att drabbas av någon förlust i genomsnittlig noggrannhet.', 'ta': 'RLIE-DQN அண்மையில் உள்ள தகவல் வெளியேற்றம் (IE) தொழில்நுட்பமான தகவல் பெறுதல் RLIE-DQN ஒரு முதலாளி ஒரு பயிற்சியை ஒரு நேரத்தில் பயிற்சி செய்கிறது. இது முக்கியமான பயிற்சியை குறைத்து வருகிறது, அது முடியாது. நாங்கள் அளபுரிய ஆர்எல் பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்தி சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றங்களை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் RLIE-A3C RLIE-A3C இணைப்பில் பல முகவர்களை பயிற்சி செய்கிறது மற்றும் RLIE-DQN க்கு மேல் 6x பயிற்சி வேகத்தை பெற முடியும், ஆனால் சராசரி சரியான சரியி', 'si': 'RLIE RLIE-DQN එක නියෝජිතයෙක් වෙනුවෙන් පුහුණු කරනවා, එක වෙනුවෙන් පුහුණුවක් වෙනවා. මේක ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි අවස්ථානය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය RL ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා අවස්ථානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ RLIE-A3C ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. RLIE-A3C ක්\u200dරියාන්තාන්ත වෙනස් නියෝජිතයෙක් සමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනවා ඒ වගේම RLIE-DQN වලට 6x ක්\u200dරියාන්තාන්ත වේගයෙන්', 'ur': 'RLIE RLIE-DQN ایک اگنٹ کو ایک دفعہ کے ساتھ ٹرین کرتا ہے، ایک دفعہ تک ایک اگنٹ پر آموزش کرتا ہے. یہ بڑی تعلیم آسانی کے نتیجے میں ہے جو ناپسند ہے۔ ہم نے اچھی پیشرفتوں کو آسینکرونز طریقے کے مطابق parallel RL ترکینس میں استعمال کیا ہے اور RLIE-A3C کی پیشنهاد کریں۔ RLIE-A3C چند اگنٹوں کو مشابہ طور پر ٹرین کرتا ہے اور 6x تطارین کو RLIE-DQN کے ذریعہ تک پہنچ سکتا ہے، حالانکہ عمومی دقیق میں کوئی خسارہ نہیں ہوتا۔', 'uz': "Name Name Bu ta'lim taʼminlovchisi esa, muvaffaqiyatsiz emas. Yaqinda, biz RL ta'minlovchi tajribalarni asynchron usullar bilan ishlatish va RLIE-A3C dasturini rivojlanamiz. @ info", 'vi': 'Phiên bản này là một kỹ thuật gia tăng nguồn tin (Iễ) được đề nghị gần đây có khả năng cung cấp bằng chứng bên ngoài trong quá trình khai thác. Phiên dịch phiên bản sẽ được huấn luyện một đặc vụ một lần. Việc này dẫn đến việc thiếu hụt một đợt huấn luyện đáng kể. Chúng ta thúc đẩy những tiến bộ gần đây trong việc huấn luyện RL song song với các phương pháp yêu dấu. RLIE-A3C huấn luyện nhiều đặc vụ song song song và có khả năng tăng tốc độ huấn luyện 6x qua RLIE-DQN, trong khi không bị mất độ chính xác trung bình.', 'hr': 'RLIE-DQN je nedavno predložena tehnika izvlačenja informacija na osnovu učenja pojačanja (IE), koja može uključiti vanjske dokaze tijekom procesa izvlačenja. RLIE-DQN vozi jednog agent a sekvencijalno, treniranje na jednom trenutku po jednom trenutku. To rezultira značajnim usporavanjem treninga koji je neophodno. Približavamo nedavne napredke u paralelnoj obuci RL uz pomoć asinkronskih metoda i predlažemo RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C vozi višestruke agente paralelno i može postići do 6x obuke ubrzano preko RLIE-DQN, dok ne pati gubitak prosječne tačnosti.', 'da': 'RLIE-DQN er en nyligt foreslået Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) teknik, der er i stand til at indarbejde ekstern evidens under ekstraktionsprocessen. RLIE-DQN træner en enkelt agent sekventielt, træner på én instans ad gangen. Dette resulterer i betydelig træningsafmatning, hvilket er uønsket. Vi udnytter de seneste fremskridt i parallel RL træning ved hjælp af asynkrone metoder og foreslår RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C træner flere agenter parallelt og er i stand til at opnå op til 6x træningshastighed over RLIE-DQN, mens de lider intet tab i gennemsnitlig nøjagtighed.', 'nl': 'RLIE-DQN is een recent voorgestelde Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) techniek die in staat is om extern bewijs te verwerken tijdens het extractieproces. RLIE-DQN traint een enkele agent sequentieel en traint op één instantie tegelijk. Dit resulteert in een aanzienlijke vertraging van de training wat ongewenst is. We maken gebruik van recente vooruitgang in parallelle RL training met behulp van asynchrone methoden en stellen RLIE-A3C voor. RLIE-A3C traint meerdere agenten parallel en kan maximaal 6x trainingssnelheid bereiken boven RLIE-DQN, zonder verlies aan gemiddelde nauwkeurigheid.', 'bg': 'RLIE-DQN е наскоро предложена техника за извличане на информация въз основа на засилване на обучението (IE), която е в състояние да включи външни доказателства по време на процеса на извличане. RLIE-DQN обучава един агент последователно, тренирайки по една инстанция в даден момент. Това води до значително забавяне на тренировките, което е нежелателно. Ние използваме последните постижения в успоредното обучение с асинхронни методи и предлагаме RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C обучава множество агенти паралелно и е в състояние да постигне до 6 пъти ускорение на обучението над RLIE-DQN, като същевременно не страда от загуба на средната точност.', 'de': 'RLIE-DQN ist eine kürzlich vorgeschlagene Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE)-Technik, die in der Lage ist, externe Beweise während des Extraktionsprozesses zu integrieren. RLIE-DQN trainiert einen einzelnen Agenten sequenziell und trainiert jeweils auf einer Instanz. Dies führt zu einer deutlichen Verlangsamung des Trainings, die unerwünscht ist. Wir nutzen die jüngsten Fortschritte im parallelen RL-Training mit asynchronen Methoden und schlagen RLIE-A3C vor. RLIE-A3C trainiert mehrere Agenten parallel und ist in der Lage, eine bis zu sechsfache Trainingsbeschleunigung über RLIE-DQN zu erreichen, ohne dabei an der durchschnittlichen Genauigkeit zu verlieren.', 'ko': 'RLIE-DQN은 추출 과정에서 외부 증거를 결합할 수 있는 학습 강화에 기반한 정보추출(IE) 기술이다.RLIE-DQN은 한 번에 하나의 인스턴스씩 개별 에이전트를 순차적으로 훈련합니다.이는 심각한 훈련 둔화를 초래할 수 있으므로 바람직하지 않다.우리는 비동기적인 방법을 이용하여 RL 훈련의 최신 진전을 병행하여 RLIE-A3C를 제기하였다.RLIE-A3C는 여러 에이전트를 병행훈련해 RLIE-DQN보다 6배나 높은 훈련 가속을 실현하면서 평균 정밀도를 잃지 않는다.', 'sw': 'RLIE-DQN ni teknolojia inayopendekezwa hivi karibuni ya Kujifunza Uchambuzi wa Habari za Uhamasishaji (IE) ambayo inaweza kuingiza ushahidi wa nje wakati wa mchakato wa utekelezaji. RLIE-DQN inamfundisha mtumiaji mmoja mwingine, kufundisha kwa namna moja kwa moja. Matokeo haya yanasababisha mafunzo makubwa yanapungua polepoleo ambayo haiwezekani. Tunaendelea maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika mafunzo yanayofanana na RL kwa kutumia njia za uchunguzi na kupendekeza RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C inawafunza maafisa kadhaa wakilinganisha na wanaweza kufikia mafunzo ya 66 zaidi ya RLIE-DQN, wakati ambapo hakuna kupoteza kwa uhakika wa wastani.', 'id': 'RLIE-DQN merupakan teknik pengekstraksi informasi (IE) yang baru-baru ini diusulkan untuk memperoleh bukti luar selama proses pengekstraksi. RLIE-DQN melatih satu agen berturut-turut, melatih pada satu instance pada waktu. Ini menghasilkan perlahan pelatihan yang signifikan yang tidak diinginkan. Kami mengumpulkan kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam latihan RL paralel menggunakan metode asinkron dan melamar RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C trains multiple agents in parallel and is able to achieve upto 6x training speedup over RLIE-DQN, while suffering no loss in average accuracy.', 'af': "RLIE RLIE-DQN trein 'n enkele agent sekwensies, onderwerp op een voorbeeld op 'n tyd. Hierdie resultaat in betekende onderwerp stadig onderwerp wat onversoeklik is. Ons het onlangse vorderings in parallele RL-oefening gebruik van asynchronese metodes en voorstel RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C trein veelvuldige agente in parallele en kan tot 6x oefening speeduig oor RLIE-DQN bereik, terwyl geen verlies in gemiddelde presies gely het nie.", 'tr': "RLIE-DQN ýokardan öwrenme tabanly Maglumat Açmak (IE) teknikidir. Açmak procesinde daşarydaky kanunlary içerip biljek teknikidir. RLIE-DQN birnäçe ajaýyr soňra ýekeje ajaýyr süreýär, birnäçe wagtda öwrenme. Bu wajyp ýokary ýuwaşlyk taýýarlanmak üçin netijede. Ýakynda parallel RL okuwçysyny asynkronous ýolylary ulanarak öňki gelişmeleri etmäge ýetirdik we RLIE-A3C'y teklip edip görkez. RLIE", 'sq': 'RLIE-DQN është një teknikë e propozuar kohët e fundit për nxjerrjen e informacionit bazuar në Mësimin (IE), e cila është në gjendje të përfshijë prova të jashtme gjatë procesit të nxjerrjes. RLIE-DQN stërvit një agjent të vetëm në një sekuencë, duke stërvitur në një rast në një kohë. Kjo rezulton në ngadalësim të rëndësishëm trainimit që është e padëshirueshme. Ne nxjerrim përparimet e fundit në trainimin paralel RL duke përdorur metoda asinkrone dhe propozojmë RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C trajnon agjentë të shumtë në paralel dhe është në gjendje të arrijë deri në 6 herë shpejtësinë e trajnimit mbi RLIE-DQN, ndërsa nuk vuan humbje në saktësinë mesatare.', 'fa': 'RLIE-DQN یک تکنیک اخیرا پیشنهاد داده شده است که استخراج اطلاعات (IE) بر اساس یادگیری (Reinforcement based Information Extraction - IE) قادر است مدرک خارجی در طول فرایند استخراج شامل کند. RLIE-DQN یک مامور تنها را به صورت بعدی آموزش می دهد، در یک مورد آموزش می دهد. این نتیجه به آهسته\u200cی آموزش مهم می\u200cرسد که ناخواسته است. ما پیشرفتهای اخیر را در آموزش RL parallel با استفاده از روش\u200cهای asynchronous تحویل می\u200cدهیم و RLIE-A3C را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم. RLIE-A3C قطار بسیاری از ماموران متفاوتی را به همراه آموزش می\u200cدهد و می\u200cتواند به سرعت 6x آموزش بر روی RLIE-DQN رسید، در حالی که هیچ خسارتی در دقیق متوسط درد نمی\u200cیابد.', 'am': 'RLIE-DQN በአሁኑ ጊዜ በመውጫው ፕሮጀክት ውስጥ የውጭ ማስረጃዎችን ለማግባት የሚችል የሀገር መረጃ ማውጣት (IE) ስህተት ነው፡፡ RLIE-DQN አንድ ተሟጋቾችን በሚያስተምሩ ጊዜ አንድ ምሳሌ እያስተማሩ ያስተምሩታል፡፡ ይህም ትልቅ ትምህርት የማይቻለውን ትርፍ ማድረግ ያሳድጋል፡፡ የቀድሞው የRL ትምህርት በማድረግ እና RLIE-A3C በመጠቀም እናሳልቃለን፡፡ RLIE-A3C trains multiple agents in parallel and is able to achieve upto 6x training speedup over RLIE-DQN, while suffering no loss in average accuracy.', 'bs': 'RLIE-DQN je nedavno predložena tehnika izvlačenja informacija na osnovu učenja pojačanja (IE), koja može uključiti vanjske dokaze tijekom procesa izvlačenja. RLIE-DQN vozi jednog agent a sekvencijalno, treniranje na jednom trenutku po jednom trenutku. To je rezultat značajnog usporavanja treninga koji je neophodno. Učinimo nedavni napredak u paralelnoj obuci RL koristeći asinkronske metode i predložimo RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C vozi višestruke agente paralelno i može postići do 6x obuke ubrzano preko RLIE-DQN, dok ne pati gubitak prosječne tačnosti.', 'bn': 'RLIE-DQN সম্প্রতি একটি প্রস্তাবিত শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক তথ্য বিস্তারিত প্রযুক্তি যা বের করার সময় বাইরের প্রমাণ অন্তর্ভুক্ত করতে পারে। RLIE-DQN এক এজেন্টের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেন, যার ফলে একবার একটি উদাহরণে প্রশিক্ষণ করেন। এর ফলে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রশিক্ষণ ধীরে যা অসম্ভব। আমরা সাম্প্রতিক প্রযুক্তি প্রশিক্ষণের মধ্যে প্রযোজনীয় আরএল প্রশিক্ষণ ব্যবহার করে এবং RLIE-A3C প্রস্তাব করি। RLIE-A3C প্রযুক্তির মধ্যে অনেক এজেন্ট প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করে এবং তারা RLIE-DQN এর উপর ৬x ট্রেনিং প্রশিক্ষণের গতি পৌঁছাতে সক্ষম, যেখান', 'az': 'RLIE RLIE Bu mümkün təhsil təhsil edilməyən təhsil yavaşlamasına görədir. Biz yeni tədbirləri parallel RL təhsilinə asynchronal metodları vasitəsilə istifadə edirik və RLIE-A3C təhsil edirik. RLIE-A3C çoxlu ajanları parallel olaraq tələb edir və RLIE-DQN üstündə 6x tələbə sürəti yetirə bilər, ortalama doğruluğu yoxdur.', 'hy': 'RLlE-DQN-ը վերջերս առաջարկված է ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրությամբ հիմնված տեղեկատվության արտահանման տեխնիկան, որը կարող է ներառել արտաքին ապացույցներ արտաքին գործընթացի ընթացքում: RLlE-DQN-ը սովորեցնում է մեկ գործիչ հաջորդաբար, սովորեցնում է մեկ օրինակ առ մեկ: Սա հանգեցնում է նշանակալի դանդաղման, ինչը անցանկանալի է: Մենք օգտագործում ենք վերջին առաջընթացները զուգահեռ ՌL-ի ուսուցման մեթոդներով և առաջարկում ենք RLlE-A3C: RLlE-A3C-ը զուգահեռ կրթում է բազմաթիվ գործիչներ և կարողանում է հասնել 6 անգամ ավելի արագ վարժեցման արագությանը RLlE-DQN-ի դեպքում, չնայած միջին ճշգրտության կորստին:', 'ca': "RLIE-DQN és una tècnica d'extracció d'informació (IE) basada en l'aprenentatge de reforç proposada recentment que pot incorporar evidències externes durant el procés d'extracció. RLIE-DQN treina un únic agent seqüencialment, treinant en una instancia a la vegada. Això resulta en una lentitud significativa en l'entrenament, cosa que no és desitjable. Utilitzem mètodes asincrònics i proposem RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C treina múltiples agents en paral·lel i és capaç d'aconseguir una velocitat de formació fins a 6x a través de RLIE-DQN, mentre que no pati pèrdua de precisió mitjana.", 'cs': 'RLIE-DQN je nedávno navržená technika extrakce informací založená na posilování učení (IE), která je schopna začlenit externí důkazy během extrakčního procesu. RLIE-DQN trénuje jednoho agenta postupně, trénuje na jedné instanci najednou. To vede k výraznému zpomalení tréninku, které je nežádoucí. Využíváme nedávných pokroků v paralelním RL tréninku pomocí asynchronních metod a navrhujeme RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C trénuje více agentů paralelně a je schopen dosáhnout až 6x zrychlení tréninku nad RLIE-DQN, přičemž netrpí žádnou ztrátu průměrné přesnosti.', 'fi': 'RLIE-DQN on hiljattain ehdotettu Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) -tekniikka, joka pystyy sisällyttämään ulkoista näyttöä talteenottoprosessin aikana. RLIE-DQN kouluttaa yhden agentin peräkkäin, koulutusta yksi tapaus kerrallaan. Tämä johtaa huomattavaan harjoittelun hidastumiseen, mikä ei ole toivottavaa. Hyödynnämme viimeaikaisia edistysaskeleita rinnakkaisessa RL-koulutuksessa asynkronisilla menetelmillä ja ehdotamme RLIE-A3C:tä. RLIE-A3C kouluttaa useita agentteja rinnakkain ja pystyy saavuttamaan jopa 6-kertaisen harjoitusnopeuden RLIE-DQN:llä, mutta ei menetä keskimääräistä tarkkuutta.', 'et': 'RLIE-DQN on hiljuti välja pakutud tugevdamise õppepõhise teabeväljavõtmise (IE) tehnika, mis suudab kaasata väljavõtmisprotsessi käigus väliseid tõendeid. RLIE-DQN koolitab ühte agenti järjestikuselt, koolitades ühe eksemplari korraga. Selle tulemuseks on treeningu oluline aeglustumine, mis on soovimatu. Me kasutame hiljutisi edusamme paralleelses RL koolituses asünkroonsete meetodite abil ja pakume välja RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C treenib paralleelselt mitut agenti ja suudab saavutada kuni 6-kordse koolituse kiiruse RLIE-DQN-i üle, samas ei kannata keskmise täpsuse vähenemist.', 'jv': 'RLIE-DqN iku sabanjuré supoyo Uniforcement Learning-basa Information extract RLIE-DqN pengaturan sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé, njuk kesempatan ning sembarang kotak. Punika dipoleh mengko kuwi nglanggar kuwi ora bisa diagonan. Awak dhéwé ngéwé ngerasakno nuné diagonal terus-terusan RL kuwi nggawe sistem asinêr karo nggawe RLIE-paper. RLIE-A3 pengaturan tambah kuwi mesthi dipoleh lan nganggo perusahaan kanggo 6 x kang dipoleh bantuan ingkang RLIE-DqN, sane ono ora iso nguasai perusahaan patik dhéwé.', 'ha': "RLIY-DQN is a yanzu an buƙata Technical na Taurar da Learn-Basic Data Extration (IU) wanda yake iya iya iya shigar da bayani na fita during jarida. @ item license (short name) Wannan yana ƙara wa mafarin aiki mai girma da za'a sauka da abin da bã ya iya saɓa. Mu sambaza mafariko na farko a cikin shirin RL da za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin asyonchronous kuma Mu buɗa RLIU-A3 C. RLIY-A3 C yana tunkuɗe masu yawa da aka parallel, kuma yana iya iya sãmun mafarin aiki taki 6x a kan RLIE DQN, alhãli kuwa bã ya da wata hasara a tsakanin taƙaita.", 'sk': 'RLIE-DQN je nedavno predlagana tehnika izvlečevanja informacij na podlagi učenja okrepitve (IE), ki lahko vključi zunanje dokaze med postopkom izvlečevanja. RLIE-DQN usposablja enega samega agenta zaporedno, usposablja na enem primeru naenkrat. To povzroči znatno upočasnitev vadbe, kar je nezaželeno. Z asinhronskimi metodami izkoriščamo nedavne napredeke pri vzporednem usposabljanju RL in predlagamo RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C vzporedno usposablja več agentov in je sposoben doseči do 6-kratno pospešitev usposabljanja nad RLIE-DQN, medtem ko ne utrpi izgube povprečne natančnosti.', 'he': 'RLIE-DQN הוא טכניקת חיפוש מידע (IE) מוצעת לאחרונה, שיכולה להכניס ראיות חיצוניות במהלך תהליך חיפוש. RLIE-DQN מאמן סוכן אחד ברצף, מאמן במקרה אחד בכל פעם. זה גורם לאט אימון משמעותי שזה לא רצוי. אנחנו משתמשים בהתקדמות האחרונות באימון RL מקביל באמצעות שיטות אסינכרוניות ומצייעים RLIE-A3C. RLIE-A3C trains multiple agents in parallel and is able to achieve upto 6x training speedup over RLIE-DQN, while suffering no loss in average accuracy.', 'bo': 'RLIE-DQN is a recently proposed Reinforcement Learning-based Information Extraction (IE) technique which is able to incorporate external evidence during the extraction process. RLIE-DQN མངའ་སྡོམ་གྱི་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྲུལ་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། སྐབས་རེ་ལ་ཐེངས་གཅིག་ཏུ་སློབ་གྲྭའི་ནང་། འདི་ནི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མེད་པའི་གྲངས་འབོར་བརྩོན་རིམ་བཏུབ་པར་དམིགས་གཏོང་ནུས། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལུགས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་མཐའ་ནས་སྦྱོར་བའི་RL ལས་གནད་དོན་མི་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད། RLIE-A3C དོན་དག་ཕྱོགས་དབུལ་གྱི་དོན་རྐྱེན་མང་པོ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Leveraging Linguistic Structures for Named Entity Recognition with Bidirectional Recursive Neural Networks', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من الهياكل اللغوية للتعرف على الكيان المحدد باستخدام الشبكات العصبية العودية ثنائية الاتجاه', 'pt': 'Alavancando estruturas linguísticas para reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas com redes neurais recursivas bidirecionais', 'es': 'Aprovechar las estructuras lingüísticas para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas con redes neuronales recursivas bidireccionales', 'ja': '双方向再帰ニューラルネットワークを使用した名前付きエンティティ認識のための言語構造の活用', 'fr': "Exploitation des structures linguistiques pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées avec des réseaux neuronaux récursifs bidirectionnels", 'zh': '因言结构双向递归神经网络名实体识之', 'hi': 'द्विदिश पुनरावर्ती तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए भाषाई संरचनाओं का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Использование лингвистических структур для распознавания именованных сущностей с двунаправленными рекурсивными нейронными сетями', 'ga': "Struchtúir Teangeolaíochta a Ghiaráil d'Aithint Aonáin Ainmnithe le Líonraí Néaracha Athchúrsacha Déthreo", 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση γλωσσολογικών δομών για αναγνώριση ονομαστών οντοτήτων με αμφίδρομη ανακλαστικά νευρωνικά δίκτυα', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Nyelvi struktúrák kihasználása a nevezett entitások felismeréséhez kétirányú rekurzív neurális hálózatokkal', 'it': 'Sfruttare le strutture linguistiche per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate con reti neurali recursive bidirezionali', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды екі бағытты рекурсивні невралдық желілерден анықтау лингвистикалық құрылғылары', 'lt': 'Pavadintų subjektų pripažinimo kalbinių struktūrų didinimas dvikryptiniais rekursyviniais nerviniais tinklais', 'mk': 'Разголемување на јазичните структури за препознавање на именувани ентитети со дворечни рекурсивни неурални мрежи', 'ms': 'Menyerangkan Struktur Bahasa untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama dengan Rangkaian Neural Recursif Dua Arah', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Leveraging Linguistic Structures for Named Entity Recognition with Bidirectional Recursive Neural Networks', 'no': 'Leverer linguistiske strukturar for gjenkjenning av namnet einingar med to retning rekursiv neiralnettverk', 'mn': 'Шинэ нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition гэх Linguistic Structures for Leveraging Linguistic Structures with Bidirectional Recursive Neural Networks', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie struktur językowych do rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów za pomocą dwukierunkowych rekursywnych sieci neuronowych', 'ro': 'Utilizarea structurilor lingvistice pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite cu rețele neurale recursive bidirecționale', 'sr': 'Uspoređivanje Lingističkih struktura za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta sa dvosmjernosnim rekursivnim nervnim mrežama', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Utnyttja språkliga strukturer för identifiering av namngivna enheter med dubbelriktade rekursiva neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'so': 'Leveraging Linguistic Structures for Named Entity Recognition with Bidirectional Recursive Neural Network', 'ur': 'نام کی اینٹیٹی شناخت کے لئے لینکیوسٹی ساختاروں کے ذریعہ دودئیرسیٹیونل نیورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ لینکیوسٹی شناخت کرنا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ học cấp cho Thống kê đơn vị với các mạng thần kinh tổng hướng', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af sproglige strukturer til anerkendelse af navngivne enheder med bidirektionelle rekursive neurale netværk', 'bg': 'Използване на лингвистични структури за разпознаване на наименовани субекти с двупосочни рекурсивни неврални мрежи', 'hr': 'Usporavanje Lingističkih struktura za prepoznavanje imenovanih podataka s dvosmjernicalnim rekursivnim nervnim mrežama', 'de': 'Nutzung linguistischer Strukturen zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten mit bidirektionalen rekursiven neuronalen Netzwerken', 'id': 'Mengangkat Struktur Bahasa untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama dengan Rangkaian Neural Biarah Recursif', 'fa': 'ساختارهای لینگیستیک برای شناسایی واحد نامیده با شبکه های عصبی دوچرخه', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van taalkundige structuren voor naamsbekendheid met Bidirectionele Recursieve Neurale Netwerken', 'tr': 'Adlanýan Entity Tanamak üçin Hat Gizlikleri Ýabşyrma', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Miundombinu ya Kilinguistic kwa ajili ya Kutambua Ujumbe wa Jinai kwa Mtandao wa Nyasiri za Kirasia', 'sq': 'Shkatërrimi i strukturave gjuhësore për njohjen e njësisë së emëruar me rrjete nervore rekursive dy-drejtore', 'hy': 'Լեզվային կառուցվածքները բարձրացնելը անվանված մարմինների ճանաչման համար երկաուղղությամբ ռեսուրսիվ նյարդային ցանցերով', 'bn': 'Name', 'ko': '양방향 귀속 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 언어 구조를 이용하여 명명 실체 식별을 진행하다', 'az': 'İsmim Entity Recognition üçün Linguistic Structures for Leveraging Linguistic Structures with Two Directional Recursive Neural Networks', 'am': 'Linguistic Structures for Named Entity Recognition with Bidirectional Recursive Neural Network', 'bs': 'Uticavajući Lingističke strukture za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta sa dvosmjernicalnim rekursivnim nervnim mrežama', 'cs': 'Využití lingvistických struktur pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit s obousměrnými rekurzivními neuronovými sítěmi', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tunnustamise keelestruktuuride kasutamine kahesuunaliste rekursiivsete neurovõrkudega', 'fi': 'Kielellisten rakenteiden hyödyntäminen nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamisessa kaksisuuntaisilla rekursiivisilla hermoverkoilla', 'ca': "Ampliar les estructures lingüístiques per a la reconeixement d'entitats anomenades amb xarxes neurals recursives bidireccionals", 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'מגביר מבנים שפותיים לזהות יחידות בשמות עם רשתות נוירוליות משתנות שתיים כיוונים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje jezikovnih struktur za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov z dvosmernimi rekursivnimi živčnimi omrežji', 'bo': 'Leveraging Linguistic Structures for Named Entity Recognition with Bidirectional Recursive Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we utilize the linguistic structures of texts to improve named entity recognition by BRNN-CNN, a special bidirectional recursive network attached with a convolutional network. Motivated by the observation that named entities are highly related to linguistic constituents, we propose a constituent-based BRNN-CNN for named entity recognition. In contrast to classical sequential labeling methods, the system first identifies which text chunks are possible named entities by whether they are linguistic constituents. Then it classifies these chunks with a constituency tree structure by recursively propagating syntactic and semantic information to each constituent node. This method surpasses current state-of-the-art on OntoNotes 5.0 with automatically generated parses.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نستخدم الهياكل اللغوية للنصوص لتحسين التعرف على الكيانات المسماة بواسطة BRNN-CNN ، وهي شبكة عودية ثنائية الاتجاه خاصة مرتبطة بشبكة تلافيفية. بدافع من ملاحظة أن الكيانات المحددة ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا بالمكونات اللغوية ، فإننا نقترح BRNN-CNN على أساس المكون للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة. على عكس طرق وضع العلامات المتسلسلة الكلاسيكية ، يحدد النظام أولاً أجزاء النص التي يمكن أن تكون كيانات مسماة من خلال ما إذا كانت مكونات لغوية أم لا. ثم يصنف هذه الأجزاء مع هيكل شجرة الدائرة الانتخابية عن طريق نشر المعلومات النحوية والدلالية بشكل متكرر لكل عقدة مكونة. تتجاوز هذه الطريقة أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية في OntoNotes 5.0 مع عمليات التحليل التي يتم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous utilisons les structures linguistiques des textes pour améliorer la reconnaissance des entités nommées par BRNN-CNN, un réseau récursif bidirectionnel spécial relié à un réseau convolutif. Motivés par l'observation selon laquelle les entités nommées sont fortement liées aux constituants linguistiques, nous proposons un BRNN-CNN basé sur les constituants pour la reconnaissance des entités nommées. Contrairement aux méthodes classiques d'étiquetage séquentiel, le système identifie d'abord quels fragments de texte sont des entités nommées possibles selon qu'il s'agit de constituants linguistiques. Ensuite, il classe ces fragments avec une structure arborescente de constituants en propageant récursivement des informations syntaxiques et sémantiques à chaque nœud constitutif. Cette méthode surpasse l'état actuel de la technologie sur OnToNotes 5.0 avec des analyses générées automatiquement.", 'es': 'En este artículo, utilizamos las estructuras lingüísticas de los textos para mejorar el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas por BRNN-CNN, una red recursiva bidireccional especial unida a una red convolucional. Motivados por la observación de que las entidades nombradas están muy relacionadas con los constituyentes lingüísticos, proponemos una BRNN-CNN basada en los constituyentes para el reconocimiento de las entidades nombradas. A diferencia de los métodos clásicos de etiquetado secuencial, el sistema primero identifica qué fragmentos de texto son posibles entidades denominadas por si son constituyentes lingüísticos. Luego clasifica estos fragmentos con una estructura de árbol de circunscripciones mediante la propagación recursiva de información sintáctica y semántica a cada nodo constituyente. Este método supera el estado actual de OntoNotes 5.0 con análisis generados automáticamente.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, utilizamos as estruturas linguísticas de textos para melhorar o reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas por BRNN-CNN, uma rede recursiva bidirecional especial conectada a uma rede convolucional. Motivados pela observação de que entidades nomeadas são altamente relacionadas a constituintes linguísticos, propomos um BRNN-CNN baseado em constituintes para reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas. Em contraste com os métodos clássicos de rotulagem sequencial, o sistema primeiro identifica quais pedaços de texto são possíveis entidades nomeadas por serem constituintes linguísticos. Em seguida, ele classifica esses pedaços com uma estrutura de árvore constituinte, propagando recursivamente informações sintáticas e semânticas para cada nó constituinte. Este método supera o estado da arte atual no OntoNotes 5.0 com análises geradas automaticamente.', 'ja': '本稿では、畳み込みネットワークに取り付けられた特殊な双方向再帰ネットワークであるBRNN - CNNによる名前付きエンティティ認識を改善するために、テキストの言語構造を利用する。命名されたエンティティが言語的構成要素と高度に関連しているという観察に動機づけられ、命名されたエンティティ認識のための構成要素ベースのBRNN - CNNを提案します。古典的な逐次標識法とは対照的に、システムはまず、どのテキストチャンクが可能であるかを識別し、それらが言語的構成要素であるかどうかによって命名されたエンティティを識別する。そして、各構成ノードに構文および意味情報を再帰的に伝播することによって、これらのチャンクを選挙区ツリー構造で分類する。このメソッドは、OntoNotes 5.0の現在の最先端メソッドを上回り、自動的に生成された解析を使用します。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम बीआरएनएन-सीएनएन द्वारा नामित इकाई मान्यता में सुधार करने के लिए ग्रंथों की भाषाई संरचनाओं का उपयोग करते हैं, जो एक विशेष द्विदिश पुनरावर्ती नेटवर्क है जो एक कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क के साथ जुड़ा हुआ है। इस अवलोकन से प्रेरित होकर कि नामित संस्थाएं भाषाई घटकों से अत्यधिक संबंधित हैं, हम नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए एक घटक-आधारित BRNN-CNN का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। शास्त्रीय अनुक्रमिक लेबलिंग विधियों के विपरीत, सिस्टम पहले पहचानता है कि कौन से पाठ खंड संभावित हैं, जो कि भाषाई घटक हैं या नहीं। फिर यह प्रत्येक घटक नोड के लिए वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ जानकारी को पुनरावर्ती रूप से प्रचारित करके एक निर्वाचन क्षेत्र के पेड़ की संरचना के साथ इन टुकड़ों को वर्गीकृत करता है। यह विधि स्वचालित रूप से जनरेट किए गए पार्स के साथ OntoNotes 5.0 पर वर्तमान स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट को पार करती है।', 'zh': '本文之中,因文本之言以改善BRNN-CNN名实体识之,BRNN-CNN附卷积网络之殊双向递归网络。 因观实体与言成分高下相关,吾发一本于成分之BRNN-CNN以名实体。 与经次第标法相反,统首因文本块是非言语成分以识之。 然后传语法、语义于递归,各为节点,以树为之类。 此术越OntoNotes 5.0上最先进之法,有自生解析功。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы используем лингвистические структуры текстов для улучшения распознавания именованных сущностей BRNN-CNN, специальной двунаправленной рекурсивной сетью, присоединенной к сверточной сети. Основываясь на наблюдении, что именованные сущности тесно связаны с лингвистическими составляющими, мы предлагаем BRNN-CNN на основе составляющих для распознавания именованных сущностей. В отличие от классических методов последовательной маркировки, система сначала определяет, какие текстовые фрагменты являются возможными именованными сущностями, по тому, являются ли они лингвистическими составляющими. Затем он классифицирует эти части со структурой дерева избирательных округов, рекурсивно распространяя синтаксическую и семантическую информацию на каждый составляющий узел. Этот метод превосходит текущее состояние на OntoNotes 5.0 с автоматически сгенерированными синтаксическими анализами.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, bainimid úsáid as struchtúir theangeolaíocha na dtéacsanna chun aitheantas aonáin ainmnithe a fheabhsú ag BRNN-CNN, líonra athfhillteach déthreorach speisialta atá ceangailte le líonra comhdhlúite. Arna spreagadh ag an tuairim go bhfuil gaol mór ag eintitis ainmnithe le comhábhair theangeolaíocha, molaimid BRNN-CNN bunaithe ar chomhábhair le haghaidh aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe. I gcodarsnacht leis na modhanna clasaiceacha lipéadaithe seicheamhach, sainaithníonn an córas ar dtús cé na smutáin téacs ar féidir a bheith ina n-eintitis ainmnithe trí cibé an comhábhair theangeolaíocha iad. Ansin rangaíonn sé na smután seo le struchtúr crann dáilcheantair trí fhaisnéis chomhréire agus shéimeantach a iomadú go hathchúrsach chuig gach nód comhchodach. Sáraíonn an modh seo an úrscothacht ar OntoNotes 5.0 le parsanna a ghintear go huathoibríoch.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban a szövegek nyelvi struktúráját használjuk fel annak érdekében, hogy javítsuk a nevezett entitás felismerését a BRNN-CNN, egy konvolúciós hálózattal összekapcsolt speciális, kétirányú rekurzív hálózat által. Arra a megfigyelésre ösztönözve, hogy a megnevezett entitások nagymértékben kapcsolódnak a nyelvi alkotóelemekhez, javaslatunk egy alkotóelem alapú BRNN-CNN a megnevezett entitás felismerésére. A klasszikus szekvenciális címkézési módszerekkel ellentétben a rendszer először azt határozza meg, hogy mely szövegdarabok lehetnek-e nevezett entitások. Ezután ezeket a darabokat egy választókerületi fa struktúrával osztályozza, rekurzív szintaktikai és szemantikai információkat terjesztve minden alkotócsomópontra. Ez a módszer felülmúlja az OntoNotes 5.0 aktuális állapotát automatikusan generált elemzésekkel.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε τις γλωσσικές δομές των κειμένων για να βελτιώσουμε την αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων από ένα ειδικό αμφίδρομο αναδρομικό δίκτυο που συνδέεται με ένα σύνθετο δίκτυο. Με κίνητρο την παρατήρηση ότι οι ονομαστικές οντότητες σχετίζονται ιδιαίτερα με γλωσσικά συστατικά, προτείνουμε ένα βασισμένο σε συστατικά για αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας. Σε αντίθεση με τις κλασικές μεθόδους διαδοχικής επισήμανσης, το σύστημα προσδιορίζει πρώτα ποια κομμάτια κειμένου είναι πιθανές ονομαστικές οντότητες από το αν είναι γλωσσικά συστατικά. Στη συνέχεια ταξινομεί αυτά τα κομμάτια με μια δομή δέντρου εκλογικής περιφέρειας με αναδρομική διάδοση συντακτικών και σημασιολογικών πληροφοριών σε κάθε συστατικό κόμβο. Αυτή η μέθοδος ξεπερνά την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στο με αυτόματα παραγόμενες αναλύσεις.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ტექსტის ლინგურისტიკური სტრუქტურები გამოყენებთ, რომ BRNN-CNN-ის გამოცნობა, სპეციალური მედირექციური რეკურსიური ქსელი, რომელიც კონგურუალური ქსელი დაკა მოტივირებულია, რომ სახელ ინტერტიკები ძალიან დაკავშირებულია ლენგურისტიკური კონსტიუტენტებით, ჩვენ გვეძლევა კონსტიუტენტიკური BRNN-CNN-ს სახელ ინტერტიკური გან კლასიკური კონტექსური სეკენტიური მარტიკური მეტოვებისა, სისტემის პირველი განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ტექსტის კონტაქტი შესაძლებელია, რომელიც ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკურ შემდეგ ის კლასიფიკაცია ამ კონსტუტიური ხე სტრუქტურაციას, რომელიც რეკუტიურად სინტაქტიური და ჟენმანტიური ინფორმაცია ყოველ კონსტუტიური კონსტიური კონ ამ პროცემის მიმდინარე წარმოდგენისა OntoNotes 5. 0-ში, ავტომატურად შექმნილი პარაზებით გადარჩენა.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, BRNN-CNN аталған мәтіндердің лингвистикалық құрылымын қолдану үшін, арнайы бидиеркционалдық қайталанушылық желімен бірге қосылып тұрған мәтіндердің лингвистикалық құрылымыз. Аталған нысандар лингвистикалық конституттарға көмектесілген, біз конститутты BRNN-CNN деп аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін қолданып тастаймыз. Классикалық келесі жарлықты жарлықтың әдістеріне қарсы, жүйе бірінші мәтін бөлшектері лингвистикалық бөлшектері болып аталатын нысандарды анықтайды. Содан кейін бұл бөлшектерді қайталап синтактикалық және семантикалық мәліметтерді әрбір бөлшектердің құрылымына салыстырады. Бұл әдіс OntoNotes 5. 0 дегенде автоматты түрде құрылған талдау күйін өзгертеді.', 'it': "In questo articolo, utilizziamo le strutture linguistiche dei testi per migliorare il riconoscimento delle entità denominate da parte di BRNN-CNN, una speciale rete ricorsiva bidirezionale collegata con una rete convoluzionale. Motivati dall'osservazione che le entità nominate sono altamente correlate ai costituenti linguistici, proponiamo una BRNN-CNN basata su costituenti per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate. Contrariamente ai classici metodi di etichettatura sequenziale, il sistema identifica prima quali blocchi di testo sono possibili entità denominate se sono costituenti linguistici. Poi classifica questi blocchi con una struttura ad albero di circoscrizione propagando ricorsivamente informazioni sintattiche e semantiche a ciascun nodo costituente. Questo metodo supera lo stato dell'arte corrente su OntoNotes 5.0 con analisi generate automaticamente.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente mes naudojame tekstų kalbines struktūras, kad pagerintume BRNN-CNN, specialio dvikryptinio rekursyvio tinklo, prijungto prie konvoliucinio tinklo, pavadintų subjektų pripažinimą. Atsižvelgdami į pastabą, kad pavadinti subjektai yra labai susiję su kalbinėmis sudedamosiomis dalimis, siūlome sukurti sudedamųjų dalių BRNN-CNN pavadinimui pripažinti. Priešingai nei klasikiniai eilės ženklinimo metodai, sistema pirmiausia nustato, kokie teksto dalys gali būti pavadinti subjektai, priklausomai nuo to, ar jie yra kalbinės sudedamosios dalys. Tada šie gabalai klasifikuojami pagal sudedamųjų dalių medžio struktūrą rekursyviai dauginant sintaksinę ir semantinę informaciją kiekvienam sudedamajam mazgui. This method surpasses current state-of-the-art on OntoNotes 5.0 with automatically generated parses.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ги искористуваме јазичните структури на текстите за подобрување на препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет од страна на BRNN-CNN, специјална двојно рекурсивна мрежа поврзана со конволуционална мрежа. Мотивирано од набљудувањето дека именуваните ентитети се високо поврзани со јазичните конститунти, предложуваме конститунтно-базиран БРН-СНН за именувано препознавање на ентитетите. За разлика од класичните секвенцијални методи на етикетирање, системот прво идентификува кои делови од текстот се можни именувани ентитети според тоа дали се јазички компоненти. Потоа ги класификува овие парчиња со структура на дрво во изборниот округ со рекурсивно пропагирање синтактички и семантички информации на секој конституционален јазол. Овој метод ги надминува актуелните најнови на OntoNotes 5. 0 со автоматски генерирани анализи.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാചകങ്ങളുടെ ഭാഷകസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ബിര്\u200dNN-CNN എന്\u200dറെ പേരിലുള്ള വസ്തുത തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒരു  പേരിട്ട വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഭാഷിക്കുന്ന സംഘത്തോടൊപ്പം വളരെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന നിരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ് ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d പിന്നീട് ലേബിള്\u200d രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് വിരോധമായി സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d ആദ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു ഏത് ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ് ചുങ്കു പിന്നീട് അത് ഈ കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റന്\u200dസിറ്റി വൃക്ഷത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ സംസ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ നോഡിനും സി ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയുടെ നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് കടന്നുപോകുന്നു. ഓണ്\u200dടോയോട്ടോക്ക് 5. 0', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nużaw l-istrutturi lingwistiċi tat-testi biex itejbu r-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa minn BRNN-CNN, netwerk rikorrenti bidirezzjonali speċjali marbut ma’ netwerk konvoluzzjonali. Motivat mill-osservazzjoni li entitajiet imsemmija huma relatati ħafna mal-kostitwenti lingwistiċi, qed nipproponu BRNN-CNN ibbażat fuq il-kostitwenti għar-rikonoxximent tal-entità msemmija. B’kuntrast mal-metodi klassiċi ta’ tikkettar sekwenzjali, is-sistema l-ewwel tidentifika liema partijiet tat-test huma entitajiet magħrufa possibbli skont jekk humiex kostitwenti lingwistiċi. Imbagħad jikklassifika dawn il-biċċiet bi struttura tas-siġar tal-kostitwenza billi jippropaga b’mod rikorressiv informazzjoni sintattika u semantika għal kull nodu kostitwenti. Dan il-metodu jeċċedi l-aġġornament attwali fuq OntoNotes 5.0 b’analiżijiet ġenerati awtomatikament.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид BRNN-CNN-ээр нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийн хэлний бүтээлүүдийг ашигладаг. Энэ нь холбогдолтой сүлжээтэй холбогдсон ялгаатай холбогдолтой холбогдолтой хувилбар юм. Үүнийг нэрлэгдсэн байгууллагууд нь хэл хэлний байгууллагуудтай маш холбоотой гэдгийг анзаарсан. Бид зохион байгууллагуудыг BRNN-CNN-д нэрлэгдсэн байгууллагуудыг анзаарсан. Дараагийн дараагийн маркингийн аргын эсрэг, систем анхны дараа нь хэлний хэмжээсүүдийн хэмжээсүүдийг нэрлэх боломжтой нэгжүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Дараа нь эдгээр хэсгүүдийг тогтмол модны бүтцийг дахин дахин шинжлэх ухаан болон semantic мэдээллийг тогтмол хэсгүүдэд хуваалцдаг. Энэ арга OntoNotes 5.0 дээрх орчин үеийн урлагийн байдлыг автоматаар гаргасан талаар илүү өндөртэй.', 'pl': 'W artykule wykorzystujemy struktury językowe tekstów w celu poprawy rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek przez BRNN-CNN, specjalną dwukierunkową sieć rekursywną dołączoną do sieci konwolucyjnej. Motywowany obserwacją, że nazwane podmioty są silnie powiązane ze składnikami językowymi, proponujemy BRNN-CNN oparty na składnikach składowych do rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów. W przeciwieństwie do klasycznych metod sekwencyjnego etykietowania system najpierw identyfikuje, które fragmenty tekstu mogą być nazwane jednostkami według tego, czy są składnikami językowymi. Następnie klasyfikuje te kawałki ze strukturą drzewa wyborczego poprzez rekursywne propagowanie informacji składniowych i semantycznych do każdego węzła składowego. Metoda ta przewyższa aktualny stan sztuki na OntoNotes 5.0 dzięki automatycznie generowanym parsowaniom.', 'no': 'I denne papiret bruker vi dei lingviske strukturene av tekstar for å forbedra gjenkjenning av namnet entitet med BRNN-CNN, eit spesiell bidireksjonal rekursivt nettverk som er kopla til eit konvolusjonell nettverk. Forskyving av observasjonen at namnet einingar er heilt relaterte til språkstiske konstitusjonar, fører vi ein konstitusjonsbasert BRNN-CNN for oppkjenning av namnet einingar. I contrast to classical sequential labelling methods, the system first identifies which text chunks are possible named entities by whether they are linguistic constituents. Den klassifiserer desse delene med ein konstitusjonstråstruktur ved å rekursivt sprei syntaktisk og semantisk informasjon til kvar konstitusjonsnode. Denne metoden går over gjeldande status-of-art på OntoNotes 5.0 med automatisk genererte tolkar.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggunakan struktur bahasa teks untuk meningkatkan pengenalan entiti bernama oleh BRNN-CNN, rangkaian rekursif bidireksi khusus yang dipasang dengan rangkaian konvolusi. Motivated by the observation that named entities are highly related to linguistic constituents, we propose a constituent-based BRNN-CNN for named entity recognition. Sebaliknya dengan kaedah label sekuensi klasik, sistem pertama mengenalpasti bahagian teks mana entiti bernama yang mungkin oleh sama ada ia adalah konstityen bahasa. Kemudian ia mengklasifikasikan potongan-potongan ini dengan struktur pokok sukunan dengan menggerakkan rekursif maklumat sintaktik dan semantik ke setiap nod sukunan. Kaedah ini melebihi keadaan semasa pada OntoNotes 5.0 dengan huraian yang dijana secara automatik.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, utilizăm structurile lingvistice ale textelor pentru a îmbunătăți recunoașterea entităților denumite de către BRNN-CNN, o rețea recursivă bidirecțională specială atașată cu o rețea convoluțională. Motivați de observația că entitățile denumite sunt foarte legate de constituenții lingvistici, propunem o BRNN-CNN bazată pe constituenți pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite. Spre deosebire de metodele clasice de etichetare secvențială, sistemul identifică mai întâi ce bucăți de text sunt posibile numite entități, indiferent dacă acestea sunt constituenți lingvistici. Apoi clasifică aceste bucăți cu o structură arborească de circumscripție prin propagarea recursivă a informațiilor sintactice și semantice către fiecare nod constitutiv. Această metodă depășește starea actuală a artei pe OntoNotes 5.0 cu analize generate automat.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පත්තරේ භාෂාවික ස්ථානය භාෂාවික සංවිධානයක් භාෂා කරනවා BRNN-CNN වලින් නම් පත්තර අඳුරගන්න, විශේෂ බි බලන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් හිටියා කියලා, නම් නම් ඇතුළුම් භාෂාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් ගැන ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි නි සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් ලේබල් විදියට විරුද්ධ විදියට, පද්ධතිය මුලින්ම පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200d ඊට පස්සේ ඒක මේ චොන්ක්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස්ටුවින්ස් ගස් සංය මේ විධානය ඔන්ටෝනෝට්ස් 5. 0 වල ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිත විශ්ලේෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය', 'so': 'Warqadan, waxaynu isticmaalnaa dhismaha luuqadaha ee qoraalka si aan u hagaajinno aqoonsiga entity ee lagu magacaabay BRNN-CNN, shabakad gaar ah oo ku xiran shabakad xujo ah. Dhaqdhaqaaqyada loo soo jeedo waxyaabaha la magacaabay waxay aad ugu xiran yihiin qofka afafka ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa aqoonsashada aqoonsiga qofka lagu magacaabay BRNN-CNN. Iska duwan qaababka labka ee fasaxa ka dambeeya, nidaamka ayaa marka ugu horeysa aqoonsan kara qofka qoraalka lagu magacaabi karo waxyaabaha lagu magacaabi karo midibo luuqad ah. Dabadeedna waxay ku kala qeybisaa geed dhismihiisa dhismaha bulshada, waxayna ku sii daabacaan macluumaad sawirid ah oo u qoran qof kasta. Kanu wuxuu ka gudbaa xaalada farshaxanka ee joogtada ah ee OntoNotes 5.0, wuxuuna ku qoran baarlamahaas si automatic ah loo sameeyo.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats använder vi texternas språkliga strukturer för att förbättra identifiering av namngivna entiteter genom BRNN-CNN, ett särskilt tvåriktat rekursivt nätverk kopplat till ett konvulutivt nätverk. Motiverad av observationen att namngivna entiteter är starkt relaterade till språkliga beståndsdelar, föreslår vi en komponentbaserad BRNN-CNN för namngivna entiteters igenkänning. Till skillnad från klassiska sekventiella märkningsmetoder identifierar systemet först vilka textbitar som är möjliga namngivna entiteter genom huruvida de är språkliga beståndsdelar. Sedan klassificeras dessa bitar med en valkretsträdsstruktur genom att rekursivt sprida syntaktisk och semantisk information till varje komponentnod. Denna metod överträffar nuvarande state-of-the-art på OntoNotes 5.0 med automatiskt genererade tolkningar.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم ٹیکسٹوں کی زبان کی ساختاریوں کو استعمال کرتے ہیں BRNN-CNN کے ذریعہ ایک مخصوص دوسری نٹورک کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے انٹیٹی شناسایی کے لئے۔ اس نظارت کے ذریعے چلنے والی ہے کہ نام کی اجتماعی زیادہ زبان کی جگہ سے متعلق ہیں، ہم ایک ایست کی شناسایی کے لئے ایک ایست کی بنیادی BRNN-CNN کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ کلاسیک سکنٹیول لیبلینگ طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں، سیسٹم پہلے کس ٹکس ٹکس ٹکس کو معلوم کرتا ہے کہ وہ زبان کی تصویریں ہیں یا نہیں۔ اس کے بعد یہ قطعات کو ایک قطعات درخت کی ساختار کے ساتھ تقسیم کرتا ہے ہر قطعات نوڈ کے لئے سینکٹیک اور سیمانٹیک معلومات کو دوبارہ پھیلانے کے ذریعہ۔ یہ طریقہ OntoNotes 5.0 پر موجود state-of-the-art کو اضافہ کرتا ہے جو خود پیدا کیا گیا پارس کے ساتھ۔', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru koristimo jezičke strukture teksta kako bi poboljšali priznanje imena entiteta BRNN-CNN, posebnu bidirekcijsku rekursivnu mrežu povezanu sa konvolucionalnom mrežom. Pod motivacijom posmatranja da su imenovane entitate veoma povezane sa lingvističkim sastavnicima, predlažemo na sastavnom bazu BRNN-CNN za priznanje entiteta. U suprotnosti sa klasičnim metodama sekvencijalnog označavanja, sistem je prvi put identifikovao kojim tekstskim dijelovima su moguće imenovanim entitetima da li su to jezički sastavnici. Tada klasifikuje ove dijelove sa strukturom drveta konstitucija rekursivno širenjem sintaktičnih i semantičnih informacija svakom čvoru sastavnog čvora. Ova metoda prelazi trenutno stanje umjetnosti na OntoNotes 5.0 sa automatskim proizvedenim analizom.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் உரைகளின் மொழிமாற்று அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளத்தை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, BRNN-CNN, ஒரு சிறப்பு முன்ன Name வகுப்பான பின்வரும் குறியீட்டு முறைமைகளுக்கு மாறாக, கணினி முதலில் கணினி கண்டுபிடிக்கும் எந்த உரை குறியீடுகள் பெயர் உரைகள் என் பின்னர் இது இந்த குறுக்குகளை பிரிவாக்குகிறது ஒவ்வொரு உறுப்பினர் குறுக்கும் புள்ளியில் உள்ள மரம் அமைப்புடன் திரும்பும் ஒ இந்த முறைமை தற்போதைய நிலையில் உள்ள- கலைப்பின் நிலையை மாற்றுகிறது OntoNotes 5. 0 யில் தானாகவே உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பார்', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz ma'lum tarmoq bilan bogʻ'liq bir maxsus qismi bogʻliq tarmoq bo'lgan, BRNN-CNN (BRNN-CNN) nomli tizimni aniqlashga ishlatamiz. Name Name Keyin buni quyidagi daraxt tuzuvlar bilan qaytadan foydalanadi. Har bir taʼminlovchi node uchun sintaktik va semantik maʼlumotni qaytadi. Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi sử dụng các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ của văn bản để cải thiện sự nhận biết mang tên của BRNNn-CNN, một mạng lưới luân phiên chạy trực tiếp gắn liền với một mạng lưới liên kết. Dựa trên quan điểm rằng các thực thể tên tuổi có quan hệ rất cao với các cử tri ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi đề nghị một cử tri dựa trên BRNNN-CNN cho việc nhận diện đơn vị tên. Khác với các phương pháp mô tả theo chuỗi cổ điển, hệ thống lần đầu tiên xác định những phần văn bản có thể được đặt tên bằng các thành phần ngôn ngữ. Sau đó nó phân loại những khoanh này với cấu trúc cây bầu cử thông tin cấu trúc theo tần tật truyền theo ngữ pháp và ngữ pháp cho mỗi lõi. Dùng phương pháp này vượt trội khả năng hiện thời trên OntoNotes 5.0 với các phân tách được tạo tự động.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия използваме лингвистичните структури на текстовете, за да подобрим разпознаването на наименованите обекти от специална двупосочна рекурсивна мрежа, свързана с конвелуционна мрежа. Мотивирани от наблюдението, че наименованите субекти са силно свързани с лингвистичните съставни елементи, ние предлагаме съставна база за признаване на наименованите субекти. За разлика от класическите методи за последователно етикетиране, системата първо идентифицира кои текстови парчета са възможни наименовани единици според това дали те са езикови съставни елементи. След това класифицира тези парчета със структура на електричното дърво чрез рекурсивно разпространяване на синтактична и семантична информация към всеки съставен възел. Този метод надминава текущото състояние на техниката с автоматично генерирани анализи.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel gebruiken we de taalstructuren van teksten om naamsbekendheid te verbeteren door BRNN-CNN, een speciaal bidirectioneel recursief netwerk gekoppeld aan een convolutioneel netwerk. Gemotiveerd door de observatie dat benoemde entiteiten sterk verwant zijn aan linguïstische bestanddelen, stellen we een constitution based BRNN-CNN voor voor naamloze entiteiten herkenning. In tegenstelling tot klassieke sequentiële etiketteringsmethoden, identificeert het systeem eerst welke tekststukjes mogelijk zijn benoemde entiteiten door of het linguïstische componenten zijn. Vervolgens classificeert het deze brokken met een kiesdistrictstructuur door recursief syntactische en semantische informatie te verspreiden naar elk constitutioneel knooppunt. Deze methode overtreft de huidige state-of-the-art op OntoNotes 5.0 met automatisch gegenereerde parsen.', 'da': 'I denne artikel udnytter vi teksternes sproglige strukturer til at forbedre navngivne entitetegenkendelse af BRNN-CNN, et særligt rekursivt bidirektionelt netværk knyttet til et konklusionelt netværk. Motiveret af observationen, at navngivne enheder er stærkt relateret til sproglige bestanddele, foreslår vi en komponentbaseret BRNN-CNN for navngivne enheder anerkendelse. I modsætning til klassiske sekventielle mærkningsmetoder identificerer systemet først, hvilke tekststykker der er mulige navngivne enheder ved, om de er sproglige bestanddele. Derefter klassificerer den disse stykker med en valgkredsstruktur ved rekursivt at formere syntaktisk og semantisk information til hver enkelt node. Denne metode overgår nuværende state-of-the-art på OntoNotes 5.0 med automatisk genererede parses.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru koristimo jezičke strukture teksta kako bi poboljšali priznanje imena entiteta BRNN-CNN, posebnu bidirektivnu rekursivnu mrežu povezanu s konvolucionalnom mrežom. Pod motivacijom posmatranja da su imenovane entitate veoma povezani s jezičkim sastavnicima, predlažemo na sastavnom temelju BRNN-CNN za priznanje imena entiteta. Za suprotnost klasičnim metodama označavanja, sustav prvo identificira koji su dijelovi teksta mogući imenovanim entitetima da li su to jezički sastavnici. Tada klasifikuje ove dijelove sa strukturom drveta konstitucije rekursivno propagavajući sintaktične i semantične informacije svakom čvorskom čvoru. Ova metoda prelazi trenutno stanje umjetnosti na OntoNotes 5.0 sa automatskim proizvedenim pretragema.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag nutzen wir die sprachlichen Strukturen von Texten, um die Erkennung benannter Entitäten durch BRNN-CNN, ein spezielles bidirektionales rekursives Netzwerk, zu verbessern. Motiviert durch die Beobachtung, dass benannte Entitäten stark mit linguistischen Bestandteilen verwandt sind, schlagen wir ein konstitutionsbasiertes BRNN-CNN zur Erkennung benannter Entitäten vor. Im Gegensatz zu klassischen sequentiellen Beschriftungsmethoden identifiziert das System zunächst, welche Textbausteine benannt werden können, indem es sich um linguistische Bestandteile handelt. Dann klassifiziert es diese Chunks mit einer Wahlkreisbaumstruktur, indem es syntaktische und semantische Informationen rekursiv an jeden konstituierenden Knoten weitergibt. Diese Methode übertrifft den aktuellen Stand der Technik auf OntoNotes 5.0 mit automatisch generierten Parses.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggunakan struktur bahasa teks untuk meningkatkan pengenalan entitas bernama oleh BRNN-CNN, jaringan rekursif bidireksi khusus yang terhubung dengan jaringan konvolusi. Motivated by the observation that named entities are highly related to linguistic constituents, we propose a constituent-based BRNN-CNN for named entity recognition. Berbeda dengan metode label sekuensial klasik, sistem pertama-tama mengidentifikasi bagian teks mana mungkin entitas bernama oleh apakah mereka adalah konstituen bahasa. Kemudian ia mengklasifikasi potongan-potongan ini dengan struktur pohon konstitusi dengan rekursif propagasi informasi sintaksi dan semantis ke setiap node konstitusi. Metode ini melebihi state-of-the-art saat ini di OntoNotes 5.0 dengan analisis yang secara otomatis dibuat.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunatumia miundombinu ya lugha ya maandishi ili kuboresha utambulisho wa entity unaoitwa na BRNN-CNN, mtandao maalum wa kurejesha viungo vinavyoungwa na mtandao wa kimataifa. Tamko la mtazamo ambao vitu vinavyotajwa vizuri vilihusiana na wapiga kura wa lugha, tunapendekeza BRNN-CNN kwa jina la utambulisho wa entity. In contrast to classical sequential labeling methods, the system first identifies which text chunks are possible named entities by whether they are linguistic constituents.  Kisha hugawanya misingi haya kwa muundo wa mti wa ubunge kwa kutangaza taarifa za ushirikiano na sekunde kwa kila upande wa ubunge. Utawala huu unapitisha hali ya sanaa ya sasa kwenye mtandao wa OntoNotes 5.0 kwa mabunge yaliyozaliwa kwa wenyewe.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما ساختارهای زبان\u200cشناسی از متن\u200cها را استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا توسط BRNN-CNN شناسایی entity نامیده شود، شبکه\u200cهای دوباره\u200cای ویژه\u200cای که با شبکه\u200cهای کنترل ارتباط دارد. توسط مشاهده\u200cای که سازمان\u200cهای نامیده با سازمان\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی بسیار ارتباط دارند، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک سازمان\u200cسازمان بر اساس برن-سین برای شناسایی سازمان نامیده شده. در مقابل روش برچسب\u200cهای کلاسیک، سیستم اول به عنوان کدام قطعه\u200cهای متن ممکن است به عنوان یک قطعه\u200cای که به عنوان آن\u200cها قطعه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی هستند شناسایی کند. سپس این قطعات را با یک ساختار درخت محیطی با تکرار کردن اطلاعات سنتاکتیک و semantic به هر گره محیطی مختلف می\u200cکند. این روش در OntoNotes 5. 0 در حالت هنر فعلی با تحلیل\u200cهای خودکار تولید می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, BRNN-CNN tarapyndan adlanylan tek ýerleri bejermek üçin metinlerin lingwistiki strukturalaryny ulanýarys. Adynyň adyny görkezilýän baýramlar lingwistiki komponentlere gollaşdyrylýar, biz esasy taýýarlanan BRNN-CNN diýip adlanan hedeflere teklip edip görýäris. Klasik soňky etiket täzelikleriniň garşy bilen, sistemiň ilkinji gezek lingwistiki komponentler bilen adlanan metiniň haýsy taýýarlaryny tanyýar. Sonra bu bölümleri her constituency düğümüne bir şekilde biyselendirir. Bu yöntem OntoNotes 5.0'da häzirki sanat kalamyny otomatik üýtgedir.", 'af': "In hierdie papier gebruik ons die lingwisiese strukture van teks om genaamde entiteit herken te verbeter deur BRNN-CNN, 'n spesiaal bidireksjonale rekursiewe netwerk wat met 'n konvolusieele netwerk aangehef is. Gebeweging deur die observasie wat genoem entiteite is baie verwante aan lingvisse konstitusies, voorstel ons 'n konstituent-gebaseerde BRNN-CNN vir genoem entiteiterkenning. In contrast to classical sequential labeling methods, the system first identifies which text chunks are possible named entities by whether they are linguistic constituents. Dan klassifiseer dit die blokke met 'n constituency boom struktuur deur rekursief te propagasie sintaktieke en semantiese inligting na elke konstituent node. Hierdie metode verbygaan huidige staat- of- die- kuns op OntoNotes 5. 0 met automaties genereerde verwerking.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përdorim strukturat gjuhësore të teksteve për të përmirësuar njohjen e njësisë së quajtur nga BRNN-CNN, një rrjet i posaçëm dy-drejtues rekursiv i lidhur me një rrjet konvolutiv. Motivuar nga vëzhgimi se njësitë e emëruara janë shumë të lidhura me përbërësit gjuhësor, ne propozojmë një BRNN-CNN me bazë përbërëse për njohjen e emëruar të njësisë. Në kundërshtim me metodat klasike të etiketave sekuenciale, sistemi identifikon së pari se cilat pjesë teksti janë të mundshme njësi të emëruara nga nëse janë përbërës gjuhësore. Pastaj klasifikon këto pjesë me një strukturë pemësh të qarkut zgjedhor duke përhapur rekursivisht informacion sintaktik dhe semantik në çdo nod përbërës. Ky metodë kalon gjendjen aktuale në OntoNotes 5.0 me analiza të gjeneruara automatikisht.', 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք օգտագործում ենք տեքստների լեզվաբանական կառուցվածքները, որպեսզի բարելավենք ԲՌՆ-ՍՆ-ի կողմից կոչված անհատականության ճանաչելը, հատուկ երկու ուղղությամբ կրկնօրինակ ցանց, որը կապված է հակա Պատճառն այն է, որ կոչված կազմակերպությունները շատ կապված են լեզվաբանական բաղադրիչների հետ, մենք առաջարկում ենք բաղադրիչներով հիմնված ԲՌՆ-ՍՆ կոչված կազմակերպությունների ճանաչելու համար: Ի հակադրություն դասական հաջորդական պիտակումների մեթոդներին, համակարգը առաջին անգամ հայտնաբերում է, թե ինչ տեքստի մասեր են հնարավոր անվանված միավորներ, կախված լեզվաբանական բաղադրիչներից: Այնուհետև այն դասակարգում է այս մասերը ընտրական շրջանի ծառի կառուցվածքով' կրկնօրինակ տարածելով սինտակտիկ և սեմանտիկ տեղեկատվություն յուրաքանչյուր մասի համար: Այս մեթոդը ավտոմատ ստեղծվող վերլուծումներով գերազանցում է ներկայիս ամենահետաքրքիր զարգացումը Օնտոնոտայի 5.0 վրա:", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ፣ የቋንቋዊ ጽሑፎችን የጽሑፎችን ሥርዓት እናጠቃለን፤ በBRNN-CNN የተባለውን አካባቢ ማውቀትን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የተባለው አካባቢዎች ከቋንቋው ተሟጋቾች ጋር ተያያይተዋል፡፡ በክላሲካዊ ግንኙነት የቋንቋ ምርጫዎች መሆኑን በመጀመሪያ ሲስተም የጽሑፍ ጉዳዮች የቋንቋዊ ገጽ መሆኑን ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ በዛፍ አካባቢ እና ለሁሉም የአካባቢ መረጃዎችን በመስጠት እና የsemantic መረጃዎችን በመስጠት ይለያያል፡፡ Notes 5.0 በተለየ ፋርስ አውቶማቲክ የተፈጠረ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'In this paper, we utilize the linguistic structures of texts to improve named entity recognition by BRNN-CNN, a special bidirectional recursive network attached with a convolutional network.  নামের বস্তুগুলো ভাষাগত ভাষার প্রতিনিধিদের সাথে সম্পর্কিত, আমরা একটি ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বিআরএনএন-সিএনএন-এর প্রস্তাব করছি যেটির নামে প্রতিষ ক্লাসিক্যালের পরবর্তী লেবেলিং পদ্ধতির বিপরীতে, সিস্টেম প্রথমে চিহ্নিত করে কোন টেক্সট চাঙ্কের নামে লেখা সম্ভব, যা ভাষাগত ভ তারপর এটি প্রতিটি প্রতিবাদকারী নোডের কাছে সিন্ট্যাকটিক এবং সেম্যান্টিক তথ্য প্রচার করে সংসদীয় গাছের কাঠামোর মাধ্যমে এই সমস্ত এই পদ্ধতি অনটোনোটস ৫. ০-এ বর্তমান অবস্থানের পরিস্থিতি অতিক্রম করে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তৈরি করা পার্স দিয়ে।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru koristimo jezičke strukture teksta kako bi poboljšali priznanje imena entiteta od strane BRNN-CNN, posebnu bidirektivnu rekursivnu mrežu povezanu sa konvolucionalnom mrežom. Pod motivacijom posmatranja da su imenovane entitate veoma povezane sa jezičkim sastavnicima, predlažemo na sastavnom bazu BRNN-CNN za priznanje imena entiteta. U suprotnosti sa klasičnim metodama sekvencijalnog označavanja, sistem je prvi put identificirao kojim tekstskim dijelovima su moguće imenovanim entitetima da li su to jezički sastavnici. Tada klasifikuje ove dijelove sa strukturom drveta konstitucija rekursivno proširujući sintaktične i semantične informacije svakom čvorskom čvoru. Ova metoda prelazi trenutno stanje umjetnosti na OntoNotes 5.0 sa automatskim proizvedenim analizom.', 'az': "Bu kağızda, BRNN-CNN vasitəsilə adlı təşkil etmək üçün məktub dilindəki quruluşlarını istifadə edirik. Bu xüsusiyyətli məktəbə ilə bağlı olan xüsusiyyətli bidirectional rekursiv a ğ. Adlı nöqtələr dil müəyyənləri ilə çox bağlı olduğu gözləmə ilə dəyişdirilmişdir, biz bu nöqtələrin tanıması üçün müəyyənləşdirilmiş BRNN-CNN təklif edirik. Klasik növbəti etiketləmə metodlarına baxmayaraq, sistem ilk dəfə kimin mətn parçalarının dil komponentlərinin mümkün olduğunu tanıyır. Sonra bu dəstələri hər dəstək düyünün sintaktik və semantik məlumatlarını bir dəstək a ğacı qurulmasıyla seçir. Bu yöntem OntoNotes 5.0'deki hökmünün quraqlığı ilə avtomatik ürəkləndirilənlər ilə keçirir.", 'ca': "In this paper, we utilize the linguistic structures of texts to improve named entity recognition by BRNN-CNN, a special bidirectional recursive network attached with a convolutional network.  Motivada per l'observació que les entitats anomenades estan molt relacionades amb els constituents lingüístics, proposem un BRNN-CNN basat en els constituents per al reconeixement de les entitats anomenades. Al contrari dels mètodes clàssics d'etiquetar seqüencial, el sistema identifica primer quins trossos de text són possibles entitats anomenades segons si són components lingüístics. Llavors classifica aquests trossos amb una estructura d'arbre electoral propagant recursivament informació sinàctica i semàntica a cada nodre. Aquest mètode supera l'actualitat de l'OntoNotes 5.0 amb analitzacions generades automàticament.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 텍스트의 언어 구조를 이용하여 BRNN-CNN(추가 볼륨 네트워크의 양방향 귀속 네트워크)을 통해 명명 실체 식별을 개선한다.명명 실체와 언어 성분의 고도와 관련된 관찰을 바탕으로 우리는 성분 기반의 BRNN-CNN 명명 실체 식별 방법을 제시했다.고전적인 순서 표기 방법과 달리 이 시스템은 먼저 텍스트 블록이 언어 성분인지 여부를 통해 어떤 텍스트 블록이 명명 실체일 수 있는지 확인한다.그 다음에 문법과 의미 정보를 각 구성 노드에 귀속적으로 전파하고 선택 트리 구조를 이용하여 이 블록을 분류한다.이런 방법은 OntoNotes 5.0에서 현재 가장 선진적인 자동 생성 해석 방법을 능가한다.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kasutame tekstide keelestruktuure, et parandada nimetatud olemite äratundmist BRNN-CNN-i poolt, mis on spetsiaalne kahesuunaline rekursiivõrk, mis on ühendatud konvolutsioonivõrguga. Motiveerituna tähelepanu sellele, et nimetatud üksused on keeleliste koostisosadega kõrgelt seotud, pakume välja koostisosapõhise BRNN-CNN nimelise üksuse tunnustamiseks. Erinevalt klassikalistest järjestikuste märgistusmeetoditest tuvastab süsteem kõigepealt, millised tekstitükid on võimalikud nimetada olemiteks, olenevalt sellest, kas need on keelelised koostisosad. Seejärel liigitab see need tükid valimisringkonna puustruktuuriga, levitades rekursiivselt süntaktilist ja semantilist teavet igasse koostissõlme. See meetod ületab OntoNotes 5.0 praeguse tehnika taseme automaatselt genereeritud parsidega.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä hyödynnämme tekstien kielellisiä rakenteita parantaaksemme nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamista BRNN-CNN:llä, joka on erityinen kaksisuuntainen rekursiivinen verkko yhdistettynä konvolutionaaliseen verkkoon. Perustuen havaintoon siitä, että nimetyt entiteetit liittyvät vahvasti kielellisiin komponentteihin, ehdotamme komponenttipohjaista BRNN-CNN nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamista varten. Toisin kuin klassiset peräkkäiset merkintämenetelmät, järjestelmä tunnistaa ensin, mitkä tekstilohkot ovat mahdollisia nimettyjä entiteettejä sen mukaan, ovatko ne kielellisiä ainesosia. Sitten se luokittelee nämä lohkot vaalipiiripuurakenteella lisäämällä rekursiivisesti syntaktista ja semanttista tietoa kuhunkin komponenttisolmuun. Tämä menetelmä ylittää OntoNotes 5.0:n nykytason automaattisesti luoduilla jäsennyksillä.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku využíváme jazykové struktury textů ke zlepšení rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit pomocí BRNN-CNN, speciální obousměrné rekurzivní sítě připojené konvoluční sítí. Motivováni pozorováním, že pojmenované entity jsou vysoce příbuzné s jazykovými složkami, navrhujeme BRNN-CNN založený na konstitucích pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit. Na rozdíl od klasických metod sekvenčního označování systém nejprve identifikuje, které kusy textu jsou možné pojmenovat entity podle toho, zda se jedná o jazykové složky. Poté klasifikuje tyto kusy se strukturou stromu voličů rekurzivním šířením syntaktických a sémantických informací do každého uzlu. Tato metoda překonává současný stav techniky na OntoNotes 5.0 s automaticky generovanými parsami.', 'jv': 'Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem anyar nggawe texti kanggo nyebutuhke Entire sing nambah saben nggo saben nggo saben nggo BENN-MT, netek sing dibenalke ireksi sing bebasan karo netek sing berarti. Awak dhéwé éntuk kelompok sing nganggo entis iki dadi wis luwih akeh gambar kelangan anyar nggawe, kéné supoyo barang kelangan-kowe barang nggawe barang kelangan BENN-MT kanggo nambah cilik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness UnknownMonitor vendor This method surpass current state-of-the-arts on OntNotify 5.0 with automatically generated parameters.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו משתמשים במבנות הלשוניים של טקסטים כדי לשפר את זיהוי היחידות בשם על ידי BRNN-CNN, רשת מיוחדת שתי כיוונים משתנה מחוברת לרשת משתנה. מוניטיבי על ידי התבוננות כי ישויות בשם קשורות מאוד לבחירות שפתיים, אנו מציעים BRNN-CNN מבוסס בבחירות לזהות ישויות בשם. בניגוד לשיטות תיקון רצפיות קלאסיות, המערכת מזהה קודם אילו חתיכות טקסט אפשריות נקראות על ידי אם הן רכיבות שפתיים. ואז הוא מסווג את החלקים האלה עם מבנה עץ מחוז הבחירות על ידי להפיץ מחדש מידע סינטקטי וסמנטי לכל קשר הבחיר. This method surpasses current state-of-the-art on OntoNotes 5.0 with automatically generated parses.', 'sk': 'V prispevku uporabljamo jezikovne strukture besedil za izboljšanje prepoznavanja imenovanih entitet s strani posebne dvosmerne rekurzivne mreže BRNN-CNN, ki je povezana s konvolucijsko mrežo. Na podlagi ugotovitve, da so imenovani entiteti zelo povezani z jezikovnimi sestavinami, predlagamo na osnovi komponent BRNN-CNN za priznavanje imenovanih entitet. V nasprotju s klasičnimi metodami zaporednega označevanja sistem najprej identificira, kateri deli besedila so možni imenovani entiteti glede na to, ali so jezikovni sestavini. Nato te kose razvrsti s strukturo drevesa volilnega okrožja tako, da rekurzivno širi sintaktične in semantične informacije na vsako sestavno vozlišče. Ta metoda presega trenutno najsodobnejše razčlenitve v sistemu OntoNotes 5.0 s samodejno ustvarjenimi razčlenitvami.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã yin amfani da linguistic tsarin littafan na rubutu dõmin a ƙarfafa sunan shaidar abubuwa da BRNN-CNN, wata shirin mataimaki na dabar-dabar da aka haɗa da wani jerin na ɗabi'a. Ana Motsar da tsarin da aka sune abubuwa masu da yawa ana yi husũma da cikin linguin, Munã buɗa wata BRNN-CNN da aka samu sunan sunan abun. Tsarin da shiryoyin alama na classical na daban, na'ura na gane shirin ayuka na matsayin a farkon, ko da za'a iya amfani da abun matsayi ko kuma, su zama masu cikin linguistic. Sa'an nan kuma, yana rarraba waɗannan kunnukan da aka samar da shi na gidan it ãce mai constitunci, kuma yana sanar da mutane zuwa duk node. @ action: button", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་BRNN-CNN་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བ་དང་མཐུད་སྐྱོང་བའི་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གིས་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་དབུགས་ཆ་ཚོ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་མཐུན་ཁང་དང་མཐུན་པོ་ཡོད། In contrast to classical sequential labeling methods, the system first identifies which text chunks are possible entities by whether they are linguistic constituents. Then it classifies these chunks with a constituency tree structure by recursively propagating syntactic and semantic information to each constituent node. This method surpasses the current state-of-the-art on OntoNotes 5.0 with automatically generated parses.'}
{'en': 'Fast and Accurate Entity Recognition with Iterated Dilated Convolutions', 'ar': 'التعرف السريع والدقيق على الكيانات مع التلافيف المتوسعة المتكررة', 'es': 'Reconocimiento de entidades rápido y preciso con circunvoluciones dilatadas iteradas', 'fr': "Reconnaissance d'entités rapide et précise avec circonvolutions dilatées itérées", 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de entidade rápido e preciso com convoluções dilatadas iteradas', 'ja': '反復拡張畳み込みによる高速かつ正確なエンティティ認識', 'hi': 'पुनरावर्ती विस्तारित Convolutions के साथ तेजी से और सटीक इकाई मान्यता', 'zh': '因迭代卷积成速确之实体', 'ru': 'Быстрое и точное распознавание сущностей с многократно расширенными конволюциями', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Aonán Tapa agus Cruinn le Convolutions Dilated Atriallta', 'ka': 'სწრაფად და წარმოადგილი ინტერტის განაცნობა განსხვავებული განსხვავებულებით', 'el': 'Γρήγορη και ακριβής αναγνώριση οντοτήτων με τις επαναλαμβανόμενες διευρυμένες καμπύλες', 'hu': 'Gyors és pontos szervezetek felismerése itterált hígított konvolúciókkal', 'it': 'Riconoscimento rapido e preciso delle entità con convezioni diluite iterate', 'kk': 'Тез және нақты нысандарды қайталанған кеңістіктермен анықтау', 'lt': 'Greitas ir tikslus subjekto pripažinimas pakartotinai ištirpintomis konvoliucijomis', 'mk': 'Брзо и прецизно препознавање на ентитетите со итирани дилацирани конволуции', 'ms': 'Fast and Accurate Entity Recognition with Iterated Dilated Convolutions', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിഭാഗങ്ങളുമായി വേഗത്തിലും എക്കൌണ്ടിറ്റി എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയ', 'mt': 'Rikonoxximent rapidu u preċiż ta’ Entità b’Konveoluzzjonijiet Dilati Iterati', 'mn': 'Хурдан, тодорхойлолтой бүтээгдэхүүн танилцуулах', 'no': 'Rask og nøyaktig gjenkjenning av eininga med gjentaande forstørrande konvolusjonar', 'sr': 'Brzo i precizno prepoznavanje entiteta sa iznenađenim dilovanim konvolucijama', 'pl': 'Szybkie i dokładne rozpoznawanie podmiotów dzięki zwrotnym rozszerzonym zwojom', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea rapidă și precisă a entităților cu conveluții diluate iterate', 'si': 'වේගය හා හරියට අන්තිම අන්තිම අඳුරගන්න', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada dhaqso iyo xisaabta ee wadanka la soo bandhigay', 'sv': 'Snabb och korrekt enhetsigenkänning med iterade utspädda konvulutioner', 'ta': 'வேகமாக மற்றும் கணக்கீட்டு உறுப்பிடப்பட்ட தொகுப்புகளுடன் கண்டறிதல்', 'ur': 'سرعت اور دقیق انٹیٹ کی پہچان دوبارہ پھیلائی کنوریوں کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thừa nhận một tập đoàn nhanh và chính xác', 'bg': 'Бързо и точно разпознаване на обекти с итерационни разширени конвелуции', 'da': 'Hurtig og nøjagtig virksomhedsgenkendelse med iterede fortyndede konvulutioner', 'de': 'Schnelle und genaue Entitätserkennung mit Iterated Dilated Convolutions', 'id': 'Pengenalan Entitas Cepat dan Tepat dengan Konvelusi Dilatasi Teriterasi', 'nl': 'Snelle en nauwkeurige entiteitsherkenning met Iterated Dilated Convolutions', 'fa': 'شناسایی واحد سریع و دقیق با مجموعه\u200cهای بازگشت', 'ko': '반복 확장 볼륨에 기반한 신속하고 정확한 실체 식별', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje brzog i preciznog subjekta s ponovljenim proširenim konvolucijama', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa Intaneti wa haraka na Hesabu na Miguvuko zilizotengwa', 'af': 'Vinnige en Accurate Entiteit Herkenning met Herverwerp Verspreidige Konvolusies', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Njohja e shpejtë dhe e saktë e njësisë me konvoluta të diluara të përsëritura', 'tr': 'Dyggat we Dyggat Aňlamak bilen Tezleşme', 'hy': 'Հիմա արագ և ճշգրիտ անհատականության ճանաչելը', 'az': 'H캼zl캼 v톛 Tam 칐l칞칲l칲 칐l칞칲l칲 칐l칞칲s칲', 'bn': 'Fast and Accurate Entity Recognition with Iterated Dilated Convolutions', 'cs': 'Rychlé a přesné rozpoznávání entit s iterovanými rozšířenými záhyby', 'ca': "Recognició ràpida i exacta d'entitats amb convolucions diluides iterats", 'et': 'Kiire ja täpne ettevõtte tunnustamine koos itereeritud lahjendatud konvolutsioonidega', 'fi': 'Nopea ja tarkka yksikkötunnistus iteroiduilla laimennetuilla konvoluatioilla', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje brzog i preciznog područja s ponovljenim dilovanim konvolucijama', 'jv': 'FullName', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Hitro in natančno prepoznavanje subjekta z iteriranimi razširjenimi konvolucijami', 'he': 'זיהוי איכות מהיר ומדויק עם שינויים מסודרים', 'bo': 'མགྱོག་དང་དྲག་པོར་སྟོན་མེད་པའི་སྒུལ་སྒྲིག་དང་མཚུངས་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Today when many practitioners run basic NLP on the entire web and large-volume traffic, faster methods are paramount to saving time and energy costs. Recent advances in GPU hardware have led to the emergence of bi-directional LSTMs as a standard method for obtaining per-token vector representations serving as input to labeling tasks such as NER (often followed by prediction in a linear-chain CRF). Though expressive and accurate, these models fail to fully exploit GPU parallelism, limiting their computational efficiency. This paper proposes a faster alternative to Bi-LSTMs for NER : Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), which have better capacity than traditional CNNs for large context and structured prediction. Unlike LSTMs whose sequential processing on sentences of length N requires O(N) time even in the face of parallelism, ID-CNNs permit fixed-depth convolutions to run in parallel across entire documents. We describe a distinct combination of network structure, parameter sharing and training procedures that enable dramatic 14-20x test-time speedups while retaining accuracy comparable to the Bi-LSTM-CRF. Moreover, ID-CNNs trained to aggregate context from the entire document are more accurate than Bi-LSTM-CRFs while attaining 8x faster test time speeds.', 'ar': 'اليوم ، عندما يقوم العديد من الممارسين بتشغيل أساسيات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية على الويب بالكامل وحركة المرور ذات الحجم الكبير ، فإن الأساليب الأسرع لها أهمية قصوى في توفير الوقت وتكاليف الطاقة. أدت التطورات الحديثة في أجهزة GPU إلى ظهور LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه كطريقة قياسية للحصول على تمثيلات متجهية لكل رمز تعمل كمدخلات لمهام وضع العلامات مثل NER (غالبًا ما يتبعها التنبؤ في CRF سلسلة خطية). على الرغم من أن هذه النماذج معبرة ودقيقة ، إلا أنها تفشل في استغلال توازي وحدة معالجة الرسومات بشكل كامل ، مما يحد من كفاءتها الحسابية. تقترح هذه الورقة بديلاً أسرع لـ Bi-LSTMs لـ NER: الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية المتكررة (ID-CNNs) ، والتي تتمتع بقدرة أفضل من شبكات CNN التقليدية للسياق الكبير والتنبؤ المنظم. على عكس LSTMs التي تتطلب معالجتها المتسلسلة على جمل بطول N وقت O (N) حتى في مواجهة التوازي ، تسمح ID-CNNs بالتلافيف ذات العمق الثابت للتشغيل بالتوازي عبر المستندات بأكملها. نحن نصف مجموعة مميزة من بنية الشبكة ومشاركة المعلمات وإجراءات التدريب التي تتيح تسريع وقت الاختبار بشكل كبير من 14 إلى 20 ضعفًا مع الحفاظ على دقة مماثلة لـ Bi-LSTM-CRF. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن ID-CNNs المدربة على تجميع السياق من المستند بأكمله أكثر دقة من Bi-LSTM-CRFs مع تحقيق سرعات وقت اختبار أسرع 8 مرات.', 'pt': 'Hoje, quando muitos praticantes executam a PNL básica em toda a web e tráfego de grande volume, métodos mais rápidos são fundamentais para economizar tempo e custos de energia. Avanços recentes no hardware de GPU levaram ao surgimento de LSTMs bidirecionais como um método padrão para obter representações vetoriais por token servindo como entrada para tarefas de rotulagem como NER (muitas vezes seguidas de previsão em um CRF de cadeia linear). Embora expressivos e precisos, esses modelos não exploram totalmente o paralelismo da GPU, limitando sua eficiência computacional. Este artigo propõe uma alternativa mais rápida aos Bi-LSTMs para NER: Redes Neurais Convolucionais Dilatadas Iteradas (ID-CNNs), que têm melhor capacidade que as CNNs tradicionais para grande contexto e previsão estruturada. Ao contrário dos LSTMs cujo processamento sequencial em sentenças de comprimento N requer tempo O(N) mesmo em face do paralelismo, os ID-CNNs permitem que convoluções de profundidade fixa sejam executadas em paralelo em documentos inteiros. Descrevemos uma combinação distinta de estrutura de rede, compartilhamento de parâmetros e procedimentos de treinamento que permitem acelerações dramáticas de tempo de teste de 14 a 20 vezes, mantendo a precisão comparável ao Bi-LSTM-CRF. Além disso, ID-CNNs treinados para agregar contexto de todo o documento são mais precisos do que Bi-LSTM-CRFs, ao mesmo tempo em que atingem velocidades de tempo de teste 8x mais rápidas.', 'es': 'Hoy en día, cuando muchos profesionales ejecutan la PNL básica en toda la web y el tráfico de gran volumen, los métodos más rápidos son fundamentales para ahorrar tiempo y costos de energía. Los avances recientes en el hardware de GPU han llevado a la aparición de LSTM bidireccionales como método estándar para obtener representaciones vectoriales por token que sirven como entrada para tareas de etiquetado como NER (a menudo seguidas de predicción en un CRF de cadena lineal). A pesar de ser expresivos y precisos, estos modelos no aprovechan al máximo el paralelismo de la GPU, lo que limita su eficiencia computacional. Este artículo propone una alternativa más rápida a los BI-LSTM para NER: las redes neuronales convolucionales dilatadas iteradas (ID-CNN), que tienen mejor capacidad que las CNN tradicionales para la predicción estructurada y de gran contexto. A diferencia de los LSTM cuyo procesamiento secuencial en oraciones de longitud N requiere O (N) tiempo incluso ante el paralelismo, las ID-CNN permiten que las convoluciones de profundidad fija se ejecuten en paralelo a través de documentos completos. Describimos una combinación distinta de estructura de red, intercambio de parámetros y procedimientos de capacitación que permiten acelerar drásticamente el tiempo de prueba de 14 a 20 veces y, al mismo tiempo, mantener una precisión comparable a la del BI-LSTM-CRF. Además, las ID-CNN capacitadas para agregar contexto de todo el documento son más precisas que las BI-LSTM-CRF, a la vez que alcanzan velocidades de tiempo de prueba 8 veces más rápidas.', 'fr': "Aujourd'hui, alors que de nombreux praticiens exécutent une PNL de base sur l'ensemble du Web et un trafic important, des méthodes plus rapides sont essentielles pour gagner du temps et économiser de l'énergie. Les récents progrès dans le matériel GPU ont conduit à l'émergence des LSTM bidirectionnels en tant que méthode standard pour obtenir des représentations vectorielles par jeton servant d'entrée à des tâches d'étiquetage telles que NER (souvent suivies d'une prédiction dans un CRF à chaîne linéaire). Bien qu'expressifs et précis, ces modèles ne parviennent pas à exploiter pleinement le parallélisme du processeur graphique, ce qui limite leur efficacité de calcul. Cet article propose une alternative plus rapide aux Bi-LSTM pour le NER\xa0: les réseaux neuronaux convolutionnels dilatés itérés (ID-CNN), qui ont une meilleure capacité que les CNN traditionnels pour la prédiction structurée et contextuelle étendue. Contrairement aux LSTM dont le traitement séquentiel sur des phrases de longueur N nécessite O (N) temps même en présence de parallélisme, les ID-CNN permettent aux convolutions à profondeur fixe de s'exécuter en parallèle sur des documents entiers. Nous décrivons une combinaison distincte de structure de réseau, de partage de paramètres et de procédures de formation qui permettent d'accélérer considérablement le temps de test de 14 à 20 fois tout en conservant une précision comparable à celle du Bi-LSTM-CRF. De plus, les ID-CNN formés pour agréger le contexte de l'ensemble du document sont plus précis que les CRF bi-LSTM-tout en atteignant des vitesses de test 8 fois plus rapides.", 'ja': '多くのプラクティショナーがウェブ全体で基本的なNLPを実行し、大量のトラフィックを処理する今日では、より高速な方法が時間とエネルギーコストを節約するために最も重要です。 ＧＰＵハードウェアの最近の進歩は、ＮＥＲなどのラベリングタスクへの入力として機能するトークンあたりのベクトル表現を取得するための標準的な方法としての双方向ＬＳＴＭの出現をもたらした（多くの場合、線形鎖ＣＲＦにおける予測が続く）。 表現的で正確であるが、これらのモデルはＧＰＵ並列性を完全に利用することができず、計算効率を制限する。 本論文では、大規模な文脈と構造化予測のための従来のCNNよりも優れた容量を有するNER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID - CNN)のためのBi - LSTMのより速い代替案を提案した。 LSTMの長さNの文の連続処理には、並列性に直面してもO (N)時間が必要であるのとは異なり、ID - CNNは、文書全体にわたって固定深度の畳み込みを並列に実行することができます。 Bi - LSTM - CRFに匹敵する精度を保持しながら、劇的な14 ～ 20倍のテスト時間のスピードアップを可能にするネットワーク構造、パラメータ共有、およびトレーニング手順の明確な組み合わせについて説明します。 さらに、ドキュメント全体からコンテキストを集約するようにトレーニングされたID - CNNは、8倍のテスト時間速度を達成しながら、Bi - LSTM - CRFよりも正確です。', 'zh': '今夫众从业者之网络,流行之NLP,更快之于节省时间,精力为重。 GPU硬件之最新进展致双向LSTM,以为每令牌向量之法,以为NER之输(常循线性CRF之占)。 虽有表现力准,未能尽用GPU并行,以限其数效率。 本文设NER双LSTM更代方案:迭代张卷积神经网络(ID-CNN),其比旧CNN有优容大上下文结构化占。 与 LSTM 不同,LSTM 以 N 句次第之,虽并行性时须 O(N) 时,而 ID-CNN 许常深卷积并行一文档中。 言网络结构、参数共训练程序,倍14-20而速,与Bi-LSTM-CRF相当也。 此外训练以合全文档上下文之 ID-CNN ,视 Bi-LSTM-CRF 为正,兼试时日增 8 倍之。', 'hi': 'आज जब कई चिकित्सक पूरे वेब और बड़ी मात्रा वाले ट्रैफ़िक पर बुनियादी एनएलपी चलाते हैं, तो समय और ऊर्जा लागत को बचाने के लिए तेज़ तरीके सर्वोपरि हैं। GPU हार्डवेयर में हाल की प्रगति ने एनईआर जैसे लेबलिंग कार्यों के लिए इनपुट के रूप में सेवारत प्रति-टोकन वेक्टर अभ्यावेदन प्राप्त करने के लिए एक मानक विधि के रूप में द्वि-दिशात्मक एलएसटीएम के उद्भव का नेतृत्व किया है (अक्सर रैखिक-श्रृंखला सीआरएफ में भविष्यवाणी के बाद)। हालांकि अभिव्यंजक और सटीक, ये मॉडल जीपीयू समांतरता का पूरी तरह से शोषण करने में विफल रहते हैं, उनकी कम्प्यूटेशनल दक्षता को सीमित करते हैं। यह पेपर एनईआर के लिए द्वि-एलएसटीएम के लिए एक तेज विकल्प का प्रस्ताव करता है: पुनरावृत्ति फैला हुआ कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (आईडी-सीएनएन), जिसमें बड़े संदर्भ और संरचित भविष्यवाणी के लिए पारंपरिक सीएनएन की तुलना में बेहतर क्षमता है। LSTMs के विपरीत जिनकी लंबाई N के वाक्यों पर अनुक्रमिक प्रसंस्करण के लिए समानांतरता के चेहरे में भी O (N) समय की आवश्यकता होती है, ID-CNN पूरे दस्तावेज़ों में समानांतर में चलने के लिए निश्चित-गहराई वाले convolutions की अनुमति देते हैं। हम नेटवर्क संरचना, पैरामीटर साझाकरण और प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रियाओं के एक अलग संयोजन का वर्णन करते हैं जो द्वि-एलएसटीएम-सीआरएफ के तुलनीय सटीकता को बनाए रखते हुए नाटकीय 14-20x परीक्षण-समय स्पीडअप को सक्षम करते हैं। इसके अलावा, पूरे दस्तावेज़ से संदर्भ को समग्र करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित आईडी-CNN 8x तेज परीक्षण समय गति प्राप्त करते हुए Bi-LSTM-CRFs की तुलना में अधिक सटीक हैं।', 'ru': 'Сегодня, когда многие практические работники запускают базовый NLP по всей сети и большому объему трафика, более быстрые методы имеют первостепенное значение для экономии времени и затрат на энергию. Недавние достижения в области аппаратного обеспечения графических процессоров привели к появлению двунаправленных LSTM в качестве стандартного метода для получения представлений каждого токена вектора, служащего в качестве входных данных для задач маркировки, таких как NER (часто с последующим прогнозированием в линейно-цепочечной ИРК). Несмотря на выразительность и точность, эти модели не в полной мере используют параллелизм графических процессоров, ограничивая их вычислительную эффективность. В этой статье предлагается более быстрая альтернатива Bi-LSTMs для NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), которые имеют лучшую способность, чем традиционные CNNs для большого контекста и структурированного прогнозирования. В отличие от LSTM, последовательная обработка которых по предложениям длиной N требует времени O(N) даже в условиях параллелизма, ID-CNN позволяют свертки фиксированной глубины работать параллельно по всем документам. Мы описываем четкую комбинацию сетевой структуры, обмена параметрами и процедур обучения, которые позволяют резко увеличить скорость испытания в 14-20 раз, сохраняя при этом точность, сопоставимую с Bi-LSTM-CRF. Кроме того, ID-CNN, обученные агрегированию контекста из всего документа, являются более точными, чем Bi-LSTM-CRF, при этом достигаются в 8 раз более высокие скорости времени тестирования.', 'ga': 'Sa lá atá inniu ann nuair a reáchtálann go leor cleachtóirí NLP bunúsach ar an ngréasán iomlán agus ar thrácht mórmhéid, tá modhanna níos tapúla ríthábhachtach chun costais ama agus fuinnimh a shábháil. Mar gheall ar dhul chun cinn le déanaí i crua-earraí GPU tháinig LSTManna déthreocha chun cinn mar mhodh caighdeánach chun léirithe veicteora in aghaidh an chomhartha a fháil a fheidhmíonn mar ionchur do thascanna lipéadaithe mar NER (go minic ina dhiaidh sin réamh-mheastachán i CRF slabhra líneach). Cé go bhfuil siad léiritheach agus cruinn, ní bhaineann na samhlacha seo leas iomlán as comhthreomhaireacht GPU, rud a chuireann srian lena n-éifeachtúlacht ríomhaireachtúil. Molann an páipéar seo rogha eile níos tapúla ar dhé-LSTManna do NER: Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite Dilated (ID-CNNanna), a bhfuil cumas níos fearr acu ná CNNanna traidisiúnta le haghaidh comhthéacs mór agus tuartha struchtúrtha. Murab ionann agus LSTManna a dteastaíonn am O(N) dá bpróiseáil seicheamhach ar phianbhreitheanna ar fad N fiú in aghaidh na comhthreomhaireachta, ceadaíonn ID-CNNanna convolutions doimhneacht sheasta a reáchtáil i gcomhthreo trasna doiciméad iomlán. Déanaimid cur síos ar mheascán sainiúil de struchtúr líonra, comhroinnt pharaiméadair agus nósanna imeachta oiliúna a chumasaíonn luasanna tástála ama drámatúla 14-20x agus ag an am céanna cruinneas atá inchomparáide leis an Bi-LSTM-CRF a choinneáil. Ina theannta sin, tá ID-CNNanna atá oilte chun comhthéacs a chomhiomlánú ón doiciméad iomlán níos cruinne ná Bi-LSTM-CRFanna agus iad ag baint amach luasanna ama tástála 8x níos tapúla.', 'hu': 'Napjainkban, amikor sok gyakorló alapvető NLP-t futtat az egész interneten és nagy mennyiségű forgalmat, a gyorsabb módszerek alapvetően fontosak az idő- és energiaköltségek megtakarításához. A GPU hardverek közelmúltbeli fejlődése vezetett a kétirányú LSTMs megjelenéséhez, mint a tokenenkénti vektorreprezentációk megszerzéséhez, amelyek bemenetként szolgálnak az olyan címkézési feladatokhoz, mint a NER (gyakran a lineáris láncú CRF előrejelzése követi). Bár kifejező és pontos, ezek a modellek nem tudják teljes mértékben kihasználni a GPU-párhuzamosságot, korlátozva számítási hatékonyságukat. Ez a tanulmány gyorsabb alternatívát javasol a NER-hez képest: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), amelyek jobb kapacitással rendelkeznek a hagyományos CNN-hez képest nagy kontextusban és strukturált előrejelzésben. Az LSTMekkel ellentétben, amelyek N hosszúságú mondatokon történő egymást követő feldolgozása a párhuzamossággal szemben O(N) időt igényel, az ID-CNN-ek lehetővé teszik, hogy a fix mélységű konvolíciók párhuzamosan futhassanak egész dokumentumokon. A hálózati struktúra, a paraméterek megosztása és a képzési eljárások különböző kombinációját írjuk le, amelyek lehetővé teszik a drámai 14-20x tesztidő gyorsulását, miközben a Bi-LSTM-CRF-hez hasonló pontosságot biztosítanak. Ezenkívül az azonosító-CNN-ek, akik a teljes dokumentumból összesítették a kontextust, pontosabbak, mint a Bi-LSTM-CRF-ek, miközben 8-szor gyorsabb tesztidőt érnek el.', 'el': 'Σήμερα, όταν πολλοί επαγγελματίες εκτελούν βασικό σε ολόκληρο το διαδίκτυο και μεγάλη κυκλοφορία, οι ταχύτερες μέθοδοι είναι υψίστης σημασίας για την εξοικονόμηση χρόνου και κόστους ενέργειας. Οι πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στο υλικό έχουν οδηγήσει στην εμφάνιση αμφίδρομης ως τυποποιημένης μεθόδου για την απόκτηση διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων ανά μάρκα που χρησιμεύουν ως εισαγωγή σε εργασίες επισήμανσης όπως η NER (συχνά ακολουθούμενη από πρόβλεψη σε μια γραμμική αλυσίδα CRF). Αν και εκφραστικά και ακριβή, αυτά τα μοντέλα αποτυγχάνουν να εκμεταλλευτούν πλήρως τον παραλληλισμό περιορίζοντας την υπολογιστική τους απόδοση. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια ταχύτερη εναλλακτική λύση στα δι-LSTMs για το ΝΕΡ: Διαρθωμένα Διεσταλμένα Νευρικά Δίκτυα (ID-CNN), τα οποία έχουν καλύτερη ικανότητα από τα παραδοσιακά για μεγάλο πλαίσιο και δομημένη πρόβλεψη. Σε αντίθεση με τα LSTMs των οποίων η διαδοχική επεξεργασία σε προτάσεις μήκους N απαιτεί χρόνο Ο(N) ακόμη και σε σχέση με τον παραλληλισμό, τα ID-CNN επιτρέπουν τη παράλληλη λειτουργία των διαστολών σταθερού βάθους σε ολόκληρα έγγραφα. Περιγράφουμε έναν ξεχωριστό συνδυασμό δομής δικτύου, διαμοιρασμού παραμέτρων και διαδικασιών κατάρτισης που επιτρέπουν δραματικές επιταχύνσεις χρόνου δοκιμής 14-20με παράλληλη διατήρηση της ακρίβειας συγκρίσιμης με το Bi-LSTM-CRF. Επιπλέον, τα ID-CNN εκπαιδευμένα για τη συγκέντρωση του πλαισίου από ολόκληρο το έγγραφο είναι πιο ακριβή από τα Bi-LSTM-CRF επιτυγχάνοντας 8x ταχύτερες χρονικές ταχύτητες δοκιμής.', 'ka': 'დღეს, როდესაც ბევრი პრაქტიკონტები უფრო სამყარო და დიდი სამყარო რპაქტიფიკაში NLP გავაკეთებენ, უფრო სწრაფად მეტივები უფრო ძალიან გასაკეთებელია მიმდინარე პროგრამეტრები GPU ჰაპეჯერში გავაკეთეთ ორგანრიგრამეტური LSTMs როგორც სტანდარტური პროგრამის მიღებაში, როგორც გავაკეთებული ვიქტორის განსახულებები, როგორც ჩატვირთვა, როგორც NER (ბევრი შემდეგ წ მაგრამ ექსპექსიური და წესიერი, ეს მოდელები არ შეუძლებელია ყველაფერად GPU პარალელეზმის გამოყენება, მათი კომპუტაციალური ეფექტიურობა დაზრ ეს დოკუნტი უფრო ბრძნელია ალტენტიფიკაცია, რომელიც უფრო ბრძნელია, რომელიც უფრო დიდ კონტექსტურაციის და სტრუქტურაციული წარმოდგენებისთვის. LSTMs-თან განსხვავებული, რომლებიც N სიგრძე სიგრძე სიტყვების განსხვავებაში O(N) დროს უნდა იყოს პარალელიზმისთვის, ID-CNNs უნდა განსხვავებული სიგრძე სიგრძე კონტულუციები, რომლებიც ყ ჩვენ ქსელის სტრუქტურის განსაკუთრებული კომბიუნცია, პარამეტრების გაყოფილი და განაკეთებული პროცესების განსაკუთრებული კომბიუნცია, რომლებიც ეპამატიკური 14-20x ტესტის სიმაღლეობის სიმაღლე დამატებით, ID-CNN მოსწავლილი ყველა დოკუმენტიდან კონტექსტის აგგგრებისთვის უფრო მარტივია, ვიდრე Bi-LSTM-CRFs, როცა 8x უფრო სიჩქარე ტესტის სიჩქარე მოიძ', 'it': "Oggi, quando molti professionisti eseguono PNL di base su tutto il web e traffico di grandi volumi, metodi più veloci sono fondamentali per risparmiare tempo e costi energetici. I recenti progressi nell'hardware GPU hanno portato all'emergere di LSTMs bidirezionali come metodo standard per ottenere rappresentazioni vettoriali per token che servono da input per attività di etichettatura come NER (spesso seguite dalla previsione in un CRF a catena lineare). Sebbene espressivi e accurati, questi modelli non riescono a sfruttare appieno il parallelismo GPU, limitando la loro efficienza computazionale. Questo articolo propone un'alternativa più veloce ai Bi-LSTM per NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), che hanno una capacità migliore rispetto alle CNN tradizionali per la previsione di grandi contesti e strutture. A differenza degli LSTMs la cui elaborazione sequenziale su frasi di lunghezza N richiede tempo O(N) anche di fronte al parallelismo, gli ID-CNN consentono di eseguire convoluzioni a profondità fissa in parallelo su interi documenti. Descriviamo una combinazione distinta di struttura di rete, condivisione di parametri e procedure di formazione che consentono drammatiche velocità 14-20x del tempo di prova mantenendo al contempo una precisione paragonabile al Bi-LSTM-CRF. Inoltre, le ID-CNN addestrate ad aggregare il contesto dall'intero documento sono più accurate rispetto alle Bi-LSTM-CRF e raggiungono velocità di prova 8 volte più elevate.", 'kk': 'Бүгін көп жұмыс істеушілер толық веб- тілінде негізгі NLP жұмыс істегенде, жылдам әдістері уақыт мен энергия бағаттарын сақтау үшін бастау үшін. Жуырдағы GPU жабдықтағы қосымшалар, NER секілді тапсырмаларды жарлыққа енгізу үшін бір токен векторының келтірімін алу стандартты әдісі ретінде, екі бағыттық LSTMs- терістеу үшін болды. Бұл үлгілер GPU параллелизмін толық қолдануға болмайды, есептеулерді шектеу үшін. Бұл қағаз NER үшін Bi- LSTMs үшін жылдам альтернативті таңдайды: Өзгертілген қатынастық невралдық желілер (ID- CNNs), олар үлкен контексті және құрылған таңдау үшін әдетті CNN бағдарламасынан артық көмектесед N ұзындығының кейінгі өзгерту керек LSTMs- терістерінен қатар, параллелизмдік бетінде O( N) уақыты керек, ID- CNN құжаттары барлық құжаттарда параллелизмді орындауға мүмкіндік береді. Біз желінің құрылымын, параметрлерді ортақтастыру және оқыту процедурлерін таңдаймыз. Бұл драматикалық 14- 20x сынақтар уақыт жылдамдығын Bi- LSTM- CRF- мен салыстыратын дұрыстығын сақтау кезінде салыстыратын же Құжаттан барлық контексті жинақтау үшін ID- CNN- лері 8x тез уақыт жылдамдығына жеткізгенде, Bi- LSTM- CRF- лерінен дұрыс.', 'lt': 'Šiandien, kai daugelis praktikuojančių specialistų vadovauja pagrindine NLP visame tinkle ir didelės apimties eismui, spartesni metodai yra labai svarbūs siekiant taupyti laiko ir energijos sąnaudų. Naujausi GPU techninės įrangos pažanga sukėlė dvikrypčius LSTM kaip standartinį metodą, skirtą kiekvieno ženklo vektoriaus atvaizdams gauti, kurie naudojami kaip įvestis į ženklinimo užduotis, pvz., NER (dažnai atliekama prognozė linijinėje grandinėje CRF). Though expressive and accurate, these models fail to fully exploit GPU parallelism, limiting their computational efficiency.  Šiame dokumente siūloma greitesnė alternatyva prie dviejų LSTM NER: pakartotiniai diliuojami konvoluciniai neurologiniai tinklai (ID-CNN), turintys geresnius pajėgumus nei tradiciniai CNN dideliam kontekstui ir struktūrizuotai prognozuoti. Priešingai nei LSTM, kurių nuoseklus N ilgio sakinių apdorojimas reikalauja O(N) laiko net paralelizmo atžvilgiu, ID-CNN leidžia, kad fiksuoto gilumo konvoliucijos vyktų lygiagrečiai visuose dokumentuose. Mes apibūdiname atskirą tinklo struktūros, parametrų pasidalijimo ir mokymo procedūrų derinį, kuris sudaro sąlygas dramatiškam 14–20 kartų bandymo laiko greičiui ir kartu išlaiko tikslumą, palyginamą su Bi-LSTM-CRF. Be to, iš viso dokumento parengti asmens tapatybės nustatymo CNN yra tikslesni nei dviejų LSTM-CRF, tuo pačiu metu užtikrinant 8 kartus greitesnį bandymo laiko greitį.', 'mk': 'Денес, кога многу практики водат основни НЛП на целиот веб и голем сообраќај, побрзите методи се најважни за заштедување на време и енергетски трошоци. Неодамнешните напредувања во хардверот на GPU доведоа до појава на двојно насоки LSTMs како стандарден метод за добивање на претставувања на векторите по знак кои служат како влог за означување на задачи како што е NER (честопати следени од предвидување во линијарен ланец CRF). Иако експресивни и прецизни, овие модели не успеваат целосно да го искористат паралелизмот на GPU, ограничувајќи ја нивната компјутациска ефикасност. This paper proposes a faster alternative to Bi-LSTMs for NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), which have better capacity than traditional CNNs for large context and structured prediction.  За разлика од ЛСТМ чие секвенцијално обработување на речениците од должина Н бара O( N) време дури и пред паралелизам, ID- CNN дозволуваат фиксна длабочина конволуции да се движат паралелно низ цели документи. Опишуваме различна комбинација на мрежна структура, споделување на параметри и процедури за обука кои овозможуваат драматични брзини од 14 до 20 пати за тест, при што ја задржуваме точноста во споредба со Би-LSTM-CRF. Покрај тоа, ИД-ЦНН обучени за агрегирање на контекстот од целиот документ се попрецизни од Би-ЛСТМ-ЦРФ, додека се постигнуваат 8 пати побрзи тестови на времето.', 'ms': 'Hari ini, ketika banyak praktek menjalankan NLP asas di seluruh web dan trafik volum besar, kaedah yang lebih cepat adalah penting untuk menghemat masa dan kos tenaga. Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam perkakasan GPU telah menyebabkan muncul LSTM bidireksi sebagai kaedah piawai untuk mendapatkan perwakilan vektor per-token yang berkhidmat sebagai input ke tugas label seperti NER (sering diikuti oleh ramalan dalam CRF rantai-linear). Meskipun ekspresif dan tepat, model ini gagal mengeksploitasi sepenuhnya paralelisme GPU, membatasi efisiensi pengiraan mereka. Kertas ini mencadangkan alternatif yang lebih cepat untuk Bi-LSTMs untuk NER: Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional Dilatasi Teriterasi (ID-CNN), yang mempunyai kapasitas yang lebih baik daripada CNN tradisional untuk konteks besar dan ramalan struktur. Tidak seperti LSTM yang proses sunyi pada kalimat panjang N memerlukan masa O(N) walaupun di hadapan paralelisme, ID-CNN membenarkan konvolusi kedalaman tertentu untuk berjalan selari di seluruh dokumen. Kami menggambarkan kombinasi yang berbeza dari struktur rangkaian, perkongsian parameter dan prosedur latihan yang membolehkan kelajuan ujian-masa dramatik 14-20x sementara menyimpan ketepatan yang boleh dibandingkan dengan Bi-LSTM-CRF. Lagipun, ID-CNN dilatih untuk kumpulkan konteks dari seluruh dokumen lebih tepat daripada Bi-LSTM-CRF semasa mencapai kelajuan masa ujian yang lebih cepat 8x.', 'ml': 'ഇന്ന് ഒരുപാട് പരിശീലകന്\u200dമാര്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d വെബ്ലിലും വലിയ വോള്\u200dവം ട്രാഫിക്കിലും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ NLP പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സമയവും ഊര്\u200dജ്ജി ജിപിയുവിലെ അടുത്തുള്ള മുന്നോട്ടുകള്\u200d നെആര്\u200d പോലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് ഒരു സാധാരണ രീതിയായി എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിനെ പുറത് Though expressive and accurate, these models fail to fully exploit GPU parallelism, limiting their computational efficiency.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നെആര്\u200dക്കുവേണ്ടി ബി-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിസിന്റെ വേഗത്തിലേക്കുള്ള മറ്റൊരു മാറ്റം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു: എല്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിസിന്റെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നീളം നീളമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സമയം വേണ്ടിയുള്ളത് പാരലിലാസിമിന്റെ മുന് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് കൂട്ടിക്കൂട്ടം, പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതും പരിശീലന പ്രക്രിയകളും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത് 14-20x ടെസ്റ്റ് സമയ അതുകൊണ്ടും 8x വേഗത്തില്\u200d പരീക്ഷ സമയ വേഗത്തില്\u200d എത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d രേഖയില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d ഐഡി- സിഎംഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200d പരിശീ', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр олон мэргэжилтнүүд бүх веб дээр үндсэн НЛП, том хэмжээний салбарт ажилладаг үед хурдан арга нь цаг, эрчим хүчний зардлыг хадгалах нь чухал. GPU төхөөрөмжийн саяхан хөгжлийн хөгжлийн давхар нь хоёр чиглэлт LSTMs-г стандарт арга болгож ирсэн юм. НЕР гэх мэт загваруудын оролцоог авах стандарт арга болсон. Энэ загварууд GPU параллелизмыг бүрэн ашиглаж, тооцоололтын үр дүнг хязгаарлаж чадахгүй. Энэ цаас NER-ийн Bi-LSTMs-ийн хувьд илүү хурдан альтернатив санал болгож байна: Дахин шингээгдсэн мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн (ID-CNNs), уламжлалтын CNNs-ээс илүү чадвартай байдаг. Н уртын өгүүлбэрийн дараагийн үйлдвэрлэлт нь O(N) хугацаа шаардлагатай LSTMs-тэй тэнцүү, ID-CNN нь баримт бүх бичил баримтууд дээр тогтмол гүн гүн гүнзгий хэмжээсүүдийг параллель хийх боломжтой болгодог. Бид сүлжээний бүтэц, параметр хуваалцах болон сургалтын процессүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Энэ нь Би-LSTM-CRF-тай харьцуулагдах зөвхөн 14-20x тест хугацааны хурдыг ашигладаг. Үүнээс гадна бүх баримтаас харьцуулахад сургалтын ID-CNN нь Bi-LSTM-CRF-с илүү зөв бөгөөд 8x хурдан туршилтын цаг хурдтай хүрэхэд багшилдаг.', 'no': 'I dag når mange praktiseringar køyrer grunnleggjande NLP på heile nett og stor volumstrafikk, er raskare metodar paramount for lagring av tid og energiskostnader. Nyleg utviklingane i GPU-maskinvaren har ført til at det oppstod på to retning av LSTMs som standardmetode for å få representasjonar for vektorar som kaller som inndata til merkelapp på oppgåver som NER (ofte følgjer etter foregåve i ein lineær kjede CRF). Selv om det er ekspresivt og nøyaktig, kan desse modelane ikkje fullstendig bruka GPU-parallelismen, avgrensa dataeffektiviteten. Denne papiret foreslår ein raskare alternativ for Bi-LSTMs for NER: Iteratert utvida konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk (ID-CNNs), som har bedre kapasitet enn tradisjonelle CNNs for stor kontekst og strukturert foregåve. I motsetjing til LSTMs som sekvensær prosessering på setningar med lengd N krev O( N) tid til og med ansikt av parallelisme, kan ID- CNN-konvolusjonar gjere at fiks dybde konvolusjonar skal køyrast parallelt over heile dokument. Vi beskriver ein spesifikk kombinasjon av nettverksstrukturen, delingsprosedyrar og treningsprosedyrar som aktiverer dramatiske 14- 20x test- tidspunkt medan det beholder nøyaktighet samanlikbar med Bi- LSTM- CRF. I tillegg er ID-CNNs trengte til å samla kontekst frå heile dokumentet meir nøyaktig enn Bi-LSTM-CRFs mens det gjer 8x raskare testhastighet.', 'pl': 'Dziś, kiedy wielu praktyków uruchamia podstawowe NLP w całej sieci internetowej i duży ruch ruchu, szybsze metody są kluczowe dla oszczędności czasu i kosztów energii. Ostatnie postępy w sprzęcie GPU doprowadziły do pojawienia się dwukierunkowych LSTMów jako standardowej metody uzyskiwania reprezentacji wektorowych na token służącej jako wejście do zadań etykietowania, takich jak NER (często następuje przewidywanie w liniowym CRF). Chociaż modele te są ekspresywne i dokładne, nie są w stanie w pełni wykorzystać równoległości GPU, ograniczając ich wydajność obliczeniową. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje szybszą alternatywę dla Bi-LSTMów dla NER: Iterated Rozszerzone Konwolucyjne Sieci Neuralne (ID-CNN), które mają większą pojemność niż tradycyjne CNN do dużego kontekstu i strukturalnej predykcji. W przeciwieństwie do LSTMów, których sekwencyjne przetwarzanie zdań o długości N wymaga czasu O(N) nawet w obliczu równoległości, ID-CNN pozwalają na równoległe przebieganie złączeń o stałej głębokości w całych dokumentach. Opisujemy wyraźne połączenie struktury sieci, współdzielenia parametrów i procedur szkoleniowych, które umożliwiają dramatyczne 14-20x przyspieszenie czasu testu przy zachowaniu dokładności porównywalnej z Bi-LSTM-CRF. Ponadto ID-CNN przeszkolone do agregowania kontekstu z całego dokumentu są dokładniejsze niż Bi-LSTM-CRF przy jednoczesnym osiąganiu 8x szybszych prędkości czasu testów.', 'ro': 'Astăzi, când mulți practicieni execută PNL de bază pe întregul web și trafic de volum mare, metodele mai rapide sunt esențiale pentru a economisi timp și costuri energetice. Avansurile recente în hardware GPU au dus la apariția LSTMs bidirecționale ca metodă standard pentru obținerea reprezentărilor vectoriale per-token care servesc ca intrare la sarcini de etichetare, cum ar fi NER (adesea urmată de predicție într-un CRF cu lanț liniar). Deși expresive și precise, aceste modele nu reușesc să exploateze complet paralelismul GPU, limitându-le eficiența computațională. Această lucrare propune o alternativă mai rapidă la Bi-LSTMs pentru NER: Rețelele Neurale Convoluționale Diluate Iterated (ID-CNN), care au o capacitate mai bună decât CNN tradiționale pentru context larg și predicție structurată. Spre deosebire de LSTMs a căror procesare secvențială pe propoziții de lungime N necesită timp O(N) chiar și în fața paralelismului, ID-CNN permit convoluțiilor cu adâncime fixă să ruleze în paralel pe documente întregi. Descriem o combinație distinctă de structura rețelei, partajarea parametrilor și procedurile de instruire care permit creșteri dramatice ale timpului de testare de 14-20x, păstrând în același timp precizie comparabilă cu Bi-LSTM-CRF. Mai mult decât atât, ID-CNN-urile instruite pentru a agrega contextul din întregul document sunt mai precise decât Bi-LSTM-CRF-urile, atingând în același timp viteze de testare de 8 ori mai mari.', 'sr': 'Danas, kada mnogi praktičari vode osnovnu NLP na cijelom internetu i velikom prometu, brže metode su najvažnije za spašavanje vremena i troškova energije. Nedavni napredak GPU hardver doveo je do otkrivanja dvosmjernih LSTMs kao standardnu metodu za dobivanje predstavljanja vektora po tokenu koji služe kao ulaz na etiketiranje takvih zadataka kao što je NER (često slijedi predviđenje u linearnom lancu CRF). Iako su ekspresivni i tačni, ovi modeli nisu potpuno iskoristili GPU parallelizam, ograničavajući njihovu računalnu efikasnost. Ovaj papir predlaže bržu alternativu bi-LSTMs za NER: Iteratirane dilovane konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (ID-CNNs), koje imaju bolju kapacitet od tradicionalnih CNNs za veliki kontekst i strukturirani predviđanje. Za razliku od LSTMs čije sekvencijalno obrađivanje rečenica dužine N zahteva vrijeme O(N) čak i u suštini parallelizma, ID-CNN dozvoljava fiksnim konvolucijama da se pokrene paralelno kroz sve dokumente. Opišemo različitu kombinaciju mrežne strukture, procedure podeljenja parametara i obuke koje omogućavaju dramatične brzine test a od 14-20x dok zadržavamo tačnost usporedno s Bi-LSTM-CRF-om. Osim toga, ID-CNN obučeni za okupljanje konteksta iz cijelog dokumenta su precizniji od Bi-LSTM-CRF-a dok postignu brže testne brzine od 8x.', 'so': 'Maanta marka shaqo-bixiyayaal badan ay ku sameeyaan gaadiidka aasaasiga ah ee NLP ee internetka oo dhan iyo gaadiidka aad u weyn, waa hababka dhaqso ah oo ay u soo bandhigaan in lagu badbaadiyo kharashka wakhtiga iyo energiga. Horumarinta qalabka ee GPU waxaa sababtay soo baxda qoraal-toos LSTMs oo ah qaab caadi ah oo ka heli karta qof-token-vector oo u adeegaya shaqooyin u eg NER (marar badan waxaa ku socda wax ku saabsan qori-liner CRF). In kastoo ay si saxda ah u muuqaneyso, modelladan ma dhamaan inay u isticmaalaan lambarka GPU, waxayna ku xadgudbayaan waxyaabahooda xisaabta. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa meel dhaqso ah oo u bedela Bi-LSTMs ee NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Network (ID-CNNs), kaas oo haysta awood ka fiican CNN’s traditional for large context and structured prediction. Ms. LSTMs whose ka baaraandegista xilliga dhererka N wuxuu u baahan yahay O(N) waqti xittaa uu u baahan yahay si lambarka ah, waxaa ruqsada aqoonsiga CNNNS inay u baaraandegaan dhibaatooyin aad u dheer si ay u siman u socoto dukumentiyada oo dhan. Waxaannu qoraynaa koox kala duduwan dhismaha shabakadda, kala qayb-dhigidda parameter iyo waxbarashada oo dhaqdhaqaaqi kara 14-20x wakhtiga tijaabada iyagoo sii haysta saxda u eg Bi-LSTM-CRF. Moreover, ID-CNNs trained to aggregate context from the entire document are more accurate than Bi-LSTM-CRFs while attaining 8x faster test time speeds.', 'sv': 'Idag när många utövare kör grundläggande NLP på hela webben och stor trafik, är snabbare metoder avgörande för att spara tid och energikostnader. De senaste framstegen inom GPU-hårdvara har lett till uppkomsten av dubbelriktade LSTMs som en standardmetod för att erhålla vektorrepresentationer per token som fungerar som input till märkningsuppgifter som NER (ofta följt av förutsägelse i en linjär kedja CRF). Även om dessa modeller är uttrycksfulla och korrekta kan de inte utnyttja GPU-parallellismen fullt ut, vilket begränsar deras beräkningseffektivitet. Denna uppsats föreslår ett snabbare alternativ till Bi-LSTM för NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), som har bättre kapacitet än traditionella CNN för stora kontexter och strukturerad förutsägelse. Till skillnad från LSTMs vars sekventiella behandling på meningar med längd N kräver O(N)-tid även inför parallellismen, tillåter ID-CNN:er fasta djupkonvulutioner att köras parallellt över hela dokument. Vi beskriver en distinkt kombination av nätverksstruktur, parameterdelning och utbildningsförfaranden som möjliggör dramatiska 14-20x testtidshastigheter samtidigt som noggrannheten bibehålls jämförbar med Bi-LSTM-CRF. Dessutom är ID-CNN utbildade för att aggregera sammanhang från hela dokumentet mer exakta än Bi-LSTM-CRF samtidigt som de uppnår åtta gånger snabbare testtidshastigheter.', 'si': 'අද ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයෝ මුළු වෙබ් එක්ක සහ ලොකු වෝල්යුම් වාර්තාවේ නිලධාරිය NLP ක්\u200dරියාපනය කරන්න, වේගයෙන් විද GPU හාර්ඩ්වර්ඩ් වලට අලුත් ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරධානය LSTMs වලට ප්\u200dරධාන වෙක්ටර් වලට ප්\u200dරධානයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලේබ්ලික් වලට ඇතුළ ඔවුන්ගේ පරිගණනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බැරි වුනා නමුත් මේ මොඩේල්ස් GPU සමාන්\u200dයයෙන්  මේ පත්තුවෙන් බී-LSTMs වෙනුවෙන් වේගයෙන් වෙනස් විකල්පයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා: ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විකල්ප ප්\u200dරයෝජනය (ID-CNNs), ඒක ලොකු සං LSTMs වගේ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් නැති වෙනුවෙන් N වාර්තාවේ වාර්තාවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් O(N) කාලය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන්, ID-CNNs සම්පූර්ණ වාර්තාවෙන් සි අපි ජාලය සංවිධානය, පැරැමිටර් සමාගම සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න සැකසුම් විශිෂ්ට පරීක්ෂණාව 14-20x පරීක්ෂණාව වේගයක් සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා Bi-LSTM-CRF ස ඉතින්, ID-CNNs සම්පූර්ණ දස්තාවෙන් සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන්, Bi-LSTM-CRFs වඩා 8x වේගයෙන් පරීක්', 'ta': 'இன்று பெரும்பாலான பயிற்சிகள் முழு இணைய மற்றும் பெரிய ஒலி போக்கும் அடிப்படையான NLP ஐ இயக்கும் போது, வேகமான முறைமைகள் நேரத்தை சமீபத்தில் GPU வன்பொருளில் முன்னேற்றம் பிதிசை LSTMs வெளியேறும் ஒரு நிலையான முறை தெளிவான மற்றும் சரியாக இருந்தாலும், இந்த மாதிரிகள் ஜிபியு இணைப்பை முழுமையாக பயன்படுத்த முடியாது, அவற்றின் கணக்கீட் இந்த தாள் பி_- LSTMs க்கான வேகமான விரைவான மாற்றுதலை அளிக்கிறது: பெரிய சூழல் மற்றும் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமையான புத்தகத்தின் பிரிவுகளுக்கு மேலும்  Unlike LSTMs whose sequential processing on sentences of length N requires O(N) time even in the face of parallelism, ID-CNNs permit fixed-depth convolutions to run in parallel across entire documents.  நாம் ஒரு வேறு பிணையத்தின் அமைப்பு, அளபுரு பகிர்ந்து மற்றும் பயிற்சி செயல்பாடுகளை விவரிக்கிறோம். இது விரைவான 14- 20x சோதனை நேரத்தின் வேகத்தை செயல்படுத் மேலும், 8x வேகமான சோதனை நேரத்தின் வேகத்தை அடையும் போது முழு ஆவணத்திலிருந்தும் குறிப்பிட பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட அடையாளம்- CNNs.', 'ur': 'آج جبکہ بہت سے کارگردان تمام ویب اور بڑی آواز ترافیکس پر بنیادی NLP چلتے ہیں، بہت تیز طریقے ہیں زمانہ اور انرژی کے قیمت نجات کے لئے۔ جی پی یو ہرڈیٹر میں اخیر اضافہ دوسری دقیق LSTMs کی اضطراری کے لئے ایک استاندارڈ طریقہ بنا رہے ہیں کہ ایک ٹوکنے ویکتور روشنی حاصل کریں جو نیر کی طرح لابلیٹ کریں (بہت سی طرح ایک لینیر زنجیر CRF میں پیش بینی کریں). اگرچہ صریح اور دقیق ہے، یہ موڈل GPU parallelism کو کامل مفید کرنے کے لئے کامل ناکام ہوتے ہیں، ان کی کمپیوٹریشن فعالیت کو محدود کرتے ہیں. This paper proposes a faster alternative to bi-LSTMs for NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), which has better capacity than traditional CNNs for large context and structured prediction. LSTMs کے مطابق جن کی تعریف N کے لہروں پر O(N) وقت کی ضرورت ہے حتی parallelism کے چہروں میں، ID-CNNs ایک مضبوط depth convolutions اجازت دیتے ہیں کہ تمام سنکوں میں ایک دوسرے سے چل سکیں. ہم نے نیٹ ورک ساختار، پارامیٹ شریک اور ترینس پردازشیوں کی ایک مختلف ترکیب کی تعریف کرتی ہے جو ڈرامیٹ 14-20x امتحان وقت کی سرعتوں کو فعال کرتی ہیں جب کہ BILSTM-CRF کے مطابق دقیق حفظ کرتی ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ID-CNN کی تعلیم پورے ڈکومکینٹ سے کنٹنس جمع کرنے کے لئے آئی ہے، آئی-LSTM-CRFs سے زیادہ دقیق ہیں جب 8x تیز تست ٹیمٹ کی سرعت پہنچ جاتی ہے۔', 'mt': 'Illum, meta ħafna prattikanti jmexxu NLP bażiku fuq l-internet kollu u traffiku b’volum kbir, metodi aktar mgħaġġla huma essenzjali għall-iffrankar tal-ħin u l-ispejjeż tal-enerġija. Recent advances in GPU hardware have led to the emergence of bi-directional LSTMs as a standard method for obtaining per-token vector representations serving as input to labeling tasks such as NER (often followed by prediction in a linear-chain CRF).  Though expressive and accurate, these models fail to fully exploit GPU parallelism, limiting their computational efficiency.  This paper proposes a faster alternative to Bi-LSTMs for NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), which have better capacity than traditional CNNs for large context and structured prediction.  Għall-kuntrarju tal-LSTMs li l-ipproċessar sekwenzjali tagħhom fuq sentenzi ta’ tul N jeħtieġ ħin O(N) anki fil-konfront tal-paralleliżmu, id-ID-CNNs jippermettu konvoluzzjonijiet ta’ fond fiss li jaħdmu b’mod parallel madwar dokumenti sħaħ. Aħna niddeskrivu kombinazzjoni distinta ta’ struttura tan-netwerk, kondiviżjoni tal-parametri u proċeduri ta’ taħriġ li jippermettu veloċitajiet drammatiċi ta’ bejn 14 u 20 darba għall-ħin tat-test filwaqt li nżammu preċiżjoni komparabbli mal-Bi-LSTM-CRF. Barra minn hekk, l-ID-CNNs imħarrġa biex jaggregaw il-kuntest mid-dokument kollu huma aktar preċiżi mill-Bi-LSTM-CRFs filwaqt li jilħqu veloċitajiet ta’ ħin tat-test 8x aktar mgħaġġla.', 'uz': "Today when many practitioners run basic NLP on the entire web and large-volume traffic, faster methods are paramount to saving time and energy costs.  @ info Bu modellar GPU parallelisiyasini butunlay ishlatib boʻlmaydi, bu kompyuterning ijodkorligini chegara qilish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi. Bu qogʻoz NER uchun Bi-LSTMs (Bi-LSTMs) uchun tez o'zgartirib boshqa parametrlarini tahrirlaydi: Tahrirlangan tarmoq tarmoqlari (ID-CNNs), katta taʼminlovchi va tuzuvlagan kutilgan tarkibdan juda yaxshi darajada CNN'ning taʼminotlaridan foydalanishi mumkin. Name Bi-LSTM-CRF bilan bog'liq bo'lgan tarmoq structuriyasi, parametr boʻlishi va taʼminlov vazifalarini tahrirlash imkoniyatlarini tahlil qilamiz. Koʻrsatgich, butun hujjatdan qisqarish uchun ID-CNN'lar 8x soni tez tekshirish vaqt tezligini bajarayotganda Bi-LSTM-CRF'dan ham yaxshi to ʻgʻri.", 'vi': 'Ngày nay, khi nhiều người thực hành một lập trình ngôn ngữ cơ bản trên to àn bộ mạng và lượng lớn giao thông, các phương pháp nhanh hơn là tiên quyết để tiết kiệm thời gian và chi phí năng lượng. Những tiến bộ gần đây trong phần cứng GPU đã dẫn đến sự xuất hiện của LSD hai hướng như một phương pháp tiêu chuẩn để lấy được các bi ểu đồ vector phục vụ nhập vào các công việc đánh dấu kiểu NER (thường theo dự đoán trong một CRF chuỗi tuyến tính). Mặc dù biểu lộ và chính xác, các mô hình này không thể hoàn to àn sử dụng sự đồng loạt GPU, giới hạn hiệu quả tính toán. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một thay thế nhanh hơn cho tổ chức Bi-LSTMs cho NER: Các mạng lưới thần kinh có liên kết nhiều giá trị (lD-CNN) có khả năng cao hơn các đài CNN truyền thống cho bối cảnh lớn và dự đoán cấu trúc. Không giống với LSTMs mà xử lý theo tần số các câu dài N đòi hỏi thời gian O(N) ngay cả khi phải đối mặt với sự đồng song song song, lD-CNN cho phép các xoắn gọn cố định được luân chuyển song song trong suốt các tài liệu. Chúng tôi mô tả một sự kết hợp khác nhau cấu trúc mạng, chia sẻ các tham số và thủ tục đào tạo, cho phép tăng tốc độ thử nghiệm quá lớn, trong khi giữ độ chính xác tương đương với Bic-LSTM-CRF. Hơn nữa, ID-CNN được huấn luyện để tổng hợp nội dung từ to àn bộ tài liệu còn chính xác hơn cả giá trị CRF Bi-LSTM-CRF trong khi chạy tốc độ thời gian thử 8x nhanh hơn.', 'bg': 'Днес, когато много практикуващи работят с основна НЛО в цялата интернет мрежа и голям трафик, по-бързите методи са от първостепенно значение за спестяване на време и разходи за енергия. Неотдавнашният напредък в хардуера на GPU доведе до появата на двупосочни ЛСТМ като стандартен метод за получаване на векторни изображения на всеки токен, служещи като вход за задачи за етикетиране като NER (често последвано от прогнозиране в линейна верига CRF). Макар и изразителни и точни, тези модели не успяват напълно да експлоатират паралелизма на GPU, ограничавайки тяхната изчислителна ефективност. Тази статия предлага по-бърза алтернатива на Би-ЛСТМ за НЕР: Итерирани разширени конволюционни невронни мрежи (ИД-CNN), които имат по-добър капацитет от традиционните CNN за голям контекст и структурирано прогнозиране. За разлика от LSTMs, чиято последователна обработка на изречения с дължина N изисква време О(N) дори в лицето на паралелизъм, ID-CNN позволяват конволюциите с фиксирана дълбочина да се изпълняват паралелно в цели документи. Описваме специфична комбинация от мрежова структура, обмен на параметри и процедури за обучение, които позволяват драматични 14-20 пъти ускорения при тестване, като същевременно запазват точност, сравнима с Би-ЛСТМ-КРФ. Освен това, обучените за обобщаване на контекста от целия документ са по-точни от Би-ЛСТМ-КРФ, като същевременно постигат 8 пъти по-бързи скорости на изпитване.', 'da': "I dag, når mange praktikere kører grundlæggende NLP på hele internettet og stor trafik, er hurtigere metoder altafgørende for at spare tid og energiomkostninger. Nylige fremskridt inden for GPU hardware har ført til fremkomsten af tovejede LSTMs som en standardmetode til at opnå vektorrepræsentationer pr. token, der tjener som input til mærkningsopgaver som NER (ofte efterfulgt af forudsigelse i en lineær kæde CRF). Selvom disse modeller er udtryksfulde og præcise, kan de ikke udnytte GPU parallelismen fuldt ud, hvilket begrænser deres beregningseffektivitet. Denne artikel foreslår et hurtigere alternativ til Bi-LSTMs for NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), som har bedre kapacitet end traditionelle CNN'er til stor kontekst og struktureret forudsigelse. I modsætning til LSTMs, hvis sekventielle behandling på sætninger af længde N kræver O(N)-tid selv i lyset af parallelisme, tillader ID-CNN'er faste dybdekonvolutioner at køre parallelt på tværs af hele dokumenter. Vi beskriver en særskilt kombination af netværksstruktur, parameterdeling og træningsprocedurer, der muliggør dramatiske 14-20x testtidshastigheder, samtidig med at nøjagtigheden bevares sammenlignelig med Bi-LSTM-CRF. Desuden er ID-CNN'er, der er uddannet til at samle kontekst fra hele dokumentet, mere nøjagtige end Bi-LSTM-CRF'er, samtidig med at de opnår 8x hurtigere testtidshastigheder.", 'nl': "Tegenwoordig, wanneer veel beoefenaars standaard NLP uitvoeren op het hele web en grote volumes verkeer, zijn snellere methoden van het grootste belang om tijd en energiekosten te besparen. Recente vooruitgang in GPU hardware heeft geleid tot de opkomst van bi-directionele LSTMs als een standaardmethode voor het verkrijgen van vectorrepresentaties per token die dienen als input voor labeltaken zoals NER (vaak gevolgd door voorspelling in een lineaire keten CRF). Hoewel expressief en nauwkeurig, kunnen deze modellen niet volledig gebruikmaken van GPU-parallellisme, waardoor hun rekenefficiëntie wordt beperkt. Dit document stelt een sneller alternatief voor Bi-LSTMs voor NER voor: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN's), die een betere capaciteit hebben dan traditionele CNN's voor grote context en gestructureerde voorspelling. In tegenstelling tot LSTMs waarvan de opeenvolgende verwerking op zinnen van lengte N O(N) tijd vereist, zelfs in het licht van parallelisme, staan ID-CNN's toe dat convoluties met vaste diepte parallel lopen over hele documenten. We beschrijven een duidelijke combinatie van netwerkstructuur, parameterdeling en trainingsprocedures die dramatische 14-20x testtijd versnellen met behoud van nauwkeurigheid vergelijkbaar met de Bi-LSTM-CRF. Bovendien zijn ID-CNN's die getraind zijn om context uit het hele document te aggregeren nauwkeuriger dan Bi-LSTM-CRF's terwijl ze 8x snellere testtijdsnelheden bereiken.", 'hr': 'Danas, kada mnogi praktičari vode osnovne NLP na cijelom internetu i velikom prometu, brže metode su najvažnije za spašavanje vremena i troškova energije. Nedavni napredak u GPU hardware doveo je do otvaranja dvosmjernih LSTMs-a kao standardnu metodu za dobivanje reprezentacija vektora po tokenu koji služe kao ulaz do označavanja zadataka poput NER (često slijedi predviđanja u linearnom lancu CRF). Iako su izraziti i precizni, ovi modeli ne mogu potpuno iskoristiti GPU parallelizm, ograničavajući računalnu učinkovitost. Ovaj papir predlaže bržu alternativu bi-LSTMs za NER: Iteratirane dilirane konvolucionalne neurone mreže (ID-CNNs), koje imaju bolju kapacitet od tradicionalnih CNN-a za veliki kontekst i strukturirane predviđanje. Za razliku od LSTMs čije sekvencijalno obrađivanje rečenica dužine N zahtijeva vrijeme O(N) čak i u suočavanju parallelizma, ID-CNN omogućava fiksnu dubinu konvolucije da se provode paralelno u svim dokumentima. Opišemo različitu kombinaciju mrežne strukture, postupke dijeljenja parametara i obuke koje omogućavaju dramatične brzine ispitivanja 14-20x tijekom održavanja to čnosti usporednog s Bi-LSTM-CRF-om. Osim toga, ID-CNNs obučeni za okupljanje konteksta iz cijelog dokumenta su precizniji od Bi-LSTM-CRFs dok postignu brže vrijeme ispitivanja 8x.', 'de': 'Heute, da viele Praktiker grundlegende NLP im gesamten Web und großen Datenverkehr betreiben, sind schnellere Methoden von größter Bedeutung, um Zeit und Energiekosten zu sparen. Neuere Fortschritte in der GPU-Hardware haben dazu geführt, dass bidirektionale LSTMs als Standardmethode zur Gewinnung von Pro-Token-Vektor-Darstellungen als Eingabe für Beschriftungsaufgaben wie NER (oft gefolgt von Vorhersage in einem linearen CRF) auftauchen. Obwohl ausdrucksstark und präzise, können diese Modelle die GPU-Parallelität nicht vollständig ausnutzen, was ihre Recheneffizienz einschränkt. Dieses Papier schlägt eine schnellere Alternative zu Bi-LSTMs für NER vor: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), die eine bessere Kapazität als herkömmliche CNNs für große Kontexte und strukturierte Vorhersagen haben. Im Gegensatz zu LSTMs, deren sequenzielle Verarbeitung von Sätzen der Länge N selbst bei Parallelität O(N)-Zeit erfordert, ermöglichen ID-CNNs eine parallele Ausführung von Faltungen mit fester Tiefe über ganze Dokumente. Wir beschreiben eine ausgeprägte Kombination aus Netzwerkstruktur, Parameterfreigabe und Trainingsverfahren, die dramatische 14-20fache Testzeitbeschleunigungen ermöglichen und dabei die Genauigkeit, die mit dem Bi-LSTM-CRF vergleichbar ist, beibehalten. Darüber hinaus sind ID-CNNs, die darauf trainiert sind, Kontext aus dem gesamten Dokument zu aggregieren, genauer als Bi-LSTM-CRFs und erreichen 8x schnellere Testzeiten.', 'fa': 'امروز وقتی بسیاری از تمرین\u200cکنندگان NLP بنیادی در کل وب و ترافیک زیادی را اجرا می\u200cکنند، روش\u200cهای سریع\u200cتر برای ذخیره زمان و هزینه\u200cهای انرژی مهم است. پیشرفتهای اخیر در hardware GPU به عنوان روش استاندارد LSTMs به عنوان یک روش استاندارد برای گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای واکتور\u200cهای تکن که به عنوان ورودی به کار\u200cهای برچسب مانند NER (اغلب از پیش\u200cبینی در یک زنجیر خطی CRF) رخ داده می\u200cشود. اگرچه مثبت و دقیق باشد، این مدل\u200cها کاملاً از پارالیلیسم GPU استفاده نمی\u200cکنند، و موثبت محاسبه\u200cی محاسبات آنها محدود می\u200cکنند. این کاغذ پیشنهاد سریع ترین جایگزینی برای دو-LSTMs برای NER: شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معمولی (ID-CNNs) که توانایی بهتر از CNN سنتی برای محیط بزرگ و پیش\u200cبینی ساخته شده است. مخالفت از LSTMs که در مجموعه\u200cهای طول N به مدت O(N) نیاز دارند، حتی در صورت parallelism ی، ID-CNN اجازه می\u200cدهند جمع\u200cآوری عمیق ثابت در طول کل سند\u200cها به همراه اجازه دهند. ما یک ترکیب متفاوتی از ساختار شبکه، پردازش\u200cهای تقسیم و آموزش پارامتر را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که در طول نگه داشتن دقیقات قابل مقایسه با Bi-LSTM-CRF فعال می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، ID-CNN آموزش داده شده تا محیط جمع کردن از کل سند دقیق تر از Bi-LSTM-CRF در حالی که سرعت زمان آزمایش 8x سریع تر است.', 'id': 'Today when many practitioners run basic NLP on the entire web and large-volume traffic, faster methods are paramount to saving time and energy costs.  Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam perangkat keras GPU telah menyebabkan muncul LSTM bidireksi sebagai metode standar untuk mendapatkan perwakilan vektor per token yang layak sebagai input ke tugas label seperti NER (sering diikuti oleh prediksi dalam rantai linear CRF). Meskipun ekspresif dan akurat, model ini gagal mengeksploitasi sepenuhnya paralelisme GPU, membatasi efisiensi komputasi mereka. Kertas ini mengusulkan alternatif yang lebih cepat untuk Bi-LSTMs untuk NER: Jaringan Neural Konvelusional Dilatasi Teriterasi (ID-CNN), yang memiliki kapasitas yang lebih baik dari CNN tradisional untuk konteks besar dan prediksi strukturasi. Tidak seperti LSTM yang proses sekuensial pada kalimat panjang N memerlukan O(N) waktu bahkan di hadapan paralelisme, ID-CNN membolehkan konvolusi kedalaman tetap berjalan secara paralel di seluruh dokumen. Kami menggambarkan kombinasi yang berbeda dari struktur jaringan, berbagi parameter dan prosedur latihan yang memungkinkan dramatis 14-20x Speed-Time tes sementara memelihara akurasi yang dapat dibandingkan dengan Bi-LSTM-CRF. Selain itu, ID-CNN dilatih untuk menggabungkan konteks dari seluruh dokumen lebih akurat daripada Bi-LSTM-CRF sementara mencapai kecepatan tes waktu 8x lebih cepat.', 'sw': 'Leo watumiaji wengi wanaendesha mfumo wa NLP kwenye usafiri wa mtandaoni kote na ujazo mkubwa wa volume, mbinu za haraka zinaweza kuokoa gharama za muda na nishati. Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika vifaa vya GPU yamesababisha kuondolewa kwa LSTMs kama njia ya kawaida ya kupata uwakilishi wa vector kwa kila ishara inayotumika kama input kwa ajili ya kutambua kazi kama vile NER (mara nyingi imefuatwa na utabiri katika mfumo wa msingi wa CRF). Pamoja na kuwa na ufanisi na sahihi, mifano hii imeshindwa kabisa kutumia usambazaji wa GPU, kwa kuzuia ufanisi wao wa hisabati. Gazeti hili linapendekeza mabadiliko ya haraka zaidi ya Bi-LSTMs kwa ajili ya NERE: Mtandao wa Tamko zilizotengwa na Ujadala (CNNNs), ambao una uwezo bora zaidi kuliko CNN za kitamaduni kwa mazingira makubwa na utabiri wa ujenzi. Tofauti na Ms. LST ambaye upasuaji wa mfululizo wa hukumu za mrefu N inahitaji muda wa O(N) hata akikabiliwa na ubaguzi, utaratibu wa ID-CNNN huruhusu matatizo ya kina ya kina kwa kiasi kikubwa kuendelea kwenye nyaraka zote. Tunaelezea muunganiko tofauti wa muundo wa mtandao, usambazaji wa parameter na mbinu za mafunzo zinazowezesha kuongezeka kwa muda wa majaribio 14-20x wakati wa kuendelea uhakika uliofanana na Bi-LSTM-CRF. Zaidi ya hayo, raia wa CNNN walifundishwa kuongeza muktadha kutoka kwenye nyaraka zote ni sahihi zaidi ya Bi-LSTM-CRFs wakati wa kufikia kiwango cha haraka cha jaribio 8x.', 'ko': '오늘날 많은 종사자들이 전체 네트워크와 대량의 데이터 흐름에서 기본 NLP를 운행할 때, 더욱 빠른 방법은 시간과 에너지 원가를 절약하는 데 매우 중요하다.GPU 하드웨어의 최신 진전은 양방향 LSTM의 출현을 초래했다. 이것은 모든 표기 벡터의 표시를 얻는 표준적인 방법으로 표기 작업(예를 들어 NER)의 입력(예를 들어 온라인 체인 CRF에서 예측)으로 사용된다.이 모델들은 표현력이 강하고 정확하지만 GPU 병행성을 충분히 활용하지 못해 계산 효율을 제한한다.본고는 Bi-LSTM보다 빠른 NER 대체 방법을 제시했다. 즉, 권적신경망(ID-CNN)을 교체적으로 확장하는 것이다. 이것은 전통적인 CNN보다 더 좋은 배경과 구조화 예측 능력을 가진다.LSTM과 달리 ID CNN은 고정된 깊이의 볼륨을 전체 문서에서 병렬로 실행할 수 있도록 하고 LSTM은 N 길이의 문장을 순서대로 처리하는 데 O(N)시간이 걸린다.우리는 독특한 네트워크 구조, 파라미터 공유와 교육 프로그램의 조합을 묘사하여 테스트 시간을 14~20배 높인 동시에 Bi LSTM CRF와 상당한 정확성을 유지하였다.또한 교육 과정을 통해 전체 문서에서 컨텍스트의 ID CNN이 Bi LSTM CRF보다 정확하고 테스트 시간이 8배 빠릅니다.', 'tr': "Bu gün, bir näçe praktikantlar bütin web we uly adam trafiýasynda esasy NLP ýöretýän wagtyny we enerji bahalaryny goramak üçin has gaty döredýärler. Ýakynda GPU donanımlardaki gelişmeler, NER gibi işleri etiketlemek üçin bir token vektör tarafından alınan iki yönde LSTMsler döredilmesine sebep oldular (köplenç linear-zincir CRF'de gelen tahmin edilen yönde). Adatça we dogry bir şekilde bu modeller GPU parallelizmini tamamlamak başarısız, hesap etkinliğini azaltmak. Bu kagyz NER üçin Bi-LSTMs üçin çalt bir alternatiw teklip edýär: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), iň uly kontekst we strukturly öňünden köp ukyplary bar. N sözleriň ardınca işleýän LSTMsleriň ýaly parallelizm bilen hem O(N) wagty gerek, diýip-de ID-CNN senediň ähli senediň arasynda sabit derinlik konvolusiýalary mümkin edýär Biz şebek strukturynyň a ýratyn bir birleşigini, paramatlary paylaşdyrma we eğitim prosellerini tanaýarýarys. Bu 2-20x testi wagtlaryň dogrylygyny Bi-LSTM-CRF bilen karşılaşýan ýagdaýynda mümkin edýär. Hemmäpli, tüm senediň habaryny toplamak üçin ID-CNN ködlemeleri 8x çalt synagda wagtyň hızlygyna ýeterrken Bi-LSTM-CRF'den has dogry.", 'hy': 'Այսօր, երբ շատ մասնագետներ կառավարում են հիմնական ՆԼՊ-ը ամբողջ ցանցում և մեծ ծավալի տրաֆիկում, ավելի արագ մեթոդները կարևոր են ժամանակ և էներգիայի ծախսերի խնայելու համար: GPU-ի սարքավորումների վերջին զարգացումները հանգեցրել են երկուղղային LSMT-ների առաջացմանը, որպես ստանդարտ մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստանանք յուրաքանչյուր վիկտոր ներկայացումներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են որպես ներմուծք, օրինակ ՆԵՌ-ը (հաճախ հետևում են գծային շղթային ԿՌՖ-ի Չնայած դրանք արտահայտության և ճշգրիտ են, այս մոդելները չեն կարողանում լիովին օգտագործել GPU-ի համեմատականությունը, սահմանափակում են նրանց հաշվարկների արդյունավետությունը: Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է ավելի արագ այլընտրանք ԲիԼՍԹՄ-ներին ՆԵՌ-ի համար՝ կրկնվող հակառակցված նեյրոնային ցանցերի (ID-CNN), որոնք ավելի լավ ունակություններ ունեն քան ավանդական CNN-ները մեծ կոնտեքստի և կառուցվածքային կանխատեսման համար: Ի տարբերություն LSMT-ներին, որոնց N երկարության նախադասությունների հաջորդական վերլուծումը պահանջում է O(N) ժամանակ նույնիսկ զուգահեռության դեմ, ID-CNN-ները թույլ են տալիս, որ կենտրոնական խորությունները զուգահեռ գործեն ամբողջ փաստաթղթերում: Մենք նկարագրում ենք ցանցի կառուցվածքի, պարամետրերի կիսման և ուսուցման գործընթացների առանձնահատուկ համակցությունը, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս 14-20 անգամ փորձարկումների ժամանակի արագություններ, մինչդեռ պահպանում է ճշգրտությունը, որը համեմատուկ է Երբ Ավելին, ID-CNN-ները, ովքեր պատրաստված են ամբողջ փաստաթղթից համախմբել կոնտեքստը, ավելի ճշգրիտ են, քան երկու LSMT-ԿՌՖ-ները, մինչդեռ 8 անգամ ավելի արագ փորձարկումների արագություններ են հասնում:', 'sq': 'Sot kur shumë praktikantë drejtojnë NLP bazë në të gjithë rrjetin dhe trafikun me volum të madh, metodat më të shpejtë janë kryesore për kursimin e kohës dhe kostot e energjisë. Përparimet e fundit në hardware GPU kanë çuar në shfaqjen e LSTMs dy-drejtuese si një metodë standarte për marrjen e përfaqësimeve të vektorëve për një token që shërbejnë si hyrje në etiketën e detyrave të tilla si NER (shpesh pasuar nga parashikimi në një zinxhir linear CRF). Though expressive and accurate, these models fail to fully exploit GPU parallelism, limiting their computational efficiency.  Ky artikull propozon një alternativë më të shpejtë ndaj Bi-LSTMs për NER: Rrjetet Neurale Konveolutive të Diluar (ID-CNN), të cilat kanë kapacitet më të mirë se CNN tradicionale për kontekst të madh dhe parashikim të strukturuar. Ndryshe nga LSTMs, procesi sekuencor i të cilëve në fjalët e gjatësisë N kërkon kohë O(N) edhe përpara paralelizmit, ID-CNN lejojnë konvolucionet e thellësisë fikse të ecin paralelisht nëpër të gjithë dokumentet. Ne përshkruajmë një kombinim të veçantë të strukturës së rrjetit, ndarjes së parametrave dhe procedurave të stërvitjes që mundësojnë shpejtësinë dramatike 14-20 herë në kohën e testit duke mbajtur saktësinë e krahasueshme me Bi-LSTM-CRF. Përveç kësaj, ID-CNN të trajnuar për të bashkuar kontekstin nga i gjithë dokumenti janë më të saktë se Bi-LSTM-CRF ndërsa arrijnë shpejtësi 8x më të shpejtë të kohës së testimit.', 'af': "Vandag wanneer baie praktisers basiese NLP op die hele web en groot volume-trafik hardloop, is vinniger metodes paramount om tyd en energiekoste te te stoor. Onlangse vorderings in GPU-hardwerf het gelei na die uitbreiding van bi-rigtinglike LSTMs as 'n standaard metode vir verkry van per-token vektorvoorstellings wat dien as invoer na etiket opdragte soos NER (dikwels volg deur voorskou in 'n lineêre-ketting CRF). Alhoewel uitdrukking en geregtige, het hierdie modele misluk om GPU parallelisme volledig te gebruik en hulle rekenasielike effektiviteit te beperk. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n vinniger alternatief vir Bi-LSTMs vir NER: Verwerking verspreidige Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke (ID-CNN), wat het beter kapasiteit as tradisionele CNN vir groot konteks en struktureerde voorskou. Ongelyks van LSTMs wie se sekwensiele verwerking op setings van lengte N benodig O( N) tyd selfs in die gesig van parallelisme, ID- CNN laat vaste diepte konvolusies toe om in parallele oor hele dokumente te hardloop. Ons beskryf 'n eienskaplike kombinasie van netwerk struktuur, parameter deel en onderwerp prosedure wat dramatiese 14- 20x toets- tyd speedops aktiveer terwyl waarskynlik vergelykbaar met die Bi- LSTM- CRF hou. Ook, ID-CNN wat opgelei is om konteks te samekom van die hele dokument is meer presies as Bi-LSTM-CRF terwyl 8x vinniger toets tyd speletjies bereik word.", 'am': 'ዛሬ ብዙ ተማሪዎች የNLP መሠረት ግንኙነት በሙሉ መረብ እና ትልቅ volume traffic ሲሮጡ፣ ጊዜና የenergy ዋጋውን ለማዳን ፍጥረት የሚቻኮሉ ሥርዓቶች ናቸው፡፡ የአሁኑ የGPU hardware ፕሮግራሞች የፊደል ቅርጽ የLSTMs አካባቢ ሰንሰለት እንደሚያገለግሉ የኢንተርኔት ፕሮግራሞች ማቀናጃ የውጤት ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አካባቢ እና እርግጠኛ ቢሆንም እነዚህ ዓይነቶች የGPU ተቃውሞ ይሞክራሉ፡፡ ይህ ገጽ ለቤ-LSTMs ለNER የሚለውጥ ፈጥኖ መተላለፊያ ያቀርባል፡፡ በተለየ የተቃውሞ የነዌብ መረብ (ID-CNNs) ለትልቅ ክፍል እና ለባሕላዊ CNNs ለመፍትወት ይሻላል፡፡ በተለየ LSTMs የርዝመት ግንኙነት N የደረጃ ግንኙነት የኦ(N) ሰዓት እንዲያስፈልጋል፣ በተለየ ጥልቅ ክፍል የCNNN ፈቃድ በሰነጃዎች ሁሉ ላይ በተለየ ጥልቅ ጉዳይ እንዲሮጥ ይፈልጋል፡፡ በቢ-LSTM-CRF በሚያሳየው የ14-20x ፈተና ጥያቄን የሚያስፈልገውን የመረብ አካባቢ፣ parameter ማጋራት እና ትምህርት ሥርዓቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Moreover, ID-CNNs trained to aggregate context from the entire document are more accurate than Bi-LSTM-CRFs while attaining 8x faster test time speeds.', 'bn': 'আজকের দিন যখন অনেক প্রশিক্ষক পুরো ওয়েব এবং বিশাল ভলিম ট্রাফিকে মৌলিক এনএলপি চালায়, তখন দ্রুত পদ্ধতি সময় এবং শক্তির খরচ সংরক্ষণের জন্য দ Recent advances in GPU hardware have led to the emergence of bi-directional LSTMs as a standard method for obtaining per-token vector representations serving as input to labeling tasks such as NER (often followed by prediction in a linear-chain CRF).  যদিও এই মডেলগুলো জিপিউ প্যারালেলিজম ব্যবহার করতে ব্যর্থ হয়েছে, তাদের গণনাত্রিক কার্যক্রম সীমাবদ্ধ করেছে। এই পত্রিকাটি বি এলস্টিমিসের জন্য দ্রুত বিকল্প প প্রস্তাব করেছে: বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন কনভোলেটেশন নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (আই-সিএনএন), যা বিশাল পরিসংখ্যান এবং গঠনের এলএসএসএমএস এর অনুরূপ যাদের দীর্ঘদিনের ব্যাপারে পরবর্তী প্রক্রিয়ার প্রয়োজন তাদের সময়ও প্যারালেলিজমের মুখোমুখি থাকার প্রয়োজন, এমনকি আই-সিএনএন-এর অনুমত আমরা নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর একটি বিভিন্ন সংযোগ ব্যাখ্যা করি যা বিএলস্টিম-CRF এর সাথে যুক্ত থাকার সময় ন্যায়মিক ১৪-২০x পরীক্ষার গতি সক্রিয় করে। এছাড়াও, পুরো ডকুমেন্ট থেকে বিএলসিএম-CRFs থেকে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে যখন ৮x দ্রুত পরীক্ষার সময়ের গতি পৌঁছানোর সময় বিএলসি', 'ca': "Avui en dia, quan molts practicants dirigeixen NLP bàsica en tota la web i tràfic de gran volum, els mètodes més ràpids són indispensables per estalviar temps i costos d'energia. Els avanços recents en el hardware GPU han portat a l'aparició de LSTMs bidireccionals com un mètode normal per obtenir representacions per vector per fitxa que serveixen com entrada a tasques d'etiquetage com NER (sovint seguits de predicció en una cadena linear CRF). Malgrat que expressius i exacts, aquests models no expliquen plenament el parallelisme GPU, limitant la seva eficiència computacional. Aquest paper proposa una alternativa més ràpida als biLSTMs per a NER: Rets Convolucionaris Neurals Dilats Iterats (ID-CNN), que tenen millor capacitat que les CNN tradicionals per a un gran context i predicció estructurada. A diferència dels LSTMs que el processament seqüencial de les frases de longitud N requereix temps O(N) fins i tot davant del parallelisme, els ID-CNN permeten que les convolucions de profunditat fixa funcionin parallelament en tots els documents. Descrevem una combinació distinta d'estructura de xarxa, compartir paràmetres i procediments d'entrenament que permeten velocitats dramàtiques de 14-20 vegades de temps de prova mentre mantenim la precisió comparable a la Bi-LSTM-CRF. Moreover, ID-CNNs trained to aggregate context from the entire document are more accurate than Bi-LSTM-CRFs while attaining 8x faster test time speeds.", 'az': "Bu gün çox təhsil edənlər bütün web və böyük səviyyət trafiqlərində əsas NLP işlədikdə, daha hızlı yollar zamanı və enerji maliyyətlərini qorumaq üçün çox mövcuddur. GPU hazırlığındaki son dəyişikliklər, NER kimi işarələrə etiketlənmək üçün hər token vektör təsirlərini alınmaq üçün standart yolu olaraq iki yönəli LSTMs təsirlərinə yol a çdı (çox zaman linear-zincir CRF içində təsirlərinə uyğun təsirlərinə uyğun olaraq). Bu modellər GPU parallelizmini tamamilə istifadə edə bilmədikləri halda, hesaplayaraq faydalanılıqlarını sınırlayır. Bu kağıt NER üçün Bi-LSTMs üçün daha hızlı alternatifi təklif edir: Yenidən uzaqlaşdırılmış Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), böyük məlumatlardan və strukturlı tədbirlərdən daha çox qüvvətli CNNs üçün daha yaxşı kapasitə sahibi olaraq. N uzunluğu cümlələrinin ardınca işləməsi üçün O(N) vaxtı parallelizm üzündə də lazım olan LSTMs kimi, ID-CNN bütün dökümlər arasında sabit derinlik işləmələrinə izin verir. Biz şəbəkə quruluşu, parametru paylaşılma və təhsil prosedürlərinin müxtəlif birləşdirilməsini təsdiqləyirik ki, dramatik 14-20x sınama vaxtı sürətlərini Bi-LSTM-CRF ilə müqayisədə müəyyən edilən təhsil sürətlərini qabilleştirər. Daha sonra, bütün səhifələrdən məlumatları toplamaq üçün təhsil edilən ID-CNN 8 x daha hızlı sınama vaxtı sürətinə çatdığı zaman üçün bi-LSTM-CRF'lərdən daha doğrudur.", 'bs': 'Danas kada mnogi praktičari vode osnovne NLP na cijelom internetu i velikom prometu, brže metode su najvažnije za spašavanje vremena i troškova energije. Nedavni napredak u GPU hardware doveo je do otvaranja dvosmjernih LSTMs-a kao standardnu metodu za dobivanje predstavljanja vektora po tokenu koji služe kao ulaz do označavanja takvih zadataka kao što je NER (često slijedi predviđanja u linearnom lancu CRF). Iako su izraziti i precizni, ovi modeli ne mogu potpuno iskoristiti GPU parallelizam, ograničavajući njihovu računalnu efikasnost. Ovaj papir predlaže bržu alternativu bi-LSTMs za NER: Iteratirane raspršene konvolucionalne neurone mreže (ID-CNNs), koje imaju bolju kapacitet od tradicionalnih CNNs za veliki kontekst i strukturirane predviđanja. Za razliku od LSTMs čije sekvencijalno obrađivanje rečenica dužine N zahtijeva vrijeme O(N) čak i u suočavanju parallelizma, ID-CNN omogućava fiksnu dubinu konvolucije da se provode paralelno u svim dokumentima. Opišemo različitu kombinaciju mrežne strukture, procedure dijeljenja parametara i obuke koje omogućavaju dramatične brzine test a 14-20x dok zadržavamo tačnost usporednom s Bi-LSTM-CRF-om. Osim toga, ID-CNN obučeni za okupljanje konteksta iz cijelog dokumenta su precizniji od Bi-LSTM-CRF-a dok postignu brže vrijeme ispitivanja 8x.', 'cs': 'V dnešní době, kdy mnoho odborníků provozuje základní NLP na celém webu a velkoobjemovém provozu, jsou rychlejší metody klíčové pro úsporu času a nákladů na energii. Nedávné pokroky v hardwaru grafických procesorů vedly k vzniku obousměrných LSTMs jako standardní metody pro získání vektorových reprezentací na token sloužících jako vstup do úloh značení, jako je NER (často následuje predikce v lineárním řetězci CRF). Přestože tyto modely jsou expresivní a přesné, nedokážou plně využít paralelismu GPU, což omezuje jejich výpočetní efektivitu. Tento článek navrhuje rychlejší alternativu Bi-LSTMs pro NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), které mají lepší kapacitu než tradiční CNN pro velký kontext a strukturovanou predikci. Na rozdíl od LSTMů, jejichž sekvenční zpracování na větách délky N vyžaduje O(N) čas i v tvář v tvář paralelismu, ID-CNN umožňují probíhat paralelně v pevné hloubce záhyby napříč celými dokumenty. Popisujeme výraznou kombinaci síťové struktury, sdílení parametrů a procedur školení, které umožňují dramatické 14-20násobné zrychlení testovacího času při zachování přesnosti srovnatelné s Bi-LSTM-CRF. Navíc ID-CNN vycvičené k agregování kontextu z celého dokumentu jsou přesnější než Bi-LSTM-CRF a zároveň dosahují 8x vyšší rychlosti testovacího času.', 'et': 'Tänapäeval, kui paljud praktikud kasutavad põhilist NLP kogu veebis ja suuremahulist liiklust, on kiiremad meetodid aja ja energiakulude säästmiseks ülimalt olulised. Viimased arengud GPU riistvaras on viinud kahesuunaliste LSTMde esilekerkimiseni standardmeetodina tokeni vektorite esituste saamiseks, mis on sisendiks sellistele märgistamisülesannetele nagu NER (millele sageli järgneb prognoosimine lineaarahelaga CRF). Kuigi need mudelid ei suuda GPU paralleelsust täielikult ära kasutada, piirates nende arvutusefektiivsust. Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja kiirem alternatiiv Bi-LSTMdele NER-i jaoks: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), millel on suurem võimsus kui traditsioonilistel CNN-idel suure konteksti ja struktureeritud prognoosimise jaoks. Erinevalt LSTMdest, mille järjestikune töötlemine pikkusega N lausetel nõuab O(N) aega isegi paralleelsuse korral, võimaldavad ID-CNN-d fikseeritud sügavusega konvolutsioone töötada paralleelselt tervetes dokumentides. Kirjeldame võrgustruktuuri, parameetrite jagamise ja koolitusprotseduuride selget kombinatsiooni, mis võimaldab dramaatilisi 14–20-kordseid testiaega kiirendada, säilitades samas Bi-LSTM-CRF-iga võrreldava täpsuse. Lisaks on kogu dokumendi konteksti koondamiseks koolitatud ID-CNN-id täpsemad kui Bi-LSTM-CRF-id, saavutades samas 8 korda kiirema katseaja kiiruse.', 'fi': 'Nykyään, kun monet ammattilaiset käyttävät perusNLP:tä koko verkossa ja suurivolyymistä liikennettä, nopeammat menetelmät ovat ensiarvoisen tärkeitä ajan ja energiakustannusten säästämiseksi. Viimeaikaiset edistysaskeleet grafiikkasuorittimen laitteistossa ovat johtaneet kaksisuuntaisten LSTMien syntymiseen vakiomenetelmänä merkkikohtaisen vektoriesitysten saamiseen, jotka toimivat syötteenä merkintätehtäviin, kuten NER (jota usein seuraa ennuste lineaarisessa ketjussa CRF). Vaikka nämä mallit ovatkin ilmeikkäitä ja tarkkoja, ne eivät pysty täysin hyödyntämään grafiikkasuorittimen rinnakkaisuutta, mikä rajoittaa niiden laskennallista tehokkuutta. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan nopeampaa vaihtoehtoa Bi-LSTMille NER: Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks (ID-CNN), joilla on parempi kapasiteetti kuin perinteisillä CNN:illä suuren kontekstin ja strukturoidun ennustamisen kannalta. Toisin kuin LSTMs, joiden perättäinen käsittely N-pitkillä lauseilla vaatii O(N) aikaa jopa rinnakkaisuuden edessä, ID-CNN sallii kiinteän syvyyden konvoluutiot kulkevat rinnakkain kokonaisissa asiakirjoissa. Kuvaamme verkoston rakenteen, parametrien jakamisen ja koulutusmenetelmien selkeän yhdistelmän, joka mahdollistaa dramaattiset 14–20-kertaiset testiajan nopeukset säilyttäen samalla Bi-LSTM-CRF:n tarkkuuden. Lisäksi koko dokumentin kontekstin kokoamiseen koulutetut ID-CNN:t ovat tarkempia kuin Bi-LSTM-CRF:t ja saavuttavat 8 kertaa nopeammat testiaikanopeudet.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness FindOK Slackfree Gambar iki supoyo akeh Alternate liyane sing luwih akeh kanggo bi-LLTT M kanggo NIR: Iterated dilate condvolution Neral networks Gak Cocok Rilah Label', 'sk': 'Danes, ko številni strokovnjaki izvajajo osnovno NLP na celotnem spletu in obsežen promet, so hitrejše metode ključnega pomena za prihranek časa in stroškov energije. Nedavni napredek v strojni opremi GPU je pripeljal do pojava dvosmernih LSTMs kot standardne metode za pridobivanje vektorskih predstavitev na žeton, ki služijo kot vhod za naloge označevanja, kot je NER (pogosto sledi napoved v linearni verigi CRF). Čeprav so ti modeli izraziti in natančni, ne morejo v celoti izkoristiti vzporednosti GPU, kar omejuje njihovo računalniško učinkovitost. Ta članek predlaga hitrejšo alternativo Bi-LSTMs za NER: Iterirana razširjena konvolucijska živčna omrežja (ID-CNN), ki imajo večjo zmogljivost kot tradicionalna CNN za veliko kontekstno in strukturirano napovedovanje. Za razliko od LSTMs, katerih zaporedna obdelava stavkov dolžine N zahteva čas O(N) tudi ob vzporednosti, ID-CNN omogoča vzporedno tekanje konvolucij s fiksno globino po celotnih dokumentih. Opisujemo različno kombinacijo mrežne strukture, izmenjave parametrov in postopkov usposabljanja, ki omogočajo dramatične 14-20-kratne pospešitve preskusnega časa, hkrati pa ohranjajo natančnost, primerljiva z Bi-LSTM-CRF. Poleg tega so ID-CNN-ji, usposobljeni za združevanje konteksta iz celotnega dokumenta, natančnejši od Bi-LSTM-CRF, medtem ko dosegajo 8-krat hitrejše preskusne hitrosti.', 'ha': "A yau, idan masu amfani da yawa sun yi tafiyar amfani da asalin NLP kan tafiyar tafiyar wata tare da ɗin sauri, za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu kashewa zuwa adana masu tsari ga lokaci da nau'in nishati. Fitarwa na GPU na da yanzu suka ƙara ga fitarwa mai bi-dirgiyar LTRM kamar wata shiryarwa mai daidaita wa motsi wa kowace-bango masu tsari da ake aiki da shi zuwa mai tsarin aiki kamar shirin NER (ko da ake ƙara da bayani cikin wani jerin-line CRF). Babu da gaske da gaske, waɗannan misãlai ba su iya amfani da cikakken parallelism na GPU ba, kuma yana ƙunsa da fasafanci na lissafi. Wannan takardar aiki na ƙayyade wata matsayi mafi kusa wa Bi-LSM wa NER: ItItated Dilated Conversioned Neural Networks (ID-CNNs), wanda yana da mafi alhẽri ga awo daga traditional CNNNs wa babban context and archive. Fara kwamfyutan LSS wanda ke samun aiki da ke kan cewa tsawo na N yana son lokaci O(N) kõ da kuma idan ya faca parallelism, don ID-CNNN ya yi izni ga masu tsari da kwanan-depth ya yi tafiya da shi da fanel duk takardar aiki. Tuna bayyana wani komai na haɗi na tsarin shirin tsari, parameter Sharing and Trainin aiki da ke iya amfani da haramtar durada 14-20x da za'a yi sauri ga jarraba-lokaci 14-20x sami kuma yana tsare tsari daidai da Bi-LTRM-CRF. Furan haka, an sanar da ID-CNNN don ya iya faɗaɗa context daga duk takardar, su ne mafi daidaita daga Bi-LSM-CRFs idan an sami da fassarar jarrabãwa masu kasi 8x.", 'he': 'היום כאשר רבים מתאמנים מנהלים NLP בסיסי ברשת כולה ותנועה גדולה, שיטות מהירות הן חשובות ביותר לחסוך זמן ועלות אנרגיה. התקדמות האחרונות בחשמל GPU הובילו להופעה של LSTMs שתי כיוונים כשיטה סטנדרטית להשיג ייצוגי ווקטורים לכל סימנים ששימשו ככניסה לתיקוי משימות כמו NER (לעתים קרובות עקבו על ידי חיזוי בשרשרת לינרית CRF). Though expressive and accurate, these models fail to fully exploit GPU parallelism, limiting their computational efficiency.  העבודה הזו מציעה אלטרנטיבה מהירה יותר לבי-LSTMs עבור NER: רשתות נוירוליות משותפות משותפות משותפות (ID-CNN), שיש להם יכולת טובה יותר מאשר CNN מסורתיות לקונקסט גדול וחזוי מבוסס. בניגוד ל-LSTMs שיעבר רצופי על משפטים של אורך N דורש זמן O(N) אפילו בפני משותף, ID-CNN מאפשר שינויים עמוקים קבועים לרוץ באופן קבוע בכל מסמכים. אנחנו מתארים שילוב ברור של מבנה רשת, שיתוף פרמטרים ותהליך אימון שמאפשרים מהירות מבחן דרמטית 14-20x בזמן שמשמירה מדויקה שווה לבי-LSTM-CRF. חוץ מזה, זיהוי-CNN מאומנים כדי לארגן הקשר מכל המסמך הם מדויקים יותר מ-BI-LSTM-CRFs בעוד להשיג מהירות זמן מבחן 8x מהיר יותר.', 'bo': 'དེ་རིང་ལ་ལག་སྟར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ཝེབ་དང་སྒྲ་བརྙན་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་ནང་ནས་NLPགཞི་རྩིས་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་དུས། དུས་ཚོད་དང་ནུ Recent advances in GPU hardware have led to the emergence of bi-directional LSTMs as a standard method for obtaining per-token vector representations serving as input to labeling tasks such as NER (often followed by prediction in a linear-chain CRF). ངོས་འཛིན་དང་བདེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་པར་མིན་འདུག་པས་རི་མོ་འདིས་GPU་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྒྲིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་Bi-LSTMs NER(Iterated Dilated Convolutional Neural Networks) ལ་མགྱོགས་མཚམས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དུ་ཕར་མེད་ཐུབ་སྐྱེལ། Unlike LSTMs whose sequential processing on sentences of length N requires O(N) time even in the face of parallelism, ID-CNNs permit fixed-depth convolutions to run in parallel across all documents. We describe a distinct combination of network structure, parameter sharing and training procedures that enable dramatic 14-20x test-time speedups while retaining accuracy comparable to the Bi-LSTM-CRF. Moreover, ID-CNNs trained to aggregate context from the entire document are more accurate than Bi-LSTM-CRFs while attaining 8x faster test time speeds.'}
{'en': 'Entity Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context', 'ar': 'ربط الكيانات عبر التشفير المشترك للأنواع والأوصاف والسياق', 'fr': "Liaison d'entités via l'encodage conjoint des types, des descriptions et du contexte", 'pt': 'Vinculação de entidades por meio de codificação conjunta de tipos, descrições e contexto', 'es': 'Vinculación de entidades mediante codificación conjunta de tipos, descripciones y contexto', 'zh': '以类上下文合编码为实链接', 'hi': 'एंटिटी प्रकार, विवरण, और संदर्भ के संयुक्त एन्कोडिंग के माध्यम से लिंकिंग', 'ja': 'タイプ、説明、およびコンテキストの共同エンコードを介したエンティティリンク', 'ru': 'Связывание сущностей с помощью совместной кодировки типов, описаний и контекста', 'ga': 'Nasc Aonán trí Ionchódú Comhpháirteach Cineálacha, Tuairiscí, agus Comhthéacs', 'hu': 'Szervezetek összekapcsolása típusok, leírások és kontextusok közös kódolásával', 'el': 'Σύνδεση οντοτήτων μέσω κοινής κωδικοποίησης τύπων, περιγραφών και πλαισίου', 'it': 'Collegamento di entità tramite codifica congiunta di tipi, descrizioni e contesto', 'lt': 'Entity Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context', 'ka': 'Entity Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context', 'kk': 'Түрлер, сипаттамасы және контекстің біріктірілген кодтамасы арқылы нысандарды сілтемелеу', 'mk': 'Entity Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context', 'ml': 'യൂണ്ട് എന്\u200dകോഡിങ്ങിന്റെ തരം, വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെ മുഖാന്തരം ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Entità li torbot permezz ta’ Kodifikazzjoni Konġunta tat-Tipi, Deskrizzjonijiet, u Kuntest', 'pl': 'Łączenie podmiotów poprzez wspólne kodowanie typów, opisów i kontekstu', 'ro': 'Legătura entităților prin codarea comună a tipurilor, descrierilor și contextului', 'mn': 'Объектын холбоотой холбоотой хэлбэр, тайлбарлалт, контекст', 'ms': 'Name', 'so': 'Isku xiriirka wadajirka ah', 'sr': 'Povezivanje objekata putem zajedničkog kodiranja tipa, opisa i konteksta', 'si': 'වර්ගය, විස්තර, සම්බන්ධතාවය සමඟ සම්බන්ධ සංවිධානය', 'ur': 'اتنی لینک ٹیپ، دکھانے، اور کنٹکسٹ کے مطابق ایک ٹیپ اکڈینگ کے ذریعہ', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Enhetslänkning via gemensam kodning av typer, beskrivningar och sammanhang', 'no': 'Entitetslenking gjennom samankoding av typar, skildringar og kontekst', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Liên kết chi tiết thông qua các loại, mô tả, và ngữ cảnh', 'bg': 'Свързване на обекти чрез съвместно кодиране на типове, описания и контекст', 'hr': 'Povezivanje objekata putem zajedničkog kodiranja tipa, opisa i konteksta', 'nl': 'Entiteitsverbinding via gezamenlijke codering van typen, beschrijvingen en context', 'da': 'Entity Linking via fælles kodning af typer, beskrivelser og sammenhæng', 'id': 'Entitas Linking melalui Pengkodan Bergabung Jenis, Deskripsi, dan Konteks', 'ko': '유형, 설명 및 컨텍스트의 결합 코딩을 통해 엔티티 링크', 'fa': 'ارتباط برقراری از طریق رمزبندی همگانی از نوع، توضیح و محیط', 'de': 'Entitätenverknüpfung über gemeinsame Kodierung von Typen, Beschreibungen und Kontext', 'af': 'Eenheidskakeling deur Gesamelede Enkodering van Tipe, Beskrywings en Konteks', 'sw': 'Uunganishaji wa Ujumbe kupitia Uunganishaji wa aina, Maelezo na Mazingiro', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar', 'am': 'Entity Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context', 'hy': 'Համակարգ, որը կապված է տեսակների, նկարագրությունների և կոնտեքստի ընդհանուր կոդավորման միջոցով', 'sq': 'Njësia që lidh nëpërmjet kodimit të përbashkët të llojeve, përshkrimeve dhe kontekstit', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Entitat Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context', 'az': '䋃뱴쎼渠仃뙶泉饲楮⁋潤污浡珄넬⁔쎼狉饬즙爠盉餠䭯湴數琠癡獩瓉饳楬즙⁂懄齬慭愊', 'fi': 'Yksikön linkittäminen tyyppien, kuvausten ja kontekstin yhteisen koodauksen avulla', 'cs': 'Propojení entit prostřednictvím společného kódování typů, popisů a kontextu', 'et': 'Olemi linkimine tüüpide, kirjelduste ja konteksti ühise kodeerimise kaudu', 'bs': 'Povezivanje objekata putem zajedničkog kodiranja tipa, opisa i konteksta', 'jv': 'EntityLink', 'he': 'קישור יחידה דרך הקוד המשותף של סוגים, תיאורים וקונקסט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Povezovanje entitet prek skupnega kodiranja vrst, opisov in konteksta', 'bo': 'Entity Linking via Joint Encoding of Types, Descriptions, and Context'}
{'en': 'For accurate entity linking, we need to capture various information aspects of an entity, such as its description in a KB, contexts in which it is mentioned, and structured knowledge. Additionally, a linking system should work on texts from different domains without requiring domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features. In this work we present a neural, modular entity linking system that learns a unified dense representation for each entity using multiple sources of information, such as its description, contexts around its mentions, and its fine-grained types. We show that the resulting entity linking system is effective at combining these sources, and performs competitively, sometimes out-performing current state-of-the-art systems across datasets, without requiring any domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features. We also show that our model can effectively embed entities that are new to the KB, and is able to link its mentions accurately.', 'ar': 'لربط كيان دقيق ، نحتاج إلى التقاط جوانب المعلومات المختلفة للكيان ، مثل وصفه في KB ، والسياقات التي يتم ذكرها فيها ، والمعرفة المنظمة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يجب أن يعمل نظام الربط على نصوص من مجالات مختلفة دون الحاجة إلى بيانات تدريب خاصة بالمجال أو ميزات مصممة يدويًا. في هذا العمل ، نقدم نظام ربط كيان عصبي معياري يتعلم تمثيلًا كثيفًا موحدًا لكل كيان باستخدام مصادر متعددة للمعلومات ، مثل وصفه ، والسياقات حول إشاراته ، وأنواعه الدقيقة. نظهر أن نظام ربط الكيانات الناتج فعال في الجمع بين هذه المصادر ، ويعمل بشكل تنافسي ، وأحيانًا يتفوق على أحدث الأنظمة الحالية عبر مجموعات البيانات ، دون الحاجة إلى أي بيانات تدريب خاصة بالمجال أو ميزات مصممة يدويًا. نظهر أيضًا أن نموذجنا يمكنه "تضمين" الكيانات الجديدة في قاعدة المعارف بشكل فعال ، وهو قادر على ربط إشاراتها بدقة.', 'es': 'Para que la vinculación de entidades sea precisa, necesitamos capturar varios aspectos de información de una entidad, como su descripción en una base de conocimientos, los contextos en los que se menciona y el conocimiento estructurado. Además, un sistema de enlace debe funcionar en textos de diferentes dominios sin requerir datos de entrenamiento específicos del dominio ni funciones diseñadas a mano. En este trabajo presentamos un sistema de enlace de entidades modular y neuronal que aprende una representación densa unificada para cada entidad utilizando múltiples fuentes de información, como su descripción, contextos alrededor de sus menciones y sus tipos detallados. Demostramos que el sistema de enlace de entidades resultante es eficaz para combinar estas fuentes y funciona de manera competitiva, a veces superando a los sistemas actuales de vanguardia en todos los conjuntos de datos, sin requerir ningún dato de entrenamiento específico del dominio ni funciones diseñadas a mano. También demostramos que nuestro modelo puede «incrustar» de manera efectiva entidades que son nuevas en la base de conocimientos y es capaz de vincular sus menciones con precisión.', 'pt': 'Para uma vinculação de entidade precisa, precisamos capturar vários aspectos de informação de uma entidade, como sua descrição em uma KB, contextos em que ela é mencionada e conhecimento estruturado. Além disso, um sistema de vinculação deve funcionar em textos de diferentes domínios sem exigir dados de treinamento específicos de domínio ou recursos de engenharia manual. Neste trabalho apresentamos um sistema de ligação de entidades neural e modular que aprende uma representação densa unificada para cada entidade usando múltiplas fontes de informação, como sua descrição, contextos em torno de suas menções e seus tipos refinados. Mostramos que o sistema de vinculação de entidades resultante é eficaz na combinação dessas fontes e funciona de forma competitiva, às vezes superando os sistemas atuais de última geração em conjuntos de dados, sem exigir nenhum dado de treinamento específico de domínio ou recursos de engenharia manual. Também mostramos que nosso modelo pode efetivamente “incorporar” entidades que são novas na KB e é capaz de vincular suas menções com precisão.', 'fr': "Pour établir des liens précis entre les entités, nous devons saisir divers aspects informationnels d'une entité, tels que sa description dans une base de connaissances, les contextes dans lesquels elle est mentionnée et les connaissances structurées. En outre, un système de liaison doit fonctionner sur des textes provenant de différents domaines sans nécessiter de données de formation spécifiques au domaine ou de fonctionnalités conçues à la main. Dans ce travail, nous présentons un système de liaison d'entités neuronales et modulaires qui apprend une représentation dense unifiée pour chaque entité à l'aide de multiples sources d'informations, telles que sa description, les contextes entourant ses mentions et ses types précis. Nous montrons que le système de liaison d'entités qui en résulte est efficace pour combiner ces sources et fonctionne de manière compétitive, surpassant parfois les systèmes de pointe actuels sur les ensembles de données, sans nécessiter de données de formation spécifiques au domaine ou de fonctionnalités conçues à la main. Nous montrons également que notre modèle peut «\xa0intégrer\xa0» efficacement les entités qui sont nouvelles dans la base de connaissances et est capable de lier ses mentions avec précision.", 'ja': '正確なエンティティのリンクのためには、チームドットでの説明、言及されているコンテキスト、構造化された知識など、エンティティのさまざまな情報の側面をキャプチャする必要があります。さらに、リンクシステムは、ドメイン固有のトレーニングデータやハンドエンジニアリング機能を必要とせずに、異なるドメインからのテキストで動作する必要があります。この研究では、ニューラルモジュラーエンティティリンクシステムを提示し、その記述、言及をめぐる文脈、細かい種類などの複数の情報源を使用して、各エンティティの統一された濃密な表現を学習します。結果として得られるエンティティリンクシステムは、これらのソースを組み合わせるのに効果的であり、ドメイン固有のトレーニングデータやハンドエンジニアリング機能を必要とせずに、データセット全体で競争力のある、時には最先端のシステムを上回る性能を発揮することを示しています。また、当社のモデルは、KBにとって初めてのエンティティを効果的に「埋め込む」ことができ、そのメンションを正確にリンクすることができることも示しています。', 'zh': '求正体链接,须得信息,如在知识库中,提及其上下文及结构化知识。 此外链接统应处分异域文本,不须特定于域练数、手工设计之功。 凡此诸事,建一神经、模块化之体链接统,宜用数信息源(如其言、及其左右上下文及其细粒度)为学一之密。 吾言生成之体链接系统有效,而有竞争力,或集优于前,无特定于领。 又明嵌入知识库新实,且能确链接。', 'hi': 'सटीक एंटिटी लिंकिंग के लिए, हमें किसी एंटिटी के विभिन्न जानकारी पहलुओं को कैप्चर करने की आवश्यकता होती है, जैसे कि केबी में इसका विवरण, संदर्भ जिसमें इसका उल्लेख किया गया है, और संरचित ज्ञान। इसके अतिरिक्त, एक लिंकिंग सिस्टम को डोमेन-विशिष्ट प्रशिक्षण डेटा या हाथ से इंजीनियर सुविधाओं की आवश्यकता के बिना विभिन्न डोमेन से ग्रंथों पर काम करना चाहिए। इस काम में हम एक तंत्रिका, मॉड्यूलर इकाई जोड़ने वाली प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो सूचना के कई स्रोतों का उपयोग करके प्रत्येक इकाई के लिए एक एकीकृत घने प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखता है, जैसे कि इसका विवरण, इसके उल्लेखों के आसपास के संदर्भ, और इसके ठीक-ठीक प्रकार। हम दिखाते हैं कि परिणामी इकाई लिंकिंग सिस्टम इन स्रोतों के संयोजन में प्रभावी है, और प्रतिस्पर्धात्मक रूप से प्रदर्शन करता है, कभी-कभी डेटासेट में वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को आउट-परफॉर्म करता है, बिना किसी डोमेन-विशिष्ट प्रशिक्षण डेटा या हाथ से इंजीनियर सुविधाओं की आवश्यकता के। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल प्रभावी रूप से उन संस्थाओं को "एम्बेड" कर सकता है जो KB के लिए नए हैं, और इसके उल्लेखों को सटीक रूप से लिंक करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ru': 'Для точного связывания сущностей нам необходимо зафиксировать различные информационные аспекты сущности, такие как ее описание в КБ, контексты, в которых она упоминается, и структурированные знания. Кроме того, система увязки должна работать с текстами из различных областей, не требуя данных об обучении для конкретных областей или ручных функций. В этой работе мы представляем нейронную, модульную систему связи сущностей, которая изучает единое плотное представление для каждой сущности, используя несколько источников информации, таких как ее описание, контексты вокруг ее упоминаний и ее мелкозернистые типы. Мы показываем, что результирующая система связывания сущностей эффективна при объединении этих источников и выполняет конкурентоспособные, иногда превосходящие по производительности современные системы в наборах данных, не требуя каких-либо данных об обучении, специфичных для конкретной области, или ручных функций. Мы также показываем, что наша модель может эффективно «встраивать» сущности, которые являются новичками в КБ, и способна точно связывать его упоминания.', 'ga': "Chun nascadh cruinn a dhéanamh ar aonán, ní mór dúinn gnéithe éagsúla faisnéise a ghabháil d'aonán, mar shampla a chur síos i KB, comhthéacsanna ina luaitear é, agus eolas struchtúrtha. Ina theannta sin, ba cheart go n-oibreodh córas nasctha ar théacsanna ó fhearainn éagsúla gan sonraí oiliúna a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann ná gnéithe innealtóireacht láimhe a bheith ag teastáil. Sa saothar seo cuirimid i láthair córas nasctha néarach, modúlach a fhoghlaimíonn léiriú dlúth aontaithe do gach aonán ag baint úsáide as foinsí iolracha faisnéise, mar shampla a chur síos, comhthéacsanna timpeall air, agus a chineálacha míne. Léirímid go bhfuil an córas nasctha aonáin a eascraíonn as seo éifeachtach chun na foinsí seo a chomhcheangal, agus go bhfeidhmíonn sé go hiomaíoch, uaireanta ag déanamh níos fearr ná na córais nua-aimseartha thar thacair sonraí, gan aon sonraí oiliúna a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann ná aon ghnéithe lámh-innealtaithe a bheith ag teastáil. Léirímid freisin gur féidir lenár múnla “leabú” éifeachtach a dhéanamh ar eintitis atá nua don KB, agus go bhfuil sé in ann a luaitear a nascadh go cruinn.", 'ka': 'მარტივი ელექტის დაკავშირებისთვის, ჩვენ უნდა ინტექტიკის განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის აპექტირები, როგორც მისი გამოსახულება KB-ში, კონტექსტებში, რომელიც ის ამოხსნა და სტრუქტ დამატებით, ერთადერთი სისტემა უნდა მუშაობა განსხვავებული დიომენების ტექსტის შესახებ განსხვავებული მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ ან ხელ ინექნიერებული ფუ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნეიროლური, მოდულური ინტერტიკი, რომელიც სისტემის დაკავშირება, რომელიც ყველა ინტერტიკისთვის ერთადერთად მსგავსი გამოყენება ინფორმაციის მრავალური წიგნის გამოყენება,  ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ შემდეგ ინტერტიკური სისტემის დაკავშირების სისტემი ეფექტიურია ამ ფოსტების შეერთებაში და კონპექტიურად გავაკეთებთ, რომელსაც კონპექტიურად გავაკეთებთ მიმდინარე სისტემის განმავლ ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებელია ეფექტიურად "ინბიბ" ინტერტიები, რომლებიც KB-ზე ახალი, და შესაძლებელია მისი ამოცანების მართლად დაკავშიროთ.', 'hu': 'A pontos entitáskötés érdekében egy entitás különböző információs aspektusait kell rögzítenünk, mint például annak leírása egy KB-ban, kontextusokat, amelyekben említésre kerül, és strukturált ismereteket. Ezenkívül egy összekapcsoló rendszernek különböző területekről származó szövegeken kell működnie anélkül, hogy tartományspecifikus képzési adatokat vagy kézzel tervezett funkciókat igényelne. Ebben a munkában egy neurális, moduláris entitáskötő rendszert mutatunk be, amely minden entitás számára egységes, sűrű reprezentációt tanul meg több információforrás felhasználásával, például annak leírásával, az említések körüli kontextusokkal és finomszemcsés típusaival. Megmutatjuk, hogy a létrejövő entitás-összekapcsoló rendszer hatékonyan kombinálja ezeket a forrásokat, és versenyképes, néha felülmúlja a jelenlegi korszerű rendszereket az adatkészletek között, anélkül, hogy tartományspecifikus képzési adatokat vagy kézzel tervezett funkciókat igényelne. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk hatékonyan képes beágyazni azokat a entitásokat, amelyek újak a KB-ban, és képes pontosan összekapcsolni az említéseket.', 'el': 'Για την ακριβή σύνδεση οντοτήτων, πρέπει να συλλάβουμε διάφορες πτυχές πληροφοριών μιας οντότητας, όπως η περιγραφή της σε μια ΚΒ, τα πλαίσια στα οποία αναφέρεται και η δομημένη γνώση. Επιπλέον, ένα σύστημα σύνδεσης θα πρέπει να λειτουργεί σε κείμενα από διαφορετικούς τομείς χωρίς να απαιτεί ειδικά δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης ή χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά. Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε ένα νευρωνικό, μορφωματικό σύστημα σύνδεσης οντότητας που μαθαίνει μια ενοποιημένη πυκνή αναπαράσταση για κάθε οντότητα χρησιμοποιώντας πολλαπλές πηγές πληροφοριών, όπως η περιγραφή της, τα πλαίσια γύρω από τις αναφορές της και τους λεπτόκοκκους τύπους της. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι το προκύπτον σύστημα σύνδεσης οντότητας είναι αποτελεσματικό στο συνδυασμό αυτών των πηγών, και εκτελεί ανταγωνιστικά, μερικές φορές ξεπερνώντας τα σημερινά συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε όλα τα σύνολα δεδομένων, χωρίς να απαιτούνται δεδομένα κατάρτισης ειδικά για τον τομέα ή χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να "ενσωματώσει" οντότητες που είναι νέες στην ΚΒ και είναι σε θέση να συνδέσει τις αναφορές της με ακρίβεια.', 'kk': 'Дұрыс бірліктерді қосылу үшін біз бірлікті мәлімет аспектерін, мәліметтің КБ- тегі сипаттамасы, мәліметтің мәліметтері және құрылған білімдері түсіну керек. Сонымен қатар, сілтеме жүйесі доменге арнаулы оқыту деректері не қол инженерлік мүмкіндіктері керек болмаса, әртүрлі домендерден мәтіндерді жұмыс істеу керек. Бұл жұмыстың бірнеше мәлімет көзін қолдану үшін біріктірілген тұрақтық мәліметтің көзі, сипаттамасы, мәліметтері және оның түрлері бойынша біріктірілген мәліметті біріктіру жүйесін көрсетеді Біз бұл көздерді біріктіру жүйесінің нәтижесін көрсетедік. Кейбірде деректер жинақтарындағы күй- жай жүйелерді біріктіру үшін әсер ететін жүйелерді біріктіру жүйесіне әсер ететін жүйелерді көрсетедік. Мұндай-ақ біз үлгіміз КБ- ге жаңа "ендіру" нысандарын әсер етеді және оның айтылуларын дұрыс сілтемелеуге болады.', 'it': 'Per un collegamento accurato di entità, abbiamo bisogno di catturare vari aspetti informativi di un\'entità, come la sua descrizione in una KB, i contesti in cui viene menzionata e la conoscenza strutturata. Inoltre, un sistema di collegamento dovrebbe funzionare su testi provenienti da diversi domini senza richiedere dati di formazione specifici del dominio o funzionalità ingegnerizzate manualmente. In questo lavoro presentiamo un sistema neurale, modulare di collegamento di entità che impara una rappresentazione densa unificata per ogni entità utilizzando più fonti di informazione, come la sua descrizione, i contesti intorno alle sue menzioni e i suoi tipi a grana fine. Mostriamo che il sistema di collegamento delle entità risultante è efficace nel combinare queste fonti e si comporta in modo competitivo, a volte superando gli attuali sistemi all\'avanguardia tra set di dati, senza richiedere alcun dato di formazione specifico del dominio o funzionalità ingegnerizzate a mano. Dimostriamo anche che il nostro modello può effettivamente "incorporare" entità nuove alla KB ed è in grado di collegare accuratamente le menzioni.', 'ms': "Untuk menghubungkan entiti yang tepat, kita perlu menangkap berbagai aspek maklumat entiti, seperti deskripsinya dalam KB, konteks di mana ia disebut, dan pengetahuan struktur. Lagipun, sistem pemautan patut bekerja pada teks dari domain yang berbeza tanpa memerlukan data latihan khusus domain atau ciri-ciri reka tangan. In this work we present a neural, modular entity linking system that learns a unified dense representation for each entity using multiple sources of information, such as its description, contexts around its mentions, and its fine-grained types.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa sistem penghubung entiti yang berasal adalah berkesan dalam menyatukan sumber-sumber ini, dan melaksanakan secara kompetitif, kadang-kadang keluar melaksanakan sistem state-of-the-art semasa melalui set data, tanpa memerlukan mana-mana data latihan khusus domain atau ciri-ciri teknik tangan. We also show that our model can effectively 'embed' entities that are new to the KB, and is able to link its mentions accurately.", 'mk': "For accurate entity linking, we need to capture various information aspects of an entity, such as its description in a KB, contexts in which it is mentioned, and structured knowledge.  Покрај тоа, поврзувачкиот систем треба да работи на тексти од различни домени без да бара податоци за обука специфични за домените или рачно инженерирани карактеристики. In this work we present a neural, modular entity linking system that learns a unified dense representation for each entity using multiple sources of information, such as its description, contexts around its mentions, and its fine-grained types.  We show that the resulting entity linking system is effective at combining these sources, and performs competitively, sometimes out-performing current state-of-the-art systems across datasets, without requiring any domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features.  We also show that our model can effectively 'embed' entities that are new to the KB, and is able to link its mentions accurately.", 'lt': "For accurate entity linking, we need to capture various information aspects of an entity, such as its description in a KB, contexts in which it is mentioned, and structured knowledge.  Be to, susiejimo sistema turėtų dirbti su įvairių sričių tekstais, nereikalaujant konkrečiai sričiai skirtų mokymo duomenų ar rankiniu būdu sukurtų savybių. Šiame darbe pristatome nervinį, modulinį subjektą, susiejantį sistemą, kuri mokosi vienodo tankio atstovavimo kiekvienam subjektui, naudojant įvairius informacijos šaltinius, pavyzdžiui, jo aprašymą, kontekstą aplink jo paminėjimus ir jo smulkiai grūdintus tipus. We show that the resulting entity linking system is effective at combining these sources, and performs competitively, sometimes out-performing current state-of-the-art systems across datasets, without requiring any domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features.  We also show that our model can effectively 'embed' entities that are new to the KB, and is able to link its mentions accurately.", 'ml': 'ശരിയായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി നമുക്ക് ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്\u200dറെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടേണ്ടതുണ്ട്, അതിന്\u200dറെ വിവരണങ്ങള്\u200d കെ കൂടാതെ, ഒരു ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ് സിസ്റ്റം വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ജോലി ചെയ്യേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. ഡൊ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുരുഷനായ, മോഡുളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സംവിധാനത്തെ കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് എല്ലാ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു സൂക്ഷ്മ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഈ സ്രോതസ്സുകളെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഫലമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം പ്രാവര്\u200dത്ഥികമാണെന്നും, ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസ് കെബിയിലേക്കുള്ള പുതിയ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു എന്നും കാണിക്കുന്', 'mt': "For accurate entity linking, we need to capture various information aspects of an entity, such as its description in a KB, contexts in which it is mentioned, and structured knowledge.  Barra minn hekk, sistema ta’ konnessjoni għandha taħdem fuq testi minn dominji differenti mingħajr ma tirrikjedi dejta ta’ taħriġ speċifiku għad-dominju jew karatteristiċi inġinerizzati bl-idejn. F’dan ix-xogħol nippreżentaw entità newrali u modulari li torbot sistema li tagħmel rappreżentanza densa unifikata għal kull entità bl-użu ta’ diversi sorsi ta’ informazzjoni, bħad-deskrizzjoni tagħha, il-kuntesti madwar is-semmiet tagħha, u t-tipi ta’ ħbub fin tagħha. We show that the resulting entity linking system is effective at combining these sources, and performs competitively, sometimes out-performing current state-of-the-art systems across datasets, without requiring any domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features.  We also show that our model can effectively 'embed' entities that are new to the KB, and is able to link its mentions accurately.", 'no': 'For nøyaktig tilkopling av eininga må vi henta ulike informasjonsaspektar av eit entitet, som beskrivelsen i ein KB, kontekstar der den vert mengd, og strukturert kunnskap. I tillegg bør eit lenkingssystem arbeide på tekstar frå ulike domene utan å kreve domenespesifikke treningsdata eller handtekeningsfunksjonar. I dette arbeidet viser vi eit neuralt, modulart eining som lærer ein unifisert tett representasjon for kvar eining med fleire kjelder av informasjon, som beskrivelsen, kontekstar rundt minningane, og sine fin-korne typar. Vi viser at det resultatet entitetet som lenkjer systemet er effektivt i å kombinere desse kjeldene, og utfører konkurransa, noen ganger ut-utfører gjeldande status-of-art-systemet over datasett, utan å kreve nokon opplæringsdata for domenespesifikke domenespesifikke eller håndingeniar-funksjonar. Vi viser også at modellen vårt kan effektivt « embed » - einingar som er nytt til KB, og kan lenke oppmerkingane nøyaktig.', 'ro': 'Pentru conectarea corectă a entităților, trebuie să surprindem diferite aspecte informaționale ale unei entități, cum ar fi descrierea acesteia într-o KB, contextele în care este menționată și cunoștințele structurate. În plus, un sistem de legătură ar trebui să funcționeze pe texte din diferite domenii fără a necesita date de instruire specifice domeniului sau caracteristici realizate manual. În această lucrare prezentăm un sistem neural, modular de legătură a entităților care învață o reprezentare densă unificată pentru fiecare entitate folosind mai multe surse de informație, cum ar fi descrierea acesteia, contextele din jurul mențiunilor sale și tipurile sale cu granulație fină. Noi arătăm că sistemul de legătură a entităților rezultate este eficient în combinarea acestor surse și performează competitiv, uneori depășind performanțele actuale de ultimă generație în seturi de date, fără a necesita date de instruire specifice domeniului sau caracteristici proiectate manual. De asemenea, arătăm că modelul nostru poate "încorpora" efectiv entități care sunt noi în KB și este capabil să conecteze cu exactitate mențiunile sale.', 'pl': 'Aby uzyskać dokładne łączenie jednostek, musimy uchwycić różne aspekty informacyjne jednostki, takie jak jego opis w KB, konteksty, w których jest on wymieniony, oraz wiedza zorganizowana. Dodatkowo system linkowania powinien działać na tekstach z różnych domen bez wymagania specyficznych danych szkoleniowych lub ręcznie projektowanych funkcji. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy neuronowy, modułowy system łączenia jednostek, który uczy się ujednoliconej gęstej reprezentacji dla każdego podmiotu z wykorzystaniem wielu źródeł informacji, takich jak jego opis, konteksty wokół jej wzmianek i jej drobnoziarniste typy. Pokazujemy, że powstały system łączenia podmiotów jest skuteczny w łączeniu tych źródeł i działa konkurencyjnie, czasem przewyższając aktualne najnowocześniejsze systemy w zestawach danych, bez wymagania żadnych danych szkoleniowych specyficznych dla domeny lub ręcznie inżynierowanych funkcji. Pokazujemy również, że nasz model potrafi skutecznie "osadzić" podmioty, które są nowe dla KB, i jest w stanie dokładnie powiązać jej wzmianki.', 'so': "Si aad u xidhiidhaan saxda ah, waa in aynu qabsannaa arrimaha macluumaadka kala duduwan ee hay'adaha, tusaale ahaan sawiridiisa KB, warqadaha lagu sheego iyo aqoonta la dhisay. Sidoo kale nidaamka xiriirka waa in uu ka shaqeeyaa qoraal ka mid ah meelaha kala duduwan, iyadoon u baahnayn macluumaad waxbarasho gaar ah oo domain ama tayooyin lagu qoray gacmaha. In this work we present a neural, modular entity linking system that learns a unified dense representation for each entity using multiple sources of information, such as its description, contexts around its mentions, and its fine-grained types.  Waxaynu tusnaynaa in arimaha la xiriirayo ay tayo u leedahay in ay isku darsameyso asalkan, qaarkoodna si iskutallaan u sameynayaan nidaamka farshaxanta ah oo aan u baahneyn macluumaad waxbarasho gaar ah oo domain-ka ah ama tayooyin ay gacanta-engineered. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in tusaaleheennu ay si faa’iido leh u sameyn karto waxyaabaha cusub ee KB, wuxuuna awoodaa inuu si saxda ah u xiriiro macluumaadkiisa.", 'mn': "Бүтээгдэхүүний тодорхойлолтын тулд бид бүтээгдэхүүний өөр олон мэдээллийн асуудлыг КБ-д тайлбарлах хэрэгтэй. Мөн холбоотой систем нь холбоотой байдал эсвэл гар инженерчлэл өгөгдлийн шаардлагагүйгээр өөр хэсгүүдийн текст дээр ажиллах хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид мэдээллийн олон эх үүсвэрийг ашиглан нэгдсэн жигхэн хэлбэрийг суралцах мэдээллийн тухай мэдээллийн мэдээллийг ашигладаг мэдрэлийн модуль бүтээгдэхүүнийг харуулж байна. Эдгээр эх үүсвэрүүдийг нэгтгэхэд үр дүнтэй байдаг. Заримдаа өгөгдлийн санг дамжуулан орчин үеийн урлагийн системийг дамжуулан дамжуулан хийдэг. Бид мөн бидний загварын загвар КБ-д шинэ элементүүдийг эффективно 'интервейт' болгож чадна.", 'sv': 'För korrekt entitetslänkning behöver vi fånga in olika informationsaspekter av en entitet, till exempel dess beskrivning i en KB, sammanhang där den nämns och strukturerad kunskap. Dessutom bör ett länksystem fungera på texter från olika domäner utan att behöva domänspecifika utbildningsdata eller handgjorda funktioner. I detta arbete presenterar vi ett neuralt, modulärt entitetslänkande system som lär sig en enhetlig tät representation för varje entitet med hjälp av flera informationskällor, såsom dess beskrivning, sammanhang kring dess omnämnanden och dess finkorniga typer. Vi visar att det resulterande enhetslänksystemet är effektivt på att kombinera dessa källor och presterar konkurrenskraftigt, ibland överträffar nuvarande toppmoderna system över datauppsättningar, utan att behöva några domänspecifika utbildningsdata eller handkonstruerade funktioner. Vi visar också att vår modell effektivt kan "bädda in" entiteter som är nya i KB, och kan länka dess omnämnanden korrekt.', 'ta': 'சரியான பொருள் இணைப்புகளுக்கு, நாம் ஒரு பொருளின் பல்வேறு தகவல் பகுதிகளை பிடிக்க வேண்டும், போன்ற அதன் விளக்கம் KB, அதில் குறிப்பிட்ட கூடுதலாக, ஒரு இணைப்பு அமைப்பு மாறுபாடுகளில் இருந்து உரைகளில் வேலை செய்ய வேண்டும், டோமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி தரவு  இந்த வேலையில் நாம் ஒரு புதிய பொருள் இணைப்பு அமைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது ஒவ்வொரு பொருளுக்கும் ஒரு தனிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட அடர்த்தியுள்ள தனிப்பட்ட ஒற்றைப்  முடிவு பொருள் இணைப்பு அமைப்பு இந்த மூலங்களை ஒன்றிணைக்கும் போது இயங்கும், சில நேரங்களில் தற்போதைய நிலைமை- கலை அமைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்த முடியாது, எந்த டோமைன் குறி கேபிக்கு புதிய பொருள்களாக இருக்கும் பொருட்களை எங்கள் மாதிரி தெரியும் என்பதையும் காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'si': "හරියට සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපිට වෙනස් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් අල්ලගන්න ඕන, KB වලින්, සංවේදනයක් තියෙන්නේ ඒක ක තවත්, සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතියක් වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලින් පිළිබඳ පද්ධතියක් වැඩ කරන්න ඕනේ ඩෝමේන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරධාන මේ වැඩේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල්, මොඩියුලර් එක්ක පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පද්ධතියක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ හැම අයිතියක්ම ගොඩක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය මෙම ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, සමහර වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ වි අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක කිබී වලට අළුත් 'ඇන්බෙන්ඩ්' අයිතියක් පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒ වගේම එයාගේ කියන්න හරිය", 'sr': 'Za tačno povezanje entiteta, moramo uhvatiti različite informativne aspekte entiteta, kao što je njegov opis u KB-u, kontekste u kojima se spominje i strukturirano znanje. Osim toga, povezan sistem bi trebao raditi na tekstima iz različitih domena bez zahteva podataka o obuci specifičnih domena ili stručnjaka za ruke. U ovom poslu predstavljamo nervni, modularni entitet koji povezuje sistem koji uči ujedinjenu gustu predstavu za svaku entitet koristeći višestruke izvore informacija, kao što su njegov opis, konteksti oko spomena i njenih vrsta finog zrnca. Pokazujemo da je rezultatni sistem povezivanja entiteta efikasan u kombinaciji tih izvora i izvodi konkurentno, ponekad izvršavajući trenutne stanje umjetnih sistema preko seta podataka, bez zahteva bilo kakvih podataka za obuku na domenu ili stručnjak na rukama. Takoðe pokazujemo da naš model može učinkovito "ukljuèiti" entitate koje su nove na KB-u, i moæi da poveže taèno spomenute.', 'ur': "ایک ایستی کی مختلف معلومات کی نسبت لینے کی ضرورت ہے، جیسے اس کی توصیف ایک کیب میں، اس کی نسبت اور ساختہ علم میں لکھی جاتی ہے. اور اضافہ، ایک لینک سیسٹم کو مختلف ڈومین سے متصل کرنے کے لئے کام کرنا چاہیے بغیر ڈومین کے مطابق تعلیم دیٹا یا ہاتھ انجینر کے متصل کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم اس کام میں ایک نئورل، موڈولر اینٹنی کی تہہ سیستم کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں جو ہر ایک کے لئے ایک متحدہ گہری نمونش کی تعلیم سکھاتا ہے، اس کی تعریف، اس کے ذکر کے اطراف اور اس کے بہترین دانے کی طرح استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ نتیجہ انٹیسیٹ لینگ سیستم ان سوروں کو جمع کرنے کے لئے مفید ہے اور بعض اوقات میں دئیاتسٹ کے درمیان موجود ایٹیسیٹ کی سیستموں کو بغیر کسی ڈومین کے مطابق تطابق ڈیٹ یا ہاتھ انجینر کے مطابق عمل کرتا ہے. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل اثبات کے ساتھ 'ایمبر' ایٹنیٹیوں کو جو KB کے لئے نئی ہیں، اور اس کے ذکر کو دقیقاً متصل کر سکتے ہیں.", 'vi': 'Để kết nối thực thể chính xác, chúng ta cần nắm bắt các khía cạnh thông tin khác nhau của một thực thể, như mô tả của nó trong một KB, các ngữ cảnh mà nó được nhắc đến, và kiến thức cơ bản. Thêm vào đó, một hệ thống liên kết sẽ hoạt động trên văn bản từ các lĩnh vực khác nhau mà không cần dữ liệu giáo huấn đặc biệt hay tính năng khéo léo. Trong công trình này chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống liên kết cấu trúc thần kinh, điều chỉnh, nó học một sự mô tả tỉ mỉ hợp nhất cho mỗi thực thể sử dụng nhiều nguồn thông tin, như mô tả, các ngữ cảnh xung quanh những đề cập, và các loại sắc màu. Chúng tôi cho thấy hệ thống liên kết nguồn kết quả có hiệu quả để kết hợp các nguồn này, và có khả năng cạnh tranh, đôi khi hiện ra các hệ thống hiện đại trong nội bộ dữ liệu, mà không cần dữ liệu giáo huấn hay nhân tạo. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy rằng mô hình của chúng tôi có thể "nhúng" các thực thể mới với KB, và có thể liên kết những chỉ dẫn chính xác hơn.', 'uz': "Muddati bogʻ'lanish uchun biz bir narsa maʼlumot tarkibini qabul qilish kerak, masalan KB'da taʼrif qilishi kerak, bu narsalarning ko'rsatiladigan taʼminot va ma'lumotni qo'llash kerak. @ info Bu vazida biz bir nechta maʼlumot manbalari yordamida bir nechta tarkibini o'rganadigan neyrol, moduly bogʻ'liq tizimni ishlatamiz. Bu bir xil narsalarning taʼminotlari, taʼriflari, taʼminotlarining orasidagi taʼminlovchilar va bir yaxshi qo'llangan turlari. Biz natijada bogʻ'liq tizimi shu manbanlarni birlashtirishda ishlaydi, va ba'zi marta maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi sanat tizimlarni bajarishni bajaradi, hech qachon domen uchun foydalanuvchi maʼlumot yoki qoʻllanmagan imkoniyatlar kerak emas. Biz bu modelmiz KB'ga yangi obʼektlarni ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin va uning ma'lumotlarini tasdiqlash mumkin.", 'da': "For at opnå nøjagtig sammenkædning af enheder er vi nødt til at indfange forskellige informationsaspekter af en enhed, såsom dens beskrivelse i en KB, sammenhænge, hvor den nævnes, og struktureret viden. Derudover bør et sammenkædningssystem fungere på tekster fra forskellige domæner uden at kræve domænespecifikke træningsdata eller håndlavede funktioner. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi et neuralt, modulært enhedssammenkædningssystem, der lærer en samlet tæt repræsentation for hver enhed ved hjælp af flere kilder til information, såsom dens beskrivelse, sammenhænge omkring dens omtaler og dens finkornede typer. Vi viser, at det resulterende enhedssammenkædningssystem er effektivt til at kombinere disse kilder og fungerer konkurrencedygtigt, nogle gange bedre end nuværende state-of-the-art systemer på tværs af datasæt, uden at kræve domænespecifikke træningsdata eller håndkonstruerede funktioner. Vi viser også, at vores model effektivt kan 'integrere' enheder, der er nye for KB, og er i stand til at linke dens omtaler nøjagtigt.", 'bg': 'За точното свързване на субектите трябва да уловим различни информационни аспекти на дадено предприятие, като описанието му в КБ, контекстите, в които е споменато, и структурираното знание. Освен това системата за свързване трябва да работи върху текстове от различни домейни, без да изисква специфични за домейна данни за обучение или ръчно проектирани функции. В тази работа представяме невронна, модулна система за свързване на единици, която научава единно плътно представяне за всяко същество, използвайки множество източници на информация, като описанието му, контекстите около споменаването му и фините му типове. Показваме, че получената система за свързване на единици е ефективна при комбинирането на тези източници и изпълнява конкурентно, понякога по-добре от съвременните системи в набори от данни, без да се изискват специфични данни за обучение или ръчно проектирани функции. Също така показваме, че нашият модел може ефективно да "вгражда" обекти, които са нови в КБ, и е в състояние да свърже неговите споменания точно.', 'hr': 'Za tačnu vezu entiteta, moramo uhvatiti različite informativne aspekte entiteta, kao što je opis u KB-u, kontekste u kojima se spominje i strukturirano znanje. Osim toga, povezan sustav bi trebao raditi na tekstima iz različitih domena bez zahtjeva podataka o obuci specifičnih domena ili stručnjaka s rukama. U ovom poslu predstavljamo sustav povezivanja neuralnog, modularnog entiteta koji uči ujedinjenu gustu predstavu za svaku entitetu koristeći višestruke izvore informacija, poput njenog opisa, konteksta oko njenih spomena i njenih vrsta finog zrnca. Pokazujemo da je rezultatni sustav povezivanja entiteta učinkovit u kombinaciji tih izvora i čini konkurentno, ponekad izvršavajući trenutne stanje umjetničke sustave u podacima, bez zahtjeva bilo kakvih podataka za obuku specifičnih domena ili stručnjaka s rukama. Također pokazujemo da naš model može učinkovito "uključiti" entitate koje su nove s KB-om i moći precizno povezati spomena.', 'id': "Untuk menghubungkan entitas akurat, kita perlu menangkap berbagai aspek informasi dari entitas, seperti deskripsinya dalam KB, konteks di mana itu disebut, dan pengetahuan strukturasi. Selain itu, sistem penghubung harus bekerja pada teks dari domain yang berbeda tanpa membutuhkan data latihan spesifik domain atau fitur rekayasa tangan. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mempersembahkan entitas neural, modular yang menghubungkan sistem yang mempelajari sebuah representation padat bersatu untuk setiap entitas menggunakan berbagai sumber informasi, seperti deskripsinya, konteks sekitar sebutan, dan tipe-tipe gandum. Kami menunjukkan bahwa sistem penghubung entitas hasilnya efektif dalam menggabungkan sumber-sumber ini, dan berkompetitif, kadang-kadang luar-performing sistem state-of-the-art saat ini di seluruh dataset, tanpa membutuhkan data pelatihan spesifik domain atau ciri-ciri rekayasa tangan. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa model kami dapat secara efektif 'embed' entitas yang baru ke KB, dan dapat menghubungkan sebutan dengan tepat.", 'de': 'Für eine genaue Entity-Verknüpfung müssen wir verschiedene Informationsaspekte einer Entität erfassen, wie z.B. ihre Beschreibung in einer KB, Kontexte, in denen sie erwähnt wird, und strukturiertes Wissen. Darüber hinaus sollte ein Verlinkungssystem auf Texten aus verschiedenen Domänen arbeiten, ohne domänenspezifische Trainingsdaten oder handgefertigte Features zu benötigen. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir ein neuronales, modulares Entitätenverknüpfungssystem vor, das eine einheitliche dichte Repräsentation für jede Entität lernt, indem es mehrere Informationsquellen verwendet, wie ihre Beschreibung, Kontexte um ihre Erwähnungen und ihre feinkörnigen Typen. Wir zeigen, dass das resultierende Entity-Linking-System diese Quellen effektiv kombiniert und wettbewerbsfähig ist und bisweilen aktuelle State-of-the-Art-Systeme über Datensätze hinweg übertrifft, ohne domänenspezifische Trainingsdaten oder handgefertigte Funktionen zu benötigen. Wir zeigen auch, dass unser Modell effektiv Entitäten "einbetten" kann, die neu für die KB sind, und in der Lage ist, ihre Erwähnungen präzise zu verknüpfen.', 'fa': 'برای ارتباط دقیق، ما باید نقطه\u200cهای اطلاعات مختلف از یک ارتباط را بگیریم، مثل توصیف آن در یک کیب، موقعیت\u200cهایی که در آن اشاره می\u200cشود، و دانش ساخته می\u200cشود. به اضافه، یک سیستم ارتباط باید روی متن\u200cها از دامنه\u200cهای مختلف کار کند بدون نیازی به داده\u200cهای آموزش ویژه\u200cهای دامنه یا ویژه\u200cهای مهندسی دستی. در این کار ما یک شرکت عصبی و مودیولی را نشان می دهیم که سیستم متصل کردن سیستم را یاد می دهد که یک نمایش متصل برای هر شرکت با استفاده از منبع متعدد اطلاعات، مثل توصیف آن، متصل اطراف اش، و نوع متعدد آن را یاد می دهد. ما نشان می دهیم که سیستم ارتباط با ارتباط برقراری این منبع\u200cها موثر است و بعضی وقتها سیستم\u200cهای موجود هنری را از طریق مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد، بدون نیازی به داده\u200cهای آموزش ویژه\u200cای به دامنه\u200cها یا ویژه\u200cهای دستی. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که مدل ما می تواند به طور تاثیر entities "embed" را که به کیب جدید هستند، به طور تاثیر ارتباط برقرار کند.', 'nl': "Voor een nauwkeurige entiteitskoppeling moeten we verschillende informatieaspecten van een entiteit vastleggen, zoals de beschrijving in een KB, contexten waarin het wordt genoemd en gestructureerde kennis. Bovendien moet een linking systeem werken op teksten uit verschillende domeinen zonder domeinspecifieke trainingsgegevens of hand-engineered functies. In dit werk presenteren we een neuraal, modulair entiteitskoppelingssysteem dat een uniforme dichte representatie leert voor elke entiteit met behulp van meerdere informatiebronnen, zoals zijn beschrijving, contexten rond zijn vermeldingen en zijn fijnkorrelige types. We laten zien dat het resulterende entity linking systeem effectief is in het combineren van deze bronnen, en concurrerend presteert, soms beter presteert dan huidige state-of-the-art systemen over datasets, zonder dat domeinspecifieke trainingsgegevens of hand-engineered functies vereist zijn. We laten ook zien dat ons model effectief entiteiten kan 'embedden' die nieuw zijn voor de KB, en in staat is om de vermeldingen nauwkeurig te koppelen.", 'tr': "Dyggat bir zat bilen baglaşdyrmak üçin bize birnäçe hili bir zat bilen meňzeş informasiýa görnüşleri taýtmak gerek, näçe bir KB-de tasvir edilýän contextlerde agzalan we strukturýan bilgi ýaly. Ayrıca, bir bağlama sistemi başga alanlardan metinler üzerinde dominiň spesifik eğitim maglumatyny ya da el inženjerlendirim özellikleri gereksiz işlemeli. Bu işde biz neural, modüler bir sistemasy bilen birleşme sistemasyny taýýarlaýarys. Bu sistemada her bir zat üçin bir näçe informasiýa çeşmelerini ulanan ynyň birleşme şeklini öwredýär. Şuny ýaly waspy, günahlarynyň daşyndaky contextler we iňe gaty täplerini saýlaýarlar. Biz bu çeşmeleri birleşdirmek üçin netijeli bir sistemiň barlanmasynyň etkinleýändigini görkeýäris we käwagt daty setirlerinde häzirki möhüm möhüm sistemalary çykaryp barýar. Munuň hatda biziň nusgamyzyň käbiňe täze bir 'integr' taýýarlap biljekdigini görkezip bilýäris we muny dogry bir baglaýyp biler.", 'af': "Vir presies entiteite wat verbind, moet ons verskeie inligting aspekte van 'n entiteite, soos sy beskrywing in 'n Kb, kontekse waarin dit geantwoord word en struktureerde kennis. In addition, a linking system should work on texts from different domains without requiring domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features. In hierdie werk stel ons 'n neurale, modulare entiteit wat lig stelsel wat leer 'n eenvoudige dens voorstelling vir elke entiteit wat veelvuldige bronne van inligting gebruik, soos sy beskrywing, konteks rondom sy bepaalde en sy fyn-graan tipes. Ons wys dat die resultateerde entiteite wat verkop stelsel is effektief by die kombinasie van hierdie bronne, en doen medelyk, soms uit-uitvoer huidige staat-of-kunste stelsels oor datastelle, sonder om enige domein-spesifieke onderwerp data of hand-inženiere funksies te vereis. Ons wys ook dat ons model kan effektief 'embed' entiteite wat nuwe is na die Kb, en is in staat na skakel sy bemenging presies.", 'sq': 'Për lidhjen e saktë të njësisë, ne duhet të kapim aspekte të ndryshme informacioni të njësisë, të tilla si përshkrimi i saj në KB, kontekste në të cilat përmendet dhe njohuri strukturuar. Përveç kësaj, një sistem lidhjeje duhet të punojë mbi tekste nga fusha të ndryshme pa kërkuar të dhëna të trainimit specifik për fushën apo karakteristika të inxhinieruara me dorë. In this work we present a neural, modular entity linking system that learns a unified dense representation for each entity using multiple sources of information, such as its description, contexts around its mentions, and its fine-grained types.  Ne tregojmë se njësia që lidh sistemin rezultues është e efektshme në kombinimin e këtyre burimeve dhe funksionon në mënyrë konkurruese, ndonjëherë jashtë funksionimit të sistemeve aktuale të state-of-the-art nëpërmjet grupeve të dhënash, pa kërkuar asnjë të dhënë trajnimi specifike në domeni apo karakteristika të inxhinieruara me dorë. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se modeli ynë mund të përfshijë në mënyrë efektive njësi të reja në KB dhe është në gjendje të lidhë përmendimet e tij me saktësi.', 'ko': '정확한 실체 링크를 실현하기 위해 우리는 실체의 각 정보를 포획해야 한다. 예를 들어 지식 라이브러리에서 실체에 대한 묘사, 실체의 상하문과 구조화된 지식을 언급해야 한다.또한 링크 시스템은 서로 다른 분야에서 온 텍스트를 처리할 수 있어야 하며 특정 분야의 교육 데이터나 수동 디자인 기능이 필요하지 않아야 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 신경적이고 모듈화된 실체 링크 시스템을 제기했다. 이 시스템은 여러 개의 정보원을 이용하여 모든 실체의 통일된 밀집 표시, 예를 들어 그 묘사, 언급된 상하문과 그 세립도 유형을 배운다.우리는 이로 인해 발생하는 실체 링크 시스템이 이러한 원본을 조합할 때 효과적이고 경쟁력이 있으며 때로는 데이터 집합에서 현재 가장 선진적인 시스템을 초과하고 특정한 분야의 교육 데이터나 수동 디자인 기능이 필요하지 않다는 것을 증명했다.또한 우리의 모델은 지식 라이브러리에 효과적으로 새로운 실체를 삽입할 수 있고 언급된 내용을 정확하게 연결할 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'az': "Əksinə bağlanmaq üçün, bənzər bir məlumatın müxtəlif məlumatı almalıyıq, bənzər bir KB vasitəsində yazıldığı məlumatı, yada edildiyi məlumatı və strukturlu bilgi. Əvvəlcə, bağlama sistemi, domain-specific təhsil məlumatlarını ya da əl inženjerləndirilən məlumatların üstündə çalışmalı. Bu işdə hər bir entitə üçün çoxlu məlumatın mənbələrini istifadə edən bir nöral, modular bir sistemi ilə birləşdirən bir şey göstəririk. Nəyrə, məlumatlarının ətrafındakı müxtəlif məlumatları və təmiz türləri istifadə edir. Biz bu mənbələri birləşdirmək üçün müvəffəqiyyəti olan məlumat sistemini göstəririk, bəzilərində məlumat qurma sistemlərinin istifadə edilməsi üçün müqayisədə müvəffəqiyyəti edər, bəzilərində məlumat qurma sistemlərinin istifadə edilməsi üçün heç bir domain-specific təhsil məlumatlarını və əl inženjerlərini istəmədən. Biz də modellərimizin KB-ə yeni olan 'integr' məlumatlarını etkili olaraq göstərir və bu məlumatlarını doğrudan bağlaya bilər.", 'bn': 'সঠিক বস্তুর লিঙ্কের জন্য, আমাদের একটি বস্তুর বিভিন্ন তথ্যের বিষয় ধরে নিতে হবে, যেমন কেবিতে এর বর্ণনা, যেসব বিষয়ে উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে এবং কাঠামো জ এছাড়াও, একটি লিংকিং সিস্টেম বিভিন্ন ডোমেনের টেক্সটের উপর কাজ করা উচিত, কোন ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট ট ট্রেনিং ডাটা অথবা হাত- এই কাজে আমরা একটি নিউরেল, মডিউলিক সিস্টেম সংযুক্ত বস্তুর সামনে উপস্থিত করি যা প্রত্যেক বস্তুর জন্য একটি একত্রিত গরম প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে পারে বেশ কয়েকটি তথ্য উৎস আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ফলাফলের সংযোগ ব্যবস্থা এই উৎসের সাথে যুক্ত করার কার্যকর এবং প্রতিযোগিতায় কাজ করে, মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে ডাটাসেটের বর্তমান অবস্থান-শিল্প ব্যবস্থ আমরা একই সাথে দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল কার্যকরীভাবে কেবির কাছে নতুন বস্তুগুলোর কাছে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে এবং তার মনোভাব সঠি', 'bs': 'Za tačnu vezu entiteta, moramo uhvatiti različite informativne aspekte entiteta, kao što je njegov opis u KB-u, kontekste u kojima se spominje i strukturirano znanje. Osim toga, povezan sistem bi trebao raditi na tekstima iz različitih domena bez zahtjeva podataka o obuci specifičnih domena ili stručnjaka za ruke. U ovom poslu predstavljamo nervni, modularni entitet koji povezuje sistem koji uči ujedinjenu gustu predstavu za svaku entitet koristeći višestruke izvore informacija, kao što su njegov opis, konteksti oko spomena i njenih vrsta finog zrnca. Pokazujemo da je rezultatni sistem povezivanja entiteta učinkovit u kombinaciji tih izvora i čini konkurentno, ponekad izvršavajući trenutne države umjetnosti u podacima, bez zahtjeva bilo kakvih podataka za obuku specifičnih domena ili stručnjaka s rukama. Također pokazujemo da naš model može učinkovito "uključiti" entitate koje su nove na KB-u, i moći precizno povezati spomena.', 'hy': "Որպեսզի ճշգրիտ անհատականությունը կապված լինի, մենք պետք է վերցնենք մի անհատականության տարբեր տեղեկատվական ասպեկտներ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ նրա նկարագրությունը ԿԲ-ում, կոնտեքստները, որոնց մեջ այն նշված է, և կառուցված Ավելին, կապելու համակարգը պետք է աշխատի տարբեր բնագավառների տեքստների վրա առանց պահանջելու բնագավառների մասնավոր ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ կամ ձեռքի ճարտարագիտական հատկություններ: Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային, մոդուլյար էակ, որը կապում է համակարգը, որը սովորում է յուրաքանչյուր էակի համար միավոր խտուն ներկայացում, օգտագործելով բազմաթիվ ինֆորմացիայի աղբյուրներ, ինչպիսիք են նրա նկարագրությունը, կոնտեքստները իր հիշողո We show that the resulting entity linking system is effective at combining these sources, and performs competitively, sometimes out-performing current state-of-the-art systems across datasets, without requiring any domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features.  We also show that our model can effectively 'embed' entities that are new to the KB, and is able to link its mentions accurately.", 'sw': 'Kwa ajili ya kuunganisha vifaa sahihi, tunahitaji kukutana vipande mbalimbali vya taarifa vya entity, kama vile maelezo yake katika KB, matatizo ambayo yanatajwa na maarifa yaliyotengenezwa. Kwa nyongeza, mfumo wa kuunganisha unapaswa kufanya kazi kwenye maandishi kutoka maeneo tofauti bila kuhitaji takwimu maalum za mafunzo ya ndani au vipengele vinavyotengenezwa mkono. Katika kazi hii tunaweka mfumo wa kuunganisha ubongo, utaratibu ambao unajifunza uwakilishi wa moja kwa moja kwa kila entity kwa kutumia vyanzo mbalimbali vya habari, kama vile maelezo yake, matatizo yanayozunguka kutajwa kwake, na aina yake ya vizuri. Tunaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa kuunganisha na taasisi hii una ufanisi mkubwa katika kuunganisha vyanzo hivi, na hufanya kazi kwa ushindani, wakati mwingine hatuna mifumo ya sanaa ya sasa katika seti za data, bila kuhitaji taarifa maalum za mafunzo ya ndani au vifaa vinavyotengenezwa mkono. Tunaonyesha pia kuwa mifano yetu inaweza kuwa na ufanisi wa vifaa vinavyotengenezwa na KB, na inaweza kuunganisha tahadhari zake kwa sahihi.', 'ca': "Per a un enllaç precis d'entitat, hem de capturar diversos aspectes d'informació d'una entitat, com la seva descripció en un KB, els contextos en els quals es menciona, i el coneixement estructurat. A més, un sistema de connexió hauria de treballar amb textos de dominis diferents sense requerir dades de capacitació específices per domini ni característiques enginyeries manuals. En aquesta feina presentem un sistema neuronal i modular de connexió que aprene una representació densa unificada per cada entitat utilitzant múltiples fonts d'informació, com la seva descripció, els contextos al voltant de les seves mencions, i els seus tipus fins. Mostrem que el sistema d'enllaç de l'entitat resultant és eficaç en combinar aquestes fonts, i funciona competitivament, a vegades superant els sistemes actuals d'última generació en conjunts de dades, sense requerir dades de capacitació específices per domini ni característiques manuals. També demostram que el nostre model pot incorporar efectivament entitats que són noves al KB i que poden enllaçar les seves mencions amb precisió.", 'fi': 'Jotta kokonaisuuksien linkittäminen olisi oikein, meidän on otettava huomioon eri tietonäkökohdat kokonaisuudesta, kuten sen kuvaus KB:ssä, kontekstit, joissa se mainitaan, ja jäsennelty tieto. Lisäksi linkitysjärjestelmän tulisi toimia eri toimialueiden tekstien kanssa tarvitsematta toimialueekohtaisia koulutustietoja tai käsin suunniteltuja ominaisuuksia. Tässä työssä esitellään neuromodulaarinen entiteettilinkkijärjestelmä, joka oppii yhtenäisen tiheän edustuksen jokaiselle entiteetille käyttämällä useita tietolähteitä, kuten sen kuvausta, mainintojen ympärillä olevia konteksteja ja sen hienorakeisia tyyppejä. Osoitamme, että tuloksena oleva kokonaisuuksien linkitysjärjestelmä on tehokas yhdistämään nämä lähteet ja toimii kilpailukykyisesti, joskus paremmin kuin nykyiset huipputekniset järjestelmät tietoaineistoissa, tarvitsematta mitään toimialueekohtaisia koulutustietoja tai käsin suunniteltuja ominaisuuksia. Osoitamme myös, että mallimme pystyy tehokkaasti "upottamaan" KB:n uusia kokonaisuuksia ja linkittämään sen maininnat tarkasti.', 'am': 'ለእርግጠኛ አካባቢ ማግኘት፣ የአካባቢውን የልዩ መረጃዎችን ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፣ እንደዚህ በKB መግለጫ፣ በተወሳበት እና እውቀትን በመሠረት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ግንኙነት ሲስተም ከሌሎች ዶሜን ያሉትን ጽሑፎች ማድረግ ወይም እጁ-engineered ምርጫዎች ሳይያስፈልጋቸው ይፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ውስጥ የደዌብ እና የሞዴል አካባቢ አካባቢ፣ ለሁሉም አካባቢ የተለየ ጥልቅ መልዕክት፣ የመረጃ መልዕክቶች፣ ማስታወቂያውን እና የተመሳሰለውን እና የተመሳሳይ ዓይነቶችን እና የተመሳሰለውን ዓይነት እያስተማርነው እናቀርባለን፡፡ የምናሳየው አካል የግንኙነት አካል እነዚህን ምንጮች በመቀላቀል እና በተለይ ይሠራል፣ አንዳንድ ጊዜ ከዳታ-አርእስት የግንኙነቱን የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ማድረግ፣ ከዶሜን የተለየ መረጃዎችን ወይም እጃቸውን-engineered ምርጫዎችን አያስፈልግም፡፡ እናም ምሳሌያችን ለKB አዲስ የሆኑት አካባቢዎች አዲስ መሆኑን እንዲያሳየን እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'et': 'Üksuse täpseks lingimiseks peame hõlmama üksuse erinevaid teabeaspekte, nagu selle kirjeldus KB-s, kontekstid, milles seda mainitakse, ja struktureeritud teadmised. Lisaks peaks linkimissüsteem töötama erinevatest valdkondadest pärit tekstidega, nõudmata domeenispetsiifilisi koolitusandmeid või käsitsi projekteeritud funktsioone. Käesolevas töös tutvustame neuraalset modulaarset üksuste sidumissüsteemi, mis õpib iga üksuse ühtset tihedat esindust, kasutades mitmeid teabeallikaid, näiteks selle kirjeldust, konteksti selle märkimise ümber ja peeneteralisi tüüpe. Näitame, et saadud üksuste sidumise süsteem on tõhus nende allikate kombineerimisel ja toimib konkurentsivõimeliselt, mõnikord ületades praeguseid tipptasemel süsteeme andmekogumites, ilma et oleks vaja mingeid domeenispetsiifilisi koolitusandmeid või käsitsi projekteeritud funktsioone. Samuti näitame, et meie mudel suudab tõhusalt "manustada" üksusi, mis on KB jaoks uued ja suudab selle märkimisi täpselt siduda.', 'cs': 'Pro přesné propojení entit potřebujeme zachytit různé informační aspekty entity, jako je její popis v KB, kontexty, ve kterých je zmíněn, a strukturované znalosti. Navíc by měl propojovací systém pracovat na textech z různých domén, aniž by vyžadoval specifická tréninková data nebo ručně vytvořené funkce. V této práci představujeme neuronový modulární systém propojení entit, který se učí jednotnou hustou reprezentaci pro každou entitu pomocí více zdrojů informací, jako je její popis, kontext kolem jejích zmínek a její jemnozrnné typy. Ukazujeme, že výsledný systém propojení entit je efektivní při kombinování těchto zdrojů a provádí konkurenční, někdy překonávající současné nejmodernější systémy napříč datovými sadami, aniž by vyžadoval žádná doménově specifická tréninková data nebo ručně vytvořené funkce. Dále ukazujeme, že náš model dokáže efektivně "vkládat" entity, které jsou v KB nové, a je schopen přesně propojit jeho zmínky.', 'jv': 'Sampeyang ono sing wis nambah, awak dhéwé kudu nggawe informasi luwih sampeyan karo Entih, kayai sampeyan siurang lan kB, contexte sing dadi nambah sak, lan sak ngerasakno Additionly, a linking System should work on texts from separated domain airs not obliring domain-special Learning data or hand-engined settings. Nang iki trabah, kita nambah sistem anyar, modul kanggo nggawe sistem sing nyenggawe sistem sing lemudhe kut nggawe sistem sing digunakno kanggo sabên Entèji sing gambar kelompok informasi sing tini ngono nggawe sistem sing berarti, winih, contextual kedisunyatan sampek lan didasai winih sing berarti. We show that the output Enty linking System is effectual at combining this source, and sings Competitionly, often out-effecting current state-of-the-arts sistems inter dataset, not obliging some domain-special curing data or hand-injected settings. If you would like to do so, you can go online. Awak dhéwé mung ngomong nik model sing bisa akeh "embed" nggawe enyari bagian kanggo Kib, lan iso disenyakake beraksi tigah-tigah.', 'sk': 'Za natančno povezovanje entitet moramo zajeti različne informacijske vidike subjekta, kot so njegov opis v KB, konteksti, v katerih je omenjen, in strukturirano znanje. Poleg tega bi moral sistem povezovanja delovati na besedilih z različnih področij, ne da bi zahteval podatke o usposabljanju za posamezno področje ali ročno izdelane funkcije. V tem delu predstavljamo nevronski, modularni sistem povezovanja entitet, ki se uči enotne goste reprezentacije za vsako entiteto z uporabo več virov informacij, kot so opis, konteksti okoli njegovih omemb in drobnozrnati tipi. Pokazujemo, da je nastali sistem povezovanja entitet učinkovit pri združevanju teh virov in deluje konkurenčno, včasih bolj uspešno kot sedanji najsodobnejši sistemi v zbirkah podatkov, ne da bi zahtevali podatke o usposabljanju za posamezno področje ali ročno izdelane funkcije. Pokazujemo tudi, da lahko naš model učinkovito "vdeli" subjekte, ki so novi v KB, in lahko natančno poveže njegove omembe.', 'bo': 'For accurate entity linking, we need to capture various information aspects of an entity, such as its description in a KB, contexts in which it is mentioned, and structured knowledge. Additionally, a linking system should work on texts from different domains without requiring domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features. In this work we present a neural, modular entity linking system that learns a unified dense representation for each entity using multiple sources of information, such as its description, contexts around its mentions, and its fine-grained types. Name We show that the resulting entity linking system is effective at combining these sources, and performs competitively, sometimes out-performing current state-of-the-art systems across datasets, without requiring any domain-specific training data or hand-engineered features. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱིས་དེབ་KB་ལ་གསར་བ་ཡིན་པའི་"སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱས་ཆོག་ཡིན་པ', 'ha': 'Ji da shirin halin da aka daidaita, za\'a buƙata mu kãma masu sakan lãbãri masu cikin abun, kamar misãlin bayyana a KB, masu samun da aka ambaci shi da shi, da kuma aka baka wani ilmi. Ƙarawa, wani na haɗi ya kamata ya yi aiki a kan matsayin ayuka na daban-daban, kuma bã ya kasa buƙata data na tsari-ɗabi\'a gudan ko wasu tsarin da aka nuna hannayen-hannayen. Daga wannan aikin, Munã halatar da wani tsarin da ke haɗi da nau\'in neural, modulu wanda ke da shi, yana sanar da wani shirin nunowa mai haɗi wa duk abun da ke amfani da sourcen tsari masu yawa, kamar misali da fassararsa, da misãlai masu ƙaranci a kẽwayen sunansa, da nau\'in da aka rubũta shi. Tuna nũna cewa abun da ke haɗi da waɗannan sources yana da amfani da shi, kuma yana aiki daidai, a lokacin da za\'a tafiyar da halin-sanatarwa na yanzu-kowaci, ko kuma bã ya kasancẽwa ga wani tsarin da aka tsare wa-Domen ko wani tsari na-da-hannayen-aka-gabatar. Tuna nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya iya amfani da masu "da aka shigar da" abubuwa masu tsari zuwa KB, kuma yana iya iya samun sunayensa da saidai.', 'he': 'For accurate entity linking, we need to capture various information aspects of an entity, such as its description in a KB, contexts in which it is mentioned, and structured knowledge.  בנוסף, מערכת חיבור צריכה לעבוד על טקסטים מתחומים שונים מבלי לדרוש נתונים אימונים ספציפיים לתחום או תכונות הנדסה ידנית. בעבודה הזו אנו מציגים יחידה עצבית, מודולרית שמקשרת מערכת שלמדה מייצג צפוף מאוחד לכל יחידה בשימוש מקורות רבים של מידע אנחנו מראים שמערכת הקשר היחידה הנוצרת היא יעילה בשילוב המקורים האלה, ומופקדת באופן תחרותי, לפעמים מחוץ למערכות המיוחדות הנוכחיות במערכת נתונים, מבלי לדרוש מידע אימון ספציפי לתחום או תכונות הנדסה ידנית. אנחנו גם מראים שהדוגמנית שלנו יכולה להכניס באופן יעיל יחידות חדשות לקי.בי.איי, והיא מסוגלת לקשר את הזכרונות שלה בדיוק.'}
{'en': 'An Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks', 'ar': 'نظام استخراج البصيرة في الأدب الطبي الحيوي مع الشبكات العصبية العميقة', 'es': 'Un sistema de extracción de conocimientos sobre literatura biomédica con redes neuronales profundas', 'pt': 'Um sistema de extração de insights sobre literatura biomédica com redes neurais profundas', 'fr': "Un système d'extraction d'informations sur la littérature biomédicale avec des réseaux neuronaux profonds", 'ja': 'ディープニューラルネットワークを備えたバイオメディカル文献に関する洞察抽出システム', 'hi': 'गहरी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ BioMedical साहित्य पर एक अंतर्दृष्टि निष्कर्षण प्रणाली', 'zh': '基于深度神经网络生物医学文献洞察提取系统', 'ru': 'Система извлечения информации о биомедицинской литературе с глубокими нейронными сетями', 'ga': 'Córas Astarraingthe Léargas ar Litríocht Bhithleighis le Líonraí Néaracha Doimhneacha', 'el': 'Ένα σύστημα εξαγωγής πληροφοριών στη βιοιατρική λογοτεχνία με βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα', 'ka': 'ბიომედიციო ლიტურატიის ინსტრექციის სისტემა, რომელიც ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელებით', 'hu': 'Egy betekintési extrakciós rendszer a bioorvosi irodalomról mélyidegi hálózatokkal', 'it': 'Un sistema di estrazione approfondita sulla letteratura biomedica con reti neurali profonde', 'kk': 'Биомедицина әдебиетінің түпнұсқа невралдық желілері туралы инзит тарқату жүйесі', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'An Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks', 'ms': 'Sistem Ekstraksi Insight pada Literatur BioMedikal dengan Rangkaian Neural Tepat', 'ml': 'An Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks', 'mt': 'Sistema ta’ Estrazzjoni fil-Ħarsa fuq il-Litteratura Bijomedika b’Netwerks Newrali Profondi', 'no': 'An Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks', 'mn': 'Биологийн эмчилгээний зохиолын тухай "Insight Extraction System" гэх мэт мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд', 'pl': 'System ekstrakcji wglądu w literaturę biomedyczną z głębokimi sieciami neuronowymi', 'ro': 'Un sistem de extracție a perspectivei asupra literaturii biomedicale cu rețele neuronale profunde', 'sr': 'Sistem izvlačenja inzista o biomedicinskoj literaturi sa dubokim neuronskim mrežama', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Network', 'sv': 'Ett Insight Extraction System om biomedicinsk litteratur med djupa neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'عمیق نیورال نیٹورک کے ساتھ بیولومیڈیسی صحیح کے بارے میں ایک Insight Extraction System', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống thu nhập về ngữ học sinh khoa học với mạng thần kinh sâu', 'bg': 'Система за извличане на прозрение по биомедицинска литература с дълбоки нервни мрежи', 'nl': 'Een Inzicht Extractie Systeem op Biomedische Literatuur met Diepe Neurale Netwerken', 'da': 'Et indsigtsekstraktionssystem om biomedicinsk litteratur med dybe neurale netværk', 'hr': 'Sistem izvlačenja Insight o biomedicinskoj književnosti sa dubokim neuronskim mrežama', 'de': 'Ein Insight Extraction System zur biomedizinischen Literatur mit tiefen neuronalen Netzwerken', 'id': 'Sistem Ekstraksi Insight pada Literatur BioMedis dengan Rangkaian Neural Tepat', 'ko': '심도 있는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 생물 의학 문헌 통찰 추출 시스템', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Kutenga Mfumo wa BioMedical with deep Neural Network', 'tr': 'Biomedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks on Insight Extraction System on Deep Neural Networks', 'af': "'n Insight Extraction System op BioMedical Literature met Deep Neural Netwerke", 'sq': 'Një sistem ekstraksioni i pamjes në letërsinë biomjekësore me rrjete të thella neuronale', 'am': 'Medical Literature with Deep Neural Network', 'hy': 'Բիոբիոբժշկական գրականության ինտերնետային հանման համակարգը խորը նյարդային ցանցերով', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Sistem izvlačenja Insight o biomedicinskoj literaturi sa dubokim neuronskim mrežama', 'az': 'Bütün Nöral Sənələri ilə BioMedical Literature haqqında İşləndirilən İşləndirmə Sistemi', 'ca': "Un sistema d'extracció de visió en la literatura biomèdica amb xarxes neuronals profundes", 'et': 'Insight ekstraheerimissüsteem biomeditsiinilise kirjanduse kohta sügavate närvivõrkudega', 'cs': 'Extrakční systém informací o biomedicínské literatuře s hlubokými neuronovými sítěmi', 'fi': 'Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks', 'jv': 'an Inch extract System on BiwoMED Digitalian lan deep Neral Network', 'ha': 'Legal literature with Depth Neural Networks', 'he': 'מערכת יציאה נראית על ספרות ביורפואית עם רשתות עצביות עמוקות', 'sk': 'Sistem za ekstrakcijo vpogleda na biomedicinsko literaturo z globokimi živčnimi mrežami', 'bo': 'An Insight Extraction System on BioMedical Literature with Deep Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'Mining biomedical text offers an opportunity to automatically discover important facts and infer associations among them. As new scientific findings appear across a large collection of biomedical publications, our aim is to tap into this literature to automate biomedical knowledge extraction and identify important insights from them. Towards that goal, we develop a system with novel deep neural networks to extract insights on biomedical literature. Evaluation shows our system is able to provide insights with competitive accuracy of human acceptance and its relation extraction component outperforms previous work.', 'ar': 'يوفر تعدين النص الطبي الحيوي فرصة لاكتشاف الحقائق المهمة تلقائيًا واستنتاج الارتباطات فيما بينها. نظرًا لظهور نتائج علمية جديدة عبر مجموعة كبيرة من المنشورات الطبية الحيوية ، فإن هدفنا هو الاستفادة من هذه الأدبيات لأتمتة استخراج المعرفة الطبية الحيوية وتحديد رؤى مهمة منها. لتحقيق هذا الهدف ، نقوم بتطوير نظام به شبكات عصبية عميقة جديدة لاستخراج رؤى حول الأدب الطبي الحيوي. يُظهر التقييم أن نظامنا قادر على تقديم رؤى بدقة تنافسية للقبول البشري وأن مكون استخراج علاقته يتفوق على العمل السابق.', 'pt': 'A mineração de textos biomédicos oferece a oportunidade de descobrir automaticamente fatos importantes e inferir associações entre eles. À medida que novas descobertas científicas aparecem em uma grande coleção de publicações biomédicas, nosso objetivo é explorar essa literatura para automatizar a extração de conhecimento biomédico e identificar insights importantes a partir deles. Para esse objetivo, desenvolvemos um sistema com novas redes neurais profundas para extrair insights sobre a literatura biomédica. A avaliação mostra que nosso sistema é capaz de fornecer insights com precisão competitiva de aceitação humana e seu componente de extração de relações supera o trabalho anterior.', 'es': 'El texto biomédico minero ofrece la oportunidad de descubrir automáticamente hechos importantes e inferir asociaciones entre ellos. A medida que aparecen nuevos hallazgos científicos en una gran colección de publicaciones biomédicas, nuestro objetivo es aprovechar esta literatura para automatizar la extracción de conocimientos biomédicos e identificar información importante a partir de ellos. Con ese objetivo, desarrollamos un sistema con nuevas redes neuronales profundas para extraer información sobre la literatura biomédica. La evaluación demuestra que nuestro sistema es capaz de proporcionar información con una precisión competitiva de aceptación humana y su componente de extracción de relaciones supera el trabajo anterior.', 'fr': "L'exploration de textes biomédicaux permet de découvrir automatiquement des faits importants et de déduire des associations entre eux. Alors que de nouvelles découvertes scientifiques apparaissent dans une vaste collection de publications biomédicales, notre objectif est de puiser dans cette littérature pour automatiser l'extraction des connaissances biomédicales et identifier les informations importantes qui en découlent. À cette fin, nous développons un système avec de nouveaux réseaux neuronaux profonds afin d'extraire des informations sur la littérature biomédicale. L'évaluation montre que notre système est capable de fournir des informations avec une précision concurrentielle de l'acceptation humaine et que sa composante d'extraction de relations surpasse les travaux précédents.", 'ja': '生物医学テキストの採掘は、重要な事実を自動的に発見し、それらの間の関連性を推論する機会を提供します。新しい科学的知見が生物医学的出版物の大規模なコレクションに広がるにつれて、私たちの目的は、この文献を活用して生物医学的知識の抽出を自動化し、それらから重要な洞察を特定することです。その目標に向けて、私たちは生物医学文献に関する洞察を抽出するために、新規の深い神経ネットワークを備えたシステムを開発します。評価によると、当社のシステムは、人間の受け入れの競争力のある正確さで洞察を提供することができ、その関係抽出コンポーネントは以前の作業を上回っています。', 'hi': 'खनन बायोमेडिकल पाठ स्वचालित रूप से महत्वपूर्ण तथ्यों की खोज करने और उनके बीच संघों का अनुमान लगाने का अवसर प्रदान करता है। जैसा कि नए वैज्ञानिक निष्कर्ष बायोमेडिकल प्रकाशनों के एक बड़े संग्रह में दिखाई देते हैं, हमारा उद्देश्य बायोमेडिकल ज्ञान निष्कर्षण को स्वचालित करने और उनसे महत्वपूर्ण अंतर्दृष्टि की पहचान करने के लिए इस साहित्य में टैप करना है। उस लक्ष्य की ओर, हम जैव चिकित्सा साहित्य पर अंतर्दृष्टि निकालने के लिए उपन्यास गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ एक प्रणाली विकसित करते हैं। मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारी प्रणाली मानव स्वीकृति की प्रतिस्पर्धी सटीकता के साथ अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करने में सक्षम है और इसका संबंध निष्कर्षण घटक पिछले काम को मात देता है।', 'zh': '掘生物医学文本给一自见要事,推其关联。 随新科学见于大生物医学出版物,因以自动化生物医学知而识要。 所以然者,开一新型深神经网络之统,以取生物医学文之见。 评估者,吾所以资人受准确性之见,取组件优于前也。', 'ru': 'Биомедицинский текст для майнинга дает возможность автоматически обнаруживать важные факты и делать среди них выводы о связях. Поскольку новые научные выводы появляются в большой коллекции биомедицинских публикаций, наша цель состоит в том, чтобы использовать эту литературу для автоматизации извлечения биомедицинских знаний и выявления важных выводов из них. Для достижения этой цели мы разрабатываем систему с новыми глубокими нейронными сетями для извлечения информации о биомедицинской литературе. Оценка показывает, что наша система способна обеспечить понимание с конкурентоспособной точностью принятия человеком, а ее компонент экстракции отношений превосходит предыдущую работу.', 'ga': 'Tugann mianadóireacht téacs bithleighis deis chun fíricí tábhachtacha a fháil amach go huathoibríoch agus cumainn eatarthu a bhaint amach. De réir mar a thagann torthaí eolaíocha nua chun solais ar fud bailiúchán mór foilseachán bithleighis, tá sé mar aidhm againn leas a bhaint as an litríocht seo chun eastóscadh eolais bithleighis a uathoibriú agus léargais thábhachtacha a aithint uathu. I dtreo na sprice sin, forbraímid córas le líonraí néarúla doimhne úra chun léargais a bhaint as litríocht bhithleighis. Léiríonn meastóireacht go bhfuil ár gcóras in ann léargais a sholáthar le cruinneas iomaíoch maidir le glacadh an duine agus go sáraíonn a chomhpháirt eastósctha gaol obair roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'ბიომედიციო ტექსტის გარეშე იქნება შესაძლებლობა, რომ ავტომატურად აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი ფაქტი და შესაძლებელოვანი აზოგაციები. როგორც ახალი მეცნიერო მონაცემები იქნება დიდი ბიომედიციო პუბულიკაციების კოლექციაში, ჩვენი მიზემი არის ამ ლიტეტურაციაში გადატანა ბიომედიციო მეცნიერო გამოცემების ამ მიზეზის მიხედვით, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით სისტემა, რომელიც ახალგაზრდება ნეიროლური ქსელებით, რომ ბიომედიციო ლიტებერტიაზე აღმოჩენოთ შესა განსაზღვრება ჩვენი სისტემის შესაძლებელია გავაკეთოთ კონკრენტებული მართლას ადამიანის მიღება და მისი შესახებ ექსტრექციის კონპონტექციის კონპექციის კონ', 'hu': 'A bányászati orvosbiológiai szöveg lehetőséget kínál arra, hogy automatikusan felfedezzük a fontos tényeket és következtetjük a közöttük lévő összefüggéseket. Mivel új tudományos eredmények jelennek meg az orvostudományi publikációk nagy gyűjteményében, célunk, hogy kihasználjuk ezt a szakirodalmat, hogy automatizáljuk az orvostudományi tudás kitermelését és azonosítsuk azokat a fontos betekintéseket. Ennek érdekében új mélyneurális hálózatokkal rendelkező rendszert fejlesztünk ki az orvostudományi irodalomra vonatkozó betekintések kinyerésére. Az értékelés azt mutatja, hogy rendszerünk képes betekintést nyújtani versenyképes pontossággal az emberi elfogadás tekintetében, és a kapcsolatkitermelési komponensei felülmúlják a korábbi munkákat.', 'el': 'Η εξόρυξη βιοϊατρικού κειμένου προσφέρει την ευκαιρία να ανακαλύψει αυτόματα σημαντικά γεγονότα και να συναχθεί συσχέτιση μεταξύ τους. Καθώς νέα επιστημονικά ευρήματα εμφανίζονται σε μια μεγάλη συλλογή βιοϊατρικών εκδόσεων, στόχος μας είναι να αξιοποιήσουμε αυτή τη βιβλιογραφία για να αυτοματοποιήσουμε την εξαγωγή βιοϊατρικής γνώσης και να εντοπίσουμε σημαντικές γνώσεις από αυτές. Προς το σκοπό αυτό, αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύστημα με νέα βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα για την εξαγωγή πληροφοριών σχετικά με τη βιοϊατρική βιβλιογραφία. Η αξιολόγηση δείχνει ότι το σύστημά μας είναι σε θέση να παρέχει πληροφορίες με ανταγωνιστική ακρίβεια της ανθρώπινης αποδοχής και το στοιχείο εξαγωγής σχέσης του ξεπερνά τις προηγούμενες εργασίες.', 'it': "Il testo biomedico minerario offre l'opportunità di scoprire automaticamente fatti importanti e dedurre associazioni tra loro. Poiché nuove scoperte scientifiche appaiono in una vasta collezione di pubblicazioni biomediche, il nostro obiettivo è quello di attingere a questa letteratura per automatizzare l'estrazione di conoscenze biomediche e identificare importanti approfondimenti da esse. Verso questo obiettivo, sviluppiamo un sistema con nuove reti neurali profonde per estrarre approfondimenti sulla letteratura biomedica. La valutazione dimostra che il nostro sistema è in grado di fornire approfondimenti con precisione competitiva sull'accettazione umana e la sua componente di estrazione delle relazioni supera il lavoro precedente.", 'lt': 'Kasybos biomedicinos tekstas suteikia galimybę automatiškai nustatyti svarbius faktus ir daryti išvadą, kad tarp jų yra asociacijos. Kadangi dideliame biomedicinų leidinių rinkinyje atsiranda naujų mokslinių tyrimų rezultatų, mūsų tikslas – pasinaudoti šia literatūra, kad būtų automatizuota biomedicinų žinių gavyba ir iš jų būtų nustatyti svarbūs supratimai. Šiuo tikslu sukuriame sistemą su naujais giliais nervų tinklais, kad gautume informaciją apie biomediciną literatūrą. Evaluation shows our system is able to provide insights with competitive accuracy of human acceptance and its relation extraction component outperforms previous work.', 'ml': 'ബൈവിമെഡിക്കല്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് സ്വയം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാര്യങ്ങളും അതിന്റെ ഇടയില്\u200d കുറച്ച് കൂടു പുതിയ ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനമുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ജീവിയ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d പ്രസംഗികങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷനാകുമ്പോള്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഈ സാഹിത്യത്തില ആ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന് മുകളില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ആഴത്തിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകളുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ബൈയോമിക്കല്\u200d  നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് മുമ്പ് ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന കാര്', 'kk': 'Балау биомедикалық мәтіні автоматты түрде маңызды факттерді табу және олардың арасындағы қатынастарын табу мүмкіндігін береді. Жаңа ғылыми тапсырмалар биомедикалық басылықтардың көп жинақтарында көрінгенде, біздің мақсатымыз бұл литератураны автоматты түрде биомедикалық білімдерді автоматты түрде тарту және олардан маңызды тү Бұл мақсат бойынша, биомедицина литературасының түсініктерін шығару үшін романдық невралдық желілері бар жүйесін жасаймыз. Біздің жүйеміздің оқиғаларымыз адамдардың қабылдауының дұрыстығын көрсетуге болады және оның қатынау компоненті алдыңғы жұмыс істемейді.', 'mn': 'Биологийн эрүүл мэндийн биологийн текст нь автоматаар чухал зүйлсийг олох боломж олгодог. Шинэ шинжлэх ухааны ололтууд биологийн эмнэлгийн хэвлэлүүд дээр харагдаж байхад бидний зорилго нь биологийн эрүүл мэндийн мэдлэгийг автоматжуулах, тэднээс хамгийн чухал ойлголт олж мэдэх юм. Энэ зорилго руу бид биологийн эмнэлгийн уран зохиолын ойлголт гаргах шинэ гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний системийг бүтээж байна. Дэлхийн үнэлгээ нь бидний системийг хүн төрөлхтний хүлээн зөвшөөрөх зөвхөн ойлголтыг харуулж чадах боломжтой ба түүний хамааралтай хамааралтай компонент нь өмнөх ажлыг гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Mining av biomedisinsk tekst tilbyr ein mulighet for automatisk oppdaging av viktige faktar og inferer tilknytingar mellom dei. Etter at nye vitenskapelige oppdagingar viser i eit stor samling av biomedisinske publikasjonar, målet vårt er å gå inn i denne literaturen for å automatisera utpakking av biomedisinske kunnskap og identifisera viktige oppdagingar frå dei. Til denne målet utviklar vi eit system med nytt dyp neuralnettverk for å utpakka innsyningar på biomedisk literatur. Evalueringa viser at systemet vårt er i stand til å gjere innsyningar med konkurrentivt nøyaktig av menneskeakseptasjon og forbindelskomponenten for ekstraksjon utfører tidlegare arbeid.', 'pl': 'Wydobywanie tekstu biomedycznego daje możliwość automatycznego odkrywania ważnych faktów i wnioskowania wśród nich skojarzeń. Ponieważ nowe odkrycia naukowe pojawiają się w dużej kolekcji publikacji biomedycznych, naszym celem jest wykorzystanie tej literatury w celu zautomatyzowania ekstrakcji wiedzy biomedycznej i identyfikacji ważnych wniosków z nich. W tym celu opracowujemy system z nowatorskimi głębokimi sieciami neuronowymi, aby uzyskać wgląd w literaturę biomedyczną. Ocena pokazuje, że nasz system jest w stanie dostarczyć informacji o konkurencyjnej dokładności akceptacji człowieka, a jego komponent ekstrakcji relacji przewyższa poprzednie prace.', 'mk': 'Mining biomedical text offers an opportunity to automatically discover important facts and infer associations among them.  Како што се појавуваат нови научни откритија низ голема колекција биомедицински публикации, нашата цел е да ја искористиме оваа литература за автоматизирање на извлекувањето биомедицинско знаење и идентификување на важни информации од нив. Towards that goal, we develop a system with novel deep neural networks to extract insights on biomedical literature.  Оценката покажува дека нашиот систем е способен да обезбеди информации со конкурентна точност на човечкото прифаќање и дека неговиот компонент за извлекување на односите ја надминува претходната работа.', 'ro': 'Textul biomedical minier oferă posibilitatea de a descoperi automat fapte importante și de a deduce asociații între ele. Pe măsură ce noile descoperiri științifice apar într-o colecție largă de publicații biomedicale, scopul nostru este de a profita de această literatură pentru a automatiza extragerea cunoștințelor biomedicale și pentru a identifica informații importante din acestea. În acest scop, dezvoltăm un sistem cu rețele neuronale profunde noi pentru a extrage informații despre literatura biomedicală. Evaluarea arată că sistemul nostru este capabil să ofere informații cu precizie competitivă a acceptării umane, iar componenta sa de extracție a relațiilor depășește lucrările anterioare.', 'sr': 'Miniranje biomedicinskog teksta pruža priliku da automatski otkrije važne činjenice i infekcije udruženja među njima. Dok se novi naučni nalazi pojavljuju u velikoj kolekciji biomedicinskih publikacija, naš cilj je pristupiti u ovu literaturu da automatski izvučemo biomedicinsko znanje i identifikujemo važne uvide od njih. Do tog cilja razvijamo sistem sa novom dubokom neuralnom mrežom da izvučemo uvid o biomedicinskoj literaturi. Evaluacija pokazuje da je naš sistem sposoban da pruži uvid konkurentnom preciznošću prihvaćanja ljudi i njegova komponenta izvlačenja odnosa iznosi prethodni rad.', 'mt': 'It-test bijomediku tal-minjieri joffri opportunità li jiġu skoperti awtomatikament fatti importanti u li jiġu konklużi assoċjazzjonijiet bejniethom. Peress li sejbiet xjentifiċi ġodda jidhru f’ġabra kbira ta’ pubblikazzjonijiet bijomediċi, l-għan tagħna huwa li niksbu użu minn din il-letteratura biex l-estrazzjoni tal-għarfien bijomediku tiġi awtomatizzata u jiġu identifikati fehmiet importanti minnhom. Lejn dak l-għan, a ħna niżviluppaw sistema b’netwerks newrali profondi ġodda biex nisfruttaw l-għarfien dwar il-letteratura bijomedika. L-evalwazzjoni turi li s-sistema tagħna hija kapaċi tipprovdi għarfien b’preċiżjoni kompetittiva tal-aċċettazzjoni mill-bniedem u l-komponent tal-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni tagħha jaqbeż ix-xogħol preċedenti.', 'so': 'Hadalka dhakhaatiirta ee Biyaatarka waxaa laga heli karaa fursad ay si automatic ah u ogaato arrimaha muhiimka ah iyo ururo yar. Sida lagu muujiyo cilmiga cusub oo ka mid ah baaritaanka dhakhaatiirta dhakhaatiirta badan, waxaynu ku talo galaynaa warqaddan si aan u bilowno soo saaridda aqoonta dhakhaatiirta iyo in ay ka muuqato aragtida muhiimka ah. Ujeedkaas waxaynu horumarinnaa nidaam aad u dheer shabakado naxaad ah si aan uga soo bixino cilmiga ku saabsan shahaadada dhakhaatiirta. Qiimeynta waxay muuqataa in nidaamkayagu uu awoodo inuu keeno waxyaabaha ku saabsan aqbalka biniaadamka iyo qaybta ka soo bixinta xiriirka uu sameeyo shaqadii hore.', 'sv': 'Mining biomedicinsk text erbjuder en möjlighet att automatiskt upptäcka viktiga fakta och härleda associationer bland dem. När nya vetenskapliga rön dyker upp i en stor samling biomedicinska publikationer är vårt mål att utnyttja denna litteratur för att automatisera biomedicinsk kunskapsutvinning och identifiera viktiga insikter från dem. Mot det målet utvecklar vi ett system med nya djupa neurala nätverk för att få insikter i biomedicinsk litteratur. Utvärdering visar att vårt system kan ge insikter med konkurrenskraftig noggrannhet i mänsklig acceptans och dess relationsextraktionskomponent överträffar tidigare arbete.', 'ur': 'بیوڈیسی ٹیکسٹ مٹینگ نے اپنا موقع اپنے ساتھ اہل حقیقت اور ان کے درمیان اتصال کرنے کے لئے ایک فرصت پیش کرتا ہے. جیسے نو سائنسی اثنات ایک بڑی زیادہ سائنسی ڈیٹریسی جماعت میں ظاہر ہوتی ہیں، ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ اس ادبیات میں داخل کرنا اور ان سے اہل اثنات پہچان سکے۔ اس مقصد کی طرف، ہم ایک سیستم کی تخلیق کریں گے جو نورال نیورال نیٹورک کے ساتھ ہے، جو بیویڈیسی ادبیات کے بارے میں نظر اٹھانے کے لئے ہے. ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارا سیستم انسان کی قبول کے مطابق مثبت کے ساتھ بصیرت حاصل کرنے کے قابل ہے اور اس کا ارتباط اٹھانے کے مطابق اگلوں کے کام سے زیادہ کام نہیں آتا۔', 'ta': 'உயிரியல் மருத்துவ உரையை சிந்தித்து அவர்களுக்கிடையே முக்கியமான உண்மைகளையும் குறைந்த இணைப்புகளையும் கண்டு புதிய அறிவியல் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் பெரிய உயிரோட மருத்துவப்பொருள்கள் மூலம் தெரியும் போது, எங்கள் இலக்கத்திற்கு இந்த கல்வியியல் தானாகவே நாம்  அந்த இலக்குக்கு முன்னால், நாம் ஒரு புதிய நிலையில் ஆழமான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை உருவாக்குகிறோம், உயிரியல் மருத்து பார்வை காட்டுகிறது நம் கணினியை மனித ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும் தேவையான திருத்தம் மற்றும் அதன் தொடர்பு பிரித்துக் கூறுகள் முந்த', 'ms': 'Menyembah teks biomedis menawarkan peluang untuk secara automatik menemukan fakta penting dan menyimpulkan persekutuan diantaranya. Sebagaimana penemuan saintifik baru muncul di seluruh koleksi besar penerbitan biomedis, tujuan kita adalah untuk menggunakan literatur ini untuk automatik pengekstrakan pengetahuan biomedis dan mengenalpasti pandangan penting dari mereka. Ke arah tujuan itu, kita mengembangkan sistem dengan rangkaian saraf yang dalam untuk mengekstrak pandangan tentang literatur biomedis. Evaluasi menunjukkan sistem kita mampu menyediakan pandangan dengan ketepatan kompetitif penerimaan manusia dan komponen ekstraksi hubungannya melebihi kerja sebelumnya.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපාර පාළුවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විද්\u200dයාපයක අලුත් විද්\u200dයාන්තික හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරකාශයක් වල ලොකු සංවිධානයක් වලින්, අපේ අරමුණ තමයි මේ ස ඒ අරමුණට, අපි පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය සාධාරණය ගැන හොඳ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාතික ජාතික ව විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය පුළුවන් විදිහට මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග සම්බන', 'uz': "Bioteksiya matnni tahrirlash uchun ularning orasidagi muhim faktlarni avtomatik aniqlashga imkoniyat beradi. Yangi ilmiy narsalar biotika tahrirlarining katta tarkibida ko'rinishi mumkin, biz bu littatlarga o'qituvchimiz biomedical ilimni avtomatik olib tashlash va ulardan muhim ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Bu maqsadda, biz yordamchi neyron tarmoqlari bilan bir tizimni o'rganamiz va biomedical littatiyatiga ko'rinishimiz uchun. Tasavvur beradi, bizning tizimimizni inson qabul qilish imkoniyatini qo'shish mumkin va uning murakkab qismi qismini oldingi ishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Tự động khám phá các sự kiện quan trọng và kết hợp với nhau. Khi những phát hiện khoa học mới xuất hiện trong một bộ sưu tập lớn các tạp chí sinh học, mục tiêu của chúng ta là khai thác các văn chương này để tự động hóa học và xác định nguồn hiểu biết quan trọng từ chúng. Về phía mục tiêu đó, chúng tôi phát triển một hệ thống với các mạng thần kinh sâu mới để tìm hiểu về văn học sinh học. Bài đánh giá cho thấy hệ thống của chúng ta có khả năng cung cấp thông tin về sự chính xác cạnh tranh của con người và các thành phần phân tích kết quả trước.', 'da': 'Mining biomedicinsk tekst giver mulighed for automatisk at opdage vigtige fakta og udlede forbindelser blandt dem. Efterhånden som nye videnskabelige resultater dukker op på tværs af en stor samling af biomedicinske publikationer, er vores mål at udnytte denne litteratur til at automatisere biomedicinsk vidensudvikling og identificere vigtige indsigter fra dem. Mod dette mål udvikler vi et system med nye dybe neurale netværk til at udtrække indsigt i biomedicinsk litteratur. Evaluering viser, at vores system er i stand til at give indsigt med konkurrencedygtig nøjagtighed i menneskelig accept, og dets relation udvinding komponent overgår tidligere arbejde.', 'bg': 'Миннодобивният биомедицински текст предлага възможност автоматично да се открият важни факти и да се направи извод на асоциации между тях. Тъй като нови научни открития се появяват в голяма колекция от биомедицински публикации, нашата цел е да се възползваме от тази литература, за да автоматизираме извличането на биомедицински знания и да идентифицираме важни прозрения от тях. За тази цел ние разработваме система с нови дълбоки невронни мрежи за извличане на прозрения за биомедицинската литература. Оценката показва, че нашата система е в състояние да предостави прозрения с конкурентна точност на човешкото приемане и връзката му екстракция компонент надминава предишната работа.', 'hr': 'Miniranje biomedicinskog teksta pruža priliku da automatski otkrije važne činjenice i povezuje udruženje među njima. Kako se novi znanstveni nalazi pojavljuju u velikoj kolekciji biomedicinskih publikacija, naš cilj je pristupiti u ovu literaturu kako bi automatski izvukao biomedicinsko znanje i identifikovao važne uvide od njih. Do tog cilja razvijamo sustav s novom dubokom neuralnom mrežom kako bi izvukli uvid o biomedicinskoj literaturi. Procjenjivanje pokazuje da je naš sustav u stanju pružiti uvid konkurentnom preciznošću prihvaćanja ljudi i njegova komponenta izvlačenja odnosa iznosi prethodni rad.', 'nl': 'Het mijnen van biomedische tekst biedt de mogelijkheid om automatisch belangrijke feiten te ontdekken en associaties daaronder te leiden. Aangezien nieuwe wetenschappelijke bevindingen verschijnen in een grote verzameling biomedische publicaties, is ons doel om deze literatuur aan te boren om biomedische kennisextractie te automatiseren en belangrijke inzichten hieruit te identificeren. Daartoe ontwikkelen we een systeem met nieuwe diepe neurale netwerken om inzichten te verkrijgen in biomedische literatuur. Evaluatie toont aan dat ons systeem in staat is om inzichten te verstrekken met concurrerende nauwkeurigheid van menselijke acceptatie en de relatieondertrekkingscomponent presteert beter dan vorig werk.', 'de': 'Das Mining biomedizinischer Texte bietet die Möglichkeit, automatisch wichtige Fakten zu entdecken und Assoziationen daraus abzuleiten. Da neue wissenschaftliche Erkenntnisse in einer großen Sammlung biomedizinischer Publikationen auftauchen, ist es unser Ziel, diese Literatur zu nutzen, um biomedizinische Wissensextraktion zu automatisieren und daraus wichtige Erkenntnisse zu identifizieren. Zu diesem Zweck entwickeln wir ein System mit neuartigen tiefen neuronalen Netzwerken, um Erkenntnisse über biomedizinische Literatur zu gewinnen. Die Auswertung zeigt, dass unser System in der Lage ist, Erkenntnisse mit wettbewerbsfähiger Genauigkeit der menschlichen Akzeptanz zu liefern und seine Beziehungsextraktionskomponente übertrifft frühere Arbeiten.', 'fa': 'متن ذخیره بیوپزشکی یک فرصت برای خودکار کشف حقیقت مهم و تعاملات بین آنها را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. همانطور که نتیجه های علمی جدید در مجموعه های بزرگی از انجمن های بیولوژیکی ظاهر می شوند، هدف ما اینه که به این ادبیات وارد بشیم تا اخراج دانش بیولوژیکی را اتوماتیک کنیم و مشاهده های مهم از آنها شناسایی کنیم. به سمت این هدف، یک سیستم با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق تازه توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا مشاهده\u200cهای درباره ادبیات بیوپزشکی بیوپزشکی را اخراج کنیم. ارزیابی نشان می دهد که سیستم ما قادر است با دقیق رقابتی از پذیرش انسان و رابطه\u200cاش نسبت به خارج شدن آن کار قبلی را بیشتر انجام دهد.', 'id': 'Menyembah teks biomedis menawarkan kesempatan untuk secara otomatis menemukan fakta penting dan menyimpulkan asosiasi diantara mereka. Karena penemuan ilmiah baru muncul di seluruh koleksi besar publikasi biomedis, tujuan kami adalah untuk mengakses sastra ini untuk otomatisasi ekstraksi ilmu biomedis dan mengidentifikasi pandangan penting dari mereka. Towards that goal, we develop a system with novel deep neural networks to extract insights on biomedical literature.  Evaluasi menunjukkan sistem kita mampu menyediakan penglihatan dengan akurasi kompetitif penerimaan manusia dan komponen ekstraksi hubungannya melebihi pekerjaan sebelumnya.', 'tr': 'K철챌체rmek bilen biomedical metini 철z-철z체ne m철h체m faktlary a챌mak we olary흫 arasynda birlikleri azat etmek 체챌in pursat berer. T채ze bilim tapylyklary birn채챌e biomedical publikasynda g철r체n첵채n 첵aly, bizi흫 maksadymyz 힊u edebi첵aty첵ada biomedical bilim alymyny otomatik etmek we olary흫 체st체nden wajyp d체힊체njelerini tanamak 체챌in guruldygymyz. Bu maksady흫 체챌in, biomedical edebi첵atyna g철z 철흫체ni a 챌mak 체챌in t채ze bir sistemany d철re첵채ris. Ta첵첵arlanmasy sistemamyzy흫 adamlary kabul etmegi흫 dogrylygyny we 철z sy첵ahatlaryny흫 da힊yrymyny흫 철흫ki i힊i 첵ok edip bilmegi m체mkin edip bil첵채r.', 'sw': 'Kuchungulia maandishi ya kitabibu yanatoa fursa ya kutambua ukweli muhimu na mashirika madogo miongoni mwao. Kama matokeo mapya ya kisayansi yanavyoonekana katika mkusanyiko mkubwa wa magazeti ya kitabibu, lengo letu ni kuingia katika fasihi hii ili kutengeneza maarifa ya kitabibu na kutambua mitazamo muhimu kutoka kwao. Mpaka lengo hilo, tunatengeneza mfumo wenye mitandao ya kisasa yenye asili ya kisasa ili kuondoa uelewa wa fasihi ya kitabibu. Uchunguzi unaonyesha mfumo wetu unaweza kutoa ufahamu wa ushindani wa uhakika wa kukubaliana na binadamu na vifaa vyake vya utekelezaji vinavyofanya kazi zilizopita.', 'ko': '생물의학 텍스트를 발굴하는 것은 중요한 사실을 자동으로 발견하고 그것들 간의 연관성을 추정할 수 있는 기회를 제공한다.대량의 생물의학 출판물에서 새로운 과학적 발견이 나타나면서 우리의 목표는 이러한 문헌을 이용하여 생물의학 지식을 자동으로 추출하고 그 중에서 중요한 견해를 찾아내는 것이다.이 목표를 실현하기 위해 우리는 생물의학 문헌의 견해를 추출하기 위해 신형 심도 신경 네트워크를 갖춘 시스템을 개발했다.평가에 의하면 우리 시스템은 경쟁력 있는 인류의 수용 정확도에 대한 견해를 제공할 수 있으며 그 관계 추출 부품의 성능은 이전의 작업보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'af': "Mining van biomediese teks bied 'n geleentheid om belangrike fakte te ontdek en onderwerp toesamenskappe onder hulle te ontdek. Soos nuwe wetenskaplike vindings verskyn deur 'n groot versameling van biomediese publikasies, is ons doel om in hierdie literateer te tap om biomediese kennis uitvoer te maak en belangrike inligtings van hulle te identifiseer. Gaan daardie doel, ontwikkel ons 'n stelsel met nuwe diep neuralnetwerke om insigte oor biomediese literature te uittrek. Evaluasie wys ons stelsel in staat om insigte te verskaf met mededingslike presisie van menslike aanvaardigheid en sy verhouding van uittrekkingskomponent uit die vorige werk.", 'sq': 'Teksti biomedical mining ofron një mundësi për të zbuluar automatikisht fakte të rëndësishme dhe për të përfshirë shoqata midis tyre. As new scientific findings appear across a large collection of biomedical publications, our aim is to tap into this literature to automate biomedical knowledge extraction and identify important insights from them.  Për këtë qëllim, ne zhvillojmë një sistem me rrjete të thella neurale të reja për të nxjerrë kuptime mbi letërsinë biomedikale. Vlerësimi tregon se sistemi ynë është në gjendje të ofrojë pamje me saktësi konkurruese të pranimit njerëzor dhe përbërja e tij e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve është më e mirë se puna e mëparshme.', 'hy': 'Բիոբիոբժշկական տեքստի արտադրումը հնարավորություն է տալիս ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերել կարևոր փաստեր և դրանց միջև կապեր հանել: Երբ նոր գիտական հայտնաբերությունները հայտնվում են կենսաբժշկական հրատարակությունների մեծ հավաքածուի միջոցով, մեր նպատակն է օգտագործել այս գրականությունը, որպեսզի ավտոմատիզացնենք կենսաբժշկական գիտելիքների վերացումը և դրանցից կարևոր ըն Այդ նպատակի ուղղությամբ մենք զարգանում ենք մի համակարգ, որն ունի նոր խորը նյարդային ցանցեր, որպեսզի բացահայտենք կենսաբժշկական գրականության մասին: Evaluation shows our system is able to provide insights with competitive accuracy of human acceptance and its relation extraction component outperforms previous work.', 'am': 'የbiomedical ጽሑፍ በመጠቀም በመካከላቸው ያሉትን አስቸኳይ ውሸቶች እና በጣም ትንሽ ጉዳዮች ማግኘት የስልጣን ማግኘት አግኝቷል፡፡ As new scientific findings appear across a large collection of biomedical publications, our aim is to tap into this literature to automate biomedical knowledge extraction and identify important insights from them.  ወደዚያም ጉዳይ፣ የጠልቅ የደዌብ መረብ ላይ የbiomedical literature ውይይትን ለመውጣት እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ማስታወቂያው ስርዓታችን የሰው መቀበል እና የግንኙነት አካባቢው የቀድሞውን ስራ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'বায়োমেডিকেল টেক্সটের মাধ্যমে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বাস্তবতা এবং কম সংস্থা খুঁজে পাওয়ার একটি স যেহেতু নতুন বৈজ্ঞানিক পরিস্থিতি বিশাল বিজ্ঞান প্রকাশের সংগ্রহের মাধ্যমে দেখা যাচ্ছে, আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে বায়োমেডিকেল জ্ঞান বের করার এই লক্ষ্যের দিকে আমরা একটি সিস্টেম গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে উন্নয়ন করি, যাতে বায়োমেডিকেল সাহিত্যের বিষয়টি বের করে  মানব গ্রহণের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতায় আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রদান করতে সক্ষম এবং এর সম্পর্ক বিনিময়ের পূর্ববর্তী কাজের প্রতিযোগিতা', 'az': 'Biyomedicin mətnlərini avtomatik olaraq mühüm faktaları keçmək və onların arasındakı birlikləri azaltmaq üçün fırsat verir. Yeni bilim tap ıları büyük bir biomedical yayınlarında göründüyü kimi, bizim amacımız bu ədəbiyyətə girmək və bunlardan möhkəm anlayışları təşkil etmək və biomedical elmdən istifadə etmək idi. Bu məqsəd tərəfində, biomedical literature barəsində nəzərləri çıxartmaq üçün yeni derin nöral a ğları olan sistemi təhsil edirik. Vəziyyət sistemimizin insan qəbul edilməsi və əlaqəsi ilə əlaqəsi, əvvəlki işdən daha çox yaxşıdır.', 'ca': "Mining biomedical text offers an opportunity to automatically discover important facts and infer associations among them.  Com apareixen nous descobriments científics a través d'una gran col·lecció de publicacions biomèdiques, el nostre objectiu és aprofitar-nos d'aquesta literatura per automatitzar l'extracció de coneixements biomèdiques i identificar insights importants d'ells. Towards that goal, we develop a system with novel deep neural networks to extract insights on biomedical literature.  La valoració mostra que el nostre sistema és capaç de proporcionar insights amb precisió competitiva de l'acceptació humana i que el seu component d'extracció de relació supera la feina anterior.", 'cs': 'Těžba biomedicínského textu nabízí příležitost automaticky objevovat důležitá fakta a odvodit mezi nimi asociace. Vzhledem k tomu, že se v rozsáhlé sbírce biomedicínských publikací objevují nové vědecké poznatky, je naším cílem využít této literatury k automatizaci extrakce biomedicínských znalostí a identifikovat z nich důležité poznatky. K tomuto cíli vyvíjíme systém s novými hlubokými neuronovými sítěmi pro získání poznatků o biomedicínské literatuře. Vyhodnocení ukazuje, že náš systém je schopen poskytnout informace s konkurenční přesností o lidské akceptaci a jeho součást extrakce vztahů překonává předchozí práci.', 'et': 'Kaevandamine biomeditsiiniline tekst pakub võimalust automaatselt avastada olulisi fakte ja järeldada nende vahelisi seoseid. Kuna uued teaduslikud tulemused ilmuvad suures biomeditsiiniliste väljaannete kogus, on meie eesmärk kasutada seda kirjandust, et automatiseerida biomeditsiiniliste teadmiste hankimine ja tuvastada neist olulised teadmised. Selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks töötame välja uudsete sügavate närvivõrkudega süsteemi, et saada teavet biomeditsiinilisest kirjandusest. Hindamine näitab, et meie süsteem suudab pakkuda inimeste aktsepteerimise konkurentsivõimelise täpsusega ülevaadet ja selle seose ekstraheerimise komponent on varasematest töödest parem.', 'bs': 'Miniranje biomedicinskog teksta nudi priliku da automatski otkrije važne činjenice i povezuje udruženja među njima. Dok se novi naučni nalazi pojavljuju u velikoj kolekciji biomedicinskih publikacija, naš cilj je pristupiti u ovu literaturu da automatski izvučemo biomedicinsko znanje i identificiramo važne uvide od njih. Prema tom cilju, razvijamo sistem sa novom dubokom neuralnom mrežom da izvučemo uvid o biomedicinskoj literaturi. Evaluacija pokazuje da je naš sistem u stanju pružiti uvid konkurentnom preciznošću prihvaćanja ljudi i njegova komponenta izvlačenja odnosa iznosi prethodni rad.', 'fi': 'Kaivos biolääketieteellinen teksti tarjoaa mahdollisuuden automaattisesti löytää tärkeitä tosiasioita ja päätellä niiden välisiä yhteyksiä. Koska uusia tieteellisiä löydöksiä esiintyy laajassa kokoelmassa biolääketieteen julkaisuja, tavoitteenamme on hyödyntää tätä kirjallisuutta automatisoidaksemme biolääketieteen tiedon poimimisen ja tunnistaa niistä tärkeitä oivalluksia. Tätä tarkoitusta kohti kehitämme järjestelmän, jossa on uusia syviä hermoverkkoja, saadaksemme tietoa biolääketieteellisestä kirjallisuudesta. Arviointi osoittaa, että järjestelmämme pystyy tarjoamaan tietoa ihmisten hyväksynnästä kilpailukykyisellä tarkkuudella ja että sen suhteellinen uuttokomponentti ylittää aiemman työn.', 'jv': 'miner Terus neng akeh sing sampeyan sing paling nggambar akeh akeh pisan anyir, kawula awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe basa iki bakal ngelarang bantuan ingkang ngerasakno biyadir iki bakal ngelarang basa sing susahé awak dhéwé. Kita goal punika, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing berarti perbudhakan nganggep kuwi aturan sing paling apik, alam kuwi tindakan bantayan kanggo kebebasan basa biyogras. Tarjamahan menehi wong sistem punika dipunangé awak dhéwé nggawe barang pangan karo kesempatan pangan ning wong liyane karo akeh barang nggawe barang dhéwé, winih dhéwé iso nggawe barang sing lihok sing paling dhéwé.', 'ha': "Tsarin matsayin bajirada, ya bãyar da fursa ya gane masu muhimu farat ɗaya da samura masu ƙaranci a tsakaninsu. Kama da fassarar da yanzu na iya dukkan takarda masu yawa na takarda da dawwama, kanmu na sami zuwa wannan littãfi dõmin a farata ƙanshi na ilmi na biyayyaci kuma ka gane gannai muhimu daga gare su. Zuwa ga wannan goa, Muke buɗe wani na'ura wanda ke da zangaren neura na yanzu, dõmin ya fitar masu kalma na littãfin bakwaida. Taƙaitar na nuna tsarin na'asarmu yana iya iya bãyar da gannai da taƙaitacce na karɓi mutum da kamfan masu haɗi na samun aiki na gaba.", 'he': 'טקסט ביורפואי מכרות מציע הזדמנות לגלות באופן אוטומטי עובדות חשובות ולמעלות איגודות ביניהם. As new scientific findings appear across a large collection of biomedical publications, our aim is to tap into this literature to automate biomedical knowledge extraction and identify important insights from them.  לכיוון המטרה הזו, אנחנו מפתחים מערכת עם רשתות עצביות עמוקות חדשות כדי להוציא תובנות על ספרות ביולורפואית. הערכה מראה שהמערכת שלנו מסוגלת לספק תובנות עם מדויקת תחרותית של הקבלה אנושית והיחסים שלה מחסל עבודה קודמת.', 'sk': 'Rudarsko biomedicinsko besedilo ponuja priložnost samodejnega odkrivanja pomembnih dejstev in sklepanja povezav med njimi. Ker se v veliki zbirki biomedicinskih publikacij pojavljajo nova znanstvena ugotovitev, je naš cilj uporabiti to literaturo, da avtomatiziramo pridobivanje biomedicinskega znanja in ugotovimo pomembne vpoglede iz njih. Za ta cilj razvijamo sistem z novimi globokimi nevronskimi omrežji za pridobivanje vpogledov v biomedicinsko literaturo. Ocena kaže, da je naš sistem sposoben zagotoviti vpogled s konkurenčno natančnostjo sprejemanja ljudi, njegova odnosna sestavina ekstrakcije pa presega prejšnje delo.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་གལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དང་། ཚན་རིག དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་སྤེལ་བའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་ཆགས་པ་དེ་ ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'ar': 'علم أصل الكلمة كتدخل اللغة الأصلية', 'es': 'La etimología de las palabras como interferencia del idioma nativo', 'pt': 'Etimologia de palavras como interferência de idioma nativo', 'fr': "L'étymologie des mots comme interférence de la langue maternelle", 'ja': 'ネイティブ言語の干渉としての単語辞典', 'zh': '词源为母语所干', 'hi': 'मूल भाषा हस्तक्षेप के रूप में शब्द व्युत्पत्ति', 'ru': 'Этимология слова как интерференция родного языка', 'ga': 'Focal Iontrála mar Chur isteach Teanga Dúchais', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ετυμολογία λέξεων ως παρέμβαση στη μητρική γλώσσα', 'hu': 'Szó etimológia mint anyanyelv interferencia', 'it': 'Etimologia della parola come interferenza della lingua nativa', 'kk': 'Етимология тіл интерференциясы ретінде', 'lt': 'žodžių etimologija kaip gimtinės kalbos trukmė', 'mk': 'Етимологија на зборовите како интерференција на роден јазик', 'ms': 'Etymologi Perkataan sebagai Interferensi Bahasa asli', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ഇടപെടുത്തല്\u200d എന്ന വാക്ക് എട്ടിമോളജി', 'mt': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'ro': 'Etimologia cuvintelor ca interferență de limbă nativă', 'pl': 'Etymologia słowa jako zakłócenie języka ojczystego', 'no': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'sr': 'Etimologija reèi kao porodièna interferencija jezika', 'si': 'භාෂාවික භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ විදියට වචනය', 'so': 'Isticmaalka afka asalka ah', 'ur': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'sv': 'Ordetimologi som modersmål störning', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த மொழி இடைவெளி', 'mn': 'Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Từ Etymology vai Native Ngôn ngữ Interferon.', 'bg': 'Етимология на думите като интерференция на родния език', 'nl': 'Woordetymologie als interferentie in de moedertaal', 'de': 'Wortetymologie als muttersprachliche Störung', 'da': 'Ordetimologi som indfødselssprog Interference', 'hr': 'Etimologija riječi kao domaći jezik Interferencija', 'id': 'Etymologi kata sebagai Interferensi Bahasa asli', 'sw': 'Neno Etymology as Interference in Language asilia', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '모국어로 방해되는 어원학', 'tr': 'Etymology (Etymology as Native Language Interference)', 'af': 'Woord Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'hy': 'Բառերի էթիմոլոգիան որպես բնիկ լեզվի փոխազդեցություն', 'sq': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'bn': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference', 'bs': 'Etimologija riječi kao domaći jezik Interferencija', 'cs': 'Etymologie slov jako narušení rodného jazyka', 'ca': 'Etimologia de paraules com a interferència en la llengua nativa', 'fi': 'Sanan etymologia äidinkielen häiriönä', 'et': 'Sõna etümoloogia kui emakeele häire', 'az': 'Etimoloji dil Interference kimi söz', 'jv': 'Word EtEtMethody as nateve Language Internet', 'he': 'אטימולוגיה של מילים כהפרעה לשפה הילדית', 'sk': 'Etimologija besed kot motnja maternega jezika', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'Word Etymology as Native Language Interference'}
{'en': 'We present experiments that show the influence of native language on lexical choice when producing text in another language   in this particular case English. We start from the premise that non-native English speakers will choose lexical items that are close to words in their native language. This leads us to an etymology-based representation of documents written by people whose mother tongue is an Indo-European language. Based on this representation we grow a language family tree, that matches closely the Indo-European language tree.', 'ar': 'نقدم تجارب توضح تأثير اللغة الأم على الاختيار المعجمي عند إنتاج نص بلغة أخرى - في هذه الحالة بالذات اللغة الإنجليزية. نبدأ من فرضية أن المتحدثين غير الناطقين باللغة الإنجليزية سيختارون عناصر معجمية قريبة من الكلمات في لغتهم الأم. يقودنا هذا إلى التمثيل المستند إلى أصل الكلمة للوثائق التي كتبها أشخاص لغتهم الأم هي لغة هندو أوروبية. بناءً على هذا التمثيل ، ننمي شجرة عائلة للغة ، تتطابق بشكل وثيق مع شجرة اللغة الهندية الأوروبية.', 'fr': "Nous présentons des expériences qui montrent l'influence de la langue maternelle sur le choix lexical lors de la production de texte dans une autre langue, en l'occurrence l'anglais. Nous partons du principe que les anglophones non natifs choisiront des éléments lexicaux proches des mots dans leur langue maternelle. Cela nous amène à une représentation étymologique de documents écrits par des personnes dont la langue maternelle est une langue indo-européenne. Sur la base de cette représentation, nous développons un arbre généalogique des langues, qui correspond étroitement à l'arbre des langues indo-européennes.", 'es': 'Presentamos experimentos que muestran la influencia del idioma nativo en la elección léxica al producir texto en otro idioma, en este caso particular el inglés. Partimos de la premisa de que los hablantes no nativos de inglés elegirán elementos léxicos que se acerquen a las palabras en su idioma nativo. Esto nos lleva a una representación basada en la etimología de documentos escritos por personas cuya lengua materna es una lengua indoeuropea. Sobre la base de esta representación, cultivamos un árbol genealógico lingüístico, que coincide estrechamente con el árbol lingüístico indoeuropeo.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos experimentos que mostram a influência da língua nativa na escolha lexical na produção de texto em outro idioma – neste caso específico o inglês. Partimos da premissa de que falantes não nativos de inglês escolherão itens lexicais que se aproximam de palavras em sua língua nativa. Isso nos leva a uma representação baseada na etimologia de documentos escritos por pessoas cuja língua materna é uma língua indo-europeia. Com base nessa representação, desenvolvemos uma árvore genealógica de línguas, que se aproxima muito da árvore de línguas indo-européias.', 'ja': '私たちは、別の言語（この場合は英語）でテキストを作成する際に、母国語が語彙選択に与える影響を示す実験を提示します。私たちは、非ネイティブの英語話者が母国語の単語に近い語彙項目を選択するという前提から始めます。これにより、インド・ヨーロッパ語族の言語を母語とする人々によって書かれた文書を、エティモロジーに基づいて表現することにつながります。この表現に基づいて、インド・ヨーロッパ語族の言語樹を育てます。', 'hi': 'हम ऐसे प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो किसी अन्य भाषा में पाठ का उत्पादन करते समय लेक्सिकल पसंद पर मूल भाषा के प्रभाव को दिखाते हैं - इस विशेष मामले में अंग्रेजी। हम इस आधार से शुरू करते हैं कि गैर-देशी अंग्रेजी बोलने वाले लेक्सिकल आइटम चुनेंगे जो उनकी मूल भाषा में शब्दों के करीब हैं। यह हमें उन लोगों द्वारा लिखे गए दस्तावेजों के व्युत्पत्ति-आधारित प्रतिनिधित्व की ओर ले जाता है जिनकी मातृभाषा एक इंडो-यूरोपीय भाषा है। इस प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर हम एक भाषा परिवार के पेड़ को विकसित करते हैं, जो इंडो-यूरोपीय भाषा के पेड़ से निकटता से मेल खाता है।', 'ru': 'Представляем эксперименты, которые показывают влияние родного языка на лексический выбор при создании текста на другом языке – в данном конкретном случае на английском. Мы начинаем с предпосылки, что не-носители английского языка будут выбирать лексические элементы, близкие к словам на своем родном языке. Это приводит нас к этимологическому представлению документов, написанных людьми, родным языком которых является индоевропейский язык. Основываясь на этом представлении, мы выращиваем дерево языковой семьи, которое близко соответствует дереву индоевропейского языка.', 'zh': '言实验见母语对用一言(为英语)生文词汇择也。 自下提始,即非英语母语人士将择近母语单词词汇目。 此盖词源学之所为,母语印欧语系言者之所为也。 基于此表,生一语言族树,与印欧语系谱绝匹。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid turgnaimh i láthair a léiríonn an tionchar a bhíonn ag teanga dhúchais ar an rogha foclóireachta agus sinn ag táirgeadh téacs i dteanga eile – an Béarla sa chás áirithe seo. Tosaímid ón mbonn go roghnóidh cainteoirí Béarla neamhdhúchasacha míreanna foclóireachta atá gar d’fhocail ina dteanga dhúchais. Fágann sé sin go gcuirimid léiriú ar dhoiciméid atá bunaithe ar fhianeolaíocht, a scríobh daoine ar teanga Ind-Eorpach a máthairtheanga. Bunaithe ar an léiriú seo fásaimid crann teaghlaigh teanga a thagann go dlúth leis an gcrann teanga Ind-Eorpach.', 'it': "Presentiamo esperimenti che mostrano l'influenza della lingua madre sulla scelta lessicale quando si produce testo in un'altra lingua - in questo caso particolare l'inglese. Partiamo dalla premessa che i non madrelingua inglese sceglieranno elementi lessicali vicini alle parole nella loro lingua madre. Questo ci porta a una rappresentazione etimologica di documenti scritti da persone la cui lingua madre è una lingua indoeuropea. Sulla base di questa rappresentazione coltiviamo un albero genealogico linguistico, che corrisponde strettamente all'albero linguistico indoeuropeo.", 'kk': 'Біз басқа тілде мәтін жасағанда тіл тілінің әсерін көрсетеді - осы жағдайда ағылшынша тілінің әсерін көрсетеді. Ағылшын тілдегі сөздерге жақын сөздерді таңдайтын премизадан бастаймыз. Бұл бізді Индо-Еуропалық тілінен жазылған құжаттардың етмологиясынан негізделген құжаттарды көрсетуге көмектеседі. Бұл кескіндіктің негізінде біз тіл үйлерінің ағашын, индо-Еуропалық тіл ағашына сәйкес келеді.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომლებიც საბავშირი ენაზე ლექსიკალური მონიშნულებაზე გამოიყენებს, როდესაც ტექსტი სხვა ენაში - ამ განსაკუთრებული ჩვენ პრემიზიდან დავიწყებთ, რომ ანგლისური საუბრილობელი ადამიანები არსებობენ, რომელიც მათი სამყარო ენაში სიტყვების მხოლოდ დახდება. ეს გვეტვირდება, რომელიც ადამიანები, რომლებიც მარჯვნიეროული ენაა ინდო-ევროპოული ენაში დაწერა დოკუმენტების გამოსახულება. ამ გამოსახულებაზე ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ენის ოჯახური ხე, რომელიც ძალიან მსგავსია ინდო-ევროპოული ენის ხე.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα που δείχνουν την επίδραση της μητρικής γλώσσας στην λεξική επιλογή κατά την παραγωγή κειμένου σε άλλη γλώσσα και στη συγκεκριμένη περίπτωση στα αγγλικά. Ξεκινάμε από την υπόθεση ότι οι μη φυσικοί ομιλητές της αγγλικής γλώσσας θα επιλέξουν λεξικά στοιχεία που είναι κοντά στις λέξεις στη μητρική τους γλώσσα. Αυτό μας οδηγεί σε μια ετυμολογική αναπαράσταση εγγράφων γραμμένων από ανθρώπους των οποίων η μητρική γλώσσα είναι ινδοευρωπαϊκή γλώσσα. Με βάση αυτή την αναπαράσταση αναπτύσσουμε ένα γλωσσικό οικογενειακό δέντρο, που ταιριάζει στενά με το ινδοευρωπαϊκό γλωσσικό δέντρο.', 'hu': 'Olyan kísérleteket mutatunk be, amelyek bemutatják az anyanyelv hatását a lexikai választásra, amikor egy másik nyelven - ebben az esetben angolul - készítenek szöveget. Arra a feltételezésre indulunk, hogy a nem anyanyelvű angol beszélők olyan lexikai elemeket választanak, amelyek közel állnak az anyanyelvükhöz. Ez elvezet minket etimológiai alapú dokumentumok ábrázolásához, amelyeket olyan emberek írnak, akiknek anyanyelve indoeurópai nyelv. Ezen ábrázolás alapján egy nyelvi családfát termesztünk, amely szorosan illeszkedik az indoeurópai nyelvfához.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame eksperimentus, kurie rodo gimtosios kalbos įtaką leksiniam pasirinkimui gaminant tekstą kita kalba - šiuo konkrečiu atveju anglų kalba. We start from the premise that non-native English speakers will choose lexical items that are close to words in their native language.  Tai reiškia, kad žmonės, kurių gimtąja kalba yra indoeuropietiška, rašo dokumentus, pagrįstus etimologija. Remdamiesi šiuo atstovavimu auginame kalbų šeimos medį, kuris glaudžiai atitinka indoeuropietišką kalbų medį.', 'mk': 'Презентираме експерименти кои покажуваат влијание на родниот јазик на лексикалниот избор кога се произведува текст на друг јазик - во овој конкретен случај англиски. Почнуваме од претпоставката дека не-родните англиски говорници ќе изберат лексикални предмети кои се блиски до зборовите на нивниот роден јазик. Ова не води до претставување на документите напишани од луѓето чиј мајчин јазик е индуевропски јазик. На основа на оваа претстава ние растеме јазичко семејно дрво, кое тесно се совпаѓа со индуевропското јазичко дрво.', 'ml': 'മറ്റൊരു ഭാഷയില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സ്വന്തം ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാ We start from the premise that non-native English speakers will choose lexical items that are close to words in their native language.  ഇത് നമ്മളെ എട്ടിമോളജി അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന രേഖകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലേക്ക് നയിക്കുന്നു. അമ്മയുടെ ഭാഷ ഇന്തോ യൂറോപ ഈ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷ കുടുംബവൃക്ഷത്തെ വളര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. അത് ഇന്തോ-യൂറോപ്പിലെ ഭാഷ വൃക്ഷത്തോട് അടുത', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan eksperimen yang menunjukkan pengaruh bahasa asli pada pilihan leksikal bila menghasilkan teks dalam bahasa lain - dalam kes tertentu bahasa Inggeris. We start from the premise that non-native English speakers will choose lexical items that are close to words in their native language.  Ini membawa kita ke perwakilan berdasarkan etimologi dokumen yang ditulis oleh orang bahasa ibunya adalah bahasa Indo-Eropah. Berdasarkan perwakilan ini kita tumbuhkan pokok keluarga bahasa, yang sepadan dengan pokok bahasa Indo-Eropah.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw esperimenti li juru l-influwenza tal-lingwa nattiva fuq l-għażla lexika meta nipproduċu t-test f'lingwa oħra - f'dan il-każ partikolari l-Ingliż. Aħna nibdew mill-premessa li l-kelliema Ingliżi mhux nattivi se jagħżlu oġġetti lexiċi li huma qrib il-kliem fil-lingwa nattiva tagħhom. Dan iwassalna għal rappreżentazzjoni bbażata fuq l-etika ta’ dokumenti miktuba minn persuni li l-ilsien matern tagħhom huwa lingwa Indo-Ewropea. Abbażi ta’ din ir-rappreżentanza, a ħna nħolqu siġar tal-familja tal-lingwi, li jaqbel mill-qrib mas-siġar tal-lingwi Indo-Ewropej.", 'no': 'Vi presenterer eksperimenter som viser påvirkninga av språk på leksisk valet når tekst er produsert i eit anna språk - i denne bestemt tilfellet engelsk. Vi startar frå premisen at ikkje-native engelske språkarar vil velja leksiske elementer som er nær ord i dei opphavlege språka. Dette fører oss til eit etymologisk basert representasjon av dokument skriven av folk som morspråk er ein Indoeuropeisk språk. Basert på denne representasjonen, vokser vi eit språksfamilietre, som passar nærare på Indo-europeisk språkstråket.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo eksperimente koji pokazuju utjecaj jezika na leksički izbor kada proizvodimo tekst na drugim jezicima - u ovom konkretnom slučaju engleski. Počinjemo od premijere da će neproditelji engleski govornici izabrati leksičke predmete koje su blizu riječi na svojom jeziku. To nas vodi do etimologijskog predstavljanja dokumenta napisanih od strane ljudi čiji je majki jezik Indoevropski jezik. Na osnovu ovog predstavljanja rastemo jezičko porodično drvo, koje se bliže uklapa sa Indoevropskom jezičkom drvetom.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm experimente care arată influența limbii materne asupra alegerii lexicale atunci când se produce text într-o altă limbă - în acest caz special engleza. Pornim de la premisa că vorbitorii de engleză non-nativi vor alege elemente lexicale care sunt aproape de cuvinte în limba lor maternă. Acest lucru ne conduce la o reprezentare etimologică a documentelor scrise de persoane a căror limbă maternă este o limbă indo-europeană. Pe baza acestei reprezentări creștem un arbore genealogic lingvistic, care se potrivește strâns cu arborele lingvistic indo-european.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy eksperymenty, które pokazują wpływ języka ojczystego na wybór leksykaliczny podczas tworzenia tekstu w innym języku, w tym konkretnym przypadku angielskim. Zaczynamy od założenia, że nienative speakers angielskiego będą wybierać elementy leksykalne, które są zbliżone do słów w ich ojczystym języku. Prowadzi nas to do etymologicznej reprezentacji dokumentów pisanych przez osoby, których językiem ojczystym jest język indoeuropejski. Na podstawie tej reprezentacji hodujemy drzewo genealogiczne języka, które ściśle pasuje do indoeuropejskiego drzewa językowego.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ලෙක්සික් තෝ අපි ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් පටන් ගන්නේ නැති ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ස්පීකර්ටර්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ මාත්\u200dරික භා මේකෙන් අපිව පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් වලින් ලියපු ලිපිණි වලින් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් වලින් ඉන්දෝරෝපිය මේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයට අනුව අපි භාෂාව පවුලේ ගස් එකක් වැඩ කරනවා, ඒක ඉන්ඩෝයෝරෝපිය භාෂාව ගස් එක්ක ල', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jirnaa imtixaamo ku saameyn ku leh luuqada hooyo ee ku saabsan doorashada shacabka marka la soo bixiyo qoraal luuqad kale- xaaladan Ingiriis ee gaar ah. Waxaan ka bilaabaynaa qiimeynta ku saabsan hadalka afkooda hooyo ee ingiriisiga aan aheyn waxay dooran doonaan alaabta xunxun oo ku dhow hadalka afkooda hooyo. Taas waxay noogu soo jeedaa muuqashada dukumentiyada oo ku qoran afka hooyadeed waa luqad Indo-Yurub. Muuqaalkan waxaan ku saleynaa geed qoys ah oo u dhow geedka afka Indo-Yurub.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar experiment som visar hur modersmål påverkar lexikalt val när man producerar text på ett annat språk - i detta fall engelska. Vi utgår från förutsättningen att icke-infödda engelsktalande kommer att välja lexikala objekt som är nära ord på deras modersmål. Detta leder oss till en etimologibaserad representation av dokument skrivna av personer vars modersmål är ett indoeuropeiskt språk. Utifrån denna representation odlar vi ett språksläktträd som matchar det indoeuropeiska språkträdet.', 'ur': 'ہم آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں جو ملک زبان کی تأثیر لیکس انتخاب پر دکھاتے ہیں جب ایک دوسری زبان میں متن پیدا کرتا ہے - اس خاص مثال میں انگلیسی ہے۔ ہم اس سے شروع کرتے ہیں کہ غیر ملی انگلیسی صحبت کرنے والوں کو لکسیکی اتمام کا انتخاب کریں جو ان کی ملی زبان میں کلمات کے قریب ہیں. یہ ہمیں لوگوں کے لکھے ہوئے دفتروں کی روشنی کی بنیاد پر چلاتا ہے جن کی ماں زبان Indo-European زبان ہے. اس نمایش پر ہم ایک زبان خاندان درخت اگاتے ہیں، جو انڈو-یورپی زبان درخت کے نزدیک مطابق مطابق ہے.', 'ta': 'மொழியில் உரையை உருவாக்கும்போது தாய் மொழியின் பாதிப்பை காண்பிக்கும் சோதனைகளை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த க நாங்கள் தொடங்குகிறோம் தொடர்ந்து ஆங்கிலத்தில் இல்லாத பேச்சாளர்கள் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் வார்த்தைகளில் நெருங இது எங்களுக்கு தாய் மொழி ஒரு சிந்தோ-ஐரோப்பிய மொழியாக இருக்கும் மக்கள் எழுதப்பட்ட ஆவணங்களின் பிரதிநிதியியல் கா இந்த முன்னிருப்பு அடிப்படையில் நாம் ஒரு மொழி குடும்பங்களை வளர்க்கிறோம், அது சிந்தோ-ஐரோப்பிய மொழி மர', 'mn': 'Бид өөр хэл дээр текст бий болгох үед ээж хэлийн нөлөө үзүүлдэг туршилтуудыг үзүүлдэг. Бид англи хэл биш орон нутгийн хэл дээрх үгсийн ойрхон зүйлсийг сонгож эхэлсэн. Энэ нь биднийг Индо-Европын хэл гэдэг хүмүүсийн ээж хэл бичигдсэн баримтуудын төлөвлөгөө үүсгэдэг. Энэ илэрхийлэл дээр бид хэлний гэр бүлийн мод, Индо-Европын хэлний мод ойролцоогоор холбоотой.', 'uz': "Biz hozir tilni boshqa tillarda matnni yaratishda natiy tillarining influensa ko'rsatadigan tajribalarni ko'rsatamiz, bu hususiyat ingliz tilida. Biz natijasi ingliz tilining tili tilida o'xshash narsalarni tanlayapmiz. Bu bizni o'z o'z o'z o'z o'zining o'z Indo-European tili yozib qo'llangan hujjatlarning asosida emas. Bu tashkilotni asosida biz tilning oilasi daraxtni o'rganamiz, bu Indo-European tili daraxtda yaxshi bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra thí nghiệm cho thấy sự ảnh hưởng của ngôn ngữ bản xứ về ngôn ngữ văn học khi sản xuất văn bản bằng ngôn ngữ khác trong trường hợp đặc biệt tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi bắt đầu với giả thiết rằng những người nói tiếng Anh không thổ dân sẽ chọn các mục văn có thể nói gần bằng từ trong ngôn ngữ của họ. Điều này dẫn chúng ta đến một mô tả các tài liệu dựa trên biểu tượng của người mà ngôn ngữ mẹ đẻ là ngôn ngữ Đông Âu. Dựa trên sự đại diện này, chúng ta trồng cây gia đình ngôn ngữ, nó rất khớp với cây ngôn ngữ Đông Âu.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer eksperimenter, der viser indflydelsen af modersmål på leksikalsk valg, når der produceres tekst på et andet sprog - i dette særlige tilfælde engelsk. Vi starter med den forudsætning, at ikke-indfødte engelsktalende vil vælge leksikalske elementer, der er tæt på ord på deres modersmål. Det fører os til en etymologisk repræsentation af dokumenter skrevet af mennesker, hvis modersmål er et indoeuropæisk sprog. På baggrund af denne repræsentation vokser vi et sprogslægtstræ, der passer tæt sammen med det indoeuropæiske sprogtræ.', 'bg': 'Представяме експерименти, които показват влиянието на родния език върху лексикалния избор при производството на текст на друг език - в конкретния случай английски. Започваме от предпоставката, че чуждоезиковите английски ще избират лексикални елементи, които са близки до думите на родния им език. Това ни води до етимологично представяне на документи, написани от хора, чийто майчин език е индоевропейски език. Въз основа на това представяне ние отглеждаме езиково родословно дърво, което съвпада точно с индоевропейското езиково дърво.', 'nl': 'We presenteren experimenten die de invloed van moedertaal op lexicale keuze tonen bij het produceren van tekst in een andere taal, in dit specifieke geval Engels. We beginnen vanuit het uitgangspunt dat niet-moedertaalsprekers Engels lexicale items kiezen die dicht bij woorden in hun moedertaal staan. Dit leidt ons tot een etymologische weergave van documenten geschreven door mensen wiens moedertaal een Indo-Europese taal is. Op basis van deze representatie kweken we een taalstamboom die nauw aansluit bij de Indo-Europese taalboom.', 'de': 'Wir stellen Experimente vor, die den Einfluss der Muttersprache auf die lexikalische Wahl bei der Produktion von Text in einer anderen Sprache, in diesem Fall Englisch, aufzeigen. Wir gehen von der Prämisse aus, dass Nicht-Muttersprachler Englisch lexikalische Elemente wählen, die nah an Wörtern in ihrer Muttersprache sind. Dies führt zu einer etymologischen Darstellung von Dokumenten, die von Menschen geschrieben wurden, deren Muttersprache eine indoeuropäische Sprache ist. Basierend auf dieser Darstellung bauen wir einen Sprachstammbaum an, der eng mit dem indoeuropäischen Sprachbaum übereinstimmt.', 'ko': '우리가 제공한 실험은 다른 언어, 특히 영어로 텍스트를 생성할 때 모국어가 어휘 선택에 미치는 영향을 나타냈다.우리는 비영어 모국어자는 모국어 중의 단어와 비슷한 어휘 항목을 선택한다는 전제에서 출발한다.이것은 우리로 하여금 어원을 바탕으로 하는 모국어를 인구어로 하는 사람들이 쓴 문서에 대한 설명을 찾게 했다.이러한 표시를 바탕으로 우리는 언어 가족 트리를 생성했는데 이것은 인구어계 트리와 매우 일치한다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan eksperimen yang menunjukkan pengaruh bahasa asli pada pilihan leksik ketika memproduksi teks dalam bahasa lain - dalam kasus tertentu bahasa Inggris. Kita mulai dari premis bahwa bahasa Inggris bukan asli akan memilih item leksik yang dekat dengan kata-kata dalam bahasa asli mereka. This leads us to an etymology-based representation of documents written by people whose mother tongue is an Indo-European language.  Berdasarkan perwakilan ini kita tumbuhkan pohon keluarga bahasa, yang sangat cocok dengan pohon bahasa Indo-Eropa.', 'sw': 'Tunatoa majaribio yanayoonyesha ushawishi wa lugha ya asili juu ya uchaguzi wa kilexico wakati wa kutengeneza ujumbe kwa lugha nyingine - hasa katika kesi hii ya Kiingereza. Tunaanza kuanzia mtazamo kwamba wazungumzaji wasio na asili wa Kiingereza watachagua vitu vibaya vinavyokaribia maneno katika lugha yao ya asili. This leads us to an etymology-based representation of documents written by people whose mother tongue is an Indo-European language.  Kutokana na uwakilishaji huu tunauza mti wa familia ya lugha, unaohusiana na mti wa lugha ya Kihindi-Ulaya.', 'fa': 'ما آزمایش\u200cهایی را نشان می\u200cدهیم که تأثیر زبان مادری بر انتخاب\u200cهای زبانی در زبان دیگر نشان می\u200cدهند، در این مورد انگلیسی. ما از نقطه\u200cای شروع می\u200cکنیم که زبان انگلیسی\u200cهای غیر طبیعی برگزیده می\u200cشوند که در زبان مادرشان به کلمات نزدیک هستند. این ما را به نمایش مدارک\u200cهایی که توسط مردم زبان مادرش یک زبان اندو-اروپایی نوشته می\u200cشود، به بنیاد etymology-based representation of documents written by people whose mother language is an Indo-European language. بر اساس این نمایش، ما یک درخت خانواده زبانی را بزرگ می کنیم که نزدیک به درخت زبان اندو-اروپایی هماهنگ می کند.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë eksperimente që tregojnë ndikimin e gjuhës natyrore në zgjedhjen lexike kur prodhojmë tekst në gjuhë tjetër - në këtë rast të veçantë anglisht. Ne fillojmë nga premiza se anglezët jo-natyrorë do të zgjedhin objekte lexike që janë pranë fjalëve në gjuhën e tyre natyrore. Kjo na çon në një përfaqësim të dokumenteve të shkruara nga njerëzit gjuha nëne e të cilëve është gjuhë indoevropiane. Based on this representation we grow a language family tree, that matches closely the Indo-European language tree.', 'am': 'በአንዲስ ቋንቋ ጽሑፍ በመፍጠር ጊዜ የአገር ቋንቋ ላይ ለሌክሲካዊ ምርጫን የሚያሳየውን ፈተናዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአገራቸው እንግሊዘኛ ቋንቋዎች በአገራቸው ቋንቋቸው የተቃረቡ የውጤት ነገሮች ይመርጡታል፡፡ This leads us to an etymology-based representation of documents written by people whose mother tongue is an Indo-European language.  በዚህ መልዕክት ላይ የቋንቋ ቤተሰብ ዛፍ እናድጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'We present experiments that show the influence of native language on lexical choice when producing text in another language - in this particular case English.  Մենք սկսում ենք այն ենթադրությունից, որ ոչ մայրիկ անգլերեն խոսնակները կընտրեն լեքսիկական առարկաներ, որոնք մոտ են իրենց մայրիկ լեզվով բառերին: Սա մեզ հանգեցնում է էթիմոլոգիայից հիմնված փաստաթղթերի ներկայացման մարդկանց կողմից, որոնց մայրլեզուն հնդեվրոպական լեզու է: Հիմնված այս ներկայացումի վրա մենք աճեցնում ենք լեզվի ընտանիքի ծառ, որը մոտավորապես համապատասխանում է հնդեվրոպական լեզվի ծառին:', 'az': 'Biz təcrübələrini başqa dildə mətn ürəkləndirməkdə, bu məsələdə İngilizce dilində yerli dilin təcrübəsini göstərən təcrübələrini göstəririk. İngilizə danışanlarının anası dilində sözlərinə yaxın olan dillərini seçəcəklərini öyrəndikdən başlayırıq. Bu bizi evropa dilində yazılmış insanların etymology tabanlı beləliklərə göstərir. Bu göstəricilə görə biz dil ailəsi a ğacını yetişdirdik. Bu Indo-Avropa dil ağacına yaxınlaşır.', 'af': "Ons voorsien eksperimente wat die influens van die taal op leksiese kies vertoon wanneer teks in 'n ander taal produseer - in hierdie spesifieke geval Engels. Ons begin van die premise dat nie-natiewe Engelske sprekkers sal kies leksiese items wat naby is na woorde in hul moedertaal. Dit lei ons na 'n etymology-gebaseerde voorstelling van dokumente skryf deur mense wie se moedertong 'n Indo-Europeese taal is. Op hierdie voorstelling groei ons 'n taal familie boom wat naby die Indo-Europeese taal boom ooreenstem.", 'bn': 'আমরা উপস্থিত পরীক্ষাগুলোকে উপস্থাপন করছি যা স্থানীয় ভাষার প্রভাব দেখাচ্ছে যখন অন্য ভাষায় লেক্সিক্যাল পছন্দের প্রভাব আমরা এই ধারণা থেকে শুরু করি যে স্থানীয় ইংরেজী ভাষাকারীরা তাদের স্থানীয় ভাষায় কাছাকাছি শব্দ বেছে নেবেন। এটি আমাদের নেতৃত্বের ভিত্তিক নথিগুলোর প্রতিনিধিত্বে নিয়ে যায় যাদের মা ভাষা ইন্দো-ইউরোপীয় ভাষা। এই প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভিত্তিতে আমরা ভাষার পরিবারের গাছ উৎপন্ন করি, যা ইন্দো-ইউরোপীয় ভাষার গাছের কাছে মিল।', 'ca': "Presentam experiments que demostren l'influència del llenguatge natiu en l'elecció lèxica quan produeixen text en una altra llengua - en aquest cas en particular anglès. Començam de la premisa que els anglesos no natius triaran objectes lèxics que estan a prop de paraules en la seva llengua materna. Això ens porta a una representació basada en etimologia de documents escrits per gent la llengua materna de la qual és una llengua indoeuropea. Sobre la base d'aquesta representació creixem un arbre de família de llengües, que coincideix estretament amb l'arbre de llengües indoeuropeu.", 'cs': 'Představujeme experimenty, které ukazují vliv rodného jazyka na lexikální výběr při tvorbě textu v jiném jazyce než v tomto konkrétním případě angličtině. Začínáme z předpokladu, že nerodilí mluvčí angličtiny si vyberou lexikální položky, které se blíží slovům v jejich rodném jazyce. To nás vede k etymologické reprezentaci dokumentů napsaných lidmi, jejichž mateřským jazykem je indoevropský jazyk. Na základě této reprezentace pěstujeme jazykový rodokmen, který úzce odpovídá indoevropskému jazykovému stromu.', 'et': 'Esitleme eksperimente, mis näitavad emakeele mõju leksikaalsele valikule teises keeles - antud konkreetsel juhul inglise keeles. Alustame eeldusest, et mitte-emakeelne inglise keel valib leksikaalsed elemendid, mis on lähedased sõnadele oma emakeeles. See viib meid etümoloogiapõhise esituseni dokumentidest, mille on kirjutanud inimesed, kelle emakeel on Indo-Euroopa keel. Selle kujunduse põhjal kasvatame keele sugupuu, mis sobib tihedalt Indo-Euroopa keelepuuga.', 'fi': 'Esitämme kokeita, jotka osoittavat äidinkielen vaikutuksen sanaston valintaan tuotettaessa tekstiä toisella kielellä - tässä tapauksessa englanniksi. Lähtökohtana on, että englanninkieliset kielenkäyttäjät valitsevat sanaston, joka on lähellä sanoja omalla äidinkielellään. Tämä johtaa etymologiseen esitykseen sellaisten henkilöiden kirjoittamista asiakirjoista, joiden äidinkieli on indoeurooppalainen kieli. Tämän edustuksen pohjalta kasvatamme kielisukupuun, joka vastaa läheisesti indoeurooppalaista kielipuuta.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo eksperimente koji pokazuju utjecaj jezika na leksički izbor kada proizvodimo tekst na drugim jezicima - u ovom konkretnom slučaju engleski. Počinjemo od premijere da će neproditelji engleski govornici izabrati leksičke predmete koje su blizu riječima na svojom rodnom jeziku. To nas vodi do etimologijskog predstavljanja dokumenta napisanih od strane ljudi čiji je majčin jezik Indoeuropski jezik. Na temelju ovog predstavljanja mi rastemo jezičko obiteljsko drvo, koje se blizu odgovara Indoeuropskom jezičkom drvetu.', 'tr': 'Biz ene dilini başga dilde metin täsirini görkezýän deneyleri çykarýarys - bu häzirki durumda iňlisçe. Biz iňlisçe adaty dilinde ýakyn sözlerine golaý sözlerini saýlayan eserden başlaýarys. Bu bizi etymology ýazylan adamlaryň eje dili Indo-Ewropa dilinde ýazylan dokumentleriň täze suratyna getirir. Bu suratlara görä biz dil maşgalasynyň agajyny ösdürýäris, Indo-Ýewropa dil agajynyň ýakyna eşleýäris.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo eksperimente koji pokazuju utjecaj jezika na leksički izbor kada proizvodimo tekst na drugim jezicima - u ovom konkretnom slučaju engleski. Počinjemo od premijere da će neproditelji engleski govornici izabrati leksičke predmete koje su blizu riječi na svojim rodnim jezicima. To nas vodi do etimologijskog predstavljanja dokumenta napisanih od strane ljudi čiji je jezik majke indoevropski jezik. Na temelju ovog predstavljanja rastemo jezičko obiteljsko drvo, koje blizu odgovara Indoevropsko jezičko drvo.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo poskuse, ki kažejo vpliv maternega jezika na leksikalno izbiro pri izdelavi besedila v drugem jeziku - v tem primeru angleščini. Začnemo s predpostavko, da bodo tuji angleški govorci izbrali leksikalne elemente, ki so blizu besedam v njihovem maternem jeziku. To nas vodi do etimološkega predstavitve dokumentov, ki jih napišejo ljudje, katerih materni jezik je indoevropski jezik. Na podlagi te reprezentacije gojimo jezikovno družinsko drevo, ki se tesno ujema z indoevropskim jezikovnim drevesom.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da jarrabãwa wanda ke nuna muhimmin harshen native kan zãɓen littafi idan za'a zaɓi matsayin da wata harshe - kuma masu hususann Ingiriya. Tuna fara daga preyinsa da wasu da ke faɗa na Ingiriya ba masu native ba, zã su zãɓi abubuwa masu kizu da ke mafi kusantar maganar da ke cikin harshensu. Wannan yana shirya mu zuwa wani mataimaki a kan takardar takardar da aka rubũta na mutane da harshensu na Indo-Yurubi. Basic kan wannan mai gayarwa, Munã tsirar wata itãce na family cikin harshen, mai kamid da daraja na harshen Indo-Yurubi.", 'he': 'אנו מציגים ניסויים שמראים את השפעה של שפה הילדית על בחירה לקסיקה כשיוצרים טקסט בשפה אחרת, במקרה הזה אנגלית. אנו מתחילים מההנושא שדיבורים אנגליים לא ילידים יבחרו פריטים לקסיים שהם קרובים למילים בשפה ההולדת שלהם. זה מוביל אותנו למצגת מסמכים מבוססת באטימולוגיה שנכתבה על ידי אנשים ששפת האמא שלהם היא שפה אינדו-אירופאית. Based on this representation we grow a language family tree, that matches closely the Indo-European language tree.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno sing ngerasakno nggawe luwih anyar tentang ning langga luwih cara-luwih kanggo nggawe Text ning liman liyane wis ana - ning kelas kuwi cah-cah sing apik Inggris. Awak dhéwé mulai ngono sing paling-tanggal kuwi basa Inggris kuwi bisa ngubah luwih cara sing ngegolake kanggo awak dhéwé. Iki lak bandakan awak dhéwé nang etMethody sing basa basa babagan dokumen sing tarjamahan ning wong liya sing luwih basa Manuk-Yusufan. NgaNgawe mau sing ngejaraké karo perusahaan langkung, iki dadi sing ngejaraké sak bab Manuk-Yupèn.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་སྐབས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག་ནང་གི་དབྱེ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མིན་པའི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདེམས་དགོས། འདིས་མི་མང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་ཨིན་ཌོ་ཡུ་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གིས་འབྲི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་གཞི་བྱས་ནས་ང་ཚོར་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་པ་ཁག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་འདུག'}
{'en': 'A Simpler and More Generalizable Story Detector using Verb and Character Features', 'ar': 'كاشف قصة أبسط وأكثر قابلية للتعميم باستخدام ميزات الفعل والشخصية', 'es': 'Un detector de historias más simple y generalizable que utiliza funciones de verbos y personajes', 'fr': "Un détecteur d'histoires plus simple et plus généralisable utilisant les caractéristiques des verbes et des personnages", 'pt': 'Um detector de histórias mais simples e generalizável usando recursos de verbos e caracteres', 'ja': '動詞と文字機能を使用した、よりシンプルで一般的なストーリー検出器', 'ru': 'Более простой и обобщаемый детектор историй с использованием глагола и символа', 'zh': '用动词符者益简,用故事尤检测器', 'hi': 'क्रिया और चरित्र सुविधाओं का उपयोग कर एक सरल और अधिक सामान्य कहानी डिटेक्टर', 'ga': 'Brathadóir Scéil Níos Simplí agus Níos Ginearálaithe ag Úsáid Gnéithe Briathar agus Carachtair', 'hu': 'Egyszerűbb és általánosíthatóbb történetérzékelő szó és karakter funkciók használatával', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένας απλούστερος και πιο γενικευμένος ανιχνευτής ιστορίας χρησιμοποιώντας τα χαρακτηριστικά ρήματος και χαρακτήρων', 'it': 'Un rivelatore di storie più semplice e generalizzabile utilizzando le funzionalità verbo e carattere', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'A Simpler and More Generalizable Story Detector using Verb and Character Features', 'ml': 'എളുപ്പമുള്ള ഒരു സാധാരണക്കാരനും കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്റ്റോറി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നു', 'kk': 'Қарапайым және көп жалпы оқиғалар таңдаушысы Verb және Таңбалар мүмкіндіктерін қолданатын анықтаушысы', 'mt': 'Detettur ta’ Story Simpler u Aktar Ġeneralizzabbli bl-użu tal-Karatteristiċi tal-Verb u tal-Karatteristiċi', 'pl': 'Prostszy i bardziej ogólny wykrywacz historii wykorzystujący funkcje czasowników i znaków', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч, Харин Хүсэг болон Илүү Жагсаалттай түүх Detector', 'no': 'Name', 'lt': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un detector de povești mai simplu și mai generalizabil folosind caracteristici Verb și Caractere', 'sr': 'Jednostavniji i generaliziraniji detektor prièe koji koristi Verb i Character Features', 'sv': 'En enklare och mer generell berättelsedetektor med verb- och teckenfunktioner', 'so': 'Qoraalka warqada ee la fududeeyo iyo wax ka badan oo la isticmaali karo qalabka iyo tababarka', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô tả truyện ngắn và đơn giản hơn', 'nl': 'Een eenvoudigere en meer algemene verhaaldetector met behulp van werkwoorden en karakterfuncties', 'bg': 'По-прост и по-общообразим детектор на истории, използващ функциите на глагол и символ', 'da': 'En enklere og mere generel historiedetektor ved hjælp af verb og tegn funktioner', 'id': 'Detektor cerita yang lebih sederhana dan lebih umum menggunakan Features Verb dan Karakter', 'fa': 'Name', 'hr': 'Jednostavniji i generaliziraniji detektor priče koristeći Verb i karakterske funkcije', 'de': 'Ein einfacherer und allgemeinerer Story-Detektor mit Verb- und Charakterfunktionen', 'sw': 'Mtengenezaji wa Habari nyepesi na Zaidi kwa kutumia Tamko na Hifadhi', 'ko': '동사와 문자 특징을 사용한 더욱 간단하고 통용되는 이야기 탐지기', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Verb we Karakter özelliklerini ulanarak Basit we Daha Umumlandyryş Hiçbir detektir', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'Verb v…ô Karakter √Ėzellikl…ôrini istifad…ô ed…ôn Basit v…ô Daha GeniŇül…ôŇüdirilmiŇü Hikay…ô KitayńĪcńĪ', 'bs': 'Jednostavniji i generaliziraniji detektor priče koristeći Verb i Character Features', 'sq': 'A Simpler and More Generalizable Story Detector using Verb and Character Features', 'cs': 'Jednodušší a obecnější detektor příběhu pomocí slovesníků a znaků', 'ca': 'A Simpler and More Generalizable Story Detector using Verb and Character Features', 'et': 'Lihtsam ja rohkem üldistatav lugudetektor, mis kasutab verbi ja märgi funktsioone', 'fi': 'Yksinkertaisempi ja yleisempi tarinantunnistin, jossa käytetään verbi- ja merkkiominaisuuksia', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sk': 'Enostavnejši in bolj splošljiv detektor zgodb z uporabo glagolnih in znakov funkcij', 'he': 'A Simpler and More Generalizable Story Detector using Verb and Character Features', 'jv': 'Simpler and Learn Generalizable Histogram detector', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Simpler and More Generalizable Story Detector using Verb and Character Features'}
{'en': 'Story detection is the task of determining whether or not a unit of text contains a story. Prior approaches achieved a maximum performance of 0.66 F1, and did not generalize well across different corpora. We present a new state-of-the-art detector that achieves a maximum performance of 0.75 F1 (a 14 % improvement), with significantly greater generalizability than previous work. In particular, our detector achieves performance above 0.70 F1 across a variety of combinations of lexically different corpora for training and testing, as well as dramatic improvements (up to 4,000 %) in performance when trained on a small, disfluent data set. The new detector uses two basic types of featuresones related to events, and ones related to characterstotaling 283 specific features overall ; previous detectors used tens of thousands of features, and so this detector represents a significant simplification along with increased performance.', 'ar': 'الكشف عن القصة هو مهمة تحديد ما إذا كانت وحدة النص تحتوي على قصة أم لا. حققت الأساليب السابقة أقصى أداء قدره 0.66 F1 ، ولم يتم تعميمها بشكل جيد عبر المؤسسات المختلفة. نقدم كاشفًا جديدًا على أحدث طراز يحقق أقصى أداء يبلغ 0.75 F1 (تحسن بنسبة 14٪) ، مع قابلية تعميم أكبر بكثير من العمل السابق. على وجه الخصوص ، يحقق كاشفنا أداءً أعلى من 0.70 F1 عبر مجموعة متنوعة من مجموعات مختلفة معجميًا للتدريب والاختبار ، بالإضافة إلى تحسينات كبيرة (تصل إلى 4000٪) في الأداء عند التدريب على مجموعة بيانات صغيرة غير ملائمة. يستخدم الكاشف الجديد نوعين أساسيين من الميزات - تلك المتعلقة بالأحداث ، والأخرى المتعلقة بالشخصيات - بإجمالي 283 ميزة محددة بشكل عام ؛ استخدمت الكواشف السابقة عشرات الآلاف من الميزات ، ولذا فإن هذا الكاشف يمثل تبسيطًا كبيرًا إلى جانب زيادة الأداء.', 'es': 'La detección de historias es la tarea de determinar si una unidad de texto contiene una historia o no. Los enfoques anteriores alcanzaron un rendimiento máximo de 0.66 F1 y no se generalizaron bien en los diferentes cuerpos. Presentamos un nuevo detector de última generación que logra un rendimiento máximo de 0.75 F1 (una mejora del 14%), con una generalización significativamente mayor que los trabajos anteriores. En particular, nuestro detector logra un rendimiento superior a 0,70 F1 en una variedad de combinaciones de cuerpos léxicamente diferentes para entrenamiento y pruebas, así como mejoras drásticas (hasta un 4,000%) en el rendimiento cuando se entrena en un conjunto de datos pequeño y difuso. El nuevo detector utiliza dos tipos básicos de características, una relacionada con los eventos y otras relacionadas con los personajes, con un total de 283 características específicas en total; los detectores anteriores utilizaban decenas de miles de funciones, por lo que este detector representa una simplificación significativa junto con un mayor rendimiento.', 'pt': 'A detecção de história é a tarefa de determinar se uma unidade de texto contém ou não uma história. As abordagens anteriores alcançaram um desempenho máximo de 0,66 F1 e não generalizaram bem em diferentes corpora. Apresentamos um novo detector de última geração que atinge um desempenho máximo de 0,75 F1 (uma melhoria de 14%), com generalização significativamente maior do que o trabalho anterior. Em particular, nosso detector atinge desempenho acima de 0,70 F1 em uma variedade de combinações de corpora lexicalmente diferentes para treinamento e teste, bem como melhorias dramáticas (até 4.000%) no desempenho quando treinado em um conjunto de dados pequeno e disfluente. O novo detector usa dois tipos básicos de recursos – relacionados a eventos e relacionados a caracteres – totalizando 283 recursos específicos no total; os detectores anteriores usavam dezenas de milhares de recursos e, portanto, esse detector representa uma simplificação significativa juntamente com um desempenho aprimorado.', 'fr': "La détection d'une histoire consiste à déterminer si une unité de texte contient une histoire. Les approches précédentes atteignaient une performance maximale de 0,66 F1 et ne généralisaient pas bien entre les différents corpus. Nous présentons un nouveau détecteur de pointe qui atteint une performance maximale de 0,75 F1 (une amélioration de 14\xa0%), avec une généralisabilité nettement supérieure à celle des travaux précédents. En particulier, notre détecteur atteint des performances supérieures à 0,70 F1 sur une variété de combinaisons de corpus lexiquement différents pour la formation et les tests, ainsi que des améliorations spectaculaires (jusqu'à 4 000\xa0%) des performances lorsqu'il est entraîné sur un petit ensemble de données disfluent. Le nouveau détecteur utilise deux types de caractéristiques de base, l'une liée aux événements et l'autre aux personnages, pour un total de 283 caractéristiques spécifiques\xa0; les détecteurs précédents utilisaient des dizaines de milliers de caractéristiques. Ce détecteur représente donc une simplification significative ainsi que des performances accrues.", 'ja': 'ストーリー検出は、テキスト単位にストーリーが含まれているかどうかを判断するタスクです。以前のアプローチは、0.66 F 1の最大パフォーマンスを達成し、異なるコーポラル全体でうまく一般化しませんでした。0.75F1の最大性能（ 14%向上）を実現し、従来よりも大幅に汎用性を高めた新型最先端の検出器を発表します。特に、当社の検出器は、トレーニングとテストのためのさまざまな異なる語彙の組み合わせで0.70 F 1を超えるパフォーマンスを達成し、小さな不流動的なデータセットでトレーニングした場合のパフォーマンスの劇的な改善（最大4,000 ％ ）を実現します。新しい検出器は、2つの基本的なタイプの機能を使用しています。イベントに関連するものと、文字に関連するもので、全体で283の特定の機能を集計します。以前の検出器は数万の機能を使用していたため、この検出器はパフォーマンスの向上とともに大幅な簡素化を表しています。', 'zh': '文检者,定文本单元含文之务也。 前法成0.66 F1最大,且于异语料库中不能推广。 建一新之探测器,其大者为0.75 F1(14%),而大于前者可推广性。 特吾检测器所以训试词汇异语料库成于 0.70 F1 之性,而习于小不流之数,性有显(达 4000%)。 新检测器用二本 - 与事相关者,与角色相关者 - 凡有283特定。 前探测器用万数之功,故探测器显化而益高。', 'hi': 'कहानी का पता लगाना यह निर्धारित करने का कार्य है कि पाठ की एक इकाई में एक कहानी है या नहीं। पूर्व दृष्टिकोण ने 0.66 एफ 1 का अधिकतम प्रदर्शन हासिल किया, और विभिन्न कॉर्पोरेट में अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत नहीं किया। हम एक नया अत्याधुनिक डिटेक्टर प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो पिछले काम की तुलना में काफी अधिक सामान्यता के साथ 0.75 एफ 1 (14% सुधार) का अधिकतम प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। विशेष रूप से, हमारा डिटेक्टर प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण के लिए लेक्सिकल रूप से अलग-अलग कॉर्पोरेट के संयोजनों की एक किस्म में 0.70 एफ 1 से ऊपर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, साथ ही साथ प्रदर्शन में नाटकीय सुधार (4,000% तक) जब एक छोटे, अव्यवस्थित डेटा सेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। नया डिटेक्टर दो बुनियादी प्रकार की विशेषताओं का उपयोग करता है- जो घटनाओं से संबंधित हैं, और पात्रों से संबंधित हैं- कुल मिलाकर 283 विशिष्ट विशेषताएं; पिछले डिटेक्टरों सुविधाओं के हजारों के दसियों का इस्तेमाल किया, और इसलिए इस डिटेक्टर में वृद्धि हुई प्रदर्शन के साथ एक महत्वपूर्ण सरलीकरण का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है.', 'ru': 'Обнаружение сюжета - это задача определения того, содержит ли единица текста сюжет. Предыдущие подходы достигли максимальной производительности 0,66 F1 и не очень хорошо обобщали различные тела. Мы представляем новый современный детектор, который достигает максимальной производительности 0,75 F1 (улучшение на 14%), со значительно большей обобщаемостью, чем предыдущая работа. В частности, наш детектор достигает производительности выше 0,70 F1 в различных комбинациях лексически различных корпусов для обучения и тестирования, а также резких улучшений (до 4000%) в производительности при обучении на небольшом, вытесненном наборе данных. Новый детектор использует два основных типа признаков - один, связанный с событиями, и один, связанный с символами - всего 283 специфических признаков в целом; предыдущие детекторы использовали десятки тысяч признаков, и поэтому этот детектор представляет собой значительное упрощение наряду с повышенной производительностью.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le scéal a bhrath ná a chinneadh an bhfuil scéal in aonad téacs nó nach bhfuil. Bhain cur chuige roimhe seo uasfheidhmíocht de 0.66 F1 amach, agus ní raibh ginearálú maith acu ar fud corparáidí éagsúla. Cuirimid i láthair brathadóir nua den scoth a ghnóthaíonn uasfheidhmíocht de 0.75 F1 (feabhsú 14%), le ginearálú i bhfad níos mó ná an obair roimhe seo. Go háirithe, baineann ár mbrathadóir feidhmíocht os cionn 0.70 F1 thar mheascáin éagsúla de chorpora atá difriúil ó thaobh foclóireachta le haghaidh oiliúna agus tástála, chomh maith le feabhsuithe drámatúla (suas le 4,000%) ar fheidhmíocht nuair a chuirtear oiliúint orthu ar thacar sonraí beag easilteach. Úsáideann an brathadóir nua dhá bhunchineál gnéithe – cinn a bhaineann le himeachtaí, agus cinn a bhaineann le carachtair – arb ionann iad agus 283 saintréith san iomlán; bhain na brathadóirí roimhe seo úsáid as na mílte gnéithe, agus mar sin is ionann an brathadóir seo agus simpliú suntasach mar aon le feidhmíocht mhéadaithe.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση ιστοριών είναι το καθήκον να καθοριστεί εάν μια μονάδα κειμένου περιέχει μια ιστορία ή όχι. Οι προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις πέτυχαν τη μέγιστη απόδοση 0.66 και δεν γενικεύτηκαν καλά σε διαφορετικά σώματα. Παρουσιάζουμε έναν νέο ανιχνευτή τελευταίας τεχνολογίας που επιτυγχάνει μέγιστη απόδοση 0,75 F1 (βελτίωση 14% ), με σημαντικά μεγαλύτερη γενικότητα από την προηγούμενη εργασία. Ειδικότερα, ο ανιχνευτής μας επιτυγχάνει απόδοση πάνω από 0.70 σε ποικίλους συνδυασμούς λεξικά διαφορετικών σωμάτων για εκπαίδευση και δοκιμή, καθώς και δραματικές βελτιώσεις (μέχρι 4.000%) στην απόδοση όταν εκπαιδεύεται σε ένα μικρό, μη ρευστό σύνολο δεδομένων. Ο νέος ανιχνευτής χρησιμοποιεί δύο βασικούς τύπους χαρακτηριστικών-αυτούς που σχετίζονται με γεγονότα και αυτούς που σχετίζονται με χαρακτήρες-συνολικά 283 συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά. Οι προηγούμενοι ανιχνευτές χρησιμοποίησαν δεκάδες χιλιάδες χαρακτηριστικά, και έτσι αυτός ο ανιχνευτής αντιπροσωπεύει μια σημαντική απλοποίηση μαζί με την αυξημένη απόδοση.', 'hu': 'A történet felismerése annak meghatározása, hogy egy szövegegység tartalmaz-e történetet. A korábbi megközelítések maximális teljesítményét 0,66 F1 érték el, és nem általánosították jól a különböző testek között. Bemutatunk egy új, korszerű detektort, amely maximális teljesítményt ér el 0,75 F1 (14%-os javulás), jelentősen nagyobb általánosíthatósággal, mint a korábbi munkák. Az érzékelőnk különösen 0,70 F1 fölötti teljesítményt ér el a lexikailag különböző testek számos kombinációjában edzésre és tesztelésre, valamint drámai javulást (akár 4000%) a teljesítményben, ha egy kis, diszfolyékony adatkészletre készül. Az új detektor két alapvető típusú jellemzőt használ – az eseményekhez kapcsolódókat, a karakterekhez kapcsolódókat – összesen 283 specifikus jellemzőt foglal magában; A korábbi érzékelők több tízezer funkciót használtak, így ez az érzékelő jelentős egyszerűsítést és növelt teljesítményt jelent.', 'ka': 'ისტორიის განსახულება არის ტექსტის ერთეულის განსახულება თუ არა. პირველი მიღება 0,66 F1-ის მაქსიმალური გამოსახულებას მიიღეთ, და არ განსხვავებული კოპორაში უფრო საშუალოდ გენერალიზაცია. ჩვენ ახალი სურათის განსაზღვრებელობა, რომელიც 0,75 F1-ის მაქსიმალური გამოსახულებას (14% უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტი) მივიღეთ, რომელიც უფრო მეტი უფრო მეტი უფ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი detektoრი უფრო მეტი 0,70 F1-ის განსაკუთრებულია განსხვავებული კოპორაციების კომბინციების განსაკუთრებისთვის და ტესტის განმავლობისთვის, და დირამატიკური გასაკეთრებისთვის (4,000%) განმავლობაში, როდე ახალი deteქტორი გამოყენებს ორი ფუნქტური ფუნქტურების ტიპები, რომელიც მოვლენებისთვის შესახებ, და რომელიც აქვს 283 სპექტიფიკური ფუნქტურებისთვის წინა განახლებელი გამოყენებულია ათასი ათასი ფუნქციების გამოყენება, და ამიტომ ეს განახლებელი გამოყენებულია მნიშვნელოვანი განახლება, რომელიც უფრო', 'it': "Il rilevamento della storia è il compito di determinare se un'unità di testo contiene o meno una storia. Gli approcci precedenti hanno raggiunto una prestazione massima di 0,66 F1, e non hanno generalizzato bene tra i diversi corpi. Presentiamo un nuovo rivelatore all'avanguardia che raggiunge una prestazione massima di 0,75 F1 (un miglioramento del 14%), con una generalizzabilità significativamente maggiore rispetto ai lavori precedenti. In particolare, il nostro rilevatore raggiunge prestazioni superiori a 0,70 F1 in una varietà di combinazioni di corpi lessicamente diversi per l'allenamento e il test, nonché miglioramenti drammatici (fino a 4.000%) nelle prestazioni quando addestrato su un piccolo set di dati disfluenti. Il nuovo rivelatore utilizza due tipi di caratteristiche di base, una relativa agli eventi e una relativa ai caratteri, per un totale di 283 caratteristiche specifiche; I rivelatori precedenti utilizzavano decine di migliaia di funzioni, e quindi questo rivelatore rappresenta una semplificazione significativa insieme ad un aumento delle prestazioni.", 'lt': 'Story detection – tai užduotis nustatyti, ar teksto vienete yra istorijos. Ankstesniais metodais pasiektas did žiausias veiksmingumas buvo 0,66 F1, o skirtingose kūno dalyse nepakankamai išplito. Pateikiame naują pažangiausią detektorių, kuris pasiekia maksimalų 0,75 F1 rezultatų (14 proc. pagerėjimas), kuris yra gerokai platesnis nei ankstesnis darbas. Visų pirma mūsų detektorius pasiekia daugiau kaip 0,70 F1 rezultatų įvairiuose mokymui ir bandymui skirtingų lexiškai skirtingų kūnų deriniuose, taip pat dramatiškai pagerėja (iki 4 000 %) rezultatai, kai jis mokomas mažame, neišvengiame duomenų rinkinyje. Naujajame detektoriuje naudojami du pagrindiniai su įvykiais susiję elementai ir elementai, susiję su bendrais 283 specifinių elementų simboliais; ankstesni detektoriai naudojo dešimtis tūkstančių savybių, taigi šis detektorius labai supaprastina ir padidina veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Журналды анықтау - мәтіннің бірлігінде оқиға бар ма екенін анықтау тапсырмасы. Алдыңғы жағдайлар 0,66 F1 көлемінің максималдығын жеткізді, және әртүрлі корпораға жақсы жағдайлы болмайды. Біз 0,75 F1 (14% жақсы жақсарту) деген жаңа орындаушы дегенді таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы жұмысынан ең жалпы жұмыс істейтін жалпы күй- жайымдылығын таңдаймыз. Әсіресе, біздің детекторымыз 0,70 F1 дегеннен артық әртүрлі лексикалық түрлі корпораттарды оқыту мен сынақтау үшін, және драматикалық жақсартуларды (4,000% дегенге дейін) жеткізеді. Жаңа анықтаушы оқиғалармен байланысты екі негізгі мүмкіндіктер түрін пайдаланып, және бірнеше 283 таңбалармен байланысты мүмкіндіктерді қолданады. Алдыңғы анықтаушылар оның миңдеген мүмкіндіктер қолданылды, сондықтан бұл анықтаушылар көптеген жұмыс істеу мен маңызды қарапайым болады.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റിന്റെ യൂണിറ്റ് ഉണ്ടോ എന്ന് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കഥ സൂക്ഷിക്കുക 0. 66 F1-ന്റെ ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എത്തിയിരുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ്റയില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d നല്ല പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ് We present a new state-of-the-art detector that achieves a maximum performance of 0.75 F1 (a 14% improvement), with significantly greater generalizability than previous work.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ ഡിക്ടറിന് 0.70 എഫ്1 ല്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d പ്രകടനം വരുത്തുന്നു. ലെക്സിക്കില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200dണയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, പരീക്ഷിക്കു പുതിയ ഡിക്ടറിന് സംഭവങ്ങളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട രണ്ടു അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ സംഭവങ്ങളുമായി 283 പ് മുമ്പുള്ള ഡിക്ടറുകള്\u200d ആയിരക്കണക്കിന് വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഈ ഡിക്ടറിന് ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ എള', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-istorja hija l-kompitu li jiġi ddeterminat jekk unit à ta’ test fiha storja jew le. Approċċi preċedenti kisbu prestazzjoni massima ta’ 0.66 F1, u ma ġeneralizzawx tajjeb f’korpi differenti. We present a new state-of-the-art detector that achieves a maximum performance of 0.75 F1 (a 14% improvement), with significantly greater generalizability than previous work.  B’mod partikolari, id-detettur tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni ogħla minn 0.70 F1 f’varjetà ta’ kombinazzjonijiet ta’ korpra lexikament differenti għat-taħriġ u l-ittestjar, kif ukoll titjib drammatiku (sa 4,000%) fil-prestazzjoni meta mħarreġ fuq sett żgħir ta’ dejta li ma jaħdimx. Id-detettur il-ġdid juża żewġ tipi bażiċi ta’ karatteristiċi-ones relatati ma’ avvenimenti, u dawk relatati ma’ karatteristiċi li jammontaw għal 283 karatteristika speċifika b’mod ġenerali; detetturi preċedenti użaw għexieren ta’ eluf ta’ karatteristiċi, u għalhekk dan id-detettur jirrappreżenta simplifikazzjoni sinifikanti flimkien ma’ prestazzjoni akbar.', 'mk': 'Детектирање на приказни е задача за одредување дали единица на текст содржи приказна или не. Претходните пристапи постигнаа максимална ефективност од 0,66 Ф1, и не се генерализираа добро низ различни корпорации. Презентираме нов најнов детектор кој постигнува максимална перформанса од 0,75 Ф1 (14 отсто подобрување), со значително поголема генерализација од претходната работа. Посебно, нашиот детектор постигнува резултати над 0,70 Ф1 во различни комбинации на лексички различни тела за обука и тестирање, како и драматични подобрувања (до 4.000 отсто) во резултатите кога се обучуваат на мал, неиспуштен набор на податоци. Новиот детектор користи два основни типи на карактеристики-они поврзани со настаните, и оние поврзани со карактеристиките со вкупно 283 специфични карактеристики; претходните детектори користеа десетици илјадници карактеристики, и затоа овој детектор претставува значително поедноставување заедно со зголемена резултатност.', 'mn': 'Түүх мэдээлэл бол текст нэгж нь түүхийн тухай эсэхийг тодорхойлох үйлдэл юм. Өмнөх арга барилга нь 0.66 F1-ийн хамгийн их үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, өөр өөр корпоратын хувьд нийтлэгддэггүй. Бид 0.75 F1 (14% сайжруулалт) дээр хамгийн их үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг шинэ урлагийн тогтоогчийг тайлбарлаж байна. Ялангуяа бидний detektor 0.70 F1-ээс илүү олон төрлийн хэлбэрээр суралцах, шалгахын тулд өөр хэлбэртэй корпора болон жижиг, буруу өгөгдлийн багш дээр сургалтын дасгал хөгжлийн сайжруулалт (4,000%) хүртэл ашигладаг. Шинэ detektor нь үйл явдалтай холбогдсон хоёр үндсэн төрлийг ашиглаж, 283 хувилбартай холбогдсон хувилбаруудыг ашиглаж байна. Өмнөх мэдээлэгчид арван мянга мянган чанарыг ашиглаж байсан. Энэ detektor нь нэмэгдсэн үйл ажиллагаатай хамт чухал хялбарчлал үзүүлдэг.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan cerita adalah tugas untuk menentukan sama ada unit teks mengandungi cerita atau tidak. Pendekatan terdahulu mencapai prestasi maksimum 0.66 F1, dan tidak menyebar dengan baik di seluruh korpra berbeza. Kami memperkenalkan pengesan terbaru yang mencapai prestasi maksimum 0.75 F1 (penambahan 14%), dengan kemudahan yang lebih besar dari kerja sebelumnya. Terutama, detektor kita mencapai prestasi di atas 0.70 F1 melalui berbagai kombinasi dari korpra berbeza secara leksikal untuk latihan dan ujian, serta penambahan dramatik (sehingga 4,000%) dalam prestasi apabila dilatih pada set data yang kecil dan tidak berguna. Detektor baru menggunakan dua jenis dasar ciri-ciri yang berkaitan dengan peristiwa, dan yang berkaitan dengan aksara-total 283 ciri-ciri khusus secara keseluruhan; detektor terdahulu menggunakan puluhan ribu ciri-ciri, jadi detektor ini mewakili kemudahan yang signifikan bersama dengan prestasi meningkat.', 'ro': 'Detectarea poveștii este sarcina de a determina dacă o unitate de text conține sau nu o poveste. Abordările anterioare au atins o performanță maximă de 0,66 F1 și nu au generalizat bine în diferite corpore. Vă prezentăm un nou detector de ultimă generație care atinge o performanță maximă de 0,75 F1 (o îmbunătățire de 14%), cu o generalizare semnificativ mai mare decât lucrările anterioare. În special, detectorul nostru atinge performanțe de peste 0,70 F1 într-o varietate de combinații de corpore diferite din punct de vedere lexical pentru antrenament și testare, precum și îmbunătățiri dramatice (până la 4.000%) în performanță atunci când este instruit pe un set de date mic și disfluent. Noul detector utilizează două tipuri de caracteristici de bază – una legată de evenimente și una legată de caractere – totalizând 283 de caracteristici specifice în general; Detectoarele anterioare au folosit zeci de mii de caracteristici, astfel încât acest detector reprezintă o simplificare semnificativă împreună cu performanța sporită.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av historiar er oppgåva for å avgjera om ei teksteining inneheld ei historie eller ikkje. Førre tilnærmingar oppnå ein maksimal utvikling av 0,66 F1, og generelliserte ikkje på ulike korporar. Vi presenterer eit nytt oppdagingstilstand som oppnår maksimum utvikling av 0,75 F1 (ein 14% forbedring), med mykje større generelliserbar enn tidlegare arbeid. Dette oppdager spesielt utviklinga over 0,70 F1 i mange kombinasjonar av leksisk forskjellige korpora for opplæring og testing, og dramatiske forbedringar (opp til 4,000%) i utviklinga når opplært på ein liten, forskjellig datasett. Den nye oppdagaren brukar to grunnleggjande typar funksjonar som er relatert til hendingar, og dei som er relaterte til teikn totalt 283 spesifikke funksjonar generelt. Førre detektatorar bruka tiere tusenvis av funksjonar, og så detektatoren representerer ein signifikante forenkling saman med økt utvikling.', 'so': 'Story detection is the task of determining whether or not a unit of text contains a story.  Dhaqdhaqaaqyada hore waxay gaadheen sameynta ugu badnaanta 0.66 F1, mana ay sameyn si fiican shirkad kala duduwan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa daryeel cusub oo farshaxan ah oo si ugu weyn u sameynaya 0.75 F1 (14% horumarinta), kaas oo aad uga sii muuqata shaqo hore. Si gaar ah, detektoreen wuxuu sameyn karaa wax ka sareeya 0.70 F1 oo ku yaal shirkado kala duduwan oo leksikal ah oo ku jira waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka, sidoo kale horumarinta horumarinta (up to 4,000%) marka lagu tababaray macluumaad yar oo kala duwan. Midabka cusub wuxuu isticmaalaa laba nooc oo aasaasi ah oo ku saabsan dhacdooyinka, iyo mid ku saabsan xaraf gaar ah oo 283 gaar ah; qofkii hore ayaa isticmaalay toban kumanyaal oo tayo ah, sidaa darteed qofku wuxuu u jeedaa fudud iyo horumar.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie opowieści to zadanie określenia, czy jednostka tekstu zawiera opowieść. Poprzednie podejścia osiągnęły maksymalną wydajność 0.66 F1 i nie uogólniały się dobrze w różnych korpusach. Prezentujemy nowy, najnowocześniejszy detektor, który osiąga maksymalną wydajność 0,75 F1 (poprawa 14% ), o znacznie większej uogólnialności niż poprzednie prace. W szczególności nasz detektor osiąga wydajność powyżej 0.70 F1 w różnych kombinacjach leksycznie różnych korpusów do treningów i testów, a także dramatyczną poprawę wydajności (do 4.000%) podczas treningu na małym, niepłynnym zbiorze danych. Nowy detektor używa dwóch podstawowych typów cech – tych związanych z zdarzeniami i tych związanych z znakami – sumujących cechy specyficzne 283; Poprzednie detektory wykorzystywały dziesiątki tysięcy funkcji, dlatego detektor ten stanowi znaczne uproszczenie wraz ze zwiększoną wydajnością.', 'si': 'කතාවක් හොයාගන්නේ කතාවක් තියෙන්නේ නැති කියලා තියෙන්නේ කාර්ය. ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් 0.66 F1 විශාල ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ලැබුනා, ඒ වගේම වෙනස් කොර්පෝරා වල සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සා අපි අළුත් ස්ථානයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අලුත් ස්ථානයක් පරීක්ෂකයෙක්, ඒකෙන් 0.75 F1 (14% වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩියෙක්) ගොඩක් වැඩි ස විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ පරීක්ෂකයා 0.70 F1 වඩා විශේෂ වෙනස් කොර්පෝරාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ විශේෂණය (4,000%) ව අළුත් පරීක්ෂකය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අභිප්\u200dරතික වර්ගයක් දෙකක් භාවිතා කරනවා, සහ අක මුලින් පරීක්ෂකයෝ විශේෂතාවක් දහයක් භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා, ඉතින් මේ පරීක්ෂකයා විශේෂ විශේෂතාව', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje priče je zadatak određivanja da li jedinica teksta sadrži priču. Prije pristupa postigli su maksimalni učinkovit 0,66 F1, i nisu se dobro generalizovali u raznim korporama. Predstavljamo novi detektor umetnosti koji postiže maksimalnu funkciju od 0,75 F1 (poboljšanje od 14%), sa značajno većom generalizacijom od prethodnog posla. Posebno, naš detektor postiže izvršnost iznad 0,70 F1 u raznim kombinacijama leksički različitih korpora za obuku i testiranje, kao i dramatičnih poboljšanja (do 4,000%) u provedbi kada je obučeno na malim, nestabilnim podacima. Novi detektor koristi dve osnovne vrste karakteristika povezane sa događajima, i one povezane sa ukupno 283 posebnih karakteristika; Prethodni detektori su koristili desetine hiljada karakteristika, pa taj detektor predstavlja značajno jednostavljanje zajedno sa povećanjem učinka.', 'sv': 'Historiedetektering är uppgiften att avgöra om en textenhet innehåller en berättelse eller inte. Tidigare tillvägagångssätt uppnådde en maximal prestanda på 0,66 F1, och generaliserade inte bra över olika kroppar. Vi presenterar en ny state-of-the-art detektor som uppnår en maximal prestanda på 0,75 F1 (en 14% förbättring), med betydligt större generaliserbarhet än tidigare arbete. Särskilt uppnår vår detektor prestanda över 0,70 F1 i en mängd olika kombinationer av lexikalt olika kroppar för träning och testning, samt dramatiska förbättringar (upp till 4 000%) i prestanda när den tränas på en liten, flytande datauppsättning. Den nya detektorn använder två grundläggande typer av funktioner – en relaterad till händelser och en relaterad till tecken – totalt 283 specifika egenskaper. Tidigare detektorer använde tiotusentals funktioner, och därför representerar denna detektor en betydande förenkling tillsammans med ökad prestanda.', 'ta': 'உரையின் அலகு ஒரு கதையை கொண்டிருக்குமா என்று தீர்மானிக்கும் செயல். Prior approaches achieved a maximum performance of 0.66 F1, and did not generalize well across different corpora.  0. 75 F1 (14% முன்னேற்றத்தில்) அதிகபட்ச ச செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது, முந்தைய வேலையை விட பொதுவான பொதுவான புதிய நிலையில் உள்ள கண்டுபிட குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்பாளர் 0.70 F1 க்கு மேல் செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது மேலும் பல்வேறு வேறு நிறுவனத்தில் பயிற்சி மற்றும் சோதனைக்கு மாறுபடும் செயல்பா @ info: whatsthis முந்தைய கண்டுபிடிப்பாளர்கள் ஆயிரக்கணக்கான தன்மைகளை பயன்படுத்தினார்கள்.', 'ur': 'کہانیاں پڑھنے کا کام ہے کہ مقرر کرے کہ ایک ٹیکسٹ کے یونیٹ میں کوئی کہانی ہے یا نہ ہے. پہلے کی تقریبا 0.66 F1 کی عمدہ عمدہ تک پہنچ گئی، اور مختلف کوپرا میں عمدہ نہیں کیا گیا۔ ہم نے ایک نئی ایٹ ڈیکٹر کو پیش کیا ہے جو 0.75 F1 (14% زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ عملکرد) کے مطابق پہلے کام سے زیادہ بڑی عملکرد کرتا ہے۔ مخصوصا، ہمارا ڈاکٹر 0.70 اف 1 سے زیادہ فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے جبکہ ایک چھوٹی، ناپھیلائی ڈاٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی جگہ دی جاتی ہے، ایک مختلف طریقے سے مختلف کورپورا کی تعلیم اور آزمائش کے لئے، اور ڈراماٹیک سوداگری (4.000%) کی عملکرد پر۔ نیا ڈیکٹر دو بنیادی طریقوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے جن میں اتفاقات کا ارتباط ہے، اور جن کا ارتباط ہے جن میں 283 مخصوص شخصیت کا ارتباط ہے۔ پہلے ڈاکٹر نے دس ہزاروں کی فرصت استعمال کی، اور اس طرح یہ ڈاکٹر بڑھنے کے ساتھ ایک بڑی ساده تعلق کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Story detection is the task of determining whether or not a unit of text contains a story.  Birinchi marta murakkablar 0.66 F1'ning eng maksimal bajarish bajarildi va boshqa kompaniya bilan yaxshi ko'proq emas. Biz yangi San'atning holatini koʻruvchimiz, bu 0.75 F1 (14% yaxshi darajada) bajarayonligiga ega bo'ladi va oldingi ishdan juda katta umumiy. Ko'pchilik, bizning qidiruvchimiz 0.70 F1 dan ortiq ishlab chiqaradi va sinov qilish uchun har xil boshqa kompaniyalarning bir qanchalik bir qanchalik kompaniyalariga, va o'z bir kichkina, o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun dramatik o'zgarishlarni bajaradi. Yangi detektor hodisalar bilan bogʻliq boʻlgan ikki asosiy xususiyatlar turidan foydalanadi, va ikkita xususiyatlarni butunlay 283 xususiyatlar imkoniyatlari bilan bogʻliq boʻladi; oldingi obʼektlar teng minglab hususiyatdan foydalaniladi, shunday qilib bu tuzuvchiga bir juda soddalashtirish imkoniyatini ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện truyện là nhiệm vụ xác định xem một đơn vị văn bản chứa câu chuyện hay không. Quá trình tiến bộ đã đạt được hiệu suất tối đa của 0.cao F1, và đã không tổng hợp tốt cho nhiều hạ sĩ khác nhau. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một máy phát hiện mới nghệ thuật đạt được hiệu suất tối đa của 0 Đặc biệt là máy phát hiện đạt được hiệu suất trên 0.70 F1 với nhiều kết hợp từ khác nhau về thể thao để huấn luyện và thử nghiệm, cũng như cải tiến kịch tính (lên tới 4,000 không=) trong hiệu suất khi được huấn luyện trên một nhóm dữ liệu nhỏ, không thạo. Máy phát hiện mới sử dụng hai loại cơ bản của các tính năng liên quan đến các sự kiện, và một loại liên quan đến các nhân vật tổng thể: tầng 23. Máy phát hiện trước sử dụng hàng chục ngàn tính năng, và do đó máy phát hiện này là một sự đơn giản đáng kể cùng với hiệu suất tăng lên.', 'bg': 'Откриването на история е задачата да се определи дали единица текст съдържа история или не. Предишните подходи постигат максимална производителност от 0,66 и не се обобщават добре в различните корпуси. Представяме нов най-модерен детектор, който постига максимална производителност от 0,75 Ф1 (14% подобрение), със значително по-голяма обобщаваемост от предишните работи. По-специално, нашият детектор постига производителност над 0,70 при различни комбинации от лексически различни корпуси за обучение и тестване, както и драматични подобрения (до 4000%) в производителността, когато се обучава върху малък, дискуфорен набор от данни. Новият детектор използва два основни типа функции – едните свързани със събития и тези свързани с знаци – общо 283 специфични характеристики; предишните детектори използваха десетки хиляди функции и така този детектор представлява значително опростяване заедно с повишена производителност.', 'da': 'Historiedetektering er opgaven at afgøre, om en enhed af tekst indeholder en historie eller ej. Tidligere tilgange opnåede en maksimal ydeevne på 0,66 F1, og generaliserede ikke godt på tværs af forskellige korpora. Vi præsenterer en ny state-of-the-art detektor, der opnår en maksimal ydeevne på 0,75 F1 (en 14% forbedring), med betydeligt større generalisering end tidligere arbejde. Især opnår vores detektor ydeevne over 0,70 F1 på tværs af en række kombinationer af leksikologisk forskellige corpora til træning og test, samt dramatiske forbedringer (op til 4.000%) i ydeevne, når de trænes på et lille, disflydende datasæt. Den nye detektor anvender to grundlæggende typer funktioner – en relateret til begivenheder og en relateret til tegn – i alt 283 specifikke funktioner; tidligere detektorer brugte titusindvis af funktioner, og så denne detektor repræsenterer en betydelig forenkling sammen med øget ydeevne.', 'nl': "Verhaaldetectie is de taak om te bepalen of een eenheid tekst een verhaal bevat of niet. Eerdere benaderingen bereikten een maximale prestatie van 0.66 F1, en generaliseerden niet goed over verschillende corpora's. We presenteren een nieuwe state-of-the-art detector die een maximale prestatie van 0,75 F1 (een 14% verbetering) bereikt, met aanzienlijk grotere generaliseerbaarheid dan vorig werk. Met name bereikt onze detector prestaties boven 0.70 F1 in een verscheidenheid van combinaties van lexicaal verschillende corpora voor training en testen, evenals dramatische verbeteringen (tot 4.000%) in prestaties wanneer getraind op een kleine, disvloeiende gegevensset. De nieuwe detector maakt gebruik van twee basistypen kenmerken-degene gerelateerd aan gebeurtenissen en degene gerelateerd aan karakters-totaal 283 specifieke kenmerken; Vorige detectoren gebruikten tienduizenden functies, en dus vertegenwoordigt deze detector een aanzienlijke vereenvoudiging samen met verbeterde prestaties.", 'hr': 'Otkrivanje priče je zadatak određivanja da li jedinica teksta sadrži priču ili ne. Prije pristupa postigli su maksimalnu učinku od 0,66 F1 i nisu se dobro generalizirali u raznim tijelima. Predstavljamo novog detektora stanja umjetnosti koji postiže maksimalnu učinku od 0,75 F1 (poboljšanje od 14%), s značajno većom generalizacijom od prethodnog rada. Posebno, naš detektor postiže učinkovitost iznad 0,70 F1 u raznim kombinacijama leksički različitih tijela za obuku i testiranje, kao i dramatična poboljšanja (do 4,000%) u učinkovitosti kada je obučena na malim, nestabilnim podacima. Novi detektor koristi dvije osnovne vrste karakteristika povezanih s događajima, te one povezane s ukupnim znakovima ukupno 283 posebnih karakteristika; prethodni detektori koristili su desetine tisuća karakteristika, pa je taj detektor predstavljao značajno pojednostavljanje zajedno s povećanom učinkom.', 'de': 'Story-Erkennung ist die Aufgabe, festzustellen, ob eine Texteinheit eine Story enthält oder nicht. Bisherige Ansätze erreichten eine maximale Leistung von 0.66 F1 und verallgemeinerten sich nicht gut über verschiedene Korpora hinweg. Wir präsentieren einen neuen hochmodernen Detektor, der eine maximale Leistung von 0,75 F1 (eine 14% Verbesserung) mit deutlich größerer Verallgemeinerbarkeit als vorherige Arbeiten erreicht. Insbesondere erreicht unser Detektor Leistung über 0,70 F1 in einer Vielzahl von Kombinationen lexikalisch unterschiedlicher Korpora für Training und Test sowie dramatische Verbesserungen (bis zu 4.000%) in der Leistung, wenn er auf einem kleinen, nicht fließenden Datensatz trainiert wird. Der neue Detektor verwendet zwei grundlegende Arten von Merkmalen – diejenigen, die sich auf Ereignisse beziehen und diejenigen, die sich auf Zeichen beziehen – insgesamt 283-spezifische Merkmale; Bisherige Detektoren verwendeten Zehntausende von Funktionen, und so stellt dieser Detektor eine erhebliche Vereinfachung zusammen mit einer erhöhten Leistung dar.', 'ko': '이야기 탐지 작업은 텍스트 단원이 이야기를 포함하는지 확인하는 것입니다.이전 방법의 최대 성능은 0.66F1로 서로 다른 어료 라이브러리에서 잘 통용되지 않았다.우리는 새로운 최첨단 검측기를 제기했는데, 그 최대 성능은 0.75F1(14% 개선)으로 이전의 작업보다 더욱 큰 통용성을 가지고 있다.특히 우리 검측기는 훈련과 테스트에 사용되는 어휘가 다른 어료 라이브러리의 각종 조합에서 0.70F1 이상의 성능을 얻었고 작고 유창하지 않은 데이터 집합에서 훈련을 할 때 성능이 현저히 향상되었다(4000%).새로운 검측기는 두 가지 기본 유형의 특징을 사용했다. 하나는 사건과 관련되고, 다른 하나는 문자와 관련되어 총 283개의 특정한 특징을 사용했다.이전의 검측기는 수만 가지 기능을 사용했기 때문에 이 검측기는 성능을 향상시키는 동시에 크게 간소화되었다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی داستان وظیفه\u200cی تعیین کردن یک واحد متن شامل داستان است یا نه. دسترسی پیشینیان بالاترین عملکرد 0.66 F1 را رسید، و در سراسر شرکت مختلف به طور عمومی نسبت نداشت. ما یک بازرس جدید هنری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که عملکرد maximal 0.75 F1 (بهبود ۱۴ درصد) را می\u200cرساند، با قابلیت عمومی بیشتر از کار قبلی. مخصوصا، کارآگاه ما در مجموعه\u200cهای متفاوتی از شرکت\u200cهای زبانی برای آموزش و آزمایش، و بهترین دراماتیکی (تا ۴۰۰۰%) در اجرای هنگامی که در مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای کوچک و ناپذیر آموزش داده می\u200cشود، انجام می\u200cدهد. بازرس جدید دو نوع بنیادی از ویژگی\u200cهای مربوط به رویدادها استفاده می\u200cکند، و آن\u200cها مربوط به نوع\u200cهای مخصوص 283 از نوع\u200cهای مخصوص در کل است. بازرسان قبلی از دهها هزار ویژه استفاده کردند، بنابراین این بازرس یک ساده\u200cسازی مهم با عملکرد افزایش را نمایش می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kugundua hadithi ni jukumu la kuamua kama kitengo cha maandishi kina hadithi. Hatua za awali zilipata ufanisi wa kiwango kikubwa wa 0.66 F1, na haikuzalisha vizuri katika makampuni mbalimbali. Tunaonyesha mtazamo mpya wa aina ya sanaa unaoendelea ufanisi wa kiwango kikubwa wa 0.75 F1 (kwa asilimia 14 ya maboresho), ukiwa na umuhimu mkubwa zaidi kuliko kazi iliyopita. Kwa hakika, daktari wetu hufanikiwa ufanisi wa zaidi ya 0.70 F1 katika maeneo mbalimbali ya makampuni yenye asili ya lexico kwa ajili ya mafunzo na jaribio, pamoja na maboresho makubwa (hadi asilimia 4,000) katika utendaji wa mafunzo wakati wa mafunzo ya taarifa ndogo, yasiyoeleweka. Mtengenezaji mpya anatumia aina mbili za msingi zinazohusiana na matukio, na zile zinazohusiana na wahusika ambao hujumuisha vipengele 283 jumla; watambuzi wa zamani walitumia maelfu ya tabia za maelfu, na kwa hiyo mtambuzi huyu anawakilisha urahisi mkubwa pamoja na uwezekano wa kuongezeka.', 'tr': 'Geçmiş a çylyk üçin metin bir hekaýa girişýändigini takyklamak üçin zady. Öňki ýakynlaşyklar 0,66 F1 oranyň azaltylygyna ýetdi we farklı korpoýalaryň arasynda hiç gowy bir şekilde üýtgetmedi. Biz täze bir sanat detektoryny görkezip şol 0.75 F1 (14% gelişmeleri), öňki işden has beýleki üýtgeşik bilen tanyşyrys. Aýratyn bolsa, biziň detektorymyz 0.70 F1-iň üstünde leksiýaly üýtgetmek we testirmek üçin farklı terjime eden çykyşlygyny ýetip bilýär, we kiçi, netijeli maglumat düzeninde üýtgetmek üçin (4,000-a çenli) taýýarlapdyr. Täze faýl aňlamak üçin 2 düzüm hilli karakterlerden ullanýar Öňki detektirler onçak müňe müňe möhüm karakterlerden ullanýardy we şonuň üçin bu detektir artyk eserleşmeler bilen has möhüm bir ýeňlemedir.', 'af': "Gestoriesoppdaging is die taak van bepaal of 'n eenheid van teks bevat 'n storie of nie. Vorige toegang het 'n maksimum effektuur van 0.66 F1 bereik, en het nie goed genereer oor verskillende korpore nie. Ons stel 'n nuwe staat-van-kuns-detekteerder wat 'n maksimum effektuur van 0.75 F1 (' n 14% verbetering) bereik, met betekenlik groter generaliseerbaarheid as vorige werk. Spesifieke, ons detekteerder bereik prestasie bo 0,70 F1 deur 'n verskillende kombinasie van leksies verskillende korpore vir onderwerp en toets, en dramatiese verbeteringe (tot 4,000%) in prestasie wanneer op 'n klein, onvloeiende data stel onderwerp is. Die nuwe detekteerder gebruik twee basiese tipes van funksies-een wat verwanter is met gebeurtenis, en een wat verwanter is met karakters totaal 283 spesifieke funksies totaal; Vorige detekteerders het tien duisende van funksies gebruik, en so hierdie detekteerder verteenwoordig 'n betekende eenvoudiging saam met vergroot prestasie.", 'am': "የጽሑፍ ክፍል ታሪክ እንዲኖር ማረጋገጫ ነው። የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች የ0.66 F1 ትልቁ ቁጥጥር አግኝቷል፡፡ አዲስ የ-አርእስት ግንኙነት አዲስ አዲስ ዶሴር እናቀርባለን የ0.75 F1 (14 በመቶ ክፍተት ያሳያል)፤ ከቀድሞው ሥራ ይልቅ አብልጦ ትልቅ ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ አዲስ ዶሮክቶቻችን ከ0.70 F1 በላይ በተለየ ሌክሲካዊ የኮርፖርት ክፍተቶችን ለማስተማርና ለመፈተን በተለየ ማድረግ፣ እናም ለትንሽ ታናሽ፣ የተለየ የዳታ ማድረጊያውን ማድረግ ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s የቀድሞው ተሟጋቾች በሺሕዎች የሚቆጠሩ ጥያቄዎች ይጠቀማሉ፤ ስለዚህም ይህ አካባቢ በተጨማሪው ፍጥረት ጋር ትልቅ ቀላል ነው፡፡", 'az': "Hikayə keşfetməsi mətn birincisinin hekayəti barəsində olub olmadığını təsdiqləmək məqsədimdir. Əvvəlki yaxınlıqlar 0,66 F1'nin maksimum performansını başa düşdü və müxtəlif korpora arasında yaxşı işlər görmədi. Biz yeni sanat detektörünü göstəririk ki, əvvəlki işdən çox böyük nümunədir. Özellikle, detektörümüz 0,70 F1 üstündə bir neçə təhsil və imtahana çəkilmək üçün təhsil və təhsil etmək üçün təhsil edilmiş, kiçik, dəyişiklik məlumatlarda təhsil edildiyi zaman təhsil etdiyimiz təhsil və dəyişiklik təhsil etdiyimiz təqdirdə təhsil edər. Yeni detektör olaraq əlaqədar olan iki əsas tərzini istifadə edir, və hərəkətlərdən 283 müəyyən tərzi ilə əlaqədarlar istifadə edir. əvvəlki detektörlər onlardan minlərlə fərqli işlədilər, bu detektör artırmaqla birlikdə möhkəm bir basitləşdirməyi göstərir.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje priče je zadatak određivanja da li jedinica teksta sadrži priču ili ne. Prije pristupa postigli su maksimalnu učinku od 0,66 F1 i nisu se dobro generalizirali u raznim korporama. Predstavljamo novog detektora umjetnosti koji postiže maksimalnu učinku od 0,75 F1 (poboljšanje od 14%), sa značajno većom generalizacijom od prethodnog rada. Posebno, naš detektor postiže učinkovitost iznad 0,70 F1 u raznim kombinacijama leksički različitih korporacija za obuku i testiranje, kao i dramatične poboljšanje (do 4,000%) u učinkovitosti kada je obučeno na malim, nestabilnim podacima. Novi detektor koristi dvije osnovne vrste karakteristika povezanih sa događajima, te one povezane s ukupnim karakterima od 283 posebnih karakteristika; prethodni detektori su koristili desetine hiljada karakteristika, pa je taj detektor predstavljao značajno jednostavljanje zajedno sa povećanom učinkom.', 'id': 'Story detection is the task of determining whether or not a unit of text contains a story.  Prior approaches achieved a maximum performance of 0.66 F1, and did not generalize well across different corpora.  We present a new state-of-the-art detector that achieves a maximum performance of 0.75 F1 (a 14% improvement), with significantly greater generalizability than previous work.  In particular, our detector achieves performance above 0.70 F1 across a variety of combinations of lexically different corpora for training and testing, as well as dramatic improvements (up to 4,000%) in performance when trained on a small, disfluent data set.  Detektor baru menggunakan dua tipe dasar dari fitur-satu yang berhubungan dengan peristiwa, dan yang berhubungan dengan karakter-total 283 fitur spesifik secara umum; previous detectors used tens of thousands of features, and so this detector represents a significant simplification along with increased performance.', 'bn': 'একটি টেক্সটের ইউনিট আছে কিনা তা নির্ধারণ করার কাজ। প্রাথমিক উপায় ০. ৬৬ এফ১ এর সর্বোচ্চ কাজ অর্জন করেছে এবং বিভিন্ন কোর্পোরা জুড়ে ভালোভাবে সৃষ্টি করেনি। আমরা একটি নতুন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ডিটেক্টর উপস্থাপন করছি যা পূর্ববর্তী কাজের চেয়ে বেশী সাধারণ কাজ অর্জন করে। বিশেষ করে, আমাদের ডিকেটর ০. ৭০ এফ১ এর বেশী কিছু কিছু লেক্সিকোর্পোরা প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা করার জন্য বিভিন্ন কোম্পোরার সাথে প্রদর্শনের সম্মিলন অর্জন করেছেন, এবং সাথে না নতুন ডিটেক্টর এই ঘটনার সাথে সম্পর্কিত দুটি মৌলিক ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে এবং সারাজ্যে অক্ষর-সম্পূর্ণ ২৮৩ নির্দিষ্ট বৈশ পূর্ববর্তী ডিটেক্টর হাজার হাজার বিশেষ ব্যবহার করেছেন এবং তাই এই ডিটেক্টর বৃদ্ধি প্রদর্শনের সাথে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ স', 'sq': 'Story detection is the task of determining whether or not a unit of text contains a story.  Prior approaches achieved a maximum performance of 0.66 F1, and did not generalize well across different corpora.  Ne paraqesim një detektor të ri të gjeneralizuar që arrin një performancë maksimale prej 0.75 F1 (një përmirësim prej 14%, me gjeneralizueshmëri më të madhe se puna e mëparshme. In particular, our detector achieves performance above 0.70 F1 across a variety of combinations of lexically different corpora for training and testing, as well as dramatic improvements (up to 4,000%) in performance when trained on a small, disfluent data set.  The new detector uses two basic types of features-ones related to events, and ones related to characters-totaling 283 specific features overall;  previous detectors used tens of thousands of features, and so this detector represents a significant simplification along with increased performance.', 'cs': 'Detekce příběhu je úkolem určit, zda jednotka textu obsahuje či nikoli příběh. Předchozí přístupy dosáhly maximálního výkonu 0.66 F1 a nezobecňovaly se dobře napříč různými korpusy. Představujeme nový nejmodernější detektor, který dosahuje maximálního výkonu 0,75 F1 (14% zlepšení), s výrazně větší zobecňovatelností než předchozí práce. Zejména náš detektor dosahuje výkonu nad 0,70 F1 v různých kombinacích lexicky odlišných korpusů pro trénink a testování, stejně jako dramatických zlepšení (až 4,000%) výkonu při tréninku na malé, neplynulé datové sadě. Nový detektor používá dva základní typy vlastností – jeden související s událostmi a jeden související se znaky – celkově 283 specifické vlastnosti; Předchozí detektory používaly desítky tisíc funkcí, a proto tento detektor představuje výrazné zjednodušení spolu se zvýšeným výkonem.', 'hy': 'Պատմությունների հայտնաբերումը նպատակն է որոշել, թե տեքստի միավորը պատմություն ունի, թե ոչ: Նախորդ մոտեցումները հասան 0.66 F1-ի առավելագույն արտադրողականության և տարբեր մարմներում լավ չեն ընդհանրացվել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր բարձրագույն դետեկտոր, որը հասնում է 0.75 F1 (14 տոկոսի բարելավում) առավելագույն արտադրողականության, որն ավելի մեծ ընդհանուր է քան նախորդ աշխատանքը: Մասնավորապես, մեր դետեկտորը հասնում է 0.70 F1-ից բարձր արտադրողականության տարբեր լեքսիկապես տարբեր կորպորանների համակցումներին ուսուցանելու և փորձարկումների համար, ինչպես նաև դրամատիկ բարելավումների (մինչև 4,000 տոկոս) արտադրողականության մեջ, երբ ուսուցանում է փոքր, ան Նոր դետեկտորը օգտագործում է իրադարձությունների հետ կապված երկու հիմնական հատկանիշներ, իսկ հատկանիշներ, որոնք կապված են հատկանիշների 283 հատկանիշների հետ: նախորդ դետեկտորները օգտագործում էին տասնյակ հազարավոր հատկանիշներ, և այսպիսով, այս դետեկտորն արտահայտում է նշանակալի պարզաբանություն միասին աճող արդյունքների հետ:', 'et': 'Lugu tuvastamine on ülesanne määrata, kas tekstiühik sisaldab lugu või mitte. Varasemad lähenemisviisid saavutasid maksimaalse jõudluse 0,66 F1 ja ei üldistunud hästi erinevate korpuste vahel. Esitleme uut kaasaegset detektorit, mis saavutab maksimaalse jõudluse 0,75 F1 (14% paranemine) ja on oluliselt suurem üldistatavus kui varasemad tööd. Eelkõige saavutab meie detektor jõudluse üle 0,70 F1 mitmesuguste leksikaalselt erinevate korpuste kombinatsioonide treenimiseks ja testimiseks, samuti märkimisväärseid parandusi (kuni 4000%) jõudluses, kui seda koolitatakse väikese, disfluentse andmekogumiga. Uus detektor kasutab kahte põhilist tüüpi funktsioone – sündmustega seotud ja tähemärkidega seotud – kokku 283 erifunktsiooni; Varasemad detektorid kasutasid kümneid tuhandeid funktsioone ja seega kujutab see detektor märkimisväärset lihtsustamist koos suurema jõudlusega.', 'fi': 'Tarinan tunnistus on tehtÃĪvÃĪ mÃĪÃĪrittÃĪÃĪ, sisÃĪltÃĪÃĪkÃķ tekstiyksikkÃķ tarinan. Aiemmat lÃĪhestymistavat saavuttivat maksimaalisen suorituskyvyn 0,66 F1, eivÃĪtkÃĪ yleistyneet hyvin eri korpusissa. Esittelemme uuden huippuluokan ilmaisimen, joka saavuttaa maksimitehokkuuden 0,75 F1 (14%:n parannus), ja yleistettÃĪvyys on huomattavasti suurempi kuin aiempi tyÃķ. Erityisesti ilmaisimemme saavuttaa suorituskyvyn yli 0,70 F1 erilaisissa leksikoristen yhdistelmissÃĪ harjoittelua ja testausta varten sekÃĪ dramaattisia parannuksia (jopa 4 000%) suorituskykyyn, kun se on koulutettu pienellÃĪ, epÃĪsujuvalla tietojoukolla. Uusi ilmaisin kÃĪyttÃĪÃĪ kahta perusominaisuutta â\x80\x93 tapahtumat ja merkit â\x80\x93 yhteensÃĪ 283 erityisominaisuutta. Aiemmat ilmaisimet kÃĪyttivÃĪt kymmeniÃĪ tuhansia ominaisuuksia, joten tÃĪmÃĪ ilmaisin edustaa merkittÃĪvÃĪÃĪ yksinkertaistamista ja parempaa suorituskykyÃĪ.', 'ca': "Story detection is the task of determining whether or not a unit of text contains a story.  Prior approaches achieved a maximum performance of 0.66 F1, and did not generalize well across different corpora.  Presentam un nou detector d'última generació que aconsegueix un rendiment màxim de 0,75 F1 (una millora del 14%), amb una generalització significativament més gran que la feina anterior. En particular, el nostre detector aconsegueix un rendiment superior a 0,70 F1 a través d'una varietat de combinacions de corpores lèxicament diferents per a entrenar i testar, i millores dramàtiques (fins a 4.000%) en el rendiment quan està entrenat en un petit conjunt de dades desfluents. El nou detector utilitza dos tipus bàsics de característiques relacionats amb esdeveniments, i altres relacionats amb caracteres totalitzant 283 característiques específices; previous detectors used tens of thousands of features, and so this detector represents a significant simplification along with increased performance.", 'jv': 'Ealah Ndheke kang dipoleh sing wis ngerasakno uwong ing 0.6 F1, lan ora ngerasakno ngono cara-cara sing itong. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan sing gak dhéwé 0.75 F1 Juara-Juara, awakdhéwé iso nggawe geranggap kanggo 0.7 F1 karo perusahaan langgar oleh dumadhan karo perusahaan nggawe geranggap ilegal gawe nguasai podho nggunakake lan ujaran, terus akeh dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno Awak dhéwé string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'גילוי סיפורים הוא המשימה להחליט אם יחידת טקסט מכילה סיפור או לא. גישות קודמות השיגו ביצוע מקסימלי של 0.66 F1, ולא הגנרליזציה היטב בכל גופורה שונה. אנחנו מציגים גלאי חדש של מצב האומנות שמגיע ביצוע מקסימום של 0.75 F1 (שיפור 14 אחוז), עם הגנרליזציה גדולה יותר משעבודה קודמת. במיוחד, המחשב שלנו משיג ביצועים מעל 0.70 F1 במערכת מגוון של שילובים של גופות שונות ללקסית לאימון ובדיקות, כמו גם שיפורים דרמטיים (עד 4,000%) בהופעה כאשר מאומנים על קבוצת מידע קטנה ומנוחה. המחשב החדש משתמש בשני סוגים בסיסיים של אופיינים-אחד שקשורים לאירועים, ואחדים שקשורים לאופנים שמספרים 283 אופיינים ספציפיים באופן כללי; הגליטים הקודמים השתמשו בעשרות אלפי תכונות, וכך הגליט הזה מייצג פשטוט משמעותי יחד עם ביצועים גדולים.', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje zgodbe je naloga ugotavljanja, ali enota besedila vsebuje zgodbo ali ne. Predhodni pristopi so dosegli največjo zmogljivost 0,66 F1 in se niso dobro posplošili v različnih korpusih. Predstavljamo nov najsodobnejši detektor, ki dosega največjo zmogljivost 0,75 F1 (14% izboljšanje), z bistveno večjo generalizacijo kot prejšnje delo. Naš detektor doseže zmogljivost nad 0,70 F1 pri različnih kombinacijah leksično različnih korpusov za trening in testiranje ter dramatične izboljšave (do 4.000%) zmogljivosti pri usposabljanju na majhnem, disfluentnem naboru podatkov. Novi detektor uporablja dve osnovni vrsti značilnosti – ena, povezana z dogodki, in ena, povezana z znaki – skupaj 283 posebnih značilnosti; prejšnji detektorji so uporabljali več deset tisoč funkcij, zato ta detektor predstavlja znatno poenostavitev skupaj z večjo zmogljivostjo.', 'bo': 'Story detection is the task of determining whether a unit of text contains a story. སྔོན་གྱི་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིས་0.66 F1 ཡི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཚད་མི་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་སྦྱོར་མི་འདྲ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་འཆར་བཤེར་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚད་0.75 F1་ཡིས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཚད་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོའི་རྟོག་པ་མཁན་གྱིས་0.70 F1 ལས་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག འཇུག་སྣོད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གིས་བྱ་འགུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཉིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་གྱི་འཛིན་སྐྱོད་པ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྟོང་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་བྱས། དེར་བརྟེན་ན། རྟོག', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kayyar hanyõyin da suka sami babban aikin 0.66 F1, kuma bai sami mai kyau a tsakanin wata dabam. Tuna gabatar da wani halin-sanar da ke sami babban rabo na 0.75F1 (an kyautata %14), da mai girma ga mai jama'a ko wani aikin da ya gabata. A cikin ƙayyade, tana sãmun mafarinsa a kan 0.70 F1 a kan komai masu haɗi na komma mai dabar-nau'i ko kuma ma'anar kwamfyuta ko da jarrabi, da kuma masu ƙaranci mai kyau (up to 4,000%) a cikin aikin idan an yi wa aikin da wani danne mai ƙaranci, mai fasahawa. @ action: button Zani ya yi amfani da dubu dubu dubu na sifati, kuma don haka wannan mai gano yana mai sauƙi sami da mai ƙaranci."}
{'en': 'Multi-modular domain-tailored OCR post-correction', 'ar': 'متعدد الوحدات المصممة لمجال OCR بعد التصحيح', 'es': 'Post-corrección de OCR multimodular adaptada al dominio', 'pt': 'Pós-correção de OCR sob medida para domínio multimodular', 'fr': 'Post-correction OCR multimodulaire adaptée au domaine', 'hi': 'मल्टी-मॉड्यूलर डोमेन-सिलवाया OCR पोस्ट-सुधार', 'zh': '多模块域定制 OCR 校正后', 'ja': 'マルチモジュール化されたドメインに合わせたOCRの訂正後', 'ru': 'Мультимодульная КЛСД после коррекции, адаптированная к домену', 'ga': 'Iarcheartú OCR ilmhodúil atá oiriúnaithe don fhearann', 'ka': 'მრავალური მოდულური დიომინის დასრულებული OCR დასრულება', 'hu': 'Többmoduláris tartományra szabott OCR utókorrekció', 'el': 'Μεταδιόρθωση OCR πολλαπλών μορφωματικών προσαρμοσμένων στον τομέα', 'kk': 'Көп модульдерді доменге өзгертілген OCR кейін түзету', 'mk': 'После корекција на ОКР со мултимодуларни домени', 'lt': 'Įvairių modulių srityse pritaikytų OCR korekcija po korekcijos', 'ms': 'Postkorreksi OCR berbilang-modular-domain-tailored', 'ml': 'Multi- modular domain- tailored OCR post-correction', 'mt': 'Postkorrezzjoni OCR multimodulari mfassla skont id-dominju', 'mn': 'Олон-модуль домены өөрчлөгдсөн OCR дараа засах', 'no': 'Multi modular domenetailored OCR post-correction', 'pl': 'Wielomodulowa modułowa korekta OCR dostosowana do domeny', 'ro': 'Postcorecție OCR adaptată domeniului multimodular', 'sr': 'Više modularne domene ispravljene OCR nakon korekcije', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මොඩියුලර් ඩෝමින් ස්ථාපිත OCR පස්ස සුධානය', 'it': 'Post-correzione OCR multi-modulare su misura per dominio', 'so': 'OCR oo hagaajinta kadib', 'sv': 'Multi-modulär domänanpassad OCR efterkorrigering', 'ta': 'Multi- modular domain- tailored OCR பின் திருத்தம்', 'ur': 'Multi modular domain-tailored OCR post-correction', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Многомодулна следкорекция на OCR, приспособена към домейна', 'nl': 'Multi-modulaire domein-aangepaste OCR post-correctie', 'hr': 'Višemodularne domene prilagođene OCR nakon korekcije', 'da': 'Multi-modulær domænespecificeret OCR post-korrektion', 'de': 'Multi-modulare domänenspezifische OCR-Nachkorrektur', 'id': 'Postkoreksi OCR yang disesuaikan dengan domain-multimodular', 'fa': 'بعد از اصلاح OCR به دومین\u200cهای زیادی متصل شده', 'ko': '다중 모듈 도메인 맞춤형 OCR 사후 보정', 'sw': 'Multi-modular domain-tailored OCR post-correction', 'sq': 'Postkorrektimi OCR i përshtatshëm për domenin multimodular', 'tr': 'Çoklu modüler domain-tailored OCR post-correction', 'af': 'Multi modular domein- sterkte OCR post- koreksie', 'am': 'በ', 'hy': 'Բազմամոդուլյար տիեզերքում պատրաստված OCR-ի հետաուղղությունը', 'bn': 'একাধিক মোডুয়াল ডোমেইন-টেইলরেড ওসিআর-এর পোস্ট সংশোধন', 'az': 'Çoxlu modular domain-adjusted OCR post-correction', 'ca': 'Post-correcció OCR adaptada al domini multimodular', 'bs': 'Više modularne domene prilagođene OCR nakon korekcije', 'et': 'Multimodulaarne domeenile kohandatud OCR-i järelkorrigeerimine', 'cs': 'Multimodulární OCR post-korekce přizpůsobená doméně', 'fi': 'Monimodulaarinen verkkotunnuksen räätälöity OCR-jälkikorjaus', 'jv': 'Multi-modulared domain-size OCR after-rection', 'he': 'התיקון לאחר התיקון OCR המוטולרי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Po popravku OCR za večmodularne domene', 'bo': 'Multi-modular domain-tailored OCR post-correction'}
{'en': 'One of the main obstacles for many Digital Humanities projects is the low data availability. Texts have to be digitized in an expensive and time consuming process whereas Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-correction is one of the time-critical factors. At the example of OCR post-correction, we show the adaptation of a generic system to solve a specific problem with little data. The system accounts for a diversity of errors encountered in OCRed texts coming from different time periods in the domain of literature. We show that the combination of different approaches, such as e.g. Statistical Machine Translation and spell checking, with the help of a ranking mechanism tremendously improves over single-handed approaches. Since we consider the accessibility of the resulting tool as a crucial part of Digital Humanities collaborations, we describe the workflow we suggest for efficient text recognition and subsequent automatic and manual post-correction', 'ar': 'إحدى العقبات الرئيسية أمام العديد من مشاريع العلوم الإنسانية الرقمية هي قلة توافر البيانات. يجب رقمنة النصوص في عملية مكلفة وتستغرق وقتًا طويلاً ، بينما يعد التصحيح اللاحق للتعرف الضوئي على الأحرف (OCR) أحد العوامل الحاسمة للوقت. في مثال التصحيح اللاحق لـ OCR ، نعرض تكييف نظام عام لحل مشكلة معينة مع القليل من البيانات. يراعي النظام مجموعة متنوعة من الأخطاء التي تمت مواجهتها في النصوص التي تم التعرف على الحروف بالمسح الضوئي والتي تأتي من فترات زمنية مختلفة في مجال الأدب. نظهر أن الجمع بين الأساليب المختلفة ، على سبيل المثال تعمل الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية والتدقيق الإملائي بمساعدة آلية الترتيب على تحسين أساليب الاستخدام بيد واحدة بشكل كبير. نظرًا لأننا نعتبر إمكانية الوصول إلى الأداة الناتجة جزءًا مهمًا من التعاون في العلوم الإنسانية الرقمية ، فإننا نصف سير العمل الذي نقترحه للتعرف على النص بكفاءة والتصحيح اللاحق التلقائي واليدوي اللاحق', 'fr': "L'un des principaux obstacles à de nombreux projets d'humanités numériques est la faible disponibilité des données. Les textes doivent être numérisés selon un processus coûteux et fastidieux, tandis que la post-correction par reconnaissance optique de caractères (OCR) est l'un des facteurs critiques en termes de temps. À l'exemple de la post-correction OCR, nous montrons l'adaptation d'un système générique pour résoudre un problème spécifique avec peu de données. Le système tient compte d'une diversité d'erreurs rencontrées dans des textes ROC provenant de différentes périodes dans le domaine de la littérature. Nous montrons que la combinaison de différentes approches, telles que la traduction automatique statistique et la vérification orthographique, à l'aide d'un mécanisme de classement, s'améliore considérablement par rapport aux approches à une seule main. Puisque nous considérons l'accessibilité de l'outil résultant comme un élément crucial des collaborations en sciences humaines numériques, nous décrivons le flux de travail que nous suggérons pour une reconnaissance de texte efficace et une post-correction automatique et manuelle ultérieure.", 'es': 'Uno de los principales obstáculos para muchos proyectos de Humanidades Digitales es la baja disponibilidad de datos. Los textos deben digitalizarse en un proceso costoso y lento, mientras que la corrección posterior del reconocimiento óptico de caracteres (OCR) es uno de los factores críticos del tiempo. En el ejemplo de la postcorrección de OCR, mostramos la adaptación de un sistema genérico para resolver un problema específico con pocos datos. El sistema da cuenta de una diversidad de errores encontrados en los textos de la OCred que provienen de diferentes períodos de tiempo en el dominio de la literatura. Demostramos que la combinación de diferentes enfoques, como por ejemplo la traducción automática estadística y el corrector ortográfico, con la ayuda de un mecanismo de clasificación, mejora enormemente con respecto a los enfoques de una sola mano. Dado que consideramos que la accesibilidad de la herramienta resultante es una parte crucial de las colaboraciones de Humanidades Digitales, describimos el flujo de trabajo que sugerimos para un reconocimiento de texto eficiente y la posterior corrección posterior automática y manual', 'pt': 'Um dos principais obstáculos para muitos projetos de Humanidades Digitais é a baixa disponibilidade de dados. Os textos precisam ser digitalizados em um processo caro e demorado, enquanto a pós-correção de reconhecimento óptico de caracteres (OCR) é um dos fatores críticos em termos de tempo. No exemplo da pós-correção de OCR, mostramos a adaptação de um sistema genérico para resolver um problema específico com poucos dados. O sistema é responsável por uma diversidade de erros encontrados em textos OCRs provenientes de diferentes períodos de tempo no domínio da literatura. Mostramos que a combinação de diferentes abordagens, como e. A tradução automática estatística e a verificação ortográfica, com a ajuda de um mecanismo de classificação, melhoram tremendamente em relação às abordagens de mão única. Uma vez que consideramos a acessibilidade da ferramenta resultante como uma parte crucial das colaborações de Humanidades Digitais, descrevemos o fluxo de trabalho que sugerimos para um reconhecimento de texto eficiente e posterior pós-correção automática e manual', 'ja': '多くのデジタル人文科学プロジェクトの主な障害の1つは、データの可用性が低いことです。テキストは高価で時間のかかるプロセスでデジタル化する必要がありますが、光学文字認識（ OCR ）後の修正は時間的に重要な要素の1つです。OCR事後補正の例では、データの少ない特定の問題を解決するためのジェネリックシステムの適応を示します。このシステムは、文献の分野で異なる時期のOCRedテキストで発生したさまざまなエラーを説明しています。統計的機械翻訳やスペルチェックなどのさまざまなアプローチの組み合わせは、ランキングメカニズムの助けを借りて、片手で行うアプローチよりも大幅に改善されることを示しています。結果として得られるツールのアクセシビリティは、デジタル人文科学とのコラボレーションの重要な部分であると考えているため、効率的なテキスト認識とその後の自動および手動の修正のために推奨されるワークフローについて説明します', 'zh': '诸数人文目之要,一为数可用性下。 文本必数字化于贵耗时,而光学符识(OCR)校正为时关键因素之一。 OCR后校正者,示以通用系统之适应性,以决数少特定。 当系统解释,自文域异时OCRed文本所遇诸误。 臣等明排名机之助,不同其法(如计机器翻译与拼写检)之组,大有改单手。 吾以为终具之可访问性,数人文学科之要,故述吾言事,以成其效,及其自手动而后正之', 'ru': 'Одним из основных препятствий для многих проектов в области цифровых гуманитарных наук является низкий уровень доступности данных. Тексты должны быть оцифрованы в дорогостоящем и трудоемком процессе, в то время как оптическое распознавание символов (OCR) после коррекции является одним из критических по времени факторов. На примере посткоррекции КЛСД мы показываем адаптацию общей системы для решения конкретной проблемы с небольшим объемом данных. Система учитывает разнообразие ошибок, встречающихся в текстах OCRed, поступающих из разных периодов времени в области литературы. Мы показываем, что сочетание различных подходов, таких как, например, статистический машинный перевод и проверка орфографии, с помощью механизма ранжирования значительно улучшает одноручные подходы. Поскольку мы рассматриваем доступность полученного инструмента как важнейшую часть сотрудничества в области цифровых гуманитарных наук, мы описываем рабочий процесс, который мы предлагаем для эффективного распознавания текста и последующего автоматического и ручного последующего исправления', 'hi': 'कई डिजिटल मानविकी परियोजनाओं के लिए मुख्य बाधाओं में से एक कम डेटा उपलब्धता है। ग्रंथों को एक महंगी और समय लेने वाली प्रक्रिया में डिजिटाइज़ किया जाना चाहिए जबकि ऑप्टिकल कैरेक्टर रिकग्निशन (ओसीआर) पोस्ट-करेक्शन समय-महत्वपूर्ण कारकों में से एक है। ओसीआर पोस्ट-सुधार के उदाहरण पर, हम छोटे डेटा के साथ एक विशिष्ट समस्या को हल करने के लिए एक सामान्य प्रणाली के अनुकूलन को दिखाते हैं। सिस्टम साहित्य के डोमेन में विभिन्न समय अवधि से आने वाले OCRed ग्रंथों में आने वाली त्रुटियों की विविधता के लिए खाता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों का संयोजन, जैसे कि सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद और वर्तनी की जांच, एक रैंकिंग तंत्र की मदद से एकल-सौंपे गए दृष्टिकोणों पर काफी सुधार करता है। चूंकि हम डिजिटल मानविकी सहयोग के एक महत्वपूर्ण भाग के रूप में परिणामी उपकरण की पहुंच पर विचार करते हैं, इसलिए हम उस वर्कफ़्लो का वर्णन करते हैं जो हम कुशल पाठ पहचान और बाद के स्वचालित और मैनुअल पोस्ट-सुधार के लिए सुझाते हैं', 'ga': 'Ceann de na príomhchonstaicí atá ag go leor tionscadal sna Daonnachtaí Digiteacha ná an infhaighteacht sonraí íseal. Ní mór téacsanna a dhigitiú i bpróiseas costasach agus am-íditheach, ach tá iarcheartú Aithint Optúil Carachtair (OCR) ar cheann de na fachtóirí a bhfuil géarghá leis ó thaobh ama de. Ag sampla iar-cheartú OCR, léirímid oiriúnú córas cineálach chun fadhb shonrach a réiteach gan mórán sonraí. Tugann an córas cuntas ar éagsúlacht na n-earráidí a aimsítear i dtéacsanna OCRed ag teacht ó thréimhsí ama éagsúla i réimse na litríochta. Léiríonn muid go bhfuil an meascán de chur chuige éagsúla, mar shampla e.g. Cuireann Aistriú Meaisín Staidrimh agus seiceáil litrithe, le cabhair ó mheicníocht rangúcháin, go mór le feabhas ar chur chuige aonláimh. Ós rud é go measann muid inrochtaineacht na huirlise mar chuid ríthábhachtach de chomhoibriú na nDaonnachtaí Digiteacha, déanaimid cur síos ar an sreabhadh oibre a mholaimid le haghaidh aithint éifeachtúil téacs agus iarcheartú uathoibríoch agus láimhe ina dhiaidh sin.', 'ka': 'ბევრი დიზიტალური ადამიანის პროექტებისთვის ერთი უფრო ძალიან ბევრი განმავლობაში არის ცოტა მონაცემები. ტექსტი უნდა იყოს ციფრიტიკური და დროის გამოყენება პროცესში, მაგრამ ოპტიკური სიმბოლოების განახლება (OCR) პოსკრიტიკური ფაქტების ერთი. OCR-ის შემდეგ კონფიგურაციის მაგალითად, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ განვითარებთ საერთო სისტემის ადატაციაციას, რომ პატარა მონაცემების განსაკუთრებული პრობლემა სისტემის შეცდომის განსხვავება OCRed ტექსტის განსხვავებული დრო პერიოდიდან ლეტებერიის დიომინში მოხვდება. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ განსხვავებული მიღებების კომბიზაცია, მაგალითად სტატისტური მაქსინური გაგრძელება და მაქსინური შემოწმება, როგორც პრენტისტური მაქსინური შემოწმება, ერთხელ მიღ ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ შემდეგ სისტემის შესაძლებლობა როგორც დიზიტალური ადამიანის მუშაობაში მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილი, ჩვენ აღწერეთ სამუშაო სისტემის შესაძლებლობა და შემდეგ ავტომატიკური და მარტი', 'el': 'Ένα από τα κύρια εμπόδια για πολλά έργα Ψηφιακών Ανθρωπιστικών Επιστημών είναι η χαμηλή διαθεσιμότητα δεδομένων. Τα κείμενα πρέπει να ψηφιοποιηθούν σε μια δαπανηρή και χρονοβόρα διαδικασία, ενώ η μεταδιόρθωση οπτικής αναγνώρισης χαρακτήρων (OCR) είναι ένας από τους χρονικά κρίσιμους παράγοντες. Στο παράδειγμα της μεταδιόρθωσης δείχνουμε την προσαρμογή ενός γενικού συστήματος για την επίλυση ενός συγκεκριμένου προβλήματος με λίγα δεδομένα. Το σύστημα εξηγεί μια ποικιλία σφαλμάτων που συναντώνται στα κείμενα που προέρχονται από διαφορετικές χρονικές περιόδους στον τομέα της λογοτεχνίας. Δείχνουμε ότι ο συνδυασμός διαφορετικών προσεγγίσεων, όπως π.χ. η Στατιστική Μηχανική Μετάφραση και ο ορθογραφικός έλεγχος, με τη βοήθεια ενός μηχανισμού κατάταξης βελτιώνει σημαντικά σε σχέση με τις μονοχειρικές προσεγγίσεις. Δεδομένου ότι θεωρούμε την προσβασιμότητα του εργαλείου που προκύπτει ως κρίσιμο μέρος των συνεργασιών των Ψηφιακών Ανθρωπιστικών Επιστημών, περιγράφουμε τη ροή εργασίας που προτείνουμε για αποτελεσματική αναγνώριση κειμένου και επακόλουθη αυτόματη και χειρωνακτική μετεγχειρητική διόρθωση', 'hu': 'Számos digitális humán projekt előtt az egyik fő akadály az alacsony adatszolgáltatás. A szövegeket drága és időigényes folyamattal kell digitalizálni, míg az optikai karakterfelismerés (OCR) utókorrekció az egyik időkritikus tényező. Az OCR post-korrekció példájában bemutatjuk egy generikus rendszer adaptálását, hogy egy adott problémát kevés adattal oldjon meg. A rendszer az irodalom területén különböző időszakokból származó OCRed szövegekben tapasztalt hibák sokféleségét számolja fel. Megmutatjuk, hogy a különböző megközelítések kombinációja, mint például a statisztikai gépi fordítás és a helyesírás-ellenőrzés, egy rangsorolási mechanizmus segítségével rendkívül javul az egykezes megközelítésekkel szemben. Mivel a digitális humán tudományok együttműködésének kulcsfontosságú részeként tekintjük a kapott eszköz hozzáférhetőségét, ismertetjük a hatékony szövegfelismeréshez és az ezt követő automatikus és manuális utójavításhoz javasolt munkafolyamatot.', 'it': "Uno dei principali ostacoli per molti progetti di Digital Humanities è la scarsa disponibilità dei dati. I testi devono essere digitalizzati in un processo costoso e dispendioso di tempo, mentre il riconoscimento ottico dei caratteri (OCR) post-correzione è uno dei fattori critici per il tempo. Nell'esempio di post-correzione OCR, mostriamo l'adattamento di un sistema generico per risolvere un problema specifico con pochi dati. Il sistema spiega una varietà di errori riscontrati nei testi OCRed provenienti da diversi periodi di tempo nel campo della letteratura. Dimostriamo che la combinazione di approcci diversi, come ad esempio la traduzione automatica statistica e il controllo ortografico, con l'aiuto di un meccanismo di classificazione migliora enormemente rispetto agli approcci con una sola mano. Poiché consideriamo l'accessibilità dello strumento risultante una parte cruciale delle collaborazioni di Digital Humanities, descriviamo il flusso di lavoro che proponiamo per un efficiente riconoscimento del testo e successiva post-correzione automatica e manuale", 'kk': 'Көптеген цифрлық адамзат жобаларының негізгі бәлкімдерінің бірі - деректер қол жеткізілмейді. Мәтіндерді бағатты және уақыт пайдалану процесінде цифрлау керек, бірақ оптикалық таңбаларды түзету (OCR) кейін уақыт- критикалық факторларының бірі. ОКР кейін түзету мәселесінің мысалы, кішкентай мәселелерді шешу үшін жалпы жүйенің адаптациясын көрсетеді. Жүйелік кәдімгінің доменінде OCRed мәтіндерінде бірнеше қатенің түрлі тіркелгісі бар. Мысалы, статистикалық компьютерді аудару мен емле тексеру механизмінің көмегімен бір қолданыстағы көмегімен, бір қолданыстағы көмегімен өте жақсы жасайды. Біз бұл құралының қатынау мүмкіндігін цифрлық адамзаттардың біріктірімінің маңызды бөлігі деп ойладық. Біз мәтінді таңдау үшін жұмыс жұмысын таңдап, кейін автоматты және қолмен кейін қолмен', 'lt': 'One of the main obstacles for many Digital Humanities projects is the low data availability.  Tekstai turi būti skaitmeninti brangiai ir laikui reikalaujančiu procesu, o optinio simbolio pripažinimas po korekcijos yra vienas iš laiko kritinių veiksnių. Pavyzdžiui, pasibaigus UŠR koregavimui, mes parodome bendros sistemos pritaikymą tam, kad būtų išspręsta konkreti problem a su mažais duomenimis. Sistema atspindi įvairias klaidas, nustatytas UŠT tekstuose, gautas iš skirtingų literatūros laikotarpių. Mes rodome, kad įvairių metodų, pavyzdžiui, statistinių mašinų vertimo ir raštų tikrinimo, derinys su ranking ų mechanizmu labai pagerina vienarankius metodus. Kadangi manome, kad gautos priemonės prieinamumas yra labai svarbi bendradarbiavimo su skaitmenine humanitarine priemone dalis, apibūdiname darbo srautą, kurį siūlome veiksmingai pripažinti tekstus ir vėliau automatiškai ir rankiniu būdu po koregavimo.', 'ms': 'Salah satu halangan utama bagi ramai projek Digital Humanities adalah kecepatan data rendah. Teks perlu didigitalisasi dalam proses yang mahal dan memakan masa sementara Pengenalan Aksara Optik (OCR) selepas penyesuaian adalah salah satu faktor kritik masa. Dalam contoh post-correction OCR, kita tunjukkan penyesuaian sistem generik untuk menyelesaikan masalah khusus dengan data yang sedikit. Sistem akaun untuk pelbagai ralat yang ditemui dalam teks OCRed yang berasal dari tempoh masa yang berbeza dalam domain literatur. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kombinasi pendekatan yang berbeza, misalnya Terjemahan Mesin Statistik dan pemeriksaan ejaan, dengan bantuan mekanisme peringkat meningkatkan secara besar atas pendekatan dengan satu tangan. Oleh kerana kita mempertimbangkan aksesibilitas alat hasil sebagai sebahagian penting dari kerjasama Digital Humanities, kita menggambarkan aliran kerja yang kami cadangkan untuk pengenalan teks efisien dan kemudian automatik dan manual selepas pembetulan', 'mk': 'Една од главните пречки за многу проекти на Дигитална хуманитост е ниската достапност на податоци. Текстите мора да се дигитализираат во скап и временски процес, додека посткорекцијата на оптичкото признавање на знаци (OCR) е еден од временски критичните фактори. На пример на посткорекцијата на ОКР, ја покажуваме адаптацијата на генерален систем за решавање на специфичен проблем со мали податоци. Системот претставува различност на грешки кои се соочени во текстите на ОЦРД кои доаѓаат од различни временски периоди во доменот на литературата. Покажуваме дека комбинацијата на различни пристапи, како што се, на пример, транслекција на статистичката машина и проверка на магија, со помош на рангирачкиот механизам, значително се подобрува преку еднорачни пристапи. Бидејќи ја сметаме пристапноста на резултатот на алатката како клучен дел од соработката на Дигиталните хуманици, го опишуваме работниот тек кој го предлагаме за ефикасно препознавање на текстот и потоа автоматско и рачно посткорекција', 'ml': 'ധാരാളം ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രോജക്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട തടസ്സങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു തടസ്സപ്പെട്ടിര പദാവലികള്\u200d വിലപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിലും സമയത്തെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയിലും ഡിജിറിറ്റിക്കേണ്ടി വരേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. ഒക്ടോക്കല്\u200d അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരി OCR പിന്നീട് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി, ചെറിയ വിവരങ്ങളുമായി ഒരു സാധാരണ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം തീ OCRed ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d കണ്ടുമുട്ടിയ പല പിശകുകളുടെയും സിസ്റ്റം അക്കൌണ്ട് എണ്ണുന്നു. സാഹിത്യത്തിന്റെ ഡോമെയിനി നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്ത സാഹചര്യങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, ഉദാ. സ്റ്റാറ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും അക്ഷരത്തി നമ്മള്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ അഗ്രഹം ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ സഹകരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗമായി വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പണ', 'no': 'Ein av dei viktigste hindringane for mange digitale menneskeprosjekta er det lave tilgjengelege data. Teksten må vera digitalisert i ein kostnad og tidspunkt prosess mens optisk teiknkjenning (OCR) er ein av dei tidspunktiske faktorene. På eksempel på OCR post- korrigeringa viser vi tilpassinga til eit generelt system for å løysa eit spesifikke problem med lite data. Systemet reknar på mange feil som oppstod i OCRed- tekstar som kommer frå ulike tidsperioder i literaturdomenet. Vi viser at kombinasjonen av ulike tilnærmingar, f.eks. Statistiske maskineomsetjing og stavekontroll, med hjelp av ein rekningsmekanismekanismekanismen er veldig forbetra over enkelhande tilnærmingar. Sidan vi ser på tilgjengeligheten av det resulterte verktøyet som ein viktig del av samarbeid med digitale menneskeheter, beskriver vi arbeidsfløyet vi foreslår for å gjenkjenne effektivt tekst og etterpå automatisk og manuelt postkorrigering', 'pl': 'Jedną z głównych przeszkód dla wielu projektów Digital Humanities jest niska dostępność danych. Teksty muszą być digitalizowane w drogim i czasochłonnym procesie, podczas gdy korekcja optycznego rozpoznawania znaków (OCR) jest jednym z czynników krytycznych w czasie. Na przykładzie postkorekcji OCR pokazujemy adaptację systemu generycznego do rozwiązania konkretnego problemu z małą ilością danych. System uwzględnia różnorodność błędów napotkanych w tekstach OCRed pochodzących z różnych okresów czasowych w dziedzinie literatury. Pokazujemy, że połączenie różnych podejść, takich jak np. statystyczne tłumaczenie maszynowe i sprawdzanie pisowni, z pomocą mechanizmu rankingowego znacznie poprawia podejście jednoręczne. Ponieważ uważamy dostępność powstałego narzędzia za kluczową część współpracy Digital Humanities, opisujemy przebieg pracy, który proponujemy dla efektywnego rozpoznawania tekstu i późniejszej automatycznej i ręcznej korekty post-korekty', 'ro': 'Unul dintre principalele obstacole pentru multe proiecte Digital Humanities este disponibilitatea scăzută a datelor. Textele trebuie digitalizate într-un proces costisitor și consumator de timp, în timp ce recunoașterea optică a caracterelor (OCR) post-corecție este unul dintre factorii critici de timp. La exemplul de post-corecție OCR, arătăm adaptarea unui sistem generic pentru a rezolva o problemă specifică cu puține date. Sistemul explică o diversitate de erori întâlnite în textele OCRed provenind din diferite perioade de timp în domeniul literaturii. Noi arătăm că combinația de abordări diferite, cum ar fi traducerea automată statistică și verificarea ortografică, cu ajutorul unui mecanism de clasificare, se îmbunătățește enorm față de abordările cu o singură mână. Deoarece considerăm accesibilitatea instrumentului rezultat ca o parte crucială a colaborărilor Digital Humanities, descriem fluxul de lucru pe care îl propunem pentru recunoașterea eficientă a textului și postcorecția automată și manuală ulterioară', 'sr': 'Jedna od glavnih prepreka za mnoge digitalne ljudske projekte je niska dostupnost podataka. Teksti moraju biti digitalizirani u skupom i vremenskom procesu potrošnje, a nakon korekcije optičkih karaktera (OCR) je jedan od kritičnih faktora vremena. Na primjer nakon korekcije OCR pokazujemo adaptaciju generičkog sistema kako bi rešili poseban problem sa malim podacima. Sistem računa o raznolikosti grešaka koje su se susreli u tekstima OCRed iz različitih vremenskih perioda u domenu literature. Pokazujemo da kombinacija različitih pristupa, poput statističkog prevoda mašina i provjere činjenice, uz pomoć mehanizma za redovanje ogromno poboljšava nad jednoručnim pristupima. Pošto smatramo pristupnost rezultatnog alata kao ključni deo saradnje digitalnih ljudskih sustava, opisujemo tok rada koji predlažemo za efikasno priznanje teksta i poslednje automatsko i ručno postkorekcije teksta', 'si': 'ඩිජිටල් මනුෂ්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපෘතියක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අඩුම දත්ත අවස්ථාවක පාළුවන් ගොඩක් සහ වෙලාවක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවට අංක්\u200dරිය කරගන්න ඕනි නමුත් අංක්\u200dරිය අංක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියා OCR පස්ස සූදානම් ගැන උදාහරණයේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය පද්ධතියේ සූදානම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ් පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විවිධ වැරැද්දක් සඳහා OCRed පාළුවන් විවිධ වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙලාවක් පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය ප අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ සම්බන්ධයක්, වගේම ස්ථානික මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සහ වාක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ පරීක්ෂ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර උපකරණයේ පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ගන්නේ ඩිජිටල් මිනිස්සුන් සහයෝගයක් විදිහට, අපි වැඩප්\u200dරවේශය විස්තර කරනවා', 'mn': 'Дижитал хүн төрөлхтний олон төслийн хамгийн гол бэрхшээл нь бага өгөгдлийн хэрэглээ. Текст үнэтэй, цаг хугацаанд хэрэглэх үйл явц дээр тооны хэмжээг тооцоолж өгөх хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ Optical Character Recognition (OCR) нь цаг хугацаанд чухал хүчин зүйлүүдийн нэг юм. ОКР-ын дараагийн засах жишээ дээр бид бага өгөгдлийн тодорхой асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд ерөнхий системийн адаптацийг харуулж байна. Энэ систем ОКР-ын текстүүдэд олон алдаа олон тохиолдсон байдаг. Учир нь уран зохиолын түвшинд өөр цаг хугацааны үеэс гарч ирсэн. Бид өөр өөр арга зам, жишээлбэл Статистикийн хөрөнгө оруулалт, зөвлөгөө шалгалтын тусламжтайгаар нэг гарын арга зам дээр маш их сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүний үр дүнтэй хэрэгсэл нь Дижитал хүн төрөлхтний хамтын чухал хэсэг гэж бодож байгаа учраас бид ажлын урсгалыг бүтээмжтэй текст хүлээн зөвшөөрөх болон дараагийн автоматик болон гар дахин зөвшөөрөх хэрэгтэй гэдгийг та', 'mt': 'Wieħed mill-ostakli ewlenin għal ħafna proġetti tal-Umanitajiet Diġitali huwa d-disponibbiltà baxxa tad-dejta. Texts have to be digitized in an expensive and time consuming process whereas Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-correction is one of the time-critical factors.  At the example of OCR post-correction, we show the adaptation of a generic system to solve a specific problem with little data.  Is-sistema tirrappreżenta diversità ta’ żbalji li nstabu fit-testi OCRed li ġejjin minn perjodi ta’ żmien differenti fil-qasam tal-letteratura. Aħna nuru li l-kombinazzjoni ta’ approċċi differenti, bħal pereżempju t-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Statistiċi u l-iċċekkjar tal-ortografija, bl-g ħajnuna ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ klassifikazzjoni jtejjeb b’mod enormi fuq approċċi b’idejn waħda. Peress li nqisu l-a ċċessibbiltà tal-għodda li tirriżulta bħala parti kruċjali tal-kollaborazzjonijiet tal-Umanitajiet Diġitali, niddeskrivu l-fluss tax-xogħol li ssuġġerixxu għal rikonoxximent effiċjenti tat-test u sussegwenti wara korrezzjoni awtomatika u manwali', 'so': 'Mid ka mid ah obstacooyinka ugu muhiimsan waxyaabaha badan oo Digital Humaniyadu waa helitaanka macluumaadka hoose. Teksiga waa in la tixgeliyo xiliga kharashka iyo wakhtiga la isticmaalayo, iyadoo ay tahay mid ka mid ah arimaha wakhtiga muhiimka ah. Tusaale ahaan hagaajinta OCR kadib waxaynu tusnaynaa isbedelka nidaamka geneeral si ay u xalliyaan dhibaato gaar ah oo ku saabsan macluumaad yar. nidaamka waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa khalado kala duduwan oo ku qoran qoraalka OCRed oo xilliyada waqtiga kala duduwan ee warqadda. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qalabka kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan tarjumidda statisticka iyo baaritaanka sawiraadka, caawimaadda meymisyada aad u hagaajinta qaabab kaliya. Since we consider the accessibility of the resulting tool as a crucial part of Digital Humanities collaborations, we describe the workflow we suggest for efficient text recognition and subsequent automatic and manual post-correction', 'sv': 'Ett av de största hindren för många projekt inom digital humaniora är den låga tillgången till data. Texter måste digitaliseras i en dyr och tidskrävande process medan Optical Character Recognition (OCR) efterkorrigering är en av de tidskritiska faktorerna. I exemplet OCR efter korrigering visar vi anpassningen av ett generiskt system för att lösa ett specifikt problem med lite data. Systemet redovisar en mängd olika fel som förekommer i OCRed-texter från olika tidsperioder inom litteraturområdet. Vi visar att kombinationen av olika tillvägagångssätt, t.ex. statistisk maskinöversättning och stavningskontroll, med hjälp av en rankningsmekanism förbättras avsevärt jämfört med enkelhandstillvägagångssätt. Eftersom vi betraktar tillgängligheten till det resulterande verktyget som en viktig del av Digital Humanities samarbeten beskriver vi det arbetsflöde vi föreslår för effektiv textigenkänning och efterföljande automatisk och manuell efterkorrigering.', 'ta': 'பல டிஜிட்டல் மனித த திட்டங்களுக்கான முக்கிய தடைகளில் ஒன்று குறைந்த தரவு கிடைக்கும். விலையான மற்றும் நேரத்தை பயன்படுத்தும் செயல்பாட்டில் உரையை இலக்கங்களாக வடிவமைக்க வேண்டும் ஆனால் Optical Character Recognition (OCR) பின்பு திருத்தம் நே OCR பின் திருத்தம் எடுத்துகாட்டியில், சிறிய தரவுகளுடன் குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய ஒரு பொது அமைப்பின @ info: whatsthis நாம் வேறு முறைமைகளை ஒன்று காட்டுகிறோம், உ. ம். புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் சொல்லை பரிசோதிக்கும் போது, ஒரு வரிசைப்படுத் நாங்கள் முடிவு கருவியின் அணுகலை இலக்கல் மனிதர்களுடைய கூட்டுதலின் முக்கியமான பகுதியாக கருவி', 'ur': 'بہت سی ڈیجیٹل انسانیت پروژیٹوں کے لئے سب سے زیادہ بازداشتوں میں سے ایک کم ڈیٹا موجود ہے۔ ٹیکسٹ ایک گران اور وقت کا مصرف پروسس میں ڈیجیٹ کیٹ کیٹ کیٹر کی شناخت (OCR) پچھٹ-اصلاح کی ایک ٹیمٹ-کریٹ فکتوروں میں سے ہے. OCR post-correction کے مثال میں، ہم ایک عمومی سیسٹم کے اندازے دکھاتے ہیں کہ تھوڑے ڈیٹے کے ساتھ ایک مشکل حل کریں۔ سیسٹم نے اکسیراڈ ٹیکسٹوں میں بہت سی خطاؤں کے لئے اظہار کیا ہے جو لکھائی کے دامنی میں مختلف وقت مدت سے آتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ مختلف طریقوں کی ترکیب، جیسے سیاستیکل ماشین ترجمہ اور سماعت چک، ایک رانڈ مکانیسم کی مدد کے ساتھ ایک ہاتھ کی طریقوں پر بہت زیادہ اضافہ ہوتی ہے۔ ہم نے نتیجے کے ابزار کی دسترسی کو ڈیجیٹل انسانیت کے ایک اہم حصہ کے طور پر سمجھ لیا ہے، ہم نے کارفلوس کی توصیف کرتی ہیں جو ہم فعالیت کے متعلق پہچان کرنے اور اس کے بعد اٹوٹوٹ اور مہمانی پوسٹ اصلاح کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik raqamli inson projektlarining eng asosiy obstetlaridan biri - maʼlumot yoʻq. Texts have to be digitized in an expensive and time consuming process whereas Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-correction is one of the time-critical factors.  OCR esa to ʻgʻrilgan masalan, biz bir kichkina maʼlumot bilan foydalanish uchun umumiy tizimning o'zgarishni tushunamiz. Name Biz boshqa usullarni tushunamiz, masalan Statistical Mashining tarjima va imkoniyatlarni tekshirish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bir necha qo'llangan usullar yordamida juda yaxshi yaxshi beradi. Chunki biz natijasi asboblarning imkoniyatlarini raqamli insonlar bilan ishlashning muhim qismi deb o'ylaymiz, biz ishni o'ylaymiz, biz matnni tasdiqlash va keyin avtomatik va qoʻlbola-toʻgʻrilash uchun tasavvur qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Một trong những cản trở chính trong nhiều dự án về Nhân loại số Kĩ thuật là việc cung cấp ít dữ liệu. Chữ phải được số hóa trong một quá trình tốn thời gian và tốn kém, còn việc ghi nhận Ký tự quang (OCR) là một trong những yếu tố quan trọng thời gian. Ví dụ về OCR sau khi sửa chữa, chúng tôi cho thấy sự thích hợp của một hệ thống chung để giải quyết một vấn đề cụ thể với một số ít dữ liệu. Hệ thống này ghi lại sự khác nhau các lỗi trong các văn bản OCRed đến từ thời gian khác nhau trong lĩnh vực văn học. Chúng tôi cho thấy sự kết hợp của các phương pháp khác nhau, như là cấu trúc cấu trúc máy tính thống kê và kiểm tra thần chú, với sự giúp đỡ của một cơ chế xếp hạng sẽ cải thiện tối đa các phương pháp đơn phương. Vì chúng tôi xem khả năng truy cập công cụ kết quả là một phần quan trọng trong việc hợp tác với Nhân loại số, chúng tôi mô tả dòng chảy làm việc chúng tôi đề nghị để nhận dạng văn bản hiệu quả và sau đó là tự động và thủ công sửa chữa.', 'bg': 'Една от основните пречки пред много проекти в областта на цифровите хуманитарни науки е ниската наличност на данни. Текстовете трябва да бъдат дигитализирани в скъп и отнемащ време процес, докато оптичното разпознаване на знаци (ОКР) след корекцията е един от критичните за времето фактори. В примера за пост-корекция на ОКР показваме адаптацията на генерична система за решаване на конкретен проблем с малко данни. Системата отчита разнообразието от грешки, срещани в текстовете, идващи от различни периоди от време в областта на литературата. Показваме, че комбинацията от различни подходи, като например статистически машинен превод и правописна проверка, с помощта на механизъм за класиране значително се подобрява в сравнение с едноръчните подходи. Тъй като считаме достъпността на получения инструмент за решаваща част от сътрудничеството в областта на цифровите хуманитарни науки, описваме работния процес, който предлагаме за ефективно разпознаване на текст и последваща автоматична и ръчна следкорекция', 'nl': 'Een van de belangrijkste obstakels voor veel Digital Humanities projecten is de lage beschikbaarheid van data. Teksten moeten worden gedigitaliseerd in een duur en tijdrovend proces, terwijl Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-correctie een van de tijdkritische factoren is. Aan het voorbeeld van OCR post-correctie tonen we de aanpassing van een generiek systeem om een specifiek probleem op te lossen met weinig gegevens. Het systeem houdt rekening met een verscheidenheid aan fouten in OCRed-teksten afkomstig uit verschillende periodes in de literatuur. We laten zien dat de combinatie van verschillende benaderingen, zoals bijvoorbeeld Statistische Machine Translation en spellingscontrole, met behulp van een rangschikmechanisme enorm verbetert ten opzichte van eenhandige benaderingen. Aangezien we de toegankelijkheid van de resulterende tool beschouwen als een cruciaal onderdeel van Digital Humanities samenwerkingen, beschrijven we de workflow die we voorstellen voor efficiënte tekstherkenning en daaropvolgende automatische en handmatige postcorrectie', 'hr': 'Jedna od glavnih prepreka za mnoge digitalne ljudske projekte je niska dostupnost podataka. Teksti moraju biti digitalizirani u skupom i vremenskom procesu potrošnje, a nakon korekcije optičkih znakova (OCR) je jedan od kritičnih faktora vremena. Na primjer nakon korekcije OCR pokazujemo adaptaciju generičkog sustava kako bi riješili poseban problem sa malim podacima. Sistem računa o raznolikosti grešaka u tekstima OCRed koji dolaze iz različitih vremenskih perioda u oblasti literature. Pokazujemo da kombinacija različitih pristupa, poput statističkog prevoda strojeva i provjere činjenice, s pomoć mehanizma redovanja ogromno poboljšava nad jednorukim pristupima. Pošto smatramo pristupnost rezultatnog alata kao ključni dio saradnje digitalnih ljudskih sustava, opisujemo tok rada koji predlažemo za učinkovito priznanje teksta i nakon toga automatsko i ručno postkorištenje teksta', 'da': 'En af de største hindringer for mange Digital Humanities projekter er den lave datatilgængelighed. Tekster skal digitaliseres i en dyr og tidskrævende proces, mens Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-korrektion er en af de tidskritiske faktorer. Ved eksemplet OCR post-korrektion viser vi tilpasningen af et generisk system til at løse et specifikt problem med få data. Systemet tegner sig for mange forskellige fejl, der er opstået i OCRed-tekster fra forskellige tidsperioder inden for litteraturområdet. Vi viser, at kombinationen af forskellige tilgange, som f.eks. Statistisk maskinoversættelse og stavekontrol, med hjælp af en rangeringsmekanisme, forbedres betydeligt i forhold til enkelthånds tilgange. Da vi betragter tilgængeligheden af det resulterende værktøj som en afgørende del af Digital Humanities samarbejder, beskriver vi den arbejdsgang, vi foreslår for effektiv tekstgenkendelse og efterfølgende automatisk og manuel efterfølgende korrektion', 'de': 'Eines der Haupthindernisse für viele Digital Humanities Projekte ist die geringe Verfügbarkeit von Daten. Texte müssen in einem teuren und zeitaufwendigen Prozess digitalisiert werden, während die Nachkorrektur der optischen Zeichenerkennung (OCR) einer der zeitkritischen Faktoren ist. Am Beispiel der OCR-Nachkorrektur zeigen wir die Anpassung eines generischen Systems, um ein spezifisches Problem mit wenig Daten zu lösen. Das System berücksichtigt eine Vielzahl von Fehlern, die in OCRed-Texten aus unterschiedlichen Zeiträumen im Bereich der Literatur auftreten. Wir zeigen, dass die Kombination verschiedener Ansätze, wie z.B. Statistische Maschinelle Übersetzung und Rechtschreibprüfung, mit Hilfe eines Rankingmechanismus gegenüber einhändigen Ansätzen enorm verbessert. Da wir die Zugänglichkeit des resultierenden Tools als wichtigen Bestandteil der Digital Humanities Kollaboration betrachten, beschreiben wir den Workflow, den wir für eine effiziente Texterkennung und anschließende automatische und manuelle Nachkorrektur vorschlagen.', 'id': 'Salah satu halangan utama bagi banyak proyek Digital Humanities adalah kecerdasan data rendah. Teks harus didigitalisasi dalam proses yang mahal dan memakan waktu sementara Pengenalan Karakter Optik (OCR) setelah koreksi adalah salah satu faktor kritis waktu. At the example of OCR post-correction, we show the adaptation of a generic system to solve a specific problem with little data.  Sistem menganggap kebanyakan kesalahan yang ditemukan dalam teks OCRed yang berasal dari periode waktu yang berbeda dalam domain literatur. Kami menunjukkan bahwa kombinasi dari pendekatan yang berbeda, misalnya Statistical Machine Translation dan pemeriksaan mantra, dengan bantuan dari mekanisme rangkaian sangat memperbaiki pendekatan dengan satu tangan. Karena kita mempertimbangkan aksesibilitas alat hasilnya sebagai bagian penting dari kolaborasi Digital Humanities, kita menggambarkan aliran kerja yang kami sarankan untuk pengenalan teks efisien dan seterusnya otomatis dan manual pos-koreksi', 'fa': 'یکی از پرده\u200cهای اصلی برای بسیاری از پروژه\u200cهای انسانیت دیجیتال دسترسی داده\u200cهای پایین است. متن باید در یک فرایند مصرف گرون و زمان دیجیتال شود، در حالی که بعد از تعیین کردن پست کارت\u200cهای آپتیک (OCR) یکی از faktورهای مهم زمان است. برای حل یک مشکل خاصی با داده های کوچک، در مثال اصلاح بعد از OCR نشان می دهیم. سیستم برای مختلف اشتباهی که در متن\u200cهای OCRed دیده شده از مدت\u200cهای زمان مختلف در دامنه ادبیات است حساب می\u200cکند. ما نشان می دهیم که ترکیب دستورات متفاوتی مثل ترکیب ماشین آمریکا و بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی طلب\u200cنوشته، با کمک یک مکانیسم رشته\u200cبندی بر روی دستورات\u200cهای یک دست بسیار بهتر می\u200cشود. از آنجایی که ما دسترسی ابزار نتیجه را به عنوان بخشی مهم از همکاری های انسانیت دیجیتال به نظر می رسیم، ما جریان کار را توصیف می کنیم که برای شناسایی متن موثرت و بعد از آن تغییرات اتوماتیک و دستی بعد از اصلاح', 'tr': 'Dijital adamlaryň birnäçe meseleleriniň esasy bar. Metinler gymmat we zamalyň ahmal prosesinde deskrip edilmelidir. ol optik Karakter tanyşy (OCR) zaman-kritik faktörlerden biridir. OCR azyndan düzeltmek üçin, kiçi maglumatlar bilen belli bir meseläni çözmek üçin bir jeneral sistemiň adaptasiýasyny görkez. Sistem dekoratatyň domaýynda OCRed metinlerinde bir näçe hata bilen bar. Biz beýleki ýagdaýlaryň birleşigini g örkeýän ýaly statistik maşynyň terjime we ymla barlamasynyň, bir dereje meýdançasynyň ýeke elimdeki ýagdaýynyň kömegi bilen örän gowurar. Näme üçin netijä eden aralygyň elýeterligini digital adamlaryň işbirlikleriniň örän möhüm bölegi diýip pikir edýändigimizden soňra, biz işgärleri etkinji metin tanymasyny we soňra awtomatik we elimizden soňra düzeltmegi üçin maslahat berýäris.', 'sq': 'One of the main obstacles for many Digital Humanities projects is the low data availability.  Tekstet duhet të digjitalizohen në një proces të shtrenjtë dhe të konsumuar kohë ndërsa njohja optike e karakterit (OCR) pas korreksionit është një nga faktorët kritikë për kohën. Në shembullin e postkorrektimit të OCR, ne tregojmë përshtatjen e një sistemi gjenerik për të zgjidhur një problem të caktuar me të dhëna të vogla. Sistemi llogaritet për një shumëllojshmëri gabimesh të gjetura në tekstet OCRed që vijnë nga periudha të ndryshme kohore në fushën e letërsisë. Ne tregojmë se kombinimi i metodave të ndryshme, të tilla si përkthimi statistik i makinave dhe kontrollimi i ortografikës, me ndihmën e një mekanizmi renditjeje përmirësohet mjaft mbi metodat me dorë të vetme. Që kur ne e konsiderojmë aksesibilitetin e mjetit rezultues si një pjesë vendimtare të bashkëpunimeve të Humanitetit Digital, ne e përshkruajmë rrjedhën e punës që sugjerojmë për njohjen e efektshme të tekstit dhe pas korrigjimit automatik dhe manual', 'am': 'በብዙ ዲጂታል ሰዎች ፕሮጀክቶች ላይ የዋና ግንኙነት አንዱ የዳታ ግንኙነት በጣም ትንሽ ነው፡፡ ጽሑፎች በብዛት እና በጊዜው በሚጠቀም ፕሮጀክት ውስጥ ዲጂትሪክ ሊሆን ያስፈልጋል፤ ነገር ግን Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-correction is one of the time-critical factors. በOCR ምሳሌ ከታናሽ ዳታ ጋር የተለያየ ጉዳይ መፍታትን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የሲስተም ብልዩ ስህተት በOCRed ጽሑፎች ውስጥ በተለየ ጊዜ ወራት በሐሳብ ውስጥ ሲመጣ ይቆጥራል፡፡ በተለያዩ ደረጃዎች፣ የstatistical machine ትርጉም እና የድምፅ ምርጫዎችን እናሳየናለን፡፡ የዲጂተል ሰብዓዊ ተማማሪ ክፍል ሲሆን የግልፅን መግቢያ እንደምናስብ፣ ለጽሑፍ ማስታወቂያውን እና ከዚያም በኋላ በራስነት እና የፖስታ ማስታወስ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'ko': '많은 디지털 인문 프로젝트의 주요 장애 중 하나는 데이터의 가용성이 낮다는 것이다.텍스트는 비싸고 시간이 걸리는 과정에서 디지털화되어야 하는데 광학 문자인식(OCR) 후 교정은 시간의 관건적인 요소 중 하나이다.OCR 후 교정의 예에서 우리는 데이터가 매우 적은 특정한 문제를 해결하기 위해 유니버설 시스템의 적응성을 보여 주었다.이 시스템은 문학 분야의 시기별 OCRD 텍스트에서 겪는 각종 오류를 설명한다.우리는 서로 다른 방법의 결합, 예를 들어 통계기계 번역과 맞춤법 검사는 순위 메커니즘의 도움 아래 한 가지 방법보다 훨씬 우수하다는 것을 나타낸다.Google은 생성 도구의 접근성이 디지털 인문 합작의 관건적인 부분이라고 생각하기 때문에 효율적인 텍스트 식별과 후속 자동 및 수동 수정 작업 절차를 설명합니다', 'hy': 'Շատ թվային մարդկային նախագծերի համար հիմնական խոչընդոտներից մեկն այն է, որ տվյալները ցածր հասանելի են: Տեքստները պետք է թվայնացվեն թանկ և ժամանակ պահանջող գործընթացում, մինչդեռ Օպտիկական Նույների ճանաչելը (OCR) ժամանակի կարևոր գործոններից մեկն է: Օրինակ OCR-ի հետաուղղությունից հետո, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս ընդհանուր համակարգի ադապտացիան, որպեսզի լուծենք որոշակի խնդիր փոքր տվյալներով: Համակարգը հաշվի առնում է սխալների բազմազանությունը, որոնք հայտնվում են OCRed տեքստներում, որոնք գալիս են գրականության տարբեր ժամանակահատվածներից: We show that the combination of different approaches, such as e.g. Statistical Machine Translation and spell checking, with the help of a ranking mechanism tremendously improves over single-handed approaches.  Քանի որ մենք համարում ենք արդյունքում ստացված գործիքի հասանելիությունը թվային մարդկային համագործակցության կարևոր մասն է, մենք նկարագրում ենք աշխատանքային հոսքը, որը մենք առաջարկում ենք արդյունավետ տեքստի ճանաչելու և հետո ավտոմատիկ և ձեռքի հետադառնալու համար', 'sw': 'Moja ya vikwazo muhimu kwa miradi mingi ya kidijitali ni upatikanaji wa taarifa kidogo. Maandishi yanapaswa kuchapishwa kidigitali katika mchakato wa gharama na muda wa matumizi wakati ambapo Tambulisho la KiOptical Character (OCR) baada ya kurekebisha mara moja ni moja ya sababu muhimu. Kwa mfano wa OCR baada ya kurekebisha, tunaonyesha upatikanaji wa mfumo wa kawaida wa kutatua tatizo maalum na taarifa ndogo. Mfumo unahesabu tofauti za makosa yaliyokutana katika maandishi ya OCRed yanatokana na kipindi tofauti cha muda katika mfumo wa fasihi. Tunaonyesha kuwa muunganiko wa mbinu tofauti, kama vile Utafiri wa Kitakwimu na utafiti wa utafiti, kwa msaada wa mfumo wa rangi unaoboresha sana juu ya mbinu moja kwa moja. Tangu tunavyochukulia upatikanaji wa zana za matokeo kama sehemu muhimu ya ushirikiano wa kidijitali wa binadamu, tunaelezea mwenendo wa kazi tunalopendekeza kutambuliwa kwa ufanisi wa maandishi na baadae kurekebisha kwa manufaa', 'az': 'Digital insanlıq proqramlarının ən böyük səbəbi is ə düşük məlumatların faydalanmasıdır. Metinlər mal və vaxtlı istifadə sürətində dijitallənməlidir, lakin Optical Character Recognition (OCR) sonrakı düzəltmə vaxt-critical faktorundan biridir. OCR post-correction misallarında, kiçik məlumatlarla müəyyən bir problemi çəkmək üçün generiki sistemin adaptasiyasını göstəririk. Sistem müxtəlif xətalara görə bilər ki, OCRed metinlərində müxtəlif vaxt müddətlərindən gəlir. Biz müxtəlif fikirlərin birləşdirilməsini g östəririk, bəzisi, Statistik Makinelərin Çevirməsi və İmlər Seçirməsi kimi, dərəcə mehanizminin yardımıyla, tək əl tərəfindən çox yaxşılaşır. Növbəti aracının istifadə edilməsini dijital insanlıqların işbirliklərinin ən vacib bir parças ı kimi hesab etdiyimiz təqdirdə çalışma akışını təsdiqləyirik ki, təsdiqləyici metin tanıması və sonradan automatski və əlli post-düzelməsi üçün təsdiqləyirik.', 'af': "Een van die hoofde hinders vir baie Digitale Humaniteit-projekte is die lae data beskikbaarheid. Teks moet in 'n koste en tyd wat die proses gebruik word, digitiseer word terwyl optiese karakter herkenning (OCR) post- koreksie is een van die tyd- kritiese faktore. By die voorbeeld van OCR post- koreksie, wys ons die aanpassing van 'n generieke stelsel om 'n spesifieke probleem met klein data te los. Die stelsel reken vir 'n verskeidigheid van foute wat in OCRed teks gekom het wat van verskillende tydsperioade in die domein van literateit kom. Ons wys dat die kombinasie van verskillende toegang, soos statistiese Masjien Vertaling en Speltoetsekking, met die hulp van 'n ranking mekanisme baie verbeter oor enkelhande toegang. Omdat ons die toeganklikheid van die resulteerde hulpmiddel as 'n belangrike deel van Digitale menslike samekoms beskryf, beskryf ons die werksvloei wat ons voorstel vir effektief teks herken en volgende automatiese en manuele post-korreksie", 'bs': 'Jedna od glavnih prepreka za mnoge digitalne ljudske projekte je niska dostupnost podataka. Teksti moraju biti digitalizirani u skupom i vremenskom procesu potrošnje, a nakon korekcije optičkih karaktera (OCR) je jedan od kritičnih faktora vremena. Na primjer nakon korekcije OCR pokazujemo adaptaciju generičkog sistema kako bi riješili specifični problem sa malim podacima. Sistem računa o raznolikosti grešaka u tekstima OCRed koji dolaze iz različitih vremenskih perioda u domenu literature. Pokazujemo da kombinacija različitih pristupa, poput statističkog prevoda strojeva i provjere činjenice, s pomoć mehanizma redovanja ogromno poboljšava nad jednorukim pristupima. Pošto smatramo pristupnost rezultatnog alata kao ključni dio saradnje digitalnih ljudskih sustava, opisujemo tok rada koji predlažemo za učinkovito prepoznavanje teksta i nakon toga automatsko i ručno postkorekcije teksta', 'bn': 'অনেক ডিজিটাল মানবিক প্রকল্পের প্রধান নিষেধাজ্ঞার মধ্যে একটি বাধা হচ্ছে কম তথ্য পাওয়া। টেক্সটের ডিজিটিকেট করতে হবে একটি দামী এবং সময় ব্যবহার করার প্রক্রিয়ায় যেখানে অপটিক্যাল ক্যারেক্টার স্বীকৃতির (ওসিআর) পরিসংশোধনের পেছনে একট অক্সির পোস্ট সংশোধনের উদাহরণে আমরা একটি সাধারণ সিস্টেমের অ্যাপপপটেশন দেখাচ্ছি ছোট তথ্য সমাধানের জন্য একটি বিশেষ সমস্যা। The system accounts for a diversity of errors encountered in OCRed texts coming from different time periods in the domain of literature.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতির সংযোগ, যেমন পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং বানান পরীক্ষা করা, একটি রেঙ্কিং মেক্সিমেন্টের সাহায্যে এক হাতের প্রা যেহেতু আমরা এই ফলাফলের টুলটিকে ডিজিটাল মানবাধিকার সহযোগিতার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ হিসেবে বিবেচনা করি, আমরা কার্যফ্লুয়ারের বর্ণনা করি যে কার্যকর প্রবাহের', 'ca': "Un dels principals obstacles per a molts projectes d'humanitats digitals és la baixa disponibilitat de dades. Els textos han de ser digitalitzats en un procés costós i demorant temps mentre que el reconeixement òptic de caràcters (OCR) després de la correcció és un dels factors crítics del temps. En l'exemple de la postcorrecció OCR, demostram l'adaptació d'un sistema genèric per resoldre un problem a específic amb poces dades. The system accounts for a diversity of errors encountered in OCRed texts coming from different time periods in the domain of literature.  Mostrem que la combinació d'enfocaments diferents, com per exemple la traducció de màquines estadístiques i la comprobació ortogràfica, amb l'ajuda d'un mecanisme de classificació millora enormement sobre enfocaments d'una sola mà. Com que considerem l'accessibilitat de l'eina resultant com una part crucial de la col·laboració de l'humanitat digital, descrivim el flux de treball que suggerem per un reconeixement eficient del text i una posterior correcció automàtica i manual", 'cs': 'Jednou z hlavních překážek mnoha projektů Digital Humanities je nízká dostupnost dat. Texty musí být digitalizovány nákladným a časově náročným procesem, zatímco post-korekce Optical Character Recognition (OCR) je jedním z časově kritických faktorů. Na příkladu OCR post-korekce ukazujeme adaptaci generického systému k řešení konkrétního problému s malým množstvím dat. Systém zohledňuje různorodost chyb, se kterými se v textech OCRed setkává, pocházejících z různých časových období v oblasti literatury. Ukazujeme, že kombinace různých přístupů, jako je např. statistický strojový překlad a kontrola pravopisu, s pomocí mechanismu hodnocení značně zlepšuje přístupy jednoručně. Vzhledem k tomu, že dostupnost výsledného nástroje považujeme za klíčovou součást spolupráce Digital Humanities, popisujeme pracovní postup, který navrhujeme pro efektivní rozpoznávání textu a následnou automatickou i manuální korekci', 'fi': 'Yksi suurimmista esteistä monissa digitaalisissa humanistisissa hankkeissa on datan heikko saatavuus. Tekstit on digitalisoitava kalliissa ja aikaa vievässä prosessissa, kun taas optinen merkkitunnistus (OCR) korjauksen jälkeen on yksi aikakriittisistä tekijöistä. Esimerkkinä OCR-jälkikorjauksesta näytämme yleisen järjestelmän mukauttamisen tietyn ongelman ratkaisemiseksi pienellä datalla. Järjestelmä huomioi monenlaisia virheitä OCRed-teksteissä, jotka tulevat kirjallisuuden eri aikakausilta. Osoitamme, että erilaisten lähestymistapojen, kuten tilastollisen konekäännöksen ja oikeinkirjoituksen, yhdistelmä ranking-mekanismin avulla paranee huomattavasti yksikäden lähestymistapoihin verrattuna. Koska pidämme tuloksena olevan työkalun saavutettavuutta keskeisenä osana Digital Humanities -yhteistyötä, kuvaamme työnkulkua, jota ehdotamme tehokkaaseen tekstintunnistukseen ja sen jälkeiseen automaattiseen ja manuaaliseen jälkikorjaukseen.', 'et': 'Paljude digitaalse humanitaarteaduse projektide üks peamisi takistusi on andmete vähe kättesaadavus. Tekstid tuleb digiteerida kulukas ja aeganõudev protsess, samas kui optiline märgituvastus (OCR) pärast korrigeerimist on üks ajakriitilisi tegureid. OCR-järgse korrigeerimise näitel näitame üldise süsteemi kohandamist konkreetse probleemi lahendamiseks väheste andmetega. Süsteem võtab arvesse mitmesuguseid vigu OCRedi tekstides, mis on pärit kirjanduse erinevatest ajavahemikest. Näitame, et erinevate lähenemisviiside, näiteks statistilise masintõlke ja õigekirjakontrolli kombinatsioon järjestusmehhanismi abil paraneb ühe käega võrreldes tohutult. Kuna peame tulemusena saadud tööriista kättesaadavust digitaalse humanitaarteaduse koostöö oluliseks osaks, kirjeldame töövoogu, mida soovitame tõhusaks tekstituvastamiseks ning sellele järgnevaks automaatseks ja käsitsi parandamiseks.', 'jv': 'Mangkin wong sing paling-wong kanggo nggawe Perusahaan Digital kuwi nggawe data sing wis ambang. tab-style Taning example of OCR after-rection Sistem sistem lan akeh akeh nyuraning Eror Sampeyan panggayatan di OCred Awak dhéwé énlanggar nggambar aturan sing dibutungan sampeyan, cilik, ngono nguasai sistem Stasitik karo nguasai aturan ingkang dipoleh Dino awak dhéwé isih beraksi perusahaan anyar tentang pancen ning acara cara-cara sing dikarepaké Digitêr, kéné deklarasi nggambar aturan operasi awak dhéwé nggawe nggunakake gambar nggambar teka-ingkang efes karo nguasai mên beraksi lan kedaulakno Manual', 'ha': "Babu ɗayan hanyõyi na masu ƙaranci wa zaluman mutane masu yawa na Digitality Ana son in digitize matsayi cikin wani jarraba mai amfani da lokaci mai yiwuwa da shirin ayuka na Optical Character Recognition (OCR) bayan-gyare, yana daga matsayin-muhimman-lokaci. At the example of OCR post-correction, we show the adaptation of a generic system to solve a specific problem with little data.  Ana ƙidãya na'urar tsarin wasu ɓatattu da aka haɗa cikin matsayin OCRed da wasu lokaci daban cikin littafin. Tuna nũna wa komai da hanyoyin daban-daban, kamar misali, Mashin Kikakci na Tarjima da kuskure, da taimakon wani matsayin da aka danne shi mai girma kan hanyoyi guda da hannayen. Tana da muka ƙayyade mataimaki da zanar ta ƙara kamar rabo na muhimu wa shirin Digitality, za mu bayyana shirin aikin da Muke shawarar da kwamfyuta wajen tambuwa na matsayin da kuma a bayan-korrekin farat ɗaya da manual", 'he': 'אחת המעכבות העיקריות לפרויקטים רבים של האמנות דיגיטלית היא זמינות נתונים נמוכה. טקסטים צריכים להיות דיגיטליים בתהליך יקר וקריטי זמן בזמן שהזיהוי אופטי של אותיות (OCR) לאחר התיקון הוא אחד מהגורמים הקריטיים בזמן. בדוגמה של התיקון לאחר OCR, אנחנו מראים את ההתאמה של מערכת גנרלית לפתור בעיה ספציפית עם מידע קטן. המערכת מחשבת למגוון של טעויות שנמצאו בטקסטים OCRed מגיעים מתקופות זמן שונות בתחום הספרות. We show that the combination of different approaches, such as e.g. Statistical Machine Translation and spell checking, with the help of a ranking mechanism tremendously improves over single-handed approaches.  מאחר שאנחנו מחשיבים את הגישות של הכל הנוצא כחלק קריטי של שיתוף פעולה של האנושיות הדיגיטליות, אנו מתארים את זרימת העבודה שאנחנו מציעים לזהות טקסט יעילה', 'sk': 'Ena glavnih ovir za številne projekte digitalne humanistike je nizka razpoložljivost podatkov. Besedila je treba digitalizirati v dragem in dolgotrajnem procesu, medtem ko je optično prepoznavanje znakov (OCR) po popravku eden od časovno kritičnih dejavnikov. Na primeru popravka OCR prikazujemo prilagoditev generičnega sistema za reševanje določenega problema z malo podatkov. Sistem predstavlja različne napake, ki se pojavljajo v OCRed besedilih iz različnih časovnih obdobij na področju literature. Pokazujemo, da se kombinacija različnih pristopov, kot sta npr. statistični strojni prevod in preverjanje črkovanja, s pomočjo mehanizma razvrščanja izjemno izboljša v primerjavi z enorokami pristopov. Ker dostopnost orodja obravnavamo kot ključni del sodelovanja v digitalni humanistiki, opisujemo potek dela, ki ga predlagamo za učinkovito prepoznavanje besedila ter naknadno samodejno in ročno popravljanje po popravku', 'bo': 'གྲངས་སྤྱོད་མིའི་ཆ་འབོར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་རྩ་བའི་བར་ཆད་གང་ཞིག་ནི་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་བའ Texts have to be digitized in an expensive and time consuming process whereas Optical Character Recognition (OCR) post-correction is one of the time-critical factors. OCR རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིན་གྱི་དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་དེ་འཆར་ཡོད་པ་ཅིག་གནད་དོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The system accounts for a diversity of errors encountered in OCRed texts coming from different time periods in the domain of literature. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣེ་འདྲ་བ་དང་། དཔེར་ན། ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་དག་ཆ་ཞུ་དག ང་ཚོས་འབྲས་པའི་ལག་ཆ་གི་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་ལ་ངེད་ཚོས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་དུ་'}
{'en': 'Learning to Predict Charges for Criminal Cases with Legal Basis', 'ar': 'تعلم توقع التهم في القضايا الجنائية على أساس قانوني', 'es': 'Aprender a predecir los cargos para casos penales con base legal', 'fr': 'Apprendre à prédire les charges dans les affaires pénales fondées sur la loi', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a prever acusações para casos criminais com base legal', 'ja': '法的根拠をもって刑事事件の告発を予測する方法を学ぶ', 'zh': '学以法占刑狱', 'hi': 'कानूनी आधार के साथ आपराधिक मामलों के लिए आरोपों की भविष्यवाणी करना सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение прогнозированию обвинений по уголовным делам на правовой основе', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas Táillí do Chásanna Coiriúla le Bunús Dlí a Thuar', 'ka': 'სწავლება საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საზოგადოებაზე', 'el': 'Μάθηση πρόβλεψης κατηγοριών για ποινικές υποθέσεις με νομική βάση', 'hu': 'A jogalappal rendelkező büntetőügyek vádainak előrejelzésének megtanulása', 'it': 'Imparare a prevedere le spese per i casi penali con base giuridica', 'lt': 'Mokymasis numatyti teisiniu pagrindu baudžiamųjų bylų kaltinimus', 'kk': 'Жариялық негізіндегі жұмыс жасауларды таңдау', 'mk': 'Научи да предвидува обвиненија за кривични случаи со правен основ', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk meramalkan tuduhan atas kes jenayah dengan dasar undang-undang', 'ml': 'ക്രിമിനല്\u200d കേസുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex jipprevedi l-Imposti għal Każijiet Kriminali b’Bażi Legali', 'mn': 'Хүүгийн хууль үндсэн гэмт хэргийн шагналын тухай', 'no': 'Læring for å foregå ladningar for kriminalnader med rettbasen', 'pl': 'Nauka się przewidywać zarzuty w sprawach karnych z podstawą prawną', 'sr': 'Naučenje predviđanja optužbi za kriminalne slučajeve sa pravnim osnovom', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a anticipa acuzațiile pentru cazurile penale cu temei juridic', 'si': 'නීතිය බේසිස් සඳහා අපරාධ ක්\u200dරියාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada u diyaarinta dacwadda dembiga iyo sharciga', 'ta': 'சட்ட அடிப்படை', 'sv': 'Att lära sig förutsäga åtal för brottmål med rättslig grund', 'ur': 'قانونی بنیاد کے ساتھ مجرم قسموں کے بارے میں جلدی کرنے کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học về dự án Hình sự với cơ sở pháp lý', 'nl': 'Leren om aanklachten voor strafzaken met rechtsgrondslag te voorspellen', 'bg': 'Научете се да предвиждате обвинения по наказателни дела с правно основание', 'hr': 'Naučenje predviđanja optužbi za kriminalne slučajeve s pravnim osnovom', 'da': 'At lære at forudsige anklager for straffesager med retsgrundlag', 'ko': '법률 근거로 형사 사건의 고소를 예측하는 것을 배우다', 'de': 'Lernen, Anklagen für Strafsachen mit Rechtsgrundlage vorherzusagen', 'id': 'Belajar untuk memprediksi tuduhan atas kasus kriminal dengan dasar hukum', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای پیشنهاد مجازات جنایت با بنیادی قانونی', 'tr': 'Kriminal hasaplar üçin Predikt etmek öwrenmek', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa Makosa ya Uhalifu kwa ajili ya Kesi za Kihalifu na msingi wa sheria', 'sq': 'Mësimi për të parashikuar akuza për raste kriminale me bazë ligjore', 'af': 'Onderleer om te voorskryf gelades vir kriminale Kase met wetlike Basis', 'am': 'Legal Basis', 'bn': 'আইনের ভিত্তিতে অপরাধী কেসের জন্য প্রেসিডিক্ট চার্জ শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'az': 'C톛nn톛t c톛zas캼 il톛 C톛h톛nn톛m c톛zas캼n캼 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bs': 'Naučenje predviđanja optužbi za kriminalne slučajeve sa pravnim osnovom', 'ca': 'Aprendre a predir càrregues per casos penals amb base legal', 'cs': 'Naučit se předvídat obvinění z trestních případů s právním základem', 'et': 'Õppimine ennustama õigusliku alusega kriminaalasjade süüdistusi', 'fi': 'Opi ennustamaan syytteitä rikosasioissa, joilla on oikeusperusta', 'hy': 'Օրինական հիմքով դատական գործերի համար մեղադրանքներ կանխատեսելու սովորելը', 'jv': 'Yalimuni kanggo kelas prediketer Karakter kanggo Kemerdekaan Kasar aturan Kasal', 'sk': 'Učenje napovedovanja obtožb v kazenskih zadevah s pravno podlago', 'he': 'ללמוד לצפות באשמות על תיקים פשעיים עם בסיס משפטי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལྟ་བུའི་རྨན་གཞི་དང་བཅས་མེད་པའི་བཀའ་སྡུད་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'The charge prediction task is to determine appropriate charges for a given case, which is helpful for legal assistant systems where the user input is fact description. We argue that relevant law articles play an important role in this task, and therefore propose an attention-based neural network method to jointly model the charge prediction task and the relevant article extraction task in a unified framework. The experimental results show that, besides providing legal basis, the relevant articles can also clearly improve the charge prediction results, and our full model can effectively predict appropriate charges for cases with different expression styles.', 'ar': 'تتمثل مهمة التنبؤ بالشحن في تحديد الرسوم المناسبة لحالة معينة ، وهو أمر مفيد لأنظمة المساعد القانوني حيث يكون إدخال المستخدم هو وصف الحقيقة. نحن نجادل بأن مقالات القانون ذات الصلة تلعب دورًا مهمًا في هذه المهمة ، وبالتالي نقترح طريقة شبكة عصبية قائمة على الانتباه لنمذجة بشكل مشترك مهمة التنبؤ بالشحنة ومهمة استخراج المقالة ذات الصلة في إطار عمل موحد. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية أنه بالإضافة إلى توفير الأساس القانوني ، يمكن للمقالات ذات الصلة أيضًا تحسين نتائج التنبؤ بالشحن بوضوح ، ويمكن لنموذجنا الكامل أن يتنبأ بشكل فعال بالرسوم المناسبة للحالات ذات أنماط التعبير المختلفة.', 'es': 'La tarea de predicción de cargos es determinar los cargos apropiados para un caso determinado, lo cual es útil para los sistemas de asistente legal donde la entrada del usuario es la descripción de los hechos. Argumentamos que los artículos legales relevantes desempeñan un papel importante en esta tarea y, por lo tanto, proponemos un método de red neuronal basado en la atención para modelar conjuntamente la tarea de predicción de cargos y la tarea de extracción de artículos relevantes en un marco unificado. Los resultados experimentales muestran que, además de proporcionar una base legal, los artículos relevantes también pueden mejorar claramente los resultados de predicción de cargos, y nuestro modelo completo puede predecir eficazmente los cargos apropiados para casos con diferentes estilos de expresión.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de previsão de cobrança é determinar cobranças apropriadas para um determinado caso, o que é útil para sistemas de assistente jurídico em que a entrada do usuário é a descrição do fato. Argumentamos que artigos de lei relevantes desempenham um papel importante nessa tarefa e, portanto, propomos um método de rede neural baseado em atenção para modelar conjuntamente a tarefa de previsão de carga e a tarefa de extração de artigos relevantes em uma estrutura unificada. Os resultados experimentais mostram que, além de fornecer base legal, os artigos relevantes também podem melhorar claramente os resultados da previsão de cobranças, e nosso modelo completo pode efetivamente prever cobranças apropriadas para casos com diferentes estilos de expressão.', 'fr': "La tâche de prédiction de frais consiste à déterminer les frais appropriés pour un cas donné, ce qui est utile pour les systèmes d'assistance juridique où l'entrée utilisateur est une description de faits. Nous soutenons que les articles de droit pertinents jouent un rôle important dans cette tâche, et proposons donc une méthode de réseau neuronal basée sur l'attention pour modéliser conjointement la tâche de prédiction de charge et la tâche d'extraction d'article pertinente dans un cadre unifié. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent qu'en plus de fournir une base juridique, les articles pertinents peuvent également améliorer clairement les résultats de la prédiction des accusations, et notre modèle complet peut prédire efficacement les frais appropriés pour les cas avec différents styles d'expression.", 'ja': '料金予測タスクは、特定のケースの適切な料金を決定することであり、ユーザーの入力が事実の説明である法律アシスタントシステムに役立ちます。我々は、関連する法則の記事がこのタスクで重要な役割を果たしていると主張し、したがって、電荷予測タスクと関連する記事抽出タスクを統一されたフレームワークで共同モデル化するための注意に基づくニューラルネットワーク方法を提案する。実験結果は、法的根拠を提供することに加えて、関連記事は電荷予測結果を明確に改善することができ、我々のフルモデルは異なる表現スタイルを有する症例の適切な電荷を効果的に予測することができることを示している。', 'zh': '费用之任,定给定狱之宜,于用户输为事实之律助理有助。 臣愚以为法文扮演着于务,故建一神经网络之法,同一框架之电荷,取建模于文章。 实验结果表明文章,出于法外,犹可以明显提高电荷占,可以效效风格之宜电荷。', 'ru': 'Задача прогнозирования расходов заключается в определении соответствующих сборов для данного дела, что полезно для систем помощников юристов, где пользователь вводит описание фактов. Мы утверждаем, что соответствующие статьи закона играют важную роль в этой задаче, и поэтому предлагаем метод нейронной сети, основанный на внимании, для совместного моделирования задачи предсказания заряда и задачи извлечения соответствующих статей в единой структуре. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что, помимо предоставления правовой основы, соответствующие статьи также могут явно улучшить результаты прогнозирования заряда, а наша полная модель может эффективно прогнозировать соответствующие заряды для случаев с различными стилями выражения.', 'hi': 'चार्ज पूर्वानुमान कार्य किसी दिए गए मामले के लिए उपयुक्त शुल्क निर्धारित करना है, जो कानूनी सहायक प्रणालियों के लिए सहायक है जहां उपयोगकर्ता इनपुट तथ्य विवरण है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि प्रासंगिक कानून लेख इस कार्य में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं, और इसलिए एक एकीकृत ढांचे में चार्ज भविष्यवाणी कार्य और प्रासंगिक लेख निष्कर्षण कार्य को संयुक्त रूप से मॉडल करने के लिए एक ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि, कानूनी आधार प्रदान करने के अलावा, प्रासंगिक लेख भी स्पष्ट रूप से चार्ज भविष्यवाणी परिणामों में सुधार कर सकते हैं, और हमारा पूरा मॉडल प्रभावी रूप से विभिन्न अभिव्यक्ति शैलियों वाले मामलों के लिए उचित शुल्क की भविष्यवाणी कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Is é an tasc a bhaineann le muirir a thuar ná táillí cuí a chinneadh do chás ar leith, rud atá cabhrach do chórais chúntóirí dlí nuair is cur síos fíorais atá san ionchur úsáideora. Áitímid go bhfuil ról tábhachtach ag ailt ábhartha dlí sa tasc seo, agus mar sin molaimid modh líonra néarúil atá bunaithe ar aird chun an tasc réamh-mheasta muirir agus an tasc eastósctha earra ábhartha a chomhshamhlú i gcreat aontaithe. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha, seachas bunús dlí a sholáthar, gur féidir leis na hailt ábhartha na torthaí tuar muirir a fheabhsú go soiléir freisin, agus is féidir lenár múnla iomlán muirir chuí a thuar go héifeachtach do chásanna le stíleanna cainte éagsúla.', 'hu': 'A díjelőrejelzési feladat az adott esetre vonatkozó megfelelő díjak meghatározása, ami hasznos a jogi asszisztens rendszerek esetében, ahol a felhasználói bevitel tényleírás. Azt állítjuk, hogy ebben a feladatban fontos szerepet játszanak a vonatkozó törvényi cikkek, ezért egy figyelem-alapú neurális hálózati módszert javasolunk a töltéselőrejelzési feladat és a vonatkozó cikkkivonási feladat egységes keretben történő modellezésére. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a vonatkozó cikkek a jogalap megadása mellett egyértelműen javíthatják a töltéselőrejelzési eredményeket, és teljes modellünk hatékonyan előrejelzi a megfelelő díjakat különböző kifejezési stílusú esetekre.', 'ka': 'ჩატვირთვა წარმოიდგინეთ საქმე არის განსაზღვრება შესაძლებელი შეტყობინებების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ძალიან საქმე asistent სისტემისთვის, სადაც მომხმარებელი ჩვენ ამბობით, რომ შესაბამისი კონტაქტიები ამ რაოდენობაში მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია აქვს, და ამიტომ ჩვენ ამბობით ნეიროლური ქსელის მეთოდი, რომელიც ერთადერთად მოდელურად მონაცემების დასაწ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ შესაძლებელი წარმოდგენების დამატებით, შესაძლებელი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა გაუკეთესოთ წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა', 'el': 'Το καθήκον πρόβλεψης χρεών είναι να καθοριστούν οι κατάλληλες χρεώσεις για μια δεδομένη περίπτωση, κάτι που είναι χρήσιμο για συστήματα νομικών βοηθών όπου η εισαγωγή του χρήστη είναι περιγραφή γεγονότων. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι τα σχετικά νομικά άρθρα διαδραματίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο σε αυτό το έργο, και ως εκ τούτου προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο νευρωνικού δικτύου βασισμένη στην προσοχή για να μοντελοποιήσουμε από κοινού την εργασία πρόβλεψης φορτίου και την αντίστοιχη εργασία εξαγωγής άρθρων σε ένα ενοποιημένο πλαίσιο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι, εκτός από την παροχή νομικής βάσης, τα σχετικά άρθρα μπορούν επίσης να βελτιώσουν σαφώς τα αποτελέσματα πρόβλεψης φορτίων, και το πλήρες μοντέλο μας μπορεί αποτελεσματικά να προβλέψει κατάλληλες χρεώσεις για περιπτώσεις με διαφορετικά στυλ έκφρασης.', 'kk': 'Жүктеу тапсырмасы келтірілген үшін керек жүктеулерді анықтау, бұл пайдаланушының келтірілген мәліметтің сипаттамасының жалпы көмекші жүйелеріне көмектесед Біз мәліметті заң мақалалары осы тапсырмада маңызды роль орындалады деп айтып тұрамыз. Сондай-ақ, назардағы невралдық желінің әдісін біріктірілген фреймінде жүктеу тапсырмасын және мақала Тәжірибелі нәтижелер жасалған мақалалар жұмыс берудің нәтижесін жақсартуға болады. Біздің толық моделіміз әртүрлі өрнегінің стилі үшін жасалған жұмыстарды таңдай алады.', 'it': "Il compito di previsione della carica è quello di determinare le spese appropriate per un dato caso, che è utile per i sistemi di assistenza legale in cui l'input dell'utente è la descrizione dei fatti. Sosteniamo che gli articoli di legge pertinenti svolgono un ruolo importante in questo compito, e quindi proponiamo un metodo di rete neurale basato sull'attenzione per modellare congiuntamente l'attività di previsione della carica e l'attività di estrazione dell'articolo pertinente in un quadro unificato. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che, oltre a fornire la base giuridica, gli articoli pertinenti possono anche migliorare chiaramente i risultati di previsione della carica, e il nostro modello completo può prevedere efficacemente le spese appropriate per casi con stili di espressione diversi.", 'mk': 'Задачата за предвидување на товарот е да се одредат соодветни товари за одреден случај, што е корисно за системите на правни помошници каде што влогот на корисникот е опис на фактите. Ние тврдиме дека релевантните законски статии играат важна улога во оваа задача, и затоа предложуваме метод на неурална мрежа базиран на внимание за заеднички моделирање на задачата за предвидување на товарот и релевантната задача за извлекување на статии во единств Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека, покрај обезбедувањето на правна основа, релевантните статии, исто така, јасно можат да ги подобрат резултатите на предвидувањето на наплатите, и нашиот целосен модел може ефикасно да предвидува соодветни наплати за случа', 'lt': 'Mokesčių prognozavimo užduotis – nustatyti atitinkamus mokesčius konkrečiam atvejui, kurie būtų naudingi teisinių pagalbininkų sistemoms, kuriose naudotojo įvestis yra faktų aprašymas. Mes teigiame, kad atitinkami įstatymų straipsniai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį šioje užduotyje, todėl siūlome dėmesiu grindžiamą nervinio tinklo metodą bendrai modeliuoti mokesčių prognozavimo užduotį ir atitinkamą gaminių gavybos užduotį vieningoje sistemoje. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad, be teisinio pagrindo, atitinkami straipsniai taip pat gali aiškiai pagerinti mokesčių prognozavimo rezultatus, o visas mūsų modelis gali veiksmingai prognozuoti atitinkamus mokesčius skirtingų išraiškos stilių atvejais.', 'ms': 'Tugas ramalan muatan adalah menentukan muatan yang sesuai untuk kes tertentu, yang berguna untuk sistem pembantu undang-undang dimana input pengguna adalah keterangan fakta. Kami menyangka bahawa artikel undang-undang berkaitan bermain peran penting dalam tugas ini, dan oleh itu melamar kaedah rangkaian saraf berdasarkan perhatian untuk bersama-sama model tugas ramalan muatan dan tugas ekstraksi artikel berkaitan dalam kerangka bersatu. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa, selain menyediakan dasar undang-undang, artikel yang berkaitan juga boleh jelas meningkatkan hasil ramalan biaya, dan model penuh kita boleh secara efektif meramalkan biaya yang sesuai untuk kes dengan gaya ungkapan yang berbeza.', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu tat-tbassir tat-tariffi huwa li jiġu ddeterminati tariffi xierqa għal każ partikolari, li jkunu ta’ għajnuna għas-sistemi ta’ assistenti legali fejn l-input tal-utent ikun deskrizzjoni tal-fatti. Aħna jargumentaw li l-artikoli rilevanti tal-liġi għandhom rwol importanti f’dan il-kompitu, u għalhekk jipproponu metodu tan-netwerk newrali bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni biex b’mod konġunt jimmudellaw il-kompitu ta’ tbassir tal-imposti u l-kompitu rilevanti ta’ estrazzjoni tal-oġġetti f’qafas unifikat. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li, minbarra li jipprovdu bażi legali, l-artikoli rilevanti jistgħu wkoll itejbu b’mod ċar ir-riżultati tat-tbassir tal-imposti, u l-mudell sħiħ tagħna jista’ effettivament jipprevedi imposti xierqa għal każijiet bi stili ta’ espressjoni differenti.', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവ് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വിവരണമാണെങ്കില്\u200d നിയമപരമായ സഹായികളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് വേണ്ടി ചാര്\u200dജ് പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ചാ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നിയമപ്രമാണങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പങ്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഒരുമിച്ചി പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നിയമപരമായ അടിസ്ഥാനം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന് പുറമെ വ്യക്തമായി പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്', 'mn': 'Шалгалтын таамаглалтын ажил бол хэрэглэгчийн орлуулалт үнэндээ тайлбарлах хэрэгтэй шагналыг тодорхойлох юм. Бид хуулийн баримтууд энэ үйл ажилд чухал үүрэг тоглодог гэдгийг хэлж байна. Иймээс анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээний аргыг нэгтгэх шаардлагатай таамаглалтын ажил болон хамааралтай баримтуудыг нэгтгэх үйл ажиллагаанд загварчл Шинжлэх ухааны үр дүн нь хуулийн суурь өгсөн гадна холбоотой баримтууд мөн зарцуулалтын таамаглалтын үр дүнг тодорхой сайжруулж чадна. Бидний бүрэн загвар нь өөр илэрхийллийн хэлбэртэй тодорхой зарцуул', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av lastingsoppgåva er å bestemme tilpassande lastingar for ein oppgjeven tilfelle, som er nyttig for rettlige assistentsystemet der brukaren inndata er faktisk skildring. Vi argumenterer at relevante lovartiklar speler ein viktig rolle i denne oppgåva, og derfor foreslår ein oppmerksbasert neuralnettverksmetode for å samsvara modellere oppgåva for forhåndsvising av lastingar og den relevante artikkelpakva for utpakking i eit vienot rammeverk. Den eksperimentelle resultatene viser at, i staden for å gjera rettbasen, dei relevante artikkelane kan også klart forbedra resultatet for å foreslå ladningar, og vår fullstendig modell kan effektivt foreslå tilfelle med ulike uttrykksstilar.', 'pl': 'Zadaniem przewidywania opłat jest określenie odpowiednich opłat dla danej sprawy, co jest pomocne w systemach asystentów prawnych, w których wejściem użytkownika jest opis faktów. Twierdzimy, że istotną rolę w tym zadaniu odgrywają odpowiednie artykuły prawne, dlatego proponujemy metodę sieci neuronowej opartą na uwadze, aby wspólnie modelować zadanie predykcji ładunku i odpowiednie zadanie ekstrakcji artykułów w jednolitych ramach. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że oprócz zapewnienia podstawy prawnej, odpowiednie artykuły mogą również wyraźnie poprawić wyniki przewidywania obciążeń, a nasz pełny model może skutecznie przewidywać odpowiednie opłaty dla przypadków o różnych stylach wyrażeń.', 'ro': 'Sarcina de predicție a taxelor este de a determina taxele adecvate pentru un anumit caz, ceea ce este util pentru sistemele de asistență juridică în care introducerea utilizatorului este descrierea faptelor. Susținem că articolele relevante de drept joacă un rol important în această sarcină și, prin urmare, propunem o metodă de rețea neurală bazată pe atenție pentru a modela împreună sarcina de predicție a sarcinii de sarcină și sarcina relevantă de extragere a articolelor într-un cadru unificat. Rezultatele experimentale arată că, pe lângă furnizarea temeiului juridic, articolele relevante pot îmbunătăți clar rezultatele predicției sarcinilor, iar modelul nostru complet poate prezice efectiv sarcinile adecvate pentru cazurile cu stiluri de expresie diferite.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje optužbe je određivanje odgovarajućih optužbi za određeni slučaj, koji je od koristi za legalne asistentne sisteme gde je ulaz korisnika opis činjenice. Predlažemo da relevantni članovi zakona imaju važnu ulogu u ovom zadatku, i stoga predlažemo metodu neuralne mreže na pažnji da zajedno modeluju zadatak predviđanja optužbe i odgovarajući zadatak izvlačenja članaka u ujedinjenom okviru. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, osim pružanja pravne osnove, relevantni članovi takođe mogu jasno poboljšati rezultate predviđanja optužbe, a naš puni model može efikasno predviđati odgovarajuće optužbe za slučajeve sa različitim stilima izražavanja.', 'sv': 'Uppgiften är att fastställa lämpliga avgifter för ett givet fall, vilket är användbart för juridiska assistentsystem där användaren anger fakta. Vi hävdar att relevanta lagartiklar spelar en viktig roll i denna uppgift, och föreslår därför en uppmärksamhetsbaserad neuralnätverksmetod för att gemensamt modellera laddprognosen och den relevanta artikelextraktionsuppgiften i ett enhetligt ramverk. De experimentella resultaten visar att de relevanta artiklarna, förutom att ge rättslig grund, också tydligt kan förbättra laddningsprognosresultaten, och vår fullständiga modell kan effektivt förutsäga lämpliga avgifter för fall med olika uttryck stilar.', 'so': 'Shaqada ku saabsan aqoonsiga lacagtu waa in uu go’aano lacag ku haboon, kaas oo caawinaya nidaamka caawiyaha sharciga ah ee uu ku qorayo wargelinta runta ah. Waxaynu ka fekernaa in qoraalaha sharciga ku saabsan ay u leeyihiin qayb muhiim ah arrimahan, sidaas darteed waxaan u soo jeedinayaa qaab shabakadda neurada ah oo loo soo jeedo si wadajir ah u sameynta shuqulka la sii sheego lacagta iyo shaqada soo saarista ee la xiriira ee warqadda la soo saaro oo ku qoran kooxeed. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa tusi kara in marka aan sharciga lagu siinayo ka sokow warqadaha muhiimka ah uu si cad u hagaajin karo dhamaantooda laguu soo hor marin karo kharashka ku habboon xaaladaha qaababka kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட விஷயத்திற்கு சரியான குறிப்புகளை தீர்மானி தொடர்புடைய சட்ட கட்டுரைகள் இந்த பணியில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கு விளையாடுகிறார்கள் என்று நாம் விவாதம் செய்கிறோம், அதனால் ஒரு unified சட்டத்தில் கவனத்தை அடிப பரிசோதனை முடிவு', 'si': 'චාර්ජ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්පූර්ණයි චාර්ජ් විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒක අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ වැඩේ වැදගත් නීතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඉතින් අවධානය අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ජාලය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, නීතික ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිච', 'ur': 'چارڈ کی پیش بینی کا کام یہ ہے کہ ایک مقرر کیس کے لئے مناسب چارڈ مقرر کریں، جسے قانونی مددگار سیستموں کے لئے مددگار ہے جہاں کارساز اینوٹ حقیقت کی توصیف ہے. ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ معاملہ قانون لکھائی اس کام میں ایک اہم رول ہے، اور لہٰذا ایک توجه پر بنیاد نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک طریقے کی پیش بینی کا کام اور معاملہ لکھائی کا کام ایک متحدہ فرم میں مشترک کرنے کے لئے پیش بینی کریں۔ آزمائش نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ قانونی بنیاد کے سوا، معاملہ مقررہ مقررہ مقررہ مقررہ مقررہ مقررہ نتائج کو بھی صاف طور پر بہتر کر سکتے ہیں، اور ہمارے پورے مدل مختلف مثالیں کے مطابق مطابق قانون کے لئے مناسب چا', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz murakkab qilamiz, ma'lumot qoidalar bu vazifaning muhim roli o'ynaladi, va shunday qilib bir birlashtirilgan qanday birlashtirilgan boshqaruv vazifasi va muhim maqola uchrashuv vazifasini birlashtirish natijasida neyron tarmoq usulini anglatadi. Tekshirish natijalari xususiyatlarini ko'rsatadi, ma'lum maqolalar qo'shish natijalarini bajarishi mumkin va bizning butun modelimiz boshqa ifodalar uslublari uchun yetarli narsalarni ishlatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ dự đoán phí là xác định chi phí thích hợp cho một vụ cụ thể, có ích cho các hệ thống trợ lý luật pháp nơi người dùng dùng dùng dùng dùng là mô tả sự thật. Chúng tôi cho rằng các bài báo pháp liên quan đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong nhiệm vụ này, và đề xuất một phương pháp mạng thần kinh dựa trên sự chú ý để cùng nhau mô hình nhiệm vụ dự đoán bộ nạp và nhiệm vụ khai thác bài báo liên quan trong một bộ phận thống nhất. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy, ngoài việc cung cấp cơ sở pháp lý, các bài báo liên quan cũng có thể rõ ràng cải thiện kết quả dự đoán tính phí, và mẫu đầy đủ của chúng ta có thể dự đoán giá trị thích hợp cho các trường hợp có các kiểu biểu đạt khác nhau.', 'da': 'Opgaven med forudsigelse af afgifter er at fastlægge passende afgifter for en given sag, hvilket er nyttigt for juridiske assistentsystemer, hvor brugerens input er faktisk beskrivelse. Vi hævder, at relevante lovartikler spiller en vigtig rolle i denne opgave, og foreslår derfor en opmærksomhedsbaseret neural netværksmetode til i fællesskab at modellere laddprognoseopgaven og den relevante artikeludtrækningsopgave i en samlet ramme. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at de relevante artikler ud over at give retsgrundlag også tydeligt kan forbedre ladningsresultaterne, og vores fulde model effektivt kan forudsige passende afgifter for tilfælde med forskellige udtryksstilarter.', 'nl': 'De taak van de kostenvoorspelling is om passende kosten voor een bepaald geval te bepalen, wat nuttig is voor juridische assistentiesystemen waarbij de gebruikersinvoer feitelijke beschrijving is. We stellen voor dat relevante wetsartikelen een belangrijke rol spelen in deze taak, en stellen daarom een attentie-based neural network methode voor om de ladingsprognosetaak en de relevante artikelextractie taak gezamenlijk te modelleren in een uniform raamwerk. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat, naast het verstrekken van juridische basis, de relevante artikelen ook duidelijk de ladingsprognoseresultaten kunnen verbeteren, en ons volledige model effectief geschikte kosten kan voorspellen voor gevallen met verschillende expressiestijlen.', 'hr': 'Predviđanje optužbe je određivanje odgovarajućih optužbi za određeni slučaj, koji je od koristi za pravne pomoćne sustave gdje je ulaz korisnika opis činjenice. Tvrdimo da relevantni članovi zakona imaju važnu ulogu u ovom zadatku, i stoga predlažemo metodu neuromreže na temelju pažnje kako bi zajedno modelirali zadatak predviđanja optužbe i odgovarajući zadatak izvlačenja članaka u ujedinjenom okviru. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, osim pružanja pravne osnove, relevantni članovi također mogu jasno poboljšati rezultate predviđanja naknade, a naš puni model može učinkovito predviđati odgovarajuće optužbe za slučajeve s različitim stilima izražavanja.', 'bg': 'Задачата за прогнозиране на таксите е да се определят подходящи такси за даден случай, което е полезно за правните асистенти системи, където потребителският вход е описание на фактите. Ние твърдим, че съответните правни статии играят важна роля в тази задача и затова предлагаме базиран на вниманието метод на невронната мрежа за съвместно моделиране на задачата за прогнозиране на заряда и съответната задача за извличане на статии в единна рамка. Експерименталните резултати показват, че освен предоставянето на правно основание, съответните статии могат ясно да подобрят резултатите от прогнозирането на зарядите, а нашият пълен модел може ефективно да предвиди подходящи заряди за случаи с различни стилове на изразяване.', 'ko': '비용 예측 임무는 주어진 안건에 적당한 비용을 정하는 것으로 사용자가 사실 묘사를 위한 법률 보조 시스템을 입력하는 데 도움이 된다.우리는 관련 법률 조항이 이 임무에서 중요한 역할을 한다고 생각하기 때문에 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경 네트워크 방법을 제시하여 통일된 구조에서 전하 예측 임무와 관련 조항 추출 임무를 연합 모델링했다.실험 결과에 따르면 법률적 근거를 제공하는 것 외에 관련 글은 고소 예측 결과를 뚜렷하게 개선할 수 있고 우리의 완전한 모델은 서로 다른 표현 스타일의 사건에 대한 적당한 고소를 효과적으로 예측할 수 있다.', 'de': 'Die Aufgabe der Kostenvorhersage besteht darin, geeignete Gebühren für einen bestimmten Fall zu ermitteln, was für Rechtsassistentensysteme hilfreich ist, bei denen die Benutzereingabe eine Faktenbeschreibung ist. Wir argumentieren, dass relevante Gesetzesartikel in dieser Aufgabe eine wichtige Rolle spielen und schlagen daher eine aufmerksamkeitsbasierte neuronale Netzwerkmethode vor, um die Ladungsvorhersageaufgabe und die relevante Artikelextraktionsaufgabe gemeinsam in einem einheitlichen Framework zu modellieren. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die relevanten Artikel neben der Bereitstellung einer Rechtsgrundlage auch die Ergebnisse der Ladungsvorhersage deutlich verbessern können, und unser vollständiges Modell kann effektiv geeignete Gebühren für Fälle mit unterschiedlichen Ausdrucksstilen vorhersagen.', 'id': 'Tugas prediksi biaya adalah menentukan biaya yang sesuai untuk kasus tertentu, yang membantu untuk sistem asisten hukum dimana input pengguna adalah deskripsi fakta. Kami berdebat bahwa artikel hukum yang relevan bermain peran penting dalam tugas ini, dan oleh itu mengusulkan metode jaringan saraf berdasarkan perhatian untuk bersama-sama model tugas prediksi muatan dan tugas ekstraksi artikel yang relevan dalam rangka bersatu. The experimental results show that, besides providing legal basis, the relevant articles can also clearly improve the charge prediction results, and our full model can effectively predict appropriate charges for cases with different expression styles.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya utabiri ni kuamua mashitaka sahihi kwa kesi fulani, ambayo inasaidia kwa mfumo wa msaidizi wa kisheria ambapo input wa mtumiaji ni maelezo ya ukweli. Tunajadili kuwa makala zinazohusiana na sheria zinacheza jukumu muhimu katika kazi hii, na kwa hiyo pendekeza njia ya mtandao wa neura yenye msimamo mkali ili kuonyesha jukumu la utabiri pamoja na kazi ya uteuzi wa makala muhimu katika mfumo wa pamoja. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa, pamoja na kutoa msingi wa sheria, makala zinazohusiana pia zinaweza kuboresha matokeo ya utabiri, na mtindo wetu kamili unaweza kutabiri mashitaka yanayotakiwa kwa kesi yenye namna tofauti za kujieleza.', 'tr': 'The charge prediction task is to determine appropriate charges for a given case, which is useful for legal assistant systems where the user input is factual description. Biz maýyp kanunlaryň bu zadyň içinde möhüm roli oýnaýandygyny a ýdýarys we şonuň üçin üns daýan ýan neural şebekesi täzimini birleştirmek üçin buýruk täzimini we möhüm maýyp açmak täzimini birleştirmek üçin teklip berýäris. Deneysel netijeler kanunlary üýtgetmekden başga, möhüm maktalar charge öngörünmesiniň netijelerini gowurap biler we biziň doly nusgymyz başga ifade edilen ýagdaýlary üçin gowurarak tahmin edip biler.', 'af': "Die laai voorskou taak is om geskikte gelades vir 'n gegewe saak te bepaal, wat is hulp vir wetlike assistent stelsels waar die gebruiker invoer is feit beskrywing. Ons argumenteer dat relevante wetaktikels 'n belangrike rol in hierdie taak speel, en daarom voorstel 'n aandag-gebaseerde neuralnetwerk metode om joint die laai voorskou taak en die relevante artikel uitvoer taak in 'n eenvoudige raamwerk te model. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat, behalwe verskaffing van wetlike basis, die relevante artikels kan ook duidelik die laai voorskou resultate verbeter, en ons volle model kan effektief voorskou toepassings vir gevalle met verskillende uitdrukkingsstyle.", 'sq': 'Detyra e parashikimit të akuzave është të përcaktohen akuzat e përshtatshme për një rast të caktuar, gjë që është e dobishme për sistemet ndihmës ligjore ku hyrja e përdoruesit është përshkrimi i fakteve. Ne argumentojmë se artikujt e ligjit të rëndësishëm luajnë një rol të rëndësishëm në këtë detyrë dhe kështu propozojmë një metodë rrjeti nervor të bazuar në vëmendje për të modeluar së bashku detyrën e parashikimit të akuzave dhe detyrën e rëndësishme të nxjerrjes së artikujve në një kuadër të unifikuar. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se, përveç dhënies së bazës ligjore, artikujt e duhura mund gjithashtu të përmirësojnë qartë rezultatet e parashikimit të akuzave dhe modeli ynë i plotë mund të parashikojë efektivisht akuzat e duhura për raste me stile të ndryshme shprehjeje.', 'am': 'የሸክም ቅድሚያ ስራ የእውነት መግለጫ ሆኖ የሚጠቅመው የሕግ ረቂቃዎች ሲስተም ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ አካባቢ የሕግ ጽሑፎች በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች ከሕግ መሠረት በቀር፣ የግንኙነት ጽሑፎች የክስ ውጤት እንዲያበጅል ይችላል፣ ሙሉ ሞዴሌዎቻችንም በተለየ መልዕክት ዓይነት ለጥያቄ ክስ እንዲያሳይ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Անվճարի կանխատեսման խնդիրը նշանակում է որոշել որոշ դեպքերի համար հարմար վճարերը, որոնք օգտակար են օրինական օգնական համակարգերի համար, որտեղ օգտագործողի ներմուծը փաստերի նկարագրությունն է: Մենք պնդում ենք, որ համապատասխանատու օրենքի հոդվածները կարևոր դեր են խաղում այս խնդրի մեջ, և հետևաբար առաջարկում ենք ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային ցանցի մեթոդ, որպեսզի միասին մոդելավորենք բեռնադրության կանխատեսման խնդիրը և համապատասխանատու հո The experimental results show that, besides providing legal basis, the relevant articles can also clearly improve the charge prediction results, and our full model can effectively predict appropriate charges for cases with different expression styles.', 'bn': 'অভিযোগের প্রতি ভবিষ্যতার কাজ হচ্ছে একটি নির্দিষ্ট কেসের জন্য যথাযথ অভিযোগ নির্ধারণ করা, যা আইনিক সহকারী সিস্টেমের জন্য সাহ আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে প্রসঙ্গ আইনের প্রবন্ধগুলো এই কাজে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে, আর তাই একটি একত্রিত ফ্রেমে একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মোডেল করার জন্য একটি  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বৈধ ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক প্রদান করা ছাড়া এই প্রসঙ্গিক প্রবন্ধগুলো পরিষ্কার করতে পারে অভিযোগের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী ফলাফলের উন্নত', 'bs': 'Predviđanje optužbe je određivanje odgovarajućih optužbi za određeni slučaj, koji je od koristi za pravne asistente sustave gdje je ulaz korisnika opis činjenice. Predlažemo da relevantni članovi zakona imaju važnu ulogu u ovom zadatku, i stoga predlažemo metodu na pažnji baziranu na neuralnoj mreži da zajedno modeluju zadatak predviđanja optužbe i odgovarajući zadatak izvlačenja članaka u ujedinjenom okviru. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da, osim pružanja pravne osnove, relevantni članovi također mogu jasno poboljšati rezultate predviđanja optužbe, a naš puni model može učinkovito predvidjeti odgovarajuće optužbe za slučajeve s različitim stilima izraza.', 'fa': 'وظیفه پیش\u200cبینی بار برای تعیین بارهای مناسب برای یک پرونده داده است، که برای سیستم دستیاری قانونی که ورودهای کاربر توصیف حقیقت است، کمک می\u200cکند. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که مقاله\u200cهای قانونی مربوط به این کار نقش مهم را بازی می\u200cکنند، و بنابراین یک روش شبکه عصبی بر روی توجه پیشنهاد کند تا با هم مدل پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای بار و وظیفه\u200cی اخراج مقاله مربوط به یک چهارچوب متحد را نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که بجز اجازه دادن بنیاد قانونی، مقاله های مربوط به طور واضح نتایج پیش\u200cبینی بار را بهتر می\u200cکند، و مدل کامل ما می\u200cتواند به طور تاثیر پیش\u200cبینی دادن بارهای مناسب برای پرونده\u200cها با استیلهای متفاوت', 'cs': 'Úkolem predikce poplatků je určit vhodné poplatky pro daný případ, což je užitečné pro systémy právních asistentů, kde uživatelským vstupem je popis faktů. Tvrdíme, že relevantní právní články hrají v tomto úkolu důležitou roli, a proto navrhujeme metodu neuronové sítě založenou na pozornosti, která společně modeluje úlohu predikce náboje a relevantní úlohu extrakce článku v jednotném rámci. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že kromě poskytnutí právního základu mohou relevantní články také jasně zlepšit výsledky predikce náboje a náš kompletní model může efektivně předpovídat vhodné poplatky pro případy s různými styly výrazu.', 'az': 'Lahiyə tədbir törətməsi, verilən vəziyyətdə uyğun yükləri təyin etməkdir. Bu, istifadəçinin istifadəçi girişi həqiqət təfsil etdiyi qanunu asistent sistemlərinə faydalandırır. Biz bu işdə mövcud qanunların mövcud rolünü oynadığını iddia edirik, buna görə də təsirli-təsirli nöral şəbəkə metodlarını birləşdirmək üçün yüklük təsirlərinin və məlumatların əlaqəsiz məlumatların birləşdirilməsi üçün birləşdirilməsi üçün təklif edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçlar kanunları təyin etmək istisnasında, əlaqəli məsələlər də yüklük təyin etmə sonuçlarını təmizləyə bilər və bütün modellərimiz müxtəlif ifadə stilləri ilə uyğun yüklərini təmin edə bilər.', 'et': 'Tasude prognoosimise ülesanne on määrata kindlaks konkreetse juhtumi jaoks sobivad tasud, mis on kasulik õigusabi süsteemides, kus kasutaja sisend on faktiline kirjeldus. Väidame, et selles ülesandes mängivad olulist rolli asjakohased õigusaktid, mistõttu pakume välja tähelepanupõhise närvivõrgu meetodi, et ühiselt modelleerida laengu ennustamise ülesannet ja asjakohast artikli ekstraheerimisülesannet ühtses raamistikus. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et lisaks õigusliku aluse andmisele võivad asjakohased artiklid selgelt parandada laengu prognoosimise tulemusi ja meie täismudel saab tõhusalt ennustada sobivaid laenguid erinevate väljendusstiilidega juhtudel.', 'ca': "La tasca de predicció de càrrega és determinar càrregues adequades per un cas determinat, que és útil per als sistemes d'assistents legals on la entrada d'usuari és descripció de fet. Afirmem que els articles de llei pertinents juguen un paper important en aquesta tasca, i per tant proposem un mètode de xarxa neural basat en l'atenció per modelar conjuntament la tasca de predicció de càrrega i la tasca d'extracció d'articles pertinents en un marc unificat. Els resultats experimentals mostren que, a part de proporcionar una base jurídica, els articles pertinents també poden millorar clarament els resultats de la predicció de càrrega, i el nostre model complet pot predir efectivament càrregues adequades per casos amb estils d'expressió diferents.", 'fi': 'Maksujen ennakointitehtävänä on määrittää kullekin tapaukselle asianmukaiset maksut, mikä on hyödyllistä oikeusapujärjestelmissä, joissa käyttäjän syöttämä tieto on fakta-kuvaus. Väitämme, että asiaa koskevilla lakiartikkeleilla on tärkeä rooli tässä tehtävässä, ja siksi ehdotamme huomiota perustuvaa neuroverkkomenetelmää, jolla voidaan mallintaa yhdessä varauksen ennustamistehtävä ja asiaankuuluva artikkelin poistotehtävä yhtenäisessä kehyksessä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että oikeusperustan lisäksi relevantit artikkelit voivat myös selvästi parantaa latausennustetuloksia, ja koko mallimme pystyy tehokkaasti ennustamaan sopivia maksuja tapauksiin, joissa on erilaisia ilmaisutyylejä.', 'jv': 'Where the user input is true Awak dhéwé ngerti cara-cara sing dikarepaké hukum sing dikarepaké ning nggawe iki, lan ngako siweke nggunakake aturan-aké netwisan sing nggawe ngubah sampek iso nggawe lanjut cara nggawe lan akeh iso nggawe lan akeh iso nggawe barang-aké cara nggawe Rejélé sing paling-paling wong na, macem nggawe praksi hukum, artik sing bebasan manut karo ngono nggawe barang nggawe dolanan tarjamahan, lan modelo sing komple kuwi nggawe barang nggawe dolanan surat sing apik karo kowe kaya perusahaan manut karo cah apik yo.', 'ha': "Kayan aikin gabatarwa na zartar da shi ya ƙayyade masu daidai wa sakan da aka ƙayyade, wanda yana da amfani da wa'urar taimakon sharci a inda tsarin mai amfani da shi ya zama maɓallin gaske. Tuna jãyayya da cẽwa makala masu husũma na sharĩ'a sun yi wani roli mai muhimu a cikin wannan aikin, kuma don ka buɗa wata hanyor shirin neural a kan zura zura ido dõmin ka sami shirin ka motsa aikin mai basĩri da kuma aikin zartarwa na da kuma masu da inganci cikin wani firam na haɗi. The experimental results show that, besides providing legal basis, the relevant articles can also clearly improve the charge prediction results, and our full model can effectively predict appropriate charges for cases with different expression styles.", 'sk': 'Naloga napovedovanja stroškov je določitev ustreznih stroškov za določen primer, kar je koristno za sisteme pravnega pomočnika, kjer je vnos uporabnika opis dejstev. Trdimo, da imajo pri tej nalogi pomembno vlogo relevantni pravni članki, zato predlagamo pozornosti temelječo metodo nevronskega omrežja za skupno modeliranje naloge napovedovanja naboja in ustrezne naloge ekstrakcije člankov v enotnem okviru. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko poleg zagotavljanja pravne podlage ustrezni članki jasno izboljšajo rezultate napovedovanja nabojev, naš celoten model pa lahko učinkovito napoveduje ustrezne naboje za primere z različnimi slogi izraza.', 'he': 'The charge prediction task is to determine appropriate charges for a given case, which is helpful for legal assistant systems where the user input is fact description.  אנו טוענים שמאמרי החוק רלוונטיים משחקים תפקיד חשוב במשימה הזאת, ולכן מציעים שיטת רשת עצבית מבוססת תשומת לב כדי למדגם יחד את משימת חיזוי האשמה ואת משימת חיפוש המאמרים רלוונטית במסגרת מאוחדת. תוצאות הניסויים מראות, מלבד הספק בסיס משפטי, המאמרים הרלוונטיים יכולים גם לשפר בבירור את תוצאות חיזוי האשמה, והמודל המלא שלנו יכול לחזות באופן יעיל חיזוי מתאים למקרים עם סגנוני ביטוי שונים.', 'bo': 'The charge prediction task is to determine appropriate charges for a given case, which is useful for legal assistant systems where the user input is fact description. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་བཀོད་པ་དེ་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ལས་འགན་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་སྤྲོད་གནང་བའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་དེ་ལུས་གཞི་བྱིན་པ་ལས། གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Quantifying the Effects of Text Duplication on Semantic Models', 'ar': 'تحديد تأثيرات ازدواجية النص على النماذج الدلالية', 'fr': 'Quantification des effets de la duplication de texte sur les modèles sémantiques', 'pt': 'Quantificando os efeitos da duplicação de texto em modelos semânticos', 'es': 'Cuantificación de los efectos de la duplicación de texto en los modelos semánticos', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ मॉडल पर पाठ दोहराव के प्रभावों को परिमाणित करना', 'zh': '量化文本重语义模样', 'ja': 'セマンティックモデルにおけるテキスト重複の影響の定量化', 'ru': 'Количественная оценка влияния дублирования текста на семантические модели', 'ga': 'Éifeachtaí Dúbailte Téacs ar Mhúnlaí Séimeantacha a Chainníochtú', 'el': 'Ποσοτικός προσδιορισμός των επιπτώσεων της αντιγραφής κειμένου στα Σημαντικά Μοντέλα', 'ka': 'ტექსტის ეუბლიკაციის ეფექტის განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'A szövegduplikáció szemantikus modellekre gyakorolt hatásainak számszerűsítése', 'it': 'Quantificazione degli effetti della duplicazione del testo sui modelli semantici', 'kk': 'Бөлшек үлгілерде мәтіннің көшірмелеу эффекттерін шектеу', 'mk': 'Квантификување на ефектите на дупликацијата на текстот на семантичните модели', 'lt': 'Teksto dubliavimo poveikio Semantiniams modeliams kiekybiškumas', 'ms': 'Mengkuantifikasi Kesan Duplikasi Teks pada Model Semantik', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകളില്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ രണ്ടുപേരുടെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d ക്വാന്റിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-kwantifikazzjoni tal-Effetti tad-Dopplikazzjoni tat-Test fuq Mudelli Semantiċi', 'no': 'Kvantering av effekten av tekstkopiering på semiantiske modeller', 'pl': 'Ilościowe wpływy duplikacji tekstu na modele semantyczne', 'ro': 'Cuantificarea efectelor duplicării textului asupra modelelor semantice', 'sr': 'Увеличавање ефекта дупирања текста на семантичким моделима', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩල් වලට පාළිය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා', 'so': 'Quantification Effects of Text Duplication on Semantic Models', 'ta': 'செமாண்டிக் மாதிரிகளில் உரையின் இரட்டிப்பு விளைவுகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی موڈل پر متن دوپیٹک کے اثرات کا مثال مقدار کرتا ہے', 'mn': 'Semantic Models-ын Текст Дубликацийн Эффектүүдийг тооцоолж байна', 'sv': 'Kvantifiering av effekterna av textduplicering på semantiska modeller', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cách xử lý ảnh hưởng của văn bản trên mẫu kính kỳ diệu', 'bg': 'Количествено определяне на ефектите от дублирането на текст върху семантични модели', 'hr': 'Quantiziranje učinka duplikacije teksta na semantičkim modelima', 'da': 'Kvantificering af virkningerne af tekstduplikation på semantiske modeller', 'nl': 'Kwantificeren van de effecten van tekstduplicatie op semantische modellen', 'de': 'Quantifizierung der Auswirkungen von Textduplizierung auf semantische Modelle', 'ko': '양적 텍스트 복제가 의미 모델에 미친 영향', 'id': 'Quantifying the Effects of Text Duplication on Semantic Models', 'fa': 'تعداد اثرات دوباره\u200cسازی متن در مدل\u200cهای ثانیه', 'sw': 'Akitangaza Effects of Duplication Text on Semantic Models', 'tr': 'Metin Çikliplerinin Etkilerini Semantik Modellerde Khartamak', 'sq': 'Përcaktimi i efekteve të duplikacionit të tekstit në modelet Semantike', 'af': 'Kwantifikasie van die Effekte van Teks Duplikasie op Semantiese Modelle', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Semantik Modell톛rd톛 Metin 캻fad톛l톛rinin 캻fad톛l톛rini K칬칞칲r칲r', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক মোডেলে টেক্সট ডাবলিকেশনের প্রভাব উপস্থাপন করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Quantificar els efectes de la duplicació de text en els models Semàtics', 'bs': 'Udaljenje učinka duplikacije teksta na semantičkim modelima', 'et': 'Teksti dubleerimise mõju kvantifitseerimine semantilistele mudelitele', 'cs': 'Kvantifikace vlivu duplikace textu na sémantické modely', 'fi': 'Tekstin kopioinnin vaikutusten määrittäminen semanttisiin malleihin', 'jv': 'to limiting the Effects of Text duplication on semanti-model', 'he': 'כיוון השפעות של כפילת טקסט על דוגמנים סמנטיים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Količinsko določanje učinkov podvajanja besedila na semantične modele', 'bo': 'Semantic མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་ཡི་གེ་འདྲ་བཤུ་གི་ནུས་པ་ཚོར་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Duplicate documents are a pervasive problem in text datasets and can have a strong effect on unsupervised models. Methods to remove duplicate texts are typically heuristic or very expensive, so it is vital to know when and why they are needed. We measure the sensitivity of two latent semantic methods to the presence of different levels of document repetition. By artificially creating different forms of duplicate text we confirm several hypotheses about how repeated text impacts models. While a small amount of duplication is tolerable, substantial over-representation of subsets of the text may overwhelm meaningful topical patterns.', 'ar': 'تعد المستندات المكررة مشكلة منتشرة في مجموعات البيانات النصية ويمكن أن يكون لها تأثير قوي على النماذج غير الخاضعة للإشراف. عادةً ما تكون طرق إزالة النصوص المكررة استدلالية أو باهظة الثمن ، لذلك من الضروري معرفة متى ولماذا هناك حاجة إليها. نقيس حساسية طريقتين دلاليتين كامنتين لوجود مستويات مختلفة من تكرار المستند. من خلال إنشاء أشكال مختلفة من النص المكرر بشكل مصطنع ، فإننا نؤكد عدة فرضيات حول كيفية تأثير النص المتكرر على النماذج. في حين أن قدرًا صغيرًا من الازدواجية أمر مقبول ، إلا أن التمثيل الزائد الكبير لمجموعات فرعية من النص قد يطغى على الأنماط الموضعية ذات المعنى.', 'fr': "Les documents dupliqués constituent un problème répandu dans les ensembles de données texte et peuvent avoir un impact important sur les modèles non supervisés. Les méthodes pour supprimer les textes en double sont généralement heuristiques ou très coûteuses, il est donc essentiel de savoir quand et pourquoi elles sont nécessaires. Nous mesurons la sensibilité de deux méthodes sémantiques latentes à la présence de différents niveaux de répétition de documents. En créant artificiellement différentes formes de texte dupliqué, nous confirmons plusieurs hypothèses concernant l'impact du texte répété sur les modèles. Bien qu'une petite quantité de doublons soit tolérable, une surreprésentation importante de sous-ensembles du texte peut submerger les modèles thématiques significatifs.", 'es': 'Los documentos duplicados son un problema generalizado en los conjuntos de datos de texto y pueden tener un fuerte efecto en los modelos no supervisados. Los métodos para eliminar textos duplicados suelen ser heurísticos o muy costosos, por lo que es vital saber cuándo y por qué se necesitan. Medimos la sensibilidad de dos métodos semánticos latentes a la presencia de diferentes niveles de repetición de documentos. Al crear artificialmente diferentes formas de texto duplicado, confirmamos varias hipótesis sobre cómo el texto repetido afecta a los modelos. Si bien una pequeña cantidad de duplicación es tolerable, la sobrerrepresentación sustancial de subconjuntos del texto puede abrumar los patrones temáticos significativos.', 'pt': 'Documentos duplicados são um problema generalizado em conjuntos de dados de texto e podem ter um forte efeito em modelos não supervisionados. Os métodos para remover textos duplicados geralmente são heurísticos ou muito caros, por isso é vital saber quando e por que eles são necessários. Medimos a sensibilidade de dois métodos semânticos latentes à presença de diferentes níveis de repetição de documentos. Ao criar artificialmente diferentes formas de texto duplicado, confirmamos várias hipóteses sobre como o texto repetido impacta os modelos. Embora uma pequena quantidade de duplicação seja tolerável, a super-representação substancial de subconjuntos do texto pode sobrecarregar padrões tópicos significativos.', 'ja': '重複したドキュメントは、テキストデータセットの普遍的な問題であり、監督されていないモデルに強い影響を与える可能性があります。重複したテキストを削除する方法は通常、ヒューリスティックまたは非常に高価であるため、いつ、なぜ必要かを知ることが重要です。私たちは、異なるレベルの文書反復の存在に対する2つの潜在的な意味論的方法の感度を測定します。異なる形式の重複テキストを人工的に作成することにより、繰り返しテキストがモデルにどのように影響を与えるかについてのいくつかの仮説を確認します。少量の重複が許容されるが、テキストのサブセットの実質的な過剰表現は、有意義な局所パターンを圧倒し得る。', 'zh': '复文档者,文本数集普遍存在之问也,或有感于无监。 删复文本之法,常为启发式贵,故知何时及何须至重。 测二者语义术之文档重敏感性也。 因人造重本,证我几假设。 虽复少可容,文集或可压。', 'hi': 'डुप्लिकेट दस्तावेज़ पाठ डेटासेट में एक व्यापक समस्या है और असुरक्षित मॉडल पर एक मजबूत प्रभाव डाल सकते हैं। डुप्लिकेट ग्रंथों को हटाने के तरीके आमतौर पर हेरिस्टिक या बहुत महंगे होते हैं, इसलिए यह जानना महत्वपूर्ण है कि उनकी आवश्यकता कब और क्यों है। हम दस्तावेज़ पुनरावृत्ति के विभिन्न स्तरों की उपस्थिति के लिए दो अव्यक्त शब्दार्थ विधियों की संवेदनशीलता को मापते हैं। कृत्रिम रूप से डुप्लिकेट टेक्स्ट के विभिन्न रूपों को बनाकर हम कई परिकल्पनाओं की पुष्टि करते हैं कि दोहराया गया पाठ मॉडल को कैसे प्रभावित करता है। जबकि दोहराव की एक छोटी राशि सहनीय है, पाठ के सबसेट का पर्याप्त अति-प्रतिनिधित्व सार्थक सामयिक पैटर्न को अभिभूत कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'Повторяющиеся документы являются широко распространенной проблемой в наборах текстовых данных и могут оказывать сильное влияние на неконтролируемые модели. Методы удаления дубликатов текстов обычно являются эвристическими или очень дорогими, поэтому важно знать, когда и зачем они нужны. Измеряем чувствительность двух скрытых семантических методов к наличию разных уровней повторения документов. Искусственно создавая различные формы дублированного текста, мы подтверждаем несколько гипотез о том, как повторяющийся текст влияет на модели. Хотя небольшое дублирование является допустимым, существенная перепредставленность подмножеств текста может перегрузить значимые тематические модели.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb fhorleatach iad doiciméid dhúblacha i dtacar sonraí téacs agus is féidir leo tionchar láidir a bheith acu ar mhúnlaí gan mhaoirseacht. Is gnách go mbíonn modhanna heorastúla nó an-chostasach ag baint le modhanna chun téacsanna dúblacha a bhaint, agus mar sin tá sé ríthábhachtach fios a bheith agat cathain agus cén fáth a bhfuil gá leo. Tomhaisimid íogaireacht dhá mhodh shéimeantacha folaigh maidir le leibhéil éagsúla athrá doiciméad a bheith ann. Trí fhoirmeacha éagsúla de théacs dúblach a chruthú go saorga, deimhnímid roinnt hipitéisí faoin tionchar a bhíonn ag téacs arís agus arís eile ar mhúnlaí. Cé gur féidir glacadh le méid beag dúblála, d’fhéadfadh go sáródh ró-léiriú suntasach ar fho-thacair an téacs pátrúin thopaiceacha brí.', 'ka': 'კომპუტირებული დოკუმენტები ტექსტის მონაცემების გარეშე პრობლემაა და შეიძლება ძალიან ეფექტის გარეშე მოდელზე. ეუპლიკური ტექსტის წაშლა მეტისები ტიპოლურად ჰეურისტიურია ან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გასაკეთ ჩვენ ორი ლატენტური სემონტიკური მეტისთვის განსხვავებული დოკუმენტის განმეორებაზე გადავიწყებთ. კულტურად განსხვავებული სხვა ფორმების ეუბლიკური ტექსტის შექმნა ჩვენ დარწმუნეთ რამდენიმე ჰიპოტეზების შესახებ თუ როგორ განმეორებული ტექსტის თუმცა პატარა ეუბლიკაციის ზომა ტოლიბულია, ტექსტის სპექსტის ძალიან მეტი გამოსახულება შეიძლება შეიძლება გადარჩენოთ მნიშვნელოვანი ტექსტიური შაბლონები.', 'hu': 'A duplikált dokumentumok átfogó problémát jelentenek a szöveges adatkészletekben, és erősen befolyásolhatják a felügyelet nélküli modelleket. A duplikált szövegek eltávolításának módszerei általában heurisztikus vagy nagyon drága, ezért fontos tudni, hogy mikor és miért van szükség rájuk. Két látens szemantikai módszer érzékenységét mérjük a dokumentum ismétlésének különböző szintjeire. A duplikált szöveg különböző formáinak mesterséges létrehozásával számos hipotézist erősítünk arról, hogy az ismételt szöveg milyen hatással van a modellekre. Bár egy kis mennyiségű duplikáció elfogadható, a szöveg részhalmazainak jelentős túlreprezentálása túlterhelheti a jelentős aktuális mintákat.', 'el': 'Τα διπλότυπα έγγραφα αποτελούν ένα διαδεδομένο πρόβλημα στα σύνολα δεδομένων κειμένου και μπορούν να έχουν ισχυρή επίδραση στα μοντέλα χωρίς επίβλεψη. Οι μέθοδοι απομάκρυνσης διπλών κειμένων είναι συνήθως heuristische ή πολύ ακριβές, οπότε είναι ζωτικής σημασίας να γνωρίζουμε πότε και γιατί χρειάζονται. Μετράμε την ευαισθησία δύο λανθάνουσας σημασιολογικής μεθόδων στην παρουσία διαφορετικών επιπέδων επανάληψης εγγράφων. Δημιουργώντας τεχνητά διαφορετικές μορφές διπλώματος κειμένου επιβεβαιώνουμε αρκετές υποθέσεις σχετικά με το πώς το επαναλαμβανόμενο κείμενο επηρεάζει τα μοντέλα. Ενώ μια μικρή ποσότητα επικάλυψης είναι ανεκτή, η ουσιαστική υπεραναπαράσταση των υποσύνολων του κειμένου μπορεί να κατακλύσει σημαντικά τοπικά μοτίβα.', 'it': 'I documenti duplicati sono un problema diffuso nei set di dati di testo e possono avere un forte effetto sui modelli non supervisionati. I metodi per rimuovere i testi duplicati sono tipicamente euristici o molto costosi, quindi è fondamentale sapere quando e perché sono necessari. Misuriamo la sensibilità di due metodi semantici latenti alla presenza di diversi livelli di ripetizione del documento. Creando artificialmente diverse forme di testo duplicato confermiamo diverse ipotesi su come il testo ripetuto influisce sui modelli. Mentre una piccola quantità di duplicazioni è tollerabile, una sostanziale sovrarappresentazione dei sottoinsiemi del testo può sopraffare modelli di attualità significativi.', 'lt': 'Duplikuoti dokumentai yra plačioji tekstų duomenų rinkinių problem a ir gali turėti didelį poveikį nepastebimiems modeliams. Duplikatų tekstų pašalinimo metodai paprastai yra heuristiniai arba labai brangūs, todėl labai svarbu žinoti, kada ir kodėl jų reikia. Mes matuojame dviejų latentinių semantinių metodų jautrumą įvairiems dokumentų kartojimo lygiams. Dirbdami įvairias dvigubo teksto formas patvirtiname keletą hipotezių, kaip pakartotinis tekstas daro poveikį modeliams. Nors nedidelis dubliavimas yra toleruojamas, didelis per didelis teksto pogrupių atstovavimas gali viršyti reikšmingus vietinius modelius.', 'kk': 'Қайталану құжаттары мәтін деректер қорларында ұзындық мәселе және қолданбаған үлгілер үшін күшті эффекті болады. Қайталанған мәтіндерді өшіру әдістері әдетте геуристік немесе өте бағатты, сондықтан олар қазір не неге керектігін білу үшін маңызды. Құжаттың қайталау деңгейінде екі latent semantic әдістердің сезімділігін өлшеміз. Қайталанған мәтіннің түрлі түрлі пішімдерін құру арқылы, қайталанатын мәтіннің үлгілерінің қанша нәрселерді қайталанатын гипотезаларды құптаймыз. Кішкене қайталану бөлшегі толықтырылған болса, мәтіннің ішкі бөлшектерінің көп-көп көрсетілімі маңызды нақышты үлгілері үлкен болуы мүмкін.', 'mk': 'Duplicate documents are a pervasive problem in text datasets and can have a strong effect on unsupervised models.  Методите за отстранување на дупликативните тексти се обично херистични или многу скапи, така што е важно да се знае кога и зошто се потребни. Ние ја мериме чувствителноста на двата лантни семантични методи кон присуството на различни нивоа на повторување на документите. Со вештачки создавање на различни форми на дупликативен текст потврдуваме неколку хипотези за тоа како повторен текст влијае на моделите. Иако мала количина на дупликација е толерабилна, значително прекумерно претставување на подгрупите на текстот може да преполни значајни точни шеми.', 'ms': 'Dokumen bergandan adalah masalah yang luas dalam set data teks dan boleh mempunyai kesan kuat pada model yang tidak diawasi. Kaedah untuk membuang teks ganda adalah biasanya heuristik atau sangat mahal, jadi penting untuk tahu bila dan mengapa mereka diperlukan. We measure the sensitivity of two latent semantic methods to the presence of different levels of document repetition.  Dengan mencipta bentuk berbeza teks ganda secara buatan kami mengesahkan beberapa hipotesis tentang bagaimana impak teks berulang-ulang model. Sementara jumlah kecil duplikasi boleh diterima, perwakilan-berlebihan besar bagi subkumpulan teks boleh melimpahkan corak topik yang bermakna.', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പകര്\u200dത്തുന്ന രേഖകള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ പ്രശ്നമാണ്. പിന്നെ സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള പ് രണ്ടാമത്തെ പദാവലികള്\u200d നീക്കം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സാധാരണ ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിക്ക് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വളരെ വിലപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട് എപ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സാമാന്റിക്ക് രേഖകളുടെ ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ അളവ് അളന്നുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത രൂപത്തില്\u200d രണ്ടു പകര്\u200dത്തപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പദാവലികള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പിന്നീട് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ആവര്\u200dത്തി While a small amount of duplication is tolerable, substantial over-representation of subsets of the text may overwhelm meaningful topical patterns.', 'mt': 'Dokumenti doppji huma problem a mifruxa fis-settijiet tad-dejta tat-testi u jistgħu jkollhom effett qawwi fuq mudelli mhux sorveljati. Il-metodi għat-tneħħija tat-testi doppji huma tipikament ewristiċi jew għaljin ħafna, għalhekk huwa vitali li wieħed ikun jaf meta u għaliex huma meħtieġa. Nikejlu s-sensittività ta’ żewġ metodi semantiċi moħbija għall-preżenza ta’ livelli differenti ta’ ripetizzjoni tad-dokumenti. Permezz tal-ħolqien artifiċjali ta’ forom differenti ta’ test doppju kkonfermaw diversi ipoteżi dwar kif it-test ripetut għandu impatt fuq il-mudelli. Filwaqt li ammont żgħir ta’ duplikazzjoni huwa tollerabbli, rappreżentazzjoni żejda sostanzjali tas-sottosettijiet tat-test tista’ taqbeż xejriet topiċi sinifikanti.', 'ro': 'Documentele duplicate reprezintă o problemă cuprinzătoare în seturile de date text și pot avea un efect puternic asupra modelelor nesupravegheate. Metodele de eliminare a textelor duplicate sunt de obicei euristice sau foarte scumpe, deci este vital să știm când și de ce sunt necesare. Măsurăm sensibilitatea a două metode semantice latente la prezența diferitelor niveluri de repetare a documentelor. Prin crearea artificială a diferitelor forme de text duplicat confirmăm mai multe ipoteze despre modul în care textul repetat influențează modelele. În timp ce o cantitate mică de duplicare este tolerabilă, suprareprezentarea substanțială a subseturilor textului poate copleși modelele actuale semnificative.', 'pl': 'Duplikowane dokumenty są powszechnym problemem w zbiorach danych tekstowych i mogą mieć silny wpływ na modele bez nadzoru. Metody usuwania duplikatów tekstów są zwykle heurystyczne lub bardzo drogie, dlatego ważne jest, aby wiedzieć, kiedy i dlaczego są one potrzebne. Mierzymy wrażliwość dwóch utajonych metod semantycznych na obecność różnych poziomów powtarzania dokumentów. Poprzez sztuczne tworzenie różnych form duplikatu tekstu potwierdzamy kilka hipotez o tym, jak powtarzający się tekst wpływa na modele. Chociaż niewielka ilość powielania jest dopuszczalna, znaczna nadmierna reprezentacja podzbiorów tekstu może przytłaczać znaczące wzorce aktualne.', 'sr': 'Duplikati dokumenti su prošireni problem u tekstnim setima podataka i mogu imati jaki uticaj na neodređene modele. Metode za uklanjanje duplikatnih tekstova su obično heuristične ili veoma skupe, tako da je važno znati kada i zašto su potrebni. Mi mjerimo osjetljivost dva latentne semantičke metode na prisustvo različitih nivoa ponovljanja dokumenta. Umetnički stvorenjem različitih oblika dupliranog teksta potvrđujemo nekoliko hipoteze o tome kako ponavljani tekst utiče na modele. Iako je mala količina duplikacije tolerantna, značajna prepredstavljanja podskupina teksta može prepuniti značajne temeljne obrasce.', 'si': 'ලිපින දත්ත සැටුම් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ මොඩේල් වලට බ ප්\u200dරතිලිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළි අපි වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා. වෙනස් පිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපි පොඩි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනකොට, පාළුවේ පොඩි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමා', 'sv': 'Duplicerade dokument är ett genomgripande problem i textdatauppsättningar och kan ha en stark effekt på icke-övervakade modeller. Metoder för att ta bort dubbletttexter är vanligtvis heuristiska eller mycket dyra, så det är viktigt att veta när och varför de behövs. Vi mäter känsligheten hos två latenta semantiska metoder för förekomsten av olika nivåer av dokumentrepetition. Genom att artificiellt skapa olika former av duplicerad text bekräftar vi flera hypoteser om hur upprepad text påverkar modeller. Även om en liten mängd dubblering är tolererbar, kan betydande överrepresentation av deluppsättningar av texten överväldiga aktuella mönster.', 'mn': 'Duplicate documents are a pervasive problem in text datasets and can have a strong effect on unsupervised models. Хоёр давтагдсан текстүүдийг устгах арга нь ихэвчлэн үнэтэй эсвэл үнэтэй. Тиймээс хэрэгтэй вэ болон яагаад гэдгийг мэдэх нь чухал. Бид баримтуудын давталтын түвшинд хоёр соронзон үргэлжлүүлэлтийн мэдрэмжийг хэмжиж байна. Бид өөр өөр хэлбэрүүдийг бий болгоход давтагдсан текст хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг талаар олон гипотезүүдийг баталж байна. Хэдийгээр жижиг хэмжээний давхарлалт нь зөвхөн зөвхөн бичсэн хэсгийг илүү илүү үзүүлэх нь маш чухал сэдвийн загваруудын хэлбэрээр илүү чухал байж болно.', 'no': 'Duplisert dokument er eit vasivt problem i tekstdatasett og kan ha sterk effekt på ulike modeller. Metodar for å fjerna dupliserte tekstar er vanlegvis heuristisk eller svært dykkar, så det er viktig å vite når og korleis dei treng. Vi målar følsomhet på to latente semantiske metodar til at det finst forskjellige nivå på gjentakinga av dokumentet. Ved kunstig oppretting av ulike formar av duplisert tekst, stadfestar vi fleire hypotesar om korleis gjentaste tekst påvirkar modeller. Mens ein liten mengde duplikasjon er tolerbar, kan substantiell over-representasjon av underdeler av teksten overvære signifikant temamønster.', 'so': 'Duplicate dukumentiyada waa dhibaato badan oo ku saabsan sawirada macluumaadka, wuxuuna saameyn ku yeelan karaa tusaalooyin aan la ilaalin. Qaadooyinka dhaqaalaha labada qoraal ah waa sida caadiga ah heuristi ama aad qaali ah, sidaas darteed waa muhiim in la ogaado waqtiga iyo sababta loo baahan yahay. Waxaynu qiyaasaynaa qalabka labada qaab ee ugu dambeeyay inay joogaan heerarka kala duwan ee dukumentiga dib u celinta. Si farshaxan ah ayaannu u sameynaa noocyo kala duduwan oo qoraal duplicate ah, waxaan xaqiijinaynaa qaar fikiro ah oo ku saabsan sida qoraalka mar-loo sameeyo tusaalayaal. Inta lagu jiro in tiro yar oo labanlaabo la sameyn karo, waxaa laga yaabaa in kooxo ka mid ah kooxaha qoraalka ay ku qoran karaan noocyada caadiga ah.', 'ur': 'ڈبلیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ میں ڈبلیٹ ڈبلیٹ ڈبلیٹ ڈبلیٹ کا ایک بڑا مسئلہ ہے اور غیرقابل مدل پر سخت اثر مل سکتا ہے. دوبلی پیغام کو ہٹانے کے مطابق طریقے معمولاً حوری یا بہت گران ہیں، تو یہ جاننا ضروری ہے کہ کب اور کیوں ان کی ضرورت ہے. ہم دو لاٹینٹ سیمنٹی طریقے کے حساسیت کا اندازہ لیتے ہیں دکھانے کے مختلف سطح تکرار کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم ایک دوبارہ متن کے مختلف فرمول بنانے کے ذریعہ بہت سی فرمول کی تصدیق کرتے ہیں کہ کیسا دوبارہ متن کی مدل اثر کرتی ہے۔ اگرچہ ایک چھوٹی دوپیٹ کا اندازہ ثابت قدم ہے، لیکن متن کے زیادہ زیادہ نمایش کا مطلوب ٹوپیٹ الٹ پر اضافہ ہو سکتا ہے.', 'ta': 'போலி ஆவணங்கள் உரை தரவுத்தளங்களில் ஒரு பெரிய பிரச்சினையாக இருக்கிறது மற்றும் சேமிக்கப்படாத மாதிரிகளில் ஒரு வலிம போலி உரைகளை நீக்க முறைமைகள் வழக்கமாக உயரியல் அல்லது மிகவும் விலையாக இருக்கும், எனவே எப்போதும் ஏன் தேவைப்படுகிறது என்பதை அறிய முக நாம் இரண்டு சமீபத்தில் பாதிப்பு முறைகளின் உணர்வை அளக்குகிறோம் வேறு நிலைகளின் மீண்டும் ஆவணத்தின் மீள்வி மீண்டும் திரும்பச் செய்யும் உரை மாதிரிகளை கைமுறையாக உருவாக்குவதால் நாம் எவ்வாறு திரும்பப்படும் உரை மாதிரி ஒரு சிறிய இருமுறை பெருக்கல் எளிதாக இருக்கும் போது, உரையின் துணுக்குகளின் மேல் பெரிய முக்கியமாக இருக்கலாம்.', 'vi': 'Tài liệu trùng hợp là một vấn đề cấp cao trong các tập tin văn bản và có thể ảnh hưởng mạnh đến các mô hình không giám sát. Những phương pháp để gỡ bỏ các văn bản trùng thường là thần kinh hoặc rất đắt tiền, nên cần thiết phải biết khi nào và tại sao chúng cần thiết. Chúng tôi đo được độ nhạy của hai phương pháp ngữ pháp tiềm ẩn với sự hiện diện của việc sao chép lại tài liệu. Bằng cách tạo ra các hình thức khác nhau của văn bản chúng tôi xác nhận nhiều giả thuyết về cách tác động văn bản lặp đi lặp lại. Một lượng nhỏ việc làm lại cũng được chấp nhận, nhưng lượng lớn sự đại diện của các nhóm dưới của văn bản có thể vượt qua những biểu đồ hiện thời.', 'uz': "@ info @ info: whatsthis Biz har xil hujjatning takrorlanish darajalari uchun ikki lateksiz semantik usullarning sensitiyatini o'ylaymiz. @ info: whatsthis Ikkilamchi ko'p nusxasi oson boʻlishi mumkin, matnning tub guruhlaridan katta taʼminlovchi bo'lishi mumkin.", 'hr': 'Duplikati dokumenti su prošireni problem u tekstskim setima podataka i mogu imati jaki učinak na neodređene modele. Metode uklanjanja duplikatnih tekstova su obično heuristične ili vrlo skupe, tako da je važno znati kada i zašto su potrebne. Mi mjerimo osjetljivost dvije latentne semantičke metode na prisutnost različitih razina ponavljanja dokumenta. Umjetno stvoriti različite oblike duplikatnog teksta potvrđujemo nekoliko hipoteze o tome kako ponavljani tekst utječe na modele. Iako je mala količina duplikacije tolerantna, značajna predstavljanja podskupina teksta može prepuniti značajne temeljne obrasce.', 'nl': 'Dubbele documenten zijn een alomvattend probleem in tekstdatasets en kunnen een sterk effect hebben op modellen zonder toezicht. Methoden om dubbele teksten te verwijderen zijn meestal heuristisch of erg duur, dus het is essentieel om te weten wanneer en waarom ze nodig zijn. We meten de gevoeligheid van twee latente semantische methoden voor de aanwezigheid van verschillende niveaus van documentherhaling. Door kunstmatig verschillende vormen van dubbele tekst te creëren bevestigen we verschillende hypothesen over de invloed van herhaalde tekst op modellen. Hoewel een kleine hoeveelheid duplicatie aanvaardbaar is, kan een aanzienlijke overrepresentatie van subsets van de tekst betekenisvolle actuele patronen overweldigen.', 'da': 'Duplikerede dokumenter er et gennemgribende problem i tekstdatasæt og kan have en stærk effekt på modeller uden opsyn. Metoder til at fjerne duplikerede tekster er typisk heuristiske eller meget dyre, så det er vigtigt at vide, hvornår og hvorfor de er nødvendige. Vi måler følsomheden af to latente semantiske metoder over for tilstedeværelsen af forskellige niveauer af dokumentgentagelse. Ved kunstigt at skabe forskellige former for duplikeret tekst bekræfter vi flere hypoteser om, hvordan gentagen tekst påvirker modeller. Mens en lille mængde duplikation er acceptabel, kan betydelig overrepræsentation af delmængder af teksten overvælde meningsfulde aktuelle mønstre.', 'bg': 'Дублирането на документи е широко разпространен проблем в текстовите набори от данни и може да има силен ефект върху модели без надзор. Методите за премахване на дублирани текстове обикновено са евристични или много скъпи, така че е жизненоважно да знаете кога и защо са необходими. Измерваме чувствителността на два латентни семантични метода към наличието на различни нива на повторение на документи. Чрез изкуствено създаване на различни форми на дублиран текст потвърждаваме няколко хипотези за това как повтарящият се текст влияе на моделите. Въпреки че малко количество дублиране е допустимо, значително свръхпредставяне на подгрупи от текста може да затрудни смислените тематични модели.', 'id': 'Dokumen duplikasi adalah masalah yang menyebar dalam set data teks dan dapat memiliki efek yang kuat pada model yang tidak diawasi. Metode untuk menghapus teks duplikasi biasanya heuristik atau sangat mahal, jadi penting untuk tahu kapan dan mengapa mereka dibutuhkan. Kami mengukur sensitivitas dua metode semantis latent untuk kehadiran tingkat berbeda pengulangan dokumen. By artificially creating different forms of duplicate text we confirm several hypotheses about how repeated text impacts models.  Sementara jumlah kecil duplikasi bisa diterima, terlalu banyak represensi dari subkelompok teks mungkin mengalahkan pola topik yang berarti.', 'de': 'Duplikate Dokumente sind ein allgemeines Problem in Textdatensätzen und können sich stark auf unbeaufsichtigte Modelle auswirken. Methoden zum Entfernen doppelter Texte sind in der Regel heuristisch oder sehr teuer, daher ist es wichtig zu wissen, wann und warum sie benötigt werden. Wir messen die Sensitivität zweier latenter semantischer Methoden für das Vorhandensein verschiedener Ebenen der Dokumentenrepetition. Durch die künstliche Erzeugung verschiedener Formen von doppeltem Text bestätigen wir mehrere Hypothesen darüber, wie sich wiederholter Text auf Modelle auswirkt. Während eine geringe Menge an Duplizierung tolerierbar ist, kann eine erhebliche Überrepräsentation von Teilmengen des Textes sinnvolle aktuelle Muster überfordern.', 'fa': 'سند\u200cهای دوقلوی یک مشکل گسترده در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متن است و می\u200cتواند اثر قوی بر مدل\u200cهای غیرقابل تحویل داشته باشد. روش\u200cهایی برای حذف متن\u200cهای دوباره معمولاً حذف\u200cکننده یا بسیار گرون هستند، بنابراین این مهم است که بدانید کی و چرا نیاز دارند. ما حساسيت دو روش\u200cهاي semantic latent را به وجود سطح مختلف تکرار سند اندازه مي\u200cگيريم. با شکل\u200cهای مختلف از متن duplicate به صورت مصنوعی ایجاد می\u200cکنیم، چندین فرضیه\u200cهای تأثیر می\u200cدهیم که چگونه متن تکرار می\u200cکند به مدل\u200cها تاثیر می\u200cدهد. در حالی که یک مقدار کوچک دوباره تحمل قابل تحمل است، زیادی از زیر زیر نمایش زیر زیر زیر زیر زیر زیر متن ممکن است الگوهای موضوع معنی را فراگیرد.', 'ko': '중복 문서가 텍스트 데이터에 집중되는 것은 보편적으로 존재하는 문제로 무감독 모델에 큰 영향을 미친다.중복된 텍스트를 삭제하는 방법은 일반적으로 계발적이거나 매우 비싸기 때문에 언제, 왜 필요한지 이해하는 것이 중요하다.우리는 두 가지 잠재적 의미 방법이 어느 정도의 문서 중복에 대한 민감성을 측정했다.서로 다른 형식의 중복 텍스트를 인공적으로 만들어서 우리는 중복 텍스트가 모델에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지에 대한 몇 가지 가설을 확인했다.소량의 중복은 용인할 수 있지만 텍스트 서브집합의 과도한 표현은 의미 있는 주제 모델을 압도할 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Senedler hatlaryň içinde janlaşdyrma meselesi bar we saklanmaýan nusgalarda gaty bir etki yaratabilir. Duplikat metinleri çykarmak üçin yöntemler normalde heuristik ýa-da örän gymmat, onsoň haçan we näme üçin gerekli bolmagyny bilmek örän möhüm. Biz senediň gaýtalanmagynyň döwletlerinde iki ýakyn semantik yönteminiň hasysyny ölçüp barýarys. Tekrarlanan metin nähili täsirli möhümleri hakkında farklı şekilleri oluşturyp, birnäçe hypoteslerden geçirilen metin nähili täsirini tasarruf ediyoruz. Kiçi köçülemek tolgunlaýan bolsa hem metin üýtgewleriniň gaty möhüm nusgalary uly gaýd edip biler.', 'sw': 'Dokumentari zilizotengenezwa ni tatizo kubwa katika seti za taarifa za maandishi na zinaweza kuwa na athari kubwa juu ya mifano yasiyopangwa. Njia za kuondoa ujumbe wa twita ni kwa ujumla wa heuristi au ghali sana, kwa hiyo ni muhimu kujua lini na kwa nini wanahitaji. Tunapimiza uelewa wa njia mbili za mpya za hivi karibuni kwa kuwepo kwa kiwango tofauti cha kurejea nyaraka. Kwa kutengeneza aina mbalimbali ya ujumbe wa twita tunathibitisha imani kadhaa kuhusu namna ambavyo inavyoathiri mifano ya maandishi yanavyoendelea. Wakati kiasi kidogo cha vifo vinavyovumilia, kiasi kikubwa cha kuwakilisha viungo vya maandishi vinaweza kuwa na miundo yenye maana ya maana.', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ሁለት ጥያቄ ጽሑፎችን ለማስወግድ ሀሪክኛ ወይም እጅግ የከበረ ነው፤ ስለዚህ መቼ እና ምን ያስፈልጋቸው እንደሆነ ማወቅ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የሰነድ አካላዊ ደረጃዎች ለመቀናቀል የሁለት ቅርብ ተቃውሞ ማሰናከል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለየ መልዕክት የሁለት ዓይነት መልዕክቶች በመፍጠር፣ የጽሑፍ አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን እንዴት እንደሚያሳየፍ ብዙዎችን አካሄድን እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ በጽሑፉ አካባቢዎች ላይ አካባቢ ክፍል በሚያሳየው አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡", 'af': "Duplikaat dokumente is 'n pervasiewe probleem in teks datastelle en kan 'n sterk effek hê op ononderwerpende modele. Metode om dupliseerde teks te verwyder is tipies heuristiese of baie koste, sodat dit is vitaal om te weet wanneer en hoekom hulle nodig is. Ons maak die sensitiviteit van twee latente semantiese metodes tot die aangesig van verskillende vlakke van dokument herhaal. Deur kunstensielik skep verskillende vorms van dubbele teks, bevestig ons verskeie hipotees oor hoe herhaalde teks invloek modele. Alhoewel 'n klein hoeveelheid duplikasie toegelukbaar is, betekende oor-voorstelling van subartikels van die teks kan bedoel betekende onderwerp patrone.", 'hy': 'Կարկնապատկված փաստաթղթերը տեքստի տվյալների համակարգերում ընդհանուր խնդիր են և կարող են ունենալ ուժեղ ազդեցություն անվերահսկված մոդելների վրա: Կարճ տեքստերի հեռացնելու մեթոդները սովորաբար հորիստիկ են կամ շատ թանկ են, ուստի կարևոր է իմանալ, թե երբ և ինչու են դրանք կարիք ունենում: Մենք չափում ենք երկու թաքնված սեմանտիկ մեթոդների զգացմունքը փաստաթղթերի կրկնման տարբեր մակարդակների առկայությանը: Արվեստական կերպով ստեղծելով կրկնօրինակ տեքստի տարբեր ձևեր մենք հաստատում ենք մի քանի հիպոթեզներ այն մասին, թե ինչպես է կրկնօրինակ տեքստը ազդում մոդելներին: Մինչդեռ մի փոքր քանակությամբ կրկնօրինակումը թույլատրելի է, տեքստի ենթախմբերի նշանակալի չափազանց ներկայացումը կարող է գերակշռել իմաստալից թեմատիկական կաղապարները:', 'sq': 'Dokumentet e dyfishuara janë një problem i përhapur në të dhënat e tekstit dhe mund të kenë një efekt të fortë mbi modelet e pazgjidhura. Metodat për të hequr tekstet e dyfishuara janë tipikisht heuristike apo shumë të shtrenjta, kështu që është e rëndësishme të dini kur dhe pse janë të nevojshme. Merrim ndjeshmërinë e dy metodave semantike të fshehta në praninë e niveleve të ndryshme të përsëritjes së dokumenteve. Duke krijuar artificialisht forma të ndryshme të tekstit të dyfishtë ne konfirmojmë disa hipoteza rreth se si teksti i përsëritur ndikon modelet. Ndërsa një sasi e vogël dyfishimi është i tolerueshëm, mbipërfaqësimi thelbësor i nëngrupeve të tekstit mund të mbizotërojë modele aktuale të kuptueshme.', 'az': 'Çift belələri metin verilən qurularında böyük bir problemdir və müəyyən edilməmiş modellərə güclü bir etkisi ola bilər. Çift metinləri silmək yolları genellikle heuristik və ya çox pahalıdır. Bu yüzden onların nə vaxt və nə üçün ehtiyacı vardıqlarını bilmək çox vacibdir. Biz iki latent semantik metodların hisslərini, müxtəlif səviyyələrin tekrarlaması üçün ölçürük. Təkrarlanan metin modellərin necə təsirlərini təsdiqlədiyini təsdiqləyirik. Küçük bir dəyişiklik istifadə edilən halda, məktubun altı dəyişikliklərinin çox dəyişiklik göstərilməsi anlamlı mövcuddur.', 'bs': 'Duplikati dokumenti su prošireni problem u tekstnim setima podataka i mogu imati jaki učinak na neodređene modele. Metode za uklanjanje duplikatnih tekstova su obično heuristične ili vrlo skupe, tako da je važno znati kada i zašto su potrebne. Mi mjerimo osjetljivost dvije latentne semantičke metode na prisustvo različitih nivoa ponavljanja dokumenta. Umjetnički stvorenjem različitih oblika dupliranog teksta potvrđujemo nekoliko hipoteza o tome kako ponavljani tekst utiče na modele. Iako je mala količina duplikacije tolerantna, značajna predstavljanja podskupina teksta može prepuniti značajne temeljne obrasce.', 'ca': 'Els documents duplicats són un problem a generalitzat en els conjunts de dades de text i poden tenir un gran efecte en els models no supervisats. Els mètodes per eliminar els textos duplicats són normalment heurístics o molt cars, així que és vital saber quan i per què són necessàries. Midim la sensibilitat de dos mètodes semàntics latents a la presença de diferents nivells de repetició dels documents. Creant artificialment diferents formes de text duplicat confirmam diverses hipòtesis sobre com impacten els models de text repetit. Mentre una petita quantitat de duplicació és tolerable, una sobrepresentació substancial dels subconjunts del text pot superar patrons tòpics significatius.', 'cs': 'Duplikované dokumenty jsou všudypřítomným problémem v textových datových sadách a mohou mít silný vliv na modely bez dohledu. Metody odstranění duplicitních textů jsou typicky heuristické nebo velmi drahé, takže je důležité vědět, kdy a proč jsou potřebné. Měříme citlivost dvou latentních sémantických metod na přítomnost různých úrovní opakování dokumentů. Umělém vytvářením různých forem duplicitního textu potvrzujeme několik hypotéz o tom, jak opakovaný text ovlivňuje modely. Zatímco malé množství duplikace je přijatelné, podstatné nadměrné reprezentace podmnožin textu může přetížit smysluplné aktuální vzory.', 'et': 'Topeltdokumendid on tekstiandmekogumites leviv probleem ja võivad avaldada tugevat mõju järelevalveta mudelitele. Topelttekstide eemaldamise meetodid on tavaliselt heuristilised või väga kallid, seega on oluline teada, millal ja miks neid vajatakse. Mõõdame kahe latentse semantilise meetodi tundlikkust erinevate dokumentide kordamise tasemete suhtes. Kunstlikult luues erinevaid dubleeritud teksti vorme kinnitame mitmeid hüpoteesid selle kohta, kuidas korduv tekst mõjutab mudeleid. Kuigi väike hulk dubleerimist on lubatav, võib teksti alamhulgade märkimisväärne ülemäärane esindamine ületada tähenduslikke teemamustreid.', 'fi': 'Kaksinkertaiset asiakirjat ovat yleinen ongelma tekstitiedostoissa, ja niillä voi olla voimakas vaikutus valvomattomiin malleihin. Menetelmät kaksoiskappaleiden poistamiseksi ovat tyypillisesti heuristisia tai erittäin kalliita, joten on tärkeää tietää milloin ja miksi niitä tarvitaan. Mittaamme kahden latentin semanttisen menetelmän herkkyyttä dokumenttien toiston eri tasoille. Luomalla keinotekoisesti päällekkäisen tekstin muotoja vahvistamme useita hypoteeseja siitä, miten toistuva teksti vaikuttaa malleihin. Vaikka pieni määrä päällekkäisyyksiä on siedettävää, tekstin alajoukkojen huomattava yliedustus voi syrjäyttää merkitykselliset ajankohtaiset kuviot.', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ডাটাসেটে ডাটাসেটের একটি বিশাল সমস্যা এবং সংরক্ষিত মডেলের উপর শক্তিশালী প্রভাব থাকতে পারে। ডাবলিকেট টেক্সট অপসারণের উপায় সাধারণত হিউরিস্টিক বা খুব বেশী দামী, কাজেই এটা জানা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যে কোথায় এবং কেন তাদে আমরা সাম্প্রতিক দুটি সেম্পেন্টিক পদ্ধতির সংবেদনশীলতা পরিমাপ করি বিভিন্ন নথির পুনরাবৃত্তি উপস্থিতির জন্য। By artificially creating different forms of duplicate text we confirm several hypotheses about how repeated text impacts models.  যদিও একটি ছোট পরিমাণ দ্বিগুণ সহ্য করা যায়, তবে টেক্সটের সাবটের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বেশী বিশাল প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদান করা যায় য', 'sk': 'Podvojeni dokumenti so splošna težava v besedilnih naborih podatkov in lahko močno vplivajo na modele brez nadzora. Metode za odstranjevanje podvojenih besedil so običajno heuristične ali zelo drage, zato je ključnega pomena vedeti, kdaj in zakaj so potrebni. Merimo občutljivost dveh latentnih semantičnih metod na prisotnost različnih stopenj ponavljanja dokumentov. Z umetnim ustvarjanjem različnih oblik podvojenega besedila potrjujemo več hipotez o tem, kako ponavljajoče se besedilo vpliva na modele. Čeprav je majhna količina podvajanja dopustna, lahko precejšnja prekomerna predstavitev podskupin besedila premaga pomembne tematske vzorce.', 'he': 'מסמכים כפולים הם בעיה שגרתית במערכות נתונים טקסטים ויכול להיות השפעה חזקה על דוגמנים לא מעוקבים. שיטות להסיר טקסטים כפולים הן בדרך כלל היוריסטיות או יקרות מאוד, כך שזה חיוני לדעת מתי ולמה הם נזדקקים. אנחנו ממדידים את רגישות שתי שיטות סמנטיות מוסתרות לנוכחות רמות שונות של חזרה מסמכים. By artificially creating different forms of duplicate text we confirm several hypotheses about how repeated text impacts models.  בעוד כמות קטנה של כפילות סובלת, מייצג מיותר משמעותי של תת-קבוצות הטקסט עלול להעלות דפוסים נושאיים משמעותיים.', 'jv': 'Sample rate structural navigation Awakdhéwé kuwi ngerasakno karo semantar iki sampek tanggal kuwi nggawe gerakan dengok nggawe barang sampek. Munculine Genjer', 'ha': "@ action: button Tsarin da za'a tafiyar da matsayin dubu-dubu, yana da jumla'a heuristic ko mai kyauta, don haka kuma yana da muhimu a san a yaune da ake amfani da su. Tuna ƙaddara hisia'in hanyoyin biyu na ƙarani zuwa a kan wata daraja dabam na'urar takardar. Ina ƙiƙira wasu former masu ducated matsayi da baka, ko kuma za mu gaskata wasu misãlai na matsayin da za'a yi sauri. Akwai da ɗan ƙara kowaci dubi'in da aka sami, mai girma wa kwanza-mai ƙanshi na matsayin, za'a ƙara kayan cikin mazaɓan mazaɓa da muhimmi.", 'bo': 'འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དེ་ཡིག་གེ་སྒྲིག འདྲ་བཤུ་ཚིག་དག་གི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདོར་བ་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནའང་མི་རྩམས་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། འུ་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་བསྐྱར་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཚོར་བ་མཚུངས་པར་ཚད་གཞན་ཞིག་ཡོད། རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་འདྲ་བཤུ་གི་དབྱིབས་རིས་གསར་འཛུགས་པ་མ་འདྲ་བྱས་ནས་ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པའམ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་བསྐྱར་ འདྲ་བཤུ་ཆ་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀུ་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་སྐབས་ཡིག་གི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་དེ་ཆེས་ཕན་མེད་ཐུབ་པའི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཔོན་རིགས'}
{'en': 'Identifying Semantically Deviating Outlier Documents', 'ar': 'تحديد المستندات الخارجية المنحرفة معنويًا', 'fr': 'Identification des documents aberrants sémantiquement divergents', 'es': 'Identificación de documentos atípicos que difieren semánticamente', 'ja': '意味的に逸脱した外れ値ドキュメントの識別', 'zh': '识语义上偏离文档', 'pt': 'Identificando documentos discrepantes semanticamente divergentes', 'hi': 'Semantically deviating outlier Documents की पहचान करना', 'ru': 'Идентификация семантически отклоняющихся резко отклоняющихся документов', 'ga': 'Doiciméid Asluiteacha Séimeantacha a Aithint', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A szemantikusan eltérő külső dokumentumok azonosítása', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός σημασιολογικά αποκλίνων εγγράφων παράκαμψης', 'it': 'Identificazione dei documenti esterni che deviano semanticamente', 'kk': 'Шығыс құжаттарды білу', 'mk': 'Идентификување семантично одвивачки надворешни документи', 'lt': 'Semantiškai nukrypstančių išorinių dokumentų identifikavimas', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Dokumen Outlier Semantically Deviating', 'ml': 'പുറത്തുള്ള രേഖകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni ta’ Dokumenti ta’ barra li jiddevjaw b’mod Semantiku', 'mn': 'Шинэ бичил баримтуудыг тодорхойлох', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja dokumentów odróżniających się semantycznie', 'ro': 'Identificarea documentelor exterioare care deviază semantic', 'sr': 'Identifikacija semantički odvraćanja vanjskih dokumenta', 'si': 'පුරුද්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Identifiera gränsdokument som avviker semantiskt', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga dukumentiyada dibadda ah', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'سامنٹی طور پر دوئوٹی ڈیویٹ کر ڈیویٹ ڈیویٹ ڈیویٹ کیے جاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'xác định các tài liệu ngoài lề', 'da': 'Identificering af overordnede dokumenter med semantisk afvigelse', 'de': 'Semantisch abweichende Outlier-Dokumente identifizieren', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на семантично отклоняващи се външни документи', 'ko': '의미가 일치하지 않는 이상 문서를 식별하다', 'hr': 'Identifikacija semantički odvraćanja vanjskih dokumenta', 'nl': 'Identificeren van semantisch afwijkende outlinedocumenten', 'id': 'Identifikasi Dokumen Keluar Semantik Beralih', 'sw': 'Identifying Semantically Deviating Outlier Documents', 'tr': 'Çikgi Senedler', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Identifying Semantically Deviating Outlier Documents', 'sq': 'Identifikimi Semantik Deviating Outlier Documents', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্ট্রিক্যালিক্যাল ডেভেজিং আউটলিয়ার ডকুমেন্ট পরিচয় করা হবে', 'hy': 'Սեմատիկ շեղում արտաքին փաստաթղթերը', 'bs': 'Identifikacija semantički odvraćanja vanjskih dokumenta', 'ca': 'Identifying Semantically Deviating Outlier Documents', 'cs': 'Identifikace sémanticky odchylných odpisových dokumentů', 'et': 'Semantiliselt kõrvalekalduvate võõrdlusdokumentide tuvastamine', 'fi': 'Semantisesti poikkeavien ulkopuolisten asiakirjojen tunnistaminen', 'az': 'D…ôrgahlƒ± D…ôrgahlƒ± D…ôrgahƒ± Kimlikl…ôndirilir', 'fa': 'شناسایی مدارک\u200cهای بیرون\u200cتری', 'jv': 'job', 'sk': 'Identifikacija semantično odstopajočih dokumentov', 'he': 'מזהה מסמכים נוספים', 'ha': 'Identifying Semantically Deviating Outlier Documents', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ལག་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'A document outlier is a document that substantially deviates in semantics from the majority ones in a corpus. Automatic identification of document outliers can be valuable in many applications, such as screening health records for medical mistakes. In this paper, we study the problem of mining semantically deviating document outliers in a given corpus. We develop a generative model to identify frequent and characteristic semantic regions in the word embedding space to represent the given corpus, and a robust outlierness measure which is resistant to noisy content in documents. Experiments conducted on two real-world textual data sets show that our method can achieve an up to 135 % improvement over baselines in terms of recall at top-1 % of the outlier ranking.', 'ar': 'الوثيقة الخارجة عن الوثيقة هي وثيقة تنحرف إلى حد كبير في الدلالات عن الأغلبية في مجموعة. يمكن أن يكون التعرف التلقائي على القيم المتطرفة للوثائق مفيدًا في العديد من التطبيقات ، مثل فحص السجلات الصحية بحثًا عن الأخطاء الطبية. في هذه الورقة ، ندرس مشكلة التعدين الانحراف المعنوي للقيم المتطرفة للوثيقة في مجموعة معينة. نحن نطور نموذجًا توليديًا لتحديد المناطق الدلالية المتكررة والمميزة في كلمة مساحة التضمين لتمثيل المجموعة المعينة ، وقياسًا قويًا للخارج يقاوم المحتوى الصاخب في المستندات. تُظهر التجارب التي أُجريت على مجموعتين من البيانات النصية في العالم الحقيقي أن طريقتنا يمكن أن تحقق تحسنًا يصل إلى 135٪ مقارنة بخطوط الأساس من حيث الاسترجاع في أعلى 1٪ من الترتيب الخارج.', 'pt': 'Um documento outlier é um documento que se desvia substancialmente em semântica dos majoritários em um corpus. A identificação automática de documentos atípicos pode ser valiosa em muitas aplicações, como a triagem de registros de saúde em busca de erros médicos. Neste artigo, estudamos o problema de mineração de documentos discrepantes semanticamente desviados em um determinado corpus. Desenvolvemos um modelo generativo para identificar regiões semânticas frequentes e características no espaço de incorporação de palavras para representar o corpus dado, e uma medida de outlierness robusta que é resistente a conteúdo ruidoso em documentos. Experimentos conduzidos em dois conjuntos de dados textuais do mundo real mostram que nosso método pode alcançar uma melhoria de até 135% em relação às linhas de base em termos de recall no top 1% da classificação de valores discrepantes.', 'fr': "Un document aberrant est un document dont la sémantique s'écarte sensiblement des documents majoritaires d'un corpus. L'identification automatique des valeurs aberrantes de documents peut s'avérer utile dans de nombreuses applications, telles que le dépistage des erreurs médicales dans les dossiers médicaux. Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème de l'extraction des valeurs aberrantes de documents sémantiquement divergentes dans un corpus donné. Nous développons un modèle génératif pour identifier les régions sémantiques fréquentes et caractéristiques dans l'espace d'inclusion de mots afin de représenter le corpus donné, ainsi qu'une mesure robuste des valeurs aberrantes qui résiste au contenu bruité des documents. Des expériences menées sur deux ensembles de données textuelles réelles montrent que notre méthode peut atteindre une amélioration allant jusqu'à 135\xa0% par rapport aux valeurs de référence en termes de rappel au top -1\xa0% du classement des valeurs aberrantes.", 'es': 'Un documento atípico es un documento que se desvía sustancialmente en semántica de los mayoritarios de un corpus. La identificación automática de los valores atípicos de los documentos puede ser valiosa en muchas aplicaciones, como el análisis de historiales médicos para detectar errores médicos. En este artículo, estudiamos el problema de extraer valores atípicos de documentos que se desvían semánticamente en un corpus determinado. Desarrollamos un modelo generativo para identificar regiones semánticas frecuentes y características en el espacio de incrustación de palabras para representar el corpus dado, y una medida robusta de atípica que es resistente al contenido ruidoso en los documentos. Los experimentos realizados en dos conjuntos de datos textuales del mundo real muestran que nuestro método puede lograr una mejora de hasta un 135% con respecto a las líneas de base en términos de recuperación en el 1% superior de la clasificación de valores atípicos.', 'ja': 'ドキュメント外れ値は、意味論的にコーパスの大部分から実質的に逸脱したドキュメントです。医学的ミスがないか健康記録をスクリーニングするなど、多くのアプリケーションで文書の異常値を自動的に識別することは貴重です。本稿では、特定のコーパスにおける文書の外れ値を意味的に逸脱するマイニングの問題について研究する。私たちは、与えられたコーパスを表すための単語埋め込み空間内の頻繁で特徴的なセマンティック領域を識別するための生成モデルと、文書内のノイズの多いコンテンツに耐性のある堅牢なアウトリエンシーメジャーを開発します。2つの現実世界のテキストデータセットで実施された実験では、当社の方法は、外れ値ランキングの上位1 ％でのリコールに関してベースラインよりも最大135 ％の改善を達成することができることが示されています。', 'zh': '文档异值是在语义上与语料库中多语义差文档。 自动识别文档异直,筛查医误录。 于本文中,于给定语料库中掘语义偏文档异直。 发一模以识别词嵌空数语义,以示给定语料库,与一强大之量,可以御文档之嘈杂。 两真实世界文本数集上实验明,吾法于异直前1%召率可比基线增135%。', 'ru': 'Выброс документа - это документ, который существенно отличается по семантике от большинства в корпусе. Автоматическая идентификация выбросов документов может быть ценной во многих областях применения, таких как проверка медицинских записей на наличие медицинских ошибок. В данной работе мы изучаем проблему семантически отклоняющихся выпадающих значений документа в данном корпусе. Мы разрабатываем генеративную модель для выявления частых и характерных семантических областей в пространстве вложения слов, чтобы представить данный корпус, и надежную меру выброса, которая устойчива к шумному содержанию в документах. Эксперименты, проведенные на двух реальных текстовых наборах данных, показывают, что наш метод может достичь улучшения до 135% по сравнению с исходными уровнями с точки зрения отзыва в топ-1% от рейтинга выброса.', 'hi': 'एक दस्तावेज़ आउटलेटर एक दस्तावेज है जो एक कॉर्पस में बहुमत वाले लोगों से शब्दार्थ में काफी हद तक विचलित होता है। दस्तावेज़ outliers की स्वचालित पहचान कई अनुप्रयोगों में मूल्यवान हो सकती है, जैसे कि चिकित्सा गलतियों के लिए स्वास्थ्य रिकॉर्ड की स्क्रीनिंग। इस पेपर में, हम किसी दिए गए कॉर्पस में शब्दार्थ रूप से विचलित दस्तावेज़ आउटलायर्स के खनन की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम दिए गए कॉर्पस का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एम्बेडिंग स्पेस शब्द में लगातार और विशिष्ट शब्दार्थ क्षेत्रों की पहचान करने के लिए एक उत्पादक मॉडल विकसित करते हैं, और एक मजबूत बाहरीता उपाय जो दस्तावेजों में शोर सामग्री के लिए प्रतिरोधी है। दो वास्तविक दुनिया के पाठ्य डेटा सेट पर किए गए प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि बाहरी रैंकिंग के शीर्ष -1% पर याद करने के मामले में बेसलाइन पर 135% तक सुधार प्राप्त कर सकती है।', 'ga': 'Is éard is asluiteach doiciméad ann ná cáipéis a chlaonann go mór ó thaobh séimeantaice de ó na cinn is mó i gcorpas. Is féidir le haithint uathoibríoch asluiteacha doiciméad a bheith luachmhar i go leor feidhmchlár, mar thaifid sláinte a scagadh le haghaidh botúin leighis. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le mianadóireacht a bheith ag imeacht go séimeantach as asluitigh doiciméad i gcorpas ar leith. Forbraímid múnla giniúna chun réigiúin shéimeantacha mhinice agus shainiúla a aithint sa spás neadaithe focal chun an corpas a thugtar a léiriú, agus beart láidir asluiteach atá in aghaidh ábhar torainn i ndoiciméid. Léiríonn turgnaimh a rinneadh ar dhá thacar sonraí téacsúla fíordhomhanda gur féidir lenár modh feabhsú suas le 135% a bhaint amach thar na bunlínte i dtéarmaí aisghairme ag barr-1% den rangú is forluiteach.', 'el': 'Ένα έγγραφο είναι ένα έγγραφο που αποκλίνει σημαντικά στη σημασιολογία από τα περισσότερα σε ένα σώμα. Ο αυτόματος προσδιορισμός των υπερβολών εγγράφων μπορεί να είναι πολύτιμος σε πολλές εφαρμογές, όπως ο έλεγχος ιατρικών αρχείων για ιατρικά λάθη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της εξόρυξης σημασιολογικά αποκλίνουσων ακραίων τιμών εγγράφων σε ένα δεδομένο σώμα. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο για τον προσδιορισμό συχνών και χαρακτηριστικών σημασιολογικών περιοχών στη λέξη που ενσωματώνει χώρο για να αντιπροσωπεύει το δεδομένο σώμα, και ένα ισχυρό μέτρο απομάκρυνσης που είναι ανθεκτικό στο θορυβώδες περιεχόμενο των εγγράφων. Τα πειράματα που διεξήχθησαν σε δύο σύνολα κειμένων του πραγματικού κόσμου δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να επιτύχει έως 135% βελτίωση σε σχέση με τις γραμμές βάσης όσον αφορά την ανάκληση στην κορυφή-1% της κατάταξης ακραίων τιμών.', 'hu': 'A dokumentum különbsége olyan dokumentum, amely jelentősen eltér a szemantikában a korpusz többségétől. A dokumentumokon kívüli értékek automatikus azonosítása számos alkalmazásban értékes lehet, például orvosi hibák esetén az egészségügyi nyilvántartások átvizsgálásában. Ebben a tanulmányban egy adott korpuszban a dokumentumok szemantikusan eltérő értékeinek bányászatának problémáját vizsgáljuk. Fejlesztünk egy generációs modellt az adott korpuszt ábrázoló szó gyakori és jellegzetes szemantikai régióinak azonosítására, valamint egy robusztus külsőségmérőt, amely ellenáll a dokumentumok zajos tartalmának. Két valós szöveges adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk akár 135%-os javulást érhet el a kiindulási értékekhez képest a visszahívás tekintetében a kívülálló rangsor 1%-ának felső részén.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის გარეშე არის დოკუმენტი, რომელიც ძალიან სიმენტიკში გარეშე უფრო მეტი კოპუსში. დოკუმენტის გამოსახულების ავტომატური ინდიდინტიფიკაცია შეიძლება მნიშვნელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანი მნიშვნელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელოვანელ ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ ვისწავლოთ პრობლემა, რომელიც სემენტიკურად გადავიწყება დოკუმენტის გარეშე კოპუუსში. ჩვენ განვითარებთ გენერაციური მოდელი, რომელიც განვითარება ფარჯობით და პერატიკური სემონტიკური რეგიონი სიტყვაში, რომელიც დავყენებული სიტყვაში სამუშაო სამუშაო, რომელიც განვითარება მო ორი რეალური მსოფლიოს ტექსტულ მონაცემების შესახებ გამოიყენება, რომ ჩვენი მეტი შეუძლია 135% უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'it': "Un documento outlier è un documento che si discosta sostanzialmente in semantica da quelli maggioritari in un corpus. L'identificazione automatica dei valori anomali dei documenti può essere utile in molte applicazioni, come lo screening delle cartelle cliniche per errori medici. In questo articolo, studiamo il problema del mining semanticamente devianti dei documenti in un dato corpus. Sviluppiamo un modello generativo per identificare regioni semantiche frequenti e caratteristiche nella parola embedding space per rappresentare il corpus dato, e una robusta misura di outlierness resistente ai contenuti rumorosi nei documenti. Esperimenti condotti su due set di dati testuali reali mostrano che il nostro metodo può ottenere un miglioramento fino al 135% rispetto alle linee di base in termini di richiamo al top-1% della classifica outlier.", 'lt': 'A document outlier is a document that substantially deviates in semantics from the majority ones in a corpus.  Automatinis dokumentų išorinių nuorodų identifikavimas gali būti naudingas daugelyje paraiškų, pavyzdžiui, medicininių klaidų sveikatos įrašų patikrinimas. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame problem ą, susijusią su kasyba semantiškai nukrypstančiais dokumentų išoriniais aspektais konkrečiame korpuse. Kuriame kartos model į, skirtą nustatyti dažnus ir ypatingus semantinius regionus žodžio įdėjimo erdvėje, kad būtų atstovaujamas tam tikram korpusui, ir tvirtą išorinio pobūdžio priemonę, atsparią triukšmui dokumentuose esančiam turiniui. Dviejų realaus pasaulio tekstinių duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali pasiekti iki 135 proc. pagerėjimą, palyginti su bazinėmis linijomis, atsižvelgiant į at šaukimą 1 proc. aukščiausio lygio ribinėje klasėje.', 'mk': 'Документот е документ кој значително одбива во семантика од мнозинството во корпус. Автоматска идентификација на излезите од документите може да биде вредна во многу апликации, како што е проверката на здравствените записи за медицински грешки. Во овој весник, го проучуваме проблемот со минирањето семантично одбивање на страниците на документите во одреден корпус. Развиваме генеративен модел за идентификување на честите и карактеристичките семантични региони во зборот „вградување на просторот“ за да го претставуваме дадениот корпус, и силна мерка на чудност која е отпорна на гласната содржина во документите. Експериментите спроведени на два набори текстуални податоци од реалниот свет покажуваат дека нашиот метод може да постигне подобрување од 135 отсто во однос на основните линии во однос на врвот на 1 отсто од надворешниот ранг.', 'kk': 'Құжаттың сыртқышы - корпустың көпшілігінен семантикалық құжаттарынан өзгертілген құжат. Құжаттың шолғыштарын автоматты түрде идентификациялау көптеген қолданбаларда, мысалы, медицина қателерінің саулық жазуларын тексеру. Бұл қағазда, біз келтірілген корпустағы құжаттың көмегімен өзгерту мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз келтірілген корпус дегенді көрсету үшін көпшілік және қасиетті семантикалық аумақтарын анықтау үшін жасайтын үлгі құрамыз, құжаттардың дыбыс мазмұнына қарсы болып тұрады. Екі шын әлемдегі мәтіндік деректер жиынында тәжірибелер әдісіміздің негізгі жолдардың 1% жоғарғы жоғарғы ретінде 135% деген жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Sebuah luar dokumen adalah dokumen yang secara mendasarkan deviasi dalam semantik daripada yang kebanyakan dalam korpus. Pengenalan automatik luar dokumen boleh bernilai dalam banyak aplikasi, seperti skrin rekod kesehatan untuk kesilapan perubatan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah perlombongan secara semantik melebihi luar dokumen dalam sebuah korpus tertentu. We develop a generative model to identify frequent and characteristic semantic regions in the word embedding space to represent the given corpus, and a robust outlierness measure which is resistant to noisy content in documents.  Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada dua set data teks dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita boleh mencapai penambahan hingga 135% atas garis dasar dalam terma pengingatan pada 1% atas peringkat luar.', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിലെ ഏറ്റവും പേരുടെയും സെമാന്റിക്സില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറുന്ന ഒരു രേഖയാണിത്. മെഡിക്കല്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കായി സ്ക്രീന്\u200d റെക്കോര്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള രേഖകള്\u200d സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള് In this paper, we study the problem of mining semantically deviating document outliers in a given corpus.  കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ പ്രതിനിധിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വാക്കില്\u200d പ്രാവശ്യം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സെമാന്റിക് സ്ഥലങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ജനറന രണ്ട് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നടത്തിയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d ന', 'mt': "Dokument deskritt huwa dokument li jiddevja sostanzjalment fis-semantika minn dawk il-maġġoranza f’korpus. L-identifikazzjoni awtomatika ta’ barra mid-dokumenti tista’ tkun ta’ valur f’ħafna applikazzjonijiet, bħall-iskrinjar tar-rekords tas-saħħa għal żbalji mediċi. F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw il-problem a tat-tħaffir fil-minjieri li jiddevja semantikament il-periferiji tad-dokumenti f’korpus partikolari. Aħna niżviluppaw mudell ġenerattiv biex nidentifikaw reġjuni semantiċi frekwenti u karatteristiċi fil-kelma spazju ta' inkorporazzjoni biex jirrappreżentaw il-korpus partikolari, u miżura robust a ta' barra li hija reżistenti għal kontenut storbjuż fid-dokumenti. L-esperimenti mwettqa fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta testwali tad-dinja reali juru li l-metodu tagħna jista’ jikseb titjib sa 135 % fuq il-linji bażi f’termini ta’ ġbir lura fl-ogħla 1 % tal-klassifikazzjoni esterna.", 'mn': 'Документын газрын зураг бол корпус дахь ихэнх хүмүүсээс ихэнх зэрэг зэрэглэгддэг баримт юм. Документын шинжлэх ухааны автоматаар тодорхойлох нь олон хэрэглээнд үнэ цэнэтэй байж болно. Жишээ нь эрүүл мэндийн алдаа гаргах бичил баримтуудыг шинжлэх. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг корпус дахь баримт бичиг загваруудыг зохиох асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид бүтээлч загварыг бий болгож өгөгдсөн корпус болон баримтуудад чимээгүй сорилтуудыг эсэргүүцэх үед ихэвчлэн, харьцангуй semantic бүс нутгийг тодорхойлдог. Хоёр бодит ертөнцийн текстур өгөгдлийн багц дээр хийсэн туршилтууд бидний арга нь суурь шугам дээр 135% дээр нэмэгдүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Wyjście dokumentów to dokument, który znacznie odbiega od semantyki większości dokumentów w korpusie. Automatyczna identyfikacja odstawiających dokumenty może być cenna w wielu zastosowaniach, takich jak kontrola dokumentacji zdrowia pod kątem błędów medycznych. W niniejszym artykule badamy problem wydobywania semantycznie odbiegających od dokumentów odległych w danym korpusie. Opracowujemy model generatywny identyfikujący częste i charakterystyczne obszary semantyczne w słowach osadzających przestrzeń reprezentujących dany korpus oraz solidny pomiar odległości odporny na szumowne treści w dokumentach. Eksperymenty przeprowadzone na dwóch rzeczywistych zbiorach danych tekstowych pokazują, że nasza metoda może osiągnąć nawet 135% poprawy w porównaniu z liniami bazowymi pod względem odzyskania na najwyższym poziomie 1% rankingu odstałych.', 'ro': 'Un document anormal este un document care deviază substanțial în semantică de cele majoritare dintr-un corpus. Identificarea automată a valorilor anormale ale documentelor poate fi valoroasă în multe aplicații, cum ar fi verificarea fișelor de sănătate pentru erori medicale. În această lucrare, studiem problema extragerii anomaliilor documentelor care deviază semantic într-un anumit corpus. Dezvoltăm un model generativ pentru identificarea regiunilor semantice frecvente și caracteristice în cuvântul spațiu încorporat pentru a reprezenta corpul dat, și o măsură robustă de depășire care este rezistentă la conținutul zgomotos din documente. Experimentele efectuate pe două seturi de date textuale din lumea reală arată că metoda noastră poate obține o îmbunătățire de până la 135% față de liniile de referință în ceea ce privește rechemarea la top-1% din clasamentul outlier.', 'no': 'Eit dokumentomriss er eit dokument som utviklar i semantikk frå dei fleste i eit korpus. Automatisk identifisering av dokumentomriskaren kan vera verdileg i mange program, slik som å sjå helsepriskaren for medisinske feil. I denne papiret studerer vi problemet med mining av semantisk avviking av dokumentomrisset i eit gitt korpus. Vi utviklar ein generelt modell for å identifisera ofte og karakteristiske semantiske område i ordet innebyggende plass for å representera den gjevne korpusen, og ein sterkt område som er resistant til støyinnhaldet i dokument. Eksperiment gjennomført på to verkeleg tekstulike datasett viser at metoden vårt kan oppnå opp til 135% forbedring over grunnlinjer ved høve til å rekna opp på top- 1% av omrisset.', 'sr': 'Izlaznik dokumenta je dokument koji se značajno odvraća u semantiku od većine u korpusu. Automatska identifikacija proizvođača dokumenta može biti vrijedna u mnogim aplikacijama, poput preglede zdravstvenih podataka za medicinske greške. U ovom papiru, proučavamo problem rudarstva semantički odvajajućih dokumenata u određenom korpusu. Razvijemo generativni model da identifikujemo česte i karakteristične semantičke regije u reči koja uključuje prostor za predstavljanje određenog korpusa, i jaku mjeru prošlosti koja je otporna na bukovni sadržaj u dokumentima. Eksperimenti provedeni na dva seta tekstualnih podataka u stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naš metod može postići poboljšanje do 135% iznad početnih linija u smislu sećanja na najvišem 1% reda.', 'so': 'Qoraalka ka hooseeya waa dukumenti aad ugu beddelan semantika ugu badnaanta qofka korpuska. Aqoonsiga dhakhtarka ah ee dukumentiyada ka soo baxa waxay qiimaan karaan codsiyado badan, tusaale ahaan warqadaha caafimaadka lagu sameeyo khaladaha caafimaadka. In this paper, we study the problem of mining semantically deviating document outliers in a given corpus.  Waxaan horumarinaa tusaale abuur ah si aan u aqoonsanno goobaha qaybaha badan oo kala duduwan, si aan ugu representno qofka la siiyey, iyo qiyaastii aan wax ka baxsan ee ka hor jeeda wax ku qoran warqadaha qaylada. Imtixaanka lagu sameeyay laba xafiiska taariikhda ee caalamiga ah waxay muujiyaan in qaabkeenkeennu uu gaadhi karo kordhin 135% oo ka hormarin karo qoraalka hoose-1 boqolkiiba marka lagu soo xusuusto.', 'sv': 'Ett dokument avvikande är ett dokument som väsentligt avviker semantiskt från majoriteten i en korpus. Automatisk identifiering av avvikelser från dokument kan vara värdefull i många tillämpningar, till exempel genom att kontrollera hälsojournaler för medicinska misstag. I denna uppsats studerar vi problemet med att utvinna semantiskt avvikande dokumentavvikelser i en given korpus. Vi utvecklar en generativ modell för att identifiera frekventa och karakteristiska semantiska regioner i ordet inbäddande utrymme för att representera den givna korpusen, och ett robust avvikelsemått som är resistent mot bullrigt innehåll i dokument. Experiment utförda på två reala textdatauppsättningar visar att vår metod kan uppnå en upp till 135% förbättring jämfört med baselines när det gäller återkallelse på topp-1% av outlier rankingen.', 'si': 'විස්තාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වෙනවා. ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, වෛද්\u200dය මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා දෙන්න පුළුවන් කොර්පුස් වලින් ලිපිණිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි ප්\u200dරභාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් හා විශේෂයෙන් සැමාන්තික ප්\u200dරදේශයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන් ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය පුළුවන් පද්ධතියෙන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන්', 'ta': 'கோர்ப்ஸில் உள்ள பெரும்பாலானவர்களில் இருந்து பெரும்பாலானவர்களில் இருந்து பெரும்பாலான மாறும் ஒரு ஆவணம். தானாகவே வெளியே உள்ள ஆவணத்தின் அடையாளம் பல பயன்பாடுகளில் மதிப்புள்ளதாக இருக்க முடியும், மருத்துவ பிழைகளுக்கான திரைய இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கார்புஸில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஆவணத்தை வெளியேற்றுவதின் பிரச்சனையை பட கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கோர்ப்ஸை குறிப்பிட வேண்டிய வார்த்தையில் நேரம் மற்றும் எழுத்துருவான பெம்பான்டிக் இடங்களை கண்டறிய ஒரு பொது மாதிரி உருவாக்குகி இரண்டு உண்மையான உலக நிரல் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது எங்கள் முறைமையில் 135% மேல் மேம்பட்ட முன்னேற்றம் அடிப்படை', 'ur': 'ایک دفتر آوریٹر ایک دفتر ہے جو بہت سے سیمانٹیکوں سے ایک کرپوس میں پھیر جاتا ہے۔ دفتر آورٹر کی آٹوٹی شناسایی بہت سی کاربریوں میں مفید ہو سکتی ہے، جیسے سلامتی راکروٹوں کو پزشکی غلطوں کے لئے سکرین کرنا۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک مقررہ کورپوس میں دکھانے والی دکھانے کا مسئلہ پڑھتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک پیدا کرنے والی موڈل پیدا کیا ہے کہ کلمات میں کثرت اور خصوصی سیمانٹی منطقه معلوم کریں جن کی جگہ پیدا ہوئی جگہ کی جگہ ہے، اور ایک مضبوط غیرقابل اندازہ ہے جو دفتروں میں صوت کی موتوں سے مقاومت رکھتا ہے۔ دو حقیقی دنیا کی متن ڈیٹ سٹ پر عمل کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ بنسٹ لین پر 135% زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتا ہے اور ایک% زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu yerdagi hujjat corpusdagi katta koʻpchilikdan semantik tartibi boʻladi. Hujjatni avtomatik ravishda aniqlash qoʻllaniladi, huddi huddi tibbiy xatolik uchun saqlash roʻyxatlarini koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz qo'shishni semantik o'zgartirish muammolarini o'rganamiz. Biz dokumatlarda qismi tarkibini aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchi modelni aniqlash uchun foydalanamiz. Ikki xavfsiz dunyo texnologiya maʼlumotlar tarkibida bajarilgan imtiyozlarni koʻrsatish mumkin, bizning usuli quyidagi chegaralarning yuqoridagi 1% chegarasining yuqoriga 135% bajarishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một tài liệu sống ngoài là một tài liệu mà theo ngữ nghĩa thì trái với hầu hết những thứ trong tập thể. Tự động nhận diện các chứng cớ ngoại phạm có thể có giá trị trong nhiều ứng dụng, như là việc kiểm tra các bệnh án y học. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề về các văn bản theo ngữ nghĩa biến dạng của khai thác theo dạng khái niệm. Chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình mang tính năng để xác định các vùng ngữ pháp thường xuyên và đặc trưng trong các vùng chữ\'biển ghép\'để đại diện cho cơ thể này, và một biện pháp đặc biệt mạnh mẽ chống lại các nội dung ồn ào trong tài liệu. Những thử nghiệm được tiến hành trên hai bộ dữ liệu cấu trúc ở thế giới thực cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể đạt đến 135=.="tiến bộ hơn so với đường cơ bản dựa trên đỉnh-1=" của tỷ lệ tiền tệ hơn.', 'bg': 'Отклонение на документа е документ, който значително се отклонява в семантиката от мнозинството в корпуса. Автоматичното идентифициране на отклонения от документи може да бъде ценно в много приложения, като например проверка на здравните записи за медицински грешки. В настоящата статия изследваме проблема с извличането на семантично отклоняващи се отклонения на документи в даден корпус. Разработваме генеративен модел за идентифициране на чести и характерни семантични региони в думата вграждащо пространство за представяне на дадения корпус, както и стабилна мярка за отклонение, която е устойчива на шумно съдържание в документите. Експериментите, проведени върху два набора текстови данни от реалния свят, показват, че нашият метод може да постигне до 135% подобрение спрямо базовите линии по отношение на изтеглянето в топ-1% от класирането на отклонения.', 'hr': 'Prolaznik dokumenta je dokument koji se značajno odvraća u semantiku od većine u korpusu. Automatska identifikacija proizvođača dokumenta može biti vrijedna u mnogim aplikacijama, poput preglede zdravstvenih podataka za medicinske greške. U ovom papiru, proučavamo problem rudarstva semantički odvajajućih proizvođa ča dokumenta u određenom korpusu. Razvijamo generativni model kako bi identificirali česte i karakteristične semantičke regije u riječi uključujući prostor za predstavljanje određenog korpusa, i jaku mjeru prošlosti koja je otporna na bukovni sadržaj u dokumentima. Eksperimenti provedeni na dva skupina tekstualnih podataka u stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naš metod može postići poboljšanje do 135% nad početnim linijama u smislu sjećanja na najviši 1% izvana reda.', 'da': 'Et dokument outlier er et dokument, der i semantikken afviger væsentligt fra flertallet i et korpus. Automatisk identifikation af dokumentværdier kan være værdifuld i mange applikationer, f.eks. screening af helbredsjournaler for medicinske fejl. I denne artikel undersøger vi problemet med at udvinde semantisk afvigende dokumentafvigelser i et givet korpus. Vi udvikler en generativ model til at identificere hyppige og karakteristiske semantiske regioner i ordet embedding space til at repræsentere det givne korpus, og en robust outsierness måling, der er modstandsdygtig over for støjende indhold i dokumenter. Eksperimenter udført på to tekstdatasæt i den virkelige verden viser, at vores metode kan opnå en forbedring på op til 135% i forhold til baselines med hensyn til tilbagekaldelse på top-1% af outlier rangeringen.', 'nl': "Een document uitschieter is een document dat qua semantiek aanzienlijk afwijkt van de meeste documenten in een corpus. Automatische identificatie van uitschieters van documenten kan waardevol zijn in veel toepassingen, zoals het screenen van gezondheidsdossiers op medische fouten. In dit artikel bestuderen we het probleem van het mining van semantisch afwijkende document uitschieters in een bepaald corpus. We ontwikkelen een generatief model om frequente en karakteristieke semantische regio's in het woord embedding space te identificeren om het gegeven corpus weer te geven, en een robuuste buitenaardsmaatregel die bestand is tegen lawaaierige inhoud in documenten. Experimenten uitgevoerd op twee real-world tekstuele datasets tonen aan dat onze methode een tot 135% verbetering kan bereiken ten opzichte van baselines in termen van recall op top-1% van de outlier ranking.", 'ko': '문서 그룹 값은 의미상 자료 라이브러리의 대다수 문서와 현저한 차이가 있는 문서를 가리킨다.문서 이상 값의 자동 식별은 많은 응용 프로그램에서 매우 가치가 있다. 예를 들어 건강 기록의 의료 오류를 선별하는 것이다.본고는 주어 자료 라이브러리에서 의미가 문서의 이상값에서 벗어나는 문제를 연구했다.우리는 단어가 공간에 박힌 빈번함과 특징적인 의미 구역을 식별하는 생성 모델을 개발하여 주어진 어료 라이브러리를 표시하고 노봉의 이상 값 도량을 개발했다. 이 도량은 문서의 소음 내용에 저항할 수 있다.두 개의 실제 텍스트 데이터 집합에서 진행된 실험에 의하면 우리의 방법은 이상치 상위 1%의 리콜율 방면에서 기준선보다 135% 높아졌다고 한다.', 'de': 'Ein Dokument-Ausreißer ist ein Dokument, das in der Semantik wesentlich von den meisten in einem Korpus abweicht. Die automatische Identifizierung von Dokumentenausläufern kann in vielen Anwendungen wertvoll sein, beispielsweise bei der Überprüfung von Gesundheitsakten auf medizinische Fehler. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir das Problem des Minings semantisch abweichender Dokumentenausläufer in einem gegebenen Korpus. Wir entwickeln ein generatives Modell, um häufige und charakteristische semantische Regionen im Wort Einbettungsraum zu identifizieren, um den gegebenen Korpus darzustellen, und ein robustes Ausreißmaß, das resistent gegen verrauschte Inhalte in Dokumenten ist. Experimente, die an zwei realen Textdatensätzen durchgeführt wurden, zeigen, dass unsere Methode eine bis zu 135% Verbesserung gegenüber Baselines in Bezug auf Rückruf bei Top-1% des Ausreißer-Rankings erreichen kann.', 'id': 'Sebuah dokumen luar adalah dokumen yang pada dasarnya berbeda dalam semantik dari yang kebanyakan dalam korpus. Identifikasi otomatis dari luar dokumen dapat berharga dalam banyak aplikasi, seperti screening catatan kesehatan untuk kesalahan medis. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah penambangan secara semantis mengalihkan dokumen luar dalam tubuh tertentu. Kami mengembangkan model generasi untuk mengidentifikasi daerah semantis yang sering dan karakteristik dalam kata-kata ruang memasukkan untuk mewakili tubuh yang diberikan, dan ukuran keanehan yang kuat yang melawan isi bising dalam dokumen. Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada dua set data tekstual dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa metode kita dapat mencapai penambahan hingga 135% atas garis dasar dalam terma ingatan di atas 1% dari rangkaian luar.', 'fa': 'یک سند خارج کننده یک سند است که زیادی در سیمانتیک از اکثریت\u200cها در یک کورپوس تغییر می\u200cکند. شناسایی خودکار از خارج\u200cکنندگان سند می\u200cتواند در بسیاری از کاربردها ارزش داشته باشد، مثل تحقیق گزارش\u200cهای سلامتی برای اشتباه\u200cهای پزشکی. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل ذخیره\u200cسازی را درس می\u200cکنیم که در یک کاغذ معلوم شده\u200cاند. ما یک مدل ژنترافی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا منطقه\u200cهای ژنترافی و ویژه\u200cهای ژنترافی را شناسایی کنیم در کلمه\u200cای که در فضا وارد می\u200cشود برای نشان دادن کورپوس، و اندازه\u200cای استواری که مقاومت به محتویات صوتی در سند است. تجربه\u200cهایی که در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای متن دنیای واقعی انجام می\u200cدهند نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما می\u200cتواند به حدود 135 درصد بهترین توسط خط\u200cهای پایین به عنوان یادآوری در حد ۱ درصد از مرحله\u200cهای پایین\u200cتر برسد.', 'sw': 'Ndani ya nyaraka ni nyaraka ambazo hubadilika kwa kiasi kikubwa kutoka kwenye nyanja kubwa. Utambulisho wa nyaraka za vijijini unaweza kuwa wa thamani katika matumizi mengi, kama vile kuchapisha rekodi za afya kwa ajili ya makosa ya kitabibu. Katika gazeti hili, tunasoma tatizo la uchimbaji madini yanayobadilika kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya nyaraka kwenye vifaa maalumu. We develop a generative model to identify frequent and characteristic semantic regions in the word embedding space to represent the given corpus, and a robust outlierness measure which is resistant to noisy content in documents.  Majaribio yaliyofanywa katika seti mbili za taarifa za uhalisia duniani yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kufikia maendeleo ya asilimia 135 zaidi ya misingi ya msingi kwa ajili ya kukumbuka kwa asilimia ya juu-1 ya cheo cha juu.', 'tr': 'Sened gaýşartçysy corpusyň köp böleginden öň bellenen senedir. Sened gaýşartçileriniň otomatik identifikaýasy birnäçe uygulamalarda, saýlaw ýalňyşynyň ýalňyşlyklary üçin gözlemek mümkin edip biler. Bu kagyzda, biz semantik bilen taýýarlamak meselesini berilen korpusda çykarýan sened çykyşlaryny okaýarys. Biz dağıtılýan bölgeleri sık we karakteristik semantik bölgeleri belirlemek üçin jenerativ bir modeli geliştirdik. Bu şekilde belgelerde gürrüň gürrüňli bir şekilde duran çözüm ölçüsi. Iki sany dünýäde metin setirlerinde provermeler çykylýan ýagdaýlaryň üstünde 135% diýp ýagdaýlaryň üstünde 1% diýp ýagdaýlaryň üstünde gelişmesini başarar.', 'af': "'n Dokument Uitveerder is 'n dokument wat substantief in semantieke afwyk van die meeste een in 'n korpus. Outomatiese identifikasie van dokument uitgeleerders kan wees waardelik in baie toepassings, soos skerm van gesondige rekorde vir mediese foute. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons die probleem van mining van semantiese afwyking van dokument oortjies in 'n gegewe korpus. Ons ontwikkel 'n genereerbare model om dikwels en karakteristiese semantiese regione te identifiseer in die woord inbeter ruimte om die gegewe korpus te verteenwoordig, en 'n kragtige buitenskap maat wat resistant is na ruis inhoud in dokumente. Experiments conducted on two real-world textual data sets show that our method can achieve an up to 135% improvement over baselines in terms of recall at top- 1% of the outlier ranking.", 'sq': 'Një dokument i jashtëm është një dokument që devijon thelbësisht në semantikë nga shumica në një korpus. Identifikimi automatik i jashtëm të dokumenteve mund të jetë i vlefshëm në shumë aplikime, të tilla si shqyrtimi i regjistrimeve shëndetësore për gabime mjekësore. Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë problem in e minierave që devijojnë semantikisht të jashtëm dokumentet në një korpus të caktuar. Ne zhvillojmë një model gjenerativ për të identifikuar rajone semantike të shpeshta dhe karakteristike në fjalën e ndërtimit të hapësirës për të përfaqësuar trupin e dhënë, dhe një masë të fortë të jashtëzakonshme që është rezistente ndaj përmbajtjeve zhurmuese në dokumente. Eksperimentet e kryera në dy grupe të dhënash tekstuale të botës reale tregojnë se metoda jonë mund të arrijë një përmirësim deri në 135% mbi linjat bazë lidhur me tërheqjen në 1% të rangut më të lartë të jashtëm.', 'bn': 'বাইরে একটি নথি হলো একটি নথি অনেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নথিপত্রের পরিচিতি মূল্যবান, যেমন চিকিৎসার ভুলের জন্য স্বাস্থ্য রেকর্ড পর্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি প্রদত্ত কোর্পাসের মধ্যে সেমান্টিক্যাল ভিন্ন নথিগুলোকে বিভ্রান্ত করার সমস্যা পড়ি। কোর্পাসের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য শব্দে প্রায়শ এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যিক সেম্যান্টিক অঞ্চলের চিহ্নিত করার জন্য আমরা একটি জেনারেটিভ মডেল তৈরি করেছি এবং নথিপত্র দুই পৃথিবীর টেক্সচুয়াল ডাটাটা সেটে অনুষ্ঠিত পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বেসেলাইনের মাধ্যমে ১৩৫% উন্নতি অর্জন করতে পারে, যেখানে বে', 'am': 'A document outlier is a document that substantially deviates in semantics from the majority ones in a corpus.  ከሰነድ ውጪዎች የሰነድ ማረጋገጫ በብዙ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ እንደ እስክሪን ጤናዊ ሳጥን ለመፈወስ ስህተት የሚሞላ ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ በተሰጠው ኮርፓስ ውስጥ የሰነዱን አነስተኛዊ ግንኙነት አነስተዋለን፡፡ We develop a generative model to identify frequent and characteristic semantic regions in the word embedding space to represent the given corpus, and a robust outlierness measure which is resistant to noisy content in documents.  በሁለት እውነተኛ ዓለም የቴክስቲክ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ማዕከላዊ ደረጃዎች ላይ-1 በመቶ ማሳሰቢያ ላይ የሚደረገውን የሥርዓታችን ማድረግ 135 በመቶ ያሳያል፡፡', 'ca': 'Un document exterior és un document que desvia substancialment en semàntica de la majoria d\'un cos. Automatic identification of document outliers can be valuable in many applications, such as screening health records for medical mistakes.  In this paper, we study the problem of mining semantically deviating document outliers in a given corpus.  Desenvolvem un model generador per identificar regions semàntiques freqüents i característiques en la paraula "incorporar espai" per representar el cos dado, i una mesura robust a d\'estrangeresa resistent al contingut ruidosos dels documents. Els experiments fets en dos conjunts de dades textuals del món real mostren que el nostre mètode pot aconseguir una millora del 135% en relació amb les línies de base en termes de recuperació al 1% superior de la puntuació externa.', 'bs': 'Prolaznik dokumenta je dokument koji se značajno odvraća u semantiku od većine u korpusu. Automatska identifikacija proizvođača dokumenta može biti vrijedna u mnogim aplikacijama, poput preglede zdravstvenih podataka za medicinske greške. U ovom papiru, proučavamo problem rudarstva semantički odvajajućih proizvođa ča dokumenta u određenom korpusu. Razvijamo generativni model da identifikujemo česte i karakteristične semantičke regije u rijeci koja se uključuje prostor za predstavljanje određenog korpusa, i jaku mjeru prošlosti koja je otporna na bukovni sadržaj u dokumentima. Eksperimenti provedeni na dva skupina tekstualnih podataka u stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naš metod može postići poboljšanje do 135% iznad početnih linija u smislu sjećanja na najviši 1% od višeg reda.', 'az': 'Bütün məlumatları korpus içindəki çoxluğundan semantik olaraq dəyişən bir belədir. Təbbi xətalarının səviyyəsi üçün sağlığın kayıtlarını təsdiqləmək kimi, bir çox proqramlarda münasibətli olar. Bu kağızda, minik məlumatlarının semantik olaraq belə bir korpus içində dəyişiklik göstəricilərinin problemini öyrənirik. Biz çox sıxıntılı və xüsusiyyətli semantik bölgelerini belə təşkil edirik ki, belə yazılmış korpusu göstərmək üçün yerləşdirilmiş bölgeler və belələrdə səs içərisində müəyyən edilən güclü təşkil ölçüsü. İki həqiqi dünyada təhsil verilən təcrübələrdə işlədilən təcrübələrə göstərilir ki, bizim metodumuzun həqiqi səhifələrin üstündə 1%-dən artıq 135%-dən artıq düzəltməsini göstərir.', 'cs': 'Odlehlý dokument je dokument, který se sémanticky výrazně liší od většiny dokumentů v korpusu. Automatická identifikace odlehlých hodnot dokladů může být cenná v mnoha aplikacích, jako je kontrola zdravotních záznamů na lékařské chyby. V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou těžby sémanticky odchylných odlehlých hodnot dokumentů v daném korpusu. Vyvíjíme generativní model pro identifikaci častých a charakteristických sémantických oblastí ve slovním vkládacím prostoru pro reprezentaci daného korpusu a robustní měřítko odlehlosti odolné vůči hlučnému obsahu dokumentů. Experimenty provedené na dvou skutečných textových datových sadách ukazují, že naše metoda může dosáhnout až 135% zlepšení oproti základním liniím, pokud jde o odvolání na nejvyšší jedno% hodnocení odlehlých hodnocení.', 'et': 'Dokumendi võõrv on dokument, mis erineb semantiliselt korpuse enamusest. Dokumentide võõrväärtuste automaatne tuvastamine võib olla väärtuslik paljudes rakendustes, näiteks terviseandmete läbivaatamisel meditsiiniliste vigade suhtes. Käesolevas töös uurime semantiliselt kõrvalekalduvate dokumentide kaevandamise probleemi antud korpuses. Töötame välja generatiivse mudeli, et tuvastada sagedasi ja iseloomulikke semantilisi piirkondi sõnas, mis sisaldavad ruumi antud korpuse esindamiseks, ning tugeva võrdluse mõõtme, mis on vastupidav mürakale sisule dokumentides. Kahe reaalmaailma tekstikogumiga läbi viidud eksperimendid näitavad, et meie meetod võib saavutada kuni 135% paremuse võrreldes lähtejoontega tagasikutsumise osas võrreldes 1% võõrväärtuste esikohal.', 'hy': 'Տեսագրի արտահայտությունը մի փաստաթղթի է, որը հիմնականում շեղում է սեմանտիկայում մարմնի մեծամասնությունից: Շատ ծրագրերում, ինչպիսիք են բժշկական սխալների առողջապահության փաստաթղթերի ստուգելը, կարող է արժեքավոր լինել փաստաթղթերի արտահայտությունը: In this paper, we study the problem of mining semantically deviating document outliers in a given corpus.  We develop a generative model to identify frequent and characteristic semantic regions in the word embedding space to represent the given corpus, and a robust outlierness measure which is resistant to noisy content in documents.  Experiments conducted on two real-world textual data sets show that our method can achieve an up to 135% improvement over baselines in terms of recall at top-1% of the outlier ranking.', 'fi': 'Dokumentin poikkeama on dokumentti, joka poikkeaa semantiikassa merkittävästi korpusen enemmistöstä. Asiakirjojen poikkeamien automaattinen tunnistaminen voi olla arvokasta monissa sovelluksissa, kuten terveystietojen seulonnassa lääketieteellisten virheiden varalta. Tässä työssä tutkitaan semanttisesti poikkeavien asiakirjojen louhinnan ongelmaa tietyssä korpusessa. Kehitämme generatiivisen mallin, jolla tunnistetaan usein esiintyviä ja tyypillisiä semanttisia alueita sanan upotustilassa edustamaan tiettyä korpusta, sekä vahvan outliersiteettimittarin, joka kestää dokumenttien meluisaa sisältöä. Kahdella reaalimaailman tekstiaineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että menetelmällämme voidaan saavuttaa jopa 135 prosentin parannus perusviivoista verrattuna takaisinkutsun osalta ylimmässä 1 prosentissa outlier-rankingista.', 'jv': 'Una dokumen sing paling kelas dokumen sing dumadhi semanti koyo ngono nggawe barang dumadhi drawable-action Nang mapun iki, kita jewulang perbudhakan kanggo ngilangno wektu sematik nggawe Dokumen kuwi duluran kanggo ngilangno durung. Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing generic kanggo nambah ingkang dipun-ingkang karo semanti sing dumadhi iki ning awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan ingkang dipun-ingkang dipun wae, lan kuwi nggawe sistem sing gak dhéwé, kuwi jenis hukum sing bisa pasar awak dhéwé, ning awak dhéwé kuwi ngga Gesulih perusahaan langkung sampeyan iki dadi textual sing nyimpen iki dadi, kita ngubah awak dhéwé iso nggawe barang pengaturan suaktu kanggo tah perusahaan sugih perusahaan sugih sabên lansangan bakal terus sabên langkung sampeyan.', 'ha': "Wani takardar da ke samar wata takardar ta tsakiya mai tsawo cikin semanti daga mafi yawanci cikin wata nau'in. Shiryoyin abun farat ɗaya na iya zama masu ƙayyade a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu yawa, kamar karatun fuskar kwamfyuta wa makosa masu shida. Ga wannan takardan, Munã karanta matsalar masu yin ciri da takardar aiki na ƙaranci da ke cikin wata korus. Tuna buɗe wani motsi na daban-daban dõmin Mu gane regional na semanti mai mara da sauri cikin filin da za'a fito a cikin filin da za'a nuna nau'in da aka bã shi, da kuma wani ma'auni wanda bã ya iya motsa ga ƙanshi wanda ke cikin takardar. Tajarakin da aka samar a kan data masu rubutun biyu masu halin-world, yana nũna cewa metodenmu yana iya ƙara zuwa 135% wa'asalin da aka kumbar da asilimin-1 da ke saman randin.", 'he': 'מסמך מחוץ למסמך הוא מסמך ששונה באופן משמעותי בסמנטיקה מרוב אלה בקורפוס. זיהוי אוטומטי של מחוץ למסמכים יכול להיות ערך בהפעולות רבות, כמו בדיקת רשומות בריאות לטעויות רפואיות. בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים את הבעיה של הכרייה סמנטית שונה מסמכים מחוץ לקורפוס מסוים. אנחנו מפתחים דוגמא דולרית לזהות אזורים סמנטיים תדירים ומאופיינים במילה "פיתוח חלל" כדי לייצג את הקורפוס הנתון, ומדידת פריצות חזקה שמתנגדת לתוכן רעש במסמכים. Experiments conducted on two real-world textual data sets show that our method can achieve an up to 135% improvement over baselines in terms of recall at top-1% of the outlier ranking.', 'sk': 'Oddaljenost dokumenta je dokument, ki v semantiki bistveno odstopa od večinskih v korpusu. Samodejna identifikacija odstopanj dokumentov je lahko dragocena v številnih aplikacijah, kot je pregled zdravstvenih evidenc za medicinske napake. V prispevku preučujemo problem rudarjenja semantično odstopajočih dokumentov v danem korpusu. Razvijamo generativni model za identifikacijo pogostih in značilnih semantičnih regij v besedi, ki vključujejo prostor za predstavitev danega korpusa, ter robustno merilo odpornosti na hrupno vsebino v dokumentih. Eksperimenti, izvedeni na dveh realnih naborih besedilnih podatkov, kažejo, da lahko naša metoda doseže do 135-odstotno izboljšanje v primerjavi z izhodiščnimi vrsticami v smislu odpoklica na najboljših 1-odstotni lestvici.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འགུལ་གྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མང་ཙམ་ནང་ལ་རིན་ཐང་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བཅས་ཀྱིས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་ཁང་ཅ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྣམ་པ་ཚོགས་བཅད་དགོས་པའི་བར་སྟོང་ནང་དུ་བཀོད་བཞག་ཡོད་པའ ལག་ལེན་འཚོལ་བ་དང་ཐིག་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གྲངས་ཀ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་འགྲོ་སྟངས་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་གཞན་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Detecting and Explaining Causes From Text For a Time Series Event', 'es': 'Detección y explicación de las causas del texto de un evento de serie temporal', 'fr': "Détecter et expliquer les causes à partir d'un texte pour un événement de série chronologique", 'ar': 'كشف وشرح الأسباب من النص لحدث السلاسل الزمنية', 'pt': 'Detectando e explicando as causas do texto para um evento de série temporal', 'ja': '時系列イベントのためのテキストからの原因の検出と説明', 'hi': 'किसी समय श्रृंखला ईवेंट के लिए पाठ से कारणों का पता लगाना और समझाना', 'ru': 'Выявление и объяснение причин из текста для события временного ряда', 'zh': '从文本中检释时序事故也', 'ga': 'Cúiseanna Ó Téacs a Bhrath agus a Mhíniú Le hAghaidh Ócáid Amshraith', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση και εξήγηση αιτιών από κείμενο για ένα συμβάν χρονικής σειράς', 'hu': 'Idősoros események szövegének okainak észlelése és magyarázata', 'mk': 'Детектирање и објаснување на причините од текстот за временски сериски настан', 'kk': 'Мәтіннен келесі уақыт тізімінің оқиғасын табу мен түсіндіру себептері', 'it': 'Rilevamento e spiegazione delle cause del testo per un evento di serie temporale', 'lt': 'Teksto priežasčių nustatymas ir paaiškinimas laiko eilutės įvykiui', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni u l-ispjegazzjoni tal-kawżi mit-test għal avveniment ta’ serje ta’ ħin', 'ml': 'വാചകത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും വ്യക്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'ms': 'Detecting and Explaining Causes From Text For a Time Series Event', 'mn': 'Хугацааны дараагийн үйл явдлын текстээс шалтгаан тогтоох болон тодорхойлох', 'no': 'Oppdag og utforskar grunnar frå teksten for ein tidseringshending', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie i wyjaśnianie przyczyn tekstu dla zdarzenia serii czasowej', 'ro': 'Detectarea și explicarea cauzelor din text pentru un eveniment de serie de timp', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje i objašnjavanje uzroka teksta za događaj serije vremena', 'si': 'වෙලාව සිරීම් සැකසුම් සඳහා පරික්ෂණය සහ විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Detecting and Explaining Causes From Text For a Time Series Event', 'sv': 'Identifiera och förklara orsaker till text för en tidsseriehändelse', 'ta': 'ஒரு நேர தொடர்ந்து நிகழ்வுக்கு உரையிலிருந்து காரணங்களை கண்டுபிடி', 'ur': 'ایک وقت سیریر ایڈمنٹ کے لئے پاکستان سے سبب شناسایی اور کھول رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện và giải thích nguyên nhân từ văn bản cho sự kiện chuỗi thời gian', 'nl': 'Oorzaken detecteren en uitleggen van tekst voor een tijdreeksevenement', 'da': 'Registrering og forklaring af årsager fra tekst til en tidsseriebegivenhed', 'bg': 'Откриване и обясняване на причини от текст за събитие от времева серия', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje i objašnjavanje uzroka teksta za događaj serije vremena', 'id': 'Mengeteksi dan menjelaskan penyebab Dari Teks Untuk Peristiwa Seri Waktu', 'ko': '시간 시퀀스 이벤트의 텍스트에서 원인 탐지 및 해석', 'de': 'Erkennen und Erklären von Ursachen aus Text für ein Zeitreihenereignis', 'fa': 'شناسایی و توضیح دلایل از متن برای یک اتفاق مجموعه زمانی', 'tr': 'Metin Senediň Senediň Sebepleri Aňlap we Keşfedilýär', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Duke zbuluar dhe shpjeguar shkaqet nga teksti për një ngjarje serie kohore', 'sw': 'Kugundua na Kuelezea Sababu Kutoka Matambo kwa Tukio la Muda', 'am': 'Text For a time Series Event', 'az': 'Bir vaxt seriyasńĪ olaraq m…ôtnd…ôn s…ôb…ôbl…ôri keŇüif v…ô aydńĪnlaŇüdńĪrma', 'bn': 'টেক্সট থেকে ক্যাফেস সনাক্ত করা এবং ব্যাখ্যা করা হচ্ছে একটি সময় সিরিয়ের অনুষ্ঠানের জন্য', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje i objašnjavanje uzroka teksta za događaj serije vremena', 'ca': 'Detectar i explicar les causes del text durant un eventde sèrie temporal', 'et': 'Ajaseeria sündmuse tekstist põhjuste tuvastamine ja selgitamine', 'cs': 'Detekce a vysvětlení příčin textu pro událost časové řady', 'fi': 'Tekstistä johtuvien syiden tunnistaminen ja selittäminen aikasarjatapahtumassa', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje in pojasnjevanje vzrokov iz besedila za dogodek časovne serije', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'גילוי ומסביר סיבות מהטקסט לאירוע סדרת זמן', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡི་གེ་ཚིག་དང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་འབྱུང་བའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་བཙལ་བ'}
{'en': 'Explaining underlying causes or effects about events is a challenging but valuable task. We define a novel problem of generating explanations of a time series event by (1) searching cause and effect relationships of the time series with textual data and (2) constructing a connecting chain between them to generate an explanation. To detect causal features from text, we propose a novel method based on the Granger causality of time series between features extracted from text such as N-grams, topics, sentiments, and their composition. The generation of the sequence of causal entities requires a commonsense causative knowledge base with efficient reasoning. To ensure good interpretability and appropriate lexical usage we combine symbolic and neural representations, using a neural reasoning algorithm trained on commonsense causal tuples to predict the next cause step. Our quantitative and human analysis show empirical evidence that our method successfully extracts meaningful causality relationships between time series with textual features and generates appropriate explanation between them.', 'ar': 'يعد شرح الأسباب أو التأثيرات الأساسية للأحداث مهمة صعبة ولكنها قيّمة. نحدد مشكلة جديدة لتوليد تفسيرات لحدث السلاسل الزمنية من خلال (1) البحث عن علاقات السبب والنتيجة للسلسلة الزمنية مع البيانات النصية و (2) إنشاء سلسلة ربط بينهما لتوليد تفسير. لاكتشاف السمات السببية من النص ، نقترح طريقة جديدة تعتمد على السببية جرانجر للسلاسل الزمنية بين السمات المستخرجة من النص مثل N-grams والموضوعات والمشاعر وتكوينها. يتطلب إنشاء تسلسل الكيانات السببية قاعدة معرفة سببية منطقية مع تفكير فعال. لضمان قابلية تفسير جيدة واستخدام معجمي مناسب ، نجمع بين التمثيلات الرمزية والعصبية ، باستخدام خوارزمية التفكير العصبي المدربة على مجموعات سببية منطقية للتنبؤ بخطوة السبب التالية. يُظهر تحليلنا الكمي والبشري دليلًا تجريبيًا على أن طريقتنا تستخلص بنجاح علاقات سببية ذات مغزى بين السلاسل الزمنية ذات السمات النصية وتنتج تفسيرًا مناسبًا فيما بينها.', 'pt': 'Explicar causas ou efeitos subjacentes sobre eventos é uma tarefa desafiadora, mas valiosa. Definimos um novo problema de gerar explicações de um evento de série temporal (1) procurando relações de causa e efeito da série temporal com dados textuais e (2) construindo uma cadeia de conexão entre eles para gerar uma explicação. Para detectar características causais do texto, propomos um novo método baseado na causalidade de Granger de séries temporais entre características extraídas do texto, como N-grams, tópicos, sentimentos e sua composição. A geração da sequência de entidades causais requer uma base de conhecimento causativa de senso comum com raciocínio eficiente. Para garantir uma boa interpretabilidade e uso lexical apropriado, combinamos representações simbólicas e neurais, usando um algoritmo de raciocínio neural treinado em tuplas causais de senso comum para prever o próximo passo da causa. Nossas análises quantitativas e humanas mostram evidências empíricas de que nosso método extrai com sucesso relações de causalidade significativas entre séries temporais com recursos textuais e gera explicação apropriada entre elas.', 'es': 'Explicar las causas o los efectos subyacentes de los eventos es una tarea difícil pero valiosa. Definimos un problema novedoso de generar explicaciones de un evento de serie temporal mediante (1) la búsqueda de las relaciones de causa y efecto de la serie temporal con datos textuales y (2) la construcción de una cadena de conexión entre ellos para generar una explicación. Para detectar las características causales del texto, proponemos un método novedoso basado en la causalidad de Granger de las series temporales entre las características extraídas del texto, como N-gramas, temas, sentimientos y su composición. La generación de la secuencia de entidades causales requiere una base de conocimiento causal de sentido común con un razonamiento eficiente. Para garantizar una buena interpretabilidad y un uso léxico adecuado, combinamos representaciones simbólicas y neuronales, utilizando un algoritmo de razonamiento neuronal entrenado en tuplas causales de sentido común para predecir el siguiente paso de causa. Nuestros análisis cuantitativos y humanos muestran evidencia empírica de que nuestro método extrae con éxito relaciones de causalidad significativas entre series temporales con características textuales y genera una explicación adecuada entre ellas.', 'fr': "Expliquer les causes ou les effets sous-jacents des événements est une tâche difficile mais précieuse. Nous définissons un nouveau problème de génération d'explications d'un événement de série chronologique en (1) recherchant les relations de cause à effet de la série chronologique avec des données textuelles et (2) en construisant une chaîne de connexion entre elles pour générer une explication. Pour détecter les caractéristiques causales du texte, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode basée sur la causalité de Granger des séries temporelles entre des caractéristiques extraites du texte telles que des N-grammes, des sujets, des sentiments et leur composition. La génération de la séquence d'entités causales nécessite une base de connaissances causales de bon sens assortie d'un raisonnement efficace. Pour garantir une bonne interprétabilité et une utilisation lexicale appropriée, nous combinons des représentations symboliques et neuronales, à l'aide d'un algorithme de raisonnement neuronal formé sur des tuples causaux de bon sens pour prédire l'étape suivante de la cause. Notre analyse quantitative et humaine montre des preuves empiriques que notre méthode réussit à extraire des relations de causalité significatives entre des séries temporelles avec des caractéristiques textuelles et à générer une explication appropriée entre elles.", 'hi': 'घटनाओं के बारे में अंतर्निहित कारणों या प्रभावों की व्याख्या करना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण लेकिन मूल्यवान कार्य है। हम एक समय श्रृंखला घटना के स्पष्टीकरण उत्पन्न करने की एक उपन्यास समस्या को परिभाषित करते हैं (1) पाठ्य डेटा के साथ समय श्रृंखला के कारण और प्रभाव संबंधों की खोज और (2) एक स्पष्टीकरण उत्पन्न करने के लिए उनके बीच एक कनेक्टिंग श्रृंखला का निर्माण करना। पाठ से कारण सुविधाओं का पता लगाने के लिए, हम एन-ग्राम, विषयों, भावनाओं और उनकी संरचना जैसे पाठ से निकाली गई सुविधाओं के बीच समय श्रृंखला के ग्रेंजर कारण के आधार पर एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। कारण संस्थाओं के अनुक्रम की पीढ़ी को कुशल तर्क के साथ एक सामान्य ज्ञान प्रेरक ज्ञान आधार की आवश्यकता होती है। अच्छी व्याख्या और उचित लेक्सिकल उपयोग सुनिश्चित करने के लिए हम अगले कारण चरण की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए कॉमनसेंस कारण ट्यूपल्स पर प्रशिक्षित एक तंत्रिका तर्क एल्गोरिथ्म का उपयोग करके प्रतीकात्मक और तंत्रिका प्रतिनिधित्व को जोड़ते हैं। हमारे मात्रात्मक और मानव विश्लेषण से अनुभवजन्य सबूत पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि सफलतापूर्वक पाठ्य विशेषताओं के साथ समय श्रृंखला के बीच सार्थक कार्य-कारण संबंधों को निकालती है और उनके बीच उचित स्पष्टीकरण उत्पन्न करती है।', 'ja': 'イベントに関する根本的な原因や影響を説明することは、困難でありながら価値のある作業です。 時系列事象の説明を生成する新たな問題を、(1)テキストデータを用いて時系列の因果関係を検索することと、(2)それらの間に連鎖を構築して説明を生成することによって定義する。 テキストから因果的特徴を検出するために、N - gram、トピック、感情、およびそれらの構成などのテキストから抽出された特徴間の時系列のグレンジャー因果性に基づいた新規の方法を提案する。 因果的実体のシーケンスの生成には、効率的な推論を伴う共通の因果的知識ベースが必要である。 良好な解釈可能性と適切な語彙使用を確保するために、私たちは、次の原因ステップを予測するために、共通の因果関係タプルでトレーニングされたニューラル推論アルゴリズムを使用して、記号的表現とニューラル表現を組み合わせます。 私たちの定量的およびヒューマン分析は、私たちの方法がテキスト機能を持つ時系列間の有意義な因果関係をうまく抽出し、それらの間に適切な説明を生成するという経験的証拠を示しています。', 'zh': '说事之本,一有挑战性而有直者也。 吾定义了一个新颖,即因(1)用文本数搜索时间序列的因果关系,及(2)在其间构连链以成解释以成时序事的解释。 检文本之因果特征,立一本于文本(如N-grams主题,情成)序者Granger因果关系新法也。 因果实之生,须有理常识性因果知识库。 以保良可解释性适词汇用法,合符号于神经,用常识性因果元组上训练神经推理算法以卜之。 吾定量与人分析表明,吾道成取文本有时序之间有义因果关系,而生其解释。', 'ru': 'Объяснение основных причин или последствий событий является сложной, но ценной задачей. Определяем новую задачу генерации объяснений события временного ряда путем (1) поиска причинно-следственных связей временного ряда с текстовыми данными и (2) построения связующей цепи между ними для генерации объяснения. Чтобы обнаружить причинно-следственные связи из текста, мы предлагаем новый метод, основанный на причинно-следственной связи Грейнджера временных рядов между признаками, извлеченными из текста, такими как N-граммы, темы, чувства и их состав. Генерация последовательности причинно-следственных связей требует наличия общепринятой базы причинно-следственных знаний с эффективной аргументацией. Для обеспечения хорошей интерпретируемости и соответствующего лексического использования мы объединяем символические и нейронные представления, используя алгоритм нейронного мышления, обученный на каузальных кортежах здравого смысла, чтобы предсказать следующий шаг причины. Наш количественный и человеческий анализ показывает эмпирические доказательства того, что наш метод успешно извлекает значимые причинно-следственные связи между временными рядами с текстовыми признаками и генерирует соответствующее объяснение между ними.', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach ach luachmhar é bunchúiseanna nó éifeachtaí imeachtaí a mhíniú. Sainmhínímid fadhb nua maidir le míniúcháin a ghiniúint ar imeacht sraith ama trí (1) caidreamh cúise agus éifeacht na sraithe ama a chuardach le sonraí téacsúla agus (2) slabhra ceangail a thógáil eatarthu chun míniú a ghiniúint. Chun gnéithe cúiseacha a bhrath ó théacs, molaimid modh úrnua bunaithe ar shraith ama cúisíochta Granger idir gnéithe a bhaintear as téacs mar N-gram, topaicí, mothúcháin, agus a gcomhdhéanamh. Chun seicheamh na n-eintiteas cúisíoch a ghiniúint, tá gá le bonn eolais cúisíoch tuisceana agus réasúnaíocht éifeachtach. Chun inléirmhíniú maith agus úsáid chuí foclóireachta a chinntiú cuirimid léiriúcháin siombalacha agus néaracha le chéile, ag baint úsáide as algartam réasúnaíochta néaracha atá oilte ar thuplaí cúiseacha le tuiscint choitianta chun an chéad chéim eile le cúis a thuar. Léiríonn ár n-anailís chainníochtúil agus daonna fianaise eimpíreach go n-éiríonn lenár modh gaolmhaireachtaí cúisíochta brí a bhaint amach idir sraitheanna ama le gnéithe téacsúla agus go gcruthaíonn sé míniú cuí eatarthu.', 'el': 'Η εξήγηση των υποκείμενων αιτιών ή επιπτώσεων σχετικά με τα γεγονότα είναι μια πρόκληση αλλά πολύτιμη εργασία. Καθορίζουμε ένα νέο πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας επεξηγήσεων ενός γεγονότος χρονοσειράς με (1) την αναζήτηση σχέσεων αιτίας και αποτελέσματος της χρονοσειράς με δεδομένα κειμένου και (2) την κατασκευή μιας αλυσίδας σύνδεσης μεταξύ τους για τη δημιουργία μιας εξήγησης. Για την ανίχνευση αιτιακών χαρακτηριστικών από κείμενο, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο βασισμένη στην αιτιώδη συνάφεια των χρονοσειρών μεταξύ χαρακτηριστικών που εξάγονται από κείμενο όπως Ν-γραφήματα, θέματα, συναισθήματα και τη σύνθεσή τους. Η δημιουργία της αλληλουχίας αιτιακών οντοτήτων απαιτεί μια λογική αιτιολογική βάση γνώσεων με αποτελεσματική συλλογιστική. Για να εξασφαλιστεί καλή ερμηνεία και κατάλληλη λεξική χρήση συνδυάζουμε συμβολικές και νευρωνικές αναπαραστάσεις, χρησιμοποιώντας έναν αλγόριθμο νευρωνικής λογικής εκπαιδευμένο σε αιτιολογικές τουαλέτες κοινής λογικής για να προβλέψουμε το επόμενο βήμα αιτίας. Η ποσοτική και ανθρώπινη ανάλυση μας δείχνει εμπειρικά στοιχεία ότι η μέθοδος μας εξάγει επιτυχώς ουσιαστικές αιτιώδεις σχέσεις μεταξύ χρονοσειρών με κειμενικά χαρακτηριστικά και παράγει την κατάλληλη εξήγηση μεταξύ τους.', 'hu': 'Az eseményekkel kapcsolatos okok és hatások magyarázata kihívást jelentő, de értékes feladat. Az idősoros események magyarázatának generálásának új problémáját definiáljuk (1) az idősorok ok-okozati összefüggéseinek keresésével szöveges adatokkal és (2) egy összekötő lánc kialakításával, hogy magyarázatot generáljunk. Az okozati jellemzők felismerésére a szövegből egy új módszert javasolunk, amely az idősorok Granger okozati összefüggésén alapul a szövegből kivont jellemzők között, mint például N-gramm, témák, érzelmek és azok összetétele. Az okozati entitások sorozatának létrehozása hatékony érveléssel ellátott, közértelmes okozati tudásbázist igényel. A jó értelmezhetőség és a megfelelő lexikális használat biztosítása érdekében kombináljuk a szimbolikus és neurális reprezentációkat, egy közértelmű okozati tupletekre képzett neurális érvelési algoritmust használva, hogy megjósoljuk a következő ok lépést. Mennyiségi és emberi elemzésünk empirikus bizonyítékot mutat arra, hogy módszerünk sikeresen kivonja a szöveges jellemzőkkel rendelkező idősorok közötti értelmes okozati összefüggéseket és megfelelő magyarázatot generál közöttük.', 'ka': 'მოვლენების შესახებ მიზეზები ან ეფექტიები განახსნა შესაძლებელია, მაგრამ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი დავალება. ჩვენ განსაზღვრებთ პრობლემა, რომელიც წარმოიქმნა დრო სერიის მოვლენების განახლებების შექმნა (1) საძებნა მიზეზი და ეფექტის შესახებების შესახებ, რომელიც ტექსტულ მონაცემებით და (2) დაკავშირებული კ ტექსტიდან მიზეზი ფუნქციების განახლებისთვის, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ პრომენტის მეტი, რომელიც გრანგერის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენება ტექსტიდან გამოკლექტილი ფუ წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების შემდეგ უნდა გამოსახულებელი წარმოდგენების უფრო გამოსახულებელი მეცნიერების ბაზა, რომელიც ეფექტი ჩვენ სიმბოლოგიური და ნეიროლური გამოყენებების გამოყენება, ნეიროლური პარამენტიური ალგორიტიმის გამოყენება, რომელიც საუბოლოო წარმოდგენების მიზეზი რამდენიმე წარმოდგენების გადა ჩვენი კოლუტატიური და ადამიანის ანალიზაცია გამოჩვენება ემპერიკური წარმოდგენება, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი წარმოდგენელად გამოყენებს მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რო', 'kk': 'Оқиғалар туралы негізгі себептерді немесе эффекттерді түсініп беру - әсер ететін, бірақ маңызды тапсырма. Біз уақыт сериясының түсініктемелерін жасау мәселесін (1) мәтін деректері мен (2) арасындағы түсініктемелерді жасау үшін уақыт сериясының себептері мен эффекттер қатынасын жасау үшін анықтаймыз. Мәтіннен негізгі мүмкіндіктерді табу үшін, N- граммалар, тақырыптар, сезімдер және олардың композициясы секілді мәтіннен таратылған мүмкіндіктер арасындағы Granger сериясының негізінде жаңа әдісін таңдаймыз Негізгі бірліктердің реттегін құру үшін көпшілікті білім негізі ефективті сезімдердің негізі керек. Жақсы түсініктемесін және қасиетті лексикалық қолдануды қамтамасыз үшін, біз символдық және невралдық түсініктемелерді біріктіреміз, көпшілікті түсініктеме алгоритмі көпшілікті Біздің санативтік және адамдардың анализиясыз текстік мүмкіндіктерімен уақыт сериясының арасындағы маңызды себептердің қатынасын сәтті түсіндіру және оның арасындағы дұрыс түсініктемелерд', 'it': 'Spiegare le cause o gli effetti sottostanti degli eventi è un compito impegnativo ma prezioso. Definiamo un nuovo problema di generare spiegazioni di un evento di serie temporali (1) cercando relazioni causa ed effetto della serie temporale con dati testuali e (2) costruendo una catena di collegamento tra di loro per generare una spiegazione. Per rilevare le caratteristiche causali dal testo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo basato sulla causalità Granger delle serie temporali tra caratteristiche estratte dal testo come N-grammi, argomenti, sentimenti e la loro composizione. La generazione della sequenza di entità causali richiede una base di conoscenza causale comune con ragionamento efficiente. Per garantire una buona interpretabilità e un uso lessicale appropriato combiniamo rappresentazioni simboliche e neurali, utilizzando un algoritmo di ragionamento neurale addestrato su tuples causali di buon senso per prevedere il prossimo passo causa. La nostra analisi quantitativa e umana mostra prove empiriche che il nostro metodo estrae con successo significative relazioni di causalità tra serie temporali con caratteristiche testuali e genera una spiegazione appropriata tra loro.', 'lt': 'Pagrindinių priežasčių ar poveikio įvykiams paaiškinimas yra sudėtinga, bet vertinga užduotis. Mes apibrėžiame naują problem ą, susijusią su laiko serijos įvykio paaiškinimų sukūrimu (1) paieškos priežastimi ir poveikiu laiko serijos ryšiais su tekstiniais duomenimis ir (2) jų jungimo grandinės sukūrimu, kad būtų galima paaiškinti. Siekiant nustatyti priežastinius požymius iš teksto, siūlome naują metodą, pagrįstą Grangerio priežastiniu laiko eilutės ryšiu tarp požymių, ištrauktų iš teksto, pvz., N-gramų, temų, jausmų ir jų sudėties. Kad būtų sukurta priežastinių subjektų seka, reikia bendros priežastinių žinių bazės, kurioje būtų veiksmingai pagrįsta. To ensure good interpretability and appropriate lexical usage we combine symbolic and neural representations, using a neural reasoning algorithm trained on commonsense causal tuples to predict the next cause step.  Mūsų kiekybinė ir žmogaus analizė rodo empirinius įrodymus, kad mūsų metodas sėkmingai išgauna reikšmingus priežastinius santykius tarp laiko eilučių ir tekstinių savybių ir sukuria tinkamą jų paaiškinimą.', 'mk': 'Explaining underlying causes or effects about events is a challenging but valuable task.  Ние дефинираме нов проблем со генерирање објаснувања за временски сериски настан со (1) пребарување на причината и ефектот врски на временската серија со текстуални податоци и (2) изградба на ланец на поврзување помеѓу нив за генерирање објаснување. За да ги откриеме причинните карактеристики од текстот, предложуваме нов метод базиран на причината на временската серија Гренџер помеѓу карактеристиките извадени од текст како што се N-грами, теми, чувства и нивната композиција. Генерацијата на секвенцијата на причинските ентитети бара заедничка причинска база на знаење со ефикасно размислување. За да обезбедиме добра интерпретабилност и соодветна лексикална употреба ние комбинираме симболички и нервни претставувања, користејќи нервен размислувачки алгоритм обучен на заеднички причинни двојки за да го предвидеме следниот чекор на причината. Нашата квантитивна и човечка анализа покажува емпирички докази дека нашиот метод успешно извлекува значајни причински односи помеѓу временските серии со текстуални карактеристики и генерира соодветно објаснување помеѓу нив.', 'mt': 'L-ispjegazzjoni tal-kawżi jew l-effetti sottostanti dwar l-avvenimenti hija kompitu ta’ sfida iżda ta’ valur. Aħna niddefinixxu problem a ġdida li niġġeneraw spjegazzjonijiet ta’ avveniment tas-serje taż-żmien permezz ta’ (1) tfittxija ta’ relazzjonijiet ta’ kawża u effett tas-serje taż-żmien mad-dejta testwali u (2) il-bini ta’ katina ta’ konnessjoni bejniethom biex niġġeneraw spjegazzjoni. Biex jinstabu karatteristiċi kawżali mit-test, nipproponu metodu ġdid ibbażat fuq il-kawżalità Granger tas-serje taż-żmien bejn karatteristiċi estratti mit-test bħal N-grammi, suġġetti, sensazzjonijiet, u l-kompożizzjoni tagħhom. Il-ġenerazzjoni tas-sekwenza ta’ entitajiet kawżali teħtieġ bażi ta’ għarfien kawżali komuni b’raġunament effiċjenti. To ensure good interpretability and appropriate lexical usage we combine symbolic and neural representations, using a neural reasoning algorithm trained on commonsense causal tuples to predict the next cause step.  L-analiżi kwantitattiva u umana tagħna turi evidenza empirika li l-metodu tagħna jestrezzjona b’suċċess relazzjonijiet ta’ kawżalità sinifikanti bejn is-serje taż-żmien b’karatteristiċi testwali u jiġġenera spjegazzjoni xierqa bejniethom.', 'ms': 'Menjelaskan penyebab atau kesan asas mengenai peristiwa adalah tugas yang mencabar tetapi berharga. Kami menentukan masalah baru untuk menghasilkan penjelasan peristiwa siri masa dengan (1) mencari sebab dan kesan hubungan siri masa dengan data teks dan (2) membina rantai sambungan antara mereka untuk menghasilkan penjelasan. Untuk mengesan ciri-ciri penyebab dari teks, kami cadangkan kaedah baru berdasarkan penyebab Granger dari siri masa antara ciri-ciri yang diekstrak dari teks seperti N-gram, topik, perasaan, dan komposisi mereka. Generasi urutan entiti penyebab memerlukan pangkalan pengetahuan penyebab yang sama dengan alasan yang efisien. Untuk memastikan pengenalan yang baik dan penggunaan leksik yang sesuai, kita menggabungkan perwakilan simbolik dan saraf, menggunakan algoritma penyebab saraf dilatih pada dua penyebab umum untuk meramalkan langkah penyebab berikutnya. Our quantitative and human analysis show empirical evidence that our method successfully extracts meaningful causality relationships between time series with textual features and generates appropriate explanation between them.', 'ml': 'സംഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ കാരണങ്ങളോ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളോ വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നത് വിലപിക്കുന്നത് വ ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ഡേറ്റായുള്ള സമയത്തിന്റെ കാരണവും പ്രഭാവങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങളും ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d ഡാറ്റായുമായി ഒരു ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ചങ്ങല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രാന്\u200dജെര്\u200d സമയ സീരിയുടെ കാരണമാണ് പ്രേരിപ്പി കാരണ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ തലമുറയുടെ തലമുറയില്\u200d ഒരു കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസ് കാരണവുമായ അറിവ് ബേസ് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ കാരണങ് നന്നായി വ്യാഖ്യാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തുവാനും, അടുത്ത കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിന് മു നമ്മുടെ കണക്കിന്റെയും മനുഷ്യന്റെയും വിശ്വാസവും കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതി വിജയിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വി', 'mn': 'Үүний үндсэн шалтгаанууд эсвэл үйл явдлын нөлөөг тайлбарлах нь хэцүү, үнэ цэнэтэй ажил юм. Бид цаг хугацааны тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын шинэ асуудлыг (1) хайлтын шалтгаан, нөлөөтэй харилцааны холбоотой (2) болон тэдний хоорондоо холбоотой хэлхээ бий болгож тайлбарлах боломжтой. Текстүүдийн шалтгаан чадварыг олохын тулд бид Н-грамм, сэтгэл, сэтгэл хөдлөл болон тэдний бүтээгдэхүүний хоорондын Грангер шалтгааны шалтгааныг санал болгож байна. Яагаад үйл явдлын дарааллын дарааллаар үр дүнтэй ойлголтын үр дүнтэй мэдлэгийн суурь хэрэгтэй. Үнэндээ сайн ойлголтын болон зөв хэлний хэрэглээний тулд бид символ болон мэдрэлийн төлөвлөгөөг нийтлэг ойлголтын алгоритм ашиглаж, дараагийн шалтгааныг таамаглах боломжтой түвшинд сургалтыг ашиглаж байна. Бидний хэмжээний болон хүн төрөлхтний шинжилгээ нь бидний арга зам нь мөн амжилттай хүчин зүйлсийн харилцааны хоорондын хугацааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцаа, мөн тэдний хоорондоо зөв тодорхойлолт', 'pl': 'Wyjaśnienie podstawowych przyczyn lub skutków zdarzeń jest trudnym, ale cennym zadaniem. Definiujemy nowatorski problem generowania wyjaśnień zdarzenia szeregu czasowego poprzez (1) wyszukiwanie relacji przyczynowo-skutkowych szeregu czasowego z danymi tekstowymi oraz (2) konstruowanie łańcucha łączącego między nimi w celu wygenerowania wyjaśnienia. Aby wykryć cechy przyczynowe z tekstu, proponujemy nowatorską metodę opartą na przyczynowości Grangera szeregów czasowych pomiędzy cechami ekstraktowanymi z tekstu, takimi jak N-gramy, tematy, sentymenty i ich skład. Generowanie sekwencji podmiotów przyczynowych wymaga zdrowego rozsądku bazy wiedzy przyczynowej z efektywnym rozumowaniem. Aby zapewnić dobrą interpretację i odpowiednie stosowanie leksykalii łączymy reprezentacje symboliczne i neuronowe, wykorzystując algorytm rozumowania neuronowego przeszkolony na krokach przyczynowych zdrowego rozsądku w celu przewidzenia kolejnego kroku przyczynowego. Nasza analiza ilościowa i ludzka pokazuje empiryczne dowody na to, że nasza metoda skutecznie wydobywa istotne związki przyczynowe między szeregami czasowymi z cechami tekstowymi i generuje odpowiednie wyjaśnienie między nimi.', 'ro': 'Explicarea cauzelor sau efectelor subiacente despre evenimente este o sarcină dificilă, dar valoroasă. Definim o nouă problemă de generare a explicațiilor unui eveniment de serie timpurie prin (1) căutarea relațiilor cauză-efect ale seriilor temporale cu datele textuale și (2) construirea unui lanț de conectare între ele pentru a genera o explicație. Pentru a detecta caracteristicile cauzale din text, propunem o metodă nouă bazată pe cauzalitatea Granger a seriilor de timp între caracteristicile extrase din text, cum ar fi N-grame, subiecte, sentimente și compoziția lor. Generarea secvenței entităților cauzale necesită o bază de cunoștințe cauzale de bun sens, cu raționament eficient. Pentru a asigura o interpretare bună și o utilizare lexicală adecvată combinăm reprezentări simbolice și neurale, folosind un algoritm de raționament neural instruit pe tuplele cauzale de bun sens pentru a prezice următorul pas cauzal. Analiza noastră cantitativă și umană arată dovezi empirice că metoda noastră extrage cu succes relații de cauzalitate semnificative între seriile de timp cu caracteristici textuale și generează explicații adecvate între ele.', 'no': 'Å forklare grunnleggjande grunnar eller effektar om hendingar er ein vanskeleg, men verdileg oppgåve. Vi definerer eit nytt problem med å laga forklaringar av ei tidseriefeil ved å søkja etter (1) søkja og effektforhold av tidserien med tekstverdiar og (2) som konstruerer ein tilkopling kjede mellom dei for å laga ein forklaring. For å oppdaga grunnleggjande funksjonar frå tekst, fører vi ein roman metode basert på Granger-grunnleggjande av tidserien mellom funksjonar som er ekstrahert frå teksten, som N-gramar, emner, sentimentar og komponenten sine. Generasjonen av sekvensen av grunnleggjande einingar krev ein vanleg forårsakeleg kunnskapsbasen med effektiv motivering. For å sikre på godt tolkingsbruk og tilpassande leksisk bruk kombinerer vi symbolske og neurale representasjonar ved å bruka ein neuralrasjonsgoritme trent på vanlegvis følgjande tuplar for å foregå neste grunnsteg. Kvantativne og menneskelige analyser våre viser empiriske beviser at metoden vårt fullførleg ekstraherer meaningfulle grunnlag mellom tidserien med tekstfunksjonar og gjer tilpassande forklaring mellom dei.', 'sr': 'Objašnjavanje temeljnih uzroka ili efekta o događajima je izazovan ali vrijedan zadatak. Definiramo nov problem stvaranja objašnjenja događaja vremenskih serija (1) pretraživanjem uzroka i efekata vremenskih serija sa tekstualnim podacima i (2) izgradnjom lanca povezivanja između njih kako bi stvorili objašnjenje. Da bismo otkrili uzrokovane karakteristike teksta, predložili smo novu metodu baziranu na Grangerovoj uzrokovanosti vremenske serije između karakteristika izvučenih iz teksta poput N-grama, teme, osjećanja i njihove kompozicije. Generacija sekvence uzrokovanih entiteta zahteva zajedničku uzrokovanu bazu znanja sa efikasnim razumijevanjem. Da bismo osigurali dobru interpretabilnost i odgovarajuću leksičku upotrebu, kombinirali smo simbolične i neuralne predstave, koristeći algoritam neuralnog razuma obučen na običnim uzrokovanim tuplima da predvidimo sledeći korak uzrokovanja. Naša kvantitativna i ljudska analiza pokazuju empiričke dokaze da naša metoda uspešno izvlači značajne veze uzrokovanja između vremenskih serija sa tekstualnim karakteristikama i stvara odgovarajuće objašnjenje između njih.', 'si': 'අවස්ථාවය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි අවස්ථාවක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වෙලාව සිරීම් සිද්ධ විස්තරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න (1) පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වෙලාව සිද්ධ සිද්ධ සංවේදනය සමඟ ප ලිපිනයෙන් කාරණික අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් හොයාගන්න, අපි කාරණික විධානයක් අධාරිත විධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් N-ග්\u200dරාම්ස්, විධානය, සංවේද කාරණාත්මක විදියට පරීක්ෂණයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට කාරණාත්මක විදියට දැනගන්න අධ්\u200dයය හොඳ අභිවාදය සහ හොඳ ලෙක්සිකල් භාවිතානය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න අපි සංකේතික සහ න්\u200dයූරාල් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය අ අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය සමහර විශේෂයෙන් අපේ විධානය සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම විශේෂය සම්බ', 'so': 'Caddaynta sababaha hoose ama saameyn ku saabsan dhacdooyinku waa mid adag laakiin waa shaqo muhiim ah. Waxaannu qoraynaa dhibaato saameyn ah oo ku saabsan abuurista dhacdooyinka safarka (1) oo raadinaya sabab iyo saameyn leh xiriirka tirada xiliga ah oo ku qoran taariikhda qoraalka iyo (2) dhisaya silsilad xiriir dhexdooda si uu u sameeyo fasax. Si aan u ogaano waxyaabaha sababta ah ee warqadda, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab warqad ah oo ku saleysan sababaha wakhtiga badan oo u dhexeeya tababaro ka soo baxa qoraal, tusaale ahaan N-gram, madam, xisaabta iyo waxyaabaha ay leeyihiin. Qarniga waxyaabaha sababta ah waxay u baahan yihiin saldhig aqoonta sababta ah oo ku saabsan sabab faa’iido leh. To ensure good interpretability and appropriate lexical usage we combine symbolic and neural representations, using a neural reasoning algorithm trained on commonsense causal tuples to predict the next cause step.  Analyskayaga qiyaasta iyo dadka waxay muujiyaan caddeynta caqliga leh in qaabkanagu uu si liibaan u soo bixiyo xiriirka sababta ah ee la xiriira farsamada xilliga iyo farsamada qoriga ah dhexdooda, wuxuuna keenaa caddeyn sahlan.', 'sv': 'Att förklara underliggande orsaker eller effekter om händelser är en utmanande men värdefull uppgift. Vi definierar ett nytt problem med att generera förklaringar av en tidsseriehändelse genom att (1) söka orsaks- och effektrelationer mellan tidsserien och textdata och (2) konstruera en förbindelsekedja mellan dem för att generera en förklaring. För att upptäcka orsakssamband från text föreslår vi en ny metod baserad på Grangers orsakssamband mellan egenskaper extraherade från text som N-gram, ämnen, känslor och deras sammansättning. Generationen av sekvensen av kausala entiteter kräver en gemensam kausativ kunskapsbas med effektivt resonemang. För att säkerställa god tolkning och lämplig lexikal användning kombinerar vi symboliska och neurala representationer, med hjälp av en neural resonansalgoritm utbildad på allmänsliga kausala tupler för att förutsäga nästa orsakssteg. Vår kvantitativa och mänskliga analys visar empiriska belägg för att vår metod framgångsrikt extraherar meningsfulla kausalitetsrelationer mellan tidsserier med textdrag och genererar lämplig förklaring mellan dem.', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வுகள் பற்றிய காரணங்கள் அல்லது விளைவுகளை விளக்குதல் ஒரு சவாலானது ஆனால் மதிப்புள்ள செயல். நாம் நேர தொடர் நிகழ்வின் விளக்கத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கான புதிய பிரச்சனையை வரையறு உரையிலிருந்து காரணக் குணங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். N- grams, தலைப்புகள், உணர்வுகள், மற்றும் அமர்வு காரணங்களின் தொடர்ச்சியின் தலைமுறையில் தேவைப்படுகிறது தேவையான காரணங்களுடன் தேவைப்படுகிறது. நல்ல மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் பொருத்தமான லெக்சிக்சியல் பயன்பாட்டை உறுதிப்படுத்த, நாம் குறியீடு மற்றும் புதிய பிரதிநிதிகளை ஒன்று சேர் எங்கள் அளவு மற்றும் மனித ஆராய்ச்சி பெரும் தெளிவான அத்தாட்சிகளை காண்பிக்கிறது நமது முறையில் வெற்றிகரமான காரணத்திற்கு இடையே நேர தொடர்', 'ur': 'اتفاقات کے بارے میں دلیل یا اثرات کا مفصل بیان کرنا ایک مشکل ہے لیکن ارزش کا کام ہے. ہم نے ایک نئی مسئلہ تفصیل دیتے ہیں تایمہ سیریے ایڈینٹ کی تفصیل پیدا کرنے کے ذریعہ تایمہ سیریے کے دلیل اور اثر رابطہ سے اور (2) ان کے درمیان ایک زنجیر پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک تفصیل پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ تاکسٹ سے کیسائل ویٹیوں کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک نو طریقہ پیش کریں جو ٹیمکسٹ سے نکالا گیا ہے، ٹیمکسٹ، ٹیمکسٹ، احساسات اور ان کی ترکیب کے درمیان گرانگر کے سبب بنیاد ہے. کائنال ایٹنیٹیوں کی سفارش کی نسل ایک عام سمجھ کے باعث علم کی بنیاد ضروری ہے۔ اچھی تفسیر قابلیت اور مناسب لکسیکی استعمال کا مضبوطی کرنے کے لئے ہم سیمبولیکی اور نیورال نمونات کو ترکیب کرتے ہیں، ایک نیورال منطقی الگوریتم کے استعمال سے آپس کے دلیل قدم کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے تعلیم کی جاتی ہے. ہمارے مقدار اور انسان کی تحلیل مضبوط نشانیاں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ موفقیت کے ساتھ زمانہ سیریے کے درمیان معنی دلیل رابطہ نکالتا ہے اور ان کے درمیان مناسب توضیح پیدا کرتا ہے.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Biz bir vaqt seriya holatini (1) qidirish uchun va matn data bilan bogʻ\'liq holatni aniqlashga va (2) orasidagi bir bogʻ\'liq boshqaruvni yaratish uchun (1) muammolarni aniqlash. Matnning eng sabablar xossalarini aniqlash uchun biz "N-grams, madaniyalar, hissiyotlar va bir tuzuvdan chizib olingan xossalarning eng katta vaqt seriyasi darajasi asosida novel usulini anglatamiz. Bu sabablar suhbatlarining tarkibi avlodiqlarini tahlil qilish uchun faqat ma\'lumot asosi kerak. Yaxshi tarjima qilishni va muhim leksikal foydalanishni ishlatish uchun biz keyingi sabablarni oldinga neyrolik va neural representalarni birlashtirish uchun neyrolik algoritni foydalanamiz. Bizning qiymatimiz va inson analytiklarimiz juda muvaffaqiyatli hujjatlarimizni ko\'rsatadi. Ustunmiz muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli vaqt seriya bilan ma\'lumotlar bilan ma\'noviy bogʻlanishimiz mumkin va texnologiya xususiyatlari bilan o\'rganish va ularning', 'vi': 'Giải thích nguyên nhân hoặc ảnh hưởng của sự kiện là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn nhưng có giá trị. Chúng tôi xác định một vấn đề mới về việc giải thích một sự kiện về chuỗi thời gian bởi (1) các mối quan hệ nguyên nhân và hiệu quả của chuỗi thời gian với các dữ liệu cấu hình và (2) thiết lập một chuỗi nối giữa chúng để giải thích. Để phát hiện các tính năng hệ quả từ văn bản, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới dựa trên sự nhân quả của chuỗi thời gian Granger giữa các tính năng được lấy ra từ văn bản như N-grams, chủ đề, tình cảm và cấu hình cùng nhau. Việc tạo ra chuỗi các sinh vật nguyên nhân đòi hỏi một căn cứ kiến thức nhân quả thông thường với một lý lẽ hiệu quả. Để đảm bảo sự giải thích tốt và sử dụng ngôn ngữ văn học thích hợp chúng ta kết hợp biểu hiện biểu tượng biểu tượng và thần kinh, sử dụng thuật to án thần kinh được đào tạo dựa trên các tuples hệ thống để dự đoán nguyên nhân tiếp theo. Phân tích con người và số lượng của chúng tôi cho thấy bằng chứng thực tế là phương pháp của chúng tôi tích cực kết hợp mối quan hệ nhân quả có ý nghĩa giữa các chuỗi thời gian với các tính chất kết cấu và giải thích thích thích thích thích thích thích thích hợp.', 'da': 'At forklare underliggende årsager eller virkninger om begivenheder er en udfordrende, men værdifuld opgave. Vi definerer et nyt problem med at generere forklaringer på en tidsseriebegivenhed ved at (1) søge årsag og effekt relationer af tidsserien med tekstdata og (2) konstruere en forbindelseskæde mellem dem for at generere en forklaring. For at opdage årsagsrelaterede træk fra tekst, foreslår vi en ny metode baseret på Granger årsagssammenhæng af tidsserier mellem træk udvundet fra tekst som N-gram, emner, følelser og deres sammensætning. Generationen af sekvensen af kausale enheder kræver en almindelig kausativ vidensbase med effektiv ræsonnement. For at sikre god fortolkning og passende leksikalsk brug kombinerer vi symbolske og neurale repræsentationer ved hjælp af en neural ræsonnement algoritme trænet på almindelige årsagstupler til at forudsige næste årsagstrin. Vores kvantitative og menneskelige analyse viser empirisk dokumentation for, at vores metode med succes udtrækker meningsfulde kausalitetsrelationer mellem tidsserier med teksttræk og genererer passende forklaringer mellem dem.', 'hr': 'Objašnjavanje temeljnih uzroka ili učinka o događajima je izazovan ali vrijedan zadatak. Definiramo novi problem stvaranja objašnjenja događaja vremenskog serija (1) pretraživanjem uzroka i učinkovitih odnosa vremenskog serija s tekstualnim podacima i (2) izgrađivanjem lanca veze između njih kako bi stvorili objašnjenje. Da bismo otkrili uzrokovane karakteristike teksta, predložili smo novu metodu koja se temelji na uzrokovanju grangera vremenske serije između karakteristika izvlačenih iz teksta poput N-grama, teme, osjećanja i njihovog sastojaka. Generacija sekvence uzrokovanih entitata zahtijeva češće uzrokovanu bazu znanja s učinkovitom razumijevanjem. Da bismo osigurali dobru interpretabilnost i odgovarajuću leksičku uporabu, kombinirali smo simboličke i neuralne predstave, koristeći algoritam neuralnog razuma obučen na češće uzročne tuple kako bi predvidjeli sljedeći korak uzroka. Naša kvantitativna i ljudska analiza pokazuju empiričke dokaze da naša metoda uspješno izvlači značajne veze uzrokovanja između vremenskih serija sa tekstualnim karakteristikama i stvara odgovarajuće objašnjenje između njih.', 'nl': 'Het uitleggen van onderliggende oorzaken of effecten van gebeurtenissen is een uitdagende maar waardevolle taak. We definiëren een nieuw probleem van het genereren van verklaringen van een tijdreeks gebeurtenis door (1) oorzaak-effect relaties van de tijdreeks met tekstuele gegevens te zoeken en (2) een verbindingsketen tussen hen te construeren om een verklaring te genereren. Om causale kenmerken uit tekst te detecteren, stellen we een nieuwe methode voor die gebaseerd is op de Granger-causaliteit van tijdreeksen tussen kenmerken die zijn geëxtraheerd uit tekst zoals N-grammen, onderwerpen, sentimenten en hun samenstelling. Het genereren van de opeenvolging van causale entiteiten vereist een gezonde causatieve kennisbasis met efficiënte redenering. Om een goede interpreteerbaarheid en passend lexicaal gebruik te garanderen combineren we symbolische en neurale representaties, met behulp van een neuraal redeneeralgoritme getraind op gezonde causale tupels om de volgende oorzaak stap te voorspellen. Onze kwantitatieve en menselijke analyse tonen empirisch bewijs aan dat onze methode met succes betekenisvolle causaliteitsrelaties tussen tijdreeksen met tekstuele kenmerken extraheert en daartussen passende uitleg genereert.', 'bg': 'Обясняването на основните причини или ефекти за събитията е предизвикателна, но ценна задача. Определяме нов проблем за генериране на обяснения на събитие от времеви серии чрез (1) търсене на причинно-следствени връзки на времевите серии с текстови данни и (2) изграждане на свързваща верига между тях за генериране на обяснение. За да открием причинно-следствените особености от текста, предлагаме нов метод, базиран на причинно-следствената връзка на Грейнджър от времеви серии между особености, извлечени от текста като Н-грами, теми, сентименти и техния състав. Генерирането на последователността от причинно-следствени единици изисква обща причинно-следствена база от знания с ефективно разсъждение. За да осигурим добра интерпретация и подходящо лексикално използване, ние комбинираме символични и невронни представи, като използваме алгоритъм на невронно разсъждаване, обучен върху обикновени причинно-следствени тупли, за да предскажем следващата стъпка на причината. Нашият количествен и човешки анализ показва емпирични доказателства, че нашият метод успешно извлича значими причинно-следствени връзки между времевите серии с текстови характеристики и генерира подходящо обяснение между тях.', 'de': 'Ursachen oder Auswirkungen von Ereignissen zu erklären, ist eine herausfordernde, aber wertvolle Aufgabe. Wir definieren ein neuartiges Problem, Erklärungen eines Zeitreihenereignisses zu generieren, indem wir (1) Ursache-Wirkungsbeziehungen der Zeitreihen mit Textdaten suchen und (2) eine Verbindungskette zwischen ihnen konstruieren, um eine Erklärung zu generieren. Um kausale Merkmale aus Text zu erkennen, schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, die auf der Granger-Kausalität von Zeitreihen zwischen Merkmalen, die aus Text extrahiert wurden, wie N-Gramm, Themen, Sentiments und deren Zusammensetzung basiert. Die Generierung der Sequenz kausaler Entitäten erfordert eine gesunde kausale Wissensbasis mit effizientem Argumentieren. Um eine gute Interpretierbarkeit und einen angemessenen lexikalischen Gebrauch zu gewährleisten, kombinieren wir symbolische und neuronale Repräsentationen, wobei ein neuronaler Argumentationsalgorithmus verwendet wird, der auf kausalen Tupeln des gesunden Menschenverstandes trainiert ist, um den nächsten Ursachenschritt vorherzusagen. Unsere quantitative und humane Analyse zeigen empirische Belege dafür, dass unsere Methode erfolgreich aussagekräftige Kausalitätsbeziehungen zwischen Zeitreihen mit textuellen Merkmalen extrahiert und entsprechende Erklärungen zwischen ihnen generiert.', 'id': 'Menjelaskan penyebab atau efek dasar tentang peristiwa adalah tugas yang menantang tapi berharga. Kami mendefinisikan masalah baru untuk menghasilkan penjelasan dari peristiwa seri waktu dengan (1) mencari penyebab dan efek hubungan dari seri waktu dengan data tekstual dan (2) membangun rantai koneksi antara mereka untuk menghasilkan penjelasan. Untuk mendeteksi fitur penyebab dari teks, kami mengusulkan metode baru berdasarkan penyebab Granger dari seri waktu antara fitur yang diekstraksi dari teks seperti N-gram, topik, perasaan, dan komposisi mereka. Generasi urutan entitas penyebab membutuhkan dasar pengetahuan penyebab yang sama dengan alasan efisien. Untuk memastikan interpretasi yang baik dan penggunaan lexik yang sesuai kita menggabungkan representation simbolik dan saraf, menggunakan algoritma alasan saraf dilatih pada dua penyebab umum untuk memprediksi langkah penyebab berikutnya. Analisis kuantitatif dan manusia menunjukkan bukti empiris bahwa metode kita berhasil mengekstrak hubungan penyebab yang berarti antara siri waktu dengan ciri-ciri teks dan menghasilkan penjelasan yang sesuai antara mereka.', 'ko': '사건의 잠재적 원인이나 영향을 설명하는 것은 도전적이지만 가치 있는 임무이다.우리는 새로운 문제를 정의했다. (1) 시간 서열과 텍스트 데이터의 인과 관계를 검색하고 (2) 그들 사이에 연결 체인을 구축하여 해석을 생성하여 시간 서열 이벤트의 해석을 생성한다.텍스트에서 인과 특징을 검출하기 위해 우리는 시간 서열을 바탕으로 하는 그랜저 인과 관계를 바탕으로 하는 텍스트 특징 검출 방법을 제시했다. 이런 특징은 N-gram, 주제, 감정과 그들의 구성을 포함한다.인과 실체 서열의 생성은 효과적인 추리를 가진 상식 인과 지식 라이브러리를 필요로 한다.양호한 해석성과 적당한 어휘 사용을 확보하기 위해 우리는 기호와 신경표시를 결합시켜 상식적 인과원조를 바탕으로 하는 신경추리 알고리즘을 사용하여 다음 단계의 원인을 예측할 것이다.우리의 정량과 인위적인 분석에 의하면 우리의 방법은 텍스트의 특징을 가진 시간 서열 간의 의미 있는 인과 관계를 성공적으로 추출하고 그들 사이에 적당한 해석을 하였다.', 'fa': 'توضیح دلایل پایه\u200cای یا اثرات در مورد رویدادها یک کار سخت اما ارزشمند است. ما مشکل نوی توضیح\u200cهای سری زمان را توضیح می\u200cدهیم (۱) رابطه\u200cهای جستجوی و تاثیر سری زمان با داده\u200cهای متن و (۲) یک زنجیر ارتباط بین آنها برای توضیح\u200cگیری. برای شناسایی ویژه\u200cهای دلایل از متن، ما یک روش رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس دلایل مجموعه زمان گرانگر بین ویژه\u200cهایی که از متن خارج شده\u200cاند مانند N-گرم، موضوع، احساسات و ترکیب آنها هستند. نسل تعادل موجودات باعث دلایل نیاز به پایگاه دانش باعث منطقی است. برای مطمئن کردن تعبیر قابلیت خوب و استفاده از زبان مناسب ما نمایش\u200cهای نمایش\u200cشناسی و عصبی را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم، با استفاده از الگوریتم دلیل\u200cشناسی عصبی آموزش یافته شده روی تاپل\u200cهای باعث دلیل معمولی برای پیش\u200cبینی قدم تحلیل مقداری و انسانی ما مدرک امپراتیک را نشان می دهند که روش ما با موفقیت رابطه\u200cهای دلایل معنی بین سری زمان با ویژه\u200cهای متن خارج می\u200cکند و توضیح مناسب بین آنها را ایجاد می\u200cکند.', 'af': "Verduidelik onderstelde oorsaak of effekte van gebeurtenis is 'n pragtige maar waardelike taak. Ons definieer 'n nuwe probleem van genereer uitduidelings van 'n tydsreeks gebeurtenis deur (1) soektog oorsaak en effek verhouding van die tydsreeks met tekstuele data en (2) wat 'n koppeling ketting tussen hulle gebruik om 'n uitduidelik te genereer. Om oorsaaklike funksies van teks te ontdek, voorstel ons 'n roman metode gebaseer op die Granger oorsaaklikheid van tydsreeks tussen funksies uitgevoer van teks soos N-gramme, onderwerpe, sentimente en hulle komposisie. Die generasie van die volgorde van oorsaaklike entiteite benodig 'n gemeenskaplike oorsaaklike kennisbasis met effektief redening. Om goeie interpretasie en geskikte leksiese gebruik te verseker, moet ons simboliese en neurale voorstellings kombinieer, gebruik 'n neurale redening algoritme wat op gemeenskapste oorsaaklike tuples opgelei is om die volgende oorsaak stap te voorskou. Ons kvantitatiewe en menslike analisie wys empiriese getuienis dat ons metode suksesvol betekenlike oorsaaklikheidverhouding tussen tydsreeks met tekstuele funksies uittrek en gemaak toepassing tussen hulle.", 'sw': 'Explaining underlying causes or effects about events is a challenging but valuable task.  Tunaweza kufafanua tatizo la riwaya la kutengeneza maelezo ya tukio la mfululizo wa muda na (1) kutafuta sababu na athari za mahusiano ya mfululizo wa mfululizo wa muda kwa takwimu za mfululizo na (2) kutengeneza mfumo wa kuunganisha kati yao ili kutengeneza maelezo. Ili kutambua vipengele vya sababu kutoka maandishi, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya kwa kutumia sababu ya mfululizo wa muda mkubwa kati ya vipengele vilivyotolewa kutoka kwenye maandishi kama vile N-grams, mada, hisia na ujenzi wao. Kizazi cha mfululizo wa vifaa vinavyosababisha kinahitaji msingi wa maarifa yenye maana ya ufanisi. Ili kuhakikisha ufafanuzi mzuri na matumizi mazuri ya lexico tunaunganisha wakilishi wa alama na neura, kwa kutumia algorithi ya kisasa inayofundishwa na vifaa vya kusababisha hatua inayofuata. Uchambuzi wetu wa kiasi na binadamu unaonyesha ushahidi wa msisitizo kwamba njia yetu kwa mafanikio inaleta mahusiano ya sababu yenye maana kati ya mfululizo wa muda na tabia za msingi na inatengeneza maelezo sahihi kati yao.', 'tr': 'Vaqialar hakynda esasy sebäpleri ýa-da etkileri düşünmek çözümli ýöne değerli zadyr. Biz wagt seriýasynyň düşündirimlerini (1) gözlemek sebäbi we etki baglaýyşlaryny tekst verileri bilen tanyşdyrmak üçin (2) olaryň arasynda bir syýahat baglaýyşyny düzenlemek üçin tassyklandyrýarys. Metoden sebäbi karakterlerni tapmak üçin biz Granger zamanlaryň sebäbi üçin, N-gramlardan, temalardan, duýgulardan we olaryň kompozisyonundan çekilýän karakterleriň arasynda täze bir täze täze teklip berýäris. Sebäpli guramlaryň dizaýnlygynyň döwletlerine mümkin duýramçylyk sebäbi bilim bazyny etkinlik sebäbi gerek. Güzel bir yorumluluğa ve uygun bir lektik kullanımına güvenmek için simbolik ve neural temsilleri birleştirerek, sıradaki sebep adımını tahmin etmek için eğitilen neural reasoning algoritmi kullanarak Bizim miktarlarımız ve insan analizimiz empirik kanıtlarını gösteriyor ki, yöntemimiz zaman serileri metin özellikleri ile ifade eden ve aralarında uygun bir açıklama getirir.', 'sq': 'Shpjegimi i shkaqeve apo efekteve themelore rreth ngjarjeve është një detyrë e vështirë por e vlefshme. Ne përcaktojmë një problem të ri të gjenerimit të shpjegimeve të një ngjarje serie kohore me (1) kërkimin e lidhjeve shkak dhe efekt të serisë kohore me të dhënat tekstuale dhe (2) ndërtimin e një zinxhiri lidhjeje midis tyre për të gjeneruar një shpjegim. Për të zbuluar karakteristika shkaktuese nga teksti, propozojmë një metodë të re bazuar në shkaktueshmërinë Granger të serive kohore midis karakteristikave të nxjerra nga teksti të tilla si N-gram, temat, ndjenjat dhe përbërja e tyre. Gjenerimi i sekuencës së njësive shkakuese kërkon një bazë të përbashkët njohurie shkakuese me arsyetim të efektshëm. Për të siguruar interpretueshmërinë e mirë dhe përdorimin e duhur lexik ne kombinojmë përfaqësime simbolike dhe nervore, duke përdorur një algoritëm arsyetimi nervor të stërvitur në dubla të përbashkëta shkak për të parashikuar hapin tjetër të shkakut. Analiza jonë kuantitative dhe njerëzore tregon prova empirike se metoda jonë nxjerr me sukses marrëdhënie shkaktuese të kuptueshme midis serive kohore me karakteristika tekstuale dhe gjeneron shpjegime të përshtatshme midis tyre.', 'am': 'በጉዳዩ ላይ መግለጫ ወይም ማስታወቂያውን መግለጫ ግን የከበረ ነገር ነው፡፡ በ (1) የመፈለግ ምክንያት እና የጊዜውን ግንኙነት የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች እና (2) የመግለጫ ሰንሰንሰለትን በመፍጠር እና ትርጓሜን ለመፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከጽሑፍ የሐሳብ ጥያቄዎችን ለማግኘት፣ ከ-ግራም፣ ጉዳዮች፣ እውቀት እና ክፍላቸውን በተለየ ጽሑፎች መካከል የግልፅ ጉዳይ የጊዜው ክፍተት በተመሳሳይ የመረጃ አካሄድ ልማድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሐሳብ አካባቢዎች ትውልድ በጥቅም ምክንያት የውቀት አዋቂ መቀመጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ መልካም ትርጓሜ እና የሚገባውን የሌክሲካዊ ጥያቄ ለመጠበቅ እና የባሕላዊ መልዕክቶችን ለመቀበል፣ በአሁለተኛይቱ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል በተጠቃሚ የውይይት አካባቢ አልgoritም ለመጠቀም እናስቀናለን፡፡ ባሕላዊ እና የሰው አስተያይነታችን የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን በጽሑፍ ግንኙነት መካከል የሚያሳውቅ የሐሰት ግንኙነት እንዲያወጣ እና በመካከላቸው የሚገባውን ትርጓሜ እንዲያሳድጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Պատճառների վերաբերյալ հիմնական պատճառների կամ ազդեցությունների բացատրությունը դժվար, բայց արժեքավոր խնդիր է: We define a novel problem of generating explanations of a time series event by (1) searching cause and effect relationships of the time series with textual data and (2) constructing a connecting chain between them to generate an explanation.  Տեքստի պատճառային հատկանիշների հայտնաբերելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որը հիմնված է Գրենգերի ժամանակային շարքերի պատճառային հատկանիշների միջև, որոնք դուրս են գալիս տեքստից, ինչպիսիք են N-գրամերը, թեմաները, զգացմունքները և դրանց Պատճառական էակների հաջորդականության ստեղծումը պահանջում է ընդհանուր պատճառական գիտելիքների հիմք արդյունավետ մտածելով: Որպեսզի ապահովենք լավ մեկնաբանելիությունը և հարմար լեքսիկական օգտագործումը, մենք համադրում ենք սիմվոլիկ և նյարդային ներկայացումները, օգտագործելով նյարդային մտածողության ալգորիթմ, որը սովորեցվում է ընդհանուր պատճառի երկու կողմերով հաջորդ Մեր քանակական և մարդկային վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս էմպիրիկ ապացույցներ, որ մեր մեթոդը հաջողությամբ հանում է իմաստալից պատճառային հարաբերություններ ժամանակային շարքերի միջև տեքստային հատկությունների հետ և ստեղծում է հարմար բացատրություն դրանց', 'bn': 'ঘটনার ব্যাপারে কারণ বা প্রভাব ব্যাখ্যা হচ্ছে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কিন্তু মূল্যবান কাজ। টাইম সিরিজের অনুসন্ধানের কারণ এবং প্রভাবিত সময় সিরিজের সম্পর্কের সাথে টেক্সচুয়াল ডাটা এবং (২) তাদের মধ্যে একটি সংযোগ চেইন তৈরি করার জন্য (১) একটি ব্যাখ্য টেক্সট থেকে কারণের বৈশিষ্ট্য সনাক্ত করার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি গ্রেঞ্জারের সময় সিরিজের কারণের ভিত্তিতে গ্রেঞ্জারের সময় সিরিজের মাধ্যমে, যেমন এন-গ্রা কারণ বিষয়বস্তুর প্রজন্মের কারণে কার্যকর কারণের জন্য একটি কমিউনিসেন্সের কারণে জ্ঞানের কারণে প্রয়োজন। ভালো ব্যাখ্যা এবং যথেষ্ট লেক্সিক্যাল ব্যবহার নিশ্চিত করার জন্য আমরা প্রতীক এবং নিউরেল প্রতিনিধিদের সাথে একত্রিত করি, পরবর্তী কারণের ধাপের ভবিষ্যদ্ আমাদের পরিমাণ এবং মানুষ বিশ্লেষণ প্রমাণ দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সফলভাবে সময় সিরিজের মাঝে মৌলিক ক কারণ সম্পর্ক বের করে এবং তাদের মধ্যে যুক্', 'ca': "Explicar les causes o efectes subjacents dels esdeveniments és una tasca difícil però valiosa. Definim un nou problem a de generar explicacions d'un esdeveniment de sèrie temporal (1) buscant relacions de causa i efecte de la sèrie temporal amb dades textuals i (2) construint una cadena de connexió entre elles per generar una explicació. Per detectar característiques causals del text, proposem un mètode nou basat en la causalitat Granger de les sèries temporals entre característiques extraites del text com N-grams, temes, sentiments i la seva composició. La generació de seqüència d'entitats causals requereix una base comú de coneixements causals amb raonament eficient. Per assegurar una bona interpretabilitat i un bon ús lexical apropiat combinam representacions simbòlicas i neuronals, utilitzant un algoritme de raonament neural entrenat en dobles causals comuns per predir el següent pas de causa. Our quantitative and human analysis show empirical evidence that our method successfully extracts meaningful causality relationships between time series with textual features and generates appropriate explanation between them.", 'bs': 'Objašnjavanje temeljnih uzroka ili učinka o događajima je izazovan ali vrijedan zadatak. Definiramo novi problem stvaranja objašnjenja događaja vremenskih serija (1) pretraživanjem uzroka i učinkovitih odnosa vremenskih serija sa tekstualnim podacima i (2) izgrađivanjem lanca povezivanja između njih kako bi stvorili objašnjenje. Da bismo otkrili uzrokovane karakteristike teksta, predložili smo novu metodu koja se temelji na uzrokovanju Granger a vremenske serije između karakteristika izvlačenih iz teksta poput N-grama, teme, osjećanja i njihove kompozicije. Generacija sekvence uzrokovanih entiteta zahtijeva bazu povezanog smisla s efikasnim razumijevanjem. Da bismo osigurali dobru interpretabilnost i odgovarajuću leksičku uporabu, kombinirali smo simboličke i neuralne predstave, koristeći algoritam neuroralnog razuma obučen na češće uzrokovane tuple kako bi predvidjeli sljedeći korak cilja. Naša kvantitativna i ljudska analiza pokazuju empiričke dokaze da naša metoda uspješno izvlači značajne veze uzrokovanja između vremenskih serija sa tekstualnim karakteristikama i stvara odgovarajuće objašnjenje između njih.', 'az': 'Vaqialar bar…ôsind…ôki s…ôb…ôbl…ôri v…ô t…ôsirl…ôrini a √ßńĪq etm…ôk √ß…ôtin, amma qiym…ôtli iŇül…ôr. Biz vaxtlńĪ seri olaraq t…ôfsilatlarńĪnńĪ t…ôŇükil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn yeni bir problemi t…ôŇükil edirik (1) vaxtńĪ serisi olaraq t…ôfsilatlarńĪnńĪ t…ôŇükil etm…ôk v…ô t…ôfsilatńĪnńĪ t…ôŇükil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn onlarńĪn arasńĪnda bańülantńĪ zincirini t…ôŇükil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn. M…ôtn t…ôs…ôvv√ľrl…ôrini keŇüfetm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, N-gram, m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr, duygularńĪ v…ô onlarńĪn kompozisyonu kimi m…ôtnl…ôrd…ôn √ßńĪxarńĪlan m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr arasńĪnda Granger s…ôviyy…ôsin…ô dayanan yeni bir metod t…ôklif edirik. M…ôxluqatńĪn s…ôviyy…ôtinin n…ôsili m√ľ…ôyy…ôn olunmuŇü d…ôyiŇüiklik fikirl…ôŇüdirilm…ôsi il…ô √ßoxluq t…ôsirli bir elm bazńĪ lazńĪmdńĪr. ńįyi yorumlayńĪcńĪ v…ô uyńüun leksik istifad…ô etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn simbolik v…ô n√∂ral g√∂st…ôricil…ôri birl…ôŇüdiririk. N√∂ral razńĪlńĪq algoritmi, t…ôhsil olunan, n√∂ral fikirl…ôŇüdirm…ôk algoritmi il…ô g…ôl…ôc…ôk s…ôb…ôb adńĪmńĪnńĪ t…ômin edir. Bizim kvantitatlńĪ v…ô insan analizimiz impirik kanńĪtlarńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôrir ki, metodumuz m√∂vcud olaraq vaxt seril…ôri il…ô m…ôlumatlar arasńĪndakńĪ m…ôlumatlarńĪ t…ôŇükil edir v…ô onlarńĪn arasńĪnda uyńüun aydńĪnlńĪq yaradńĪr.', 'et': 'Sündmuste põhjuste või tagajärgede selgitamine on keeruline, kuid väärtuslik ülesanne. Määratleme uue probleemi ajareasündmuse selgituste genereerimiseks (1) ajarea põhjuslike ja tagajärgede seoste otsimisel tekstiandmetega ja (2) nende vahel ühendusahela loomisel selgituse saamiseks. Tekstist põhjuslike omaduste tuvastamiseks pakume välja uudse meetodi, mis põhineb Grangeri aegridade põhjuslikul seosel tekstist ekstraheeritud omaduste vahel nagu N-grammid, teemad, tunded ja nende koostis. Põhjuslike üksuste jada tekitamine nõuab üldse mõistlikku põhjuslikku teadmistebaasi, millel on tõhus arutlus. Hea tõlgendatavuse ja sobiva leksikaalse kasutamise tagamiseks kombineerime sümboolseid ja neuraalseid esitusi, kasutades järgmise põhjuse etapi prognoosimiseks neuroarutluse algoritmi, mis on koolitatud põhjuslikel tuplitel. Meie kvantitatiivne ja inimlik analüüs näitab empiirilisi tõendeid selle kohta, et meie meetod kajastab edukalt tähenduslikke põhjuslikke seoseid aegridade vahel tekstiliste omadustega ja loob nende vahel sobiva selgituse.', 'cs': 'Vysvětlit základní příčiny nebo účinky událostí je náročný, ale cenný úkol. Nový problém generování vysvětlení události časových řad definujeme (1) hledáním příčinových a účinkových vztahů časových řad s textovými daty a (2) konstruováním spojovacího řetězce mezi nimi pro generování vysvětlení. Pro detekci kauzálních rysů z textu navrhujeme novou metodu založenou na Grangerově kauzalitě časových řad mezi rysy extrahovanými z textu, jako jsou N-gramy, témata, sentimenty a jejich složení. Generování sekvence kauzálních entit vyžaduje zdravý rozumný kauzální znalostní základ s efektivním uvažováním. Pro zajištění dobré interpretovatelnosti a vhodného lexikálního využití kombinujeme symbolické a nervové reprezentace pomocí algoritmu neuronového uvažování trénovaného na zdravém rozumu kauzálních tulících k předpovědi dalšího kroku příčiny. Naše kvantitativní a lidská analýza ukazuje empirický důkaz, že naše metoda úspěšně extrahuje smysluplné kauzalitní vztahy mezi časovými řadami s textovými rysy a generuje mezi nimi vhodné vysvětlení.', 'fi': 'Tapahtuman taustalla olevien syiden tai vaikutusten selittäminen on haastava mutta arvokas tehtävä. Määrittelemme uuden ongelman aikasarjatapahtuman selittämisestä (1) etsimällä aikasarjojen syy-seuraussuhteita tekstitiedoilla ja (2) rakentamalla niiden välille yhdysketjun selityksen tuottamiseksi. Tekstin kausaalisten ominaisuuksien havaitsemiseksi ehdotamme uutta menetelmää, joka perustuu Grangerin kausaalisuuteen tekstistä poimittujen ominaisuuksien, kuten N-grammien, aiheiden, tunteiden ja niiden koostumuksen välillä. Syyllisten entiteettien sekvenssin luominen edellyttää järkevää kausaalista tietopohjaa tehokkaalla päättelyllä. Varmistaaksemme hyvän tulkittavuuden ja asianmukaisen sanaston käytön yhdistämme symbolisia ja neuroesityksiä käyttämällä järjetöntä kausaalituplia koulutettua hermopäättelyalgoritmia seuraavan syyn ennustamiseksi. Kvantitatiiviset ja inhimilliset analyysimme osoittavat empiiristä näyttöä siitä, että menetelmämme onnistuneesti poimii merkityksellisiä kausaalisuussuhteita aikasarjojen välillä tekstuaalisilla ominaisuuksilla ja tuottaa asianmukaisen selityksen niiden välille.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé éngawe pernik nganggo pernik nggawe kapan tanggal nggawe pernik (1) nggawe pernik nggawe pernik nggawe pernik nggawe pernik wektu nggawe data nggambar textual lan (2) nggawe dolanan nambah kebebasan dumateng sampek kanggo ngilanggar kebebasan Jejaring Genjer Jejaring Awakdhéwé kantarno karo hal-hal nganggo urip kuwi nggawe perusahaan empirhik punika dipuluhayo nggawe nguasai perusahaan seneng pisan kelangan anyar nggawe nguasai winih lan nganggo perusahaan anyar nggawe nguasai winih dhéwé', 'he': "להסביר סיבות או השפעות בסיסיות על אירועים היא משימה מאתגרת אבל יקרה. אנחנו מגדירים בעיה חדשה של ליצור הסברים של אירוע סדרת הזמן על ידי (1) חיפוש סיבה ולהשפעה מערכות יחסים של סדרת הזמן עם נתונים טקסטיים (2) בניית שרשרת חיבור ביניהם כדי ליצור הסבר. כדי לגלות תכונות סיבות מהטקסט, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה מבוססת על סיבות גראנג'ר של סדרת הזמן בין תכונות שמוצאות מהטקסט כמו N-גרם, נושאים, רגשות, והמייצב שלהם. דור הרצף של יחידות סיבות דורש בסיס ידע סיבותי משותף עם סיבה יעילה. כדי להבטיח אפשרות לפרשנות טובה ושימוש לקסי מתאים אנחנו משלבים מייצגים סמליים ועצביים, באמצעות אלגוריתם הגיון העצבי מאומן על כפולות סיבות משותפות כדי לחזות את צעד הסיבה הבא. Our quantitative and human analysis show empirical evidence that our method successfully extracts meaningful causality relationships between time series with textual features and generates appropriate explanation between them.", 'ha': "Yi bayyana bayani ga masu ƙari ko matsayin ayuka masu husũma masu hushi ne wani mai tsõron aiki kuma amma yana da kima. Tuna bayyana wani matsayi na nowaya da za'a ƙiƙira fassarar birnin da (1) ke nuna saba'a da mazaɓa da mazaɓa da danne-danne na littãfi da (2) za'a samar da wani ƙure mai haɗi a tsakanin su dõmin ya danne wani fassarar. To domin gane masu sabawa daga matsayin, za'a buƙata wata hanyoyi a kan hanyarwa na Gabbar da yawan shawarar lokaci tsakanin da aka samu masu tsari daga matsayin, kamar N-gram, madaidaita, da hisori da samun sunan. Umarnin da ke ƙaranci da ma'anar sabon, yana nufin wani ma'abũcin sanitar da ma'abũcin sanyi mai kamid. To, dõmin ka yi tabbatar da fassarar mai kyau da amfani da lissafi masu daidai, za mu koma da misalin alama da neura, idan an yi amfani da algoritm na rubura wanda aka sanar da shi a kan manyan shawarar da mataimaki na dabam. Our quantitative and human analysis show empirical evidence that our method successfully extracts meaningful causality relationships between time series with textual features and generates appropriate explanation between them.", 'sk': 'Razlaganje osnovnih vzrokov ali učinkov dogodkov je zahtevna, vendar dragocena naloga. Nov problem generiranja razlag dogodka časovne serije definiramo z (1) iskanjem vzročno-posledičnih odnosov časovne serije z besedilnimi podatki in (2) konstruiranjem povezovalne verige med njimi za ustvarjanje razlage. Za odkrivanje vzročnih značilnosti iz besedila predlagamo novo metodo, ki temelji na Grangerjevi vzročni zvezi časovnih vrst med značilnostmi, pridobljenimi iz besedila, kot so N-grami, teme, čustva in njihova sestava. Ustvarjanje zaporedja vzročnih entitet zahteva splošno vzročno bazo znanja z učinkovitim razlogom. Za zagotovitev dobre interpretabilnosti in ustrezne leksikalne uporabe združujemo simbolne in nevralne reprezentacije z uporabo algoritma nevralnega razmišljanja, usposobljenega na splošnih vzročnih tuplicah, da napovedamo naslednji korak vzroka. Naša kvantitativna in človeška analiza kaže empirične dokaze, da naša metoda uspešno izvleče smiselne vzročne povezave med časovnimi vrstami z besedilnimi značilnostmi in ustvari ustrezno razlago med njimi.', 'bo': 'བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཞི་ལུགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་དང་ནུས་པ་ཚོར་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནི་གནད ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟ་བུའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ ཚིག་ཡིག་ནས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་རྟོགས་དགོས་པ་ལས་ འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་དང་། Granger་རྐྱེན་ཐོག་དང་། ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་ཚོའི་ནང རྒྱུ་མཚན་དབྱེ་བ་ཚུགས་ཀྱི་གོ་རྗེས་ལྟར་མཚམས་འཇོག་ནུས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞི་གཅིག་དང To ensure good interpretability and appropriate lexical usage we combine symbolic and neural representations, using a neural reasoning algorithm trained on commonsense causal tuples to predict the next cause step. ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་འབོར་དང་མིའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'A Novel Cascade Model for Learning Latent Similarity from Heterogeneous Sequential Data of MOOC', 'ar': 'نموذج تسلسلي جديد لتعلم التشابه الكامن من البيانات المتسلسلة غير المتجانسة في MOOC', 'es': 'Un nuevo modelo en cascada para aprender la similitud latente a partir de datos secuenciales heterogéneos de MOOC', 'pt': 'Um novo modelo em cascata para aprender similaridade latente a partir de dados sequenciais heterogêneos de MOOC', 'fr': 'Un nouveau modèle en cascade pour apprendre la similitude latente à partir de données séquentielles hétérogènes de MOOC', 'ja': 'MOOCの異種シーケンシャルデータから潜在的な類似性を学習するための新規カスケードモデル', 'zh': '一从MOOC异构序数中学潜相似性者新型级联模', 'hi': 'MOOC के विषम अनुक्रमिक डेटा से अव्यक्त समानता सीखने के लिए एक उपन्यास कैस्केड मॉडल', 'ru': 'Новая каскадная модель для изучения скрытого сходства на основе гетерогенных последовательных данных MOOC', 'ga': 'Samhail Chascáidigh Úrscéalta chun Cosúlachtaí Folaigh a Fhoghlaim ó Shonraí Seicheamhacha Ilchineálacha MOOC', 'el': 'Ένα νέο μοντέλο Cascade για τη μάθηση της λανθάνουσας ομοιότητας από ετερογενή διαδοχικά δεδομένα του MOOC', 'hu': 'Új kaszkádmodell a MOOC heterogén szekvenciális adataiból későbbi hasonlóságok tanulására', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Нов каскаден модел за учење подоцна сличност од хетерогенските секвенцијални податоци на MOOC', 'it': 'Un nuovo modello a cascata per imparare la somiglianza latente dai dati sequenziali eterogeni del MOOC', 'ml': 'മോഡില്\u200d നിന്നും ഹെറോറജെന്നിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാനുള്ള നോവല്\u200d കാസ്കേഡ് മോഡല്\u200dName', 'ms': 'Name', 'lt': 'Naujas kaskado pavyzdys mokytis vėlesnio panašumo iš heterogeninių sekacinių MOOC duomenų', 'mt': 'Mudell ġdid ta’ Kaskata għal Similarità Latenti ta’ Tagħlim minn Dejta Sekwenzjali Eteroġenea ta’ MOOC', 'kk': 'MOOC тегероген келесі мәліметті оқу үшін жаңа каскад моделі', 'pl': 'Nowy model kaskadowy do uczenia się latentnej podobności z heterogennych danych sekwencyjnych MOOC', 'mn': 'Хетерогений дараагийн MOOC-ын өгөгдлийн дараагийн тэнцүү байдлыг сурах Novel Cascade Model', 'sr': 'Novi model kaskade za učenje kasne sličnosti od Heterogenijih sekvencijalnih podataka MOOC-a', 'ro': 'Un nou model cascadă pentru învățarea similarității latente din datele secvențiale eterogene ale MOOC', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'A Novel Cascade Model for Learning Latent Similarity from Heterogeneous Sequential Data of MOOC', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'En ny kaskademodell för att lära sig latent likhet från heterogena sekvensdata från MOOC', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình pha mới để học gần giống nhau từ dữ liệu tình tiết thiên bẩm của MOOC', 'bg': 'Нов каскаден модел за учене на латентна прилика от хетерогенни последователни данни на МООК', 'da': 'En ny kaskademodel til læring af latent lighed fra heterogene sekvensdata fra MOOC', 'nl': 'Een nieuw cascademodel voor het leren van latente gelijkenis van heterogene opeenvolgende gegevens van MOOC', 'hr': 'Model novog kaskade za učenje kasne sličnosti iz Heterogenijih sekvencijskih podataka MOOC-a', 'id': 'Model Kaskade Novel untuk Belajar Similaritas Lambat dari Data Sekuensial Heterogen dari MOOC', 'ko': 'MOOC 이성 서열 데이터에서 잠재적 유사성을 학습하는 새로운 등급 연결 모델', 'fa': 'یک مدل کاسکد نوئل برای یادگیری شبیه\u200cهای تاریخی از داده\u200cهای اضطراری MOOC', 'de': 'Ein neuartiges Kaskadenmodell zum Lernen latenter Ähnlichkeit aus heterogenen Sequenzdaten von MOOC', 'sw': 'Model of Cascade for Learning Later Similarity from Heterogeneous data of MOOC', 'tr': 'A Novel Cascade Model for Learning Latent Similarity from Heterogeneous Sequential Data of MOOC', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'ՄոՕԿ-ի հետերոգեն հաջորդականսային տվյալներից հետո սովորելու նոր կասկադի մոդել', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'MOOC Heterogeneous Sequential Data Data 칬yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n Novel Cascade Modeli', 'bn': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një model i ri kaskadës për mësimin e ngjashmërisë së vonuar nga të dhënat heterogjene seksuale të MOOC', 'bs': 'Model novog kaskade za učenje kasne sličnosti iz Heterogenijih sekvencijskih podataka MOOC-a', 'ca': 'Un nou model de cascade per aprendre la similitud tardia a partir de dades seqüencials heterogènes de MOOC', 'cs': 'Nový kaskádový model pro učení latentní podobnosti z heterogenních sekvenčních dat MOOC', 'fi': 'Uusi Cascade Model for Learning Latent Similarity from Heterogeneous Sequential Data of MOOC', 'et': 'Uus kaskaadimudel hiljutise sarnasuse õppimiseks MOOCi heterogeensetest järjestikustest andmetest', 'he': 'מודל קסקיד חדש ללמוד דמיון מאוחר יותר ממידע רציני טרוגני של MOOC', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'jv': 'A New Kascade model for Learning Laetent Similrity from HeterogNeus Sesecondary data of MOOC', 'sk': 'Novi kaskadni model za učenje latentne podobnosti iz heterogenih zaporednih podatkov MOOC', 'bo': 'A Novel Cascade Model for Learning Latent Similarity from Heterogeneous Sequential Data of MOOC'}
{'en': 'Recent years have witnessed the proliferation of Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). With massive learners being offered MOOCs, there is a demand that the forum contents within MOOCs need to be classified in order to facilitate both learners and instructors. Therefore we investigate a significant application, which is to associate forum threads to subtitles of video clips. This task can be regarded as a document ranking problem, and the key is how to learn a distinguishable text representation from word sequences and learners’ behavior sequences. In this paper, we propose a novel cascade model, which can capture both the latent semantics and latent similarity by modeling MOOC data. Experimental results on two real-world datasets demonstrate that our textual representation outperforms state-of-the-art unsupervised counterparts for the application.', 'ar': 'شهدت السنوات الأخيرة انتشار الدورات التدريبية المفتوحة عبر الإنترنت (MOOCs). مع توفير عدد كبير من المتعلمين MOOCs ، هناك مطلب بضرورة تصنيف محتويات المنتدى داخل MOOCs من أجل تسهيل كل من المتعلمين والمعلمين. لذلك نحن نتحرى عن تطبيق مهم ، وهو ربط سلاسل رسائل المنتدى بترجمات مقاطع الفيديو. يمكن اعتبار هذه المهمة مشكلة تصنيف المستند ، والمفتاح هو كيفية تعلم تمثيل نصي مميز من تسلسل الكلمات وتسلسل سلوك المتعلمين. في هذا البحث ، نقترح نموذجًا متسلسلًا جديدًا يمكنه التقاط كل من الدلالات الكامنة والتشابه الكامن عن طريق نمذجة بيانات MOOC. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات في العالم الحقيقي أن تمثيلنا النصي يتفوق في الأداء على نظرائنا غير الخاضعين للإشراف للتطبيق.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, nous avons assisté à la prolifération des cours en ligne ouverts et massifs (MOOC). Étant donné que de nombreux apprenants se voient proposer des MOOC, il existe une demande pour que le contenu des forums dans les MOOC soit classé afin de faciliter la tâche des apprenants et des instructeurs. C'est pourquoi nous étudions une application importante, qui consiste à associer des fils de discussion de forum aux sous-titres de clips vidéo. Cette tâche peut être considérée comme un problème de classement des documents, et la clé est de savoir comment apprendre une représentation textuelle distinguable à partir de séquences de mots et de séquences de comportement des apprenants. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau modèle en cascade, qui peut capturer à la fois la sémantique latente et la similarité latente en modélisant des données MOOC. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données réels démontrent que notre représentation textuelle surpasse les performances de nos homologues non supervisés de pointe pour l'application.", 'pt': 'Os últimos anos testemunharam a proliferação de Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). Com a oferta de MOOCs para alunos em massa, há uma demanda de que o conteúdo do fórum dentro dos MOOCs precise ser classificado para facilitar tanto os alunos quanto os instrutores. Portanto, investigamos uma aplicação importante, que é associar tópicos do fórum a legendas de videoclipes. Esta tarefa pode ser considerada como um problema de classificação de documentos, e a chave é como aprender uma representação de texto distinguível de sequências de palavras e sequências de comportamento dos alunos. Neste artigo, propomos um novo modelo em cascata, que pode capturar tanto a semântica latente quanto a similaridade latente por meio da modelagem de dados MOOC. Resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados do mundo real demonstram que nossa representação textual supera as contrapartes não supervisionadas de última geração para o aplicativo.', 'es': 'Los últimos años han sido testigos de la proliferación de cursos en línea abiertos y masivos (MOOC). Con la oferta de MOOC a estudiantes masivos, existe la demanda de que los contenidos de los foros dentro de los MOOC se clasifiquen para facilitar tanto a los estudiantes como a los instructores. Por lo tanto, investigamos una aplicación importante, que consiste en asociar los hilos del foro a los subtítulos de los videoclips. Esta tarea puede considerarse como un problema de clasificación de documentos, y la clave es cómo aprender una representación de texto distinguible a partir de secuencias de palabras y secuencias de comportamiento de los alumnos. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de cascada novedoso, que puede capturar tanto la semántica latente como la similitud latente mediante el modelado de datos MOOC. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos del mundo real demuestran que nuestra representación textual supera a las contrapartes no supervisadas de última generación para la aplicación.', 'ja': '近年、MOOC （ Massive Open Online Course ）が急増している。大規模な学習者にはMOOCが提供されているため、学習者とインストラクターの両方を容易にするために、MOOC内のフォーラムの内容を分類する必要がある。したがって、フォーラムのスレッドをビデオクリップの字幕に関連付ける重要なアプリケーションを調査します。この課題は、文書のランク付けの問題と見なすことができ、鍵となるのは、単語シーケンスと学習者の行動シーケンスから区別可能なテキスト表現を学ぶ方法です。本稿では， MOOCデータをモデル化することで，潜在的な意味論と潜在的な類似性の両方を捉えることができる新規のカスケードモデルを提案する． 2つの現実のデータセットの実験結果は、当社のテキスト表現がアプリケーションの最先端の監督されていないカウンターパートよりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '近年以来,大开在线课程(MOOC)激增。 随众学以供MOOC,人须分MOOC中论坛,以便师傅。 是以研求要应用程序,将论坛线程关视频剪辑之字幕。 此可以为文档名,要在单词序与学者之行序,学一可分之文本。 于本文中,立一新级联模,当得对MOOC数建模以获潜语义、潜相似性。 两真实世界数集上之实验结果表明,文本优于应用程序之最先进者无监应。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में बड़े पैमाने पर ओपन ऑनलाइन पाठ्यक्रमों (MOOCs) का प्रसार देखा गया है। बड़े पैमाने पर शिक्षार्थियों को MOOCs की पेशकश की जा रही है, एक मांग है कि MOOCs के भीतर मंच सामग्री को शिक्षार्थियों और प्रशिक्षकों दोनों की सुविधा के लिए वर्गीकृत करने की आवश्यकता है। इसलिए हम एक महत्वपूर्ण आवेदन है, जो वीडियो क्लिप के उपशीर्षक के लिए मंच धागे संबद्ध करने के लिए है की जांच करते हैं। इस कार्य को एक दस्तावेज़ रैंकिंग समस्या के रूप में माना जा सकता है, और कुंजी यह है कि शब्द अनुक्रमों और शिक्षार्थियों के व्यवहार अनुक्रमों से एक अलग पाठ प्रतिनिधित्व कैसे सीखें। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास कैस्केड मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो MOOC डेटा मॉडलिंग द्वारा अव्यक्त शब्दार्थ और अव्यक्त समानता दोनों पर कब्जा कर सकता है। दो वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा पाठ्य प्रतिनिधित्व आवेदन के लिए अत्याधुनिक असुरक्षित समकक्षों को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'В последние годы наблюдается рост числа массовых открытых онлайн-курсов (MOOC). Поскольку массовым учащимся предлагаются MOOC, существует потребность в том, чтобы содержание форума в MOOC было классифицировано, чтобы облегчить как учащимся, так и инструкторам. Поэтому мы исследуем существенное приложение, которое заключается в том, чтобы связать темы форума с субтитрами видеоклипов. Эту задачу можно рассматривать как проблему ранжирования документов, и ключевым моментом является то, как выучить различимое текстовое представление из последовательностей слов и последовательностей поведения учащихся. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую каскадную модель, которая может охватить как латентную семантику, так и латентное сходство путем моделирования данных MOOC. Экспериментальные результаты на двух реальных наборах данных показывают, что наше текстовое представление превосходит современные неконтролируемые аналоги для приложения.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá iomadú Cúrsaí Ollmhóra Oscailte Ar Líne (MOOCs). Agus MOOCanna á dtairiscint ag foghlaimeoirí ollmhóra, tá éileamh ann go gcaithfear ábhar an fhóraim laistigh de MOOCanna a rangú chun foghlaimeoirí agus teagascóirí araon a éascú. Dá bhrí sin déanaimid imscrúdú ar fheidhm shuntasach, is é sin snáitheanna fóraim a cheangal le fotheidil de ghearrthóga físe. Is féidir breathnú ar an tasc seo mar fhadhb rangú doiciméad, agus is é an rud is tábhachtaí ná conas léiriú téacs so-aitheanta a fhoghlaim ó sheichimh focal agus ó sheichimh iompraíochta na bhfoghlaimeoirí. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla nua easghluaiseachta, a fhéadfaidh an tséimeantaic fholaithe agus na cosúlachtaí folaigh a ghabháil trí shonraí MOOC a shamhaltú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí ón bhfíorshaol go sáraíonn ár n-ionadaíocht théacsúil na comhghleacaithe neamh-mhaoirsithe is nua-aimseartha don fheidhmchlár.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια έχουν γίνει μάρτυρες του πολλαπλασιασμού των μαζικών ανοικτών διαδικτυακών μαθημάτων. Με μαζικούς μαθητές να προσφέρονται ΜΟΟΚ, υπάρχει απαίτηση να ταξινομηθούν τα περιεχόμενα του φόρουμ μέσα στα ΜΟΟΚ προκειμένου να διευκολύνονται τόσο οι εκπαιδευτές όσο και οι εκπαιδευτές. Ως εκ τούτου ερευνούμε μια σημαντική εφαρμογή, η οποία είναι να συσχετίσουμε νήματα φόρουμ με υπότιτλους βίντεο κλιπ. Αυτή η εργασία μπορεί να θεωρηθεί ως πρόβλημα κατάταξης εγγράφων και το κλειδί είναι πώς να μάθετε μια διακριτή αναπαράσταση κειμένου από ακολουθίες λέξεων και ακολουθίες συμπεριφοράς των μαθητών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο καταρράκτων, το οποίο μπορεί να συλλάβει τόσο την λανθάνουσα σημασιολογία όσο και την λανθάνουσα ομοιότητα μοντελοποιώντας δεδομένα MOOC. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων του πραγματικού κόσμου δείχνουν ότι η γραπτή αναπαράσταση μας ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα χωρίς επίβλεψη αντίστοιχα για την εφαρμογή.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években a masszív nyílt online kurzusok (MOOC) elterjedésének tanúja volt. Mivel hatalmas tanulóknak MOOC-okat kínálnak, igény van arra, hogy a MOOC-kon belüli fórum tartalmait osztályozni kell, hogy megkönnyítsék mind a tanulókat, mind az oktatókat. Ezért egy jelentős alkalmazást vizsgálunk, amely a fórum szálakat videoklipek felirataihoz társítja. Ez a feladat dokumentum rangsorolási problémának tekinthető, és a kulcs az, hogy hogyan lehet megkülönböztethető szövegábrázolást tanulni a szövegsorozatoktól és a tanulók viselkedési sorozataitól. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új kaszkád modellt javasolunk, amely MOOC adatok modellezésével képes rögzíteni a látens szemantikát és a látens hasonlóságot. Két valós adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy szöveges ábrázolásunk felülmúlja az alkalmazás legkorszerűbb felügyelet nélküli megfelelőit.', 'ka': 'ბოლო წლის შემდეგ მონაცემულების გახსნა მასიური ინტერნეული კურსების გახსნა (MOOCs). მასტიური სწავლებელი MOOCs-ს მოძლევა, აქვს მოთხოვრება, რომ MOOCs-ში ფორმის შესახებ უნდა იყოს კლასიფიკაცია, რომლებიც სწავლებელი და ინსტრუქტორი უნდა იყოს. ამიტომ ჩვენ შევსწავლობთ მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრამა, რომელიც პროგრამის ნაწილი ვიდეო კლიპების ნაწილთან დაკავშირება. ეს დავალება შეიძლება აღმოჩნოთ როგორც დოკუმენტის პრობლემა, და გასაღები არის როგორ აღმოჩნოთ განსხვავებელი ტექსტის გამოსახულება სიტყვების წესებიდან და სწავლებელის ქ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდა პრომენტის კაკადის მოდელს, რომელიც შეუძლია დავწეროთ ლატენტიკური სიმენტიკური და ლატენტიკური განსხვავება MOOC მონაცემებით. ესპერიმენტიური შედეგი ორი რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი ტექსტური რესპეცენტაცია შეუძლებელია მონაცემების სახელსაწყოთა მსოფლიო', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni si è assistito alla proliferazione dei Massive Open Online Courses (MOOC). Con gli studenti enormi che vengono offerti MOOC, c'è una richiesta che i contenuti del forum all'interno dei MOOC devono essere classificati al fine di facilitare sia gli studenti che gli istruttori. Pertanto indaghiamo su un'applicazione significativa, che consiste nell'associare thread del forum ai sottotitoli dei video clip. Questo compito può essere considerato come un problema di classificazione dei documenti, e la chiave è come imparare una rappresentazione del testo distinguibile dalle sequenze di parole e dalle sequenze di comportamento degli studenti. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo modello a cascata, che può catturare sia la semantica latente che la somiglianza latente modellando i dati MOOC. I risultati sperimentali su due set di dati reali dimostrano che la nostra rappresentazione testuale supera le controparti non supervisionate all'avanguardia per l'applicazione.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais buvo stebimas masinių atvirų internetinių kursų plitimas. With massive learners being offered MOOCs, there is a demand that the forum contents within MOOCs need to be classified in order to facilitate both learners and instructors.  Todėl mes tiriame reikšmingą programą, t. y. susieti forumo siūlus su vaizdo klipų subtitrais. Ši užduotis gali būti laikoma dokumentų klasifikavimo problem a, o pagrindinis dalykas – kaip išmokti išskirtinį teksto atstovavimą nuo žodžių sekų ir besimokančiųjų elgesio sekų. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują kaskado model į, kuris gali apimti tiek latentinę semantiką, tiek latentinį panašumą modeliuojant MOOC duomenis. Eksperimentiniai dviejų realiojo pasaulio duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų tekstinis atstovavimas yra geriausias nei naujausia nepastebima paraiškos dalis.', 'ms': 'Tahun-tahun terakhir telah menyaksikan penyebaran Jalan Terbuka Massif Online (MOOCs). Dengan pembelajar besar yang ditawarkan MOOC, terdapat permintaan bahawa kandungan forum dalam MOOC perlu diklasifikasikan untuk memudahkan kedua-dua pembelajar dan pengajar. Therefore we investigate a significant application, which is to associate forum threads to subtitles of video clips.  Tugas ini boleh dianggap sebagai masalah pengukuran dokumen, dan kunci adalah bagaimana untuk belajar perwakilan teks yang boleh dibedakan dari urutan perkataan dan urutan perilaku pelajar. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model kaskad baru, yang boleh menangkap kedua-dua semantik tersembunyi dan persamaan tersembunyi dengan memmodelkan data MOOC. Keputusan percubaan pada dua set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan teks kita lebih berharga daripada rekan-rekan yang tidak diawasi untuk aplikasi.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдар массалық онлайн ашылған мектептерді (MOOCs) жасауға көмектеседі. Көп оқытушыларды MOOC-ге жеткізу үшін, MOOC-ның форумының мазмұнын жұмыс істеу үшін оқытушыларды және инструкторды көмектесу үшін жұмыс істеу керек болады. Сондықтан біз маңызды қолданбаны зерттеп, бұл форум ілеспелерін видео клиптерінің субтитрлеріне байланыстыру. Бұл тапсырманы құжаттарды реттеу мәселесі ретінде қалай көрсетеді, және кілті сөздердің ретінде және оқушылардың әрекеттерінен бөлек мәтінді көрсету ретінде үйрене алады. Бұл қағазда, MOOC деректерін моделдеу үшін жаңа каскад үлгісін қолданамыз. Екі шын әлемдегі деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері мәтіндік таңдауымыз қолданбаның күйіне қарсы жоқ деп көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните години се сведоци на проширувањето на масовните отворени онлајн курси. Со масовните ученици кои се нудат МООК, постои барање содржината на форумот во рамките на МООК да се класификува со цел да се олесни учениците и инструкторите. Затоа истражуваме значајна апликација, која е поврзување на форумските жици со субтитулите на видео клиповите. Оваа задача може да се смета за проблем со рангирањето на документите, а клучот е како да се научи различен текст претставување од зборовите и однесувањето на учениците. Во овој весник, предложуваме нов каскаден модел, кој може да ја зафати и тајната семантика и тајната сличност со моделирање на податоците на МООК. Експерименталните резултати на двата бази на податоци на реалниот свет покажуваат дека нашето текстуално претставување ги надминува најсовремените ненадгледувани колеги за апликацијата.', 'ml': 'Recent years have witnessed the proliferation of Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs).  മോക്സിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള ഫോറമിന്റെ ഉള്ളടക്കങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്പിള്\u200d ചെയ്യേണ്ടതാണ്, പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കും ഉപദേശികള്\u200dക്കും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ് അതുകൊണ്ട് വീഡിയോ ക്ലിപ്പുകളുടെ സബ്റ്റെട്ടിലേക്ക് ഫോറമിലെ ത്രൂഡുകള്\u200d പങ്കാളിയാക്കുന്നതാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ ജോലി റെങ്കിങ് പ്രശ്നം എന്ന പ്രശ്നമായി കരുതുന്നതാണ്. വാക്കിന്റെ സെക്കന്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d കാസ്കേഡ് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് പുതിയ സെമാന്റിക്സും പുതിയ അവസാനത്തെ പിടികൂടു രണ്ട് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പ്രയോഗത്ത', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн жилүүд Массан Онлайн Их Сургууль (MOOC) дээр нэмэгдсэн бөгөөд Маш олон сурагчид МООК-д санал өгсөн болохоор, МООК-д сурагчид болон багш нарын тусламжтайгаа хуваалцах хэрэгтэй болно. Тиймээс бид үнэхээр чухал хэрэгжүүлэлтийг судалж байна. Энэ бол форум хэлбэрүүдийг видео клипуудын зурагтай холбоотой. Энэ үйл ажиллагаа баримтын дарааллын асуудал гэж үзэж болно. Харин чухал нь үгийн дарааллаас, сурагчидын үйл ажиллагааны дарааллаас ялгаатай текст үзүүлэлтийг хэрхэн сурах вэ? Энэ цаасан дээр бид зохиолын каскад загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь MOOC өгөгдлийг модельчлахад хоёуланг хоёуланг болон халдвартай адилтгалыг барьж болно. Хоёр жинхэнэ дэлхийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний текстур дүрслэл нь хэрэглээний төлөөлөл болон урлагийн төлөөлөөлөгдсөн хүмүүсийг ашиглаж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år har vitne at utvidelsen av massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) er utvida. Med massivt lærarar som vert tilbygd MOOCs, er det ein førespurnad for at innhaldet i MOOCs må bli klassifisert for å gjere både lærarar og instruktorar. Det er derfor vi undersøker eit viktig program, som er å tilknytte forumstrådar til subtitler av videoklipp. Denne oppgåva kan verta kalla til eit dokumentrankeringsproblem, og nøkkelen er korleis å læra ein forskjellig tekstrepresentasjon frå ordsekvens og lærarans atferdssekvens. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt kaskadmodell, som kan henta både latent semantikk og latent likning ved modellering av MOOC-data. Eksperimentale resultat på to datasett for verkeleg viser at tekst-representasjonen vår utfører tilstanden av kunsten ikkje er oppretta mottakarar for programmet.', 'ro': 'Ultimii ani au fost martorii proliferării cursurilor online deschise masive (MOOC). Având în vedere că cursanții masivi li se oferă MOOC, există o cerere ca conținutul forumului din MOOC să fie clasificat pentru a facilita atât cursanții, cât și instructorii. Prin urmare, investigăm o aplicație semnificativă, care este de a asocia subiectele forumului cu subtitrările clipurilor video. Această sarcină poate fi considerată o problemă de clasificare a documentelor, iar cheia este cum să învățați o reprezentare a textului distinctivă de secvențele de cuvinte și secvențele comportamentale ale elevilor. În această lucrare, propunem un nou model în cascadă, care poate surprinde atât semantica latentă, cât și similaritatea latentă prin modelarea datelor MOOC. Rezultatele experimentale pe două seturi de date din lumea reală demonstrează că reprezentarea noastră textuală depășește omologii de ultimă generație nesupravegheați pentru aplicație.', 'mt': 'L-aħħar snin xhiedu l-proliferazzjoni ta’ Korsijiet Massivi Miftuħa Online (MOOCs). Billi jiġu offruti MOOCs għal studenti kbar, hemm domanda li l-kontenut tal-forum fi ħdan MOOCs jeħtieġ li jiġi kklassifikat sabiex jiġu ffaċilitati kemm l-istudenti kif ukoll l-għalliema. Għalhekk ninvestigaw applikazzjoni sinifikanti, li hija li jiġu assoċjati l-ħjut tal-forum mas-subtitli tal-video clips. Dan il-kompitu jista’ jitqies bħala problem a tal-klassifikazzjoni tad-dokument, u l-kunċett huwa kif titgħallem rappreżentazzjoni distintiva tat-test mis-sekwenzi tal-kliem u s-sekwenzi tal-imġiba tal-istudenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ kaskata, li jista’ jinkludi kemm is-semantika moħbija kif ukoll is-similarità moħbija billi nimmudellaw id-dejta MOOC. Riżultati esperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li r-rappreżentanza testwali tagħna tirrappreżenta l-aktar kontropartijiet moderni mhux sorveljati għall-applikazzjoni.', 'sr': 'Poslednje godine su svjedoci proširenju masovnih otvorenih online kursa (MOOC). S obzirom da se mnogim učenicima ponudi MOOC, postoji zahtev da sadržaj forum a unutar MOOC-a mora biti klasifikovan kako bi olakšao učenike i instruktore. Stoga istražujemo značajnu aplikaciju, koja je da povežemo forumske trgovine sa podnaslovima video klipova. Ovaj zadatak se može smatrati problemom u redovima dokumenta, a ključ je kako naučiti različiti predstavljanje teksta iz redovišta riječi i sekvence ponašanja učenika. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model kaskade, koji može uhvatiti i latentnu semantiku i latentnu sličnost modelima MOOC podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naša tekstualna predstavljanja iznosi države umjetnosti nepotrebne kolege za aplikaciju.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie lata były świadkami rozprzestrzeniania się masywnych otwartych kursów online (MOOCs). Ponieważ masowym uczniom oferowane są MOOC, istnieje wymaganie, aby treści forum w MOOC były klasyfikowane, aby ułatwić zarówno uczniom, jak i instruktorom. Dlatego badamy znaczącą aplikację, jaką jest kojarzenie wątków forum z napisami klipów wideo. Zadanie to można uznać za problem rankingu dokumentów, a kluczem jest nauka odróżniającej się reprezentacji tekstu od sekwencji słów i sekwencji zachowań uczących się. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy model kaskadowy, który może uchwycić zarówno skrytą semantykę, jak i skrytą podobieństwo poprzez modelowanie danych MOOC. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasza reprezentacja tekstowa przewyższa najnowocześniejsze bez nadzoru odpowiedniki aplikacji.', 'sv': 'De senaste åren har bevittnat spridningen av Massive Open Online Courses (MOOC). Med massiva elever som erbjuds MOOC finns det ett krav på att foruminnehållet inom MOOC måste klassificeras för att underlätta både elever och instruktörer. Därför undersöker vi en betydande applikation, som är att associera forumtrådar till undertexter på videoklipp. Denna uppgift kan betraktas som ett dokumentrankningsproblem, och nyckeln är hur man lär sig en särskiljbar textrepresentation från ordsekvenser och elevers beteendesekvenser. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny kaskadmodell, som kan fånga både latent semantik och latent likhet genom att modellera MOOC data. Experimentella resultat på två datauppsättningar i verkligheten visar att vår textrepresentation överträffar toppmoderna oövervakade motsvarigheter för applikationen.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුද්දේවල් සාක්ෂික විශාල විස්තර කරනවා (MOOCs). ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන්ට MOOCs දෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, MOOCs වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ඕනි විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන්ට ඉතින් අපි වීඩියෝ ක්ලිප්ස් වලින් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒක තමයි වීඩියෝ ක්ලිප්ස් ව මේ කාර්ය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ඒ වගේම යතුර තමයි විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් පාළුවක් පෙනු මේ පත්තරේ අපි නියම කැස්කේඩ් නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒක පුළුවන් MOOC තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් ලේටින් සි ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සටහන් දෙකක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට අපේ පාළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරත', 'so': 'Sanooyinkii la soo dhowaaday waxay markhaati furan yihiin koritaanka koorasyada furan ee internetka (MOOCs). Markii waxbarasho badan la siiyo MOOOCs, waxaa laga baahan yahay in la qoro kooxaha warqadda ku jira MOOOCs, si ay u fududaato waxbarashada iyo hagayaasha. Sidaa darteed waxaynu baaraynaa codsi muhiim ah, kaas oo ah in lagu wadanayo koorasyada warqadaha fiidiyowga lagu qorayo meelaha lagu qorayo. Shaqadan waxaa looga tirin karaa dhibaato qoraal ah oo la soo bandhigayo, fursadkuna waa sida aad u barto macluumaad kala duduwan oo looga jeedo qoraalka kala duwan iyo hababka tababarka barta. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model kaskade ee warqaddan, kaas oo ku qabsan kara labada ismidab ee ugu dambeeyay iyo si u eg sameynta macluumaadka MOOC. Imtixaanka labada macluumaad ee caalamiga ah waxay muujiyaan in noogu wakiilo qoraal ah uu soo bandhigayo wadamada farshaxanka ee codsiga aan la ilaalinayn.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகள் பெரிய திறந்த இணைய மாற்றங்களின் வளர்ச்சியை பார்த்துள்ளன (MOOOCs). MOOCs வழங்கப்படும் பெரிய கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் படிப்பவர்களுடன், MOOCs உள்ளுள்ள குறிப்புகளின் உள்ளடக்கங்களை வகைப்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்று ஒரு கேட எனவே நாம் ஒரு முக்கியமான பயன்பாட்டை ஆராய்க்கிறோம், அது வீடியோ கிளிப்புகளின் துணை தலைப்புகளை இணைக்கும். இந்த செயல் ஒரு ஆவண வரிசைப்படுத்தல் பிரச்சினையாக கருதப்படும், விசை எப்படி வார்த்தை வரிசைகளில் இருந்து மாறுபடுத்தப்படும் உரை பிரதிநிதி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய காஸ்கேட் மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது சமீபத்தில் பாதிப்பு மற்றும் சமீபத்தில் ஒத்திசை இரண்டு உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களின் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் பயன்பாட்டிற்கான பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اگلوں سالوں نے بڑے کھولے آنلاین کورس (MOOCs) کے گھیرنے کی گواہی دی ہے۔ مواکس کے ساتھ بہت سی تعلیم کرنے والوں کو پیش کیا جاتا ہے، ایک درخواست ہے کہ مواکس کے اندر فرموم کی محتویات مختلف ہونے کی ضرورت ہے تاکہ ان دونوں کی تعلیم کرنے والوں اور استعمال کرنے والوں کو آسان کرے۔ لہٰذا ہم ایک معتبر کاربری کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جو فرموم ترڈ کو ویڈیو کلیپ کے subtitles میں شریک کرنا ہے۔ یہ کام لکھنے والی مسئلہ کی طرح سمجھ سکتا ہے، اور کلید یہ ہے کہ لکھنے والی اورلکھنے والوں کے رفتار کی سفارش سے ایک متفرق لکھنے والی پیغام کی تعلیم کو کس طرح سیکھ سکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی کاسکیڈ موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو MOOC ڈاٹ کی مدل کے ذریعہ لاٹینٹ سیمانٹیک اور لاٹینٹ سیمانٹی کو پکڑ سکتا ہے۔ دو حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری ٹیکسٹل کی نمایش یہ کاربرد کے لئے بغیر قابل تحمل نہیں کی جاتی۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda yil ochilgan Online kursorlari (MOOCs) soni ko'rdi. Muhim o'rganishlar bilan MOOOCs tilida o'rganishlar bilan, MOOOCning orasidagi forum tarkibini klassiflash kerak, o'rganish va taʼminlovchilarga foydalanish uchun. Shunday qilib, biz juda muhim dasturni boshqaramiz, bu video kliptlarining tub sarlavhasini birlashtirish mumkin. Bu vazifa chegara boʻlgan hujjatning muammosi deb hisoblanadi, va kalit soʻzning chegaralari va amalning tabiiy chegaralarini o'rganishni qanday o'rganish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz novel kaskade modelini talab qilamiz, bu yangi semantika va yangi xil tilni MOOC maʼlumotni modellash mumkin. Ikki haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibida taʼminlovchi natijalari dastur uchun tuzilmagan saqlash holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Những năm gần đây đã chứng kiến sự gia tăng các kênh mạng khổng lồ (ROM). Với những đệ tử hàng loạt được đề nghị tổ chức MOOCs, một yêu cầu rằng nội dung của forum phải được phân loại để giúp cả học sinh lẫn giáo viên. Do đó chúng tôi điều tra một ứng dụng quan trọng, gồm việc liên kết các mối forum với phụ đề của đoạn băng. Nhiệm vụ này có thể được coi là vấn đề xếp hạng tài liệu, và mấu chốt là học cách phân biệt chữ phân biệt từ dãy Từ và dãy trình ứng của học viên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một kiểu dây chuyền mới, nó có thể nắm bắt cả hai nét chữ Ấn và nét giống ẩn bằng cách tạo dữ liệu MOOC. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu thế giới thực chứng minh rằng sự đại diện của chúng ta hoàn thiện các đối tác không giám sát.', 'bg': 'Последните години станаха свидетели на разпространението на масови отворени онлайн курсове (МООК). С предлагането на масивни обучаеми има изискване съдържанието на форума да бъде класифицирано, за да се улесни както обучаемите, така и инструкторите. Ето защо ние разследваме значително приложение, което е да свързваме форумни теми със субтитри на видео клипове. Тази задача може да се разглежда като проблем за класиране на документи, а ключът е как да се научи разграничаващо се текстово представяне от последователности на думи и последователности на поведение на учащите. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов каскаден модел, който може да улови както латентната семантика, така и латентната прилика чрез моделиране на данни от МООК. Експерименталните резултати на два набора от данни от реалния свят показват, че нашето текстово представяне превъзхожда най-съвременните ненадзорни контрагенти за приложението.', 'hr': 'Posljednje godine su svjedoci proširenju masovnih otvorenih online kursa (MOOC). S obzirom da se mnogim učenicima nude MOOC, postoji zahtjev da sadržaj forum a unutar MOOC-a mora biti klasifikiran kako bi olakšao učenike i instruktore. Stoga istražujemo značajnu primjenu, koja je da povežemo forumske trgovine podtituljima snimka. Ovaj zadatak se može smatrati problemom reda dokumenta, a ključ je kako naučiti različiti predstavljanje teksta iz redova riječi i redova ponašanja učenika. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model kaskade, koji može uhvatiti latentne semantike i latentne sličnosti modelizacijom MOOC podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka o stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naša tekstualna predstavljanja iznosi države umjetnosti nepotrebne kolege za zahtjev.', 'nl': "De afgelopen jaren zijn er getuige geweest van de proliferatie van Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). Nu er massale cursisten MOOC's worden aangeboden, is er een eis dat de foruminhoud binnen MOOC's moet worden geclassificeerd om zowel studenten als instructeurs te vergemakkelijken. Daarom onderzoeken we een significante toepassing, namelijk het koppelen van forumthreads aan ondertitels van videoclips. Deze taak kan worden beschouwd als een document ranking probleem, en de sleutel is hoe een onderscheidbare tekstrepresentatie te leren van woordsequenties en gedragssequenties van leerlingen. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw cascademodel voor, dat zowel de latente semantiek als latente gelijkenis kan vastleggen door MOOC data te modelleren. Experimentele resultaten op twee real-world datasets tonen aan dat onze tekstuele representatie beter presteert dan state-of-the-art onbeheerde tegenhangers voor de toepassing.", 'da': 'De seneste år har været vidne til spredningen af Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). Med massive elever, der tilbydes MOOCs, er der et krav om, at forumindholdet i MOOCs skal klassificeres for at lette både elever og instruktører. Derfor undersøger vi en betydelig applikation, som er at knytte forum tråde til undertekster på videoklip. Denne opgave kan betragtes som et problem med dokumentranking, og nøglen er, hvordan man lærer en skelnelig tekstrepræsentation fra ordsekvenser og elevernes adfærdssekvenser. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny kaskademodel, som kan fange både latent semantik og latent lighed ved at modellere MOOC data. Eksperimentelle resultater på to datasæt fra den virkelige verden viser, at vores tekstrepræsentation overgår state-of-the-art uautoriserede modparter til applikationen.', 'id': 'Tahun-tahun terakhir telah menyaksikan proliferasi dari Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). Dengan pembelajaran besar yang ditawarkan MOOC, ada permintaan bahwa isi forum dalam MOOC perlu diklasifikasi untuk memudahkan kedua pembelajaran dan instruktur. Oleh karena itu kami menyelidiki aplikasi yang signifikan, yaitu untuk mengassokasikan benang forum ke subtitle video clips. Tugas ini dapat dianggap sebagai masalah penangkapan dokumen, dan kunci adalah bagaimana untuk belajar sebuah representation teks yang dapat dibedakan dari urutan kata dan urutan perilaku para pelajar. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model kaskade novel, yang dapat menangkap semantik yang tersembunyi dan persamaan yang tersembunyi dengan model data MOOC. Hasil percobaan pada dua set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa representation teks kita lebih berharga dari rekan-rekan yang tidak diawasi untuk aplikasi.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren wurde die Verbreitung von Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) beobachtet. Da massive Lernende MOOCs angeboten werden, besteht die Forderung, dass die Foreninhalte innerhalb von MOOCs klassifiziert werden müssen, um sowohl Lernenden als auch Dozenten zu erleichtern. Daher untersuchen wir eine bedeutende Anwendung, die darin besteht, Forentreads mit Untertiteln von Videoclips zu verknüpfen. Diese Aufgabe kann als Dokument-Ranking-Problem betrachtet werden, und der Schlüssel ist, wie man eine unterscheidbare Textdarstellung aus Wortsequenzen und Verhaltenssequenzen der Lernenden lernt. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neuartiges Kaskadenmodell vor, das sowohl latente Semantik als auch latente Ähnlichkeit durch Modellierung von MOOC-Daten erfassen kann. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an zwei realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unsere Textdarstellung die neuesten unbeaufsichtigten Pendants für die Anwendung übertrifft.', 'fa': 'سالهای اخیر شاهد گسترش درس\u200cهای بسیار باز آنلاین (MOOCs) بودند. با اینکه دانش آموزان زیادی به MOOCs پیشنهاد می\u200cشود، یک درخواست هست که محتویات فرومی در MOOCs باید مخفی بشه تا هر دو دانش آموزان و آموزش آموزش دهند. بنابراین ما یک کاربرد مهم را تحقیق می کنیم، که این است که نقشه\u200cهای فرومی را به عنوان زیر عنوان کلیپ\u200cهای ویدئو متصل کنیم. این کار می\u200cتواند به عنوان یک مشکل رشته\u200cبندی سند برگزار شود، و کلید چگونه یک نمایش متن متفاوت را از رشته\u200cبندی کلمات و رشته\u200cهای رفتاری دانش\u200cکنندگان یاد بگیرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل کاسکید نو پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند از طریق نمونه داده\u200cهای MOOC هر دو سیمانتیک latent و شباهت latent را بگیرد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی متن\u200cمان شرکت\u200cهای هنری را برای کاربرد بی\u200cنیاز انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 대규모 온라인 개방 과정(MOOC)이 급증했다.많은 학습자에게 MOOC가 제공됨에 따라 학습자와 강사를 편리하게 하기 위해 MOOC의 포럼 내용을 분류해달라는 요구가 나왔다.따라서 우리는 포럼 라인과 영상 단편의 자막이 연결되는 중요한 응용을 연구했다.이 작업은 문서 정렬 문제로 볼 수 있는데, 관건은 단어 서열과 학습자의 행위 서열에서 구분할 수 있는 텍스트 표시를 어떻게 배우는가이다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 등급 연결 모델을 제시했는데 모델 MOOC 데이터를 통해 잠재적 의미와 잠재적 유사성을 포착할 수 있다.두 개의 무감독 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 텍스트가 나타내는 성능이 무감독 데이터 집합보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'tr': "Soňky ýyllar Aç Halka Çaltylyklaryň (MOOCs) döwletlerini tanaýarlar. MOOC'a golaý öwrenýän adamlar bilen, MOOC'yň içindeki forumlaryň hem öwrenmegi hem öwrenmegi hem mugallymlary bejermek üçin klassif edilmesi gerek. Şol sebäpli biz esasy bir uygulama çykarýarys, bu da forum dinini video klipleriniň altynda çarpmalydygyny çalyşýarys. Bu zady sened çykarmak meselesi diýip görkezilip biler, we a çary söz dizirlerinden we öwrenlerin davranışyny nädip öwrenip biler. Bu kagyzda, MOOC maglumatlary modelleýäniň hem soňky semantikleriň hem ýakynlaşyklaryny çekebilir bir roman nusgasyny teklip edip bileris. Iki sany dünýäde maglumat setiriniň örän netijesi biziň tekstüň çykyşymyzyň uygulama üçin garşymyz ýok bolandygyny kanıtlaýar.", 'sw': 'Miaka ya hivi karibuni imeshuhudia kuongezeka kwa masomo makubwa ya Mafuriko ya Mtandaoni (MOOCs). Wakati wanafunzi wengi wakitolewa kwa mashirika ya MOOOCs, kuna madai ya kuwa yaliyomo katika viwanja vya MOOCs yanahitaji kutangazwa ili kuwawezesha wanafunzi na wahariri wote. Kwa hiyo tunachunguza matumizi makubwa, ambayo ni kushirikiana na matangazo ya jukwaa kwenye viungo vya video. Kazi hii inaweza kuchukuliwa kama tatizo la nyaraka, na ufunguo ni namna ya kujifunza uwakilishi wa maandishi tofauti kutoka kwa mfululizo wa maneno na namna ya kujifunza tabia. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya kaskade ya riwaya, ambayo inaweza kushika mifano ya hivi karibuni na usawa wa hivi karibuni kwa kutengeneza takwimu za MOOC. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na takwimu mbili za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kwamba uwakilishi wetu wa kimsingi unafanya watetezi wa sanaa wasiohifadhiwa kwa ajili ya programu hiyo.', 'sq': 'Vitet e fundit janë dëshmitarë të përhapjes së kurseve masive të hapura online (MOOC). Me nxënësit masivë që ofrohen MOOC, ekziston një kërkesë që përmbajtja e forumit brenda MOOC duhet të klasifikohet me qëllim që të lehtësohet si nxënësit ashtu edhe instruktorët. Kështu që ne hetojmë një aplikim të rëndësishëm, i cili është të bashkojmë filat e forumit me subtitlet e video clips. Kjo detyrë mund të konsiderohet si një problem i renditjes së dokumentit dhe çelësi është se si të mësohet një përfaqësim i dalluar teksti nga sekuencat e fjalëve dhe sekuencat e sjelljes së mësuesve. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një model të ri kaskadë, i cili mund të kapë si semantikën e fshehtë dhe ngjashmërinë e fshehtë duke modeluar të dhënat MOOC. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy grupe të dhënash të botës reale demonstrojnë se përfaqësimi ynë tekstual përfaqëson homologët më të lartë të pazgjidhur për aplikimin.', 'af': "Onlangse jaar het getuig die verlenging van Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs). Met massiewe leerneerdes wat MOOCs aanbied word, is daar 'n versoek dat die forum inhoud binne MOOCs moet klassifiseer word om beide leerneerdes en instrukteurs te maak. Daarom ondersoek ons 'n betekende toepassing, wat is om forum gedragte te asosialiseer na subtitles van video klippe. Hierdie taak kan wees aangesien as 'n dokument rangering probleem, en die sleutel is hoe om 'n verskillende teks verteenwoording te leer van woord volgorde en leerders se gedrag volgorde. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n roman kaskade model, wat kan neem beide die latente semantieke en latente gelykenis deur MOOC data te modelleer. Eksperimentale resultate op twee reël wêreld datastelle bevestig dat ons tekstuele verteenwoording uitvoer staat-van-kunsten-ononderwerpende kunstenaars vir die aansoek.", 'am': 'የቀድሞው ዓመታት የጋዜጠኛ ክፈት የመስመር ኮርቨርስቲ (MOOCs) ማስታወቂያውን ነው፡፡ ተማሪዎች እና ተማሪዎችን ለማግኘት የጦማር ውይይት ውስጥ ያሉት የጦማሪያው ውይይት መክፈት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ስለዚህም የፎርማት መድረኮችን ለቪዲዮ ክፍሎች አቀማመጥ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ይህም ስራ የሰነድ ጉዳይ እንዲያየው ይቻላል፥ ቁልፎችም ከንግግር ግንኙነት እና ተማሪዎችን ድርጊት እንዲያስተምር እንዴት ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የረኀብ ካስካድድ ሞዴል እና የቀድሞውን እና የቀድሞውን የMOOC ዳታዎችን በመዘርጋት የሚችል ነው፡፡ በሁለት እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታተሮች ላይ የመፈተና ውጤቶች የጽሑፍ መልዕክታችን ለፕሮግራሙ የተጠበቀውን የዓላማ ተቃዋሚዎችን እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիները ականատես են եղել զանգվածային բաց առցանց դասընթացների տարածմանը: Երբ մեծ քանակությամբ ուսանողներին առաջարկում են ՄՕՕ-ներ, պահանջվում է, որ ՄՕՕ-ների ներսում գտնվող ֆորմի պարունակությունը պետք է դասակարգված լինի, որպեսզի հեշտացնեն ուսանողներին և ուսուցիչներին: Այդ պատճառով մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մի կարևոր ծրագիր, որը նշանակում է խմբի թելերը միացնել տեսագրաֆիլմերի ենթագծերին: Այս խնդիրը կարելի է համարել փաստաթղթի դասակարգման խնդիր, և կարևորը այն է, թե ինչպես սովորել տարբերակելի տեքստի ներկայացումը բառերի հաջորդականություններից և ուսանողների վարքագծային հաջորդականություններից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր կասկադի մոդել, որը կարող է վերցնել բացահայտված սեմանտիկան և բացահայտված նմանությունը մոդելների միջոցով: Երկու իրական աշխարհի տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր տեքստային ներկայացումը արտահայտում է ամենաբարձր անվերահսկված համագործակցությունը ծրագրի համար:', 'az': 'Son illərdə Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs) genişlənməsinə şahid oldular. MOOC təklif edilən böyük öyrənənənlərlə, MOOC içərisində forum içərisində ehtiyacı var ki, öyrənənənləri və öyrənənənləri asanlaşdırmaq üçün gizli olmalıdır. Beləliklə, biz çox möhkəm bir uyğulama təşkil edirik, ki, forum sonlarını video cliplərin altyazılarına bağlamaq. Bu işi döküm sıralama problemi olaraq, a çar sözlərin sıralamasından və öyrənənənlərin davranışlarının sıralamasından ayırılabilir metin göstəricisi necə öyrənə bilər. Bu kağızda yeni kascada modeli təklif edirik ki, MOOC məlumatlarını modelləşdirərək latent semantik və latent similitəsini alır. İki həqiqət dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrinin təcrübələrinin təcrübələrinin uyğunlaşdırması üçün müəyyən edilməmiş müsəlmanların istifadə edilməsini göstərir.', 'bs': 'Poslednje godine su svjedoci proširenju masovnih otvorenih online kursa (MOOCs). S obzirom na ponudu masivnih učenika MOOC-a, postoji zahtjev da sadržaj foruma unutar MOOC-a mora biti klasifikovan kako bi olakšao učenike i instruktore. Stoga istražujemo značajnu prijavu, koja je da povežemo forumske trgovine sa podnaslovima video klipa. Ovaj zadatak se može smatrati problemom reda dokumenta, a ključ je kako naučiti različitu predstavu teksta iz redova riječi i redova ponašanja učenika. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model kaskade, koji može uhvatiti latentne semantike i latentne sličnosti modelizacijom MOOC podataka. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da naša tekstualna predstavljanja iznosi države umjetnosti nepotrebne kolege za prijavu.', 'bn': 'Recent years have witnessed the proliferation of Massive Open Online Courses (MOOCs).  বিশাল শিক্ষার্থীদের প্রস্তাব দেওয়া হচ্ছে মোওক্সের ভেতরে ফোরামের বিষয়বস্তু শিক্ষকদের আর শিক্ষকদের সুবিধা দেয়ার জন্য। তাই আমরা একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন অনুসন্ধান করি, যা ভিডিও ক্লিপের সাবটাইটেলে ফোরাম থ্রিডের সাথে যুক এই কাজটি একটি নথির রেঙ্কিং সমস্যা হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা যাবে এবং চাবি কিভাবে শব্দের সেকেন্স এবং শিক্ষার আচরণের বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নভেল ক্যাস্কেড মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যা সাম্প্রতিক সেমেন্টিক এবং সম্প্রতি সাম্প্রতিক সমতার মাধ্যমে MOOC তথ্য ম দুই বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের টেক্সচুয়াল প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য', 'ca': "Els últims anys han assistit a la proliferació de curss massius oberts en línia. Amb l'oferta d'estudiants massius de MOOC, hi ha una exigència que els continguts del fòrum a l'interior dels MOOC siguin classificats per facilitar tant els estudiants com els instructors. Així que investigam una aplicació significativa, que és associar fils del fòrum amb subtítulos de vídeos. Aquesta tasca es pot considerar un problem a de classificació de documents, i la clau és com aprendre una representació distingible del text de les seqüències de paraules i el comportament dels alumnes. En aquest article proposem un nou model de cascade, que pot capturar tant la semàntica latent com la similitud latent modelant les dades MOOC. Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades del món real demostren que la nostra representació textual supera les homologues no supervisades de l'última generació de l'aplicació.", 'cs': 'Poslední roky byly svědky šíření masivních otevřených online kurzů (MOOCs). Vzhledem k tomu, že masivní studenti jsou nabízeny MOOCs, existuje požadavek, aby obsah fóra v rámci MOOCs byl klasifikován, aby usnadnil jak studentům, tak instruktorům. Proto zkoumáme významnou aplikaci, kterou je spojovat vlákna fóra s titulky videoklipů. Tento úkol lze považovat za problém hodnocení dokumentů a klíčem je, jak se naučit odlišitelnou reprezentaci textu od slovních sekvencí a chování žáků. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový kaskádový model, který dokáže zachytit latentní sémantiku i latentní podobnost modelováním MOOC dat. Experimentální výsledky na dvou skutečných datových sadách ukazují, že naše textová reprezentace překonává nejmodernější protějšky bez dohledu pro danou aplikaci.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on olnud tunnistajaks massiivsete avatud online-kursuste (MOOC) levikule. Kuna massiivseid õppijaid pakutakse MOOC-id, on nõudlus, et foorumi sisu MOOC-ides tuleb klassifitseerida, et hõlbustada nii õppijaid kui ka instruktoriid. Seetõttu uurime olulist rakendust, milleks on seostada foorumi lõimed videoklippide subtiitritega. Seda ülesannet võib pidada dokumendi järjestamise probleemiks ja võtmeks on, kuidas õppida eristatavat teksti esitust sõnade järjestustest ja õppijate käitumise järjestustest. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse kaskaadimudeli, mis suudab jäädvustada nii latentsemantikat kui ka latentset sarnasust MOOC andmete modelleerimisega. Kahe reaalmaailma andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie tekstiline esitus ületab rakenduse puhul kaasaegseid järelevalveta vastastikke.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina on nähty massiivisten avoimien online-kurssien (MOOC) leviämistä. Koska massiivisille opiskelijoille tarjotaan MOOC-ohjelmia, on olemassa vaatimus, että foorumin sisältö MOOC-ohjelmissa on luokiteltava niin oppijoiden kuin ohjaajien helpottamiseksi. Siksi tutkimme merkittävää sovellusta, joka on liittää keskusteluketjut videoleikkeiden tekstityksiin. Tätä tehtävää voidaan pitää dokumenttien ranking-ongelmana, ja avainasemassa on se, miten oppia erottuva tekstiesitys sanasekvensseistä ja oppijoiden käyttäytymissekvensseistä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta kaskadimallia, joka pystyy kuvaamaan sekä piilevän semantiikan että piilevän samankaltaisuuden mallintamalla MOOC-dataa. Kokeelliset tulokset kahdesta reaalimaailman aineistosta osoittavat, että tekstiesityksemme suoriutuu sovelluksen huipputason valvomattomasta vastineesta.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno yakuné bewat kelompok tarjamahan Open online (MOOCs). TODO Kaya awak dhéwé nyonggunaké aplikasi sing berarti, iki dadi kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo tarjamahan kanggo video Clip. task_BAR_ Nanging kuwi iki, kita supoyo model kanggo nyeyane, iso nggawe semanti karo ngono terus-terus marilah karo model MOOC data . Ngucap Ciro', 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih je priča širjenju množičnih odprtih spletnih tečajev (MOOC). Ker so množičnim učencem na voljo MOOC, obstaja zahteva, da je treba vsebine foruma znotraj MOOC razvrstiti, da bi olajšali učence in inštruktorje. Zato raziskujemo pomembno aplikacijo, ki je povezovanje forumskih niti s podnapisi videoposnetkov. To nalogo je mogoče obravnavati kot problem razvrščanja dokumentov, ključno pa je, kako se naučiti različnega besedilnega predstavitve od besednih zaporedij in vedenjskih zaporedij učencev. V prispevku predlagamo nov kaskadni model, ki lahko z modeliranjem MOOC podatkov zajame tako latentno semantiko kot latentno podobnost. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dveh resničnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da je naša besedilna reprezentacija boljša od najsodobnejših brez nadzora pri aplikaciji.', 'ha': "A yanzu shẽkaru sun halarce the prolife of Massiƙan Open Cursors (MOOOCs). Ko da jama'a masu ƙara da aka motsa MOOOCs, there ya ƙayyade cewa an rarraba kayan Forum cikin MOOOCs, dõmin ya yi amfani da masu lõkaci da shiryarwa. Saboda haka, munã ƙidãya wani shirin ayuka mai girma, wanda ke haɗa matsayin Forum zuwa sunan takardar video. Wannan aikin za'a ƙayyade shi kamar wata takardar da za'a yi fassara, kuma maɓalli yana zama yadda za a sanar da wani mai daidaita matsayi mai rarraba daga masu sequence da masu sani. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wani misalin kaskade na nowaya, wanda ke iya iya kãma duk na semantiki da masu ƙara da ke daidaita, da kuma misalin data na MOOC. Mataimakin da aka samu danna biyu masu cikin duniya gaskiya sun nuna cewa misalinmu na rubutun na ƙarfafa fassarar-state-of-the-art wanda ba'a tsare wa shirin ayuka.", 'he': "השנים האחרונות היו עדים לפרידה של קורסים אונליין פתוחים מסיביים (MOOCs). עם תלמידים מסיביים מוצעים MOOCs, יש דרישה שתוכל הפורום בתוך MOOCs צריך להיות מסווג כדי להקל גם למלמלמידים וגם למורכים. לכן אנו חוקרים שימוש משמעותי, שהוא להחבר חוטי פורום לתותרים של קליפים וידאו. This task can be regarded as a document ranking problem, and the key is how to learn a distinguishable text representation from word sequences and learners' behavior sequences.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל קסקיד חדש, שיכול לתפוס גם את הסמנטיקה המוסתרת וגם את הדמיון המוסתר על ידי מודל נתונים MOOC. תוצאות ניסיוניות על שני קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראות שהמייצג הטקסטאלי שלנו מוביל את השותפים המיוחדים ביותר ללא השגחה לתוכנית.", 'bo': "ད་ལྟ་མ་འོངས་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཚོར་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་ཁ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཤུལ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་མཐོང་བྱུང་། ཤོག་བྱས་པ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་MOOC ལ་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་དགོས་པ་དེ་འདྲ་བྲིས་ནས་ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག This task can be regarded as a document ranking problem, and the key is how to learn a distinguishable text representation from word sequences and learners' behavior sequences. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་ཞིག་གི་མིག་ཆའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དངོས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་འཕྲིན་གྲངས་ཀ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཡོད་པ་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་རྣམས་གནས་སྟངས་"}
{'en': 'Identifying the Provision of Choices in Privacy Policy Text', 'ar': 'تحديد توفير الخيارات في نص سياسة الخصوصية', 'fr': "Identification de l'offre de choix dans le texte de la politique de confidentialité", 'pt': 'Identificando a provisão de opções no texto da política de privacidade', 'es': 'Identificación de la provisión de opciones en el texto de la política de privacidad', 'ja': 'プライバシーポリシーテキストにおける選択肢の提供の特定', 'zh': '定私政文本选项给', 'hi': 'गोपनीयता नीति पाठ में विकल्पों के प्रावधान की पहचान करना', 'ru': 'Определение выбора в тексте Политики конфиденциальности', 'ga': 'Soláthar Roghanna a Aithint i dTéacs Beartas Príobháideachta', 'ka': 'პირადი პოლიტიკური ტექსტის მონიშნულებების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Προσδιορισμός της παροχής επιλογών στην Πολιτική Απορρήτου Κείμενο', 'hu': 'A választási lehetőségek meghatározása az Adatvédelmi Szabályzatban Szöveg', 'it': "Identificare la fornitura di scelte nell'Informativa sulla privacy", 'kk': 'Жеке саясаттар мәтіндегі таңдауларды анықтау', 'lt': 'Pasirinkimų nuostatų nustatymas privatumo politikos tekste', 'mk': 'Идентификување на обезбедувањето на избори во текстот на политиката за приватност', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Persediaan Pilihan dalam Teks Polisi Peribadi', 'mn': 'Хялбар байдлын бодлогын текст сонголтуудыг тайлбарлах', 'ml': 'സ്വകാര്യ പോളിസി പദാവലിയില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനെ തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tad-Dispożizzjoni tal-Għażliet fit-Test tal-Politika tal-Privatezza', 'no': 'Identifiserer utvalet i teksten for privatlitetsspolitikk', 'pl': 'Określenie możliwości wyboru w Polityce Prywatności Tekst', 'sr': 'Identifikacija pružanja izbora u tekstu politike privatnosti', 'ro': 'Identificarea furnizării de opțiuni în Politica de confidențialitate Text', 'si': 'පෞද්ගලික පාලනයේ තෝරාගන්න තෝරාගන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga dalbashada doorashada ee qoraalka siyaasada gaarka loo leeyahay', 'sv': 'Identifiera tillhandahållandet av val i sekretesspolicyn Text', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'خصوصی پولیسی ٹیکسٹ میں انتخاب کے پیدا کرنے کی تعریف کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Nhận diện khả năng chọn trong văn bản chính sách cá nhân.', 'bg': 'Определяне на възможностите за избор в Политиката за поверителност Текст', 'hr': 'Identifikacija pružanja izbora u tekstu politike privatnosti', 'da': 'Identificering af tilvejebringelsen af valgmuligheder i privatlivspolitikken Tekst', 'nl': 'Identificeren van de keuze in het privacybeleid Tekst', 'de': 'Identifizierung der Wahlmöglichkeiten in der Datenschutzerklärung Text', 'ko': '개인 정보 보호 정책 텍스트에서 사용할 수 있는 옵션 결정', 'fa': 'شناسایی دادن انتخاب در متن سیاست خصوصی', 'sw': 'Kutambua Utengenezaji wa Uchaguzi katika Maandishi ya Sera ya Binafsi', 'tr': 'Şahsy Politiki Metinde Saýlawlaryň Berişini belli edi', 'af': 'Identifiseer die verskaffing van keuses in Privateitsbeleid Teks', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i furnizimit të zgjedhjeve në tekstin e politikës së privatësisë', 'hy': 'Պատասխանատվության քաղաքականության տեքստի ընտրության պարտադրումը', 'id': 'Identifikasi Penyediaan Pilihan dalam Teks Kebijaksanaan', 'bn': 'প্রাইভেট নীতি লেখায় নির্বাচনের প্রস্তাব পরিচয় করা হবে', 'ca': 'Identificar les opcions en el text de la política de privacitat', 'am': 'የግል ፖሊሲ ጽሑፍ', 'cs': 'Identifikace možností volby v zásadách ochrany osobních údajů Text', 'az': 'Ňěahsiyy…ôt SiyasńĪ Metnind…ô se√ßiml…ôrin t…ôrzini t…ôsdiql…ôyici', 'et': 'Privaatsuspoliitika valikute kindlakstegemine Tekst', 'bs': 'Identifikacija pružanja izbora u tekstu politike privatnosti', 'fi': 'Tietosuojakäytännön valintojen määrittely Teksti', 'sk': 'Opredelitev določanja izbir v politiki zasebnosti Besedilo', 'he': 'מזהה את הצעת הבחירות בטקסט מדיניות פרטיות', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'bo': 'མི་སྒེར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གྱི་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་གདམ་ཁ་ཚད་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ', 'ha': 'Ina gane the Provision of Options in Text Price Policy'}
{'en': 'Websites’ and mobile apps’ privacy policies, written in natural language, tend to be long and difficult to understand. Information privacy revolves around the fundamental principle of Notice and choice, namely the idea that users should be able to make informed decisions about what information about them can be collected and how it can be used. Internet users want control over their privacy, but their choices are often hidden in long and convoluted privacy policy texts. Moreover, little (if any) prior work has been done to detect the provision of choices in text. We address this challenge of enabling user choice by automatically identifying and extracting pertinent choice language in privacy policies. In particular, we present a two-stage architecture of classification models to identify opt-out choices in privacy policy text, labelling common varieties of choices with a mean F1 score of 0.735. Our techniques enable the creation of systems to help Internet users to learn about their choices, thereby effectuating notice and choice and improving Internet privacy.', 'ar': 'تميل سياسات الخصوصية لمواقع الويب وتطبيقات الأجهزة المحمولة ، المكتوبة بلغة طبيعية ، إلى أن تكون طويلة وصعبة الفهم. تدور خصوصية المعلومات حول المبدأ الأساسي للإشعار والاختيار ، أي فكرة أن المستخدمين يجب أن يكونوا قادرين على اتخاذ قرارات مستنيرة حول المعلومات التي يمكن جمعها وكيفية استخدامها. يريد مستخدمو الإنترنت التحكم في خصوصيتهم ، ولكن غالبًا ما تكون اختياراتهم مخفية في نصوص سياسة الخصوصية الطويلة والمعقدة. علاوة على ذلك ، تم القيام بالقليل (إن وجد) من العمل السابق للكشف عن توفير الاختيارات في النص. نتصدى لهذا التحدي المتمثل في تمكين اختيار المستخدم من خلال تحديد واستخراج لغة الاختيار ذات الصلة تلقائيًا في سياسات الخصوصية. على وجه الخصوص ، نقدم بنية من مرحلتين لنماذج التصنيف لتحديد خيارات إلغاء الاشتراك في نص سياسة الخصوصية ، مع تصنيف الأنواع الشائعة من الخيارات بمتوسط درجة F1 يبلغ 0.735. تمكّن تقنياتنا من إنشاء أنظمة لمساعدة مستخدمي الإنترنت على التعرف على خياراتهم ، وبالتالي تفعيل الإشعار والاختيار وتحسين خصوصية الإنترنت.', 'fr': "Les politiques de confidentialité des sites Web et des applications mobiles, rédigées en langage naturel, ont tendance à être longues et difficiles à comprendre. La confidentialité des informations s'articule autour du principe fondamental de la notification et du choix, à savoir l'idée que les utilisateurs doivent être en mesure de prendre des décisions éclairées sur les informations les concernant qui peuvent être collectées et sur la manière dont elles peuvent être utilisées. Les internautes veulent contrôler leur vie privée, mais leurs choix sont souvent cachés dans des textes de politique de confidentialité longs et alambiqués. De plus, peu (voire aucun) de travail préalable n'a été fait pour détecter la fourniture de choix dans le texte. Nous relevons ce défi de permettre le choix de l'utilisateur en identifiant et en extrayant automatiquement le langage de choix pertinent dans les politiques de confidentialité. En particulier, nous présentons une architecture en deux étapes de modèles de classification pour identifier les choix de désinscription dans le texte de la politique de confidentialité, en étiquetant les variétés courantes de choix avec un score F1 moyen de 0,735. Nos techniques permettent de créer des systèmes pour aider les internautes à connaître leurs choix, ce qui permet d'effectuer des avis et des choix et d'améliorer la confidentialité sur Internet.", 'pt': 'As políticas de privacidade de sites e aplicativos móveis, escritas em linguagem natural, tendem a ser longas e difíceis de entender. A privacidade da informação gira em torno do princípio fundamental de Aviso e escolha, ou seja, a ideia de que os usuários devem ser capazes de tomar decisões informadas sobre quais informações sobre eles podem ser coletadas e como podem ser usadas. Os usuários da Internet querem controle sobre sua privacidade, mas suas escolhas geralmente estão escondidas em textos longos e complicados de políticas de privacidade. Além disso, pouco (ou nenhum) trabalho prévio foi feito para detectar a oferta de opções no texto. Enfrentamos esse desafio de permitir a escolha do usuário identificando e extraindo automaticamente o idioma de escolha pertinente nas políticas de privacidade. Em particular, apresentamos uma arquitetura de dois estágios de modelos de classificação para identificar opções de exclusão no texto da política de privacidade, rotulando variedades comuns de opções com uma pontuação F1 média de 0,735. Nossas técnicas permitem a criação de sistemas para ajudar os usuários da Internet a aprender sobre suas escolhas, efetuando assim avisos e escolhas e melhorando a privacidade na Internet.', 'es': 'Las políticas de privacidad de los sitios web y las aplicaciones móviles, redactadas en lenguaje natural, suelen ser largas y difíciles de entender. La privacidad de la información gira en torno al principio fundamental de Aviso y elección, a saber, la idea de que los usuarios deben poder tomar decisiones informadas sobre qué información sobre ellos se puede recopilar y cómo se puede utilizar. Los usuarios de Internet quieren controlar su privacidad, pero sus opciones a menudo están ocultas en textos largos y complicados de política de privacidad. Además, se ha hecho poco (si es que hay alguno) trabajo previo para detectar la disposición de opciones en el texto. Abordamos este desafío de permitir la elección del usuario identificando y extrayendo automáticamente el idioma de elección pertinente en las políticas de privacidad. En particular, presentamos una arquitectura de dos etapas de modelos de clasificación para identificar las opciones de exclusión voluntaria en el texto de la política de privacidad, etiquetando las variedades comunes de opciones con una puntuación media de F1 de 0,735. Nuestras técnicas permiten la creación de sistemas para ayudar a los usuarios de Internet a conocer sus opciones, con lo que se efectúa el aviso y la elección y se mejora la privacidad en Internet.', 'ja': 'ウェブサイトとモバイルアプリのプライバシーポリシーは、自然言語で書かれており、長く、理解しにくい傾向があります。 情報プライバシーは、通知と選択の基本原則、すなわち、ユーザーは、どのような情報が収集され、どのように使用されるかについて、情報に基づいた意思決定を行うことができるべきであるという考え方に基づいています。 インターネットユーザーは自分のプライバシーをコントロールしたいと考えていますが、長く煩雑なプライバシーポリシーのテキストに彼らの選択が隠されていることがよくあります。 さらに、テキストでの選択肢の提供を検出するための事前の作業はほとんど行われていません（もしあれば）。 Googleでは、プライバシーポリシーの適切な選択言語を自動的に特定して抽出することで、ユーザーの選択を可能にするという課題に対処しています。 特に、私たちは、プライバシーポリシーテキストのオプトアウトの選択を識別するための分類モデルの2段階のアーキテクチャを提示し、平均F 1スコアが0.735の一般的な種類の選択をラベル付けします。 当社のテクニックにより、インターネットユーザーが選択肢を知るのに役立つシステムを作成し、通知と選択を実現し、インターネットのプライバシーを向上させることができます。', 'zh': '网站移应用程序隐,以自然语言为之,往往久而不解。 夫信息隐私,周旋告择之大经,用户可得而收其所以为明者也。 互联网用户欲制其私,然其选往往隐于冗长而杂隐文本。 此外,于检测文本中供选择,以前罕()事。 因自动识别与取私相关择言以决用户择挑战。 特为两段分架构,以识隐选项,以均F1分数0.735标常见之选。 吾术能创其统,助互联网用户知其所择,以成通择,改善互联网私。', 'hi': 'वेबसाइटों और मोबाइल ऐप्स की गोपनीयता नीतियां, जो प्राकृतिक भाषा में लिखी गई हैं, लंबी और समझने में मुश्किल होती हैं। सूचना गोपनीयता नोटिस और पसंद के मौलिक सिद्धांत के चारों ओर घूमती है, अर्थात् यह विचार कि उपयोगकर्ताओं को इस बारे में सूचित निर्णय लेने में सक्षम होना चाहिए कि उनके बारे में कौन सी जानकारी एकत्र की जा सकती है और इसका उपयोग कैसे किया जा सकता है। इंटरनेट उपयोगकर्ता अपनी गोपनीयता पर नियंत्रण चाहते हैं, लेकिन उनके विकल्प अक्सर लंबे और जटिल गोपनीयता नीति ग्रंथों में छिपे होते हैं। इसके अलावा, पाठ में विकल्पों के प्रावधान का पता लगाने के लिए बहुत कम (यदि कोई हो) पूर्व कार्य किया गया है। हम गोपनीयता नीतियों में प्रासंगिक पसंद भाषा को स्वचालित रूप से पहचानने और निकालने के द्वारा उपयोगकर्ता की पसंद को सक्षम करने की इस चुनौती को संबोधित करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम गोपनीयता नीति पाठ में ऑप्ट-आउट विकल्पों की पहचान करने के लिए वर्गीकरण मॉडल की दो-चरणीय वास्तुकला प्रस्तुत करते हैं, 0.735 के औसत एफ 1 स्कोर के साथ विकल्पों की सामान्य किस्मों को लेबल करते हैं। हमारी तकनीकें इंटरनेट उपयोगकर्ताओं को उनके विकल्पों के बारे में जानने में मदद करने के लिए सिस्टम के निर्माण को सक्षम करती हैं, जिससे नोटिस और पसंद को प्रभावित किया जा सके और इंटरनेट गोपनीयता में सुधार किया जा सके।', 'ru': 'Политика конфиденциальности веб-сайтов и мобильных приложений, написанная на естественном языке, как правило, длинна и трудна для понимания. Конфиденциальность информации основывается на основополагающем принципе уведомления и выбора, а именно на идее о том, что пользователи должны иметь возможность принимать обоснованные решения о том, какую информацию о них можно собирать и как ее использовать. Пользователи Интернета хотят контролировать свою конфиденциальность, но их выбор часто скрыт в длинных и запутанных текстах политики конфиденциальности. Кроме того, было проведено мало (если таковые имели место) предшествующей работы по выявлению возможности выбора в тексте. Мы решаем эту проблему, позволяя пользователю выбирать, автоматически идентифицируя и извлекая соответствующий язык выбора в политике конфиденциальности. В частности, мы представляем двухступенчатую архитектуру классификационных моделей для определения вариантов отказа в тексте политики конфиденциальности, обозначающую распространенные варианты выбора со средним баллом F1 0,735. Наши методы позволяют создавать системы, помогающие пользователям Интернета узнавать о своем выборе, тем самым делая уведомления и выбор и улучшая конфиденциальность Интернета.', 'ga': 'Is gnách go mbíonn polasaithe príobháideachais suíomhanna Gréasáin agus feidhmchláir shoghluaiste, scríofa i dteanga nádúrtha, fada agus deacair le tuiscint. Baineann príobháideacht faisnéise le bunphrionsabal an Fhógra agus na Rogha, is é sin an smaoineamh gur cheart go mbeadh úsáideoirí in ann cinntí eolasacha a dhéanamh maidir leis an bhfaisnéis fúthu is féidir a bhailiú agus conas is féidir í a úsáid. Teastaíonn smacht ó úsáideoirí idirlín ar a bpríobháideachas, ach is minic a bhíonn a roghanna folaithe i dtéacsanna fada agus convoluted polasaí príobháideachta. Ina theannta sin, is beag (má tá aon obair) déanta roimh ré chun soláthar roghanna i dtéacs a bhrath. Tugaimid aghaidh ar an dúshlán seo maidir le rogha úsáideoirí a chumasú trí rogha teanga ábhartha a aithint agus a bhaint go huathoibríoch i bpolasaithe príobháideachais. Go háirithe, cuirimid ailtireacht dhá chéim de shamhlacha aicmithe i láthair chun roghanna rogha an diúltaithe a aithint i dtéacs an bheartais phríobháideachais, ag lipéadú cineálacha roghanna coitianta le meánscór F1 de 0.735. Cumasaíonn ár dteicníochtaí córais a chruthú a chuideoidh le húsáideoirí Idirlín foghlaim faoina roghanna, rud a chuireann fógra agus rogha i bhfeidhm agus a fheabhsaíonn príobháideacht an Idirlín.', 'hu': 'A webhelyek és mobilalkalmazások természetes nyelven írt adatvédelmi irányelvei általában hosszúak és nehéz megérteni. Az információs adatvédelem a tájékoztatás és a választás alapelve körül forog, nevezetesen arra az elképzelésre, hogy a felhasználóknak tájékozott döntéseket kell hozniuk arról, hogy milyen információkat lehet gyűjteni róluk és hogyan lehet azok felhasználni. Az internetfelhasználók szeretnék irányítani magánéletüket, de választásaikat gyakran hosszú és bonyolult adatvédelmi irányelvek rejtik el. Ezenkívül kevés (ha van) előzetes munkát végeztek a választási lehetőségek szövegben történő felderítésére. Az adatvédelmi irányelvekben a megfelelő választási nyelv automatikus azonosításával és kibontásával kezeljük ezt a kihívást, amely lehetővé teszi a felhasználói választás lehetővé tételét. Különösen az osztályozási modellek kétlépcsős architektúráját mutatjuk be az adatvédelmi politika szövegében az opt-out választási lehetőségek azonosítására, a közös választási lehetőségeket 0,735 átlagos F1 pontszámmal jelölve. Technikáink lehetővé teszik olyan rendszerek létrehozását, amelyek segítenek az internetfelhasználóknak megismerni választásaikat, ezáltal hatással vannak a tájékoztatásra és a választásra, és javítják az internetes adatvédelmet.', 'el': 'Οι πολιτικές απορρήτου των ιστοσελίδων και εφαρμογών για κινητά, γραμμένες σε φυσική γλώσσα, τείνουν να είναι μακριές και δύσκολο να κατανοηθούν. Το απόρρητο των πληροφοριών περιστρέφεται γύρω από τη θεμελιώδη αρχή της ειδοποίησης και επιλογής, δηλαδή την ιδέα ότι οι χρήστες θα πρέπει να είναι σε θέση να λαμβάνουν ενημερωμένες αποφάσεις σχετικά με το ποιες πληροφορίες σχετικά με αυτούς μπορούν να συλλέγονται και πώς μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν. Οι χρήστες του διαδικτύου θέλουν τον έλεγχο της ιδιωτικής τους ζωής, αλλά οι επιλογές τους συχνά κρύβονται σε μεγάλα και περίπλοκα κείμενα πολιτικής απορρήτου. Επιπλέον, ελάχιστες (αν υπάρχουν) προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν γίνει για τον εντοπισμό της παροχής επιλογών στο κείμενο. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτή την πρόκληση της δυνατότητας επιλογής των χρηστών ταυτοποιώντας και εξάγοντας αυτόματα τη σχετική γλώσσα επιλογής στις πολιτικές απορρήτου. Ειδικότερα, παρουσιάζουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική δύο σταδίων μοντέλων ταξινόμησης για τον προσδιορισμό των επιλογών εξαίρεσης στο κείμενο της πολιτικής απορρήτου, επισημαίνοντας κοινές ποικιλίες επιλογών με μέση βαθμολογία F1 0.735. Οι τεχνικές μας επιτρέπουν τη δημιουργία συστημάτων που βοηθούν τους χρήστες του Διαδικτύου να μάθουν για τις επιλογές τους, με αποτέλεσμα την ειδοποίηση και επιλογή και τη βελτίωση της ιδιωτικής ζωής του Διαδικτύου.', 'ka': 'საიბეტების და მობილური პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამი, რომელიც ნაირადი ენაში დაწერა, უნდა იყოს ძალიან და რთული გავიგოთ. ინფორმაციის პრივიაციის პრიფუნციალური პრინუფიკაციის და არჩევის ფუნდამენტური პრინუფიკაციის გადარჩენა, რაც იდეა, რომ მომხმარებელი უნდა შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ ინფორმაციული გადაწყვეტილებების ინტერნეტი მომხმარებელი მოთხოვენ, მაგრამ მათი არჩევები ძალიან ძალიან დახურებულიან ძალიან და კონტულური პროლიტიკური ტექსტში. დამატებით, პატარა (თუ არსებობს) საწინაღალდე სამუშაო მუშაობა ტექსტში მონიშნული მონიშნულების განსაზღვრება. ჩვენ ამ გამოსახულებას გავაკეთებთ მომხმარებელი გამოსახულებას ავტომატურად განსახულებით და გამოსახულებით პრივიაციური პოლიტიკის შესახებ. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის მოდელების ორ ფაეჯის აქტიქტიკურაციას გამოყენებთ, რომელიც პრივიაციენტის პოლიტიკური ტექსტში არჩევების განსაკუთრება, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებების განსა ჩვენი ტექნოგიები შეუძლება სისტემის შექმნა, რომ ინტერნეტის მომხმარებელების შესაძლებლობა გავისწავლა მისი არჩევების შესახებ, ამიტომ გააკეთება ინტერნეტის პირად', 'it': "Le politiche sulla privacy dei siti web e delle app mobili, scritte in linguaggio naturale, tendono ad essere lunghe e difficili da capire. La privacy delle informazioni ruota attorno al principio fondamentale dell'Informativa e della scelta, vale a dire l'idea che gli utenti dovrebbero essere in grado di prendere decisioni informate su quali informazioni su di loro possono essere raccolte e come possono essere utilizzate. Gli utenti di Internet vogliono controllare la loro privacy, ma le loro scelte sono spesso nascoste in testi lunghi e contorti sulla privacy policy. Inoltre, poco (se del caso) lavoro precedente è stato fatto per individuare la disposizione delle scelte nel testo. Affrontiamo questa sfida di consentire la scelta degli utenti identificando ed estraendo automaticamente il linguaggio di scelta pertinente nelle politiche sulla privacy. In particolare, presentiamo un'architettura in due fasi dei modelli di classificazione per identificare le scelte di opt-out nel testo della privacy policy, etichettando le varietà comuni di scelte con un punteggio F1 medio di 0,735. Le nostre tecniche consentono la creazione di sistemi per aiutare gli utenti di Internet a conoscere le loro scelte, in tal modo attuando l'avviso e la scelta e migliorando la privacy di Internet.", 'kk': 'Вебсайттардың және мобильді қолданбалардың жеке тәуелсіздік ережелері, тәуелсіз тілде жазылған, ұзын және түсініңіз қиын. Ескерту мен таңдау негізгі принципіне мәліметтің жалғастырылығы - пайдаланушылардың мәліметті қалай жинақтауға және қалай пайдалануға болады деген идеясы. Интернет пайдаланушылары өзінің жеке тәуелсіздігін басқаруын қалайды, бірақ олардың таңдаулары көбінде ұзын және жеке тәуелсіздік ережелердің мәтіндерінде Сонымен қатар, мәтіндегі таңдауларды анықтау үшін алдыңғы жұмыс кішкентай (егер келген болса) жасалған. Біз пайдаланушының таңдауын автоматты түрде таңдау тілді жеке саясаттарында анықтап, тарқату үшін бұл әсер етіп тұрмыз. Мысалы, біз жұмыс саясатының мәтіндегі таңдауларды таңдау үшін жұмыс саясатының екі этап архитектурасын көрсету үшін, жалпы таңдаулардың түрлі түрлерін 0,735 деп аталады. Біздің техникамыз Интернет пайдаланушыларының таңдаулары туралы оқытуға көмектесетін жүйелерді құру мүмкіндігін мүмкіндік береді, сондықтан ескерту және таңдау және Интер', 'lt': 'Interneto svetainių ir mobiliųjų programų privatumo politika, rašoma natūralia kalba, paprastai yra ilga ir sunku suprasti. Informacijos privatumas apsiriboja pagrindiniu pranešimo ir pasirinkimo principu, būtent idėja, kad vartotojai turėtų turėti galimybę priimti pagrįstus sprendimus, kokia informacija apie juos gali būti renkama ir kaip ji gali būti naudojama. Interneto naudotojai nori kontroliuoti savo privatumą, tačiau jų pasirinkimai dažnai slepiami ilguose ir sudėtinguose privatumo politikos tekstuose. Be to, atlikta nedaug (jei yra) ankstesnių darbų, kad būtų galima nustatyti pasirinkimo galimybes tekste. Mes sprendžiame šį uždavinį – suteikti galimybę naudotojams pasirinkti, automatiškai nustatydami ir ištraukdami atitinkamą pasirinkimo kalbą privatumo politikoje. Visų pirma pristatome dviejų etapų klasifikavimo modelių struktūrą, kuria siekiama nustatyti privatumo politikos tekste pasirinktus sprendimus, ženklinant bendrąsias pasirinkimo rūšis, kurių vidutinis F1 balas yra 0,735. Mūsų metodai leidžia kurti sistemas, padedančias interneto naudotojams sužinoti apie savo pasirinkimus, taip užtikrinant įspėjimą ir pasirinkimą bei gerinant interneto privatumą.', 'mk': 'Политиката за приватност на веб-сајтовите и мобилните апликации, напишана на природен јазик, обично е долга и тешка да се разбере. Приватноста на информациите се врти околу основниот принцип на известување и избор, имено идејата дека корисниците треба да можат да донесат информирани одлуки за тоа какви информации за нив може да се соберат и како може да се користат. Интернет корисниците сакаат контрола над нивната приватност, но нивните избори честопати се скриени во долги и конволуцирани тексти на политиката за приватност. Покрај тоа, малку (ако има) претходна работа е направена за откривање на одлуките во текстот. Ние го решаваме овој предизвик да го овозможиме изборот на корисникот со автоматски идентификување и извлекување на поврзаниот јазик на избор во политиките за приватност. Особено, претставуваме двофазична архитектура на моделите на класификација за идентификување на изборите за опција-отсуство во текстот на политиката за приватност, означувајќи ги заедничките различни избори со просечна оценка F1 од 0,735. Our techniques enable the creation of systems to help Internet users to learn about their choices, thereby effectuating notice and choice and improving Internet privacy.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d എഴുതിയ വെബ്സൈറ്റുകളുടെയും മൊബൈലിന്റെയും സ്വകാര്യ പോലീസുകളുടെയും വെബ്സൈറ്റുകള്\u200d നീണ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്വകാര്യം നോട്ടീസിന്റെയും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടുപോകുന്നു. ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് അവരുടെ സ്വകാര്യത്തില്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, പക്ഷെ അവരുടെ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക് വാചകത്തില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d മുമ്പ് എന്തെങ്കിലും ജോലി ചെയ്തിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കി സ്വകാര്യമായ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഈ വ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജ് മോഡലുകളുടെ സ്വകാര്യത്തില്\u200d പോളിസി വാക്കുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പോട്ട് പുറത്തുള്ള ഐച്ഛികങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന് ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് അവയുടെ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക', 'mt': 'Il-politiki tal-privatezza tas-siti tal-internet u tal-applikazzjonijiet mobbli, miktuba bil-lingwa naturali, għandhom tendenza li jkunu twal u diffiċli biex jinftiehmu. Il-privatezza tal-informazzjoni tiddawwar madwar il-prinċipju fundamentali tal-Avviż u l-għażla, jiġifieri l-idea li l-utenti għandhom ikunu jistgħu jieħdu deċiżjonijiet infurmati dwar liema informazzjoni dwarhom tista’ tinġabar u kif tista’ tintuża. L-utenti tal-Internet iridu l-kontroll fuq il-privatezza tagħhom, iżda l-għażliet tagħhom ta’ spiss huma moħbija f’testi twal u konvulżi tal-politika dwar il-privatezza. Barra minn hekk, ftit (jekk ikun hemm) xogħol minn qabel sar biex jiġi identifikat l-għoti ta’ għażliet fit-test. Aħna nindirizzaw din l-isfida li jippermettu l-għażla tal-utent billi jidentifikaw u jestraġu awtomatikament il-lingwa tal-għażla pertinenti fil-politiki tal-privatezza. B’mod partikolari, a ħna nippreżentaw arkitettura f’żewġ stadji ta’ mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni biex nidentifikaw għażliet li ma jistgħux jintużaw fit-test tal-politika dwar il-privatezza, bit-tikkettar ta’ varjetajiet komuni ta’ għażliet b’punteġġ F1 medju ta’ 0.735. It-tekniki tagħna jippermettu l-ħolqien ta’ sistemi li jgħinu lill-utenti tal-Internet jitgħallmu dwar l-għażliet tagħhom, u b’hekk iwettqu avviż u għażla u jtejbu l-privatezza tal-Internet.', 'ms': 'Polisi privasi laman web dan aplikasi bimbit, ditulis dalam bahasa semulajadi, cenderung untuk panjang dan sukar untuk dipahami. Peribadi maklumat berputar sekitar prinsip asas Pemberitahuan dan pilihan, iaitu idea bahawa pengguna patut mampu membuat keputusan yang diberitahu mengenai maklumat apa yang boleh dikumpulkan dan bagaimana ia boleh digunakan. Pengguna Internet mahu kawalan atas privasi mereka, tetapi pilihan mereka sering tersembunyi dalam teks politik privasi yang panjang dan terhubung. Moreover, little (if any) prior work has been done to detect the provision of choices in text.  Kami mengatasi cabaran ini untuk membenarkan pilihan pengguna dengan mengidentifikasi dan mengekstrak secara automatik bahasa pilihan yang sesuai dalam polisi privasi. Secara khususnya, kami memperkenalkan arkitektur dua tahap model klasifikasi untuk mengenalpasti pilihan opt-out dalam teks kebijakan privasi, mengetikkan jenis pilihan umum dengan nilai F1 rata-rata 0.735. Our techniques enable the creation of systems to help Internet users to learn about their choices, thereby effectuating notice and choice and improving Internet privacy.', 'pl': 'Polityka prywatności witryn internetowych i aplikacji mobilnych, napisana w języku naturalnym, jest zwykle długa i trudna do zrozumienia. Prywatność informacji skupia się wokół podstawowej zasady powiadomienia i wyboru, a mianowicie idei, że użytkownicy powinni mieć możliwość podejmowania świadomych decyzji o tym, jakie informacje o nich mogą być gromadzone i w jaki sposób mogą być wykorzystywane. Użytkownicy Internetu chcą kontrolować swoją prywatność, ale ich wybory są często ukryte w długich i skomplikowanych tekstach polityki prywatności. Ponadto wcześniej niewiele (jeśli w ogóle) prac wykonano w celu wykrycia możliwości wyboru w tekście. Rozwiązujemy to wyzwanie polegające na umożliwieniu użytkownikowi wyboru poprzez automatyczne identyfikowanie i wyodrębnianie odpowiedniego języka wyboru w polityce prywatności. W szczególności przedstawiamy dwustopniową architekturę modeli klasyfikacji w celu identyfikacji opcji opt-out w tekście polityki prywatności, oznaczając wspólne odmiany wyborów średnim wynikiem F1 0,735. Nasze techniki umożliwiają tworzenie systemów, które pomagają użytkownikom Internetu dowiedzieć się o ich wyborach, tym samym wpływając na powiadomienie i wybór oraz poprawę prywatności Internetu.', 'ro': 'Politicile de confidențialitate ale site-urilor web și aplicațiilor mobile, scrise în limbaj natural, tind să fie lungi și dificil de înțeles. Confidențialitatea informațiilor se învârte în jurul principiului fundamental al notificării și alegerii, și anume ideea că utilizatorii ar trebui să poată lua decizii informate cu privire la ce informații despre ei pot fi colectate și cum pot fi utilizate. Utilizatorii de internet doresc controlul asupra confidențialității lor, dar alegerile lor sunt adesea ascunse în texte lungi și complicate privind politica de confidențialitate. În plus, s-au făcut puține (dacă există) eforturi anterioare pentru a detecta oferirea de opțiuni în text. Abordăm această provocare de a permite alegerea utilizatorului prin identificarea automată și extragerea limbajului de alegere relevant în politicile de confidențialitate. În special, prezentăm o arhitectură în două etape a modelelor de clasificare pentru a identifica opțiunile opt-out în textul politicii de confidențialitate, etichetând varietățile comune de opțiuni cu un scor F1 mediu de 0,735. Tehnicile noastre permit crearea de sisteme pentru a ajuta utilizatorii de Internet să învețe despre alegerile lor, efectuând astfel notificarea și alegerea și îmbunătățind confidențialitatea internetului.', 'mn': 'Вебсайтын болон хөдөлгөөн апплетийн хувийн бодлого, байгалийн хэл дээр бичигдсэн, урт, ойлгоход хэцүү байдаг. Мэдээллийн хувийн байдал нь анхаарлаа, сонголтын үндсэн принципын эргэн тойронд орж ирдэг. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчид хэрхэн мэдээллийг цуглуулж, хэрхэн хэрэглэж болох вэ гэдгийг мэдээллийн шийдвэр гаргаж чадна. Интернет хэрэглэгчид хувийн амьдралыг удирдах хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ тэдний сонголтууд ихэвчлэн урт, хувийн байгалийн бодлогын текстүүд нуугддаг. Үүнээс ч өмнө нь (хэрвээ нэг юм бол) сонголтуудыг текст байлгахын тулд бага (хэрвээ нэг юм бол) хийгдсэн. Бид хэрэглэгчийн сонголтыг автоматаар хэрэглэгчийн сонголтыг хувийн амьдралд хэрэглэгчийн засгийн газрын тухай сонголт хэлний талаар шийдвэрлэх боломжтой. Ялангуяа бид хувийн бодлогын текст дээр сонголтыг тодорхойлох хоёр дахь загварын архитектурыг үзүүлнэ. Олон төрлийн сонголтуудыг тодорхойлох боломжтой F1 тоо 0.735-той тэмдэглэдэг. Бидний техникууд Интернет хэрэглэгчид өөрсдийн сонголтуудыг суралцахын тулд системүүдийг бүтээх боломжтой болгодог.', 'no': 'Retningsprogrammet for personverktøy for nettstader og mobilprogrammer, skriven i naturspråk, er vanskeleg å forstå lang og vanskeleg. Informasjonsprivatet revolver rundt den grunnleggjande prinsippen for varslinga og valet, dvs. ideen at brukarar bør kunna gjera informasjonsbeslutningar om kva informasjon om dei kan samla og korleis det kan brukast. Internettbrukarar ønskjer å kontrollera over privatliteten sine, men vala sine er ofte gøymde i lange og konvoluserte tekstar for privatlitetsprogrammet. I tillegg er det gjort lite (dersom nokon) førre arbeid for å finna utvalet i tekst. Vi adresserer denne utfordringen for å slå på brukarvalet ved å automatisk identifisera og pakka ut eigentleg valspråk i privatspolitikk. I særskilt presenterer vi eit to stadige arkitektur av klassifikasjonsmodular for å identifisera utvala i teksten for privatspolitikk, som merker felles variasjonar av vala med gjennomsnittlig F1- poeng med 0,735. Teknikka våre kan laga systemar for å hjelpa internettbrukarar til å lære om dei vala, dermed å gjera varslinga og val og forbetra internettbruk.', 'sr': 'Politika privatnosti internetskih sajtova i mobilnih aplikacija, napisana na prirodnom jeziku, teško je shvatiti dugo i teško. Informativna privatnost se okreće oko osnovnog principa obaveštavanja i izbora, a to je ideja da korisnici mogu donijeti obaveštene odluke o tome kakve informacije o njima mogu biti skupljene i kako se može koristiti. Korisnici interneta žele kontrolu nad svojom privatnošću, ali njihovi izbori su često skriveni u dugim i konvolutiranim tekstima politike privatnosti. Osim toga, bilo je malo (ako je bilo) pre posla za otkrivanje određenog izbora u tekstu. Odrešimo taj izazov omogućavanja izbora korisnika automatski identifikovanjem i izvlačenjem odgovarajućeg jezika izbora u politikama privatnosti. Posebno, predstavljamo dve faze arhitekturu klasifikacijskih modela da identifikujemo izbore izbora iz teksta politike privatnosti, označavajući zajedničke razlike izbora sa srednjim rezultatom F1 od 0,735. Naše tehnike omogućavaju stvaranje sustava da pomognu korisnicima interneta da nauče o svojim izborima, tako da provede obavijesti i izbor i poboljšavaju privatnost interneta.', 'sv': 'Webbplatsers och mobilapps sekretesspolicyer, skrivna på naturligt språk, tenderar att vara långa och svåra att förstå. Informationsintegriteten kretsar kring den grundläggande principen om meddelande och val, nämligen tanken att användarna ska kunna fatta välgrundade beslut om vilken information om dem som kan samlas in och hur den kan användas. Internetanvändare vill ha kontroll över sin integritet, men deras val döljs ofta i långa och invecklade integritetspolicytexter. Dessutom har lite (om något) tidigare arbete gjorts för att upptäcka tillhandahållandet av val i text. Vi tar itu med denna utmaning att möjliggöra användarval genom att automatiskt identifiera och extrahera relevant valfrihetsspråk i sekretesspolicyn. I synnerhet presenterar vi en tvåstegsarkitektur av klassificeringsmodeller för att identifiera val av undantag i integritetspolicytexten och märka vanliga val med en genomsnittlig F1-poäng på 0,735. Våra tekniker gör det möjligt att skapa system för att hjälpa internetanvändare att lära sig om sina val, vilket påverkar meddelanden och val och förbättrar integriteten på Internet.', 'so': 'Boosaska gaarka loo leeyahay bogagga internetka iyo codsiga telefoonka ee gaarka loo leeyahay oo ku qoran luuqada asalka ah, waxaa inta badan aad u adag oo aad u adag in aad fahanto. Macluumaadka gaarka loo leeyahay wuxuu ku wareegsan yahay shuruudaha aasaasiga ah ee Notice iyo doorashada, taas oo ah fikrada isticmaalayaasha in ay awoodi karto go’aan ka gaara macluumaadka la xiriira sida loo soo ururiyo iyo sida loo isticmaali karo. Inta badan isticmaalayaasha internetka waxay doonayaan in ay u maamulaan maamulka gaarka loo leeyahay, laakiin doorashooyinkoodu waxay inta badan ku qarsoon yihiin qoraalka siyaasada gaarka loo leeyahay oo waqti dheer iyo si shakhsi ah. Sidoo kale, wax yar (haddii shaqo la sameeyo) in la caddeeyo sharciga doorashada qoraalka. Waxaannu u sheekeynaynaa dhibaatadan ku habboonaynta doorashada isticmaalaha si rasmi ah u aqoonsashada iyo soo bixinta luuqada doorashada ee gaarka loo leeyahay siyaasadaha gaarka ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaa dhismo qaabab kala duduwan oo fasax ah si aan u aqoonsanno doorashooyinka doorashada ee qoraalka siyaasada gaarka loo leeyahay, waxaana ku qornaa doorashooyin kala duduwan oo caadiga ah oo ku qoran iskuulka F1 ee 0.735. Teqooyinkayada waxay awoodi karaan abuuridda nidaamka si ay u caawiyaan isticmaalayaasha internetka si ay u bartaan doorashooda, taasoo ay saameyn ku yeelan karaan wargelinta iyo doorashooyinka iyo horumarinta gaarka loo leeyahay Internetka.', 'ta': "வலைதளங்கள் ' மற்றும் கைபேசிகளின் தனிப்பட்ட கொள்கைகள், இயற்கையான மொழியில் எழுதப்பட்ட, நீண்ட மற்றும் புரிந்து க தகவல் தனிப்பட்டுள்ள தகவல் குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் தேர்வுகளின் அடிப்படையான குறிப்புகளை சுற்றி மாறுகிறது, அதாவது பயனர் பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்று அறி இணைய பயனர்கள் தங்கள் தனியார்த்தத்தை கட்டுப்பாடு விரும்புகிறார்கள், ஆனால் அவர்கள் தேர்வுகள் நீண்ட மற்றும் பிரசியமான மேலும், உரையில் விருப்பங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க சிறிய (ஏதாவது முன்) வேலை செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால். தனிப்பட்ட கொள்கைகளில் தானாகவே தேர்வு மொழியை கண்டுபிடிக்க மற்றும் வெளியேற்றுவதற்கான பயனர் தேர்வு செயல்படுத்து தனிப்பட்ட கொள்கை உரையில் தேர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க இரண்டு நிலையில் வகுப்பு மாதிரிகளின் கட்டுப்பாட்டை காண்பிக்கிறோம், பொதுவான வேறு தேர்வுகளை குற Our techniques enable the creation of systems to help Internet users to learn about their choices, thereby effectuating notice and choice and improving Internet privacy.", 'si': 'වෙබ් සහ මෝබායිල් ඇප්ලිකේස්ට්ස් ගැන පුද්ගලික විද්\u200dයාපය, ස්වාභාවික භාෂාත්මයෙන් ලියලා තේර තොරතුරු පුද්ගලිකත්වය පුද්ගලිකත්වය සහ තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන වලින්, අදහසක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ ප්\u200dරයෝජක ඉන්තර්ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයාලට ඔවුන්ගේ පුද්ගලිකතාවට පාලනය ඕන, නමුත් ඔවුන්ගේ තෝරණ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ඉතින්, පොඩ්ඩක් (කිසිම) කලින් මුලින් වැඩ කරලා තියෙන්නේ පාළුවට තෝරණ තීරණය හොයාගන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ තෝරාගන්න සක්\u200dරිය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ තෝරාගන්න සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අඳුරගන් විශේෂයෙන්, අපි විශේෂයෙන්, පුද්ගලික පොලිසිකාර පාලනයේ opt-out තොරතුරු හඳුන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විවිධ වර්ගයක් ලබාගන්නේ F1 ස්කෝර් 0.735 ව අපේ තාක්ෂණය සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න අන්තර්ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයෝ ගැන උදව් කරන්න, ඔවුන්ගේ තෝරණ ගැන,', 'ur': 'ویب سائٹ اور موبائل اپ کے خصوصی پولیسیٹ، طبیعی زبان میں لکھی ہوئی، سمجھنے کے لئے طویل اور مشکل ہیں. اطلاعات کی خصوصی خبری اور انتخاب کی بنیادی اصل کے اطراف میں پھیر رہی ہے، یعنی یہ خیال ہے کہ کارساز کو ان کے بارے میں کیا معلومات جمع کر سکتے ہیں اور کیسے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں۔ انٹرنیٹ کارساز اپنے خصوصی پر کنٹرول چاہتے ہیں لیکن ان کی انتخاب اکثر طویل اور مخفی خصوصی پولیس ٹیکسٹوں میں چھپائے جاتے ہیں. اور اس سے پہلے بہت ہی کم کام کیے گئے ہیں کہ اس کے ذریعہ سے انتخاب کی روزی تلاش کریں ہم اس چال سے استعمال کرنے کے لئے اپنا انتخاب کرنا اور خصوصی پولیس میں اضافہ کرنا اور اضافہ کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ مخصوصا، ہم کلاسپیٹ موڈل کے دو مرحلے کی معماری پیش کرتے ہیں کہ خصوصی پولیسیٹ کے متن میں opt-out انتخاب کو پہچان سکیں، ایک متوسط F1 اسکو 0.735 کے متوسط مختلف انتخاباتوں کے لابلیک کریں. ہماری تکنیک سیستموں کی پیدائش کو امکان دیتی ہے کہ انٹرنیٹ کارساز کو ان کی انتخاباتوں کے بارے میں سیکھنے کی مدد کریں، اس کے ذریعہ سے خبردار اور انتخاب کرنے اور انٹرنیٹ کی خصوصیت کو بہتر کریں۔', 'vi': 'Phần riêng tư cho ứng dụng điện thoại, được viết bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, có xu hướng dài và khó hiểu. Việc riêng tư thông tin xoay quanh nguyên tắc cơ bản của Thông báo và lựa chọn, là ý tưởng người dùng nên có thể đưa ra quyết định thông tin về những thông tin về họ và cách sử dụng nó. Người dùng Internet muốn kiểm soát sự riêng tư của họ, nhưng lựa chọn của họ thường bị che giấu trong những văn bản bảo mật dài và phức tạp. Hơn nữa, chỉ có ít (nếu có) việc trước đây đã được thực hiện để phát hiện khả năng lựa chọn trong văn bản. Chúng ta giải quyết thử thách này nhằm hỗ trợ sự lựa chọn của người dùng bằng cách tự động xác định và khai thác ngôn ngữ chọn thích hợp trong chính sách bảo mật. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc hai giai đoạn của các mô- đun phân loại để xác định các lựa chọn trong văn bản luật bảo mật riêng tư, in các loại lựa chọn chung với một số lượng F1 số lượng 0.735. Kỹ thuật của chúng tôi cho phép tạo ra hệ thống để giúp người dùng Internet biết được lựa chọn của họ, nhờ đó có thông báo và chọn lựa và cải thiện quyền riêng của Internet.', 'uz': "Name Maʼlumot shaxsiyati xabar va tanlash asosiy asosiy asosida o'zgariladi. Bu g'oya, foydalanuvchilar ular haqida qanday maʼlumot olish mumkin va qanday foydalanishi mumkin haqida xabar berish mumkin. Internet foydalanuvchilari ularning shaxsiy qoidalarini boshqarishni xohlaydi, lekin ularning xususiyatlari ko'pincha uzoq va murakkab bo'lgan shaxsiy qoidalar matnlarida qarinadi. Koʻrsatilgan, agar bir ishni matnni tanlash uchun oldin ishga tushirib boʻlsa. Biz foydalanuvchi tanlanuvchini avtomatik aniqlash va shaxsiy qoidadagi muhim tanlangan dasturni ajratish. Shunday qilib, biz shaxsiy qoidalar matnini aniqlash uchun ikki darajada dastur modelining arxituvchisini hozir qilamiz. Boshqa qoidalar matnini aniqlash uchun qo'llanmalarni ko'paytirish uchun oddiy tartiblarni qo'shish, 0.735 darajasi 0.735 darajasi bilan bir darajadagi bir darajada ko Bizning qismlarimiz Internetga foydalanuvchilarga ularning tanlashlarini o'rganish uchun tizimlarni yaratishga yordam beradi.", 'nl': 'Het privacybeleid van websites en mobiele apps, geschreven in natuurlijke taal, is vaak lang en moeilijk te begrijpen. Informatie privacy draait om het fundamentele principe van kennisgeving en keuze, namelijk het idee dat gebruikers geïnformeerde beslissingen moeten kunnen nemen over welke informatie over hen verzameld kan worden en hoe deze gebruikt kan worden. Internetgebruikers willen controle over hun privacy, maar hun keuzes zijn vaak verborgen in lange en ingewikkelde privacybeleidsteksten. Bovendien is er weinig (indien van tevoren) werk verricht om de keuzemogelijkheden in tekst op te sporen. We gaan deze uitdaging aan om gebruikerskeuze mogelijk te maken door automatisch relevante keuzetaal te identificeren en te extraheren in het privacybeleid. In het bijzonder presenteren we een tweefasige architectuur van classificatiemodellen om opt-out keuzes in de tekst van het privacybeleid te identificeren, waarbij gemeenschappelijke variëteiten van keuzes worden gemarkeerd met een gemiddelde F1 score van 0.735. Onze technieken maken het mogelijk om systemen te creëren die internetgebruikers helpen te leren over hun keuzes, waardoor kennisgeving en keuze worden bewerkstelligd en de privacy op internet wordt verbeterd.', 'da': 'Webstedernes og mobilapps privatlivspolitikker, der er skrevet på naturligt sprog, har tendens til at være lange og vanskelige at forstå. Informationsbeskyttelse drejer sig om det grundlæggende princip om meddelelse og valg, nemlig tanken om, at brugerne skal kunne træffe informerede beslutninger om, hvilke oplysninger om dem der kan indsamles, og hvordan de kan bruges. Internetbrugere ønsker kontrol over deres privatliv, men deres valg er ofte skjult i lange og indviklede tekster om privatlivspolitik. Desuden er der kun lidt (hvis nogen) tidligere arbejde blevet gjort for at opdage mulighederne for valg i tekst. Vi løser denne udfordring med at muliggøre brugervalg ved automatisk at identificere og udtrække relevant valgssprog i privatlivspolitikker. Vi præsenterer især en to-trins arkitektur af klassifikationsmodeller for at identificere valg af fravalg i teksten til privatlivspolitikken og mærke almindelige valgmuligheder med en gennemsnitlig F1 score på 0,735. Vores teknikker gør det muligt at oprette systemer til at hjælpe internetbrugere med at lære om deres valg, hvorved meddelelse og valg påvirker og forbedrer internetets privatliv.', 'bg': 'Политиките за поверителност на уебсайтовете и мобилните приложения, написани на естествен език, обикновено са дълги и трудни за разбиране. Поверителността на информацията се върти около основния принцип на уведомяване и избор, а именно идеята потребителите да могат да вземат информирани решения за това каква информация за тях може да се събира и как може да се използва. Интернет потребителите искат контрол върху поверителността си, но изборът им често се крие в дълги и сложни текстове на политиката за поверителност. Освен това е направена малка (ако изобщо) предишна работа за откриване на предоставянето на избор в текста. Ние се справяме с това предизвикателство да позволим избор на потребителите чрез автоматично идентифициране и извличане на съответния език на избор в политиките за поверителност. По-специално, ние представяме двуетапна архитектура на класификационните модели, за да идентифицираме изборите за отказ в текста на политиката за поверителност, етикетирайки общи сортове избори със средна оценка от 0,735. Техниките ни позволяват създаването на системи, които да помогнат на интернет потребителите да научат за избора си, като по този начин се осъществява известие и избор и се подобрява поверителността на интернет.', 'hr': 'Politika privatnosti internetskih stranica i mobilnih aplikacija, napisana na prirodnom jeziku, teško je shvatiti dugo i teško. Informativna privatnost se okreće oko temeljnog načela obavijesti i izbora, a to je ideja da korisnici mogu donijeti obaviješene odluke o tome što se informacije o njima mogu prikupiti i kako se može koristiti. Korisnici interneta žele kontrolu nad svojom privatnošću, ali njihovi izbori se često skrivaju u dugim i konvolutiranim tekstima politike privatnosti. Osim toga, mali (ako je bilo) prije rada obavljen za otkrivanje određenog izbora u tekstu. Mi rješavamo taj izazov omogućavanja izbora korisnika automatski identificiranjem i izvlačenjem odgovarajućeg izbora jezika u politikama privatnosti. Posebno, predstavljamo dvije faze arhitekturu klasifikacijskih modela kako bi identifikovali izbore izbora u tekstu politike privatnosti, označavajući zajedničke razine izbora s srednjim rezultatom F1 od 0,735. Naše tehnike omogućavaju stvaranje sustava kako bi korisnici interneta pomogli naučiti o svojim izborima, tako djelujući obavijest i izbor i poboljšati privatnost interneta.', 'ko': '사이트와 모바일 애플리케이션의 프라이버시 정책은 자연 언어로 작성된 것으로 종종 길고 이해하기 어렵다.정보 프라이버시권은 알림과 선택의 기본 원칙, 즉 사용자가 어떤 정보를 수집하고 이를 어떻게 사용하는지 현명하게 결정할 수 있어야 한다는 것을 둘러싸고 있다.인터넷 사용자들은 자신의 프라이버시를 통제하기를 원하지만, 그들의 선택은 종종 지루하고 복잡한 프라이버시 정책 텍스트에 숨겨져 있다.그 밖에 이전에 텍스트의 옵션을 검사하는 작업을 거의 하지 않았다.Google은 프라이버시 정책의 관련 선택 언어를 자동으로 식별하고 추출함으로써 사용자의 선택에 대한 도전을 해결합니다.특히 우리는 프라이버시 정책 텍스트의 선택 퇴출 옵션을 식별하고 평균 F1 점수 0.735로 흔히 볼 수 있는 선택 종류를 표시하는 두 단계의 분류 모델 구조를 제시했다.우리의 기술은 시스템을 구축하여 인터넷 사용자들이 그들의 선택을 이해하고 통지와 선택을 실현하며 인터넷 프라이버시를 개선할 수 있도록 도와줄 수 있다.', 'de': 'Die Datenschutzrichtlinien von Websites und mobilen Apps, die in natürlicher Sprache verfasst sind, sind in der Regel lang und schwer verständlich. Der Datenschutz dreht sich um das grundlegende Prinzip der Mitteilung und Auswahl, nämlich die Idee, dass Benutzer in der Lage sein sollten, fundierte Entscheidungen darüber zu treffen, welche Informationen über sie gesammelt und wie sie verwendet werden können. Internetnutzer wollen Kontrolle über ihre Privatsphäre, aber ihre Entscheidungen sind oft in langen und verwickelten Datenschutzerklärungstexten versteckt. Darüber hinaus wurde bisher wenig (wenn überhaupt) daran gearbeitet, die Auswahl im Text aufzudecken. Wir begegnen dieser Herausforderung, die Benutzerwahl zu ermöglichen, indem wir die entsprechende Sprache automatisch identifizieren und extrahieren. Insbesondere stellen wir eine zweistufige Architektur von Klassifizierungsmodellen vor, um Opt-out-Optionen im Text der Datenschutzrichtlinie zu identifizieren, wobei gängige Auswahlvarianten mit einem mittleren F1-Score von 0,735 gekennzeichnet werden. Unsere Techniken ermöglichen die Schaffung von Systemen, um Internetnutzern zu helfen, über ihre Wahlmöglichkeiten zu erfahren, wodurch Bekanntmachung und Auswahl bewirkt und der Datenschutz im Internet verbessert wird.', 'fa': 'سیاست خصوصی کاربردهای وب\u200cسایت و موبایل، نوشته شده در زبان طبیعی، طولانی و سخت است که درک کنند. خصوصی اطلاعات اطلاعات در اطراف قانون بنیادی اطلاعات و انتخاب، یعنی ایده ای که کاربران باید بتونند تصمیم\u200cگیری آگاهی بگیرند درباره چه اطلاعات درباره آنها می\u200cتوانند جمع شوند و چگونه می\u200cتوانند استفاده شوند. کاربران اینترنت می\u200cخواهند کنترل خصوصی خود را کنترل کنند، اما انتخاب\u200cهایشان اغلب در متن سیاست خصوصی طولانی و مخفی می\u200cشوند. علاوه بر این، کار پیشینیان کوچک برای تشخیص دادن انتخابات در متن انجام شده است. ما این چالش را حل می\u200cکنیم که در سیاست\u200cهای خصوصی توان انتخاب کاربر را با خودکار شناسایی و استخراج کردن زبان انتخاب مناسبی در سیاست خصوصی انجام دهیم. مخصوصا، ما یک معماری دو مرحله از مدل\u200cهای مختلف را برای شناسایی انتخاب\u200cهای انتخاب\u200cبندی در متن سیاست\u200cهای خصوصی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که مختلف انتخاب\u200cهای مشترک با یک امتیاز متوسط F1 از 0.735 نشان می\u200cدهیم. تکنیک\u200cهای ما به ایجاد سیستم\u200cها اجازه می\u200cدهند که به کاربر اینترنت کمک کنند تا در مورد انتخاب\u200cهایشان یاد بگیرند، به وسیله\u200cی این که اخطار و انتخاب کنند و خصوصی اینترنت را بهتر کنند.', 'tr': 'Meýdançalaryň we bellenen programleriniň gizlilik politikasy, tebigy dilde ýazylýar, uzak we kyn düşünmek aňsatdyr. Ullançylar hakynda nähili maglumat toplanabilen we nähili ullanılabilir barada maglumat hususiyeti habaryň we saýlawyň esasy prinsipinde çykýar. Internet Ullançylary özleriniň hususiyetleri üstünde kontrol etmek isleýär ýöne olaryň saýlawlary köplenç uzak we azaltylyk syýasy metinlerinde gizlenýär. Munuň üçin, öňki işiň esasy saýlawlaryň berenini tespit etmek üçin kiçi bir iş edildi. Biz bu kynçylyky ýüzünlik politikalarynda ullançylar saýlawy otomatik tanamak we çykarmak üçin ullanýarys. Aýratyn bolsa, biz klasifikasyon nusgalarynyň iki staýasynda saýlawlary tespit etmek üçin bir arhitektura görkeýäris, we olaryň umumy saýlawlarynyň orta noktasy 0.735 diýip etitlenýär. Biziň tekniklerimiz internetçileriň saýlawlary barada öwrenmek üçin sistemalary bejermek üçin mümkin edýär, şeýle diýip pikir etmek we saýlamak üçin internetçiliklerini ýagdaýlaşýar.', 'af': "Webwerke en mobile toepassings se privateitsbeleid, skryf in natuurlike taal, moet lank en moeilik wees om te verstaan. Informasie-privateit revolver rondom die fundamentele prinsipe van kennisgewing en keuse, bedoel die idee dat gebruikers kan besluit word om inligtige besluit te maak oor watter inligting van hulle kan versamel word en hoe dit kan gebruik word. Internetgebruikers wil beheer oor hul privateit, maar hul keuses word dikwels versteek in lang en konvoluteerde privateitsbeleid teks. Maar, bietjie (as enige) voorheede werk is gedoen om die verskaffing van keuses in teks te ontdek. Ons adres hierdie uitdrukking om gebruiker keuse te aktiveer deur outomaties te identifiseer en uittrek pertinent keuse taal in privateitsbeleid. In spesifieke stel ons 'n twee-stadige arkitektuur van klasifikasie modele voor om opt-uit keuses in privateitsbeleid teks te identifiseer, wat gemeenskaplike verskeidings van keuses met 'n gemeenskaplike F1 telling van 0.735 te merk. Ons teknike kan die skepping van stelsels aktiveer om Internet gebruikers te help om oor hul keuses te leer, deur dit kennisgewing en keuse te effekteer en Internet privateit te verbeter.", 'sq': 'Politikat e fshehtësisë së uebsajteve dhe aplikacioneve të lëvizshme, të shkruara në gjuhën natyrore, tenderojnë të jenë të gjata dhe të vështira për të kuptuar. Privatësia e informacionit rrotullohet rreth parimit themelor të njoftimit dhe zgjedhjes, veçanërisht idenë se përdoruesit duhet të jenë në gjendje të marrin vendime të informuar rreth asaj që informacioni rreth tyre mund të mblidhet dhe se si mund të përdoret. Përdoruesit e internetit duan kontrollin mbi privatësinë e tyre, por zgjedhjet e tyre shpesh janë të fshehura në tekste të gjata dhe të ndërlikuara të politikës së privatësisë. Moreover, little (if any) prior work has been done to detect the provision of choices in text.  Ne trajtojmë këtë sfidë për të mundësuar zgjedhjen e përdoruesit duke identifikuar dhe nxjerrë automatikisht gjuhën e zgjedhjes në politikat e privatësisë. Veçanërisht, ne paraqesim një arkitekturë dy-fazore të modeleve klasifikimi për të identifikuar zgjedhjet opt-out në tekstin e politikës së privatësisë, etiketat e ndryshimeve të përbashkëta të zgjedhjeve me një rezultat mesatar F1 prej 0.735. Tekniket tona lejojnë krijimin e sistemeve për të ndihmuar përdoruesit e internetit të mësojnë rreth zgjedhjeve të tyre, duke efektuar kështu njoftimin dhe zgjedhjen dhe duke përmirësuar privatësinë e internetit.', 'am': 'የድረአምባዎች እና የmobile ፕሮግራሞች የግል ፖለቲካዎች በፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ የተጻፈ ረጅም እና ለማስተዋል በጣም ከባድ ነው፡፡ የኩነቶች የግል ግዛት፣ የመጠቀም መረጃዎች እንዴት እንዲሰበስብ እና እንዴት እንዲጠቀም የሚችሉትን ማስታወቂያ እንዲችሉ እና እንዴት እንዲጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የኢንተርኔት ተጠቃሚዎች የግል ሥርዓታቸውን ሊገልጽ ይፈልጋሉ፤ ነገር ግን ምርጫቸው ብዙ ጊዜ ረጅም እና በተመሳሳይ የግል ፖሊሲ ጽሑፎች ይሸሽጋሉ፡፡ ደግሞም ጥቂት (ማንኛውም) አስቀድሞ ሥራ ቢደረግ ምርጫዎችን በጽሑፍ ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ የግል ፖሊሲ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ ቋንቋን ማግኘት እና ለመውጣት የፍትወት ምርጫዎችን ማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ In particular, we present a two-stage architecture of classification models to identify opt-out choices in privacy policy text, labelling common varieties of choices with a mean F1 score of 0.735.  የኢንተርኔት ተጠቃሚዎች ምርጫቸውን ለመማር እና የመረጃ ማድረግ እና የመረጃ ምርጫዎችን ለማድረግ እና የኢንተርኔት የግል ብሔራዊነትን ለማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'id': 'Kebijakan privasi website dan aplikasi ponsel, ditulis dalam bahasa alami, cenderung untuk panjang dan sulit untuk dipahami. Privasi informasi berputar sekitar prinsip dasar Notis dan pilihan, yaitu ide bahwa pengguna harus mampu membuat keputusan yang diberitahu tentang apa informasi tentang mereka dapat dikumpulkan dan bagaimana dapat digunakan. Pengguna Internet ingin mengendalikan privasi mereka, tapi pilihan mereka sering tersembunyi dalam teks panjang dan terhubung kebijakan privasi. Selain itu, sedikit (jika ada) pekerjaan sebelumnya telah dilakukan untuk mendeteksi penyediaan pilihan dalam teks. Kami mengatasi tantangan ini untuk memungkinkan pilihan pengguna dengan secara otomatis mengidentifikasi dan mengekstraksi bahasa pilihan pertinent dalam kebijakan privasi. Terutama, kami mempersembahkan arsitektur dua tahap dari model klasifikasi untuk mengidentifikasi pilihan opt-out dalam teks kebijakan privasi, mengetikkan variasi umum pilihan dengan nilai F1 rata-rata 0,735. Our techniques enable the creation of systems to help Internet users to learn about their choices, thereby effectuating notice and choice and improving Internet privacy.', 'sw': 'Sera za faragha za matumizi ya tovuti na simu za mkononi, zilizoandikwa kwa lugha ya asili, huwa ni vigumu kuelewa. Information privacy revolves around the fundamental principle of Notice and choice, namely the idea that users should be able to make informed decisions about what information about them can be collected and how it can be used.  Watumiaji wa mtandao wa intaneti wanahitaji kudhibiti faragha yao, lakini chaguo lao mara nyingi hujificha katika teknolojia za sera za faragha na za siri. Zaidi ya hayo, kidogo (kama kazi yoyote) imefanywa ili kutambua utoaji wa chaguo kwa maandishi. Tunajadili changamoto hili la kuwawezesha watumiaji kuchagua chaguo kwa kujitambua na kutengeneza lugha ya uchaguzi muhimu katika sera za faragha. Kwa hakika, tunaweka ujenzi wa mifano miwili ya daraja ili kutambua chaguo za uteuzi katika ujumbe wa sera binafsi, tunaonyesha tofauti za chaguo za kawaida kwa kiwango cha F1 cha 0.735. Teknolojia zetu zinawezesha kutengeneza mfumo wa kuwasaidia watumiaji wa mtandao wa intaneti kujifunza kuhusu chaguo lao, kwa hiyo inatumia taarifa na chaguo na kuboresha faragha ya mtandao wa intaneti.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় লিখা ওয়েবসাইট এবং মোবাইল অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের গোপনীয়তা নীতি বোঝার জন্য দীর্ঘ এবং কঠিন। Information privacy revolves around the fundamental principle of Notice and choice, namely the idea that users should be able to make informed decisions about what information about them can be collected and how it can be used.  ইন্টারনেট ব্যবহারকারীরা তাদের গোপনীয়তার উপর নিয়ন্ত্রণ চায়, কিন্তু তাদের নির্বাচন প্রায়শ দীর্ঘ এবং বিশ্বাস করে গোপনী তাছাড়াও, লেখায় পছন্দের প্রদানের জন্য ছোট (যদি কোন) কাজের আগে কাজ করা হয়েছে। আমরা ব্যবহারকারীদের পছন্দের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত এবং ব্যক্তিগত নীতিতে বিশেষ পছন্দ ভাষাকে বের করে নিয়ে এই চ্যালে বিশেষ করে, আমরা ব্যক্তিগত নীতি লেখায় প্রাইভেট নীতির বিভিন্ন সিদ্ধান্ত চিহ্নিত করার জন্য একটি দুই স্তরের ক্লাসিফেশন মডেলের কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করি, যার মানে ফ ইন্টারনেট ব্যবহারকারীদের নির্বাচন সম্পর্কে জানতে সাহায্য করার জন্য আমাদের প্রযুক্তিগুলো সৃষ্টি করতে সক্ষম হয়, যার ফলে নোটি ও পছন্দের', 'bs': 'Politika privatnosti internetskih stranica i mobilnih aplikacija, napisana na prirodnom jeziku, teško je shvatiti dugo i teško. Informativna privatnost se okreće oko temeljnog principa obavijesti i izbora, a to je ideja da korisnici mogu donijeti obavijestite odluke o tome kakve informacije o njima mogu biti prikupljene i kako se može koristiti. Korisnici interneta žele kontrolu nad svojom privatnošću, ali njihovi izbori su često skriveni u dugim i konvolutiranim tekstima politike privatnosti. Osim toga, mali (ako je bilo) prije posla radi kako bi se otkrilo određenje izbora u tekstu. Mi rješavamo taj izazov omogućavanja izbora korisnika automatski identificiranjem i izvlačenjem odgovarajućeg izbornog jezika u politikama privatnosti. Posebno predstavljamo dvije faze arhitekturu klasifikacijskih modela kako bi identifikovali izbore izbora iz teksta politike privatnosti, označavajući zajedničke razlike izbora sa srednjim rezultatom F1 od 0,735. Naše tehnike omogućavaju stvaranje sustava da pomognu korisnicima interneta da nauče o svojim izborima, tako da provede obavijest i izbor i poboljšavaju privatnost interneta.', 'ca': "Les polítiques de privacitat dels llocs web i les aplicacions mòbils, escrites en llenguatge natural, tendeixen a ser llargues i difícils d'entendre. La privacitat de la informació gira al voltant del principi fonamental de la Avisa i l'elecció, a saber, la idea que els usuaris haurien de poder prendre decisions informades sobre quina informació es pot recollir i com es pot utilitzar. Els usuaris d'Internet volen controlar la seva privacitat, però sovint les seves eleccions estan amagades en textos llargs i convolurats de política de privacitat. A més, no s'ha fet gaire (si hi ha alguna) feina anterior per detectar la oferta d'eleccions en text. Afectem aquest repte de permetre l'elecció dels usuaris identificant i extraint automàticament el llenguatge d'elecció pertinent en les polítiques de privacitat. En particular, presentem una arquitectura en dos etapes de models de classificació per identificar opcions d'exclusió en el text de la política de privacitat, etiquetant varietats comunes d'opcions amb una puntuació F1 mitjana de 0,735. Our techniques enable the creation of systems to help Internet users to learn about their choices, thereby effectuating notice and choice and improving Internet privacy.", 'hy': 'Վեբկայքերի և բջջային ծրագրերի գաղտնիության քաղաքականությունը, գրված բնական լեզվով, շատ երկար է և դժվար է հասկանալ: Տեղեկատվության գաղտնիությունը շրջապատում է Ուշադրության և ընտրության հիմնարար սկզբունքի շուրջ, հատկապես այն գաղափարի մասին, որ օգտագործողները պետք է կարողանան տեղեկացված որոշումներ կայացնել այն մասին, թե ինչ տեղեկատվություն կարող են հավաքել և ինչպես այն կարող Ինտերնետի օգտագործողները ուզում են կառավարել իրենց գաղտնիքի վերաբերյալ, բայց նրանց ընտրությունը հաճախ թաքնված է երկար և թաքնված գաղտնիքի քաղաքականության տեքստերում: Moreover, little (if any) prior work has been done to detect the provision of choices in text.  Մենք լուծում ենք այս մարտահրավերը՝ օգտագործողների ընտրությունը հնարավորելու միջոցով ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերելով և դուրս բերելով պատասխանատու ընտրական լեզուն գաղտնիքի քաղաքականության մեջ: Մենք հատկապես ներկայացնում ենք դասակարգման մոդելների երկու փուլում գտնվող ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի բացահայտենք անհնար ընտրությունները գաղտնիքի քաղաքականության տեքստում, նշում ենք ընդհանուր ընտրությունների բազմազանությունները 0,735-ի միջին F1- Մեր տեխնիկաները հնարավորություն են տալիս ստեղծել համակարգեր, որոնք օգնեն ինտերնետի օգտագործողներին սովորել իրենց ընտրությունների մասին, այնպես իրականացնելով նախազգուշացությունը, ընտրությունը և բարելավելով ինտերնետի գա', 'cs': 'Zásady ochrany osobních údajů webových stránek a mobilních aplikací, napsané v přirozeném jazyce, jsou obvykle dlouhé a obtížně srozumitelné. Ochrana osobních údajů se točí kolem základní zásady oznámení a volby, konkrétně myšlenky, že uživatelé by měli mít možnost činit informovaná rozhodnutí o tom, jaké informace o nich mohou být shromažďovány a jak je lze použít. Uživatelé internetu chtějí kontrolu nad svým soukromím, ale jejich volby jsou často skryty v dlouhých a spletitých textech zásad ochrany osobních údajů. Kromě toho byla dříve vykonána málo (pokud existuje) práce na zjištění poskytování možností volby v textu. Tuto výzvu spočívající v umožnění výběru uživatelů řešíme automatickou identifikací a extrakcí příslušného jazyka volby v zásadách ochrany osobních údajů. Představujeme zejména dvoustupňovou architekturu klasifikačních modelů pro identifikaci možností opt-out v textu zásad ochrany osobních údajů a označujeme běžné varianty voleb průměrným skórem F1 0,735. Naše techniky umožňují vytvářet systémy, které pomáhají uživatelům internetu dozvědět se o svých volbách, čímž dochází k upozornění a volbě a zlepšení soukromí na internetu.', 'az': 'Vasitlərin və mobil uyğulamaların təbiətli dildə yazılmış təbiətli siyasətlərin uzun və çətin olduğunu anlamaq məqsədilə bənzəyir. İstifadəçilərin haqqında nə məlumat toplanacağı və necə istifadə ediləcəyi haqqında bildirilmiş kararlar vermək üçün istifadəçilərin və seçimlərin əsas prinsipi ətrafında təhrif edir. İnternet istifadəçiləri özlərinin xəbərsizliğini kontrol etmək istəyirlər, amma seçimləri çox uzun və müxtəlif xəbərsizlik siyasi mətnlərində gizlənirlər. Daha sonra, əvvəlki iş mətndə seçimlərin ruzisini tanıtmaq üçün çox az işlər edilmişdir. Biz bu çətinlikdə istifadəçilərin seçimlərini öz-özünə təşkil etmək və seçimlərin dilini təşkil etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün çətinliklə çəkiririk. Özellikle, biz ikinci fərz arhitektürünü təsdiqləyirik ki, xüsusiyyət politikası metində fərqli seçimləri təsdiqləmək üçün seçimləri təsdiqləyirik, orta f1 dərəcəsi 0,735 ilə müxtəlif seçimləri etiketləyirik. Bizim tekniklərimiz internet istifadəçilərinin seçimləri haqqında öyrənməsinə kömək etmək üçün sistemlərin yaratmasını qabilleştirir, bu olaraq bilgiləri, seçimləri və İnternet təhlükəsizlərini yaxşılaşdırır.', 'et': 'Veebisaitide ja mobiilirakenduste privaatsuspoliitikad, mis on kirjutatud looduslikus keeles, on tavaliselt pikad ja raskesti mõistetavad. Teabe privaatsus põhineb teavitamise ja valiku aluspõhimõttel, nimelt ideel, et kasutajad peaksid saama teha teadlikke otsuseid selle kohta, millist teavet nende kohta saab koguda ja kuidas seda kasutada. Interneti-kasutajad soovivad kontrolli oma privaatsuse üle, kuid nende valikud on sageli peidetud pikkadesse ja keerulistesse privaatsuspoliitikatekstidesse. Lisaks on eelnevalt tehtud vähe (kui üldse) tööd, et tuvastada valikuvõimalusi tekstis. Me tegeleme sellega, et võimaldame kasutajatel valida, tuvastades automaatselt asjakohase valikukeele privaatsuspoliitikatest ja välja tõmmates. Eelkõige tutvustame klassifitseerimismudelite kaheastmelist arhitektuuri, et tuvastada eraelu puutumatuse poliitika tekstis loobumisest loobumise valikud, märgistades tavalisi valikute sorte keskmise F1 skooriga 0,735. Meie tehnikad võimaldavad luua süsteeme, mis aitavad Interneti kasutajatel oma valikutest teada saada, tõhustades seeläbi teavitamist ja valikut ning parandades Interneti privaatsust.', 'fi': 'Verkkosivustojen ja mobiilisovellusten tietosuojakäytännöt, jotka on kirjoitettu luonnollisella kielellä, ovat yleensä pitkiä ja vaikeasti ymmärrettäviä. Tietosuojassa on kyse ilmoituksen ja valinnan perusperiaatteesta, nimittäin ajatuksesta, että käyttäjien olisi voitava tehdä tietoon perustuvia päätöksiä siitä, mitä tietoja heistä voidaan kerätä ja miten niitä voidaan käyttää. Internetin käyttäjät haluavat hallita yksityisyyttään, mutta heidän valintansa piilotetaan usein pitkiin ja monimutkaisiin tietosuojakäytäntöteksteihin. Lisäksi on tehty vähän (jos lainkaan) aikaisempaa työtä sen havaitsemiseksi, että tekstissä on tarjottu vaihtoehtoja. Vastaamme tähän käyttäjien valinnan mahdollistamiseen liittyvään haasteeseen tunnistamalla ja poimimalla automaattisesti asianmukaisen valintakielen tietosuojakäytännöistä. Erityisesti esittelemme kaksivaiheisen luokittelumalliarkkitehtuurin, jonka avulla voidaan tunnistaa opt-out-valinnat tietosuojakäytännön tekstissä ja merkitä yhteisiä valintoja F1-pisteellä keskimäärin 0,735. Tekniikamme mahdollistavat sellaisten järjestelmien luomisen, jotka auttavat Internetin käyttäjiä oppimaan valinnoistaan, mikä mahdollistaa ilmoituksen ja valinnan sekä parantaa Internetin yksityisyyttä.', 'he': 'מדיניות פרטיות האתרים והאפליקציות הניידות, שנכתבות בשפה טבעית, נוטים להיות ארוכות וקשה להבין. פרטיות המידע מסתובבת סביב העקרון הבסיסי של ההודעה והבחירה, במיוחד הרעיון שהמשתמשים צריכים להיות מסוגלים לקבל החלטות מודיעות על מה מידע עליהם יכול להיאסף ואיך הוא יכול להשתמש. משתמשים באינטרנט רוצים שליטה על הפרטיות שלהם, אבל הבחירות שלהם נמצאות לעתים קרובות חבויות בטקסטים ארוכים ומתובבים מדיניות פרטיות. חוץ מזה, מעט (אם יש) עבודה קודמת נעשה כדי לגלות את הספקה של בחירות בטקסט. אנו מתמודדים עם האתגר הזה של אפשרות בחירה משתמשת על ידי זיהוי אוטומטי ומוציא שפת בחירה רלוונטית במדיניות פרטיות. במיוחד, אנחנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה בשתי שלבים של דוגמנים מסווגים לזהות בחירות אופט-החוצה בטקסט מדיניות פרטיות הטכניקות שלנו מאפשרות ליצור מערכות כדי לעזור למשתמשים באינטרנט ללמוד על הבחירות שלהם, כך להשפיע בהודעה ובבחירה ולהשפר פרטיות האינטרנט.', 'sk': 'Pravilniki o zasebnosti spletnih mest in mobilnih aplikacij, napisani v naravnem jeziku, so običajno dolgi in težko razumljivi. Zasebnost informacij temelji na temeljnem načelu obveščanja in izbire, namreč ideji, da bi morali uporabniki imeti možnost sprejemati informirane odločitve o tem, katere informacije o njih je mogoče zbrati in kako jih je mogoče uporabiti. Uporabniki interneta želijo nadzor nad svojo zasebnostjo, vendar so njihove izbire pogosto skrite v dolgih in zapletenih besedilih politike zasebnosti. Poleg tega je bilo malo (če sploh) predhodnega dela opravljenega za odkrivanje zagotavljanja izbir v besedilu. Ta izziv omogočanja izbire uporabnikov rešujemo s samodejnim prepoznavanjem in izvlečevanjem ustreznega jezika izbire v politiki zasebnosti. Predstavljamo zlasti dvostopenjsko arhitekturo modelov razvrščanja, da bi v besedilu politike zasebnosti opredelili izbire za zavrnitev, označevali skupne sorte izbire s povprečno oceno F1 0,735. Naše tehnike omogočajo oblikovanje sistemov, ki uporabnikom interneta pomagajo spoznati svoje izbire, s čimer omogočajo obveščanje in izbiro ter izboljšanje zasebnosti interneta.', 'jv': 'Dolanan pribadi nang webs karo aplikasi mobil, sampeyan lagi pakan ning langa budhakan, tentang sampeyan lan susah. Pribadi informasi nggawe barang-aké supensi bener tentang karo bebasan ning Notis lan Pilihan, nambah kebebasan winih dhéwé iso dianggawe informasi ning kebebasan informasi sing apik dhéwé iso nggawe ampuhé lan ampuhé berarti. Awak Internet maneh pengin nguasai penggunaké pribadi, njuk sopan pilihan wong liyane sak nguasai kapan lan dekasai politik sing pribadi. Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé ngerasah perbudhakan iki dadi nggawe ngubah akeh pengguna sapa-uteg yen nggih sapa-uteg liyane sing ngubah layar kanggo ngubah persên. ngomong: Teknik-teknik awak dhéwé iso nggawe sistem kanggo bantuan pengguna Internet kanggo ngerasai sak sebelahi kanggo nggawe Perintah lan Pilihan lan ngéwé ngerasai Pribadi Internet', 'bo': 'དྲ་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་སྐུད་མེད་པའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ། རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག སྒེར་གྱི་ཆེད་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་དུ་བརྡ་འཕྲིན་དང་གདམ་ཀྱི་རྨན་གཞི་གླེང་སྟེང་འདིར་བྱེད་ཡོད། ཆོག་ཡིན་ན། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྐོར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དེ་ཚོར་ དྲ་དམངས་གཙོ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མི་སྒེར་གྱི་རང་དབང་གི་ལས་དོ་དམ་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གདམ་ཀ་དེ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་རིང ད་དུང་། ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་གདམ་གསེས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཁོངས་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པའི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ཆུང་ཉུང་ཡོད་པ། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གདམ་གས་འདི་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པ་རྟོགས་ན་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གདམ་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས In particular, we present a two-stage architecture of classification models to identify opt-out choices in privacy policy text, labelling common varieties of choices with a mean F1 score of 0.735. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གདམ་ཁ་ཐད་ནས་མཐུད་རྐྱེན་དང་འདེམས་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་།', 'ha': "Rukacin tsari na shiryoyin ayukan ayukan ayuka da aka rubũta cikin harshen asimi, za'a zama masu yiwuwa tsawo da wagon yin fahimta. Primary information na buɗe around the essence of the Note and select, i.e. the idãnan da mai amfani da shi ya kamata a iya iya faɗa hukuncin abin da information za'a sami da kuma yadda za'a iya amfani da shi. Yin amfani da Intanet sunã nufin su yi mamlaka a kanzu farat ɗaya, kuma amma an ɓõye zaɓen su ko da yawa a cikin rubutun siyasar da farat ɗaya. Da haka, da abu kaɗan idan an aikata wani aiki sai a gane wa'azi na zaɓallin matsayin. Munã tambayar wannan kansalar da za'a iya amfani da amfani da kwamfyutan ka gane da kuma mu fitar da harshen zaɓaɓen masu inganci cikin siyafan farat ɗaya. Kayyai, Munã halatar da wani matsayin masallaci biyu-daraja don ka iya gane zaɓallin shiryarwa cikin matsayin siyasar ta fara ɗaya, kuma munã nuna wasu masu shiryuwa na daban-daban da aka kasancewa F1 score 0.735. YagoniyayinMu na amfani da wasu mutane na Intanet su iya ƙara wa masu amfani da intaintaintainet dõmin su san zãɓen su, sai su yi amfani da alama da zaɓen gareshi da kuma ana ƙara fara farat ɗaya na Intanet."}
{'en': 'An Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document Versions', 'fr': "Une analyse empirique de l'importance des modifications entre les versions de documents", 'ar': 'تحليل تجريبي لأهمية التحرير بين إصدارات المستند', 'es': 'Un análisis empírico de la importancia de la edición entre versiones de documentos', 'pt': 'Uma análise empírica da importância da edição entre as versões do documento', 'ja': 'ドキュメントバージョン間の編集の重要性の実証的分析', 'zh': '文档版本间编辑重要之实证', 'ru': 'Эмпирический анализ важности редактирования между версиями документа', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़ संस्करणों के बीच संपादन महत्व का एक अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Anailís Eimpíreach ar Tábhacht in Eagar idir Leaganacha Doiciméid', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის ვერციების შორის რედაქტირების მნიშვნელობის ამომირიკალური ანალიზი', 'hu': 'A dokumentumverziók közötti fontosság szerkesztésének empirikus elemzése', 'el': 'Μια εμπειρική ανάλυση της σημασίας επεξεργασίας μεταξύ εκδόσεων εγγράφων', 'it': "Un'analisi empirica dell'importanza di modifica tra versioni del documento", 'kk': 'Құжат нұсқалары арасындағы маңыздылығын өңдеу империкалық анализ', 'ms': 'An Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document Versions', 'ml': 'രേഖയുടെ പതിപ്പുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Analiżi Impirika tal-Importanza ta’ Edizzjoni bejn il-Verżjonijiet tad-Dokumenti', 'mn': 'Документын хувилбаруудын хамгийн чухал тохиолдол', 'no': 'Eit empirisk analyse av redigeringsviktighet mellom dokumentversjonar', 'pl': 'Analiza empiryczna znaczenia edycji między wersjami dokumentów', 'ro': 'O analiză empirică a importanței editării între versiunile documentelor', 'sr': 'Impirička analiza editora važnosti između verzija dokumenta', 'lt': 'An Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document Versions', 'mk': 'Империска анализа на уредување на важноста помеѓу верзиите на документот', 'si': 'දස්තාවේදි සංවිධානය අතර සංවිධානය විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Analyse Empirical of Edit Importance between Document Verifications', 'sv': 'En empirisk analys av redigeringens betydelse mellan dokumentversioner', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'دکھانے واسطے کے درمیان اہم اثرات کی ویڈیٹ کی عمومی تحلیل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document versions', 'da': 'En empirisk analyse af redigering vigtighed mellem dokumentversioner', 'bg': 'Емпиричен анализ на значението на редакцията между версиите на документа', 'nl': 'Een empirische analyse van het belang van bewerken tussen documentversies', 'hr': 'Empirička analiza redakcije važnosti između verzija dokumenta', 'de': 'Eine empirische Analyse der Edit-Bedeutung zwischen Dokumentversionen', 'id': 'An Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document Versions', 'ko': '문서 버전 간 편집의 중요성에 대한 실증 분석', 'sw': 'Anachambua Uwezeshaji wa Tahariri Kimuhimu kati ya Vitabu vya Sheria', 'tr': 'Sened Däplikleri arasynda Wagtlaýyn Taýramlygy', 'fa': 'یک تحلیل امپراتیک از ویرایش مهم بین نسخه\u200cهای سند', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një Analizë Perandore e Ndryshimit të rëndësisë midis Versioneve të Dokumentit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Dökümət Versyonları arasındakı möhümlülük Düzenlemenin İmpariki Analizi', 'bn': 'An Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document Versions', 'bs': 'Empirička analiza editora važnosti između verzija dokumenta', 'ca': "Un anàlisi empíric d'edició d'importància entre les versions dels documentos", 'cs': 'Empirická analýza důležitosti úprav mezi verzemi dokumentů', 'et': 'Dokumendiversioonide vahelise olulisuse empiiriline analüüs', 'fi': 'Empiirinen analyysi julkaisuversioiden välisen muokkauksen tärkeydestä', 'jv': 'Ngubah Ketok Important terus Versi Dokumen', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Empirična analiza pomembnosti urejanja med različicami dokumenta', 'ha': 'An Empirical Analysis of Edit Importance between Document Versions', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་ཐོན་རིམ་དབར་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་གལ་ཆེན་དག་གི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a novel approach to infer significance of various textual edits to documents. An author may make several edits to a document ; each edit varies in its impact to the content of the document. While some edits are surface changes and introduce negligible change, other edits may change the content / tone of the document significantly. In this paper, we perform an analysis on the human perceptions of edit importance while reviewing documents from one version to the next. We identify linguistic features that influence edit importance and model it in a regression based setting. We show that the predicted importance by our approach is highly correlated with the human perceived importance, established by a Mechanical Turk study.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا جديدًا لاستنتاج أهمية التعديلات النصية المختلفة على المستندات. يجوز للمؤلف إجراء العديد من التعديلات على المستند ؛ يختلف كل تعديل في تأثيره على محتوى المستند. في حين أن بعض عمليات التحرير عبارة عن تغييرات سطحية وإدخال تغييرات طفيفة ، فقد تؤدي عمليات التحرير الأخرى إلى تغيير محتوى / نغمة المستند بشكل ملحوظ. في هذه الورقة ، نجري تحليلًا للتصورات البشرية لأهمية التحرير أثناء مراجعة المستندات من إصدار إلى آخر. نحدد السمات اللغوية التي تؤثر على أهمية التحرير ونضعها في إعداد قائم على الانحدار. نظهر أن الأهمية المتوقعة من خلال نهجنا ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا بالأهمية البشرية المتصورة ، والتي تم تحديدها من خلال دراسة تركيبة ميكانيكية.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque novedoso para inferir la importancia de varias ediciones textuales de los documentos. Un autor puede hacer varias ediciones en un documento; cada edición varía en cuanto a su impacto en el contenido del documento. Si bien algunas ediciones son cambios superficiales e introducen cambios insignificantes, otras pueden cambiar el contenido/tono del documento de forma significativa. En este artículo, realizamos un análisis de las percepciones humanas sobre la importancia de la edición mientras revisamos documentos de una versión a la siguiente. Identificamos las características lingüísticas que influyen en la importancia de la edición y la modelamos en un entorno basado en la regresión Demostramos que la importancia predicha por nuestro enfoque está altamente correlacionada con la importancia percibida por el ser humano, establecida por un estudio de Mechanical Turk.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova abordagem para inferir o significado de várias edições textuais em documentos. Um autor pode fazer várias edições em um documento; cada edição varia em seu impacto no conteúdo do documento. Enquanto algumas edições são alterações superficiais e introduzem alterações insignificantes, outras edições podem alterar significativamente o conteúdo/tom do documento. Neste artigo, realizamos uma análise sobre as percepções humanas da importância da edição ao revisar documentos de uma versão para outra. Identificamos características linguísticas que influenciam a importância da edição e a modelamos em uma configuração baseada em regressão. Mostramos que a importância prevista por nossa abordagem está altamente correlacionada com a importância percebida humana, estabelecida por um estudo Mechanical Turk.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une approche novatrice pour déduire l'importance de diverses modifications textuelles apportées à des documents. Un auteur peut apporter plusieurs modifications à un document\xa0; chaque modification varie en termes d'impact sur le contenu du document. Alors que certaines modifications sont des modifications superficielles et n'introduisent que des modifications négligeables, d'autres modifications peuvent modifier le contenu/la tonalité du document de manière significative. Dans cet article, nous effectuons une analyse des perceptions humaines de l'importance de la modification tout en examinant les documents d'une version à l'autre. Nous identifions les caractéristiques linguistiques qui influencent l'importance des modifications et les modélisons dans un contexte basé sur la régression. Nous montrons que l'importance prédite par notre approche est fortement corrélée à l'importance perçue par l'homme, établie par une étude de Mechanical Turk.", 'ja': '本稿では、文書に対する様々なテキスト編集の意義を推論するための新たなアプローチを提示する。著者は、ドキュメントに複数の編集を加えることができます。各編集は、ドキュメントの内容に与える影響によって異なります。一部の編集は表面の変更であり、ほとんど変更されませんが、他の編集ではドキュメントの内容/トーンが大幅に変更される場合があります。本稿では，人間の編集の重要性に対する認識を分析しつつ，あるバージョンから次バージョンへの文書の見直しを行っている．私たちは、編集の重要性に影響を与える言語学的特徴を特定し、回帰に基づく設定でモデル化します。私たちのアプローチによる予測される重要性は、機械的トゥルク研究によって確立された人間の知覚された重要性と非常に相関していることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文中,新法以推诸文本编辑文档要。 作者可数辑文档; 每辑对文档所染不同。 虽某编辑阳改引入可忽略不计,其他编辑或显改文档者/语气。 于本文中,考文档自一本至一本,析人伦编辑之要。 定言特征,建模于归设。 吾道之大要土耳其人研究所与机械之大要。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम दस्तावेजों के लिए विभिन्न पाठ्य संपादनों के महत्व का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एक लेखक किसी दस्तावेज़ में कई संपादन कर सकता है; प्रत्येक संपादन दस्तावेज़ की सामग्री के लिए इसके प्रभाव में भिन्न होता है। जबकि कुछ संपादन सतह परिवर्तन हैं और नगण्य परिवर्तन का परिचय देते हैं, अन्य संपादन दस्तावेज़ की सामग्री / टोन को महत्वपूर्ण रूप से बदल सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक संस्करण से अगले संस्करण तक दस्तावेजों की समीक्षा करते समय संपादन महत्व की मानव धारणाओं पर एक विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम भाषाई विशेषताओं की पहचान करते हैं जो संपादन महत्व को प्रभावित करते हैं और इसे प्रतिगमन आधारित सेटिंग में मॉडल करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारे दृष्टिकोण द्वारा अनुमानित महत्व मानव कथित महत्व के साथ अत्यधिक सहसंबद्ध है, जो एक यांत्रिक तुर्क अध्ययन द्वारा स्थापित किया गया है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы представляем новый подход к выведению значимости различных текстовых правок к документам. Автор может внести несколько изменений в документ; каждое изменение варьируется в зависимости от его содержания. В то время как некоторые изменения являются поверхностными изменениями и вносят незначительные изменения, другие изменения могут значительно изменить содержание/тон документа. В этой статье мы проводим анализ человеческого восприятия важности редактирования при рассмотрении документов от одной версии к другой. Мы определяем лингвистические особенности, которые влияют на важность редактирования, и моделируем их в условиях, основанных на регрессии. Показано, что прогнозируемая значимость по нашему подходу в значительной степени коррелирует с воспринимаемой человеком значимостью, установленной исследованием Mechanical Turk.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid cur chuige nua i láthair chun tábhacht na n-athruithe téacsacha éagsúla ar dhoiciméid a bhaint amach. Féadfaidh údar roinnt athruithe a dhéanamh ar dhoiciméad; athraíonn gach eagar ina thionchar ar ábhar an doiciméid. Cé gur athruithe dromchla iad roinnt athruithe agus go dtugann siad isteach athrú diomaibhseach, d’fhéadfadh go n-athródh athruithe eile ábhar/ton an doiciméid go suntasach. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar dhearcadh an duine ar thábhacht eagarthóireacht agus athbhreithniú á dhéanamh againn ar dhoiciméid ó leagan amháin go leagan eile. Aithnímid gnéithe teanga a mbíonn tionchar acu ar thábhacht eagarthóireachta agus eiseamláirímid é i suíomh atá bunaithe ar chúlchéimniú. Léirímid go bhfuil an tábhacht a thuartar ag ár gcur chuige comhghaolmhar go mór leis an tábhacht a bhraitear an duine, arna bhunú ag staidéar Meicniúil Turk.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ პრომენტის მიღება, რომელიც განსხვავებული ტექსტულ რედაქტირების მნიშვნელობას დოკუმენტებში გავაკეთებთ. ავტორი შეიძლება დოკუმენტის მრავალი რედაქტირების შექმნა; ყოველ რედაქტირება დოკუმენტის შემდგომარებისთვის განსხვავებულია. თუმცა ზოგიერთი რედაქტირები სამუშაო ცვლილებები და გადატანა ცვლილებები, სხვა რედაქტირები შეიძლება დოკუმენტის შესახებ/Ton ცვლილება მნიშვნელოვ ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ადამიანის აღმოჩენების ანალიზაცია მნიშვნელობის რედაქტირებას, როცა დოკუმენტები ერთი ვერსიდან შემდეგიდან გადავუ ჩვენ ინდრესისტიკური ფუნქციები განვიცნობით, რომლებიც მინდომის მნიშვნელობის რედაქტირება და მოდელის შესახებ რეგრესის ბაზეულში. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენილი მნიშვნელობა ძალიან კოლექალურია ადამიანის აღმოჩენილი მნიშვნელობით, რომელიც მაქნიკალური რულკის სწავლებ', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για να συναχθεί η σημασία των διαφόρων κειμένων επεξεργασιών σε έγγραφα. Ένας συγγραφέας μπορεί να κάνει αρκετές επεξεργασίες σε ένα έγγραφο. κάθε επεξεργασία ποικίλλει ως προς τον αντίκτυπο της στο περιεχόμενο του εγγράφου. Ενώ ορισμένες επεξεργασίες είναι επιφανειακές αλλαγές και εισάγουν αμελητέες αλλαγές, άλλες επεξεργασίες ενδέχεται να αλλάξουν σημαντικά το περιεχόμενο/τον τόνο του εγγράφου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια ανάλυση των ανθρώπινων αντιλήψεων ως προς τη σημασία επεξεργασίας ενώ εξετάζουμε έγγραφα από τη μία έκδοση στην άλλη. Αναγνωρίζουμε γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά που επηρεάζουν τη σημασία επεξεργασίας και το μοντελοποιούμε σε ένα περιβάλλον που βασίζεται στην παλινδρόμηση. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προβλεπόμενη σημασία από την προσέγγισή μας συσχετίζεται σε μεγάλο βαθμό με την ανθρώπινη αντιληπτή σημασία, που καθορίστηκε από μια Μηχανική Τουρκική μελέτη.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban új megközelítést mutatunk be a dokumentumok különböző szövegszerkesztéseinek jelentőségére. A szerző több szerkesztést is végezhet egy dokumentumban; Minden szerkesztés a dokumentum tartalmára gyakorolt hatásában változik. Míg egyes szerkesztések felületi változások, és elhanyagolható változásokat vezetnek be, más szerkesztések jelentősen megváltoztathatják a dokumentum tartalmát/hangszínét. Ebben a tanulmányban elemzést végzünk a szerkesztés fontosságáról szóló emberi érzékelésekről, miközben áttekintjük a dokumentumokat egyik változatról a másikra. Azonosítjuk azokat a nyelvi jellemzőket, amelyek befolyásolják a szerkesztés fontosságát, és regressziós alapú környezetben modellezzük. Megmutatjuk, hogy a megközelítésünk által előrejelzett fontosság nagymértékben korrelálódik az emberi érzékelt fontossággal, amelyet egy Mechanical Turk tanulmány által megállapított.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un nuovo approccio per dedurre il significato di varie modifiche testuali ai documenti. Un autore può apportare diverse modifiche a un documento; Ogni modifica varia nel suo impatto sul contenuto del documento. Mentre alcune modifiche sono modifiche superficiali e introducono modifiche trascurabili, altre modifiche possono cambiare significativamente il contenuto/tono del documento. In questo articolo, eseguiamo un'analisi sulle percezioni umane di importanza di modifica mentre esaminiamo documenti da una versione all'altra. Identifichiamo le caratteristiche linguistiche che influenzano l'importanza della modifica e la modelliamo in un ambiente basato sulla regressione. Mostriamo che l'importanza prevista dal nostro approccio è altamente correlata con l'importanza percepita dall'uomo, stabilita da uno studio Mechanical Turk.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naują požiūrį į įvairių tekstinių redakcijų reikšmę dokumentuose. Autorius gali atlikti kelis dokumento redakcijas; kiekvienas redakcijos poveikis priklauso nuo dokumento turinio. Nors kai kurie redagavimai yra paviršiaus pokyčiai ir yra nereikšmingi, kiti redagavimai gali reikšmingai pakeisti dokumento turinį ir (arba) toną. Šiame dokumente atliekame analizę apie žmogaus suvokimą apie redakcijos svarbą ir peržiūrime dokumentus iš vienos versijos į kitą. Nustatome kalbines savybes, turinčias įtakos redakcijos svarbai ir modeliuojame ją regresijos sąlygomis. Mes rodome, kad mūsų požiūrio prognozuojama svarba labai koreliuojama su žmogaus suvokiama svarba, nustatyta atlikus Mechaninių turkų tyrimą.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме нов пристап за да се заклучи значењето на различните текстуални уредувања во документите. Автор може да направи неколку уредувања во документ; NAME OF TRANSLATORS секој уред се разликува во своето влијание на содржината на документот. Иако некои уредувања се промени на површината и воведуваат незначителни промени, други уредувања може значително да ја променат содржината/тонот на документот. Во овој весник, спроведуваме анализа на човечките перцепции за уредување важност додека ги прегледаме документите од една верзија до друга. Ние идентификуваме јазични карактеристики кои влијаат на уредувањето на важноста и го моделираме во регресиски поставување. Покажуваме дека предвидената важност од нашиот пристап е високо поврзана со човечката перцепирана важност, утврдена од студијата на Механичкиот Турк.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru untuk menyimpulkan pentingan dari pelbagai edisi teks ke dokumen. Penulis boleh membuat beberapa edit ke dokumen; setiap edit berbeza dalam kesannya kepada kandungan dokumen. Sementara beberapa edit merupakan perubahan permukaan dan memperkenalkan perubahan yang tidak terlihat, edit lain mungkin mengubah kandungan/nada dokumen secara signifikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami melakukan analisis tentang perasaan manusia tentang penting edit semasa mengkaji dokumen dari satu versi ke versi berikutnya. Kami mengenalpasti ciri-ciri bahasa yang mempengaruhi penting edit dan model dalam seting berdasarkan regresi. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kepentingan yang dijangka oleh pendekatan kami adalah sangat berkorrelasi dengan kepentingan yang dianggap manusia, ditetapkan oleh kajian Mekanikal Turki.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രേഖകളിലേക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്തുലിക എഡിറ്ററുകളുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു നോ ഒരു രചയിതാവ് ഒരു രേഖയിലേക്ക് പല എടുത്തുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാം; രേഖയുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിലേക്ക് ഓരോ ചിട്ടപ്പെട്ടിട്ടും അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്. ചില ചില മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഭൂതലത്തിന്റെ മാറ്റങ്ങളാണെങ്കില്\u200d, അശ്രദ്ധയില്ലാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ പേരില്\u200d ഒരു അന്വേഷണ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെയും നാം ഭാഷിപ്പിക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്, മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക്', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw approċċ ġdid biex niinferu s-sinifikat ta’ diversi edizzjonijiet testwali għad-dokumenti. An author may make several edits to a document;  kull edit ivarja fl-impatt tiegħu skont il-kontenut tad-dokument. Filwaqt li xi edits huma bidliet fil-wiċċ u jintroduċu bidliet negliġibbli, edits oħrajn jistgħu jibdlu l-kontenut/it-ton tad-dokument b’mod sinifikanti. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu analiżi dwar il-perċezzjonijiet umani ta’ importanza ta’ editjar filwaqt li nirrevedu dokumenti minn verżjoni għal oħra. Aħna nidentifikaw karatteristiċi lingwistiċi li jinfluwenzaw l-importanza tal-edizzjoni u nimmudellawha f’ambjent ibbażat fuq ir-rigressjoni. Aħna nuru li l-importanza mbassra mill-approċċ tagħna hija korrelata ħafna mal-importanza perċepita mill-bniedem, stabbilita minn studju dwar it-Turk Mekkaniku.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөр өөр хэлбэрийн бичлэгүүдийг баримтуудад нэмэгдүүлэх шинэ арга зам илэрхийлж байна. Багш баримт хэдэн өөрчлөлт хийж болно. Засварлалт бүр баримтын бүтээгдэхүүнд өөрчлөгдөж байна. Зарим редакторууд гадаргуу өөрчлөлт болон бусад редакторууд баримтын соёлыг/дуу нь чухал өөрчлөх боломжтой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүн төрөлхтний ойлголтын тухай нэг хувилбараас дараагийн хүртэл баримтуудыг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид хэл хэлний чухал зүйлсийг өөрчлөхөд, сэтгэл хөдлөлт дээр загвар өгдөг. Бид хүний ойлголтын таамаглалтын чухал зүйл нь Механик Турк судалгаагаар байгуулсан хүний ойлголтын чухал чухал зүйлтэй маш холбоотой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi ein roman tilnærming for å gjere utvikling av ulike tekstredigeringar til dokument. Eit forfattar kan lage fleire redigeringar til eit dokument. kvar redigering varierer i effekten til innhaldet i dokumentet. Selv om nokre redigeringar er overflate- endringar og introduserer utanfor endringar, kan andre redigeringar endra innhaldet/tonen av dokumentet signifikant. I denne papiret utfører vi ein analyse om menneske oppfatningane for å redigera viktighet medan du gjer dokument frå ein versjon til neste. Vi identifiserer lingviske funksjonar som påvirkar endring av viktighet og modeller det i ein regresjonsbasert innstilling. Vi viser at den forventa viktigheten av tilnærminga vårt er svært korrelatert med den menneske oppfatte viktigheten, som er opprettet av ein mekanisk Turk-studie.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy nowatorskie podejście do wnioskowania znaczenia różnych edycji tekstowych dokumentów. Autor może dokonać kilku modyfikacji dokumentu; Każda edycja różni się wpływem na treść dokumentu. Podczas gdy niektóre edycje są zmianami powierzchniowymi i wprowadzają nieistotne zmiany, inne edycje mogą znacznie zmienić treść/ton dokumentu. W niniejszym artykule przeprowadzamy analizę ludzkiego postrzegania znaczenia edycyjnego podczas przeglądu dokumentów z jednej wersji do drugiej. Identyfikujemy cechy językowe, które wpływają na znaczenie edycji i modelujemy ją w oparciu o regresję. Wykazujemy, że przewidywane znaczenie naszego podejścia jest wysoce skorelowane z postrzeganym przez człowieka znaczeniem, ustalonym w badaniu mechanicznym Turka.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare nouă pentru a deduce semnificația diferitelor editări textuale la documente. Un autor poate efectua mai multe modificări ale unui document; Fiecare editare variază în impactul său asupra conținutului documentului. În timp ce unele modificări sunt modificări de suprafață și introduc modificări neglijabile, alte modificări pot modifica semnificativ conținutul/tonul documentului. În această lucrare, efectuăm o analiză a percepțiilor umane asupra importanței editării în timp ce revizuim documentele de la o versiune la alta. Identificăm caracteristicile lingvistice care influențează importanța editării și o modelăm într-un cadru bazat pe regresie. Noi arătăm că importanța preconizată prin abordarea noastră este foarte corelată cu importanța percepută umană, stabilită printr-un studiu Mecanic Turk.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi pristup da povezujemo značaj različitih tekstualnih editora u dokumente. Autor može napraviti nekoliko editora za dokument; svaki urednik se razlikuje u svoj uticaj na sadržaj dokumenta. Iako su neke editore izmjene površine i predstavljaju nezgodne promjene, drugi editori mogu značajno promijeniti sadržaj/ton dokumenta. U ovom papiru izvršavamo analizu o ljudskim percepcijama o editaciji važnosti dok pregledamo dokumente iz jedne verzije do sledeće. Identificiramo lingvističke karakteristike koje utiču na modifikaciju važnosti i modele ga u osnovu regresije. Pokazujemo da je predviđena važnost našeg pristupa veoma povezana sa ljudskom percepcijom važnošću, uspostavljenom Mehaničkom studijom Turske.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි විවිධ පාළුවන්ගේ විවිධ පාළුවන්ගේ විවිධ පාළුවන්ගේ විවිධියක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ලේඛකයෙක් දස්තාවෙන් විතරක් සංපාදනය කරන්න පුළුවන්; හැම සංපාදනය වෙනස් වෙනවා විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින්. සමහර සංපාදනය සමහර වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සහ අවශ්\u200dය වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සැකසුම් කරනවා නම්, අනිත් සංපාදනය සමාව/ට මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරන්නේ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අදහසක් ගැන විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරන්නේ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ අපි භාෂාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඒක අවශ්\u200dයය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් ඉන්න අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා මිනිස්සුන්ගේ දැනගන්න අවශ්\u200dයතාව', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa qaab warqad qoraal ah si aan ugu fekerno muhiimka warqadaha qoraalka kala duduwan ee dukumentiyada. Qoraalka qoraalku wuxuu ku sameeyaa warqad badan; Wax kastoo hagaajiyaba saameyn bay ku leedahay waxa ku jira dukumentiga. Inta lagu jiro tahrir qaarkood waa isbeddelo dhulka kadibna waxay soo bandhigi karaan beddelmo aan la doornayn, sawirro kale waxey si muhiim ah u beddeli karaan waxyaabaha ku jira/codka dukumentiga. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku sameynaa baaritaan aragtida biniaadamka ee muhiimka ah, marka aan ka fiirinno dukumentiyada warqad kooban ilaa labaad. Waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa noocyo luqada ah oo saameyn ku yeelan karta muhiimka iyo tusaale ahaan loo sameeyo qoraalka dib u dhigista. Waxaynu muujinnaa in muhiimka horay loo sii sheegay ee dhaqdhaqaalahayaga aad loola xiriiraa muhiimka dadka la gartay, taas oo lagu sameeyay waxbarasho mekaniikal Turk.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för att härleda betydelsen av olika textredigeringar av dokument. En författare kan göra flera ändringar i ett dokument; Varje redigering varierar i sin inverkan på innehållet i dokumentet. Vissa redigeringar är ytändringar och medför försumbara ändringar, men andra redigeringar kan ändra innehållet/tonen i dokumentet avsevärt. I den här uppsatsen analyserar vi mänskliga uppfattningar om redigerings betydelse samtidigt som vi granskar dokument från en version till nästa. Vi identifierar språkliga egenskaper som påverkar redigeringens betydelse och modellerar den i en regressionsbaserad miljö. Vi visar att den förutspådda betydelsen av vårt tillvägagångssätt är starkt korrelerad med den mänskliga upplevda betydelsen, fastställd av en Mechanical Turk studie.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз әртүрлі мәтіндік редакторының маңыздылығын құжаттарға көмектесу үшін романдық тәртібін келтіреміз. Автор құжатта бірнеше өңдегіштерді жасай алады; NAME OF TRANSLATORS әрбір өңдеу құжаттың мазмұнына әсер етеді. Кейбір өзгертулері поверхностық өзгертулері болса да, басқа өзгертулері құжаттың мазмұнын/тонын өзгерте алады. Бұл қағазда, біз құжаттарды бір нұсқасынан келесіге қарай, адамдардың маңызды оқиғаларын өзгерту үшін анализ жасаймыз. Біз лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді анықтаймыз, олардың маңыздылығын өзгерту және оны регрессия негізінде үлгілеу үшін. Механикалық Турк зерттеу арқылы құрылған адамның түсінікті маңыздылығымен өте қатынасыз бар дегенді көрсетедік.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کیا ہے کہ مختلف ٹیکسٹل ایڈیٹوں کی تعریف دکھانے کے لئے دکھانے کے لئے دکھانے کے لئے۔ لکھنے والا ایک دکھانے کے لئے چند سمجھ بنا سکتا ہے۔ ہر ایڈیٹ اپنے تأثیر میں دکھانے کے منصوبے سے متفاوت ہوتی ہے. اگرچہ بعض ایڈیٹ سطح بدلنے والے ہیں اور غیر معلوم بدلنے والی بدلنے والے ہیں، دوسرے ایڈیٹ دکھانے کے منصوبے/ٹون کو معلوم کر سکتے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک تحلیل کریں گے انسان کی تصوروں کے بارے میں کہ ایک نسخہ سے دوسری نسخہ تک سنائے جاتے ہیں۔ ہم زبان شناخت کریں گے کہ اس کی اثرات سمجھتے ہیں اور اس کی مدل ایک دوسرے گریشنی کے بنیاد پر ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے تقریبا کے ذریعہ سے پیش بینی کی اثری بہت سی تعلق ہے کہ انسان کی سمجھ کی اثری کے ساتھ، ایک مکانیک ترک کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ بنایا گیا ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஆவணங்களுக்கு வேறு நிரல் திருத்தங்களின் முக்கியத்தை குறைக்க ஒரு புதிய முறையை கொ ஒரு ஆசிரியர் ஆவணத்திற்கு பல திருத்தங்களை உருவாக்கலாம். ஒவ்வொரு திருத்தமும் ஆவணத்தின் உள்ளடக்கத்தில் அதன் விளைவுகளில் மாறுபடுகிறது. சில திருத்தங்கள் மேல் மாற்றங்களாக இருக்கும் போது மற்றும் பராமாற்றம் இல்லாத மாற்றங்களை introduce itself, மற்ற திருத்தங்கள் ஆவணத இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தொகுப்பு முக்கியமான பார்வைகளைப் பற்றி ஒரு ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் ஒரு பதிப்பிலிருந்து அடுத்த பத மொழி குணங்களை கண்டுபிடி நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் முன்னோக்கிய முக்கியம் மிக முக்கியமானது மனித புரிந்த முக்கியமானது, ஒரு மெக்சிகில து', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz hujjatlarga har xil matn tahrirlarining muhimligini ko'rsatish uchun novel usulni koʻrsatimiz. Muallif hujjatga bir necha tahrirlar yaratishi mumkin; @ info: whatsthis Baʼzi tahrirlar jadvalning o'zgarishlari va hech qanday oʻzgarishni anglatadi, boshqa tahrirlar hujjatning tarkibi/tovushini muhim oʻzgartirishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz bir versiyadan keyingi versiyadan qo'llangan inson muhim fikrlarini bajaramiz. Biz tilni tahrirlash muhimligini aniqlash va uni qayta boshqarish asosida o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz o'ylaymiz, bizning fikrimimizning eng muhim, mekanik Turk o'qituvchisi tomonidan qo'shilgan inson muhim bilan juda bog'liq.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp mới để đưa ra ý nghĩa của các văn bản khác nhau vào tài liệu. Một tác giả có thể soạn vài bản về một tài liệu; Mỗi sửa đổi tùy thuộc vào tác động của nó với nội dung tài liệu. Trong khi một số bản thảo thay đổi bề mặt và thay đổi không đáng kể, các bản khác có thể thay đổi nội dung/ sắc độ của tài liệu. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thực hiện một phân tích về quan điểm sửa đổi quan trọng của con người trong khi xem lại các tài liệu từ phiên bản này sang phiên bản khác. Chúng tôi xác định các tính năng ngôn ngữ có tác động sửa đổi tầm quan trọng và mô hình nó trong thiết lập phục hồi. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng tầm quan trọng dự đoán của phương pháp của chúng tôi hoàn toàn phù hợp với tầm quan trọng của con người, được tạo ra bởi một nghiên cứu của người Thổ.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нов подход за извеждане на значението на различни текстови редакции на документи. Авторът може да направи няколко редакции на даден документ; Всяка редакция варира по отношение на въздействието си върху съдържанието на документа. Докато някои редакции са повърхностни промени и въвеждат незначителна промяна, други редакции могат да променят значително съдържанието/тона на документа. В тази статия правим анализ на човешките възприятия за важността на редакцията, докато преглеждаме документите от една версия в друга. Идентифицираме лингвистичните особености, които влияят на важността на редакцията, и го моделираме в регресионна настройка. Показваме, че прогнозираното значение от нашия подход е силно свързано с възприеманото от човека значение, установено от Механично Турско изследване.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi pristup kojim se povećava značajnost različitih tekstualnih editora dokumentima. Autor može napraviti nekoliko redaktora dokumentu; svaki urednik se razlikuje u utjecaju na sadržaj dokumenta. Iako su neke redakcije izmjene površine i predstavljaju nezgodne promjene, drugi urednici mogu značajno promijeniti sadržaj/ton dokumenta. U ovom papiru izvršavamo analizu o ljudskim percepcijama o editiranju važnosti dok pregledamo dokumente iz jedne verzije do sljedeće. Identificiramo lingvističke karakteristike koje utječu na modificiranje važnosti i modeliranje u osnovu regresije. Pokazujemo da je predviđena važnost našim pristupom vrlo povezana s ljudskom važnošću koje je smatrao ljudima, uspostavljenom Mehaničkom studijom Turske.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny tilgang til at udlede betydningen af forskellige tekstredigeringer af dokumenter. En forfatter kan foretage flere redigeringer af et dokument; Hver redigering varierer i dens indflydelse på dokumentets indhold. Mens nogle redigeringer er overfladeændringer og indfører ubetydelige ændringer, kan andre redigeringer ændre dokumentets indhold/tone betydeligt. I denne artikel foretager vi en analyse af de menneskelige opfattelser af redigerings vigtighed, mens vi gennemgår dokumenter fra den ene version til den næste. Vi identificerer sproglige træk, der påvirker redigeringens betydning, og modellerer den i en regressionsbaseret indstilling. Vi viser, at den forudsigede betydning af vores tilgang er stærkt korreleret med den menneskelige opfattede betydning, etableret af en Mekanisk Turk undersøgelse.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuwe benadering om de betekenis van verschillende tekstuele bewerkingen aan documenten af te leiden. Een auteur kan meerdere bewerkingen aan een document aanbrengen; Elke bewerking varieert in zijn impact op de inhoud van het document. Hoewel sommige bewerkingen oppervlaktewijzigingen zijn en verwaarloosbare wijzigingen veroorzaken, kunnen andere bewerkingen de inhoud/toon van het document aanzienlijk wijzigen. In dit artikel voeren we een analyse uit van de menselijke percepties van edit belang terwijl we documenten van de ene versie naar de andere bekijken. We identificeren taalkundige kenmerken die invloed hebben op edit belang en modelleren dit in een regressie gebaseerde setting. We tonen aan dat het voorspelde belang door onze aanpak sterk gecorreleerd is met het menselijk waargenomen belang, vastgesteld door een Mechanisch Turkonderzoek.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen neuartigen Ansatz vor, um die Bedeutung verschiedener Textbearbeitungen an Dokumenten abzuleiten. Ein Autor kann mehrere Bearbeitungen an einem Dokument vornehmen; Jede Bearbeitung variiert in ihrer Auswirkung auf den Inhalt des Dokuments. Während einige Bearbeitungen Oberflächenänderungen sind und vernachlässigbare Änderungen bewirken, können andere Bearbeitungen den Inhalt/Ton des Dokuments erheblich verändern. In diesem Beitrag führen wir eine Analyse der menschlichen Wahrnehmung von Edit-Bedeutung durch, während wir Dokumente von einer Version zur nächsten überprüfen. Wir identifizieren linguistische Merkmale, die die Wichtigkeit der Bearbeitung beeinflussen und modellieren diese in einem regressionsbasierten Setting. Wir zeigen, dass die prognostizierte Bedeutung durch unseren Ansatz stark mit der vom Menschen wahrgenommenen Bedeutung korreliert, die durch eine mechanische Turk-Studie festgestellt wurde.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش رمانی را برای تعریف تعریف متنوع به مدارک نشان می دهیم. یک نویسنده ممکن است چندتا ویرایش برای یک سند انجام دهد. هر ویرایش در تاثیرش به محتوای سند متفاوت می\u200cشود. در حالی که بعضی ویرایش تغییرات سطح هستند و تغییرات غیرقابل توصیف می\u200cکنند، ویرایش\u200cهای دیگر ممکن است محتوای/Ton سند را به طور معنی تغییر دهند. در این کاغذ، ما یک تحلیل در مورد احساسات انسان از تغییر اهمیت را انجام می دهیم در حالی که مدارک را از یک نسخه به بعدی بررسی می کنیم. ما ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی را شناسایی می\u200cکنیم که تأثیر اهمیت را تغییر می\u200cدهند و مدل آن را در یک تنظیمات پایه\u200cی تکرار می\u200cدهند. ما نشان می دهیم که اهمیت پیش بینی از طریق دسترسی ما با اهمیت متوجه بشر بسیار ارتباط دارد، که توسط یک مطالعه تورک مکانیکی ایجاد شده است.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, çeşitli metin editleriniň wajyplygyny tespit etmek üçin bir roman golaýyny görkeýäris. Otomatik bir sened üçin birnäçe düzenlemegi edip biler. her Editçi senediň maglumatynda üýtgedir. Käbir editler yüzeyde üýtgewlerdir we ymykly üýtgewleri girdirdirler. Başga editler senediň mazmunlaryny/tonyny möhüm edip biler. Bu kagyzda, adamlaryň maslahatlaryny bir wersiýadan indiki çerçewe barlap deňleýän düşünjeleri barada analyze edýäris. Biz lingwistiki özellikleri faýllary faýlyň wajyplygyny düzenleyip, regresije daýanýan düzümlerde ördinan tanyýarys. Biziň golaýymyzyň öngörülenen wajyplygymyň ynsanyň düşünýän wajyplygyny bilen örän täsirli bir Mehanika Turk araşdyrmany bilen guruldygyny görkeýäris.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan pendekatan baru untuk menyimpulkan penting dari berbagai edit tekstual ke dokumen. Penulis dapat membuat beberapa edit ke dokumen; setiap edit berbeda dalam dampak ke isi dokumen. Sementara beberapa edit merupakan perubahan permukaan dan memperkenalkan perubahan yang tidak terlihat, edit lain mungkin mengubah isi/nada dokumen secara signifikan. In this paper, we perform an analysis on the human perceptions of edit importance while reviewing documents from one version to the next.  Kami mengidentifikasi karakteristik bahasa yang mempengaruhi penting edit dan model dalam seting berbasis regresi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa penting yang diprediksi oleh pendekatan kami sangat berkorelasi dengan penting yang dianggap manusia, ditetapkan oleh sebuah studi Mekanikal Turki.', 'af': "In hierdie papier is ons 'n roman toegang voorsien om die betekening van verskeie tekstuele redigeerders te verwyder na dokumente. 'n Outeur kan maak verskeie redigeerders na' n dokument; elke redigeer verander in sy invloek na die inhoud van die dokument. Alhoewel sommige redigeerder is oorspronklike veranderinge en verlei onverwantlike veranderinge, ander redigeerder kan die inhoud/tone van die dokument betekeurig verander. In hierdie papier, ons doen 'n analiseer op die menslike aandagings van redigeer belangrikheid terwyl ons dokumente van een weergawe tot die volgende oorskou. Ons identifiseer lingwisiese funksies wat effekteer belangrikheid en model dit in 'n regresie gebaseerde instelling. Ons wys dat die voorskoude belangrikheid deur ons toegang is baie vergelyk met die menslike aanvaardige belangrikheid wat deur 'n Mekaniese Turk studie gestel is.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 각종 텍스트 편집이 문서에 대한 의미를 추측하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.작가는 한 파일을 여러 번 편집할 수 있다.편집할 때마다 문서 컨텐트에 미치는 영향은 서로 다릅니다.일부 편집은 표면적인 변화일 뿐 무시할 수 있지만 다른 편집은 문서의 내용/기조를 현저하게 바꿀 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 편집의 중요성에 대한 인류의 감지를 분석하고 한 버전에서 다음 버전으로 문서를 보았다.우리는 편집의 중요성에 영향을 주는 언어 특징을 식별하고 회귀를 바탕으로 모델링을 한다.우리는 우리의 방법 예측의 중요성은 인류 감지의 중요성과 매우 관련이 있음을 나타낸다. 이것은 기계 터키인 연구에 의해 세워진 것이다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu ya riwaya ya kupunguza umuhimu wa wahariri mbalimbali wa maandishi kwa nyaraka. Mwandishi anaweza kutengeneza wahariri kadhaa katika nyaraka; each edit varies in its impact to the content of the document.  Wakati baadhi ya wahariri ni mabadiliko ya uso na kutangaza mabadiliko yasiyoeleweka, mabadiliko mengine yanaweza kubadili maudhui/sauti ya waraka. Katika karatasi hii, tunafanya uchambuzi wa mitazamo ya binadamu ya umuhimu wa kuhariri wakati tukiangalia nyaraka kutoka toleo moja hadi mwingine. Tunaweza kutambua alama za lugha ambazo zinaathiri uhariri wa umuhimu na kuunda katika mazingira ya kandamizi. Tunaonyesha kwamba umuhimu uliotabiriwa kwa njia yetu unahusiana sana na umuhimu wa binadamu unaoonekana, ulioanzishwa na utafiti wa Uturuki.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր մոտեցում, որպեսզի բազմաթիվ տեքստալ խմբագրությունների կարևորությունը հասնենք փաստաթղթերին: Արտոր կարող է մի քանի խմբագրություն կատարել փաստաթղթի մեջ: each edit varies in its impact to the content of the document.  Մինչդեռ որոշ խմբագրություններ մակերևույթի փոփոխություններ են և ներկայացնում աննշանակալի փոփոխություններ, այլ խմբագրություններ կարող են նշանակալի փոփոխել փաստաթղթի պարունակությունը և տոնը: In this paper, we perform an analysis on the human perceptions of edit importance while reviewing documents from one version to the next.  Մենք բացահայտում ենք լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունները, որոնք ազդում են կարևորության խմբագրման վրա և մոդելավորում այն ռեգրեսիայի հիմնված միջավայրում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումների կանխատեսված կարևորությունը շատ կապված է մարդկային ընկալված կարևորության հետ, որը հիմնված է մեխանիկական թուրքի ուսումնասիրության արդյունքում:', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጽሑፍ ማረፊያዎችን ለሰነድ ማነሳቀስ እናስባለን፡፡ ደራሲ ሰነድ ማረፊያ ይችላል ሁሉም አስተካክል እቅጂው በሰነዱ ውስጥ ይለያያል። አንዳንዶች ማረፊያዎች የsurface ለውጦችን ሲገልጹ እና የውጤት ለውጦችን ሲያስታውሱ፣ ሌሎች ማረፊያዎች የሰነዱን ውይይት/ድምጽ በኩል ሊለውጡ ይችላሉ፡፡ In this paper, we perform an analysis on the human perceptions of edit importance while reviewing documents from one version to the next.  የቋንቋው ጥያቄዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የምናሳየው የቅርብ ግንኙነት በመግኘታችን በሚታወቀው የሰው ውርደት በጣም የበለጠ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë të re për të përfshirë rëndësinë e editave të ndryshme tekstuale në dokumente. Një autor mund të bëjë disa modifikime në një dokument; çdo editim ndryshon në ndikimin e tij në përmbajtjen e dokumentit. Ndërsa disa modifikime janë ndryshime të sipërfaqes dhe futin ndryshime të pakujdesshme, modifikime të tjera mund të ndryshojnë ndjeshëm përmbajtjen/tonin e dokumentit. Në këtë letër, ne bëjmë një analizë mbi perceptimet njerëzore të rëndësisë së editimit ndërsa shqyrtojmë dokumentet nga një version në tjetrën. We identify linguistic features that influence edit importance and model it in a regression based setting.  Ne tregojmë se rëndësia e parashikuar nga qasja jonë është shumë e lidhur me rëndësinë e perceptuar nga njerëzit, e krijuar nga një studim mekanik turk.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, müxtəlif mətn editlərinin məsələsini belələrə dəyişdirmək üçün yeni bir approach göstəririk. Yazıcı bir dəstə üçün çoxlu editör yarada bilər; hər düzəltmə səhifələrinin məlumatına dəyişir. Bazı editlər yüzə dəyişiklikləridir və dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləri tanıdırlar, digər editlər dəyişiklik/tonunu mövcuddur. Bu kağızda, insanların çoxluğunu dəyişdirmək haqqında bir analizi çəkirik, bir verzijdən sonrakinə qədər. Biz dillərin möhümlülüyü düzəltdiyi və onu regresiya tabanlı tərzdə modellərini təşkil edir. Biz göstəririk ki, bizim tərəfimizin tədbir edilmiş möhümlülüyü, insanların görünüş möhümlüyü, mehanika Türkiyə təhsil edilən təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil ilə çox bağlıdır.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নথিপত্রের প্রতি বিভিন্ন টেক্সচুয়াল সম্পাদনের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রতিক্রিয়া উপস্থাপন করি। An author may make several edits to a document;  প্রত্যেক সম্পাদনা নথির বিষয়বস্তুতে তার প্রভাবের মধ্যে ভিন্ন। কিছু সম্পাদক সার্ফেস পরিবর্তন এবং অজ্ঞাত পরিবর্তনের পরিবর্তন প্রদর্শন করে, অন্যান্য সম্পাদক নথির বিষয়বস্তু/টন গুরুত্বপূর এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মানুষের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি সম্পাদনের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির ব্যাপারে বিশ্লেষণ করি যখন একটি সংস্করণ থ আমরা ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের চিহ্নিত করি যা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সম্পাদনের প্রভাব ফেলে দেয় এবং পুনরাবৃত্তির ভিত্তিক সেট আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপের প্রতি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, মেকানিক্যাল তুর্কের গবে', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi pristup da povezujemo značaj različitih tekstualnih editora u dokumente. Autor može napraviti nekoliko editora za dokument; svaki urednik se razlikuje u svoj utjecaj na sadržaj dokumenta. Iako su neke editore izmjene površine i predstavljaju nezgodne promjene, drugi editori mogu značajno promijeniti sadržaj/ton dokumenta. U ovom papiru izvršavamo analizu o ljudskim percepcijama o editiranju važnosti dok pregledamo dokumente iz jedne verzije do sljedeće. Identificiramo lingvističke karakteristike koje utječu na modifikaciju važnosti i modelu njega na osnovu regresije. Pokazujemo da je predviđena važnost našeg pristupa vrlo povezana sa ljudskom percepcijom važnošću, uspostavljenom Mehaničkom studijom Turske.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nový přístup k odvození významu různých textových editací dokumentů. Autor může provést několik úprav dokumentu; každá úprava se liší svým dopadem na obsah dokumentu. Zatímco některé úpravy jsou povrchové změny a přinášejí zanedbatelné změny, jiné úpravy mohou výrazně změnit obsah/tón dokumentu. V tomto článku provádíme analýzu lidského vnímání důležitosti editace při přezkoumání dokumentů z jedné verze do druhé. Identifikujeme jazykové rysy, které ovlivňují důležitost editace a modelujeme ji v regresním nastavení. Ukazujeme, že předpokládaná důležitost našeho přístupu je vysoce korelovaná s lidskou vnímanou důležitostí, stanovenou mechanickou tureckou studií.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään uusi lähestymistapa erilaisten tekstimuokkauksien merkityksen päättelemiseen asiakirjoihin. Kirjoittaja voi tehdä useita muutoksia asiakirjaan; kunkin muokkauksen vaikutus asiakirjan sisältöön vaihtelee. Vaikka jotkin muokkaukset ovat pintamuutoksia ja aiheuttavat vähäisiä muutoksia, muut muokkaukset voivat muuttaa asiakirjan sisältöä/sävyä merkittävästi. Tässä artikkelissa analysoimme ihmisten käsityksiä muokkauksen tärkeydestä samalla, kun tarkastelemme dokumentteja eri versioista toiseen. Tunnistamme muokkauksen tärkeyteen vaikuttavia kielellisiä piirteitä ja mallinnamme sitä regressiopohjaisessa ympäristössä. Osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme ennakoitu merkitys korreloi vahvasti mekaanisen turkkilaisen tutkimuksen ihmisen kokemaan merkitykseen.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudset lähenemisviisi erinevate tekstimuudatuste tähtsuse järeldamiseks dokumentides. Autor võib teha dokumenti mitu muudatust; iga muudatuse mõju dokumendi sisule varieerub. Kuigi mõned muudatused on pinna muudatused ja toovad kaasa tühiseid muudatusi, võivad teised muudatused dokumendi sisu/tooni oluliselt muuta. Käesolevas töös analüüsime inimese arusaamasid redigeerimise tähtsusest, vaadates dokumente ühest versioonist teise. Me tuvastame keelelised tunnused, mis mõjutavad redigeerimise tähtsust ja modelleerime seda regressioonipõhises seadistuses. Näitame, et meie lähenemisviisi prognoositav tähtsus on kõrgelt korrelatsioonis inimese tajutava tähtsusega, mis on kindlaks määratud mehaanilise türgi uuringuga.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem un enfocament nou per deduir la significació de diverses edicions textuals als documents. Un autor pot fer diverses edicions en un document; cada edició varia en el seu impacte al contingut del document. Mentre que algunes edicions són canvis de superfície i introdueixen canvis negligents, altres edicions poden canviar significativament el contingut/ton del document. En aquest article, fem una an àlisi sobre les percepcions humanes de l'importància d'edició mentre revisem documents d'una versió a la següent. Identifiquem característiques lingüístices que influeixen en l'importància de l'edició i la modelem en un entorn basat en la regressió. Mostrem que la importància predita pel nostre enfocament està molt correlacionada amb la importància perceptida human a, estabelecida per un estudi turc mecànic.", 'jv': 'Nanging papat iki, kita sadhaya nyumbang kanggo nyelehake kuwi nggawe editasi textual karo dokumen. Sampeyan iso nggawe akeh liyane editasi kanggo dokumen; akeh edit-action string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Nang mapani iki, kita dadi nyoal bakal ngubah perusahaan anyar tentang kapan kanggo ngubah cara nggawe dokumen limo versi sing sampek sampek next. Awak dhéwé éngari perusahaan anyar nggawe barang langgambar kang dipoleh nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng pisan bangsane. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono ana sing ngerasakno akeh dumadhi iki luwih apik karo perbudhakan sing gak jéwih dumadhi iki, senjat nguasakno operasi sistem mekanika sing berarti.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים גישה חדשה כדי למצוא חשיבות של עורכות טקסטוליות שונות למסמכים. סופר יכול לעשות כמה עורכים למסמך; Comment כל עורך שונה בהשפעה שלו לתוכן המסמך. בעוד חלק מהעורכים הם שינויים על פני השטח ומציג שינויים בלתי משמעותיים, עורכים אחרים יכולים לשנות את התוכן/טון של המסמך באופן משמעותי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מבצעים ניתוח על התפיסה האנושית של חשיבות עורך בזמן שביקור מסמכים מגרסה אחת לאחרת. אנחנו מזהה תכונות שפתיים שמשפעות בעורר חשיבות ומודל אותו בסיס חזרה. אנחנו מראים שהחשיבות המצפויה על ידי הגישה שלנו קשורה באופן גבוה לחשוב האנושי הנחשב, מוקם על ידי מחקר הטורק המכוני.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wata matsayi zuwa kafin da za'a sami muhimmi wa masu takardar rubutu zuwa takardun. Wani mai gabatar da shi ya sami wasu taƙaitãwa zuwa takardar; @ info: whatsthis Waka da wasu editori za'a canza fuskar kwamfyuta kuma ya ƙãga gyare-gyare wanda ba'a sani ba, wasu editori za'a canza maɓallin/kwanan takardar, da muhimu. Ga wannan takardan, za mu yi anadi a kan taskõkin mutum na muhimu a lokacin da za'a kula takardar daga versiyori guda zuwa na ƙarami. We identify linguistic features that influence edit importance and model it in a regression based setting.  Tuna nũna cewa muhimmin da aka gabatar da hanyarmu, yana mai kamid da muhimmin mutum da aka gane shi, an wajen wani karatun na Mekaniki turki.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo nov pristop k sklepanju pomena različnih besedilnih ureditev dokumentov. Avtor lahko naredi več ureditev dokumenta; Vsaka ureditev se razlikuje po vplivu na vsebino dokumenta. Medtem ko so nekatere urejanja spremembe površine in prinašajo zanemarljive spremembe, lahko druga urejanja bistveno spremenijo vsebino/ton dokumenta. V prispevku analiziramo človeško dojemanje pomembnosti urejanja, medtem ko pregledujemo dokumente iz ene različice v drugo. Identificiramo jezikovne značilnosti, ki vplivajo na pomembnost urejanja, in jo modeliramo v regresijski nastavitvi. Pokazujemo, da je predvidena pomembnost z našim pristopom močno povezana s človeškim zaznanim pomembnostjo, ki jo je ugotovila Mehanska Turkova študija.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་གཞན་ཤས་བཟོ་ཐུབ་པ བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཐེངས་རེ་རེར་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དོན་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་མཚུངས་ཡིན། བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ལ་ཤས་ཞིག་ཡིན་དུ་གདོང་རིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བ་ཡིན་ནའང In this paper, we perform an analysis on the human perceptions of edit importance while reviewing documents from one version to the next. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དང་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་བཀོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གྱིས་རྔོན་ཟིན་བྱས་པའི་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ནི་མི་ཤེས་ཚོར་གལ་ཆེན་དང་མཐུན་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད་པ་ས'}
{'en': 'Transition-Based Disfluency Detection using LSTMs', 'ar': 'كشف عدم الطلاقة القائم على الانتقال باستخدام LSTM', 'es': 'Detección de disfluencias basada en transiciones mediante LSTM', 'fr': "Détection de disfluence basée sur la transition à l'aide de LSTM", 'pt': 'Detecção de Disfluência Baseada em Transição usando LSTMs', 'ja': 'LSTMを使用した遷移ベースの不流動性検出', 'hi': 'संक्रमण-आधारित Disfluency का पता लगाने LSTMs का उपयोग कर', 'zh': '用 LSTM 之基于转换者不流畅性检测', 'ru': 'Обнаружение искажений на основе перехода с использованием LSTM', 'ga': 'Aimsiú Disfluence Bunaithe ar Aistriú ag baint úsáide as LSTManna', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Átmeneti alapú diszfluencia detektálás LSTMs használatával', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση ανωμαλίας με βάση τη μετάβαση με χρήση LSTMs', 'it': 'Rilevamento di disfluenza basato sulla transizione utilizzando LSTMs', 'kk': 'LSTMs көмегімен ауыстыру негіздеген бөлшектерді анықтау', 'mk': 'Детектирање на транзициона дифленција користејќи LSTMs', 'lt': 'Pereinamojo laikotarpio nuotekų nustatymas naudojant LSTM', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Kesuaian Berasas-Transition menggunakan LSTMs', 'ml': 'LSTMs ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് മാറ്റുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡിഫ്ലൈവെന്\u200dസി ഡിറ്ററി', 'mt': 'Detezzjoni ta’ Disfluwenza bbażata fuq it-Tranżizzjoni bl-użu ta’ LSTMs', 'mn': 'LSTMs-г ашиглан шилжилтийн үндсэн бэрхшээл тогтоох', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie niepłynności opartej na przejściu przy użyciu LSTMów', 'no': 'Transisjonsbasert forskjellingsoppdaging ved bruk av LSTMs', 'ro': 'Detectarea disfluenței bazată pe tranziție utilizând LSTMs', 'sr': 'Открећање нефликтности користећи LSTMs', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Shahaadada baahida ee lagu soo wareejiyo LSTMs', 'sv': 'Övergångsbaserad störningsdetektering med hjälp av LSTMs', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Bộ phát hiện dịch chuyển đổi dùng LSTM', 'bg': 'Установяване на разстройство въз основа на прехода с помощта на LSTMs', 'nl': 'Op overgang gebaseerde disfluence detectie met behulp van LSTMs', 'hr': 'Detekcija nestabilnosti na temelju prijelaza koristeći LSTMs', 'da': 'Overgangsbaseret diskløshedsdetektion ved hjælp af LSTMs', 'de': 'Transition-Based Disfluence Detection mit LSTMs', 'id': 'Deteksi Disfluensi Berdasarkan Transisi menggunakan LSTM', 'ko': '전환 기반 LSTMs 매끄럽지 않은 감지', 'fa': 'بازرسی ناپذیری بر اساس تغییرات با استفاده از LSTMs', 'tr': "LSTMs'i ulanarak geçirmek Buýruky Aňlamak", 'af': 'Transition- Based Disfluency Deteksie gebruik LSTMs', 'sq': 'Detektimi i Disfluency Basuar në Transition duke përdorur LSTMs', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Ushindi wa Kupitia Transition kwa kutumia LSTMs', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'LSTMs vasit…Щsil…Щ istifad…Щ edil…Щn Transition-Based Disfluency Detection', 'hy': 'Առաջնական հիմնված հեղության հայտնաբերումը LSMT-ներով', 'bn': 'Name', 'cs': 'Detekce neslušnosti založená na přechodu pomocí LSTMs', 'ca': 'Detecció de disfluència basada en transició utilitzant LSTMs', 'et': 'Üleminekupõhine häirete tuvastamine LSTMde abil', 'bs': 'Detekcija nestabilnosti na temelju transicije koristeći LSTMs', 'fi': 'Transition-based disfluency detection using LSTMs', 'jv': 'Tarjamahan-Ngerawat Disflority detection nggunakake LA', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje disfluentnosti na podlagi prehoda z uporabo LSTMs', 'he': 'זיהוי עדר מבוסס על העברה באמצעות LSTMs', 'bo': 'LSTMs་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་འཕགས་རིས་བསམ་བཤེར'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we model the problem of disfluency detection using a transition-based framework, which incrementally constructs and labels the disfluency chunk of input sentences using a new transition system without syntax information. Compared with sequence labeling methods, it can capture non-local chunk-level features ; compared with joint parsing and disfluency detection methods, it is free for noise in syntax. Experiments show that our model achieves state-of-the-art f-score of 87.5 % on the commonly used English Switchboard test set, and a set of in-house annotated Chinese data.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، قمنا بنمذجة مشكلة الكشف عن عدم الطلاقة باستخدام إطار عمل قائم على الانتقال ، والذي يقوم بشكل متزايد ببناء وتسمية جزء عدم الطلاقة في جمل الإدخال باستخدام نظام انتقال جديد بدون معلومات بناء الجملة. بالمقارنة مع طرق وضع العلامات التسلسلية ، يمكن أن تلتقط ميزات على مستوى القطعة غير المحلية ؛ بالمقارنة مع طرق تحليل المفصل وعدم إتقان اللغة ، فهي خالية من الضوضاء في بناء الجملة. تُظهر التجارب أن نموذجنا يحقق درجة عالية من الفن تبلغ 87.5٪ في مجموعة اختبار لوحة مفاتيح اللغة الإنجليزية شائعة الاستخدام ، ومجموعة من البيانات الصينية المشروحة داخليًا.', 'es': 'En este artículo, modelamos el problema de la detección de disfluencia utilizando un marco basado en la transición, que construye y etiqueta de manera incremental el fragmento de disfluencia de las oraciones de entrada utilizando un nuevo sistema de transición sin información de sintaxis. En comparación con los métodos de etiquetado de secuencias, puede capturar características no locales a nivel de fragmento; en comparación con los métodos de análisis conjunto y detección de disfluencia, es libre de ruido en la sintaxis. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo logra una puntuación f de última generación del 87,5% en el conjunto de pruebas de English Switchboard de uso común, y un conjunto de datos chinos anotados internos.', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы моделируем проблему обнаружения вытеснения с помощью переходного фреймворка, который постепенно конструирует и маркирует кусок вытеснения входных предложений, используя новую переходную систему без синтаксической информации. По сравнению с методами маркировки последовательностей, он может захватывать нелокальные функции на уровне кусков; по сравнению с методами совместного синтаксического анализа и обнаружения вытеснения, он свободен от шума в синтаксисе. Эксперименты показывают, что наша модель достигает самого современного f-балла 87,5% на часто используемом наборе тестов английского коммутатора и наборе внутренних аннотированных китайских данных.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, modelamos o problema de detecção de disfluência usando uma estrutura baseada em transição, que constrói e rotula incrementalmente o pedaço de disfluência de sentenças de entrada usando um novo sistema de transição sem informações de sintaxe. Comparado com os métodos de rotulagem de sequência, ele pode capturar recursos não locais em nível de bloco; comparado com os métodos de análise conjunta e detecção de disfluência, é livre de ruídos na sintaxe. Os experimentos mostram que nosso modelo atinge o f-score de última geração de 87,5% no conjunto de testes do painel de controle em inglês comumente usado e um conjunto de dados chineses anotados internos.', 'ja': '本稿では、構文情報を伴わない新しい遷移システムを用いて入力文の不流動チャンクを段階的に構築し、ラベル付けする遷移ベースのフレームワークを用いて、不流動検出の問題をモデル化する。シーケンスラベリング法と比較して、非局所的なチャンクレベルの特徴を取り込むことができます。ジョイント解析法や不流動性検出法と比較して、構文でノイズを発生させません。実験によると、当社のモデルは、一般的に使用されている英語のスイッチボードテストセットと一連の社内注釈付き中国語データで、最先端のfスコア87.5%を達成しています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक संक्रमण-आधारित ढांचे का उपयोग करके डिस्फ्लुएंसी डिटेक्शन की समस्या को मॉडल करते हैं, जो वाक्यविन्यास जानकारी के बिना एक नई संक्रमण प्रणाली का उपयोग करके इनपुट वाक्यों के विघटन खंड का निर्माण और लेबल करता है। अनुक्रम लेबलिंग विधियों की तुलना में, यह गैर-स्थानीय चंक-स्तर सुविधाओं को कैप्चर कर सकता है; संयुक्त पार्सिंग और disfluency का पता लगाने के तरीकों के साथ तुलना में, यह वाक्यविन्यास में शोर के लिए स्वतंत्र है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल आमतौर पर उपयोग किए जाने वाले अंग्रेजी स्विचबोर्ड परीक्षण सेट पर 87.5% के अत्याधुनिक एफ-स्कोर को प्राप्त करता है, और इन-हाउस एनोटेट चीनी डेटा का एक सेट।', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous modélisons le problème de la détection de disfluence à l'aide d'un framework basé sur la transition, qui construit et étiquette de manière incrémentielle le segment de disfluence des phrases d'entrée à l'aide d'un nouveau système de transition sans informations de syntaxe. Comparé aux méthodes d'étiquetage de séquence, il peut capturer des caractéristiques non locales au niveau des blocs\xa0; par rapport aux méthodes d'analyse conjointe et de détection de disfluence, il est exempt de bruit dans la syntaxe. Les expériences montrent que notre modèle obtient un score f de pointe de 87,5\xa0% sur l'ensemble de tests standard anglais couramment utilisé et sur un ensemble de données chinoises annotées en interne.", 'zh': '于本文之中,吾辈用转易之框架建模于不流检测,当框架用无语法信息之新渡系统以增量构造、标记输入句者不流块。 比之序列标记之法,其可得非本地块级特征。 比之合解析与不流检测之法,其于语法无噪音。 实验以英文总机试集、内注中文数中最先进87.5%之f得分。', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid múnla ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le héagsúlacht a bhrath trí úsáid a bhaint as creat atá bunaithe ar an trasdul, a dhéanann agus a lipéadaíonn go hincriminteach an smután easnaimh d'abairtí ionchuir ag baint úsáide as córas trasdula nua gan faisnéis chomhréire. I gcomparáid le modhanna lipéadaithe seichimh, féadann sé gnéithe leibhéal smután neamh-áitiúla a ghabháil; i gcomparáid le parsáil chomhpháirteach agus modhanna braite disfluachta, tá sé saor ó thorann sa chomhréir. Léiríonn turgnaimh go n-éiríonn lenár múnla scóir f-scoir úrscothach de 87.5% ar an tacar tástála Lasc-chláir Béarla a úsáidtear go coitianta, agus ar thacar sonraí Síneach anótáilte intí.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ დოკუნტში მოდელურებთ განსხვავების პრობლემა, რომელიც განსხვავებული ფრამეტრის გამოყენებით, რომელიც ინტერნექციურად კონფიგურაციას და მინიშნავს სინტაქქსი ინფორმაციას გარეშე ა სკენეციის მარტიკის მეტისთან შემდგომარებულია, ეს შეიძლება არ-ლოკალური მარტიკის ფუნქციების შესახებ; სინტაქქსის სიტუნექსისთვის დამატებით ერთადერთი პარაზიცია და განსხვავება მეტოვებით შედგენა. ექსპერიმენტები გამოიყენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი 87,5% უდრის შესაძლებლობად გამოიყენებული ინგლისური შვიფბორდის ტესტის შესაძლებლობა და ჩინეთის მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban átmeneti alapú keretrendszer segítségével modellezzük a diszfluencia detektálásának problémáját, amely fokozatosan konstruálja és címkézi a bemeneti mondatok diszfluencia részét egy új, szintaxisinformációk nélküli átmeneti rendszer segítségével. A sorozatcímkézési módszerekkel összehasonlítva nem helyi darabszintű funkciókat rögzíthet; A közös elemzési és diszfluencia detektálási módszerekkel összehasonlítva szintaxisban zajmentes. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk 87,5%-os f pontszámot ér el a leggyakrabban használt angol kapcsolótábla tesztkészleten, valamint egy házon belüli jegyzetelt kínai adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, μοντελοποιούμε το πρόβλημα της ανίχνευσης ανωμαλίας χρησιμοποιώντας ένα πλαίσιο που βασίζεται στη μετάβαση, το οποίο κατασκευάζει και χαρακτηρίζει σταδιακά το κομμάτι της ανωμαλίας των προτάσεων εισαγωγής χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νέο μεταβατικό σύστημα χωρίς πληροφορίες σύνταξης. Σε σύγκριση με τις μεθόδους μαρκαρίσματος ακολουθίας, μπορεί να συλλάβει μη τοπικά χαρακτηριστικά επιπέδου κομματιού. σε σύγκριση με τις κοινές μεθόδους ανάλυσης και ανίχνευσης δυσρευστότητας, είναι ελεύθερο για θόρυβο στη σύνταξη. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει την υπερσύγχρονη βαθμολογία του 87,5% στο κοινό χρησιμοποιούμενο σύνολο δοκιμών αγγλικού πίνακα μεταγραφής και ένα σύνολο εσωτερικών σχολιασμένων κινεζικών δεδομένων.', 'it': "In questo articolo, modelliamo il problema del rilevamento della disfluenza utilizzando un framework basato sulla transizione, che costruisce ed etichetta incrementalmente il pezzo di disfluenza delle frasi di input utilizzando un nuovo sistema di transizione senza informazioni sintattiche. Rispetto ai metodi di etichettatura di sequenza, può catturare caratteristiche non locali a livello di chunk; Rispetto ai metodi di analisi congiunta e rilevamento di disfluenza, è libero per rumore nella sintassi. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello raggiunge un f-score all'avanguardia dell'87,5% sul set di test Switchboard inglese comunemente usato e una serie di dati cinesi annotati internamente.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, синтаксис мәліметі жоқ жаңа ауыстыру жүйесі арқылы, ауыстыру негізінде негізделген қоршауын анықтау мәселесін түсіндіреді. Тізбектерді жарлықтау әдістерімен салыстырылған, ол жергілікті бөліктерді емес деңгейінде қатынауға болады; бұл параметр Бірлескен талдау және жылдамдығын анықтау әдістерімен салыстырып, ол синтаксисінде дыбыс үшін бос. Тәжірибелер біздің моделіміз көпшілікті ағылшын Швейцариялық пайдаланушының сынақтарында 87,5% күйіне жеткізеді деп көрсетеді, және ішінде қытайша деректері жазылған.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente modeliuojame trūkumų aptikimo problem ą naudojant pereinamojo laikotarpio sistemą, kuri palaipsniui konstruoja ir ženklina įvestų sakinių trūkumų dalį naudojant naują pereinamojo laikotarpio sistemą be sintaksinės informacijos. Palyginti su sekos ženklinimo metodais, jis gali nustatyti ne vietinius gabalėlių lygio požymius; palyginti su sąnarių analizavimo ir skysčių aptikimo metodais, jis neturi triukšmo sintakse. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekia 87,5 proc. aukščiausio lygio f tašką paprastai naudojamame anglų jungiklio bandymų rinkinyje, o vidaus duomenys rodo Kinijos duomenis.', 'mk': 'In this paper, we model the problem of disfluency detection using a transition-based framework, which incrementally constructs and labels the disfluency chunk of input sentences using a new transition system without syntax information.  Во споредба со методите на етикетирање на секвенца, може да ги фати нелокалните карактеристики на ниво на парчиња; compared with joint parsing and disfluency detection methods, it is free for noise in syntax.  Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот модел постигнува најдобра оценка во висина од 87,5 отсто на обично употребениот англиски сет на тестови на Светборд и сет на внатрешни анотирани кинески податоци.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita model masalah pengesan ketidaklengkapan menggunakan kerangka berasaskan-transisi, yang secara bertambah membina dan label potongan ketidaklengkapan kalimat input menggunakan sistem transisi baru tanpa maklumat sintaks. Berbanding dengan kaedah label urutan, ia boleh menangkap ciri-ciri aras potongan bukan setempat; dibandingkan dengan kaedah penghuraian dan pengesan kelemahan kongsi, ia bebas untuk bunyi dalam sintaks. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kita mencapai markah f-state-of-the-art 87.5% pada set ujian Switchboard Inggeris yang biasa digunakan, dan set data Cina yang dicatat dalam rumah.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു ട്രാന്\u200dസിങ്ക്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള അസ്വാഭാവം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയിലാക്കുന്നു. അത്  സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലേബിലിങ്ങ് രീതികളോടൊപ്പം തുല്യമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു, അത് ലോക്കല്\u200d ചാങ്ക് നില വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പിടി സഹജമായ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെയും തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെയും താല്\u200dപര്യമില്ലാത്ത രീതികളെയും താല്\u200dപര്യമാ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 87.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nimmudellaw il-problem a tad-detezzjoni tad-disfluwenza bl-użu ta’ qafas ibbażat fuq it-tranżizzjoni, li inkrementalment jibni u tikketta l-biċċa tad-disfluwenza tas-sentenzi input bl-użu ta’ sistema ġdida ta’ tranżizzjoni mingħajr informazzjoni ta’ sintaks. Meta mqabbel ma’ metodi ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza, jista’ jaqbad karatteristiċi mhux lokali fil-livell tal-biċċiet; meta mqabbel ma’ metodi ta’ analizzazzjoni tal-ġogi u detezzjoni tad-disfluwenza, huwa ħieles għall-istorbju fis-sintaks. L-esperimenti juru li l-mudell tagħna jilħaq l-aktar punteġġ f avvanzat ta’ 87.5% fuq is-sett tat-test tal-Switchboard Ingliż użat b’mod komuni, u sett ta’ dejta Ċiniża annotata internament.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид шилжилт дээр суурилсан хэлбэрийг ашиглаж, шилжилт өгүүлбэрээс шинэ шилжилт системийг шинэ мэдээллээгүй ашиглаж бүтээж, шилжилтийн хэсгийг загварлаж байна. Дараагийн маркингийн аргыг харьцуулахад орон нутгийн хэмжээст бус хэмжээсүүдийг барьж болно. Хамтдаа хуваалцах болон бууруулах аргыг харьцуулахын тулд энэ нь синтаксис дээр чимээгүй. Түүнчлэл бидний загвар нь англи Швейчбуудын тест хэмжээнд 87.5% урлагийн хувьд хүргэж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule modelujemy problem wykrywania niepłynności przy użyciu frameworku opartego na przejściach, który stopniowo konstruuje i etykietuje kawałek niepłynności zdań wejściowych przy użyciu nowego systemu przejściowego bez informacji składni. W porównaniu z metodami etykietowania sekwencji, może przechwytywać nielokalne funkcje na poziomie fragmentów; W porównaniu z metodami parsowania wspólnych i wykrywania niepłynności, jest wolny dla szumów w składni. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejszy wynik f-wynoszący 87,5% na powszechnie używanym zestawie testowym angielskiej Switchboard oraz zestawie wewnętrznych annotowanych chińskich danych.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, modelăm problema detectării disfluenței folosind un cadru bazat pe tranziție, care construiește și etichetează progresiv bucata de disfluență de propoziții de intrare folosind un nou sistem de tranziție fără informații sintaxiale. În comparație cu metodele de etichetare a secvențelor, acesta poate capta caracteristici non-locale la nivel de bucată; În comparație cu analizarea comună și metodele de detectare a disfluenței, este liber pentru zgomot în sintaxă. Experimentele arată că modelul nostru obține un scor F de ultimă generație de 87,5% pe setul de testare utilizat în mod obișnuit în limba engleză Switchboard și un set de date chinezești adnotate intern.', 'no': 'I denne papiret modeller vi problemet med oppdaging av forstyrrelser ved å bruka eit overgangsbasert rammeverk, som inkrementalt konstruerer og merker den forstyrrelsepunkten av innsetjingar med ein ny overgangssystem utan syntaksinformasjon. Samanlikna med sekvensetikettingsmetodar, kan det henta ikkje-lokale blokkenivåfunksjonar; og samanlikna med samanlikningsmetoder for tolking og avslutning, er det fritt for støy i syntaks. Eksperimentar viser at modellen vårt når f-poeng for kunsten er 87,5% på det vanleg brukte testsettet for engelsk skiftbord, og eit sett av innbygge kinesiske data.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru modeliramo problem otkrivanja nedostatka koristeći prekovremeni okvir koji povećavaju konstrukciju i označava komad nedostatka uvodnih rečenica koristeći novi prelazni sistem bez sintaksičnih informacija. U usporedbi sa metodama označavanja sekvence, može da uhvati neke lokalne karakteristike nivoa komada; u poređenju sa zajedničkim metodama analize i detekcije nestabilnosti, slobodno je za buku u sintaksi. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model postiže državni f-rezultat od 87,5% na često korištenom setu testova engleskog Švicarskog broda, i setu unutrašnjih kineskih podataka.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, සංකේත තොරතුරු නැති අලුත් වාර්ථාව පද්ධතියක්  පරීක්ෂණ ලේබිල් විධානය සමග සම්බන්ධ විධානය, ඒක ස්ථානික චැන්ක් ලේබිල් විශේෂතාවක් න සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය හොයාගන්න විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක සංකේෂණයේ ශබ්ද ව පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක 87.5% වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ස්විච්බෝර්ඩ් පරීක්ෂණ ස්ථානයේදී 87.5% වලින් හොයාගන්නවා කියලා,', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku sameynaa dhibaatada garashada cilmi la'aanta, kaas oo ku qoraya qorshaha soo wareegista, kaas oo aad u dhisan karto oo ku sawiraya xubnaha injiilka, isticmaalaya nidaam cusub oo aan macluumaad la'aan canshuuraha. Isbarbardhig oo ku qoran qaababka imtixaanka xilliga, waxay qabsan kartaa heer aan deegaan aheyn; Isbarbarbardhig ku qoran baaritaanka wadajirka ah iyo qaababka aqoonta faa’iido ah, waa lacag la’aan oo cod la’aan ah canshuurta. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu helo xaaladda farshaxanka oo ah 87.5 boqolkiiba oo lagu isticmaalaa imtixaanka ingiriisiga ee Switzerland, iyo koox lambaro ah macluumaad ku saabsan xarunta Shiino.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats modellerar vi problemet med disfluency detection med hjälp av ett övergångsbaserat ramverk, som stegvis konstruerar och etiketterar disfluency biten av indatameningar med hjälp av ett nytt övergångssystem utan syntaxinformation. Jämfört med sekvensmärkningsmetoder kan det fånga icke-lokala bitar-nivå funktioner; jämfört med gemensamma parsnings- och diskfluensedetekteringsmetoder är det fritt för brus i syntax. Experiment visar att vår modell uppnår toppmodern f-poäng på 87,5% på den allmänt använda engelska switchboard testuppsättningen, och en uppsättning interna kommenterade kinesiska data.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பிரச்சனையை மாற்றுகிறோம் ஒரு மாற்று அடிப்படையில் கண்டுபிடிப்பிடிப்பு பிரச்சனையை பயன்படுத்தி, அது அதிகமாக உருவாக்குகிறது  வரிசையின் குறியீட்டு முறைமைகளுடன் ஒப்பிட்டால், அது உள்ளார்ந்த சுட்டி மட்டத்தின் குணங்களை பிடிக்க முட compared with joint parsing and disfluency detection methods, it is free for noise in syntax.  முயற்சிகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரி நிலையில் 87. 5% பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஆங்கிலத்தின் மாற்று போர்ட் சோதனைப் அமைப்ப', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے تغییر پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے فرمیک کے مطابق تغییر فکرم کے مشکل کی مدل کر دی ہے، جو اضافہ طور پر اضافہ کرتا ہے اور لیبل کرتا ہے، ایک نئی تغییر سیستم کے بغیر سینٹکس معلومات کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے سطح لیبلینگ طریقے کے ساتھ مقایسہ کیا گیا ہے، یہ غیر محلی چانک-سطح ویژے کو پکڑ سکتا ہے، جوڑ پارسینگ اور غلطئنست شناسایی طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں، یہ سنٹکس میں صدا کے لئے آزاد ہے. آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل 87.5% کی ایٹ آرت f-اسکور کو صرف انگلیسی سوئیچبورڈ تست سٹ پر پہنچ جاتی ہے اور ایک سٹ میں چینی ڈائٹ کا ذکر کیا جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz transition asosiy freym asosida muvaffaqiyatlarni aniqlash muammolarini modellaymiz. Bu qogʻoz darajada qo'shish muvaffaqiyatlarini qo'yish va qo'shish muvaffaqiyatlarini qo'shish tizimini syntax maʼlumoti yordamida yangi tarjima tizimdan fo @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Tajribalar esa modelimiz 87.5% va oddiy ishlatilgan ingliz Switchboard sinov tizimi bilan 87.5% darajaga erishiladi va uyidagi bir necha xitoycha maʼlumotlarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả vấn đề tìm ra thói quen bí mật sử dụng một cơ quan dựa trên sự chuyển đổi, để tăng dần cấu tạo và chú ý khối lượng bất động của các câu nhập, sử dụng một hệ thống chuyển đổi mới mà không có thông tin cú pháp. So với các phương pháp đánh dấu chuỗi, nó có thể ghi lại các tính chất lượng không cục bộ; So với phương pháp phân tích và dự đoán sai, nó miễn phí cho nhiễu trong cú pháp. Thử nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta đạt được điểm số cao nhất của 87.5. trên bộ thử nghiệm trên bàn máy bay Anh thường dùng, và một bộ dữ liệu Trung Quốc được ghi chú nội bộ.', 'bg': 'В тази статия моделираме проблема с откриването на дисфлуънтност, използвайки рамка, базирана на преход, която постепенно конструира и етикетира парчето дисфлуънтност на входните изречения, използвайки нова преходна система без синтаксисна информация. В сравнение с методите за етикетиране на последователността, той може да улавя нелокални функции на ниво парче; В сравнение с методите за анализ на ставите и откриване на дискуфория, той е свободен за шум в синтаксиса. Експериментите показват, че нашият модел постига най-съвременни резултати от 87,5% на често използвания тест комплект английски комутатор и набор от вътрешни анотирани китайски данни.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel modelleren we het probleem van disfluencie detectie met behulp van een transitie-gebaseerd framework, dat incrementele construeert en labelt de disfluencie chunk van invoerzinnen met behulp van een nieuw overgangssysteem zonder syntaxis informatie. Vergeleken met sequentie labeling methoden, kan het niet-lokale chunk-level kenmerken vastleggen; Vergeleken met joint parsing en disfluency detection methoden, is het vrij voor ruis in syntaxis. Experimenten tonen aan dat ons model state-of-the-art f-score van 87,5% behaalt op de veelgebruikte Engelse Switchboard testset, en een set van in-house geannoteerde Chinese gegevens.', 'da': 'I denne artikel modellerer vi problemet med disfluency detection ved hjælp af en overgangsbaseret framework, som trinvist konstruerer og mærker disfluency chunk af inputsætninger ved hjælp af et nyt overgangssystem uden syntaksoplysninger. Sammenlignet med sekvensmærkningsmetoder kan det fange ikke-lokale chunk-niveau funktioner; Sammenlignet med fælles parsing og disfluency detektion metoder, er det gratis for støj i syntaks. Eksperimenter viser, at vores model opnår state-of-the-art f-score på 87,5% på det almindeligt anvendte engelske switchboard testsæt og et sæt interne annoterede kinesiske data.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru modeliramo problem otkrivanja nedostatka koristeći prekovremeni okvir, koji povećavaju konstrukciju i označava komad nedostatka ulaznih rečenica koristeći novi sustav premještaja bez sintaksičnih informacija. U usporedbi s metodama označavanja sekvencije, može uhvatiti neke lokalne karakteristike nivoa komada; i u usporedbi s zajedničkim metodama analize i detekcije nestabilnosti, slobodno je za buku u sintaksi. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model postigne državni f-rezultat 87,5% na često korištenom testu u engleskoj Švicarskoj tabli, i skupu unutarnjih podataka o kineskim podacima.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag modellieren wir das Problem der Disfluenzerkennung mit Hilfe eines Übergangs-basierten Frameworks, das inkrementell den Disfluenzblock von Eingabesätzen konstruiert und beschriftet, indem ein neues Übergangssystem ohne Syntaxinformationen verwendet wird. Im Vergleich zu Sequenz-Beschriftungsmethoden kann es nicht-lokale Chunk-Level-Features erfassen; Im Vergleich zu Joint Parsing und Disfluency Detection Methoden ist es frei für Rauschen in der Syntax. Experimente zeigen, dass unser Modell einen State-of-the-Art f-Score von 87,5% auf dem häufig verwendeten englischen Switchboard-Testsatz und einer Reihe von internen annotierten chinesischen Daten erzielt.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل کشف ناپذیری را با استفاده از چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار در مقایسه با روش برچسب برچسب\u200cهای رده می\u200cتواند ویژگی\u200cهای سطح غیر محلی را بگیرد. در مقایسه با روش شناسایی مشترک و ناپدید شدن، آزاد برای صدا در سنتاکس است. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای فن\u200cهنری 87.5 درصد در مجموعه تست\u200cهای انگلیسی استفاده می\u200cشود و مجموعه\u200cای از داده\u200cهای چینی که در خانه\u200cها مشخص می\u200cشود رسیده است.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita model masalah deteksi ketidaksempurnaan menggunakan rangkaian berdasarkan transisi, yang secara incremental membangun dan label potongan ketidaksempurnaan kalimat masukan menggunakan sistem transisi baru tanpa informasi sintaks. dibandingkan dengan metode label urutan, ia dapat menangkap fitur tingkat potongan bukan lokal; dibandingkan dengan metode penganalisis dan deteksi gangguan kongsi, itu bebas untuk suara dalam sintaks. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita mencapai markas f-state-of-the-art 87,5% pada set ujian Switchboard Inggris yang biasa digunakan, dan set data Cina annotasi dalam rumah.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 전환을 바탕으로 하는 프레임워크를 사용하여 유창하지 않은 검측 문제를 모델링한다. 이 프레임워크는 새로운 전환 시스템을 사용하여 문법 정보가 없는 상황에서 입력 문장의 유창하지 않은 블록을 증량적으로 구성하고 표시한다.시퀀스 표기 방법에 비해 비국부 블록급 특징을 포착할 수 있다.연합문법 분석과 불유창성 검측 방법에 비해 이 방법은 문법 소음이 존재하지 않는다.실험에 의하면 우리의 모델은 자주 사용하는 영어 교환기 테스트 집합과 내부 주석의 중국어 데이터에서 87.5%의 최신 f점수에 이르렀다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha tatizo la kutambua kutokuwepo na ufahamu kwa kutumia mfumo wa mpito, ambao unajenga na kuonyesha ukosefu wa hukumu za input kwa kutumia mfumo mpya wa mpito bila taarifa za kodi. Kulinganishwa na njia za utambulisho wa mfululizo, inaweza kupata sifa zisizo za ngazi za chini; ukilinganishwa na mbinu za wimbo wa pamoja na kutambua ukosefu wa usawa, ni bure kwa sauti katika kodi. Majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inafanikiwa hali ya a in a ya sanaa ya asilimia 87.5 kwenye seti ya jaribio la Kiingereza la Switzerland, na seti ya takwimu za Kichina zinazokerwa nyumbani.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz geçişi tabanly çerçewçilikden ullanýän küçümsizlik hasaplamasyny nusgala edip, sintaks maglumaty ýok bir terjime sistemini ulanarak giriş sözleriniň iň üýtgemegini etitleýäris. _Hat sanlary görkezilsin: Kop karşılaşdyrma we çykyşlyk deteksi metodlary bilen karşılaşdyrylýar, bu syntaksda ses üçin boş. Denminatlar biziň nusgamyzyň 87.5% köp Iňlisçe Şweýsariýa testiň düzümlerinde durumyny ýetip barýandygyny görkez.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne modelojmë problemin e zbulimit të disfluency duke përdorur një kuadër të bazuar në tranzicion, i cili gradualisht ndërton dhe etiketon pjesën e disfluency të fjalëve të hyrjes duke përdorur një sistem të ri tranzicion pa informacion sintaksi. Krahasuar me metodat e etiketave të sekuencës, ajo mund të kapë elemente jo-lokale të nivelit të copave; krahasuar me metodat e analizimit të përbashkët dhe zbulimit të zhurmës, është e lirë për zhurmë në sintaks. Eksperimentet tregojnë se modeli ynë arrin pikë-f më të moderne prej 87.5% në grupin e testimeve të shndërrimit anglez të përdorur zakonisht dhe një grup të dhënash kineze të anotuara në shtëpi.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ የፍጥረት ግንኙነትን በመጠቀም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአካባቢ ደረጃዎች ላይ compared with joint parsing and disfluency detection methods, it is free for noise in syntax.  ፈተናዎች ሞዴሌዎቻችን የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የፊደል ደረጃ ማግኘት 87.5 በመቶ በተጠቃሚ የንግልዝኛ ስዊትቦር ፈተና ማዘጋጀት እና በቤት ውስጥ የቻይና ዳታዎችን ማግኘት እንደተደረገ ያሳያል', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք մոդելավորում ենք անհեղության հայտնաբերման խնդիրը, օգտագործելով անցումային հիմքում հիմնված շրջանակ, որը միաժամանակ կառուցում է և պիտակում է ներմուծի նախադասությունների անհեղության մասը օգտագործելով նոր անցումային համակարգ առանց սինտաքսի Համեմատելով հաջորդականության պիտակավորման մեթոդների հետ, այն կարող է վերցնել ոչ տեղական մասերի մակարդակի առանձնահատկություններ, համեմատած կապերի վերլուծության և անհեղության հայտնաբերման մեթոդների հետ, այն ազատ է աղմուկի համար սինտաքսի մեջ: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը հասնում է 87.5 տոկոսի լավագույն f-գնահատականը սովորաբար օգտագործված անգլերեն հատվածի փորձարկումների համակարգում, ինչպես նաև ընտանիքում գրված չինական տվյալների համակարգում:', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪzda, sintaks m…ôlumatńĪ olmadan yeni bir d…ôyiŇüiklik sistemini istifad…ô ed…ôn yeni d…ôyiŇüiklik sistemi il…ô d…ôyiŇüiklik keŇüfinin problemini modell…ôyirik. Se√ßm…ô etiketl…ôm…ô metodlarńĪ il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü, yerli bir par√ßa seviyy…ôsi olmayan f…ôrqli olaraq …ôlaq…ô ed…ô bil…ôr; M√ľxt…ôlif ayńĪrma v…ô f…ôsad tanńĪtma metodlarńĪ il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪldńĪ, sintaks i√ßind…ô s…ôsl…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn azaldńĪr. H…ôqiq…ôt…ôn, t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimiz modell…ôrimizin genellik istifad…ô edil…ôn ńįngilis Switchboard sńĪnamasńĪnda 87,5%-li f …ôrqli m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ôsini g√∂st…ôrir v…ô evd…ô √ßin m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ bildirirl…ôr.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি ট্রান্সফ্রেমের ভিত্তিক ফ্রেক্কার ব্যবহার করে অস্বাভাবিক আবিষ্কারের সমস্যার মডেল করি, যা সিন্যাক্স তথ্য ছাড়া একটি নতুন প্রবেশ ব্যবস সেকেন্ড লেবেলিং পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনায়, এটি স্থানীয় চাঙ্ক-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য ধরতে পারে; যৌথ পার্সিং এবং অক্ষর সনাক্তির পদ্ধতির তুলনায়, সিন্ট্যাক্সে শব্দের জন্য এটি মুক্ত। পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল ৮৭. ৫% সাধারণত ইংরেজি সুইটবোর্ড পরীক্ষা সেটে পৌঁছে যায় এবং বাড়িতে চীনা তথ্য বিরক্ত করা হয়েছে।', 'ca': "En aquest paper, modelem el problem a de la detecció de la disfluència utilitzant un marc basat en transició, que incrementalment construeix i etiqueta el tros de disfluència de frases d'entrada utilitzant un nou sistema de transició sense informació de sintaxi. Comparat amb els mètodes d'etiqueta de seqüència, pot capturar característiques no locals a nivell de trossos; comparats amb els mètodes d'analització de les articulacions i de detecció de disfluència, és lliure de soroll en sintaxi. Els experiments demostren que el nostre model aconsegueix un puntuatge f més avançat del 87,5% en el conjunt d'exàmens d'anglès comument utilitzat, i un conjunt de dades xineses anotates internament.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru modeliramo problem otkrivanja nedostatka koristeći prekovremeni okvir, koji povećavajući konstrukciju i označava komad nedostatka ulaznih rečenica koristeći novi sustav premještaja bez sintaksičnih informacija. U usporedbi sa metodama označavanja sekvence, može uhvatiti neke lokalne karakteristike nivoa komada; u usporedbi sa zajedničkim metodama analize i detekcije nestabilnosti, slobodno je za buku u sintaksi. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model postigne državni f-rezultat od 87,5% na često korištenom setu testova engleskog Švicarskog broda, i skup unutrašnjih komentacija kineskih podataka.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös modelleerime disfluentsuse tuvastamise probleemi üleminekupõhise raamistiku abil, mis konstrueerib ja märgistab disfluentsuse osa sisendlausetest, kasutades uut süntaksiinfota üleminekusüsteemi. Võrreldes järjestuse märgistamise meetoditega võib see jäädvustada mittekohalisi tükkide taseme funktsioone; Võrreldes liigeste parsimise ja disfluentsuse tuvastamise meetoditega on see süntaksis müravaba. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie mudel saavutab tipptasemel f-skoori 87,5% tavaliselt kasutatud inglise lülitiplaadi testikomplekti ja kogumi ettevõttesiseseid annoteeritud Hiina andmeid.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons model die probleem van afskuldigheidsverking met 'n oorgang-gebaseerde raamwerk, wat inkrementeer konstrukteer en etiketteer die afskuldigheidsblok van invoer setinge met gebruik van 'n nuwe oorgang stelsel sonder sintaks inligting. Vergelyk met volgorde etiket metodes, dit kan neen- plaaslike blok- vlak funksies opneem; vergelyk met joint parsing and disfluency detection methods, dit is vry vir ruis in sintaks. Eksperimente wys dat ons model 87,5% van die gewoonlik gebruikte Engelske Switchboard toets stel bereik het, en 'n stel van in-huis gekommerde Sjinese data.", 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ mallinnamme disfluenssin havaitsemisen ongelmaa siirtymﾃ､pohjaisella kehyksellﾃ､, joka rakentaa ja leimaa disfluenssipalkin asteittain kﾃ､yttﾃ､mﾃ､llﾃ､ uutta siirtymﾃ､jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ ilman syntaksitietoa. Verrattuna sekvenssimerkintﾃ､menetelmiin se voi tallentaa ei-paikallisia lohkotason ominaisuuksia; Verrattuna nivelparsaukseen ja disfluenssin havaitsemiseen se on syntaksissa kohinaton. Kokeet osoittavat, ettﾃ､ mallimme saavuttaa huippuluokan f-pisteet 87,5% yleisesti kﾃ､ytetyssﾃ､ englanninkielisessﾃ､ kytkinlevytestisarjassa ja joukon sisﾃ､isiﾃ､ huomautuksia sisﾃ､ltﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､ kiinalaista dataa.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku modelujeme problém detekce neslušnosti pomocí přechodového frameworku, který postupně konstruuje a označuje kus neslušnosti vstupních vět pomocí nového přechodového systému bez syntaxních informací. Ve srovnání s metodami sekvenčního popisování může zachytit nekomístní funkce na úrovni kusů; Ve srovnání s metodami syntaxe kloubního parsování a detekce neslušnosti je zdarma pro šum. Experimenty ukazují, že náš model dosahuje nejmodernějšího f-skóre 87,5% na běžně používané testovací sadě anglického rozvaděče a sadě interních anotovaných čínských dat.', 'jv': 'Nang paper iki, kita model kuwi nggawe kesalakno kanggo ngilanggar nggawe sistem sing wis ana dadi nggawe barang nggawe lan etiket kebijakan kanggo ngilanggar bantuan ingkang disransfer Sample rate bookmarks Name', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו דוגמנים את הבעיה של זיהוי חוסר השליטה באמצעות מסגרת מבוססת מעבר, אשר מבנה באופן שלילי ומתווים את חתיכת חוסר השליטה של משפטי הכניסה באמצעות מערכת מעבר חדשה ללא מידע סינטקסי. בהשוואה לשיטות תיקון רצף, הוא יכול לכלול תכונות לא מקומיות ברמה של חתיכות. בהשוואה לשיטות בדיקת משותפות ולגילוי חוסר השפעה, זה חופשי לרעש בסינטקס. ניסויים מראים שהמודל שלנו משיג נקודת F מצוינת ביותר של 87.5% על קבוצת מבחן אנגלית Switchboard משתמשת בדרך כלל, וסוג של נתונים סיניים מוצבעים בתוך הבית.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã motsar matsalar da za'a gane wa'anar mai fassara, ana yi amfani da wani firam mai shawara ta shige, wanda yana samar da shi ana ƙara, kuma yana yi alama mai fassara na tsarin ayuka da za'a yi amfani da wani tsari na shishi na daban-daban, bã da wani information na syntaxer. @ info: whatsthis QXml Fijaroyi na nuna cewa misalinmu yana sãmu halin-mai-sanar f-score na 87.5%, a kan daidaita matsayin Shirin Mai Shirin Ayuka na Ingiriya da aka yi amfani da shi a ɗabi'a, da wani matsayin a gidan-gida da aka sanar da data na China.", 'sk': 'V prispevku smo modelirali problem odkrivanja disfluentnosti z uporabo prehodnega okvira, ki postopoma konstruira in označuje del disfluentnosti vhodnih stavkov z uporabo novega prehodnega sistema brez sintaksnih informacij. V primerjavi z metodami označevanja zaporedja lahko zajame ne-lokalne funkcije na ravni kosov; V primerjavi z metodami za ugotavljanje disfluentnosti je brez hrupa v sintaksi. Eksperimenti kažejo, da naš model dosega najsodobnejši f-rezultat 87,5% na pogosto uporabljenem angleškem testnem kompletu stikalne plošče in niz notranjih označenih kitajskih podatkov.', 'bo': 'In this paper, we model the problem of disfluency detection using a transition-based framework, which incrementally constructs and labels the disfluency chunk of input sentences using a new transition system without syntax information. Compared with sequence labeling methods, it can capture non-local chunk-level features;  མཉམ་དུ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་བསྡུར་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཚུ་མཉམ་དུ་ཉམས་འཇོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experiments show that our model achieves state-of-the-art f-score of 87.5% in the commonly used English Switchboard test set, and a set of in-house annotated Chinese data.'}
{'en': 'A Study of Style in Machine Translation : Controlling the Formality of Machine Translation Output', 'ar': 'دراسة الأسلوب في الترجمة الآلية: التحكم في شكليات مخرجات الترجمة الآلية', 'fr': 'Une étude du style dans la traduction automatique\xa0: contrôler la formalité de la sortie de la traduction automatique', 'es': 'Un estudio del estilo en la traducción automática: control de la formalidad de la producción de la traducción automática', 'pt': 'Um estudo de estilo na tradução automática: controlando a formalidade da tradução automática', 'ja': '機械翻訳におけるスタイルの研究：機械翻訳出力の形式を制御する', 'ru': 'A Study of Style in Machine Translation: Controlling the Formality of Machine Translation Output', 'zh': '机器翻译中风格,制机器翻译输文', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद में शैली का एक अध्ययन: मशीन अनुवाद आउटपुट की औपचारिकता को नियंत्रित करना', 'ga': 'Staidéar ar Stíl san Aistriúchán Meaisín: Foirmiúlacht Aschur an Aistriúcháin Meaisín a Rialú', 'el': 'Μελέτη του στυλ στη μηχανική μετάφραση: Έλεγχος της τυπικότητας της παραγωγής της μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A stílus tanulmánya a gépi fordításban: a gépi fordítási kimenet formaságának ellenőrzése', 'it': "Uno studio dello stile nella traduzione automatica: controllare la formalità dell'output della traduzione automatica", 'kk': 'Машин аудармасындағы стильдің оқытуы: Машин аудармасының пішімділігін басқару', 'lt': 'Mašin ų vertimo stilio tyrimas: mašinų vertimo rezultato formalumo kontrolė', 'mk': 'Студија на стил во машински превод: Контролирање на формалноста на излезот на машински превод', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Studju ta’ Stil fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni: Kontroll tal-Formalità tal-Prodott tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Машин хөгжүүлэлтийн стиль судалгаа: Машин хөгжүүлэлтийн форматыг удирдах', 'ro': 'Un studiu al stilului în traducerea automată: controlul formalității rezultatelor traducerii automate', 'pl': 'Studium stylu w tłumaczeniu maszynowym: kontrola formalności wyników tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'sr': 'Proučavanje stila u prevodu mašine: Kontroliranje formalnosti rezultata prevoda mašine', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Study of Style in Machine Translation: Controlling the Formality of Machine Translation Output', 'sv': 'En studie av stil i maskinöversättning: Kontroll av formeln i maskinöversättning output', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A study of style in Machine Translation: control the Formality of Machine Translation outra', 'nl': 'Een studie van stijl in machinevertaling: het controleren van de formaliteit van machinevertaling output', 'bg': 'Изследване на стила в машинния превод: контролиране на формалността на изхода от машинния превод', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje stila u prevodu strojeva: Kontroliranje formalnosti rezultata prevoda strojeva', 'am': 'Controling the Formality of Machine Translation Output', 'da': 'En undersøgelse af stil i maskinoversættelse: Styring af formaliteten af maskinoversættelsesuddata', 'bs': 'Proučavanje stila u prevodu mašine: Kontroliranje formalnosti rezultata prevoda mašine', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '기계 번역 스타일 연구: 기계 번역 출력을 제어하는 형식', 'id': 'A Study of Style in Machine Translation: Controlling the Formality of Machine Translation Output', 'ca': "Un estudi d'estil en traducció màquina: Controllar la formalitat de la producció de traducció màquina", 'cs': 'Studie stylu strojového překladu: Řízení formality strojového překladu', 'de': 'Eine Stilstudie in der maschinellen Übersetzung: Kontrolle der Formalität der maschinellen Übersetzung', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Style katika Tafsiri ya Mashine: Kudhibiti Utafiti wa Tafsiri wa Mashine', 'sq': 'Një studim i stilit në përkthimin e makinave: Kontrollimi i Formalitetit të Prodhimit të Trakthimit të Makinës', 'az': 'Makinel톛rin terc칲m톛sind톛 St칲l 칐yr톛nm톛si: Makinel톛rin T톛rc칲m톛 칂캼qt캼s캼n캼n Formalitetini Kontrol Et', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjimelerinde Stil öwrenmesi: Maşynyň terjime edilen Çikgi Kontroli', 'hy': 'Մեքենայի թարգմանման ոճի ուսումնասիրություն. մեքենայի թարգմանման արտադրության ֆորմալ վերահսկումը', 'bn': 'Name', 'et': 'Masintõlke stiiliuuring: masintõlke väljundi formaalsuse kontrollimine', 'fi': 'Konekäännöksen tyylin tutkimus: Konekäännöksen tuotoksen muodollisuuden hallinta', 'af': 'Name', 'jv': 'tab-style', 'sk': 'Študija sloga strojnega prevajanja: nadzor formalnosti izhoda strojnega prevajanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מחקר של סגנון בתרגום מכונות: שליטה בפורמליות של יציאת התרגום מכונות', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་ལུགས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྱི་དཔེ་ཚོད་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་སྒྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Stylistic variations of language, such as formality, carry speakers’ intention beyond literal meaning and should be conveyed adequately in translation. We propose to use lexical formality models to control the formality level of machine translation output. We demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach in empirical evaluations, as measured by automatic metrics and human assessments.', 'ar': 'الاختلافات الأسلوبية في اللغة ، مثل الشكليات ، تحمل نية المتحدثين وراء المعنى الحرفي ويجب نقلها بشكل مناسب في الترجمة. نقترح استخدام نماذج الإجراءات المعجمية للتحكم في مستوى شكلي إخراج الترجمة الآلية. نظهر فعالية نهجنا في التقييمات التجريبية ، كما تم قياسه بواسطة المقاييس التلقائية والتقييمات البشرية.', 'fr': "Les variations stylistiques du langage, telles que la formalité, transmettent l'intention de l'orateur au-delà du sens littéral et doivent être traduites de manière adéquate dans la traduction. Nous proposons d'utiliser des modèles de formalité lexicale pour contrôler le niveau de formalité des résultats de traduction automatique. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de notre approche dans des évaluations empiriques, telles que mesurées par des métriques automatiques et des évaluations humaines.", 'es': 'Las variaciones estilísticas del lenguaje, como la formalidad, llevan la intención de los oradores más allá del significado literal y deben transmitirse adecuadamente en la traducción. Proponemos utilizar modelos de formalidad léxica para controlar el nivel de formalidad de la salida de traducción automática. Demostramos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque en las evaluaciones empíricas, medidas mediante métricas automáticas y evaluaciones humanas.', 'pt': 'As variações estilísticas da linguagem, como a formalidade, levam a intenção dos falantes além do significado literal e devem ser transmitidas adequadamente na tradução. Propomos usar modelos de formalidade lexical para controlar o nível de formalidade da saída da tradução automática. Demonstramos a eficácia de nossa abordagem em avaliações empíricas, medidas por métricas automáticas e avaliações humanas.', 'ja': '形式などの様式的な言語のバリエーションは、話者の意図を文字通りの意味を超えて伝え、翻訳で適切に伝える必要があります。機械翻訳出力の形式レベルを制御するために、語彙形式モデルを使用することを提案します。私たちは、自動指標と人間の評価によって測定される、実証的評価における私たちのアプローチの有効性を実証します。', 'ru': 'Стилистические вариации языка, такие как формальность, выводят намерения ораторов за рамки буквального значения и должны адекватно передаваться в переводе. Мы предлагаем использовать лексические формальные модели для контроля уровня формальности выходных данных машинного перевода. Мы демонстрируем эффективность нашего подхода в эмпирических оценках, измеряемых автоматическими метриками и человеческими оценками.', 'zh': '言语之变,如文,使言者之意越字面义,宜尽传于译。 臣等议用词汇式以制机器翻译输形式化水平。 吾证吾法于实效性,自指标与人工评之。', 'hi': 'भाषा की शैलीगत विविधताएं, जैसे कि औपचारिकता, शाब्दिक अर्थ से परे वक्ताओं के इरादे को ले जाती हैं और अनुवाद में पर्याप्त रूप से व्यक्त की जानी चाहिए। हम मशीन अनुवाद आउटपुट की औपचारिकता स्तर को नियंत्रित करने के लिए लेक्सिकल औपचारिकता मॉडल का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम अनुभवजन्य मूल्यांकन में हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जैसा कि स्वचालित मीट्रिक और मानव आकलन द्वारा मापा जाता है।', 'ga': 'Téann éagsúlachtaí stíle teanga, mar fhoirmiúlacht, thar chiall na gcainteoirí thar brí litriúil agus ba chóir iad a chur in iúl go cuí san aistriúchán. Tá sé beartaithe againn samhlacha foirmiúlachta foclóireachta a úsáid chun leibhéal foirmiúlachta aschuir meaisín-aistrithe a rialú. Léirímid éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige maidir le meastóireachtaí eimpíreacha, arna dtomhas ag méadracht uathoibríoch agus measúnuithe daonna.', 'ka': 'ენის სტილისტიკური განცვლები, როგორც ფორმალურობა, მუშაობის საზოგადოება ლიტრალური ნიშნალის გარეშე და უნდა იყოს მარტივი განცვლითაში. ჩვენ მინდა გამოყენოთ ლექსიკალური ფორმატიური მოდელები მაქინის გადაწყვეტილების ფორმატიური დონე. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ ჩვენი წარმოდგენის ეფექტიურობას ემპირიკალური განსაზღვრებში, როგორც ავტომატური მეტრიკის და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებით.', 'hu': 'A nyelv stílusos változatai, mint például a formaság, a beszélők szándékát túlmutatják a szó szerinti értelmén, és fordításban megfelelően kell közvetíteni. Javasoljuk, hogy lexikai formasági modelleket használjunk a gépi fordítási kimenet formalitási szintjének szabályozására. Megközelítésünk hatékonyságát empirikus értékelésekben mutatjuk be, automatikus mérésekkel és emberi értékelésekkel mérve.', 'el': 'Οι στυλιστικές παραλλαγές της γλώσσας, όπως η τυπικότητα, μεταφέρουν την πρόθεση των ομιλητών πέρα από το κυριολεκτικό νόημα και πρέπει να μεταφέρονται επαρκώς στη μετάφραση. Προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε λεξικά μοντέλα τυπικότητας για τον έλεγχο του επιπέδου τυπικότητας της παραγωγής μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Αποδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας σε εμπειρικές αξιολογήσεις, όπως μετρώνται με αυτόματες μετρήσεις και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις.', 'it': "Le variazioni stilistiche della lingua, come la formalità, portano l'intenzione degli oratori oltre il significato letterale e dovrebbero essere trasmesse adeguatamente nella traduzione. Proponiamo di utilizzare modelli di formalità lessicali per controllare il livello di formalità dell'output di traduzione automatica. Dimostriamo l'efficacia del nostro approccio nelle valutazioni empiriche, misurate da metriche automatiche e valutazioni umane.", 'lt': 'Kalbos stilistiniai pokyčiai, pavyzdžiui, formalumas, reiškia kalbėtojų ketinimus, kurie neturi literalios reikšmės, ir turėtų būti tinkamai išversti. Siūlome naudoti tekstinius formalumo modelius mašinų vertimo išvesties formalumo lygiui kontroliuoti. Mes parodome savo požiūrio veiksmingumą atliekant empirinius vertinimus, išmatuotus automatiniais metriniais ir žmogaus vertinimais.', 'kk': 'Тілдердің стилистикалық айнымалылығы, мысалы, официалдық секілді, сөйлейтінің мақсатын әріпті мәліметінен артық тастайды және аудармасында дұрыс түрлену керек. Біз лексикалық официалдық үлгілерін қолдану үшін машинаның аудармалардың официалдық деңгейін басқару үшін қолданып тастаймыз. Автоматты метрикалық және адамдардың оқиғалары бойынша өзіміздің эмпирикалық оқиғаларында тәжірибесін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Стилистичките варијации на јазикот, како што е формалноста, ја носат намерата на говорниците надвор од буквалното значење и треба да се пренесуваат соодветно на превод. Предложуваме да се користат модели на лексикална формалност за контрола на нивото на формалност на машински превод. We demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach in empirical evaluations, as measured by automatic metrics and human assessments.', 'ms': 'Variasi stilistik bahasa, seperti formaliti, membawa tujuan pembicara melampaui makna literal dan seharusnya dihantar dengan tepat dalam terjemahan. Kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan model formaliti leksikal untuk mengawal aras formaliti output terjemahan mesin. Kami menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan kita dalam penilaian empirik, seperti diukur oleh metrik automatik dan penilaian manusia.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷയുടെ സ്റ്റൈലിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d, ഫോര്\u200dമിലിറ്റിയില്ലെന്ന പ്രസംഗിക്കുന്നവരുടെ ഉദ്ദേശം സാക്ഷ്യതയുട ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dട്ടിലിറ്റി മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. മെഷീന്\u200d പര സ്വയം മെട്രിക്കകളും മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിചാരണകളുമായി അളന്നുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യതയുടെ സ്വാഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Холны стилист өөрчлөлт, жишээ нь үндэслэлт, илтгэгчдийн зорилго нь бичил утга учиртай илтгэлээсээ илтгэдэг. Тэгээд илтгэлээс адилхан илтгэгдэх хэрэгтэй. Бид машины орчуулалтын официаллын түвшинд хэрэглэх хэмжээг ашиглах гэсэн санал өгдөг. Бид автоматик метрик болон хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээгээр хэмжигдсэн тооцоололтой тооцоололтой эффективностыг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Stilistiske variasjonar av språk, slik som formalitet, bør innføra taleinnstillingane etter bokstavelig mening og bør tilpassast i omsetjinga. Vi foreslår å bruka leksiske formalitetsmodeller for å kontrollera formalitetsnivået på omsetjinga av maskinen. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt i empiriske evaluering, som målt av automatiske metrikar og menneske evalueringar.', 'pl': 'Stylistyczne warianty języka, takie jak formalność, przenoszą intencje mówców poza dosłowne znaczenie i powinny być odpowiednio przekazywane w tłumaczeniu. Proponujemy wykorzystanie leksykalnych modeli formalności do kontroli poziomu formalności wyjściowego tłumaczenia maszynowego. Efektywność naszego podejścia demonstrujemy w ocenach empirycznych mierzonych automatycznymi i ocenami ludzkimi.', 'ro': 'Variațiile stilistice ale limbajului, cum ar fi formalitatea, duc intenția vorbitorilor dincolo de sensul literal și ar trebui să fie transmise în mod adecvat în traducere. Propunem să folosim modele de formalitate lexicală pentru a controla nivelul de formalitate al rezultatelor traducerii automate. Demonstrăm eficiența abordării noastre în evaluările empirice, măsurate prin măsurători automate și evaluări umane.', 'mt': 'Varjazzjonijiet stilistiċi tal-lingwa, bħall-formalità, iġorru l-intenzjoni tal-kelliema lil hinn mit-tifsira letterali u għandhom jitwasslu b’mod adegwat fit-traduzzjoni. Aħna nipproponu li jintużaw mudelli ta’ formalità lexika biex jiġi kkontrollat il-livell ta’ formalità tal-output tat-traduzzjoni bil-magna. Aħna nuru l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna f’evalwazzjonijiet empiriċi, kif imkejla permezz ta’ metriċi awtomatiċi u valutazzjonijiet umani.', 'sr': 'Stylističke varijacije jezika, poput formalnosti, nose namjeru govornika izvan bukvalnog značenja, i trebalo bi biti adekvatno preneseno u prevodu. Predlažemo da koristimo leksičke formalnosti za kontrolu nivoa formalnosti prevođenja mašine. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa u empiričkim procenama, mjerenim automatskim metrikama i ljudskim procenama.', 'so': "Isticmaalka luqada ee isticmaalka ah, tusaale ahaan rasmiga ah, waxay leeyihiin qasnada hadalka oo aan ku qornayn waxyaabaha qoraalka ah iyo in lagu turjumo si ku filan. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan isticmaalno qaabab rasmi ah oo leksikal ah si aan u maamulno heerka rasmiga ah ee midhaha turjumaadda machine. Waxaynu muujinnaa faa'iidada qaababkayaga qiimeynta caadiga ah, sida loo qiyaasay maamulka iyo qiimeynta dadka.", 'si': 'ස්ටිලිස්ටික් වෙනස් භාෂාව, හරියට සාමාන්\u200dයතාවය, ස්පීකර්ස්ගේ අදහසක් අතරින් ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය අදහසක් අතරින් ගෙ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ලෙක්සිකාලික සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න යන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තනයේ සාමාන අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ', 'sv': 'Stilistiska språkvariationer, t.ex. formaliteter, leder talarnas avsikter bortom bokstavlig mening och bör förmedlas på lämpligt sätt i översättningen. Vi föreslår att man använder lexikala formalitetsmodeller för att kontrollera formalitetsnivån för maskinöversättning. Vi visar hur effektivt vårt tillvägagångssätt är i empiriska utvärderingar, mätta med automatiska mätvärden och mänskliga bedömningar.', 'ta': 'மொழியின் பாணியான மாறுபாடுகள், வடிவமைப்பு, எழுத்துரு அர்த்தத்திற்கு மேற்கூடிய பேச்சாளரின் நிலையை எடுத்து பொருள நாங்கள் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு வெளியீட்டின் வடிவமைப்பு மாதிரிகளை கட்டுப்படுத்துவதற்கு முன்நிர் நாம் தானியங்கி மெட்ரிக்கள் மற்றும் மனித கணக்கீடுகள் மூலம் அளந்து, எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவுகளை காட்டுகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'زبان کی استیلیسٹی تغییرات، جیسے فرمول، اسپیرٹوں کا ارادہ ذمہ لیتے ہیں اور ان کی ترجمہ میں اچھی طرح اضافہ کرنا چاہیے۔ ہم نے لکسیکل فرمولیٹ موڈل استعمال کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ ماشین ترجمہ آوتپٹ کے فرمولیٹ سطح کو کنٹرول کرے۔ ہم اپنے طریقے کے مطابق مطابق مطابق کے مطابق مطابق اور انسان کے مطابق اندازے کے مطابق دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz texnological formatlash modellaridan foydalanishni istaysizmi, mashinaning tarjima natijasining formatlash darajasini boshqarish uchun. Biz avtomatik metric va inson qiymatlari bilan o'ylab, bizning qiymatlarimizning effektini ko'rsatumiz.", 'vi': 'Sự biến đổi ngôn ngữ chính xác, như thủ tục, mang ý định của người phát biểu ra ngoài nghĩa đen và nên được cung cấp đầy đủ theo cách dịch. Chúng tôi đề nghị dùng các mô hình thức từ dược để kiểm soát mức độ hình thức của sản phẩm dịch cỗ máy. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của cách tiếp cận trong kinh nghiệm, đo định bằng âm tính và đánh giá con người.', 'hr': 'Stylističke varijacije jezika, poput formalnosti, nose namjeru govornika izvan bukvalnog značenja i trebalo bi biti adekvatno preneseno u prevodu. Predlažemo koristiti leksičke formalnosti modele za kontrolu nivoa formalnosti prevoda strojeva. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa u empiričkim procjenama, mjerenim automatskim metrikama i ljudskim procjenama.', 'nl': 'Stilistische variaties van taal, zoals formaliteit, dragen de intentie van sprekers verder dan letterlijke betekenis en moeten adequaat in vertaling worden overgebracht. We stellen voor om lexicale formaliteitsmodellen te gebruiken om het formaliteitsniveau van machinevertaaloutput te controleren. We tonen de effectiviteit van onze aanpak aan in empirische evaluaties, gemeten aan de hand van automatische metrics en human assessments.', 'bg': 'Стилистичните вариации на езика, като формалността, пренасят намерението на говорещите отвъд буквалния смисъл и трябва да бъдат предадени адекватно в превода. Предлагаме да се използват лексикални формалности модели за контрол на нивото на формалност на изхода от машинния превод. Ние демонстрираме ефективността на нашия подход при емпирични оценки, измерени чрез автоматични измервания и човешки оценки.', 'da': 'Stilistiske sprogvariationer, såsom formaliteter, bærer talernes hensigt ud over bogstavelig betydning og bør formidles tilstrækkeligt i oversættelse. Vi foreslår at bruge leksikalske formalitetsmodeller til at styre formalitetsniveauet for maskinoversættelse output. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af vores tilgang i empiriske evalueringer, målt ved automatiske målinger og menneskelige vurderinger.', 'de': 'Stilistische Variationen der Sprache, wie etwa Formalität, tragen die Intention des Sprechers über den wörtlichen Sinn hinaus und sollten in der Übersetzung adäquat vermittelt werden. Wir schlagen vor, lexikalische Formalitätsmodelle zur Kontrolle des Formalitätsniveaus der maschinellen Übersetzung zu verwenden. Die Wirksamkeit unseres Ansatzes demonstrieren wir in empirischen Auswertungen, gemessen an automatischen Metriken und Human Assessments.', 'id': "Stylistic variations of language, such as formality, carry speakers' intention beyond literal meaning and should be conveyed adequately in translation.  Kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan model formalitas lexik untuk mengontrol tingkat formalitas dari output terjemahan mesin. Kami menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kita dalam evaluasi empiris, seperti diukur dengan metrik otomatis dan penilaian manusia.", 'ko': '언어의 문체 변화, 예를 들어 형식은 말하는 사람의 의도가 글자의 의미를 초월하게 하기 때문에 번역에서 충분히 표현해야 한다.우리는 어휘 형식화 모델을 사용하여 기계 번역 출력의 형식화 수준을 제어할 것을 건의합니다.우리는 자동 도량과 인공 평가를 통해 우리의 방법이 실증 평가에서의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya msingi ya lugha kama vile ufanisi, hubeba lengo la wazungumzaji zaidi ya maana ya msingi na inapaswa kutumika kwa fasiri ya kutosha. Tunazipendekeza kutumia mifano ya usalama wa lexico kudhibiti kiwango cha rasmi cha utafsiri wa mashine. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu katika tafiti za utafiti, kama ilivyo kupigwa kwa mbinu za kujitegemea na tathmini za binadamu.', 'sq': 'Variacionet stilistike të gjuhës, të tilla si formaliteti, mbajnë qëllimin e folësve përtej kuptimit literal dhe duhet të transmetohen në mënyrë të përshtatshme në përkthim. Ne propozojmë të përdorim modele të formalitetit lexik për të kontrolluar nivelin e formalitetit të daljes së përkthimit të makinës. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë në vlerësimet empirike, siç matën nga metrikat automatike dhe vlerësimet njerëzore.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ተለዋጭነት፣ እንደምትፈንድ፣ የቋንቋዎችን አቃውሞ በተግባራዊ ማህበረት ማድረግ እና በመተርጓሜ በመጠቀም ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የሜክስሎ ፎርማሌ ምሳሌዎችን ለመቀበል እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በአካባቢ ሚትሪክ እና በሰው አካውንቶች በተለካ መጠን የሥርዓታችንን ጥያቄ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեզվի ոճելիստական տարբերությունները, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ ձևավորությունը, խոսնականների մտադրությունը բառացի իմաստից դուրս է գալիս և դրանք պետք է բավականին հաղորդեն թարգմանության մեջ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել լեքսիկական պաշտոնական մոդելներ մեքենայի թարգմանման արդյունքի պաշտոնական մակարդակի վերահսկելու համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը էմպրիկական գնահատումների մեջ, չափված ավտոմատիկ մետրիկայի և մարդկային գնահատումների միջոցով:', 'fa': 'تغییرات استیلیستیک زبان، مثل رسمی، قصد سخنرانی را فراتر از معنی حرفه\u200cای حمل می\u200cکند و باید به طور مناسب در ترجمه\u200cای برگردد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم از مدل رسمی\u200cهای زبان استفاده کنیم تا سطح رسمی\u200cهای خروج ماشین را کنترل کنیم. ما فعالیت روش ما را در ارزیابی امپراتیک نشان می دهیم، همانطور که توسط متریک\u200cهای خودکار و ارزیابی انسان اندازه شده است.', 'az': 'Dillərin stilistik dəyişiklikləri, formalitə kimi, söhbətçilərin niyyətini yazmaq məqsədilə daşımaq və dəyişiklik məqsədilə yeterli təlqin etmək lazımdır. Biz maşın çeviri səviyyəsini kontrol etmək üçün leksik formalitə modellərini istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Biz özümüzün istifadə etdiyimizi empirik değerlendirmələrdə göstəririk, avtomatik metrik və insan değerlendirmələri ilə ölçülür.', 'tr': 'Dilleriň stilistik üýtgeşmeleri ýaly formalitet, sözleriniň niýetini edebiýan anlamdan daşary taýýarlar we terjime etmelidir. Maşynyň terjime edilişiniň derejesini kontrol etmek üçin lektik formalitet nusgalaryny ulanmagy maslahat berýäris. Biz empirik deňlemelerde ýaryşymyzyň etkinliýetini awtomatik metrika we adamlaryň deňlemeleri bilen ölçülendirilýäris.', 'af': 'Stylistiese variasies van taal, soos formeeliteit, dra sprekkers se intensie buite literale betekening en moet adequate in vertaling uitgevoer word. Ons stel voorstel om leksiese formaliteit modele te gebruik om die formaliteit vlak van masjien vertaling uitvoer te beheer. Ons wys die effektiviteit van ons toegang in empiriese evaluerings, soos gemeet deur outomatiese metries en menslike evaluerings.', 'bn': 'ভাষার স্টাইলিস্টিক বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, যেমন ফরেমিলিটি, সাহিত্যিক অর্থের বাইরে কথাবার্তাদের উদ্দেশ্য বহন করে এবং অন আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি মেশিন অনুবাদ আউটপুটের ফরম্যালিটি মোডেল ব্যবহার করার জন্য। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মেট্রিক এবং মানুষের মূল্যের মাধ্যমে পরিমাপে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি।', 'ca': "Variacions estilistiques de llenguatge, com la formalitat, porten la intenció dels oradors més enllà del significat literal i haurien de ser transmises adequadament en traducció. Proposem que utilitzem models de formalitat lèxica per controlar el nivell de formalitat de la traducció automàtica. Demonstrem l'eficacia del nostre enfocament en les evaluacions empíriques, mesurades per la mètrica automàtica i les evaluacions humanes.", 'bs': 'Stylističke varijacije jezika, poput formalnosti, nose namjeru govornika izvan bukvalnog značenja i trebalo bi biti adekvatno preneseno u prevodu. Predlažemo da koristimo leksičke formalnosti modele da kontrolišemo nivo formalnosti prevoda mašine. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa u empiričkim procjenama, mjerenim automatskim metrikama i ljudskim procjenama.', 'cs': 'Stylistické varianty jazyka, jako je formalita, nesou záměr řečníka nad doslovný význam a měly by být adekvátně předávány v překladu. Navrhujeme použití lexikálních formalitních modelů pro řízení úrovně formality strojového překladu. Účinnost našeho přístupu demonstrujeme v empirických hodnoceních, měřených automatickými metrikami a lidskými hodnoceními.', 'et': 'Keele stiilsed variatsioonid, näiteks formaalsus, viivad kõnelejate kavatsused sõnasõnalisest tähendusest kaugemale ja neid tuleks tõlkes piisavalt edasi anda. Me teeme ettepaneku kasutada leksikaalse formaalsuse mudeleid masintõlke väljundi formaalsuse kontrollimiseks. Näitame oma lähenemisviisi efektiivsust empiirilistes hindamistes, mida mõõdetakse automaatsete mõõdikute ja inimhinnangute abil.', 'fi': 'Tyylikkäät kielenvaihdokset, kuten muodollisuus, vievät puhujan tarkoituksen kirjaimellisen merkityksen ulkopuolelle, ja ne tulisi välittää asianmukaisesti käännöksessä. Ehdotamme leksikaalisia muodollisuusmalleja konekäännöksen tuotoksen muodollisuustason kontrolloimiseksi. Osoitamme lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden empiirisissä arvioinneissa, joita mitataan automaattisilla mittareilla ja ihmisarvioinneilla.', 'jv': 'Tarjamakno Awak dhéwé nggunakake model lewat saiki nggawe ngubah sampek kudu nggawe barang kelas teljamahan. Awak dhéwé éntukno éntukno awak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan karo hal-hal dadi, nik kuwi nggawe barang daftar éntuk karo perusahaan maning.', 'sk': 'Stilistične različice jezika, kot je formalnost, prenašajo namen govornikov preko dobesednega pomena in jih je treba ustrezno prenesti v prevajanju. Predlagamo uporabo modelov leksikalne formalnosti za nadzor stopnje formalnosti rezultata strojnega prevajanja. Učinkovitost našega pristopa dokazujemo pri empiričnih vrednotenjih, merjenih z avtomatskimi metrikami in človeškimi ocenami.', 'he': 'שינויים סטיליסטיים של שפה, כמו רשמיות, נושאים את כוונתם של הרופאים מעבר לשמעות מילולית והם צריכים להעביר בהתאם בתרגום. אנחנו מציעים להשתמש בדוגמנים רשמיים לקסיים כדי לשלוט ברמה רשמית של תוצאות התרגום המכונית. אנחנו מראים את היעילות של גישתנו בערכות אמפיריות, כפי שמדודה על ידי מטריקה אוטומטית וערכות אנושיות.', 'ha': '@ action: inmenu Munã buƙatan mu yi amfani da misãlai masu tsari na leksikali dõmin mu yi mamlakar da daraja na fassarar fassarar maɓalli. Tuna nũna mafiya amfani ga hanyarmu a kan muhimmada, kamar an ƙaddara mafariki da akan mutane.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་གྱི་དབུས་རིམ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱད་ནས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས ང་ཚོས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལྟར་བཀོད་པ་ཡིན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Sharp Models on Dull Hardware : Fast and Accurate Neural Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'ar': 'نماذج حادة على أجهزة مملة: فك تشفير سريع ودقيق لترجمة الآلة العصبية على وحدة المعالجة المركزية', 'es': 'Modelos nítidos en hardware sin brillo: Decodificación de traducción automática neuronal rápida y precisa en la CPU', 'fr': 'Modèles Sharp sur matériel terne\xa0: décodage de traduction automatique neuronale rapide et précis sur le processeur', 'pt': 'Modelos afiados em hardware maçante: decodificação de tradução automática neural rápida e precisa na CPU', 'ja': '鈍いハードウェアのシャープモデル： CPU上の高速で正確な神経機械翻訳デコード', 'zh': '沉闷硬件上清模:CPU 上速神经机器翻译解码', 'hi': 'सुस्त हार्डवेयर पर तेज मॉडल: सीपीयू पर फास्ट और सटीक न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद डिकोडिंग', 'ru': 'Модели Sharp на скучном оборудовании: быстрое и точное декодирование перевода нейронных машин на процессоре', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Géara ar Chrua-earraí Trom: Díchódú Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach Tapa agus Cruinn ar an LAP', 'ka': 'ძირითადი მოდელები ჩატვირთვაში: ძირითადი და წარმოადგილი ნეირალური მაქსინის გადასტვირთვა კოდირება CPU- ში', 'hu': 'Éles modellek tompa hardveren: gyors és pontos idegi fordítási dekódolás a CPU-n', 'el': 'Οξεία μοντέλα σε βαρύ υλικό: Γρήγορη και ακριβής αποκωδικοποίηση νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης στην ΚΜΕ', 'it': 'Modelli taglienti su hardware opaco: decodifica veloce e accurata traduzione automatica neurale sulla CPU', 'lt': 'Stiprus modelis duelinėje įrangoje: greitas ir tikslus neurologinių mašinų vertimo kodavimas CPU', 'kk': 'Екі жабдықтағы ортақ үлгілер: Процессордағы тез және дұрыс нейрондық машинаның аудару декодтамасы', 'ms': 'Model Sharp on Dull Hardware: Fast and Accurate Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'mk': 'Шири модели на двоен хардвер: брзо и точно декодирање на преведувањето на невралните машини на процесорот', 'ml': 'ഡുള്\u200d ഹാര്\u200dഡ്വെയരില്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഷാര്\u200dപ്പ് ചെയ്യുക: സിപിയുവില്\u200d വേഗത്തില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന', 'mt': 'Mudelli Sharp fuq Hardware Dull: Dikodifikazzjoni rapida u preċiża tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali fuq is-CPU', 'mn': 'Dull Hardware дээрх хурдан загвар: Хурдан, тодорхой мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулах', 'pl': 'Ostre modele na nudnym sprzęcie: Szybkie i dokładne dekodowanie tłumaczeń maszynowych neuronalnych na procesorze', 'no': 'Skarp- modeller på Dull- maskinvare: Snøggt og akkurat Neural Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'ro': 'Modele ascuțite pe hardware plictisitor: Decodarea rapidă și precisă a traducerii mașinilor neurale pe procesor', 'sr': 'Oštri modeli na Dull Hardware: Dekodiranje brze i precizne neuronske prevode na CPU', 'so': 'Hardwalka Dull', 'si': 'දුල් හාර්ඩ්වේර් වල තියෙන තියෙන මොඩේල්: CPU වල ඉක්මන් හා සාක්ෂික නිර්මාණ මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය', 'ur': 'ڈول هارڈ ویر پر شارپ موڈل: CPU پر تیز اور دقیق نیورال ماشین ترجمہ ڈکوڈینگ', 'ta': 'டுல் வன்பொருளில் பகிர்ந்த மாதிரிகள்:', 'sv': 'Sharp modeller på tråkig hårdvara: Snabb och exakt neural maskinöversättning avkodning på processorn', 'vi': 'Chế độ sắc bén trên Phần cứng Dulles: Dịch sang hình thái thần kinh nhanh và chính xác giải mã chương trình CPU', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': "Skarpe modeller på kedelig hardware: Hurtig og nøjagtig Neural Machine Translation dekodning på CPU'en", 'nl': 'Scherpe modellen op saaie hardware: snelle en nauwkeurige neurale machinevertaling decodering op de CPU', 'bg': 'Остри модели на скучен хардуер: бързо и точно декодиране на неврален машинен превод на процесора', 'hr': 'Oštri modeli na dvostrukoj hardwareu: Dekodiranje brze i precizne neurološke prevode na CPU', 'ko': '둔한 하드웨어의 날카로운 모형: CPU에서 신속하고 정확한 신경기계 번역 디코딩', 'id': 'Model Sharp on Dull Hardware: Fast and Accurate Neural Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'fa': 'Models Sharp on Dull Hardware: Fast and Accurate Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'de': 'Scharfe Modelle auf langweiliger Hardware: Schnelle und genaue Dekodierung der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung auf der CPU', 'tr': "Dul Hatlaryň üzerinde Gatnaş Modeller: Häzir we Katyk Neural Makina Terjime Ködlemeleri CPU'de", 'sq': 'Sharp Models on Dull Hardware: Fast and Accurate Neural Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'sw': 'Simulizi za simu za mkononi kwenye vifaa vya kudhulumu: Utafiti wa Mashine ya Karibu na Takribani Utafiti wa Kikaribia kuhusu CPU', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային սարքավորումների խիստ մոդելները. արագ և ճշգրիտ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման կոդավորում CPU-ի վրա', 'af': 'Skerp Modelle op Dull Hardware: Vinnige en Accurate Neurale Masjien Vertaling Dekodering op die CPU', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': "Dul Yazılımlarda Sharp Models: CPU'da Hızlı və Tam Nüral Makina Çeviri Dekodlaması", 'bn': 'Sharp Models on Dull Hardware: Fast and Accurate Neural Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU', 'bs': 'Oštri modeli na Dull Hardware: Dekodiranje brze i precizne neuronske prevode na CPU', 'ca': 'Models aguts del Hardware Dull: Descodificació ràpida i exacta de traducció de màquines neuronales al CPU', 'cs': 'Ostré modely na nudném hardwaru: Rychlé a přesné dekódování neuronového strojového překladu na procesoru', 'et': 'Teravad mudelid igaval riistvaral: kiire ja täpne neuroaalne masintõlke dekodeerimine protsessoril', 'fi': 'Sharp-mallit tylsällä laitteistolla: nopea ja tarkka neuraalinen konekäännös dekoodaus suorittimessa', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'he': 'דוגמנים חמורים על חומר דול: מתקנת התרגום מהירה ומדויקת של מכונות נוירות על המעבד', 'sk': 'Sharp modeli na dolgočasni strojni opremi: hitro in natančno dekodiranje nevralnega strojnega prevoda na CPU', 'ha': '@ action: button', 'bo': 'Sharp Models on Dull Hardware: Fast and Accurate Neural Machine Translation Decoding on the CPU'}
{'en': 'Attentional sequence-to-sequence models have become the new standard for machine translation, but one challenge of such models is a significant increase in training and decoding cost compared to phrase-based systems. In this work we focus on efficient decoding, with a goal of achieving accuracy close the state-of-the-art in neural machine translation (NMT), while achieving CPU decoding speed / throughput close to that of a phrasal decoder. We approach this problem from two angles : First, we describe several techniques for speeding up an NMT beam search decoder, which obtain a 4.4x speedup over a very efficient baseline decoder without changing the decoder output. Second, we propose a simple but powerful network architecture which uses an RNN (GRU / LSTM) layer at bottom, followed by a series of stacked fully-connected layers applied at every timestep. This architecture achieves similar accuracy to a deep recurrent model, at a small fraction of the training and decoding cost. By combining these techniques, our best system achieves a very competitive accuracy of 38.3 BLEU on WMT English-French NewsTest2014, while decoding at 100 words / sec on single-threaded CPU. We believe this is the best published accuracy / speed trade-off of an NMT system.', 'ar': 'أصبحت نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل المتعمدة هي المعيار الجديد للترجمة الآلية ، ولكن أحد التحديات التي تواجه هذه النماذج هو زيادة كبيرة في تكلفة التدريب وفك التشفير مقارنة بالأنظمة القائمة على العبارات. في هذا العمل ، نركز على فك التشفير الفعال ، بهدف تحقيق الدقة بالقرب من أحدث التقنيات في الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ، مع تحقيق سرعة / إنتاجية لفك تشفير وحدة المعالجة المركزية قريبة من وحدة فك التشفير. نحن نتعامل مع هذه المشكلة من زاويتين: أولاً ، نصف العديد من التقنيات لتسريع وحدة فك ترميز البحث عن شعاع NMT ، والتي تحصل على تسريع 4.4x عبر وحدة فك ترميز أساسية فعالة للغاية دون تغيير إخراج وحدة فك التشفير. ثانيًا ، نقترح بنية شبكة بسيطة ولكنها قوية تستخدم طبقة RNN (GRU / LSTM) في الأسفل ، متبوعة بسلسلة من الطبقات المكدسة المتصلة بالكامل المطبقة في كل خطوة. تحقق هذه البنية دقة مماثلة للنموذج المتكرر العميق ، بجزء صغير من تكلفة التدريب وفك التشفير. من خلال الجمع بين هذه التقنيات ، يحقق أفضل نظام لدينا دقة تنافسية للغاية تبلغ 38.3 BLEU على WMT English-French NewsTest2014 ، بينما يتم فك التشفير بسرعة 100 كلمة / ثانية على وحدة المعالجة المركزية ذات الخيط الفردي. نعتقد أن هذه هي أفضل مقايضة سرعة / دقة منشورة لنظام NMT.', 'pt': 'Os modelos atencionais de sequência a sequência tornaram-se o novo padrão para tradução automática, mas um desafio desses modelos é um aumento significativo no custo de treinamento e decodificação em comparação com sistemas baseados em frases. Neste trabalho, focamos na decodificação eficiente, com o objetivo de alcançar precisão próxima ao estado da arte em tradução automática neural (NMT), enquanto alcançamos velocidade/taxa de transferência de CPU próxima à de um decodificador frasal. Abordamos esse problema de dois ângulos: primeiro, descrevemos várias técnicas para acelerar um decodificador de busca de feixe NMT, que obtém uma aceleração de 4,4x em um decodificador de linha de base muito eficiente sem alterar a saída do decodificador. Em segundo lugar, propomos uma arquitetura de rede simples, mas poderosa, que usa uma camada RNN (GRU/LSTM) na parte inferior, seguida por uma série de camadas empilhadas totalmente conectadas aplicadas a cada passo de tempo. Essa arquitetura atinge precisão semelhante a um modelo recorrente profundo, com uma pequena fração do custo de treinamento e decodificação. Ao combinar essas técnicas, nosso melhor sistema alcança uma precisão muito competitiva de 38,3 BLEU no WMT English-French NewsTest2014, enquanto decodifica a 100 palavras/s em CPU single-thread. Acreditamos que esta seja a melhor relação precisão/velocidade publicada de um sistema NMT.', 'fr': "Les modèles de séquence à séquence attentionnels sont devenus la nouvelle norme pour la traduction automatique, mais l'un des défis de ces modèles est l'augmentation significative des coûts de formation et de décodage par rapport aux systèmes basés sur des phrases. Dans ce travail, nous nous concentrons sur un décodage efficace, dans le but d'atteindre une précision proche de la technologie de la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT), tout en atteignant une vitesse/un débit de décodage CPU proche de celui d'un décodeur phrasal. Nous abordons ce problème sous deux angles\xa0: Tout d'abord, nous décrivons plusieurs techniques pour accélérer un décodeur de recherche de faisceau NMT, qui permet d'obtenir une accélération de 4,4x par rapport à un décodeur de base très efficace sans modifier la sortie du décodeur. Ensuite, nous proposons une architecture réseau simple mais puissante qui utilise une couche RNN (GRU/LSTM) en bas, suivie d'une série de couches empilées entièrement connectées appliquées à chaque pas de temps. Cette architecture atteint une précision similaire à celle d'un modèle récurrent profond, pour une petite fraction du coût de formation et de décodage. En combinant ces techniques, notre meilleur système atteint une précision très compétitive de 38,3 BLEU sur WMT anglais-français NewsTest 2014, tout en décodant à 100 mots/sec sur un processeur mono-thread. Nous pensons qu'il s'agit du meilleur compromis précision/vitesse publié d'un système NMT.", 'es': 'Los modelos atencionales de secuencia a secuencia se han convertido en el nuevo estándar para la traducción automática, pero uno de los desafíos de estos modelos es un aumento significativo en los costos de capacitación y decodificación en comparación con los sistemas basados en frases. En este trabajo nos centramos en la decodificación eficiente, con el objetivo de lograr una precisión cercana al estado de la técnica de la traducción automática neuronal (NMT), al tiempo que se logra una velocidad/rendimiento de decodificación de CPU cercana a la de un decodificador phrasal. Abordamos este problema desde dos ángulos: primero, describimos varias técnicas para acelerar un decodificador de búsqueda de haces NMT, que obtienen una aceleración de 4,4x sobre un decodificador de línea base muy eficiente sin cambiar la salida del decodificador. En segundo lugar, proponemos una arquitectura de red simple pero potente que utiliza una capa RNN (GRU/LSTM) en la parte inferior, seguida de una serie de capas apiladas totalmente conectadas que se aplican en cada paso de tiempo. Esta arquitectura logra una precisión similar a la de un modelo recurrente profundo, a una pequeña fracción del costo de capacitación y decodificación. Al combinar estas técnicas, nuestro mejor sistema logra una precisión muy competitiva de 38.3 BLEU en WMT inglés-francés NewsTest2014, mientras que decodifica a 100 palabras/segundo en CPU de un solo subproceso. Creemos que esta es la mejor compensación de precisión/velocidad publicada de un sistema NMT.', 'ja': '注意深いシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルは、機械翻訳の新しい標準となっていますが、そのようなモデルの課題の1つは、フレーズベースのシステムと比較して、トレーニングとデコードのコストが大幅に増加することです。 この作業では、効率的なデコードに焦点を当て、最先端のニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）の精度を達成すると同時に、CPUのデコード速度/スループットをフレーサルデコーダに近づけることを目標としています。 この問題を2つの角度からアプローチします。まず、NMTビーム検索デコーダを高速化するためのいくつかの技術について説明します。この技術は、デコーダ出力を変更することなく、非常に効率的なベースラインデコーダ上で4.4倍のスピードアップを得ます。 第二に、下部にRNN （ GRU/LSTM ）レイヤーを使用し、その後にすべてのタイムステップで適用される一連のスタックされた完全接続レイヤーを使用する、シンプルでありながら強力なネットワークアーキテクチャを提案します。 このアーキテクチャは、訓練および復号化コストのわずかな部分で、深い反復モデルと同様の精度を達成します。 これらの技術を組み合わせることで、当社の最高のシステムは、シングルスレッドCPUで100ワード/秒でデコードしながら、WMT英仏NewsTest 2014で38.3 BLEUという非常に競争力のある精度を実現します。 これは、NMTシステムの最高の公表された精度/速度のトレードオフであると考えています。', 'zh': '注意序成机器翻译之新准,而比之于短语统,此一挑战,训练解码成本显增也。 注意于高效解码,近先进之神经机器翻译(NMT)准确性,兼近短语解码器之CPU解码/吞吐量。 先言数速NMT波束索解码器之术,不变解码器输,倍之基线解码器4.4。 其次,吾言简而功能强大网络架构,其底用RNN(GRU / LSTM)层,然后每时步长以一系叠者全接之。 此架构得与循环相似之精,但练解码成本之小者也。 合此术者,至统于WMT英语 - 法语NewsTest201438.3 BLEU者极有竞争力之精,而于单线程CPU上以100字/秒之速解码。 信是NMT系统上精度/速度权衡。', 'hi': 'ध्यान देने योग्य अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए नया मानक बन गए हैं, लेकिन इस तरह के मॉडल की एक चुनौती वाक्यांश-आधारित प्रणालियों की तुलना में प्रशिक्षण और डिकोडिंग लागत में महत्वपूर्ण वृद्धि है। इस काम में हम कुशल डिकोडिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, सटीकता प्राप्त करने के लक्ष्य के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) में अत्याधुनिक को बंद कर देते हैं, जबकि सीपीयू डिकोडिंग गति / थ्रूपुट प्राप्त करते हुए एक फ्रैसल डिकोडर के करीब। हम इस समस्या को दो कोणों से देखते हैं: सबसे पहले, हम एक एनएमटी बीम खोज विकोडक को तेज करने के लिए कई तकनीकों का वर्णन करते हैं, जो विकोडक आउटपुट को बदलने के बिना एक बहुत ही कुशल बेसलाइन डिकोडर पर 4.4x स्पीडअप प्राप्त करते हैं। दूसरा, हम एक सरल लेकिन शक्तिशाली नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो नीचे एक आरएनएन (जीआरयू / एलएसटीएम) परत का उपयोग करता है, इसके बाद हर टाइमस्टेप पर लागू स्टैक्ड पूरी तरह से जुड़ी परतों की एक श्रृंखला होती है। यह वास्तुकला प्रशिक्षण और डिकोडिंग लागत के एक छोटे से अंश पर, एक गहरे आवर्तक मॉडल के समान सटीकता प्राप्त करती है। इन तकनीकों के संयोजन से, हमारी सबसे अच्छी प्रणाली WMT अंग्रेजी-फ्रेंच NewsTest2014 पर 38.3 BLEU की एक बहुत ही प्रतिस्पर्धी सटीकता प्राप्त करती है, जबकि एकल-थ्रेडेड सीपीयू पर 100 शब्दों / सेकंड पर डिकोडिंग करती है। हमारा मानना है कि यह एक एनएमटी प्रणाली का सबसे अच्छा प्रकाशित सटीकता / गति ट्रेड-ऑफ है।', 'ru': 'Внимательные модели последовательности стали новым стандартом для машинного перевода, но одна из проблем таких моделей заключается в значительном увеличении стоимости обучения и декодирования по сравнению с фразеологическими системами. В этой работе мы фокусируемся на эффективном декодировании с целью достижения точности, близкой к самой современной в области нейронного машинного перевода (НМП), при достижении скорости/пропускной способности ЦП декодирования, близкой к скорости/пропускной способности фразеологического декодера. Мы подходим к этой проблеме под двумя углами зрения: во-первых, мы описываем несколько методов ускорения дешифратора для поиска луча NMT, которые получают ускорение в 4,4 раза по сравнению с очень эффективным базовым декодером без изменения выхода декодера. Во-вторых, мы предлагаем простую, но мощную сетевую архитектуру, которая использует слой RNN (GRU/LSTM) внизу, за которым следует ряд стековых полностью соединенных слоев, применяемых на каждом временном шаге. Эта архитектура обеспечивает точность, аналогичную глубинной повторяющейся модели, при небольшой доле затрат на обучение и декодирование. Объединяя эти методы, наша лучшая система достигает очень конкурентоспособной точности 38,3 BLEU на WMT English-French NewsTest2014, при этом декодируя на однопоточном ЦП со скоростью 100 слов/сек. Мы считаем, что это наилучший из опубликованных компромиссов между точностью и скоростью системы НМТ.', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh aireach anois mar an gcaighdeán nua le haghaidh aistriúcháin mheaisín, ach dúshlán amháin a bhaineann le samhlacha den sórt sin is ea méadú suntasach ar an gcostas oiliúna agus díchódaithe i gcomparáid le córais frása-bhunaithe. San obair seo dírímid ar dhíchódú éifeachtach, agus é mar sprioc againn cruinneas a bhaint amach an úrscothacht i néaraistriúchán meaisín (NMT) a dhúnadh, agus luas díchódaithe LAP/tréchur a bhaint amach gar do dhíchódóir phrasal. Déileálaimid leis an bhfadhb seo ó dhá uillinn: Ar dtús, déanaimid cur síos ar theicnící éagsúla chun díchódóir cuardaigh le léas NMT a bhrostú, a fhaigheann luasghéarú 4.4x thar dhíchódóir bunlíne an-éifeachtach gan aschur an díchódóra a athrú. Ar an dara dul síos, molaimid ailtireacht líonra shimplí ach chumhachtach a úsáideann ciseal RNN (GRU/LSTM) ag bun an leathanaigh, agus ina dhiaidh sin sraith de shraitheanna lán-nasctha cruachta a chuirtear i bhfeidhm gach céim ama. Baineann an ailtireacht seo amach cruinneas cosúil le múnla athfhillteach domhain, ag codán beag den chostas oiliúna agus díchódaithe. Trí na teicníochtaí seo a chomhcheangal, sroicheann ár gcóras is fearr cruinneas an-iomaíoch de 38.3 BLEU ar WMT English-French NewsTest2014, agus é á dhíchódú ag 100 focal/soicind ar LAP aon-snáithe. Creidimid gurb é seo an cruinneas/comhbhabhtáil luais is fearr de chóras NMT.', 'hu': 'A gépi fordítás új szabványává váltak a figyelemmel kísért szekvenciák modellei, de az ilyen modellek egyik kihívása a képzési és dekódolási költségek jelentős növekedése a kifejezésalapú rendszerekhez képest. Ebben a munkában a hatékony dekódolásra összpontosítunk, azzal a céllal, hogy a neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) legkorszerűbb pontosságát közelítsük el, miközben a processzor dekódolási sebességét/átviteli sebességét elérjük a phraszal dekóderhez közel. Két szögből közelítjük meg ezt a problémát: Először is számos olyan technikát írunk le, amelyek felgyorsítják az NMT sugárkereső dekódolót, amelyek egy nagyon hatékony alapkódoló dekódolónál 4,4x gyorsulást érnek el anélkül, hogy megváltoztatnák a dekóder kimenetet. Másodszor, egy egyszerű, de erőteljes hálózati architektúrát javasolunk, amely alján RNN (GRU/LSTM) réteget használ, majd egy sor halmozott, teljesen összekapcsolt réteget alkalmaz minden időlépésben. Ez az architektúra hasonló pontosságot ér el egy mély visszatérő modellhez, a képzési és dekódolási költségek kis töredékével. Ezen technikák kombinációjával a legjobb rendszerünk nagyon versenyképes pontosságot ér el a WMT angol-francia NewsTest2014-en, miközben 100 szó/mp dekódolás egyszálú CPU-n. Úgy véljük, hogy ez a legjobb közzétett pontosság/sebesség kereskedelme egy NMT rendszer esetében.', 'it': "I modelli sequenziali attenti sono diventati il nuovo standard per la traduzione automatica, ma una delle sfide di tali modelli è un aumento significativo dei costi di formazione e decodifica rispetto ai sistemi basati su frasi. In questo lavoro ci concentriamo sulla decodifica efficiente, con l'obiettivo di raggiungere una precisione vicina allo stato dell'arte nella traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), raggiungendo velocità di decodifica CPU / throughput vicino a quella di un decoder frasale. Approfondiamo questo problema da due angolazioni: in primo luogo, descriviamo diverse tecniche per accelerare un decoder NMT beam search, che ottengono una velocità di 4,4x su un decoder base molto efficiente senza modificare l'output del decoder. In secondo luogo, proponiamo un'architettura di rete semplice ma potente che utilizza un livello RNN (GRU/LSTM) in basso, seguito da una serie di livelli sovrapposti completamente connessi applicati in ogni momento. Questa architettura raggiunge una precisione simile a un modello ricorrente profondo, ad una piccola frazione del costo di formazione e decodifica. Combinando queste tecniche, il nostro sistema migliore raggiunge una precisione molto competitiva di 38,3 BLEU su WMT inglese-francese NewsTest2014, mentre decodifica a 100 parole/sec su CPU single-thread. Crediamo che questo sia il miglior compromesso di precisione/velocità pubblicato di un sistema NMT.", 'ka': 'ატრუნციონალური მოდელები მოდელების შემდეგ ახალი სტანდარტულებაში გახდა, მაგრამ ასეთი მოდელების ერთი გამოცდილობა იყო მნიშვნელოვანი განაკეთება და განაკეთება სისტემის შემდეგ. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ვფიქრდებით ევკოდირებაზე, მიზეზით წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენა ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელებაში (NMT), როცა CPU წარმოდგენის სიჩქარე/გახსნა ფრაზალური ევკოდირების გადარ ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას ორი კუთხედან დავწყებთ: პირველი, ჩვენ განახსენებთ რამდენიმე ტექნოგიები NMT სინახლეების ძალიან ეფექტიური ფექტიური განახსენების განახსენებისთვის, რომელიც 4.4x სინახლე მეორე, ჩვენ ვაპირებთ საუკეთესო, მაგრამ ძალიან ქსელის აქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც გამოყენებს RNN (GRU/LSTM) ნაწილის ქვემოთ, შემდეგ ყველა დროში დაკავშირებული ნაწილის სერი ეს არქტიქტიკური მიიღება განსხვავებული სიმართლე რეკურენტური მოდელზე, რომელიც განსხვავებული და განსხვავებული სიმართლეების პატარა ნაწილად. ამ ტექნექციების შეერთებით, ჩვენი უკეთესი სისტემა 38.3 BLEU-ის კონპექტიური წარმოდგენა WMT ინგლისურ-ფრანგური ნუზეტესტესტი 2014-ში, როდესაც 100 სიტყვებით/სივდილით ერთ-ერთი CPU- ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ ეს არის ყველაზე საუკეთესო პრობლეულებული სისტემა NMT სისტემა.', 'el': 'Τα προσεχτικά μοντέλα ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας έχουν γίνει το νέο πρότυπο για τη μηχανική μετάφραση, αλλά μια πρόκληση αυτών των μοντέλων είναι η σημαντική αύξηση του κόστους κατάρτισης και αποκωδικοποίησης σε σύγκριση με τα συστήματα που βασίζονται σε φράσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία εστιάζουμε στην αποτελεσματική αποκωδικοποίηση, με στόχο την επίτευξη ακρίβειας που να πλησιάζει την τελευταία λέξη της τεχνολογίας στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (ενώ επιτυγχάνεται ταχύτητα/απόδοση αποκωδικοποίησης CPU κοντά σε αυτή ενός αποκωδικοποιητή φράσεων. Προσεγγίζουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα από δύο γωνίες: Πρώτον, περιγράφουμε διάφορες τεχνικές για την επιτάχυνση ενός αποκωδικοποιητή αναζήτησης ακτίνων οι οποίες επιτυγχάνουν 4,4fache επιτάχυνση πάνω από έναν πολύ αποδοτικό αποκωδικοποιητή βάσης χωρίς αλλαγή της εξόδου αποκωδικοποιητή. Δεύτερον, προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά ισχυρή αρχιτεκτονική δικτύου που χρησιμοποιεί ένα στρώμα στο κάτω μέρος, ακολουθούμενο από μια σειρά στοιβαγμένων πλήρως συνδεδεμένων στρωμάτων που εφαρμόζονται σε κάθε χρονικό βήμα. Αυτή η αρχιτεκτονική επιτυγχάνει παρόμοια ακρίβεια με ένα βαθύ επαναλαμβανόμενο μοντέλο, σε ένα μικρό κλάσμα του κόστους εκπαίδευσης και αποκωδικοποίησης. Συνδυάζοντας αυτές τις τεχνικές, το καλύτερο σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει μια πολύ ανταγωνιστική ακρίβεια 38.3 σε Αγγλικά-Γαλλικά NewsTest2014, ενώ αποκωδικοποιεί σε 100 λέξεις/δευτερόλεπτο σε ενιαία κλωστή CPU. Πιστεύουμε ότι αυτή είναι η καλύτερη δημοσιευμένη ανταλλαγή ακρίβειας/ταχύτητας ενός συστήματος NMT.', 'kk': 'Қатысушылық реттеу үлгілері машина аудару үшін жаңа стандарт болды, бірақ бұл үлгілердің бір мәселесі - сөздерді негіздеген жүйелерімен салыстырып, оқу және декодтау бағаларын өзгерту және Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз эффективті декодтациялауға көмектесеміз, невралдық компьютердің аудармасының (NMT) күйін жабу мақсатымен, процессордың декодтациялауының жылдамдығын/көмектесуді жеткізу мақсатымен. Біз осы мәселеге екі бұрыштан келеміз: Біріншіден, NMT жұлдыз іздеу декодерін жылдыру үшін бірнеше техникаларды таңдаймыз. Бұл декодердің шығысын өзгертпей, 4.4x деңгейін ең эффективні негізгі деко Екіншіден, бұл желінің астында RNN (GRU/LSTM) қабатты қолданатын қарапайым, бірақ күшті желінің архитектурасын таңдаймыз. Бұл кезде әрбір уақытта қолданылатын толық қосылған қабаттар тіз Бұл архитектура қайталану үлгісіне ұқсас тәртіпке жеткізеді, оқыту мен декодтау бағаларының кішкентай бөлігімен. Бұл техникаларды біріктіру арқылы, біздің ең жақсы жүйеміз WMT ағылшын- французша NewsTest2014 жұмыс ішінде 38,3 BLEU деңгейіндегі деңгейінде 100 сөз/ сек деңгейіндегі процессорды деңгейінде жеткізеді. Бұл NMT жүйесінің ең жақсы дұрыс/жылдамдығын шығаруға сенеміз.', 'lt': 'Atsargūs sekos po sekos modeliai tapo nauju vertimo mašinomis standartu, tačiau vienas iš tokių modelių iššūkių yra didelis mokymo ir dekodinimo išlaidų padidėjimas, palyginti su frazėmis pagrįstomis sistemomis. Šiame darbe daugiausia dėmesio skiriame veiksmingam dekodiavimui, siekiant tikslumo uždaryti pažangiausią nervinių mašin ų vertimo (NMT) tikslumą ir kartu pasiekti CPU dekodiavimo greitį ir (arba) pralaidą, artimą frazės dekodifikatoriaus greičiui. Šią problem ą sprendžiame iš dviejų kampų: pirma, apibūdiname kelis metodus, kaip pagreitinti NMT spindulių paieškos dekoderį, kuris gauna 4,4 karto greitį per labai veiksmingą pradinį dekoderį nekeičiant dekoderio išėjimo. Second, we propose a simple but powerful network architecture which uses an RNN (GRU/LSTM) layer at bottom, followed by a series of stacked fully-connected layers applied at every timestep.  Ši architektūra pasiekia panašų tikslumą kaip gilus pasikartojantis modelis, maža mokymo ir dekodinimo išlaidų dalis. Suderindami šiuos metodus, mūsų geriausia sistema užtikrina 38,3 BLEU konkurencinį tikslumą WMT English-French NewsTest2014, o vienos srovės CPU – 100 žodžių per sekundę. Manome, kad tai geriausias paskelbtas NMT sistemos tikslumas ir greitis.', 'mk': 'Внимателните модели од секвенца до секвенца станаа новиот стандард за машински превод, но еден предизвик на ваквите модели е значително зголемување на трошоците за обука и декодирање во споредба со системите базирани на фрази. Во оваа работа се фокусираме на ефикасното декодирање, со цел да постигнеме прецизност затворање на најновата технологија во преводот на невројалните машини (НМТ), додека постигнеме брзина/проход на декодирање на процесорот блиску до онаа на фразалниот декодирач. We approach this problem from two angles: First, we describe several techniques for speeding up an NMT beam search decoder, which obtain a 4.4x speedup over a very efficient baseline decoder without changing the decoder output.  Второ, предложуваме едноставна, но моќна мрежна архитектура која користи RNN (GRU/LSTM) слој на дното, по која следи серија на сосема поврзани слоеви кои се применуваат секој пат. Оваа архитектура постигнува слична точност како длабоко рецидентен модел, со мал дел од цената на обуката и декодирањето. Со комбинацијата на овие техники, нашиот најдобар систем постигнува многу конкурентна точност од 38,3 БЛЕУ на WMT English-French NewsTest2014, додека декодира на 100 зборови/секунда на едножичен процесор. Веруваме дека ова е најдобрата објавена точност/размена на брзината на НМТ системот.', 'ms': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan perhatian telah menjadi piawai baru untuk terjemahan mesin, tetapi satu cabaran bagi model tersebut adalah peningkatan yang signifikan dalam latihan dan pengkodan kosong dibandingkan dengan sistem berdasarkan frasa. Dalam kerja ini, kami fokus pada penyahkodan efisien, dengan tujuan untuk mencapai ketepatan menutup keadaan-state-of-the-art dalam terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT), sementara mencapai kelajuan/laluan penyahkodan CPU yang dekat dengan pengekod frasa. Kita mendekati masalah ini dari dua sudut: pertama, kita menggambarkan beberapa teknik untuk mempercepat dekoder carian cahaya NMT, yang mendapat 4.4x kelajuan atas dekoder asas yang sangat efisien tanpa mengubah output dekoder. Kedua, kami cadangkan arkitektur rangkaian yang mudah tetapi berkuasa yang menggunakan lapisan RNN (GRU/LSTM) di bawah, diikuti oleh siri lapisan terkumpul yang tersambung sepenuhnya dilaksanakan setiap langkah masa. Arkitektur ini mencapai ketepatan yang sama dengan model berulang yang mendalam, dengan pecahan kecil dari kos latihan dan penyahkodan. Dengan menggabungkan teknik-teknik ini, sistem terbaik kita mencapai ketepatan yang sangat kompetitif 38.3 BLEU pada WMT English-French NewsTest2014, sementara menyahkod pada 100 perkataan/saat pada CPU dengan benang tunggal. Kami percaya ini adalah akurasi terbaik diterbitkan/perdagangan kelajuan sistem NMT.', 'ml': 'മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള പുതിയ മാതൃകങ്ങളായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ഇത്തരം മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യാലോചനം പരിശീലനത്തിലും വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സിസ്റ്റ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സുരക്ഷിതമായ ഡികോഡിങ്ങിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു, ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സിപിയുവിന്റെ വേഗത്തില്\u200d/വാക്ക്  നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു കോണ്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ പ്രശ്നം അടുത്തെത്തുന്നു. ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു NMT ബീമ് തെരച്ചില്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡിറ്റ് മാറ്റാതെ വേഗത്തിലേക്ക് പല ടെക്കിനി Second, we propose a simple but powerful network architecture which uses an RNN (GRU/LSTM) layer at bottom, followed by a series of stacked fully-connected layers applied at every timestep.  ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെയും കോഡിങ്ങിന്റെയും ചെറിയ ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ആഴത്തെ തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന മോഡലിന് ഈ സാങ്കേതികങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വ്യുഎംടി ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഫ്രെഞ്ച് നേവ്സ്ട്രെസ്റ്റ് 2014-ല്\u200d 38 നമ്മള്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നത് ഇതാണ് NMT സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല വേഗത്തിലുള്ള വ്യാപാരം/വേഗത്തിലുള', 'pl': 'Uważne modele sekwencji-sekwencji stały się nowym standardem tłumaczenia maszynowego, ale jednym z wyzwań takich modeli jest znaczny wzrost kosztów szkolenia i dekodowania w porównaniu z systemami opartymi na frazach. W niniejszej pracy koncentrujemy się na efektywnym dekodowaniu, mającym na celu osiągnięcie dokładności bliskiej najnowocześniejszej w neuronowym translacji maszynowym (NMT), przy jednoczesnym osiągnięciu szybkości/przepustowości dekodowania procesora zbliżonej do dekodera frazałowego. Podchodzimy do tego problemu z dwóch kątów: Po pierwsze, opisujemy kilka technik przyspieszenia dekodera wiązki NMT, które uzyskują 4,4x przyspieszenie nad bardzo wydajnym dekoderem bazowym bez zmiany wyjścia dekodera. Po drugie, proponujemy prostą, ale potężną architekturę sieci, która wykorzystuje warstwę RNN (GRU/LSTM) u dołu, a następnie serię układanych w pełni połączonych warstw stosowanych na każdym kroku czasu. Architektura ta zapewnia podobną dokładność do głębokiego modelu powtarzającego, przy niewielkim ułameku kosztów szkolenia i dekodowania. Łącząc te techniki, nasz najlepszy system osiąga bardzo konkurencyjną dokładność 38.3 BLEU na WMT angielsko-francuskim NewsTest2014, jednocześnie dekodowanie 100 słów/sek na jednowątkowym procesorze. Uważamy, że jest to najlepszy opublikowany kompromis dokładności/szybkości systemu NMT.', 'mn': 'Хэрэв сонирхолтой дарааллын загварууд машины орчуулалтын шинэ стандарт болж байна. Гэхдээ ийм загваруудын нэг сорилт нь дасгал хөдөлгөөн, үнэ цэнэтэй системтэй харьцуулахад үнэ цэнэтэй нэмэгдүүлэлт юм. Энэ ажлын тулд бид үр дүнтэй загвар шилжүүлэх зорилго дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулж, мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулах зорилго дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид энэ асуудлыг хоёр өнцөгээс ойртож байна: Эхлээд, бид NMT хайлтын шийдвэрлэгчийг хурдан хурдан тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь 4.4x хурдаар бүтээмжтэй суурь шугамны шийдвэрлэгчийг өөрчлөгдсөн маш үр дүнтэй суурь шугамны шийдвэ Хоёр дахь, бид энгийн, хүчтэй сүлжээний архитектурыг суурилуулдаг. Энэ нь ДНХ (GRU/LSTM) давхарга ашигладаг. Энэ архитектур дахин дахин давтагдах загвартай адилхан тодорхойлолтой байдаг. Боловсрол болон загварын жижиг хэсэгт. Энэ техникуудыг нэгтгэхэд хамгийн шилдэг систем WMT Англи-Француз NewsTest2014 онд 38.3 BLEU-ын зөв байдал гарч ирнэ. Гэхдээ 100 үг/секунд ганц CPU-д хуваалцдаг. Бид үүнийг NMT системийн хамгийн сайн нийтлэгдсэн тодорхойлолт/хурдан худалдааны алдаа гэдэгт итгэдэг.', 'no': 'Attentional sequence-to-sequence models have become the new standard for machine translation, but one challenge of such models is a significant increase in training and decoding cost compared to phrase-based systems. I denne arbeida fokuserer vi på effektivt dekoding, med eit mål om å nå nøyaktighet lukka kunsttilstanden i omsetjinga av neiralmaskina (NMT), mens prosessoren gjer dekoding av fart/gjennomsetjing nøyaktig til eit frasaldekoder. Vi nærmer dette problemet frå to vinkler: Først beskriver vi fleire teknikkar for å raske opp eit NMT- søkdekoder, som får ein 4. 4x rask over ein veldig effektivt baselinje- dekoder utan å endra dekoderutdata. Andre, vi foreslår ein enkel, men kraftig nettverksarkitektur som brukar ein RNN (GRU/LSTM) lag nedanfor, etterfulgt av ei serie av stakkerte fullstendig tilkopla lag som vert brukt på kvar tidsstrekk. Denne arkitekturen oppnår liknande nøyaktighet til ein dyp gjentakingsmodul, ved ein liten brøk av øvinga og dekoderkostnaden. Ved å kombinere desse teknikkene, har vårt beste system oppnådd ein svært konkurrentivt nøyaktig av 38,3 BLEU på WMT-engelsk-fransk NewsTest2014, mens det dekoderer med 100 ord/sekund på enkelt tråd CPU. Vi tror at dette er den beste utgjevne nøyaktigheten/fartstrykk av eit NMT-system.', 'ro': 'Modelele secvență-la-secvență atențională au devenit noul standard pentru traducerea automată, însă o provocare a acestor modele este o creștere semnificativă a costurilor de formare și decodare în comparație cu sistemele bazate pe fraze. În această lucrare ne concentrăm pe decodarea eficientă, cu scopul de a obține o precizie aproape de cea mai modernă în traducerea automată neurală (NMT), obținând în același timp o viteză / throughput de decodare CPU aproape de cea a unui decodor frazal. Abordăm această problemă din două unghiuri: În primul rând, descriem mai multe tehnici pentru accelerarea unui decodor de căutare a fasciculului NMT, care obțin o viteză de 4,4x peste un decodor de bază foarte eficient, fără a schimba ieșirea decodorului. În al doilea rând, propunem o arhitectură de rețea simplă, dar puternică, care utilizează un strat RNN (GRU/LSTM) în partea de jos, urmat de o serie de straturi stivuite complet conectate aplicate la fiecare pas. Această arhitectură obține o precizie similară cu un model recurent profund, la o mică fracțiune din costul de instruire și decodare. Prin combinarea acestor tehnici, cel mai bun sistem al nostru atinge o precizie foarte competitivă de 38,3 BLEU pe WMT engleză-franceză NewsTest2014, în timp ce decodarea la 100 de cuvinte/sec pe procesor cu un singur filet. Considerăm că acesta este cel mai bun schimb de precizie/viteză publicat al unui sistem NMT.', 'sr': 'Pozorni modeli sekvencije do sekvence postali su novi standard za prevod mašine, ali jedan izazov takvih modela je značajan povećanje troškova obuke i dekodiranja u usporedbi sa sistemima baziranim na frazi. U ovom poslu se fokusiramo na efikasno dekodiranje, sa ciljem ostvarivanja tačnosti zatvaranja stanja umjetnosti u prevodu neuralnih mašin a (NMT), dok postignemo CPU dekodiranje brzine/prošlosti blizu onog frazalnog dekodiranja. Približavamo se ovom problemu iz dva ugla: Prvo, opisujemo nekoliko tehnika za ubrzanje dekodera pretraživanja zraka NMT-a, koji dobija brzinu od 4,4x preko veoma efikasnog početnog dekodera bez promjene izlaza dekodera. Drugo, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali moćnu mrežnu arhitekturu koja koristi sloj RNN (GRU/LSTM) na dnu, slijedeći serijom kompletno povezanih slojeva koji se primjenjuju na svakom vremenskom koraku. Ova arhitektura postiže sličnu tačnost dubokom ponavljajućem modelu, na malom dijelu troškova obuke i dekodiranja. Kombinujući te tehnike, naš najbolji sistem postiže veoma konkurentnu tačnost od 38,3 BLEU na WMT engleskom-francuskom NewsTest2014, dok se dekodira na 100 reči/sekundi na jednostavnom CPU. Vjerujemo da je ovo najbolja objavljena preciznost/brzina trgovina NMT-ovog sistema.', 'si': 'අවධානය ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා අළුත් ප්\u200dරමාණය පද්ධතිය සඳහා අලුත් ප්\u200dරමාණය වෙලා තියෙනවා, නමුත් මෙම ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරම මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වික්\u200dරියාත්මක වික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ඉලක්කයක් තියෙන්නේ, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් (NMT) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වික්\u200dර අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්නවා: මුලින්, අපි NMT බීම් සොයාගැනීමේ ඩිකොඩර් වේගයක් වැඩ කරන්න විදිහක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඒක 4.4x දෙවෙනියි, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය නමුත් ශක්තිමත් ජාලය සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම RNN (GRU/LSTM) ස්ථානයක් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙ මේ ස්ථාපනය සමාන විශේෂතාවක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වගේ සිද්ධතාවක් ලැබෙනවා, ප්\u200dරධානය සහ සංකේෂණය සඳහ අපේ හොඳම පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විදියට, WMT ඉංග්\u200dරේන්ස්-ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් නියුස්ටේස්ට් 2014 වලින් 100 වලින් සෙක්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදි අපි විශ්වාස කරනවා මේක NMT පද්ධතියේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරකාශනය/වේගයක් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් කියලා.', 'so': 'Tusaalada xilliga-xilliga waxay noqdeen kaar cusub ee turjumidda mashiinka, laakiin mid ka mid ah qaababka modelladan waa mid aad u kordhiya barashada iyo kharashka deynta oo la barbaranayo nidaamka rasmiga ah. In this work we focus on efficient decoding, with a goal of achieving accuracy close the state-of-the-art in neural machine translation (NMT), while achieving CPU decoding speed/throughput close to that of a phrasal decoder.  Waxaynu dhibaatadan uga soo dhowaynaa laba malag: Marka hore, waxaynu tilmaamaynaa qaabab badan oo aad u dhaqdhaqaaqno qoraal raadinta NMT ah, kaasoo helaya 4.4x oo ka sii kordhaya qorshaha hoose-dhigka oo faa’iido leh oo a an beddelin dhamaadka. Second, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa sahlan laakiin xoog badan urur shabakad ah oo isticmaalaya RNN (GRU/LSTM) xarunta hoose, waxaana soo raacaynaa koox xarumo ah oo lagu xiriiray dhammaan marmar walba lagu codsaday. Tirkirkan wuxuu gaadhaa saxda la mid ah, tusaale ahaan oo aad u soo socda, qeyb yar oo ka mid ah waxbarashada iyo kharashka deynta. Isticmaalyadan, nidaamkan ugu wanaagsan wuxuu gaadhaa saxda aad u adag oo 38.3 BLEU ku saabsan WMT Ingiriis-Faraansiis NewsTest2014, iyadoo lagu qorayo 100 hadal/sec oo kali ah CPU. Waxaynu aaminsanahay in tan ugu wanaagsan ee la soo daabacay saxda/badbaadada ganacsiga NMT.', 'sv': 'Modeller med noggrann sekvens-till-sekvens har blivit den nya standarden för maskinöversättning, men en utmaning med sådana modeller är en betydande ökning av utbildnings- och avkodningskostnaderna jämfört med frasbaserade system. I detta arbete fokuserar vi på effektiv avkodning, med målet att uppnå noggrannhet nära state-of-the-art inom neural machine translation (NMT), samtidigt som CPU avkodning hastighet / genomströmning nära en frasal dekoder. Vi närmar oss detta problem från två vinklar: Först beskriver vi flera tekniker för att påskynda en NMT-stråle sökavkodare, som får en 4,4x hastighet över en mycket effektiv baslinjeavkodare utan att ändra avkodarens utgång. För det andra föreslår vi en enkel men kraftfull nätverksarkitektur som använder ett RNN-lager (GRU/LSTM) längst ner, följt av en serie staplade fullt anslutna lager som appliceras vid varje tidsteg. Denna arkitektur uppnår liknande noggrannhet som en djup återkommande modell, till en liten bråkdel av utbildnings- och avkodningskostnaden. Genom att kombinera dessa tekniker uppnår vårt bästa system en mycket konkurrenskraftig noggrannhet på 38,3 BLEU på WMT engelsk-franska NewsTest2014, medan avkodning vid 100 ord/sek på entrådig processor. Vi anser att detta är den bästa publicerade noggrannheten/hastigheten av ett NMT-system.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza ta’ attenzjoni saru l-istandard il-ġdid għat-traduzzjoni bil-magna, iżda sfida waħda minn dawn il-mudelli hija żieda sinifikanti fl-ispejjeż tat-taħriġ u tad-dekodifikazzjoni meta mqabbla mas-sistemi bbażati fuq il-frażi. F’din il-ħidma niffokaw fuq id-dekodifikazzjoni effiċjenti, bil-għan li tinkiseb preċiżjoni tagħlaq l-aktar avvanzata fit-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT), filwaqt li niksbu l-veloċità/il-fluss tad-dekodifikazzjoni tas-CPU qrib dik ta’ dekodifikatur frażali. Aħna nindirizzaw din il-problem a minn żewġ angoli: L-ewwel nett, a ħna niddeskrivu diversi tekniki biex inħaffu d-dekoder tat-tiftix tar-raġġ NMT, li jiksbu veloċità ta’ 4.4x fuq dekoder tal-linja bażi effiċjenti ħafna mingħajr ma nbidlu l-output tad-dekoder. It-tieni nett, nipproponu arkitettura tan-netwerk sempliċi iżda b’saħħitha li tuża saff ta’ RNN (GRU/LSTM) fil-qiegħ, segwit minn serje ta’ saffi stacked kompletament konnessi applikati f’kull pass ta’ żmien. Din l-arkitettura tikseb preċiżjoni simili għal mudell rikorrenti profond, bi frazzjoni żgħira tal-ispiża tat-taħriġ u tad-dekodifikazzjoni. Permezz tal-kombinazzjoni ta’ dawn it-tekniki, l-a ħjar sistema tagħna tikseb preċiżjoni kompetittiva ħafna ta’ 38.3 BLEU fuq WMT English-French NewsTest2014, filwaqt li tiddekodifika b’100 kelma/sekonda fuq CPU b’wajer wieħed. Aħna nemmnu li dan huwa l-aħjar korrettezza/kompromess ippubblikat ta’ sistema NMT.', 'ta': 'கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கான புதிய இயல்பான மாதிரிகளாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆனால் இது மாதிரிகளில் ஒரு சவால் இந்த வேலையில் நாம் விரைவாக குறியீட்டை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம், ஒரு சொற்றொடர் குறியீட்டிற்கு அருகில் இருக்கும் போது, நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் சரியான சரி இரண்டு கோணங்களிலிருந்து நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை நெருங்குகிறோம்: முதலில், நாம் ஒரு NMT beam தேடு குறியீட்டை வேகமாக விவரிக்க பல தொழில்நுட்புகளை விவரிக் இரண்டாவது, நாம் ஒரு எளிய ஆனால் சக்தியுள்ள வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது கீழே ஒரு RNN (GRU/LSTM) அடுக்கை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, பின்னர்  இந்த உருவாக்கி ஒரு ஆழமான திரும்ப மாதிரியின் சரியான திட்டம் பெறுகிறது, பயிற்சி மற்றும் குறியீட்டு விலை சிறிய ப இந்த தொழில்நுட்பங்களை இணைத்து, எங்கள் சிறந்த அமைப்பு WMT ஆங்கிலத்தில்- பிரெஞ்சு செய்திகள் 2014 மீது 38.3 பிலியுவின் மிகவும் போராடியான சரித்திரத்தை  நாங்கள் நம்புகிறோம் இது ஒரு NMT முறைமையின் சரியான/வேகமான வணிக-off சிறந்த வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்டது என்று.', 'ur': 'مہینی ترجمہ کے لئے اچھا استاندارد ہوا ہے، لیکن ایسے موڈل کی ایک چال ہے کہ تطارین اور ڈیکوڈ کے مطابق مہینے کی سیستموں کے مقابلہ میں بہت اضافہ ہوتا ہے. اس کام میں ہم مفید ڈیکوڈینگ پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں، ایک مقصد کے ساتھ نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کی موقعیت کو بند کرنا چاہتے ہیں، جبکہ CPU ڈیکوڈینگ سرعت/عبارت ڈیکوڈر کے قریب ہوتے ہیں۔ ہم اس مسئلہ کو دو زاویے سے پہلے پہنچاتے ہیں: ہم نے NMT بیم تلاش ڈیکوڈر کی جلدی کرنے کے لئے بہت سی ٹیکنیکوں کو توصیح دیتے ہیں، جو ایک بہت اثبات بیس لین ڈیکوڈر پر 4.4x کی جلدی حاصل کرتی ہے بغیر ڈیکوڈر اپوٹٹ بدلنے کے۔ دوسرا، ہم ایک ساده لیکن طاقتور نیٹ ورک معماری پیشنهاد کریں جو نیچے RNN (GRU/LSTM) لائر کو استعمال کرتا ہے، اور اس کے پیچھے ہر ٹیموٹ سٹک پر کامل متصل لہروں کی ایک سری لہروں کی پیروی کرتی ہے۔ یہ معماری ایک عمیق دوبارہ ریکا موڈل کے مطابق سیدھی دقیق حاصل کرتی ہے، تعلیم اور ڈیکڈ کیسی قیمت کے ایک چھوٹے ٹکڑے سے۔ یہ تکنیک جمع کرنے کے ذریعہ، ہماری بہترین سیسٹم نے WMT انگلیسی-فرانسوی نیوسٹسٹ 2014 پر 38.3 بلیوس کی بہترین مساوی دقیق حاصل کی، حالانکہ ایک ٹریڈ سی پی یو پر 100 کلمات/ثانیه سے ڈکوڈ کرتا ہے. ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ یہ ایک NMT سیسٹم کے سب سے بہترین صحیح/سرعت تبلیغ ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu vazifani biz tasavvur qilamiz, neural mashinaning tarjima tarjima (NMT) holatini yopish maqsadiga foydalanamiz, va CPU soni kodlash orqali sozni ko'rib chiqarishda foydalanamiz. Biz bu muammolarni ikkita burchakdan qaramamiz: Birinchi, biz NMT beam qidirish kodvalini tezlashtirish uchun bir necha teknologizni anglatamiz, bu cheksiz natijani o'zgartirib yetishmaydigan 4.4x tezligini 4.4x tezlashtiradi. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz oddiy, elektron tarmoq arxituvchisi, buning pastida RNN (GRU/LSTM) qatlamni ishlatiladi, keyin har bir marta qoʻllangan qatlam qoʻllaniladi. Bu arxituvlar taʼminlovchi va kodlash qiymatidan bir kichkina qiymatiga ega bo'ladi. Bu teknikalarni birlashtirish bilan eng yaxshi tizimmiz WMT Ingliz- Fransuzcha NewsTest2014 (WMT-Fransuzcha NewsTest2014) bilan 38.3 BLEU juda rivojlanish imkoniyatini topadi, va bizning eng yuqori CPU bilan 100 сўз/sekundda ko'rdi. Biz ishonamiz bu NMT tizimning eng yaxshi tashkilotlari/tezlik tashkilotlari.", 'vi': 'Các mô- tơ-trình học tiến bộ đã trở thành tiêu chuẩn mới cho dịch-biến-máy, nhưng một thử thách của các mô-đun này là tăng đáng kể giá đào tạo và giải mã so với các hệ thống từ điển thành ngữ. Trong công việc này chúng tôi tập trung vào việc giải mã hiệu quả, với mục đích đạt được độ chính xác gần với mức độ chính xác cao nhất trong dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh (NMB) trong khi đạt được tốc độ giải mã bộ CPU gần với thiết bị giải mã từ. Chúng ta tiếp cận vấn đề này từ hai góc: Thứ nhất, chúng ta mô tả một vài kỹ thuật để tăng tốc độ tìm kiếm ở máy giải mã NMB, mà đạt được một tốc độ 4.44x vượt một thiết bị giải mã cực kỳ hiệu quả mà không thay đổi kết quả giải mã. Thứ hai, chúng tôi đề xuất một kiến trúc mạng đơn giản nhưng mạnh dùng lớp RNN (GRU/LSTM) phía dưới, theo sau là một chuỗi các lớp liên kết hoàn toàn xếp được áp dụng vào mỗi thời gian. Kiến trúc này đạt được độ chính xác tương tự với mô hình thường xuyên sâu, với một phần nhỏ của chi phí huấn luyện và giải mã. Kết hợp các kỹ thuật này, hệ thống tốt nhất của chúng ta đạt được độ chính xác cạnh tranh rất cao của 38.3 BleU on WRT English-French NewTestamen4, trong khi giải mã bằng 100 words/sec trên CPU đơn giản. Chúng tôi tin đây là hệ thống giao dịch nhanh và chính xác nhất của công chúng.', 'bg': 'Моделите от последователност към последователност на вниманието се превърнаха в нов стандарт за машинен превод, но едно от предизвикателствата на такива модели е значително увеличаване на разходите за обучение и декодиране в сравнение със системите, базирани на фрази. В тази работа се фокусираме върху ефективното декодиране, с цел постигане на точност да се доближи до най-съвременните технологии в невронния машинен превод (НМТ), като същевременно се постигне скорост/производителност на декодиране на процесора, близка до тази на фрасалния декодер. Ние подхождаме към този проблем от два ъгъла: Първо, описваме няколко техники за ускоряване на декодер за търсене на лъчи, които получават 4,4 пъти ускорение над много ефективен базов декодер, без да променят изхода на декодера. Второ, предлагаме проста, но мощна мрежова архитектура, която използва слой в долната част, последван от серия от подредени напълно свързани слоеве, прилагани по всяко време. Тази архитектура постига подобна точност на дълбоко повтарящия се модел, при малка част от разходите за обучение и декодиране. Комбинирайки тези техники, нашата най-добра система постига много конкурентна точност от 38.3 докато декодира със 100 думи/сек на еднорезбов процесор. Вярваме, че това е най-добрият публикуван компромис за точност/скорост на системата на НМТ.', 'hr': 'Pozorni modeli sekvence do sekvence postali su novi standard za prevod strojeva, ali jedan izazov takvih modela je značajan povećanje troškova obuke i dekodiranja u usporedbi s sustavima na osnovu fraza. U ovom poslu se fokusiramo na učinkovito dekodiranje, s ciljem ostvarivanja preciznosti zatvaranja stanja umjetnosti u prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT), dok postignemo CPU dekodiranje brzine/prošlosti blizu onog frazalnog dekodera. Približavamo se ovom problemu iz dva ugla: Prvo, opisujemo nekoliko tehnika za ubrzanje dekodera pretraživanja zraka NMT-a, koji dobija brzinu od 4,4x preko vrlo efikasnog početnog dekodera bez promjene izlaza dekodera. Drugo, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali moćnu mrežnu arhitekturu koja koristi sloj RNN (GRU/LSTM) na dnu, slijedeći serijom kompletno povezanih slojeva koji se primjenjuju na svakom vremenskom koraku. Ova arhitektura postiže sličnu to čnost dubokom ponavljajućem modelu, na malom dijelu troškova obuke i dekodiranja. Kombinirajući te tehnike, naš najbolji sustav postiže veoma konkurentnu preciznost od 38,3 BLEU na WMT engleskom-francuskom NewsTest2014, dok se dekodira na 100 riječi/sekundi na jedinstvenom procesoru. Vjerujemo da je ovo najbolja objavljena preciznost/brzina trgovina od NMT sustava.', 'nl': 'Attentieve sequence-to-sequence modellen zijn de nieuwe standaard voor machinevertaling geworden, maar een uitdaging van dergelijke modellen is een aanzienlijke stijging van de opleidings- en decoderingskosten in vergelijking met frase-based systemen. In dit werk richten we ons op efficiënte decodering, met als doel het bereiken van nauwkeurigheid dicht bij de state-of-the-art in neural machine translation (NMT), terwijl CPU decodering snelheid/doorvoer dicht bij die van een frasaldecoder. We benaderen dit probleem vanuit twee hoeken: Ten eerste beschrijven we verschillende technieken voor het versnellen van een NMT beam search decoder, die een 4,4x versnelling verkrijgen over een zeer efficiënte baseline decoder zonder de decoder output te veranderen. Ten tweede stellen we een eenvoudige maar krachtige netwerkarchitectuur voor die gebruik maakt van een RNN (GRU/LSTM) laag aan de onderkant, gevolgd door een reeks gestapelde volledig verbonden lagen die bij elke tijdsstap worden toegepast. Deze architectuur bereikt vergelijkbare nauwkeurigheid als een diep terugkerend model, tegen een kleine fractie van de training- en decoderingskosten. Door deze technieken te combineren, bereikt ons beste systeem een zeer concurrerende nauwkeurigheid van 38.3 BLEU op WMT Engels-Franse NewsTest2014, terwijl decodering op 100 woorden/sec op single-threaded CPU. Wij geloven dat dit de beste gepubliceerde nauwkeurigheid/snelheid compromis is van een NMT-systeem.', 'da': 'Attertionerede sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller er blevet den nye standard for maskinoversættelse, men en udfordring ved sådanne modeller er en betydelig stigning i uddannelses- og dekodningsomkostningerne i forhold til sætningsbaserede systemer. I dette arbejde fokuserer vi på effektiv afkodning, med det formål at opnå nøjagtighed tæt på state-of-the-art inden for neural machine translation (NMT), samtidig med at vi opnår CPU afkodningshastighed / gennemløb tæt på en phrasal dekoder. Vi nærmer os dette problem fra to vinkler: For det første beskriver vi flere teknikker til at fremskynde en NMT beam search dekoder, som opnår en 4,4x speed up over en meget effektiv baseline dekoder uden at ændre dekoderudgangen. For det andet foreslår vi en enkel, men kraftfuld netværksarkitektur, der bruger et RNN (GRU/LSTM) lag nederst, efterfulgt af en række stablede fuldt forbundne lag anvendt på hvert tidstrin. Denne arkitektur opnår samme nøjagtighed som en dyb tilbagevendende model til en lille brøkdel af uddannelses- og dekodningsomkostningerne. Ved at kombinere disse teknikker opnår vores bedste system en meget konkurrencedygtig nøjagtighed på 38,3 BLEU på WMT engelsk-fransk NewsTest2014, mens afkodning ved 100 ord/sek på single-threaded CPU. Vi mener, at dette er den bedste offentliggjorte præcision/hastighed trade-off af et NMT-system.', 'de': 'Sorgfältige Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modelle sind zum neuen Standard für die maschinelle Übersetzung geworden, aber eine Herausforderung solcher Modelle ist ein deutlicher Anstieg der Schulungs- und Dekodierungskosten im Vergleich zu phrasenbasierten Systemen. In dieser Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns auf effiziente Dekodierung, mit dem Ziel, Genauigkeit zu erreichen, die dem Stand der Technik in der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) entspricht, während CPU-Decodiergeschwindigkeit/Durchsatz nahe der eines Phrasal-Decoders erreicht wird. Wir nähern uns diesem Problem aus zwei Blickwinkeln: Erstens beschreiben wir verschiedene Techniken zur Beschleunigung eines NMT-Strahlsuchdekoders, die eine 4,4x Beschleunigung über einem sehr effizienten Baseline-Decoder erzielen, ohne den Decoder-Ausgang zu verändern. Zweitens schlagen wir eine einfache, aber leistungsstarke Netzwerkarchitektur vor, die unten eine RNN-Schicht (GRU/LSTM) verwendet, gefolgt von einer Reihe gestapelter, vollständig vernetzter Schichten, die zu jedem Zeitpunkt angewendet werden. Diese Architektur erreicht eine ähnliche Genauigkeit wie ein tiefes wiederkehrendes Modell zu einem kleinen Bruchteil der Schulungs- und Dekodierungskosten. Durch die Kombination dieser Techniken erreicht unser bestes System eine sehr wettbewerbsfähige Genauigkeit von 38.3 BLEU auf WMT Englisch-Französisch NewsTest2014, während die Dekodierung mit 100 Wörter/Sek auf Single-Thread CPU. Wir glauben, dass dies der beste veröffentlichte Kompromiss zwischen Genauigkeit und Geschwindigkeit eines NMT-Systems ist.', 'id': 'Model urutan-ke-urutan perhatian telah menjadi standar baru untuk terjemahan mesin, tetapi satu tantangan dari model tersebut adalah meningkat signifikan dalam pelatihan dan decoding biaya dibandingkan dengan sistem berdasarkan frasa. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami fokus pada dekodasi efisien, dengan tujuan untuk mencapai akurasi menutup state-of-the-art dalam terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT), sementara mencapai kecepatan dekodasi CPU/throughput dekat dengan dekodasi frasa. Kita mendekati masalah ini dari dua sudut: pertama, kita menggambarkan beberapa teknik untuk mempercepat dekoder pencarian beam NMT, yang mendapatkan 4,4x speedup atas dekoder dasar yang sangat efisien tanpa mengubah output dekoder. Kedua, kami mengusulkan arsitektur jaringan sederhana tapi kuat yang menggunakan lapisan RNN (GRU/LSTM) di bawah, diikuti oleh seri lapisan yang terkumpul yang terhubung sepenuhnya yang diterapkan setiap langkah waktu. Arkitektur ini mencapai akurasi yang sama dengan model yang berulang-ulang dalam, dengan fraksi kecil dari biaya pelatihan dan dekodifikasi. Dengan menggabungkan teknik-teknik ini, sistem terbaik kita mencapai akurasi yang sangat kompetitif 38,3 BLEU pada WMT English-French NewsTest2014, sementara mendekodifikasi pada 100 kata/detik pada single-threaded CPU. Kami percaya ini adalah akurasi terbaik diterbitkan/perdagangan kecepatan dari sistem NMT.', 'ko': '시퀀스 모델은 이미 기계 번역의 새로운 표준이 되었지만, 짧은 언어를 기반으로 하는 시스템에 비해 이런 모델의 도전은 훈련과 디코딩 비용이 현저히 증가하는 것이다.이 작업에서 우리는 효율적인 디코딩에 전념하고 목표는 신경기계번역(NMT)의 가장 선진적인 수준에 가까운 정확도를 실현하는 동시에 짧은 디코딩기에 가까운 CPU 디코딩 속도/吞吐량을 실현하는 것이다.우리는 두 가지 측면에서 이 문제를 처리한다. 첫째, 우리는 몇 가지 가속 NMT 빔 검색 디코더의 기술을 묘사했다. 이런 기술은 디코더의 출력을 바꾸지 않는 상황에서 매우 효율적인 베이스 디코더보다 4.4배의 가속을 얻었다.그 다음으로 우리는 밑에 RNN(GRU/LSTM) 층을 사용한 다음에 시간마다 일련의 쌓인 완전 연결 층을 응용하는 간단하지만 기능이 강한 네트워크 체계 구조를 제시했다.이런 구조는 깊이 귀속 모델과 유사한 정밀도를 실현하고 소량의 훈련과 디코딩 비용만 필요로 한다.이러한 기술을 결합하여 우리의 가장 좋은 시스템은 WMT 영법 뉴스 테스트 2014에서 38.3 BLEU의 경쟁력 있는 정확도를 실현하였으며 단선정 CPU에서 100자/초의 속도로 디코딩하였다.NMT 시스템의 최적 정밀도/속도 측정이라고 생각합니다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای مراقبت به ترکیب\u200cها استاندارد جدید برای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین تبدیل شده\u200cاند، اما یک چالش از این مدل افزایش بزرگی در آموزش و دکوندن هزینه\u200cهای بزرگی در مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای متعلق به عبارت است. در این کار ما روی دکوندن موثرت تمرکز می کنیم، با هدف رسیدن دقیقیت در حالت هنری در ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) را بسته می کنیم، در حالی که سرعت/سفر CPU را دریافت می کنیم، نزدیک آن یک دکوردر فرزال است. ما از دو زاویه به این مشکل نزدیک می\u200cشویم: اول، ما چندین تکنیک برای سرعت یک دکوردر جستجوی فضای NMT را توصیف می\u200cکنیم، که سرعت ۴.4x بر روی یک دکوردر زیر خط بسیار موثر است بدون تغییر نتیجه دکورد را می\u200cگیریم. دوم، ما یک معماری شبکه ساده ولی قدرتمند را پیشنهاد می کنیم که از یک لایه RNN (GRU/LSTM) در پایین استفاده می کند، بعد از یک مجموعه لایه\u200cهای کامل متصل شده در هر مرحله زمان کاربرد می\u200cکند. این معماری دقیقات مشابهی با یک مدل عمیق تکرار می\u200cشود، در بخشی کوچک از هزینه\u200cهای آموزش و دکوندگی. با ترکیب این تکنولوژی\u200cها، بهترین سیستم ما دقیقاتی بسیار مسابقه\u200cای از 38.3 BLEU در نویسهای انگلیسی-فرانسوی WMT ۲۰۱۴ می\u200cرسد، در حالی که در ۱۰۰ کلمه/ثانیه در یک سی\u200cپی\u200cیو مسابقه می\u200cکند. ما فکر می\u200cکنیم این بهترین دقیق/سرعت تجارت از یک سیستم NMT است.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa ufuatiliaji wa mfululizo umekuwa kiwango kipya cha kutafsiri mashine, lakini changamoto moja ya mifano kama hizi ni kuongezeka kwa mafunzo na kupunguza gharama za kukosa sambamba na mfumo wa maneno. Katika kazi hii tunalenga kupunguza kwa ufanisi, kwa lengo la kufikia ukweli unaofungwa na hali ya sanaa katika tafsiri ya mashine ya kidini (NMT), wakati wakifika kupunguza kasi ya CPU kwa kiwango cha kupunguza kwa kiwango cha ukodi wa maneno. Tunakutana na tatizo hili kutoka angali mbili: Kwanza, tunaelezea mbinu kadhaa za kupata kiwango cha kutafuta mfumo wa nishati ya NMT, ambacho kinapata kiwango cha 4.4x kwa kiwango kikubwa cha chini bila kubadilisha matokeo ya kodi. Pili, tunapendekeza ujenzi rahisi lakini wenye nguvu wa mtandao unaotumia ngazi ya RNN (GRU/LSTM) chini, na kufuatia mfululizo wa vipengele vya viunganishwa vizuri vilivyotumika kila hatua. Ujengo huu unatokea uhakika wa namna hiyo na mifano inayoendelea kwa kiasi kikubwa, kwa sehemu ndogo ya mafunzo na kupunguza gharama. Kwa kuunganisha mbinu hizi, mfumo wetu bora unafanikiwa ukweli wa ushindani wa 38.3 BLEU kwenye gazeti la Uingereza na Ufaransa 2014, wakati ukipungua maneno 100/sekunde kwenye CPU yenye ujumla mmoja. Tunaamini hili ni sahihi bora zaidi/biashara ya haraka ya mfumo wa NMT.', 'tr': 'Saýlaw sequence-to-sequence nusgalary maşynyň terjime etmek üçin täze standart boldy, ýöne bu nusgalaryň bir kynçylyky fraz sistemleri bilen gurlyşylar we taýýarlamak üçin has baglanyşygy artýar. Bu işde biz effektiv dekoding üstine üns berip, näyral maşynyň terjimesinde (NMT) sungatyň durumyny dogry ýapmak maksady bilen prozessiýasyny dekoding tizligine ýetýäris. Bu meselede iki küçünden golaýlaşýarys: Ilkinji gezek, NMT gözlemäň dekoderini hızlandyrmak üçin birnäçe teknikleri tasvir edip, bu şekilde 4.4x süýtgeli bir beýiklik dekoderinden howlup geçirilýär Ikinji gezek, biz esasy ýöne güýçli şebeke arhitektura teklip edip, bu iň a şagynda RNN (GRU/LSTM) gatyny ullanýar, we her zamanyň üstünde ýerleşýän ýerleşýän ýerleşýän gatylaryň bir serisi tarapyndan yzarlanýar. Bu arhitektura gaty bir nusga ýaly bir nusga ýetip bilýär, okuw we kodlama töleginiň kiçi böleginde. Bu teknikleri birleşdirmek üçin biziň iň gowy sistemamyz WMT Iňlis-Fransiz NewsTest2014-de 38.3 BLEU-yň takyklygynda 100 söz/saniýada ýekeje syýasatda kodýar. Biziň pikirimiz bu NMT sistemanyň iň gowy görkezilen dogrylygyny/ýigyrlygyny kesişdirildir.', 'am': 'የፊደል ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ አዲስ የሞክራዊ ትርጉም ሆኖአል፤ ነገር ግን እንደዚህ ዓይነቶች የሚደረገው አንዲት ጥላቻ ከሥርዓት የተመሳሳይ እና ከድጋፍ ክፍተቶችን ከመተካከል የሚያበዛ ትልቅ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ አካባቢ አካባቢ ማድረግ እናስከትናለን፣ የ-የ-የ-የ-art ግንኙነትን በመግለጽ (NMT) ለመግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ክፍሎች ላይ እንቀርባለን፤ መጀመሪያ የNMT ብረት ፈልግ ክፍተቶችን ለመፍጠር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Second, we propose a simple but powerful network architecture which uses an RNN (GRU/LSTM) layer at bottom, followed by a series of stacked fully-connected layers applied at every timestep.  ይህ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት ለጥልቅ የሚቆጠር ሞዴል በሚያሳድገው ትንሽ ክፍል ነው፡፡ እነዚህን ቴክኖችንን በመቀላቀል፣ መልካሙን ስርዓታችን በዩMT እንግሊዘኛ-ፈረንሳይ ዜና 2014 ላይ 38.3 ቢሊዩን በጣም ተቃውሞ አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህች የNMT ስርዓት የፍጥነት/የፍጥነት ንግድ መፍጠር የተሻለ ነው ብለን እናምናለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Modelet e vëmendjes sekuencë-në-sekuencë janë bërë standarti i ri për përkthimin e makinave, por një sfidë e modeleve të tilla është një rritje e rëndësishme në trajnimin dhe dekodimin e kostos krahasuar me sistemet bazuar në fraza. Në këtë punë ne përqëndrohemi në dekodimin e efektshëm, me një qëllim për arritjen e saktësisë mbylle gjendjen më të mirë të përkthimit të makinave nervore (NMT), ndërsa arrijmë shpejtësinë e dekodimit të CPU-së pranë asaj të një dekodimi frazël. Ne i afrohemi këtij problemi nga dy këndja: së pari, ne përshkruajmë disa teknika për të përshpejtuar një dekoder kërkimi për rreze NMT, i cili merr një shpejtësi 4.4x mbi një dekoder bazë shumë efektiv pa ndryshuar daljen e dekoderit. Së dyti, ne propozojmë një arkitekturë të thjeshtë por të fuqishme rrjeti që përdor një shtresë RNN (GRU/LSTM) në fund, pasuar nga një seri shtresash të mbushura plotësisht të lidhura aplikuar në çdo hap kohor. Kjo arkitekturë arrin saktësi të ngjashme me një model të thellë të përsëritur, me një pjesë të vogël të kostos së trajnimit dhe dekodimit. Duke kombinuar këto teknika, sistemi ynë më i mirë arrin një saktësi shumë konkurruese 38.3 BLEU në WMT English-French NewsTest2014, ndërsa dekodion në 100 fjalë/sekonda në një CPU me një fije të vetëm. Ne besojmë se kjo është saktësia më e botuar/shkëmbimi më i shpejtë i një sistemi NMT.', 'af': "Aangaande volgorde-na-volgorde modele het die nuwe standaard geword vir masjien vertaling, maar een uitdaging van sodanige modele is 'n betekende verhoog in onderwerp en dekodering koste vergelyk met frase-gebaseerde stelsels. In hierdie werk fokus ons op effektief dekodering, met 'n doel om die presisiteit te bereik toe te maak toe die state-of-the-kuns in neurale masjien vertaling (NMT), terwyl CPU dekodering spoed/deursigtigheid toe te kom naby daardie van 'n frasaldekoder. Ons het hierdie probleem aangekom van twee hoeke: Eerste, ons beskryf verskeie teknike vir speeding op 'n NMT beam soektog dekoder, wat 'n 4. 4x speedskouer kry oor' n baie effektief basisline dekoder sonder om die dekoder uitvoer te verander. Tweede, ons voorstel 'n eenvoudige maar kragtige netwerk arkitektuur wat gebruik 'n RNN (GRU/LSTM) laag onder, volg deur 'n reeks van stapelinge volledige verbind laag wat op elke tydstrek aangepas word. Hierdie arkitektuur verkry soos gelyke presies aan 'n diep herhaalde model, by 'n klein fraksie van die oefening en dekodering koste. Deur hierdie teknike te kombinerer, ons beste stelsel bereik 'n baie mededingslike presisie van 38.3 BLEU op WMT Engels-Franse NuusTest2014, terwyl ons dekodeer op 100 woorde/sekonde op enkele gedraaide CPU. Ons glo dit is die beste uitgepubliseerde presies/spoed handeling van 'n NMT stelsel.", 'bn': 'মনোযোগ প্রদান করা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য নতুন ম্যান্ডার পরিণত হয়েছে, কিন্তু এই মডেলের একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে প্রশিক্ষণ এবং ব্যাক্তিভিত্তিক সিস্টেমের তুলন এই কাজে আমরা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) রাষ্ট্র বন্ধ করার লক্ষ্যে সঠিকভাবে কাজের জন্য কার্যক্রমের কাজের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করি, যেখানে সিপিউ কোডারের দ্রুত/ব্যাপারে ক আমরা দুই কোণ থেকে এই সমস্যার কাছে পৌঁছাই: প্রথমে, আমরা একটি এনএমটি বীম অনুসন্ধানের ডিকোডার বেড়ে যাওয়ার জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি কৌশল বর্ণনা করি, যা ডেকোডার আউটপুট পরিবর্তন দ্বিতীয়, আমরা একটি সাধারণ কিন্তু শক্তিশালী নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করি যা নিচে একটি RNN (GRU/LSTM) স্তর ব্যবহার করে, তার পরে প্রতিটি সময়ের মধ্যে প্রয়োজন করা  প্রশিক্ষণ এবং কোডিং খরচের একটি ছোট অংশে এই প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলো গভীর পুনরাবর্তন মডেলের সাথে একই রকম সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে। এই প্রযুক্তিগুলোর সাথে যুক্ত করার মাধ্যমে আমাদের সেরা ব্যবস্থা উইএমটি ইংরেজি-ফ্রেঞ্চ নিউজেস্ট ২০১৪-এর ৩৮. আমরা বিশ্বাস করি এটা এনএমটি সিস্টেমের সর্বোচ্চ সঠিকভাবে প্রকাশিত/গতি ব্যবসা ব্যবসায়ী সর্বোত্তম।', 'az': 'Attention sequence-to-sequence modelləri maşın çevirilməsi üçün yeni standart oldular, amma bu modellərin bir səbəbi təhsil etmək və dəyişiklik maliyyəti fraz sistemləri ilə qarşılaşdığı qədər böyük artırmaqdır. Bu işdə, biz müvəffəqiyyətli kodlama üzərində, nöral maşına çevirilməsindəki nöral məktəbinə qarşılaşdırmaq məqsədilə, CPU kodlama sürəti/dövrünü frazal dekoderinin yaxınlaşdırmaq məqsədilə təmin edirik. Biz bu problem ə iki küçük tərəfindən yaxınlaşırıq: ilk dəfə, NMT xəbəri araştırma dekoderini hızlandırmaq üçün bir neçə tekniki təsdiqləyirik, bu da 4.4x sürətini çox etkili baseline dekoderi ilə dəyişdirir. İkincisi, hər vaxt adımda istifadə edilən çox tamamlanmış yerlərlə birlikdə istifadə edilən RNN (GRU/LSTM) səviyyəsini təklif edirik. Bu arhitektura, təhsil və kodlama maliyyətlərinin küçük bir bölümündə çəkilən çəkilənlərə bənzər bir dəyişiklik modeli qəbul edər. Bu teknikləri birləşdirərək, ən yaxşı sistemimiz WMT İngilizce-Fransız NewsTest2014 ilə 38.3 BLEU ilə müqayisədə olduğu qədər müqayisədə 100 sözlərlə/saniyədə bir CPU ilə kodlaşır. Biz bu NMT sisteminin ən yaxşı dəqiqliyi/hızlı ticarətdir.', 'hy': 'Ուշադիր հաջորդականության մոդելները դարձել են մեքենայի թարգմանման նոր ստանդարտ, բայց նման մոդելների մեկ մարտահրավերը նշանակալի աճ է կրթության և կոդավորման արժեքների մեջ համեմատած արտահայտված համակարգերի հետ: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք արդյունավետ կոդավորման վրա, որպեսզի ճշգրիտությունը հասնենք, փակենք նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) տեխնոլոգիան, մինչդեռ հասնենք CPU-ի կոդավորման արագությունը և հաջողությունը, որը մոտ է արտահայտված We approach this problem from two angles: First, we describe several techniques for speeding up an NMT beam search decoder, which obtain a 4.4x speedup over a very efficient baseline decoder without changing the decoder output.  Երկրորդ, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ, բայց հզոր ցանցային ճարտարապետություն, որը օգտագործում է ներքևում գտնվող ՌՆՆ (GRU-LStm) շերտ, հետևում մի շարք ամբողջովին կապված շերտեր, որոնք կիրառվում են յուրաքանչյուր անգամ: Այս ճարտարապետությունը ստանում է նման ճշգրտություն, ինչպես խորը կրկնվող մոդելը, ուսուցման և կոդավորման արժեքի փոքր մասում: Այս տեխնիկաների համադրման միջոցով մեր լավագույն համակարգը հասնում է 38.3 ԲԼԵՎ-ի մրցակցային ճշգրտությունը 2014 թվականի Անգլերեն-Ֆրանսերեն նորությունների թեստերի ժամանակ, մինչդեկոդավորելով 100 բառ վայրկյանում մեկ լար պրոցեսորի վրա: Մենք հավատում ենք, որ սա NMT համակարգի լավագույն հրատարակված ճշգրտությունն է:', 'bs': 'Pozorni modeli sekvence do sekvence postali su novi standard za prevod strojeva, ali jedan izazov takvih modela je značajan povećanje troškova obuke i dekodiranja u usporedbi s sustavima baziranim na frazi. U ovom poslu se fokusiramo na efikasno dekodiranje, s ciljem ostvarivanja tačnosti zatvaranja stanja umjetnosti u prevodu neuralnih strojeva (NMT), dok postignemo CPU dekodiranje brzine/prošlosti blizu onog frazalnog dekodera. Približavamo se ovom problemu iz dva ugla: Prvo, opisujemo nekoliko tehnika za ubrzanje dekodera pretraživanja zraka NMT-a, koji dobija brzinu od 4,4x preko vrlo efikasnog početnog dekodera bez promjene izlaza dekodera. Drugo, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali moćnu mrežnu arhitekturu koja koristi sloj RNN (GRU/LSTM) na dnu, slijedeći serijom kompletno povezanih slojeva koji se primjenjuju na svakom vremenskom koraku. Ova arhitektura postiže sličnu tačnost dubokom ponavljajućem modelu, na malom dijelu troškova obuke i dekodiranja. Kombinujući te tehnike, naš najbolji sistem postiže veoma konkurentnu tačnost od 38,3 BLEU na WMT engleskom-francuskom NewsTest2014, dok se dekodira na 100 riječi/sekundi na jednostavnom CPU. Vjerujemo da je ovo najbolja objavljena preciznost/brzina trgovina NMT-ovog sistema.', 'ca': "Els models de seqüència a seqüència atenció s'han convertit en el nou estàndard de traducció màquina, però un repte d'aquests models és un augment significatiu en el cost d'entrenament i descodificació comparat amb els sistemes basats en frases. In this work we focus on efficient decoding, with a goal of achieving accuracy close the state-of-the-art in neural machine translation (NMT), while achieving CPU decoding speed/throughput close to that of a phrasal decoder.  Aproximem aquest problem a de dos angles: En primer lloc, descrivim diverses tècniques d'acceleració d'un decodificador de cerca de raig NMT, que obtenen una velocitat de 4,4x sobre un decodificador de base molt eficient sense canviar la producció del decodificador. Segon, proposem una arquitectura de xarxa senzilla però poderosa que utilitza una capa RNN (GRU/LSTM) a la part inferior, seguida d'una sèrie de capes plenament connectades aplicades cada cop. Aquesta arquitectura aconsegueix una precisió similar a un model recurrent profund, amb una petita fracció del cost d'entrenament i descodificació. Combinant aquestes tècniques, el nostre millor sistema aconsegueix una precisió molt competitiva de 38,3 BLEU en WMT English-French NewsTest2014, mentre que descodifica a 100 paraules/segon en un CPU amb un únic filament. Creiem que aquest és el millor intercanvi de precisió/velocitat publicat d'un sistema NMT.", 'cs': 'Pozorné modely sekvence-sekvence se staly novým standardem pro strojový překlad, ale jednou z výzev těchto modelů je výrazné zvýšení nákladů na školení a dekódování ve srovnání s frázovými systémy. V této práci se zaměřujeme na efektivní dekódování s cílem dosáhnout přesnosti blízké nejmodernějšímu neuronovému strojovému překladu (NMT), přičemž docílíme rychlosti dekódování procesoru blízké rychlosti/propustnosti dekódování frazálního dekodéru. K tomuto problému přistupujeme ze dvou úhlů: Nejprve popisujeme několik technik urychlení NMT paprskového dekodéru, které získávají 4,4x zrychlení nad velmi efektivním základním dekodérem bez změny výstupu dekodéru. Za druhé navrhujeme jednoduchou, ale výkonnou síťovou architekturu, která využívá vrstvu RNN (GRU/LSTM) ve spodní části a následuje řada stohovaných plně propojených vrstev aplikovaných v každém časovém kroku. Tato architektura dosahuje podobné přesnosti jako u hlubokých opakovaných modelů s malým zlomem nákladů na školení a dekódování. Kombinací těchto technik, náš nejlepší systém dosahuje velmi konkurenční přesnosti 38.3 BLEU na WMT anglicko-francouzských NewsTest2014, přičemž dekódování na 100 slov/sekundu na jednovláknovém procesoru. Věříme, že jde o nejlepší publikovaný kompromis přesnosti a rychlosti NMT systému.', 'et': 'Masintõlke uueks standardiks on saanud tähelepanuväärsest järjestusest järjestuseni mudelid, kuid selliste mudelite üheks väljakutseks on märkimisväärne koolitus- ja dekodeerimiskulude suurenemine võrreldes fraasipõhiste süsteemidega. Käesolevas töös keskendume tõhusale dekodeerimisele, mille eesmärk on saavutada täpsus, lähendada nüüdisaegset neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) taset, saavutades samal ajal protsessori dekodeerimise kiiruse/läbilaskevõime lähedal fraasaaldekoodrile. Me läheneme sellele probleemile kahest nurgast: Esiteks kirjeldame mitmeid meetodeid NMT kiirguse otsingu dekoodri kiirendamiseks, mis saavutavad 4,4-kordse kiirenduse üle väga tõhusa baasdekoodri ilma dekoodri väljundit muutmata. Teiseks pakume välja lihtsa, kuid võimsa võrguarhitektuuri, mis kasutab alumises RNN (GRU/LSTM) kihti, millele järgneb rida virnastatud täielikult ühendatud kihte, mida rakendatakse igal ajal. See arhitektuur saavutab sarnase täpsuse kui sügav korduv mudel, väikese murdosaga koolitus- ja dekodeerimiskuludest. Nende tehnikate kombineerimisega saavutab meie parim süsteem väga konkurentsivõimelise täpsuse 38,3 BLEU WMT inglise-prantsuse NewsTest2014, dekodeerides samal ajal 100 sõna sekundis ühe keermega protsessoril. Usume, et see on parim avaldatud täpsuse/kiiruse kompromiss NMT süsteemist.', 'fi': 'Asennussekvenssi-sekvenssimalleista on tullut konekäännöksen uusi standardi, mutta näiden mallien haasteena on koulutus- ja dekoodauskustannusten merkittävä kasvu fraasipohjaisiin järjestelmiin verrattuna. Tässä työssä keskitytään tehokkaaseen dekoodaukseen, jonka tavoitteena on saavuttaa tarkkuus lähellä neurokonekäännöksen (NMT) viimeisintä tekniikkaa ja saavuttaa prosessorin dekoodausnopeus/läpivienti lähelle fraasidekooderin nopeutta. Käsittelemme tätä ongelmaa kahdesta kulmasta: Ensin kuvaamme useita tekniikoita NMT-säteen hakudekooderin nopeuttamiseksi, jotka saavat 4,4-kertaisen nopeuteen verrattuna erittäin tehokkaaseen lähtötason dekooderiin muuttamatta dekooderin ulostuloa. Toiseksi ehdotamme yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta verkkoarkkitehtuuria, joka käyttää pohjassa RNN (GRU/LSTM) -kerrosta, jota seuraa sarja pinottuja täysin yhdistettyjä kerroksia, joita käytetään joka vaiheessa. Tämä arkkitehtuuri saavuttaa samanlaisen tarkkuuden kuin syvä toistuva malli pienellä murto-osalla koulutus- ja dekoodauskustannuksista. Yhdistämällä nämä tekniikat paras järjestelmämme saavuttaa erittäin kilpailukykyisen tarkkuuden, 38,3 BLUE WMT Englanti-Ranska NewsTest2014, kun taas dekoodaa 100 sanaa sekunnissa yksisäikeisellä suorittimella. Uskomme, että tämä on paras julkaistu tarkkuus/nopeus kompromissi NMT-järjestelmässä.', 'jv': 'Attentive-to-order model sing berarti sistem sistem sing bagian nggawe sistem sistem sing berarti dadi supoyo karo perusahaan sistem sing berarti. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita punika dipunikno ning jeffisikno ngon njaluk kanggo ngilangno langgar sampeyan pangan Awak dhéwé ngerasakno pergambar iki anglo Second, we proposal a Simple and Power network architecture that use an R.N (GruU/LTT) layer at bottom, next by a string of stabted full-connected layers used at every timephase. Arkturatura iki wis kelakon deweke sampeyan nganggo model sing paling nggawe Ngawe ngubah sistem sing paling-atik iki, sistem sing luwih dumadhi kanggo ngerasakno asai paten kanggo kalagayaan sing kalagayutan 3.3 B luwih sabên kanggo WWT Inggris-French New Test 2013, sampeyan entuk dhéwé sing kotak bali/sec nang sampeyan sing kotak dhéwé NGC. Awak dhéwé ngpisan nganggo iki sing paling dhéwé nggawe gerakan karo sistem NMT.', 'sk': 'Modeli zaporedja v zaporedje so postali novi standard strojnega prevajanja, vendar je eden izzivov takih modelov znatno povečanje stroškov usposabljanja in dekodiranja v primerjavi s sistemi, ki temeljijo na frazah. V tem delu se osredotočamo na učinkovito dekodiranje, s ciljem doseči natančnost blizu najsodobnejšega pri nevronskem strojnem prevajanju (NMT), hkrati pa doseči hitrost/pretok dekodiranja CPU blizu hitrosti frazalnega dekodiranja. Temu problemu pristopimo iz dveh kotov: Najprej opisujemo več tehnik za pospešitev iskalnega dekodirja NMT žarkov, ki dosežejo 4,4-kratno pospešitev nad zelo učinkovitim osnovnim dekodirjem brez spreminjanja izhoda dekodirja. Drugič, predlagamo preprosto, a zmogljivo omrežno arhitekturo, ki uporablja RNN (GRU/LSTM) plast na dnu, sledi serija zloženih popolnoma povezanih plasti, ki se uporabljajo v vsakem časovnem koraku. Ta arhitektura dosega podobno natančnost kot globoko ponavljajoči se model z majhnim deležem stroškov usposabljanja in dekodiranja. Z združevanjem teh tehnik naš najboljši sistem doseže zelo konkurenčno natančnost 38,3 BLEU na WMT angleško-francoskem NewsTest2014, medtem ko dekodira s 100 besedami/s na enonitnem procesorju. Verjamemo, da je to najboljši objavljeni kompromis za natančnost/hitrost sistema NMT.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Daga wannan aikin, Munã fokus wa kodi masu iya amfani da, game da goa da za'a sami tsari zuwa halin-the-art cikin fassarar mashine na neural (NMT), a lokacin da Muke sãmun CPU dakodiya farako/buɗa ɗɗe na rufe shi na kode-na. Babu kusantar da wannan muammãni daga matsayin biyu masu: Kayyan, muna bayyana kodi masu amfani da kwamfyuta kodi na NMT, da za'a sami wata 4.4x sauri kan kwamfyuta mai amfani da kwamfyuta baza-danna idan ba za'a canza fitarwa. Second, we propose a simple but powerful network architecture which uses an RNN (GRU/LSTM) layer at bottom, followed by a series of stacked fully-connected layers applied at every timestep.  Wannan arkin yana sãmu tsari mai daidai zuwa wani misali mai daurawa, cikin rabon ƙarami na yin amfani da yin kodi. Ga ku haɗa wannan masu kwamfyuta, na'asarmu ta sami tsarin da ya kamata 38.3 BLEU a kan WMT-Ingiriya-French NewsTest2014, sami kuma yana kasancẽwa da 100 words/sakan a kan komai guda. Ina aminci, wannan ne mafi kyaun abin da aka faɗa na gaskiya/gaugar fartawa daga na'urar-na-NMT.", 'he': 'דוגמני רצף-רצף תשומת לב הפכו לסטנדרט החדש לתרגום מכונות, אך אתגר אחד של דוגמנים כאלה הוא גידול משמעותי בעלות האימון והפיקוד בהשוואה למערכות מבוססות ביטויים. בעבודה הזאת אנו מתמקדים בפיתוח יעיל, עם מטרה להשיג מדויקה סגור את המצב המיוחד בתרגום מכונות עצביות (NMT), בזמן להשיג מהירות לפיתוח CPU/דרך קרוב לזה של מפיתוח ביטויים. We approach this problem from two angles: First, we describe several techniques for speeding up an NMT beam search decoder, which obtain a 4.4x speedup over a very efficient baseline decoder without changing the decoder output.  שנית, אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה רשתית פשוטה אבל חזקה אשר משתמשת בשכבת RNN (GRU/LSTM) בתחתית, לאחר מכן בסדרה של שכבות ערוכות מחוברות לחלוטין שמשתמשות בכל צעד הזמן. הארכיטקטורה הזאת משיגה מדויקה דומה למודל חוזר עמוק, בחלק קטן של עלות האימון והפיתוח. על ידי שילוב הטכניקות האלה, המערכת הטובה ביותר שלנו משיגה מדויקה מאוד תחרותית של 38.3 BLEU על WMT אנגלי-צרפתי NewsTest2014, בעוד לפענח ב-100 מילים/שנייה על CPU חוט אחד. אנו מאמינים שזו הדיוקת והמהירות הטובה ביותר של מערכת NMT.', 'bo': 'Attentional sequence-to-sequence models have become the new standard for machine translation, but one challenge of such models is a significant increase in training and decoding cost compared to phrase-based systems. In this work we focus on efficient decoding, with a goal of achieving accuracy close the state-of-the-art in neural machine translation (NMT), while achieving CPU decoding speed/throughput close to that of a phrasal decoder. We approach this problem from two angles: First, we describe several techniques for speeding up an NMT beam search decoder, which obtain a 4.4x speedup over a very efficient baseline decoder without changing the decoder output. གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་RNN (GRU/LSTM)བང་རིམ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྟབས་བདེ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པ་ཞིག་གི་རྗེས་སུ་བཏང་ཡོད This architecture achieves similar accuracy to a deep recurrent model, at a small fraction of the training and decoding cost. By combining these techniques, our best system achieves a very competitive accuracy of 38.3 BLEU on WMT English-French NewsTest2014, while decoding at 100 words/sec on single-threaded CPU.[2] ང་ཚོས་འདི་ནི་NMT་མ་ལག་གི་བདེ་སྡོམ་དང་མགྱོགས་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དྲས་ཤོས་ཤིག་རེད་བསམ་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning for POS Tagging without Cross-Lingual Resources', 'ar': 'تعلم التحويل عبر اللغات لوضع علامات نقاط البيع بدون موارد متعددة اللغات', 'fr': 'Apprentissage par transfert multilingue pour le balisage POS sans ressources multilingues', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de transferência entre idiomas para marcação de PDV sem recursos entre idiomas', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe para el etiquetado de puntos de venta sin recursos multilingües', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルリソースなしのPOSタグ付けのためのクロスリンガル転送学習', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल संसाधनों के बिना पीओएस टैगिंग के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग', 'zh': '无须跨语资 POS 标记语移学', 'ru': 'Кросс-лингвальное трансферное обучение для маркировки POS без кросс-лингвальных ресурсов', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Trastheangach le haghaidh Clibeáil POS gan Acmhainní Trastheangacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διάγλωσση μάθηση μεταφοράς για τη σήμανση χωρίς γλωσσικούς πόρους', 'hu': 'Nyelvközi transzfer tanulás POS címkézéshez nyelvközi erőforrások nélkül', 'it': "Translingual Transfer Learning per l'etichettatura POS senza risorse cross-linguali", 'kk': 'Тішкі тіл ресурстары жоқ POS тегтерін білу үшін біріктіру', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Mokymasis tarpkalbiniu perdavimu POS ženklinimui be tarpkalbinių išteklių', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Selasa-Lingua Belajar untuk Tagging POS tanpa Sumber Selasa-Lingua', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ പോസ് ടാഗിങ്ങിനുള്ള ക്രോസ്- ലിന്\u200dഗുവല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പഠിപ', 'mn': 'Төрвөн хэлбэргүй POS Tagging болон Төрвөнгө Төрвөнгө суралцах', 'mt': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning for POS Tagging without Cross-Lingual Resources', 'pl': 'Transferowe uczenie się dla POS Tagowanie bez zasobów wielojęzycznych', 'ro': 'Învățare translingvistică de transfer pentru etichetarea POS fără resurse translingvistice', 'sr': 'Учење преноса на крозлингуалном преносу за маркиране POS без крозлингуалних ресурсова', 'no': 'Læring av krysslingsoverføringar for POS- merking utan krysslingsressursar', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkigt transferlärande för POS-märkning utan tvärspråkliga resurser', 'so': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning for POS Tagging without Cross-Lingual Resources', 'ta': 'Cross- Lingual Resources', 'ur': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning for POS Tagging without Cross-Lingual Resources', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết xuyên ngôn ngữ học về thẻ bưu kiện mà không có các nguồn hiểu rộng', 'da': 'Tværsproget overførselslæring til POS-mærkning uden tværsprogede ressourcer', 'hr': 'Naučenje prijenosa preko jezika za označavanje POS-a bez preko jezičkih resursa', 'bg': 'Междулингвистично трансферно обучение за маркиране на ПОС без междулингвистични ресурси', 'nl': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning voor POS Tagging zonder Cross-Lingual Resources', 'id': 'Belajar Transfer Selata-Lingua untuk Tagging POS tanpa Sumber Selata-Lingua', 'de': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning für POS Tagging ohne sprachübergreifende Ressourcen', 'fa': 'یادگیری انتقال زبانی برای نقاشی POS بدون منابع متصل زبان', 'sw': 'Uhamiaji wa lugha na Kilingi kwa ajili ya Ujumbe wa POS bila rasilimali za Kirusi', 'ko': '다중 언어 자원 필요 없는 단어 표기 다중 언어 이동 학습', 'tr': 'POS Taýgy çyzgyrmak üçin Çapraz Diller Taýranmasy', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Transferimit Gjithgjuhësor për etiketat POS pa burime Gjithgjuhësore', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Խոսլեզվի փոխանցման սովորելը POS-ի նշանների համար առանց Խոսլեզվի ռեսուրսների', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': '칂톛rz Dil Kaynaklar캼 olmadan POS etiketi 칲칞칲n 칂톛rz-칂톛rz Transfer 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bs': 'Preliminarno učenje prijenosa za označavanje POS-a bez preliminarnih resursa', 'bn': 'ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়াল সম্পদ ছাড়া POS ট্যাগিং এর জন্য ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়াল ট্রান্সফারেন্স শিক্ষা', 'cs': 'Cross-lingvální transfer učení pro POS tagování bez mezijazyčných zdrojů', 'ca': 'Aprendiment de transferències translingües per etiquetar POS sense recursos translingües', 'et': 'Keeleülene siirdeõpe POS märgistamiseks ilma keeleüleste ressurssideta', 'fi': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning POS-merkintään ilman Cross-Lingual Resources', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Medjezikovno učenje prenosa za označevanje POS brez medjezikovnih virov', 'he': 'לימוד מעברת לינגוליות לציוד POS ללא משאבים לינגוליים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Cross-Lingual Transfer Learning for POS Tagging without Cross-Lingual Resources'}
{'en': 'Training a POS tagging model with crosslingual transfer learning usually requires linguistic knowledge and resources about the relation between the source language and the target language. In this paper, we introduce a cross-lingual transfer learning model for POS tagging without ancillary resources such as parallel corpora. The proposed cross-lingual model utilizes a common BLSTM that enables knowledge transfer from other languages, and private BLSTMs for language-specific representations. The cross-lingual model is trained with language-adversarial training and bidirectional language modeling as auxiliary objectives to better represent language-general information while not losing the information about a specific target language. Evaluating on POS datasets from 14 languages in the Universal Dependencies corpus, we show that the proposed transfer learning model improves the POS tagging performance of the target languages without exploiting any linguistic knowledge between the source language and the target language.', 'ar': 'عادة ما يتطلب تدريب نموذج علامات نقاط البيع مع التعلم عبر اللغات معرفة وموارد لغوية حول العلاقة بين اللغة المصدر واللغة الهدف. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نموذج تعلم النقل عبر اللغات لوضع علامات نقاط البيع بدون موارد إضافية مثل المجموعات المتوازية. يستخدم النموذج عبر اللغات المقترح BLSTM مشتركًا يتيح نقل المعرفة من اللغات الأخرى ، و BLSTMs الخاصة للتمثيلات الخاصة باللغة. يتم تدريب النموذج عبر اللغات من خلال التدريب على الخصومة اللغوية والنمذجة اللغوية ثنائية الاتجاه كأهداف مساعدة لتمثيل المعلومات العامة للغة بشكل أفضل مع عدم فقد المعلومات حول لغة هدف محددة. من خلال التقييم على مجموعات بيانات نقاط البيع من 14 لغة في مجموعة التبعيات العالمية ، نظهر أن نموذج التعلم بالنقل المقترح يحسن أداء علامات نقاط البيع للغات الهدف دون استغلال أي معرفة لغوية بين لغة المصدر واللغة الهدف.', 'pt': 'Treinar um modelo de marcação POS com aprendizado de transferência entre idiomas geralmente requer conhecimento linguístico e recursos sobre a relação entre o idioma de origem e o idioma de destino. Neste artigo, apresentamos um modelo de aprendizado de transferência multilíngue para marcação de POS sem recursos auxiliares, como corpora paralelos. O modelo multilíngue proposto utiliza um BLSTM comum que permite a transferência de conhecimento de outros idiomas e BLSTMs privados para representações específicas de idioma. O modelo multilíngue é treinado com treinamento contraditório de linguagem e modelagem de linguagem bidirecional como objetivos auxiliares para melhor representar as informações gerais da linguagem, sem perder as informações sobre uma língua-alvo específica. Avaliando em conjuntos de dados POS de 14 idiomas no corpus de Dependências Universais, mostramos que o modelo de aprendizado de transferência proposto melhora o desempenho de marcação POS dos idiomas de destino sem explorar nenhum conhecimento linguístico entre o idioma de origem e o idioma de destino.', 'fr': "La formation d'un modèle de marquage POS avec apprentissage par transfert interlinguistique nécessite généralement des connaissances linguistiques et des ressources sur la relation entre la langue source et la langue cible. Dans cet article, nous présentons un modèle d'apprentissage par transfert multilingue pour le marquage POS sans ressources auxiliaires telles que des corpus parallèles. Le modèle multilingue proposé utilise un BLSTM commun qui permet le transfert de connaissances à partir d'autres langues, et des BLSTM privés pour les représentations spécifiques à la langue. Le modèle multilingue est formé avec une formation antagoniste linguistique et une modélisation linguistique bidirectionnelle comme objectifs auxiliaires afin de mieux représenter les informations générales sur la langue sans perdre les informations sur une langue cible spécifique. En évaluant les ensembles de données POS de 14 langues dans le corpus Dépendances universelles, nous montrons que le modèle d'apprentissage par transfert proposé améliore les performances de balisage POS des langues cibles sans exploiter aucune connaissance linguistique entre la langue source et la langue cible.", 'es': 'La formación de un modelo de etiquetado de PDV con aprendizaje de transferencia interlingüística generalmente requiere conocimientos lingüísticos y recursos sobre la relación entre el idioma de origen y el idioma de destino. En este documento, presentamos un modelo de aprendizaje de transferencia multilingüe para el etiquetado de puntos de venta sin recursos auxiliares, como corpora paralelos. El modelo multilingüe propuesto utiliza un BLSTM común que permite la transferencia de conocimientos desde otros idiomas, y BLSTM privados para representaciones específicas del idioma. El modelo multilingüe se entrena con la capacitación lingüística contradictoria y el modelado del lenguaje bidireccional como objetivos auxiliares para representar mejor la información general del idioma sin perder la información sobre un idioma de destino específico. Al evaluar los conjuntos de datos de POS de 14 idiomas en el corpus de Dependencias Universales, mostramos que el modelo de aprendizaje por transferencia propuesto mejora el rendimiento del etiquetado de PDV de los idiomas de destino sin explotar ningún conocimiento lingüístico entre el idioma de origen y el idioma de destino.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル転送学習を伴うPOSタグ付けモデルのトレーニングは、通常、ソース言語とターゲット言語の関係についての言語学的知識とリソースを必要とする。 本稿では、パラレルコーパスのような補助的なリソースを用いずにPOSタグ付けを行うためのクロスリンガル転送学習モデルを紹介する。 提案されたクロスリンガルモデルは、他の言語からの知識転送を可能にする共通のBLSTMと、言語固有の表現のためのプライベートBLSTMを利用する。 クロスリンガルモデルは、特定のターゲット言語に関する情報を失うことなく、言語一般情報をよりよく表現するための補助目標として、言語対抗訓練と双方向言語モデリングで訓練されている。 Universal Dependenciesコーパスの14の言語からのPOSデータセットを評価すると、提案された転送学習モデルは、ソース言語とターゲット言語の間の言語学的知識を活用することなく、ターゲット言語のPOSタグ付けのパフォーマンスを向上させることが示されています。', 'zh': '语言迁习 POS 标记模形,常须语言知识。 于本文中,言跨语者迁学模样,施于POS标记,而无并行语料库等助助资源。 拟议之BLSTM,使知得移于他语,而用于特定言之私BLSTM。 跨言以言抗教双向言建模以为辅翼,以善言为信,不失特定言。 通用依赖性语料库14种语言者POS据集上评估,结果表明,所发迁学,于不利用语言语言之间,一切语言知识,以重POS能。', 'hi': 'क्रॉसलिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग के साथ पीओएस टैगिंग मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए आमतौर पर स्रोत भाषा और लक्ष्य भाषा के बीच संबंध के बारे में भाषाई ज्ञान और संसाधनों की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट जैसे सहायक संसाधनों के बिना पीओएस टैगिंग के लिए एक क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग मॉडल पेश करते हैं। प्रस्तावित क्रॉस-भाषी मॉडल एक सामान्य BLSTM का उपयोग करता है जो अन्य भाषाओं से ज्ञान हस्तांतरण को सक्षम बनाता है, और भाषा-विशिष्ट प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए निजी BLSTMs। क्रॉस-भाषी मॉडल को भाषा-प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण और द्विदिश भाषा मॉडलिंग के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, जो भाषा-सामान्य जानकारी का बेहतर प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए सहायक उद्देश्यों के रूप में प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, जबकि एक विशिष्ट लक्ष्य भाषा के बारे में जानकारी नहीं खोता है। यूनिवर्सल निर्भरता कॉर्पस में 14 भाषाओं से पीओएस डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि प्रस्तावित स्थानांतरण सीखने का मॉडल स्रोत भाषा और लक्ष्य भाषा के बीच किसी भी भाषाई ज्ञान का शोषण किए बिना लक्ष्य भाषाओं के पीओएस टैगिंग प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'Обучение модели маркировки POS с кросс-лингвальным обучением, как правило, требует лингвистических знаний и ресурсов о взаимосвязи между исходным языком и целевым языком. В этой статье мы представляем модель кросс-лингвистического обучения для маркировки POS-терминалов без вспомогательных ресурсов, таких как параллельные корпуса. Предлагаемая межъязыковая модель использует общую BLSTM, которая позволяет передавать знания с других языков, и частные BLSTM для языковых представлений. Межъязыковая модель обучается языковым противоборством и двунаправленным языковым моделированием в качестве вспомогательных целей для лучшего представления общей языковой информации, не теряя при этом информации о конкретном целевом языке. Оценивая наборы данных POS из 14 языков в корпусе Universal Dependencies, мы показываем, что предлагаемая модель обучения переносу улучшает производительность маркировки POS целевых языков без использования каких-либо языковых знаний между исходным языком и целевым языком.', 'ga': 'Teastaíonn eolas agus acmhainní teanga faoin ngaol idir an teanga fhoinseach agus an sprioctheanga chun samhail chlibeála POS a oiliúint le foghlaim aistrithe trasteanga de ghnáth. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach múnla foghlama aistrithe tras-teanga do chlibeáil POS gan acmhainní coimhdeacha amhail corpas comhthreomhar. Úsáideann an tsamhail thrastheangach atá beartaithe BLSTM coiteann a chumasaíonn aistriú eolais ó theangacha eile, agus BLSTManna príobháideacha le haghaidh léirithe a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga. Cuirtear oiliúint ar an tsamhail thrastheangach le hoiliúint sáraithe teanga agus samhaltú déthreoch teanga mar chuspóirí cúnta chun faisnéis ghinearálta teanga a léiriú níos fearr agus gan an fhaisnéis faoi sprioctheanga ar leith a chailleadh. Agus measúnú á dhéanamh ar thacair sonraí POS ó 14 theanga sa chorpas um Spleáchas Uilíoch, léirímid go bhfeabhsaíonn an tsamhail foghlama aistrithe atá beartaithe feidhmíocht chlibeála POS na sprioctheanga gan leas a bhaint as aon eolas teangeolaíoch idir an teanga fhoinseach agus an sprioctheanga.', 'ka': 'POS მოდელის შემწავლობა, რომელიც კრისტალური ტრანსტრენსის სწავლების შემდეგ უნდა ინგლისტიკური მეცნიერება და რესურსების შესახებ მსოფლიო ენის და მისაღების ენ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ შევცვალოთ მრავალური ტრანსტრინციის მოდელი POS-ის მონიშნულებისთვის, როგორც პარალელური კოპორაში. პროგრამეტური მსგავსი მოდელის გამოყენება საერთო BLSTM, რომელიც სხვა ენებიდან მეცნიერების გადატვირთვას და პირადი BLSTMs ენის განსაზღვრებისთვის. მრავალენგური მოდელი იქნება ენის-ანგარდარიალური განსწავლებით და მედირექციონალური ენის მოდელეციით, როგორც დახმარებელი მიზეზები, რომ უფრო უფრო მხოლოდ ენის გულისხმების ინფორმაციას გა POS მონაცემების შესაბამისათვის 14 ენაზე სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო კოპუსში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენი მონაცემები მონაცემები მოდელ', 'hu': 'A POS-címkézési modell nyelvi transzfertanulással történő képzése általában nyelvi ismereteket és erőforrásokat igényel a forrásnyelv és a célnyelv közötti kapcsolatról. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy többnyelvű transzfer tanulási modellt a POS címkézéshez olyan kiegészítő erőforrások nélkül, mint például a párhuzamos corpora. A javasolt többnyelvű modell egy olyan közös BLSTM-et használ, amely lehetővé teszi a tudásátadást más nyelvekről, és privát BLSTM-eket használ nyelvspecifikus reprezentációkhoz. A többnyelvű modellt nyelvi-ellentétes képzéssel és kétirányú nyelvi modellezéssel képezik kiegészítő célkitűzésként, hogy jobban ábrázolja a nyelvi általános információkat, miközben nem veszíti el az adott célnyelvről szóló információkat. Az Univerzális Függőségek korpuszában szereplő 14 nyelvből származó POS adatkészleteket értékelve kimutatjuk, hogy a javasolt transzfer tanulási modell javítja a célnyelvek POS címkézési teljesítményét anélkül, hogy kihasználná a forrásnyelv és a célnyelv közötti nyelvtudást.', 'el': 'Η εκπαίδευση ενός μοντέλου σήμανσης με τη μάθηση της διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς απαιτεί συνήθως γλωσσικές γνώσεις και πόρους σχετικά με τη σχέση μεταξύ της γλώσσας προέλευσης και της γλώσσας-στόχου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα μοντέλο εκμάθησης διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς για την επισήμανση χωρίς βοηθητικούς πόρους όπως παράλληλα σώματα. Το προτεινόμενο διγλωσσικό μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί ένα κοινό που επιτρέπει τη μεταφορά γνώσεων από άλλες γλώσσες, και ιδιωτικό για γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις. Το διγλωσσικό μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται με γλωσσική εκπαίδευση και αμφίδρομη γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση ως βοηθητικούς στόχους για την καλύτερη αναπαράσταση των γενικών γλωσσικών πληροφοριών χωρίς να χάνεται η πληροφορία για μια συγκεκριμένη γλώσσα-στόχο. Αξιολογοώντας σε σύνολα δεδομένων από 14 γλώσσες στο σώμα Οικουμενικών Εξαρτήσεων, δείχνουμε ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο εκμάθησης μεταφοράς βελτιώνει την απόδοση επισήμανσης των γλωσσών-στόχων χωρίς να εκμεταλλεύεται οποιαδήποτε γλωσσική γνώση μεταξύ της γλώσσας προέλευσης και της γλώσσας-στόχου.', 'it': 'La formazione di un modello di tag POS con apprendimento translinguale richiede solitamente conoscenze linguistiche e risorse sulla relazione tra la lingua di origine e la lingua di destinazione. In questo articolo, introduciamo un modello di apprendimento cross-lingual transfer per il tag POS senza risorse accessorie come i corpi paralleli. Il modello multilingue proposto utilizza un BLSTM comune che consente il trasferimento di conoscenze da altre lingue, e BLSTM privati per rappresentazioni linguistiche specifiche. Il modello multilingue è formato con formazione linguistica-avversaria e modellazione linguistica bidirezionale come obiettivi ausiliari per rappresentare meglio le informazioni linguistiche generali senza perdere le informazioni su una specifica lingua di destinazione. Valutando su set di dati POS provenienti da 14 lingue nel corpus delle dipendenze universali, mostriamo che il modello di transfer learning proposto migliora le prestazioni di tag POS delle lingue target senza sfruttare alcuna conoscenza linguistica tra la lingua di origine e la lingua di destinazione.', 'kk': 'Қосылық тілдерді аудару оқыту үшін POS тегтер үлгісін оқыту үшін әдетте лингвистикалық білім мен ресурстар көзінің тілі мен мақсатты тіл арасындағы қатынас туралы талап етеді Бұл қағазда, параллель корпора секілді POS тегтері үшін бірнеше тілді аудару үлгісін келтіреміз. Бұл көп тілді үлгі үлгі басқа тілдерден мәліметтерді аудару мүмкіндігін және жеке BLSTMs тілдерді көрсетуге мүмкіндік беретін жалпы BLSTM қолданылады. Артық тіл үлгісі тіл-қарсы оқытумен және басқа тіл үлгісімен оқыту үшін көмектесу мақсаттары болып, тіл жалпы мәліметін жасау үшін, нақты мақсатты тіл туралы мәліметті жоғалу үшін,  Жалпы Тәуелсіздік корпус 14 тілден POS деректер қорларын оқу үшін, келтірілген аудару үлгісі мақсатты тілдер арасындағы лингвистикалық білім мен мақсатты тілдер арасындағы кез келген тілдер мен тілдер арасындағы POS тегтерін жақ', 'lt': 'Mokant POS žymėjimo model į su tarpkalbiniu mokymu paprastai reikia kalbinių žinių ir išteklių apie ryšį tarp kilmės kalbos ir tikslinės kalbos. Šiame dokumente pristatome tarpkalbinį mokymosi model į, skirtą POS ženklinimui be papildomų išteklių, pvz., lygiagrečiai korporai. Siūlomas daugiakalbis modelis naudoja bendrą BLSTM, leidžiantį žinių perdavimą iš kitų kalbų, ir privačius BLSTM konkrečioms kalboms atstovauti. Kelių kalbų model is mokomas su priešingu kalbų mokymu ir dviejų krypčių kalbų modeliavimu kaip pagalbiniai tikslai geriau atstovauti bendrajai kalbos informacijai, tačiau neprarasti informacijos apie konkrečią tikslinę kalbą. Vertindami 14 Universal Dependencies corpus kalbų POS duomenų rinkinius, parodome, kad siūlomas mokymosi perdavimu modelis pagerina tikslinių kalbų POS ženklinimo veiksmingumą nenaudojant jokių kalbinių žinių tarp kilmės kalbos ir tikslinės kalbos.', 'mk': 'Тренирањето на моделот за означување на POS со прекујазично префрлање учење обично бара јазичко знаење и ресурси за односот помеѓу изворниот јазик и метниот јазик. Во овој документ, воведуваме модел за учење на трансфер на јазик за означување на POS без дополнителни ресурси како што е паралелната корпора. The proposed cross-lingual model utilizes a common BLSTM that enables knowledge transfer from other languages, and private BLSTMs for language-specific representations.  Многу јазичкиот модел е обучен со јазик-непријателска обука и дводречен јазик моделирање како помошни цели за подобро претставување на генералните информации за јазик, а не губење на информациите за специфичен јазик на целта. Оценувајќи ги компјутерите на податоци на POS од 14 јазици во универзалните зависности корпус, покажуваме дека предложениот модел на трансферентно учење ја подобрува резултатот на означувањето на POS на јазиците на целта без искористување на било кое јазичко знаење помеѓу јазикот на изворот и јази', 'ms': 'Latihan model tag POS dengan pembelajaran pemindahan saling bahasa biasanya memerlukan pengetahuan bahasa dan sumber mengenai hubungan antara bahasa sumber dan bahasa sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model pembelajaran pemindahan salib bahasa untuk tag POS tanpa sumber selari seperti corpora selari. Model saling bahasa yang diusulkan menggunakan BLSTM umum yang membolehkan pemindahan pengetahuan dari bahasa lain, dan BLSTM peribadi untuk perwakilan khusus bahasa. The cross-lingual model is trained with language-adversarial training and bidirectional language modeling as auxiliary objectives to better represent language-general information while not losing the information about a specific target language.  Mengevaluasi set data POS dari 14 bahasa dalam Universal Dependencies corpus, kami menunjukkan bahawa model pemindahan yang direncanakan memperbaiki prestasi tag POS bahasa sasaran tanpa mengeksploitasi mana-mana pengetahuan bahasa antara bahasa sumber dan bahasa sasaran.', 'mt': 'It-taħriġ ta’ mudell ta’ tikkettar tal-POS b’tagħlim ta’ trasferiment translingwi normalment jeħtieġ għarfien lingwistiku u riżorsi dwar ir-relazzjoni bejn il-lingwa tas-sors u l-lingwa fil-mira. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu mudell ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment translingwi għat-tikkettar tal-POS mingħajr riżorsi anċillari bħall-korpora parallel a. Il-mudell interlingwistiku propost juża BLSTM komuni li jippermetti t-trasferiment tal-għarfien minn lingwi oħra, u BLSTMs privati għal rappreżentazzjonijiet speċifiċi għall-lingwa. Il-mudell translingwistiku huwa mħarreġ bit-taħriġ lingwistiku-avversarju u l-immudellar bidirezzjonali tal-lingwa bħala objettivi awżiljarji biex tirrappreżenta a ħjar l-informazzjoni ġenerali lingwistika filwaqt li ma titlifx l-informazzjoni dwar lingwa fil-mira speċifika. Meta nivvalutaw fuq settijiet ta’ dejta POS minn 14-il lingwa fil-korpus Universal Dependencies, nuru li l-mudell propost ta’ tagħlim tat-trasferiment itejjeb il-prestazzjoni tat-tikkettar POS tal-lingwi fil-mira mingħajr ma nisfruttaw l-ebda għarfien lingwistiku bejn il-lingwa tas-sors u l-lingwa fil-mira.', 'mn': 'Олон хэл шилжүүлэх сургалтын тухай POS-ийн загварын загварын суралцах нь үндсэн хэл болон зорилготой хэл хоорондын харилцааны талаар хэлний мэдлэг болон нөөц боломж хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид POS-ийн талаарх олон хэлний шилжүүлэлт суралцах загварыг параллел корпора шиг бага зэрэг бага зэрэг тэмдэглэх боломжгүй загварыг танилцуулдаг. Өөр хэл дээрх олон хэл загвар нь мэдлэгийг бусад хэл дээр шилжүүлэх боломжтой, хувийн БЛСТМ-г хэл дээр тодорхойлох боломжтой ижил БЛСТМ хэрэглэдэг. Хөгжлийн загвар нь хэл-эсрэг суралцах болон хоёр дасгал хэл загварын загварын загвар нь хэлний ерөнхий мэдээллийг илүү сайн илэрхийлэх зорилго болгож, тодорхой загварын хэлний тухай мэдээллийг алдахгүй байдаг. Дэлхийн хамааралтай Корпус-ын 14 хэлний POS өгөгдлийн сургуулиудыг үнэлэхээр бид санал өгсөн шилжүүлэх загварын загвар нь зориулагдсан хэл болон зориулагдсан хэл хоорондын хэл болон хэл хоорондын хэл мэдлэгийг ашиглахгүйгээр POS-ын үйл ажиллаг', 'no': 'Øving av eit POS-merkingsmodul med læring av krysspråksomføringar krev vanlegvis linguistisk kunnskap og ressursar om forholdet mellom kjeldespråket og målspråket. I denne papiret introduserer vi eit læringsmodell for cross-language transfer for POS-merking utan ancillary ressursar som parallell korpora. Den foreslåde krysspråksmodellen brukar ein felles BLSTM som tillater kunnskap overføring frå andre språk, og private BLSTMs for språkspesifikante representasjonar. Krysspråk-modellen er trent med språk-adversarial opplæring og bidireksjonal språk-modellering som hjelpemål for å betre representera språk-generell informasjon mens ikkje mistar informasjon om eit spesifikke målspråk. Å evaluerer POS-datasett frå 14 språk i den universele avhengighetskorpusen, viser vi at den foreslåde underlæringsmodellen forbedrar POS-merkinga av målspråket utan å bruka nokon lingvisk kunnskap mellom kjeldespråket og målspråket.', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്ലിങ്കല്\u200d മാറ്റാന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പോഎസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണയായി ഉറവിട ഭാഷയും ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയും തമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, പോഎസ് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങിന് പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ക്രിസ്ല്ലാന്\u200dഗ്രാന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ് പോസ്റ്റ് ഗ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്രില്\u200dഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മറ്റു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനും സ്വകാര്യ ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിസ്സിനും ഭാഷ പ ക്രിസ്ലാങ്കുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഭാഷ- എതിരാളിയുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d മാതൃകയിലുള്ള ഉപദേശങ്ങള്\u200d ക പോഎസ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും 14 ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷകളുടെ ലക', 'pl': 'Szkolenie modelu tagowania POS z uczeniem się transferu wielojęzycznego zazwyczaj wymaga wiedzy językowej i zasobów na temat relacji między językiem źródłowym a językiem docelowym. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy wielojęzyczny model uczenia się transferu dla tagowania POS bez dodatkowych zasobów, takich jak korpusy równoległe. Proponowany model wielojęzyczny wykorzystuje wspólny BLSTM umożliwiający transfer wiedzy z innych języków oraz prywatne BLSTM dla reprezentacji specyficznych dla języka. Model wielojęzyczny jest trenowany przy użyciu szkolenia językowo-przeciwnego i dwukierunkowego modelowania języka jako celów pomocniczych, aby lepiej reprezentować ogólne informacje językowe przy jednoczesnym nie traceniu informacji o konkretnym języku docelowym. Oceniając zbiory danych POS z 14-tych języków w korpusie Uniwersalnych zależności, pokazujemy, że proponowany model nauki transferowej poprawia wydajność tagowania POS języków docelowych bez wykorzystania jakiejkolwiek wiedzy językowej między językiem źródłowym a językiem docelowym.', 'ro': 'Formarea unui model de etichetare POS cu învățare translingvă necesită, de obicei, cunoștințe lingvistice și resurse despre relația dintre limba sursă și limba țintă. În această lucrare, introducem un model de învățare translingvistică pentru etichetarea POS fără resurse auxiliare, cum ar fi corporele paralele. Modelul translingvistic propus utilizează un BLSTM comun care permite transferul de cunoștințe din alte limbi, și BLSTM private pentru reprezentări specifice limbii. Modelul translingvistic este instruit cu instruire lingvistică-adversară și modelare lingvistică bidirecțională ca obiective auxiliare pentru a reprezenta mai bine informațiile lingvistice generale, fără a pierde informațiile despre o anumită limbă țintă. Evaluând seturile de date POS din 14 limbi din corpul Dependențelor Universale, arătăm că modelul propus de transfer learning îmbunătățește performanța de etichetare POS a limbilor țintă fără a exploata cunoștințele lingvistice între limba sursă și limba țintă.', 'sr': 'Treniranje model a označavanja POS-a sa učenjem prevođenja jezika obično zahteva jezičko znanje i resurse o odnosu između izvornog jezika i ciljnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model preko jezika za učenje POS-a bez dodatnih resursa poput paralelne korpore. Predloženi krstojezički model koristi zajedničku BLSTM koja omogućava prenošenje znanja iz drugih jezika i privatnih BLSTM za predstavljanje jezika. Međujezički model je obučen sa obrazovanjem jezika-protivnika i modelovanjem jezika kao pomoćni ciljevi da bi bolje predstavljali informacije o jeziku-općem, a ne izgubili informacije o određenom jeziku. Procjenjujući podatke POS-a iz 14 jezika u Univerzalnoj zavisnosti korpusu, pokazujemo da je predloženi model učenja prijenosa poboljšao učinkovitost POS-a, a da ne iskoristimo bilo kakvo jezičko znanje između izvornog jezika i ciljnog jezika.', 'so': 'Sida caadiga ah barashada barashada luuqada iskuulka ah ee POS waxey inta badan u baahan yihiin aqoonta luuqada iyo resources ku saabsan xiriirka luqada iyo luqada waxqabadka. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa model waxbarashada barashada luuqadaha kala duwan ee POS tagida oo aan haysan hanti dheeraad ah sida shirkadda lambarka ah. Tusaale la soo jeeday oo luuqadaha kala duduwan wuxuu isticmaalaa BLSTM oo caadi ah, kaas oo awoodda in aqoonta laga soo wareejiyo luuqadaha kale, iyo tusaale ahaan BLSTMs oo gaar loo leeyahay in loo sameeyo noocyo cayiman oo luuqad ah. Tusaale luuqadaha kala duduwan waxaa lagu baraa waxbarasho ka gees ah luuqada iyo tusaale ahaan noocyada luuqada oo la xiriira, taas oo la mid ah maamulka macluumaadka guud ee luuqadda, iyadoon lumin macluumaadka ku saabsan luqada cayiman. Evaluating on POS datasets from 14 languages in the Universal Dependencies corpus, we show that the proposed transfer learning model improves the POS tagging performance of the target languages without exploiting any linguistic knowledge between the source language and the target language.', 'sv': 'Att utbilda en POS-taggmodell med translingual transfer learning kräver vanligtvis språkliga kunskaper och resurser om relationen mellan källspråket och målspråket. I den här uppsatsen introducerar vi en tvärspråkig överföringsinlärningsmodell för POS-märkning utan sidoresurser såsom parallella corpora. Den föreslagna flerspråkiga modellen använder en gemensam BLSTM som möjliggör kunskapsöverföring från andra språk, och privata BLSTM för språkspecifika representationer. Den flerspråkiga modellen är utbildad med språklig-kontradiktorisk utbildning och tvåriktad språkmodellering som hjälpmål för att bättre representera språkallmän information utan att förlora informationen om ett specifikt målspråk. Genom att utvärdera POS-datauppsättningar från 14 språk i Universal Dependences-korpusen visar vi att den föreslagna överföringsinlärningsmodellen förbättrar POS-märkningen av målspråken utan att utnyttja någon språklig kunskap mellan källspråket och målspråket.', 'si': 'POS ටැගින් මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්නේ විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය ඉගෙනගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට භාෂාවික දැනය සහ උපද මේ පැත්තට, අපි පොස් ටැග් කරන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂ භාෂාවක් මොඩේල් එක සමාන්\u200dය BLSTM එකක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම අනිත් භාෂාවල් වල විශේෂ භාෂාත්මක මොඩේල් එක්ක භාෂා-විරෝධික ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය සහ භාෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ භාෂාත්මක විශේෂ අරම ජාතික විශ්වාසික භාෂාව 14 වලින් POS දත්ත සෙට් වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව ඉගෙන', 'ta': 'மூலத்தின் மொழி மற்றும் இலக்க மொழிக்கும் இடையே தொடர்பு பற்றிய ஒரு POS குறியீட்டு மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்து வழக்கமாக மொழிமாற்ற இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு மொழி மொழி மாற்றி கற்ற மாதிரி முனையத்தை அறிவிக்கிறோம் போஸ் ஒட்டும் மாதிரியில் இணை கோர்போர பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி பொதுவான BLSTM பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அது மற்ற மொழிகளிலிருந்து அறிவு மாற்றும், மற்றும் தனிப்பட்ட BLSTMs மொழி மாதிரி பயிற்சியுடன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது மொழி- எதிரியான பயிற்சி மற்றும் பிரிவான மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி சிறப்பு ச மூலத்தின் மொழி மற்றும் இலக்கு மொழி', 'ur': 'ایک POS ٹاگنگ موڈل کی تعلیم کرسی زبان ترنسیٹ کی تعلیم کے ساتھ معمولاً زبان علم اور منابع کی ضرورت ہے سورج زبان اور موقع زبان کے درمیان رابطہ کے بارے میں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مختلف زبان ترنسفور کی تعلیم موڈل کو POS ٹاگ کے لئے پیش کریں گے جیسے مشابہ کورپور کے بغیر اور زیادہ سرمایہ کے۔ پیشنهاد کرس زبان کی مدل ایک مشترک BLSTM کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو دوسری زبانوں سے علم کا انتقال کرنا امکان دیتا ہے اور خصوصی BLSTMs زبان کے مطابق مخصوص نمونات کے لئے۔ کلاس زبان کی مدل کی زبان-مخالف تعلیم اور دوسری زبان کی مدل کے ساتھ تعلیم کی جاتی ہے کہ زبان-عمومی معلومات کو اچھی طرح دکھائے جاتے ہیں اور ایک خاص مولف زبان کے بارے میں معلومات ضائع نہیں کرتے۔ پوس ڈیٹ سٹ پر 14 زبانوں کی ارزیابی کرپوس کی ہے، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد ترنسیٹ سیکھنے کی مدل موجود کی موجود زبانوں کی POS ٹاگ کی فعالیت کو مزید پہنچاتا ہے بغیر کسی زبان علم کو سورس زبان اور موجود زبان کے درمیان استعمال نہیں کرتا۔', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha tillar tilida o'rganish modelini o'rganamiz, balki parallel kompaniya kabi o'zgarishni o'rganish mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan muloqat modeli boshqa tillardan илмni olib tashlash imkoniyatlaridan foydalanadi, va boshqa tildan foydalanish uchun shaxsiy BLSTMs. Name PoS maʼlumotlar tarkibini faqat qilish, Universal Dependency Corpusdagi 14 tillardan foydalanish modelini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, ilova qilingan o'rganishni o'rganish modeli foydalanishini foydalanishini ko'rsatamiz mumkin, manba tilida va qanday tilda hech qanday lugʻatni foydalanish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Đào tạo một mô hình bố trí kết vị bằng việc học qua ngôn ngữ truyền thông thường đòi hỏi kiến thức ngôn ngữ và nguồn lực về mối quan hệ giữa ngôn ngữ nguồn và ngôn ngữ đích. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ tạo ra một mô hình học chuyển nhượng ngôn ngữ khác nhau cho thẻ Vị trí mà không có nguồn lực hỗ trợ như là đồng minh. Các mô hình chung ngôn ngữ đề xuất sử dụng một kiểu NGSTM phổ biến để truyền đạt kiến thức từ các ngôn ngữ khác, và sandM riêng cho các biểu tượng ngôn ngữ. Kiểu ngôn ngữ trải rộng được đào tạo bằng giáo dục ngôn ngữ đối nghịch và thiết kế ngôn ngữ trực tiếp hỗ trợ để đại diện tốt hơn thông tin chung ngôn ngữ mà không bị mất đi thông tin về ngôn ngữ cụ thể. Đánh giá dữ liệu từ trường POS từ bảy ngôn ngữ trong tập đoàn Chuyên môn chung, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng mô hình học chuyển nhượng đã đề nghị cải thiện khả năng hiệu ứng của ngôn ngữ đích mà không cần phải khai thác kiến thức ngôn ngữ từ nguồn và ngôn ngữ đích.', 'bg': 'Обучението на модел за маркиране на ПОС с интерезично трансферно обучение обикновено изисква езикови знания и ресурси за връзката между езика на произход и целевия език. В тази статия представяме междуезичен модел за трансферно обучение за маркиране на ПОС без допълнителни ресурси като паралелни корпори. Предложеният междуезичен модел използва общ БЛСТМ, който позволява трансфер на знания от други езици, и частни БЛСТМ за специфични за езика представяния. Междуезичният модел се обучава с езиково-конкурентно обучение и двупосочно езиково моделиране като спомагателни цели за по-добро представяне на общата езикова информация, като същевременно не се губи информацията за конкретен целев език. Оценявайки наборите от данни на ПОС от 14 езика в корпуса "Универсални зависимости", ние показваме, че предложеният модел на трансферно обучение подобрява ефективността на маркирането на ПОС на целевите езици, без да използва никакви езикови познания между езика на изхода и целевия език.', 'da': 'Uddannelse af en POS tagging model med tværsproget transferlæring kræver normalt sproglig viden og ressourcer om forholdet mellem kildesproget og målsproget. I denne artikel introducerer vi en cross-lingual transfer learning model for POS tagging uden accessory ressourcer såsom parallelle corpora. Den foreslåede tværsprogede model bruger en fælles BLSTM, der muliggør overførsel af viden fra andre sprog, og private BLSTM til sprogspecifikke repræsentationer. Den tværsprogede model er trænet med sprog-modstander træning og bidirektionel sprogmodellering som hjælpemål for bedre at repræsentere sprog-generelle oplysninger uden at miste oplysningerne om et bestemt målsprog. Ved at evaluere POS datasæt fra 14 sprog i Universal Dependences korpus viser vi, at den foreslåede transfer learning model forbedrer POS tagging performance af målsprogene uden at udnytte nogen sproglig viden mellem kildesproget og målsproget.', 'nl': "Het trainen van een POS tagging model met crosslingual transfer learning vereist meestal taalkennis en middelen over de relatie tussen de brontaal en de doeltaal. In dit artikel introduceren we een cross-lingual transfer learning model voor POS tagging zonder bijkomende bronnen zoals parallelle corpora. Het voorgestelde cross-lingual model maakt gebruik van een gemeenschappelijk BLSTM dat kennisoverdracht vanuit andere talen mogelijk maakt, en privé BLSTM's voor taalspecifieke representaties. Het cross-lingual model is getraind met taal-tegenstrijdige training en bidirectionele taalmodellering als hulpdoelen om taal-algemene informatie beter te vertegenwoordigen zonder de informatie over een specifieke doeltaal te verliezen. Door te evalueren op POS datasets uit 14-talen in het Universal Dependencies corpus, laten we zien dat het voorgestelde transfer learning model de POS tagging prestaties van de doeltalen verbetert zonder enige taalkennis tussen de brontaal en de doeltaal te exploiteren.", 'hr': 'Obučavanje model a označavanja POS-a s učenjem prijenosnih jezika obično zahtijeva jezičke znanje i resurse o odnosu između izvornog jezika i ciljnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model prevođenja preko jezika za označavanje POS-a bez pomoćnih resursa poput paralelne korporacije. Predloženi krstojezički model koristi zajedničku BLSTM koja omogućava prenošenje znanja iz drugih jezika i privatne BLSTMs za predstavljanje jezika. Međujezički model je obučen s obrazovanjem jezika-protivnika i modelovanjem jezika kao pomoćni ciljevi za bolje predstavljanje općih jezičkih informacija dok ne izgubi informacije o određenom ciljnom jeziku. Procjenjivanje podataka POS-a iz 14 jezika u Univerzalnoj zavisnosti korpusu pokazujemo da je predloženi model učenja prijenosa poboljšao provedbu POS-a označavanja ciljnih jezika bez iskoristavanja bilo kakvih jezičkih znanja između izvornog jezika i ciljnog jezika.', 'id': 'Latihan model tagging POS dengan belajar transfer saling bahasa biasanya membutuhkan pengetahuan bahasa dan sumber daya tentang hubungan antara bahasa sumber dan bahasa sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model pembelajaran transfer saling bahasa untuk tagging POS tanpa sumber daya ancillary seperti corpora paralel. Model saling bahasa yang diusulkan menggunakan BLSTM yang umum yang memungkinkan transfer pengetahuan dari bahasa lain, dan BLSTM pribadi untuk representation spesifik bahasa. Model saling bahasa dilatih dengan pelatihan bahasa-musuh dan model bahasa bidireksi sebagai tujuan bantuan untuk mewakili lebih baik informasi umum bahasa sementara tidak kehilangan informasi tentang bahasa sasaran spesifik. Mengevaluasi dataset POS dari 14 bahasa di Universal Dependencies corpus, kami menunjukkan bahwa model transfer belajar yang diusulkan memperbaiki prestasi tagging POS bahasa sasaran tanpa mengeksploitasi pengetahuan bahasa antara bahasa sumber dan bahasa sasaran.', 'de': 'Das Training eines POS-Tagging-Modells mit crosslingualem Transferlernen erfordert in der Regel sprachliche Kenntnisse und Ressourcen über die Beziehung zwischen der Ausgangssprache und der Zielsprache. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein sprachübergreifendes Transfer-Lernmodell für POS-Tagging ohne zusätzliche Ressourcen wie parallele Korpora vor. Das vorgeschlagene crosslinguale Modell verwendet ein gemeinsames BLSTM, das den Wissenstransfer aus anderen Sprachen ermöglicht, und private BLSTMs für sprachspezifische Repräsentationen. Das crosslinguale Modell wird mit sprachlich-gegnerischem Training und bidirektionaler Sprachmodellierung als Hilfsziele trainiert, um sprachliche allgemeine Informationen besser darzustellen, ohne die Informationen über eine bestimmte Zielsprache zu verlieren. Durch die Auswertung von POS-Datensätzen aus 14-Sprachen im Korpus Universal Dependencies zeigen wir, dass das vorgeschlagene Transferlernmodell die POS-Tagging-Leistung der Zielsprachen verbessert, ohne dass linguistische Kenntnisse zwischen der Ausgangssprache und der Zielsprache ausgenutzt werden.', 'ko': '다중 언어 이동 학습을 통해 단어성 표기 모델을 훈련하려면 보통 원시 언어와 목표 언어 간의 관계에 대한 언어 지식과 자원을 필요로 한다.본고는 평행 어료 라이브러리 등 보조 자원이 필요 없는 어성 표기 다중 언어 이동 학습 모델을 소개했다.제시된 크로스 언어 모델은 통용되는 BLSTM을 이용했다. 이 BLSTM은 다른 언어의 지식 이동을 지원하고 개인 BLSTM은 특정 언어의 표현에 사용된다.다중 언어 모델은 언어 대항성 훈련과 양방향 언어 모델링을 보조 목표로 훈련하여 언어의 일반적인 정보를 더욱 잘 표현하고 특정 목표 언어의 정보를 잃지 않도록 한다.유니버설 의존 어료 라이브러리 중 14개 언어의 어성 데이터 집합에 대한 평가를 통해 우리는 제시된 이동 학습 모델이 원시 언어와 목표 언어 사이의 어떠한 언어 지식도 이용하지 않는 상황에서 목표 언어의 어성 표기 성능을 향상시켰다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'آموزش مدل نقاشی POS با یادگیری انتقال زبان\u200cهای مختلف معمولاً نیاز به دانش زبان\u200cشناسی و منابع درباره ارتباط بین زبان منبع و زبان هدف است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل یادگیری متصل زبان برای یادگیری POS را معرفی می کنیم که بدون منابع اضافه مانند شرکت متصل است. مدل مختلف زبان پیشنهاد یک BLSTM مشترک را استفاده می\u200cکند که اجازه می\u200cدهد انتقال علم از زبان\u200cهای دیگر و BLSTMs خصوصی برای نمایش\u200cدهندگان مختلف زبان را اجازه می\u200cدهد. مدل متوسط زبان با تمرین زبان-دشمنی و مدل زبان\u200cهای دوتایی به عنوان هدف\u200cهای کمک برای بهتر نشان دادن اطلاعات ژنرال زبان در حالی که اطلاعات درباره زبان هدف خاص را از دست نمی\u200cدهد. با ارزیابی در مجموعه داده\u200cهای POS از ۱۴ زبان در مجموعه اعتمادی جهانی، نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل تحلیل پیشنهاد تحلیل کردن مدل تحلیل POS فعالیت یادگیری از زبانهای هدف را بدون استفاده از هیچ دانش زبانی بین زبان منبع و زبان هدف بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'tr': "Çapraz dil transfers öwrenmegi bilen POS taýýarlama nusgasyny adatça dil bilen we maksadyň arasyndaky baglanmagy barada gerek bolýar. Bu kagyzda, paralel korpora ýaly POS üçin çarpaz dil öwrenmek nusgasyny tanyşdyrýarys. Öň teklip eden cross-dil nusgasy başga dillerden bilgi aktarmagyny we özi BLSTM dillerden a ýratyn surat üçin ullanýar. Çapraz dil nusgasy dil-täsirli okuw bilen we adaty dil nusgasy bilen kömek maksady bolup dil umumy maglumaty gowy görkezmek üçin bilim sistemasy bilen okalýar. Universal Dependencies Korpusyň 14 dilinden POS veri setirlerini çykyp bilmek üçin, biz munyň teklip eden öwrenme modeliniň maksady dilleriniň arasynda hiç hili dil bilen ulanmadyk bolsa POS'u etiketleýän zadyny görkeýäris.", 'sw': 'Kufundisha muundo wa kutuma ujumbe wa POS na kujifunza kwa lugha ya kusafirisha lugha mara nyingi unahitaji maarifa na rasilimali za lugha kuhusiana na uhusiano kati ya lugha ya asili na lugha inayolenga. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha modeli ya kujifunza kwa lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya viungo vya POS bila rasilimali za ziada kama vile kampuni inayofanana. Mradi wa lugha inayopendekezwa hutumia ujumla wa BLSTM ambao unawezesha kusambaza maarifa kutoka lugha nyingine, na binafsi wa BLSTMs kwa ajili ya uwakilishi maalum wa lugha. Mfano huu wa lugha unafundishwa na mafunzo yanayopinga lugha na mifano ya lugha ya kushindwa kama malengo ya ushirikiano zaidi kuwakilisha taarifa za lugha kwa ujumla wakati sio kupoteza taarifa kuhusu lugha fulani. Kutathmini taarifa za POS kutoka lugha 14 katika makampuni ya ulimwengu yanayotegemea, tunaonyesha kuwa modeli ya kuhamisha elimu inayopendekezwa inaboresha utendaji wa lugha za POS kwa lengo hilo bila kutumia maarifa yoyote ya lugha ya lugha kati ya lugha ya chanzo na lugha inayolenga.', 'af': "Onderwysing van 'n POS merking model met kruistale oordrag leer is gewoonlik gewoonlik linguistiese kennis en hulpbronne oor die verwanting tussen die bron taal en die doel taal. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n kruistale oordrag onderwerp model vir POS-etiket sonder ancillary hulpbronne soos parallele korpora. Die voorgestelde kruistale model gebruik 'n gemeenskaplike BLSTM wat kennis oordrag van ander tale, en privaat BLSTM vir taal spesifieke voorstellings. Die kruistale model is opgelei met taal-teëstandaar opvoering en bidireksjonale taal modellering as hulpdoel om taal-algemene inligting te verteenwoordig terwyl nie die inligting oor 'n spesifieke doel taal verloor nie. Ons wys dat die voorgestelde oordragmodel van die POS-datastel van 14 tale in die Universele afhanklikheid korpus verbeter die POS-etiketting van die doel tale sonder om enige lingwisiese kennis te gebruik tussen die bron taal en die doel taal.", 'am': 'የPOS tagging model በመስመር ቋንቋ ለመለወጥ በተለየ ቋንቋ ትምህርት በተቃውሞ የቋንቋዊ እውቀትና ሀብት በመጠቀም ቋንቋ እና በተቃውሞ ቋንቋ መካከል ግንኙነት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተማሪ ሞዴል እንደተለያዩ ኮርፖርት ያለ የጥቅረት ሀብት ሳይኖር የፖএস ተማሪዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ሞዴል እውቀትን ከሌሎች ቋንቋዎች እንዲለወጥ እና የብልሆች የBLSTMs ለቋንቋ-specific መልዕክቶች የሚቻል BLSTM የተለየ ትዕዛዝ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ሞዴል በተቃዋሚ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ትምህርት እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማሳየት የተጠቃሚ አቃራቢ የቋንቋ-general መረጃዎችን ለማሳየት በተለየ ጉዳዩ ቋንቋ ላይ መረጃዎችን ሳያሳስቱ ነው፡፡ በዩንቨርስቲ ድጋፍ ካርፓስ ውስጥ የPOS ዳታተሮችን በ14 ቋንቋዎች ላይ በማሳየፍ፣ በተዘጋጀው የተማረ ምርምር ሞዴል በቋንቋዎች መካከል ቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና በተቃውሞ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ምንም የቋንቋ እውቀት ሳይጠቀም የPOS ማቀናጃ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Կարիք ունի լեզվաբանական գիտելիք և ռեսուրսներ աղբյուր լեզվի և նպատակային լեզվի հարաբերության մասին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք POS-ի նշանների փոխանցման լեզվով սովորելու մոդել առանց օգտակար ռեսուրսների, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ զուգահեռ կապորան: The proposed cross-lingual model utilizes a common BLSTM that enables knowledge transfer from other languages, and private BLSTMs for language-specific representations.  Երկու ուղղությամբ լեզվի մոդելը կրթություն է ստանում լեզվի հակառակյալ կրթությամբ և երկու ուղղությամբ լեզվի մոդելների միջոցով որպես օգնական նպատակներ ավելի լավ ներկայացնել լեզվի ընդհանուր տեղեկատվությունը, չկորցնելով Ագնահատելով POS-ի տվյալների համակարգերը Universal Depndenties Corpus-ի 14 լեզուներից, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ առաջարկած փոխանցման ուսուցման մոդելը բարելավում է POS-ի նշանների արտադրողականությունը առանց օգտագործելու ցանկացած լեզվաբանական գիտելիք աղբյուր լեզու և նշանակալի լեզու', 'az': "√áift dil √∂yr…ônm…ôsi il…ô POS etik modelini t…ôhsil etm…ôk …ôslind…ô dill…ôrin elmi v…ô kaynaqlarńĪn m…ônb…ô dili il…ô m…ôqs…ôd dili arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪ haqqńĪnda m…ôlumat lazńĪmdńĪr. Bu kańüńĪzda, paralel korpora kimi, POS etiketi √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox dil √∂yr…ônm…ô modelini tanńĪyńĪrńĪq. Bu t…ôblińü edil…ôn √ßox dilli modell…ôr baŇüqa dill…ôrd…ôn elm almasńĪnńĪ v…ô dill…ôrin m√ľ…ôyy…ôn t…ôrzl…ôrin…ô √∂zl…ôrini g√∂st…ôrm…ôsini sańülayan m√ľxt…ôlif BLSTM istifad…ô edir. Bu √ßox dil modeli dil-d√ľŇüm…ôn√ßilik t…ôhsil v…ô dil modell…ôri t…ôhsil edir ki, dil-genel m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ daha yaxŇüńĪ g√∂st…ôrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, m…ôqs…ôdil dili haqqńĪnda m…ôlumatlarńĪ yoxdur. Universal Dependencies corpus'un 14 dilind…ôki POS veri qurńüularńĪnńĪn deńüerlendirm…ôsini g√∂st…ôrdik ki, t…ôklif edilmiŇü transfer √∂yr…ônm…ô modeli m…ôqs…ôd dill…ôrinin POS etiketl…ôrinin performansńĪnńĪ m…ônb…ô dili v…ô m…ôqs…ôd dili arasńĪnda he√ß bir dil bilgisini istifad…ô etm…ôd…ôn d…ôyiŇüdirir.", 'bn': 'পোএস ট্যাগিং মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার সাধারণত ভাষা ও লক্ষ্যভাষার মধ্যে সম্পর্ক সম্পর্ক সম্পর্কের জন্য ভাষাগত জ্ঞান ও সম্পদের প্রয়োজন। In this paper, we introduce a cross-lingual transfer learning model for POS tagging without ancillary resources such as parallel corpora.  প্রস্তাবিত ক্রিভাষাভাষী মডেল ব্যবহার করে একটি সাধারণ বিএলস্টিম ব্যবহার করে যা অন্য ভাষা থেকে জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করতে সক্ষম হয় এবং ব্যক্তিগত বিএল ক্রাশ-ভাষার মডেল ভাষার বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ এবং বিদ্রোহীত ভাষার মডেল হিসেবে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়, যেখানে ভাষার সাধারণ তথ্য প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভর কর্পাসের ১৪ ভাষা থেকে পোএস ডাটাসেট সম্পর্কে মূল্যায়ন করা হচ্ছে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রস্তাবিত শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের মডেল পোস ট্যাগিং ভাষার কার', 'bs': 'Obučavanje model a označavanja POS-a sa učenjem preko jezika potrebno je jezičko znanje i resurse o odnosu između izvornog jezika i ciljnog jezika. U ovom papiru predstavljamo model prevođenja preko jezika za označavanje POS-a bez pomoćnih resursa poput paralelnog korporacije. Predloženi krstojezički model koristi zajedničku BLSTM koja omogućava prenošenje znanja iz drugih jezika i privatnih BLSTM za predstavljanje jezika. Međujezički model je obučen s jezikom-adversarnim treningama i dvodirektivnim jezikom kao pomoćni ciljevi da bolje predstavljaju informacije o jeziku-općem, a ne gube informacije o specifičnom jeziku. Procjenjivanje podataka POS-a iz 14 jezika u Univerzalnoj zavisnosti korpusu pokazujemo da je predloženi model učenja prijenosa poboljšao učinkovitost POS-a označavanje učinka ciljnih jezika bez iskoristavanja bilo kakvih jezičkih znanja između izvornog jezika i ciljnog jezika.', 'sq': 'Trenimi i modelit të etiketave POS me mësimin e transferimit ndërgjuhësor zakonisht kërkon njohuri gjuhësore dhe burime rreth lidhjes midis gjuhës burimore dhe gjuhës objektive. In this paper, we introduce a cross-lingual transfer learning model for POS tagging without ancillary resources such as parallel corpora.  Modeli ndërgjuhësor i propozuar përdor një BLSTM të përbashkët që lejon transferimin e njohurive nga gjuhë të tjera dhe BLSTM private për përfaqësime specifike gjuhësh. Modeli ndërgjuhësor është trajnuar me trainimin kundërshtar gjuhës dhe modelimin dy-drejtues të gjuhës si objektiva ndihmëse për të përfaqësuar më mirë informacionin e përgjithshëm gjuhës duke mos humbur informacionin rreth një gjuhë specifike objektiv. Duke vlerësuar grupet e të dhënave POS nga 14 gjuhë në Korpus të Varësive Universale, ne tregojmë se modeli i propozuar i mësimit të transferimit përmirëson performancën e etiketave POS të gjuhëve objektive pa shfrytëzuar ndonjë njohuri gjuhësore midis gjuhës burimore dhe gjuhës objektive.', 'cs': 'Školení modelu značení POS s učením více jazyků obvykle vyžaduje jazykové znalosti a zdroje o vztahu mezi zdrojovým jazykem a cílovým jazykem. V tomto článku představujeme model výuky mezi jazyky pro POS tagování bez doplňkových zdrojů, jako jsou paralelní korpusy. Navržený cross-jazyčný model využívá běžný BLSTM, který umožňuje přenos znalostí z jiných jazyků, a soukromý BLSTM pro jazykově specifické reprezentace. Křížový model je trénován s jazykově-adversariálním školením a obousměrným jazykovým modelováním jako pomocnými cíli pro lepší reprezentaci jazykově obecných informací a přitom neztrácejí informace o konkrétním cílovém jazyce. Na základě hodnocení POS datových sad ze 14-jazyků v korpusu Universal Dependences ukazujeme, že navržený model transferového učení zlepšuje výkon POS tagování cílových jazyků bez využití jazykových znalostí mezi zdrojovým jazykem a cílovým jazykem.', 'et': 'POS märgistusmudeli koolitamine keeleülese ülekande õppega nõuab tavaliselt keeleoskusi ja ressursse lähtekeele ja sihtkeele vahelise seose kohta. Käesolevas töös tutvustame keeleülest siirdeõppe mudelit POS märgistamiseks ilma lisaressurssideta, näiteks paralleelkorporatsioonideta. Kavandatud keeleülene mudel kasutab ühist BLSTM-i, mis võimaldab teadmiste edastamist teistest keeltest, ja privaatset BLSTM-i keelespetsiifiliste esinduste jaoks. Keeleülest mudelit koolitatakse keeleülese koolituse ja kahesuunalise keele modelleerimise abieesmärkidena, et paremini esindada keeleüldist teavet, ilma et see kaotaks teavet konkreetse sihtkeele kohta. Hinnates universaalse sõltuvuse korpuse 14 keele POS andmekogumeid, näitame, et kavandatud siirdeõppe mudel parandab sihtkeelte POS sildistamise tulemuslikkust, kasutamata ära mingeid keeleoskusi lähtekeele ja sihtkeele vahel.', 'fi': 'POS-tunnistemallin kouluttaminen monikielisellä siirtooppimisella vaatii yleensä kielellistä tietoa ja resursseja lähdekielen ja kohdekielen välisestä suhteesta. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme monikielisen siirtooppimisen mallin POS-tunnisteiden merkintään ilman lisäresursseja, kuten rinnakkaisia korpusia. Ehdotetussa monikielisessä mallissa hyödynnetään yhteistä BLSTM:ää, joka mahdollistaa tiedon siirron muilta kieliltä, ja yksityisiä BLSTM:iä kielikohtaisiin esityksiin. Kieltenvälistä mallia koulutetaan kieli-vastakkainasettelulla ja kaksisuuntaisella kielimallinnuksella aputavoitteina, jotta voidaan paremmin esittää kieliyleistä tietoa menettämättä tietoa tietystä kohdekielestä. Arvioimalla 14 kielen POS-aineistoja Universaaliset riippuvuudet -korpusessa osoitetaan, että ehdotettu siirtooppimismalli parantaa kohdekielten POS-tunnisteiden suorituskykyä hyödyntämättä lähdekielen ja kohdekielen välistä kielitaitoa.', 'ca': "Formar un model d'etiqueta POS amb aprenentatge translingüístic requereix coneixement lingüístic i recursos sobre la relació entre el llenguatge d'origen i el llenguatge d'objectiu. In this paper, we introduce a cross-lingual transfer learning model for POS tagging without ancillary resources such as parallel corpora.  El model translingüístic proposat utilitza un BLSTM comú que permet la transfer ència del coneixement d'altres llengües, i BLSTM privats per representacions específices de llengües. El model translingüístic està entrenat amb formació adversaria lingüística i modelació bidireccional de llenguatges com objectius auxiliars per representar millor la informació general del llenguatge sense perdre la informació sobre un llenguatge específic. Evaluant els conjunts de dades POS de 14 llengües del Corpus Universal Dependencies, demostram que el model d'aprenentatge proposat de transfer ència millora el rendiment de l'etiqueta POS de les llengües alvo sense aprofitar cap coneixement lingüístic entre el llenguatge d'origen i el llenguatge alvo.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, kita mulai model kuwi nggawe luwih dumaten kanggo nggawe gerakan SMS kuwi nggawe pawaran liyane Laptop" and "Desktop model karo akeh-lengkang telas telas karo nggawe luwih-pakan karo pawang-pakan karo alêr-pakan kuwi tindang kuwi tindang kuwi duluran kanggo meh bantuan ipun kesempatan kanggo langa-jenengan kuwi mau. Ngawe nggunakake data sing nggawe nang 14 bangsa ning cara-cara Universal', 'ha': "Kuma a kõre wani motel na tagogi na PS da aka saka shifo cikin harshen tsohon, yana da amfani da ilmi da resource a cikin harshen na'ura a bayan haɗi tsakanin harshen source da harshen wanda aka yi amfani da. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wata motel mai motsi da aka sanar da shi cikin linguin-na-ƙaranci wa shirin PoS kuma bã da rasilimali bakwai kamar shirin sami. @ info: whatsthis An sanar da shirin misalin harshe mai motsi da harshe na tsohon-harshe kuma ana sami motsi da misalin harshe na daban-duranci kamar abubuwa masu inganci da za'a yi amfani da shi dõmin ya nuna ma'anar-lugha-jumla da kuma ba ya ɓace information about lugha na ƙayyade. Ana iya ƙayyade tsarin maɓallin PoS daga harshen 14 cikin lingui na Universal Debugarin Aiki, ko, munã nuna cewa shirin motsi da aka buƙata in motsi da ake amfani da shi, ya ƙari tsarin tagogi na PSS da harshen masu amfani da kuma bã ya yin amfani da wani ilmi na harshe tsakanin lugha na farko da lugha wanda ake amfani da.", 'he': 'אימון מודל תווים POS עם לימוד העברת שפתיים בדרך כלל דורש ידע שפתי ומשאבים על היחסים בין שפת המקור לשפת המטרה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מודל למידה של העברה לשפתיים לציוד POS ללא משאבים עזריים כמו גופרה מקבילה. The proposed cross-lingual model utilizes a common BLSTM that enables knowledge transfer from other languages, and private BLSTMs for language-specific representations.  מודל השפה הצלבית מאומן באימונים לשפה-יריבי ומודל שפה שתיים כיוונים נוספים כדי לייצג טוב יותר מידע שפה כללי בזמן שלא לאבד את המידע על שפה המטרה מסוימת. בהערכה על קבוצות נתונים POS מ-14 שפות בקורפוס הינברסלי תלויות, אנו מראים שהמודל ההעברה המוצע משפר את ביצועי התג POS של שפות המטרה מבלי לנצל כל ידע שפותי בין שפת המקור לשפת המטרה.', 'sk': 'Usposabljanje modela označevanja POS z medjezičnim učenjem prenosa običajno zahteva jezikovno znanje in vire o odnosu med izvornim jezikom in ciljnim jezikom. V tem prispevku predstavljamo model medjezičnega prenosnega učenja za označevanje POS brez pomožnih virov, kot so vzporedni korpusi. Predlagani medjezični model uporablja skupni BLSTM, ki omogoča prenos znanja iz drugih jezikov, in zasebni BLSTM za jezikovne predstavitve. Medjezični model se usposablja z jezikovno-kontradiktorskim usposabljanjem in dvosmernim modeliranjem jezika kot pomožnim ciljem za boljšo predstavitev splošnih jezikovnih informacij, pri čemer ne izgublja informacij o določenem ciljnem jeziku. Ocenjujemo nabore podatkov POS iz 14 jezikov v korpusu Univerzalne odvisnosti in pokažemo, da predlagani model transfernega učenja izboljšuje učinkovitost označevanja POS ciljnih jezikov brez izkoriščanja jezikovnega znanja med izvornim jezikom in ciljnim jezikom.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གནས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་མཐུད་ཚད་དང་མཐུན་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་སྐུལ་ལས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་POS ཡི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག The proposed cross-lingual model uses a common BLSTM that enables knowledge transfer from other languages, and private BLSTMs for language-specific representations. སྐད་ཡིག ཡིག་ཆ་མཐུན་མཁན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་POS གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་འབ'}
{'en': 'Image Pivoting for Learning Multilingual Multimodal Representations', 'ar': 'تمحور الصورة لتعلم التمثيلات متعددة اللغات', 'es': 'Imagen pivotante para el aprendizaje de representaciones multimodales multilingües', 'pt': 'Pivotagem de imagens para aprender representações multimodais multilíngues', 'fr': "Pivotement d'image pour l'apprentissage de représentations multimodales", 'ja': '多言語マルチモーダル表現を学習するための画像ピボット', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी बहुआयामी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए छवि Pivoting', 'zh': '学多言多模态象旋转', 'ru': 'Поворот изображения для изучения многоязычных мультимодальных представлений', 'ga': 'Íomhá Pivoting chun Foghlama Léirithe Ilmhódúla Ilteangacha', 'ka': 'Multilingual Multimodal Representations for Learning Image Pivoting', 'el': 'Η εικόνα περιστρέφεται για την εκμάθηση πολύγλωσσων πολυμεταφορικών αντιπροσωπειών', 'hu': 'Image Pivoting for Learning Többnyelvű multimodális képviseletek', 'it': "Immagine pivotante per l'apprendimento Multilingue Rappresentanze Multimodali", 'kk': 'Көптеген көптеген көптеген кескіндерді үйрену', 'lt': 'Paveikslėlių rinkimas mokymosi daugiakalbėse daugiakalbėse atstovybėse', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pemutaran Imej untuk Belajar Perwakilan Multimodal Berbahasa', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഇമേജ് പിവോട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Pivoting tal-Immaġni għat-Tagħlim ta’ Rappreżentazzjonijiet Multimodali Multilingwi', 'mn': 'Олон хэл хэл суралцах зураг', 'no': 'Biletbytering for å læra fleirspråk multimodal representasjonar', 'ro': 'Imagine pivotantă pentru învățare Reprezentanțe Multimodale Multilingve', 'so': 'Codsiga sawiridda waxbarashada luuqadaha badan', 'pl': 'Obraz Pivoting dla uczenia się wielojęzycznych reprezentacji multimodalnych', 'sr': 'Pivotiranje slika za učenje multijezičkih multimodalnih predstavljanja', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ඉගෙනගන්න පින්තූර', 'ur': 'Multilingual Multimodal Representations for Learning Image Pivoting', 'sv': 'Bild Pivoting för lärande Flerspråkiga multimodala representationer', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கான பிம்பத் தேர்வு செய்தல்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ hình khai thác giáo dục đa ngôn ngữ', 'nl': 'Image Pivoting voor het leren van meertalige multimodale vertegenwoordigingen', 'bg': 'Обръщане на изображения за изучаване на многоезични мултимодални представителства', 'hr': 'Pivotiranje slike za učenje multijezičkih multimodalnih predstavljanja', 'da': 'Image Pivoting for Learning Flersprogede multimodale repræsentationer', 'de': 'Image Pivoting für Learning Multilingual Multimodal Representations', 'id': 'Image Pivoting for Learning Multilingual Multimodal Representations', 'fa': 'تصویر تصویر برای یادگیری نمایش\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cها', 'ko': '다중 언어 다중 모드 표시를 배우는 데 사용되는 이미지 회전', 'sw': 'Picha ya kupiga kura kwa ajili ya kujifunza maoni mengi ya lugha nyingi', 'af': 'Beeld Pivoting vir leer van veelvuldige multimodale voorstellings', 'tr': 'Çoklu diller öwrenmek üçin Resim Pivoting', 'sq': 'Picture Pivoting for Learning Multilingual Multimodal Representations', 'am': 'የምስል ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': '칂oxlu dil 칞oxlu m칬vzular 칬yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n r톛smi Pivoting', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধি শিখার জন্য ছবি পিভোট', 'et': 'Pildi pöördumine mitmekeelsete mitmeliigiliste esinduste õppimiseks', 'bs': 'Pivotiranje slike za učenje multijezičkih multimodalnih predstavljanja', 'ca': 'Image Pivoting for Learning Multilingual Multimodal Representations', 'cs': 'Image Pivoting pro vícejazyčné multimodální zastoupení', 'fi': 'Image Pivoting for Learning Multilingual Multimodal Representations', 'jv': 'Gambar PiVoting kanggo Ngerti Gambar Multimodal', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'sk': 'Slikovno vrtenje za učenje večjezičnih multimodalnih predstavništev', 'he': 'צינור תמונות ללמוד מייצגות רבות שפות', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་བསུབ་པའི་བརྗོད་རིས་འདྲ་བྱེད་པར་གཟུགས་རིས་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'In this paper we propose a model to learn multimodal multilingual representations for matching images and sentences in different languages, with the aim of advancing multilingual versions of image search and image understanding. Our model learns a common representation for images and their descriptions in two different languages (which need not be parallel) by considering the image as a pivot between two languages. We introduce a new pairwise ranking loss function which can handle both symmetric and asymmetric similarity between the two modalities. We evaluate our models on image-description ranking for German and English, and on semantic textual similarity of image descriptions in English. In both cases we achieve state-of-the-art performance.', 'ar': 'نقترح في هذا البحث نموذجًا لتعلم التمثيلات متعددة اللغات متعددة الوسائط لمطابقة الصور والجمل بلغات مختلفة ، بهدف تطوير الإصدارات متعددة اللغات للبحث عن الصور وفهم الصور. يتعلم نموذجنا تمثيلًا شائعًا للصور وأوصافها بلغتين مختلفتين (والتي لا يجب أن تكون متوازية) من خلال اعتبار الصورة كمحور بين لغتين. نقدم وظيفة خسارة الترتيب الزوجي الجديدة والتي يمكنها التعامل مع التشابه المتماثل وغير المتماثل بين الطريقتين. نقوم بتقييم نماذجنا بناءً على ترتيب وصف الصورة للألمانية والإنجليزية ، وعلى التشابه النصي الدلالي لوصف الصور باللغة الإنجليزية. في كلتا الحالتين نحقق أداء متطورًا.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um modelo para aprender representações multimodais multilíngues para combinar imagens e frases em diferentes idiomas, com o objetivo de avançar em versões multilíngues de busca de imagens e compreensão de imagens. Nosso modelo aprende uma representação comum para imagens e suas descrições em duas linguagens diferentes (que não precisam ser paralelas) considerando a imagem como um pivô entre duas linguagens. Introduzimos uma nova função de perda de classificação de pares que pode lidar com semelhanças simétricas e assimétricas entre as duas modalidades. Avaliamos nossos modelos no ranking de descrição de imagens para alemão e inglês e na similaridade textual semântica de descrições de imagens em inglês. Em ambos os casos, alcançamos um desempenho de última geração.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle pour apprendre les représentations multimodales multilingues pour faire correspondre des images et des phrases dans différentes langues, dans le but de faire progresser les versions multilingues de la recherche d'images et de la compréhension des images. Notre modèle apprend une représentation commune pour les images et leurs descriptions dans deux langues différentes (qui ne doivent pas nécessairement être parallèles) en considérant l'image comme un pivot entre deux langues. Nous introduisons une nouvelle fonction de perte de classement par paire qui peut gérer à la fois la similitude symétrique et asymétrique entre les deux modalités. Nous évaluons nos modèles sur la base du classement des descriptions d'images pour l'allemand et l'anglais, et sur la similitude textuelle sémantique des descriptions d'images en anglais. Dans les deux cas, nous atteignons des performances de pointe.", 'es': 'En este artículo proponemos un modelo para aprender representaciones multimodales multilingües para hacer coincidir imágenes y oraciones en diferentes idiomas, con el objetivo de avanzar en las versiones multilingües de búsqueda de imágenes y comprensión de imágenes. Nuestro modelo aprende una representación común de las imágenes y sus descripciones en dos idiomas diferentes (que no tienen por qué ser paralelos) al considerar la imagen como un eje entre dos idiomas. Presentamos una nueva función de pérdida de clasificación por pares que puede manejar la similitud simétrica y asimétrica entre las dos modalidades. Evaluamos nuestros modelos en el ranking de descripción de imágenes para alemán e inglés, y en la similitud textual semántica de las descripciones de imágenes en inglés. En ambos casos, logramos un rendimiento de vanguardia.', 'ja': '本稿では、画像検索と画像理解の多言語版を推進することを目的として、異なる言語の画像と文章をマッチングさせるための多言語表現を学習するモデルを提案する。私たちのモデルは、画像を2つの言語間のピボットと見なすことによって、2つの異なる言語（並列である必要はありません）での画像とその説明の共通表現を学習します。対称性と非対称性の両方を扱うことができる新しいペアワイズランキング損失関数を導入しました。私たちは、ドイツ語と英語の画像記述ランキングと、英語の画像記述のセマンティックテキストの類似性についてモデルを評価します。どちらの場合も、最先端のパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем модель для изучения мультимодальных многоязычных представлений для сопоставления изображений и предложений на разных языках с целью продвижения многоязычных версий поиска изображений и понимания изображений. Наша модель изучает общее представление изображений и их описания на двух разных языках (которые не обязательно должны быть параллельными), рассматривая изображение как поворот между двумя языками. Мы вводим новую функцию попарного ранжирования потерь, которая может обрабатывать как симметричное, так и асимметричное сходство между двумя модальностями. Мы оцениваем наши модели по ранжированию изображения-описания для немецкого и английского языков, а также по семантическому текстовому сходству описаний изображений на английском языке. В обоих случаях мы достигаем самых современных показателей.', 'zh': '于本文中,设一模以学多模态多言,以匹异言之象句,所以进图像搜求解多言本也。 吾形以象为二言之枢轴,以学象象之通用(不须并行)。 引入一新成对排名损函数,可以处两模态之间是非对称相似性。 吾以德语、英语之图言列名及英语之语义文本相似性以质吾模形。 此二者,皆得先进之性也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम छवि खोज और छवि समझ के बहुभाषी संस्करणों को आगे बढ़ाने के उद्देश्य से, विभिन्न भाषाओं में छवियों और वाक्यों के मिलान के लिए बहुआयामी बहुभाषी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल दो भाषाओं के बीच एक धुरी के रूप में छवि पर विचार करके दो अलग-अलग भाषाओं (जो समानांतर होने की आवश्यकता नहीं है) में छवियों और उनके विवरणों के लिए एक सामान्य प्रतिनिधित्व सीखता है। हम एक नया युग्मवार रैंकिंग हानि समारोह पेश करते हैं जो दो तौर-तरीकों के बीच सममित और असममित समानता दोनों को संभाल सकता है। हम जर्मन और अंग्रेजी के लिए छवि-विवरण रैंकिंग पर अपने मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और अंग्रेजी में छवि विवरण की शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता पर। दोनों ही मामलों में हम अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo molaimid múnla chun léirithe ilmhódacha ilteangacha a fhoghlaim chun íomhánna agus abairtí a mheaitseáil i dteangacha éagsúla, agus é mar aidhm aige leaganacha ilteangacha de chuardach íomhá agus tuiscint íomhá a chur chun cinn. Foghlaimíonn ár múnla léiriú comónta d’íomhánna agus a gcur síos in dhá theanga dhifriúla (nach gá a bheith comhthreomhar) trí bhreathnú ar an íomhá mar mhaighdeog idir dhá theanga. Tugaimid feidhm nua chaillteanais rangú pairwise isteach ar féidir léi cosúlacht siméadrach agus neamhshiméadrach idir an dá mhódúlacht a láimhseáil. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár múnlaí ar rangú íomhá-thuairiscí don Ghearmáinis agus don Bhéarla, agus ar chosúlacht théacsúil shéimeantach na gcur síos ar íomhánna i mBéarla. Sa dá chás bainimid feidhmíocht den scoth amach.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban egy modellt javasolunk a multimodális, többnyelvű reprezentációk elsajátítására a különböző nyelveken történő képek és mondatok összehangolására, azzal a céllal, hogy fejlessze a képkeresés és a képértés többnyelvű változatait. Modellünk megtanulja a képek és leírásaik közös ábrázolását két különböző nyelven (amelyeknek nem kell párhuzamosaknak lenniük) úgy, hogy a képet két nyelv közötti forgópontnak tekinti. Bevezetünk egy új páros rangsorolási veszteség függvényt, amely képes kezelni mind a szimmetrikus, mind az aszimmetrikus hasonlóságot a két mód között. Modelljeinket német és angol nyelvű képleírási rangsorolással, valamint angol nyelvű képleírások szemantikai szöveghasonlóságával értékeljük. Mindkét esetben korszerű teljesítményt érünk el.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο εκμάθησης πολυμέσων πολύγλωσσων αναπαραστάσεων για αντιστοίχιση εικόνων και προτάσεων σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες, με στόχο την προώθηση πολύγλωσσων εκδόσεων αναζήτησης εικόνων και κατανόησης εικόνας. Το μοντέλο μας μαθαίνει μια κοινή αναπαράσταση των εικόνων και των περιγραφών τους σε δύο διαφορετικές γλώσσες (οι οποίες δεν χρειάζεται να είναι παράλληλες) θεωρώντας την εικόνα ως στροφή μεταξύ δύο γλωσσών. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα ζεύγη συνάρτηση απώλειας που μπορεί να χειριστεί τόσο συμμετρική όσο και ασύμμετρη ομοιότητα μεταξύ των δύο μορφών. Αξιολογούμε τα μοντέλα μας στην κατάταξη εικόνας-περιγραφής για γερμανικά και αγγλικά, και στη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα κειμένων των περιγραφών εικόνας στα αγγλικά. Και στις δύο περιπτώσεις επιτυγχάνουμε απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მოვიწყებთ მოდელს, რომ მელტიმოდიალური მრავალური გამოსახულების გამოსახულებისთვის და სიტყვებისთვის განსხვავებული ენებისთვის შესაბამისათვის მელტი ენგური ვერსიების გარდაქ ჩვენი მოდელეში გამოსახულებისთვის და ისინი გამოსახულების გამოსახულება ორი განსხვავებული ენებისთვის (რომელიც არ უნდა იყოს პარალელელი) აღმოჩნენ გამოსახულება როგორც ორი ენების შორის ჩვენ ჩვენ შევაჩვენოთ ახალი პორიონტიკური პერიენტიკური პერიენტიკური ფუნქცია, რომელიც შეუძლია გამოყენება ორი მოდილიტების შორის სიმტერტიკური და აციმეტრი ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელების განსაზღვრება გერმანეთის და ინგლისური რენგენციის გამოსახულებაზე და სმენტიკური ტექსტური გამოსახულებაზე ინგლისური გამოსახულებაზე. ორივე შემთხვევაში ჩვენ მივიღეთ სახელსაწყისი კეთესტაციას.', 'it': "In questo articolo proponiamo un modello per imparare rappresentazioni multimodali multilingue per abbinare immagini e frasi in diverse lingue, con l'obiettivo di avanzare versioni multilingue di ricerca di immagini e comprensione delle immagini. Il nostro modello apprende una rappresentazione comune delle immagini e delle loro descrizioni in due lingue diverse (che non devono essere parallele) considerando l'immagine come un perno tra due lingue. Introducemo una nuova funzione di perdita di ranking pairwise che può gestire sia la somiglianza simmetrica che asimmetrica tra le due modalità. Valutiamo i nostri modelli sulla classificazione delle immagini in tedesco e inglese, e sulla somiglianza semantica testuale delle descrizioni delle immagini in inglese. In entrambi i casi raggiungiamo prestazioni all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome model į, pagal kurį mokytis daugiakalbių vaizdų ir sakinių derinimo skirtingomis kalbomis modelių, siekiant pažangos daugiakalbėse vaizdo paieškos ir vaizdo supratimo versijose. Mūsų modelis mokosi bendrai atstovauti vaizdus ir jų aprašymus dviem skirtingomis kalbomis (kurios neturi būti lygiagrečios), vertindamas vaizdą kaip dviejų kalbų kryptį. Įdiegiame naują dviejų rūšių nuostolių klasifikavimo funkciją, kuri gali valdyti ir simetrinį, ir asimetrinį abiejų rūšių panašumą. Vertiname savo modelius vokiečių ir anglų vaizdo aprašymo rangu ir semantiniu tekstiniu vaizdo aprašymų panašumu anglų kalba. In both cases we achieve state-of-the-art performance.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз кескіндерді іздеу мен кескіндерді түсіну үшін бірнеше тілде сәйкес келген кескіндерді мен сөйлемелерді бірнеше тілді нұсқаларының көп тілді нұсқаларын өзгерту үшін моделін ұсынамыз. Біздің үлгіміз кескіндерді және олардың сипаттамасын екі түрлі тілде (параллель емес) көрсетеді. Кескінді екі тіл арасындағы pivot ретінде қарастырады. Біз екі әдістер арасындағы симметриялық және асимметриялық ұқсас істей алатын жаңа жиі жоғалу функциясын таңдаймыз. Біз өзіміздің үлгілерімізді неміс мен ағылшын тілінде кескін сипаттамасының рейтинг және ағылшын тілінде кескін сипаттамасының семантикалық мәтіндік сипаттамасын Екі жағдайда біз әртүрлі жағдайды жеткіземіз.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami cadangkan model untuk belajar perwakilan berbilang-bahasa berbilang-modal untuk sepadan imej dan kalimat dalam bahasa berbeza, dengan tujuan untuk maju versi berbilang-bahasa pencarian imej dan pemahaman imej. Model kami belajar mewakili biasa bagi imej dan deskripsi mereka dalam dua bahasa yang berbeza (yang tidak perlu selari) dengan mempertimbangkan imej sebagai pivot antara dua bahasa. Kami memperkenalkan fungsi kehilangan rangkaian pasangan baru yang boleh menangani persamaan simetrik dan asimetrik antara kedua-dua modaliti. Kami menilai model kami pada rangkaian gambar-keterangan untuk Jerman dan Inggeris, dan pada persamaan tekstual semantik gambar-keterangan dalam bahasa Inggeris. Dalam kedua-dua kes kita mencapai prestasi terbaik.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник предложуваме модел за учење мултимодални мултијазични претставувања за споредување на слики и реченици на различни јазици, со цел напредување на мултијазичните верзии на пребарување на слики и разбирање на сликите. Нашиот модел научи заедничко претставување на сликите и нивните описи на два различни јазици (кои не мора да бидат паралелни) со сметање на сликата како врвот помеѓу двата јазици. Ние воведуваме нова функција на загуба на парови кои може да се справи со симетричната и асиметричната сличност помеѓу двете модели. Ги проценуваме нашите модели на рангирање на описот на сликите за германски и англиски, и семантична текстуална сличност на описите на сликите на англиски. In both cases we achieve state-of-the-art performance.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ചിത്രങ്ങളിലും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലും വാക്കുകളോടും പൊരുതുന്നതിനായി മൊട്ടല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മാതൃകയാണ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം  നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും അവരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രതിനിധിയും പഠിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ചിത്രം ഒരു പിവോ We introduce a new pairwise ranking loss function which can handle both symmetric and asymmetric similarity between the two modalities.  ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലെയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിന്റെയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെയും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെയും സെമാന്റിക്ക് ടെക്സ്കൂളിലെയും  രണ്ടു കാര്യങ്ങളിലും നമ്മള്\u200d കലാകാര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ അവസ്ഥ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi eit modell for å lære fleirspråk representasjonar for å passa med bilete og setningar på ulike språk, med målet å forstørra fleirspråk versjonar av søk og forstørring av bilete. Modellen vårt lærer eit felles representasjon for bilete og skildringane i to forskjellige språk (som treng ikkje vera parallelle) ved å sjå på biletet som ein pivot mellom to språk. Vi introduserer ein ny funksjon for tap på pare som kan handtera både symmetrisk og asymmetrisk liknande mellom dei to modulene. Vi evaluerer våre modeller på biletskrivelsesranking for tysk og engelsk, og på semantisk tekstulikhet på biletskrivelser på engelsk. I begge tilfeller oppnår vi tilstanden for kunsten.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model nauki multimodalnych wielojęzycznych reprezentacji dopasowywania obrazów i zdań w różnych językach, w celu rozwoju wielojęzycznych wersji wyszukiwania i rozumienia obrazów. Nasz model uczy się wspólnej reprezentacji obrazów i ich opisów w dwóch różnych językach (które nie muszą być równoległe), rozważając obraz jako przełącznik między dwoma językami. Wprowadzamy nową funkcję strat rankingowych, która może obsługiwać zarówno symetryczne, jak i asymetryczne podobieństwo między dwoma modalnościami. Nasze modele oceniamy na podstawie rankingu obrazu-opisu dla niemieckiego i angielskiego oraz semantycznego podobieństwa tekstowego opisów obrazów w języku angielskim. W obu przypadkach osiągamy najnowocześniejszą wydajność.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид зураг хайх болон зураг ойлгох олон хэлний хэлбэрийн олон хэлний үзүүлэлтийг сурах загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний загварын загвар зураг болон түүний тодорхойлолтыг хоёр өөр хэл дээр (параллел байх хэрэггүй) зураг хоёр хэл хоорондын хувьд тодорхойлолт гэж үздэг. Бид шинэ хоёр дагуулын алдагдлын функцийг танилцуулж байна. Энэ нь хоёр дагуулын хоорондох тэнцүү байдлыг хоёр дагуулж чадна. Бид Герман, Англи хэлний зураг тайлбарлах зохиолын загварыг үнэлэх, Англи хэлний зураг тайлбарлах төстэй төстэй хэлбэртэй. Хоёр тохиолдолд бид урлагийн үйл ажиллагаа хийдэг.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare propunem un model de învățare multimodală a reprezentărilor multilingve pentru potrivirea imaginilor și propozițiilor în diferite limbi, cu scopul de a avansa versiuni multilingve de căutare a imaginilor și înțelegere a imaginilor. Modelul nostru învață o reprezentare comună a imaginilor și descrierilor acestora în două limbi diferite (care nu trebuie să fie paralele) considerând imaginea ca un pivot între două limbi. Introducem o nouă funcție de clasificare pereche a pierderilor care poate gestiona atât similitudinea simetrică, cât și asimetrică între cele două modalități. Evaluăm modelele noastre pe clasamentul descrierii imaginilor în limba germană și engleză și pe similaritatea textuală semantică a descrierilor imaginilor în limba engleză. În ambele cazuri obținem performanțe de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo model da naučimo multimodalne multijezičke predstave za odgovarajuće slike i rečenice na različitim jezicima, sa ciljem unapređenja multijezičkih verzija pretraživanja i razumevanja slika. Naš model nauči zajedničku predstavu slika i njihovih opisa na dva različita jezika (koji ne trebaju biti paralelni) razmatrajući sliku kao pivot između dva jezika. Predstavljamo novu funkciju gubitka na parovima koja može da podnese simetričnu i asimetričku sličnost između dva modaliteta. Procjenjujemo naše modele o redovima opisa slika za njemački i engleski, i o semantičkoj tekstualnoj sličnosti opisa slika na engleskom jeziku. U oba slučaja postižemo predstavu umjetnosti.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en modell för att lära sig multimodala flerspråkiga representationer för att matcha bilder och meningar på olika språk, med målet att främja flerspråkiga versioner av bildsökning och bildförståelse. Vår modell lär sig en gemensam representation av bilder och deras beskrivningar på två olika språk (som inte behöver vara parallella) genom att betrakta bilden som en pivot mellan två språk. Vi introducerar en ny parvis ranking loss funktion som kan hantera både symmetrisk och asymmetrisk likhet mellan de två modaliteterna. Vi utvärderar våra modeller på bildbeskrivningsrapportering för tyska och engelska, samt på semantisk textlikhet mellan bildbeskrivningar på engelska. I båda fallen uppnår vi toppmoderna prestanda.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaan ku qornaa tusaale aan barno noocyo badan oo luuqado kala duduwan oo u eg sawirro iyo qoraalo kala duduwan, kaas oo la isku dayo inuu horumariyo warqado luuqado badan oo raadinta sawirka iyo waxgarashada sawirka. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu ku baranayaa muuqashada wadajirka ah oo ku qoran sawirada iyo qoraalkooda laba luqadood oo kala duduwan (taas oo aan loo baahnayn in la isku mid dhigo) marka aad sawirkaas u aragtid mid ku qoran labada luqadood. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa shaqo la'aan oo cusub oo labada nooc oo xil leh, kaas oo xambaaran kara isku mid ah labada qaab. Tusaalooyinkayada sawir sawir ah ee Jarmal iyo Ingiriis, iyo qoraalka sawirka sawirka oo la mid ah Ingiriis. In both cases we achieve state-of-the-art performance.", 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි මොඩොල්ල් එකක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වලට පින්තූර සහ වචනයක් සඳහා ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, පින් අපේ මොඩල් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා පින්තූර සහ ඔවුන්ගේ විවිධ භාෂාවක් දෙකක් තියෙන සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ විවිධිපත් අපි අළුත් ජෝමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සමාන්\u200dය සහ අසිමාන්\u200dය සමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න ප අපි පින්තූර විශ්වාස කරනවා ජර්මන් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සඳහා පින්තූර විශ්වාස කරනවා අපේ මොඩේල්ස් වගේ අවශ්\u200dයාත්මක දෙන්නම අවස්ථාවක් දෙන්නම අපිට තත්වයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் பல மொழிக்கான பிம்பங்கள் மற்றும் வாக்கியங்களை பொருத்துவதற்காக கற்றுக் கொள்ள ஒரு மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். பிம் பிம்பத்தை இரண்டு மொழிகளுக்கும் இடையே ஒரு பைவோட்டாக கருதுவதற்காக நம் மாதிரி பிம்பங்களுக்கும் மற்றும் அவற்றின் விவரிப்புகளுக்க நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஜோடி விளக்கமான இழப்பு செயல்பாடை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது இரண்டு வகைகளுக்கும் இடையே ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தலாம். நாம் ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கான பிம்ப விவரிப்பு வரிசையில் எங்கள் மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் பிம்பம் வி In both cases we achieve state-of-the-art performance.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nipproponu mudell biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet multimodali multilingwi għat-tqabbil tal-immaġni u s-sentenzi f’lingwi differenti, bil-għan li jiġu avvanzati verżjonijiet multilingwi tat-tiftix tal-immaġni u l-fehim tal-immaġni. Il-mudell tagħna jitgħallem rappreżentazzjoni komuni għall-immaġni u d-deskrizzjonijiet tagħhom f’żewġ lingwi differenti (li m’għandhomx għalfejn ikunu paralleli) billi titqies l-immaġni bħala punt ċentrali bejn żewġ lingwi. Aħna nintroduċu funzjoni ġdida ta’ telf ta’ klassifikazzjoni par-wise li tista’ timmaniġġja kemm similarità simetrika kif ukoll asimetrika bejn iż-żewġ modalitajiet. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudelli tagħna dwar il-klassifikazzjoni tad-deskrizzjoni tal-immaġni għall-Ġermaniż u l-Ingliż, u dwar similarità semantika testwali tad-deskrizzjonijiet tal-immaġni bl-Ingliż. Fiż-żewġ każijiet inkisbu prestazzjoni avvanzata.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ تصاویروں اور جماعتوں کے مطابق مختلف زبانوں میں مطابق ہونے کے لئے بہت سی زبان کے متعدد زبان کی تصاویر اور تصاویر سمجھنے کے بہت سی زبان کی نسخہ کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ ہماری مدل تصاویروں کے لئے اور ان کی توصیف دو مختلف زبانوں میں سکھائی جاتی ہے جو تصویر کو دو زبانوں کے درمیان پیوٹ سمجھتے ہیں۔ ہم نے ایک نئی جوڑی رقم خسارہ فعالیت کو معلوم کرتا ہے جو دونوں موجودات کے درمیان برابر اور برابر برابر ہے ہم اپنے نمونڈلوں کو جرمن اور انگلیسی کے لئے نمونڈلوں کا ارزش کررہے ہیں اور انگلیسی میں نمونڈلوں کی نمونڈلوں پر نمونڈلوں کا ارزش کررہے ہیں۔ دونوں قسموں میں ہم آهنگ کی حالت پر کامل ہوتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz rasm va so'zlar bilan mos keladigan rasmlar va so'zlarni bir xil tilda ko'plab tillar representarini o'rganish uchun modelni rivojlanamiz, rasm qidirish va rasm tushunishni ko'p tillar versiyasini oshirish uchun. Bizning modelimiz rasmlar uchun umumiy taʼminlovchi va ularning taʼriflarini ikki xil tillarda o'rganadi. Rasmni ikkita tillar orasidagi pivot sifatida o'ylab ko'rsatish mumkin. Biz ikki usullar orasidagi bir necha xil chegara qo'llangan funksiyatlarni ko'rib chiqaramiz. Bu ikkita usullar orasidagi symmetrik va asymmetrik bir xil shaklni boshqara oladi. Biz Olmon va ingliz tili tilida rasm taʼminlovchi modellarimizni qiymatimiz, va semantik textblik tilida rasm taʼriflariga o'xshash mumkin. Bu ikkita holatda, bu sananing holatini bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình để học các biểu tượng đa chiều, để khớp ảnh và câu ở các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, với mục đích phát triển các phiên bản đa dạng của việc tìm kiếm ảnh và hiểu hình ảnh. Mô hình của chúng tôi học một cách đại diện chung cho ảnh và mô tả của ảnh tại hai ngôn ngữ khác nhau (không cần phải song song) bằng cách xem ảnh như một trục trặc giữa hai ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hàm thua kép mới có thể xử lý sự giống nhau đối xứng và không đối xứng giữa hai phương thức. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu của chúng tôi về cấp độ mô tả ảnh cho Đức và Anh, và về nét chữ giống văn bản của mô tả ảnh bằng tiếng Anh. Trong cả hai trường hợp chúng ta đạt được màn trình diễn hiện đại.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме модел за изучаване на мултимодални многоезични изображения за съвпадение на изображения и изречения на различни езици, с цел напредване на многоезичните версии на търсенето на изображения и разбирането на изображения. Нашият модел научава общо представяне на изображенията и техните описания на два различни езика (които не е необходимо да бъдат успоредни), като разглежда изображението като пивот между два езика. Въвеждаме нова функция за загуба по двойки, която може да се справи както със симетрично, така и с асиметрично сходство между двете модали. Ние оценяваме нашите модели по класиране на изображение-описание за немски и английски език, както и по семантична текстова сходство на описанията на изображенията на английски език. И в двата случая постигаме най-съвременно изпълнение.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en model til at lære multimodale flersprogede repræsentationer til at matche billeder og sætninger på forskellige sprog, med det formål at fremme flersprogede versioner af billedsøgning og billedforståelse. Vores model lærer en fælles repræsentation af billeder og deres beskrivelser på to forskellige sprog (som ikke behøver være parallelle) ved at betragte billedet som et pivot mellem to sprog. Vi introducerer en ny parvis rangering tab funktion, som kan håndtere både symmetrisk og asymmetrisk lighed mellem de to modaliteter. Vi evaluerer vores modeller på billedbeskrivelses rangering for tysk og engelsk, og på semantisk tekstlighed af billedbeskrivelser på engelsk. I begge tilfælde opnår vi state-of-the-art performance.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een model voor om multimodale meertalige representaties te leren voor overeenkomende afbeeldingen en zinnen in verschillende talen, met als doel meertalige versies van beeldzoeken en beeldbegrip te bevorderen. Ons model leert een gemeenschappelijke weergave van afbeeldingen en hun beschrijvingen in twee verschillende talen (die niet parallel hoeven te zijn) door het beeld te beschouwen als een draaipunt tussen twee talen. We introduceren een nieuwe pairwise ranking loss functie die zowel symmetrische als asymmetrische gelijkenis tussen de twee modaliteiten aankan. We evalueren onze modellen op beeld-beschrijving rangschikking voor Duits en Engels, en op semantische tekstuele gelijkenis van beeldbeschrijvingen in het Engels. In beide gevallen bereiken we state-of-the-art prestaties.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo model naučiti multimodalne multijezičke predstave za odgovarajuće slike i rečenice na različitim jezicima, s ciljem unapređenja multijezičkih verzija pretraživanja i razumijevanja slika. Naš model uči zajedničku predstavu slika i njihovih opisa na dva različita jezika (koji ne trebaju biti paralelni) razmatrajući sliku kao pivot između dva jezika. Predstavljamo novu funkciju gubitka na parima koja može riješiti simetričnu i asimetričku sličnost između dva načina. Procjenjujemo naše modele o redovima opisa slika za njemački i engleski, i o semantičkoj tekstualnoj sličnosti opisa slika na engleskom jeziku. U oba slučaja postignemo stanje umjetnosti.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein Modell vor, um multimodale mehrsprachige Repräsentationen für die Übereinstimmung von Bildern und Sätzen in verschiedenen Sprachen zu lernen, mit dem Ziel, mehrsprachige Versionen der Bildsuche und des Bildverständnisses voranzutreiben. Unser Modell lernt eine gemeinsame Darstellung von Bildern und deren Beschreibungen in zwei verschiedenen Sprachen (die nicht parallel sein müssen), indem das Bild als Pivot zwischen zwei Sprachen betrachtet wird. Wir führen eine neue paarweise Rangfolgeverlustfunktion ein, die sowohl symmetrische als auch asymmetrische Ähnlichkeit zwischen den beiden Modalitäten handhaben kann. Wir evaluieren unsere Modelle auf Bildbeschreibungs-Rankings für Deutsch und Englisch sowie auf semantische Textähnlichkeit von Bildbeschreibungen in Englisch. In beiden Fällen erreichen wir Performance auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mengusulkan sebuah model untuk belajar representation multimodal multibahasa untuk cocok gambar dan kalimat dalam bahasa yang berbeda, dengan tujuan meningkatkan versi multibahasa pencarian gambar dan pemahaman gambar. Model kami belajar sebuah representation umum untuk gambar dan deskripsi mereka dalam dua bahasa yang berbeda (yang tidak perlu parallel) dengan mempertimbangkan gambar sebagai pivot antara dua bahasa. Kami memperkenalkan fungsi kehilangan berpasangan baru yang dapat menangani persamaan simetrik dan asimetrik antara kedua modalitas. Kami mengevaluasi model kami pada peringkat gambar-deskripsi untuk Jerman dan Inggris, dan pada persamaan tekstual semantis gambar deskripsi dalam bahasa Inggris. Dalam kedua kasus kita mencapai pertunjukan terbaik.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda suratlary we sözleri eşidmek üçin multimodal köp dilli suratlary öwrenmek üçin bir nusga teklip edip otyrýarys. Resim arama we surat düşürmek üçin birnäçe dilli wersiýalary geliştirmek üçin. Biziň modelimiz suratlar üçin orta surat we olaryň tassymlaryny iki dürli dilde (parallel bolmaly däldir) suraty iki dil arasynda pivot diýip düşünerek öwrenýär. Biz yeni çift derece kaybetme fonksiyonunu tanıtıyoruz ki iki modalitet arasında hem simetrik hem de asymetrik bir benzeri çözebilir. Biz modellerimizi nemes we iňlis dilinde surat tassyýasynda deňleýäris we semantik tekstuali surat tassyýatlarynda deňleýäris Iki ýagdaýda sungatyň durumyny başarýarys.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما یک مدل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش\u200cهای چندین زبان را یاد بگیریم که تصاویر و جمله\u200cها در زبان\u200cهای مختلف با هدف افزایش نسخه\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cهای جستجوی و درک تصاویر را یاد بگیرند. مدل ما یک نمایش مشترک برای تصاویر و توضیح آنها را در دو زبان متفاوت یاد می\u200cگیرد (که نیازی نیست متفاوت باشد) با توجه به تصویر به عنوان یک پیوت بین دو زبان. ما یک عملکرد از دست دادن صفحه جدیدی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند هر دو شبیه\u200cای مشابه و مشابه\u200cای بین دو روش کند. ما مدل\u200cهایمان را در مقابل توصیف تصویر برای آلمان و انگلیسی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، و در مقابل توصیف تصویر به انگلیسی شبیه\u200cسازی متن\u200cسازی است. در هر دو موقع ما به اجرای موقعیت هنری رسیدیم.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunapendekeza muundo wa kujifunza maoni ya lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kupambana na picha na sentensi katika lugha tofauti, kwa lengo la kuongeza toleo la lugha mbalimbali la kutafuta picha na kuelewa picha. Mfano wetu unajifunza uwakilishi wa kawaida kwa picha na maelezo yao kwa lugha mbili tofauti (ambazo hazihitaji kulinganisha) kwa kuzingatia picha hiyo kama sauti kati ya lugha mbili. Tunaonyesha kazi mpya ya kupoteza kwa viwili viwili vyenu ambavyo inaweza kukabiliana na vifaa vinavyofanana kati ya njia hizo mbili. Tutathmini mifano yetu kuhusu maelezo ya picha kwa ajili ya Ujerumani na Kiingereza, na kwa mfano wa maelezo ya picha kwa lugha ya Kiingereza. Katika matukio hayo mawili tunafanikiwa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa.', 'am': 'In this paper we propose a model to learn multimodal multilingual representations for matching images and sentences in different languages, with the aim of advancing multilingual versions of image search and image understanding.  ምስሉን በሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ጥምቀት አድርጎ በመቆጣጠር እና መልዕክታቸውን በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች (ተሳያየት አይፈልግም) በመጠቀም የሞዴል መልዕክታችን ለጣቢያ መልዕክት ይማራል፡፡ አዲስ ሁለት ዓይነቶች እና በሁለቱ ዓይነቶች መካከል ጥያቄ የሚችሉትን አዲስ ሁኔታ አዲስ የጉዳይ ክፍል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የጀርመን እና እንግሊዘኛ እና የኢንጂልኛ መልዕክት እና የኢንጂልኛ ምስል ጽሑፎችንን በመስመር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሁለቱም ጉዳይ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-አርእስት አግኝተናል፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n model om multimodaal multitaalse voorstellings te leer vir ooreenstemmende beelde en setnings in verskillende tale, met die doel van die versterking van multitaalse weergawes van beeldsoek en beeldverstanding. Ons model leer 'n gemeenskaplike voorstelling vir beelde en hulle beskrywings in twee verskillende tale (wat nie benodig wees parallele) deur die beeld as 'n pivot tussen twee tale te beskou. Ons introduseer 'n nuwe parewyse ranking verlies funksie wat kan beide simetriese en asymetriese gelykenis hanteer tussen die twee modaliteite. Ons evalueer ons modele op beeld-beskrywing ranking vir Duits en Engels, en op semantiese tekstuele gelykenis van beeldbeskrywings in Engels. In beide gevalle bereik ons staat-van-kunsten-prestasie.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër propozojmë një model për të mësuar përfaqësime multimodale shumëgjuhësore për të përputhur imazhet dhe fjalimet në gjuhë të ndryshme, me qëllim të përparuar versionet shumëgjuhësore të kërkimit të imazhit dhe kuptimit të imazhit. Modeli ynë mëson një përfaqësim të përbashkët për imazhet dhe përshkrimet e tyre në dy gjuhë të ndryshme (që nuk duhet të jenë paralele) duke konsideruar imazhin si një pikë midis dy gjuhëve. Ne prezantojmë një funksion të ri të humbjes së renditjes së dy palëve që mund të trajtojë si simmetrikë ashtu dhe asimetrikë ngjashmëri midis dy modaliteteve. Ne vlerësojmë modelet tona në renditjen e përshkrimit të imazhit për gjermanisht dhe anglisht, dhe në ngjashmërinë semantike tekstuale të përshkrimit të imazhit në anglisht. Në të dy rastet arrijmë shfaqje më të larta.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որպեսզի սովորենք բազմալեզու բազմալեզու ներկայացումներ պատկերների և նախադասությունների համապատասխանման համար տարբեր լեզուներով, որպեսզի զարգացնենք պատկերի որոնման և պատկերի հասկանալու բազմալեզու տարբեր Մեր մոդելը սովորում է պատկերների և դրանց նկարագրությունների ընդհանուր ներկայացումը երկու տարբեր լեզուներով (որոնք պետք չէ զուգահեռ լինել) ընդունելով պատկերը երկու լեզուների միջև գլխավոր շրջանակներով: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր զույգչային դասակարգչային կորստի ֆունկցիա, որը կարող է վերահսկել երկու միջոցների համաչափ և անհամաչափ նմանությունը: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելները գերմանացի և անգլերենի նկարագրման դասակարգման և նկարագրությունների սեմանտիկ տեքստալ նմանության վրա անգլերենում: Երկու դեպքում մենք հասնում ենք ամենաբարձր ներկայացումներին:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, görüntü arama və görüntü anlamanın çoxlu dillərinin çoxlu tərzlərini öyrənmək üçün çoxlu dil tərzlərini öyrənmək üçün modeli təklif edirik. Bizim modellərimiz şəkillər üçün ortaq bir göstəriş öyrənir və onların tanımlamalarını iki cür dildə (paralel olmaması lazımdır) suratı iki dil arasında pivot hesab edir. Biz iki modül arasında simetrik və asymetrik bir istifadə edə biləcək yeni bir çift dərəcəli zəiflik funksiyasını tanıyırıq. Biz modellərimizi Almanca və İngilizə rəngli rəngli rəngli və İngilizə şəkillərin məsələlərinin semantik məsələlərinin məsələlərini değerləşdiririk. İkisində də sanatlı performansı başa çatdıq.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 다중모드적 다중언어 표시를 학습하는 모델을 제시했는데 서로 다른 언어의 이미지와 문장을 매칭하는데 그 목적은 이미지 검색과 이미지 이해를 촉진하는 다중언어 버전이다.우리의 모델은 이미지를 두 언어 간의 중추로 보고 두 가지 서로 다른 언어(평행할 필요가 없음)에서 이미지와 묘사의 공통된 표현을 배운다.우리는 두 모델 간의 대칭과 비대칭 유사성을 처리할 수 있는 새로운 쌍 정렬 손실 함수를 도입했다.우리는 독일어와 영어의 이미지 묘사 순위 모델, 그리고 영어 이미지 묘사의 의미인 텍스트 유사성 모델을 평가했다.이 두 가지 상황에서 우리는 모두 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현하였다.', 'ca': "En aquest paper proposem un model d'aprendre representacions multilingües multimodals per a comparar imatges i frases en diferents llengües, amb l'objectiu d'avançar versions multilingües de busca d'imatges i comprensió d'imatges. El nostre model aprene una representació comú de les imatges i les seves descripcions en dues llengües diferents (que no han de ser parallels) considerant la imatge com una xifra entre dues llengües. Introduem una nova funció de pèrdua de classement parell que pot gestionar la similitud simètrica i asimètrica entre les dues modalitats. Evaluam els nostres models en la classificació de la descripció d'imatges en alemany i anglès, i en la similitud textual semàntica de les descripcions d'imatges en anglès. Ambdós casos aconsegueixem actuació més avançada.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি ছবি এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষায় প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য বহুভাষী ভাষায় প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে, যার উদ্দেশ্যে ছবি অনুসন্ধান এব আমাদের মডেল দুই ভাষায় ছবির জন্য সাধারণ প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং তাদের বর্ণনা শিখে দুই ভাষায় (যেগুলোর সাথে সমান নয়) ছবিটি দুই ভাষার মধ্যে  আমরা একটি নতুন জোড়া জোড়া রেঙ্কিং ক্ষতির কাজ পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা দুটি মোডেলের মধ্যে সিম্যাট্রিক এবং এসইমিমেট্রিক দুটি  আমরা জার্মান এবং ইংরেজীর জন্য ছবির বর্ণনা রেঙ্কিং নিয়ে আমাদের মডেলের মূল্য মূল্য চালিয়ে দিচ্ছি এবং ইংরেজী ভাষায় প্রাম দুটো ক্ষেত্রে আমরা শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের প্রতিষ্ঠান অর্জন করি।', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme model pro naučení multimodálních vícejazyčných reprezentací pro odpovídání obrázků a vět v různých jazycích s cílem pokročit vícejazyčné verze vyhledávání obrázků a porozumění obrázků. Náš model se naučí společnou reprezentaci obrázků a jejich popisů ve dvou různých jazycích (které nemusí být paralelní) považováním obrázku jako otočného mezi dvěma jazyky. Představujeme novou funkci párového hodnocení ztrát, která dokáže zvládnout jak symetrickou, tak asymetrickou podobnost mezi oběma modalitami. Naše modely hodnotíme na hodnocení obrazového popisu pro němčinu a angličtinu a na sémantické textové podobnosti obrazových popisů v angličtině. V obou případech dosahujeme nejmodernějšího výkonu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja mudeli mitmeliigiliste mitmekeelsete kujutiste ja lausete sobitamiseks erinevates keeltes, eesmärgiga edendada pildiotsingu ja pildi mõistmise mitmekeelseid versioone. Meie mudel õpib kujutiste ja nende kirjelduste ühist esitust kahes erinevas keeles (mis ei pea olema paralleelsed), arvestades kujutist kahe keele vahelise pöördepunktina. Tutvustame uut paarijärgulist kaotusfunktsiooni, mis suudab käsitleda nii sümmeetrilist kui ka asümmeetrilist sarnasust kahe mudeli vahel. Hindame oma mudeleid saksa ja inglise keeles pildikirjelduse järjestusel ning inglise keeles pildikirjelduste semantilisel tekstisarnasusel. Mõlemal juhul saavutame tipptasemel esinemise.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo model da naučimo multimodalne multijezičke predstave za odgovarajuće slike i rečenice na različitim jezicima, sa ciljem unapređenja multijezičkih verzija pretraživanja i razumijevanja slika. Naš model nauči zajedničku predstavu slika i njihovih opisa na dva različita jezika (koji ne trebaju biti paralelni) razmatrajući sliku kao pivot između dva jezika. Predstavljamo novu funkciju gubitka na parovima koja može riješiti simetričnu i asimetričku sličnost između dva modaliteta. Procjenjujemo naše modele o redovima opisa slika za njemački i engleski, i o semantičkoj tekstualnoj sličnosti opisa slika na engleskom jeziku. U oba slučaja postignemo predstavu umjetnosti.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme mallia multimodaalisten monikielisten representaatioiden oppimiseen kuvien ja lauseiden yhdistämiseen eri kielillä, tavoitteena edistää monikielisiä versioita kuvanhausta ja kuvan ymmärtämisestä. Mallimme oppii yhteisen esitystavan kuville ja niiden kuvauksille kahdella eri kielellä (joiden ei tarvitse olla rinnakkaisia) tarkastelemalla kuvaa kahden kielen välisenä pivottina. Esittelemme uuden parikohtaisen ranking loss funktion, joka pystyy käsittelemään sekä symmetrisiä että epäsymmetrisiä samankaltaisuuksia näiden kahden muodon välillä. Arvioimme mallejamme saksan ja englannin kuvankuvausjärjestyksessä sekä englannin kuvakuvausten semanttisessa tekstissä samankaltaisuudessa. Molemmissa tapauksissa saavutamme huipputason suorituskyvyn.', 'jv': "Nang pebuk iki, kita supoyo model kanggo sampeyan akeh multimodal karo gambar gambar nggo gambar karo cebra ing sampeyan karo nggo langa sampeyan Model sing lemuran Where's the basic representation for images and their descriptions in 2 Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing gagalé perusahaan nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk model kéné karo nggambar-nggambar gambar nggambar barang kelangan karo Inggris, lan kelangan semantasi kapan kelangan gambar kelangan karo Kemerdekaan surat sing basa Inggris. Slackfree", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציעים מודל ללמוד מייצגים multimodal multilingual לתאמת תמונות ומשפטים בשפות שונות, במטרה להתקדם גרסאות multilingual של חיפוש תמונות והבינה של תמונות. המודל שלנו לומד מייצג משותף לתמונות והתיאורים שלהם בשתי שפות שונות (שאין צורך להיות מקבילות) על ידי שקול התמונה כפיוט בין שתי שפות. אנו מציגים פעילות אובדן חדשה בשווי זוגות שיכולה להתמודד עם דומות סימטריות ואסימטריות בין שני המדרגות. אנו מעריכים את הדוגמנים שלנו על הדרגה לתיאור תמונות בגרמנית ואנגלית, ובדמיון טקסטלי סמנטי של תיאורים תמונות באנגלית. בשני המקרים אנחנו משיגים ביצועים חדשים.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani motsi dõmin ka sanar da masu motsi masu multi-lingui wa masu daidaita zane da maganar daban-daban, don a yi amfani da in ƙarfafa masu motsi na zane da zane. Ana sanar da misalin ɗabi'a wa zane da misalinsu cikin lugha biyu (ba za'a so ba da daidaita) ko kuma, ka yi bincike zanen kamar wata pivot tsakanin harshen biyu. We introduce a new pairwise ranking loss function which can handle both symmetric and asymmetric similarity between the two modalities.  Tuna ƙaddara misalinmu a kan salon zane da za'a yi sauri ga jeron da Ingiriya, kuma a kan misãlai na semantic kamar misãlai na zane cikin Ingiriya. A cikin dukansu munã sãmun halin mai sanar da shi.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo model za učenje multimodalnih večjezičnih predstavitev za ujemanje slik in stavkov v različnih jezikih, s ciljem napredovanja večjezičnih različic iskanja slik in razumevanja slik. Naš model se nauči skupne reprezentacije slik in njihovih opisov v dveh različnih jezikih (ki jih ni treba vzporedno upoštevati), tako da sliko obravnava kot vrtinec med dvema jezikoma. Predstavljamo novo funkcijo pare izgube, ki lahko obvladuje simetrično in asimetrično podobnost med obema modalitema. Naše modele ocenjujemo na podlagi razvrščanja slikovnih opisov v nemščini in angleščini ter na semantični besedilni podobnosti opisov slik v angleščini. V obeh primerih dosegamo najsodobnejšo predstavo.', 'bo': 'In this paper we propose a model to learn multimodal multilingual representations for matching images and sentences in different languages, with the aim of advancing multilingual versions of image search and image understanding. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་པར་རིས་དང་ཐ་སྙད་འདི་དག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ནང་གི་གསལ་བཤད་རྣམས་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་དང་མཐུན་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་དབུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྐྱེས་བ་ཞ ང་ཚོའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཟུགས་བརྙན་ཞིབ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་ཚད་ལྟར་ཐག་ཡིན། ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོས་རང་སུམ་སྒྱུར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གྲུབ་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation with Source Dependency Representation', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal con representación de dependencia de fuentes', 'pt': 'Tradução automática neural com representação de dependência de origem', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية مع تمثيل التبعية للمصدر', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale avec représentation de dépendance à la source', 'ja': 'ソース依存性表現を持つ神経機械翻訳', 'zh': '有源以神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'स्रोत निर्भरता प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод с представлением зависимости от источника', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach le hIonadaíocht ar Spleáchas Foinse', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση με αναπαράσταση εξάρτησης από την πηγή', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítás forrásfüggőségi reprezentációval', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale con rappresentazione della dipendenza dalla sorgente', 'kk': 'Көзінің тәуелсіздік кеңістігімен нейрондық машинаның аударуы', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Neural Machine Translation with Source Dependency Representation', 'ml': 'Neural Machine Translation with Source Dependency Representation', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali bir-Rappreżentanza tad-Dipendenza tas-Sors', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл хамааралтай мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэлт', 'no': 'Neuralmaskineomsetjing med kjeldeavhengighetsrepresentasjon', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe z reprezentacją zależności od źródła', 'lt': 'Neuralinės mašinos vertimas su šaltinio priklausomybės atstovavimu', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală cu reprezentarea dependenței sursei', 'sr': 'Neuralni prevod mašine sa predstavljanjem izvora zavisnosti', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂතාව ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සමග නිර්මාණ මැෂින් භාවිතය', 'so': 'Translation with Source Dependence Representation', 'sv': 'Neural maskinĂ¶versĂ¤ttning med kĂ¤llberoenderepresentation', 'ur': 'سورٹ ڈیپنڈنسیٹ ریسپانسیٹ کے ساتھ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ', 'ta': 'மூலத்தின் சார்ந்த மாற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh với nguồn tin phụ thuộc', 'hr': 'Neuralna prevoda stroja sa predstavljanjem izvora zavisnosti', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit Darstellung der Quellenabhängigkeit', 'bg': 'Невроден машинен превод с представяне на зависимостта от източника', 'nl': 'Neurale machinevertaling met bronafhankelijkheidsrepresentatie', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse med kildeafhængighedsrepræsentation', 'id': 'Translation Mesin Neural dengan Representasi Dependensi Sumber', 'ko': '원시 의존 표시의 신경', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Njerumani kwa Tamko la Kutegemea Chanzo', 'tr': 'Çeşme bağlılık temsili bilen näral maşynyň terjime edilmesi', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinës nervore me përfaqësim të varësisë së burimit', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی با نمایش بستگی منبع', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն աղբյուրի կախվածության ներկայացման հետ', 'bn': 'উৎস নির্ভরিত প্রতিনিধিত্ব দিয়ে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'az': 'Mənbə bağımlılığı göstəricisi ilə nöral mašin tərcüməsi', 'ca': 'Neural Machine Translation with Source Dependency Representation', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge koos allikasõltuvuse esindamisega', 'bs': 'Neuralna mašina prevoda sa predstavljanjem izvora zavisnosti', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad s reprezentací závislosti na zdroji', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös lähderiippuvuuden edustamisella', 'jv': 'Kernel Majin Terjamahan karo Pak-Pak Devenantasi', 'sk': 'Živčni strojni prevod s predstavljanjem odvisnosti od vira', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תרגום מכונת עצבית עם מייצג תלויות מקור', 'bo': 'འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ལ་རྟེན་པའི་ཚོར་བ་མཚོན་པའི་སྒུལ་འཁོར་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'Source dependency information has been successfully introduced into statistical machine translation. However, there are only a few preliminary attempts for Neural Machine Translation (NMT), such as concatenating representations of source word and its dependency label together. In this paper, we propose a novel NMT with source dependency representation to improve translation performance of NMT, especially long sentences. Empirical results on NIST Chinese-to-English translation task show that our method achieves 1.6 BLEU improvements on average over a strong NMT system.', 'pt': 'As informações de dependência de origem foram introduzidas com sucesso na tradução automática estatística. No entanto, existem apenas algumas tentativas preliminares de tradução automática neural (NMT), como a concatenação de representações da palavra de origem e seu rótulo de dependência juntos. Neste artigo, propomos um novo NMT com representação de dependência de fonte para melhorar o desempenho da tradução de NMT, especialmente frases longas. Os resultados empíricos da tarefa de tradução NIST de chinês para inglês mostram que nosso método alcança 1,6 melhorias de BLEU em média em um sistema NMT forte.', 'ar': 'تم إدخال معلومات تبعية المصدر بنجاح في الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية. ومع ذلك ، لا يوجد سوى عدد قليل من المحاولات الأولية للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ، مثل تمثيلات متسلسلة للكلمة المصدر وتسمية التبعية الخاصة بها معًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح NMT جديدًا مع تمثيل تبعية المصدر لتحسين أداء ترجمة NMT ، وخاصة الجمل الطويلة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية في مهمة ترجمة NIST من الصينية إلى الإنجليزية أن طريقتنا تحقق 1.6 تحسينات BLEU في المتوسط على نظام NMT قوي.', 'es': 'La información de dependencia de origen se ha introducido correctamente en la traducción automática estadística. Sin embargo, solo hay unos pocos intentos preliminares de traducción automática neuronal (NMT), como concatenar representaciones de la palabra fuente y su etiqueta de dependencia. En este artículo, proponemos un NMT novedoso con representación de la dependencia de la fuente para mejorar el rendimiento de la traducción de NMT, especialmente las frases largas. Los resultados empíricos de la tarea de traducción del chino al inglés del NIST muestran que nuestro método logra una mejora de 1,6 BLEU en promedio con respecto a un sistema NMT sólido.', 'fr': "Les informations de dépendance à la source ont été introduites avec succès dans la traduction automatique statistique. Cependant, il n'existe que quelques tentatives préliminaires pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT), comme la concaténation de représentations du mot source et de son étiquette de dépendance ensemble. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau NMT avec représentation de la dépendance de la source afin d'améliorer les performances de traduction de NMT, en particulier les phrases longues. Les résultats empiriques de la tâche de traduction du chinois vers l'anglais du NIST montrent que notre méthode atteint 1,6 amélioration de l'UEBL en moyenne par rapport à un système NMT solide.", 'ja': 'ソース依存情報は、統計的機械翻訳に正常に導入されました。ただし、ソースワードとその依存関係ラベルの表現を連結するなど、ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）の予備的な試みはわずかである。本稿では、特に長文のNMTの翻訳パフォーマンスを向上させるために、ソース依存表現を備えた新規のNMTを提案する。NIST中国語から英語への翻訳タスクの実証結果は、当社の方法が強力なNMTシステムよりも平均して1.6 BLEU改善を達成していることを示しています。', 'zh': '源赖信息成功引入计机器翻译。 然神经机器翻译 (NMT) 少数初试,如将源词及恃标签相属。 本文中,有源依赖性新型NMT,以重NMT译性能,特为长句。 NIST汉英译实结果表明,比于强NMT,其法均1.6 BLEU。', 'ru': 'Информация о зависимости от источника успешно внедрена в статистический машинный перевод. Тем не менее, есть только несколько предварительных попыток для нейронного машинного перевода (НМП), таких как объединение представлений исходного слова и его метки зависимости вместе. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую НБП с представлением зависимости от источника для улучшения производительности перевода НБП, особенно длинных предложений. Эмпирические результаты по задаче перевода с китайского на английский NIST показывают, что наш метод достигает 1,6 BLEU улучшений в среднем по сильной системе NMT.', 'hi': 'स्रोत निर्भरता जानकारी सफलतापूर्वक सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद में पेश किया गया है। हालांकि, न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) के लिए केवल कुछ प्रारंभिक प्रयास हैं, जैसे कि स्रोत शब्द और इसकी निर्भरता लेबल के एक साथ प्रतिनिधित्व को संयोजित करना। इस पेपर में, हम एनएमटी के अनुवाद प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए स्रोत निर्भरता प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ एक उपन्यास एनएमटी का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, विशेष रूप से लंबे वाक्य। NIST चीनी-से-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद कार्य पर अनुभवजन्य परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि एक मजबूत NMT प्रणाली पर औसतन 1.6 BLEU सुधार प्राप्त करती है।', 'ga': 'Tá eolas faoi spleáchas ar fhoinse tugtha isteach go rathúil san aistriúchán meaisín staidrimh. Mar sin féin, níl ach cúpla réamhiarracht ar Neural Machine Translation (NMT), mar shampla léiriúcháin den bhfocal foinse agus a lipéad spleáchais a chomhchaitheamh le chéile. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid NMT úrnua le hionadaíocht spleáchais ar an bhfoinse chun feidhmíocht aistriúcháin NMT a fheabhsú, go háirithe abairtí fada. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha ar thasc aistriúcháin Sínis-go-Béarla NIST go mbaineann ár modh feabhsúcháin 1.6 BLEU amach ar an meán thar chóras láidir NMT.', 'ka': 'Source dependency information has been successfully introduced into statistical machine translation. მაგრამ, არსებობს მხოლოდ ნეიროლური მაქსინის გასაგრძელება (NMT) მხოლოდ ნეიროლური მაქსინის გასაგრძელება, როგორც მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ სიტყვის და მისი ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ პრომენტის NMT-ს გამოსახულება, რომელიც გამოსახულებელობის გამოსახულებელობის გამოსახულებლად NMT-ის განახლება, განსაკუთრებით ძლიერი სიტყ თმორიკალური წარმოდგენები NIST ჩინეთიურ-ანგლისურ გაგრძელების დავამუშავება, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი გავაკეთება 1,6 BLEU სისტემაზე სიძლიერი NMT სისტემაზე.', 'el': 'Οι πληροφορίες εξάρτησης από την πηγή έχουν εισαχθεί επιτυχώς στη στατιστική μηχανική μετάφραση. Ωστόσο, υπάρχουν μόνο μερικές προκαταρκτικές προσπάθειες για τη Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (όπως η αλληλουχία αναπαραστάσεων της λέξης προέλευσης και της ετικέτας εξάρτησής της μαζί. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο NMT με αναπαράσταση εξάρτησης από την πηγή για τη βελτίωση της μεταφραστικής απόδοσης της NMT, ιδιαίτερα των μεγάλων προτάσεων. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα σχετικά με την εργασία μετάφρασης από κινέζικα σε αγγλικά δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει βελτιώσεις 1.6 κατά μέσο όρο σε σχέση με ένα ισχυρό σύστημα NMT.', 'hu': 'A forrásfüggőségi információkat sikeresen bevezették a statisztikai gépi fordításba. Mindazonáltal csak néhány előzetes kísérlet van a Neural Machine Translation (NMT), például a forrásszó és annak függőségi címkéjének összekapcsolása. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új NMT-t javasolunk forrásfüggőségi reprezentációval, amely javítja az NMT fordítási teljesítményét, különösen a hosszú mondatokat. A NIST kínai-angol fordítási feladat empirikus eredményei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk átlagosan 1,6 BLEU fejlesztést ér el egy erős NMT rendszerrel szemben.', 'it': 'Le informazioni sulla dipendenza dalle fonti sono state introdotte con successo nella traduzione automatica statistica. Tuttavia, ci sono solo pochi tentativi preliminari per la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), come concatenare le rappresentazioni della parola sorgente e la sua etichetta di dipendenza insieme. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo NMT con rappresentazione della dipendenza dai sorgenti per migliorare le prestazioni di traduzione di NMT, specialmente le frasi lunghe. I risultati empirici sul compito di traduzione cinese-inglese NIST mostrano che il nostro metodo raggiunge in media 1,6 miglioramenti BLEU su un sistema NMT forte.', 'kk': 'Көзінің тәуелдік мәліметі статистикалық машинаның аудармасына сәтті келтірілді. Бірақ, негізгі сөз мен тәуелсіздік жарлығын біріктіру үшін тек бірнеше негізгі әрекеттер бар. Бұл қағазда, NMT жұмысын аудару үшін көзінің тәуелдіктігін жақсарту үшін, өзінде ұзын сөйлемелерді жақсарту үшін, NMT жаңа жағдайда жаңа NMT- ті NIST қытап-ағылшын аудару тапсырмасының империялық нәтижелері біздің әдіміміз күшті NMT жүйесінен орташа 1,6 BLEU жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Šaltinio priklausomybės informacija buvo sėkmingai įtraukta į statistinį vertimą mašinomis. Vis dėlto atliekami tik keli išankstiniai bandymai dėl nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT), pavyzdžiui, sutrumpinti pradinio žodžio ir jo priklausomybės etiketę. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują NMT, kuriame būtų atstovaujama priklausomybei nuo šaltinių, siekiant pagerinti NMT vertimo rezultatus, ypač ilgus sakinius. Empiriniai rezultatai, susiję su NIST kinų ir anglų vertimo užduotimis, rodo, kad mūsų metodas vidutiniškai pagerina 1,6 BLEU, palyginti su stipria NMT sistema.', 'mk': 'Информациите за зависност од изворот се успешно внесени во статистичкиот машински превод. Сепак, постојат само неколку прелиминарни обиди за неурална машинска транслекција (НМТ), како што се концентрирачките претставувања на изворниот збор и нејзината ознака на зависност заедно. In this paper, we propose a novel NMT with source dependency representation to improve translation performance of NMT, especially long sentences.  Импирските резултати на задачата за превод од кинески на англиски на НИСТ покажуваат дека нашиот метод постигнува 1,6 подобрувања на БЛЕ во просек преку силен НМТ систем.', 'ms': 'Maklumat dependensi sumber telah berjaya diperkenalkan ke dalam terjemahan mesin statistik. Namun, terdapat hanya beberapa percubaan awal untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT), seperti perwakilan berkumpul perkataan sumber dan label dependensi bersama-sama. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar NMT novel dengan mewakili dependensi sumber untuk meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan NMT, terutama kalimat panjang. Hasil empirik pada tugas terjemahan Cina-ke-Inggeris NIST menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita mencapai 1.6 peningkatan BLEU secara rata-rata melalui sistem NMT yang kuat.', 'mt': 'Informazzjoni dwar id-dipendenza fuq is-sorsi ġiet introdotta b’suċċess fit-traduzzjoni tal-makkinarju statistiku. Madankollu, hemm biss ftit tentattivi preliminari għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali (NMT), bħal rappreżentazzjonijiet konċitanti tal-kelma tas-sors u t-tikketta tad-dipendenza tagħha flimkien. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu NMT ġdid b’rappreżentanza tad-dipendenza mis-sorsi biex tittejjeb il-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni tal-NMT, speċjalment sentenzi twal. Riżultati empiriċi dwar ix-xogħol ta’ traduzzjoni minn Ċina għal Ingliż NIST juru li l-metodu tagħna jikseb titjib ta’ 1.6 BLEU bħala medja fuq sistema NMT b’saħħitha.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хамааралтай мэдээлэл статистикийн машины хувилбарт амжилттай орсон. Гэхдээ мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) болон эх үүсвэрийн үг болон хамааралтай тэмдэглэх зөвхөн хэдэн анхны хичээл байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид NMT-г эх үүсвэртэй хамааралтай дүрслэлтэй зохион байгуулах зохиолын тулд, ялангуяа урт өгүүлбэрүүдийг улам хөгжүүлэх зохиолын тулд шинэ NMT-г санал болго NIST Хятад болон Англи хэлний орчуулах үйлдлийн эзэмшигийн үр дүнд бидний арга нь хүчтэй NMT системээс дундаж 1.6 BLEU-ын сайжруулалт гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'സ്രോതസ്സ് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിജയകരമായി പരിശോധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്ക് (NMT) പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള ആദ്യ ശ്രമം മാത്രമേ ഉണ്ടാവുന്നുള്ളൂ. In this paper, we propose a novel NMT with source dependency representation to improve translation performance of NMT, especially long sentences.  NIST-ല്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കുള്ള പരിഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു ശക്തിയായ NMT സിസ്റ്റത്തി', 'no': 'Informasjon om kjeldeavhengighet er innført i statistisk maskinsomsetjing. Det er imidlertid berre nokre første forsøk for Neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT), slik som samsvarande representasjonar av kjeldeordet og merkelappen til avhengighet. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt NMT med representasjon av kjeldeavhengighet for å forbetra omsetjingsfunksjonen av NMT, spesielt lange setningar. Empirical results on NIST Chinese-to-English translation task show that our method achieves 1,6 BLEU improvements on average over a strong NMT system.', 'pl': 'Informacje o zależności źródła zostały z powodzeniem wprowadzone do statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego. Istnieje jednak tylko kilka wstępnych prób neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT), takich jak łączenie reprezentacji słowa źródłowego i jego etykiety zależności razem. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy NMT z reprezentacją zależności od źródła w celu poprawy wydajności tłumaczenia NMT, zwłaszcza długich zdań. Wyniki empiryczne dotyczące zadania tłumaczenia chińsko-angielskiego NIST pokazują, że nasza metoda osiąga średnio poprawę 1.6 BLEU w porównaniu z silnym systemem NMT.', 'ro': 'Informațiile privind dependența sursei au fost introduse cu succes în traducerea automată statistică. Cu toate acestea, există doar câteva încercări preliminare pentru Neural Machine Translation (NMT), cum ar fi concatenarea reprezentărilor cuvântului sursă și eticheta sa de dependență împreună. În această lucrare, propunem un NMT nou cu reprezentare a dependenței sursei pentru a îmbunătăți performanța traducerii NMT, în special propozițiile lungi. Rezultatele empirice asupra sarcinii NIST de traducere chineză-engleză arată că metoda noastră realizează în medie îmbunătățiri de 1,6 BLEU în raport cu un sistem puternic NMT.', 'si': 'මුළු විශේෂතා තොරතුරු සමහර විශේෂයෙන් ස්ථානතික පණිවිධානයට ඇතුළත් වුනා. නමුත්, න්\u200dයූරාල් මේෂන් පරිවර්තනය (NMT) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විතරයි, වගේම මුළු වචනය සහ එයාගේ විශ්වාස ලේබල් එකට සම මේ පත්තරේ අපි නියම NMT නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, විශේෂයෙන්ම ලොකු වචනයක්. NIST චීනි වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වලින් අභිවාදය වැඩේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදිය', 'so': 'Macluumaadka ku xirnaanta sourceed waxaa lagu soo bandhigay turjumaadda takhasuska machine. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa jira jarrabo yar oo ku jira turjumidda neural machine (NMT), tusaale ahaan wakiilayaasha hadalka sourceed iyo calaamada ku xirnaanta. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa warqad NMT oo ay leedahay nooc ku xiran sourceed oo ku saabsan si loo hagaajiyo muuqashada turjumaadda ee NMT, khusuusan hadal dheer. Shaqo xiisooyin ah oo ku saabsan shaqada tarjumaadda ee NIST-China-to-Ingiriis waxay muujiyaan in qaabkeenkeennu uu helo hagaajinta 1.6 BLEU si guud ah ugu kordhiya nidaamka xoogga badan ee NMT.', 'sv': 'Källberoendeinformation har framgångsrikt införts i statistisk maskinöversättning. Det finns dock bara ett fåtal preliminära försök för Neural Machine Translation (NMT), till exempel att sammanfoga representationer av källord och dess beroende etikett tillsammans. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny NMT med källberoenderepresentation för att förbättra översättningen av NMT, särskilt långa meningar. Empiriska resultat på NIST kinesiska-engelska översättningsuppgifter visar att vår metod uppnår 1,6 BLEU-förbättringar i genomsnitt över ett starkt NMT-system.', 'sr': 'Informacije o zavisnosti izvora uspešno su uvedene u prevod statističkih mašina. Međutim, postoji samo nekoliko preliminarnih pokušaja za neurološki prevod mašine (NMT), kao što su povezani predstavljanja izvornog reči i oznake zavisnosti zajedno. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi NMT sa zastupanjem zavisnosti izvora kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost prevođenja NMT-a, posebno dugih rečenica. Impirički rezultati na zadatku prevođenja kineskog do engleskog NIST pokazuju da naš metod postiže poboljšanje u prosjeku 1,6 BLEU preko jakog NMT-ovog sistema.', 'ta': 'மூலம் சார்ந்த தகவல் வெற்றிகரமாக புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் உள்ளது. ஆனால், நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) போன்ற சில முன்னுரிமையான முயற்சிகள் மட்டுமே உள்ளன, மூல வார்த்தையின் குறிப்புகளை ஒன் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு நீண்ட வாக்கியங்களை மூலம் சார்ந்த சார்ந்திருப்பது NMT என்பதை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, குறிப்பாக NIST சீனம்- இருந்து ஆங்கிலம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணியில் வெறுமையான முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது நம் முறைமையில் 1. 6 பிலி முன்னேற்றங்', 'ur': 'سراسر اعتمادی معلومات موفقیت کے ساتھ آمار ماشین کی ترجمہ میں پیش کیے گئے ہیں. However, there are only a few preliminary attempts for Neural Machine Translation (NMT), such as concatenating representations of source word and its dependency label together. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نوم NMT کی پیشنهاد کریں گے کہ NMT کی ترجمہ کرنا، مخصوصاً طویل کلمات کو زیادہ زیادہ کرے۔ نیسٹ چین سے انگلیسی ترجمہ تابع پر امپراتیک نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ ایک مضبوط NMT سیسٹم پر متوسط ۱.۶ بلیوس ترجمہ حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info Lekin, bir necha bir necha narsalar mavjud. Masalan manba soʻzning tahrirlarini birlashtirish va ularning tasdiqligini birlashtirish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz NMT'ning tarjimalarni oshirish uchun manba ishlatuvchiga ishlatish uchun yangi novel NMT dasturini tahrirlash imkoniyat qilamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Nguồn tin phụ thuộc đã được nhập thành công trong dịch vụ máy thống kê. Tuy nhiên, chỉ có vài bước tiến sơ bộ về dịch lắp máy thần kinh (NMB) như các biểu tượng của từ nguồn và nhãn phụ thuộc của nó cùng nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một công ty NMT mới có dịch vụ phụ thuộc nguồn để cải thiện khả năng dịch chuyển của NMT, đặc biệt là những câu dài. Kết quả từ dự án dịch dịch tiếng Trung Quốc cho NIST cho thấy rằng phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được một số hiệu cải tiến trên trung bình hơn một hệ thống NMT mạnh.', 'da': 'Kildeafhængighedsoplysninger er blevet introduceret med succes i statistisk maskinoversættelse. Der er dog kun få foreløbige forsøg på Neural Machine Translation (NMT), såsom sammenkobling af repræsentationer af kildeord og dets afhængighedsmærke. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny NMT med kildeafhængighedsrepræsentation for at forbedre oversættelsesevnen af NMT, især lange sætninger. Empiriske resultater på NIST kinesisk-engelsk oversættelsesopgave viser, at vores metode opnår 1,6 BLEU-forbedringer i gennemsnit over et stærkt NMT-system.', 'nl': 'Bronafhankelijkheidsinformatie is succesvol geïntroduceerd in statistische machinevertaling. Er zijn echter slechts enkele voorlopige pogingen voor Neural Machine Translation (NMT), zoals het samenvoegen van representaties van bronwoord en het afhankelijkheidslabel. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe NMT voor met bronafhankelijkheidsrepresentatie om de vertaalprestaties van NMT te verbeteren, vooral lange zinnen. Empirische resultaten op NIST Chinees-naar-Engels vertaaltaak tonen aan dat onze methode gemiddeld 1.6 BLEU verbeteringen bereikt ten opzichte van een sterk NMT systeem.', 'de': 'Informationen zur Abhängigkeit von Quellen wurden erfolgreich in die statistische maschinelle Übersetzung eingeführt. Es gibt jedoch nur wenige vorläufige Versuche für die Neurale Maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT), wie die Verkettung von Repräsentationen von Quellwort und dessen Abhängigkeitslabel zusammen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neuartige NMT mit Quellenabhängigkeitsdarstellung vor, um die Übersetzungsleistung von NMT, insbesondere von langen Sätzen, zu verbessern. Empirische Ergebnisse zur NIST-Übersetzungsaufgabe zeigen, dass unsere Methode durchschnittlich 1.6 BLEU-Verbesserungen im Vergleich zu einem starken NMT-System erzielt.', 'id': 'Informasi dependensi sumber telah berhasil diperkenalkan ke dalam terjemahan mesin statistik. Namun, hanya ada beberapa percobaan awal untuk Translation Neural Machine (NMT), seperti perwakilan konkatenasi dari kata sumber dan label dependensi bersama-sama. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan NMT novel dengan representation dependensi sumber untuk meningkatkan prestasi terjemahan NMT, terutama kalimat panjang. Hasil imperial pada tugas terjemahan dari Cina ke Inggris NIST menunjukkan bahwa metode kita mencapai 1,6 perbaikan BLEU rata-rata atas sistem NMT yang kuat.', 'bg': 'Информацията за зависимостта от източниците е въведена успешно в статистическия машинен превод. Съществуват обаче само няколко предварителни опита за неврален машинен превод (НМТ), като например обединяване на представянето на изходната дума и етикета на зависимост. В тази статия ние предлагаме нов НМТ с представяне на зависимостта от източника, за да подобрим ефективността на превода на НМТ, особено дълги изречения. Емпиричните резултати на задачата за превод от китайски на английски език показват, че методът ни постига средно 1.6 подобрения в сравнение със силна система за превод.', 'hr': 'Informacije o zavisnosti izvora uspješno su uvedene u prevod statističkih strojeva. Međutim, postoji samo nekoliko preliminarnih pokušaja za prevod neuroloških strojeva (NMT), poput potvrđivanja predstavljanja izvornog riječi i oznake zavisnosti zajedno. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi NMT s zastupanjem zavisnosti izvora kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost prevođenja NMT-a, posebno dugih rečenica. Impirički rezultati na zadatku prevođenja kineskog do engleskog NIST pokazuju da naš metod postigne prosječno poboljšanje BLEU-a od 1,6 na snažnom sustavu NMT-a.', 'sw': 'Source dependency information has been successfully introduced into statistical machine translation.  Hata hivyo, kuna jaribio chache tu za awali kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya NMT (NMT), kama vile kuwakilisha maoni ya neno la vyanzo na alama yake ya kutegemea kwa pamoja. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza riwaya ya NMT yenye uwakilishi wa chanzo cha kutegemea kwa ajili ya kuboresha utendaji wa tafsiri wa NMT, hasa hukumu ndefu. Matokeo ya msisimko juu ya kazi ya tafsiri ya NIST ya China-to-English inaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inapata maboresho ya BLEU 1.6 kwa wastani zaidi ya mfumo wenye nguvu wa NMT.', 'ko': '원본 의존 정보가 통계기계 번역에 성공적으로 도입되었다.그러나 신경기계번역(NMT)에 대해서는 원시어의 표시와 의존 라벨을 연결하는 등 초보적인 시도만 있을 뿐이다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 원본 의존 표시를 가진 NMT를 제시하여 NMT의 번역 성능, 특히 긴 문장의 번역 성능을 향상시켰다.NIST 한영 번역 임무의 실증 결과에 따르면 강력한 NMT 시스템에서 우리의 방법은 평균 1.6 BLEU 개선을 실현했다.', 'tr': '횉e힊me baglan챌y maglumaty statistik makine terjime edip bilen 체첵tgedildi. 횦철ne, n채ral Ma힊yny흫 terjimesini (NMT) 체챌in di흫e birn채챌e 철흫ki synany힊 bar, munu흫 챌e힊me s철z체ni흫 we onu흫 baglanylyk etiketini bilelikde ylala힊첵an 첵aly. Bu kagyzda, NMT t채zeliklerini 체첵tgetmek 체챌in 챌e힊me dependensi첵asynda NMT t채zeliklerini gowuramak 체챌in bir roman teklip edip g철r첵채ris. NIST 횉in챌e-we I흫lis챌e terjime t채bligini흫 Impirik netijesi bizi흫 metodamyzy흫 1.6 BLEU 첵체z체ni흫 ortalamasynda g체첵챌li NMT sistemasyndan gowyla힊dyrylygyny g철rkez.', 'af': "Bron afhanklikheidsinligting is suksesvol ingevoer in statistiese masjien vertaling. Maar daar is slegs 'n paar voorafinstellings probeer vir Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT), soos samelewing van voorafinstellings van bron woord en sy afhanklikheid etiket saam. In hierdie papier stel ons 'n nuwe NMT voorstel met bron afhanklikheid voorstel om vertaling van NMT te verbeter, veral lanke setings. Enige resultate op NIST Sjinese-na-Engels vertaling taak wys dat ons metode 1.6 BLES verbeteringe op gemiddelde bereik oor 'n sterk NMT stelsel.", 'sq': 'Informacioni i varësisë së burimit është futur me sukses në përkthimin statistikor të makinave. Megjithatë, ekzistojnë vetëm disa përpjekje paraprake për Translacionin e Makinës Neurale (NMT), të tilla si përfaqësimet e përbashkëta të fjalës burimore dhe etiketën e varësisë së saj së bashku. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një NMT të ri me përfaqësim të varësisë së burimit për të përmirësuar performancën e përkthimit të NMT, veçanërisht fjalët e gjata. Rezultatet imperiale në detyrën e përkthimit kinez-anglez të NIST tregojnë se metoda jonë arrin 1.6 përmirësime BLEU në mesatare lidhur me një sistem të fortë NMT.', 'am': 'ምንጭ ነገር ግን የመጀመሪያው መፍትወት የኔural machine ትርጉም (NMT) የሚደረጉ ጥቂቶች ብቻ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የNMT ትርጉም ውይይት፣ በተለይም ረጅም ፍርድ እንዲያሳድግ የኩነቶች ትርጓሜ የሚያስተካክል የNMT ትርጓሜ አካባቢ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የNIST-ቻይና-ወደ-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም አድራሻ ላይ የቻይና-ኢንጂል ውጤቶች የሆኑት ውጤቶች በኃይል የNMT ስርዓት ላይ በ1.6 BLEU ጥናት እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Գործիքի կախվածության տեղեկատվությունը հաջողությամբ ներդրվել է վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, կան միայն մի քանի նախաձեռնական փորձեր նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համար, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ աղբյուր բառի համեմատական ներկայացումները և նրա կախվածության պիտակը միասին: In this paper, we propose a novel NMT with source dependency representation to improve translation performance of NMT, especially long sentences.  ՆԻՍՏ չինական-անգլերեն թարգմանման խնդիրների կայսրական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը հասնում է 1.6 բլեուզ բարելավման միջինում NMT-ի ուժեղ համակարգում:', 'az': "Qaynaq bağımlılıq məlumatı statistik maşına çevirilməsinə müvəffəqiyyətlə daxil edildi. Lakin, mənbə sözünün və bağımlılıq etiketini birlikdə təsdiqləyici kimi, Neural Machine Translation (NMT) üçün ancaq bir neçə əvvəlki çabalar var. Bu kağızda, NMT'in çevirilməsini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün mənbə bağımlılığı olan yeni NMT təklif edirik, özlərinə də uzun cümlələr. NIST Çinli-İngilizə çevirilməsi törətdiyi təqdirdə impirik sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim metodumuz qüvvətli NMT sistemində ortalama 1.6 BLEU düzəltməsini başa çatdırır.", 'bn': 'সূত্র নির্ভরিত তথ্য সফলভাবে পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদে পরিচিত হয়েছে। তবে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) এর জন্য কিছু প্রাথমিক চেষ্টা রয়েছে, যেমন উৎস শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং তার নির্ভরশীল ল লেবেল একসাথে এক এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নভেল এনএমটি প্রস্তাব করছি যার সূত্র নির্ভরিত প্রতিনিধিত্ব রয়েছে এনএমটির অনুবাদ প্রদর্শনের বিশেষ করে  এনআইএসটি চীন-থেকে ইংরেজি অনুবাদ কর্মসূচিতে সামান্য ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি গড়ে এক শক্তিশালী এনএমটি সিস্টেমের উপর ১.', 'fa': 'اطلاعات بستگی منبع به موفقیت در ترجمه ماشین آمار وارد شده است. ولی تنها چند تلاش پیشینیانی برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) وجود دارد، مثل ترجمه نمایش\u200cهای کلمه منبع و نقاشی بستگی آن با هم. در این کاغذ، ما یک نویس NMT را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با نمایش بستگی منبع تا عملکرد ترجمه NMT را بهتر کند، مخصوصاً جمله\u200cهای طولانی. نتایج امپراطوری در کار ترجمه چینی و انگلیسی NIST نشان می دهد که روش ما در میانگین بر روی یک سیستم NMT قوی بهترین ۱.۶ BLEU به دست می آید.', 'bs': 'Informacije o zavisnosti izvora uspješno su uvedene u prevod statističkih strojeva. Međutim, postoji samo nekoliko preliminarnih pokušaja za neurološki prevod strojeva (NMT), kao što su potvrđene predstave izvorne riječi i oznake zavisnosti zajedno. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi NMT sa zastupanjem zavisnosti izvora kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost prevođenja NMT-a, posebno duge rečenice. Impirički rezultati na zadatku prevođenja kineskog do engleskog NIST pokazuju da naš metod postigne poboljšanje BLEU od 1,6 u prosjeku preko jakog NMT-ovog sistema.', 'cs': 'Informace o závislosti na zdroji byly úspěšně zavedeny do statistického strojového překladu. Existuje však jen několik předběžných pokusů o neuronový strojový překlad (NMT), například spojení reprezentací zdrojového slova a jeho závislostního štítku dohromady. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový NMT s reprezentací závislosti na zdroji pro zlepšení překladové výkonnosti NMT, zejména dlouhých vět. Empirické výsledky překladu NIST z čínštiny do angličtiny ukazují, že naše metoda dosahuje v průměru 1.6 BLEU zlepšení oproti silnému NMT systému.', 'ca': "La informació sobre la dependencia de fonts s'ha introduït amb èxit en la traducció estadística de màquines. No obstant això, només hi ha alguns intents preliminars de traducció de màquines neuronals (NMT), com les representacions concatenades de la paraula fonti la seva etiqueta de dependencia juntes. En aquest article, proposem una nova NMT amb representació de dependencia de fonts per millorar el rendiment de traducció de NMT, especialment les llargues frases. Els resultats empírics de la tasca de traducció NIST de xinès a anglès mostren que el nostre mètode aconsegueix 1,6 millors de la BLEU en mitjana a través d'un sistema NMT fort.", 'et': 'Allikasõltuvusteavet on edukalt kasutusele võetud statistilises masintõlkes. Siiski on olemas vaid mõned esialgsed katsed neuromasintõlke (NMT), näiteks algsõna ja selle sõltuvusmärgise ühendamine. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse NMT allikasõltuvusega esitamise, et parandada NMT tõlketõhusust, eriti pikki lauseid. Empiirilised tulemused NIST hiina-inglise tõlke ülesande kohta näitavad, et meie meetod saavutab tugeva NMT süsteemiga võrreldes keskmiselt 1,6 BLEU paranemist.', 'fi': 'Lähderiippuvuustiedot on otettu onnistuneesti käyttöön tilastollisessa konekäännöksessä. Neural Machine Translation (NMT) on kuitenkin vain muutama alustava yritys, kuten yhdistää lähdesanan ja sen riippuvuusmerkinnän esityksiä yhteen. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme uutta NMT:tä, jossa on lähderiippuvuutta, parantamaan NMT:n käännöstehokkuutta, erityisesti pitkiä lauseita. Empiiriset tulokset NIST:n kiinan ja englannin käännöstehtävästä osoittavat, että menetelmämme saavuttaa keskimäärin 1,6 BLEU-parannusta vahvaan NMT-järjestelmään verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Poken politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepul iki, kita mudhun kuwi nyumbang NMT karo nguasai kang dipulangan kelas nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo NMT, susahe kapan langgar. Rehunita cara-cara sing paling nyanggo urip ning cara NISTA anu-karo Inggris kuwi nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing bisa bantayan kanggo 1.6 B luwih apik sing nyeleh sistem sing nggawe NMT sing bisa maneh.', 'he': 'מידע על תלויות מקור הוציא בהצלחה לתרגום מכונת סטטיסטיקה. בכל אופן, יש רק כמה ניסיונות קודמיים לתרגום מכונות נוירואליות (NMT), כמו מייצגים משותפים של מילה מקור ותווית התלויה שלה יחד. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציעים רומן NMT עם מייצג תלויות מקור כדי לשפר ביצועי התרגום של NMT, במיוחד משפטים ארוכים. תוצאות אימפריות על משימה התרגום סיני לאנגלית NIST מראות שהשיטה שלנו משיגה 1.6 שיפורים BLEU בממוצע על מערכת NMT חזקה.', 'ha': "@ info A lokacin da, yana da jarrabo kaɗan ta farko da ake yi wa Tarjima na Neural Machine (NMT), kamar concategoring attitudes of source word and its dependant label along. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata noveli na NMT da sourcen yana da inganci wa mai kyau ga fassarar fassarar na NMT, hasa'a, sonar tsawo. Empirical fassarar a kan aikin NIS na China-to-Ingiriya yana nũna cẽwa hanyonmu za'a samar da 1.6 BLEU a kan jama'a kowace na tsarin NMT mai ƙarfi.", 'sk': 'Informacije o odvisnosti od virov so bile uspešno uvedene v statistično strojno prevajanje. Vendar pa obstaja le nekaj predhodnih poskusov za nevralni strojni prevod (NMT), kot je povezovanje predstavitev izvorne besede in oznake odvisnosti. V prispevku predlagamo nov NMT s predstavitvijo odvisnosti od vira za izboljšanje prevajalske zmogljivosti NMT, zlasti dolgih stavkov. Empirični rezultati prevajanja NIST kitajsko-angleščino kažejo, da naša metoda doseže v povprečju 1,6 izboljšav BLEU v primerjavi z močnim NMT sistemom.', 'bo': 'ཐོག་ཁུངས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནང་འཁྲིལ་བ་སྐྱེས་བ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་ཚོར་བསྒྱུར་ནུས་དང་ཁ་འབྲེལ་བའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་ཁོ་ཤས་མེད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་དུ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་གསར་གཏོད་ཅིག་སྔོན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། NIST རྒྱ་ནག་ལས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་རྒྱ་ནག་ལ་ལས་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཉེན'}
{'en': 'Sequence Effects in Crowdsourced Annotations', 'pt': 'Efeitos de sequência em anotações de crowdsourcing', 'ar': 'تأثيرات التسلسل في التعليقات التوضيحية التعهيد الجماعي', 'fr': 'Effets de séquence dans les annotations participatives', 'es': 'Efectos de secuencia en anotaciones colaborativas', 'zh': '众包注序列效', 'hi': 'Crowdsourced एनोटेशन में अनुक्रम प्रभाव', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングされた注釈のシーケンス効果', 'ru': 'Эффекты последовательности в краудсорсинговых аннотациях', 'ga': 'Éifeachtaí Seichimh i Anótálacha Sluaite', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Sorozathatások a közösségi forrású jegyzetekben', 'el': 'Εφέ αλληλουχίας σε σχολιασμούς από κοινού', 'it': 'Effetti di sequenza nelle annotazioni Crowdsourced', 'mk': 'Ефекти на секвенција во анотации од група', 'lt': 'Sekos poveikis daugumos pranešimuose', 'kk': 'Көздеген жазбалардың реттеу эффекттері', 'ms': 'Kesan Sejukan dalam Annotasi Sumber Kerumunan', 'ml': 'Sourced Annotations', 'mn': 'Үзэглэгчдийн дарааллын эффектүүд', 'mt': 'Effetti tas-Sekwenza f’Annotazzjonijiet ta’ Sors Ġenerali', 'no': 'Sekvenseffektar i krøvdursorerte notasjonar', 'pl': 'Efekty sekwencji w adnotacjach społecznych', 'ro': 'Efecte de secvență în adnotările Crowdsource', 'sr': 'Sekvencijski efekti u Crowdsourced Annotations', 'si': 'source', 'ta': 'மூடப்பட்ட அறிவிப்புகளில் தொடர் விளைவுகள்', 'so': 'Sequence Effects in Crowdsourced Annotations', 'sv': 'Sekvenseffekter i Crowdsourced Annotations', 'ur': 'source Annotations', 'uz': 'Sourced Annotations', 'vi': 'Hiệu ứng chuỗi trong Phụ chú', 'bg': 'Последователни ефекти в анотациите с множество източници', 'da': 'Sekvenseffekter i crowdsourcerede noter', 'hr': 'Sekvencija učinka u Crowdsourced Annotations', 'nl': 'Sequenseffecten in crowdsource annotaties', 'de': 'Sequenzeffekte in Crowdsourcing-Anmerkungen', 'id': 'Efek Sekuensi dalam Annotasi Sumber Kelompok', 'ko': '패키지 주석 중의 서열 효과', 'fa': 'اثرات سطح در نوشته\u200cهای مختلف', 'sw': 'Sequence Effects in Crowdsourced Annotations', 'tr': 'Söwdürli Gürjükler', 'sq': 'Efektet e Sekuencës në Anotacionet e Burimeve', 'af': 'Soektog Effekte in Crowdsourced Annotations', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'sourced Annotations', 'bn': 'Sequence Effects in Crowdsourced Annotations', 'az': 'Sıradan Etkiler Sequence Effects in Crowdsourced Annotations', 'cs': 'Sekvenční efekty v crowdsource anotacích', 'et': 'Järjeefektid ühisallikate annotatsioonides', 'ca': "Efectes de seqüència en anotacions d'origen públic", 'bs': 'Sekvencija učinka u Crowdsourced Annotations', 'fi': 'Sarjatehosteet joukkolähteissä olevissa huomautuksissa', 'jv': 'source', 'sk': 'Učinki zaporedja v množičnih opombah', 'ha': 'Sourced Annotments', 'he': 'השפעות מעקב בהערות מקורות', 'bo': 'Crowdsourced Annotations'}
{'en': 'Manual data annotation is a vital component of NLP research. When designing annotation tasks, properties of the annotation interface can unintentionally lead to artefacts in the resulting dataset, biasing the evaluation. In this paper, we explore sequence effects where annotations of an item are affected by the preceding items. Having assigned one label to an instance, the annotator may be less (or more) likely to assign the same label to the next. During rating tasks, seeing a low quality item may affect the score given to the next item either positively or negatively. We see clear evidence of both types of effects using auto-correlation studies over three different crowdsourced datasets. We then recommend a simple way to minimise sequence effects.', 'ar': 'يعد شرح البيانات اليدوي مكونًا حيويًا لبحوث البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. عند تصميم مهام التعليقات التوضيحية ، يمكن أن تؤدي خصائص واجهة التعليق التوضيحي عن غير قصد إلى أخطاء في مجموعة البيانات الناتجة ، مما يؤدي إلى تحيز التقييم. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف تأثيرات التسلسل حيث تتأثر التعليقات التوضيحية لعنصر ما بالعناصر السابقة. بعد تعيين تسمية واحدة لمثيل ما ، قد يقل (أو أكثر) من المحتمل أن يقوم مضيف التعليقات بتعيين نفس التسمية للنوع التالي. أثناء مهام التصنيف ، قد تؤثر رؤية عنصر جودة منخفضة على الدرجة الممنوحة للعنصر التالي إما إيجابًا أو سلبًا. نرى دليلًا واضحًا على كلا النوعين من التأثيرات باستخدام دراسات الارتباط التلقائي على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات مختلفة من التعهيد الجماعي. نوصي بعد ذلك بطريقة بسيطة لتقليل تأثيرات التسلسل.', 'fr': "L'annotation manuelle des données est un élément essentiel de la recherche sur la PNL. Lors de la conception de tâches d'annotation, les propriétés de l'interface d'annotation peuvent involontairement entraîner des artefacts dans le jeu de données résultant, biaisant ainsi l'évaluation. Dans cet article, nous explorons les effets de séquence dans lesquels les annotations d'un élément sont affectées par les éléments précédents. Après avoir attribué une étiquette à une instance, l'annotateur peut être moins (ou plus) susceptible d'attribuer la même étiquette à la suivante. Au cours des tâches d'évaluation, le fait de voir un élément de faible qualité peut avoir une incidence positive ou négative sur le score attribué à l'élément suivant. Nous voyons des preuves claires de ces deux types d'effets à l'aide d'études d'auto-corrélation portant sur trois ensembles de données participatifs différents. Nous recommandons ensuite une méthode simple pour minimiser les effets de séquence.", 'pt': 'A anotação manual de dados é um componente vital da pesquisa em PNL. Ao projetar tarefas de anotação, as propriedades da interface de anotação podem involuntariamente levar a artefatos no conjunto de dados resultante, influenciando a avaliação. Neste artigo, exploramos os efeitos de sequência em que as anotações de um item são afetadas pelos itens anteriores. Tendo atribuído um rótulo a uma instância, o anotador pode ter menos (ou mais) probabilidade de atribuir o mesmo rótulo à próxima. Durante as tarefas de classificação, ver um item de baixa qualidade pode afetar a pontuação dada ao próximo item de forma positiva ou negativa. Vemos evidências claras de ambos os tipos de efeitos usando estudos de autocorrelação em três conjuntos de dados de crowdsourcing diferentes. Em seguida, recomendamos uma maneira simples de minimizar os efeitos de sequência.', 'es': 'La anotación manual de datos es un componente vital de la investigación de PNL. Al diseñar tareas de anotación, las propiedades de la interfaz de anotación pueden provocar involuntariamente artefactos en el conjunto de datos resultante, lo que sesga la evaluación. En este artículo, exploramos los efectos de secuencia en los que las anotaciones de un elemento se ven afectadas por los elementos anteriores. Al haber asignado una etiqueta a una instancia, es posible que el anotador tenga menos (o más) probabilidades de asignar la misma etiqueta a la siguiente. Durante las tareas de calificación, ver un artículo de baja calidad puede afectar la puntuación otorgada al siguiente elemento, ya sea positiva o negativamente. Vemos evidencias claras de ambos tipos de efectos mediante estudios de autocorrelación en tres conjuntos de datos de colaboración colectiva diferentes. A continuación, recomendamos una forma sencilla de minimizar los efectos de la secuencia.', 'zh': '手动据注者,NLP治之要组成部分。 设注记之时,注记界面性或无意生数集伪影,以致偏差。 本文中,我们探讨了项目的注释受这项目的序列效。 分一以实例,注器或益少(或益多)或同者分一实。 评级事之间,见低质量之分,或起于消极。 臣等于三异之众包数据集上用自相关究见此二效之明证也。 然后荐一简之法以最小化其序效。', 'hi': 'मैनुअल डेटा एनोटेशन एनएलपी अनुसंधान का एक महत्वपूर्ण घटक है। एनोटेशन कार्यों को डिजाइन करते समय, एनोटेशन इंटरफ़ेस के गुण अनजाने में परिणामी डेटासेट में कलाकृतियों को जन्म दे सकते हैं, मूल्यांकन को पूर्वाग्रहित कर सकते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम अनुक्रम प्रभावों का पता लगाते हैं जहां किसी आइटम के एनोटेशन पूर्ववर्ती वस्तुओं से प्रभावित होते हैं। एक उदाहरण के लिए एक लेबल असाइन करने के बाद, एनोटेटर अगले को एक ही लेबल असाइन करने की संभावना कम (या अधिक) हो सकता है। रेटिंग कार्यों के दौरान, कम गुणवत्ता वाले आइटम को देखने से अगले आइटम को दिए गए स्कोर को सकारात्मक या नकारात्मक रूप से प्रभावित किया जा सकता है। हम तीन अलग-अलग क्राउडसोर्स डेटासेट पर ऑटो-सहसंबंध अध्ययनों का उपयोग करके दोनों प्रकार के प्रभावों के स्पष्ट सबूत देखते हैं। फिर हम अनुक्रम प्रभाव को कम करने के लिए एक सरल तरीका सुझाते हैं।', 'ja': '手動データアノテーションは、NLP研究の重要な要素です。アノテーションタスクを設計する場合、アノテーションインターフェイスのプロパティは、結果として得られるデータセット内のアーティファクトに意図せずにつながる可能性があり、評価にバイアスをかけます。本稿では、項目の注釈が前述の項目の影響を受けるシーケンス効果について考察する。１つのラベルをインスタンスに割り当てた後、アノテータは、同じラベルを次のインスタンスに割り当てる可能性が低くなる（またはより多くなる）可能性がある。評価タスク中、低品質のアイテムを見ると、次のアイテムに与えられたスコアに肯定的または否定的な影響を与える可能性があります。3つの異なるクラウドソーシングされたデータセットにわたる自動相関研究を使用して、両方のタイプの効果の明確な証拠が見られます。次に、シーケンス効果を最小限に抑える簡単な方法をお勧めします。', 'ru': 'Аннотация данных вручную является жизненно важным компонентом исследования NLP. При проектировании задач аннотации, свойства интерфейса аннотации могут непреднамеренно привести к артефактам в результирующем наборе данных, искажая оценку. В этой статье мы исследуем эффекты последовательности, когда аннотации элемента затрагиваются предыдущими пунктами. После присвоения одной метки одному экземпляру аннотатор может иметь меньше (или больше) шансов присвоить одну и ту же метку следующему. Во время рейтинговых заданий вид элемента низкого качества может повлиять на оценку, данную следующему элементу, положительно или отрицательно. Мы видим четкие доказательства обоих типов эффектов, используя автокорреляционные исследования для трех различных наборов данных, полученных с помощью краудсорсинга. Затем мы рекомендуем простой способ минимизации эффектов последовательности.', 'ga': 'Comhpháirt ríthábhachtach de thaighde NLP is ea anótáil sonraí láimhe. Nuair a bhíonn tascanna anótála á ndearadh, is féidir le hairíonna chomhéadain anótála a bheith mar thoradh d’aon turas ar dhéantáin sa tacar sonraí a thagann as, rud a laofacht sa mheastóireacht. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar éifeachtaí seichimh nuair a chuireann na míreanna roimhe seo isteach ar nótaí míre. Tar éis lipéad amháin a shannadh do shampla, d’fhéadfadh gur lú (nó gur mó) an seans go sannfaidh anótaire an lipéad céanna ar an gcéad lipéad eile. Le linn tascanna rátála, d’fhéadfadh tionchar dearfach nó diúltach a bheith ag féachaint ar mhír ar chaighdeán íseal ar an scór a thugtar don chéad mhír eile. Feicimid fianaise shoiléir ar an dá chineál éifeachtaí ag baint úsáide as staidéir uath-chomhghaolaithe thar thrí thacar sonraí sluafhoinsithe éagsúla. Molaimid ansin bealach simplí chun éifeachtaí seichimh a íoslaghdú.', 'ka': 'ხელსაწყოთა მონაცემების ანოტაცია NLP სწავლობას მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტია. როდესაც ატვირციის დავალებების განაზღვრება, ატვირციის ინტერფექტის მნიშვნელობები შეუძლია არტეფექტისთვის გადატანა შემდეგ მონაცემების კონტაქტისთვის, როდესა ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ წინასწორებული ეფექტები, სადაც წინასწორებული ელემენტის ნიოტაციები მოვლენა. შემდეგ ერთი ლაბელის ინსტანციისთვის დააყენებულია, ანტოტორი შეიძლება შეიძლება იგივე ლაბელის შემდეგ დააყენება. პარამეტრების კონფიგურაციის განსაზღვრებით, სანამ ცოტა კონფიგურაციის ელემენტი შესაძლებელია შემდეგ ელემენტის შესაძლებელია, რომელიც შემდეგ ელემე ჩვენ ვიხედავთ განსაკუთრებული ეფექტის ორივე ტიპის ეფექტის გამოყენება სამი განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავებას. შემდეგ ჩვენ მუშაობით მარტივი გზა, რომელიც მინიმუშაობით წესების ეფექტები.', 'hu': 'A manuális adatmegjegyzések létfontosságú összetevője az NLP kutatásnak. A jegyzetelési feladatok tervezésekor a jegyzetelési felület tulajdonságai véletlenül a kapott adatkészletben lévő tárgyak kialakításához vezethetnek, előfordulva az értékelést. Ebben a tanulmányban olyan szekvenciaeffektusokat vizsgálunk, ahol egy elem jegyzeteit befolyásolják az előző elemek. Miután egy címkét hozzárendelt egy példányhoz, a megjegyző kevesebb (vagy több) valószínűséggel rendeli ugyanazt a címkét a következőhöz. Az értékelési feladatok során az alacsony minőségű elem látása pozitívan vagy negatívan befolyásolhatja a következő elem pontszámát. Egyértelmű bizonyítékokat látunk mindkét típusú hatásról három különböző közösségi forrásból származó adatkészleten végzett auto-korrelációs tanulmányok segítségével. Ezután javasoljuk a szekvenciahatások minimalizálásának egyszerű módját.', 'el': 'Η χειροκίνητη παρατήρηση δεδομένων είναι ένα ζωτικό στοιχείο της έρευνας. Κατά τον σχεδιασμό εργασιών σχολιασμού, οι ιδιότητες της διεπαφής σχολιασμού μπορούν ακούσια να οδηγήσουν σε αντικείμενα στο σύνολο δεδομένων που προκύπτουν, προκατάληψη της αξιολόγησης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξερευνούμε εφέ ακολουθίας όπου οι σχολιασμοί ενός στοιχείου επηρεάζονται από τα προηγούμενα στοιχεία. Έχοντας εκχωρήσει μια ετικέτα σε μια περίπτωση, ο σχολιαστής μπορεί να είναι λιγότερο (ή περισσότερο) πιθανό να εκχωρήσει την ίδια ετικέτα στην επόμενη. Κατά τη διάρκεια των εργασιών αξιολόγησης, η εμφάνιση ενός στοιχείου χαμηλής ποιότητας μπορεί να επηρεάσει τη βαθμολογία που δίνεται στο επόμενο στοιχείο είτε θετικά είτε αρνητικά. Βλέπουμε σαφείς αποδείξεις και των δύο τύπων επιδράσεων χρησιμοποιώντας μελέτες αυτόματης συσχέτισης σε τρία διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε έναν απλό τρόπο ελαχιστοποίησης των αποτελεσμάτων ακολουθίας.', 'it': "L'annotazione manuale dei dati è una componente vitale della ricerca PNL. Quando si progettano attività di annotazione, le proprietà dell'interfaccia di annotazione possono involontariamente portare a artefatti nel set di dati risultante, distorcendo la valutazione. In questo articolo esploriamo gli effetti di sequenza in cui le annotazioni di un elemento sono influenzate dagli elementi precedenti. Dopo aver assegnato un'etichetta a un'istanza, l'annotatore può avere meno (o più) probabilità di assegnare la stessa etichetta a quella successiva. Durante le attività di valutazione, vedere un elemento di bassa qualità può influire positivamente o negativamente sul punteggio dato all'oggetto successivo. Vediamo chiare prove di entrambi i tipi di effetti utilizzando studi di auto-correlazione su tre diversi set di dati crowdsourcing. Consigliamo quindi un modo semplice per ridurre al minimo gli effetti di sequenza.", 'lt': 'Rankinių duomenų anotacija yra gyvybiškai svarbi NLP mokslinių tyrimų dalis. Nustatant anotacijų užduotis, anotacijos sąsajos savybės gali netyčia sukelti faktus gautame duomenų rinkinyje, o vertinimas gali būti nukreiptas į pusiausvyrą. Šiame dokumente tiriame sekos poveikį, kai ankstesni straipsniai daro poveikį tam tikro straipsnio anotacijoms. Pavyzdžiui priskyrus vieną etiketę, anotatorius gali mažiau (arba daugiau) tikėtis priskirti tą pačią etiketę kitam. Reitingo užduočių metu žemos kokybės elemento matymas gali turėti teigiamą arba neigiamą poveikį kitam punktui. Matome akivaizdžius abiejų rūšių poveikio įrodymus, naudojant autokoreliacijos tyrimus su trimis skirtingais visuomenės duomenų rinkiniais. We then recommend a simple way to minimise sequence effects.', 'mk': 'Manual data annotation is a vital component of NLP research.  Кога се дизајнираат задачи за анотација, сопственостите на интерфејсот за анотација може ненамерно да доведат до артефакти во резултатот на податоците, предрасудувајќи ја проценката. Во овој документ, ги истражуваме ефектите на секвенцијата каде анотациите на еден предмет се влијани на претходните предмети. По додавањето на една етикета на една инстанција, анотаторот може да биде помалку (или повеќе) веројатно да ја додели истата етикета на следната. За време на рејтинг задачите, гледањето на нискоквалитетен елемент може да влијае на резултатот даден на следниот елемент или позитивно или негативно. Гледаме јасни докази за двата вида ефекти користејќи студии за автоматска корелација во врска со три различни групни податоци. Потоа препорачуваме едноставен начин да се минимизираат ефектите на секвенцијата.', 'ms': 'Manual data annotation is a vital component of NLP research.  When designing annotation tasks, properties of the annotation interface can unintentionally lead to artefacts in the resulting dataset, biasing the evaluation.  Dalam kertas ini, kita mengeksplorasi kesan urutan di mana anotasi item dipengaruhi oleh item sebelumnya. Setelah ditugaskan satu label ke kejadian, pengembara mungkin kurang (atau lebih) mungkin ditugaskan label yang sama ke kejadian berikutnya. Semasa tugas penilaian, melihat item kualiti rendah boleh mempengaruhi skor yang diberikan kepada item berikutnya sama ada positif atau negatif. Kami melihat bukti yang jelas bagi kedua-dua jenis kesan menggunakan kajian korelasi automatik atas tiga set data sumber ramai yang berbeza. Kemudian kami cadangkan cara sederhana untuk mengurangi kesan urutan.', 'kk': 'Қолмен деректер жазбалары NLP зерттеулерінің маңызды компоненті. Жаңарту тапсырмаларын құрастырғанда, жаңарту интерфейсінің қасиеттері артефакттарға сәйкес келетін деректер жиынында, оқиғаны бұғаттайды. Бұл қағазда, біз бұрынғы нысандардың белгілеріне әсер етілген реттеу эффекттерін іздейміз. Келесіге бір жарлық белгісін таңдау үшін, белгілер келесіге бір жарлық белгісін таңдауға мүмкін (немесе көп болуы мүмкін). Тапсырмаларды оқу кезінде, сапалық деңгейінде келесі нөмірге келтірілген нөмірлерді оқиға немесе негативен көрсету мүмкін. Біз автокоррелациялау зерттеулерінің екі түрлі эффекттерін көреміз. Үш түрлі көпшілік деректер қорларында. Содан кейін реттеу эффекттерін төмендету үшін қарапайым жолын таңдаймыз.', 'ml': 'കൈയ്യൂണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d NLP പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാണ്. അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ ജോലികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d അനുഭവിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്\u200dറെ വിഷമങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള Having assigned one label to an instance, the annotator may be less (or more) likely to assign the same label to the next.  ജോലികളുടെ റേഡിങ്ങ് ജോലികളില്\u200d, കുറഞ്ഞ ഗുണവിശേഷത്തില്\u200d അടുത്ത വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട സ്കോര്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമ മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്വയം ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് രണ്ട് തരം പ്രഭാവങ്ങളുടെ പിന്നീട് സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ചെറുതാക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ വഴിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള', 'mt': 'L-annotazzjoni tad-dejta manwali hija komponent vitali tar-riċerka NLP. Meta jiġu ddisinjati kompiti ta’ annotazzjoni, il-karatteristiċi tal-interfaċċja ta’ annotazzjoni jistgħu b’mod mhux intenzjonat iwasslu għal artefatti fis-sett tad-dejta li jirriżulta, li jippreġudikaw l-evalwazzjoni. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nesploraw effetti ta’ sekwenza fejn l-annotazzjonijiet ta’ oġġett huma affettwati mill-oġġetti preċedenti. Wara li tkun assenjat tikketta waħda lil każ, l-annotatur jista’ jkun inqas (jew aktar) probabbli li jassenja l-istess tikketta lil ieħor. Waqt ix-xogħlijiet ta’ klassifikazzjoni, jekk wieħed jara element ta’ kwalità baxxa jista’ jaffettwa l-punteġġ mogħti lill-punt li jmiss jew b’mod pożittiv jew negattiv. Aħna naraw evidenza ċara taż-żewġ tipi ta’ effetti bl-użu ta’ studji ta’ awto-korrelazzjoni fuq tliet settijiet differenti ta’ dejta minn sorsi ta’ massa. Imbagħad nirrakkomandaw mod sempliċi biex nimminimizzaw l-effetti tas-sekwenza.', 'mn': 'Холбоо өгөгдлийн нээлт нь NLP судалгааны чухал хэсэг юм. Дараагийн даалгавруудыг зохион байгуулах үед нэр дэвшүүлэх интерфейсийн шинжлэх ухааны өөрчлөлт нь артефактуудыг нөлөөлж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг зүйлийн анзаарлын нөлөөлдөг дарааллын эффектүүдийг судалж байна. Нэг жагсаалт нэг жагсаалт тавьж байхад, загварчид дараагийн жагсаалт ижил жагсаалт тавьж болох (эсвэл илүү) бага байж болно. Дараагийн даалгавруудыг тооцоолж байхдаа бага чанартай элемент нь дараагийн элементэд өгсөн тоонуудыг эерэг эсвэл сөрөг тооцоолж чадна. Бид хоёр төрлийн нөлөөг автохолбоотой судалгаагаар 3 өөр олон нийтийн мэдээллийн сангуудыг ашиглан харж байна. Дараа нь дараа нь дарааллын үр дүнг багасгах энгийн аргыг зөвлөе.', 'no': 'Manuelle data- notasjon er ein viktig komponent av NLP- forskning. Når du designerer notasjonsoppgåver, kan eigenskapane av notasjonsgrensesnittet uventa føre til artefaktar i resultatet datasett, som blir forbetra evalueringa. I denne papiret utforskar vi sekvenseffektar der merkingar på eit element påvirkar dei førre elementa. Å ha tildelt ein merkelapp til ein instans, kan merkelappen vera mindre (eller fleire) sannsynlegvis tildelt den same merkelappen til neste. Når du vurderer oppgåver, kan det gjere eit låg kvalitetelement påvirka poeng som er gitt til neste element anten positivt eller negativt. Vi ser klare beviser om begge typar effektar med automatisk korrelasjonsstudiar over tre ulike datasett som er tilgjengelege. Vi anbefaler så ein enkel måte å minimera sekvenseffektar.', 'pl': 'Ręczna adnotacja danych jest istotnym elementem badań NLP. Podczas projektowania zadań adnotacyjnych właściwości interfejsu adnotacyjnego mogą nieumyślnie prowadzić do powstania artefaktów w wynikowym zbiorze danych, sprzecznie z oceną. W niniejszym artykule badamy efekty sekwencji, w których adnotacje elementu mają wpływ na poprzednie elementy. Po przypisaniu jednej etykiety do instancji, adnotator może być mniejsze (lub większe) prawdopodobieństwo przypisania tej samej etykiety do następnej. Podczas zadań oceniających zobaczenie elementu niskiej jakości może wpłynąć na wynik przyznany kolejnej pozycji pozytywnie lub negatywnie. Widzimy wyraźne dowody na oba rodzaje efektów za pomocą badań autokorelacji na trzech różnych zbiorach danych crowdsourcingowych. Następnie zalecamy prosty sposób zminimalizowania efektów sekwencji.', 'ro': 'Adnotare manuală a datelor este o componentă vitală a cercetării PNL. La proiectarea sarcinilor de adnotare, proprietățile interfeței de adnotare pot duce neintenționat la artefacte în setul de date rezultat, părtinind evaluarea. În această lucrare, explorăm efectele de secvență în care adnotările unui element sunt afectate de elementele precedente. După ce a atribuit o etichetă unei instanțe, adnotatorul poate fi mai puțin (sau mai mult) probabil să atribuie aceeași etichetă următoarei. În timpul evaluării sarcinilor, vederea unui articol de calitate scăzută poate afecta scorul dat următorului articol fie pozitiv, fie negativ. Vedem dovezi clare ale ambelor tipuri de efecte folosind studii de auto-corelație pe trei seturi de date crowdsourced diferite. Vă recomandăm apoi o modalitate simplă de a minimiza efectele de secvență.', 'si': 'මැනුම් දත්ත කිරීමේ NLP පරීක්ෂණයේ ජීවිත කොටසක්. ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්න මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිකාර පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, මුලින් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. ස්ථානයකට ලේබල් එකක් තියාගත්තා තියෙන්නේ, ස්ථානයක් පරීක්ෂකයෙන් (නැත්නම්) අඩු වෙන්න පුළුවන්. වැඩක් රේට් කරමින් වෙලාවට, අඩුම කුළුවත් අයිතියක් බලන්න පුළුවන් ඊළඟ අයිතියට දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් හ අපිට පැහැදිලි සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂි දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති ඊට පස්සේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්.', 'sr': 'Manualna annotacija podataka je vitalna komponenta istraživanja NLP-a. Kada dizajniramo obaveze za annotaciju, vlasništvo interfejsa annotacije ne namjerno može dovesti do artefakta u rezultatnoj seti podataka, predrasudavajući procjenu. U ovom papiru istražujemo sekvenčne efekate u kojima su annotacije prednjih predmeta utjecale. Kada je dodijeljena jedna etiketa na primer, annotator može biti manje (ili više) verovatno da dodaje istu etiketu sljedećem. Tijekom ocjenjivanja zadataka, viđenje niskog kvalitetnog elementa može utjecati na rezultat koji je dato sledećem elementu ili pozitivno ili negativno. Vidimo jasne dokaze o obje vrste efekta koji koriste ispitivanja automatske korelacije preko tri različite masovne datoteke. Onda preporučujemo jednostavan način da smanjimo sekvenčne efekte.', 'so': 'Wargelinta macluumaadka gacanta ah waa qayb muhiim ah oo ka mid ah waxbarashada NLP. Markii loo sameynayo shaqooyinka caafimaadka, hantidiisa Interfeyska la xiriira waxay si iskaa ah u hoggaami karaan waxyaabaha lagu sameeyo sameynta kooxda macluumaadka, iyadoo ka baahan kara qiimeynta. Qoraalkan waxaynu baaraynaa saamayno dabar ah, meesha ay dhibaatooyin ku saameyso alaabta hore. Having assigned one label to an instance, the annotator may be less (or more) likely to assign the same label to the next.  Xilliga fasaxa shaqada waxaa saameyn ku yeelan kara alaabta qiimaha hoose ama si positive ah ama wax negativ ah. Waxaynu aragnaa caddeyn cad oo labada saameyn ah oo isticmaalaya waxbarashada iskuulka iskaashatada ee saddexda kooban oo kala duduwan. Markaas waxaynu talo bixinaynaa jid fudud si aan ugu yarayno waxyaabaha soo socda.', 'sv': 'Manuell datanotering är en viktig del av NLP-forskningen. Vid utformningen av kommenteringsuppgifter kan egenskaperna hos kommenteringsgränssnittet oavsiktligt leda till artefakter i den resulterande datauppsättningen, vilket snedvrider utvärderingen. I denna uppsats undersöker vi sekvenseffekter där anteckningar av ett objekt påverkas av föregående objekt. Efter att ha tilldelat en etikett till en instans kan kommentatorn vara mindre (eller mer) sannolikt att tilldela samma etikett till nästa. Under betygsuppgifter kan det påverka poängen som ges till nästa objekt positivt eller negativt att se ett objekt av låg kvalitet. Vi ser tydliga belägg för båda typerna av effekter med hjälp av autokorrelationsstudier över tre olika crowdsourcerade datauppsättningar. Vi rekommenderar sedan ett enkelt sätt att minimera sekvenseffekter.', 'ta': 'கைமுறை தகவல் அறிவிப்பு NLP ஆராய்ச்சியின் முக்கியமான பகுதி அறிவிப்பு பணிகளை வடிவமைக்கும் போது, அறிவிப்பு இடைமுகத்தின் பண்பு இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தொடர் விளைவு ஒரு நிகழ்வுக்கு ஒரு விளக்கச்சீட்டை வழங்கிய பிறகு, விளக்குபவர் அதே விளக்கச்சீட்டை அடுத்த விளக்கச் செய்யலாம். குறைந்த தரம் உருப்படியை பார்க்கும் போது, அடுத்த உருப்படிக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மதிப்பின் மதிப்பை பாதிக்கலாம் சரிய மூன்று வித்தியாசமான மூல தரவுத்தளங்களை பயன்படுத்தி தானாகவே இணைப்பு படிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி தெளிவான விளைவு பிறகு தொடர் விளைவுகளை சிறிதாக்க ஒரு சுலபமான வழியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'NLP تحقیقات کے ایک حیاتی رقم ہے. جب انٹوریٹ ٹاکس طراحی کرتی ہیں، انٹوریٹ انٹرنیٹ کے خصوصے غیر منتظر ہیں کہ نتیجہ ڈاٹ سٹ میں آرٹیٹ فکتس کو پیش کرسکتے ہیں، انٹوریٹ کا انٹوریٹ منتظر اس کاغذ میں، ہم اگلوں کے اثرات کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں جہاں ایک کاغذ کے اثرات پہلے سے اثرات اثرات کر رہے ہیں. ایک لابل کو ایک مثال کے لئے مقرر کیا گیا ہے، اچھی لابل کے لئے بھی کم (یا زیادہ) ہو سکتا ہے۔ ٹاکس ریٹ کرنے کے موقع، کم کیلوٹ ایٹم کو دیکھنے کے لئے آگئی ایٹم کے لئے یا مثبت یا منفی سے دیا گیا اسکور پر اثر پا سکتا ہے. ہم نے تین مختلف گروپ سورسٹ ڈیٹسٹ کے ذریعے اپنے ساتھ تعلق کے مطالعہ سے دو قسم کے اثرات کا صاف صاف دلیل دیکھا ہے پھر ہم ایک ساده طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ کائنات اثرات کو کم کر دیں۔', 'uz': "Name Anʼanaviy vazifalarni yaratishda, taʼminlovchi interfeysning xossalari natijasida maʼlumot satrida artektlarni aniqlash mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha effektlarni ko'rib chiqqamiz. Birinchi narsalar birinchi narsalarning tashkilotlari birinchi narsalar tomonidan qo'llangan. @ info: whatsthis Vazifalar davomida, qiymatning qiymati elementini koʻrsatish uchun keyingi elementga koʻrsatilgan score yoki negativ boʻlishi mumkin. Biz uchta boshqa maʼlumotlar manbasiga avto-bogʻ'liq o'rganishni ishlatish uchun ikkita turdagi hujjatlarni ko'rib turamiz. Keyin biz cheksiz effektlarni kamaytirish uchun oddiy usulni talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Ghi chú bằng tay dữ liệu là yếu tố quan trọng trong nghiên cứu Njala. Khi thiết kế các công việc ghi chú, các tính chất của giao diện chú chú có thể vô tình dẫn đến các đồ vật trong bộ dữ liệu kết quả, làm hài lòng đánh giá. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi khám phá các hiệu ứng chuỗi nơi ghi chú của một mục bị ảnh hưởng bởi các mục trước. Sau khi gắn một nhãn vào một trường hợp, chú thích có thể ít (hay nhiều) khả năng gán cùng một nhãn vào trường hợp tiếp theo. Trong các nhiệm vụ đánh giá, thấy một mục dưới chất lượng thấp có thể ảnh hưởng đến điểm được đưa cho mục tiếp theo dù dương hay xấu. Chúng tôi thấy các dấu hiệu rõ ràng của các loài kết quả ba các bộ sự tương hộ độ lãng. Chúng tôi đề nghị một cách đơn giản để giảm thiểu hiệu ứng chuỗi.', 'bg': 'Ръчното анотиране на данни е жизненоважен компонент на изследванията на НЛП. При проектиране на задачи за анотация свойствата на интерфейса за анотация могат неволно да доведат до артефакти в получения набор от данни, което наклонява оценката. В тази статия изследваме последователните ефекти, при които анотациите на даден елемент са засегнати от предходните елементи. След като е присвоил един етикет на дадена инстанция, анотаторът може да има по-малка (или повече) вероятност да присвои същия етикет на следващия. По време на задачите за оценяване виждането на елемент с ниско качество може да повлияе положително или отрицателно на оценката, дадена на следващия елемент. Виждаме ясни доказателства за двата вида ефекти, използвайки проучвания за автокорелация върху три различни набора от данни. След това препоръчваме прост начин за минимизиране на ефектите от последователността.', 'da': 'Manuel dataannotering er en vigtig komponent i NLP forskning. Når du designer annotationsopgaver, kan egenskaberne for annotationsgrænsefladen utilsigtet føre til artefakter i det resulterende datasæt, hvilket skærper evalueringen. I denne artikel undersøger vi sekvenseffekter, hvor noteringer af et element påvirkes af de foregående elementer. Efter at have tildelt én etiket til en forekomst, kan kommentatoren være mindre (eller mere) tilbøjelig til at tildele den samme etiket til den næste. Under vurderingsopgaver kan det påvirke scoren, der gives til det næste element, enten positivt eller negativt. Vi ser tydelige beviser på begge typer af effekter ved hjælp af auto-korrelation undersøgelser over tre forskellige crowdsourcerede datasæt. Vi anbefaler derefter en enkel måde at minimere sekvenseffekter på.', 'nl': 'Handmatige data annotatie is een essentieel onderdeel van NLP onderzoek. Bij het ontwerpen van annotatietaken kunnen eigenschappen van de annotatie-interface onbedoeld leiden tot artefacten in de resulterende dataset, waardoor de evaluatie wordt beïnvloed. In dit artikel onderzoeken we sequentieffecten waarbij annotaties van een item worden beïnvloed door de voorgaande items. Nadat een label aan een instantie is toegewezen, kan de annotator minder (of meer) waarschijnlijk hetzelfde label toewijzen aan het volgende. Tijdens het beoordelen van taken kan het zien van een item van lage kwaliteit de score aan het volgende item positief of negatief beïnvloeden. We zien duidelijk bewijs van beide soorten effecten met behulp van auto-correlatie studies over drie verschillende crowdsourcing datasets. We raden dan een eenvoudige manier aan om sequentieffecten te minimaliseren.', 'hr': 'Ručna annotacija podataka je vitalna komponenta istraživanja NLP-a. Kada dizajniramo zadatke za annotaciju, vlasništvo interfejsa za annotaciju ne namjerno može dovesti do artefakta u rezultatnoj seti podataka, predstavljajući procjenu. U ovom papiru istražujemo sekvenčne učinke u kojima se navodi oznake predmeta utječe na prethodne predmete. Kad je dodijeljena jedna etiketa na primjer, annotator može biti manje (ili više) vjerojatno da će sljedeći dodijeliti istu etiketu. Tijekom ocjenjivanja zadataka, vidjeti nisku kvalitetnu predstavu može utjecati na rezultat koji je dato sljedećem predstavu ili pozitivno ili negativno. Vidimo jasne dokaze o obje vrste učinka koristeći ispitivanje automatske korelacije preko tri različite masovne podatke. Onda preporučujemo jednostavan način da minimiziramo učinke sekvencije.', 'de': 'Manuelle Datenannotation ist ein wichtiger Bestandteil der NLP-Forschung. Beim Entwerfen von Annotationsaufgaben können Eigenschaften der Annotationsschnittstelle versehentlich zu Artefakten im resultierenden Datensatz führen, was die Auswertung verzerrt. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir Sequenzeffekte, bei denen Anmerkungen eines Elements von den vorangegangenen Elementen beeinflusst werden. Nachdem einer Instanz ein Label zugewiesen wurde, kann es sein, dass der Annotator weniger (oder mehr) wahrscheinlich ist, dasselbe Label der nächsten zuweist. Während der Bewertung von Aufgaben kann das Sehen eines Elements niedriger Qualität die Bewertung des nächsten Elements positiv oder negativ beeinflussen. Wir sehen klare Beweise für beide Arten von Effekten durch Autokorrelationsstudien über drei verschiedene Crowdsourcing-Datensätze. Wir empfehlen dann eine einfache Möglichkeit, Sequenzeffekte zu minimieren.', 'id': 'Anotasi data manual adalah komponen penting dari penelitian NLP. Ketika merancang tugas anotasi, properti antarmuka anotasi secara tidak sengaja dapat membawa ke artefakta dalam set data yang berasal, membiasikan evaluasi. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengeksplorasi efek urutan di mana anotasi dari item dipengaruhi oleh item sebelumnya. Setelah memberikan satu label ke sebuah contoh, annotator mungkin kurang (atau lebih) kemungkinan untuk memberikan label yang sama ke contoh berikutnya. During rating tasks, seeing a low quality item may affect the score given to the next item either positively or negatively.  Kami melihat bukti jelas dari kedua jenis efek menggunakan studi korelasi otomatis di atas tiga dataset crowdsourced berbeda. We then recommend a simple way to minimise sequence effects.', 'sw': 'Tangazo la taarifa za mkono ni sehemu muhimu ya utafiti wa NLP. Wakati wakitengeneza tasnia za kutangaza, utambulisho wa mahusiano yanaweza kuipeleka viumbe katika seti ya taarifa za matokeo, wakipinga tathmini hizo. In this paper, we explore sequence effects where annotations of an item are affected by the preceding items.  Baada ya kuweka alama moja kwa mfano, mtangazaji huyo anaweza kuwa chini (au zaidi) ya kuweka alama moja kwa moja inayofuata. Wakati wa shughuli za kupambana, kwa kuona bidhaa ya kiwango cha chini inaweza kuathiri vipindi vinavyopewa kwa bidhaa inayofuata ama vizuri au hasi. Tunaona ushahidi wa wazi wa aina zote za athari hizi kwa kutumia utafiti wa kujihusiana binafsi zaidi ya seti tatu tofauti za taarifa za watu. Kisha tunapendekeza njia rahisi kupunguza madhara ya mfumo.', 'tr': 'Eller maglumat täblisasi NLP araştyrmasynyň wajyp komponenti. Notlamak işini tasarlanýanda, notlamak interface häsiýetleri niýetassyz şekilde artefaktlara netijä getirilip bilýär, değerlendirmeyi bias edip biler. Bu kagyzda, biz öňki täzelikleriň täzelikleri nähili täsirlerde etjek sanlaryny keşfetýäris. Täze bir etiket täblisaň, täze bir etiket täblisaň, täze bir etiket täblisaň az (ýada köp) bolup biler. Görniş derejesi üçin azaltmak üçin azalyk mykdary görkezilişinde soňky täblisaňa mümkin edip biler. Biz iki näçe täsir etkiniň otomatik bilen meňzeşlik öwrenmelerini üç dürli köp sanat setiriniň üstünde görýäris. Sonra sıralama etkisini azaltmak için basit bir yol maslahat ediyoruz.', 'af': "Hand data annotasie is 'n vitaal komponent van NLP ondersoek. Wanneer annotasie opdragte ontwerp, kan eienskappe van die annotasie koppelvlak onbetekenlik lei na artefakte in die resulteerde datastel en die evaluasie biasing. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons sekwensieeffekte waar aanmerking van 'n item beïnvloor word deur die vorige items. Het een etiket aan 'n voorbeeld toegewys, mag die annotator minder (of meer) waarskynlik wees om dieselfde etiket aan die volgende etiket te toewys. Terwyl 'n lae kwaliteit item sien, kan effekteer die telling gegee aan die volgende item of positief of negatief. Ons sien duidelike getuienis van beide tipes effekte met automaties-korrelasie studies oor drie verskillende verskeie verskeie verskeie datastelle. Ons beveel dan 'n eenvoudige manier om sekwensieeffekte te minimiseer.", 'sq': 'Anotacioni manual i të dhënave është një komponent jetik i kërkimit NLP. Kur dizajnojnë detyrat e anotacionit, pronësitë e interfaqes së anotacionit mund të çojnë pa qëllim në artefakte në grupin e të dhënave që rezultojnë, duke përkrahur vlerësimin. Në këtë letër, ne eksplorojmë efektet e sekuencës ku anotacionet e një objekti preken nga elementet e mëparshme. Duke i caktuar një etiketë një shembulli, anotatori mund të jetë më pak (ose më shumë) i mundshëm të caktojë të njëjtën etiketë tjetrit. Gjatë detyrave të vlerësimit, shihja e një objekti të cilësisë së ulët mund të ndikojë në rezultatin e dhënë objektit tjetër ose pozitivisht ose negativ. Ne shohim prova të qarta të të dy llojeve të efekteve duke përdorur studime auto-korrelacioni mbi tre grupe të dhënash të ndryshme. Pastaj rekomandojmë një mënyrë të thjeshtë për të minimizuar efektet e sekuencës.', 'am': 'የዳታ ማስታወቂያ የNLP ትምህርት ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ የአሳባቢ ስራዎችን በመግለጽ ጊዜ፣ የመግለጫው የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት ፍጥረት ፍጥረት ወደ ፍጥረቱ ዳታ ማውቀትን በመግለጥ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ አስቀድሞ የነበረውን ዕቃዎች የሚያስጨንቁበት የግንኙነት ውጤቶች እናፈልጋለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ አንዱን ምልክት ማሳየት ካደረገ በኋላ፣ ማስታወቂያው ትንሹ (ወይም ከዚህ በላይ) ይቻላል አንዱን ምልክት ለሚቀጥለው ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ During rating tasks, seeing a low quality item may affect the score given to the next item either positively or negatively.  በሦስት ልዩ የድምፅ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በራሱ ግንኙነት ትምህርት በተጠቃሚ የሁለቱን ዓይነት ግልጾችን እናያለን፡፡ በኋላም የውይይት ውጤቶችን ለማንሳሰስ ቀላል መንገድ እናስባለን፡፡', 'ko': '인공 데이터 표시는 자연 언어 처리 연구의 중요한 구성 부분이다.주석 임무를 설계할 때 주석 인터페이스의 속성은 무의식중에 결과 데이터에 위상이 집중되어 평가에 편차가 생길 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 서열 효과를 연구했는데 그 중 한 항목의 주석은 앞의 항목의 영향을 받았다.인스턴스에 레이블을 지정하면 주석기가 다음 인스턴스에 동일한 레이블을 지정할 가능성이 더 낮거나 더 클 수 있습니다.채점 임무에서 질이 낮은 항목을 보면 다음 항목의 채점에 적극적이거나 부정적인 영향을 미칠 수 있다.세 개의 서로 다른 패키지 데이터 집합에 대해 자체 관련 연구를 통해 우리는 이 두 가지 효과에 대한 명확한 증거를 보았다.그리고 서열 효과를 최소화하는 간단한 방법을 추천합니다.', 'fa': 'اعلام داده\u200cهای دستی یک بخش حیاتی از تحقیقات NLP است. هنگامی که طراحی کارهای نویسندگی، ویژگی\u200cهای interface ی نویسندگی می\u200cتوانند به ناخواسته به آرتفاکت\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای نتیجه\u200cای رهبری کنند، با توجه به ارزیابی. در این کاغذ، ما اثرات ردیابی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، جایی که اثرات یک کاغذ توسط کاغذ پیشین تاثیر می\u200cدهد. با توجه به یک نقاشی به یک مثال، نویسنده ممکن است کمتر (یا بیشتر) باشد که یک نقاشی را به بعدی تعیین کند. در طول امتیاز کارها، دیدن یک عنوان کیفیت پایین ممکن است امتیاز بعدی را یا مثبت یا منفی تأثیر دهد. ما مدرک روشنی از هر دو نوع اثرات را با استفاده از مطالعه\u200cهای ارتباط خودکار در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای مختلف می\u200cبینیم. سپس راهی ساده برای کمترین تاثیرات ردیابی پیشنهاد می کنیم.', 'hy': 'Ձեռքի տվյալների annoտացիան ՆԼՊ հետազոտության կարևոր բաղադրիչ է: When designing annotation tasks, properties of the annotation interface can unintentionally lead to artefacts in the resulting dataset, biasing the evaluation.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հաջորդականության էֆեկտները, որտեղ տարրերի նկարագրությունները ազդում են նախորդ տարրերի վրա: Օրինակի համար մեկ պիտակ տրված լինելուց հետո, նկարագրողը կարող է ավելի քիչ (կամ ավելի) հավանական լինել, որ միևնույն պիտակը տրվի հաջորդին: Հաշվի առնելու խնդիրների ընթացքում ցածր որակային տարրերի տեսնելը կարող է ազդել հաջորդ տարրերին տրված գնահատականը կամ դրական կամ բացասական: Մենք տեսնում ենք երկու տեսակի էֆեկտների պարզ ապացույցներ՝ օգտագործելով ավտոկորելացիայի ուսումնասիրություններ երեք տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Հետո մենք խորհուրդ ենք տալիս նվազեցնել հաջորդականության էֆեկտները:', 'az': 'Əl məlumatları NLP araşdırmasının vacib bir komponenti. Nöqtəsizlik işlərini dizayn etdikdə, nöqtəsizlik interfisinin xüsusiyyətləri niyə qədər artfaktlarına yol göstərə bilər. Nöqtəsizlik qurğusu ilə artfaktlarına yol göstərə bilər. Bu kağızda, əvvəlki nöqtələr təsirlərinin etkisi olduğu seçmə effektlərini keşfetirik. Bir məsəl üçün bir etiket təyin etdikdən sonra, etiketçi bir etiket daha az (ya da daha çox) olar, bəlkə də sonrakinə eyni etiket təyin edə bilər. Görüntüləri dəyişdirmək vaxtında, düşük kaliteli nöqtəsi görünmək sonraki nöqtəsinə verilən nöqtəsinə ya positiv ya da negativ təsiri olar. Biz üç müxtəlif qüvvətli məlumatlar arasında avtomatik-bağlantılı təhsillərini istifadə edən iki növ təsirlərin açıq dəlillərini görürük. Sonra sıralama etkisini azaltmaq üçün basit bir yol tövsiyə edirik.', 'bn': 'হ্যান্ডাল ডাটা বিজ্ঞাপন NLP গবেষণার একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ। বিস্তারিত কাজ নির্মাণ করার সময় বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ইন্টারফেসের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকভাবে ফলাফলের ডাটাসেটে আর্টারফেক্টের ক এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পূর্ববর্তী জিনিসগুলোর ক্ষেত্রে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হয়েছি। একটি উদাহরণের জন্য একটি লেবেল নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছিল, পরবর্তী লেবেলের মধ্যে অ্যান্টাটেটর কম (অথবা আরও) হতে পারে। কাজের সময়, একটি কম মানের বস্তু দেখে পরবর্তী বস্তুর স্কোরের প্রভাব ফেলতে পারে, কিন্তু ইতিবাচক অথবা নেতিবাচক। আমরা দুটো ধরনের প্রভাবের পরিষ্কার প্রমাণ দেখতে পাচ্ছি স্বয়ংক্রিয় সংযোগ গবেষণা ব্যবহার করে তিনটি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন জন We then recommend a simple way to minimise sequence effects.', 'bs': 'Ručna annotacija podataka je vitalna komponenta istraživanja NLP-a. Kada dizajniramo obaveze za annotaciju, vlasništvo interfejsa annotacije ne namjerno može dovesti do artefakta u rezultatnom setu podataka, predrasudavajući procjenu. U ovom papiru istražujemo sekvenčne učinke u kojima su annotacije prednjih predmeta utjecale. Kad je dodijeljena jedna etiketa na primjer, annotator može biti manje (ili više) vjerojatno da će sljedeći dodijeliti istu etiketu. Tijekom ocjenjivanja zadataka, vidjenja niskog kvalitetnog elementa može utjecati na rezultat koji je dobio sljedećem elementu ili pozitivno ili negativno. Vidimo jasne dokaze o obje vrste učinka koristeći ispitivanja automatske korelacije preko tri različite masovne datoteke. Onda preporučujemo jednostavan način da minimiziramo efekte sekvence.', 'cs': 'Manuální anotace dat je důležitou součástí výzkumu NLP. Při navrhování anotačních úloh mohou vlastnosti anotačního rozhraní neúmyslně vést k artefaktům ve výsledné datové sadě, což může ovlivnit hodnocení. V tomto článku zkoumáme sekvenční efekty, kdy jsou anotace položky ovlivněny předchozími položkami. Po přiřazení jednoho štítku instanci může být anotátor méně (nebo více) pravděpodobný, že přiřadí stejný štítek dalšímu. Během hodnocení úkolů může vidět položku nízké kvality ovlivnit skóre udělené další položce buď pozitivně nebo negativně. Vidíme jasné důkazy o obou typech účinků pomocí autokorelačních studií na třech různých crowdsourcingových datových sadách. Poté doporučujeme jednoduchý způsob, jak minimalizovat sekvenční efekty.', 'et': 'Käsitsi andmete märgistamine on uue arenguprogrammi uuringute oluline komponent. Anotatsiooniülesannete kujundamisel võivad annotatsiooniliidese omadused juhuslikult viia esemeteni saadud andmekogumis, mis kahjustab hindamist. Selles dokumendis uurime järjestuseefekte, kus eelnevad üksused mõjutavad üksuse annotatsioone. Pärast ühe sildi määramist eksemplarile võib annotator olla väiksem (või enam) tõenäosus sama sildi määramiseks järgmisele. Hindamisülesannete ajal võib madala kvaliteediga üksuse nägemine mõjutada järgmisele üksusele antud skoori kas positiivselt või negatiivselt. Me näeme selgeid tõendeid mõlemat tüüpi mõjude kohta, kasutades automaatse korrelatsiooni uuringuid kolme erineva ühisandmekogumi kohta. Seejärel soovitame lihtsat viisi järjestuse efektide minimeerimiseks.', 'fi': 'Manuaalinen tiedonannotointi on tärkeä osa NLP-tutkimusta. Huomautustehtäviä suunniteltaessa merkinnän käyttöliittymän ominaisuudet voivat tahattomasti johtaa artefakteihin tuloksena olevassa aineistossa, mikä vääristää arviointia. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme sekvenssitehosteita, joissa edellä mainitut kohteet vaikuttavat kohteen huomautuksiin. Kun huomautus on määrittänyt yhden tunnisteen esiintymälle, on todennäköisempää (tai enemmän) määrittää sama tunniste seuraavalle. Arviointitehtävien aikana heikkolaatuisen kohteen näkeminen voi vaikuttaa seuraavalle kohteelle annettuun pistemäärään joko positiivisesti tai negatiivisesti. Näemme selkeää näyttöä molemmista vaikutuksista käyttämällä kolmen eri joukkolähdeaineiston autokorrelaatiotutkimuksia. Tämän jälkeen suosittelemme yksinkertaista tapaa minimoida sekvenssivaikutukset.', 'ca': "L'anotació manual de dades és un component vital de la recerca NLP. Quan dissenyen tasques d'anotació, les propietats de l'interfície d'anotació poden conduir involuntàriament a artefactes en el conjunt de dades resultant, orientant l'evaluació. En aquest article explorem efectes de seqüència on les anotacions d'un article són afectades pels articles anteriors. Després d'assenyar una etiqueta a una instancia, l'anotator pot ser menys (o més) probable d'assenyar la mateixa etiqueta a la següent. Durant les tasques de valoració, veure un element de baixa qualitat pot afectar la puntuació dada al següent element tant positivament com negativament. Veiem evidencies clares de ambdós tipus d'efectes fent servir estudis de correlació automàtica sobre tres conjunts de dades d'origen públic diferents. Recomendem una manera senzilla de minimitzar els efectes de seqüència.", 'ha': "Manual data annotation is a vital component of NLP research.  Idan ana ƙayyade aikin mai zartar da shiri, tayari na interfekt ɗin shirin su iya ƙara wa matsayin da ake ƙara, yana iya ƙyale ga muhimmin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jarraba masu hushi a inda zartar abun wani abu na gaba ta yi amfani da su. Ga a raba alama guda zuwa wani misali, mai yiwuwa ya zama mafi ƙaranci (ko da mafi yiwuwa) ya raba alama guda zuwa na ƙarshen. Idan an danna aikin yin rabo, da wata abun nau'i ya ƙara, yana iya shagala ga nau'in da aka bai wa abun na daban, ko kuma a tsaye ko negative. Tuna ganin ãyõyi bayyananne biyu masu shiryuwa da amfani da mutane-mutane farat ɗaya a kan sauran danne-danne-danne uku daban-daban. Sa'an nan kuma Muke shauri wata hanya mai sauƙi zuwa ƙarami masu amfani da matsayin.", 'jv': 'Language politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Binding and finishing politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awake dhéwé éntukno ngerasakno karo hal-hal efek sing gampang ilegal auto-korolah Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan yang sampeyan kanggo mbelak seneng dadi.', 'he': 'ציון מידע ידני הוא רכיב חיוני של מחקר NLP. כאשר מעצבים משימות הערות, תכונות ממשק הערות יכולים באופן לא בכוון להוביל לארטфактים במערכת הנתונים הנוצאה, שמחיות את הערכה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו חוקרים תופעות רצף שבו הערות של פריט משפיעות על ידי פריטים הקודמים. לאחר שהוסיף תווית אחת למקרה, המכתב עשוי להיות פחות (או יותר) סביר להוסיף את אותו תווית למקרה הבא. במהלך משימות ציונים, לראות פריט איכות נמוכה יכול להשפיע על הציון שנתן לפרייט הבא או חיובי או שלילי. We see clear evidence of both types of effects using auto-correlation studies over three different crowdsourced datasets.  We then recommend a simple way to minimise sequence effects.', 'sk': 'Ročno označevanje podatkov je ključna sestavina raziskav NLP. Pri načrtovanju opravil označevanja lahko lastnosti vmesnika označevanja nenamerno povzročijo artefakte v nastalem naboru podatkov, kar ovira vrednotenje. V tem članku raziskujemo učinke zaporedja, kjer prejšnji elementi vplivajo na opombe elementa. Ko je primerku dodelil eno oznako, je morda verjetnost, da bo opomba dodelila isto oznako naslednji. Med opravili ocenjevanja lahko videnje elementa slabe kakovosti pozitivno ali negativno vpliva na oceno naslednjega elementa. Vidimo jasne dokaze o obeh vrstah učinkov z uporabo študij samokorelacije v treh različnih množičnih naborih podatkov. Nato priporočamo preprost način za zmanjšanje učinkov zaporedja.', 'bo': 'NLP འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་གལ་ཆུང་བའི་ཆ་ཤས་ཤིག་རེད། Designing annotation tasks, properties of the annotation interface can unintentionally lead to artefacts in the resulting dataset, biasing the evaluation. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་འགྲོས་ཀྱི་གོ་རྣམ་གྲངས དཔེར་ན་ཅིག་ལ་ཤོག་བྱང་གཅིག་བྱས་ཡོད་པ་དང་སྐྱེལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པར་བསམ་བྱས་ཡོད། རིམ་ཐང་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་སྐབས་སུ། རིམ་ཐང་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཞིག་མིན་ན་འོག ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་གསུམ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུ འོན་ཀྱང་། གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་ཆུང་དུ་ཆུང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སླ་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས་པ།'}
{'en': 'The strange geometry of skip-gram with negative sampling', 'ar': 'الهندسة الغريبة لتخطي الجرام مع أخذ العينات السلبية', 'es': 'La extraña geometría del skip-gram con muestreo negativo', 'fr': "L'étrange géométrie de Skip-Gram avec échantillonnage négatif", 'pt': 'A estranha geometria do skip-gram com amostragem negativa', 'ja': '負のサンプリングによるスキップグラムの奇妙なジオメトリ', 'hi': 'नकारात्मक नमूने के साथ स्किप-ग्राम की अजीब ज्यामिति', 'zh': '负采样跳跃克怪几何状', 'ru': 'Странная геометрия скип-граммы с отрицательной выборкой', 'ga': 'An geoiméadracht aisteach de skip-gram le sampláil diúltach', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული გეომეტრია, რომელიც გადაწყენებული გრამის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A kihagyott gramm furcsa geometriája negatív mintavétellel', 'el': 'Η παράξενη γεωμετρία του skip-gram με αρνητική δειγματοληψία', 'it': 'La strana geometria di skip-gram con campionamento negativo', 'kk': 'Негізгі түрлендіру үшін грамманы өткізу геометриясы', 'lt': 'Įprasta praleisto gramo geometrija su neigiamu mėginių ėmimu', 'mk': 'Чудната геометрија на прескокнувањето со негативно примерок', 'ms': 'Geometri pelik lompat-gram dengan sampel negatif', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമിന്റെ വിചിത്രമായ ജോമിത്രി', 'mt': 'Il-ġeometrija stramba ta’ skip-gram b’kampjunar negattiv', 'mn': 'Харин сөрөг хэлбэрээр алчуулах гайхалтай геометр', 'no': 'Den merkelige geometrien av hopp- gram med negativt samling', 'pl': 'Dziwna geometria skip-grama z ujemnym próbkowaniem', 'ro': 'Geometria ciudată a săriturii gramului cu eșantionare negativă', 'sr': 'Čudna geometrija skip-grama sa negativnim uzorcima', 'si': 'අවශ්\u200dය සැම්ප්ලින් එක්ක ස්කිප්-ග්\u200dරාම් එක්ක අනතුරු ජාමිතිය', 'sv': 'Den märkliga geometrin hos skip-gram med negativ provtagning', 'so': 'Joomeriyada ajaanibta ah ee sameynta negative', 'ta': 'எதிர்மறை மாதிரி செய்யும் skip-gram வித்தியாசமான geometry', 'ur': 'منفی نمپلینگ کے ساتھ Skip-gram کی عجیب جسمٹری', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hình học kỳ lạ của tua-gram với lấy mẫu âm.', 'da': 'Den mærkelige geometri af spring-gram med negativ prøveudtagning', 'hr': 'Čudna geometrija skip-grama sa negativnim uzorcima', 'nl': 'De vreemde geometrie van skip-gram met negatieve sampling', 'bg': 'Странната геометрия на скок-грам с отрицателни проби', 'de': 'Die seltsame Geometrie von Skip-Gramm mit negativer Abtastung', 'id': 'Geometri aneh dari skip-gram dengan sampel negatif', 'ko': '마이너스 샘플링 skip-gram의 기이한 기하학적', 'sw': 'The strange geometry of skip-gram with negative sampling', 'fa': 'ژومتری عجیب از نمونه\u200cهای منفی', 'af': 'Die vreemde geometrie van skip- gram met negatiewe versameling', 'sq': 'Gjeometria e çuditshme e skip-gram me kampionat negative', 'am': 'የ-ግራም ግንኙነት ነፃ ምሳሌ', 'hy': 'Տարօրինակ երկրաչափությունը բացասական նմուշներով', 'bn': 'The strange geometry of skip-gram with negative sampling', 'bs': 'Čudna geometrija skip-grama sa negativnim uzorcima', 'az': 'N톛trafl캼 n칲mun톛l톛rl톛 atlay캼b 칞톛kilm톛sinin t톛톛cc칲bl칲 geometri', 'ca': 'La estranya geometria del skip-gram amb mostratges negatius', 'cs': 'Podivná geometrie skip-gramu s negativním vzorkem', 'et': 'Negatiivse proovivõtuga grammi kummaline geomeetria', 'tr': 'Negatif näme üçin atlamanın garip geometrisi', 'fi': 'Kummallista geometriasta, jossa on negatiivinen näytteenotto', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'sk': 'Čudna geometrija preskočnega grama z negativnim vzorčenjem', 'he': 'הגאומטריה המוזרה של דיפוק-גרם עם דגימות שליליות', 'ha': 'Ga ajabu geometry wa skip-gram da misali negative', 'bo': 'The strange geometry of skip-gram with negative sampling'}
{'en': 'Despite their ubiquity, word embeddings trained with skip-gram negative sampling (SGNS) remain poorly understood. We find that vector positions are not simply determined by semantic similarity, but rather occupy a narrow cone, diametrically opposed to the context vectors. We show that this geometric concentration depends on the ratio of positive to negative examples, and that it is neither theoretically nor empirically inherent in related embedding algorithms.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من انتشارها في كل مكان ، تظل عمليات دمج الكلمات المدربة على أخذ العينات السلبية للتخطي (SGNS) غير مفهومة جيدًا. نجد أن مواضع المتجهات لا يتم تحديدها ببساطة عن طريق التشابه الدلالي ، بل تشغل مخروطًا ضيقًا ، على عكس متجهات السياق تمامًا. نوضح أن هذا التركيز الهندسي يعتمد على نسبة الأمثلة الإيجابية إلى السلبية ، وأنه ليس من الناحية النظرية أو التجريبية متأصلاً في خوارزميات التضمين ذات الصلة.', 'pt': 'Apesar de sua onipresença, as incorporações de palavras treinadas com amostragem negativa (SGNS) permanecem pouco compreendidas. Descobrimos que as posições dos vetores não são simplesmente determinadas pela similaridade semântica, mas ocupam um cone estreito, diametralmente oposto aos vetores de contexto. Mostramos que esta concentração geométrica depende da razão de exemplos positivos para negativos, e que não é teórica nem empiricamente inerente aos algoritmos de incorporação relacionados.', 'fr': "Malgré leur omniprésence, les intégrations de mots entraînées avec l'échantillonnage négatif à saut de gramme (SGNS) restent mal comprises. Nous trouvons que les positions des vecteurs ne sont pas simplement déterminées par la similarité sémantique, mais qu'elles occupent plutôt un cône étroit, diamétralement opposé aux vecteurs de contexte. Nous montrons que cette concentration géométrique dépend du rapport entre les exemples positifs et négatifs, et qu'elle n'est ni théoriquement ni empiriquement inhérente aux algorithmes d'intégration connexes.", 'es': 'A pesar de su ubicuidad, las incrustaciones de palabras entrenadas con muestras negativas de salto (SGNS) siguen siendo poco conocidas. Encontramos que las posiciones de los vectores no están determinadas simplemente por la similitud semántica, sino que ocupan un cono estrecho, diametralmente opuesto a los vectores de contexto. Mostramos que esta concentración geométrica depende de la proporción de ejemplos positivos a negativos, y que no es ni teórica ni empíricamente inherente a los algoritmos de incrustación relacionados.', 'zh': '虽无所不在,而以跳过革兰氏阴采样(SGNS)训练之词嵌之犹知之甚少。 吾见向量位非略由语义相似性也,据一狭锥体,与上下文向量截然相反。 吾等明此何浓度决于正负示例比例,且嵌算法非理固有也。', 'ja': '普遍的であるにもかかわらず、スキップグラム陰性サンプリング（ ＳＧＮＳ ）でトレーニングされた単語埋め込みは、依然としてあまり理解されていない。ベクトルの位置は単純に意味の類似性によって決定されるのではなく、文脈ベクトルとは全く反対の狭い円錐を占めることがわかります。この幾何学的濃度は、正の例と負の例の比率に依存し、理論的にも経験的にも関連する埋め込みアルゴリズムに固有のものではないことを示しています。', 'ru': 'Несмотря на свою повсеместную распространенность, вложения слов, обученные с помощью пропуска отрицательной выборки (SGNS), остаются плохо понятыми. Мы находим, что позиции векторов определяются не просто семантическим сходством, а занимают узкий конус, диаметрально противоположный векторам контекста. Показано, что эта геометрическая концентрация зависит от соотношения положительных и отрицательных примеров, и что она не является ни теоретически, ни эмпирически присущей связанным алгоритмам встраивания.', 'hi': 'उनकी सर्वव्यापकता के बावजूद, स्किप-ग्राम नकारात्मक नमूनाकरण (एसजीएनएस) के साथ प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग खराब रूप से समझे जाते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि वेक्टर की स्थिति केवल शब्दार्थ समानता द्वारा निर्धारित नहीं की जाती है, बल्कि एक संकीर्ण शंकु पर कब्जा कर लेती है, जो संदर्भ वैक्टर के विपरीत है। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह ज्यामितीय एकाग्रता सकारात्मक से नकारात्मक उदाहरणों के अनुपात पर निर्भर करती है, और यह न तो सैद्धांतिक रूप से और न ही अनुभवजन्य रूप से संबंधित एम्बेडिंग एल्गोरिदम में निहित है।', 'ga': 'In ainneoin a n-uileláithreachais, ní thuigtear go leor fós as leabaithe focal atá oilte le sampláil scip-gram diúltach (SGNS). Faighimid amach nach bhfuil suímh veicteora á gcinneadh go simplí ag cosúlacht shéimeantach, ach go bhfuil siad i gcón cúng, go trasiméadrach i gcodarsnacht leis na veicteoirí comhthéacs. Léirímid go mbraitheann an tiúchan geoiméadrach seo ar an gcóimheas idir samplaí dearfacha agus diúltacha, agus nach bhfuil sé bunúsach go teoiriciúil ná go heimpíreach sna halgartaim leabaithe gaolmhara.', 'ka': 'მათი სამყაროდ, სიტყვების ინბედინციები, რომლებიც გადაწყვეტილი გამოსახულებით გამოსახულებით (SGNS) არაფერად პასუხულია. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ გვქტორის პოციაციები არა მხოლოდ სემონტიკური განსხვავებულია, მაგრამ უფრო კონექტიკური კონექტის განსხვავებულია, დიამარტიკურად კონტე ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს ჯეომეტრიული კონცენტრეცია დაახლოდება პოტიფიკაციური მაგალითან დასახლოებით, და რომ ეს არ არის ტეორეტიკური, არც ემპერიკურად ინტერესური ალგორიტებში.', 'el': 'Παρά την πανταχού παρουσία τους, οι ενσωμάτωση λέξεων εκπαιδευμένες με αρνητική δειγματοληψία (SGNS) παραμένουν ανεπαρκώς κατανοητές. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι διανυσματικές θέσεις δεν καθορίζονται απλά από σημασιολογική ομοιότητα, αλλά καταλαμβάνουν έναν στενό κώνο, διαμετρικά αντίθετο με τα διανυσματικά πλαίσια. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η γεωμετρική συγκέντρωση εξαρτάται από την αναλογία θετικών προς αρνητικών παραδειγμάτων και ότι δεν είναι ούτε θεωρητικά ούτε εμπειρικά εγγενής σε σχετικούς αλγόριθμους ενσωμάτωσης.', 'hu': 'Mindenütt jelen vannak, a skip-gram negatív mintavétellel (SGNS) kiképzett szóbeágyazások továbbra is rosszul érthetők. Úgy találjuk, hogy a vektorpozíciókat nem egyszerűen a szemantikai hasonlóság határozza meg, hanem inkább egy keskeny kúpot foglalnak el, amely átmérőlegesen ellentétes a kontextusvektorokkal. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a geometriai koncentráció a pozitív és negatív példák arányától függ, és hogy sem elméletileg, sem empirikusan nem rejlik a kapcsolódó beágyazási algoritmusokban.', 'it': 'Nonostante la loro ubiquità, le incorporazioni di parole addestrate con campionamento negativo skip-gram (SGNS) rimangono scarsamente comprese. Troviamo che le posizioni vettoriali non sono semplicemente determinate dalla somiglianza semantica, ma piuttosto occupano un cono stretto, diametralmente opposto ai vettori di contesto. Mostriamo che questa concentrazione geometrica dipende dal rapporto tra esempi positivi e negativi, e che non è né teoricamente né empiricamente inerente ai relativi algoritmi di embedding.', 'kk': 'Олардың жалпы байланысына қарамастан, сөздердің ендіру үшін сөздердің негативті мәліметтері (SGNS) өткізілген түсінбейді. Біз вектордың орналасуы тек семантикалық ұқсастықтығымен анықталмайды, бірақ шағын конус, диаметриялық контексті векторларға қарсы. Бұл геометриялық концентрациясы негативті мысалдардың қасиетіне тәуелді, теориялық және эмпирикалық алгоритмдерінің қасиетіне тәуелді.', 'lt': 'Nepaisant jų paplitimo, žodžių įterpimas, apmokytas atliekant neigiamą mėginių ėmimą (SGNS), tebėra prastai suprantamas. We find that vector positions are not simply determined by semantic similarity, but rather occupy a narrow cone, diametrically opposed to the context vectors.  Mes rodome, kad ši geometrinė koncentracija priklauso nuo teigiamų ir neigiamų pavyzdžių santykio ir kad ji nėra nei teoriškai, nei empiriškai būdinga susijusiems įterpimo algoritmams.', 'ms': 'Walaupun mereka berada di mana-mana, penyembedding perkataan dilatih dengan penerimaan sampel negatif skip-gram (SGNS) tetap tidak faham. Kita dapati kedudukan vektor tidak hanya ditentukan oleh persamaan semantik, tetapi menggunakan konus yang sempit, secara diametrik bertentangan dengan vektor konteks. Kita menunjukkan bahawa konsentrasi geometrik ini bergantung pada nisbah contoh positif kepada negatif, dan ia tidak secara teori atau empirik terkandung dalam algoritma penyembedding berkaitan.', 'ml': 'അവരുടെ സ്വതന്ത്ര്യത്തിന് ശേഷം, സ്പിപ്പ് ഗ്രാമിന്റെ നെഗേറ്റീവ് മാമ്പിള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d കുറച്ച് മനസ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് സമീപത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നില്ല എന്ന് നമുക്ക് തോന്നുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ഒരു ചെറുതായ കോണിനെ പ്രവര നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഈ ജോമിത്രിക ക കോണ്\u200dസെന്റേഷന്\u200d നേരിട്ട ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളുടെ വിഭാഗത്തെ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു എന്നാണ്, അത് സാധാ', 'mt': 'Minkejja li jinsabu kullimkien, l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem imħarrġa b’kampjunar negattiv skip-gram (SGNS) jibqgħu mifhuma ħażin. Aħna nsibu li l-pożizzjonijiet tal-vetturi mhumiex sempliċement determinati minn similarità semantika, iżda pjuttost okkupaw konju dejaq, b’mod dijametriku oppost għall-vetturi tal-kuntest. Aħna nuru li din il-konċentrazzjoni ġeometrika tiddependi fuq il-proporzjon ta’ eżempji pożittivi għal negattivi, u li la teoretikament u lanqas empirikament hija inerenti f’algoritmi ta’ inkorporazzjoni relatati.', 'mn': 'Тэдний хаана ч байж болохгүй гэсэн үг бичлэгүүд нь алдагдах грамм сөрөг хэлбэрээр сургалт авсан юм. Бид векторын байр суурь нь зөвхөн семантик тэнцүү байдалтай тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Гэхдээ жижиг конус, диаметр нөхцөл векторуудын эсрэг. Бид энэ геометрийн төвлөрөл нь эерэг жишээнтэй харьцааны харьцааны хамааралтай гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь теоретик болон эерэг хэлбэрээр хамааралтай алгоритмын харьцааны хамааралтай байхгүй.', 'no': 'Til tross av universet, vert ordinnbyggingar trengte med overskyving av negativt prøveprogram (SGNS) verkeleg forstått. Vi finn at vektorposisjonane er ikkje enkelt bestemt av semantiske likningar, men i staden opphav eit langt kone, diametrisk mot kontekstvektorane. Vi viser at denne geometriske konsentrasjonen avhengig av forholdet mellom positiv til negative eksemplar, og at det er ikkje teoretisk eller empirisk inherent i relaterte innbyggingsalgoritme.', 'pl': 'Pomimo swojej wszechobecności osadzenia słów przeszkolone skip-gram negatywnym próbkowaniem (SGNS) pozostają słabo zrozumiane. Odkrywamy, że pozycje wektorów nie są po prostu określane przez podobieństwo semantyczne, ale raczej zajmują wąski stożek, diametralnie przeciwny do wektorów kontekstowych. Pokazujemy, że ta koncentracja geometryczna zależy od stosunku przykładów pozytywnych do negatywnych i że nie jest ani teoretycznie, ani empirycznie nieodłączna dla powiązanych algorytmów osadzania.', 'ro': 'În ciuda ubiquității lor, încorporările de cuvinte instruite cu eșantionare negativă skip-gram (SGNS) rămân slab înțelese. Observăm că pozițiile vectoriale nu sunt determinate doar de similitudinea semantică, ci ocupă mai degrabă un con îngust, diametral opus vectorilor contextului. Aratăm că această concentrație geometrică depinde de raportul dintre exemplele pozitive și negative și că nu este nici teoretic, nici empiric inerentă algoritmilor de încorporare asociați.', 'sr': 'Uprkos njihovoj svjetskosti, uključene reèi obučene negativnim uzorcima skip-grama (SGNS) ostaju loše shvaćene. Nalazimo da pozicije vektora nisu jednostavno određene semantičkom sličnošću, već zauzimaju uski konj, dijamantski suprotno kontekstskim vektorima. Pokazujemo da ova geometrska koncentracija zavisi od odnosa pozitivnih na negativne primjere i da nije ni teoretički niti empirički inherenta u povezanim ugrađenim algoritmima.', 'si': 'ඔවුන්ගේ ස්වභාවිතාවට නමුත්, වාර්තාව ස්පිප් ග්\u200dරාම් නිරාක්\u200dෂිත සැම්ප්ලින් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන් අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙක්ටර් ස්ථානය සාමාන්තික වර්ගයෙන් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්නේ නැහැ, නමුත් අඩු කෝන් එකක් වෙන්න, ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ජ්\u200dයාමිතික සංවර්ධනය අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ නැති උදාහරණ වලට, ඒ වගේම ඒක සාධාරණික විදිහට නැත', 'mk': 'И покрај нивното насекаде, зборовите обучени со пропуштање на негативни примероци (СГНС) остануваат лошо разбрани. Најдовме дека позициите на векторите не се одредени само од семантична сличност, туку повеќе окупираат тесен кон, дијаметрички спротивно на контекстните вектори. Ние покажуваме дека оваа геометриска концентрација зависи од односот помеѓу позитивни и негативни примери, и дека не е ниту теоретски ниту емпирички ингерентна во поврзаните вградувачки алгоритми.', 'so': 'Inta kastoo ay ka daahirsanaayeen, hadal ku tababarida sameynta koob-gram (SGNS) ayaa si xun u garanaya. Waxaynu aragnaa in goobaha jidhka wadista aan si siman oo kaliya looma qeexayo, laakiin waxay leedahay qeyb fudud oo ka gees ah wadooyinka hoose. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in horumarkii jiimeetirku ay ku xiran tahay qaybaha shakhsiga ah ee tusaalayaasha negative, taas oo aan si cilmi ah ugu qornayn ama si caqli ah ugu qoran algoreemo la xidhiidha.', 'sv': 'Trots deras allestädes förekomst är ord inbäddningar utbildade med skip-gram negativ sampling (SGNS) fortfarande dåligt förstådda. Vi finner att vektorpositioner inte bara bestäms av semantisk likhet, utan snarare upptar en smal kon, diametralt motsatt kontextvektorerna. Vi visar att denna geometriska koncentration beror på förhållandet mellan positiva och negativa exempel, och att den varken teoretiskt eller empiriskt är inneboende i relaterade inbäddningsalgoritmer.', 'ta': 'அவர்களுடைய தன்மையிலும் இருந்தாலும், வார்த்தை உள்ளீடுகளில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது skip- gram negative மாதிரி நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் நெறிமுறை நிலைகள் பாதிப்பு சமமாக இல்லை ஆனால் சிறிய கூம்பை வைத்துக் கொள்ளுங்கள், சூழல் நெறிகளுக்க நாம் இந்த ஜியூமிட்ரிக் கவனத்தை எதிர்மறை உதாரணங்களுக்கு விகிதத்தை சார்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் என்பதை காண்பிக்கிறோம். இது தொடர்பு உள்ளீ', 'ur': 'ان کی حوصلہ کے بغیر، اسپی گرم منفی نمونٹ (SGNS) کے ساتھ آموزش کئے ہوئے کلمات انبودینگ کم سمجھ رہے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ویکتور موقعیت صرف سیمنٹی برابری کے ذریعہ مقرر نہیں ہوتی، بلکہ ایک تنگ کان کو مشغول کریں، جسے متوسط ویکتروں کے مقابلہ میں diametrically مخالف ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ جسمیٹریک کنٹوریٹ منفی مثالوں کے نسبت مثبت پر ہے، اور یہ نہ تئوریٹی طور پر ہے اور نہ مثبت طور پر ارتباط دار الگوریٹم میں ہے۔', 'uz': "Ularning shaxsiyatlarida aytganda, skip gram negativ samol (SGNS) bilan o'rganilgan so'zlar yomon o'rganadi. Biz o'ylaymiz, vector joylari faqat semantik teng tomonidan aniqlanmagan emas, balki qisqa tugmani boshqarish, diametrik vektoriga bog'liq. Biz bu geometrik konsentrasi negativ misollarda yaxshi shaklga qo'shiladi, va bu tasavvulik amalga oshirilgan algoritlarga emas.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù có tồn tại, sự cấy ghép từ ngữ được đào tạo với mẫu âm bỏ (SGNS) vẫn chưa được hiểu rõ. Chúng tôi thấy các vị trí vector không chỉ được xác định bởi nét giống xã hội, mà còn chiếm một hình nón hẹp, trực tiếp trái ngược với véc- tơ ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi cho thấy sự tập trung hình học này phụ thuộc vào tỉ lệ các ví dụ tích cực với âm tính, và nó không thuộc về mặt lý thuyết hay thực tế trong thuật to án tham nhũng liên quan.', 'da': 'På trods af deres allestedsnærværelse, ord indlejringer trænet med skip-gram negativ sampling (SGNS) forbliver dårligt forstået. Vi finder ud af, at vektorpositioner ikke blot bestemmes af semantisk lighed, men snarere besætter en smal kegle, diametralt modsat kontekstvektorerne. Vi viser, at denne geometriske koncentration afhænger af forholdet mellem positive og negative eksempler, og at den hverken teoretisk eller empirisk er iboende i relaterede indlejringsalgoritmer.', 'nl': 'Ondanks hun alomtegenwoordigheid blijven woordembeddingen getraind met skip-gram negatieve sampling (SGNS) slecht begrepen. We vinden dat vectorposities niet alleen bepaald worden door semantische gelijkenis, maar veeleer een smalle kegel bezetten, diametraal tegenover de contextvectoren. We tonen aan dat deze geometrische concentratie afhankelijk is van de verhouding van positieve tot negatieve voorbeelden, en dat het noch theoretisch noch empirisch inherent is aan verwante embedding algoritmes.', 'bg': 'Въпреки тяхната всеобхватност, словесните вграждания, обучени с отрицателни проби (СГНС), остават слабо разбрани. Откриваме, че векторните позиции не се определят просто от семантично сходство, а по-скоро заемат тесен конус, диаметрално противоположен на контекстните вектори. Показваме, че тази геометрична концентрация зависи от съотношението на положителните към отрицателните примери и че тя не е нито теоретично, нито емпирично присъща на свързаните алгоритми за вграждане.', 'hr': 'Unatoč njihovoj svjetskosti, uključene riječi koje su obučene negativnim uzorcima skip-grama (SGNS) ostaju loše shvaćene. Nalazimo da pozicije vektora nisu jednostavno određene semantičkom sličnošću, već zauzimaju uski konj, dijamantski suprotno kontekstskim vektorima. Pokazujemo da ova geometrska koncentracija zavisi od odnosa pozitivnih na negativne primjere i da nije ni teoretički niti empirički inherenta u povezanim ugrađenim algoritmima.', 'de': 'Trotz ihrer Allgegenwärtigkeit sind Worteinbettungen, die mit Skip-Gram-Negativ-Sampling (SGNS) trainiert wurden, nur wenig verstanden. Wir stellen fest, dass Vektorpositionen nicht einfach durch semantische Ähnlichkeit bestimmt werden, sondern einen schmalen Kegel einnehmen, der diametral gegenüber den Kontextvektoren steht. Wir zeigen, dass diese geometrische Konzentration vom Verhältnis von positiven zu negativen Beispielen abhängt und dass sie weder theoretisch noch empirisch inhärent in verwandten Einbettungsalgorithmen ist.', 'id': 'Meskipun mereka berada di mana-mana, kata embedding dilatih dengan skip-gram sampel negatif (SGNS) tetap tidak mengerti dengan baik. Kami menemukan bahwa posisi vektor tidak hanya ditentukan oleh persamaan semantis, tetapi lebih baik mengumpulkan konus yang sempit, diametris bertentangan dengan vektor konteks. Kita menunjukkan bahwa konsentrasi geometris ini tergantung pada nisbah dari contoh positif ke negatif, dan bahwa itu tidak secara teori atau empiris ineren dalam algoritma penyembedding terkait.', 'ko': '보편적이지만, 그랜드 음성샘플(SGNS) 훈련을 건너뛴 단어 삽입은 여전히 이해가 부족하다.우리는 벡터의 위치가 의미의 유사성에 의해 결정되는 것이 아니라 좁은 원추를 차지하고 상하문 벡터와 정반대라는 것을 발견했다.우리는 이러한 기하학적 집중은 양과 음의 예시 비율에 달려 있고 관련 삽입 알고리즘에서 이론적으로 고유한 것도 경험적으로 고유한 것도 아니라는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Pamoja na ushirikiano wao, maneno yaliyofundishwa na sampuli hasi ya vifaa vinaendelea kuelewa vibaya. Tunaona kuwa nafasi za vector hazina madhubuti kwa usawa wa kimapenzi, bali kuingia kwenye mstari mdogo, kwa kiasi kikubwa kinyume na vectors wa muktadha. Tunaonyesha kuwa mkanganyiko huu wa kijiometric unategemea kiwango chanya cha mifano hasi, na kwamba siyo kwa nadharia wala kwa makini katika makubaliano yanayohusiana.', 'fa': 'با وجود اینکه همه جاشون هستند، استفاده کردن کلمه\u200cهایی با نمونه\u200cهای منفی (SGNS) پرتاب شده\u200cاند بد درک می\u200cکنند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که موقعیت\u200cهای ویکتور به ساده\u200cای از شبیه\u200cهای سیمانتیک تعیین نمی\u200cشوند، بلکه ترجیح می\u200cدهیم یک کان کوتاه را مشغول کنیم، در صورت الماس بر ویکتور\u200cهای محیط. ما نشان می دهیم که این تمرکز ژومتریک بر نسبت مثبت به مثال منفی بستگی دارد، و این نه نظریه\u200cای و نه امپراتیک در الگوریتم\u200cهای متصل شده است.', 'tr': 'Her yerde, gram negatif örnekler ile eğitilenen kelime içerikleri boş düşünmedi. Biz vektör pozisyonları sadece semantik benzeri tarafından belirlenmedik, fakat dik bir koni oluşturmak yerine, kontekst vektörlerine karşı diametrik olarak tanımlamıştır. Biz bu geometriň konsantrasynyň negatif örneklere görä baglanýandygyny görkeýäris we ol teoriýaly we empiriýaly daşary algoritmalarda däl.', 'sq': 'Pavarësisht nga gjendja e tyre, përfshirjet e fjalëve të stërvitura me mbikqyrjen negative skip-gram (SGNS) mbeten të keqkuptuara. Ne zbulojmë se pozicionet e vektorëve nuk janë thjesht të përcaktuara nga ngjashmëria semantike, por më tepër të okupojnë një konj të ngushtë, diametrikisht në kundërshtim me vektorët e kontekstit. We show that this geometric concentration depends on the ratio of positive to negative examples, and that it is neither theoretically nor empirically inherent in related embedding algorithms.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን ብልሃት ቢሆንም፣ በship-gram-negative ምሳሌ የተማሩት ቃላት ስህተት ጥቂት ሳይታወቁ ነው፡፡ የቦታ ቦታዎች በsemantic ብጤት ብቻ ሳይቆጠሩ እናገኛለን፣ ነገር ግን በአካባቢው vector ተቃራኒ ነው፡፡ ይህ የጂዮሜትሪክ ትኩረት በአካባቢ ምሳሌዎች በክፍለ አካባቢ እንዲሆን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Չնայած դրանց տարածությանը, բառերի ներդրումները, որոնք վարժեցվել են բաց-գրամ բացասական նմուշների ընդունման միջոցով, դեռևս վատ հասկանում են: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ վեկտորների դիրքերը պարզապես չեն որոշվում սեմանտիկ նմանության միջոցով, այլ ավելի ճիշտ են բռնում նեղ կոն, որը դիմադրում է կոնտեքստի վեկտորներին: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս երկրաչափական կոնցենտրացիան կախված է դրական և բացասական օրինակների հարաբերությունից, և որ այն ոչ տեսականորեն, ոչ էլ էմպիրիկապես բնորոշ չէ հարաբերված ներգրավման ալգորիթմների մեջ:', 'af': "Terwyl hulle omheerlikheid, word inbêding wat onderwerp is met skip-gram negatiewe versameling (SGNS) verkeerd verstaan word. Ons vind dat vektorposisies nie eenvoudig bepaal word deur semantiese gelykenis nie, maar eerder occupeer 'n sterk koning, diametrik teen die konteksvektore. Ons wys dat hierdie geometriese konsentrasie afhang van die verhouding van positiewe na negatiewe voorbeelde, en dat dit nie teorieese of empiriese inherent is nie in verwante inbêding algoritme nie.", 'az': 'Onların hər yerdə olmasına rağmen, sıçrama negatif nümunələri (SGNS) ilə təhsil edilən sözlər içərisində kötü anlaşılmamışdır. Biz vektor pozisyonları sadəcə semantik bənzəri ilə müəyyən edilməmişdir, ancaq çətin bir konu alırıq, diametrik məlumat vektorlarına qarşı. Biz bu geometrik konsantrasyonun pozitiv nümunələrə bağlı olduğuna göstəririk və bu nə teorik olaraq, nə də empirik olaraq bağlı bir içərisində olan algoritmlərə bağlı olduğunu göstəririk.', 'bn': 'তাদের বৈষম্য সত্ত্বেও, জাহাজ-গ্রাম নেতিবাচক নমুনা দ্বারা প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা শব্দগুলো খুব কম বুঝতে পারে। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে ভেক্টরের অবস্থান শুধুমাত্র সেমান্টিক সমতার দ্বারা নির্ধারিত নয়, বরং একটি স্বল্প কন্টেন্ট ভেক্টরের বিরুদ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই জীমিট্রিক কনসেন্টেশন নেতিবাচক উদাহরণের উপর ভালোভাবে নির্ভর করে এবং এটা ততিত্বের কোন বৈশিষ্ট্যিক ভাবে বাস করে না এবং সংশ্', 'ca': "Malgrat la seva ubicació, l'incorporació de paraules entrenada amb la mostra negativa skip-gram (SGNS) segueix mal entendida. Trobem que les posicions dels vectors no són simplement determinades per la similitud semàntica, sinó ocupen un còn estret, diamètricament oposat als vectors contextuals. We show that this geometric concentration depends on the ratio of positive to negative examples, and that it is neither theoretically nor empirically inherent in related embedding algorithms.", 'bs': 'Uprkos njihovoj svjetskosti, uključene riječi koje su obučene negativnim uzorcima skip-grama (SGNS) ostaju loše shvaćene. Nalazimo da pozicije vektora nisu jednostavno određene semantičkom sličnošću, već zauzimaju uski konj, dijamantski suprotno kontekstskim vektorima. Pokazujemo da ova geometrska koncentracija zavisi od odnosa pozitivnih na negativne primjere i da nije ni teoretički niti empirički inherenta u povezanim ugrađenim algoritmima.', 'cs': 'Navzdory své všudypřítomnosti, slovní vložení trénované skip-gram negativním vzorkováním (SGNS) zůstávají špatně pochopené. Zjišťujeme, že pozice vektorů nejsou jednoduše určeny sémantickou podobností, ale spíše obsahují úzký kužel, diametrálně proti kontextovým vektorům. Ukazujeme, že tato geometrická koncentrace závisí na poměru kladných a negativních příkladů a že není ani teoreticky ani empiricky inherentní souvisejícím algoritmům vkládání.', 'et': 'Hoolimata kõikjalt levivast sõnast, mida on koolitatud skip-gram negatiivse proovivõtmisega (SGNS), on sõnade manustamine endiselt halvasti mõistetav. Me leiame, et vektori positsioonid ei ole määratud lihtsalt semantilise sarnasuse, vaid pigem hõlmavad kitsast koonust, diameetriliselt konteksti vektorite vastu. Me näitame, et see geomeetriline kontsentratsioon sõltub positiivsete ja negatiivsete näidete suhtest ning et see ei ole teoreetiliselt ega empiiriliselt seotud manustamise algoritmidele omas.', 'fi': 'Yleisyydestään huolimatta skip-gram negatiivisella näytteenotolla (SGNS) koulutetut sanaupotukset ovat edelleen huonosti ymmärrettyjä. Havaitsemme, että vektorien sijainnit eivät ole pelkästään semanttisen samankaltaisuuden määrittämiä, vaan ne ovat kapeita kartioita, jotka ovat halkaisijaltaan vastakkaisia kontekstivektorien kanssa. Osoitamme, että tämä geometrinen pitoisuus riippuu positiivisten ja negatiivisten esimerkkien suhteesta ja että se ei ole teoreettisesti eikä empiirisesti luontainen niihin liittyviin upotusalgoritmeihin.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness string" in "context_BAR_stringClone Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo jeogratis iki dipunduké karo perusahaan anyar luwih dumadhi kanggo kalih basa, lan iki ngono kuwi kebutuhan theoretik dhéwé, ora ono langasara basa luwih apik dhéwé.', 'he': "למרות שכולם נמצאים, תוספות מילים מאומנות עם דגימות שליליות של סג'גרם (skip-gram negative sampling - SGNS) נשארות לא מובנות היטב. אנו מוצאים שמקומות הוקטורים לא נקבעים רק על ידי דומות סמנטיות, אלא מעדיף לכבוש קון צר, באופן קיצוני בניגוד לוקטורים הקשר. We show that this geometric concentration depends on the ratio of positive to negative examples, and that it is neither theoretically nor empirically inherent in related embedding algorithms.", 'sk': 'Kljub vsesplošni vseprisotnosti so besede, usposobljene z negativnim vzorčenjem preskočil gramov (SGNS), še vedno slabo razumljene. Ugotavljamo, da položaje vektorjev ne določa le semantična podobnost, temveč zasedajo ozek stožec, diametralno nasproten kontekstnim vektorjem. Pokazali smo, da je ta geometrijska koncentracija odvisna od razmerja med pozitivnimi in negativnimi primeri in da ni niti teoretično niti empirično neločljiva v sorodne algoritme vgradnje.', 'ha': "Babu da shirin su ba, sai maganar da aka sanar da shi da misãlin skip-gram-negative (SGNS) ba ta kasa fahimta ba. Munã gane cewa ma'anar hanya ba ta ƙayyade shi ba na daidaita kawai, kuma amma, ka yi riƙon hanci mai sauƙi, tare da dimetica yana tsakanin shiryoyi. Tuna nũna cewa wannan jumetriki yana dõgara ga rabon misãlai negative, kuma shi bã ta cikin littafin da keɓaki kuma bã ya cikin algoritori masu husũma.", 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ubiquity་དེ་བསྟུན་ནས་གསལ་གྲངས་སུ་འཇུག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ནང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་རྫུན་མི་ཤེས་པ་ཡིན། We find that vector positions are not simply determined by semantic similarity, but rather occupy a narrow cone, diametrically opposed to the context vectors. We show that this geometric concentration depends on the ratio of positive to negative examples, and that it is neither theoretically nor empirically inherent in related embedding algorithms.'}
{'en': 'Natural Language Processing with Small Feed-Forward Networks', 'ar': 'معالجة اللغة الطبيعية مع شبكات التغذية الأمامية الصغيرة', 'es': 'Procesamiento de lenguaje natural con pequeñas redes de alimentación anticipada', 'pt': 'Processamento de linguagem natural com pequenas redes feed-forward', 'fr': 'Traitement du langage naturel avec de petits réseaux Feed-Forward', 'zh': '用小前馈网络自然语言之', 'ja': '小さなフィードフォワードネットワークによる自然言語処理', 'hi': 'छोटे फ़ीड-फॉरवर्ड नेटवर्क के साथ प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण', 'ru': 'Обработка естественного языка с помощью небольших сетей прямой связи', 'ga': 'Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha le Líonraí Beaga Feed-Ar Aghaidh', 'el': 'Επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας με μικρά δίκτυα τροφοδοσίας', 'hu': 'Természetes nyelv feldolgozása kis hálózatokkal', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Шағын ақпар- алғашқы желілерімен табиғлық тіл процесіName', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos apdorojimas mažais pašarų perdavimo tinklais', 'mk': 'Природно обработување јазик со мали мрежи за пренос на податоци', 'it': 'Elaborazione del linguaggio naturale con piccole reti di feed-forward', 'ms': 'Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami dengan Rangkaian Suapan-Maju Kecil', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс жижиг Feed-Forward Networks-тэй', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'L-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali b’Netwerks Żgħar ta’ Trasferiment', 'pl': 'Przetwarzanie języka naturalnego z małymi sieciami Feed-Forward', 'ro': 'Prelucrarea limbajului natural cu rețele mici de alimentare', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Prirodni jezik proces sa malim mrežama za hranu', 'so': 'Horumarinta afka asalka ah ee la xiriira Internetka Small Feed-Forward', 'ta': 'சிறிய செலுத்து- முன்னோக்கி வலைப்பின்னல்களுடன் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'چھوٹی فیڈ-فورڈ نیٹورک کے ساتھ طبیعی زبان پرسس کرنا', 'sv': 'Behandling av naturligt språk med små nätverk för vidarebefordran', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bản quản lý ngôn ngữ với mạng tươi trẻ', 'bg': 'Обработка на естествен език с малки мрежи за подаване', 'nl': 'Natuurlijke taalverwerking met kleine feed-forward netwerken', 'de': 'Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache mit kleinen Feed-Forward Netzwerken', 'id': 'Proses Bahasa Alami dengan Rangkaian Ke-Maju-Sumber Kecil', 'ko': '작은 피드백 네트워크를 갖춘 자연 언어 처리', 'fa': 'پرداخت زبان طبیعی با شبکه\u200cهای کوچک غذا پیش\u200cفرستادن', 'da': 'Behandling af natursprog med små feed-forward-netværk', 'hr': 'Prirodni jezik procesiranje s malim mrežama naprijed hrane', 'sw': 'Utendaji wa lugha ya asili na Mtandao mdogo wa Feed-Forward', 'af': 'Natuurlike Taal Verwerking met Klein Voorwerke', 'sq': 'Procesimi i gjuhës natyrore me rrjete të vogla të furnizimit', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Kiçik Besər-İleri Sənələri ilə Təbiətli Dil İşləməsi', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া', 'bs': 'Prirodni jezik procesiranje sa malim mrežama za hranu', 'tr': 'Kiçi Beslemek-ileri Aýry bilen Natal Dil Prozesi', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ փոքր հոսքի-առաջ ցանցերով', 'cs': 'Zpracování přirozeného jazyka s malými sítěmi Feed-Forward', 'et': 'Loodusliku keele töötlemine väikeste edastamisvõrkudega', 'fi': 'Luonnollisen kielen käsittely pienillä syöttöverkkoilla', 'ca': "Procesament de llenguatges naturals amb petites xarxes d'alimentació", 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Obdelava naravnega jezika z majhnimi omrežji za posredovanje podatkov', 'he': 'מעבדת שפת טבעית עם רשתות מזון-קדימה קטנות', 'bo': 'ཆུང་ཀུ་དང་སྔོན་སྐྱོད་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'We show that small and shallow feed-forward neural networks can achieve near state-of-the-art results on a range of unstructured and structured language processing tasks while being considerably cheaper in memory and computational requirements than deep recurrent models. Motivated by resource-constrained environments like mobile phones, we showcase simple techniques for obtaining such small neural network models, and investigate different tradeoffs when deciding how to allocate a small memory budget.', 'ar': 'نظهر أن الشبكات العصبية الصغيرة والضحلة يمكن أن تحقق نتائج قريبة من أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا في مجموعة من مهام معالجة اللغة غير المهيكلة والمنظمة بينما تكون أرخص بكثير في الذاكرة والمتطلبات الحسابية من النماذج المتكررة العميقة. بدافع من البيئات ذات الموارد المحدودة مثل الهواتف المحمولة ، نعرض تقنيات بسيطة للحصول على مثل هذه النماذج الصغيرة للشبكات العصبية ، ونبحث في المفاضلات المختلفة عند تحديد كيفية تخصيص ميزانية صغيرة للذاكرة.', 'es': 'Demostramos que las redes neuronales de alimentación anticipada pequeñas y poco profundas pueden lograr resultados casi de vanguardia en una variedad de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje estructuradas y no estructuradas, a la vez que son considerablemente más económicas en cuanto a requisitos de memoria y computación que los modelos recurrentes profundos. Motivados por entornos con recursos limitados, como los teléfonos móviles, mostramos técnicas sencillas para obtener modelos de redes neuronales tan pequeños e investigamos diferentes compensaciones a la hora de decidir cómo asignar un presupuesto de memoria pequeño.', 'pt': 'Mostramos que redes neurais feedforward pequenas e superficiais podem alcançar resultados próximos do estado da arte em uma variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem estruturada e não estruturada, sendo consideravelmente mais baratas em memória e requisitos computacionais do que modelos recorrentes profundos. Motivados por ambientes com recursos limitados, como telefones celulares, apresentamos técnicas simples para obter esses pequenos modelos de rede neural e investigamos diferentes compensações ao decidir como alocar um pequeno orçamento de memória.', 'fr': "Nous montrons que des réseaux de neurones prévisionnels petits et peu profonds peuvent obtenir des résultats proches de la pointe de la technologie pour une gamme de tâches de traitement du langage structurées et non structurées tout en étant considérablement moins coûteux en termes de mémoire et de calcul que les modèles récurrents profonds. Motivés par des environnements à ressources limitées, tels que les téléphones mobiles, nous présentons des techniques simples pour obtenir des modèles de réseaux neuronaux aussi petits et étudions différents compromis lorsqu'il s'agit de décider comment allouer un petit budget mémoire.", 'ja': '小規模で浅いフィードフォワード型ニューラルネットワークは、深い反復モデルよりもメモリと計算要件がかなり安価でありながら、非構造化および構造化言語処理タスクの範囲でほぼ最先端の結果を達成することができることを示しています。携帯電話のようなリソースに制約された環境をモチーフにして、そのような小さなニューラルネットワークモデルを取得するための簡単なテクニックを紹介し、小さなメモリ予算を割り当てる方法を決定するときに異なるトレードオフを調査します。', 'ru': 'Мы показываем, что небольшие и неглубокие нейронные сети с прямой связью могут достичь почти самых современных результатов по ряду неструктурированных и структурированных задач языковой обработки, в то же время значительно удешевляя требования к памяти и вычислениям по сравнению с глубокими рекуррентными моделями. Мотивированные ограниченными ресурсами средами, такими как мобильные телефоны, мы демонстрируем простые методы получения таких небольших нейросетевых моделей и исследуем различные компромиссы при принятии решения о том, как распределить небольшой бюджет памяти.', 'zh': '小浅层前馈神经网络者,非结构化结构化言也,近乎先进,内存计深循环模型也。 手机资受限激,展其小形神经网络形之约术,分而小之内存论其权衡。', 'hi': 'हम दिखाते हैं कि छोटे और उथले फ़ीड-फॉरवर्ड तंत्रिका नेटवर्क गहरे आवर्तक मॉडल की तुलना में स्मृति और कम्प्यूटेशनल आवश्यकताओं में काफी सस्ता होने के दौरान असंरचित और संरचित भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों की एक श्रृंखला पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। मोबाइल फोन जैसे संसाधन-विवश वातावरण से प्रेरित होकर, हम इस तरह के छोटे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल प्राप्त करने के लिए सरल तकनीकों का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और एक छोटे से मेमोरी बजट को आवंटित करने का निर्णय लेते समय विभिन्न ट्रेडऑफ की जांच करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Léirímid gur féidir le líonraí néaracha beathaithe beaga agus éadomhain torthaí gar den scoth a bhaint amach ar raon tascanna próiseála teanga neamhstruchtúrtha agus struchtúrtha agus iad i bhfad níos saoire ó thaobh cuimhne agus riachtanais ríomhaireachtúla ná samhlacha athfhillteacha domhain. Arna spreagadh ag timpeallachtaí atá srianta ó thaobh acmhainní ar nós fóin phóca, taispeánaimid teicnící simplí chun mionsamhlacha líonraí néaracha den sórt sin a fháil, agus fiosraíonn muid malairtí éagsúla agus cinneadh á dhéanamh againn conas buiséad cuimhne beag a leithdháileadh.', 'hu': 'Megmutatjuk, hogy a kis és sekély előirányú neurális hálózatok számos strukturálatlan és strukturált nyelvfeldolgozási feladat esetén közel korszerű eredményeket érhetnek el, miközben a memória és a számítástechnikai követelmények jelentősen olcsóbbak, mint a mély visszatérő modellek. Az erőforrás-korlátozott környezetek, mint például a mobiltelefonok motiválják, egyszerű technikákat mutatunk be az ilyen kis neurális hálózati modellek eléréséhez, és különböző kompromisszumokat vizsgálunk, amikor eldöntjük, hogyan osztunk ki egy kis memória költségvetést.', 'el': 'Δείχνουμε ότι τα μικρά και ρηχά νευρωνικά δίκτυα τροφοδοσίας μπορούν να επιτύχουν αποτελέσματα σχεδόν τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε μια σειρά από μη δομημένες και δομημένες εργασίες επεξεργασίας γλωσσών, ενώ είναι σημαντικά φθηνότερα όσον αφορά τη μνήμη και τις υπολογιστικές απαιτήσεις από τα βαθιά επαναλαμβανόμενα μοντέλα. Με κίνητρο από περιβάλλοντα περιορισμένων πόρων, όπως τα κινητά τηλέφωνα, παρουσιάζουμε απλές τεχνικές για την απόκτηση τέτοιων μικρών μοντέλων νευρωνικών δικτύων, και διερευνούμε διαφορετικές διαφορές όταν αποφασίζουμε πώς θα διαθέσουμε ένα μικρό προϋπολογισμό μνήμης.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პატარა და ცოტარა ფორმაციული ნეიროლური ქსელები შეუძლიათ წარმოდგენის გარეშე სტრუქტურაციული და სტრუქტურაციული ენების პროცესირების პარამეტრების პარამეტრებში, როცა მნიშვნელოვანია მოტივირებული რესურსების გადარჩენებით, როგორც მობილური ტელეფონები, ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენეთ მარტივი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელების განვითარებისთვის მარტივი ტექნონგიების გამოყენება და განსხვავებ', 'it': "Mostriamo che le reti neurali feed-forward piccole e superficiali possono raggiungere risultati quasi all'avanguardia su una serie di attività di elaborazione del linguaggio non strutturate e strutturate, pur essendo notevolmente più economiche in memoria e requisiti computazionali rispetto ai modelli ricorrenti profondi. Motivati da ambienti limitati dalle risorse come i telefoni cellulari, mostriamo tecniche semplici per ottenere modelli di rete neurale così piccoli e indaghiamo diversi compromessi quando decidiamo come allocare un budget di memoria ridotto.", 'kk': 'Біз кішкентай және үлкен ақпараттық невралдық желілерді құрылмаған және құрылмаған тіл өңдеу тапсырмаларының арасында жады және компьютерлік талаптарында қайталану үлгілерінен артық болып жатыр дегенді көрсетедік. Мобильді телефондар сияқты ресурстардың шектелген орталары, бұл кішкентай невралды желі моделдерді алу үшін қарапайым техникаларды көрсету және кішкентай жады бюджетінің қалай бөлігін шешінде, әртүрлі тәртіпсізд', 'lt': 'Mes parodome, kad maži ir plokščiai prieinami neurologiniai tinklai gali pasiekti beveik naujausius rezultatus įvairiose nestruktūrizuotose ir struktūrizuotose kalbų apdorojimo užduotyse, tuo pačiu būdami gerokai pigesni atminties ir skaičiavimo reikalavimuose nei giliai pasikartojantys modeliai. Motivuojamos išteklių ribota aplinka, pavyzdžiui, mobilieji telefonai, rodome paprastus būdus, kaip gauti tokius mažus nervinių tinklų modelius, ir tiriame skirtingus kompromisus nusprendžiant, kaip skirti mažą atminties biudžetą.', 'mk': 'Ние покажуваме дека малите и ниски нервни мрежи можат да постигнат резултати во близина на најсовремените резултати на голем број неструктурирани и структурирани задачи за обработување јазик, додека се значително поевтини во меморијата и компјутациските барања од длабоките рецидентни мо Мотивирани од средини со ограничување на ресурсите како мобилните телефони, покажуваме едноставни техники за добивање на вакви мали модели на нервната мрежа, и истражуваме различни компромиси кога одлучуваме како да доделиме мал буџет за меморија.', 'ms': 'Kami menunjukkan bahawa rangkaian saraf feed-forward kecil dan rendah dapat mencapai keputusan dekat-state-of-the-art pada julat tugas pemprosesan bahasa yang tidak terstruktur dan terstruktur sementara menjadi jauh murah dalam memori dan keperluan komputasi daripada model yang berulang dalam. Disimunkan oleh persekitaran yang dikuasai sumber seperti telefon bimbit, kami tunjukkan teknik sederhana untuk mendapatkan model rangkaian saraf kecil seperti ini, dan menyelidiki perdagangan yang berbeza apabila memutuskan bagaimana untuk memisahkan anggaran ingatan kecil.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, ചെറിയ ഫീഡ് മുന്നോട്ടുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് അടുത്ത് നില്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എത്താന്\u200d കഴ മൊബൈല്\u200d ഫോണ്\u200d പോലെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ പരിസ്ഥിതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇത്തരം ചെറിയ നെറിയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡ', 'mt': 'Aħna nuru li netwerks newrali żgħar u baxxi jistgħu jiksbu riżultati qrib l-aktar avvanzati fuq firxa ta’ kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi mhux strutturati u strutturati filwaqt li jkunu konsiderevolment irħas fir-rekwiżiti tal-memorja u tal-komputazzjoni minn mudelli rikorrenti profondi. Motivati minn ambjenti ristretti fir-riżorsi bħal telefoni ċellulari, a ħna nuru tekniki sempliċi għall-ksib ta’ mudelli ta’ netwerk newrali żgħar bħal dawn, u ninvestigaw kompromessi differenti meta niddeċiedu kif jallokaw baġit ta’ memorja żgħira.', 'mn': 'Бид жижиг, гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний ойролцоогоор бүтээгдэхүүн болон бүтээгдэхүүнтэй хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагааг олон хэсэгт хүргэж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Хөдөлгөөн утаснууд шиг нөөцийн хязгаарлагдсан орчинд хөдөлгөөнтэй, бид ийм жижиг мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загваруудыг олж авах энгийн техникуудыг харуулж, жижиг санамжийн төлөвлөгөө хэрхэн зарцуулахыг шийдэхэд өөр өөр худалда', 'no': 'Vi viser at små og fleire kjeldeforandringsnettverk kan oppnå nær status-of-the-art resultatet på eit rekkjefølgje av ikkje-strukturerte og strukturerte språkshandsamingsoppgåver mens det er mykje billige i minne og datamaskinekrav enn dype rekurserande modeller. Flytt av ressursavgrensa miljø som mobiltelefonar, viser vi enkle teknikk for å få slike små neuralnettverksmodeller, og undersøker ulike forskjellige forskjellingar når du bestemmer korleis å tildele ein liten minnebruk.', 'pl': 'Pokazujemy, że małe i płytkie sieci neuronowe mogą osiągnąć niemal najnowocześniejsze wyniki w zakresie szeregu nieustrukturyzowanych i ustrukturyzowanych zadań przetwarzania języka, a jednocześnie są znacznie tańsze w zakresie pamięci i wymagań obliczeniowych niż głębokie modele powtarzające się. Motywowani środowiskami ograniczonymi zasobami, takimi jak telefony komórkowe, prezentujemy proste techniki uzyskiwania tak małych modeli sieci neuronowych i badamy różne kompromisy podczas decyzji o przydzieleniu małego budżetu pamięci.', 'ro': 'Vom arăta că rețelele neuronale mici și superficiale pot obține rezultate aproape de ultimă oră pe o serie de sarcini de procesare a limbajului nestructurate și structurate, fiind în același timp considerabil mai ieftine în memorie și cerințe de calcul decât modelele recurente profunde. Motivați de medii restricționate de resurse, cum ar fi telefoanele mobile, prezentăm tehnici simple pentru obținerea unor astfel de modele de rețele neurale mici și investigăm diferite compromisuri atunci când decidem cum să alocăm un buget mic de memorie.', 'sr': 'Pokazujemo da mali i plitki neuralni mreži mogu postići blizu rezultata umetnosti na nizu neostrukturovanih i strukturovanih zadataka za obrađivanje jezika dok su veoma jeftiniji u pamćenju i računalnim zahtevima nego duboki rekonstruirani modeli. Pokazali smo jednostavne tehnike za dobivanje takvih modela neuralne mreže i istraživati različite trgovine kada odlučimo kako odrediti mali budžet za pamćenje.', 'si': 'අපි පෙන්වන්නේ පුංචි හා බොහොම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැහැ සහ සංස්ථාපිත භාෂාව මෝබායිල් ෆෝන් වගේ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය පෙන්වන්න, අපි ඒ වගේ ප', 'so': "Waxaynu tusnaynaa in shabakado yaryar oo shallo ah oo daboolan oo cajiibta neurada ayaa gaadhi kara arimaha u dhow xaaladda farshaxanka ah oo lagu sameyn karo shaqooyin kala duduwan oo aan la dhisay oo la dhisay luuqado, iyadoo aad ugu qiimo yar xusuusta iyo baahida xisaabta oo ka qiimo dheer samooyinka soo socda. Dhaqdhaqaaqyo deegaanka qasabka ah sida telefoonka telefoonka oo kale, waxaynu tusnaa qaabab fudud oo aad u heli karto noocyada shabakada neurada ah, waxaana baaritaan baaritaanka kala duduwan marka aan go'aanno sida loo qaybiyo bajetarka xusuusta yar.", 'sv': 'Vi visar att små och grunda neurala nätverk kan uppnå nästan toppmoderna resultat på en rad ostrukturerade och strukturerade språkbehandlingsuppgifter samtidigt som de är betydligt billigare i minne och beräkningskrav än djupa återkommande modeller. Motiverade av resursbegränsade miljöer som mobiltelefoner visar vi upp enkla tekniker för att få fram sådana små neurala nätverksmodeller, och undersöker olika avvägningar när vi beslutar hur vi ska fördela en liten minnesbudget.', 'ta': 'நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் சிறிய மற்றும் கஷ்டமான உணவு முன்னோக்கி புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் நிலையில்-கலை முடிவுகளை அடைய முடியும் நிலையில் கட்டுப்படுத மூலம் கட்டாயப்பட்ட சூழ்நிலைப்போன்ற தொலைபேசிகள் மூலம் இயக்கப்பட்டது, இத்தகைய சிறிய புதிய பிணையத்தின் மாதிரிகளை பெறுவதற்கு எளிய தொழில்நுட்பத்தை காட்டு', 'ur': 'ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ چھوٹی اور گھٹی فیڈ-فورد نیورل نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کے نزدیک ایٹ-اول-آرت کا نتیجہ پہنچا سکتی ہے ایک طریقہ پر جو غیر ساختہ اور ساختہ زبان کی پیدائش کی کوشش کرتی ہے اور اس طرح یاد اور کمپیوٹر کی نیازیوں میں بہت کم کم موبائل فون کی طرح محدودیت کی محدودیت کے ذریعے چلتی ہے، ہم ایسی چھوٹی نیورل نیٹورک موڈل کو حاصل کرنے کے لئے ساده تکنیک دکھاتے ہیں، اور مختلف ترڈریفوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جب ایک چھوٹی میمور بوڈیٹ کا فیصلہ کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz shunday ko'rsatganimiz, kichkina va kichkina foydalanuvchi neyron tarmoqlarini o'rganish mumkin, quyidagi va qo'llangan tillar jarayonlarining bir necha jarayonlariga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Bu paytda xotira va kompyuterga taklif qilish davomida juda cheksiz. Ushbu kichkina tarmoq modellarini olish uchun oddiy tugmalarni ko'rsatishimiz va bir nechta xotira bajeti qanday qanday qanday qanday qanday qanday qanday ajratishni xotira qilishga qaramadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cho thấy những mạng thần kinh nhỏ và nông cạn có thể đạt được kết quả gần như hiện đại trên một loạt các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ không xây dựng và cấu trúc, trong khi đòi hỏi bộ nhớ và tính toán còn rẻ hơn các mô hình thường xuyên sâu. Động cơ bởi những môi trường hạn chế tài nguyên như điện thoại di động, chúng tôi hiển thị các kỹ thuật đơn giản để lấy những mô hình mạng thần kinh nhỏ như vậy, và tìm hiểu những quyết định lệch lạc khác nhau khi quyết định cách phân bổ một ngân sách bộ nhớ nhỏ.', 'hr': 'Mi pokazujemo da mali i plitki neuralni mreži mogu postići blizu rezultata umjetnosti na nizu neostrukturovanih i strukturovanih zadataka obrađivanja jezika, dok su veoma jeftiniji u sjećanju i računalnim zahtjevima nego duboki rekonstruirani modeli. Pokretani sredstvima ograničenim resursima poput mobilnih telefona, pokazujemo jednostavne tehnike za dobivanje takvih modela neuralne mreže, i istražujemo različite trgovine kada odlučimo kako odrediti mali proračun za pamćenje.', 'da': 'Vi viser, at små og overfladiske feed-forward neurale netværk kan opnå næsten state-of-the-art resultater på en række ustrukturerede og strukturerede sprogbehandlingsopgaver, samtidig med at de er betydeligt billigere i hukommelse og beregningsmæssige krav end dybe tilbagevendende modeller. Motiveret af ressourcebegrænsede miljøer som mobiltelefoner, viser vi enkle teknikker til at opnå sådanne små neurale netværksmodeller, og undersøger forskellige kompromiser, når vi beslutter, hvordan vi skal allokere et lille hukommelsesbudget.', 'de': 'Wir zeigen, dass kleine und flache feed-forward neuronale Netze bei einer Reihe unstrukturierter und strukturierter Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben nahezu State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse erzielen können, während sie in Bezug auf Speicher und Rechenanforderungen deutlich günstiger sind als tiefe wiederkehrende Modelle. Motiviert durch ressourcenbeschränkte Umgebungen wie Mobiltelefone, zeigen wir einfache Techniken, um solche kleinen neuronalen Netzwerkmodelle zu erhalten, und untersuchen verschiedene Kompromisse bei der Entscheidung, wie ein kleines Speicherbudget zugewiesen werden soll.', 'id': 'Kami menunjukkan bahwa jaringan saraf kecil dan rendah-rendah feed-forward dapat mencapai hasil dekat-state-of-the-art pada jangkauan dari tugas proses bahasa yang tidak strukturasi dan strukturasi sementara menjadi jauh lebih murah dalam ingatan dan keperluan komputasi daripada model yang berkurang dalam. Dimotifkan oleh lingkungan yang dikuasai sumber daya seperti ponsel, kami menunjukkan teknik sederhana untuk mendapatkan model jaringan saraf kecil seperti itu, dan menyelidiki perdagangan yang berbeda ketika memutuskan bagaimana untuk mengalokasi anggaran ingatan kecil.', 'bg': 'Показваме, че малките и плитки невронни мрежи могат да постигнат почти най-съвременни резултати при редица неструктурирани и структурирани задачи за обработка на езика, като същевременно са значително по-евтини по отношение на паметта и изчислителните изисквания, отколкото дълбоките повтарящи се модели. Мотивирани от ограничени ресурси среди като мобилни телефони, ние показваме прости техники за получаване на такива малки невронни мрежи модели и изследваме различни компромиси, когато решаваме как да разпределим малък бюджет за памет.', 'nl': 'We laten zien dat kleine en ondiepe feed-forward neurale netwerken bijna state-of-the-art resultaten kunnen bereiken op een reeks van ongestructureerde en gestructureerde taalverwerkingstaken terwijl ze aanzienlijk goedkoper zijn in geheugen en rekenkundige vereisten dan diepe recidiverende modellen. Gemotiveerd door omgevingen met beperkte middelen, zoals mobiele telefoons, tonen we eenvoudige technieken voor het verkrijgen van dergelijke kleine neurale netwerkmodellen, en onderzoeken verschillende compromissen bij het kiezen van een klein geheugenbudget.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha kuwa mitandao madogo na yenye matumizi ya neura yanayoweza kufikia karibu na matokeo ya hali ya sanaa katika mfululizo wa upasuaji wa lugha zilizoundwa na ujenzi wakati ambapo ni rahisi sana katika kumbukumbu na mahitaji ya hesabu kuliko mifano ya kina yanayoendelea. Inahamasishwa na mazingira yenye rasilimali kama simu za mkononi, tunaonyesha mbinu rahisi za kupata mifano michache ya mtandao wa neurali, na kuchunguza njia tofauti pale tunapoamua kueneza bajeti ndogo ya kumbukumbu.', 'ko': '우리는 소형과 얕은층 전파신경 네트워크가 일련의 비구조화와 구조화 언어 처리 임무에서 가장 선진적인 결과에 가깝고 깊이 귀속모델보다 메모리와 계산 수요가 훨씬 싸다는 것을 보여준다.휴대전화 등 자원 제한 환경의 격려를 받아 우리는 이런 소형 신경 네트워크 모델을 얻는 간단한 기술을 보여주고 소형 메모리 예산을 어떻게 분배할 것인지를 결정할 때 서로 다른 균형을 연구했다.', 'sq': 'Ne tregojmë se rrjetet e vogla dhe të sipërfaqe të përdorimit neuronal mund të arrijnë rezultate më të afërta në një gamë detyrash të pastruara dhe të strukturuara të përdorimit të gjuhës duke qenë konsiderueshëm më të lira në kujtesë dhe kërkesa kompjuterike se modelet e thella të përsëritura. Motivuar nga mjediset e kufizuara nga burimet si telefonat celulare, ne tregojmë teknika të thjeshta për të marrë modele të tilla të rrjetit nervor të vogël dhe hetojmë kompromise të ndryshme kur vendosim si të caktojmë një buxhet të vogël të kujtesës.', 'am': 'እናሳየዋለን ትንሽ እና ጥቁር የፍሬት የነጥብ መረብ የቋንቋ ሥርዓቶች በተመሠረተ እና በተመሠረተ የቋንቋ ሥርዓት ስራዎችን እንዲያገኝ እና በተሳሰቢያ እና በቁጥጥር ፈቃድ በጣም በጣም ቀላል ነው፡፡ የመድኃኒት አካባቢ እንደ mobile phones በተደረገ አካባቢ፣ እንደዚህ ትንሽ የናቡር መረብ modelዎችን ለማግኘት ቀላል ጥያቄዎችን እናሳየዋለን፣ ትንሽ ማስታወሻ ብዛት እንዴት እንዲያሳካክሉ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Ons wys dat klein en skaal voedvoerde neuralnetwerke naby staat-van-die-kuns resultate kan bereik op 'n reek van ongestruktureerde en struktureerde taal verwerking opdragte terwyl betekenlik baie skaars in geheue en rekenaar benodigte as diep rekenaar modele is. Gebeweging deur hulpbron-beheinde omgewing soos mobile foon, wys ons eenvoudige teknike vir sodanige klein neuralnetwerk modele te kry, en ondersoek verskillende verwerking wanneer besluit hoe om 'n klein geheue-budžet te toewys.", 'tr': 'Biz kiçi we gowy iýmitli netral şebekeleriniň ýakyn-da strukturulmaýan we strukturmaýan diller işleýän zadynyň bir näçe netijesinde çykyp biljekdigini görkeýäris we hatda we kompýuterläk isleýçleriň derin nusgadan has ýüzedir. Çotdan howply telefonlar ýaly çeşmeler tarapyndan süýtgedilen, beýleki kiçi neural şebek modellerini almak üçin basit teknikleri görkez we kiçi bir yada böleginiň nähili wezip bolmagyny çözýän wagtlary beýleki teknikleri barlaýarys.', 'hy': 'Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ փոքր և մակերեսային առաջնային նյարդային ցանցերը կարող են հասնել մոտ ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքների մի շարք անկառուցված և կառուցվածված լեզվի վերամշակման խնդիրների վրա, մինչդեռ հիշողության և հաշվարկների պահանջներում շատ ավելի էժան են, քան խո Մոտիվացված ռեսուրսներով սահմանափակված միջավայրով, ինչպիսիք են բջջային հեռախոսները, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս պարզ տեխնիկաներ նյարդային ցանցի այնպիսի փոքր մոդելների ստանալու համար և ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր հակամարտություններ որոշում, թե ինչպես հաշվի առնել', 'az': 'Biz göstəririk ki, küçük və çətinlikli fərqli nöral a ğları müəyyən edilməmiş və strukturlı dil işləməsi işlərinin bir səviyyəsində məlumatlardan və hesablama şartlarında çox ucuz olaraq çox çətinlikli modellerdən daha çox çətinlikli olar. Mobil telefonlar kimi çox qüvvətli ortamlar ilə hərəkət edir, böyük kiçik nöral a ğ modellərini almaq üçün basit teknikləri göstəririk, kiçik bir yada bütçesini necə bölüşdürməyi karar verdikdə fərqli ticarətlər təşkil edirik.', 'bn': 'আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ছোট এবং অল্প ফিড-আনল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাছাকাছি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করতে পারে যেখানে স্মৃতি এবং গভীর পুনরাবর্তন মডেলের চেয়ে স্মৃতি এবং গণন মোবাইল ফোনের মতো সম্পদ নির্ধারিত পরিবেশের মাধ্যমে আমরা সাধারণ প্রযুক্তি দেখাচ্ছি এই ছোট নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল পাওয়ার জন্য, এবং বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন', 'bs': 'Mi pokazujemo da mali i plitki neuralni mreži mogu postići blizu rezultata umjetnosti na nizu neostrukturovanih i strukturovanih zadataka obrađivanja jezika, dok su veoma jeftiniji u pamćenju i računalnim zahtjevima nego duboki rekonstruirani modeli. Pokazali smo jednostavne tehnike za dobivanje takvih modela neuronske mreže i istraživati različite trgovine kada odlučimo kako odrediti mali budžet za pamćenje.', 'ca': 'Mostrem que les xarxes neurals petites i baixes poden aconseguir resultats més moderns en una gamma de tasques de processament de llenguatges no estructurats i estructurats mentre són considerablement més barates en la memòria i els requisits computacionals que en models recurrents profunds. Motivats per entorns limitats a recursos com els mòbils, mostram tècniques senzilles per obtenir models de xarxa neural tan petits, i investigam diferents compensacions quan decidim com allocar un petit pressupost de memòria.', 'et': 'Näitame, et väikesed ja madalad edasised närvivõrgud suudavad saavutada peaaegu kaasaegseid tulemusi mitmesuguste struktureerimata ja struktureeritud keeletöötluse ülesannete puhul, olles mälu- ja arvutusnõuete osas märkimisväärselt odavamad kui sügavate korduvate mudelite puhul. Motiveeritud ressursipiirangutest keskkondadest, nagu mobiiltelefonid, tutvustame lihtsaid tehnikaid selliste väikeste närvivõrgumudelite saamiseks ja uurime erinevaid kompromisse, kuidas eraldada väikest mälueelarvet.', 'cs': 'Ukazujeme, že malé a mělké přenosové neuronové sítě mohou dosáhnout téměř nejmodernějších výsledků na řadě nestrukturovaných a strukturovaných úloh zpracování jazyka, přičemž jsou výrazně levnější v paměti a výpočetních požadavků než hluboké recidivní modely. Motivováni prostředím s omezenými zdroji, jako jsou mobilní telefony, představujeme jednoduché techniky pro získání takových malých modelů neuronových sítí a zkoumáme různé kompromisy při rozhodování o přidělení malého rozpočtu paměti.', 'fa': 'ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که شبکه\u200cهای عصبی کوچک و کوچک\u200cترین تغذیه پیش می\u200cتوانند در نزدیک ایالت هنر نتیجه\u200cهای پرداخت\u200cهای زبانی ساخته و ساخته\u200cتر به دست یابند در حالی که در حافظه و نیازهای محاسبه\u200cترین نسبت به مدل\u200cهای دوباره\u200cترین عمیق ارزون\u200cتر هستند. توسط محیط محدودیت محدودیت منبع مانند تلفن های موبایل حرکت می\u200cشود، ما تکنیک ساده\u200cها را برای پیدا کردن چنین مدل شبکه عصبی کوچک نشان می\u200cدهیم، و وقتی تصمیم گرفتیم چگونه یک بودجه حافظه کوچک را تقسیم کنیم، تجارت متفاوت را تح', 'fi': 'Osoitamme, että pienet ja matalat syöttöhermoverkot voivat saavuttaa lähes viimeisimpiä tuloksia erilaisissa strukturoimattomissa ja strukturoiduissa kielinkäsittelytehtävissä, mutta ne ovat huomattavasti halvempia muisti- ja laskennallisissa vaatimuksissa kuin syvätoistuvissa malleissa. Resurssirajoitteisten ympäristöjen, kuten matkapuhelinten, motivoituneina esittelemme yksinkertaisia tekniikoita pienten neuroverkkomallien hankkimiseksi ja tutkimme erilaisia kompromisseja päätettäessä pienen muistibudjetin jakamisesta.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé menehi kuwi nglanggar-sistem sing gak bener tentang karo netah sing iso dianggawe barang-sistem sing dumadhi winih ngono nggawe nguasai tindakan Ngawe lagi ndhelik-sistem sing diagram-sistem sing dibutuhi gambar mobil, kita ngawe lan sistem sing sampeyan kanggo nggawe model sing alat maneh alat sing nguasai, lan ujian ngembukakipun diagram-informasi alat sing ngawe isih alat yang segala macem budheg alat', 'ha': "Tuna nũna cewa, mitandan ƙarami da filin-forward neura masu basu da zartar da matsalar-na-kunyar za'a iya kai makusanta a matsayin-state-the-art kan wasu aikin aiki wanda ba'a samar da ba'an da kuma an daidaita lugha da kuma ana fi sauƙi a lokacin hukuru da kalmar lissafi ko misãlai masu ƙaranci na wanda ya sake koma. Akan motsa da muhalli da aka tsare shi kamar misalin mobile, za'a nuna masu shiryoyin shiryoyin kwamfyutan tebur masu iya samun misãlai masu ƙarami na jerin neurali, kuma za mu yi ƙidãya ga fatauci daban-dabam idan ana hukunta jini za'a raba bajeti kaɗan na tunar.", 'sk': 'Pokazali smo, da lahko majhna in plitva prenosna nevronska omrežja dosežejo skoraj najsodobnejše rezultate pri različnih nestrukturiranih in strukturiranih opravilih obdelave jezika, hkrati pa so bistveno cenejše pri pomnilniških in računalniških zahtevah kot globoko ponavljajoči se modeli. Motivirana z omejenimi viri okolji, kot so mobilni telefoni, predstavljamo preproste tehnike za pridobivanje takšnih majhnih modelov nevronskih omrežij in raziskujemo različne kompromise pri odločanju, kako dodeliti majhen pomnilniški proračun.', 'he': 'אנו מראים שרשתות עצביות קטנות ומטבעיות יכולות להשיג תוצאות מוקדמות קרובות למדינה על מגוון של משימות עיבוד שפת לא מבושלות ומבנות מוטיבציה על ידי סביבות מוגבלות משאבים כמו טלפונים ניידים, אנו מראים טכניקות פשוטות להשיג דוגמנים רשת עצבית קטנות כאלה, ולחקור תחליפים שונים כשמחליטים איך להקציב תקציב זכרון קטן.', 'bo': 'We show that small and shallow feed-forward neural networks can achieve near state-of-the-art results on a range of unstructured and structured language processing tasks while being considerably cheaper in memory and computational requirements than deep recurrent models. Motivated by resource-constrained environments like mobile phones, we showcase simple techniques for obtaining such small neural network models, and investigate different tradeoffs when deciding how to allocate a small memory budget.'}
{'en': 'Analogs of Linguistic Structure in Deep Representations', 'ar': 'نظائر التركيب اللغوي في التمثيلات العميقة', 'pt': 'Análogos da Estrutura Linguística em Representações Profundas', 'fr': 'Analogues de la structure linguistique dans les représentations profondes', 'es': 'Análogos de la estructura lingüística en representaciones profundas', 'ja': '深層表現における言語構造のアナログ', 'zh': '深层表征中语言结构之类似物', 'hi': 'गहरे प्रतिनिधित्व में भाषाई संरचना के एनालॉग्स', 'ru': 'Аналоги лингвистической структуры в глубоких представлениях', 'ga': 'Analógacha den Struchtúr Teangeolaíoch i Léiriúcháin Dhomhain', 'ka': 'ლინგუსტიკური სტრუქტურის ანალოგიები ძალიან გამოსახულებაში', 'hu': 'A nyelvi struktúra analógjai a mély reprezentációkban', 'el': 'Αναλογίες της γλωσσικής δομής σε βαθιές αναπαραστάσεις', 'kk': 'Лингистикалық құрылғының аналогиялары', 'it': 'Analogi della struttura linguistica nelle rappresentazioni profonde', 'lt': 'Kalbų struktūros giliose atstovybėse analizės', 'mk': 'Analogs of Linguistic Structure in Deep Representations', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് സ്ട്രോക്ട്രൂട്ടിക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള അന്യായം', 'ms': 'Analog Struktur Bahasa dalam Perwakilan Dalam', 'mn': 'Гүн төлөвлөгөөний хэлбэрийн бүтэц аналоги', 'mt': 'Analogi tal-Istruttura Lingwistika f’Rappreżentazzjonijiet Profondi', 'pl': 'Analogi struktury językowej w głębokich reprezentacjach', 'no': 'Analoger av linguistisk struktur i dyppa representasjonar', 'ro': 'Analogii structurii lingvistice în reprezentări profunde', 'sr': 'Analogi lingvističke strukture u dubokim predstavljanjima', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයේ ලින්ග්යුස්ටික් ස්ථාපනයේ විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාපනය', 'so': 'Analogs of Linguistic structure in deep Representations', 'sv': 'Analoger av språklig struktur i djupa representationer', 'ta': 'ஆழமான பிரதிநிகழ்வுகளில் கோட்டு அமைப்புகளின் ஆராய்வுகள்', 'ur': 'عمیق نمایشگروں میں لینگیستیک ساختار کی آنالوگ', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Аналози на езиковата структура в дълбоките представи', 'da': 'Analoger af sproglig struktur i dybe repræsentationer', 'nl': 'Analogen van taalkundige structuur in diepe representaties', 'hr': 'Analogi lingvističke strukture u dubokim predstavljanjima', 'id': 'Analog Struktur Bahasa Dalam Perwakilan Dalam', 'de': 'Analogien der sprachlichen Struktur in tiefen Repräsentationen', 'ko': '심층 표징 중의 언어 구조 유비', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Miundombinu ya Kilinguistic katika Representative Deep', 'tr': 'Derje Wasp Görkezilişinde hatlaryň strukturlarynyň analoglary', 'sq': 'Analogët e strukturës gjuhësore në përfaqësime të thella', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Analogs of Linguistic Structure in Deep Representations', 'az': 'Derin Temsill…ôrd…ô Linguistik Yapƒ±larƒ±nƒ±n analogi', 'bn': 'গভীর প্রতিনিধিত্বে লিঙ্গিস্টিক কাঠামোর বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Analogi lingvističke strukture u dubokim predstavljanjima', 'ca': "Analòlegs de l'estructura lingüística en representacions profundes", 'cs': 'Analogy jazykové struktury v hlubokých reprezentacích', 'fi': 'Kielellisen rakenteen analogeja syvissä edustustoissa', 'et': 'Keelelise struktuuri analoogid sügavates esindustes', 'fa': 'Analogies of Linguistic Structure in Deep Representations', 'af': 'Analoge van Linguistiese struktuur in Deep Voorstellings', 'sk': 'Analogi jezikovne strukture v globokih predstavitvah', 'jv': 'Analan lan structural navigation', 'he': 'Analogs of Linguistic Structure in Deep Representations', 'ha': 'Analog of Linguistic Background in Depth Repositions', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་པ་ནང་དུ་གྲལ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་Analogs of Linguistic Structure in Deep Representations'}
{'en': 'We investigate the compositional structure of message vectors computed by a deep network trained on a communication game. By comparing truth-conditional representations of encoder-produced message vectors to human-produced referring expressions, we are able to identify aligned (vector, utterance) pairs with the same meaning. We then search for structured relationships among these aligned pairs to discover simple vector space transformations corresponding to negation, conjunction, and disjunction. Our results suggest that neural representations are capable of spontaneously developing a syntax with functional analogues to qualitative properties of natural language.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في البنية التركيبية لمتجهات الرسائل المحسوبة بواسطة شبكة عميقة مدربة على لعبة اتصال. بمقارنة التمثيلات الشرطية للحقيقة لناقلات الرسائل التي ينتجها المشفر بتعبيرات الإحالة التي يصنعها الإنسان ، يمكننا تحديد أزواج المحاذاة (المتجهية واللفظية) التي لها نفس المعنى. ثم نبحث بعد ذلك عن العلاقات المهيكلة بين هذه الأزواج المتوافقة لاكتشاف تحويلات فضاء متجه بسيطة تتوافق مع النفي والاقتران والانفصال. تشير نتائجنا إلى أن التمثيلات العصبية قادرة تلقائيًا على تطوير "بناء جملة" مع نظائر وظيفية للخصائص النوعية للغة الطبيعية.', 'es': 'Investigamos la estructura compositiva de los vectores de mensajes calculados por una red profunda entrenada en un juego de comunicación. Al comparar las representaciones condicionales de la verdad de los vectores de mensajes producidos por el codificador con las expresiones de referencia producidas por el hombre, podemos identificar pares alineados (vector, enunciado) con el mismo significado. Luego buscamos relaciones estructuradas entre estos pares alineados para descubrir transformaciones simples del espacio vectorial que corresponden a la negación, la conjunción y la disyunción. Nuestros resultados sugieren que las representaciones neuronales son capaces de desarrollar espontáneamente una «sintaxis» con análogos funcionales a las propiedades cualitativas del lenguaje natural.', 'pt': 'Investigamos a estrutura composicional de vetores de mensagens computados por uma rede profunda treinada em um jogo de comunicação. Ao comparar representações condicionais de verdade de vetores de mensagem produzidos por codificador com expressões de referência produzidas por humanos, somos capazes de identificar pares alinhados (vetor, enunciado) com o mesmo significado. Em seguida, procuramos relações estruturadas entre esses pares alinhados para descobrir transformações simples no espaço vetorial correspondentes à negação, conjunção e disjunção. Nossos resultados sugerem que as representações neurais são capazes de desenvolver espontaneamente uma “sintaxe” com análogos funcionais às propriedades qualitativas da linguagem natural.', 'fr': "Nous étudions la structure compositionnelle de vecteurs de messages calculés par un réseau profond entraîné sur un jeu de communication. En comparant les représentations conditionnelles à la vérité de vecteurs de message produits par l'encodeur à des expressions de référence produites par l'homme, nous sommes en mesure d'identifier des paires alignées (vecteur, énoncé) ayant la même signification. Nous recherchons ensuite des relations structurées entre ces paires alignées afin de découvrir des transformations spatiales vectorielles simples correspondant à la négation, à la conjonction et à la disjonction. Nos résultats suggèrent que les représentations neuronales sont capables de développer spontanément une «\xa0syntaxe\xa0» avec des analogues fonctionnels aux propriétés qualitatives du langage naturel.", 'ja': '我々は、通信ゲームで訓練された深いネットワークによって計算されたメッセージベクトルの構成構造を調査する。エンコーダ生成されたメッセージベクトルの真理条件表現を人間生成された参照表現と比較することにより、同じ意味を有する整列された（ベクトル、発話）ペアを識別することができる。次に、これらの整列されたペアの間の構造化された関係を探索して、否定、連結、および離散に対応する単純なベクトル空間変換を発見します。私たちの結果は、神経表現が自然言語の定性的特性に機能的な類似物を伴う「構文」を自発的に発展させることができることを示唆しています。', 'zh': '考之通信游戏之深网络计之消息向量成结构。 以编码器生问向量真值与人比表达式,能识同义者齐(向量,语)是。 然后索其结构化,以应其非,合取析取向量间易之。 吾之治结果表明,神经表征能自发一语法,其类自然语言者定性性性也。', 'hi': 'हम एक संचार खेल पर प्रशिक्षित एक गहरे नेटवर्क द्वारा परिकलित संदेश वैक्टर की रचनात्मक संरचना की जांच करते हैं। एनकोडर-उत्पादित संदेश वैक्टर के सत्य-सशर्त प्रतिनिधित्व की तुलना मानव-उत्पादित संदर्भ अभिव्यक्तियों से करके, हम एक ही अर्थ के साथ संरेखित (वेक्टर, उच्चारण) जोड़े की पहचान करने में सक्षम हैं। फिर हम इन संरेखित जोड़े के बीच संरचित संबंधों की खोज करते हैं ताकि नकारात्मकता, संयोजन और विघटन के अनुरूप सरल वेक्टर स्पेस परिवर्तनों की खोज की जा सके। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि तंत्रिका प्रतिनिधित्व प्राकृतिक भाषा के गुणात्मक गुणों के लिए कार्यात्मक एनालॉग्स के साथ अनायास एक "वाक्यविन्यास" विकसित करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем композиционную структуру векторов сообщений, вычисляемых глубокой сетью, обученной на коммуникационной игре. Сравнивая истинно-условные представления векторов сообщений, созданных кодером, с человеческими ссылочными выражениями, мы можем идентифицировать выровненные (векторные, речевые) пары с одинаковым значением. Затем мы ищем структурированные отношения между этими выровненными парами, чтобы обнаружить простые преобразования векторного пространства, соответствующие отрицанию, конъюнкции и дизъюнкции. Наши результаты показывают, что нейронные представления способны спонтанно развивать «синтаксис» с функциональными аналогами качественных свойств естественного языка.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid imscrúdú ar struchtúr comhdhéanamh veicteoirí teachtaireachta arna ríomh ag líonra domhain atá oilte ar chluiche cumarsáide. Trí chomparáid a dhéanamh idir léirithe fírinne-choinníollacha veicteoirí teachtaireachta arna dtáirgeadh ag ionchódóirí le habairtí tagartha daonna-tháirgthe, táimid in ann péirí ailínithe (veicteoir, cainte) a bhfuil an bhrí chéanna leo a aithint. Déanaimid cuardach ansin do chaidrimh struchtúrtha i measc na mbeirteanna ailínithe seo chun claochluithe simplí veicteoirí spáis a fháil a fhreagraíonn d’idirbheartaíocht, do chomhcheangal agus do dhícheangal. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios go bhfuil léirithe néaracha in ann “comhrón” a fhorbairt go spontáineach le analógacha feidhmiúla ar airíonna cáilíochtúla teanga nádúrtha.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებთ შეტყობინებების გვექტორის კომპოზიციონალური სტრუქტურაცია, რომელიც კომუნიკაციის თამაში გასწავლა დიდი ქსელის გამო კოდირებული შეტყობინებების გვეკოდერების სინამდვილეების განსაზღვრებით ადამიანის შეტყობინებული განსაზღვრებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია განსაზღვრებული (გვეკტორი, განსაზღვრებით) ზოგების განსაზღვ შემდეგ ჩვენ ძებნა სტრუქტურაციული პრობლემები ამ სხვადასხვა პრობლემების შორის, რომ აღმოჩენოთ განსაკუთრებული გვეკტორის სივრცემის გარგება, როგორც კონფიგურა ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ ნეიროლური გამოსახულებები სპონტანოდ შეუძლებელია "სინტაქსი" განვითარება, რომელიც ფუნქციოლური ანალოგიების კვალტატიური', 'hu': 'Vizsgáljuk a kommunikációs játékra képzett mély hálózat által kiszámított üzenetvektorok kompozíciós struktúráját. A kódoló által előállított üzenetvektorok igazság-feltételes reprezentációinak összehasonlításával az ember által előállított hivatkozási kifejezésekkel képesek vagyunk azonosítani azonos jelentésű igazított (vektor, kimondás) párokat. Ezután strukturált kapcsolatokat keresünk ezek között az összehangolt párok között, hogy felfedezzük a negatív, konjunkciós és disjunkciós egyszerű vektortér transzformációkat. Eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy a neurális reprezentációk képesek spontán módon fejleszteni a természetes nyelv minőségi tulajdonságaihoz hasonló funkcionális analógokkal.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε τη σύνθεση των διανυσμάτων μηνυμάτων που υπολογίζονται από ένα βαθύ δίκτυο εκπαιδευμένο σε ένα παιχνίδι επικοινωνίας. Συγκρίνοντας αναπαραστάσεις μηνυμάτων που παράγονται από κωδικοποιητές με αναφερόμενες εκφράσεις που παράγονται από τον άνθρωπο, είμαστε σε θέση να εντοπίσουμε ευθυγραμμισμένα (διανυσματικά, εκφραστικά) ζεύγη με την ίδια έννοια. Στη συνέχεια, αναζητούμε δομημένες σχέσεις μεταξύ αυτών των ευθυγραμμισμένων ζευγαριών για να ανακαλύψουμε απλούς μετασχηματισμούς διανυσματικού διαστήματος που αντιστοιχούν στην άρνηση, την ένωση και την αποσύνδεση. Τα αποτελέσματα μας δείχνουν ότι οι νευρωνικές αναπαραστάσεις είναι σε θέση να αναπτύξουν αυθόρμητα μια "σύνταξη" με λειτουργικά ανάλογα με τις ποιοτικές ιδιότητες της φυσικής γλώσσας.', 'kk': "Біз коммуникациялық ойында оқылған терең желі бойынша есептелген хаттар векторының құрылымын зерттеуді. Кодер жасалған хаттардың векторларын адам жасалған сілтемелеріне салыстырып, біз бір мәліметімен (вектор, сөйлеу) теңжерлерді бірдей анықтай аламыз. Содан кейін бұл жерлердің арасындағы құрылған қатынастарын іздейміз, қарапайым вектор бос орын түрлендірімізге сәйкес келетін қарапайым вектордың түрлендірімізді табу үшін. Біздің нәтижелеріміз невралдық түрінде тәуелді тілдің квалификациялық қасиеттеріне функциялық аналогиялық 'синтаксис' дегенді автоматты түрде жасауға мүмкіндік береді.", 'lt': 'Mes tiriame pranešimų vektorių sudėtinę struktūrą, kurią apskaičiuoja gilus tinklas, mokomas ryšių žaidime. By comparing truth-conditional representations of encoder-produced message vectors to human-produced referring expressions, we are able to identify aligned (vector, utterance) pairs with the same meaning.  Tada ieškome struktūrizuotų santykių tarp šių suderintų porų, kad aptiktume paprastus vektorių erdvės pokyčius, atitinkančius neigiamą, jungtį ir išjungtį. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad neurologiniai rodmenys gali spontaniškai sukurti sintaksą su funkciniais analogais gamtos kalbos kokybinėms savybėms.', 'mk': 'Ја истражуваме композициската структура на векторите на пораките кои се компјутираат од длабока мрежа обучена во комуникациска игра. Со споредба на вистински условни претставувања на векторите на пораките произведени од кодерот со референтните изрази произведени од човекот, можеме да идентификуваме alined (вектор, израз) парови со исто значење. Потоа бараме структурирани врски помеѓу овие подредени парови за да откриеме едноставни векторни вселенски трансформации кои одговараат на негативноста, конекцијата и расклучувањето. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека нервните претставувања се спонтано спонтани за развој на „синтаксис“ со функционални аналози со квалитетните сопствености на природниот јазик.', 'ms': "Kami menyelidiki struktur komposisi vektor mesej yang dikira oleh rangkaian dalam dilatih dalam permainan komunikasi. Dengan membandingkan perwakilan kebenaran-syarat vektor mesej yang dihasilkan pengekod dengan ungkapan rujukan yang dihasilkan oleh manusia, kita boleh mengenalpasti pasangan yang dijajarkan (vektor, ungkapan) dengan makna yang sama. Kemudian kita mencari hubungan struktur di antara pasangan yang dijajarkan ini untuk mencari perubahan ruang vektor sederhana yang sepadan dengan negatif, konjunksi, dan pencegahan. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan saraf mampu mengembangkan 'sintaks' secara spontan dengan analog fungsi kepada ciri-ciri kualitatif bahasa alam.", 'ml': "നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ആഴത്തെ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലനം നടത്തിയ സന്ദേശ വെക്ടറുകളുടെ സംഘടനയെ അന്വേഷിക്ക By comparing truth-conditional representations of encoder-produced message vectors to human-produced referring expressions, we are able to identify aligned (vector, utterance) pairs with the same meaning.  പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ചേര്\u200dന്ന ഇണകളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d സ്ഥാപിച്ച ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിസ് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ന്യൂറല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി ഒരു 'സിന്റാക്സ്' സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നതാണെന്ന് നിര്\u200dദ്ദ", 'mt': "Aħna ninvestigaw l-istruttura kompożittiva tal-vetturi tal-messaġġi kkalkulati minn netwerk profond imħarreġ fuq logħob ta’ komunikazzjoni. Billi nqabblu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet kundizzjonali tal-verità tal-vetturi tal-messaġġi prodotti mill-kodifikatur mal-espressjonijiet referenzjarji prodotti mill-bniedem, nistgħu nidentifikaw par allinjati (vettur, espressjoni) bl-istess tifsira. We then search for structured relationships among these aligned pairs to discover simple vector space transformations corresponding to negation, conjunction, and disjunction.  Ir-riżultati tagħna jissuġġerixxu li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet newrali huma kapaċi jiżviluppaw b'mod spontanju 'sintaks' b'analogi funzjonali għal proprjetajiet kwalitattivi tal-lingwa naturali.", 'it': "Investighiamo la struttura compositiva dei vettori di messaggio calcolati da una rete profonda addestrata su un gioco di comunicazione. Confrontando le rappresentazioni condizionali della verità dei vettori di messaggio prodotti dall'encoder con le espressioni di riferimento prodotte dall'uomo, siamo in grado di identificare coppie allineate (vettore, pronuncia) con lo stesso significato. Cerchiamo quindi relazioni strutturate tra queste coppie allineate per scoprire semplici trasformazioni spaziali vettoriali corrispondenti a negazione, congiunzione e disgiunzione. I nostri risultati suggeriscono che le rappresentazioni neurali sono in grado di sviluppare spontaneamente una 'sintassi' con analoghi funzionali alle proprietà qualitative del linguaggio naturale.", 'mn': "Бид харилцааны тоглоом дээр сургалтын гүн гүнзгий сүлжээгээр тооцогдсон захиаг векторуудын бүтэц бүтцийг судалж байна. Хүн бүтээсэн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой (вектор, илтгэл) холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг харьцуулахад бид ижил утгатай холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байж болно. Тэгээд бид эдгээр хоёр хоорондын бүтэц харилцаа хайж хамгийн энгийн вектор орон-зай өөрчлөлтийг олж мэдэхэд хасах, холбоотой, холбоотой байдалтай холбоотой. Бидний үр дүнд мэдрэлийн төлөвлөгөө байгалийн хэлний чадвартай адилогууд болох 'синтаксис'-г автоматаар хөгжүүлж чадах боломжтой гэдгийг сануулдаг.", 'no': 'Vi undersøker komposisjonsstrukturen av meldingsvektorar rekna ut av ein dyp nettverk trent på eit kommunikasjonspel. På sammenligning av sannhetskondicionale representasjonar av koderande meldingsvectorar med menneskeproduserte refereringsuttrykk, kan vi identifisera rette (vektor, uttrykk) par med same mening. Vi søker så etter strukturerte forhold mellom desse justerte parene for å oppdaga enkle vektorromtransformasjonar som tilsvarar negasjonen, konjunksjon og disjunksjon. Resultatet våre tyder på at neirale representasjonar er i stand til å utvikla ein «syntaks» med funksjonelle analog til kvalitative eigenskapar av naturspråk.', 'pl': 'Badamy strukturę kompozycyjną wektorów wiadomości obliczaną przez głęboką sieć przeszkoloną na grze komunikacyjnej. Porównując warunkowe reprezentacje wektorów wiadomości wyprodukowanych przez kodera do wyrażeń odwołujących wyprodukowanych przez człowieka, jesteśmy w stanie zidentyfikować wyrównane (wektor, wypowiedź) pary o tym samym znaczeniu. Następnie szukamy ustrukturyzowanych relacji między tymi wyrównanymi parami, aby odkryć proste transformacje przestrzeni wektorowej odpowiadające negacji, połączeniu i dyskrzycji. Nasze wyniki sugerują, że reprezentacje neuronowe są w stanie spontanicznie rozwinąć "składnię" z funkcjonalnymi analogami do jakościowych właściwości języka naturalnego.', 'ro': 'Investigăm structura compozițională a vectorilor de mesaje calculați de o rețea profundă instruită pe un joc de comunicare. Comparând reprezentările condiționate de adevăr ale vectorilor de mesaje produși de codificator cu expresiile de referință produse de om, suntem capabili să identificăm perechi aliniate (vector, rostire) cu același sens. Apoi căutăm relații structurate între aceste perechi aliniate pentru a descoperi transformări simple ale spațiului vectorial corespunzătoare negației, conjuncției și disjuncției. Rezultatele noastre sugerează că reprezentările neuronale sunt capabile să dezvolte spontan o "sintaxă" cu analogi funcționali la proprietățile calitative ale limbajului natural.', 'sr': "Istražujemo kompozicionalnu strukturu vektora poruke koje je računalo duboka mreža obučena na komunikacijskoj igri. Uspoređujući istinske uvjetne predstave vektora proizvodnje poruke kodera sa ljudskim izrazima, možemo identifikovati spojene pare (vektor, rečenje) sa istim značenjem. Potom tražimo strukturirane veze među ovim usklađenim parovima da otkrijemo jednostavne transformacije svemira vektora koji odgovaraju negaciji, vezi i disjunkciji. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da su neuralne predstave sposobne da spontano razviju 'sintaks' sa funkcionalnim analogom kvalitativnim vlasništvom prirodnog jezika.", 'so': 'Waxaynu baaraynaa dhismaha hoose ee jidhka wargelinta oo lagu xisaabiyay shabakad aad u dheer oo lagu baray ciyaar la xiriira. Isbarbardhigidda runta-sharafta ah ee koox-soo-sameeyay vector-quraanka dadka, waxaynu awoodi karnaa inaannu aqoonsanno labo isku mid ah (vector, hadal). Markaas waxaynu raadinnaa xiriir la dhisay oo ku dhex jira labadaas si aan u ogaano isbedelka sahliga ah oo u eg qasabka, iskutallaabta iyo iskutallaabta. Abaalkayaga waxaa loola jeedaa in noocyada neurada ah ay awoodi karaan horumarinta suurtagal ah oo ay leeyihiin shahaado shaqo ah oo ay qaataan tayada afka dabiicadda ah.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker kompositionsstrukturen hos meddelandevektorer som beräknats av ett djupt nätverk utbildad på ett kommunikationsspel. Genom att jämföra sanningsvillkorliga representationer av kodare-producerade meddelandevektorer med mänskligt producerade referensuttryck, kan vi identifiera anpassade (vektor, yttrande) par med samma innebörd. Vi söker sedan efter strukturerade relationer mellan dessa justerade par för att upptäcka enkla vektorrymdomvandlingar som motsvarar negation, konjunktion och disjunktion. Våra resultat tyder på att neurala representationer spontant kan utveckla en "syntax" med funktionella analoger till kvalitativa egenskaper hos naturligt språk.', 'ta': "நாம் ஒரு தொடர்பு விளையாட்டு பயிற்சி ஒரு ஆழமான வலைப்பின்னல் கணிக்கப்பட்ட செய்தி வெக்டரின் கூட்டிணைப்பு உர குறியீட்டு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட செய்தி வெக்டார்களின் உண்மையான நிபந்தனை பிரிவுகளை மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கூற்றுகளுக்கு ஒப்பிடுகிறது, நாம் ஒ பின்னர் நாம் இந்த சேர்க்கப்பட்ட ஜோடிகளுக்கிடையே உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உறவுகளை தேடுகிறோம் எளிய வெக்டர் வெக்டார் மாற்றங்களை கண் நம்முடைய முடிவுகள் தெரியும் பாதுகாப்பு புதிய குறிப்புகள் இயற்கையான மொழியின் குணங்களை செயல்பாடுகளுடன் தானாகவே ஒரு 'ஒத்தி", 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ පණිවිඩය වෙක්ටර්ස්ගේ සංවිධානය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සම්බන්ධ සෙල්ලම් සෙල්ලම්  මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ඇත්ත-සාමාන්තික ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, අපිට එකම අදහස් සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් (වෙක්ටර්, කතාවක්) ජ අපි ඊට පස්සේ සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක් හොයාගන්න මේ සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් අවසානය හොයාගන්න සරල ව අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ස්ථානික විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාවේ ක්\u200dරියාත්ම', 'ur': "ہم نے پیغام ویکتروں کی پیدائش کی ساختار کی تحقیق کی ہے جو ایک عمیق نیٹورک کے ذریعہ ایک کمنیک کھیل پر آموزش کی گئی ہے۔ اس کے مطابق ہم ایک ہی معنی کے ساتھ تفریق کرسکتے ہیں (ویکتور، کلام) جڑے جو پیدا کئے گئے ہیں، حق-conditional representations of encoder-produced message vectors with human-produced referring expressions. پھر ہم ان دونوں کے درمیان سادھے ویکتور فضا تغییرات کی پیدا کرنے کے لئے سادھے ویکتور کی جگہ کے مطابق منفی، جمع اور تغییرات کے مطابق بنائے ہوئے رابطہ تلاش کرتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے یہ معلوم کرتے ہیں کہ نیورل نمائندوں کو طبیعی زبان کے کیلوٹیٹیوں کی گواہی کے لئے 'سینٹکس' کے ساتھ استعمال کرنے کے قابل ہیں.", 'uz': "Biz aloqa oʻyinida o'rganilgan juda qiyin tarmoq tarmoqni o'rganishga hisoblangan xabar vektorlar tizimini qidirimiz. Name Keyin biz bu bir tomondan qo'llangan munosabatlarni qidirish uchun oddiy vektorning oʻzgarishlarini o'rganish uchun oddiy narsalarni ko'rganamiz, birlashtirish va ajratish uchun. Bizning natijalarimiz aytganimiz, neyrol representarini avtomatik foydalanishi mumkin va ishlaydigan analoglar bilan tabiiy tilning xususiyatlariga tayyorlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi điều tra cấu trúc cấu trúc của các luồng thông điệp được tính toán bởi một mạng lưới ngầm được huấn luyện trên một trò chơi giao tiếp. Bằng cách so sánh các biểu tượng dựa trên khả năng nhận dạng mã hóa của các thông điệp được tạo ra với các biểu thức chỉ dẫn con người, chúng tôi có thể xác định các cặp với cùng một ý nghĩa. Sau đó chúng ta tìm kiếm các mối quan hệ cấu trúc giữa các cặp được liên kết để khám phá các biến đổi không gian vector tương đương với âm bản, kết nối, và chia rẽ. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy các biểu tượng thần kinh có khả năng tự phát triển một "cú pháp" với các điều tương tự chức năng với tính chất của ngôn ngữ tự nhiên.', 'bg': 'Проучваме съставната структура на векторите на посланията, изчислени от дълбока мрежа, обучена на комуникационна игра. Сравнявайки условните за истината представи на векторите на посланията, произведени от кодера, с произведените от човека референтни изрази, ние сме в състояние да идентифицираме подравнени (вектор, реч) двойки със същото значение. След това търсим структурирани взаимоотношения между тези подравнени двойки, за да открием прости векторни пространствени трансформации, съответстващи на отрицание, конюнкция и дискюнкция. Нашите резултати предполагат, че невронните репрезентации са способни спонтанно да развият "синтаксис" с функционални аналози на качествените свойства на естествения език.', 'nl': "We onderzoeken de compositiestructuur van berichtvectoren berekend door een diep netwerk getraind op een communicatiespel. Door waarheidsvoorwaardelijke representaties van door encoder geproduceerde berichtvectoren te vergelijken met door mensen geproduceerde verwijzende expressies, zijn we in staat om uitgelijnde (vector, uiting) paren met dezelfde betekenis te identificeren. Vervolgens zoeken we naar gestructureerde relaties tussen deze uitgelijnde paren om eenvoudige vectorruimtetransformaties te ontdekken die overeenkomen met negatie, conjunctie en disjunctie. Onze resultaten suggereren dat neurale representaties in staat zijn spontaan een 'syntaxis' te ontwikkelen met functionele analogen aan kwalitatieve eigenschappen van natuurlijke taal.", 'da': "Vi undersøger sammensætningsstrukturen af beskedvektorer beregnet af et dybt netværk uddannet i et kommunikationsspil. Ved at sammenligne sandhedsbetingede repræsentationer af encoder-producerede meddelelsesvektorer med menneskeligt producerede referenceudtryk, er vi i stand til at identificere justerede (vektor, udtalelse) par med samme betydning. Vi søger derefter efter strukturerede relationer mellem disse justerede par for at opdage enkle vektorrumstransformationer svarende til negation, konjunktion og disjunktion. Vores resultater tyder på, at neurale repræsentationer er i stand til spontant at udvikle en 'syntaks' med funktionelle analoger til kvalitative egenskaber af naturligt sprog.", 'hr': "Istražujemo kompozicionalnu strukturu vektora poruke računalog dubokom mrežom obučenom na komunikacijskoj igri. Uspoređujući istinske uvjetne predstave vektora proizvodnje poruke kodera s ljudskim izrazima, možemo identificirati spojene pare (vektor, izraz) s istim značenjem. Zatim tražimo strukturirane veze među ovim usklađenim parovima kako bi otkrili jednostavne transformacije prostora vektora odgovarajuće negaciji, vezi i disjunkciji. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da su neuralne predstave sposobne spontano razvijati 'sintaks' sa funkcionalnim analogom kvalitativnim vlasništvom prirodnog jezika.", 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die Kompositionsstruktur von Nachrichtenvektoren, die von einem tiefen Netzwerk berechnet werden, das auf einem Kommunikationsspiel trainiert wurde. Durch den Vergleich wahrheitsbedingter Repräsentationen von Encoder-erzeugten Nachrichtenvektoren mit vom Menschen produzierten Referenzausdrücken können wir ausgerichtete (Vektor, Äußerung) Paare mit derselben Bedeutung identifizieren. Wir suchen dann nach strukturierten Beziehungen zwischen diesen ausgerichteten Paaren, um einfache Vektorraumtransformationen zu entdecken, die Negation, Konjunktion und Disjunktion entsprechen. Unsere Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass neuronale Repräsentationen in der Lage sind, spontan eine "Syntax" mit funktionalen Analoga zu qualitativen Eigenschaften natürlicher Sprache zu entwickeln.', 'id': "Kami menyelidiki struktur komposisi vektor pesan yang dihitung oleh jaringan dalam dilatih dalam permainan komunikasi. Dengan membandingkan perwakilan kondisi kebenaran dari vektor pesan yang diproduksi oleh pengekode dengan ekspresi yang diproduksi oleh manusia, kita dapat mengidentifikasi pasangan yang disesuaikan (vektor, utterance) dengan arti yang sama. Kemudian kita mencari hubungan struktur di antara pasangan yang disesuaikan ini untuk menemukan transformasi ruang vektor sederhana yang cocok dengan negatif, konjunksi, dan pemutusan. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa representation saraf mampu secara spontan mengembangkan 'sintaks' dengan analogi fungsional ke properti kualitatif bahasa alam.", 'fa': 'ما ساختار ترکیب ویکتورهای پیام را تحقیق می کنیم که توسط یک شبکه عمیق آموزش داده شده در بازی ارتباطی است. با مقایسه کردن نمایش\u200cهای حقیقت-شرایط پیغام\u200cهای پیغام\u200cهای تولید شده\u200cی کودکتر با نمایش\u200cهای تولید شده\u200cی انسان، قادر به شناسایی جفت\u200cهای متصل\u200cشده (ویکتور، سخنرانی) با یک معنی است. سپس ما دنبال رابطه\u200cهای ساخته\u200cشده بین این جفت\u200cهای متصل می\u200cگردیم تا تغییرات فضای ویکتور ساده را کشف کنیم که مربوط به منفی، ترکیب و ترکیب است. نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که نمایش\u200cهای عصبی می\u200cتوانند با استفاده از خودشان یک «سینتکس» با آنالوگ\u200cهای عملی برای ویژه\u200cهای کیفیت زبان طبیعی توسعه دهند.', 'sw': "Tunatachunguza muundo wa jumla wa vectors za ujumbe unaohesabiwa na mtandao wa kina ulioelekezwa kwenye mchezo wa mawasiliano. Kwa kulinganisha uwakilizaji wa ukweli wa vectors za ujumbe zilizotengenezwa kwa kutumia maoni yanayotengenezwa kwa binadamu, tunaweza kutambua wawili (vector, hotuba) kwa maana hayo. Kisha tunatafuta mahusiano yaliyotengenezwa miongoni mwa wanaume hawa waliotengenezwa ili kugundua mabadiliko rahisi ya barabara yenye mabadiliko yanayohusiana na hasi, ushirikiano na kutengwa. Our results suggest that neural representations are capable of spontaneously developing a 'syntax' with functional analogues to qualitative properties of natural language.", 'tr': "Bir iletişim oyunu üzerinde çalışan bir a ğ tarafından hesaplanmış mesaj vektörlerinin sastal yapısını inceledik. Kod eden mesaj vektörlerinin elimizden gelen ifadeleri ile karşılaştırarak, biz de aynı ifade ile çizgileri tanımlayabiliriz. - Sonra basit vektör uzay değişimlerini keşfetmek için bu çizgiler arasında yapılmış ilişkileri arıyoruz. Näme netijelerimiz näyral temsillerimiz tebigy diliniň kvalitetli hasaplaryna spontanly bir 'syntaks' gelişmegi mümkin edip biljekdigini duýýarlar.", 'ko': "우리는 통신 게임에서 훈련된 깊이 있는 네트워크 계산의 메시지 벡터의 구성 구조를 연구했다.인코더가 생성한 메시지 벡터와 인류가 생성한 인용 표현식의 진가 조건을 비교함으로써 우리는 같은 의미를 가진 정렬(벡터, 언어) 쌍을 식별할 수 있다.그 다음에 우리는 이러한 정렬 간의 구조화 관계를 검색하여 부정, 합성, 분석에 대응하는 간단한 벡터 공간 변환을 발견한다.우리의 결과에 따르면 신경표징은 자연언어의 정성적 속성과 기능의 유사성을 가진'문법'을 자발적으로 발전시킬 수 있다.", 'sq': "We investigate the compositional structure of message vectors computed by a deep network trained on a communication game.  Duke krahasuar përfaqësimet e të vërtetës-kushtueshme të vektorëve të mesazheve të prodhuar nga koduesit me shprehjet referente të prodhuara nga njeriu, ne jemi në gjendje të identifikojmë çifte të renditura (vektor, shprehje) me të njëjtin kuptim. Pastaj kërkojmë marrëdhënie të strukturuara midis këtyre çifteve të rreshtuara për të zbuluar transformime të thjeshta të hapësirës së vektorit që korrespondonin me negativën, lidhjen dhe shkëputjen. Rezultatet tona sugjerojnë se përfaqësimet neuronale janë në gjendje të zhvillojnë spontanisht një 'sintaks' me analogë funksionale me pronësitë kualitative të gjuhës natyrore.", 'am': 'We investigate the compositional structure of message vectors computed by a deep network trained on a communication game.  By comparing truth-conditional representations of encoder-produced message vectors to human-produced referring expressions, we are able to identify aligned (vector, utterance) pairs with the same meaning.  ከዚያም በኋላ በእነዚህ በተለያዩ ሁለት መካከል የተካሄደውን የሜትሮር ስፋት ለውጦችን ለማግኘት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ፍሬቶቻችንም የነዌብ መልዕክቶች የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አካባቢ የቋንቋ ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հաղորդագրությունների վեկտորների բաղադրական կառուցվածքը, որը հաշվարկվում է հաղորդակցման խաղի մեջ վարժեցված խորը ցանցի միջոցով: Համեմատելով կոդերով արտադրված հաղորդագրությունների վեկտորների ճշմարտության պայմաններով արտահայտված հաղորդագրությունների և մարդկային արտադրված հաղորդագրությունների արտահայտությունների, մենք կարողանում ենք հայտնաբերել հավասար (վեկտոր, արտահայտություն) զույգե Հետո մենք փնտրում ենք կառուցվածքային հարաբերություններ այս հավասար զույգերի միջև, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք պարզ վեկտորի տարածության վերափոխություններ, որոնք համապատասխանում են բացասական, հաղորդակցման և անհաղորդակցման հետ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նյարդային ներկայացումները կարող են ինքնաբուխ զարգացնել ֆունկցիոնալ անալոգների հետ ֆունկցիոնալ համաձայն բնական լեզվի որակային հատկությունների հետ:', 'bn': "যোগাযোগ খেলায় প্রশিক্ষিত একটি গভীর নেটওয়ার্ক গভীর নেটওয়ার্ক হিসেবে বার্তা ভেক্টরের সংগঠনের কাঠামো আমরা ত এনকোডার উৎপাদন করা বার্তা ভেক্টরের সত্য-শর্তিক প্রতিনিধিত্বের মাধ্যমে মানুষের উল্লেখযোগ্য প্রকাশের সাথে তুলনা করে, আমরা একই মানে সাথে স তারপর আমরা এই একত্রিত জোড়ার মধ্যে কাঠামো সম্পর্ক খুঁজে বের করি যাতে সাধারণ ভেক্টর স্পেস পরিবর্তনের সাথে নেতিবাচক, যোগাযোগ এবং বি আমাদের ফলাফল পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে নিউরেল প্রতিনিধিত্ব স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বাভাবিকভাবে একটি 'সিন্ক্যাক্স' উন্নয়ন করতে সক্ষম হবে যার ফলে ক", 'az': "Biz bir komunikasyon oyununda t…ôhsil edilmiŇü bir a ńüńĪ il…ô hesablanmńĪŇü ismarńĪŇü vekt√∂rl…ôrinin kompozisyonal strukturasńĪnńĪ incidirik. KodlayńĪb √ľr…ôkl…ônmiŇü mesaj vekt√∂rl…ôrinin istifad…ô edilm…ôsi il…ô insanlarńĪn √ľr…ôkl…ônmiŇü ifad…ôl…ôrin…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn, biz d…ô eyni anlama il…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü (vekt√∂r, s√∂z) √ßiftl…ôrini tanńĪyabiliriz. Sonra bu c√ľtl…ôr arasńĪndakńĪ strukturlu iliŇükileri arayńĪrńĪq ki, negasyona, birlikd…ô v…ô disjunksiya m√ľqayis…ôd…ô olan basit vektor uzay d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrini keŇüf ed…ôk. N√∂vb…ôl…ôrimizin n…ôtic…ôl…ôrimiz t…ôbi…ôtli dill…ôrin qabiliyy…ôtli √∂zellikl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô f…ôaliyy…ôtli analogi olan 'sintaks' vasit…ôsil…ô t…ômizl…ôy…ô bil…ôr.", 'bs': "Istražujemo kompozicionalnu strukturu vektora poruke koje je računalo duboka mreža obučena na komunikacijskoj igri. Uspoređujući istinske uvjetne predstave vektora proizvodnje poruke kodera sa ljudskim izrazima, možemo identificirati spojene pare (vektor, izjava) sa istim značenjem. Zatim tražimo strukturirane veze među ovim usklađenim parovima kako bi otkrili jednostavne transformacije prostora vektora odgovarajuće negaciji, vezi i disjunkciji. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da su neuralne predstave sposobne spontano razvijati 'sintaks' sa funkcionalnim analogom kvalitativnim vlasništvom prirodnog jezika.", 'ca': "Investiguem l'estructura compositiva dels vectors de missatges computats per una xarxa profunda entrenada en un joc de comunicació. Comparant representacions condicionals de veritat dels vectors de missatges produïts per codificador amb expressions de referència produïdes per humans, podem identificar parells allinjats (vector, expressió) amb el mateix significat. Llavors busquem relacions estructuradas entre aquestes parelles alliniades per descobrir transformacions simples de l'espai vector que corresponden a negatió, conjunció i desjuncció. Els nostres resultats suggereixen que les representacions neuronals són capaços de desenvolupar espontàniament una 'sintaxi' amb analògues funcionals a propietats qualitatives del llenguatge natural.", 'cs': 'Zkoumáme kompoziční strukturu vektorů zpráv vypočítaných hlubokou sítí trénovanou na komunikační hře. Porovnáním pravdivě podmíněných reprezentací vektorů zpráv vytvořených kodérem s lidskými referenčními výrazy jsme schopni identifikovat zarovnané (vektor, výrok) páry se stejným významem. Poté hledáme strukturované vztahy mezi těmito zarovnanými páry, abychom objevili jednoduché transformace vektorového prostoru odpovídající negaci, konjunkci a disjunkci. Naše výsledky naznačují, že neuronové reprezentace jsou schopny spontánně vytvořit "syntaxi" s funkčními analogy k kvalitativním vlastnostem přirozeného jazyka.', 'et': 'Uurime sõnumivektorite kompositsioonistruktuuri, mis on arvutatud kommunikatsioonimänguga treenitud sügavõrgu poolt. Võrreldes kodeerija poolt toodetud sõnumivektorite tõetingimuslikke esitusi inimese poolt toodetud viitavate väljenditega, suudame tuvastada sama tähendusega joondatud paarid (vektor, väljend). Seejärel otsime struktureeritud seoseid nende joondatud paaride vahel, et avastada lihtsaid vektoriruumi muundusi, mis vastavad negatsioonile, konjunktsioonile ja disjunktsioonile. Meie tulemused näitavad, et neurorepresentatsioonid on võimelised spontaanselt arendama "süntaksit" funktsionaalsete analoogidega looduskeele kvalitatiivsetele omadustele.', 'fi': "Tutkimme viestintäpeliin koulutetun syväverkon laskemien viestivektorien koostumusta. Vertaamalla koodaajien tuottamien viestivektorien totuudellisia esityksiä ihmisen tuottamiin viittausilmaisuihin pystymme tunnistamaan tasaantuneita (vektori, lause) pareja, joilla on sama merkitys. Sitten etsimme strukturoituja suhteita näiden tasattujen parien välillä löytääksemme yksinkertaisia vektoriavaruuden muunnoksia, jotka vastaavat kieltämistä, konjunktiota ja disjunktiota. Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että neurorepresentaatiot kykenevät spontaanisti kehittämään 'syntaksia' funktionaalisilla analogeilla luonnollisen kielen laadullisille ominaisuuksille.", 'af': "Ons ondersoek die komposisielle struktuur van boodskapvektore wat deur 'n diep netwerk wat op 'n kommunikasiespeletjie opgelei is. Deur die vergelyking van waarheid-voorwaardes voorstellings van enkoder-produseerde boodskapvektore na die mens-produseerde verwysing uitdrukkings, is ons in staat om te identifiseer gelyk (vektor, uitdrukking) paar met dieselfde betekening. Ons soek dan vir struktureerde verhouding tussen hierdie gelykte paar om eenvoudige vektor spasietransformasies te ontdek wat ooreenstemmende met negasie, konjunksie en disjunksie. Ons resultate stel voorstel dat neurale voorstellings moontlik is om 'n 'sintaks' te ontwikkel met funksionele analoge na kwaliteiteit eienskappe van natuurlike taal.", 'jv': "We yatèhke Gedit perusahaan kelompok kelompok Where am I Kernel Rejalekan anyar suggerekan karo hal-pawaran anyar mungkin iso nggawe nguasar 'sinaksi' karo dialog funksiyone kanggo hasil karo nggawe perusahaan anyar lengkang pribadhakan.", 'sk': "Raziskujemo sestavno strukturo vektorjev sporočil, ki jih izračuna globoko omrežje, usposobljeno za komunikacijsko igro. S primerjavo resnično pogojenih reprezentacij vektorjev sporočil, ki jih proizvajajo kodirniki, in referenčnih izrazov, ki jih proizvaja človek, smo sposobni identificirati poravnane pare (vektor, izraz) z enakim pomenom. Nato iščemo strukturirane relacije med temi poravnanimi pari, da odkrijemo preproste vektorske prostorske transformacije, ki ustrezajo zanikanju, konjunkciji in disjunkciji. Naši rezultati kažejo, da so nevronske reprezentacije sposobne spontano razviti 'sintakso' s funkcionalnimi analogi kvalitativnim lastnostim naravnega jezika.", 'ha': "Ina ƙidãya da shirin komai na shiryoyi masu basĩri da aka lissafa na wani jerin na'ura mai da aka yi wa wani game da yin mazaɓa. Ga ka daidaita masu halin da aka samu da shiryoyi na kode-wanda aka samu da wajen maganar da aka danne wa mutum, za'a iya iya gane nau'in da ake samu da shi. Sa'an nan kuma munã nemi danganta da aka samar da su daga mazan aiki da aka daidaita dõmin Mu gane musanya masu mutane na hanyoyi da haske, haɗi da da ciyi. MatamayinMu na gaya cewa masu iya iya motsar misalin neura farat ɗaya a kan 'na'urar kodi' da misãlai masu amfani da masu gaura zuwa masu sifatida masu cikin harshen asimi.", 'bo': 'We investigate the compositional structure of message vectors computed by a deep network trained on a communication game. Comparison with truth-conditional representations of encoder-produced message vectors to human-produced referring expressions, we are able to identify aligned (vector, utterance) pairs with the same meaning. དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་གྲལ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ', 'he': 'We investigate the compositional structure of message vectors computed by a deep network trained on a communication game.  על ידי השוואה ביצועי אמת-תנאים של ווקטורי הודעות מופיעים ע"י קודם לביצועים אנושיים ביצועים מתייחסים, אנחנו מסוגלים לזהות זוגות ממוקדות (ווקטור, ביטוי) עם אותו משמעות. We then search for structured relationships among these aligned pairs to discover simple vector space transformations corresponding to negation, conjunction, and disjunction.  Our results suggest that neural representations are capable of spontaneously developing a \'syntax\' with functional analogues to qualitative properties of natural language.'}
{'en': 'A Simple Regularization-based Algorithm for Learning Cross-Domain Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'خوارزمية بسيطة قائمة على التنظيم لتعلم تضمين الكلمات عبر المجالات', 'pt': 'Um algoritmo simples baseado em regularização para aprender incorporações de palavras entre domínios', 'fr': "Un algorithme simple basé sur la régularisation pour l'apprentissage des intégrations de mots interdomaines", 'es': 'Un algoritmo simple basado en la regularización para aprender incrustaciones de palabras entre dominios', 'ja': 'クロスドメインWord埋め込みを学習するためのシンプルな正規化ベースのアルゴリズム', 'zh': '一本于正则化之简跨域词嵌学算法', 'ru': 'Простой алгоритм, основанный на регуляризации, для изучения вложений кросс-доменных слов', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-डोमेन वर्ड एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए एक सरल नियमितीकरण-आधारित एल्गोरिथ्म', 'ga': 'Algartam Simplí Bunaithe ar Rialáil chun Leabú Focal Trasfhearann a Fhoghlaim', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Egyszerű szabályozási alapú algoritmus a tartományok közötti szóbeágyazások tanulásához', 'el': 'Ένας απλός αλγόριθμος βασισμένος στη ρύθμιση για την εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων μεταξύ τομέων', 'lt': 'Paprastas reguliavimo pagrindu pagrįstas mokymosi tarpdomeninių žodžių įterpimo algoritmas', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d', 'kk': 'Қос- доменді сөз ендіру үшін қарапайым регулярлау негіздеген алгоритм', 'ms': 'Name', 'no': 'Ein enkel reguleringsbasert algoritme for læring av krysdomeneord', 'mn': 'Хөгжин домайн үг нэмж сурахын тулд энгийн хэмжээст байгуулах алгоритм', 'pl': 'Prosty algorytm oparty na regularyzacji do uczenia się wieloodziennych osadzeń słowa', 'mt': 'Algoritmu sempliċi bbażat fuq ir-Regolamentazzjoni għat-Tagħlim tal-Integrazzjoni tal-Kliem Transdomestiku', 'ro': 'Un algoritm simplu bazat pe regularizare pentru învățarea încorporărilor de cuvinte între domenii', 'sr': 'Jednostavni algoritam na osnovu regularizacije za učenje uključenja riječi preko domena', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En enkel regleringsbaserad algoritm för att lära sig Word-inbäddade över domäner', 'so': 'A simple Regularization based Algorithm for Learning Cross-Domain Word Embeds', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'it': 'Un algoritmo semplice basato sulla regolarizzazione per imparare le incorporazioni di parole cross-domain', 'vi': 'Đơn giản chỉnh chu kỳ cho nền văn học giáo dục xuyên miền giáo', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Един прост алгоритъм, базиран на регулиране, за изучаване на вграждания на думи между домейните', 'hr': 'Jednostavni algoritam na temelju regularizacije za učenje uključenja riječi preko domena', 'da': 'En enkel reguleringsbaseret algoritme til læring af indlejringer på tværs af domæner', 'nl': 'Een eenvoudig op regulering gebaseerd algoritme voor het leren van domeinoverschrijdende Word Embeddings', 'de': 'Ein einfacher Regularisierungs-basierter Algorithmus zum Erlernen domänenübergreifender Word-Einbettungen', 'ko': '정규화된 크로스 단어 삽입 학습 알고리즘', 'id': 'Algoritma sederhana berdasarkan Regularisasi untuk Mempelajari Pencampuran Kata Cross-Domain', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mgaidi wa Udhibiti wa Udhibiti unaotengenezwa kwa ajili ya Kufundisha Kusini', 'tr': 'Çot-Domain Kelimi Eýetmek üçin basit düzenlemeli Algoritm', 'sq': 'Një algoritëm i thjeshtë bazuar në rregullim për mësimin e përfshirjes së fjalëve ndër-domini', 'am': 'Name', 'bn': 'A Simple Regularization-based Algorithm for Learning Cross-Domain Word Embeddings', 'az': '칂톛rz-Domen S칬zl톛ri 캻fad톛l톛rini 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n Basit D칲z톛ltm톛-tabanl캼 Algoritimi', 'hy': 'Պարզ ռեգորիզացիայի հիմնված ալգորիթմ բառերի խաչբեռնման սովորելու համար', 'bs': 'Jednostavni algoritam na osnovu regularizacije za učenje uključenja riječi preko domena', 'cs': 'Jednoduch첵 algoritmus zalo탑en첵 na regularizaci pro u훾en챠 se vkl찼d찼n챠 slov mezi dom챕nami', 'et': 'Lihtne regulariseerimispõhine algoritm domeenidevaheliste sõnade manustamise õppimiseks', 'ca': 'Un algoritme simple basat en la regularització per aprendre integracions de paraules transdomàniques', 'fi': 'Yksinkertainen sääntelyyn perustuva algoritmi verkkotunnusten välisten sanaupotusten oppimiseen', 'jv': 'A Simple Regularialisation-supported Algorithm for Learning krus-domain Word embedding', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Enostaven algoritm, ki temelji na regularizaciji, za učenje meddomenskih vdelav besed', 'he': 'אלגוריתם פשוט מבוסס על ריגוריזציה ללמוד מילים ברחבי שדה', 'bo': 'Cross-Domain Word Embedding སྦྱར་ནུས་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ས Algorithm'}
{'en': 'Learning word embeddings has received a significant amount of attention recently. Often, word embeddings are learned in an unsupervised manner from a large collection of text. The genre of the text typically plays an important role in the effectiveness of the resulting embeddings. How to effectively train word embedding models using data from different domains remains a problem that is less explored. In this paper, we present a simple yet effective method for learning word embeddings based on text from different domains. We demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach through extensive experiments on various down-stream NLP tasks.', 'ar': 'لقد حظي تعلم حفلات الزفاف بالكلمات بقدر كبير من الاهتمام مؤخرًا. في كثير من الأحيان ، يتم تعلم حفلات الزفاف بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة من مجموعة كبيرة من النصوص. عادةً ما يلعب نوع النص دورًا مهمًا في فعالية حفلات الزفاف الناتجة. تظل كيفية تدريب نماذج تضمين الكلمات بشكل فعال باستخدام بيانات من مجالات مختلفة مشكلة أقل استكشافًا. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم طريقة بسيطة لكنها فعالة لتعلم تضمين الكلمة بناءً على نص من مجالات مختلفة. نبرهن على فعالية نهجنا من خلال تجارب مكثفة على مهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية المختلفة.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje de la incrustación de palabras ha recibido una gran atención recientemente. A menudo, las incrustaciones de palabras se aprenden de manera no supervisada a partir de una gran colección de texto. El género del texto normalmente desempeña un papel importante en la eficacia de las incrustaciones resultantes. Cómo entrenar eficazmente los modelos de incrustación de palabras utilizando datos de diferentes dominios sigue siendo un problema que se explora menos. En este artículo, presentamos un método simple pero efectivo para aprender incrustaciones de palabras basadas en texto de diferentes dominios. Demostramos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque a través de extensos experimentos en varias tareas posteriores de la PNL.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage des intégrations de mots a récemment fait l'objet d'une grande attention. Souvent, les intégrations de mots sont apprises de manière non supervisée à partir d'une grande collection de textes. Le genre du texte joue généralement un rôle important dans l'efficacité des intégrations qui en résultent. La manière de former efficacement des modèles d'intégration de mots à l'aide de données provenant de différents domaines reste un problème encore moins exploré. Dans cet article, nous présentons une méthode simple mais efficace pour apprendre les intégrations de mots à partir de textes provenant de différents domaines. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de notre approche par des expériences approfondies sur diverses tâches de PNL en aval.", 'pt': 'Aprender incorporações de palavras recebeu uma quantidade significativa de atenção recentemente. Muitas vezes, as incorporações de palavras são aprendidas de maneira não supervisionada a partir de uma grande coleção de texto. O gênero do texto normalmente desempenha um papel importante na eficácia das incorporações resultantes. Como treinar efetivamente modelos de incorporação de palavras usando dados de diferentes domínios continua sendo um problema menos explorado. Neste artigo, apresentamos um método simples, mas eficaz, para aprender incorporações de palavras com base em texto de diferentes domínios. Demonstramos a eficácia de nossa abordagem por meio de extensos experimentos em várias tarefas de PNL a jusante.', 'zh': '学词嵌近大关注。 常,单词嵌以无监督之法,从大集学之。 文本之体,常于所产嵌有效性中起为重。 何以异域之数训练词嵌模犹一较少。 在本文中,我们发出一种不同的文本学词,有效的方法。 吾以众NLP之博实验证吾术之有效性。', 'ja': '学習の単語埋め込みは、最近大きな注目を集めています。多くの場合、単語の埋め込みは、大規模なテキストコレクションから監督されていない方法で学習されます。テキストのジャンルは、通常、結果として生じる埋め込みの有効性において重要な役割を果たします。さまざまなドメインからのデータを使用してワード埋め込みモデルを効果的にトレーニングする方法は、まだまだあまり検討されていない問題です。本稿では、異なるドメインからのテキストに基づいて、単純でありながら効果的な単語埋め込みを学習するための方法を提示する。私たちは、下流のさまざまなNLPタスクに関する広範な実験を通じて、アプローチの有効性を示します。', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखने ने हाल ही में ध्यान की एक महत्वपूर्ण राशि प्राप्त की है। अक्सर, शब्द एम्बेडिंग को पाठ के एक बड़े संग्रह से एक असुरक्षित तरीके से सीखा जाता है। पाठ की शैली आमतौर पर परिणामी एम्बेडिंग की प्रभावशीलता में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाती है। विभिन्न डोमेन से डेटा का उपयोग करके वर्ड एम्बेडिंग मॉडल को प्रभावी ढंग से कैसे प्रशिक्षित किया जाए, यह एक ऐसी समस्या बनी हुई है जो कम पता लगाई गई है। इस पेपर में, हम विभिन्न डोमेन से पाठ के आधार पर शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम विभिन्न डाउन-स्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्यों पर व्यापक प्रयोगों के माध्यम से हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Значительное внимание в последнее время было уделено внедрению слов для обучения. Часто вложения слов изучаются неконтролируемым образом из большой коллекции текста. Жанр текста обычно играет важную роль в эффективности результирующих вложений. Как эффективно обучать модели встраивания слов, используя данные из разных областей, остается проблемой, которая менее изучена. В этой статье мы представляем простой, но эффективный метод изучения вложений слов, основанный на тексте из различных областей. Эффективность нашего подхода мы демонстрируем с помощью обширных экспериментов над различными задачами Down-Stream NLP.', 'ga': 'Díríodh go leor airde le déanaí ar fhoghlaim leabaithe focal. Go minic, foghlaimítear leabú focal ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht ó bhailiúchán mór téacs. Bíonn ról tábhachtach ag seánra an téacs go hiondúil in éifeachtacht an leabaithe a bhíonn mar thoradh air. Is fadhb i gcónaí í conas múnlaí leabú focal a thraenáil go héifeachtach agus úsáid á baint as sonraí ó fhearainn éagsúla nach ndéantar aon iniúchadh uirthi. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair modh simplí ach éifeachtach chun leabú focal a fhoghlaim bunaithe ar théacs ó réimsí éagsúla. Léirímid éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige trí thurgnaimh fhairsing ar thascanna éagsúla NLP iartheachtacha.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση της ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων έχει λάβει σημαντική προσοχή πρόσφατα. Συχνά, οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων μαθαίνονται χωρίς επίβλεψη από μια μεγάλη συλλογή κειμένου. Το είδος του κειμένου παίζει συνήθως σημαντικό ρόλο στην αποτελεσματικότητα των προκύπτουσα ενσωμάτωσης. Πώς να εκπαιδεύσετε αποτελεσματικά μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα από διαφορετικούς τομείς παραμένει ένα πρόβλημα που είναι λιγότερο διερευνημένο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για την εκμάθηση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων με βάση κείμενο από διαφορετικούς τομείς. Αποδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας μέσα από εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε διάφορες μεταγενέστερες εργασίες NLP.', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру оқыту жаңа уақытта маңызды болды. Көбінде сөздерді ендіру үлкен мәтіннің жинақтауынан қолданылады. Мәтіннің жанрысы, әдетте, нәтижесінің ең маңызды рөлін орындайды. Басқа домендерден деректерді қолдану үлгілерді қалай құру үлгілерін қалай өзгертуге мүмкіндік беру керек деп қалады. Бұл қағазда, біз әртүрлі домендерден мәтінді негіздеген сөздерді ендіру үшін көңіл, әлі эффективті әдісін таңдаймыз. Біз NLP тапсырмаларының көптеген тәжірибелерімен өзіміздің тәжірибесін көрсетедік.', 'it': "Imparare le incorporazioni di parole ha ricevuto una notevole quantità di attenzione ultimamente. Spesso, le incorporazioni di parole vengono imparate in modo non supervisionato da una vasta collezione di testo. Il genere del testo gioca tipicamente un ruolo importante nell'efficacia delle incorporazioni risultanti. Come formare efficacemente modelli di incorporazione di parole utilizzando dati provenienti da domini diversi rimane un problema meno esplorato. In questo articolo, presentiamo un metodo semplice ma efficace per imparare le incorporazioni di parole basate su testi provenienti da diversi domini. Dimostriamo l'efficacia del nostro approccio attraverso ampi esperimenti su vari compiti a valle del PNL.", 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások tanulása jelentős figyelmet kapott az utóbbi időben. Gyakran a szóbeágyazásokat felügyelet nélkül tanulják egy nagy szöveggyűjteményből. A szöveg műfaja jellemzően fontos szerepet játszik a kapott beágyazások hatékonyságában. A különböző tartományokból származó adatok felhasználásával a szóbeágyazási modellek hatékony képzése továbbra is kevésbé feltárt probléma. Ebben a tanulmányban egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony módszert mutatunk be a különböző tartományokból származó szövegek alapján történő szóbeágyazások tanulására. Megközelítésünk hatékonyságát átfogó kísérletekkel mutatjuk be különböző, downstream NLP feladatokkal.', 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu daug dėmesio buvo skiriama mokymuisi žodžių įtraukimo klausimais. Dažnai žodžių įterpimas mokomas nepastebimu būdu iš didelio teksto rinkinio. Teksto rūšys paprastai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį užtikrinant veiksmingumą. Kaip veiksmingai mokyti žodžių įtraukimo modelius naudojant įvairių sričių duomenis, tebėra mažiau išnagrinėta problem a. Šiame dokumente pristatome paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą žodžių įterpimo mokymosi metodą, pagrįstą tekstu iš įvairių sričių. Mes įrodome savo požiūrio veiksmingumą, atlikdami išsamius eksperimentus, susijusius su įvairiomis nuolatinėmis NLP užduotimis.', 'ms': 'Mempelajari penyambungan perkataan telah menerima banyak perhatian baru-baru ini. Biasanya, pelengkapan perkataan belajar dengan cara yang tidak diawasi dari koleksi teks yang besar. Jener teks biasanya memainkan peran penting dalam keefektivitas penyambungan yang berasal. Bagaimana secara efektif melatih model penyembedding perkataan menggunakan data dari domain yang berbeza tetap masalah yang kurang dikenalpasti. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah sederhana tetapi efektif untuk mempelajari pelengkapan perkataan berdasarkan teks dari domain yang berbeza. Kami menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan kami melalui eksperimen luas dalam berbagai tugas NLP turun-stream.', 'mk': 'Неодамна учењето на вложување на зборови доби значително внимание. Често, вложувањето на зборови се научи на ненадгледуван начин од голема колекција текст. Генерот на текстот обично игра важна улога во ефикасноста на резултатите на вградувањата. Како ефикасно да се обучат моделите за вградување на зборови користејќи податоци од различни домени останува проблем кој е помалку истражен. Во овој весник, претставуваме едноставен, но ефикасен метод за учење на вградувања на зборови базиран на текст од различни домени. Демонстрираме ефикасност на нашиот пристап преку експерименти на различни должни задачи на НЛП.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് അടുത്തുതന്നെ വളരെ ശ്രദ്ധ കിട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും പഠിക്കുന്നു. പദാവലിയുടെ ജീന്\u200d സാധാരണയായി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ഭാഗമാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്. വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമീനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വാക്ക് എപ്പോഡിങ്ങ് മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന We demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach through extensive experiments on various down-stream NLP tasks.', 'mt': 'Dan l-a ħħar it-tagħlim dwar l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem irċieva ammont sinifikanti ta’ attenzjoni. Often, word embeddings are learned in an unsupervised manner from a large collection of text.  Il-ġeneru tat-test tipikament għandu rwol importanti fl-effettività tal-inkorporazzjonijiet li jirriżultaw. Kif jitħarrġu b’mod effettiv mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem bl-użu ta’ dejta minn dominji differenti tibqa’ problem a li hija inqas esplorata. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw metodu sempliċi iżda effettiv għat-tagħlim tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem ibbażat fuq it-test minn oqsma differenti. Aħna nuru l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna permezz ta’ esperimenti estensivi fuq diversi kompiti ta’ NLP down stream.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үеийнхөө суралцах нь маш их анхаарал авсан. Ихэнхдээ, үгний цуглуулалт нь том хэмжээний цуглуулалтаас багтаагүй аргаар суралцдаг. Текст жанр нь ихэвчлэн үр дүнтэй байдлын үр дүнд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Өөр хэсэгт өгөгдлийг ашиглаж үгсийг хэрхэн хөгжүүлэх нь бага судалгааны асуудал байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөр хэсгүүдийн текст дээр суралцах энгийн ч үр дүнтэй аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид өөр олон NLP үйл ажиллагааны тухай өргөн туршилтуудын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Læring av ordinnbygging har nyleg motteken mykje oppmerksomhet. Ofte vert ordinnbygging lært på ein ukjend måte frå ein stor samling av tekst. Sjansen av teksten spelar vanlegvis ein viktig rolle i effektiviteten av dei resulterte innbygginga. Korleis å trykke ordinnbygging av modeller med data frå ulike domene, vil det vere eit problem som er mindre utforska. I denne papiret presenterer vi ein enkel, men likevel effektiv metode for å lære ordinnbygging basert på tekst frå ulike domene. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt gjennom utvidende eksperimenter på ulike nedstrømte NLP-oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Nauka osadzeń słów otrzymała ostatnio znaczną ilość uwagi. Często osadzenia słów uczą się w sposób bez nadzoru z dużej kolekcji tekstu. Gatunek tekstu zazwyczaj odgrywa ważną rolę w efektywności powstałych osadzeń. Jak skutecznie szkolić modele osadzania słów z wykorzystaniem danych z różnych domen pozostaje problemem, który jest mniej zbadany. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy prostą, ale skuteczną metodę nauki osadzeń słów opartą na tekście z różnych domen. Efektywność naszego podejścia demonstrujemy poprzez obszerne eksperymenty na różnych dalszych zadaniach NLP.', 'ro': 'Învățarea încorporării cuvintelor a primit recent o cantitate semnificativă de atenție. Adesea, încorporările de cuvinte sunt învățate într-o manieră nesupravegheată dintr-o colecție mare de text. Genul textului joacă de obicei un rol important în eficiența încorporărilor rezultate. Modul de instruire eficientă a modelelor de încorporare a cuvintelor utilizând date din domenii diferite rămâne o problemă mai puțin explorată. În această lucrare, prezentăm o metodă simplă, dar eficientă pentru învățarea încorporărilor de cuvinte bazate pe text din diferite domenii. Demonstrăm eficacitatea abordării noastre prin experimente ample pe diferite sarcini în aval ale PNL.', 'sr': 'Nauèenje reèi ugraðenja je nedavno primilo znaèajnu kolièinu pažnje. Često se uključuju uključenje riječi na neodređen način iz velike kolekcije teksta. Genr teksta obično igra važnu ulogu u učinkovitosti rezultatnih integracija. Kako učinkovito trenirati modele uključujući riječi s podacima iz različitih domena ostaje problem koji je manje istražen. U ovom papiru predstavljamo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu za učenje reči ugrađenja na tekstu iz različitih domena. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa kroz široke eksperimente o različitim NLP zadacima.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada hadalka ku habboonaanta ayaa ugu dhowaad aad u dhegaystay. Inta badan waxaa lagu bartaa qoraal a an la ilaalinayn looga barto qoraal aad u badan. Sida caadiga ah qoraalka ayaa qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraya waxyaabaha ay ku shaqeeyaan waxyaabaha ay ka soo baxaan. Sida aad si faa’iido ah ugu tababarido sameynta qaababka macluumaadka ee gudaha kala duduwan, waa dhibaato aan ka yar baahan. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo qornaa qaab fudud oo weli saamayn ah oo ku saabsan barashada hadalka ku qoran qoraalka laga soo diro meelaha kala duduwan. Waxaynu muujinnaa shaqaalaha qaababkayaga ee lagu sameeyo imtixaamo badan oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka NLP oo kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Lärande ord inbäddningar har fått en betydande mängd uppmärksamhet nyligen. Ofta lär sig ordinbäddningar på ett obevakat sätt från en stor textsamling. Textens genre spelar vanligtvis en viktig roll för effektiviteten av de resulterande inbäddningarna. Hur man effektivt utbildar ordinbäddningsmodeller med hjälp av data från olika domäner är fortfarande ett problem som är mindre utforskat. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en enkel men effektiv metod för att lära sig ordinbäddningar baserat på text från olika domäner. Vi demonstrerar effektiviteten i vårt tillvägagångssätt genom omfattande experiment på olika nedåtgående NLP-uppgifter.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுதலை கற்றுக்கொள்வது சமீபத்தில் ஒரு முக்கியமான கவனத்தை பெற்றுள்ளது. பெரிய உரையின் தொகுப்பிலிருந்து காப்பாற்றப்படாத வகையில் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடுகிறது. உரையின் மரம் வழக்கமாக முடிவுகளின் விளைவில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது. எவ்வாறு வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்க மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி பயிற்சி செய்வது பிரச்சனையில் குறைவா இந்த காகிதத்தில், வேறு களங்களிலிருந்து உரையை அடிப்படையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு எளிய ஆனாலும் வெளிப்படையான முற நாம் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் விரிவான சோதனைகள் மூலம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் பல்வேறு கீழ்நீர் NLP பணிகளில்.', 'si': 'වචනය ඉගෙන ගන්න අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් ලැබුනා. සමහර වෙලාවෙන්, වචන සංවිධානයක් ලොකු පාළුවේ සංවිධානයක් නැති විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්නවා. පාළුවේ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙ කොහොමද වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලින් දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ වෙනස් විදියට පරික්ෂා කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන් මේ පැත්තේ, අපි වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලින් පැත්තට ආධාරිත වචනය ඉගෙන ගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් තියෙනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා විශාල ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා විශාල ප්\u200dර', 'ur': 'ابڈینگ لکھنے کی تعلیم اخیر سے بہت بڑی توجه حاصل کی گئی ہے۔ اغلب، کلمات ابڈینگ ایک بڑے کلکس سے بغیر محفوظ طریقے سے سکھائی جاتی ہے. پیغام کا جونس معمولاً ایک اہم رغم کھیل رہا ہے نتیجۂ ایمبڈینگ کے فعالیت میں۔ کس طرح مختلف ڈومین سے ڈاٹ کے مطابق لکھنے کی مدل کے مطابق لکھنے والی لغات کی تطابق کرنا ایک مشکل ہے جو کم تحقیق کی جاتی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ساده اور اثبات طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کے مطابق مختلف ڈومین کے متعلق متصل کریں۔ ہم نے اپنے طریقے کے مطابق مختلف نیچے سیدھے NLP کے کاموں کے ذریعہ بڑی آزمائش کے ذریعہ دکھائے ہیں.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შესწავლება ახლა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი დაახლოებით. ზოგიერთად, სიტყვების შეყვარება ტექსტის დიდი კოლექციაზე შესწავლილია არსწორად. ტექსტის ჯენერი ტიპოლურად იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი პროლის შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი რექსიტურებაში. როგორ ეფექტიურად მოდელების შეყვარება მოდელების გამოყენება განსხვავებული დიომენებიდან დარჩენა პრობლემა, რომელიც ცოტა გამოყენებულია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ განსხვავებული დომენტების ტექსტის დაბაზეული მარტივი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური მეტი დავიწყებთ. ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობას გამოჩვენებთ განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტებით განსხვავებული NLP საქმებზე.', 'uz': "Keyingi soʻzni o'rganish uchun eng muhim paydo bo'lgan. Odatda, so'zlar ichida xavfsiz matnni katta toʻplamdan o'rganadi. The genre of the text typically plays an important role in the effectiveness of the resulting embeddings.  @ info Bu qogʻozda, biz har xil domenadagi matn asosida so'zlarni o'rganish uchun oddiy va effektiv usulni hosil qilamiz. Biz qanchalik NLP vazifalarini ko'proq jarayonlarni ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Việc xây dựng từ ngữ học gần đây đã được chú ý rất nhiều. Thông thường, sự cấy ghép từ được học theo một cách không giám sát từ một bộ sưu tập văn bản lớn. Thể loại của văn bản thường đóng vai trò quan trọng trong hiệu quả của sự nhúng vào kết quả. Cách huấn luyện thực tế các mô hình ghép từ bằng dữ liệu từ các miền khác vẫn là vấn đề chưa được khám phá kĩ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để học những từ ngữ dựa trên văn bản từ các miền khác nhau. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của cách tiếp cận này qua các thí nghiệm lớn về các công việc CRP.', 'bg': 'Наскоро изучаването на вграждането на думи е получило значително внимание. Често вграждането на думи се научава без надзор от голяма колекция от текст. Жанрът на текста обикновено играе важна роля за ефективността на получените вграждания. Как ефективно да се обучават модели за вграждане на думи, използващи данни от различни домейни, остава проблем, който е по-малко проучен. В настоящата статия представяме прост, но ефективен метод за изучаване на вграждания на думи въз основа на текст от различни домейни. Ние демонстрираме ефективността на нашия подход чрез обширни експерименти по различни задачи по НЛО надолу по веригата.', 'hr': 'Naučenje riječi uključenje nedavno je primilo značajnu količinu pažnje. Često se uključivanje riječi uče na neodređen način iz velike kolekcije teksta. Genr teksta obično igra važnu ulogu u učinkovitosti rezultatih integracija. Kako učinkovito trenirati modele uključujući riječi s podacima iz različitih domena ostaje problem koji je manje istražen. U ovom papiru predstavljamo jednostavan i yet efikasni metod učenja riječi ugrađenih na tekstu iz različitih domena. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa kroz široke eksperimente o raznim zadacima NLP-a.', 'nl': 'Het leren van woord embeddings heeft de laatste tijd veel aandacht gekregen. Vaak worden woordinbeddingen zonder toezicht geleerd uit een grote verzameling tekst. Het genre van de tekst speelt meestal een belangrijke rol in de effectiviteit van de resulterende embeddings. Hoe effectief woordinbeddingsmodellen getraind kunnen worden met behulp van gegevens uit verschillende domeinen blijft een probleem dat minder onderzocht wordt. In dit artikel presenteren we een eenvoudige maar effectieve methode voor het leren van woord embeddings op basis van tekst uit verschillende domeinen. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van onze aanpak door uitgebreide experimenten op verschillende downstream NLP taken.', 'da': 'Læring ord indlejringer har fået en betydelig mængde opmærksomhed for nylig. Ofte læres ordindlejringer uden opsyn fra en stor samling tekst. Tekstens genre spiller typisk en vigtig rolle i effektiviteten af de resulterende indlejringer. Hvordan man effektivt træner ordindlejringsmodeller ved hjælp af data fra forskellige domæner er stadig et problem, der er mindre udforsket. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en enkel, men effektiv metode til at lære ordindlejringer baseret på tekst fra forskellige domæner. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af vores tilgang gennem omfattende eksperimenter med forskellige downstream NLP-opgaver.', 'de': 'Das Lernen von Wort Einbettungen hat in letzter Zeit eine beträchtliche Menge Aufmerksamkeit erhalten. Oft werden Worteinbettungen unbeaufsichtigt aus einer großen Textsammlung gelernt. Typischerweise spielt das Genre des Textes eine wichtige Rolle für die Effektivität der resultierenden Einbettungen. Wie effektiv Worteinbettungsmodelle mit Daten aus verschiedenen Domänen trainiert werden können, bleibt ein Problem, das weniger erforscht wird. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine einfache, aber effektive Methode vor, Worteinbettungen basierend auf Text aus verschiedenen Domänen zu lernen. Die Wirksamkeit unseres Ansatzes demonstrieren wir durch umfangreiche Experimente an verschiedenen nachgelagerten NLP-Aufgaben.', 'ko': '최근 단어가 삽입된 학습이 폭넓은 관심을 받고 있다.일반적으로 단어 삽입은 감독이 없는 상황에서 대량의 텍스트에서 배운다.텍스트의 장르는 통상적으로 결과에 삽입된 유효성에 중요한 역할을 한다.서로 다른 분야의 데이터를 어떻게 사용하여 단어 삽입 모델을 효과적으로 훈련시키는지는 여전히 탐색이 비교적 적은 문제이다.본고에서 우리는 서로 다른 분야의 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 간단하고 효과적인 단어 삽입 학습 방법을 제시했다.우리는 다양한 다운스트림 NLP 임무에 대한 많은 실험을 통해 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن ابزار کلمات اخیراً توجه بسیار بزرگی را دریافت کرده است. اغلب، جمع کردن کلمات به طریق غیرقابل تعلیم داده می شوند. ژنتر متن معمولاً نقش مهم در فعالیت پایان\u200cگیری\u200cها را بازی می\u200cکند. چگونه با استفاده از داده\u200cها از دامنه\u200cهای مختلف کلمه\u200cای که کمتر تحقیق می\u200cشود را آموزش دهیم. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش ساده و تاثیر برای یادگیری کلمه\u200cها بر اساس متن از دامنه\u200cهای مختلف نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما موثرت دستور ما را با آزمایش های گسترده در کار های NLP مختلف پایین سیستم نشان می دهیم.', 'id': 'Mempelajari penerbangan kata telah menerima banyak perhatian baru-baru ini. Often, word embeddings are learned in an unsupervised manner from a large collection of text.  Jener teks biasanya memainkan peran penting dalam efektif penerbangan yang berasal. Bagaimana secara efektif melatih model penerbangan kata menggunakan data dari domain yang berbeda tetap masalah yang kurang dikeksplorasi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan metode sederhana namun efektif untuk mempelajari embedding kata berdasarkan teks dari domain yang berbeda. Kami menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kami melalui eksperimen ekstensif pada berbagai tugas NLP turun aliran.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza maneno yamepokea kiasi kikubwa cha kusikiliza hivi karibuni. Often, word embeddings are learned in an unsupervised manner from a large collection of text.  Kigeni cha maandishi kwa kawaida kinacheza nafasi muhimu katika ufanisi wa matokeo hayo. Inawezekana kufundisha mifano inayotumia taarifa kutoka maeneo mbalimbali ya maneno yanabaki kuwa tatizo ambalo halijagunduliwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa kujifunza maneno yanayotumika kwa kutumia maandishi kutoka maeneo tofauti. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu kupitia majaribio mengi kwenye kazi mbalimbali za NLP za mito ya chini.', 'tr': 'Soňra söz integrlerini öwrenmek üçin gaty uly üns berildi. Köplenç, söz integrasy uly metin ýygnanyndan goramaýan bir şekilde öwrenilýär. Metin çenli adatça netijeli baglançylygyň täsirinde wajyp roli çalýar. Farklı alanlardan maglumatlary ulanan sözleri nähili etkinlik şekilde çykarmak üçin hasaplanýan bir meselä galýar. Bu kagyzda başga alanlardan daýanýan söz integrlerini öwrenmek üçin esasy we etkinlik bir yöntemi sundýarys. Biz özümiziň yaklaşymyzyň etkinliýetimizi NLP-iň aşak täzelikleri üzerinde örän köp deneylerimizi görkeýäris.', 'af': "Leer woord inbettings het 'n betekende hoeveelheid aandag onlangs ontvang. Gedikwels word woord inbêring leer in 'n onverondersteunde manier van' n groot versameling van teks. Die genre van die teks speel tipies 'n belangrike rol in die effektiviteit van die resulteerde inbettings. Hoe om woord inbêring modele te oefen met die gebruik van data van verskillende domeine te bly 'n probleem wat minder ondersoek word. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n eenvoudige nog effektief metode vir die leer van woord inbêring gebaseer op teks van verskillende domeine. Ons wys die effektiviteit van ons toegang deur uitbreidige eksperimente op verskeie afstroom NLP-taak.", 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfshirjes së fjalëve ka marrë një sasi të rëndësishme vëmendje kohët e fundit. Shpesh, përfshirjet e fjalëve mësohen në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur nga një koleksion i madh teksti. Gjenera e tekstit tipikisht luan një rol të rëndësishëm në efektshmërinë e përfshirjeve që rezultojnë. How to effectively train word embedding models using data from different domains remains a problem that is less explored.  Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë të thjeshtë por efektive për mësimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve bazuar në tekst nga fusha të ndryshme. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë nëpërmjet eksperimenteve të gjerë në detyra të ndryshme të NLP-së.', 'am': 'ቃላትን መግለጽ በማስተማር በቅርብ ጊዜ እጅግ ብዙ ትኩረት ተቀበለ፡፡ ብዙ ጊዜም ቃላትን በተጠበቀው የጽሑፍ ክፍል በተማሩ ይማራሉ፡፡ የጽሑፉ ሥርዓት በተለየው የውጤት አካባቢዎች በጥቅምነት የሚያሳርገው አዋቂነት ነው፡፡ መልዕክቶች ከሌሎች ውይይቶች የሚጠቀሙትን የቃላትን መክፈት እንዴት እንደሚያስተምሩ ጉዳት በጣም ትንሽ የለውም፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ቃላትን በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች የጽሑፎችን ለመማር ቀላል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በብዙ ፈተና የNLP ስራዎችን በሚያሳየው የሥርዓታችንን ጥቅም እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառերի ներգրավման սովորելը վերջերս շատ ուշադրություն է ստացել: Հաճախ բառերի ներգրավումները սովորվում են առանց վերահսկման տեքստի մեծ հավաքածուց: Տեքստի գենդերը սովորաբար կարևոր դեր է խաղում արդյունավետ ներդրումների արդյունավետության մեջ: Ինչպե՞ս արդյունավետ վարժեցնել բառերի ներգրավման մոդելները, օգտագործելով տարբեր բնագավառների տվյալներ, դեռևս մի խնդիր է, որը ավելի քիչ ուսումնասիրում է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ մեթոդ բառերի ներգրավման սովորելու համար, որը հիմնված է տարբեր բնագավառների տեքստի վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը բազմաթիվ փորձարկումների միջոցով, որոնք վերաբերում են բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ խնդիրներին:', 'az': 'Sözlük inşallarını öyrənmək son zamanlarda çox böyük məlumat alındı. Genellikle, büyük mətn koleksiyonundan qeyri-müdafiə edilməmiş kimi söz in şalları öyrənirir. Metin genri olaraq növbəti in şallarının etkinliğində möhüm bir rol oynayır. Müxtəlif domeinlərdən verilər istifadə edən modelləri ilə yazılmış sözləri necə təhsil edir ki, az keşif edilən problemi həmişə qalar. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif domenin mətnlərinə dayanan sözləri öyrənmək üçün basit, hətta etkili bir metod göstəririk. Biz təsirimizin müxtəlif NLP işləri ilə çoxlu təcrübələrimizlə müxtəlif təcrübələrimizi göstəririk.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কালে শব্দের বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ পেয়েছে। প্রায়শই, শব্দ বিভিন্ন সংগ্রহের একটি বিশাল টেক্সট থেকে অরক্ষিত ভাবে শিখা যায়। টেক্সটের প্রজেন্ট সাধারণত প্রযুক্তির কার্যক্রমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে। কিভাবে বিভিন্ন ডোমেইন থেকে তথ্য ব্যবহার করে শব্দ প্রশিক্ষণের মোডেল কিভাবে প্রশিক্ষণ দেয়া যায়, তা এখনো একটা সমস্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন ডোমেন থেকে লেখা ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত এনএলপির বিভিন্ন নীচের প্রসারিত পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি।', 'ca': "Aprendre l'integració de paraules ha rebut molta atenció fa poc. Sovint, les integracions de paraules s'aprenen d'una manera sense supervisió d'una gran col·lecció de text. El gènere del text normalment té un paper important en l'eficacia de les integracions resultants. Com treinar eficaçment els models d'incorporació de paraules utilitzant dades de dominis diferents encara és un problem a menys explorat. In this paper, we present a simple yet effective method for learning word embeddings based on text from different domains.  Demonstrem l'eficacia del nostre enfocament a través d'extensos experiments en diverses tasques de NLP.", 'cs': 'Učení se vkládání slov v poslední době získalo značné množství pozornosti. Často se vkládání slov učí bez dohledu z velké sbírky textu. Žánr textu obvykle hraje důležitou roli v efektivitě výsledných vložení. Jak efektivně trénovat modely vložení slov pomocí dat z různých domén zůstává problémem, který je méně zkoumán. V tomto článku představujeme jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu učení se vložení slov na základě textu z různých domén. Účinnost našeho přístupu demonstrujeme prostřednictvím rozsáhlých experimentů na různých následných NLP úkolech.', 'et': 'Viimasel ajal on märkimisväärselt tähelepanu pööratud sõnade manustamise õppimisele. Sageli õpitakse sõnade manustamist järelevalveta suurest tekstikogust. Teksti žanr mängib tavaliselt olulist rolli tulemusliku manustamise tõhususes. Kuidas tõhusalt koolitada erinevate valdkondade andmeid kasutavaid sõnade manustamise mudeleid, on endiselt vähem uuritud probleem. Käesolevas töös tutvustame lihtsat, kuid tõhusat meetodit erinevatest valdkondadest pärit teksti õppimiseks. Näitame oma lähenemisviisi tõhusust ulatuslike eksperimentide kaudu mitmesuguste järgmiste NLP ülesannetega.', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten oppimiseen on viime aikoina kiinnitetty paljon huomiota. Usein sanaupotukset opitaan valvomattomasti suuresta tekstikokoelmasta. Tekstin genrellä on tyypillisesti tärkeä rooli tuloksena olevien upotusten tehokkuudessa. Eri toimialojen tietoja hyödyntävien sanaupotusmallien tehokas kouluttaminen on edelleen ongelma, jota ei ole tutkittu. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme yksinkertaisen mutta tehokkaan menetelmän eri toimialueiden tekstiin perustuvien sanaupotusten oppimiseen. Osoitamme toimintamme tehokkuuden laajoilla kokeiluilla erilaisissa jatkojalostustehtävissä.', 'bs': 'Naučenje riječi o integraciji nedavno je primilo značajnu količinu pažnje. Često se uključivanje riječi uče na neodređen način iz velike kolekcije teksta. Genr teksta obično igra važnu ulogu u učinkovitosti rezultatih integracija. Kako učinkovito trenirati modele uključenih riječi koristeći podatke iz različitih domena ostaje problem koji se manje istražuje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu metodu učenja riječi ugrađenih na tekstu iz različitih domena. Pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa kroz široke eksperimente o različitim zadacima NLP-a.', 'he': 'ללמוד מילים קיבל כמות משמעותית של תשומת לב לאחרונה. לעתים קרובות, מילים נלמדות באופן לא מעוקב מאסף גדול של טקסט. הסגנון של הטקסט בדרך כלל משחק תפקיד חשוב בעובדות התקפות הנוצאות. איך לאמן באופן יעיל דוגמנים של קישום מילים באמצעות נתונים מתחומים שונים נשארת בעיה פחות חוקרת. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים שיטה פשוטה אך יעילה ללמוד מילים מובססת על טקסט מתחומים שונים. אנחנו מראים את היעילות של הגישה שלנו באמצעות ניסויים רחבים על משימות NLP שונות למטה.', 'ha': 'An motsa maganar da aka shigar da su a yanzu masu girma a yanzu. Koda yawa, an sanar da maganar da aka shigar da shi cikin wata tsari ba daga mai haɗa matsayi mai girma. Jerin matsayi na iya ƙayyade yana da wani role mai muhimu a cikin alama masu gabatar da matsayi. Yãya zartar da shiryarwa masu cikin tsari da ake amfani da data daga guda daban-daban, akwai wata matsayi wanda ba da ƙaranci ba. In this paper, we present a simple yet effective method for learning word embeddings based on text from different domains.  Yana nũna mafiya amfani ga mataimakanmu da jarrabai masu yawa a kan taskõkin NLP-da-ƙari.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Genr politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pebuk iki, kita nyimpen akeh semplit maneh sing luwih apik kanggo ngerasai gambaran gambaran seng basa gambaran seng sedhaya ulih apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk efekat kanggo nyenengaké awak dhéwé ning ngerasakno sing nyenengaké NLP', 'sk': 'Učenje vključevanja besed je v zadnjem času prejelo veliko pozornosti. Pogosto se vdelave besed naučijo brez nadzora iz velike zbirke besedil. Žanr besedila običajno igra pomembno vlogo pri učinkovitosti nastalih vdelav. Kako učinkovito usposabljati modele vključevanja besed z uporabo podatkov iz različnih domen, ostaja težava, ki je manj raziskana. V prispevku predstavljamo preprosto, a učinkovito metodo za učenje vgradnje besed, ki temelji na besedilu iz različnih domen. Učinkovitost našega pristopa dokazujemo z obsežnimi eksperimenti na različnih nalogah nadaljnjega delovanja NLP.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་དུ་ཤེས་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ནང་དུ་སྦུང་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚད་ཆེ་ཤོས་རྙེད་ཡོད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་དུ་ཡིག་གེ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཐོག་ནས་རྒྱུན་གྱིན་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སླར་བ ཡི་གེའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁྱད་པར་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱིབས་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱད་ནས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ལམ་སྟབས་བདེ་བོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་གནོད་སྡུད་དམ་ཟབ་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པ་དེ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Learning what to read : Focused machine reading', 'ar': 'تعلم ما تقرأ: القراءة الآلية المركزة', 'fr': "Apprendre ce qu'il faut lire\xa0: lecture automatique ciblée", 'es': 'Aprender qué leer: lectura automática enfocada', 'pt': 'Aprendendo o que ler: leitura de máquina focada', 'ja': '何を読むべきかを学ぶ：機械読解に焦点を当てる', 'zh': '学读:注机器读', 'hi': 'सीखना क्या पढ़ने के लिए: केंद्रित मशीन पढ़ना', 'ru': 'Узнайте, что читать: Сфокусированное машинное чтение', 'ga': 'Ag foghlaim cad atá le léamh: Léamh meaisíndhírithe', 'ka': 'მასწავლება რა უნდა წაკითხვა:', 'el': 'Μάθετε τι να διαβάζετε: Εστιασμένη ανάγνωση μηχανών', 'hu': 'Tanulás, mit kell olvasni: Fókuszált gépi olvasás', 'it': 'Imparare a leggere: Lettura automatica focalizzata', 'kk': 'Оқу үшін үйрену: Focus machine reading', 'mk': 'Научи што да читаш: Фокусирано читање на машина', 'lt': 'Mokytis skaityti: sutelktas mašinų skaitymas', 'ms': 'Belajar apa untuk dibaca: Pembacaan mesin fokus', 'ml': 'വായിക്കണമെന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്നു: Focused machine reading', 'mn': 'Юу унших вэ гэдгийг сурах нь', 'mt': 'Tagħlim x’għandek taqra: Qara bil-magna ffukata', 'no': 'Læring kva å lesa: Fokusert maskinelesing', 'pl': 'Nauka czytania: Skoncentrowane odczyty maszynowe', 'ro': 'Învățarea ce să citească: Citirea automată focalizată', 'sr': 'Naučenje èitanja: fokusirano èitanje mašine', 'si': 'කියනවද කියනවද කියනවා: Focus ed machine reading', 'so': 'Waxbarashada waxa la akhriyo: Focused machine reading', 'sv': 'Lär dig vad du ska läsa: Fokuserad maskinläsning', 'ta': 'என்ன படிக்க வேண்டும் என்பதை கற்றுக் கொண்டு: Focused machine reading', 'ur': 'پڑھنے کی سیکھ رہی ہے: Focus machine reading', 'uz': 'Learning what to read: Focused machine reading', 'vi': 'Học cái gì để đọc: Bản dịch tiêu cự', 'da': 'Lære hvad man skal læse: Fokuseret maskinlæsning', 'nl': 'Leren wat te lezen: gericht machinelezen', 'de': 'Lesen lernen: Fokussiertes maschinelles Lesen', 'id': 'Belajar membaca apa: Pembacaan mesin fokus', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن چیزی که بخوانیم: خواندن ماشین تمرکز', 'hr': 'Naučenje čega čitati: Fokusirano čitanje stroja', 'sw': 'Kujifunza nini kitasoma: Focused machine reading', 'bg': 'Научете какво да четете: Фокусирано машинно четене', 'af': 'Leer wat om te lees: Fokuseerde masjien lees', 'tr': 'Näme okamalydygy öwrenmek: ünsli maşyny okamak', 'am': 'Learning what to read: Focused machine reading', 'ko': '학습 읽기 내용: 기계 읽기에 초점을 맞추다', 'sq': 'Mësoni se çfarë të lexoni: leximi i përqëndruar i makinës', 'hy': 'Learning what to read: Focused machine reading', 'bs': 'Naučenje čega čitati: Fokusirano čitanje stroja', 'bn': 'পড়তে কি শিখা যাচ্ছে: ফোকাস করা মেশিন পড়া হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Aprendre què llegir: Llegir màquina centrada', 'az': 'Neyi oxuyacańüńĪnńĪ √∂yr…ônm…ôk: FokuslńĪ maŇ°in oxuyacańüńĪ', 'cs': 'Naučit se číst: Zaměřené strojové čtení', 'et': 'Õppimine, mida lugeda: keskendunud masinlugemine', 'fi': 'Lukemisen oppiminen: Keskitetty koneluku', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'FoFokused Machine reading', 'sk': 'Učenje, kaj brati: Osredotočeno strojno branje', 'he': 'ללמוד מה לקרוא: קריאת מכונות מרוכזת', 'bo': 'ཅི་ཀློག་དགོས་པ་ཤེས་དུས། བློ་གཏོང་བའི་མ་ལག་ལྟ་ཀློག་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Recent efforts in bioinformatics have achieved tremendous progress in the machine reading of biomedical literature, and the assembly of the extracted biochemical interactions into large-scale models such as protein signaling pathways. However, batch machine reading of literature at today’s scale (PubMed alone indexes over 1 million papers per year) is unfeasible due to both cost and processing overhead. In this work, we introduce a focused reading approach to guide the machine reading of biomedical literature towards what literature should be read to answer a biomedical query as efficiently as possible. We introduce a family of algorithms for focused reading, including an intuitive, strong baseline, and a second approach which uses a reinforcement learning (RL) framework that learns when to explore (widen the search) or exploit (narrow it). We demonstrate that the RL approach is capable of answering more queries than the baseline, while being more efficient, i.e., reading fewer documents.', 'ar': 'حققت الجهود الحديثة في المعلوماتية الحيوية تقدمًا هائلاً في قراءة الآلة للأدب الطبي الحيوي ، وتجميع التفاعلات الكيميائية الحيوية المستخرجة في نماذج واسعة النطاق مثل مسارات إشارات البروتين. ومع ذلك ، فإن القراءة الآلية للأدبيات بمقياس اليوم (PubMed وحدها تفهرس أكثر من مليون ورقة في السنة) غير مجدية بسبب التكلفة والتكاليف الزائدة على حد سواء. في هذا العمل ، نقدم طريقة قراءة مركزة لتوجيه القراءة الآلية للأدب الطبي الحيوي إلى الأدب الذي يجب قراءته للإجابة على استفسار طبي حيوي بأكبر قدر ممكن من الكفاءة. نقدم مجموعة من الخوارزميات للقراءة المركزة ، بما في ذلك خط أساس بديهي وقوي ، ونهج ثانٍ يستخدم إطار عمل التعلم المعزز (RL) الذي يتعلم متى يجب استكشاف (توسيع البحث) أو استغلاله (تضييقه). نوضح أن نهج RL قادر على الإجابة على استفسارات أكثر من خط الأساس ، مع كونه أكثر كفاءة ، أي قراءة عدد أقل من المستندات.', 'fr': "Les récents efforts en bioinformatique ont permis de réaliser d'énormes progrès dans la lecture automatique de la littérature biomédicale et dans l'assemblage des interactions biochimiques extraites dans des modèles à grande échelle tels que les voies de signalisation des protéines. Cependant, la lecture automatique par lots de littérature à l'échelle actuelle (PubMed indexe à lui seul plus d'un million d'articles par an) n'est pas réalisable en raison des coûts et des frais généraux de traitement. Dans ce travail, nous introduisons une approche de lecture ciblée pour guider la lecture automatique de la littérature biomédicale vers la littérature à lire pour répondre à une question biomédicale le plus efficacement possible. Nous introduisons une famille d'algorithmes pour une lecture ciblée, y compris une base de référence intuitive et solide, et une seconde approche qui utilise un cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement (RL) qui apprend quand explorer (élargir la recherche) ou exploiter (restreindre). Nous démontrons que l'approche RL est capable de répondre à un plus grand nombre de questions que la base de référence, tout en étant plus efficace, c'est-à-dire en lisant moins de documents.", 'es': 'Los esfuerzos recientes en bioinformática han logrado un enorme progreso en la lectura automática de la literatura biomédica y el ensamblaje de las interacciones bioquímicas extraídas en modelos a gran escala, como las vías de señalización de proteínas. Sin embargo, la lectura de literatura por lotes a escala actual (solo PubMed indexa más de 1 millón de artículos por año) no es factible debido a los costos y gastos generales de procesamiento. En este trabajo, presentamos un enfoque de lectura enfocado para guiar la lectura automática de la literatura biomédica hacia qué literatura debe leerse para responder a una consulta biomédica de la manera más eficiente posible. Presentamos una familia de algoritmos para una lectura enfocada, que incluye una base de referencia sólida e intuitiva, y un segundo enfoque que utiliza un marco de aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL) que aprende cuándo explorar (ampliar la búsqueda) o explotarlo (reducirlo). Demostramos que el enfoque de RL es capaz de responder a más consultas que la línea de base, a la vez que es más eficiente, es decir, leer menos documentos.', 'pt': 'Esforços recentes em bioinformática alcançaram um tremendo progresso na leitura automática da literatura biomédica e na montagem das interações bioquímicas extraídas em modelos de larga escala, como vias de sinalização de proteínas. No entanto, a leitura automática em lote da literatura na escala atual (somente o PubMed indexa mais de 1 milhão de artigos por ano) é inviável devido ao custo e à sobrecarga de processamento. Neste trabalho, apresentamos uma abordagem de leitura focada para orientar a leitura automática da literatura biomédica para qual literatura deve ser lida para responder a uma consulta biomédica da maneira mais eficiente possível. Apresentamos uma família de algoritmos para leitura focada, incluindo uma linha de base intuitiva e forte e uma segunda abordagem que usa uma estrutura de aprendizado por reforço (RL) que aprende quando explorar (ampliar a pesquisa) ou explorar (restringi-la). Demonstramos que a abordagem RL é capaz de responder a mais consultas do que a linha de base, sendo mais eficiente, ou seja, lendo menos documentos.', 'ja': 'バイオインフォマティクスにおける最近の取り組みは、生物医学文献の機械読み取り、ならびに抽出された生化学的相互作用のタンパク質シグナル伝達経路などの大規模モデルへの組み立てにおいて、極めて大きな進歩を達成している。 しかし、今日の規模での文献のバッチマシン読み取り（ PubMedだけで年間100万以上の論文をインデックス化）は、コストと処理オーバーヘッドの両方の理由で実行不可能です。 この研究では、生物医学的な問いにできるだけ効率的に答えるためにどのような文献を読むべきかに向けて、生物医学的な文献の機械読解を導くための焦点を当てた読書アプローチを紹介します。 私たちは、直感的で強力なベースラインを含む集中的な読み取りのためのアルゴリズムのファミリーと、いつ探索（検索を拡大）または利用（絞り込む）するかを学習する強化学習（ RL ）フレームワークを使用する第二のアプローチを紹介します。 RLアプローチは、ベースラインよりも多くのクエリに答えることができる一方で、より効率的で、すなわち、より少ないドキュメントを読むことができることを実証しています。', 'ru': 'Недавние усилия в биоинформатике достигли огромного прогресса в машинном чтении биомедицинской литературы и сборке извлеченных биохимических взаимодействий в крупномасштабные модели, такие как сигнальные пути белка. Тем не менее, пакетное машинное чтение литературы в сегодняшнем масштабе (только PubMed индексирует более 1 миллиона документов в год) нецелесообразно из-за как стоимости, так и накладных расходов на обработку. В этой работе мы вводим целенаправленный подход к чтению, чтобы направлять машинное чтение биомедицинской литературы к тому, какую литературу следует читать, чтобы максимально эффективно отвечать на биомедицинский запрос. Мы представляем семейство алгоритмов для сфокусированного чтения, включая интуитивно понятную, сильную базовую линию и второй подход, который использует фреймворк обучения подкреплению (RL), который обучается, когда исследовать (расширить поиск) или использовать (сузить его). Мы демонстрируем, что подход RL способен отвечать на большее количество запросов, чем базовый уровень, но при этом более эффективен, т.е. читать меньше документов.', 'zh': '近于生物信息学力于生物医学文之机器,读而大进之,取生化相用组装成蛋白质信号通路等大体。 然成本销销,以今之批量机器读文献(仅PubMed岁索引之论过100万篇)不可行也。 引而读之,以道生物医学文机器读所当观文献以尽生物医学对。 余言列于集读之算,包直观强基线,及用强化学(RL)框架第二法,当框架可学何时探索(广搜索)或利用(缩小搜索)。 臣等证之,RL术能对比基线更多者问之,兼有效,即读更少之文档。', 'hi': 'जैव सूचना विज्ञान में हाल के प्रयासों ने बायोमेडिकल साहित्य की मशीन रीडिंग में जबरदस्त प्रगति हासिल की है, और प्रोटीन सिग्नलिंग मार्गों जैसे बड़े पैमाने पर मॉडल में निकाले गए जैव रासायनिक इंटरैक्शन की असेंबली। हालांकि, आज के पैमाने पर साहित्य का बैच मशीन रीडिंग (PubMed अकेले प्रति वर्ष 1 मिलियन से अधिक कागजात अनुक्रमित करता है) लागत और प्रसंस्करण ओवरहेड दोनों के कारण अव्यवहार्य है। इस काम में, हम बायोमेडिकल साहित्य के मशीन पढ़ने का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए एक केंद्रित पढ़ने के दृष्टिकोण का परिचय देते हैं कि साहित्य को बायोमेडिकल क्वेरी का यथासंभव कुशलता से जवाब देने के लिए क्या पढ़ा जाना चाहिए। हम केंद्रित पढ़ने के लिए एल्गोरिदम के एक परिवार को पेश करते हैं, जिसमें एक सहज ज्ञान युक्त, मजबूत आधार रेखा और एक दूसरा दृष्टिकोण शामिल है जो एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने (आरएल) ढांचे का उपयोग करता है जो सीखता है कि कब खोज का पता लगाना (खोज को चौड़ा करना) या शोषण करना (इसे संकीर्ण करना है)। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि आरएल दृष्टिकोण बेसलाइन की तुलना में अधिक प्रश्नों का उत्तर देने में सक्षम है, जबकि अधिक कुशल है, यानी, कम दस्तावेजों को पढ़ना।', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn iontach bainte amach ag iarrachtaí le déanaí i mbithfhaisnéisíocht i léitheoireacht meaisín na litríochta bithleighis, agus i gcomhthionól na n-idirghníomhaíochtaí bithcheimiceacha asbhainte i múnlaí ar scála mór cosúil le conairí comharthaíochta próitéine. Mar sin féin, níl léamh baisc-inneall na litríochta ar scála an lae inniu (innéacsanna PubMed amháin os cionn 1 milliún páipéar in aghaidh na bliana) indéanta mar gheall ar chostas agus forchostais phróiseála araon. Sa saothar seo, tugaimid isteach cur chuige léitheoireachta dírithe chun léitheoireacht mheaisín na litríochta bithleighis a threorú i dtreo na litríochta ar cheart a léamh chun ceist bhithleighis a fhreagairt chomh héifeachtach agus is féidir. Tugaimid isteach teaghlach halgartaim don léitheoireacht fhócasaithe, lena n-áirítear bonnlíne iomasach, láidir, agus an dara cur chuige a úsáideann creat foghlama treisithe (RL) a fhoghlaimíonn cathain is féidir iniúchadh a dhéanamh (an cuardach a leathnú) nó a shaothrú (é a chaolú). Léirímid go bhfuil an cur chuige RL in ann níos mó fiosruithe ná an bhunlíne a fhreagairt, agus é a bheith níos éifeachtaí, i.e. níos lú doiciméad a léamh.', 'ka': 'ბიო-ინფორმატიკაში ბიო-ინფორმატიკაში მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი მიიღეთ ბიო-მედიცინური ლიტურატიკაში და ბიო-ჰიომიკური ინტერფექციების კომპუნქცია დიდი მანდელში, როგ მაგრამ, დღეს სიკალეტაციაში (PubMed მხოლოდ იდექსებს 1 მილიონის დონე) სიკვდილის კითხვა არ შეუძლებელია, რადგან ორივე სიკვდილის და პროცესის შესაძლებელია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ჩვენ კონუქტირებული კითხვის მიღება, რომელიც შესაძლებელია ბიომედიციო ლიტურატის კითხვის მაქსინის მიღება, რომელიც ლიტურატია უნდა წავიღოთ,  ჩვენ ალგორიტიმების ოჯახი, რომელიც კონუქტირებული წაკითხვისთვის, ინტუტიური, ძალიან ფესტიური, და მეორე პროგრამის გამოყენება, რომელიც სწავლის სწავლის კონუქტირების (RL) ფესტის, როდესაც გავისწავ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ RL პროგრამის შესაძლებლობა უფრო მეტი კითხვების შესაძლებლობა, ვიდრე ფეხსნა ფეხსნა ფეხსნა უფრო ეფექტიური დოკუმენტები.', 'el': 'Οι πρόσφατες προσπάθειες στη βιοπληροφορική έχουν επιτύχει τεράστια πρόοδο στη μηχανική ανάγνωση της βιοϊατρικής βιβλιογραφίας, και τη συναρμολόγηση των εξαγόμενων βιοχημικών αλληλεπιδράσεων σε μοντέλα μεγάλης κλίμακας όπως οι πρωτεϊνικές οδούς σηματοδότησης. Ωστόσο, η μαζική ανάγνωση λογοτεχνίας στη σημερινή κλίμακα (μόνο η PubMed δείχνει πάνω από ένα εκατομμύριο εφημερίδες ετησίως) είναι αδύνατη τόσο λόγω κόστους όσο και του γενικού κόστους επεξεργασίας. Στην εργασία αυτή, εισάγουμε μια εστιασμένη προσέγγιση ανάγνωσης για να καθοδηγήσουμε τη μηχανική ανάγνωση της βιοϊατρικής λογοτεχνίας προς το τι λογοτεχνία πρέπει να διαβαστεί για να απαντήσει σε ένα βιοϊατρικό ερώτημα όσο το δυνατόν αποτελεσματικότερα. Παρουσιάζουμε μια οικογένεια αλγόριθμων για εστιασμένη ανάγνωση, συμπεριλαμβανομένης μιας διαισθητικής, ισχυρής βάσης, και μια δεύτερη προσέγγιση που χρησιμοποιεί ένα πλαίσιο ενίσχυσης μάθησης (που μαθαίνει πότε να εξερευνά (διευρύνει την αναζήτηση) ή να εκμεταλλευτεί (να την περιορίσει). Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγιση είναι ικανή να απαντήσει σε περισσότερα ερωτήματα από τη γραμμή βάσης, ενώ είναι πιο αποτελεσματική, δηλαδή να διαβάζει λιγότερα έγγραφα.', 'hu': 'A bioinformatika terén tett közelmúltbeli erőfeszítések óriási előrelépést értek el az orvosbiológiai szakirodalom gépi olvasásában, valamint a kivont biokémiai kölcsönhatások nagyszabású modellekbe való összeállításában, mint például a fehérje jelátviteli útvonalak. Azonban a mai méretű irodalom kötegelt gépi olvasása (a PubMed önmagában több mint 1 millió papírt indexel évente) mind a költségek, mind a feldolgozási költségek miatt nem megvalósítható. Ebben a munkában egy olyan koncentrált olvasási megközelítést mutatunk be, amely irányítja az orvosbiológiai irodalom gépi olvasását arra, hogy milyen irodalmat kell olvasni, hogy a lehető leghatékonyabban válaszoljon az orvosbiológiai kérdésekre. Bevezetünk egy algoritmuscsaládot a fókuszált olvasáshoz, beleértve egy intuitív, erős alapvonalat, és egy második megközelítést, amely egy erősítő tanulási (RL) keretrendszert használ, amely megtanulja, mikor kell felfedezni (kiterjeszteni a keresést) vagy kihasználni (szűkíteni). Bemutatjuk, hogy az RL megközelítés képes több kérdésre válaszolni, mint az alap, miközben hatékonyabb, azaz kevesebb dokumentum olvasására.', 'it': "I recenti sforzi in bioinformatica hanno raggiunto enormi progressi nella lettura automatica della letteratura biomedica e nell'assemblaggio delle interazioni biochimiche estratte in modelli su larga scala come i percorsi di segnalazione delle proteine. Tuttavia, la lettura automatica batch della letteratura sulla scala attuale (PubMed da solo indicizza oltre 1 milione di articoli all'anno) è impraticabile sia a causa dei costi che delle spese di elaborazione. In questo lavoro, introduciamo un approccio di lettura focalizzato per guidare la lettura automatica della letteratura biomedica verso ciò che la letteratura dovrebbe essere letta per rispondere a una domanda biomedica nel modo più efficiente possibile. Introduciamo una famiglia di algoritmi per la lettura focalizzata, tra cui una base di base intuitiva e forte, e un secondo approccio che utilizza un framework di apprendimento di rinforzo (RL) che impara quando esplorare (ampliare la ricerca) o sfruttare (restringerla). Dimostriamo che l'approccio RL è in grado di rispondere a più domande rispetto alla base, pur essendo più efficiente, cioè leggendo meno documenti.", 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu bioinformatikos srityje padaryta didžiulpažanga skaitant biomedicinę literatūrą ir surinktos biocheminės sąveikos surinkimas į didelio masto modelius, pavyzdžiui, baltymų signalizacijos kelius. Tačiau šiandienos mastu literatūros skaitymas serijomis (vien tik PubMed indeksai viršija 1 mln. popierių per metus) yra neįmanomas dėl s ąnaudų ir apdorojimo išlaidų. Šiame darbe įvedame tikslinį skaitymo metodą, kuriuo vadovaujamasi biomedicinės literatūros skaitymui, siekiant kuo veiksmingiau atsakyti į biomedicinį klausimą. Įdiegiame tikslinio skaitymo algoritmų šeimą, įskaitant intuityvų, tvirtą bazinį požiūrį, ir antrąjį požiūrį, kuris naudoja stipresnio mokymosi sistemą, kuri išmoko ištirti (išplėsti paiešką) arba išnaudoti (suvaržyti ją). Mes įrodome, kad RL metodas gali atsakyti į daugiau klausimų negu pradinis, tuo pat metu yra veiksmingesnis, t. y. skaitant mažiau dokumentų.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы биомақпаратикалық әрекеттерде биомақпаратикалық әдебиеттерді оқу машинасында көп жұмыс жеткізді, және бұл биомақпараттық интерфейстердің біріктіру үлкен үлкен моделдеріне, мысалы протеиндерді Бірақ бүгінгі масштабындағы литератураны оқу машинасы (PubMed тек жылдық 1 миллион қағаз арасындағы индекстер) бағаттары мен өңдеу үшін оңай болмайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде биомедицина литературасын оқу үшін, биомедицина сұрақтарына қандай оқу үшін көздеген оқу тәртібін келтіреміз. Біз көздеген оқу үшін алгоритмдердің отбасын келтіреміз, интуитивті, күшті негізгі сызық және екінші жағдай, ол қазір оқу үшін оқу үшін қолданатын (RL) бағдарламасын қолданатын (іздеу үшін) немесе қолдану ү Біз RL қасиеті негізгі жолдан артық сұрақтарды жауап беруге болады дегенді көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсетедік, яғни құжаттарды оқу керек.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните напори во биоинформатиката постигнаа огромен напредок во машинското читање на биомедицинската литература и собирањето на екстрактираните биохемиски интеракции во големи модели како што се патиштата за сигнализација на протеините. Сепак, читањето на литературата на денешната машина (индексите само на PubMed над 1 милион хартии годишно) не е спроведливо поради цените и процесот. Во оваа работа, воведуваме фокусиран пристап на читање за да го водиме машинското читање на биомедицинската литература кон она што литературата треба да се чита за да одговори на биомедицинското прашање што е можно поефикасно. Ние воведуваме семејство алгоритми за фокусирано читање, вклучувајќи интуитивен, силен основен пристап и втор пристап кој користи рамка за зајакнување на учењето (RL) која научи кога да истражува (прошири го пребарувањето) или да го искористи (стесни го). Демонстрираме дека пристапот на РЛ е способен да одговара на повеќе прашања отколку на основата, додека е поефикасен, т.е. да чита помалку документи.', 'ms': 'Usaha-usaha baru-baru ini dalam bioinformatik telah mencapai kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam pembacaan mesin literatur biomedis, dan kumpulan interaksi biokimia ekstrak ke dalam model skala besar seperti laluan sinyal protein. Namun, pembacaan mesin batch literatur pada skala hari ini (indeks PubMed sahaja lebih dari 1 juta kertas setahun) tidak boleh dilakukan kerana kedua-dua biaya dan pemprosesan overhead. Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan pembacaan fokus untuk memimpin pembacaan mesin literatur biomedis ke arah apa literatur patut dibaca untuk menjawab pertanyaan biomedis dengan sebaik mungkin. We introduce a family of algorithms for focused reading, including an intuitive, strong baseline, and a second approach which uses a reinforcement learning (RL) framework that learns when to explore (widen the search) or exploit (narrow it).  Kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan RL mampu menjawab lebih banyak pertanyaan daripada asas, sementara lebih efisien, iaitu membaca lebih sedikit dokumen.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ജീവിതത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വലിയ പ്രോഗത്തിനും പ്രോട്ടീന്\u200d സിഗ്നല്\u200d വഴികള്\u200d പോലെ പ്രോട്ടീന്\u200d സിഗ് എന്നാലും ഇന്നുള്ള സാഹിത്യത്തിലെ ബാച്ച് യന്ത്രം വായിക്കുന്നത് ബാച്ച് മെഷീന്\u200d (പുബ്മെഡ് ഒറ്റയ്ക്ക് ഒരു വര്\u200dഷത്തില്\u200d 1 മില്യണ്\u200d പത് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ച് വായിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെഷിന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ബൈയോമിക്കല്\u200d സാഹിത്യത്ത ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകേള്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ കുടുംബത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന, ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d, രണ്ടാ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തേക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d കഴിവുള്ള R', 'mt': "L-isforzi reċenti fil-bijoinformatika kisbu progress enormi fil-qari bil-magna tal-letteratura bijomedika, u l-immuntar tal-interazzjonijiet bijokimiċi estratti f’mudelli fuq skala kbira bħall-mogħdijiet tas-sinjalar tal-proteini. However, batch machine reading of literature at today's scale (PubMed alone indexes over 1 million papers per year) is unfeasible due to both cost and processing overhead.  F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nintroduċu approċċ ta’ qari ffukat biex niggwidaw il-qari bil-magna tal-letteratura bijomedika lejn liema letteratura għandha tinqara biex twieġeb mistoqsija bijomedika bl-aktar mod effiċjenti possibbli. We introduce a family of algorithms for focused reading, including an intuitive, strong baseline, and a second approach which uses a reinforcement learning (RL) framework that learns when to explore (widen the search) or exploit (narrow it).  Aħna nuru li l-approċċ RL huwa kapaċi jwieġeb aktar mistoqsijiet mil-linja bażi, filwaqt li jkun aktar effiċjenti, jiġifieri li jinqraw inqas dokumenti.", 'no': 'Nyleg har innsatt i bioinformatikken oppnådd enorme framgang i maskinelesing av biomedisinsk literatur, og samlinga av de ekstraherte biokjemiske interaksjonane i stor skala modeller som proteinssigneringsveiar. Det er imidlertid ikkje enkelt å lesa litteratur i dagens skala (bare PubMed indekserer over 1 million papir i året) på grunn av både kostnader og handlingar over overskrift. I denne arbeiden introduserer vi ein fokusert lesingstilnærming for å gjera maskinelesing av biomedisinsk literatur mot kva literatur skal lesast for å svara på ein biomedisinsk spørjing så effektivt som mulig. Vi introduserer ein familie av algoritmer for fokusert lesing, inkludert ein intuitiv, sterk baselinje, og ein andre tilnærming som brukar eit reinforcementlæring (RL) rammeverk som lærer når du utforskar (utvida søket) eller eksploderer (minst det). Vi viser at RL-tilnærminga er i stand til å svara på fleire spørsmål enn baselinja, mens det er meir effektivt, dvs. lesa mindre dokument.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie wysiłki w dziedzinie bioinformatyki osiągnęły ogromny postęp w odczycie maszynowym literatury biomedycznej i montażu ekstrahowanych interakcji biochemicznych w modele na dużą skalę, takie jak ścieżki sygnalizacji białek. Jednak maszynowy odczyt literatury w dzisiejszej skali (sam PubMed indeksuje ponad milion prac rocznie) jest niemożliwy ze względu na koszty i koszty przetwarzania. W niniejszej pracy wprowadzamy ukierunkowane podejście do czytania, aby poprowadzić maszynowy odczyt literatury biomedycznej w kierunku tego, jaką literaturę należy czytać, aby jak najskuteczniej odpowiedzieć na pytanie biomedyczne. Wprowadzamy rodzinę algorytmów do ukierunkowanego czytania, w tym intuicyjną, silną bazę bazową oraz drugie podejście, które wykorzystuje framework uczenia się, który uczy się, kiedy eksplorować (poszerzyć wyszukiwanie) lub wykorzystać (zawężyć). Wykazujemy, że podejście RL jest w stanie odpowiedzieć na więcej pytań niż baza, a jednocześnie jest bardziej efektywne, czyli czytać mniej dokumentów.', 'mn': 'Биологийн мэдээллийн хувьд сүүлийн үед биологийн уран зохиолын унших машин дээр маш их хөгжлийн үр дүн гарсан бөгөөд хадгалагдсан биологийн химийн харилцааны цуглуулалт нь уураг илэрхийлэх зам зэрэг том хэмжээний загварууд болж байна. Гэхдээ өнөөдрийн уран зохиолын унших машинууд (ПубМед ганц жилд 1 сая гаруй цаасан индекс) нь үнэтэй болон үйлдвэрлэлийн тулд амархан байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид биологийн эмнэлгийн уран зохиолын унших машины удирдах төвлөрсөн унших арга зам руу илтгэдэг. Биологийн эмнэлгийн асуултыг хэрхэн үр дүнтэй хариулах ёстой вэ? Бид төвлөрсөн унших алгоритмын гэр бүлийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь ойлголттой, хүчтэй суурь шугам, хоёр дахь арга зам юм. Бид RL арга зам нь суурь шулуунаас илүү олон асуулт хариулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь илүү үр дүнтэй, яг л бага баримт унших боломжтой.', 'ro': 'Eforturile recente în bioinformatică au realizat progrese extraordinare în citirea mașinii literaturii biomedicale și asamblarea interacțiunilor biochimice extrase în modele la scară largă, cum ar fi căile de semnalizare a proteinelor. Cu toate acestea, citirea în serie a literaturii la scara actuală (numai PubMed indică peste 1 milion de lucrări pe an) este imposibilă atât din cauza costurilor, cât și a cheltuielilor de procesare. În această lucrare, introducem o abordare de lectură concentrată pentru a ghida citirea automată a literaturii biomedicale spre ce literatură ar trebui citită pentru a răspunde la o interogare biomedicală cât mai eficient posibil. Introducem o familie de algoritmi pentru citirea concentrată, inclusiv o bază de referință intuitivă și puternică, și o a doua abordare care utilizează un cadru de învățare de armare (RL) care învață când să exploreze (lărgiți căutarea) sau să exploateze (restrângeți-l). Demonstrăm că abordarea RL este capabilă să răspundă la mai multe întrebări decât cea de referință, fiind în același timp mai eficientă, adică citirea mai puține documente.', 'sr': 'Nedavni napori u bioinformatiki postigli su ogroman napredak u čitanju mašine biomedicinske literature i skupljanju izvlačenih biohemijskih interakcija u velike skale modela poput puteva signala proteina. Međutim, mašina sa serijama čitanja literatura na današnjoj skali (samo PubMed indeks preko 1 miliona papira godišnje) nije lako zbog koštanja i obrade iznad glave. U ovom poslu predstavljamo fokusirani pristup čitanja da vodimo mašinu čitanja biomedicinske literature prema onome što bi literaturu trebalo pročitati da odgovorimo na biomedicinsku pitanju što je najefikasnije moguće. Predstavljamo porodicu algoritma za fokusirano čitanje, uključujući intuitivnu, jaku osnovnu liniju i drugi pristup koji koristi okvir pojačanja učenja (RL) koji nauči kada istražiti (širi potragu) ili iskoristiti (suži ga). Pokazujemo da je pristup RL sposoban odgovoriti na više pitanja od početne linije, dok je učinkovitiji, to je èitanje manje dokumenta.', 'so': "Shaqooyinkii ugu dambeeyey ee bioinformatiyada waxay soo korodhay horumar aad u weyn ee machine-ka lagu akhriyey qoraalka baabiyada iyo ururka qalabka laga soo saaray biokemika waxay u noqdeen tusaale ahaan waddooyinka saxafka protein. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qoraalka qoraalka ee maanta (PubMed oo kaliya index ka badan 1 million warqadood sanadkii) waa fududaan sababtoo ah kharashka iyo baaraandegista. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab iskuul ah oo akhriska maskaxda lagu akhriyo shahaadada baabiyada, si loo jawaabo su'aalka dhakhtarka ee dhakhtarka sida suurtagal ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoyska algorithm oo lagu qorayo akhriska, kuwaas oo ku jira qoraal-koronta, xoog leh, iyo qaab labaad oo isticmaalaya qorshaha waxbarashada (RL) oo barashada marka la baaraanayo (ballaadhi karo) ama baahida (cidhiidhi). Waxaynu muujinnaa in habka RL uu awoodo in uu jawaabo su'aalo ka badan sameynta qoraalka asalka ah, iyadoo aan ahayn mid ka faa’iido badan, tusaale ahaan akhrista dukumentiyada yar.", 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda insatser inom bioinformatik har uppnått enorma framsteg i maskinläsningen av biomedicinsk litteratur, och sammansättningen av extraherade biokemiska interaktioner i storskaliga modeller såsom proteinsignalvägar. Dock är maskinläsning av litteratur i dagens skala (PubMed enbart indexerar över 1 miljon papper per år) omöjlig på grund av både kostnader och bearbetningskostnader. I detta arbete introducerar vi en fokuserad läsningsmetod för att vägleda maskinläsningen av biomedicinsk litteratur mot vilken litteratur som ska läsas för att besvara en biomedicinsk fråga så effektivt som möjligt. Vi introducerar en familj av algoritmer för fokuserad läsning, inklusive en intuitiv, stark baslinje, och ett andra tillvägagångssätt som använder ett förstärkt lärande (RL) ramverk som lär sig när man ska utforska (bredda sökningen) eller utnyttja (begränsa den). Vi visar att RL-metoden kan svara på fler frågor än baslinjen, samtidigt som den är effektivare, dvs. läsa färre dokument.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் உயிரியல் அறிவிப்புகளின் முயற்சி பெரிய முன்னேற்றத்தை இயந்திரம் படிக்கும் மற்றும் வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட உயிரியல் இடைவெளியேற்றங்கள் பெரிய அளவு  ஆனால், இன்று அளவில் வாக்கியத்தை பாத்ச் இயந்திரம் (புப்மேட் ஒரு வருடத்திற்கு மேல் 1 மில்லியன் தாள்களை மட்டும் படிக்க முடியாது) செலவு மற்று இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு முக்கியமான படிப்பு முறைமையை அறிவிக்கிறோம் இயந்திர மருத்துவ வ வாசிப்பு இயந்திரத்தை நேர்வழி காட்டுவதற்காகவும்,  நாம் முக்கியமாக படிப்பதற்கான ஒரு குடும்பத்தை அறிவிக்கிறோம், ஒரு உள்ளுணர்வு, வலிமையான அடிப்படைக்கோடு, மற்றும் ஒரு இரண்டாவது செயல்பாடு, ஆர்எல் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தும்  நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால், ஆர்.எல் அணுக்கம் அடிப்படைக்கோட்டிற்கு மேலும் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்க முடியும் என்பதை', 'si': 'ජීවිත තොරතුරු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුණා ජීවිත විද්\u200dයාත්මක කියවන පරීක්ෂණයේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරධානය ලැබුණා,  නමුත්, අදින් ප්\u200dරමාණයේ සාක්ෂිත්\u200dර කියවන්නේ මැෂින් පණිවිඩය (පුබ්මෙඩ් විතරයි අවුරුද්දේ මිලියන 1 කියලා පණිවිඩයෙන මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය සාධාරණයේ කියවන්න යන්ත්\u200dරය ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, ජීවිත වෛද්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ අපි ප්\u200dරධාන කියවන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් පවුලේ පවුලක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරධානයක්, සහ දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරධානයක් භාවිත කරනවා, උදව් සිකී අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා RL ප්\u200dරවේශනය විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයකට වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඉතින් විතරයි වඩා වි', 'ur': "بیولوغ اطلاعات میں اگلے کی کوشش بیولوغ طبیعت کی پڑھنے کے ماشین میں بہت بڑی پیشرفت پہنچ گئی ہے اور بیولوغ شیمیایی تعاملات کی جماعت بڑی اسکیل موڈل میں، جیسے پروٹین سیگنالیوں کے راستوں میں۔ However, batch machine reading of literature at today's scale (PubMed alone indexes over 1 million papers per year) is not easy due to both cost and processing overhead. ہم اس کام میں ایک منظور پڑھنے کی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو زیاترین پزشکی ادبیات کی مشین پڑھنے کی مدد کرتا ہے کہ اسے کس طرح پڑھنا چاہیے کہ ایک بیولی پزشکی سؤال کی جواب دیں جس قدر ممکن ہے۔ ہم ایک الگوریتم کے خاندان کو متمرکز پڑھنے کے لئے پیش کریں گے، ایک نظریہ، مضبوط بنسٹ لین اور دوسری طریقہ کے ساتھ جو ایک مضبوط علم (RL) فرم استعمال کرتا ہے جو کس وقت پڑھتا ہے (جہاد کرنا) یا اسے اضافہ کرنا چاہتا ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ RL تقریبا بنیادی لین سے زیادہ سوال جواب دینے کے قابل ہے، یعنی کم سند پڑھنے کے لئے۔", 'uz': "Yaqinda bio-informatika jarayonlarida biomediya litteratorini o'qish mashinadagi juda ajoyib muvaffaqiyatli bajardi, va chiqarilgan biokjemik interaksiyatlarini, masalan protein signalning yo'llari kabi katta modellarga modellarga o'zgartirdi. Lekin, bu kuni o'zgartirib o'qishni bir yilda faqat 1 million qoʻllar indeksi (PubMed faqat 1 million qoʻllar) o'qishni o'qishga oson emas. Bu narsalarning eng yuqori narsalar va jarayonligi sababi. Bu ishda, biz biomedical literatorini o'qish uchun fokus qilish usulini o'rganamiz va o'qish kerak bo'lgan o'quvchiga qanday o'qish kerak bo'lgan o'quvchiga javob berish kerak. Biz bir guruhni o'qish uchun foydalanuvchi o'qish uchun qo'llanmalarni anglatamiz. Bu birinchi qiziqarli, sterk asosiy, va ikkinchi usul bilan o'rganish qanday o'rganish (qidirish) yoki ishlab chiqarish (qidirish) bilan o'rganishni foydalanadi. Biz RL tili asosiy soʻrovlardan ko'proq javob berish imkoniyatini ko'rsatdik, balki ko'proq hujjatlarni o'qish imkoniyatini ko'proq.", 'vi': 'Nỗ lực sinh học gần đây đã đạt được tiến bộ to lớn trong việc đọc máy của văn học sinh học và kết hợp các tác sinh học chiết xuất vào các mô hình quy mô lớn như các đường chỉ dẫn protein. Không thể dễ dàng đọc các dòng chữ ở mức độ văn học ngày nay (chỉ đơn thuần là Phổ Địa phân tích hơn một triệu tờ báo mỗi năm) vì cả chi phí lẫn chi phí xử lý. Trong công trình này, chúng ta tiến hành một phương pháp đọc tập trung để hướng dẫn việc đọc sách sinh học về các loại văn học nên đọc để giải đáp một câu hỏi sinh học hiệu quả nhất có thể. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một gia đình các thuật to án để đọc tập trung, gồm có một cơ sở cá nhân tốt, và một phương pháp thứ hai sử dụng một cơ sở học gia tăng học tập (RL) để học cách khám phá (mở rộng tìm kiếm) hay khai thác (thu hẹp nó). Chúng tôi cho thấy trình bày RL có khả năng trả lời nhiều câu hỏi hơn so với thực địa, trong khi hiệu quả hơn, tức là đọc ít tài liệu hơn.', 'bg': 'Последните усилия в биоинформатиката постигнаха огромен напредък в машинното четене на биомедицинската литература и сглобяването на извлечените биохимични взаимодействия в широкомащабни модели като протеинови сигнални пътища. Въпреки това, партидно машинно четене на литература в днешния мащаб (само PubMed индексира над 1 милион статии годишно) е невъзможно поради разходите и общите разходи за обработка. В тази работа въвеждаме фокусиран подход за четене, който да насочва машинното четене на биомедицинската литература към това какво литература трябва да се чете, за да отговори на биомедицинска заявка възможно най-ефективно. Въвеждаме семейство алгоритми за фокусирано четене, включително интуитивна, силна базова линия и втори подход, който използва рамка за подсилване на обучението (РС), която научава кога да изследва (разширява търсенето) или експлоатира (стеснява го). Доказваме, че подходът на РС е способен да отговори на повече запитвания от базовата линия, като същевременно е по-ефективен, т.е. да чете по-малко документи.', 'nl': 'Recente inspanningen in bioinformatica hebben enorme vooruitgang geboekt in het machinelezen van biomedische literatuur, en de assemblage van de geëxtraheerde biochemische interacties in grootschalige modellen zoals eiwitsignaleringspaden. Batch machine reading van literatuur op de huidige schaal (PubMed alleen indexeert meer dan een miljoen kranten per jaar) is echter niet haalbaar vanwege zowel kosten als verwerkingskosten. In dit werk introduceren we een gerichte leesbenadering om het machinelezen van biomedische literatuur te begeleiden naar wat literatuur moet worden gelezen om een biomedische vraag zo efficiënt mogelijk te beantwoorden. We introduceren een familie van algoritmen voor gericht lezen, waaronder een intuïtieve, sterke baseline, en een tweede benadering die gebruikmaakt van een versterking learning (RL) framework dat leert wanneer te verkennen (verbreden van de zoekopdracht) of exploiteren (verfijnen). We tonen aan dat de RL-benadering in staat is om meer vragen te beantwoorden dan de baseline, terwijl ze efficiënter is, d.w.z. minder documenten te lezen.', 'da': 'Den seneste indsats inden for bioinformatik har opnået enorme fremskridt i maskinlæsning af biomedicinsk litteratur, og samling af de ekstraherede biokemiske interaktioner i store modeller såsom proteinsignalveje. Men batch maskinlæsning af litteratur i nutidens skala (PubMed alene indekserer over 1 million papirer om året) er umulig på grund af både omkostninger og omkostninger til behandling. I dette arbejde introducerer vi en fokuseret læsetilgang til at lede maskinlæsningen af biomedicinsk litteratur mod, hvilken litteratur der skal læses for at besvare en biomedicinsk forespørgsel så effektivt som muligt. Vi introducerer en familie af algoritmer til fokuseret læsning, herunder en intuitiv, stærk baseline, og en anden tilgang, der bruger en forstærkning læring (RL) ramme, der lærer, hvornår man skal udforske (udvide søgningen) eller udnytte (indsnævre den). Vi viser, at RL-metoden er i stand til at besvare flere forespørgsler end baseline, samtidig med at den er mere effektiv, dvs. at læse færre dokumenter.', 'hr': 'Nedavni napori u bioinformatiki postigli su ogroman napredak u čitanju strojeva biomedicinske literature i skupljanju izvlačenih biokemijskih interakcija u velike skale modela poput puteva signala proteina. Međutim, u današnjoj skali čitanja književnih strojeva (samo PubMed indeksira preko 1 milijuna papira godišnje) nije lako zbog troškova i obrade iznad glave. U ovom poslu predstavljamo fokusirani pristup čitanja kako bi vodili mašinu čitanja biomedicinske književnosti prema čemu se literatura treba pročitati kako bi odgovorili na biomedicinsku pitanje što je moguće učinkovito. Predstavljamo obitelj algoritma za fokusirano čitanje, uključujući intuitivnu, jaku početnu liniju i drugi pristup koji koristi okvir pojačanja učenja (RL) koji uči kada istražiti (širiti potragu) ili iskoristiti (suziti ga). Pokazujemo da je pristup RL sposoban odgovoriti na više pitanja od početne linije, dok je učinkovitiji, tj. čitanje manje dokumenta.', 'id': 'Perusahaan baru-baru ini dalam bioinformatika telah mencapai kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam pembacaan mesin literatur biomedis, dan pengumpulan interaksi biokimia ekstraksi ke model skala besar seperti jalan sinyal protein. Namun, pembacaan mesin batch dari literatur pada skala hari ini (hanya indeks PubMed lebih dari 1 juta kertas per tahun) tidak mungkin karena biaya dan proses overhead. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan pembacaan fokus untuk memimpin pembacaan mesin dari literatur biomedis ke arah apa literatur yang harus dibaca untuk menjawab pertanyaan biomedis secara efisien yang mungkin. Kami memperkenalkan sebuah keluarga algoritma untuk pembacaan fokus, termasuk dasar dasar yang intuitif, kuat, dan pendekatan kedua yang menggunakan rangkaian pembelajaran pemerintahan (RL) yang belajar kapan untuk mengeksplorasi (memperluas pencarian) atau mengeksplorasinya (sempit-sempit). Kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan RL mampu menjawab lebih banyak pertanyaan daripada dasar, sementara lebih efisien, yaitu membaca lebih sedikit dokumen.', 'de': 'Die jüngsten Bemühungen in der Bioinformatik haben enorme Fortschritte beim maschinellen Lesen biomedizinischer Literatur und der Zusammenführung der extrahierten biochemischen Wechselwirkungen in großformatige Modelle wie Proteinsignalwege erzielt. Allerdings ist das maschinelle Lesen von Literatur im heutigen Maßstab (allein PubMed indexiert über eine Million Papiere pro Jahr) aufgrund von Kosten und Bearbeitungskosten nicht realisierbar. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir einen fokussierten Leseansatz vor, um das maschinelle Lesen biomedizinischer Literatur dahingehend zu führen, was Literatur gelesen werden sollte, um eine biomedizinische Frage so effizient wie möglich zu beantworten. Wir stellen eine Familie von Algorithmen für fokussiertes Lesen vor, einschließlich einer intuitiven, starken Grundlinie und einem zweiten Ansatz, der ein Enhancement Learning (RL)-Framework verwendet, das lernt, wann zu erforschen (die Suche erweitern) oder auszunutzen (sie einzugrenzen). Wir zeigen, dass der RL-Ansatz in der Lage ist, mehr Anfragen als die Baseline zu beantworten und gleichzeitig effizienter zu sein, d.h. weniger Dokumente zu lesen.', 'fa': 'تلاش های اخیرا در بیولوژیک اطلاعات زیادی در خواندن ماشین ادبیات بیولوژیک، و جمع تعامل بیولوژیک شیمیایی خارج شده به مدلهای مقیاس بزرگ مانند راه\u200cهای سیگنال پروتئین رسیده است. با این حال، دستگاه\u200cهای گروه خواندن ادبیات در مقیاس امروز (تنها PubMed indexes بیش از ۱ میلیون کاغذ در سال) به دلیل هزینه\u200cها و پردازش بالا و بالا نیست. در این کار، ما یک روش خواندن تمرکز را معرفی می کنیم تا ماشین خواندن ادبیات بیولوپزشکی را هدایت کنیم به سوی آنچه ادبیات باید خوانده شود برای پاسخ دادن یک سوال بیولوپزشکی به اندازه موثرتی که ممکن است. ما خانواده\u200cی الگوریتم را برای خواندن تمرکز معرفی می\u200cکنیم، شامل یک خط بنیادی بی\u200cنظیر، قوی و یک روش دوم که از چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ما نشان می دهیم که دستور RL قادر به جواب سوال بیشتری از خط پایین است، در حالی که موثرت\u200cتر است، یعنی خواندن مدارک کمتر.', 'sw': "Juhudi za hivi karibuni katika taarifa za kibaiolojia zimefanisha maendeleo makubwa katika mashine ya kusoma fasihi ya kitabibu, na mkusanyiko wa mahusiano ya kibaiolojia katika mifano makubwa kama vile njia za saini za protein. However, batch machine reading of literature at today's scale (PubMed alone indexes over 1 million papers per year) is unfeasible due to both cost and processing overhead.  Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha mbinu ya kusoma yenye lengo la kuongoza mashine ya kusoma fasihi ya kitabibu kwa kiasi gani fasihi inapaswa kusoma kujibu swali la kitabibu kama inavyowezekana. Tunawasilisha familia ya algorithi kwa ajili ya kusoma, ikiwa ni pamoja na misingi yenye ufanisi, yenye nguvu, na mbinu ya pili ambayo hutumia mfumo wa kujifunza (RL) ambao unajifunza wakati wa kutafuta (kutafuta) au kutumia (uchunguzi mdogo). Tunaonyesha kwamba mbinu ya RL inaweza kujibu maswali zaidi ya msingi, wakati ambapo ni ufanisi zaidi, yaani kusoma nyaraka chache.", 'tr': 'Ýakynda bioinformatiklerde örän öňki çabalar biomedical edebiýatynyň okaýşynda, we protéin signaling ýoluşynyň ýaly uly düzüm modalara çykyp çykylýan biohemiýasy etkileşimleriniň toplantysyny ýetirdi. Ýöne şu gün mekdeplerde edebiýat okamak maşynlary (PubMed ýeke ýylda 1 milyon kagyz açýar) hem tölegi hem üstünde işleýän sebäbi aňsat däl. Bu işde biz biomedical edebiýatyny okamak üçin maşynyny näme üçin edebiýatynyň okamalydygyny mümkin ýaly şekilde üns bermek üçin fokus okamak taýýarlandyrýarys. Biz üns berilen okamak üçin algoritmalaryň maşgalasyny tanyşdyrýarys, intuitiv, güýçli bir tagam we ikinji ýagdaýy öwrenmek üçin (RL) çarpyşyny gaýd etmek üçin ullanýan (tarapy genişleýäni) we ulanmak üçin bir nusga görýäris. Biz RL ýaryşdygynyň basetden köp soraglary jogap bermegi başarýarys diýip görkeýäris. Bu ýagdaýda birnäçe etkinlik sebäpli hasaplanýar.', 'sq': 'Përpjekjet e fundit në bioinformatikë kanë arritur përparim të madh në leximin e makinave të letraturës biomedikale dhe mbledhjen e ndërveprimeve biokimike të nxjerra në modele në shkallë të madhe të tilla si rruga sinjalizuese proteinash. Megjithatë, leximi i letërsisë me batch makinë në shkallën e sotme (vetëm indekset PubMed mbi 1 milion letra në vit) është i pamundur për shkak të kostos dhe përpunimit të përgjithshëm. Në këtë punë, ne futim një qasje të përqëndruar leximi për të udhëzuar leximin e makinës të letraturës biomedikale drejt asaj që letratura duhet të lexohet për të përgjigjur një pyetje biomedikale sa më efektivisht të jetë e mundur. Ne prezantojmë një familje algoritmesh për lexim të përqëndruar, duke përfshirë një bazë intuitive, të fortë dhe një qasje të dytë që përdor një kuadër të mësimit të forcimit (RL) që mëson kur të eksplorojë (zgjerojë kërkimin) ose të shfrytëzojë (ngushtoje atë). Ne demonstrojmë se qasja RL është në gjendje të përgjigjet më shumë pyetje sesa baza, ndërsa është më e efektshme, pra, duke lexuar më pak dokumente.', 'af': "Onlangse versoekte in bioinformatike het groot vordering in die masjien lees van biomediese literasie, en die vergadering van die uitgevoerde biochemiese interaksies in groot-skaal modele soos protein-signaling pad. Maar die slag masjien lees van literaat op vandag se skaal (PubMed alleen indekseer oor 1 miljoen papier per jaar) is onmaklik vanweë beide koste en verwerking van oordekop. In hierdie werk introduseer ons 'n fokuseerde lees toegang om die masjien lees van biomediese literaat te lei na wat literaat moet lees word om 'n biomediese vraag te antwoord so effektief as moontlik. Ons introduseer 'n familie van algoritme vir fokuseerde lees, insluitend 'n intuitief, sterk basislien en 'n tweede toegang wat gebruik 'n versterking leer (RL) raamwerk wat leer wanneer om te ondersoek (verbreek die soektog) of te eksplodeer (vernietig dit). Ons wys dat die RL-toegang is in staat om meer vraagte te antwoord as die basislien, terwyl dit meer effektief is, i.e. minder dokumente te lees.", 'am': 'በቅርብ ጊዜ በbioinformatics ውስጥ ባለው ጥያቄ የbiomedical literature በማንበብ እና የመውጣት የbiochemical interaction ጉባኤ እንደ ፕሮጣይን ሲክለል መንገዶች በሚመስል ትልቅ ምሳሌዎች ውስጥ ደረሰ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የብቻክ መሣሪያዎች ዛሬ በሐሳብ ማነብ (ፉብMed ብቻውን በዓመቱ ላይ 1 ሚሊዮን የጋዜጠቶች ማውጣት) ከዋጋው እና በክፍል በመጠቀም አይቻልም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የbiomedical literature ማንኛውን መምረጃ እንደሚቻለው የbiomedical ፈቃድ ለመመልስ ምን ያህል ትምህርት እንደሚገባ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአልጎሪትምን ቤተሰብ እናስጠጋለን፤ እና አስተያየት፣ ጠንካራዊ መሳሪያ እና ሁለተኛ የኢንተርኔት (RL) ፍሬማር መፍጠር (መተላለፊያ) መፍጠር ወይም መፍጠር (ማሳየት) የሚችል ነው፡፡ አዲስ ሰነዱን አነስተኛ እናስባለን፡፡', 'hy': "Բիոինֆորմատիկայի վերջին ջանքերը հսկայական առաջընթաց են հասել կենսաբժշկական գրականության մեքենայի ընթերցման մեջ, ինչպես նաև ստացված բիոքիմիական փոխազդեցությունների հավաքածուն մեծ մոդելների մեջ, ինչպիսիք են սպիտակուցների ազդանշանակման ճա However, batch machine reading of literature at today's scale (PubMed alone indexes over 1 million papers per year) is unfeasible due to both cost and processing overhead.  Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք կենտրոնացված կարդալու մոտեցում կենսաբժշկական գրականության մեխանիզմի կարդալու ուղղությամբ այն մասին, թե ինչ գրականություն պետք է կարդալ կենսաբժշկական հարցերին պատասխանելու համար որքան հնարավոր է: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք կենտրոնացված կարդալու ալգորիթմների մի ընտանիք, ներառյալ ինտուիտիվ, ուժեղ հիմք և երկրորդ մոտեցում, որը օգտագործում է ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրության (RL) շրջանակը, որը սովորում է, երբ ուսումնասիրել (ընդլայնել որոնումը) կամ օգտագործել Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ RL մոտեցումը կարողանում է պատասխանել ավելի շատ հարցերին, քան հիմնական հարցերը, մինչդեռ ավելի արդյունավետ է, այսինքն՝ ավելի քիչ փաստաթղթեր կարդալ:", 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 생물정보학은 생물의학 문헌을 기계적으로 읽고 추출한 생물화학의 상호작용을 단백질 신호 통로로 조립하는 등 대규모 모델에 큰 진전을 거두었다.그러나 원가와 처리 비용 때문에 오늘날의 규모(PubMed 한 곳만 매년 100만 편의 논문을 색인하는 것)로 대량의 기계로 문헌을 읽는 것은 불가능하다.이 작업에서 우리는 생물의학 문헌에 초점을 맞추어 읽는 방법을 도입하여 가능한 한 생물의학 문제에 효율적으로 대답하도록 했다.우리는 직관적이고 강력한 기선, 그리고 두 번째 방법을 포함하여 집중 읽기 알고리즘을 소개했다. 이 방법은 강화 학습(RL) 프레임워크를 사용하여 언제 탐색(검색 범위 확대)하거나 이용(검색 범위 축소)하는지 배운다.우리는 RL 방법이 베이스라인보다 더 많은 조회에 대답할 수 있고 효율이 높으며 더 적은 문서를 읽을 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'az': 'Biyoinformatiklərin yeni çabaları, biomedical literature oxuması makinelərində böyük tədbirlik etdi, və protéin sinyal yollarına bənzər böyük ölçülü modellərə çıxarılmış biokimyasal etkileşimlerin toplantısı. Ancaq bu günün dəyişiklikdə (PubMed yalnız 1 milyon kağıt indiks edir) kitabı oxuyan maşın hər ikisinin maliyyəti və baş üstündə işləməsi üçün asanlaşdırılmaz. Bu işdə, bizim maşınızın biomedical edebiyatının oxunmasını mümkün olduğu qədər müvəffəqiyyətə cavab vermək üçün nə oxunması lazımdır. Biz odaqlanmış oxumaq üçün algoritm ailəsini, intuitiv, qüvvətli sətir və ikinci tərzi ilə təşkil etmək üçün öyrənirik. Bu, nə vaxt araştırmaq (genişlənmək) və ya onu çəkmək üçün öyrənir. Biz RL tərəfindən daha çox soruşma cavab verə biləcəyini göstəririk, həmçinin daha faydalı olduğu halda, daha az səhifələri oxuyaraq.', 'ca': "Els esforços recents en la bioinformàtica han aconseguit un progrés enorme en la lectura màquina de la literatura biomèdica, i l'assemblatge de les interaccions bioquímiques extraites en models a gran escala, com les víes de senyal de proteïnes. No obstant això, la lectura de literatura a escala d'avui en dia (índexs PubMed només més de 1 milion d'articles l'any) és impossible, tant per costos com per processament. In this work, we introduce a focused reading approach to guide the machine reading of biomedical literature towards what literature should be read to answer a biomedical query as efficiently as possible.  Introduïm una família d'algoritmes per llegir centrats, incloent una base intuïtiva i forta, i un segon enfocament que utilitza un marc d'aprenentatge de reforç (RL) que aprengui quan explorar (ampliar la cerca) o explotar (restringir-la). Demonstrem que l'enfocament RL és capaç de respondre a més preguntes que a la base, mentre és més eficient, és a dir, llegir menys documents.", 'cs': 'Nedávné úsilí v bioinformatice dosáhlo obrovského pokroku ve strojovém čtení biomedicínské literatury a sestavování extrahovaných biochemických interakcí do rozsáhlých modelů, jako jsou proteinové signální dráhy. Nicméně dávkové strojové čtení literatury v dnešním měřítku (samotné PubMed indexuje více než jeden milion papírů ročně) není možné z důvodu nákladů i režijních nákladů na zpracování. V této práci představujeme zaměřený čtenářský přístup, který vede strojové čtení biomedicínské literatury k tomu, jakou literaturu by měla být čtena, aby byla co nejefektivnější odpověď na biomedicínský dotaz. Představujeme rodinu algoritmů pro zaměřené čtení, včetně intuitivního, silného základního principu a druhého přístupu, který využívá rámec posílení učení (RL), který se učí, kdy prozkoumat (rozšířit vyhledávání) nebo využít (zúžit). Dokazujeme, že RL přístup je schopen zodpovědět více dotazů než základní základní linie, přičemž je efektivnější, tj. číst méně dokumentů.', 'bs': 'Nedavni napori u bioinformatiki postigli su ogroman napredak u čitanju strojeva biomedicinske literature i skupštinu izvlačenih biohemijskih interakcija u velike skale modela poput puteva signala proteina. Međutim, današnja skala (samo PubMed indeks preko 1 milijuna papira godišnje) nije lako čitati književnost u seriji zbog troškova i obrade iznad glave. U ovom poslu predstavljamo fokusirani pristup čitanja da vodimo mašinu čitanja biomedicinske literature prema onome što bi literaturu trebalo pročitati kako bi odgovorili na biomedicinsku pitanju što je moguće efikasno. Predstavljamo porodicu algoritma za fokusirano čitanje, uključujući intuitivnu, jaku osnovnu liniju i drugi pristup koji koristi okvir pojačanja učenja (RL) koji nauči kada istražiti (širiti potragu) ili iskoristiti (suziti ga). Pokazujemo da je pristup RL sposoban odgovoriti na više pitanja od početne linije, dok je učinkovitiji, tj. čitanje manje dokumenta.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset bioinformatiikan ponnistelut ovat saavuttaneet valtavaa edistystä biolääketieteellisen kirjallisuuden konelukemisessa ja uutettujen biokemiallisten vuorovaikutusten kokoamisessa laajamittaisiin malleihin, kuten proteiinin signalointireitteihin. Kirjallisuuden erälukeminen nykymittakaavassa (pelkästään PubMed indeksoi yli miljoona paperia vuodessa) on kuitenkin mahdotonta sekä kustannusten että käsittelykustannusten vuoksi. Tässä työssä esitellään kohdennettu lukutapa, joka ohjaa biolääketieteellisen kirjallisuuden konelukemista kohti sitä, mitä kirjallisuutta tulisi lukea, jotta biolääketieteelliseen kyselyyn voitaisiin vastata mahdollisimman tehokkaasti. Esittelemme joukon algoritmeja keskittyneeseen lukemiseen, mukaan lukien intuitiivinen, vahva lähtötilanne, ja toisen lähestymistavan, joka käyttää vahvistuksen oppimista (RL), joka oppii milloin tutkia (laajentaa hakua) tai hyödyntää (kaventaa sitä). Osoitamme, että RL-lähestymistapa pystyy vastaamaan enemmän kyselyihin kuin perusskenaario, mutta on tehokkaampi eli lukemaan vähemmän asiakirjoja.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক প্রচেষ্টা বায়োমেডিকেল সাহিত্যের পাঠের মেশিনে বিশাল অগ্রগতি অর্জন করেছে এবং বায়োমেডিকেল সাহিত্যের সম্মেলনে বায়োরামিকাল ইন্টারনে তবে আজকের সাহিত্যে ব্যাচ মেশিন পড়তে পারে (পুবেমেদের একা ১ মিলিয়ন কাগজের বেশী সংকেত) মাধ্যমে দাম এবং প্রক্রিয়া উভয়ের কারণে খুব সহজ। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা একটি ফোকাস্টার পড়তে পারি যাতে বায়োমেডিকেল সাহিত্যের পাঠের মেশিন পড়তে পারে যে সাহিত্যের প্রতি কোন সাহিত্যে পাঠ কর আমরা একটি আলগোরিদমের পরিবারের পরিচালিত করি মনোযোগ পাঠের জন্য, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে একটি বুদ্ধিমান, শক্তিশালী বেস্লাইন এবং একটি দ্বিতীয় পদ্ধতি যার মধ্যে একটি শক্তিশালী শিক্ষ আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আরএল প্রতিযোগিতা বেসার লাইনের চেয়ে বেশী প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিতে সক্ষম, যেমন কম নথি পড়ার ক্ষেত্রে।', 'et': 'Hiljutised jõupingutused bioinformaatikas on saavutanud tohutuid edusamme biomeditsiinilise kirjanduse masinlugemisel ja ekstraheeritud biokeemiliste koostoimete kokkupanemisel suuremahulisteks mudeliteks, nagu valgu signaaliteed. Kirjanduse masinlugemine tänapäeva ulatuses (ainuüksi PubMed indekseerib üle 1 miljoni paberi aastas) ei ole siiski teostatav nii kulude kui ka töötlemise üldkulude tõttu. Käesolevas töös tutvustame fokuseeritud lugemismeetodit, et suunata biomeditsiinilise kirjanduse masinlugemist selleni, millist kirjandust tuleks lugeda, et vastata biomeditsiinilisele päringule võimalikult tõhusalt. Tutvustame keskendunud lugemise algoritmide perekonda, sealhulgas intuitiivset, tugevat algoritmi ja teist lähenemisviisi, mis kasutab tugevdatud õppe raamistikku, mis õpib, millal uurida (laiendada otsingut) või kasutada (kitsendada seda). Näitame, et RL lähenemisviis suudab vastata rohkem päringutele kui algväärtus, olles samas tõhusam, st lugeda vähem dokumente.', 'jv': 'R.E.F. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang gunggo iki, kéné gunakake perusahaan neng dipoleh sing nggawe ngubah gambar kelas kang basa biyadir sing bisa basa sing kudu ngejaraké supoyo sak biyadir sing bisa ngejaraké sing apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem karo Algoritmi kanggo nggawe kang dipoleh, gambar tuang kelas, sisané awak dhéwé, lan nganggo sampek segondi sing gambar nggawe sistem sing isiné awak dhéwé (RL) sing lemarang kedoka nggawe nguasah (sumulai ndheres) apa. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngono ngono diangkat RL iso nggambar ujaran cegari sing luwih apik sing katêpakan liyane sing luwih basa, terus wis asèh, iso mlaku dokumen sing luwih apik.', 'ha': "Ga aikin da suka ƙara a cikin littafin da aka karanta littafin Bi'ada da aka sami aikin da suka samu zuwa misalin-sami mai girma, kamar hanyar ayuka na sajiyar ayuka. A lokacin da aka karanta littãfin a shekaran yanzu (Pubmed guda na kodi kodi miliyan takarda kodi a shekara) bai zama mai sauƙi ba kan musamman ko kuma ma'anar komai. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nuna wani matsayi da aka zura karatun karatun kafin da ake shirya karatun littãfin da aka biya zuwa a yanda ake karanta littafin da ya kamata a karɓi karɓi wani tambayi na'asar a bizara, da fassarar abin da ke iya kamfata. Tuna ƙara wani gidan algoritm wa karatun da aka yi zura fassarawa, kamar yana da wani littãfi masu ƙaranci, mai ƙarfi, da aikin na ƙaranci wanda ke amfani da firam na ƙaranci (RL) wanda yake iya sani a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da (suna nuna) ko kuma za'a yi amfani da (mai amfani da shi). Tuna nũna cewa shirin RL na iya iya iya karɓa wa tambayi masu ƙaranci daga bakin kwanan-salon, kuma yana da mafi masu amfani, misali, karatun takardun ƙaranci.", 'he': 'המאמצים האחרונים בביואינפורמטיקה השיגו התקדמות עצומה בקריאת המכונה של ספרות ביו-רפואית, והאסיפה של אינטראקציות ביו-כימיות המווצאות למודלים בקנה מידה גדולה כמו דרכים לאיתור חלבונים. בכל אופן, קריאת מכונות המחלקה של ספרות בסולם היום (אינדיקסים של PubMed לבד מעל מיליון ניירות בשנה) אינה אפשרית בשל עלות ובעיבוד גבוהה. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציגים גישה קריאה ממוקדת כדי להדריך את קריאת המכונה של ספרות ביורפואית לכיוון מה ספרות צריכה לקרוא כדי לענות על שאלה ביורפואית באופן יעיל ככל האפשר. אנחנו מציגים משפחה של אלגוריתמים לקריאה ממוקדת, כולל ביקור אינטואיטיבי, חזק, וגישה שנייה שמשתמשת במסגרת לימוד חיבורי (RL) שתלמד מתי לחקור (להרחיב את החיפוש) או לנצל (צמצם אותו). אנחנו מראים שהגישה RL מסוגלת לענות על שאלות נוספות מאשר הבסיס, בזמן שהיא יותר יעילה, כלומר קריאה פחות מסמכים.', 'sk': 'Nedavna prizadevanja na področju bioinformatike so dosegla ogromen napredek pri strojnem branju biomedicinske literature in sestavljanju ekstrahiranih biokemičnih interakcij v obsežne modele, kot so proteinske signalne poti. Vendar pa strojno branje serije literature v današnjem obsegu (samo PubMed indeksira več kot 1 milijon člankov na leto) zaradi stroškov in splošnih stroškov obdelave ni mogoče izvesti. V tem delu predstavljamo osredotočen bralni pristop, s katerim strojno branje biomedicinske literature usmerjamo k temu, katero literaturo je treba brati, da bi čim bolj učinkovito odgovorili na biomedicinsko poizvedbo. Predstavljamo družino algoritmov za osredotočeno branje, vključno z intuitivnim, močnim osnovnim izhodiščem in drugim pristopom, ki uporablja okvir za ojačanje učenja (RL), ki se nauči, kdaj raziskati (razširiti iskanje) ali ga izkoristiti (zožiti). Dokazujemo, da je pristop RL sposoben odgovoriti na več poizvedb kot osnovna vrednost, hkrati pa je učinkovitejši, tj. branje manj dokumentov.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་གསོག་སྔོན་གྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚོགས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དུ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཆེ་བ་ལེན་བྱུང་བ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དེ་རིང་གི་ཚད་ལྗངས་སུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་བཟོ་རྩིས་ཀྱི་མིག་ཆས་ཀློག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་གིས་མིའི་ཆོག་ཡིག་ཆའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གློག་འཕྲིན་ཡོད་པའི་ ང་ཚོས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀློག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་སྣ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་སྟོན་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་དང་། ཐད་ཚོར་གཞི་རྟེན་གཉིས་པ་ཞིག་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་གཏོང་ཐབ ང་ཚོས་RL ཡི་གཟུགས་སྐོར'}
{'en': 'DOC : Deep Open Classification of Text Documents', 'ar': 'DOC: التصنيف المفتوح العميق للمستندات النصية', 'es': 'DOC: Clasificación abierta de documentos de texto', 'fr': 'DOC\xa0: Classification ouverte approfondie des documents texte', 'pt': 'DOC: Classificação Aberta Profunda de Documentos de Texto', 'zh': 'DOC曰:文档深开其类', 'hi': 'DOC: पाठ दस्तावेज़ों का गहरा खुला वर्गीकरण', 'ja': '文書：文書文書の深いオープン分類', 'ru': 'DOC: Глубокая открытая классификация текстовых документов', 'ga': 'DOC: Aicmiú Doimhneacht Oscailte ar Dhoiciméid Téacs', 'ka': 'DOC: ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია ძალიან გახსნა', 'el': 'DOC: Βαθιά ανοικτή ταξινόμηση εγγράφων κειμένου', 'hu': 'DOC: A szövegdokumentumok mélynyílt osztályozása', 'it': 'DOC: Classificazione aperta approfondita dei documenti di testo', 'kk': 'DOC: Мәтін құжаттардың тереңнен ашу классификациясы', 'lt': 'DOC: giliai atviras teksto dokumentų klasifikavimas', 'mk': 'DOC: Длабока отворена класификација на текстови документи', 'ms': 'DOC: Klasifikasi Buka Dalam Dokumen Teks', 'ml': 'DOC: പദാവലിയുടെ രേഖകളുടെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d തുറക്കുക', 'mn': 'DOC: Текст баримтын гүнзгий нээлттэй классификация', 'mt': 'DOC: Klassifikazzjoni Miftuħa fil-fond tad-Dokumenti tat-Test', 'no': 'DOC: Deep Open Classification of Text Documents', 'ro': 'DOC: Clasificarea profundă deschisă a documentelor text', 'pl': 'DOC: Głęboka otwarta klasyfikacja dokumentów tekstowych', 'sr': 'DOC: Duboko otvorena klasifikacija tekstskih dokumenta', 'si': 'DOC: ලිපින් දස්තාවේ ගොඩක් විවෘත විවෘත කරන්න', 'so': 'DOC: Deep Open Classification of Text Documenties', 'sv': 'DOC: Djupöppen klassificering av textdokument', 'ta': 'DOC: உரை ஆவணங்களின் ஆழமாக திற வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'DOC: ٹیکسٹ دکھانوں کی عمیق کھولنے کی کلاس', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'DOC: Bản khai thác thâm độc tố Văn bản', 'bg': 'DOC: Дълбоко отворена класификация на текстови документи', 'nl': 'DOC: Deep Open Classification of Text Documents', 'hr': 'DOC: duboko otvorena klasifikacija tekstskih dokumenta', 'da': 'DOC: Dyb åben klassificering af tekstdokumenter', 'de': 'DOC: Deep Open Classification of Text Documents', 'fa': 'DOC: کلاس عمیق باز کردن سند متن', 'ko': 'DOC: 텍스트 문서의 깊이 있는 개방 분류', 'id': 'DOC: Klasifikasi Dokumen Teks terbuka dalam', 'sw': 'DOC: Kufungwa kwa Makala ya Maandishi', 'sq': 'DOC: Klasifikimi i thellë i hapur i dokumenteve teksti', 'tr': 'DOC:Metin Senedlerinin Derin Aç Sınıflaması', 'af': 'DOC: Deep Open Klassifikasie van Teks Dokumente', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'DOC: Տեքստի փաստաթղթերի խորը բաց դասակարգումը', 'bn': 'DOC: টেক্সট ডকুমেন্টের গভীরে খুলে দেওয়া হবে', 'az': 'DOC: Metin S칬kml톛rinin Derin톛 A칞', 'bs': 'DOC: Duboka otvorena klasifikacija tekstskih dokumenta', 'cs': 'DOC: Deep Open Klasifikace textových dokumentů', 'et': 'DOC: Tekstidokumentide avatud klassifitseerimine', 'ca': 'DOC: Classificació oberta profunda dels documentos de text', 'fi': 'DOC: Tekstiasiakirjojen syvä avoin luokitus', 'jv': 'DOC:', 'he': 'DOC: שיעור פתוח עמוק של מסמכים טקסטים', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'DOC: Globoko odprta klasifikacija besedilnih dokumentov', 'bo': 'DOC: ཡིག་གེ་ཡིག་གེ་སྡེར་བ་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ'}
{'en': 'Traditional supervised learning makes the closed-world assumption that the classes appeared in the test data must have appeared in training. This also applies to text learning or text classification. As learning is used increasingly in dynamic open environments where some new / test documents may not belong to any of the training classes, identifying these novel documents during classification presents an important problem. This problem is called open-world classification or open classification. This paper proposes a novel deep learning based approach. It outperforms existing state-of-the-art techniques dramatically.', 'ar': 'يجعل التعلم التقليدي الخاضع للإشراف افتراض العالم المغلق بأن الفصول التي ظهرت في بيانات الاختبار يجب أن تكون قد ظهرت في التدريب. ينطبق هذا أيضًا على تعلم النص أو تصنيف النص. نظرًا لاستخدام التعلم بشكل متزايد في البيئات المفتوحة الديناميكية حيث قد لا تنتمي بعض المستندات الجديدة / الاختبار إلى أي من فصول التدريب ، فإن تحديد هذه المستندات الجديدة أثناء التصنيف يمثل مشكلة مهمة. تسمى هذه المشكلة تصنيف العالم المفتوح أو التصنيف المفتوح. تقترح هذه الورقة نهج جديد قائم على التعلم العميق. إنه يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث التقنيات الموجودة.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje supervisado tradicional supone en el mundo cerrado que las clases que aparecen en los datos de la prueba deben haber aparecido en el entrenamiento. Esto también se aplica al aprendizaje de textos o a la clasificación de textos. Dado que el aprendizaje se utiliza cada vez más en entornos abiertos dinámicos donde algunos documentos nuevos o de prueba pueden no pertenecer a ninguna de las clases de capacitación, la identificación de estos documentos novedosos durante la clasificación presenta un problema importante. Este problema se denomina clasificación de mundo abierto o clasificación abierta. Este artículo propone un enfoque novedoso basado en el aprendizaje profundo. Supera drásticamente las técnicas de vanguardia existentes.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage supervisé traditionnel part de l'hypothèse du monde fermé que les classes apparaissant dans les données de test doivent être apparues lors de la formation. Cela s'applique également à l'apprentissage de texte ou à la classification de texte. L'apprentissage étant de plus en plus utilisé dans des environnements ouverts dynamiques où certains nouveaux documents ou documents de test peuvent n'appartenir à aucune des classes de formation, l'identification de ces nouveaux documents lors de la classification pose un problème important. Ce problème est appelé classification en monde ouvert ou classification ouverte. Cet article propose une nouvelle approche basée sur le deep learning. Il surpasse considérablement les techniques de pointe existantes.", 'pt': 'O aprendizado supervisionado tradicional faz a suposição de mundo fechado de que as classes que apareceram nos dados de teste devem ter aparecido no treinamento. Isso também se aplica ao aprendizado de texto ou classificação de texto. Como o aprendizado é usado cada vez mais em ambientes abertos dinâmicos, onde alguns documentos novos/de teste podem não pertencer a nenhuma das classes de treinamento, identificar esses novos documentos durante a classificação apresenta um problema importante. Esse problema é chamado de classificação de mundo aberto ou classificação aberta. Este artigo propõe uma nova abordagem baseada em aprendizado profundo. Ele supera drasticamente as técnicas de última geração existentes.', 'ja': '従来の監督学習は、テストデータに表示されたクラスがトレーニングに表示されている必要があるというクローズドワールドの仮定を立てています。これは、テキスト学習またはテキスト分類にも適用されます。学習は、一部の新しい/テストドキュメントがいずれのトレーニングクラスにも属していない可能性のある動的なオープン環境でますます使用されているため、分類中にこれらの新規ドキュメントを特定することは、重要な問題を提示します。この問題はオープンワールド分類またはオープン分類と呼ばれる。本論文では、新規のディープラーニングに基づくアプローチを提案している。既存の最先端技術を劇的に凌駕している。', 'hi': 'पारंपरिक पर्यवेक्षित सीखने से बंद-दुनिया की धारणा बनती है कि परीक्षण डेटा में दिखाई देने वाली कक्षाएं प्रशिक्षण में दिखाई दी होंगी। यह पाठ सीखने या पाठ वर्गीकरण पर भी लागू होता है। चूंकि सीखने का उपयोग गतिशील खुले वातावरण में तेजी से किया जाता है जहां कुछ नए / परीक्षण दस्तावेज किसी भी प्रशिक्षण वर्ग से संबंधित नहीं हो सकते हैं, वर्गीकरण के दौरान इन उपन्यास दस्तावेजों की पहचान करना एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या प्रस्तुत करता है। इस समस्या को open-world classification या open classification कहा जाता है। यह पेपर एक उपन्यास गहरी सीखने आधारित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करता है। यह मौजूदा अत्याधुनिक तकनीकों को नाटकीय रूप से बेहतर बनाता है।', 'zh': '古之监学为封世之伪设,测试数据之类必见于训练。 此亦文本学文本分类也。 随学转多,其新/试文档或非一培训课程,故于分类中识此新文档为要务。 此所谓开世界、开分类也。 本文立深度新型法。 其性大优于今最先进之术。', 'ru': 'Традиционное обучение под наблюдением делает предположение закрытого мира, что классы, появившиеся в тестовых данных, должны были появиться в обучении. Это также относится к изучению текста или классификации текста. Поскольку обучение все чаще используется в динамичных открытых средах, где некоторые новые/тестовые документы могут не принадлежать ни к одному из учебных классов, выявление этих новых документов во время классификации представляет собой важную проблему. Эта проблема называется классификацией открытого мира или открытой классификацией. В этой статье предлагается новый подход, основанный на глубоком обучении. Он значительно превосходит существующие современные методы.', 'ga': 'Déanann an fhoghlaim thraidisiúnta faoi mhaoirseacht an toimhde dhomhanda dúnta go gcaithfidh na ranganna a bhí le feiceáil sna sonraí tástála a bheith le feiceáil san oiliúint. Baineann sé seo freisin le foghlaim téacs nó le haicmiú téacs. De bharr go n-úsáidtear an fhoghlaim níos mó agus níos mó i dtimpeallachtaí oscailte dinimiciúla ina bhféadfadh sé nach mbaineann roinnt doiciméad nua/tástála le haon cheann de na ranganna oiliúna, is fadhb thábhachtach é na doiciméid núíosacha seo a shainaithint le linn an aicmithe. Tugtar aicmiú domhanda oscailte nó aicmiú oscailte ar an bhfadhb seo. Molann an páipéar seo cur chuige nua atá bunaithe ar dhomhainfhoghlaim. Feidhmíonn sé go mór na teicnící úrscothacha atá ann cheana féin.', 'ka': 'ტრადიციონალური მონაცემებული სწავლება დახურებული მსოფლიოს წარმოდგენა, რომ ტესტის მონაცემებში კლასები ჩვენებულია. ეს შემდეგ ტექსტის სწავლებისთვის ან ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის გამოყენება. როდესაც სწავლება უფრო მეტი გამოყენება დინამიკური გახსნილი საზოგადოებში, სადაც რამდენიმე ახალი/ტესტიური დოკუმენტები შეიძლება არსებობს სწავლების კლასში, როდესაც კლასიფიკაციის ეს პრობლემა გახსნა მსოფლიოს კლასიფიკაცია ან გახსნა კლასიფიკაცია. ეს წიგნი პრომენტის ძალიან ძალიან სწავლების მიღება. ეს ძალიან დირამატურად მსგავსი სტატიური ტექნექციების განმავლობა.', 'hu': 'A hagyományos felügyelt tanulás azt a feltételezést teszi lehetővé, hogy a tesztadatokban szereplő osztályok a képzés során megjelennek. Ez vonatkozik a szövegtanulásra vagy a szövegosztályozásra is. Mivel a tanulást egyre inkább dinamikus nyílt környezetben használják, ahol néhány új/tesztdokumentum nem tartozik egyetlen képzési osztályba sem, az új dokumentumok osztályozás során történő azonosítása fontos problémát jelent. Ezt a problémát nyílt világbeli osztályozásnak vagy nyílt osztályozásnak nevezik. Ez a tanulmány egy új, mélytanuláson alapuló megközelítést javasol. Drámaian felülmúlja a meglévő legkorszerűbb technikákat.', 'el': 'Η παραδοσιακή εποπτευόμενη μάθηση κάνει την υπόθεση του κλειστού κόσμου ότι τα μαθήματα που εμφανίστηκαν στα δεδομένα δοκιμής πρέπει να εμφανίστηκαν στην εκπαίδευση. Αυτό ισχύει επίσης για τη μάθηση κειμένου ή την ταξινόμηση κειμένου. Καθώς η μάθηση χρησιμοποιείται όλο και περισσότερο σε δυναμικά ανοιχτά περιβάλλοντα όπου ορισμένα νέα έγγραφα/έγγραφα δοκιμής ενδέχεται να μην ανήκουν σε κανένα από τα μαθήματα κατάρτισης, ο εντοπισμός αυτών των νέων εγγράφων κατά την ταξινόμηση παρουσιάζει ένα σημαντικό πρόβλημα. Αυτό το πρόβλημα ονομάζεται ταξινόμηση ανοικτού κόσμου ή ανοικτή ταξινόμηση. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια νέα προσέγγιση βασισμένη στη βαθιά μάθηση. Υπερτερούν δραματικά τις υπάρχουσες τεχνικές τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'kk': 'Тәдімгі бақылау үйренімі жабылған әлемде сыныптардың мәліметтерінде көрінген сыныптар оқыту үшін көрсетіледі. Мәтін оқыту не мәтін классификациясына қолданылады. Оқыту динамикалық ашылған ортада қолданылады. Кейбір жаңа/сынақ құжаттары оқыту класына қатынасыз болуы мүмкін, классификациялау кезінде бұл романдық құжаттарды анықтау үшін маңызды мәселе Бұл мәселе ашық әлемді классификация не ашық классификация деп аталады. Бұл қағаз романдық оқыту негізіндегі тәсілді ұсынады. Бұл барлық әртүрлі техникаларды драматикалық түрде жасайды.', 'lt': 'Tradicinis prižiūrimas mokymasis daro prielaidą, kad uždarytame pasaulyje bandymų duomenys turi būti įtraukti į mokymą. Tai taip pat taikoma teksto mokymuisi arba teksto klasifikacijai. Kadangi mokymasis vis dažniau naudojamas dinamiškose atvirose aplinkose, kur kai kurie nauji ir (arba) bandymų dokumentai gali nepriklausyti nė vienai mokymo klasei, tokių naujų dokumentų nustatymas klasifikavimo metu kelia didelę problem ą. Ši problema vadinama atviro pasaulio klasifikacija arba atvira klasifikacija. Šiame dokumente siūlomas naujas požiūris į gilų mokymąsi. Ji dramatiškai viršija esamus moderniausius metodus.', 'mk': 'Традиционалното набљудувано учење прави затворениот свет да претпостави дека класите се појавија во тестовите податоци мора да се појавија во обуката. This also applies to text learning or text classification.  Бидејќи учењето се користи сé повеќе во динамичките отворени средини каде што некои нови/тестирани документи можеби не припаѓаат на ниту една од класите за обука, идентификацијата на овие нови документи за време на класификацијата претставува важен проблем. Овој проблем се нарекува отворена класификација или отворена класификација. This paper proposes a novel deep learning based approach.  Истиот драматично ги надминува постојните најсовремени техники.', 'it': "L'apprendimento supervisionato tradizionale fa supporre che le classi apparse nei dati di prova debbano essere apparse durante la formazione. Ciò vale anche per l'apprendimento del testo o la classificazione del testo. Poiché l'apprendimento è sempre più utilizzato in ambienti aperti dinamici in cui alcuni nuovi documenti/test potrebbero non appartenere a nessuna delle classi di formazione, identificare questi nuovi documenti durante la classificazione presenta un problema importante. Questo problema è chiamato classificazione del mondo aperto o classificazione aperta. Questo articolo propone un nuovo approccio basato sul deep learning. Supera drasticamente le tecniche esistenti all'avanguardia.", 'ml': 'പരീക്ഷണ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെട്ടുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെട്ടിരിക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പഠിക്കുന്നതോ പദാവലി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനോ ഇതും പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പഠനം കൂടുതല്\u200d തുറന്ന പരിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, പുതിയ/പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ രേഖകള്\u200d പരിശീലന ക്ലാസില്\u200d ഒന്നിനും ചേരാത്തതില ഈ പ്രശ്നം തുറന്ന ലോകത്തിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d തുറന്ന ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d എന്ന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാണ്. ഇത് നിലവിലുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാകാര്യ സാങ്കേതികമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tradizzjonali sorveljat jagħmel is-suppożizzjoni tad-dinja magħluqa li l-klassijiet li dehru fid-dejta tat-test iridu jkunu dehru fit-taħriġ. Dan japplika wkoll għat-tagħlim tat-test jew għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test. Peress li t-tagħlim qed jintuża dejjem aktar f’ambjenti dinamiċi miftuħa fejn xi dokumenti ġodda/tat-testijiet jistgħu ma jappartjenux għal xi waħda mill-klassijiet ta’ taħriġ, l-identifikazzjoni ta’ dawn id-dokumenti ġodda matul il-klassifikazzjoni tippreżenta problema importanti. Din il-problema tissejjaħ klassifikazzjoni tad-dinja miftuħa jew klassifikazzjoni miftuħa. Dan id-dokument jipproponi approċċ ġdid ibbażat fuq tagħlim profond. It outperforms existing state-of-the-art techniques dramatically.', 'ms': 'Pelajaran tradisional mengawasi membuat anggapan dunia tertutup bahawa kelas muncul dalam data ujian mesti muncul dalam latihan. Ini juga berlaku untuk belajar teks atau klasifikasi teks. Sebab pembelajaran digunakan semakin dalam persekitaran terbuka dinamik dimana beberapa dokumen baru/ujian mungkin tidak termasuk dalam mana-mana kelas latihan, pengenalpasti dokumen baru semasa pengenalan mengandungi masalah penting. Masalah ini dipanggil klasifikasi dunia terbuka atau klasifikasi terbuka. Kertas ini mencadangkan pendekatan berbasis belajar dalam novel. Ia melebihi teknik yang ada secara dramatis.', 'ro': 'Învățarea tradițională supravegheată face presupunerea lumii închise că clasele apărute în datele testului trebuie să fi apărut în curs de formare. Acest lucru se aplică și în cazul învățării textelor sau clasificării textelor. Deoarece învățarea este utilizată din ce în ce mai mult în medii deschise dinamice, unde unele documente noi/de testare pot să nu aparțină niciunuia dintre clasele de formare, identificarea acestor documente noi în timpul clasificării reprezintă o problemă importantă. Această problemă se numește clasificare în lumea deschisă sau clasificare deschisă. Această lucrare propune o nouă abordare bazată pe învățare profundă. Ea depăşeşte dramatic tehnicile de ultimă oră existente.', 'no': 'Tradisjonalt oversikt læring gjer den lukka verden assumpsjonen at klassene viste i test data må ha vist i opplæring. Dette gjev også i bruk av tekstlæring eller tekstklassifikasjon. Når læring vert brukt aukande i dynamiske opne miljø der nokre nye/testdokument kan ikkje høyre til nokon av øvingsklassene, kan du identifisera desse noveldokumenta under klassifikasjon gjere eit viktig problem. Dette problemet er kalla opna verdsklassifikasjon eller opna klassifikasjon. Denne papiret foreslår eit nytt dyp læringsbasert tilnærming. Det utfører dei eksisterande teknikke i kunsten dramatisk.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjne nadzorowane uczenie się zakłada, że zajęcia pojawiły się w danych testowych musiały pojawić się w szkoleniu. Dotyczy to również uczenia się tekstów lub klasyfikacji tekstów. Ponieważ nauka jest coraz częściej stosowana w dynamicznych otwartych środowiskach, w których niektóre nowe dokumenty/dokumenty testowe mogą nie należeć do żadnej z zajęć szkoleniowych, identyfikacja tych nowych dokumentów podczas klasyfikacji stanowi istotny problem. Problem ten nazywa się klasyfikacją otwartym światem lub klasyfikacją otwartą. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nowe podejście oparte na głębokim uczeniu się. Zdramatycznie przewyższa istniejące najnowocześniejsze techniki.', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны удирдлагатай суралцах нь шалгалтын өгөгдлийн хувьд хичээл нь сургалт дээр харагдах ёстой гэж ойлгож байна. Энэ нь мөн текст суралцах эсвэл текст хэлбэрээр ашигладаг. Сургууль нь нээлттэй орчинд ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг учраас зарим шинэ/шалгалтын баримтууд сургалтын хичээл дээр байж болохгүй байх боломжтой. Дасгалын үед эдгээр шинэ баримтуудыг тодорхойлох нь чухал асуу Энэ асуудлыг нээлттэй ертөнцийн хуваарилалт эсвэл нээлттэй хуваарилт гэж нэрлэдэг. Энэ цаас шинэ гүн гүнзгий суралцах шинэ арга зам сануулдаг. Энэ нь сургуулийн урлагийн хувьд байгаа техникуудыг гайхалтай үр дүнтэй болгодог.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada caadiga ah waxaa laga dhigaa in fasalka la xiriiray ay ka muuqato waxbarashada. Taas waxaa sidoo kale ku habboon waxbarashada qoraalka ama fasalka qoraalka. Sida lagu isticmaalayo waxbarashada si korsocota ah oo lagu kordhiyo deegaanka furan, meesha dukumentiyada cusub/tijaabadu aysan ka mid ahayn fasalka waxbarashada, oo ay aqoonsadaan dukumentiyadan warqada ah xiliga fasalka, wuxuu keenaa dhibaato muhiim ah. Dhibaatadan waxaa loogu yeedhaa fasax-furan dunida ama fasax furan. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa qaab aad u weyn waxbarasho. Waxay si taqsiir ah u muuqataa xaaladda farshaxanta.', 'sv': 'Traditionellt övervakat lärande förutsätter att klasserna i testdata måste ha dykt upp under utbildningen. Detta gäller även för textinlärning eller textklassificering. Eftersom lärande i allt högre grad används i dynamiska öppna miljöer där vissa nya/testdokument kanske inte tillhör någon av utbildningsklasserna utgör identifieringen av dessa nya dokument under klassificeringen ett viktigt problem. Detta problem kallas öppen världsklassificering eller öppen klassificering. Denna uppsats föreslår ett nytt djupinlärningsbaserat tillvägagångssätt. Den överträffar de senaste teknikerna dramatiskt.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක දත්තේ පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වගේ ලෝ මේක වගේම පාළ සඳහා පාළ සඳහා පාළ සලකුණු විශේෂණය සඳහා භාවිත කරන්නේ. ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විශාල විශාල විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා, අලුත්/පරීක්ෂා විදිහට පරීක්ෂා විදිහට අයිතිය නොහැකි ව මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විවෘත ලෝක විවෘත විවෘත කිරීම නැත්තම් විවෘත විවෘත කිරීම කියලා. මේ පත්තුවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ අධාර්යය ඉගෙන ගන්න අධාර්\u200dයය. ඒක විශ්වාසයෙන් තියෙන්නේ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විදියට.', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட படிப்புகள் மூடிய உலக நினைக்கிறது சோதனை தரவில் வகுப்புகள் தெரியும் என்று பயிற்சியில்  இதும் உரை படிப்பதற்கு அல்லது உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. பயிற்சி வகுப்புகளுக்குச் சில புதிய/சோதனை ஆவணங்கள் எந்த வகுப்புகளுக்கும் சேராமல் இருக்கும் போது, வகுப்பினை போது இந்த புதிய ஆவணங்களை குற இந்த பிரச்சினை திறந்த உலக வகுப்பு அல்லது திறந்த வகுப்பு என்று அழைக்கப்படுகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் செயல்பாட்டை நினைவூட்டுகிறது. இது நடப்பு நிலையில் இருக்கும் கலை தொழில்நுட்பத்தை வெளியேற்றுகிறது.', 'ur': 'سنتی تحقیق کی تعلیم بند دنیا کی فرض کرتا ہے کہ کلاس آزمائش ڈیٹے میں ظاہر ہونے کی ضرورت ہے. یہ بھی لکھنے کی تعلیم یا لکھنے کی کلاسیفوں پر لکھا جاتا ہے۔ جبکہ تعلیم بہت زیادہ کھلی ہوئی محیط میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے جہاں کچھ نو/امتحان دکھانے کی تعلیم کلاس میں سے کسی کی ملتی نہیں ہو سکتی ہے، کلاسیفوں میں یہ نو دکھانے کی شناسایی کرتی ہے ایک اہم مشکل ہے. اس مسئلہ کو کھلی دنیا کی کلاسیفوں یا کھلی کلاسیفوں کا نام ہے۔ یہ کاغذ ایک نئی عمیق تعلیم کی تقریبا پیش کرتا ہے۔ یہ موجود موجود موجود آرتی تکنیک سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'sr': 'Tradicionalno nadzorno učenje čini pretpostavku zatvorenog svijeta da se klase pojavile u testovim podacima moraju pojaviti u obuci. To se takođe odnosi na učenje teksta ili klasifikaciju teksta. Pošto se učenje uvećava u dinamičnim otvorenim okolišama u kojima neki novi/testni dokumenti možda ne pripadaju ni jednoj od časova obuke, identifikacija ovih novih dokumenta tokom klasifikacije predstavlja važan problem. Ovaj problem se zove klasifikacija otvorenog svijeta ili otvorena klasifikacija. Ovaj papir predlaže novi pristup na osnovu dubokog učenja. To je dramatično iznosi postojeće tehnike stanja umjetnosti.', 'uz': "Name Bu yerda matn o'rganish yoki matn turisiga qoʻllaniladi. @ info This problem is called open-world classification or open classification.  Bu qogʻoz yoʻl o'rganish asosiy o'rganishga qaror qiladi. Bu mavjud kunlar holatini o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Truyền thống giám sát học khiến cho giả thuyết thế giới kín rằng các lớp học xuất hiện trong dữ liệu thử nghiệm phải xuất hiện trong huấn luyện. Điều này cũng áp dụng cho việc học văn bản hay phân loại văn bản. Do học được sử dụng ngày càng nhiều trong môi trường mở động nơi có thể có những văn bản mới/thử nghiệm không thuộc về bất kỳ lớp học nào, việc xác định những tài liệu mới này trong giai đoạn phân loại là một vấn đề quan trọng. Vấn đề này được gọi là "khai mạc" hoặc "khai trương" Bài báo này đề xuất một phương pháp học sâu mới. Nó vượt trội các kỹ thuật hiện đại đột ngột.', 'bg': 'Традиционното контролирано обучение прави предположението от затворен свят, че класовете, които са се появили в данните от теста, трябва да са се появили по време на обучение. Това важи и за изучаване на текст или класификация на текста. Тъй като обучението се използва все повече в динамични отворени среди, където някои нови/тестови документи може да не принадлежат към нито един от класовете за обучение, идентифицирането на тези нови документи по време на класификацията представлява важен проблем. Този проблем се нарича отворена класификация или отворена класификация. Тази статия предлага нов подход, основан на дълбоко обучение. Той превъзхожда драматично съществуващите най-съвременни техники.', 'da': 'Traditionel overvåget læring gør den lukkede verden antagelse, at de klasser, der optræder i testdataene, må være dukket op under træningen. Dette gælder også for tekstlæring eller tekstklassificering. Da læring i stigende grad anvendes i dynamiske åbne miljøer, hvor nogle nye/testdokumenter muligvis ikke tilhører nogen af uddannelsesklasserne, udgør det et vigtigt problem at identificere disse nye dokumenter under klassificeringen. Dette problem kaldes åben verdensklassifikation eller åben klassifikation. Denne artikel foreslår en ny tilgang baseret på dyb læring. Det overgår eksisterende state-of-the-art teknikker dramatisk.', 'nl': 'Traditioneel begeleid leren veronderstelt dat de lessen die in de testgegevens voorkomen, tijdens de training moeten zijn verschenen. Dit geldt ook voor tekstleren of tekstclassificatie. Aangezien leren steeds vaker wordt gebruikt in dynamische open omgevingen waar sommige nieuwe/testdocumenten mogelijk niet tot een van de trainingsklassen behoren, vormt het identificeren van deze nieuwe documenten tijdens de classificatie een belangrijk probleem. Dit probleem wordt open-world classificatie of open classificatie genoemd. Dit document stelt een nieuwe, op deep learning gebaseerde aanpak voor. Het overtreft de bestaande state-of-the-art technieken drastisch.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalno nadzorno učenje čini pretpostavku zatvorenog svijeta da se klase pojavile u testovim podacima moraju pojaviti u obuci. To se također odnosi na učenje teksta ili klasifikaciju teksta. Pošto se učenje koristi sve više u dinamičkim otvorenim okolišama u kojima neki novi/testni dokumenti možda ne pripadaju ni jednoj od časova obuke, identifikacija tih novih dokumenta tijekom klasifikacije predstavlja važan problem. Ovaj problem se zove klasifikacija otvorenog svijeta ili otvorena klasifikacija. Ovaj papir predlaže novi pristup na temelju dubokog učenja. To dramatično iznosi postojeće state-of-the-art tehnike.', 'de': 'Traditionelles überwachtes Lernen geht von der geschlossenen Welt aus, dass die Klassen in den Testdaten im Training erschienen sein müssen. Dies gilt auch für Textlernen oder Textklassifizierung. Da das Lernen zunehmend in dynamischen offenen Umgebungen eingesetzt wird, in denen einige neue/Testdokumente möglicherweise keiner der Schulungskurse angehören, stellt die Identifizierung dieser neuen Dokumente während der Klassifizierung ein wichtiges Problem dar. Dieses Problem wird Open-World-Klassifizierung oder Open-World-Klassifizierung genannt. Dieses Papier schlägt einen neuartigen Deep Learning basierten Ansatz vor. Es übertrifft bestehende State-of-the-Art-Techniken dramatisch.', 'id': 'Belajar tradisional yang diawasi membuat asumsi dunia tertutup bahwa kelas muncul dalam data ujian harus muncul dalam latihan. Ini juga berlaku untuk belajar teks atau klasifikasi teks. Karena belajar semakin digunakan dalam lingkungan terbuka dinamik dimana beberapa dokumen baru/tes mungkin tidak termasuk dalam salah satu kelas pelatihan, mengidentifikasi dokumen baru ini selama klasifikasi memberikan masalah penting. Masalah ini disebut klasifikasi dunia terbuka atau klasifikasi terbuka. This paper proposes a novel deep learning based approach.  Ini melampaui batas teknik terbaik yang ada secara dramatis.', 'fa': 'آموزش تحت نظر سنتی باعث می شود فرض جهانی بسته شده که کلاس ها در داده های آزمایش باید در آموزش ظاهر شده باشند. این همچنین برای یادگیری متن یا تنظیم متن استفاده می\u200cکند. در حالی که یادگیری بیشتر در محیط\u200cهای دینامیک باز استفاده می\u200cشود که بعضی از مدارک\u200cهای جدید/آزمایش ممکن است به هیچ کلاس آموزش متعلق به آن نیست، و شناسایی این مدارک\u200cهای رمانی در زمان تفریق مشکل مهم را نشان می\u200cدهد. این مشکل به عنوان مختصات جهان باز یا مختصات باز نامیده می شود. این کاغذ یک روش عمیق یادگیری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. این تکنیک\u200cهای دولتی هنر موجود به شدت زیادی انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kusomwa kwa utamaduni unafanya dhana kuwa darasa zilionekana katika takwimu za jaribio lazima zilionekana katika mafunzo. Hii pia inatumia kujifunza maandishi au kutangaza maandishi. Wakati kujifunza inatumiwa kwa kuongezeka katika mazingira ya wazi ambapo baadhi ya nyaraka mpya/jaribio zinaweza kuwa hazina miongoni mwa darasa la mafunzo, kutambua nyaraka hizi za riwaya wakati wa kutangaza inaleta tatizo muhimu. Tatizo hili linaitwa usambazaji wa ulimwengu wa wazi au utafsiri wa wazi. Makala hii inapendekeza njia ya kujifunza yenye msingi wa riwaya. Inaonyesha mbinu zilizopo kwenye hali ya sanaa kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'tr': 'Däpli gözetli öwrenmek üçin ýapyk dünýäde synplar bilim maglumatynda görünmeli diýip pikir edýär. Bu hem metin öwrenmek ýa metin klasifikasyna mümkin edýär. Öwrenme köp dinamik açyk çevrede ulanylýar. Käbir täze/test senediň okuwçylaryň hiçbiri üçin degilmegi mümkin däldir, klasifikasyon wagynda bu täze senediň kimligini belirleýär. Bu mesele açyk-dünýä klasifikasyýa ýada açyk klasifikasyýa adlanýar. Bu kagyz gaty derin öwrenmek taýýarlamasyny teklip edýär. Öň bar ýagdaý tekniklerden dramatik ýagdaýda täsir edýär.', 'af': "Tradisjoneel ondersoekte leer maak die toegesluit wêreld aanvaar dat die klasse in die toets data verskyn moet in onderwerp verskyn het. Hierdie applies ook na teks leer of teks klasifikasie. Omdat leer vergroot gebruik word in dinamiese oop omgewing waar sommige nuwe/toets dokumente dalk nie aan enige van die oefening klasse behoort nie, die identifiseer van hierdie novele dokumente tydens klasifikasie stel 'n belangrike probleem. Hierdie probleem word oop- wêreld klasifikasie of oop klasifikasie genoem. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n roman diep leer gebaseerde toegang. Dit dramatiese bestaande staat-van-kunstenike teknike uitvoer.", 'ko': '전통적인 감독 학습 가설 테스트 데이터에 나타난 유형은 반드시 훈련에 나타나야 한다.이것도 텍스트 학습이나 텍스트 분류에 적용된다.학습이 동적 개방 환경에 점점 더 많이 사용되면서 그 중 일부 새로운 문서/테스트 문서는 어떤 교육 과정에 속하지 않을 수도 있다. 분류 과정에서 이런 새로운 문서를 식별하는 것은 중요한 문제이다.이 문제는 개방 세계 분류 또는 개방 분류라고 불린다.본고는 심도 있는 학습에 기초한 새로운 방법을 제시했다.그것의 성능은 기존의 최첨단 기술보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'am': 'የባሕላዊ ትምህርት የተጠበቀው ተማሪ የደረቀ ዓለማት ተቋርጦ በፈተናው ዳታዎች ውስጥ ያሉት ክፍሎች በሙሉ ሊገልጹ ይገባዋል፡፡ ይህም ደግሞ ጽሑፍ ማምረሚያ ወይም የጽሑፍ መግለጫ ይጠቅማል። ትምህርት በተከፈቱ አካባቢ ውስጥ ሲጨምሩ አንዳንዶች አዲስ/ፈተና ሰነጃዎች ከትምህርት ክፍተት አንዱ ባልሆነው፣ በመግለጫው ጊዜ እነዚህን የአሁኑን ሰነዶች የሚያሳውቅ ጉዳይ ያስችላል፡፡ ይህ መከራ የዓለም ክፍት መግለጫ ወይም የተከፈተ መግለጫ ይጠራል፡፡ ይህም ገጽ የጠለቀ ትምህርት መሠረት ጥልቅ ትምህርት ያሳልፋል፡፡ የአሁኑን የ-የ-አርእስት ሀብት ግንኙነት በተለየ ውጤት ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Dövrütlü təşkil edilən öyrənmək, sınama verilənlərdə dəstələrin göründüyünü gözləyir. Bu da mətn öyrənməsi və mətn klasifikasiyasına uyğun olur. Bazı yeni/sınama belələri təhsil dəstələrindən heç kəsə ait olmadığı təhsil dəstələrindən daha çox dinamik açıq çevrelərdə istifadə ediləndə, bu yeni belələri klasifikasyon sırasında təhsil etmək mümkün bir problem ə göstərir. Bu problemin açıq dünya klasifikasyonu və açıq klasifikasyonu adlandırılır. Bu kağıt yeni dərin öyrənmə tərzini təklif edir. Bu, mövcud mövcuddur sanat tekniklərini dramatik olaraq dəyişdirir.', 'bn': 'ঐতিহ্যবাহী পর্যবেক্ষণ শিক্ষার ফলে বন্ধ বিশ্ব ধারণা করে যে পরীক্ষার তথ্যে শ্রেণীগুলো প্রশিক্ষণে দেখা যাচ্ছে। এছাড়াও টেক্সট শিক্ষা অথবা টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশনের প্রয়োজন। যেহেতু শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে ক্লাসের কোন নতুন/পরীক্ষা নথি যেখানে প্রশিক্ষণ ক্লাসের অন্তর্ভুক্ত হতে পারে, ক্লাসাফিকেশনের সময় এই নথি পরিচিত এই সমস্যাটিকে খোলা বিশ্বের শ্রেণীকরণ অথবা খোলা শ্রেণীকরণ বলা হয়। এই পত্রিকাটি গভীর শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করে। এটা বিদ্যমান রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের প্রযুক্তি ন্যায়েমিকভাবে প্রদর্শন করে।', 'hy': 'ավանդական վերահսկվող ուսումնասիրությունը ստիպում է փակ աշխարհի ենթադրությունը, որ փորձարկման տվյալներում ներկայացված դասերը պետք է ներկայացված լինեին փորձարկում: Սա նաև տեղի է ունենում տեքստի սովորելու կամ տեքստի դասակարգման համար: Քանի որ սովորելը ավելի ու ավելի օգտագործվում է դինամիկ բաց միջավայրում, որտեղ որոշ նոր և թեստերի փաստաթղթեր հնարավոր է, որ չեն պատկանում որևէ ուսուցման դասին, դասակարգության ընթացքում այս նոր փաստաթղթերը բացահայտելը կարևոր Այս խնդիրը կոչվում է բաց աշխարհի դասակարգում կամ բաց դասակարգում: Այս թղթին առաջարկում է խորը ուսումնասիրության հիմնված նոր մոտեցում: Այն դրամական չափով գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող լավագույն տեխնոլոգիաները:', 'bs': 'Tradicionalno nadzorno učenje čini pretpostavku zatvorenog svijeta da se klase pojavile u testovim podacima moraju pojaviti u obuci. To se također odnosi na učenje teksta ili klasifikaciju teksta. Pošto se učenje koristi sve više u dinamičkim otvorenim okolišama u kojima neki novi/testni dokumenti možda ne pripadaju ni jednoj od časova obuke, identifikacija ovih novih dokumenta tokom klasifikacije predstavlja važan problem. Ovaj problem se zove klasifikacija otvorenog svijeta ili otvorena klasifikacija. Ovaj papir predlaže novi pristup na temelju dubokog učenja. To dramatično iznosi postojeće tehnike stanja umjetnosti.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge supervisionat tradicional fa que la suposició del món tancat que les classes apareixen en les dades de prova haurien d'haver aparegut en l'entrenament. Això també s'aplica a l'aprenentatge de text o a la classificació de text. As learning is used increasingly in dynamic open environments where some new/test documents may not belong to any of the training classes, identifying these novel documents during classification presents an important problem.  Aquest problema es diu classificació de món obert o classificació oberta. Aquest paper proposa un nou enfocament basat en l'aprenentatge profund. Supera dramàticament les tècniques actuals existents.", 'cs': 'Tradiční dohlížené učení vychází z předpokladu uzavřeného světa, že třídy, které se objevily v testovacích datech, se musely objevit v tréninku. To platí i pro učení textů nebo klasifikaci textů. Vzhledem k tomu, že učení se stále více využívá v dynamickém otevřeném prostředí, kde některé nové/testovací dokumenty nemusí patřit do žádné ze školicích kurzů, představuje důležitý problém identifikace těchto nových dokumentů během klasifikace. Tento problém se nazývá klasifikace otevřeného světa nebo otevřená klasifikace. Tento článek navrhuje nový přístup založený na hlubokém učení. Výrazně překonává stávající nejmodernější techniky.', 'et': 'Traditsiooniline järelevalveõpe eeldab suletud maailma, et testiandmetes ilmunud klassid peavad olema koolitusel. See kehtib ka teksti õppe või klassifitseerimise kohta. Kuna õppimist kasutatakse üha enam dünaamilistes avatud keskkondades, kus mõned uued/katsedokumendid ei pruugi kuuluda ühegi koolitusklassi, on nende uute dokumentide kindlakstegemine klassifitseerimise ajal oluline probleem. Seda probleemi nimetatakse avatud maailma klassifikatsiooniks või avatud klassifikatsiooniks. Käesolevas dokumendis pakutakse välja uudne sügavõppel põhinev lähenemisviis. See ületab oluliselt olemasolevaid tipptasemel tehnikaid.', 'fi': 'Perinteinen ohjattu oppiminen tekee suljetun maailman olettamuksen, että testiaineistossa esiintyvien luokkien on täytynyt esiintyä koulutuksessa. Tämä koskee myös tekstin oppimista tai tekstin luokittelua. Koska oppimista käytetään yhä enemmän dynaamisissa avoimissa ympäristöissä, joissa jotkin uudet/testiasiakirjat eivät välttämättä kuulu mihinkään koulutusluokkiin, näiden uusien asiakirjojen tunnistaminen luokittelun aikana on merkittävä ongelma. Tätä ongelmaa kutsutaan avoimen maailman luokitukseksi tai avoimeksi luokitukseksi. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotetaan uutta syvään oppimiseen perustuvaa lähestymistapaa. Se ylittää nykyiset huipputekniset tekniikat dramaattisesti.', 'sq': 'Mësimi tradicional i mbikqyrur bën supozimin e botës së mbyllur se klasat që u shfaqën në të dhënat e testit duhet të jenë shfaqur në trainimin. Kjo aplikohet gjithashtu për mësimin e tekstit apo klasifikimin e tekstit. Ndërsa mësimi përdoret gjithnjë e më tepër në mjedise dinamike të hapura ku disa dokumente të reja/testimi mund të mos i përkasin asnjë nga klasat e trajnimit, identifikimi i këtyre dokumenteve të reja gjatë klasifikimit paraqet një problem të rëndësishëm. This problem is called open-world classification or open classification.  Ky artikull propozon një metodë të re të bazuar në mësim të thellë. Ajo paraqet në mënyrë dramatike teknikat ekzistuese të moderne.', 'jv': 'Tradisondisiyen sampeyan kelas kuwi nggawe barang-sangan kuwi tau ngerasahan kelas nang data ujian sisan depan sing bisa mlebu politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness sé kesalahan iki dipun wae kelas open-world, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak iki supoyo nganggo kuwi nganggo barang nggambar barang. Genjer-Genjer esuk-esuk didasakno ngerasakno iki dadi.', 'ha': 'Ana zaɓe danganin da aka tsare danganta a cikin jarraba, sai ya buƙata tsarin da aka tsare. Wannan yana da amfani da tsarin matsayi, idan an karanta matsayin, ko kuma idan an daidaita matsayin. Idan an yi amfani da kwamfyuta a cikin muhalli na buɗaɗe, da wasu takardar kwanan/jarrabãwa ba su iya zama daga wani kurs na aikin kõrari ba, idan an gane takardun kwanan cikin shirin, yana gaya wata matsala mai muhimu. Kana kiran wannan matsayi tsarin-duniya buɗe ko kuma an buɗe fassarar. Wannan karatun yana ƙarfafa wani matsayin da aka sanar da bakin karatun. Tana samar da halin-halin-kunyar-kunyar', 'he': 'הלימודים המסורתיים ששומרים על השגחה גורמים להניחה בעולם סגור שהשיעורים הופיעו במידע המבחן כנראה הופיעו באימונים. זה מתאים גם ללמוד טקסטים או להקליזת טקסטים. כיוון שלמדה משתמשת יותר ויותר בסביבות פתוחות דינמיות שבו מסמכים חדשים/מבחנים אולי לא שייכים לאף אחד משיעורי האימונים, זיהוי המסמכים החדשים האלה במהלך ההקלטה מציג בעיה חשובה. הבעיה הזאת נקראת מסווג עולם פתוח או מסווג פתוח. העיתון הזה מציע גישה מובססת על לימוד עמוק רומן. It outperforms existing state-of-the-art techniques dramatically.', 'sk': 'Tradicionalno nadzorovano učenje predpostavlja, da so se razredi, ki so se pojavili v testnih podatkih, pojavili med usposabljanjem. To velja tudi za učenje besedila ali klasifikacijo besedila. Ker se učenje vedno bolj uporablja v dinamičnih odprtih okoljih, kjer nekateri novi/testni dokumenti morda ne spadajo v noben od razredov usposabljanja, je identifikacija teh novih dokumentov med klasifikacijo pomemben problem. Ta problem se imenuje klasifikacija odprtega sveta ali odprta klasifikacija. Ta prispevek predlaga nov pristop na podlagi globokega učenja. Dramatično presega obstoječe najsodobnejše tehnike.', 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམས་མཐོང་བའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདིས་མཐོང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ནང་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གསལ འདི་ནི་ཡིག་གེ་ཤེས་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའམ་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་བེད་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། སློབ་གྲྭར་གྱིས་རང་སྟངས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་ཡོད་པ་ལས་/བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཡིག དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཞིག་རེད། ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སློབ་ནུས་པའི་ལྟ་བ་ཞིག་དང་སྤྲོད་འདུག དེས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟབས་བདེ་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Charmanteau : Character Embedding Models For Portmanteau Creation', 'ar': 'Charmanteau: نماذج تضمين الأحرف لإنشاء Portmanteau', 'es': 'Charmanteau: modelos de incrustación de personajes para la creación de Portmanteau', 'pt': 'Charmanteau: modelos de incorporação de personagens para criação de portmanteau', 'fr': "Charmanteau\xa0: Modèles d'intégration de caractères pour la création de mot-valise", 'ja': 'Charmanteau ： Portmanteauの創造のためのキャラクター埋め込みモデル', 'zh': 'Charmanteau:波特曼托角嵌', 'hi': 'Charmanteau: चरित्र एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के लिए Portmanteau निर्माण', 'ru': 'Charmanteau: модели встраивания персонажей для создания портманто', 'ga': 'Charmanteau: Múnlaí Leabú Carachtair Do Chruthú Portmanteau', 'hu': 'Charmanteau: karakter beágyazó modellek Portmanteau teremtéséhez', 'ka': 'Charmanteau: პორტემანეო შექმნისთვის სიმბოლოების შექმნის მოდელები', 'el': 'Χαρακτήρας που ενσωματώνει τα μοντέλα για τη δημιουργία', 'it': 'Charmanteau: Modelli di Embedding Personaggi per la Creazione di Portmanteau', 'kk': 'Шармантео: Портмантео құру үшін таңбаларды ендіру үлгілері', 'ms': 'Charmanteau: Model Penjelmaan Aksara Untuk Penciptaan Portmanteau', 'lt': 'Charmanteau: Portmanteau kūrimo simbolių įterpimo modeliai', 'ml': 'ചാര്\u200dമാണ്ടീയു: അക്ഷരര്\u200d എംബെഡിങ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Charmanteau: Character Embedding Models For Portmanteau Creation', 'mn': 'Чармантоо: Портмантоо бүтээлийн тайзны нэгтгэл загвар', 'no': 'Charmanteau: Teikn- innbyggingsmodeller for Portmanteau- oppretting', 'ro': 'Charmanteau: Modele de încorporare a caracterelor pentru crearea Portmanteau', 'pl': 'Charmanteau: Modele osadzania postaci do tworzenia Portmanteau', 'mk': 'Шарманто: Модели за внесување знаци за создавање на Портманто', 'so': 'Qoraalka xarafka ku soo deganaanshaha', 'si': 'චාර්මැන්ටෝ: පෝට්මැන්ටෝ සිර්මාණය සඳහා අක්ෂර සම්බන්ධ නිර්මාණය', 'sr': 'Šarmantovo: Modeli integracije karaktera za stvaranje Portmanteau', 'sv': 'Charmanteau: Tecken Inbäddning Modeller För Portmanteau Skapande', 'ta': 'எழுத்து ஏற்றுமதி மாதிரிகள்', 'ur': 'چارمانتئو: پورتمنٹئو خلقت کے لئے علائم انڈینگ موڈل', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Description: Các mô- đun chứa ký tự cho tạo phông chữ', 'bg': 'Шарманто: Модели за вграждане на символи за създаване на портманто', 'hr': 'Charmanteau: Modeli integracije znakova za stvaranje Portmanteau', 'da': 'Charmanteau: Character Embedding modeller til Portmanteau skabelse', 'nl': 'Charmanteau: Karakter Embedded Modellen voor Portmanteau Creatie', 'de': 'Charmanteau: Character Embedded Models für Portmanteau Creation', 'id': 'Charmanteau: Caracter Embedding Models For Portmanteau Creation', 'fa': 'کارمنتوئو: مدل\u200cهای جمع کردن caracters for Portmanteau Creation', 'sw': 'Charmanteau: Mradi wa Hifadhi ya Kialama kwa Uumbuzi wa Kireno', 'tr': 'Karakter', 'ko': 'Charmanteau:Portmanteau에서 만든 캐릭터 삽입 모형', 'af': 'Charmanteau: Karakter Inbêer Modelle vir Portmanteau Skep', 'sq': 'Charmanteau: Modele të përfshirjes së karaktereve për krijimin e Portmanteau', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Charmanteau: Portmanteau yaradılış üçün Karakter İçeri Modelləri', 'bn': 'Charmanteau: Character Embedding Models For Portmanteau Creation', 'ca': "Charmanteau: Models d'incorporació de caràcters per a la creació de Portmanteau", 'bs': 'Charmanteau: Modeli integracije karaktera za stvaranje Portmanteau', 'cs': 'Charmanteau: Modely vložení postav pro tvorbu Portmanteau', 'et': 'Charmanteau: Portmanteau loomise märkide põimimise mudelid', 'fi': 'Charmanteau: Character Embedding Models For Portmanteau Creation', 'hy': 'Շարմանտեո. Պորմանտեո ստեղծման համար ներգրավված նշաններ', 'jv': 'architecture', 'he': 'Charmanteau: דוגמנים מכניסים אופיינים לייצור פורטמנטו', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Charmanteau: Modeli za vgradnjo znakov za ustvarjanje Portmanteau', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གཟུགས་: ཡིག་འབྲུ་ནང་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་(Portmanteau Creation)'}
{'en': 'Portmanteaus are a word formation phenomenon where two words combine into a new word. We propose character-level neural sequence-to-sequence (S2S) methods for the task of portmanteau generation that are end-to-end-trainable, language independent, and do not explicitly use additional phonetic information. We propose a noisy-channel-style model, which allows for the incorporation of unsupervised word lists, improving performance over a standard source-to-target model. This model is made possible by an exhaustive candidate generation strategy specifically enabled by the features of the portmanteau task. Experiments find our approach superior to a state-of-the-art FST-based baseline with respect to ground truth accuracy and human evaluation.', 'ar': 'Portmanteaus هي ظاهرة تكوين الكلمات حيث يتم دمج كلمتين في كلمة جديدة. نقترح طرق التسلسل العصبي إلى التسلسل (S2S) على مستوى الحرف لمهمة إنشاء بورتمانتو التي يمكن تدريبها من طرف إلى طرف ، ومستقلة عن اللغة ، ولا تستخدم بشكل صريح معلومات صوتية إضافية. نقترح نموذجًا بنمط القناة الصاخبة ، والذي يسمح بإدراج قوائم الكلمات غير الخاضعة للإشراف ، وتحسين الأداء على نموذج قياسي من المصدر إلى الهدف. أصبح هذا النموذج ممكنًا من خلال إستراتيجية شاملة لتوليد المرشحين تم تمكينها على وجه التحديد من خلال ميزات مهمة portmanteau. تجد التجارب أن نهجنا متفوق على خط الأساس الحديث القائم على FST فيما يتعلق بدقة الحقيقة الأساسية والتقييم البشري.', 'fr': "Les Portmanteaux sont un phénomène de formation de mots où deux mots se combinent pour former un nouveau mot. Nous proposons des méthodes de séquence à séquence neuronale (S2S) au niveau du caractère pour la génération de mot-valise qui peuvent être entraînées de bout en bout, indépendantes de la langue et qui n'utilisent pas explicitement d'informations phonétiques supplémentaires. Nous proposons un modèle de type canal bruyant, qui permet d'intégrer des listes de mots non supervisées, améliorant ainsi les performances par rapport à un modèle source vers cible standard. Ce modèle est rendu possible grâce à une stratégie exhaustive de génération de candidats spécifiquement activée par les fonctionnalités de la tâche portmanteau. Les expériences révèlent que notre approche est supérieure à une base de référence FST de pointe en ce qui concerne la précision de la vérité au sol et l'évaluation humaine.", 'pt': 'Portmanteaus são um fenômeno de formação de palavras onde duas palavras se combinam em uma nova palavra. Propomos métodos de seqüência a seqüência neural em nível de caractere (S2S) para a tarefa de geração de portmanteau que são treináveis de ponta a ponta, independentes de linguagem e não usam explicitamente informações fonéticas adicionais. Propomos um modelo estilo canal barulhento, que permite a incorporação de listas de palavras não supervisionadas, melhorando o desempenho em relação a um modelo padrão de origem para destino. Este modelo é possibilitado por uma estratégia exaustiva de geração de candidatos especificamente habilitada pelos recursos da tarefa portmanteau. Os experimentos consideram nossa abordagem superior a uma linha de base baseada em FST de última geração em relação à precisão da verdade do terreno e avaliação humana.', 'es': 'Los acrónimos son un fenómeno de formación de palabras en el que dos palabras se combinan en una nueva palabra. Proponemos métodos de secuencia a secuencia neuronal (S2S) a nivel de caracteres para la tarea de generación de portmanteau que son entrenables de extremo a extremo, independientes del lenguaje y no utilizan explícitamente información fonética adicional. Proponemos un modelo de canal ruidoso, que permite la incorporación de listas de palabras sin supervisión, mejorando el rendimiento en comparación con un modelo estándar de fuente a destino. Este modelo es posible gracias a una estrategia exhaustiva de generación de candidatos habilitada específicamente por las características de la tarea portmanteau. Los experimentos encuentran que nuestro enfoque es superior a una línea base de vanguardia basada en FST con respecto a la precisión de la verdad sobre el terreno y la evaluación', 'ja': 'Portmanteausは、2つの単語が結合して新しい単語になる単語形成現象です。エンドツーエンド訓練可能で、言語に依存せず、追加の音声情報を明示的に使用しない、ポートマントー生成のタスクのための文字レベルのニューラルシーケンスツーシーケンス（ S 2 S ）方法を提案します。ノイズの多いチャンネルスタイルのモデルを提案します。これにより、監督されていない単語リストを組み込むことができ、標準的なソースからターゲットへのモデルよりもパフォーマンスが向上します。このモデルは、portmanteauタスクの機能によって具体的に可能にされる網羅的な候補生成戦略によって可能になります。実験では、我々のアプローチは、最先端のFSTベースのベースラインよりも、地上の真実の精度と人間の評価に関して優れていることがわかります。', 'ru': 'Portmanteaus - это словообразовательный феномен, когда два слова объединяются в новое слово. Мы предлагаем методы нейронной последовательности на уровне символов (S2S) для задачи генерации portmanteau, которые являются сквозными, языково независимыми и явно не используют дополнительную фонетическую информацию. Мы предлагаем модель в стиле шумного канала, которая позволяет включать неконтролируемые списки слов, улучшая производительность по сравнению со стандартной моделью «источник-цель». Эта модель стала возможной благодаря исчерпывающей стратегии генерации кандидатов, специально разработанной с учетом особенностей задачи portmanteau. Эксперименты обнаружили, что наш подход превосходит современную базовую линию на основе FST в отношении точности истины и оценки человека.', 'hi': 'Portmanteaus एक शब्द गठन घटना है जहां दो शब्द एक नए शब्द में गठबंधन करते हैं। हम पोर्टमेंटेउ पीढ़ी के कार्य के लिए चरित्र-स्तरीय तंत्रिका अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (S2S) विधियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो अंत-से-अंत-प्रशिक्षित, भाषा स्वतंत्र हैं, और स्पष्ट रूप से अतिरिक्त ध्वन्यात्मक जानकारी का उपयोग नहीं करते हैं। हम एक शोर-चैनल-शैली मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो असुरक्षित शब्द सूचियों को शामिल करने की अनुमति देता है, एक मानक स्रोत-से-लक्ष्य मॉडल पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। इस मॉडल को एक संपूर्ण उम्मीदवार पीढ़ी की रणनीति द्वारा विशेष रूप से portmanteau कार्य की विशेषताओं द्वारा सक्षम द्वारा संभव बनाया गया है। प्रयोगों को जमीनी सच्चाई सटीकता और मानव मूल्यांकन के संबंध में हमारे दृष्टिकोण को अत्याधुनिक एफएसटी-आधारित आधार रेखा से बेहतर लगता है।', 'zh': 'Portmanteaus一单词成象,其二单词组合成一新单词。 吾为portmanteau生事建字符神经序(S2S)法,有端到端可训练性,无关言语,不显式用他语音信息。 吾为噪声道式,许并无监单词列表,以重其源到。 此由 portmanteau 功专成之详也。 实验见地实准确性与人评估,吾法优于先进之基FST基线。', 'ga': 'Is feiniméan foirmithe focal é Portmanteaus ina nasctar dhá fhocal isteach i bhfocal nua. Molaimid modhanna néaracha seicheamh go seicheamh (S2S) ag leibhéal carachtar le haghaidh giniúna portmanteau atá in oiliúint ó cheann ceann go ceann, neamhspleách ar theanga, agus nach n-úsáideann faisnéis bhreise foghraíochta go sainráite. Molaimid múnla torainn-chainéil, a cheadaíonn ionchorprú liostaí focal gan mhaoirseacht, chun feidhmíocht a fheabhsú thar mhúnla caighdeánach foinse-go-sprioc. Tá an tsamhail seo indéanta mar gheall ar straitéis uileghabhálach giniúna iarrthóra arna chumasú go sonrach ag gnéithe an taisc portmanteau. Is fearr le turgnaimh ár gcur chuige ná bunlíne den scoth atá bunaithe ar FST maidir le cruinneas na fírinne talún agus meastóireacht dhaonna.', 'ka': 'პორტმანტეო არის სიტყვების ფორმაციის ფანომენი, სადაც ორი სიტყვები ახალი სიტყვებში შეიყვანია. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ პორტმანტეოს წარმოდგენისთვის, რომლებიც ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან მუშაობელი, ენერგიის განსაზღვრება და არ გამ ჩვენ გვეძლევა სიტყვის სიტყვის მოდელს, რომელიც შესაძლებელია არსებული სიტყვის სიტყვის შეყვარება, სტანდარტული მხოლოდ მისაღების მოდელზე მუშაობა. ამ მოდელის შესაძლებელია, რომელიც პორტმანტეო დავალების განსაკუთრებულად შეუძლებელია გასრულებული კანდენტის განვითარების სტრატიგია. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთ ჲრკპთგარ ნაქთჲრ ოპთლთფ ოჲ-დჲლწმა ნა ჟყჟრარა ნა FST ბაჱთნჟკთ ჟპვე ოპაგთლნჲჟრ ნა თჟრთნარა თ ფჲგვფვჟკარა ჲценკა.', 'hu': 'A Portmanteaus egy szóképző jelenség, ahol két szó egyesül egy új szóvá. Karakterszintű neurális szekvencia-szekvencia (S2S) módszereket javasolunk a portmanteau generáció feladatához, amelyek végtől végig képezhetőek, nyelvfüggetlenek, és nem használnak kifejezetten kiegészítő fonetikai információkat. Egy zajos csatorna-stílusú modellt javasolunk, amely lehetővé teszi a felügyelet nélküli szólisták beépítését, javítva a teljesítményt egy standard forrás-cél modellel szemben. Ezt a modellt a portmanteau feladat jellemzői teszik lehetővé. A kísérletek szerint a megközelítésünk jobb, mint egy korszerű FST alapú alapképzési alapközpont, tekintettel az alap igazság pontosságára és az emberi értékelésre.', 'el': 'Οι Portmanteaus είναι ένα φαινόμενο σχηματισμού λέξεων όπου δύο λέξεις συνδυάζονται σε μια νέα λέξη. Προτείνουμε μεθόδους νευρωνικής αλληλουχίας σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων για το έργο της δημιουργίας που είναι εκπαιδευόμενες από το τέλος προς το τέλος, γλωσσικές ανεξάρτητες και δεν χρησιμοποιούν ρητά πρόσθετες φωνητικές πληροφορίες. Προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο τύπου θορυβωδών καναλιών, το οποίο επιτρέπει την ενσωμάτωση λίστας λέξεων χωρίς επίβλεψη, βελτιώνοντας την απόδοση έναντι ενός τυποποιημένου μοντέλου πηγής-στόχου. Το μοντέλο αυτό καθίσταται δυνατό με μια εξαντλητική στρατηγική δημιουργίας υποψηφίων που επιτρέπει ειδικά τα χαρακτηριστικά του έργου portmanteau. Τα πειράματα βρίσκουν την προσέγγισή μας ανώτερη από μια υπερσύγχρονη βάση όσον αφορά την ακρίβεια της αλήθειας και την ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση.', 'it': "I portmanteaus sono un fenomeno di formazione di parole in cui due parole si combinano in una nuova parola. Proponiamo metodi neuronali sequenza-sequenza-sequenza (S2S) a livello di carattere per il compito della generazione di portmanteau che sono end-to-end-trainable, indipendenti dal linguaggio e non utilizzano esplicitamente informazioni fonetiche aggiuntive. Proponiamo un modello in stile canale rumoroso, che consente l'incorporazione di elenchi di parole non supervisionati, migliorando le prestazioni rispetto a un modello standard source-to-target. Questo modello è reso possibile da un'esaustiva strategia di generazione dei candidati specificamente abilitata dalle caratteristiche del compito portmanteau. Gli esperimenti ritengono che il nostro approccio sia superiore a una base base FST all'avanguardia per quanto riguarda l'accuratezza della verità di base e la valutazione umana.", 'kk': 'Портмантео - сөздерді пішімдеу панелі. Екі сөз жаңа сөзде біріктіріледі. Біз таңбалар деңгейіндегі невралдық реттеу (S2S) әдістерін таңдаймыз. Соңғы- соңғы тәжірибелі, тілді тәуелсіз, және қосымша фонетикалық мәліметтерді қолдануға болмайды. Біз дыбыс арналының стилі үлгісін ұсынамыз. Бұл сөз тізімдерін қосуға мүмкіндік береді. Стандартты көзгерту үлгісін жақсарту үлгісін қосуға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл модель портманту тапсырмасының қасиеттері арқылы белгіленген кандидаттарды құру стратегиясы бойынша мүмкін болады. Тәжірибелер біздің көздерімізді FST күйінде негізделген негізгі сызыққа қарай шындық дұрыстығын және адамдардың оқиғасына қатынау үшін бастайды.', 'lt': 'Portmanteaus yra žodžių formavimo reiškinys, kuriame du žodžiai sujungiami į naują žodį. Siūlome simbolio lygio nervų sekos sekos iš eilės (S2S) metodus portmanteau gamybos uždaviniams, kurie yra nuo vienos iki kitos traukiami, nepriklauso nuo kalbos ir aiškiai nenaudoja papildomos foninės informacijos. We propose a noisy-channel-style model, which allows for the incorporation of unsupervised word lists, improving performance over a standard source-to-target model.  Šis modelis įmanomas taikant išsamią kandidatų generacijos strategiją, kuri yra konkrečiai įmanoma atsižvelgiant į portmanteau uždavinio ypatumus. Eksperimentai mano, kad mūsų požiūris yra geresnis už naujausią FST pagrįstą bazinę vertę, atsižvelgiant į esminės tiesos tikslumą ir žmogaus vertinimą.', 'mk': 'Портмантеј се феномен на формирање зборови каде два збора се комбинираат во нов збор. Ние предложуваме методи на нервна секвенца до секвенца (S2S) на ниво на карактер за задачата на генерацијата на портмантео кои се од крај до крај возливи, независни од јазик и не користат експлицитно дополнителни фонетски информации. Ние предложуваме модел во стил на звучен канал, кој овозможува вклучување на ненадгледувани листи на зборови, подобрување на резултатите над стандардниот модел од извор до цел. Овој модел е овозможен со искусна стратегија за генерација на кандидати, специфично овозможена од карактеристиките на задачата на портмантео. Експериментите го сметаат нашиот пристап за супериорен на најсовремената основа базирана на ФСТ во однос на точноста на основната вистина и човечката проценка.', 'ml': 'പോര്\u200dട്ട്മാണ്ടെയിസ് ഒരു വാക്ക് രൂപപ്രകൃതിയുടെ സ്ഥിതിയാണ്. രണ്ടു വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുതിയ വാക്കിലേക് പോര്\u200dട്ട്മാണ്ടിയുടെ തലമുറയുടെ ജോലിയ്ക്കുള്ള അക്ഷരരൂപത്തിന്റെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസിനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തെ പരിശീല സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ പട്ടികയില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ശബ്ദം-ചാനല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് സാധ്യതയില്ലാത ക്ഷീണിതമായ ഒരു പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിയുടെ തലമുറയില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഈ മോഡല്\u200d സാധ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രാജ്യത്തെക്കാള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് എഫ്എസ്റ്റിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തേക്കാള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട', 'ms': 'Portmanteaus adalah fenomena pembentukan perkataan di mana dua perkataan bergabung ke dalam perkataan baru. Kami cadangkan kaedah urutan saraf aras-aksara-ke-urutan (S2S) untuk tugas generasi portmanteau yang boleh dilatih-akhir-ke-akhir, bahasa bebas, dan tidak secara eksplicit menggunakan maklumat fonetik tambahan. Kami cadangkan model gaya-saluran-bunyi, yang membenarkan penyambungan senarai perkataan yang tidak diawasi, meningkatkan prestasi melalui model sumber-ke-sasaran piawai. Model ini dibuat mungkin oleh strategi generasi calon yang melelahkan yang dibenarkan secara khusus oleh ciri-ciri tugas portmanteau. Eksperimen menemukan pendekatan kita lebih tinggi dari dasar FST yang terbaik dengan kaitan dengan ketepatan kebenaran tanah dan penilaian manusia.', 'mt': 'Portmanteaus huwa fenomenu ta’ formazzjoni ta’ kliem fejn żewġ kliem jingħaqdu f’kelma ġdida. Aħna nipproponu metodi ta’ sekwenza newrali minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (S2S) fil-livell tal-karattru għall-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-portmanteau li jistgħu jitħarrġu minn tarf għal tarf, indipendenti mil-lingwa, u ma jużawx b’mod espliċitu informazzjoni fonetika addizzjonali. Aħna nipproponu mudell bi stil ta’ kanal storbjuż, li jippermetti l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ listi ta’ kliem mhux sorveljati, li jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni fuq mudell standard minn sors għal mira. Dan il-mudell huwa possibbli permezz ta’ strateġija eżawrjenti ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ kandidati speċifikament permessa mill-karatteristiċi tal-kompitu portmanteau. L-esperimenti jsibu l-approċċ tagħna superjuri għal linja bażi l-aktar avvanzata bbażata fuq l-FST fir-rigward tal-preċiżjoni tal-verità tal-art u l-evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem.', 'no': 'Portmanteaus er eit ordformateringsfenomen der to ord kombinerer inn i eit ny ord. Vi foreslår metodar for tegn-nivå neuralsekvens-til-sekvens (S2S) for oppgåva til portmanteaugenerering som er ende-til-end-trainable, språk uavhengig, og ikkje bruk ekstra fonetisk informasjon. Vi foreslår ein støykanal-modell, som tillater å inkludere ulike ord-lister, forbetra utviklinga over ein standard kjelde-til-mål-modell. Dette modellet er lagt mulig av ein utrygt kandidat-genereringsstrategi spesifikke slått på av funksjonane for portmanteauoppgåva. Eksperiment finn tilnærminga vårt over ein FST-basert baseline med hensyn til grunnleggjande sannhetsnøyaktighet og menneskelige evaluering.', 'mn': 'Портмантус бол үг үүсгэх явдал юм. Хоёр үг шинэ үг болгон нэгтгэдэг. Бид харин түвшинд мэдрэлийн дарааллаар дарааллаар (S2S) дарааллаар хөгжүүлэх боломжтой, хэл хамааралтай болон нэмэлт фонетик мэдээллийг ашиглахгүй портmanteau үеийн үйлдлийн даалгаврыг санал болгож байна. Бид чимээгүй арьсны хэлбэрийн загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хэлбэргүй үг жагсаалтыг нэгтгэх боломжтой, стандарт эх үүсвэрээс зорилготой загвар дээр ажиллагааг сайжруулах боломжтой. Энэ загвар нь portmanteau ажлын чадваруудын тухай тодорхойлогдсон бүтээлчдийн төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөө боломжтой болгодог. Үнэндээ үнэн зөв байдал болон хүн төрөлхтний оюун шалгалтыг харьцуулахын тулд бидний арга зам нь FST-ийн байгууллагын суурь шугам шугам байдалд илүү дээр байдаг.', 'sr': 'Portmanteaus je fenomen formacije reèi u kojem se dve reèi kombiniraju u novu reè. Predlažemo metode neurološke sekvence do sekvence (S2S) na nivou karaktera za zadatak generacije portmanteaua koji su kraj do kraja obučeni, jezik nezavisni i ne koriste pojasno dodatne fonetičke informacije. Predlažemo model zvukovih kanala, koji omogućava uključivanje neizbežnih listi riječi, poboljšavanje izvora na standardni model do cilja. Ovaj model je omogućio iscrpljujuća strategija generacije kandidata posebno omogućena karakteristikama zadatka portmantoa. Eksperimenti pronađu naš pristup nadreðen na osnovnoj liniji na državi umjetnosti FST-a u odnosu na taènost istine i ljudsku procjenu.', 'si': 'පෝට්මන්ටෝස් වචනයක් තමයි වචනයක් සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ. වචනයක් දෙකක් අලුත් වචනයක් එකතු වෙනවා. අපි පොර්ට්මැන්ටෝ පරීක්ෂණයේ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, භාෂාව ස්වතුත්වයි, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ශබ්ද-චැනල් ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නැති වචන ලැයිස්තුවක් සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න, ස්ථා මේ මොඩල් එක පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ පොර්ට්මැන්ටෝ වැඩක් විශේෂයෙන් සක්රිය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ පරීක්ෂණාවල් අපේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් හොයාගන්නවා අපේ ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ FST ස්ථානයේ අධ්\u200dයතික ප්\u200dරධානයක', 'ro': 'Portmanteaus este un fenomen de formare a cuvintelor în care două cuvinte se combină într-un cuvânt nou. Propunem metode neuronale secvență-la-secvență (S2S) la nivel de caracter pentru sarcina generației portmanteau care sunt end-to-end-trainable, independente de limbă și care nu utilizează în mod explicit informații fonetice suplimentare. Propunem un model în stil canal zgomotos, care permite încorporarea listelor de cuvinte nesupravegheate, îmbunătățind performanța față de un model standard sursă-țintă. Acest model este făcut posibil printr-o strategie exhaustivă de generare a candidaților, activată în mod specific de caracteristicile sarcinii portmanteau. Experimentele consideră abordarea noastră superioară unei baze FST de ultimă oră în ceea ce privește acuratețea adevărului de bază și evaluarea umană.', 'so': 'Orodoonka waa hadal la sameeyo, kaas oo laba eray lagu isku daro hadal cusub. We propose character-level neural sequence-to-sequence (S2S) methods for the task of portmanteau generation that are end-to-end-trainable, language independent, and do not explicitly use additional phonetic information.  Waxaan soo jeedaynaa model qaylo ah-kanal-style, kaas oo u ogolaa in lagu soo galo liiska erayada aan la ilaalinayn, si uu horumariyo tababar ka kordhiso qaab ka mid ah noocyada caadiga ah-ilaa-goal. Tusaaladan waxaa suurtagal ah qoraal dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo uu ku shaqeeyo qaab gaar ah shaqooyinka bandhigyada. Imtixaanka waxay ka heli karaan hab ka sareeya xaaladda farshaxanta ee FST-ka ku saleysan saxda runta iyo qiimeynta dadka.', 'pl': 'Portmanteaus to zjawisko formowania słów, w którym dwa słowa łączą się w nowe słowo. Do zadania generowania portmanteau proponujemy metody neuronowej sekwencji na poziomie znaków (S2S), które są kompleksowo trenowalne, niezależne od języka i nie wykorzystują wyraźnie dodatkowych informacji fonetycznych. Proponujemy model noisy-channel, który pozwala na włączenie nienadzorowanych list słów, poprawiając wydajność w stosunku do standardowego modelu źródła-docelowego. Model ten jest możliwy dzięki wyczerpującej strategii generowania kandydatów, umożliwionej specjalnie przez cechy zadania portmanteau. Eksperymenty uznają, że nasze podejście jest lepsze niż najnowocześniejsze bazowe oparte na FST pod względem dokładności prawdy podstawowej i oceny ludzkiej.', 'ta': 'புதிய வார்த்தை உருவாக்கும் பொருள் உள்ளது. இரண்டு வார்த்தைகளை புதிய வார்த்தைக்கு இணைக்கும். நாம் எழுத்து மட்டத்திற்கு பின்னணி தொடர்ச்சி முறைமைகளை முன்னிருப்புகிறோம். முடிவு கடைசி பயிற்சியளிக்கும், மொழி சுதந்திரம் மற்றும் கூடுதல் தொலைபே நாம் ஒரு ஒலி அலைவரி பாணி மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது காப்பாற்றப்படாத வார்த்தை பட்டியலில் உள்ளிட அனுமதிக்கும், நிலையான மூலத்தில் இரு இந்த மாதிரி செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட தேர்வாளர் உருவாக்கும் திட்டத்தின் தன்மைகளால் செயற்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. முயற்சி எங்கள் வழிமுறையை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ஒரு நிலையில்-கலை FST-அடிப்படையான அடிப்படை வரிசையில் மேலானதாக கண்டுபிடி', 'sv': 'Portmanteaus är ett ordbildningsfenomen där två ord kombineras till ett nytt ord. Vi föreslår S2S-metoder (neural sekvens-to-sekvens) för uppgiften för portmanteau generation som är end-to-end-trainable, språkoberoende och inte uttryckligen använder ytterligare fonetisk information. Vi föreslår en bullriga kanalmodell som gör det möjligt att införliva obevakade ordlistor, vilket förbättrar prestandan jämfört med en standardmodell från källa till mål. Denna modell möjliggörs genom en uttömmande strategi för kandidatgenerering som särskilt möjliggörs av funktionerna i portmanteau-uppgiften. Experiment anser att vårt tillvägagångssätt är överlägset en state-of-the-art FST-baserad baslinje med avseende på grundsanningens noggrannhet och mänsklig utvärdering.', 'ur': 'پورتمنٹئوس ایک لکھ فرموشن فائدہ ہے جہاں دو لکھ ایک نئی لکھ میں ملتے ہیں. ہم شخص-سطح نائرول سطح-تا-سطح (S2S) طریقے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں پورتمنٹیو کی نسل کے کام کے لئے جو end-to-end-trainable ہیں، زبان ناخصوص ہیں، اور اضافہ فونیک معلومات کے استعمال نہیں کرتے۔ ہم ایک صدا-چانال-شیل مدل کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو غیر قابل تعلق کے لکھنے کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے، ایک استاندارڈ سور-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-موڈل کے ذریعہ عمل کو بہتر کرتا ہے. This model is made possible by an exhaustive candidate generation strategy specifically enabled by the portmanteau task. تجربے ہماری طریقہ کو ایک ایسی حالت پر زیادہ پائیں گے جو اپنا ایٹی ایٹی بنسټ کی بنسٹ لین ہے جگہ سچی دقیق اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے بارے میں۔', 'uz': "Portmanteaus are a word formation phenomenon where two words combine into a new word.  @ info Biz qoʻllanmagan soʻzlar roʻyxatlarini kiritish imkoniyatini qo'yish mumkin. Andoza manba- to-target modelida bajarish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Name Tajribalar bizning asosiy FST asosiy asosiy asosiy asosiy sohasini va inson qiymatlari haqiqiqatga ega bo'lgan holatdan o'xshashligimizni topadi.", 'vi': 'Bồ Đào Nha là một hiện tượng hình thành từ mà hai từ kết hợp thành một từ mới. Chúng tôi đề xuất các phương pháp phân tách dây thần kinh cấp tính cách phân biệt (S2S) cho nhiệm vụ của thế hệ người Bồ Đào Nha, được huấn luyện hết mức, độc lập ngôn ngữ, và không dùng thông tin cơ bản thêm. Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình kênh ồn ào, cho phép lắp đặt các danh sách từ không giám sát, cải thiện hiệu suất hơn mô hình nguồn-đối-mục tiêu tiêu tiêu tiêu tiêu chuẩn. Một một một một một chiến lược hành trị hành hệ thống được ảnh hưởng tới kỹ năng của các cậu ốc này. Thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội hơn so với một cơ sở hoàn hảo nhất của FSB với độ chính xác thực mặt đất và đánh giá con người.', 'bg': 'Портмантеите са явление за формиране на думи, при което две думи се съчетават в нова дума. Предлагаме методи за генериране на портманто, които могат да се обучават от край до край, независими от езика и не използват изрично допълнителна фонетична информация. Предлагаме модел в стил шумен канал, който позволява включването на ненадзорни списъци с думи, подобрявайки производителността в сравнение със стандартен модел източник към цел. Този модел е направен възможно чрез изчерпателна стратегия за генериране на кандидати, специално позволена от характеристиките на задачата портманто. Експериментите смятат, че подходът ни е по-добър от най-съвременната база на базата на ФСТ по отношение на точността на базата на истината и човешката оценка.', 'hr': 'Portmanteaus je fenomen formiranja riječi u kojem se dvije riječi kombiniraju u novu riječ. Predlažemo metode neurološke sekvence do sekvence (S2S) na nivou karaktera za zadatak generacije portmanteaua koji su završno-do-kraja trenirali, nezavisni jezik i ne koriste pojasno dodatne fonetičke informacije. Predlažemo model zvukovih kanala, koji omogućava uključiti neizbjeđene liste riječi, poboljšati učinkovitost na standardni model izvora do cilja. Ovaj model je omogućio iscrpljiva strategija generacije kandidata posebno omogućena karakteristikama zadatka portmanteaua. Eksperimenti pronađu naš pristup nadmoćniji na početnoj liniji FST-a s obzirom na temelju tačnosti istine i ljudske procjene.', 'nl': 'Portmanteaus zijn een woordvormingsfenomeen waarbij twee woorden samenkomen tot een nieuw woord. Voor het genereren van portmanteau stellen we voor op karakterniveau neurale sequence-to-sequence (S2S) methodes voor die end-to-end trainable, taalonafhankelijk zijn en geen expliciet gebruik maken van aanvullende fonetische informatie. We stellen een noisy-channel model voor, dat de integratie van woordenlijsten zonder toezicht toelaat, waardoor de prestaties ten opzichte van een standaard source-to-target model worden verbeterd. Dit model wordt mogelijk gemaakt door een uitgebreide strategie voor het genereren van kandidaten die specifiek mogelijk is door de kenmerken van de portmanteau-taak. Experimenten vinden onze aanpak superieur aan een state-of-the-art FST based baseline met betrekking tot de nauwkeurigheid van de grondwaarheid en menselijke evaluatie.', 'ko': 'Portmanteau는 두 단어가 하나의 새로운 단어로 조합된 구사 현상이다.우리는 문자급 신경 서열에서 서열(S2S) 방법을 제시하여portmanteau를 생성했다. 이런 방법은 처음부터 끝까지 훈련할 수 있고 언어에 독립되며 추가 음성 정보를 현저하게 사용하지 않는다.우리는 소음 채널 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 감독이 없는 단어 목록을 통합시켜 표준적인 원본에서 목표 모델에 비해 성능을 향상시켰다.포트맨 팀 작업의 특성을 통해 상세한 후보 생성 정책을 사용합니다. 이 모델은 가능합니다.실험에서 우리의 방법은 지상 진상의 정확성과 인류 평가에서 가장 선진적인 FST 기반 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.', 'da': 'Portmanteaus er et orddannelsesfænomen, hvor to ord kombineres til et nyt ord. Vi foreslår karakterniveau neurale sekvens-til-sekvens (S2S) metoder til opgaven med portmanteau generation, der er end-to-end-trainable, sproguafhængige, og ikke udtrykkeligt bruger yderligere fonetisk information. Vi foreslår en støjende kanal-stil model, som gør det muligt at indarbejde uautoriserede ordlister, hvilket forbedrer ydeevnen i forhold til en standard kilde-til-mål model. Denne model er mulig ved hjælp af en udtømmende kandidatgenerationsstrategi, der specifikt er muliggjort af funktionerne i portmanteau-opgaven. Eksperimenter synes, at vores tilgang er bedre end en state-of-the-art FST-baseret baseline med hensyn til jordsandhedens nøjagtighed og menneskelig evaluering.', 'sw': 'Kwenye msingi ni jambo la kutengeneza maneno ambapo maneno mawili yanaunganisha katika neno mpya. Tunazipendekeza mbinu za mfululizo wa kiwango cha ubora kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo (S2S) kwa ajili ya kazi ya uzalishaji wa vizazi vinavyohitimika mwishoni na yenye mafunzo, lugha huru, na hatutumi kwa uwazi zaidi taarifa za simu za mkononi. Tunapendekeza mtindo wa mitandao ya kelele, ambao unaruhusu kuingiza orodha ya maneno yasiyopangwa, kuboresha utendaji wa muundo wa kiwango cha kiwango cha ngazi. Mfano huu unawezekana na mkakati wa kizazi cha wagombea mwenye kuchoka hasa uliowezeshwa na vipengele vya kazi hiyo. Majaribio yanagundua hatua yetu zaidi ya hali ya sanaa ya FST yenye msingi wa msingi wa FST na kuhusiana na ukweli wa ardhi na tathmini za binadamu.', 'de': 'Portmanteaus sind ein Phänomen der Wortbildung, bei dem sich zwei Wörter zu einem neuen Wort verbinden. Wir schlagen für die Aufgabe der Portmanteau-Generierung auf Zeichenebene neuronale Sequenz-zu-Sequenz (S2S) Methoden vor, die end-to-end trainierbar, sprachunabhängig sind und keine expliziten zusätzlichen phonetischen Informationen verwenden. Wir schlagen ein Noisy-Channel-Modell vor, das die Einbindung von unbeaufsichtigten Wortlisten ermöglicht, wodurch die Leistung gegenüber einem Standard-Source-to-Target-Modell verbessert wird. Ermöglicht wird dieses Modell durch eine umfassende Kandidatengenerierungsstrategie, die speziell durch die Merkmale der Portmanteau-Aufgabe ermöglicht wird. Experimente finden, dass unser Ansatz einer modernen FST-basierten Basis überlegen ist, was die Genauigkeit der Ground Truth und die menschliche Bewertung betrifft.', 'fa': 'پورتمانتوس (Portmanteaus) یک نمایش ساختن کلمه است که دو کلمه به یک کلمه جدید ترکیب می\u200cکند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش\u200cهای عصبی-به-ترکیب (S2S) را برای کار نسل پورتمانتوئو که پایان-به-پایان-ترکیب قابل استفاده می\u200cکنند، زبان مستقل و کاملاً از اطلاعات فونتیک اضافه استفاده نمی\u200cکنند. ما یک مدل سبک صدا-کانال را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که اجازه می\u200cدهد که لیست\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای غیرقابل تحریک باشد، عملکرد را بر روی یک مدل منبع استاندارد به هدف بهتر کند. این مدل توسط استراتژی نسل کاندیده\u200cهای کامل به طور خاص توسط ویژه\u200cهای کار پورتمانتوئو توانایی می\u200cشود. تجربه\u200cها دسترسی ما را بالاتر از یک خط بنیادی FST بر اساس دقیق حقیقت و ارزیابی انسان می\u200cیابند.', 'id': 'Portmanteaus are a word formation phenomenon where two words combine into a new word.  Kami mengusulkan metode urutan saraf-ke-urutan (S2S) pada tingkat karakter untuk tugas generasi portmanteau yang dapat dilatih dari akhir ke akhir, bahasa independen, dan tidak secara eksplicit menggunakan informasi fonetik tambahan. Kami mengusulkan model gaya-saluran-bising, yang memungkinkan untuk inkorporasi daftar kata yang tidak diawasi, meningkatkan prestasi atas model sumber-ke-sasaran standar. Model ini dibuat mungkin oleh strategi generasi kandidat yang melelahkan yang spesifik diaktifkan oleh ciri-ciri tugas portmanteau. Eksperimen menemukan pendekatan kita lebih tinggi dari dasar FST yang terbaik dalam hal akurasi kebenaran tanah dan evaluasi manusia.', 'sq': 'Portmanteu është një fenomen i formimit të fjalëve ku dy fjalë kombinohen në një fjalë të re. We propose character-level neural sequence-to-sequence (S2S) methods for the task of portmanteau generation that are end-to-end-trainable, language independent, and do not explicitly use additional phonetic information.  Ne propozojmë një model me stil të kanalit të zhurmshëm, i cili lejon përfshirjen e listave të fjalëve të pazgjidhura, përmirësimin e performancës mbi një model standard burim-në-objektiv. Ky model është bërë i mundur nga një strategji e zhveshur e gjeneratës së kandidatëve të aktivizuar specifikisht nga karakteristikat e detyrës portmanteau. Eksperimentet e gjejnë qasjen tonë më të lartë se një bazë bazuar në FST me lidhje me saktësinë e të vërtetës dhe vlerësimin njerëzor.', 'tr': 'Portmanteaular, iki söz täze söze bilen birleşýär. Biz Karakter derejesi näyral sequence-to-sequence (S2S) metodlaryny portmanteau döredilmesi üçin soňra-soňra eğitilebilir, dillerden bağımsız we olaryň üstüne fonetik maglumatlaryny ulanmaýarys. Biz gaty-kanal stili nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Bu nusgasy maslahat edilmedik söz listleri döretmäge rugsat berýär. Bu nusgasy standart çeşmeleriň we maksadyň üstünde täzelenmesine mümkin edýär. Bu nusga portmanteau zadynyň özellikleri tarapyndan edil çykyş kandidat döredilişi strategiýasy bilen mümkin edildi. Denminatlar biziň öz yaklaşymyzy FST-niň durumumyzyň üstinde çykyşymyz we ynsan çykyşymyza degişli.', 'hy': 'Պորմանտեոսը բառերի ձևավորման ֆենոմեն է, որտեղ երկու բառերը միավորվում են նոր բառի մեջ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բնավորության մակարդակի նյարդային հաջորդականություն հաջորդականության (S2S) մեթոդներ, որոնք վերջ-վերջ կրթության հնարավոր են, անկախ լեզվից և բացահայտորեն չեն օգտագործում ավելին ֆոնետիկ տեղեկատվություն: Մենք առաջարկում ենք աղմկոտ կանանի ոճի մոդել, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս անվերահսկված բառերի ցուցակների ներառումը, բարելավելով արտադրողությունը ստանդարտ աղբյուր-նպատակի մոդելի միջոցով: Այս մոդելը հնարավոր է դարձնում հոգնեցնող թեկնածուների սերունդների ռազմավարության միջոցով, որը հատկապես հնարավոր է դառնալ պորմանտեոյի խնդիրների հատկությունների միջոցով: Փորձարկումները գտնում են, որ մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր ՖՍԹ-ի հիմքում հիմնված հիմքի վերաբերյալ ճշմարտության և մարդկային գնահատման հարցում:', 'am': 'ሁለት ቃላት በአዲስ ቃላት የሚጋጠሙበት ቃላት ነው፡፡ የፊርማኖት ትውልድ ለፍጻሜ ማቀናጃ፣ ቋንቋ ነጻ እናስገድዳለን፣ እናም በተለይ የፎንnetic መረጃዎችን አይጠቀምም፡፡ የድምፅ-channel-style ምሳሌ እናስጀጋለን፤ ይህም የቃላትን ዝርዝሮች ማግባት ይፈቅዳል፤ የድምፅ ዓይነት-ወደ-target ዓይነት ማሳደግ ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ምሳሌ በተጨማሪው የፍትወት ትውልድ strategie በተለየ በፖርትናው ስራ ላይ የተቻለ ነው፡፡ Experiments find our approach superior to a state-of-the-art FST-based baseline with respect to ground truth accuracy and human evaluation.', 'bn': 'পোর্টম্যান্টিয়াস একটি শব্দ গঠনের ব্যাপার যেখানে দুটি শব্দ নতুন শব্দে একত্রিত হয়। আমরা ক্যারেক্টার-স্তরের নিউরেল সেকেন্স-ব্যবহারের (S2S) পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যা পোর্টান্ডিউ প্রজন্মের কাজের জন্য যারা শেষ-শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা  আমরা একটি আওয়াজ-চ্যানেল-স্টাইল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যা অরক্ষিত শব্দের তালিকাকে অন্তর্ভুক্ত করতে পারে, স্ট্যান্ডার্ড উৎস থেকে লক্ষ্য মডেলের উপর এই মডেলটি ক্লান্ত প্রার্থী প্রজন্মের কৌশল দ্বারা সম্ভব। পরীক্ষার মধ্যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পাওয়া যাচ্ছে একটি শিল্পী এফএসটির ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বেসালাইনের চেয়ে বেশী ভালো', 'az': 'Portmanteaus, iki söz yeni sözlərə birləşdirilən söz formasyonudur. Biz karakter-seviyyəti nöral sequence-to-sequence (S2S) metodlarını təbliğ edirik ki, end-to-end-trainable, dil bağımsız və çox fonetik məlumatı istifadə etməz. Biz səs-kanal stili modeli təklif edirik ki, bu söz listelərini birləşdirməyə imkan verir, standart mənbə modeli ilə birləşdirməyə imkan verir. Bu modeli portmanteau işinin özellikləri ilə mümkün olaraq mümkün olar. Həqiqət doğruluğu və insan değerlendirməsi barəsində təcrübələrimizin fəaliyyəti FST-dən daha üstün olduğunu görürlər.', 'cs': 'Portmanteaus jsou jev tvorby slov, kde se dvě slova spojují do nového slova. Pro úlohu generace portmanteau navrhujeme metody neuronové sekvence-to-sekvence (S2S) na znakové úrovni, které jsou end-to-end trénovatelné, jazykově nezávislé a nepoužívají explicitně další fonetické informace. Navrhujeme model hlučného kanálu, který umožňuje začlenění seznamů slov bez dohledu, což zlepšuje výkon oproti standardnímu zdrojovému modelu. Tento model je umožněn vyčerpávající strategií generace kandidátů speciálně umožněnou vlastnostmi portmanteau úlohy. Experimenty shledávají náš přístup nadřazený nejmodernějším základním principům založeným na FST, pokud jde o přesnost pravdy a hodnocení lidí.', 'ca': "Portmanteaus és un fenomen de formació de paraules on dues paraules es combinan en una nova paraula. Proposem mètodes seqüència a seqüència neuronal (S2S) a nivell de caràcter per a la tasca de generació de portmanteau que són entrenables de cap a cap, independents del llenguatge i que no utilitzen explícitament informació fonètica adicional. Proposem un model d'estil de canal sorollós, que permet l'incorporació de llistes de paraules no supervisades, millorant el rendiment sobre un model normal de fonts a objectius. Aquest model es permet per una estratègia exhaustiva de generació de candidats activada específicament pels aspectes de la tasca portmanteau. Els experiments troben el nostre enfocament superior a una línia basada en FST més avançada en relació a la precisió de la veritat fonamental i l'evaluació humana.", 'et': 'Portmanteaus on sõna moodustumise nähtus, kus kaks sõna ühenduvad uueks sõnaks. Pakume portmanteau generatsiooni ülesandeks välja märgitasemel neuraalseks järjestuseks (S2S) meetodeid, mis on lõpust lõpuni treenitavad, keelesõltumatud ega kasuta selgesõnaliselt täiendavat foneetilist informatsiooni. Pakume välja mürakanalilise mudeli, mis võimaldab lisada järelevalveta sõnaloendeid, parandades jõudlust standardse allikast sihtmärgini mudeli võrreldes. Selle mudeli võimaldab põhjalik kandidaatide genereerimise strateegia, mis on spetsiaalselt võimaldatud portmanteau ülesande omadustega. Eksperimentid leiavad, et meie lähenemisviis on parem kui tipptasemel FST-l põhinev lähtealus, mis puudutab maapinna tõe täpsust ja inimeste hindamist.', 'bs': 'Portmanteaus je fenomen formacije riječi u kojem se dvije riječi kombiniraju u novu riječ. Predlažemo metode neurološke sekvence do sekvence (S2S) na nivou karaktera za zadatak generacije portmanteaua koji su na kraju-do-kraju obučeni, jezik nezavisni i ne koriste pojasno dodatne fonetičke informacije. Predlažemo model zvukovih kanala, koji omogućava uključiti neizbježne liste riječi, poboljšati učinkovitost na standardni model izvora do cilja. Ovaj model je omogućio iscrpljiva strategija generacije kandidata posebno omogućena karakteristikama zadatka portmanteaua. Eksperimenti pronađu naš pristup nad početnom linijom na državi umjetnosti FST-a u odnosu na tačnost istine i ljudsku procjenu.', 'af': "Portmanteaus is 'n woord formasie fenomen waar twee woorde in 'n nuwe woord kombinasie word. Ons voorstel karaktervlak neurale sekvensie-na-sekvensie (S2S) metodes vir die taak van portmanteau generasie wat end-to-end-trainable is, taal onveilig, en doen nie uitduidelik gebruik ekstra fonetiese inligting. Ons voorstel 'n geluid-kanaal-styl model wat toelaat vir die inkorporering van ononderwerpende woorde lyste, verbetering van prestasie oor 'n standaard bron na doel model. Hierdie model is moontlik gemaak deur 'n uitsluit kandidate generasie strategie spesifieke geaktiveer deur die funksies van die portmanteau taak. Eksperimente vind ons toegang superior na 'n staat van die kunste FST-gebaseerde basislien met respek na grondwaarheid waarheid waarheid en menslike evaluering.", 'fi': 'Portmanteaus on sananmuodostuksen ilmiö, jossa kaksi sanaa yhdistyy uudeksi sanaksi. Ehdotamme portmanteau-generaation tehtävään merkkitason neurosekvenssi-to-sequence (S2S) -menetelmiä, jotka ovat täysin koulutettavissa, kielestä riippumattomia, eivätkä nimenomaisesti käytä foneettista lisätietoa. Ehdotamme meluisaa kanavatyylistä mallia, joka mahdollistaa valvomattomien sanalistojen liittämisen, mikä parantaa suorituskykyä vakiomalliseen lähteestä kohteeseen -malliin verrattuna. Mallin mahdollistaa kattava ehdokassukupolvistrategia, jonka erityisesti portmanteau-tehtävän ominaisuudet mahdollistavat. Kokeiden mukaan lähestymistapamme on ylivoimainen kuin huipputekninen FST-pohjainen perusajatus perustuen totuuden tarkkuuteen ja ihmisen arviointiin.', 'he': 'פורטמנטאוס הם תופעה ליצור מילים שבה שתי מילים מתחברות למילה חדשה. אנו מציעים שיטות רצף עצבי ברמה של אופי (S2S) למשימה של דור פורטמנטו שהם ניתנים לאימון מסוף-לסוף, עצמאות לשפה, ולא משתמשים באופן ברור במידע פונטי נוסף. אנו מציעים מודל סגנון ערוץ רעש, שמאפשר להכניס רשימות מילים ללא השגחה, לשפר ביצועים על מודל מקור למטרה סטנדרטי. מודל זה מאפשר על ידי אסטרטגיה מיושמת של דור מועמדים שנאפשרת במיוחד על ידי תכונות המשימה של פורטמנטו. Experiments find our approach superior to a state-of-the-art FST-based baseline with respect to ground truth accuracy and human evaluation.', 'sk': 'Portmanteus je pojav oblikovanja besed, kjer se dve besedi združujeta v novo besedo. Za nalogo generacije portmanteau predlagamo metode nevronskega zaporedja v zaporedje znakov (S2S), ki so izurljive od konca do konca, jezikovno neodvisne in ne uporabljajo izrecno dodatnih fonetičnih informacij. Predlagamo model hrupnega kanala, ki omogoča vključitev nenadzorovanih seznamov besed in izboljšanje učinkovitosti v primerjavi s standardnim modelom od vira do cilja. Ta model omogoča izčrpna strategija generacije kandidatov, ki jo posebej omogočajo značilnosti naloge portmanteau. Eksperimenti ugotavljajo, da je naš pristop boljši od najsodobnejšega osnovnega izhodišča, ki temelji na FST, kar zadeva natančnost osnovne resnice in človeško vrednotenje.', 'ha': 'Tsarinsa yana da wani abu na danna magana wanda sau biyu ke haɗa cikin wata kalma na dabam. Tuna goyyar da shiryoyin karar-daraja-neural-to-sequence (S2S) hanyoyin wa aikin kiyãyen birnin wanda ya kasance na ƙari-to-ƙari mai amfani da shi, da kuma ba mu yi amfani da zane na ƙaranci ba. We propose a noisy-channel-style model, which allows for the incorporation of unsupervised word lists, improving performance over a standard source-to-target model.  Wannan motel can be made by an ƙudura kimar kiyayen wanda ya yi rauni mai tsakanin da ke fara haske da properties wa aikin hagandau. Jaryoyin suka sãmi hanyoyinmu mafiya kyauta daga halin-mai-rubutun Fstan da gaskiyar ƙasa da kimar.', 'jv': 'Port Manetos kuwi gadhah ujaran Anyone Awak dhéwé nggunakake model sing rusak-channel, supoyo iso nggawe Perintah sing gak Cocok dadi bisa nggawe barang bersatu, njaluke nggawe barang sistem offline nggo model sing bisa dumadhi iki. model iki iso nggawe diumbang kelompok nggawe Perintah Candidaturan sing paling nggawe Perintah sing nyimpen karo nggawe portmani task. Gebudhakan langkung ngerti dadi sing paling-perusahaan kanggo langgambar aturan sing paling-perusahaan karo perusahaan sing katêpakan karo nggawe gerakan sing apik perusahaan karo perusahaan sing katêpakan uwong.', 'bo': 'Portmanteaus ནི་བརྡ་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ནང་འདྲེན་གྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་པའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་རིམ་(S2S)ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསམ་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་ལམ་ལུགས་པའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་པར་མ་དབྱིབས་ཅིག་གི་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིང་ཐོག་འགོ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མ་ལག མིག Experiments find our approach superior to a state-of-the-art FST based baseline with respect to ground truth accuracy and human evaluation.'}
{'en': 'Using Automated Metaphor Identification to Aid in Detection and Prediction of First-Episode Schizophrenia', 'ar': 'استخدام التعريف الآلي للاستعارة للمساعدة في الكشف والتنبؤ بمرض انفصام الشخصية من الحلقة الأولى', 'es': 'Uso de la identificación automática de metáforas para ayudar en la detección y predicción de la esquizofrenia del primer episodio', 'fr': "Utilisation de l'identification automatisée par métaphore pour faciliter la détection et la prédiction du premier épisode de schizophrénie", 'pt': 'Usando a identificação automatizada de metáforas para ajudar na detecção e previsão do primeiro episódio de esquizofrenia', 'ja': '自動化された比喩的識別を使用して、最初のエピソードの統合失調症の検出と予測を支援する', 'zh': '以自隐喻知助检候首发之精神分裂症', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूपक पहचान का उपयोग करने के लिए पता लगाने और पहले एपिसोड सिज़ोफ्रेनिया की भविष्यवाणी में सहायता के लिए', 'ru': 'Использование автоматизированной идентификации метафор для помощи в обнаружении и прогнозировании первой эпизодической шизофрении', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Meafar Uathoibrithe a Úsáid chun Cabhrú le Scitsifréine Céad-Eipeasóid a Bhrath agus a Thuar', 'el': 'Χρήση αυτοματοποιημένης ταυτοποίησης μεταφορών για να βοηθήσει στην ανίχνευση και πρόβλεψη της σχιζοφρένειας πρώτου επεισοδίου', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური მეტაფორის იდენტიფიკაციის გამოყენება შიზოფრენიის პირველი ეპიზოდის განსახულებაში და დაწყენებაში', 'hu': 'Automatizált metafóra azonosítás használata az első epizód skizofrénia felismeréséhez és előrejelzéséhez', 'kk': 'Бірінші епизод Шизофрениясының анықтамасында көмегімен автоматты түрде метафор идентификациясын қолданып', 'it': "Utilizzo dell'identificazione automatica della metafora per aiutare nella rilevazione e nella previsione della schizofrenia del primo episodio", 'lt': 'Automatinės metaforos identifikacijos naudojimas pirmojo epizodo šizofrenijos aptikimui ir prognozavimui', 'mk': 'Користење автоматизирана метафорска идентификација за помош во детективирањето и предвидувањето на првата епизода шизофренија', 'ms': 'Menggunakan Identifikasi Metafora Automatik untuk membantu dalam pengesan dan prediksi Shizofrenia Episod Pertama', 'ml': 'ആദ്യത്തെ എപ്പിസോഡ് ഷിസോഫെനിയയുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിലും സഹായത്തിനുള്ള സ്വയമായ മെറ്റാപ്പറിന്റെ തി', 'no': 'Bruk automatisk metaforidentifikasjon til hjelp i oppdaging og forhåndsvising av første episod- schizophrenia', 'ro': 'Utilizarea identificării automate a metaforelor pentru a ajuta la detectarea și predicția schizofreniei primului episod', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie zautomatyzowanej identyfikacji metaforów do pomocy w wykrywaniu i przewidywaniu schizofrenii pierwszego epizodu', 'mn': 'Автоматтын метафор идентификацийг ашиглаж эхний хэсэг Шизофренийн тусламжтайгаар', 'mt': 'Using Automated Metaphor Identification to Aid in Detection and Prediction of First-Episode Schizophrenia', 'sr': 'Koristeći automatsku identifikaciju metafora za pomoć u otkrivanju i predviđenju prve epizode Šizofrenija', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sv': 'Använda automatiserad metaforidentifiering för att hjälpa till att upptäcka och förutsäga första episodens schizofreni', 'so': 'Isticmaalka aqoonsiga caawimaadda ee la isticmaalayo baaritaanka iyo Prediction of first-Episode Schizophrenia', 'ta': 'தன்னியக்க முறைமையின் அடையாளத்தை கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் முதல் வெளியீடு ஸ்கிசோபெனியாவின் முன்னிருப்பு', 'ur': 'First-Episode Schizophrenia کی تصدیق اور پیش بینی کے لئے اٹوٹوٹیڈ میٹوفور شناساتی کا استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dùng tự động nhận diện siêu hình để trợ giúp trinh sát và đoán trước của Schizophrenia.', 'bg': 'Използване на автоматизирана метафорна идентификация за подпомагане на откриването и прогнозирането на шизофрения от първи епизод', 'hr': 'Koristeći automatsku identifikaciju metafora za pomoć u otkrivanju i predviđenju prve epizode Šizofrenija', 'nl': 'Geautomatiseerde metaforidentificatie gebruiken om te helpen bij het opsporen en voorspellen van eerste episode schizofrenie', 'da': 'Brug af automatiseret identifikation af metaforer til at hjælpe med detektion og forudsigelse af første episode skizofreni', 'ko': '자동 은유 식별을 사용하여 최초의 정신 분열증을 검측하고 예측하는 데 도움을 주다', 'de': 'Automatisierte Metaphern-Identifikation zur Erkennung und Vorhersage von Schizophrenie in der ersten Episode', 'id': 'Menggunakan Identifikasi Metafora Otomatis untuk membantu dalam Deteksi dan Prediksi Episoda Pertama Schizofrenia', 'fa': 'استفاده از شناسایی متاغیر اتوماتیک برای کمک در کشف و پیش\u200cبینی اولین بخش شیزوفرنیا', 'tr': 'Birinji Episode Şizofreniýasynyň öňünden kömek üçin Otomatik Metofor Kimligi ullanýar', 'af': 'Gebruik automatiese metaforidentifikasie na hulp in beskrywing en voorskrif van eerste episode Schizophrenia', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia utambulisho wa Mtandao wa Kujitoleza Kusaidia katika Kugundua na Utawala wa Kitengo cha kwanza cha Schizophrenia', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i Identifikimit të Metaforës së Automatizuar për të ndihmuar në zbulimin dhe parashikimin e Shizofrenisë së Episodës së Parë', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': "İlk-Epizod Şizofreni'nin keşfetməsində və Önümüzdə Yardımcılığı üçün Avtomatik Metafor Kimliğini istifadə edir", 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով ավտոմացված մետաֆորային հայտնաբերումը օգնելու առաջին էպիզոդի շիզոֆրենիայի հայտնաբերման և կանխատեսման մեջ', 'bs': 'Koristeći automatsku identifikaciju metafora za pomoć u otkrivanju i predviđanju prve epizode Šizofrenija', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেটাপোর পরিচয়পত্র ব্যবহার করে প্রথম-Episode Schizophrenia-র স্কোয়ারেনিয়ায় সাহায্য পরিচয়পত্রের জন্য', 'ca': 'Utilitzant la identificació automàtica de metàfora per ajudar a detectar i predir la schizofrenia de primer episodi', 'fi': 'Automaattisen metaforin tunnistuksen käyttäminen ensimmäisen episodin skitsofrenian havaitsemiseen ja ennustamiseen', 'cs': 'Využití automatizované identifikace metaforem k pomoci při detekci a predikci schizofrenie první epizody', 'et': 'Automaatse metafoori tuvastamise kasutamine esimese episoodi skisofreenia avastamisel ja prognoosimisel', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Automated metaphor', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'sk': 'Uporaba avtomatizirane identifikacije metafore za pomoč pri odkrivanju in napovedovanju shizofrenije prve epizode', 'he': 'השימוש בזהות מטאפורה אוטומטית כדי לסייע בבחינה ובחיזוי של שיזופרניה בפרק הראשון', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབུལ་ངོས་འཛིན་སྤྱད་ནས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་ཐོག་དང་གསལ་བཤད'}
{'en': 'The diagnosis of serious mental health conditions such as schizophrenia is based on the judgment of clinicians whose training takes several years, and can not be easily formalized into objective measures. However, previous research suggests there are disturbances in aspects of the language use of patients with schizophrenia. Using metaphor-identification and sentiment-analysis algorithms to automatically generate features, we create a classifier, that, with high accuracy, can predict which patients will develop (or currently suffer from) schizophrenia. To our knowledge, this study is the first to demonstrate the utility of automated metaphor identification algorithms for detection or prediction of disease.', 'fr': "Le diagnostic de troubles mentaux graves tels que la schizophrénie repose sur le jugement de cliniciens dont la formation dure plusieurs années et ne peut pas être facilement formalisé en mesures objectives. Cependant, des recherches antérieures suggèrent qu'il existe des perturbations dans certains aspects de l'utilisation de la langue chez les patients atteints de schizophrénie. En utilisant des algorithmes d'identification par métaphore et d'analyse des sentiments pour générer automatiquement des caractéristiques, nous créons un classificateur qui, avec une grande précision, peut prédire quels patients développeront (ou souffriront actuellement) de schizophrénie. À notre connaissance, cette étude est la première à démontrer l'utilité des algorithmes automatisés d'identification de métaphore pour la détection ou la prédiction d'une maladie.", 'pt': 'O diagnóstico de condições graves de saúde mental, como a esquizofrenia, é baseado no julgamento de médicos cujo treinamento leva vários anos e não pode ser facilmente formalizado em medidas objetivas. No entanto, pesquisas anteriores sugerem que existem distúrbios em aspectos do uso da linguagem de pacientes com esquizofrenia. Usando algoritmos de identificação de metáforas e análise de sentimentos para gerar recursos automaticamente, criamos um classificador que, com alta precisão, pode prever quais pacientes desenvolverão (ou sofrerão atualmente de) esquizofrenia. Até onde sabemos, este estudo é o primeiro a demonstrar a utilidade de algoritmos automatizados de identificação de metáforas para detecção ou previsão de doenças.', 'ar': 'يعتمد تشخيص حالات الصحة العقلية الخطيرة مثل الفصام على حكم الأطباء الذين يستغرق تدريبهم عدة سنوات ، ولا يمكن تحويله بسهولة إلى مقاييس موضوعية. ومع ذلك ، تشير الأبحاث السابقة إلى وجود اضطرابات في جوانب استخدام اللغة لمرضى الفصام. باستخدام خوارزميات تحديد المجاز وتحليل المشاعر لإنشاء ميزات تلقائيًا ، نقوم بإنشاء مصنف يمكنه ، بدقة عالية ، التنبؤ بالمرضى الذين سيصابون (أو يعانون حاليًا) من مرض انفصام الشخصية. على حد علمنا ، هذه الدراسة هي الأولى التي توضح فائدة خوارزميات تحديد الاستعارة الآلية للكشف عن المرض أو التنبؤ به.', 'es': 'El diagnóstico de enfermedades mentales graves, como la esquizofrenia, se basa en el juicio de los médicos cuya formación lleva varios años y no puede formalizarse fácilmente en medidas objetivas. Sin embargo, investigaciones previas sugieren que hay alteraciones en aspectos del uso del lenguaje de los pacientes con esquizofrenia. Utilizando algoritmos de identificación de metáforas y análisis de sentimientos para generar automáticamente características, creamos un clasificador que, con gran precisión, puede predecir qué pacientes desarrollarán (o padecerán actualmente) esquizofrenia. Hasta donde sabemos, este estudio es el primero en demostrar la utilidad de los algoritmos automatizados de identificación de metáforas para la detección o predicción de enfermedades.', 'ja': '統合失調症などの深刻な精神衛生状態の診断は、研修に数年を要する臨床医の判断に基づいており、容易に客観的な対策に形式化することはできない。しかし、以前の研究では、統合失調症患者の言語使用の側面に障害があることが示唆されています。特徴を自動的に生成するために、メタファー識別およびセンチメント分析アルゴリズムを使用して、どの患者が統合失調症を発症する（または現在発症する）かを高精度で予測できる分類子を作成します。我々の知る限りでは、この研究は、疾患の検出または予測のための自動メタファー識別アルゴリズムの有用性を最初に示したものである。', 'zh': '精神分裂症等精神健康状况诊在临床医,其培训数年,不可轻正式化客观。 然前论明白,精神分裂症患者言语有碍。 隐喻情析算以自生,创一器以高精度之(或目前之有)精神分裂症。 以吾所知,始验自隐喻识算法之实用性。', 'hi': 'सिज़ोफ्रेनिया जैसी गंभीर मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों का निदान चिकित्सकों के फैसले पर आधारित है जिनके प्रशिक्षण में कई साल लगते हैं, और इसे उद्देश्य उपायों में आसानी से औपचारिक रूप नहीं दिया जा सकता है। हालांकि, पिछले शोध से पता चलता है कि सिज़ोफ्रेनिया वाले रोगियों की भाषा के उपयोग के पहलुओं में गड़बड़ी है। स्वचालित रूप से सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए रूपक-पहचान और भावना-विश्लेषण एल्गोरिदम का उपयोग करके, हम एक क्लासिफायर बनाते हैं, जो उच्च सटीकता के साथ, भविष्यवाणी कर सकते हैं कि कौन से रोगी सिज़ोफ्रेनिया विकसित होंगे (या वर्तमान में) से पीड़ित होंगे। हमारे ज्ञान के लिए, यह अध्ययन बीमारी का पता लगाने या भविष्यवाणी के लिए स्वचालित रूपक पहचान एल्गोरिदम की उपयोगिता को प्रदर्शित करने वाला पहला है।', 'ru': 'Диагноз серьезных психических расстройств, таких как шизофрения, основан на суждении врачей, подготовка которых занимает несколько лет, и не может быть легко формализован в объективные меры. Однако предыдущие исследования показывают, что существуют нарушения в аспектах использования языка у пациентов с шизофренией. Используя алгоритмы метафорической идентификации и сентиментального анализа для автоматической генерации признаков, мы создаем классификатор, который с высокой точностью может предсказать, у каких пациентов развивается (или в настоящее время страдает) шизофрения. Насколько нам известно, это исследование является первым, чтобы продемонстрировать полезность автоматизированных алгоритмов идентификации метафоры для обнаружения или прогнозирования заболевания.', 'ga': 'Bunaítear diagnóis riochtaí tromchúiseacha meabhairshláinte amhail scitsifréine ar bhreithiúnas na gcliniceoirí a dtógann a n-oiliúint roinnt blianta, agus nach féidir a chur ar bhonn foirmiúil go bearta oibiachtúla go héasca. Mar sin féin, tugann taighde a rinneadh roimhe seo le fios go bhfuil suaitheadh ann maidir le gnéithe d’úsáid teanga othar a bhfuil scitsifréine orthu. Trí úsáid a bhaint as halgartaim meafar-aitheantais agus meon-anailísithe chun gnéithe a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch, cruthaímid aicmitheoir a bheidh in ann, le cruinneas ard, a thuar cé na hothair a dtiocfaidh scitsifréine orthu (nó a bhfuil fulaingt orthu faoi láthair). Go bhfios dúinn, is é an staidéar seo an chéad cheann a léirigh úsáideacht halgartaim aitheantais meafar uathoibrithe chun galair a bhrath nó a thuar.', 'el': 'Η διάγνωση σοβαρών παθήσεων ψυχικής υγείας όπως η σχιζοφρένεια βασίζεται στην κρίση των κλινικών των οποίων η εκπαίδευση διαρκεί αρκετά χρόνια και δεν μπορεί εύκολα να διατυπωθεί σε αντικειμενικά μέτρα. Ωστόσο, προηγούμενες έρευνες δείχνουν ότι υπάρχουν διαταραχές στις πτυχές της γλωσσικής χρήσης ασθενών με σχιζοφρένεια. Χρησιμοποιώντας αλγόριθμους μετα-ταυτοποίησης και ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων για την αυτόματη δημιουργία χαρακτηριστικών, δημιουργούμε έναν ταξινομητή, ο οποίος, με μεγάλη ακρίβεια, μπορεί να προβλέψει ποιοι ασθενείς θα αναπτύξουν (ή θα υποφέρουν) σχιζοφρένεια. Από όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτή η μελέτη είναι η πρώτη που καταδεικνύει τη χρησιμότητα των αυτοματοποιημένων αλγορίθμων αναγνώρισης μεταφορικών για την ανίχνευση ή την πρόβλεψη ασθενειών.', 'hu': 'A súlyos mentális egészségügyi állapotok, mint például a skizofrénia diagnózisa azon orvosok ítéletén alapul, akiknek a képzése több évig tart, és nem könnyen formálható objektív intézkedésekké. Korábbi kutatások azonban arra utalnak, hogy a skizofréniában szenvedő betegek nyelvhasználatának szempontjaiban zavarok vannak. Metafóra-azonosító és érzelem-elemző algoritmusok segítségével automatikusan generáljuk a funkciókat, létrehozunk egy osztályozót, amely nagy pontossággal megjósolhatja, hogy mely betegek alakulnak ki (vagy jelenleg szenvednek) skizofréniában. Tudomásunk szerint ez a tanulmány az első, amely bemutatja az automatizált metafora azonosító algoritmusok hasznosságát a betegségek kimutatására vagy előrejelzésére.', 'ka': 'ჟვპთჲჱნჲ მთჟლთფვჟკჲ ჱეპაგჲ, კარჲ ქთჱჲტპვნთწ, ჟვ ჲბაჱგა ნა კლთნთუთრვ, კჲთრჲ რპვნთპა ნწკჲლკჲ დჲეთნთ, თ ნვ მჲზვ ეა ბთევ ლვჟნჲ ჲტთუთპანჲ ჲბვკრთგნთრვ მვპთ. მაგრამ, წინა შესწავლობა იტყვებს, რომ ქიზოფრენიის პოციენტების გამოყენება ენის აპექტებში არსებობს შეცდომა. მეტაფორის განსაზღვრება და სენტიმენტის ანალგიზმის ალგორიტემის გამოყენება ავტომატურად ფუნქციების შექმნა, ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის შექმნა, რომელიც უფრო მართლად შეგვიძლია განსაზღვრება რომელის პოციენტებ ჩვენი მეცნიერებისთვის, ეს კვლევა არის პირველი, რომელიც აჩვენებს ავტომატურად მეტაფორის ინდიდინტიფიკაციის ალგორიტემის სუტილიტებას, რომელიც ავტომატურად განვიცნობის ან', 'it': "La diagnosi di gravi condizioni di salute mentale come la schizofrenia si basa sul giudizio di medici la cui formazione dura diversi anni e non può essere facilmente formalizzata in misure oggettive. Tuttavia, ricerche precedenti suggeriscono che ci sono disturbi negli aspetti dell'uso del linguaggio dei pazienti con schizofrenia. Utilizzando algoritmi di identificazione metaforica e analisi sentimentale per generare automaticamente caratteristiche, creiamo un classificatore, che, con alta precisione, può prevedere quali pazienti svilupperanno (o attualmente soffrono di) schizofrenia. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questo studio è il primo a dimostrare l'utilità di algoritmi automatici di identificazione metaforica per il rilevamento o la previsione della malattia.", 'lt': 'Sunkių psichikos sveikatos sutrikimų, pvz., šizofrenijos, diagnozavimas grindžiamas gydytojų, kurių mokymas trunka keletą metų, sprendimu ir negali būti lengvai formalizuotas objektyviomis priemonėmis. Tačiau ankstesni tyrimai rodo, kad šizofrenija sergančių pacientų kalbos vartojimo aspektai yra sutrikę. Naudodami metaforų identifikavimo ir jausmų analizės algoritmus, kad automatiškai generuotume savybes, sukuriame klasifikatorių, kuris, labai tiksliai, gali nuspėti, kurie pacientai išsivystys (arba dabar kenčia) nuo šizofrenijos. Mūsų žiniomis, šis tyrimas yra pirmasis, įrodantis, kad naudojami automatizuoti metaforų identifikavimo algoritmai ligoms nustatyti ar prognozuoti.', 'mk': 'Дијагнозата на сериозни ментални здравствени услови како што е шизофренија се базира на пресудата на клиничарите чија обука трае неколку години и не може лесно да се формализира во објективни мерки. Сепак, претходните истражувања покажуваат дека постојат вознемирувања во аспектите на употребата на јазикот на пациентите со шизофренија. Using metaphor-identification and sentiment-analysis algorithms to automatically generate features, we create a classifier, that, with high accuracy, can predict which patients will develop (or currently suffer from) schizophrenia.  Според нашето знаење, оваа студија е првата која ја покажува корисноста на автоматизираните алгоритми за идентификација на метафорите за детекција или предвидување на болестите.', 'kk': 'Шизофрения секілді маңызды психикалық саулық шарттарының диагностикасы, бірнеше жыл ұзақ беретін клиникалықтардың тәртібіне негізделген, және мақсатты мерзімдерге оңай болмайды. Бірақ, алдыңғы зерттеулердің шизофренияны пациенттердің тілдерінің қолдану аспектерінде өзгерістер бар деп ойлайды. Метафор- идентификация және сенсимент- анализ алгоритмдерін автоматты түрде мүмкіндіктерді құру үшін, біз классификациялық құрамыз, бұл дұрыс арқылы қандай пациенттердің (немесе қазіргі жағдайдан) шизофренияны қ Біздің білімімізге, бұл зерттеу - ауруларды анықтау немесе бақылау үшін автоматты метафор идентификациялау алгоритмдерінің утилитасын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Diagnosis keadaan kesehatan mental yang serius seperti skizofrenia berdasarkan penilaian doktor yang latihan mengambil beberapa tahun, dan tidak mudah dipormalkan menjadi tindakan objektif. Namun, kajian sebelumnya menunjukkan ada gangguan dalam aspek penggunaan bahasa pesakit dengan skizofrenia. Dengan menggunakan algoritma pengenalisan-metafora dan analisis-perasaan untuk secara automatik menghasilkan ciri-ciri, kami mencipta pengklasifikasi, yang, dengan ketepatan tinggi, boleh meramalkan yang mana pesakit akan mengembangkan (atau sekarang menderita) skizofrenia. Menurut pengetahuan kita, kajian ini adalah yang pertama untuk menunjukkan utiliti algoritma pengenalan metafora automatik untuk pengesan atau ramalan penyakit.', 'mt': 'Id-dijanjosi ta’ kundizzjonijiet serji tas-saħħa mentali bħal skiżofrenija hija bbażata fuq il-ġudizzju ta’ tobba li t-taħriġ tagħhom jieħu bosta snin, u ma tistax faċilment tiġi formalizzata f’miżuri oġġettivi. However, previous research suggests there are disturbances in aspects of the language use of patients with schizophrenia.  Bl-użu ta’ algoritmi ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-metafori u analiżi tas-sentimenti biex jiġġeneraw awtomatikament karatteristiċi, a ħna nħolqu klassifikatur, li, b’preċiżjoni għolja, jista’ jipprevedi liema pazjenti se jiżviluppaw (jew bħalissa jsofru minn) skiżofrenija. Għall-għarfien tagħna, dan l-istudju huwa l-ewwel li juri l-utilità ta’ algoritmi awtomatizzati ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-metafori għad-detezzjoni jew it-tbassir tal-marda.', 'mn': 'Шизофрени мэт чухал сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөл байдал нь хэдэн жилийн сургалтын тухай эмч хүмүүсийн шийдвэрлэл дээр үндсэн бөгөөд зорилготой хэмжээсүүд дээр амархан хэлбэртэй болж ча Гэхдээ өмнөх судалгаагаар шизофрений өвчтөнүүдийн хэлний хэрэглээний талаар өөрчлөлт байдаг гэсэн үг. Метафор-тодорхойлолт, сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ алгоритмыг автоматаар шинжилгээ үүсгэхийн тулд бид хэн өвчтөн шизофрениас (эсвэл одоо үед) хөгжүүлэхийг тодорхойлж чадна. Бидний мэдэхэд энэ судалгаа өвчний мэдэх эсвэл таамаглах алгоритмыг автоматжуулсан метафор тодорхойлох алгоритмыг анхны үзүүлэх нь юм.', 'ml': 'The diagnosis of serious mental health conditions such as schizophrenia is based on the judgment of clinicians whose training takes several years, and cannot be easily formalized into objective measures.  എന്നാലും മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശോധനം പറയുന്നത് സ്കിസോഫ്രെനിയായ രോഗികളുടെ ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയില്\u200d ഭ്രാന്തുകള്\u200d ഉണ സ്വയം വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി മെതിഫോര്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും അനുഭവവിശേഷവും ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫര്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന് ഈ പഠനം ആദ്യം രോഗം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയോ പ്രവചിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ആദ്യത്തെയാണ്.', 'no': 'Diagnosen av alvorleg psykiske helseforhold, som schizofrenia, er basert på sprøytebruken av klinikar som treng fleire år, og kan ikkje lett formaliserast i objektive tiltak. Førre forskning tyder imidlertid at det er forstyrrelsar i aspekten av språkbruken av pasienter med schizofrenia. Bruk metaforidentifikasjon og sentimentanalyse-algoritme for automatisk oppretting av funksjonar, oppretter vi ein klassifiserer, som, med høg nøyaktig, kan foregå kva pasienter vil utvikla (eller no går frå) schizofrenia. Dette studiet er det første som demonstrerer verktøyet for automatiske metaforidentifikasjonsgoritme for oppdaging eller forhåndsvising av sykdommen.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznanie poważnych stanów zdrowia psychicznego, takich jak schizofrenia, opiera się na ocenie lekarzy, których szkolenie trwa kilka lat i nie może być łatwo sformalizowane w obiektywne środki. Jednak wcześniejsze badania sugerują, że występują zaburzenia w aspektach używania języka u pacjentów ze schizofrenią. Korzystając z algorytmów identyfikacji metaforycznej i analizy sentymentów do automatycznego generowania cech, tworzymy klasyfikator, który z dużą dokładnością może przewidzieć, którzy pacjenci rozwiną (lub obecnie cierpią) schizofrenię. Z naszej wiedzy, niniejsze opracowanie jest pierwszym, które zademonstrowało użyteczność automatycznych algorytmów identyfikacji metafor do wykrywania lub przewidywania choroby.', 'sr': 'Diagnoza ozbiljnih mentalnih zdravstvenih uslova poput šizofrenija temeljena je na rasuđivanju klinika čija obuka traje nekoliko godina, a ne može biti lako formalizovana u objektivne mjere. Međutim, prethodno istraživanje ukazuje na to da postoje poremećaji u aspektima upotrebe jezika pacijenata sa šizofrenijom. Koristeći algoritme metaforidentifikacije i sentimentalne analize da bi automatski stvorili karakteristike, stvorili smo klasifikatoru, koji, sa visokom tačnošću, može predvidjeti koji će pacijent razviti (ili trenutno patiti od) šizofrenija. Za naše znanje, ova studija je prva koja pokazuje korisnost automatskih algoritma identifikacije metafora za otkrivanje ili predviđanje bolesti.', 'ro': 'Diagnosticul afecțiunilor grave de sănătate mintală, cum ar fi schizofrenia, se bazează pe judecata medicilor a căror pregătire durează mai mulți ani și nu poate fi ușor formalizată în măsuri obiective. Cu toate acestea, cercetările anterioare sugerează că există tulburări în aspecte ale utilizării limbajului pacienților cu schizofrenie. Folosind algoritmi de identificare metaforică și analiză sentimentală pentru a genera automat caracteristici, creăm un clasificator, care, cu mare precizie, poate prezice ce pacienți vor dezvolta (sau suferi în prezent de) schizofrenie. Din câte știm, acest studiu este primul care demonstrează utilitatea algoritmilor automate de identificare a metaforelor pentru detectarea sau predicția bolii.', 'si': 'සිසියෝෆ්\u200dරෙනියා වගේ සාධාරණ මානසික ස්ථානයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ අවුරුදු කීපයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ  නමුත්, මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා සිසියෝෆ්\u200dරෙනියාවෙන් රෝගියෝ භාෂා මෙටාෆෝර්-පරීක්ෂණය සහ විශේෂණය අල්ගෝරිතම් භාවිතා කරනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි විශේෂකයෙක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒක, උත් අපේ දන්නවට, මේ අධ්\u200dයානය තමයි පළමුවෙනි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරපු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අල්ගෝරිතම', 'so': "Diagnostiga shuruudaha caafimaadka dhimirka ah sida schizofrenia waxay ku saleysan yihiin xukunka dhakhaatiirta dhakhaatiirta waxbarashadooda ay qaadato dhawr sano, oo aan si fudud loogu bandhigi karin waxyaabaha la jeedo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada hore waxay muuqataa inay jiraan dhibaatooyin ku saabsan isticmaalka luqada bukaanka schizofrenia. Isku isticmaalaya aqoonsiga sawirada iyo sawirida kalgorityada si aan automatic u abuurno faa'iido, waxaynu abuurnaa fasax, si aad u sahlan, waxaynu ka hor dhigi karnaa in bukaanku ay horumari doonaan (ama haatan ku xanuunsan doonaan) schizofrenia. Aqoonsashadeenna, waxbarashadu waa kan ugu horeeyay in lagu caddeeyo isticmaalka aqoonsiga iskuulka ah oo loo yaqaan ama la sii sheego cudurka.", 'sv': 'Diagnosen av allvarliga psykiska tillstånd som schizofreni grundar sig på bedömningen av läkare vars utbildning tar flera år och inte lätt kan formaliseras i objektiva åtgärder. Tidigare forskning tyder dock på att det finns störningar i aspekter av språkanvändningen hos patienter med schizofreni. Med hjälp av metafor-identifiering och sentimentalanalys algoritmer för att automatiskt generera funktioner skapar vi en klassificerare, som med hög noggrannhet kan förutsäga vilka patienter som kommer att utveckla (eller för närvarande lider av) schizofreni. Såvitt vi vet är denna studie den första att visa nyttan av automatiserade metaforidentifieringsalgoritmer för upptäckt eller prediktion av sjukdom.', 'ta': 'தீவிரமான மருத்துவர்களின் தீர்வு அடிப்படையில் இருக்கிறது எளிதாக பயிற்சி எடுத்துக் கொண்டுள்ளது மற்றும் சுலபமாக வடிவமைக்க முடி ஆனால், முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் schizofrenia நோயாளிகளை பயன்படுத்தும் மொழியில் குழப்பம் இருக்கிறது என்பது தெரிவிக்கிறது. தன்னியக்கமாக குணங்களை உருவாக்க ஒரு வகுப்பாளரை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது உயர்த்த தெளிவாக இருக்கும் நோயாளிகள் யார் உருவாக்கும் (அல்லது தற்போது இருக்கும் போது வேதனை  எங்கள் அறிவிற்கு, இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி தானாகவே கண்டறிதல் அல்லது நோயை முன்வாக்குதல்.', 'ur': 'جن کی تعلیم چند سال طول ہوتی ہے اور آسان طور پر مستقل اندازے میں قائم نہیں ہوتی۔ لیکن پہلے کی تحقیقات کی توصیف کرتی ہے کہ اسکیزوفرنیا کے بیماروں کے استعمال کی زبان کی نسبت اختلاف ہے. مٹافور کی شناسایی اور احساسات-تحلیل الگوریتم کو استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ خصوصیات پیدا کریں، ہم ایک کلاسفار بناتے ہیں، کہ بالا دقیق سے، کس بیماروں کو (یا اکنون) سیزوفرنیا سے پکڑے گا۔ ہمارے علم کے لئے، یہ تحقیق پہلی ہے جو بیماری کی شناسایی یا پیش بینی کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Chẩn đoán về những điều kiện sức khỏe tinh thần nghiêm trọng như bệnh tâm thần phân liệt dựa trên đánh giá của những người y khoa đã mất vài năm, và không thể dễ dàng chính thức thành một phương pháp khách quan. Tuy nhiên, nghiên cứu trước cho thấy có sự rối loạn trong các khía cạnh sử dụng ngôn ngữ của bệnh nhân tâm thần phân liệt. Sử dụng thuật to án ẩn dụ nhận dạng và phân tích cảm xúc để tự động tạo ra các tính năng, chúng tôi tạo ra một phân loại, mà với độ chính xác cao, có thể dự đoán những bệnh nhân sẽ phát triển hay hiện ra phân liệt. Theo chúng tôi biết, nghiên cứu này là nghiên cứu đầu tiên nhằm chứng minh sự hữu ích của thuật to án ẩn dụ tự động để phát hiện hoặc dự đoán bệnh tật.', 'uz': "schizofreniya kabi darajali fikr holatlarini diagnostik bir necha yil o'tkazida o'tibor beradigan klinikalarning xususiyatlariga asoslangan. Bu muammolarning qismlarini o'rganadi va oddiy qanday foydalanish mumkin. Lekin oldingi taʼminotlar schizofreniya bo'lgan odamlarning tilidagi muammolar bor. Tafsilotni avtomatik aniqlash uchun metaphor identification va sentiment-analysis algoritlaridan foydalanish mumkin, biz bir klassiflarni yaramiz. Bu juda foydalanuvchi bo'lsa schizofreniya'ni qanchalik yaxshi tuzuvchi (yoki hozir yuzlab chiqaradi) deb hisoblash mumkin. Bu o'qituvchimizga, bizning ko'rinishimiz uchun avtomatik foydalanuvchining algoritlarini ko'rsatish yoki kasalliklarning oldini ko'rsatish uchun birinchi o'qituvchi.", 'bg': 'Диагнозата на сериозни психични заболявания като шизофрения се основава на преценката на клиници, чието обучение отнема няколко години и не може лесно да бъде формализирано в обективни мерки. Въпреки това, предишни изследвания показват, че има нарушения в аспектите на езиковата употреба на пациенти с шизофрения. Използвайки алгоритми за метафорно-идентификация и анализ на чувствата за автоматично генериране на функции, създаваме класификатор, който с висока точност може да предскаже кои пациенти ще развият (или понастоящем страдат от) шизофрения. Доколкото знаем, това изследване е първото, което демонстрира полезността на автоматизираните алгоритми за идентифициране на метафори за откриване или прогнозиране на болести.', 'hr': 'Diagnoza ozbiljnih stanja mentalnog zdravlja poput šizofrenija temeljena je na procjeni kliničara čija obuka traje nekoliko godina, te se ne može lako formalizirati u objektivne mjere. Međutim, prethodno istraživanje ukazuje na poremećaje u aspektima primjene jezika bolesnika s šizofrenijom. Koristeći algoritme metaforidentifikacije i sentimentalne analize kako bi automatski stvorili karakteristike, stvorili smo klasifikator, koji, s visokom preciznošću, može predvidjeti koji će bolesnici razviti (ili trenutno patiti) šizofreniju. Za naše znanje, ovo ispitivanje je prvo što pokazuje korisnost automatskih algoritma identifikacije metafora za otkrivanje ili predviđanje bolesti.', 'da': 'Diagnosen af alvorlige psykiske sygdomme som skizofreni er baseret på vurderingen af klinikere, hvis uddannelse tager flere år, og det kan ikke let formaliseres i objektive foranstaltninger. Tidligere forskning tyder dog på, at der er forstyrrelser i aspekter af sprogbrugen hos patienter med skizofreni. Ved hjælp af metafor-identifikation og sentiment-analyse algoritmer til automatisk at generere funktioner, skaber vi en klassificering, der med høj nøjagtighed kan forudsige, hvilke patienter der vil udvikle (eller i øjeblikket lider af) skizofreni. Så vidt vi ved, er dette studie den første til at demonstrere nytten af automatiserede metaforidentifikationsalgoritmer til detektion eller forudsigelse af sygdom.', 'nl': 'De diagnose van ernstige psychische aandoeningen zoals schizofrenie is gebaseerd op het oordeel van artsen wier opleiding meerdere jaren duurt en niet gemakkelijk kan worden geformaliseerd in objectieve maatregelen. Eerder onderzoek suggereert echter dat er verstoringen zijn in aspecten van het taalgebruik van patiënten met schizofrenie. Met behulp van metafoor-identificatie en sentiment-analyse algoritmes om automatisch functies te genereren, creëren we een classificator, die met hoge nauwkeurigheid kan voorspellen welke patiënten schizofrenie zullen ontwikkelen (of momenteel lijden aan). Voor zover wij weten, is deze studie de eerste die het nut aantoont van geautomatiseerde metafoor identificatie algoritmes voor detectie of voorspelling van ziekte.', 'de': 'Die Diagnose schwerer psychischer Erkrankungen wie Schizophrenie basiert auf dem Urteil von Ärzten, deren Ausbildung mehrere Jahre dauert und nicht leicht in objektive Maßnahmen formalisiert werden kann. Bisherige Forschungen deuten jedoch darauf hin, dass es Störungen in Aspekten des Sprachgebrauchs von Patienten mit Schizophrenie gibt. Mithilfe von Metaphern-Identifikations- und Sentiment-Analyse-Algorithmen zur automatischen Generierung von Merkmalen erstellen wir einen Klassifikator, der mit hoher Genauigkeit vorhersagen kann, welche Patienten Schizophrenie entwickeln (oder derzeit leiden). Nach unserem Wissen ist diese Studie die erste, die den Nutzen automatisierter Metaphern-Identifikationsalgorithmen für die Erkennung oder Vorhersage von Krankheiten demonstriert.', 'id': 'Diagnosis kondisi kesehatan mental serius seperti skizofrenia berdasarkan penilaian dari dokter yang pelatihan mengambil beberapa tahun, dan tidak dapat mudah formalisasi menjadi tindakan objektif. Namun, penelitian sebelumnya menunjukkan ada gangguan dalam aspek penggunaan bahasa pasien dengan skizofrenia. Menggunakan algoritma identifikasi-metafora dan analisis-sentimen untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan ciri-ciri, kami menciptakan klasifikasi, yang, dengan akurasi tinggi, dapat memprediksi pasien mana yang akan mengembangkan (atau saat ini menderita) skizofrenia. Menurut pengetahuan kita, penelitian ini adalah yang pertama untuk menunjukkan utilitas algoritma identifikasi metafora otomatis untuk deteksi atau prediksi penyakit.', 'ko': '정신분열증 등 심각한 심리건강 상태의 진단은 임상의사의 판단에 따른 것으로, 이들의 교육은 몇 년이 걸려 이를 객관적 지표로 공식화하기 어렵다.그러나 이전 연구에 따르면 정신분열증 환자는 언어 사용에 장애가 있는 것으로 나타났다.은유 식별과 감정 분석 알고리즘을 사용하여 자동으로 특징을 생성하고 우리는 분류기를 만들어서 어떤 환자가 정신분열증을 앓고 있는지 높은 정밀도로 예측할 수 있다.이 연구는 질병 검출이나 예측에서 자동 은유 식별 알고리즘의 실용성을 처음으로 증명한 것으로 알려졌다.', 'fa': 'تشخيص شرايط سلامتي رواني جدي مثل شيزوفرنيا بر اساس قضاوت از بيمارستان\u200cهايي که آموزش چند سال طول مي\u200cکشند، و نمي\u200cتواند به راحتي به اندازه\u200cهاي موضوع رسمي بشه. ولی تحقیقات قبلی پیش از این پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که در مورد استفاده از زبان بیماران با شیزوفرنیا ناراحتی وجود دارد. استفاده از الگوریتم\u200cهای شناسایی و تحلیل احساسات برای تولید خصوصیت\u200cهای خودکار، یک کلی\u200cشناسایی ایجاد می\u200cکنیم که با دقیق بالا می\u200cتواند پیش بینی کنیم که کدام بیماران (یا در حال حاضر از) شیزوفرنیا درحال تولید می\u200cکنند. برای دانش ما، این مطالعه اولین است که استفاده از الگوریتم شناسایی متعفری خودکار برای شناسایی یا پیش بینی بیماری را نشان دهد.', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa mazingira makubwa ya afya ya akili kama vile schizofrenia unajikita na uamuzi wa kliniki ambao mafunzo yanachukua miaka kadhaa, na haiwezi kuboresha kwa urahisi katika hatua za malengo. Hata hivyo, utafiti uliopita unaonyesha kuwa kuna tatizo katika masuala ya matumizi ya lugha ya wagonjwa wenye schizofrenia. Kwa kutumia algorithi za kutambua picha na uchambuzi wa hisia kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vipengele vya kujitegemea, tunatengeneza darasa, kwamba, kwa ufanisi mkubwa, wanaweza kutabiri wagonjwa wapi wataendelea (au kwa sasa wanakabiliwa na schizofrenia). Kwa ufahamu wetu, utafiti huu ni wa kwanza wa kuonyesha matumizi ya utambulisho wa vifaa vyenu vya kujitegemea kwa kutambua au kutabiri ugonjwa.', 'af': "Die diagnosis van ernstige geestelike gesondige voorwaardes soos schizophrenia is gebaseer op die oordeel van klinikaars wie se onderwerp verskeie jaar lank neem, en kan nie maklik in objektiewe maat formaliseer word nie. Maar voorree verondersoek beveel dat daar onderwerp is in aspekte van die taal gebruik van pasientes met schizophrenia. Gebruik van metaforidentifikasie en sentimentanalisie algoritme om outomaties funksies te genereer, skep ons 'n klassifiseerder, wat, met hoë presisie, kan voorskou watter pasiënte sal ontwikkel (of huidiglik lyk van) schizophrenia. Om ons kennis, is hierdie studie die eerste om die nutsprogram van outomatiese metaforidentifikasie algoritme te wys vir opdekking of voorskou van siekte.", 'sq': 'Diagnoza e kushteve serioze të shëndetit psikologjik të tilla si skizofrenia është bazuar në gjykimin e klinikëve që trajnimi i tyre zgjat disa vjet dhe nuk mund të formalizohet lehtë në masa objektive. Megjithatë, kërkimet e mëparshme sugjerojnë se ka shqetësime në aspektet e përdorimit të gjuhës të pacientëve me skizofreni. Duke përdorur algoritmet e identifikimit të metaforave dhe analizës së ndjenjave për të gjeneruar automatikisht karakteristika, ne krijojmë një klasifikues, i cili, me saktësi të lartë, mund të parashikojë se cili pacient do të zhvillohet (apo aktualisht do të vuajë nga) skizofrenia. Për njohurinë tonë, ky studim është i pari që demonstron përdorimin e algoritmeve automatike të identifikimit të metaforave për zbulimin apo parashikimin e sëmundjeve.', 'am': 'እንደschizophrenia ያሉት የmental ጤና አካባቢዎች ማግኘት የብዙ ዓመታት ማህበረሰብ በሚወስደው የኪሎኒያን ፍርድ ላይ በመሠረት ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የቀድሞው ትምህርት የschizophrenia የቋንቋ ቋንቋ የሚጠቀሙት መከራ ይታያል፡፡ የሜትፎር-identification እና የስሜት-አዳራሲ አሌጎሪትምን ለመፍጠር በተጠቀሙ ጊዜ ክፍላፊዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ To our knowledge, this study is the first to demonstrate the utility of automated metaphor identification algorithms for detection or prediction of disease.', 'tr': 'Şizofreniýa ýaly çykyş akyllyk saglygynyň şertleri diagnostiki birnäçe ýyl geçirilýän klinikleriň kararyna dayanýar we maksady düzmeklerine aňsatlyk şekilde formalýar. Ýöne öňki araştyrmalar şizofreniýa bilen usulylaryň dili ullanyşynyň aýratynda täsirler bardygyny düşünýär. Metafori-identifikaç we duýgular-analizi algoritmalaryny otomatik üýtgetmek üçin, bir klassifikatçi ullanýarys, ýokary dogry bilen nähili hastalaryň şizofreniýadan öwrenip (ýa-da häzirçe) çykarjakdygyny tahmin edip bileris. Bilgimize göre bu çalışma hastalanyň tanyş ýa öňünden aýtmak üçin awtomatik metaforler kimligi algoritmalaryň ullanyşyny görkezmek üçin ilkinji boldy.', 'hy': 'Խիստ մտավոր առողջապահության հիվանդությունների ախտորոշումը, ինչպիսիք են շիզոֆրենիան, հիմնված է այն բժիշկների դատողության վրա, որոնց ուսուցման համար մի քանի տարի է տևում, և դրանք հեշտությամբ չեն կարող ձևավոր Սակայն նախորդ հետազոտությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ շիզոֆրենիայով հիվանդների լեզվի օգտագործման ասպեկտներում խռովություններ կան: Օգտագործելով փոխաբերական հայտնաբերման և զգացմունքների վերլուծության ալգորիթմները, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծենք հատկանիշներ, մենք ստեղծում ենք դասակարգիչ, որը, բարձր ճշգրտությամբ, կարող է կանխատեսել, թե ո՞ր հիվանդ է զարգանա (կամ հիմա տա Մեր գիտելիքների կարծիքով, այս ուսումնասիրությունը առաջինն է, որ ցույց է տալիս հիվանդության հայտնաբերման կամ կանխատեսման ավտոմատիկ փոխաբերական ալգորիթմների օգտակարությունը:', 'az': 'Şizofrenija kimi ciddi mental sağlamlıq şəkillərinin dijagnozusu birkaç il alır və objektif ölçülərə asanlıqla formalizə edilə bilməz kliniklərin hökmünə dayandırılır. Ancaq əvvəlki araştırmalar, şizofreni olan hastaların dillərin istifadəsi haqqında rahatsız edilməsini iddia edir. Mətafor-kimlik və sentiment-analizi algoritmi istifadə edərək özellikləri otomatik olaraq yaratmaq üçün, biz bir klassifik yaradırıq ki, yüksək doğruluqla, hansı hastaların şizofreni təşkil edəcəyini təmin edə bilər. Bilməyimiz üçün bu təhsil, hastalığı keşfetmək və təsəvvür etmək üçün avtomatik metaforların istifadəsini göstərən ilk təhsil.', 'ca': "El diagnòstic de malalties graves de salut mental, com la esquizofrenia, es basa en el judici dels clínics els quals treballen durant molts anys i no es pot formar fàcilment en mesures objectives. Però la recerca anterior suggereix que hi ha perturbacions en aspectes de l'ús de la llengua dels pacients amb esquizofrenia. Utilitzant algoritmes d'identificació metàfora i anàlisi de sentiments per generar característiques automàticament, creem un classificador que, amb alta precisió, pot predir quins pacients desenvoluparà (o pateixerà actualment) esquizofrenia. Segons el nostre coneixement, aquest estudi és el primer a demostrar l'utilitat d'algoritmes d'identificació automàtica de metàfores per detectar o predir malalties.", 'cs': 'Diagnostika závažných duševních zdravotních stavů, jako je schizofrenie, je založena na úsudku klinických lékařů, jejichž výcvik trvá několik let a nelze je snadno formalizovat do objektivních opatření. Předchozí výzkum však naznačuje, že existují poruchy v aspektech jazykového užívání pacientů se schizofrenií. Pomocí algoritmů metaforické identifikace a analýzy sentimentů pro automatické generování funkcí vytváříme klasifikátor, který s vysokou přesností předpoví, kteří pacienti budou (nebo v současné době trpět) schizofrenií. Podle našich znalostí je tato studie první, která demonstruje užitečnost automatizovaných algoritmů identifikace metafor pro detekci nebo predikci onemocnění.', 'fi': 'Vakavien mielenterveyssairauksien, kuten skitsofrenian, diagnoosi perustuu useiden vuosien koulutukseen osallistuvien lääkäreiden arviointiin, eikä sitä voida helposti muodollistaa objektiivisiksi toimenpiteiksi. Aiemmat tutkimukset viittaavat kuitenkin siihen, että skitsofreniapotilaiden kielenkäyttöön liittyy häiriöitä. Käyttämällä metaforien tunnistus- ja tunteiden analysointialgoritmeja automaattisesti luoda ominaisuuksia, luomme luokittelijan, joka suurella tarkkuudella voi ennustaa, mitkä potilaat kehittyvät (tai kärsivät tällä hetkellä) skitsofreniasta. Tietojemme mukaan tämä tutkimus on ensimmäinen, joka osoittaa automaattisten metaforien tunnistusalgoritmien hyödyllisyyttä sairauksien havaitsemisessa tai ennustamisessa.', 'bs': 'Diagnoza ozbiljnih stanja mentalnog zdravlja poput šizofrenija temeljena je na presudi kliničara čija obuka traje nekoliko godina i ne može se lako formalizirati u objektivne mjere. Međutim, prethodno istraživanje sugerira da postoje poremećaji u aspektima primjene jezika bolesnika s šizofrenijom. Koristeći algoritme metaforidentifikacije i sentimentalne analize kako bi automatski stvorili karakteristike, stvorili smo klasifikator, koji, sa visokom preciznošću, može predvidjeti koji će pacijent razviti (ili trenutno patiti) šizofreniju. Za naše znanje, ova studija je prva koja pokazuje korisnost automatskih algoritma identifikacije metafora za otkrivanje ili predviđanje bolesti.', 'bn': 'The diagnosis of serious mental health conditions such as schizophrenia is based on the judgment of clinicians whose training takes several years, and cannot be easily formalized into objective measures.  তবে পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে ভাষার ব্যবহার করা রোগীদের ক্ষেত্রে বিভ্রান্তিগুলো রয়েছে। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করার জন্য মেটাফোর পরিচিতি এবং আবেগ-বিশ্লেষণ অ্যালগরিদম ব্যবহার করে আমরা একটি শ্রেণীবিষয়ক তৈরি করি, যে উচ্চপরিস্থিতির সাথে আমরা ভব আমাদের জ্ঞানের জন্য, এই গবেষণা হচ্ছে প্রথম যাতে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মেটাফোর পরিচিতির অ্যালগরিদমের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে', 'et': 'Tõsiste vaimse tervise seisundite, näiteks skisofreenia diagnoosimine põhineb arstide hinnangul, kelle koolitus võtab aega mitu aastat ja seda ei saa lihtsalt objektiivseteks meetmeteks vormistada. Varasemad uuringud näitavad siiski, et skisofreeniaga patsientide keelekasutuse aspektides esineb häireid. Kasutades metafoori identifitseerimise ja sentimentaalüüsi algoritme automaatseks funktsioonide genereerimiseks, loome klassifitseerija, mis suudab suure täpsusega ennustada, millistel patsientidel tekib (või praegu kannatab) skisofreenia. Meie teada on see uuring esimene, mis näitab automatiseeritud metafooride identifitseerimise algoritmide kasulikkust haiguste avastamisel või prognoosimisel.', 'ha': "Diagnore sharĩ'a masu alheri kamar misãlin shaƙofreni ne a kan zartar da ma'abũta matalauci, wanda ya yi amfani da su shẽkaru guda, kuma bã ya iya sakan an an danne su a cikin ma'abũcin lokaci. However, previous research suggests there are disturbances in aspects of the language use of patients with schizophrenia.  Yana amfani da algoritori na zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane, za'a ƙãga wani tsohon-ɗabi'a, ko kuma, idan yana da taƙaitacce, za'a gane cewa wagon za'a tsziofren. Ga saninmu, wannan littafi na farkon ya nuna amfani da algorityim na farat ɗaya na gani ko kuma ya yi bayani ga aikin jiran.", 'jv': 'Rasané sing dipunangé kapan sing wérti sing dikarepaké, kaya ngono kebebasan winih, dino ning kebebasan winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan dhéwé, lan ora iso ngejaraké diuwisan ngono nggawe aksi. Jupuk, akeh pancene tualah suggerekan karo akeh gak perusahaan anyar tentang karo pawaran kanggo nggambar barang sliwat karo winih. Ngawe ngubah metaphor-id karo penting Algorithm kuwi nggawe perusahaan manut, kita kebutuhan kelas, dadine susahe seneng pisan seneng wis dipenepakan (atawa iso disenyongno karo iso diangkat saben) politenes. Awakdhéwé karo hal-awakdhéwé, mbéwé kuwi ngéwangaké ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno karo hal-awakdhéwé metaphor sing otomatik dhéwé.', 'he': 'The diagnosis of serious mental health conditions such as schizophrenia is based on the judgment of clinicians whose training takes several years, and cannot be easily formalized into objective measures.  עם זאת, מחקרים קודמים מציעים שיש הפרעות בנושאים של השימוש בשפה של חולים עם סקיזופרניה. בשימוש אלגוריתמים של זיהוי מטאפורה ונבחן רגשות כדי ליצור אוטומטית תכונות, אנו יוצרים מסווג, שיכול, עם מדויקת גבוהה, לחזות איזה חולים יפתחו (או כרגע סובלים) מסכיזופרניה. לדעתנו, המחקר הזה הוא הראשון שהוכיח את היעילות של אלגוריתמי זיהוי מטאפורה אוטומטיים', 'sk': 'Diagnoza resnih duševnih bolezni, kot je shizofrenija, temelji na presoji zdravnikov, katerih usposabljanje traja več let in jih ni mogoče zlahka formalizirati v objektivne ukrepe. Vendar pa predhodne raziskave kažejo, da obstajajo motnje v vidikih uporabe jezika bolnikov s shizofrenijo. Z uporabo algoritmov metafore-identifikacije in analize sentimenta za avtomatsko generiranje funkcij ustvarimo klasifikator, ki z visoko natančnostjo lahko napove, kateri pacienti bodo razvili (ali trenutno trpeli za) shizofrenijo. Kolikor vemo, je ta študija prva, ki dokazuje uporabnost avtomatiziranih algoritmov za identifikacijo metaforov za odkrivanje ali napovedovanje bolezni.', 'bo': 'བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གནད་མེད་སྐྱོན་བརྟེན་ནས་གླེང་སྡོམ་པ་ཚོ་གི་གོ་སྐབས་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། གཞི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ལོ་རྒྱུས ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བརླག་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གསལ་བཤད་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཤེས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་པ་དེ་ནི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྟོགས་པར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཛུགས་སྤྱོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་རྟོགས་ཐ'}
{'en': 'Truth of Varying Shades : Analyzing Language in Fake News and Political Fact-Checking', 'ar': 'حقيقة اختلاف الظلال: تحليل اللغة في الأخبار الكاذبة وتقصي الحقائق السياسية', 'es': 'Verdad de diferentes matices: análisis del lenguaje en noticias falsas y verificación de datos políticos', 'pt': 'A verdade dos vários tons: analisando a linguagem em notícias falsas e checagem de fatos políticos', 'fr': 'La vérité aux nuances variées\xa0: analyse du langage dans les fausses nouvelles et vérification des faits politiques', 'ja': 'さまざまな色合いの真実：フェイクニュースと政治的ファクトチェックで言語を分析する', 'zh': '异色调之情:析假新闻之言,与政之核', 'hi': 'अलग-अलग रंगों की सच्चाई: नकली समाचार और राजनीतिक तथ्य-जांच में भाषा का विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Правда о различных оттенках: анализ языка в фейковых новостях и политическая проверка фактов', 'ga': 'Fírinne na Scáthanna Éagsúla: Anailís a dhéanamh ar Theanga i Nuacht Bréige agus Seiceáil Fíricí Polaitíochta', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული შინების სიმართლე: წარმოდგენება წარმოდგენებაში და პოლიტიკური ფაქტის შემოწმება', 'el': 'Αλήθεια των ποικίλων σκιών: Ανάλυση της γλώσσας στα ψεύτικα νέα και έλεγχος πολιτικών γεγονότων', 'hu': 'A különböző árnyalatok igazsága: A nyelv elemzése hamis hírekben és politikai tények ellenőrzésében', 'it': 'Verità di sfumature diverse: analizzare il linguaggio nelle notizie false e controllare i fatti politici', 'lt': 'Įvairių šešėlių tiesa: kalbos analizė suklastotose žiniose ir politinių faktų tikrinimas', 'mk': 'Truth of Varying Shades: Analyzing Language in Fake News and Political Fact-Checking', 'kk': 'Түрлі көлеңкелер шындығы: Тілді жаңалықтар мен саяси факттерді тексеру', 'ms': 'Kebenaran Bayangan Berberbeza: Menganalisis Bahasa dalam Berita palsu dan Pemeriksaan Fakta Politik', 'mt': 'Truth of Varying Shadows: Analyzing Language in False News and Political Fact-Checking', 'ml': 'മാറ്റുന്ന നിഴലുകളുടെ സത്യം: ഫെയിക്ക് വാര്\u200dത്തകളിലും രാഷ്ട്രീയത്തിലും പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ', 'mn': 'Өөр өөрчлөлтийн нүдний үнэн: Хуудлын мэдээлэл, улс төрийн үнэн шалгалтын хэл шинжилгээ', 'no': 'Sannhet på varierende skyggar: Analiserer språk i falske nyhetar og politiske faktisksjekking', 'pl': 'Prawda o różnych odcieniach: analiza języka w fałszywych wiadomościach i sprawdzanie faktów politycznych', 'ro': 'Adevărul nuanțelor diferite: analiza limbajului în știrile false și verificarea faptelor politice', 'so': 'Rugta isbedelka: Analysing afka ee warqada fake- iyo xaqiiqda suuqa siyaasada', 'si': 'වෙනස් ශේඩ්ස් ඇත්ත: බොරු වාර්තාව සහ රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණයේ භාෂාව විශේෂ කරනවා', 'sv': 'Sanningen om olika nyanser: Analysera språk i falska nyheter och politisk faktakontroll', 'sr': 'Istina o različitim sjenama: Analiziranje jezika u lažnim vijestima i provjeravanju političkih činjenica', 'ta': 'மாறிகளின் உண்மை: பொய் செய்தி மற்றும் அரசியல் முகப்பு சரிபார்ப்பு', 'ur': 'مختلف چھاؤں کی حقیقت: فعل خبریں اور سیاسی حقیقت-Checking میں زبان کا تحلیل کرنا', 'vi': 'Sự thật của thay đổi Bóng tối: phân tích ngôn ngữ trên bản tin giả và kiểm tra thực tế chính trị', 'uz': 'Oò£zgaruvchining soyasi haqiqiqiy: Tilni oò£zgartirish va siyosa haqida tekshirish', 'da': 'Sandheden om forskellige nuancer: Analyse af sprog i falske nyheder og politisk fakta-kontrol', 'nl': 'Waarheid van verschillende schaduwen: Taalanalyse in nepnieuws en politieke feitencontrole', 'bg': 'Истината за различните нюанси: Анализиране на езика при фалшиви новини и проверка на политическите факти', 'de': 'Wahrheit der unterschiedlichen Schattierungen: Sprache in Fake News analysieren und politische Fakten überprüfen', 'ko': '변화무쌍한 진상: 가짜 뉴스에서의 언어 분석과 정치 사실 조사', 'sw': 'Ukweli wa Vvugu vya Kutofauti: Anachambua Lugha katika Habari za uongo na Kuchunguza Ukweli wa Siasa', 'id': 'Kebenaran dari Bayangan Berbeda: Analisasi Bahasa dalam Berita palsu dan Pemeriksaan Fakta Politis', 'tr': 'Çeşitli kölgeler hakykaty: Dili ýalňyş haberler we syýasy Hatlary barlamak', 'af': 'Waardheid van Varying Shades: Analiseer Taal in Falke Nuus en Politiese Fakte-Kontrolering', 'sq': 'E vërteta e hijeve të ndryshme: Analizimi i gjuhës në lajmet e rreme dhe kontrollimi i fakteve politike', 'am': 'የሳኦል ዜና እና የፖለቲካ ስህተት መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Տարբեր երանգների ճշմարտությունը. լեզուների վերլուծությունը կեղծ նորություններում և քաղաքական փաստերի ստուգելը', 'az': 'Çeşitməyən kölgələr haqqı: Dili yalan xəbərlərin və siyasi faktların təşkil etməsi', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন সংবাদ এবং রাজনৈতিক ফ্যাক্ট পরীক্ষায় ভাষা বিশ্লেষণ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Istina o različitim sjenama: Analiziranje jezika u lažnim vijestima i provjeravanju političkih činjenica', 'hr': 'Istina o različitim sjenama: Analiziranje jezika u lažnim vijestima i provjeravanju političkih činjenica', 'ca': 'La veritat de les ombres variades: Analitzar la llengua en notícies falses i verificar els fets polítics', 'fa': 'حقیقت از سایه\u200cهای متفاوتی: تحلیل زبان در اخبار دروغ و بررسی حقیقت سیاسی', 'cs': 'Pravda různých odstínů: Analýza jazyka ve falešných zprávách a kontrola politických faktů', 'et': 'Tõde varieeruvatest varjudest: keele analüüsimine valeuudistes ja poliitiliste faktide kontrollimine', 'fi': 'Truth of Variing Shades: Kielen analysointi vÃĪÃĪrissÃĪ uutisissa ja poliittisten faktojen tarkistaminen', 'he': 'אמת צללים שונים: ניתוח שפה בחדשות מזויפות ובדיקת עובדות פוליטיות', 'sk': 'Resnica različnih senc: analiziranje jezika v lažnih novicah in preverjanje političnih dejstev', 'jv': 'Hawek karo Variying shades: Analising Language kanggo Kebebasan Hawek lan Ngawe Perintah Pantian', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Truth of Varying Shades: Language analysis in Fake News and Political Fact-Checking of Language'}
{'en': 'We present an analytic study on the language of news media in the context of political fact-checking and fake news detection. We compare the language of real news with that of satire, hoaxes, and propaganda to find linguistic characteristics of untrustworthy text. To probe the feasibility of automatic political fact-checking, we also present a case study based on PolitiFact.com using their factuality judgments on a 6-point scale. Experiments show that while media fact-checking remains to be an open research question, stylistic cues can help determine the truthfulness of text.', 'ar': 'نقدم دراسة تحليلية للغة وسائل الإعلام الإخبارية في سياق تدقيق الحقائق السياسية وكشف الأخبار المزيفة. نحن نقارن لغة الأخبار الحقيقية مع لغة التهكم والخداع والدعاية لإيجاد الخصائص اللغوية للنص غير الموثوق به. للتحقق من جدوى التحقق التلقائي من الحقائق السياسية ، نقدم أيضًا دراسة حالة استنادًا إلى PolitiFact.com باستخدام أحكامهم الواقعية على مقياس مكون من 6 نقاط. تظهر التجارب أنه في حين أن التحقق من الحقائق في وسائل الإعلام لا يزال سؤالًا مفتوحًا للبحث ، يمكن أن تساعد الإشارات الأسلوبية في تحديد مصداقية النص.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une étude analytique sur le langage des médias d'information dans le contexte de la vérification des faits politiques et de la détection des fausses nouvelles. Nous comparons le langage des nouvelles réelles à celui de la satire, des canulars et de la propagande afin de trouver les caractéristiques linguistiques d'un texte peu fiable. Pour étudier la faisabilité de la vérification automatique des faits politiques, nous présentons également une étude de cas basée sur Politifact.com utilisant leurs jugements de factualité sur une échelle de 6 points. Les expériences montrent que, même si la vérification des faits dans les médias reste une question ouverte, les indices stylistiques peuvent aider à déterminer la véracité du texte.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um estudo analítico sobre a linguagem da mídia noticiosa no contexto da checagem de fatos políticos e detecção de notícias falsas. Comparamos a linguagem das notícias reais com a da sátira, fraudes e propaganda para encontrar características linguísticas de texto não confiável. Para investigar a viabilidade da verificação automática de fatos políticos, também apresentamos um estudo de caso baseado no PolitiFact.com usando seus julgamentos de factualidade em uma escala de 6 pontos. Experimentos mostram que, embora a verificação de fatos da mídia continue sendo uma questão de pesquisa aberta, dicas estilísticas podem ajudar a determinar a veracidade do texto.', 'es': 'Presentamos un estudio analítico sobre el lenguaje de los medios de comunicación en el contexto de la verificación de hechos políticos y la detección de noticias falsas. Comparamos el lenguaje de las noticias reales con el de la sátira, los engaños y la propaganda para encontrar características lingüísticas de textos poco fiables. Para investigar la viabilidad de la verificación automática de los hechos políticos, también presentamos un estudio de caso basado en Politifact.com que utiliza sus juicios de hechos en una escala de 6 puntos. Los experimentos muestran que, si bien la verificación de datos de los medios sigue siendo una pregunta de investigación abierta, las señales estilísticas pueden ayudar a determinar la veracidad del texto.', 'ja': '政治的ファクトチェックとフェイクニュース検出の文脈で、ニュースメディアの言語に関する分析的研究を提示します。私たちは、本当のニュースの言語を風刺、騙し、プロパガンダの言語と比較して、信頼できないテキストの言語的特徴を見つけます。自動政治的ファクトチェックの実現可能性を探るために、PolitiFact.comに基づき、6段階の事実判断を用いたケーススタディも提示しています。実験によると、メディアファクトチェックはオープンな研究課題であり続けているが、文体の手がかりはテキストの真実性を判断するのに役立つことが示されている。', 'zh': '考之以政,假新闻之背景,新闻媒体之以言。 以真新闻之言与刺,恶作剧与宣传之语较之,以见不可信之语。 考自治之可行性,立 PolitiFact.com 例,以6分制事实。 实验明,虽媒体核犹一开究,而文线可助定文本之实。', 'hi': 'हम राजनीतिक तथ्यों की जांच और नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के संदर्भ में समाचार मीडिया की भाषा पर एक विश्लेषणात्मक अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम वास्तविक समाचार की भाषा की तुलना व्यंग्य, धोखा और प्रचार के साथ करते हैं ताकि अविश्वसनीय पाठ की भाषाई विशेषताओं को ढूंढा जा सके। स्वचालित राजनीतिक तथ्य-जांच की व्यवहार्यता की जांच करने के लिए, हम 6-बिंदु पैमाने पर अपने तथ्यात्मकता निर्णयों का उपयोग करके PolitiFact.com के आधार पर एक केस स्टडी भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि जबकि मीडिया तथ्य-जांच एक खुला शोध प्रश्न है, शैलीगत संकेत पाठ की सच्चाई को निर्धारित करने में मदद कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем аналитическое исследование языка СМИ в контексте политической проверки фактов и выявления фейковых новостей. Мы сравниваем язык реальных новостей с языком сатиры, мистификации и пропаганды, чтобы найти языковые характеристики ненадежного текста. Чтобы проверить возможность автоматической политической проверки фактов, мы также представляем тематическое исследование на основе PolitiFact.com, используя их суждения о фактах по 6-балльной шкале. Эксперименты показывают, что, хотя проверка фактов в СМИ остается открытым вопросом исследования, стилистические подсказки могут помочь определить правдивость текста.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair staidéar anailíse ar theanga na meán nuachta i gcomhthéacs seiceáil fíricí polaitiúla agus braite nuachta bréige. Déanaimid comparáid idir teanga na fíor-nuachta agus teanga na haoir, na hoaxes, agus na bolscaireachta chun tréithe teanga an téacs neamhiontaofa a fháil. Chun féidearthacht seiceáil fíorais pholaitiúil uathoibríoch a fhiosrú, cuirimid i láthair freisin cás-staidéar bunaithe ar PolitiFact.com ag baint úsáide as a gcuid breithiúnais fhíorais ar scála 6 phointe. Léiríonn turgnaimh cé go bhfuil seiceáil fíricí na meán fós ina cheist taighde oscailte, is féidir le leideanna stíle cabhrú le fírinneacht an téacs a chinneadh.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια αναλυτική μελέτη σχετικά με τη γλώσσα των ΜΜΕ ειδήσεων στο πλαίσιο του πολιτικού ελέγχου γεγονότων και της ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων. Συγκρίνουμε τη γλώσσα των πραγματικών ειδήσεων με εκείνη της σάτιρας, των ψευτών και της προπαγάνδας για να βρούμε γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά αναξιόπιστου κειμένου. Για να διερευνηθεί η σκοπιμότητα του αυτόματου ελέγχου πολιτικών γεγονότων, παρουσιάζουμε επίσης μια μελέτη περίπτωσης βασισμένη στο PolitiFact. Οι αποφάσεις τους σχετικά με την πραγματι\xadκότητα σε κλίμακα έξι σημείων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι ενώ ο έλεγχος των γεγονότων των μέσων ενημέρωσης παραμένει ένα ανοικτό ερευνητικό ερώτημα, οι στυλιστικές ενδείξεις μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στον προσδιορισμό της αλήθειας του κειμένου.', 'hu': 'Elemző tanulmányt mutatunk be a hírmédia nyelvéről a politikai tények ellenőrzése és a hamis hírek felismerése kontextusában. Összehasonlítjuk a valódi hírek nyelvét a szatírával, a csalásokkal és a propaganda nyelvével, hogy megtaláljuk a megbízhatatlan szöveg nyelvi jellemzőit. Az automatikus politikai tényállás megvalósíthatóságának vizsgálatára bemutatunk egy esettanulmányt a PolitiFact alapján. a tényszerűségi ítéletek 6 pontos skálán történő felhasználásával. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy miközben a média tényleges ellenőrzése továbbra is nyitott kutatási kérdés, a stilisztikai utalások segíthetnek meghatározni a szöveg valóságát.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახლა ინფორმაციის მედიაზე ანალიტიკური განსწავლება პოლიტიკური ფაქტის შემოწმება და ტალქტიკური ინფორმაციის განსწავლების კონტექსტში. ჩვენ რეალური ინფორმაციების ენათის შემდგომარებით სიატირებით, ზექსირებით და პროპადანდის შემდგომარებით, რომ ინგურაციელი ტექსტის ლენგურისტიკური პროპრატი რომ ავტომატიკური პოლიტიკური ფაქტის შემოწმებას შემოწმება, ჩვენ ასევე კითხვა პოლიტიკური ფექტის ბაზაზე გავაკეთებთ. com იყენებს მათი ტაკუალურობის შესახებ 6 წერტილის მაგალითში. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ მედია ფაქტის შემოწმება გახსნა კითხვა, სტილისტიკური სიმბოლოები შეუძლია დახმარება ტექსტის სიმართლის შესაძლებლობა.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame analizinį žiniasklaidos kalbos tyrimą politinių faktų patikrinimo ir suklastotų žiniasklaidų aptikimo kontekste. Palyginame tikrų naujienų kalbą su satyro, apgaulės ir propagandos kalba, kad rastume nepatikimo teksto kalbines savybes. Siekdami ištirti automatinio politinio faktų patikrinimo galimybes, taip pat pateiksime bylų tyrimą, pagrįstą PolitiFact. com naudojant 6 punktų masto faktinius sprendimus. Eksperimentai rodo, kad nors žiniasklaidos faktų tikrinimas tebėra atviras mokslinių tyrimų klausimas, stilistiniai ženklai gali padėti nustatyti teksto tikrumą.', 'it': "Presentiamo uno studio analitico sul linguaggio dei media nel contesto del controllo politico dei fatti e del rilevamento delle fake news. Confrontiamo il linguaggio delle notizie reali con quello della satira, delle bufale e della propaganda per trovare caratteristiche linguistiche di testi inaffidabili. Per verificare la fattibilità del controllo automatico dei fatti politici, presentiamo anche un caso studio basato su PolitiFact. L'applicazione delle loro sentenze di fatto su una scala di 6 punti. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che mentre il controllo dei fatti sui media rimane una domanda aperta di ricerca, gli indizi stilistici possono aiutare a determinare la veridicità del testo.", 'mk': 'Презентираме аналитичка студија за јазикот на новинските медиуми во контекст на политичко проверување на фактите и лажно детектирање на вестите. Го споредуваме јазикот на вистинските вести со јазикот на сатирот, магиите и пропагандата за да најдеме јазични карактеристики на неповерлив текст. To probe the feasibility of automatic political fact-checking, we also present a case study based on PolitiFact. ком користејќи ги нивните пресуди за факталност на скала од 6 точки. Експериментите покажуваат дека иако проверката на фактите на медиумите останува отворено прашање за истражување, стилистичките знаци можат да помогнат во одредувањето на вистината на текстот.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan kajian analitik bahasa media berita dalam konteks pemeriksaan fakta politik dan pengesan berita palsu. We compare the language of real news with that of satire, hoaxes, and propaganda to find linguistic characteristics of untrustworthy text.  Untuk menyelidiki kemungkinan pemeriksaan fakta politik secara automatik, kami juga memperkenalkan kajian kes berdasarkan PolitiFact. com menggunakan penilaian faktualiti mereka pada skala 6 titik. Experiments show that while media fact-checking remains to be an open research question, stylistic cues can help determine the truthfulness of text.', 'ml': 'രാഷ്ട്രീയ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും തെറ്റായ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും പ്രഭാഷയ നമ്മള്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വിശ്വസിക്കാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത് സ്വയം രാഷ്ട്രീയ കാര്യം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം തെളിയിക്കാന്\u200d, പോലിസ്റ്റ് ഫാക്റ്റിനെ അട അവരുടെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിധികള്\u200d 6 പോയിന്റ് തൂക്കത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ട്. Experiments show that while media fact-checking remains to be an open research question, stylistic cues can help determine the truthfulness of text.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw studju analitiku dwar il-lingwa tal-midja tal-aħbarijiet fil-kuntest tal-verifika politika tal-fatti u l-individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet foloz. Aħna nqabblu l-lingwa tal-aħbarijiet reali ma’ dik tas-satir, il-ħżiena, u l-propaganda biex isibu karatteristiċi lingwistiċi ta’ test mhux affidabbli. Biex tiġi eżaminata l-fattibbiltà tal-verifika awtomatika tal-fatti politiċi, qed nippreżentaw ukoll studju ta’ każ ibbażat fuq PolitiFact. com bl-użu tas-sentenzi fattwali tagħhom fuq skala ta’ 6 punti. L-esperimenti juru li filwaqt li l-verifika tal-fatti tal-midja tibqa’ kwistjoni ta’ riċerka miftuħa, sinjali stilistiċi jistgħu jgħinu biex tiġi ddeterminata l-verità tat-test.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein analysk studie om språket av nyhetsmedium i konteksten av politiske faktisksjekking og falske informasjon. Vi sammenliknar språket på verkeleg nyhetar med det av satir, frakser og propaganda for å finna lingviske karakteristikk av uttrukkeleg tekst. For å prøve at det kan gjerast automatisk politisk faktisk kontroll, presenterer vi også ein tilfellesstudie basert på PolitiFact. com med dei faktiske sprøytebrukane på ein 6-punktskala. Eksperimentar viser at mens kontrollering av mediefaktet er ei opna forskningsspørsmål, kan stylistiske teikn hjelpa til å bestemme sannheten på teksten.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy analityczne badanie nad językiem mediów informacyjnych w kontekście politycznego sprawdzania faktów i wykrywania fake news. Porównujemy język prawdziwych wiadomości z językiem satyry, oszustw i propagandy, aby znaleźć cechy językowe niegodnego zaufania tekstu. Aby zbadać możliwość automatycznego sprawdzania faktów politycznych, przedstawiamy również studium przypadku oparte na PolitiFact. wykorzystując swoje orzeczenia faktyczne w skali 6-punktowej. Eksperymenty pokazują, że chociaż sprawdzanie faktów medialnych pozostaje otwartym pytaniem badawczym, stylistyczne wskazówki mogą pomóc określić prawdziwość tekstu.', 'mn': 'Бид улс төрийн мэдээллийн хэл дээр шинжилгээний судалгаа, худлаа мэдээллийн шинжилгээ судалж өгсөн. Бид жинхэнэ мэдээний хэлийг сайхан, сэтгэл хөдлөл, дэлхийн тухай харьцуулж, итгэл итгэлгүй текстүүдийн хэлний чадварыг олдог. Автоматик улс төрийн үнэндээ шалгах боломжтой байдлыг судалж үзэхийн тулд бид PolitiFact-ын үндсэн судалгааг илтгэнэ. 6 цэгийн хэмжээнд бодит байдлыг ашиглаж байна. Үнэндээ мэдээллийн үнэндээ шалгалт нь нээлттэй судалгааны асуулт байхдаа стилист үзүүлэлт нь текст үнэндээ тодорхойлж чадна.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo analitičku studiju o jeziku novinskih medija u kontekstu provjere političkih činjenica i lažnog otkrivanja vesti. Uspoređujemo jezik prave vijesti sa satirom, prevarom i propagandom kako bi pronašli jezičke karakteristike nevjerojatnog teksta. Da bismo provjerili mogućnost automatskog provjere političkih činjenica, predstavili smo i studiju slučaja na temelju PolitiFakta. com koristeći svoje osude na 6 bodova. Eksperimenti pokazuju da dok kontrola činjenica medija ostaje otvoreno istraživanje, stilistički znakovi mogu pomoći da utvrde istinu teksta.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un studiu analitic privind limbajul mass-media de știri în contextul verificării faptelor politice și detectării știrilor false. Comparăm limbajul știrilor reale cu cel al satirei, farselor și propagandei pentru a găsi caracteristicile lingvistice ale textului nedemn de încredere. Pentru a investiga fezabilitatea verificării automate a faptelor politice, prezentăm, de asemenea, un studiu de caz bazat pe PolitiFact. Comisia utilizează hotărârile privind caracterul de fapt pe o scară de 6 puncte. Experimentele arată că, în timp ce verificarea faptelor media rămâne o întrebare deschisă de cercetare, indiciile stilistice pot ajuta la determinarea adevărului textului.', 'si': 'අපි විශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ වාර්තාව මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ භාෂාව පෙන්වන්නේ රජාත්\u200dය පරීක්ෂ අපි ඇත්ත වාර්තාවේ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සේටිර්, හොක්ස්, සහ ප්\u200dරොපාගන්ඩා වලින් විශ්වාසික විශේෂ විශේෂ ව ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි පොලිටිෆැක්ට් විධානය com ඔවුන්ගේ ඇත්ත විශ්වාස නිර්දේශය 6-පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මිඩියාව ඇත්ත පරීක්ෂණා පරීක්ෂණයක් විවෘත විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ස්ටිලිස්ට', 'kk': 'Біз жаңалық медиақтар тілінде саяси факттерді тексеру және жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау контекстінде аналитикалық зерттеуді таңдаймыз. Біз шындық жаңалықтардың тілін сатр, жұмыс және пропаганда мәтіннің лингвистикалық қасиеттерін табу үшін сатырымен салыстырамыз. Автоматты саяси тексерудің мүмкіндігін тексеру үшін, біз де PolitiFact негізіндегі жағдай зерттеуді таңдаймыз. 6 нүкте масштабтағы шындық түсініктемелерін қолданады. Тәжірибелер медиа тексеруді ашық зерттеу сұрағы болғанда, стильстик белгілер мәтіннің дұрыстығын анықтауға көмектеседі.', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa waxbarasho analyo ah oo ku qoran luqada macluumaadka warbixinta, marka lagu jiro baaritaanka siyaasada iyo baaritaanka warbixinta been ah. Luqada warqada runta ah waxaynu isbarbardhignaa si ay u helaan waxyaabaha luqada ah oo aan la aamin karin. Sidoo kale waxaynu keennaa waxbarasho xaalad ku saleysan siyaasadeed. Com isticmaalaya xukummadooda runta ah oo ku qoran 6 point. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in marka xaqiiqsiga baaritaanka media ay sii jiraan su'aal furan, cudurada isticmaalka ayaa caawinaya in ay caddeyso runta qoraalka.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en analytisk studie om nyhetsmediers språk i samband med politisk faktakontroll och fake news detection. Vi jämför språket i verkliga nyheter med språket satir, bluffar och propaganda för att hitta språkliga egenskaper hos opålitlig text. För att undersöka möjligheten till automatisk politisk faktakontroll presenterar vi också en fallstudie baserad på PolitiFact. Kommissionen använder sina faktaunderlag på en 6-punktsskala. Experiment visar att även om mediefaktakontroll fortfarande är en öppen forskningsfråga, kan stilistiska ledtrådar hjälpa till att avgöra textens sanning.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு செய்தி ஊடகங்களின் மொழியில் ஒரு ஆராய்ச்சியை கொண்டுவருகிறோம் ராசியல் உண்மையை சரிபார்த்து போலி ச நாம் உண்மையான செய்திகளின் மொழியை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் வேறுபாடு, ஹோக்ஸ், மற்றும் பரப்பும் மொழியை நம்பாத உரையின் மொழியில்  தானியங்கி அரசியல் உண்மையை சரிபார்ப்பதற்கு தெரியும், நாம் ஒரு கேச்சு ஆய்வு கொண்டு PolitiFact அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது. com using their factuality judgments on a 6-point scale.  பரிசோதனைகள் தெரியும் போது ஊடகங்கள் உண்மையை பரிசோதிக்கும் போது திறந்த ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்வி இருக்கும் போது, பாணியல் கூ', 'ur': 'ہم نے اخبار میڈیا کی زبان پر ایک تحقیق کی تحقیق کو سیاسی حقیقت کی چک اور جھوٹی اخبار کی شناسایی میں پیش کیا ہے. ہم واقعی خبروں کی زبان کی مثال سناتے ہیں کہ اس کے ذریعے سایٹر، جذب اور پراپاگنڈ کی زبان کی خصوصی پیدا کریں سیاسی حقیقت کی تحقیقات کے امکانات کا تحقیق کرنے کے لئے، ہم بھی سیاسی حقیقت پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں ایک کیس تحقیق. کم اپنی حقیقت کے فیصلے کے مطابق 6 پوینٹ کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب میڈیا حقیقت چک رہی ہے تو ایک کھلی تحقیق سوال ہے، استیلیسٹی نشانیاں متن کی سچائی کا فیصلہ کر سکتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một nghiên cứu tích cực về ngôn ngữ của truyền thông tin trong trường hợp kiểm tra sự thật chính trị và phát hiện tin giả. Chúng ta so sánh ngôn ngữ của tin tức thật với ngôn ngữ của mỉa mai, lừa đảo, và tuyên truyền để tìm ra tính chất ngôn ngữ của văn bản không đáng tin cậy. Để nghiên cứu khả năng kiểm tra chính trị tự động, chúng tôi cũng đưa ra một trường hợp dựa trên PolitiFact. sử dụng các phán quyết tình hình theo quy mô 6-điểm. Thí nghiệm cho thấy, trong khi kiểm tra dữ liệu truyền thông vẫn còn là một câu hỏi nghiên cứu mở, các gợi ý thiết kế có thể giúp xác định sự thật của văn bản.', 'uz': "Biz xavfsiz haqiqida tekshirish va falsk xabar aniqlash muhimkoniyati haqida yangiliklar media tillarini aniqlab olamiz. Biz haqiqiqiy yangiliklar tilini tasavvur qilamiz, xavfs va propaganda ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin emas matnning tillarini topish. Автоматик сиёсий ҳужжатни текшириш имкониятини аниқлаш учун, биз ҳам PolitiFact asosida bir kashfa-ta-qidirishni ҳозир кўрсатамиз. com using their factuality judgments on a 6-point scale.  Tajribalarni ko'rsatadi, media haqiqiqiy tekshirishda ochiq qidirish soʻrovi bo'lganda, uslublar matnning haqiqatni aniqlashga yordam beradi.", 'bg': 'Представяме аналитично изследване на езика на медиите в контекста на политическата проверка на фактите и откриването на фалшиви новини. Сравняваме езика на реалните новини с този на сатирата, измамите и пропагандата, за да открием лингвистичните характеристики на недоверим текст. За да проучим осъществимостта на автоматичната политическа проверка на фактите, представяме и казус, базиран на ПолитиФакт. Комисията използва своите решения за фактическост по скала от 6 точки. Експериментите показват, че докато медийната проверка остава отворен изследователски въпрос, стилистичните знаци могат да помогнат да се определи истинността на текста.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en analytisk undersøgelse af nyhedsmediers sprog i forbindelse med politisk fact-checking og fake news detektion. Vi sammenligner sproget i virkelige nyheder med sproget satire, snyd og propaganda for at finde sproglige karakteristika ved upålidelig tekst. For at undersøge muligheden for automatisk politisk fact-kontrol præsenterer vi også et casestudie baseret på PolitiFact. Kommissionen anvender deres faktiske domme på en 6-punktsskala. Eksperimenter viser, at mens mediefaktakontrol stadig er et åbent forskningsspørgsmål, kan stilistiske signaler hjælpe med at bestemme sandheden af tekst.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sebuah studi analitis tentang bahasa media berita dalam konteks pemeriksaan fakta politik dan deteksi berita palsu. Kami membandingkan bahasa berita nyata dengan bahasa satir, penipuan, dan propaganda untuk menemukan karakteristik bahasa teks yang tidak dipercaya. Untuk menyelidiki feasibilitas pemeriksaan fakta politik otomatis, kami juga mempersembahkan studi kasus berdasarkan PolitiFact. com menggunakan penilaian faktualitas mereka pada skala 6 poin. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa sementara pemeriksaan fakta media tetap menjadi pertanyaan penelitian terbuka, tanda-tanda stilistik dapat membantu menentukan kebenaran teks.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine analytische Studie zur Sprache von Nachrichtenmedien im Kontext von Political Fact Checking und Fake News Detection. Wir vergleichen die Sprache realer Nachrichten mit der von Satire, Hoaxes und Propaganda, um sprachliche Merkmale unzuverlässiger Texte zu finden. Um die Machbarkeit einer automatischen politischen Faktenüberprüfung zu untersuchen, stellen wir außerdem eine Fallstudie auf Basis von PolitiFact vor. Die Kommission hat ihre Sachverhaltsurteile auf einer 6-Punkte-Skala angewandt. Experimente zeigen, dass die mediale Faktenüberprüfung zwar eine offene Forschungsfrage bleibt, aber stilistische Hinweise helfen können, die Wahrhaftigkeit von Texten zu bestimmen.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een analytisch onderzoek naar de taal van nieuwsmedia in het kader van politieke fact-checking en fake news detectie. We vergelijken de taal van echt nieuws met die van satire, hoaxes en propaganda om taalkundige kenmerken van onbetrouwbare tekst te vinden. Om de haalbaarheid van automatische politieke feitencontrole te onderzoeken, presenteren we ook een case study gebaseerd op PolitiFact. De Commissie is van oordeel dat zij op een 6-puntenschaal feitelijk oordeelt. Experimenten tonen aan dat, hoewel media fact-checking een open onderzoeksvraag blijft, stilistische aanwijzingen kunnen helpen de waarheidsgetrouwheid van tekst te bepalen.', 'ko': '우리는 정치 사실 조사와 허위 뉴스 검측 배경에서 뉴스 매체의 언어를 분석 연구했다.우리는 진실한 뉴스의 언어와 풍자, 악작극, 홍보의 언어를 비교하여 믿을 수 없는 텍스트의 언어 특징을 발견할 것이다.자동 정치 사실 검사의 타당성을 탐구하기 위해 우리는 폴리티팩트 기반의 사례 연구도 제공했다.com은 6점제의 진실성 판단을 사용한다.실험에 의하면 미디어 사실 조사는 여전히 개방적인 연구 문제이지만 문체 단서는 텍스트의 진실성을 확인하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있다.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo analitičko istraživanje jezika novinskih medija u kontekstu provjere političkih činjenica i lažnog otkrivanja vijesti. Upoređujemo jezik prave vijesti sa satirom, prevarom i propagandom kako bi pronašli jezičke karakteristike nevjerojatnog teksta. Da bismo provjerili mogućnost automatskog provjere političkih činjenica, također predstavljamo ispitivanje slučajeva na temelju PolitiFact-a. com koristeći suđenja o činjenici na skali 6 bodova. Eksperimenti pokazuju da dok kontrola činjenica medija ostaje otvoreno istraživanje, stilistički znakovi mogu pomoći utvrditi istinu teksta.', 'fa': 'ما یک مطالعه تحلیل درباره زبان رسانه های خبری در محیط تحقیق حقیقت سیاسی و شناسایی اخبار دروغ را پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما زبان خبرهای واقعی را با این زبان سایتری، جذاب و پروپاگاندی برای پیدا کردن ویژگی زبان\u200cشناسی از متن بی\u200cاعتماد مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. برای تحقیق قابلیت تحقیق حقیقت سیاسی خودکار، ما همچنین یک تحقیق پرونده بر اساس حقیقت سیاسی را پیشنهاد می کنیم. با استفاده از قضاوت حقیقت خود در مقیاس ۶ نقطه. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که در حالی که بررسی حقیقت رسانه\u200cها برای تحقیقات باز هستند، نشانه\u200cهای استیلیستیک می\u200cتوانند کمک کنند به تعیین حقیقت متن.', 'sw': 'We present an analytic study on the language of news media in the context of political fact-checking and fake news detection.  Tunawalinganisha lugha ya habari halisi na hilo la uchochezi, hoxy na propaganda ili kutafuta sifa za lugha za maandishi yasiyoaminika. Kujaribu uwezekano wa kuchunguza ukweli wa kisiasa wa kujitegemea, pia tunaleta utafiti wa kesi kwa msingi wa kisiasa. com kwa kutumia maamuzi yao ya ukweli kwa kiwango cha 6. Majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba wakati kutangaza ukweli wa vyombo vya habari bado vinaendelea kuwa swali la wazi la utafiti, viungo vya utafiti vinaweza kusaidia kutambua ukweli wa maandishi.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n analitiese studie op die taal van nuusmedia in die konteks van politieke fakte-kontrole en falske nuusbeskrywing. Ons vergelyk die taal van regte nuus met daardie van satire, hoeke en propaganda om lingwisiese karakteristieke van onvertroude teks te vind. Om die feilikheid van outomatiese politieke faktuursoek te probeer, voorsien ons ook 'n geval studie gebaseer op PolitiFact. met die gebruik van hul faktualiteit oordelings op 'n 6-punt skaal. Eksperimente wys dat terwyl media fakte-kontrole bly om 'n oopgemaak forskingspraak te wees, stylistiese tekens kan help om die waarheid van teks te bepaal.", 'tr': 'Biz täzelikler medýäniýasynyň dilinde syýasy fakt barlamasynda we ýalňyşlyk tapylmagynda analitik bir studiýa çykýarys. Biz çyndanam habarlaryň dili güýçli metin dilini tapmak üçin ýygnalýarys. Politikiýa daýanýan ýagdaý barlap awtomatik syýasy barlamasynyň mümkinçiligini barlamak üçin biz hem esasy barlap Politikiýa daýanýan bir ýagdaýy çykarýarys. com gerçeklik kararlarını 6 noktalar boyutunda kullanarak. Araştyrmalar hatlary barlamak hatlary açyk araştyrma soragy bolup durýandygyny görkezýär, stilistik cuer metin dogrylygyny bejermek üçin kömek edip biler.', 'am': 'የዜና ሚዲያ ቋንቋ በፖለቲካዊ ውይይት መግለጽ እና የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት በተቃውሞ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የእውነተኛውን ዜና ቋንቋ እናሳያታለን፡፡ በራሱ ፖለቲካዊ የፖለቲካ ስህተት ማረጋገጫ ማረጋገጥ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ኮም የእውነታቸው ፍርድ 6 ነጥብ ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎች የሜዲያዊ መረጃ ማረጋገጫ የተከፈተ ጥያቄ ሲሆን የጽሑፉን እውነተኛነት ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'We present an analytic study on the language of news media in the context of political fact-checking and fake news detection.  Ne krahasojmë gjuhën e lajmeve të vërteta me atë të satirit, mashtrimit dhe propagandës për të gjetur karakteristikat gjuhësore të tekstit të pabesueshëm. Për të hetuar realizueshmërinë e kontrollit automatik të fakteve politike, ne gjithashtu paraqesim një studim rasti bazuar në PolitiFact. duke përdorur gjykimet e tyre faktike në një shkallë prej 6 pikësh. Eksperimentet tregojnë se ndërsa kontrollimi i fakteve i medias mbetet një pyetje e hapur kërkimi, shenjat stilistike mund të ndihmojnë në përcaktimin e vërtetës së tekstit.', 'az': 'Biz x…ôb…ôr mediyalarńĪnńĪn dilind…ô siyasi h…ôqiq…ôti t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôk v…ô sahte x…ôb…ôr keŇüfetm…ôsi bar…ôsind…ô analitik t…ôhsil edirik. Biz h…ôqiq…ôt haqq x…ôb…ôrl…ôrin dilini satir, h√∂c…ôtl…ôr v…ô propaganda dill…ôrin inanńĪlmaz m…ôtnl…ôrin dill…ôrini tapmaq √ľ√ß√ľn qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq. Avtomatik siyasi t…ôŇükil t…ôŇükil edilm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn PolitiFact vasit…ôsil…ô birlikd…ô dava t…ôŇükil etdik. 6 n√∂qt…ô √∂l√ß√ľsind…ô h…ôqiqi h√∂kml…ôrini istifad…ô edirl…ôr. H…ôqiq…ôt…ôn, medya h…ôqiq…ôti t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôsi a√ßńĪq araŇütńĪrma sualńĪ olduńüu halda, stilistik m…ôlumatlar m…ôlumatńĪn dońüruluńüunu t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôy…ô k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôr.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նորությունների լեզուների վերլուծության ուսումնասիրություն քաղաքական փաստերի վերահսկման և կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման կոնտեքստում: Մենք համեմատում ենք իրական նորությունների լեզուն սաթիրի, խաբեության և պրոպագանդային լեզուների հետ, որպեսզի գտնենք անվստահելի տեքստի լեզվական հատկությունները: Որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք քաղաքական փաստերի ավտոմատիկ վերահսկողության իրականացվությունը, մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք քաղաքական փաստերի վրա հիմնված մի դեպքի ուսումնասիրություն: օգտագործելով իրենց փաստականության դատողությունները 6 կետի չափի վրա: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մինչ լրատվամիջոցների փաստերի ստուգելը դեռևս բաց հետազոտության հարց է, ոճիլիստական նշանները կարող են օգնել որոշել տեքստի ճշմարտությունը:', 'ca': 'Presentam un estudi analític sobre el llenguatge dels mitjans de notícies en el context de la verificació política de fets i la detecció de notícies falses. Comparem la llengua de les notícies reals amb la de satir, enganys i propaganda per trobar característiques lingüístices del text desconfiant. Per investigar la viabilitat de la verificació política automàtica, també presentem un estudi de cas basat en PolitiFact. com utilitzant els seus judicis de factualitat a escala de 6 punts. Els experiments mostren que mentre que la verificació de fets dels mitjans encara és una qüestió de recerca oberta, les indicacions estilistiques poden ajudar a determinar la veritat del text.', 'bn': 'রাজনৈতিক বাস্তবতা পরীক্ষা এবং মিথ্যা সংবাদ সনাক্তির প্রেক্ষাপটে সংবাদ প্রচার মাধ্যমের ভাষায় আমরা একটি বিশ্ আমরা সত্যিকারের সংবাদের ভাষাকে বিদ্রুপ, হোক্স এবং প্রচারণার সাথে তুলনা করি যাতে বিশ্বাস করা যায় না লেখার ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে রাজনৈতিক তথ্য পরীক্ষা করার ব্যাপারটি প্রমাণ করার জন্য আমরা পোলিটিফাক্টের ভিত্তিতে একটি কেস com using their factuality judgments on a 6-point scale.  পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে যখন প্রচার মাধ্যমের তথ্য পরীক্ষা একটি উন্মুক্ত গবেষণা প্রশ্ন হিসেবে থাকে, তখন স্টাইলিক কিউগুলো ল', 'cs': 'Představujeme analytickou studii jazyka zpravodajských médií v kontextu politického ověřování faktů a detekce falešných zpráv. Srovnáváme jazyk skutečných zpráv s jazykem satiry, podvodů a propagandy, abychom našli jazykové charakteristiky nedůvěryhodného textu. Pro zkoumání proveditelnosti automatického kontroly politických faktů představujeme také případovou studii založenou na PolitiFact. používají své věcné rozsudky v šestibodovém měřítku. Experimenty ukazují, že zatímco mediální kontrola faktů zůstává otevřenou výzkumnou otázkou, stylistické nápovědy mohou pomoci určit pravdivost textu.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo analitičku studiju o jeziku novinskih medija u kontekstu provjere političkih činjenica i lažnog otkrivanja vijesti. Uspoređujemo jezik prave vijesti sa satirom, prevarom i propagandom kako bi pronašli jezičke karakteristike nevjerojatnog teksta. Da bismo provjerili mogućnost automatskog provjere političkih činjenica, također predstavljamo studiju slučajeva na temelju PolitiFact a. com koristeći svoje osude o činjenici na skali 6 bodova. Eksperimenti pokazuju da dok kontrola činjenica medija ostaje otvoreno istraživanje, stilistički znakovi mogu pomoći utvrditi istinu teksta.', 'et': 'Esitleme analüütilist uuringut uudistemeedia keele kohta poliitilise faktikontrolli ja valeuudiste tuvastamise kontekstis. Me võrdleme reaalsete uudiste keelt satiiri, pettuste ja propaganda keelega, et leida ebausaldusväärse teksti keelelised tunnused. Automaatse poliitilise faktikontrolli teostatavuse uurimiseks esitame ka PolitiFact-il põhineva juhtumiuuringu. komisjon kasutab oma faktilist otsust 6 punkti skaalal. Eksperimentid näitavad, et kuigi meedia faktide kontrollimine on endiselt avatud uurimisküsimus, võivad stiililised vihjed aidata kindlaks määrata teksti tõesust.', 'fi': 'Esitämme analyyttisen tutkimuksen uutismedian kielestä poliittisen faktatarkistuksen ja fake news detection kontekstissa. Vertaamme todellisten uutisten kieltä satiirin, huijausten ja propagandan kieleen löytääksemme epäluotettavan tekstin kielellisiä ominaisuuksia. Analysoidaksemme automaattisen poliittisen faktatarkastuksen toteutettavuutta esittelemme myös PolitiFact-tietokantaan perustuvan tapaustutkimuksen. Komissio käyttää tosiseikkoja koskevia tuomioitaan kuuden pisteen asteikolla. Kokeet osoittavat, että vaikka mediafaktojen tarkistaminen on edelleen avoin tutkimuskysymys, tyylilliset vihjeet voivat auttaa määrittämään tekstin totuudenmukaisuuden.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah ujal karo perusahaan langkung banjur media barang kanggo nganggep nggawe barang politik lan ujak-ujak wartané kuwi ora oleh. Awak dhéwé nglanggar luwih akeh barang kanggo masara, nglanggar, lan nglanggar nganggo cara-cara nglanggar Text kuwi kudu ngregani. Mbok beraksi kanggo ngerasakno kang ora bisa nguasakno cara-cara sing perusahaan, kita nganggep kuwi gadhah batasan kiye basa politiki. com Perintah bener', 'ha': "Munã zo da wani fassara na fassara a kan harshen media cikin muhalli da za'a jarraba gaskiya na kisa da gane na ƙarya. Tuna samfani da harshen lãbãri na gaskiya da za'a sami da takarda, da kuma da fagarta dõmin ka sãmi littãfin da ba'a yi ĩmãni ba. To, dõmin ka jarraba abincin a kan jarraba masu farat ɗaya na kisa, za mu zo da wani matsayi a kan karatun siyasar. com ya yi amfani da bazaɓallinsu masu gaskiya a kan wani takarda 6 point. Cijaroyi na nuna cewa, a lokacin da jarrabi masu cikin mutanen da za'a iya zama wani tambayi mai bayyanãwa na ƙidãya, misalin misalin na'ura za'a iya taimakon su bayyana gaskiyar matsayin.", 'he': 'We present an analytic study on the language of news media in the context of political fact-checking and fake news detection.  אנחנו משוותים את שפת החדשות האמיתיות עם שפת הסאטיר, הונאות, ופרוגנדה כדי למצוא אופיינים שפתיים של טקסט לא אמין. כדי לחקור את האפשרות של בדיקת עובדות פוליטית אוטומטית, אנחנו גם מציגים מחקר מקרים מבוסס על PolitiFact. משתמשים בשיפעות העובדות שלהם בסולם של 6 נקודות. ניסויים מראים שבעוד בדיקת עובדות התקשורת נשארת שאלה מחקר פתוחה, סימנים סטיליסטיים יכולים לעזור לקבוע את האמת של הטקסט.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo analitično študijo jezika novinarskih medijev v kontekstu političnega preverjanja dejstev in odkrivanja lažnih novic. Jezik resničnih novic primerjamo z jezikom satire, prevare in propagande, da bi našli jezikovne značilnosti nezanesljivega besedila. Za proučitev izvedljivosti avtomatskega preverjanja političnih dejstev predstavljamo tudi študijo primera, ki temelji na PolitiFact. Komisija uporablja svoje sodbe o dejanskem stanju na lestvici 6 točk. Eksperimenti kažejo, da medtem ko je preverjanje medijskih dejstev še vedno odprto raziskovalno vprašanje, lahko stilski namigi pomagajo ugotoviti resničnost besedila.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བརྡ་འཕྲིན་དོན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། སེམས་ཆུ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཆབ་སྲིད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་ཐབས་འཇུག་དགོས་ངེད་ཚོས་ཡང་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིག་གཅིག་ག com སྤྱད་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱིས་6གྲལ་ཐིག་གི་ཁེལ་ཐུབ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྐབས་སུ་འཇུག་ཟམ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'Topic-Based Agreement and Disagreement in US Electoral Manifestos', 'ar': 'اتفاق قائم على الموضوع وخلاف في البيانات الانتخابية الأمريكية', 'pt': 'Acordo e desacordo baseado em tópicos nos manifestos eleitorais dos EUA', 'fr': 'Accord et désaccord thématiques dans les manifestes électoraux américains', 'es': 'Acuerdo y desacuerdo por temas en los manifiestos electorales de EE. UU.', 'ja': '米国の選挙マニフェストにおけるトピックベースの合意と意見の相違', 'zh': '美国选举宣言,略同异同', 'hi': 'विषय-आधारित समझौता और अमेरिकी चुनावी घोषणापत्रों में असहमति', 'ru': 'Тематическое соглашение и разногласия в предвыборном манифесте США', 'ga': 'Comhaontú agus Easaontú Bunaithe ar Thopaicí i bhForálacha Toghcháin na SA', 'hu': 'Témaalapú megállapodás és nézeteltérés az amerikai választási kiáltványokban', 'ka': 'ტემიკური შესაბამისი შესაბამისი და არასწორება ამერიკულია მონიფესტში', 'el': 'Θεματική συμφωνία και διαφωνία στα εκλογικά μανιφέστα των ΗΠΑ', 'it': 'Accordo tematico e disaccordo nei Manifesti elettorali statunitensi', 'lt': 'Tema grindžiamas susitarimas ir nesutarimas JAV rinkimų manifestuose', 'mk': 'Договор базиран на тема и несогласување во американските изборни манифести', 'kk': 'АҚШ таңдау манифестосында нақышты негізделген келістік және келістіктемесі', 'ms': 'Perjanjian Berasas Topik dan Kesepakatan dalam Manifesto Pemilihan Amerika Syarikat', 'ml': 'Topic-Based Agreement and Disagreement in US Electoral Manifestos', 'mt': "Ftehim ibbażat fuq suġġetti u nuqqas ta' qbil fil-Manifesti Elettorali tal-Istati Uniti", 'mn': 'АНУ-ын сонгуулийн манифесто дээр сэдэвтэй санал болон зөрчилдөөн', 'pl': 'Porozumienie tematyczne i sprzeczność w amerykańskich manifestach wyborczych', 'ro': 'Acord bazat pe subiecte și dezacord în manifestele electorale americane', 'sr': 'Temski sporazum i neslaganje u američkom izbornom Manifestosu', 'no': 'Temebasert avtale og avtale i amerikanske valManifestar', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත සම්බන්ධතාව සහ අවිශ්වාසය US තෝරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'so': 'Topic-Based Agreement and Disagreement in US Electoral Manifestos', 'sv': 'Ämnesbaserat avtal och oenighet i amerikanska valmanifest', 'ur': 'امریکا انتخابات منفیٹوس میں موضوع بنیاد معاملہ اور اختلاف', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thỏa thuận và Thỏa thuận bầu cử Hoa Kỳ', 'bg': 'Темно-базирано споразумение и несъгласие в изборните манифести на САЩ', 'hr': 'Temski sporazum i neslaganje u američkom izbornom manifestosu', 'nl': "Topic Based Agreement and Disagreemt in US Electoral Manifesto's", 'da': 'Emnebaseret aftale og uenighed i amerikanske valgmanifester', 'de': 'Thematische Einigung und Meinungsverschiedenheit in US-Wahlmanifesten', 'id': 'Perjanjian Berdasarkan Topik dan Kesepakatan dalam Manifesto Pemilihan AS', 'ko': '미국 선거 선언에서 주제의 일치와 불일치에 기초하다', 'sw': 'Makubaliano na makubaliano ya msingi na Makubaliano ya Uchaguzi wa Marekani', 'sq': 'Marrëveshje me thema dhe mosmarrëveshje në manifestimet zgjedhore të SHBA', 'am': 'አሜሪካ ምርጫ ማነጻዎች', 'hy': '諒榨沾铡盏崭站 瞻斋沾斩站铡债 瞻铡沾铡毡铡盏斩崭謧诈盏崭謧斩 謬 铡斩瞻铡沾铡毡铡盏斩崭謧诈盏崭謧斩 员談諉-斋 炸斩湛謤铡寨铡斩 粘铡斩铡蘸铡謤瞻崭謤栅崭謧诈盏崭謧斩斩榨謤崭謧沾', 'fa': 'توافق موضوع و اختلاف در انتخابات آمریکا', 'af': 'Onderwerp-gebaseerde ooreenkoms en ongeregtigheid in VSA-keuse Manifestos', 'bn': 'মার্কিন নির্বাচন ম্যানিফেস্টোসের বিষয়ের ভিত্তিক চুক্তি', 'az': 'Əlbəttə Seçimlər Manifestoslarında Mevzu Üstündəki Anlaşma və Tərəflər', 'bs': 'Temski sporazum i neslaganje u američkim izbornim Manifestima', 'ca': 'Acordat i desacord basat en temes en els manifestos electorals dels EUA', 'cs': 'Tématická dohoda a neshoda v amerických volebních manifestech', 'et': 'Teemapõhine kokkulepe ja lahkarvamused USA valimismanifestides', 'fi': 'Aiheeseen perustuva sopimus ja erimielisyys Yhdysvaltain vaalimanifesteissa', 'tr': 'Etrap Saýlaw Manifestalarynda Temasly Aýlaşma we Araştyrma', 'sk': 'Tematski sporazum in nesoglasje v volilnih manifestih ZDA', 'jv': 'Tema-Ngenyarno Rusak-Ngenyarno Rusak-Ngenyarno kanggo nyumbang maniFestos', 'he': 'הסכם מבוסס על נושאים וחסר הסכם במניפיסטוס בחירות ארצות הברית', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་གཞི་རྟེན་དང་འདྲ་བརྟན་པར་ཨ་རིས་ཁྱབ་ཁོངས་ཀྱི་སྲོལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མེད།'}
{'en': 'We present a topic-based analysis of agreement and disagreement in political manifestos, which relies on a new method for topic detection based on key concept clustering. Our approach outperforms both standard techniques like LDA and a state-of-the-art graph-based method, and provides promising initial results for this new task in computational social science.', 'ar': 'نقدم تحليلًا قائمًا على الموضوع للاتفاق والاختلاف في البيانات السياسية ، والذي يعتمد على طريقة جديدة للكشف عن الموضوع بناءً على تجميع المفاهيم الرئيسية. يتفوق نهجنا على كل من التقنيات القياسية مثل LDA والطريقة القائمة على الرسم البياني الحديثة ، ويوفر نتائج أولية واعدة لهذه المهمة الجديدة في العلوم الاجتماعية الحاسوبية.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma análise baseada em tópicos de acordo e desacordo em manifestos políticos, que se baseia em um novo método para detecção de tópicos baseado em agrupamento de conceitos-chave. Nossa abordagem supera as técnicas padrão como LDA e um método baseado em grafos de última geração e fornece resultados iniciais promissores para essa nova tarefa em ciências sociais computacionais.', 'es': 'Presentamos un análisis basado en temas del acuerdo y el desacuerdo en los manifiestos políticos, que se basa en un nuevo método para la detección de temas basado en la agrupación de conceptos clave. Nuestro enfoque supera tanto las técnicas estándar como el LDA como un método basado en gráficos de última generación, y proporciona resultados iniciales prometedores para esta nueva tarea en la ciencia social computacional.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une analyse thématique de l'accord et du désaccord dans les manifestes politiques, qui repose sur une nouvelle méthode de détection de sujets basée sur le regroupement de concepts clés. Notre approche surpasse à la fois les techniques standard telles que la LDA et une méthode graphique de pointe, et fournit des résultats initiaux prometteurs pour cette nouvelle tâche des sciences sociales computationnelles.", 'ja': '主要なコンセプトクラスタリングに基づくトピック検出の新しい方法に依存する、政治マニフェストにおける合意と不合意のトピックベースの分析を提示する。私たちのアプローチは、LDAのような標準的なテクニックと最先端のグラフベースの方法の両方を上回り、計算社会科学におけるこの新しいタスクの有望な初期結果を提供します。', 'zh': '建一本于主题之政,与分歧之分,赖一本于要聚类新主题检测之法。 吾道优于LDA等格术及最先进之法,并为计社会科学之新务。', 'hi': 'हम राजनीतिक घोषणापत्रों में समझौते और असहमति का एक विषय-आधारित विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो प्रमुख अवधारणा क्लस्टरिंग के आधार पर विषय का पता लगाने के लिए एक नई विधि पर निर्भर करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण एलडीए जैसी मानक तकनीकों और एक अत्याधुनिक ग्राफ-आधारित विधि दोनों को मात देता है, और कम्प्यूटेशनल सामाजिक विज्ञान में इस नए कार्य के लिए आशाजनक प्रारंभिक परिणाम प्रदान करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем тематический анализ согласия и несогласия в политических манифестах, который опирается на новый метод выявления тем, основанный на кластеризации ключевых концепций. Наш подход превосходит как стандартные методы, такие как LDA, так и современный метод на основе графов, и дает многообещающие первоначальные результаты для этой новой задачи в вычислительной социальной науке.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair anailís ábhar-bhunaithe ar chomhaontú agus easaontas i bhforógraí polaitiúla, a bhraitheann ar mhodh nua chun topaicí a bhrath bunaithe ar bhraisliú príomhchoincheapa. Is fearr lenár gcur chuige na teicnící caighdeánacha amhail LDA agus modh graf-bhunaithe den scoth, agus soláthraíonn sé torthaí tosaigh dóchasacha don tasc nua seo san eolaíocht ríomhaireachtúil shóisialta.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια θεματική ανάλυση της συμφωνίας και της διαφωνίας στα πολιτικά μανιφέστα, η οποία βασίζεται σε μια νέα μέθοδο ανίχνευσης θεμάτων με βάση τη συγκέντρωση βασικών εννοιών. Η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά και τις δύο τυποποιημένες τεχνικές όπως η LDA και μια υπερσύγχρονη μέθοδος βασισμένη σε γραφήματα, και παρέχει πολλά υποσχόμενα αρχικά αποτελέσματα για αυτό το νέο έργο στην υπολογιστική κοινωνική επιστήμη.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პოლიტიკური პოლიტიკური მანქანებში დავიწყებთ ტემიკური ანალიზი, რომელიც ახალი პროგრამის განახლებისთვის გადარჩენა კონცექტირების კონცექტირებისთვის. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია გავაკეთება ორივე სტანდარტური ტექნოგიები როგორც LDA და სტანდარტური გრაფიკური მეთოდი, და გვეუბნება გავაკეთებელი პირველი შედეგი ამ ახალი საქმენტის კო', 'hu': 'A politikai kiáltványok egyetértésének és nézeteltérésének témaalapú elemzését mutatjuk be, amely a kulcskoncepciók klaszterezésén alapuló új módszerre támaszkodik. Megközelítésünk mind a szabványos technikákat, mint például az LDA, mind pedig egy korszerű gráf alapú módszert felülmúlja, és ígéretes kezdeti eredményeket nyújt a számítástechnikai társadalomtudományban.', 'it': "Presentiamo un'analisi tematica dell'accordo e del disaccordo nei manifesti politici, che si basa su un nuovo metodo per la rilevazione dei temi basato sul cluster di concetti chiave. Il nostro approccio supera entrambe le tecniche standard come LDA e un metodo grafico all'avanguardia, e fornisce risultati iniziali promettenti per questo nuovo compito nella scienza sociale computazionale.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame teminiu požiūriu pagrįstą susitarimo ir nesutarimo analizę politiniuose manifestuose, kuris grindžiamas nauju temų nustatymo metodu, grindžiamu pagrindinėmis koncepcijomis. Mūsų požiūris yra didesnis už standartinius metodus, pavyzdžiui, LDA ir naujausią grafikos metodą, ir suteikia pažangius pradinius rezultatus šiai naujai kompiuterinių socialinių mokslų užduotims.', 'kk': 'Біз саяси профильмдерінде келістіктер мен келістіктерді анализ негізінде тақырыпты анықтау тәсіліне тәуелді. Біздің тәсіліміміз LDA секілді стандартты техникаларды және графикалық күйде негізделген әдімі жасайды. Бұл жаңа тапсырманың бастапқы нәтижелерін компьютерлік әлемдік ғылымдарын', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan analisis berdasarkan topik kesepakatan dan ketidaksetujuan dalam manifesto politik, yang bergantung pada kaedah baru untuk pengesan topik berdasarkan konsep kunci clustering. Pendekatan kita melebihi kedua-dua teknik piawai seperti LDA dan kaedah terbaik berdasarkan graf, dan menyediakan hasil awal yang berjanji untuk tugas baru ini dalam sains sosial komputasi.', 'ml': 'രാഷ്ട്രീയ പ്രത്യക്ഷത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസവും ഭിന്നിച്ചുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ഒരു പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിശ്വ നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം LDA പോലെയുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റാര്\u200dട്ട് ടെക്നിക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ സാമൂഹ്യ ശാസ്ത്രീയ', 'mk': 'Презентираме анализа базирана на тема на договорот и несогласувањето во политичките манифести, кој се потпира на нов метод за детекција на тема базиран на клучното групирање концепти. Нашиот пристап ги надминува стандардните техники како што се ЛДА и најсовремениот графски метод, и обезбедува ветувачки првични резултати за оваа нова задача во компјутерската социјална наука.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy tematyczną analizę porozumienia i niezgody w manifestach politycznych, która opiera się na nowej metodzie wykrywania tematów opartej na kluczowym klastrowaniu koncepcji. Nasze podejście przewyższa zarówno standardowe techniki, takie jak LDA, jak i najnowocześniejszą metodę opartą na wykresie i zapewnia obiecujące wstępne wyniki dla tego nowego zadania w obliczeniowych naukach społecznych.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw analiżi bbażata fuq suġġett ta’ ftehim u nuqqas ta’ qbil f’manifesti politiċi, li jiddependi fuq metodu ġdid għall-individwazzjoni ta’ suġġetti bbażat fuq raggruppament ta’ kunċetti ewlenin. Our approach outperforms both standard techniques like LDA and a state-of-the-art graph-based method, and provides promising initial results for this new task in computational social science.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein temabasert analyse av samordning og ikkje-samordning i politiske manifestar, som relier på ein ny metode for oppdaging av emne basert på nøkkelkonsept-gruppering. Tilnærminga vårt utfører både standard teknikk som LDA og ein tilstandsbasert graf-metode, og tilbyr forståande oppgåver for denne nye oppgåva i datamaskinen sosiale vitenskap.', 'mn': 'Бид улс төрийн илтгэл дээр зөвшөөрөл болон зөрчилдөөний талаар сэдвийн үндсэн шинжилгээг үзүүлнэ. Энэ нь хамгийн чухал ойлголтын сүлжээнд үндсэн шинэ арга юм. Бидний арга барилга нь LDA болон урлагийн график суурилсан стандарт технологиуд хоёуланг дамжуулдаг. Мөн компьютерийн нийгмийн шинжлэх ухааны шинэ ажлын эхний үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o analiză tematică a acordului și dezacordului în manifestele politice, care se bazează pe o nouă metodă de detectare a subiectelor bazată pe clusterizarea conceptului cheie. Abordarea noastră depășește atât tehnicile standard, cum ar fi LDA, cât și o metodă bazată pe grafice de ultimă generație și oferă rezultate inițiale promițătoare pentru această nouă sarcină în știința socială computațională.', 'so': 'Anagu waxaan keenaynaa baaritaanka ku saabsan heshiiska iyo iskala xiriirka muuqashada siyaasadeedka, kaas oo ku xiran qaab cusub oo la soo ogaanayo fikrada muhiimka ah. Dhaqdhaqaaqyadayadu waxay soo bandhigtaa teknikada caadiga ah oo la mid ah LDA iyo habka farshaxanka, wuxuuna bixiyaa resultiyada hore ee shaqadan cusub ee cilmiga bulshada xisaabta.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ රජාත්\u200dරික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අවිශ්වාසයක්, ඒක අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව අපේ විදිහට LDA වගේ ප්\u200dරමාණික තාක්ෂණික දෙන්නා වගේ ප්\u200dරමාණික තාක්ෂණයක් සහ ප්\u200dරමාණික විදිහයක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා, සමාජ', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo na temi baziranu analizu sporazuma i neslaganja u političkim manifestima, koji se oslanja na novu metodu otkrivanja tema baziranu na ključnom skupinu koncepta. Naš pristup iznosi i standardne tehnike poput LDA i metode na nacionalnoj grafici, i pruža obećavajuće početne rezultate za ovaj novi zadatak u računalnoj socijalnoj nauci.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ämnesbaserad analys av enighet och oenighet i politiska manifest, som bygger på en ny metod för ämnesdetektering baserad på nyckelkonceptklustring. Vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar både standardtekniker som LDA och en state-of-the-art grafbaserad metod, och ger lovande inledande resultat för denna nya uppgift inom beräknings samhällsvetenskap.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک موافقت اور مخالفت کی تحلیل کے متعلق موافقت اور اختلاف کے متعلق موضوع پر پیش کرتے ہیں، جو ایک نوی طریقہ پر موضوع شناسایی کے لئے موضوع کی کلسٹر کی بنیاد رکھتا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ LDA جیسے استاندارڈ ٹیکنیک اور ایک ایست گراف بنیاد کی طریقہ سے کامل ہوتا ہے اور یہ کامپیوتر سوسیال سائنس میں اس نئی تابع کے لئے وعدہ دینے والی نتیجہ پیش کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'We present a topic-based analysis of agreement and disagreement in political manifestos, which relies on a new method for topic detection based on key concept clustering.  நம்முடைய நெறிமுறை LDA போன்ற நிலையான தொழில்நுட்பத்தை வெளியிடுகிறது மற்றும் ஒரு நிலையான-கலை வரைகலை அடிப்படையான முறையை வெளியேறுகிறத', 'uz': 'Биз мазкур мавзу маълумотларга эътибор ва мазкур маълумотлар тахминлашни тақдим этамиз, у қонун фикрларига асосий маълумотларни кўриб чиқиш учун янги усулга таваккал қилади. Our approach outperforms both standard techniques like LDA and a state-of-the-art graph-based method, and provides promising initial results for this new task in computational social science.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đưa ra một bài phân tích về sự đồng ý và bất đồng trong các tuyên ngôn chính trị, nó dựa trên một phương pháp mới để phát hiện chủ đề dựa trên tụ tập các khái niệm chủ chốt. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi thực hiện cả các kỹ thuật tiêu chuẩn như khai hoang và một phương pháp đồ thị tuyệt vời, và cung cấp kết quả đầu tiên hứa hẹn cho nhiệm vụ mới này trong khoa học xã hội tính.', 'bg': 'Представяме тематичен анализ на съгласието и несъгласието в политическите манифести, който разчита на нов метод за откриване на теми, базиран на ключови концепции. Нашият подход превъзхожда както стандартните техники като LDA, така и най-съвременния графичен метод и осигурява обещаващи първоначални резултати за тази нова задача в компютърните социални науки.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en emnebaseret analyse af enighed og uenighed i politiske manifester, som bygger på en ny metode til emneovervågning baseret på nøglebegrebet clustering. Vores tilgang overgår både standard teknikker som LDA og en state-of-the-art graf-baseret metode, og giver lovende indledende resultater til denne nye opgave i beregningsmæssig samfundsvidenskab.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo temeljnu analizu sporazuma i neslaganja u političkim manifestima, koja se oslanja na novu metodu otkrivanja tema temeljno na ključnom skupinu koncepta. Naš pristup nadmašuje standardne tehnike poput LDA i metode temeljene na grafiku stanja umjetnosti i pruža obećavajuće početne rezultate za ovaj novi zadatak u računalnoj socijalnoj znanosti.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een topic-based analyse van overeenstemming en onenigheid in politieke manifesten, die gebaseerd is op een nieuwe methode voor topic detectie gebaseerd op key concept clustering. Onze aanpak overtreft zowel standaardtechnieken als LDA en een state-of-the-art grafiekgebaseerde methode, en levert veelbelovende eerste resultaten voor deze nieuwe taak in de computationele sociale wetenschap.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine themenbasierte Analyse von Übereinstimmung und Meinungsverschiedenheiten in politischen Manifesten, die auf einer neuen Methode zur Themenerkennung basiert, die auf Schlüsselkonzeptclustering basiert. Unser Ansatz übertrifft sowohl Standardtechniken wie LDA als auch eine hochmoderne graphenbasierte Methode und liefert vielversprechende erste Ergebnisse für diese neue Aufgabe in der Computational Social Science.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan analisis berdasarkan topik kesepakatan dan ketidaksetujuan dalam manifesto politik, yang bergantung pada metode baru untuk deteksi topik berdasarkan konsep kunci clustering. Our approach outperforms both standard techniques like LDA and a state-of-the-art graph-based method, and provides promising initial results for this new task in computational social science.', 'ko': '우리는 주제를 바탕으로 하는 정치선언의 일치성과 불일치성 분석 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은 관건적인 개념을 바탕으로 분류된 주제 검측 방법에 의존한다.우리의 방법은 LDA와 같은 표준 기술과 가장 선진적인 도형 기반 방법보다 우수하며, 사회과학을 계산하는 이 새로운 임무에 희망적인 초보적인 결과를 제공했다.', 'fa': 'ما یک تحلیل موضوع بر اساس موضوع قرارداد و اختلاف در نمایش های سیاسی را پیشنهاد می کنیم که بر روش جدید برای شناسایی موضوع بر اساس گروهی کلید مفهومی است. دستور ما هر دو تکنیک استاندارد مانند LDA و یک روش بنیاد گراف هنری را انجام می دهد، و نتیجه\u200cهای اولیه\u200cای برای این کار جدید در علم اجتماعی محاسبه را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutoa uchambuzi wa makubaliano na kutokubaliana katika manifesto za kisiasa, ambazo hutegemea njia mpya ya kutambua mada kwa kutumia dhana ya msingi. Hatua yetu inaonyesha mbinu za kawaida kama vile LDA na mbinu inayohusiana na serikali ya sanaa, na inatoa matokeo ya awali kwa kazi hii mpya katika sayansi ya kijamii.', 'tr': 'Biz tema tabanly bir anlaşma we razylygy syýasy manifestalarda görkezip çykýarys. Bu tema tanyşynyň täze bir yönünde möhüm düşünjeler klusterinde daýanýar. Biziň ýaryşymyz LDA ýaly standart tekniklerden hem grafik taýýarlanan döwürden çykýar we kalkular sosyal bilimi üçin bu täze täze täze täze täze täze täze täzelikleri üçin söz berýär.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n onderwerp-gebaseerde analisie van ooreenkoms en ongelukkigheid in politieke manifeste, wat op 'n nuwe metode aflyk vir onderwerp-opdekking gebaseer op sleutel konsepte-klastering. Ons toegang uitvoer beide standaard teknike soos LDA en 'n staat-van-die-kunste graafgebaseerde metode, en verskaf beloftende aanvanklike resultate vir hierdie nuwe taak in rekenasielike sosiale wetenskap.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një analizë bazuar në temë të marrëveshjes dhe mosmarrëveshjes në manifestat politike, e cila mbështetet në një metodë të re për zbulimin e temës bazuar në grupimin kryesor të konceptit. Our approach outperforms both standard techniques like LDA and a state-of-the-art graph-based method, and provides promising initial results for this new task in computational social science.', 'am': 'በፖለቲካ መልዕክቶች ውስጥ የውይይት ውይይት እና ውይይት የሚደረገውን አካባቢ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የግንኙነታችን አካባቢ የLDA እና የ-የ-አርእስት የግንኙነት አካባቢ ሥርዓት እና የዚህን አዲስ ስራ ለመቆጣጠር ማኅበራዊ እውቀት የሚደረገውን የመጀመሪያ ፍጥረት ያሳርጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք թեմայով հիմնված համաձայնության և անհամաձայնության վերլուծություն քաղաքական ցուցադրություններում, որը հիմնված է թեմայի հայտնաբերման նոր մեթոդի վրա, հիմնված հիմնական գաղափարի խմբագրման վրա: Մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է այնպիսի ստանդարտ տեխնիկաներ, ինչպիսիք են ԼԴԱ-ը, ինչպես նաև լավագույն գծագրային հիմնված մեթոդը, և ապահովում է խոստացող սկզբնական արդյունքներ այս նոր հանձնարարության համար հաշվարկների սոցիալական', 'bn': 'আমরা রাজনৈতিক প্রত্যক্ষেত্রে চুক্তি এবং বিভিন্ন মতামতের বিষয়বস্তু বিশ্লেষণ উপস্থাপন করছি, যা মূল ধারণার ভিত্তিতে নির্ভর করে একটি নতুন ব আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা এলডিএ এবং রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক কৌশলের মতো স্ট্যান্ডার্ড প্রযুক্তি প্রকাশ করে এবং গণনাত্রিক সামা', 'az': 'Biz siyasi manifestl…ôrd…ô anlaŇüma v…ô anlaŇümazlńĪq analizisini t…ôs…ôvv√ľr edirik. Bu, anahtar konceptu clusterin…ô dayanan m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr keŇüfetm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn yeni bir metoda t…ôv…ôkk√ľl edir. Bizim t…ôrzimiz LDA kimi standart teknikl…ôri v…ô grafik t…ôrzl…ôrin…ô dayanan bir Ňü…ôkild…ô istifad…ô edir v…ô bu yeni iŇüin baŇülanńüńĪ√ß sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ hesaplayaraq sosyal elmd…ô t…ômin edir.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo na temi baziranu analizu sporazuma i neslaganja u političkim manifestima, koji se oslanja na novu metodu otkrivanja tema baziranu na ključnom skupinu koncepta. Naš pristup iznosi i standardne tehnike poput LDA i metode na nacionalnoj grafici, i pruža obećavajuće početne rezultate za ovaj novi zadatak u računalnoj socijalnoj nauci.', 'ca': "Presentam una anàlisi basada en temes d'acord i desacord en manifestos polítics, que es basa en un nou mètode de detecció de temes basat en una agrupació de conceptes clau. El nostre enfocament supera les tècniques estandards com LDA i un mètode basat en els gràfics més avançats, i proporciona resultats inicials prometedors per aquesta nova tasca en ciència social computacional.", 'cs': 'Představujeme tématickou analýzu shody a neshody v politických manifestech, která se opírá o novou metodu detekce témat založenou na klíčovém clusteru konceptů. Náš přístup překonává jak standardní techniky jako LDA, tak nejmodernější grafovou metodu a poskytuje slibné výsledky pro tento nový úkol ve výpočetní sociální vědě.', 'et': 'Esitleme poliitilistes manifestides kokkuleppe ja lahkarvamuste teemapõhist analüüsi, mis tugineb uuele teematuvastamise meetodile, mis põhineb põhikontseptsioonide klastristamisel. Meie lähenemine ületab nii standardseid tehnikaid nagu LDA kui ka kaasaegset graafikapõhist meetodit ning annab paljulubavaid esialgseid tulemusi selle uue ülesande jaoks arvutuslikus sotsiaalteaduses.', 'fi': 'Esitämme aihekohtaisen analyysin poliittisten manifestien yksimielisyydestä ja erimielisyydestä, joka perustuu uuteen menetelmään aiheen havaitsemiseksi avainkäsitteiden klusterointiin. Lähestymistapamme ylittää sekä standarditekniikat, kuten LDA, että huippuluokan graafiseen menetelmään perustuvan menetelmän ja tarjoaa lupaavia alkutuloksia tähän uuteen laskennallisen yhteiskuntatieteen tehtävään.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé nambah karo tema-tema akeh pancening nggawe gerakan karo nggawe barang politik maneh, sing isin dhéwé kuwi method sing gawe nguasah tarjamahan kanggo kelas tema sing basa saben kelas clustering. Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe sistem sing gawe akèh padha uga teknik sing gambar n'alêr, lan stad-of-the-arts nggawe barang-sistem kuwi dianggawe sistem sing nyimpen mulai gawe nguasakno sistem sing paling dhéwé kuwi sak akèh dudu komputer.", 'he': 'אנו מציגים ניתוח מבוסס על נושאים של הסכם וחסר הסכם במסמכים פוליטיים, שמסומך על שיטה חדשה לגילוי נושאים מבוססת על קבוצת מושג מפתחי. הגישה שלנו מגבילה את שתי הטכניקות הסטנדרטיות כמו LDA ושיטה מבוססת בגרף מצוין, ומספקת תוצאות קודמיות מבטיחות למשימה החדשה הזו במדע חברתי מחשבי.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo tematsko analizo soglasja in nesoglasja v političnih manifestih, ki temelji na novi metodi odkrivanja teme, ki temelji na ključnem grudiranju konceptov. Naš pristop presega tako standardne tehnike, kot je LDA, kot tudi najsodobnejšo metodo na grafih, in zagotavlja obetavne začetne rezultate za to novo nalogo v računalniški družboslovni znanosti.', 'ha': "Munã zo da wani anayyar da masu bincike wa yarda da jãyayya a cikin wurãren haske na kisa, wanda yana dõgara a kan zane-gane wata hanyowa na madaidaici, a kan bincike zaɓen muhimmai. Mataimakinmu na samar da labayan tufãfi kamar LDA da shirin-na-fassarar-kunna, kuma yana bãyar da matsalar masu yi wa'adi ga wannan aikin da ke cikin lissafi.", 'bo': 'We present a topic-based analysis of agreement and disagreement in political manifestos, which relies on a new method for topic detection based on key concept clustering. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་LDA དང་གནས་སྟངས་གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Zipporah : a Fast and Scalable Data Cleaning System for Noisy Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora', 'ar': 'Zipporah: نظام تنظيف بيانات سريع وقابل للتطوير من أجل Corpora المتوازي الصاخب الذي يتم الزحف إليه عبر الويب', 'es': 'Zipporah: un sistema de limpieza de datos rápido y escalable para cuerpos paralelos ruidosos rastreados por la web', 'fr': 'Zipporah\xa0: un système de nettoyage de données rapide et évolutif pour les corpus parallèles bruyants analysés sur le Web', 'pt': 'Zipporah: um sistema de limpeza de dados rápido e escalável para corpos paralelos rastreados pela Web barulhentos', 'ja': 'Zipporah ：ノイズの多いWebクロール型パラレルコーポラルのための高速でスケーラブルなデータクリーニングシステム', 'zh': 'Zipporah曰:疾其数,Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora其数', 'hi': 'Zipporah: शोर वेब क्रॉल समानांतर निगम के लिए एक तेज और स्केलेबल डेटा सफाई प्रणाली', 'ru': 'Zipporah: Быстрая и Масштабируемая Система Очистки Данных для Шумных Параллельных Корпусов Web-Crawled', 'ga': 'Zipporah: Córas Glanta Sonraí Tapa Inscálaithe do Chorpóra Comhuaineach Noisy Web-sraithte', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Zipporah: egy gyors és skálázható adattisztító rendszer zajos webes feltérképezésű párhuzamos Corpora számára', 'el': 'Ένα γρήγορο και κλιμακωτό σύστημα καθαρισμού δεδομένων για θορυβώδες παράλληλο σώμα', 'it': 'Zipporah: un sistema di pulizia dati veloce e scalabile per Corpora Parallela Crawled Web Noisy', 'kk': 'Zipporah: Жылдамды және масштабтау деректерді тазалау жүйесі үшін Шығыс Веб- Crawled параллелі корпора', 'mk': 'Зипора: Брз и скалиран систем за чистење на податоци за бучни веб-кревети паралелни корпора', 'lt': 'Zipora: greito ir mastelio duomenų valymo sistema triukšmui naudojant tinklo krautuvus paralelines korporas', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Zipporah: a Fast and Scalable Data Cleaning System for Noisy Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora', 'mt': 'Zipporah: Sistema ta’ Nadif ta’ Dejta Rapida u Skalabbli għal Korpora Paralleli tal-Istorbju fuq il-Bżieżaq tal-Internet', 'ro': 'Zipporah: un sistem rapid și scalabil de curățare a datelor pentru Corpora paralelă zgomotoasă pe web', 'pl': 'Zipporah: szybki i skalowalny system czyszczenia danych dla hałasowego równoległego korpusu sieciowego', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Zipporah: Хурдан болон Scalable Data Cleaning System for Noisy Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora', 'so': 'Zipporah: A fast and scaleable Data Clearing System of Noisy Web-Crawled Parallel', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Zipporah: brzi i izmjerljivi sistem čišćenja podataka za bezveznu mrežnu paralelnu korporu', 'sv': 'Zipporah: ett snabbt och skalbart system för datarengöring för bullriga webbaserade parallella Corpora', 'ur': 'Zipporah: ایک سریع اور اسکابل ڈاٹا پاک کرنے سیسٹم نائز ویب-کرولد پارالی کورپور کے لئے', 'ta': 'Zipporah: வேகமாக மற்றும் அளவாக்கக்கூடிய தகவல் சுத்தம் அமைப்பு', 'uz': 'Zipporah: a Fast and Scalable Data Cleaning System for Noisy Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora', 'vi': 'Zipporah: một Hệ thống quét dữ liệu nhanh và có khả năng gây nhiễu từ mạng, Parallel Corpus.', 'bg': 'Бърза и мащабируема система за почистване на данни за шумен паралелен корпор', 'da': 'Zipporah: et hurtigt og skalerbart datarengøringssystem til støjende web-crawled Parallel Corpora', 'nl': 'Zipporah: een snel en schaalbaar systeem voor gegevenszuivering voor lawaaierig web-crawled parallel corpora', 'hr': 'Zipporah: brzi i izmjerljivi sustav čišćenja podataka za bolnu mrežu i paralelnu korporu', 'ko': 'Zipporah: 빠르고 확장 가능한 소음 네트워크 기어오르기 병렬 자료 라이브러리 데이터 정리 시스템', 'id': 'Zipporah: Sistem Pembersihan Data Cepat dan Berskala untuk Korpora Paralel Bersuara Web-Crawled', 'fa': 'Zipporah: یک سیستم پاک کردن داده\u200cهای سریع و اندازه\u200cپذیر برای خروج پارالی\u200cای شبکه\u200cهای سنگین', 'sw': 'Zipporah: a Fast and Scalable Data Cleaning System for Noisy Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora', 'de': 'Zipporah: ein schnelles und skalierbares Datenbereinigungssystem für rauschende Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora', 'tr': 'Zipora: Aýalýan Web-Crawled Parallel Köpüri üçin Hızlı we Resim Maglumaty Temizleme Sistemi', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Զիպպորա. արագ և ընդլայնելի տվյալների մաքրման համակարգ աղմկոտ համացանցի զուգահեռ կորպորայի համար', 'az': 'Zipporah: S칲p칲rl칲 Web-Crawled Parallel Corpora 칲칞칲n H캼zl캼 v톛 M톛zil톛nirli Veri Temizl톛nm톛 Sistemi', 'sq': 'Zippora: një sistem i shpejtë dhe të shkallëzueshëm pastrimi i të dhënave për një korporë paralele të zhurmshme në internet', 'bs': 'Zipporah: brzi i izmjerljivi sustav čišćenja podataka za bezveznu mrežu paralelnu korporu', 'bn': 'জিপোরা: নোয়েসি ওয়েব- ক্রাউল করা পারেল কোর্পোরার জন্য দ্রুত এবং পরিমাণ তথ্য পরিষ্কার সিস্টেম', 'ca': 'Zipporah: un sistema de netejació ràpida i escalable de dades per a una corpora paralèl·lela de soroll', 'cs': 'Zipporah: rychlý a škálovatelný systém čištění dat pro hlučné paralelní korpusy procházené webem', 'et': 'Zipporah: kiire ja skaleeritav andmete puhastamise süsteem mürase veebipõhise paralleelse korpuse jaoks', 'fi': 'Zipporah: nopea ja skaalautuva tiedonpuhdistusjĂ¤rjestelmĂ¤ meluisalle Web-Crawled Parallel Corporalle', 'jv': 'paper size', 'he': 'זיפורה: מערכת ניקוי נתונים מהירה ומקבלת לנקות רשת מזויפת רעש', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Zipporah: hiter in prilagodljiv sistem za čiščenje podatkov za hrupno vzporedno korpuso s spletom', 'bo': 'Zipporah: འཕྱུར་མཚམས་དང་ཚད་རྟགས་ཅན་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལུགས་པ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཁ་ཡིག་ཆ་གཙང་དག་གི་མ་ལག་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'We introduce Zipporah, a fast and scalable data cleaning system. We propose a novel type of bag-of-words translation feature, and train logistic regression models to classify good data and synthetic noisy data in the proposed feature space. The trained model is used to score parallel sentences in the data pool for selection. As shown in experiments, Zipporah selects a high-quality parallel corpus from a large, mixed quality data pool. In particular, for one noisy dataset, Zipporah achieves a 2.1 BLEU score improvement with using 1/5 of the data over using the entire corpus.', 'ar': 'نقدم Zipporah ، وهو نظام تنظيف بيانات سريع وقابل للتطوير. نقترح نوعًا جديدًا من ميزة ترجمة حقيبة الكلمات ، ونقوم بتدريب نماذج الانحدار اللوجستي لتصنيف البيانات الجيدة والبيانات الاصطناعية المزعجة في مساحة الميزة المقترحة. يتم استخدام النموذج المدرب لتسجيل جمل متوازية في تجمع البيانات للاختيار. كما هو موضح في التجارب ، يختار Zipporah مجموعة موازية عالية الجودة من مجموعة بيانات كبيرة مختلطة الجودة. على وجه الخصوص ، بالنسبة لمجموعة بيانات واحدة مزعجة ، يحقق Zipporah تحسنًا في درجة 2.1 BLEU باستخدام 1/5 من البيانات فوق استخدام المجموعة بأكملها.', 'es': 'Presentamos Zipporah, un sistema de limpieza de datos rápido y escalable. Proponemos un tipo novedoso de función de traducción de bolsa de palabras y entrenamos modelos de regresión logística para clasificar los datos buenos y los datos ruidosos sintéticos en el espacio de características propuesto. El modelo entrenado se utiliza para puntuar oraciones paralelas en el grupo de datos para su selección. Como se muestra en los experimentos, Zipporah selecciona un corpus paralelo de alta calidad de un grupo de datos grande y de calidad mixta. En particular, para un conjunto de datos ruidoso, Zipporah logra una mejora en la puntuación BLEU de 2.1 con el uso de 1/5 de los datos en comparación con el uso de todo el corpus.', 'fr': "Nous présentons Zipporah, un système de nettoyage de données rapide et évolutif. Nous proposons un nouveau type de fonction de traduction de sacs de mots et entraînons des modèles de régression logistique pour classer les bonnes données et les données bruitées synthétiques dans l'espace de caractéristiques proposé. Le modèle entraîné est utilisé pour noter des phrases parallèles dans la banque de données à des fins de sélection. Comme le montrent les expériences, Zipporah sélectionne un corpus parallèle de haute qualité à partir d'un vaste pool de données de qualité mixte. En particulier, pour un ensemble de données bruyant, Zipporah obtient une amélioration du score UEBL de 2,1 en utilisant 1/5 des données par rapport à l'utilisation de l'ensemble du corpus.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos o Zipporah, um sistema de limpeza de dados rápido e escalável. Propomos um novo tipo de recurso de tradução de saco de palavras e treinamos modelos de regressão logística para classificar dados bons e dados sintéticos ruidosos no espaço de recursos proposto. O modelo treinado é usado para pontuar sentenças paralelas no conjunto de dados para seleção. Conforme mostrado nos experimentos, o Zipporah seleciona um corpus paralelo de alta qualidade de um grande conjunto de dados de qualidade mista. Em particular, para um conjunto de dados ruidoso, o Zipporah alcança uma melhoria de pontuação de 2,1 BLEU com o uso de 1/5 dos dados em relação ao uso de todo o corpus.', 'ja': '高速でスケーラブルなデータクリーニングシステムであるZipporahをご紹介します。私たちは、新しいタイプの単語袋翻訳機能を提案し、提案された特徴空間内の良好なデータと合成ノイズのあるデータを分類するためのロジスティック回帰モデルをトレーニングします。訓練されたモデルは、選択のためにデータプール内の並列文をスコアリングするために使用される。実験で示されているように、Zipporahは大規模な混合品質データプールから高品質の並列コーパスを選択します。特に、1つのノイズの多いデータセットについて、Zipporahは、コーパス全体を使用してデータの1/5を使用して2.1 BLEUスコアの改善を達成します。', 'hi': 'हम Zipporah, एक तेज और स्केलेबल डेटा सफाई प्रणाली पेश करते हैं। हम एक उपन्यास प्रकार के बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स अनुवाद सुविधा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और प्रस्तावित फीचर स्पेस में अच्छे डेटा और सिंथेटिक शोर डेटा को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। प्रशिक्षित मॉडल का उपयोग चयन के लिए डेटा पूल में समानांतर वाक्यों को स्कोर करने के लिए किया जाता है। जैसा कि प्रयोगों में दिखाया गया है, ज़िपपोरा एक बड़े, मिश्रित गुणवत्ता वाले डेटा पूल से एक उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले समानांतर कॉर्पस का चयन करता है। विशेष रूप से, एक शोर डेटासेट के लिए, ज़िपपोरा पूरे कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके डेटा के 1/5 का उपयोग करने के साथ 2.1 BLEU स्कोर सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '我们介绍Zipporah,一个快速可以扩展的数据清系统。 立新型词包译特征,并练逻辑归模形,空中好数与合成噪声数分类。 凡训练之法,以并行句评分供选择。 如实验所示,Zipporah 从大混合质量池中择高质量者并行语料库。 其于一嘈杂之数集,Zipporah用1/5之数而不用全语料库,成2.1 BLEU分之数也。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем Zipporah, быструю и масштабируемую систему очистки данных. Мы предлагаем новый тип функции перевода Bag-of-Sords и обучаем модели логистической регрессии для классификации хороших данных и синтетических шумных данных в предлагаемом пространстве функций. Обученная модель используется для оценки параллельных предложений в пуле данных для отбора. Как показано в экспериментах, Zipporah выбирает высококачественный параллельный корпус из большого пула данных смешанного качества. В частности, для одного шумного набора данных Zipporah достигает улучшения оценки 2.1 BLEU с использованием 1/5 данных по сравнению с использованием всего тела.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach Zipporah, córas glanta sonraí tapa agus inscálaithe. Molaimid cineál nua de ghné aistriúcháin mála focal, agus cuirfimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí cúlchéimnithe lóistíochta chun sonraí maithe agus sonraí fuaimiúla sintéiseacha a rangú sa ghnéspás atá beartaithe. Úsáidtear an tsamhail oilte chun abairtí comhthreomhara a scóráil sa chomhthiomsú sonraí le haghaidh roghnúcháin. Mar a léirítear i dturgnaimh, roghnaíonn Zipporah corpas comhthreomhar ardcháilíochta ó chomhthiomsú mór sonraí cáilíochta measctha. Go háirithe, maidir le tacar sonraí torannacha amháin, baineann Zipporah amach feabhas scór 2.1 BLEU trí 1/5 de na sonraí a úsáid thar an gcorpas iomlán a úsáid.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ Zipporah-ს გაჩვენებთ, სწრაფად და სკვიალური მონაცემების გაფორმება სისტემა. ჩვენ პრომენტიკური ტიპი სიტყვების გადაწყვეტილება და ლოგისტიკური რეგრესიის მოდელების გაგრძნობა, რომ საკუთარი მონაცემები და სინტეტიკური სიტყვეტიკური მონაცემები კლასიფიკაცი მონაცემების მოდელი მონიშნულია მონიშნულების მონაცემებისთვის პარალელური სიტყვებისთვის. როგორც გამოჩვენებულია ექსპერიმენტებში, Zipporah ამოირჩევს დიდი, შემგრძელებული კალგატიური მონაცემების ბასონიდან მაღალი პარალელი კორპუსს. განსაკუთრებულია, ერთი ძალიან მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის, Zipporah მიიღება 2,1 BLEU მონაცემების უფრო მეტია, რომელიც 1/5 მონაცემების გამოყენება უფრო კოპუს', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a Zipporah-t, egy gyors és skálázható adattisztító rendszert. Új típusú fordítási funkciót javasolunk, és logisztikai regressziós modelleket készítünk a jó adatok és a szintetikus zajos adatok osztályozására a javasolt funkciótérben. A képzett modellt használjuk párhuzamos mondatok pontozására az adatkészletben a kiválasztás céljából. Amint azt a kísérletek mutatják, a Zipporah kiváló minőségű párhuzamos korpuszt választ ki egy nagy, vegyes minőségű adatkészletből. Különösen egy zajos adatkészlet esetében a Zipporah 2,1 BLEU pontszámot ér el azzal, hogy az adatok 1/5-ét használja fel a teljes korpusz felhasználásával.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα γρήγορο και κλιμακωτό σύστημα καθαρισμού δεδομένων. Προτείνουμε έναν νέο τύπο μεταφραστικού χαρακτηριστικού σάκου λέξεων και εκπαιδεύουμε μοντέλα λογιστικής παλινδρόμησης για την ταξινόμηση καλών δεδομένων και συνθετικών θορυβωδών δεδομένων στον προτεινόμενο χώρο χαρακτηριστικών. Το εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο χρησιμοποιείται για να σκοράρει παράλληλες προτάσεις στην πισίνα δεδομένων για επιλογή. Όπως φαίνεται σε πειράματα, η Zipporah επιλέγει ένα υψηλής ποιότητας παράλληλο σώμα από μια μεγάλη, μικτή συλλογή δεδομένων ποιότητας. Ειδικότερα, για ένα θορυβώδες σύνολο δεδομένων, η Zipporah επιτυγχάνει βελτίωση βαθμολογίας 2.1 με τη χρήση 1/5 των δεδομένων πέρα από τη χρήση ολόκληρου του σώματος.', 'it': "Presentiamo Zipporah, un sistema di pulizia dati veloce e scalabile. Proponiamo un nuovo tipo di funzionalità di traduzione bag-of-words e addestriamo modelli di regressione logistica per classificare dati buoni e dati sonori sintetici nello spazio di funzionalità proposto. Il modello addestrato viene utilizzato per segnare frasi parallele nel pool di dati per la selezione. Come mostrato negli esperimenti, Zipporah seleziona un corpus parallelo di alta qualità da un ampio pool di dati di qualità mista. In particolare, per un set di dati rumoroso, Zipporah ottiene un miglioramento del punteggio BLEU di 2,1 utilizzando 1/5 dei dati sopra l'utilizzo dell'intero corpus.", 'kk': 'Біз Zipporah-ды жылдам және масштабтау деректерді тазалау жүйесін таңдаймыз. Біз романдық түрлі сөздерді аудару мүмкіндігін және логистикалық регрессия үлгілерін жақсы деректер мен синтетикалық дыбыс деректерін келтіру үшін ұсынамыз. Таңдау үшін келесі үлгі деректер басында параллель сөздерді есептеу үшін қолданылады. Тәжірибелерде, Zipporah үлкен, араластырылған сапатты деректер басынан жоғары сапатты параллель корпусты таңдайды. Мысалы, бір дыбыс деректер жинағы үшін Zipporah барлық корпус қолдану үшін 1/5 деректерді қолдану үшін 2,1 BLEU нәтижесін жақсартады.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan Zipporah, sistem pembersihan data yang cepat dan boleh diperbaiki. Kami mengusulkan jenis novel ciri terjemahan-beg-kata, dan melatih model regresi logistik untuk mengklasifikasi data yang baik dan data bunyi sintetik dalam ruang ciri yang diusulkan. Model dilatih digunakan untuk skor kalimat selari dalam kumpulan data untuk pemilihan. Seperti yang dipaparkan dalam eksperimen, Zipporah memilih korpus paralel berkualiti tinggi dari kolam data berkualiti bercampur besar. Terutama, untuk satu set data bunyi, Zipporah mencapai peningkatan skor 2.1 BLEU dengan menggunakan 1/5 daripada menggunakan seluruh korpus.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome Ziporą, greitą ir skaliuojamą duomenų valymo sistemą. Siūlome naują žodžių maišelio vertimo savybę ir treniruodami logistinės regresijos modelius, kad siūlomoje savybių erdvėje būtų klasifikuojami geri duomenys ir sintetiniai triukšmingi duomenys. Mokytas model is naudojamas lygiagretiems sakiniams rinkti duomenų rinkinyje nustatyti. Kaip parodyta eksperimentuose, Zippora atrinka aukštos kokybės paralelinį korpusą iš didelio mišraus kokybės duomenų rinkinio. Ypač viename triukšmingame duomenų rinkinyje Zippora pasiekia 2,1 BLEU rezultato pagerėjimą naudojant 1/5 duomenų, o ne naudojant visą korpusą.', 'mk': 'Го претставуваме Зипора, брз и скалиран систем за чистење на податоци. Предложуваме нов тип на преведувачки функции за торба со зборови, и обучуваме логистички регресни модели за класификација на добри податоци и синтетички шумни податоци во предложениот простор за функции. Тренираниот модел се користи за постигнување паралелни реченици во базата на податоци за избор. Како што се покажа во експериментите, Зипора избира висококвалитетен паралелен корпус од голем, мешан квалитетен базен на податоци. Посебно, за еден бучен компјутер на податоци, Зипара постигна подобрување на БЛЕУ резултатот од 2,1 со употреба на 1/5 од податоците над употребата на целиот корпус.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu Zipporah, sistema ta’ tindif tad-dejta rapida u skalabbli. Aħna nipproponu tip ġdid ta’ karatteristika ta’ traduzzjoni ta’ borża ta’ kliem, u nħarrġu mudelli ta’ rigressjoni loġistika biex tikklassifika dejta tajba u dejta sintetika storbjuża fl-ispazju ta’ karatteristiċi propost. Il-mudell imħarreġ jintuża biex jinkisbu sentenzi paralleli fil-ġabra tad-dejta għall-għażla. Kif muri fl-esperimenti, Zipporah jagħżel korpus parallel ta’ kwalità għolja minn ġabra kbira ta’ dejta ta’ kwalità mħallta. In particular, for one noisy dataset, Zipporah achieves a 2.1 BLEU score improvement with using 1/5 of the data over using the entire corpus.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d സിപ്പോറാഹിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, വേഗത്തിലും പരിശുദ്ധ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വൃത്തിയാക്കുന്ന സി പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിശേഷസ്ഥലത്തില്\u200d നല്ല ഡേറ്റായും സിന്തിറ്റിക്ക് ശബ്ദ വിവരങ്ങളും വിശദീകരിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d തരം ബാഗ്-ഓ-വ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡാറ്റാ പൂളിലെ പാരാളല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി പരിശീ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d കാണിക്കപ്പെടുന്നത് പോലെ, സിപ്പോറാ ഒരു വലിയ, mixed quality data പൂളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ഉയര്\u200dത്തിപ്പാള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ത പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഒരു ശബ്ദ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റിന്, സിപ്പോറാഹ് മുഴുവന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d 1/5 ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d 2.', 'mn': 'Бид Zipporah-г хурдан, хэмжээтэй мэдээллийн цэвэрлэх системийг танилцуулдаг. Бид шинэ хэлбэрийн үг хэлбэрээр орчуулах чадвар, логист регрессийн загварыг сургаж өгөгдлийн болон шинэ сонсолт өгөгдлийн санааг санал болгох зорилготой. Сургуулсан загвар нь сонголтын суурь дээр параллел өгүүлбэрүүдийг тооцоолж хэрэглэгддэг. Зиппора туршилтын хувьд маш өндөр чанартай параллел корпус агуулдаг. Ялангуяа нэг чимээгүй өгөгдлийн сангийн тулд Zipporah 2.1 БЛЕС тооны сайжруулалт гарч ирнэ. Бүх корпус ашиглан 1/5 өгөгдлийн сангийн сайжруулалт гарч ирнэ.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer Zipporah, ein rask og skalerbar dataoppryggingssystem. Vi foreslår eit nytt type omsetjingsfunksjon av bag-of-words, og treng logistiske regresjonsmodular for å klassifisera gode data og syntetiske støydata i den foreslåtte funksjonsplassen. Den trengte modellen vert brukt til å teikna parallelle setningar i databasen for utval. Som vist i eksperimenter, vil Zipporah velja ein høg kvalitet parallell korpus frå eit stor, blandet kvalitetdatabasen. Sjølvsagt for ein støyrande dataset, oppnår Zipporah eit forbedring av 2,1 BLEU-poeng med 1/5 av data over heile korpus.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy Zipporah, szybki i skalowalny system czyszczenia danych. Proponujemy nowy rodzaj funkcji tłumaczenia worków słów oraz trenujemy modele regresji logistycznej w celu klasyfikacji dobrych danych i syntetycznych danych szumownych w proponowanej przestrzeni funkcji. Przeszkolony model służy do oceny zdań równoległych w puli danych do wyboru. Jak pokazano w eksperymentach, Zipporah wybiera wysokiej jakości korpus równoległy z dużej, mieszanej jakości puli danych. W szczególności dla jednego szumowego zbioru danych Zipporah osiąga poprawę wyniku 2.1 BLEU dzięki użyciu 1/5 danych nad wykorzystaniem całego korpusu.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo Zipporah, brzi i skalabilni sistem čišćenja podataka. Predlažemo novu vrstu prevodnog karakteristika vreća riječi i obučavamo modele logističke regresije kako bi klasifikovali dobre podatke i sintetičke bučne podatke u predloženom prostoru. Trenirani model se koristi za rezultat paralelnih rečenica u bazenu podataka za izbor. Kao što je pokazalo u eksperimentima, Zipporah odabere visokokvalitetni paralelni korpus iz velikog, mešanog bazena kvalitetnih podataka. Posebno, za jednu bučnu setu podataka, Zipporah postiže poboljšanje rezultata 2,1 BLEU sa upotrebom 1/5 podataka o upotrebi cijelog korpusa.', 'ro': 'Introducem Zipporah, un sistem rapid și scalabil de curățare a datelor. Propunem un tip nou de caracteristică de traducere sac-of-words și instruim modele de regresie logistică pentru a clasifica date bune și date zgomotoase sintetice în spațiul de caracteristici propus. Modelul instruit este folosit pentru a scora propoziții paralele în baza de date pentru selecție. După cum se arată în experimente, Zipporah selectează un corp paralel de înaltă calitate dintr-un bazin mare de date de calitate mixtă. În special, pentru un set de date zgomotos, Zipporah obține o îmbunătățire a scorului BLEU de 2,1 prin utilizarea a 1/5 din date peste utilizarea întregului corpus.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa Zipporah, nidaamka nadiifsashada macluumaadka ee dhaqsaha iyo qiyaasta. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa nooca warqada ah oo ah bagga-of-words turjumidda, waxaana ku tababarinnaa noocyo-logistic regression, si aan u fasaxno macluumaadka wanaagga iyo taarifka santetisti oo codsiga ah goobta la soo jeedo. Tusaale tababarida ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa in loo soo bandhigi karo hababka lambarka ee balliga macluumaadka. Sida loo muujiyey jirrabaadda, Zipporah wuxuu ka doortaa korpus isku mid ah oo ka mid ah balliga macluumaadka tijaabada. Si gaar ah, Sipporah wuxuu u baahan yahay kordhiska kooxda BLEU 2.1 si uu u isticmaalo 1/5 macluumaadka isticmaalka kooxda oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar Zipporah, ett snabbt och skalbart system för datarening. Vi föreslår en ny typ av översättningsfunktion för säck-of-words och tränar logistiska regressionsmodeller för att klassificera bra data och syntetiska bullriga data i det föreslagna funktionsutrymmet. Den utbildade modellen används för att göra parallella meningar i datapoolen för urval. Som visas i experiment väljer Zipporah en högkvalitativ parallell korpus från en stor datapool med blandad kvalitet. Särskilt för en bullrig datauppsättning uppnår Zipporah en förbättring av BLEU-poäng på 2,1 genom att använda 1/5 av data över att använda hela korpusen.', 'ta': 'நாம் Zipporah, ஒரு வேகமாகவும் scalable data cleansing அமைப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம். நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பண்புகளில் பாக்- of- words மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பண்பு பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி தேர்வு செய்வதற்கான தரவு தூளில் இணைய வாக்கியங்களை மதிப்பெடுக்க பயன்படுத்தப்பட சோதனைகளில் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டது போல, Zipporah ஒரு பெரிய, கலந்த தரவு கூட்டத்திலிருந்து ஒரு உயர்தரமான இணைப்பு கூட்டை தேர் குறிப்பிட்டு, ஒரு ஒலி தகவல் அமைப்புக்கு, Zipporah ஒரு 2. 1 பிலியு மதிப்பு மேம்படுத்துகிறது, முழு கார்ப்ஸ் பயன்படுத்தி தகவல் 1/5 பயன்படுத', 'si': 'අපි Zipporeh වේගයෙන් ස්කේල් කරන්න පුළුවන් දත්ත සුද්ධ කරන්න පද්ධතියක්. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා බෑග්-වචන් වාර්තාවක් විශේෂයක් වගේ, සහ හ හොඳ දත්ත සහ සංවිධාන ශබ්ද දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක තෝරණය සඳහා තොරතුරු පුළුවන් දත්ත පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරන්න භාවිත කරන්න. පරීක්ෂණාවට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, Zipporeh විශේෂ සාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පස් එකක් තෝරාගන්නවා ලොකු, මිශාල විශේෂයෙන්, සිප්පෝරාහ් එක්ක ශබ්ද දත්ත සෙට් වෙනුවෙන්, සම්පූර්ණ කොර්පුස් භාවිතා කරන්න දත්ත 1/5 ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් බ', 'ur': 'ہم Zipporah کو پہنچاتے ہیں، ایک سریع اور اسکیل قابل پاکیزگی سیستم. ہم ایک نئی طرح کی پیغام دیتے ہیں لغات کی ترجمہ فرصت، اور لوژیک ریگرس موڈلز کی ترکین دیتے ہیں کہ اچھی ڈیٹا اور سینٹیسی غږ ڈیٹا کو پیشنهاد کی فرصت جگہ میں کلاس کریں. انتخاب کے لئے ڈیٹ پول میں پارالی وینٹوں کا سکوٹ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. جیسے آزمائش میں دکھائی جاتی ہے، Zipporah ایک بڑے، مختلف کیلومتی ڈیٹ پول سے ایک بلند کیلومتی پارالل کورپوس کو انتخاب کرتا ہے. مخصوصا، ایک صوت ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے Zipporah نے 2.1 BLEU اسکور کا مزید پہنچایا ہے جو تمام کورپوس کے استعمال سے 1/5 ڈاٹ کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz Zipporah, tez va qisqatlab maʼlumot tozasini ko'rsatumiz. Biz soʻzlar tarjima xossalarining novel turini tahlil qilamiz, va tahrirlangan xossada yaxshi maʼlumot va syntetik yoʻlning maʼlumotini moslash uchun logistik boshqarish modellarini taʼminlaydimiz. Taʼminlovchi modeli tanlangan maʼlumot poolida parallel soʻzlarni qidirish uchun ishlatiladi. Zipporah tajribalarda ko'rsatilgan ko'rsatilgan katta qiymati maʼlumot koʻplamdan juda katta balandlik parametrlarni tanlang. Bitta qiyin maʼlumotlar uchun Zipporah butun kompyuterdan foydalanadigan maʼlumot bilan 1/5 yordamida 2.1 BLEU qiymatni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu Zipporah, một hệ thống quét dữ liệu nhanh gọn có bỏng. Chúng tôi đề xuất một loại mới tinh của tính năng dịch chuyển túi bằng từ, và mô hình phục hồi hàng hoá học để phân loại dữ liệu tốt và dữ liệu ồn ào tổng hợp trong nội dung dự kiến. Người mẫu được huấn luyện được dùng để ghi các câu song trong hồ sơ dữ liệu để chọn. Như các thí nghiệm đã thấy, Zipporah đã chọn một tập thể song song phẩm chất lượng cao từ một bể chứa dữ liệu chất lượng chung lớn. Ví dụ, với một bộ dữ liệu ồn ào, Zipporah tiến bộ ghi điểm 2.1 tiếng bíp bằng cách dùng một/5 của dữ liệu bằng cách sử dụng toàn bộ tập đoàn.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer Zipporah, et hurtigt og skalerbart datarensningssystem. Vi foreslår en ny type sæk-of-words oversættelsesfunktion, og træner logistiske regressionsmodeller til at klassificere gode data og syntetiske støjende data i det foreslåede funktionsrum. Den trænede model bruges til at score parallelle sætninger i datapuljen til udvælgelse. Som vist i eksperimenter vælger Zipporah et parallelt korpus af høj kvalitet fra en stor datapulje af blandet kvalitet. Især for ét støjende datasæt opnår Zipporah en 2,1 BLEU score forbedring ved at bruge 1/5 af dataene over at bruge hele korpustet.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo Zipporah, brzi i skalabilni sustav čišćenja podataka. Predlažemo novu vrstu prevoditelja torbe riječi i obučavamo modele logističke regresije kako bi klasifikirali dobre podatke i sintetičke bučne podatke u predloženom prostoru. Obučen model se koristi za rezultat paralelnih rečenica u bazenu podataka za izbor. Kao što je pokazalo u eksperimentima, Zipporah odabere visokokvalitetan paralelni korpus iz velikog, mješanog bazena podataka o kvaliteti. Posebno, za jednu bučnu skupu podataka, Zipporah postigne poboljšanje rezultata BLEU-a od 2,1 s korištenjem 1/5 podataka preko cijelog korpusa.', 'bg': 'Представяме бърза и мащабируема система за почистване на данни. Предлагаме нов тип функция за превод на торба с думи и тренираме логистични регресионни модели за класифициране на добри данни и синтетични шумни данни в предложеното пространство за характеристика. Обученият модел се използва за оценка на паралелни изречения в базата данни за подбор. Както е показано в експериментите, избира висококачествен паралелен корпус от голям, смесен набор от данни. По-специално, за един шумен набор от данни, постига подобрение на оценката с 2.1 с използване на 1/5 от данните в сравнение с използването на целия корпус.', 'nl': 'We introduceren Zipporah, een snel en schaalbaar data cleaning systeem. We stellen een nieuw type van bag-of-words vertaalfunctie voor en trainen logistieke regressiemodellen om goede gegevens en synthetische ruisige gegevens in de voorgestelde kenmerkruimte te classificeren. Het getrainde model wordt gebruikt om parallelle zinnen te scoren in de datapool voor selectie. Zoals in experimenten is aangetoond, selecteert Zipporah een hoogwaardig parallel corpus uit een grote, gemengde datapool. Met name voor één lawaaierige dataset bereikt Zipporah een 2.1 BLEU score verbetering door 1/5 van de data te gebruiken boven het gehele corpus.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan Zipporah, sistem pembersihan data yang cepat dan dapat diperbaiki. We propose a novel type of bag-of-words translation feature, and train logistic regression models to classify good data and synthetic noisy data in the proposed feature space.  Model terlatih digunakan untuk mencetak kalimat paralel di kolam data untuk pemilihan. Seperti yang ditunjukkan dalam eksperimen, Zipporah memilih corpus paralel kualitas tinggi dari kolam data kualitas yang besar dan bercampur. Terutama, untuk satu set data yang berisik, Zipporah mencapai peningkatan skor 2.1 BLEU dengan menggunakan 1/5 dari data lebih dari menggunakan seluruh corpus.', 'de': 'Wir stellen Zipporah vor, ein schnelles und skalierbares Datenreinigungssystem. Wir schlagen einen neuartigen Typ von Bag-of-Words-Übersetzungsfunktionen vor und trainieren logistische Regressionsmodelle, um gute Daten und synthetische Rauschdaten im vorgeschlagenen Feature-Raum zu klassifizieren. Das trainierte Modell wird verwendet, um parallele Sätze im Datenpool für die Auswahl zu bewerten. Wie in Experimenten gezeigt, wählt Zipporah aus einem großen, gemischten Datenpool einen hochwertigen Parallelkorpus aus. Insbesondere für einen Rauschdatensatz erreicht Zipporah eine 2.1 BLEU-Score-Verbesserung, indem 1/5 der Daten über die Verwendung des gesamten Korpuss verwendet wird.', 'fa': 'ما سیستم تمیز داده های سریع و مقیاس قابل توصیف می کنیم. ما یک نوع رمانی از ویژگی ترجمه کلمات را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، و مدل\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای لوژیک را آموزش می\u200cدهیم تا داده\u200cهای خوب و داده\u200cهای صوتی سناتیک را در فضای ویژگی پیشنهاد کند. مدل آموزش برای امتیاز جمله\u200cهای پارالی در استخراج داده برای انتخاب استفاده می\u200cشود. همانطور که در آزمایشات نشان داده می\u200cشود، Zipporah یک کورپوس پارالی با کیفیت بالا از یک استخر داده\u200cهای کیفیت بزرگ، مختلف شده انتخاب می\u200cکند. مخصوصا، برای یک مجموعه اطلاعات صوتی، Zipporah یک تغییر درجه ۲.۱ BLEU با استفاده از ۱/۵ از اطلاعات در مورد استفاده از کل کورپوس رسیده است.', 'tr': 'Zipporany tiz we ölçeklenýän maglumaty temizlemek sistemini tanyşdyrýarys. Biz bir roman hili bag-of-word terjime wajyplygyny teklip edip, we logistik regressiýa nusgalary teklip edip görkezilen özelliklerde gowy maglumatlar we syntetik goş maglumatlary klasifikasy üçin teklip edýäris. Çaltylyk modi maglumaty pool üçin parallel sözleri sanlamak üçin ullanýar Zipporah deneylerde görkezilýän ýaly uly, karmaşık kwalitet maglumaty pool üçin ýokary kaliteli parallel korpusy saýlaýar. Adatça, bir gürrüňli veri setigi üçin Zipporah bütin korpusy ulanyp bilýän maglumatyň 1/5 üstüne golaýlaşýar.', 'ko': '빠르고 확장 가능한 데이터 정리 시스템인 Zipporah를 소개합니다.우리는 새로운 어구 번역 특징을 제시했고 이 특징 공간에서logistic 회귀 모델을 훈련시켜 좋은 데이터와 합성 소음 데이터를 분류했다.훈련된 모델은 데이터 탱크에서 평행 문장을 평가하여 선택할 수 있도록 한다.실험에서 보듯이 Zipporah는 대형, 혼합 품질의 데이터 탱크에서 고품질의 평행 언어 자료 라이브러리를 선택했다.특히 잡음이 있는 데이터 세트에 대해 Zipporah는 5분의 1의 데이터를 사용하는 것이 전체 어료 라이브러리를 사용하는 데이터보다 2.1 BLEU 점수를 높였다.', 'af': "Ons introduseer Zipporah 'n vinnige en skalerbare data skoonmaak stelsel. Ons voorstel 'n roman tipe pak van woorde vertaling funksie, en trein logistike regresie modele om goeie data en sintetiese ruis data in die voorgestelde funksie spasie te klassifiseer. Die gevorderde model is gebruik om parallele teikens in die data poort vir keuse te tel. Soos vertoon in eksperimente, Kies Zipporah 'n hoë- kwaliteit parallele korpus van' n groot, gemengde kwaliteit data poort. Spesifieke, vir een geluidige datastel, het Zipporah 'n 2.1 BLEU-poeier verbetering bereik met die gebruik van 1/5 van die data oor die gebruik van die hele korpus.", 'am': 'ዝppora፣ ፈጥኖ እና የተለየ የዳታ ማጥራት ስርዓት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የቦስክ-የቃላት ትርጉም ምርጫዎች እና የግንኙነትን ሥርዓት ሞዴላዎችን ለመግለጥ እና በተፈቀደው የአፍሪካ ስፋት ውስጥ መልካም ዳታ እና የድምፅ ድምፅ ዳታዎችን ለመግለጽ እናስጀምር፡፡ ምርጫ በተፈተና ውስጥ እንደሚታየው፣ ዚፕሮህ ከፍተኛ እና የተለየ የጥሩ ዳታ መቆሚያ ይምረጣል፡፡ በተለይም፣ ለአንድ ድምፅ ዳታተር፣ Zipporah የ2.1 BLEU score በመጠቀም በሙሉ ኮርፓስ በመጠቀም ከዳታ 1/5 በመጠቀም አግኝቷል፡፡', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha Zipporah, mfumo wa usafi wa data kwa haraka na kwa kasi. Tunazipendekeza a in a ya riwaya ya utafsiri wa maneno, na kufundisha miundo mbinu ya kudhibiti kilogistics ili kuweka taarifa nzuri na taarifa za sauti za pamoja katika nafasi inayopendekezwa. Mradi wa mafunzo unatumiwa kupunguza hukumu za usambazaji katika viwanja vya data kwa ajili ya uchaguzi. Kama ilivyoonyeshwa katika majaribio, Zipporah anachagua viungo vinavyofanana kwa kiwango kikubwa kutoka kwenye kiwango kikubwa cha data kinachochanganyika. Katika seti moja ya takwimu za kelele, Zipporah anafanikiwa kuboreshwa kwa vipindi 2.1 BLEU kwa kutumia takwimu 1/5 kwa kutumia vifaa vyote.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë Zippora, një sistem të shpejtë dhe të shkallëzueshëm pastrimi i të dhënave. Ne propozojmë një lloj të ri të llojit të përkthimit të çantës së fjalëve dhe trajnojmë modele logjistike të regresionit për të klasifikuar të dhënat e mira dhe të dhënat sintetike të zhurmshme në hapësirën e propozuar të llojit. Modeli i trajnuar përdoret për të shënuar fjalët paralele në grupin e të dhënave për zgjedhjen. Siç tregohet në eksperimente, Zippora zgjedh një korpus paralel të cilësisë së lartë nga një grup i madh të të dhënave të cilësisë së përzier. In particular, for one noisy dataset, Zipporah achieves a 2.1 BLEU score improvement with using 1/5 of the data over using the entire corpus.', 'az': "Zipporah'a hızlı və ölçə bilən məlumat təmizləmə sistemini tanıdırıq. Biz yeni məlumatları və sintetik səs məlumatlarını təyin edirik, təklif edilmiş fərqli alanda lojik regresiya modellerini təyin edirik. Əlavə edilən modeli seçim üçün məlumatların qutusunda paralel sözləri göstərmək üçün istifadə edilir. Zipporah təcrübələrdə göstərdiyi kimi, böyük, karışıq kaliteli məlumat pisindən yüksək kaliteli paralel korpusu seçir. Özellikle, bir gürültü verilən quruluğu üçün Zipporah bütün korpus istifadəsində 1/5 verilən məlumatların faydalanması ilə 2.1 BLEU dərəcələrini yaxşılaşdırar.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Զիպորա, արագ և ընդլայնելի տվյալների մաքրման համակարգը: We propose a novel type of bag-of-words translation feature, and train logistic regression models to classify good data and synthetic noisy data in the proposed feature space.  Պատրաստված մոդելը օգտագործվում է հավասար նախադասությունների գնահատման համար ընտրության համար: As shown in experiments, Zipporah selects a high-quality parallel corpus from a large, mixed quality data pool.  Մասնավորապես, մեկ աղմկոտ տվյալների համար Զիպորան հասնում է 2.1 ԲԼԵՎ գնահատականի բարելավման օգտագործելով տվյալների 1.5-ը ամբողջ կորպոսի օգտագործման մեջ:', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo Zipporah, brzi i skalabilni sistem čišćenja podataka. Predlažemo novu vrstu prevodnog karakteristika torbe riječi i obučavamo modele logističke regresije kako bi klasifikovali dobre podatke i sintetičke bučne podatke u predloženom prostoru. Trenirani model se koristi za rezultat paralelnih rečenica u bazenu podataka za izbor. Kao što je pokazalo u eksperimentima, Zipporah odabere visokokvalitetni paralelni korpus iz velikog, mešanog bazena podataka o kvaliteti. Posebno, za jedan bučni set podataka, Zipporah postigne poboljšanje rezultata 2,1 BLEU-a s upotrebom 1/5 podataka o upotrebi cijelog korpusa.', 'bn': 'আমরা জিপ্পোরাহ, একটি দ্রুত এবং পরিষ্কার তথ্য পরিষ্কার সিস্টেম। আমরা প্রস্তাবিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের জায়গায় ভালো তথ্য এবং সিন্টিটিক্যাটিক আওয়াজের তথ্য ব্যবহার করার জন্য একটি উপনোযানের ধরনের ব্যাগ-অফ-ওয়ার্ড প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল নির্বাচনের জন্য তথ্য পুলের প্যারালেল বাক্য স্কোর করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়। পরীক্ষায় যেমন দেখা যায়, জিপ্পোরাহ একটি বিশাল মানের মিশ্র মানের তথ্য পুল থেকে একটি উচ্চমান প্যারালেল কর্পুস নির্ব বিশেষ করে, একটি আওয়াজের ডাটাসেটের জন্য জিপ্পোরাহ পুরো কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে তথ্য ব্যবহার করে ২.', 'ca': "Introduïm Zipporah, un sistema de netejació ràpida i escalable de dades. We propose a novel type of bag-of-words translation feature, and train logistic regression models to classify good data and synthetic noisy data in the proposed feature space.  El model entrenat s'utilitza per puntuar frases paralleles a la reunió de dades per a seleccionar. As shown in experiments, Zipporah selects a high-quality parallel corpus from a large, mixed quality data pool.  En particular, per a un conjunt de dades sorolloses, Zipporah aconsegueix una millora de puntuació de 2,1 BLEU amb l'ús de 1/5 de les dades sobre l'ús del corpus sencer.", 'cs': 'Představujeme Zipporah, rychlý a škálovatelný systém čištění dat. Navrhujeme nový typ překladu sáčků slov a trénujeme logistické regresní modely pro klasifikaci dobrých dat a syntetických šumových dat v navrhovaném funkčním prostoru. Trénovaný model slouží k skórování paralelních vět v datovém fondu pro výběr. Jak bylo ukázáno v experimentech, Zipporah vybírá vysoce kvalitní paralelní korpus z velkého datového fondu smíšené kvality. Zejména pro jednu šumovou sadu dat Zipporah dosahuje zlepšení 2.1 BLEU skóre použitím 1/5 dat před použitím celého korpusu.', 'et': "Tutvustame Zipporah'i, kiiret ja skaleeritavat andmepuhastussüsteemi. Pakume välja uudset tüüpi sõnakoti tõlke funktsiooni ja treenime logistilisi regressiooni mudeleid, et klassifitseerida head andmed ja sünteetilised mürakad andmed kavandatud funktsiooniruumis. Koolitatud mudelit kasutatakse paralleelsete lausete skoorimiseks andmekogus valimiseks. Nagu näidatud katsetes, valib Zipporah suurest segakvaliteetsest andmebaasist kvaliteetse paralleelkorpuse. Eelkõige saavutab Zipporah ühe müraka andmekogumi puhul 2,1 BLEU skoori paranemise, kasutades 1/5 andmetest võrreldes kogu korpuse kasutamisega.", 'fi': 'Esittelemme Zipporahin, nopean ja skaalautuvan tiedonpuhdistusj瓣rjestelm瓣n. Ehdotamme uudenlaista sanapussin k瓣瓣nn繹stoimintoa ja harjoittelemme logistisia regressiomalleja hyv瓣n ja synteettisen meluisan tiedon luokitteluun ehdotetussa ominaisuustilassa. Koulutettua mallia k瓣ytet瓣瓣n pisteytt瓣m瓣瓣n rinnakkaisia lauseita tietopoolissa valintaa varten. Kuten kokeissa on osoitettu, Zipporah valitsee korkealaatuisen rinnakkaiskorpusen suuresta, sekalaatuisesta datapoolista. Erityisesti yhden meluisan aineiston kohdalla Zipporah saavuttaa 2,1 BLEU-pisteen parannuksen k瓣ytt瓣m瓣ll瓣 1/5 datasta verrattuna koko korpuseen.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe Sipporah, sistem kanggo mbalke lan ijol-ijolan data netah Anyone Didateng Seong ngomong nik anggal sing koyok, Sipporah milih perusahaan langgar-kalih dumadhi kudu, akeh-kalih dumadhi data pool ngomong, kanggo sabên data sing beraksi, Sipporah iso dianggapasli 2.1 B luwih sing lunasai kanggo nggambar 1/5 dadi kanggo nggambar barang kotak sing memperbudhakan', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam Zipporah, hiter in razširljiv sistem čiščenja podatkov. Predlagamo novo vrsto funkcije prevajanja vrečke besed in vzpostavimo logistične regresijske modele za klasifikacijo dobrih podatkov in sintetičnih hrupnih podatkov v predlaganem funkcijskem prostoru. Usposabljeni model se uporablja za ocenjevanje vzporednih stavkov v bazi podatkov za izbor. Kot je prikazano v poskusih, Zipporah izbere visokokakovostno vzporedno korpus iz velikega, mešanega bazena podatkov. Zlasti pri enem hrupnem naboru podatkov Zipporah doseže 2,1 izboljšanje rezultata BLEU z uporabo 1/5 podatkov v primerjavi z uporabo celotnega korpusa.', 'ha': "Munã ƙara Zipporah, da tsari na'urar data da ke iya ƙayyade. Kana goyyade wani nau'i na-bass-of-word-translation, kuma muna ƙidãya misãlai masu shiryuwa na logistic dõmin a rarrabe data mai kyau kuma data na saurare cikin filin da aka buƙata. An yi amfani da shirin da aka tsare shi don ya yi motsi ga tsari masu daidaita cikin pool in da aka yi wa zaɓani. Kamar da aka nũna cikin jarrabai, Zipporah yana zãɓi wata nau'i mai nau'i mai girma daga wani bashi mai gaura da data. Kuma da ƙayyadadde, Zipporah ya sami kimar 2.1 BLEU mai kyau game da amfani da 1/5 daga data don ya yi amfani da duk nau'in.", 'he': 'אנחנו מכירים את זיפורה, מערכת ניקוי נתונים מהירה ומקבילה. We propose a novel type of bag-of-words translation feature, and train logistic regression models to classify good data and synthetic noisy data in the proposed feature space.  המודל המאמן משתמש כדי לקבוע משפטים מקבילים בבריכת הנתונים לבחירה. כפי שנראה בניסויים, זיפורה בוחרת קורפוס מקביל של איכות גבוהה מבריכת מידע איכות גדולה ומערובת. במיוחד, עבור קבוצת נתונים רעשים אחת, זיפורה משיגה שיפור בתוצאות BLEU 2.1 בשימוש של 1/5 מהנתונים על השימוש של כל הקורפוס.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་Zipporah་ལ་མགྱོག་ངང་དང་ཚད་རྟགས་ཅན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གཙང་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་སྟོན་པ། We propose a novel type of bag-of-words translation feature, and train logistic regression models to classify good data and synthetic noisy data in the proposed feature space. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དབུགས་འདི་སེལ་འཐུ་བྱེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནང་གི་ཚིག་ཆས་མཐུན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ནང་དུ་Zipporah་གིས་སྒྲིག་ཚད་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གདམ་པ་ལས་མཐོ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚད་མཐོ་བརྗོད་ཡོད། དམིགས'}
{'en': 'Bringing Structure into Summaries : Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'ar': 'إحضار الهيكل إلى الملخصات: التعهيد الجماعي لمجموعة معايير من خرائط المفاهيم', 'fr': "Intégrer la structure dans les résumés\xa0: externalisation participative d'un corpus de cartes conceptuelles de référence", 'pt': 'Trazendo a estrutura para os resumos: crowdsourcing um corpus de referência de mapas conceituais', 'es': 'Incorporar la estructura a los resúmenes: Crowdsourcing de un corpus de referencia de mapas conceptuales', 'ja': '要約への構造の導入：コンセプトマップのベンチマークコーパスのクラウドソーシング', 'zh': '将结构带入摘要:众包概念地图基准语料库', 'hi': 'सारांश में संरचना लाना: अवधारणा मानचित्र के एक बेंचमार्क कॉर्पस को क्राउडसोर्सिंग', 'ru': 'Приведение структуры в резюме: краудсорсинг эталонного набора концептуальных карт', 'ga': 'Struchtúr a Thabhairt isteach ina Achoimrí: Sluaite Corpas Tagarmharc de Léarscáileanna Coincheapa a fhoinsiú', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურაციის რეზიმირებში გადატანა: ბენქმარკის კონფექტურაცია კონფექტურაციის კონფექტურაცია', 'hu': 'Struktúra bevezetése összefoglalókba: a koncepciótérképek referenciaértékeinek közösségi beszerzése', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση της δομής σε συνοπτικές περιλήψεις: Η παροχή κοινού σε ένα σώμα συγκριτικών χαρτών εννοιών', 'it': 'Portare la struttura in riassunti: Crowdsourcing di un corpo di riferimento di mappe concettuali', 'lt': 'Struktūros santraukų apibendrinimas: koncepcijų žemėlapių lyginamojo ženklo korpuso viešasis tiekimas', 'mk': 'Донесување на структурата во резултати: Создавање на концептни мапи', 'kk': 'Құрылымды тұжырымдамасына келтіру: Құрылымдар құрылымдары', 'ms': 'Membawa Struktur ke Ringkasan: Menyediakan Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ് മാപ്പുകളുടെ ഒരു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പ്സിലേക്ക് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്ന സ്ട്രാക്ട്രോക്ടര്\u200d ച', 'mt': 'Il-ġbir ta’ l-istruttura fis-Sommarji: L-għoti ta’ sorsi pubbliċi ta’ Korp ta’ Benchmark ta’ Mappas ta’ Kunċetti', 'mn': 'Structure into Summaries: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'no': 'Hentar struktur i samandrag: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'pl': 'Wprowadzanie struktury do podsumowań: Crowdsourcing a referencyjny korpus map koncepcyjnych', 'ro': 'Aducerea structurii în rezumate: Crowdsourcing a unui corpus de referință de hărți concepte', 'sr': 'Donošenje strukture u sažetke: Crowdsourcing a benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'si': 'Description', 'so': 'Bringing Structure into Summaries: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'sv': 'Att föra in struktur i sammanfattningar: Crowdsourcing av en benchmarkkorpus av konceptkartor', 'ta': 'sourceing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'ur': 'Structure in Summaries: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'uz': 'Hisobotlarni yaratish: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'vi': 'Đưa Cấu trúc vào cho tổng đài... Tập hợp vật chứa ý tưởng', 'bg': 'Внасяне на структурата в обобщенията: групово снабдяване на референтен корпус от концептуални карти', 'hr': 'Vraćanje strukture u sažetke: Crowdsourcing a benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'da': 'At bringe struktur ind i sammenfatninger: Crowdsourcing af et benchmark korpus af konceptkort', 'nl': 'Structuur in samenvattingen brengen: Crowdsourcing van een benchmark corpus van conceptkaarten', 'de': 'Struktur in Zusammenfassungen bringen: Crowdsourcing eines Benchmark-Korpus von Konzeptkarten', 'fa': 'ساختار را به جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها می\u200cآورد: خروجی\u200cسازی یک خروجی از نقشه\u200cهای مفهوم', 'id': 'Membawa Struktur ke Ringkasan: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'sw': 'Kuingiza Miundombinu katika Makutano: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'tr': 'Structure to Summary: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'sq': 'Duke sjellë strukturën në përmbledhje: Shërbimi i një Korpi Benchmark të Kartave të Koncepteve', 'am': 'Bringing Structure into Summaries: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'af': 'Name', 'az': "Structure'u Toplaşdırmağa gətirir: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps", 'hy': 'Կարռուցվածքը համառոտագրությունների մեջ բերելը. Հանդիսատեսը', 'bn': 'সামারসংক্ষেপে কাঠামো নিয়ে যাচ্ছে: কনসেপ্ট ম্যাপের বেঞ্চাম্যার্ক কর্পুস', 'ko': '총괄 구조: 패키지 개념도 기준 자료 라이브러리', 'bs': 'Vraćanje strukture u sažetke: Crowdsourcing a benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps', 'et': 'Struktuuri koondamine kokkuvõtetesse: kontseptsioonikaartide võrdluskorpuse ühiskoordineerimine', 'ca': "Portar estructura en Resumes: La font d'un Corpus de Maps de Conceptes", 'cs': 'Přinášení struktury do souhrnů: Crowdsourcing srovnávacího korpusu koncepčních map', 'fi': 'Rakennuksen tuominen tiivistelmiin: Konseptikarttojen esikuva-aineiston joukkoistaminen', 'jv': "Where's the reference point?", 'sk': 'Vključevanje strukture v povzetke: množično oblikovanje referenčnega korpusa konceptnih zemljevidov', 'he': 'להביא את המבנה לתוך סדרות: תוצרת משאבים של קורפוס בנקסמארק של מפות מושג', 'ha': 'Source a bong-shimfiɗar Corbus of ConceptMap', 'bo': 'Bringing Structure into Summaries: Crowdsourcing a Benchmark Corpus of Concept Maps'}
{'en': 'Concept maps can be used to concisely represent important information and bring structure into large document collections. Therefore, we study a variant of multi-document summarization that produces summaries in the form of concept maps. However, suitable evaluation datasets for this task are currently missing. To close this gap, we present a newly created corpus of concept maps that summarize heterogeneous collections of web documents on educational topics. It was created using a novel crowdsourcing approach that allows us to efficiently determine important elements in large document collections. We release the corpus along with a baseline system and proposed evaluation protocol to enable further research on this variant of summarization.', 'ar': 'يمكن استخدام خرائط المفاهيم لتقديم معلومات مهمة بإيجاز وإضفاء الهيكلية على مجموعات المستندات الكبيرة. لذلك ، ندرس نوعًا مختلفًا من التلخيص متعدد المستندات الذي ينتج ملخصات في شكل خرائط المفاهيم. ومع ذلك ، مجموعات بيانات التقييم المناسبة لهذه المهمة مفقودة حاليًا. لسد هذه الفجوة ، نقدم مجموعة تم إنشاؤها حديثًا من خرائط المفاهيم التي تلخص المجموعات غير المتجانسة من مستندات الويب حول الموضوعات التعليمية. تم إنشاؤه باستخدام نهج جديد للتعهيد الجماعي يسمح لنا بتحديد العناصر المهمة بكفاءة في مجموعات المستندات الكبيرة. نصدر المجموعة جنبًا إلى جنب مع نظام خط الأساس وبروتوكول التقييم المقترح لتمكين إجراء مزيد من البحث حول هذا البديل من التلخيص.', 'fr': "Les cartes conceptuelles peuvent être utilisées pour représenter de manière concise des informations importantes et structurer de grandes collections de documents. Par conséquent, nous étudions une variante de la synthèse multi-documents qui produit des résumés sous forme de cartes conceptuelles. Cependant, il manque actuellement des ensembles de données d'évaluation appropriés pour cette tâche. Pour combler cette lacune, nous présentons un nouveau corpus de cartes conceptuelles qui résument des collections hétérogènes de documents Web sur des sujets éducatifs. Il a été créé à l'aide d'une nouvelle approche de crowdsourcing qui nous permet de déterminer efficacement les éléments importants dans de grandes collections de documents. Nous publions le corpus ainsi qu'un système de base et un protocole d'évaluation proposé pour permettre d'autres recherches sur cette variante de synthèse.", 'pt': 'Os mapas conceituais podem ser usados para representar informações importantes de forma concisa e trazer estrutura para grandes coleções de documentos. Portanto, estudamos uma variante de sumarização multidocumento que produz resumos na forma de mapas conceituais. No entanto, atualmente faltam conjuntos de dados de avaliação adequados para esta tarefa. Para fechar essa lacuna, apresentamos um corpus recém-criado de mapas conceituais que resumem coleções heterogêneas de documentos da web sobre temas educacionais. Ele foi criado usando uma nova abordagem de crowdsourcing que nos permite determinar com eficiência elementos importantes em grandes coleções de documentos. Nós liberamos o corpus junto com um sistema de linha de base e protocolo de avaliação proposto para permitir mais pesquisas sobre essa variante de sumarização.', 'es': 'Los mapas conceptuales se pueden utilizar para representar de manera concisa información importante y estructurar grandes colecciones de documentos. Por lo tanto, estudiamos una variante de resumen de varios documentos que produce resúmenes en forma de mapas conceptuales. Sin embargo, actualmente faltan conjuntos de datos de evaluación adecuados para esta tarea. Para cerrar esta brecha, presentamos un corpus de mapas conceptuales recientemente creado que resumen colecciones heterogéneas de documentos web sobre temas educativos. Se creó utilizando un novedoso enfoque de crowdsourcing que nos permite determinar de manera eficiente los elementos importantes en grandes colecciones de documentos. Publicamos el corpus junto con un sistema de referencia y un protocolo de evaluación propuesto para permitir una mayor investigación sobre esta variante de resumen.', 'hi': 'अवधारणा मानचित्रों का उपयोग संक्षिप्त रूप से महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी का प्रतिनिधित्व करने और बड़े दस्तावेज़ संग्रहों में संरचना लाने के लिए किया जा सकता है। इसलिए, हम बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के एक संस्करण का अध्ययन करते हैं जो अवधारणा मानचित्रों के रूप में सारांश का उत्पादन करता है। हालाँकि, इस कार्य के लिए उपयुक्त मूल्यांकन डेटासेट वर्तमान में अनुपलब्ध हैं. इस अंतर को बंद करने के लिए, हम अवधारणा मानचित्रों का एक नव निर्मित कॉर्पस प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो शैक्षिक विषयों पर वेब दस्तावेजों के विषम संग्रह को संक्षेप में प्रस्तुत करता है। यह एक उपन्यास क्राउडसोर्सिंग दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके बनाया गया था जो हमें बड़े दस्तावेज़ संग्रह में महत्वपूर्ण तत्वों को कुशलतापूर्वक निर्धारित करने की अनुमति देता है। हम सारांशीकरण के इस संस्करण पर आगे के शोध को सक्षम करने के लिए एक बेसलाइन सिस्टम और प्रस्तावित मूल्यांकन प्रोटोकॉल के साथ कॉर्पस जारी करते हैं।', 'zh': '概念图以简要为信,引入大文档。 故论多文档摘要之变体,变体以概念图成摘要。 但当时缺少当务的评估数据集。 为缩小之差,建一新创之概念图语料库,总结教Web文档之异构。 其创用新众包法,使得效定大体文档集之要。 发语料库及基线统、议评,以究其变体。', 'ja': 'コンセプトマップを使用して、重要な情報を簡潔に表現し、大きなドキュメントコレクションに構造をもたらすことができます。したがって、コンセプトマップの形で要約を生成するマルチドキュメント要約の変形を研究する。ただし、このタスクに適した評価データセットは現在欠落しています。このギャップを埋めるために、教育トピックに関するWebドキュメントの異種のコレクションを要約する新たに作成されたコンセプトマップのコーパスを提示する。これは、大規模なドキュメントコレクションの重要な要素を効率的に決定することができる、斬新なクラウドソーシングアプローチを使用して作成されました。ベースライン・システムと提案された評価プロトコルと共にコーパスをリリースし、この変種の要約に関するさらなる研究を可能にする。', 'ru': 'Концептуальные карты могут использоваться для краткого представления важной информации и включения структуры в крупные подборки документов. Поэтому мы изучаем вариант многодокументного обобщения, который производит обобщения в виде концептуальных карт. Однако подходящие оценочные наборы данных для этой задачи в настоящее время отсутствуют. Для устранения этого разрыва мы представляем вновь созданный корпус концептуальных карт, которые обобщают разнородные подборки веб-документов по образовательным темам. Он был создан с использованием нового краудсорсингового подхода, который позволяет нам эффективно определять важные элементы в больших коллекциях документов. Мы выпускаем корпус вместе с базовой системой и предлагаемым протоколом оценки, чтобы обеспечить возможность дальнейшего исследования этого варианта обобщения.', 'ga': 'Is féidir léarscáileanna coincheapa a úsáid chun faisnéis thábhachtach a léiriú go beacht agus chun struchtúr a thabhairt isteach i mbailiúcháin mhóra doiciméad. Mar sin, déanaimid staidéar ar mhalairt de achoimriú ildhoiciméid a tháirgeann achoimrí i bhfoirm léarscáileanna coincheap. Mar sin féin, tá tacair sonraí measúnaithe oiriúnacha don tasc seo in easnamh faoi láthair. Chun an bhearna seo a dhúnadh, cuirimid i láthair corpas nuachruthaithe de léarscáileanna coincheapa a thugann achoimre ar bhailiúcháin ilchineálacha doiciméad gréasáin ar ábhair oideachais. Cruthaíodh é trí úsáid a bhaint as cur chuige nua maidir le sluafhoinsiú a ligeann dúinn gnéithe tábhachtacha a chinneadh go héifeachtach i mbailiúcháin mhóra doiciméad. Scaoilimid an corpas mar aon le córas bonnlíne agus prótacal meastóireachta molta chun tuilleadh taighde a chumasú ar an leagan achoimre seo.', 'hu': 'A koncepciótérképek használhatók a fontos információk tömör megjelenítésére és a nagy dokumentumgyűjtemények struktúrájára. Ezért tanulmányozzuk a többdokumentumos összefoglalás változatát, amely koncepciótérképek formájában összefoglalókat készít. Jelenleg azonban hiányoznak az ehhez a feladathoz szükséges értékelési adatok. Ennek a hiányosságnak a megszüntetése érdekében újonnan létrehozott koncepciótérképek korpuszát mutatjuk be, amelyek összefoglalják a webes dokumentumok heterogén gyűjteményeit oktatási témákban. Újszerű crowdsourcing megközelítéssel jött létre, amely lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy hatékonyan meghatározzuk a nagy dokumentumgyűjtemények fontos elemeit. A korpuszt egy alapvető rendszerrel és javasolt értékelési protokollnal együtt kiadjuk, hogy lehetővé tegyük a további kutatást az összefoglalás ezen változatán.', 'el': 'Οι χάρτες εννοιών μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για να αναπαριστούν συνοπτικά σημαντικές πληροφορίες και να φέρουν δομή σε μεγάλες συλλογές εγγράφων. Ως εκ τούτου, μελετούμε μια παραλλαγή σύνοψης πολλαπλών εγγράφων που παράγει περιλήψεις με τη μορφή εννοιολογικών χαρτών. Ωστόσο, λείπουν επί του παρόντος κατάλληλα σύνολα δεδομένων αξιολόγησης για το έργο αυτό. Για να καλυφθεί αυτό το χάσμα, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νεοδημιουργημένο σώμα νοητικών χαρτών που συνοψίζουν ετερογενείς συλλογές διαδικτυακών εγγράφων για εκπαιδευτικά θέματα. Δημιουργήθηκε χρησιμοποιώντας μια νέα προσέγγιση που μας επιτρέπει να προσδιορίσουμε αποτελεσματικά σημαντικά στοιχεία σε μεγάλες συλλογές εγγράφων. Απελευθερώνουμε το σώμα μαζί με ένα σύστημα βάσης και προτεινόμενο πρωτόκολλο αξιολόγησης για να επιτρέψουμε περαιτέρω έρευνα σε αυτή την παραλλαγή συνοψίας.', 'ka': 'შეიძლება გამოყენება კონცექტის კაპრატები მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციაში და დიდი დოკუმენტის კოლექციაში შეიძლება გამოყენება. ამიტომ, ჩვენ მრავალური დოკუმენტის სისუმენტის განრავლობას ვისწავლეთ, რომელიც კონცექტის კაპონტის ფორმაში გამოვიყენებს სისუმენტის შე მაგრამ, ამ დავალებისთვის შესაძლებელი განსაზღვრებული მონაცემები არსებობს. ეს გახსნა, ჩვენ ახალი შექმნილი კონცექტის კაპოსების კონცექტის კონცექტის კონცექტის კონცექტის კონცექტის კონცექტის კონცექტის კო ეს შექმნა, რომელიც პრომენტის პუბლისურსის მიზეზით, რომელიც გვეძლება ეფექტიურად გავაკეთოთ მნიშვნელოვანი ელემენტები დიდი დოკუმენტი ჩვენ კორპუსს გახსნა ბაზლინური სისტემის ერთად და მინდა გავაკეთება პროტოკოლას, რომელიც უფრო მეტი გასწავლა ამ გარინაციის გარეშენზე.', 'mk': 'Концептските мапи може да се користат за кратко да претставуваат важни информации и да ја внесат структурата во големи колекции на документи. Затоа, ние студираме варијант на мултидокументарна резултатација која произведува резултати во форма на концептни мапи. Сепак, моментално недостасуваат соодветни датотеки за проценка за оваа задача. За да ја затвориме оваа празнина, претставуваме новоформиран корпус на концептни мапи кои ги сумираат хетерогенските колекции на веб документи за образовни теми. Тоа беше создадено користејќи нов пристап на пулсурсирање кој ни овозможува ефикасно да одредиме важни елементи во големите колекции документи. We release the corpus along with a baseline system and proposed evaluation protocol to enable further research on this variant of summarization.', 'kk': 'Концепция карталары маңызды мәліметті келтіру үшін қолданылады және құжатты үлкен құжаттар жиындарына келтіруге болады. Сондықтан біз көптеген құжаттың тұжырымдамасының түрінде тұжырымдамасын жасайтын түрінде үйренеміз. Бірақ бұл тапсырма үшін жақсы бағалау деректер жиындары жоқ. Бұл қашықтығын жабу үшін біз білім мәселелерде гетероген веб құжаттардың жинақтарын жаңа құрылған концепция карталарының корпусусын таңдаймыз. Бұл құжаттардың үлкен жинақтарындағы маңызды элементтерді таңдауға мүмкіндік береді. Біз корпусты негізгі жүйелік және бағалау протоколын басып шығару үшін қолданыстағы мәліметтерді қолдануға болады.', 'it': 'Le mappe concettuali possono essere utilizzate per rappresentare in modo conciso informazioni importanti e portare struttura in grandi collezioni di documenti. Pertanto, studiamo una variante di sintesi multi-documento che produce riassunti sotto forma di mappe concettuali. Tuttavia, attualmente mancano set di dati di valutazione adeguati per questo compito. Per colmare questo divario, presentiamo un corpus di mappe concettuali appena creati che riassumono collezioni eterogenee di documenti web su argomenti educativi. È stato creato utilizzando un nuovo approccio di crowdsourcing che ci permette di determinare in modo efficiente elementi importanti in grandi collezioni di documenti. Rilasciamo il corpus insieme a un sistema di base e protocollo di valutazione proposto per consentire ulteriori ricerche su questa variante di sintesi.', 'lt': 'Koncepcijos žemėlapiai gali būti naudojami glaudžiai atspindėti svarbią informaciją ir struktūrą įtraukti į didelius dokumentų rinkinius. Todėl mes tiriame įvairių dokumentų santraukų variant ą, kuriame pateikiamos koncepcijų žemėlapių santraukos. Tačiau šiuo metu trūksta tinkamų šios užduoties vertinimo duomenų rinkinių. Siekiant užbaigti šią spragą, pristatome naujai sukurtą koncepcijų žemėlapių, kuriuose apibendrinami įvairiapusieji tinklo dokumentų rinkiniai švietimo temomis. Ji buvo sukurta taikant naują visuomenės išteklių naudojimo metodą, kuris leidžia mums veiksmingai nustatyti svarbius elementus dideliuose dokumentų rinkiniuose. Mes išleidžiame korpusą kartu su bazine sistema ir siūlomu vertinimo protokolu, kad būtų galima toliau tirti šį santraukos variant ą.', 'mn': 'Загварын газрын зураг маш чухал мэдээллийг илэрхийлдэг ба бүтцийг том баримт цуглуулах үед ашиглаж болно. Тиймээс бид олон баримтын жинхэнэ хэлбэрийг судалж байна. Энэ нь ойлголтын зураг хэлбэрээр жинхэнэ хэлбэрийг бий болгодог. Гэвч энэ ажлын тулд зөв үнэлгээ өгөгдлийн сангууд алга болсон. Энэ хоорондын тулд бид боловсролын сэдэв дээр шинэ бүтээгдэхүүний газрын зурагнуудын корпус харуулж байна. Энэ нь шинэ олон нийтлэгчдийн асуудлыг ашиглан бидэнд том баримт цуглуулалтын чухал элементүүдийг үр дүнтэй тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Бид корпус суурь шугам системтэй хамт гаргаж, үнэлгээний протоколыг илүү олон судалгааг ашиглах боломжтой болгосон.', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റ് മാപ്പുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി  അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d പല രേഖകളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായി പഠിക്കുന്നു. അത് കോപ്പ് മാപ്പുകളുടെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കു However, suitable evaluation datasets for this task are currently missing.  ഈ വേര്\u200dപ്പ് അടയ്ക്കാന്\u200d, വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d വെബിലെ രേഖകളുടെ പുതിയൊരു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് മാപ്പുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില വലിയ രേഖയിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മൂലകങ്ങള്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അനുവദിക്കുന്ന നോവല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മൂല നമ്മള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പസിനെ ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തോടൊപ്പം വിടുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു വിശ്വാസത്തിനുള്ള പ്രോട്ടോക്കോള്\u200d പ്രാ', 'ms': 'Concept maps can be used to concisely represent important information and bring structure into large document collections.  Oleh itu, kami mempelajari variasi pengringkasan multi-dokumen yang menghasilkan ringkasan dalam bentuk peta konsep. Namun, set data penilaian yang sesuai untuk tugas ini kini hilang. Untuk menutup ruang ini, kami mempersembahkan sebuah korpus baru dicipta peta konsep yang mengungkapkan koleksi heterogeni dokumen web pada topik pendidikan. Ia dicipta menggunakan pendekatan crowdsourcing baru yang membolehkan kita menentukan elemen penting secara efektif dalam koleksi dokumen besar. Kami melepaskan corpus bersama dengan sistem asas dan melamar protokol penilaian untuk membolehkan kajian lanjut tentang variasi ringkasan ini.', 'no': '@ title: window Derfor studerer vi ein variant av sammendraging av fleire dokument som produserer sammendragar i form av konseptkart. Men passande evalueringsdatasett for denne oppgåva manglar no. For å lukka denne avstanden, presenterer vi eit nytt oppretta korpus av konseptkart som samanserer heterogenene samlingar av nettdokument på utdanningsstemmer. Det ble oppretta ved å bruka ein novel crowdsourcing approach som tillater oss å bestemme viktige element i store dokumentsamlingar. Vi løyser korpusen saman med ein grunnlinjesystem og foreslått evalueringsprotokoll for å slå på forskning om denne sammendraga.', 'pl': 'Mapy koncepcyjne mogą być wykorzystywane do zwięzłego reprezentowania ważnych informacji i wprowadzenia struktury do dużych zbiorów dokumentów. W związku z tym badamy wariant podsumowania wielu dokumentów, który tworzy podsumowania w postaci map koncepcyjnych. Jednakże obecnie brakuje odpowiednich zbiorów danych oceniających do tego zadania. Aby zamknąć tę lukę, przedstawiamy nowo powstały korpus map koncepcyjnych, które podsumowują heterogeniczne zbiory dokumentów internetowych dotyczących tematów edukacyjnych. Został stworzony z wykorzystaniem nowatorskiego podejścia crowdsourcingowego, które pozwala nam skutecznie określić istotne elementy w dużych zbiorach dokumentów. Udostępniamy korpus wraz z systemem bazowym i zaproponowanym protokołem oceny, aby umożliwić dalsze badania nad tym wariantem podsumowania.', 'sr': 'Može se koristiti koncepcione mape za tačno predstavljanje važnih informacija i uvesti strukturu u velike kolekcije dokumenta. Stoga proučavamo variant sažetka multidokumenta koji proizvodi sažetke u obliku mapa koncepta. Međutim, odgovarajuće procjene podataka za ovaj zadatak trenutno nedostaje. Da bi zatvorili ovu prazninu, predstavljamo novog stvorenog korpusa mapa koncepta koji sažete heterogenezne kolekcije web dokumenta o obrazovnim temama. Stvorena je koristeći novi pristup crowdsourcing koji nam omogućava da efikasno utvrdimo važne elemente u velikim kolekcijama dokumenta. Puštamo korpus zajedno sa osnovnim sistemom i predložimo protokol za procjenu kako bi omogućili daljnje istraživanje o ovoj varijanti sažetke.', 'mt': 'Concept maps can be used to concisely represent important information and bring structure into large document collections.  Għalhekk, nistudjaw varjant ta’ sommarju b’diversi dokumenti li jipproduċi sommarji fil-form a ta’ mapep ta’ kunċetti. Madankollu, bħalissa m’hemmx settijiet ta’ dejta xierqa ta’ evalwazzjoni għal dan il-kompitu. Biex jingħalaq dan id-distakk, qed nippreżentaw korp ġdid ta’ mapep ta’ kunċetti li jiġbru fil-qosor il-kollezzjonijiet eteroġeni ta’ dokumenti tal-internet dwar suġġetti edukattivi. Inħoloq permezz ta’ approċċ ġdid ta’ crowdsourcing li jippermettilna niddeterminaw b’mod effiċjenti elementi importanti f’kollezzjonijiet kbar ta’ dokumenti. Aħna nħelsu l-korpus flimkien ma’ sistema ta’ bażi u l-protokoll ta’ evalwazzjoni propost biex jippermettu aktar riċerka dwar dan il-varjant ta’ sommarju.', 'so': 'Kaariikhda qabsashada waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa si la mid ah u muujin karo macluumaad muhiim ah islamarkaasna lagu keeni karo dhismaha dukumentiyada waaweyn. Sidaa darteed waxaynu baranaynaa warqado kala duduwan oo loo qorayo warqado kala duduwan oo qoraal ah oo soo saara koorsooyin u eg kartooyinka fikirka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka loo baahan yahay sawirada qiimeynta. Si aan u xidhno burburkaas, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa hal koob oo cusub oo la abuuray kartooyin, kaas oo ku summarinaya ururada warqadaha internetka ee ku saabsan maadooyinka waxbarashada. Waxaa la abuuray isticmaalka qaab aad noogu isticmaali karto taariikhda dadka, taasoo inagu ogolaa si fiican aan u go’aamino elemental muhiim ah oo ku jira ururada dukumentiyada waaweyn. Waxaannu ku ridnaa nidaamka asalka ah, waxaana soo jeedaynaa heshiiska qiimeynta, si aan u fududeeyo waxbarashada dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan soo gaaristan.', 'ro': 'Hărțile conceptuale pot fi utilizate pentru a reprezenta concis informații importante și pentru a aduce structura în colecții mari de documente. Prin urmare, studiem o variantă de rezumare multi-document care produce rezumate sub formă de hărți conceptuale. Cu toate acestea, în prezent lipsesc seturi de date adecvate de evaluare pentru această sarcină. Pentru a elimina acest decalaj, prezentăm un corpus nou creat de hărți conceptuale care rezumă colecții eterogene de documente web pe teme educaționale. A fost creat folosind o abordare nouă de crowdsourcing care ne permite să determinăm eficient elemente importante în colecțiile mari de documente. Eliberăm corpul împreună cu un sistem de bază și protocol de evaluare propus pentru a permite cercetarea ulterioară a acestei variante de rezumare.', 'ta': 'முக்கிய தகவலை குறிப்பிட பயன்படுத்தலாம் மற்றும் அமைப்பை பெரிய ஆவண தொகுப்புகளுக்கு கொண்டு வரைபடங்களை பயன்படு ஆகையால், நாம் பல ஆவணங்களின் சுருக்கம் மாறுபாட்டை படிக்கிறோம். இது வரைபடங்களின் வடிவமைப்பில் சுருக்கம் உருவாக்கு ஆனால் இப்பணிக்கான பொருத்தமான மதிப்பீடு தகவல் அமைப்புகள் தற்போது காணவில்லை. இந்த இடைவெளியை மூட, நாம் புதிதாக உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கருத்து வரைபடங்களின் குறிப்பை கொண்டுவருகிறோம். இது வெவ்வேறு பொருள் தொகுப் பெரிய ஆவண தொகுப்புகளில் முக்கியமான உறுப்புகளை தீர்மானிக்க உதவும் புதிய கூட்டு மூலங்களை பயன்படுத்தி உருவாக்கப் நாம் ஒரு அடிப்படைக்கோடு முறைமையுடன் கார்ப்ஸை வெளியிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் சுருக்கும் மாறியை மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சி செ', 'ur': 'تفصیلہ نقشه مثالیں ضروری معلومات کو دکھانے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں اور ساختار بڑے دکھانے کے مجلسوں میں لے آئیں۔ لہٰذا ہم بہت سی دفتروں کی مخلوقات کا ایک فرق پڑھتے ہیں جو تفصیل نقشه کی شکل میں مخلوقات پیدا کرتا ہے۔ However, suitable evaluation datasets for this task are currently missing. یہ فاصلہ بند کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے ایک نئی پیدا ہوئی کورپوس کی کورپوس کو پیش کیا ہے جو تعلیم موضوع کے بارے میں ویب دفتروں کی مختلف جمع کرتی ہے۔ یہ ایک نئی جماعت سورسینگ طریقہ کے مطابق پیدا کیا گیا ہے جو ہمیں بہت بڑے سند جماعتوں میں اہم عنایتوں کا فیصلہ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ہم نے کورپوس کو بنیاس لین سیسٹم کے ساتھ چھوڑ دیں اور اس کی ارزیابی پروٹوکول کو پیش کیا ہے کہ اس ترکیابی کے بارے میں اضافہ تحقیق کریں۔', 'si': 'වැදගත්ත තොරතුරු පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ තොරතුරු පෙන්වන්න සහ ලොකු ලොකු ලිපින්ත සංග්රහන ඉතින්, අපි ගොඩක් ලිපින්ත සංවිධානයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සංවිධානයක් සංවිධානයක් විදියට නමුත්, මේ වැඩ සඳහා යුක්තිය විශ්ලේෂණ දත්ත සෙට් අතුරුදන් වෙනවා. මේ වැඩක් වහන්න, අපි අළුත් නිර්මාණය කරපු කොර්පස් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ වෙබ් ලොකුම් සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදියට සම් ඒක නිර්මාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් අපිට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ අයිතියක අපි කොර්පුස් එක්ක පද්ධතියක් සමඟ පද්ධතියක් නිදහස් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා මේ වි', 'sv': 'Konceptkartor kan användas för att kortfattat representera viktig information och föra struktur i stora dokumentsamlingar. Därför studerar vi en variant av multi-document summering som producerar sammanfattningar i form av konceptkartor. För närvarande saknas dock lämpliga utvärderingsdata för denna uppgift. För att överbrygga denna lucka presenterar vi en nyskapad korpus av konceptkartor som sammanfattar heterogena samlingar av webbdokument om utbildningsämnen. Den skapades med hjälp av en ny crowdsourcing metod som gör att vi effektivt kan bestämma viktiga element i stora dokumentsamlingar. Vi släpper korpusen tillsammans med ett baslinjesystem och föreslagna utvärderingsprotokoll för att möjliggöra vidare forskning om denna variant av sammanfattning.', 'uz': "Concept maps can be used to concisely represent important information and bring structure into large document collections.  Shunday qilib, biz bir necha hujjatning tahrirlash turini o'rganamiz. Bu bir necha hujjatning tahrirlarini tasavvur qilamiz. @ info Bu gapni yopish uchun, biz taʼlim mavzulari haqida yangi yaratilgan tashqi kartonlarning yangi quyidagi kartoni koʻrsatimiz. Name Biz corpusni baseline tizimi bilan chiqaramiz va qiymati protokollarini o'zgartirish uchun boshqa qidirish imkoniyatini beradi.", 'vi': 'Biểu đồ ý tưởng có thể được dùng để đại diện những thông tin quan trọng và mang các cấu trúc vào các bộ sưu tập tài liệu lớn. Do đó, chúng tôi nghiên cứu một biến thể của mô tả đa tài liệu tổng hợp tạo ra các bản đồ khái niệm. Tuy nhiên, hiện tại chưa có dữ liệu đánh giá thích hợp cho nhiệm vụ này. Để lấp chỗ trống này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập hợp các khái niệm mới được tạo ra để tổng hợp các tập hợp các văn bản web khác nhau về các chủ đề giáo dục. Nó được tạo ra bằng một phương pháp tụ họp mới cho phép chúng tôi xác định các yếu tố quan trọng trong các bộ sưu tập tài liệu lớn. Chúng tôi công bố cơ thể cùng với một hệ cơ sở cơ bản và một giao thức đánh giá đề xuất để có thể nghiên cứu thêm về biến thể này.', 'hr': 'Može se koristiti koncepcione mape za to čno predstavljanje važnih informacija i dovesti strukturu u velike kolekcije dokumenta. Stoga proučavamo variant sažetka višestrukog dokumenta koji proizvodi sažetke u obliku mapa koncepta. Međutim, trenutno nedostaje odgovarajuće podaci za procjenu za ovaj zadatak. Da bi zatvorili taj praznik, predstavljamo novog stvorenog korpusa mapa koncepta koji sažete heterogenezne kolekcije web dokumenta o obrazovnim temama. Stvorena je koristeći nov pristup crowdsourcing koji nam omogućava učinkovito utvrditi važne elemente u velikim kolekcijama dokumenta. Oslobodili smo korpus zajedno s početnim sustavom i predložili protokol za procjenu kako bi omogućili daljnje istraživanje o tom variantu sažetke.', 'bg': 'Концептуалните карти могат да се използват за кратко представяне на важна информация и въвеждане на структура в големи колекции от документи. Затова изследваме вариант на многодокументално обобщаване, който произвежда обобщения под формата на концептуални карти. Понастоящем обаче липсват подходящи набори от данни за оценка за тази задача. За да запълним тази празнина, представяме новосъздаден корпус от концептуални карти, които обобщават хетерогенни колекции от уеб документи по образователни теми. Тя е създадена с помощта на нов подход за crowdsourcing, който ни позволява ефективно да определим важни елементи в големите колекции от документи. Освобождаваме корпуса заедно с базова система и предложен протокол за оценка, за да позволим по-нататъшно изследване на този вариант на обобщаване.', 'da': 'Konceptkort kan bruges til kortfattet at repræsentere vigtige oplysninger og bringe struktur i store dokumentsamlinger. Derfor studerer vi en variant af multi-document resuméering, der producerer resuméer i form af konceptkort. Der mangler imidlertid i øjeblikket passende evalueringsdatasæt til denne opgave. For at lukke dette hul præsenterer vi et nyoprettet korpus af konceptkort, der opsummerer heterogene samlinger af webdokumenter om pædagogiske emner. Det blev skabt ved hjælp af en ny crowdsourcing tilgang, der giver os mulighed for effektivt at bestemme vigtige elementer i store dokumentsamlinger. Vi frigiver korpuset sammen med et baseline system og foreslået evalueringsprotokol for at muliggøre yderligere forskning i denne variant af sammenfatning.', 'nl': 'Conceptkaarten kunnen worden gebruikt om belangrijke informatie kort weer te geven en structuur te brengen in grote documentcollecties. Daarom bestuderen we een variant van multi-document samenvatting die samenvattingen produceert in de vorm van concept maps. Er ontbreken echter momenteel geschikte evaluatiedatasets voor deze taak. Om deze kloof te dichten presenteren we een nieuw corpus van concept maps die heterogene collecties van webdocumenten over educatieve onderwerpen samenvatten. Het is gemaakt met behulp van een nieuwe crowdsourcing-benadering waarmee we belangrijke elementen in grote documentcollecties efficiënt kunnen bepalen. We geven het corpus samen met een baseline systeem en voorgestelde evaluatieprotocol vrij om verder onderzoek naar deze variant van samenvatting mogelijk te maken.', 'de': 'Mit Concept Maps lassen sich wichtige Informationen prägnant darstellen und große Dokumentensammlungen strukturieren. Daher untersuchen wir eine Variante der Multidokumentzusammenfassung, die Zusammenfassungen in Form von Concept Maps erzeugt. Allerdings fehlen derzeit geeignete Auswertungsdatensätze für diese Aufgabe. Um diese Lücke zu schließen, präsentieren wir einen neu erstellten Korpus von Konzeptkarten, die heterogene Sammlungen von Webdokumenten zu Bildungsthemen zusammenfassen. Es wurde mit einem neuartigen Crowdsourcing-Ansatz erstellt, der es uns ermöglicht, wichtige Elemente in großen Dokumentensammlungen effizient zu bestimmen. Wir veröffentlichen den Korpus zusammen mit einem Basissystem und einem vorgeschlagenen Evaluationsprotokoll, um weitere Untersuchungen zu dieser Variante der Zusammenfassung zu ermöglichen.', 'fa': 'نقشه\u200cهای مفهوم می\u200cتوانند برای دقیقا نشان دادن اطلاعات مهم استفاده شود و ساختار را در جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای سند بزرگ بیاورند. بنابراین، ما تغییری از جمع کردن چند سند مطالعه می کنیم که جمع\u200cآوری در شکل نقشه\u200cهای مفهوم تولید می\u200cکند. ولی، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ارزیابی مناسب برای این کار در حال حاضر گم شده است. برای بستن این فاصله، ما یک قالب جدید ساخته شده از نقشه\u200cهای مفهوم را نشان می\u200cدهیم که جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای متفاوتی از سند\u200cهای وب در مورد موضوع آموزش را جمع می\u200cکند. با استفاده از طریق توسط طریق جامعه\u200cای که اجازه می\u200cدهد به موثرت عناصر مهم را در جمع\u200cآوری سند بزرگ تعریف کنیم. ما کورپوس را با یک سیستم پایین آزاد می\u200cکنیم و پروتکل ارزیابی پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم تا تحقیقات بیشتری در این گونه\u200cای از جمع\u200cآوری توان دهیم.', 'ko': '개념도는 중요한 정보를 간결하게 표시하고 구조를 대형 문서 집합에 도입하는 데 사용될 수 있다.따라서 우리는 다중 문서 요약의 변체를 연구했는데 이것은 개념도의 형식으로 요약을 생성한다.그러나 현재 이 임무에 적합한 평가 데이터 집합이 부족하다.이러한 격차를 좁히기 위해 우리는 새로 만든 개념도 자료 라이브러리를 제시했다. 이 자료 라이브러리는 교육 주제에 관한 각종 인터넷 문서 집합을 총괄했다.이것은 새로운 패키지 방법으로 만들어진 것이다. 이런 방법은 대형 문서 집합의 중요한 요소를 효과적으로 확정할 수 있게 한다.우리는 이러한 요약 변체에 대해 진일보한 연구를 하기 위해 어료 라이브러리와 하나의 기선 시스템을 발표했고 평가 협의를 제시했다.', 'id': 'Peta konsep dapat digunakan untuk secara singkat mewakili informasi penting dan membawa struktur ke koleksi dokumen besar. Oleh karena itu, kami mempelajari variasi dari penghasilan multi-dokumen yang menghasilkan ringkasan dalam bentuk peta konsep. Namun, set data evaluasi yang sesuai untuk tugas ini kini hilang. Untuk menutup ruang ini, kami mempersembahkan sebuah korpus baru dari peta konsep yang mengagumkan koleksi heterogene dokumen web pada topik pendidikan. Ini diciptakan menggunakan pendekatan crowdsourcing yang baru yang memungkinkan kita menentukan elemen penting secara efisien dalam koleksi dokumen besar. Kami melepaskan corpus bersama dengan sistem dasar dan melaporkan protokol evaluasi untuk memungkinkan penelitian lanjut tentang varian ringkasan ini.', 'sw': 'Ramani za kudhibiti inaweza kutumika kwa ajili ya kuonyesha taarifa muhimu na kutoa muundo kwenye makusanyiko makubwa ya nyaraka. Kwa hiyo, tunasoma tofauti ya muhtasari wa nyaraka mbalimbali unaotengeneza muhtasari katika mfumo wa ramani za dhana. Hata hivyo, seti za taarifa za uchunguzi zinazofaa kwa kazi hii hivi sasa hazionekani. To close this gap, we present a newly created corpus of concept maps that summarize heterogeneous collections of web documents on educational topics.  Imetengenezwa kwa kutumia mbinu ya vyanzo vya habari vya watu wa riwaya ambazo inaturuhusu kuamua vifaa muhimu katika makusanyiko makubwa ya nyaraka. Tunaachia makampuni hayo pamoja na mfumo wa msingi na tukapendekeza protoko ya uchunguzi ili kuwezesha tafiti zaidi kuhusu tofauti hii ya muhtasari.', 'af': "@ title: window Daarom, ons studeer 'n variant van multi-dokument opsomming wat opsommings in die vorm van konseptkaarte produseer. Maar, geskikte evaluering datastel vir hierdie taak is huidiglik ontbreek. Om hierdie gap te sluit, laat ons 'n nuwe geskepte korpus van konseptkaarte voorsien wat heterogenee versameling van webdokumente op opvoedkundige onderwerpe opsomming maak. Dit is geskep met gebruik van 'n nuwe skakelinge toegang wat ons toelaat om belangrike elemente in groot dokumentsamlings te bepaal. Ons verlos die korpus saam met 'n basisline stelsel en voorgestel evalueringsprotokol om verdere ondersoek op hierdie variante van opsomming te aktiveer.", 'sq': 'Kartat koncepti mund të përdoren për të përfaqësuar në mënyrë të shkurtër informacion të rëndësishëm dhe për të sjellë strukturën në koleksione të mëdha dokumentesh. Prandaj, ne studiojmë një variant të përmbledhjes multidokumentore që prodhon përmbledhje në form ën e hartave koncepti. Megjithatë, të dhënat e përshtatshme të vlerësimit për këtë detyrë janë aktualisht të munguara. Për të mbyllur këtë boshllëk, ne paraqesim një trup të ri të hartave të konceptit që përmbledhin koleksionet heterogjene të dokumenteve të internetit mbi temat arsimore. Ajo u krijua duke përdorur një metodë të re crowdsourcing që na lejon të përcaktojmë me efektshmëri elemente të rëndësishme në koleksione të mëdha dokumentesh. We release the corpus along with a baseline system and proposed evaluation protocol to enable further research on this variant of summarization.', 'am': 'ሰነዶች ስለዚህ የብዙ የሰነድ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ እናስተምራለን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ለዚህ ስራ የሚያስፈልገውን ዳታ ማሳየት አልተቻለም። ይህንን ክፍል ለመዝጋት፣ አዲስ የፍጥረት ካርፓስ ማህበረሰብ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ It was created using a novel crowdsourcing approach that allows us to efficiently determine important elements in large document collections.  የኮርፓስን ቁጥር በመጀመሪያ ሳውንት እናስቀራለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar bilen möhüm maglumaty temsil etmek üçin ullanýar we nusgasyny uly sened toplamlara girdirmek üçin ullanylar. Şol sebäpli, biz multi-sened toplantyň wariantyny düşünjeli kartlaryň şeklinde alýar. Ýöne bu zadyň üçin ýeterli çykyş maglumatlary ýok. Bu boşluky ýapmak üçin, bilim meýdançasynda web sahypalaryň beýleki görkezilişini hasaplanjak üçin täze bir köpüsi ýöredik. Bu ýer biziň uly sened toplumynda möhüm elementler bejermek üçin täze köp taýýarlama golaýyndan ullanýar. Biz korpusy baz sistemasy bilen we çykyş protokollaryny çykaryp, bu topar wariantyň üstünde başga barlamasyny mümkin etmäge teklip etdik.', 'bn': 'গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য কনসেপ্ট ম্যাপ ব্যবহার করা যাবে এবং বড় নথি সংগ্রহে কাঠামো নিয়ে  তাই আমরা অনেক ডকুমেন্টের সারসংক্ষেপের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গবেষণা করছি যা ধারণা মানচিত্রের আকারে স তবে এই কাজের জন্য যথাযথ মূল্যায়নের ডাটাসেট বর্তমানে নিখোঁজ। এই বিভ্রান্তি বন্ধ করার জন্য আমরা নতুন একটি ধারণা মানচিত্রের কোর্পাস উপস্থাপন করি যা শিক্ষামূলক বিষয়গুলোতে উজ্জ্বল বিষয়ে ওয়েব নথিপত্র এটি তৈরি করা হয়েছে একটি উপন্যাসের জনসোর্সিং পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে যা আমাদের কাজে বিশাল নথি সংগ্রহের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উপাদান আমরা একটি বেসেলাইন সিস্টেমের সাথে কোর্পাস ছেড়ে দেই এবং এই সংক্ষেপের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয়ে আরো গবেষণা প্রস্তাব করি।', 'hy': 'Կենցեպտիկ քարտեզները կարող են օգտագործվել կարևոր տեղեկություն կոնցեպտիկ ներկայացնելու համար և կառուցվածքը ներառելու մեծ փաստաթղթերի հավաքածուների մեջ: Այսպիսով, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման տարբերակը, որը հանդիսանում է համառոտագրություններ գաղափարի քարտեզների տեսքով: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս խնդրի համար բացակայում են համապատասխան գնահատման տվյալների համակարգեր: Այս տարբերությունը փակելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր ստեղծված գաղափարների քարտեզներ, որոնք համառոտագրում են կրթական թեմաների վեբ փաստաթղթերի հերոգեն հավաքածուները: Այն ստեղծվել է օգտագործելով նոր ամբողջ ժողովրդավարության մոտեցում, որը մեզ հնարավորություն է տալիս արդյունավետ որոշել մեծ փաստաթղթերի հավաքածուների կարևոր տարրերը: Մենք արձակում ենք կորպոսը միասին հիմնական համակարգի հետ և առաջարկում ենք գնահատման պրոտոկոլ, որպեսզի կարողանանք ավելի շատ հետազոտություններ համառոտագրման այս տարբերակի մասին:', 'az': 'Əsas məlumatı göstərmək və strukturları böyük döküm koleksiyonlarına gətirmək üçün müəyyən xəritələr istifadə edilə bilər. Beləliklə, biz çoxlu belədi təmizlənməsinin dəyişikliyini təhsil edirik ki, məsələlər haritaların formu ilə təmizlənir. Ancaq bu işlər üçün uyğun değerlendirmə verilən qurğuları qeyb edir. Bu boşluğu kapatmaq üçün yeni yaratdığımız məsələlər barəsində təhsil məsələləri barəsində müxtəlif web məsələlərinin müxtəlif koleksiyonlarını qeyd edir. Bu, bizə böyük dökümət koleksiyonlarında möhkəm elementləri təsdiqləməyə imkan verir. Biz korpusu təklif sistemi ilə birlikdə yayındırırıq və təklif etdik değerlendirmə protokolu bu dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləri barəsində daha çox araştırmağa qadir olmaq üçün.', 'ca': "Els mapes conceptuals poden ser utilitzats per representar concretament informació important i portar estructura en grans col·leccions de documents. Per tant, estudiem una variant de resum multidocumental que produeix resums en form a de mapes de concepte. Però actualment falten conjunts de dades d'evaluació adequats per a aquesta tasca. Per acabar amb aquest buit, presentem un nou cos de mapes de concepte que resumen col·leccions heterogènes de documents web sobre temes educatius. Es va crear fent servir un nou enfocament de crowdsourcing que ens permet determinar eficientment els elements importants en grans col·leccions de documents. We release the corpus along with a baseline system and proposed evaluation protocol to enable further research on this variant of summarization.", 'cs': 'Koncepční mapy lze použít k stručnému reprezentování důležitých informací a vnést strukturu do velkých sbírek dokumentů. Proto studujeme variantu multi-dokumentové shrnutí, která vytváří shrnutí ve formě koncepčních map. V současné době však chybí vhodné hodnotící datové sady pro tento úkol. Abychom tuto mezeru uzavřeli, představujeme nově vytvořený korpus konceptních map, které shrnují heterogenní sbírky webových dokumentů na vzdělávací témata. Byl vytvořen s využitím nového crowdsourcingového přístupu, který nám umožňuje efektivně určit důležité prvky ve velkých sbírkách dokumentů. Korpus uvolníme spolu se základním systémem a navrženým hodnotícím protokolem, který umožňuje další výzkum této varianty shrnutí.', 'bs': 'Može se koristiti koncepcione mape za tačno predstavljanje važnih informacija i uvesti strukturu u velike kolekcije dokumenta. Stoga proučavamo variant sažetka multidokumenta koji proizvodi sažetke u obliku mapa koncepta. Međutim, odgovarajuće podatke za procjenu za ovaj zadatak trenutno nedostaje. Da bi zatvorili taj praznik, predstavljamo novog stvorenog korpusa mapa koncepta koji sažete heterogenezne kolekcije web dokumenta o obrazovnim temama. Stvorena je koristeći novi pristup crowdsourcing koji nam omogućava da efikasno utvrdimo važne elemente u velikim kolekcijama dokumenta. Puštamo korpus zajedno sa osnovnim sistemom i predložimo protokol za procjenu kako bi omogućili daljnje istraživanje o ovoj varijanti sažetke.', 'et': 'Kontseptkaarte saab kasutada olulise teabe kokkuvõtlikuks esitamiseks ja struktuuri lisamiseks suurtesse dokumendikogudesse. Seetõttu uurime mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtte varianti, mis toodab kokkuvõtteid kontseptsioonikaartide kujul. Kuid praegu puuduvad selle ülesande jaoks sobivad hindamisandmekogumid. Selle lõhe kõrvaldamiseks esitame äsja loodud kontseptsioonikaartide korpuse, mis võtab kokku haridusalaste teemade veebidokumentide heterogeensed kollektsioonid. See loodi uudse ühishankimise lähenemisviisi abil, mis võimaldab meil tõhusalt määrata olulised elemendid suurtes dokumendikogudes. Avaldame korpuse koos lähtesüsteemi ja kavandatud hindamisprotokolliga, et võimaldada edasisi uuringuid selle kokkuvõtte variandi kohta.', 'fi': 'Konseptikarttojen avulla voidaan esittää tiivistetysti tärkeää tietoa ja tuoda rakennetta suuriin asiakirjakokoelmiin. Siksi tutkimme monidokumenttien yhteenvedon varianttia, joka tuottaa yhteenvedon konseptikartojen muodossa. Tähän tehtävään ei kuitenkaan tällä hetkellä ole sopivia arviointiaineistoja. Tämän aukon poistamiseksi esittelemme vastikään luodun konseptikarttakorpuksen, joka kokoaa yhteen heterogeeniset kokoelmat web-dokumentteja opetusaiheisista aiheista. Se on luotu käyttämällä uudenlaista joukkoistamismenetelmää, jonka avulla voimme tehokkaasti määrittää tärkeät elementit suurissa asiakirjakokoelmissa. Julkaisemme korpusen yhdessä perusjärjestelmän ja ehdotetun arviointiprotokollan kanssa, jotta tätä tiivistelmävarianttia voitaisiin tutkia tarkemmin.', 'jv': 'section politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness kanggo ngilangno iki, kita nganggo perusahaan nganggo mapan jênêmêr Jejaring Awak dhéwé mbukak karo sistem sing ditambah kanggo nyelaran protokol sing nggawe perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sistêm kuwi nggawe', 'sk': 'Konceptni zemljevidi se lahko uporabljajo za jedrnato predstavitev pomembnih informacij in vključevanje strukture v velike zbirke dokumentov. Zato preučujemo različico večdokumentne povzetke, ki izdeluje povzetke v obliki konceptnih zemljevidov. Vendar trenutno manjkajo ustrezni nabori podatkov o oceni za to nalogo. Za zapolnitev te vrzeli predstavljamo novo ustvarjen korpus konceptnih zemljevidov, ki povzemajo heterogene zbirke spletnih dokumentov o izobraževalnih temah. Ustvarjen je bil z uporabo novega množičnega pristopa, ki nam omogoča učinkovito določanje pomembnih elementov v velikih zbirkah dokumentov. Korpus objavljamo skupaj z osnovnim sistemom in predlaganim ocenjevalnim protokolom, ki omogoča nadaljnje raziskave te različice povzetka.', 'ha': "Concept maps can be used to concisely represent important information and bring structure into large document collections.  Saboda haka, muna karanta wasu masu ƙararin takardar wasu masu yawa wanda ke samar da ƙarami cikin tsarin zauren zato. Babu kuma, ba za'a sava tsari masu daidai wa wannan aikin da ake daidai ba a yanzu. Ga ya rufe wannan gaura, muna halatar da wata takardar zato na-yanzu wanda aka halitta na hanyoyin zato, yana ƙararin komai na takardar takardar masu cikin masu da aka sani. An halitta shi da wani hanyon umarni mai haɗuwa da aiki wanda ke yarda da mu iya ƙayyade ƙanshi masu muhimu cikin takardun takardar. Munã sakar da kowaci sami da wata na'urar-basalin na'ura, kuma Muke buƙatan wata kimar ta ƙaddara dõmin ya iya iya amfani da research kan wannan variant na ƙararinsa.", 'he': 'מפות מושג יכולות להשתמש כדי לייצג בקצר מידע חשוב ולהביא מבנה לאוספי מסמכים גדולים. לכן, אנחנו לומדים שונה של מסמכים רבים שיוצר סדרות בצורה של מפות מושג. עם זאת, קבוצות מידע עריכה מתאימות למשימה הזו חסרות כרגע. כדי לסגור את הפער הזה, אנחנו מציגים קורפוס חדש של מפות מושג שמסכם אוסף הרוגני של מסמכי אינטרנט על נושאים חינוכיים. הוא נוצר באמצעות גישה חדשה למקורות קהל שמאפשרת לנו לקבוע באופן יעיל אלמנטים חשובים באיסוף מסמכים גדול. אנו משחררים את הקורפוס יחד עם מערכת בסיסית והצענו פרוטוקול הערכה כדי לאפשר מחקר נוסף על השינוי הזה של הסכם.', 'bo': 'Concept maps can be used to concisely represent important information and bring structure into large document collections. དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་བསྡུར་བའི་ཚིག ཡིན་ནའང་། བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་དོན་ལྟར་ཕན་འབྲས་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་བརླག་མེད། བར་སྟོང་འདི་སྒོ་རྒྱག དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོར་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཁག་གི་གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བཅུག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་དེ་ཡིན་ན་ང་ཚ ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་རྨང་གཞིའི་མ་ལག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྐྱུར་བ་དང་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Natural Language Does Not Emerge ‘Naturally’ in Multi-Agent Dialog', 'ar': 'لا تظهر اللغة الطبيعية "بشكل طبيعي" في الحوار متعدد العوامل', 'es': 'El lenguaje natural no surge «naturalmente» en el diálogo de varios agentes', 'pt': "A linguagem natural não surge 'naturalmente' na caixa de diálogo multiagente", 'fr': "Le langage naturel n'apparaît pas «\xa0naturellement\xa0» dans la boîte de dialogue multi-agents", 'ja': 'マルチエージェントダイアログでは、自然言語は「自然に」出現しません', 'zh': '自然语言不在多智对话框中自然', 'hi': "प्राकृतिक भाषा बहु-एजेंट संवाद में 'स्वाभाविक रूप से' नहीं उभरती है", 'ru': 'Естественный язык не проявляется «естественно» в диалоге с несколькими агентами', 'ga': "Ní thagann Teanga Nádúrtha chun cinn `go nádúrtha' sa dialóg Ilghníomhaire", 'ka': "ნაირადი ენერგია არ მოხდება `ნაირადი' დიალოგში", 'el': 'Η φυσική γλώσσα δεν αναδύεται "φυσικά" στον διάλογο πολλαπλών παραγόντων', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv nem jelenik meg "természetesen" a Multi-Agent párbeszédpanelen', 'it': 'Il linguaggio naturale non emerge "naturalmente" nella finestra di dialogo multi-agente', 'kk': "Негізгі тіл көп- агенттер диалогында 'табиғи' дегенге келмейді", 'lt': 'Daugiaagentų dialoge natūrali kalba neatsiranda „ natūrali “.', 'mk': 'Природниот јазик не се појавува „ природно “ во дијалогот со повеќе агенти', 'ms': "Bahasa Biasa tidak muncul `Secara Biasa' dalam Dialog Berbanyak-Ejen", 'ml': "Natural Language Does Not Emerge `Naturally' in Multi-Agent Dialog", 'mt': 'Il-Lingwa Naturali ma toħroġx ‘Naturalment’ fid-Djalogu b’Aktar Aġenti', 'mn': "Байгалийн хэл олон агентын диалогт `байгалийн' хэл", 'no': 'Naturspråk gjer ikkje « naturleg » i multiagentdialogen', 'pl': 'Język naturalny nie pojawia się "naturalnie" w oknie dialogowym wielu agentów', 'ro': 'Limbajul natural nu apare "natural" în dialogul Multi-Agent', 'sr': 'Prirodni jezik ne izaziva "prirodno" u multiagentskom dijalogu', 'si': "ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ගොඩක් නියෝජිත සංවාදයෙන් 'ස්වභාවිකය' කිරීම නැහැ.", 'so': 'Luqada asalka ah ma aha mid xaaladaha degdega ah ee ku qoran diyaariga ajnabiga badan', 'sv': 'Naturligt språk dyker inte upp "naturligt" i dialogen med flera agenter', 'ta': "இயல்பான மொழி 'இயல்பாக' பல முகவரி உரையாடலில் பெறுவது இல்லை", 'ur': "طبیعی زبان مختلف اژنٹ ڈیلوگو میں `طبیعی' نہیں چلتی", 'uz': 'Muddati taò¥minlovchi muloqat oynasida', 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ tự nhiên không phát ra/ tự nhiên trong hộp thoại đa đặc vụ', 'hr': "Prirodni jezik ne izaziva `prirodno' u multiagentskom dijalogu", 'bg': 'Естественият език не възниква "естествено" в диалога с множество агенти', 'nl': "Natuurlijke taal treedt niet 'natuurlijk' op in dialoog met meerdere agenten", 'da': "Naturligt sprog dukker ikke op `naturligt' i Multi-Agent Dialog", 'fa': 'زبان طبیعی در محاورۀ چند مامور\u200cها \u200cطبیعی\u200c', 'ko': "자연 언어는 다중 에이전트 대화에서'자연스럽게'나타나지 않는다", 'de': 'Natürliche Sprache taucht nicht "natürlich" im Multi-Agenten Dialog auf', 'id': "Bahasa Alami tidak muncul `Alami' dalam Dialog Multi-Agen", 'tr': "Täbiýal Dil köp-agent dialogda ''Naturally' girişemez", 'sw': "Lugha ya asili haina hatari 'Asili' katika Dialog ya Ajili", 'af': "Natuurlike Taal Doen nie 'Natuurlik' in Multi- Agent Dialoog", 'sq': "Gjuha natyrore nuk shfaqet `Natyrshëm' në dialogun me shumë agjentë", 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'az': "T…ôbi…ôtli Dil √ßoxlu-ańüantlńĪ Dialoog i√ßind…ô `T…ôbi…ôtli'-ni yaratmaz", 'hy': 'Բնական լեզուն չի զարգանում «Բնական» բազմագործականների դասախոսում', 'bn': "স্বাভাবিক ভাষা বহু এজেন্ট ডায়ালগে 'স্বাভাবিক' জরুরী নেই", 'bs': "Prirodni jezik ne izaziva `prirodno' u multiagentskom dijalogu", 'cs': 'Přirozený jazyk není "přirozený" v dialogu s více agenty', 'ca': "La llengua natural no surt 'Naturalment' en el diàleg multiagente", 'fi': 'Luonnollinen kieli ei synny "luonnollisesti" moniagentti-dialogissa', 'et': 'Loomulik keel ei ilmu mitme teguriga dialoogis loomulikult', 'sk': 'Naravni jezik se ne pojavi "naravno" v dialogu z več agenti', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': "Language Daerah sing ora butuh 'Narihan' ning Dialog Multi-ajan", 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་ལ་ "རྒྱུན་ལྡན" པར་མཐོང་མི་ཐུབ', 'he': "שפה טבעית לא פותחת 'טבעית' בדיולוג עם הרבה סוכנים"}
{'en': 'A number of recent works have proposed techniques for end-to-end learning of communication protocols among cooperative multi-agent populations, and have simultaneously found the emergence of grounded human-interpretable language in the protocols developed by the agents, learned without any human supervision ! In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of ‘negative’ results culminating in a ‘positive’ one   showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional. In essence, we find that natural language does not emerge ‘naturally’,despite the semblance of ease of natural-language-emergence that one may gather from recent literature. We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.', 'ar': 'اقترح عدد من الأعمال الحديثة تقنيات للتعلم الشامل لبروتوكولات الاتصال بين مجموعات متعاونة متعددة الوكلاء ، ووجدت في نفس الوقت ظهور لغة متأصلة يمكن تفسيرها بشريًا في البروتوكولات التي طورها الوكلاء ، والتي تم تعلمها دون أي إشراف بشري ! في هذه الورقة ، باستخدام لعبة مرجعية Task & Talk بين عاملين كاختبار للاختبار ، نقدم سلسلة من النتائج "السلبية" بلغت ذروتها بنتائج "إيجابية" - تظهر أنه في حين أن معظم اللغات التي اخترعها الوكيل فعالة (أي تحقيق ما يقرب من- مكافآت المهام المثالية) ، فهي بالتأكيد غير قابلة للتفسير أو تركيبية. من حيث الجوهر ، نجد أن اللغة الطبيعية لا تظهر "بشكل طبيعي" ، على الرغم من ما يشبه سهولة ظهور اللغة الطبيعية الذي قد يجمعه المرء من الأدب الحديث. نناقش كيف يمكن إقناع اللغات المخترعة لتصبح أكثر فأكثر شبيهة بالإنسان وتركيبة من خلال زيادة القيود على كيفية تواصل عاملين.', 'fr': "Un certain nombre de travaux récents ont proposé des techniques d'apprentissage de bout en bout des protocoles de communication parmi des populations coopératives multi-agents, et ont simultanément constaté l'émergence d'un langage ancré interprétable par l'homme dans les protocoles développés par les agents, appris sans aucune supervision humaine\xa0! Dans cet article, en utilisant un jeu de référence Task & Talk entre deux agents comme banc d'essai, nous présentons une séquence de résultats «\xa0négatifs\xa0» aboutissant à un résultat «\xa0positif\xa0» — montrant que si la plupart des langages inventés par des agents sont efficaces (c'est-à-dire qu'ils permettent d'obtenir des récompenses de tâches presque parfaites), ils ne sont décidément pas interprétables ou compositionnel. Essentiellement, nous constatons que le langage naturel n'émerge pas «\xa0naturellement\xa0», malgré le semblant de facilité d'émergence du langage naturel que l'on peut tirer de la littérature récente. Nous discutons de la façon dont il est possible de persuader les langues inventées de devenir de plus en plus humaines et compositionnelles en augmentant les restrictions sur la façon dont deux agents peuvent communiquer.", 'pt': "Uma série de trabalhos recentes propuseram técnicas para aprendizado de ponta a ponta de protocolos de comunicação entre populações multiagentes cooperativas e, simultaneamente, encontraram o surgimento de linguagem humana-interpretável fundamentada nos protocolos desenvolvidos pelos agentes, aprendidas sem qualquer supervisão humana. ! Neste artigo, usando um jogo de referência Task & Talk entre dois agentes como um banco de testes, apresentamos uma sequência de resultados ‘negativos’ culminando em um ‘positivo’ – mostrando que enquanto a maioria das linguagens inventadas por agentes são eficazes (ou seja, alcançam quase recompensas de tarefa perfeitas), eles decididamente não são interpretáveis ou composicionais. Em essência, descobrimos que a linguagem natural não surge 'naturalmente', apesar da aparência de facilidade de emergência da linguagem natural que se pode deduzir da literatura recente. Discutimos como é possível persuadir as linguagens inventadas a se tornarem cada vez mais humanas e composicionais, aumentando as restrições sobre como dois agentes podem se comunicar.", 'es': 'Varios trabajos recientes han propuesto técnicas para el aprendizaje de principio a fin de protocolos de comunicación entre poblaciones cooperativas de múltiples agentes, y al mismo tiempo han encontrado el surgimiento de un lenguaje fundamentado interpretable por humanos en los protocolos desarrollados por los agentes, ¡aprendido sin supervisión humana alguna! En este artículo, que utiliza un juego de referencia de Task & Talk entre dos agentes como banco de pruebas, presentamos una secuencia de resultados «negativos» que culmina en uno «positivo», lo que demuestra que, si bien la mayoría de los lenguajes inventados por los agentes son efectivos (es decir, logran recompensas de tareas casi perfectas), decididamente no son interpretables o composicional. En esencia, encontramos que el lenguaje natural no surge «naturalmente», a pesar de la apariencia de facilidad de surgimiento del lenguaje natural que se puede deducir de la literatura reciente. Discutimos cómo es posible persuadir a los lenguajes inventados para que se conviertan cada vez más en humanos y compositivos aumentando las restricciones sobre la forma en que dos agentes pueden comunicarse.', 'ja': '最近の多くの著作は、協力的なマルチエージェント集団間のコミュニケーションプロトコルのエンドツーエンド学習のための技術を提案し、同時に、エージェントが開発したプロトコルに人間が解釈可能な言語が存在することを見出し、人間の監督なしで学習しました！この論文では、2つのエージェント間のタスク＆トーク参照ゲームをテストベースとして、エージェントが発明した言語のほとんどが効果的である（すなわち、ほぼ完璧なタスク報酬を達成する）一方で、それらは決定的に解釈可能ではない、または構成的ではないことを示す、「陽性」に達する一連の「陰性」結果を提示します。本質的に、私たちは、最近の文献から集まる可能性のある自然言語の出現の容易さのように見えるにもかかわらず、自然言語が「自然に」出現することはないことを発見します。私たちは、2つのエージェントがどのようにコミュニケーションするかの制限を増やすことによって、発明された言語をどんどん人間のようになり、構成的になるように同調させることがどのように可能かについて議論します。', 'zh': '近事发于合作多智能群体中端端习信协之术,而见于摄发之议,出于人伦之可解,其言无所监督! 本文以两摄之间Task&Talk参戏为试台,列为"负面",终成"正面"——明虽多摄发明之言有效(即成近美之任奖),其明不可解也。 以质言之,自然语言非自然,虽近文得自然语言之易也。 我们议论了怎么增加对两个通信的限限来哄骗发明的话转似人们和组合。', 'hi': "हाल के कई कार्यों ने सहकारी बहु-एजेंट आबादी के बीच संचार प्रोटोकॉल के एंड-टू-एंड सीखने के लिए तकनीकों का प्रस्ताव दिया है, और साथ ही साथ एजेंटों द्वारा विकसित प्रोटोकॉल में जमीनी मानव-व्याख्यायोग्य भाषा के उद्भव को पाया है, जो बिना किसी मानव पर्यवेक्षण के सीखा गया है! इस पेपर में, एक टेस्टबेड के रूप में दो एजेंटों के बीच एक टास्क एंड टॉक संदर्भ गेम का उपयोग करते हुए, हम 'नकारात्मक' परिणामों का एक अनुक्रम प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो 'सकारात्मक' में समाप्त होता है - यह दर्शाता है कि जबकि अधिकांश एजेंट-आविष्कार की गई भाषाएं प्रभावी होती हैं (यानी निकट-पूर्ण कार्य पुरस्कार प्राप्त करती हैं), वे निश्चित रूप से व्याख्यायोग्य या रचनात्मक नहीं हैं। संक्षेप में, हम पाते हैं कि प्राकृतिक भाषा 'स्वाभाविक रूप से' उभरती नहीं है, प्राकृतिक-भाषा-उद्भव की आसानी की झलक के बावजूद जो हाल के साहित्य से इकट्ठा हो सकती है। हम चर्चा करते हैं कि आविष्कार की गई भाषाओं को अधिक से अधिक मानव-जैसे और रचनात्मक बनने के लिए कैसे मनाना संभव है, इस पर प्रतिबंधों को बढ़ाकर कि दो एजेंट कैसे संवाद कर सकते हैं।", 'ru': 'В ряде недавних работ были предложены методы комплексного обучения коммуникационным протоколам среди кооперативных групп населения, состоящих из нескольких агентов, и в то же время обнаружено появление в протоколах, разработанных агентами, обоснованных человеческих интерпретируемых формулировок, изученных без какого-либо надзора со стороны человека! В этой статье, используя игру Task &amp; Talk между двумя агентами в качестве испытательного стенда, мы представляем последовательность «отрицательных» результатов, завершающихся «положительным» – показывая, что, хотя большинство языков, изобретенные агентами, являются эффективными (т.е. достигают почти идеальных вознаграждений за задачу), они явно не интерпретируются или не являются композиционными. По сути, мы находим, что естественный язык не возникает «естественно»,несмотря на подобие легкости естественного языка - появления, которое можно собрать из недавней литературы. Мы обсуждаем, как можно уговорить изобретенные языки стать все более человекоподобными и композиционными, усиливая ограничения на то, как два агента могут общаться.', 'ga': 'Tá teicnící molta ag roinnt saothar le déanaí chun prótacail chumarsáide a fhoghlaim ó cheann ceann go ceann i measc daonraí comhoibríocha ilghníomhairí, agus fuair siad ag an am céanna teacht chun cinn teanga bunaithe ar an duine inmhínithe sna prótacail a d’fhorbair na gníomhairí, a d’fhoghlaim gan aon mhaoirseacht dhaonna. ! Sa pháipéar seo, ag baint úsáide as cluiche tagartha Tasc & Caint idir dhá oibreán mar leaba tástála, cuirimid i láthair seicheamh de thorthaí ‘diúltacha’ a chríochnaíonn le ceann ‘dearfach’ – rud a thaispeánann cé go bhfuil an chuid is mó de na teangacha a cheap gníomhairí éifeachtach (i. luach saothair tasc foirfe), is cinnte nach féidir iad a léirmhíniú ná a chomhdhéanamh. Go bunúsach, feicimid nach dtagann teanga nádúrtha chun cinn ‘go nádúrtha’, in ainneoin chomh héasca agus atá an teacht chun cinn nádúrtha-teanga a d’fhéadfadh duine a bhailiú ón litríocht le déanaí. Pléimid conas is féidir na teangacha cumtha a mhealladh le bheith níos cosúla le daoine agus le comhdhéanamh trí shrianta a mhéadú ar an gcaoi a bhféadfaidh an dá ghníomhairí cumarsáid a dhéanamh.', 'el': 'Μια σειρά πρόσφατων έργων έχουν προτείνει τεχνικές για την εξ ολοκλήρου εκμάθηση πρωτοκόλλων επικοινωνίας μεταξύ συνεργατικών πληθυσμών πολλαπλών παραγόντων, και ταυτόχρονα έχουν βρει την εμφάνιση θεμελιωμένης ανθρώπινης ερμηνείας γλώσσας στα πρωτόκολλα που αναπτύσσονται από τους πράκτορες, που μαθαίνονται χωρίς ανθρώπινη επίβλεψη! Σε αυτή την εργασία, χρησιμοποιώντας ένα παιχνίδι αναφοράς μεταξύ δύο παραγόντων ως δοκιμαστικό κρεβάτι, παρουσιάζουμε μια ακολουθία "αρνητικών" αποτελεσμάτων που κορυφώνεται σε ένα "θετικό" σημείο που δείχνει ότι ενώ οι περισσότερες γλώσσες εφευρέθηκαν από πράκτορες είναι αποτελεσματικές (δηλαδή επιτυγχάνουν σχεδόν τέλειες ανταμοιβές εργασίας), δεν είναι σαφώς ερμηνευτές ή σύνθετες. Στην ουσία, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η φυσική γλώσσα δεν αναδύεται "φυσικά", παρά την φαινομενική ευκολία της ανάδειξης της φυσικής γλώσσας που μπορεί κανείς να συλλέξει από την πρόσφατη λογοτεχνία. Συζητούμε πώς είναι δυνατόν να πείσουμε τις επινοημένες γλώσσες να γίνουν όλο και πιο ανθρώπινες και συνθηματικές αυξάνοντας τους περιορισμούς στον τρόπο επικοινωνίας δύο παραγόντων.', 'hu': 'Számos közelmúltbeli munka javaslatot tett a kommunikációs protokollok végponttól végpontig történő tanulásának technikájára együttműködő több ügynök populációja körében, és egyidejűleg az ügynökök által kidolgozott protokollokban, emberi felügyelet nélkül tanulták meg az alapozott ember-értelmezhető nyelv kialakulását! Ebben a tanulmányban, egy Task & Talk referenciajátékot használva két ügynök között tesztágyként, bemutatjuk a "negatív" eredmények sorozatát, amelyek egy "pozitív" eredménnyel csúcspontoznak – bizonyítva, hogy bár a legtöbb ügynök által kitalált nyelv hatékony (azaz majdnem tökéletes feladat jutalmat érnek el), azok határozottan nem értelmezhetők vagy kompozíciós. Lényegében azt találjuk, hogy a természetes nyelv nem jelenik meg "természetesen", annak ellenére, hogy a természetes nyelv megjelenésének könnyedén látszik, amit a közelmúltbeli irodalomból gyűjthetünk össze. Beszélgetünk arról, hogyan lehetséges a feltalált nyelveket arra ösztönözni, hogy egyre emberiszerűbbé és kompozíciósabbá váljanak azáltal, hogy fokozzák a korlátozásokat a két ügynök kommunikációjára vonatkozóan.', 'it': 'Alcuni lavori recenti hanno proposto tecniche per l\'apprendimento end-to-end dei protocolli di comunicazione tra popolazioni cooperative multi-agente, e hanno contemporaneamente trovato l\'emergere di un linguaggio umano-interpretabile a terra nei protocolli sviluppati dagli agenti, appresi senza alcuna supervisione umana! In questo articolo, usando un gioco di riferimento Task & Talk tra due agenti come banco di prova, presentiamo una sequenza di risultati \'negativi\' che culminano in uno \'positivo\' - dimostrando che mentre la maggior parte dei linguaggi inventati dagli agenti sono efficaci (cioè ottengono premi quasi perfetti per compiti), essi non sono decisamente interpretabili o compositivi. In sostanza, troviamo che il linguaggio naturale non emerge "naturalmente", nonostante la parvenza di facilità di emersione del linguaggio naturale che si può raccogliere dalla letteratura recente. Discutiamo di come sia possibile indurre i linguaggi inventati a diventare sempre più umani e compositivi aumentando le restrizioni sul modo in cui due agenti possono comunicare.', 'kk': "Жуырдағы жұмыс бірнеше жұмыс бірнеше бірнеше көп агенттер арасындағы коммуникациялық протоколдарды аяқтау үшін оқыту техникаларын ұсынады. Бірақ, агенттер жасалған протоколдарда, адамдарды қарау жоқ оқылған адамдардың түсінікті тілдер Бұл қағазда, екі агент арасындағы тапсырма және сөйлейтін сілтеме ойынын қолдану үшін, біз `негативті' нәтижесін `positiv' бірінде сәйкес келтіреміз - агенттің көпшілігі тапсырма тілдері эффективні болғанда (мысалы, жақын тапсырма мәлімет Негізінде, біз табиғи тіл жаңа литературадан бірге жеткізе алатын табиғи тілдерінің көңіл түсініктері болмайды. Біз құрылған тілдерді қалай оқыту мүмкін екі агенттің қалай байланысты болатынын шектеу арқылы адамдардың көбірек және құрылысы болатынын айтып тұрмыз.", 'lt': 'Keletas neseniai atliktų darbų pasiūlė metodus, skirtus tarpusavyje mokytis bendradarbiaujančių daugelio veiksnių populiacijų ryšių protokolų, ir tuo pačiu metu agent ų parengtuose protokoluose, kurie buvo mokomi be jokios žmogaus priežiūros, atsirado pagrįstos žmogiškai aiškinamos kalbos! In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of `negative\' results culminating in a `positive\' one - showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional.  Iš esmės mes nustatome, kad natūrali kalba neatsiranda "natūrali", nepaisant to, kad atrodo lengva natūrali kalba atsirasti, kurią galima surinkti iš naujausios literatūros. We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.', 'ms': "Beberapa pekerjaan baru-baru ini telah mengusulkan teknik untuk belajar dari hujung ke hujung protokol komunikasi diantara populasi multi-ejen kooperatif, dan secara bersamaan telah menemukan muncul bahasa manusia-terjemahan di dalam protokol yang dikembangkan oleh ejen, belajar tanpa sebarang pengawasan manusia! Dalam kertas in i, menggunakan permainan rujukan Tugas & Cakap diantara dua ejen sebagai tempat ujian, kami memperkenalkan urutan keputusan `negatif' yang mencapai puncak dalam satu `positif' - menunjukkan bahawa walaupun kebanyakan bahasa-bahasa yang dicipta ejen adalah berkesan (iaitu mencapai hadiah tugas hampir sempurna), mereka tentunya tidak boleh diterjemahkan atau komposisi. Pada dasarnya, kita mendapati bahasa alam tidak muncul 'secara semulajadi', walaupun kelihatan mudah muncul bahasa alam yang boleh dikumpulkan dari literatur baru-baru ini. Kami membincangkan bagaimana mungkin untuk melatih bahasa yang dicipta untuk menjadi semakin manusia-seperti dan komposisi dengan meningkatkan keterangan bagaimana dua ejen boleh berkomunikasi.", 'mk': 'Неколку неодамнешни дела предложија техники за конечно учење на комуникациските протоколи помеѓу кооперативните популации со мултиагенти, и истовремено го пронајдоа појавувањето на основаниот човек-интерпретабилен јазик во протоколите развиени од агентите, научени без никаква човечка над Во овој весник, користејќи референтна игра Task & Talk помеѓу двајца агенти како тестиран кревет, претставуваме секвенца на „ негативни “ резултати кои кулминираат во „ позитивни “ - покажувајќи дека иако повеќето јазици измислени од агентот се ефикасни (т.е. постигнуваат скоро совршени награди за задачите), тие одлучено не се Во суштина, откриваме дека природниот јазик не се појавува „природно“, и покрај тоа што изгледа како лесно да се појавува природен јазик кој може да се собере од неодамнешната литература. We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.', 'ml': "സാമ്പത്തില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സഹപ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള കമ്മ്യൂണിക്കോളുകള്\u200d അവസാനിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, രണ്ടു ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഒരു ടാസ്ക് & സംസാരിക്കുന്ന രേഖകള്\u200d കളി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് 'സ്ഥിരമായ' ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നു 'നേജിറ്റീവ്' എന്ന് നാം ഒരു 'ഫലം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. മിക്കവ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പുറപ്പെടുന്നില്ലെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ, സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പുറത്തുവരുന്നതിന് സാധ We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.", 'mt': 'A number of recent works have proposed techniques for end-to-end learning of communication protocols among cooperative multi-agent populations, and have simultaneously found the emergence of grounded human-interpretable language in the protocols developed by the agents, learned without any human supervision!  F’dan id-dokument, bl-użu ta’ logħba ta’ referenza Task & Talk bejn żewġ a ġenti bħala test bed, aħna nippreżentaw sekwenza ta’ riżultati “negattivi” li kulminaw f’waħda “pożittiva” - li turi li filwaqt li l-biċċa l-kbira tal-lingwi inventati mill-aġenti huma effettivi (jiġifieri jiksbu premji kważi perfetti tal-kompitu), huma deċi żament mhux interpretabbli jew kompożittivi. Fil-fatt, isibu li l-lingwa naturali ma toħroġx ‘naturalment’, minkejja l-simili ta’ faċilità ta’ emerġenza naturali-lingwa li wieħed jista’ jiġbor mil-letteratura reċenti. Aħna niddiskutu kif huwa possibbli li l-lingwi inventati jingħaqdu biex isiru dejjem aktar simili għall-bniedem u kompożittivi billi jiżdiedu r-restrizzjonijiet fuq kif żewġ aġenti jistgħu jikkomunikaw.', 'mn': "Саяхан олон ажлын ажиллагаа хамтран ажилладаг олон агентын нийгэмд хамтран ажилладаг холбоо протоколын төгсгөлд сурах технологиудыг санал болгож байна. Гэвч агентуудын хөгжүүлсэн протоколууд нь хүн төрөлхтний харилцаагүйгээр суралцаж байгаа хүн төрөл Энэ цаасан дээр, хоёр агентын хоорондын даалгавар болон ярилцлагын тоглоом хэрэглэж, бид `сөрөг' үр дүнг `эерэг' хэлбэртэй болгож байна. Ихэнх агентын бүтээгдэхүүний үр дүнтэй (яг л хамгийн ойролцоогоор даалгаварын шагналыг гаргаж чадна) гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үнэндээ бид байгалийн хэл саяхан уран зохиолдаас цуглуулж болох байгалийн хэлний амархан амархан байдал биш гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Бид бүтээгдэхүүний хэл хэрхэн илүү хүн төрөлхтний төстэй болон бүтээлч байх боломжтой талаар ярилцдаг.", 'no': 'Mange nyleg arbeidar har foreslått teknikk for å lære kommunikasjonsprotokollar til slutt til slutt mellom samarbeidsfolkningspopulasjonar, og har funne samtidig utviklinga av grunnleggjande menneskelige tolkbare språk i protokollene utvikla av agentane, lært utan menneskelige oversikt! I denne papiret, ved å bruka eit oppgåve og talereferansspel mellom to agentar som testbed, viser vi e i rekkjefølgje av « negative » - resultatet som kulminar i eit « positive » - som viser at mens dei fleste agent-inventerte språk er effektiv (t.d. oppnå nær-perfekt oppgåvetiltak), er dei ikkje uttrykkbare eller komposionale. I hovedsak finn vi at naturspråk ikkje oppstår «naturlig», selv om det er lett i naturspråk-avhengig som ein kan samla frå nyleg literatur. Vi diskuterer korleis det er mogleg å trenga dei oppretta språka å bli meir og meir menneskelig og samansett ved å øke avgrensingar på korleis to agentar kan kommunisera.', 'pl': 'Szereg ostatnich prac zaproponowało techniki kompleksowego uczenia się protokołów komunikacyjnych wśród współpracujących populacji wielu agentów, a jednocześnie odkryło pojawienie się uziemionego języka interpretowalnego człowieka w protokołach opracowanych przez agentów, uczonego bez żadnego nadzoru człowieka! W niniejszym artykule, wykorzystując grę referencyjną "Task-Talk" między dwoma agentami jako platformę testową, przedstawiamy sekwencję "negatywnych" wyników kulminacyjną "pozytywną" wskazującą, że chociaż większość języków wymyślonych przez agentów jest skuteczna (tj. osiąga prawie doskonałe nagrody za zadania), zdecydowanie nie są interpretowalne ani kompozycyjne. W istocie odkrywamy, że język naturalny nie powstaje "naturalnie", pomimo pozoru łatwości pojawienia się języka naturalnego, jaką można uzyskać z najnowszej literatury. Omawiamy, jak możliwe jest przekonanie wymyślonych języków, aby stały się coraz bardziej ludzkie i kompozycyjne poprzez rosnące ograniczenia w jaki sposób dwóch agentów mogą się komunikować.', 'ro': 'Un număr de lucrări recente au propus tehnici de învățare end-to-end a protocoalelor de comunicare în rândul populațiilor cooperante multi-agenți și au găsit simultan apariția unui limbaj uman-interpretabil în protocoalele dezvoltate de agenți, învățate fără supraveghere umană! În această lucrare, folosind un joc de referință Task & Talk între doi agenți ca bază de testare, prezentăm o secvență de rezultate `negative\' care culminează într-una `pozitivă\' - arătând că, deși majoritatea limbilor inventate de agenți sunt eficiente (adică obțin recompense aproape perfecte pentru sarcini), ele nu sunt în mod decisiv interpretabile sau compoziționale. În esenţă, constatăm că limbajul natural nu apare "natural", în ciuda aparenţei uşurinţei apariţiei limbajului natural pe care o putem aduna din literatura recentă. Discutăm cum este posibil să convingem limbile inventate să devină din ce în ce mai umane și compoziționale prin creșterea restricțiilor privind modul în care doi agenți pot comunica.', 'sr': 'Nekoliko nedavnih radova predložio je tehnike za učenje komunikacijskih protokola među multiagentnim populacijama saradnje i istovremeno su pronašli otkriće temeljnog ljudskog jezika u protokolama koje su razvili agenti, naučenih bez ljudskog nadzora! U ovom papiru, koristeći referentnu igru zadataka i razgovora između dva agent a kao testovanog kreveta, predstavljamo sekvencu rezultata `negativnih\' koji se skupljaju u `pozitivnom\' prvom - pokazujući da, iako većina jezika izumljenih agenata su efikasna (tj. postizanje nagrade blizu savršenog zadataka), odlučno nisu interpretabilne ili kompozicionalne. U suštini, mi smatramo da prirodni jezik ne pojavljuje "prirodno", uprkos izgledu lakše prirodno-jezičkog događaja koji se može okupiti iz nedavne literature. Razgovaramo o tome kako je moguće trenirati izumljene jezike da postanu sve više ljudski i kompozicionalniji povećanjem ograničenja na način komunikacije dva agenta.', 'si': "අන්තිම වැඩක් තියෙනවා අවසාන විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට අවසාන විදියට අවසාන විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න සම්බන්ධ විදියට, සම්බන්ධ විදියට මි මේ පැත්තේ, නියෝජිත දෙන්නෙක් අතර පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක & කතා සෙල්ලම් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සෙල්ලම් කරන්න, අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන් `වැ අපි හොයාගන්නවා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව 'ස්වාභාවික' නෙවෙයි, ස්වාභාවික භාෂාවයේ සැලසුම් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් කොහොමද හොයාගත්ත භාෂාවල් වඩා වඩා මිනිස්සු වගේ වගේ සම්පූර්ණයක් වෙන්නේ කියලා සම්පූර්ණය කර", 'so': "Shaqooyin badan ee ugu dambeeyey waxay soo jeedeen iskuulooyin ay dhammaad u dhammaadaan barashada protokollada xiriirka ee dadka wadajirka ah dhexdooda, isla markaasna waxay isla markaasba ka heleen soo baxashada luqada lagu turjumi karo afka dadka oo lagu qorayo samooyinka ay maamuliintu horumariyeen, waxayna bareen wax aan la ilaalin dadka! In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of `negative' results culminating in a `positive' one - showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional.  Si dhab ah, waxaynu helnaa in luqada asalka ah uusan ka soo bixin `asalka', inkastoo ay fudud tahay fudud oo afka dabiicadda ah, in qof laga soo ururiyo qoraalkii ugu dambeeyey. Waxaannu ka sheekeynaynaa sida suurtagal ah in luqadaha la soo abuuray ay ay u noqon karto si aad u kala duwan dad iyo isku mid ah, marka lagu soo kordhiyo xadoor ku saabsan sida labada dalool ay u xiriiri karaan.", 'sv': 'Ett antal senaste arbeten har föreslagit tekniker för end-to-end inlärning av kommunikationsprotokoll bland kooperativa multi-agentpopulationer, och har samtidigt funnit framväxten av grundat mänskligt-tolkningsbart språk i de protokoll som utvecklats av agenterna, lärt sig utan någon mänsklig övervakning! I denna uppsats, med hjälp av ett referensspel mellan två agenter som testbädd, presenterar vi en sekvens av `negativa\' resultat som kulminerar i ett `positivt\' - vilket visar att även om de flesta agentuppfunna språk är effektiva (dvs uppnå nästan perfekta uppgiftsbelopp), är de definitivt inte tolkade eller kompositiva. I grund och botten finner vi att naturligt språk inte framträder "naturligt", trots det sken av lätthet av naturspråk-framväxt som man kan samla från den senaste litteraturen. Vi diskuterar hur det är möjligt att förmå de uppfunna språken att bli mer och mer mänskligt och kompositionellt genom att öka restriktionerna för hur två agenter kan kommunicera.', 'ta': "சமீபத்தில் சில செயல்கள் முடிவில் தொடர்பு நெறிமுறைகளை முடிவில் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் தொழில்நுட்பத்திற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. அதே போல் முகவரிகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட நெறிம இந்த காகிதத்தில், செயல் & பேச்சு குறிப்பு விளையாட்டை சோதனைப்படுத்தி இரண்டு மேலாளர்களுக்கிடையில் 'நேர்ம' முடிவுகளின் 'எதிர்மறை' விளைவுகளை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் 'நேர்ம' என்று காண்பிக்கி முக்கியத்தில், இயல்பான மொழி 'இயல்பாக' வெளியேறாது என்று நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், ஆனால் சமீபத்தில் ஒருவர் ஒரு இலக்கத்தில் இருந்து சேர நாம் எவ்வாறு கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட மொழிகளை கூட்ட முடியும் மற்றும் மேலும் மனித போன்ற மற்றும் தொகுப்பாக மாற்ற வேண்டும் என", 'ur': 'بہت سی اخیر کاروں نے بہت سی ٹیکنالوں کی پیشنهاد کی ہے کہ آئینٹوں نے توسعہ کیا تھا اور کسی انسان کی نظر کے بغیر سیکھا گیا تھا کہ آئینٹوں کی توسعہ پر بنیاد انسان کی تعبیر قابل زبان کی جگہ پائی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، دو اگنٹوں کے درمیان ایک ٹاکس اور ٹاکس رانس بازی کا استعمال کر رہے ہیں، ہم نے "منفی" نتیجے کا ایک "مثبت" میں چلتے ہیں، یہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ اگنٹ کی بہت سی زبانیں اثر ہیں (یعنی نزدیک پوری ٹاکس کا اجر پہنچ سکتے ہیں) وہ فیصلہ کے طور پر تفسیر نہیں کر سکتے یا پیدا کرنے والے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ طبیعی زبان „طبیعی طور پر “ (طبیعی طور پر) نہیں پیدا ہوتی،اگرچہ طبیعی زبان کی آسانی کے مثال سے آسان ہو جاتی ہے کہ ایک اگلے ادبیات سے جمع ہو سکتا ہے۔ ہم بحث کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح بنائے ہوئے زبانوں کی تعلیم کرنا ممکن ہے کہ انسان کی طرح زیادہ اور زیادہ انسان کی طرح ہوجائے اور پیدا کریں کہ دو اگنٹوں کو کس طرح تعلیم دیں', 'ka': "ბევრი ახალი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მრავალ ადვნენტის პროტოკოლობის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის კომუნიკაციის შესწავლების ტექნონგიები მოძლევა და ერთადერთ ამ დომენტში, ორი ადვნენტის შორის რეფერენციის გამოყენება, როგორც ტესტირებულია, ჩვენ მივიღეთ `negativ' შედეგების შედეგება, რომლებიც `positiv' ერთში კულმინირებულია, რომლებიც ბევრი ადვნენტის განახლებული ენები ეფექტიურია (მაგალითად გადავადგინ მაგალითად, ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ნაირადი ენერგია არ იქნება `ნაირადი',თუმცა ნაირადი ენერგიის განმავლობაზე გამოსახულება, რომელიც შეიძლება შეიძლება ახალი ლიტურატიდან შეიძლება შეი ჩვენ ვისაუბრობთ თუ როგორ შესაძლებელია გავაკეთოთ გამოიყენებული ენები, რომ უფრო მეტი ადამიანური და კომპოზიციური ხდება, როგორც ორი ადამიანტი შეუძლება კომუნიკაციას", 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik ishlamalar bir nechta ko'pchilik boshqaruvchilardagi aloqa protokollar o'rganishni o'rganish uchun teknologilarni o'rganishga tayyorlaydi, va shunday paytda, boshqaruvchilar tuzuvchi protokollarda qo'llangan qo'llanma boshqaruvchi tilni o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganadi! Bu qogʻozda, ikkita tashkilotlar orasidan vazifa va Talab qilish uchun, biz bir `positiv' natijalarini ishlatish natijasi bilan kelamiz. Ko'pchilik aniqlangan tillarning ko'pchiligi ishlab chiqaradi (balki eng yaxshi vazifani toʻxtatish mumkin) va ular faqat tarjima qilmaydi. Aslida, biz o'ylaymiz, asl tili tabiiy emas, tabiiy tilning sodda bo'lmasligi bo'lishi mumkin. Yaqinda bir necha literatoridan bir necha keladi. Biz quyidagi tillarni qanday qo'shish mumkin bo'lishi mumkin va ko'proq inson sifatida ko'proq bo'lishi mumkin va ikkita agentlar qanday bog'lash mumkin bo'lganligini ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một số công trình gần đây đã đề xuất kỹ thuật học kết thúc việc học về giao thức giữa các xã hội đa nhân viên hợp tác, và đồng thời tìm thấy sự xuất hiện của ngôn ngữ được giáo dục con người hiểu thấu trong các giao thức được phát triển bởi các đặc vụ, học được mà không bị giám sát bởi con người! In this paper, using a Task*Q Thuyết reference game between two agents as a tested, we present a dãy of\'negative\'results kết quả in a "tích cực\' one- showing that while most agent-invented languages are effectively (Tức là đạt được gần hoàn hảo phần thưởng nhiệm vụ), they are Rõ ràng không thể diễn tả hay phối hợp. Tóm lại, chúng tôi thấy rằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên không xuất hiện "tự nhiên", mặc dù có vẻ dễ dàng phát triển ngôn ngữ tự nhiên mà bạn có thể học được từ văn học gần đây. Chúng ta bàn bạc làm thế nào để dụ dỗ những ngôn ngữ phát minh trở nên giống loài người và thành lập hơn bằng cách tăng giới hạn cách liên lạc của hai đặc vụ.', 'bg': 'Редица скорошни разработки предлагат техники за цялостно обучение на комуникационни протоколи сред кооперативни мултиагентни популации и едновременно откриват появата на заземен човешки интерпретативен език в протоколите, разработени от агентите, научен без никакво човешко наблюдение! В тази статия, използвайки референтна игра между двама агенти като тестова база, ние представяме поредица от "отрицателни" резултати, кулминиращи в "положителен" - показвайки, че макар повечето изобретени от агентите езици да са ефективни (т.е. постигат почти перфектни награди за задачи), те определено не могат да бъдат тълкувани или композиционни. По същество, ние откриваме, че естественият език не се появява "естествено", въпреки приличащата на лекота на появата на естествения език, която човек може да събере от скорошната литература. Обсъждаме как е възможно изобретените езици да станат все по-човешки и композиционни чрез увеличаване на ограниченията върху начина, по който двама агенти могат да комуникират.', 'da': 'En række nylige værker har foreslået teknikker til end-to-end læring af kommunikationsprotokoller blandt samarbejdsvillige multi-agent populationer, og har samtidig fundet fremkomsten af grundlagt menneskeligt fortolkbart sprog i de protokoller, der er udviklet af agenterne, lært uden nogen menneskelig overvågning! I denne artikel, ved hjælp af et Task & Talk referencespil mellem to agenter som en testbed, præsenterer vi en række `negative\' resultater kulminerer i en `positiv\' - en - der viser, at mens de fleste agent-opfundede sprog er effektive (dvs opnå næsten perfekte opgave belønninger), er de bestemt ikke fortolkes eller kompositionelle. I det væsentlige finder vi, at naturligt sprog ikke fremkommer "naturligt", på trods af den tilsyneladende lethed af naturligt sprog-fremkomst, som man kan samle fra nyere litteratur. Vi diskuterer, hvordan det er muligt at få de opfundede sprog til at blive mere og mere menneskelige og kompositionelle ved at øge begrænsningerne på, hvordan to agenter kan kommunikere.', 'nl': "Een aantal recente werken heeft technieken voorgesteld voor end-to-end leren van communicatieprotocollen onder coöperatieve multi-agenten populaties, en tegelijkertijd de opkomst van gegronde mens-interpreteerbare taal in de protocollen ontwikkeld door de agenten, geleerd zonder enige menselijke supervisie! In dit artikel, met behulp van een Taak.Talk referentiespel tussen twee agenten als testbed, presenteren we een reeks van `negatieve' resultaten die culmineren in een `positieve' één punt waaruit blijkt dat hoewel de meeste door agenten uitgevonden talen effectief zijn (d.w.z. nagenoeg perfecte taakverdelingen behalen), ze beslist niet interpreteerbaar of compositioneel zijn. In wezen vinden we dat natuurlijke taal niet 'natuurlijk' tevoorschijn komt, ondanks de schijn van gemak van natuurlijke taal-opkomst die men uit recente literatuur kan halen. We bespreken hoe het mogelijk is om de uitgevonden talen te overtuigen om meer en meer menselijk en compositioneel te worden door toenemende beperkingen op hoe twee agenten kunnen communiceren.", 'hr': "Nekoliko nedavnih radova predložio je tehnike za učenje komunikacijskih protokola među multiagentnim populacijama saradnje i istovremeno su pronašli otkrivanje temeljnog ljudskog jezika u protokolima koje su razvili agenti, naučenim bez ljudskog nadzora! U ovom papiru, koristeći referentnu igru zadataka i razgovora između dva agent a kao testovanog kreveta, predstavljamo sekvenciju rezultata „negativnih“ koji se skupljaju u „pozitivnom” prvom - pokazujući da, iako su većina jezika izumljenih agenata učinkovita (tj. postizanje nagrade blizu savršenog zadataka), odlučno nisu interpretirani niti kompozicionalni. U suštini, smatramo da se prirodni jezik ne pojavljuje `prirodno',uprkos sličnosti lakosti prirodnog jezika, koji se može okupiti iz nedavne literature. Razgovaramo o tome kako je moguće trenirati izumljene jezike da postanu sve više slične ljudima i sastavljajući povećanjem ograničenja na način komunikacije dva agenta.", 'de': 'Eine Reihe neuerer Arbeiten haben Techniken für das Ende-zu-Ende-Lernen von Kommunikationsprotokollen unter kooperativen Multi-Agenten-Populationen vorgeschlagen und gleichzeitig die Entstehung einer geerdeten, vom Menschen interpretierbaren Sprache in den von den Agenten entwickelten Protokollen gefunden, die ohne menschliche Aufsicht gelernt wurden! In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unter Verwendung eines Task-Talk-Referenzspiels zwischen zwei Agenten eine Abfolge von "negativen" Ergebnissen vor, die in einem "positiven" Ergebnis gipfeln, das zeigt, dass die meisten von Agenten erfundenen Sprachen zwar effektiv sind (d.h. nahezu perfekte Aufgabenbelohnungen erzielen), aber entschieden nicht interpretierbar oder kompositorisch sind. Im Wesentlichen stellen wir fest, dass natürliche Sprache nicht "natürlich" entsteht, trotz des Scheins der Leichtigkeit der natürlichen Sprache-Entstehung, den man aus der neueren Literatur entnehmen kann. Wir diskutieren, wie es möglich ist, die erfundenen Sprachen dazu zu bringen, mehr und mehr menschlich und kompositorisch zu werden, indem die Beschränkungen, wie zwei Agenten kommunizieren dürfen, zunehmen.', 'ko': "최근의 일부 업무에서 다중지능체 협업 단체 간의 통신 프로토콜의 단말기부터 단말기까지 학습 기술을 제시했고 지능체 개발의 프로토콜에 뿌리내린 인류 해석 가능한 언어가 등장했다. 이런 언어는 인류의 감독 없이 학습한 것이다!본고에서 우리는 두 에이전트 간의 임무와 대화 참고 게임을 테스트 플랫폼으로 삼아 일련의'부정적'결과를 제시했고 최종적으로'긍정적'결과를 얻었다. 이것은 대부분의 에이전트 발명 언어가 효과적이지만(즉 완미에 가까운 임무 보상을 받는) 해석이나 조합이 불가능하다는 것을 보여준다.본질적으로 말하자면 우리는 자연언어가'자연'에 나타난 것이 아니라는 것을 발견했다. 비록 최근의 문헌에서 알 수 있듯이 자연언어는 쉽게 나타난 것 같다.우리는 두 대리인이 어떻게 통신을 하는지에 대한 제한을 늘려 발명된 언어를 점점 인성화되고 조합화하는지 토론했다.", 'fa': 'تعدادی از کارهای اخیر برای یادگیری پروتکل های ارتباطی در بین جمعیت های چند مامور همکاری پیشنهاد داده اند و همزمان اضطراری زبان قابل تعبیر انسان را در پروتکل های متخصص توسط ماموران یاد گرفته اند و بدون هیچ نظر انسان یاد گرفته اند! در این کاغذ، با استفاده از بازی مربوط به کار و صحبت بین دو مامور به عنوان یک تخت آزمایش، یک دسته نتیجه منفی را در یک «مثبت» نشان می دهیم، که در حالی که بیشتر زبان\u200cهای مأمور اختراع شده\u200cاند موثبت هستند (که به عنوان پاداش کاری نزدیک کامل رسیدن)، تصمیم گرفته\u200cایم که قابل تعبیر و ترکیب در اصل، ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که زبان طبیعی با وجود مشکل آسانی زبان طبیعی که می\u200cتواند از ادبیات اخیر جمع شود، «طبیعی» نمی\u200cشود. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که چگونه ممکن است زبان\u200cهای اختراع را آموزش دهیم که به وسیله افزایش محدودیت\u200cها بر چگونه دو مامور ارتباط داشته باشند، بیشتر و بیشتر بشوند.', 'sw': "Kazi kadhaa za hivi karibuni zimependekeza mbinu za kujifunza protoko za mawasiliano kwa mwisho wa mwisho miongoni mwa idadi ya shirika la watu wengi, na kwa wakati huo wamegundua kuongezeka kwa lugha yenye tafsiri ya binadamu katika mikataba zilizoundwa na maafisa, wanajifunza bila kufuatiliwa kwa binadamu! Katika karatasi hii, kwa kutumia mchezo wa kujieleza kazi na mazungumzo kati ya watumishi wawili kama mtihani, tunaonyesha mfululizo wa matokeo ya 'hasi' yanayohitimisha kwenye 'chanya' moja – kuonyesha kwamba wakati lugha nyingi zilizotengenezwa zina ufanisi (yaani kupata malipo ya kazi kamili), kwa hakika hawana ufafanuzi wala viunganishi. Kwa msingi, tunagundua kuwa lugha ya asili haitokea ‘asili’, licha ya mifano ya urahisi wa lugha ya asili ambayo mtu anaweza kukusanyika na fasihi ya hivi karibuni. We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.", 'tr': "Ýakyndaky bir näçe eserler, multi-agent milletler arasynda saz protokollaryny soňra-soňra öwrenmek üçin tekniklere tekniýetleşdirdi we bu gezek ajantlaryň tarapyndan gelinýän, ýüzünde hiç hili adam garaşsyz öwrenmedi! Bu kagyzda, iki ajaýyp arasyndaky Task & Gürüş Referans oýnuny teste edilen ýaly ulanyp, `negativ' bir netijede bolan ''pozitiv' bir topar getirilip başlaýarys -a ňsatçy ajaýyp görkezilen diller täsirli bolýandygyny görkez (meseläm, gowy görkezilen täsirlerden çykyp bilýän netijesini çykaryp bilmeýänler) we Adatça, tebigat dili ýakyn edebiýatdan ýygnap biljek ýaly bir adam 'tebigat dilinden' görünmez diýip pikir edýäris. Biz guýrat edilen dilleri nähili adam bilen habarlaşyp bilen gürrüňleýändigini gürrüňleýäris.", 'af': "'n Nommer van onlangse werke het voorgestel teknike vir die einde-tot-einde leer van kommunikasie protokolle onder kooperasielike multi-agent populasie, en het simultaan die uitbreiding van gegrondgebaseerde menslike-interpretabele taal gevind in die protokolle wat deur die agente ontwikkel is, geleer sonder enige menslike supervisie! In hierdie papier, gebruik 'n Opdrag en praat verwysing speletjie tussen twee agent e as 'n testbed, voorsien ons 'n volgorde van `negatiewe' resultate culminasie in' n `positiewe' een - vertoon dat terwyl die meeste agent- inventeerde tale effektief is (bv. naby- perfekte opdrag vergelde), hulle is besluit nie omtelbaar of compositioneel nie. In esensies vind ons dat natuurlike taal nie 'natuurlik' uitkom nie, alhoewel die voorskynlik van gemeenskap van natuurlike taal-uitbreiding wat een kan versamel van nuutste literaat. Ons bespreek hoe dit moontlik is om die opgemaakte tale te onderwerp om meer en meer menslike en gemeenskap te word deur die vergroot beperkinge oor hoe twee agente kan kommuniseer.", 'sq': "Një numër punësh të fundit kanë propozuar teknika për mësimin përfundimtar të protokolleve të komunikimit midis popullsive bashkëpunuese me shumë agjentë dhe kanë gjetur në të njëjtën kohë daljen e gjuhës njerëzore të interpretueshme në protokollet e zhvilluar nga agjentët, të mësuar pa ndonjë mbikqyrje njerëzore! Në këtë letër, duke përdorur një lojë reference Task & Talk midis dy agjentëve si një shtrat të testuar, ne paraqesim një sekuencë të rezultateve `negative' që kulminajnë në një `pozitiv' - duke treguar se ndërsa shumica e gjuhëve të shpikura nga agjenti janë efektive (pra arrijnë shpërblime gati perfekte për detyrën), ato janë vendimisht jo të interpretueshme apo kompozitive. Në thelb, gjejmë se gjuha natyrore nuk shfaqet 'natyralisht', pavarësisht nga dukja e lehtësisë së shfaqjes natyrore-gjuhësore që mund të mblidhet nga literatura e fundit. Ne diskutojmë se si është e mundur të trajnojmë gjuhët e shpikura që të bëhen gjithnjë e më njerëzore dhe kompozitive duke rritur kufizimet në mënyrën se si dy agjentë mund të komunikojnë.", 'am': "በቅርብ ዘመን የሚቆጠሩ ሥራ በመጨረሻ ለመጨረሻ የመንግግር ፕሮግራሞች በተካሄደው ብዙአዊ አካባቢዎች መካከል ለመማር የተዘጋጀ ስልጣናዎችን ያስተጋጅተዋል፡፡ በተጨማሪም በተቃዋሚዎች በፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ የሰው ቋንቋ የሚተረጉም ቋንቋን አግኝተዋል፡፡ In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of `negative' results culminating in a `positive' one - showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional.  በአዳም፣ የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ‹ፍጥረት› ሳይወጣ እናገኛለን፡፡ በሁለቱ ተሟጋቾች እንዴት እንዲገልጹ እና እንዴት እንደተፈጠሩ ቋንቋዎችን ማቀናቀል እና እንዴት እንዲበዛ እና እንዲበዛ እናውቃለን፡፡", 'hy': 'Շատ վերջին աշխատանքներ առաջարկեցին հաղորդակցման պրոտոկոլների վերջ-վերջ սովորելու մեթոդներ բազմագործող բնակչությունների միջև և միաժամանակ հայտնաբերեցին մարդկային լեզուների առաջացումը գործիչների կողմից զարգացած պրոտոկոլներում, սովորված առանց որևէ մարդկային վերահսկողության: In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of `negative\' results culminating in a `positive\' one - showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional.  Փաստորեն, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ բնական լեզուն "բնական" չի առաջանում, չնայած բնական լեզուների առաջացման հեշտությանը, որը կարելի է հավաքել վերջին գրականությունից: We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki işlər çoxlu-ağantlı nümunələr arasında birləşdirilən iletişim protokollarının sonu-sonu öyrənməsi üçün tekniklər təklif etdi və bir-birində ağantların təhsil edilmiş protokollarda insanların təfsil edilə bilən dillərin istifadəsini tapdılar, heç bir insan nəzarəti olmadan öyrənildilər! Bu kağızda, iki agent arasındakı bir Task & Talk referans oyunu testlər olaraq istifadə edirik, biz `positive\' sonuçlarında \'negatif\' sonuçlarını göstəririk - çox agent təşkil edilmiş dillərin faydalı olduğuna görə belə göstəririk. Əslində, təbiətli dil "təbiətli" deyildir, təbiətli dil təbiətindən çox asanlıqlarının bənzərinə baxmayaraq. Biz uydurduqları dilləri necə daha çox insan kimi və müxtəlif olmaq mümkün olduğunu müzakirə edirik, iki agent necə əlaqə edə bilər?', 'id': "Beberapa pekerjaan baru-baru ini telah mengusulkan teknik untuk belajar dari akhir ke akhir protokol komunikasi diantara populasi multiagen kooperatif, dan secara bersamaan menemukan muncul bahasa manusia-interpretable berdasarkan protokol yang dikembangkan oleh agen, belajar tanpa pengawasan manusia apapun! Dalam kertas in i, menggunakan permainan referensi Task & Talk antara dua agen sebagai tempat ujian, kami mempersembahkan urutan hasil `negatif' yang kulminasi dalam satu `positif' - menunjukkan bahwa sementara kebanyakan bahasa-bahasa yang diciptakan oleh agen efektif (i.e. mencapai hadiah tugas hampir sempurna), mereka pasti tidak dapat diterjemahkan atau komposisi. Pada dasarnya, kita menemukan bahasa alam tidak muncul 'secara alami', meskipun tampaknya mudah muncul bahasa alami yang dapat dikumpulkan dari literatur baru-baru ini. We discuss how it is possible to coax the invented languages to become more and more human-like and compositional by increasing restrictions on how two agents may communicate.", 'bn': "সাম্প্রতিক কাজের কিছু কাজ শেষ পর্যন্ত যোগাযোগ প্রোটোকলের শেষ পর্যন্ত শেখার প্রস্তাব প্রদান করেছে যারা সহযোগিতায় বহুজেন্ট জনসংখ্যার মধ্যে যোগাযোগ প্রোটোকল শেখার জন্য, এব In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of `negative' results culminating in a `positive' one - showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional.  প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা সাম্প্রতিক সাহিত্য থেকে একত্রিত হতে পারে সত্ত্বেও প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার সাম্প্রাকৃতিক সাহিত্যের সাম্প্রতিক সাহ আমরা আলোচনা করি কিভাবে আবিষ্কার ভাষাগুলোকে কোক্স করার সম্ভাবনা সম্ভব হবে যে দুই এজেন্ট কিভাবে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে তা বাড়তে পারে।", 'bs': "Nekoliko nedavnih radova predložio je tehnike za učenje komunikacijskih protokola među multiagentnim populacijama saradnje i istovremeno su pronašli otkrivanje temeljnog ljudskog jezika u protokolima koje su razvili agenti, naučenim bez ljudskog nadzora! U ovom papiru, koristeći referentnu igru zadataka i razgovora između dva agent a kao testovanog kreveta, predstavljamo sekvencu rezultata `negativnih' koji se klumiraju u `pozitivnom' prvom - pokazujući da, iako je većina jezika izumljenih agenata efikasna (tj. postizanje nagrade blizu savršenog zadataka), odlučno nisu interpretabilne ili kompozicionalne. U suštini, smatramo da se prirodni jezik ne pojavljuje `prirodno',uprkos izgledu lakosti prirodnog jezika-hitnog slučaja koji se može okupiti iz nedavne literature. Razgovaramo o tome kako je moguće trenirati izumljene jezike da postanu sve više ljudski i kompozicionalniji povećanjem ograničenja na način komunikacije dva agenta.", 'ca': "Una sèrie de treballs recents han proposat tècniques d'aprenentatge final a final de protocols de comunicació entre poblacions multiagentes cooperatives, i han descobert simultàneament l'aparició de llenguatge basat en l'interpretació humana en els protocols desenvolupats pels agents, aprenguts sense cap supervisió humana! En aquest article, utilitzant un joc de referència Task & Talk entre dos agents com a camí de prova, presentem una seqüència de resultats `negatius' culminant en un `positiv'- mostrant que mentre la majoria de llengües inventades per agents són eficaces (és a dir, aconseguir recompensas gairebé perfectes de les tasques), no són clarament interpretables ni composicionables. En essència, trobem que el llenguatge natural no apareix 'naturalment', malgrat la semblant d'una fàcil aparició de llenguatge natural que es pot recollir de la literatura recent. Discutem com és possible coaxionar les llengües inventades per esdevenir cada cop més humanes i composicioses incrementant les restriccions sobre com poden comunicar dos agents.", 'cs': 'Řada nedávných prací navrhla techniky pro komplexní učení komunikačních protokolů mezi kooperativními multiagentními populacemi a zároveň zjistila vznik zakotveného člověkem interpretovatelného jazyka v protokolech vyvinutých agenty, učeného bez lidského dohledu! V tomto článku, využívajícím referenční hru Task;Talk mezi dvěma agenty jako testovací lůžko, prezentujeme sekvenci "negativních" výsledků, které vyvrcholí v "pozitivním" bodu ukazujícím, že zatímco většina jazyků vynalezených agenty jsou efektivní (tj. dosahují téměř dokonalých odměn za úkoly), rozhodně nejsou interpretovatelné ani kompoziční. V podstatě zjišťujeme, že přirozený jazyk nevzniká "přirozeně", navzdory zdání snadného vzniku přirozeného jazyka, které lze shromáždit z nedávné literatury. Diskutujeme, jak je možné přesvědčit vynalezené jazyky k tomu, aby se staly čím dál více lidskými a kompozičními tím, že rostou omezení komunikace dvou agentů.', 'et': 'Mitmed hiljutised tööd on välja pakkunud meetodeid kommunikatsiooniprotokollide lõpp-lõpuni õppimiseks koostööd multiagentide populatsioonide hulgas ning samal ajal on leitud, et agentide väljatöötatud protokollides tekkis maapinnatud inimtõlgendatav keel, mida õppiti ilma inimese järelevalveta! Käesolevas töös, kasutades kahe agendi vahelist Task & Talk viitemängu testialusena, esitame negatiivsete tulemuste jada, mis kulmineeruvad positiivse tulemusega - näidates, et kuigi enamik agentide leiutatud keeli on tõhusad (st saavutavad peaaegu täiusliku ülesande preemia), ei ole need otsustavalt tõlgendatavad ega kompositsioonilised. Põhimõtteliselt leiame, et looduskeel ei ilmu "loomulikult", hoolimata looduskeele kergest esilekerkimisest, mida võib hiljutisest kirjandusest koguda. Arutleme, kuidas on võimalik leiutatud keeli veenda inimlikumaks ja kompositsioonilisemaks muutuma, suurendades piiranguid kahe agendi suhtlemisele.', 'fi': 'Useissa viimeaikaisissa teoksissa on ehdotettu tekniikoita kommunikaatioprotokollien päästä päähän oppimiseen yhteistyössä toimivien moniagenttipopulaatioiden keskuudessa, ja samanaikaisesti on havaittu maadoitetun ihmisen tulkittavan kielen ilmaantumista agenttien kehittämiin protokolliin, jotka on opittu ilman ihmisen valvontaa! Tässä artikkelissa, käyttäen Task & Talk referenssipeliä kahden agentin välillä testialustana, esittelemme sarjan negatiivisia tuloksia, jotka huipentuvat positiiviseen tulokseen - osoittaen, että vaikka useimmat agentin keksimät kielet ovat tehokkaita (eli saavuttavat lähes täydelliset tehtäväpalkinnot), niitä ei todellakaan voida tulkita tai säveltää. Pohjimmiltaan toteamme, että luonnollinen kieli ei synny "luonnollisesti", huolimatta siitä, että luonnollinen kieli ilmestyy helposti viimeaikaisesta kirjallisuudesta. Keskustelemme siitä, miten keksityt kielet voidaan houkutella muuttumaan yhä inhimillisemmiksi ja kompositiivisemmiksi lisäämällä rajoituksia siihen, miten kaksi agenttia voivat kommunikoida.', 'sk': 'Številna nedavna dela so predlagala tehnike za celostno učenje komunikacijskih protokolov med sodelovalnimi populacijami več agentov, hkrati pa so ugotovila pojav ozemljenega človeško razložljivega jezika v protokolih, ki so jih razvili agenti in se učili brez človeškega nadzora! V tem prispevku z uporabo referenčne igre Task & Talk med dvema agentoma kot testno ploščo predstavljamo zaporedje ‚negativnih\' rezultatov, ki dosegajo ‚pozitiven\' rezultat - ki dokazuje, da je večina agentov izumljenih jezikov učinkovitih (tj. dosegajo skoraj popolne nagrade za nalogo), vendar jih ni mogoče razlagati ali sestavljati. V bistvu ugotavljamo, da se naravni jezik ne pojavlja "naravno", kljub temu, da se lahko pojavi naravni jezik iz novejše literature. Razpravljamo o tem, kako je mogoče izumljene jezike prepričati, da postanejo vse bolj človeški in kompozicijski s povečanjem omejitev komunikacije dveh agentov.', 'he': 'מספר עבודות אחרונות הציעו טכניקות ללימודים מסוף לסוף של פרוטוקולים תקשורת בין אוכלוסיות שותפות במיוחד, ומצאו באותו הזמן את התפתחות של שפה מקורקמת אפשרית לפרשנות האנושית בפרוטוקולים שפותחים על ידי הסוכנים, ללמוד ללא שום פיקוח אנושי! In this paper, using a Task & Talk reference game between two agents as a testbed, we present a sequence of `negative\' results culminating in a `positive\' one - showing that while most agent-invented languages are effective (i.e. achieve near-perfect task rewards), they are decidedly not interpretable or compositional.  למעשה, אנו מוצאים שפה טבעית לא יוצאת "באופן טבעי", אנחנו מדברים על איך אפשרי לאמן את השפות הממצאות כדי להפוך יותר ויותר אנושיות ומרכיבות על ידי הגבלות על איך שני סוכנים יכולים לתקשר.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing nggawe teknik nggawe aturan kanggo ngerasah protokol komunikasi gampang populasan multi-ajan sing tambah nggawe, lan sampeyan ngono perbudhakan kanggo ngerasah adalah dumateng liyane karo hal-nganggo perbudhakan maneh karo protokol sing dibutuhi sak cara-saka sing perbudhakan kanggo ngerasah kuwi dia Nang pepulan iki, Ngawe nyimpen task < Talk\\@reference\\.Game> ning weapon sampeyan iki bakal kelas testing, awake dhéwé mengko kelas 'no dhéwé' sing berarti ning 'no dhéwé' sing berarti ning 'no dhéwé' sing berarti; Sicilik dianggawe barang awak dhéwé sing apik nyebuté (i.e. iso dianggap bijine-perusahaan task), padha biasane or a bisa ttenger Nanging sithik, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo sabanjuré, nganggo ngerasakno pangalan sing apik lan ijol-ijolan sing arep kuwi. Awak dhéwé pisan piye isakno kanggo ngerasakno luwih apik lan banjuré luwih dumadhi lan sampeyan wih-wih apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno iki apat.", 'ha': "Babu ƙidãya masu aikin da suka sani sun buɗa kungiyar ta ƙara zuwa-ƙari da aka sanar da shiryoyin ayukan wa mawasita a tsakanin mutane masu shirin tarayya, kuma suka sami sami suka gane kashi na lugha da fassarar mutane a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayukan da aka buɗe, da kuma aka sanar, ba da wani surilin mutum ba! A cikin wannan takarda, ana amfani da wani game da Reference na Tafiyar da Talk a tsakanin mataimaki biyu kamar wata jarraba, muna halatar da wata matsalar `negative' wanda ke ƙara cikin `wurin' na-gaba - sunã nuna cewa, kuma a lokacin da wasu harshen da aka ƙirƙira shi masu amfani da (misali, ka cika sakamakon aiki makusanciya), ba su zama mai fassarwa ba, kuma bã su sami. Ina bincike, za'a gane da harshen asiyya ba na fita `a'asa', kuma ingawa na mai sauƙi wa masu fassarar-harshen asili da wanda ya samu daga littafan nan na ƙara. Munã jãyayya a kan yadda za'a iya kodi harsunan da aka buɗe su zama masu ƙaranci da masu kama da mutum kuma samuranci da za'a ƙara tsari a kan yadda mutane biyu suke iya haɗi.", 'bo': 'nesen ལྟ་བུའི་རྩོལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མི་མང་ཆོས་མཐུན་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་མང་ཆོས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྔོན་འཆར་བརྗོད་བྱས་མྱོང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་གཅིག་ར ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ "Task & Talk"ལྟ་བུའི་རྩེད་དམོ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ལས་ བརྟག་དཔྱད་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་རྩེད་དམོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། དེ་ལྟར་ངེད་ཚོའི་རྨན་གཞི་ནས་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རྣམས་མཐོང་མི་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་ཡིན་མིན་འདུག་ལ་གསར་གཏོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Depression and Self-Harm Risk Assessment in Online Forums', 'ar': 'تقييم مخاطر الاكتئاب والأذى الذاتي في المنتديات على الإنترنت', 'pt': 'Avaliação de risco de depressão e automutilação em fóruns online', 'es': 'Evaluación del riesgo de depresión y autolesión en foros en línea', 'fr': "Évaluation des risques liés à la dépression et à l'automutilation dans", 'ja': 'オンラインフォーラムにおける抑うつと自傷行為のリスク評価', 'zh': '在线论坛中抑郁,自伤风险', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन मंचों में अवसाद और आत्म-हानि जोखिम मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Оценка риска депрессии и членовредительства на онлайн-форумах', 'ga': 'Measúnú Riosca ar Dhúlagar agus Féindochar i bhFóraim Ar Líne', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση κινδύνου κατάθλιψης και αυτοτραυματισμού σε διαδικτυακά φόρουμ', 'ka': 'დეპპრესია და თავისუფალური რისკის აღმოჩენა ხალხური ფორმებში', 'hu': 'Depresszió és önkáros kockázatértékelés online fórumokon', 'kk': 'Онлайн форумында депрессия және өзінің қарсы оценкасы', 'it': 'Valutazione del rischio di depressione e autodanno nei forum online', 'lt': 'Depresijos ir savižalos rizikos vertinimas internetiniuose forumuose', 'mk': 'Депресија и самоштетна проценка на ризикот во онлајн форумите', 'ms': 'Pemeriksaan Risiko Depresi dan Kerosakan Sendiri dalam Forum Online', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോറമുകളില്\u200d ഡിപ്രഷനും സ്വയം ഹാര്\u200dമ് റിസ്ക് വിശ്വസിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Id-Depressjoni u l-Valutazzjoni tar-Riskju għall-Ħsara Awta f’Forums Online', 'mn': 'Онлайн форум дээрх сэтгэл хөдлөл, өөрсдийгөө халдвар эрсдэлийн оценка', 'no': 'Depresjon og selvHarm-risikovurdering i nettforum', 'pl': 'Ocena ryzyka depresji i samooszkody na forach online', 'ro': 'Evaluarea riscului de depresie și auto-vătămare în forumurile online', 'si': 'අන්ලයාන් ෆෝරුම්ස් වල ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය අවශ්\u200dයය', 'so': 'Depression and Self-Harm Risk Assessment in Online Forums', 'sv': 'Riskbedömning för depression och självskadlighet i onlineforum', 'sr': 'Depresija i procjena rizika za samohranu u internetskim forumima', 'ur': 'اولاین فورموں میں دھوپ اور خود-Harm Risk Assessment', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Suy thoái và đánh giá rủi ro tự hại trên mạng', 'bg': 'Оценка на риска от депресия и самонараняване в онлайн форуми', 'da': 'Risikovurdering af depression og selvskader i online fora', 'nl': 'Depressie en zelfschade risicobeoordeling in online forums', 'de': 'Depressions- und Selbstschaden-Risikobewertung in Online-Foren', 'id': 'Depresi dan penilaian risiko kerusakan diri di Forum Online', 'ko': '온라인 포럼에서의 우울과 자기상해 위험 평가', 'fa': 'افسردگی و ارزیابی خطر خودکشی در فورمهای آنلاین', 'sw': 'Tathmini ya hatari ya kushindwa na kujitegemea katika Jukwaa la Mtandaoni', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Forumlarda Depressiýa we Öz-Harm Risk Assessmi', 'af': 'Depresie en Self-Harm Risk Assensie in Online Forums', 'sq': 'Depression and Self-Harm Risk Assessment in Online Forums', 'am': 'የድምፅ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Դեպրեսիան և ինքնավնաս վնասվածքի գնահատումը առցանց ֆորումներում', 'az': 'Online Forumlarƒ±nda Depresiya v…ô √ñz-Harm Risk Assess…ôsi', 'hr': 'Depresija i procjena rizika za sebi u internetskim forumima', 'bn': 'অনলাইন ফোরামে ডিমেন্ট এবং স্বার্থহার্মের রাস্তা বিজয়', 'bs': 'Depresija i procjena rizika za samohranu u internetskim forumima', 'ca': "La depressió i l'auto-avaluació del risc en foros on-line", 'cs': 'Hodnocení rizik deprese a sebepoškození v online fórech', 'et': 'Depressiooni ja enesehahjustuse riskihindamine online foorumites', 'fi': 'Masennus- ja itsevahinkoriskien arviointi online-foorumeilla', 'jv': 'depresyon karo Self-harm Risik assessment nang online forumen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'דיכאון וערכת הסיכון לפגיעה עצמית בפורומים באינטרנט', 'sk': 'Ocena tveganja depresije in samoškode v spletnih forumih', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱའི་མཉམ་སྡོམས་ནང་སྡོར་བ་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར་བསམ།'}
{'en': 'Users suffering from mental health conditions often turn to online resources for support, including specialized online support communities or general communities such as Twitter and Reddit. In this work, we present a framework for supporting and studying users in both types of communities. We propose methods for identifying posts in support communities that may indicate a risk of self-harm, and demonstrate that our approach outperforms strong previously proposed methods for identifying such posts. Self-harm is closely related to depression, which makes identifying depressed users on general forums a crucial related task. We introduce a large-scale general forum dataset consisting of users with self-reported depression diagnoses matched with control users. We show how our method can be applied to effectively identify depressed users from their use of language alone. We demonstrate that our method outperforms strong baselines on this general forum dataset.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يلجأ المستخدمون الذين يعانون من حالات الصحة العقلية إلى الموارد عبر الإنترنت للحصول على الدعم ، بما في ذلك مجتمعات الدعم المتخصصة عبر الإنترنت أو المجتمعات العامة مثل Twitter و Reddit. في هذا العمل ، نقدم إطار عمل لدعم ودراسة المستخدمين في كلا النوعين من المجتمعات. نقترح طرقًا لتحديد المشاركات في مجتمعات الدعم التي قد تشير إلى خطر إلحاق الأذى بالنفس ، ونوضح أن نهجنا يتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب القوية المقترحة سابقًا لتحديد مثل هذه المنشورات. يرتبط إيذاء النفس ارتباطًا وثيقًا بالاكتئاب ، مما يجعل تحديد المستخدمين المكتئبين في المنتديات العامة مهمة حاسمة ذات صلة. نقدم مجموعة بيانات عامة واسعة النطاق للمنتدى تتكون من مستخدمين لديهم تشخيص اكتئاب تم الإبلاغ عنه ذاتيًا ومطابقًا لمستخدمي المجموعة الضابطة. نوضح كيف يمكن تطبيق طريقتنا لتحديد المستخدمين المكتئبين بشكل فعال من خلال استخدامهم للغة وحدها. نثبت أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس القوية في مجموعة بيانات المنتدى العامة هذه.', 'pt': 'Os usuários que sofrem de problemas de saúde mental geralmente recorrem a recursos on-line para obter suporte, incluindo comunidades especializadas de suporte on-line ou comunidades gerais, como Twitter e Reddit. Neste trabalho, apresentamos um framework para apoiar e estudar usuários em ambos os tipos de comunidades. Propomos métodos para identificar postagens em comunidades de apoio que podem indicar um risco de automutilação e demonstramos que nossa abordagem supera os métodos previamente propostos para identificar tais postagens. A automutilação está intimamente relacionada à depressão, o que torna a identificação de usuários deprimidos em fóruns gerais uma tarefa crucial relacionada. Apresentamos um conjunto de dados de fórum geral em grande escala composto por usuários com diagnósticos de depressão autorrelatados combinados com usuários de controle. Mostramos como nosso método pode ser aplicado para identificar efetivamente usuários deprimidos apenas pelo uso da linguagem. Demonstramos que nosso método supera as linhas de base fortes neste conjunto de dados geral do fórum.', 'fr': "Les utilisateurs souffrant de problèmes de santé mentale se tournent souvent vers des ressources en ligne pour obtenir de l'aide, notamment des communautés de soutien en ligne spécialisées ou des communautés générales telles que Twitter et Reddit. Dans ce travail, nous présentons un cadre pour soutenir et étudier les utilisateurs des deux types de communautés. Nous proposons des méthodes pour identifier les postes dans les communautés de soutien qui peuvent indiquer un risque d'automutilation, et nous démontrons que notre approche surpasse les méthodes avancées précédemment proposées pour identifier de tels postes. L'automutilation est étroitement liée à la dépression, ce qui fait de l'identification des utilisateurs déprimés sur les forums généraux une tâche connexe cruciale. Nous introduisons un ensemble de données de forum général à grande échelle composé d'utilisateurs ayant des diagnostics de dépression autodéclarés et jumelés à des utilisateurs témoins. Nous montrons comment notre méthode peut être appliquée pour identifier efficacement les utilisateurs déprimés à partir de leur seule utilisation de la langue. Nous démontrons que notre méthode surpasse les bases solides de cet ensemble de données de forum général.", 'es': 'Los usuarios que sufren problemas de salud mental a menudo recurren a recursos en línea para obtener apoyo, incluidas comunidades de apoyo en línea especializadas o comunidades generales como Twitter y Reddit. En este trabajo, presentamos un marco para apoyar y estudiar a los usuarios en ambos tipos de comunidades. Proponemos métodos para identificar puestos en las comunidades de apoyo que puedan indicar un riesgo de autolesión, y demostramos que nuestro enfoque supera los sólidos métodos propuestos anteriormente para identificar dichos puestos. La autolesión está estrechamente relacionada con la depresión, lo que hace que identificar a los usuarios deprimidos en los foros generales sea una tarea relacionada crucial. Presentamos un conjunto de datos de foros generales a gran escala que consiste en usuarios con diagnósticos de depresión autoinformados emparejados con usuarios de control. Mostramos cómo se puede aplicar nuestro método para identificar eficazmente a los usuarios deprimidos solo por su uso del idioma. Demostramos que nuestro método supera las sólidas líneas de base de este conjunto de datos del foro general.', 'ja': 'メンタルヘルスに苦しむユーザーは、専門的なオンラインサポートコミュニティ、またはTwitterやRedditなどの一般的なコミュニティを含む、サポートのためのオンラインリソースにしばしば目を向けます。この研究では、両方のタイプのコミュニティのユーザーをサポートし、研究するためのフレームワークを提示します。私たちは、自傷行為のリスクを示す可能性のあるサポートコミュニティのポストを特定する方法を提案し、私たちのアプローチが、そのようなポストを特定するために以前に提案された強力な方法よりも優れていることを実証します。自傷行為はうつ病と密接に関連しており、一般的なフォーラムでうつ病のユーザーを特定することが重要な関連タスクとなっています。コントロールユーザーとマッチングしたうつ病診断を自己報告したユーザーからなる大規模な一般フォーラムデータセットをご紹介します。私たちは、言語の使用だけからうつ状態のユーザーを効果的に識別するために、どのように私たちの方法を適用できるかを示します。この一般的なフォーラムデータセットでは、メソッドが強力なベースラインを上回ることを実証しています。', 'hi': 'मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों से पीड़ित उपयोगकर्ता अक्सर समर्थन के लिए ऑनलाइन संसाधनों की ओर रुख करते हैं, जिसमें विशेष ऑनलाइन समर्थन समुदाय या सामान्य समुदाय जैसे ट्विटर और रेडिट शामिल हैं। इस काम में, हम दोनों प्रकार के समुदायों में उपयोगकर्ताओं का समर्थन करने और उनका अध्ययन करने के लिए एक रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम समर्थन समुदायों में पदों की पहचान करने के तरीकों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो आत्म-नुकसान के जोखिम का संकेत दे सकते हैं, और प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण इस तरह के पदों की पहचान करने के लिए मजबूत पहले से प्रस्तावित तरीकों को बेहतर बनाता है। आत्म-हानि अवसाद से निकटता से संबंधित है, जो सामान्य मंचों पर उदास उपयोगकर्ताओं की पहचान करना एक महत्वपूर्ण संबंधित कार्य बनाता है। हम एक बड़े पैमाने पर सामान्य मंच डेटासेट पेश करते हैं जिसमें नियंत्रण उपयोगकर्ताओं के साथ मिलान किए गए आत्म-रिपोर्ट किए गए अवसाद निदान वाले उपयोगकर्ता शामिल हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि अकेले भाषा के उपयोग से उदास उपयोगकर्ताओं की प्रभावी ढंग से पहचान करने के लिए हमारी विधि को कैसे लागू किया जा सकता है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारी विधि इस सामान्य मंच डेटासेट पर मजबूत बेसलाइन को मात देती है।', 'zh': '有心健康状况者用户常转在线资源求助,专在线持社区或Twitter与Reddit等社区。 于是建一框架,以赞社区用户。 吾言知社区之中,可以明自伤之帖,而明吾术之优于先知之强也。 自伤与抑郁症相关,是使论坛知抑郁之用户为至重也。 引入大通论坛数集,当数集由自言抑郁症诊用户与对照组用户相匹。 吾示以法识抑郁之用户,惟其言用。 余证此通用论坛数据集上优于强基线。', 'ru': 'Пользователи, страдающие психическими расстройствами, часто обращаются за поддержкой к онлайн-ресурсам, включая специализированные онлайн-сообщества поддержки или общие сообщества, такие как Twitter и Reddit. В этой работе мы представляем структуру для поддержки и изучения пользователей в обоих типах сообществ. Мы предлагаем методы выявления должностей в сообществах поддержки, которые могут указывать на риск причинения себе вреда, и демонстрируем, что наш подход превосходит сильные ранее предложенные методы выявления таких должностей. Самоповреждение тесно связано с депрессией, что делает выявление депрессивных пользователей на общих форумах важной связанной с этим задачей. Представляем масштабный датасет общего форума, состоящий из пользователей с саморегистрирующимися диагнозами депрессии, сопоставленными с контрольными пользователями. Мы показываем, как наш метод может быть применен, чтобы эффективно идентифицировать депрессивных пользователей от их использования языка в одиночку. Мы демонстрируем, что наш метод превосходит сильные базовые линии в этом наборе данных общего форума.', 'ga': 'Is minic a chasann úsáideoirí a bhfuil riochtaí meabhairshláinte orthu chuig acmhainní ar líne le haghaidh tacaíochta, lena n-áirítear sainphobail tacaíochta ar líne nó pobail ghinearálta ar nós Twitter agus Reddit. San obair seo, cuirimid creat i láthair chun tacú le húsáideoirí agus staidéar a dhéanamh orthu sa dá chineál pobail. Molaimid modhanna chun poist a aithint i bpobail tacaíochta a d’fhéadfadh riosca féindochair a léiriú, agus léirímid go sáraíonn ár gcur chuige na modhanna láidre a moladh roimhe seo chun poist dá leithéid a aithint. Tá dlúthbhaint ag féindochar le dúlagar, rud a fhágann gur tasc ríthábhachtach gaolmhar é úsáideoirí depressed a aithint ar fhóraim ghinearálta. Tugaimid isteach tacar sonraí fóram ginearálta ar scála mór ar a mbeidh úsáideoirí a bhfuil diagnóisí dúlagar féintuairiscithe acu atá meaitseáilte le húsáideoirí rialaithe. Léirímid conas is féidir ár modh a chur i bhfeidhm chun úsáideoirí depressed a aithint go héifeachtach ón úsáid a bhaineann siad as teanga amháin. Léirímid go sáraíonn ár modh bonnlínte láidre ar an tacar sonraí ginearálta fóraim seo.', 'el': 'Οι χρήστες που πάσχουν από ψυχικές παθήσεις συχνά στρέφονται σε διαδικτυακούς πόρους για υποστήριξη, συμπεριλαμβανομένων εξειδικευμένων διαδικτυακών κοινοτήτων υποστήριξης ή γενικών κοινοτήτων όπως το Twitter και το Reddit. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την υποστήριξη και τη μελέτη των χρηστών και των δύο τύπων κοινοτήτων. Προτείνουμε μεθόδους για τον εντοπισμό θέσεων σε κοινότητες υποστήριξης που μπορεί να υποδηλώνουν κίνδυνο αυτοτραυματισμού και αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά τις ισχυρές μεθόδους που πρότειναν προηγουμένως για τον προσδιορισμό τέτοιων θέσεων. Η αυτοβλάβη σχετίζεται στενά με την κατάθλιψη, γεγονός που καθιστά τον εντοπισμό των καταθλιπτικών χρηστών σε γενικά φόρουμ ένα κρίσιμο σχετικό έργο. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα ευρείας κλίμακας γενικό σύνολο δεδομένων φόρουμ που αποτελείται από χρήστες με αυτοαναφερθείσες διαγνώσεις κατάθλιψης που αντιστοιχούν σε χρήστες ελέγχου. Δείχνουμε πώς η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί για να εντοπίσει αποτελεσματικά τους καταθλιπτικούς χρήστες μόνο από τη χρήση της γλώσσας τους. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις ισχυρές βάσεις σε αυτό το γενικό σύνολο δεδομένων φόρουμ.', 'hu': 'A mentális egészségügyi állapotban szenvedő felhasználók gyakran online forrásokhoz fordulnak támogatásra, beleértve a speciális online támogató közösségeket vagy általános közösségeket, mint például a Twitter és a Reddit. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk a felhasználók támogatására és tanulmányozására szolgáló keretet mindkét típusú közösségben. Javasoljuk a támogató közösségekben lévő állások azonosítására irányuló módszereket, amelyek önkárosítás kockázatát jelezhetik, és bizonyítjuk, hogy megközelítésünk túllép az ilyen állások azonosítására korábban javasolt erős módszereket. Az önkárosodás szorosan kapcsolódik a depresszióhoz, ami a depressziós felhasználók azonosítása általános fórumokon kulcsfontosságú kapcsolódó feladat. Bemutatunk egy nagyszabású általános fórum adatkészletet, amely a kontrollfelhasználókkal párosított depressziós diagnózisú felhasználókból áll. Megmutatjuk, hogyan alkalmazható módszerünk a depressziós felhasználók hatékony azonosítására kizárólag a nyelvhasználat alapján. Bemutatjuk, hogy módszerünk ezen általános fórum adatkészleten meghaladja az erős alapvető értékeket.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი, რომლებიც ფექციალური სიცოცხლეების შესახებ, ზოგიერთად ინტერნეტის რესურსების შესახებ, სპეციალურად ინტერნეტიური საზოგადოება ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ვიყვანეთ სამუშაო სამუშაო და სწავლებელი ორივე ტიპის საზოგადოებში. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ განვიცნოთ პროცემები საზოგადოებო საზოგადოებაში, რომელიც შეიძლია განვიცნოთ საზოგადოებაში, რომელიც შეგვიძლია განვიცნოთ საზოგადოებო რისკი და გამოჩვენ სოფლიო დაკავშირება დეპრესციისთვის ძალიან დაკავშირებულია, რაც დეპრესტის გამოყენებელების განსაზღვრება საერთო ფორმულში გასაკეთებელი დავალება. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ დიდი განსაზღვრებული გულისხმები ტორმის მონაცემები, რომელიც მომხმარებელი თავიდან გამოიყენებული ევპრესიის დიაგონგიებით, რომელიც კონტრო ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორ ჩვენი მეტი შეიძლება ეფექტიურად განვიცნოთ ევპრესირებული მომხმარებელი მხოლოდ ენის გამოყენებიდან. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო ძალიან ბაზი ხაზები ამ საერთო ფორმის მონაცემების სეტში.', 'it': "Gli utenti che soffrono di condizioni di salute mentale spesso si rivolgono a risorse online per il supporto, incluse comunità specializzate di supporto online o comunità generali come Twitter e Reddit. In questo lavoro, presentiamo un framework per supportare e studiare gli utenti in entrambi i tipi di comunità. Proponiamo metodi per identificare i post nelle comunità di supporto che possono indicare un rischio di autolesionismo, e dimostriamo che il nostro approccio supera i forti metodi precedentemente proposti per identificare tali post. L'autolesionismo è strettamente correlato alla depressione, il che rende l'identificazione degli utenti depressi sui forum generali un compito correlato cruciale. Introducemo un set di dati generali su larga scala del forum composto da utenti con diagnosi di depressione auto-segnalate abbinate agli utenti di controllo. Mostriamo come il nostro metodo può essere applicato per identificare efficacemente gli utenti depressi dal solo uso del linguaggio. Dimostriamo che il nostro metodo supera le solide linee di base su questo set di dati generali del forum.", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушылар психикалық саулық шарттарынан көбірек онлайн ресурстар қолдау үшін, онлайн қолдау көмегімен, Twitter және Reddit секілді онлайн қолдау көмегімен, жалпы қоғамд Бұл жұмыста, қолдау және оқу үшін пайдаланушылардың екі түрлерінде қолдау және оқу бағдарламасын таңдаймыз. Біз өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің қауіпсіздігін көрсету мүмкіндігін қолдау көмектесетін жарлықтарды анықтау әдістерін таңдаймыз. Бұл жарлықтарды анықтау әдістерін өткізу ү Өзіңіздің қауіпсіздігі депрессиясымен жақын байланысты, бұл депрессия пайдаланушыларды жалпы форумдарда анықтау үшін маңызды тапсырма болады. Біз басқару пайдаланушылармен сәйкес келетін депрессия диагностикаларының құрамындағы үлкен масштабтағы жалпы форум деректер жиынын келтіреміз. Біз біздің әдімімізді тілдерінің қолдануындағы депрессиялық пайдаланушыларды жалғыз анықтау үшін қалай қолдануға болады деп көрсетедік. Біз әдіміздің тәсіліміміз бұл жалпы форум деректер жиынында күшті негізгі сызықтарды орындайды деп көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Pengguna yang mengalami keadaan kesehatan mental sering berubah kepada sumber online untuk sokongan, termasuk komuniti sokongan online khusus atau komuniti umum seperti Twitter dan Reddit. Dalam kerja ini, kami mempersembahkan kerangka untuk menyokong dan mempelajari pengguna di kedua-dua jenis komuniti. Kami mencadangkan kaedah untuk mengenalpasti pos dalam komuniti sokongan yang mungkin menunjukkan risiko kerosakan diri, dan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita melampaui kaedah yang telah dicadangkan sebelumnya kuat untuk mengenalpasti pos seperti itu. Kerosakan diri terkait dengan depresi, yang membuat pengenalan pengguna depresi di forum umum tugas terkait penting. Kami memperkenalkan set data forum umum skala besar yang terdiri daripada pengguna dengan diagnosis depresi yang dilaporkan sendiri yang sepadan dengan pengguna kawalan. Kita tunjukkan bagaimana cara kita boleh dilaksanakan untuk mengenalpasti pengguna tertekan secara efektif dari penggunaan bahasa mereka sahaja. We demonstrate that our method outperforms strong baselines on this general forum dataset.', 'lt': 'Naudotojai, kenčiantys nuo psichikos sveikatos sąlygų, dažnai kreipiasi į paramos internetu išteklius, įskaitant specializuotas paramos internete bendruomenes arba bendras bendruomenes, pvz., Twitter ir Reddit. Šiame darbe siūlome abiejų tipų bendruomenių naudotojų rėmimo ir tyrimo sistemą. Siūlome būdus, kaip nustatyti paramos bendruomenių pareigas, galinčias rodyti savižalos riziką, ir įrodome, kad mūsų požiūris viršija anksčiau pasiūlytus griežtus tokių pareigų nustatymo metodus. Savižala glaudžiai susijusi su depresija, dėl kurios pagrindinis uždavinys yra nustatyti depresijos vartotojus visuotiniuose forumuose. Įdiegiame plataus masto bendrą forumo duomenų rinkinį, kurį sudaro naudotojai, kuriems diagnozuojama depresija, atitinkanti kontrolės naudotojus. Mes parodome, kaip mūsų metodas gali būti taikomas veiksmingai nustatyti deprimiuotus vartotojus vien tik naudojant kalbą. Mes parodome, kad mūsų metodas yra didesnis už tvirtas šio bendrojo forumo duomenų rinkinio bazes.', 'ml': 'മാനസിക സ്വാഭാവികാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളിലേക്ക് തിരി ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, രണ്ടു തരം സമൂഹത്തിലും ഉപയോക്താക്കളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുകയും പഠിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു ഫ്ര പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന സമൂഹത്തിലെ പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് സ്വയം നഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്ത ആത്മാവിന്റെ ദ്രോഹം വിപത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് പൊതുവായ ഫോറമുകളില്\u200d വിഷമിച്ച ഉപയോക്താക നിയന്ത്രണ ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ കൂടെ സ്വയം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിപ്പിടിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡേപ്രഷന്\u200d ഡിയോഗിനുകളുടെ കൂടെയുള്ള ഒരു വലിയ സ നമ്മുടെ രീതി എങ്ങനെയാണ് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് അവരുടെ ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും  നമ്മുടെ രീതി ഈ ജനറല്\u200d ഫോറമിലെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്', 'mt': 'L-utenti li jbatu minn kundizzjonijiet tas-saħħa mentali spiss jirrikorru għal riżorsi onlajn għall-appoġġ, inklużi komunitajiet speċjalizzati ta’ appoġġ onlajn jew komunitajiet ġenerali bħal Twitter u Reddit. F’dan ix-xogħol, nippreżentaw qafas għall-appoġġ u l-istudju tal-utenti fiż-żewġ tipi ta’ komunitajiet. Aħna nipproponu metodi għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ postijiet fil-komunitajiet ta’ appoġġ li jistgħu jindikaw riskju ta’ ħsara lilna nnifisha, u nippruvaw li l-approċċ tagħna huwa akbar minn metodi qawwija proposti qabel għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ postijiet bħal dawn. Il-ħsara lill-persuna nnifisha hija relatata mill-qrib mad-depressjoni, li tagħmel l-identifikazzjoni ta’ utenti depressi f’fora ġenerali kompitu kruċjali relatat. We introduce a large-scale general forum dataset consisting of users with self-reported depression diagnoses matched with control users.  We show how our method can be applied to effectively identify depressed users from their use of language alone.  Aħna nuru li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż il-linji bażi b’saħħithom fuq dan is-sett ta’ dejta tal-forum ġenerali.', 'mk': 'Users suffering from mental health conditions often turn to online resources for support, including specialized online support communities or general communities such as Twitter and Reddit.  Во оваа работа претставуваме рамка за поддршка и студирање на корисниците во двата вида заедници. Предложуваме методи за идентификување на места во заедниците за поддршка кои може да покажат ризик за самоштета и да покажеме дека нашиот пристап е поголем од силните претходно предложени методи за идентификување на вакви места. Самоштетата е тесно поврзана со депресијата, што го прави идентификувањето на депресивните корисници на генералните форуми клучна задача поврзана со тоа. Ние воведуваме голем генерален групен форум податоци кој се состои од корисници со дијагнози за депресија кои се согласуваат со контролните корисници. Ние покажуваме како нашиот метод може да се примени за ефикасно идентификување на депресивните корисници само од нивното употребување на јазик. Демонстрираме дека нашиот метод ги надминува силните основни линии на овој генерален форум податоци.', 'no': 'Brukarar som går frå mentale helseforhold ofte blir tilkopla til nettressursar for støtte, inkludert spesialiserte nettstøtte-fellesskap eller generelle fellesskap som Twitter og Reddit. I dette arbeidet presenterer vi eit rammeverk for å støtta og studera brukarar i begge typar samfunn. Vi foreslår metodar for å identifisera postar i støtte samfunn som kan indisera ein risiko for selvskade, og demonstrar at tilnærminga vårt utfører sterke førehandsviste metodar for å identifisera slike postar. Sjølvskade er nærare relatert til depresjon, som gjer å identifisera depreserte brukarar på generelle forum ein viktig relatert oppgåve. Vi introduserer ein stor generell forum- dataset som inneheld av brukarar med avskrivingsdiagnoser som passar med kontrollprogrammer. Vi viser korleis metoden vårt kan brukast for å identifisera depreserte brukarar frå bruken av språk alene. Vi demonstrerer at metoden vårt utfører sterke baselinjer på denne generelle forumsdatasettet.', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчид сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөл байдлаас зовж байгаа хүмүүс ихэвчлэн онлайн нөхцөлд дэмжих боломжтой болдог. Твиттер болон Редит зэрэг онлайн дэм Энэ ажил дээр бид хоёр төрлийн нийгмийн хэрэглэгчийг дэмжиж, судалж болох системийг олгодог. Бид өөрсдийгөө хохирох эрсдэлийг илэрхийлж чадах нийгмийн тусламжтайгаа тайлбарлах арга замыг санал болгож, бидний арга зам нь өмнө нь ийм захирагдлыг тайлбарлах эрсдэлтэй арга замыг илэрхийлж чадна. Өөрийгөө хохирох нь депрессионтай холбоотой. Энэ нь ерөнхий форум дээр депрессионы хэрэглэгчийг тодорхойлох нь чухал ажил юм. Бид маш том хэмжээний ерөнхий форумын өгөгдлийн санг удирдах хэрэглэгчидтэй холбогдож байгаа хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэрэглэгчидтэй холбогдож байна. Бид өөрсдийн арга хэрхэн хэлний хэрэглэгчийг ганцаараа хэлний хэрэглэгчдийг эффективно тодорхойлдохын тулд хэрэглэгдэж болох вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний арга нь энэ ерөнхий форумын өгөгдлийн санд хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Utilizatorii care suferă de afecțiuni de sănătate mintală apelează adesea la resurse online pentru sprijin, inclusiv comunități specializate de sprijin online sau comunități generale, cum ar fi Twitter și Reddit. În această lucrare, prezentăm un cadru pentru sprijinirea și studierea utilizatorilor din ambele tipuri de comunități. Propunem metode de identificare a posturilor în comunitățile de sprijin care pot indica un risc de auto-vătămare și demonstrăm că abordarea noastră depășește metodele puternice propuse anterior pentru identificarea acestor posturi. Autovătămarea este strâns legată de depresie, ceea ce face identificarea utilizatorilor deprimați pe forumurile generale o sarcină conexă crucială. Introducem un set de date general pe scară largă, format din utilizatori cu diagnostice de depresie auto-raportate, potrivite cu utilizatorii de control. Vă arătăm cum metoda noastră poate fi aplicată pentru a identifica eficient utilizatorii deprimați doar prin utilizarea limbajului. Demonstrăm că metoda noastră depășește liniile de bază puternice pe acest set de date general al forumului.', 'pl': 'Użytkownicy cierpiący na choroby psychiczne często zwracają się do zasobów internetowych, w tym do specjalistycznych społeczności wsparcia online lub ogólnych społeczności, takich jak Twitter i Reddit. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy ramy wspierania i badania użytkowników w obu typach społeczności. Proponujemy metody identyfikacji postów w społecznościach wsparcia, które mogą wskazywać na ryzyko samooszkody, oraz wykazujemy, że nasze podejście przewyższa silne wcześniej proponowane metody identyfikacji takich postów. Samooszkodzenie jest ściśle związane z depresją, co sprawia, że identyfikacja depresyjnych użytkowników na ogólnych forach jest kluczowym zadaniem powiązanym. Przedstawiamy duży ogólny zestaw danych forum składający się z użytkowników z samodzielnie zgłaszanymi diagnozami depresji dopasowanych do użytkowników kontrolnych. Pokazujemy, w jaki sposób można zastosować naszą metodę, aby skutecznie identyfikować depresyjnych użytkowników wyłącznie z ich używania języka. Pokazujemy, że nasza metoda przewyższa silne linie bazowe na tym ogólnym zbiorze danych forum.', 'sr': 'Korisnici koji pate od stanja mentalnog zdravlja često se okreću na internet resurse za podršku, uključujući specijalizovane zajednice za internet podršku ili generalne zajednice poput Twitter i Reddit. U ovom poslu predstavljamo okvir za podršku i proučavanje korisnika u obje vrste zajednica. Predlažemo metode za identifikaciju postova u zajednicama podrške koji mogu ukazati na rizik od samoubistva i pokazati da naš pristup iznosi jake prethodno predložene metode za identifikaciju takvih postova. Samoubojstvo je u blizini povezano sa depresijom, što čini identifikaciju depresivnih korisnika na općim forumima ključnom povezanom zadatku. Upoznajemo veliku opciju podataka za forum koji se sastoji od korisnika sa dijagnozom depresije koji odgovara korisnicima kontrole. Pokazujemo kako se naš metod može primjenjivati da se efikasno identifikuje depresivni korisnici sa njihovog korištenja jezika. Pokazujemo da naša metoda iznosi jake osnovne linije na ovom generalnom setu podataka za forum.', 'sv': 'Användare som lider av psykisk ohälsa vänder sig ofta till onlineresurser för stöd, inklusive specialiserade onlinesupportgrupper eller allmänna grupper som Twitter och Reddit. I detta arbete presenterar vi en ram för att stödja och studera användare i båda typerna av samhällen. Vi föreslår metoder för att identifiera inlägg i stödgrupper som kan indikera en risk för självskada, och visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar starka tidigare föreslagna metoder för att identifiera sådana inlägg. Självskada är nära relaterad till depression, vilket gör att identifiera deprimerade användare på allmänna forum en viktig relaterad uppgift. Vi introducerar en storskalig generell forumdatauppsättning bestående av användare med självrapporterade depressionsdiagnoser matchade med kontrollanvändare. Vi visar hur vår metod kan tillämpas för att effektivt identifiera deprimerade användare från deras språkanvändning. Vi visar att vår metod överträffar starka baslinjer på denna generella forumdatauppsättning.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ මානසික ස්වාස්ත්වයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථානයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් අන්ලයින් උපකරණය සඳහා සහය සම මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශකයක් තියෙන්නේ සමාජිකයෝ වගේ ප්\u200dරවේශකයෝ දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෝ සහ අධ්\u200dයය අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංගයක් සහාය සමාජයේදී පොස්ටල් අඳින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වගේම අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණය සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයි, ඒකෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණයේ සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකර අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණ දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විද අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට කොහොමද භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ විදියට මේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය දත්ත සෙට් එකේ ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200d', 'ta': 'மனநோய் உடல்நிலைகளிலிருந்து பயனர்கள் பெரும்பாலும் ஆதரவுக்கு online மூலங்கள் திரும்புகிறார்கள், அதில் துணை மற்றும் ர இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இரண்டு வகைகளிலும் உபயோகிப்பவர்களுக்கு ஆதரவும் படிப்பதற்கும் ஒரு சட்டம் கொண்டு வருகிறோ நாங்கள் ஆதரவு சமூகத்தில் இருக்கும் முறைகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான முறைமைகளை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது தானே நஷ்டத்தை குறிப்பிடும், மற சுதந்து தாக்குதல் கவலைப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, அது பொதுவான குறுக்குறிப்புகளில் கவலைப்பட்ட பயனர்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ம நாங்கள் ஒரு பெரிய அளவு பொது குறிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் என்பது பயனர்களில் உள்ளது. ஆனால் கட்டுப்பாட்டு பயனர்களுடன்  நாம் எப்படி எங்கள் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் மட்டுமே மொழியை பயன்படுத்தும் இந்த பொது குறிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பில் வலிமையான அடிப்படையில் எங்கள் முறைமை செயல்படுத்தும் என்பதை நாம் காட', 'ur': 'مذہنی سلامتی شرایطوں سے اکثر مدد کے لئے آنلاین رسورسوں کی طرف متوجہ ہوتے ہیں، جیسے ٹویٹر اور ریڈیٹ کے ساتھ مخصوص آنلاین مدد کمونٹیوں یا عمومی کمونٹیوں میں شامل ہوتے ہیں. ہم اس کام میں ایک فرم پیش کرتے ہیں جو دونوں جوامع میں استعمال کرنے اور پڑھنے کے لئے ہے۔ ہم اس طرح طریقے سے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ پوسٹوں کی شناسایی کمونٹیوں میں جو اپنی خطر کا خطرہ دکھائیں اور دکھائیں کہ ہماری طریقہ پہلے سے پیش کیا گیا تھا اس طرح کے مطابق قوی طریقے سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اپنا خسارہ افسردگی کے ساتھ قریب ہے، جسے افسردہ کارساز کو عمومی فورموں میں معلوم کرنے کے لئے ایک ضروری رابطہ دار کام بناتا ہے. ہم ایک بڑی اسکیل عمومی فورمی ڈیٹ سٹ کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جو خود راپورٹ کر دیے گئے افسردگی ڈیٹسٹ کے ساتھ موجود ہیں جو کنٹرول کارساز کے ساتھ مطابق موجود ہیں۔ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ کس طرح استعمال کر سکتا ہے کہ ان کے زبان کے استعمال سے مضطرب کارساز کو اثبات سے پہچان سکتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ اس عمومی فورمز ڈیٹ سٹ پر مضبوط بنسس لینوں کو کامل کرتا ہے۔', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaasha dhibaatooyinka caafimaadka dhimirka inta badan waxay u leeyihiin kaalmada internetka, kuwaas oo kamid ah bulshada caawimaadda shabakadda ee gaarka ah ama bulshada caafimaadka sida Twitter iyo Reddit. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa shuruudo caawinta iyo barashada isticmaalayaasha labada noocyo oo bulshada ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaabab ay ku ogaato boostada kaalmada bulshada, taas oo ku muuqan kara khatar naftiisa ku jirta, waxaana muujinaynaa in qaababkayagu uu horay u soo jeedo qaabab aad u horeeyay in ay aqoonsadaan boostadan. Dhibaatooyinka iskaa-abuurista waxay ku xiran tahay degaanka, taas oo ka dhigaya in ay aqoonsadaan isticmaalayaasha dhibaatada oo ku qoran jardiinada guud ee shaqada muhiimka ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa koonfurta macluumaadka guud ee jaamacadda ah oo ay ka mid yihiin isticmaalayaal, taasoo ay leeyihiin diagnos-eg depression oo u eg isticmaalayaasha kontrollka. Waxaynu tusnaynaa sida qaababkayaga loo codsan karo si ay u aqoonsadaan isticmaalka luuqadooda oo kaliya. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu ay ka samaysaa aasaasyo xoog leh oo ku qoran danbiyadan guud ee Forum.', 'uz': "Foydalanuvchilar qo'llanmalar, Twitter va Reddit kabi foydalanuvchilar tarmoqni qo'llash uchun tarmoq imkoniyatlarni qo'llashadi. Bu ishda biz ikkita jamiyatlar turida foydalanuvchilarni qo'llash va o'rganish uchun freymni hozir qilamiz. Biz jamiyatlarni qoʻllashda postlarni aniqlash usullarini tahrirlash imkoniyatlarimiz bilan boshlanamiz. Biz o'zimiz o'zimni o'zgarishga xavfli ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu kabi postlarni aniqlash uchun oldin tayyorlangan usullarni bajaradi. Self-o'zaro o o'zgarishga murakkablik yaxshi bog'liq. Bu umumiy forumlarda boshqaruvchi foydalanuvchilarni aniqlash mumkin. Biz boshqaruv foydalanuvchilari bilan mos keladigan foydalanuvchilarga katta umumiy forum maʼlumot tarkibini ishlatimiz. We show how our method can be applied to effectively identify depressed users from their use of language alone.  Biz bu umumiy forum maʼlumotlari tarkibidagi katta asosiy asboblarini ko'rsatumiz.", 'vi': 'Người dùng bị điều kiện sức khỏe tinh thần thường sử dụng các nguồn hỗ trợ trực tuyến, bao gồm các cộng đồng hỗ trợ trực tuyến chuyên nghiệp hay các cộng đồng chung như Twitter và Reddit. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đưa ra một cơ sở để hỗ trợ và nghiên cứu người sử dụng trong cả hai xã hội. Chúng tôi đề xuất phương pháp xác định các vị trí trong các cộng đồng hỗ trợ có thể cho thấy nguy cơ tự hại, và chứng minh phương pháp của chúng tôi làm được những phương pháp mạnh mẽ đã đề nghị để xác định các vị trí đó. Tự hại có liên quan đến trầm cảm, khiến việc nhận diện những người bị trầm cảm trên các diễn đàn chung là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mẫu lớn của forum có các người dùng với chẩn đoán trầm cảm tự ghi nhận tương ứng với người dùng điều khiển. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi có thể áp dụng để xác định các người dùng bị trầm cảm từ chỉ sử dụng ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi chứng minh phương pháp của chúng tôi vượt trội các nền tảng vững chắc trên tập tin forum.', 'bg': 'Потребителите, страдащи от психични заболявания, често се обръщат към онлайн ресурси за подкрепа, включително специализирани общности за онлайн поддръжка или общи общности като Туитър и Редит. В тази работа представяме рамка за подпомагане и изучаване на потребителите в двата типа общности. Предлагаме методи за идентифициране на постове в общности за подкрепа, които могат да показват риск от самонараняване, и демонстрираме, че нашият подход превъзхожда силните, предложени преди това методи за идентифициране на такива постове. Самоувреждането е тясно свързано с депресията, което прави идентифицирането на депресирани потребители на общи форуми решаваща свързана задача. Представяме мащабен общ набор от данни от форума, състоящ се от потребители със самодокладвани диагнози за депресия, съчетани с контролни потребители. Показваме как нашият метод може да бъде приложен за ефективно идентифициране на депресирани потребители само от използването на език. Ние демонстрираме, че нашият метод надминава силните базови линии на този общ набор от данни на форума.', 'da': 'Brugere, der lider af psykiske sygdomme, henvender sig ofte til online ressourcer for at få støtte, herunder specialiserede online supportfællesskaber eller generelle fællesskaber som Twitter og Reddit. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en ramme for at støtte og studere brugere i begge typer af samfund. Vi foreslår metoder til at identificere stillinger i støttefællesskaber, der kan indikere en risiko for selvskade, og viser, at vores tilgang overgår stærke tidligere foreslåede metoder til identificering af sådanne stillinger. Selvskade er tæt relateret til depression, hvilket gør identifikation af deprimerede brugere på generelle fora en afgørende relateret opgave. Vi introducerer et stort generelt forum datasæt bestående af brugere med selvrapporterede depressionsdiagnoser matchet med kontrolbrugere. Vi viser, hvordan vores metode kan anvendes til effektivt at identificere deprimerede brugere fra deres brug af sprog alene. Vi demonstrerer, at vores metode overgår stærke basislinjer på dette generelle forum datasæt.', 'nl': 'Gebruikers die lijden aan psychische aandoeningen wenden zich vaak tot online bronnen voor ondersteuning, waaronder gespecialiseerde online ondersteuningsgroepen of algemene gemeenschappen zoals Twitter en Reddit. In dit werk presenteren we een kader voor het ondersteunen en bestuderen van gebruikers in beide soorten gemeenschappen. We stellen methoden voor voor het identificeren van posten in ondersteunende gemeenschappen die kunnen wijzen op een risico op zelfbeschadiging, en tonen aan dat onze aanpak beter presteert dan sterke eerder voorgestelde methoden voor het identificeren van dergelijke posten. Zelfschade is nauw gerelateerd aan depressie, waardoor het identificeren van depressieve gebruikers op algemene fora een cruciale gerelateerde taak is. We introduceren een grootschalige algemene forumdataset bestaande uit gebruikers met zelf gerapporteerde depressiediagnoses gekoppeld aan controlegebruikers. We laten zien hoe onze methode kan worden toegepast om depressieve gebruikers effectief te identificeren aan de hand van hun taalgebruik alleen. We tonen aan dat onze methode beter presteert dan sterke baselines op deze algemene forumdataset.', 'hr': 'Korisnici koji pate od stanja mentalnog zdravlja često se okreću na internet resurse za podršku, uključujući specijalizirane zajednice za online podršku ili opće zajednice poput Twitter i Reddit. U ovom poslu predstavljamo okvir za podršku i proučavanje korisnika u obje vrste zajednica. Mi predlažemo metode za identifikaciju postova u zajednicama podrške koji mogu ukazati na rizik od samoubojstva i pokazati da naš pristup iznosi jake prethodno predložene metode za identifikaciju takvih postupaka. Samoubojstvo je blizu povezano s depresijom, što čini identifikaciju depresivnih korisnika na općim forumima ključnim povezanim zadatkom. Predstavljamo velike opće podatke za forum koji se sastavljaju od korisnika sa dijagnozom depresije koji se odgovaraju s korisnicima kontrole. Mi pokazujemo kako se naš metod može primjenjivati za učinkovito identificiranje depresivnih korisnika samo iz njihove upotrebe jezika. Pokazujemo da naša metoda iznosi jake osnovne linije na ovom općem sastavu podataka za forum.', 'de': 'Nutzer, die unter psychischen Erkrankungen leiden, wenden sich häufig an Online-Ressourcen, einschließlich spezialisierter Online-Support-Communities oder allgemeiner Communities wie Twitter und Reddit. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir einen Rahmen für die Unterstützung und Untersuchung von Benutzern in beiden Arten von Communities vor. Wir schlagen Methoden vor, um Beiträge in Unterstützungsgemeinschaften zu identifizieren, die auf ein Risiko von Selbstverletzung hinweisen können, und zeigen, dass unser Ansatz starke zuvor vorgeschlagene Methoden zur Identifizierung solcher Beiträge übertrifft. Selbstschaden steht in engem Zusammenhang mit Depressionen, was die Identifizierung depressiver Benutzer in allgemeinen Foren zu einer entscheidenden verwandten Aufgabe macht. Wir stellen einen großen allgemeinen Forendatensatz vor, der aus Benutzern mit selbst gemeldeten Depressionsdiagnosen und Kontrollanwendern besteht. Wir zeigen, wie unsere Methode angewendet werden kann, um depressive Nutzer allein aus ihrem Sprachgebrauch effektiv zu identifizieren. Wir zeigen, dass unsere Methode starke Baselines auf diesem allgemeinen Forendatensatz übertrifft.', 'id': 'Pengguna yang menderita kondisi kesehatan mental sering berubah ke sumber daya online untuk dukungan, termasuk komunitas dukungan online khusus atau komunitas umum seperti Twitter dan Reddit. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan rangkaian untuk mendukung dan mempelajari pengguna di kedua tipe komunitas. We propose methods for identifying posts in support communities that may indicate a risk of self-harm, and demonstrate that our approach outperforms strong previously proposed methods for identifying such posts.  Kerusakan diri terkait dengan depresi, yang membuat identifikasi pengguna depresi di forum umum menjadi tugas terkait penting. Kami memperkenalkan sebuah set data forum umum skala besar yang terdiri dari pengguna dengan diagnosis depresi yang dilaporkan sendiri yang cocok dengan pengguna kontrol. Kita menunjukkan bagaimana metode kita dapat diterapkan untuk mengidentifikasi efektif pengguna depresi dari penggunaan bahasa mereka sendiri. Kami menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi garis dasar yang kuat pada set data forum umum ini.', 'fa': 'کاربرانی که از شرایط سلامتی روانی رنج می\u200cبرند اغلب به منابع آنلاین برای پشتیبانی می\u200cشوند، شامل جامعه\u200cهای پشتیبانی آنلاین ویژه\u200cای یا جامعه\u200cهای عمومی مانند Twitter و Reddit. در این کار، ما یک چهارچوب برای پشتیبانی و مطالعه کاربران در هر دو نوع جامعه پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما روش\u200cهایی برای شناسایی پوست\u200cها در جامعه\u200cهای پشتیبانی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتوانند ریسک خودآسیب را نشان دهند، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش\u200cهایی که قبلا پیشنهاد کرده\u200cایم برای شناسایی این پوست\u200cها قوی\u200cتر است. خودآسیب نزدیک به افسردگی ارتباط دارد، که باعث می\u200cشود کاربران افسردگی در فورمز عمومی شناسایی یک کار مربوط به مهم بسیار مهم باشد. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات ژنرال فرومی بزرگ را معرفی می کنیم که از استفاده کنندگان با تشخیص افسردگی که با استفاده کنندگان کنترل مشابه دارند. ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه روش ما می تواند برای تاثیر شناسایی کاربران افسردگی از استفاده از زبان تنها انجام شود. ما نشان می دهیم که روش ما بر روی این مجموعه داده های فورمی عمومی پایین قوی انجام می دهد.', 'sw': 'Watumiaji wakikabiliana na hali ya afya ya akili mara nyingi hugeuka rasilimali za mtandaoni kwa ajili ya kuunga mkono, ikiwa ni pamoja na jamii maalumu za mtandaoni au jamii jumla kama vile Twita na Reddit. Katika kazi hii, tunaweka mfumo wa kuwasaidia na kusoma watumiaji katika a in a zote za jamii. Tunazipendekeza njia za kutambua makala kwenye jamii zinazounga mkono ambazo zinaweza kuonyesha hatari ya kudangamiza nafsi zao, na kuonyesha kwamba mbinu zetu zinafanya vizuri zilizopendekezwa kabla kwa kutambua makala kama hizi. Uharibifu wa kujitegemea unahusiana na mawazo, na unawafanya kuwatambua watumiaji wanaotumiwa vizuizini katika jukwaa la jumla ni jambo muhimu linalohusiana. Tunawasilisha kituo cha data cha jumla cha jukwaa ambacho ni pamoja na watumiaji wenye maambukizi ya mawazo yanayoripotiwa kujichanganya na watumiaji wa udhibiti. We show how our method can be applied to effectively identify depressed users from their use of language alone.  Tunaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inafanya misingi yenye nguvu kwenye seti ya taarifa za jumla za Jukwaa.', 'sq': 'Përdoruesit që vuajnë nga kushtet e shëndetit mendor shpesh kthehen në burime online për mbështetje, duke përfshirë komunitete të specializuara të mbështetjes online apo komunitete të përgjithshme të tilla si Twitter dhe Reddit. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një kuadër për mbështetjen dhe studimin e përdoruesve në të dy llojet e komuniteteve. Ne propozojmë metoda për identifikimin e vendeve në komunitetet e mbështetjes që mund të tregojnë një rrezik të vetë-dëmit dhe të demonstrojmë se qasja jonë është më e fortë se metodat e propozuara më parë për identifikimin e vendeve të tilla. Vetëdëmi është i lidhur ngushtë me depresionin, i cili bën identifikimin e përdoruesve të deprimuar në forumet e përgjithshëm një detyrë vendimtare lidhur me të. Ne paraqesim një grup të dhënash të përgjithshme të forumit në shkallë të madhe që përbëhet nga përdoruesit me diagnoza depresioni të raportuar vetë të përshtatshme me përdoruesit e kontrollit. Ne tregojmë se si metoda jonë mund të aplikohet për të identifikuar efektivisht përdoruesit e deprimuar nga përdorimi i tyre i gjuhës vetëm. Ne demonstrojmë se metoda jonë kalon linjat bazë të forta në këtë grup të dhënash të forumit të përgjithshëm.', 'tr': 'Mensiýet saglygynyň şertleri bolan ullançylar köplenç online çeşmelerine kömekleşer, Twitter we Reddit ýaly ünsli internet kömekleşmeleri ýa-da. Bu işde ullançylary hem jemgyýetlerde kömekleşmek we öwrenmek üçin bir çerçew görkeýäris. Biz jemgyýetlerde mektuplary takyklamak üçin çyzgytlary teklip edip, özüne bir zarar bermegi mümkin edip biljek jemgyýetlerde taýýarlanan yöntemlerimizi üýtgedýäris we şol ýagdaýlary tanamak üçin öňünden öňki teklip eden ýöntemlerimiziň üstüne ç Öz-başarnyk depresiýa ýakynlaşdyrylýar, bu sebäbi depresiýa ýüzünçä ullanýanlary umumy forumlarda tanyşdyrmak örän möhüm bir zat bilen mejbur edýär. Ullançylaryň özi bildirilen depresiýa diagnostikasy bilen meňzeşli uly bir forüm maglumatyny tanyşdyrýarys. Biz öz ýüregimizi dillerinden nähili gowy görkezilip bilmek üçin ýüregimizi görkeýäris. Biz öz yöntemimiziň bu umumy forum veri setirinde güýçli temel hatlary çykarýandygyny görkeýäris.', 'af': "Gebruikers wat gely van menslike gesondheidsvoorwaardes dikwels draai na online hulpbronne vir ondersteun, insluitend spesialiseerde online ondersteuning gemeenskappe of algemene gemeenskappe soos Twitter en Reddit. In hierdie werk stel ons 'n raamwerk voor te ondersteun en te studeer gebruikers in beide tipes van gemeenskappe. Ons voorstel metodes vir die identifiseer van pos in ondersteunde gemeenskappe wat dalk 'n risiko van self-skade kan aanwys en wys dat ons toegang sterk voorheen voorgestelde metodes uitvoer om sodanige pos te identifiseer. Selfskade is naby verwante met depresiëring, wat maak die identifiseer van depresiërde gebruikers op algemene forume 'n kruistelike verwante taak. Ons introduseer 'n groot-skaal algemene forum datastel wat bestaan van gebruikers met self-raporteerde depresiëtdagnoste wat ooreenstem met beheer gebruikers. Ons wys hoe ons metode kan aanwend word om effektief depreseerde gebruikers te identifiseer van hul gebruik van taal alleen. Ons wys dat ons metode sterk basisline uitvoer op hierdie algemene forum datastel.", 'hy': 'Users suffering from mental health conditions often turn to online resources for support, including specialized online support communities or general communities such as Twitter and Reddit.  Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի շրջանակ օգտագործողների աջակցության և ուսումնասիրության համար երկու տեսակի համայնքներում: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են համայնքներում տեղադրված պաշտոններ հայտնաբերելու համար, որոնք կարող են ցույց տալ ինքնավնասվածքի վտանգ, և ցույց տալ, որ մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է նախկինում առաջարկված ուժեղ մե Ինքնավնասվածքը սերտորեն կապված է դեպրեսիայի հետ, ինչը դարձնում է ընդգծված օգտագործողների հայտնաբերումը ընդհանուր ֆորմում կարևոր կապված խնդիր: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեծ մասշտաբով ընդհանուր ֆորմում տվյալների համակարգ, որը կազմված է օգտագործողներից, ովքեր ինքնահայտարարված են դեպրեսիայի ախտորոշումներով համապատասխանում են վերահսկողների Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կարող ենք կիրառել մեր մեթոդը, որպեսզի արդյունավետ ճանաչենք ճնշված օգտագործողներին միայն լեզվի օգտագործումից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը գերազանցում է այս ընդհանուր ֆորմում տվյալների համակարգի ուժեղ հիմքերը:', 'az': 'İstifadəçilər ağıllı sağlamlıq şərtlərindən əziyyət verirlər, Twitter və Reddit kimi özellikli onlayn dəstək toplumları və dünya ümmətləri içərisində onlayn resurslara çevrirlər. Bu işdə, hər ikisi ilə birlikdə istifadəçiləri dəstəkləmək və öyrənmək üçün bir çerçive göstəririk. Biz öz-özünə zərər verəcək təhlükəsini göstərəcək və tərəfimizin əvvəlki təhlükəsizlər təşkil etmək üçün çox qüvvətli təhlükəsizlik yollarını təsdiq etmək üçün metodları təklif edirik. Öz-özünə zərər depresiyə yaxınlaşdırılmış, bu da depresifik istifadəçilərini genel forumlarda tanıtmaq üçün çox mövcud bir işdir. Biz böyük ölçüdə genel forum verilənlərini təşkil edirik ki, özünün bildirilmiş depresiya diagnostikləri ilə istifadəçiləri ilə uyğunlaşan istifadəçilərdən olub. Bizim metodumuzu təkcə dillərinin istifadəsindən depresif istifadəçiləri tanıtmaq üçün necə istifadə edilə bilər göstəririk. Biz tərzimizin bu genel forum verilənlərin qurduğu qüvvətli səhifələrin istifadəsini göstəririk.', 'ko': '심리적 건강 문제를 앓고 있는 사용자들은 전문적인 온라인 지원 커뮤니티나 트위터, 레딧 등 일반 커뮤니티를 포함한 온라인 자원에 도움을 요청하는 경우가 많다.이 업무에서 우리는 이 두 지역 사회 사용자를 지지하고 연구하는 구조를 제시했다.Google은 커뮤니티에서 자해 위험이 존재할 수 있는 게시물을 식별하는 방법을 제시했고 Google의 방법이 이전에 제시한 게시물을 식별하는 강력한 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했습니다.자기상해는 우울함과 밀접한 관계를 가지기 때문에 일반 포럼에서 우울증 사용자를 식별하는 것은 매우 중요한 관련 임무가 된다.우리는 우울증 진단과 대조팀 사용자가 일치하는 대규모 유니버설 포럼 데이터 집합을 소개했다.우울한 사용자를 효과적으로 식별하는 언어 사용에 우리의 방법이 어떻게 적용되는지 보여 주었다.우리는 이 통용 포럼 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법이 강기선보다 우수하다는 것을 증명한다.', 'bs': 'Korisnici koji pate od stanja mentalnog zdravlja često se okreću na internet resurse za podršku, uključujući specijalizovane zajednice za internet podršku ili opće zajednice poput Twitter i Reddit. U ovom poslu predstavljamo okvir za podršku i proučavanje korisnika u obje vrste zajednica. Predlažemo metode za identifikaciju postova u zajednicama podrške koje mogu ukazati na rizik od samoubistva i pokazati da naš pristup iznosi jake prethodno predložene metode za identifikaciju takvih postupaka. Samoubojstvo je blizu povezano s depresijom, što čini identifikaciju depresivnih korisnika na općim forumima ključnim vezama s zadatkom. Predstavljamo veliku opću grupu podataka za forum koja se sastavlja od korisnika sa dijagnozom depresije koji se odgovaraju sa korisnicima kontrole. Mi pokazujemo kako se naš metod može primjenjivati da se efikasno identificira depresivni korisnici samo iz njihove upotrebe jezika. Pokazujemo da naša metoda iznosi jake osnovne linije na ovom općem setu podataka za forum.', 'ca': "Users suffering from mental health conditions often turn to online resources for support, including specialized online support communities or general communities such as Twitter and Reddit.  En aquesta feina, presentem un marc per sostenir i estudiar usuaris en ambdós tipus de comunitats. Proposem mètodes d'identificació de posts en comunitats de suport que poden indicar un risc d'auto-dany i demostrar que el nostre enfocament supera mètodes forts proposats abans per identificar aquests posts. L'auto-dany està estretament relacionat amb la depressió, que fa que la identificació dels usuaris deprimit en fòrums generals sigui una tasca crucial relacionada. Introduïm un conjunt de dades generals de fòrum a gran escala que consisteix en usuaris amb diagnòstics de depressió auto-notificats que coincideixen amb usuaris de control. Mostrem com es pot aplicar el nostre mètode per identificar efectivament els usuaris deprimits només amb l'ús del llenguatge. Demonstrem que el nostre mètode supera les fortes bases d'aquest conjunt de dades del fòrum general.", 'cs': 'Uživatelé trpící duševním zdravím se často obrací na online zdroje pro podporu, včetně specializovaných online komunit podpory nebo obecných komunit, jako je Twitter a Reddit. V této práci představujeme rámec pro podporu a studium uživatelů v obou typech komunit. Navrhujeme metody identifikace příspěvků v podpůrných komunitách, které mohou naznačovat riziko sebepoškození, a demonstrujeme, že náš přístup překonává silné dříve navržené metody identifikace těchto příspěvků. Sebeoškození úzce souvisí s depresemi, což činí identifikaci depresivních uživatelů na obecných fórech klíčovým souvisejícím úkolem. Představujeme rozsáhlý všeobecný datový soubor fóra sestávající z uživatelů se samozřejmě hlášenými depresními diagnózami srovnanými s kontrolními uživateli. Ukážeme, jak lze naši metodu použít k efektivní identifikaci depresivních uživatelů pouze z jejich používání jazyka. Dokazujeme, že naše metoda překonává silné základní linie na této obecné datové sadě fóra.', 'et': 'Vaimse tervise all kannatavad kasutajad pöörduvad sageli toetuse saamiseks veebipõhiste ressursside poole, sealhulgas spetsialiseeritud veebipõhiste tugikogukondade või üldiste kogukondade, nagu Twitter ja Reddit. Käesolevas töös esitame raamistiku kasutajate toetamiseks ja uurimiseks mõlemat tüüpi kogukondades. Me pakume välja meetodid, kuidas tuvastada ametikohad tugikogukondades, mis võivad osutada enesevigastuse ohule, ning näitame, et meie lähenemisviis ületab varem kavandatud tugevaid meetodeid selliste ametikohtade tuvastamiseks. Enesekahjustus on tihedalt seotud depressiooniga, mis muudab depressiooni kasutajate tuvastamise üldistel foorumitel oluliseks seotud ülesandeks. Tutvustame laiaulatuslikku üldise foorumi andmekogumit, mis koosneb endast teatatud depressiooniagnoosidega ja kontrollkasutajatega. Näitame, kuidas meie meetodit saab rakendada masendunud kasutajate tõhusaks tuvastamiseks ainult nende keelekasutuse kaudu. Näitame, et meie meetod ületab tugevaid lähtejooni selles üldises foorumi andmekogumis.', 'fi': 'Mielenterveysongelmista kärsivät käyttäjät käyttävät usein verkkoresursseja tuen saamiseksi, mukaan lukien erikoistuneet verkkotukiyhteisöt tai yleiset yhteisöt, kuten Twitter ja Reddit. Tässä työssä esitellään puitteet käyttäjien tukemiseen ja tutkimiseen molemmissa yhteisöissä. Ehdotamme menetelmiä sellaisten tukiyhteisöjen virkojen tunnistamiseksi, jotka voivat viitata itsensä vahingoittamisen riskiin, ja osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme ylittää aiemmin ehdotetut vahvat menetelmät tällaisten virkojen tunnistamiseksi. Itsevahingoittaminen liittyy läheisesti masennukseen, mikä tekee masentuneiden käyttäjien tunnistamisesta yleisillä foorumeilla ratkaisevan tärkeän tähän liittyvän tehtävän. Esittelemme laajamittaisen yleisen foorumiaineiston, joka koostuu käyttäjistä, joilla on itseraportoitu masennusdiagnoosi yhdistettynä kontrollikuljettajiin. Näytämme, miten menetelmäämme voidaan soveltaa masentuneiden käyttäjien tunnistamiseen tehokkaasti pelkästään kielen käytöstä. Osoitamme, että menetelmämme ylittää vahvat lähtökohdat tässä yleisessä foorumitietokannassa.', 'bn': 'মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য পরিস্থিতি থেকে ব্যবহারকারীরা প্রায়শই সমর্থনের জন্য অনলাইন সম্পদে ফিরে যায়, যার মধ্যে বিশেষ অনলাইন এই কাজে আমরা উভয় ধরনের সম্প্রদায়ের ব্যবহারকারীদের সমর্থন ও পড়ার জন্য একটি ফ্রেম উপস্থাপন করি। আমরা সমর্থন করা সম্প্রদায়ের পোস্ট চিহ্নিত পদ্ধতি চিহ্নিত করার প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করি যা নিজেদের আত্মক্ষতির ঝুঁকি নির্দেশ করে এবং প্রমাণ নিজের আত্মা ক্ষতির কাছাকাছি কাছাকাছি সম্পর্ক, যা সাধারণ ফোরামে দুঃখিত ব্যবহারকারীদের চিহ্নিত করে গুরুত্বপূর আমরা ব্যবহারকারীদের সাথে নিয়ন্ত্রণ ব্যবহারকারীদের সাথে মিলিত এক বিশাল সাধারণ ফোরাম ডাটাসেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই। We show how our method can be applied to effectively identify depressed users from their use of language alone.  আমরা প্রমাণ করছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি এই জেনারেল ফোরামের ডাটাসেটে শক্তিশালী বেসাইন প্রদর্শন করে।', 'am': 'የmental ጤና አካባቢዎች መከራን የሚቀበሉ ተጠቃሚዎች ብዙ ጊዜ የኢንተርኔት መደጋገሚያ ማኅበረሰብ ወይም የትዊተር እና Reddit እንደተደረጉ የጦማሪያን አካባቢ ማኅበረሰብ፣ በመስመር ላይ ድጋፍ ይዞራሉ፡፡ In this work, we present a framework for supporting and studying users in both types of communities.  የድምፅ ጉዳይ የራሳቸውን ጉዳት ማሳየት እንዲችሉ እና ቀድሞው የዚህን ደብዳቤዎች ለመታወቅ ጠንካራችን እንዲያሳያል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የራሳቸው ጉዳት ከድምፅ ጋር አቅራቢያ ነው፤ ይህም የጠለቁትን የጦማሪያውን የጦማር ውይይት የተጠቃሚ ስራ ነው፡፡ በሥልጣን ተጠቃሚዎች ጋር የተመሳሳይ የራሳቸውን አፍረት አፍቃሪን የሚቆጠሩ አካባቢ የፍሬማዊ ዳታ ማሳየት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በቋንቋቸው ብቻውን የሚጠቀሙትን ተጠቃሚዎችን እንዴት እንደሚጠቀም እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የሥርዓታችን የጠንካራ መሠረቶች በዚህ የፎርዮም ዳታ ማዕከል ላይ ነው፡፡', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan sing wis ana ing sakjane resuran sing nggawe online kanggo supoyo, tambah bantuan di supoyo online sing pekenalke kanggo komunitas segala sing nyeneng Google lan Redit. Nang-uwong iki, awak dhéwé ngewehke sistem kanggo nggunaké lan ijol-ijolan iki ning arep komunitas. Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem kanggo ngilangno bantuan nggawe komunitas iki dadi bisa nguasai perbudhakan kanggo ngilangno nggawe gerakan sampeyan sampeyan nguasai iki dadi kejahatan tentang kanggo ngilangno nggawe ngubah dhéwé. Self Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem dadi nggawe barang-kalang yen ditambah banjuré dikenakno Awakdhéwé menehi kaké ngerasakno ning jewelasakno nggunakake tresnaning winih Awak dhéwé éntukno awak dhéwé ngerti dadi nggawe barang maning maneh kanggo dataset nggawe barang.', 'sk': 'Uporabniki, ki trpijo zaradi duševnega zdravja, se pogosto obrnejo na spletne vire za podporo, vključno s specializiranimi spletnimi skupnostmi za podporo ali splošnimi skupnostmi, kot sta Twitter in Reddit. V tem delu predstavljamo okvir za podporo in preučevanje uporabnikov v obeh vrstah skupnosti. Predlagamo metode za identifikacijo delovnih mest v podpornih skupnostih, ki lahko kažejo na tveganje samopoškodbe, in dokazujemo, da naš pristop presega močne predlagane metode za identifikacijo takih delovnih mest. Samo-poškodba je tesno povezana z depresijo, zaradi česar je identifikacija depresivnih uporabnikov na splošnih forumih ključna povezana naloga. Predstavljamo obsežen splošni forum podatkov, ki jih sestavljajo uporabniki s samoporočanimi diagnozami depresije in kontrolnimi uporabniki. Pokazali smo, kako lahko našo metodo uporabimo za učinkovito prepoznavanje depresivnih uporabnikov samo z njihovo uporabo jezika. Dokazujemo, da naša metoda presega močne osnovne linije na tem splošnem forumu podatkov.', 'he': 'משתמשים שסובלים ממצבי בריאות נפשית לעתים קרובות פונים למשאבים באינטרנט לתמיכה, כולל קהילות תמיכה אינטרנט מיוחדות או קהילות כלליות כמו טוויטר ורדיט. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים מסגרת לתמוך וללמד משתמשים בשני סוגי קהילות. אנו מציעים שיטות לזהות תפקידים בקהילות תמיכה שאולי מצביעים על סיכון לנזק עצמי, ולהראות שהגישה שלנו מתגברת על שיטות חזקות שהמציעו קודם לזהות תפקידים כאלה. נזק עצמי קשור קרוב לדיכאון, מה שעושה לזהות משתמשים מדוכאים בפורומים כלליים משימה קשורה קריטית. אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים של פורום כללי בקנה מידה גדולה שמכילה משתמשים עם אבחנות דיכאון דווחות בעצמם מתאימות עם משתמשים בשליטה. אנו מראים איך השיטה שלנו יכולה להיות שימושית כדי לזהות בעובדה משתמשים מדוכאים משימוש בשפה שלהם לבד. אנחנו מראים שהשיטה שלנו עולה מעל קווי בסיס חזקים על קבוצת מידע הפורום הכללי הזו.', 'ha': "Yin amfani da suke cũtar da sharri'a na fikanci, ko kuma sunã kamfata mataimaki na ƙarami masu amfani da waɗancan, kamar Twitter da Rededit. Daga wannan aikin, Munã gabatar da wani firam wa masu taimakon mãsu amfani da su cikin jama'a biyu. Tuna goyya da hanyoyin su gane posten da za'a ƙarfafa jamii waɗanda ke iya ƙayyade hatari ga rãyukansu, kuma mu nuna cewa hanyoyinmu za'a samar hanyoyin bayani a gabãni da aka buƙata su gane su. Ruwa na kangara yana makusanci na haɗi da depression, inda yana sanya masu amfani da marubuci da suka zama na muhimu a cikin aikin jama'a. Tuna ƙuyya da matsayin jama'a na Forum mai girma wanda ke samun mãsu amfani da shi, da diagnoni na shiryarwa da kansa ya sami da masu amfani da Control. Kana nũna jinsi za'a iya amfani da metodenmu dõmin a iya gane masu da amfani da shi da ake depression, daga amfani da harshen su kaɗai. Tune nuna cewa hanyoyinmu na sami mafi ƙarfi a kan wannan database na jumla.", 'bo': 'སྒེར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་རྣམས་ནད་མེད་སྐྱོང་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ལ་དྲ་རྒྱའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡོད་པས། དམིགས་བསལ་ནུས་ཡ ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྩོལ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དང་ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་མཐའ་འཁོར་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་ཚོགས་སྡེ་ཚན་འདིའི་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསམ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རང་ཉིད་འཆར་བ་ནི་depression་དང་མཐུན་ཁག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་པའི་འཆར་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཆེན་དུ་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཅི་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་ན་ཡིན་པ་ལས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཡིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྨན་གཞི་གཞི་རྟེན་འདིའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Men Also Like Shopping : Reducing Gender Bias Amplification using Corpus-level Constraints', 'ar': 'يحب الرجال أيضًا التسوق: الحد من تضخيم التحيز الجنساني باستخدام قيود على مستوى الجسم', 'fr': "Les hommes aiment aussi le shopping\xa0: réduire l'amplification des préjugés sexistes à l'aide de contraintes au niveau du corps", 'pt': 'Os homens também gostam de fazer compras: reduzindo a amplificação do preconceito de gênero usando restrições em nível de corpus', 'es': 'A los hombres también les gusta ir de compras: reducir la amplificación del sesgo de género mediante restricciones a nivel', 'ja': '男性も買い物が好き：コーパスレベルの制約を使用してジェンダーバイアスの増幅を減らす', 'zh': '男性亦好市物:用语料库级约束减性别偏见放大', 'ru': 'Мужчины также любят шоппинг: снижение усиления гендерных предрассудков с использованием ограничений на уровне корпуса', 'hi': 'खरीदारी की तरह पुरुष भी: कॉर्पस-स्तर की बाधाओं का उपयोग करके लिंग पूर्वाग्रह प्रवर्धन को कम करना', 'ga': 'Is maith le Fir Siopadóireacht freisin: Aimpliú Laofachta Inscne a Laghdú ag Úsáid Srianta ar leibhéal an Chorpais', 'ka': 'მამაკაცები ასევე, როგორც საკონფიგურაცია: საკონფიგურაცია საკონფიგურაცია', 'hu': 'A férfiak szintén szeretik a vásárlást: A nemek közötti előfordulás erősítésének csökkentése Corpus-szintű korlátozásokkal', 'el': 'Στους άνδρες αρέσουν επίσης τα ψώνια: Μείωση της ενίσχυσης της προκατάληψης των φύλων χρησιμοποιώντας περιορισμούς σε επίπεδο σώματος', 'it': "Anche agli uomini piace lo shopping: Ridurre l'amplificazione del bias di genere utilizzando vincoli a livello Corpus", 'kk': 'Еркектерді сатып алу сияқты: Жұлдыз көлемі шектеулерді көшірмелеу', 'lt': 'Vyrai taip pat kaip pirkimas: mažinti lyčių problemų didinimą taikant korpuso lygmens apribojimus', 'ms': 'Lelaki Juga Seperti Pembelian: Mengurangi Penampilan Bias Gender menggunakan Kebatasan Aras-Korpus', 'mk': 'Мажите исто така сакаат да купуваат: намалување на зголемувањето на полските навреди користејќи ограничувања на ниво на корпус', 'mn': 'Эрчүүд мөн худалдан авч үзэх мэт: Жинхэнэ биеийн ампликацийг багасгах', 'mt': 'Men Also Like Shopping: Reducing Gender Bias Amplification using Corpus-level Constraints', 'ml': 'പുരുഷന്മാരും ഷോപ്പിങ്ങിനെപ്പോലെ', 'no': 'Menn også som shopping: Reduserer generelle både amplisering med korpusnivåbegrensningar', 'pl': 'Mężczyźni również lubią zakupy: zmniejszenie wzmacniania uprzedzeń płci za pomocą ograniczeń na poziomie korpusu', 'ro': 'Bărbaților le place, de asemenea, cumpărăturile: Reducerea Amplificării Bias Gen folosind Constrângeri la nivel Corpus', 'sr': 'Muškarci takođe poput kupovine: smanjenje poludne biškoće sa ograničenjem nivoa korpusa', 'ta': 'ஆண்களும் விளையாடுவது போன்ற ஆண்கள்: கார்ப்ஸ்- மட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி பெண் பையை குறைக்கிறது', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු වගේම විකුණු වගේම: කොර්පුස් ලේවල් සීමාවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ජෙන්ඩර් බියාස් සිම්පිල', 'ur': 'مرد بھی خرید کی طرح ہے: جنس بیس امپلیٹ کے ذریعہ کورپوس-سطح محدودیت کے مطابق کم کرتا ہے', 'so': 'Men Also Like Shopping: Reducing Gender Bias Amplification using Corpus-level Constraints', 'sv': 'Män gillar också shopping: Minska könsbias förstärkning med korpusnivå begränsningar', 'uz': 'BogĘ»larni Shop kabi ham kamaytirish: Chepus darajasi bilan koĘ»chirish', 'vi': 'Cũng giống như Shopping: Giảm ham muốn giãn xương bằng giới hạn của Tập Đoàn.', 'bg': 'Мъжете също обичат пазаруването: Намаляване на усилването на половите наклонности чрез ограничения на ниво Корпус', 'da': 'Mænd kan også lide at shoppe: Reducere kønsbias forstærkning ved hjælp af korpusniveau begrænsninger', 'nl': 'Mannen houden ook van winkelen: het verminderen van gender bias versterking met behulp van corpus-level beperkingen', 'de': 'Männer mögen auch Einkaufen: Reduzierung von Gender Bias Amplification durch Corpus-Level Constraints', 'id': 'Pria Juga Seperti Pembelian: Mengurangi Penampilan Bias Gender menggunakan Kebatasan Tingkat Korpus', 'ko': '남성도 쇼핑 선호: 어료 라이브러리급 제약 사용 성별 편견 감소 확대', 'hr': 'Muškarci također poput kupovine: smanjenje amplifikacije poludnih bića korpusnim ograničenjima nivoa', 'fa': 'مردان همچنین مانند خرید: کاهش آلودگی جنسی با استفاده از محدودیت سطح کورپوس', 'sw': 'Wanaume pia kama Mapigano: Kupunguza Ushirikiano wa Kijinsia kwa kutumia Mashitaka ya Kikundi cha Korpus', 'sq': 'Burrat gjithashtu si blerjet: zvogëlimi i problemeve gjinore duke përdorur kufizime në nivelin e korpusit', 'am': 'ወንዶች ደግሞ እንደ ሽብር: የውንዶች ቢas አቀማመጥ በቆርፓስ-level Constraints', 'tr': 'Erkekler Ayrıca Satış gibi: Gençler Bias Amplikasyonu Küçükleyin', 'hy': 'Տղամարդիկ նաև գնումներ են սիրում. նվազեցնել գենդերային հակադրությունը՝ օգտագործելով Կորպուսի մակարդակի սահմանափակումներ', 'af': 'Manne ook soos koop: Redigeer Gender Bias Amplifikasie met Korpus- vlak Beheinings', 'az': 'ńįnsanlar d…ô alńĪŇü kimi: C…ônn…ôt s…ôviyy…ôsi QńĪdńĪrlarńĪ il…ô C…ônn…ôt Bias Amplifikasyonu azaldńĪr', 'bn': 'Men Also Like Shopping: Reducing Gender Bias Amplification using Corpus-level Constraints', 'ca': 'Men Also Like Shopping: Reducing Gender Bias Amplification using Corpus-level Constraints', 'fi': 'Miehet tykkäävät myös shoppailusta: Sukupuolten bias-vahvistumisen vähentäminen Corpus-tason rajoitusten avulla', 'bs': 'Muškarci također poput kupovine: smanjenje amplifikacije Gender Bias s korpusnim ograničenjima nivoa', 'cs': 'Muži mají také rádi nakupování: Snížení zesílení genderových předpokladů pomocí omezení na úrovni korpusu', 'et': 'Meestele meeldib ka ostlemine: soolise eelarvamuse võimendamine Corpuse taseme piirangute abil', 'jv': 'Wurung mengko soko kuchasi: Kebebasan Gender Bias Kebebasan Ubah', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'גברים גם אוהבים קניות: להפחית את ההרבה של זכרים באמצעות מגבלות ברמה של קורפוס', 'sk': 'Moškim je všeč tudi nakupovanje: zmanjšanje spolne pristranskosti z uporabo omejitev na ravni Corpus', 'bo': 'Men Also Like Shopping: Gender Bias Amplification reduced using Corpus-level Constraints'}
{'en': 'Language is increasingly being used to de-fine rich visual recognition problems with supporting image collections sourced from the web. Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of correlations between co-occurring labels and visual input but risk inadvertently encoding social biases found in web corpora. In this work, we study data and models associated with multilabel object classification and visual semantic role labeling. We find that (a) datasets for these tasks contain significant gender bias and (b) models trained on these datasets further amplify existing bias. For example, the activity cooking is over 33 % more likely to involve females than males in a training set, and a trained model further amplifies the disparity to 68 % at test time. We propose to inject corpus-level constraints for calibrating existing structured prediction models and design an algorithm based on Lagrangian relaxation for collective inference. Our method results in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5 % and 40.5 % for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively', 'ar': 'يتم استخدام اللغة بشكل متزايد لإزالة مشاكل التعرف المرئي الغنية من خلال دعم مجموعات الصور التي يتم الحصول عليها من الويب. تُستخدم نماذج التنبؤ المهيكلة في هذه المهام للاستفادة من الارتباطات بين التسميات المتزامنة والمدخلات المرئية ولكنها تخاطر بترميز التحيزات الاجتماعية الموجودة في مجموعات الويب عن غير قصد. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بدراسة البيانات والنماذج المرتبطة بتصنيف الكائنات متعددة العلامات ووصف الدور الدلالي المرئي. نجد أن (أ) مجموعات البيانات لهذه المهام تحتوي على تحيز كبير بين الجنسين و (ب) النماذج المدربة على مجموعات البيانات هذه تزيد من تضخيم التحيز الحالي. على سبيل المثال ، يزيد احتمال إشراك الإناث في مجموعة التدريب عن نشاط الطهي بنسبة 33٪ مقارنة بالذكور ، ويزيد النموذج المدرَّب من التباين إلى 68٪ في وقت الاختبار. نقترح إدخال قيود على مستوى الجسم لمعايرة نماذج التنبؤ المهيكلة الحالية وتصميم خوارزمية تعتمد على استرخاء لاغرانج للاستدلال الجماعي. لا تؤدي طريقتنا إلى أي خسارة تقريبًا في الأداء لمهمة التعرف الأساسية ولكنها تقلل من حجم تضخيم التحيز بنسبة 47.5٪ و 40.5٪ للتصنيف متعدد العلامات ووسم الدور الدلالي المرئي ، على التوالي。', 'es': 'El lenguaje se utiliza cada vez más para definir problemas de reconocimiento visual enriquecidos con colecciones de imágenes de soporte procedentes de la web. En estas tareas se utilizan modelos de predicción estructurados para aprovechar las correlaciones entre las etiquetas concurrentes y la entrada visual, pero se corre el riesgo de codificar inadvertidamente los sesgos sociales que se encuentran en los cuerpos web. En este trabajo, estudiamos datos y modelos asociados con la clasificación de objetos multietiqueta y el etiquetado de roles semánticos visuales. Encontramos que (a) los conjuntos de datos para estas tareas contienen un sesgo de género significativo y (b) los modelos entrenados en estos conjuntos de datos amplifican aún más el sesgo existente. Por ejemplo, la actividad de cocinar tiene más de un 33% más de probabilidades de involucrar a mujeres que a hombres en un conjunto de entrenamiento, y un modelo entrenado amplifica aún más la disparidad al 68% en el momento del examen. Proponemos inyectar restricciones a nivel del cuerpo para calibrar los modelos de predicción estructurados existentes y diseñar un algoritmo basado en la relajación lagrangiana para la inferencia colectiva. Nuestro método casi no produce pérdida de rendimiento para la tarea de reconocimiento subyacente, pero reduce la magnitud de la amplificación del sesgo en un 47,5% y un 40,5% para la clasificación multietiqueta y el etiquetado de roles semánticos visuales, respectivamente。', 'pt': 'A linguagem está sendo cada vez mais usada para definir problemas avançados de reconhecimento visual com suporte a coleções de imagens provenientes da web. Modelos de previsão estruturados são usados nessas tarefas para tirar proveito das correlações entre rótulos co-ocorrentes e entrada visual, mas correm o risco de codificar inadvertidamente vieses sociais encontrados em corpora da web. Neste trabalho, estudamos dados e modelos associados à classificação de objetos multilabel e rotulagem visual de papéis semânticos. Descobrimos que (a) conjuntos de dados para essas tarefas contêm viés de gênero significativo e (b) modelos treinados nesses conjuntos de dados amplificam ainda mais o viés existente. Por exemplo, a atividade de cozinhar tem 33% mais chances de envolver mulheres do que homens em um conjunto de treinamento, e um modelo treinado amplifica ainda mais a disparidade para 68% no momento do teste. Propomos injetar restrições em nível de corpus para calibrar modelos de predição estruturados existentes e projetar um algoritmo baseado em relaxação Lagrangiana para inferência coletiva. Nosso método resulta em quase nenhuma perda de desempenho para a tarefa de reconhecimento subjacente, mas diminui a magnitude da amplificação de viés em 47,5% e 40,5% para classificação multilabel e rotulagem de função semântica visual, respectivamente。', 'fr': "Le langage est de plus en plus utilisé pour définir les problèmes de reconnaissance visuelle riches avec des collections d'images provenant du Web. Des modèles de prédiction structurés sont utilisés dans ces tâches pour tirer parti des corrélations entre les étiquettes concomitantes et les entrées visuelles, mais ils risquent de coder par inadvertance les biais sociaux trouvés dans les corpus Web. Dans ce travail, nous étudions des données et des modèles associés à la classification d'objets multi-étiquettes et à l'étiquetage sémantique visuel des rôles. Nous constatons que (a) les ensembles de données pour ces tâches contiennent d'importants biais sexistes et (b) que les modèles formés à partir de ces ensembles de données amplifient davantage les biais existants. Par exemple, l'activité culinaire est plus de 33\xa0% plus susceptible de faire participer les femmes que les hommes à un ensemble d'entraînement, et un modèle entraîné amplifie encore la disparité à 68\xa0% au moment du test. Nous proposons d'injecter des contraintes au niveau du corpus pour calibrer les modèles de prédiction structurés existants et de concevoir un algorithme basé sur la relaxation lagrangienne pour l'inférence collective. Notre méthode n'entraîne pratiquement aucune perte de performance pour la tâche de reconnaissance sous-jacente, mais diminue l'ampleur de l'amplification du biais de 47,5\xa0% et 40,5\xa0% pour la classification multiétiquette et l'étiquetage sémantique visuel des rôles, respectivement。", 'ja': 'ウェブから調達された画像コレクションをサポートすることで、豊富な視覚認識の問題を解決するために言語がますます使用されています。 構造化された予測モデルは、共起ラベルと視覚入力との間の相関関係を利用するためにこれらのタスクで使用されますが、Webコーパスで見つかった社会的バイアスを誤ってエンコードするリスクがあります。 この作業では、マルチラベルオブジェクト分類と視覚的セマンティックロールラベリングに関連するデータとモデルを研究します。 私たちは、(a)これらのタスクのデータセットには著しい性別バイアスが含まれており、(b)これらのデータセットでトレーニングされたモデルが既存のバイアスをさらに増幅することを発見しました。 たとえば、アクティビティクッキングは、トレーニングセットの男性よりも女性が関与する可能性が33%以上高く、トレーニングされたモデルは、テスト時間に68%まで格差をさらに増幅します。 既存の構造化予測モデルを校正するためのコーパスレベルの制約を注入し、集合的推論のためのラグランジュ緩和に基づいたアルゴリズムを設計することを提案します。 当社の方法は、基礎となる認識タスクのパフォーマンス損失はほとんどありませんが、マルチラベル分類および視覚的意味的ロールラベルのバイアス増幅の大きさはそれぞれ47.5%および40.5%減少します。。', 'hi': 'भाषा तेजी से वेब से sourced छवि संग्रह का समर्थन करने के साथ अमीर दृश्य पहचान समस्याओं को ठीक करने के लिए इस्तेमाल किया जा रहा है. संरचित भविष्यवाणी मॉडल का उपयोग इन कार्यों में सह-घटित लेबल और दृश्य इनपुट के बीच सहसंबंधों का लाभ उठाने के लिए किया जाता है, लेकिन अनजाने में वेब कॉर्पोरेट में पाए जाने वाले सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों को एन्कोडिंग करने का जोखिम होता है। इस काम में, हम मल्टीलेबल ऑब्जेक्ट वर्गीकरण और दृश्य शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग से जुड़े डेटा और मॉडल का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि (ए) इन कार्यों के लिए डेटासेट में महत्वपूर्ण लिंग पूर्वाग्रह होता है और (बी) इन डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल मौजूदा पूर्वाग्रह को और बढ़ाते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, खाना पकाने की गतिविधि एक प्रशिक्षण सेट में पुरुषों की तुलना में महिलाओं को शामिल करने की 33% से अधिक संभावना है, और एक प्रशिक्षित मॉडल परीक्षण के समय असमानता को 68% तक बढ़ाता है। हम मौजूदा संरचित भविष्यवाणी मॉडल को कैलिब्रेट करने के लिए कॉर्पस-स्तर की बाधाओं को इंजेक्ट करने और सामूहिक अनुमान के लिए लाग्रांगियन विश्राम के आधार पर एक एल्गोरिथ्म डिजाइन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि अंतर्निहित मान्यता कार्य के लिए लगभग कोई प्रदर्शन हानि में परिणाम है, लेकिन पूर्वाग्रह प्रवर्धन के परिमाण को क्रमशः मल्टीलेबल वर्गीकरण और दृश्य शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग के लिए 47.5% और 40.5% तक कम कर देता है।', 'zh': '言语益多,以合网络像。 结构化占模形用之,以同标视觉输入之相关性,或无意中编码于Web语料库中见偏见。 于此,论所与众所分视语义角色相关者数事。 吾见(a)数之偏见,(b)于此集上练之形益大。 烹饪及女,高于男33%以上,试而大之68%。 臣等请注语料库级约束校准见结构化测模形,设一基于拉格朗日弛之算集体推理。 吾法于底事几无损失,但于多标类视语义角色标签,偏差放大幅度分减47.5%40.5%。', 'ru': 'Язык все чаще используется для решения проблем визуального распознавания с поддержкой коллекций изображений, полученных из Интернета. Структурированные модели прогнозирования используются в этих задачах, чтобы извлечь выгоду из корреляций между сопутствующими метками и визуальным вводом, но риск непреднамеренного кодирования социальных предрассудков, обнаруженных в веб-корпусах. В данной работе мы изучаем данные и модели, связанные с многоуровневой классификацией объектов и визуальной семантической ролевой маркировкой. Мы обнаружили, что (а) наборы данных для этих задач содержат значительную гендерную предвзятость и (б) модели, обученные на этих наборах данных, дополнительно усиливают существующую предвзятость. Например, кулинарная активность более чем на 33% чаще вовлекает женщин, чем мужчин, в тренировочный набор, и обученная модель дополнительно усиливает диспропорцию до 68% во время тестирования. Мы предлагаем ввести ограничения на уровне корпуса для калибровки существующих структурированных моделей прогнозирования и разработать алгоритм на основе релаксации Лагранжа для коллективного вывода. Наш метод практически не приводит к потере производительности для основной задачи распознавания, но уменьшает величину усиления смещения на 47,5% и 40,5% для многоуровневой классификации и визуальной семантической ролевой маркировки, соответственно。', 'ga': 'Tá níos mó úsáide á baint as teanga chun fadhbanna saibhre aitheanta amhairc a réiteach le bailiúcháin íomhá tacaíochta a fhaightear ón ngréasán. Baintear úsáid as samhlacha struchtúrtha tuartha sna tascanna seo chun leas a bhaint as comhghaolta idir lipéid chomhtharlaithe agus ionchur amhairc ach tá baol ann go ndéanfaí laofachtaí sóisialta a fhaightear i gcorpas gréasáin a ionchódú go neamhaireach. Sa obair seo, déanaimid staidéar ar shonraí agus ar shamhlacha a bhaineann le haicmiú réad illipéid agus le lipéadú róil shéimeantach amhairc. Faighimid amach (a) go bhfuil claontacht shuntasach inscne sna tacair sonraí do na tascanna seo agus (b) go méadaíonn samhlacha atá oilte ar na tacair sonraí seo an laofacht atá ann cheana féin. Mar shampla, tá breis is 33% níos dóchúla go mbeidh baint ag mná ná fir i sraith oiliúna sa chócaireacht ghníomhaíochta, agus méadaíonn múnla oilte an difríocht go 68% ag am tástála a thuilleadh. Tá sé beartaithe againn srianta ar leibhéal an chorpais a instealladh chun samhlacha struchtúrtha réamh-mheastacháin atá ann cheana a chalabrú agus algartam a dhearadh bunaithe ar mhaolú Lagrangian le haghaidh tátail chomhchoiteann. Ní bhíonn aon chaillteanas feidhmíochta beagnach mar thoradh ar ár modh don tasc aitheantais bhunúsach ach laghdaítear méid an aimplithe laofachta faoi 47.5% agus 40.5% maidir le haicmiú illipéad agus lipéadú róil shéimeantach amhairc, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'ენერგია უფრო მეტი გამოყენებულია ბეჭდვილი ვიზუალური განაცნობის პრობლემებისთვის, რომელიც ინტერვიდან გამოიყენებული სურათის კოლექციების მხა სტრუქტურებული წინასწორებული მოდელები ამ დავალებში გამოიყენება, რომელიც ერთმანეთი წინასწორებულების და ვიზუალური ჩანაწერების შორის კოლექციების გამოყენება, მაგრამ რესიკურება ვებ კოპორა ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მონაცემები და მოდელები, რომლებიც მრავლელემების კლასიფიკაცია და ვიზუალური სიმენტიკური პროლის ნიშანებით დავსწავლოთ. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ a) მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია ამ დავალებისთვის აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი გენდერის წინასწორება და b) მოდელები, რომლებიც ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაცი მაგალითად, აკეთეტიური წაშლა 33% უფრო მეტი უფრო შესაძლებელია ქალების შესახებ, ვიდრე მამაკაცების შესახებ, და აკეთეტიური მოდელი უფრო მეტი აკეთეტირებას 68% განსხვავებას ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ კოპპუს-დონეზე გადაწყვეტილება, რომლებიც არსებობს სტრუქტურული წარმოდგენების მოდელების კალიბრება და ალგორიტიმის განზომილება, რომლებიც ლაგრეინიანის რელაქტი ჩვენი მეტი წარმოიდგენა პირდაპირად არაფერი კლასიფიკაცია და ვიზუალური სიმენტიკური პროლის ლაბლიკაციაზე, მაგრამ 47,5% და 40,5% გამრავლებული წარმოიდგენა.', 'hu': 'A nyelvet egyre inkább használják a gazdag vizuális felismerési problémák finomítására a webről származó képgyűjtemények támogatásával kapcsolatban. Ezekben a feladatokban strukturált előrejelzési modelleket használnak, hogy kihasználják az egyidejűleg előforduló címkék és a vizuális bemenetek közötti korrelációkat, de a webes korpuszokban található társadalmi elfogultságok véletlenül kódolását kockáztatják. Ebben a munkában a multilabel objektumok osztályozásához és vizuális szemantikai szerepkörcímkézéshez kapcsolódó adatokat és modelleket vizsgáljuk. Megállapítjuk, hogy (a) ezekre a feladatokra vonatkozó adatkészletek jelentős nemi elfogultságot tartalmaznak, és (b) ezekre az adatkészletekre képzett modellek tovább erősítik a meglévő elfogultságot. Például a tevékenységfőzés több mint 33%-kal nagyobb valószínűséggel vonja be a nőket, mint a férfiakat egy edzőkészletbe, és egy képzett modell tovább erősíti az eltérést a tesztidőben 68%-ra. Javasoljuk, hogy korpusz-szintű korlátokat fecskendezünk be a meglévő strukturált predikciós modellek kalibrálására és egy Lagrangian relaxációs algoritmust tervezünk a kollektív következtetésre. Módszerünk szinte semmilyen teljesítményvesztést nem eredményez az alapul szolgáló felismerési feladat esetében, de 47,5%-kal, illetve 40,5%-kal csökkenti a bias erősítés nagyságát a multilabel osztályozás és a vizuális szemantikus szerepkörjelölés esetében.', 'el': 'Η γλώσσα χρησιμοποιείται όλο και περισσότερο για να εξαλείψει τα πλούσια προβλήματα οπτικής αναγνώρισης με την υποστήριξη συλλογών εικόνων που προέρχονται από το διαδίκτυο. Τα δομημένα μοντέλα πρόβλεψης χρησιμοποιούνται σε αυτές τις εργασίες για να εκμεταλλευτούν τους συσχετισμούς μεταξύ των ταυτόχρονων ετικετών και της οπτικής εισόδου, αλλά κινδυνεύουν ακούσια να κωδικοποιήσουν κοινωνικές προκαταλήψεις που βρίσκονται στα σώματα ιστού. Στην εργασία αυτή μελετάμε δεδομένα και μοντέλα που σχετίζονται με την ταξινόμηση αντικειμένων πολλαπλών ετικετών και την οπτική σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι (α) τα σύνολα δεδομένων για αυτά τα καθήκοντα περιέχουν σημαντική προκατάληψη φύλου και (β) τα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται σε αυτά τα σύνολα δεδομένων ενισχύουν περαιτέρω την υπάρχουσα προκατάληψη. Για παράδειγμα, η δραστηριότητα μαγειρέματος είναι πάνω από 33% πιο πιθανό να εμπλακεί γυναίκες από άνδρες σε ένα σετ κατάρτισης, και ένα εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο ενισχύει περαιτέρω την ανισότητα σε 68% κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής. Προτείνουμε να εισαγάγουμε περιορισμούς σε επίπεδο σώματος για τη βαθμονόμηση των υφιστάμενων δομημένων μοντέλων πρόβλεψης και να σχεδιάσουμε έναν αλγόριθμο βασισμένο στη Λαγκρανγιανή χαλάρωση για συλλογικό συμπέρασμα. Η μέθοδος μας δεν έχει ως αποτέλεσμα σχεδόν καμία απώλεια απόδοσης για την υποκείμενη εργασία αναγνώρισης αλλά μειώνει το μέγεθος της ενίσχυσης της προκατάληψης κατά 47,5% και 40,5% για την ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών και την οπτική σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων, αντίστοιχα', 'it': "Il linguaggio è sempre più utilizzato per eliminare problemi di riconoscimento visivo ricchi con il supporto di collezioni di immagini provenienti dal web. Modelli strutturati di previsione sono utilizzati in questi compiti per sfruttare le correlazioni tra etichette co-esistenti e input visivi, ma rischiano inavvertitamente di codificare pregiudizi sociali trovati nei corpora web. In questo lavoro studiamo dati e modelli associati alla classificazione di oggetti multilabel e all'etichettatura semantica visiva dei ruoli. Troviamo che (a) i set di dati per questi compiti contengono una significativa polarizzazione di genere e (b) i modelli formati su questi set di dati amplificano ulteriormente la polarizzazione esistente. Ad esempio, la cucina dell'attività ha più del 33% di probabilità di coinvolgere le donne rispetto ai maschi in un set di allenamento, e un modello addestrato amplifica ulteriormente la disparità al 68% al momento del test. Proponiamo di iniettare vincoli a livello di corpus per calibrare modelli predittivi strutturati esistenti e progettare un algoritmo basato sul rilassamento Lagrangiano per inferenza collettiva. Il nostro metodo non comporta quasi alcuna perdita di prestazioni per l'attività di riconoscimento sottostante, ma diminuisce l'ampiezza dell'amplificazione del bias del 47,5% e del 40,5% rispettivamente per la classificazione multilabel e l'etichettatura semantica visiva dei ruoli, rispettivamente", 'lt': 'Kalba vis dažniau naudojama įvairioms vizualinio atpažinimo problemoms pašalinti remiant iš tinklo gautus vaizdo rinkinius. Šiose užduotyse naudojami struktūriniai prognozės modeliai, kad būtų galima pasinaudoti koreliacijomis tarp kartu esančių etikečių ir vaizdo įvedimų, tačiau kyla pavojus, kad netikėtai koduojami interneto korporoje nustatyti socialiniai nukrypimai. Šiame darbe mes tiriame duomenis ir modelius, susijusius su daugiamete objektų klasifikacija ir vizualiniu semantiniu vaidmens ženklinimu. Nustatome, kad a) šių užduočių duomenų rinkiniuose yra reikšmingos lyties pusiausvyros ir b) šiose duomenų rinkiniuose parengti modeliai dar labiau sustiprina esamą pusiausvyrą. Pavyzdžiui, daugiau kaip 33 proc. tikimybės, kad rengiant mokymo rinkinį dirba moterys nei vyrai, o parengtas model is dar labiau padidina skirtumą iki 68 proc. bandymo metu. Siūlome įšvirkšti korpuso lygio apribojimus, kad būtų galima kalibruoti esamus struktūrizuotus prognozavimo modelius ir sukurti algoritmą, pagrįstą Lagrangian relaxation kolektyvinėms išvadoms. Our method results in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5% and 40.5% for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively', 'ms': 'Bahasa semakin digunakan untuk menentukan masalah pengenalan visual yang kaya dengan sokongan koleksi imej yang berasal dari web. Model ramalan struktur digunakan dalam tugas ini untuk mengambil keuntungan dari korelasi antara label yang berlaku sama dan input visual tetapi risiko secara tidak sengaja mengekodkan biases sosial ditemui dalam korpra web. Dalam kerja ini, kami mempelajari data dan model yang berkaitan dengan klasifikasi objek multilabel dan label peranan semantik visual. Kami mendapati bahawa (a) set data untuk tugas ini mengandungi bias jenis yang signifikan dan (b) model dilatih pada set data ini lebih amplifikasi bias yang wujud. Contohnya, aktiviti memasak lebih 33% lebih mungkin melibatkan perempuan daripada lelaki dalam set latihan, dan model terlatih lebih meningkatkan perbezaan kepada 68% pada masa ujian. Kami cadangkan untuk menyuntik keterangan aras-corpus untuk mengkalibrasi model ramalan struktur yang ada dan merancang algoritma berdasarkan relaxation Lagrangian untuk kesimpulan kolektif. Kaedah kami mengakibatkan hampir tiada kerugian prestasi untuk tugas pengenalan yang didasarkan tetapi mengurangkan magnitud amplifikasi bias dengan 47.5% dan 40.5% untuk klasifikasi label berbilang dan label peranan semantik visual, berdasarkan', 'mk': 'Јазикот се користи сé повеќе за дефинирање на богатите проблеми со визуелното препознавање со поддршката на колекциите на слики кои се изврзани од интернет. Структурираните предвидувачки модели се користат во овие задачи за да се искористат корелациите помеѓу заедничките етикети и визуелните внесувања, но ризикуваат несреќно кодирање на социјалните предрасуди пронајдени во веб-корпората. Во оваа работа, ги проучуваме податоците и моделите поврзани со класификацијата на мултиетички објект и визуелното семантично означување на улогата. Најдовме дека (a) податоците за овие задачи содржат значителна генерална предрасуда и (b) моделите обучени на овие податоци понатаму ги зголемуваат постојните предрасуди. На пример, готвењето на активностите е повеќе од 33 отсто поголема веројатност да вклучува жени отколку мажи во вежбање, а обучениот модел понатаму ја зголемува разликата на 68 отсто во времето на тестот. Предложуваме да се инјектираат ограничувања на ниво на корпус за калибрирање на постојните структурни модели на предвидување и да се дизајнира алгоритм базиран на лагараншка релаксација за колективна инференција. Нашиот метод резултира со скоро никаква загуба на перформансата за задачата за признавање, но ја намалува големината на засилувањето на предрасудите за 47,5 отсто и 40,5 отсто за класификација на мултиетикетите и визуелно семантично означување на улогата, односно', 'mt': 'Language is increasingly being used to de-fine rich visual recognition problems with supporting image collections sourced from the web.  F’dawn il-kompiti jintużaw mudelli strutturati ta’ tbassir biex jieħdu vantaġġ mill-korrelazzjonijiet bejn it-tikketti li jseħħu fl-istess ħin u l-input viżwali iżda r-riskju li jiġu kkodifikati bi żball il-preġudizzji soċjali li jinsabu fil-korpra web. F’dan ix-xogħol, nistudjaw id-dejta u l-mudelli assoċjati mal-klassifikazzjoni ta’ oġġetti multitikkettati u t-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku viżwali. We find that (a) datasets for these tasks contain significant gender bias and (b) models trained on these datasets further amplify existing bias.  For example, the activity cooking is over 33% more likely to involve females than males in a training set, and a trained model further amplifies the disparity to 68% at test time.  We propose to inject corpus-level constraints for calibrating existing structured prediction models and design an algorithm based on Lagrangian relaxation for collective inference.  Our method results in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5% and 40.5% for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively', 'ml': 'വെബ്ബില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ചിത്ര സംഘങ്ങളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഭാഷ കൂടുതല്\u200d സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള കാഴ്ചപ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രവചന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ജോലികളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സഹസംഭവിക്കുന്ന ലേബലുകളും കാഴ്ച്ചലുകളും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പല്ലിറ്റബെല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനും കാഴ്ചകളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബിളില്\u200d  We find that (a) datasets for these tasks contain significant gender bias and (b) models trained on these datasets further amplify existing bias.  ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി, പാചകം ചെയ്യുന്നത് പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികളെക്കാള്\u200d പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികളെക്കാള്\u200d പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികളെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d 33% കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധ്യ നിലവിലുള്ള നിര്\u200dമ്മിതമായ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലിബിളേഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി കോര്\u200dപ്സ് നിലനിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഇഷ്ട്ടപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ജോലിക്ക് ഒരു പ്രധാനനനഷ്ടമല്ലാതായിരുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ബിയാസിന്റെ വലിപ്പം 47.5% കുറവാക്കുന്നു. മുള്\u200dട്', 'mn': 'Холбоо веб-ээс авсан зурагт цуглуулалтыг дэмжих боломжтой баян хүлээн зөвшөөрөх асуудлуудын тулд ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Структур таамаглалтын загварууд эдгээр даалгаварууд холбогдолтой загваруудыг ашиглахад хэрэглэгддэг. Гэхдээ веб корпоратын холбогдолтой нийгмийн загваруудыг эрсдэлгүй кодлох эрсдэлтэй. Энэ ажил дээр бид олон загварын объектийн хуваарилалт болон харагдах хэмжээний үйл ажиллагаатай холбогдсон өгөгдлийн болон загваруудыг судалдаг. Бид эдгээр ажлын (a) өгөгдлийн сангууд нь гендер байдал болон (b) загваруудыг эдгээр өгөгдлийн сангууд дээр сургалтын загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Жишээлбэл, үйл ажиллагааны хооллолт нь эрэгтэй хүмүүсээс илүү эмэгтэйчүүдийг дасгал хөдөлгөөнд оруулах магадлалтай 33%-аас илүү боломжтой. Сургуулсан загвар нь шалгалтын үед 68%-аас ялгааг нэмэгд Бид оршиж байгаа бүтээлтийн таамаглалтын загварыг калибр хийх корпус-түвшинд хязгаарлалтыг инжекциржүүлэх, Lagrangian хамтын халдварын тулд алгоритм зохион байгуулахыг санал болгож байна. Бидний арга нь ойролцоогоор хүлээн зөвшөөрөх үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнд бараг ямар ч үр дүнг алдахгүй гэхдээ ойролцоогоор 47.5% болон 40.5% нь ойролцоогоор хуваалцах, харин харагдах хэмжээний үйл ажиллагааны марки', 'pl': 'Język jest coraz częściej używany do usuwania bogatych problemów z rozpoznawaniem wizualnym poprzez obsługę kolekcji obrazów pochodzących z sieci. W tych zadaniach wykorzystywane są strukturalne modele predykcyjne, aby wykorzystać korelacje między współwystępującymi etykietami a wejściem wizualnym, ale ryzyko nieumyślnego zakodowania uprzedzeń społecznych znajdujących się w korpusach internetowych. W niniejszej pracy badamy dane i modele związane z wieloznakową klasyfikacją obiektów i wizualnym semantycznym oznaczaniem roli. Stwierdzono, że (a) zbiory danych dla tych zadań zawierają znaczące uprzedzenia płci, a (b) modele szkolone na tych zbiorach dodatkowo wzmacniają istniejące uprzedzenia. Na przykład, aktywność gotowania jest ponad 33% większe prawdopodobieństwo zaangażowania kobiet niż mężczyzn w zestaw treningowy, a przeszkolony model dodatkowo wzmacnia dysproporcję do 68% w czasie testu. Proponujemy wstrzyknięcie ograniczeń na poziomie korpusu do kalibracji istniejących ustrukturyzowanych modeli predykcyjnych oraz zaprojektowanie algorytmu opartego na relaksacji Lagranga dla wspólnego wnioskowania. Nasza metoda skutkuje prawie brakiem utraty wydajności dla podstawowego zadania rozpoznawania, ale zmniejsza wielkość wzmocnienia biasu o 47,5% i 40,5% dla klasyfikacji wieloznakowych i wizualnego oznaczania roli semantycznych.', 'ro': 'Limbajul este folosit din ce în ce mai mult pentru a elimina problemele bogate de recunoaștere vizuală prin sprijinirea colecțiilor de imagini provenite de pe web. Modelele structurate de predictie sunt folosite in aceste sarcini pentru a profita de corelatiile dintre etichetele care apar in comun si input vizual, dar risca sa codeze accidental prejudecatile sociale gasite in corporele web. În această lucrare, studiem datele și modelele asociate clasificării obiectelor multilabel și etichetării semantice vizuale a rolurilor. Observăm că (a) seturile de date pentru aceste sarcini conțin părtiniri semnificative de gen și (b) modelele instruite pe aceste seturi de date amplifică și mai mult părtinirea existentă. De exemplu, gătitul de activitate este cu peste 33% mai probabil să implice femeile decât bărbații într-un set de antrenament, iar un model instruit amplifică și mai mult disparitatea la 68% la momentul testului. Propunem injectarea constrângerilor la nivel de corpus pentru calibrarea modelelor de predicție structurate existente și proiectarea unui algoritm bazat pe relaxarea Lagrangiană pentru inferența colectivă. Metoda noastră duce la aproape nicio pierdere de performanță pentru sarcina de recunoaștere subiacentă, dar scade amploarea amplificarii bias cu 47,5% și, respectiv, 40,5% pentru clasificarea multilabel și etichetarea rolurilor semantice vizuale.', 'no': 'Språk blir større brukt for å gjenoppretta rike oppkjenningsproblemar med å støtta biletssamlingar som er kjerne frå nettet. Strukturerte forhåndsvising- modeller vert brukte i desse oppgåvene for å bruka forhåndsvising mellom samtidige etikettar og synlege inndata, men risiko for å dekke opp sosiale forhåndsvising i nettkorpora. I dette arbeidet studerer vi data og modeller som er assosiert med multilabel objektklassifikasjon og visuelle semantiske rolletiketting. Vi finn at a) dataseta for desse oppgåvene inneheld signifikante seks-forsiktighet og b) modeller trengte på desse dataseta større forstørrar eksisterande forsiktighet. For eksempel, aktivitetskoblinga er over 33% meir sannsynlegvis å involvera kvinner enn menn i eit opplæringssett, og ein treng modell styrer forskjellighet til 68% på testtid. Vi foreslår å injisera korpusnivåbegrensningar for å kalibrera eksisterande strukturerte forebyggingsmodeller og utforma ein algoritme basert på Lagrangian relaksjon for kolektive infeksjon. Metoden vårt fører til nesten ingen tap av utviklinga for den undergrunnleggjande oppgåva, men reduserer storleiken på forskyvingsforskyvinga med 47,5 % og 40,5 % for multimerkelapplassifikasjon og synlege semantiske rolletiketting.', 'so': 'Luqada waxaa loogu isticmaalaa dhibaatooyinka aqoonsiga aragga ee taajirka ah ee la xiriira kaalmada ururada sawirka ee internetka laga soo diro. Shaqooyinkaas waxaa lagu isticmaalaa qaabab la soo hor jeedo si ay u isticmaalaan xiriirka ka dhexeeya alaabta la soo soconayo iyo midibta aragga, laakiin khatar la’aan u qorayo hababka bulshada ee shabakadda laga helay. Shaqodaas waxan ku baranaynaa macluumaad iyo modelal la xiriira fasaxa alaabta wax badan oo kala duduwan iyo tababarka aragtida qayb ka mid ah. Waxaynu heli nahay (a) sawirada shaqaalahaas waxay ku jiraan tababarada jinsiga oo muhiim ah (b) iyo qaababka lagu baray sawirida danbiyadaas si dheeraad ah u sii kordhiya tababarada joogta. Tusaale ahaan cuntada dhaqaalaha waxaa ka badan 33% oo haweenka labka ka tirsan kara marka lagu sameeyo koorasyada waxbarashada, tusaale waxbarashaduna wuxuu kordhiyaa isbedelka ugu badnaanta 68% marka la tijaabiyo. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan soo jarno xaduudaha heerka qoyska si aan u xisaabinno qaababka la soo qoray oo lagu qoro algoritm oo lagu saleynayo qabsashada Lagrangian Shaqo aqoonsashada hoose ee aqoonsashada waxaa sabab u noqon kara kharash, laakiin wuxuu hoos u dhigi karaa koritaanka baahida waxyaabaha loo kordhiyo 47.5% iyo 40.5% fasaxa kala duduwan iyo qayb aragtida', 'si': 'භාෂාව වැඩියෙන් වෙබ් වලින් පින්තූර සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා පින්තූර සම්බන්ධය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය විශ්වාස මොඩල් භාවිතා වෙන්නේ මේ වැඩේ සම්බන්ධ ලේබල් සහ දිහා ඇතුළු අතර සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම මේ වැඩේ අපි දත්ත හා මොඩේල් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා මාළිලේබ් වර්ගයක් සමඟ සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සහ ප්\u200dරදේශ සෙමාන අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට මේ වැඩකට (a) දත්ත සේට් එක්ක විශේෂ සංවේදනය සහ (b) මොඩේල් එක්ක මේ දත්ත සේට් එක්ක උදාහරණයෙන්, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කුකියාව 33% වඩා වඩා පුරුද්ධිය පුරුද්ධියෙන් පුරුද්ධියෙක්ට වඩා පුරුද්ධියෙක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කොර්පුස් ලේවල් අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් කැලිබ්රේට් කරනවා තියෙන සංස්ථාවිත සංස්ථාවිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරතිචාර විසිද්ධ විශ්වාස නැති වෙන්නේ නැති ප්\u200dරතිචාර විසිද්ධ වැරදි විසිද්ධ විසිද්ධ විසිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් නමුත් 47', 'ta': 'மொழி வலைப்பிலிருந்து ஆதரிக்கப்பட்ட பிம்பத்தின் தொகுப்புகளை ஆதரிக்கும் பிரச்சனைகளை மேலும் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறத கட்டப்பட்ட முன்கூறு மாதிரிகள் இந்த பணிகளில் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது இணைய சிட்டைகள் மற்றும் காட்சி உள்ளீடு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பல்வேறு பொருள் வகைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் பார்வை அரைப்பு பங்கு விளையாட்டு பொருளுடன் இணைந்த தகவல (a) இந்த செயல்களுக்கான தகவல் அமைப்புகள் முக்கியமான பெண் ஒழுங்குகள் உள்ளன மற்றும் (b) இந்த தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதி For example, the activity cooking is over 33% more likely to involve females than males in a training set, and a trained model further amplifies the disparity to 68% at test time.  தற்போதைய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை அளவிட மற்றும் லாக்ரான்ஜினியான் அமைப்புக்கு அடிப்படையாக வடிவமைப்பை வடிவமைக்கவும். நம்முடைய முறைமையில் கிட்டத்தட்ட அடிப்படையான அடிப்படையான அறிவிப்பு பணிக்கு எந்த செயல் இழப்பும் இல்லை ஆனால் பியாஸ் அதிகரிப்பு 47.5% மற்றும் 40.5% மற்றும் பல வகு', 'sv': 'Språk används i allt högre grad för att avfina rika visuella igenkänningsproblem med stöd för bildsamlingar från webben. Strukturerade förutsägelsemodeller används i dessa uppgifter för att dra nytta av korrelationer mellan samtidiga etiketter och visuell input men riskerar oavsiktligt att koda sociala fördomar som finns i webbkorpor. I detta arbete studerar vi data och modeller kopplade till multilabel objektklassificering och visuell semantisk rollmärkning. Vi finner att (a) datauppsättningar för dessa uppgifter innehåller betydande könsbias och (b) modeller utbildade på dessa datauppsättningar ytterligare förstärker befintlig bias. Exempelvis är det mer än 33% mer sannolikt att aktivitetsmatlagning involverar kvinnor än män i ett träningsset, och en utbildad modell förstärker skillnaderna ytterligare till 68% vid testtillfället. Vi föreslår att man injicerar korpusnivåbegränsningar för kalibrering av befintliga strukturerade förutsägelsemodeller och utformar en algoritm baserad på Lagrangian relaxation för kollektiv inferens. Vår metod resulterar i nästan ingen prestandaförlust för den underliggande igenkänningsuppgiften men minskar storleken på bias förstärkning med 47,5% respektive 40,5% för multilabel klassificering respektive visuell semantisk rollmärkning.', 'sr': 'Jezik se sve više koristi za odlučivanje bogatih problema vizualnog priznanja sa podrškom kolekcija slika iz mreže. Strukturirani modeli predviđanja koriste se u ovim zadacima kako bi iskoristili korelaciju između zajedničkih etiketa i vizualnih ulaska, ali rizik nesmotreno kodiranja socijalnih predrasuda pronađenih u web korpori. U ovom poslu, proučavamo podatke i modele povezane sa klasifikacijom multilabel objekata i vizualnim semantičkim etiketom uloga. Nalazimo da a) podaci za ove zadatke sadrže značajne predrasude spola i b) modele obučene na ovim podacima dodatno povećavaju postojeće predrasude. Na primjer, kuhanje aktivnosti je više od 33% verovatnije da uključuje žene od muškaraca u obuku, a trenirani model dodatno povećava razliku od 68% u testu. Predlažemo da ubrizgavamo ograničenja na nivou korpusa za kalibraciju postojećih strukturiranih modela predviđanja i dizajniramo algoritam na osnovu opuštanja Lagrangiana za kolektivnu infekciju. Naš metod rezultira skoro bez gubitka uspeha za temeljni zadatak priznanja, ali smanjuje veličinu pojačanja pristrasnosti za 47,5% i 40,5% za multietičku klasifikaciju i vizualnu semantičku etiketu uloge, odgovarajući,', 'ur': 'زبان بہت زیادہ استعمال کی جاتی ہے کہ ویب سے موجود ہونے والی تصاویر مجموعے کی مدد کرتی ہے۔ ساختہ پیش بینی موڈل ان کاموں میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ ان کے ساتھ شروع ہونے والی لابلوں اور تصویر اینپیٹ کے درمیان تعلقات کا فائدہ اٹھانے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں لیکن وئب کورپورا میں حاضر ہونے کے باعث خطرہ غیر جانے کے ساتھ ہم اس کام میں ڈیٹا اور موڈل پڑھتے ہیں جو ملتی لابلیٹ Objekٹ کلاسیفوں اور دیدھی سیمنٹی رول لابلیٹ کے ساتھ مرتبہ ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ ان کاموں کے لئے (a) ڈیٹ سٹ میں اہم جنس کی بحث اور (b) نمونڈل ہیں جو ان ڈیٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی گئی ہیں اور اس سے زیادہ موجود بحث کو اضافہ کریں۔ مثال یہ ہے کہ فعالیت پیدا کرنے کی تقویت 33% سے زیادہ شانس ہے کہ مردوں سے زیادہ مادہ پیدا کریں، اور تربیت کی مدل آگے 68% کی تقویت کی تقویت کی تقویت کی تقویت کی تقویت کرے گی۔ ہم پیشنهاد کریں کہ موجود ساختاری پیش بینی موڈلیوں کی کالیبراٹ کرنے کے لئے کورپوس سطح کے تنظیمات کا ذخیره کریں اور ایک الگوریٹم کو لاگرینیان کے ذریعہ آسانی کے ذریعہ بنیاد رکھے۔ ہمارا طریقہ تقریباً کسی طریقہ کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ پہچان کے کام کے لئے کبھی اثبات ضائع نہیں ہوتا لیکن مختلف لیبل کلاسیفوں اور دیدہ سیمانٹی رول لیبلینگ کے ذریعہ 47.5% اور 40.5% کے ذریعہ کم کرتا ہے', 'kk': 'Тілді интернеттен көмектесетін кескіндер жиындарын қолдау үшін баяны көрінетін мәселелерді таңдау үшін қолданылады. Бұл тапсырмаларда құрылған алдын- алау үлгілері қолданылады, бірақ веб- корпорада табылған жарлық жарлықтар мен көрінетін енгізу арасындағы қатынастарды қолдану үшін қолданылады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз көп жарлық нысандардың классификациясы мен визуалдық семантикалық роль жарлығымен байланысты деректер мен моделдерді зерттейміз. Бұл тапсырмалар үшін (a) деректер қорларында маңызды гендерлік қарсы және (b) үлгілері бар деректер қорларында оқыту үлгілері бар. Мысалы, белсенділік жасау үшін әйелдерді бақылау бағдарламасында әйелдерден 33% артық болады, және бақылау үлгісі тексеру уақытында 68% дегенді көтереді. Біз қорпус деңгейіндегі шектеулерді бар құрылған таңдау үлгілерін калибрлеу үшін инжекциялау және коллективтік инференцияларына негізделген Lagrangian алгоритмді құруға жұмыс береміз. Біздің әдіміміз көп жарлық классификациялық және визуалдық семантикалық рольді жарлықтау үшін 47,5% және 40,5% көп жарлық түрлендіру және көрінетін семантикалық тапсырмалардың жарлығын шектеу ү', 'uz': "Tilni veb- sahifa manbasiga rasm to ʻplamlarini qoʻllash uchun yordam beradi. Ushbu vazifalarda quyidagi taqdimot modellari bilan birlashtirilgan lab- ketlik va ko'rinish tarkibini foydalanish uchun ishlatiladi, lekin veb- korporiyadagi jamiyatlarni kodlash muvaffaqiyatsiz yoʻq. Bu ishda biz ko'plab obʼekt darajasini va ko'rinish semantik roli lab chiqarish bilan bog'liq maʼlumot va modellarni o'rganamiz. Biz shu vazifalar uchun maʼlumotlar tarkibini aniqlash mumkin va bu maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi bir muhim jinsiyalar bilan o'rganish modellari (b) mavjud kompaniyalarni oshirish mumkin. Masalan, tashkilotni 3% dan ortiq qo'llashni o'rganish mumkin, va o'rganish modeli sinov vaqtda 68% ta'minligini oshirish mumkin. Biz mavjud tasavvur modellarini kalitlash uchun qopyuz darajasining tartiblarini kiritishingizni talab qilamiz va Lagrangian birlashtirish uchun algoritni tasavvur qilamiz. Bizning usuli asosiy tashkilotni tasdiqlash vazifasi qo'shish uchun hech qachon narsa yo'qotmaydi, balki bizning chegarasini 47.5% va 40.5% ko'paytirish va ko'pgina semantik raqamlarini ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ ngày càng được dùng để giải tỏa các vấn đề nhận diện thị giác giàu có với việc hỗ trợ các bộ sưu tập ảnh nguồn từ trang web. Những mô- đun dự đoán cấu trúc được sử dụng trong các công việc này để lợi dụng sự liên kết giữa các nhãn đồng hiện tại và nhập trực giác nhưng có thể vô tình mã hóa các giả lập xã hội được tìm thấy trên mạng. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu dữ liệu và các mô hình liên quan đến phân loại vật thể đa hiệu và phân loại hình thức. Chúng tôi thấy rằng (a) các tập tin cho các công việc này chứa quan trọng phân biệt giới tính và (b) các mô hình được đào tạo trên các tập tin này tăng thêm khả năng tồn tại. Ví dụ, khả năng nấu ăn cao hơn 33=)) có thể liên quan phụ nữ hơn nam giới trong một bộ huấn luyện, và một mô hình được huấn luyện tăng cường sự khác biệt với 68=nữavào giờ thử nghiệm. Chúng tôi đề nghị tiêm những giới hạn trên tập đoàn để ước lượng các mô hình dự đoán cấu trúc hiện tại và thiết kế một thuật to án dựa trên độ thoải mái Lagrange cho ngụ ý chung. Cách của chúng tôi không có mất hiệu suất cho nhiệm vụ nhận dạng cơ bản, nhưng giảm độ lớn của khuếch đại khuynh hướng với 475. và 400.5=.* cho phân hạng thẻ xanh và nhãn chữ nghĩa.', 'nl': 'Taal wordt steeds vaker gebruikt om rijke visuele herkenningsproblemen te verwijderen met ondersteuning van beeldcollecties afkomstig van het web. Gestructureerde voorspellingsmodellen worden gebruikt in deze taken om te profiteren van correlaties tussen co-voorkomende labels en visuele input, maar het risico lopen om onbedoeld sociale vooroordelen in webcorpora te coderen. In dit werk bestuderen we gegevens en modellen geassocieerd met multilabel objectclassificatie en visuele semantische rollabeling. We vinden dat (a) datasets voor deze taken significante gender bias bevatten en (b) modellen die op deze datasets zijn getraind, bestaande bias verder versterken. Bijvoorbeeld, de activiteit koken is meer dan 33% waarschijnlijker om vrouwen te betrekken dan mannen in een trainingsset, en een getraind model versterkt de ongelijkheid verder tot 68% op testtijd. We stellen voor om corpusniveau beperkingen te injecteren voor het kalibreren van bestaande gestructureerde voorspellingsmodellen en een algoritme te ontwerpen gebaseerd op Lagrange relaxatie voor collectieve inferentie. Onze methode resulteert in bijna geen prestatieverlies voor de onderliggende herkenningstak, maar vermindert de grootte van bias versterking met 47,5% en 40,5% voor multilabel classificatie en visuele semantische rollabeling, respectievelijk', 'bg': 'Езикът все повече се използва за отстраняване на проблемите с визуалното разпознаване с помощта на колекции от изображения, получени от интернет. В тези задачи се използват структурирани модели за прогнозиране, за да се възползват от корелациите между съвместните етикети и визуалния вход, но рискуват неволно да кодират социалните пристрастия, открити в уеб корпоративните корпуси. В тази работа се изследват данни и модели, свързани с многоетикетната класификация на обекти и визуалното семантично етикетиране на ролята. Установяваме, че (а) наборите от данни за тези задачи съдържат значителни полови отклонения и (б) моделите, обучени по тези набори от данни допълнително усилват съществуващите отклонения. Например, активното готвене е с над 33% по-вероятно да включва жени, отколкото мъже в комплект за обучение, а обученият модел допълнително увеличава различието до 68% по време на теста. Предлагаме да се инжектират ограничения на корпусно ниво за калибриране на съществуващи структурирани модели за прогнозиране и да се разработи алгоритъм, базиран на Лагрангова релаксация за колективно заключение. Методът ни не води до почти никаква загуба на производителност за основната задача за разпознаване, но намалява мащаба на усилването на отклоненията съответно с 47,5% и 40,5% за класификация с многоетикети и визуално семантично етикетиране на ролята.', 'de': 'Sprache wird zunehmend verwendet, um komplexe Probleme bei der visuellen Erkennung zu beseitigen, indem Bildsammlungen aus dem Web unterstützt werden. Strukturierte Vorhersagemodelle werden in diesen Aufgaben verwendet, um Korrelationen zwischen nebeneinander auftretenden Labels und visuellem Input zu nutzen, riskieren aber versehentlich soziale Verzerrungen in Web-Korpora zu kodieren. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir Daten und Modelle, die mit Multilabel-Objektklassifikation und visueller semantischer Rollenbeschriftung verbunden sind. Wir finden, dass (a) Datensätze für diese Aufgaben signifikante Gender Bias enthalten und (b) Modelle, die auf diesen Datensätzen trainiert werden, bestehende Bias weiter verstärken. Zum Beispiel ist die Aktivität Kochen über 33% wahrscheinlicher, Frauen als Männer in ein Trainingsset einzubeziehen, und ein trainiertes Modell verstärkt die Disparität zur Testzeit auf 68% weiter. Wir schlagen vor, Einschränkungen auf Korpusebene für die Kalibrierung bestehender strukturierter Vorhersagemodelle zu injizieren und einen Algorithmus basierend auf Lagrange Relaxation für kollektive Inferenzen zu entwerfen. Unsere Methode führt zu nahezu keinem Leistungsverlust für die zugrunde liegende Erkennungsaufgabe, verringert aber die Größe der Bias-Verstärkung um 47,5% und 40,5% für die Multilabel-Klassifizierung bzw. visuelle semantische Rollenbeschriftung.', 'da': 'Sprog bliver i stigende grad brugt til at affine rige visuelle genkendelsesproblemer med understøttelse af billedsamlinger, der stammer fra internettet. Strukturerede forudsigelsesmodeller bruges i disse opgaver til at drage fordel af korrelationer mellem samtidig forekommende etiketter og visuel input, men risikerer utilsigtet at kode sociale fordomme fundet i web corpora. I dette arbejde studerer vi data og modeller forbundet med multilabel objektklassificering og visuel semantisk rollemærkning. Vi konstaterer, at (a) datasæt til disse opgaver indeholder betydelig kønsbias og (b) modeller, der er trænet på disse datasæt, yderligere forstærker eksisterende bias. For eksempel er det mere end 33% mere sandsynligt, at aktivitetsmadlavningen involverer kvinder end mænd i et træningssæt, og en uddannet model forstærker forskellen yderligere til 68% på testtidspunktet. Vi foreslår at indsprøjte korpusniveau begrænsninger til kalibrering af eksisterende strukturerede forudsigelsesmodeller og designe en algoritme baseret på Lagrangian afslapning for kollektiv inferens. Vores metode resulterer i næsten intet performance tab for den underliggende genkendelse opgave, men reducerer størrelsen af bias forstærkning med henholdsvis 47,5% og 40,5% for multilabel klassificering og visuel semantisk rollemærkning.', 'hr': 'Jezik se sve više koristi za odlučivanje bogatih problema vizualnog priznanja s podrškom kolekcija slika iz interneta. Strukturirani modeli predviđanja koriste se u ovim zadacima kako bi iskoristili korelacije između zajedničkih etiketa i vizualnih ulaska, ali rizik nesvjesno kodiranja socijalnih predrasuda pronađenih u web korpori. U ovom poslu proučavamo podatke i modele povezane s klasifikacijom multietičkih objekata i označavanjem vizuelne semantičke uloge. Nalazimo da a) podaci za te zadatke sadrže značajne predrasude spola i b) modele obučene na ovim podacima dodatno povećavaju postojeće predrasude. Na primjer, kuhanje aktivnosti je preko 33% vjerojatno uključujući žene od muškaraca u obuku, a obučeni model dalje povećava razliku od 68% u vrijeme testiranja. Predlažemo injekciju ograničenja na razini korpusa za kalibraciju postojećih strukturiranih modela predviđanja i dizajniranje algoritma na osnovu opuštanja Lagrangiana za kolektivnu infekciju. Naš metod rezultira skoro bez gubitka učinkovitosti za temeljni zadatak priznanja, ali smanjuje veličinu pojačanja pristrasnosti za 47,5% i 40,5% za višeetičku klasifikaciju i označavanje vizuelne semantičke uloge.', 'id': 'Bahasa semakin digunakan untuk menentukan masalah pengenalan visual yang kaya dengan mendukung koleksi gambar yang berasal dari web. Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of correlations between co-occurring labels and visual input but risk inadvertently encoding social biases found in web corpora.  Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempelajari data dan model yang berhubungan dengan klasifikasi objek multilabel dan label peran semantis visual. Kami menemukan bahwa (a) dataset untuk tugas ini mengandung bias jenis yang signifikan dan (b) model yang dilatih pada dataset ini lebih amplifikasi bias yang ada. Contohnya, aktivitas memasak lebih dari 33% lebih mungkin melibatkan perempuan daripada laki-laki dalam set latihan, dan model terlatih lebih meningkatkan ketidakpersamaan ke 68% pada waktu tes. Kami mengusulkan untuk menyuntik batas tingkat tubuh untuk mengkalibrasi model prediksi strukturasi yang ada dan merancang algoritma berdasarkan relaxasi Lagrangian untuk kesimpulan kolektif. Metode kami mengakibatkan hampir tidak ada kehilangan prestasi untuk tugas pengenalan dasar tetapi mengurangi ukuran amplifikasi bias dengan 47,5% dan 40,5% untuk klasifikasi multilabel dan penandaian peran semantis visual, secara respektif', 'ko': '언어는 점점 더 풍부한 시각적 식별 문제를 해결하고 웹에서 온 이미지 수집을 지원하는 데 사용되고 있다.이러한 임무에서 구조화 예측 모델은 공현 라벨과 시각적 입력 간의 관련성을 이용하는 데 사용되지만 무의식중에 인터넷 자료 라이브러리에서 발견된 사회적 편견을 인코딩할 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 다중 라벨 대상의 분류와 시각적 의미 역할 표기와 관련된 데이터와 모델을 연구했다.우리는 (a) 이러한 임무의 데이터 집합은 현저한 성별 편견을 포함하고 (b) 이러한 데이터 집합에서 훈련하는 모델은 기존의 편견을 더욱 확대시켰다.예를 들어 훈련이 집중되면 여성이 요리 활동에 참여할 가능성이 남성보다 33% 이상 높았고, 훈련을 거친 모델은 테스트 시 68% 로 격차를 확대했다.우리는 어료 라이브러리 단계의 제약을 주입하여 기존의 구조화 예측 모델을 교정하고 라그랑의 해이한 집단 추리 알고리즘을 바탕으로 설계할 것을 제안한다.우리의 방법은 기본 식별 임무에서 성능 손실이 거의 없지만 다중 라벨 분류와 시각적 의미 역할 표기에서 편차 확대의 폭은 각각 47.5%와 40.5% 낮아졌다', 'sw': 'Lugha inatumiwa kuongezeka kwa matatizo ya kutambua vizuri vya kuona na kusaidia mkusanyiko wa picha zilizotoka kwenye mtandao wa intaneti. Mradi wa utabiri uliotengenezwa hutumiwa katika kazi hizi ili kutumia uhusiano kati ya mabango yanayotokea pamoja na mazingira ya kuona lakini hatari bila kujali kuingia upendeleo wa kijamii uliopo kwenye kampuni ya mtandaoni. Katika kazi hii, tunasoma takwimu na mifano inayohusiana na usambazaji wa vitu vingi vingi na jukumu la sekunde la kuonekana. Tunapata taarifa za kazi hizi zina upendeleo mkubwa wa jinsia na (b) mifano inayofundishwa kwenye seti hizi za taarifa zinaongeza upendeleo uliopo zaidi. Kwa mfano, matengenezo ya harakati ni zaidi ya asilimia 33 zaidi ya uwezekano wa kuwashirikisha wanawake kuliko wanaume katika seti ya mafunzo, na mtindo wa mafunzo unaongezea tofauti na asilimia 68 kwa wakati wa jaribio. Tunazipendekeza kuingiza vizuizi vya kiwango cha makampuni kwa kuchukua mifano ya utabiri uliopo na kutengeneza algorithi inayotokana na mapumziko ya Lagrangian kwa ajili ya mgonjwa wa pamoja. Our method results in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5% and 40.5% for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively', 'sq': 'Gjuha po përdoret gjithnjë e më tepër për të zbukuruar problemet e pasura të njohjes vizuale me mbështetjen e koleksioneve të imazheve të nxjerra nga rrjeti. Modelet e strukturuar të parashikimit përdoren në këto detyra për të përfituar nga korrelacionet midis etiketave bashkëndodhëse dhe hyrjeve vizuale por rrezikojnë të kodojnë pa qëllim paragjykimet sociale të gjetura në web corpora. Në këtë punë, ne studiojmë të dhëna dhe modele të lidhura me klasifikimin e objekteve me shumë etiketa dhe etiketin e rolit semantik vizual. Ne gjejmë se (a) grupet e të dhënave për këto detyra përmbajnë paragjykime të rëndësishme gjinore dhe (b) modelet e trajnuara në këto grupe të dhënash amplifikojnë më tej paragjykimet ekzistuese. Për shembull, gatimi i veprimtarisë ka mbi 33% më shumë gjasa të përfshijë femra se meshkuj në një set stërvitjeje dhe një model i stërvitur amplifikon më tej dallimin në 68% në kohën e testit. Ne propozojmë të injektojmë kufizime në nivelin e trupit për kalibrimin e modeleve ekzistuese të strukturuara të parashikimit dhe të dizajnojmë një algoritëm bazuar në relaksionin lagrangian për përfundimin kolektiv. Metoda jonë rezulton në pothuajse asnjë humbje performance për detyrën bazë të njohjes por zvogëlon madhësinë e amplifikimit të paragjykimit me 47.5% dhe 40.5% për klasifikimin e shumë-etiketave dhe etiketin vizual semantik të rolit, respektivisht', 'tr': 'Diller web tarapyndan berilen surat toplumlaryny desteklemek üçin baý görnüş hasaplamak üçin ullanýar. Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of the co-occurring labels and visual input between correlations, but risk unfortunately encoding social biases found in web corpora. Bu işde, multilabel nesne klasifikasyyla ve görsel semantik rol etiketlerle ilgili maglumatlar we modelleri öwrenýärdik. Bu görevler üçin (a) veri setirlerimizde nähili jentiller bias we (b) nusgalarynda bu veri setirlerinde okuwçylan örän möhüm biçimleri bardyr. mysal ýaly, nahar bişirmek üçin 33%-den gowurak a ýallar erkeklerden öňünde täsirler bolup biler, we bu bilim nusgasy testiň wagtynda 68% däldigini artýar. Biz bar döredilmiş öngörüm modellerini kalibrlemek üçin korpus derejesi çöplüklemegi we toplam hasaplamak üçin Lagrangian umydygynda bir algoritmus düzenlemegi teklip edýäris. Bizim yöntemimiz ilk tanıma görevi üçin hiç bir etkenlik kaybına uğramıyor, fakat multi-etiketli klasifikasyon ve görsel semantik rol etiketlemesi için 47.5% ve 40.5% tarafından büyüklenmesini azaltıyor.', 'af': "Taal word vermeerder gebruik om ryk visuele herkening probleems te affineer met ondersteun van beeldversamelings wat uit die web geskep is. Struktuurde voorskou modele word gebruik in hierdie taak om voordeel van korrelasies te neem tussen saam- voorgekom etikette en visuele invoer, maar risiko ongelukkig enkodering sosiale voorspoedies in web korpora gevind word. In hierdie werk studeer ons data en modele wat geassosieer is met multilabel objekteklassifikasie en visuele semantiese roletiketing. Ons vind dat (a) datastelle vir hierdie opdragte betekende geneemde bias bevat en (b) modele wat op hierdie datastelle opgelei is, verder bestaande bias versterk. Byvoorbeeld, die aktiviteit koeking is meer waarskynlik om vroue as manne in 'n onderwerp stel te insluit, en 'n onderwerp model verder die verskilligheid tot 68% by toets tyd vergroot. Ons voorstel om corpus-vlak beheinings te inprop vir kalibreer van bestaande struktureerde voorskou modele en 'n algoritme te ontwerp wat gebaseer is op Lagrangian relaksie vir kolektiewe infeksie. Ons metode resulteer in amper geen prestasie verlies vir die onderstelde herken taak, maar verklein die groot groot van bias versterking deur 47.5% en 40.5% vir multilabel klassifikasie en visuele semantiese roletiketting, respektief", 'hy': 'Language is increasingly being used to de-fine rich visual recognition problems with supporting image collections sourced from the web.  Այս խնդիրներում օգտագործվում են կառուցված կանխատեսման մոդելներ, որպեսզի օգտագործեն համատեղվող պիտակների և տեսողական ներմուծների միջև կապը, բայց վտանգ ունեն, որ անպատահաբար կոդավորվում են սոցիալական կողմնականությունները, որոնք գտնվում են վե Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տվյալներ և մոդելներ, որոնք կապված են բազմաթիկված օբյեկտների դասակարգման և վիզուալ սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակումների հետ: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ a) այս խնդիրների տվյալների համակարգերը պարունակում են նշանակալի գենդերային կողմնականություն և b) այս տվյալների համակարգերի վրա վարժեցված մոդելները ավելի լայնացնում են գոյություն ունեցող կողմն Օրինակ, ակտիվության խոհարարությունը ավելի քան 33 տոկոսով ավելի հավանական է կանանց ներգրավելու, քան տղամարդկանց ուսուցման համակարգում, և ուսուցման մոդելը ևս աճեցնում է անհավասարությունը մինչև 68 տոկոսով: We propose to inject corpus-level constraints for calibrating existing structured prediction models and design an algorithm based on Lagrangian relaxation for collective inference.  Our method results in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5% and 40.5% for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively', 'fa': 'زبان بیشتر برای مشکلات شناسایی بینایی پولدار با پشتیبانی جمع\u200cآوری تصویر از وب استفاده می\u200cشود. مدل پیش بینی ساخته شده در این وظیفه استفاده می\u200cشود تا از ارتباطات بین نقاشی\u200cهای همکاری و ورودی دیده\u200cای استفاده کند، ولی خطر بی\u200cآگاهی تغییرات اجتماعی کودکان\u200cدهندگی\u200cهای اجتماعی که در وب شرکت پیدا شده است. در این کار، ما داده\u200cها و مدل\u200cها را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که با برچسب نقش\u200cهای سیمانتیک و برچسب نقش\u200cهای متنوع\u200cلوژه\u200cها و نقش\u200cهای متنوع\u200cلوژه\u200cها ارتباط دارند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که (a) مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها برای این وظیفه\u200cها شامل حوادث بزرگی جنسی و (b) مدل\u200cهای آموزش یافته در این مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها جایگزین کردند. برای مثال، آشپزی فعالیت بیشتر از ۳۳ درصد احتمال بیشتری است که زنان از مردان در مجموعه آموزش شامل باشند، و یک مدل آموزش یافته بیشتر تفاوت به ۶۸ درصد در زمان آزمایش افزایش دهد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که محدودیت سطح کورپوس را تزریق کنیم تا مدلهای پیش بینی ساختار موجود باشد و الگوریتم را طراحی کنیم که بر اساس آرامش لاگرینیان برای آلودگی جمع است. روش ما به نتیجه تقریباً هیچ خسارت عملکرد برای کار شناسایی بنیادی نتیجه نمی\u200cدهد ولی ارتفاع افزایش طبیعی را با 47.5% و 40.5% کاهش می\u200cدهد برای برچسب نقشه\u200cهای متنوع لیبل\u200cها و نقشه\u200cهای متنوعی دیده', 'az': 'Dil İnternettən qurulmuş surat koleksiyonlarını dəstəkləmək üçün zəngin görüntü tanıması problemlərini dəstəkləmək üçün daha çox istifadə edir. Yapılandırılmış tədbir modelləri bu işdə istifadə edilir ki, şəkli etiketlər və göylər giriş arasındakı bağlantılardan faydalanmaq üçün istifadə edərlər, amma web korporasında bulunan sosyal tədbirləri təhlükəsizlikdə təhlükəsizlik edərlər. Bu işdə, çoxlu etiketli objek klasifikasyonunla birlikdə məlumatları və modelləri təhsil edirik. Bu işlər üçün a) verilən qurğular cins tərzlərini və b) modellərini bu verilən qurğularda daha çox genişləndirir. Məsələn, fəaliyyət yeməyi erkəklərdən daha çox qadınları təhsil qurmasında məcburiyyət etmək üçün 33%-dən artırar və təhsil edilən modeli test vaxtında 68%-dən daha çox fəaliyyəti artırar. Biz quruluş tədbirli modelləri kalibrləmək üçün korpus səviyyəsi müəyyənləşdirmək və Lagrangian birlikdə infeksiya üçün dayanan bir algoritm dizayn etmək istəyirik. Bizim metodlarımız müəyyən edilən tanıma görevi üçün yaxınlaşdırılmaz, lakin çoxlu etiketlər klasifikasyonu və görsel semantik rol etiketi üçün 47,5% və 40,5% tərəfindən çoxlu etiketlərin böyüklüyünü azaldırır.', 'bs': 'Jezik se sve više koristi za odlučivanje bogatih problema vizualnog priznanja s podrškom kolekcija slika iz interneta. Strukturirani modeli predviđanja koriste se u ovim zadacima kako bi iskoristili korelacije između zajedničkih etiketa i vizualnih ulaska, ali rizik nesvjesno kodiranja socijalnih predrasuda pronađenih u web korpori. U ovom poslu, proučavamo podatke i modele povezane sa klasifikacijom multietiketnih objekata i vizualnim etiketom semantičkih uloga. Nalazimo da a) podaci za te zadatke sadrže značajne predrasude spola i b) modele obučene na ovim podacima dodatno povećavaju postojeće predrasude. Na primjer, kuhanje aktivnosti je više od 33% vjerojatnije da uključuje žene od muškaraca u obuku, a obučeni model dodatno povećava razliku od 68% u vrijeme testa. Predlažemo injekciju ograničenja na nivou korpusa za kalibraciju postojećih strukturiranih modela predviđanja i dizajniranje algoritma na osnovu opuštanja Lagrangiana za kolektivnu infekciju. Naš metod rezultira skoro bez gubitka učinka za temeljni zadatak priznanja, ali smanjuje veličinu pojačanja pristrasnosti za 47,5% i 40,5% za multietičku klasifikaciju i vizualnu semantičku etiketu uloga, odgovarajući,', 'bn': 'ওয়েব থেকে উৎস প্রকাশিত ছবি সংগ্রহের সমর্থনে ভাষা ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে সমৃদ্ধ দৃশ্য স্বীকারের সমস্যার জন্য। Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of correlations between co-occurring labels and visual input but risk inadvertently encoding social biases found in web corpora.  এই কাজে আমরা বহুটিলাবেল বস্তুর বিভাগ এবং দৃশ্যমান সেম্যান্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেলের সাথে সম্পর্কিত তথ্য ও মডেল পড়ি। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি (a) এই কাজের জন্য ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ লিঙ্গের বিরুদ্ধে প্রশিক্ষণ রয়েছে এবং (b) এই ডাটাটাসেটে প্রশ উদাহরণস্বরূপ, এই কার্যকর রান্নায় পুরুষদের চেয়ে ৩৩% বেশী সম্ভবত পুরুষের সাথে প্রশিক্ষিত এবং প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল পরীক্ষায় ৬৮% বিভি আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বিদ্যমান ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী মডেল ক্যালিবার করার জন্য কোর্পাস-স্তরের নিয়ম নিষেধাজ্ঞা চালানোর জন্য এবং লাগ্রাঙ্গিয়ানের সংগ Our method results in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5% and 40.5% for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively', 'am': 'ቋንቋ በተጨማሪው የሀብታም ዓይነት ማውቀት ችግር ለመጠቀም ይደረጋል፡፡ የተመሠረቱት የውይይት ዓይነቶች በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ በተቀማሚ ምልክቶች እና ማየት ውስጥ ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም ይጠቀማሉ፤ ነገር ግን በመረብ ኮርፖራ ውስጥ የተገኘውን ማኅበራዊ ድጋፍ ማኅበራዊ ጉዳይ ማኅበራዊ ክፍል ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈራ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ላይ ዳርተቶችንና ሞዴሎችን በብዙ አካባቢል አካል መግለጫ እና ራእይ የsemantic role ማሳየት እናስተምራለን፡፡ (a) ለዚህ ስራ ዳታ ዘርጊዎች የሴት ውጤቶች እና (b) ምሳሌዎች በዚህ ዳታተኞቹ ተማርተዋል የሚኖረውን ብሔራዊ ጥያቄ እንዲያበዛ እናገኛለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ የጥያቄው ማብሰብ ከወንዶች ይልቅ ሴቶችን ማግባት የሚችል ከ33 በመቶ የበለጠ ነው፤ በተፈተናው ጊዜ የተማረ ሞዴል በጥያቄው 68 በመቶ ይጨምርበታል፡፡ የካርፓስ ደረጃ ግንኙነትን ለመቀነስ እና ለላግርግንጋኒያን ጥላቻ ለመጠቀም የተገኘውን የውይይት አካላትን ለመቀበል እና ለመፍጠር እናስባለን፡፡ የውይይት ማስታወቂያው ስራ ለማድረግ ጉዳይ የጎዳና ጉዳይ አይሆንም፣ ነገር ግን የብሔራዊ ሽፋን በ47.5 በመቶ እና 40.5 በመቶ ለብዛት መፍታት እና ለራእዩ የsemantic ተግባር ማሳየት ያሳንፋል፡፡', 'cs': 'Jazyk se stále více používá k odstranění bohatých problémů s vizuálním rozpoznáváním díky podpoře sbírek obrázků zdrojovaných z webu. V těchto úkolech se používají strukturované predikční modely k využití korelací mezi současně vyskytujícími se štítky a vizuálními vstupy, ale riziko neúmyslného kódování sociálních předsudků nalezených ve webových korpusech. V této práci studujeme data a modely spojené s klasifikací multilabel objektů a vizuálním sémantickým označováním rolí. Zjišťujeme, že (a) datové sady pro tyto úkoly obsahují významnou genderovou předpojatost a (b) modely trénované na těchto datových sadách dále zesilují existující předpojatost. Například aktivita vaření je více než 33% pravděpodobnější, že do tréninkové sady zahrnuje ženy než samci, a trénovaný model dále zesiluje disparitu na 68% v době testu. Navrhujeme vstříknout omezení na úrovni korpusu pro kalibraci existujících strukturovaných predikčních modelů a navrhnout algoritmus založený na Lagrangově relaxaci pro kolektivní inferenci. Naše metoda má za následek téměř žádné ztráty výkonu pro základní úlohu rozpoznávání, ale snižuje velikost zesílení biasu o 47,5% a 40,5% pro klasifikaci víceštítků a vizuální sémantické označování rolí', 'fi': 'Kieltä käytetään yhä enemmän rikkaiden visuaalisten tunnistusongelmien poistamiseen verkosta hankittujen kuvakokoelmien tukemisessa. Näissä tehtävissä käytetään strukturoituja ennustemalleja, joilla hyödynnetään samanaikaisten etikettien ja visuaalisen syötteen välisiä korrelaatioita, mutta vaarana on, että verkkokorpusissa esiintyvät sosiaaliset harhat koodataan tahattomasti. Tässä työssä tutkitaan aineistoa ja malleja, jotka liittyvät monimerkkiseen objektiluokitukseen ja visuaaliseen semanttiseen roolimerkintään. Havaitsemme, että (a) näiden tehtävien aineistot sisältävät merkittävää sukupuoliharhaa ja (b) näihin aineistoihin koulutetut mallit vahvistavat edelleen olemassa olevaa harhaa. Esimerkiksi aktiivisuusruoanlaittoon liittyy yli 33 prosenttia todennäköisemmin naisia kuin miehiä koulutussarjaan, ja koulutettu malli lisää eroja edelleen 68 prosenttiin testiaikana. Ehdotamme korpustason rajoitusten injektointia olemassa olevien strukturoitujen ennustemallien kalibrointia varten ja suunnittelemme Lagrangen rentoutumiseen perustuvan algoritmin kollektiivista päättelyä varten. Menetelmämme ei aiheuta lähes mitään suorituskyvyn heikkenemistä taustalla olevassa tunnistustehtävässä, mutta vähentää bias-vahvistuksen suuruutta 47,5% monimerkinnöissä ja 40,5% visuaalisessa semanttisessa roolimerkinnässä.', 'et': 'Keelt kasutatakse üha enam rikkalike visuaalse tuvastamise probleemide lahendamiseks veebist pärit pildikogude toetamisel. Nendes ülesannetes kasutatakse struktureeritud ennustusmudeleid, et kasutada ära samaaegselt esinevate märgiste ja visuaalse sisendi vahelisi korrelatsioone, kuid ohtu on kodeerida tahtmatult veebikorporades leitud sotsiaalseid eelarvamusi. Käesolevas töös uurime andmeid ja mudeleid, mis on seotud mitmemärgise objektiklassifikatsiooni ja visuaalse semantilise rolli märgistamisega. Leiame, et a) nende ülesannete andmekogumid sisaldavad märkimisväärseid sooliseid eelarvamusi ja b) nende andmekogumite alusel koolitatud mudelid võimendavad veelgi olemasolevat eelarvamust. Näiteks toiduvalmistamise aktiivsus hõlmab koolituskomplektis rohkem kui 33% tõenäoliselt naisi kui mehi ning koolitatud mudel võimendab erinevust veelgi 68%ni katseajal. Me teeme ettepaneku süstida korpusetaseme piiranguid olemasolevate struktureeritud ennustusmudelite kalibreerimiseks ja kujundada Lagrangi lõdvestusel põhinev algoritm kollektiivseks järelduseks. Meie meetod ei põhjusta peaaegu mingit jõudluse kadu aluseks oleva tuvastusülesande puhul, kuid vähendab erapooletuse võimendamise ulatust vastavalt 47,5% ja 40,5% võrra mitmemärgise klassifitseerimise ja visuaalse semantilise rolli märgistamise puhul.', 'ca': "Language is increasingly being used to de-fine rich visual recognition problems with supporting image collections sourced from the web.  Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of correlations between co-occurring labels and visual input but risk inadvertently encoding social biases found in web corpora.  In this work, we study data and models associated with multilabel object classification and visual semantic role labeling.  Trobem que a) els conjunts de dades d'aquestes tasques contenen un bias significatiu de gènere i b) els models entrenats en aquests conjunts de dades amplifiquen encara més el bias existent. For example, the activity cooking is over 33% more likely to involve females than males in a training set, and a trained model further amplifies the disparity to 68% at test time.  We propose to inject corpus-level constraints for calibrating existing structured prediction models and design an algorithm based on Lagrangian relaxation for collective inference.  El nostre mètode no provoca gairebé cap pèrdua de rendiment per a la tasca de reconeixement subjacent, però redueix la magnitud de l'amplificació del bias en un 47,5% i un 40,5% per a la classificació multietiqueta i l'etiqueta del paper semàntic visual, respectivament", 'ha': "An ci amfani da harshen zuwa matabbata masu riki ga gannai na-da-mazaunin gannai da ke ƙarani da sunayen zane da aka source daga web. Ana amfani da misalin basĩri cikin wannan aikin su dõmin su nẽmi amfani da mazauni tsakanin tagogi da tsarin da ke samu-faɗi da masu gani, kuma amma risiko idan an kodi sunayen jamii da aka samu a cikin bangon web. Daga wannan aikin, Munã karatun data da misãlai da ke haɗi da fasalin abun masu multi'abel da mai fasalin fasalin na semantic. Munã sãmu (a) tsaro da aka samu zuwa wannan aikin da ke ƙunsa da misalin mutane mai girma kuma (b) an sanar da su a kan wannan tsarin da aka ƙara bayani masu buƙata. Misali, shirin karatun koki ya fi tsakanin 33% ne mafiya kusa ya haɗa mace mafi mutane a cikin wani matsayi na tsari, kuma a ƙara wata misãlin da aka yi wa aikin sha'awa yana ƙãra rabon zuwa 68% a lokacin jarraba. We propose to inject corpus-level constraints for calibrating existing structured prediction models and design an algorithm based on Lagrangian relaxation for collective inference.  Tsarinmu na ƙara ƙaranci kada wata hasãra ga aikin kunyarwa na ƙara amma yana ƙara girma wa firgiyar biyar da shekara 47.5% da 40.5% wa fasalin multilabel da fasalin semantic mai gani", 'sk': 'Jezik se vedno bolj uporablja za odpravljanje težav z bogatim vizualnim prepoznavanjem s podporo zbirkami slik, ki izvirajo iz spleta. Pri teh nalogah se uporabljajo strukturirani modeli napovedovanja, da bi izkoristili korelacije med sočasnimi oznakami in vizualnim vnosom, vendar tvegajo nenamerno kodiranje socialnih pristranskosti, ki jih najdemo v spletnih korpusih. V tem delu preučujemo podatke in modele, povezane z večoznačevanjem objektov in vizualnim semantičnim označevanjem vlog. Ugotovili smo, da (a) nabori podatkov za te naloge vsebujejo znatno pristranskost med spoloma in (b) modeli, usposobljeni za te nabore podatkov, dodatno okrepijo obstoječo pristranskost. Na primer, dejavnost kuhanja je več kot 33% verjetnejša za vključitev žensk kot moških v nabor usposabljanja, usposobljeni model pa dodatno povečuje razliko na 68% v času preskusa. Predlagamo vbrizgavanje omejitev na ravni korpusa za umerjanje obstoječih strukturiranih modelov napovedi in oblikovanje algoritma, ki temelji na Lagrangovi relaksaciji za kolektivno sklepanje. Naša metoda ne povzroča skoraj nobene izgube učinkovitosti pri osnovni nalogi prepoznavanja, vendar zmanjšuje obseg ojačevanja pristranskosti za 47,5% oziroma 40,5% pri razvrščanju več oznak oziroma za vizualno semantično označevanje vlog.', 'he': 'Language is increasingly being used to de-fine rich visual recognition problems with supporting image collections sourced from the web.  Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of correlations between co-occurring labels and visual input but risk inadvertently encoding social biases found in web corpora.  בעבודה הזו, אנו לומדים נתונים ודוגמנים שקשורים לזיהוי אובייקטים רבים ותיקום תפקיד סמנטי ויזואלי. We find that (a) datasets for these tasks contain significant gender bias and (b) models trained on these datasets further amplify existing bias.  לדוגמה, בישול הפעילות סביר יותר מ-33% לערב נשים מאשר זכרים בתכנית אימונים, ודוגמא מאומנת מחמירה את ההבדל ל-68% בזמן הבדיקה. אנו מציעים להזריק מגבלות ברמה של קורפוס כדי לקליברציה מודלים חיזוי מבוססים קיימים ולעיצוב אלגוריתם מבוסס על ריגוע לאגרנגי למסקנה קולקטיבית. השיטה שלנו תוצאת כמעט בלי איבוד ביצועים למשימת ההכרה המרכזית, אך מפחידה את גודל ההצטננות על ידי 47.5% ו-', 'jv': 'Language lagi luwih akeh luwih dumadhi kanggo masala anyar tentang karo nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe ungasun sampeyan image sing susahe web. structural navigation Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné isih data karo model sing dibenalko karo multilabel object category og Visual semanti rol label. Anyone Rasané, awak dhèwèké diolah sing ngenaé katèh urip lan èwèké sing entuk èwèké, nik awak dhèwèké kuwi nggawe gerarané, lan model sing térané sumelang sakjane tuawa sing entuk dhèwèké, mengko awak dhèwèké sampeyan cara-cara sing gawe diolah Awak dhéwé nggunakake nggawe barang-nambah kanggo nggawe barang dumateng structural maneh lan nggawe Algorithm sing basa lagrangan seneng nggawe barang kelas nggawe barang nggawe Perintah dhéwé éntuk gak dhéwé ngerasakno dadi nêmên ngerasakno', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་མཐོང་ནུས་པ་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་པར་ཆ་རྩིས་མཐོང་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདྲ་བ་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པ Structured prediction models are used in these tasks to take advantage of correlations between co-occurring labels and visual input but risk inadvertently encoding social biases found in web corpora. In this work, we study data and models associated with multilabel object classification and visual semantic role labeling. We find that (a) datasets for these tasks contain significant gender bias and (b) models trained on these datasets further amplify existing bias. དཔེར་ན། གྲུ་ཚིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ནི་སྐྱེས་པ་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བུད་མེད་སྐྱེས་སྐར་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་བཟོ་བཀོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་སྒྲིག Our method in almost no performance loss for the underlying recognition task but decreases the magnitude of bias amplification by 47.5% and 40.5% for multilabel classification and visual semantic role labeling, respectively.'}
{'en': 'The NLTK FrameNet API : Designing for Discoverability with a Rich Linguistic Resource', 'ar': 'واجهة برمجة تطبيقات NLTK FrameNet: تصميم قابلية الاكتشاف باستخدام مورد لغوي غني', 'es': 'La API FrameNet de NLTK: diseño para la capacidad de descubrimiento con un rico recurso lingüístico', 'pt': 'A API NLTK FrameNet: projetando para descoberta com um rico recurso linguístico', 'fr': "L'API NLTK FrameNet\xa0: concevoir pour la découvrabilité avec une riche ressource linguistique", 'ja': 'NLTK FrameNet API ：豊富な言語リソースを使用した発見性の設計', 'zh': 'NLTK FrameNet API曰:利用可发现性度', 'hi': 'NLTK FrameNet API: एक रिच भाषाई संसाधन के साथ Discoverability के लिए डिज़ाइनिंग', 'ru': 'API NLTK FrameNet: разработка для возможности обнаружения с помощью богатого лингвистического ресурса', 'ga': 'An NLTK FrameNet API: Ag Dearadh le hAghaidh Infhionnachtana le hAcmhainn Saibhir Teangeolaíoch', 'hu': 'Az NLTK FrameNet API: A felfedezhetőség tervezése gazdag nyelvi erőforrással', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ο σχεδιασμός για την ανακάλυψη με έναν πλούσιο γλωσσικό πόρο', 'kk': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Рич лингвистикалық ресурстарымен байланыстыру үшін құрылымы', 'lt': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Sukurti galimybes atskleisti turtingus kalbinius išteklius', 'it': "L'API FrameNet NLTK: progettare per la scoperta con una ricca risorsa linguistica", 'mk': 'АПИ на NLTK FrameNet: Дизајнирање за откривање со богат јазички ресурс', 'ms': 'API FrameNet NLTK: Merancang untuk Penjelasan dengan Sumber Bahasa Kaya', 'ml': 'NLTK ഫ്രെമിനെറ്റ് API: സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക് വിഭവങ്ങളുമായി ഡിസൈനിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-API NLTK FrameNet: It-tfassil għall-iskopertabbiltà b’Riżorsi Lingwistiċi Rikjesti', 'mn': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Rich Linguistic Resource-тай олох зохиол', 'pl': 'NLTK FrameNet API: projektowanie dla odkrywalności z bogatym zasobem językowym', 'ro': 'API-ul FrameNet NLTK: Proiectarea pentru descoperirea cu o resursă lingvistică bogată', 'no': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Designing for discoverability with a Rich Linguistic Resource', 'sr': 'NLTK FrameNet API: dizajniranje za otkrivenje s bogatim lingvističkim resursom', 'so': 'The NLTK FrameNet API: Designing for Discoverability with a Rich Linguistic resource', 'sv': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Designa för upptäckt med en rik språklig resurs', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'The NLLK khungNet API: Designetion for Disco verality with a Rich Linguistic Resource', 'bg': 'Проектиране за откриваемост с богат лингвистичен ресурс', 'hr': 'NLTK FrameNet API: dizajniranje za otkrivenje s bogatim lingvističkim resursom', 'nl': 'De NLTK FrameNet API: ontwerpen voor vindbaarheid met een rijke taalkundige bron', 'da': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Design for opdagelighed med en rig sproglig ressource', 'de': 'Die NLTK FrameNet API: Entwerfen auf Auffindbarkeit mit einer reichhaltigen linguistischen Ressource', 'id': 'API FrameNet NLTK: Merancang untuk Pengetahuan dengan Sumber Linguistik Rich', 'ko': 'NLTK FrameNet API: 풍부한 언어 리소스를 사용한 검색 가능 설계', 'fa': 'The NLTK FrameNet API: Designing for Discoverability with a Rich Linguistic Resource', 'sq': 'API NLTK FrameNet: Projektimi për zbulimin me një burim të pasur gjuhësor', 'af': "Die NLTK RaamNet API: Ontwerping vir Ontvankbaarheid met 'n Rich Linguistic Hulpbron", 'sw': 'The NLTK FrameNet API: Designing for Discoverability with a Rich Linguistic Resource', 'am': 'የNLTK FrameNet API: Designing for Discoverable with a rich Linguistic resource', 'hy': 'ՆԼԹՔ-ի ՖրամNet API-ը. Հարուստ լեզվաբանական ռեսուրսների օգնությամբ բացահայտության համար նախագծելը', 'tr': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Rich Linguistic Resource ile gözlenmek üçin tasarlama', 'bn': 'NLTK ফ্রেমেনেট এপিআই: সম্পদ লিঙ্গিস্টিক সম্পদের সাথে স্বচ্ছতার জন্য ডিজাইন করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "L'API NLTK FrameNet: Desenyar per a descobrir amb un recurso lingüístic ric", 'az': 'NLTK FrameNet', 'et': 'NLTK FrameNet API: avastatavuse kavandamine rikkaliku keelelise ressursiga', 'cs': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Navrhování pro objevitelnost s bohatým jazykovým zdrojem', 'bs': 'NLTK FrameNet API: dizajniranje za otkrivenje s bogatim lingvističkim resursom', 'fi': 'NLTK FrameNet API: Suunnittelu löydettävyyteen rikkaan kieliresurssin avulla', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'API NLTK FrameNet: עיצוב עבור גילוי עם משאב לינגולי עשיר', 'sk': 'NLTK FrameNet API: oblikovanje za odkrivanje z bogatim jezikovnim virom', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'The NLTK FrameNet API: Designing for Discoverability with a Rich Linguistic Resource'}
{'en': 'A new Python API, integrated within the NLTK suite, offers access to the FrameNet 1.7 lexical database. The lexicon (structured in terms of frames) as well as annotated sentences can be processed programatically, or browsed with human-readable displays via the interactive Python prompt.', 'ar': 'توفر واجهة Python API الجديدة ، المدمجة في مجموعة NLTK ، الوصول إلى قاعدة البيانات المعجمية FrameNet 1.7. يمكن معالجة المعجم (منظم من حيث الإطارات) وكذلك الجمل المشروحة برمجيًا ، أو تصفحها بشاشات يمكن قراءتها بواسطة الإنسان عبر موجه Python التفاعلي.', 'fr': "Une nouvelle API Python, intégrée à la suite NLTK, permet d'accéder à la base de données lexicale FrameNet 1.7. Le lexique (structuré en termes de cadres) ainsi que les phrases annotées peuvent être traités par programme ou parcourus avec des affichages lisibles par l'utilisateur via l'invite interactive Python.", 'es': 'Una nueva API de Python, integrada en la suite NLTK, ofrece acceso a la base de datos léxica FrameNet 1.7. El léxico (estructurado en términos de marcos), así como las oraciones anotadas, se pueden procesar mediante programación o navegar con pantallas legibles por humanos a través del indicador interactivo de Python.', 'pt': 'Uma nova API Python, integrada ao pacote NLTK, oferece acesso ao banco de dados léxico FrameNet 1.7. O léxico (estruturado em termos de quadros), bem como as frases anotadas, podem ser processadas programaticamente ou navegadas com exibições legíveis por humanos por meio do prompt interativo do Python.', 'ja': 'NLTKスイートに統合された新しいPython APIは、FrameNet 1.7語彙データベースへのアクセスを提供します。（フレームに関して構造化された）辞書と注釈付きの文章は、プログラムで処理することも、インタラクティブなPythonプロンプトを介して人間が読み取り可能なディスプレイで閲覧することもできます。', 'zh': '一新Python API集NLTK套件中,可访FrameNet 1.7词汇数据库。 词典(以帻为单构)及带注句可编程处之,或交互式Python示人可读之见览。', 'hi': 'एक नया पायथन एपीआई, एनएलटीके सूट के भीतर एकीकृत, फ्रेमनेट 1.7 लेक्सिकल डेटाबेस तक पहुंच प्रदान करता है। शब्दकोश (फ्रेम के संदर्भ में संरचित) के साथ-साथ एनोटेट किए गए वाक्यों को प्रोग्रामेटिक रूप से संसाधित किया जा सकता है, या इंटरैक्टिव पायथन प्रॉम्प्ट के माध्यम से मानव-पठनीय डिस्प्ले के साथ ब्राउज़ किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Новый API Python, интегрированный в набор NLTK, предлагает доступ к лексической базе данных FrameNet 1.7. Лексика (структурированная в терминах фреймов), а также аннотированные предложения могут быть обработаны программно или просмотрены с помощью удобочитаемых дисплеев с помощью интерактивной подсказки Python.', 'ga': 'Tugann API Python nua, atá comhtháite laistigh de shraith NLTK, rochtain ar bhunachar sonraí foclóireachta FrameNet 1.7. Is féidir an foclóir (struchtúrtha i dtéarmaí frámaí) chomh maith le habairtí anótáilte a phróiseáil go ríomhchláraithe, nó a bhrabhsáil le taispeántais inléite ag daoine tríd an leid Python idirghníomhach.', 'el': 'Ένα νέο API Python, ενσωματωμένο στη σουίτα NLTK, προσφέρει πρόσβαση στη λεξική βάση δεδομένων FrameNet 1.7. Το λεξικό (δομημένο σε πλαίσια) καθώς και οι σχολιασμένες προτάσεις μπορούν να επεξεργαστούν προγραμματικά, ή να περιηγηθούν με αναγνώσιμες από άνθρωπο οθόνες μέσω της διαδραστικής προτροπής Python.', 'hu': 'Az NLTK csomagba integrált új Python API hozzáférést biztosít a FrameNet 1.7 lexikai adatbázishoz. A lexikon (keretek szerint strukturált) és a jegyzetelt mondatok programozhatók, vagy ember által olvasható kijelzőkkel böngészhetők az interaktív Python prompt segítségével.', 'ka': 'Name ლექსიკონი (სტრუქტურებული ფრამების განსაზღვრებით) და ანოტირებული სიტყვები შეიძლება პროგრამეტურად პროგრამეტურად გამოყენება, ან ადამიანის წაკითხვა დისპრამებით ინტერექტი', 'kk': 'NLTK бағдарламасында енгізілген жаңа Python API, FrameNet 1. 7 лексикалық деректер қорына қатынауға мүмкіндік береді. Лексикон (фреймдер тізімінде құрылған) және белгіленген сөздерді бағдарламалық түрде өзгертуге болады немесе адамды оқуға болатын дисплейлерді интерактивті Python сұрауы арқылы шолу мүмкін.', 'it': "Una nuova API Python, integrata all'interno della suite NLTK, offre l'accesso al database lessicale FrameNet 1.7. Il lessico (strutturato in termini di frame) così come le frasi annotate possono essere elaborate in modo programmatico, o sfogliate con display leggibili dall'uomo tramite il prompt interattivo Python.", 'lt': 'A new Python API, integrated within the NLTK suite, offers access to the FrameNet 1.7 lexical database.  Leksikonas (struktūrizuotas rėmų atžvilgiu) ir anotuoti sakiniai gali būti tvarkomi programiniu būdu arba perskaitomi žmogaus skaitomais ekranais per interaktyvų Python paklausą.', 'mk': 'Нова Python API, интегрирана во NLTK апартманот, нуди пристап до FrameNet 1. 7 лексикална база на податоци. Лексиконот (структуриран во поглед на рамки) како и анотираните реченици може да се процесираат програматично, или да се прелистуваат со приказни кои се читаат од луѓето преку интерактивниот Python prompt.', 'ms': 'API Python baru, terintegrasi dalam suite NLTK, menawarkan akses ke pangkalan data leksikal FrameNet 1. 7. Leksikon (struktur dalam terma bingkai) serta kalimat yang dicatat boleh diproses secara programatik, atau dilayar dengan paparan boleh dibaca oleh manusia melalui maklumat Python interaktif.', 'ml': 'NLTK സ്യൂട്ടിനുള്ളില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ പൈത്തോന്\u200d എപിഐ, ഫ്രെമെന്\u200dറ് 1. 7 ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാബേസിലേക്ക് സമ്മതിക്കുന്നു. ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d (ഫ്രെയിമുകളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു) വാക്കുകളും പ്രോഗ്രാമികമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മനു', 'mt': 'A new Python API, integrated within the NLTK suite, offers access to the FrameNet 1.7 lexical database.  Il-lexicon (strutturat f’termini ta’ oqfsa) kif ukoll sentenzi annotati jistgħu jiġu pproċessati b’mod programmatiku, jew ibbrawżati b’wiri li jinqraw mill-bniedem permezz tal-prompt interattiv Python.', 'mn': 'NLTK сууйтын дотор нэгтгэгдсэн шинэ Python API нь FrameNet 1.7 лексикийн өгөгдлийн сан рүү нэвтрэх боломжтой. Лексикон (фрэйм хэлбэрээр бүтээгдсэн) мөн анзаарсан өгүүлбэрийг програмчлалын хувьд боловсруулж болох эсвэл хүний уншиж чадах дисплейүүдийг интерактив Пифон програмчлалын хувьд үзүүлж болох юм.', 'no': 'Eit ny Python API, integrert i NLTK- suiten, tilbyr tilgang til rammeNet 1. 7- leksisk databasen. Leksjonen (strukturert i frammenyen) og merke setningar kan vera behandla programatisk, eller lesa med menneskelige skjermar via interaktive Python-spørjinga.', 'pl': 'Nowe API Pythona, zintegrowane z pakietem NLTK, oferuje dostęp do leksykalnej bazy danych FrameNet 1.7. Leksykon (ustrukturyzowany pod kątem klatek) jak również adnotacje zdań mogą być przetwarzane programowo lub przeglądane na czytelnych dla człowieka wyświetlaczach za pośrednictwem interaktywnego wiersza Pythona.', 'ro': 'Un nou API Python, integrat în suita NLTK, oferă acces la baza de date lexicală FrameNet 1.7. Lexiconul (structurat în termeni de cadre), precum și propozițiile adnotate pot fi procesate programatic, sau navigate cu afișaje lizibile de om prin promptul interactiv Python.', 'sr': 'Novi Python API, integrisan u NLTK apartmanu, nudi pristup Leksičkoj bazi podataka FrameNet 1.7. Leksikon (strukturiran u smislu okvira) kao i annotirane rečenice mogu biti proizvođen programatički, ili pregledan sa ljudskim pročitajućim ekranima preko interaktivnog brzina Pythona.', 'si': 'අළුත් Python API, NLTK සුයිට් ඇතුලට සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, ෆ්\u200dරේම්නෙට් 1. 7 ලෙක්සිකාල් ඩාටාබේස් එකට ප්\u200dරවේ ලෙක්සිකෝන් (චෝරම් වලට සංස්ථාපනය) සහ අනතුරු වාක්ය ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන්, නැත්තම් මිනිස්සු ප', 'sv': 'Ett nytt Python API, integrerat i NLTK-sviten, ger tillgång till FrameNet 1.7 lexikala databas. Lexikonet (strukturerat i termer av ramar) och kommenterade meningar kan bearbetas programmässigt, eller bläddras med mänskligt läsbara skärmar via den interaktiva Python prompten.', 'so': 'A new Python API, integrated within the NLTK suite, offers access to the FrameNet 1.7 lexical database. Leksikanka (lagu dhisay qashinka) iyo sidoo kale hadallada lagu xumeeyey waxaa lagu baaraandegayaa programka, ama bandhigyada dadka wax akhriyi karo waxaa lagu baaraandegayaa dhaqdhaqaalaha Python oo la mid ah.', 'ta': 'Name லெக்சிகோன் (சட்டங்களில் அமைக்கப்பட்ட) மற்றும் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களும் நிரலியலாக செயல்படுத்தலாம், அல்லது இடைசெயல்படும் பைதான் விரைவா', 'ur': 'NLTK سوئٹ کے اندر ایک نوی پیٹون API، فرمینٹ 1. 7 لکسیکل ڈیٹابیس کے لئے دسترسی پیش کرتا ہے. لکسیکن (فرموں کے معاملہ میں ساختہ کئے گئے) اور اظہار کئے ہوئے جماعتوں کو پروگرامی کے طور پر پروگرامی کر سکتے ہیں، یا انسان کے پڑھنے کے قابل دکھانوں کے ذریعہ مطابق پئیٹون پرومٹ کے ذریعہ براہ کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': 'Name Name', 'vi': 'Một API Python mới, được hợp nhất trong dãy NLK, cung cấp truy cập vào cơ sở dữ liệu ngôn ngữ 1.7. Từ vựng (cấu trúc theo dạng khung) cũng như các câu được ghi chú có thể được xử lý theo lập trình, hoặc duyệt qua các bộ trình bày có thể đọc người qua dấu nhắc Python tương tác.', 'bg': 'Нов Питон API, интегриран в пакета NLTK, предлага достъп до лексикалната база данни FrameNet 1.7. Лексиконът (структуриран по отношение на рамки), както и анотираните изречения могат да се обработват програмно или да се разглеждат с четими за човека дисплеи чрез интерактивния подкан на Питон.', 'nl': 'Een nieuwe Python API, geïntegreerd in de NLTK suite, biedt toegang tot de FrameNet 1.7 lexicale database. Zowel het lexicon (gestructureerd in termen van frames) als geannoteerde zinnen kunnen programmatisch worden verwerkt, of worden bekeken met menselijk leesbare displays via de interactieve Python prompt.', 'de': 'Eine neue Python API, integriert in die NLTK Suite, bietet Zugriff auf die lexikalische FrameNet 1.7 Datenbank. Das Lexikon (strukturiert in Frames) sowie kommentierte Sätze können programmatisch verarbeitet oder mit menschenlesbaren Displays über die interaktive Python-Eingabeaufforderung durchsucht werden.', 'da': 'En ny Python API, integreret i NLTK suite, giver adgang til FrameNet 1.7 leksikal database. Leksikonet (struktureret i form af rammer) såvel som kommenterede sætninger kan behandles programmerligt, eller browses med menneskelæsbare skærme via den interaktive Python prompt.', 'hr': 'Novi Python API, integriran u NLTK apartmanu, nudi pristup leksičkoj bazi podataka FrameNet 1.7. Leksikon (strukturiran u smislu okvira) kao i annotirane rečenice mogu se programatički obraditi ili pretražiti s ljudskim pročitajućim ekranima kroz interaktivnu Python brzinu.', 'id': 'API Python baru, terintegrasi dalam suite NLTK, menawarkan akses ke pangkalan data lexik FrameNet 1.7. Leksikon (struktur dalam terma bingkai) serta kalimat annotasi dapat diproses secara programatis, atau dilayari dengan layar yang dapat dibaca oleh manusia melalui prompt interaktif Python.', 'sw': 'API mpya ya Python, iliyohamasishwa ndani ya suite ya NLTK, inatoa upatikanaji wa taarifa za lexico ya FrameNet 1.7. Lexicon (imetengenezwa kwa mifumo) pamoja na sentensi zinazokerwa zinaweza kuchukuliwa programu, au kutangazwa na maonyesho yanayosomwa kwa binadamu kupitia harakati za Python.', 'ko': 'NLTK 키트에 통합된 새 Python API는 FrameNet 1.7 문법 데이터베이스에 접근할 수 있습니다.사전(프레임 구조별)과 주석이 달린 문장은 프로그래밍을 통해 처리하거나 인터랙티브 파이톤 알림부호를 통해 인간이 읽을 수 있는 디스플레이를 통해 조회할 수 있다.', 'tr': 'NLTK takmynasynda integralýan täze Python API, FrameNet 1.7 leksiýal databank berir. Leksikon (fraým diňe ýa-da ýazylýan sözler) programatik bilen işledilip biler, ýada adam okalabilir ekranlar bilen interaktif Python soragy bilen browslanabilir.', 'fa': 'یک API Python جدید که در suite NLTK متصل شده است، دسترسی به داده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی FrameNet 1. 7 را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. زبان\u200cنامه (ساخته به عنوان چهره\u200cها) و جمله\u200cهای نوشته\u200cشده می\u200cتواند با برنامه\u200cریزی پرداخت شود، یا با نمایش\u200cهای قابل خواندن انسان با توجه به پیتن متفاوت\u200cفعال بررسی شود.', 'sq': 'Një API e re Python, e integruar brenda suitës NLTK, ofron akses në bazën e dhënave lexike FrameNet 1.7. Lexikoni (i strukturuar në terma të kornizave) si dhe fjalët e anotuara mund të procesohen në mënyrë programatike ose të shfletohen me shfaqje të lexueshme nga njerëzit nëpërmjet kërkesës interaktive Python.', 'af': "'n Nuwe Python API, integreer binne die NLTK suite, stel toegang tot die FrameNet 1. 7 leksiese databasis aan. Die leksikon (structured in terms of rame) as ook aanmerkte setnings kan program verwerk word, of deur mens- leesbare vertoons deur die interaktiewe Python-prompt gebruik word.", 'az': 'NLTK suite i√ßind…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇü yeni Python API, FrameNet 1.7 leksik veril…ôn veril…ônl…ôr…ô eriŇüimi t…ôklif edir. Leksikon (fotogramlar √ľz…ôrind…ô yapńĪlandńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü) v…ô bildirilmiŇü c√ľml…ôl…ôr proqrammatik olaraq iŇül…ôdilir, ya da insan oxuyabil…ôn ekranlarla interaktif Python prompt vasit…ôsil…ô g√∂zl…ônil…ô bil…ôr.', 'am': 'አዲስ Python API - በNLTK ጉዳዩ ውስጥ የተጠቅመ ነው - የFrameNet 1.7 lexical ዳታ መቀመጫውን ያቀርባል። ሌክሲኮን (በframe ግንኙነት የተመሠረተውን) እና የተገኘ ቃላት በፕሮግራማዊ፣ ወይም በመካከለኛው በተቃውሞ ፕython ፈጥኖ በመስመር በሚችል የሰው ማሳየት በመቃኛ ይችላል፡፡', 'bs': 'Novi Python API, integrisan u NLTK apartmanu, nudi pristup leksičkoj bazi podataka FrameNet 1.7. Leksikon (strukturiran u smislu okvira) kao i annotirane rečenice mogu se programatički obraditi ili pregledati s ljudskim pročitajućim ekranima preko interaktivnog Pythona brzina.', 'bn': 'NLTK স্যুটের মধ্যে একত্রিত একটি নতুন পাইথন এপিআই, ফ্রেমেনেট ১. ৭ লেক্সিক্যাল ডাটাবেসে প্রবেশ করার প্রস্তাব দিয়েছে। লেক্সিকোন (ফ্রেমের শর্তে তৈরি করা হয়) এবং বিরক্তিকর বাক্য প্রোগ্রামিক ভাবে প্রক্রিয়া করা যাবে, অথবা মানুষ-পাঠযোগ্য পাইথন প্রাপ্তের মাধ্', 'ca': 'A new Python API, integrated within the NLTK suite, offers access to the FrameNet 1.7 lexical database.  El lexicó (estructurat en termes de marcs) i les frases anotates es poden processar programàticament, o navegar amb pantalles llegibles per humans a través de la pregunta interactiva de Python.', 'hy': 'Նոր Պիթոն API-ը, ինտեգրված ՆԼԹՔ համակարգի մեջ, հնարավորություն է տալիս հասնել Ֆրամենեթ 1.7 լեքսիկական բազայի: Լեքսիկոնն (կառուցված շրջանակներով) ինչպես նաև annoտացված նախադասությունները կարող են ծրագրավորվել կամ բրաուզվել մարդկային կարդալի էկրաններով ինտերակտիվ Պիթոն հարցի միջոցով:', 'fi': 'Uusi Python API, integroitu NLTK-pakettiin, tarjoaa pääsyn FrameNet 1.7:n sanastotietokantaan. Sanastoa (kehyksinä jäsennelty) ja huomautuksilla varustettuja lauseita voidaan käsitellä ohjelmoidusti tai selata ihmisluettavilla näytöillä interaktiivisen Python-kehotteen kautta.', 'et': 'NLTK komplekti integreeritud uus Pythoni API pakub juurdepääsu FrameNet 1.7 leksikaalsele andmebaasile. Sõnavara (raamide järgi struktureeritud) ja märgitud lauseid saab töödelda programmiliselt või sirvida inimloetavate kuvaritega interaktiivse Pythoni viibi kaudu.', 'cs': 'Nové Python API, integrované do sady NLTK, nabízí přístup k lexikální databázi FrameNet 1.7. Lexikon (strukturovaný v rámcích) i anotované věty mohou být zpracovávány programaticky, nebo prohlíženy na člověkem čitelných displejích prostřednictvím interaktivního Pythonu výzvy.', 'jv': 'Language Text', 'ha': 'Wata sabo na Python ApplI, wanda aka haɗa cikin maɓallin NLTK, yana da amfani da matsayin maɓallin Dane na FrameNet 1.7. @ action: button', 'sk': 'Nov Python API, integriran v paket NLTK, ponuja dostop do leksikalne baze podatkov FrameNet 1.7. Leksikon (strukturiran v smislu okvirjev) in stavki z opombami se lahko obdelujejo programsko ali brskajo z človeško berljivimi zasloni prek interaktivnega Python poziva.', 'he': 'API Python חדש, מושלם בתוך הסוויטה NLTK, מציע גישה למאגר הנתונים הלקסי FrameNet 1.7. הלקסיקון (מובנה במונחים של מסגרות) וגם משפטים מוצבעים יכולים להתעסק בתוכנית, או להתעסק עם תצוגות ניתן לקרוא ע"י האינטראקטיבית Python.', 'bo': 'A new Python API, integrated within the NLTK suite, offers access to the FrameNet 1.7 lexical database. The lexicon (structured in terms of frames) as well as annotated sentences can be processed programatically, or browsed with human-readable displays via the interactive Python prompt.'}
{'en': 'Argotario : Computational Argumentation Meets Serious Games', 'ar': 'Argotario: الجدل الحسابي يلبي الألعاب الجادة', 'pt': 'Argotario: Argumentação computacional encontra jogos sérios', 'es': 'Argotario: La argumentación computacional se une a los juegos serios', 'fr': "Argotario\xa0: l'argumentation computationnelle rencontre les jeux sérieux", 'ja': 'Argotario:計算の議論と真剣なゲームの出会い', 'zh': 'Argotario:计论与严戏遇', 'ru': 'Argotario: Вычислительная аргументация отвечает серьезным играм', 'hi': 'Argotario: कम्प्यूटेशनल तर्क गंभीर खेलों से मिलता है', 'ga': 'Argotario: Argóint Ríomhaireachtúil Buaileann Cluichí Tromchúiseacha', 'el': 'Argumentario: Η υπολογιστική επιχειρηματολογία συναντά σοβαρά παιχνίδια', 'it': "Argoario: L'argomentazione computazionale incontra i giochi seri", 'kk': 'Аргентарио: Компьютерлік аргументациясы Маңызды ойындар', 'lt': 'Argotario: Computational Argumentation Meets Serious Games', 'mk': 'Арготарио: Компутационалната аргументација се соочува со сериозни игри', 'hu': 'Argotário: A számítástechnikai érvelés komoly játékokkal találkozik', 'ka': 'არგოტორიო', 'ml': 'അര്\u200dഗോട്ടാരിയോ: കണക്കിട്ടുള്ള അര്\u200dഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d ഗുരുതരമായ കളികള്\u200d കാണുന്നു', 'mn': 'Аргентарио: Компьютерийн аргументариа маш чухал тоглоомууд', 'pl': 'Argumentario: Argumentacja komputerowa spotyka poważne gry', 'ms': 'Argotario: Argumentasi Komputasi Bertemu Permainan Serius', 'mt': 'Argotarju: Argumentazzjoni tal-Komputazzjoni tiltaqa’ ma’ Logħob Serju', 'no': 'Argotario: Computational Argumentation Meets Serious Games', 'ro': 'Argumentarea computațională se întâlnește cu jocurile serioase', 'si': 'ආර්ගෝටාරියෝ: පරිගණක වාර්තාවක් සංවේදනය සෙල්ලම් කරනවා', 'sv': 'Argorio: Beräkningsargumentation möter seriösa spel', 'sr': 'Argotario: Kompjuterska argumentacija susreće ozbiljne igre', 'so': 'Argotario: Argumentation Meets Games Siyaar', 'ur': 'آرگوٹاریو: کمپیوٹریشن آرگومنٹ سیریز کھیل ملتی ہے', 'ta': 'ஆர்கோடாரியோ: கணிப்பு ஆர்காமெண்டென்ட் பொருள் முக்கியமான விளையாட்டுகளை சந்திக்கிறது', 'uz': 'Argotario: Kompyuterning Argumentsiya Muhim oʻyinlari', 'vi': 'Argotario: cuộc tranh luận tranh luận chuẩn', 'bg': 'Компютърната аргументация среща сериозни игри', 'nl': 'Argumentario: Computational Argumentation meets Serious Games', 'hr': 'Argotario: Računalna argumentacija ispunjava ozbiljne igre', 'da': 'Argumentation: Computational Argumentation møder seriøse spil', 'de': 'Argumentario: Computational Argumentation trifft auf Serious Games', 'fa': 'آرگوتاریو: آرژومات کامپیوتری با بازی جدی ملاقات می\u200cکند', 'ko': '아고타리오: 계산 논증과 엄숙한 게임', 'id': 'Argotario: Argumentasi Komputasi Bertemu Permainan Serius', 'sw': 'Argotario: Ubaguzi wa Hesabu unakutana na michezo Makubwa', 'tr': 'Çot', 'af': 'Argotario: Rekenaar Argumentasie Stel ernstige Speletjies', 'sq': 'Argotari: Argumentimi kompjuterik takon lojra serioze', 'hy': 'Արգոթարիո. Համակարգչային համոզմունքը հանդիպում է լուրջ խաղեր', 'az': 'Argotario: Computational Argumentation Meets Serious Games', 'am': 'አርጎቲዮ፦ ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Argotari: L'argumentació computacional troba jocs seriosos", 'cs': 'Argumentario: Výpočetní argumentace se setkává s seriózními hrami', 'bn': 'আর্গোটারিও: কম্পিউটেশন আর্গুমেন্টেশন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ খেলার সাথে দেখা করে', 'et': 'Argotario: Arvutuslik argumenteerimine kohtub tõsiste mängudega', 'bs': 'Argotario: Kompjuterska argumentacija susreće ozbiljne igre', 'fi': 'Argotario: Computational Argumentation Meets Serious Games', 'sk': 'Argotario: Računalniška argumentacija sreča resne igre', 'he': 'Argotario: Argumentation Computation Meets Serious Games', 'jv': 'Validity:', 'ha': 'Argotario: KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྒྲུབ་རྟགས། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ལ་མཚུངས་པའི་རྩེད་མོའི་ནང་དུ་འདྲ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'An important skill in critical thinking and argumentation is the ability to spot and recognize fallacies. Fallacious arguments, omnipresent in argumentative discourse, can be deceptive, manipulative, or simply leading to ‘wrong moves’ in a discussion. Despite their importance, argumentation scholars and NLP researchers with focus on argumentation quality have not yet investigated fallacies empirically. The nonexistence of resources dealing with fallacious argumentation calls for scalable approaches to data acquisition and annotation, for which the serious games methodology offers an appealing, yet unexplored, alternative. We present Argotario, a serious game that deals with fallacies in everyday argumentation. Argotario is a multilingual, open-source, platform-independent application with strong educational aspects, accessible at.www.argotario.net. ', 'ar': 'من المهارات المهمة في التفكير النقدي والحجج القدرة على اكتشاف المغالطات والتعرف عليها. يمكن أن تكون الحجج المضللة ، المنتشرة في كل مكان في الخطاب الجدلي ، خادعة أو خادعة أو تؤدي ببساطة إلى "خطوات خاطئة" في المناقشة. على الرغم من أهميتها ، فإن علماء الجدل والباحثين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية مع التركيز على جودة الحجة لم يحققوا بعد في المغالطات تجريبياً. يستدعي عدم وجود الموارد التي تتعامل مع الجدل الخاطئ مناهج قابلة للتطوير للحصول على البيانات والشرح ، والتي تقدم منهجية الألعاب الجادة بديلاً جذابًا ، ولكنه غير مستكشف. نقدم Argotario ، لعبة جادة تتعامل مع المغالطات في الجدل اليومي. Argotario هو تطبيق متعدد اللغات ومفتوح المصدر ومستقل عن النظام الأساسي مع جوانب تعليمية قوية ، ويمكن الوصول إليه على <www.argotario.net>.', 'pt': "Uma habilidade importante no pensamento crítico e argumentação é a capacidade de identificar e reconhecer falácias. Argumentos falaciosos, onipresentes no discurso argumentativo, podem ser enganosos, manipuladores ou simplesmente levar a 'movimentos errados' em uma discussão. Apesar de sua importância, estudiosos da argumentação e pesquisadores da PNL com foco na qualidade da argumentação ainda não investigaram as falácias empiricamente. A inexistência de recursos para argumentação falaciosa exige abordagens escaláveis de aquisição e anotação de dados, para as quais a metodologia de jogos sérios oferece uma alternativa atraente, porém inexplorada. Apresentamos Argotario, um jogo sério que trata de falácias na argumentação cotidiana. Argotario é um aplicativo multilíngue, de código aberto, independente de plataforma, com fortes aspectos educacionais, acessível em <www.argotario.net>.", 'fr': "Une compétence importante en matière de pensée critique et d'argumentation est la capacité de repérer et de reconnaître les erreurs. Les arguments fallacieux, omniprésents dans le discours argumentatif, peuvent être trompeurs, manipulateurs ou simplement conduire à de «\xa0mauvaises décisions\xa0» dans une discussion. Malgré leur importance, les chercheurs en argumentation et les chercheurs en PNL qui se concentrent sur la qualité de l'argumentation n'ont pas encore étudié les erreurs de manière empirique. L'absence de ressources traitant de l'argumentation fallacieuse nécessite des approches évolutives de l'acquisition et de l'annotation des données, pour lesquelles la méthodologie des jeux sérieux offre une alternative attrayante mais inexplorée. Nous vous présentons Argotario, un serious game qui traite des erreurs de l'argumentation quotidienne. Argotario est une application multilingue, open source, indépendante de la plateforme avec de solides aspects éducatifs, accessible à l'adresse<www.argotario.net>.", 'es': 'Una habilidad importante en el pensamiento crítico y la argumentación es la capacidad de detectar y reconocer las falacias. Los argumentos falaces, omnipresentes en el discurso argumentativo, pueden ser engañosos, manipuladores o simplemente conducir a «movimientos equivocados» en una discusión. A pesar de su importancia, los estudiosos de la argumentación y los investigadores de la PNL que se centran en la calidad de la argumentación aún no han investigado las falacias de La inexistencia de recursos que se ocupen de la argumentación falaz exige enfoques escalables para la adquisición y anotación de datos, para los cuales la metodología de juegos serios ofrece una alternativa atractiva, aunque inexplorada. Presentamos Argotario, un juego serio que se ocupa de las falacias de la argumentación cotidiana. Argotario es una aplicación multilingüe, de código abierto e independiente de la plataforma con fuertes aspectos educativos, accesible en<www.argotario.net>.', 'ja': '批判的思考と議論の重要なスキルは、誤りを見つけて認識する能力です。弁論術的な議論において万能である誤った議論は、欺瞞的、操作的、または単に議論における「間違った動き」につながる可能性がある。弁論術の重要性にもかかわらず、弁論術の質に焦点を当てた弁論術の学者やNLPの研究者は、まだ誤謬を経験的に調査していない。間違った議論を扱うリソースが存在しないことは、データの取得と注釈へのスケーラブルなアプローチを必要とし、真剣なゲームの方法論は、魅力的でありながら未探索の代替案を提供します。私たちはArgotarioを発表します。これは、日常の議論における誤謬を扱う真剣なゲームです。Argotarioは多言語、オープンソース、プラットフォームに依存しないアプリケーションで、強力な教育的側面を持ち、にアクセスでき<www.argotario.net>ます。', 'hi': "महत्वपूर्ण सोच और तर्क में एक महत्वपूर्ण कौशल भ्रम को स्पॉट करने और पहचानने की क्षमता है। भ्रामक तर्क, तर्कसंगत प्रवचन में सर्वव्यापी, भ्रामक, जोड़-तोड़, या बस एक चर्चा में 'गलत चाल' के लिए अग्रणी हो सकते हैं। उनके महत्व के बावजूद, तर्क की गुणवत्ता पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने वाले तर्क विद्वानों और एनएलपी शोधकर्ताओं ने अभी तक अनुभवजन्य रूप से भ्रम की जांच नहीं की है। भ्रामक तर्क से निपटने वाले संसाधनों का अस्तित्व डेटा अधिग्रहण और एनोटेशन के लिए स्केलेबल दृष्टिकोण के लिए कहता है, जिसके लिए गंभीर गेम पद्धति एक आकर्षक, अभी तक अनपेक्षित, विकल्प प्रदान करती है। हम Argotario, एक गंभीर खेल है कि हर रोज तर्क में भ्रम से संबंधित प्रस्तुत करते हैं. Argotario एक बहुभाषी, खुला स्रोत, मंच-स्वतंत्र मजबूत शैक्षिक पहलुओं के साथ आवेदन है, <www.argotario.net> पर सुलभ है।", 'ru': 'Важным навыком в критическом мышлении и аргументации является способность обнаруживать и распознавать ошибки. Ложные аргументы, вездесущие в спорном дискурсе, могут быть обманчивыми, манипулятивными или просто приводящими к «неправильным шагам» в дискуссии. Несмотря на свою важность, ученые-аргументаторы и исследователи NLP с акцентом на качество аргументации еще не исследовали ошибки эмпирически. Отсутствие ресурсов, связанных с ложной аргументацией, требует масштабируемых подходов к сбору данных и аннотации, для которых методология серьезных игр предлагает привлекательную, но еще не исследованную альтернативу. Мы представляем Argotario, серьезную игру, которая имеет дело с заблуждениями в повседневной аргументации. Argotario - это многоязычное, независимое от платформы приложение с открытым исходным кодом с сильными образовательными аспектами, доступное по адресу<www.argotario.net>.', 'zh': '批判性思虑论证之要,见知谬也。 谬论在辩语无不在,或欺骗性或操纵性,或徒致其过举。 虽其要也,专于论证学者与NLP治人未究其谬也。 治谬证之资不存,须广数采注,严戏供一引人而未索者代方案。 臣等展Argotario,此一严戏,处常论之谬也。 Argotario多言,开源,独立平台之应用程序,有强教,访之<www.argotario.net>。', 'ga': "Scil thábhachtach sa smaointeoireacht chriticiúil agus san argóint is ea an cumas fallaí a aimsiú agus a aithint. Is féidir le hargóintí bréagacha, uileláithreacha sa dioscúrsa argóinteach, a bheith mealltach, láimhsithe, nó go simplí as a dtiocfaidh `boganna mícheart' i bplé. In ainneoin a dtábhachta, níl imscrúdú eimpíreach fós déanta ag scoláirí argóinte agus taighdeoirí NLP a dhírigh ar cháilíocht argóinte ar fhallacies. Toisc nach bhfuil acmhainní ann a dhéileálann le hargóintí fallaí, tá gá le cineálacha cur chuige inscálaithe maidir le sonraí a fháil agus anótáil, agus cuireann modheolaíocht na gcluichí tromchúiseacha rogha eile tarraingteach, ach nach bhfuil taiscéalaithe, ar fáil ina leith. Cuirimid i láthair Argotario, cluiche tromchúiseach a dhéileálann le fallaí san argóint laethúil. Feidhmchlár ilteangach, foinse oscailte, ardán-neamhspleách é Argotario a bhfuil gnéithe láidre oideachais aige agus atá inrochtana ag <www.argotario.net>.", 'ka': "მნიშვნელოვანი კრიტიკური ფიქრობის და არგუმენტაციის შესაძლებლობა იყო ტალაციების შესაძლებლობა. ტალაციური არგუმენტები, ყველაფერი არგუმენტიური დისკუმენტებში, შეიძლება იყოს ტალაციური, მანოპულაციური, ან მხოლოდ განსხვავებაში `შეცდომი მოძრაობები'  მათი მნიშვნელოვანობას მაგრამ, აპროგმენტის სტუდენტის სტუდენტის და NLP სწავლებელი, რომლებიც აპროგენტირების კალეტაციისთვის ფონსკურებულია, არ რესურსების არსებობა, რომლებიც არსებობენ, რომლებიც არსებობენ არსებობითი არსებობა არსებობის არსებობას, უნდა გავაკეთოთ მონაცემების და ანოტაციისთვის, რომლებიც სერიოგიური თამაში მეტოლოგია ა ჩვენ აპდოტარიო, სერიო თამაში, რომელიც ყოველდღე აპდუმენტაციაში გავამუშავებთ ტალაციას. არგორარიო არის მრავალენგური, გახსნა ფორმა, პლატატურის განსაზღვრებული პროგრამია, ძალიან განსწავლებელი აპექტებით, შესაძლებელი <www.argotario-ში. net>.", 'hu': 'A kritikus gondolkodás és érvelés fontos készsége a tévedések észlelésének és felismerésének képessége. A téves érvek, amelyek mindenütt jelen vannak az érvelő diskurzusban, megtévesztők, manipulatívak lehetnek, vagy egyszerűen "rossz lépésekhez" vezethetnek egy vita során. Fontosságuk ellenére az érvelés minőségére összpontosító érvelési kutatók és NLP kutatók még nem vizsgálták empirikusan a tévedéseket. A téves érveléssel foglalkozó erőforrások hiánya skálázható adatgyűjtési és jegyzetelési megközelítéseket igényel, amelyekhez a komoly játékok módszertana vonzó, mégis feltáratlan alternatívát kínál. Bemutatjuk az Argotario-t, egy komoly játékot, amely a mindennapi érvelés tévedéseivel foglalkozik. Argotario egy többnyelvű, nyílt forráskódú, platformfüggetlen alkalmazás erős oktatási szempontokkal, elérhető <www.argotario. net>.', 'el': 'Μια σημαντική ικανότητα στην κριτική σκέψη και επιχειρηματολογία είναι η ικανότητα εντοπισμού και αναγνώρισης πλάνων. Τα παραπλανητικά επιχειρήματα, πανταχού παρόντα στον επιχειρηματολογικό λόγο, μπορούν να είναι παραπλανητικά, χειραγωγικά ή απλά να οδηγούν σε "λάθος κινήσεις" σε μια συζήτηση. Παρά τη σημασία τους, μελετητές επιχειρηματολογίας και ερευνητές με έμφαση στην ποιότητα επιχειρηματολογίας δεν έχουν ακόμη διερευνήσει εμπειρικά τις πλάνες. Η έλλειψη πόρων που ασχολούνται με λανθασμένες επιχειρηματολογίες απαιτεί κλιμακωτές προσεγγίσεις για την απόκτηση δεδομένων και την σχολιασμό, για τις οποίες η μεθοδολογία σοβαρών παιχνιδιών προσφέρει μια ελκυστική, αλλά ανεξερεύνητη, εναλλακτική λύση. Παρουσιάζουμε το Αργοτάριο, ένα σοβαρό παιχνίδι που ασχολείται με τις πλάνες στην καθημερινή επιχειρηματολογία. Το Αργοτάριο είναι μια πολύγλωσση, ανοικτού κώδικα, ανεξάρτητη πλατφόρμα με ισχυρές εκπαιδευτικές πτυχές, προσβάσιμη στο <αργοτάριο. καθαρό>.', 'lt': 'Svarbus įgūdis kritinio mąstymo ir argumentavimo srityje yra gebėjimas nustatyti ir pripažinti klaidas. Klaidingi argumentai, visuotinai paplitę argumentuojančioje kalboje, gali būti apgaulingi, manipuliuojami arba paprasčiausiai lemti klaidingus veiksmus diskusijoje. Nepaisant jų svarbos, argumentų mokslo darbuotojai ir NLP mokslininkai, daugiausia dėmesio skiriantys argumentų kokybei, dar empiriškai netikslumų neišnagrinėjo. Nesant išteklių, susijusių su klaidingais argumentais, reikia taikyti mastuojamus duomenų rinkimo ir anotacijos metodus, kuriems pagal rimtą žaidimų metodiką siūloma patraukli, tačiau neišnagrinėta alternatyva. Mes pristatome Argotario, rimtą žaidimą, kuris kasdieniame argumente sprendžia klaidas. Argotario yra daugiakalbė, atvirasis, nepriklausoma nuo platformos programa su tvirtais švietimo aspektais, prieinama <www.argotario. net>.', 'it': 'Un\'abilità importante nel pensiero critico e nell\'argomentazione è la capacità di individuare e riconoscere errori. Argomenti fallaci, onnipresenti nel discorso argomentativo, possono essere ingannevoli, manipolatori o semplicemente portare a "mosse sbagliate" in una discussione. Nonostante la loro importanza, studiosi di argomentazione e ricercatori NLP con attenzione alla qualità dell\'argomentazione non hanno ancora indagato empiricamente le fallacie. L\'inesistenza di risorse che affrontano argomentazioni fallaci richiede approcci scalabili all\'acquisizione e all\'annotazione dei dati, per i quali la metodologia dei giochi seri offre un\'alternativa attraente, ma inesplorata. Vi presentiamo Argotario, un gioco serio che affronta le fallacie nell\'argomentazione quotidiana. Argotario è un\'applicazione multilingue, open source, indipendente dalla piattaforma con forti aspetti educativi, accessibile all\'indirizzo <www.argotario. net>.', 'kk': 'Маңызды ойлау және аргументация үшін маңызды жұмыс - фалацияларды көру және тану мүмкіндігі. Аргументтік дискурстағы барлық аргументтер, аргументтік дискурстағы барлық аргументтер жалғастырып, манипуляциялық, немесе дискуссия бойынша "жарамсыз жылжытулар" болуы мүмкін. Олардың маңыздылығына қарамастан, аргументациялық ғылымдары және NLP зерттеушілері аргументациялық сапасына көңіл көмектесілмейді. Аргументациялық ресурстардың жоқ болуы мәліметтерді алу мен жаңарту арқылы масштабтау арқылы көмектесетін көмектесуі керек. Ол үшін масштабтағы ойындар методологиясы жаңарту, бірақ таңдамаған, альтер Біз Арготарионы күнделік аргументациясындағы fallacies-мен қатынайтын маңызды ойынды таңдаймыз. Арготарио - көптілік, ашық көзі, платформа-тәуелсіз білім беру аспектері бар қолданба, <www.argotario дегенде қол жеткізетін. net>.', 'mk': 'Важна вештина во критичното мислење и аргументацијата е способноста да се забележат и препознаат лажностите. Фалсивните аргументи, насекаде присутни во аргументативниот дискурс, можат да бидат измамници, манипулативни или едноставно да водат до „ погрешни потези “ во дискусија. И покрај нивната важност, аргументарните научници и истражувачите на НЛП со фокус на квалитетот на аргументацијата сé уште не ги истражуваат фалсифиците емпирички. Непостоењето на ресурси кои се занимаваат со лажни аргументации повикува на скалирани пристапи до набавување и анотација на податоци, за кои сериозната методологија на игрите нуди привлечна, но неистражена, алтернатива. Го претставуваме Арготарио, сериозна игра која се справува со грешки во секојдневните аргументи. Арготарио е мултијазична, отворен код, независна од платформата апликација со силни образовни аспекти, достапна на <www.argotario. Нет>.', 'ms': "Kekuatan penting dalam pemikiran kritik dan argumen adalah kemampuan untuk melihat dan mengenali kegagalan. Argumen yang gagal, tersebar dalam pembicaraan argumentatif, boleh menipu, manipulatif, atau hanya menyebabkan 'gerakan yang salah' dalam pembicaraan. Walaupun penting mereka, ilmuwan argumen dan peneliti NLP dengan fokus pada kualiti argumen belum menyelidiki kegagalan secara empirik. The nonexistence of resources dealing with fallacious argumentation calls for scalable approaches to data acquisition and annotation, for which the serious games methodology offers an appealing, yet unexplored, alternative.  Kami memperkenalkan Argotario, permainan serius yang berurusan dengan kegagalan dalam argumen setiap hari. Argotario adalah aplikasi berbilang-bahasa, sumber terbuka, bebas-platform dengan aspek pendidikan yang kuat, boleh didapati di <www.argotario. net>.", 'ml': "പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ചിന്തിക്കുന്നതിനും വാദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിനും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു കഴിവ് എന്താണെന്നാല്\u200d പ വ്യാജമായ വാദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d, വാദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d, വഞ്ചിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതും വഞ്ചിക്കുന്നതും അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d 'തെറ് അവരുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് എങ്കിലും വാദിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസികളും എംഎല്\u200dപി പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരും വാദ്യാഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ ഗുണത്തി വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയാണ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നത് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിഷ നമ്മള്\u200d അര്\u200dഗോട്ടാരിയോയെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, എല്ലാ ദിവസവും വാദിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള കളിയാണ്. അര്\u200dഗോട്ടാരിയോ ഒരു പല ഭാഷ, തുറന്ന സ്രോതസ്സ്, പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിലെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ പ്രയോഗമാണ്. ശക്തിയുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ  നെറ്റ്>.", 'mt': 'Ħiliet importanti fil-ħsieb u l-argumentazzjoni kritiċi huma l-kapaċità li jiġu identifikati u rikonoxxuti fallimenti. Argumenti fallaċi, omnipresenti fid-diskors argumentattiv, jistgħu jkunu qarrieqa, manipulattivi, jew sempliċement iwasslu għal ‘movimenti żbaljati’ f’diskussjoni. Minkejja l-importanza tagħhom, l-istudenti tal-argumentazzjoni u r-riċerkaturi tal-NLP b’enfasi fuq il-kwalità tal-argumentazzjoni għadhom ma investigawx fallimenti empirikament. In-nuqqas ta’ eżistenza ta’ riżorsi li jittrattaw argumentazzjoni fallaċi jitlob approċċi skalabbli għall-akkwist u l-annotazzjoni tad-dejta, li għalihom il-metodoloġija serja tal-logħob toffri alternattiva attraenti, iżda mhux esplorata. Aħna nippreżentaw Argotario, logħba serja li tittratta l-fallimenti fl-argumentazzjoni ta’ kuljum. Argotario huwa applikazzjoni multilingwi, open-source, indipendenti mill-pjattaforma b’aspetti edukattivi b’saħħithom, a ċċessibbli fuq <www.argotario. nett>.', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлагдмал бодол, аргументын чухал чадвар бол булчинг ойлгох, ойлгох чадвар. Аргументийн ярианд байгаа бүх аргументууд нь буруу хөдөлгөөн байж болно. Тэдний чухал зүйл ч гэсэн, аргументын эрдэмтэд болон НЛП судлаачид аргументын чанарыг анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулж байгаагүй. Өвөрмөц аргументтай тулгарч байгаа баялаг байхгүй байдал нь өгөгдлийн худалдан авах болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн арга барилгыг хүсч чадна. Энэ нь үнэхээр чухал тоглоомын методологийг шалгаж буй, гэхдээ тайлбаргүй, сонголтгүй. Бид өдөр тутмын тухай арготарио гэдэг маш чухал тоглоом юм. Арготарио бол олон хэлний, нээлттэй эх үүсвэр, платформ-хамааралтай боловсролын талаар хүчтэй хэрэглээ,  <www.argotario-д ашиглах боломжтой. net>.', 'no': 'Eit viktig kvalitet i kritisk tenking og argumentasjon er kapasiteten for å oppdaga og gjenkjenna fallacier. Falske argumenter, alltid tilgjengelege i argumentativ diskurs, kan vera falsifisert, manipulativ eller enkelt føre til «feil trekk» i ein diskusjon. Til tross deres viktighet har argumentasjonsforskere og NLP-forskere med fokus på argumentasjonskvalitet enno ikkje undersøkte fallacies empirisk. Det ikkje finst ressursar som arbeider med falske argumentasjon påkallar for skalerbare tilnærmingar til data-henting og annotasjon, som det seriøse spelmetodulogien tilbyr ein appelsjon, men ikkje utforska, alternativet. Vi presenterer Argotario, eit seriøsk spel som handler med fallacies i kvardag argument. Argotario er ein fleirspråk, opna kjelde, plattformuavhengig program med sterke utdanningsspekter, tilgjengeleg på <www.argotario. net>.', 'pl': 'Ważną umiejętnością w krytycznym myśleniu i argumentacji jest umiejętność wykrywania i rozpoznawania błędów. Fałszywe argumenty, wszechobecne w dyskursie argumentacyjnym, mogą być zwodnicze, manipulujące lub po prostu prowadzące do "złych ruchów" w dyskusji. Pomimo ich znaczenia naukowcy argumentacji i badacze NLP skupiający się na jakości argumentacji nie badali jeszcze empirycznie błędów. Brak zasobów zajmujących się błędną argumentacją wymaga skalowalnego podejścia do pozyskiwania i adnotacji danych, dla których metodologia gier poważnych stanowi atrakcyjną, ale niezbadaną alternatywę. Przedstawiamy Argotario, poważną grę, która zajmuje się błędami w codziennej argumentacji. Argotario to wielojęzyczna, open-source, niezależna od platformy aplikacja o silnych aspektach edukacyjnych, dostępna pod adresem <www.argotario. netto>.', 'ro': 'O abilitate importantă în gândirea critică și argumentarea este capacitatea de a detecta și recunoaște erorile. Argumentele eronate, omniprezente în discursul argumentativ, pot fi înșelătoare, manipulative sau pur și simplu conducând la "mișcări greșite" într-o discuție. În ciuda importanței lor, cercetătorii de argumentare și cercetătorii PNL cu accent pe calitatea argumentării nu au investigat încă erorile empiric. Inexistența resurselor care se ocupă de argumentarea eronată necesită abordări scalabile pentru achiziționarea și adnotarea datelor, pentru care metodologia jocurilor serioase oferă o alternativă atrăgătoare, dar neexplorată. Vă prezentăm Argotario, un joc serios care se ocupă de erori în argumentarea de zi cu zi. Argotario este o aplicație multilingvă, open-source, independentă de platformă, cu aspecte educaționale puternice, accesibilă la <www.argotario. net>.', 'sr': "Važna vještina u kritičnom razmišljanju i argumentaciji je sposobnost otkrivanja i prepoznavanja falacija. Fallacious arguments, omnipresent in argumentative discourse, can be deceptive, manipulative, or simply leading to 'wrong moves' in a discussion. Uprkos njihovoj važnosti, naučnici argumentacije i istraživači NLP sa fokusiranjem na kvalitetu argumentacije još nisu istraživali falaciju empirično. Nepostojanje resursa koji se bave falacijom argumentacijom zahtijeva mjerljivim pristupima prikupljanju i annotaciji podataka, za koje je metodika ozbiljnih igra nudila apelujuću, ali neočekivanu, alternativu. Predstavljamo Argotario, ozbiljnu igru koja se bavi falacijama u svakodnevnoj argumentaciji. Argotario je multijezički, otvoreni izvor, platform a nezavisna aplikacija sa jakim obrazovnim aspektima, dostupnim na <www.argotario. net>.", 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හිතන්න හා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ වැදගත් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද Fallacious කතාවක්, සාමාන්\u200dය වාර්තාවක් කතාවක් වෙනුවෙන්, පුළුවන් විහිළුවක්, විහිළුවක් වෙනුවෙන්, නැත්තම් සිද්ධ ව ඔවුන්ගේ වැදගත් විදියට තියෙන්නේ නැත්නම්, ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාඥයෝ සහ NLP පරීක්ෂකයෝ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට අවධානය ක විශාල විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ නැහැ සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සැකසීමක් වෙනුවෙන් තියෙන්නේ දත්ත ගන්න සහ ආරංචිකරණය සඳහා සැකසීමක් විදි අපි ආර්ගෝටාරියෝ, හැමදාම විරෝද්ධයෙන් විශේෂ සෙල්ලම් කරනවා. ආර්ගෝටාරියෝ තමයි බොහොම භාෂාවක්, විවෘත ස්ථානය, ප්ලේටෆ්ටෝම් ස්වතුත්වික භාෂාවක්, ශක්තිමත්  net>.', 'so': 'Xirfad muhiim ah oo ku saabsan fikrada muhiimka ah iyo hadalka muhiimka ah waa awoodda la helo iyo aqoonsashada fallaadka. Hadalka khiyaanada ah ee aan waxtar lahayn, hada lagu hadlo hadal dood ah, waxay noqon karaan khiyaano, waxqabad ama waxay ku hoggaami karaan sheekeysi `dhaqdhaqaaq khalad ah’. Inta kastoo ay muhiim u tahay, ardayda wadashada iyo cilmi-baaritaanka NLP waxay focus ugu leeyihiin takhasuska arrimaha hadalka aan weli u baarayn fallaadka. The nonexistence of resources dealing with fallacious argumentation calls for scalable approaches to data acquisition and annotation, for which the serious games methodology offers an appealing, yet unexplored, alternative.  Argotario waxaynu joognaa ciyaar daran oo ka maamula fallaadho maalin walba. Argotario waa codsi luuqado kala duduwan oo furan, jardiinada aan xor u lahayn, waxayna leedahay dhinacyo xoog leh oo waxbarasho, waxaana laga heli karaa <www.argotario». net>.', 'sv': 'En viktig färdighet i kritiskt tänkande och argumentation är förmågan att upptäcka och känna igen felaktigheter. Felaktiga argument, allestädes närvarande i argumenterande diskurs, kan vara vilseledande, manipulerande eller helt enkelt leda till "felaktiga drag" i en diskussion. Trots deras betydelse har argumentationsforskare och NLP-forskare med fokus på argumentationskvalitet ännu inte undersökt felaktigheter empiriskt. Bristen på resurser som hanterar felaktig argumentation kräver skalbara metoder för datainsamling och notering, för vilka seriösa spelmetoder erbjuder ett tilltalande men outforskat alternativ. Vi presenterar Argotario, ett seriöst spel som behandlar felaktigheter i vardagens argumentation. Argotario är en flerspråkig, öppen källkod, plattformsoberoende applikation med starka utbildningsaspekter, tillgänglig på <www.argotario. net>.', 'ta': "ஒரு முக்கியமான நினைவு மற்றும் தர்க்கம் என்பது பார்க்க மற்றும் குழப்பத்தை அறிந்து கொள்ள முடியும். பொய் வார்ப்புகள், வார்த்தையாட்டு பேச்சில் தற்போது, ஏமாற்றலாம், கையாளுதலாம் இருக்க முடியும், அல்லது 'தவறான நகர்த்தல்' ஒரு விவாதத அவர்களுடைய முக்கியமாக இருந்தாலும், வார்ப்பு மாணவர்கள் மற்றும் NLP ஆராய்ச்சி ஆராய்ச்சிகள் மீது கவனம் கொண்டு தர்க்கம் தரம் மீ வெறுமையான தர்க்கம் பற்றிய மூலங்கள் இல்லை தகவல் பெறுதல் மற்றும் விளையாட்டு முறைமைகளை கேட்கிறது, அதில் தீவிரமான விளையாட்டு முறைமையாக ஒரு ஆப் நாங்கள் அர்கோடோடாரியோ, ஒரு தீவிரமான விளையாட்டு, ஒவ்வொரு நாளும் தர்க்கம் கொண்டு விளையாட்டை கொண்ட ஆர்கோடாரியோ ஒரு பல மொழிகள், திறந்த மூலத்தில் உள்ளது, தளம் சுதந்திரமான பயன்பாடு, வலுவான கல்விப்பாட்டு விளைவுகள் உள்ளது <www.argotario-ல் அ net>.", 'ur': 'ضروری فکرت اور بحث میں ایک مهم کائنات ہے کہ فالکوسی کو دیکھنے اور پہچان سکنے کی قابلیت ہے. جھگڑنے والے جھگڑنے میں ہر موجود دلیل ہے، فریب دینے والی، غلط بات، یا صرف ایک بحث میں "غلط حرکت" کی رخ دینے والی ہو سکتی ہے. ان کے اہم اثر کے بغیر، بحثات علماء اور NLP تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ بحثات کی کیفیت پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے، فسادیوں کو ابھی مضبوط تحقیق نہیں کیا گیا ہے. غیر موجود منابع جن کے بارے میں غیر موجود ہو سکتے ہیں، جن کے لئے ڈیٹا حاصل کرنا اور اظہار کرنا کے مطابق مطابق مطابق پڑھنے کے لئے پکارتے ہیں، جن کے لئے سنگین کھیل کے مطابق مطابق اظہار کرنے والی، لیکن غیر اظہار ہم آرگوٹاریو کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک سنگین کھیل جو روزہ اختلاف میں فالکاسی کے ساتھ معاملہ کرتی ہے۔ آرگوٹاریو (Argotario) ایک بہت سی زبان، اوپن-سورس ہے، پلٹورم-سفارشی کاربرد ہے، مضبوط تحصیل کے اندازے کے ساتھ، جو <www.argotario میں دسترسی حاصل کرنے والی ہے. net>.', 'uz': 'Muhimlik fikr va murakkab qilish uchun muhim xilli bu suhbatni ko\'rsatish va o\'zgartirish imkoniyati. Ботил ҳужжатлар, ҳужжат суҳбатида ҳозир турли ҳужжатлар холи, мажбурлаш ёки "хато ҳаракатга чиқиш" ҳужжатга эга бўлиши мумкин. Agar ularning muhim bo\'lsa, argumentlar va NLP ta\'qituvchilari o\'qituvchilari o\'qituvchilarga foydalanishni o\'rganish kerakli holatlarni o\'zgartiradi. Bu holatning sifatida o\'zgarishni o\'rganib qolmaydi. Name Biz Argotario, har kuni davomida o\'tkaziladigan katta o\'yincha o\'ylayapmiz. Argotario bir necha tilda ochilgan, ochiq-manba, platform-xotir dastur, <www.argotario\' da qulay ta\'lim bilan ishlatiladi. net>.', 'vi': 'Một kỹ năng quan trọng trong suy nghĩ và tranh luận quan trọng là khả năng nhận ra sai sót. Những lời lẽ mê hoặc, luôn luôn luôn dẫn đến những bước đi sai trái trong cuộc thảo luận. Mặc cho tầm quan trọng của họ, các nhà nghiên cứu nghiên cứu nghiên cứu về chất lượng nghiên cứu không có kinh nghiệm. Sự không tồn tại của nguồn lực đối phó với các bài luận sai lầm đòi hỏi một phương pháp leo thang tới việc lấy dữ liệu và ghi chú, mà phương pháp chơi nghiêm túc cho đó là một phương pháp hấp dẫn, nhưng chưa được khám phá. Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu: Argotario, một trò chơi nghiêm túc xử lý các dự án phòng hằng ngày. Argo là một chương trình độc lập đa dạng, phát-ra-dạng rộng, với các khía cạnh giáo dục mạnh mẽ, dễ truy cập tại tạp chí. net ư?', 'da': 'En vigtig færdighed i kritisk tænkning og argumentation er evnen til at spotte og genkende fejl. Fejlagtige argumenter, allestedsnærværende i argumenterende diskurs, kan være vildledende, manipulerende eller simpelthen føre til "forkerte bevægelser" i en diskussion. På trods af deres betydning har argumentationsforskere og NLP-forskere med fokus på argumentationskvalitet endnu ikke undersøgt fejl empirisk. Den manglende eksistens af ressourcer, der beskæftiger sig med fejlagtig argumentation, kræver skalerbare tilgange til dataindsamling og annotation, hvor seriøse spilmetoder tilbyder et attraktivt, men uudforsket alternativ. Vi præsenterer Argotario, et seriøst spil, der beskæftiger sig med fejl i hverdagens argumentation. Argotario er en flersproget, open source, platform-uafhængig applikation med stærke uddannelsesmæssige aspekter, tilgængelig på <www.argotario. net>.', 'nl': "Een belangrijke vaardigheid in kritisch denken en argumenteren is het vermogen om fouten te ontdekken en te herkennen. Faleachtige argumenten, alomtegenwoordig in argumentatief discours, kunnen misleidend, manipulatief zijn of simpelweg leiden tot 'verkeerde bewegingen' in een discussie. Ondanks hun belang hebben argumentatiewetenschappers en NLP-onderzoekers met focus op argumentatiekwaliteit nog geen empirisch onderzoek gedaan naar falacies. Het ontbreken van middelen die omgaan met misleidende argumentatie vraagt om schaalbare benaderingen voor gegevensverzameling en annotatie, waarvoor de serious games methodologie een aantrekkelijk, maar onontdekt alternatief biedt. We presenteren Argotario, een serieus spel dat omgaat met mislukkingen in alledaagse argumentatie. Argotario is een meertalige, open-source, platform-onafhankelijke applicatie met sterke educatieve aspecten, toegankelijk op <www.argotario. netto>.", 'bg': 'Важно умение в критичното мислене и аргументацията е способността да се забелязват и разпознават фалациите. Фалшивите аргументи, всеприсъстващи в аргументативния дискурс, могат да бъдат измамни, манипулативни или просто да доведат до "погрешни ходове" в дискусията. Въпреки важността си, учените по аргументация и изследователите на НЛП с фокус върху качеството на аргументацията все още не са изследвали емпирично фалациите. Липсата на ресурси, занимаващи се с фалшива аргументация, изисква мащабируеми подходи за придобиване и анотация на данни, за които методологията на сериозните игри предлага привлекателна, но неизследвана алтернатива. Представяме ви сериозна игра, която се занимава с заблуди в ежедневната аргументация. Арготарио е многоезично, с отворен код, независимо от платформата приложение със силни образователни аспекти, достъпно на <www.argotario. net>.', 'hr': "Važna vještina kritičnog razmišljanja i argumentacije je sposobnost otkriti i prepoznati falacije. Fallacious arguments, omnipresent in argumentative discourse, can be deceptive, manipulative, or simply leading to 'wrong moves' in a discussion. Unatoč njihovoj važnosti, naučnici argumentacije i istraživači NLP-a s fokusiranjem na kvalitetu argumentacije još nisu istraživali falacije empirično. Nepostojanje resursa koji se bave opasnom argumentacijom zahtijeva mjerljivim pristupima prikupljanju i annotaciji podataka, za koje je metodika ozbiljnih igra nudila apelujuću, ali neočekivanu, alternativu. Predstavljamo Argotario, ozbiljnu igru koja se bavi falacijama u svakodnevnoj argumentaciji. Argotario je multijezički, otvoreni izvor, platform a nezavisna aplikacija s jakim obrazovnim aspektima, dostupnim na <www.argotario. net>.", 'de': 'Eine wichtige Fähigkeit im kritischen Denken und Argumentieren ist die Fähigkeit, Irrtümer zu erkennen und zu erkennen. Falsche Argumente, allgegenwärtig im argumentativen Diskurs, können trügerisch, manipulativ oder einfach zu "falschen Bewegungen" in einer Diskussion führen. Trotz ihrer Bedeutung haben Argumentationswissenschaftler und NLP-Forscher mit Fokus auf Argumentationsqualität Fehlverhalten bisher nicht empirisch untersucht. Das Fehlen von Ressourcen, die sich mit irreführender Argumentation beschäftigen, erfordert skalierbare Ansätze zur Datenerfassung und -annotation, für die die Serious Games-Methodik eine attraktive, aber unerforschte Alternative bietet. Wir präsentieren Argotario, ein Serious Game, das sich mit Irrtümern in der täglichen Argumentation beschäftigt. Argotario ist eine mehrsprachige, quelloffene, plattformunabhängige Anwendung mit starken pädagogischen Aspekten, zugänglich unter <www.argotario. netto>.', 'id': "An important skill in critical thinking and argumentation is the ability to spot and recognize fallacies.  Argumen gagal, omnipresen dalam pidato argumensif, dapat menipu, manipulatif, atau hanya menyebabkan 'gerakan yang salah' dalam diskusi. Meskipun penting mereka, para ilmuwan argumen dan peneliti NLP dengan fokus pada kualitas argumen belum menyelidiki kegagalan secara empiris. Tidak ada sumber daya yang berurusan dengan argumen palsu memanggil pendekatan yang dapat diperbaiki untuk pengakuan dan anotasi data, yang mana metodologi permainan serius menawarkan alternatif yang menarik, namun tidak dikenalpasti. Kami memperkenalkan Argotario, permainan serius yang berurusan dengan kegagalan dalam argumen sehari-hari. Argotario adalah aplikasi multibahasa, sumber terbuka, platform-independent dengan aspek pendidikan yang kuat, tersedia di <www.argotario. net>.", 'fa': 'یک مهارت مهم در فکر و بحث ضروری توانایی مشاهده کردن و شناختن فالکاسی است. دلیل\u200cهای ناراحتی، همه\u200cی چیز در گفتگوهای مذاکره\u200cای، می\u200cتواند فریب\u200cگیری، تغییر\u200cگیری باشد، یا به ساده\u200cای که به «حرکتهای ناراحتی» در یک گفتگو می\u200cرسد. با وجود اهمیت آنها، دانشمندان اختلاف و تحقیقات NLP با تمرکز روی کیفیت اختلاف هنوز از فالکاسی تحقیق نکرده\u200cاند. غیر وجود منابع در مورد توضیح ناپذیری، نیاز دارد به دسترسی قابل اندازه\u200cگیری برای گرفتن و اخطار داده\u200cها، که روش\u200cشناسی بازی\u200cهای جدی برای آن یک آزار کننده، ولی غیر توضیح\u200cداده، جایگزینی می\u200cدهد. ما آرگوتاریو را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک بازی جدی که در مجادله\u200cهای روزی با فالکاسی\u200cها در کار می\u200cکند. Argotario یک کاربرد بسیاری از زبان، منبع باز و استفاده از Platform-independent با نقطه های آموزشی قوی است که در <www.argotario دسترسی دارد. net>.', 'tr': "Kritik pikirlenýän we tartışmada wajyp ukyp çykyşyklary tanamak we çykyşyklary tanamak ukypdyr. Nädogry argumlar, söhbetdeşlik gürrüňde hemme bar, aldatmak, işleýji bolup biler ýada gürrüňde ýalňyş hereket edip biler. Olaryň wajyplygyna rağmen, sözleşme bilim adamlary we NLP araştyrmalarynyň sözleşmeleri wajyplygyna üns bermegi häzir hem boýunça ýüze barmady. Ululy argümatlar bilen çykan resurslar ýok bolmagy maglumat almak we duýgulama ýagdaýynyň golaýlary üçin golaýlaýar. Bu üçin çykyş oýun methodologiýasy çykyşsyz, emma tanyşsyz, başga bir nusga berer. Biz Argotario'y her gün tartışmada fallacilerle ilgili çykan bir oýun görkeýäris. Argotario /www.argotario'da elýeterli bolan bir köp dilli, a çyk-çeşme, plataforma-daýsyz öwrenmeli aspektler bilen elýeterli. net>.", 'sq': "Një aftësi e rëndësishme në mendimin kritik dhe argumentin është aftësia për të vëzhguar dhe njohur gabimet. Argumentet e gabuara, të përhapura në diskursin argumentues, mund të jenë mashtruese, manipuluese apo thjesht të çojnë në 'lëvizje të gabuara' në një diskutim. Megjithë rëndësinë e tyre, shkencëtarët e argumenteve dhe kërkuesit e NLP me përqëndrim në cilësinë e argumenteve nuk kanë hetuar ende gabimet empirike. Mungesa e burimeve që trajtojnë argumentet e gabuara kërkon përqasje të shkallëzueshme për marrjen e të dhënave dhe anotacionin, për të cilat metodologjia serioze e lojrave ofron një alternativë tërheqëse, por jo të eksploruar. We present Argotario, a serious game that deals with fallacies in everyday argumentation.  Argotario është një aplikacion shumëgjuhës, burimi i hapur, i pavarur nga platform a me aspekte të forta arsimore, i mundshëm në <www.argotario. net>.", 'af': "'n belangrike kunstenheid in kritiese dink en argumentasie is die moontlik om fallacies te bekend en te herken. Fallacious argumente, omnipresent in argumentatiewe diskursie, kan bedrief, manipulatief wees of eenvoudig na 'verkeerde skuiwe' in 'n diskusie lei. Terwyl hulle belangrikheid is, het argumentasielers en NLP-resekers met fokus op argumentasiekwaliteit nog nie gevind het fallacies empiries nie. Die onbestaande van hulpbronne wat met gevallige argumentasie verwerk het, roep vir skaalbere toegang tot data aanvanging en annotasie, waarvoor die ernstige speletjies metodologie 'n appealing, nog onverklare, alternatief aanbied. Ons stel Argotario voor 'n ernstige speletjie wat met fallacies in elke dag argumentasie verwerk. Argotario is 'n veelvuldige, oop-bron, platform-afhanklike toepassing met sterke onderwysingsaspekte, toeganklik by <www.argotario. net>.", 'am': 'አካባቢ አሳብ እና ክርክር የሚያስፈልገው ችሎታ ነው፡፡ የውሸት ክርክሮች፣ በተጨማሪ ንግግር፣ የሚያታልል፣ የሚያስተባብል፣ ወይም የተሳሳተ ንቅስቃሴን የሚመራ ‹ስሕተት› በተቃውሞው ውይይት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ግንኙነት ቢሆንም፣ የግንኙነት አስተማሪዎች እና የNLP አስተማሪዎች በአውራሲ ጥቅምት ላይ ማስታወቂያውን በማስማማማት ገና በአስቸጋሪው ውድቅ ላይ ሳይመረመር አላደረጉም፡፡ የውሸት አካባቢ አካባቢ ማግኘት የሀብት መኖሪያ ሳይኖር ለዳታ ማግኘት እና ማሰቃየት እንዲጠይቅ ይጠራል፡፡ አርጎታሪዮን በዕለቱ ሁኔታዊ ክርክር ላይ የሚያስጨንቀው ብርቱ ጨዋታ እናቀርባለን፡፡ አርጎቲዮ በብዙ ቋንቋ፣ የተከፈተ መልዕክት፣ ፕላተፎር-ነፃ ፕሮግራም ነው፡፡ net>.', 'hy': 'Կրիտիկ մտածողության և բանավեճերի մեջ կարևոր հմտություն է սխալմունքների հայտնաբերման և ճանաչելու ունակությունը: Սխալ բանավեճերը, որոնք գոյություն ունեն բանավեճի մեջ, կարող են խաբել, մանիպուլտիվ լինել կամ պարզապես հանգեցնել սխալ շարժումներին քննարկության մեջ: Չնայած նրանց կարևորությանը, բանավեճերի գիտնականները և ՆԼՊ-ի հետազոտողները, որոնք կենտրոնացել են բանավեճերի որակի վրա, դեռ չեն ուսումնասիրել սխալները էմպիրիկապես: Խաղաղ բանավեճերի հետ կապված ռեսուրսների չգոյությունը պահանջում է ընդլայնելի մոտեցումներ տվյալների հավաքելուն և annoտացիային, որոնց համար լուրջ խաղերի մեթոդոլոգիան առաջարկում է գրավիչ, սակայն անուսումնասիրելի, այլընտրանքային Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Արգոթարիոն, մի լուրջ խաղ, որը առնչվում է սխալների հետ ամենօրյա բանավեճում: Արգոթարիոն բազմալեզու, բաց աղբյուր, անկախ հարթային ծրագիր է, որը ունի ուժեղ կրթական ասպեկտներ, հասանելի է ։ net.', 'sw': "Ujuzi muhimu katika kufikiri na hoja ni uwezo wa kutambua na kutambua uvunjifu. Majadiliano ya uongo, hivi karibuni katika mazungumzo ya mjadala, yanaweza kuwa ya udanganyifu, udanganyifu, au kuongoza tu 'harakati za makosa' katika mjadala. Pamoja na umuhimu wao, wanazuoni wa mazungumzo na watafiti wa NLP wenye lengo la kiwango cha mazungumzo bado hawajachunguza vibaya vinavyoendelea. Kukuwepo na rasilimali zinazohusiana na hoja za msingi zinatoa wito wa namna mbaya za kupata taarifa na kuchanganya taarifa, ambazo mbinu za michezo makubwa zinatoa wito, lakini hazijapatika, mbadala. Tunawasilisha Argotario, mchezo mkubwa unaohusisha ukatili katika mazungumzo ya kila siku. Argotario ni matumizi ya lugha mbalimbali, yenye mwandishi huru wa jukwaa linalohusu masuala ya elimu yenye nguvu, yanayopatikana kwenye <www.argotario. net>.", 'bn': 'গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চিন্তা এবং যুক্তি নিয়ে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দক্ষতা হচ্ছে ভ্রান্তিকে দেখতে ও স্বীকার করত মিথ্যা বিতর্ক, যুক্তিগত কথোপকথনে উপস্থিত, বিভ্রান্ত, বিভ্রান্তিকর, অথবা ‘ভুল আন্দোলন’ নিয়ে আলোচনায় যেতে পারে। তাদের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সত্ত্বেও, যুক্তির শিক্ষার্থী এবং এনএলপি গবেষকদের যুক্তির মানের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে তারা এখনও ক্ যুক্তির মাধ্যমে মিলিত সম্পদ নেই, তথ্য পেতে এবং বিরক্তির জন্য তথ্য প্রতিযোগিতার ক্ষেত্রে স্ক্যালেবাল উপায়ের আহ্বান জানানো হয়েছে, যার জন্য গ আমরা আর্গোটারিওকে উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ খেলা যা প্রতিদিনের বিতর্কের সাথে মিলিত হয়। আর্গোটারিও একটি বহুভাষায়, উন্মুক্ত উৎস, প্লাটফর্ম-স্বাধীন অ্যাপ্লিকেশন, যার ক্ষেত্রে শক্ত শিক্ষার্থীর দিকে প্রবেশ করা য নেট>.', 'az': 'Kritik fikirləşmək və müzakirə etmək üçün vacib bir yeteneklik fallaciləri tanıma və tanıma yeteneklikdir. Müxtəlif argumentlər, müzakirçi sözlərdə olan hər hansı şey, aldatıcı, manipulatlı və ya sadəcə müzakirə içində "yanlış hərəkətlər" olar. Önemliklərinə baxmayaraq, argumentasyon elm sahibləri və NLP araştırmacıları argumentasyon keyfiyyətinə odaqlanmış olaraq hələ düşmənləri empirik olaraq incitmədilər. Qüvvətli argumentlər ilə müvəffəq edilən kaynaqların olmaması məlumatlar alınması və annotasyon üçün çətin oyun metodolojisi təklif edir, amma təmin edilməz, alternatif təklif edir. Biz Argotario\'yu, günlük müzakirələrində fallasiya ilə müzakirə edən ciddi bir oyun göstəririk. Argotario çox dilli, a çıq-kaynaq, platform-bağımsız proqramdır ki, qüvvətli təhsil aspektləri ilə <www.argotario\'da faydalanır. net>.', 'ca': "Una habilitat important en el pensament crític i l'argumentació és l'habilitat de detectar i reconèixer falàcies. Els arguments fracassos, omnipresents en discurs argumentatiu, poden ser enganyats, manipulatius o simplement portar a moviments equivocats en una discussió. Malgrat la seva importància, estudiants d'argumentació i investigadors de NLP centrats en la qualitat d'argumentació encara no han investigat les falàcies empíricament. La inexistencia de recursos que tracten d'argumentacions falàcies necessita abordaments escalables a l'adquisició i anotació de dades, per als quals la metodologia seriosa dels jocs ofereix una alternativa atractiva, però no explorada. Presentam Argotario, un joc seriós que tracta de falàcies en l'argumentació cotidiana. Argotario és una aplicació multillengua, de codi obert i independent de plataformes amb forts aspectes educatius, accessible a <www.argotario. net>.", 'bs': "Važna vještina u kritičnom razmišljanju i argumentaciji je sposobnost otkrivanja i prepoznavanja falacija. Fallacious arguments, omnipresent in argumentative discourse, can be deceptive, manipulative, or simply leading to 'wrong moves' in a discussion. Uprkos njihovoj važnosti, naučnici argumentacije i istraživači NLP sa fokusiranjem na kvalitetu argumentacije još nisu istraživali falacije empirično. Nepostojanje resursa koji se bave falacijskim argumentacijama zahtijeva mjerljivim pristupima prikupljanju i annotaciji podataka, za koje je metodika ozbiljnih igra nudila apelujuću, ali neočekivanu, alternativu. Predstavljamo Argotario, ozbiljnu igru koja se bavi falacijama u svakodnevnoj argumentaciji. Argotario je multijezički, otvoreni izvor, platform a nezavisna aplikacija sa jakim obrazovnim aspektima, dostupnim na <www.argotario. net>.", 'cs': 'Důležitou dovedností v kritickém myšlení a argumentaci je schopnost rozpoznat a rozpoznat klamy. Klamné argumenty, všudypřítomné v argumentativním diskurze, mohou být klamavé, manipulativní nebo prostě vedoucí k "špatným krokům" v diskusi. I přes svůj význam argumentační odborníci a výzkumníci NLP se zaměřením na kvalitu argumentace dosud nezkoumali klamy empiricky. Neexistence zdrojů zabývajících se falešnou argumentací vyžaduje škálovatelné přístupy k získávání a anotaci dat, pro které metodika seriózních her nabízí atraktivní, ale neprozkoumanou alternativu. Představujeme Argotario, seriózní hru, která se zabývá klamy v každodenní argumentaci. Argotario je vícejazyčná, open-source, platformově nezávislá aplikace se silnými vzdělávacími aspekty, dostupná na <www.argotario. síť>.', 'et': 'Kriitilise mõtlemise ja argumenteerimise oluline oskus on võime tuvastada ja ära tunda valesid. Valed argumendid, mis on kõikjal esinevad argumentides, võivad olla petlikud, manipuleerivad või lihtsalt viia arutelus valede käikudeni. Vaatamata oma tähtsusele ei ole argumentatsiooniteadlased ja NLP uurijad, kes keskenduvad argumentatsiooni kvaliteedile, veel empiiriliselt eksitatsioone uurinud. Valelike argumentidega tegelevate ressursside puudumine nõuab skaleeritavaid lähenemisviise andmete kogumisele ja annoteerimisele, mille jaoks tõsiste mängude metoodika pakub atraktiivset, kuid uurimata alternatiivi. Esitleme Argotario, tõsine mäng, mis tegeleb valedega igapäevases argumenteerimises. Argotario on mitmekeelne, avatud lähtekoodiga, platvormist sõltumatu rakendus tugevate hariduslike aspektidega, kättesaadav aadressil <www.argotario. net>.', 'ko': '비판적 사고와 논증의 중요한 기능은 오류를 발견하고 식별하는 능력이다.잘못된 이론은 변론적인 말에서 어디에나 있고 사기성, 조종성을 가지거나 토론 중의 잘못된 행동을 초래할 수 있다.비록 논증학자와 NLP 연구원들은 논증의 질을 매우 중시하지만, 그들은 아직 오류에 대해 실증 연구를 진행하지 않았다.오류 논증을 처리하는 자원이 존재하지 않기 때문에 확장 가능한 데이터 수집과 주석 방법이 필요하고 엄숙한 게임 방법론은 사람을 끌어당기지만 아직 탐색하지 못한 대체 방법을 제공한다.Argotario를 소개합니다. 일상적인 논쟁의 오류를 처리하는 엄숙한 게임입니다.Argotario는 다국어, 오픈소스, 플랫폼에 독립된 앱으로 <www.Argotario에 접근할 수 있는 강력한 교육 기능을 갖추고 있다.net>。', 'fi': 'Kriittisen ajattelun ja argumentoinnin tärkeä taito on kyky havaita ja tunnistaa harhaluulot. Väittelykeskustelussa esiintyvät valheelliset argumentit voivat olla harhaanjohtavia, manipuloivia tai yksinkertaisesti johtaa vääriin liikkeisiin keskustelussa. Argumentointitutkijat ja argumentoinnin laatuun keskittyneet NLP-tutkijat eivät ole vielä tutkineet harhakuvitelmia empiirisesti tärkeydestään huolimatta. Valehteluun argumentointiin liittyvien resurssien puuttuminen vaatii skaalautuvia lähestymistapoja tiedonhankintaan ja merkintöihin, joille serious games -menetelmä tarjoaa houkuttelevan, mutta tutkimattoman vaihtoehdon. Esittelemme Argotario, vakava peli, joka käsittelee erehdyksiä jokapäiväisessä argumentoinnissa. Argotario on monikielinen, avoimen lähdekoodin, alustariippumaton sovellus, jolla on vahvat koulutusnäkökohdat, saatavilla osoitteessa <www.argotario. net>.', 'sk': 'Pomembna spretnost kritičnega razmišljanja in argumentacije je sposobnost opazovanja in prepoznavanja napak. Lažni argumenti, ki so vsepovsotni v argumentativnem diskurzu, so lahko zavajajoči, manipulativni ali preprosto vodijo do napačnih potez v razpravi. Kljub svojemu pomenu argumentacijski strokovnjaki in raziskovalci NLP s poudarkom na kakovosti argumentacije še niso empirično raziskovali zmote. Neobstoj virov, ki se ukvarjajo z zmotno argumentacijo, zahteva razširljive pristope k pridobivanju podatkov in označevanju, za katere metodologija resnih iger ponuja privlačno, a neraziskano alternativo. Predstavljamo Argotario, resno igro, ki se ukvarja z zmatami v vsakdanjem argumentaciji. Argotario je večjezična, odprtokodna, platforma neodvisna aplikacija z močnimi izobraževalnimi vidiki, dostopna na <www.argotario. net>.', 'ha': "Taimar da muhimu a cikin fikar da muhimmi da za'a iya gane ko gane na fassarar. Babu'anar ƙarya, a yanzu a cikin mazaɓa mai husũma, za'a iya yaudara, ko kuwa yana madaidaita a cikin wani taƙaitun `tafiyar da ɓata'. Babu da muhimmin su, ma'abũta muhimmada da watani na NLP da mazaɓa, sun yi makini a kan nau'i da mazaɓa, ba za su yi kashẽwa ba. Babu manyan dũkiyõyi da ke dangantar da bakin fili, yana kiran su zuwa matsayin zartar da zane ta samu'a ga data, da kwamfyutan metoden gamuwa masu husũma, za'a bãyar da rufaffi, kuma ba'a yi buƙata ba, da wata musanya. Muna halatar da Argotario, game mai girma wanda ke aiki da fassara a cikin kunnufi a yinin. @ info net>.", 'he': 'כישור חשוב בחשבון קריטי ויכוח הוא היכולת לזהות ולזיהות שגויות. ויכוחים שגויים, מופיעים בכל מקום בתנאי טיעון, יכולים להיות משוגעים, מניפולטיביים, או פשוט להוביל לתהליכים הלא נכונים בדיון. למרות חשיבותיהם, מדעני התווכחות וחקרי NLP עם התמקדות באיכות התווכחות עדיין לא חקרו שגויות אמפירית. לא קיימת משאבים מתמודדים עם טיעון שגוי דורש גישות אפשריות לקבלת נתונים והציונים, עבור מה שמתודלת המשחקים הרצינות מציעה אלטרנטיבה מעניינת, אך לא חוקרת. אנחנו מציגים את ארגוטאריו, משחק רציני שמטפל בשליכות בטיעון יומי. ארגוטאריו (באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario; באנגלית: Argotario). רשת>.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé kuwi nggilalaman sing dikarepaké karo awak dhéwé kuwi bisa nguasai nêmên kuwi mau. Eror Gak dhéwé nganggo cara-cara, akeh dumaten lan cerceturan NLP nganggep ingkang dipolehasan karo segala macem sing gak adhil, ora nguasai perusahaan anyi pasar. Rasané awak dhéwé sing perusahaan nganggo akeh argument sing gak bener tentang kanggo nganggo perusahaan nggawe data nggo ngono nggawe dolanan sing perusahaan, nganggo perusahaan sistem sing beraksi Dino dolanan sing beraksi yang segala macem gak dhéwé, ora gewis gak nggawe Alternate. Awak dhéwé éntukno argument, perusahaan nganggo dolanan sing ngomong nik pakan jênêr rasané argument wrap modetextattr', 'bo': "སྐྱེས་ཆེན་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། སྒྲུབ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ལུས་པ་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་ནི་ Fallacious arguments, omnipresent in argument discourse, can be deceptive, manipulative, or simply leading to `wrong moves' in a discussion. དེ་དག་གི་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་། སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་རྩོམ་པ་དང་། NLP རྩོམ་སྒྲིག་པ་ཚོས་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་དང་། The nonexistence of resources dealing with fallacious argumentation calls for scalable approaches to data acquisition and annotation, for which the serious games methodology offers an appealing, yet unexplored, alternative. ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྒྲུབ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་མིའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་རྩེད་དམོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Argotario is a multilingual, open-source, platform-independent application with strong educational aspects, accessible at <www.argotario. net>."}
{'en': 'An Analysis and Visualization Tool for Case Study Learning of Linguistic Concepts', 'ar': 'أداة تحليل وتصور لتعلم دراسة الحالة للمفاهيم اللغوية', 'es': 'Una herramienta de análisis y visualización para el aprendizaje de conceptos lingüísticos de estudios de casos', 'pt': 'Uma Ferramenta de Análise e Visualização para Aprendizagem de Conceitos Lingüísticos em Estudo de Caso', 'fr': "Un outil d'analyse et de visualisation pour l'apprentissage de concepts linguistiques par étude de cas", 'ja': '言語概念のケーススタディ学習のための分析および視覚化ツール', 'zh': '语言例究析可视化具', 'ru': 'Инструмент анализа и визуализации для изучения лингвистических концепций на примере конкретных примеров', 'hi': 'भाषाई अवधारणाओं के केस स्टडी लर्निंग के लिए एक विश्लेषण और विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन टूल', 'ga': 'Uirlis Anailíse agus Amharcléirithe le hAghaidh Chás-Staidéar a Fhoghlaim ar Choincheapa Teangeolaíocha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Elemző és megjelenítő eszköz a nyelvi fogalmak esettanulmányi tanulásához', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο ανάλυσης και οπτικοποίησης για τη μάθηση γλωσσολογικών εννοιών', 'kk': 'Лингистикалық концепцияларды оқу үшін әріптерді оқу үшін анализ және визуализация құралы', 'it': "Uno strumento di analisi e visualizzazione per l'apprendimento di casi di studio di concetti linguistici", 'lt': 'Analizės ir vizualizavimo priemonė, skirta kalbinių koncepcijų mokymuisi atvejų tyrimu', 'mk': 'Инструмент за анализа и визуализација за настава на случаи на јазички концепти', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക് കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റുകളുടെ കേസ് സ്റ്റൌണ്ടി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അന്വേഷണവും കാണുന്ന ഉപകര', 'mt': 'Għodda ta’ Analiżi u Viżwalizzazzjoni għat-Tagħlim ta’ Kunċetti Lingwistiċi fi Studju ta’ Każijiet', 'mn': 'Судалгааны судалгааны талаар ярианы ойлголтын талаар шинжилгээ болон үзүүлэлтийн хэрэгсэл', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Narzędzie do analizy i wizualizacji dla studiów przypadku nauki koncepcji językowych', 'ro': 'Un instrument de analiză și vizualizare pentru studiul de caz de învățare a conceptelor lingvistice', 'sr': 'Analiziranje i vizualizacija alata za učenje slučajeva Lingističkih koncepta', 'so': 'An Analysis and Visualization Tool for Case Study Learning of Linguistic Concepts', 'sv': 'Ett analys- och visualiseringsverktyg för fallstudier lärande av språkliga begrepp', 'ta': 'கேஸ் படிப்பு கற்றுக்கான ஒரு ஆராய்வு மற்றும் பார்வை கருவி', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một công cụ phân tích và phân biệt ngôn ngữ học', 'bg': 'Инструмент за анализ и визуализация за изучаване на езикови концепции за казуси', 'hr': 'Analiziranje i vizualizacija alata za učenje slučajeva o lingvističkim konceptijama', 'da': 'Et analyse- og visualiseringsværktøj til case study læring af sproglige begreber', 'nl': 'Een analyse- en visualisatietool voor het leren van taalkundige concepten', 'id': 'Alat Analisi dan Visualisasi untuk Studi Kasus Belajar Koncept Bahasa', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '언어 개념 사례 학습의 분석과 시각화 도구', 'de': 'Ein Analyse- und Visualisierungstool zum Fallstudienlernen linguistischer Konzepte', 'sw': 'Kifaa cha Uchambuzi na Maonekano kwa Kufundisha Mazungumzo ya Kireno', 'tr': 'Bir Çizgi Mazmunlar öwrenmek üçin Taýramlyk we Görselleştirmek Aracı', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'An Analysis and Visualization Tool for Case Study Learning of Linguistic Concepts', 'am': 'የመስመር ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Լեզվային գաղափարների ուսումնասիրության դեպքերի ուսումնասիրության վերլուծության և վիզուալիզացիայի գործիք', 'bs': 'Analiziranje i vizualizacija alata za učenje slučajeva o lingvističkim koncepcijama', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিক কনসেপ্টসের কেস স্টিডি শিক্ষার জন্য একটি বিশ্লেষণ এবং দৃশ্যমান টুল', 'az': '쎇즙牺椠쎶祲즙湭즙欠쎼쎧쎼渠慮慬楺椠盉餠柃뙲쎼滃뱬泉駅齤楲淉餠癡獩瓉饳椊', 'ca': "Una eina d'anàlisi i visualització per a l'aprenentatge de conceptes lingüístics d'estudis de casos", 'cs': 'Nástroj pro analýzu a vizualizaci pro případovou studii učení jazykových pojmů', 'et': 'Analüüsi ja visualiseerimise vahend juhtumiuuringu õppimiseks keeleliste kontseptsioonide', 'fi': 'Analyysi- ja visualisointityökalu tapaustutkimuksen oppimiseen kielikäsitteistä', 'jv': 'an Test and Visual Tool for Case Learning of Linguistical Methods', 'ha': 'An Analysis and Visualization Tool for Case Study Learning of Linguistic Concepts', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Orodje za analizo in vizualizacijo za učenje jezikovnih konceptov v študiji primerov', 'bo': 'An Analysis and Visualization Tool for Case Study of Linguistic Concepts'}
{'en': 'We present an educational tool that integrates computational linguistics resources for use in non-technical undergraduate language science courses. By using the tool in conjunction with evidence-driven pedagogical case studies, we strive to provide opportunities for students to gain an understanding of linguistic concepts and analysis through the lens of realistic problems in feasible ways. Case studies tend to be used in legal, business, and health education contexts, but less in the teaching and learning of linguistics. The approach introduced also has potential to encourage students across training backgrounds to continue on to computational language analysis coursework.', 'ar': 'نقدم أداة تعليمية تدمج موارد اللغويات الحاسوبية لاستخدامها في دورات علوم اللغة غير الفنية للطلاب الجامعيين. من خلال استخدام الأداة جنبًا إلى جنب مع دراسات الحالة التربوية القائمة على الأدلة ، فإننا نسعى جاهدين لتوفير الفرص للطلاب لاكتساب فهم للمفاهيم اللغوية والتحليل من خلال عدسة المشكلات الواقعية بطرق مجدية. تميل دراسات الحالة إلى استخدامها في سياقات التثقيف القانوني والتجاري والصحي ، ولكن بشكل أقل في تدريس وتعلم اللغويات. يحتوي النهج الذي تم تقديمه أيضًا على إمكانية تشجيع الطلاب عبر خلفيات التدريب على الاستمرار في الدورات الدراسية لتحليل اللغة الحسابية.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un outil pédagogique qui intègre des ressources de linguistique computationnelle à utiliser dans des cours de premier cycle non techniques en sciences du langage. En utilisant cet outil conjointement avec des études de cas pédagogiques fondées sur des données probantes, nous nous efforçons de donner aux étudiants la possibilité de comprendre les concepts linguistiques et de les analyser à travers le prisme de problèmes réalistes de manière réalisable. Les études de cas ont tendance à être utilisées dans des contextes juridiques, commerciaux et d'éducation à la santé, mais moins dans l'enseignement et l'apprentissage de la linguistique. L'approche introduite a également le potentiel d'encourager les étudiants de tous les horizons de formation à poursuivre leurs cours d'analyse du langage informatique.", 'es': 'Presentamos una herramienta educativa que integra recursos lingüísticos computacionales para su uso en cursos de ciencias del lenguaje de pregrado no técnicos. Al usar la herramienta junto con estudios de casos pedagógicos basados en evidencia, nos esforzamos por brindar oportunidades para que los estudiantes obtengan una comprensión de los conceptos lingüísticos y el análisis a través de la lente de problemas realistas de manera factible. Los estudios de casos tienden a utilizarse en contextos legales, empresariales y de educación sanitaria, pero menos en la enseñanza y el aprendizaje de la lingüística. El enfoque introducido también tiene el potencial de alentar a los estudiantes de todos los niveles de formación a continuar con los cursos de análisis computacional del lenguaje.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma ferramenta educacional que integra recursos de linguística computacional para uso em cursos não técnicos de graduação em ciências da língua. Ao usar a ferramenta em conjunto com estudos de caso pedagógicos baseados em evidências, nos esforçamos para oferecer oportunidades para os alunos obterem uma compreensão dos conceitos linguísticos e da análise através da lente de problemas realistas de maneiras viáveis. Os estudos de caso tendem a ser usados em contextos jurídicos, empresariais e de educação em saúde, mas menos no ensino e aprendizagem de linguística. A abordagem introduzida também tem o potencial de incentivar os alunos de diferentes origens de treinamento a continuar com os cursos de análise de linguagem computacional.', 'ja': '私たちは、計算言語学リソースを統合して、非技術的な学部の言語科学コースで使用するための教育ツールを提示します。このツールをエビデンス主導型の教育ケーススタディと併用することで、実現可能な方法で現実的な問題の視点を通じて言語学的概念と分析の理解を学習者に得る機会を提供することに努めている。ケーススタディは、法律、ビジネス、健康教育の文脈で使用される傾向がありますが、言語学の教授と学習ではあまり使用されません。導入されたアプローチは、トレーニングのバックグラウンドを超えて学習者が計算言語分析のコースワークに進むことを奨励する可能性もある。', 'zh': '设教具,集算语言学资,施于非技术性本科语言科学课程。 因将该具与证证驱动的教学案例研究合用,我们努力为学生供机会,以可行的因缘现实问来知道。 例究向法,商康教背景,然少于语言学教习。 引入之法,犹有劝异培训背景者续学计算语言析课程。', 'hi': 'हम एक शैक्षिक उपकरण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो गैर-तकनीकी स्नातक भाषा विज्ञान पाठ्यक्रमों में उपयोग के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान संसाधनों को एकीकृत करता है। साक्ष्य-संचालित शैक्षणिक मामले के अध्ययन के साथ संयोजन के रूप में उपकरण का उपयोग करके, हम छात्रों को व्यवहार्य तरीकों से यथार्थवादी समस्याओं के लेंस के माध्यम से भाषाई अवधारणाओं और विश्लेषण की समझ हासिल करने के अवसर प्रदान करने का प्रयास करते हैं। मामले के अध्ययन का उपयोग कानूनी, व्यवसाय और स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा संदर्भों में किया जाता है, लेकिन भाषाविज्ञान के शिक्षण और सीखने में कम। पेश किए गए दृष्टिकोण में कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषा विश्लेषण coursework पर जारी रखने के लिए प्रशिक्षण पृष्ठभूमि में छात्रों को प्रोत्साहित करने की क्षमता भी है।', 'ru': 'Представляем образовательный инструмент, объединяющий ресурсы вычислительной лингвистики для использования на нетехнических курсах языкознания бакалавриата. Используя инструмент в сочетании с обоснованными педагогическими примерами, мы стремимся предоставить студентам возможность получить понимание лингвистических концепций и анализа через призму реалистичных проблем реальными способами. Тематические исследования, как правило, используются в контексте юридического, делового и медицинского образования, но в меньшей степени в преподавании и изучении лингвистики. Внедренный подход также имеет потенциал для поощрения студентов всех уровней образования к продолжению работы по компьютерному анализу языка.', 'ga': "Cuirimid uirlis oideachais i láthair a chomhtháthaíonn acmhainní ríomhtheangeolaíochta le húsáid i gcúrsaí fochéime eolaíochta teanga neamhtheicniúla. Trí úsáid a bhaint as an uirlis i gcomhar le cás-staidéir oideolaíocha atá bunaithe ar fhianaise, déanaimid ár ndícheall deiseanna a sholáthar do mhic léinn tuiscint a fháil ar choincheapa agus anailís teanga trí lionsa na bhfadhbanna réadúla ar bhealaí indéanta. Is gnách go n-úsáidtear cás-staidéir i gcomhthéacs an dlí, an ghnó agus an oideachais sláinte, ach níos lú úsáide i dteagasc agus i bhfoghlaim na teangeolaíochta. D'fhéadfadh an cur chuige a tugadh isteach freisin spreagadh a thabhairt do mhic léinn ó chúlraí oiliúna leanúint ar aghaidh go dtí obair chúrsa ar anailís teanga ríomhaireachtúil.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ განსწავლებელი საქაღალდე, რომელიც კომპუტაციალური ლინგურისტიკის რესურსების ინტერგურაციას, რომელიც არ-ტექნონიკური მეცნიერების გამოყენებით ხელსაწყობილობის შესახებ პედაგოგიური კვლევების შესახებ, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სტუდენტებისთვის პრობლემების შესახებ და ანალიზიციის შესახებ რეალიჟრური პრობლემების ლენსისტიკის შესა კონტექსტის კონტექსტის სწორედ, ბიზნესტის და ჯანმრთელო განათლების კონტექსტში გამოყენება, მაგრამ უფრო ცოტა ენგურისტიკის სწავლებაში ჩვენებული პროგრამის შესახებ უნდა იყოს პროცენტი, რომ სტუდენტებს განაკეთებული ფუნქციების განმავლობაში დაუწყება კომპუტეციალური ენის ანალიზის კუ', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy oktatási eszközt, amely integrálja a számítástechnikai nyelvészeti erőforrásokat a nem technikai alapképzési nyelvtudományi kurzusokban. Az eszköz bizonyítékokon alapuló pedagógiai esettanulmányokkal együtt történő használatával arra törekszünk, hogy lehetőséget biztosítsunk a hallgatók számára, hogy megértsék a nyelvi fogalmakat és elemzéseket a reális problémák lencséjén keresztül, megvalósítható módon. Az esettanulmányokat általában jogi, üzleti és egészségügyi oktatási kontextusokban használják, de kevésbé a nyelvészet oktatásában és tanulásában. A bevezetett megközelítés potenciálisan ösztönözheti a hallgatókat a képzési hátterekben, hogy folytassák a számítástechnikai nyelvelemzési tanfolyamokat.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα εκπαιδευτικό εργαλείο που ενσωματώνει υπολογιστικούς γλωσσικούς πόρους για χρήση σε μη τεχνικά προπτυχιακά μαθήματα γλωσσολογίας. Χρησιμοποιώντας το εργαλείο σε συνδυασμό με τεκμηριωμένες παιδαγωγικές περιπτωσιολογικές μελέτες, προσπαθούμε να προσφέρουμε ευκαιρίες στους μαθητές να αποκτήσουν μια κατανόηση των γλωσσικών εννοιών και ανάλυση μέσω του φακού των ρεαλιστικών προβλημάτων με εφικτούς τρόπους. Οι μελέτες περιπτώσεων τείνουν να χρησιμοποιούνται σε νομικά, επιχειρηματικά και υγειονομικά πλαίσια, αλλά λιγότερο στη διδασκαλία και τη μάθηση της γλωσσολογίας. Η προσέγγιση που εισήχθη έχει επίσης τη δυνατότητα να ενθαρρύνει τους μαθητές σε όλο το εκπαιδευτικό υπόβαθρο να συνεχίσουν στα μαθήματα υπολογιστικής ανάλυσης γλωσσών.', 'it': "Presentiamo uno strumento educativo che integra risorse linguistiche computazionali da utilizzare in corsi di scienze linguistiche non tecniche. Utilizzando lo strumento in combinazione con casi di studio pedagogici basati su prove, ci sforziamo di fornire agli studenti l'opportunità di acquisire una comprensione dei concetti linguistici e l'analisi attraverso la lente di problemi realistici in modi fattibili. I casi di studio tendono ad essere utilizzati in contesti legali, aziendali e di educazione sanitaria, ma meno nell'insegnamento e nell'apprendimento della linguistica. L'approccio introdotto ha anche il potenziale di incoraggiare gli studenti attraverso background formativi a continuare a corsi di analisi del linguaggio computazionale.", 'kk': 'Біз компьютерлік лингвистикалық ресурстарды техникалық емес бағдарламалық тіл ғылыми курстарында қолдану үшін білім беру құралын таңдаймыз. Бұл құрылғыны біріктірген педагогикалық оқиғалармен біріктіріп, студенттердің лингвистикалық концепцияларды түсінуге және анализ арқылы реалистикалық мәселелердің линзиясы арқылы мүмкіндіктерді жеткізу үшін көме Деректер зерттеулері юридикалық, бизнес және саулық білім мәтіндерінде қолданылады, бірақ лингвистикалық оқыту және оқыту үшін аз. Келтірілген тәртібі оқушыларды бақылау кезінде компьютерлік тілдерді анализ курстарына жалғастыруға мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Презентираме образовна алатка која ги интегрира компјутерските лингвистички ресурси за употреба во нетехничките студентски научни курси на јазик. Со употребата на алатката заедно со педагошките студии на случаи кои се поттикнуваат на докази, ние се обидуваме да обезбедиме можности за студентите да добијат разбирање на јазичките концепти и анализа преку lenteта на реални проблеми на остварливи начини. Случајните студии обично се користат во законски, бизнис и здравствен образованички контекст, но помалку во учењето и учењето на јазикот. Пристапот што е воведен, исто така, има потенцијал да ги охрабри студентите низ целата основа на обуката да продолжат со проучувањата за анализа на компјутативниот јазик.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame švietimo priemonę, kurioje integruojami skaičiavimo kalbos ištekliai, skirti naudoti ne techniniuose studentų kalbos mokslo kursuose. Naudodami priemonę kartu su įrodymais pagrįstais pedagoginiais atvejų tyrimais stengiamės suteikti studentams galimybes įmanomais būdais suprasti kalbines koncepcijas ir analizę naudojant realių problemų sklaidą. Bylų tyrimai paprastai naudojami teisiniame, verslo ir sveikatos švietimo kontekste, tačiau mažiau kalbos mokymo ir mokymosi srityje. Įgyvendintas metodas taip pat gali skatinti studentus mokymo pagrindu tęsti skaičiavimo kalbų analizės kursus.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan alat pendidikan yang mengintegrasikan sumber bahasa komputasi untuk digunakan dalam pelajaran sains bahasa luar teknik. Dengan menggunakan alat ini bersama dengan kajian kes pedagogi yang didorong oleh bukti, kami berusaha untuk memberikan peluang bagi pelajar untuk mendapatkan pemahaman konsep bahasa dan analisis melalui lensa masalah realistik dengan cara yang boleh dilakukan. kajian kes biasanya digunakan dalam konteks pendidikan undang-undang, perniagaan, dan kesehatan, tetapi kurang dalam mengajar dan belajar bahasa. Pendekatan yang diperkenalkan juga mempunyai potensi untuk mendorong pelajar melalui latar belakang latihan untuk terus ke kerja kursus analisis bahasa komputasi.', 'ml': 'സാങ്കേതിക വിദ്യാഭാഷയുടെ ശാസ്ത്ര ശാസ്ത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള കണക്കിന് ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന തെളിവുകള്\u200d നടത്തുന്ന വിദ്യാഭാഷ കേസ് പഠനങ്ങളുമായി ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്ക് അവസരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥി കേസ് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d നിയമപരമായ, ബിസിനസ്, സ്വാധാരണവിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പിന്നില്\u200d വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രാദേശിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുണ്ട്. കണക്', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw għodda edukattiva li tintegra r-riżorsi lingwistiċi tal-komputazzjoni għall-użu f’korsijiet xjentifiċi tal-lingwi undergradwati mhux tekniċi. Billi nużaw l-għodda flimkien ma’ studji pedagoġiċi ta’ każijiet ibbażati fuq l-evidenza, aħna nistinkaw li nipprovdu opportunitajiet għall-istudenti biex jiksbu fehim ta’ kunċetti lingwistiċi u analiżi permezz tal-lenti ta’ problemi realistiċi b’modi fattibbli. Studji ta’ każijiet għandhom it-tendenza li jintużaw f’kuntesti ta’ edukazzjoni legali, kummerċjali u tas-saħħa, iżda inqas fit-tagħlim u t-tagħlim tal-lingwistika. L-approċċ introdott għandu wkoll il-potenzjal li jinkoraġġixxi lill-istudenti fl-isfond tat-taħriġ biex ikomplu jaħdmu fuq korsijiet ta’ analiżi tal-lingwi komputazzjonali.', 'mn': 'Бид тооцооллын хэлний шинжлэх ухааны хичээлд хэрэглэх боломжтой хөрөнгө оруулдаг боловсролын хэрэгсэл. Баталгаа хөдөлгөж буй педагогик судалгаатай холбогдох хэрэгсэл ашиглан оюутнуудын хэлний ойлголтыг ойлгох боломж олгох боломжтой болгодог. Кэйсийн судалгаанууд хуулийн, бизнес, эрүүл мэндийн боловсролын тухайд хэрэглэгддэг, гэхдээ хэлний сургалтын багш боловч бага байдаг. Үүний харилцааны арга нь оюутнуудыг тооцооллын хэлний анализ сургуульд үргэлжлүүлэх боломжтой байдаг.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit utdanningsverktøy som integrerer computational linguistic resources for use in non-technical undergraduate language science courses. Ved å bruka verktøyet i samsvar med studier med dårlige pedagogiske tilfeller, må vi gjere muligheter for studentar å få forståelse av språk-konseptar og analyser gjennom lensen av realistiske problemer på feilige måtar. Tilfeldige studiar er vanlegvis brukt i juridiske, biznisk og helseutdanning, men mindre i læring og læring av linguistikk. Tilnærminga som er introdusert har også potensial for å oppretta studentar på øvingsbakgrunnen for å halda fram til dataanalyseringskurseverk.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy narzędzie edukacyjne, które integruje zasoby językoznawstwa obliczeniowego do wykorzystania w nietechnicznych licencjackich kursach językowych. Wykorzystując narzędzie w połączeniu z opartymi na dowodach studiami pedagogicznymi przypadków, staramy się zapewnić studentom możliwość zrozumienia koncepcji językowych i analizy przez soczewkę realistycznych problemów w wykonalny sposób. Studia przypadków są zwykle wykorzystywane w kontekście edukacji prawnej, biznesowej i zdrowotnej, ale mniej w nauczaniu i uczeniu się językoznawstwa. Wprowadzone podejście może również zachęcić uczniów z różnych środowisk szkoleniowych do kontynuowania zajęć się obliczeniowymi analizami języka.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un instrument educațional care integrează resurse lingvistice computaționale pentru utilizarea în cursuri de știință lingvistică non-tehnică de licență. Prin utilizarea instrumentului în combinație cu studii de caz pedagogice bazate pe dovezi, ne străduim să oferim studenților oportunități de a obține o înțelegere a conceptelor lingvistice și a analizei prin lentilele problemelor realiste în moduri fezabile. Studiile de caz tind să fie folosite în contexte juridice, de afaceri și de educație medicală, dar mai puțin în predarea și învățarea lingvistică. Abordarea introdusă are, de asemenea, potențialul de a încuraja studenții din toate mediile de formare să continue la cursuri de analiză lingvistică computațională.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo obrazovni alat koji integriše računalne lingvističke resurse za upotrebu na nekotehničkim nastavnim nastavnim nastavacima jezika. Koristeći alat u vezi sa studijama pedagogičkih slučajeva na dokazima, trudimo se pružiti mogućnosti da studenti dobiju razumijevanje jezičkih koncepta i analize kroz lense realnih problema na mogućim načinama. U pravnim, poslovnim i zdravstvenim kontekstima se koriste studije slučajeva, ali manje u predavanju i učenju lingvistike. Uključeni pristup takođe ima potencijal ohrabrenja studenata na području obuke da nastavi na studiju analize računalnih jezika.', 'si': 'අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අධිකාරික භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක උපකරණයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරයෝ සාක්ෂික පෙඩාගොජික් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විදියර්ථානුවන්ට භාෂාවි කේස් පරීක්ෂණය නීතික, ව්\u200dයාපාරය, හා ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය ශීෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ පාවිච්චි වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනව අනිවාර්යාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පුළුවන් විදියට විදියට පරික්ෂාත්මක භාෂාව විශ', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett pedagogiskt verktyg som integrerar datorlingvistiska resurser för användning i icke-tekniska grundkurser i språkvetenskap. Genom att använda verktyget tillsammans med evidensdrivna pedagogiska fallstudier strävar vi efter att ge studenterna möjlighet att få förståelse för språkliga begrepp och analys genom objektivet av realistiska problem på genomförbara sätt. Fallstudier tenderar att användas i juridiska, affärs- och hälsoutbildningssammanhang, men mindre i undervisning och lärande av lingvistik. Det tillvägagångssätt som introduceras har också potential att uppmuntra studenter över utbildningsbakgrunder att fortsätta till datorbaserad språkanalys kurser.', 'so': 'Waxaannu qabannaa qalabka waxbarashada, kaas oo koorasyada cilmiga iskuulka tacliinta ah ee aan iskuulka tacliinta sare ee luuqada xisaabta ah ku qabsan. Sida lagu isticmaalo qalabka iskuullada tacliinta waxbarashada ee aqoonta, waxaynu u dadaalnaa in ardayda fursado ay u helaan waxyaabo suurtagal ah inay ku gartaan fikrada luuqada iyo baaritaanka dhibaatooyinka runta ah. Waxbarashada arrimaha waxaa inta badan lagu isticmaalaa qorshaha sharciga, ganacsiga iyo waxbarashada caafimaadka, laakiin wax ka yar waxbarashada iyo barashada luuqadaha. Waxaa sidoo kale suurtagal ah in ardayda lagu dhiirrigeliyo waxbarashada aasaasiga ah si ay u sii wadaan koorasyada baaritaanka luuqada ee xisaabinta.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு கல்வி கருவியை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது கணிக்க மொழிகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும். தொழில்நுட்பம் இல்லாத கல்வி அறிவியல் மொழி நாம் மாணவர்களுக்கு வாய்ப்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத்தும் கருவியை பயன்படுத்தி சாத்தியமான பொருள் படிப்புகளுடன் பயன்படுத்தி, மாணவர்களுக்கு வாய்ப்புகள் அளிக்க வழக்கம் படிப்புகள் சட்ட, வியாபாரத்தில், மற்றும் சுகாதார கல்வி பொருளில் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் மொழிகளில் கற்றுக மாணவர்களுக்கு பயிற்சி பின்னணிகளுக்கு முன்னணியில் தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும் பொழுது கணிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி ஆய்வு முறைகள', 'ur': 'ہم ایک تحصیلی ابزار پیش کرتے ہیں جو کمپیوٹریشن زبان شناسی سئنس کورس میں استعمال کرنے کے لئے کامپیوٹریشن زبان رسورسوں کو جمع کرتا ہے۔ مداہدیت کے ذریعہ پیڈاگوژیکل کیس تحقیقات کے ساتھ مداہدیت کے ساتھ وسیلہ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم نے دانش آموزوں کے لئے فرصت حاصل کرنے کے لئے کوشش کی ہے کہ زبان نظریں اور تحقیقات کے ذریعہ حقیقی مشکلات کے لینز سے کامل طریقے سے سمجھیں۔ کیس کی تعلیمات قانونی، تجارت اور سلامتی تحصیل میں استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں، لیکن زبان شناسی کی تعلیم اور تعلیم میں کم ہے. اس طریقہ سے پہنچایا گیا ہے کہ دانش آموزوں کو تربیت کے پچھلوں میں سفارش دینے کے لئے کامپیوتر کی زبان تحلیل کی کورس کی ادامہ ادامہ کریں۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một công cụ giáo dục tích hợp các nguồn ngôn ngữ vi tính cho việc sử dụng trong các khóa khoa học chưa kỹ thuật. Bằng cách sử dụng công cụ cùng với các nghiên cứu về trường hợp khoa học dựa trên bằng chứng, chúng tôi cố gắng tạo cơ hội cho sinh viên có thể hiểu được các khái niệm ngôn ngữ và phân tích qua mục tiêu của những vấn đề thực tế theo cách có thể. Trường hợp học thường được sử dụng trong ngữ cảnh giáo dục luật, kinh doanh, y tế, nhưng ít hơn trong việc giảng dạy và học ngôn ngữ. Phương pháp được áp dụng cũng có khả năng khuyến khích học sinh trải qua nền giáo dục tiếp tục làm các lớp phân tích ngôn ngữ tính.', 'uz': "Biz ta'lim vositasini hozir qilamiz, bu ta'lim tilni o'rganish uchun kompyutlar rasmlarini birlashtiradi. Biz o'quvchilarni tasavvur qiladigan o'quvchilar bilan birlashtirilgan asboblar bilan ishlatishni istaysizki, biz o'quvchilarga o'quvchilarni o'rganishga imkoniyatlarni o'rganishga imkoniyat beramiz va ta'sirlik muammolari darajalari bilan boshqarish imkoniyatlari Cash o'qituvchilari qoidagi, tibbiy, va tibbiy ta'lim ta'lim sohasida ishlatiladi, lekin tillarni o'rganish va o'rganishda qisqa. Ko'rib chiqish uchun o'quvchilarni o'rganish orqali o'rganish orqali o'quvchilarni o'rganishga foydalanishi mumkin.", 'bg': 'Представяме образователен инструмент, който интегрира компютърни лингвистични ресурси за използване в нетехнически бакалавърски курсове по езикова наука. Използвайки инструмента във връзка с базирани на доказателства педагогически казуси, ние се стремим да предоставим възможност на студентите да придобият разбиране на езиковите концепции и анализ чрез обектива на реалистични проблеми по осъществими начини. Проучванията на казусите обикновено се използват в правни, бизнес и здравни образователни контексти, но по-малко в преподаването и ученето на лингвистика. Въведеният подход също така има потенциал да насърчи учениците от различни образователни среди да продължат към курсовете по компютърен езиков анализ.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo obrazovni alat koji uključuje računalne lingvističke resurse za upotrebu na nekotehničkim poddiplomiranim nastavacima znanosti jezika. Koristeći alat zajedno s ispitivanjem pedagogičkih slučajeva na dokazima, trudimo se pružiti mogućnosti studentima da dobiju razumijevanje jezičkih koncepta i analize kroz lense realnih problema na mogućim načinama. U pravnim, poslovnim i zdravstvenom obrazovanju, ali manje u učenju i učenju jezika. Uvedeni pristup također ima potencijal ohrabrenja studenata na temelju obuke da nastavi raditi na računalnoj analizi jezika.', 'nl': "We presenteren een educatieve tool die computationele linguïstische bronnen integreert voor gebruik in niet-technische undergraduate taalwetenschapscursussen. Door de tool te gebruiken in combinatie met evidence-driven pedagogische casestudy's, streven we ernaar om studenten mogelijkheden te bieden om begrip te krijgen van taalconcepten en analyse door de lens van realistische problemen op haalbare manieren. Case studies worden meestal gebruikt in juridische, zakelijke en gezondheidseducatie contexten, maar minder in het onderwijzen en leren van taalkunde. De geïntroduceerde aanpak heeft ook potentieel om studenten met verschillende trainingsachtergronden aan te moedigen door te gaan met computertaalanalyse cursussen.", 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et uddannelsesværktøj, der integrerer beregningslingvistiske ressourcer til brug i ikke-tekniske bachelor sprogvidenskab kurser. Ved at bruge værktøjet sammen med evidensdrevne pædagogiske casestudier stræber vi efter at give eleverne mulighed for at få en forståelse af sproglige begreber og analyser gennem linsen af realistiske problemer på mulige måder. Casestudier bruges ofte i juridiske, erhvervsmæssige og sundhedsuddannelsesmæssige sammenhænge, men mindre i undervisningen og læringen af lingvistik. Den indførte fremgangsmåde har også potentiale til at tilskynde studerende på tværs af uddannelsesbaggrunde til at fortsætte med beregningsmæssig sproganalyse kurser.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan alat pendidikan yang mengintegrasikan sumber daya bahasa komputasi untuk digunakan dalam kursus ilmu bahasa non-teknis. Dengan menggunakan alat ini bersama dengan studi kasus pedagogi yang didorong bukti, kami berusaha untuk menyediakan kesempatan bagi siswa untuk mendapatkan pemahaman konsep bahasa dan analisis melalui lensa dari masalah realistis dengan cara yang layak. Studi kasus cenderung digunakan dalam konteks pendidikan hukum, bisnis, dan kesehatan, tetapi kurang dalam mengajar dan belajar bahasa. pendekatan yang diperkenalkan juga memiliki potensi untuk mendorong siswa melalui latar belakang pelatihan untuk melanjutkan ke kursus analisis bahasa komputasi.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein pädagogisches Tool, das computerlinguistische Ressourcen für den Einsatz in nicht-technischen Bachelor-Sprachkursen integriert. Durch den Einsatz des Tools in Verbindung mit evidenzgetriebenen pädagogischen Fallstudien wollen wir Studierenden Möglichkeiten bieten, sprachliche Konzepte und Analysen durch die Linse realistischer Probleme auf praktikable Weise zu verstehen. Fallstudien werden in der Regel in rechtlichen, betriebswirtschaftlichen und gesundheitlichen Bildungskontexten verwendet, weniger jedoch in der Lehre und dem Lernen der Linguistik. Der vorgestellte Ansatz hat auch das Potenzial, Studenten mit unterschiedlichen Ausbildungshintergründen zu ermutigen, mit computergestützten Sprachanalysekursen fortzufahren.', 'ko': '우리는 계산언어학 자원을 통합시켜 비기술 본과 언어과학 과정에 활용하는 교육 도구를 제시했다.이 도구와 실증 교수 사례 연구를 결합시켜 우리는 학생들에게 실행 가능한 방식으로 현실 문제의 시각을 통해 언어 개념과 분석을 이해할 수 있는 기회를 제공하도록 노력한다.사례 연구는 흔히 법률, 상업과 건강 교육 환경에 쓰이지만 언어학의 교육과 학습에 적게 쓰인다.도입 방법도 서로 다른 교육 배경의 학생들이 계산 언어 분석 과정을 계속 공부하도록 장려할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka zana ya elimu inayojumuisha rasilimali za lugha za kompyuta za kutumia katika masomo ya sayansi za lugha isiyo ya teknolojia. By using the tool in conjunction with evidence-driven pedagogical case studies, we strive to provide opportunities for students to gain an understanding of linguistic concepts and analysis through the lens of realistic problems in feasible ways.  Utafiti wa kesi huwa unatumiwa katika miradi ya sheria, biashara, na elimu ya afya, lakini ni wachache katika kufundisha na kujifunza lugha. Hatua hiyo inawezekana kuwahamasisha wanafunzi katika maeneo ya mafunzo yanayoendelea kuendelea kufanya uchambuzi wa lugha za kompyuta.', 'tr': 'Biz matematik dillerini bilmeýän bilim kurslarynda ulanmak üçin hesaplamak isleýän bir bilim aralygyny görkeýäris. Kanunlar pedagogiýaly kynçylyk öwrenmeleri bilen birleşdirmek üçin okuwçylar üçin lingwistiki düşünjelerini we çözümleri çözmek üçin mümkinçilik kynçylyklary we çözümleri çözmek üçin çabaladyk. Köp işleriniň ýagdaý, biznes we saglyk bilim meňzeşlerinde ulanylýar, ýöne lingwistiklerin öwrenmesi we öwrenmesi iň az bolýar. Ýöne guruldy ýagdaý çykyş hem okuwçylary kompýuter dilleriniň analýusiýasyna dowam etmek üçin köpüsi bar.', 'fa': 'ما ابزار آموزشی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که منابع زبان\u200cشناسی کامپیوتری را برای استفاده در کلاس\u200cهای علمی زبان\u200cشناسی غیر فنی تخصیص می\u200cدهد. با استفاده از ابزار با مطالعه\u200cهای پرونده\u200cهای پداگوژیکی با مدرک\u200cها، تلاش می\u200cکنیم که فرصت\u200cهایی برای دانش\u200cآموزان بدهیم تا بفهمند نظریه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و تحلیل\u200cها را از طریق لینک\u200cهای مشکلات واقعی به روش\u200cهای قابل انجام دهند. مطالعه\u200cهای پرونده\u200cها معمولاً در موقعیت\u200cهای قانونی، تجارت و تحصیل سلامتی استفاده می\u200cشوند، ولی کمتر در آموزش و یادگیری زبان\u200cشناسی است. این دستور معرفی همچنین توانایی دارد که دانش آموزان را در زمینه آموزش تحویل دهند تا به مراحل تحلیل زبانهای محاسبه ادامه دهند.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n opvoedkundige gereedskap wat rekenaar lingwisiese hulpbronne integreer vir gebruik in nie-tekniese onderwerp taal wetenskap kurse. Deur die gereedskap te gebruik saam met getuienisse pedagogiese geval studies, moet ons versoek om moontlikhede vir studente te verskaf om 'n verstanding van lingwisiese konsepte en analiseer te kry deur die lense van realistiese probleme op feilike maniere. Kas studies is gewoonlik gebruik in wetlike, besigheid en gesondige onderwerp-konteks, maar minder in die onderwerp en leer van lingwisies. Die aangeleide toegang het ook potensieal om studente te bevestig oor onderwerp agtergrond om voort te gaan na rekenasielike taal analiseerde kursewerk.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një mjet arsimor që integron burimet e gjuhës kompjuterike për përdorim në kurset e shkencës së gjuhës jo-teknike. Duke përdorur mjetin në lidhje me studimet e rasteve pedagogjike të bazuara nga provat, ne përpiqemi të ofrojmë mundësi për studentët për të fituar një kuptim të koncepteve gjuhësore dhe analizave nëpërmjet lentës së problemeve realiste në mënyra të realizueshme. Studimet e rasteve tenderojnë të përdoren në kontekstet ligjore, të biznesit dhe të arsimit shëndetësor, por më pak në mësimin dhe mësimin e gjuhës. Përqasja e futur ka gjithashtu potencial për të inkurajuar studentët nëpër sfondet e trainimit për të vazhduar në punët e kurseve të analizës së gjuhës llogaritare.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք կրթական գործիք, որը ինտեգրում է հաշվարկների լեզվաբանական ռեսուրսներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են ոչ տեխնիկական ուսանողների լեզվաբանության դասընթացներում: Օգտագործելով այս գործիքը միասին ապացույցներով հիմնված դասաբանական դեպքերի ուսումնասիրությունների հետ, մենք փորձում ենք ուսանողներին հնարավորություններ տալ լեզվաբանական գաղափարների հասկանալու և վերլուծության միջոցով իրականացված խնդիրների ոսպնյակի միջոցով իրականացնելի Կատահական ուսումնասիրությունները սովորաբար օգտագործվում են իրավական, բիզնեսի և առողջապահության կրթության կոնտեքստում, բայց ավելի քիչ լեզվաբանության ուսուցման և սովորման մեջ: Ներմուծված մոտեցումը նաև պոտենցիալ ունի խրախուսելու աշակերտներին կրթության միջոցով շարունակելու հաշվարկների լեզվի վերլուծության դասընթացները:', 'am': 'የቋንቋዎች ቋንቋዎች ሀብትን ለመጠቀም በተቃውሞ የቴክክክሎጂ የቋንቋ ሳይንቀሳቀስ ትምህርት ትምህርት ማቀናቀፍ እናቀርባለን፡፡ በተገለጸው የትምህርት ጉዳይ ትምህርት ትምህርት ጋር በመጠቀም፣ ለተማሪዎቹ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችን ለማስተዋል እና በተቻለይ የውይይት ጉዳዮች በመስመር ማስተዋል እና ለማስተዋል ፍቃድ እናደርጋለን፡፡ Case studies tend to be used in legal, business, and health education contexts, but less in the teaching and learning of linguistics.  የመግለጫው ሥርዓት ደግሞ ተማሪዎችን በጥቅምት የቋንቋ-ቋንቋን ትምህርት ትምህርት ማድረግ ለመቆጣጠር የሚችል ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo obrazovni alat koji integrira računalne lingvističke resurse za upotrebu na kursovima neotehničkih poddiplomiranih jezika. Koristeći alat u vezi s studijama pedagogičkih slučajeva na dokazima, trudimo se pružiti mogućnosti da studenti dobiju razumijevanje jezičkih koncepta i analize kroz lense realnih problema na mogućim načinama. U pravnim, poslovnim i zdravstvenom obrazovanju se koriste istraživanja slučajeva, ali manje u predavanju i učenju jezika. Uključeni pristup također ima potencijal ohrabrenja studenata na području obuke da nastavi na kursu analize računalnih jezika.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি শিক্ষামূলক টুল উপস্থাপন করছি যা কোন প্রযুক্তিগত বিজ্ঞান কোর্সে ব্যবহার করার জন্য গণনাত্রিক ভাষার সম্পদ সংগ্রহ করে। প্রমাণ-পরিচালিত শিক্ষাগত কেস গবেষণার সাথে যুক্তি ব্যবহার করে আমরা শিক্ষার্থীদের সুযোগ দিতে চেষ্টা করছি যাতে বাস্তবতার বাস্তবতার সমস্যার লাইনের মামলা গবেষণা বৈধ, ব্যবসা এবং স্বাস্থ্য শিক্ষা প্রতিযোগিতায় ব্যবহার করে, কিন্তু ভাষাগত শিক্ষা ও শিক্ষা কম। প্রশিক্ষণের প্রেক্ষাপটে শিক্ষার্থীদের উৎসাহ প্রদান করার সম্ভাবনা রয়েছে যাতে তারা গণনাত্রিক ভাষা বিশ্লেষণের ক', 'az': 'Biz təhsil vasitəsini təyin edirik ki, istifadə etmək üçün hesablama dillərinin mənzillərini təyin edir. Şübhəsiz ki, dəlillərlə təşkil edilmiş pedagojik davalarla birlikdə istifadə edərək, öğrencilərə dil fikirlərini və analizi mümkün yollarla çəkməyə çalışırıq. Məsələlər təhsil, iş və sağlamlıq təhsil müqabilində istifadə edilir, lakin dil öyrənməsində və öyrənməsində daha az. Təşkil edilən tərzim də öyrənməyənlərə təhsil etmək üçün ehtiyacı var.', 'ca': "Presentam una eina educativa que integra els recursos lingüístics computacionals per a ser utilitzats en curss de ciència de llenguatges no tècnics. Utilitzant l'eina en conjunt amb estudis de casos pedagògics basats en evidències, busquem proporcionar oportunitats als estudiants per a obtenir una comprensió dels conceptes lingüístics i l'an àlisi a través de la lent de problemes realistes de maneres viables. Els estudis de cas tendeixen a ser utilitzats en contextes d'educació legal, empresarial i sanitari, però menys en l'ensenyament i l'aprenentatge de la lingüística. L'enfocament introduït també té el potencial d'animar els estudiants a través de la formació a continuar amb els cursos d'anàlisi de llenguatges computacionals.", 'cs': 'Představujeme vzdělávací nástroj, který integruje výpočetní lingvistické zdroje pro použití v netechnických bakalářských jazykových kurzech. Použitím tohoto nástroje ve spojení s důkazy orientovanými pedagogickými případovými studiemi se snažíme poskytnout studentům příležitosti k porozumění jazykovým konceptům a analýze objektivem realistických problémů realizovatelnými způsoby. Případové studie se obvykle používají v právních, obchodních a zdravotnických vzdělávacích kontextech, ale méně ve výuce a učení lingvistiky. Představený přístup má také potenciál povzbudit studenty napříč vzdělávacími prostředími, aby pokračovali v kurzech výpočetní jazykové analýzy.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme opetusvälineen, joka integroi laskennalliset kielitieteen resurssit käytettäväksi ei-teknisillä perustutkinnon kielitieteen kursseilla. Käyttämällä työkalua yhdessä näyttöön perustuvien pedagogisten tapaustutkimusten kanssa pyrimme tarjoamaan opiskelijoille mahdollisuuksia ymmärtää kielellisiä käsitteitä ja analyysejä realististen ongelmien linssin kautta toteuttamiskelpoisilla tavoilla. Tapaustutkimuksia käytetään yleensä oikeudellisissa, liike-elämän ja terveyskasvatuksen yhteyksissä, mutta vähemmän kielitieteen opetuksessa ja oppimisessa. Käytössä olevalla lähestymistavalla on myös potentiaalia kannustaa eri koulutustaustojen opiskelijoita jatkamaan laskennallisen kielianalyysin kursseja.', 'et': 'Esitleme haridusvahendit, mis ühendab arvutusliku keeleteaduse ressursid mittetehniliste bakalaureuse keeleteaduse kursuste kasutamiseks. Kasutades tööriista koos tõenduspõhiste pedagoogiliste juhtumiuuringutega, püüame pakkuda õpilastele võimalusi saada aru keelelistest kontseptsioonidest ja analüüsist realistlike probleemide läätse kaudu teostataval viisil. Juhtumiuuringuid kasutatakse tavaliselt õigus-, äri- ja tervishoiualase hariduse kontekstis, kuid vähem keeleteaduse õpetamisel ja õppimisel. Tutvustatud lähenemisviis võib ka julgustada õpilasi üle koolituse tausta jätkama arvutusliku keeleanalüüsi kursustega.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo pergambar nggawe barang kelangan kelangan bangsa komputer kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelangan kuwi mau. Ngawe ngubah bener nggo ngerasakno karo perusahaan kelas pedanggé, kita ngubah dhéwé nggawe perusahaan kanggo mau ngerasakno Cah-cah sing dipunangé kuwi tau ngomong nik nggawe aturan hukum, negori lan situs resan inggilané, kuwi mau kudu nggawe aturan pakan lan inggilané surat. Awakdhéwé éntuk nglanggar aturan sak kayané perbudhakan kanggo ngubah-ingkang lewat cara-ingkang sapa ngulinakake tarjamahan ingkang komputer.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani zane na elimi wanda ke haɗa rasiliki na lissafi na lissafa da za'a yi amfani da shi a cikin ma'an an zane-zane na masu danganta ba-technical. By using the tool in conjunction with evidence-driven pedagogical case studies, we strive to provide opportunities for students to gain an understanding of linguistic concepts and analysis through the lens of realistic problems in feasible ways.  Ana amfani da karatun masu cikin littafan sharĩ'a, business, da masu da matsayin afya, kuma da ƙaranci a cikin baran da aka karanta harshen. Tsarin da aka introduce shi yana da awon ya wahamar da wanan kowaci a bakin mafarin bangon, su yi daidai a yi karatun alƙaluman aiki na ƙidãya.", 'he': 'אנו מציגים כלי חינוך שמכיל משאבי שפת מחשבים לשימוש במדרגות מדעי שפת ללימודים לא טכניים. על ידי השימוש בכשיר ביחד עם מחקרי מקרים pedagogic מונעים על ראיות, אנו מתאמצים לספק הזדמנויות לסטודנטים להשיג הבנה של הרעיונות והניתוח לשפתיים דרך העדשה של בעיות מציאותיות בדרכים אפשריות. מחקרי מקרים נוטים להשתמש בתוך קשרי חינוך משפטי, עסקי ובריאות, אבל פחות בהליכה ולמדה של שפת. The approach introduced also has potential to encourage students across training backgrounds to continue on to computational language analysis coursework.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo izobraževalno orodje, ki združuje računalniške jezikoslovne vire za uporabo v netehničnih dodiplomskih jezikovnih tečajih. Z uporabo orodja v povezavi z dokazi usmerjenimi pedagoškimi študijami primerov si prizadevamo študentom zagotoviti možnosti za razumevanje jezikovnih konceptov in analize skozi objektiv realističnih problemov na izvedljive načine. Študije primerov se običajno uporabljajo v pravnem, poslovnem in zdravstvenem izobraževanju, manj pa pri poučevanju in učenju jezikoslovja. Uvedeni pristop lahko tudi spodbudi študente iz izobraževalnih okolij, da nadaljujejo s tečajem računalniške analize jezikov.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་གཞི་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཉམ་གྱི་ལག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ཕྱོགས་རིམ་པ་ཚོར་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་འགན་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པའི་ཐད་ཚོར སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་། ལས་འགུལ་བྱ་རིམ། འཕྲོད་བསྟེན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྐབས་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ལས། སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་སྐད་ འདི་ལྟ་བ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་སྤྲོད་དེ་བཞིན་གྱིས་གློག'}
{'en': 'GraphDocExplore : A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'ar': 'GraphDocExplore: إطار عمل للمقارنة التجريبية لأساليب استكشاف المستندات القائمة على الرسم البياني', 'es': 'GraphDocExplore: un marco para la comparación experimental de técnicas de exploración de documentos basadas en gráficos', 'pt': 'GraphDocExplore: Uma Estrutura para a Comparação Experimental de Técnicas de Exploração de Documentos Baseados em Gráficos', 'fr': "GraphDocExplore\xa0: Un cadre pour la comparaison expérimentale de techniques d'exploration de documents basées sur des graphes", 'ja': 'GraphDocExplore ：グラフベースの文書探索技術の実験的比較のためのフレームワーク', 'zh': 'GraphDocExplore曰:图形文档求术者实验框架', 'ru': 'GraphDocExplore: Основа для экспериментального сравнения методов исследования документов на основе графиков', 'hi': 'GraphDocExplore: ग्राफ-आधारित दस्तावेज़ अन्वेषण तकनीकों की प्रयोगात्मक तुलना के लिए एक रूपरेखा', 'ga': 'GraphDocExplore: Creat chun Comparáid Turgnamhach a dhéanamh ar Theicnící Taiscéalaithe Cáipéise Bunaithe ar Ghraf', 'ka': 'GraphDocExplore', 'el': 'Ένα πλαίσιο για την πειραματική σύγκριση τεχνικών εξερεύνησης εγγράφων με βάση γραφήματα', 'hu': 'GraphDocExplore: A keretrendszer a grafikon alapú dokumentumfeltárási technikák kísérleti összehasonlítására', 'it': 'GraphDocExplore: un quadro per il confronto sperimentale delle tecniche di esplorazione dei documenti basate su grafici', 'kk': 'GraphDocExplore: Графика негіздеген құжатты зерттеу техникаларының эксперименталдық салыстырудың рамочы', 'lt': 'GraphDocExplore: Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques eksperimentinio palyginimo sistema', 'mk': 'GraphDocExplore: Рамка за експериментално споредување на техниките за експериментално истражување на документи базирани на график', 'ms': 'GraphDocExplore: Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'mt': 'GraphDocExplore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ്ഡോക്സ്പ്രോള്\u200d: ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ രേഖകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു ഫ്രെമെയിമെന്റ്', 'mn': 'GraphDocExplore: График-based Document Exploration Техникийн туршилтын харьцуулалт', 'no': 'GraphDocExplore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'sr': 'GraphDocExplore: okvir za eksperimentalnu usporedbu tehnika istraživanja dokumenta na grafiku', 'pl': 'GraphDocExplore: Ramy eksperymentalnego porównania technik eksperymentalnego eksploracji dokumentów opartych na wykresie', 'ro': 'GraphDocExplore: Un cadru pentru compararea experimentală a tehnicilor de explorare a documentelor bazate pe grafice', 'si': 'GraphDocExplore', 'so': 'GraphDocExplore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Document Exploration Techniques', 'sv': 'GraphDocExplore: Ett ramverk för experimentell jämförelse av grafikbaserade dokumentutforskningstekniker', 'ta': 'GraphDocExplore: A Frame for the Experimental Comparison of Graph- based Document Exploration Technologies', 'ur': 'GraphDocExplore: گراف بنیاد دکھانے کی تحقیقات کے لئے ایک فرم ورک', 'uz': 'GraphDocExplore: A Frame for the Experimental Comparities of Graph- based Document Exploration Techniques', 'vi': 'Hình ảnh tham khảo: Một bộ khung cho sự thử nghiệm của các công trình thám hiểm tài liệu dựa trên đồ họa', 'bg': 'Рамка за експериментално сравняване на графични техники за изследване на документи', 'hr': 'GraphDocExplore: okvir za eksperimentalnu usporedbu tehnika istraživanja dokumenta na grafiku', 'da': 'GraphDocExplore: En ramme for eksperimentel sammenligning af grafikbaserede dokumentundersøgelsesteknikker', 'de': 'GraphDocExplore: Ein Framework für den experimentellen Vergleich grafenbasierter Dokumentenerkundungstechniken', 'nl': 'GraphDocExplore: Een kader voor de experimentele vergelijking van grafiekgebaseerde documentverkenningstechnieken', 'fa': 'GraphDocExplore: یک چشمه برای مقایسه\u200cسازی تجربه فناوری تحقیق سند بر اساس گراف', 'id': 'GraphDocExplore: Sebuah Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'ko': 'GraphDocExplore: 그래픽 기반 문서 탐색 기술 실험 비교 프레임워크', 'af': "GraphDocExplore: ' n Raamwerk vir die eksperimentele Vergelyking van Grafie-gebaseerde Dokument Exploration Techniques", 'sw': 'GraphDocExplore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'sq': 'GraphDocExplore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'tr': 'GraphDocExplore: Grafik tabanly Sened Explosion Tehnikleri üçin bir Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Document Exploration Techniques', 'am': 'Explore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniqs', 'hy': 'GrafDocExplore. Գրաֆի վրա հիմնված փաստաթղթերի ուսումնասիրության տեխնիկայի փորձարկվող համեմատության մի շրջանակ', 'bn': 'GraphDocExplore: A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'ca': "GraphDocExplore: Un marc per la comparació experimental de tècniques d'exploració de documents basades en gràfics", 'az': 'GraphDocExplore', 'cs': 'GraphDocExplore: Rámec pro experimentální srovnání grafově založených technik průzkumu dokumentů', 'bs': 'GraphDocExplore: okvir za eksperimentalnu usporedbu tehnika istraživanja dokumenta na grafiku', 'et': 'GraphDocExplore: raamistik graafikapõhiste dokumentide uurimismeetodite eksperimentaalseks võrdlemiseks', 'fi': 'GraphDocExplore: Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Graph Dok Expressor: A frame for the Test Match of Graph-bazed Dokumen Expression Teknik', 'sk': 'GraphDocExplore: Okvir za eksperimentalno primerjavo grafičnih tehnik raziskovanja dokumentov', 'he': 'GraphDocExplore: מסגר לשוואה ניסיונית של טכניקות חיפוש מסמכים מבוססות על Graph', 'bo': 'GraphDocExplore:A Framework for the Experimental Comparison of Graph-based Document Exploration Techniques'}
{'en': 'Graphs have long been proposed as a tool to browse and navigate in a collection of documents in order to support exploratory search. Many techniques to automatically extract different types of graphs, showing for example entities or concepts and different relationships between them, have been suggested. While experimental evidence that they are indeed helpful exists for some of them, it is largely unknown which type of graph is most helpful for a specific exploratory task. However, carrying out experimental comparisons with human subjects is challenging and time-consuming. Towards this end, we present the GraphDocExplore framework. It provides an intuitive web interface for graph-based document exploration that is optimized for experimental user studies. Through a generic graph interface, different methods to extract graphs from text can be plugged into the system. Hence, they can be compared at minimal implementation effort in an environment that ensures controlled comparisons. The system is publicly available under an open-source license.GraphDocExplore\n      framework. It provides an intuitive web interface for graph-based document\n      exploration that is optimized for experimental user studies. Through a\n      generic graph interface, different methods to extract graphs from text can\n      be plugged into the system. Hence, they can be compared at minimal\n      implementation effort in an environment that ensures controlled\n      comparisons. The system is publicly available under an open-source\n      license.\n    ', 'ar': 'لطالما تم اقتراح الرسوم البيانية كأداة للتصفح والتنقل في مجموعة من الوثائق من أجل دعم البحث الاستكشافي. تم اقتراح العديد من التقنيات لاستخراج أنواع مختلفة من الرسوم البيانية تلقائيًا ، والتي تعرض على سبيل المثال الكيانات أو المفاهيم والعلاقات المختلفة بينها. على الرغم من وجود أدلة تجريبية على أنها مفيدة بالفعل لبعضهم ، إلا أنه من غير المعروف إلى حد كبير نوع الرسم البياني الأكثر فائدة لمهمة استكشافية محددة. ومع ذلك ، فإن إجراء مقارنات تجريبية مع البشر يمثل تحديًا ويستغرق وقتًا طويلاً. لتحقيق هذه الغاية ، نقدم إطار عمل GraphDocExplore. يوفر واجهة ويب سهلة الاستخدام لاستكشاف المستندات المستند إلى الرسم البياني الذي تم تحسينه لدراسات المستخدم التجريبية. من خلال واجهة الرسم البياني العامة ، يمكن توصيل طرق مختلفة لاستخراج الرسوم البيانية من النص في النظام. ومن ثم ، يمكن مقارنتها بأقل جهد تنفيذ في بيئة تضمن مقارنات مضبوطة. النظام متاح للجمهور بموجب ترخيص مفتوح المصدر.', 'es': 'Los gráficos se han propuesto durante mucho tiempo como una herramienta para navegar y navegar en una colección de documentos con el fin de apoyar la búsqueda exploratoria. Se han sugerido muchas técnicas para extraer automáticamente diferentes tipos de gráficos, mostrando, por ejemplo, entidades o conceptos y diferentes relaciones entre ellos. Si bien existen pruebas experimentales de que son realmente útiles para algunos de ellos, se desconoce en gran medida qué tipo de gráfico es más útil para una tarea exploratoria específica. Sin embargo, llevar a cabo comparaciones experimentales con sujetos humanos es difícil y lleva mucho tiempo. Con este fin, presentamos el marco GraphDocExplore. Proporciona una interfaz web intuitiva para la exploración de documentos basada en gráficos que está optimizada para estudios experimentales de usuarios. A través de una interfaz gráfica genérica, se pueden conectar al sistema diferentes métodos para extraer gráficos del texto. Por lo tanto, se pueden comparar con un esfuerzo de implementación mínimo en un entorno que garantice comparaciones controladas. El sistema está disponible públicamente bajo una licencia de código abierto.', 'pt': 'Os gráficos têm sido propostos há muito tempo como uma ferramenta para navegar e navegar em uma coleção de documentos para apoiar a pesquisa exploratória. Muitas técnicas para extrair automaticamente diferentes tipos de gráficos, mostrando por exemplo entidades ou conceitos e diferentes relacionamentos entre eles, foram sugeridas. Embora existam evidências experimentais de que eles são realmente úteis para alguns deles, não se sabe qual tipo de gráfico é mais útil para uma tarefa exploratória específica. No entanto, realizar comparações experimentais com seres humanos é desafiador e demorado. Para isso, apresentamos o framework GraphDocExplore. Ele fornece uma interface web intuitiva para exploração de documentos baseada em gráficos que é otimizada para estudos experimentais de usuários. Através de uma interface gráfica genérica, diferentes métodos para extrair gráficos de texto podem ser conectados ao sistema. Assim, eles podem ser comparados com um esforço mínimo de implementação em um ambiente que garante comparações controladas. O sistema está disponível publicamente sob uma licença de código aberto.', 'fr': "Les graphiques ont longtemps été proposés comme un outil permettant de parcourir et de naviguer dans une collection de documents afin de faciliter la recherche exploratoire. De nombreuses techniques permettant d'extraire automatiquement différents types de graphiques, montrant par exemple des entités ou des concepts et différentes relations entre eux, ont été proposées. Bien qu'il existe des preuves expérimentales de leur utilité pour certains d'entre eux, on ne sait pas quel type de graphique est le plus utile pour une tâche exploratoire spécifique. Cependant, la réalisation de comparaisons expérimentales avec des sujets humains est difficile et prend beaucoup de temps. À cette fin, nous présentons le framework GraphDocExplore. Il fournit une interface Web intuitive pour l'exploration de documents basée sur des graphiques, optimisée pour les études expérimentales d'utilisateurs. Grâce à une interface graphique générique, différentes méthodes d'extraction de graphiques à partir de texte peuvent être intégrées au système. Ils peuvent donc être comparés avec un effort de mise en œuvre minimal dans un environnement qui garantit des comparaisons contrôlées. Le système est accessible au public sous licence open source.", 'ja': 'グラフは、探索的検索をサポートするために、文書のコレクションを閲覧およびナビゲートするためのツールとして長い間提案されてきました。 さまざまな種類のグラフを自動的に抽出するための多くのテクニックが提案されており、たとえば、エンティティや概念、それらの間のさまざまな関係を示しています。 それらが実際に役に立つという実験的証拠はいくつか存在するが、どのタイプのグラフが特定の探索的タスクに最も役立つかはほとんど知られていない。 しかしながら、ヒト対象との実験比較を行うことは困難であり、時間がかかる。 このために、GraphDocExploreフレームワークを提示します。 グラフベースのドキュメント探索のための直感的なWebインターフェースを提供し、実験的なユーザー調査のために最適化されています。 一般的なグラフインターフェースを通じて、テキストからグラフを抽出するさまざまな方法をシステムに接続できます。 したがって、それらは、制御された比較を保証する環境で、最小限の実装努力で比較することができます。 このシステムは、オープンソースのライセンスの下で公開されています。', 'hi': 'ग्राफ़ को लंबे समय से खोजपूर्ण खोज का समर्थन करने के लिए दस्तावेजों के संग्रह में ब्राउज़ करने और नेविगेट करने के लिए एक उपकरण के रूप में प्रस्तावित किया गया है। स्वचालित रूप से विभिन्न प्रकार के रेखांकन को निकालने के लिए कई तकनीकों, उदाहरण के लिए संस्थाओं या अवधारणाओं और उनके बीच विभिन्न संबंधों को दिखाते हुए, सुझाव दिया गया है। जबकि प्रयोगात्मक सबूत है कि वे वास्तव में सहायक हैं, उनमें से कुछ के लिए मौजूद हैं, यह काफी हद तक अज्ञात है कि किस प्रकार का ग्राफ एक विशिष्ट अन्वेषणात्मक कार्य के लिए सबसे उपयोगी है। हालांकि, मानव विषयों के साथ प्रयोगात्मक तुलना करना चुनौतीपूर्ण और समय लेने वाला है। इस अंत की ओर, हम GraphDocExplore रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं। यह ग्राफ-आधारित दस्तावेज़ अन्वेषण के लिए एक सहज ज्ञान युक्त वेब इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करता है जो प्रयोगात्मक उपयोगकर्ता अध्ययन के लिए अनुकूलित है। एक सामान्य ग्राफ इंटरफ़ेस के माध्यम से, पाठ से ग्राफ़ निकालने के लिए विभिन्न तरीकों को सिस्टम में प्लग किया जा सकता है। इसलिए, उनकी तुलना एक ऐसे वातावरण में न्यूनतम कार्यान्वयन प्रयास पर की जा सकती है जो नियंत्रित तुलना सुनिश्चित करता है। सिस्टम एक ओपन-सोर्स लाइसेंस के तहत सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Графики уже давно предлагаются в качестве инструмента для просмотра и навигации в коллекции документов в целях поддержки поискового поиска. Было предложено множество методов автоматического извлечения различных типов графиков, показывающих, например, сущности или концепции и различные взаимосвязи между ними. Хотя для некоторых из них существуют экспериментальные доказательства того, что они действительно полезны, в значительной степени неизвестно, какой тип графа наиболее полезен для конкретной исследовательской задачи. Однако проведение экспериментальных сравнений с субъектами-человеками является сложной и трудоемкой задачей. С этой целью мы представляем фреймворк GraphDocExplore. Он обеспечивает интуитивно понятный веб-интерфейс для изучения документов на основе графов, который оптимизирован для экспериментальных исследований пользователей. Через общий интерфейс графиков в систему могут быть подключены различные методы извлечения графиков из текста. Следовательно, их можно сравнивать при минимальных усилиях по внедрению в среде, которая обеспечивает контролируемые сравнения. Система является общедоступной по лицензии с открытым исходным кодом.', 'zh': '久之,人建议以图形为文档集览导航之具,以支探索性索。 已多自取异类图形之术,如见实体、名念、其间不同。 虽有实验证,诚有助于其中,而不知其图之特定最助也。 然与人受试者实验较挑战性且耗时。 为此GraphDocExplore框架。 图形之文档,探直观之Web界面,界面针实验性用户优化。 通用图形接口,可将从文本中提取图形的不同法插入系统中。 故可以保受控较之,以小较之。 当系开源许可证下公可用。', 'ga': 'Tá graif molta le fada mar uirlis chun brabhsáil agus nascleanúint a dhéanamh i gcnuasach doiciméad chun tacú le cuardach taiscéalaíoch. Tá go leor teicníochtaí molta chun cineálacha éagsúla graif a bhaint go huathoibríoch, ag taispeáint mar shampla aonáin nó coincheapa agus gaolmhaireachtaí éagsúla eatarthu. Cé go bhfuil fianaise thurgnamhach ann go bhfuil siad cabhrach go deimhin do chuid acu, ní fios den chuid is mó cén cineál graif is mó a chabhródh le haghaidh tasc taiscéalaíoch ar leith. Mar sin féin, tá dúshlán agus am-íditheach ag baint le comparáidí turgnamhacha a dhéanamh le hábhair dhaonna. Chuige sin, cuirimid an creat GraphDocExplore i láthair. Soláthraíonn sé comhéadan gréasáin iomasach le haghaidh taiscéalaíochta doiciméad bunaithe ar ghraif atá optamaithe le haghaidh staidéir úsáideoirí turgnamhacha. Trí chomhéadan cineálach graif, is féidir modhanna éagsúla chun graif a bhaint as téacs a phlugáil isteach sa chóras. Mar sin, is féidir iad a chur i gcomparáid le hiarrachtaí cur chun feidhme íosta i dtimpeallacht a áirithíonn comparáidí rialaithe. Tá an córas ar fáil go poiblí faoi cheadúnas foinse oscailte.', 'ka': 'გრაფიკები ძალიან განვითარებულია როგორც ხელსაწყო, რომ დოკუმენტების კოლექციაში ძიება და navigationების შესაძლებელად გამოყენება. ბევრი ტექნოგიები განსხვავებული გრაფიკის ტიპების ავტომატურად ექსტრაქტირებისთვის, რომლებიც მაგალითად ინტერტიკები ან კონცექტები და განსხვავებული გრაფიკ თუმცა ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები, რომ ისინი ნამდვილად სამყაროდ არსებობენ ზოგიერთი მათგანი, ეს ძალიან უცნობიერია, რომელიც გრაფის ტიპი უფრო მხოლოდ მაგრამ, ექსპერიმენტიური შემდგომარებას ადამიანის subjekტებისთვის გავაკეთება შესაძლებელია და დროის შემდგომარება. ამ საკუთარი მიზეზით, ჩვენ GraphDocExplore ფრამეტრის გამოყენებთ. ეს ინტუტიური ვებ ინტერფექტიური გეკუმენტის განსხვავებაში, რომელიც ექსპერიმენტიური მომხმარებელი სწავლებისთვის ოპტიმიზებულია. სისტემიდან განსხვავებული გრაფიკის ინტერფექტის გამოყენება შეიძლება სისტემიდან დაკავშირება. ამიტომ, ისინი შეიძლება დამატება მინიმალური გამოყენებაში, რომელიც კონტროლური დამატებას. სისტემა ადგილურად ხელმისაწყებელია საქაღალდე საქაღალდე.', 'hu': 'A grafikonokat már régóta javasolták a dokumentumgyűjteményben való böngészéshez és navigációhoz, hogy támogassák a feltáró keresést. Számos olyan technikát javasoltunk, amelyek automatikusan kivonják a különböző típusú grafikonokat, például entitásokat vagy fogalmakat, valamint a közöttük lévő különböző kapcsolatokat. Bár kísérleti bizonyítékok vannak arra, hogy ezek valóban hasznosak néhányuk számára, nagyrészt ismeretlen, hogy melyik típusú gráf a leghasznosabb egy adott feltáró feladathoz. Azonban az emberi alanyokkal való kísérleti összehasonlítások elvégzése kihívást jelent és időigényes. Ennek érdekében bemutatjuk a GraphDocExplore keretrendszert. intuitív webes felületet biztosít grafikonalapú dokumentumfeltáráshoz, amely kísérleti felhasználói tanulmányokhoz optimalizált. Általános grafikonfelületen keresztül különböző módszereket lehet csatlakoztatni a rendszerbe a grafikonok szövegből történő kivonására. Ezért minimális megvalósítási erőfeszítéssel hasonlíthatók össze olyan környezetben, amely ellenőrzött összehasonlításokat biztosít. A rendszer nyilvánosan elérhető nyílt forráskódú licenc alatt.', 'el': 'Τα γραφήματα έχουν προταθεί εδώ και καιρό ως εργαλείο για την περιήγηση και πλοήγηση σε μια συλλογή εγγράφων, προκειμένου να υποστηρίξουν την εξερευνητική αναζήτηση. Έχουν προταθεί πολλές τεχνικές για την αυτόματη εξαγωγή διαφορετικών τύπων γραφημάτων, που δείχνουν για παράδειγμα οντότητες ή έννοιες και διαφορετικές σχέσεις μεταξύ τους. Ενώ υπάρχουν πειραματικές αποδείξεις ότι είναι πράγματι χρήσιμες για μερικούς από αυτούς, είναι σε μεγάλο βαθμό άγνωστο ποιος τύπος γραφήματος είναι πιο χρήσιμος για μια συγκεκριμένη ερευνητική εργασία. Ωστόσο, η διενέργεια πειραματικών συγκρίσεων με ανθρώπινα αντικείμενα είναι πρόκληση και χρονοβόρα. Προς το σκοπό αυτό, παρουσιάζουμε το πλαίσιο GraphDocExplore. Παρέχει μια διαισθητική διεπαφή ιστού για εξερεύνηση εγγράφων με βάση γραφήματα που είναι βελτιστοποιημένη για πειραματικές μελέτες χρηστών. Μέσω μιας γενικής διεπαφής γραφήματος, μπορούν να συνδεθούν στο σύστημα διαφορετικές μέθοδοι εξαγωγής γραφήσεων από κείμενο. Ως εκ τούτου, μπορούν να συγκριθούν με ελάχιστη προσπάθεια υλοποίησης σε ένα περιβάλλον που εξασφαλίζει ελεγχόμενες συγκρίσεις. Το σύστημα είναι δημόσιο διαθέσιμο με άδεια ανοικτού κώδικα.', 'it': "I grafici sono stati a lungo proposti come strumento per navigare e navigare in una raccolta di documenti al fine di supportare la ricerca esplorativa. Sono state suggerite molte tecniche per estrarre automaticamente diversi tipi di grafici, mostrando ad esempio entità o concetti e diverse relazioni tra di loro. Sebbene esistano prove sperimentali che siano effettivamente utili per alcuni di loro, non è noto quale tipo di grafico sia più utile per uno specifico compito esplorativo. Tuttavia, effettuare confronti sperimentali con soggetti umani è impegnativo e richiede tempo. A tal fine, presentiamo il framework GraphDocExplore. Fornisce un'interfaccia web intuitiva per l'esplorazione di documenti basati su grafici che è ottimizzata per gli studi sperimentali degli utenti. Attraverso un'interfaccia grafica generica, diversi metodi per estrarre grafici dal testo possono essere collegati al sistema. Pertanto, possono essere confrontati al minimo sforzo di implementazione in un ambiente che garantisce confronti controllati. Il sistema è pubblicamente disponibile sotto una licenza open source.", 'kk': 'Графикалар іздеу үшін құжаттарды шолу және навигациялау құралы ретінде ұзындықтан ұсынылды. Бірнеше графикалық түрлерді автоматты түрде тарқату үшін көптеген техникалар, мысалы оның арасындағы нысандар не концепциялар мен түрлі қатынастар көрсетіледі. Олардың кейбір үшін тәжірибелі мәліметтері бар екенін білмейді, бірақ бұл график түрі кейбір зерттеу тапсырмасына көмектесетін көмектеседі. Бірақ адамдардың мәселелерімен тәжірибелікті салыстыруды көмектеседі. Бұл соңына қарсы GraphDocExplore бағдарламасын таңдаймыз. Бұл график негіздеген құжаттарды зерттеу үшін интуитивті интерфейсін көрсетеді. Бұл эксперименталдық пайдаланушыларды зерттеу үшін оптимизацияланған. Жалпы график интерфейсі арқылы мәтіннен графиктерді тарқату әртүрлі әдістері жүйесіне қосылады. Осылайша, оларды бақылайтын салыстыруды қамтамасыз ететін ортада төменгі істеу әрекеттеріне салыстыруға болады. Жүйе ашық көзінің лицензиясы арқылы жалпы болады.', 'lt': 'Grafai jau seniai siūlomi kaip priežiūros ir navigacijos įrankis dokumentų rinkimui remti tiriamąją paiešką. Siūloma automatiškai ištraukti įvairių tipų grafikus, pavyzdžiui, subjektus ar koncepcijas ir skirtingus tarpusavio ryšius. Nors kai kuriems iš jų yra eksperimentinių įrodymų, kad jie iš tikrųjų yra naudingi, iš esmės nežinoma, koks grafikas yra naudingiausias konkrečiai tiriamajai užduotims atlikti. Tačiau eksperimentiniai palyginimai su žmonėmis yra sunkūs ir užtrukdo daug laiko. Towards this end, we present the GraphDocExplore framework.  Ji suteikia intuityvią internetinę sąsają grafiniu pagrindu pagrįstam dokumentų žvalgymui, kuris optimizuojamas eksperimentiniams naudotojų tyrimams. Naudojant bendrą grafikos sąsają į sistemą galima sujungti skirtingus grafikų ištraukimo iš teksto metodus. Todėl juos galima palyginti minimaliomis įgyvendinimo pastangomis aplinkoje, užtikrinančioje kontroliuojamą palyginimą. Sistema viešai prieinama pagal atviro kodo licenciją.', 'mk': 'Графите долго време се предложени како алатка за прелистување и навигација во колекција документи со цел да се поддржи експлоаторното пребарување. Многу техники за автоматски извлекување различни типови на графики, покажувајќи на пример ентитети или концепти и различни односи меѓу нив, се предложени. Иако експерименталните докази дека тие навистина се корисни постојат за некои од нив, во голема мера не е познато кој тип на граф е најкорисен за специфична експериментарна задача. Сепак, спроведувањето експериментални споредби со човечките субјекти е предизвикувачки и потребно време. На овој начин ја претставуваме рамката GraphDocExplore. Таа обезбедува интуитивен веб интерфејс за експлоатација на документи базирани на график, кој е оптимизиран за експериментални студии на корисниците. Преку генерален графски интерфејс, различни методи за извлекување графици од текст може да се приклучат во системот. Поради тоа, тие можат да се споредат со минималните напори за спроведување во средина која обезбедува контролирани споредби. Системот е јавно достапен под лиценца на отворен код.', 'mt': 'Il-grafiċi ilhom jiġu proposti bħala għodda għall-ibbrawġjar u n-navigazzjoni f’ġabra ta’ dokumenti sabiex jappoġġjaw it-tiftix esploratorju. Ġew issuġġeriti ħafna tekniki biex jiġu estratti awtomatikament tipi differenti ta’ graffi, li juru pereżempju entitajiet jew kunċetti u relazzjonijiet differenti bejniethom. Filwaqt li jeżisti evidenza sperimentali li huma tabilħaqq ta’ għajnuna għal xi wħud minnhom, fil-biċċa l-kbira mhuwiex magħruf liema tip ta’ graff huwa l-aktar ta’ għajnuna għal kompitu esploratorju speċifiku. Madankollu, it-twettiq ta’ paraguni sperimentali ma’ individwi umani huwa ta’ sfida u jieħu ħafna ħin. Għal dan il-għan, nippreżentaw il-qafas tal-GraphDocExplore. It provides an intuitive web interface for graph-based document exploration that is optimized for experimental user studies.  Permezz ta’ interfaċċja ġenerika tal-grafika, metodi differenti għall-estrazzjoni tal-grafiki mit-test jistgħu jitwaħħlu fis-sistema. Għalhekk, jistgħu jitqabblu fi sforz minimu ta’ implimentazzjoni f’ambjent li jiżgura paraguni kkontrollati. Is-sistema hija disponibbli pubblikament taħt liċenzja open-source.', 'ml': 'പരിശോധന തെരച്ചില്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു രേഖകള്\u200d ബ്രൌസ് ചെയ്യുകയും നാവേഗ് ചെയ്യുവാന്\u200d ഒരു ഉപകരണമായി ഗ്രാഫ്സ സ്വയം വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d പലതും സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ, ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി വസ്തുക്കളോ ആശയങ്ങളോ തമ്മില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ തെളിവുകള്\u200d അവയില്\u200d ചിലര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് തെളിയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ എന്നാലും, മനുഷ്യബോധങ്ങളുമായി പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ താല്\u200dപര്യാപ്തികങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുകയും സമയ ഈ അവസാനത്തേക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്ഡോക്സ്പ്രോള്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെയിന്\u200dറെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ രേഖകള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനായി പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അത ഒരു സാധാരണ ഗ്രാഫ് ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്റ്റിലൂടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഗ്രാഫ് പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികള്\u200d സ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട പരിപാടികള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന പരിപാടിയില്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ പ്രവര്\u200dത് സിസ്റ്റം ഒരു തുറന്ന സോഴ്സ് ലൈസന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ കീഴില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവികമായി ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Graphs have long been proposed as a tool to browse and navigate in a collection of documents in order to support exploratory search.  Banyak teknik untuk mengekstrak secara automatik jenis graf berbeza, menunjukkan contoh entiti atau konsep dan hubungan berbeza diantaranya, telah disarankan. Walaupun bukti percubaan bahawa mereka benar-benar membantu ada bagi sebahagian daripada mereka, tidak diketahui jenis graf yang paling membantu untuk tugas penjelajah tertentu. Namun, melakukan perbandingan percubaan dengan subjek manusia adalah menantang dan memakan masa. Ke arah ini, kami memperkenalkan kerangka GraphDocExplore. Ia menyediakan antaramuka web intuitif untuk pengeksplorasi dokumen berasaskan graf yang optimum untuk kajian pengguna percubaan. Melalui antaramuka graf generik, kaedah berbeza untuk mengekstrak graf dari teks boleh dipalam ke dalam sistem. Oleh itu, mereka boleh dibandingkan dengan usaha pencetakan minimal dalam persekitaran yang memastikan perbandingan terkawal. Sistem tersedia secara umum dibawah lesen sumber terbuka.', 'mn': 'Графиктуудыг судалгааны хайлтыг дэмжихийн тулд баримтын цуглуулга болон судлах хэрэгсэл болгон урт хугацааны санал болсон. Өөр төрлийн график буюу ойлголт болон өөр харилцааны харилцаа автоматжуулахын тулд олон технологиуд санал болсон. Эдгээр нь зарим хүмүүст тусламжтай гэдгийг туршилтын баталгаа хэзээ ч энэ нь тодорхой судалгааны ажлын тулд хамгийн тусламжтай хэлбэрийг мэдэхгүй. Гэхдээ хүн төрөлхтнүүдтэй туршилтын харьцуулалт хийх нь хэцүү, цаг хугацааны хэрэглээ. Энэ төгсгөлд бид GraphDocExplore-ын хэлбэрийг үзүүлнэ. Энэ нь график дээр суурилсан баримт судалгааны интерфейсийг ашиглаж, туршилтын хэрэглэгчдийн судалгаанд сайхан хангалттай. Ерөнхий график интерфейсээр, текстээс графикийг гаргах өөр аргыг системд холбогдож болно. Тиймээс тэднийг хяналттай харьцуулалт гаргадаг орчинд бага зэрэг хэрэгжүүлэх чадвартай харьцуулж болно. Энэ систем нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн лицензийн доор олон нийтэд ашигладаг.', 'pl': 'Wykresy od dawna są proponowane jako narzędzie do przeglądania i poruszania się po zbiorze dokumentów w celu wspierania poszukiwań eksploracyjnych. Zaproponowano wiele technik automatycznego wyodrębniania różnych typów wykresów, pokazujących np. podmioty lub koncepcje oraz różne relacje między nimi. Podczas gdy dla niektórych z nich istnieją dowody eksperymentalne, że są one rzeczywiście pomocne, w dużej mierze nie wiadomo, który rodzaj wykresu jest najbardziej pomocny dla konkretnego zadania badawczego. Jednak przeprowadzanie porównań eksperymentalnych z osobami ludzkimi jest wymagające i czasochłonne. W tym celu przedstawiamy framework GraphDocExplore. Zapewnia intuicyjny interfejs internetowy do eksploracji dokumentów opartych na wykresie, który jest zoptymalizowany do eksperymentalnych badań użytkowników. Dzięki ogólnemu interfejsowi wykresu można podłączyć do systemu różne metody ekstrakcji wykresów z tekstu. Dzięki temu można je porównywać przy minimalnym nakładzie wdrożeniowym w środowisku zapewniającym kontrolowane porównania. System jest publicznie dostępny na licencji open source.', 'ro': 'Graficele au fost propuse de mult timp ca un instrument de navigare și navigare într-o colecție de documente pentru a sprijini căutarea exploratorie. Au fost sugerate multe tehnici de extragere automată a diferitelor tipuri de grafice, care arată, de exemplu, entități sau concepte și relații diferite între ele. Deși există dovezi experimentale că acestea sunt într-adevăr utile pentru unele dintre ele, este în mare parte necunoscut care tip de grafic este cel mai util pentru o anumită sarcină exploratorie. Cu toate acestea, efectuarea comparațiilor experimentale cu subiecții umani este provocatoare și consumatoare de timp. În acest scop, vă prezentăm cadrul GraphDocExplore. Acesta oferă o interfață web intuitivă pentru explorarea documentelor bazate pe grafice, care este optimizată pentru studiile experimentale ale utilizatorilor. Printr-o interfață grafică generică, diferite metode de extragere a graficelor din text pot fi conectate la sistem. Prin urmare, acestea pot fi comparate cu un efort minim de implementare într-un mediu care asigură comparații controlate. Sistemul este disponibil public sub o licență open-source.', 'sr': 'Grafi su dugo predloženi kao alat za pretraživanje i navigaciju u kolekciji dokumenta kako bi podržali istraživačku pretraživanje. Predloženo je mnoge tehnike za automatski izvlačenje različitih vrsta grafika, pokazujući na primer entiteta ili koncept i različite odnose između njih. Iako eksperimentalni dokazi da su zaista korisni za neke od njih, u velikoj meri je nepoznat koji je tip grafika najkorisniji za određeni istraživački zadatak. Međutim, provedba eksperimentalnih usporedba sa ljudskim subjektima je izazovna i potrošnja vremena. Predstavljamo okvir GraphDocExplore. To pruža intuitivni web interfejs za istraživanje dokumenta baziranog na grafiku koji je optimiziran za eksperimentalne studije korisnika. Kroz generički grafički interfejs, različite metode za izvlačenje grafika iz teksta mogu biti povezane u sistem. Stoga se mogu usporediti na minimalnim naporima provedbe u okruženju koja osigura kontrolirane usporedbe. Sistem je javno dostupan pod dozvolu otvorenog izvora.', 'no': 'Grafikar har lang foreslått som eit verktøy for å bla gjennom og navigera i eit samling av dokument for å støtta utforskingssøk. Mange teknikkar for automatisk pakking av ulike typar grafikk, som viser for eksempel einingar eller konseptar og ulike forhold mellom dei, er foreslått. Mens eksperimentelt bevis at dei er truleg hjelp for nokre av dei, er det stort ukjent kva type graf er mest hjelp for eit spesifikke utforskingsbehandling. Men å utføra eksperimentelle sammenlikningar med menneske subjekter er vanskeleg og tidsforberer. Til denne slutten viser vi rammeverket GraphDocExplore. Name Gjennomsiktig grafgrensesnitt kan ulike metodar for å pakka ut grafene frå teksten kopla til systemet. Dette kan derfor samanliknast dei ved minimale implementeringsinnstillingar i eit miljø som sikrar kontrollerte sammenlikningar. Systemet er tilgjengeleg offentlig under ein open-source lisens.', 'so': 'Sida waqti dheer waxaa loo talo galay in loo baaraandegayo iyo baabuurta dukumentiyada si ay u kaalmeeyo raadinta baaritaanka. Waxaa talo galay qaabab badan oo ay si iskaa ah u soo saaraan qaabab kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan waxyaabo tusaale ah ama fikrada iyo xiriir kala duduwan. Inta lagu xaqiijiyo caddeynta tijaabada in ay caawimaad u leeyihiin qaarkood, waa mid aan la garanayn in caynkaas lagu caawinayo shaqo baaritaanka gaar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee sameynta is-barbaro jirrab ah oo la xiriira maadooyinka dadku waa dhibaato iyo isticmaalka wakhtiga. Tan ugu horraysa, waxaan keenaynaa framework GraphDocExplore. Macluumaadka internetka waxaa laga helaa baaritaanka dukumentiyada ee ku saleysan xarunta, kaas oo lagu baran karo waxbarashada imtixaanka isticmaalayaasha. Interfac geneeral ah waxaa lagu xiri karaa habab kala duduwan in sawir laga soo saaro. Sidaas darteed waxaa la barbardhigi karaa hawlaha la soo dejinayo ee ugu yaraan, kuwaas oo ka xaqiijin kara isbardhigyada la maamulay. Liisanka furan waxaa lagu heli karaa nidaamka.', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ්ස් ලොකු වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා පරීක්ෂා සොයාගන්න සඳහා දස්තාවක් සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් වෙනස් වර්ගයක් නිකාලන්න, උදාහරණයෙන් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරමාණ වර්ගයක් සහ වෙනස් සම්බන්ධතාවක්  පරීක්ෂණ සාක්ෂියක් තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන් ඇත්තටම උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ඔවුන්ගෙන් සමහර දෙනෙක් වෙනුවෙන් තියෙන් නමුත්, මිනිස්සු විදියට පරීක්ෂණ සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට සහ වෙලාවක් අ මේ අවසානයට, අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ්ඩොක්ස්ප්ලෝර් ක්\u200dරියාම්පරේට් එක පෙන්වන්නේ. Name සාමාන්\u200dය ග්\u200dරාෆ් අන්තර්ගයක් වලින්, වෙනස් විදියට පද්ධතියෙන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින් අරගෙන යන්න පුළුවන ඉතින්, ඔවුන්ට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් අඩුම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විත පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'Grafer har länge föreslagits som ett verktyg för att bläddra och navigera i en samling dokument för att stödja utforskande sökning. Många tekniker för att automatiskt extrahera olika typer av grafer, som visar till exempel entiteter eller begrepp och olika relationer mellan dem, har föreslagits. Även om experimentella bevis för att de verkligen är användbara finns för vissa av dem, är det i stort sett okänt vilken typ av graf som är mest användbar för en specifik undersökande uppgift. Att utföra experimentella jämförelser med mänskliga försökspersoner är dock utmanande och tidskrävande. I detta syfte presenterar vi GraphDocExplore ramverket. Det ger ett intuitivt webbgränssnitt för grafbaserad dokumentutforskning som är optimerat för experimentella användarstudier. Genom ett generiskt grafgränssnitt kan olika metoder för att extrahera grafer från text anslutas till systemet. Därför kan de jämföras med minimal implementeringsinsats i en miljö som säkerställer kontrollerade jämförelser. Systemet är offentligt tillgängligt under en öppen källkod licens.', 'ta': 'தேடுவதற்கு தேடுதலை ஆதரிக்க ஒரு ஆவணங்களை உலாவும் நேரடியும் செல்லும் கருவியாக வரைகல்கள் நீண்ட நேரம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட் தானாகவே வேறு வகையான வரைபடங்களை வெளியேற்ற பல தொழில்நுட்பம், உதாரணமாக பொருள்கள் அல்லது கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் அவைகளுக்கிடையே வே While experimental evidence that they are indeed helpful exists for some of them, it is largely unknown which type of graph is most helpful for a specific exploratory task.  ஆனால், சோதனையின் ஒப்பீடுகளை மனித பொருட்களுடன் செயல்படுத்துவது சவால் மற்றும் நேரத்தை பயன்படுத்துவது. இந்த முடிவிற்கு முன்பு, நாம் கிராப்ட் DocExplore சட்டத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம். இது வரைபடத்தை அடிப்படையான ஆவணத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ஒரு உள்ளுணர்வு இணைய இடைமுகப்பு வழங்குகிறது சோதனையான பயனர் படிப உரையிலிருந்து வரைப்படங்களை வெளியேற்ற வேறு முறைமைகளால் கணினியில் இணைக்கப்பட முடியும். அதனால், அவர்கள் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒப்பீடுகளை உறுதிப்படுத்தும் சூழலில் சிறிய முயற்சியை ஒப்பிட முடியும். திறந்த மூலத்தின் உரிமம் கீழ் அமைப்பு பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'Graphs are long proposed as a tool to browse and navigate in a collection of documents to support exploratory search. بہت سی ٹیکنالوں کی تعداد جو ان کے درمیان مختلف طریقوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے اٹھانے والی ہیں، مثال کے مطابق انٹیٹیوں یا معلومات اور مختلف رابطہ دکھائی جاتی ہیں۔ حالانکہ آزمائش کی نشانیاں کہ وہ ان میں سے بعض کے لئے ضرور مددگار ہیں، یہ بہت معلوم نہیں کہ کس طرح کا گراف ایک مخصوص تحقیق کام کے لئے بہت مددگار ہے۔ لیکن انسان کے معاملات کے مطابق آزمائش کی مثالیں کرنا مشکل ہے اور وقت مصرف کرنا ہے اس کے اندر ہم گراف ڈاکسپلر فرمیک کو پیش کرتے ہیں۔ یہ گراف پر بنیاد رکھا ہوا ڈکومکسٹ اچھی اچھی طرح کے لئے ایک اینٹیویٹ ویب اینٹرنیٹ پیدا کرتا ہے جو آزمائش کارساز مطالعہ کے لئے اچھی طرح کی جاتی ہے. ایک عمومی گراف انٹرنیفس کے ذریعہ، متن سے گراف نکالنے کے لئے مختلف طریقے ہیں، سیسٹم میں پگل کر سکتے ہیں. لہٰذا، یہ کم عملومات کی کوشش کے ذریعے مقایسہ کر سکتے ہیں ایک محیط میں جو کنٹرول کی مقایسات کا ثابت رکھتا ہے. سیسٹم کھولتا ہے ایک کھولتا سورس لیزانس کے نیچے.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik tugmalarni avtomatik raqamlarni chiqarish uchun boshqa teknologiya talab qilinadi, masalan, ma'lum obʼektlar yoki fikrlarni va orasidagi boshqa munosabatlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Ko'pchilik haqida ularning ko'pchiliklariga yordam beradigan imtiyozlar mavjud boʻlsa, eng katta nomaʼlum emas, bu grafik turi foydalanuvchi vazifasi uchun qanday foydalanadi. Lekin, odamlar bilan tajriba tajribalarni bajarishga harakat qilish va vaqt ishlab chiqaradi. Bu oxiriga, biz GraphDocExplore freymni hosil qilamiz. Name Gradientni matnni chiqish uchun boshqa usullar tizimga ulanishi mumkin. Шундай қилиб, улар тўртта мосламаларини аниқлаб турадиган муҳитда камчилик лойиҳа сифатида тенглаштириш мумкин. The system is publicly available under an open-source license.", 'vi': 'Các đồ họa đã được đề xuất lâu nay như một công cụ để duyệt qua và đi lại trong một bộ sưu tập tài liệu để hỗ trợ tìm kiếm. Nhiều kỹ thuật để tự động trích xuất các kiểu biểu đồ khác nhau, hiển thị ví dụ các thực thể hay khái niệm và các mối quan hệ khác nhau giữa chúng, đã được đề nghị. Trong khi những bằng chứng thử nghiệm về sự hữu ích của một vài người trong số họ, thì hầu như chưa rõ loại đồ thị nào hữu ích nhất cho một nhiệm vụ thăm dò cụ thể. Tuy nhiên, tiến hành thí nghiệm đối chiếu với người dân rất khó khăn và tốn thời gian. Để đạt được mục đích này, chúng tôi xin giới thiệu phần mềm. Nó cung cấp một giao diện mạng trực tiếp cho việc thám hiểm tài liệu dựa vào đồ thị, và được tối ưu cho việc thử nghiệm. Dùng một giao diện đồ thị chung, các phương pháp trích xuất đồ chữ khác nhau có thể được cắm vào hệ thống. Do đó, chúng có thể được so sánh với mức độ áp dụng tối thiểu trong một môi trường đảm bảo so sánh được. Hệ thống được công bố dưới một giấy phép nguồn mở.', 'bg': 'Графите отдавна са предложени като инструмент за разглеждане и навигиране в колекция от документи, за да подкрепят проучвателното търсене. Предлагани са много техники за автоматично извличане на различни типове графики, показващи например обекти или концепции и различни взаимоотношения между тях. Въпреки че експериментални доказателства, че те наистина са полезни за някои от тях, до голяма степен не е известно кой тип графика е най-полезен за конкретна изследователска задача. Въпреки това, извършването на експериментални сравнения с хора е предизвикателство и отнема време. За тази цел представяме рамката. Той осигурява интуитивен уеб интерфейс за графично проучване на документи, който е оптимизиран за експериментални потребителски проучвания. Чрез общ графичен интерфейс, различни методи за извличане на графики от текст могат да бъдат включени в системата. Следователно те могат да бъдат сравнени с минимални усилия за изпълнение в среда, която гарантира контролирани сравнения. Системата е публично достъпна под лиценз с отворен код.', 'nl': 'Grafieken worden al lang voorgesteld als hulpmiddel om te bladeren en te navigeren in een verzameling documenten om verkennend zoeken te ondersteunen. Veel technieken om automatisch verschillende soorten grafieken te extraheren, bijvoorbeeld entiteiten of concepten en verschillende relaties tussen hen, zijn voorgesteld. Hoewel experimenteel bewijs bestaat dat ze inderdaad nuttig zijn voor sommigen van hen, is het grotendeels onbekend welk type grafiek het meest nuttig is voor een specifieke verkennende taak. Het uitvoeren van experimentele vergelijkingen met menselijke proefpersonen is echter uitdagend en tijdrovend. Hiertoe presenteren we het GraphDocExplore framework. Het biedt een intuïtieve webinterface voor grafiekgebaseerde documentverkenning die is geoptimaliseerd voor experimentele gebruikersstudies. Via een generieke grafiekinterface kunnen verschillende methoden om grafieken uit tekst te extraheren in het systeem worden aangesloten. Ze kunnen dus met minimale implementatieinspanning vergeleken worden in een omgeving die gecontroleerde vergelijkingen garandeert. Het systeem is openbaar beschikbaar onder een open-source licentie.', 'da': 'Grafer har længe været foreslået som et værktøj til at gennemse og navigere i en samling af dokumenter for at understøtte sonderende søgning. Mange teknikker til automatisk at udtrække forskellige typer grafer, der viser for eksempel enheder eller begreber og forskellige relationer mellem dem, er blevet foreslået. Selvom der findes eksperimentelle beviser på, at de virkelig er nyttige for nogle af dem, er det stort set ukendt, hvilken type graf der er mest nyttig til en specifik undersøgelsesopgave. Det er dog udfordrende og tidskrævende at foretage eksperimentelle sammenligninger med mennesker. Med henblik herpå præsenterer vi GraphDocExplore rammen. Det giver en intuitiv webgrænseflade til grafbaseret dokumentudforskning, der er optimeret til eksperimentelle brugerstudier. Gennem en generisk grafgrænseflade kan forskellige metoder til at udtrække grafer fra tekst tilsluttes systemet. Derfor kan de sammenlignes med minimal implementeringsindsats i et miljø, der sikrer kontrollerede sammenligninger. Systemet er offentligt tilgængeligt under en open source licens.', 'hr': 'Grafi su dugo predloženi kao alat za pretraživanje i navigaciju u skupini dokumenta kako bi podržali istraživačku potragu. Predloženo je mnoge tehnike za automatski izvlačenje različitih vrsta grafika, pokazujući na primjer entiteta ili koncept i različite odnose između njih. Iako eksperimentalni dokazi da su zaista korisni za neke od njih, u velikoj mjeri nije poznat koji je tip grafa najkorisniji za određeni istraživački zadatak. Međutim, provedba eksperimentalnih usporedba s ljudskim subjektima je izazovna i potrošnja vremena. Predstavljamo okvir GraphDocExplore. To pruža intuitivni web interfejs za istraživanje dokumenta baziranog na grafiku koji se optimizira za eksperimentalne ispitivanje korisnika. Kroz generički grafički interfejs, različite metode izvlačenja grafika iz teksta mogu se priključiti u sustav. Stoga se mogu usporediti s minimalnim naporima provedbe u okruženju koja osigura kontrolirane usporedbe. Sistem je javno dostupan pod dozvolu otvorenog izvora.', 'ko': '오랫동안 탐색적인 검색을 지원하기 위해 사람들은 도형을 도구로 문서 집합을 탐색하고 내비게이션하는 것을 권장해 왔다.사람들은 실체나 개념, 그리고 그들 간의 서로 다른 관계를 나타내는 등 다양한 유형의 도형을 자동으로 추출하는 기술을 많이 제기했다.그 중 일부에게 도움이 된다는 실험 증거가 있지만 특정한 탐색적 임무에 어떤 종류의 도형이 가장 도움이 되는지는 어느 정도 알 수 없다.그러나 인간 수험자와 실험을 비교해 보면 도전적이고 시간이 걸린다.이를 위해 GraphDocExplore 프레임워크를 제시했습니다.이는 도형을 바탕으로 한 문서 탐색에 직관적인 웹 인터페이스를 제공하고 실험 사용자에 대한 연구를 최적화시켰다.일반 그래픽 인터페이스를 사용하여 텍스트에서 그래픽을 추출하는 다양한 방법을 시스템에 삽입할 수 있습니다.따라서 통제된 비교를 확보하는 환경에서 최소한의 실현 작업량으로 비교할 수 있다.이 시스템은 오픈 소스 라이센스 하에 공개적으로 사용할 수 있습니다.', 'de': 'Graphen werden seit langem als Werkzeug zum Durchsuchen und Navigieren in einer Sammlung von Dokumenten vorgeschlagen, um die explorative Suche zu unterstützen. Es wurden viele Techniken vorgeschlagen, um verschiedene Arten von Graphen automatisch zu extrahieren, z.B. Entitäten oder Konzepte und unterschiedliche Beziehungen zwischen ihnen zu zeigen. Während experimentelle Beweise dafür existieren, dass sie tatsächlich hilfreich sind, ist es weitgehend unbekannt, welche Art von Graphen für eine bestimmte explorative Aufgabe am hilfreichsten ist. Die Durchführung experimenteller Vergleiche mit menschlichen Probanden ist jedoch herausfordernd und zeitaufwendig. Zu diesem Zweck stellen wir das GraphDocExplore Framework vor. Es bietet eine intuitive Weboberfläche für die graphenbasierte Dokumentenerkundung, die für experimentelle Benutzerstudien optimiert ist. Über eine generische Graph-Schnittstelle können verschiedene Methoden zum Extrahieren von Graphen aus Text in das System eingebunden werden. Somit können sie mit minimalem Implementierungsaufwand in einer Umgebung verglichen werden, die kontrollierte Vergleiche gewährleistet. Das System ist öffentlich unter einer Open-Source-Lizenz verfügbar.', 'fa': 'گرافها خیلی وقته به عنوان ابزار برای جستجوی و جستجوی در مجموعه سند پیشنهاد داده شده\u200cاند. بسیاری از تکنیک\u200cها برای اخراج از نوع\u200cهای مختلف گراف\u200cها به طور خودکار پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که برای مثال نشان داده می\u200cشوند عنوان\u200cها یا فرضیه\u200cها و رابطه\u200cهای مختلف بین آنها. در حالی که مدرک آزمایشی که آنها واقعاً برای بعضی از آنها کمک می کنند وجود دارد، بسیار معلوم نیست که کدام نوع گراف برای یک کار تحقیقات خاص کمک می کند. با این حال، مقایسه\u200cهای آزمایشی با موضوع انسان را انجام می\u200cدهد، سخت\u200cگیری و مصرف زمان است. به سمت این پایان، ما چهارچوب GraphDocExplore را پیشنهاد می کنیم. این برای تحقیقات سند بنیاد گراف برای تحقیقات کاربر آزمایشی بهترین شده است. از طریق یک مجموعه گرافیک عمومی، روش\u200cهای مختلف برای خروج گرافیک از متن می\u200cتواند به سیستم پیوند شود. بنابراین، آنها می توانند در تلاش کمینه عملکرد در محیط محیط مقایسه کنترل را در مقایسه قرار دهند. سیستم به طور عمومی تحت اجازه منبع باز موجود است.', 'id': 'Graf telah lama diusulkan sebagai alat untuk melayar dan navigasi dalam koleksi dokumen untuk mendukung pencarian eksplorator. Banyak teknik untuk secara otomatis mengekstrak tipe grafik yang berbeda, menunjukkan misalnya entitas atau konsep dan hubungan yang berbeda antara mereka, telah disarankan. Walaupun bukti percobaan bahwa mereka benar-benar membantu ada untuk beberapa dari mereka, tidak diketahui jenis grafik yang paling membantu untuk tugas eksplorasi khusus. Namun, melakukan perbandingan eksperimental dengan subjek manusia adalah tantangan dan memakan waktu. Menuju tujuan ini, kami memperkenalkan cadangan GraphDocExplore. Ini menyediakan antarmuka web intuitif untuk eksplorasi dokumen berdasarkan grafik yang optimisasi untuk penelitian eksperimen pengguna. Melalui antarmuka grafik generik, metode berbeda untuk mengekstrak grafik dari teks dapat disambung ke dalam sistem. Oleh karena itu, mereka dapat dibandingkan dengan upaya implementasi minimal dalam lingkungan yang memastikan perbandingan terkendali. Sistem tersedia publik di bawah lisensi sumber terbuka.', 'af': "Grafiese het lank voorgestel as 'n hulpmiddel om te blaai en navigeer in 'n versameling van dokumente te ondersteun deursoek. Baie teknike om verskillende tipes grafieke outomaties te uitpak, vertoon byvoorbeeld entiteite of konsepte en verskillende verwantings tussen hulle, is voorgestel. Terwyl eksperimentele bevestige dat hulle regtig hulpbaardige bestaan vir sommige van hulle, is dit groot onbekende wat tipe graaf is mees hulpbaardige vir 'n spesifieke uitsoek taak. Maar die uitvoering van eksperimentale vergelykings met menslike onderwerpe is 'n challenging en tyd-gebruik. Na hierdie einde voorsien ons die GraphDocExplore raamwerk. Name Deur 'n generieke graafkoppelvlak, ander metodes om graaf van teks uit te pak kan in die stelsel inprop word. Daarom kan hulle vergelyk word by die minimale implementering verskaf in 'n omgewing wat kontroleerde vergelykings verseker. Die stelsel is openlik beskikbaar onder 'n open-bron lisensie.", 'sw': 'Tafsiri zimependekezwa kwa muda mrefu kama zana ya kutazama na kuendelea katika mkusanyiko wa nyaraka ili kusaidia kutafuta uchunguzi. Teknolojia nyingi za kujitoa aina mbalimbali za picha, zinazoonyesha kwa mfano vitu au dhana na mahusiano tofauti kati yao, zimependekezwa. Wakati ushahidi wa majaribio kwamba wanasaidia kwa hakika kuwepo kwa baadhi yao, haijulikani kwa kiasi kikubwa ni aina gani ya grafu inasaidia kwa ajili ya kazi maalum ya uchunguzi. Hata hivyo, kufanya ulinganisho wa majaribio na mada ya binadamu ni changamoto na matumizi ya muda. Mpaka mwisho huu, tunawasilisha mfumo wa GraphDocExplore. Inatoa mtandao wa intaneti yenye ufahamu wa uchunguzi wa nyaraka inayotumika na picha ambazo ni bora kwa ajili ya utafiti wa watumiaji wa majaribio. Kwa kupitia sura ya kawaida, njia tofauti za kutengeneza picha kutoka maandishi inaweza kuingizwa kwenye mfumo. Kwa hiyo, wanaweza kulinganishwa na juhudi za utekelezaji wa chini katika mazingira ambazo zinahakikisha kulinganishwa. The system is publicly available under an open-source license.', 'am': '&ፈልግ ብዙ ልዩ ዓይነቶችን ማውጣት በተለየ ቋንቋዎች እና ምሳሌ አካባቢዎችን እና በመካከላቸው ልዩ ግንኙነት እንዲያሳዩ ተግሳጽቷል፡፡ While experimental evidence that they are indeed helpful exists for some of them, it is largely unknown which type of graph is most helpful for a specific exploratory task.  ነገር ግን ከሰው አካባቢዎች ጋር ተሳያየትን ለመፈለግ የጊዜውን ጥያቄ እና ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ወደዚህ መጨረሻ የGraphDocExplore framework እናቀርባለን፡፡ በተፈተና ተጠቃሚዎች ትምህርት ላይ የሚደረገውን የgraph-based ሰነድ መረጃ መግለጫ የኢንተርኔት интерфейсን ይሰጣል፡፡ የተለመደው ቀለም ስለዚህም በተጨማሪው ተሳካቾችን በሚያረጋግጥ አካባቢ ውስጥ በሚያሳየው አካባቢ ውጤት ይተካከላሉ፡፡ ሲስተምሩ በተከፈተ ቋንቋ ፈቃድ ውስጥ ግልፅ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Grafikët janë propozuar për një kohë të gjatë si një mjet për të shfletuar dhe naviguar në një koleksion dokumentesh me qëllim që të mbështesin kërkimin eksplorues. Shumë teknika për të nxjerrë automatikisht lloje të ndryshme grafike, duke treguar për shembull njësi apo koncepte dhe marrëdhënie të ndryshme midis tyre, janë sugjeruar. Ndërsa për disa prej tyre ekziston prova eksperimentale se ato janë me të vërtetë të dobishme, është e panjohur se cili lloj grafiku është më i dobishëm për një detyrë të veçantë eksploruese. Megjithatë, kryerja e krahasimeve eksperimentale me subjektet njerëzore është e vështirë dhe e mban kohë. Për këtë qëllim, prezantojmë kuadrin GraphDocExplore. Ajo ofron një interfaqe intuitive web për eksplorimin e dokumenteve bazuar në grafik që optimizohet për studimet eksperimentale të përdoruesve. Nëpërmjet një interfaqe gjenerale grafike, metoda të ndryshme për të nxjerrë grafike nga teksti mund të lidhen në sistem. Kështu, ato mund të krahasohen me përpjekje minimale zbatimi në një mjedis që siguron krahasime të kontrolluara. Sistemi është në dispozicion publik nën një licensë burimi të hapur.', 'tr': 'Çaplanjak ahtaryş arşiwi desteklemek üçin senedi ahtarmak we geçirmek üçin bir araç hökmünde köp täze terjime edildi. Birnäçe grafikler köpüsini otomatik taýýarlamak üçin teknikler, mysal taýýarlar, düşünjeler we dürli baglaýyşlar arasynda görkezilýän teknikler maslahat edildi. Olaryň käbirlerine tapawutlyk bolmagynyň bardygyny synanyşdyrylýan kanaplaryň bardygyny bilen tanamaýar. Hakykatdan soňra tanyş göresi üçin has kömek däldir. Yöne adamlary bilen deneysel karşılaştyrylyklary çykarmak we wagt taýýarlanmakdyr. Bu soňra we GraphDocExplore çerçevesini görkez. Bu grafik tabanly sened keşfedilmesi üçin gözlenen web interfejsini saýlaýar. Umumy grafik interfejesinden grafikleri a çmak üçin farklı yöntemler sisteme baglanyp biler. Şol sebäpli, olar çykyş etmäge çykyş etmäge çalyşyrlyp bilerler. Bu sistem açyk-çeşme lisansynyň astynda päblisaň bar.', 'bn': 'তদন্ত অনুসন্ধানের সমর্থন করার জন্য একটি ডকুমেন্ট সংগ্রহে ব্রাউজ এবং ন্যাভিগেটের একটি টুল হিসেবে দীর্ঘ সময় ধরে গ্রাফ প্রস্ত স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিভিন্ন ধরনের গ্রাফ বের করার জন্য অনেক প্রযুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যেমন বিষয়বস্তু অথবা ধারণা এবং তাদের মধ্যে বি যখন পরীক্ষার প্রমাণ হচ্ছে যে তারা তাদের কিছু কিছুর জন্য সাহায্য করে থাকে, তখন এটা বেশীরভাগ অজানা যায় যে কোন ধরনের গ্রাফ বিশেষ পর্ তবে মানুষের বিষয়গুলোর সাথে পরীক্ষার তুলনায় পরীক্ষা করা চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং সময়ের ব্যবহার করছে। এই শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা গ্রাফ ডক্সপ্লোরের ফ্রেমে উপস্থাপন করছি। এটি গ্রাফ-ভিত্তিক নথিভিত্তিক গবেষণার জন্য একটি ইন্টারফেস প্রদান করে যা পরীক্ষা ব্যবহারকারীদের গবেষণার জন্য অপ্ একটি সাধারণ গ্রাফ ইন্টারফেসের মাধ্যমে টেক্সট থেকে গ্রাফ বের করার বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতি সিস্টেমে প্লাগ করা যাবে। তাই তাদের তুলনা করা যাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণিত তুলনা নিশ্চিত করা পরিবেশের মধ্যে ন্যুনতম ব্যবস্থার প্রচেষ্টায়। খোলা সোর্স লাইসেন্সের অধীনে এই সিস্টেম প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'hy': 'Գրաֆերը երկար ժամանակ առաջարկում են որպես գործիք փաստաթղթերի հավաքածուի միջոցով նայելու և ուղևորության համար, որպեսզի աջակցեն ուսումնասիրությունը: Շատ մեթոդներ են առաջարկվել տարբեր տեսակի գրաֆիկների ավտոմատ հանելու համար, որոնք ցույց են տալիս օրինակ միավորներ կամ գաղափարներ և դրանց միջև տարբեր հարաբերություններ: Մինչդեռ փորձարկվող ապացույցները, որ դրանք իսկապես օգտակար են գոյություն ունեն նրանցից ոմանց համար, մեծ մասամբ անհայտ է, թե ինչ տեսակի գրաֆիկը առավել օգտակար է որոշակի ուսումնասիրությունների համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, մարդկային թեմաների հետ փորձարկվող համեմատություններ կատարելը դժվար է և ժամանակ է պահանջում: Այս ուղղությամբ մենք ներկայացնում ենք GrafDocExplore-ի շրջանակը: It provides an intuitive web interface for graph-based document exploration that is optimized for experimental user studies.  Գրաֆի ընդհանուր ինտերֆեյսի միջոցով գրաֆիկները տեքստից հանելու տարբեր մեթոդներ կարելի է միացնել համակարգին: Այդ իսկ պատճառով, դրանք կարող են համեմատել մինիմալ իրականացման ջանքերով միջավայրում, որն ապահովում է վերահսկվող համեմատություններ: Համակարգը հանրային հասանելի է բաց կոդի լիցենսի տակ:', 'ca': "Fa molt de temps que s'han proposat gràfics com una eina de navegació i navegació en una col·lecció de documents per sostenir la recerca exploratoria. Many techniques to automatically extract different types of graphs, showing for example entities or concepts and different relationships between them, have been suggested.  Mentre existeix una evidència experimental de que són realment útils per alguns d'ells, és molt desconegut quin tipus de gràfic és més útil per a una tasca exploratoria específica. However, carrying out experimental comparisons with human subjects is challenging and time-consuming.  En aquest sentit, presentem el marc GraphDocExplore. proporciona una interfície web intuïtiva per a l'exploració de documentos basats en gràfics optimitzada per estudis experimentals d'usuaris. A través d'una interfície gràfica genèrica, diferents mètodes d'extracció de gràfics del text es poden connectar al sistema. Per tant, es poden comparar amb un esforç mínim d'implementació en un entorn que garanteix comparacions controlades. El sistema està disponible públicament sota una llicència de codi obert.", 'cs': 'Grafy jsou již dlouho navrženy jako nástroj pro procházení a navigaci ve sbírce dokumentů s cílem podporovat průzkumné vyhledávání. Bylo navrženo mnoho technik automatického extrahování různých typů grafů, ukazujících například entity nebo koncepty a různé vztahy mezi nimi. Zatímco experimentální důkazy, že jsou skutečně užitečné pro některé z nich existují, je do značné míry neznámo, který typ grafu je nejvíce užitečný pro konkrétní průzkumný úkol. Provádění experimentálních srovnání s lidskými subjekty je však náročné a časově náročné. Za tímto účelem představujeme framework GraphDocExplore. Poskytuje intuitivní webové rozhraní pro grafové průzkumy dokumentů, které je optimalizováno pro experimentální uživatelské studie. Prostřednictvím obecného grafového rozhraní lze do systému připojit různé metody extrahování grafů z textu. Proto je lze porovnat s minimální implementační námahou v prostředí, které zajišťuje kontrolované srovnání. Systém je veřejně dostupný pod open source licencí.', 'az': 'Grafiklər keşif araştırmalarını dəstəkləmək üçün səhifələr koleksiyonundan keçirmək və navigatiya vasitəsi olaraq təklif edilmişdir. Müxtəlif grafik növlərini avtomatik olaraq çıxartmaq üçün çoxlu tekniklər, məsələlər, məsələlər, fikirlər və onların arasında müxtəlif ilişkiler göstərmək üçün təklif edilmişdir. Həqiqətən, onların bəzilərinə faydalı olduğuna dair eksperimentli dəlillər varsa da, bu çox bilinməz ki, hansı graf növü müəyyən edilmiş bir keşif işinə ən faydalı olar. Ancaq insanlarla müxtəlif müqayisədə istifadə etmək çətin və vaxt istifadə etməkdir. Bu son tərəfində GraphDocExplore framework ünü göstəririk. Bu, graf-tabanlı dökümət keşif üçün müxtəlif istifadəçilərin təhsilinə optimizlənən bir web interfejsini təmin edir. Mətndən grafləri çıxartmaq üçün müxtəlif yollar sistemə bağlanabilir. Buna görə də, onlar müdafiə edilmiş salışdırmaları güclü bir ortamda minimal istifadə etmə çabaları ilə qarşılaşdırıla bilərlər. Sistem açıq mənbə lisansının altında açıq olaraq faydalanır.', 'bs': 'Grafi su davno predloženi kao alat za pretraživanje i navigaciju u kolekciji dokumenta kako bi podržali istraživačku pretraživanje. Predloženo je mnoge tehnike za automatski izvlačenje različitih vrsta grafika, pokazujući na primjer entiteta ili koncept i različite odnose između njih. Iako eksperimentalni dokazi da su zaista korisni za neke od njih, u velikoj mjeri nije poznat koji je tip grafa najkorisniji za određeni istraživački zadatak. Međutim, provedba eksperimentalnih usporedba s ljudskim subjektima je izazovna i potrošnja vremena. Predstavljamo okvir GraphDocExplore. To pruža intuitivnu internetsku interfejsu za istraživanje dokumenta baziranog na grafiku koja se optimizira za eksperimentalne studije korisnika. Kroz generički grafički interfejs, različite metode za izvlačenje grafika iz teksta mogu se priključiti u sistem. Stoga se mogu usporediti na minimalnim naporima provedbe u okruženju koja osigura kontrolirane usporedbe. Sistem je javno dostupan pod dozvolu otvorenog izvora.', 'fi': 'Graafeja on jo pitkään ehdotettu työkaluksi selata ja navigoida dokumenttikokoelmassa tutkivan haun tueksi. On ehdotettu useita tekniikoita, joilla voidaan automaattisesti poimia erilaisia kaavioita, joissa esitetään esimerkiksi entiteettejä tai käsitteitä ja erilaisia suhteita niiden välillä. Vaikka kokeellista näyttöä siitä, että ne todella ovat hyödyllisiä on olemassa joillekin niistä, on suurelta osin tuntematonta, minkä tyyppinen kaavio on eniten hyödyllinen tiettyyn tutkimustehtävään. Kokeellisten vertailujen tekeminen ihmisiin on kuitenkin haastavaa ja aikaa vievää. Tätä varten esittelemme GraphDocExplore-kehyksen. Se tarjoaa intuitiivisen web-käyttöliittymän graafiseen dokumenttien etsintään, joka on optimoitu kokeellisia käyttäjätutkimuksia varten. Yleisen graafikäyttöliittymän avulla järjestelmään voidaan liittää erilaisia menetelmiä graafien poimimiseksi tekstistä. Näin ollen niitä voidaan verrata mahdollisimman pienellä täytäntöönpanovaivalla ympäristössä, joka varmistaa kontrolloidut vertailut. Järjestelmä on julkisesti saatavilla avoimen lähdekoodin lisenssillä.', 'et': 'Graafikuid on juba ammu välja pakutud kui vahendit dokumentide kogumi sirvimiseks ja navigeerimiseks, et toetada uurimisotsingut. On välja pakutud mitmeid meetodeid erinevat tüüpi graafikute automaatseks ekstraheerimiseks, näiteks olemid või kontseptsioonid ja erinevad seosed nende vahel. Kuigi eksperimentaalsed tõendid selle kohta, et need on tõepoolest kasulikud, on suures osas teadmata, millist tüüpi graafik on kõige kasulikum konkreetse uurimisülesande jaoks. Kuid eksperimentaalsete võrdluste teostamine inimestega on keeruline ja aeganõudev. Selleks tutvustame GraphDocExplore raamistikku. See pakub intuitiivset veebiliidet graafikapõhiseks dokumendiuuringuks, mis on optimeeritud eksperimentaalseteks kasutajate uuringuteks. Üldise graafikaliidese kaudu saab süsteemi ühendada erinevaid meetodeid graafikute ekstraheerimiseks tekstist. Seega saab neid võrrelda minimaalse rakenduspingutusega keskkonnas, mis tagab kontrollitud võrdlused. Süsteem on avalikult kättesaadav avatud lähtekoodiga litsentsi alusel.', 'ha': "An buƙata Grafs don a ƙayyade shi kamar wata zanar ta yi biraws da kuma za'a tafiyar da cikin takardar takardun aiki don ya yi ƙarani da search. An buƙata masu yawa masu motsi wa farat-fitar nau'i-nau'i, ko kuma an nuna masu misali da zato da danganta dabam-daban a tsakanin su. Bayan jarrabo, lalle ne, za'a iya amfani da su masu cikin wasu daga cikinsu, ba za'a sani ba wanne aina grafi zai fi amfani da wajen wani task õkin ta ƙayyade. A lokacin da, ta sami misãlai da mazaɓa na mutane yana tsõratar da matuƙar. @ action: button Ina ƙunsa da wani interface na Intanet mai amfani da kwamfyuta wa zane-zane-zane ga zane-zane-zane-zane kan karatun karatun masu basĩra. @ info: whatsthis Saboda haka, za su daidaita su da aikin zartar da aiki da ke ƙara cikin wata mazaɓa wanda ke tsare misalin da za'a yi lissafa. Ana iya ƙayyade tsarin bayani da wata lissãfi mai buɗewa.", 'he': 'הגרפים כבר הרבה זמן הציעו ככלי לדחוף ולניווט באספת מסמכים כדי לתמוך בחיפוש חקירי. הציעו טכניקות רבות להוציא באופן אוטומטי סוגים שונים של גרפים, שמראות למשל ישויות או רעיונות ומערכות יחסים שונות ביניהם. למרות שהראיות ניסויים שהן באמת עוזרות קיימות עבור חלק מהם, לא ידוע לרוב איזה סוג של גרף הוא הכי עוזר עבור משימה חקירה ספציפית. עם זאת, לבצע שיוואות ניסויים עם נושאים אנושיים זה מאתגר ומזל זמן. לכיוון זה, אנחנו מציגים את המסגרת GraphDocExplore. זה מספק ממשק אינטואיטיבי לאינטואיטיבי לחקור מסמכים מבוססים בגרף שמאופטימיזם למחקרים ניסויים של משתמשים. דרך ממשק גרף גנרי, שיטות שונות להוציא גרפים מהטקסט יכולות להיות מחוברות למערכת. לכן, הם יכולים להשוות במאמץ מינימלי להפעילה בסביבה שמבטיח שיווחים שולטים. The system is publicly available under an open-source license.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé teknik sing nyebutaké sewé akeh pisan nang sampeyan, iso nggambar atit karo sampeyan karo akeh dumadhan Genjer-genjer paling nggawe gerangé nggawe barang nggawe aturan sing perusahaan kanggo kelas karo cegawe, gawe paling nggawe graf kudu nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolitenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mawuh berlak iki, kita sadurungke rampun Graffdock FindOK politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kaya, dheweke iso nggambar nganggo dolanan sing titimbane ning titimbang nggawe Sistem kang dipuangkat wong liyané saben nggo Open-source lisansi.', 'sk': 'Grafi so že dolgo predlagani kot orodje za brskanje in krmarjenje po zbirki dokumentov, da bi podprli raziskovalno iskanje. Predlagane so bile številne tehnike za samodejno ekstrakcijo različnih tipov grafov, ki prikazujejo na primer entitete ali koncepte in različne odnose med njimi. Medtem ko obstajajo eksperimentalni dokazi, da so dejansko koristni za nekatere od njih, ni večinoma znano, katera vrsta grafov je najbolj koristna za določeno raziskovalno nalogo. Vendar pa je izvedba eksperimentalnih primerjav z ljudmi zahtevna in dolgotrajna. V ta namen predstavljamo okvir GraphDocExplore. Zagotavlja intuitiven spletni vmesnik za grafično raziskovanje dokumentov, ki je optimiziran za eksperimentalne uporabniške študije. S splošnim grafičnim vmesnikom je mogoče v sistem priključiti različne metode za ekstrakcijo grafikonov iz besedila. Zato jih je mogoče primerjati z minimalnim naporom za izvajanje v okolju, ki zagotavlja nadzorovane primerjave. Sistem je javno dostopen pod odprtokodno licenco.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་རིས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་རུང་བའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་བཤེར་བྱེད་དང་ཕྱོགས དཔེར་ན། དབྱེ་བ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མི་འདྲ་བ་ལས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐེབས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོས་དངོས་ཡོད་ཐུབ་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་དཔེ་ ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་ཚོའི་བརྗོད་ཁག་དང་མི་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་འདྲ་བྱེད་དགོས་མེད། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་འགྲོས་དེ་ལྟར་ངེད་ཚོས་GraphDocExplore་གཞི་བཀོད་སྟོན་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་གྲངས་རིས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཡིག སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིས་ལག་གི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བ དེར་བརྟེན། རང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཚད་རྩིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་འཇུག་ཟམ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཉུང་བའི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་དང་ མ་ལག་འདི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཐོག་མའི་མང་ཆོག་ཐང་ཐོག་ཏུ་སྤྱོད་རུང་བ'}
{'en': 'SGNMT   A Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'ar': 'SGNMT - منصة فك تشفير NMT مرنة للنماذج الأولية السريعة للنماذج الجديدة واستراتيجيات البحث', 'pt': 'SGNMT – Uma Plataforma Flexível de Decodificação NMT para Prototipagem Rápida de Novos Modelos e Estratégias de Pesquisa', 'fr': 'SGNMT — Une plateforme de décodage NMT flexible pour le prototypage rapide de nouveaux modèles et de nouvelles stratégies de recherche', 'es': 'SGNMT: una plataforma flexible de decodificación de NMT para la creación rápida de prototipos de nuevos modelos y estrategias de búsqueda', 'ja': 'SGNMT –新しいモデルと検索戦略の迅速なプロトタイプ作成のための柔軟なNMTデコードプラットフォーム', 'hi': 'SGNMT - नए मॉडल और खोज रणनीतियों के त्वरित प्रोटोटाइप के लिए एक लचीला NMT डिकोडिंग प्लेटफ़ॉर्म', 'zh': 'SGNMT – 灵 NMT 解码台,速设新模搜索之策', 'ru': 'SGNMT – Гибкая платформа декодирования NMT для быстрого прототипирования новых моделей и стратегий поиска', 'ga': 'SGNMT – Ardán Díchódaithe NMT Solúbtha chun Fréamhshamhail Thapa a dhéanamh ar Mhúnlaí Nua agus ar Straitéisí Cuardaigh', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια ευέλικτη πλατφόρμα αποκωδικοποίησης για γρήγορη τυποποίηση νέων μοντέλων και στρατηγικών αναζήτησης', 'hu': 'SGNMT – Rugalmas NMT dekódoló platform az új modellek és keresési stratégiák gyors prototípusához', 'it': 'SGNMT – Una piattaforma flessibile di decodifica NMT per la prototipazione rapida di nuovi modelli e strategie di ricerca', 'mk': 'SGNMT – Флексибилна платформа за декодирање на NMT за брзо прототипирање на новите модели и стратегии за пребарување', 'kk': 'SGNMT - Жаңа үлгілер мен іздеу стратегияларының тез прототиптері үшін NMT декодтау платформасы', 'lt': 'SGNMT – lanksti NMT kodavimo platforma, skirta greitam naujų modelių ir paieškos strategijų protipiavimui', 'ml': 'SGNMT - പുതിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും തെരച്ചില്\u200d സ്ട്രേറ്റേജികള്\u200dക്കും വേഗം പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിട്ട് ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള', 'mn': 'SGNMT - Шинэ загвар болон хайлтын стратеги шинэ хурдан прототикчлэх болон NMT хурдан шинэчлэх Платформ', 'ms': 'SGNMT – Platform Pengekodan NMT Fleksible untuk Prototyping Cepat Model Baru dan Strategi Gelintar', 'no': 'SGNMT – eit fleksibel NMT- dekoding- plattform for rask prototyping av nye modeller og søkjestrategi', 'ro': 'SGNMT – O platformă flexibilă de decodare NMT pentru prototiparea rapidă a noilor modele și strategii de căutare', 'si': 'SGnMT - අළුත් මොඩේල් සහ හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාවට ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපනය සඳහා හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය', 'sr': 'SGNMT – Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'mt': 'SGNMT – Pjattaforma flessibbli tad-dekodifikazzjoni tal-NMT għall-Prototipizzazzjoni Rapida ta’ Mudelli Ġodda u Strateġiji ta’ Tfittxija', 'sv': 'SGNMT – En flexibel NMT avkodningsplattform för snabb prototypning av nya modeller och sökstrategier', 'ta': 'Name', 'pl': 'SGNMT – Elastyczna platforma dekodowania NMT do szybkiego prototypowania nowych modeli i strategii wyszukiwania', 'ur': 'SGNMT - نئی موڈل اور جستجو استراتژی کے لئے تیز پروٹوٹیپینگ کے لئے فالکسیبل NMT ڈیکوڈینگ پلٹورم', 'so': 'SGNMT - A Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ chỉ giải mã NMT có khả năng xác định thời trang nhanh cho giai đoạn mới', 'nl': 'SGNMT-peEen flexibel NMT-decoderingsplatform voor snelle prototyping van nieuwe modellen en zoekstrategieën', 'hr': 'SGNMT - Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'bg': 'Гъвкава платформа за декодиране на нови модели и стратегии за търсене', 'da': 'SGNMT - En fleksibel NMT dekodningsplatform til hurtig prototype af nye modeller og søgestrategier', 'fa': 'SGNMT - یک Platform Decoding NMT Flexible for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'id': 'SGNMT - A Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'sw': 'SGNMT - Jukwaa la Kuchapisha NMT ya Kuhamia NMT kwa ajili ya kuandika Makodi ya haraka ya Mitandao Mpya na Tafuta', 'de': 'SGNMT-peEine flexible NMT-Decodierplattform zum schnellen Prototyping neuer Modelle und Suchstrategien', 'tr': 'SGNMT - Täze Modeller we Arama Strategiýasy üçin Fleksibil NMT Ködleme Platform', 'ko': 'SGNMT - 새로운 모델과 검색 전략을 신속하게 원형화하는 유연한 NMT 디코딩 플랫폼', 'sq': 'SGNMT - A Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'az': 'SGNMT - Yeni Modellər və Arama Strategiyaları üçün Hızlı Prototyping üçün Flexible NMT Dekodlama Platformu', 'bn': 'SGNMT - A Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'am': 'አዲስ ሞዴል እና ፈልግ Strategies', 'bs': 'SGNMT - Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'af': "SGNMT - ' n Fleksible NMT Dekodering Platform vir Vinnige Prototiping van Nuwe Modelle en Soektog Strategies", 'cs': 'Flexibilní NMT dekódovací platforma pro rychlé prototypování nových modelů a strategií vyhledávání', 'fi': 'SGNMT - Joustava NMT-dekoodauspaikka uusien mallien ja hakustrategioiden nopeaan prototyyppiin', 'ca': 'SGNMT - Una plataforma flexible de codificació del NMT per a prototipar ràpid els nous models i estratègies de cerca', 'hy': 'Comment', 'et': 'SGNMT - paindlik NMT dekodeerimisplatvorm uute mudelite ja otsingustrateegiate kiireks prototüüpimiseks', 'jv': 'sGNMT - Aowah Floksible NMT Dekode Plashape kanggo quick Prototype nang model Baro lan Kebebasan Sitèri', 'sk': 'SGNMT - Prilagodljiva NMT dekodirna platforma za hitro prototipiranje novih modelov in strategij iskanja', 'he': 'SGNMT - Platform Flexible NMT Decoding for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'SGNMT - A Flexible NMT Decoding Platform for Quick Prototyping of New Models and Search Strategies'}
{'en': 'This paper introduces SGNMT, our experimental platform for machine translation research. SGNMT provides a generic interface to neural and symbolic scoring modules (predictors) with left-to-right semantic such as translation models like NMT, language models, translation lattices, n-best lists or other kinds of scores and constraints. Predictors can be combined with other predictors to form complex decoding tasks. SGNMT implements a number of search strategies for traversing the space spanned by the predictors which are appropriate for different predictor constellations. Adding new predictors or decoding strategies is particularly easy, making it a very efficient tool for prototyping new research ideas. SGNMT is actively being used by students in the MPhil program in Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology at the University of Cambridge for course work and these s, as well as for most of the research work in our group.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta SGNMT, nuestra plataforma experimental para la investigación de la traducción automática. SGNMT proporciona una interfaz genérica para módulos de puntuación neuronal y simbólica (predictores) con semántica de izquierda a derecha, como modelos de traducción como NMT, modelos de lenguaje, redes de traducción, listas de n-mejores u otros tipos de puntuaciones y restricciones. Los predictores se pueden combinar con otros predictores para formar tareas de decodificación complejas. SGNMT implementa una serie de estrategias de búsqueda para atravesar el espacio abarcado por los predictores que son apropiadas para diferentes constelaciones de predictores. Agregar nuevos predictores o estrategias de decodificación es particularmente fácil, lo que lo convierte en una herramienta muy eficaz para crear prototipos de nuevas ideas de investigación. Los estudiantes del programa MPhil en aprendizaje automático, tecnología del habla y el lenguaje de la Universidad de Cambridge utilizan activamente el SGNMT para trabajos de curso y tesis, así como para la mayoría de los trabajos de investigación de nuestro grupo.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta o SGNMT, nossa plataforma experimental para pesquisa em tradução automática. O SGNMT fornece uma interface genérica para módulos de pontuação neurais e simbólicos (preditores) com semântica da esquerda para a direita, como modelos de tradução como NMT, modelos de linguagem, treliças de tradução, listas n-melhores ou outros tipos de pontuações e restrições. Os preditores podem ser combinados com outros preditores para formar tarefas de decodificação complexas. O SGNMT implementa uma série de estratégias de busca para percorrer o espaço gerado pelos preditores que são apropriados para diferentes constelações de preditores. Adicionar novos preditores ou estratégias de decodificação é particularmente fácil, tornando-se uma ferramenta muito eficiente para prototipar novas ideias de pesquisa. O SGNMT está sendo usado ativamente por alunos do programa MPhil em Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology da Universidade de Cambridge para trabalhos de curso e teses, bem como para a maioria dos trabalhos de pesquisa em nosso grupo.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة التعريفية لمنصة SGNMT التجريبية لأبحاث الترجمة الآلية. توفر SGNMT واجهة عامة لوحدات التسجيل العصبية والرمزية (تنبؤات) مع دلالي من اليسار إلى اليمين مثل نماذج الترجمة مثل NMT أو نماذج اللغة أو مشابك الترجمة أو قوائم أفضل n أو أنواع أخرى من الدرجات والقيود. يمكن دمج المتنبئين مع المتنبئين الآخرين لتشكيل مهام فك تشفير معقدة. تنفذ SGNMT عددًا من استراتيجيات البحث لاجتياز المساحة الممتدة بواسطة المتنبئين والتي تتناسب مع الأبراج التنبؤية المختلفة. تعد إضافة تنبؤات جديدة أو استراتيجيات فك التشفير أمرًا سهلاً بشكل خاص ، مما يجعلها أداة فعالة للغاية لنماذج أولية لأفكار بحثية جديدة. يتم استخدام SGNMT بنشاط من قبل الطلاب في برنامج MPhil في التعلم الآلي والكلام وتكنولوجيا اللغة في جامعة كامبريدج للعمل الدراسي والأطروحات ، وكذلك لمعظم الأعمال البحثية في مجموعتنا.', 'fr': "Cet article présente SGNMT, notre plateforme expérimentale pour la recherche en traduction automatique. SGNMT fournit une interface générique aux modules de notation neuronale et symbolique (prédicteurs) avec une sémantique de gauche à droite tels que des modèles de traduction tels que NMT, des modèles de langage, des réseaux de traduction, des listes n-best ou d'autres types de scores et de contraintes. Les prédicteurs peuvent être combinés avec d'autres prédicteurs pour former des tâches de décodage complexes. SGNMT met en œuvre un certain nombre de stratégies de recherche pour parcourir l'espace parcouru par les prédicteurs qui sont appropriées pour différentes constellations de prédicteurs. L'ajout de nouveaux prédicteurs ou stratégies de décodage est particulièrement facile, ce qui en fait un outil très efficace pour prototyper de nouvelles idées de recherche. SGNMT est activement utilisé par les étudiants du programme MPhil en apprentissage automatique, technologie de la parole et du langage de l'Université de Cambridge pour les travaux de cours et les thèses, ainsi que pour la plupart des travaux de recherche de notre groupe.", 'zh': '本文引SGNMT,所以机器翻译治实验台也。 SGNMT为神经符评分模块(预测器)供一通口,有从左到右语义,如译模,如NMT,言模,译格,n-best列表及他分约束。 占变量可以合变量以成杂解码。 SGNMT 成搜索策,遍历用异预测器星变量所跨空间。 添新测因子或解码策特易,使为用原型设新理念之极效。 SGNMT方为剑桥大学机器所习,语音语言硕士课程之徒,极于作业论文,及吾小组之大较。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एसजीएनएमटी, मशीन अनुवाद अनुसंधान के लिए हमारे प्रयोगात्मक मंच का परिचय देता है। SGNMT तंत्रिका और प्रतीकात्मक स्कोरिंग मॉड्यूल (predictors) के लिए एक सामान्य इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करता है, जैसे कि बाएं-से-दाएं शब्दार्थ के साथ जैसे कि एनएमटी, भाषा मॉडल, अनुवाद जाली, एन-सर्वश्रेष्ठ सूचियां या अन्य प्रकार के स्कोर और बाधाएं। भविष्यवाणियों को जटिल डिकोडिंग कार्यों को बनाने के लिए अन्य भविष्यवाणियों के साथ जोड़ा जा सकता है। SGNMT भविष्यवाणियों द्वारा फैलाए गए स्थान को पार करने के लिए कई खोज रणनीतियों को लागू करता है जो विभिन्न भविष्यवक्ता नक्षत्रों के लिए उपयुक्त हैं। नए भविष्यवाणियों या डिकोडिंग रणनीतियों को जोड़ना विशेष रूप से आसान है, जिससे यह नए शोध विचारों को प्रोटोटाइप करने के लिए एक बहुत ही कुशल उपकरण बन जाता है। SGNMT सक्रिय रूप से पाठ्यक्रम के काम और थीसिस के लिए कैम्ब्रिज विश्वविद्यालय में मशीन लर्निंग, भाषण और भाषा प्रौद्योगिकी में एमफिल कार्यक्रम में छात्रों द्वारा उपयोग किया जा रहा है, साथ ही साथ हमारे समूह में अधिकांश शोध कार्यों के लिए भी।', 'ja': '本稿では、機械翻訳研究の実験的プラットフォームであるSGNMTについて紹介します。SGNMTは、NMTのような翻訳モデル、言語モデル、翻訳格子、nベストリスト、または他の種類のスコアおよび制約などの左から右へのセマンティックを備えたニューラルおよびシンボリックスコアリングモジュール（予測因子）への一般的なインターフェースを提供する。予測因子は、他の予測因子と組み合わせて、複雑な復号化タスクを形成することができる。ＳＧＮＭＴは、異なる予測子星座に適した、予測子によって広がる空間を横断するためのいくつかの探索戦略を実装する。新しい予測因子の追加や戦略のデコードは特に簡単で、新しい研究アイデアをプロトタイプ化するための非常に効率的なツールになります。SGNMTは、ケンブリッジ大学の機械学習、音声、言語テクノロジーのMPhilプログラムの学生によって、コースワークと論文、そしてグループのほとんどの研究ワークに積極的に使用されています。', 'ru': 'Эта бумага вводит SGNMT, нашу экспериментальную платформу для исследования машинного перевода. SGNMT предоставляет общий интерфейс для нейронных и символических скоринговых модулей (предикторов) с семантикой слева направо, таких как модели перевода, такие как NMT, языковые модели, решетки перевода, n-лучшие списки или другие виды оценок и ограничений. Прогностические факторы могут быть объединены с другими предикторами для формирования сложных задач декодирования. SGNMT реализует ряд стратегий поиска для пересечения пространства, охватываемого предикторами, которые подходят для различных созвездий предикторов. Добавление новых предикторов или стратегий декодирования особенно просто, что делает его очень эффективным инструментом для прототипирования новых исследовательских идей. SGNMT активно используется студентами в программе MPhil в машинном обучении, речи и языковых технологиях в Кембриджском университете для курсовой работы и тезисов, а также для большей части исследовательской работы в нашей группе.', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo isteach SGNMT, ár n-ardán turgnamhach le haghaidh taighde meaisín-aistriúcháin. Soláthraíonn SGNMT comhéadan cineálach do mhodúil scórála néaracha agus siombalacha (réamhmheastacháin) le séimeantach ó chlé go deas ar nós samhlacha aistriúcháin mar NMT, samhlacha teanga, laitíse aistriúcháin, n-liostaí is fearr nó cineálacha eile scóir agus srianta. Is féidir réamh-mheastacháin a chomhcheangal le tuaróirí eile chun tascanna casta díchódaithe a dhéanamh. Cuireann SGNMT roinnt straitéisí cuardaigh i bhfeidhm chun an spás a thrasnaíonn na réamhaisnéiseoirí a thrasnú atá feiliúnach do réaltbhuíonta éagsúla. Tá sé thar a bheith éasca réamhaisnéiseoirí nó straitéisí díchódaithe nua a chur leis, rud a fhágann gur uirlis an-éifeachtach é chun smaointe taighde nua a fhréamhshamhail. Tá SGNMT á úsáid go gníomhach ag mic léinn sa chlár MPhil i bhFoghlaim Meaisín, Teicneolaíocht Urlabhra agus Teanga in Ollscoil Cambridge le haghaidh obair chúrsa agus tráchtais, chomh maith le haghaidh fhormhór na hoibre taighde inár ngrúpa.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური პლატატური მაქსინის გაგრძელებისთვის SGNMT-ს გამოყენება. Name ოპვეთევკრჲპთრვ მჲზარ ეა ჟვ კჲმბთნთპარ ჟჲ ეპსდთ ოპვეგთევკრჲპთ ჱა კჲმპლთკჟთრვ ევკჲეთპაŒა. Name ახალი პროცექტორის დამატება ან სტრაქტიკური სტრატიგიების დამატება განსაკუთრებით ადვილია, რომელიც ეს ძალიან ეფექტიკური ხელსაწყო ახალი სწავლობა SGNMT აქტიგურად გამოყენება სტუდენტებით MPhil პროგრამის მაქსინის სწავლების, საუბრის და ენათის ტექნოლოგიაში კომბრიჯის университетში კონფიგურაციის სამუშაოდ სამუშაოდ და სამუშა', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την πειραματική πλατφόρμα μας για έρευνα μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Το παρέχει μια γενική διεπαφή σε νευρωνικές και συμβολικές ενότητες βαθμολόγησης (προγνωστές) με σημασιολογία από αριστερά προς δεξιά, όπως μοντέλα μετάφρασης, γλωσσικά μοντέλα, μεταφραστικά δίκτυα, λίστες καλύτερων σημείων ή άλλα είδη βαθμολογιών και περιορισμών. Οι προβλέψεις μπορούν να συνδυαστούν με άλλους προγνωστές για να σχηματίσουν σύνθετες εργασίες αποκωδικοποίησης. Το εφαρμόζει μια σειρά στρατηγικών αναζήτησης για να διασχίσει το χώρο που εκτείνεται από τους προγνωστές που είναι κατάλληλες για διαφορετικούς αστερισμούς προγνωστών. Η προσθήκη νέων προβλέψεων ή στρατηγικών αποκωδικοποίησης είναι ιδιαίτερα εύκολη, καθιστώντας το ένα πολύ αποτελεσματικό εργαλείο για τη δημιουργία πρωτοτύπων νέων ερευνητικών ιδεών. Το χρησιμοποιείται ενεργά από τους φοιτητές του προγράμματος στη μηχανική μάθηση, την τεχνολογία ομιλίας και γλώσσας στο Πανεπιστήμιο του Κέιμπριτζ για εργασίες μαθημάτων και διατριβές, καθώς και για το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της ερευνητικής εργασίας στην ομάδα μας.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a gépi fordítási kutatások kísérleti platformját, az SGNMT-t. Az SGNMT általános interfészt biztosít az idegi és szimbolikus pontozási modulokhoz (prediktorok) balról jobbra szemantikával, mint például fordítási modellek, nyelvi modellek, fordítási rácsok, n-best listák vagy más típusú pontszámok és korlátozások. Az előrejelzők kombinálhatók más előrejelzőkkel, hogy komplex dekódolási feladatokat alakítsanak ki. Az SGNMT számos keresési stratégiát hajt végre a prediktorok által átfogó téren, amelyek megfelelnek a különböző prediktorcsillagképekhez. Új előrejelzők vagy dekódolási stratégiák hozzáadása különösen egyszerű, így nagyon hatékony eszköz az új kutatási ötletek prototípusának. Az SGNMT-et a Cambridge-i Egyetem Gépi Tanulás, Beszéd és Nyelvtechnológia MPhil programjának hallgatói aktívan használják tanfolyami munkákhoz és szakdolgozatokhoz, valamint csoportunk kutatási munkájának többségéhez.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta SGNMT, la nostra piattaforma sperimentale per la ricerca sulla traduzione automatica. SGNMT fornisce un'interfaccia generica a moduli di punteggio neurali e simbolici (predittori) con semantica da sinistra a destra come modelli di traduzione come NMT, modelli linguistici, reticoli di traduzione, n-best list o altri tipi di punteggi e vincoli. I predittori possono essere combinati con altri predittori per formare attività di decodifica complesse. SGNMT implementa una serie di strategie di ricerca per attraversare lo spazio attraversato dai predittori che sono appropriate per diverse costellazioni predittori. L'aggiunta di nuovi predittori o strategie di decodifica è particolarmente facile, rendendolo uno strumento molto efficiente per la prototipazione di nuove idee di ricerca. SGNMT viene utilizzato attivamente dagli studenti del programma MPhil in Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology presso l'Università di Cambridge per lavori di corso e tesi, nonché per la maggior parte del lavoro di ricerca nel nostro gruppo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз машинаны аудару зерттеулердің эксперименталдық платформасын SGNMT деп таңдайды. SGNMT ньюралды және символдық скоринг модульдеріне (прогнозерлер) сол жақтан оң жақтан семантикалық интерфейсін береді, мысалы NMT, тіл моделдері, аудармалар латициялары, n- ең жақсы тізімдер немесе басқа түрлі нәрселер мен шектеулер Басқа тапсырмаларды комплексті декодтау тапсырмаларды құру үшін басқа тапсырмалардың біріктіруге болады. SGNMT бірнеше прогнозер жұлдыздықтары үшін қолданылатын орын ауыстыру стратегиясын бірнеше іздеу стратегиясын іске асырады. Жаңа предсказушыларды немесе декодтау стратегияларын қосу әсіресе оңай, жаңа зерттеу идеяларын прототиптеу үшін бұл құрал болады. SGNMT Кембридж университетіндегі Машин оқыту, сөйлеу және тіл технологиясының MPhil бағдарламасындағы студенттер қолданылады, сондай-ақ біздің тобыбыздың зерттеулердің көпшілігі қолданылады.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го претставува СГНМТ, нашата експериментална платформа за машинско преводно истражување. SGNMT обезбедува генерален интерфејс за неурални и симболични модули на оценка (предвидувачи) со семантични резултати од лево до десно, како што се преведувачките модели како НМТ, јазичките модели, преведувачките лактики, n-најдобрите листи или други видови на оценки и ограничува Предвидувачите можат да се комбинираат со други предвидувачи за да формираат комплексни декодирачки задачи. SGNMT implements a number of search strategies for traversing the space spanned by the predictors which are appropriate for different predictor constellations.  Додавањето нови предвидувачи или стратегии за декодирање е особено лесно, што ја прави многу ефикасна алатка за прототип на нови истражувачки идеи. СГНМТ активно се користи од студентите во програмата МФил за машинско учење, говор и јазична технологија на Универзитетот Кембриџ за курсна работа и тези, како и за повеќето истражувачки работи во нашата група.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan SGNMT, platform percubaan kami untuk kajian terjemahan mesin. SGNMT menyediakan antaramuka generik untuk modul skor saraf dan simbolik (prediksor) dengan semantik kiri-ke-kanan seperti model terjemahan seperti NMT, model bahasa, lattik terjemahan, senarai n-terbaik atau jenis lain skor dan keterangan. Prediktor boleh digabung dengan prediktor lain untuk membentuk tugas penyahkodan kompleks. SGNMT melaksanakan sejumlah strategi gelintar untuk menyeberangi ruang yang dijangka oleh prediktor yang sesuai untuk bintang prediktor yang berbeza. Adding new predictors or decoding strategies is particularly easy, making it a very efficient tool for prototyping new research ideas.  SGNMT secara aktif digunakan oleh pelajar dalam program MPhil dalam Pembelajaran Mesin, Perkataan dan Teknologi Bahasa di Universiti Cambridge untuk kerja kursus dan tesis, serta untuk kebanyakan kerja kajian dalam kumpulan kami.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d എസ്ജിന്\u200dഎംടി പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോം മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്ക എസ്ജിന്\u200dഎംടി, ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d, പരിഭാഷ ലാറ്ററിസ്റ്റിക്സ്, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മികച്ച സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മറ്റു തരം സ്കോര്\u200dസുകളും നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങളും ഉള്ള പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഡികോഡിങ്ങ് ജോലികള്\u200d രൂപിക്കാന്\u200d വേറെ പ്രവചിക്കുന്നവരോടൊപ്പം സജ്ജീകരിക്കാന്\u200d  എസ്ജിന്\u200dഎംടി വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന നക്ഷത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന പ്രതീക്ഷകര്\u200d സ്പെയിന്\u200dറ് ചെയ്ത സ്പേന പുതിയ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന strategies കൂട്ടുന്നതോ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് എളുപ്പമാണ്, പുതി SGNMT is actively being used by students in the MPhil program in Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology at the University of Cambridge for course work and theses, as well as for most of the research work in our group.', 'no': 'Denne papiret introduserer SGNMT, vår eksperimentell plattform for forskning av maskineomsetjingar. SGNMT gjev eit generelt grensesnitt til neirale og symbolske skoringsmodular (predikatorar) med venstre til høgre semantisk som omsetjingsmodular som NMT, språk- modeller, omsetjingsmodular, n- beste lister eller andre typar poeng og begrensningar. Forhåndsvisingar kan kombinererast med andre forhåndsvisingar for å laga komplekse dekoderingsoppgåver. SGNMT implementerer fleire søkestrategi for å overføra mellomrommet som er avslutta av foregåver som er passande for ulike foregåver- stjernebildar. Legg til nye foregåver eller dekoderingsstrategiar er særleg lett, og gjer det ein veldig effektivt verktøy for prototyping av nye forskningsidear. SGNMT blir aktivt brukt av studentene i MPhil-programmet i maskinelæring, språk og språk-teknologi i Universiteten Cambridge for sjølvsagt arbeid og tema, og for dei fleste forskningsarbeida i gruppa vårt.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jintroduċi SGNMT, il-pjattaforma sperimentali tagħna għar-riċerka dwar it-traduzzjoni tal-magni. SGNMT jipprovdi interfaċċja ġenerika għal moduli ta’ punteġġi newrali u simboliċi (predikaturi) b’semantika mix-xellug għal-lemin bħal mudelli ta’ traduzzjoni bħall-NMT, mudelli lingwistiċi, lattiċi ta’ traduzzjoni, listi n-a ħjar jew tipi oħra ta’ punteġġi u restrizzjonijiet. It-tbassir jista’ jiġi kkombinat ma’ tbassir ieħor biex jifforma kompiti kumplessi ta’ dekodifikazzjoni. SGNMT jimplimenta għadd ta’ strateġiji ta’ tiftix biex jgħaddu mill-ispazju mifrux mill-prevedituri li huma xierqa għal kostellazzjonijiet ta’ prevedituri differenti. Iż-żieda ta’ prevedituri ġodda jew strateġiji ta’ dekodifikazzjoni hija partikolarment faċli, u tagħmilha għodda effiċjenti ħafna għall-prototip ta’ ideat ġodda ta’ riċerka. SGNMT qed jintuża b’mod attiv minn studenti fil-programm MPhil fit-Tagħlim tal-Magni, Speech u Teknoloġija tal-Lingwi fl-Università ta’ Cambridge għal xogħol ta’ kors u tesi, kif ukoll għall-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol ta’ riċerka fil-grupp tagħna.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас машины орчуулалтын судалгааны туршилтын платформ SGNMT-г танилцуулдаг. SGNMT нь мэдрэлийн болон символын скорингийн модульд (таамаглаачид) зүүн-баруун semantic болон хөрөнгө оруулах загваруудыг NMT, хэл загварууд, хөрөнгө оруулах латис, n-сайн жагсаалт эсвэл бусад төрлийн тоо болон хязгаарлалт гэх мэт нийтлэг Таамаглаачид өөр таамаглаачид комплекс хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг бүтээх боломжтой. SGNMT олон олон хайх стратегийг дамжуулдаг. Таамаглаачид олон төрлийн таамаглаачид дамжуулан орон зайг шилжүүлэх боломжтой. Шинэ таамаглагчид, эсвэл шинэ шинэ шинэ судалгааны санаануудыг прототайп бичэх нь маш амархан юм. SGNMT нь Кембриджийн Их Сургуулийн Машин Сургууль, яриа, хэл Технологийн MPhil програмын оюутнуудын ажлын тулд ажиллах, тези болон багийн ихэнх судалгааны ажлын тулд ашигладаг.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatoma SGNMT, mūsų eksperimentinė mašinų vertimo mokslinių tyrimų platforma. SGNMT suteikia bendrą sąsają su nerviniais ir simboliniais vertinimo moduliais (prognozatoriais), turinčiais kairiąją į dešinę semantinę reikšmę, pavyzdžiui, vertimo modeliais, kalbiniais modeliais, vertimo laipsniais, n-geriausiais sąrašais arba kitų rūšių rezultatais ir apribojimais. Prognozuotojai gali būti derinami su kitais prognozuotojais, kad būtų sudarytos sudėtingos dekodinimo užduotys. SGNMT įgyvendina keletą paieškos strategijų, skirtų peržengti prognozuotojų skirtą erdvę, tinkamą skirtingoms prognozuotosioms žvaigždėms. Ypač lengva įtraukti naujus prognozuotojus ar dekodizavimo strategijas, todėl tai yra labai veiksminga priemonė naujų mokslinių tyrimų idėjų prototipai kurti. SGNMT aktyviai naudojasi Kambridžio universiteto MPhil programoje „Mokymasis mašinomis, kalba ir kalbos technologija“ dalyvaujantys studentai kursų darbui ir tesėms, taip pat daugeliui mūsų grupės mokslinių tyrimų darbų.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja SGNMT, našu eksperimentalnu platformu za istraživanje prevoda mašine. SGNMT pruža generičnu interfejsu neurološkim i simboličkim modulima (predviđateljima) sa lijevom do desnom semantikom poput prevođenja modela poput NMT, jezičkih modela, prevođenja lattice, n-najboljih listova ili drugih vrsta rezultata i ograničenja. Prediktori mogu biti kombinirani sa drugim predvidatorima da bi stvorili kompleksni zadatak za dekodiranje. SGNMT implementira broj strategija pretraživanja za prebacivanje svemira koje su spajane predviđateljima koji su prikladni za različite predviđateljske zvijezde. Dodanje novih predviđa ča ili dekodiranja strategija je posebno lako, čineći to veoma efikasnim alatom za prototipiranje novih istraživačkih ideja. SGNMT se aktivno koristi studenti u MPhil programu za učenje mašine, govore i jezičke tehnologije na Univerzitetu Kembridža za kurs i teze, kao i za većinu istraživanja u našoj grupi.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa SGNMT, jardiinada jirrabka ah ee loo baaraandegayo waxbarashada baaritaanka maskinada. SGNMT wuxuu u fidiyaa noocyada kooriga iyo sawirada sawirada ah (predictors) oo ku yaala midig-ilaa-midig semantic, tusaale ahaan noocyada turjumaadda sida NMT, modellada afka, lattixiyada turjumaanka, qoraalka noocyada ugu wanaagsan ama noocyo kale oo kooxaha iyo xadhiidka ah. Heeganka waxaa la isku dari karaa wax kale oo la soo sheegay, si ay u sameeyaan shaqooyin adag oo codsiga. SGNMT wuxuu sameeyaa qalabka raadinta oo lagu wareejiyo sawirada boosaska lagu qoray, kuwaas oo u eg xiddigaha kala duduwan oo ku haboon. Qofka la sii daro wax soo sheegayaasha cusub ama qalabka kooban waa u fudud, waxayna ka dhigtaa qalabka aad u faa’iido leh oo sameynta fikrada waxbarashada cusub. SGNMT waxaa si firfircoon loogu isticmaalaa ardayda ku qoran barnaamijka MPhilka ee Machinadda Barshadda, Hadalka iyo Teknolojiga luuqada ee jaamacadda Cambridge, kaas oo loo isticmaalaa shaqo iyo tiyaamiinta koorasyada iyo shaqada waxbarashada badidooda ee kooxdayada.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ SGDMT, අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dලේටෆ්ටෝම් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන්. SGnMT ප්\u200dරවේශයක් න්\u200dයූරාල් සහ සංකේතික ස්කෝරින් මොඩ්යුල්ලට (ප්\u200dරවේශකය) ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා වමුන් වමුන් වාර්ථාපනය මොඩ්ලුල් වගේ NMT, භාෂා මොඩ්ලුල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනිත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් අනිත් ප්\u200dරශ SGDMT පරීක්ෂණය සංවේදනය කරනවා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශකය ස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සංවේදනය කරනවා. අළුත් විශ්වාස කරුණාකරුවන් නැත්නම් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන්ම ලේසියි, ඒක අළුත් විශ්වාස අදහස්  SGnMT සක්\u200dරිය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණයේ MPhil විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණයේ කැම්බ්\u200dරිජ් විශ්වාසේ ඉගෙන, කතා කරන්න සහ භාෂාව්\u200dය තාක්ෂණයේ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණයේ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar SGNMT, vår experimentella plattform för maskinöversättning forskning. SGNMT tillhandahåller ett generiskt gränssnitt till neurala och symboliska poängsättningsmoduler (prediktorer) med semantik från vänster till höger såsom översättningsmodeller som NMT, språkmodeller, översättningsgatter, n-bästa listor eller andra typer av poäng och begränsningar. Prediktorer kan kombineras med andra prediktorer för att bilda komplexa avkodningsuppgifter. SGNMT implementerar ett antal sökstrategier för att korsa det utrymme som spänns över av prediktorerna som är lämpliga för olika prediktorkonstellationer. Att lägga till nya prediktorer eller avkodningsstrategier är särskilt enkelt, vilket gör det till ett mycket effektivt verktyg för att prototypa nya forskningsidéer. SGNMT används aktivt av studenter i MPhil-programmet i maskininlärning, tal och språkteknik vid University of Cambridge för kursarbete och avhandlingar, samt för större delen av forskningsarbetet i vår grupp.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă SGNMT, platforma noastră experimentală pentru cercetarea traducerii automate. SGNMT oferă o interfață generică pentru modulele de scoring neurale și simbolice (predictori) cu semantică de la stânga la dreapta, cum ar fi modele de traducere cum ar fi NMT, modele lingvistice, rețele de traducere, n-best lists sau alte tipuri de scoruri și constrângeri. Predictorii pot fi combinați cu alți predictori pentru a forma sarcini complexe de decodare. SGNMT implementează o serie de strategii de căutare pentru traversarea spațiului acoperit de predictori, care sunt adecvate pentru diferite constelații predictoare. Adăugarea de noi predictori sau strategii de decodare este deosebit de ușoară, făcându-l un instrument foarte eficient pentru prototiparea de noi idei de cercetare. SGNMT este utilizat în mod activ de către studenții programului MPhil în Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology de la Universitatea din Cambridge pentru lucrări de curs și teze, precum și pentru majoritatea activităților de cercetare din grupul nostru.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono SGNMT, naszą eksperymentalną platformę do badań nad tłumaczeniem maszynowym. SGNMT zapewnia ogólny interfejs do neuronowych i symbolicznych modułów oceny (predyktorów) z semantyką od lewej do prawej, takich jak modele tłumaczeń, takie jak NMT, modele językowe, siatki tłumaczeniowe, n-best listy lub inne rodzaje wyników i ograniczeń. Predyktory mogą być łączone z innymi predyktorami, aby tworzyć złożone zadania dekodowania. SGNMT wdraża szereg strategii wyszukiwania dla przemierzania przestrzeni rozciąganej przez predyktory, które są odpowiednie dla różnych konstelacji predyktorów. Dodawanie nowych predyktorów lub strategii dekodowania jest szczególnie łatwe, co czyni go bardzo skutecznym narzędziem do prototypowania nowych pomysłów badawczych. SGNMT jest aktywnie wykorzystywany przez studentów programu MPhil w zakresie uczenia się maszynowego, mowy i technologii językowej na Uniwersytecie Cambridge do prac kursowych i prac pracowniczych, a także do większości prac badawczych w naszej grupie.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ SGNMT کو معلوم کرتا ہے، ماشین ترجمہ تحقیقات کے لئے ہماری آزمائش پلٹورم۔ SGNMT نے بائیں سے دائیں سمانٹی کے ساتھ نیورل اور سیمبلیک اسکورینگ موڈلولوں (پیش بینی کرنے والے) کے لئے ایک عمومی انٹرنیٹ پیدا کیا ہے جیسے NMT کی ترجمہ موڈلوں، زبان موڈلوں، ترجمہ لاتیس، n-بہترین لکھ یا دوسری طرح سے اسکور اور محدودیت. پیش بینی کرنے والوں کو دوسرے پیش بینی کرنے والوں کے ساتھ پیدا کر سکتا ہے کہ پیچیدہ ڈیکڈ ٹاکس بنائیں۔ SGNMT نے مختلف پیش بینی ستاروں کے لئے بہت سی تلاش استراتژی کی تعداد کے مطابق پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے جگہ پھیلائی ہے. نئی پیش بینی کرنے والے یا ڈیکوڈ استراتژی زیادہ آسان ہے، اس کو نئی تحقیق ایڈیوں کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے بہت اثبات کرنے کے لئے بہت اثبات کا ابزار بنانے کے لئے۔ SGNMT کو کامبرج کے университет میں ماشین سکونت، سخنچی اور زبان تکنولوژی کے مطابق مفیل پروگرام میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، اور ہمارے گروپ میں اکثر تحقیقات کے کام کے لئے بھی استعمال کیا جاتا ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் எஸ்ஜிஎன்எம்டி, எம்பியை கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கான பரிசோதனையான தளபுள்ளி SGNMT பொதுவான முகப்பு வழங்குகிறது புதிய மற்றும் குறியீட்டு மதிப்பு கூறுகளுக்கு (முன்காட்சிகள்) இடப்புறத்திலிருந்து வலப்புறத்திலிருந்து பாதிப்பான மாதிரிகள சிக்கலான குறியீட்டு பணிகளை உருவாக்க முன்னுரிமைகளுடன் மற்ற முன்காணிப்பவர்களுடன் ஒன்றிணைக்கலாம். SGNMT விண்மீன் இடைவெளியை மாற்றுவதற்கு பல தேடும் தேடும் விண்மீன்களை செயல்படுத்துகிறது. வேறு விண்மீன் நட்சத்திரக்கூட் புதிய எதிர்பார்ப்பவர்களை சேர்த்து அல்லது குறியீட்டு திட்டங்களை கூட்டுவது மிகவும் எளிதாகும், புதிய ஆய்வு கருத்துகளை  எஸ்ஜின்எம்டி செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது எம்பில் நிரலில் மாணவர்கள் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறார்கள் கேம்பிரிஜ் கல்வி கல்வி மற்றும் மொழி தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் மாண', 'uz': 'This paper introduces SGNMT, our experimental platform for machine translation research.  Name Name Name Yangi diqqatlarni qoʻshish amalni kodlash strategiyasi juda oddiy, yangi taʼminlovchi fikrlarni boshqarish uchun juda muhim asbob qiladi. Name', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu SGNMT, tổ chức thí nghiệm dịch thuật máy của chúng ta. SGNMT cung cấp một giao diện chung cho mô- đun điểm biểu tượng và thần kinh biểu tượng (dự đoán) với ngữ pháp trái-phải như các mô hình dịch như NMT, các mô hình ngôn ngữ, các cơ quan dịch, n-best lists hay các loại ghi điểm và giới hạn khác. Sự tiên đoán có thể kết hợp với dự đoán khác để tạo các nhiệm vụ giải mã phức tạp. SGNMT thực hiện một số phương pháp tìm kiếm để vượt qua khoảng trống được mở bởi người dự đoán, thích hợp cho các chòm sao dự đoán khác nhau. Thêm dự đoán mới hoặc chiến lược giải mã đặc biệt dễ dàng, biến nó thành một công cụ rất hiệu quả cho việc chế tạo các ý tưởng nghiên cứu mới. Các học viên SGNMT đang tích cực được sử dụng trong chương trình MPl ở Machine Learning, Ngôn ngữ và Ngôn ngữ Technology ở Đại học Cambridge để làm khóa học và luận, cũng như phần lớn các nghiên cứu trong nhóm chúng ta.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя нашата експериментална платформа за изследване на машинния превод. SGNMT осигурява генеричен интерфейс към невронни и символични модули за оценяване (предсказатели) с семантични отляво-надясно, като например модели на превод като НМТ, езикови модели, преводни решетки, списъци с най-добри резултати или други видове оценки и ограничения. Предсказателите могат да бъдат комбинирани с други предсказатели за формиране на сложни задачи за декодиране. SGNMT прилага редица стратегии за търсене за преминаване през пространството, обхванато от предсказателите, които са подходящи за различни предсказателни съзвездия. Добавянето на нови предсказатели или декодиращи стратегии е особено лесно, което го прави много ефективен инструмент за прототипиране на нови изследователски идеи. Активно се използва от студенти в програмата по машинно обучение, говорови и езикови технологии в Университета на Кеймбридж за курсова работа и дисертации, както и за по-голямата част от научноизследователската работа в нашата група.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja SGNMT, našu eksperimentalnu platformu za istraživanje prevoda strojeva. SGNMT pruža generičnu interfejsu neurološkim i simboličkim modulima (predviđateljima) s lijevom do desnom semantikom poput modela prevođenja poput NMT, jezičkih modela, prevođenja lattice, n-najboljih listova ili drugih vrsta rezultata i ograničenja. Prediktori mogu biti kombinirani s drugim predvidjetnicima kako bi stvorili kompleksni zadatak za dekodiranje. SGNMT provodi brojne strategije pretraživanja prostora koje se šire predvidjetnici koji su prikladni za različite predvidjetnike zvijezde. Dodanje novih predviđa ča ili dekodiranja strategija je posebno lako, čineći to vrlo efikasnim alatom za prototipiranje novih istraživačkih ideja. SGNMT se aktivno koristi studenti u programu MPhil-a u tehnologiji učenja strojeva, govora i jezika na Univerzitetu Cambridge na kursnom radu i tezama, kao i za većinu istraživačkog rada u našoj skupini.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel introduceert SGNMT, ons experimentele platform voor machinevertaalonderzoek. SGNMT biedt een generieke interface voor neurale en symbolische scoremodules (voorspellers) met links-naar-rechts semantiek zoals vertaalmodellen zoals NMT, taalmodellen, vertaalroosters, n-best lijsten of andere soorten scores en beperkingen. Predictors kunnen worden gecombineerd met andere voorspellers om complexe decoderingstaken te vormen. SGNMT implementeert een aantal zoekstrategieën voor het doorkruisen van de ruimte die wordt overspannen door de voorspellers die geschikt zijn voor verschillende voorspellende constellaties. Het toevoegen van nieuwe voorspellers of decoderingsstrategieën is bijzonder eenvoudig, waardoor het een zeer efficiënt hulpmiddel is voor het prototypen van nieuwe onderzoeksideeën. SGNMT wordt actief gebruikt door studenten in het MPhil programma in Machine Learning, Spraak en Taaltechnologie aan de Universiteit van Cambridge voor cursuswerk en scripties, evenals voor het grootste deel van het onderzoekswerk in onze groep.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt SGNMT vor, unsere experimentelle Plattform für maschinelle Übersetzungsforschung. SGNMT bietet eine generische Schnittstelle zu neuronalen und symbolischen Scoring-Modulen (Prädiktoren) mit Links-nach-Rechts-Semantik wie Übersetzungsmodellen wie NMT, Sprachmodellen, Übersetzungsgittern, n-Best-Listen oder anderen Arten von Scores und Einschränkungen. Predictoren können mit anderen Prädiktoren kombiniert werden, um komplexe Dekodierungsaufgaben zu bilden. SGNMT implementiert eine Reihe von Suchstrategien zur Durchquerung des von den Prädiktoren überspannten Raumes, die für verschiedene Prädiktorkonstellationen geeignet sind. Das Hinzufügen neuer Prädiktoren oder Dekodierungsstrategien ist besonders einfach und macht es zu einem sehr effizienten Werkzeug für das Prototyping neuer Forschungsideen. SGNMT wird aktiv von Studenten des MPhil-Programms in Machine Learning, Sprach- und Sprachtechnologie der Universität Cambridge für Kursarbeiten und Abschlussarbeiten sowie für die meisten Forschungsarbeiten in unserer Gruppe genutzt.', 'da': 'Denne artikel introducerer SGNMT, vores eksperimentelle platform for maskinoversættelsesforskning. SGNMT giver en generisk grænseflade til neurale og symbolske scoring moduler (predictors) med venstre mod højre semantik såsom oversættelsesmodeller som NMT, sprogmodeller, oversættelsesgatter, n-bedste lister eller andre former for score og begrænsninger. Forudsigere kan kombineres med andre forudsigere for at danne komplekse afkodningsopgaver. SGNMT implementerer en række søgestrategier til at krydse det rum, som forudsigerne spænder over, og som er passende for forskellige forudsigelseskonstellationer. Det er særligt nemt at tilføje nye forudsigere eller afkodningsstrategier, hvilket gør det til et meget effektivt værktøj til prototype af nye forskningsideer. SGNMT bliver aktivt brugt af studerende i MPhil-programmet i maskinlæring, tale og sprogteknologi på University of Cambridge til kursusarbejde og afhandlinger, samt til det meste af forskningsarbejdet i vores gruppe.', 'ko': '본고는 우리의 기계 번역 연구 실험 플랫폼인 SGNMT를 소개한다.SGNMT는 왼쪽에서 오른쪽까지의 의미를 가진 신경과 기호 평점 모듈(예측기)에 NMT 등 번역 모델, 언어 모델, 번역 칸, n-best 목록 또는 다른 유형의 평점과 제약을 제공하는 유니버설 인터페이스를 제공한다.예측기는 복잡한 디코딩 작업을 형성하기 위해 다른 예측기와 조합할 수 있다.서로 다른 별자리에 대해 NMT는 서로 다른 예측치 검색 전략을 실현했다.새로운 예측기나 디코딩 전략을 추가하는 것은 특히 쉽기 때문에 이것은 매우 효과적인 도구가 되어 새로운 연구 방향을 원형화하는 데 사용된다.캠브리지 대학의 언어 연구 프로젝트에서 대다수 학생들은 적극적으로 기계 학습을 하고 있다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan SGNMT, platform percobaan kami untuk penelitian terjemahan mesin. SGNMT menyediakan antarmuka generik untuk modul skor saraf dan simbolik (prediksor) dengan semantis kiri-kanan seperti model terjemahan seperti NMT, model bahasa, lattics terjemahan, daftar n-terbaik atau jenis lain skor dan batas. Prediktor dapat digabungkan dengan prediktor lain untuk membentuk tugas dekodasi kompleks. SGNMT mengimplementasi sejumlah strategi pencarian untuk menyeberangi ruang yang ditempatkan oleh prediksor yang sesuai untuk konstelasi prediksor yang berbeda. Menambahkan prediksor baru atau strategi dekoding sangat mudah, membuatnya alat yang sangat efisien untuk prototip ide penelitian baru. SGNMT secara aktif digunakan oleh siswa dalam program MPhil dalam Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology di Universitas Cambridge untuk kerja kursus dan tesis, serta untuk kebanyakan pekerjaan penelitian dalam kelompok kami.', 'sw': 'paper hii inaonyesha SGNMT, jukwaa letu la majaribio kwa utafiti wa mashine. SGNMT anatoa sura ya kawaida kwa vifaa vya upande wa ubongo n a alama (watabiri) wenye semantic kutoka kushoto hadi kulia kama vile mifano ya tafsiri kama vile NMT, mifano ya lugha, tafsiri, orodha bora au aina nyingine ya vipimo vya vipimo vya kurasa na vikwazo. Wagombea wanaweza kuunganishwa na watabiri wengine ili kutengeneza kazi ngumu za kupunguza decodi. SGNMT anatumia mbinu kadhaa za kutafuta kwa ajili ya kutafuta anga zinazopangwa na watabiri ambao ni sahihi kwa ajili ya watabiri tofauti wa nyota. Kuongeza watabiri wapya au mipango ya kuboresha ni rahisi, na kufanya hivyo kuwa zana yenye ufanisi sana kwa ajili ya kuweka maoni mpya ya utafiti. SGNMT is actively being used by students in the MPhil program in Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology at the University of Cambridge for course work and theses, as well as for most of the research work in our group.', 'af': "Hierdie papier introduseer SGNMT, ons eksperimentale platforma vir masjien vertaling. Name Voorskouers kan gekombineer word met ander voorskouers om kompleks dekoding opdragte te vorm. Name Voeg by nuwe voorskouers of dekoding strategies is besonderlik maklik, maak dit 'n baie effektief nutsprogram vir prototipering nuwe ondersoek idees. SGNMT word aktief gebruik deur studente in die MPhil program in Masjien Leer, Spraak en Taal Teknologie by die Universiteit van Cambridge vir natuurlik werk en theses, en ook vir die meeste van die ondersoek werk in ons groep.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz maşyny terjime etmek üçin biziň deneysel platformymyzy SGNMT'y tanyşdyrýar. SGNMT neiral we simbolik gaýd etmek modüllerine sol-saga semantik bilen döwlet nusgasyny NMT ýaly terjime modelleri, dil modelleri, terjime latticesi, n-gowy sanlary we beýleki türler we çäreler bilen üýtgedýär Rakgatlar karmaşık taýýarlama işini düzenlemek üçin başga tahýjylar bilen birleştirilebilir. SGNMT çarpyşlar tarapyndan uzay terjime etmek üçin birnäçe gözleme strategiýany implement edýär Täze täze öngörümler ýa-da kodlemek stratejikleri oňa a ňsat däldir, şonuň üçin täze ylmy pikirleri prototik etmek üçin örän täsirli täze bir araç çykarýar. SGNMT Cambridge Uniwersitetimizde Maşynyň öwrenmesi, söz we dil teknolojisindeki MPhil programinde okuwçylar tarapynda işleýär. Ýöne biziň toparymyzyň köpüsi üçin hem işleýär.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ SGNMT را معرفی می کند، پلاکتر آزمایشی ما برای تحقیقات ترجمه ماشین. Name پیشنهاد\u200cکننده\u200cها می\u200cتوانند با پیش\u200cبینی\u200cکننده\u200cهای دیگر تغییر دهند تا وظیفه\u200cهای تغییر\u200cگیری پیچیده کنند. SGNMT تعدادی استراتژی جستجو برای تبدیل کردن فضا توسط پیش\u200cبینی\u200cها که برای ستاره\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای مختلف مناسب هستند را اجرا می\u200cکند. اضافه کردن پیش بینی\u200cکننده\u200cهای جدید یا استراتژی\u200cهای دیک\u200cکوندن بسیار آسان است، که آن را یک ابزار بسیار موثرتی برای پیش\u200cبینی ایده\u200cهای تحقیقات جدید انجام دهد. SGNMT فعال توسط دانش آموزان در برنامه MPhil در تکنولوژی یادگیری، سخنرانی و زبان در دانشگاه کمبریج برای کار و تزریق، و برای بیشتر کارهای تحقیق در گروه ما استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër prezanton SGNMT, platform ën tonë eksperimentale për kërkimin e përkthimit të makinave. SGNMT ofron një interfaqe gjenerike për modulet nervore dhe simbolike të pikërimit (parashikues) me semantikë të majtë n ë të djathtë të tilla si modelet e përkthimit si NMT, modelet gjuhësore, lattices përkthimi, listat n-më të mira apo llojet e tjera të pikërimeve dhe kufizimeve. Predictors can be combined with other predictors to form complex decoding tasks.  SGNMT zbaton një numër strategjish kërkimi për të kaluar hapësirën e shtrirë nga parashikuesit që janë të përshtatshme për konstelacione të ndryshme parashikuese. Adding new predictors or decoding strategies is particularly easy, making it a very efficient tool for prototyping new research ideas.  SGNMT po përdoret aktivisht nga studentët në program in MPhil në Mësimin e Makinës, Fjalën dhe Teknologjinë e Gjuhave në Universitetin e Kembrixhit për punën kursore dhe thesat si dhe për shumicën e punës kërkimore në grupin tonë.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ SGNMT፣ የሞክራዊ ፕላጦማችን የሜስክሪን ትርጓሜ ትርጓሜን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ SGNMT provides a generic interface to neural and symbolic scoring modules (predictors) with left-to-right semantic such as translation models like NMT, language models, translation lattices, n-best lists or other kinds of scores and constraints.  የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች SGNMT በተለያዩ የተንቀሳቃዩ ከዋክብት የተጠቃሚ የደረጃ መጠቀሚያ ለመግለጥ የተጠቃሚ የልዩ መረጃ strategy ያስተካክላል። አዲስ ትንቢተኞችን በመጨመር ወይም የድምፅ ቀለሞች ማጨመር በጣም ቀላል ነው፣ አዲስ ትምህርት አእምሮዎችን ለመዘርጋት በጣም ለጥያቄ ማቀናጃ ነው፡፡ SGNMT በካምቢድሪክ ዩንቨርስቲ ትምህርት፣ ንግግር እና ቋንቋ ቴክኖሎጂ ተማሪዎች የተጠቃቀሙ ተማሪዎች እና በብዙዎቹ በጭፍራችን ትምህርት ሥራ ይደረጋሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা এসজিনএমটিকে পরীক্ষা করে দেয়, মেশিন অনুবাদ গবেষণার জন্য আমাদের পরীক্ষা প্ল্যাটফর্ম। SGNMT নিউরেল এবং প্রতীক স্কোরিং মডিউল (ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী) এর জন্য একটি সাধারণ ইন্টারফেস দিয়েছে যার মধ্যে বাম থেকে ডান থেকে সেমেন্টিক, যেমন অনুবাদ মডেল, ভাষার মডেল, অনুবাদ কমপ্লেক্স ডিকোডিং কাজ গঠনের জন্য অন্যান্য ভবিষ্যদ্বাণীদের সাথে একত্রিত হতে পারে। এসজিনএমটি বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী তারামণ্ডলের জন্য বিভিন্ন প্রত্যাখ্যানের জন্য অনুসন্ধানের কৌশল প্রয়োজন। Adding new predictors or decoding strategies is particularly easy, making it a very efficient tool for prototyping new research ideas.  ক্যাম্ব্রিজ বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের শিক্ষা, ভাষা এবং ভাষা প্রযুক্তির শিক্ষার্থীরা এসজিএমটি সক্রিয় করে ব্যবহার করেছেন কার্যকলাপ এবং থিসের জন্য এবং আমাদের', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է ՍԳՆՄԹ-ը, մեքենային թարգմանման ուսումնասիրության մեր փորձարկման հարթակը: ՍԳՆՄԹ-ը ստեղծում է ընդհանուր ինտերֆեյս նյարդային և սիմվոլիկ գնահատման մոդուլների (կանխատեսողների) համար, որոնք ունեն ձախ-աջ սեմանտիկ, ինչպիսիք են NMT-ը, լեզվի մոդելները, թարգմանման լատիկները, n-լավագույն ցուցակները կամ այլ տեսակի գնահատ Նախատեսողները կարող են համադրվել այլ կանխատեսողների հետ, որպեսզի կառուցեն բարդ բաժանելու խնդիրներ: SGNMT implements a number of search strategies for traversing the space spanned by the predictors which are appropriate for different predictor constellations.  Նոր կանխատեսողների կամ կոդավորման ռազմավարությունների ավելացումը հատկապես հեշտ է, դարձնելով այն շատ արդյունավետ գործիք նոր հետազոտության գաղափարների նախատիպը: SGNMT is actively being used by students in the MPhil program in Machine Learning, Speech and Language Technology at the University of Cambridge for course work and theses, as well as for most of the research work in our group.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja SGNMT, našu eksperimentalnu platformu za istraživanje prevoda mašine. SGNMT pruža generičnu interfejsu neurološkim i simboličkim modulima (predviđateljima) sa lijevom do desnom semantikom poput modela prevođenja poput NMT, jezičkih modela, prevođenja lattice, n-najboljih listova ili drugih vrsta rezultata i ograničenja. Prediktori mogu biti kombinirani sa drugim predvidatorima kako bi stvorili kompleksni zadatak za dekodiranje. SGNMT provodi brojne strategije pretraživanja prostora koja se širi predvidjetelji koji su odgovarajući za različite predvidačke zvijezde. Dodanje novih predviđa ča ili dekodiranja strategija je posebno lako, čineći to vrlo efikasnim alatom za prototipiranje novih istraživačkih ideja. SGNMT se aktivno koristi studenti u MPhil programu za učenje mašine, govor i jezičke tehnologije na Univerzitetu Kembridž za kurs i teze, kao i za većinu istraživačkog rada u našoj grupi.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje SGNMT, naši experimentální platformu pro výzkum strojového překladu. SGNMT poskytuje obecné rozhraní pro neuronové a symbolické skórovací moduly (prediktory) se sémantikou zleva doprava, jako jsou překladové modely jako NMT, jazykové modely, překladové mřížky, n-best listy nebo jiné druhy skóre a omezení. Prediktory lze kombinovat s dalšími prediktory a vytvořit složité dekódovací úlohy. SGNMT implementuje řadu vyhledávacích strategií pro procházení prostoru rozpětého prediktory, které jsou vhodné pro různé konstelace prediktorů. Přidání nových prediktorů nebo dekódovacích strategií je obzvláště snadné, což z něj činí velmi efektivní nástroj pro prototypování nových výzkumných nápadů. SGNMT je aktivně využíván studenty MPhil programu strojového učení, řeči a jazykové technologie na University of Cambridge pro kurzovou práci a diplomové práce, stejně jako pro většinu výzkumné práce v naší skupině.', 'ca': "Aquest article introdueix SGNMT, la nostra plataforma experimental per a la recerca de traducció automàtica. SGNMT proporciona una interfície genèrica a móduls de puntuació neuronal i símbolica (preditors) amb semàntic d'esquerra a dreta, com models de traducció com NMT, models de llenguatge, lattiques de traducció, llistes n-millors o altres tipus de puntuacions i restriccions. Els predictors es poden combinar amb altres predictors per formar tasques complexes de decodificació. SGNMT implementa una sèrie d'estratègies de cerca per travessar l'espai ampliat pels preditors que són apropiats per diferents constelacions preditors. Adicionar nous preditors o estratègies de decodificació és particularment fàcil, fent-lo una eina molt eficient per a prototipar noves idees de recerca. SGNMT està activament utilitzat per estudiants del programa MPhil en aprenentatge màquinari, discurs i tecnologia de llenguatge a la Universitat de Cambridge per treballar cursos i tesis, com també per la majoria de la feina de recerca del nostre grup.", 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa esitellﾃ､ﾃ､n SGNMT, kokeellinen alustamme konekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶstutkimukselle. SGNMT tarjoaa yleisen kﾃ､yttﾃｶliittymﾃ､n neuro- ja symbolisille pisteytysmoduuleille (ennustajille), joilla on vasemmalta oikealle semantiikka, kuten kﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶsmalleille, kielimalleille, kﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶsratkaisuille, n-best listoille tai muunlaisille pistemﾃ､ﾃ､rille ja rajoituksille. Ennusteita voidaan yhdistﾃ､ﾃ､ muihin ennustajiin monimutkaisten dekoodatustehtﾃ､vien muodostamiseksi. SGNMT toteuttaa useita hakustrategioita, jotka soveltuvat erilaisille ennustajien konstellaatioille. Uusien ennusteiden tai dekoodatusstrategioiden lisﾃ､ﾃ､minen on erityisen helppoa, joten se on erittﾃ､in tehokas tyﾃｶkalu uusien tutkimusideoiden prototyyppiin. SGNMT:tﾃ､ kﾃ､yttﾃ､vﾃ､t aktiivisesti Cambridgen yliopiston koneoppimisen, puhe- ja kieliteknologian MPhil-ohjelman opiskelijat kurssityﾃｶhﾃｶn ja opinnﾃ､ytetyﾃｶihin sekﾃ､ suurimpaan osaan ryhmﾃ､mme tutkimustyﾃｶstﾃ､.', 'et': "Käesolev töö tutvustab SGNMT, meie eksperimentaalset platvormi masintõlke uurimiseks. SGNMT pakub üldist liidest neuro- ja sümboolsete skoorimismoodulitele (ennustajatele), millel on vasakult paremale semantika, näiteks tõlkemudelid nagu NMT, keelemudelid, tõlkevõrgud, n-best nimekirjad või muud tüüpi skoorid ja piirangud. Ennustajaid saab kombineerida teiste prognoosijatega, et moodustada keerulised dekodeerimisülesanded. SGNMT rakendab mitmeid otsingustrateegiaid, mis on sobivad erinevatele ennustajate tähtkujudele. Uute ennustajate või dekodeerimisstrateegiate lisamine on eriti lihtne, muutes selle väga tõhusaks vahendiks uute uurimisideede prototüüpimiseks. SGNMT kasutavad aktiivselt Cambridge'i Ülikooli masinõppe, kõne- ja keeltehnoloogia MPhil programmi õpilased kursuste ja lõputööde jaoks, samuti enamiku meie grupi uurimistöö jaoks.", 'az': "Bu kağıt maşın çeviri araştırması üçün eksperimenti SGNMT'i tanıyır. SGNMT, NMT kimi çevirim modelləri, dil modelləri, tercümə latticesi, n-ən yaxşı listelər və başqa n öqtələr və sıxıntılar kimi sol-sağ semantik modelləri ilə nöral və simbolik scoring modullərinə müəyyən edilir. Prediktörlər kompleks kodlama işləri yaratmaq üçün digər tədbirlərlə birləşdirilebilir. SGNMT müxtəlif predictor yıldızları üçün uyğun olan tədbirlərin uzağı keçirmək üçün bir neçə arama stratejilərini istifadə edir. Yeni tədbirləri və ya kodlama stratejilərini birləşdirmək çox asandır, yeni araşdırma fikirlərini prototyp etmək üçün çox faydalı bir vasitədir. SGNMT, Cambridge Universitetindəki Makin Öyrənməsi, Sözlük və Dil Teknolojisində MPhil proqramındakı öğrencilər tələb edir, həmçin in qrupumuzdakı araştırma işlərinin çoxu üçün istifadə edir.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את SGNMT, הפלטפורמה הניסיונית שלנו למחקר תרגום מכונות. SGNMT מספק ממשק גנרי למודולים נוירוניים וסימבוליים (צפיים) עם סמנטיקה שמאלה לימין, כמו דוגמניות תרגום כמו NMT, דוגמניות שפה, רשימות תרגום, רשימות n-הטובות ביותר או סוגים אחרים של נקודות ומגבלות. נצפים יכולים להיות משולבים עם נצפים אחרים כדי ליצור משימות פיתוח מורכבות. SGNMT מפעיל מספר אסטרטגיות חיפוש לעבור את המרחב שנמצא על ידי החזויים שמתאימים לכוכבים צפויים שונים. Adding new predictors or decoding strategies is particularly easy, making it a very efficient tool for prototyping new research ideas.  SGNMT משתמש באופן פעיל על ידי סטודנטים בתוכנית MPhil ללמוד מכונות, דיבור וטכנולוגיה לשפה באוניברסיטת קמברידג עבור עבודת קורס ותזכויות, כמו גם לרוב עבודת המחקר בקבוצה שלנו.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja SGNMT, našo eksperimentalno platformo za raziskave strojnega prevajanja. SGNMT zagotavlja generičen vmesnik za nevronske in simbolične module ocenjevanja (napovedovalce) s semantiko leve proti desni, kot so prevajalski modeli, kot so NMT, jezikovni modeli, prevajalske mreže, seznami n-best ali druge vrste rezultatov in omejitev. Napovedovalce je mogoče kombinirati z drugimi napovedovalci za oblikovanje kompleksnih dešifriranih nalog. SGNMT izvaja številne iskalne strategije za prečkanje prostora, ki ga obsegajo napovedovalci, ki so primerne za različne napovedovalne ozvezdje. Dodajanje novih napovedovalcev ali strategij dekodiranja je še posebej enostavno, zaradi česar je zelo učinkovito orodje za prototipiranje novih raziskovalnih idej. SGNMT aktivno uporabljajo študenti MPhil programa strojnega učenja, govorne in jezikovne tehnologije Univerze v Cambridgeu za predavanja in naloge ter večino raziskovalnega dela v naši skupini.', 'jv': 'Pesene iki nggawe kang sGNMT, awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan kanggo ranjut ujian sGNMT ngewehke nyimpen kelompok kanggo modol-Nyural lan simbol sing di nggambar (supoyantar) karo left-to-right semanti (supoyantar) ngangge sistem anyar terjamahan surat lagi NMT, model nggambar, terjamahan Layout Global bending Nambah kang perbudhakan anyar S GNMT iso ngulinakake sing mesthi enebang bantên ning program mphil kanggo Mahine Learning, Perancis lan Langan Teknôlogi ning Universite di Kembridèn dhéwé uga ngerjaké karo kalawarta ampuhé, lan akeh lanjut arep bantên kanggo ngilanggar nggo kelompok awakdhéwé.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་SGNMT སྟོན་པ་དེ་རེད། SGNMT provides a generic interface to neural and symbolic scoring modules (predictors) with left-to-right semantic such as translation models like NMT, language models, translation lattices, n-best lists or other kinds of scores and constraints. སྔོན་འཛུགས་པ་ཚོས་མཉམ་དུ་སྔོན་རྟགས་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏན་རྩིས་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས། SGNMT implements a number of search strategies for traversing the space spanned by the predictors which are appropriate for different predictor constellations. སྔོན་ཚོད་པ་དང་སྦྱར་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་འཇུག་ནི་ཁྱད་པར་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་ཡིན། SGNMT ནི་རྩོམ་པ་པ་ཁག་གིས་སློབ་ཆེན་དང་། སློབ་ཆེན་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲི་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་གི་ MPhil བ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ་ཡོད།', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na ƙarfafa SGNMT, da jarrabai masu karatun na fassarar mashinaci. SGNMT n a samar da fuskar ɗabi'a zuwa modulen gyarar kwamfyutan neural da symbolic (mãsu bashiri) da semantic mai hagu zuwa dama-dama kamar misãlan fassarar da misãlan zane-zane na NMT, misãlai masu harshe, fassarori, jerin-zane, ko wasu nau'i na musamman. @ info: whatsthis SGNMT yana amfani da wasu masu motsi da za'a sami cikin fili wanda aka spana da shi na mãsu bashiri da ke daidai wa taurãri dabam-daban. A ƙara waɗansu mataimaki na yanzu ko ko yin kodi, yana mai sauƙi, kuma yana sanya ta zane mai amfani da fassarar mutane da za'a rubutu fassarar tafarki. SGNMT ana yi amfani da wanan cikin shirin Paramel a cikin Shirin Mai Learni, Sauti da Lugha Technyoyi a cikin Universin Kambrige, da kuma mafi yawansu na aikin research a cikin ƙungiyõyinmu."}
{'en': 'StruAP : A Tool for Bundling Linguistic Trees through Structure-based Abstract Pattern', 'ar': 'StruAP: أداة لتجميع الأشجار اللغوية من خلال نمط تجريدي قائم على الهيكل', 'pt': 'StruAP: uma ferramenta para agrupar árvores linguísticas por meio de padrão abstrato baseado em estrutura', 'es': 'StrUap: una herramienta para agrupar árboles lingüísticos a través de patrones abstractos basados en estructuras', 'fr': "StruAP\xa0: un outil pour regrouper des arbres linguistiques par le biais d'un modèle abstrait basé sur la structure", 'ja': 'StruAP ：構造ベースの抽象パターンを介して言語ツリーをバンドルするためのツール', 'zh': 'StruAP曰:系言树之具也', 'ru': 'StruAP: A Tool for Bundling Linguistic Trees through Structure-based Abstract Pattern', 'hi': 'StruAP: संरचना-आधारित सार पैटर्न के माध्यम से भाषाई पेड़ों को बंडल करने के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ga': 'StruAP: Uirlis chun Crainn Theangeolaíocha a Chuarú trí Phatrún Teibí Bunaithe ar Struchtúr', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'StruAP: Egy eszköz a nyelvi fák struktúraalapú absztrakt mintával történő csomagolására', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο για τη δέσμευση γλωσσολογικών δέντρων μέσα από αφηρημένο μοτίβο βασισμένο στη δομή', 'it': 'StruAP: Uno strumento per raggruppare alberi linguistici attraverso schemi astratti basati sulla struttura', 'kk': 'StruAP: Структура- негіздеген абстракт үлгісі арқылы лингвистикалық бұтақтарды біріктіру құралыName', 'mk': 'StruAP: Алатка за врзување на јазичните дрвја преку структурен апстрактен шаблон', 'ms': 'StruAP: Alat untuk Mengikat Pohon Bahasa melalui Corak Abstrakt berdasarkan Struktur', 'lt': 'StruAP: Linguistinių medžių jungimo struktūra grindžiamas abstraktus šablonas priemonė', 'ml': 'സ്ട്രൂഎപ്പ്: സ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അസ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് പാത്റ്രേറ്റ്', 'mt': 'StruAP: Għodda għat-twaħħil ta’ Għaxar Lingwistiċi permezz ta’ Mudell Abstrat ibbażat fuq l-Istruttura', 'mn': 'StruAP: Структур-based Абстракт загвараар шулууны модыг бүрдүүлэх хэрэгсэл', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'StruAP: Narzędzie do łączenia drzew językowych poprzez strukturalny abstrakcyjny wzór', 'ro': 'StruAP: Un instrument pentru îmbinarea copacilor lingvistici prin model abstract bazat pe structură', 'sr': 'StruAP: Alat za spajanje lingwističkih drveta kroz obrazac na strukturu', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'StruAP: A Tool for Bundling Linguistic Trees through StruAP-based Abstract Pattern', 'sv': 'StruAP: Ett verktyg för att sammanfoga språkliga träd genom strukturbaserat abstrakt mönster', 'ta': 'ஸ்ட்ரூபாப்: கட்டமைப்பு அடிப்படையிலுள்ள துணுக்குப் பாதைகள் மூலம் கட்டும் கோடுகளுக்கு ஒரு கருவி', 'ur': 'StruAP: ساختاری بنیادی Abstract Pattern کے ذریعہ لینگیسٹ درختوں کے لئے ایک ابزار', 'uz': 'StruAP: Name', 'vi': 'StruAP: A Tool for Bunting Linguistic Trees through structure-based Trtract Mẫu', 'nl': 'StruAP: Een hulpmiddel voor het bundelen van taalkundige bomen door Structuur-based Abstract Patroon', 'bg': 'Инструмент за обединяване на лингвистични дървета чрез структурно базиран абстрактен модел', 'de': 'StruAP: Ein Werkzeug zur Bündelung sprachlicher Bäume durch strukturbasierte abstrakte Muster', 'id': 'StruAP: Alat untuk Mengikat Pohon Linguistik melalui Pattern Abstrakt Berdasarkan Struktur', 'fa': 'StruAP: یک ابزار برای تنظیم درختهای لینکیستیک از طریق الگوی بی\u200cاستراکت بر اساس ساختار', 'sw': 'StruAP: Kifaa cha Kujenga miti ya Kilinguistic kupitia Miundombinu yenye ujenzi', 'da': 'StruAP: Et værktøj til bundling af sproglige træer gennem strukturbaseret abstrakt mønster', 'hr': 'StruAP: Njihov alat za spajanje lingwističkih drveta kroz strukturni abstrakt obrazac', 'sq': 'StruAP: Një mjet për lidhjen e pemëve gjuhësore nëpërmjet modelit abstrakt të bazuar në strukturë', 'ko': 'StruAP: 구조 기반 추상 모드를 통해 언어 트리를 바인딩하는 도구', 'am': 'view-action', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'স্ট্রুএপ: কাঠামোর ভিত্তিক আবট্র্যাক্ট প্যাটারেন্টের মাধ্যমে বানানো লিঙ্গিস্টিক গাছের একটি টুল', 'bs': 'StruAP: Alat za spajanje lingwističkih drveta kroz strukturni abstrakt obrazac', 'tr': 'StruAP: Structure-based Abstract Pattern (TABLE)', 'af': 'Name', 'et': 'StruAP: vahend keeleliste puude kokkupanemiseks struktuuripõhise abstraktse mustri kaudu', 'az': 'StruAP: Structure-based Abstract Pattern vasit…ôsil…ô Linguistik ańüaclarńĪnńĪ birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir vasit…ôsi', 'ca': 'StruAP: Una eina per agrupar arbres lingüístics a través de patrons abstracts basats en estructura', 'cs': 'StruAP: Nástroj pro spojení jazykových stromů prostřednictvím strukturně založeného abstraktního vzoru', 'fi': 'StruAP: Työkalu kielipuiden yhdistämiseen rakennepohjaisen abstraktin kuvion avulla', 'he': 'StruAP: כלי לארגז עצים שפתיים דרך דפוס אסטרקט מבוסס על מבנה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'StruAP: Orodje za združevanje jezikovnih dreves skozi strukturno temelječi abstraktni vzorec', 'jv': 'structural-supported absolute patterns', 'bo': 'StruAP: A Tool for Bundling Linguistic Trees through Structure-based Abstract Pattern'}
{'en': 'We present a tool for developing tree structure patterns that makes it easy to define the relations among textual phrases and create a search index for these newly defined relations. By using the proposed tool, users develop tree structure patterns through abstracting syntax trees. The tool features (1) intuitive pattern syntax, (2) unique functions such as recursive call of patterns and use of lexicon dictionaries, and (3) whole workflow support for relation development and validation. We report the current implementation of the tool and its effectiveness.', 'ar': 'نقدم أداة لتطوير أنماط هيكل الشجرة التي تجعل من السهل تحديد العلاقات بين العبارات النصية وإنشاء فهرس بحث لهذه العلاقات المحددة حديثًا. باستخدام الأداة المقترحة ، يطور المستخدمون أنماط هيكل الشجرة من خلال أشجار بناء الجملة المستخرجة. تتميز الأداة (1) بناء جملة نمط بديهي ، (2) وظائف فريدة مثل الاستدعاء المتكرر للأنماط واستخدام قواميس المعجم ، و (3) دعم كامل لسير العمل لتطوير العلاقات والتحقق من صحتها. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن التنفيذ الحالي للأداة وفعاليتها.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma ferramenta para desenvolver padrões de estrutura em árvore que facilita a definição das relações entre as frases textuais e a criação de um índice de busca para essas relações recém-definidas. Ao utilizar a ferramenta proposta, os usuários desenvolvem padrões de estrutura de árvore por meio da abstração de árvores sintáticas. A ferramenta apresenta (1) sintaxe de padrão intuitiva, (2) funções exclusivas, como chamada recursiva de padrões e uso de dicionários de léxico, e (3) suporte completo ao fluxo de trabalho para desenvolvimento e validação de relações. Relatamos a implementação atual da ferramenta e sua eficácia.', 'es': 'Presentamos una herramienta para desarrollar patrones de estructura de árbol que facilita la definición de las relaciones entre frases textuales y la creación de un índice de búsqueda para estas relaciones recién definidas. Mediante el uso de la herramienta propuesta, los usuarios desarrollan patrones de estructura de árbol mediante la abstracción de árboles de sintaxis. La herramienta incluye (1) una sintaxis de patrones intuitiva, (2) funciones únicas como la llamada recursiva de patrones y el uso de diccionarios de léxico, y (3) soporte completo de flujo de trabajo para el desarrollo y la validación de relaciones. Reportamos la implementación actual de la herramienta y su eficacia.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un outil pour développer des modèles de structure arborescente qui facilite la définition des relations entre les phrases textuelles et la création d'un index de recherche pour ces relations nouvellement définies. En utilisant l'outil proposé, les utilisateurs développent des modèles de structure arborescente au moyen d'arbres syntaxiques abstraits L'outil comprend (1) une syntaxe de modèle intuitive, (2) des fonctions uniques telles que l'appel récursif de modèles et l'utilisation de dictionnaires lexicaux, et (3) la prise en charge complète du flux de travail pour le développement et la validation des relations. Nous rendons compte de la mise en œuvre actuelle de l'outil et de son efficacité.", 'ja': 'テキストフレーズ間の関係を簡単に定義し、これらの新しく定義された関係の検索インデックスを作成することができる、ツリー構造パターンを開発するためのツールを提示します。提案されたツールを使用することで、ユーザーは構文木を抽象化してツリー構造パターンを開発します。このツールは、(1)直感的なパターン構文、(2)パターンの再帰呼び出しや辞書の使用などのユニークな機能、(3)リレーションシップ開発と検証のためのワークフロー全体のサポートを備えています。ツールの現在の実装とその有効性を報告します。', 'zh': '建一以开树式之具,轻定义文本短语之际,创为搜索索引。 用建言之具,用户抽象语法树来开树构式。 器有(1)直观式语法,(2)特立之功,如式递归调词典词典之用,及(3)开验之事。 告具而有效性。', 'hi': 'हम पेड़ संरचना पैटर्न विकसित करने के लिए एक उपकरण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो पाठ्य वाक्यांशों के बीच संबंधों को परिभाषित करना आसान बनाता है और इन नए परिभाषित संबंधों के लिए एक खोज सूचकांक बनाता है। प्रस्तावित उपकरण का उपयोग करके, उपयोगकर्ता वाक्यविन्यास पेड़ों को अमूर्त करने के माध्यम से पेड़ संरचना पैटर्न विकसित करते हैं। उपकरण सुविधाएँ (1) सहज ज्ञान युक्त पैटर्न वाक्यविन्यास, (2) अद्वितीय कार्य जैसे पैटर्न के पुनरावर्ती कॉल और शब्दकोश शब्दकोशों का उपयोग, और (3) संबंध विकास और सत्यापन के लिए पूरे वर्कफ़्लो समर्थन। हम उपकरण के वर्तमान कार्यान्वयन और इसकी प्रभावशीलता की रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Представляем инструмент для разработки шаблонов древовидной структуры, позволяющий легко определить отношения между текстовыми фразами и создать поисковый индекс для этих вновь определенных отношений. Используя предлагаемый инструмент, пользователи разрабатывают шаблоны структуры деревьев путем абстрагирования синтаксических деревьев. Инструмент обладает (1) интуитивно понятным синтаксисом шаблона, (2) уникальными функциями, такими как рекурсивный вызов шаблонов и использование словарей лексики, и (3) полной поддержкой рабочего процесса для разработки и проверки отношений. Мы сообщаем о текущем внедрении этого инструмента и его эффективности.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid uirlis i láthair chun patrúin struchtúir crann a fhorbairt a fhágann go bhfuil sé éasca an gaol idir frásaí téacsúla a shainiú agus innéacs cuardaigh a chruthú do na caidrimh nua-shainithe seo. Trí úsáid a bhaint as an uirlis mholta, forbraíonn úsáideoirí patrúin struchtúir crann trí chrainn chomhréire a asbhaint. Gnéithe an uirlis (1) comhréir phatrúin iomasach, (2) feidhmeanna uathúla cosúil le glaoch athchúrsach ar phatrún agus úsáid foclóirí foclóireachta, agus (3) tacaíocht sreabhadh oibre iomlán le haghaidh forbairt agus bailíochtú gaol. Tuairiscímid cur i bhfeidhm reatha na huirlise agus a éifeachtúlacht.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ხელის სტრუქტურის მონაცემების ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა სტრუქტურის განვითარებისთვის, რომელიც ახლა განსაზღვრებულია ტექსტულ ფრაზების შესა გამოყენებული ხელის გამოყენებით, მომხმარებელი ხელის სტრუქტურაციის შაბლოების განვითარებით სინტაქქსის ხელებით. ხელსაწყოთა ფუნქციები (1) ინტუტიური სინტაქსი, (2) უნიკალური ფუნქციები, როგორც რეკუტიური სინტაქციების გამოყენება და ლექსიკონის სიკუნქციების გამოყენება, და (3) ყველა მუ ჩვენ მიმდინარე ხელსაწყოთან და მისი ეფექტიურობის მიმდინარე გამოყენებას შეგვიყვანეთ.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy olyan eszközt, amely megkönnyíti a szöveges kifejezések közötti kapcsolatok meghatározását és keresési indexet hoz létre ezekhez az újonnan definiált kapcsolatokhoz. A javasolt eszköz használatával a felhasználók faszerkezeti mintákat fejlesztenek ki a szintaxisfák absztrakciójával. Az eszköz (1) intuitív minta szintaxisát, (2) egyedi funkciókat tartalmaz, mint például rekurzív minták hívása és lexikon szótárak használata, és (3) teljes munkafolyamat támogatást a kapcsolatok fejlesztéséhez és validálásához. Jelentést teszünk az eszköz jelenlegi végrehajtásáról és hatékonyságáról.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα εργαλείο για την ανάπτυξη μοτίβων δομής δέντρων που διευκολύνει τον καθορισμό των σχέσεων μεταξύ των κειμένων φράσεων και τη δημιουργία ενός ευρετηρίου αναζήτησης για αυτές τις νεοκαθορισμένες σχέσεις. Χρησιμοποιώντας το προτεινόμενο εργαλείο, οι χρήστες αναπτύσσουν μοτίβα δομής δέντρων μέσω της αφαίρεσης δέντρων σύνταξης. Το εργαλείο διαθέτει (1) διαισθητική σύνταξη μοτίβου, (2) μοναδικές λειτουργίες όπως αναδρομική κλήση προτύπων και χρήση λεξικών λεξικών, και (3) ολόκληρη υποστήριξη ροής εργασίας για την ανάπτυξη και επικύρωση σχέσεων. Αναφέρουμε την τρέχουσα εφαρμογή του εργαλείου και την αποτελεσματικότητά του.', 'it': "Presentiamo uno strumento per sviluppare modelli di struttura ad albero che rende facile definire le relazioni tra frasi testuali e creare un indice di ricerca per queste relazioni appena definite. Utilizzando lo strumento proposto, gli utenti sviluppano modelli di struttura degli alberi attraverso l'astrazione degli alberi di sintassi. Lo strumento presenta (1) sintassi intuitiva del modello, (2) funzioni uniche come chiamata ricorsiva di modelli e uso di dizionari lessicali, e (3) supporto completo del flusso di lavoro per lo sviluppo e la convalida delle relazioni. Riportiamo l'attuale attuazione dello strumento e la sua efficacia.", 'kk': 'Біз жаңа анықталған қатынастар үшін ағаш құрылғысын құру құралын таңдаймыз. Бұл мәтін сөздерінің қатынасын анықтауға оңай болады. Келтірілген құралды пайдаланушылар синтаксис ағаштарын абстракциялау арқылы ағаш құрылғыларын құрады. Құралдар мүмкіндіктері (1) интуитивті үлгі синтаксисі, (2) қайталанатын үлгілер мен лексикон сөздіктерін қолдану үшін қайталанатын функциялар, және (3) қатынау және тексеру үшін жұмыс жұмыс жұмы Қолданыстағы құралының және оның эффектілігін жазып береміз.', 'lt': 'Mes siūlome priemonę medžių struktūros modeliams kurti, kad būtų lengva apibrėžti tekstinių frazių santykius ir sukurti šių naujai apibrėžtų santykių paieškos indeksą. Naudodami siūlomą priemonę, naudotojai plėtoja medžių struktūros modelius abstraktuodami sintaksinius medžius. Prietaiso charakteristikos (1) intuityvi modelių sintaksija, (2) unikalios funkcijos, pvz., pakartotinis modelių skambutis ir leksikoninių žodynų naudojimas, ir (3) visa darbo srauto parama santykių kūrimui ir patvirtinimui. Mes pranešame apie dabartinę priemonės įgyvendinimą ir jos veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'Презентираме алатка за развој на структурни шеми на дрвјата што олеснува да се дефинираат односите меѓу текстуалните фрази и да се создаде индекс за пребарување за овие ново дефинирани односи. Со користење на предложената алатка, корисниците развиваат структурни шеми на дрвјата преку апстрактни синтаксични дрвја. The tool features (1) intuitive pattern syntax, (2) unique functions such as recursive call of patterns and use of lexicon dictionaries, and (3) whole workflow support for relation development and validation.  Ние го известуваме сегашното спроведување на алатката и нејзината ефикасност.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan alat untuk mengembangkan corak struktur pokok yang memudahkan untuk menentukan hubungan antara frasa teks dan mencipta indeks gelintar untuk hubungan baru ditentukan ini. Dengan menggunakan alat yang diusulkan, pengguna mengembangkan corak struktur pokok melalui pokok sintaks abstrak. Fungsi alat (1) sintaks corak intuitif, (2) fungsi unik seperti panggilan rekursif corak dan penggunaan kamus leksikon, dan (3) sokongan seluruh aliran kerja untuk pembangunan hubungan dan pengesahihan. Kami laporkan pelaksanaan semasa alat ini dan keefektivitasnya.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാനും ഈ പുതിയ വിശദീകരിച്ച ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള തെരച്ചിലുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക് നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d മരത്തിന്റെ സിന്റാക്സ് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളിലൂടെ മാതൃകങ് ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ (1) ഉള്ളില്ലാത്ത മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ സിന്റാക്സ്, (2) പ്രത്യേക ഫങ്ഷനുകള്\u200d, മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയിക്കുന്ന വിളിയും ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d  ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും അതിന്റെ ഫലവും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw għodda għall-iżvilupp ta’ mudelli tal-istruttura tas-siġar li tagħmilha faċli li jiġu definiti r-relazzjonijiet bejn il-frażijiet testwali u li jinħoloq indiċi ta’ tiftix għal dawn ir-relazzjonijiet definiti ġodda. Billi jużaw l-għodda proposta, l-utenti jiżviluppaw xejriet ta’ struttura tas-siġar permezz ta’ siġar tas-sintaks astratti. The tool features (1) intuitive pattern syntax, (2) unique functions such as recursive call of patterns and use of lexicon dictionaries, and (3) whole workflow support for relation development and validation.  Aħna nirrappurtaw l-implimentazzjoni attwali tal-għodda u l-effettività tagħha.', 'mn': 'Бид модны бүтцийн загваруудыг хөгжүүлэх хэрэгсэл болгодог. Энэ нь textual phrases хоорондын харилцааныг тодорхойлж, шинэ тодорхойлсон харилцааныг хайх индекс бий болгодог. Хэрэглэгчид модны бүтэц загваруудыг синтаксик модны шинж тэмдэглэхэд хөгжүүлдэг. Багаж хөгжүүлэх болон шинжлэх ухааны тусламжтайгаар ажиллах хөгжлийн болон шинжлэх ухааны тусламжтайгаар ажиллах хөгжлийн тусламжтайгаар бүх ажиллах хөгжлийн шинжлэх ухаан (1) шинжлэх ухаан шин Бид одоогийн хэрэгсэл болон үр дүнтэй ажиллагааны үйлдвэрлэлийг мэддэг.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit verktøy for å utvikla trestrukturmønsterelement som gjer det lett å definera relasjonane mellom teksttekstfrasar og laga ei søkindeks for desse nye definerte relasjonane. Bruk det foreslåtte verktøyet utviklar tre-strukturmønsterelement gjennom abstrakt av syntakstrådar. Verktøyfunksjonane (1) intuitivt mønstersyntaks, 2) unike funksjonane som rekursivt kall av mønster og bruk av lexicon- ordbokar, og (3) heile arbeidsrøm- støtte for utvikling og validering av relasjonar. Vi rapporterer gjeldande implementasjon av verktøyet og effektiviteten.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy narzędzie do tworzenia wzorców struktury drzew, które ułatwia definiowanie relacji między frazami tekstowymi i stworzenie indeksu wyszukiwania dla tych nowo zdefiniowanych relacji. Korzystając z proponowanego narzędzia, użytkownicy tworzą wzorce struktury drzew poprzez abstrakcję drzew składni. Narzędzie posiada (1) intuicyjną składnię wzorców, (2) unikalne funkcje takie jak rekursywne wywoływanie wzorców i używanie słowników leksykonowych oraz (3) cały przepływ pracy dla tworzenia i walidacji relacji. Raportujemy bieżące wdrożenie narzędzia i jego skuteczność.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un instrument pentru dezvoltarea modelelor structurii arborilor care facilitează definirea relațiilor dintre frazele textuale și crearea unui indice de căutare pentru aceste relații nou definite. Utilizând instrumentul propus, utilizatorii dezvoltă modele de structură arborească prin abstracția arborilor sintaxiali. Instrumentul dispune de (1) sintaxa intuitivă a modelelor, (2) funcții unice, cum ar fi apelarea recursivă a modelelor și utilizarea dicționarelor lexiconice și (3) suport întreg fluxul de lucru pentru dezvoltarea și validarea relațiilor. Raportăm implementarea actuală a instrumentului și eficacitatea acestuia.', 'si': 'අපි ගස් සංවිධානයක් විස්තර කරන්න උපකරණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ලේසිය සම්බන්ධයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ අළුත් විශ ප්\u200dරවේශනය උපකරණය භාවිත කරන්න, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ ගස් සංවේශනය ගස්ස් වලින් ගස්සක් නිර්මාණය කර Name අපි උපකරණය සහ ඒකේ අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් වාර්තා කරනවා.', 'so': 'Waxaynu keennaa qalabka horumarinta qaababka dhismaha geedka, taasoo u fudud in lagu caddeeyo xiriirka hadallada qoraalka ah iyo in aan u abuurno index raadinta ee xiriirkan cusub ee la qoray. Sida uu isticmaalo qalabka la soo jeeday, isticmaalayaashu waxay horumariyaan tusaale dhismo geed ah, iyadoo lagu rido geedaha canshuurta. Qoraalka qalabka waxaa ku qoran (1) kaalmada halka midowga ah, (2) shaqooyin gooni ah, tusaale ahaan u yeedhidda midowga iyo isticmaalidda luqadaha leksikanka iyo (3) kaalmada safarka shaqada oo dhan ee koritaanka iyo shaqeynta xiriirka. Waxaynu wargelinaynaa habka la soo dejinayo iyo waxyaabaheeda.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett verktyg för att utveckla trädstrukturmönster som gör det enkelt att definiera relationerna mellan textfraser och skapa ett sökindex för dessa nydefinierade relationer. Genom att använda det föreslagna verktyget utvecklar användarna trädstrukturmönster genom att abstrahera syntaxträd. Verktyget har (1) intuitiv mönstersyntax, (2) unika funktioner som rekursiv anrop av mönster och användning av lexikonordböcker, och (3) hela arbetsflödesstöd för relationsutveckling och validering. Vi rapporterar det aktuella genomförandet av verktyget och dess effektivitet.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo alat za razvoj obrazaca strukture drveta koji olakšava definiciju odnosa među tekstualnim frazama i stvara indeks za potragu za ovim novim definicijama odnosa. Koristenjem predloženog alata, korisnici razvijaju obrazac strukture drveta kroz apstrakciju sintaksa drveta. Objašnjavanja alata (1) sintaksa intuitivnih obrazaca, (2) jedinstvenih funkcija kao što su rekursivni poziv obrazaca i upotreba leksikonskih dizionara i (3) potpora radnog toka za razvoj i validaciju odnosa. Prijavljujemo trenutnu provedbu alata i njegove efikasnosti.', 'ta': 'நாம் மரத்தின் அமைப்பு வடிவமைப்புகளை உருவாக்க ஒரு கருவியை ஏற்படுத்துகிறோம். அது உரை சொற்களின் இடையே தொடர்பை விவரிக்க எளிதாக்கும் மற By using the proposed tool, users develop tree structure patterns through abstracting syntax trees.  கருவியின் (1) உணர்வுள்ள முறைமை ஒத்திசைவு (2) தனிப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு நாம் கருவியின் தற்போதைய செயல்பாட்டை மற்றும் அதன் விளைவுகளை அறிவிக்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'ہم نے درخت ساختہ نمونے کے لئے ایک ابزار پیش کرتا ہے جو اسے آسان کر دیتا ہے کہ تفصیل فرشتوں کے درمیان رابطہ معلوم کریں اور ان نئی معلوم رابطہ کے لئے جہاد انڈکس بنائیں۔ پیغمبر کی تولید کے ذریعہ، کارساز درخت ساختہ نمونے کی تولید کرتے ہیں، سینٹکس درختوں کے ذریعہ۔ ابزار ویژگی (1) نظریہ پٹرن سینٹکس, (2) واحد فعالیت جیسے پٹرنوں کا دوبارہ کال اور لکسیون دیکتوریوں کا استعمال، اور (3) رابطہ ڈلوماٹ اور validation کے لئے کامل کارفلو مدد. ہم ابزار اور اس کی فعالیت کے موجود عملومات کا گزارش کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz daraxt structural modellarini yaratish uchun asbob qilamiz. Bu matn so'zlarning orasidagi munosabatlarni aniqlash imkoniyatini осон qiladi va yangi aniqlangan munosabatlar uchun qidirish indeksi yaratish mumkin. Name Name Biz joriy asboblarni ishlatishni va ishlatishni ruxsat beramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một công cụ để phát triển các mô hình cấu trúc cây làm cho việc xác định các mối quan hệ giữa các cụm từ cấu hình và tạo ra một chỉ mục tìm kiếm cho các quan hệ mới được xác định. Bằng cách sử dụng công cụ đề xuất, người dùng phát triển cấu trúc cây bằng cách trừu tượng cây. Các chức năng của công cụ (1) cấu trúc âm bản trực tiếp (2) chức năng độc đáo như sự gọi lại các mẫu và sử dụng các từ điển, và (3) hỗ trợ dòng chảy toàn bộ để phát triển và thẩm tra quan hệ. Chúng tôi báo cáo việc thực hiện công cụ và hiệu quả của nó.', 'bg': 'Представяме инструмент за разработване на модели на дървесна структура, който улеснява определянето на отношенията между текстовите фрази и създаване на индекс за търсене на тези новодефинирани отношения. Използвайки предложения инструмент, потребителите разработват модели на структурата на дърветата чрез абстракция на синтаксисни дървета. Инструментът разполага с (1) интуитивен синтаксис на модела, (2) уникални функции като рекурсивно извикване на модели и използване на речници на лексикона и (3) поддръжка на целия работен поток за разработване и валидиране на отношенията. Докладваме за текущото прилагане на инструмента и неговата ефективност.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een tool voor het ontwikkelen van boomstructuurpatronen die het gemakkelijk maakt om de relaties tussen tekstzinnen te definiëren en een zoekindex voor deze nieuw gedefinieerde relaties te creëren. Door de voorgestelde tool te gebruiken, ontwikkelen gebruikers boomstructuurpatronen door syntaxisbomen te abstraheren. De tool beschikt over (1) intuïtieve patroonsyntaxis, (2) unieke functies zoals recursieve oproep van patronen en gebruik van lexicon woordenboeken, en (3) volledige workflow ondersteuning voor relatieontwikkeling en validatie. We rapporteren de huidige implementatie van de tool en de effectiviteit ervan.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo alat za razvoj obrazaca strukture drveta koji olakšava definiranje odnosa među tekstualnim frazama i stvoriti indeks za potragu za ovim novim definiranim odnosima. Koristeći predloženi alat, korisnici razvijaju obrazac strukture drveta prostrom apstraciranja sintaksičnih drveta. Objašnjavanja alata (1) sintaksa intuitivnog obrazaca, (2) jedinstvenih funkcija poput rekursivnog poziva obrazaca i uporabe leksikonskih dizionara i (3) cijela podrška radnog toka za razvoj i validaciju odnosa. Prijavljujemo trenutnu provedbu alata i njegove učinkovitosti.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et værktøj til udvikling af træstruktur mønstre, der gør det nemt at definere relationerne mellem tekstsætninger og oprette et søgeindeks for disse nydefinerede relationer. Ved at bruge det foreslåede værktøj udvikler brugerne træstrukturmønstre gennem abstraktion af syntakstræer. Værktøjet indeholder (1) intuitiv mønstersyntaks, (2) unikke funktioner såsom rekursiv opkald af mønstre og brug af ordbøger og (3) hele arbejdsprocessen understøttelse til relationsudvikling og validering. Vi rapporterer om den aktuelle gennemførelse af værktøjet og dets effektivitet.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan alat untuk mengembangkan pola struktur pohon yang membuat mudah untuk mendefinisikan hubungan antara frasa teks dan menciptakan indeks pencarian untuk hubungan yang baru didefinisikan. Dengan menggunakan alat yang diusulkan, pengguna mengembangkan pola struktur pohon melalui pohon sintaks abstrak. Karakteristik alat (1) sintaks pola intuitif, (2) fungsi unik seperti panggilan rekursif pola dan penggunaan kamus leksikon, dan (3) seluruh dukungan aliran kerja untuk pengembangan hubungan dan validasi. Kami melaporkan implementasi saat ini alat dan efektifnya.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein Werkzeug zur Entwicklung von Baumstrukturmustern, das es einfach macht, die Beziehungen zwischen Textphrasen zu definieren und einen Suchindex für diese neu definierten Beziehungen zu erstellen. Mit dem vorgeschlagenen Werkzeug entwickeln Benutzer Baumstrukturmuster durch Abstraktion von Syntaxbäumen. Das Tool verfügt über (1) intuitive Mustersyntax, (2) einzigartige Funktionen wie rekursiven Aufruf von Mustern und Verwendung von Lexikonwörterbüchern und (3) Unterstützung des gesamten Workflows für Beziehungsentwicklung und -validierung. Wir berichten über die aktuelle Implementierung des Tools und dessen Wirksamkeit.', 'ko': '우리는 텍스트 단어 간의 관계를 쉽게 정의하고 새로 정의된 관계에 검색 인덱스를 만들 수 있는 트리 구조 모델을 개발하는 도구를 제공합니다.이 도구를 사용하면 사용자는 추상적인 문법 트리를 통해 트리 구조 모델을 개발할 수 있다.이 도구는 (1) 직관적인 모델 문법, (2) 독특한 기능을 가지고 있다. 예를 들어 모델의 귀속 호출과 사전 사전의 사용, 그리고 (3) 관계 개발과 검증에 대한 전체 작업 흐름 지원 등이다.우리는 이 도구의 현재 실시 상황과 그 유효성을 보고했다.', 'sw': 'Tunawesha nyenzo ya kutengeneza miundo mbinu ya mti ambayo inafanya rahisi kufafanua uhusiano kati ya maneno ya msingi na kutengeneza index ya kutafuta kwa ajili ya mahusiano haya mapya yanayoelezwa. Kwa kutumia zana iliyopendekezwa, watumiaji wanatengeneza miundo ya mti kwa kupitia kutengeneza miti ya kodi. Kifaa hicho kinaonyesha msaada wa muundo wenye ufanisi wa hali halisi, (2) functions za kipekee kama vile wito wa kurudisha mitindo na matumizi ya dictionary wa lexico, na (3) msaada wa kazi nzima kwa ajili ya maendeleo na uhalisia wa mahusiano. Tunatoa taarifa za utekelezaji wa kifaa hiki na ufanisi wake.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n hulpmiddel vir die ontwikkeling van boom struktuur patrone wat dit maklik maak om die relasies onder tekstuule frase te definieer en skep 'n soektog indeks vir hierdie nuwe gedefinieerde relasies. Deur die voorgestelde hulpmiddel te gebruik, ontwikkel gebruikers boom struktuur patrone deur abstracting van sintaks bome. Die nutsprogram funksies (1) intuitiewe patroon sintaks, (2) unieke funksies soos rekursiewe roep van patrone en gebruik van lexikon woordeboeke, en (3) hele werkvloed ondersteun vir verwanting ontwikkeling en geldigheid. Ons rapporteer die huidige implementasie van die nutsbalk en sy effektiviteit.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një mjet për zhvillimin e modeleve të strukturës së pemëve që e bën të lehtë të përcaktojmë marrëdhëniet midis frazave tekstuale dhe të krijojmë një indeks kërkimi për këto marrëdhënie të përcaktuara sapo. Duke përdorur mjetin e propozuar, përdoruesit zhvillojnë modele strukture pemësh nëpërmjet pemëve abstrakte sintaksi. Mjet ka (1) sintaksi intuitive të modelit, (2) funksione unike të tilla si thirrje rekursive të modeleve dhe përdorimi i fjalorëve lexikonësh dhe (3) mbështetje e tërë rrjedhës së punës për zhvillimin dhe vlerësimin e marrëdhënieve. Ne raportojmë zbatimin aktual të mjetit dhe efektshmërinë e tij.', 'am': 'We present a tool for developing tree structure patterns that makes it easy to define the relations among textual phrases and create a search index for these newly defined relations.  በተዘጋጀው መሣሪያ በመጠቀም ተጠቃሚዎች የዛፍ መሠረት ምሳሌዎችን በመለስ ሲንካስር ዛፎችን በመለስ ያሳድጋሉ፡፡ tool-options-action የአሁኑን መጠቀሚያ እና ፍቃዱን እናስታውሳለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ծառերի կառուցվածքի կաղապարների զարգացման գործիք, որը հեշտացնում է սահմանել տեքստալ արտահայտությունների միջև հարաբերությունները և ստեղծել նորից սահմանված հարաբերությունների որոնման ինդեքս: Օգտագործելով առաջարկված գործիքը, օգտագործողները զարգանում են ծառերի կառուցվածքի կաղապարները վերացական սինտաքսի ծառերի միջոցով: The tool features (1) intuitive pattern syntax, (2) unique functions such as recursive call of patterns and use of lexicon dictionaries, and (3) whole workflow support for relation development and validation.  Մենք զեկուցում ենք գործիքի ներկայիս իրականացման մասին և դրա արդյունավետության մասին:', 'fa': 'ما یک ابزار برای توسعه الگوهای ساختار درخت را نشان می دهیم که رابطه\u200cهای متن را تعریف کردن آسان می\u200cکند و یک ابزار جستجو برای این رابطه\u200cهای تازه تعریف می\u200cکند. از طریق استفاده از ابزار پیشنهاد، کاربران الگوهای ساختار درخت را از طریق استفاده از درختان سینتکس توسعه می کنند. ویژه\u200cهای ابزار (۱) ویژه\u200cسازی الگوی بی\u200cنظیر (۲) فعالیت\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای مثل تماس مجدد الگوها و استفاده از لکسیکون\u200cها و (۳) تمام پشتیبانی جریان کار برای توسعه و تأیید ارتباط. ما گزارش میدیم که کاربرد فعلی ابزار و کاربردی آن را انجام دهد.', 'bn': 'আমরা গাছের কাঠামো প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য একটি টুল উপস্থাপন করি যা টেক্সচুয়াল বাক্যের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক নির্ধারণ করে এবং এই নতুন নির্ধারিত সম্পর্ক প্রস্তাবিত টুল ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহারকারীরা সিন্ট্যাক্স গাছ থেকে বিচ্ছিন্ন করার মাধ্যমে গাছের কাঠামো প্ টুলটি ব্যবহার করে (1) ইন্টুয়েটিভ প্যানেট সিন্ট্যাক্স, (2) বিশেষ কার্যক্রম, যেমন প্যানারেসিকোর পুনরাবৃত্তিক কল এবং লেক্সিকোন অভিধান ব্যবহার করার জন আমরা টুলের বর্তমান বাস্তবায়ন এবং এর কার্যকর্মের প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি।', 'az': 'Biz a ğac quruluşu modellərini təhsil etmək üçün bir araç göstəririk ki, textual frazlərin ilişkilerini təsdiqləmək və bu yeni təsdiqlənmiş ilişkiler üçün arama indiks yaradır. İstifadə edilən vasitəsilə, istifadəçilər sintaks ağaclarını abstraktura vasitəsilə ağac quruluşları təşkil edirlər. Araç özellikləri (1) intuitiv örnek sintaksi, (2) yenidən fərqli örneklərin çağırışı və leksikon sözlərinin istifadəsi kimi fərqli fərqli fərqli və (3) əlaqələr gelişməsi və təsdiqlənməsi üçün bütün çalışma akışı desteği. Biz bu vasitəsinin və onun etkinliğinin günlük istifadəsini bildiririk.', 'ca': "We present a tool for developing tree structure patterns that makes it easy to define the relations among textual phrases and create a search index for these newly defined relations.  Utilitzant l'eina proposada, els usuaris desenvolupen patrons d'estructura d'arbres a través d'arbres de sintaxi abstracts. L'eina té (1) síntaxi de patrons intuïtius, (2) funcions únices com la trucada recursiva de patrons i l'ús de diccionaris de lexicons, i (3) suport de flux de treball complet al desenvolupament i validació de relacions. Informem sobre la implementació actual de l'eina i la seva eficacia.", 'et': 'Esitleme tööriista puustruktuuri mustrite arendamiseks, mis võimaldab lihtsalt määratleda tekstifraaside vahelisi seoseid ja luua nende uute seoste otsinguindeksi. Kavandatud tööriista abil arendavad kasutajad puustruktuuri mustreid süntaksipuude abstrakteerimise kaudu. Tööriist sisaldab (1) intuitiivset mustrisüntaksit, (2) unikaalseid funktsioone nagu rekursiivne mustrite väljakutse ja sõnastiku sõnaraamatute kasutamine ning (3) kogu töövoo toetust seoste arendamiseks ja valideerimiseks. Me anname aru vahendi praegusest rakendamisest ja selle tõhususest.', 'cs': 'Představujeme nástroj pro vývoj vzorů stromové struktury, který usnadňuje definovat vztahy mezi textovými frázemi a vytvořit index hledání pro tyto nově definované vztahy. Pomocí navrženého nástroje uživatelé vytvářejí vzory struktury stromů prostřednictvím abstrakce syntaxe stromů. Nástroj obsahuje (1) intuitivní syntaxi vzorů, (2) unikátní funkce jako rekurzivní volání vzorů a použití slovníků lexikonu a (3) podporu celého workflow pro vývoj a validaci vztahů. Podáváme zprávu o aktuální implementaci nástroje a jeho efektivitě.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme työkalun, jolla kehitetään puurakenteita, joiden avulla on helppo määritellä tekstilauseiden väliset suhteet ja luoda hakuindeksi näille uusille suhteille. Käyttämällä ehdotettua työkalua käyttäjät kehittävät puurakenteita abstraktoimalla syntaksipuita. Työkalussa on (1) intuitiivinen kuviosyntaksi, (2) ainutlaatuisia toimintoja, kuten rekursiivinen kuviokutsu ja sanaston sanakirjojen käyttö, ja (3) koko työnkulun tuki suhteiden kehittämiseen ja validointiin. Raportoimme työkalun nykyisestä täytäntöönpanosta ja sen tehokkuudesta.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo alat za razvoj obrazaca strukture drveta koji olakšava definiciju odnosa među tekstualnim frazama i stvara indeks pretraživanja za nove definirane odnose. Koristeći predloženi alat, korisnici razvijaju obrazac strukture drveta prostrom apstraktanja sintaksa drveta. Objašnjavanja alata (1) sintaksa intuitivnog obrazaca, (2) jedinstvenih funkcija poput rekursivnog poziva obrazaca i upotrebe leksikonskih diktorija i (3) potpore radnog toka za razvoj i validaciju odnosa. Prijavljujemo trenutnu provedbu alata i njegove učinkovitosti.', 'tr': 'Biz agaç strukturasy nusgalaryny bejermek üçin bir araç çykarýarys. Bu sened sözleriň arasynyň baglaýyşyny bejermek üçin a ňsat bir şekilde düzenleýäris we bu täze taniş baglaýyşlar üçin bir arama indeks bejerýäris. Ullançylar teklip eden esbaplar üçin agaç nusgalaryny syntaks agaçlaryny çykarýar. Esbap zolaky gaýşartmak üçin (1) intuitiv çykyş sintaksy, (2) ýene-de bir faýllar çykyş we leksikon sözlerniň ullanyşy ýaly çaplary we ullanyşy üçin (3) tüm işleýişik aklanyş golaýaty gelişmek we janlaşdyrmak üçin ullanyşy Biz häzirki esbapyň implementasiýasyny we onuň täsirli bolmagyny bildirip berýäris.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk alat kanggo nggawe sistem sing ngedol anyar tentang nggawe gerakan kelas barang nggambarang seneng pisan textual lan nggawe indeks kebuturan kanggo nggawe barang dhéwé Jaringan seneng tool sing nggunakake The tool parameters (1) INUitve patterns format (2) unique funksion Awak dhéwé ngerti aplikasi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים כלי לפיתוח דפוסי מבנה עצים שמקלים להגדיר את היחסים בין ביטויים טקסטיים וליצור אינדיקס חיפוש עבור היחסים החדשים המוגדרים האלה. באמצעות השימוש בכלי הצעה, משתמשים מפתחים דפוסי מבנה עצים דרך עצי סינטקסי מוזרים. מכשיר מכשיר (1) סינטקס דפוס אינטואיטיבי, (2) פונקציות ייחודיות כמו שיחה חוזרת של דפוסים ושימוש במילוני הלקסיקונים, ו (3) תמיכת זרימת עבודה שלמה לפיתוח יחסים ואישור. אנחנו מדווחים על ההפעלה הנוכחית של הכל והיעילות שלו.', 'ha': "We present a tool for developing tree structure patterns that makes it easy to define the relations among textual phrases and create a search index for these newly defined relations.  Yi amfani da shirin kayan da aka buƙata, masu amfani da su zaɓe tsari na itãce na ƙidãya, a kafin su kange itãcen syntaxewa. Shirin kayan amfani da (1) tsarin shiryarwa masu kiya da ke cikin shirin shiryarwa, (2) funamman na ɗabi'a kamar masu motsi na shiryarwa da amfani da dictionaries na leksikon, da (3) ƙaramar aikin aiki na yi amfani da shiryarwa da gaskiya. Munã sanar da amfani da shirin ayuka yanzu.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo orodje za razvoj drevesnih strukturnih vzorcev, ki omogoča enostavno definiranje relacij med besedilnimi frazami in ustvarjanje iskalnega indeksa za te nove definirane relacije. Z uporabo predlaganega orodja uporabniki razvijajo vzorce strukture dreves z abstrakcijo sintaksa dreves. Orodje vsebuje (1) intuitivno sintakso vzorca, (2) edinstvene funkcije, kot so rekurzivni klic vzorcev in uporaba leksikonskih slovarjev, in (3) celotno podporo poteka dela za razvoj relacij in preverjanje. Poročamo o trenutnem izvajanju orodja in njegovi učinkovitosti.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྩ་འབྲེལ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྟངས་ལ་ལག་ཆ་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཕན་ཚུན་ཡིག་ཚིག་གི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་གསར་འཛུགས་བཤེར ལག་ལེན་པ་སྤྲོད་ཟིན་པའི་ལག་ཆ་སྤྱད་ནས་དབྱིབས་ཤིང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པ་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The tool features (1) intuitive pattern syntax, (2) unique functions such as recursive call of patterns and use of lexicon dictionaries, and (3) whole workflow support for relation development and validation. ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་ལག་ཆ་དང་དོན་ལྡན་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ནུས་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'KnowYourNyms? A Game of Semantic Relationships', 'pt': 'KnowYourNyms? Um jogo de relacionamentos semânticos', 'ar': 'KnowYourNyms؟ لعبة العلاقات الدلالية', 'fr': 'Connaissez-vous vos prémices\xa0? Un jeu de relations sémantiques', 'es': '¿Conoces a tu NYMS? Un juego de relaciones semánticas', 'ja': 'KnowYourNyms?意味関係のゲーム', 'zh': '知子之Nyms? 语义戏', 'hi': 'KnowyourNyms? Semantic Relationships का खेल', 'ru': 'KnowYourNyms? Игра семантических отношений', 'ga': 'KnowYourNyms? Cluiche Caidrimh Shéimeantach', 'hu': 'Ismered a sajátjaidat? A szemantikus kapcsolatok játéka', 'ka': 'ოჲჱნაგაქ ლთ ნვიმჟ? Name', 'el': 'Ξέρεις την Nyms σου; Ένα παιχνίδι σημαντικών σχέσεων', 'mk': 'Ги познаваш Вашите? Игра на семантички односи', 'kk': 'Өзіңізді білесіз бе? Semantic Relationships ойыныName', 'lt': 'KnowYourNyms?  Semantinių santykių žaidimas', 'ms': 'Kau kenal Nyms? Permainan Hubungan Semantik', 'it': 'KnowYourNyms? Un gioco di relazioni semantiche', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങളുടെ ന്യൂം അറിയുമോ? സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ കളി', 'mt': 'KnowYourNyms? Logħba ta’ Relazzjonijiet Semantiċi', 'ro': 'Cunoaşteţi-vă Nyms? Un joc de relaţii semantice', 'mn': 'Таныг мэднэ үү? Semantic Relationships Game', 'sr': 'Poznaješ svoje? Igra semantičkih odnosa', 'si': 'ඔයාගේ නායිම්ස්ව දන්නවද? Name', 'pl': 'Znasz swoje Nyms? Gra związków semantycznych', 'no': 'Kjenner YourNyms? Name', 'sv': 'Känner du dina nyms? Ett spel av semantiska relationer', 'ta': 'உங்கள் நைம்ஸ் தெரியுமா? Name', 'ur': 'آپ کے نیموں کو جانتے ہیں؟ Name', 'so': 'Garan YourNyms? A Game of Semantic Relationships', 'uz': 'KnowYourNyms?  Name', 'vi': 'Anh biết? Trò chơi giữa mùa thường', 'bg': 'Познаваш Нимс? Игра на семантични отношения', 'hr': 'Poznaješ svoje? Igra semantičkih odnosa', 'id': 'Kau tahu Nyms? Permainan Hubungan Semantik', 'da': 'Kender du dine nyms? Et spil af semantiske relationer', 'nl': 'Ken je Nyms? Een spel van semantische relaties', 'fa': 'نيمز رو ميشناسي؟ Name', 'ko': '너 이름 알아?의미 관계의 게임', 'de': 'Kennst du deine Nyms? Ein Spiel der semantischen Beziehungen', 'tr': "YourNyms'i tanaýarsyñmy? Semantik ilişkiler oyunu", 'sq': 'E njeh Njimsin tënd? Një Lojë e Marrëdhënieve Semantike', 'sw': 'Je YourNyms? Game of Semantic Relations', 'am': 'YourNyms? አዲስ ጨዋታ', 'az': 'Sizi tanıyırsınız? Semantik İlişkilərin Oyunu', 'af': 'Ken U Nyms? Name', 'hy': 'KnowYourNyms?  A Game of Semantic Relationships', 'ca': 'Coneixeu els vostres Nyms? A Game of Semantic Relationships', 'bs': 'Poznaješ svoje? Igra semantičkih odnosa', 'cs': 'Znáš svoje Nyms? Hra sémantických vztahů', 'bn': 'KnowYourNyms?  সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্কের একটি খেলাName', 'et': 'Tead oma nyme? Semantiliste suhete mäng', 'fi': 'Tunnetko Nymsisi? Semanttisten suhteiden peli', 'sk': 'Poznaš svoje Nymse? Igra semantičnih odnosov', 'ha': 'Yasan YourNym? Game game na Semantic Relation', 'jv': 'Nym ngerti Yèné ? Name', 'he': 'KnowYourNyms?  משחק מערכות יחסים סמנטיות', 'bo': 'ཡིན་ནམ་ཡིན་ནམ་གང་ཡིན་ནམ། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་བ་གྱི་རྩེད་མོ་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'Semantic relation knowledge is crucial for natural language understanding. We introduce KnowYourNyms?, a web-based game for learning semantic relations. While providing users with an engaging experience, the application collects large amounts of data that can be used to improve semantic relation classifiers. The data also broadly informs us of how people perceive the relationships between words, providing useful insights for research in psychology and linguistics.', 'ar': 'معرفة العلاقة الدلالية أمر بالغ الأهمية لفهم اللغة الطبيعية. نقدم لعبة "KnowYourNyms؟" ، وهي لعبة تعتمد على الويب لتعلم العلاقات الدلالية. أثناء تزويد المستخدمين بتجربة تفاعلية ، يجمع التطبيق كميات كبيرة من البيانات التي يمكن استخدامها لتحسين مصنفات العلاقات الدلالية. تُعلمنا البيانات أيضًا على نطاق واسع كيف يدرك الناس العلاقات بين الكلمات ، مما يوفر رؤى مفيدة للبحث في علم النفس واللغويات.', 'es': 'El conocimiento de las relaciones semánticas es crucial para la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Presentamos «¿Conoces a tus NYMS?» , un juego basado en la web para aprender relaciones semánticas. Al mismo tiempo que proporciona a los usuarios una experiencia atractiva, la aplicación recopila grandes cantidades de datos que se pueden utilizar para mejorar los clasificadores de relaciones semánticas. Los datos también nos informan ampliamente de cómo las personas perciben las relaciones entre las palabras, proporcionando información útil para la investigación en psicología y lingüística.', 'fr': "La connaissance des relations sémantiques est essentielle à la compréhension du langage naturel. Nous vous présentons «\xa0Connaissez-vous vos Nyms\xa0?\xa0» , un jeu en ligne pour apprendre les relations sémantiques. Tout en offrant aux utilisateurs une expérience attrayante, l'application collecte de grandes quantités de données qui peuvent être utilisées pour améliorer les classificateurs de relations sémantiques. Les données nous renseignent également de manière générale sur la façon dont les gens perçoivent les relations entre les mots, fournissant ainsi des informations utiles pour la recherche en psychologie et en linguistique.", 'pt': 'O conhecimento da relação semântica é crucial para a compreensão da linguagem natural. Apresentamos “KnowYourNyms?”, um jogo baseado na web para aprender relações semânticas. Ao fornecer aos usuários uma experiência envolvente, o aplicativo coleta grandes quantidades de dados que podem ser usados para melhorar os classificadores de relações semânticas. Os dados também nos informam amplamente sobre como as pessoas percebem as relações entre as palavras, fornecendo insights úteis para pesquisas em psicologia e linguística.', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ के लिए शब्दार्थ संबंध ज्ञान महत्वपूर्ण है। हम "KnowYourNyms?" पेश करते हैं, जो शब्दार्थ संबंधों को सीखने के लिए एक वेब-आधारित गेम है। उपयोगकर्ताओं को एक आकर्षक अनुभव प्रदान करते समय, एप्लिकेशन बड़ी मात्रा में डेटा एकत्र करता है जिसका उपयोग शब्दार्थ संबंध क्लासिफायरमें सुधार करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। डेटा भी मोटे तौर पर हमें सूचित करता है कि लोग शब्दों के बीच संबंधों को कैसे समझते हैं, मनोविज्ञान और भाषाविज्ञान में अनुसंधान के लिए उपयोगी अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ja': '自然言語を理解するためには、意味関係の知識が不可欠である。意味関係を学ぶためのWebベースのゲーム「KnowYourNyms ?」をご紹介します。ユーザーに魅力的なエクスペリエンスを提供しながら、アプリケーションは意味関係分類子を改善するために使用できる大量のデータを収集します。また、このデータは、人々が単語間の関係をどのように認識しているかを広く示し、心理学と言語学の研究のための有用な洞察を提供します。', 'zh': '语义知自然语言至重。 吾言"KnowYourNyms"者,一款学语义之基于Web戏也。 供用户引人入胜之体,宜应用程序大收可入语义分类器之数。 博告以视单词,为心理学与语言学论。', 'ru': 'Знание семантических отношений имеет решающее значение для понимания естественного языка. Мы представляем онлайн-игру для изучения семантических отношений «KnowYourNyms?». Предоставляя пользователям привлекательный опыт, приложение собирает большие объемы данных, которые могут быть использованы для улучшения семантических классификаторов отношений. Данные также широко информируют нас о том, как люди воспринимают отношения между словами, предоставляя полезную информацию для исследований в области психологии и лингвистики.', 'ga': 'Tá eolas ar chaidreamh séimeantach ríthábhachtach chun teanga nádúrtha a thuiscint. Cuirimid isteach “KnowYourNyms?”, cluiche gréasán-bhunaithe chun caidreamh séimeantach a fhoghlaim. Agus taithí mhealltach á sholáthar d’úsáideoirí, bailíonn an feidhmchlár méideanna móra sonraí is féidir a úsáid chun aicmitheoirí caidrimh shéimeantaigh a fheabhsú. Cuireann na sonraí in iúl dúinn go ginearálta freisin conas a bhraitheann daoine an gaol idir focail, ag soláthar léargais úsáideacha le haghaidh taighde sa tsíceolaíocht agus teangeolaíocht.', 'el': 'Η γνώση της σημασματικής σχέσης είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Σας παρουσιάζουμε το "Know YourNyms;", ένα διαδικτυακό παιχνίδι για την εκμάθηση σημασιολογικών σχέσεων. Ενώ παρέχει στους χρήστες μια συναρπαστική εμπειρία, η εφαρμογή συλλέγει μεγάλες ποσότητες δεδομένων που μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για τη βελτίωση των σημασιολογικών ταξινομητών σχέσεων. Τα δεδομένα μας ενημερώνουν επίσης ευρέως για το πώς οι άνθρωποι αντιλαμβάνονται τις σχέσεις μεταξύ λέξεων, παρέχοντας χρήσιμες πληροφορίες για την έρευνα στην ψυχολογία και τη γλωσσολογία.', 'hu': "A szemantikus kapcsolattudás kulcsfontosságú a természetes nyelv megértéséhez. Bemutatjuk a 'KnowYourNyms'-t, egy webalapú játék a szemantikai kapcsolatok tanulására. Miközben vonzó élményt nyújt a felhasználóknak, az alkalmazás nagy mennyiségű adatot gyűjt, amelyek felhasználhatók a szemantikai kapcsolatok osztályozóinak javítására. Az adatok széles körben tájékoztatnak bennünket arról, hogy az emberek hogyan érzékelik a szavak közötti kapcsolatokat, és hasznos betekintést nyújtanak a pszichológia és a nyelvészet kutatásához.", 'it': "La conoscenza semantica delle relazioni è fondamentale per la comprensione del linguaggio naturale. Vi presentiamo 'KnowYourNyms', un gioco basato sul web per imparare le relazioni semantiche. Pur fornendo agli utenti un'esperienza coinvolgente, l'applicazione raccoglie grandi quantità di dati che possono essere utilizzati per migliorare i classificatori di relazioni semantiche. I dati ci informano anche ampiamente su come le persone percepiscono le relazioni tra le parole, fornendo utili approfondimenti per la ricerca in psicologia e linguistica.", 'kk': 'Тәуелдік тілді түсініктіру үшін семантикалық қатынас мәліметі маңызды. Біз "Сізді білесіз бе?" Семантикалық қатынастарды оқыту үшін веб-негіздегі ойын. Пайдаланушыларды бір тәжірибе бергенде, бағдарлама semantic қатынас классификаторын жақсарту үшін қолданатын үлкен деректер санын жинақтайды. Мәліметтер сондай-ақ адамдар сөздер арасындағы қатынастарды қалай түсініп, психология және лингвистикалық зерттеулерге пайдалы түсініктер береді.', 'ka': 'ჟვმანრთფნა გპყჱკა ჱა ჱნანთვ ვ გაზნჲ ჱა ნაპჲენთწ ენვჟ. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ "იცით თქვენი ნემი?" სემანტიკური შესაბამისათვის ვებ-დაბათი თამაში. როცა მომხმარებელების შესაძლებლობელი გამოცდილობის გამოცდილობა, პროგრამა ძალიან დიდი მონაცემების რაოდენობა, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება სემონტიკური კ მონაცემები უფრო უფრო დიდი ინფორმაციას გვაქვს, როგორ ადამიანები სიტყვების გრძნობების შესახებ, საშუალოდ სიტყვების შესახებ და სიტყვების შესახებ', 'mk': 'Семантичкото знаење на односите е клучно за природното разбирање на јазикот. Го претставуваме "KnowYourNyms"? веб-базирана игра за учење семантични односи. И покрај тоа што им дава на корисниците интересно искуство, апликацијата собира големи количини податоци кои може да се користат за подобрување на класификаторите на семантичните односи. Податоците, исто така, широко не информираат за тоа како луѓето ги перцепираат односите помеѓу зборовите, обезбедувајќи корисни информации за истражувањето во психологијата и лингвистиката.', 'lt': 'Semantinių santykių žinios yra labai svarbios natūraliam kalbų supratimui. Mes pristatome "KnowYourNyms?", internetinis žaidimas semantiniams santykiams mokytis. Naudotojams suteikiant įdomią patirtį, paraiškoje renkami dideli duomenys, kurie gali būti naudojami semantiniams santykių klasifikatoriams gerinti. Duomenys taip pat plačiai informuoja mus apie tai, kaip žmonės suvokia santykius tarp žodžių, suteikiant naudingą supratimą psichologijos ir kalbos moksliniams tyrimams.', 'ms': "Pengetahuan hubungan semantik adalah penting untuk pemahaman bahasa alam. Kami perkenalkan 'KnowYourNyms?' permainan berasaskan web untuk belajar hubungan semantik. Sementara menyediakan pengguna pengalaman yang menarik, aplikasi mengumpulkan jumlah besar data yang boleh digunakan untuk meningkatkan pengklasifikasi hubungan semantik. Data juga secara lebar memberitahu kita bagaimana orang menyangka hubungan antara perkataan, menyediakan pandangan berguna untuk kajian dalam psikologi dan bahasa.", 'ml': "സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധമുള്ള അറിവ് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 'നിങ്ങളുടെ ന്യൂം അറിയുമോ? ഒരു വെബ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ കളി ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്ന അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രയോഗത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ബന്ധവിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു എന്ന് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു എന്നും സൈക്കോളജിയിലും ഭാഷ്ട", 'mt': 'L-għarfien tar-relazzjoni Semantika huwa kruċjali għall-fehim tal-lingwa naturali. Aħna nintroduċu "KnowYourNyms?", logħob ibbażat fuq l-internet għat-tagħlim tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi. Filwaqt li tipprovdi lill-utenti b’esperjenza involuta, l-applikazzjoni tiġbor ammonti kbar ta’ dejta li jistgħu jintużaw biex itejbu l-klassifikaturi tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi. Id-dejta tinforma wkoll b’mod wiesa’ dwar kif in-nies jaraw ir-relazzjonijiet bejn il-kliem, billi tipprovdi għarfien utli għar-riċerka fil-psikoloġija u l-lingwistika.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл ойлголтын тулд семантик харилцаа нь чухал. Бид "Таныг мэдэх үү?" гэдгийг танилцуулж байна. семантик харилцаа сурах вэб-суурилсан тоглоом. Хэрвээ хэрэглэгчиддээ сонирхолтой туршлага өгөхдөө, хэрэглэгчид ихэнх хэмжээний өгөгдлийг цуглуулж чадна. Эдгээр мэдээллүүд мөн хүмүүс үгийн харилцааны харилцаа хэрхэн ойлгож, психологи болон хэлний судалгааны талаар ашигтай ойлголт өгдөг.', 'pl': 'Znajomość relacji semantycznych ma kluczowe znaczenie dla zrozumienia języka naturalnego. Przedstawiamy "KnowYourNyms?", internetowa gra do nauki relacji semantycznych. Zapewniając użytkownikom angażujące doświadczenie, aplikacja gromadzi duże ilości danych, które mogą być wykorzystane do poprawy klasyfikatorów relacji semantycznych. Dane te szeroko informują również o tym, jak ludzie postrzegają relacje między słowami, dostarczając przydatnych informacji dla badań psychologicznych i lingwistycznych.', 'sr': 'Semantička veza znanja je ključna za razumevanje prirodnog jezika. Predstavljamo se "Poznaješ svoje ime?" web-bazirana igra za učenje semantičkih odnosa. Dok se korisnicima pružaju iskustvo, aplikacija skuplja velike količine podataka koje se mogu koristiti za poboljšanje klasifikatora semantičkih odnosa. Podaci nam takođe široko informišu kako ljudi osećaju odnose između riječi, pružajući korisne uvide za istraživanje psihologije i jezičanstva.', 'ro': "Cunoașterea relațiilor semantice este crucială pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural. Introducem 'KnowYourNyms', un joc bazat pe web pentru învățarea relațiilor semantice. În timp ce oferă utilizatorilor o experiență captivantă, aplicația colectează cantități mari de date care pot fi utilizate pentru a îmbunătăți clasificatorii de relații semantice. De asemenea, datele ne informează în general despre modul în care oamenii percep relațiile dintre cuvinte, oferind perspective utile pentru cercetarea în psihologie și lingvistică.", 'sv': 'Kunskap om semantisk relation är avgörande för förståelsen av naturligt språk. Vi introducerar "KnowYourNyms?" ett webbaserat spel för att lära sig semantiska relationer. Samtidigt som applikationen ger användarna en engagerande upplevelse samlar den in stora mängder data som kan användas för att förbättra semantiska relationsklassificerare. Datan informerar oss också brett om hur människor uppfattar relationerna mellan ord, vilket ger användbara insikter för forskning inom psykologi och lingvistik.', 'so': "aqoonta xiriirka galmada waa muhiim u ah garashada afka dabiicadda. Waxaynu soo bandhijinnaa 'Aqoonsan Nyamyadaada?', a web-based game for learning semantic relations.  Inta lagu siinayo isticmaalayaasha aqoonta la xiriira, codsigu wuxuu soo ururiyaa macluumaad badan oo aad u badan, kuwaas oo loo isticmaali karo si loo hagaajiyo fasalka kala duduwan. Macluumaadka waxaad sidoo kale noogu sheegaysaa sida dadku u u garto xiriirka hadallada dhexdooda, kuwaas oo u fidiya waxyaabo faa’iido leh oo lagu baranayo cilmi-cilmi iyo luqada.", 'si': 'සැමැන්තික සම්බන්ධ දැනගන්නේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න විශේෂයි. අපි ඔයාගේ නායිම්ස් දැනගන්න පුළුවන්ද? වෙබ් අධාරිත සෙමාන්තික සම්බන්ධයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට සම්බන්ධ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙලාවක්, විශාල සම්බන්ධ විශේෂකයන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න මේ දත්තේ අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් තියෙනවා කොහොමද මිනිස්සුන් වචන අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් දැනගන්නේ කියලා, මාසික විද්\u200dයාව', 'ta': "செமான்டிக் தொடர்பு அறிவு இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ள முக்கியமானது. நாங்கள் 'உங்களுடைய நைம்கள் தெரியுமா'? ஒரு இணைய சார்ந்த விளையாட்டு பயனர்களுக்கு ஒரு சேர்க்கப்பட்ட அனுபவத்தை வழங்கும் போது, பயன்பாடு பெரிய தகவலை சேகரிக்கிறது, இது பெம்மான்டிக் தொடர்பு வகுப்பு The data also broadly informs us of how people perceive the relationships between words, providing useful insights for research in psychology and linguistics.", 'ur': 'سیمنٹی نسبت علم طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے ضروری ہے۔ ہم آپ کے ناموں کو معلوم کرتے ہیں؟ سیمانٹی رابطہ سکھانے کے لئے ویب بنیادی کھیل ہے۔ حاﻻنکہ کارساز ایک مشکل تجربہ کے ساتھ حاصل کرتے ہیں، یہ کارساز بہت بڑے اندازے ڈاٹے جمع کرتا ہے جو سیمانٹی نسبت کلاسیٹر کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتے ہیں. ڈاٹا ہمیں بھی گھیرے طور پر بتاتا ہے کہ لوگوں نے کلمات کے درمیان کس طرح رابطہ دیکھا ہے، روانشناسی اور زبان شناسی کے تحقیقات کے لئے فائدہ بصیرت دیتے ہیں۔', 'no': 'Semantisk relasjonskunnskap er viktig for naturspråk forståking. Vi introduserer « Kjenner YourNyms »? ein nettbasert spel for å lære semantiske forhold. I tillegg til brukarar med eit engasjert opplevelse, samler programmet store mengdar data som kan brukast for å forbetra semantiske relasjonsklassifikatorar. Dataet informerer oss også om korleis folk oppfattar forholdet mellom ord, og tilbyr nyttige innsyningar for forskning i psykologi og språk.', 'uz': 'Semantik tajribasi tabiiy tilni tushunishga muhim. Biz "Sizning Nyamlaringizni bilsangiz?" o\'rganish uchun veb-asosiy oʻyinib o\'rganish. While providing users with an engaging experience, the application collects large amounts of data that can be used to improve semantic relation classifiers.  Maʼlumotlar esa odamlar so\'zlar orasidan munosabatlarni ko\'rinishini angladi, psykologi va tilliklarda o\'rganish uchun foydali ko\'rini beradi.', 'vi': "Thuyết quan hệ trung học là điều quan trọng cho hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu'KnowYour Nyx'? một trò chơi dựa trên mạng để học quan hệ ngữ pháp. Trong khi cung cấp cho người dùng một kinh nghiệm hấp dẫn, ứng dụng thu thập một lượng lớn dữ liệu có thể được dùng để cải thiện các phân nhánh liên quan/ Các dữ liệu cũng cho ta biết rộng rãi cách người ta cảm nhận các mối quan hệ giữa từ, cung cấp thông tin hữu ích cho nghiên cứu về tâm lý học và ngôn ngữ.", 'bg': 'Знанието за семантичните взаимоотношения е от решаващо значение за разбирането на естествения език. Представяме ви "KnowYourNyms?", уеб базирана игра за изучаване на семантични отношения. Докато предоставя на потребителите ангажиращо изживяване, приложението събира големи количества данни, които могат да бъдат използвани за подобряване на класификаторите на семантични взаимоотношения. Данните също така ни информират широко за това как хората възприемат взаимоотношенията между думите, предоставяйки полезни прозрения за изследвания в психологията и лингвистиката.', 'nl': "Semantische relatiekennis is cruciaal voor het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. We introduceren 'KnowYourNyms?', een web-based spel voor het leren van semantische relaties. Terwijl gebruikers een boeiende ervaring bieden, verzamelt de applicatie grote hoeveelheden gegevens die kunnen worden gebruikt om semantische relatieklassifiers te verbeteren. De data informeert ons ook over hoe mensen de relaties tussen woorden waarnemen, wat nuttige inzichten oplevert voor onderzoek in psychologie en taalkunde.", 'da': "Semantisk relation viden er afgørende for naturlig sprogforståelse. Vi introducerer 'KnowYourNyms', et webbaseret spil til læring af semantiske relationer. Mens programmet giver brugerne en engagerende oplevelse, indsamler programmet store mængder data, der kan bruges til at forbedre semantiske relationsklassificatorer. Dataene informerer os også bredt om, hvordan folk opfatter forholdet mellem ord, hvilket giver nyttig indsigt til forskning i psykologi og lingvistik.", 'de': "Semantisches Beziehungswissen ist entscheidend für das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache. Wir stellen 'KnowYourNyms' vor, ein webbasiertes Spiel zum Lernen semantischer Beziehungen. Während die Anwendung Benutzern eine ansprechende Erfahrung bietet, sammelt sie große Datenmengen, die verwendet werden können, um semantische Relationsklassifikatoren zu verbessern. Die Daten informieren uns darüber, wie Menschen die Beziehungen zwischen Wörtern wahrnehmen und liefern nützliche Erkenntnisse für die Forschung in Psychologie und Linguistik.", 'ko': '어의 관계 지식은 자연 언어의 이해에 매우 중요하다.당신의 이름을 아십니까?의미 관계를 배우는 온라인 게임사용자에게 흥미진진한 체험을 제공하는 동시에 이 응용 프로그램은 대량의 데이터를 수집하여 의미 관계 분류기를 개선하는 데 사용할 수 있다.이러한 데이터는 사람들이 단어와 단어 간의 관계를 어떻게 생각하는지 광범위하게 알려주고 심리학과 언어학 연구에 유용한 견해를 제공한다.', 'hr': 'Semantička veza znanja je ključna za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. Predstavljamo "Poznajete vaše djevojke?" internetska igra za učenje semantičkih odnosa. Dok se korisnicima pružaju zajedničko iskustvo, aplikacija skuplja velike količine podataka koje se mogu koristiti za poboljšanje klasifikatora semantičkih odnosa. Podaci nam također široko informiraju kako ljudi osjećaju odnose između riječi, pružajući korisne uvide za istraživanje psihologije i lingvistike.', 'tr': 'Semantik bilen baglaşyk tebigy dil düşünmesi üçin möhüm. Biz "YourNyms\'i tanyşdyrýarys" diýip tanyşdyrýarys, semantik baglaýyşlary öwrenmek üçin web tabanly oýun. Ullançylary birlikde tecrübe etmäge rugsat bererken, bu program semantik baglaýyşlary klasifikatçylary gelişmek üçin ullanýan uly sany maglumat toplaýar. Maglumatlar hem bizi sözler arasyndaky baglaýyşlaryň nähili düşünýändigini we psihologiýa we lingwistiklerde araştyrma üçin ulanyp barýandygyny bildirýärler.', 'sw': "Ufahamu wa kijinsia ni muhimu kwa kuelewa lugha ya asili. We introduce 'KnowYourNyms?',  mchezo wa mtandaoni kwa kujifunza mahusiano ya kimapenzi. Wakati wakiwapa watumiaji na uzoefu wa kujihusisha, matumizi hayo yanakusanya kiasi kikubwa cha data ambacho kinaweza kutumika ili kuboresha wataalamu wa mahusiano ya kimapenzi. Takwimu hizo pia zinatuelezea jinsi watu wanavyoelewa uhusiano kati ya maneno, na kutoa ufanisi wa tafiti katika kisaikolojia na lugha.", 'id': "Hubungan semantis pengetahuan penting untuk pemahaman bahasa alam. Kami memperkenalkan 'KnowYourNyms?' sebuah permainan web untuk belajar hubungan semantis. While providing users with an engaging experience, the application collects large amounts of data that can be used to improve semantic relation classifiers.  Data juga secara lebar memberitahu kita bagaimana orang memperlihatkan hubungan antara kata-kata, menyediakan pandangan berguna untuk penelitian dalam psikologi dan bahasa.", 'sq': 'Njohja e lidhjes Semantike është vendimtare për kuptimin natyror të gjuhës. Ne prezantojmë "KnowYourNyms?". një lojë në internet për mësimin e marrëdhënieve semantike. Ndërsa ofron përdoruesve një përvojë interesante, aplikimi mbledh sasi të mëdha të dhënash që mund të përdoren për të përmirësuar klasifikuesit e marrëdhënieve semantike. Të dhënat gjithashtu na informojnë gjerësisht se si njerëzit perceptojnë marrëdhëniet midis fjalëve, duke ofruar kuptime të dobishme për kërkimin në psikologji dhe gjuhë.', 'fa': 'علم مربوط به سمت مربوط به زبان طبیعی بسیار مهم است. ما معرفی میکنیم "KnowYourNyms"؟ بازی بر روی وب برای یادگیری رابطه\u200cهای semantic. در حالی که استفاده کنندگان را با تجربه\u200cای مشترک می\u200cدهند، کاربرد تعداد زیادی از داده\u200cها را جمع می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند برای بهتر کردن رابطه\u200cهای نسبت به سنتی\u200cها استفاده شود. اطلاعات همچنین به وسیله ما اطلاعات می\u200cدهد که مردم رابطه بین کلمات را چگونه می\u200cبینند، و برای تحقیقات روانشناسی و زبان\u200cشناسی مشاهده می\u200cکنند.', 'am': 'የስሜናዊ ግንኙነት እውቀት ለፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ "የራስNyms እናውቃለን?" የዌብ-based ተጨማሪ የsemantic ግንኙነት ለመማር While providing users with an engaging experience, the application collects large amounts of data that can be used to improve semantic relation classifiers.  መረጃዎቹም በሙሉ የሚናገሩት ቃል መካከል ግንኙነት እንዴት እንደምታስተውሉ ይነግረናል፡፡', 'hy': "Semantic relation knowledge is crucial for natural language understanding.  We introduce 'KnowYourNyms?',  սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների սովորելու վեբ-հիմնված խաղ: While providing users with an engaging experience, the application collects large amounts of data that can be used to improve semantic relation classifiers.  The data also broadly informs us of how people perceive the relationships between words, providing useful insights for research in psychology and linguistics.", 'af': 'Semantiese verwanting van kennis is crucial vir natuurlike taal verstanding. Ons introduiseer "ken jou Nyms?" \'n web-gebaseerde speletjie vir die leer van semantiese relasies. Terwyl gebruikers verskaf met \'n aanvangende erfaring, versamel die toepassing groot hoeveelheid data wat gebruik kan word om semantiese verwanting klassifiseerders te verbeter. Die data gee ons ook breed inligting van hoe mense die verwantings tussen woorde aansien, wat gebruiklike insigte verskaf vir ondersoek in psykologie en lingvistika.', 'bn': 'সেমান্টিক সম্পর্কের জ্ঞান প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। আমরা তোমার নাম পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি? সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্ক শিখার জন্য ওয়েব ভিত্তিক খেলা। ব্যবহারকারীদের একটি অংশগ্রহণকারী অভিজ্ঞতার সাথে প্রদান করার সময় অ্যাপ্লিকেশনটি বিশাল পরিমাণ তথ্য সংগ্রহ করে যা সেম্যান তথ্যগুলো ব্যাপক ভাবে আমাদের জানাচ্ছে কিভাবে লোকেরা শব্দের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক বুঝতে পারে, যারা মানসিকোলজি এবং ভাষার গবেষণা', 'bs': 'Semantičko znanje veze je ključno za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika. Predstavljamo "Poznajete vaše ljude?" internetska igra za učenje semantičkih odnosa. Dok se korisnicima pružaju učestvom iskustva, aplikacija skuplja velike količine podataka koje se mogu koristiti za poboljšanje klasifikatora semantičkih odnosa. Podaci nam također široko informiraju kako ljudi osjećaju odnose između riječi, pružajući korisne uvide za istraživanje psihologije i lingvistike.', 'ca': 'Semantic relation knowledge is crucial for natural language understanding.  Introduïm "KnowYourNyms?", un joc web per aprendre relacions semàntiques. Mentre proporciona als usuaris una experiència interessant, l\'aplicació recolliu grans quantitats de dades que es poden utilitzar per millorar els classificadors de relacions semàntiques. Les dades també ens informen de com la gent percebe les relacions entre paraules, proporcionant informacions útils per a la recerca en psicologia i lingüística.', 'cs': 'Znalost sémantických vztahů je klíčová pro porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Představujeme "KnowYourNyms?" webová hra pro učení sémantických vztahů. Zatímco poskytuje uživatelům poutavou zkušenost, aplikace shromažďuje velké množství dat, které lze použít k zlepšení klasifikátorů sémantických vztahů. Data nás také široce informují o tom, jak lidé vnímají vztahy mezi slovy a poskytují užitečné poznatky pro výzkum v psychologii a lingvistice.', 'et': 'Semantiliste suhete teadmised on loodusliku keele mõistmiseks otsustava tähtsusega. Me tutvustame "KnowYourNyms?" veebipõhine mäng semantiliste suhete õppimiseks. Pakkudes kasutajatele kaasavat kogemust, kogub rakendus suurt hulka andmeid, mida saab kasutada semantiliste suhete klassifitseerijate parandamiseks. Andmed annavad meile laialdaselt teavet ka sellest, kuidas inimesed tajuvad sõnadevahelisi suhteid, pakkudes kasulikke ülevaateid psühholoogia ja lingvistika uurimiseks.', 'fi': 'Semanttinen suhdetieto on ratkaisevan tärkeää luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämiselle. Esittelemme KnowYourNyms? Internet-pohjainen peli semanttisten suhteiden oppimiseen. Samalla kun sovellus tarjoaa käyttäjille mukaansatempaavan kokemuksen, se kerää suuria määriä dataa, jota voidaan käyttää semanttisten suhteiden luokittelijoiden parantamiseen. Aineisto kertoo laajasti myös siitä, miten ihmiset näkevät sanojen väliset suhteet, tarjoten hyödyllistä tietoa psykologian ja kielitieteen tutkimukseen.', 'az': 'Semantik ilişki bilgi təbiətli dil anlama üçün çox mövcuddur. Biz "Özünüzü tanıyırsınız?" semantik ilişkileri öyrənmək üçün web tabanlı oyun. İstifadəçiləri təcrübə edərkən, proqramın semantik ilişkiləri daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edilə biləcək böyük məlumatları toplar. Məlumatlar da bizi psikoloji və dil istiqamətlərində araşdırmaq üçün faydalı görüş göstərir.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kelas karo kesalaman sing dikarepaké kanggo kelas pribadi. Awak dhéwé nggunaké "Ngerti-Nym ?" Dolanan sing basa web nganggo kelas semanti politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awakdhéwé éntuk wong mengko awak dhéwé piye perkaran wong liya karo perkaran langkung sampeyan wigat, nggawe ngubah urip bantuan kanggo resampungan kelas karo perusahaan langkung.', 'sk': 'Znanje o semantičnih odnosih je ključnega pomena za razumevanje naravnega jezika. Predstavljamo vam "KnowYourNyms"? spletna igra za učenje semantičnih odnosov. Medtem ko uporabnikom zagotavlja privlačno izkušnjo, aplikacija zbira velike količine podatkov, ki jih je mogoče uporabiti za izboljšanje klasifikatorjev semantičnih relacij. Podatki nas na splošno obveščajo tudi o tem, kako ljudje dojemajo odnose med besedami, kar zagotavlja koristne vpoglede za raziskave psihologije in jezikoslovja.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཆེན་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་“KnowYourNyms”སྐད་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན་ནམ། སྔོན་ལྟར་འབྲེལ་བ་ཤེས་པའི་དྲ་རྩེད་ལ་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་རྩེད། སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་تجربད་ཞིག་བྱིན་པའི་སྐབས་ལ། ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཚད་ཆེ་རུ་སྒྲིག་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས། མི་མང་གིས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཉན་པའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།', 'ha': 'Jami\'a na Semantic yana da muhimu ga fahimtar harshe na natsi. Munã ƙara "Yasan YourNym?", game da ke kan kwamfyuta ta samun mutane. Waka da ke bãyar da masu amfani da shirin haɗi, shirin ayuka yana samun duk yawan data mai girma wanda za\'a yi amfani da su dõmin ya improve fasalarari masu haɗi na semantic. Kayya, data yana gaya mana yadda mutane ke fahimta danganta a tsakanin maganar, kuma yana da gannai masu amfani ga tafarkin a cikin aikoloji da linguistic.', 'he': 'ידע מערכת יחסים סמנטית הוא קריטי להבנת שפה טבעית. אנחנו מציגים "KnowYourNyms?", משחק מבוסס באינטרנט ללמוד יחסים סמנטיים. בזמן שסיפק למשתמשים ניסיון מעורב, היישומים אוספים כמויות גדולות של נתונים שיכולים להשתמש בשיפור מערכות יחסים סמנטיות. הנתונים מיידעו אותנו גם באופן רחב על איך אנשים מתייחסים למערכת יחסים בין מילים, מספקים תובנות שימושיות למחקר בפסיכולוגיה ולשפתית.'}
{'en': 'The Projector : An Interactive Annotation Projection Visualization Tool', 'ar': 'جهاز العرض: أداة تصور عرض التعليقات التوضيحية التفاعلية', 'es': 'El proyector: una herramienta interactiva de visualización de proyecciones de anotaciones', 'pt': 'O Projetor: Uma Ferramenta de Visualização de Projeção de Anotação Interativa', 'fr': "Le projecteur\xa0: un outil interactif de visualisation de projection d'annotations", 'zh': '投影仪:交互式注记投影可视化器', 'ja': 'プロジェクター：インタラクティブアノテーションプロジェクション視覚化ツール', 'hi': 'प्रोजेक्टर: एक इंटरैक्टिव एनोटेशन प्रोजेक्शन विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन उपकरण', 'ru': 'Проектор: Интерактивный инструмент визуализации проекции аннотаций', 'ga': 'An Teilgeoir: Uirlis Amharcléirithe Teilgean Anótála Idirghníomhach', 'hu': 'A projektor: Interaktív megjegyzések kivetítési eszköz', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ο προβολέας: Ένα διαδραστικό εργαλείο απεικόνισης προβολής σχολίων', 'lt': 'Projektorius: sąveikus annotacijos projektavimo vizualizavimo įrankis', 'it': 'Il proiettore: uno strumento interattivo di visualizzazione della proiezione di annotazioni', 'mk': 'Проекторот: Интерактивна алатка за визуализација на проектирање на анатации', 'kk': 'Проектор: Интерактивті жазбаларды көрсету құралы', 'ms': 'Projektor: Alat Visualisasi Projeksi Annotasi Interaktif', 'ml': 'പദ്ധതി', 'mt': 'Il-Proġettatur: Għodda ta’ Viżwalizzazzjoni tal-Proġettazzjoni ta’ Annotazzjoni Interattiva', 'no': 'Prosjektoren: Visualiseringsverktøyet for interaktiv merking', 'mn': 'Проектор: Interactive Annotation Projection Visualization Tool', 'pl': 'Projektor: Interaktywne narzędzie do wizualizacji projekcji anotacji', 'ro': 'Proiectorul: un instrument interactiv de vizualizare a proiecției de adnotări', 'si': 'ව්\u200dයාපෘතිකරණය: අන්තර්භාවිත ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විස්තර කරන්න උපකරණය', 'so': 'Projector: Tool la seekero Interactive Annotation Projection Tool', 'sr': 'Projektor: Interaktivni instrument za vizualizaciju proizvodnje annotacije', 'sv': 'Projektorn: Ett interaktivt verktyg för visning av anteckningar', 'ta': 'திட்டப்பணி', 'ur': 'پروژیکٹر: ایک انٹراکسٹیو انٹرایٹ پراژیکشن ویزولیزی ابزار', 'uz': 'The Projector: An Interactive Annotation Projection Visualization Tool', 'vi': 'Phát dẫn: công cụ cắt mục tương tác', 'bg': 'Проекторът: Интерактивен инструмент за визуализация на проекция за анотация', 'hr': 'Projektor: Interaktivni instrument za vizualizaciju proizvodnje annotacije', 'da': 'Projektoren: Et interaktivt projektionsværktøj til visualisering af annoncer', 'nl': 'De projector: een interactieve annotatie projectie visualisatie tool', 'de': 'Der Projektor: Ein interaktives Werkzeug zur Visualisierung von Annotationen', 'ko': '프로젝터: 대화형 주석 투영 시각화 도구', 'id': 'Projektor: Alat Visualisasi Projeksi Annotasi Interaktif', 'fa': 'پروژوگر: یک ابزار ویژه\u200cسازی توضیح مصاحبه\u200cای', 'sw': 'Mradi: Kifaa cha Kuonyesha Mradi wa Kutangaza Kuhusika', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Projektori: Një mjet i vizualizimit të Projektit të Anotacionit Interaktiv', 'tr': 'Projektör:Bir Etkileşimli Açıklama Projekti Görselleştirme Aracı', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Պրոյեկտոր. Ինտերակտիվ նանոտացիայի նախագծման վիզուալիզացիայի գործիք', 'az': 'Proyektör: İnteraktif Annotation Projection Visualization Tool', 'bn': 'প্রজেক্টর: একটি ইন্টার্কেটিভ অ্যানোটেশন প্রজেক্টেশন দেখানোর টুল', 'bs': 'Projektor: Interaktivni instrument za vizualizaciju proizvodnje annotacije', 'cs': 'Projektor: Interaktivní nástroj pro vizualizaci projekcí anotací', 'ca': "El projector: Una eina de visualització interactiva del projecte d'anotació", 'et': 'Projektor: interaktiivne annotatsiooni projektsiooni visualiseerimise tööriist', 'fi': 'Projektori: Interaktiivinen huomautus Projektion visualisointityökalu', 'jv': 'Projector:', 'sk': 'Projektor: Interaktivno orodje za vizualizacijo projekcije z opombami', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'The Projector: An Interactive Annotation Projection Visualization Tool', 'bo': 'འཆར་སྐྱོང་པ་：སྒྲ་ཚུལ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་འཆར་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་ལག་ཆ་'}
{'en': 'Previous works proposed annotation projection in parallel corpora to inexpensively generate treebanks or propbanks for new languages. In this approach, linguistic annotation is automatically transferred from a resource-rich source language (SL) to translations in a target language (TL). However, annotation projection may be adversely affected by translational divergences between specific language pairs. For this reason, previous work often required careful qualitative analysis of projectability of specific annotation in order to define strategies to address quality and coverage issues. In this demonstration, we present THE PROJECTOR, an interactive GUI designed to assist researchers in such analysis : it allows users to execute and visually inspect annotation projection in a range of different settings. We give an overview of the GUI, discuss use cases and illustrate how the tool can facilitate discussions with the research community.', 'fr': "Des travaux antérieurs proposaient la projection d'annotations dans des corpus parallèles afin de générer à peu de frais des banques d'arbres ou des banques de propbanks pour de nouvelles langues. Dans cette approche, l'annotation linguistique est automatiquement transférée d'une langue source (SL) riche en ressources vers des traductions dans une langue cible (TL). Cependant, la projection des annotations peut être affectée négativement par les divergences de traduction entre des paires de langues spécifiques. Pour cette raison, les travaux antérieurs nécessitaient souvent une analyse qualitative minutieuse de la projetabilité d'une annotation spécifique afin de définir des stratégies pour résoudre les problèmes de qualité et de couverture. Dans cette démonstration, nous présentons THE PROJECTOR, une interface graphique interactive conçue pour aider les chercheurs dans de telles analyses\xa0: elle permet aux utilisateurs d'exécuter et d'inspecter visuellement des projections d'annotations dans différents paramètres. Nous donnons un aperçu de l'interface graphique, discutons de cas d'utilisation et illustrons comment l'outil peut faciliter les discussions avec la communauté des chercheurs.", 'es': 'Trabajos anteriores propusieron la proyección de anotaciones en corpus paralelos para generar bancos de árboles o bancos de propbanks para nuevos lenguajes de manera económica. En este enfoque, la anotación lingüística se transfiere automáticamente de un idioma de origen (SL) rico en recursos a traducciones en un idioma de destino (TL). Sin embargo, la proyección de anotaciones puede verse afectada negativamente por las divergencias de traducción entre pares de idiomas específicos. Por esta razón, el trabajo anterior a menudo requería un análisis cualitativo cuidadoso de la capacidad de proyección de anotaciones específicas para definir estrategias para abordar los problemas de calidad y cobertura. En esta demostración, presentamos THE PROJECTOR, una GUI interactiva diseñada para ayudar a los investigadores en dicho análisis: permite a los usuarios ejecutar e inspeccionar visualmente la proyección de anotaciones en una variedad de configuraciones diferentes. Ofrecemos una visión general de la GUI, discutimos casos de uso e ilustramos cómo la herramienta puede facilitar las discusiones con la comunidad investigadora.', 'ar': 'اقترحت الأعمال السابقة الإسقاط التوضيحي في مجموعات موازية لإنشاء ضفاف أشجار أو دعامات للغات جديدة بتكلفة زهيدة. في هذا النهج ، يتم نقل التعليقات التوضيحية اللغوية تلقائيًا من لغة مصدر غنية بالموارد (SL) إلى الترجمات في اللغة الهدف (TL). ومع ذلك ، قد يتأثر إسقاط التعليقات التوضيحية سلبًا بالاختلافات الترجمية بين أزواج لغوية معينة. لهذا السبب ، غالبًا ما تطلب العمل السابق تحليلًا نوعيًا دقيقًا لإمكانية إسقاط شرح توضيحي محدد من أجل تحديد الاستراتيجيات لمعالجة قضايا الجودة والتغطية. في هذا العرض التوضيحي ، نقدم جهاز العرض ، وهو واجهة مستخدم رسومية تفاعلية مصممة لمساعدة الباحثين في مثل هذا التحليل: فهي تتيح للمستخدمين تنفيذ إسقاط التعليقات التوضيحية وفحصها بصريًا في مجموعة من الإعدادات المختلفة. نقدم نظرة عامة على واجهة المستخدم الرسومية ، ونناقش حالات الاستخدام ونوضح كيف يمكن للأداة تسهيل المناقشات مع مجتمع البحث.', 'pt': 'Trabalhos anteriores propunham projeção de anotação em corpora paralelos para gerar bancos de árvores ou propbanks de forma barata para novas linguagens. Nesta abordagem, a anotação linguística é automaticamente transferida de um idioma de origem rico em recursos (SL) para traduções em um idioma de destino (TL). No entanto, a projeção da anotação pode ser adversamente afetada por divergências de tradução entre pares de idiomas específicos. Por esta razão, o trabalho anterior muitas vezes exigia uma análise qualitativa cuidadosa da projetabilidade de uma anotação específica, a fim de definir estratégias para abordar questões de qualidade e cobertura. Nesta demonstração, apresentamos o THE PROJECTOR, uma GUI interativa projetada para auxiliar os pesquisadores nessa análise: permite que os usuários executem e inspecionem visualmente a projeção de anotações em uma variedade de configurações diferentes. Damos uma visão geral da GUI, discutimos casos de uso e ilustramos como a ferramenta pode facilitar discussões com a comunidade de pesquisa.', 'ja': '以前の著作では、新しい言語のためのツリーバンクまたはプロップバンクを安価に生成するために、並列コーパでのアノテーション投影を提案していた。このアプローチでは、言語的注釈は、リソース豊富なソース言語（ ＳＬ ）からターゲット言語（ ＴＬ ）の翻訳に自動的に転送される。しかしながら、注釈投影は、特定の言語ペア間の翻訳の乖離によって悪影響を受ける可能性がある。このため、これまでの研究では、品質とカバレッジの問題に対処するための戦略を定義するために、特定の注釈の投影可能性の慎重な定性的分析が必要とされることが多かった。このデモでは、このような分析において研究者を支援するために設計されたインタラクティブなGUIであるプロジェクターを提示します。これにより、ユーザーはさまざまな設定でアノテーションプロジェクションを実行し、視覚的に検査することができます。GUIの概要を説明し、ユースケースについて話し合い、ツールが研究コミュニティとの話し合いを促進する方法を示します。', 'zh': '前事并行语料库中注投影,以廉价为新语生树库propbank。 其法,语言自资 (SL) 传输至 (TL) 译。 然注影或有特定言语乖异之平移。 是以前事往往详定性可预测性,以定覆盖之略。 本演之中,将介投影仪,此一交互式GUI也,指助研究者析之:其许用户列置中行、目视检注投影。 吾概述GUI,论用例,言其器之所以进社区也。', 'hi': 'पिछले कामों ने नई भाषाओं के लिए ट्रीबैंक या प्रोपबैंक्स को सस्ते में उत्पन्न करने के लिए समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट में एनोटेशन प्रक्षेपण का प्रस्ताव दिया। इस दृष्टिकोण में, भाषाई एनोटेशन स्वचालित रूप से संसाधन-समृद्ध स्रोत भाषा (SL) से लक्ष्य भाषा (TL) में अनुवाद करने के लिए स्थानांतरित हो जाता है। हालांकि, एनोटेशन प्रक्षेपण विशिष्ट भाषा जोड़े के बीच ट्रांसलेशनल विचलन से प्रतिकूल रूप से प्रभावित हो सकता है। इस कारण से, पिछले काम को अक्सर गुणवत्ता और कवरेज के मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए रणनीतियों को परिभाषित करने के लिए विशिष्ट एनोटेशन की प्रोजेक्टेबिलिटी के सावधानीपूर्वक गुणात्मक विश्लेषण की आवश्यकता होती है। इस प्रदर्शन में, हम प्रोजेक्टर पेश करते हैं, एक इंटरैक्टिव जीयूआई जो इस तरह के विश्लेषण में शोधकर्ताओं की सहायता करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है: यह उपयोगकर्ताओं को विभिन्न सेटिंग्स की एक श्रृंखला में एनोटेशन प्रक्षेपण को निष्पादित करने और नेत्रहीन निरीक्षण करने की अनुमति देता है। हम जीयूआई का अवलोकन देते हैं, उपयोग के मामलों पर चर्चा करते हैं और बताते हैं कि उपकरण अनुसंधान समुदाय के साथ चर्चा को कैसे सुविधाजनक बना सकता है।', 'ru': 'Предыдущие работы предлагали аннотационную проекцию в параллельных корпусах, чтобы недорого генерировать берега деревьев или пробанки для новых языков. В этом подходе лингвистическая аннотация автоматически переносится с богатого ресурсами исходного языка (SL) на переводы на целевой язык (TL). Однако на проекцию аннотации могут негативно влиять трансляционные расхождения между конкретными языковыми парами. По этой причине предыдущая работа часто требовала тщательного качественного анализа возможности проецирования конкретных аннотаций для определения стратегий решения вопросов качества и охвата. В этой демонстрации мы представляем ПРОЕКТОР, интерактивный графический интерфейс, предназначенный для помощи исследователям в таком анализе: он позволяет пользователям выполнять и визуально проверять аннотационную проекцию в различных настройках. Мы даем обзор GUI, обсуждаем сценарии использования и иллюстрируем, как инструмент может способствовать дискуссиям с исследовательским сообществом.', 'ga': 'Moladh in oibreacha roimhe seo teilgean nótaí i gcorpas comhuaineach chun bainc chrainn nó bainc prop a ghiniúint do theangacha nua gan chostas. Sa chur chuige seo, aistrítear anótáil theangeolaíoch go huathoibríoch ó theanga foinse shaibhir acmhainní (SL) go haistriúcháin i sprioctheanga (TL). Mar sin féin, d’fhéadfadh éagsúlachtaí aistritheacha idir péirí teangacha ar leith cur isteach go diúltach ar theilgean nótaí. Ar an ábhar sin, ba mhinic a theastaigh anailís cháilíochtúil chúramach ar inmheastacht anótála ar leith chun straitéisí a shainiú chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar shaincheisteanna cáilíochta agus clúdaigh. Sa léiriú seo, cuirimid THE PROJECTOR i láthair, GUI idirghníomhach atá deartha chun cabhrú le taighdeoirí anailís den sórt sin: cuireann sé ar chumas úsáideoirí teilgean nótaí a fheidhmiú agus a iniúchadh go radhairc i raon suíomhanna éagsúla. Tugaimid forbhreathnú ar an GUI, pléimid cásanna úsáide agus léirímid conas is féidir leis an uirlis plé a éascú leis an bpobal taighde.', 'hu': 'A korábbi munkák párhuzamos korpuszokkal történő megjegyzések vetítését javasolták, hogy olcsón létrehozzák az új nyelveket. Ezzel a megközelítéssel a nyelvi jegyzékek automatikusan átkerülnek egy erőforrásban gazdag forrásnyelvről (SL) a célnyelven (TL) történő fordításra. A megjegyzések kivetítését azonban hátrányosan befolyásolhatják az egyes nyelvpárok közötti fordítási eltérések. Ezért a korábbi munkák gyakran szükségesek voltak az egyes megjegyzések projektképességének gondos minőségi elemzésére annak érdekében, hogy stratégiákat határozzanak meg a minőségi és lefedettségi kérdések kezelésére. Ebben a bemutatóban bemutatjuk a THE PROJECTOR-t, egy interaktív GUI-t, amelyet arra terveztek, hogy segítse a kutatókat az ilyen elemzésben: lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy végrehajtsák és vizuálisan ellenőrizzék a jegyzetek vetítését különböző beállításokban. Áttekintést adunk a GUI-ról, megvitatjuk a felhasználási eseteket és bemutatjuk, hogy az eszköz hogyan segíthet megbeszéléseket a kutatóközösséggel.', 'el': 'Προηγούμενες εργασίες πρότειναν προβολή σχολίων σε παράλληλα σώματα για την οικονομική δημιουργία δέντρων ή προπύργων για νέες γλώσσες. Σε αυτή την προσέγγιση, η γλωσσική σχολιασμός μεταφέρεται αυτόματα από μια πλούσια σε πόρους γλώσσα προέλευσης (SL) σε μεταφράσεις σε μια γλώσσα-στόχο (TL). Ωστόσο, η προβολή σχολιασμού μπορεί να επηρεαστεί δυσμενώς από μεταφραστικές αποκλίσεις μεταξύ συγκεκριμένων γλωσσικών ζευγαριών. Για το λόγο αυτό, οι προηγούμενες εργασίες συχνά απαιτούσαν προσεκτική ποιοτική ανάλυση της δυνατότητας προβολής συγκεκριμένων σχολίων προκειμένου να καθοριστούν στρατηγικές για την αντιμετώπιση θεμάτων ποιότητας και κάλυψης. Σε αυτή την επίδειξη, παρουσιάζουμε το πρόγραμμα, ένα διαδραστικό περιβάλλον εργασίας σχεδιασμένο για να βοηθήσει τους ερευνητές σε μια τέτοια ανάλυση: επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να εκτελέσουν και να επιθεωρήσουν οπτικά την προβολή σχολίων σε μια σειρά διαφορετικών ρυθμίσεων. Δίνουμε μια επισκόπηση του GUI, συζητάμε περιπτώσεις χρήσης και επεξηγούμε πώς το εργαλείο μπορεί να διευκολύνει τις συζητήσεις με την ερευνητική κοινότητα.', 'ka': 'პარალელი კოპორაში წინასწორი საქმედები წინასწორებული ანოტაციის პროექცია, რომელიც ახალი ენებისთვის შექმნა საბონკები ან პრობანკები. ამ პროგრამაში, ლინგურისტიკური ანოტაცია ავტომატურად რესურსების ბეჭდვილი სახელიდან (SL) მისამართლური ენაში (TL) გადატანა. მაგრამ, ანოტაციის პროექცია შეიძლება განსაზღვრებული ენის ზოგების შორის განსხვავებების განსაზღვრებით განავლენა. ამ მიზეზისთვის, წინა სამუშაო მუშაოდ მოჭირდება განსაკუთრებული ნიოტაციის პროექტიფიური ანალიზაციის მუშაოდ, რომ განსაკუთრება სტრატიგიები, რომლებიც გადასა ამ დემონსტრაციაში ჩვენ პროექტორის გამოსახულებთ, ინტერქექტიური GUI, რომელიც განაზღვრებულია ამ ანალიზაციაში პროექტორის დახმარებისთვის: ეს მომხმარებელი განსხვავებული პარამეტრებში მომხმარე ჩვენ GUI-ს გადავიწყებთ, განსაკუთრებით გამოყენება და ილუსტრატირებით როგორ ხელსაწყოთა შესაძლებელია განსაკუთრებების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებელია სწორე', 'it': "I lavori precedenti proponevano la proiezione di annotazioni in corpi paralleli per generare a buon mercato alberi o propbank per nuovi linguaggi. In questo approccio, l'annotazione linguistica viene trasferita automaticamente da una lingua sorgente ricca di risorse (SL) alle traduzioni in una lingua di destinazione (TL). Tuttavia, la proiezione delle annotazioni può essere influenzata negativamente dalle divergenze traduzionali tra coppie linguistiche specifiche. Per questo motivo, i lavori precedenti hanno spesso richiesto un'attenta analisi qualitativa della progettabilità di annotazioni specifiche al fine di definire strategie per affrontare problemi di qualità e copertura. In questa dimostrazione presentiamo THE PROJECTOR, una GUI interattiva progettata per assistere i ricercatori in tale analisi: consente agli utenti di eseguire e ispezionare visivamente la proiezione di annotazioni in una serie di impostazioni diverse. Diamo una panoramica della GUI, discutiamo casi d'uso e illustriamo come lo strumento può facilitare discussioni con la comunità di ricerca.", 'kk': 'Алдыңғы жұмыс жаңа тілдер үшін жаңа тілдер үшін жаңа тілдерді жасау үшін параллель корпорада жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаң Бұл тәсілде лингвистикалық жазбалар автоматты түрде ресурстар баяны көзінің тілінен (SL) мақсатты тілде аударылған тіліне (TL) аударылады. Бірақ жазбалардың проекциясы бірнеше тіл екеуі арасындағы аудармалы аудармалық аудармалық аудармалық аудармалық қасиеттеріне қарамастырылады. Бұл себебі, алдыңғы жұмыс сапасы мен мәселелерді шешу стратегияларын анықтау үшін керек жазбалардың көптеген көптеген сапалық анализ керек. Бұл демонстрациясында біз ПРОЖЕКТОРды көрсеткіздік. Бұл анализ зерттеушеріне көмектесу үшін құрылған интерактивті графикалық интерактивті графикалық интерактивті графикалық интерактивті графикалық: пайдалану Біз графикалық интерфейстің көзі көрсетіп, оқиғаларды қолдану және құрал зерттеу коммуникасының қалай талқылау мүмкіндігін көмектесуге болады.', 'lt': 'Ankstesniuose darbuose siūloma paralelinėje korporoje sukurti anotacijų projektavimą, kad nebrangiai būtų sukurtos naujų kalbų medienos arba rėmų. In this approach, linguistic annotation is automatically transferred from a resource-rich source language (SL) to translations in a target language (TL).  Tačiau anotacijos prognozės gali būti neigiamai paveiktos vertimo skirtumais tarp konkrečių kalbų porų. Dėl šios priežasties ankstesniame darbe dažnai reikėjo atidžiai kokybiškai analizuoti konkrečių anotacijų prognozuojamumą, kad būtų apibrėžtos strategijos kokybės ir aprėpties klausimams spręsti. Šioje demonstracijoje pristatome PROJEKTORĄ, interaktyvią grafinę sąsają, kuria siekiama padėti mokslininkams atlikti tokią analizę: ji leidžia naudotojams atlikti ir vizualiai tikrinti anotacijos projekciją įvairiose aplinkybėse. Apžvelgiame ŽIB, aptariame naudojimo atvejus ir paaiškiname, kaip priemonė gali palengvinti diskusijas su mokslinių tyrimų bendruomene.', 'mk': 'Претходните дела предложија проекција на анотација во паралелна корпора за нескапо генерирање на дрвја или пробанки за нови јазици. Во овој пристап, јазичната анотација е автоматски пренесена од јазик од извор богат со ресурси (SL) на преводи на јазик на цел (TL). Сепак, проекцијата на анотација може да биде негативно влијана од преведувачките разлики помеѓу специфичните јазички парови. Од оваа причина, претходната работа честопати бараше внимателна квалитетна анализа на проективноста на специфичната анотација со цел да се дефинираат стратегиите за решавање на прашањата на квалитетот и покривањето. Во оваа демонстрација, го претставуваме PROJECTOR, интерактивна графична интерфејс дизајнирана за да им помогне на истражувачите во ваква анализа: овозможува на корисниците да извршат и визуелно да ја инспектираат проекцијата на анотација во различни поставувања. Даваме преглед на ГРИ, разговараме за случаите на употреба и илустрираме како алатката може да ги олесни разговорите со истражувачката заедница.', 'ms': 'Pekerjaan terdahulu mencadangkan projeksi anotasi dalam korpra selari untuk menghasilkan bank pokok atau propbank untuk bahasa baru secara tidak mahal. Dalam pendekatan ini, anotasi bahasa dipindahkan secara automatik dari bahasa sumber kaya sumber (SL) ke terjemahan dalam bahasa sasaran (TL). However, annotation projection may be adversely affected by translational divergences between specific language pairs.  Untuk sebab ini, kerja sebelumnya sering memerlukan analisis kualitatif berhati-hati projeksi anotasi khusus untuk menentukan strategi untuk mengatasi isu kualiti dan penyamaran. Dalam demonstrasi ini, kami memperkenalkan PROJECTOR, GUI interaktif yang direka untuk membantu penyelidik dalam analisis seperti ini: ia membolehkan pengguna untuk melaksanakan dan memeriksa secara visual projeksi anotasi dalam julat tetapan yang berbeza. Kami memberikan pandangan ringkasan bagi GUI, membincangkan kes penggunaan dan memperlihatkan bagaimana alat boleh memudahkan perbincangan dengan komuniti penyelidikan.', 'mt': 'Ix-xogħlijiet preċedenti pproponew projezzjoni ta’ annotazzjoni f’korpra parallela biex jiġġeneraw b’mod mhux għali banek tas-siġar jew banek tas-siġar għal lingwi ġodda. F’dan l-approċċ, l-annotazzjoni lingwistika tiġi trasferita awtomatikament minn lingwa tas-sors rikka fir-riżorsi (SL) għal traduzzjonijiet f’lingwa fil-mira (TL). Madankollu, il-projezzjoni tal-annotazzjoni tista’ tiġi affettwata ħażin minn diverġenzi traduzzjonali bejn pari speċifiċi tal-lingwa. Għal din ir-raġuni, ix-xogħol preċedenti spiss kien jeħtieġ analiżi kwalitattiva bir-reqqa tal-proġettabbiltà ta’ annotazzjoni speċifika sabiex jiġu definiti strateġiji biex jiġu indirizzati kwistjonijiet ta’ kwalità u kopertura. F’din id-dimostrazzjoni, nippreżentaw il-PROĠETTUR, GUI interattiva ddisinjata biex tgħin lir-riċerkaturi f’tali analiżi: tippermetti lill-utenti jeżegwixxu u jispezzjonaw viżwalment il-projezzjoni tal-annotazzjoni f’firxa ta’ ambjenti differenti. We give an overview of the GUI, discuss use cases and illustrate how the tool can facilitate discussions with the research community.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх ажлын хувьд параллель корпора дээр анзаарах төсөөллийг шинэ хэлний хувьд суурь банкууд эсвэл банкууд бий болгох гэсэн санал болгосон. Энэ арга хэлбэрээр хэлний анзаарал автоматаар баян эх үүсвэрийн хэл (SL) дээр зориулагдсан хэл (TL) руу шилжүүлнэ. Гэхдээ хэлний хоорондын хувьд илтгэл таамаглалтын төсөөлөл ямар ч нөлөөтэй байж болно. Ийм шалтгаанаас өмнөх ажлын ажил нь сайн чанар, мэдээллийн асуудлыг тодорхойлдох стратегийг тодорхойлдохын тулд тодорхойлдог тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой шинжилгээ хэрэгтэй. Энэ үзүүлэлт бид Судлаачид ийм шинжилгээнд туслахад зориулсан интерактив GUI проекторыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчид өөр өөр хэмжээсүүд дээр анхаарлаа шалгаж, харах боломж олгодог. Бид GUI-ын талаар ярьж, хэрэгжүүлэлтийг хэрхэн ашиглаж, судалгааны нийгмийн талаар ярилцлага хэрхэн амжилттай болохыг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d പ്രചോദിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പുതിയ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കായി ത്രീബാങ്കുകളോ  ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d, വിഭവസമൃദ്ധിയുള്ള ഉറവിട ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ലക്ഷ്യമായ ഭാഷയിലേക്കുള്ള ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം മാറ്റുന്നു. എന്നാലും പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷയുടെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dപ അതുകൊണ്ട്, മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി പലപ്പോഴും സൂക്ഷ്മമായി പരിശോധിക്കേണ്ടി വന്നിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊജക്റ്റേഷന്റെ പ്രൊജക്റ ഈ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തില്\u200d നാം ദി പ്രൊജെക്ട്രോറിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഇതുപോലുള്ള അന്വേഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നവരെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഒരു ഇന്\u200dറര്\u200dച്ച നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്യൂയിയെ കുറിച്ച് ഒഴിവുകാണിക്കുന്നു, കേസുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഉപകര', 'ro': 'Lucrările anterioare propuneau proiecția adnotării în corpuri paralele pentru a genera în mod ieftin bănci de copac sau propbănci pentru noi limbi. În această abordare, adnotările lingvistice sunt transferate automat dintr-o limbă sursă bogată în resurse (SL) la traduceri într-o limbă țintă (TL). Cu toate acestea, proiecția adnotării poate fi afectată negativ de divergențele traducerii dintre perechile lingvistice specifice. Din acest motiv, lucrările anterioare au necesitat adesea o analiză calitativă atentă a proiectabilității adnotării specifice pentru a defini strategii de abordare a problemelor de calitate și acoperire. În această demonstrație, vă prezentăm THE PROJECTOR, o interfață grafică interactivă concepută pentru a ajuta cercetătorii în astfel de analize: permite utilizatorilor să execute și să inspecteze vizual proiecția adnotărilor într-o serie de setări diferite. Oferim o imagine de ansamblu a GUI-ului, discutăm cazuri de utilizare și ilustrăm modul în care instrumentul poate facilita discuțiile cu comunitatea de cercetare.', 'pl': 'Poprzednie prace proponowały projekcję adnotacji w korpusach równoległych, aby niedrogo generować bazy drzew lub propbanki dla nowych języków. W tym podejściu adnotacja językowa jest automatycznie przenoszona z języka źródłowego bogatego w zasoby (SL) do tłumaczeń w języku docelowym (TL). Jednak projekcja adnotacji może mieć negatywny wpływ na rozbieżności translacyjne między poszczególnymi parami językowymi. Z tego powodu wcześniejsze prace często wymagały starannej analizy jakościowej możliwości projektowania konkretnej adnotacji w celu określenia strategii rozwiązywania problemów jakości i zasięgu. W tym pokazie prezentujemy THE PROJECTOR, interaktywny interfejs graficzny zaprojektowany, aby pomóc naukowcom w takiej analizie: umożliwia użytkownikom wykonywanie i wizualne sprawdzanie projekcji adnotacji w różnych ustawieniach. Podajemy przegląd GUI, omawiamy przypadki użycia i ilustrujemy, w jaki sposób narzędzie może ułatwić dyskusje ze środowiskiem badawczym.', 'no': 'Førre arbeidar foreslått notasjonsprojeksjon i parallelle korpora for å laga treebankar eller propbankar for nye språk. I denne tilnærminga vert linguistiske notasjon automatisk overført frå ein ressursryk kjeldespråk (SL) til omsetjingar i eit målspråk (TL). Merknadsproseksjonen kan imidlertid bli negativt påvirka av translationale forskjeller mellom spesifikke språkport. For dette grunnen krevst tidlegare arbeid ofte forsiktig kvalitative analyse av prosjektet av spesifikke notasjon for å definera strategiar for å handtera kvaliteten og dekkefølgja. I denne demonstrasjonen presenterer vi PROJECTOR eit interaktiv grensesnitt som er lagt til å hjelpa forskere i slike analyser: Det tillater brukarar å køyra og synleg kontrollere annotasjonsproseksjonen i mange ulike innstillingar. Vi gjev eit oversikt over GUI-en, diskuterer bruk av tilfeller og illustrerer korleis verktøyet kan gjere tilgjengelege diskusjonar med forskningssamfunnet.', 'sr': 'Prethodni radovi predložili su projekciju annotacije u paralelnom korporaciji da bi se neprocenjivo stvorili treebanci ili propbanke za nove jezike. U ovom pristupu, lingvistička annotacija se automatski prenosi iz izvornog jezika bogata resursa (SL) na prevode na ciljnom jeziku (TL). Međutim, projekcija annotacije može da se negativno utječe na translativne razlike između određenih jezičkih parova. Zbog ovog razloga, prethodni rad često zahteva pažljivu kvalitativnu analizu projektivnosti specifične annotacije kako bi definisao strategije za rješavanje pitanja kvalitete i pokrivanja. U ovoj demonstraciji predstavljamo PROJEKTOR, interaktivni GUI dizajniran da pomogne istraživačima u takvoj analiziji: omogućava korisnicima da izvrše i vizualno inspekuju projekciju annotacije u nizu različitih nastava. Pregled GUI-a, razgovaramo o slučajevima korištenja i ilustrujemo kako alat može olakšati razgovore sa istraživačkom zajednicom.', 'si': 'මුලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාන්\u200dය කොර්පෝරාවට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා අලුත් භාෂාවට ට්\u200dරීබැන්ක් හෝ ප්\u200dර මෙම විදියට, භාෂාවික කිරීම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණ භාෂාව (SL) වලින් ඉලක්ක භාෂාව (TL) වල නමුත්, විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් අතර විශේෂ වෙනස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළ මේ හේතුවෙන්, කලින් වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ආවරණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්දේශ කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරොජෙක්ටර්ව පෙන්වන්නම්, අන්තර්භාවිත GUI විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ මේ විශේෂණයේදී පරීක්ෂකයන්ට උදව් කරන්න අපි GUI ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නේ, පරීක්ෂණ සමාජයෙන් කොහොමද උපකරණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා පෙන්වන', 'so': "Shaqooyinkii hore waxay horay u soo jeedeen in shirkadda lambarka ah ay si aan hawlgab aheyn u soo dhashaan baalasho ama bangiyo luuqado cusub. Markaas waxaa afka luuqadda lagu soo wareejiyaa luqada luuqada (SL) si ay u turjumaan luqada goal (TL). Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa saameyn ku yeelan kara faa'iido kala duduwan oo u dhexeeya lammaanaha gaarka ah. Sababtaas darteed, shaqada hore wuxuu marar badan u baahan yahay baaritaan aad u taxadar ah oo la sameynayo suurtagalka gaarka ah si uu u caddeeyo qalabka ku saabsan takhasuska la xiriira arrimaha takhasuska iyo daboolka. Muujintan waxaynu soo bandhignaa PROJECTOR, kaas oo ah GUI oo la mid ah oo loo talo galay in lagu caawiyo baaritaanka caymiska caynkaas ah: waxay isticmaalayaasha u ogolaanshaa in ay sameeyaan oo ay aragtida ka baaritaan waxyaabaha la kordhiyo oo ka mid ah xarumaha kala duduwan. Waxaannu ka qornaa warqada GUI, kala sheekaynaynaa xaaladaha isticmaalka, waxaynu caddaynaynaa siduu qalabka caawinayo kala sheekeysiga bulshada waxbarashada.", 'sv': 'Tidigare verk föreslog annoteringsprojektion i parallella korpor för att billigt generera trädbanker eller propbanker för nya språk. I detta tillvägagångssätt överförs språklig notering automatiskt från ett resursrikt källspråk (SL) till översättningar på ett målspråk (TL). Noteringsprojektionen kan dock påverkas negativt av översättningsskillnader mellan specifika språkpar. Av denna anledning krävde tidigare arbeten ofta noggrann kvalitativ analys av projektbarheten hos specifika anteckningar för att definiera strategier för att hantera kvalitets- och täckningsfrågor. I denna demonstration presenterar vi THE PROJECTOR, ett interaktivt GUI utformat för att hjälpa forskare i sådan analys: det gör det möjligt för användare att utföra och visuellt inspektera annoteringsprojektion i en rad olika inställningar. Vi ger en översikt över GUI, diskuterar användningsfall och illustrerar hur verktyget kan underlätta diskussioner med forskarsamhället.', 'ta': 'Previous works proposed annotation projection in parallel corpora to inexpensively generate treebanks or propbanks for new languages.  இந்த செயல்பாட்டில், மொழி அறிவிப்பு தானாகவே மூலத்திலிருந்து செல்லப்படும் மூலத்தின் மொழி( SL) மொழியில் மொழியில் மொழிப ஆனால், அறிவிப்பு திட்டம் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி ஜோடிகளுக்கிடையில் மொழிபெருக்கல் வேறுபாடுகளால் பாதிக இந்த காரணமாக, முந்தைய வேலை பெரும்பாலும் கவனமான குறிப்பிட்ட அறிவிப்பின் திட்டப்பணியின் இயல்பான கவனமான மதிப்பீட்டு ஆய இந்த காட்சியில், நாம் இந்த குறிப்பிட்டில் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், ஒரு interactive GUI ஆராய்ச்சியில் ஆராய்ச்சிகளுக்கு உதவி செய்ய வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: இது பயனர்களை  நாம் GUI காட்சியை கொடுக்கிறோம், நாம் விஷயங்களை பயன்படுத்தி வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் கருவி ஆய்வு சமூகத்தி', 'ur': 'اگلے کام کی پیشنهاد کرتی تھی کہ مشابہ کورپورا میں اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اس طریقے میں، زبان انٹوریسی انٹوریسی انٹوریسی (SL) کو موجود زبان (TL) میں ترجمہ کرنے کی جگہ سے اپنے ساتھ ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ However, annotation projection may be adversely affected by translational differences between specific language pairs. اسی وجہ سے، اگلے کام کثرت سے صریح اظہار کی پروژیکٹیپٹیپٹیپٹیپٹیٹیپٹیٹیپٹی تحلیل کی ضرورت تھی تاکہ کیفیت اور کاوپر مسائل کے بارے میں استراتژی تعریف کریں. اس دکھانے میں ہم نے پروژیکٹر کو پیش کیا ہے، ایک انٹرناکٹی GUI جو اس طرح کی تحقیقات میں پھیرنے والوں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے طراحی کی ہے: یہ کارساز کو مختلف تنظیم کے اندر انٹرناکٹر کی پروژیکٹر کی عملہ اور تصور کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ہم GUI کے بارے میں ایک نظر دیتے ہیں، کاسس استعمال کے بارے میں بحث کرتے ہیں اور بتاتے ہیں کہ ابزار کس طرح تحقیق کمونٹی کے ساتھ بحث آسان کر سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Oldingi vazifalar, parallel kompaniyadagi taʼminlovchi tashkilotni rivojlanadi, yangi tillar uchun treebank yoki propbanks yaratish mumkin. Ushbu usulda, tillar taʼminlovchi manbaning (SL) manzilidan avtomatik tarjima qilinadi. Lekin, taʼminlovchi tashkilotni tasdiqlash mumkin, ma'lum tillar qoʻllari orasidagi tarjima tarjima tarjima tarjima bo'lishi mumkin. Bu sababda, oldingi vazifa doim taʼminlovchi taʼminotni aniqlash kerak. Bu muammolarni o'zgartirish uchun tayyorlarni aniqlash uchun tayyorlarni aniqlash mumkin. Bu tashkilotda, biz o'qituvchilarga yordam beradigan interaktiv GUI'ni PROJECTORni ko'rib chiqaramiz. U foydalanuvchilarni boshqa parametrlarda bajarish va taʼminlovchini ko'rib chiqarish imkoniyatini ruxsat beradi. Biz GUI'ni ko'rib chiqaramiz, narsalarni ishlatamiz va asboblar taʼminlovchi jamiyatlarni qanday talab qilishini foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Những tác phẩm trước đã đề nghị sử dụng trong tính to án song song để cung cấp giá ba hoặc vốn cho ngôn ngữ mới. Trong phương pháp này, ghi chú ngôn ngữ sẽ tự động được chuyển từ ngôn ngữ giàu tài nguyên (SL) sang dịch tại ngôn ngữ đích (TLS). Tuy nhiên, mục ghi chú có thể bị ảnh hưởng từ sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ giữa cặp cụ thể. Vì vậy, các công việc trước đây thường đòi hỏi một cuộc nghiên cứu về tính chất cẩn thận về khả năng dự án của chú thích cụ thể để xác định các chiến lược để giải quyết vấn đề chất lượng và che đậy. Trong cuộc biểu tình này, chúng tôi giới thiệu "The Projector", một GUI tương tác được thiết kế để hỗ trợ các nhà nghiên cứu cho việc phân tích như thế: nó cho phép người dùng thực hiện và giám sát hình ảnh phóng chú thích trong một loạt các thiết lập khác nhau. Chúng tôi cung cấp một thông tin tổng quát về GUI, thảo luận các trường hợp sử dụng và minh họa cách công cụ có thể giúp cuộc thảo luận với cộng đồng nghiên cứu.', 'bg': 'Предишни работи предлагат анотационна проекция в паралелни корпуси за евтино генериране на дървесни банки или пропбанки за нови езици. При този подход лингвистичната анотация автоматично се прехвърля от богат на ресурси изходен език (СЛ) към преводи на целеви език (ТЛ). Проекцията на анотацията обаче може да бъде неблагоприятно повлияна от преводовите различия между конкретните езикови двойки. Поради тази причина предишната работа често изисква внимателен качествен анализ на проектоспособността на конкретна анотация, за да се определят стратегии за решаване на проблемите с качеството и покритието. В тази демонстрация представяме интерактивен графичен интерфейс, предназначен да помогне на изследователите в такъв анализ: той позволява на потребителите да изпълняват и визуално проверяват проекцията на анотацията в диапазон от различни настройки. Представяме преглед на графичния интерфейс, обсъждаме случаи на употреба и илюстрираме как инструментът може да улесни дискусиите с изследователската общност.', 'hr': 'Prethodni radovi predložili su projekciju annotacije u paralelnom korporaciji kako bi se nepošteno proizveli kretanje ili propanci za nove jezike. U tom pristupu, jezička annotacija se automatski prenosi iz izvornog jezika bogata resursa (SL) na prevode na ciljnom jeziku (TL). Međutim, prognoza oznake može biti negativno utjecana na translativne razlike između određenih jezičkih parova. Zbog ovog razloga, prethodni rad često zahtijeva pažljivu kvalitativnu analizu projektivnosti specifične annotacije kako bi se definirala strategije za rješavanje pitanja kvalitete i pokrivanja. U ovom demonstraciji predstavljamo PROJEKTOR, interaktivni građevinski interfejs dizajniran kako bi pomogao istraživačima u takvoj analizi: omogućava korisnicima da izvrše i vizualno provjere projekciju annotacije u nizu različitih nastava. Pregled GUI-a, razgovaramo o slučajevima korištenja i ilustrujemo kako alat može olakšati razgovore s istraživačkom zajednicom.', 'da': "Tidligere værker foreslog annoteringsprojektion i parallelle korpora for billigt at generere træbanker eller propbanker til nye sprog. Ved denne fremgangsmåde overføres sproglig annotation automatisk fra et ressourcerigt kildesprog (SL) til oversættelser på et målsprog (TL). Fremskrivningen af noteringer kan dog påvirkes negativt af oversættelsesmæssige forskelle mellem specifikke sprogpar. Derfor krævede tidligere arbejde ofte omhyggelig kvalitativ analyse af projektabiliteten af specifikke annoteringer for at definere strategier til løsning af kvalitets- og dækningsspørgsmål. I denne demonstration præsenterer vi PROJECTOR, en interaktiv GUI designet til at hjælpe forskere med en sådan analyse: det giver brugerne mulighed for at udføre og visuelt inspicere annoteringsprojektion i en række forskellige indstillinger. Vi giver et overblik over GUI'en, diskuterer brugscases og illustrerer, hvordan værktøjet kan lette diskussioner med forskningsfællesskabet.", 'nl': 'Eerdere werken stelden annotatieprojectie in parallelle corpora voor om goedkoop boombanken of propbanken te genereren voor nieuwe talen. Bij deze aanpak wordt taalkundige annotatie automatisch overgezet van een bronrijke brontaal (SL) naar vertalingen in een doeltaal (TL). Annotatieprojectie kan echter nadelig worden beïnvloed door translationele divergenties tussen specifieke taalparen. Om deze reden vereiste eerdere werkzaamheden vaak een zorgvuldige kwalitatieve analyse van projecteerbaarheid van specifieke annotatie om strategieën te definiëren om kwaliteits- en dekkingskwesties aan te pakken. In deze demonstratie presenteren we THE PROJECTOR, een interactieve GUI ontworpen om onderzoekers te helpen bij dergelijke analyses: het stelt gebruikers in staat annotatieprojectie uit te voeren en visueel te inspecteren in verschillende instellingen. We geven een overzicht van de GUI, bespreken use cases en illustreren hoe de tool discussies met de onderzoeksgemeenschap kan vergemakkelijken.', 'de': 'Frühere Arbeiten schlugen Annotationsprojektionen in parallelen Korpora vor, um kostengünstig Baumbänke oder Propbanken für neue Sprachen zu generieren. Bei diesem Ansatz wird die linguistische Annotation automatisch von einer ressourcenreichen Quellsprache (SL) auf Übersetzungen in eine Zielsprache (TL) übertragen. Die Annotationsprojektion kann jedoch durch translationale Divergenzen zwischen bestimmten Sprachpaaren beeinträchtigt werden. Aus diesem Grund erforderten frühere Arbeiten oft eine sorgfältige qualitative Analyse der Projektierbarkeit spezifischer Annotationen, um Strategien zur Lösung von Qualitäts- und Coverage-Problemen zu definieren. In dieser Demonstration stellen wir THE PROJECTOR vor, eine interaktive Benutzeroberfläche, die Forscher bei solchen Analysen unterstützen soll: Sie ermöglicht es Benutzern, Annotationsprojektionen in verschiedenen Einstellungen auszuführen und visuell zu überprüfen. Wir geben einen Überblick über die GUI, diskutieren Use Cases und veranschaulichen, wie das Tool Diskussionen mit der Forschungsgemeinschaft erleichtern kann.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan sebelumnya mengusulkan proyeksi anotasi dalam corpora paralel untuk menghasilkan batang pohon atau propbank untuk bahasa baru. Dalam pendekatan ini, anotasi bahasa secara otomatis dipindahkan dari bahasa sumber kaya sumber (SL) ke terjemahan dalam bahasa sasaran (TL). Namun, proyeksi anotasi mungkin terpengaruh negatif oleh divergensi terjemahan antara pasangan bahasa spesifik. Untuk alasan ini, pekerjaan sebelumnya sering membutuhkan analisis kualitatif hati-hati proyeksibilitas anotasi spesifik untuk mendefinisikan strategi untuk mengatasi masalah kualitas dan penyamaran. Dalam demonstrasi ini, kami memperkenalkan PROJEKTOR, sebuah GUI interaktif yang dirancang untuk membantu peneliti dalam analisis seperti ini: memungkinkan pengguna untuk mengeksekusi dan memeriksa secara visual proyeksi anotasi dalam jangkauan pengaturan yang berbeda. Kami memberikan overview dari GUI, mendiskusikan kasus penggunaan dan memperlihatkan bagaimana alat dapat memudahkan diskusi dengan komunitas penelitian.', 'fa': 'کارهای قبلی پیشنهاد توضیح دادن اظهار توصیف در شرکت متفاوتی برای تولید کردن پایگاه\u200cهای درخت یا پیشنهاد بانک\u200cهای جدید برای زبان\u200cهای جدید. در این روش، اظهار زبان\u200cشناسی از یک زبان منبع منبع (SL) به ترجمه\u200cهای زبان هدف (TL) به طور خودکار انتقال می\u200cشود. با این حال، تغییرات ترجمه بین جفت\u200cهای زبان خاصی ممکن است اثر گزارش دهد. بخاطر این دلیل، کار قبلی اغلب تحلیل کیفیت دقتی از پیش بینی آگاهی خاص نیاز دارد تا استراتژی\u200cها را برای مشکلات کیفیت و حفاظت تعریف کند. در این نمایش، ما پروژه\u200cکننده را نشان می\u200cدهیم، یک GUI متفاوتی که طراحی شده است تا به محققان در چنین تحلیل کمک کند: این اجازه می\u200cدهد کاربران که پروژه\u200cهای نوشته\u200cها را در مجموعه\u200cی تنظیمات متفاوتی اجرا کنند و بطور تصور کنند. ما یک نظر از GUI را می\u200cدهیم، در مورد پرونده\u200cهای استفاده از پرونده\u200cها بحث می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که چگونه ابزار می\u200cتواند با جامعه تحقیقات بحث را آسان سازی کند.', 'ko': '이전의 작업에서는 새 언어의 트리 라이브러리나 Propbank를 저렴하게 만들기 위해 평행 자료 라이브러리에 주석 투영을 하는 것을 권장했다.이 메서드에서는 리소스가 풍부한 소스 언어(SL)에서 대상 언어(TL)로 언어 주석이 자동으로 번역됩니다.그러나 주석 투영은 특정 언어가 번역 차이에 미치는 불리한 영향을 받을 수 있다.이 때문에 이전의 작업은 일반적으로 특정한 주석의 투영성에 대해 세밀한 정성 분석을 해서 품질과 커버율 문제를 해결하는 전략을 정의해야 했다.이 프레젠테이션에서는 사용자가 다양한 설정에서 주석 투영을 직접 보고 확인할 수 있도록 하는 대화형 GUI를 보여 줍니다.GUI에 대해 간략하게 설명하고 용례에 대해 설명하며 이 도구가 연구 커뮤니티와의 토론을 어떻게 추진하는지 설명했습니다.', 'sq': 'Previous works proposed annotation projection in parallel corpora to inexpensively generate treebanks or propbanks for new languages.  Në këtë qasje, anotacioni gjuhësor transferohet automatikisht nga një gjuhë burimi i pasur me burime (SL) në përkthime në një gjuhë objektive (TL). However, annotation projection may be adversely affected by translational divergences between specific language pairs.  Për këtë arsye, puna e mëparshme shpesh kërkonte analizë të kujdesshme kualitative të parashikueshmërisë së anotacionit të posaçëm me qëllim që të përcaktoheshin strategjitë për të trajtuar çështjet e cilësisë dhe mbulimit. Në këtë demonstrim, ne paraqesim PROJEKTORIN, një GUI interaktive e dizajnuar për të ndihmuar kërkuesit në një analizë të tillë: ajo lejon përdoruesit të ekzekutojnë dhe të inspektojnë vizualisht projektimin e anotacionit në një gamë të ndryshme rregullimesh. Ne japim një përmbledhje të GUI, diskutojmë rastet e përdorimit dhe ilustrojmë se si mjeti mund të lehtësojë diskutimet me komunitetin kërkimor.', 'sw': 'Kazi zilizopita ilipendekeza kuchochea matangazo katika makampuni yanayofanana na kutengeneza mabango ya mitatu au mabango kwa lugha mpya. Katika muktadha huu, taarifa za lugha zinahamasishwa na lugha yenye rasilimali (SL) kwenda kutafsiri katika lugha inayolenga (TL). Hata hivyo, utaratibu wa matangazo unaweza kuathiriwa vibaya na tofauti za kutafsiri kati ya wanandoa wa lugha maalum. Kwa sababu hii, kazi iliyopita mara nyingi imehitaji uchambuzi wa uhakika wa ubunifu wa uchunguzi maalum ili kuelezea mikakati ya kukabiliana na masuala ya ubora na taarifa. Katika maandamano haya, tunawasilisha PROJECTOR, GUI yenye ufanisi wa kati lililolenga kuwasaidia watafiti katika uchambuzi wa namna hiyo: inaruhusu watumiaji kutekeleza na kuchunguza utafiti katika mazingira mbalimbali. Tunatoa maoni ya GUI, kujadili matumizi ya kesi na kuelezea jinsi vifaa vinavyoweza kusaidia mijadala na jamii ya utafiti.', 'af': "Vorige werke voorgestel annotasie projeksie in parallele korpora om onekspensief treebanks of propbanke vir nuwe tale te genereer. In hierdie toegang is lingwisiese notasie outomaties oordra van 'n hulpbron- ryk bron taal (SL) na vertalings in 'n doel taal (TL). Maar, annotasie projeksie kan noodsaaklik be ïnvloor word deur translationale verskillende tussen spesifieke taal paar. Vir hierdie rede het die vorige werk dikwels versigtige kwaliteiteit analiseer van projektiviteit van spesifieke notasie nodig om strategies te definieer om kwaliteit en dekkeningsprobleme te adres. In hierdie demonstrasie, laat ons die PROJECTOR voorsien, 'n interaktiewe GUI ontwerp om resekers in sodanige analisie te help: dit laat gebruikers toe om annotasie projeksie te uitvoer en visualiseer in 'n reek van verskillende instellings te inspekeer. Ons gee 'n oorskou van die GUI, bespreek gebruik gevalle en illustreer hoe die hulpmiddel kan gemeenskap met die ondersoek gemeenskap gemeenskap.", 'am': 'የቀድሞው ሥራ በአዲስ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ተጨማሪ የኢንተርኔት አካባቢ ግንኙነቶችን ወይም አዲስ ቋንቋዎችን ለመፍጠር አቅራቢያ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ጉዳይ፣ ቋንቋው ማስታወሻ አውቶማዊ ከresource-rich source ቋንቋ (SL) ወደ ትርጉም ቋንቋ (TL) ይለውጣል፡፡ ነገር ግን በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች መካከል በተለየ ቋንቋዎች መካከል የተለየ ትርጓሜ እንዲያስጨንቁበት ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህም ምክንያት የቀድሞው ስራ ብዙ ጊዜ የጥያቄ እና የድጋፍ ጉዳዮችን ለመግለጽ ጥያቄን ለመግለጽ ጥያቄን ለመግለጽ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ማስታወቂያው፣ እንደዚህ አስተማሪዎችን ለመረዳት የሚደረገውን የፕሮጀጀክክቶርን ጉዩን እናቀርባለን፤ በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች ውስጥ ተጠቃሚዎችን እንዲያደርጉ እና ማሳየትን እንዲያይ ይችላል፡፡ የGUI ጉዳይ ላይ እናሳየዋለን፣ ጉዳዮችን እናሳውቃለን እና የትምህርት ማኅበረሰብ ጋር ውይይትን እንዴት እንደሚችል እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Անցյալ աշխատանքները առաջարկեցին նատորացիայի պրոեկցիա զուգահեռ կառուցվածքում, որպեսզի անթանկ կերպով ստեղծվի ծառերի հիմնադրամներ կամ նոր լեզուների համար: Այս մոտեցումներում լեզվաբանական annoտացիան ինքնաբերաբար փոխանցվում է ռեսուրսներով հարուստ աղբյուրների լեզվից (ՍԼ) թարգմանություններին նպատակային լեզվով (ՏԼ). Այնուամենայնիվ, annoտացիայի պրոեկցիան կարող է դժվար ազդեցություն ունենալ հատուկ լեզվի զույգերի միջև թարգմանվող տարբերություններից: Այս պատճառով նախորդ աշխատանքը հաճախ անհրաժեշտ էր հատուկ annoտացիայի պրոեկտիվության խելամիտ որակային վերլուծություն, որպեսզի սահմանեն որակի և ծածկության խնդիրների լուծման ռազմավարություններ Այս ցուցադրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք PROPROyeCT-ը, ինտերակտիվ գծային ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակտիվ ինտերակ Մենք համապատասխանում ենք գծային ինտերֆեյսին, քննարկում ենք օգտագործման դեպքերը և ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես է գործիքը կարող հեշտացնել քննարկումները հետազոտող համայնքի հետ:', 'az': "Əvvəlki işlər, paralel korpora təşkil edilmiş annotation projection təşkil edilmişdir ki, yeni dillər üçün çubuqlar və propbanklar yaratmaq üçün təşkil edilmişdir. Bu tərzdə, dil məlumatı (TL) məqsəd dilində qonaqlı mənbə dilindən (SL) tərcümə dilinə avtomatik olaraq göndərilir. Lakin, təkrarlama projeksiyonu təkrarlanan dil çiftlərinin arasındakı təkrarlama təsirlərindən dəyişə bilər. Bu səbəbdən, əvvəlki işlər çox vaxtlı qiyməti və örtük məsələlərini çəkmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş xəbərdarlıqların proyektiv analizi təmin edir. Bu göstərişdə, biz PROJEKTOR'u, bu analizəşdə araştırmacılara kömək etmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş interaktif bir GUI göstərdik: istifadəçiləri fərqli tərzlərdə annotasyon projeksisini fəallaşdırmağa və vizualizə baxmaya imkan verir. Biz GUI barəsində bir nəzər veririk, istifadə etdiyimiz məsələlər mübahisə edir və araşdırma toplumuyla müzakirələrin necə olaraq asanlaşdıracağını göstəririk.", 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী কাজের প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করেছে প্যারালেল কর্পোরায় ত্রিব্যাংক বা নতুন ভাষার জন্য প্রোব্যাংক তৈরি করার জন্ এই ক্ষেত্রে ভাষাগত বিষয়টি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একটি সম্পদ-ধনী উৎস ভাষা থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাষায় অনুবাদ করা হয়েছে (টিএল)। তবে বিশেষ ভাষার জোড়ার মধ্যে অনুবাদের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্রকল্পের ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হতে পারে। এর কারণে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ প্রায়শ সতর্কীকরণ বিশ্লেষণের প্রয়োজন, যাতে তারা মান এবং কাভারেজ বিষয়ের মাধ্যমে নির্ধারণ করার কৌশল ন এই বিক্ষোভের মধ্যে আমরা দি প্রোজেক্টরের উপস্থাপন করছি, যিনি এই ধরনের বিশ্লেষণে গবেষকদের সাহায্য করার জন্য একটি ইন্টারেক্টিভ গুয়েল ডিজাইন করেছেন: এটি ব্যবহারকারীদে আমরা গ্লোবাল ভয়েসেস সম্পর্কে একটি পর্যবেক্ষণ দিয়েছি, কেস ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহার করা এবং ব্যাখ্যা করি কিভাবে এই টুলটি গবেষণা সম্প্', 'bs': 'Prethodni radovi predložili su projekciju annotacije u paralelnom korporaciji kako bi se neprocenjivo stvorili treebanci ili propanci za nove jezike. U tom pristupu, lingvistička annotacija se automatski prenosi iz izvornog jezika bogata resursa (SL) na prevode na ciljnom jeziku (TL). Međutim, projekcija annotacije može biti negativno utjecana na translativne razlike između određenih jezičkih parova. Zbog ovog razloga, prethodni rad često zahtijeva pažljivu kvalitativnu analizu projektivnosti specifične annotacije kako bi se definisao strategije za rješavanje pitanja kvalitete i pokrivanja. U ovom demonstraciji predstavljamo PROJEKTOR, interaktivan grafički interfejs dizajniran da pomogne istraživačima u takvoj analizi: omogućava korisnicima da izvrše i vizualno provjere projekciju annotacije u nizu različitih nastava. Pregled građevinskog interfejsa, razgovaramo o slučajevima korištenja i ilustrujemo kako alat može olakšati razgovore sa istraživačkom zajednicom.', 'ca': "Els treballs anteriors van proposar projecció d'anotació en corpora paral·lela per generar a poc costos bancs d'arbres o bancs de propulsió per les noves llengües. En aquest enfocament, l'anotació lingüística es transfereix automàticament d'una llengua de fonts rica en recursos (SL) a traduccions en una llengua d'objectiu (TL). Però la projecció d'anotació pot ser afectada negativament pels divergències de traducció entre parells de llenguatges específics. Per aquest motiu, la feina anterior sovint necessitava una anàlisi qualitativa cuidadosa de la projectabilitat d'una anotació específica per definir estratègies per abordar problemes de qualitat i cobertura. En aquesta demostració, presentem el PROJECTOR, una IGU interactiva dissenyada per ajudar els investigadors en aquesta an àlisi: permet als usuaris executar i inspeccionar visualment la projecció d'anotació en una gama de configuracions diferents. We give an overview of the GUI, discuss use cases and illustrate how the tool can facilitate discussions with the research community.", 'cs': 'Předchozí práce navrhly anotaci projekci v paralelních korpusech pro levné generování stromových bank nebo propbank pro nové jazyky. Při tomto přístupu je jazyková anotace automaticky přenášena z zdrojového jazyka bohatého na zdroje (SL) do překladů v cílovém jazyce (TL). Avšak anotace projekce může být nepříznivě ovlivněna translačními divergencemi mezi konkrétními jazykovými páry. Z tohoto důvodu předchozí práce často vyžadovala pečlivou kvalitativní analýzu projektovatelnosti konkrétní anotace s cílem definovat strategie řešení problematiky kvality a pokrytí. V této ukázce představujeme THE PROJECTOR, interaktivní GUI navržené tak, aby pomohlo výzkumným pracovníkům při takové analýze: umožňuje uživatelům provádět a vizuálně kontrolovat projekci anotací v řadě různých nastavení. Podáváme přehled GUI, diskutujeme případy užití a ilustrujeme, jak může nástroj usnadnit diskusi s výzkumnou komunitou.', 'et': 'Varasemad tööd pakkusid välja annotatsiooniprojektsiooni paralleelsetes korpustes, et luua odavalt puupanke või propbanke uutele keeltele. Selles lähenemisviisis kantakse keeleline annotatsioon automaatselt üle ressursirikkast lähtekeelest (SL) sihtkeelde (TL). Anotatsiooniprojektsiooni võivad siiski negatiivselt mõjutada konkreetsete keelepaaride tõlkimise erinevused. Sel põhjusel nõudis varasem töö sageli konkreetsete märkuste projektivõime hoolikat kvalitatiivset analüüsi, et määratleda strateegiad kvaliteedi- ja katvusküsimuste lahendamiseks. Selles demonstratsioonis tutvustame THE PROJECTOR, interaktiivset GUI, mis on mõeldud teadlaste abistamiseks sellises analüüsis: see võimaldab kasutajatel teostada ja visuaalselt kontrollida annotatsiooni projektsiooni erinevates seadetes. Anname ülevaate graafilisest kasutajaliidesest, arutame kasutusjuhtumeid ja illustreerime, kuidas tööriist saab lihtsustada arutelusid teadusringkonnaga.', 'fi': 'Aiemmat työt ehdottivat annotointiprojektiota rinnakkaiskorpusissa, jotta ne tuottaisivat edullisesti puupankkeja tai proppankkeja uusille kielille. Tässä lähestymistavassa kielelliset merkinnät siirtyvät automaattisesti resurssirikkaasta lähdekielestä (SL) kohdekielelle (TL). Tiettyjen kieliparien väliset käännösvirheet voivat kuitenkin vaikuttaa kielteisesti annotointiprojektioon. Tästä syystä aiempi työ vaati usein tarkkaa laadullista analyysiä tiettyjen merkintöjen projektikelpoisuudesta, jotta voitaisiin määritellä strategioita laatu- ja kattavuuskysymysten käsittelemiseksi. Esittelyssä esitellään THE PROJECTOR, interaktiivinen käyttöliittymä, joka on suunniteltu auttamaan tutkijoita tällaisessa analyysissä: sen avulla käyttäjät voivat suorittaa ja visuaalisesti tarkastaa merkintöjen projisoinnin eri asetuksissa. Annamme yleiskuvan graafisesta käyttöliittymästä, keskustelemme käyttötapauksista ja havainnollistamme, miten työkalu voi helpottaa keskustelua tutkimusyhteisön kanssa.', 'tr': "Öňki işlerde parallel korpora sahypasynda agaç çykyşlary ýa-da täze diller üçin banklary döretmäge teklip etdiler. Bu ýagdaýda, lingwistiki täzelikler (SL) resurslardan baý çeşme dilinden (TL) terjime edilýär. Ýöne, sözleşme zamany belli dil çiftleri arasynda terjime edilen täsirlerden täsirli täsirli bolup biler. Şol sebäpli, öňki işiň kän wagtlaryň üstünlik we ördek meselelerini çözmek üçin ýüze çykmak üçin örän wajyplyklary ahyrlygyny maslahat etmesi üçin örän wajyplyk analyzasyna gerek. Bu demonstratorda biz PROJEKTOR'y görkezip, barlagçylara beýleki düzenlerde kömek etmek üçin tasarlanýan interaktiw bir GUI görkezip berýäris: Ullançylaryň üýtgeşmelerini başga düzenlerde a ýratyn suratyny bejermek we görnüşdirmegi mümkin edýär. Biz GUI barada pikir edip, durumlary ulanyp taryşýarys we çykyş jemgyýeti bilen nähili çykyş edip biljekdigini görkez.", 'jv': 'Wurung previous Nang jejer-jejer iki, populasyon langgar kang dipunangke ditambah menyang kelas (SL) kanggo terjamahan ning langa sing dikarepaké (T L). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Erenong iki, akeh sing langkung wigat akeh nyong nggawe geraksi dadi paten kanggo langkung pawarno kanggo nggawe staji kanggo nggawe kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno kalitas karo pangunakno Nang daemongke iki, kéné mengko KETOR (PILOYKET), grah interactive grah dumateng kanggo ngubah cercetahane kanggo anu nggunakake perangkat wih-wih: iso disenyakake bener kang ngubah akeh iso nggunakake lan iso nglanggar aturan anyar neng sampek anyar neng cah-sampek. Awakdhéwé mengko nggawe barang kanggo nggunakake tarjamahan kanggo nyeasahan barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe komunitas resmi.', 'sk': 'Prejšnja dela so predlagala projekcijo označevanja v vzporednih korpusih, da bi poceni ustvarila drevesne banke ali propbanke za nove jezike. Pri tem pristopu se jezikovna opomba samodejno prenese iz izvornega jezika (SL), bogatega z viri, v prevode v ciljni jezik (TL). Vendar pa lahko prevajalske razlike med posameznimi jezikovnimi pari negativno vplivajo na projekcijo označevanja. Zato so predhodna dela pogosto zahtevala skrbno kvalitativno analizo projektnosti posebnih opomb, da bi se opredelile strategije za obravnavanje vprašanj kakovosti in pokritosti. V tej predstavitvi predstavljamo THE PROJECTOR, interaktivni grafični vmesnik, namenjen pomoči raziskovalcem pri takšni analizi: uporabnikom omogoča izvedbo in vizualni pregled projekcije opomb v različnih nastavitvah. Podamo pregled grafičnega vmesnika, razpravljamo o primerih uporabe in ponazarjamo, kako lahko orodje olajša razprave z raziskovalno skupnostjo.', 'ha': "Banner page In this approach, linguistic annotation is automatically transferred from a resource-rich source language (SL) to translations in a target language (TL).  A lokacin da, kunnufi na zartar da fassarar-farin gauranci tsakanin sauran da aka ƙayyade. Daga wannan, aikin da aka riga ya ƙayyade yin sauri, ana ƙayyade analyi mai lissafa wa muhimmanci wa masu basĩri masu ƙayyade, dõmin ya bayyana kimar da za'a yi amfani da masu tsari da kuma rufe masu sakan. Daga wannan shirin da Muke halatar da PROJEctOR, wata GUI na tsakiya dõmin ya taimaki watafiti cikin wannan anayyar: yana yarda da wasu mãsu amfani da shi da za'a zartar da shi kuma ka gane abubuwa masu cikin wasu shiryoyin dabam-dabam. Muna sami surori na GUI, kuma Muke jãyayya abubuwa masu amfani da shiryoyin ayuka kuma Mu bayyana bayani yadda zanen iya amfani da jãyayya da jamii-barabara.", 'he': 'Previous works proposed annotation projection in parallel corpora to inexpensively generate treebanks or propbanks for new languages.  באמצעות הגישה הזו, הערות שפתית הועברה באופן אוטומטי משפה מקור עשירה במקורים (SL) לתרגום בשפה המטרה (TL). עם זאת, פרוייקציה של הערות יכולה להשפיע בצורה לא טובה על ידי ההבדלים התרגמים בין זוגות שפות ספציפיות. מסיבה זו, עבודה קודמת דורשת לעתים קרובות ניתוח איכותי זהיר של ניתוח צפוי של ציון ספציפי כדי להגדיר אסטרטגיות להתמודד עם בעיות איכות וכיסוי. בהדגמה הזאת, אנו מציגים את הפרויקטור, GUI אינטראקטיבי, המתכנן כדי לסייע למחקרים בניתוח כזה: זה מאפשר למשתמשים להוציא להורג ולבדוק באופן חזותי את פרוייקציה של הערות במערכת מסויימות שונות. אנו נותנים תצוגה כללית של האינטרנט הגרפי, מדברים על מקרי השימוש ולהראות איך הכלי יכול להקל דיון עם קהילת המחקר.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་ཚོར་བ་དང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཁང་གི་མཐུན་ཁང་གི་གསལ་སྟོན་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན་ཕན་འབྲས་མེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས ཡིན་ནའང་། འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་འགྱུར་འགྲོས་ཀྱིས་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་དང་། འདི་ལ་བརྟེན། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་རྒྱུན་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རིམ་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་དག་ཡོད། In this demonstration, we present The PROJECTOR, an interactive GUI designed to assist researchers in such analysis: it allows users to execute and visually inspect annotation projection in a range of different settings. ང་ཚོས་GUI་གི་དོན་ཚན་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Interactive Visualization for Linguistic Structure', 'ar': 'التصور التفاعلي للبنية اللغوية', 'es': 'Visualización interactiva para la estructura lingüística', 'pt': 'Visualização interativa para estrutura linguística', 'fr': 'Visualisation interactive pour la structure linguistique', 'ja': '言語構造のインタラクティブ可視化', 'hi': 'भाषाई संरचना के लिए इंटरैक्टिव विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन', 'zh': '言语结构之交互式可视化', 'ru': 'Интерактивная визуализация для лингвистической структуры', 'ga': 'Amharcléiriú Idirghníomhach don Struchtúr Teangeolaíoch', 'hu': 'Interaktív megjelenítés a nyelvi struktúrához', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διαδραστική απεικόνιση γλωσσολογικής δομής', 'it': 'Visualizzazione interattiva per la struttura linguistica', 'kk': 'Linguistic құрылғының интерактивті визуализациясы', 'lt': 'Interaktinis kalbos struktūros vizualizavimas', 'mk': 'Интерактивна визуализација за јазичката структура', 'mn': 'Холбооны бүтцийн интерактив үзүүлэлт', 'ml': 'ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക് സ്ട്രാക്ട്രൂക്ടിക്കിനുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200dവെക്റ്റിവേഷന്\u200d കാണിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Visualisasi Interaktif untuk Struktur Bahasa', 'mt': 'Viżwalizzazzjoni Interattiva għall-Istruttura Lingwistika', 'no': 'Interaktiv visualisering for lingsstruktur', 'sr': 'Интерактивна визуализация за лингвистичну структуру', 'pl': 'Interaktywna wizualizacja struktury językowej', 'ro': 'Vizualizare interactivă pentru structura lingvistică', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Interactive Visualisation for Linguistic structure', 'sv': 'Interaktiv visualisering för språklig struktur', 'ta': 'இணைப்பு அமைப்புக்கான இடைவெளி பார்வை', 'ur': 'Linguistic Structure کے لئے انٹراکسٹی ویزولیزا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự phân biệt ngôn ngữ học', 'bg': 'Интерактивна визуализация на езиковата структура', 'da': 'Interaktiv visualisering af sproglig struktur', 'nl': 'Interactieve visualisatie voor taalkundige structuur', 'hr': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija Lingističke strukture', 'id': 'Visualisasi Interaktif untuk Struktur Bahasa', 'ko': '언어 구조의 상호작용식 시각화', 'de': 'Interaktive Visualisierung für sprachliche Strukturen', 'fa': 'تصویر مشاهده\u200cای برای ساختار لینگیستیک', 'sw': 'Interactive Visualization for Linguistic Structure', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk strukturasy üçin etkileşimli Görnöşim', 'sq': 'Visualizimi interaktiv për strukturën gjuhësore', 'am': 'Interactive Visualization for Linguistic Structure', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Լեզուական կառուցվածքի ինտերակտիվ վիզուալիզացիան', 'az': 'Linguistik Qurğuları üçün Interaktiv Görünüş', 'bn': 'লিঙ্গিস্টিক কাঠামোর জন্য ইন্টারেক্টিভ ভ ভিউালেশন', 'bs': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija Lingističke strukture', 'ca': "Visualització interactiva per a l'estructura lingüística", 'et': 'Keelestruktuuri interaktiivne visualiseerimine', 'cs': 'Interaktivní vizualizace jazykové struktury', 'fi': 'Kielellisen rakenteen vuorovaikutteinen visualisointi', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'Interactive Visualization for Linguistic Structure', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija jezikovne strukture', 'bo': 'Interactive Visualization for Linguistic Structure'}
{'en': 'We provide a visualization library and web interface for interactively exploring a parse tree or a forest of parses. The library is not tied to any particular linguistic representation, but provides a general-purpose API for the interactive exploration of hierarchical linguistic structure. To facilitate rapid understanding of a complex structure, the API offers several important features, including expand / collapse functionality, positional and color cues, explicit visual support for sequential structure, and dynamic highlighting to convey node-to-text correspondence.', 'ar': 'نحن نقدم مكتبة تصور وواجهة ويب للاستكشاف التفاعلي لشجرة التحليل أو غابة من التحليلات. لا ترتبط المكتبة بأي تمثيل لغوي معين ، ولكنها توفر واجهة برمجة تطبيقات للأغراض العامة للاستكشاف التفاعلي للهيكل اللغوي الهرمي. لتسهيل الفهم السريع للهيكل المعقد ، تقدم API العديد من الميزات المهمة ، بما في ذلك وظيفة التوسيع / الانهيار ، والإشارات الموضعية واللون ، والدعم المرئي الواضح للهيكل المتسلسل ، والتمييز الديناميكي لنقل المراسلات من العقدة إلى النص.', 'es': 'Proporcionamos una biblioteca de visualización y una interfaz web para explorar interactivamente un árbol de análisis o un bosque de análisis sintáctico. La biblioteca no está vinculada a ninguna representación lingüística en particular, pero proporciona una API de propósito general para la exploración interactiva de la estructura lingüística jerárquica. Para facilitar la comprensión rápida de una estructura compleja, la API ofrece varias funciones importantes, incluida la funcionalidad de expandir/contraer, indicaciones posicionales y de color, soporte visual explícito para la estructura secuencial y resaltado dinámico para transmitir correspondencia de nodo a texto.', 'fr': "Nous fournissons une bibliothèque de visualisation et une interface Web pour explorer de manière interactive un arbre d'analyse ou une forêt d'analyses. La bibliothèque n'est liée à aucune représentation linguistique particulière, mais fournit une API polyvalente pour l'exploration interactive de la structure linguistique hiérarchique. Pour faciliter la compréhension rapide d'une structure complexe, l'API offre plusieurs fonctionnalités importantes, notamment une fonctionnalité d'agrandissement et de réduction, des repères de position et de couleur, une prise en charge visuelle explicite de la structure séquentielle et une mise en évidence dynamique pour transmettre une correspondance node-texte.", 'pt': 'Fornecemos uma biblioteca de visualização e uma interface da web para explorar interativamente uma árvore de análise ou uma floresta de análises. A biblioteca não está vinculada a nenhuma representação linguística específica, mas fornece uma API de uso geral para a exploração interativa da estrutura linguística hierárquica. Para facilitar a compreensão rápida de uma estrutura complexa, a API oferece vários recursos importantes, incluindo funcionalidade de expansão/redução, sugestões de posicionamento e cores, suporte visual explícito para estrutura sequencial e realce dinâmico para transmitir correspondência de nó para texto.', 'ja': 'パースツリーまたはパースの森をインタラクティブに探索するための視覚化ライブラリとウェブインターフェイスを提供します。ライブラリは、特定の言語表現に結びついていませんが、階層言語構造のインタラクティブな探索のための汎用APIを提供します。複雑な構造の迅速な理解を容易にするために、APIは、拡張/折りたたみ機能、位置およびカラーキュー、シーケンシャル構造の明示的な視覚的サポート、ノード間の対応を伝達するための動的ハイライトなど、いくつかの重要な機能を提供します。', 'zh': '供一可视化库 Web 界面,交互式索解析树解析林。 该库不赖特定言,而给一通API,以重交互式索。 便于速解杂构,API 供数要,展/叠、位、色、序、显式、视、传节点、文本之动。', 'hi': 'हम इंटरैक्टिव रूप से एक पार्स पेड़ या पार्स के एक जंगल की खोज के लिए एक विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन लाइब्रेरी और वेब इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करते हैं। पुस्तकालय किसी विशेष भाषाई प्रतिनिधित्व से बंधा नहीं है, लेकिन पदानुक्रमित भाषाई संरचना के इंटरैक्टिव अन्वेषण के लिए एक सामान्य उद्देश्य एपीआई प्रदान करता है। एक जटिल संरचना की तेजी से समझ को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए, एपीआई कई महत्वपूर्ण विशेषताएं प्रदान करता है, जिसमें विस्तार / पतन कार्यक्षमता, स्थितिगत और रंग संकेत, अनुक्रमिक संरचना के लिए स्पष्ट दृश्य समर्थन, और नोड-टू-टेक्स्ट पत्राचार को व्यक्त करने के लिए गतिशील हाइलाइटिंग शामिल हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы предоставляем библиотеку визуализации и веб-интерфейс для интерактивного изучения дерева синтаксического анализа или леса синтаксического анализа. Библиотека не привязана к какому-либо конкретному лингвистическому представлению, но предоставляет API общего назначения для интерактивного исследования иерархической лингвистической структуры. Чтобы облегчить быстрое понимание сложной структуры, API предлагает несколько важных функций, включая функциональность расширения/сворачивания, позиционные и цветовые подсказки, явную визуальную поддержку последовательной структуры и динамическое выделение для передачи соответствия между узлами и текстом.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid leabharlann léirshamhlaithe agus comhéadan gréasáin ar fáil chun crann parsála nó foraoise parsanna a iniúchadh go hidirghníomhach. Níl an leabharlann ceangailte le haon léiriú teangeolaíoch ar leith, ach cuireann sí API ilfhóinteach ar fáil le haghaidh iniúchadh idirghníomhach ar struchtúr ordlathach teangeolaíoch. Chun tuiscint mhear ar struchtúr casta a éascú, cuireann an API gnéithe tábhachtacha éagsúla ar fáil, lena n-áirítear feidhmiúlacht leathnaithe/laghdaithe, leideanna suímh agus datha, tacaíocht amhairc shainráite do struchtúr seicheamhach, agus aibhsiú dinimiciúil chun comhfhreagras nód-go-téacs a chur in iúl.', 'hu': 'Vizualizációs könyvtárat és webes felületet biztosítunk egy elemzőfa vagy egy elemzőerdő interaktív felfedezéséhez. A könyvtár nem kapcsolódik semmilyen nyelvi ábrázoláshoz, hanem általános célú API-t biztosít a hierarchikus nyelvi struktúra interaktív feltárásához. A komplex struktúra gyors megértésének megkönnyítése érdekében az API számos fontos funkciót kínál, beleértve a kiterjesztési/összeomlási funkciót, a pozíciós és színes jeleket, a szekvenciális struktúra explicit vizuális támogatását és a dinamikus kiemelést a csomópont-szöveg levelezés közvetítéséhez.', 'el': 'Παρέχουμε μια βιβλιοθήκη απεικόνισης και διεπαφή ιστού για διαδραστική εξερεύνηση ενός δέντρου ή ενός δάσους αναλύσεων. Η βιβλιοθήκη δεν συνδέεται με κάποια συγκεκριμένη γλωσσική αναπαράσταση, αλλά παρέχει ένα γενικού σκοπού API για τη διαδραστική διερεύνηση της ιεραρχικής γλωσσικής δομής. Για να διευκολυνθεί η γρήγορη κατανόηση μιας σύνθετης δομής, το προσφέρει διάφορα σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά, συμπεριλαμβανομένων της λειτουργικότητας επέκτασης/κατάρρευσης, των χαρακτηριστικών θέσης και χρώματος, της ρητής οπτικής υποστήριξης για τη διαδοχική δομή και της δυναμικής επισήμανσης για τη μεταφορά αλληλογραφίας κόμβου-κειμένου.', 'it': "Forniamo una libreria di visualizzazione e un'interfaccia web per esplorare interattivamente un albero di analisi o una foresta di analisi. La biblioteca non è legata a particolari rappresentazioni linguistiche, ma fornisce un'API di uso generale per l'esplorazione interattiva della struttura linguistica gerarchica. Per facilitare la comprensione rapida di una struttura complessa, l'API offre diverse funzionalità importanti, tra cui funzionalità di espansione/collasso, segnali di posizione e colore, supporto visivo esplicito per la struttura sequenziale e evidenziazione dinamica per trasmettere la corrispondenza nodo-testo.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვიზუალიზაციას ლიბერიკა და ვებ ინტერფექტი ინტერფექტის ინტერფექტიურად პარასტის ხე ან პარასტის ქალების განსხვავება. ლიბური არ არის კონფიგური ლენგურისტიკური გამოსახულებისთვის დაკავშირებულია, მაგრამ იქნება ინტერაქტიური ლენგურისტიკური სტრუქტურაციის ინტერაქტიური ინტერექტიური რომელსაც კომპლექსიკური სტრუქტურაციის ძალიან სწრაფად გაგრძელება, API-ს მნიშვნელოვანი ფუნქციალობა, პოციონალური და ფერების სიმბოლოების გაფართება, სკენტიკური სტრუქტურაციის გასაკეთებლად გამოსახ', 'kk': 'Біз визуализациялау жиындарын және веб интерфейсін интерактивті түрде талдау ағашын не талдау орманы келтіреміз. Бұл кітапхана тілдік түрінде байланысты емес, бірақ иерархиялық лингвистикалық құрылғының интерактивті зерттеу үшін жалпы мақсатты API береді. Комплекс құрылғыны тез түсінуге арналған үшін API бірнеше маңызды мүмкіндіктерді ұсынады, кеңейту/сүйреу функциялығын, орналасу мен түстер белгілерін, кейінгі құрылғының көрініс қолдауын және түстерге сүйреу үшін динамикалық бо', 'lt': 'Mes teikiame vizualizacijos biblioteką ir internetinę sąsają interaktyviai ištirti parso medį arba parso mišką. The library is not tied to any particular linguistic representation, but provides a general-purpose API for the interactive exploration of hierarchical linguistic structure.  Siekiant sudaryti palankesnes sąlygas greitai suprasti sudėtingą struktūrą, API siūlo keletą svarbių savybių, įskaitant plėtimosi ir (arba) susidūrimo funkciją, padėties ir spalvų ženklus, aiškią vaizdinę paramą sekvencinei struktūrai ir dinamišką atskleidimą, kad būtų galima perduoti korespondenciją tarp mazgų ir teksto.', 'mk': 'Ние обезбедуваме визуелизациска библиотека и веб интерфејс за интерактивно истражување на дрво на анализа или шума на анализи. Библиотеката не е поврзана со никаква конкретна лингвистичка претстава, туку обезбедува општа АПИ за интерактивна експлоатација на хиерархичната лингвистичка структура. За да се олесни брзото разбирање на комплексната структура, АПИ нуди неколку важни карактеристики, вклучувајќи ја и функционалноста на проширување/колапс, позиционалните и боевите знаци, експлицитната визуелна поддршка за секвенцијалната структура и динамичното истакнување за пренес', 'ms': 'Kami menyediakan perpustakaan visualisasi dan antaramuka web untuk mengeksplorasi secara interaktif pepohon hurai atau hutan hurai. Pustaka tidak terikat kepada mana-mana mewakili bahasa tertentu, tetapi menyediakan API-tujuan umum untuk eksplorasi interaktif struktur bahasa hierarkis. Untuk memudahkan pemahaman cepat struktur kompleks, API menawarkan beberapa ciri-ciri penting, termasuk fungsi kembangan/runtuhan, isyarat kedudukan dan warna, sokongan visual eksplicit untuk struktur urutan, dan penonjolan dinamik untuk menyampaikan persamaan nod-ke-teks.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പാര്\u200dസ് മരം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പാര്\u200dസുകളുടെ കാട്ടുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെബ് ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസില്\u200d ഒരു കാഴ്ച നല്\u200dക ഈ ലൈബ്രറി ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിട്ടില്ല, പക്ഷെ ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഷ ഘടനയുടെ ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചിക്കല്\u200d പരി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ സ്ഥാനം മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d API കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു, വികസിപ്പിക്കുക/തകര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വി', 'mt': 'Aħna nipprovdu librerija ta’ viżwalizzazzjoni u interfaċċja fuq l-internet għall-esplorazzjoni interattiva ta’ siġar tal-analiżi jew forest a tal-analiżi. Il-librerija mhijiex marbuta ma’ xi rappreżentanza lingwistika partikolari, iżda tipprovdi API bi skop ġenerali għall-esplorazzjoni interattiva ta’ struttura lingwistika ġerarkika. Sabiex jiġi ffaċilitat il-fehim rapidu ta’ struttura kumplessa, l-API toffri diversi karatteristiċi importanti, inklużi l-funzjonalità ta’ espansjoni/kollass, sinjali pożizzjonali u tal-kulur, appoġġ viżwali espliċitu għall-istruttura sekwenzjali, u enfasi dinamika biex tintbagħat il-korrispondenza bejn in-nodi u t-testi.', 'mn': 'Бид дүрслэлтийн номын сан болон веб интерфейсийг интерфейсийн ажиллагаанд хуваалцах мод эсвэл ойн ажиллагааны талаар судалж өгдөг. Энэ номын санг хэлний хэлний үзүүлэлтийн тухай холбоотой биш, гэхдээ ерөнхий зорилго API-г иерактив хэлний бүтцийг судалж өгдөг. Комплексийн бүтцийг хурдан ойлгохын тулд API нь олон чухал зүйлсийг санал болгож, нэмэгдүүлэх/сүйрүүлэх функцийн, байр суурь болон өнгийн тэмдэгт, дараагийн бүтцийн тусламжтайгаар тодорхой дүрслэлийн дэмжлэг, мөн түвшингийн харилцааны тусламжта', 'no': 'Vi oppgjev eit visualiseringsbibliotek og nettgrensesnitt for interaktivt utforsking av ei tolking tre eller eit skog med tolking. Biblioteken er ikkje tilkopla nokon spesielt lingvisk representasjon, men tilbyr ein generell mål API for interaktiv utforsking av hierarkisk lingvisk struktur. For å letta raskt forståking av ein kompleks struktur, offerer API fleire viktige funksjonar, inkludert utvid/kollaps funksjonalitet, posisjonell og fargekommer, eksplisitt visuell støtte for sekvensisk struktur, og dynamisk opplysning for å senda tilsvarande node-til-tekst.', 'ro': 'Oferim o bibliotecă de vizualizare și o interfață web pentru explorarea interactivă a unui arbore de parse sau a unei păduri de parse. Biblioteca nu este legată de nicio reprezentare lingvistică specifică, ci oferă un API general pentru explorarea interactivă a structurii lingvistice ierarhice. Pentru a facilita înțelegerea rapidă a unei structuri complexe, API oferă mai multe caracteristici importante, inclusiv funcționalitate de extindere / colaps, indicii poziționale și color, suport vizual explicit pentru structura secvențială și evidențiere dinamică pentru a transmite corespondența nod-la-text.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරකෘතිකරණ ලොක්කොරි සහ වෙබ් අන්තර්ජනයක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කරනවා විශේෂණ ගස පොත්තලය කිසිම විශේෂ භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ නැහැ, නමුත් සාමාන්\u200dය-අරමුණ API එක ප්\u200dරශ්ණ සංවිධානයක් ගැන ඉක්මනින් තේරුම් ගන්න, API එකේ වැදගත් විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය වර්ගයක් සමග විස්තර/කැලැප්ස් වැඩක් සහ වර්ගයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණිත', 'sr': 'Mi pružamo vizualizaciju biblioteke i internet interfejs za interaktivno istraživanje drveta ili šume parsera. Biblioteka nije vezana za bilo kakvu posebnu jezičku predstavu, već pruža generalnu svrhu API za interaktivno istraživanje hijerarhijske jezičke strukture. Da bi se olakšalo brzo razumijevanje kompleksnog struktura, API nudi nekoliko važnih karakteristika, uključujući funkcionalnost proširenja/kolapsa, pozicionalne i bojne znakove, ekskluzivnu vizualnu podršku sekvencijalne strukture, i dinamičnu naglašavanju kako bi prenio korespondencu node-to-text.', 'pl': 'Zapewniamy bibliotekę wizualizacji i interfejs internetowy do interaktywnego odkrywania drzewa parse lub lasu parses. Biblioteka nie jest związana z żadną konkretną reprezentacją językową, ale zapewnia uniwersalne API do interaktywnej eksploracji hierarchicznej struktury językowej. Aby ułatwić szybkie zrozumienie złożonej struktury, API oferuje kilka ważnych funkcji, w tym funkcjonalność rozszerzania/zawalania, wskazówki pozycji i kolorów, wyraźne wsparcie wizualne dla struktury sekwencyjnej oraz dynamiczne podświetlanie w celu przekazania korespondencji węzłów-tekstu.', 'so': 'Maktabada muuqashada iyo Internetka waxaynu u siinaynaa si si firfircoon ah u baaraandegista geedka kaniisadda ama kaynta baaritaanka. Maktabadu kuma xidhan karo qof ka mid ah wakiilka luuqadaha, laakiin wuxuu u fidiyaa API oo u dhexeeya baaritaanka afka hierarchical. Si loo fududeeyo garashada qalabka adag, API wuxuu siiyaa noocyo badan oo muhiim ah, including boodi/collapse functional, boos-positive iyo midab faro ah, kaalmada muuqashada muuqashada muuqashada ee dhismaha dabagalka, iyo dabeecada si loo sheego macluumaadka qoriga ah.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு பார்ஸ் மரத்தை அல்லது ஒரு காட்டை தேடுவதற்கான ஒரு பார்ச் நூலகத்தை மற்றும் இணைய இடைமுகத்தை வழங்குகிறோம். இந்த நூலகம் எந்த குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி குறிப்பிடுதலுடனும் இணைக்கப்படவில்லை, ஆனால் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி வடிவமைப்பின் இடைவெளிச்செயல்  ஒரு சிக்கல் அமைப்பை விரைவாக புரிந்து கொள்வதற்கு, API சில முக்கியமான குணங்களை வழங்குகிறது, விரிவாக/விழுங்கும் செயல்பாடு, நிலையான மற்றும் நிற வண்ண குணங்கள், பின்வரும் அம', 'sv': 'Vi tillhandahåller ett visualiseringsbibliotek och webbgränssnitt för att interaktivt utforska ett parseträd eller en skog av parser. Biblioteket är inte bundet till någon särskild språklig representation, utan tillhandahåller ett allmänt API för interaktiv utforskning av hierarkisk språklig struktur. För att underlätta snabb förståelse av en komplex struktur erbjuder API flera viktiga funktioner, inklusive expandera/komprimera funktionalitet, positions- och färgsignaler, explicit visuellt stöd för sekventiell struktur och dynamisk markering för att förmedla nod-till-text korrespondens.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک تصویزی لیبروری اور ویب انٹرنیفس کے لئے ایک پارس درخت یا پارس کے جنگل کا انتشار کریں گے۔ لائیبروری کسی مخصوص زبان کی نمایش کے ساتھ متصل نہیں ہوتی، لیکن ایک عمومی هدف API کو حیراتیکل زبان کی ساختار کے لئے پیدا کرتا ہے. ایک پیچیدہ ساختار کی جلدی سمجھنے کے لئے API نے بہت سے اہم فرصت پیش کیے ہیں، جس میں گھیری/کالپ فناکیٹی، موقعیت اور رنگ کوں، سفارشی ساختار کے لئے صریح بصیرت کی مدد، اور نڈ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ-ٹ', 'uz': "Biz tashqi kutubxona va veb interfeysni o'rganamiz va parse daraxt yoki daraxtni o'rganish uchun. kutubxonasi hech qanday foydalanuvchi tillik taʼminlovchiga bogʻlanmagan emas, balki hierarchik tillarda interaktiv qidirish uchun umumiy asosiy API. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cung cấp một thư viện tưởng tượng và giao diện web cho việc thăm dò tương tác một cây cha xứ hoặc một khu rừng của cha xứ. Thư viện không liên quan đến các đại diện ngôn ngữ cụ thể, mà cung cấp một API chung cho việc khám phá các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ phân cấp. Để dễ dàng hiểu nhanh về một cấu trúc phức tạp, API cung cấp nhiều tính năng quan trọng, bao gồm chức năng mở rộng/sụp đổ, các tín hiệu vị trí và màu, sự hỗ trợ trực tiếp về cấu trúc chuỗi, và sự nhấn mạnh động để chuyển liên kết giữa nút và văn bản.', 'bg': 'Ние предлагаме библиотека за визуализация и уеб интерфейс за интерактивно проучване на дърво за анализ или гора от анализи. Библиотеката не е свързана с конкретно лингвистично представяне, а предоставя интерактивно проучване на йерархичната лингвистична структура с обща цел. За да улесни бързото разбиране на сложната структура, предлага няколко важни функции, включително функционалност за разширяване/свиване, позиционни и цветни знаци, изрична визуална поддръжка за последователна структура и динамично подчертаване, за да предаде кореспонденция между възел и текст.', 'nl': 'We bieden een visualisatiebibliotheek en webinterface voor het interactief verkennen van een parse boom of een forest van parses. De bibliotheek is niet gebonden aan een bepaalde linguïstische representatie, maar biedt een universele API voor de interactieve verkenning van hiërarchische linguïstische structuur. Om snel inzicht in een complexe structuur te vergemakkelijken, biedt de API een aantal belangrijke functies, waaronder uitvouwen/samenvouwen functionaliteit, positie- en kleuraanwijzingen, expliciete visuele ondersteuning voor sequentiële structuur en dynamische markering om node-to-text correspondentie over te brengen.', 'hr': 'Mi pružamo vizualizacijsku biblioteku i internetsku interfejsu za interaktivno istraživanje prašenja drveta ili šume parsova. Biblioteka nije vezana za bilo kakvu posebnu jezičku predstavu, već pruža API općeg cilja za interaktivno istraživanje hijerarhijske jezičke strukture. Kako bi se olakšalo brzo razumijevanje složene strukture, API nudi nekoliko važnih karakteristika, uključujući funkcionalnost proširenja/kolapsa, pozicionalne i bojne znakove, jasnu vizualnu podršku za sekvencijsku strukturu, te dinamičko osvjetljavanje kako bi prenio korespondenciju čvorova na tekst.', 'da': "Vi leverer et visualiseringsbibliotek og webgrænseflade til interaktivt at udforske et parsetræ eller en skov af parser. Biblioteket er ikke bundet til nogen bestemt sproglig repræsentation, men leverer en generel API til interaktiv udforskning af hierarkisk sproglig struktur. For at lette hurtig forståelse af en kompleks struktur tilbyder API'en flere vigtige funktioner, herunder udvide/kollapse funktionalitet, positions- og farveindikationer, eksplicit visuel støtte til sekventiel struktur og dynamisk fremhævning for at formidle node-to-tekst korrespondance.", 'id': 'Kami menyediakan perpustakaan visualisasi dan antarmuka web untuk secara interaktif mengeksplorasi pohon analisis atau hutan analisis. The library is not tied to any particular linguistic representation, but provides a general-purpose API for the interactive exploration of hierarchical linguistic structure.  Untuk memudahkan pemahaman cepat dari struktur kompleks, API menawarkan beberapa ciri-ciri penting, termasuk fungsi pengembang/runtuhan, tanda posisi dan warna, dukungan visual eksplisit untuk struktur sekuensional, dan penonjolan dinamik untuk menyampaikan korespondensi node-to-text.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine Visualisierungsbibliothek und eine Weboberfläche zur Verfügung, um einen Parse-Baum oder einen Parse-Wald interaktiv zu erkunden. Die Bibliothek ist nicht an eine bestimmte linguistische Repräsentation gebunden, sondern bietet eine universelle API zur interaktiven Erforschung hierarchischer linguistischer Strukturen. Um ein schnelles Verständnis einer komplexen Struktur zu ermöglichen, bietet die API mehrere wichtige Funktionen, darunter Erweiterungs-/Zusammenbruch-Funktionalität, Positions- und Farbhinweise, explizite visuelle Unterstützung für sequentielle Strukturen und dynamische Hervorhebung zur Übertragung von Knoten-zu-Text-Korrespondenz.', 'fa': 'ما یک کتابخانه\u200cی تصویر\u200cسازی و interface ی وب را برای کشف کردن یک درخت پردازی یا جنگل پردازی می\u200cدهیم. کتابخانه به هیچ نمایش زبان\u200cشناسی خاصی ارتباط ندارد، بلکه یک API هدف عمومی برای تحقیقات interactive ساختار زبان\u200cشناسی را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. برای آسانی\u200cسازی سریع درک یک ساختار پیچیده، API چند ویژگی مهم را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، شامل فعالیت گسترش/شکستگی، نشانه\u200cهای موقعیت و رنگ، حمایت دیده\u200cای واضح برای ساختار پیچیده، و تعلق\u200cنمایی\u200cهای دینامیک برای تسلیم پیوند نود-به-متن.', 'ko': '우리는 상호작용적인 해석 트리와 시각화된 해석 트리 라이브러리를 제공했다.이 라이브러리는 특정한 언어 표현에 의존하지 않고 차원 언어 구조의 상호작용 탐색에 유니버설 API를 제공한다.복잡한 구조를 쉽게 이해할 수 있도록 API는 확장/축소 기능, 위치와 색상 힌트, 순서 구조에 대한 명확한 시각적 지원, 노드를 텍스트에 전달하는 동적 강조 표시 등 몇 가지 중요한 기능을 제공합니다.', 'tr': 'Biz janla힊dyrma kitaphanesini we web interfejsini 챌철z체mlenmek 체챌in aga챌y 첵a-da pars me흫zini g철zlemek 체챌in temin ed첵채ris. Bu kitaphana hi챌bir hili belli lingwistiki me첵dan챌alygy bilen baglanma첵ar, 첵철ne i첵erarhi첵aly lingwistiki struktury흫 etkile힊imli ke힊fedilmesi 체챌in umumy ama챌lary API 체pj체n ed첵채r. H캇zl캇 bir karma힊캇k struktury흫 d체힊체nmesini kolayla힊t캇rmak 체챌in API birn채챌e wajyp 철zellikleri, d체휓체m-to-metin me흫ze힊liklerini ke힊fetmek 체챌in geni힊letip/k체챌체rmek 체챌in, explicit g철rsel bir 힊ekilde desteklenmek 체챌in, ve dinamik bir 힊ekilde ayd캇nlatmak 체챌in d체휓체m/k체챌체rmek 체챌in.', 'sw': 'Tunatoa maktaba ya kuonyesha na sura ya mtandaoni kwa ajili ya kutafuta mti wa mbuga au msituni wa magari. Maktaba haiungwi na uwakilishi wa lugha yoyote, bali inatoa API kwa malengo ya jumla kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa miundombinu ya lugha. Ili kusaidia kuelewa kwa muundo mzito wa haraka, API inatoa vipengele kadhaa muhimu, ikiwa ni pamoja na kuongezeka/kuanguka, vifaa vyenye nafasi na rangi, kuunga mkono wazi kwa muundo wa mfumo wa baadae, na kuonyesha ujumbe wa ujumbe wa ujumbe wa maandishi.', 'sq': 'Ne ofrojmë një bibliotekë vizualizimi dhe interfaqe interneti për të eksploruar interaktivisht një pemë analizimi ose një pyll analizimi. Biblioteka nuk është e lidhur me ndonjë përfaqësim të veçantë gjuhësor, por ofron një API me qëllim të përgjithshëm për eksplorimin interaktiv të strukturës hierarkike gjuhësore. Për të lehtësuar kuptimin e shpejtë të një strukture komplekse, API ofron disa karakteristika të rëndësishme, duke përfshirë funksionalitetin e zgjerimit/rrëzimit, shenjat pozitive dhe ngjyrore, mbështetjen eksplicite vizuale për strukturën sekuenciale dhe theksimin dinamik për të transmetuar korrespondencën nod-to-text.', 'af': "Ons verskaf 'n visualisasie biblioteek en web koppelvlak vir interaktief 'n verwerking boom of 'n bos van verwerking. Die biblioteek is nie verbind met enige spesifieke lingwisiese voorstelling nie, maar verskaf 'n algemene- doel API vir die interaktiewe uitvoer van hierarkiese lingwisiese struktuur. Om vinnige verstanding van 'n kompleks struktuur te eenvoudig, gee die API verskeie belangrike funksies, insluitend uitbreiding/collapse funksiealiteit, posisieale en kleuretekens, uitgespreidige visuele ondersteun vir sekwensiele struktuur, en dinamiese verligting om node-na-teks ooreenstemming te verwyder.", 'am': 'የፓርስ ዛፍ ወይም የፓርስ ዱር ለመፍጠር እና የመረጃ መጻሕፍት እና የመረብ интерфейсን እናደርጋለን፡፡ መዝገብ ቤትሪክ ከቋንቋው መልዕክት በተለየ ቋንቋ መልዕክት አይታሰርም፥ ነገር ግን በተግባራዊ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም የሚችል API ይሰጠዋል፡፡ በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት ለማስተዋል፣ API የፊደል ግንኙነት፣ ማሰፋት/መደገፊያ፣ ቦታ እና ቀለም ክፍሎች፣ ለግንኙነት ግንኙነት የሚያስፈልግ የራእይ ድጋፍ እና የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት ለማሳየት እና የተመሳሳይ ኃይለኛ ድጋፍ ያቀርባል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք տրամադրում ենք տեսողական գրադարան և վեբ ինտերֆեյսը ինտերակտիվ ուսումնասիրելու համար վերլուծման ծառ կամ վերլուծման անտառ: The library is not tied to any particular linguistic representation, but provides a general-purpose API for the interactive exploration of hierarchical linguistic structure.  Որպեսզի բարդ կառուցվածքի արագ հասկանալու համար API-ն առաջարկում է մի քանի կարևոր հատկություններ, ներառյալ ընդլայնման և կործանման ֆունկցիոնալությունը, դիրքի և գույնի նշանները, բացատրական տեսողական աջակցությունը հաջորդականության կառուցվածքի համար և դինամիկ նշա', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি দৃশ্যমান লাইব্রেরী এবং ওয়েব ইন্টারফেস প্রদান করি একটি পার্স গাছ বা পার্সের বন খুঁজে বের করার জন্য। এই লাইব্রেরীটি কোন নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে বাঁধা নেই, কিন্তু হিয়ারার্কিল ভাষার কাঠামোর মধ্যে সক্রিয় তদন্ত একটি জটিল কাঠামোর ব্যাপারে দ্রুত বোঝার জন্য এপিআই বেশ কিছু গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদান করেছে, যার মধ্যে প্রসারিত/ধ্বংস হয়ে যাওয়া কার্যক্রম, ইতিবাচক এবং রং কায়ের জন্য,', 'bs': 'Mi pružamo vizualizacijsku biblioteku i internetsku interfejsu za interaktivno istraživanje drveta ili šume parsova. Biblioteka nije vezana za bilo kakvu posebnu jezičku predstavu, već pruža obezbeđenu API za interaktivno istraživanje hijerarhijske jezičke strukture. Da bi se olakšalo brzo razumijevanje kompleksnog struktura, API nudi nekoliko važnih karakteristika, uključujući funkcionalnost proširenja/kolapsa, pozicionalne i bojne znakove, ekskluzivnu vizualnu podršku za sekvencijsku strukturu, i dinamičko osvjetljenje kako bi prenijela dopisnost node-to-text.', 'az': 'Biz vizualizasyon kütüphanəsini və web interfejsini interaktif bir a ğacı və ya analizasyon ormanı keşfetmək üçün təmin edirik. Kitabxan hiyerarşik dil quruluşunun interaktif keşfetməsi üçün heç bir dil göstəricisinə bağlı deyildir. Müxtəlif strukturların hızlı anlaşılmasını asanlaşdırmaq üçün, API çoxlu möhüm xüsusiyyətləri təklif edir, genişləndirilən/çökmüş funksiyalıqları, pozisyonal və rəngli işarələri, sequential strukturların a çıq-aydın visual dəstəki və düyüm-mətnə məlumatlarını təbliğ etmək üçün dinamik işıq', 'cs': 'Poskytujeme vizualizační knihovnu a webové rozhraní pro interaktivní prozkoumání parse stromu nebo lesu parses. Knihovna není vázána na žádnou konkrétní jazykovou reprezentaci, ale poskytuje univerzální API pro interaktivní zkoumání hierarchické jazykové struktury. Pro usnadnění rychlého porozumění složité struktuře nabízí API několik důležitých funkcí, včetně funkce rozšíření/sestavení, polohových a barevných návodů, explicitní vizuální podpory sekvenční struktury a dynamického zvýraznění pro přenos korespondence mezi uzly a textem.', 'ca': "Ens proporcionem una biblioteca de visualització i una interfície web per explorar interactivament un arbre d'analització o un bosc d'analitzacions. La biblioteca no està lligada a una representació lingüística concreta, sinó proporciona una API de propòsit general per l'exploració interactiva de l'estructura lingüística jeràrquica. Per facilitar la ràpida comprensió d'una estructura complex a, l'API ofereix diverses característiques importants, com la funcionalitat d'expansió/col·lapse, les indicacions de posició i color, el suport visual explícit per a l'estructura seqüencial i la ressaltació dinàmica per transmetre la correspondència node a text.", 'et': 'Pakume visualiseerimise teeki ja veebiliidet parsimispuu või parsimismetsa interaktiivseks uurimiseks. Raamatukogu ei ole seotud ühegi konkreetse keelelise esitusega, vaid pakub üldise otstarbega API hierarhilise keelelise struktuuri interaktiivseks uurimiseks. Keerulise struktuuri kiireks mõistmiseks pakub API mitmeid olulisi funktsioone, sealhulgas laiendamise/kokkukukkumise funktsionaalsust, positsiooni- ja värvilisi vihjeid, selget visuaalset tuge järjestikusele struktuurile ja dünaamilist esiletõstmist sõlme-teksti vastavuse edastamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tarjoamme visualisointikirjaston ja verkkokäyttöliittymän jäsennyspuun tai jäsennysmetsän interaktiiviseen tutkimiseen. Kirjasto ei ole sidottu mihinkään tiettyyn kielelliseen esitykseen, vaan se tarjoaa yleiskäyttöisen sovellusliittymän hierarkkisen kielellisen rakenteen interaktiiviseen tutkimiseen. Helpottaakseen monimutkaisen rakenteen nopeaa ymmärtämistä API tarjoaa useita tärkeitä ominaisuuksia, kuten laajennus-/supistustoiminnot, sijainti- ja värivihjeet, eksplisiittinen visuaalinen tuki sekvenssiaalirakenteelle ja dynaaminen korostus solmun ja tekstin välisen vastaavuuden välittämiseksi.', 'jv': 'We nyimpen Visual Library lan web interactive Bibloteka ora nggawe barang kanggo ngubah ingkang dipun-ingkang, njuk mau ngewehke popular-bukisakno To help speed compromise of a komplex structural, the Api offrs a number of Important options, include expand/collapse', 'he': 'אנחנו מספקים ספרייה ויזואליזציה ומשק אינטראקטיבי לחקור אינטראקטיבי עץ מעבדה או יער של מעבדות. הספרייה לא קשורה לאף מייצג שפתי מסוים, אלא מספקת API למטרה כללית לחקור אינטראקטיבי של מבנה שפתי הייררכי. כדי להקל בהבנה מהירה של מבנה מורכב, API מציע מספר תכונות חשובות, כולל פונקציונליות התרחבות/התמוטטות, סימני עמדה וצבע, תמיכה ויזואלית ברורה למבנה רצופי, ודינמיקציה דינמית כדי להעביר התכתבות נוטל לטקסט.', 'ha': "Tuna samar da littãfin mai gani da interfekt ɗin web dõmin a yi amfani da cinikin cire wata itãce na parse ko wani misitu na parse. @ info: status To, dõmin ya sauƙa ƙara fahimtar da haraka game da wani matsayi mai tsanani, the ANI na bãyar da wasu abũbuwan muhimu, kamar yadda ya faɗi/ɓace functionin, masu shiryuwa da launi, taimakon nuna na gane wa masu haɗi da matsayin muhimmanci, da kuma ya gyare-gyare zuwa ma'anar-text.", 'sk': 'Nudimo vizualizacijsko knjižnico in spletni vmesnik za interaktivno raziskovanje drevesa razčlenjevanja ali gozda razčlenjevanja. Knjižnica ni vezana na nobeno določeno jezikovno reprezentacijo, ampak zagotavlja splošni API za interaktivno raziskovanje hierarhične jezikovne strukture. Da bi olajšali hitro razumevanje kompleksne strukture, API ponuja več pomembnih funkcij, vključno s funkcionalnostjo razširitve/zrušitve, pozicijskimi in barvnimi namigi, eksplicitno vizualno podporo za zaporedno strukturo in dinamičnim poudarjanjem za prenos korespondence med vozliščem in besedilom.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་གླེང་སྒྲུང་དང་ The library is not tied to any particular linguistic representation, but provides a general-purpose API for the interactive exploration of hierarchical linguistic structure. To facilitate rapid understanding of a complex structure, the API offers several important features, including expand/collapse functionality, positional and color cues, explicit visual support for sequential structure, and dynamic highlighting to convey node-to-text correspondence.'}
{'en': 'DLATK : Differential Language Analysis ToolKit', 'ar': 'DLATK: مجموعة أدوات التحليل اللغوي التفاضلي', 'es': 'DLATK: Kit de herramientas de análisis diferencial del lenguaje', 'fr': "DLATK\xa0: Boîte à outils d'analyse différentielle du langage", 'pt': 'DLATK: Kit de ferramentas de análise de linguagem diferencial', 'ja': 'DLATK ：差分言語分析ツールキット', 'zh': 'DLATK:差言工具包', 'hi': 'DLATK: विभेदक भाषा विश्लेषण टूलकिट', 'ru': 'DLATK: Инструментарий для дифференциального анализа языка', 'ga': 'DLATK: Foireann Uirlisí Anailíse Teanga Difreálacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'DLATK: Εργαλείο ανάλυσης διαφορικής γλώσσας', 'it': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis ToolKit', 'kk': 'DLATK: Тілді анализ құралы', 'hu': 'DLATK: Differenciális nyelvelemző eszközkészlet', 'lt': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis Toolkit', 'mk': 'DLATK: Инструмент за анализа на различни јазици', 'ms': 'DLATK: Kit Alat Analisi Bahasa Berbeza', 'mt': 'DLATK: Għodod għall-Analiżi tal-Lingwa Differenzjali', 'ml': 'DLATK: വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഭാഷ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണക്കെട്ട്', 'mn': 'ДLATK: Өөр өөр хэл шинжилгээний ToolKit', 'pl': 'DLATK: Zestaw narzędzi do analizy języka różnicowego', 'no': 'Stencils', 'si': 'DLATK: වෙනස් භාෂාව විශ්ලේෂණය ToolKit', 'ro': 'DLATK: Kit de instrumente pentru analiza limbilor diferențiale', 'so': 'DLATK: Analysis luuqadaha kala duduwan', 'sr': 'Diferencijalni ToolKit za analizu jezika', 'sv': 'DLATK: Verktygssats för differentiell språkanalys', 'ta': 'DLATK: வெவ்வேறு மொழி ஆராய்வு கருவிக்குறிப்பு', 'ur': 'ڈلیٹک: مختلف زبان تحلیل تولکیٹ', 'uz': 'DLATK: Taʼminlovchi tilni moslash vositasiName', 'vi': 'Tiêu đề phân biệt ngôn ngữ học', 'bg': 'DLATK: Комплект инструменти за анализ на диференциалния език', 'da': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis ToolKit', 'nl': 'DLATK: Differentiële Taalanalyse ToolKit', 'hr': 'DLATK: Diferencijalni ToolKit za analizu jezika', 'de': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis ToolKit', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'DLATK: Alat Analisi Bahasa Differential', 'ko': 'DLATK: 차이 언어 분석 키트', 'sw': 'DLATK: Kiti cha Uchambuzi wa Lugha tofauti', 'af': 'Verskillende Taal Analisie ToolKit', 'sq': 'DLATK: ToolKit Differential Language Analysis', 'am': 'መሣሪያዎች', 'tr': 'Delli Çeşitme Dili Çözümleme ToolKit', 'az': 'DLATK: Farklı Dil Analizi ToolKit', 'hy': 'ԴԼԹԹՔ. Լեզվի տարբեր վերլուծության գործիքներ', 'bs': 'Diferencijalni ToolKit za analizu jezika', 'bn': 'DLATK: ভিন্ন ভাষা বিশ্লেষণ টুল কিট', 'ca': 'DLATK: Diferential Language Analysis Toolkit', 'cs': 'DLATK: Sada nástrojů pro analýzu diferenciálních jazyků', 'fi': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis ToolKit', 'et': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis ToolKit', 'jv': 'Language Test Tool lKit', 'sk': 'DLATK: Orodja za analizo diferencialnega jezika', 'he': 'DLATK: ערכת כלי ניתוח שפה שונה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'DLATK: Differential Language Analysis ToolKit'}
{'en': 'We present Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), an open-source python package and command-line tool developed for conducting social-scientific language analyses. While DLATK provides standard NLP pipeline steps such as tokenization or SVM-classification, its novel strengths lie in analyses useful for psychological, health, and social science : (1) incorporation of extra-linguistic structured information, (2) specified levels and units of analysis (e.g. document, user, community), (3) statistical metrics for continuous outcomes, and (4) robust, proven, and accurate pipelines for social-scientific prediction problems. DLATK integrates multiple popular packages (SKLearn, Mallet), enables interactive usage (Jupyter Notebooks), and generally follows object oriented principles to make it easy to tie in additional libraries or storage technologies.', 'ar': 'نقدم مجموعة أدوات التحليل اللغوي التفاضلي (DLATK) ، وهي حزمة بايثون مفتوحة المصدر وأداة سطر أوامر تم تطويرها لإجراء تحليلات اللغة العلمية الاجتماعية. بينما توفر DLATK خطوات قياسية لخط معالجة اللغات الطبيعية مثل الترميز أو تصنيف SVM ، تكمن قوتها الجديدة في التحليلات المفيدة في العلوم النفسية والصحية والاجتماعية: (1) دمج المعلومات المنظمة غير اللغوية ، (2) المستويات والوحدات المحددة من التحليل (على سبيل المثال الوثيقة ، المستخدم ، المجتمع) ، (3) المقاييس الإحصائية للنتائج المستمرة ، و (4) خطوط أنابيب قوية ومثبتة ودقيقة لمشاكل التنبؤ العلمي الاجتماعي. يدمج DLATK العديد من الحزم الشائعة (SKLearn و Mallet) ، ويتيح الاستخدام التفاعلي (Jupyter Notebooks) ، ويتبع عمومًا المبادئ الموجهة للكائنات لتسهيل الربط في مكتبات أو تقنيات تخزين إضافية.', 'fr': "Nous présentons le Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), un package Python open source et un outil en ligne de commande développé pour effectuer des analyses langagières socio-scientifiques. Alors que DLATK fournit des étapes de pipeline de PNL standard telles que la tokenisation ou la classification SVM, ses nouveaux atouts résident dans les analyses utiles pour les sciences psychologiques, de la santé et sociales\xa0: (1) intégration d'informations structurées extra-linguistiques, (2) niveaux et unités d'analyse spécifiés (par exemple document, utilisateur, communauté), (3) des métriques statistiques pour des résultats continus, et (4) des pipelines robustes, éprouvés et précis pour les problèmes de prédiction socio-scientifique. DLATK intègre plusieurs packages populaires (SKlearn, Mallet), permet une utilisation interactive (blocs-notes Jupyter) et suit généralement des principes orientés objet pour faciliter l'intégration de bibliothèques ou de technologies de stockage supplémentaires.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos o Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), um pacote python de código aberto e uma ferramenta de linha de comando desenvolvida para realizar análises de linguagem sociocientíficas. Embora o DLATK forneça etapas de pipeline de PNL padrão, como tokenização ou classificação SVM, seus novos pontos fortes residem em análises úteis para psicologia, saúde e ciências sociais: (1) incorporação de informações estruturadas extralinguísticas, (2) níveis e unidades especificados de (por exemplo, documento, usuário, comunidade), (3) métricas estatísticas para resultados contínuos e (4) pipelines robustos, comprovados e precisos para problemas de previsão sociocientífica. O DLATK integra vários pacotes populares (SKLearn, Mallet), permite o uso interativo (Jupyter Notebooks) e geralmente segue princípios orientados a objetos para facilitar a vinculação de bibliotecas ou tecnologias de armazenamento adicionais.', 'es': 'Presentamos Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), un paquete python de código abierto y una herramienta de línea de comandos desarrollada para realizar análisis del lenguaje sociocientífico. Si bien DLATK proporciona pasos de canalización de PNL estándar, como la tokenización o la clasificación SVM, sus puntos fuertes novedosos radican en los análisis útiles para las ciencias psicológicas, de la salud y sociales: (1) incorporación de información estructurada extralingüística, (2) niveles y unidades de análisis específicos (por ejemplo, documento, usuario, comunidad), (3) métricas estadísticas para resultados continuos y (4) canales sólidos, probados y precisos para problemas de predicción sociocientífica. DLATK integra varios paquetes populares (SKLearn, Mallet), permite el uso interactivo (Jupyter Notebooks) y, en general, sigue principios orientados a objetos para facilitar la vinculación de bibliotecas o tecnologías de almacenamiento adicionales.', 'ja': '社会科学的言語分析を行うために開発されたオープンソースのPythonパッケージとコマンドラインツールであるDifferential Language Analysis Toolkit （ DLATK ）をご紹介します。DLATKは、トークン化やSVM分類などの標準的なNLPパイプラインステップを提供しますが、その新規の強みは、心理学、健康学、社会科学に有用な分析にあります。これは、（ 1 ）言語外の構造化情報の組み込み、（ 2 ）特定のレベルと分析単位（例えば、文書、ユーザー、コミュニティ）、（ 3 ）継続的アウトカムの統計的指標、（ 4 ）社会科学予測問題のための堅牢で実証された正確なパイプラインです。DLATKは、複数の人気パッケージ（ SKLearn、Mallet ）を統合し、インタラクティブな使用（ Jupyterノートブック）を可能にし、一般的にオブジェクト指向の原則に従って、追加のライブラリやストレージテクノロジーを簡単に結びつけることができます。', 'hi': 'हम विभेदक भाषा विश्लेषण टूलकिट (DLATK), एक ओपन-सोर्स पायथन पैकेज और सामाजिक-वैज्ञानिक भाषा विश्लेषण करने के लिए विकसित कमांड-लाइन टूल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। जबकि DLATK मानक एनएलपी पाइपलाइन चरण जैसे टोकनाइजेशन या एसवीएम-वर्गीकरण प्रदान करता है, इसकी उपन्यास ताकत मनोवैज्ञानिक, स्वास्थ्य और सामाजिक विज्ञान के लिए उपयोगी विश्लेषणों में निहित है: (1) अतिरिक्त-भाषाई संरचित जानकारी का निगमन, (2) विश्लेषण के निर्दिष्ट स्तर और इकाइयां (जैसे दस्तावेज़, उपयोगकर्ता, समुदाय), (3) निरंतर परिणामों के लिए सांख्यिकीय मीट्रिक, और (4) सामाजिक-वैज्ञानिक भविष्यवाणी समस्याओं के लिए मजबूत, सिद्ध और सटीक पाइपलाइनें। DLATK कई लोकप्रिय पैकेजों (SKLearn, Mallet) को एकीकृत करता है, इंटरैक्टिव उपयोग (Jupyter नोटबुक) को सक्षम बनाता है, और आम तौर पर अतिरिक्त पुस्तकालयों या भंडारण प्रौद्योगिकियों में टाई करना आसान बनाने के लिए ऑब्जेक्ट उन्मुख सिद्धांतों का पालन करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем Инструментарий дифференциального языкового анализа (DLATK), пакет с открытым исходным кодом python и инструмент командной строки, разработанный для проведения социально-научного языкового анализа. В то время как DLATK предоставляет стандартные шаги конвейера NLP, такие как токенизация или классификация SVM, его новые сильные стороны заключаются в анализах, полезных для психологических, медицинских и социальных наук: (1) включение внеязыковой структурированной информации, (2) определенные уровни и единицы анализа (например, документ, пользователь, сообщество), (3) статистические показатели для непрерывных результатов и (4) надежные, проверенные и точные конвейеры для задач социально-научного прогнозирования. DLATK интегрирует несколько популярных пакетов (SKLearn, Mallet), обеспечивает интерактивное использование (Jupyter Notebooks) и, как правило, следует объектно ориентированным принципам, чтобы облегчить привязку к дополнительным библиотекам или технологиям хранения.', 'zh': '吾言差分言析工具包(DLATK),此一开源之python包命之具,以社会科学语言分析也。 虽DLATK准之NLP管道步骤,若标SVM分类,然其新者在心,康强社会科学有用之分:(1)合言语外之结构化信,(2)指级析位(如文档,用户,社区),(3)连计指标,及(4)用于社会科学测之稳,成熟准之道。 DLATK多集流行软件包(SKLearn,Mallet),赞交互式用(Jupyter Notebooks),且常循面向对象法,以便绑定他库存储技术。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid Uirlisí Anailíse Teanga Difreálacha (DLATK) i láthair, pacáiste python foinse oscailte agus uirlis ordú-líne a forbraíodh chun anailísí teanga sóisialta-eolaíochta a dhéanamh. Cé go soláthraíonn DLATK céimeanna caighdeánacha píblíne NLP mar chomharthaíocht nó aicmiú SFM, luíonn a láidreachtaí úra in anailísí atá úsáideach don eolaíocht shíceolaíoch, shláinte agus shóisialta: (1) faisnéis struchtúrtha seachtheangeolaíoch a ionchorprú, (2) leibhéil agus aonaid shonraithe de anailís (m.sh. doiciméad, úsáideoir, pobal), (3) méadracht staidrimh le haghaidh torthaí leanúnacha, agus (4) píblínte stóinsithe, cruthaithe agus cruinn le haghaidh fadhbanna tuar sóisialta-eolaíochta. Comhtháthaíonn DLATK il-phacáistí móréilimh (SKLearn, Mallet), cumasaíonn sé úsáid idirghníomhach (Leabhair Nótaí Iúpatair), agus go ginearálta leanann sé prionsabail atá dírithe ar oibiachtaí chun é a dhéanamh éasca a cheangal i leabharlanna breise nó i dteicneolaíochtaí stórála.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), egy nyílt forráskódú python csomagot és parancssori eszközt, amelyet a társadalomtudományos nyelvelemzések elvégzésére fejlesztettek ki. Míg a DLATK standard NLP pipeline lépéseket biztosít, mint például tokenizáció vagy SVM-osztályozás, új erőssége a pszichológiai, egészségügyi és társadalomtudományi elemzésekben rejlik: (1) nyelven kívüli strukturált információk beépítése, (2) meghatározott szintek és elemzési egységek (pl. dokumentum, felhasználó, közösség), (3) statisztikai mutatók a folyamatos eredményekhez, és (4) robusztus, bizonyított, és pontos csővezetékek a társadalomtudományos előrejelzési problémákhoz. A DLATK több népszerű csomagot (SKLearn, Mallet) integrál, lehetővé teszi az interaktív használatot (Jupyter Notebooks), és általában objektumorientált elveket követ, hogy könnyedén összekapcsolhassa további könyvtárakat vagy tárolási technológiákat.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებული ენის ანალიზიციის ხელსაწყობილობი (DLATK), გახსნა ფორმა Python პოკეტი და მოწყობილობის მოწყობილობის ხელსაწყობილობი სოციალურ-მეცნიერო ენის ან DLATK იყენებს სტანდარტური NLP-ის კლასიფიკაციას ან SVM-კლასიფიკაციას, როგორც მისი პრომენტიკური ძალიანობა ფსიკოლოგიური, ჯანდარული და სოციალური მეცნიერებისთვის გამოყენებაში: 1) ექსტრანგური სტრუქტურული ინფორმაციის შეყენება, (2) განსაზღვრებული წესები და ანალიზის ერთეულები და სოციალურად მეცნიერო პრობლემებისთვის მარტივი პრობლემები. Name', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πακέτο πύθωνων ανοιχτού κώδικα και εργαλείο γραμμής εντολών που αναπτύχθηκε για τη διεξαγωγή κοινωνιολογικών γλωσσικών αναλύσεων. Ενώ το DLATK παρέχει τυποποιημένα βήματα αγωγού όπως η επισήμανση ή η ταξινόμηση, τα νέα πλεονεκτήματα του βρίσκονται σε αναλύσεις χρήσιμες για τις ψυχολογικές, υγειονομικές και κοινωνικές επιστήμες: (1) ενσωμάτωση εξωγλωσσικών δομημένων πληροφοριών, (2) καθορισμένα επίπεδα και μονάδες ανάλυσης (π.χ. έγγραφο, χρήστης, κοινότητα), (3) στατιστικές μετρήσεις για συνεχή αποτελέσματα και (4) ισχυρά, αποδεδειγμένα, και ακριβείς αγωγοί για κοινωνικά-επιστημονικά προβλήματα πρόβλεψης. Το ενσωματώνει πολλαπλά δημοφιλή πακέτα (επιτρέπει διαδραστική χρήση (σημειωματάρια Jupyter) και γενικά ακολουθεί αντικειμενικές αρχές για να διευκολύνει τη σύνδεση πρόσθετων βιβλιοθηκών ή τεχνολογιών αποθήκευσης.', 'it': "Presentiamo Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), un pacchetto python open source e uno strumento a riga di comando sviluppato per condurre analisi socio-scientifiche del linguaggio. Mentre DLATK fornisce passaggi standard della pipeline NLP come la tokenizzazione o la classificazione SVM, i suoi nuovi punti di forza risiedono nelle analisi utili per le scienze psicologiche, sanitarie e sociali: (1) incorporazione di informazioni strutturate extra-linguistiche, (2) livelli e unità di analisi specificati (ad esempio documento, utente, comunità), (3) metriche statistiche per risultati continui e (4) robuste, comprovate, e condotte accurate per problemi di previsione socio-scientifica. DLATK integra più pacchetti popolari (SKLearn, Mallet), consente l'utilizzo interattivo (Jupyter Notebooks) e generalmente segue principi orientati agli oggetti per rendere facile collegare librerie o tecnologie di archiviazione aggiuntive.", 'kk': 'Біз әртүрлі тіл анализ құралдарын (DLATK), ашық көзі python дестесін және командалық сызық құралы, әлеуметтік- ғылыми тіл анализацияларын жасау үшін жасалған. DLATK токенизациясы не SVM классификациясы секілді стандартты NLP құрылғының қадамдарын береді, оның романдық күштері психологиялық, саулық және әлемдік ғылым үшін пайдалы анализацияларында: 1) қосымша лингвистикалық құрылған мәліметтерді қосу, (2) анализ деңгейлері мен бірліктері (мысалы, құжат, па және әлеуметтік-ғылыми прогноз мәселелерінің дұрыс жолғылары. DLATK бірнеше мәліметті бағдарламаларды (SKLearn, Mallet), интерактивті пайдалануды рұқсат етеді (Jupyter Notebooks) және әдетте нысандардың бағытталған принциптерін қосымша кітапханалар не сақтау технологияларына қосымша қы', 'mk': 'Презентираме Инструмент за различна анализа на јазикот (DLATK), пакет на отворен код питон и алатка за командна линија развиена за спроведување на социјално-научни анализи на јазикот. Иако ДЛАТК обезбедува стандардни чекори на нафтоводот НЛП како што се токенизацијата или класификацијата на СВМ, нејзините нови сили се во анализите корисни за психолошките, здравствените и социјалните науки: (1) вклучување на екстра-лингвистичките структурирани информации, (2) специфицирани нивоа и единици на анализа (на пример документот, корисникот, зае И точни гасоводи за социјално-научни предвидувања. DLATK интегрира повеќе популарни пакети (SKLearn, Mallet), овозможува интерактивна употреба (Jupyter Notebooks) и генерално ги следи принципите ориентирани на објекти за да биде лесно да се врзува во дополнителни библиотеки или технологии за складирање.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), atvirojo kodo python paketą ir komandų linijos priemonę, sukurtą atliekant socialinės ir mokslinės kalbos analizę. Nors DLATK numato standartinius NLP vamzdynų etapus, pavyzdžiui, tokenizaciją arba SVM klasifikaciją, jos nauji stiprumai yra psichologiniam, sveikatos ir socialiniam mokslui naudingos analizės: 1) ne kalbos struktūrizuotos informacijos įtraukimas, 2) nurodyti lygiai ir analizės vienetai (pvz., dokumentas, naudotojas, bendruomenė), 3) nuolatinių rezultatų statistiniai rodikliai ir 4) patikimi, įrodyti, • ir tikslūs vamzdynai, skirti socialinės ir mokslinės prognozės problemoms spręsti. DLATK integruoja kelis populiarius paketus (SKLearn, Mallet), leidžia interaktyvų naudojimą (Jupyter Notebooks) ir paprastai laikosi objektui orientuotų principų, kad būtų lengva susieti papildomas bibliotekas ar saugojimo technologijas.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങളുടെ (DLATK), ഒരു തുറന്ന സോര്\u200dസ്സോര്\u200dസ് പൈത്തോണ്\u200d പാക്കേജും കമാന്\u200dഡ് ലൈന്\u200d ഉപകരണവും സാമൂഹ്യ- ഡിലാട്ടിക്ക് സാധാരണ NLP പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d പടികള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിന്റെ നോവല്\u200d ശക്തികള്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രീയോളജി, ആരോഗ്യത്തിനും സാമൂഹ്യശാസ്ത്രത്തിനും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതി സാമൂഹ്യശാസ്ത്രീയ പ്രവചന പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള പൈപ്പെലിനുകളും കൃത്യമായി വിശദീകരിച DLATK പല പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പാക്കേജുകളെ (SKLearn, Mallet), ഇന്ററര്\u200dവ്വിക്കേറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സജ്ജമാക്കുന്നു. ജുപ്പൈറ്റര്\u200d നോട്ട്ബുക്സുകള്\u200d, പൊതുവായി സാധാരണ പ', 'mn': 'Бид өөр өөр хэл шинжилгээний хэрэгсэл (DLATK), нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй питон багц болон команд шугам хэрэгсэл, нийгмийн-шинжлэх ухааны хэл шинжилгээний ажиллагаанд хөгжүүлсэн. DLATK нь стандарт NLP хоолойн алхам болон SVM-г хуваалцах мэт шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаанд хэрэгтэй байдаг: (1) нэмэлт хэлний бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээлэл, 2) тодорхойлсон түвшин болон шинжлэх ухааны нэгжүүд (жишээ нь, баримт, хэрэглэгч, нийгмийн), (3) үргэлжлүүлэх итгэлтийн статистикийн метрик болон нийгмийн болон шинжлэх ухааны асуудлуудын шугам шугам. DLATK олон олон олон алдартай багц (SKLearn, Mallet), интерактив хэрэглээ болох боломжийг олгодог. Обьектын шууд багц нь нэмэлт номын сан эсвэл хадгалах технологиудад хамаарах амархан боломжтой болгодог.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy zestaw narzędzi do analizy języka różnicowego (DLATK), open-source pakiet pythona oraz narzędzie wiersza poleceń opracowane do przeprowadzania społeczno-naukowych analiz językowych. Podczas gdy DLATK zapewnia standardowe kroki rurociągu NLP, takie jak tokenizacja lub klasyfikacja SVM, jego nowe atuty polegają na analizie przydatnych dla nauk psychologicznych, zdrowotnych i społecznych: (1) włączeniu pozajęzykowych informacji strukturalnych, (2) określonych poziomów i jednostek analizy (np. dokument, użytkownik, społeczność), (3) wskaźniki statystyczne dla ciągłych wyników oraz (4) solidne, sprawdzone, i dokładnych rurociągów do problemów prognozowania społeczno-naukowego. DLATK integruje wiele popularnych pakietów (SKLearn, Mallet), umożliwia interaktywne użytkowanie (Notebooki Jupyter) i ogólnie stosuje się do zasad zorientowanych na obiekty, aby ułatwić powiązanie dodatkowych bibliotek lub technologii pamięci masowej.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer forskjellige språk analyseringsverktøykassa (DLATK), eit opna-kjelde python-pakke og kommandolinjeverktøy utvikla for å gjera sosiale-vitenskapelige språk-analyser. Mens DLATK tilbyr standard NLP-røyr-steg som tokenisering eller SVM-klassifikasjon, sitt romstrekk ligg i analyser som nyttig for psykologisk, helse og sosial vitenskap: (1) inkorporasjon av ekstra-lingvistisk strukturert informasjon, (2) spesifiserte nivå og einingar for analysering (f.eks. dokument, brukar, kommunikasjon), (3) statistiske metrikar for kontinuerleg resultat, og (4) robust, bevist, Og nøyaktig røyr for sosiale-vitenskapelige forhåndsvising. DLATK integrerer fleire populære pakkar (SKLearn, Mallet), slår på interaktiv bruk (Jupyter Notebooks) og følgjer generelt objektorienterte prinsipper for å gjera det lett å binda i ekstra biblioteknologi eller lagringsverktøyar.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm diferențial Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), un pachet Python open-source și instrument de linie de comandă dezvoltat pentru efectuarea analizelor social-științifice ale limbajului. În timp ce DLATK oferă etape standard de conductă NLP, cum ar fi tokenizarea sau clasificarea SVM, noile sale puncte forte constau în analize utile pentru psihologie, sănătate și științe sociale: (1) încorporarea informațiilor structurate extralingvistice, (2) niveluri și unități specifice de analiză (de exemplu document, utilizator, comunitate), (3) măsurători statistice pentru rezultate continue și (4) robuste, dovedite, și conducte precise pentru probleme de predicție social-științifică. DLATK integrează mai multe pachete populare (SKLearn, Mallet), permite utilizarea interactivă (Jupyter Notebooks) și, în general, urmează principiile orientate spre obiecte pentru a face mai ușor conectarea în biblioteci sau tehnologii de stocare suplimentare.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo različite instrumente za analizu jezika (DLATK), paket otvorenog izvora Pythona i alat za komandne linije razvijen za provođenje analize socijalnog i naučnog jezika. Iako DLATK pruža standardne korake za kanalizaciju NLP kao što su tokenizacija ili klasifikacija SVM-a, njegove nove snage nalaze u analizima korisnim za psihološku, zdravlje i socijalnu nauku: (1) uključenje ekstra-lingvističkih strukturiranih informacija, (2) određenih nivoa i jedinica analize (npr. dokument, korisnik, zajednica), (3) statističke metrike za stalne ishode i (4) jake, dokazane, I precizne cijevi za probleme socijalno-naučne predviđanja. DLATK integriše višestruke popularne pakete (SKLearn, Mallet), omogućava interaktivnu korištenje (Jupyter Notebooks) i obično slijedi principe orientirane objekta kako bi se olakšalo vezati u dodatne biblioteke ili tehnologije skladišta.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw Sett ta’ Għodod għall-Analiżi tal-Lingwa Differenzjali (DLATK), pakkett ta’ python open-source u għodda tal-linja ta’ kmand żviluppata għat-twettiq ta’ analiżi tal-lingwi soċjali-xjentifiċi. Filwaqt li DLATK jipprovdi passi standard tal-pipeline NLP bħalma huma t-tokenizzazzjoni jew il-klassifikazzjoni SVM, il-qawwiet ġodda tagħha jinsabu f’analiżi utli g ħax-xjenza psikoloġika, tas-saħħa u soċjali: (1) l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni strutturata extra-lingwistika, (2) livelli u unitajiet ta’ analiżi speċifikati (e ż. dokument, utent, komunità), (3) metriċi statistiċi għal riżultati kontinwi, u (4) robusti, ippruvati, ) u pipelines preċiżi għal problemi ta’ tbassir soċjali-xjentifiku. DLATK jintegra pakketti popolari multipli (SKLearn, Mallet), jippermetti użu interattiv (Jupyter Notebooks), u ġeneralment isegwi prinċipji orjentati lejn l-oġġetti biex jagħmilha faċli li tintrabat f’libreriji addizzjonali jew teknoloġiji tal-ħżin.', 'so': 'Analysis luuqadaha kala duduwan (DLATK), baakad furan ee python iyo qalabka amarka lagu sameeyo baaritaanka luuqada bulshada. Wakhti DLATK uu siiyo tallaabooyin asal ah e e NLP sida calaamad-calaamad ama SVM-classifisiisa, xooggeeda hore waxay ku jirtaa baaritaan faa’iido u leh dhimirka cilmiga psykologiga, caafimaadka iyo cilmiga bulshada: (1) ka soo geliya macluumaadka la dhisay luuqadaha dheer, (2) heerarka iyo kooxaha lagu caddeeyey (e.g. document, user, community), (3) statistical metrics for soo socota, iyo (4) robust,  and accurate pipelines for social-scientific prediction problems.  DLATK wuxuu qabsadaa baakado badan oo popular ah (SKLearn, Mallet), wuxuu qaban karaa isticmaalka interactive ah (Jupyter Notebooks), wuxuuna sida caadiga ah u soo socdaa qoraal la hagaajiyey in loo fududeeyo in lagu xidho maktabadaha dheeraadka ama teknolojiyada lagu kaydiyo.', 'si': 'අපි විවිධ භාෂාව විශ්ලේෂණ උපකරණය (DLATK), විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති DLATK presents standard NLP wireline Steps as Tokenizing or SVM-classification, its roman strength lie in testises Used for psychologistic, Health, and ILO science: (1) integration of extra-language Strructed data, (2) clarified levels and units of study (e.g. file, user, group), (3) Static metrics for ongoous OutCome, and (4) Robist, piern, සමාජික විද්\u200dයාඥාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාජික විද්\u200dයාපිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. Name', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), ett python-paket med öppen källkod och kommandoradsverktyg utvecklat för att genomföra samhällsvetenskapliga språkanalyser. Medan DLATK tillhandahåller standard NLP pipeline steg såsom tokenisering eller SVM-klassificering, ligger dess nya styrkor i analyser som är användbara för psykologi, hälsa och samhällsvetenskap: (1) inkorporering av extra-språklig strukturerad information, (2) specificerade nivåer och analysenheter (t.ex. dokument, användare, gemenskap), (3) statistiska mätvärden för kontinuerliga resultat och (4) robust, beprövad, och korrekta rörledningar för samhällsvetenskapliga förutsägelseproblem. DLATK integrerar flera populära paket (SKLearn, Mallet), möjliggör interaktiv användning (Jupyter Notebooks) och följer generellt objektorienterade principer för att göra det enkelt att koppla in ytterligare bibliotek eller lagringstekniker.', 'ta': 'நாம் வெவ்வேறு மொழி Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), ஒரு திறந்த மூலம் பைதான் தொகுப்பு மற்றும் கட்டளைக்கோடு கருவியை உருவாக்கியுள்ளோம் சமூக அறிவியல் மொ DLATK குறிப்பிட்ட நிலையான NLP பைப்பெல்லின் படிகளை அதாவது குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அதன் புதிய வலிமைகள் தொடர்ந்து வரும் விளைவுகளுக்கு பயனுள்ளதாக ஆராய்ச்சியில் அமைக்கிறது: (1) கூடுதல் மொழி வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட தகவல்களையும், குறிப்பிட்ட மட்டங்களைய சமூக அறிவியல் எதிர்பார்ப்பு பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு தெளிவான பைலன்கள். DLATK பல பெரிய தொகுப்புகளை (SKLearn, Mallet), சேர்க்கப்பட்ட பயன்பாட்டை செயல்படுத்தும் (Jupyter Notebooks), பொதுவாக முறையாக பொருள் முறையிடப்பட்ட குறிப்புகளை பின்பற்றுகிறது, அத', 'ur': 'ہم مختلف زبان تحلیل تولکیٹ (DLATK) کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک کھولا-سورس پیٹون پاکیٹ اور کمندلین تولیل جو سوسیال-علم زبان تحلیل کرنے کے لئے تولید کی جاتی ہے۔ While DLATK provides standard NLP pipeline steps such as tokenization or SVM-classification, its novel strengths are in analyses useful for psychological, health, and social science: (1) incorporation of extra-linguistic structure information, (2) specified levels and units of analysis (e.g. document, user, community), (3) statistical metrics for continuous outcomes, and (4) robust, proven, اور سیاسی-سائل-سائنسی پیش بینی مشکلات کے لئے صحیح پائیپلین۔ DLATK بہت سی محبوب پاکیزوں (SKLearn, Mallet) کو متحدہ کرتا ہے، interactive use (Jupyter Notebooks) کو امکان دیتا ہے، اور عموماً object oriented principles کا اتباع کرتا ہے تاکہ اس کو اضافہ لائبری یا ذخیره تکنولوژی میں آسان بنا سکے۔', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan Kit Alat Analisi Bahasa Berbeza (DLATK), pakej python sumber terbuka dan alat baris perintah yang dikembangkan untuk melakukan analisis bahasa sosial-saintifik. Sementara DLATK menyediakan langkah paip NLP piawai seperti tokenization atau SVM-classification, kekuatan novelnya terletak dalam analisis berguna untuk sains psikologi, kesehatan, dan sosial: (1) penyambungan maklumat struktur ekstra-bahasa, (2) tahap tertentu dan unit analisis (cth. dokumen, pengguna, komuniti), (3) metrik statistik untuk hasil terus menerus, dan (4) kuat, terbukti, - dan saluran paip yang tepat untuk masalah ramalan sosial-saintifik. DLATK menyertai pakej terkenal berbilang (SKLearn, Mallet), membolehkan penggunaan interaktif (Notebooks Jupyter), dan secara umum mengikut prinsip yang mengarah objek untuk memudahkan ikatan dalam perpustakaan tambahan atau teknologi penyimpanan.', 'uz': "Биз маълумот тил таҳлилишини бажариш учун фарқиятли тил таҳлилиш асбобларини ҳозирлаштирамиз. DLATK tasdiqlash yoki SVM darajasi kabi standard NLP pipelining qadamlarini yaratadi, bu yerning novel kuchlari psykologik, saqlash va ijtimoiy fani aniqlashda foydalanadi: (1) qoʻshimcha tillarning tuzilishi haqida maʼlumotni birlashtirish (2) koʻrsatilgan darajaga va analyzerni birlashtirish (masalan, hujjat, foydalanuvchi, jamiyat), (3) davom etish uchun statistical metrikalar va (4) toʻxtatish natijalari uchun foydalanishi mumkin, va ijtimoiy ilmiy tadbirlik muammolari uchun qo'llanmalar. DLATK integrates multiple popular packages (SKLearn, Mallet), enables interactive usage (Jupyter Notebooks), and generally follows object oriented principles to make it easy to tie in additional libraries or storage technologies.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu Công cụ phân tích ngôn ngữ phân biệt (DLATK), một gói Pyhon mở nguồn và một công cụ chỉ huy được phát triển để tiến hành phân tích ngôn ngữ khoa học xã hội. Trong khi DLATK cung cấp các bước dẫn đường tiêu chuẩn của đài NLP, ví dụ như hiệu ứng hay mã hóa hóa SVM, nó giật g ân trong các phân tích tích hữu ích cho tâm lý, sức khỏe và khoa học xã hội: 1) khai thác thông tin cấu trúc thêm ngôn ngữ, 2) chi tiết và các đơn vị phân tích (ví dụ, tài liệu, người dùng, cộng đồng), 3) âm tính cho kết quả liên tục, và (4) vững chắc, được chứng minh, và ống dẫn chính xác cho vấn đề dự đoán khoa học xã hội. DLATK bao gồm nhiều gói hàng phổ biến (SkyLear, Mallet), cho phép sử dụng tương tác (Jupyger Notebook), và thông thường tuân theo các nguyên tắc hướng về đối tượng để dễ dàng trói buộc trong thư viện hay công nghệ lưu trữ thêm.', 'bg': 'Представяме комплект инструменти за анализ на диференциалния език (ДЛАТК), пакет питон с отворен код и инструмент от команден ред, разработен за провеждане на социално-научни езикови анализи. Докато предлага стандартни стъпки от НЛП като токенизация или класификация, новите му силни страни се крият в анализите, полезни за психологията, здравеопазването и социалните науки: (1) включване на извънлингвистична структурирана информация, (2) определени нива и единици на анализ (например документ, потребител, общност), (3) статистически показатели за непрекъснати резултати и (4) стабилни, доказани, и точни тръбопроводи за социално-научни проблеми с прогнозирането. Интегрира множество популярни пакети (позволява интерактивно използване (преносими книги) и като цяло следва обектно ориентирани принципи, за да улесни свързването с допълнителни библиотеки или технологии за съхранение.', 'nl': 'We presenteren Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), een open-source python pakket en command-line tool ontwikkeld voor het uitvoeren van sociaal-wetenschappelijke taalanalyses. Hoewel DLATK standaard NLP-pijpleidingstappen biedt, zoals tokenisering of SVM-classificatie, liggen de nieuwe sterke punten ervan in analyses die nuttig zijn voor psychologische, gezondheids- en sociale wetenschappen: (1) integratie van extra-linguïstische gestructureerde informatie, (2) gespecificeerde niveaus en eenheden van analyse (bijv. document, gebruiker, gemeenschap), (3) statistische statistieken voor continue resultaten, en (4) robuust, bewezen, en nauwkeurige pijpleidingen voor sociaal-wetenschappelijke voorspellingsproblemen. DLATK integreert meerdere populaire pakketten (SKLearn, Mallet), maakt interactief gebruik mogelijk (Jupyter Notebooks) en volgt over het algemeen objectgeoriënteerde principes om het eenvoudig te maken om extra bibliotheken of opslagtechnologieën aan te sluiten.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo različite instrumente za analizu jezika (DLATK), paket otvorenog izvora Pythona i alat za zapovjednu liniju razvijen za provođenje analiza socijalnog i znanstvenog jezika. Iako DLATK pruža standardne korake cjevovodne linije NLP kao što su tokenizacija ili klasifikacija SVM-a, njegove nove snage nalaze u analizima korisnim za psihološku, zdravlje i socijalnu znanost: (1) uključenje ekstra-jezičke strukturirane informacije, (2) određene razine i jedinice analize (npr. dokument, korisnik, zajednica), (3) statističke metrike za stalne ishode te (4) jake, dokazane, i precizne cijevi za probleme socijalno-znanstvenog predviđanja. DLATK integrira višestruke popularne pakete (SKLearn, Mallet), omogućava interaktivnu korištenje (Jupyter Notebooks) i obično slijedi načela orientiranih objekata kako bi se olakšalo vezati u dodatne biblioteke ili tehnologije skladišta.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), en open source python pakke og kommandolinjeværktøj udviklet til at udføre samfundsvidenskabelige sproganalyser. Mens DLATK leverer standard NLP pipeline trin såsom tokenisering eller SVM-klassificering, ligger dens nye styrker i analyser, der er nyttige for psykologi, sundhed og samfundsvidenskab: (1) inkorporering af ekstra-sproglig struktureret information, (2) specificerede niveauer og analyseenheder (f.eks. dokument, bruger, fællesskab), (3) statistiske metrics for kontinuerlige resultater og (4) robuste, beviste, og nøjagtige rørledninger til samfundsvidenskabelige forudsigelsesproblemer. DLATK integrerer flere populære pakker (SKLearn, Mallet), muliggør interaktiv brug (Jupyter Notebooks), og følger generelt objektorienterede principper for at gøre det nemt at knytte yderligere biblioteker eller lagerteknologier.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan Toolkit Analisi Bahasa Differential (DLATK), paket python sumber terbuka dan alat baris perintah yang dikembangkan untuk melakukan analisis bahasa sosial-ilmiah. Sementara DLATK menyediakan langkah pipa standar NLP seperti tokenization atau klasifikasi SVM, kekuatan novelnya terletak dalam analisis berguna untuk psikologi, kesehatan, dan ilmu sosial: (1) inkorporasi informasi strukturasi ekstra-bahasa, (2) tingkat tertentu dan unit analisis (contohnya dokumen, pengguna, komunitas), (3) metrik statistik untuk hasil terus menerus, dan (4) kuat, terbukti, Dan saluran pipa akurat untuk masalah prediksi sosial-ilmiah. DLATK mengintegrasikan banyak paket populer (SKLearn, Mallet), memungkinkan penggunaan interaktif (Jupyter Notebooks), dan umumnya mengikuti prinsip orientasi objek untuk membuat mudah mengikat dalam perpustakaan tambahan atau teknologi penyimpanan.', 'ko': '사회과학 언어 분석을 위한 오픈 소스인python 패키지와 명령행 도구인 Differential Language Analysis Toolkit(DLATK)를 소개했다.DLATK는 표준적인 NLP 파이프 절차를 제공했다. 예를 들어 표기화나 SVM 분류를 제공했지만 그 새로운 장점은 심리, 건강과 사회 과학에 대한 유용한 분석이다. (1) 언어 밖의 구조화된 정보를 포함하고 (2) 지정된 분석 단계와 단위(예를 들어 문서, 사용자, 지역사회), (3) 연속적인 결과의 통계 지표와 (4) 안정적이고 경험적인사회과학 예측 문제의 정확한 통로.DLATK는 여러 개의 유행하는 소프트웨어 패키지(SKLearn, Mallet)를 통합하여 상호작용(Jupyter 노트북)을 지원하고 일반적으로 대상을 대상으로 하는 원칙에 따라 다른 라이브러리나 저장 기술을 쉽게 귀속시킬 수 있다.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren das Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), ein Open-Source Python-Paket und Kommandozeilen-Tool, das für die Durchführung sozialwissenschaftlicher Sprachanalysen entwickelt wurde. Während DLATK Standard-NLP-Pipeline-Schritte wie Tokenisierung oder SVM-Klassifizierung bietet, liegen seine neuen Stärken in Analysen, die für psychologische, gesundheits- und sozialwissenschaftliche Zwecke nützlich sind: (1) Einbeziehung von extralinguistisch strukturierten Informationen, (2) spezifizierte Ebenen und Einheiten der Analyse (z.B. Dokument, Benutzer, Gemeinschaft), (3) statistische Kennzahlen für kontinuierliche Ergebnisse und (4) robuste, bewährte, und genaue Pipelines für sozialwissenschaftliche Vorhersageprobleme. DLATK integriert mehrere gängige Pakete (SKLearn, Mallet), ermöglicht die interaktive Nutzung (Jupyter Notebooks) und folgt im Allgemeinen objektorientierten Prinzipien, um die Einbindung zusätzlicher Bibliotheken oder Speichertechnologien zu vereinfachen.', 'tr': 'Biz dürli Diller Analyzasy Araçlaryny (DLATK), sosial-bilim dili analyzasy üçin açyk-kaynakly python paketleri we beýikligi hatlary çykaryp geliştirdik. DLATK tokenizat ýa-da SVM-klasifikasy ýaly standart NLP pipeline adımlaryny temin edýär, onuň novelleri psikolojik, saglyk we sosyal bilimi üçin peýdaly analysiýalarda alyp barýar: (1) ýene-dilli strukturly maglumatyň ýerleşmesi, (2) takyk derejesi we analýşiň birimlerini (meselâ, sened, ullançy, jemgyýeti), (3) daşary netijeli netijeler üçin statistik metrikler we (4) ýigrenç, ث sosial-bilim öngörüm meseleleri üçin dogry pipelini. DLATK birnäçe popüler paketleri (SKLearn, Mallet), etkileşimli ulanmagy mümkin edýär (Jupyter Notebooks) we adatça zadyň yönünde boýunça kitaphanelerde ýa-da almak tehnologiýalarynda ýeňil baglaşmak üçin zady gurlanýan prinsiplere taýýar.', 'fa': 'ما ابزار تحلیل زبان متفاوتی (DLATK) را نشان می دهیم، یک بسته python منبع باز و ابزار خط فرمان برای تحلیل زبان اجتماعی و علمی توسعه داده شده است. While DLATK provides standard pipeline NLP steps such as tokenization or SVM-classification, its strengths are in analyses useful for psychological, health and social science: (1) incorporation of extra-linguistic structure information, (2) specified levels and units of analysis (e.g. document, user, community), (3) statistical metrics for continuous outcomes, and (4) robust, proven, و خط لوله دقیق برای مشکلات پیش بینی اجتماعی و علمی. DLATK بسته\u200cهای بسته\u200cهای مشهور (SKLearn, Mallet) را جمع می\u200cکند، فعال می\u200cکند استفاده\u200cهای متفاوتی (Jupyter Notebooks) و عموماً از اصول\u200cهای مستقیم objektu پیروی می\u200cکند تا در کتابخانه\u200cهای اضافه یا تکنولوژی ذخیره آسان گرداند.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim Gjuha Analizë Differenciale Toolkit (DLATK), një paketë python me burim të hapur dhe një mjet linje komandash të zhvilluar për kryerjen e analizave sociale-shkencore të gjuhës. Ndërsa DLATK ofron hapa standarte të tubacionit NLP të tilla si tokenizimi apo klasifikimi i SVM, forcat e saj të reja janë në analiza të dobishme për shkencën psikologjike, shëndetësore dhe sociale: (1) përfshirje e informacionit ekstra-gjuhësor të strukturuar, (2) nivele dhe njësitë e specifikuara të analizës (për shembull dokumenti, përdoruesi, komuniteti), (3) metrika statistike për rezultate të vazhdueshme dhe (4) të forta, të vërtetuara, Dhe tubacione të sakta për problemet e parashikimit shoqëror-shkencor. DLATK integron paketa të shumta popullore (SKLearn, Mallet), mundëson përdorimin interaktiv (Jupyter Notebooks) dhe përgjithësisht ndjek parimet e orientuara në objekte për të bërë të lehtë lidhjen në biblioteka shtesë apo teknologji ruajtjeje.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka kituo cha Uchambuzi wa Lugha tofauti (DLATK), kituo cha python kilichofunguliwa na zana za simu za amri zilizoundwa kwa ajili ya kufanya uchambuzi wa lugha za kijamii na kisayansi. Wakati DLATK hutoa hatua za viwango vya NLP kama vile kutangaza alama au usambazaji wa SVM, nguvu za riwaya zinaweka katika uchambuzi unaotufaika kwa ajili ya kisaikolojia, afya na sayansi za kijamii: (1) kuingiza taarifa zilizotengenezwa kwa lugha nyingine, (2) viwango maalum na vifaa vya uchambuzi (kwa mfano, nyaraka, mtumiaji, jamii), (3) mitazamo ya takwimu kwa matokeo yanayoendelea, na (4) yanaonyesha,  and accurate pipelines for social-scientific prediction problems.  DLATK inaunganisha vifurushi vingi maarufu (SKLearn, Mallet), inawezesha kutumia matumizi ya moja kwa moja (Notifications of Jupyter), na kwa ujumla hufuata kanuni zilizoongozwa ili kufanya hivyo kuwa rahisi kufungwa katika maktaba za ziada au teknolojia ya kuhifadhia.', 'af': "Ons stel verskillende taal analisie nutsbalkit (DLATK), ' n oop-bron python pakket en opdraglyn nutsbalk ontwikkeld vir die conducting van sosiale-wetenskaplike taal analisies. Terwyl DLATK verskaf standaard NLP pipeline stappe soos tokenisasie of SVM-klassifikasie, lê sy novel e sterkte in analysies wat gebruik is vir psykologies, gesondheid en sosiale wetenskap: (1) inkorporering van ekstra-lingvisiese struktureerde inligting, (2) gespesifiseerde vlakke en eenhede van analisie (bv. dokument, gebruiker, gemeenskap), (3) statistiese metrike vir voortdurende uitvoegings en (4) robust, bevestig, en presies pyplyn vir sosiale-wetenskaplike voorskou probleme. DLATK integreer veelvuldige populêre pakkette (SKLearn, Mallet), aktiveer interaktiewe gebruik (Jupyter Notebooks), en gewoonlik volg voorwerp orienteerde prinsipels om dit maklik te maak in addisionele biblioteke of opslaan teknologies.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), የማኅበራዊ-ሳይንሳዊ ቋንቋ-Analysis ለመፈለግ የክፈት የፕython ጥቅል እና የመትእዛዝ-የመረጃ ሀብት እናቀርባታለን፡፡ DLATK በተጨማሪው የግንኙነት አካባቢ የNLP ቅድሚያ እርምጃዎችን እንደ ማስታወቂያ ወይም SVM-መግለጫ የሚያደርግ፣ የአሁኑን አካባቢዎች ለሲኮሎጂ፣ ጤና እና ማኅበራዊ እውቀት ይጠቅማል በማስተዋል ይኖራል:(1) በተለየው የቋንቋዊ መረጃ እና የአካላት ደረጃዎች (ምሳሌ ሰነድ፣ ተጠቃሚ፣ ማኅበረሰብ፣ (3) ለዘወትር ውጤቶች እና (4) የተፈጸመ፣ እና ማኅበራዊ-ሳይንሳይዊ ትንቢት ጉዳይ ላይ የተፈጸመ የኮንፕላንዶች ። DLATK ብዙዎች የሕዝብ ጥቅሎችን (SKLearn, Mallet), የሚቀጥለው ተጠቃሚዎችን (Jupyter Notebooks) ያስችላል፤ በተጨማሪም መብረቆች ወይም የዝግጅት ቴክኖሎጂዎችን ማሰር ያቀላል አካባቢዎችን ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz dəyişiklik dil analizi araçlarını (DLATK), açıq-kaynaklı Python paketi və sosial-elmi dil analizi üçün hazırlanmış əmr-səhifə aracı göstəririk. DLATK tokenizasyon və SVM klasifikasyonu kimi standart NLP bor çizgi adımlarını sağlayaraq, onun yeni g ücləri psikolojik, sağlığı və sosyal elmi üçün faydalı analizi ilə istifadə edir: (1) ekstra dil qurulmuş məlumatların birləşdirilməsi, (2) beləliklə dərəcələr və analizi birləşdirilməsi (məsələlər, istifadəçi, toplum), (3) sürəkli sonuçlar üçün statistik metrikləri və (4) qüvvətli və sosial-elmi tədbir problemləri üçün doğru pipelines. DLATK çoxlu məşhur paketləri (SKLearn, Mallet) birləşdirir, interaktif istifadə edər (Jupyter Notebooks) və genellikle objekt tərəfindən tərəfindən istifadə edər ki, əlavə kitabları ya da depolama teknolojilərinə bağlanmaq üçün asanlaşdırmaq üçün asanlaşdırar.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տարբեր լեզվի վերլուծության գործիքներ (ԴԼԹԹՔ), բաց կոդը ստեղծված փիթոնի փաթեթ և հրամանների գծի գործիքներ, որոնք զարգացվել են սոցիալ-գիտական լեզվի վերլուծության համար: Մինչդեռ ԴԼԹԹՔ-ը ստեղծում է ստանդարտ ՆԼՊ խողովակաշարերի քայլեր, ինչպիսիք են թոկենիզացիան կամ ՍՎՄ-դասակարգումը, դրա նոր ուժեղությունները հիմնված են հոգեբանական, առողջապահության և սոցիալական գիտության համար օգտակար վերլուծություններում: (1) արտաքին լեզվաբանական կառուցվածքային տեղեկատվության ներառումը, (2) որոշ մակարդակներ և վերլուծության միա Սոցիալ-գիտական կանխատեսման խնդիրների ճշգրիտ խողովակաշարերը: ԴԼԹԹ ինտեգրում է բազմաթիվ հայտնի փաթեթներ (SkLern, MalLet), հնարավորություն է տալիս ինտերակտիվ օգտագործել (Jupy ter NoteBooks), և ընդհանուր առմամբ հետևում է օբյեկտներով հիմնված սկզբունքներին, որպեսզի ավելի հեշտ կապել ավելին գր', 'bn': 'সামাজিক-বিজ্ঞানিক ভাষা বিশ্লেষণের জন্য আমরা বিভিন্ন ভাষা বিশ্লেষণ টুলিকিট (ডিলাটকে), একটি খোলা সোর্সের প্যাকেজ এবং কমান্ড-লাইন টু যদিও DLATK স্ট্যান্ডার্ড এনএলপি পাইপেলাইন পদক্ষেপ প্রদান করে যেমন চিহ্নিত বা এসভিএম-ক্লাসাফিকেশন, তার উপন্যাসের শক্তি মানসিক, স্বাস্থ্য এবং সামাজিক বিজ্ঞানের জন্য উপযুক্ত বিশ্লেষণে লিখেছে: (১) অতিরিক্ত ভাষার সংস্কার ত এবং সামাজিক-বিজ্ঞানিক ভবিষ্যতের সমস্যার জন্য সঠিক পাইপেলেন। DLATK integrates multiple popular packages (SKLearn, Mallet), enables interactive usage (Jupyter Notebooks), and generally follows object oriented principles to make it easy to tie in additional libraries or storage technologies.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo različite instrumente za analizu jezika (DLATK), paket otvorenog izvora Pythona i alat za komandne linije razvijen za provođenje analiza socijalnog i naučnog jezika. Iako DLATK pruža standardne korake za kanalizaciju NLP-a kao što su tokenizacija ili klasifikacija SVM-a, njegove nove snage nalaze u analizima korisnim za psihološku, zdravlje i socijalnu nauku: (1) uključenje ekstra-lingvističkih strukturiranih informacija, (2) određenih nivoa i jedinica analize (npr. dokument, korisnik, zajednica), (3) statističke metrike za stalne ishode i (4) jake, dokazane, I precizne cijevi za probleme socijalno-naučne predviđanja. DLATK integrira višestruke popularne pakete (SKLearn, Mallet), omogućava interaktivnu korištenje (Jupyter Notebooks) i obično slijedi principe orientirane objekta kako bi se olakšalo vezati u dodatne biblioteke ili tehnologije skladišta.', 'ca': "We present Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), an open-source python package and command-line tool developed for conducting social-scientific language analyses.  Mentre que DLATK proporciona països normalitzats de pipeline NLP com la fitogenització o la classificació SVM, les seves noves fortitats es troben en anàlisis útils per a la ciència psicològica, sanitària i social: (1) incorporació d'informació estructurada extralingüística, (2) nivells especificats i unitats d'anàlisi (per exemple, document, usuari, comunitat), (3) mètriques estadístices per a resultats continus, i (4) robustos, demostrats, i conductes precises per a problemes de predicció social-científica. DLATK integra múltiples paquets populars (SKLearn, Mallet), permet l'ús interactiu (Jupyter Notebooks), i generalment segueix principis orientats a objectes per fer fàcil unir biblioteques adicionals o tecnologies d'emmagatzematge.", 'fi': 'Esittelemme Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), avoimen lähdekoodin python-paketin ja komentorivityökalun, joka on kehitetty yhteiskunnallis-tieteellisten kielianalyysien tekemiseen. DLATK tarjoaa NLP:n vakiovaiheita, kuten tokenisointia tai SVM-luokitusta, mutta sen vahvuudet ovat psykologian, terveyden ja yhteiskuntatieteiden kannalta hyödylliset analyysit: (1) ekstrakielisen strukturoidun tiedon sisällyttäminen, (2) määritellyt analyysitasot ja -yksiköt (esim. dokumentti, käyttäjä, yhteisö), (3) tilastolliset mittarit jatkuvien tulosten saavuttamiseksi ja (4) vankka, todistettu, ja tarkat putkistot yhteiskunnallis-tieteellisiin ennusteongelmiin. DLATK integroi useita suosittuja paketteja (SKLearn, Mallet), mahdollistaa vuorovaikutteisen käytön (Jupyter Notebooks) ja noudattaa yleensä objektisuuntautuneita periaatteita, jotta kirjastojen tai tallennusteknologioiden liittäminen on helppoa.', 'cs': 'Představujeme diferenciální jazykovou analýzu Toolkit (DLATK), open-source python balíček a příkazový řádek vyvinutý pro provádění sociálně-vědeckých jazykových analýz. Zatímco DLATK poskytuje standardní kroky NLP potrubí, jako je tokenizace nebo klasifikace SVM, jeho nové silné stránky spočívají v analýzách užitečných pro psychologické, zdravotní a sociální vědy: (1) začlenění mimojazykově strukturovaných informací, (2) specifikované úrovně a jednotky analýzy (např. dokument, uživatel, komunita), (3) statistické metriky pro kontinuální výsledky a (4) robustní, ověřené, a přesné potrubí pro sociálně-vědecké problémy predikce. DLATK integruje několik populárních balíčků (SKLearn, Mallet), umožňuje interaktivní použití (Jupyter Notebooky) a obecně dodržuje objektově orientované principy, aby bylo snadné připojit další knihovny nebo technologie úložiště.', 'et': 'Esitleme Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), avatud lähtekoodiga püthon paketi ja käsurea tööriista, mis on välja töötatud sotsiaal-teaduslike keeleanalüüside läbiviimiseks. Kuigi DLATK pakub standardseid NLP etappe, nagu tokeniseerimine või SVM-klassifikatsioon, peituvad selle uued tugevused psühholoogilises, tervishoiu- ja sotsiaalteadustes kasulikes analüüsides: (1) ekstrakeelelise struktureeritud teabe kaasamine, (2) kindlaksmääratud tasemed ja analüüsiüksused (nt dokument, kasutaja, kogukond), (3) statistilised mõõdikud pidevate tulemuste jaoks ja (4) tugevad, tõestatud, ja täpsed torujuhtmed sotsiaal-teaduslike prognooside probleemide jaoks. DLATK integreerib mitmeid populaarseid pakette (SKLearn, Mallet), võimaldab interaktiivset kasutamist (Jupyteri sülearvutid) ja järgib üldiselt objektile orienteeritud põhimõtteid, et lihtsustada täiendavate teekide või salvestustehnoloogiate sidumist.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam orodje za analizo diferencialnega jezika (DLATK), odprtokodni paket python in orodje ukazne vrstice, razvito za izvajanje družbeno-znanstvenih jezikovnih analiz. Medtem ko DLATK zagotavlja standardne korake NLP, kot sta žetonizacija ali SVM-klasifikacija, so njegove nove prednosti v analizah, ki so koristne za psihološke, zdravstvene in družbene vede: (1) vključevanje ekstra-jezikovnih strukturiranih informacij, (2) določene ravni in enote analize (npr. dokument, uporabnik, skupnost), (3) statistične metrike za stalne rezultate in (4) robustne, dokazane, in natančne cevovode za družbeno-znanstvene napovedi. DLATK združuje več priljubljenih paketov (SKLearn, Mallet), omogoča interaktivno uporabo (Jupyter Notebooks) in na splošno upošteva predmetno usmerjena načela, da olajša povezovanje dodatnih knjižnic ali tehnologij shranjevanja.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים ערכת כלי ניתוח שפה שונה (DLATK), חבילה פיתון מקור פתוח וכלי קו פקודה שפותחים לבצע ניתוח שפה חברתית-מדעית. בעוד DLATK מספק צעדים צינור NLP סטנדרטיים כמו tokenization או SVM-classification, החזקים החדשים שלה נמצאים בניתוחים שימושיים למדע פסיכולוגי, בריאות וחברתי: (1) הכילוי של מידע מובנה מחוץ לשונות, (2) רמות ומחידות ניתוח מסוימות (למשל מסמך, משתמש, קהילה), (3) מטריקה סטטיסטית לתוצאות ממשיכות, ו (4) חזקה, מווכחה, צינורות מדויקים לבעיות צפייה חברתית-מדעית. DLATK מייצר חבילות פופולריות רבות (SKLearn, Mallet), מאפשר שימוש אינטראקטיבי (Jupyter Notebooks), ובכלל עוקב אחרי עקרונות ממוקדים על אובייקטים כדי להקל לקשור בספריות נוספות או טכנולוגיות אחסון.', 'ha': 'Tuna halatar da Shirin Analyza na Harabũta na Di-Aiki (DMATK), wata akwatin python na buɗe-yanzu da aka buɗe zanen umarnin don ya yi amfani da Analomasin lugha masu da sani. Waka da DMATK ke samar da wasu hanyõyi na naƙasan NLP kamar shirin tsari ko SvM-classified, ƙarami na cikin analyza masu amfani da amfani ga aikin aikoloji, da abin da ya yi amfani da shi, da kyautar da masu sani: (1) za\'a shigar da data na ƙaranci da aka daidaita, (2) daraja da sunaye na ƙayyade (misali, dokuman, mai amfani da shi, da jama\'a), "3) statistical metrics ga fassaran na daidaici, kuma (4) wanda aka jarraba, kuma misalin masu sauri na wajen bastarwa masu basĩri da masu sani. DLETK na haɗa wasu da aka sani (SKLearn, Mallen), yana iya amfani da amfani da mai interactive (Notebooks na Jupyter), kuma yana biyar rubutun da aka origina abun don ya sauƙaƙara ta cikin libraries ko kuma masu tsari technogi.', 'jv': 'We present Héwé DLAT mbukak Standard NLP kegangarno kanggo tokenializasi karo SVM-klasik, bener kuwi basa sing gawe basa basa luwih nggawe bener kanggo diwisalahan luwih apik, wérti, lan saiki sokar: (1) inkportation of extra-Linguistik structural information, (2) Cendelok lan unit of measurement (isim. document, user, komunity), "(3) stasitical Metika kanggo kontinus-ultrasor, lan (4) botul, test, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive DLAT mlamlaku paket sing akeh populer (sKLearn, malit), iso dianggawe gambar interactive', 'bo': 'We present Differential Language Analysis Toolkit (DLATK), an open-source python package and command-line tool developed for conducting social-scientific language analyses. While DLATK provides standard NLP pipeline steps such as tokenization or SVM-classification, its novel strengths lie in analyses useful for psychological, health, and social science: (1) incorporation of extra-linguistic structured information, (2) specified levels and units of analysis (e.g. document, user, community), (3) statistical metrics for continuous outcomes, and (4) robust, proven, སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་ཚན་རིག་གི་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུད་དུ་གཏོང་དགོས། DLATK ལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཐུམ་སྒྲིལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'QUINT : Interpretable Question Answering over Knowledge Bases', 'ar': 'QUINT: إجابة الأسئلة القابلة للتفسير على قواعد المعرفة', 'es': 'QUINT: Respuestas interpretables a preguntas sobre bases de conocimiento', 'pt': 'QUINT: Respondendo a perguntas interpretáveis sobre bases de conhecimento', 'fr': 'QUINT\xa0: Réponses aux questions interprétables sur les bases de connaissances', 'ja': 'QUINT ：ナレッジベース上での解釈可能な質問の回答', 'zh': 'QUINT曰:以知识库对', 'hi': 'क्विंट: व्याख्यात्मक प्रश्न नॉलेज बेस पर जवाब', 'ru': 'QUINT: Интерпретируемые ответы на вопросы по базам знаний', 'ga': 'QUINT: Ceist Inléirithe ag Freagra thar Bhunáit Eolais', 'ka': 'QUINT', 'el': 'QUINT: Διερμηνώσιμη απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις μέσω βάσεων γνώσης', 'hu': 'QUINT: Értelmezhető kérdések megválaszolása tudásbázisokon', 'it': 'QUINT: Risposta alle domande interpretabili su basi di conoscenza', 'kk': 'QUINT: Білім негізінде жауап беретін сұрақ', 'lt': 'QUINT: Interpretable Question Answering over Knowledge Bases', 'mk': 'КВИНТ: Интерпретабилен одговор на прашања во врска со базите на знаење', 'ms': 'QUINT: Jawapan Pertanyaan Boleh Terinterpretasi atas Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'ക്യൂന്\u200dറ്: അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യം', 'mt': 'QUINT: Tweġiba Interpretabbli għal Mistoqsijiet dwar Bażijiet ta’ Għarfien', 'mn': 'QUINT: Мэдлэг суурь дээр хариулт гаргах боломжтой асуулт', 'no': 'QUINT: Interpretabil spørsmål svar over kjensbaser', 'pl': 'QUINT: Interpretacyjne pytania odpowiadające na bazy wiedzy', 'ro': 'QUINT: Răspunsuri la întrebări interpretabile în bazele de cunoștințe', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanje o bazi znanja', 'si': 'QUINT: දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'so': "QUINT: jawaabta su'aalaha turjumista ee aasaasiga aqoonta", 'sv': 'QUINT: Tolkbart frågesvar över kunskapsbaser', 'ta': 'குறிப்பு: அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படைகளுக்கு மேல் விடைக்கும் Interpretable கேள்வி', 'ur': 'QUINT: علم Bases پر جواب دینے والی سوال', 'uz': 'QUINT: Interpretable Question Answering over Knowledge Bases', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi giải thích về Kiến thức', 'bg': 'Тълкуваем отговор на въпроси в базата на знания', 'hr': 'QUINT: Odgovor na pitanje o bazi znanja', 'da': 'QUINT: Tolkbar spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbaser', 'nl': 'QUINT: Interpreteerbare vragen beantwoorden via kennisbanken', 'ko': 'QUINT: 지식 라이브러리 기반의 해석 가능한 질문에 대한 답변', 'fa': 'QUINT: سوال قابل توضیح پاسخ بر پایه\u200cهای دانش', 'de': 'QUINT: Interpretierbare Frage Beantwortung über Wissensbasen', 'id': 'QUINT: Jawaban Pertanyaan Terinterpretasi Dari Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'sw': 'QUINT: Interpretable Question Answering over Knowledge Bases', 'tr': 'ÇUINT: Bilim Baseleri barada terjime edilen sorag jogap', 'sq': 'QĂ‹NTĂ‹: PĂ«rgjigje pĂ«r pyetje tĂ« interpretueshme mbi bazat e njohurive', 'af': 'QUINT: Interpretable Fraag Antwoord oor kennis Basies', 'hy': 'Գիտելու հիմքերի մասին թարգմանելի հարցերի պատասխանը', 'am': 'QUINT: በአውቀት መቀመጫዎች ላይ የሚተርጉም ጥያቄ', 'az': 'QUINT: Bilim √únvarlarńĪ √ľz…ôrind…ô t…ôŇükil edil…ôn sual cavabńĪ', 'bn': 'কিউইনেট: জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিতে ব্যাখ্যাত প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'cs': 'QUINT: Interpretovatelné odpovědi na otázky prostřednictvím znalostních bází', 'bs': 'Razumljivo pitanje odgovora na baze znanja', 'ca': 'QUINT: Interpretable Question Answering over Knowledge Bases', 'et': 'QUINT: Tõlgendatav küsimustele vastamine teadmistebaaside üle', 'fi': 'QUINT: Tulkittavat kysymykset tietokantojen kautta', 'jv': 'query-criteria', 'he': 'קווינט: תשובות לשאלות מתפרצות על בסיסי ידע', 'sk': 'QUINT: Razlagljivo odgovarjanje na vprašanja v zvezi z bazami znanja', 'ha': 'QUINT: Socket error code NotSupported', 'bo': 'QUINT: ཡིག་སྒྲུབ་ལ་འགྲོ་རུང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གིས་ཤེས་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་དང་ལན་གསལ་པ'}
{'en': 'We present QUINT, a live system for question answering over knowledge bases. QUINT automatically learns role-aligned utterance-query templates from user questions paired with their answers. When QUINT answers a question, it visualizes the complete derivation sequence from the natural language utterance to the final answer. The derivation provides an explanation of how the syntactic structure of the question was used to derive the structure of a SPARQL query, and how the phrases in the question were used to instantiate different parts of the query. When an answer seems unsatisfactory, the derivation provides valuable insights towards reformulating the question.', 'ar': 'نقدم QUINT ، وهو نظام حي للإجابة على الأسئلة على قواعد المعرفة. يتعلم QUINT تلقائيًا قوالب استعلام الكلام المنطقي المتوافقة مع الأدوار من أسئلة المستخدم المقترنة بإجاباتها. عندما يجيب QUINT على سؤال ، فإنه يتخيل تسلسل الاشتقاق الكامل من النطق اللغوي الطبيعي إلى الإجابة النهائية. يوفر الاشتقاق شرحًا لكيفية استخدام البنية النحوية للسؤال لاشتقاق بنية استعلام سباركل ، وكيف تم استخدام العبارات في السؤال لإنشاء مثيل لأجزاء مختلفة من الاستعلام. عندما تبدو الإجابة غير مرضية ، يوفر الاشتقاق رؤى قيمة لإعادة صياغة السؤال.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o QUINT, um sistema ao vivo para responder perguntas sobre bases de conhecimento. A QUINT aprende automaticamente modelos de consulta de enunciado alinhados por função a partir de perguntas do usuário combinadas com suas respostas. Quando o QUINT responde a uma pergunta, ele visualiza a sequência de derivação completa do enunciado em linguagem natural até a resposta final. A derivação fornece uma explicação de como a estrutura sintática da pergunta foi usada para derivar a estrutura de uma consulta SPARQL e como as frases na pergunta foram usadas para instanciar diferentes partes da consulta. Quando uma resposta parece insatisfatória, a derivação fornece insights valiosos para a reformulação da questão.', 'es': 'Presentamos QUINT, un sistema en vivo para responder preguntas a través de bases de conocimiento. QUINT aprende automáticamente las plantillas de consulta de enunciado alineadas con los roles de las preguntas de los usuarios junto con sus respuestas. Cuando QUINT responde a una pregunta, visualiza la secuencia de derivación completa desde el enunciado en lenguaje natural hasta la respuesta final. La derivación proporciona una explicación de cómo se usó la estructura sintáctica de la pregunta para derivar la estructura de una consulta SPARQL y cómo se usaron las frases de la pregunta para crear instancias de diferentes partes de la consulta. Cuando una respuesta parece insatisfactoria, la derivación proporciona información valiosa para reformular la pregunta.', 'fr': "Nous présentons QUINT, un système en direct pour répondre aux questions sur des bases de connaissances. QUINT apprend automatiquement les modèles de requête d'énoncé alignés sur les rôles à partir des questions des utilisateurs associées à leurs réponses. Lorsque QUINT répond à une question, il visualise la séquence de dérivation complète depuis l'énoncé en langage naturel jusqu'à la réponse finale. La dérivation explique comment la structure syntaxique de la question a été utilisée pour dériver la structure d'une requête SPARQL, et comment les phrases de la question ont été utilisées pour instancier différentes parties de la requête. Lorsqu'une réponse ne semble pas satisfaisante, la dérivation fournit des informations précieuses pour reformuler la question.", 'ja': 'ナレッジベース上で質問に答えるためのライブシステムであるQUINTをご紹介します。QUINTは、回答とペアになったユーザーの質問から、ロールアライメントされた発話クエリテンプレートを自動的に学習します。クイントが質問に答えると、自然言語の発話から最終的な答えまでの完全な導出シーケンスが視覚化されます。導出は、質問の構文構造がSPARQLクエリの構造を導出するためにどのように使用されたか、および問題のフレーズがクエリの異なる部分をインスタンス化するためにどのように使用されたかを説明します。答えが満足のいくものではないと思われる場合、導出は質問を再定式化するための貴重な洞察を提供します。', 'hi': 'हम क्विंट, ज्ञान के आधार पर सवाल का जवाब देने के लिए एक लाइव सिस्टम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। क्विंट स्वचालित रूप से उनके उत्तरों के साथ युग्मित उपयोगकर्ता प्रश्नों से भूमिका-संरेखित कथन-क्वेरी टेम्पलेट्स सीखता है. जब क्विंट किसी प्रश्न का उत्तर देता है, तो यह प्राकृतिक भाषा के उच्चारण से अंतिम उत्तर तक पूर्ण व्युत्पत्ति अनुक्रम की कल्पना करता है। व्युत्पत्ति इस बात की व्याख्या प्रदान करती है कि प्रश्न की वाक्यात्मक संरचना का उपयोग SPARQL क्वेरी की संरचना को प्राप्त करने के लिए कैसे किया गया था, और क्वेरी के विभिन्न भागों को शुरू करने के लिए प्रश्न में वाक्यांशों का उपयोग कैसे किया गया था। जब कोई उत्तर असंतोषजनक लगता है, तो व्युत्पत्ति प्रश्न को फिर से तैयार करने की दिशा में मूल्यवान अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करती है।', 'zh': '吾言QUINT,以知识库对者实时统。 QUINT 自用户及对案学角色语问模板。 QUINT 对一问,则可视化自自然语言语至终报案之全。 使生共其语法 SPARQL 问其所用,与其短语之所不同者。 对案似不惬,推导为重定计。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем QUINT, живую систему для ответов на вопросы по базам знаний. КВИНТ автоматически изучает шаблоны запросов с выравниванием по ролям из вопросов пользователей, сопровождаемых их ответами. Когда КВИНТ отвечает на вопрос, он визуализирует полную последовательность извлечения из высказывания на естественном языке до окончательного ответа. Вывод дает объяснение того, как синтаксическая структура вопроса была использована для получения структуры запроса SPARQL, и как фразы в вопросе были использованы для создания экземпляра различных частей запроса. В тех случаях, когда ответ представляется неудовлетворительным, этот вывод дает ценное представление о переформулировании вопроса.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid QUINT i láthair, córas beo chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt thar bhunachar eolais. Foghlaimíonn QUINT teimpléid ráiteas-ailínithe go huathoibríoch ó cheisteanna úsáideoirí atá péireáilte lena gcuid freagraí. Nuair a fhreagraíonn QUINT ceist, samhlaíonn sé seicheamh iomlán an díorthaithe ón chaint nádúrtha teanga go dtí an freagra deiridh. Tugann an díorthú míniú ar an gcaoi ar úsáideadh struchtúr comhréire na ceiste chun struchtúr ceiste SPARQL a dhíorthú, agus conas a úsáideadh na frásaí sa cheist chun codanna éagsúla den cheist a chur ar an toirt. Nuair is cosúil go bhfuil freagra míshásúil, cuireann an díorthú léargais luachmhara ar fáil chun an cheist a athfhoirmliú.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα ζωντανό σύστημα απάντησης ερωτήσεων μέσω βάσεων γνώσης. Το μαθαίνει αυτόματα πρότυπα ερωτήματος εκφοράς ευθυγραμμισμένα με ρόλους από ερωτήσεις χρηστών σε συνδυασμό με τις απαντήσεις τους. Όταν το QUINT απαντά σε μια ερώτηση, οπτικοποιεί την πλήρη ακολουθία παραγώγων από την ομιλία της φυσικής γλώσσας μέχρι την τελική απάντηση. Η παράγωγη παρέχει μια εξήγηση του πώς η συντακτική δομή της ερώτησης χρησιμοποιήθηκε για να αντληθεί η δομή ενός ερωτήματος και πώς οι φράσεις στην ερώτηση χρησιμοποιήθηκαν για να στιγματίσουν διαφορετικά μέρη του ερωτήματος. Όταν μια απάντηση φαίνεται μη ικανοποιητική, η προέλευση παρέχει πολύτιμες πληροφορίες για την επαναδιατύπωση της ερώτησης.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a QUINT-ot, egy élő rendszert a tudásbázisokon keresztül történő kérdések megválaszolására. A QUINT automatikusan megtanulja a szerepkörökhöz igazított kimondási-lekérdezési sablonokat a válaszokkal párosított felhasználói kérdésekből. Amikor a QUINT válaszol egy kérdésre, megjeleníti a teljes származási sorrendet a természetes nyelv kimondásától a végső válaszig. A levonás magyarázatot ad arra, hogy a kérdés szintaktikus struktúráját hogyan használták egy SPARQL lekérdezés szerkezetének levonására, és hogyan használták a kérdésben szereplő kifejezéseket a lekérdezés különböző részeinek instantiálására. Amikor egy válasz nem kielégítőnek tűnik, a levonás értékes betekintést nyújt a kérdés újraformálásához.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ QUINT-ს, ცხოვრებული სისტემა, კითხვის გასაღებისთვის მეცნიერების ბაზების შესახებ. Name როდესაც QUINT კითხვის გასაგების შესახებ, ის ვიზუალურებს დასრულებული განსრულებების წერტილიდან ბოლო წერტილიდან დასრულებული პასუხისთვის. განსაზღვრება განსაზღვრებს, როგორ კითხვის სინტაქტიული სტრუქტურაცია გამოყენებულია SPARQL კითხვის სტრუქტურაციას და როგორ კითხვის განსხვავებული ნაწილების განსაზღვრებისთვის გამოყენებულია. როდესაც საპასუხი არაფერი იქნება, განსხვავება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შესახებ კითხვის რეფორმეტულაციას.', 'it': 'Vi presentiamo QUINT, un sistema live per rispondere alle domande su basi di conoscenza. QUINT apprende automaticamente i modelli di query di pronuncia allineati ai ruoli dalle domande degli utenti associate alle loro risposte. Quando QUINT risponde a una domanda, visualizza la sequenza completa di derivazione dalla pronuncia del linguaggio naturale alla risposta finale. La derivazione fornisce una spiegazione di come la struttura sintattica della domanda è stata utilizzata per derivare la struttura di una query SPARQL, e come le frasi nella domanda sono state utilizzate per istanziare diverse parti della query. Quando una risposta sembra insoddisfacente, la derivazione fornisce preziose intuizioni per riformulare la domanda.', 'kk': 'QUINT дегенді білім негізінде жауап беру үшін сұрақ жүйесін таңдаймыз. QUINT автоматты түрде жауаптармен біріктірілген пайдаланушылардың сұрақтарынан рөл- тізбекті сұрақ үлгілерін үйренеді. QUINT сұраққа жауап бергенде, оның табиғи тілден соңғы жауап тұратынын көрсетеді. Сұраныстың синтактикалық құрылғысын SPARQL сұраныстың құрылғысын түсіндіру үшін және сұраныстың бірнеше бөліктерін түсіндіру үшін мәліметті түсіндіреді. Жауап жауап тұрақсыз сияқты болғанда, тұрақты сұрақты реформациялау үшін маңызды түсініктер береді.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome QUINT, gyvą klausimų atsakymo sistemą žinių bazėse. QUINT automatiškai išsiaiškina pagal vaidmenį suderintus žodžių ir klausymų šablonus iš naudotojo klausimų, susiejamų su jų atsakymais. Kai QUINT atsako į klausimą, jis vizualizuoja visą išvedimo seką nuo natūralios kalbos išraiškos iki galutinio atsakymo. Išvestinė informacija paaiškina, kaip buvo naudojama klausimo sintaksinė struktūra SPARQL klausimo struktūrai gauti, ir kaip klausimo frazės buvo naudojamos skirtingoms klausimo dalims įspėti. Kai atsakymas atrodo nepatenkinamas, išvestinė finansinė priemonė suteikia vertingų įžvalgų, kaip persvarstyti klausimą.', 'mk': 'Го претставуваме КВИНТ, жив систем за одговори на прашања преку базите на знаење. QUINT автоматски научи шаблони за изразување и прашање со улога во согласност со нивните одговори од прашањата на корисникот. Кога QUINT одговара на прашање, го визуелизира целосната секвенца на деринација од природниот јазик до конечниот одговор. Дериминацијата обезбедува објаснување за тоа како синтактичката структура на прашањето била употребена за да се извлече структурата на прашањето SPARQL, и како фразите во прашањето биле употребени за инстанцијација на различни делови од прашањето. Кога одговорот изгледа незадоволен, деринацијата обезбедува вредни информации за реформирањето на прашањето.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan QUINT, sistem hidup untuk menjawab soalan melalui pangkalan pengetahuan. QUINT secara automatik belajar templat utterance-query sepadan peranan dari soalan pengguna sepadan dengan jawapan mereka. Apabila QUINT menjawab soalan, ia memaparkan jujukan derivati lengkap dari ungkapan bahasa semulajadi ke jawapan akhir. Derivation menyediakan penjelasan bagaimana struktur sintaktik soalan digunakan untuk mendatangkan struktur pertanyaan SPARQL, dan bagaimana frasa dalam soalan digunakan untuk mendatangkan bahagian yang berbeza dari pertanyaan. Apabila jawapan kelihatan tidak puas, penghasilan menyediakan pandangan berharga untuk mengubah soalan.', 'ml': 'ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ജീവിതമായ സിസ്റ്റമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്യുന് ക്യുവിന്\u200dറ് സ്വയം പഠിക്കുന്നത് ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും അവയുടെ ഉത്തരം കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന വാക കുവിന്\u200dറ് ഒരു ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുമ്പോള്\u200d അത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും അവസാന ഉത്തരം വരെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഉത്തരം കാണുന്നു. ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്കൂളിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനം എസ്പാര്\u200dക്ക്യൂള്\u200d ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ചത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്നും ചോദ്യത് ഒരു ഉത്തരം അസാധ്യതയില്ലെന്ന് തോന്നുമ്പോള്\u200d ചോദ്യത്തെ സംസ്കരിക്കുന്നതിന് വിലപിടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ്.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw QUINT, sistema live għal mistoqsijiet li jwieġbu fuq il-bażijiet tal-għarfien. QUINT jitgħallem awtomatikament mudelli allinjati għar-rwol ta’ dikjarazzjoni-mistoqsija minn mistoqsijiet tal-utent flimkien mat-tweġibiet tagħhom. Meta QUINT iwieġeb mistoqsija, viżwalizza s-sekwenza sħiħa tad-derivazzjoni mill-espressjoni tal-lingwa naturali sat-tweġiba finali. Id-derivazzjoni tipprovdi spjegazzjoni ta’ kif l-istruttura sintattika tal-mistoqsija ntużat biex tiġi dderivata l-istruttura ta’ mistoqsija SPARQL, u kif il-frażijiet fil-mistoqsija ntużaw biex jiġu istanzjati partijiet differenti tal-mistoqsija. Meta tweġiba tidher mhux sodisfaċenti, id-derivazzjoni tipprovdi fehmiet siewja lejn ir-riformulazzjoni tal-mistoqsija.', 'mn': 'Бид QUINT-г мэдлэгийн суурь дээр хариулт өгөх амьдралын системийг илтгэдэг. QUINT автоматаар хариулттай холбогдсон хэрэглэгчийн асуултуудаас хэлбэртэй хэлний-кверсийн шагналыг суралцдаг. QUINT асуултыг хариулах үед байгалийн хэлээс хамгийн сүүлийн хариулаас хүртэл бүрэн derivation sequence-г харуулдаг. Шинэ тодорхойлолт нь асуултын синтактик бүтэц хэрхэн SPARQL кверсийн бүтэц болон асуултын үг хэрхэн кверсийн өөр хэсгүүдийг тогтоохын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн талаар тайлбарладаг. Хариулт асуудалгүй байх үед, урвал асуултыг шинэчлэхэд үнэ цэнэтэй ойлголт гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer QUINT, ei leve system for spørsmål som svarar over kunnskapsbaser. QUINT lærer automatisk uttale- spørsmål frå brukarspørsmål som er saman med svara sine. Når QUINT svarar på eit spørsmål, viser det fullstendige deriveringsrekkjefølgja frå den naturlege språket til den siste svaret. Avviklinga gjev ei forklaring av korleis det syntaktiske strukturen av spørsmålet vart brukt for å få opp strukturen av ein SPARQL- spørsmål, og korleis frasene i spørsmålet vart brukte for å instansera ulike deler av spørsmålet. Når ein svar ser ugjennomsiktig, tilbyr derivasjonen verdilege innsyningar mot reformulering av spørsmålet.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy QUINT, system na żywo do odpowiadania na pytania za pośrednictwem baz wiedzy. QUINT automatycznie uczy się dostosowanych do roli szablonów zapytań wypowiedzi z pytań użytkowników połączonych z ich odpowiedziami. Gdy QUINT odpowiada na pytanie, wizualizuje całą sekwencję pochodzącą od wypowiedzi języka naturalnego do ostatecznej odpowiedzi. Pochodność zawiera wyjaśnienie, w jaki sposób struktura składni pytania została wykorzystana do wyprowadzenia struktury zapytania SPARQL oraz w jaki sposób zwroty w pytaniu zostały wykorzystane do instancji różnych części zapytania. Kiedy odpowiedź wydaje się niesatysfakcjonująca, pochodzenie dostarcza cennych wniosków w kierunku przeformułowania pytania.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm QUINT, un sistem live pentru răspunsul la întrebări pe baze de cunoștințe. QUINT învață automat șabloanele de interogare cu pronunțare aliniate la roluri din întrebările utilizatorilor asociate cu răspunsurile lor. Când QUINT răspunde la o întrebare, vizualizează secvența completă de derivație de la pronunțarea limbajului natural până la răspunsul final. Rezultatul oferă o explicație a modului în care structura sintactică a întrebării a fost utilizată pentru a obține structura unei interogări SPARQL și modul în care frazele din întrebare au fost utilizate pentru a instanția diferite părți ale interogării. Atunci când un răspuns pare nesatisfăcător, derivarea oferă perspective valoroase pentru reformularea întrebării.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo QUINT, živi sistem za pitanje koji odgovara na baze znanja. QUINT automatski nauèi uzorak za ulogu poreðenog reèenja iz pitanja korisnika povezanih sa njihovim odgovorima. Kada QUINT odgovori na pitanje, vizualizira kompletnu sekvencu derivacije iz prirodnog jezika do konačnog odgovora. Otkrivanje pruža objašnjenje kako je sintaktička struktura pitanja korišćena kako bi proizvela strukturu ispitivanja SPARQL-a i kako su rečenice na pitanju korišćene za instantiranje različitih dijelova ispitivanja. Kada odgovor izgleda neobično, derivacija pruža vrijedne uvide prema reformulaciji pitanja.', 'si': 'අපි QUINT දැනගන්නවා, ජීවිත පද්ධතියක් දන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. Name QUINT ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් උත්තර දෙන්නම්, ඒක ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයෙන් පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ සංවිධානය කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ සංවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ SPARQL ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ සංවිධානය හොයාගන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරශ් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පේන්නේ නැති විදියට, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා', 'so': "Waxaan keenaynaa QUINT, nidaam nool oo su'aal ah oo ka jawaabaya saldhigyada aqoonta. QUINT wuxuu si gaar ah u baranayaa macluumaad ku saabsan hadal-query macluumaad ka mid ah su'aalaha isticmaalayaasha oo ay jawaabkooda ku leeyihiin. Marka QUINT uu jawaabo su'aal, waxay muuqataa dhamaantooda oo ka soo baxa hadalka afka asalka ah ilaa jawaabta ugu dambeeya. Isku'aanta ayaa fasiraya siduu u isticmaalay dhismaha sawirida ee su'aalka, iyo siduu ugu isticmaalay qoraalka SPARQL, iyo siduu ugu isticmaalay hadalka su'aalka si dhaqso ah qeybo kala duduwan. Marka jawaabku uu u muuqanayo mid aan suurtogal ahayn, waxaa laga helaa aragti qiimo leh oo ku hagaajiya su'aalka.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar QUINT, ett levande system för frågesvar över kunskapsbaser. QUINT lär sig automatiskt rollanpassade uttrycksfrågsmallar från användarfrågor kopplade till deras svar. När QUINT svarar på en fråga visualiserar den hela härledningssekvensen från det naturliga språkets yttrande till det slutliga svaret. Härledningen ger en förklaring av hur den syntaktiska strukturen i frågan användes för att härleda strukturen i en SPARQL-fråga, och hur fraserna i frågan användes för att instantiera olika delar av frågan. När ett svar verkar otillfredsställande ger härleddet värdefulla insikter för att omformulera frågan.', 'ta': 'நாம் குவின்ட், அறிவு அடிப்படைகளுக்கு பதில் கேள்விக்கு ஒரு நேரடி அமைப்பை கூட்டுகிறோம். Name QUINT ஒரு கேள்விக்கு பதில் அளிக்கும் போது, அது இயல்பான மொழி சொல்லிலிருந்து இறுதியாக விடையை பார்க்கும். The derivation provides an explanation of how the syntactic structure was used to derive a SPARQL query structure, and how the phrase in the question was used to instantly enact different parts of the query. ஒரு விடை தோன்றும் போது கேள்வியை மாற்றுவதற்கு மதிப்புள்ள உணர்வுகளை அளிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم QUINT کو پیش کرتے ہیں، علم بنسس پر جواب دینے کے لئے ایک زندہ سیستم۔ Name When QUINT answers a question, it visualizes the complete derivation sequence from the natural language utterance to the final answer. ڈریوریٹ نے سؤال کی سینٹاکسی ساختاری کس طرح استعمال کی گئی تھی SPARQL سؤال کی ساختاری کے لئے، اور سؤال کے فرشتوں کو کیسے سؤال کی مختلف قسموں کو آغاز کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا. جب کوئی جواب غیر مشکل بنتا ہے، اس طرح تحقیق سؤال کی اصلاح کرنے کے لئے ارزش دار نظریں پیش کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz QUINT, ilmiy asosida javob berish uchun hayot tizim. Name @ info Name Javob notoʻgʻri deb hisoblanayotganda, suhbatni o'zgartirishga qiymatli ko'rinishni anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi có một hệ thống thanh tra trực tiếp trả lời câu hỏi dựa trên kiến thức. Đầu tiên truy tìm các mẫu liên kết kết kết lại vai trò từ các câu hỏi người dùng kết hợp với câu trả lời. Khi thanh to án nhanh, nó mường tượng ra chuỗi bắt nguồn hoàn toàn từ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên tới câu trả lời cuối cùng. The derivation cung cấp một giải thích về cách cấu trúc cú pháp của câu hỏi được dùng để phân tán cấu trúc của các câu hỏi. và cách các cụm từ trong câu hỏi được dùng để lập tức lại các phần khác nhau của câu hỏi. Khi câu trả lời có vẻ không hài lòng, sản xuất cung cấp những nghiên cứu tích cực để cải tạo câu hỏi.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer QUINT, et live system til spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbaser. QUINT lærer automatisk rollejusterede taleforespørgselsskabeloner fra brugerspørgsmål parret med deres svar. Når QUINT besvarer et spørgsmål, visualiserer det hele afledningssekvensen fra det naturlige sprog udtalelse til det endelige svar. Afledningen giver en forklaring på, hvordan den syntaktiske struktur af spørgsmålet blev brugt til at udlede strukturen af en SPARQL-forespørgsel, og hvordan sætningerne i spørgsmålet blev brugt til at instantiere forskellige dele af forespørgslen. Når et svar synes utilfredsstillende, giver afledningen værdifuld indsigt i at omformulere spørgsmålet.', 'bg': 'Представяме ви жива система за отговор на въпроси над бази знания. Автоматично научава подравнени на ролите шаблони за заявки за изказване от потребителски въпроси, сдвоени с техните отговори. Когато отговаря на въпрос, той визуализира цялата последователност на извличане от произнасянето на естествения език до крайния отговор. Изваждането дава обяснение на това как синтактичната структура на въпроса е била използвана за извличане на структурата на заявка и как фразите във въпроса са били използвани за въвеждане на различни части от заявката. Когато отговорът изглежда незадоволителен, изводът предоставя ценни прозрения за реформирането на въпроса.', 'nl': "We presenteren QUINT, een live systeem voor vragen beantwoorden via kennisbanken. QUINT leert automatisch op rollen uitgelijnde sjablonen voor expressie-query's van gebruikersvragen gekoppeld aan hun antwoorden. Wanneer QUINT een vraag beantwoordt, visualiseert het de volledige afleidingsequentie van de uitspraak van de natuurlijke taal tot het uiteindelijke antwoord. De afleiding geeft een uitleg over hoe de syntactische structuur van de vraag werd gebruikt om de structuur van een SPARQL-query af te leiden, en hoe de zinnen in de vraag werden gebruikt om verschillende delen van de query te instantiëren. Wanneer een antwoord onbevredigend lijkt, geeft de afleiding waardevolle inzichten om de vraag opnieuw te formuleren.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo QUINT, živi sustav za pitanje koji odgovara na baze znanja. QUINT automatski uči raspoređene raspoređene raspoređene uloge iz pitanja korisnika povezanih s njihovim odgovorima. Kada QUINT odgovori na pitanje, vizualizira kompletnu sekvencu derivacije iz prirodnog jezika do konačnog odgovora. Otkrivanje pruža objašnjenje kako je sintaktička struktura pitanja korišćena za otkrivanje strukture ispitivanja SPARQL-a i kako su rečenice na pitanju korišćene za instantiranje različitih dijelova ispitivanja. Kada odgovor izgleda neugodno, derivacija pruža vrijedne uvide prema reformiranju pitanja.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren QUINT, ein Live-System zur Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensbasen. QUINT lernt automatisch rollenorientierte Äußerungsabfragevorlagen von Benutzerfragen gepaart mit deren Antworten. Wenn QUINT eine Frage beantwortet, visualisiert es die komplette Ableitungssequenz von der natürlichen Sprachäußerung bis zur endgültigen Antwort. Die Ableitung liefert eine Erklärung, wie die syntaktische Struktur der Frage verwendet wurde, um die Struktur einer SPARQL-Abfrage abzuleiten und wie die Phrasen in der Frage verwendet wurden, um verschiedene Teile der Abfrage zu instanziieren. Wenn eine Antwort unbefriedigend erscheint, liefert die Ableitung wertvolle Erkenntnisse zur Neuformulierung der Frage.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan QUINT, sistem langsung untuk menjawab pertanyaan di atas dasar pengetahuan. QUINT secara otomatis belajar templat utterance-query disesuaikan peran dari pertanyaan pengguna sepasang dengan jawaban mereka. Ketika QUINT menjawab pertanyaan, ia membayangkan urutan derivasi lengkap dari ungkapan bahasa alami ke jawaban akhir. Derivasi menyediakan penjelasan bagaimana struktur sintaksik pertanyaan digunakan untuk mendirikan struktur pertanyaan SPARQL, dan bagaimana frasa dalam pertanyaan digunakan untuk mendirikan bagian-bagian yang berbeda dari pertanyaan. Ketika jawaban tampaknya tidak memuaskan, derivasi memberikan pandangan berharga untuk mengubah pertanyaan.', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리를 통해 퀴즈를 진행하는 실시간 시스템인 QUINT를 소개했다.QUINT는 자동으로 정답과 일치하는 사용자 질문에서 캐릭터가 일치하는 언어 조회 템플릿을 배웁니다.QUINT가 질문에 대답할 때 자연 언어의 말에서 최종 답안까지의 완전한 파생 서열을 가시화합니다.유도 프로세스는 문제의 문법 구조를 어떻게 사용하여 SPARQL 조회의 구조를 유도하는지, 문제의 짧은 단어를 어떻게 사용하여 조회의 다른 부분을 실례화하는지 설명한다.답안이 만족스럽지 않을 것 같을 때, 이 추론은 이 문제를 다시 설명하는 데 가치 있는 견해를 제공했다.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha QUINT, mfumo wa moja kwa moja wa maswali ya kujibu juu ya msingi wa maarifa. QUINT hujifunza kwa faragha ya kujifunza majumbani yanayohusiana na utafiti wa hotuba kutoka maswali yanayohusiana na majibu yao. Wakati QUINT anajibu swali, inaonyesha uwezekano mkubwa wa uzalishaji kutoka hotuba ya asili hadi jibu la mwisho. Kutokana na uzoefu huu unaelezea jinsi muundo wa ushirikiano wa swali ulivyotumiwa kuwezesha muundo wa utafiti wa SPARQL, na jinsi maneno katika swali yalivyotumiwa kuanzisha sehemu mbalimbali za utafiti huo. Wakati jibu linaonekana kutokuwepo sahihi, uzoefu huo unatoa mitazamo ya thamani kwa kuboresha swali hilo.', 'fa': 'ما QUINT را نشان می دهیم، یک سیستم زنده برای جواب سوال در پایگاه دانش. Name وقتی QUINT به یک سؤال جواب می دهد، آن تعداد کامل تولید را از زبان طبیعی به پاسخ نهایی تصور می کند. تولید توضیح می\u200cدهد که چگونه ساختار سنتاکتیک سوال برای تولید ساختار یک سوال SPARQL استفاده می\u200cشود، و چگونه جمله\u200cها در سوال برای پایان\u200cهای مختلف از سوال استفاده می\u200cشوند. هنگامی که پاسخ به نظر ناراحتی می\u200cرسد، تولید به تغییرات سؤال ارزشمندی می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Bilim sebäplerinde jogap bermek üçin bir ýa şamly sistemi görkezýäris. UINT Ullançy jogabylary bilen gabdaly sözleşik-sorag nusgalaryny otomatik bilen öwrenýär. UINT bir soragy jogaplaýanda, bu tebigatal dilden soňky jogaba çevrilen çykyş sequencesini görkez. Döwlet soragyň sintaktik strukturunyň SPARQL soragynyň strukturyny çykmak üçin nähili ulanylýandygyny we soragyň sözleriň soragynyň farklı parçalaryny a ýratmak üçin ullanýandygyny düşündirýär. Ýüklemek närazy bolanda, çykyş soragy reformlamaga degişli pikirleri saýlaýar.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim QUINT, një sistem gjallë për përgjigje pyetjesh mbi bazat e njohurive. QUINT mëson automatikisht modele të rreshtuara me role nga pyetjet e përdoruesve që janë të barabarta me përgjigjet e tyre. When QUINT answers a question, it visualizes the complete derivation sequence from the natural language utterance to the final answer.  Derivatori jep një shpjegim se si struktura sintaktike e pyetjes u përdorë për të nxjerrë strukturën e një pyetjeje SPARQL dhe se si frazat në pyetje u përdorën për të nxjerrë pjesë të ndryshme të pyetjes. Kur një përgjigje duket e pakënaqur, nxjerrja ofron kuptime të vlefshme drejt reformulimit të pyetjes.', 'af': "Ons stel QUINT voor 'n lewe stelsel vir vraag antwoord oor kennis basis. QUINT leer outomaties rol- aligned uitdrukking- navraag templates van gebruiker vrae wat met hul antwoorde gepaar is. Wanneer QUINT antwoord 'n vraag, visualiseer dit die volledige afgeleide volgorde van die natuurlike taal uitspraak tot die eindelike antwoord. Die afgeleide verskaf 'n uitduidelik van hoe die sintaktieke struktuur van die vraag was gebruik word om die struktuur van 'n SPARQL navraag te afgelei, en hoe die frase in die vraag gebruik word om verskillende dele van die navraag te ontvang. Wanneer 'n antwoord onbevestig lyk, verskaf die afgeleide waardelike insig tot die reformulering van die vraag.", 'am': 'የትውቀት መቀመጫዎች ላይ የመመልስ የሕይወት ስርዓት እናቀርባለን፡፡ የግል QUINT አንድን ጥያቄ ሲመልስ፣ ፍጹም የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ቃላት ከፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ወደመጨረሻው መልስ እንዲያሳያል፡፡ The derivation provides an explanation of how the syntactic structure of the question was used to derive the structure of a SPARQL query, and how the phrases in the question were used to instantiate different parts of the query.  መልስ የማይፈጸም ሲመስል፣ ጉዳዩን ለመቀነስ የሚጠቅመውን አስተያየት ይሰጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'We present QUINT, a live system for question answering over knowledge bases.  QUINT-ը ինքնաբերաբար սովորում է օգտագործողի հարցերից, որոնք համապատասխանվում են իրենց պատասխանների հետ: When QUINT answers a question, it visualizes the complete derivation sequence from the natural language utterance to the final answer.  Առաջինը բացատրում է, թե ինչպես է հարցի սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքը օգտագործվել սպառքի կառուցվածքը ստանալու համար, և թե ինչպես են հարցի արտահայտությունները օգտագործվել հարցի տարբեր մասերի ակտիվացման համար: Երբ պատասխանը բավարար է թվում, արդյունքը արժեքավոր ընկալումներ է տալիս հարցի վերաձևափոխման համար:', 'az': "Biz QUINT'i, elm üssələrində cavab verən sual sistemini göstəririk. QUINT öz-özünə rol-tərəfləndirilmiş söz-soruşma nöqtələrini cavablarıyla birlikdə istifadəçi suallarından öyrənir. QUINT bir suala cavab verdikdə, bu təbiətli dil sözlərindən son cavabına qədər tamamlama sıralamasını görür. Söylənin sintaktik quruluşunun SPARQL soruşmasının quruluşunu çəkmək üçün necə istifadə edildiyini və soruşduqların sözlərinin müxtəlif bölümlərini təsdiqləmək üçün necə istifadə edildiyini təsdiqləyir. Cevap təhlükəsiz göründüyü zaman, təhlükəsiz sualın reformlaması haqqında qiymətli fikirlər verir.", 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের বেসের উপর জবাব দেওয়ার জন্য আমরা কুইন্ট উপস্থাপন করছি। QUINT automatically learns role-aligned utterance-query templates from user questions paired with their answers.  কিউইন্ট যখন একটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়, তখন এটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ভাষা থেকে শেষ উত্তর পর্যন্ত পুরোপুরি উৎপাদনের সীমা দেখে দেখে। এই প্রশ্নের সাথে কিভাবে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এসপার্কিউল কার্যক্রমের কাঠামো উদ্ধার করার জন্য এবং কিভাবে প্রশ্নের বিভিন্ন অংশ স্থ যখন একটি উত্তর দেখা যায় না কার্যকর মনে হচ্ছে, তারা এই প্রশ্ন সংস্কারের প্রতি মূল্যবান দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করে।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo QUINT, živi sistem za pitanje koji odgovara na baze znanja. QUINT automatski nauči uzorak za ulogu poravnane rasprave iz pitanja korisnika povezanih s njihovim odgovorima. Kada QUINT odgovori na pitanje, vizualizira kompletnu sekvencu derivacije iz prirodnog govora jezika do konačnog odgovora. Ovaj derivat pruža objašnjenje kako je sintaktička struktura pitanja korišćena kako bi proizvela strukturu ispitivanja SPARQL-a i kako su rečenice na pitanju korišćene za instantiranje različitih dijelova ispitivanja. Kada odgovor izgleda nepristojno, derivacija pruža vrijedne uvide prema reformulaciji pitanja.', 'ca': "Presentam QUINT, un sistema en directe per respondre preguntes sobre les bases de coneixement. QUINT automatically learns role-aligned utterance-query templates from user questions paired with their answers.  Quan QUINT respon a una pregunta, visualitza la seqüència completa de derivació de l'expressió natural del llenguatge fins a la resposta final. La derivació proporciona una explicació de com la estructura sinàctica de la pregunta va ser utilitzada per derivar l'estructura d'una pregunta SPARQL, i de com les frases en la pregunta van ser utilitzades per instantiar diferents parts de la pregunta. Quan una resposta sembla insatisfactoria, la derivació proporciona comprensions valioses per reformular la pregunta.", 'et': 'Tutvustame QUINT, reaalajas süsteemi küsimustele vastamiseks üle teadmistebaaside. QUINT õpib automaatselt rolliga joondatud väljenduspäringu malle kasutaja küsimustest, mis on seotud nende vastustega. Kui QUINT vastab küsimusele, visualiseerib ta täielikku tuletamisjärjestust looduskeelsest väljendist lõpliku vastuseni. Tuletamine annab selgituse, kuidas küsimuse süntaktilist struktuuri kasutati SPARQL päringu struktuuri tuletamiseks ja kuidas küsimuses olevaid fraase kasutati päringu eri osade instantseerimiseks. Kui vastus tundub ebarahuldav, annab tuletis väärtuslikku teavet küsimuse ümbersõnastamiseks.', 'cs': 'Představujeme QUINT, živý systém pro zodpovězení otázek přes znalostní báze. QUINT se automaticky učí šablony výrokových dotazů založené na rolích z uživatelských otázek spárovaných s jejich odpověďmi. Když QUINT odpoví na otázku, vizualizuje kompletní odvození sekvence od přirozeného jazyka k konečné odpovědi. Odvození poskytuje vysvětlení, jak byla syntaktická struktura otázky použita k odvození struktury SPARQL dotazu a jak byly fráze v otázce použity k instancii různých částí dotazu. Pokud se odpověď zdá neuspokojivá, poskytuje odvození cenných poznatků k reformulaci otázky.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme QUINT, reaaliaikainen järjestelmä kysymyksiin vastaamiseen tietokantojen kautta. QUINT oppii automaattisesti roolilinjatut lausekyselymallit käyttäjien kysymyksiin, jotka on yhdistetty heidän vastauksiinsa. Kun QUINT vastaa kysymykseen, se visualisoi täydellisen johtosarjan luonnollisesta kielestä lopulliseen vastaukseen. Johdanto antaa selityksen siitä, miten kysymyksen syntaktista rakennetta käytettiin SPARQL-kyselyn rakenteen johtamiseen ja miten kysymyksen lauseita käytettiin kyselyn eri osien instantiaatioon. Kun vastaus vaikuttaa epätyydyttävältä, päättely antaa arvokkaita oivalluksia kysymyksen uudelleenmuotoiluun.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam QUINT, živ sistem za odgovarjanje na vprašanja preko baz znanja. QUINT samodejno uči predloge poizvedbe z vlogami poravnanih izjav iz uporabniških vprašanj, združenih z njihovimi odgovori. Ko QUINT odgovori na vprašanje, vizualizira celotno zaporedje izpeljanja iz naravnega jezika do končnega odgovora. Izpeljava ponuja pojasnilo, kako je bila sintaktična struktura vprašanja uporabljena za izpeljavo strukture poizvedbe SPARQL in kako so stavki v vprašanju uporabljeni za instanciranje različnih delov poizvedbe. Kadar se odgovor zdi nezadovoljiv, izpeljava zagotavlja dragocene vpoglede v preoblikovanje vprašanja.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את קווינט, מערכת חיה לענות על שאלות על בסיסי ידע. QUINT לומד באופן אוטומטי דוגמני מבקש-מילה מתאימים לתפקידים משאלות משתמשים זוויות עם תשובותיהם. כאשר QUINT עונה על שאלה, הוא מדמיין את רצף ההוצאות המושלם מהמילה השפה הטבעית לתשובה הסופית. ההוצאה מספקת הסבר על איך המבנה הסינטקטי של השאלה השתמש כדי להוציא את המבנה של השאלה SPARQL, ואיך המשפטים בשאלה השתמשו כדי להפעיל חלקים שונים של השאלה. כאשר תשובה נראית לא מספקת, ההוצאה מספקת תובנות ערובות כלפי שינוי השאלה.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah Kuser, sistem kanggo nambah kanggo sabanjuré supoyo barang kanggo sabanjuré iku. Name Candy Tulung Awak dhéwé éwé mbubati ora klêrung, akeh tanggal dipunangé perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe gerakan ingkang alih.', 'ha': "Munã halatar da QUINT, wata na'ura da za'a karɓa a kan bakin ilmi. KCharselect unicode block name Idan QUINT ya karɓa wa wani tambayi, yana nuna matsayin duk mai nuna daga maganar harshe na asili zuwa jibin ƙarami. @ info: tooltip Idan wani majibu ya kasa fara, mai gaura yana da gannai masu inganci zuwa yin gyãra ga tambayar.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་QUINT་དང་། ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་གཞི་གཞི་རྟེན་ལ་མཐུན་གྱི་མ་ཚུལ་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ QUINT་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གོ་རིམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཤེས་བྱེད་པ QUINT་གིས་འདྲི་ཞིག་ལ་ལན་པ་དེ་ལྟར་པར་མཐུན་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་རྗེས་ཐོག་མཇུག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག The derivation provides an explanation of how the syntactic structure of the question was used to derive the structure of a SPARQL query, and how the phrases in the question were used to instantiate different parts of the query. The derivation is used to derive the structure of a SPARQL query. ལན་གསལ་ཞིག་ནི་ཉམས་འབྱུང་མེད་དུས་སྐབས། རྩིས་འབྲེལ་གྱིས་འདྲི་ཚིག་གསར་བཟོ་བ་དང་མཐུན་ཐང་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་འག'}
{'en': 'Function Assistant : A Tool for NL Querying of APIs', 'ar': 'مساعد الوظيفة: أداة لاستعلام NL عن واجهات برمجة التطبيقات', 'pt': 'Assistente de função: uma ferramenta para consulta NL de APIs', 'es': 'Asistente de funciones: una herramienta para la consulta de API de NL', 'fr': "Function Assistant\xa0: un outil pour l'interrogation NL des API", 'ja': '関数アシスタント: APIのNLクエリのためのツール', 'zh': '函数赞者: API NL 问器用', 'ru': 'Помощник по функциям: инструмент для NL-запроса API', 'hi': 'फ़ंक्शन सहायक: APIs के NL क्वेरीकरने के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ga': 'Cúntóir Feidhme: Uirlis chun APIanna a Cheansú NL', 'hu': 'Funkcióasszisztens: Eszköz az API-k NL lekérdezéséhez', 'ka': 'ფუნქციის დამხმარებელი: A Tool for NL Querying APIs', 'el': 'Βοηθός Λειτουργίας: Ένα εργαλείο για την έρευνα των ΔΥ', 'it': 'Assistente funzione: uno strumento per la query NL delle API', 'kk': 'Функциялық көмекші: NL API сұрау құралы', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Pareigos padėjėjas: NL API klausimo įrankis', 'ms': 'Pembantu Fungsi: Alat untuk Pertanyaan NL API', 'ml': 'ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d സഹായി: എപിഐസിന്റെ NL ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ഉപകരണം', 'mn': 'Функцийн тусламжтай: NL APIs-ын асуултын A Tool', 'mt': 'Function Assistant: A Tool for NL Querying of APIs', 'no': 'Funksjonassistent: A Tool for NL Querying of APIs', 'pl': 'Asystent funkcji: Narzędzie do NL zapytań API', 'ro': 'Function Assistant: Un instrument pentru NL interogarea API-urilor', 'sr': 'Помощник функција: Астрем за Питање NL АПИС', 'so': 'Kaalmada shaqada: A Tool for NL Query of APIs', 'si': 'භාවිත සහායකය: NL ප්\u200dරශ්න සඳහා උපකරණය', 'sv': 'Funktionsassistent: Ett verktyg för NL-frågor av API:er', 'ta': 'செயல்கூறு உதவி', 'ur': 'فنقشل مددگار: NL سوال کے لئے ابزار', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Trợ lý chức năng: Một công cụ để liên lạc nhu cầu', 'bg': 'Функционен помощник: Инструмент за заявки за NL на APIs', 'nl': "Functieassistent: Een tool voor NL Query van API's", 'da': "Funktionsassistent: Et værktøj til NL Forespørgsel af API'er", 'hr': 'Pomoćnik funkcije: alat za ispitivanje NL-a APIsa', 'id': 'Function Assistant: A Tool for NL Querying of APIs', 'de': 'Funktionsassistent: Ein Tool zur NL Abfrage von APIs', 'ko': 'Function Assistant: API의 NL 질의 도구', 'fa': 'کمک عملکرد: یک ابزار برای سوال NL از APIs', 'sw': 'Msaidizi wa функсия: Kifaa cha NL kinachohoji API', 'tr': 'Funksiýa kömek: NL API soragy üçin bir araç', 'af': 'Funksie Assistent: A Tool for NL Query of APIs', 'sq': 'Ndihmës funksioni: Një mjet për kërkimin e API-ve në NL', 'az': 'Funksiya Yardımcısı: A Tool for NL Querying of APIs', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': "Asistent de funció: Una eina per a la consulta d'APIs en NL", 'bn': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Pomoćnik funkcije: NL Zapitanje API', 'cs': 'Funkční asistent: Nástroj pro NL dotazování API', 'et': 'Funktsiooniassistent: A Tool for NL Querying of API', 'fi': 'Function Assistant: Työkalu NL Querying of API', 'jv': 'Sampeyan funksi Sampeyan: A Tool kanggo NL Ngawe Perintah Api', 'ha': '@ info: tooltip', 'sk': 'Funkcijski pomočnik: Orodje za NL poizvedbo API-jev', 'he': 'עוזר תפקידים: כלי עבור חקירת API של NL', 'bo': 'Function Assistant: A Tool for NL Querying of APIs'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe Function Assistant, a lightweight Python-based toolkit for querying and exploring source code repositories using natural language. The toolkit is designed to help end-users of a target API quickly find information about functions through high-level natural language queries, or descriptions. For a given text query and background API, the tool finds candidate functions by performing a translation from the text to known representations in the API using the semantic parsing approach of (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). Translations are automatically learned from example text-code pairs in example APIs. The toolkit includes features for building translation pipelines and query engines for arbitrary source code projects. To explore this last feature, we perform new experiments on 27 well-known Python projects hosted on Github.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، وصفنا وظيفة المساعد ، وهي مجموعة أدوات خفيفة الوزن تعتمد على لغة بايثون للاستعلام عن مستودعات الكود المصدري واستكشافها باستخدام لغة طبيعية. تم تصميم مجموعة الأدوات لمساعدة المستخدمين النهائيين لواجهة برمجة التطبيقات المستهدفة في العثور بسرعة على معلومات حول الوظائف من خلال الاستعلامات أو الأوصاف اللغوية الطبيعية عالية المستوى. بالنسبة لاستعلام نصي محدد وواجهة برمجة تطبيقات للخلفية ، تجد الأداة الوظائف المرشحة عن طريق إجراء ترجمة من النص إلى تمثيلات معروفة في واجهة برمجة التطبيقات باستخدام نهج التحليل الدلالي (Richardson and Kuhn ، 2017). يتم تعلم الترجمات تلقائيًا من أمثلة أزواج التعليمات البرمجية النصية في نماذج APIs. تتضمن مجموعة الأدوات ميزات لبناء خطوط أنابيب الترجمة ومحركات الاستعلام لمشاريع التعليمات البرمجية المصدر التعسفية. لاستكشاف هذه الميزة الأخيرة ، نجري تجارب جديدة على 27 مشروعًا معروفًا بلغة Python مستضافة على Github.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos o Function Assistant, um kit de ferramentas leve baseado em Python para consultar e explorar repositórios de código-fonte usando linguagem natural. O kit de ferramentas foi projetado para ajudar os usuários finais de uma API de destino a encontrar rapidamente informações sobre funções por meio de consultas ou descrições de linguagem natural de alto nível. Para uma determinada consulta de texto e API em segundo plano, a ferramenta encontra funções candidatas realizando uma tradução do texto para representações conhecidas na API usando a abordagem de análise semântica de (Richardson e Kuhn, 2017). As traduções são aprendidas automaticamente a partir de pares de código de texto de exemplo em APIs de exemplo. O kit de ferramentas inclui recursos para criar pipelines de tradução e mecanismos de consulta para projetos de código-fonte arbitrários. Para explorar esse último recurso, realizamos novos experimentos em 27 conhecidos projetos Python hospedados no Github.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons Function Assistant, une boîte à outils légère basée sur Python pour interroger et explorer les référentiels de code source à l'aide du langage naturel. La boîte à outils est conçue pour aider les utilisateurs finaux d'une API cible à trouver rapidement des informations sur les fonctions par le biais de requêtes ou de descriptions en langage naturel de haut niveau. Pour une requête de texte et une API d'arrière-plan données, l'outil trouve des fonctions candidates en effectuant une traduction du texte vers des représentations connues dans l'API à l'aide de l'approche d'analyse sémantique de (Richardson et Kuhn, 2017). Les traductions sont automatiquement apprises à partir d'exemples de paires texte-code dans des API d'exemple. La boîte à outils inclut des fonctionnalités pour créer des pipelines de traduction et des moteurs de requête pour des projets de code source arbitraires. Pour explorer cette dernière fonctionnalité, nous réalisons de nouvelles expériences sur 27 projets Python bien connus hébergés sur Github.", 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos Function Assistant, un kit de herramientas ligero basado en Python para consultar y explorar repositorios de código fuente utilizando lenguaje natural. El kit de herramientas está diseñado para ayudar a los usuarios finales de una API de destino a encontrar rápidamente información sobre las funciones mediante consultas o descripciones de lenguaje natural de alto nivel. Para una consulta de texto determinada y una API en segundo plano, la herramienta encuentra funciones candidatas realizando una traducción del texto a representaciones conocidas en la API mediante el enfoque de análisis semántico de (Richardson y Kuhn, 2017). Las traducciones se aprenden automáticamente a partir de pares de códigos de texto de ejemplo en las API de ejemplo. El kit de herramientas incluye funciones para crear canales de traducción y motores de consulta para proyectos de código fuente arbitrario. Para explorar esta última característica, realizamos nuevos experimentos en 27 proyectos de Python conocidos alojados en Github.', 'ja': '本稿では、自然言語を使用してソースコードリポジトリをクエリして探索するための軽量なPythonベースのツールキットであるFunction Assistantについて説明する。このツールキットは、ターゲットAPIのエンドユーザーが、高レベルの自然言語クエリまたは説明を介して機能に関する情報をすばやく見つけるのに役立つように設計されています。所与のテキストクエリとバックグラウンドＡＰＩについて、ツールは、のセマンティック構文解析アプローチを使用して、ＡＰＩ内のテキストから既知の表現への翻訳を実行することによって、候補関数を探し出す（ Ｒｉｃｈａｒｄｓｏｎ ａｎｄ Ｋｕｈｎ ， ２ ０ １ ７ ）。翻訳は、例示的なAPIの例示的なテキストコードのペアから自動的に学習されます。ツールキットには、翻訳パイプラインを構築するための機能と、任意のソースコードプロジェクトのためのクエリエンジンが含まれています。この最後の機能を調べるために、Githubでホストされている27の有名なPythonプロジェクトで新しい実験を行います。', 'zh': '本文述Function Assistant,盖Python之轻量级工具包,所以自然语言询索源代码储也。 工具包旨在助 API 者最终用户因高级自然语言询述速函数。 于给定文本询及后台API,其器用语义解析法(RichardsonKuhn,2017)从文本至API中已知转换以求选函数。 译者,示例 API 之示例文本代码自学也。 其工具包包用任意源代码项目构译管访引擎功能。 为探最后功能,Github上托管27知名Python项目新实验。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम फ़ंक्शन असिस्टेंट का वर्णन करते हैं, जो प्राकृतिक भाषा का उपयोग करके स्रोत कोड रिपॉजिटरी को क्वेरी करने और खोजने के लिए एक हल्का पायथन-आधारित टूलकिट है। टूलकिट को लक्ष्य API के अंतिम-उपयोगकर्ताओं को उच्च-स्तरीय प्राकृतिक भाषा क्वेरीज़, या विवरणों के माध्यम से फ़ंक्शंस के बारे में जानकारी जल्दी से खोजने में मदद करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है. किसी दिए गए पाठ क्वेरी और पृष्ठभूमि एपीआई के लिए, उपकरण (रिचर्डसन और कुह्न, 2017) के शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके एपीआई में ज्ञात अभ्यावेदन के लिए पाठ से अनुवाद करके उम्मीदवार कार्यों को ढूंढता है। अनुवाद स्वचालित रूप से उदाहरण APIs में उदाहरण पाठ-कोड जोड़े से सीखे जाते हैं। टूलकिट में अनुवाद पाइपलाइनों और मनमाने ढंग से स्रोत कोड परियोजनाओं के लिए क्वेरी इंजन बनाने के लिए सुविधाएँ शामिल हैं। इस अंतिम सुविधा का पता लगाने के लिए, हम गिथब पर होस्ट किए गए 27 प्रसिद्ध पायथन परियोजनाओं पर नए प्रयोग करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем Function Assistant, легкий набор инструментов на основе Python- для запроса и исследования репозиториев исходного кода с использованием естественного языка. Инструментарий предназначен для того, чтобы помочь конечным пользователям целевого API быстро находить информацию о функциях с помощью запросов или описаний высокого уровня на естественном языке. Для данного текстового запроса и фонового API инструмент находит функции-кандидаты, выполняя перевод из текста в известные представления в API, используя подход семантического анализа (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). Переводы автоматически извлекаются из примеров пар текстовых кодов в примерах API. Инструментарий включает в себя возможности для построения конвейеров перевода и движков запросов для произвольных проектов исходного кода. Чтобы изучить эту последнюю функцию, мы проводим новые эксперименты над 27 известными Python проектами, размещенными на Github.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar Function Assistant, foireann uirlisí éadroma bunaithe ar Python chun stórtha cód foinse a fhiosrú agus a iniúchadh ag baint úsáide as teanga nádúrtha. Tá an fhoireann uirlisí deartha chun cabhrú le húsáideoirí deiridh API sprice faisnéis a fháil go tapa faoi fheidhmeanna trí cheisteanna nó tuairiscí teanga nádúrtha ardleibhéil. I gcás ceiste téacs ar leith agus API cúlra, aimsíonn an uirlis feidhmeanna iarrthóra trí aistriúchán a dhéanamh ón téacs go dtí léirithe aitheanta san API ag baint úsáide as an gcur chuige parsála shéimeantach (Richardson agus Kuhn, 2017). Foghlaimítear aistriúcháin go huathoibríoch ó phéirí cód téacs mar shampla in APInna. Áiríonn an fhoireann uirlisí gnéithe chun píblínte aistriúcháin a thógáil agus innill fiosrúcháin do thionscadail cód foinse treallach. Chun an ghné dheireanach seo a iniúchadh, déanaimid turgnaimh nua ar 27 tionscadal aitheanta Python a óstáiltear ar Github.', 'ka': 'ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ ფუნქციის ახალგაზრდებით, Python-ის სახელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა სახელსაწყოთა კონქ ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა კონფიგურაციის მომხმარებისთვის მომხმარებელი API მისამართლად მოიძებნა ინფორმაციის შესახებ ფუნქციების შესახებ თავისუფალური ენერ მონიშნული ტექსტის კითხვა და ფონდის API-სთვის, მოწყობილობა აღმოიძებნა კანდიდენტის ფუნქციების შემდეგ ტექსტიდან ცნობილი პრეცენტაციებისთვის API-ში გამოყენება (Richardson და Kuhn, 2017). ტექსტი- კოდის ზოგების მაგალითად APIs- ში ავტომატურად შესწავლია. Name ამ ბოლო ფუნქციის განსხვავებაში, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ახალი ექსპერიმენტები 27 უცნობილი Python პროექტებში, რომელიც Github-ში ჰოსტირებულია.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε τον Βοηθό Λειτουργίας, μια ελαφριά εργαλειοθήκη βασισμένη στο Python για την αναζήτηση και την εξερεύνηση αποθετηρίων πηγαίου κώδικα χρησιμοποιώντας φυσική γλώσσα. Το κιτ εργαλείων έχει σχεδιαστεί για να βοηθήσει τους τελικούς χρήστες ενός στόχου να βρουν γρήγορα πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις λειτουργίες μέσω ερωτήσεων φυσικής γλώσσας υψηλού επιπέδου ή περιγραφών. Για ένα δεδομένο ερώτημα κειμένου και το υπόβαθρο, το εργαλείο βρίσκει υποψήφιες λειτουργίες εκτελώντας μια μετάφραση από το κείμενο σε γνωστές αναπαραστάσεις στο χρησιμοποιώντας την προσέγγιση σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης του (Richardson και Kuhn, 2017). Οι μεταφράσεις μαθαίνονται αυτόματα από παραδειγματικά ζεύγη κειμένου-κώδικα σε παραδειγματικά API. Η εργαλειοθήκη περιλαμβάνει δυνατότητες για την κατασκευή αγωγών μετάφρασης και μηχανών ερωτήματος για αυθαίρετα έργα πηγαίου κώδικα. Για να εξερευνήσουμε αυτό το τελευταίο χαρακτηριστικό, κάνουμε νέα πειράματα σε 27 γνωστά έργα που φιλοξενούνται στο Github.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Function Assistant-t, egy könnyű Python alapú eszköztárat a forráskódtárak lekérdezéséhez és feltárásához természetes nyelven. Az eszközkészlet célja, hogy segítsen a cél API végfelhasználóinak gyorsan információkat találni a funkciókról magas szintű természetes nyelvű lekérdezések vagy leírások segítségével. Egy adott szöveglekérdezés és háttér API esetében az eszköz úgy találja meg a jelölt függvényeket, hogy a szövegből az API ismert reprezentációira fordítja a fordítást (Richardson és Kuhn, 2017). A fordítások automatikusan tanulhatók a példa API-kban található szöveg-kód párokból. Az eszközkészlet olyan funkciókat tartalmaz, amelyek fordítási csővezetékeket és lekérdezési motorokat építenek tetszőleges forráskódprojektekhez. Az utolsó funkció felfedezéséhez új kísérleteket végzünk 27 jól ismert Python projektet Github-on.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo Function Assistant, un toolkit leggero basato su Python per interrogare ed esplorare repository di codice sorgente utilizzando il linguaggio naturale. Il toolkit è progettato per aiutare gli utenti finali di un'API di destinazione a trovare rapidamente informazioni sulle funzioni attraverso query o descrizioni di linguaggio naturale di alto livello. Per una data query di testo e API di sfondo, lo strumento trova le funzioni candidate eseguendo una traduzione dal testo alle rappresentazioni note nell'API utilizzando l'approccio di analisi semantica di (Richardson e Kuhn, 2017). Le traduzioni vengono apprese automaticamente da coppie di testo-codice di esempio nelle API di esempio. Il toolkit include funzionalità per costruire pipeline di traduzione e motori di query per progetti di codice sorgente arbitrario. Per esplorare quest'ultima funzionalità, eseguiamo nuovi esperimenti su 27 noti progetti Python ospitati su Github.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname funkcijų padėjėją, lengvą Pitonu pagrįstą įrankių rinkinį, skirtą paklausti ir ištirti šaltinio kodų saugyklas naudojant natūralią kalbą. Prietaisų rinkinys skirtas padėti tikslinės API galutiniams naudotojams greitai rasti informaciją apie funkcijas per aukšto lygio gamtinių kalbų klausimus arba aprašymus. Tam tikro teksto klausimo ir foninės API atveju įrankis randa kandidatų funkcijas atlikdamas vertimą iš teksto į žinomus API atstovus naudodamas semantinio analizavimo metodą (Richardson ir Kuhn, 2017). Vertimai automatiškai mokomi iš pavyzdžių teksto kodų poros pavyzdžiuose API. Prietaisų rinkinys apima vertimo vamzdynų ir užklausos variklių kūrimo savavališkiems šaltinio kodo projektams savybes. Norėdami išnagrinėti šią paskutinę savybę, atlikome naujus eksperimentus 27 gerai žinomais Python projektais, kurie buvo rengiami Githube.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, опишуваме функционен помошник, лесен набор на алатки базиран на питон за испитување и истражување на складиштата на изворни кодови користејќи природен јазик. Наредницата е дизајнирана за да им помогне на крајните корисници на API на целта брзо да најдат информации за функциите преку природни прашања или описи на високо ниво на јазик. За дадено текстово прашање и API за позадина, алатката ги пронајде кандидатските функции со извршување на превод од текстот до познатите претставувања во API користејќи го семантичкиот пристап на анализирање (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). Преведувањата се автоматски научуваат од пример парови текст- код во пример API. Парчето алатки вклучува карактеристики за изградба на гасоводи за превод и мотори за прашања за арбитрални изворни кодови проекти. За да ја истражуваме оваа последна карактеристика, спроведуваме нови експерименти на 27 познати питонски проекти домаќини на Гитуб.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, Функциялардың көмекшісін, Python негіздеген құралдар панелін таңдап, көзі код репозиторилерді табиғи тілді қолдану және зерттеу үшін көмектесу құралдарын аны Құралдар пайдаланушыларының API- ның соңындағы пайдаланушыларының көмегімен функциялар туралы жоғары деңгейіндегі табиғи тілдер сұраулары немесе сипаттамалары арқылы мәл Келтірілген мәтін сұраныс мен аясының API үшін, құралы мәтіннен белгілі мәліметтердің аудармасын API- де (Richardson және Kuhn, 2017) семантикалық талдау қасиетін қолданады. Аудармалар мәтін- код екі мысалы API үшін автоматты түрде үйреніледі. Құралдар панелінде аудармалы құрылғылар және сұраныс көзі код жобаларын құру мүмкіндіктері бар. Бұл соңғы мүмкіндікті зерттеу үшін, біз Github-де орнатылған 27 мәлім Python жобаларының жаңа тәжірибелерін орындаймыз.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan Penolong Fungsi, alat yang ringan berdasarkan Python untuk menanyai dan mengeksplorasi repositori kod sumber menggunakan bahasa semulajadi. Kit alat dirancang untuk membantu pengguna akhir API sasaran dengan cepat mencari maklumat mengenai fungsi melalui pertanyaan bahasa alam tahap tinggi, atau deskripsi. Untuk pertanyaan teks dan API latar belakang yang diberi, alat mencari fungsi calon dengan melakukan terjemahan dari teks ke perwakilan yang diketahui dalam API menggunakan pendekatan penghuraian semantik (Richardson dan Kuhn, 2017). Terjemahan belajar secara automatik dari contoh pasangan kod-teks dalam contoh API. Kit alat mengandungi ciri-ciri untuk membina paip terjemahan dan enjin pertanyaan untuk projek kod sumber arbitrari. Untuk mengeksplorasi ciri-ciri terakhir ini, kami melakukan eksperimen baru pada 27 projek Python yang terkenal ditempatkan di Github.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niddeskrivu Assistent tal-Funzjoni, sett ta’ għodod ħafif ibbażat fuq il-Python għall-mistoqsijiet u l-esplorazzjoni tar-repożitorji tal-kodiċi tas-sors bl-użu tal-lingwa naturali. Il-ġabra ta’ għodod hija mfassla biex tgħin lill-utenti finali ta’ API fil-mira jsibu malajr informazzjoni dwar il-funzjonijiet permezz ta’ mistoqsijiet jew deskrizzjonijiet ta’ lingwi naturali ta’ livell għoli. Għal mistoqsija tat-test partikolari u API tal-isfond, l-għodda ssib funzjonijiet kandidati billi twettaq traduzzjoni mit-test għal rappreżentazzjonijiet magħrufa fl-API bl-użu tal-approċċ semantiku tal-analiżi ta’ (Richardson u Kuhn, 2017). It-traduzzjonijiet jitgħallmu awtomatikament minn par eżempji ta’ kodiċi-test f’eżempji APIs. Il-ġabra ta’ għodod tinkludi karatteristiċi għall-bini ta’ pajpijiet ta’ traduzzjoni u magni ta’ mistoqsijiet għal proġetti arbitrarji ta’ kodiċi tas-sors. Biex nesploraw din l-aħħar karatteristika, nagħmlu esperimenti ġodda fuq 27 proġett Python magħruf sew ospitat fuq Github.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഫാങ്ഷന്\u200d സഹായിയെ വിവരിക്കുന്നു, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി ലളിതമായ പൈത്തോന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ അവസാന ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഉപയോക്താക്കളെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ന കൊടുത്ത ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിലെ എപ്പിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിചയപ്പെടുന്ന പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല എപ്പിഐസിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണത്തില്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ്- കോഡ് ജോടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷകള്\u200d സ്വയം പഠിച്ചിരി @ info ഈ അവസാനത്തെ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഗിത്തുബില്\u200d ഹോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്ത 27 പൈത്തോണ്\u200d പ്രോജക്റ്റുകളില്\u200d പുതിയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид функцийн тусламжтайгаар тайлбарлаж байгалийн хэл ашиглаж, эх үүсвэрийн кодын хадгаламжтайгаар квадрат болон судлах хэрэгсэл хэрэгсэл байгууллага Python-ын үндсэн хэлбэртэй. Цагийн API-ын төгсгөл хэрэглэгчдийн хэрэглэгчдийн хэрэглэгчдийн тусламжтайгаар функцийн талаар өндөр түвшинд байгалийн хэл квери, эсвэл тайлбарлалтын тулд мэдээллийг олох хэрэгсэ Одоо өгөгдсөн текст квадрат болон ногоон API-ийн хувьд хэрэглэгч нь текст болон API-д мэдэгдэх хэлбэрүүдэд зохион байгуулах аргыг ашиглан (Ричардсон болон Куhn, 2017). Жишээлбэл APIs-д текст-кодын хоорондоо автоматаар суралцдаг. Хэрэглэгчдийн хэрэгсэл нь хөгжлийн шугам болон бусад эх үүсвэрийн кодын төслүүдийн хувьсалын машин бүтээх боломжтой байдаг. Энэ сүүлийн шинжлэх ухааны тулд бид Github дээр зохион байгуулсан 27 сайн мэддэг Питон төсөл дээр шинэ туршилт хийдэг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi funksjonsassistent, eit lett Python-basert verktøykassett for å spørja og utforska kildekodelager med naturspråk. Verktøykastet er designert for å hjelpa sluttbrukarar av ein målAPI for rask å finna informasjon om funksjonar gjennom naturlege spørjingar, eller skildringar på høg nivå. For ein gitt tekstspørjing og bakgrunnsfarge- API finn verktøyet kandidatfunksjonar ved å utføra eit omsetjing frå teksten til kjente representasjonar i API med den semantiske tolkingslinjen av (Richardson og Kuhn, 2017). Omsetjingar vert automatisk lært frå eksempel tekstkodepar i eksempel API. Verktøykastet inneheld funksjonar for å bygge omsetjingsprøytebrukar og spørja motorar for tilfeldig kjeldekodprosjekt. For å utforske denne siste funksjonen, utfører vi nye eksperimenter på 27 godt kjente Python-prosjekt vert på Github.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy Function Assistant, lekki zestaw narzędzi oparty na Pythonie do wyszukiwania i eksplorowania repozytoriów kodu źródłowego przy użyciu języka naturalnego. Zestaw narzędzi ma na celu pomóc użytkownikom końcowym docelowego interfejsu API szybko znaleźć informacje o funkcjach za pomocą wysokiego poziomu zapytań językowych naturalnych lub opisów. Dla danego zapytania tekstowego i API tła narzędzie znajduje funkcje kandydatów poprzez wykonanie tłumaczenia z tekstu na znane reprezentacje w API przy użyciu podejścia parsowania semantycznego (Richardson i Kuhn, 2017). Tłumaczenia są automatycznie uczone z przykładowych par tekst-kod w przykładowych interfejsach API. Zestaw narzędzi zawiera funkcje budowy rurociągów tłumaczeń i silników zapytań dla dowolnych projektów kodu źródłowego. Aby zbadać tę ostatnią funkcję, przeprowadzamy nowe eksperymenty na 27 znanych projektach Pythona hostowanych na Github.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem Function Assistant, un kit de instrumente ușor bazat pe Python pentru interogarea și explorarea depozitelor de coduri sursă folosind limbajul natural. Setul de instrumente este conceput pentru a ajuta utilizatorii finali ai unui API țintă să găsească rapid informații despre funcții prin interogări sau descrieri de limbaj natural de nivel înalt. Pentru o anumită interogare de text și API de fundal, instrumentul găsește funcțiile candidate prin efectuarea unei traduceri de la text la reprezentări cunoscute în API folosind abordarea de analizare semantică a (Richardson și Kuhn, 2017). Traducerile sunt învățate automat din perechi text-cod exemplu în API-uri exemplare. Setul de instrumente include caracteristici pentru construirea de conducte de traducere și motoare de interogare pentru proiecte de cod sursă arbitrar. Pentru a explora această ultimă caracteristică, efectuăm noi experimente pe 27 de proiecte Python bine cunoscute găzduite pe Github.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo pomoćnik funkcije, lakši Python-bazirani alat za ispitivanje i istraživanje skladišta izvornog koda koristeći prirodni jezik. Instrumenta je dizajnirana da pomogne krajnjim korisnicima ciljnog API brzo pronađemo informacije o funkcijama kroz prirodne ispitivanja visokog nivoa prirodnog jezika ili opisa. Za određeni tekstni zahtev i pozadinski API, alat nalazi funkcije kandidata izvršavajući prevod teksta na poznate predstave u API koristeći semantički pristup analize (Richardson i Kuhn, 2017). Преводи се автоматично научавају из примера пара текста кода у примеру API. Korisnički alat uključuje karakteristike za izgradnju prevodnih cijevi i ispitivanje motora za proizvodnje koda. Da bi istražili ovu poslednju funkciju, izvršili smo nove eksperimente na 27 poznatih Python projekta domaćin na Githubu.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි විස්තර කරන්නේ වැඩසහායක් සහායකයක්, පායිතන් අධාරිත පායිතන් අධාරිත උපකරණ කිට් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පරීක්ෂ ඉලක්කය API ගේ අවසානය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාට උදව් කරන්න උපකරණය සැකසුම් කරලා ඉක්මනින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ගැන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ගැන තොරතු දෙන්න පාළ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ පසුබිම API සඳහා, උපකරණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්නවා පාළුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් දන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් API වලින් පරිශ්න පරිවාදය ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා උදාහරණයෙන් පාළ- කෝඩ් ජෝඩාවක් උදාහරණය APIs වල @ info: tooltip මේ අන්තිම විශේෂතාව පරීක්ෂා කරන්න, අපි අළුත් පරීක්ෂණා කරනවා ජිතුබ් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය 27 දී දන්න පි', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa kaalmaha Function, qalabka fudud ee Python ku saleysan qoraalka qoraalka kooxaha ah ee isticmaalka luqada asalka ah. Qalabka caawimaadda isticmaalayaasha dhamaadka ee API waxaa dhaqso u heli kara macluumaad la xiriira shaqooyinka heerka sare ee su'aalaha luuqada asalka ah ama qoraalka. Qoraalka qoraalka iyo bakhtiga API waxaa laga helaa shaqooyin madaxa ah oo lagu sameeyo turjubaan ka mid ah qoraalka loo aqoonsan karo representations in API lagu isticmaalo hababka semantic parsing (Richardson iyo Kuhn, 2017). Turjumista waxaa lagu baranayaa tusaale ahaan labo qoraal ah, tusaale ahaan APIs. Qoraalka waxyaabaha lagu qorayo waxaa ku jira qalabka turjumaadda iyo mashiinadaha la weydiinayo qorsheyaasha kooxeedka asalka ah. Si aan u baarayno waxyaabahan ugu dambeeyay, waxaynu sameynaa jirrabo cusub oo ku saabsan dhaqdhaqaaqyada 27 Python ee lagu yaqaan Github.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi Function Assistant, en lätt Python-baserad verktygslåda för att fråga och utforska källkodsregister med hjälp av naturligt språk. Verktygspaketet är utformat för att hjälpa slutanvändare av ett målAPI att snabbt hitta information om funktioner genom högkvalitativa naturspråksfrågor eller beskrivningar. För en given textfråga och bakgrunds API hittar verktyget kandidatfunktioner genom att utföra en översättning från texten till kända representationer i API med hjälp av semantisk tolkning metod av (Richardson och Kuhn, 2017). Översättningar lär sig automatiskt från exempel text-kodpar i exempel API:er. Verktygssatsen innehåller funktioner för att bygga översättningsledningar och frågemotorer för godtyckliga källkodsprojekt. För att utforska denna sista funktion utför vi nya experiment på 27 välkända Python-projekt som finns på Github.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم فرقشن مددگار کو توصیح دیتے ہیں، ایک ہلکا پیٹون بنیادی تولیک کیٹ کے لئے سئورس کوڈ ریپوسٹریوں کو سؤال اور تحقیق کرنے کے لئے، طبیعی زبان کے مطابق۔ تولیک کیٹ ایک موقع API کے تمام کاربران کی مدد کرنے کے لئے تیز طراحی کی گئی ہے کہ فانسکوں کے بارے میں بہت سی سطح طبیعی زبان کوریزوں کے ذریعے مطلوبہ تلاش کریں یا وصیت کریں. ایک مقرر کیسٹ کیسٹر اور پچھلی API کے لئے، یہ تولید کاندینٹ فنکٹوں کو پیدا کرتا ہے تاکسٹ سے پیدا کرنے کے ذریعہ API میں معلوم معلوم نمایشنامات کے مطابق (ریچاردسون اور کون، 2017) کی سیمنٹی پارسینگ طریقے کے مطابق۔ Translations are automatically learned from example text- code pairs in example APIs. تولکیٹ میں ترجمہ پیپ لینڈ بنانے کے لئے ویژگی لگا رہی ہے اور منحصر سورس کوڈ پروژیکوں کے لئے انجینڈ کوئٹر کے لئے۔ اس آخری فرصت کی جستجو کے لئے ہم نے 27 خوب معلوم پیتان پروژیکوں پر نئی تجربے کی۔', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செயல்கூறு உதவியாளரை விவரிக்கிறோம், இயற்கையான மொழியை பயன்படுத்தி கேள்வி மற்றும் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் ஒரு எ உயர்நிலை இயல்பான மொழி கேள்விகள் அல்லது விவரிப்புகள் மூலம் செயல்பாடு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரை கேள்வி மற்றும் பின்னணி API கேட்டுக்காக கருவி தேர்வான செயல்பாடுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் உரையிலிருந்து தெரியும் பகிர்ந்துக Name @ info: whatsthis இந்த கடைசி குணங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க, நாம் 27 நன்றாக தெரியும் பைதான் திட்டங்களில் புதிய சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம்.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz funksiyat yordamchisini asosida yordam beramiz, asosiy tilni yordamida soʻrov va qidirish uchun oddiy asboblar asboblari. Name Name @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Bu oxirgi imkoniyatlarni qidirish uchun Github bilan boshlangan 27 yaxshi ko'proq Python loyihasida yangi imtiyozni bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả Trợ lý hàm, bộ công cụ Python nhỏ gọn để đặt câu hỏi và tìm kiếm các kho chứa mã nguồn bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Bộ cấu trúc này được thiết kế để giúp người dùng cuối của một API mục tiêu tìm thông tin về chức năng thông qua các câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cấp cao, hoặc mô tả. Với một yêu cầu văn bản cụ thể và hồ sơ nền API, công cụ tìm ra chức năng của ứng viên bằng cách thực hiện một bản dịch từ văn bản đến các biểu hiện đã biết trong API bằng cách sử dụng cách phân tích theo ngữ nghĩa (Richardson and Kuhn, thẩm diễn xuất phần phần thưởng). Quá trình được học tự động từ các cặp mã văn bản ví dụ API. Bộ dụng cụ chứa các tính năng xây dựng đường ống dịch chuyển và động cơ truy vấn các dự án mã nguồn ngẫu nhiên. Để khám phá tính năng cuối cùng này, chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm mới trên tàu 27 nổi tiếng Python được tổ chức tại GitHub.', 'nl': "In dit artikel beschrijven we Function Assistant, een lichtgewicht Python-gebaseerde toolkit voor het opvragen en verkennen van broncoderepositories met behulp van natuurlijke taal. De toolkit is ontworpen om eindgebruikers van een doelAPI te helpen snel informatie over functies te vinden via zoekopdrachten in natuurlijke taal op hoog niveau of beschrijvingen. Voor een bepaalde tekstquery en achtergrond API vindt de tool kandidaatfuncties door een vertaling uit te voeren van de tekst naar bekende representaties in de API met behulp van de semantische parsing benadering van (Richardson en Kuhn, 2017). Vertalingen worden automatisch geleerd van voorbeeldtekst-code paren in voorbeeld API's. De toolkit bevat functies voor het bouwen van vertaalpipelines en query engines voor willekeurige broncodeprojecten. Om deze laatste functie te verkennen, voeren we nieuwe experimenten uit op 27-bekende Python-projecten gehost op Github.", 'da': "I denne artikel beskriver vi Function Assistant, et let Python-baseret værktøjssæt til forespørgsler og udforskning af kildekodelagre ved hjælp af naturligt sprog. Værktøjssættet er designet til at hjælpe slutbrugere af en målAPI med hurtigt at finde oplysninger om funktioner gennem naturlige sprogforespørgsler eller beskrivelser på højt niveau. For en given tekstforespørgsel og baggrundsAPI finder værktøjet kandidatfunktioner ved at udføre en oversættelse fra teksten til kendte repræsentationer i API'en ved hjælp af den semantiske parsing tilgang af (Richardson og Kuhn, 2017). Oversættelser læres automatisk fra eksempelvis tekst-kodepar i eksempelvis API'er. Værktøjssættet indeholder funktioner til opbygning af oversættelsesrørledninger og forespørgselsmotorer til vilkårlige kildekodeprojekter. For at udforske denne sidste funktion, udfører vi nye eksperimenter på 27 velkendte Python projekter hostet på Github.", 'bg': 'В тази статия описваме функционален асистент, лек набор от инструменти, базиран на Python, за справки и проучване на хранилища на изходен код, използващи естествен език. Комплектът с инструменти е предназначен да помогне на крайните потребители на целеви API бързо да намерят информация за функциите чрез заявки за естествен език на високо ниво или описания. За дадена текстова заявка и фонов интерфейс инструментът намира кандидат функции чрез извършване на превод от текста към известни представи в интерфейса, използвайки семантичния анализ подход на (Ричардсън и Кун, 2017). Преводите се научават автоматично от примерни текстово-кодови двойки в примерни APIs. Инструментите включват функции за изграждане на тръбопроводи за преводи и двигатели за заявки за произволни проекти за изходен код. За да проучим тази последна функция, извършваме нови експерименти върху 27 добре познати проекта хоствани в Гитхъб.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo pomoćnik funkcije, lakši Python-based alat za ispitivanje i istraživanje skladišta izvornog koda koristeći prirodni jezik. Korisnički alat je dizajniran da pomogne krajnjim korisnicima ciljnog API brzo pronaći informacije o funkcijama kroz ispitivanje prirodnog jezika visokog nivoa ili opisa. Za određeno pitanje teksta i pozadinski API, alat pronalazi funkcije kandidata izvršavajući prevod teksta na poznate predstave u API koristeći semantički pristup analize (Richardson i Kuhn, 2017). Prevodi se automatski uče od primjera par tekstskih kodova u primjeru API. Korisnički alat uključuje karakteristike za izgradnju prevodnih cijevi i zapitavanje motora za proizvorni projekti izvornog koda. Da bi istražili ovu posljednju funkciju, izvršili smo nove eksperimente na 27 poznatih Python projekta domaćin na Githubu.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir Function Assistant, ein leichtes Python-basiertes Toolkit zum Abfragen und Erkunden von Quellcode-Repositories mit natürlicher Sprache. Das Toolkit wurde entwickelt, um Endbenutzern einer Ziel-API zu helfen, schnell Informationen über Funktionen durch hochrangige Abfragen in natürlicher Sprache oder Beschreibungen zu finden. Für eine bestimmte Textabfrage und Hintergrund-API findet das Tool Kandidatenfunktionen, indem es eine Übersetzung aus dem Text in bekannte Darstellungen in der API mithilfe des semantischen Parsing-Ansatzes von (Richardson und Kuhn, 2017) durchführt. Übersetzungen werden automatisch aus Beispieltext-Code-Paaren in Beispiel-APIs gelernt. Das Toolkit enthält Funktionen zum Erstellen von Übersetzungs-Pipelines und Abfrage-Engines für beliebige Quellcode-Projekte. Um diese letzte Funktion zu erkunden, führen wir neue Experimente an 27-bekannten Python-Projekten durch, die auf Github gehostet werden.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan Asisten Fungsi, sebuah toolkit ringan berdasarkan Python untuk menanyai dan mengeksplorasi repositori kode sumber menggunakan bahasa alam. Paket alat dirancang untuk membantu pengguna akhir dari API target dengan cepat menemukan informasi tentang fungsi melalui pertanyaan bahasa alam tingkat tinggi, atau deskripsi. Untuk pertanyaan teks dan API latar belakang tertentu, alat menemukan fungsi kandidat dengan melakukan terjemahan dari teks ke represisi yang dikenal dalam API menggunakan pendekatan penghuraian semantis (Richardson dan Kuhn, 2017). Terjemahan secara otomatis belajar dari contoh pasangan kode-teks dalam contoh API. Paket alat termasuk fitur untuk membangun pipa terjemahan dan mesin pertanyaan untuk proyek sumber kode secara arbitrari. Untuk mengeksplorasi karakteristik terakhir ini, kami melakukan eksperimen baru pada 27 proyek Python yang terkenal ditempatkan di Github.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunamelezea Msaidizi wa Functions, kituo cha zana yenye msingi wa Python yenye uzito kwa ajili ya kutafuta na kutafuta makala za vyanzo vya kodi kwa kutumia lugha ya asili. Kifaa hicho kinalengwa kusaidia watumiaji wa mwisho wa API kwa lengo hili kutafuta taarifa kuhusu kazi za lugha za asili, au maelezo. Kwa kutafuta ujumbe wa maandishi na API, zana hiyo inapata nafasi za wagombea kwa kufanya tafsiri kutoka maandishi yanayofahamika na wawakilishi katika API kwa kutumia mbinu za magereza ya kimapenzi (Richardson na Kuhn, 2017). Tafsiri zinajifunza kwa kujitegemea kutoka kwa mfano wawili wa simu za mkononi kwa mfano APIs. Kifaa hicho kinajumuisha vipengele vya kutengeneza mabwawa ya kutafsiri na kutafuta injini kwa ajili ya miradi ya kanuni za kiholela. Ili kuchunguza kipengele hiki cha mwisho, tunafanya majaribio mapya katika miradi 27 maarufu ya Python iliyoandaliwa Github.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz Funksiýa Ajypatçysyny, beýleki dil ullanýän we çykmak üçin peýdaly pytonyň esasy çykarmak üçin hasaplaýarlar. Esbap zolaky buýruk API ň ahyry ulananlaryna çalt fonksiýalary ýokary dereje tebigy dil soraglary we düşündirimler barada maglumat tapmak üçin tasarlanýar. Berilen metin soragy we arkaplan API üçin, bu araç modinden tekstden tanaýan temsillere (Richardson we Kuhn, 2017) üýtgetmek üçin kandidat fonksiýalary tapýar. Terjimeler örän APIler içinde metin-kodyň çiftleri otomatik bilen öwrenilýär. Esbap zolaky täze ködleme hatlary bejermek üçin çykyş hatlary we taryş ködleme proýetleri üçin sorgulamak üçin özellikleri bar. Soňky özellikleri keşfedmek üçin, 27-nji bilinen Python projelerinde Githubda hostlanan täze deneyler çykýarys.', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons Funksie Assistent, 'n liggewig Python-gebaseerde nutsbalk vir navraag en uitsoek bronkode stoorplekke gebruik natuurlik taal. Die nutsbalk is ontwerp om die einde- gebruikers van 'n doel API vinnig inligting oor funksies te vind deur hoë- vlak natuurlike taal navraag, of beskrywings. Vir 'n gegewe teks navraag en agtergrond API, vind die hulpmiddel kandidate funksies deur 'n vertaling uit die teks na bekende voorstellings in die API te doen met die semantiese verwerking toegang van (Richardson en Kuhn, 2017). Vertalings word outomaties geleer van voorbeeld teks- kode paar in voorbeeld APIs. Name Om hierdie laaste funksie te ondersoek, doen ons nuwe eksperimente op 27 goed bekende Python-projekte wat op Github bediener is.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë Asistentin e Funksioneve, një paketë mjete të lehtë bazuar në Python për pyetje dhe eksplorim të repozitorëve kodesh burimi duke përdorur gjuhën natyrore. Paketa e mjeteve është projektuar për të ndihmuar përdoruesit përfundimtarë të një API objektiv të gjejnë shpejt informacion rreth funksioneve nëpërmjet pyetjeve të nivelit të lartë të gjuhës natyrore apo përshkrimeve. Për një pyetje teksti të caktuar dhe API të sfondit, mjeti gjen funksione kandidate duke kryer një përkthim nga teksti në përfaqësime të njohura në API duke përdorur metodën semantike të analizimit (Richardson dhe Kuhn, 2017). Përkthimet mësohen automatikisht nga shembulli i çifteve teksti-kodi në shembull API. Paketa e instrumenteve përfshin funksione për ndërtimin e tubacioneve të përkthimit dhe motorëve të pyetjeve për projekte arbitrarë kodi burimi. Për të eksploruar këtë funksion të fundit, ne bëjmë eksperimente të reja në 27 projekte të njohur Python të pritur në Github.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የፍунксия ረዳት፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ለመጠየቅና ለመፍጠር እና የsource code repositories በመጠየቅ የፕython መሠረት ሀብት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቱልባር መሣሪያው የኮምፕዩተር ቋንቋ ጠያፊዎች ወይም ጽሑፎች በቶሎ የፋይሎችን መረጃ ማግኘት ለመግለጫ ይጠቅማል፡፡ ለመስጠት የጽሑፍ ጠይቅ እና የመደቡን API በመስጠት፣ መሣሪያው የፊደለኞቹን ስርዓት በመጠቀም በጽሑፉ የተታወቀውን ተርጓሚዎች በAPI ውስጥ የsemantic parsing approaches (Richardson እና Kuhn, 2017) በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ትርጉም ከምሳሌ ጽሑፍ-code-pair ምሳሌ API ተማርተዋል። የቱልባር መክፈቻ ውስጥ ትርጉም ፕሮጀክቶችን ለመሥራት ምርጫዎች እና ማንኪኖችን ለመርከብ የኩነቶች ኮድ ፕሮጀክቶች ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ To explore this last feature, we perform new experiments on 27 well-known Python projects hosted on Github.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք Ֆունկցիոնալ օգնականը, մի թեթև Պիթոնի հիմնված գործիքների շարք, որը օգտագործում է բնական լեզու աղբյուր կոդի պանակարաններ հարցնելու և ուսումնասիրելու համար: Գործիքների շարքը նախագծված է օգնելու նպատակային API-ի վերջնական օգտագործողներին արագ տեղեկատվություն գտնել ֆունկցիաների մասին բարձր մակարդակի բնական լեզվի հարցերի կամ նկարագրությունների միջոցով: Տեքստի հարցերի և ֆոնդային API-ի համար գործիքը գտնում է թեկնածու ֆունկցիաներ, թարգմանելով տեքստից դեպի հայտնի ներկայացումներ API-ում՝ օգտագործելով Ռիչարդսոնի և Քունի սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մոտեցումը (2017). Թարգմանությունները ինքնաբերաբար սովորվում են օրինակի տեքստի-կոդի զույգերից API-ներում: Գործիքների շարքը ներառում է հատկություններ թարգմանման խողովակաշարերի կառուցվածքի համար և հարցերի շարժիչներ կամավոր աղբյուր կոդի նախագծերի համար: To explore this last feature, we perform new experiments on 27 well-known Python projects hosted on Github.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 Function Assistant를 묘사했는데 이것은 Python을 기반으로 하는 경량급 도구 패키지로 자연 언어를 사용하여 원본 코드 저장소를 조회하고 탐색하는 데 사용된다.이 키트는 대상 API의 최종 사용자가 고급 자연 언어 쿼리 또는 설명을 통해 함수에 대한 정보를 신속하게 찾을 수 있도록 돕기 위해 설계되었습니다.주어진 텍스트 쿼리와 배경 API에 대해 이 도구는 사용된 의미 해석 방법(Richardson and Kuhn, 2017)을 사용하여 텍스트를 API에서 알려진 표현으로 변환하여 후보 함수를 찾습니다.번역은 예제 API의 예제 텍스트 코드 쌍에서 자동으로 학습됩니다.이 패키지는 임의의 원본 코드 프로젝트를 위한 번역 파이프와 조회 엔진 기능을 포함한다.마지막 특성을 탐색하기 위해 Github에 위탁 관리된 27개의 유명한 파이톤 프로젝트에서 새로운 실험을 진행했다.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ফাংশন সহকারীকে বর্ণনা করি, প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা ব্যবহার করে পাইথন ভিত্তিক টুলিকিট অনুসন্ধান এবং সোর্স কোড রিপোজিটোরি  টুলবিটের ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে একটি লক্ষ্য এপিআই-এর শেষ ব্যবহারকারীদের সাহায্য করার জন্য যাতে তারা দ্রুত উচ্চপর্যায়ের প্রাকৃতিক ভ একটি প্রদত্ত টেক্সট অনুসন্ধান এবং পটভূমির প্রার্থী এপিআই-এ পরিচিত প্রতিনিধিদের অনুবাদ করার মাধ্যমে টুলটি পাওয়া যায় (রিচার্ডসন ও কুন, ২০১৭)। স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অনুবাদ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে API-র উদাহরণ টেক্সট- কোড জুট থেকে শিখা হয়। টুলবিটের মধ্যে অনুবাদ পাইপেলাইন নির্মাণের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং আর্বার্টির উৎস কোড প্রকল্পের জন্য ইঞ্জিন নির্মাণ এই শেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুসন্ধানের জন্য, আমরা গিথুবে আয়োজন করা ২৭ জন পরিচিত পাইথন প্রকল্পের নতুন পরীক্ষা করি।', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشتری عملکرد را توصیف می\u200cکنیم، یک کاغذ ابزارهای سبک بر پایه Python برای سوال و تحقیق ذخیره\u200cهای کد منبع با استفاده از زبان طبیعی. کلید ابزار برای کمک به کاربران پایان یک API هدف به سرعت اطلاعات درباره عملکرد را از طریق سوال زبان طبیعی بالا طراحی می\u200cکند، یا توصیف\u200cها. برای یک سوال متن و API پشتیبانی داده شده، ابزار با انجام یک ترجمه از متن به نمایش\u200cهای شناخته در API با استفاده از طریق تجزیه\u200cهای semantic از (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017) تابع کاندیده پیدا می\u200cکند. ترجمه\u200cها به طور خودکار از جفت\u200cهای متن- کد در مثال API یاد گرفته می\u200cشوند. تولید ابزار شامل ویژگی برای ساختن خط لوله\u200cهای ترجمه و موتورها برای پروژه\u200cهای منبع منبع تصادفی است. برای تحقیق این آخرین ویژه، ما آزمایش جدید را در پروژه\u200cهای پیتان شناخته شده در گیتوب انجام می\u200cدهیم.', 'az': "Bu kağızda Funksiya Yardımcısını, təbiətli dil vasitəsilə soruşmaq və keşfetmək üçün hafif Python vasitəsilə tabanlı araç kitabını təsdiq edirik. Məqsəd API istifadəçilərinin sonlarına kömək etmək üçün istifadə edilən araç kitabı yüksək seviyyətli təbiətli dil soruşmaları və ya tanımlamaları vasitəsilə fonksiyonlar haqqında məlumat tapmaq üçün tədbir edilmişdir. Verilən mətn soruşması və arxa plan API üçün, bu araç mətndən ilk dəyişiklik tərzi ilə (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). Tərcümələr məsəllərdə mətn kodu çiftlərdən avtomatik öyrənirlər. Bu araç çubuğu tərcümə pipe çubuqlarını inşa etmək və müəyyən mənbə kodu proqramları üçün maşınları soruşmaq üçün xüsusiyyətlər içərir. Bu son xüsusiyyəti keşfetmek üçün, Github'da qonaqlı 27 tanınmış Python proqramlarında yeni təcrübələr edərik.", 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim Function Assistant, un conjunt d'eines lliure basat en Python per consultar i explorar repositoris de codis fonts utilitzant llenguatge natural. El conjunt d'eines està dissenyat per ajudar als usuaris finals d'una API d'objectiu a trobar ràpidament informació sobre funcions a través de preguntes o descripcions de llenguatges naturals d'alt nivell. Per a una consulta de text i API de fons, l'eina troba funcions candidates fent una traducció del text a representacions conegudes a l'API fent servir l'enfocament semàntic d'analització de (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). Les traduccions s'aprenen automàticament a partir d'exemples de parells de codis de text en exemples d'APIs. The toolkit includes features for building translation pipelines and query engines for arbitrary source code projects.  Per explorar aquesta última característica, fem nous experiments en 27 coneguts projectes Python aconseguits a Github.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme funkční asistent, lehkou sadu nástrojů založenou na Pythonu pro dotazování a zkoumání repozitářů zdrojového kódu pomocí přirozeného jazyka. Sada nástrojů je navržena tak, aby pomohla koncovým uživatelům cílového rozhraní API rychle najít informace o funkcích prostřednictvím dotazů nebo popisů na vysoké úrovni přirozeného jazyka. Pro daný textový dotaz a rozhraní API na pozadí nástroj najde kandidátské funkce provedením překladu z textu do známých reprezentací v rozhraní API pomocí přístupu sémantické parsing (Richardson a Kuhn, 2017). Překlady se automaticky učí z příkladových párů text-kód v příkladových rozhraních API. Sada nástrojů obsahuje funkce pro budování překladových potrubí a dotazových enginů pro libovolné projekty zdrojového kódu. Pro prozkoumání této poslední funkce provádíme nové experimenty na 27 známých Pythonových projektech hostovaných na Githubu.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo pomoćnika funkcije, lakši Python-based alat za ispitivanje i istraživanje repozitorija izvornog koda koristeći prirodni jezik. Korisnički alat je dizajniran da pomogne krajnjim korisnicima ciljnog API brzo pronaći informacije o funkcijama kroz prirodne ispitivanja na visokom nivou, ili opisa. Za određeni tekstni zahtev i pozadinski API, alat nalazi funkcije kandidata izvršavajući prevod iz teksta na poznate predstave u API koristeći semantički pristup analize (Richardson i Kuhn, 2017). Prevodi se automatski uče od primjera par teksta koda u primjeru API. Kutija alata uključuje karakteristike za izgradnju prevodnih cijevi i ispitivanje motora za proizvorni izvorni kodovi. Da bi istražili ovu poslednju funkciju, izvršili smo nove eksperimente na 27 poznatih Python projekta domaćin na Githubu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame Function Assistenti, kerget Python-põhist tööriistakomplekti lähtekoodihoidlate pärimiseks ja uurimiseks looduskeelt kasutades. Tööriistakomplekt on loodud selleks, et aidata sihtAPI lõppkasutajatel kiiresti leida funktsioonide kohta teavet kõrgetasemeliste looduskeele päringute või kirjelduste kaudu. Konkreetse tekstipäringu ja tausta API puhul leiab tööriist kandidaatfunktsioone, teostades tõlke tekstist tuntud esitustesse API-s semantilise parsimise meetodi abil (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). Tõlked õpivad automaatselt näiteks API-des olevatest tekstikoodipaaridest. Tööriistakomplekt sisaldab funktsioone tõlkejuhtmete ja päringumootorite ehitamiseks suvalise lähtekoodi projektide jaoks. Viimase funktsiooni uurimiseks teeme uusi katseid 27 tuntud Pythoni projektiga Githubis.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan Function Assistant, kevyt Python-pohjainen työkalupakki lähdekoodivarastojen kyselyyn ja tutkimiseen luonnollisella kielellä. Työkalupakki on suunniteltu auttamaan kohderajapinnan loppukäyttäjiä löytämään nopeasti tietoja toiminnoista korkean tason luonnollisen kielen kyselyjen tai kuvausten avulla. Tietylle tekstikyselylle ja taustarajapinnalle työkalu etsii ehdokasfunktioita suorittamalla käännöksen tekstistä tunnettuihin esityksiin API:ssa käyttäen semanttista jäsennysmenetelmää (Richardson ja Kuhn, 2017). Käännökset oppivat automaattisesti esimerkkiohjelmointirajapintojen tekstikoodipareista. Työkalupakki sisältää ominaisuuksia käännösputkien ja kyselymoottoreiden rakentamiseen mielivaltaisiin lähdekoodiprojekteihin. Tutkiaksemme tätä viimeistä ominaisuutta suoritamme uusia kokeiluja 27 tunnetussa Python-projektissa Githubissa.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kéné rambarang Panjenengan Assistribute, barang langgar-sistem sing paling apit nang piton kanggo nggunakake lan ngjelakake depolasi kelompok nggambar aturan. Perintah sing dibenalkit kanggo bantuan pengguna-tenan ning tarjamahan Sampeyan panggunggo teks lan Api penontong kapan kanggo ngilanggar kelompok word Peringkat-peringkat sing dibenalki kanggo nggawe lanjut string karo pangot engin kanggo kelas kelas kode kanggo kebebasan perintah sing dibutuhke, kita sampeyan perbudhakan anyar nang awak dhéwé Jagat Jagat kanggo ngerasakno', 'sk': 'V tem članku opisujemo Function Assistant, lahek komplet orodij, ki temelji na Pythonu, za poizvedbe in raziskovanje repozitorijev izvorne kode z uporabo naravnega jezika. Komplet orodij je zasnovan tako, da končnim uporabnikom ciljnega API-ja pomaga hitro poiskati informacije o funkcijah prek poizvedb v naravnem jeziku na visoki ravni ali opisov. Za določeno besedilno poizvedbo in API za ozadje orodje poišče kandidatne funkcije tako, da izvede prevod iz besedila v znane reprezentacije v API z uporabo pristopa semantičnega razčlenjanja (Richardson in Kuhn, 2017). Prevodi se samodejno naučijo iz primerov parov besedilne kode v primeru API. Komplet orodij vključuje funkcije za gradnjo prevajalskih cevovodov in poizvedbenih mehanizmov za samovoljne projekte izvorne kode. Za raziskovanje te zadnje funkcije izvajamo nove poskuse na 27 znanih Python projektih, ki gostujejo na Githubu.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana taimakon Aiki na Aiki, wani zance mai sauƙi a asalin Python dõmin yin tambayi da yin jarraba kode-bakori da ke amfani da harshen asili. An design an zartar da shirin ayuka dõmin ya taimake masu ƙari da ke amfani da ɗin AI ɗin gaba ɗaya, don ka samu zartar da agare masu amfani da amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu husũna da shiryoyin ayuka masu sauran-daraja, ko misãlai. @ info: tooltip @ info: whatsthis @ info: tooltip To domin yin jarrabi wannan na ƙarshe, za'a samun jarrabãwa guda a kan abũbuwan da aka sani na Python na GiThb.", 'he': 'In this paper, we describe Function Assistant, a lightweight Python-based toolkit for querying and exploring source code repositories using natural language.  ערכת הכלים מתוכננת כדי לעזור למשתמשים הסופיים של API המטרה למצוא במהירות מידע על תפקידים דרך שאלות טבעיות ברמה גבוהה בשפה, או תיאורים. עבור שאלה טקסטית מסוימת ואפי רקע, הכלי מוצא פונקציות מועמדים על ידי ביצוע תרגום מהטקסט לייצגות ידועות באפי, באמצעות גישת מעבדה סמנטית של (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). התרגשות נלמדות באופן אוטומטי מזוגי קוד טקסט בדוגמא APIs. ערכת הכלים כוללת תכונות לבניין צינורות התרגום ומנועי חקירה עבור פרוייקטי קוד מקור רציניים. כדי לחקור את התמונה האחרונה הזו, אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים חדשים על 27 פרוייקטי פיתון ידועים הידועים שמארחים בגיטוב.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་Function Assistant་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ཉེ་ཆུང The toolkit is designed to help end-users of a target API quickly find information about functions through high-level natural language queries, or descriptions. For a given text query and background API, the tool finds candidate functions by performing a translation from the text to known representations in the API using the semantic parsing approach of (Richardson and Kuhn, 2017). དཔེར་ན APIs ནང་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གྲངས་ཆ་གཅིག་ལས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པ The toolkit includes features for building translation pipelines and query engines for arbitrary source code projects. To explore this last feature, we perform new experiments on 27 well-known Python projects hosted on Github.'}
{'en': 'MoodSwipe : A Soft Keyboard that Suggests MessageBased on User-Specified Emotions', 'ar': 'MoodSwipe: لوحة مفاتيح ناعمة تقترح رسالة تستند إلى المشاعر التي يحددها المستخدم', 'fr': "MoodSwipe\xa0: un clavier logiciel qui suggère un message en fonction des émotions spécifiées par l'utilisateur", 'es': 'MoodSwipe: un teclado suave que sugiere mensajes basados en emociones especificadas por el usuario', 'pt': 'MoodSwipe: um teclado virtual que sugere mensagens com base em emoções especificadas pelo usuário', 'ja': 'MoodSwipe ：ユーザー指定の感情に基づいてメッセージを提案するソフトキーボード', 'zh': 'MoodSwipe:柔键盘,用户言消息', 'ru': 'MoodSwipe: мягкая клавиатура, которая предлагает MessageBased на основе определенных пользователем эмоций', 'hi': 'MoodSwipe: एक नरम कुंजीपटल जो उपयोगकर्ता-निर्दिष्ट भावनाओं पर आधारित संदेश का सुझाव देता है', 'ga': 'MoodSwipe: Méarchláir Bog a Mholann Teachtaireacht Bunaithe ar Mhothúcháin a Shonraigh Úsáideoir', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'MoodSwipe: Egy puha billentyűzet, amely üzeneteket javasol a felhasználó által megadott érzelmek alapján', 'el': 'Ένα μαλακό πληκτρολόγιο που προτείνει μηνύματα βάσει συναισθημάτων που καθορίζονται από τον χρήστη', 'it': "MoodSwipe: una tastiera morbida che suggerisce messaggi basati sulle emozioni specificate dall'utente", 'kk': 'АйдSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that suggests Messages Based on User- Specified Emotions', 'mk': 'Comment', 'lt': 'Comment', 'ms': 'Comment', 'mt': 'MoodSwipe: Keyboard Soft li jissuġġerixxi Messaġġ Ibbażat fuq Emozzjonijiet Speċifikati mill-Utent', 'mn': 'MoodSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that Suggests Messages Based on User-Specified Emotions', 'ml': '啻氞川嗟嵿处嗟嵿窗啻ㄠ祶鈥峉wipe: A Soft Keyboard that recommends MessageBased on User- Specified Emotions', 'pl': 'MoodSwipe: Miękka klawiatura sugerująca wiadomości na podstawie emocji określonych przez użytkownika', 'ro': 'MoodSwipe: O tastatură moale care sugerează mesaje bazate pe emoțiile specificate de utilizator', 'sr': 'MoodSwipe: Soft Keyboard koja predlaže poruku baziranu na posebnim emocijama korisnika', 'no': 'MåndSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that suggests Messages Based on User- Specified Emotions', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'MoodSwipe: Ett mjukt tangentbord som föreslår meddelanden baserat på användarspecifika känslor', 'so': 'MoodSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that recommends MessageBased on User-Specified Emotions', 'ta': 'நிலவுSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that recommends MessageBased on User- Specified Emotions', 'ur': 'Swipe: A Soft Keyboard that Suggests Messages Based on User-Specified Emotions', 'vi': 'Mô- đun mềm đề nghị tạo giao thức dựa trên cảm xúc xác định người dùng', 'uz': 'OySwipe: A Soft Keyboard that recommends MessageBased on User- Specified Emotions', 'hr': 'Name', 'bg': 'Мека клавиатура, която предлага съобщения въз основа на специфични от потребителя емоции', 'nl': 'MoodSwipe: Een zacht toetsenbord dat berichtgebaseerd is op gebruikersspecifieke emoties', 'da': 'MoodSwipe: Et blødt tastatur, der foreslår beskeder baseret på brugerdefinerede følelser', 'id': 'MoodSwipe: Sebuah papan kekunci lembut yang menyarankan pesan berdasarkan emosi yang ditentukan oleh pengguna', 'de': 'MoodSwipe: Eine weiche Tastatur, die Nachrichten basierend auf benutzerdefinierten Emotionen vorschlägt', 'ko': 'MoodSweep: 사용자가 지정한 정서에 따라 정보를 알려주는 소프트 키보드', 'fa': 'MoodSwipe: یک کلیدۀ نرم که پیغام را بر روی احساسات مشخص کاربر پیشنهاد می\u200cکند', 'sq': 'MoodSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that Suggests MessageBased on User-Specified Emotions', 'sw': 'Mwezi: A Soft Keyboard that recommends MessageBased on User-Specified Emotions', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Sallanç: A Soft Keyboard that Suggests Messages Based on User-Specified Emotions', 'am': 'ጨረቃSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that recommends MessageBased on User- Specified Emotions', 'bn': 'চাঁদ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'MoodSwipe: Soft Keyboard koja predlaže poruku baziranu na predstavljenim emocijama korisnika', 'ca': "MoodSwipe: Un teclat suau que suggereix missatges basats en emocions especificades per l'usuari", 'cs': 'MoodSwipe: Měkká klávesnice, která navrhuje zprávy založené na uživatelských emocích', 'et': 'MoodSwipe: pehme klaviatuur, mis soovitab sõnumeid kasutaja määratud emotsioonidel', 'fi': 'MoodSwipe: pehmeä näppäimistö, joka ehdottaa viestejä käyttäjän määrittämien tunteiden perusteella', 'az': 'MoodSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that suggests Messages Based on User-Specified Emotions', 'jv': 'Display boxes', 'he': 'Comment', 'ha': 'Dakata', 'sk': 'MoodSwipe: mehka tipkovnica, ki predlaga sporočila na podlagi uporabnikovih čustev', 'bo': 'MoodSwipe: A Soft Keyboard that Suggests Messages Based on User-Specified Emotions'}
{'en': 'We present MoodSwipe, a soft keyboard that suggests text messages given the user-specified emotions utilizing the real dialog data. The aim of MoodSwipe is to create a convenient user interface to enjoy the technology of emotion classification and text suggestion, and at the same time to collect labeled data automatically for developing more advanced technologies. While users select the MoodSwipe keyboard, they can type as usual but sense the emotion conveyed by their text and receive suggestions for their message as a benefit. In MoodSwipe, the detected emotions serve as the medium for suggested texts, where viewing the latter is the incentive to correcting the former. We conduct several experiments to show the superiority of the emotion classification models trained on the dialog data, and further to verify good emotion cues are important context for text suggestion.', 'ar': 'نقدم MoodSwipe ، وهي لوحة مفاتيح ناعمة تقترح رسائل نصية بالنظر إلى المشاعر التي يحددها المستخدم باستخدام بيانات الحوار الحقيقية. الهدف من MoodSwipe هو إنشاء واجهة مستخدم مريحة للاستمتاع بتقنية تصنيف المشاعر واقتراح النص ، وفي نفس الوقت لجمع البيانات المصنفة تلقائيًا لتطوير تقنيات أكثر تقدمًا. بينما يختار المستخدمون لوحة مفاتيح MoodSwipe ، يمكنهم الكتابة كالمعتاد ولكنهم يشعرون بالعاطفة التي تنقلها نصهم ويتلقون اقتراحات لرسالتهم كميزة. في MoodSwipe ، تعمل المشاعر المكتشفة كوسيط للنصوص المقترحة ، حيث يكون عرض الأخير هو الحافز لتصحيح الأول. نجري العديد من التجارب لإظهار تفوق نماذج تصنيف المشاعر المدربة على بيانات الحوار ، وكذلك للتحقق من أن إشارات المشاعر الجيدة هي سياق مهم لاقتراح النص.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o MoodSwipe, um teclado virtual que sugere mensagens de texto dadas as emoções especificadas pelo usuário utilizando os dados reais do diálogo. O objetivo do MoodSwipe é criar uma interface de usuário conveniente para aproveitar a tecnologia de classificação de emoções e sugestão de texto e, ao mesmo tempo, coletar dados rotulados automaticamente para desenvolver tecnologias mais avançadas. Enquanto os usuários selecionam o teclado MoodSwipe, eles podem digitar como de costume, mas sentir a emoção transmitida por seu texto e receber sugestões para sua mensagem como um benefício. No MoodSwipe, as emoções detectadas servem de meio para os textos sugeridos, onde a visualização dos últimos é o incentivo para a correção dos primeiros. Conduzimos vários experimentos para mostrar a superioridade dos modelos de classificação de emoções treinados nos dados de diálogo e, além disso, para verificar se boas pistas de emoção são um contexto importante para a sugestão de texto.', 'es': 'Presentamos MoodSwipe, un teclado virtual que sugiere mensajes de texto dadas las emociones especificadas por el usuario utilizando los datos reales del diálogo. El objetivo de MoodSwipe es crear una interfaz de usuario cómoda para disfrutar de la tecnología de clasificación de emociones y sugerencias de texto, y al mismo tiempo recopilar datos etiquetados automáticamente para desarrollar tecnologías más avanzadas. Mientras los usuarios seleccionan el teclado MoodSwipe, pueden escribir como de costumbre, pero percibir la emoción que transmite su texto y reciben sugerencias para su mensaje como beneficio. En MoodSwipe, las emociones detectadas sirven como medio para sugerir textos, donde ver estos últimos es el incentivo para corregir los primeros. Llevamos a cabo varios experimentos para mostrar la superioridad de los modelos de clasificación de emociones entrenados en los datos del diálogo y, además, para verificar que las buenas señales de emoción son un contexto importante para la sugerencia de texto.', 'fr': "Nous présentons MoodSwipe, un clavier logiciel qui suggère des messages texte en fonction des émotions spécifiées par l'utilisateur en utilisant les données de dialogue réelles. L'objectif de MoodSwipe est de créer une interface utilisateur pratique pour profiter de la technologie de classification des émotions et de suggestion de texte, tout en collectant automatiquement des données étiquetées pour développer des technologies plus avancées. Pendant que les utilisateurs sélectionnent le clavier MoodSwipe, ils peuvent taper comme d'habitude mais ressentir l'émotion véhiculée par leur texte et recevoir des suggestions pour leur message. Dans MoodSwipe, les émotions détectées servent de support à des suggestions de textes, alors que le fait de voir les seconds est une incitation à corriger les premiers. Nous menons plusieurs expériences pour montrer la supériorité des modèles de classification des émotions formés sur les données de dialogue, et pour vérifier que les bons indices d'émotion constituent un contexte important pour la suggestion de texte.", 'ja': '実際のダイアログデータを利用して、ユーザーが指定した感情に基づいてテキストメッセージを提案するソフトキーボード、MoodSwipeを発表します。MoodSwipeの目的は、感情の分類とテキスト提案のテクノロジーを楽しむための便利なユーザーインターフェースを作成すると同時に、より高度なテクノロジーを開発するためにラベル付けされたデータを自動的に収集することです。ユーザーはMoodSwipeキーボードを選択しますが、通常どおり入力できますが、テキストによって伝えられる感情を感知し、メリットとしてメッセージの提案を受け取ることができます。MoodSwipeでは、検出された感情が提案されたテキストの媒体となり、そこで後者を見ることが前者を修正するインセンティブとなる。私たちは、ダイアログデータでトレーニングされた感情分類モデルの優位性を示すためのいくつかの実験を行い、さらに、良い感情の手がかりがテキスト提案の重要な文脈であることを検証します。', 'zh': '臣等展MoodSwipe,此软键盘也,因实对数,因用户指定之情以议短信。 MoodSwipe者,创一便用户界面,以享情类文本之术,而自收其数以开先进之术。 当用户择MoodSwipe键盘,可以打字如常,而可以感文本之情,而得消息之议以为便。 MoodSwipe中,检情充建言文本之媒,其视后者正前机也。 三实验,以验情类之优越性,更验良情为文本之要上下文。', 'hi': 'हम MoodSwipe, एक नरम कुंजीपटल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो वास्तविक संवाद डेटा का उपयोग करके उपयोगकर्ता-निर्दिष्ट भावनाओं को देखते हुए पाठ संदेशों का सुझाव देता है। MoodSwipe का उद्देश्य भावना वर्गीकरण और पाठ सुझाव की तकनीक का आनंद लेने के लिए एक सुविधाजनक उपयोगकर्ता इंटरफ़ेस बनाना है, और साथ ही अधिक उन्नत प्रौद्योगिकियों को विकसित करने के लिए स्वचालित रूप से लेबल किए गए डेटा को इकट्ठा करना है। जबकि उपयोगकर्ता MoodSwipe कीबोर्ड का चयन करते हैं, वे हमेशा की तरह टाइप कर सकते हैं लेकिन उनके पाठ द्वारा व्यक्त भावनाओं को समझ सकते हैं और लाभ के रूप में अपने संदेश के लिए सुझाव प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। मूडस्वाइप में, पता लगाई गई भावनाएं सुझाए गए ग्रंथों के लिए माध्यम के रूप में काम करती हैं, जहां उत्तरार्द्ध को देखना पूर्व को सही करने के लिए प्रोत्साहन है। हम संवाद डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित भावना वर्गीकरण मॉडल की श्रेष्ठता दिखाने के लिए कई प्रयोग करते हैं, और आगे अच्छे भावना संकेतों को सत्यापित करने के लिए पाठ सुझाव के लिए महत्वपूर्ण संदर्भ हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем MoodSwipe, программную клавиатуру, которая предлагает текстовые сообщения с учетом определенных пользователем эмоций, используя реальные диалоговые данные. Целью MoodSwipe является создание удобного пользовательского интерфейса для наслаждения технологией классификации эмоций и текстовых подсказок, а также автоматический сбор маркированных данных для разработки более продвинутых технологий. Когда пользователи выбирают клавиатуру MoodSwipe, они могут печатать как обычно, но чувствовать эмоции, передаваемые их текстом, и получать предложения для своего сообщения в качестве выгоды. В MoodSwipe обнаруженные эмоции служат средством для предлагаемых текстов, где просмотр последних является стимулом для исправления первых. Мы проводим несколько экспериментов, чтобы показать превосходство моделей классификации эмоций, обученных на диалоговых данных, и далее, чтобы убедиться, что хорошие эмоциональные сигналы являются важным контекстом для предложения текста.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid MoodSwipe i láthair, méarchlár bog a mholann teachtaireachtaí téacs i bhfianaise na mothúcháin atá sonraithe ag an úsáideoir agus úsáid á baint as na fíorshonraí dialóige. Tá sé mar aidhm ag MoodSwipe comhéadan úsáideora áisiúil a chruthú chun taitneamh a bhaint as teicneolaíocht aicmithe mothúcháin agus moladh téacs, agus ag an am céanna sonraí lipéadaithe a bhailiú go huathoibríoch chun teicneolaíochtaí níos airde a fhorbairt. Cé go roghnaíonn úsáideoirí an méarchlár MoodSwipe, is féidir leo clóscríobh mar is gnách ach an mothúchán a chuireann a dtéacs in iúl a bhrath agus moltaí a fháil dá dteachtaireacht mar shochar. I MoodSwipe, feidhmíonn na mothúcháin a bhraitear mar mheán do théacsanna molta, áit a bhfuil sé mar dhreasacht chun an chéad cheann a cheartú ach féachaint ar an dara ceann. Déanaimid roinnt turgnaimh chun barr feabhais na múnlaí aicmithe mothúcháin atá oilte ar na sonraí dialóige a thaispeáint, agus chun leideanna maithe mothúcháin a fhíorú is comhthéacs tábhachtach le haghaidh moladh téacs.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ MoodSwipe, მარტივი კლავიატური, რომელიც აჩვენებს ტექსტის შეტყობინებები, რომელიც მომხმარებელი განსაზღვრებული ემოციების გამოყენება რეალური დიალოგის MoodSwipe-ის მისამართი არის შექმნა მომხმარებელი ინტერფექტი, რომელიც ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციის და ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის ტექნოლოგიაციის ტექნოლოგიაციის ტექნოლოგიას, და ერთადერთი დროში მომხმარე მომხმარებელი MoodSwipe კლავიატურის ამორჩევა, მაგრამ ისინი შეუძლიათ დაიწეროთ როგორც საუკეთესო, მაგრამ ისინი ტექსტიდან ემოციას გადატანა და მიიღება შეტყობინ MoodSwipe-ში, აღმოჩნდა ემოციები იყენებენ როგორც საკუთარი ტექსტის საშუალებაში, სადაც აღმოჩნეთ ბოლო ემოციები იყენებენ წინასწორებაში. ჩვენ ვიყავით რამდენიმე ექსპერიმენტები, რომ გამოჩვენოთ ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციის მოდელების უფრო მეტი, რომლებიც დიალოგის მონაცემებზე განაკეთებული მონაცემებით, და დამატებით', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μαλακό πληκτρολόγιο που προτείνει μηνύματα κειμένου δεδομένου των συναισθημάτων που καθορίζονται από το χρήστη χρησιμοποιώντας τα πραγματικά δεδομένα διαλόγου. Ο στόχος του είναι να δημιουργήσει μια βολική διεπαφή χρήστη για να απολαύσετε την τεχνολογία της ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων και της πρότασης κειμένου, και ταυτόχρονα να συλλέξει αυτόματα τα επισημασμένα δεδομένα για την ανάπτυξη πιο προηγμένων τεχνολογιών. Ενώ οι χρήστες επιλέγουν το πληκτρολόγιο μπορούν να πληκτρολογήσουν ως συνήθως, αλλά να αισθανθούν το συναίσθημα που μεταδίδει το κείμενό τους και να λαμβάνουν προτάσεις για το μήνυμά τους ως πλεονέκτημα. Στο σύστημα τα συναισθήματα που εντοπίστηκαν χρησιμεύουν ως το μέσο για προτεινόμενα κείμενα, όπου η προβολή των τελευταίων αποτελεί κίνητρο για τη διόρθωση των πρώτων. Διεξάγουμε διάφορα πειράματα για να δείξουμε την ανωτερότητα των μοντέλων ταξινόμησης συναισθημάτων που εκπαιδεύονται στα δεδομένα διαλόγου, και περαιτέρω για να επαληθεύσουμε ότι οι καλές ενδείξεις συναισθημάτων αποτελούν σημαντικό πλαίσιο για την πρόταση κειμένου.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a MoodSwipe billentyűzetet, amely a valódi párbeszédadatok felhasználásával szöveges üzeneteket javasol a felhasználó által megadott érzelmeknek megfelelően. A MoodSwipe célja, hogy kényelmes felhasználói felületet hozzon létre az érzelmi osztályozás és a szövegjavaslat technológiájának élvezéséhez, ugyanakkor automatikusan gyűjtsön címkézett adatokat a fejlettebb technológiák fejlesztéséhez. Miközben a felhasználók kiválasztják a MoodSwipe billentyűzetet, a szokásos módon gépelhetnek, de érzékelhetik a szövegük által közvetített érzelmet, és javaslatokat kaphatnak üzenetükre. A MoodSwipe-ban az érzékelt érzelmek a javasolt szövegek médiumként szolgálnak, ahol az utóbbi megtekintése ösztönzi az előbbi javítását. Több kísérletet végezünk a párbeszédadatokra képzett érzelmi osztályozási modellek felsőbbrendűségének megmutatására, továbbá annak ellenőrzésére, hogy a jó érzelmi utak fontos kontextusát jelentik a szövegjavaslatnak.', 'kk': 'Біз Айды көрсетедік.Swipe, a soft keyboard that suggests text messages given to the user- specified emotions utilizing the real dialog data. MoodSwipe мақсаты - емоциялық классификациялық және мәтін таңдаудың технологиялық технологиясын жасау үшін оңай пайдаланушылардың интерфейсін құру, және бірдей уақытта жалғастырылған технологиялық жасау ү Пайдаланушылар Айд- Свип пернетақтасын таңдағанда, олар әдеттегі ретінде тере алады, бірақ мәтінде көмектесілген емоцияларды сезіп, хабарламаларды пайдалану үшін ұсыныстарын алуға MoodSwipe дегенде табылған емоциялар мәтіндердің медиақшасы ретінде жұмыс істейді. Соңғы мәтіндерді қарау - бұрынғыны түзету үшін көмек. Біз көптеген тәжірибелерді диалог деректерінде оқылған емоциялық классификациялық үлгілерін көрсету үшін көптеген тәжірибелерді жақсы емоциялық белгілерді тексеру үшін мәтін та', 'it': "Vi presentiamo MoodSwipe, una tastiera morbida che suggerisce messaggi di testo date le emozioni specificate dall'utente utilizzando i dati reali di dialogo. L'obiettivo di MoodSwipe è quello di creare una comoda interfaccia utente per godere della tecnologia di classificazione delle emozioni e suggerimento del testo, e allo stesso tempo di raccogliere automaticamente i dati etichettati per lo sviluppo di tecnologie più avanzate. Mentre gli utenti selezionano la tastiera MoodSwipe, possono digitare come al solito, ma percepire l'emozione trasmessa dal loro testo e ricevere suggerimenti per il loro messaggio come vantaggio. In MoodSwipe, le emozioni rilevate servono come mezzo per i testi suggeriti, dove la visualizzazione di questi ultimi è l'incentivo a correggere i primi. Conduciamo diversi esperimenti per dimostrare la superiorità dei modelli di classificazione emotiva addestrati sui dati di dialogo, e ulteriormente per verificare che i buoni indizi emotivi siano un contesto importante per la suggestione del testo.", 'mk': 'Презентираме MoodSwipe, мека тастатура која предложува текстови пораки со оглед на емоциите специфицирани од корисникот кои ги користат вистинските дијалошки податоци. Целта на MoodSwipe е да создаде удобен кориснички интерфејс за да ужива во технологијата на емоционална класификација и текстови предлози, а истовремено да се собираат автоматски означени податоци за развој на понапредни технологии. Додека корисниците ја избираат клавіатурата MoodSwipe, тие можат да ја напишат како обично, но да ја почувствуваат емоцијата пренесена од нивниот текст и да добијат предлози за нивната порака како корист. Во MoodSwipe, откриените емоции служат како медиум за предложени тексти, каде што гледањето на последните е стимул за корекција на првите. Ние спроведуваме неколку експерименти за да ја покажеме супериорноста на моделите на емоционална класификација обучени на податоците од дијалогот, и понатаму за да потврдиме дека добрите емоционални знаци се важен контекст за текстови предлози.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome MoodSwipe, minkštą klaviatūrą, kuri siūlo teksto pranešimus atsižvelgiant į naudotojo nurodytus emocijas, naudojančias tikrus dialogo duomenis. MoodSwipe tikslas – sukurti patogią naudotojo sąsają, kuria būtų galima naudotis emocijų klasifikavimo ir teksto pasiūlymų technologijomis, ir kartu automatiškai rinkti pažymėtus duomenis pažangiosioms technologijoms plėtoti. Nors vartotojai pasirinka MoodSwipe klaviatūrą, jie gali rašyti kaip įprasta, bet jausti savo tekstu perduotas emocijas ir gauti pasiūlymus savo pranešimui kaip naudą. MoodSwipe atveju aptiktos emocijos naudojamos kaip siūlomų tekstų terpė, kai pastarųjų matymas yra paskata pataisyti pirmuosius tekstus. Mes atliekame keletą eksperimentų, kad parodytume emocijų klasifikavimo modelių, parengtų dialogo duomenimis, viršenybę, ir toliau tikriname gerus emocinius ženklus yra svarbus teksto pasiūlymo kontekstas.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചന്ദ്രനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു സൌഫ്റ്റ് കീബോര്\u200dഡ്, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ഡയലോ ചന്ദ്സ്വീപിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം വികാരത്തിന്റെയും പദാവലിയുടെയും സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെയും സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d ആസ്വദിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു നല്ല ഉപയോക്താവിന്റ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d ചന്ദ്രന്\u200d സ്വീപ് കീബോര്\u200dഡ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, അവര്\u200dക്ക് സാധാരണമായി ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന ചന്ദ്സ്വീപില്\u200d, കണ്ടെത്തിയ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മദ്ധ്യത്തില്\u200d സേവിക്കുന്നു. അവ നമ്മള്\u200d പല പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ഡയലോഗ് ഡാറ്റായില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വികാരങ്ങളുടെ മഹത്വം കാണിക്കാന', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan MoodSwipe, papan kekunci lembut yang menyarankan mesej teks diberikan emosi yang dinyatakan oleh pengguna menggunakan data dialog sebenar. Tujuan MoodSwipe ialah mencipta antaramuka pengguna yang sesuai untuk menikmati teknologi klasifikasi emosi dan cadangan teks, dan pada masa yang sama untuk mengumpulkan data labeled secara automatik untuk mengembangkan teknologi yang lebih maju. While users select the MoodSwipe keyboard, they can type as usual but sense the emotion conveyed by their text and receive suggestions for their message as a benefit.  Dalam MoodSwipe, emosi yang dikesan berkhidmat sebagai medium untuk teks yang disarankan, di mana melihat yang terakhir adalah motif untuk memperbaiki yang pertama. Kami melakukan beberapa eksperimen untuk menunjukkan ketinggian model klasifikasi emosi dilatih pada data dialog, dan lebih lanjut untuk mengesahkan tanda emosi yang baik adalah konteks penting untuk cadangan teks.', 'mn': 'Бид MoodSwipe-г жинхэнэ диалог өгөгдлийг ашиглаж байгаа хэрэглэгчийн тодорхойлолтой мэдрэмжүүдийг харуулж өгсөн текст захирагддаг. MoodSwipe-ын зорилго нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалтын технологи болон текст санал зөвлөх боломжтой хэрэглэгчийн интерфейс үүсгэх ба илүү хөгжсөн технологийг хөгжүүлэхэд өөрчлөгдсөн өгөгдлийг автоматаар цуглуулах юм. Хэрэглэгчид MoodSwipe-ын клавиатурыг сонгож байхдаа тэд ерөнхийдөө бичиж чадна. Гэхдээ тэдний текстэй мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийг мэдэрч чадна. MoodSwipe-д мэдрэгдсэн сэтгэл хөдлөл санал өгсөн бичгийн дунд ажилладаг. Эцсийг харах нь өмнөх сэтгэл хөдлөлийг засах урам юм. Бид олон туршилтуудыг диалог өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэлбэрийн загварын өндөр өндөр үзүүлэх боломжтой. Мөн сайн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тодорхойлолтуудыг батлах боломжтой болгон текст', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw MoodSwipe, tastiera ratba li tissuġġerixxi messaġġi tat-test minħabba l-emozzjonijiet speċifikati mill-utent li jużaw id-dejta reali tad-djalogu. L-għan tal-MoodSwipe huwa li joħloq interfaċċja konvenjenti għall-utent biex igawdi t-teknoloġija tal-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet u s-suġġeriment tat-test, u fl-istess ħin biex tinġabar id-dejta ttikkettata awtomatikament għall-iżvilupp ta’ teknoloġiji aktar avvanzati. While users select the MoodSwipe keyboard, they can type as usual but sense the emotion conveyed by their text and receive suggestions for their message as a benefit.  Fil-MoodSwipe, l-emozzjonijiet misjuba jservu bħala l-mezz għat-testi ssuġġeriti, fejn il-ħarsa lejn dawn tal-aħħar hija l-inċentiv għall-korrezzjoni tal-ewwel. Għandna nagħmlu diversi esperimenti biex juru s-superjorità tal-mudelli tal-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet imħarrġa fuq id-dejta tad-djalogu, u aktar biex jivverifikaw sinjali emozzjonali tajbin huma kuntest importanti għas-suġġeriment tat-test.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm MoodSwipe, o tastatură moale care sugerează mesaje text date emoțiilor specificate de utilizator folosind datele reale de dialog. Scopul MoodSwipe este de a crea o interfață de utilizator convenabilă pentru a vă bucura de tehnologia clasificării emoțiilor și sugestiei textului și, în același timp, de a colecta automat date etichetate pentru dezvoltarea tehnologiilor mai avansate. În timp ce utilizatorii selectează tastatura MoodSwipe, ei pot tasta ca de obicei, dar simt emoția transmisă de textul lor și primesc sugestii pentru mesajul lor ca un beneficiu. În MoodSwipe, emoțiile detectate servesc ca mediu pentru textele sugerate, în cazul în care vizualizarea acestora din urmă este stimulentul pentru corectarea primelor. Realizăm mai multe experimente pentru a arăta superioritatea modelelor de clasificare emoțională instruite pe datele de dialog și în continuare pentru a verifica indiciile emoționale bune sunt contextul important pentru sugestia textului.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo MoodSwipe, meka klavijatura koja predlaže tekstne poruke s obzirom na posebne emocije korisničkih podataka o pravom dijalogu. Cilj MoodSwipe je stvaranje prikladnog korisničkog interfejsa za uživanje u tehnologiji klasifikacije emocija i predlog teksta, a u is to vreme skupljanje označenih podataka automatski za razvoj naprednijih tehnologija. Dok korisnici izaberu MoodSwipe tastaturu, mogu pisati kao obièno, ali osetiti emocije koje su navedene svojim tekstom i primati predlog za svoju poruku kao korist. U MoodSwipeu, otkrivene emocije služe kao medij za predložene tekste, gde je posmatranje poslednjeg podsticaja da ispravi bivše. Vodimo nekoliko eksperimenata kako bi pokazali superiornost modela klasifikacije emocija obučenih na podacima dijaloga, i dalje da bismo proverili dobre emocije znakove važne su kontekste za predlog teksta.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy MoodSwipe, miękką klawiaturę sugerującą wiadomości tekstowe, biorąc pod uwagę emocje określone przez użytkownika z wykorzystaniem rzeczywistych danych dialogowych. Celem MoodSwipe jest stworzenie wygodnego interfejsu użytkownika, aby cieszyć się technologią klasyfikacji emocji i sugestii tekstowych, a jednocześnie automatycznie gromadzić etykietowane dane w celu opracowywania bardziej zaawansowanych technologii. Podczas gdy użytkownicy wybierają klawiaturę MoodSwipe, mogą pisać jak zwykle, ale wyczuwać emocje przekazywane przez ich tekst i otrzymywać sugestie dotyczące swojej wiadomości jako korzyść. W MoodSwipe wykryte emocje służą jako medium sugerowanych tekstów, gdzie oglądanie tych drugich jest motywacją do poprawienia tych pierwszych. Przeprowadzamy kilka eksperymentów, aby pokazać wyższość modeli klasyfikacji emocji trenowanych na danych dialogowych, a następnie weryfikować dobre wskazówki emocji są ważnym kontekstem sugestii tekstowej.', 'so': "MoodSwipe, qalabka qalabka saxda ah oo muuqata warqada qoraalka ah ee uu siiyo hissiyadaha uu isticmaalayo isticmaalka macluumaadka diyaarinta ah. Ujeedada MoodSwipe waa in la sameeyo Interfac u sahlan isticmaalaha si uu ugu raaxaysto teknolojiga fasixiga emotion iyo muuqashada qoraalka, isla waqtigaas in loo soo ururiyo data lab-lab si automatic ah oo loo horumariyo teknolojiyo ka horeeya. Inta isticmaalayaashu ay dooranayaan qoraalka qorraxda MoodSwipe, waxay u qori karaan sida caadiga ah, laakiin waxay garan karaan fikrada ay ku soo bandhigtay qoraalka, waxayna heli karaan talooyin faa'iido ah. Dalka MoodSwipe, xisaabta la heshay waxay u adeegtaa sida dhexe u ah qoraal la soo jeeday, meesha laga arko in qofka dambe ay tahay dhiirran in la hagaajiyo qofkii hore. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaamo badan si aan u tusno qaababka iskuulka hissiga oo lagu baray macluumaadka dialogeenka, waxaana sidoo kale si aan u xaqiijinno cudurada fikrada wanaagsanu ay muhiim u yihiin qoraalka laga soo jeedo.", 'no': 'Vi viser månadSwipe, ein måkt tastatur som foreslår tekstmeldingar gitt dei brukaraspesifiserte følelsene som brukar dei verkelege dialog data. Målet for MoodSwipe er å laga eit nyttig brukargrensesnitt for å bruka teknologien av emosjonsklassifikasjon og tekstforslag, og samtidig å samla merkelige data automatisk for å utvikla fleire avanserte teknologi. Mens brukarar vel MoodSwipe-tastaturet, kan dei skriva som vanleg, men føle følelsen som er konvertert av teksten sine og motta forslag for meldinga sine som nyttig. I MoodSwipe er dei oppdagane følelsene som medium for foreslått tekst, der å sjå dei siste er den stimulerende å korrigera dei tidlegare. Vi gjer fleire eksperimenter for å visa overhøgda av emosjonsklassifikasjonsmodulane som trengte på dialogvindauget, og framover for å kontrollere gode emosjonsmønsterer er viktig kontekst for tekstforslag.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar MoodSwipe, ett mjukt tangentbord som föreslår textmeddelanden med användarspecificerade känslor genom att använda den verkliga dialogdata. Syftet med MoodSwipe är att skapa ett bekvämt användargränssnitt för att njuta av tekniken för känsloklassificering och textförslag, och samtidigt samla in märkta data automatiskt för att utveckla mer avancerad teknik. Medan användarna väljer MoodSwipe-tangentbordet kan de skriva som vanligt men känna känslan som förmedlas av texten och få förslag på sitt meddelande som en fördel. I MoodSwipe fungerar de upptäckta känslorna som medium för föreslagna texter, där visning av det senare är incitamentet att korrigera det förra. Vi genomför flera experiment för att visa överlägsenheten hos de känsloklassificeringsmodeller som tränats på dialogdata, och vidare för att verifiera att goda känslosignaler är viktiga sammanhang för textförslag.', 'ta': 'நாம் சந்திரன்Swipe, a soft keyboard that suggests text messages given to the user- specified emotions using the real dialog data. நிலவுஸ்வீபின் இலக்கு உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் உரை பரிந்துரைகளின் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை அனுபவிக்க ஒரு சுலபமான பயனர் இடைமுகத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கு, அதே நேரத்தில பயனர்கள் நிலவை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் போது, அவர்கள் இயல்பான விசைப்பலகையை உள்ளிட முடியும், ஆனால் அவர்கள் உரையால் கொண்டுள்ள உணர்வு  நிலவில், கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு We conduct several experiments to show the superiority of the emotion classification models trained on the dialog data, and further to verify good emotion cues are important context for text suggestion.', 'ur': 'ہم موڈ کو پیش کریں گے، ایک نرم کیب ورڈ جو استعمال کرتا ہے کہ استعمال کے ذریعے استعمال کرتا ہے، استعمال کرتا ہے کہ استعمال کرتا ہے حقیقی диалог ڈیٹا. MoodSwipe کا مطلب یہ ہے کہ احساسات کلاسیفوں اور متکس پیشنهاد کے ٹیکنالوجی کے مزے فائدہ حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک مناسب کارساز انٹرنیفس بنانا ہے اور اس کے ساتھ زیادہ پیشرفت تکنولوجی کے لئے لابلیج ڈیٹا جمع کرنا ہے۔ While users select the MoodSwipe keyboard, they can type as usual but feel the emotion conveyed by their text and receive suggestions for their message as a benefit. چاندسوئیپ میں، پہلے لوگوں کی اصلاح کرنے کے لئے مشاهده ہوئے احساسات متوسط کے طور پر عمل کرتے ہیں، جہاں پچھلے کو دیکھنا ہے. ہم بہت سی آزمائش کرتے ہیں کہ ان احساسات کلاسیفوں کی موڈل کو دکھاتے ہیں جن کی تعلیم دی جاتی ہے، اور اچھی احساسات نشانیوں کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے متن پیشنهاد کے لئے اہم منظور ہیں.', 'si': 'Name MoodSwape ගේ ලක්ෂණය තමයි භාවිත විශේෂය සහ පාළුවන්ගේ තාක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂය සඳහා පාළුවන්ගේ තාක්ෂණය සැලසුම් කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ මූඩ්ස්විප් කීබෝර්ඩ් එක තෝරාගත්තොත්, ඔවුන්ට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ලියාගන්න පුළුවන් නමුත් ඔවුන් මූඩ්ස්විප් වල, හොයාගත්ත හැඟීම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙ අපි පරීක්ෂණ ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සංවාද දත්තේ පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන හැඟීමක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පෙන්වන්න.', 'uz': "Biz oynaSwipe, a soft keyboard which suggests text messages given by the user-specified emotions using the real dialog data. Oddiy Shvep maqsadi, emotion classification va matn imkoniyatlarining texnologiyani yaratish uchun juda yetarli foydalanuvchi interfeys yaratish uchun, va shu paytida ko'proq technologiy technologini tezlashtirish uchun lab-ketlik maʼlumotni avtomatik olish uchun. Foydalanuvchilar oynaSwipe keyboard, they can type as usual but feel the emotions submitted by their text and receive suggestions for their message as a benefit. OySwipe ichida, ko'rsatilgan hissiyalar ilhom'ilgan textlar uchun o'rtacha huddi, amba keyingi ko'rinishi esa oldingi o'zgarishga foydalanadi. Biz muloqat maʼlumotida o'rganilgan hissiyotning darajalashtirish modellarini ko'rsatish uchun bir necha imtiyozni bajaramiz, va yaxshi hissiyotlar xususiyatlarini tasdiqlash uchun matn talab qilish muhim context.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu MoonSwitpe, một bàn phím mềm gợi ý các thông điệp văn bản cung cấp các cảm xúc chỉ định người dùng sử dụng thông tin hộp thoại thật. Mục đích của MoonSwipe là tạo một giao diện tiện lợi cho người dùng để tận hưởng công nghệ phân loại cảm xúc và gợi ý văn bản, và đồng thời để thu thập dữ liệu dán nhãn tự động để phát triển các công nghệ tiên tiến hơn. Trong khi người dùng chọn bàn phím MoonSwipe, họ có thể gõ như thường lệ, nhưng cảm nhận cảm xúc được truyền bởi văn bản và nhận gợi ý cho thông điệp của họ như một lợi ích. In MoodSwipe, cảm xúc phát hiện phục vụ như một phương tiện cho các văn bản gợi ý, nơi xem nó là động cơ sửa chữa những bản cũ. Chúng tôi tiến hành nhiều thí nghiệm để thể hiện ưu việt của các mô hình phân tích cảm xúc được đào tạo trên dữ liệu hộp thoại, và thêm để xác minh những gợi ý cảm xúc tốt là quan trọng cho lời gợi ý văn bản.', 'bg': 'Представяме мека клавиатура, която предлага текстови съобщения предвид зададените от потребителя емоции, използвайки реалните диалогови данни. Целта на е да създаде удобен потребителски интерфейс, който да се наслади на технологията за класификация на емоциите и текстови предложения, и в същото време да събира етикетирани данни автоматично за разработване на по-съвременни технологии. Докато потребителите избират клавиатурата, те могат да пишат както обикновено, но да усетят емоцията, предавана от текста им и да получават предложения за съобщението си като предимство. В откритите емоции служат като среда за предложени текстове, където гледането на последните е стимул за коригиране на първите. Провеждаме няколко експеримента, за да покажем превъзходството на моделите за класификация на емоциите, обучени върху диалоговите данни, а също така да проверим дали добрите емоционални сигнали са важен контекст за текстово предложение.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer MoodSwipe, et blødt tastatur, der foreslår tekstbeskeder givet brugerdefinerede følelser ved hjælp af de reelle dialogdata. Formålet med MoodSwipe er at skabe en praktisk brugergrænseflade til at nyde teknologien for følelsesklassificering og tekstforslag, og samtidig indsamle mærkede data automatisk til udvikling af mere avancerede teknologier. Mens brugerne vælger MoodSwipe-tastaturet, kan de skrive som sædvanligt, men fornemme følelsen formidlet af deres tekst og modtage forslag til deres besked som en fordel. I MoodSwipe fungerer de opdagede følelser som medium for foreslåede tekster, hvor visning af sidstnævnte er incitamentet til at korrigere førstnævnte. Vi gennemfører flere eksperimenter for at vise overlegenheden af de følelsesklassificeringsmodeller, der er trænet på dialogdata, og yderligere for at verificere gode følelsescertifikater er vigtige kontekster for tekstforslag.', 'nl': 'We presenteren MoodSwipe, een zacht toetsenbord dat tekstberichten suggereert gezien de door de gebruiker opgegeven emoties met behulp van de echte dialooggegevens. Het doel van MoodSwipe is om een handige gebruikersinterface te creëren om te genieten van de technologie van emotieclassificatie en tekstsuggestie, en tegelijkertijd gelabelde gegevens automatisch te verzamelen voor het ontwikkelen van meer geavanceerde technologieën. Terwijl gebruikers het MoodSwipe-toetsenbord selecteren, kunnen ze zoals gewoonlijk typen, maar voelen de emotie die door hun tekst wordt overgebracht en ontvangen ze suggesties voor hun bericht als voordeel. In MoodSwipe dienen de gedetecteerde emoties als medium voor voorgestelde teksten, waarbij het bekijken van de laatste de stimulans is om de eerste te corrigeren. We voeren verschillende experimenten uit om de superioriteit van de emotieclassificatiemodellen aan te tonen die getraind zijn op de dialooggegevens, en verder om te verifiëren dat goede emotiecues belangrijke context zijn voor tekstsuggestie.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren MoodSwipe, eine Softtastatur, die Textnachrichten unter Berücksichtigung der benutzerdefinierten Emotionen unter Verwendung der realen Dialogdaten vorschlägt. Das Ziel von MoodSwipe ist es, eine bequeme Benutzeroberfläche zu schaffen, um die Technologie der Emotionsklassifizierung und Textvorschläge zu genießen und gleichzeitig beschriftete Daten automatisch für die Entwicklung fortschrittlicher Technologien zu sammeln. Während Benutzer die MoodSwipe-Tastatur auswählen, können sie wie gewohnt tippen, spüren aber die Emotion, die durch ihren Text vermittelt wird, und erhalten Vorschläge für ihre Nachricht als Vorteil. In MoodSwipe dienen die erkannten Emotionen als Medium für vorgeschlagene Texte, wobei das Betrachten letzterer der Anreiz ist, erstere zu korrigieren. Wir führen mehrere Experimente durch, um die Überlegenheit der auf den Dialogdaten trainierten Emotionsklassifizierungsmodelle zu zeigen und weiter zu verifizieren, dass gute Emotionshinweise ein wichtiger Kontext für Textvorschläge sind.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan MoodSwipe, papan kekunci lembut yang menyarankan pesan teks yang diberikan emosi yang ditentukan oleh pengguna menggunakan data dialog nyata. Tujuan MoodSwipe adalah menciptakan antaramuka pengguna yang nyaman untuk menikmati teknologi klasifikasi emosi dan saran teks, dan pada saat yang sama untuk mengumpulkan data labeled secara otomatis untuk mengembangkan teknologi yang lebih maju. Sementara pengguna memilih papan kekunci MoodSwipe, mereka dapat mengetik seperti biasa tetapi merasakan emosi yang disampaikan oleh teks mereka dan menerima saran untuk pesan mereka sebagai manfaat. In MoodSwipe, the detected emotions serve as the medium for suggested texts, where viewing the latter is the incentive to correcting the former.  Kami melakukan beberapa eksperimen untuk menunjukkan ketinggalan dari model klasifikasi emosi yang dilatih pada data dialog, dan lebih lanjut untuk memverifikasi tanda emosi yang baik adalah konteks penting untuk saran teks.', 'ko': '우리는 실제 대화 데이터를 이용하여 사용자가 지정한 정서에 따라 텍스트 메시지를 제시하는 소프트 키보드를 소개했다.Moodsweep의 목표는 편리한 사용자 인터페이스를 만들어 감정 분류와 텍스트 제안 기술을 누리는 동시에 표기 데이터를 자동으로 수집하여 더욱 선진적인 기술을 개발하는 것이다.사용자가 Moodsweep 키보드를 선택할 때, 그들은 평소와 같이 타자를 칠 수 있지만, 텍스트가 전달하는 감정을 느낄 수 있고, 그 중에서 정보를 얻을 수 있다.Moodsweep에서 검출된 정서는 조언 텍스트의 매개체가 되고 후자를 보는 것은 전자를 바로잡는 동기이다.우리는 몇 가지 실험을 통해 대화 데이터 훈련을 바탕으로 하는 감정 분류 모델의 우월성을 증명하고 양호한 감정 단서가 텍스트 암시의 중요한 상하문임을 검증했다.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha MoodSwipe, klabu nyepesi ambalo linapendekeza ujumbe wa maandishi uliotolewa na hisia zinazoonyesha watumiaji kwa kutumia data halisi za mazungumzo. Lengo la MoodSwipe ni kutengeneza sura ya mtumiaji rahisi ya kufurahia teknolojia ya kutangaza hisia na pendekezo la maandishi, na wakati huo huo ili kukusanya taarifa zinazoonyesha kwa ajili ya kutengeneza teknolojia bora zaidi. Wakati watumiaji wanachagua keyboard ya mwezi mwezi, wanaweza kuandika kama kawaida lakini wanaeleza hisia zilizotumiwa na ujumbe wao na kupokea mapendekezo kwa ajili ya ujumbe wao kama faida. Nchini MoodSwipe, hisia zinazogunduliwa zinatumika kama katikati ya maandishi yanayopendekezwa, ambapo kuangalia mwisho ni hamasa ya kurekebisha wale wa zamani. Tunafanya majaribio kadhaa ili kuonyesha ubora wa mifano ya usawa wa hisia zilizofundishwa kwenye data za mazungumzo, na pia ili kuthibitisha matukio mema ya hisia ni muktadha muhimu kwa pendekezo la maandishi.', 'tr': "Biz MoodSwipe, iň ýuwaş klavyjy üçin ullanýan metin mesajlary üýtgedýäris. MoodSwipe'iň maksady duýgym klasifikasyýasy we metin maslahatlarynyň teknolojisini gowy görkezmek üçin ýeterli ulançylar interface düzenlemekdir we şol wagtda etiket edilen maglumatlary awtomatik ösümli teknolojiler gelişmek üçin ýygnamak. Ullançylar MoodSwipe klavyny saýlaryp bilerler, olar adatça ýazmak bilerler ýöne metin tarapyndan geçirilen duýgyny duýup bilerler we mesajlary üçin bir fayda alyp bilerler. Kuzey aýynda, tanyş duýgular öňki metinleri düzeltmek üçin orta hökmünde alýarlar. Biz duýgularyň klasifikasyýa nusgalarynyň üstünligini dijalog maglumatynda bilim beren ýagdaýyny görkezmek üçin birnäçe deneyler etdik we gowy duýgularyň hatlaryny barlamak üçin metin maslahat üçin wajyp konteksidir.", 'af': "Ons stel MoodSwipe,  'n sagte sleutelbord wat voorstel teks boodskappe gegee het die gebruiker- spesifiseerde emosies wat die regte dialoog data gebruik word. Die doel van MoodSwipe is om 'n goeie gebruikerkoppelvlak te skep om die teknologie van emosie klassifikasie en teks voorstel te hê, en op dieselfde tyd om die etiketeerde data outomaties te samel vir meer gevorderde teknologies te ontwikkel. Terwyl gebruikers die MoodSwipe sleutelbord kies, kan hulle tipe as gewoonlik maar voel die emosie wat deur hul teks verbind is en ontvang voorstellings vir hul boodskap as 'n voordeel. In MoodSwipe, die gevinde emosies dien as die medium vir voorgestelde teks, waar die laaste sien is die insensief om die vorige te korrigeer. Ons het verskeie eksperimente gedoen om die hoogheid van die emosie klassifikasie modele te wys wat op die dialoog data geleer is, en verder om goeie emosie tekens te bevestig is belangrik konteks vir teks voorstel.", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë MoodSwipe, një tastierë e butë që sugjeron mesazhe teksti duke dhënë emocionet e specifikuara nga përdoruesi duke përdorur të dhënat e dialogut të vërtetë. Qëllimi i MoodSwipe është të krijojë një interfaqe të përshtatshme përdorues për të kënaqur me teknologjinë e klasifikimit të emocioneve dhe sugjerimit të tekstit dhe në të njëjtën kohë për të mbledhur automatikisht të dhënat e etiketuara për zhvillimin e teknologjive më të avancuara. Ndërsa përdoruesit zgjedhin tastierën MoodSwipe, ata mund të shkruajnë si zakonisht por të ndjejnë emocionet e transmetuara nga teksti i tyre dhe të marrin sugjerime për mesazhin e tyre si përfitim. Në MoodSwipe, emocionet e zbuluara shërbejnë si mjet për tekstet e sugjeruara, ku shikimi i të fundit është nxitja për korrektimin e të parëve. Ne kryejmë disa eksperimente për të treguar superioritetin e modeleve të klasifikimit të emocioneve të stërvitur në të dhënat e dialogut dhe më tej për të verifikuar shenjat e mira të emocioneve janë kontekst i rëndësishëm për sugjerimin e tekstit.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo MoodSwipe, meka klavijatura koja predlaže tekstne poruke s obzirom na izražene emocije korištenja pravih podataka o dijalogu. Cilj MoodSwipe je stvoriti prikladnu korisničku interfejsu kako bi uživali u tehnologiji klasifikacije emocija i predloga teksta te istovremeno skupljali označene podatke automatski za razvoj naprednijih tehnologija. Dok korisnici odaberu MoodSwipe tastaturu, mogu pisati kao obično, ali osjetiti emocije koje su navedene svojim tekstom i primati prijedloge za svoju poruku kao korist. U MoodSwipe, otkrivene emocije služe kao medij za predložene tekste, gdje je posmatranje posljednjih podsticaja za ispravu bivših. Provodimo nekoliko eksperimenata kako bi pokazali superiornost modela klasifikacije emocija obučenih na podacima dijaloga, a dalje da bismo proverili dobre emocije znakove važne su kontekste za predlog teksta.', 'am': 'ጨረቃSwipe, a soft keyboard that suggests text messages given to the user-specified emotions using the real dialog data. የጨረቃዊ ስብሰባ መግለጫ እና የጽሑፍ ጉዳይ የስብሰባ መፍታት እና የጽሑፍ ጥያቄን ለመቀበል የተሻለ ተጠቃሚው የኢንተርኔት ማቀናጃ ነው፡፡ ጠቃሚ ጨረቃውን ሲመረጡ እነርሱ ይችላል እንደ አስቀድሞ ነገር ግን እውቀት በጽሑፉ የተደረገውን እውቀት እና ለመልእክታቸው ምክንያቶችን ለመጠቀም ይቀበላሉ፡፡ በጨረቃዊ ስብሰባ፣ የተገኘው እውቀት የፊተኛውን ለማስተካከል የመካከለኛ ጽሑፎችን እንደሚያገለግል ነው፡፡ በጥያቄ ዳታዎችን ያስተማሩ የስሜት መፍትሄ ምሳሌዎችን ለማሳየት ብዙ ፈተናዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք "ՄուդՍվիփ"-ը, մի փափուկ ստեղնաշար, որը առաջարկում է տեքստի հաղորդագրություններ, հաշվի առնելով օգտագործողի կողմից նշված զգացմունքները՝ օգտագործելով իրական ՄուդՇվեյփի նպատակն է ստեղծել հարմար օգտագործողի ինտերֆեյսը, որպեսզի հաճույք ստանանք զգացմունքների դասակարգման և տեքստի առաջարկումների տեխնոլոգիայից, և միաժամանակ ավտոմատ հավաքել պիտակուցված տվյալներ ավելի զա While users select the MoodSwipe keyboard, they can type as usual but sense the emotion conveyed by their text and receive suggestions for their message as a benefit.  Մուդսվիփի մեջ հայտնաբերված զգացմունքները ծառայում են որպես միջոց առաջարկած տեքստների համար, որտեղ վերջիններին դիտելը դրդապատճառ է առաջարկած տեքստի ուղղելու համար: Մենք մի քանի փորձարկումներ ենք կատարում, որպեսզի ցույց տանք էմոցիոնալ դասակարգման մոդելների գերազանցությունը, որոնք պատրաստված են դասախոսության տվյալների վրա, և ավելի շատ լավ էմոցիոնալ նշանների ստուգելու համար տեքստի առաջարկու', 'az': "Biz MoodSwipe, bir yumuşaq klavyə göstəririk ki, istifadəçi təyin edilmiş hissələrə verilən mətn ismarışlarını təbliğ edir. MoodSwipe'in məqsədi, emosyon klasifikasiyasının və metin təsirlərinin teknolojisinin faydalanması üçün faydalanması üçün istifadəçi интерфейсini yaratmaq və həmçinin daha gelişmiş teknolojilər üçün etiketli məlumatları avtomatik olaraq toplamaq. İstifadəçilər MoodSwipe klavyəsini seçərkən, onlar hərəkətli olaraq yaza bilərlər, lakin məktubları ilə bildirilən emosiyaları hiss edə bilərlər və məktubları fayda olaraq təklif edə bilərlər. MoodSwipe-də, keşfedilmiş duygular təbliğ edilmiş mətnlər üçün ortam kimi istifadə edirlər, sonuncu görmək əvvəlkiləri düzəltmək üçün təsirdir. Biz bir neçə təcrübə edirik ki, düzgün məlumatlar üzərində təhsil edilmiş emosyon klasifikasyonu modellerinin üstünlüyünü göstərək, yaxşı emosyon məlumatlarını təsdiqləmək üçün məlumat təsiri üçün mövcuddur.", 'fa': 'ما MoodSwipe را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک کلید نرم که پیغام متن را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که احساسات مشخص شده به کاربر با استفاده از داده\u200cهای محاورۀ واقعی استفاده می\u200cکند. هدف MoodSwipe این است که یک ارتباط کاربر مناسب برای لذت ببرند از تکنولوژی فرهنگ احساسات و پیشنهاد متن، و همزمان برای جمع کردن داده\u200cهای برچسب\u200cشده به طور خودکار برای توسعه تکنولوژی\u200cهای پیشرفته\u200cتر از آن استفاده کند. در حالی که کاربران کلید MoodSwipe را انتخاب می کنند، می توانند به عنوان معمولی نوشته کنند ولی احساسات که با متن خودشان ارائه شده و پیشنهاد برای پیغام خود را به عنوان سودی دریافت کنند. در MoodSwipe، احساسات شناسایی به عنوان رسانه برای متن پیشنهاد خدمت می\u200cکنند، جایی که دیدن آن\u200cها به اصلاح سابق ترتیب می\u200cدهد. ما چندتا آزمایش را انجام می دهیم تا بزرگترین مدلهای مختصات احساسات را نشان دهیم که روی داده های محاورش آموزش یافته شده است، و بیشتر برای تصدیق کردن نشانه های احساسات خوب محیط مهم برای پیشنهاد متن است.', 'ca': "Presentam MoodSwipe, un teclat suau que suggereix missatges de text dadas les emocions especificades per l'usuari utilitzant les dades del diàleg real. L'objectiu de MoodSwipe és crear una interfície d'usuari convenient per gaudir de la tecnologia de classificació emocional i suggerició de text, i al mateix temps recollir dades etiquetades automàticament per desenvolupar tecnologies més avançades. Mentre que els usuaris seleccionen el teclat MoodSwipe, poden escriure com sempre però sentir l'emoció transmitida pel seu text i rebre suggericions per al seu missatge com a benefici. A MoodSwipe, les emocions detectades serveixen de medi per a els textos suggerits, on veure aquests últims és l'incentiu a corregir els primers. Fem varis experiments per mostrar la superioritat dels models de classificació emocional entrenats en les dades del diàleg, i més per verificar bones indicacions emocionals són un context important per a suggerir text.", 'cs': 'Představujeme MoodSwipe, měkkou klávesnici, která navrhuje textové zprávy vzhledem k uživatelským emocím s využitím reálných dialogových dat. Cílem MoodSwipe je vytvořit pohodlné uživatelské rozhraní, které si užívá technologie klasifikace emocí a textové návrhy, a současně automaticky shromažďovat označená data pro vývoj pokročilejších technologií. Zatímco uživatelé vybírají klávesnici MoodSwipe, mohou psát jako obvykle, ale cítit emoce přenášené textem a dostávat návrhy na jejich zprávu jako výhodu. V MoodSwipe slouží detekované emoce jako médium pro navrhované texty, kde prohlížení druhého je motivací k opravě prvního. Provádíme několik experimentů, abychom ukázali nadřazenost modelů klasifikace emocí trénovaných na dialogových datech a dále ověřili, že dobré emoční signály jsou důležitým kontextem pro návrh textu.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo MoodSwipe, meka klavijatura koja predlaže tekstne poruke s obzirom na izražene emocije korisničke podatke o pravom dijalogu. Cilj MoodSwipe je stvaranje prikladnog korisničkog interfejsa za uživanje u tehnologiji klasifikacije emocija i predlog teksta, a u is to vrijeme skupljanje označenih podataka automatski za razvoj naprednijih tehnologija. Dok korisnici izaberu MoodSwipe tastaturu, mogu pisati kao obično, ali osjetiti emocije koje su navedene svojim tekstom i primati predloge za svoju poruku kao korist. U MoodSwipe, otkrivene emocije služe kao medij za predložene tekste, gdje je posmatranje poslednjih podsticaja za ispravu bivših. Provodimo nekoliko eksperimenata kako bi pokazali superiornost modela klasifikacije emocija obučenih na podacima dijaloga, a dalje da bi proverili dobre emocije znakove su važni kontekst za predlog teksta.', 'bn': 'আমরা চাঁদের উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি সফটক কীবোর্ড যার পরামর্শ প্রদান করে যে ব্যবহারকারী নির্দিষ্ট অনুভূতি ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বাস্তব ড মুডসুইপের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে আবেগ গ্রাহক এবং লেখা পরামর্শের প্রযুক্তি উপভোগ করার জন্য একটি সুবিধা ব্যবহারকারী ইন্টারফেস তৈরি করার জন্য এবং একই সময়ে লেবেলেড ড ডাটা  যখন ব্যবহারকারীরা চাঁদ সুইপ কীবোর্ড নির্বাচন করে, তখন তারা স্বাভাবিক ভাবে টাইপ করতে পারে, কিন্তু তাদের লেখা দ্বারা প্রকাশিত অন In MoodSwipe, the detected emotions serve as the medium for suggested texts, where viewing the latter is the incentive to correcting the former.  আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি পরীক্ষা করছি যাতে এই ডায়ালগের তথ্যে প্রশিক্ষিত অনুভূতিগুলোর শ্রেষ্ঠত্বের মাধ্যমে অনুভূতি প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, আরো ভালো আবেগ', 'et': "Esitleme MoodSwipe'i, pehmet klaviatuuri, mis soovitab tekstisõnumeid, arvestades kasutaja määratud emotsioone, kasutades reaalseid dialoogiandmeid. MoodSwipe eesmärk on luua mugav kasutajaliides emotsioonide klassifitseerimise ja tekstisoovituste tehnoloogia nautimiseks ning samal ajal koguda märgistatud andmeid automaatselt arenenumate tehnoloogiate arendamiseks. Kui kasutajad valivad MoodSwipe klaviatuuri, saavad nad tippida nagu tavaliselt, kuid tajuda oma teksti edastatavat emotsiooni ja saada soovitusi oma sõnumi kohta. MoodSwipe'is on tuvastatud emotsioonid soovitatud tekstide vahendiks, kus viimase vaatamine on stiimul esimese parandamiseks. Teostame mitmeid eksperimente, et näidata dialoogiandmetel koolitatud emotsioonide klassifitseerimise mudelite paremust ning veelgi kinnitada, et head emotsioonilised vihjed on olulised tekstisoovituste kontekstid.", 'fi': 'Esittelemme MoodSwipe, pehmeä näppäimistö, joka ehdottaa tekstiviestejä käyttäjän määrittämien tunteiden perusteella käyttäen todellisia dialogitietoja. MoodSwipen tavoitteena on luoda kätevä käyttöliittymä tunteiden luokittelun ja tekstiehdotusten teknologiasta nauttimiseen ja samalla kerätä automaattisesti merkittyjä tietoja kehittyneempien teknologioiden kehittämiseksi. Kun käyttäjät valitsevat MoodSwipe-näppäimistön, he voivat kirjoittaa tavalliseen tapaan, mutta aistia tekstin välittämän tunteen ja vastaanottaa ehdotuksia viestilleen eduksi. MoodSwipessä havaitut tunteet toimivat ehdotettujen tekstien välineenä, jossa jälkimmäisten katselu kannustaa korjaamaan niitä. Teemme useita kokeita osoittaaksemme dialogitietoihin koulutettujen tunteiden luokittelumallien paremmuuden ja vahvistaaksemme, että hyvät tunteet ovat tärkeä konteksti tekstiehdotukselle.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe Monggo, akeh basa sing luwih dumaten kanggo ngerasai perusahaan langgambar barang seneng pisan seneng pisan gagal Awal sing koyo Monday politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness In Kilung Awak dhéwé éntuk gak dhéwé éntuk kanggo ngerasai kapan ning model sing larang awak dhéwé, ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé, lan nganggep nggunakake sistem sing apik dhéwé, sing uwis seneng sak informasi sing luwih kanggo ngerasai tèks.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam MoodSwipe, mehko tipkovnico, ki predlaga besedilna sporočila glede na uporabnikovo določena čustva, ki uporabljajo resnične podatke v pogovornem oknu. Namen MoodSwipe je ustvariti priročen uporabniški vmesnik za uživanje v tehnologiji klasifikacije čustev in besedilnih predlogov ter hkrati samodejno zbiranje označenih podatkov za razvoj naprednejših tehnologij. Medtem ko uporabniki izberejo tipkovnico MoodSwipe, lahko tipkajo kot običajno, vendar zaznajo čustva, ki jih prenaša besedilo, in prejmejo predloge za svoje sporočilo kot korist. V MoodSwipe zaznana čustva služijo kot medij za predlagana besedila, pri čemer je gledanje slednjega spodbuda za popravljanje prvega. Izvedli smo več eksperimentov, da bi pokazali superiornost modelov klasifikacije čustev, usposobljenih na podlagi dialognih podatkov, in nadalje preverili, da so dobri čustveni namigi pomemben kontekst za besedilno predlaganje.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da watã Yaaimin watã Sãshe ne ya ƙiƙira wani interfaci mai daidai wa mai amfani da shi dõmin ya yarda da technical mai classified hisãbi da shawarar matsayi, kuma a lokacin da za'a sami data da aka rubũta shi farat ɗaya dõmin ya buɗe technical masu ƙaranci. Waka da mãsu amfani da shi ke zãɓi kallon watã In MoodSwipe, the detected emotions serve as the medium for suggested texts, where viewing the latter is the incentive to correcting the former.  Munã aikin jarrabo masu yawa dõmin Mu nũna masu ƙaranci ga misãlai na tsari na hisani wanda aka sanar da shi a kan zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayanin, kuma don a ƙara bayani don ka gaskata kyauta masu kyauta mai kyau wa zauren akwatin matsayin.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים MoodSwipe, מקלדת רכה שמצייעה הודעות טקסט בהתחשב ברגשות המסופרות על המשתמש שמשתמשים במידע הדיולוג האמיתי. המטרה של MoodSwipe היא ליצור ממשק משתמש נוח כדי ליהנות מהטכנולוגיה של מסווג רגשות וההצעה טקסטית, ובאותו הזמן לאסוף נתונים מסומנים באופן אוטומטי לפיתוח טכנולוגיות מתקדמות יותר. בעוד משתמשים בוחרים את מקלדת MoodSwipe, הם יכולים לטyp כרגיל, אבל לחוש את הרגשות שנעברו על ידי הטקסט שלהם ולקבל הצעות למסר שלהם כתועלת. במודסוויפ, הרגשות המוגלות משתמשות בתור המדיום לטקסטים המוציעים, שבו צפייה באחרונה היא המניע לתקן את הקודם. אנו מבצעים מספר ניסויים כדי להראות את העליון של מודלים מסווג הרגשות מאומנים על נתוני הדיולוגים, ולמעבר לאמת סימני רגשות טובים הם הקשר חשוב להצעה טקסטית.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་MoodSwipe, a soft keyboard that suggests text messages given to the user-specified emotions utilizing the real dialog data. The aim of MoodSwipe is to create a convenient user interface to enjoy the technology of emotion classification and text suggestion, and at the same time to collect labeled data automatically for developing more advanced technologies. སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་MoodSwipe འཐེབ་གཞུང་འདེམས་པ་དང་དེ་དག་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་ནའང་། སེམས་ཚོར་ཡིག་གེ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་འཕྲིན་དོན་ལ་རང་ག MoodSwipe ནང་དུ་བསམ་ཡོད་པའི་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱིས་འཇིག་རྟེན་ནས་བསམ་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་ཚིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་སྒེར་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་སྟོན་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་མཐོ་རིམ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ར'}
{'en': 'HeidelPlace : An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'ar': 'HeidelPlace: إطار عمل ممتد للتوسع الجغرافي', 'pt': 'HeidelPlace: uma estrutura extensível para análise geográfica', 'fr': 'HeidelPlace\xa0: un cadre extensible pour le géoparsing', 'es': 'HeidelPlace: un marco extensible para geoanálisis', 'ja': 'HeidelPlace:ジオパーシングのための拡張可能なフレームワーク', 'zh': 'HeidelPlace:地理分析以广框架', 'ru': 'HeidelPlace: Расширяемый каркас для геопарсинга', 'hi': 'HeidelPlace: Geoparsing के लिए एक एक्सटेंसिबल फ्रेमवर्क', 'ga': 'HeidelPlace: Creat Inmheánach le haghaidh Geoparsáil', 'el': 'Ένα επεκτάσιμο πλαίσιο για τη γεωανάλυση', 'hu': 'HeidelPlace: A kiterjeszthető keretrendszer a geoparsing számára', 'kk': 'Биіктік орны: Географиялау үшін кеңейтілген фреймдер', 'it': 'HeidelPlace: un framework estensibile per la geoanalisi', 'lt': 'HeidelPlace: platus geoanalizavimo pagrindas', 'ml': 'ഹീഡല്\u200dPlace: A Extensible Frame work for Geoparsing', 'ms': 'HeidelPlace: Sebuah Bingkai Sambungan untuk Geoparsing', 'mk': 'HeidelPlace: Проширена рамка за геоперација', 'mt': 'HeidelPlace: Qafas Estensibbli għall-Ġeoparizzazzjoni', 'mn': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'no': 'Høgdplass: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'ka': 'HeidelPlace: A Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'pl': 'HeidelPlace: Rozszerzalne ramy geoparsowania', 'sr': 'HeidelPlace: Prošireni okvir za geoparsing', 'ro': 'HeidelPlace: Un cadru extensibil pentru Geoparsing', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'ta': 'HeidelPlace: A Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'sv': 'HeidelPlace: En utbyggbar ram för Geoparsing', 'ur': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'uz': 'Place: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'vi': 'Trang rộng rãi cho trang web', 'bg': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'da': 'HeidelPlace: En udvidelig ramme for Geoparsing', 'hr': 'HeidelPlace: Prošireni okvir za Geoparsing', 'nl': 'HeidelPlace: Een uitbreidbaar framework voor geoparsing', 'id': 'HeidelPlace: Sebuah Framework yang Lanjutkan untuk Geoparsing', 'de': 'HeidelPlace: Ein erweiterbares Framework für Geoparsing', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'HeidelPlace: Mpango wa Kueneza kwa ajili ya Geoparsing', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Beýik', 'am': 'Place: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'sq': 'HeidelPlace: Një kuadër i zgjeruar për Geoparsing', 'hy': 'HeiDelPlaceComment', 'ko': 'HeidelPlace: 확장 가능한 지질 탐사 프레임워크', 'az': 'Y칲ks톛k Yer: Geoparsing 칲칞칲n 쿮lav톛 Et', 'bs': 'HeidelPlace: Prošireni okvir za Geoparsing', 'bn': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'ca': 'HeidelPlace: Un marc extensible per a geoanalitzar', 'fi': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'cs': 'HeidelPlace: Rozšířitelný rámec pro geoparsing', 'et': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'HeidelPlace: מסגר רחב לגיאופרסינג', 'sk': 'HeidelPlace: Razširljiv okvir za geoparsing', 'ha': 'Place: An Extent Frame for Geoparsing', 'bo': 'HeidelPlace: An Extensible Framework for Geoparsing'}
{'en': 'Geographic information extraction from textual data sources, called geoparsing, is a key task in text processing and central to subsequent spatial analysis approaches. Several geoparsers are available that support this task, each with its own (often limited or specialized) gazetteer and its own approaches to toponym detection and resolution. In this demonstration paper, we present HeidelPlace, an extensible framework in support of geoparsing. Key features of HeidelPlace include a generic gazetteer model that supports the integration of place information from different knowledge bases, and a pipeline approach that enables an effective combination of diverse modules tailored to specific geoparsing tasks. This makes HeidelPlace a valuable tool for testing and evaluating different gazetteer sources and geoparsing methods. In the demonstration, we show how to set up a geoparsing workflow with HeidelPlace and how it can be used to compare and consolidate the output of different geoparsing approaches.', 'ar': 'يُعد استخراج المعلومات الجغرافية من مصادر البيانات النصية ، والذي يُطلق عليه التحليل الجغرافي ، مهمة أساسية في معالجة النصوص ومركزيًا في مناهج التحليل المكاني اللاحقة. يتوفر العديد من الجغرافيين الذين يدعمون هذه المهمة ، ولكل منهم معجمه الخاص (غالبًا ما يكون محدودًا أو متخصصًا) وطرقه الخاصة لاكتشاف أسماء المواقع الجغرافية وحلها. في هذه الورقة التوضيحية ، نقدم HeidelPlace ، وهو إطار عمل قابل للتوسيع لدعم الاستكشاف الجغرافي. تشتمل الميزات الرئيسية لـ HeidelPlace على نموذج معجم جغرافي عام يدعم تكامل معلومات المكان من قواعد المعرفة المختلفة ، ونهج خط الأنابيب الذي يتيح مزيجًا فعالًا من الوحدات المتنوعة المصممة خصيصًا لمهام تحديد المواقع الجغرافية. وهذا يجعل من HeidelPlace أداة قيّمة لاختبار وتقييم مصادر معجم جغرافي وطرق جغرافية مختلفة. في العرض التوضيحي ، نوضح كيفية إعداد سير عمل التوزيع الجغرافي باستخدام HeidelPlace وكيف يمكن استخدامه لمقارنة مخرجات أساليب التوزيع الجغرافي المختلفة ودمجها.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'informations géographiques à partir de sources de données textuelles, appelée géoanalyse, est une tâche clé dans le traitement de texte et au cœur des approches d'analyse spatiale ultérieures. Plusieurs géoparseurs sont disponibles pour prendre en charge cette tâche, chacun ayant son propre répertoire géographique (souvent limité ou spécialisé) et ses propres approches de détection et de résolution des toponymes. Dans ce document de démonstration, nous présentons HeidelPlace, un framework extensible prenant en charge le géoparsing. Les principales caractéristiques de HeidelPlace comprennent un modèle de répertoire géographique générique qui prend en charge l'intégration des informations de lieu provenant de différentes bases de connaissances, et une approche par pipeline qui permet une combinaison efficace de divers modules adaptés à des tâches de géoanalyse spécifiques. Cela fait de HeidelPlace un outil précieux pour tester et évaluer différentes sources de répertoire géographique et méthodes de géoanalyse. Dans la démonstration, nous montrons comment configurer un flux de travail de géoanalyse avec HeidelPlace et comment il peut être utilisé pour comparer et consolider le résultat de différentes approches de géoanalyse.", 'es': 'La extracción de información geográfica de fuentes de datos textuales, denominada geoanálisis, es una tarea clave en el procesamiento de textos y fundamental para los enfoques de análisis espacial posteriores. Hay varios geoanalizadores disponibles que apoyan esta tarea, cada uno con su propio diccionario geográfico (a menudo limitado o especializado) y sus propios enfoques para la detección y resolución de topónimos. En este documento de demostración, presentamos HeidelPlace, un marco extensible en apoyo del geoanálisis. Las características clave de HeidelPlace incluyen un modelo genérico de diccionario geográfico que admite la integración de información de lugares de diferentes bases de conocimiento, y un enfoque de canalización que permite una combinación eficaz de diversos módulos adaptados a tareas específicas de geoanálisis. Esto convierte a HeidelPlace en una herramienta valiosa para probar y evaluar diferentes fuentes de diccionarios geográficos y métodos de geoanálisis. En la demostración, mostramos cómo configurar un flujo de trabajo de geoanálisis con HeidelPlace y cómo se puede utilizar para comparar y consolidar el resultado de diferentes enfoques de geoanálisis.', 'pt': 'A extração de informações geográficas de fontes de dados textuais, chamada geoparsing, é uma tarefa fundamental no processamento de texto e central para abordagens de análise espacial subsequentes. Vários geoparsers estão disponíveis para dar suporte a essa tarefa, cada um com seu próprio dicionário geográfico (geralmente limitado ou especializado) e suas próprias abordagens para detecção e resolução de topônimos. Neste artigo de demonstração, apresentamos o HeidelPlace, uma estrutura extensível de suporte à análise geográfica. Os principais recursos do HeidelPlace incluem um modelo genérico de dicionário geográfico que suporta a integração de informações de locais de diferentes bases de conhecimento e uma abordagem de pipeline que permite uma combinação eficaz de diversos módulos adaptados a tarefas específicas de geoanálise. Isso torna o HeidelPlace uma ferramenta valiosa para testar e avaliar diferentes fontes do dicionário geográfico e métodos de análise geográfica. Na demonstração, mostramos como configurar um fluxo de trabalho de análise geográfica com o HeidelPlace e como ele pode ser usado para comparar e consolidar a saída de diferentes abordagens de análise geográfica.', 'ja': 'ジオパーシングと呼ばれるテキストデータソースからの地理情報抽出は、テキスト処理における重要なタスクであり、その後の空間分析アプローチの中心となる。 このタスクをサポートするジオパーサはいくつか用意されており、それぞれに独自の（しばしば限定的または専門的な）地名辞書と、地名の検出と解決への独自のアプローチがあります。 このデモ論文では、ジオパーシングをサポートする拡張可能なフレームワークであるHeidelPlaceを提示します。 HeidelPlaceの主要な機能には、さまざまなナレッジベースからの場所情報の統合をサポートする一般的な地名辞典モデルと、特定の地理解析タスクに合わせた多様なモジュールの効果的な組み合わせを可能にするパイプラインアプローチがあります。 これにより、HeidelPlaceはさまざまな地名辞典ソースと地理解析方法をテストおよび評価するための貴重なツールとなります。 このデモでは、HeidelPlaceでジオパーシングワークフローを設定する方法と、さまざまなジオパーシングアプローチの出力を比較して統合する方法を示します。', 'zh': '取诸文本数据源地理信息(谓之地理分析)文本之一机,亦续空分析方法之核心也。 有数地理分析器赞其事,每地名词典皆有之(常有限专)地名词典,及己地名检测解析法。 于本演文,介于HeidelPlace,是一赞地理分析之可广框架。 HeidelPlace之要,包一通之地名词典,合一知识库之信,与一管之法,合特定地理分析任量身制诸模块。 此使HeidelPlace为试质异名词典原地理分析法之宝器也。 示之以 HeidelPlace ,设之以地理分析流,比之以整合分析方法之。', 'ru': 'Извлечение географической информации из текстовых источников данных, называемое геопарсингом, является ключевой задачей в обработке текста и занимает центральное место в последующих подходах к пространственному анализу. Имеется несколько геопарсеров, которые поддерживают эту задачу, каждый из которых имеет свой собственный (часто ограниченный или специализированный) справочник географических названий и свои собственные подходы к обнаружению и разрешению топонима. В этом демонстрационном документе мы представляем HeidelPlace, расширяемую структуру в поддержку геопарсинга. Ключевые особенности HeidelPlace включают в себя общую модель справочника, которая поддерживает интеграцию информации о месте из различных баз знаний, и подход к конвейеру, который позволяет эффективно сочетать различные модули, адаптированные к конкретным задачам геопарсинга. Это делает HeidelPlace ценным инструментом для тестирования и оценки различных источников справочников и методов геопарсинга. В демонстрации мы покажем, как настроить рабочий процесс геопарсинга с помощью HeidelPlace и как его можно использовать для сравнения и консолидации результатов различных подходов к геопарсингу.', 'hi': 'पाठ्य डेटा स्रोतों से भौगोलिक जानकारी निष्कर्षण, जिसे जियोपार्सिंग कहा जाता है, पाठ प्रसंस्करण में एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है और बाद के स्थानिक विश्लेषण दृष्टिकोणों के लिए केंद्रीय है। कई geoparsers उपलब्ध हैं जो इस कार्य का समर्थन करते हैं, प्रत्येक अपने स्वयं के (अक्सर सीमित या विशिष्ट) गजेटियर और toponym का पता लगाने और संकल्प के लिए अपने स्वयं के दृष्टिकोण के साथ। इस प्रदर्शन पत्र में, हम HeidelPlace, geoparsing के समर्थन में एक एक्सटेंसिबल रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं। HeidelPlace की प्रमुख विशेषताओं में एक सामान्य गजेटियर मॉडल शामिल है जो विभिन्न ज्ञान आधारों से जगह की जानकारी के एकीकरण का समर्थन करता है, और एक पाइपलाइन दृष्टिकोण जो विशिष्ट जियोपर्सिंग कार्यों के अनुरूप विविध मॉड्यूल के प्रभावी संयोजन को सक्षम बनाता है। यह HeidelPlace परीक्षण और विभिन्न गजेटियर स्रोतों और geoparsing विधियों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक मूल्यवान उपकरण बनाता है। प्रदर्शन में, हम दिखाते हैं कि HeidelPlace के साथ एक जियोपार्सिंग वर्कफ़्लो कैसे सेट किया जाए और इसका उपयोग विभिन्न जियोपार्सिंग दृष्टिकोणों के आउटपुट की तुलना और समेकित करने के लिए कैसे किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Príomhthasc i bpróiseáil téacs is ea eastóscadh faisnéise geografaí ó fhoinsí sonraí téacsúla, ar a dtugtar geoparsáil, agus tá sé lárnach do chur chuige anailíse spáis ina dhiaidh sin. Tá go leor geoparsálaithe ar fáil a thacaíonn leis an tasc seo, gach ceann acu lena n-gazetter féin (go minic teoranta nó speisialaithe) agus a chur chuige féin maidir le hainmfhocal a bhrath agus a réiteach. Sa pháipéar taispeána seo, cuirimid HeidelPlace i láthair, creatlach inmhínithe chun tacú le geoparsáil. I measc na bpríomhghnéithe de HeidelPlace tá samhail gazetteer cineálach a thacaíonn le comhtháthú faisnéise áite ó bhoinn éagsúla eolais, agus cur chuige píblíne a chumasaíonn meascán éifeachtach de mhodúil ilghnéitheacha atá oiriúnaithe do thascanna geoparsála sonracha. Mar sin is uirlis luachmhar é HeidelPlace chun foinsí éagsúla gazetteer agus modhanna geoparsála a thástáil agus a mheas. Sa léiriú, léirímid conas sreabhadh oibre geoparsála a bhunú le HeidelPlace agus conas is féidir é a úsáid chun aschur cur chuige geoparsála éagsúla a chur i gcomparáid agus a chomhdhlúthú.', 'hu': 'A szöveges adatforrásokból származó földrajzi információk kinyerése, az úgynevezett geoparsing kulcsfontosságú feladat a szövegfeldolgozásban, és központi a későbbi térbeli elemzési megközelítések szempontjából. Ezt a feladatot támogató több geogyártó is rendelkezésre áll, mindegyik saját (gyakran korlátozott vagy speciális) lappal és saját megközelítéssel rendelkezik a toponím felismerésére és felbontására. Ebben a demonstrációs tanulmányban bemutatjuk a HeidelPlace-t, egy kiterjeszthető keretet a geopározás támogatására. A HeidelPlace kulcsfontosságú jellemzői közé tartozik egy általános közlönymodell, amely támogatja a különböző tudásbázisokból származó helyinformációk integrálását, valamint egy csővezeték-megközelítés, amely lehetővé teszi a különböző modulok hatékony kombinációját speciális geoárzási feladatokhoz. Ez a HeidelPlace értékes eszközzé teszi a különböző lapforrások és geoárzási módszerek tesztelését és értékelését. A bemutatóban bemutatjuk, hogyan állítható össze egy geopárzási munkafolyamat a HeidelPlace segítségével, és hogyan használható fel a különböző geopárzási megközelítések eredményeinek összehasonlítására és konszolidálására.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή γεωγραφικών πληροφοριών από πηγές κειμένων, που ονομάζεται γεωχαρτογράφηση, αποτελεί βασικό καθήκον στην επεξεργασία κειμένου και κεντρικό για τις επόμενες προσεγγίσεις χωρικής ανάλυσης. Υπάρχουν διάφοροι γεωαναλυτές που υποστηρίζουν αυτό το έργο, ο καθένας με το δικό του (συχνά περιορισμένο ή εξειδικευμένο) gazetter και τις δικές του προσεγγίσεις για την ανίχνευση και ανάλυση τοποωνύμων. Σε αυτό το έγγραφο επίδειξης, παρουσιάζουμε το ένα επεκτάσιμο πλαίσιο για την υποστήριξη της γεωχαρτογράφησης. Βασικά χαρακτηριστικά του περιλαμβάνουν ένα γενικό μοντέλο που υποστηρίζει την ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών τόπου από διαφορετικές βάσεις γνώσεων, και μια προσέγγιση αγωγού που επιτρέπει έναν αποτελεσματικό συνδυασμό διαφορετικών μονάδων προσαρμοσμένων σε συγκεκριμένες εργασίες γεωδιάταξης. Αυτό καθιστά το ένα πολύτιμο εργαλείο για τη δοκιμή και την αξιολόγηση διαφορετικών πηγών και μεθόδων γεωπύρωσης. Στην επίδειξη, παρουσιάζουμε τον τρόπο δημιουργίας μιας ροής εργασίας γεωχαρτογράφησης με το και πώς μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη σύγκριση και την ενοποίηση της παραγωγής διαφορετικών προσεγγίσεων γεωχαρτογράφησης.', 'it': "L'estrazione di informazioni geografiche da fonti di dati testuali, chiamata geoparsing, è un compito chiave nell'elaborazione del testo e centrale per i successivi approcci di analisi spaziale. Sono disponibili diversi geoparser che supportano questo compito, ognuno con il proprio (spesso limitato o specializzato) gazzetter e i propri approcci alla rilevazione e risoluzione dei toponimi. In questo documento dimostrativo presentiamo HeidelPlace, un framework estensibile a supporto del geoparsing. Le caratteristiche chiave di HeidelPlace includono un modello generico di gazetter che supporta l'integrazione di informazioni sul luogo provenienti da diverse basi di conoscenza, e un approccio pipeline che consente una combinazione efficace di diversi moduli su misura per specifiche attività di geoparsing. Questo rende HeidelPlace uno strumento prezioso per testare e valutare diverse fonti di gazzetter e metodi di geoparsing. Nella dimostrazione, mostriamo come impostare un flusso di lavoro di geoparsing con HeidelPlace e come può essere utilizzato per confrontare e consolidare l'output di diversi approcci di geoparsing.", 'kk': 'Географиялық мәліметті, геопализация деп аталатын мәтін өңдеу көзінен тарқату - мәтін өңдеу және келесі келесі бос талдау көзінің негізгі тапсырмасы. Бұл тапсырманы қолдау үшін бірнеше геоператор бар, әрбір өзінің (көп шектелген немесе арнаулы) және топонимді анықтау мен айырмашылығына өзінің арнаулары бар. Бұл демонстрацияның қағазында HeidelPlace дегенді, геоперацияны қолдау үшін кеңейтілген фреймін көрсетеді. HeidelPlace пернесінің кілттері бірнеше білім негізінен мәліметтерді біріктіру үшін қолдайтын жалпы газеттер үлгісін қолдау үшін, және оның бейімді түрлі модульдерді біріктіруге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл көмегімен бі Бұл HeidelPlace a valuable tool for testing and evaluating different gazetteer sources and geoparsing methods. Демонстрациясында, HeidelPlace жұмысын геоталдау жұмысын қалай орнату және оны қалай салыстыру және қалай қолдануға болады.', 'lt': 'Geografinės informacijos gavimas iš tekstinių duomenų šaltinių, vadinamo geoanalizavimu, yra pagrindinė tekstų apdorojimo užduotis ir yra pagrindinis tolesnių erdvinės analizės metodų veiksnys. Šią užduotį remia keli geoanalizatoriai, kiekvienas turi savo (dažnai ribotą arba specializuotą) gazetą ir savo metodus toponimų aptikimui ir pertvarkymui. Šiame demonstraciniame dokumente pristatome HeidelPlace, plataus masto sistemą geoanalizei remti. Pagrindinės HeidelPlace savybės – tai bendrasis gazetų modelis, kuriuo remiama vietų informacijos integracija iš skirtingų žinių bazių, ir vamzdyno metodas, kuris leidžia veiksmingai derinti įvairius modulius, pritaikytus konkrečioms geoanalizavimo užduotims. This makes HeidelPlace a valuable tool for testing and evaluating different gazetteer sources and geoparsing methods.  Demonstracijoje parodomi, kaip sukurti geoanalizuojantį darbo srautą su HeidelPlace ir kaip jį galima naudoti palyginti ir konsoliduoti skirtingų geoanalizuojančių metodų rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Екстракција на географски информации од текстуалните извори на податоци, наречени геоперација, е клучна задача во текстовото обработување и централна на следните пристапи на просторна анализа. Неколку геоператори се достапни кои ја поддржуваат оваа задача, секој со свој (честопати ограничен или специјализиран) газетер и свои пристапи до детекција и резолуција на топоним. Во овој документ за демонстрација, го претставуваме ХајделПлејс, проширена рамка за поддршка на геоперацијата. Клучните карактеристики на HeidelPlace вклучуваат генерален модел на газетник кој ја поддржува интеграцијата на информациите за местото од различни бази на знаење, и нафтоводен пристап кој овозможува ефикасна комбинација на различни модули прилагодени за специфични геоперативни задачи Ова го прави HeidelPlace вредна алатка за тестирање и евалуирање на различни извори на весници и методи за геоперација. In the demonstration, we show how to set up a geoparsing workflow with HeidelPlace and how it can be used to compare and consolidate the output of different geoparsing approaches.', 'ms': 'Pengekstraksi maklumat geografik dari sumber data teks, dipanggil penghuraian geografik, adalah tugas kunci dalam pemprosesan teks dan pusat kepada pendekatan analisis ruang berikutnya. Beberapa pemeriksa geo tersedia yang menyokong tugas ini, masing-masing dengan pemeriksa gazet sendiri (sering terbatas atau khusus) dan pendekatannya sendiri untuk pengesan toponym dan resolusi. Dalam kertas demonstrasi ini, kami memperkenalkan HeidelPlace, kerangka yang boleh diperluaskan untuk menyokong geoparsing. Ciri-ciri kunci HeidelPlace termasuk model gazeter generik yang menyokong integrasi maklumat tempat dari pangkalan pengetahuan yang berbeza, dan pendekatan garis paip yang membolehkan kombinasi efektif modul berbeza yang disesuaikan untuk tugas geoparsing khusus. Ini menjadikan HeidelPlace alat yang berharga untuk menguji dan menilai sumber gazeter berbeza dan kaedah penghuraian geo. Dalam demonstrasi, kita menunjukkan bagaimana untuk menetapkan aliran kerja penghuraian geo dengan HeidelPlace dan bagaimana ia boleh digunakan untuk membandingkan dan konsolidasi output pendekatan penghuraian geo yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'ജോപാര്\u200dസിംഗ് എന്ന് വിളിക്കുന്ന ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാ സ്രോതസ്സുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ജിയോഗ്രാഫിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുക്കുക, ടെക്സ്റ കുറച്ചു ജോപ്പര്\u200dസര്\u200dസുകള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു, ഓരോരുത്തര്\u200dക്കും സ്വന്തം പ്രത്യേകിച്ച (സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം അതിന്റെ സ് ഈ പ്രകടന പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഹെയിഡെല്\u200dപ്ലാസിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ജോപാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ഒരു വി ഹെയിഡല്\u200dപ്ലാസിന്റെ കീയുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നതിനെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ഒരു സാധാരണ ഗാഗെറ്റീറ്റര്\u200d മോഡല ഇത് ഹെയിഡല്\u200dപ്ലേസ് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഗാസിറ്റര്\u200d സ്രോതസ്സും ജോപാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് രീതികളും പരീക്ഷിക്കാനും പരിശോധിക്കാനും വിലയ പ്രതിഷേധത്തില്\u200d, ഹെയിഡല്\u200d പ്ലേസിനോടൊപ്പം ഒരു ജോപാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ജോപ്പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രവൃത്തിയെ എങ്ങനെ സ്ഥാപ', 'no': 'Ekstraksjon av geografiske informasjon frå tekstkilder, kalla geoanalysering, er ein nøkkeloppgåve i teksthandsaming og sentralt til følgjande tilnærmingar av mellomromanalyser. Fleire geoparsarar er tilgjengelege som støttar denne oppgåva, kvar med sitt eigen (ofte begrenset eller spesialisert) gazetter og sitt eige tilnærmingar til toponym- oppdaging og oppløysing. I denne demonstrasjonspapiret viser vi HeidelPlace eit utvidbare rammeverk som støttar geoanalysering. Nøkkelfunksjonar for HeidelPlace inneheld ein generell gazettermodell som støttar integrering av plassinformasjon frå ulike kunnskapsbaser, og ein røyrlinjetilnærming som gjer ein effektiv kombinasjon av ulike modular tilpassa til spesifikke geoanalyseringsoppgåver. Dette gjer HeidelPlace eit verdileg verktøy for testing og evaluering av forskjellige gazetterkjelder og geoanalyseringsmetodar. I demonstrasjonen viser vi korleis det skal setjast opp eit geoanalyseringsarbeidsfløy med HeidelPlace og korleis det kan brukast til å sammenlikna og konsolidera utdata av ulike geoanalyseringstilnærmingar.', 'ka': 'ტექსტუალური მონაცემების გამოსახულებიდან გეგოფიკაური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება, რომელიც ეგოპასუზაცია, არის ტექსტური პროცესი და ცენტრიალური კონტრალური განსა რამდენიმე გეოპასერები აქვს, რომლებიც ამ რაოდენობას დაეყენებენ, ყოველთვის საკუთარი (ზოგრად განსაზღვრებული ან სპეციალური) დაზეტირებით და საკუთარი დაზეტირებით ამ დემონსტრაციის დომენტში, ჩვენ ჰედელპესტის გამოსახულება, რომელიც ეგოპასირების მხარდაჭერად გავამხსენებთ. HeidelPlace-ის კლავიფიკაციების შესახებ განსხვავებული მეცნიერების ინფორმაციის ინტერგურაციის მოდელი, რომელიც განსხვავებული მეცნიერების ბაზის ინტერგურაციის ინტერგურაციას და გარეშე მიზემის მიზემი, რომელიც განსხვავებ ეს იქნება HeidelPlace მნიშვნელოვანი ხელსაწყო განსხვავებული გაზეტერის ფორმატების და ჯეოპალიზის მეტოვებისთვის. ევმონსტრაციაში, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ვიჩვენებთ როგორ დავწეროთ სამუშაო დავამყენება ჰედელპლასთან და როგორ შეიძლება გამოიყენება განსხვავებული გეოპასტირების გარეშე და კონს', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni ġeografika minn sorsi ta’ dejta testwali, imsejħa ġeopartizzazzjoni, hija kompitu ewlieni fl-ipproċessar tat-test u ċentrali għal approċċi sussegwenti ta’ analiżi ġeografika. Hemm disponibbli diversi ġeoparsers li jappoġġjaw dan il-kompitu, kull wieħed b’gazzetter tiegħu stess (spiss limitat jew speċjalizzat) u l-approċċi tiegħu stess għall-individwazzjoni u r-riżoluzzjoni tat-toponimu. In this demonstration paper, we present HeidelPlace, an extensible framework in support of geoparsing.  Il-karatteristiċi ewlenin ta’ HeidelPlace jinkludu mudell ġeneriku ta’ gazzetti li jappoġġja l-integrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni dwar il-post minn bażijiet ta’ għarfien differenti, u approċċ ta’ pipeline li jippermetti kombinazzjoni effettiva ta’ moduli varji mfassla għal kompiti ġeografiċi speċifiċi. Dan jagħmel HeidelPlace għodda ta’ valur għall-ittestjar u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ sorsi differenti ta’ gazzetti u metodi ta’ ġeopartizzazzjoni. Fid-dimostrazzjoni, a ħna nuru kif nistabbilixxu fluss ta’ xogħol ta’ ġeopartizzazzjoni ma’ HeidelPlace u kif dan jista’ jintuża biex jitqabbel u jiġi kkonsolidat ir-riżultat ta’ approċċi ta’ ġeopartizzazzjoni differenti.', 'mn': 'Географик өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэрээс газрын мэдээлэл гаргах нь текст процесс болон дараагийн орон нутгийн шинжилгээний ойлголтын гол ажил юм. Энэ ажлыг дэмжиж буй олон геоперсартууд бүр өөрийн (ихэвчлэн хязгаарлагдсан, мэргэжлийн) газрын сэтгэгч болон топонимд олох, шийдвэрлэх арга барилгыг ашигладаг. Энэ үзүүлэлтийн цаасан дээр бид ХайделПлес-г геоперсийн талаар дэмжих өргөн хэлбэрийг тайлбарлаж байна. ХайделПлейсийн түлхүүр чанар нь олон мэдлэг суурь дээрх мэдээллийг нэгтгэх боломжтой ерөнхий газрын загварын загвар юм. Харин хоолойн загвар нь тодорхой геоперализацийн даалгавар дээр дамжуулагдсан олон төрлийн модульуудын нэгтгэл Энэ нь HeidelPlace-г өөр газрын эх үүсвэрүүд болон геоперализацийн аргыг шалгах, үнэ цэнэтэй хэрэгсэл болгодог. Энэ үзүүлэлт бид HeidelPlace-тэй геоперсийн ажлын урсгалыг хэрхэн зохион байгуулахыг харуулж, өөр өөр геоперсийн ойлголтыг харьцуулахын тулд хэрхэн хэрэглэгдэж болох вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja informacji geograficznych ze źródeł danych tekstowych, zwana geoparsingiem, jest kluczowym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu tekstu i kluczowym dla kolejnych metod analizy przestrzennej. Dostępne jest kilka geoparserów, które wspierają to zadanie, każdy z nich posiada własny (często ograniczony lub specjalistyczny) gazetter oraz własne podejście do wykrywania i rozdzielczości toponimów. W niniejszym artykule demonstracyjnym przedstawiamy HeidelPlace, rozszerzalny framework wspierający geoparsing. Kluczowe cechy HeidelPlace obejmują ogólny model gazeterów, który wspiera integrację informacji o miejscu z różnych baz wiedzy, oraz podejście rurociągu, które umożliwia skuteczne połączenie różnych modułów dostosowanych do konkretnych zadań geoparsingowych. Dzięki temu HeidelPlace jest cennym narzędziem do testowania i oceny różnych źródeł gazeterów i metod geoparsingowych. W prezentacji pokazujemy, jak skonfigurować przepływ geoparsingowy z HeidelPlace oraz jak można go wykorzystać do porównywania i konsolidacji wyników różnych metod geoparsingowych.', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor geografice din surse de date textuale, numită geoparsing, este o sarcină cheie în procesarea textului și centrală pentru abordările ulterioare de analiză spațială. Mai mulți geoparseri sunt disponibili care susțin această sarcină, fiecare cu propriul său (adesea limitat sau specializat) ziar și propriile abordări ale detectării și rezoluției toponimelor. În această lucrare demonstrativă, prezentăm HeidelPlace, un cadru extensibil în sprijinul geoparsingului. Caracteristicile cheie ale HeidelPlace includ un model generic de gazete care sprijină integrarea informațiilor despre locuri din diferite baze de cunoștințe și o abordare prin pipeline care permite o combinație eficientă de module diverse adaptate la sarcini specifice de geoparsing. Acest lucru face din HeidelPlace un instrument valoros pentru testarea și evaluarea diferitelor surse de gazete și metode de geoparsing. În demonstrație, vă arătăm cum să configurați un flux de lucru geoparsing cu HeidelPlace și cum poate fi utilizat pentru a compara și consolida rezultatele diferitelor abordări geoparsing.', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija geografskih informacija iz tekstualnih izvora podataka, zvanog geoparsiranja, je ključni zadatak u obradi teksta i centralnom za sljedeće pristupe svemirskoj analizi. Nekoliko geoparsera je dostupno koji podržavaju ovaj zadatak, svako sa svojim (često ograničenim ili specijalizovanim) novinarima i svojim pristupima otkrivanju i rezoluciji toponima. U ovom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo HeidelPlace, širok okvir podrške geoparsiranja. Ključne karakteristike HeidelPlace uključuju generični model novinara koji podržava integraciju informacija o mjestu iz različitih baza znanja i pristup kanalizacije koji omogućava efikasnu kombinaciju različitih modula prilagođenih specifičnim geoparsijskim zadacima. To čini HeidelPlace vrijednim alatom za testiranje i procjenu različitih izvora novinara i metoda geoparsiranja. U demonstraciji pokazujemo kako da uspostavimo geoparsirani radni tok sa HeidelPlasom i kako se može koristiti za usporedbu i konsolidaciju izlaza različitih geoparsijskih pristupa.', 'si': 'භාවිත්\u200dයාත්මක තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය, භාවිත්\u200dයාත්මක තොරතුරු ස්ථානය, භාවිත්\u200dයාත්මක කිරීම ක්\u200dරියාවක්, පාළි ගොඩක් ජෝපරේස්ටර් ලැබෙනවා මේ වැඩ සහයෝගයක්, හැමෝම (සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන්) පරීක්ෂණය සහ පුළුවන් ප්\u200dර මේ ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය පැත්තේ, අපි HeidelPlace ට පෙනුම් කරනවා, භාවිශේෂණය සහයෙන් විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණයක්. HeidelPlace ගේ යතුරු විශේෂතාවක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ජාවික ජාවිත්ටර් මොඩේල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වෙනස් දන්න තොරතුරු ස්ථානය සඳහා  මේක HeidelPlaceName ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද හේඩෙල්ප්ලේස් එක්ක භාවිත්\u200dයාන්\u200dය වැඩප්\u200dරවාහයක් සැකසුම් කරන්නේ කියලා, ඒක කොහොමද වෙන', 'sv': 'Geografisk informationsutvinning från textdatakällor, kallad geoparsing, är en viktig uppgift i textbehandling och central för efterföljande rumsliga analysmetoder. Flera geoparsörer finns tillgängliga som stöder denna uppgift, var och en med sin egen (ofta begränsad eller specialiserad) tidskrift och sina egna tillvägagångssätt för toponym detektering och upplösning. I detta demonstrationsarbete presenterar vi HeidelPlace, en utbyggbar ram till stöd för geoparsering. Viktiga funktioner i HeidelPlace inkluderar en generisk tidningsmodell som stöder integrering av platsinformation från olika kunskapsbaser, och en pipeline-strategi som möjliggör en effektiv kombination av olika moduler skräddarsydda för specifika geoparseringsuppgifter. Detta gör HeidelPlace till ett värdefullt verktyg för att testa och utvärdera olika tidningskällor och geoparseringsmetoder. I demonstrationen visar vi hur man sätter upp ett geoparseringsarbetsflöde med HeidelPlace och hur det kan användas för att jämföra och konsolidera resultatet av olika geoparseringsmetoder.', 'so': 'Ka soo saarista macluumaadka jiografiga ee laga soo diro sourceoyinka taariikhda ee la yidhaahdo geoparsing, waa shuqul muhiim ah oo ka baaraandegista qoraalka iyo marka loo soo daba galay baaritaanka spatiaal. Halkaas waxaa laga heli karaa jardiino badan oo kaalmeeya shaqada, mid kastaaba wuxuu leeyahay jardiinadeed (inta badan ama gaar ah) iyo qaab u gaar ah oo uu ku soo ogaado toponimada iyo go’aanka. Warqadan muujinta waxan ku qornaa HeidelPlace, kaas oo ah qoraal aad u dheer oo ku caawinaya jardiinada. HeidelPlace waxaa kamid ah model caadiga ah oo taageeraya la qabsashada macluumaadka meelaha laga helo saldhigyada aqoonta kala duduwan, iyo qaab baabuur ah oo suurtogal ka dhigi kara isku xiriirka noocyo kala duduwan oo loo qoray goobaha lagu sameeyo. Taasi waxay HeidelPlace ka dhigataa qalabka qiimaha ah ee imtixaanka iyo qiimeynta noocyo kala duduwan iyo hababka jardiinada. In the demonstration, we show how to set up a geoparsing workflow with HeidelPlace and how it can be used to compare and consolidate the output of different geoparsing approaches.', 'ta': 'ஜியோபார்சிங் என்று அழைக்கப்படும் உரை செயல்படுத்தலில் இருந்து புவிய தகவல் வெளியீடு, பின்வரும் வானியல் ஆய்வு முடிவு பல புவியோபார்சர்கள் கிடைக்கும் இந்த செயலை ஆதரிக்கும், ஒவ்வொரு சொந்த (பெரும்பாலாக வரம்பு அல்லது சிறப்பாக) காகிடைக்கும் மற்று இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஹெயிட்ல்ப்ளேஸ், பூவியாக்குதலுக்கு ஆதரவு ஒரு விரிவான சட்டம். HeidelPlace விசையின் குணங்கள் ஒரு பொதுவான காசெட்டர் மாதிரி உள்ளது, அது வேறு அறிவு அடிப்படைகளிலிருந்து இடங்கள் தகவலை ஒன்றிணைக்க உதவுகிறது, மற்றும் ஒரு பைப்லைன் முறைமையை செ இது HeidelPlace a valuable tool for testing and evaluating different gazetter sources and geoparsing methods. இந்த காட்சியில், நாம் எப்படி பூவியாக்குதல் வேலை இயக்கத்தை அமைப்பதை காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் அதை எப்படி ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு மற்றும் வேறு பூவிய', 'ur': 'جغرافیک معلومات اضافہ کرنا، جغرافی ڈیٹا سورس سے، جغرافی کرنا نامیدہ ہے، ایک کلی تابع ہے، جغرافی پرسس کرنا اور مرکزی کے بعد جغرافی تحلیل کے قریبوں کے لئے۔ بہت سے جئوپارس موجود ہیں جو اس کام کی مدد کرتے ہیں، ہر شخص اپنے (کثرت سے محدود یا مخصوص) نگاٹر کے ساتھ اور اپنے تاپونیم شناسایی اور حل کے لئے اپنی طریقے سے۔ یہ نمونش کاغذ میں، ہم HeidelPlace کو نشان دیتے ہیں، جئوپارسینگ کی مدد کے لئے ایک پھیلا پھیلا دینے والا فرم. ہیڈلپلیس کی کلی ویٹیوں میں ایک جینریک گازٹر موڈل ہے جو مختلف علم بنسس سے مطلوبہ کی تفریق کی مدد کرتا ہے اور ایک پائپ لین طریقہ کی تابعداری کرتا ہے جو مختلف موڈلوں کی تفریق کی طریقہ سے مطابق کرتی ہے۔ یہ HeidelPlace کو آزمائش اور ارزش کے لئے ایک مقدار ابزار بناتا ہے۔ نمایش میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہیڈلپلس کے ساتھ جئوپارسینگ کارفول کس طرح استعمال کر سکتے ہیں اور اس کو کس طرح استعمال کر سکتے ہیں کہ مختلف جئوپارسینگ کے قریبوں کا نتیجہ مقایسہ کرنے اور متفرق کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Koʻp nechta geoparserlar bu vazifani qoʻllash uchun imkoniyatlar mavjud. Bu hujjatning daftarida, biz HeidelPlace, geoparing qoidasini qoʻllash uchun juda yetarli freym. Name Name Ko'rsatishda, biz HeidelPlace bilan geoparing ish orqali qanday o'rnatishni ko'rsamiz va bu turli geoparing sohalarining natijasini qanday o'xshash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc trích xuất thông tin địa lý từ nguồn dữ liệu văn bản, gọi là phân tích địa phương, là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc xử lý văn bản và là trung tâm tới các phương pháp phân tích địa lý sau đó. Có rất nhiều nhà phân tích hỗ trợ cho nhiệm vụ này, mỗi người đều có một chiếc nghiên cứu riêng (thường hạn chế hay chuyên môn) và cách tiếp cận với việc phát hiện và giải quyết địa hình. Trong tờ giấy biểu tình này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Heidelberg Place, một khung rộng để hỗ trợ phân tích địa hình. Các tính năng chính của Heidelberg là một kiểu nhãn quan rộng, hỗ trợ việc hòa nhập thông tin nơi ở các căn cứ kiến thức khác nhau, và một phương pháp dẫn đường giúp một sự kết hợp hiệu quả các mô- đun khác nhau phù hợp với các nhiệm vụ phân tích địa lý cụ thể. Kế hoạch này biến Heidelberg Place thành công cụ thử nghiệm và đánh giá các nguồn cảm biến khác nhau và phương pháp phân tích địa hình. Trong cuộc biểu tình, chúng tôi cho thấy cách thiết lập một dòng chảy phân tích địa với Heidelberg và cách nó có thể dùng để so sánh và củng cố kết quả các phương pháp phân tích địa lý khác nhau.', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija geografskih informacija iz izvora tekstualnih podataka, zvanog geoparsiranja, ključni zadatak je obradi teksta i centralni za sljedeće pristupe prostornoj analizi. Nekoliko geoparsera je dostupno koji podržavaju ovaj zadatak, svaki sa svojim (često ograničenim ili specijaliziranim) novinarima i svojim pristupima otkrivanju i rezoluciji toponima. U ovom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo HeidelPlace, širok okvir podrške geoparsiranja. Ključne karakteristike HeidelPlace uključuju generični model novinara koji podržava integraciju informacija o mjestu iz različitih baza znanja i pristup cijevi koji omogućava učinkovitu kombinaciju različitih modula prilagođenih određenim geoparsijskim zadacima. To čini HeidelPlace vrijednom alatom za testiranje i procjenu različitih izvora novinara i metoda geoparsiranja. U demonstraciji pokazujemo kako uspostaviti geoparsirani radni tok sa HeidelPlace i kako se može koristiti za usporedbu i konsolidaciju izlaza različitih geoparsijskih pristupa.', 'da': 'Geografisk informationsudvinding fra tekstdatakilder, kaldet geoparsing, er en vigtig opgave i tekstbehandling og central for efterfølgende geografiske analysemetoder. Flere geoparsere er tilgængelige, der understøtter denne opgave, hver med sin egen (ofte begrænsede eller specialiserede) tidsskrift og sine egne tilgange til toponym detektion og opløsning. I dette demonstrationsdokument præsenterer vi HeidelPlace, en udvidelig ramme til støtte for geoparsering. Hovedtræk ved HeidelPlace omfatter en generisk gazetteermodel, der understøtter integration af stedinformation fra forskellige vidensbaser, og en pipeline-tilgang, der muliggør en effektiv kombination af forskellige moduler skræddersyet til specifikke geoparseringsopgaver. Dette gør HeidelPlace til et værdifuldt værktøj til test og evaluering af forskellige bladekilder og geoparseringsmetoder. I demonstrationen viser vi, hvordan man opretter en geoparsing workflow med HeidelPlace, og hvordan den kan bruges til at sammenligne og konsolidere output af forskellige geoparsing tilgange.', 'bg': 'Извличането на географска информация от текстови източници на данни, наречено геопардиране, е ключова задача в текстовата обработка и централна за последващите подходи за пространствен анализ. На разположение са няколко геопарсора, които подкрепят тази задача, всеки със собствен (често ограничен или специализиран) беседер и собствени подходи за откриване и разделяне на топоними. В този демонстрационен документ представяме разширяема рамка в подкрепа на геопаркирането. Основните характеристики на ХайделПлейс включват генеричен модел на беседка, който подпомага интегрирането на информация за мястото от различни бази знания, и подход на тръбопровода, който позволява ефективно съчетаване на различни модули, съобразени с конкретни задачи по геопаркиране. Това прави ХайделПлас ценен инструмент за тестване и оценка на различни източници и методи за геопардиране. В демонстрацията ще покажем как да създадем работен поток по геопаркиране с ХайделПлайс и как той може да се използва за сравняване и консолидиране на резултатите от различни подходи по геопаркиране.', 'nl': 'Geografische informatie extractie uit tekstbronnen, geoparsing genoemd, is een belangrijke taak in tekstverwerking en centraal in latere ruimtelijke analysebenaderingen. Er zijn verschillende geoparsers beschikbaar die deze taak ondersteunen, elk met zijn eigen (vaak beperkte of gespecialiseerde) gazetteer en zijn eigen benaderingen voor toponiemdetectie en -resolutie. In dit demonstratiedocument presenteren we HeidelPlace, een uitbreidbaar kader ter ondersteuning van geoparsing. Belangrijke kenmerken van HeidelPlace zijn een generiek gazetteer model dat de integratie van plaatsinformatie uit verschillende kennisbases ondersteunt, en een pipeline aanpak die een effectieve combinatie van diverse modules mogelijk maakt die zijn afgestemd op specifieke geoparsing taken. Dit maakt HeidelPlace een waardevol hulpmiddel voor het testen en evalueren van verschillende gazetterbronnen en geoparsing methoden. In de demonstratie laten we zien hoe een geoparsing workflow met HeidelPlace kan worden opgezet en hoe deze kan worden gebruikt om de output van verschillende geoparsing benaderingen te vergelijken en te consolideren.', 'id': 'Ekstrasi informasi geografis dari sumber data tekstual, disebut geoparsing, adalah tugas kunci dalam proses teks dan pusat untuk pendekatan analisis ruang berikutnya. Beberapa geoparser tersedia yang mendukung tugas ini, masing-masing dengan gazeter sendiri (sering terbatas atau spesialisasi) dan pendekatannya sendiri untuk deteksi toponym dan resolusi. Dalam kertas demonstrasi ini, kami memperkenalkan HeidelPlace, sebuah rangkaian yang bisa diperlukan untuk mendukung geoparsing. Key features of HeidelPlace include a generic gazetteer model that supports the integration of place information from different knowledge bases, and a pipeline approach that enables an effective combination of diverse modules tailored to specific geoparsing tasks.  Ini membuat HeidelPlace alat yang berharga untuk menguji dan mengevaluasi sumber gazeter berbeda dan metode geoparsing. Dalam demonstrasi, kami menunjukkan bagaimana mengatur aliran kerja geoparsing dengan HeidelPlace dan bagaimana dapat digunakan untuk membandingkan dan konsolidasi hasil dari pendekatan geoparsing yang berbeda.', 'ko': '텍스트 데이터 원본에서 지리 정보를 추출하는 것을 지리 검색이라고 하는데 텍스트 처리의 관건적인 임무이자 후속 공간 분석 방법의 핵심이다.몇몇 지질 탐사원들이 이 임무를 지지하는데, 모든 사람은 자신의 지명록과 자신의 지명 검측과 해석 방법을 가지고 있다.이 프레젠테이션 파일에서는 지질 탐사를 지원하는 확장 가능한 프레임워크 HeidelPlace에 대해 설명합니다.HeidelPlace의 관건적인 기능은 서로 다른 지식 라이브러리에서 온 지명 정보를 통합하고 특정한 지질 탐사 임무에 대한 맞춤형 모듈을 효과적으로 결합시킬 수 있는 유니버설 지명록 모델을 포함한다.이로써 HeidelPlace는 서로 다른 지명의 출처와 지질 탐사 방법을 시험하고 평가하는 가치 있는 도구가 되었다.프레젠테이션에서는 HeidelPlace를 사용하여 지질 탐사 작업흐름을 설정하는 방법과 이를 사용하여 다양한 지질 탐사 방법의 출력을 비교·통합하는 방법을 보여준다.', 'sw': 'Geographic information extraction from textual data sources, called geoparsing, is a key task in text processing and central to subsequent spatial analysis approaches.  Wajaribu kadhaa wanapatikana kuwa wanaunga mkono kazi hii, kila mmoja akiwa na gazeti lake mwenyewe (mara nyingi linalozungumzwa au maalumu) na namna yake mwenyewe ili kutambua mada na kutatua suluhisho hilo. Katika gazeti hili la maandamano, tunawasilisha HeidelPlace, mfumo wa kiasi kikubwa wa kuunga mkono uchimbaji. Tamko muhimu za HeidelPlace zinajumuisha muundo wa gazeti la kawaida unaosaidia kuunganisha taarifa kutoka kwenye misingi mbalimbali ya maarifa, na mbinu za pipeline zinazowezesha kuunganisha vifaa tofauti vinavyotengenezwa na kazi maalum za kubadilisha mazingira. Hii inafanya HeidelPlace kuwa zana yenye thamani ya kujaribu na kutathmini vyanzo tofauti vya gazeti na njia za kupambana. Katika maandamano hayo, tunaonyesha jinsi ya kuanzisha safari ya kazi za kuvutia na HeidelPlace na jinsi inavyoweza kutumika kulinganisha na kuunganisha matokeo ya mitazamo mbalimbali ya mazingira.', 'tr': "Metin maglumatlaryň çeşmelerinden, geoparsleme diýip atlandyrylýan ýeri metin işlemeginiň we ortasynda ýene-de sowal analýşiniň golaýatynyň a çyk zady. Birnäçe geoparsatçy bu zady destekleýän zady bar, her biri öz (köplenç hadysy ýa-da specialiýa) gazeteci bilen we toponym tanyşyna we çözümleşmegi üçin özüniň golaýlary bar. Bu demonstrator kagyzynda biz HeidelPlace'i geoparslamak üçin döwürülen bir çerýük görkeýäris. HeidelPlace'yň a çyk özellikleri farklı bilgi baserden habarlaryň integrasyny destekleýän jeneral gazeterçi modeliniň içine alýar, we lançylyk metodlaryny spesifik geoparseýşen görerlere täsirli modullerniň birleşigine mümkin edýär. Bu HeidelPlace'i farklı gazetter çeşmeleri we geoanalyz yöntemlerini çalyştyrmak üçin değerli bir araç getirir. Görkezilişinde, biz HeidelPlace bilen geoparsyş aklyny nähili düzenlemegi we muny nähili ulanylýar we muny farklı geoparsyş golaýynyň netijesini görkezmek we konsolidýar.", 'af': "Geografiese inligting uitpakking van tekstuele data bronne, genoem geoparsing, is 'n sleutel taak in teksversoeking en sentrale na volgende spasielle analisie toegang. Verskeie geoparsiers is beskikbaar wat hierdie taak ondersteun, elkeen met sy eie (dikwels beperk of spesialiseerde) gazetteer en sy eie toegang tot toponime opdekking en resolusie. In hierdie demonstrasie papier, voorsien ons HeidelPlace 'n uitbreidige raamwerk in ondersteun van geoparsing. Sleutel funksies van HeidelPlace insluit 'n generieke gazetteerdermodel wat ondersteun die integrasie van plek inligting van verskillende kennisbasis, en 'n pipeline toegang wat 'n effektief kombinasie van verskillende modules wat gegroei is na spesifieke geoparsing taak. Hierdie maak HeidelPlace 'n waardelike hulpmiddel vir toets en evalueer verskillende gazetteer bronne en geoparsing metodes. In die demonstrasie, wys ons hoe om 'n geoparsing werksvloei met HeidelPlace te stel en hoe dit kan gebruik word om die uitvoer van verskillende geoparsing toegang te vergelyk en konsoliseer te word.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e informacionit gjeografik nga burimet tekstuale të të dhënave, të quajtura gjeografikim, është një detyrë kyçe në procesimin e tekstit dhe qendrore në qasjet e analizave hapësirore të ardhshme. Disa geoparser janë në dispozicion që mbështesin këtë detyrë, secili me gazetarin e vet (shpesh të kufizuar apo të specializuar) dhe qasjet e tij për zbulimin dhe zgjidhjen e toponimit. In this demonstration paper, we present HeidelPlace, an extensible framework in support of geoparsing.  Karakteristikat kryesore të HeidelPlace përfshijnë një model gazetar gjeneral që mbështet integrimin e informacionit të vendit nga baza të ndryshme të njohurive dhe një qasje tubacioni që mundëson një kombinim efektiv të moduleve të ndryshëm të përshtatshëm për detyrat e posaçme të gjeografikimit. Kjo e bën HeidelPlace një mjet të vlefshëm për testimin dhe vlerësimin e burimeve të ndryshme gazetarësh dhe metodave gjeografike. Në demonstrim, ne tregojmë se si të ngrejmë një rrjedhë të punës gjeopartizuese me HeidelPlace dhe se si mund të përdoret për të krahasuar dhe konsoliduar daljen e metodave të ndryshme gjeopartizuese.', 'de': 'Geographische Informationsextraktion aus Textdatenquellen, Geoarsing genannt, ist eine Schlüsselaufgabe in der Textverarbeitung und zentral für nachfolgende räumliche Analyseansätze. Es stehen mehrere Geoarser zur Verfügung, die diese Aufgabe unterstützen, jeder mit seinem eigenen (oft begrenzten oder spezialisierten) Gazetter und seinen eigenen Ansätzen zur Toponymerkennung und -auflösung. In diesem Demonstrationspapier stellen wir HeidelPlace vor, ein erweiterbares Framework zur Unterstützung von Geobranding. Zu den Hauptmerkmalen von HeidelPlace gehören ein generisches Gazetteermodell, das die Integration von Ortsinformationen aus verschiedenen Wissensbasen unterstützt, sowie ein Pipeline-Ansatz, der eine effektive Kombination verschiedener Module ermöglicht, die auf spezifische Geokartierungsaufgaben zugeschnitten sind. Damit ist HeidelPlace ein wertvolles Werkzeug für die Erprobung und Bewertung verschiedener Gazetteerquellen und Geobrandmethoden. In der Demonstration zeigen wir, wie man mit HeidelPlace einen Geoarsing-Workflow einrichtet und wie man damit die Ergebnisse verschiedener Geoarsing-Ansätze vergleichen und konsolidieren kann.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ እና በመካከለኛው ስፓስቲካዊ አካላቢ ማህበረሰብ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ እና የመስመር ማቀናጃ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ ብዙዎች የዮፓርተር ሰዎች የዚህን ስራ የሚደግሙ ናቸው፤ እያንዳንዱ የገዛ (ብዙ ጊዜ የተለየ ወይም የተለየ) ጋጋዜት እና የራሳቸውን የጦማኒ ማግኘት እና ማስታወቂያውን ለመግኘት የሚችሉ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ በማስታወቂያው ፕሮግራም፣ የህዲልPlace፣ የግንኙነትን ለመደጋገም የሚችል የፍሬም ክፍል እናቀርባለን፡፡ የHeidelPlace ቁልፎች የልዩ እውቀት መቀመጫዎች መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚደግፍ የግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢ ሞዴል እና የተለያዩ የዮፓርስ ስራዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል የልዩ ዓይነት ሞኮሎችን ማቀናቀል የሚችል ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ይሄ HeidelPlace ልዩ የጋዜታር ምንጮች እና የጂዮፖርሲን ዘዴዎች ለመፈትና ለማስተዋል የከበረ ሀብት ያደርጋል፡፡ በተሰልፎቹ ውስጥ ከሄዲልPlace ጋር የዮአፓርቲ ሥራ ፈሳሽ እንዴት እንደማቆም እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Գեոգրաֆիկ տեղեկատվությունը տեքստային տվյալների աղբյուրներից, որը կոչվում է գեոգրաֆիկ վերլուծում, տեքստի վերլուծության հիմնական խնդիրն է և հետագա տարածական վերլուծության կենտրոնական մոտեցումների համար: Գոյություն ունի բազմաթիվ երկրաչափուցիչներ, որոնք աջակցում են այս խնդիրը, յուրաքանչյուրը իր սեփական (հաճախ սահմանափակ կամ մասնագիտական) ժապարակներով և իր սեփական մոտեցումներով թոպոնիմների հայտնաբերման և լուծումների Այս ցուցադրական թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք HeiDelPlaceը, երկրաչափության աջակցության ընդլայնելի շրջանակ: Key features of HeidelPlace include a generic gazetteer model that supports the integration of place information from different knowledge bases, and a pipeline approach that enables an effective combination of diverse modules tailored to specific geoparsing tasks.  Սա HeiDelPlaceն արժեքավոր գործիք է դարձնում թեստավորելու և գնահատելու տարբեր ժապարակների աղբյուրները և երկրաչափման մեթոդները: Այս ցուցադրության ժամանակ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես կառուցել HeiDelPlaceի միջոցով աշխատանքային հոսանքը և թե ինչպես այն կարող է օգտագործվել տարբեր գեովերլուծության մոտեցումների արդյունքների համեմատության և կազմակերպման համար:', 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات جغرافی از منابع داده های متن، به نام جغرافیزی، یک کار کلید در پردازش متن و مرکزی برای نزدیک تحلیل فضایی بعدی است. چندتا جغرافی دسترسی دارند که این کار را حمایت می کنند، هر یک با نگاهبان خودش (معمولاً محدود یا متخصص) و دسترسی خودش برای شناسایی و حل توپونیم. در این کاغذ نمایش، ما هویدلپلیس را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها ویژگی\u200cهای کلید هایدلپل شامل یک مدل شبکه\u200cکننده عمومی است که از پایگاه\u200cهای دانش مختلف اطلاعات جایگاه را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند، و یک دستور لوله\u200cای که اجازه می\u200cدهد ترکیب موجودات مختلف موجودات متفاوتی که برای کار\u200cهای جغرافی خاص تغییر داد این باعث می\u200cشود که HeidelPlace یک ابزار ارزشمند برای آزمایش و ارزش منابع نگاهگر و روش\u200cهای جغرافی مختلف باشد. در نمایش، ما نشان می دهیم چگونه یک جریان جغرافی با هایدلپلیس و چگونه می تواند از آن استفاده شود برای مقایسه کردن و متصل کردن نتیجه نزدیک جغرافی مختلف.', 'bn': 'টেক্সচুয়াল ডাটা উৎস থেকে জিওগ্রাফিক তথ্য বের করা হচ্ছে, যার নাম জোপার্জিং, টেক্সট প্রক্রিয়া এবং কেন্দ্রীয় কাজ, যার পরে স্প্য Several geoparsers are available that support this task, each with its own (often limited or specialized) gazetteer and its own approaches to toponym detection and resolution.  এই প্রতিবাদ পত্রিকায় আমরা হেইদেলপ্লেসের উপস্থাপন করছি, যা ভূমিপার্জিং এর সমর্থনে ব্যাপকভাবে একটি ফ্রেমার্কে হিদেলপ্লাসের কী বৈশিষ্ট্য আছে একটি সাধারণ গ্যাজেটার মডেল যা বিভিন্ন জ্ঞানের বেস থেকে তথ্য যুক্ত করার সমর্থন করে, আর একটি পাইপেলাইন পদ্ধতি যা বিভিন্ন মডিউলের কার এটি হিদেলপ্লাস্ট বিভিন্ন গ্যাসেটার উৎস এবং ভূমিপার্জিং পদ্ধতি পরীক্ষা করার জন্য একটি মূল্যবান টুল বানিয়েছে। বিক্ষোভে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে হিদেলপ্লাসের সাথে ভূমিপার্সিং কর্মফ্লুয়ার স্থাপন করা যায় এবং কিভাবে ব্যবহার করা যায় বিভিন্ন ভূমি', 'az': "Mətn işləməsində və sonrakı uzay analizi yaxınlaşdırmalarına məlumat işləməsində anahtar işləməsində məlumat verilən məlumatlardan bir məlumat çıxarılması. Bu işi dəstəkləyən bir neçə geoparser var, hər biri öz (çox müəyyən edilmiş və ya özlərinə müəyyən edilmiş) gazeteci ilə və toponim keşfetməsi və çözünürlük üçün özünün özünün tərəfləri ilə. Bu göstəriş kağıdında HeidelPlace'i, geoparsing dəstəklərinə çox geniş bir çerçive göstəririk. HeidelPlace'in a çar özellikləri müxtəlif bilgi üssələrindən məlumatların integrasiyasını dəstəkləyən generic gazetter modeli ilə birləşdirir, və məlumatların müxtəlif geoparsing işlərinə uyğun müxtəlif modulların birləşdirilməsini mümkün edir. Bu HeidelPlace'i müxtəlif gazetter kaynaqlarını və geoparsing metodlarını sınamaq və değerləşdirmək üçün qiymətli bir vasitədir. Bu göstərimdə, biz HeidelPlace ilə geoparsing çalışma akışını necə quraşdıracağımızı göstərdik və onun müxtəlif geoparsing yaxınlıqlarının çıxışını necə salmaq və konsolidləmək üçün necə istifadə ediləcəyini göstərdik.", 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija geografskih informacija iz tekstualnih izvora podataka, zvanog geoparsiranja, je ključni zadatak u obradi teksta i centralnom za sljedeće pristupe svemirskoj analizi. Nekoliko geoparsera je dostupno koji podržavaju ovaj zadatak, svaki sa svojim (često ograničenim ili specijalizovanim) novinarima i svojim pristupima otkrivanju i rezoluciji toponima. U ovom demonstracijskom papiru predstavljamo HeidelPlace, širok okvir podrške geoparsiranja. Ključne karakteristike HeidelPlace uključuju generični model novinara koji podržava integraciju informacija o mjestu iz različitih baza znanja i pristup cijevi koji omogućava učinkovitu kombinaciju različitih modula prilagođenih specifičnim geoparsijskim zadacima. To čini HeidelPlace vrijednom alatom za testiranje i procjenu različitih izvora novinara i metoda geoparsiranja. U demonstraciji pokazujemo kako uspostaviti geoparsirani radni tok sa HeidelPlace i kako se može koristiti za usporedbu i konsolidaciju izlaza različitih geoparsijskih pristupa.', 'ca': "L'extracció d'informació geogràfica de fonts de dades textuals, anomenada geoanalització, és una tasca clau en el processament de textos i és central a l'anàlisi espacial posterior. Hi ha molts geoanalistes disponibles que suporten aquesta tasca, cada una amb la seva pròpia (sovint limitada o especialitzada) periodista i els seus propis enfocaments a la detecció i resolució de toponymes. En aquest paper de demostració, presentem HeidelPlace, un marc extensible en suport a la geoanalització. Les característiques clau de HeidelPlace inclouen un model genèric de periodistes que suporta la integració de la informació sobre llocs de diferents bases de coneixements, i un enfocament de pipeline que permet una combinació efectiva de móduls diversos adaptats a tasques específices de geoanalització. Això fa que HeidelPlace sigui una eina valiosa per testar i evaluar diferents fonts de periodistes i mètodes de geoanalització. En la demostració demostram com crear un flux de treball de geoanalització amb HeidelPlace i com es pot utilitzar per comparar i consolidar la producció de diferents enfocaments de geoanalització.", 'cs': 'Geografická extrakce informací z textových zdrojů, tzv. geoparsing, je klíčovým úkolem při zpracování textu a ústředním pro následné přístupy prostorové analýzy. K dispozici je několik geoparserů, které tento úkol podporují, každý má svůj vlastní (často omezený nebo specializovaný) gazetter a vlastní přístupy k detekci a rozlišení toponymů. V tomto demonstračním článku představujeme HeidelPlace, rozšířitelný rámec na podporu geoparsingu. Mezi klíčové vlastnosti HeidelPlace patří obecný gazetterový model, který podporuje integraci informací o místě z různých znalostních bází, a přístup potrubí, který umožňuje efektivní kombinaci různých modulů přizpůsobených konkrétním geoparkingovým úkolům. Díky tomu je HeidelPlace cenným nástrojem pro testování a hodnocení různých zdrojů gazetterů a metod geoparkingu. V ukázce ukážeme, jak nastavit geoparsingový workflow s HeidelPlace a jak ho lze použít k porovnání a konsolidaci výstupu různých geoparsingových přístupů.', 'fi': 'Geoparsing on keskeinen tehtävä tekstinkäsittelyssä ja keskeinen osa myöhempiä paikkatietoanalyyseja. Käytettävissä on useita geokartoittajia, jotka tukevat tätä tehtävää, joista jokaisella on oma (usein rajoitettu tai erikoistunut) lehtinen ja omat lähestymistapansa toponyymien havaitsemiseen ja resoluutioon. Esittelyssä esitellään HeidelPlace, laajennettava kehys geokartoituksen tueksi. HeidelPlacen keskeisiä ominaisuuksia ovat yleinen lehtimalli, joka tukee paikkatiedon integrointia eri tietokantoista, sekä putkistolähestymistapa, joka mahdollistaa erilaisten moduulien tehokkaan yhdistämisen tiettyihin geokartoitustehtäviin. Tämä tekee HeidelPlacesta arvokkaan työkalun erilaisten lehtien lähteiden ja geokartoitusmenetelmien testaamiseen ja arviointiin. Esittelyssä näytämme, miten HeidelPlacen avulla pystytetään geokartoituksen työnkulku ja miten sitä voidaan käyttää erilaisten geokartoituksen lähestymistapojen tulosten vertailuun ja konsolidointiin.', 'et': "Geograafilise teabe ekstraheerimine tekstiandmeallikatest, mida nimetatakse geoparsimiseks, on teksti töötlemise võtmetähtsus ja hilisemate ruumianalüüsi lähenemisviiside keskne ülesanne. Seda ülesannet toetavad mitmed geoarserid, igaühel on oma (sageli piiratud või spetsialiseeritud) väljaanne ja oma lähenemisviisid toponüümide tuvastamisele ja eraldusvõimele. Selles demonstreerimisdokumendis tutvustame HeidelPlace'i, laiendatavat raamistikku geoparsimise toetamiseks. HeidelPlace'i põhijooned hõlmavad üldist väljaannete mudelit, mis toetab erinevatest teadmistebaasidest pärit kohateabe integreerimist, ja torujuhtme lähenemist, mis võimaldab tõhusalt kombineerida erinevaid mooduleid, mis on kohandatud konkreetsete geoparsimise ülesannete jaoks. See muudab HeidelPlace'i väärtuslikuks vahendiks erinevate väljaannete allikate ja geoparsimismeetodite testimiseks ja hindamiseks. Demonstratsioonis näitame, kuidas seadistada HeidelPlace'iga geoparsimise töövoog ning kuidas seda saab kasutada erinevate geoparsimise lähenemisviiside tulemuste võrdlemiseks ja konsolideerimiseks.", 'he': 'חיפוש מידע גיאוגרפי ממקורי מידע טקסטאליים, שנקרא גיאופרסינג, הוא משימה מפתחת בעבודת טקסט ומרכזית לגישוי ניתוח חללי אחר כך. יש מספר גיאופרסים זמינים שמתמיכים במשימה הזאת, כל אחד עם עיתונאי משלו (לעתים קרובות מוגבל או מומחה) והגישות שלו לגילוי ופתרון טופונימים. בנייר ההצגה הזה, אנחנו מציגים את היידלפלס, סגרת מתרחבת בתמיכה לגיאופרסינג. אופיינים מפתחיים של HeidelPlace כוללים מודל עיתונאי גנרלי שמתמך באינטרגציה של מידע מקום מבסיסי ידע שונים, וגישה צינורות שמאפשרת שילוב יעיל של מודולים מגוונים מתוכננים למשימות גיאופריסטיות ספציפיות. This makes HeidelPlace a valuable tool for testing and evaluating different gazetteer sources and geoparsing methods.  בהדגמה, אנו מראים איך להקים זרם עבודה גיאופרסי עם HeidelPlace ואיך זה יכול להשתמש לשוות ולקבל את תוצאה של גישות גיאופרסיות שונות.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje geografskih informacij iz besedilnih virov podatkov, imenovano geoparsing, je ključna naloga pri obdelavi besedila in osrednja za nadaljnje pristope prostorske analize. Na voljo je več geoarserjev, ki podpirajo to nalogo, vsak z lastnim (pogosto omejenim ali specializiranim) gazetom in lastnimi pristopi k odkrivanju in ločljivosti toponimov. V tem demonstracijskem prispevku predstavljamo HeidelPlace, razširljiv okvir v podporo geoparciranju. Ključne značilnosti HeidelPlace vključujejo generični model gazetteer, ki podpira integracijo lokalnih informacij iz različnih baz znanja, in pristop cevovodov, ki omogoča učinkovito kombinacijo različnih modulov, prilagojenih specifičnim nalogam geoparkiranja. Zaradi tega je HeidelPlace dragoceno orodje za testiranje in vrednotenje različnih virov gazetteer in metod geoparsing. V predstavitvi bomo pokazali, kako vzpostaviti potek dela geoparciranja s HeidelPlace in kako ga lahko uporabimo za primerjavo in konsolidacijo rezultatov različnih pristopov geoparciranja.', 'ha': "Extractin information na Geography daga sourcen data na rubutu da aka yi kira geoparing, yana da maɓalli cikin aikin matsayi da kuma a tsakanin zuwa masu motsi da analyza na daban. Several geoparsers are available that support this task, each with its own (often limited or specialized) gazetteer and its own approaches to toponym detection and resolution.  Ga wannan karatun da ake nuna, Munã halatar da heidlPlace, wata firam mai shimfiɗa ta ƙaranci ga gyarandin. Furofatin maɓallin HaidlPlace na ƙunsa da wata motel na gabatar gasetter wanda ke ƙarfafa integrated information daga salon zane daban-daban, da kuma wata hanyor pipe wanda ke iya amfani da koma mai amfani da ko-nau'in module daban-daban zuwa aikin geoparing. Wannan yana sanya heidl Yana cikin shirin da Muke nuna yadda za'a daidaita wani juparing mai aiki da heidlPlace da kuma za'a iya amfani da shi a sami da kuma a tabbatar da matsayin hanyõyi daban juparing.", 'jv': 'Global Multiple Nang daemongke iki, kita nyimpen HydelPlas, akeh lansangan di jeogras nggunaké karo jeogras. echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Digawe Nang mätö, kita ngomong kegambar töweke sampeyan operasi nggawe kaya HydelPla karo iso nggawe nggawe gerarangkar karo iso nggawe gerarangkar sampeyan operasi nggawe gerarangkar sampeyan operasi sérangkar.', 'bo': 'Geographic information extraction from textual data sources, called geoparsing, is a key task in text processing and central to subsequent spatial analysis approaches. Several geoparsers are available that support this task, each with its own (often limited or specialized) gazetteer and its own approaches to toponym detection and resolution. In this demonstration paper, we present HeidelPlace, an extensible framework in support of geoparsing. Key features of HeidelPlace include a generic gazetteer model that supports the integration of place information from different knowledge bases, and a pipeline approach that enables an effective combination of diverse modules tailored to specific geoparsing tasks. This makes HeidelPlace a valuable tool for testing and evaluating different gazetteer sources and geoparsing methods. In the demonstration, we show how to set up a geoparsing workflow with HeidelPlace and how it can be used to compare and consolidate the output of different geoparsing approaches.'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised, Knowledge-Free, and Interpretable Word Sense Disambiguation', 'ar': 'توضيح معنى الكلمة غير خاضع للإشراف وخالٍ من المعرفة وقابل للتفسير', 'fr': 'Désambiguïsation des sens des mots non supervisée, sans connaissance et interprétable', 'pt': 'Desambiguação de Sentido de Palavras Não Supervisionado, Livre de Conhecimento e Interpretável', 'es': 'Desambiguación del sentido de las palabras sin supervisión, sin conocimiento e interpretable', 'ja': '監督されていない、知識のない、解釈可能な単語センスの曖昧さを解消する', 'zh': '无监督、无知识且可解者词义消歧义', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित, ज्ञान-मुक्त, और व्याख्यायोग्य शब्द भावना बहुविकल्पी', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемая, не требующая знаний и интерпретируемая расплывчатость смысла слов', 'ga': 'Neamh-mhaoirseacht, Gan Eolas, agus Léirmhínithe ar Bhriathra Focal', 'el': 'Χωρίς παρακολούθηση, χωρίς γνώση και ερμηνεία Αποσαφήνιση Λογικής Λόγου', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli, tudásmentes és értelmezhető szóérzék szétbontás', 'ka': 'ბოლო ცნობიერების შეცდომა და შეცდომა სიტყვების შეცდომა', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувано, без знаење и интерпретабилно разјаснување на чувството на зборот', 'it': 'Disambiguazione del senso della parola non sorvegliata, priva di conoscenza e interpretabile', 'kk': 'Өзгертілмеген, білім бос және аударылмайтын сөздер сезімін бұғаттау', 'ms': 'Tidak mengawasi, Bebas Pengetahuan, dan Penjelasan Perkataan', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത, അറിവില്ലാത്ത സ്വതന്ത്രമാണ്, വാക്കുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാനുള്ള സെന്\u200dസ് നിര്\u200d', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas, be žinių ir aiškinamasis žodžių jausmas', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдэхгүй, мэдлэг үнэгүй, ойлгомжтой үг мэдрэмжгүй', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta, kjennomsiktig og omsetjingsfeil av ord', 'pl': 'Niekontrolowane, wolne od wiedzy i interpretowalne rozłączenie zmysłu słowa', 'ro': 'Dezactivarea simțului cuvântului nesupravegheată, fără cunoștințe și interpretabilă', 'sr': 'Nepotrebna, besplatna znanja i razumljiva Disambiguacija osjeæaja reèi', 'si': 'නිර්භාවිත, දැනගන්න- නිදහස්, සහ ප්\u200dරවේශිත වචන සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අක්\u200dරීය කරන්න', 'so': 'Isu’aanta, aqoonta-xor, iyo qalloocnaanta hadalka turjumista ah', 'sv': 'Oserverad, kunskapsfri och tolkningsbar ordkänsla Disambiguation', 'mt': 'Disambigwazzjoni tas-Sens tal-Kliem Mhux Sorveljata, Mingħajr Għarfien u Interpretabbli', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படவில்லை, அறிவில்லை, மற்றும் பொருட்படுத்தக்கூடிய வார்த்தை உணர்வு தடைப்பு', 'ur': 'بے حفاظت، علم بے حفاظت، اور تفصیل قابل کلمات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Không giám sát, không biết, và giải thích từ ngữ.', 'hr': 'Nepotrebna, besplatna znanja i razumljiva Disambiguacija osjećaja riječi', 'bg': 'Неконтролирано, без знание и тълкуваемо разбиране на думите', 'nl': 'Onbewaakte, kennisvrije en interpreteerbare woordzinnigheid Disambiguation', 'da': 'Uovervåget, vidensfri og fortolkbar ordsanse Disambiguation', 'de': 'Unsupervised, wissensfrei und interpretierbar Wortsinn Disambiguation', 'ko': '감독이 없고 지식이 없고 해석할 수 있는 단어의 뜻이 갈라지다', 'sw': 'Hakudhibitiwa, Ufahamu Huru, na neno linalozungumzia Kupuuzwa kwa Sensi', 'fa': 'غیرقابل تحویل، آزاد دانش و تغییر احساس کلمه قابل تغییر', 'id': 'Tidak diawasi, Bebas Pengetahuan, dan Penjelasan Perkataan', 'tr': 'Saklanmaýan, Bilim Boş we Türleşikli Kelime Senedi Çagaldyrma', 'sq': 'Fjalë e pashmangshme, pa njohuri dhe të interpretueshme', 'af': 'Onondersteunde, kennis-vry en verbeterbare woord Sense Ontbreking', 'hy': 'Առանց վերահսկման, առանց գիտելիքների և թարգմանելի բառերի բացատրության', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Nepotrebna, besplatna znanja i razumljiva Disambiguacija osjećaja riječi', 'ca': 'Desambiguació sense supervisió, sense coneixement i interpretable', 'az': 'Müdafiə edilməmiş, Bilməyən Özgür və Əlaqətləşməz Kelimi Özgürlüyü', 'bn': 'অনলাইন, জ্ঞান-ফ্রি এবং ব্যাখ্যাত শব্দ সেন্সের বিরুদ্ধে', 'cs': 'Rozjasnění bez dohledu, bez znalostí a interpretovatelného slovního smyslu', 'et': 'Järelevalveta, teadmistevaba ja tõlgendatav sõnatunde disambiguatsioon', 'fi': 'Valvontaton, tietoton ja tulkittava sanaaistin purkaminen', 'jv': 'Gak Cocok, Bilih-Perangkat lan Gambar Kemerdekaan Nguasar', 'he': 'Unsupervised, Knowledge-Free, and Interpretable Word Sense Disambiguation', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovan, brez znanja in razložljiv besedni smisel', 'bo': 'སྐྱོན་རུང་མེད་པ། མི་ཤེས་པ་(Knowledge-Free)དང་འདྲ་བྱེད་རུང་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་འདི་ལ་ཉར་མ་ཆོག་པ'}
{'en': 'Interpretability of a predictive model is a powerful feature that gains the trust of users in the correctness of the predictions. In word sense disambiguation (WSD), knowledge-based systems tend to be much more interpretable than knowledge-free counterparts as they rely on the wealth of manually-encoded elements representing word senses, such as hypernyms, usage examples, and images. We present a WSD system that bridges the gap between these two so far disconnected groups of methods. Namely, our system, providing access to several state-of-the-art WSD models, aims to be interpretable as a knowledge-based system while it remains completely unsupervised and knowledge-free. The presented tool features a Web interface for all-word disambiguation of texts that makes the sense predictions human readable by providing interpretable word sense inventories, sense representations, and disambiguation results. We provide a public API, enabling seamless integration.', 'ar': 'تعد إمكانية تفسير النموذج التنبئي ميزة قوية تكتسب ثقة المستخدمين في صحة التنبؤات. في توضيح معنى الكلمة (WSD) ، تميل الأنظمة القائمة على المعرفة إلى أن تكون أكثر قابلية للتفسير من نظيراتها الخالية من المعرفة لأنها تعتمد على ثروة من العناصر المشفرة يدويًا والتي تمثل حواس الكلمات ، مثل hypernyms وأمثلة الاستخدام والصور. نقدم نظام WSD الذي يسد الفجوة بين هاتين المجموعتين غير المتصلين حتى الآن من الأساليب. على وجه التحديد ، يهدف نظامنا ، الذي يوفر الوصول إلى العديد من نماذج WSD الحديثة ، إلى أن يكون قابلاً للتفسير كنظام قائم على المعرفة بينما يظل غير خاضع للإشراف وخالٍ من المعرفة تمامًا. تتميز الأداة المقدمة بواجهة ويب لتوضيح كل الكلمات للنصوص التي تجعل تنبؤات المعنى قابلة للقراءة من خلال توفير قوائم جرد لمعنى الكلمات قابلة للتفسير ، وتمثيلات المعنى ، ونتائج إزالة الغموض. نحن نقدم واجهة برمجة تطبيقات عامة ، مما يتيح التكامل السلس.', 'fr': "L'interprétabilité d'un modèle prédictif est une fonctionnalité puissante qui permet aux utilisateurs de gagner la confiance des utilisateurs dans l'exactitude des prévisions. Dans le cas de la désambiguïsation des sens des mots (WSD), les systèmes basés sur la connaissance ont tendance à être beaucoup plus interprétables que leurs homologues sans connaissance, car ils s'appuient sur la richesse d'éléments codés manuellement représentant les sens des mots, tels que des hyperonymes, des exemples d'utilisation et des images. Nous présentons un système WSD qui comble le fossé entre ces deux groupes de méthodes jusqu'ici déconnectés. À savoir, notre système, qui donne accès à plusieurs modèles de WSD de pointe, vise à être interprétable comme un système basé sur la connaissance tout en restant totalement non supervisé et sans connaissances. L'outil présenté comprend une interface Web pour la désambiguïsation de tous les mots de textes qui rend les prédictions de sens lisibles par l'homme en fournissant des inventaires de sens de mots interprétables, des représentations de sens et des résultats de désambiguïsation. Nous fournissons une API publique, permettant une intégration transparente.", 'pt': 'A interpretabilidade de um modelo preditivo é um recurso poderoso que ganha a confiança dos usuários na exatidão das previsões. Na desambiguação de sentido de palavras (WSD), sistemas baseados em conhecimento tendem a ser muito mais interpretáveis do que contrapartes livres de conhecimento, pois contam com a riqueza de elementos codificados manualmente que representam sentidos de palavras, como hiperônimos, exemplos de uso e imagens. Apresentamos um sistema WSD que preenche a lacuna entre esses dois grupos de métodos até então desconectados. Ou seja, nosso sistema, fornecendo acesso a vários modelos WSD de última geração, visa ser interpretável como um sistema baseado em conhecimento, enquanto permanece completamente sem supervisão e livre de conhecimento. A ferramenta apresentada apresenta uma interface da Web para desambiguação de todas as palavras de textos que torna as previsões de sentido legíveis por humanos, fornecendo inventários de sentido de palavra interpretáveis, representações de sentido e resultados de desambiguação. Fornecemos uma API pública, permitindo uma integração perfeita.', 'es': 'La interpretabilidad de un modelo predictivo es una característica poderosa que se gana la confianza de los usuarios en la exactitud de las predicciones. En la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras (WSD), los sistemas basados en el conocimiento tienden a ser mucho más interpretables que sus homólogos sin conocimiento, ya que se basan en la gran cantidad de elementos codificados manualmente que representan los sentidos de las palabras, como hiperónimos, ejemplos de uso e imágenes. Presentamos un sistema de WSD que cierra la brecha entre estos dos grupos de métodos hasta ahora desconectados. Es decir, nuestro sistema, que proporciona acceso a varios modelos de WSD de última generación, pretende ser interpretable como un sistema basado en el conocimiento mientras permanece completamente sin supervisión y sin conocimiento. La herramienta presentada presenta una interfaz web para la desambiguación de textos en todas las palabras que hace que las predicciones de los sentidos sean legibles para los humanos al proporcionar inventarios interpretables de los sentidos de las palabras, representaciones de los sentidos y resultados de la desambiguación. Proporcionamos una API pública que permite una integración perfecta.', 'ja': '予測モデルの解釈可能性は、予測の正しさに対するユーザーの信頼を得る強力な機能です。単語の意味での曖昧さ解消（ ＷＳＤ ）において、知識ベースのシステムは、超常数、使用例、及び画像などの単語の感覚を表す豊富な手動で符号化された要素に依存するため、知識のない対応物よりもはるかに解釈可能である傾向がある。これまで断絶してきた2つのメソッド群の間のギャップを埋めるWSDシステムを提示した。すなわち、いくつかの最先端のWSDモデルへのアクセスを提供する当社のシステムは、完全に監督されておらず、知識がないまま、知識ベースのシステムとして解釈可能であることを目指しています。提示されたツールは、解釈可能な単語センス目録、センス表現、および曖昧さ解消結果を提供することによって、人間の予測を読み取り可能にする、テキストの全単語の曖昧さ解消のためのウェブインターフェースを特徴とする。シームレスな統合を可能にするパブリックAPIを提供します。', 'zh': '测曰:可解释性强大,用户信正确性也。 词义消歧义(WSD)中,盖知识之统,往往比无知之应物更具可解释性,盖其依于词义之大手动编码元素,如超名,以法示例象也。 我们出了一个WSD系统,该系统弥合了这两个迄今为止互不相连的方法间差距。 曰:先WSD访之,说以为统,全无监无。 所陈具具一Web界面,施于文本之全字消歧,以给词义可解者,感测示消歧义,使有义者可读。 共公 API,无隙集。', 'hi': 'एक भविष्यवाणी मॉडल की interpretability एक शक्तिशाली विशेषता है कि भविष्यवाणियों की शुद्धता में उपयोगकर्ताओं का विश्वास हासिल है. शब्द भावना बहुविकल्पी (डब्ल्यूएसडी) में, ज्ञान-आधारित प्रणालियां ज्ञान-मुक्त समकक्षों की तुलना में बहुत अधिक व्याख्यायोग्य होती हैं क्योंकि वे शब्द इंद्रियों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले मैन्युअल रूप से एन्कोडेड तत्वों के धन पर भरोसा करते हैं, जैसे कि हाइपरनिम, उपयोग के उदाहरण और छवियां। हम एक डब्ल्यूएसडी प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो इन दोनों के बीच की खाई को पुल करता है अब तक विधियों के डिस्कनेक्ट किए गए समूहों। अर्थात्, हमारी प्रणाली, कई अत्याधुनिक डब्ल्यूएसडी मॉडल तक पहुंच प्रदान करती है, जिसका उद्देश्य ज्ञान-आधारित प्रणाली के रूप में व्याख्या करने योग्य होना है, जबकि यह पूरी तरह से असुरक्षित और ज्ञान-मुक्त रहता है। प्रस्तुत उपकरण में ग्रंथों के सभी-शब्द बहुविकल्प के लिए एक वेब इंटरफ़ेस है जो व्याख्यायोग्य शब्द भावना सूची, अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व और बहुविकल्पीय परिणाम प्रदान करके मानव पठनीय भविष्यवाणियों को समझता है। हम एक सार्वजनिक एपीआई प्रदान करते हैं, जो निर्बाध एकीकरण को सक्षम करता है।', 'ru': 'Интерпретируемость прогностической модели является мощной особенностью, которая завоевывает доверие пользователей к правильности прогнозов. В словарной дезагрегации (WSD), системы, основанные на знаниях, как правило, гораздо более интерпретируемы, чем свободные от знаний аналоги, поскольку они полагаются на богатство закодированных вручную элементов, представляющих чувства слова, такие как гипернимы, примеры использования и изображения. Мы представляем систему WSD, которая устраняет разрыв между этими двумя пока разобщенными группами методов. А именно, наша система, предоставляющая доступ к нескольким современным моделям WSD, стремится быть интерпретируемой как система, основанная на знаниях, в то время как она остается полностью неконтролируемой и свободной от знаний. В представленном инструменте есть веб-интерфейс для развенчания текстов всеми словами, что делает разумные предсказания понятными для человека, предоставляя интерпретируемые списки смысла слов, представления смысла и результаты развенчания. Мы предоставляем общедоступный API, обеспечивающий плавную интеграцию.', 'ga': 'Is gné chumhachtach í léirmhíniú samhail thuarthach a ghnóthaíonn muinín na n-úsáideoirí as cruinneas na dtuar. Maidir le dí-athbhrí ar chiall na bhfocal (WSD), is gnách go mbíonn córais eolasbhunaithe i bhfad níos soléirithe ná a gcomhghleacaithe atá saor ó eolas mar go mbraitheann siad ar shaibhreas na n-eilimintí ionchódaithe de láimh a léiríonn céadfaí focal, mar hipearainmneacha, samplaí úsáide, agus íomhánna. Cuirimid córas WSD i láthair a dhúnann an bhearna idir an dá ghrúpa modhanna seo atá dícheangailte go dtí seo. Is é sin le rá, go bhfuil sé mar aidhm ag ár gcóras, a sholáthraíonn rochtain ar roinnt samhlacha WSD úrscothacha, a bheith inléirmhínithe mar chóras eolasbhunaithe fad is a fhanann sé go hiomlán gan mhaoirseacht agus saor ó eolas. Tá comhéadan Gréasáin san uirlis a chuirtear i láthair le haghaidh dí-athbhrí uile-focal ar théacsanna a fhágann go bhfuil na tuartha brí inléite ag daoine trí fhardail inmhínithe ar chiall na bhfocal, uiríll braite, agus torthaí dí-athbhrí a sholáthar. Cuirimid API poiblí ar fáil, rud a chumasaíonn comhtháthú gan uaim.', 'el': 'Η ερμηνεία ενός προβλέψιμου μοντέλου είναι ένα ισχυρό χαρακτηριστικό που κερδίζει την εμπιστοσύνη των χρηστών στην ορθότητα των προβλέψεων. Στην αποσαφήνιση λέξεων, τα συστήματα βασισμένα στη γνώση τείνουν να είναι πολύ πιο ερμηνευτικά από τα ομόλογά τους χωρίς γνώση, καθώς βασίζονται στον πλούτο των χειροκίνητα κωδικοποιημένων στοιχείων που αντιπροσωπεύουν τις αισθήσεις λέξεων, όπως υπερνύματα, παραδείγματα χρήσης και εικόνες. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα που γεφυρώνει το χάσμα μεταξύ αυτών των δύο μέχρι στιγμής αποσυνδεμένων ομάδων μεθόδων. Συγκεκριμένα, το σύστημά μας, το οποίο παρέχει πρόσβαση σε αρκετά σύγχρονα μοντέλα στοχεύει να ερμηνευθεί ως ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στη γνώση, ενώ παραμένει εντελώς ανεξέλεγκτο και χωρίς γνώση. Το εργαλείο που παρουσιάζεται διαθέτει μια διεπαφή για την αποσαφήνιση όλων των λέξεων κειμένων που καθιστά τις προβλέψεις αισθήσεων αναγνώσιμες από τον άνθρωπο παρέχοντας ερμηνευτές απογραφές αισθήσεων λέξεων, αναπαραστάσεις αισθήσεων και αποτελέσματα αποσαφήνισης. Παρέχουμε ένα δημόσιο που επιτρέπει την απρόσκοπτη ενσωμάτωση.', 'hu': 'A prediktív modell értelmezhetősége olyan erőteljes funkció, amely megnyeri a felhasználók bizalmát az előrejelzések helyességében. A szóérzék egyértelműsítésében (WSD) a tudásalapú rendszerek általában sokkal értelmezhetőbbek, mint a tudás-mentes megfelelők, mivel a szóérzékeket képviselő manuális kódolású elemek gazdagságára támaszkodnak, mint például hipernímek, használati példák és képek. Bemutatunk egy WSD rendszert, amely áthidalja a szakadékot e két eddig szétválasztott módszercsoport között. Rendszerünk, amely számos korszerű WSD modellhez hozzáférést biztosít, célja, hogy tudásalapú rendszerként értelmezhető legyen, miközben teljesen felügyelet nélkül és tudásmentesen marad. A bemutatott eszköz webes felületet biztosít a szövegek összes szós egyértelműsítésére, amely az értelmezések előrejelzéseit emberi értelmezhetővé teszi azáltal, hogy értelmezhető szóérzék leltárokat, érzék ábrázolásokat és egyértelműsítési eredményeket biztosít. Nyilvános API-t biztosítunk, amely lehetővé teszi a zökkenőmentes integrációt.', 'ka': 'პროგრამეტური მოდელის შესაძლებლობა არის ძალიან ძალიან ფუნქცია, რომელიც მომხმარებლის შესაძლებლობას წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა. სიტყვების სიტყვებით განამბიგუაცია (WSD), ცნობიერებული სისტემები უფრო უფრო გარგებელია, ვიდრე ცნობიერებელი უფრო უფრო უფრო ცნობიერებელი, როგორც მანძილურად კოდირებული ელემენტების ბედნიერ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ WSD სისტემა, რომელიც ამ ორის განსხვავებას ახლა განსხვავებულია მეტების განსხვავებას. ჩვენი სისტემა, რამდენიმე მსოფლიო WSD მოდელების შესაძლებლობა, უნდა იყოს ინტერპლექციური სისტემა როგორც ცნობიერებული სისტემა, მაგრამ ის უნდა დარჩენა ყველაფერად უცნობი მომხმარებული ხელსაწყოთა ინტერფესტის ინტერფესტი ყველა სიტყვების განამბიგუაციისთვის, რომელიც ადამიანის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების შესაძლებელია, რომელიც ინტერფესტის სიტყვე ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ადამიანის API, რომელიც შეუძლებელია ბედნიერი ინტეგრაცია.', 'kk': 'Бақылау үлгісінің түсініктілігі - таңдау дұрыстығында пайдаланушылардың сенімін жеткізеді. Мәліметтің түсіндігінде, мәліметтің негіздеген жүйелері білім бос мәліметтерден артық мәліметтерден артық түсіндіру мүмкіндігі болады, себебі олар қолмен кодталған элементтердің бағасы, мәліметтің сезімі, гипернимдер,  Біз осы екі әдістердің арасындағы аралығын көшірмелейтін WSD жүйесін келтіреміз. Біздің жүйеміз бірнеше күй- жай WSD моделдеріне қатынауға мүмкіндік береді, білім негізделген жүйе ретінде толықтауға мақсат береді, білім бос болмайды. Келтірілген құралда мәтіндерді өзгерту үшін Веб интерфейсі барлық сөздердің мәтіндерін өзгерту үшін, адамның оқуға мүмкіндік беретін мәтіндерді оқуға мүмкіндік беретін мәтіндердің тү Біз көпшілік API дегенді қамтамасыз береміз. Бірақ бұл көпшілік интеграциясы мүмкіндік береді.', 'it': "L'interpretabilità di un modello predittivo è una potente funzione che guadagna la fiducia degli utenti nella correttezza delle previsioni. Nella disambiguazione del senso delle parole (WSD), i sistemi basati sulla conoscenza tendono ad essere molto più interpretabili delle controparti prive di conoscenza in quanto si basano sulla ricchezza di elementi codificati manualmente che rappresentano i sensi delle parole, come ipernimi, esempi di utilizzo e immagini. Presentiamo un sistema WSD che colma il divario tra questi due gruppi finora disconnessi di metodi. Vale a dire, il nostro sistema, che fornisce accesso a diversi modelli WSD all'avanguardia, mira ad essere interpretato come un sistema basato sulla conoscenza pur rimanendo completamente non supervisionato e privo di conoscenza. Lo strumento presentato presenta un'interfaccia Web per la disambiguazione di testi che rende le predizioni di senso leggibili dall'uomo fornendo inventari di senso delle parole interpretabili, rappresentazioni di senso e risultati di disambiguazione. Forniamo un'API pubblica, consentendo un'integrazione senza soluzione di continuità.", 'lt': 'Prognozuojamo modelio aiškinimas yra galingas veiksnys, kuris didina naudotojų pasitikėjimą prognozių teisingumu. In word sense disambiguation (WSD), knowledge-based systems tend to be much more interpretable than knowledge-free counterparts as they rely on the wealth of manually-encoded elements representing word senses, such as hypernyms, usage examples, and images.  Pateikiame WSD sistemą, kuri užkirstų kelią atotrūkiui tarp šių dviejų iki šiol atskirtų metodų grupių. Visų pirma, mūsų sistema, suteikianti prieigą prie keleto naujausių VSD modelių, siekia būti aiškinama kaip žiniomis pagrįsta sistema, nors ji lieka visiškai nepastebima ir be žinių. Pateiktoje priemonėje yra internetinė sąsaja, skirta visiems žodžiams išskaičiuoti tekstus, dėl kurių prasmingos prognozės yra skaitomos žmogiškai, pateikiant aiškinamus žodžio jutimo aprašus, jutimo atspaudus ir išskaičiuojamų rezultatus. Mes teikiame viešą API, leidžiančią sklandžią integraciją.', 'mk': 'Интерпретабилноста на предвидливиот модел е моќна карактеристика која ја добива довербата на корисниците во точноста на предвидувањата. Во зборна смисла, раздвоумувањето (ВСД), системите базирани на знаење имаат тенденција да бидат многу поинтерпретабилни од колегите без знаење, бидејќи се потпираат на богатството на рачно кодирани елементи кои ги претставуваат зборните сетила, како што се хипернимите, примерите за користење и сликите. Презентираме систем на ВСД кој ја преместува празнината помеѓу овие две досега отклучени групи на методи. Нашиот систем, кој обезбедува пристап до неколку најсовремени модели на ВСД, има за цел да биде интерпретабилен како систем базиран на знаење, додека останува целосно ненадгледуван и без знаење. Презентираната алатка содржи веб-интерфејс за раздвојување на сите зборови на текстите, кој прави смисла предвидувања човечки читливи со обезбедување интерпретабилни инвентории на зборови, претставувања на чувствата и резултати на раздвојувањето. We provide a public API, enabling seamless integration.', 'ms': 'Interpretabiliti model ramalan adalah ciri yang berkuasa yang mencapai kepercayaan pengguna dalam kebijaksanaan ramalan. Dalam arti perkataan penyelesaian (WSD), sistem berdasarkan pengetahuan cenderung menjadi jauh lebih boleh diterangkan daripada rakan-rakan bebas pengetahuan kerana mereka bergantung pada kekayaan unsur-unsur yang dikodifikasi secara manual yang mewakili sens perkataan, seperti hipernim, contoh penggunaan, dan imej. Kami memperkenalkan sistem WSD yang menyambungkan ruang antara dua kumpulan kaedah yang terputus sejauh ini. Namanya, sistem kita, menyediakan akses ke beberapa model WSD yang terbaik, bermaksud untuk diterjemahkan sebagai sistem berdasarkan pengetahuan sementara ia masih sepenuhnya tidak diawasi dan bebas pengetahuan. Alat yang dihadapkan mengandungi antaramuka Web untuk menyambiguasi semua perkataan teks yang membuat akal ramalan manusia boleh dibaca dengan menyediakan inventori akal perkataan yang boleh diterjemahkan, persembahan akal, dan keputusan menyambiguasi. Kami menyediakan API awam, memungkinkan integrasi tanpa senyap.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോഡലിന്റെ വിശ്വാസം ഒരു ശക്തിയുള്ള വ്യക്തിയാണ് പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ ശരിയായ പ്രവചനങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താ വാക്കിലുള്ള അഭിപ്രായത്തില്\u200d, വിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സിസ്റ്റം പരിജ്ഞാനത്തെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ മൂലക ഈ രണ്ടുപേരുടെയും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഒരു WSD സിസ്റ്റം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. Namely, our system, providing access to several state-of-the-art WSD models, aims to be interpretable as a knowledge-based system while it remains completely unsupervised and knowledge-free.  പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഉപകരണത്തിന് വെബ് ഇന്റര്\u200dമെസ്റ്റ് കാണിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെയും  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൊതുവായ എപിഐ നല്\u200dകുന്നു, സമീപത്തില്ലാത്ത ഒരുമിച്ച് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Interpretabilitet for eit foregåande modell er ein kraftig funksjon som får tillit til brukarar i rettigheten av foregåver. I ordmengde er disambiguasjon (WSD), kunnskapsbaserte systemar tenderer til å vera mykje meir tolkbare enn kunnskapsfri counterpartar, slik at dei rely på riktigheten av manuelt koderte elementar som representerer ordsensar, slik som hypernymar, brukeksemplar og bilete. Vi presenterer eit WSD-system som brytar mellomrommet mellom desse to så langt fråkopla grupper av metodar. Dette er systemet vårt, som tilbyr tilgang til fleire modeller av kunsten WSD. Målet er å tolka som eit kunnskapsbasert system mens det er fullstendig usikkerte og kunnskapsfri. Dette verktøyet inneheld eit nettgrensesnitt for å forstørra tekstar med alle ord som gjer følelsesfordringar som kan lesast menneskelig ved å tilbyra tolkbare ordfølelser inventorer, følelsesrepresentasjonar og forstørringsverdiar. Vi tilbyr ein offentleg API, som kan slå på synleg integrering.', 'mt': 'L-interpretabbiltà ta’ mudell prevedibbli hija karatteristika qawwija li tikseb il-fiduċja tal-utenti fil-korrettezza tal-previżjonijiet. In word sense disambiguation (WSD), knowledge-based systems tend to be much more interpretable than knowledge-free counterparts as they rely on the wealth of manually-encoded elements representing word senses, such as hypernyms, usage examples, and images.  Aħna nippreżentaw sistema WSD li tgħaqqad id-distakk bejn dawn iż-żewġ gruppi ta’ metodi li s’issa ma ġewx konnessi. B’mod partikolari, is-sistema tagħna, li tipprovdi a ċċess għal bosta mudelli tal-AWSD l-aktar avvanzati, għandha l-għan li tkun interpretabbli bħala sistema bbażata fuq l-għarfien filwaqt li tibqa’ kompletament mhux sorveljata u ħielsa mill-għarfien. L-għodda preżentata għandha interfaċċja fuq l-internet għad-diżambiguazzjoni ta’ kull kelma tat-testi li tagħmel is-sens tbassir li jista’ jinqara mill-bniedem billi tipprovdi inventarji interpretabbli tas-sens tal-kelma, rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-sens, u riżultati tad-diżambiguazzjoni. Aħna nipprovdu API pubblika, li tippermetti integrazzjoni bla xkiel.', 'mn': 'Таамаглах загварын тухай ойлголт бол таамаглалтын зөв байдлыг хэрэглэгчийн итгэлтэй чадварыг авдаг хүчирхэг чадвар юм. Зөвхөн тодорхойлолтой хэлбэрээр, мэдлэг суурилсан систем нь мэдлэг боловсруулагдаагүй counterparts-аас илүү илүү илүү ойлгомжтой байдаг. Яг л тэд барилгаар шинэчлэгдсэн элементүүдийн баялаг, үг мэдрэмжүүдийг илэрхийлдэг, гиперним, хэрэглэх жишээ,  Бид эдгээр хоёр хүртэл хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хо Энэ нь бидний систем, олон улс төрийн WSD загваруудыг хангаж, мэдлэг суурилсан систем гэдэгт зориулагддаг. Энэ нь бүрэн дэмжигдэхгүй, мэдлэг үнэгүй. Тайлбарласан хэрэгсэл нь хүн төрөлхтний уншиж чадах мэдрэмжтэй үг мэдрэмжтэй зохиолууд, мэдрэмжтэй илтгэл болон буруутгах үр дүнг өгөхөд хүн төрөлхтний хувилбаруудын Веб интерфейсийг харуулдаг. Бид олон нийтийн API-г гаргаж, хэцүү нэгтгэл боломж олгодог.', 'ro': 'Interpretarea unui model predictiv este o caracteristică puternică care câștigă încrederea utilizatorilor în corectitudinea predicțiilor. În dezambiguizarea sensului cuvintelor (WSD), sistemele bazate pe cunoaștere tind să fie mult mai interpretabile decât omologii fără cunoaștere, deoarece se bazează pe bogăția de elemente codificate manual reprezentând simțurile cuvintelor, cum ar fi hipernime, exemple de utilizare și imagini. Vă prezentăm un sistem WSD care compensează decalajul dintre aceste două grupuri de metode până acum deconectate. Și anume, sistemul nostru, care oferă acces la mai multe modele WSD de ultimă generație, își propune să fie interpretat ca un sistem bazat pe cunoaștere, în timp ce rămâne complet nesupravegheat și fără cunoștințe. Instrumentul prezentat prezintă o interfață Web pentru dezambiguizarea tuturor cuvintelor a textelor care face ca predicțiile de sens să poată fi citite uman, oferind inventare de sens interpretabile, reprezentări de sens și rezultate de dezambiguizare. Oferim un API public, permițând integrarea fără probleme.', 'pl': 'Interpretacja modelu predykcyjnego to potężna funkcja, która zyskuje zaufanie użytkowników do poprawności prognoz. W słownej dyambiguacji (WSD), systemy oparte na wiedzy są zwykle bardziej interpretowalne niż odpowiedniki wolne od wiedzy, ponieważ opierają się na bogactwie ręcznie zakodowanych elementów reprezentujących zmysły słowa, takich jak hipernimy, przykłady użycia i obrazy. Przedstawiamy system WSD, który wypełnia lukę między tymi dwoma dotychczas niepowiązanymi grupami metod. Mianowicie nasz system, zapewniający dostęp do kilku najnowocześniejszych modeli WSD, ma być interpretowalny jako system oparty na wiedzy, pozostając całkowicie bez nadzoru i bez wiedzy. Prezentowane narzędzie posiada interfejs internetowy służący do wszystkich słów dyscyplinacji tekstów, który sprawia, że przewidywania sensu są czytelne dla człowieka poprzez dostarczanie interpretowalnych spisów zmysłów, reprezentacji zmysłów i wyników dyscyplinacji. Zapewniamy publiczne API, umożliwiające bezproblemową integrację.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් බලාපොරොත්තු විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ විශ්වාස විශ In word sensation disombguation (WSD), Knowing-based systems have a lot more translation than Knowing-Free අපි WSD පද්ධතියක් පෙනුම් කරනවා මේ දෙන්නෙක් අතර පැත්තක් වෙනුවෙන් පැත්තක් කරනවා. අපේ පද්ධතිය, විශ්වාසයෙන්, විශ්වාසයෙන් විශේෂ WSD මෝඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙන්න, අදහස් කරනවා දන්නවත් පද්ධතියක් විදිහ පෙන්වන්න උපකරණය සලකුණු වෙබ් අන්තර්ජනය සඳහා සියළුම වචන අන්තර්ජනය සඳහා මිනිස්සුන් කියවන්න පුළුවන් අදහස් වචන අන්තර්ජන අපි ප්\u200dරජාතික API එකක් දෙන්නේ, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න.', 'so': 'Turjumidda model la sii sheegayo waa mid aad u xoog badan oo ka helaya aaminka isticmaalayaasha si ay u hagaajiyaan wixii la soo sheegay. Isticmaalka aqoonta (WSD) waxaa inta badan laga turjumaa kuwa aan aqoonta lahayn, sababtoo ah waxay isku halleeyaan hodantinimada alaabta qofka gacanta ku qoran, kuwaas oo ka mid ah xisaabta hadalka, tusaale ahaan isticmaalka, tusaale ahaan isticmaalka iyo sawirada. We present a WSD system that bridges the gap between these two so far disconnected groups of methods.  Magaca, nidaamkayaga, ee isticmaalaya isticmaalka qaababka noocyada farshaxanka ah ee WSD, wuxuu u jeedaa in lagu turjumo nidaam aqoonta ku saleysan, iyadoo ay sii jirto si kamid ah u badbaadeyn iyo aqoonta lacag la’aan. Qoraalka la soo saaray waxaa ka mid ah Interfac Internetka oo ku saabsan dhammaan eray kala duwan oo qoraal ah, kaas oo ka dhiga waxyaabaha la sii akhriyo dadka marka lagu siiyo muuqashada macluumaadka waxyaabaha lagu turjumo, aragtida fikrada iyo resultiyada kala duwan. Waxaannu siinaynaa API oo dadweynaha ah, taas oo caawinaya la qabsashada badnaanta.', 'sr': 'Razumljivost predvidnog model a je moćna karakteristika koja dobija povjerenje korisnika u ispravnosti predviđanja. U smislu razmišljanja o disambiguaciji (WSD), sistemi na znanju su često mnogo interpretabilniji od kolega bez znanja, jer se oslanjaju na bogatstvo ručno kodiranih elementa koji predstavljaju čula riječi, poput hipernima, primjera korištenja i slika. Predstavljamo WSD sistem koji predstavlja prazninu između ove dve do sada isključene grupe metoda. U imenu, naš sistem, pružajući pristup nekoliko modela umjetnosti WSD-a, cilj je da bude interpretabilan kao sistem na temelju znanja, dok ostaje potpuno neodređen i bez znanja. Predstavljeni alat uključuje Web interfejs za razmazivanje tekstova koji čini smisla predviđanja ljudskim pročitanjem pružajući izvore interpretabilnog rečenja, predstavljanja osjećaja i rezultate disambigacije. Obezbeđujemo javnu API, omogućavajući bezveznu integraciju.', 'sv': 'Tolkning av en prediktiv modell är en kraftfull funktion som ökar användarnas förtroende för att förutsägelserna är korrekta. I ordmeningsdeklaration (WSD) tenderar kunskapsbaserade system att vara mycket mer tolkningsbara än kunskapsfria motsvarigheter eftersom de förlitar sig på en mängd manuellt kodade element som representerar ordsinnen, såsom hypernymer, användningsexempel och bilder. Vi presenterar ett WSD-system som överbryggar klyftan mellan dessa två hittills frånkopplade grupper av metoder. Vårt system, som ger tillgång till flera toppmoderna WSD-modeller, syftar nämligen till att kunna tolkas som ett kunskapsbaserat system samtidigt som det förblir helt oövervakat och kunskapsfritt. Det presenterade verktyget har ett webbgränssnitt för alla ord disambiguation av texter som gör meningsförutsägelser mänskligt läsbara genom att tillhandahålla tolkningsbara ordsinnesförteckningar, sinnesrepresentationer och disambiguation resultat. Vi tillhandahåller ett offentligt API som möjliggör sömlös integration.', 'ta': 'முன்னோக்கும் மாதிரியின் விளக்கம் ஒரு சக்தியுடைய தன்மையாகும். இது முன்னோர்களின் சரியாக உள்ள பயனர் நம்பிக்கையை ப வார்த்தையில் பாதுகாப்பில் அறிவு அடிப்படையான முறைமைகள் அறிவு இல்லாத கூட்டாளிகளை விட அதிக முறையாக விளக்கமாக இருக்கும் ஏனெனில் அவர்கள் சொல்லும் குறியீட்ட நாம் ஒரு WSD அமைப்பை கொண்டிருக்கிறோம். இந்த இரண்டு முறையில் உள்ள இடைவெளியை பிரித்துக் கொள்கிறோம். பெயர், எங்கள் அமைப்பு, பல நிலையில்- கலை WSD மாதிரிகளுக்கு அணுகல் அளித்து, அறிவு அடிப்படையான அமைப்பாக முழுமையாக சேமிக்கப்படாத மற்றும் அறிவு ம கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கருவி அனைத்து வார்த்தைகளையும் பிரித்துப் பார்க்கக்கூடிய முடிவுகளுக்கும் இணைய இடைமுகப்புகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது. அது மனிதனை படிக நாங்கள் ஒரு பொது API வழங்குகிறோம், கடல் முழுமையான ஒன்றுசேர்க்கப்படும்.', 'ur': 'ایک پیش بینی موڈل کی تفصیلات ایک طاقتور ویژہ ہے جو پیش بینی کے مطابق کارساز کے اعتماد کو حاصل کرتا ہے. زبان کے مطابق غیر قابل تعبیر (WSD) کے مطابق علم کی سیستموں سے بہت زیادہ تعبیر دینے والی ہیں جیسے وہ اپنے ہاتھ سے محفوظ الطابق کے اموال پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں جو کلمات حس کے مطابق تعبیر کرتے ہیں، جیسے hypernyms، استعمال کی مثالیں اور تصاویر. ہم ایک WSD سیسٹم کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ان دو طریقوں کے درمیان فاصلہ کو دوڑتا ہے۔ ہماری سیسٹم، بہت سی ایٹیٹ ویس ڈی موڈل کی دسترسی دے رہی ہے، اس کا ارادہ ہے کہ علم کی بنیادی سیسٹم کے طور پر تفسیر کرسکے حالانکہ یہ کامل غیر قابل تحفظ اور علم کے بغیر قابل رہتا ہے. پیش فرض کی تولید ایک ویب انٹرنیفس کے لئے تمام کلمات کی تغییرات کے لئے ویب انٹرنیفس کا شامل ہے جو انسان کے پڑھنے کے قابل تغییرات کے ذریعہ انسان کو سمجھ سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے ایک عمومی API کو پیدا کیا ہے، بے حساب تفریق کرنے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Koʻrib chiqish modelining tarjima - kutilgan deb hisoblangan foydalanuvchilarga ishonch haqiqatga ega bo'ladi. Keyingi so'zlar (WSD) ta'minlovchi bo'lsa, ilmiy tizimlar haqida o'rganish bilan boshqaruvchilarga ko'p tarjima bo'ladi, chunki ular so'zlar hissiyotlarini, huddi hypernym, foydalanish misollari, va rasmlarni qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qoiday kodlash elementlariga ishlatadi. Biz bir WSD tizimni hozir qilamiz, bu ikkita bilan bog'liq bir usullar orasidagi gap ajratiladi. Bizning tizimimizning bir necha holatda yordam WSD modellariga murojaat qilish imkoniyatlarimiz, va u butunlay saqlanmagan va bilmagan tizim sifatida o'rganish mumkin. Name Biz jamiyat API bilan birlashtiramiz, seamlarni birlashtirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Độ giải thích của mô hình dự đoán là một yếu tố mạnh mẽ giúp người dùng tin tưởng vào sự đúng đắn của dự đoán. Phân dạng dạng dạng từ ngữ (WSD), hệ thống dựa trên kiến thức có xu hướng dễ hiểu hơn nhiều so với các đối tác không có kiến thức, vì chúng dựa vào sự giàu có của các yếu tố được mã hóa bằng tay đại diện cho các giác quan từ, như siêu năng, ví dụ sử dụng, và hình ảnh. Chúng tôi đưa ra một hệ thống WSD để gián đoạn khoảng cách giữa hai nhóm phương pháp đã bị ngắt kết nối. Ví dụ, hệ thống của chúng tôi, cung cấp quyền truy cập vào nhiều loại mẫu WSD hiện đại, nhằm được giải thích như một hệ thống dựa trên kiến thức, trong khi nó vẫn hoàn to àn không được giám sát và không có kiến thức. Công cụ được trình bày có một giao diện web để phân dạng toàn từ các văn bản làm cho những dự đoán có lý dễ đọc bằng cách cung cấp các phát minh dạng từ nhạy cảm, các biểu hiện cảm và kết quả biến đổi. Chúng tôi cung cấp API công khai, hỗ trợ sự hòa nhập.', 'bg': 'Тълкуваемостта на прогнозиращия модел е мощна характеристика, която печели доверието на потребителите в правилността на прогнозите. В обозначаването на смисъла на думата (WSD), базираните на знанието системи обикновено са много по-интерпретативни от несъзнателните си колеги, тъй като разчитат на богатството от ръчно кодирани елементи, представляващи сетивата на думата, като хиперними, примери за употреба и изображения. Представяме система, която покрива пропастта между тези две досега несвързани групи методи. Именно нашата система, осигуряваща достъп до няколко най-съвременни модела на ВиК, има за цел да бъде интерпретирана като базирана на знанието система, докато остава напълно без надзор и без знание. Представеният инструмент разполага с уеб интерфейс за разграничаване на всички думи на текстове, който прави предсказанията смислени за човека чрез предоставяне на интерпретирани инвентаризации на смисъла на думи, представления на смисъла и резултати от разграничаване. Ние предоставяме публичен API, позволяващ безпроблемна интеграция.', 'nl': 'Interpreteerbaarheid van een voorspellend model is een krachtige functie die het vertrouwen van gebruikers in de juistheid van de voorspellingen wint. In Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) zijn kennisgebaseerde systemen vaak veel duidelijker te interpreteren dan kennisvrije tegenhangers omdat ze afhankelijk zijn van de rijkdom aan handmatig gecodeerde elementen die woordzinnen vertegenwoordigen, zoals hyperniemen, gebruiksvoorbeelden en afbeeldingen. We presenteren een WSD-systeem dat de kloof overbrugt tussen deze twee tot nu toe niet verbonden groepen methodes. Ons systeem, dat toegang biedt tot verschillende state-of-the-art WSD modellen, streeft ernaar interpreteerbaar te zijn als een kennisgebaseerd systeem terwijl het volledig onbewaakt en kennisvrij blijft. De gepresenteerde tool beschikt over een webinterface voor alle-woord disambiguatie van teksten die de zintuigvoorspellingen menselijk leesbaar maakt door interpreteerbare woordzintuiginventarissen, zintuigrepresentaties en disambiguatie resultaten te verstrekken. We bieden een publieke API, waardoor naadloze integratie mogelijk is.', 'da': 'Fortolkningsevnen af en prædiktiv model er en kraftfuld funktion, der vinder brugernes tillid til korrektheden af forudsigelserne. Ved ordforstandsforskelse (WSD), videnbaserede systemer har tendens til at være meget mere fortolkelige end vidensfrie modstykker, da de er afhængige af et væld af manuelt kodede elementer, der repræsenterer ordsanser, såsom hypernymer, brugseksempler og billeder. Vi præsenterer et WSD-system, der bryder kløften mellem disse to hidtil afbrudte grupper af metoder. Det vil sige, at vores system, der giver adgang til flere state-of-the-art WSD modeller, sigter mod at kunne fortolkes som et videnbaseret system, mens det forbliver fuldstændig uautoriseret og vidensfrit. Det præsenterede værktøj indeholder en webgrænseflade til alle ord adskillelse af tekster, der gør meningsforudsigelserne menneskelig læsbare ved at give fortolkelige ord sans opgørelser, sanse repræsentationer og adskillelsesresultater. Vi leverer en offentlig API, der muliggør problemfri integration.', 'id': 'Interpretabilitas model prediksi adalah fitur yang kuat yang mendapatkan kepercayaan pengguna dalam persamaan prediksi. In word sense disambiguation (WSD), knowledge-based systems tend to be much more interpretable than knowledge-free counterparts as they rely on the wealth of manually-encoded elements representing word senses, such as hypernyms, usage examples, and images.  Kami mempersembahkan sistem WSD yang menyambungkan ruang antara dua kelompok metode yang terputus sejauh ini. Namun, sistem kita, menyediakan akses ke beberapa model WSD terbaik, bertujuan untuk diterjemahkan sebagai sistem berdasarkan pengetahuan sementara itu tetap benar-benar tidak diawasi dan tanpa pengetahuan. Alat yang dipaparkan mengandung antarmuka web untuk menyambiguasi semua kata dari teks yang membuat akal prediksi manusia dapat dibaca dengan menyediakan inventori akal perkataan yang dapat diterjemahkan, representation akal, dan hasil menyambiguasi. Kami menyediakan API publik, memungkinkan integrasi tanpa henti.', 'de': 'Die Interpretierbarkeit eines Vorhersagemodells ist eine leistungsstarke Funktion, die das Vertrauen der Nutzer in die Richtigkeit der Vorhersagen gewinnt. In der Wortsinn-Disambiguation (WSD) sind wissensbasierte Systeme tendenziell viel besser interpretierbar als wissensfreie Pendants, da sie sich auf die Fülle von manuell codierten Elementen stützen, die Wortsinne repräsentieren, wie Hypernyme, Anwendungsbeispiele und Bilder. Wir präsentieren ein WSD-System, das die Lücke zwischen diesen beiden bisher getrennten Gruppen von Methoden überbrückt. Unser System, das Zugang zu mehreren modernen WSD-Modellen bietet, zielt darauf ab, als wissensbasiertes System interpretierbar zu sein, während es völlig unbeaufsichtigt und wissensfrei bleibt. Das vorgestellte Tool verfügt über eine Web-Schnittstelle zur Ganzwortdisambiguation von Texten, die die Sinnesvorhersagen menschlich lesbar macht, indem interpretierbare Wortsinninventare, Sinnesrepräsentationen und Disambiguationsergebnisse bereitgestellt werden. Wir bieten eine öffentliche API, die eine nahtlose Integration ermöglicht.', 'ko': '예측 모델의 해석성은 강력한 기능으로 사용자로 하여금 예측의 정확성을 믿게 할 수 있다.의미 분리(WSD)에서 단어의 의미를 나타내는 수동 인코딩 요소, 예를 들어 초어, 용법 예제 및 이미지와 같은 수많은 단어의 의미를 나타내는 수동 인코딩 요소에 의존하기 때문에 지식 기반 시스템은 종종 지식이 없는 시스템보다 해석하기 쉽다.우리는 두 그룹이 지금까지 연결되지 않은 방법 사이의 차이를 보완하는 WSD 시스템을 제시했다.즉, 우리 시스템은 몇 가지 가장 선진적인 수무서 모델에 대한 방문을 제공하여 이를 지식 기반의 시스템으로 해석하고 감독과 지식이 완전히 없는 상태를 유지하기 위한 것이다.이 도구는 텍스트의 모든 단어의 변조를 위한 웹 인터페이스를 제공합니다. 해석 가능한 의미 목록, 의미 표시, 변조 결과를 제공함으로써 의미 예측을 읽을 수 있습니다.원활한 통합을 위한 공용 API를 제공합니다.', 'sw': 'Utafsiri wa muundo unaotabiri ni tabia yenye nguvu inayopata imani ya watumiaji katika ukweli wa utabiri. Kwa maana ya kutofautisha kwa maneno (WSD), mifumo yenye ufahamu huenda kuwa na ufafanuzi zaidi ya wapinzani wasio na ufahamu kwa sababu wanategemea utajiri wa vifaa vilivyoandikwa kwa mikononi kuwaonyesha hisia za maneno kama vile mifano ya matumizi, na picha. Tunaonyesha mfumo wa WSD unaohusisha tofauti kati ya makundi haya mawili mpaka sasa yanayohusiana na njia. Jina hilo, mfumo wetu, kwa kutoa upatikanaji wa mifano kadhaa ya sanaa ya WSD, inakusudia kutafsiri kama mfumo wa maarifa wakati huo bado hauna ufahamu kabisa. Kifaa hicho kinachotolewa kinaonyesha mtandao wa intaneti kwa ajili ya kukanganisha maneno yote ya maandishi yanayoweza kuwa na maana ya kutabiri binadamu yanaweza kusoma kwa kutoa ubunifu wa maana, uwakilishi wa maana, na matokeo ya kutokubalika. Tunatoa API ya umma, inawezesha ushirikiano usio na bahari.', 'fa': 'قابلیت توضیح یک مدل پیش\u200cبینی یک ویژه قدرتمند است که اعتماد کاربران را در درستی پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cگیرد. به عنوان مفهوم ناآزمایش (WSD) سیستم\u200cهای علمی بیشتر از همکاران بدون علم است که بر ثروت عناصر\u200cهای دستی که نشان می\u200cدهند حس\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها، مثل هیپرنیم، مثال\u200cهای استفاده و تصاویر، اعتماد دارند. ما سیستم WSD را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که فاصله بین این دو گروه\u200cهای متصل شده تا الان را برابر می\u200cکند. به عنوان سیستم ما، دسترسی به چند مدل موقعیت هنری WSD، هدف می\u200cدهد که به عنوان سیستم بر اساس علم قابل تعبیر شود، در حالی که کاملا غیرقابل تحسین و آزاد دانش باقی ماند. ابزار پیش\u200cفرستاده\u200cای یک برنامه\u200cی وب برای ناتوان کردن تمام کلمه\u200cهای متن را نشان می\u200cدهد که پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای منطقی را قابل خواندن بشر می\u200cسازد با تولید اختراع حس کلمه\u200cای که قابل تعبیر می\u200cشود، نمایش حس و نتایج نا ما یک API عمومی را تغییر می دهیم، که اجازه می دهد تغییر بی ارزش.', 'hr': 'Razumljivost predvidnog model a je moćna osobina koja dobija povjerenje korisnika u ispravnosti predviđanja. U riječima razmišljanja o disambiguaciji (WSD), sustavi na znanju čine se mnogo više interpretirati od kolega bez znanja jer se oslanjaju na bogatstvo ručno kodiranih elementa koji predstavljaju čula riječi, poput hipernima, primjera korištenja i slika. Predstavljamo sustav WSD-a koji predstavlja prazninu između ove dvije do sada isključene grupe metoda. U imenu, naš sustav, pružajući pristup nekoliko modela umjetnosti WSD-a, ciljeva je da se interpretiraju kao sustav na temelju znanja, dok ostaje potpuno neodređen i bez znanja. Predstavljeni alat uključuje internetski interfejs za razmazivanje tekstova koji čini osjećajne predviđanja ljudskim čitanjem pružajući pronalaženje interpretabilnih riječi smisla, predstavljanja osjećaja i rezultate disambigacije. Mi pružamo javnu API, omogućavajući beznačajnu integraciju.', 'tr': "Önümüzdeki bir model'in öngörümliliği güçlü bir özelliktir. Kullanıcıların öngörümlerin doğruluğuna güvenilir. Sözlerde göçürmek (WSD), bilim sistemalary bilim ýok sanlaryndan ködleme aňsat aňsat aňsat aňsat aňsat aňsat aňsat aňsat elementleriň baýramyna ynanýarlar, mysal ýaly hipernim, ullanç örnekleri we suratlaryň bardygyna ynanýarlar. Biz bu iki yöntemden uzaklaşmak üçin WSD sistemini gösteriyoruz. Adatça biziň sistemamyz, sanat WSD nusgalaryna gol berýän birnäçe möhüm modalary bolup bilgi sistemasyna terjime edip bilmeýän bir sistem bolup geçirilýär. Bu araç çözümlendirilen metinlerin tüm kelimelerden çözümlenmek üçin bir Web arayüzünü tanımlayar. Bu, insan okuyabilir kelime duygu icat etmeleri, duygu temsilleri we çözümlenme netijesini sağlayarak düşünebilir. Biz jemgyýetli API-ny temin edýäris, ymyksyz integrasy barlap bilýäris.", 'am': 'የቀድሞው የሞዴል ትርጓሜ የውይይት ውይይት በሚያሳየው ተጠቃሚዎች ማመነታችንን የሚያገኝ ኃይለኛ ስርዓት ነው፡፡ በንግግር ግንኙነት (WSD)፣ እውቀት-መሠረት እውቀት-ነፃ ተቃዋሚዎች ላይ ከመጠቀም ይልቅ የሚተረጉም ነው፡፡ በሁለቱ መካከል የግንኙነት የሥርዓት ክፍሎች የሚቆርጥ የWSD ስርዓት እናቀርባለን፡፡ በተባለው ስርዓታችን፣ የጦማር አካባቢ አካባቢ እና እውቀት ነፃ ሳይኖር እውቀት የቋንቋ ሥርዓት መሆኑን መተርጉም ይችላል፡፡ የተጠቃሚው መሣሪያው የቃላትን ሁሉንም መቀናቀል የሚያስፈልገውን የንግግር ማስታወቂያውን፣ የስህተት መልዕክቶች እና ፍሬቶችን በመስጠት የሚችል የንግግር ማስታወቂያውን የሚያስተውል የጽሑፎችን ማቀናቀል የዌብ Interface ታይ ነው፡፡ We provide a public API, enabling seamless integration.', 'af': "Interpretabiliteit van 'n voorskou model is 'n kragtige funksie wat die vertroue van gebruikers in die korrekheid van die voorskou kry. In woord sens ontsammings (WSD), kennis-gebaseerde stelsels tendeer om baie meer te interpreteer as kennis-vry kunstenaars as hulle vertrou op die rykdom van hand-enkodeerde elemente wat word senses verteenwoordig, soos hypernime, gebruiksvoorbeelde en beelde. Ons stel 'n WSD stelsel wat die spasie tussen hierdie twee so ver ontkoppelde groepe van metodes gebruik. Naam, ons stelsel, verskaf toegang tot verskeie staat van die kuns WSD-modele, doel om te interpreteer as 'n kennis-gebaseerde stelsel terwyl dit heeltemal nie onderwerp en kennis-vry bly. Die voorgestelde hulpmiddel funksie 'n Web koppelvlak vir alle woorde ontsamming van teks wat die sens voorskoue menslike leesbaar maak deur te verskaf uitleggbare woorde sin inventories, sens voorskou en ontsamming resultate te verskaf. Ons verskaf 'n publieke API, en dit aktiveer sonderlik integrasie.", 'hy': 'Նախատեսողական մոդելի մեկնաբանելիությունը հզոր հատկություն է, որը մեծանում է օգտագործողների վստահությունը կանխատեսումների ճիշտության մեջ: Բառային իմաստով բառային բառերի անբացատրությունը գիտելիքի հիմնված համակարգերը հակված են ավելի շատ մեկնաբանելի, քան գիտելիքից ազատ համագործակալները, քանի որ դրանք հիմնված են ձեռքով կոդավորված տարրերի հարստությանը, որոնք ներկայացնում են բառային զգացմունքներ, ինչպիսիք են հիպերնիմները, օգտագործման օրինակ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի համակարգ, որը կապում է այս երկու մինչ այժմ անկապ մեթոդների խմբերի միջև եղած տարբերությունը: Հատկապես, մեր համակարգը, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմաթիվ ամենահետաքրքիր համակարգչային զարգացման մոդելների հասանելիությունը, նպատակն է դառնալ մեկնաբանելի որպես գիտելիքի հիմնված համակարգ, մինչդեռ այն մնում է լիովին անվերահսկված և ան Այս ներկայացված գործիքը ունի վեբ ինտերֆեյս բոլոր բառերի բառերի բացատրելու համար, որը նշանակում է, որ կանխատեսումները մարդկային կարելի է կարդալ՝ տրամադրելով մեկնաբանելի բառերի զգայարանների գյուղեր, զգայարանների ներկայացումներ և բացատրելի արդյու Մենք հանրային API-ն ենք տրամադրում, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս անընդհատ ինտեգրացիան:', 'bn': 'ভবিষ্যত মডেলের ব্যাখ্যা হচ্ছে একটি শক্তিশালী বৈশিষ্ট্য যা ভবিষ্যতের সঠিকভাবে ব্যবহারকারীদের বিশ্বাস পায়। শব্দের মানসিক বিভ্রান্তিতে জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক ব্যবস্থা জ্ঞান-মুক্ত প্রতিপক্ষের চেয়ে অনেক বেশী ব্যাখ্যা করে যেহেতু তারা নিজেরা শব্দের অনুভূতির সম্পদের উপর আমরা একটি ডিউএসডি সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করছি যা এই দুই দলের মধ্যে বিভ্রান্ত প্রকাশ করে। নাম, আমাদের সিস্টেম, বেশ কয়েকটি শিল্প-শিল্পী ডিউএসডি মডেলে প্রবেশ করার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম হিসেবে ব্যাখ্যা কর উপস্থিত টুলটি সকল শব্দের বিভ্রান্তির জন্য একটি ওয়েব ইন্টারফেস দেখাচ্ছে যা মানুষের প্রতি পাঠানোর মাধ্যমে মানুষের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী পাঠ করা যায়, য আমরা একটা পাবলিক এপিআই প্রদান করি, সীমিলেসের সাথে একত্রিত করতে পারি।', 'sq': 'Interpretueshmëria e një modeli parashikues është një karakteristikë e fuqishme që fiton besimin e përdoruesve në saktësinë e parashikimeve. In word sense disambiguation (WSD), knowledge-based systems tend to be much more interpretable than knowledge-free counterparts as they rely on the wealth of manually-encoded elements representing word senses, such as hypernyms, usage examples, and images.  Ne paraqesim një sistem WSD që lidh dallimin midis këtyre dy grupeve metodash deri tani të shkëputur. Së pari, sistemi ynë, duke ofruar akses ndaj disa modeleve më të lartë të WSD, synon të interpretohet si një sistem i bazuar në njohuri ndërsa mbetet krejtësisht i pazgjidhur dhe pa njohuri. Mjet i paraqitur paraqet një interfaqe interneti për çambiguacionin e të gjitha fjalëve të teksteve që e bën kuptimin parashikimet njerëzore të lexueshme duke ofruar inventare të interpretueshme të kuptimit të fjalës, përfaqësime të kuptimit dhe rezultate të çambiguacionit. Ne ofrojmë një API publik, duke mundësuar integrimin e paqëndrueshëm.', 'bs': 'Razumljivost predvidnog model a je moćna karakteristika koja dobija povjerenje korisnika u ispravnosti predviđanja. U smislu razmišljanja o disambiguaciji (WSD), sistemi na znanju često su interpretabilniji od kolega bez znanja jer se oslanjaju na bogatstvo ručno kodiranih elementa koji predstavljaju čula riječi, poput hipernima, primjera korištenja i slika. Predstavljamo WSD sistem koji se premješta praznine između tih dva do sada isključenih grupa metoda. U imenu, naš sistem, pružajući pristup nekoliko modela umjetnosti WSD-a, cilj je da bude interpretabilan kao sistem na temelju znanja, dok ostaje potpuno neodređen i bez znanja. Predstavljeni alat uključuje internetsku interfejsu za razmazivanje svih riječi teksta koji čini predviđanja smisla ljudskim čitanjem pružajući pronalaženje interpretabilnih riječi, predstavljanja osjećaja i rezultate disambigacije. Mi pružamo javnu API, omogućavajući bezveznu integraciju.', 'az': 'Önümüzdeki model in anlaşılması güclü bir özellikdir ki, tədbirlərin doğruluğunda istifadəçilərin güvenini qazanır. Sözlük anlayışında, elm sistemləri elm olmayan dostlarından daha çox anlaşılabilir, çünki onlar öz əlində kodlanmış elementlərin malına təvəkkül edirlər, söz duygularını göstərirlər, həmçinin hipernimlər, istifadə məsəlləri və şəkillərini göstərirlər. Biz bu ikisinin arasındakı uzaqlaşmasını körpəyən WSD sistemini göstəririk. Əslində, bizim sistemimiz, bir neçə sanatlı WSD modellərinə erişiklik sağlayaraq, elm sistemi ilə təfsil edilməyə niyyət edir, çünki bu tamamilə müəyyən edilməz və elm olmaz. Görünən vasitəsi, insanların oxuyabiləcək mətnlərin bütün sözlərin səhv edilməsi üçün Web interfejsini təsdiqləyir. Bu məlumat insanın oxuyabiləcəyi tədbirləri təsdiqləyir. Biz halqsız API təklif edirik, təhlükəsiz integrasiya qabilleştiririk.', 'cs': 'Interpretovatelnost prediktivního modelu je výkonnou funkcí, která získává důvěru uživatelů v správnost predikcí. Systémy založené na znalostech bývají mnohem více interpretovatelné než protějšky bez znalostí, protože spoléhají na bohatství ručně kódovaných prvků reprezentujících slovní smysly, jako jsou hypernymy, příklady použití a obrázky. Představujeme WSD systém, který překlenuje mezeru mezi těmito dvěma dosud odpojenými skupinami metod. Konkrétně náš systém, který poskytuje přístup k několika nejmodernějším modelům WSD, si klade za cíl být interpretovatelný jako systém založený na znalostech a zůstává zcela bez dohledu a bez znalostí. Prezentovaný nástroj obsahuje webové rozhraní pro celoslovní rozcestnění textů, které umožňuje čitelnost předpovědí smyslu pro člověka poskytováním interpretovatelných inventářů slovních smyslů, reprezentací smyslů a výsledků rozcestnění. Poskytujeme veřejné API, které umožňuje bezproblémovou integraci.', 'ca': "L'interpretabilitat d'un model predictiu és una característica poderosa que guanya la confiança dels usuaris en la correctesa de les prediccions. En termes de desambiguació (DEM), els sistemes basats en el coneixement tendeixen a ser molt més interpretables que els homologues sense coneixement mentre confien en la riquesa d'elements codificats manualment que representen sentits de paraula, com hipernims, exemples d'ús i imatges. Presentam un sistema de DEM que ajusta l'espai entre aquests dos grups de mètodes fins ara desconnectats. En concret, el nostre sistema, proporcionant accés a diversos models de DEM d'última generació, mira a ser interpretable com a sistema basat en el coneixement mentre encara no està supervisat i sense coneixement. L'eina presentada té una interfície web per desambiguar els textos amb totes les paraules que fan sentit prediccions que poden llegir humans proporcionant inventaris interpretables de sentit de paraules, representacions de sentit i resultats de desambiguació. Ens proporcionem una API pública, que permet una integració senzilla.", 'fi': 'Ennustemallin tulkittavuus on tehokas ominaisuus, joka saa käyttäjien luottamuksen ennusteiden oikeellisuuteen. Sanaaistien erottelussa (WSD) tietoon perustuvat järjestelmät ovat usein paljon ymmärrettävämpiä kuin tietovapaat vastineet, koska ne luottavat sanaaistia edustavien manuaalisesti koodattujen elementtien, kuten hypernyymien, käyttöesimerkkien ja kuvien, runsauteen. Esittelemme WSD-järjestelmän, joka kuroo umpeen näiden kahden toistaiseksi toisistaan irrallisen menetelmäryhmän välistä kuilua. Järjestelmämme, joka tarjoaa pääsyn useisiin huippuluokan WSD-malleihin, pyrkii tulkittavaksi tietoon perustuvaksi järjestelmäksi, vaikka se pysyy täysin valvomattomana ja tietottomana. Esitetyssä työkalussa on web-käyttöliittymä tekstien sanakohtaista erittelyä varten, joka tekee järkeennusteista ihmisen luettavissa tarjoamalla tulkittavissa olevia sanamerkityksiä, merkityksiä ja erottelutuloksia. Tarjoamme julkisen API:n, joka mahdollistaa saumattoman integroinnin.', 'et': 'Ennustusmudeli tõlgendatavus on võimas funktsioon, mis võidab kasutajate usalduse prognooside õigsuse vastu. Sõnatähenduse eristamise (WSD) puhul kipuvad teadmistepõhised süsteemid olema palju tõlgendatavamad kui teadmistevabad süsteemid, kuna nad tuginevad käsitsi kodeeritud elementidele, mis esindavad sõnatundeid, nagu hüpernüümid, kasutusnäited ja pildid. Esitleme WSD süsteemi, mis ületab lõhe nende kahe seni lahutatud meetodite rühma vahel. Nimelt on meie süsteem, mis pakub juurdepääsu mitmetele tipptasemel WSD mudelitele, eesmärk tõlgendada kui teadmistepõhine süsteem, kuid see jääb täiesti järelevalveta ja teadmistevabaks. Esitatud tööriist sisaldab veebiliidet tekstide kõigi sõnade selgitamiseks, mis muudab mõtteprognoosid inimesele loetavaks, pakkudes tõlgendatavaid sõnade tähenduste inventuure, tähenduste esitamist ja selgituste tulemusi. Pakume avalikku API-d, mis võimaldab sujuvat integratsiooni.', 'jv': 'Jejaring (WSD) Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem WSD sing bisa mbelak iki dadi iki dadi iki dadi, karo hal-hal koyok barang maneh. Nanging, sistem awak dhéwé, nggawe akses ditulak liyane karo model sing wis antar tentang WSD, iki dadi sing bisa ditambangakke sistem sing basa awak dhéwé sapa-sistem sing ora bisa nguasai perusahaan lan ora kebebasané awak dhéwé. Tool Options Awak dhéwé ngewehke Api publik, iso nguasakno akeh di-telakot.', 'sk': 'Razlagljivost napovednega modela je močna funkcija, ki pridobi zaupanje uporabnikov v pravilnost napovedi. V besednem smislu so sistemi, ki temeljijo na znanju, običajno veliko bolj razložljivi kot brez znanja, saj se zanašajo na bogastvo ročno kodiranih elementov, ki predstavljajo besedne čute, kot so hipernimi, primeri uporabe in slike. Predstavljamo sistem WSD, ki premosti vrzel med tema dvema doslej nepovezanima skupinama metod. Namen našega sistema, ki zagotavlja dostop do več najsodobnejših modelov WSD, je namreč razlagati kot sistem, ki temelji na znanju, medtem ko ostaja popolnoma nenadzorovan in brez znanja. Predstavljeno orodje vključuje spletni vmesnik za razjasnitev besedil z vsemi besedami, ki omogoča človeško berljive smiselne napovedi z zagotavljanjem razložljivih popisov besednih pomenov, predstavitev smisla in rezultatov razjasnitve. Zagotavljamo javni API, ki omogoča brezhibno integracijo.', 'ha': "Tsariya wa misalin wani mai basĩri shi ne mai ƙarfi wanda yana sãmu aminci ga masu amfani da shi cikin gaskiyar da za'a gaskata na gabanin. In sunãɓa da maganar (WSD), na'urar da aka sani, za'a zama mafi fassar na fassarar masu da ilmi ba da kuma sunã dõgara a kan dũkiyar abubuwa da hannayen da aka rubũta saurãre, kamar misãlai da amfani da zanen. Tuna halatar da wani na WSD wanda ke samar da tsakanin waɗannan ƙungiyõyi biyu da aka haɗu zuwa yanzu. Sunan, na'urarmu, da za'a iya samun abinci zuwa misãlai-na-sanar-WSD, yana kasa yin fassara kamar wata na'anar da ilmi a lokacin da za'a tsare ta cikakken da ba'a da ilmi ba. Wannan zanar da aka bãyar da shi yana da wani interfeci na Web dõmin rarrabẽwa duk magana na littattafai wanda yana da muhimmi wanda za'a karatun mutum da shi ya sauƙa ƙara fassarar magana da za'a fassara bakwai masu fassara, masu gaya da mazaɓa da fassara. Munã samun wata ApplI na sami, yana iya samun haɗi da fara.", 'he': 'הפרשנות של מודל צפוי היא תכונה חזקה שמזכה את האמון של המשתמשים בתיקנות של הצפויות. במובן מילים, ניתוח מילים (WSD), מערכות מבוססות על ידע נוטים להיות הרבה יותר ניתנות לפרש מאשר שותפים חסרי ידע כיוון שהם סומכים על העושר של אלמנטים מוצפנים ידנית שמייצגים חושים מילים, כמו היפרנימות, דוגמאות השימוש, ותמונות. אנחנו מציגים מערכת WSD שמגשרת את הפער בין שני קבוצות השיטות הנפרדות עד כה. Namely, our system, providing access to several state-of-the-art WSD models, aims to be interpretable as a knowledge-based system while it remains completely unsupervised and knowledge-free. הכלי המוצגן מכיל ממשק אינטרנט עבור ניתוח כל מילים של טקסטים שמביא את הגיון לחזויות אנושיות קריאות על ידי סיפק מילוי חוש מילים אפשרי לפרשנות, מייצגים חוש, ותוצאות ניתוח ניתוח. We provide a public API, enabling seamless integration.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཅན་ཅིག་རེད། In word sense disambiguation (WSD), knowledge-based systems tend to be much more interpretable than knowledge-free counterparts as they rely on the wealth of manually-encoded elements representing word senses, such as hypernyms, usage examples, and images. ང་ཚོས་WSD མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་འདིའི་བར་ནམ་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་ཚོ་ཁག་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མ་ཟད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་WSD་ཁག་ཅིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ The presented tool features a Web interface for all-word disambiguation of texts that makes the sense predictions human readable by providing interpretable word sense inventories, sense representations, and disambiguation results. ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་གི་API སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་དང་ཐད་མེད་པའི་ཆ་ཁྲིད་སྒྲུབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'SupWSD : A Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'ar': 'SupWSD: مجموعة أدوات مرنة لتوضيح معنى الكلمة تحت الإشراف', 'pt': 'SupWSD: Um kit de ferramentas flexível para desambiguação supervisionada do Word Sense', 'es': 'SupWSD: un kit de herramientas flexible para la desambiguación supervisada del sentido de las palabras', 'fr': 'SupWSD\xa0: une boîte à outils flexible pour la désambiguïsation supervisée du sens des', 'ja': 'SupWSD ：監視されたワードセンスの曖昧さ解消のための柔軟なツールキット', 'hi': 'SupWSD: पर्यवेक्षित वर्ड सेंस बहुविकल्पी के लिए एक लचीला टूलकिट', 'zh': 'SupWSD:利用监督式词义消歧工具包', 'ru': 'SupWSD: Гибкий инструментарий для контролируемого размывания смысла слов', 'ga': 'SupWSD: Foireann Uirlisí Solúbtha le haghaidh Dídhébhríocht Focal faoi Mhaoirseacht', 'el': 'Ένα ευέλικτο κιτ εργαλείων για την εποπτευόμενη αποσαφήνιση της αίσθησης λέξεων', 'hu': 'SupWSD: Rugalmas eszközkészlet a felügyelt Word Sense szétbontásához', 'ka': 'SupWSD: სტლექსიბური ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა სიტყვების განსხვავება', 'it': 'SupWSD: un kit di strumenti flessibile per la disambiguazione supervisionata del senso delle parole', 'kk': 'SupWSD: Бақылау мәліметтің сезімін бұғаттау үшін жылғыз құралдар панелі', 'mk': 'SupWSD: Flexible Toolkit за надгледувано раздвојување на чувството на зборот', 'lt': 'SupWSD: lankstus įrankių rinkinys, skirtas kontroliuojamam žodžių jutimo nesuderinimui', 'ms': 'SupWSD: Satu Kit Alat Fleksibel untuk Pemindahan Sensa Perkataan Diperhatikan', 'ml': 'SupWSD: Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'mt': 'SupWSD: Sett ta’ Għodod Flessibbli għad-Diżambigwazzjoni tas-Sens tal-Kliem Sorveljat', 'mn': 'SupWSD: Хэрэглэгдсэн үгний мэдрэмжийн сэтгэл хөдлөлт', 'pl': 'SupWSD: Elastyczny zestaw narzędzi do nadzorowanego rozłączania zmysłu słowa', 'no': 'SupWSD: Eit fleksibel verktøykassett for oversikt av ordførsel', 'ro': 'SupWSD: Un kit de instrumente flexibil pentru dezambiguizarea supravegheată a sensului Word', 'sr': 'SupWSD: Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'si': 'supWSD: පරීක්ෂණය කරපු වචන සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අක්\u200dරීය කරන්න සැකසුම් උපකරණ කිට්', 'ta': 'SupWSD: Superwatched Word Sense Dissemination', 'ur': 'SupWSD: Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation کے لئے ایک فلکسیبل تولیک کیٹ', 'sv': 'SupWSD: Ett flexibelt verktygspaket för övervakad ordkänsla Disambiguation', 'so': 'SupWSD: A Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambition', 'vi': 'SupWSD: Một dụng cụ sửa chữa chữa từ ngữ mách bảo.', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'SupWSD: Een flexibele Toolkit voor begeleide Word Sense Disambiguation', 'bg': 'Гъвкав инструментариум за контролирано разграничаване на чувството на думи', 'hr': 'SupWSD: Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'de': 'SupWSD: Ein flexibles Toolkit für überwachte Word Sense Disambiguation', 'ko': 'SupWSD: 유연한 감독어 의미 변조 도구 키트', 'da': 'SupWSD: Et fleksibelt værktøjssæt til overvåget Word Sense Disambiguation', 'sw': 'SupWSD: Kifaa cha Kifaa cha Kuhamishwa kwa Utangazaji wa Tamko', 'id': 'SupWSD: A Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'fa': 'SupWSD: یک کیت ابزار متفاوتی برای ناتوان کردن حس کلمه تحت نظر', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'SupWSD: Gözlemli Kelimi Senedleri Gaýşartmak üçin bir Fleksible Toolkit', 'af': "SupWSD: 'n Fleksible Nutsbalk vir Ondersoektog Woord Sense Ontbreking", 'hy': 'Դադար', 'sq': 'SupWSD: A Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'az': 'SupWSD: Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation üçün Flexible Toolkit', 'bn': 'SupWSD: Supervied Word Sense Disambiguation for Flexible toolkit', 'ca': "SupWSD: Un kit d'eines flexible per a desambiguar el sentit de paraules supervisades", 'bs': 'SupWSD: Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'et': 'SupWSD: paindlik tööriistakomplekt järelevalve sõnade tajumise disambiguatsiooniks', 'cs': 'SupWSD: Flexibilní sada nástrojů pro kontrolované rozjasnění smyslu slova', 'fi': 'SupWSD: Joustava työkalupaketti valvottuun sanaaistin hajottamiseen', 'jv': 'supWSD:Aowar Floksible Tool lkit kanggo super-Vised Word Sense disabled', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'SupWSD: Prilagodljiv nabor orodij za nadzorovano razjasnitev besednega zaznavanja', 'he': 'SupWSD: A Flexible Toolkit for Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation', 'bo': 'SupWSD: Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation ལ་ཆུང་ཆུང་བའི་ལག་ཆ་སྒྲུབ་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'In this demonstration we present SupWSD, a Java API for supervised Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). This toolkit includes the implementation of a state-of-the-art supervised WSD system, together with a Natural Language Processing pipeline for preprocessing and feature extraction. Our aim is to provide an easy-to-use tool for the research community, designed to be modular, fast and scalable for training and testing on large datasets. The source code of SupWSD is available at.http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD.\n    ', 'ar': 'في هذا العرض التوضيحي ، نقدم SupWSD ، واجهة برمجة تطبيقات Java لتوضيح تحسس الكلمات تحت الإشراف (WSD). تتضمن مجموعة الأدوات هذه تنفيذ أحدث نظام WSD خاضع للإشراف ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع خط أنابيب معالجة اللغة الطبيعية للمعالجة المسبقة واستخراج الميزات. هدفنا هو توفير أداة سهلة الاستخدام لمجتمع البحث ، مصممة لتكون معيارية وسريعة وقابلة للتطوير للتدريب والاختبار على مجموعات البيانات الكبيرة. الكود المصدري لـ SupWSD متاح على <http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>.', 'es': 'En esta demostración presentamos SupWSD, una API de Java para la desambiguación supervisada del sentido de palabras (WSD). Este kit de herramientas incluye la implementación de un sistema WSD supervisado de última generación, junto con una canalización de procesamiento del lenguaje natural para el preprocesamiento y la extracción de funciones. Nuestro objetivo es proporcionar una herramienta fácil de usar para la comunidad investigadora, diseñada para ser modular, rápida y escalable para la capacitación y las pruebas en grandes conjuntos de datos. El código fuente de SupWSD está disponible en < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'pt': 'Nesta demonstração apresentamos o SupWSD, uma API Java para Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) supervisionado. Este kit de ferramentas inclui a implementação de um sistema WSD supervisionado de última geração, juntamente com um pipeline de processamento de linguagem natural para pré-processamento e extração de recursos. Nosso objetivo é fornecer uma ferramenta fácil de usar para a comunidade de pesquisa, projetada para ser modular, rápida e escalável para treinamento e teste em grandes conjuntos de dados. O código fonte do SupWSD está disponível em <http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>.', 'fr': "Dans cette démonstration, nous présentons SupWSD, une API Java pour la désambiguïsation Word Sense (WSD) supervisée. Cette boîte à outils comprend la mise en œuvre d'un système WSD supervisé de pointe, ainsi qu'un pipeline de traitement du langage naturel pour le prétraitement et l'extraction de fonctionnalités. Notre objectif est de fournir un outil facile à utiliser pour la communauté des chercheurs, conçu pour être modulaire, rapide et évolutif pour la formation et les tests sur de grands ensembles de données. Le code source de SupWSD est disponible à l'adresse < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.", 'ja': 'このデモでは、Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD)のためのJava APIであるSupWSDを紹介します。このツールキットには、最先端の監視されたWSDシステムの実装と、前処理と機能抽出のための自然言語処理パイプラインが含まれています。当社の目的は、大規模なデータセットのトレーニングとテストのためにモジュール化され、高速でスケーラブルに設計された、研究コミュニティのための使いやすいツールを提供することです。SupWSDのソースコードはで入手できる<http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>。', 'zh': '本演 SupWSD,所以监督式词感消歧义 (WSD) 之 Java API也。 工具包最先进者受监督之 WSD 统,及预处理特征提取自然语言管道。 所以考社区易用之具,模块化速可广,试以大集。 SupWSD之源代码可<http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>。', 'ru': 'В этой демонстрации мы представляем SupWSD, Java API для контролируемой раздвоения смысла слова (WSD). Этот инструментарий включает в себя внедрение современной контролируемой системы WSD вместе с трубопроводом обработки на естественном языке для предварительной обработки и извлечения признаков. Наша цель - предоставить простой в использовании инструмент для исследовательского сообщества, разработанный как модульный, быстрый и масштабируемый для обучения и тестирования на больших наборах данных. Исходный код SupWSD доступен по адресу<http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>.', 'hi': 'इस प्रदर्शन में हम SupWSD, पर्यवेक्षित Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) के लिए एक जावा एपीआई प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इस टूलकिट में प्रीप्रोसेसिंग और फीचर निष्कर्षण के लिए एक प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण पाइपलाइन के साथ-साथ एक अत्याधुनिक पर्यवेक्षित डब्ल्यूएसडी सिस्टम का कार्यान्वयन शामिल है। हमारा उद्देश्य अनुसंधान समुदाय के लिए एक आसान-से-उपयोग उपकरण प्रदान करना है, जिसे बड़े डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण के लिए मॉड्यूलर, तेज और स्केलेबल होने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। SupWSD का स्रोत कोड <http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD> पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ga': 'Sa léiriú seo cuirimid i láthair SupWSD, API Java le haghaidh Díathriú Word Sense (WSD). Áirítear leis an bhfoireann uirlisí seo cur i bhfeidhm an chórais WSD maoirsithe úrscothach, mar aon le píblíne Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha le haghaidh réamhphróiseála agus eastóscadh gnéithe. Tá sé mar aidhm againn uirlis atá éasca le húsáid a sholáthar don phobal taighde, atá deartha le bheith modúlach, tapa agus inscálaithe le haghaidh oiliúna agus tástála ar thacair shonraí mhóra. Tá cód foinse SupWSD ar fáil ag <http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την επίδειξη παρουσιάζουμε το SupWSD, ένα API για την επιτηρημένη αποσαφήνιση της αίσθησης λέξεων (WSD). Αυτή η εργαλειοθήκη περιλαμβάνει την εφαρμογή ενός υπερσύγχρονου εποπτευόμενου συστήματος σε συνδυασμό με έναν αγωγό επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας για προεπεξεργασία και εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών. Στόχος μας είναι να παρέχουμε ένα εύχρηστο εργαλείο για την ερευνητική κοινότητα, σχεδιασμένο να είναι μορφωματικό, γρήγορο και κλιμακωτό για εκπαίδευση και δοκιμές σε μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας του SupWSD είναι διαθέσιμος στο < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'hu': 'Ebben a bemutatóban bemutatjuk a SupWSD-t, egy Java API a felügyelt Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Ez az eszköztár magában foglalja egy korszerű felügyelt WSD rendszer megvalósítását, valamint egy természetes nyelv feldolgozási csővezetéket az előfeldolgozáshoz és a funkciók kitermeléséhez. Célunk, hogy egy könnyen használható eszközt biztosítsunk a kutatóközösség számára, amelyet úgy terveztünk, hogy moduláris, gyors és skálázható legyen a nagy adatkészleteken történő képzéshez és teszteléshez. A SupWSD forráskódja elérhető < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'ka': 'ამ დემონსტრაციაში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ SupWSD-ს, Java API მონახვა სიტყვის სიტყვის განსხვავება (WSD). ეს ხელსაწყობილობის კონფიგურაცია აქვს სახელსაწყოთა სისტემა, რომელიც სახელსაწყოთა ენის პროცესირების კონფიგურაცია და ფუნქციების ექსტრექციისთვის. ჩვენი მიზეზი არის გამოყენება ადვილად გამოყენებელი ხელსაწყოთა საზოგადოებაში, რომელიც მოდულიური, ბრძნელი და სკალური იყოს დიდი მონაცემების საზოგადოებაში. SupWSD-ის მხოლოდ კოდი შესაძლებელია < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD - ეა.', 'it': "In questa dimostrazione presentiamo SupWSD, un'API Java per la disambiguazione supervisionata di Word Sense (WSD). Questo toolkit include l'implementazione di un sistema WSD supervisionato all'avanguardia, insieme a una pipeline Natural Language Processing per il preprocessing e l'estrazione delle funzionalità. Il nostro obiettivo è quello di fornire uno strumento facile da usare per la comunità di ricerca, progettato per essere modulare, veloce e scalabile per la formazione e il test su set di dati di grandi dimensioni. Il codice sorgente di SupWSD è disponibile su < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.", 'kk': 'Бұл демонстрациясында SupWSD- ті басқару үшін Java API дегенді көрсетедік. Бұл құралдар құрылғысының басқару жүйесінің күйін басқару жүйесінің іске асыру жүйесінің бірінде, өзгерту және қасиеттерді тарқату үшін Түзіндік тіл процессорының қабырғы жолымен Біздің мақсатымыз - зерттеу коммуникасының оңай пайдалану құралын қолдану, үлкен деректер жиындарында оқыту және сынақтау үшін модульдер, жылдам және мақсатты болу құралы. SupWSD көзі коды < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'mk': 'Во оваа демонстрација го претставуваме SupWSD, Java API за надгледувана Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Овој набор алатки вклучува спроведување на најсовремениот надгледуван систем на ВСД, заедно со гасовод за процес на природен јазик за препроцес и екстракција на карактеристики. Нашата цел е да обезбедиме лесна алатка за употреба за истражувачката заедница, дизајнирана да биде модуларна, брза и скалабилна за обука и тестирање на големи податоци. Изворниот код на SupWSD е достапен на < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'lt': 'In this demonstration we present SupWSD, a Java API for supervised Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD).  Šis priemonių rinkinys apima moderniausios prižiūrimos VSD sistemos įgyvendinimą kartu su gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo vamzdynu, skirtu paruošti apdorojimą ir savybių gavybą. Our aim is to provide an easy-to-use tool for the research community, designed to be modular, fast and scalable for training and testing on large datasets.  SupWSD šaltinio kodas pateikiamas < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'mt': 'F’din id-dimostrazzjoni nippreżentaw SupWSD, API ta’ Java għad-Diżambigwarazzjoni tas-Sens tal-Kliem (WSD) taħt superviżjoni. Dan is-sett ta’ għodod jinkludi l-implimentazzjoni ta’ sistema ta’ WSD sorveljata l-aktar avvanzata, flimkien ma’ pipeline ta’ Proċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali għall-ipproċessar minn qabel u l-estrazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi. L-għan tagħna huwa li tipprovdi għodda faċli għall-użu għall-komunità tar-riċerka, imfassla biex tkun modulari, mgħaġġla u skalabbli għat-taħriġ u l-ittestjar fuq settijiet ta’ dejta kbar. Il-kodiċi tas-sors ta’ SupWSD huwa disponibbli fuq < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സുപ്വാഡിയെ കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ജാവാ എപിഐ, വാക്ക് സെന്\u200dസ് ഡിസ്പിഗ്യൂഷന This toolkit includes the implementation of a state-of-the-art supervised WSD system, together with a Natural Language Processing pipeline for preprocessing and feature extraction.  നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന് ഒരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതാണ്, വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാസറ സുപ്ഡഡിയുടെ ഉറവിട കോഡ് ലഭ്യമല്ല < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'ms': 'Dalam demonstrasi ini kami perkenalkan SupWSD, API Java untuk penyelesaian Sensa Perkataan (WSD) yang dikendalikan. Kit alat ini termasuk pelaksanaan sistem WSD yang diawasi state-of-the-art, bersama dengan saluran paip Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami untuk pemprosesan dan ekstraksi ciri-ciri. Tujuan kami adalah untuk menyediakan alat mudah digunakan untuk komuniti kajian, direka untuk modular, cepat dan boleh skala untuk latihan dan ujian pada set data besar. Kod sumber SupWSD tersedia di < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'mn': 'Энэ үзүүлэлтийн дотор бид SupWSD, Java API-г удирдлагатай Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) гэж үзүүлнэ. Энэ багаж хэрэглэгчдийн хэрэглэгчийн компьютер дамжуулагдсан WSD системийн үйл ажиллагааны дамжуулалт болон байгалийн хэл Процессийн хоолойн шугам нь аль болон хувьсгал татах боломжтой. Бидний зорилго бол судалгааны нийгэмд амархан ашиглах хэрэгсэл хангамж өгөгдлийн санд суралцах, шалгах, хөгжүүлэх, хурдан, магадлал болгох юм. SupWSD-ын эх үүсвэр код < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'no': 'I denne demonstrasjonen presenterer vi SupWSD, ein Java API for oversikt av ordførsel- disambiguasjon (WSD). Denne verktøykassa inneheld implementasjonen av eit tilstand til kunstsystemet som er oversikt over WSD, saman med ein naturleg språk-handsamar-røyr for forhandsaming og utpakking av funksjonar. Målet vårt er å gje eit enkelt bruksverktøy for forskningssamfunnet, utforma for å vera modular, rask og skalerbar for trening og testing på store datasett. Kjeldekode for SupWSD er tilgjengeleg på < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'sr': 'U ovoj demonstraciji predstavljamo SupWSD, Java API za nadzornu disambigaciju osjećaja reči (WSD). Ovaj alat uključuje provedbu državnog sustava nadziranog WSD-a, zajedno sa prirodnom jezičkom procesorom cijevi za preobradu i izvlačenje funkcija. Naš cilj je pružiti jednostavan alat za upotrebu istraživačke zajednice, dizajniran da bude modular, brz i skalabilan za obuku i testiranje na velikim podacima. Izvorni kod SupWSD je dostupan na < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'ro': 'În această demonstrație vă prezentăm SupWSD, un API Java pentru dezambiguizarea supravegheată a sensului Word (WSD). Acest set de instrumente include implementarea unui sistem WSD supravegheat de ultimă generație, împreună cu o conductă de procesare a limbajului natural pentru pre-procesare și extragerea caracteristicilor. Scopul nostru este de a oferi un instrument ușor de utilizat comunității de cercetare, conceput pentru a fi modular, rapid și scalabil pentru instruire și testare pe seturi de date mari. Codul sursă al SupWSD este disponibil la < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'pl': 'W tym pokazie prezentujemy SupWSD, Java API do nadzorowanego rozporządzania zmysłu Word Sense (WSD). Ten zestaw narzędzi obejmuje wdrożenie najnowocześniejszego systemu nadzorowanego WSD wraz z rurociągiem Natural Language Processing do przetwarzania wstępnego i ekstrakcji funkcji. Naszym celem jest dostarczenie łatwego w użyciu narzędzia dla środowiska badawczego, zaprojektowanego tak, aby było modułowe, szybkie i skalowalne do szkolenia i testowania na dużych zbiorach danych. Kod źródłowy SupWSD jest dostępny pod adresem < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'si': 'මේ ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයේ අපි සුප්වාස්ඩ් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ, Java API විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ වචන සම්බන්ධය (WSD). මේ උපකරණ කිට් එක්ක තත්වය- of- the- art supervised WSD පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සමග ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාසික පායිප්ලින් එක්ක ප්\u200d අපේ අරමුණ තමයි පරීක්ෂණ සමාජයෙන් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් උපකරණයක් දෙන්න, මොඩ්යුලර්, වේගය හා වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ supWSD ගේ මූලික කෝඩ <at) http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'ta': 'இந்த காட்சியில் நாம் SupWSD, ஒரு ஜாவா API காண்பிக்கிறோம் வார்த்தை உணர்வு குழப்பம் (WSD). @ info: whatsthis எங்கள் இலக்கு ஆராய்ச்சி சமூகத்திற்கு எளிய பயன்படுத்தும் கருவி SupWSD மூல குறியீடு உள்ளது < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'so': 'Muujintan waxaan keenaynaa SupWSD, kaas oo ah Java API oo la ilaaliyo hadal Sense (WSD). Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay in lagu soo dejiyo nidaamka qoraalka farshaxanka ah oo WSD-ka ilaaliya, iyo qoraalka baaraandegista afka asalka ah oo la soo saaro horumarinta iyo waxyaabaha la soo saaro. Ujeedkeennu waa in loo siiyo qalabka isticmaalka oo fudud oo loo isticmaalo bulshada baaritaanka, kaas oo loo qoray inay noqdo mid qaabilsan, dhaqso iyo mid kaloo u baaraandegista waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka kamid ah. SupWSD kaararkiisu wuxuu ku jiraa < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'sv': 'I denna demonstration presenterar vi SupWSD, ett Java API för övervakad Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Denna verktygslåda innehåller implementering av ett toppmodernt övervakat WSD-system, tillsammans med en Natural Language Processing pipeline för förbehandling och funktionsutvinning. Vårt mål är att tillhandahålla ett lättanvänt verktyg för forskarsamhället, utformat för att vara modulärt, snabbt och skalbart för utbildning och testning på stora datauppsättningar. Källkoden för SupWSD finns tillgänglig på < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'ur': 'ہم اس دکھانے میں سوپ واس ڈی، ایک جاوا آپی (واس ڈی) کے لئے (واس ڈی) دکھاتے ہیں۔ یہ تولیک کیٹ ایک ایست کی نظارت والد سیسٹم کی عملومات میں شامل ہے، اور ایک طبیعی زبان پرینسی پائپ لین کے ساتھ پیش پرینسٹ اور فکرت اخراج کے لئے۔ ہمارا مطلب یہ ہے کہ تحقیق کمونٹی کے لئے آسان استعمال کا وسیلہ پیدا کریں، جو بڑے ڈیٹسٹ پر آموزش اور امتحان کرنے کے لئے موڈولر، سریع اور مقدار بنا دیا گیا ہے۔ SupWSD کے سراسر کوڈ <پر موجود ہے http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'uz': "Bu demonida biz soʻzni boshqarish (WSD) uchun Java API (Java API). Name Bizning maqsadimiz taʼminlovchi jamoasi uchun oddiy foydalanish asboblarini qo'shish, katta maʼlumotlar tizimlarida o'rganish va sinov qilish uchun modulyat, tez va tez va taʼminlovchi bo'lishi mumkin. SupWSD manba kodi <da mavjud emas http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.", 'vi': 'Trong cuộc biểu tình này, chúng tôi giới thiệu SupWSD, một API Java for managered Word sense Disaguation (WSD). Bộ đồ này bao gồm việc thực hiện một hệ thống WSD tối tân được giám sát, cùng với một đường ống xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho việc xử lý trước và khai thác các tính năng. Mục tiêu của chúng tôi là cung cấp một công cụ dễ sử dụng cho cộng đồng nghiên cứu, được thiết kế để có thể điều chỉnh, nhanh và dễ leo trèo để huấn luyện và thử nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu lớn. Đoạn mã gốc của SupWSD có thể dùng tại\'" http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD -̀.', 'bg': 'В тази демонстрация представяме Джава API за контролирано дисамбигуация на чувството на думи (WSD). Този инструментариум включва внедряване на най-съвременна надзорна система, заедно с тръбопровод за обработка на естествен език за предварителна обработка и извличане на функции. Нашата цел е да предоставим лесен за използване инструмент за изследователската общност, проектиран да бъде модулен, бърз и мащабируем за обучение и тестване на големи набори от данни. Изходният код на SupWSD е достъпен на < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'nl': 'In deze demonstratie presenteren we SupWSD, een Java API voor begeleide Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Deze toolkit omvat de implementatie van een state-of-the-art begeleid WSD-systeem, samen met een Natural Language Processing pijplijn voor preprocessing en feature extractie. Ons doel is om een gebruiksvriendelijke tool te bieden voor de onderzoeksgemeenschap, ontworpen om modulair, snel en schaalbaar te zijn voor training en testen op grote datasets. De broncode van SupWSD is beschikbaar op < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'id': 'Dalam demonstrasi ini kami mempersembahkan SupWSD, API Java untuk Disambiguation Sense Word (WSD) yang diawasi. Paket alat ini termasuk implementasi sistem WSD yang diawasi state-of-the-art, bersama dengan pipa Proses Bahasa Alami untuk memproses dan ekstraksi fitur. Tujuan kami adalah untuk menyediakan alat mudah digunakan untuk komunitas penelitian, dirancang untuk modular, cepat dan dapat dilatih dan menguji pada set data besar. Kode sumber SupWSD tersedia di < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'da': 'I denne demonstration præsenterer vi SupWSD, en Java API til overvåget Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Dette værktøjssæt indeholder implementering af et state-of-the-art overvåget WSD-system sammen med en Natural Language Processing pipeline til forbehandling og feature extraction. Vores mål er at levere et brugervenligt værktøj til forskningssamfundet, designet til at være modulært, hurtigt og skalerbart til træning og test på store datasæt. Kildekoden til SupWSD er tilgængelig på < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'hr': 'U ovom demonstraciji predstavljamo SupWSD, Java API za nadzornu disambigaciju osjećaja riječi (WSD). Ovaj alat uključuje provedbu sustava nadzornog WSD-a, zajedno s kanalizacijom prirodnog jezika za preobradu i izvlačenje funkcija. Naš cilj je pružiti jednostavan alat za upotrebu istraživačke zajednice, dizajniran da bude modular, brz i mjerljiv za obuku i testiranje na velikim podacima. Izvorni kod SupWSD je dostupan na < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'ko': '이 프레젠테이션에서는 단어의 변조(WSD)를 감독하는 Java API인 SupWSD에 대해 설명합니다.이 패키지에는 WSD 시스템의 실현을 감시하는 최첨단 감시 장치와 사전 처리 및 특징 추출에 사용되는 자연 언어 처리 파이프라인이 포함되어 있다.우리의 목표는 연구 지역사회에 쉽게 사용할 수 있는 도구를 제공하고 모듈화, 신속, 확장 가능하게 설계하여 대형 데이터 집합에서 교육과 테스트를 실시하는 것이다.SupWSD의 소스 코드는 <http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD>.', 'sw': 'Katika maandamano haya tunawasilisha SupWSD, API ya Java kwa kudhibiti Ukosefu wa Sensi (WSD). Kifaa hiki kinajumuisha utekelezaji wa mfumo wa hali ya sanaa unaoangaliwa na WSD, pamoja na pipeli ya utaratibu wa lugha ya asili kwa ajili ya kuchukua utaratibu na utekelezaji. Lengo letu ni kutengeneza zana rahisi ya matumizi kwa jamii ya utafiti, lililotengenezwa kuwa ya kawaida, haraka na vibaya kwa ajili ya mafunzo na kujaribu katika seti kubwa za taarifa. The source code of SupWSD is available at < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'de': 'In dieser Demonstration stellen wir SupWSD vor, eine Java API für überwachte Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Dieses Toolkit beinhaltet die Implementierung eines hochmodernen überwachten WSD-Systems sowie eine Natural Language Processing-Pipeline zur Vorverarbeitung und Feature-Extraktion. Unser Ziel ist es, ein benutzerfreundliches Tool für die Forschungsgemeinschaft bereitzustellen, das modular, schnell und skalierbar für Schulungen und Tests an großen Datensätzen ist. Der Quellcode von SupWSD ist verfügbar unter < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'tr': "Biz bu demonstratiýada SupWSD'i, üstlenen sözleri Senz Disambiguasyon (WSD) üçin bir Java API görkezip Bu esbap çykyşy ön işlemek we özellikler a çmak üçin bir WSD sisteminiň durumynyň implementasyny bar. Biziň maksadymyz, ylmy jemgyýetleri üçin aňsat ulanmak üçin ýeterli bir araç saýlamak, modular, tiz we ölçeklenmek üçin uly datasetlerde okuw we synaglamak üçin düzenlenýär. SupWSD'iň çeşme kody bar <at> http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >", 'sq': 'Në këtë demonstrim ne paraqesim SupWSD, një API Java për zhdukjen e mbikqyrur të fjalëve (WSD). Ky paket mjete përfshin zbatimin e një sistemi WSD të mbikqyrur më së miri, së bashku me një tubacion për procesimin e gjuhës natyrore për përprocesimin dhe nxjerrjen e funksioneve. Qëllimi ynë është të ofrojmë një mjet të lehtë për përdorim për komunitetin kërkimor, të dizajnuar për të qenë modular, të shpejtë dhe të shkallëzueshëm për trainimin dhe testimin e grupeve të mëdha të të dhënave. Kodi burimi i SupWSD është në dispozicion në < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'am': 'In this demonstration we present SupWSD, a Java API for supervised Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD).  ይህ መሣሪያው የጠለቀ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት እና የፊደል ምርጫዎችን ለመግለጫ እና ለመግለጫ የፊደል ምርጫዎችን በተጨማሪው የሀገር-የ-art-ስርዓት ውጤት እንዲያስተካክሉ ነው፡፡ ስልጣን ለትምህርት ማኅበረሰብ ቀላል የተጠቃሚ ማቀናጃ ማቅረብ ነው፣ ለትልቁ ዳታዎችን ለማስተማርና ለመፈተን እና ለፍጥረት ማሰናከል፣ ለፍጥነት እና ለስቃይ መሆኑን ነው፡፡ የኩነቶች መረጃ http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'hy': 'Այս ցուցադրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք ենթակառավարվող Word Sense Discovery-ի Java API (ՀՀՀՀՀ) ցուցադրությունը: This toolkit includes the implementation of a state-of-the-art supervised WSD system, together with a Natural Language Processing pipeline for preprocessing and feature extraction.  Մեր նպատակը հետազոտության համայնքի համար հեշտ օգտագործելու գործիք է, որը նախագծված է այնպես, որ լինի մոդուլյար, արագ և ընդլայնելի մեծ տվյալների համակարգերի ուսումնասիրության և փորձարկումների համար: Հիմնական կոդը հասանելի է http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD ]:', 'fa': 'In this demonstration we present SupWSD, a Java API for supervised Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). این دستگاه شامل عملیات یک سیستم WSD تحت نظارت وضعیت هنری است، با یک لوله\u200cی پردازش زبان طبیعی برای پردازش پیش\u200cپردازش و استخراج ویژگی. هدف ما این است که ابزار آسانی برای استفاده برای جامعه تحقیقات، طراحی شده برای آموزش و آزمایش در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ باشد. کد منبع SupWSD در < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD .', 'af': "In hierdie demonstrasie voorsien ons SupWSD, 'n Java API vir superviseerde Woord Sense Disambiguasie (WSD). Hierdie nutsbalk insluit die implementasie van 'n staat- of- die- kuns ondersoekte WSD stelsel, saam met 'n Natuurlike Taal Verwerking pyplyn vir voorprocess en funksie uitpakking. Ons doel is om 'n maklik om te gebruik hulpmiddel te verskaf vir die ondersoek gemeenskap, ontwerp om modular, vinnig en skalbaar te wees vir onderwerp en toets op groot datastelle. Die bronkode van SupWSD is beskikbaar by < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >", 'bs': 'U ovoj demonstraciji predstavljamo SupWSD, Java API za nadzornu disambigaciju osjećaja riječi (WSD). Ovaj alat uključuje provedbu državnog sustava nadziranog WSD-a, zajedno sa kanalizacijom prirodnog jezika za preobradu i izvlačenje funkcija. Naš cilj je pružiti jednostavan alat za upotrebu istraživačke zajednice, dizajniran da bude modular, brz i mjerljiv za obuku i testiranje na velikim podacima. Izvorni kod SupWSD je dostupan na < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD - Da.', 'cs': 'V této ukázce představujeme SupWSD, Java API pro kontrolované Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD). Tato sada nástrojů zahrnuje implementaci nejmodernějšího systému dohledu WSD spolu s potrubím Natural Language Processing pro předzpracování a extrakci funkcí. Naším cílem je poskytnout snadno použitelný nástroj pro výzkumnou komunitu, navržený tak, aby byl modulární, rychlý a škálovatelný pro školení a testování na velkých datových sadách. Zdrojový kód SupWSD je k dispozici na adrese < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'az': "Bu göstərişdə, Supervised Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) üçün SupWSD'i göstəririk. Bu araç çubuğu, əvvəlcə işləmə və özellikləri çıxartmaq üçün təbiətli dil işləmə boru çubuğu ilə birlikdə təbiətli WSD sisteminin istifadəsini daxil edir. Bizim amacımız, araştırma toplumunda asan istifadə etmək və böyük verilən qurbanlarda təhsil etmək və imtahana çəkmək üçün modular, hızlı və çətin olmaq üçün müəyyən edilmiş bir araç verməkdir. SupWSD mənbə kodu < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >", 'et': 'Selles demonstratsioonis tutvustame SupWSD, Java API järelevalvega Word Sense disambiguatsiooni (WSD) jaoks. See tööriistakomplekt sisaldab kaasaegse järelevalvega WSD süsteemi rakendamist koos looduskeele töötlemise torujuhtmega eeltöötlemiseks ja funktsioonide ekstraheerimiseks. Meie eesmärk on pakkuda teadusringkonnale lihtsalt kasutatavat tööriista, mis on mõeldud modulaarseks, kiireks ja skaleeritavaks koolituseks ja testimiseks suurte andmekogumitega. SupWSD lähtekood on saadaval aadressil < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'bn': 'এই বিক্ষোভে আমরা একটি জাভা এপিআইকে উপস্থাপন করছি শব্দ সেন্স বিভ্রান্তির (ডাব্লিউএসডি)। এই টুলিকিটের মধ্যে রয়েছে একটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পর্যবেক্ষণ করা ডিউএসডি সিস্টেমের ব্যবস্থা, যার মধ্যে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া পাইপেল আমাদের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে গবেষণা সম্প্রদায়ের জন্য সহজ-ব্যবহারের টুল প্রদান করা, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে মডিউলিয়াল, দ্রুত এবং পরীক্ষা এবং ব SupWSD এর উৎস কোড <এ পাওয়া যাচ্ছে http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'fi': 'Tässä esittelyssä esittelemme SupWSD, Java API valvottuun Word Sense Disambiguation (WSD) -rajapinnan. Tämä työkalupakki sisältää uusimman valvotun WSD-järjestelmän käyttöönoton sekä luonnollisen kielen prosessointiputken esikäsittelyä ja ominaisuuksien uuttamista varten. Tavoitteenamme on tarjota tutkimusyhteisölle helppokäyttöinen työkalu, joka on suunniteltu modulaariseksi, nopeaksi ja skaalautuvaksi suurilla tietoaineistoilla tapahtuvaa koulutusta ja testausta varten. SupWSD:n lähdekoodi on saatavilla osoitteessa < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'ca': "En aquesta demostració presentem SupWSD, una API Java per desambiguació supervisada del sentit de paraules (WSD). Aquest paquet d'eines inclou la implementació d'un sistema de DEM supervisat actualment, juntament amb un tub de processament de llenguatges naturals per a la preprocessió i l'extracció de característiques. El nostre objectiu és proporcionar una eina fàcil d'utilitzar a la comunitat de recerca, dissenyada per ser modular, ràpida i escalable per a formar i testar grans conjunts de dades. El codi fontde SupWSD està disponible a < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.", 'he': 'בהפגנה הזאת אנחנו מציגים את SupWSD, API Java עבור ניתוח חוש מילים (WSD) מפקח. חבילת כלים זו כוללת ההפעלה של מערכת WSD מושגת במצב המיוחד, יחד עם צינור מעבדת שפת טבעית לתכנית ותוציאת תכונות. המטרה שלנו היא לספק כלי קל להשתמש לקהילת המחקר, המתכנן להיות מודולרי, מהיר ומקביל לאימונים ובדיקות על קבוצות נתונים גדולות. קוד המקור של SupWSD זמין ב < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'jv': 'Nang daemony iki, kita kang supWSD, Api Jawane kanggo langgambar Word Sense disabled mbiguation (WSD). Arkit iki tahun ngewehke mulai perusahaan sistem state-of-the-arts super-WSD, karo sistem Normal Language Kita goal punika nggawe barang kelas-ngengampang kanggo nguasai perusahaan kanggo nguasai komunitas, dibenalke kanggo modul, dino lan ijol-ijolan kanggo disimpen lan ujian ne Dino dataset sing apik. Coverage http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >', 'sk': 'V tej predstavitvi predstavljamo SupWSD, Java API za nadzorovano disambiguacijo Word Sense (WSD). Ta orodja vključuje izvedbo najsodobnejšega nadzorovanega sistema WSD, skupaj s cevovodom za obdelavo naravnega jezika za predobdelavo in ekstrakcijo funkcij. Naš cilj je zagotoviti enostavno orodje za uporabo za raziskovalno skupnost, zasnovano tako, da bo modularno, hitro in prilagodljivo za usposabljanje in testiranje na velikih naborih podatkov. Izvorna koda SupWSD je na voljo na < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >.', 'ha': "Daga wannan shirin da Muke iya gabatar da SupWSD, wata Java PAI wa aka tsare maganar saka (WSD). Wannan shirin ayuka na ƙunsa da shirin zartar da wata na-state-art wanda aka tsare WSD, sami da wata pipe na Cikakken aiki na Lugha na Natural don ya yi amfani da shiryoyin shiryoyin da aka ƙayyade. Gayinmu na zartar da zanen amfani da amfani mai sauƙi wa jamii za'a yi amfani da shi, ana yi amfani da shi, wa'anar za'a zama masu motsi, haraka da kafin zartarwa wa da aka jarraba kan tsari masu girma. The source code of SupWSD is available at < http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པའི་སྟོན་བརྗོད་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་SupWSD་ལྟ་རྟོགས་པའི་Java API ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། This toolkit includes the implementation of a state-of-the-art supervised WSD system, together with a Natural Language Processing pipeline for preprocessing and feature extraction. ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར SupWSD ཡི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་<ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ http://github.com/SI3P/SupWSD >'}
{'en': 'Interactive Visualization and Manipulation of Attention-based Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'التصور التفاعلي والتلاعب في الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الانتباه', 'es': 'Visualización interactiva y manipulación de la traducción automática neuronal basada en la atención', 'pt': 'Visualização interativa e manipulação de tradução automática neural baseada em atenção', 'fr': "Visualisation interactive et manipulation de la traduction automatique neuronale basée sur l'attention", 'ja': 'インタラクティブな視覚化と注意に基づく神経機械翻訳の操作', 'zh': '盖注意之神经机器翻译交互式可视化操也', 'hi': 'इंटरैक्टिव विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन और ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के हेरफेर', 'ru': 'Интерактивная визуализация и манипуляции с нейронным машинным переводом на основе внимания', 'ga': 'Amharcléiriú Idirghníomhach agus Ionramháil Aistriúchán Meaisín Néar-Bhunaithe Aird-Bhunaithe', 'hu': 'A figyelem alapú idegi fordítás interaktív megjelenítése és manipulációja', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διαδραστική απεικόνιση και χειρισμός της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης βασισμένης στην προσοχή', 'it': "Visualizzazione interattiva e manipolazione della traduzione automatica neurale basata sull'attenzione", 'lt': 'Interaktinis dėmesiu pagrįstų neurologinių mašinų vertimo vaizdas ir manipuliacija', 'kk': 'Қарапайым негіздеген невралдық машинаның аудармасының интерактивті визуализациясы мен манипулациясы', 'mk': 'Интерактивна визуализација и манипулација на внимание базирана превод на неврална машина', 'ms': 'Penglihatan dan Manipulasi Interaktif Terjemahan Mesin Neural Berasas Perhatian', 'ml': 'ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചെക്റ്റിവേക്ട് വ', 'mt': 'Viżwalizzazzjoni Interattiva u Manipulazzjoni tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali bbażata fuq l-Attenzjoni', 'mn': 'Хэрэглээний үндсэн мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн интерактив харагдах болон Manipulation of Attention-based Neural Machine Translation', 'pl': 'Interaktywna wizualizacja i manipulacja tłumaczeniem maszynowym opartym na uwadze', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Vizualizarea interactivă și manipularea traducerii automate neurale bazate pe atenție', 'sr': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija i manipulacija neuroloških prevoda na temelju pažnje', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Interactive Visualisation and Manipulation of Attention-based Neural machine Translation', 'sv': 'Interaktiv visualisering och manipulation av uppmärksamhetsbaserad neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'கவனிப்பு அடிப்படையில் உள்ளடக்க பார்வை மற்றும் கையாளுதல்Name', 'ur': 'انتظار پر بنیاد رکھنے والی نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کی آنٹراکسٹ ویزیولیزی اور Manipulation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự phân phối hình ảnh và thao tác', 'bg': 'Интерактивна визуализация и манипулация на базиран на вниманието неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Interactieve visualisatie en manipulatie van aandacht-gebaseerde neurale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Interaktiv visualisering og manipulation af opmærksomhedsbaseret neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija i manipulacija neurološkog prevoda na temelju pažnje', 'id': 'Visualisasi Interaktif dan Manipulasi Translation Mesin Neural Berdasarkan Perhatian', 'de': 'Interaktive Visualisierung und Manipulation von aufmerksamkeitsbasierter neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung', 'ko': '주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경 기계 번역의 상호작용과 조작', 'fa': 'تغییرات ماشین عصبی بر پایه توجه', 'tr': 'Attention tabanly Nural Maşynyň terjimesiniň etkileşimli Görnöşim we Taýtgetmesi', 'sw': 'Utafiti na Utafiti wa Mashine ya Kiurali anayeishi Kihisia', 'af': 'Interaktiewe Visualisering en Manipulasie van Aangaande-gebaseerde Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'hy': 'Ուշադրության վրա հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն', 'az': "Attention-based Neural Machine Translation'in Interaktiv Visualization and Manipulation of Attention-based Neural Machine Translation", 'sq': 'Visualizimi interaktiv dhe manipulimi i përkthimit të makinave nervore me bazë në vëmendje', 'bn': 'মনোযোগ ভিত্তিক নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের ইন্টার্ভিক্টিভ ভিস্ট দৃশ্য এবং ম্যানিপুলেশন', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'bs': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija i manipulacija neuroloških prevoda na temelju pažnje', 'ca': "Visualització interactiva i manipulació de traducció de màquines neuronals basada en l'atenció", 'et': 'Tähelepanu-põhise neuromasintõlke interaktiivne visualiseerimine ja manipuleerimine', 'fi': 'Huomioon perustuvan neurokääntämisen vuorovaikutteinen visualisointi ja manipulointi', 'cs': 'Interaktivní vizualizace a manipulace s neuronovým strojovým překladem založeným na pozornosti', 'sk': 'Interaktivna vizualizacija in manipulacija pozornosti temelječega nevronskega strojnega prevajanja', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Visualization and Manipulation Interactive of Attention-Based Neural Machine Translation', 'bo': 'Interactive Visualization and Manipulation of Attention-based Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) provides high-quality translation, it is still hard to interpret and analyze its behavior. We present an interactive interface for visualizing and intervening behavior of NMT, specifically concentrating on the behavior of beam search mechanism and attention component. The tool (1) visualizes search tree and attention and (2) provides interface to adjust search tree and attention weight (manually or automatically) at real-time. We show the tool gives various methods to understand NMT.', 'fr': "Alors que la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) fournit une traduction de haute qualité, il est toujours difficile d'interpréter et d'analyser son comportement. Nous présentons une interface interactive pour visualiser et intervenir le comportement de la NMT, en se concentrant spécifiquement sur le comportement du mécanisme de recherche de faisceau et de la composante d'attention. L'outil (1) visualise l'arbre de recherche et l'attention et (2) fournit une interface pour ajuster l'arbre de recherche et le poids de l'attention (manuellement ou automatiquement) en temps réel. Nous montrons que l'outil fournit différentes méthodes pour comprendre la NMT.", 'ar': 'بينما توفر الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) ترجمة عالية الجودة ، لا يزال من الصعب تفسير وتحليل سلوكها. نقدم واجهة تفاعلية لتصور سلوك NMT والتدخل فيه ، مع التركيز بشكل خاص على سلوك آلية البحث بالحزمة ومكون الانتباه. الأداة (1) تصور شجرة البحث والانتباه و (2) توفر واجهة لضبط شجرة البحث ووزن الانتباه (يدويًا أو تلقائيًا) في الوقت الفعلي. نظهر أن الأداة تعطي طرقًا مختلفة لفهم NMT.', 'es': 'Si bien la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) proporciona una traducción de alta calidad, sigue siendo difícil interpretar y analizar su comportamiento. Presentamos una interfaz interactiva para visualizar e intervenir el comportamiento de NMT, concentrándose específicamente en el comportamiento del mecanismo de búsqueda de haces y el componente de atención. La herramienta (1) visualiza el árbol de búsqueda y la atención y (2) proporciona una interfaz para ajustar el árbol de búsqueda y el peso de la atención (manual o automáticamente) en tiempo real. Mostramos que la herramienta proporciona varios métodos para entender la NMT.', 'pt': 'Embora a tradução automática neural (NMT) forneça tradução de alta qualidade, ainda é difícil interpretar e analisar seu comportamento. Apresentamos uma interface interativa para visualizar e intervir no comportamento do NMT, concentrando-se especificamente no comportamento do mecanismo de busca do feixe e no componente de atenção. A ferramenta (1) visualiza a árvore de busca e a atenção e (2) fornece interface para ajustar a árvore de busca e o peso da atenção (manual ou automaticamente) em tempo real. Mostramos que a ferramenta oferece vários métodos para entender a NMT.', 'zh': '虽神经机器翻译(NMT)供高质量译,犹难解释。 建一交互式界面,施于可视化干NMT,尤关波束搜机注意组件之行。 器用(1)可视化索树注意,(2)给实时调索树意权重(手动或自)之界面。 示具以知NMT。', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳（ NMT ）は高品質の翻訳を提供しますが、その挙動を解釈して分析することは依然として困難です。NMTの挙動を可視化し介在させるためのインタラクティブインターフェースを提供し、特にビームサーチ機構と注意コンポーネントの挙動に焦点を当てています。このツールは、（ 1 ）検索ツリーと注意を視覚化し、（ 2 ）検索ツリーと注意の重みを（手動または自動で）リアルタイムで調整するためのインターフェースを提供します。このツールは、NMTを理解するためのさまざまな方法を提供しています。', 'hi': 'जबकि तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले अनुवाद प्रदान करता है, फिर भी इसके व्यवहार की व्याख्या और विश्लेषण करना मुश्किल है। हम एनएमटी के व्यवहार को विज़ुअलाइज़ करने और हस्तक्षेप करने के लिए एक इंटरैक्टिव इंटरफ़ेस प्रस्तुत करते हैं, विशेष रूप से बीम खोज तंत्र और ध्यान घटक के व्यवहार पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। उपकरण (1) खोज पेड़ और ध्यान visualizes और (2) वास्तविक समय पर खोज पेड़ और ध्यान वजन (मैन्युअल रूप से या स्वचालित रूप से) को समायोजित करने के लिए इंटरफ़ेस प्रदान करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि उपकरण एनएमटी को समझने के लिए विभिन्न तरीकों को देता है।', 'ru': 'В то время как нейронный машинный перевод (НМП) обеспечивает высококачественный перевод, все еще трудно интерпретировать и анализировать его поведение. Представляем интерактивный интерфейс для визуализации и интервенционирования поведения НМТ, специально концентрируясь на поведении механизма поиска луча и компонента внимания. Инструмент (1) визуализирует дерево поиска и внимание и (2) предоставляет интерфейс для настройки дерева поиска и веса внимания (вручную или автоматически) в режиме реального времени. Мы показываем, что инструмент дает различные методы для понимания НБ.', 'ga': 'Cé go soláthraíonn néaraistriúchán meaisín (NMT) aistriúchán ar ardchaighdeán, tá sé deacair fós a iompar a léirmhíniú agus a anailísiú. Cuirimid comhéadan idirghníomhach i láthair chun iompar NMT a léirshamhlú agus a idirghabháil, ag díriú go sonrach ar iompar meicníocht chuardaigh bíoma agus comhpháirt aird. Léiríonn an uirlis (1) crann cuardaigh agus aird agus (2) soláthraíonn sé comhéadan chun crann cuardaigh agus meáchan aird a choigeartú (de láimh nó go huathoibríoch) i bhfíor-am. Léiríonn muid go dtugann an uirlis modhanna éagsúla chun NMT a thuiscint.', 'ka': 'თუმცა ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) უფრო კარგად გაგრძელება, მაგრამ უფრო რთულია გაგრძელება და ანალიზაცია მისი ქცევა. Name Name ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ხელსაწყოს განსხვავებული მეტოვები NMT-ს გავიგოთ.', 'hu': 'Míg a neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) kiváló minőségű fordítást biztosít, viselkedését még mindig nehéz értelmezni és elemezni. Interaktív felületet mutatunk be az NMT viselkedésének vizualizálására és beavatkozására, különösen a sugárkereső mechanizmus és a figyelem komponens viselkedésére összpontosítva. Az eszköz (1) megjeleníti a keresési fát és a figyelmet, és (2) felületet biztosít a keresési fa és a figyelem súlyának (manuálisan vagy automatikusan) valós idejű beállítására. Megmutatjuk, hogy az eszköz különböző módszereket ad az NMT megértésére.', 'it': "Mentre la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) fornisce una traduzione di alta qualità, è ancora difficile interpretare e analizzare il suo comportamento. Presentiamo un'interfaccia interattiva per visualizzare e intervenire il comportamento di NMT, concentrandoci in particolare sul comportamento del meccanismo di ricerca del fascio e della componente di attenzione. Lo strumento (1) visualizza albero di ricerca e attenzione e (2) fornisce interfaccia per regolare albero di ricerca e peso attenzione (manualmente o automaticamente) in tempo reale. Mostriamo che lo strumento fornisce vari metodi per comprendere NMT.", 'el': 'Ενώ η νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση παρέχει υψηλής ποιότητας μετάφραση, εξακολουθεί να είναι δύσκολο να ερμηνευθεί και να αναλύσει τη συμπεριφορά της. Παρουσιάζουμε μια διαδραστική διεπαφή για την απεικόνιση και παρέμβαση της συμπεριφοράς της εστιάζοντας συγκεκριμένα στη συμπεριφορά του μηχανισμού αναζήτησης ακτίνων και του συστατικού προσοχής. Το εργαλείο (1) απεικονίζει το δέντρο αναζήτησης και την προσοχή και (2) παρέχει διεπαφή για να ρυθμίσει το δέντρο αναζήτησης και το βάρος προσοχής (χειροκίνητα ή αυτόματα) σε πραγματικό χρόνο. Δείχνουμε ότι το εργαλείο δίνει διάφορες μεθόδους για την κατανόηση της NMT.', 'kk': 'Невралдық компьютердің аудармасы (NMT) жоғары сапатты аудармасын қамтамасыз етеді дегенде, әлі оның қасиетін толықтау және анализ күтпейді. Біз NMT- тің визуализациялау мен арасындағы әрекеттерін интерактивті интерактивті интерфейсін көрсетедік. Бұл көздерді іздеу механизміне және назардағы компонентінің қасиеттеріне назар Құралы (1) іздеу бұтағын және назарды көрсетеді, және (2) іздеу бұтағын және назарды (қолмен немесе автоматты түрде) түзету үшін интерфейсін көрсетеді. Біз құралды NMT түсініктерін түсініктеу әдістерін көрсетедік.', 'mk': 'Иако преводот на нервната машина (НМТ) обезбедува висококвалитетен превод, сé уште е тешко да се интерпретира и анализира своето однесување. Презентираме интерактивен интерфејс за визуализација и интервенција на однесувањето на НМТ, концентрирајќи се посебно на однесувањето на механизмот за пребарување на зрак и компонентот за внимание. Инструментот (1) го визуелизира барачкото дрво и вниманието и (2) обезбедува интерфејс за прилагодување на барачкото дрво и тежината на вниманието (рачно или автоматски) во реално време. Ние покажуваме дека алатката дава различни методи за разбирање на НМТ.', 'lt': 'Nors nervinės mašinos vertimas (NMT) suteikia aukštos kokybės vertimą, vis dar sunku aiškinti ir analizuoti savo elgesį. Mes pristatome interaktyvią sąsają, skirtą vaizduoti ir įsikišti į NMT elgesį, ypač sutelkiant dėmesį į šviesos paieškos mechanizmo ir dėmesio komponento elgesį. Įranga (1) vaizduoja paieškos medį ir dėmesį ir (2) suteikia sąsają paieškos medžiui ir dėmesio svoriui (rankiniu ar automatiniu) reguliuoti realiuoju laiku. Mes rodome, kad priemonė suteikia įvairius NMT supratimo metodus.', 'ms': 'Sementara terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) menyediakan terjemahan kualiti tinggi, ia masih sukar untuk menerangkan dan menganalisis perilakunya. We present an interactive interface for visualizing and intervening behavior of NMT, specifically concentrating on the behavior of beam search mechanism and attention component.  Alat (1) memaparkan pepohon gelintar dan perhatian dan (2) menyediakan antaramuka untuk menyesuaikan pepohon gelintar dan berat perhatian (secara manual atau secara automatik) pada masa sebenar. Kami menunjukkan alat memberikan berbagai cara untuk memahami NMT.', 'mt': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) provides high-quality translation, it is still hard to interpret and analyze its behavior.  Aħna nippreżentaw interfaċċja interattiva għall-viżwalizzazzjoni u l-imġiba li tintervjeni ta’ NMT, b’konċentrazzjoni speċifika fuq l-imġiba tal-mekkaniżmu ta’ tiftix tar-raġġ u l-komponent ta’ attenzjoni. L-għodda (1) viżwalizza s-siġra tat-tiftix u l-attenzjoni u (2) tipprovdi interfaċċja biex taġġusta s-siġra tat-tiftix u l-piż tal-attenzjoni (manwalment jew awtomatikament) f’ħin reali. Aħna nuru li l-għodda tagħti diversi metodi biex nifhmu l-NMT.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിന്റെ സ്വഭാവം വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് പ്രയാസകരമാണ്. We present an interactive interface for visualizing and intervening behavior of NMT, specifically concentrating on the behavior of beam search mechanism and attention component.  @ info നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് NMT മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Ньюрал машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) нь өндөр чанартай хөрөнгө оруулалт гаргадаг ч өөрийнхөө үйл явдлыг илэрхийлж, шинжилгээ хийх нь хэцүү. Бид NMT-ийн үзүүлэлт болон оролцохын тулд интерактив интерфейсийг харуулж байна. Ялангуяа цацраг хайлтын механизм болон анхаарлын компонентийн үйл ажиллагаанд төвлөрүүлж байна. Багаж (1) хайлтын мод болон анхаарлыг харуулдаг бөгөөд (2) хайлтын мод болон анхаарлын жин (гар болон автоматаар) бодит цаг үед интерфейсийг хангадаг. Бид багаж NMT-г ойлгохын тулд олон арга зам өгдөг.', 'no': 'Mens omsetjinga av neuralmaskinen (NMT) gjev høg kvalitet, er det fortsatt vanskeleg å tolka og analysera atferden. Vi presenterer eit interaktivt grensesnitt for visualisering og intervensjon av NMT- atferd, spesielt konsantrering på atferden av søkingsmekanismen for stråm og oppmerksomhet. Verktøyet (1) viser søkjetrom og oppmerksomhet og (2) gir grensesnitt for å justera søkjetrom og oppmerksomhet (manuelt eller automatisk) på verkeleg tid. Vi viser verktøyet gir ulike metodar for å forstå NMT.', 'pl': 'Chociaż neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) zapewnia wysokiej jakości tłumaczenie, nadal trudno jest zinterpretować i analizować jego zachowanie. Przedstawiamy interaktywny interfejs do wizualizacji i interwencji zachowań NMT, w szczególności koncentrujący się na zachowaniu mechanizmu wyszukiwania wiązki i komponentu uwagi. Narzędzie (1) wizualizuje drzewo wyszukiwania i uwagę oraz (2) zapewnia interfejs do regulacji drzewa wyszukiwania i wagi uwagi (ręcznie lub automatycznie) w czasie rzeczywistym. Pokazujemy, że narzędzie daje różne metody zrozumienia NMT.', 'ro': 'În timp ce traducerea automată neurală (NMT) oferă traduceri de înaltă calitate, este încă greu de interpretat și analizat comportamentul său. Prezentăm o interfață interactivă pentru vizualizarea și intervenția comportamentului NMT, concentrându-se în special pe comportamentul mecanismului de căutare a fasciculului și componentei atenției. Instrumentul (1) vizualizează arborele de căutare și atenția și (2) oferă interfață pentru a ajusta arborele de căutare și greutatea atenției (manual sau automat) în timp real. Vă arătăm că instrumentul oferă diferite metode pentru a înțelege NMT.', 'sr': 'Iako prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) pruža kvalitetan prevod, još uvek je teško interpretirati i analizirati svoje ponašanje. Predstavljamo interaktivni interfejs za vizualizaciju i intervenciju ponašanja NMT-a, posebno koncentrisanje na ponašanje mehanizma pretraživanja zraka i pažnje komponenta. Instrument (1) vizualizira drvo i pažnju pretraživanja i (2) pruža interfejs za prilagodbu težine pretraživanja drveta i pažnje (ručno ili automatski) u realno vreme. Pokazujemo da alat daje različite metode da razumemo NMT.', 'so': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) provides high-quality translation, it is still hard to interpret and analyze its behavior.  Waxaynu keennaa Interfac Interactive ah si aan u aragno oo aan u qabno dabeecada NMT, si gaar ah ugu kalsoonaanno dabeecada raadinta iyo hababka dhegaynta. Qoraalka (1) wuxuu fiiriyaa geedka raadinta iyo dhegaysta iyo (2) waxaa si loo beddelo hagaajiyada geedka raadinta iyo miisaanka hagitaanka (manual ama automati) waqtiga. Waxan tusnaynaa qalabka ay leedahay qaabab kala duduwan oo ay u fahamaan NMT.', 'sv': 'Medan neural maskinöversättning (NMT) ger högkvalitativ översättning, är det fortfarande svårt att tolka och analysera dess beteende. Vi presenterar ett interaktivt gränssnitt för att visualisera och ingripa beteende hos NMT, särskilt inriktat på beteendet hos beam search mekanism och uppmärksamhet komponent. Verktyget (1) visualiserar sökträd och uppmärksamhet och (2) ger gränssnitt för att justera sökträd och uppmärksamhet vikt (manuellt eller automatiskt) i realtid. Vi visar att verktyget ger olika metoder för att förstå NMT.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අවවාදය කරන්න පුළුවන් වුනත්, ඒක තවමත් අමාරුයි ඒකේ ව අපි NMT විශ්වාසයෙන් පෙන්වන්න සහ අවධානය කරන්න සඳහා සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක අන්තර්ජනයක් පෙන්වන්න, විශේෂයෙන්  Name අපි පෙන්වන්නේ උපකරණය NMT තේරුම් ගන්න විවිධ විදියට විවිධ විදියට.', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) உயர்தரமான மொழிபெயர்ப்பை வழங்கும் போது, அதன் நடத்தையை மொழிபெயர்த்து ஆர நாம் NMT நடைமுகத்தை பார்க்க மற்றும் இடைவெளிக்கும் இடைவெளி நடைமுகத்திற்கு ஒரு இடைவெளி காண்பிக்கிறோம், குறிப்பாக இருந்தால் bea @ info We show the tool gives various methods to understand NMT.', 'ur': 'جبکہ نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) اچھی کیفیت ترجمہ دیتا ہے، اس کے رفتار کا تفسیر اور تحقیق کرنے کا مشکل ہے. ہم NMT کی تصویزی اور انٹرنیٹ رفتار کے لئے ایک انٹرنیٹ ایٹرنیٹ پیدا کرتے ہیں، مخصوصاً بیم تلاش مکانیسم اور توجه کامپیوتر کے رفتار پر کنٹرنیٹ کر رہے ہیں۔ Name ہم ابزار کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ NMT کو سمجھنے کے لئے مختلف طریقے دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Biz NMT xususiyatini ko'rib chiqarish va intervention xususiyatlarini ko'rsatish uchun interaktiv interfeysni hozir qilamiz. Aks holda, beam qidirish mekanismening xususiyatlarini va taqdim qismi komponentini foydalanish mumkin. Name Biz asboblar NMT tushunishga har xil usullar beradi.", 'vi': 'Trong khi dịch phiên dịch máy thần kinh (NMB) cung cấp dịch chất lượng cao, nó vẫn khó để giải thích và phân tích hành vi của nó. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một giao diện tương tác để hình dung và hành vi can thiệp của NMB, đặc biệt tập trung vào hành vi của cơ chế tìm tia và bộ phận chăm sóc. Công cụ (1) hình dung cây tìm kiếm và sự chú ý và (2) cung cấp giao diện để điều chỉnh cây tìm kiếm và trọng lượng chú ý (tự động hay tự động) vào thời gian thực. Chúng tôi cho thấy công cụ cung cấp các phương pháp khác nhau để hiểu NMB.', 'bg': 'Докато невронният машинен превод (НМТ) осигурява висококачествен превод, все още е трудно да се интерпретира и анализира поведението му. Представяме интерактивен интерфейс за визуализиране и намесване на поведението на НМТ, концентрирайки се конкретно върху поведението на механизма за търсене на лъча и компонента на вниманието. Инструментът (1) визуализира дървото за търсене и вниманието и (2) осигурява интерфейс за регулиране на дървото за търсене и теглото на вниманието (ръчно или автоматично) в реално време. Показваме, че инструментът дава различни методи за разбиране на НМТ.', 'da': 'Mens neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) giver oversættelse af høj kvalitet, er det stadig svært at fortolke og analysere dens adfærd. Vi præsenterer en interaktiv grænseflade til visualisering og intervenerende adfærd af NMT, specielt med fokus på adfærden af beam search mekanisme og opmærksomhedskomponent. Værktøjet (1) visualiserer søgetræ og opmærksomhed og (2) giver grænseflade til at justere søgetræ og opmærksomhedsvægt (manuelt eller automatisk) i realtid. Vi viser, at værktøjet giver forskellige metoder til at forstå NMT.', 'hr': 'Iako prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT) pruža kvalitetan prevod, još uvijek je teško interpretirati i analizirati svoje ponašanje. Predstavljamo interaktivni interfejs za vizualizaciju i intervenciju ponašanja NMT-a, posebno koncentriranje na ponašanje mehanizma pretraživanja zraka i komponenta pažnje. Instrument (1) vizualizira drvo i pažnju pretraživanja i (2) pruža interfejs za prilagodbu težine pretraživanja drveta i pažnje (ručno ili automatski) u realno vrijeme. Pokazujemo da alat daje različite metode za razumijevanje NMT-a.', 'nl': 'Hoewel neuronale machine translation (NMT) hoogwaardige vertaling biedt, is het nog steeds moeilijk om het gedrag ervan te interpreteren en te analyseren. We presenteren een interactieve interface voor het visualiseren en interveniëren van gedrag van NMT, specifiek gericht op het gedrag van straalzoekmechanisme en aandachtscomponent. De tool (1) visualiseert zoekboom en aandacht en (2) biedt interface om zoekboom en aandachtsgewicht (handmatig of automatisch) in real-time aan te passen. We laten zien dat de tool verschillende methoden geeft om NMT te begrijpen.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)은 질 좋은 번역을 제공하지만, 여전히 그 행동을 해석하고 분석하기는 어렵다.우리는 NMT 행위를 시각화하고 관여하는 상호작용 인터페이스를 제공했고 특히 웨이브 검색 메커니즘과 성분에 주의하는 행위를 주목했다.이 도구(1)는 검색 트리와 주의력을 시각화하고, (2)는 검색 트리와 주의력 권중(수동 또는 자동)을 실시간으로 조정하는 인터페이스를 제공한다.우리는 이 도구가 NMT를 이해하는 여러 가지 방법을 제공하는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'id': 'Sementara terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) menyediakan terjemahan kualitas tinggi, masih sulit untuk menerangkan dan menganalisis perilakunya. Kami mempersembahkan antarmuka interaktif untuk membayangkan dan mengganggu perilaku NMT, secara khusus berkonsentrasi pada perilaku mekanisme pencarian sinar dan komponen perhatian. Alat (1) membayangkan pohon pencarian dan perhatian dan (2) menyediakan antarmuka untuk menyesuaikan pohon pencarian dan berat perhatian (secara manual atau otomatis) pada waktu nyata. Kami menunjukkan alat memberikan berbagai metode untuk memahami NMT.', 'de': 'Während neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) qualitativ hochwertige Übersetzungen liefert, ist es immer noch schwierig, ihr Verhalten zu interpretieren und zu analysieren. Wir stellen eine interaktive Schnittstelle zur Visualisierung und Intervention des NMT-Verhaltens vor, die sich speziell auf das Verhalten von Strahlsuchmechanismus und Aufmerksamkeitskomponente konzentriert. Das Tool (1) visualisiert Suchbaum und Aufmerksamkeit und (2) bietet eine Schnittstelle, um Suchbaum und Aufmerksamkeit Gewicht (manuell oder automatisch) in Echtzeit anzupassen. Wir zeigen, dass das Tool verschiedene Methoden gibt, um NMT zu verstehen.', 'fa': 'در حالی که ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) ترجمه\u200cی کیفیت بالا را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، هنوز تعبیر و تحلیل رفتارش سخت است. ما یک منطقه متفاوتی را برای تصویر کردن رفتار NMT و مدیریت مشاهده می کنیم، به طور خاص تمرکز روی رفتار مکانیسم جستجوی سیاه و بخش توجه. Name ما ابزار را نشان می دهیم که روش های مختلف را برای فهمیدن NMT می دهد.', 'sw': 'Wakati utafsiri wa mashine ya ubongo (NMT) unatoa tafsiri yenye sifa kubwa, bado ni vigumu kueleza na kutangaza tabia zake. Tunaweza kuonyesha na kuingilia tabia za NMT, hasa tunajikita kwenye tabia za utafutaji wa umeme na vifaa vya kusikiliza. The tool (1) visualizes search tree and attention and (2) provides interface to adjust search tree and attention weight (manually or automatically) at real-time.  Tunaonyesha zana hiyo inatoa njia mbalimbali za kuelewa NMT.', 'af': "Terwyl die neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) hoë- kwaliteit vertaling verskaf, is dit nog moeilik om sy gedrag te interpreteer en analyseer. Ons stel 'n interaktiewe koppelvlak voor die visualisering en interveningsgedrag van NMT, spesifieke konsentreer op die gedrag van beam soektog mekanisme en aandagkomponent. Name Ons wys die hulpmiddel gee verskillende metodes om NMT te verstaan.", 'sq': 'Ndërsa përkthimi i makinave nervore (NMT) ofron përkthime të cilësisë së lartë, është ende e vështirë të interpretohet dhe të analizohet sjellja e tij. Ne paraqesim një interfaqe interaktive për vizualizimin dhe sjelljen ndërhyrëse të NMT, duke u përqëndruar veçan ërisht në sjelljen e mekanizmit të kërkimit të rreze dhe komponentit të vëmendjes. Mjet (1) vizualizon pemën e kërkimit dhe vëmendjen dhe (2) ofron interfaqe për të rregulluar pemën e kërkimit dhe peshën e vëmendjes (manualisht apo automatikisht) në kohën reale. Ne tregojmë se mjeti jep metoda të ndryshme për të kuptuar NMT.', 'am': 'የደዌብ መሣሪያው ትርጉም (NMT) ከፍ-quality ትርጉም ሲሰጠው፣ የሥርዓቱን ትርጉም መተርጓሜ እና ማስታወቂያው ገና ችግር ነው፡፡ የNMT ጥያቄን ለማሳየትና ለማስቀላቀል እና ማቀናቀል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ መሣሪያው (1) የፈልግ ዛፍ እና ማስታወቂያ እና (2) የፊደል ክፍል በመሠረት ጊዜ ፈልግ ዛፍ እና ሚዛንን (በእጅነት ወይም በራሱ ጊዜ) ለማስተካከል ያሳያል። መሣሪያው NMT ለማስተዋል ልዩ ልማድ እንዲሰጥ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'tr': "NMT-iň ýokary kaliwatly terjime etmäge rugsat berýän bolsa, ýöne öz davranışyny terjime etmek we çözümlenmek kyn. NMT görkezilişi we intervalýan hereketleri üçin bir etkileşimli interfejs görkezip otyrýarys, iň bellenen arama mekanismi we üns komponentiniň davranışyny üns berýäris. _BAR_ NMT'i düşünmek üçin dürli yöntemler berýändigini görkezýäris.", 'az': 'NMT yüksək kaliteli tərcümə verəndə, hələ də öz davranışlarını təfsil etmək və analizi çətindir. NMT-nin vizualizasyonu və intervenci davranışları üçün interaktif bir interfejsini göstəririk, xüsusiyyətli nümunə arama mekanismi və məlumat komponentinin davranışlarına konsantre edirik. Bu araç (1) arama ağacını və dikkatini görünür və (2) arama ağacını və təsiri ağırlığını (əlli və avtomatik olaraq) gerçək vaxtda dəyişdirmək üçün interfejsini təmin edir. Biz bu vasitəsi NMT anlamaq üçün müxtəlif metodları verir.', 'bn': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) provides high-quality translation, it is still hard to interpret and analyze its behavior.  আমরা এনএমটির আচরণ দেখতে এবং হস্তক্ষেপের জন্য একটি ইন্টার্কিভ ইন্টারফেস উপস্থাপন করি, বিশেষ করে বীম অনুসন্ধানের মেশিন এবং মনোযোগ প্রদানের আচ টুল (১) অনুসন্ধান গাছ এবং মনোযোগ প্রদর্শন করে এবং (২) সত্যিকারের সময় অনুসন্ধান গাছ এবং মনোযোগ প্রতিরোধ করার জন্য ইন্টারফেস দেখায় (হাত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে টুলটি এনএমটি বুঝতে পারে বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতি দিয়েছে।', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) առաջարկում է բարձր որակի թարգմանություն, դեռևս դժվար է թարգմանել և վերլուծել իր վարքագծը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ինտերակտիվ ինտերֆեյսը NMT-ի վիզուալացման և ներխուժման համար, հատկապես կենտրոնացնելով ճառագայթի որոնման մեխանիզմի և ուշադրության բաղադրի վարքագիծին: Գործիքը (1) տեսնում է որոնման ծառը և ուշադրությունը և (2) տրամադրում է ինտերֆեյսը որոնման ծառի և ուշադրության կշիռի (ձեռքով կամ ինքնաբերաբար) հարմարեցման համար իրական ժամանակում: We show the tool gives various methods to understand NMT.', 'bs': 'Iako prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) pruža kvalitetan prevod, još uvijek je teško interpretirati i analizirati svoje ponašanje. Predstavljamo interaktivni interfejs za vizualizaciju i intervenciju ponašanja NMT-a, posebno koncentriranje na ponašanje mehanizma pretraživanja zraka i komponenta pažnje. Alat (1) vizualizira drvo i pažnju pretraživanja i (2) pruža interfejs za prilagodbu težine pretraživanja drveta i pažnje (ručno ili automatski) u realno vrijeme. Pokazujemo da alat daje različite metode za razumijevanje NMT-a.', 'ca': "Mentre la traducció neural de màquines (NMT) proporciona traducció d'alta qualitat, encara és difícil d'interpretar i analitzar el seu comportament. Presentam una interfície interactiva per visualitzar i intervenir el comportament de la NMT, centrant-nos específicament en el comportament del mecanisme de cerca del raig i el component d'atenció. L'eina (1) visualitza l'arbre de recerca i l'atenció i (2) proporciona interfície per ajustar el pes de l'arbre de recerca i l'atenció (manualment o automàticament) en temps real. Mostrem que l'eina dóna diversos mètodes per entendre la NMT.", 'cs': 'Zatímco neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) poskytuje vysoce kvalitní překlad, stále je těžké interpretovat a analyzovat jeho chování. Představujeme interaktivní rozhraní pro vizualizaci a intervenční chování NMT, konkrétně se zaměřující na chování mechanismu vyhledávání paprsku a komponenty pozornosti. Nástroj (1) vizualizuje vyhledávací strom a pozornost a (2) poskytuje rozhraní pro nastavení vyhledávacího stromu a hmotnosti pozornosti (ručně nebo automaticky) v reálném čase. Ukážeme, že nástroj poskytuje různé metody pro porozumění NMT.', 'et': 'Kuigi neuromasintõlge (NMT) pakub kvaliteetset tõlket, on selle käitumist siiski raske tõlgendada ja analüüsida. Esitleme interaktiivset liidest NMT käitumise visualiseerimiseks ja sekkumiseks, keskendudes spetsiaalselt kiirte otsingu mehhanismi ja tähelepanu komponendi käitumisele. Tööriist (1) visualiseerib otsingupuu ja tähelepanu ning (2) pakub liidest otsingupuu ja tähelepanu kaalu reguleerimiseks (käsitsi või automaatselt) reaalajas. Näitame, et tööriist annab erinevaid meetodeid NMT mõistmiseks.', 'fi': 'Vaikka neurokonekäännös (NMT) tarjoaa korkealaatuista käännöstä, sen käyttäytymistä on edelleen vaikea tulkita ja analysoida. Esitämme interaktiivisen käyttöliittymän NMT:n käyttäytymisen visualisointiin ja interventioon keskittyen erityisesti säteen hakumekanismin ja huomiokomponentin käyttäytymiseen. Työkalu (1) visualisoi hakupuun ja huomion ja (2) tarjoaa käyttöliittymän hakupuun ja huomion painon säätämiseen (manuaalisesti tai automaattisesti) reaaliajassa. Näytämme, että työkalu antaa erilaisia menetelmiä ymmärtää NMT.', 'sk': 'Medtem ko nevronski strojni prevod (NMT) zagotavlja visokokakovostno prevajanje, ga je še vedno težko interpretirati in analizirati njegovo vedenje. Predstavljamo interaktivni vmesnik za vizualizacijo in posredovanje vedenja NMT, posebej osredotočen na vedenje mehanizma iskanja žarka in komponente pozornosti. Orodje (1) vizualizira iskalno drevo in pozornost ter (2) zagotavlja vmesnik za prilagajanje iskalnega drevesa in teže pozornosti (ročno ali samodejno) v realnem času. Pokazali smo, da orodje daje različne metode za razumevanje NMT.', 'jv': 'Anyone Awak dhéwé éntuk interactive kanggo ngilanggar nggawe ngilanggar karo iso nggambar barang NMT NAME OF TRANSLATORS Awak dhéwé éntuk kelompok ngéwangi sistem kanggo ngerasakno NMT', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis Tuna gaurar da interfaci mai haɗi dõmin ka gane da aikin NMT, yana da muhimmi a kan aikin filinaikin sauri da ƙan an an filinaiki. @ info: tooltip Tuna nũna shirin ayuka na bã su hanyõyi masu iya fahimta NMT.', 'he': 'בעוד התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT) מספק תרגום איכות גבוהה, עדיין קשה לפרש ולניתוח את התנהגותו. אנחנו מציגים ממשק אינטראקטיבי להדמיין ולהתערב בהתנהגות של NMT, במיוחד להתרכז בהתנהגות של מנגנון חיפוש קרן וחלק תשומת לב. הכלי (1) מציג עץ חיפוש ותשומת לב (2) מספק ממשק כדי לתקן עץ חיפוש ומשקל תשומת לב (ידנית או אוטומטית) בזמן אמיתי. אנחנו מראים שהכלי נותן שיטות שונות להבין NMT.', 'bo': 'While neural machine translation (NMT) provides high-quality translation, it is still difficult to interpret and analyze its behavior. NMT ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་དུས་ཚོད་པའི་ངོས་འདྲ་བ་སྟོན་པའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་འདྲ་བ་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་བསྟར་ན། སྤྱོད་ཆས(1) འཚོལ་བཤེར ང་ཚོས་NMT་ལ་ཆ་ཤེས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་བ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Acquisition, Representation and Usage of Conceptual Hierarchies', 'ar': 'اكتساب وتمثيل واستخدام التسلسلات الهرمية المفاهيمية', 'fr': 'Acquisition, représentation et utilisation des hiérarchies conceptuelles', 'pt': 'Aquisição, Representação e Uso de Hierarquias Conceituais', 'es': 'Adquisición, representación y uso de jerarquías conceptuales', 'ja': '概念的階層の取得、表現、および使用', 'hi': 'अधिग्रहण, प्रतिनिधित्व और वैचारिक पदानुक्रम का उपयोग', 'zh': '二层次结构者,示用也', 'ru': 'Приобретение, представление и использование концептуальных иерархий', 'ga': 'Ordlathas Coincheapa a Fháil, a Léiriú agus a Úsáid', 'ka': 'მიღება, გამოსახულება და გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Fogalmi hierarchiák megszerzése, reprezentálása és használata', 'el': 'Απόκτηση, αναπαράσταση και χρήση εννοιολογικών ιεραρχίων', 'it': 'Acquisizione, rappresentazione e utilizzo delle gerarchie concettuali', 'mk': 'Добивање, претставување и употреба на концептуални хиерархии', 'kk': 'Концептуалды гиерхилерді қабылдау, таңдау және қолдану', 'ms': 'Akquisition, Representation and Use of Conceptual Hierarchies', 'lt': 'Koncepcinių hierarchijų įsigijimas, atstovavimas ir naudojimas', 'mt': 'L-akkwist, ir-Rappreżentanza u l-Użu ta’ Erarkiji Kunċettwali', 'mn': 'Үүний ойлголтын төлөвлөгөө, төлөвлөгөө, хэрэглээ', 'ml': 'അഭിപ്രായം, പ്രതിനിധിയും ഉപയോഗിക്കുക', 'no': 'Henting, representasjon og bruk av konseptuelle hierarki', 'ro': 'Achiziţionarea, reprezentarea şi utilizarea ierarhiilor conceptuale', 'sr': 'Prihvaćanje, predstavljanje i upotrebu konceptualnih hijerakija', 'pl': 'Pozyskiwanie, reprezentacja i wykorzystanie hierarchii koncepcyjnych', 'si': 'අල්ලගන්න, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'so': 'Aqbalista, dib u dhigista iyo isticmaalka hierarchies', 'sv': 'Förvärv, representation och användning av koncepthierarkier', 'ta': 'பெறுதல், மாற்றுதல் மற்றும் வெற்றிகரமான உபயோகம்', 'ur': 'حاصل، نمایش اور استعمال', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thu thập, Sở thích và sử dụng khả năng kinh tế', 'bg': 'Придобиване, представителство и използване на концептуални йерархии', 'hr': 'Prihvaćanje, predstavljanje i uporaba konceptualnih hijerarija', 'nl': 'Verwerving, vertegenwoordiging en gebruik van conceptuele hiërarchieën', 'da': 'Erhvervelse, repræsentation og brug af konceptuelle hierarkier', 'de': 'Erwerb, Darstellung und Nutzung konzeptueller Hierarchien', 'fa': 'دریافت، نمایش و استفاده از مجموعه\u200cهای نظامی', 'ko': '개념 차원 구조의 획득, 표시와 사용', 'id': 'Acquisition, Representation and Usage of Conceptual Hierarchies', 'tr': 'Ullanma, Görkezilişi we Görsel Hijerikleri', 'sw': 'Upatikanaji, Mahakilisho na Utumiaji wa Viwanja vya Mitandao', 'af': 'Aanbank, voorstel en gebruik van konseptieële hierarkies', 'sq': 'Merrja, përfaqësimi dhe përdorimi i Hierarkive Konceptive', 'az': 'Q톛lbl톛nm톛, T칬vrat캼 v톛 Konceptiv Hirarhiyalar캼n istifad톛si', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ፣ ተሟጋቾች እና መጠቀሚያ', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধি, প্রতিনিধি এবং কনসেপ্টুয়াল হিরার্চির ব্যবহার', 'bs': 'Prihvaćanje, predstavljanje i upotrebu konceptualnih hijerakija', 'hy': 'Կենցեպտուալ հեերարխիաների գնումը, ներկայացումը և օգտագործումը', 'ca': 'Acquisició, representació i Utilització de Hierarquies Conceptuals', 'cs': 'Získávání, reprezentace a využití koncepčních hierarchie', 'et': 'Kontseptaalsete Hierarhiate omandamine, esindamine ja kasutamine', 'fi': 'Käsitteellisten hierarkioiden hankinta, edustaminen ja käyttö', 'jv': '??????????????????????', 'sk': 'Pridobitev, zastopanje in uporaba konceptualnih hierarhij', 'he': 'רכוש, מייצג ושימוש בהיררכיות מוחשיות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Acquisition, Representation and Usage of Conceptual Hierarchies'}
{'en': 'Through subsumption and instantiation, individual instances (artificial intelligence, the spotted pig) otherwise spanning a wide range of domains can be brought together and organized under conceptual hierarchies. The hierarchies connect more specific concepts (computer science subfields, gastropubs) to more general concepts (academic disciplines, restaurants) through IsA relations. Explicit or implicit properties applicable to, and defining, more general concepts are inherited by their more specific concepts, down to the instances connected to the lower parts of the hierarchies. Subsumption represents a crisp, universally-applicable principle towards consistently representing IsA relations in any knowledge resource. Yet knowledge resources often exhibit significant differences in their scope, representation choices and intended usage, to cause significant differences in their expected usage and impact on various tasks. This tutorial examines the theoretical foundations of subsumption, and its practical embodiment through IsA relations compiled manually or extracted automatically. It addresses IsA relations from their formal definition ; through practical choices made in their representation within the larger and more widely-used of the available knowledge resources ; to their automatic acquisition from document repositories, as opposed to their manual compilation by human contributors ; to their impact in text analysis and information retrieval. As search engines move away from returning a set of links and closer to returning results that more directly answer queries, IsA relations play an increasingly important role towards a better understanding of documents and queries.', 'ar': 'من خلال الاستيعاب والتشكيل ، يمكن تجميع الأمثلة الفردية ("الذكاء الاصطناعي" ، "الخنزير المرقط") التي تغطي نطاقًا واسعًا من المجالات معًا وتنظيمها في إطار تسلسل هرمي مفاهيمي. تربط التسلسلات الهرمية مفاهيم أكثر تحديدًا ("الحقول الفرعية لعلوم الكمبيوتر" ، "gastropubs") بمفاهيم أكثر عمومية ("التخصصات الأكاديمية" ، "المطاعم") من خلال علاقات IsA. يتم توريث الخصائص الصريحة أو الضمنية المطبقة على المفاهيم الأكثر عمومية وتعريفها من خلال مفاهيمها الأكثر تحديدًا ، وصولاً إلى الحالات المتصلة بالأجزاء السفلية من التسلسلات الهرمية. يمثل الاستهلاك مبدأً واضحًا وقابل للتطبيق عالميًا تجاه تمثيل علاقات وكالة الفضاء الدولية باستمرار في أي مصدر معرفي. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما تُظهر موارد المعرفة اختلافات كبيرة في نطاقها وخيارات التمثيل والاستخدام المقصود ، لإحداث اختلافات كبيرة في الاستخدام المتوقع وتأثيرها على المهام المختلفة. يفحص هذا البرنامج التعليمي الأسس النظرية للاستيعاب وتجسيده العملي من خلال علاقات IsA التي يتم تجميعها يدويًا أو استخراجها تلقائيًا. يتناول علاقات IsA من تعريفها الرسمي ؛ من خلال الاختيارات العملية التي تم إجراؤها في تمثيلهم داخل مصادر المعرفة المتاحة على نطاق أوسع وأكثر استخدامًا ؛ للحصول عليها تلقائيًا من مستودعات المستندات ، بدلاً من تجميعها يدويًا من قبل المساهمين البشريين ؛ لتأثيرها في تحليل النص واسترجاع المعلومات. كمحركات بحث\nالابتعاد عن إرجاع مجموعة من الروابط وأقرب إلى النتائج المرجوة التي تجيب بشكل مباشر على الاستفسارات ، تلعب علاقات IsA دورًا متزايد الأهمية نحو فهم أفضل للوثائق والاستفسارات. يعلم البرنامج التعليمي الجمهور حول التعريفات والافتراضات والخيارات العملية المتعلقة بنمذجة وتمثيل علاقات ISA في الموارد القائمة والمجمعة بشريًا للحالات والمفاهيم والتسلسلات الهرمية المفاهيمية الناتجة ؛ طرق لاستخراج مجموعات الحالات تلقائيًا ضمن المفاهيم غير المسماة أو المصنفة ، حيث يمكن اعتبار المفاهيم كمجموعة مسطحة أو منظمة بشكل هرمي ؛ وتطبيقات علاقات ISA في استرجاع المعلومات.', 'es': 'A través de la subsunción y la instanciación, las instancias individuales («inteligencia artificial», «el cerdo manchado») que de otro modo abarcan una amplia gama de dominios pueden reunirse y organizarse bajo jerarquías conceptuales. Las jerarquías conectan conceptos más específicos («subcampos de la informática», «gastropubs») con conceptos más generales («disciplinas académicas», «restaurantes») a través de las relaciones iSA. Las propiedades explícitas o implícitas aplicables y definitorias de conceptos más generales son heredadas por sus conceptos más específicos, hasta las instancias conectadas a las partes inferiores de las jerarquías. La subsunción representa un principio nítido y de aplicación universal para representar consistentemente las relaciones de ISA en cualquier recurso de conocimiento. Sin embargo, los recursos de conocimiento a menudo muestran diferencias significativas en su alcance, opciones de representación y uso previsto, lo que provoca diferencias significativas en el uso esperado y el impacto en diversas tareas. Este tutorial examina los fundamentos teóricos de la subsunción y su realización práctica a través de relaciones ISA compiladas manualmente o extraídas automáticamente. Aborda las relaciones ISA desde su definición formal; a través de elecciones prácticas realizadas en su representación dentro de los recursos de conocimiento disponibles más amplios y ampliamente utilizados; hasta su adquisición automática de repositorios de documentos, en lugar de su compilación manual por parte de colaboradores humanos; su impacto en el análisis de textos y la recuperación de información. Como motores de búsqueda\nAl alejarse de devolver un conjunto de enlaces y acercarse a devolver resultados que respondan más directamente a las consultas, las relaciones ISA desempeñan un papel cada vez más importante hacia una mejor comprensión de los documentos y las consultas. El tutorial enseña a la audiencia las definiciones, suposiciones y opciones prácticas relacionadas con el modelado y la representación de las relaciones ISA en recursos existentes compilados por humanos de instancias, conceptos y jerarquías conceptuales resultantes; métodos para extraer automáticamente conjuntos de instancias dentro de conceptos etiquetados, donde los conceptos pueden considerarse como un conjunto plano u organizarse jerárquicamente; y aplicaciones de las relaciones ISA en la recuperación de información.', 'fr': "Grâce à la subsumption et à l'instanciation, des instances individuelles («\xa0intelligence artificielle\xa0», «\xa0le cochon tacheté\xa0») couvrant un large éventail de domaines peuvent être regroupées et organisées selon des hiérarchies conceptuelles. Les hiérarchies relient des concepts plus spécifiques («\xa0sous-domaines informatiques\xa0», «\xa0pubs gastronomiques\xa0») à des concepts plus généraux («\xa0disciplines académiques\xa0», «\xa0restaurants\xa0») par le biais de relations iSA. Les propriétés explicites ou implicites applicables et définissant des concepts plus généraux sont héritées par leurs concepts plus spécifiques, jusqu'aux instances connectées aux parties inférieures des hiérarchies. La subsumption représente un principe clair et universellement applicable pour représenter de manière cohérente les relations iSA dans n'importe quelle ressource de connaissances. Pourtant, les ressources de connaissances présentent souvent des différences significatives dans leur portée, leurs choix de représentation et leur utilisation prévue, ce qui entraîne des différences significatives dans leur utilisation attendue et leur impact sur diverses tâches. Ce tutoriel examine les fondements théoriques de la subsomption et sa mise en œuvre pratique par le biais de relations iSA compilées manuellement ou extraites automatiquement. Il aborde les relations ISA depuis leur définition formelle\xa0; en passant par les choix pratiques effectués dans leur représentation au sein des ressources de connaissances disponibles les plus vastes et les plus largement utilisées\xa0; jusqu'à leur acquisition automatique à partir de référentiels de documents, par opposition à leur compilation manuelle par des contributeurs humains\xa0; leur impact sur l'analyse de texte et la récupération d'informations. Comme moteurs de recherche\ns'éloignant du renvoi d'un ensemble de liens pour se rapprocher des résultats qui répondent plus directement aux requêtes, les relations iSA jouent un rôle de plus en plus important pour une meilleure compréhension des documents et des requêtes. Le didacticiel enseigne au public les définitions, les hypothèses et les choix pratiques liés à la modélisation et à la représentation des relations iSA dans des ressources humaines existantes d'instances, de concepts et de hiérarchies conceptuelles résultantes\xa0; des méthodes pour extraire automatiquement des ensembles d'instances dans des les concepts étiquetés, où les concepts peuvent être considérés comme un ensemble plat ou organisés hiérarchiquement\xa0; et les applications des relations iSA dans la recherche d'informations.", 'pt': 'Por meio de subsunção e instanciação, instâncias individuais (“inteligência artificial”, “o porco manchado”) de outra forma abrangendo uma ampla gama de domínios podem ser reunidas e organizadas sob hierarquias conceituais. As hierarquias conectam conceitos mais específicos (“subcampos de ciência da computação”, “gastropubs”) a conceitos mais gerais (“disciplinas acadêmicas”, “restaurantes”) por meio de relações IsA. Propriedades explícitas ou implícitas aplicáveis e definidoras de conceitos mais gerais são herdadas por seus conceitos mais específicos, até as instâncias conectadas às partes inferiores das hierarquias. A subsunção representa um princípio nítido e universalmente aplicável para representar consistentemente as relações IsA em qualquer recurso de conhecimento. No entanto, os recursos de conhecimento geralmente exibem diferenças significativas em seu escopo, escolhas de representação e uso pretendido, para causar diferenças significativas em seu uso esperado e impacto em várias tarefas. Este tutorial examina os fundamentos teóricos da subsunção e sua concretização prática por meio de relações IsA compiladas manualmente ou extraídas automaticamente. Aborda as relações IsA a partir de sua definição formal; por meio de escolhas práticas feitas em sua representação dentro dos recursos de conhecimento mais amplos e mais amplamente utilizados; à sua aquisição automática de repositórios de documentos, em oposição à sua compilação manual por colaboradores humanos; ao seu impacto na análise de texto e na recuperação de informações. Como motores de busca\nlonge de retornar um conjunto de links e mais perto de retornar resultados que respondam mais diretamente às consultas, as relações IsA desempenham um papel cada vez mais importante para uma melhor compreensão de documentos e consultas. O tutorial ensina o público sobre definições, suposições e escolhas práticas relacionadas à modelagem e representação de relações IsA em recursos existentes, compilados por humanos de instâncias, conceitos e hierarquias conceituais resultantes; métodos para extrair automaticamente conjuntos de instâncias dentro de conceitos não rotulados ou rotulados, onde os conceitos podem ser considerados como um conjunto plano ou organizados hierarquicamente; e aplicações das relações IsA na recuperação da informação.', 'ja': '帰納およびインスタンス化を通じて、さもなければ、広範囲のドメインにわたる個々のインスタンス（「人工知能」、「斑点のあるブタ」）を、概念的階層の下にまとめ、整理することができる。 階層は、ISA関係を通じて、より具体的な概念（「コンピュータサイエンスのサブフィールド」、「ガストロパブ」）とより一般的な概念（「学問分野」、「レストラン」）を結びつける。 より一般的な概念に適用され、定義される明示的または暗黙的なプロパティは、階層の下部に接続されたインスタンスまで、より具体的な概念によって継承されます。 Subsumptionは、あらゆる知識リソースでISA関係を一貫して表現するための、鮮明で普遍的に適用可能な原則を表しています。 しかし、知識リソースは、多くの場合、その範囲、表現の選択肢、および意図された使用方法に有意な違いを示し、予想される使用方法の有意な違いを引き起こし、さまざまなタスクに影響を与えます。 このチュートリアルでは、手動でコンパイルされた、または自動的に抽出されたIsA関係を通じて、帰納の理論的基礎とその実践的な実施形態を検討します。 これは、正式な定義から、利用可能なナレッジリソースのより大きな、より広く使用されている範囲内での表現での実用的な選択、人間の貢献者による手動コンパイルとは対照的に、文書リポジトリからの自動取得、テキスト分析と情報検索への影響まで、ISA関係を扱います。検索エンジンとして\n一連のリンクを返すことから離れ、より直接的にクエリに答える結果を返すことに近づくと、ISA関係は文書とクエリをよりよく理解するためにますます重要な役割を果たします。このチュートリアルでは、既存の人間が編纂したインスタンス、概念、および結果として生じる概念的階層のリソースにおけるISA関係のモデリングおよび表現に関連する定義、仮定、および実用的な選択肢、ラベル付けされていないまたはラベル付けされた概念内のインスタンスのセットを自動的に抽出するための方法、コンセプトがフラットセットまたは階層的に整理されていると見なされる可能性があること、および情報取得におけるISA関係の応用について聴衆に教えます。', 'zh': '包实之化,可以越博域之单("人工智能","斑点猪")合之于层次结构。 层次结构以IsA名(计算机科学子领域,美食酒)与更(学科,餐馆)系焉。 用与定义更显式隐式二,属于层次结构。 包含者,明也,所以终始Isa也。 然知识资源,所在显异,而用法显异。 本教程因手动编译自取之Isa,考其理实。 定义解Isa。 以大益博用者,以知资源为实也;以大博用者,以知资源为实也。 自取文档储库,非人贡献者手动编译。 其于文本析信息检索之中。 以为搜索引擎\n自反链接转更近,IsA 关文档问。 其教程言于众编译之实,其名层次结构其资建模与Isa之义,伪设而实择之。 名自取实例集,名曰平集。 及Isa在信息检索中应用。', 'hi': 'subsumption और instantiation के माध्यम से, व्यक्तिगत उदाहरण ("कृत्रिम बुद्धिमत्ता", "धब्बेदार सुअर") अन्यथा डोमेन की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में फैले हुए एक साथ लाया जा सकता है और वैचारिक पदानुक्रम के तहत आयोजित किया जा सकता है। पदानुक्रम आईएसए संबंधों के माध्यम से अधिक सामान्य अवधारणाओं ("अकादमिक विषयों", "रेस्तरां") से अधिक विशिष्ट अवधारणाओं ("कंप्यूटर विज्ञान उपक्षेत्र", "गैस्ट्रोपब्स") को जोड़ते हैं। स्पष्ट या अंतर्निहित गुण लागू होते हैं, और परिभाषित करते हैं, अधिक सामान्य अवधारणाओं को उनकी अधिक विशिष्ट अवधारणाओं द्वारा विरासत में मिला है, पदानुक्रम के निचले हिस्सों से जुड़े उदाहरणों के नीचे। Subsumption किसी भी ज्ञान संसाधन में लगातार ISA संबंधों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने की दिशा में एक कुरकुरा, सार्वभौमिक रूप से लागू सिद्धांत का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। फिर भी ज्ञान संसाधन अक्सर उनके दायरे, प्रतिनिधित्व विकल्पों और इच्छित उपयोग में महत्वपूर्ण अंतर प्रदर्शित करते हैं, ताकि उनके अपेक्षित उपयोग और विभिन्न कार्यों पर प्रभाव में महत्वपूर्ण अंतर हो सके। यह ट्यूटोरियल subsumption की सैद्धांतिक नींव की जांच करता है, और IsA संबंधों के माध्यम से इसके व्यावहारिक अवतार मैन्युअल रूप से संकलित या स्वचालित रूप से निकाला। यह उनकी औपचारिक परिभाषा से आईएसए संबंधों को संबोधित करता है; उपलब्ध ज्ञान संसाधनों के बड़े और अधिक व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले के भीतर उनके प्रतिनिधित्व में किए गए व्यावहारिक विकल्पों के माध्यम से; दस्तावेज़ भंडार से उनके स्वचालित अधिग्रहण के लिए, जैसा कि मानव योगदानकर्ताओं द्वारा उनके मैनुअल संकलन के विपरीत है; पाठ विश्लेषण और सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति में उनके प्रभाव के लिए। खोज इंजन के रूप में\nलिंक का एक सेट लौटने से दूर चले जाएं और परिणामों को वापस करने के करीब जो अधिक सीधे प्रश्नों का उत्तर देते हैं, आईएसए संबंध दस्तावेजों और प्रश्नों की बेहतर समझ की दिशा में तेजी से महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। ट्यूटोरियल दर्शकों को मॉडलिंग से संबंधित परिभाषाओं, मान्यताओं और व्यावहारिक विकल्पों के बारे में सिखाता है और उदाहरणों, अवधारणाओं और परिणामी वैचारिक पदानुक्रमों के मौजूदा, मानव-संकलित संसाधनों में आईएसए संबंधों का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है; स्वचालित रूप से अनलेबल या लेबल की गई अवधारणाओं के भीतर उदाहरणों के सेट को निकालने के तरीके, जहां अवधारणाओं को एक फ्लैट सेट या पदानुक्रमित रूप से व्यवस्थित माना जा सकता है; और सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति में ISA संबंधों के अनुप्रयोगों.', 'ru': 'Посредством включения и создания экземпляров отдельные экземпляры ("искусственный интеллект", "пятнистая свинья"), охватывающие широкий спектр областей, могут быть объединены и организованы в рамках концептуальных иерархий. Иерархии связывают более конкретные концепции («подполя информатики», «гастропабы») с более общими концепциями («академические дисциплины», «рестораны») через отношения ISA. Явные или неявные свойства, применимые к более общим концепциям и определяющие их, наследуются их более конкретными концепциями, вплоть до экземпляров, связанных с нижними частями иерархий. Потребление представляет собой четкий, универсально применимый принцип для последовательного представления отношений МА в любом ресурсе знаний. Тем не менее ресурсы знаний часто имеют существенные различия в сфере их охвата, вариантах представления и предполагаемом использовании, что вызывает существенные различия в их предполагаемом использовании и влиянии на различные задачи. В данном учебном пособии рассматриваются теоретические основы поглощения и его практическое воплощение через отношения ISA, скомпилированные вручную или извлеченные автоматически. В нем рассматриваются отношения МА на основе их формального определения; практического выбора, сделанного в отношении их представленности в более широком и широко используемом объеме имеющихся ресурсов знаний; их автоматического получения из хранилищ документов в отличие от их ручной компиляции вкладчиками-человеками; их влияния на анализ текста и поиск информации.\nотойти от возврата набора ссылок и приблизиться к возврату результатов, которые более непосредственно отвечают на запросы, отношения ISA играют все более важную роль в улучшении понимания документов и запросов. Учебное пособие обучает аудиторию определениям, допущениям и практическим вариантам выбора, связанным с моделированием и представлением отношений ISA в существующих, скомпилированных человеком ресурсах экземпляров, концепций и результирующих концептуальных иерархий; методам автоматического извлечения множеств экземпляров в немеченных или помеченных концепциях, где концепции могут рассматриваться как плоский набор или организованы иерархически; и применению отношений ISA в извлечении информации.', 'ga': 'Trí dhul isteach agus mheandarach, is féidir cásanna aonair (“intleacht shaorga”, “an mhuc bheach”) a chuimsíonn raon leathan réimsí a thabhairt le chéile agus a eagrú faoi ordlathais choincheapa. Ceanglaíonn na hordlathais coincheapa níos sainiúla (“fo-réimsí eolaíocht ríomhaireachta”, “gastropubs”) le coincheapa níos ginearálta (“disciplíní acadúla”, “bialanna”) trí chaidreamh ISA. Faightear airíonna soiléire nó intuigthe a bhaineann le coincheapa níos ginearálta agus a shainíonn, de bharr na gcoincheapa níos sainiúla a bhaineann leo, síos go dtí na cásanna a bhaineann leis na codanna íochtair den ordlathas. Is prionsabal briosc é an tsuim atá infheidhme go huilíoch maidir le caidreamh EIS a léiriú go comhsheasmhach in aon acmhainn eolais. Ach is minic a léiríonn acmhainní eolais difríochtaí suntasacha ina scóip, ina roghanna ionadaíochta agus ina n-úsáid bheartaithe, chun difríochtaí suntasacha a chruthú ina n-úsáid ionchais agus tionchar ar thascanna éagsúla. Scrúdaíonn an rang teagaisc seo na bunsraitheanna teoiriciúla a bhaineann le haighneacht, agus a chorprú praiticiúil trí chaidreamh ISA a tiomsaítear de láimh nó a bhaintear go huathoibríoch. Tugann sé aghaidh ar chaidreamh CIS óna sainmhíniú foirmiúil; trí roghanna praiticiúla a dhéanamh ina n-ionadaíocht laistigh de na hacmhainní eolais atá ar fáil níos mó agus a úsáidtear níos forleithne; a bhfáil go huathoibríoch ó stórtha doiciméad, seachas iad a bheith tiomsaithe de láimh ag rannchuiditheoirí daonna; dá dtionchar in anailís téacs agus in aisghabháil faisnéise. Mar innill chuardaigh\nbogadh ar shiúl ó shraith nasc a thabhairt ar ais agus níos gaire do thorthaí a thabhairt ar ais a fhreagraíonn fiosrúcháin ar bhealach níos dírí, tá ról níos tábhachtaí ag caidreamh le ISA i dtreo tuiscint níos fearr ar dhoiciméid agus ceisteanna. Múineann an rang teagaisc don lucht éisteachta faoi shainmhínithe, toimhdí agus roghanna praiticiúla a bhaineann le samhaltú agus ionadaíocht a dhéanamh ar chaidreamh ISA in acmhainní atá ann cheana féin, arna dtiomsú ag an duine de chásanna, de choincheapa agus sna hordlathais choincheapúla a bhíonn mar thoradh air; 648/2012 Téacs atá ábhartha maidir leis an LEE modhanna chun tacair cásanna a bhaint go huathoibríoch laistigh de choincheapa nach bhfuil lipéadaithe nó lipéadaithe, ina bhféadfar na coincheapa a mheas mar thacar comhréidh nó a n-eagrófar go ordlathach; agus caidreamh CIS a chur i bhfeidhm in aisghabháil faisnéise.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ გადაგრძელება კომპონტაქტის შესახებ და გადაგრძელება შესახებ, რომელიც უფრო დირექტურად განსხვავებული კითხვების შესახებ, ISA-ს შესახებ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი პრო სტუტერიალური მოსწავლის განსაზღვრებები, წარმოდგენები და პრექტიკური არჩევები, რომლებიც მოდელირებაზე და გამოსაყენებული ISA-ს შესახებ მსგავსი, ადამიანური შექმნილი რესურსი ინსტუტებების, კონ მოცემებების ავტომატურად გამოყენება ინსტენსტის კონფიგურაციისთვის, როცა კონფიგურაციები შეიძლება აღმოჩნოთ როგორც სტატური კონფიგურაცია ან ორგანიზაცი და ინფორმაციის მიღებაში ISA პროგრამების გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'Az IsA kapcsolatok egyre fontosabb szerepet játszanak a dokumentumok és lekérdezések jobb megértésében. Az oktató megtanítja a közönséget az IsA kapcsolatok modellezéséhez és ábrázolásához kapcsolódó definíciókról, feltételezésekről és gyakorlati választásokról az esetek, fogalmak és az ebből eredő fogalmi hierarchiák meglévő, emberi által összeállított erőforrásaiban; a címke nélküli vagy címkézett fogalmakban lévő példánysorozatok automatikus kivonására szolgáló módszerek, ahol a fogalmak lapos halmaznak vagy hierarchikusan szervezhetők; és az IsA kapcsolatok alkalmazása az információvisszakeresésben.', 'it': "Le relazioni IsA svolgono un ruolo sempre più importante per una migliore comprensione dei documenti e delle domande. Il tutorial insegna al pubblico definizioni, ipotesi e scelte pratiche relative alla modellazione e rappresentazione delle relazioni IsA nelle risorse esistenti compilate dall'uomo di istanze, concetti e gerarchie concettuali risultanti; metodi per estrarre automaticamente insiemi di istanze all'interno di concetti non etichettati o etichettati, in cui i concetti possono essere considerati come un insieme piatto o organizzati gerarchicamente; e applicazioni delle relazioni IsA nel recupero di informazioni.", 'el': 'να απομακρυνθούν από την επιστροφή ενός συνόλου συνδέσεων και να πλησιάσουν την επιστροφή αποτελεσμάτων που απαντούν πιο άμεσα σε ερωτήματα, οι σχέσεις ΙσΑ διαδραματίζουν όλο και πιο σημαντικό ρόλο για την καλύτερη κατανόηση των εγγράφων και των ερωτήσεων. Το σεμινάριο διδάσκει το κοινό σχετικά με τους ορισμούς, τις παραδοχές και τις πρακτικές επιλογές που σχετίζονται με τη μοντελοποίηση και την αναπαράσταση σχέσεων σε υπάρχοντες, ανθρώπινους πόρους περιπτώσεων, εννοιών και συνακόλουθων εννοιολογικών ιεραρχίων. μέθοδοι αυτόματης εξαγωγής συνόλων περιπτώσεων εντός εννοιών χωρίς επισήμανση ή επισήμανση, όπου οι έννοιες μπορούν να θεωρηθούν ως ένα επίπεδο σύνολο ή οργανωμένη ιεραρχικά· και εφαρμογές των σχέσεων ΙσΑ στην ανάκτηση πληροφοριών.', 'kk': 'Сұрақтарды тікелей жауап беретін сілтемелерді қайтаруға жақын және қайтаруға жақын, ISA қатынастары құжаттарды және сұрақтарды жақсы түсінуге көп маңызды роль береді. Орындаушылар үлгілеу және ISA қатынасы бар, адамдардың компиляциясы, концепциялар және концепциялық иерархиялардың ресурстарындағы мәліметтер, таңдаулар және практикалық таңдаулар туралы аудиторияларды ұстайды. жазылмаған немесе жарлық концепцияларында институттар жиынын автоматты түрде тарқату әдістері, қайда концепцияларды жалғыз орнатылған немесе түрлендірілген иерархиялық ретінде қарастырылады; мәліметті алу үшін ISA қатынасының қолданбалары.', 'ms': 'jauh dari mengembalikan set pautan dan lebih dekat dengan mengembalikan keputusan yang lebih langsung menjawab pertanyaan, hubungan ISA bermain peran semakin penting untuk memahami dokumen dan pertanyaan yang lebih baik. Tutorial mengajar penonton mengenai takrifan, asumsi dan pilihan praktik yang berkaitan dengan pemodelan dan mewakili hubungan IsA dalam sumber-sumber yang terdapat, dikompilasi oleh manusia, contoh dan hierarki konsep yang berasal; kaedah untuk mengekstrak secara automatik set kejadian dalam konsep yang tidak ditabel atau ditabel, di mana konsep boleh dianggap sebagai set rata atau diatur secara hierarkis; dan aplikasi hubungan ISA dalam pemulihan maklumat.', 'ml': 'ഒരു കൂട്ടം ലിങ്കുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചുവരുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും നേരിട്ട് ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചുവരുത്തുന്നതിലേക്കും നീങ്ങിപ്പോകു നിലവിലുള്ള ഇസായുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങളിലും നിലവിലുള്ള മനുഷ്യരുടെ സംഭവങ്ങളിലും മനുഷ്യരുടെ സമ്പത്തുകളിലുമുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളിലുമുള്ള വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d, ആശയങ്ങളും ആശയങ്ങള സ്വയം പുറത്തേക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഇസായുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളും.', 'lt': 'atsisakyti grąžinti sąsajas ir priartinti prie grąžinamų rezultatų, kurie labiau tiesiogiai atsako į klausimus, ISA santykiai atlieka vis svarbesnį vaidmenį siekiant geriau suprasti dokumentus ir klausimus. Mokykloje auditorija mokoma apie apibrėžimus, prielaidas ir praktinius pasirinkimus, susijusius su modeliavimu ir ISA santykių atstovavimu esamuose žmogiškuosiuose atvejų, koncepcijų ir susijusių koncepcinių hierarchijų ištekliuose; metodai, taikomi automatiškai ekstrahuojant atvejų rinkinius nepažymėtose arba pažymėtose sąvokose, kai sąvokos gali būti laikomos plokščiais rinkiniais arba hierarchiškai organizuotomis; ir ISA santykių taikymą informacijos gavimo srityje.', 'mk': 'да се оддалечат од враќањето на неколку врски и поблиску до враќањето на резултатите кои повеќе директно одговараат на прашањата, односите на ИСА играат сé важна улога кон подобро разбирање на документите и прашањата. Научникот ја учи публиката за дефинициите, претпоставувањата и практичните избори поврзани со моделирањето и претставувањето на односите на ИСА во постоечките, човечки компилирани ресурси на случаи, концепти и резултатите на концептуалната хиерархија; методи за автоматско извлекување на сетови на инстанции во неозначени или означени концепти, каде концептите може да се сметаат за рамен сет или организирани хиерархички; и апликациите на односите на ИСА во преземањето информации.', 'mt': 'jimxu ’l bogħod mir-ritorn ta’ sett ta’ rabtiet u eqreb lejn ir-ritorn ta’ riżultati li jwieġbu aktar direttament għal mistoqsijiet, ir-relazzjonijiet tal-ISA għandhom rwol dejjem aktar importanti lejn fehim a ħjar tad-dokumenti u mistoqsijiet. It-tutorjali jgħallem lill-udjenza dwar id-definizzjonijiet, is-suppożizzjonijiet u l-għażliet prattiċi relatati mal-immudellar u r-rappreżentazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet tal-IsA f’riżorsi eżistenti, ikkumpilati mill-bniedem ta’ każijiet, kunċetti u ġerarkiji kunċettwali li jirriżultaw; methods for automatically extracting sets of instances within unlabeled or labeled concepts, where the concepts may be considered as a flat set or organized hierarchically;  u l-applikazzjonijiet tar-relazzjonijiet tal-IsA fil-ġbir tal-informazzjoni.', 'pl': 'Odchodząc od zwracania zestawu linków i bliżej zwracania wyników, które bardziej bezpośrednio odpowiadają na zapytania, relacje Isa odgrywają coraz ważniejszą rolę w lepszym zrozumieniu dokumentów i zapytań. Poradnik uczy odbiorców definicji, założeń i praktycznych wyborów związanych z modelowaniem i reprezentowaniem relacji Isa w istniejących, kompilowanych przez ludzi zasobach instancji, koncepcji i wynikających z nich hierarchii koncepcyjnych; metody automatycznego wyodrębniania zestawów instancji w pojęciach nieoznakowanych lub oznakowanych, w przypadku gdy pojęcia te mogą być uznane za zbiór płaski lub zorganizowane hierarchicznie; i zastosowania relacji Isa w pozyskiwaniu informacji.', 'ro': 'departe de returnarea unui set de linkuri și mai aproape de returnarea rezultatelor care răspund mai direct la întrebări, relațiile IsA joacă un rol din ce în ce mai important pentru o mai bună înțelegere a documentelor și interogărilor. Tutorialul învață publicul despre definiții, ipoteze și opțiuni practice legate de modelarea și reprezentarea relațiilor IsA în resursele existente, compilate de om ale instanțelor, conceptelor și ierarhiilor conceptuale rezultate; metode de extragere automată a seturilor de instanțe din concepte fără etichete sau etichetate, în cazul în care conceptele pot fi considerate ca un set plat sau organizate ierarhic; și aplicațiile relațiilor ISA în recuperarea informațiilor.', 'mn': 'Хариулт нь илүү шууд хариулт өгөх үр дүнтэй холбоотой. ИСА-ын харилцаа баримт болон query-ын илүү ойлголтын тулд илүү чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Боловсрол нь зөвхөн сонсогчдыг моделчлал болон илэрхийлэх ИСА холбоотой тодорхойлолтуудын тухай тодорхойлолт, таамаглал, практикийн сонголтуудын тухай зааж өгдөг. тодорхойлолтуудыг төвөгтэй эсвэл төлөвлөгдсөн ойлголтын дотор автоматаар гаргах арга зам юм. ИСА-ын харилцааны хэрэглээ.', 'no': 'Flytt vekk frå returnering av ei sett lenkjer og nærmere til returnering av resultat som meir direkte svarar på spørsmål, speler IsA-relasjonar ein større viktig rolle mot ein bedre forståelse av dokument og spørsmål. Opplæringa lærer publikum om definisjonar, assumpsjonar og praktiske val relaterte til modellering og representeringa av ISA-relasjonar i eksisterande, menneskelige kompilerte ressursar av instansar, konseptar og resultater av konseptuelle hierarki; metodar for automatisk utpakking av setningar av instansar i ulike eller merkelige konseptar, der konseptane kan vera kalla som ein flat sett eller organisert hierarkisk. og brukar av ISA-relasjonar i informasjonshenting.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධතාවක් ආපහු ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ආපහු ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් වඩා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dර The Tuorial learns the Auditors on definition, assumption and Practical choices සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් මොඩල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ISA සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, මිනිස්සු සම්බන්ධ විදිහට, සං ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති නැති න සහ ISA සම්බන්ධතාවක් තොරතුරු අරගෙන යන්න.', 'ta': 'மேலும் நேரடியாக விடைக்கும் முடிவுகளை திரும்ப வேண்டும் முடிவுகளை திரும்புவதிலிருந்து திரும்புவதிலிருந்து வெளியேறுகிறது,  The tutorial teaches the audience about definitions, assumptions and practical choices related to modeling and representing IsA relations in existing, human-compiled resources of instances, concepts and resulting conceptual hierarchies;  குறிப்பிடாத அல்லது குறிப்பிடாத கருத்துக்களுக்குள் தானாகவே நிகழ்வுகளை வெளியேற்ற முறைகளை வெளியேற்ற முறை தகவல் மீட்டெடுப்பதில் இஸ்ஏ தொடர்புகளின் பயன்பாடுகளை', 'sr': 'Odmaknite se od povratka kompleta veza i bliže povratku rezultata koje se izravnije odgovaraju na pitanja, odnosi IsA imaju veću važnu ulogu za bolje razumijevanje dokumenta i pitanja. Tutorijalno uči publiku o definicijama, pretpostavkama i praktičnim izborima povezanim sa modelima i predstavljanjem odnosa ISA u postojećim, ljudskim resursima kompileranih slučajeva, koncepta i rezultativnim konceptualnim hijerarhijama; metode za automatsko izvlačenje set a instancija unutar neizbiljnih ili etiketiranih koncepta, gdje se koncepti mogu smatrati ravnim setom ili organizovanim hijerarhički; i primjene odnosa IsA u prikupljanju informacija.', 'sv': 'IsA-relationer spelar en allt viktigare roll för en bättre förståelse av dokument och frågor. Handledningen lär publiken om definitioner, antaganden och praktiska val relaterade till modellering och representation av IsA-relationer i befintliga, mänskliga sammanställda resurser av instanser, begrepp och resulterande konceptuella hierarkier; Metoder för automatisk extraktion av instanser inom omärkta eller märkta begrepp, där begreppen kan betraktas som en platt uppsättning eller organiseras hierarkiskt. och tillämpningen av IsA-relationer i informationssökning.', 'so': "ka guur in aad dib u soo celiso koox xiriir ah oo u dhow dib u celinta resultiyada si toos ah ugu jawaaba su'aalaha, xiriirka IsA waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo u jeeda garashada qoraalka iyo su'aalaha. Waxbarashada waxbarashadu wuxuu dadka baraa sawirro, malooyin iyo doorashooyin caadiga ah oo la xiriira sameynta iyo wakiilka xiriirka IsA ee ay jiraan, rasmiga la koobi karo tusaalooyin, fikrada iyo waxyaabaha la soo jeedo. qaababka lagu soo saaro tusaalooyin aan la qorin ama aan la qorin, kaas oo lagu tirin karo in fekerka lagu soo bandhigi karo bannaan ama loo qaban karo hierarkiisa; iyo codsiyada xiriirka IsA ee ku hela macluumaadka.", 'ur': 'ایک مجموعہ لینک واپس لانے سے اور نتیجے واپس لانے سے زیادہ قریب جانے سے دور جاؤ جو سچے سوال سے زیادہ جواب دیتے ہیں، اسا رابطہ اس سے زیادہ اہم رقم رکھتا ہے جو سند اور سوال کے بہتر سمجھنے کے لئے ہے. تحصیلات کی تعلیم دینے والوں کو معلومات، فرضیات اور قابل انتخاب کے بارے میں سکھاتی ہے جو موجود موجود ہے اور اسے معلومات کرتی ہیں، موجود موجود موجود موجود موجودات، نظریات اور فرضیات کے معاملات میں انسان کی تعلیمات کی نسبت ہے، بغیر نامیبل یا لیبل کی نظریں میں ایسٹنسٹ کے سٹ کو اٹھانے کے مطابق طریقے بنا سکتے ہیں، جہاں یہ نظریں فالت سٹ یا سازمان کیے جاتے ہیں، اور اسا کے معاملات حاصل کرنے میں استعمال کریں۔', 'uz': "Name O'qituvchi o'quvchi tadqiqlarni o'rganadi, tasavvur, g'oyalar va praktikal choʻllarini modellash va IsA murakkablarining mavjud, shaxsiy narsalar, g'oyalar va g'oyalar bilan bog'liqchi narsa haqida o'rganadi; @ info: whatsthis va ma'lumotni olib tashlash uchun IsA munosabatlarining dasturlari.", 'vi': 'tránh xa việc khôi phục một bộ liên kết và gần hơn đến việc trả lại kết quả mà trả lời các câu hỏi trực tiếp hơn, mối quan hệ của Issa đóng vai trò ngày càng quan trọng để tìm hiểu tốt về tài liệu và các câu hỏi. Thầy lớp dạy khán giả về những định hướng, giả thuyết và các lựa chọn thực tế liên quan đến việc mô phỏng và đại diện cho quan hệ với Isla trong các nguồn tài nguyên hiện tại, tập hợp người của các trường hợp, khái niệm và hệ thống thiết lập dẫn đến; phương pháp để tự động trích các trường hợp bên trong các khái niệm chưa được dán nhãn, nếu các khái niệm này có thể được coi là một bộ cấu trúc hay tổ chức theo thứ tự. và các ứng dụng của quan hệ với lsA trong việc lấy thông tin.', 'bg': 'Отдалечете се от връщане на набор от връзки и по-близо до връщане на резултати, които по-пряко отговарят на запитвания, отношенията играят все по-важна роля за по-добро разбиране на документите и запитванията. Инструкторът учи аудиторията за дефиниции, допускания и практически избори, свързани с моделирането и представянето на отношенията в съществуващи, човешки компилирани ресурси на инстанции, концепции и произтичащи от тях концептуални йерархии; методи за автоматично извличане на съвкупности от инстанции в рамките на немаркирани или обозначени понятия, когато понятията могат да се считат за плосък набор или йерархично организирани; и приложения на отношенията на АСУ при извличането на информация.', 'de': 'Die Isa-Beziehungen spielen eine immer wichtigere Rolle für ein besseres Verständnis von Dokumenten und Abfragen. Das Tutorial vermittelt Definitionen, Annahmen und praktische Entscheidungen im Zusammenhang mit der Modellierung und Repräsentation von Isa-Beziehungen in bestehenden, vom Menschen zusammengestellten Ressourcen von Instanzen, Konzepten und daraus resultierenden konzeptionellen Hierarchien. Methoden zum automatischen Extrahieren von Instanzsätzen innerhalb nicht beschrifteter oder beschrifteter Konzepte, bei denen die Konzepte als flache Menge oder hierarchisch organisiert betrachtet werden können; und Anwendungen von Isa-Beziehungen in der Informationsgewinnung.', 'hr': 'Odmaknite se od povratka kompleta veza i bliže povratku rezultata koje se izravnije odgovaraju na pitanja, odnosi IsA imaju sve važniju ulogu u cilju boljeg razumijevanja dokumenta i pitanja. Učitelj uči publiku o definicijama, pretpostavkama i praktičnim izborima vezanim za modeliranje i predstavljanje odnosa ISA-a u postojećim, ljudskim resursima kompiliranih slučajeva, koncepta i rezultativnim konceptualnim hijerarhijama; metode za automatsko izvlačenje set a instancija unutar neizbiljnih ili označenih koncepta u kojima se koncepti mogu smatrati ravnim setom ili organiziranim hijerarhički; i primjene odnosa IsA u prikupljanju informacija.', 'nl': 'Isa-relaties spelen een steeds belangrijkere rol bij het beter begrijpen van documenten en queries. De tutorial leert het publiek over definities, aannames en praktische keuzes met betrekking tot het modelleren en vertegenwoordigen van Isa-relaties in bestaande, door mensen gecompileerde bronnen van instanties, concepten en resulterende conceptuele hiërarchieën; methoden voor het automatisch extraheren van sets van instanties binnen niet-gelabelde of gelabelde concepten, waarbij de concepten kunnen worden beschouwd als een vlakke verzameling of hiërarchisch georganiseerd; en toepassingen van Isa relaties bij het terugvinden van informatie.', 'da': 'IsA-relationer spiller en stadig vigtigere rolle i retning af en bedre forståelse af dokumenter og forespørgsler. Vejledningen lærer publikum om definitioner, antagelser og praktiske valg relateret til modellering og repræsentation af IsA relationer i eksisterende, menneskelige-kompilerede ressourcer af instanser, koncepter og resulterende konceptuelle hierarkier; metoder til automatisk udtrækning af forekomstsæt inden for ikke-mærkede eller mærkede begreber, hvor begreberne kan betragtes som et fladt sæt eller organiseret hierarkisk og anvendelse af IsA-relationer i informationssøgning.', 'id': 'menjauh dari mengembalikan set hubungan dan lebih dekat dengan mengembalikan hasil yang lebih langsung menjawab pertanyaan, hubungan ISA bermain peran yang semakin penting untuk memahami dokumen dan pertanyaan yang lebih baik. Tutorial mengajarkan penonton tentang definisi, asumsi dan pilihan praktis yang berhubungan dengan model dan mewakili hubungan ISA dalam sumber daya yang ada, dikompilasi oleh manusia dari contoh, konsep dan hierarki konsep yang berasal; metode untuk mengekstraksi secara otomatis set kejadian dalam konsep yang tidak ditabel atau ditabel, dimana konsep dapat dianggap sebagai set rata atau terorganisir secara hierarkis; dan aplikasi hubungan ISA dalam penemuan informasi.', 'tr': 'Bir topar baglaýyşlary yzyna almakdan uzak we yzyna çykmak üçin netijede düzgün soraglary jogap bermek üçin, IsA ilişkileri sened we soraglary gowurak düşünmek üçin has möhüm roli bar. Gurban tapçy düzenlere modelleme we çykmak we ISA baglanyşyny bar, adam bilen jemgyýetlenýän çykyşlar, düşünjeler we netijeli bir iýerarhiýanyň bardygyny düşündirýär; ahtaryşlar içinde ýazylmaz ýa-da etilgenýän düşünjeler içinde otomatik a ňlamak üçin modler, nähili düşünceler paýat düzüm ýa-da hiyerarhiýa düzümlenmediler; we ISA baglaýyşlaryň maglumaty almagyny bilen laýyşyrýarlar.', 'sw': 'ukiondoka na kurudisha mfululizo wa viungo na karibu na kurudisha matokeo ambayo yanajibu maswali ya moja kwa moja, mahusiano ya IsA yanacheza jukumu la muhimu kuelekea uelewa bora wa nyaraka na maswali. Elimu hiyo inawafundisha hadhira kuhusu tafsiri, dhana na chaguo za kihalisi zinazohusiana na kutengeneza mahusiano ya IsA katika maeneo yanayopo, rasilimali zilizokusanyika kwa binadamu za matukio, mawazo na matokeo yanayosababisha makusanyiko ya dhana; mbinu za kutengeneza matukio ya faragha ndani ya dhana isiyo na alama, ambapo dhana hizo zinaweza kuchukuliwa kama kitengo cha bango au kilichoratibiwa; na matumizi ya mahusiano ya IsA katika kurejea taarifa.', 'ko': '한 그룹의 링크를 되돌려 조회에 더욱 직접적으로 대답하는 결과까지 IsA 관계는 문서와 조회를 더욱 잘 이해하는 데 점점 중요한 역할을 발휘하고 있다.본 강좌는 관중에게 기존의, 인력으로 작성된 실례, 개념과 이로 인해 발생한 개념 차원 자원에서 모델링과 IsA 관계를 나타내는 정의, 가설과 실제 선택을 소개한다.표기되지 않거나 표기되지 않은 개념 내의 실례 집합을 자동으로 추출하는 방법인데 그 중에서 이러한 개념은 평면 집합이나 층 조직으로 볼 수 있다.IsA 관계가 정보 검색에서의 응용', 'sq': 'largohen nga kthimi i një sëre lidhjesh dhe më afër rezultateve që përgjigjen më drejtpërdrejt pyetjeve, marrëdhëniet ISA luajnë një rol gjithnjë e më të rëndësishëm drejt një kuptimi më të mirë të dokumenteve dhe pyetjeve. Tutoriali mëson publikun rreth përkufizimeve, supozimeve dhe zgjedhjeve praktike lidhur me modelimin dhe përfaqësimin e marrëdhënieve të ISA në burimet ekzistuese, të kompiliuara nga njerëzit të rasteve, koncepteve dhe hierarkive konceptuale që rezultojnë; metodat për nxjerrjen automatike të grupeve të rasteve brenda koncepteve jo të etiketuara apo të etiketuara, ku konceptet mund të konsiderohen si një grup i pjekur apo të organizuar hierarkikisht; dhe aplikimet e marrëdhënieve të ISA në marrjen e informacionit.', 'fa': 'از بازگشت مجموعه ارتباط و نزدیکتر به بازگشت نتیجه\u200cهایی که مستقیماً جواب می\u200cدهند، رابطه\u200cهای ISA نقش مهم\u200cتر برای فهمیدن بهتر از سند\u200cها و سوال\u200cها بازی می\u200cکنند. تحصیلات به مردم درباره تعریف، فرضیه\u200cها و انتخاب\u200cهای عملی که مربوط به مدل\u200cسازی و نمایش رابطه\u200cهای ISA در منابع\u200cهای موجود، جمع شده\u200cی انسان\u200cها، فرضیه\u200cها و فرضیه\u200cهای فرضیه\u200cهای فرضیه\u200cای است، آموزش می\u200cدهد. روش\u200cهایی برای اخراج کردن مجموعه\u200cهای نمونه\u200cهای خود در درون مفهوم\u200cهای نامه\u200cای یا نقاشی، جایی که مفهوم\u200cها می\u200cتوانند به عنوان مجموعه\u200cی ساده\u200cای یا سازمان\u200cشده\u200cاند به نظر گرفته شود; و کاربرد رابطه\u200cهای اسا در انتقال اطلاعات.', 'af': "Skuif weg van terugkeer van 'n stel skakels en naby om resultate te terugkeer wat meer direk antwoord vraagte, IsA-relasies speel 'n grootste belangrike rol teenoor 'n beter verstanding van dokumente en vraagte. Die onderwerp leer die publikaat oor definisies, voorwerpe en praktiese keuses wat verwante met modellering en voorstel van IsA relasies in bestaande, menslike samelekteerde hulpbronne van geleenthede, konsepte en resultate konseptieële hierarkies; en metodes vir outomaties uitpak stelle van voorwaardes binne ongeabelde of etiketeerde konsepte, waar die konsepte dalk as 'n plat stel of hierarkies georganiseer kan word; en toepassings van IsA relasies in inligting ontvang.", 'az': 'Təkcə cavab verən sonuçları geri qaytarmaqdan uzaqlaşdırın, IsA bağlantıları belələrin və soruşmaların daha yaxşı anlamasına daha çox möhüm rol oynayır. Öyrənmək məlumatlarına modelləşdirmək və ISA ilişkilerini göstərmək haqqında təhsil edənlərə dəlillər, iddialar və praktik seçimlər haqqında öyrədir. müəyyən edilməmiş və ya etiket edilməmiş məsələlər içərisində təkrarlanmış və ya hiyerarşik olaraq təkrarlanmış məsələlər təkrarlanması üçün təkrarlama metodları; və ISA məlumatlarını almaq üçün istifadə edirlər.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ከመመለስ እና ወደ ፍሬዎችን ለመመለስ የቀረበ ለመመለስ ይሄዳሉ፡፡ ትምህርት፣ የኢስአ ግንኙነት እና የኢሳይ ግንኙነት በተገኘ፣ የሰው ጉዳዮች፣ አካባቢዎች እና የሐሳብ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ማስተምረዋል፡፡ በአካባቢ ወይም በጽሑፍ ውስጥ ያሉ ዓይነቶችን ማውጣት ማድረግ ማሰናከል እና በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ መሆኑን ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ የኢስአ ግንኙነት ለመቀበል ጥያቄ ነው::', 'bn': 'কিছু লিঙ্ক ফিরে যাওয়ার কাছ থেকে সরে যাও এবং তার ফলাফল ফিরে আসার কাছে যা সরাসরি প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়, ইসা সম্পর্কের ক্রমশ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা প The tutorial teaches the audience about definitions, assumptions and practical choices related to modeling and representing IsA relations in existing, human-compiled resources of instances, concepts and resulting conceptual hierarchies;  স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ইনস্টেম বের করার পদ্ধতিগুলো অল্প লেবেল অথবা লেবেল করা ধারণার মধ্যে, যেখানে ধারণাগুলো ফ্ল্যাট সেট হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা য এবং তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য আইসা সম্পর্কের অ্যাপ্লিকেশন।', 'hy': 'հեռու վերադարձնել մի շարք կապեր և ավելի մոտ վերադարձնել արդյունքները, որոնք ավելի ուղղակիորեն պատասխանում են հարցերին, ISA հարաբերությունները ավելի կարևոր դեր են խաղում փաստաթղթերի և հարցերի ավելի լավ հասկանալու համար: Գործողությունը սովորեցնում է հանդիսատեսին սահմանումների, ենթադրությունների և գործնական ընտրությունների մասին, որոնք կապված են մոդելների կառուցվածքի և ISA հարաբերությունների ներկայացման հետ գոյություն ունեցող մարդկային կառուցվածքներում, օրինակների, գաղափարների և արդյունքում առաջ մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են առանց նշանների կամ նշանների ընթացքում տեղադրված օրինակների հավաքածուների ավտոմատ հանելու համար, երբ հասկացությունները կարող են համարվել հավաքած կամ հիերարխիկապես կազմակերպված: և ISA հարաբերությունների կիրառումները տեղեկատվության վերադարձման մեջ:', 'cs': 'Vztahy Isa hrají stále důležitější roli k lepšímu porozumění dokumentům a dotazům. Návod učí diváky o definicích, předpokladech a praktických volbách souvisejících s modelováním a reprezentováním vztahů Isa v existujících, lidsky sestavených zdrojích instancí, konceptů a výsledných koncepčních hierarchiech; metody automatického extrahování sad instancí v rámci nepoznačených nebo označených konceptů, pokud mohou být pojmy považovány za plochý soubor nebo hierarchicky uspořádány; a aplikace vztahů Isa při vyhledávání informací.', 'et': 'liikuda kaugemale linkide kogumist ja lähemale tulemuste tagastamisele, mis vastavad otsesemalt päringutele, mängivad Isa suhted üha olulisemat rolli dokumentide ja päringute parema mõistmise suunas. Õpetus õpetab publikut määratlustest, eeldustest ja praktilistest valikutest, mis on seotud Isa suhete modelleerimise ja esindamisega olemasolevates, inimkoostatud ressurssides, kontseptsioonides ja sellest tulenevates kontseptuaalsetes hierarhiates; meetodid märgistamata või märgistamata kontseptsioonide eksemplaride automaatseks ekstraheerimiseks, kui mõisteid võib pidada tasaseks komplektiks või hierarhiliselt organiseerituks; ja ISA suhete rakendused teabe hankimisel.', 'bs': 'Odmaknite se od povratka kompleta veza i bliže povratku rezultata koje se izravnije odgovaraju na pitanja, odnosi IsA imaju veću važnu ulogu za bolje razumijevanje dokumenta i pitanja. Tutorijalno uči publiku o definicijama, pretpostavkama i praktičnim izborima vezanim za modeliranje i predstavljanje odnosa ISA-a u postojećim, ljudskim resursima kompiliranih slučajeva, koncepta i rezultativnim konceptualnim hijerarhijama; metode za automatsko izvlačenje set a instancija unutar neizbiljnih ili etiketiranih koncepta, gdje se koncepti mogu smatrati ravnim setom ili organiziranim hijerarhički; i primjene odnosa IsA u prikupljanju informacija.', 'ca': "afanyar-se de retornar un conjunt de enllaços i més a prop de retornar resultats que responen més directament a preguntes, les relacions ISA juguen un paper cada vegada més important cap a una millor comprensió dels documents i preguntes. El tutorial ensenya a l'audiència les definicions, suposicions i opcions pràctiques relacionades amb la modelació i representació de les relacions d'AIS en recursos existents, compilats per humans, d'instances, conceptes i jerarquies conceptuals resultants; mètodes d'extracció automàtica de conjunts d'instances dins conceptes no marcats o etiquetats, on els conceptes poden ser considerats com un conjunt plat o organitzats hierarquicament; and applications of IsA relations in information retrieval.", 'fi': 'Isa-suhteet ovat yhä tärkeämmässä asemassa asiakirjojen ja kyselyjen ymmärtämisessä. Opetusohjelma opettaa yleisölle määritelmiä, oletuksia ja käytännön valintoja, jotka liittyvät Isa-suhteiden mallintamiseen ja esittämiseen olemassa olevissa, inhimillisissä resursseissa esiintymistä, käsitteistä ja niistä johtuvista käsitteellisistä hierarkioista; menetelmät, joilla poimitaan automaattisesti esiintymiä merkitsemättömistä tai merkityistä käsitteistä, jos käsitteitä voidaan pitää litteänä joukkona tai hierarkisesti järjestettynä; ja Isa-suhteiden sovellukset tiedonhaussa.', 'sk': 'Odnosi Isa igrajo vse pomembnejšo vlogo pri boljšem razumevanju dokumentov in poizvedb. Vadnica poučuje občinstvo o definicijah, predpostavkah in praktičnih izbirah, povezanih z modeliranjem in predstavljanjem odnosov Isa v obstoječih, človeško sestavljenih virih primerov, konceptov in nastalih konceptualnih hierarhijah; metode za samodejno ekstrakcijo naborov primerov znotraj neoznačenih ali označenih konceptov, pri čemer se koncepti lahko štejejo za ravni nabor ali hierarhično organizirane; in uporabe odnosov Isa pri iskanju informacij.', 'he': 'להתרחק מלחזור קבוצה של קשרים וקרוב יותר לתוצאות שחוברות ישירות יותר על שאלות, יחסים ISA משחקים תפקיד חשוב יותר ויותר לכיוון הבנה טובה של מסמכים ובשאלות. הלימודים מלמדים את הקהל על הגדרות, הנחות ובחירות מעשיות שקשורות לדוגמה ומייצגים יחסים ISA במקורים, הרעיונות וההייררכיות הנוצאות שיטות להוציא אוטומטית קבוצות של מקרים בתוך מושג ללא סימנים או מסומנים, שבו הרעיונות יכולים להיחשב כקבוצה שוטה או מאורגנת הייררכית; ויישומים של מערכות יחסים ISA בהשגת מידע.', 'ha': "Socket error code NotSupported Kilimorin ya sanar da saurãren bayani game da fassarar, zato da zaɓen aikin da ke danganta da masu husũma na IsA a cikin existi, manyan mutane da aka samirtar misãlai, da zato da za'a ƙara hiera fara-zato; methods for automatically extracting sets of instances within unlabeled or labeled concepts, where the concepts may be considered as a flat set or organized hierarchically;  da shiryoyin samurai na IsA da za'a karɓi mutane.", 'jv': 'Mbok kuwi tanggal mruput kanggo nganggo dolanan karo perusahaan lan padha nganggo dolanan sing luwih dumadhi cegi, isara IsA karo perusahaan langkung wih-wih apik sing luwih apik lan padha mengko awak dhéwé karo cegi sing luwih apik. Tutor in lan aplikasi kanggo nggambar IsA kang kelas informasi', 'bo': 'དེ་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཏུ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཞིག་དང་གཡར་གཡོན་ཏུ་ཡར་ལེན་སྐྱེས་བའི་ཐོག་ལས་སྤར་བ སྒྲ་བརྙན་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དག་གིས་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ངོས་འཛིན་དང་། གསལ་བཤད་བྱ་རྣམ་དང་གདམ་ཁ་གཏོང་དགོས་པ་ཚོར་གནས་ཡུལ་དང་བསྡུར་བྱེད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚ methods for automatically extracting sets of instances within unlabeled or labeled concepts, where the concepts may be considered as a flat set or organized hierarchically;  ཞིབ་ཕྲོ་ཞིབ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དག་སྙམ་དུ་འཇུག་པ'}
{'en': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'fr': 'Sarcasme computationnel', 'ar': 'السخرية الحسابية', 'pt': 'Sarcasmo computacional', 'es': 'Sarcasmo computacional', 'ja': 'ｺｳﾃﾝｾｲｺｳｼｭｳｼｭｸ', 'zh': '计其讥刺', 'hi': 'कम्प्यूटेशनल व्यंग्य', 'ru': 'Вычислительный сарказм', 'ga': 'Sarcasm Ríomhaireachtúil', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Υπολογιστικός σαρκασμός', 'hu': 'Számítástechnikai szarkazmus', 'it': 'Sarcasmo computazionale', 'kk': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'lt': 'Kompiuterinis sarkazmas', 'mk': 'Компутационен сарказам', 'ms': 'Sarkasme Komputasi', 'ml': 'കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന സര്\u200dക്കാസം', 'mt': 'Sarkazmu Komputattiv', 'mn': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'no': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'ro': 'Sarcasm computațional', 'pl': 'Sarkazm obliczeniowy', 'sr': 'Kompjuterski sarkazam', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Beräkningssarkasm', 'so': 'Xisaabiyo sarcasm', 'ta': 'கணிப்பு Sarcasm', 'ur': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tính tử', 'nl': 'Computersarcasme', 'hr': 'Računalni sarkazam', 'bg': 'Изчислителен сарказъм', 'da': 'Beregningsarkasme', 'ko': '계산 풍자', 'de': 'Computersarkasmus', 'id': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'fa': 'سارکاسم کامپیوتری', 'sw': 'Kikosi', 'tr': 'Çot', 'sq': 'Sarkazmi kompjuterik', 'af': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային Սարկազմ', 'az': 'Computational Sarcasm', 'bn': 'গণনামূলক সার্কাস', 'bs': 'Kompjuterski sarkazam', 'cs': 'Výpočetní sarkasmus', 'et': 'Arvutuslik sarkasm', 'ca': 'Sarcasme computacional', 'fi': 'Laskennallinen sarkasmi', 'sk': 'Računalniški sarkazem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'סרקזם מחשבי', 'jv': 'Sarkasm komputer', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྦྱོར་རྟགས་མཉམ།'}
{'en': 'Sarcasm is a form of verbal irony that is intended to express contempt or ridicule. Motivated by challenges posed by sarcastic text to sentiment analysis, computational approaches to sarcasm have witnessed a growing interest at NLP forums in the past decade. Computational sarcasm refers to automatic approaches pertaining to sarcasm. The tutorial will provide a bird’s-eye view of the research in computational sarcasm for text, while focusing on significant milestones. The tutorial begins with linguistic theories of sarcasm, with a focus on incongruity : a useful notion that underlies sarcasm and other forms of figurative language. Since the most significant work in computational sarcasm is sarcasm detection : predicting whether a given piece of text is sarcastic or not, sarcasm detection forms the focus hereafter. We begin our discussion on sarcasm detection with datasets, touching on strategies, challenges and nature of datasets. Then, we describe algorithms for sarcasm detection : rule-based (where a specific evidence of sarcasm is utilised as a rule), statistical classifier-based (where features are designed for a statistical classifier), a topic model-based technique, and deep learning-based algorithms for sarcasm detection. In case of each of these algorithms, we refer to our work on sarcasm detection and share our learnings. Since information beyond the text to be classified, contextual information is useful for sarcasm detection, we then describe approaches that use such information through conversational context or author-specific context. We then follow it by novel areas in computational sarcasm such as sarcasm generation, sarcasm v / s irony classification, etc. We then summarise the tutorial and describe future directions based on errors reported in past work. The tutorial will end with a demonstration of our work on sarcasm detection. This tutorial will be of interest to researchers investigating computational sarcasm and related areas such as computational humour, figurative language understanding, emotion and sentiment sentiment analysis, etc. The tutorial is motivated by our continually evolving survey paper of sarcasm detection, that is available on arXiv at : Joshi, Aditya, Pushpak Bhattacharyya, and Mark James Carman. Automatic Sarcasm Detection : A Survey. arXiv preprint arXiv:1602.03426 (2016).', 'fr': "Le sarcasme est une forme d'ironie verbale qui vise à exprimer du mépris ou du ridicule. Motivées par les défis posés par le texte sarcastique à l'analyse des sentiments, les approches computationnelles du sarcasme ont suscité un intérêt croissant dans les forums de la PNL au cours de la dernière décennie. Le sarcasme computationnel fait référence aux approches automatiques relatives au sarcasme. Le tutoriel fournira une vue d'ensemble de la recherche sur le sarcasme informatique pour le texte, tout en se concentrant sur les étapes importantes. Le tutoriel commence par les théories linguistiques du sarcasme, en mettant l'accent sur l'incongruité\xa0: une notion utile qui sous-tend le sarcasme et d'autres formes de langage figuratif. Puisque le travail le plus important en matière de sarcasme computationnel est la détection du sarcasme\xa0: prédire si un texte donné est sarcastique ou non, la détection du sarcasme constitue le point central ci-après. Nous commençons notre discussion sur la détection du sarcasme par des ensembles de données, en abordant les stratégies, les défis et la nature des ensembles de données. Ensuite, nous décrivons des algorithmes pour la détection du sarcasme\xa0: basés sur des règles (où une preuve spécifique du sarcasme est généralement utilisée), basés sur un classificateur statistique (où les fonctionnalités sont conçues pour un classificateur statistique), une technique basée sur un modèle thématique et des algorithmes basés sur le deep learning pour la détection du sarcasme. Dans le cas de chacun de ces algorithmes, nous renvoyons à nos travaux sur la détection des sarcasmes et partageons nos apprentissages. Étant donné que les informations au-delà du texte à classifier, les informations contextuelles sont utiles pour la détection du sarcasme, nous décrivons ensuite des approches qui utilisent\ninformations à travers le contexte conversationnel ou le contexte spécifique à l'auteur.Nous le suivons ensuite par de nouveaux domaines du sarcasme computationnel tels que la génération de sarcasmes, la classification du sarcasme par rapport à l'ironie, etc. Nous résumons ensuite le tutoriel et décrivons les orientations futures en fonction des erreurs rapportées dans des travaux antérieurs. Le tutoriel se terminera par une démonstration de notre travail sur la détection des sarcasmes. Ce tutoriel intéressera les chercheurs qui étudient le sarcasme computationnel et des domaines connexes tels que l'humour informatique, la compréhension du langage figuratif, l'analyse des émotions et des sentiments, etc. motivée par notre document d'enquête en constante évolution sur la détection des sarcasmes, disponible sur arXiv à l'adresse\xa0: Joshi, Aditya, Pushpak Bhattacharyya et Mark James Carman. «\xa0Détection automatique des sarcasmes\xa0: une enquête\xa0». Préimpression arXiv ArXIV:1602.03426 (2016).", 'pt': 'O sarcasmo é uma forma de ironia verbal que se destina a expressar desprezo ou ridículo. Motivados pelos desafios impostos pelo texto sarcástico à análise de sentimentos, as abordagens computacionais ao sarcasmo testemunharam um interesse crescente nos fóruns de PNL na última década. O sarcasmo computacional refere-se a abordagens automáticas relacionadas ao sarcasmo. O tutorial fornecerá uma visão panorâmica da pesquisa em sarcasmo computacional para texto, ao mesmo tempo em que se concentra em marcos significativos. Língua. Como o trabalho mais significativo em sarcasmo computacional é a detecção de sarcasmo: prever se um determinado pedaço de texto é sarcástico ou não, a detecção de sarcasmo forma o foco a seguir. Começamos nossa discussão sobre detecção de sarcasmo com conjuntos de dados, abordando estratégias, desafios e natureza dos conjuntos de dados. Em seguida, descrevemos algoritmos para detecção de sarcasmo: baseado em regras (onde uma evidência específica de sarcasmo é utilizada como regra), baseado em classificador estatístico (onde os recursos são projetados para um classificador estatístico), uma técnica baseada em modelo de tópico e algoritmos baseados em aprendizado para detecção de sarcasmo. No caso de cada um desses algoritmos, nos referimos ao nosso trabalho sobre detecção de sarcasmo e compartilhamos nossos aprendizados. Como as informações além do texto a serem classificadas, as informações contextuais são úteis para a detecção de sarcasmo, descrevemos abordagens que usam tais\ninformações através de contexto de conversação ou contexto específico do autor. Em seguida, seguimos por novas áreas em sarcasmo computacional, como geração de sarcasmo, classificação de sarcasmo v/s ironia, etc. Resumimos o tutorial e descrevemos direções futuras com base em erros relatados em trabalhos anteriores . O tutorial terminará com uma demonstração do nosso trabalho em detecção de sarcasmo. Este tutorial será de interesse para pesquisadores que investigam sarcasmo computacional e áreas relacionadas, como humor computacional, compreensão de linguagem figurativa, análise de emoções e sentimentos, etc. O tutorial é motivado por nosso documento de pesquisa em constante evolução da detecção de sarcasmo, que está disponível no arXiv em: Joshi, Aditya, Pushpak Bhattacharyya e Mark James Carman. “Detecção automática de sarcasmo: uma pesquisa”. arXiv pré-impressão arXiv:1602.03426 (2016).', 'ar': 'السخرية هي شكل من أشكال السخرية اللفظية التي تهدف إلى التعبير عن الازدراء أو السخرية. بدافع من التحديات التي يطرحها النص الساخر لتحليل المشاعر ، شهدت المناهج الحسابية للسخرية اهتمامًا متزايدًا في منتديات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في العقد الماضي. تشير السخرية الحسابية إلى الأساليب التلقائية المتعلقة بالسخرية. سيوفر البرنامج التعليمي نظرة شاملة للبحث في السخرية الحسابية للنص ، مع التركيز على معالم مهمة. يبدأ البرنامج التعليمي بنظريات لغوية للسخرية ، مع التركيز على التناقض: فكرة مفيدة تكمن وراء السخرية وأشكال أخرى من التصويرية لغة. نظرًا لأن أهم عمل في السخرية الحسابية هو اكتشاف السخرية: التنبؤ بما إذا كان جزء معين من النص ساخرًا أم لا ، فإن اكتشاف السخرية يشكل التركيز فيما بعد. نبدأ مناقشتنا حول اكتشاف السخرية باستخدام مجموعات البيانات ، والتطرق إلى الاستراتيجيات والتحديات وطبيعة مجموعات البيانات. بعد ذلك ، نصف الخوارزميات لاكتشاف السخرية: القائمة على القواعد (حيث يتم استخدام دليل محدد للسخرية كقاعدة) ، والقائمة على المصنف الإحصائي (حيث تم تصميم الميزات لمصنف إحصائي) ، وتقنية تستند إلى نموذج موضوعي ، وعميقة الخوارزميات القائمة على التعلم لاكتشاف السخرية. في حالة كل من هذه الخوارزميات ، نشير إلى عملنا على اكتشاف السخرية ونشارك ما تعلمناه. نظرًا لأن المعلومات التي تتجاوز النص المراد تصنيفها ، فإن المعلومات السياقية مفيدة لاكتشاف السخرية ، ثم نصف الأساليب التي تستخدم مثل هذه المعلومات\nالمعلومات من خلال سياق محادثة أو سياق خاص بالمؤلف ، ثم نتبعها بمجالات جديدة في السخرية الحسابية مثل توليد السخرية ، وتصنيف السخرية مقابل السخرية ، وما إلى ذلك ، ثم نلخص البرنامج التعليمي ووصف الاتجاهات المستقبلية بناءً على الأخطاء المبلغ عنها في العمل السابق . سينتهي البرنامج التعليمي بعرض عملنا على اكتشاف السخرية. سيكون هذا البرنامج التعليمي ذا أهمية للباحثين الذين يبحثون عن السخرية الحسابية والمجالات ذات الصلة مثل الفكاهة الحسابية ، وفهم اللغة التصويرية ، وتحليل المشاعر والمشاعر ، وما إلى ذلك. ورقتنا الاستقصائية المتطورة باستمرار لاكتشاف السخرية ، والمتوفرة على موقع arXiv على العنوان التالي: Joshi و Aditya و Pushpak Bhattacharyya و Mark James Carman. "الكشف التلقائي عن السخرية: مسح." إصدار arXiv التمهيدي arXiv: 1602.03426 (2016).', 'es': 'El sarcasmo es una forma de ironía verbal que pretende expresar desprecio o ridiculización. Motivados por los desafíos que plantea el texto sarcástico para el análisis de sentimientos, los enfoques computacionales del sarcasmo han sido testigos de un creciente interés en los foros de PNL en la última década. El sarcasmo computacional se refiere a los enfoques automáticos relacionados con el sarcasmo. El tutorial proporcionará una visión panorámica de la investigación sobre el sarcasmo computacional para el texto, al tiempo que se centra en los hitos significativos.El tutorial comienza con las teorías lingüísticas del sarcasmo, con un enfoque en la incongruencia: una noción útil que subyace al sarcasmo y otras formas de lenguaje figurativo. Dado que el trabajo más significativo en el sarcasmo computacional es la detección del sarcasmo: predecir si un texto dado es sarcástico o no, la detección del sarcasmo forma el centro de atención en adelante. Comenzamos nuestro debate sobre la detección del sarcasmo con conjuntos de datos, abordando las estrategias, los desafíos y la naturaleza de los conjuntos de datos. Luego, describimos algoritmos para la detección del sarcasmo: basados en reglas (donde se utiliza una evidencia específica de sarcasmo como regla), basados en clasificadores estadísticos (donde las características se diseñan para un clasificador estadístico), una técnica basada en modelos temáticos y algoritmos basados en el aprendizaje profundo para la detección del sarcasmo. En el caso de cada uno de estos algoritmos, nos remitimos a nuestro trabajo sobre la detección del sarcasmo y compartimos nuestros aprendizajes. Dado que la información más allá del texto que se va a clasificar, la información contextual es útil para la detección del sarcasmo, describimos enfoques que utilizan\ninformación a través del contexto conversacional o del contexto específico del autor. Luego la seguimos por áreas novedosas en el sarcasmo computacional, como la generación de sarcasmo, la clasificación de sarcasmo v/s ironía, etc. Luego resumimos el tutorial y describimos las direcciones futuras en función de los errores reportados en trabajos anteriores. El tutorial finalizará con una demostración de nuestro trabajo en la detección del sarcasmo. Este tutorial será de interés para los investigadores que investigan el sarcasmo computacional y áreas relacionadas, como el humor computacional, la comprensión del lenguaje figurativo, el análisis de emociones y sentimientos, etc. motivado por nuestra encuesta de detección de sarcasmo en constante evolución, que está disponible en arXiv en: Joshi, Aditya, Pushpak Bhattacharyya y Mark James Carman. «Detección automática de sarcasmo: una encuesta». arXiv preprint arXiv:1602.03426 (2016).', 'ja': '皮肉は、軽蔑や嘲笑を表現することを目的とした言葉の皮肉の一種です。 感情分析への皮肉な文章による課題に動機づけられた皮肉に対する計算的アプローチは、過去10年間でNLPフォーラムでの関心の高まりを目の当たりにしてきた。 計算上の皮肉とは、皮肉に関わる自動的なアプローチを指す。 このチュートリアルは、重要なマイルストーンに焦点を当てながら、テキストのための計算的皮肉の研究の俯瞰図を提供します。このチュートリアルは、不整合性に焦点を当てた皮肉の言語理論から始まります。これは、皮肉や他の形の比喩的言語の基礎となる有用な概念です。 計算皮肉における最も重要な仕事は皮肉の検出である：特定のテキストが皮肉であるかどうかを予測することであるため、皮肉の検出は以下の焦点を形成する。 私たちは、データセットの戦略、課題、およびデータセットの性質に触れることで、皮肉検出に関する議論を開始します。 次に、皮肉検出のためのアルゴリズムについて説明します：ルールベース（皮肉の特定の証拠がルールとして利用される）、統計分類子ベース（特徴が統計分類子のために設計される）、トピックモデルベースの手法、および皮肉検出のためのディープラーニングベースのアルゴリズムです。 これらのアルゴリズムのそれぞれの場合、私たちは皮肉検出に関する仕事を参照し、私たちの学習を共有します。 分類すべきテキストを超えた情報、文脈情報は皮肉の検出に有用であるため、そのような情報を使用するアプローチを説明します。\n会話コンテキストまたは著者固有のコンテキストを介して情報を提供します。次に、皮肉の生成、皮肉v/s皮肉の分類などの計算皮肉の新規領域によってそれに従います。その後、チュートリアルをまとめ、過去の作業で報告されたエラーに基づいて今後の方向性を説明します。このチュートリアルは、皮肉検出に関する私たちの仕事のデモンストレーションで終わります。このチュートリアルは、計算的皮肉と、計算的ユーモア、比喩的言語理解、感情と感情分析などの関連分野を調査する研究者にとって興味深いものになります。このチュートリアルは、継続的に進化する皮肉検出の調査論文に動機づけられています。調査論文はarXivで入手できます： Joshi、Aditya、Pushpak Bhattacharyya、Mark James Carman。「Automatic Sarcasm Detection: A Survey .」arXiv preprint arXiv: 1602.03426 (2016 )。', 'hi': 'व्यंग्य मौखिक विडंबना का एक रूप है जिसका उद्देश्य अवमानना या उपहास व्यक्त करना है। भावना विश्लेषण के लिए व्यंग्यात्मक पाठ द्वारा उत्पन्न चुनौतियों से प्रेरित, व्यंग्य के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल दृष्टिकोण ने पिछले दशक में एनएलपी मंचों पर बढ़ती रुचि देखी है। कम्प्यूटेशनल व्यंग्य व्यंग्य व्यंग्य से संबंधित स्वचालित दृष्टिकोणों को संदर्भित करता है। ट्यूटोरियल पाठ के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल व्यंग्य में अनुसंधान का एक पक्षी-आंख दृश्य प्रदान करेगा, जबकि महत्वपूर्ण मील के पत्थर पर ध्यान केंद्रित करेगा। ट्यूटोरियल व्यंग्य के भाषाई सिद्धांतों के साथ शुरू होता है, असंगतता पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के साथ: एक उपयोगी धारणा जो व्यंग्य और आलंकारिक भाषा के अन्य रूपों को रेखांकित करती है। चूंकि कम्प्यूटेशनल व्यंग्य में सबसे महत्वपूर्ण काम व्यंग्य का पता लगाना है: यह भविष्यवाणी करते हुए कि पाठ का एक दिया गया टुकड़ा व्यंग्यात्मक है या नहीं, व्यंग्य का पता लगाना इसके बाद फोकस बनाता है। हम डेटासेट के साथ व्यंग्य का पता लगाने, रणनीतियों, चुनौतियों और डेटासेट की प्रकृति को छूने पर हमारी चर्चा शुरू करते हैं। फिर, हम व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए एल्गोरिदम का वर्णन करते हैं: नियम-आधारित (जहां व्यंग्य के एक विशिष्ट सबूत का उपयोग एक नियम के रूप में किया जाता है), सांख्यिकीय क्लासिफायर-आधारित (जहां सुविधाओं को सांख्यिकीय क्लासिफायर के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है), एक विषय मॉडल-आधारित तकनीक, और व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए गहरी सीखने-आधारित एल्गोरिदम। इन एल्गोरिदम में से प्रत्येक के मामले में, हम व्यंग्य का पता लगाने पर हमारे काम का उल्लेख करते हैं और हमारे सीखने को साझा करते हैं। चूंकि पाठ से परे जानकारी को वर्गीकृत किया जाना है, प्रासंगिक जानकारी व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए उपयोगी है, इसलिए हम तब उन दृष्टिकोणों का वर्णन करते हैं जो इस तरह का उपयोग करते हैं\nसंवादात्मक संदर्भ या लेखक-विशिष्ट संदर्भ के माध्यम से जानकारी। फिर हम कम्प्यूटेशनल व्यंग्य में उपन्यास क्षेत्रों द्वारा इसका पालन करते हैं जैसे व्यंग्य पीढ़ी, व्यंग्य बनाम विडंबना वर्गीकरण, आदि। फिर हम ट्यूटोरियल को संक्षेप में प्रस्तुत करते हैं और पिछले काम में रिपोर्ट की गई त्रुटियों के आधार पर भविष्य की दिशाओं का वर्णन करते हैं। ट्यूटोरियल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने पर हमारे काम के एक प्रदर्शन के साथ समाप्त हो जाएगा। यह ट्यूटोरियल कम्प्यूटेशनल व्यंग्य और संबंधित क्षेत्रों जैसे कम्प्यूटेशनल हास्य, आलंकारिक भाषा की समझ, भावना और भावना भावना विश्लेषण, आदि की जांच करने वाले शोधकर्ताओं के लिए रुचि का होगा। ट्यूटोरियल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के हमारे लगातार विकसित सर्वेक्षण पत्र से प्रेरित है, जो arXiv पर उपलब्ध है: जोशी, आदित्य, पुष्पक भट्टाचार्य, और मार्क जेम्स कारमैन। "स्वचालित व्यंग्य का पता लगाना: एक सर्वेक्षण." arXiv preprint arXiv: 1602.03426 (2016).', 'zh': '刺者,口刺之文,指为蔑笑。 刺文本于情,刺术于NLP论坛。 计刺者,刺之自也。 本教程将供文本计刺治之鸟瞰图,兼重点注重里程碑。 本教程始于刺语言学,其大不调:一有用之名,以为刺文之喻言。 计刺之大者,刺检:占给定之本片段有刺意味,故刺检将为后焦点。 我从数据集论刺检测,触数集之策、挑战性质。 然后述刺检之算:(刺特定证以为法),计分类器(其特徵为计分类器之),基题模之术,及深度之刺检算法。 凡此诸法,皆参以刺检,分享其事。 分类之外,上下文信有用于刺检,故述用此法。\n上下文、特定于上下文。 然后计刺之新领,如刺生,刺v / s刺类。 然后总结本教程,随事告误。 本教程将以讥检终事。 本教程将论刺关领之兴,如计幽默,喻言语,情情析。 本教程动机,刺勘论文,可得于arXiv:Joshi,Aditya,Pushpak BhattacharyyaMark James Carman。 "自刺检",arXiv预印本arXiv:1602.03426(2016)。', 'ru': 'Сарказм - это форма словесной иронии, которая предназначена для выражения презрения или насмешки. Мотивированные проблемами, создаваемыми саркастическим текстом для анализа настроений, вычислительные подходы к сарказму стали свидетелями растущего интереса на форумах NLP в последнее десятилетие. Вычислительный сарказм относится к автоматическим подходам, относящимся к сарказму. Учебник даст представление об исследованиях в области вычислительного сарказма для текста с акцентом на значимые вехи. Учебник начинается с лингвистических теорий сарказма с акцентом на несогласованность: полезное понятие, лежащее в основе сарказма и других форм образного языка. Поскольку наиболее значительная работа в вычислительном сарказме - это обнаружение сарказма: предсказание того, является ли данный фрагмент текста саркастическим или нет, обнаружение сарказма формирует фокус в дальнейшем. Мы начинаем нашу дискуссию об обнаружении сарказма с наборов данных, затрагивая стратегии, проблемы и природу наборов данных. Затем мы описываем алгоритмы для обнаружения сарказма: основанный на правилах (где в качестве правила используется конкретное доказательство сарказма), основанный на статистическом классификаторе (где признаки предназначены для статистического классификатора), основанный на тематической модели метод и основанные на глубоком обучении алгоритмы для обнаружения сарказма. В случае каждого из этих алгоритмов мы ссылаемся на нашу работу по обнаружению сарказма и делимся своими знаниями. Поскольку информация, выходящая за рамки засекреченного текста, контекстуальная информация полезна для обнаружения сарказма, мы затем описываем подходы, которые используют такие\nинформация через разговорный контекст или авторский контекст. Затем мы следуем за ней по новым областям в вычислительном сарказме, таким как генерация сарказма, классификация иронии сарказма и т. д. Затем мы обобщаем учебное пособие и описываем будущие направления на основе ошибок, о которых сообщалось в предыдущей работе. Этот учебник будет интересен исследователям, исследующим вычислительный сарказм и смежные области, такие как вычислительный юмор, образное понимание языка, анализ эмоций и настроений и т. д. Учебник мотивирован нашей постоянно развивающейся обзорной бумагой по обнаружению сарказма, которая доступна на arXiv по адресу: Joshi, Aditya, Pushpak Bhattacharyya, and Mark James Carman. “Automatic Sarcasm Detection: A Survey.” arXiv preprint arXiv:1602.03426 (2016).', 'ga': 'Is cineál íoróin bhriathartha é searbhas atá ceaptha díspeagadh nó magadh a chur in iúl. Spreagtha ag dúshláin a bhaineann le téacs sarcastic le hanailís sentiment, tá cur chuige ríomhaireachtúil i leith searbhas feicthe ag méadú spéise ag fóraim NLP le deich mbliana anuas. Tagraíonn searbhas ríomhaireachtúil do chur chuige uathoibríocha a bhaineann le searbhas. Tabharfaidh an rang teagaisc léargas súlmhar ar an taighde sa searbhas ríomhaireachtúil don téacs, agus díreoidh sé ar gharspriocanna suntasacha. Tosaíonn an teagasc le teoiricí teangeolaíocha na searbhas, le fócas ar neamhréir: nóisean úsáideach atá mar bhunús leis an searbhas agus le foirmeacha eile de chuid figiúrtha. teanga. Ós rud é gurb é an t-sharcasm ríomhaireachtúil an saothar is suntasaí sa bhrath searbhais: ag tuar cé acu an bhfuil píosa áirithe téacs sarcastach nó nach bhfuil, is é braite searbhas an fócas ina dhiaidh seo. Cuirimid tús lenár bplé ar bhrath searbhas le tacair shonraí, ag plé le straitéisí, dúshláin agus nádúr na dtacar sonraí. Ansin, déanaimid cur síos ar algartaim le haghaidh braite searbhas: bunaithe ar rialacha (mar a úsáidtear fianaise shonrach de searbhas mar riail), bunaithe ar aicmitheora staidrimh (ina bhfuil gnéithe deartha le haghaidh aicmitheora staidrimh), teicníc bunaithe ar mhúnla topaice, agus domhain. halgartaim atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim chun searbhas a bhrath. I gcás gach ceann de na halgartaim seo, déanaimid tagairt dár gcuid oibre ar bhrath searbhas agus roinnimid ár gcuid foghlama. Ós rud é go bhfuil faisnéis lasmuigh den téacs le rangú, go bhfuil faisnéis chomhthéacsúil úsáideach chun searbhas a bhrath, déanaimid cur síos ansin ar chur chuige a úsáideann a leithéid\nfaisnéis trí chomhthéacs comhrá nó comhthéacs a bhaineann go sonrach leis an údar. Leanaimid ansin é trí réimsí núíosacha i searbhas ríomhaireachtúil cosúil le giniúint searbhas, searbhas v/s aicmiú íoróin, etc. Déanaimid achoimre ansin ar an rang teagaisc agus déanaimid cur síos ar threoracha na todhchaí bunaithe ar earráidí a tuairiscíodh san obair atá caite. . Críochnóidh an teagasc le léiriú ar ár gcuid oibre ar bhrath searbhas. Beidh an rang teagaisc seo ina ábhar spéise do thaighdeoirí a imscrúdaíonn searbhas ríomhaireachtúil agus réimsí gaolmhara ar nós greann ríomhaireachtúil, tuiscint fhigiúrach teanga, anailís ar mhothúchán agus ar mhothúchán meoin, etc. ár bpáipéar suirbhéireachta ar bhrath searbhas atá ag forbairt go leanúnach, atá ar fáil ar arXiv ag: Joshi, Aditya, Pushpak Bhattacharyya, agus Mark James Carman. “Brath Uathoibríoch Sarcasm: Suirbhé.” arXiv réamhchló arXiv:1602.03426 (2016).', 'hu': 'A szarkazmus a verbális irónia egyik formája, amelynek célja a megvetés vagy a nevetség kifejezése. A szarkasztikus szöveg által az érzelmek elemzésével kapcsolatos kihívások motiválták, a szarkazmus számítástechnikai megközelítései az elmúlt évtizedben növekvő érdeklődést mutattak az NLP fórumok iránt. A számítástechnikai szarkazmus a szarkazmussal kapcsolatos automatikus megközelítésekre utal. A bemutató madártávlatot nyújt a szöveg számítási szarkazmusának kutatásáról, miközben jelentős mérföldkövekre összpontosít. A bemutató a szarkazmus nyelvi elméleteivel kezdődik, fókuszálva az inkongrunitásra: egy hasznos fogalom, amely a szarkazmus és a figuratív nyelv egyéb formái mögött rejlik. Mivel a számítástechnikai szarkazmus legjelentősebb munkája a szarkazmus felismerése: annak előrejelzése, hogy egy adott szövegdarab szarkasztikus-e vagy sem, a szarkazmus felismerése képezi a következő fókuszt. A szarkazmus felismeréséről szóló beszélgetést adatkészletekkel kezdjük, érintve stratégiákat, kihívásokat és az adatkészletek jellegét. Ezt követően leírjuk a szarkazmus detektálására szolgáló algoritmusokat: szabályok alapú (ahol a szarkazmus konkrét bizonyítékát használják), statisztikai osztályozó alapú (ahol a funkciókat statisztikai osztályozó számára tervezték), téma modell alapú technika és mélytanulás alapú algoritmusok a szarkazmus detektálására. Mindegyik algoritmus esetében utalunk a szarkazmus felismerésével kapcsolatos munkánkra és megosztjuk tanulásainkat. Mivel a minősítendő szövegen kívül eső információk, a kontextuális információk hasznosak a szarkazmus felismeréséhez, ezt követően leírjuk az ilyen megközelítéseket', 'el': 'Ο σαρκασμός είναι μια μορφή λεκτικής ειρωνείας που έχει σκοπό να εκφράσει περιφρόνηση ή γελοιοποίηση. Με κίνητρο τις προκλήσεις που θέτει το σαρκαστικό κείμενο στην ανάλυση συναισθημάτων, οι υπολογιστικές προσεγγίσεις στον σαρκασμό έχουν δει ένα αυξανόμενο ενδιαφέρον στα φόρουμ την τελευταία δεκαετία. Ο υπολογιστικός σαρκασμός αναφέρεται σε αυτόματες προσεγγίσεις που σχετίζονται με τον σαρκασμό. Το σεμινάριο θα παρέχει μια οπτική του πουλιού της έρευνας στον υπολογιστικό σαρκασμό για κείμενο, ενώ θα επικεντρωθεί σε σημαντικά ορόσημα. Το μάθημα ξεκινά με γλωσσικές θεωρίες του σαρκασμού, με έμφαση στην ασυμφωνία: μια χρήσιμη έννοια που βασίζεται στον σαρκασμό και άλλες μορφές εικονιστικής γλώσσας. Δεδομένου ότι η πιο σημαντική εργασία στον υπολογιστικό σαρκασμό είναι η ανίχνευση σαρκασμού: η πρόβλεψη του αν ένα συγκεκριμένο κομμάτι κειμένου είναι σαρκαστικό ή όχι, η ανίχνευση σαρκασμού αποτελεί το επίκεντρο στο εξής. Ξεκινάμε τη συζήτησή μας για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού με σύνολα δεδομένων, αγγίζοντας στρατηγικές, προκλήσεις και φύση των συνόλων δεδομένων. Στη συνέχεια, περιγράφουμε αλγόριθμους για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού: βασισμένους σε κανόνες (όπου χρησιμοποιείται κατά κανόνα μια συγκεκριμένη απόδειξη σαρκασμού), βασισμένους σε στατιστικούς ταξινομητές (όπου τα χαρακτηριστικά σχεδιάζονται για έναν στατιστικό ταξινομητή), μια τεχνική βασισμένη στο θέμα μοντέλο και αλγόριθμους βαθιάς μάθησης για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού. Σε περίπτωση καθενός από αυτούς τους αλγόριθμους, αναφερόμαστε στην εργασία μας για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού και μοιραζόμαστε τις γνώσεις μας. Δεδομένου ότι οι πληροφορίες πέρα από το κείμενο που πρόκειται να ταξινομηθεί, οι πληροφορίες του περιβάλλοντος είναι χρήσιμες για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού, στη συνέχεια περιγράφουμε προσεγγίσεις που χρησιμοποιούν τέτοια στοιχεία.', 'it': "Il sarcasmo è una forma di ironia verbale che ha lo scopo di esprimere disprezzo o ridicolo. Motivati dalle sfide poste dal testo sarcastico all'analisi dei sentimenti, gli approcci computazionali al sarcasmo hanno visto un crescente interesse nei forum NLP negli ultimi dieci anni. Sarcasmo computazionale si riferisce ad approcci automatici relativi al sarcasmo. Il tutorial fornirà una visione a volo d'uccello della ricerca nel sarcasmo computazionale per il testo, concentrandosi su pietre miliari significative. Il tutorial inizia con le teorie linguistiche del sarcasmo, con un focus sull'incongruenza: una nozione utile che sottende il sarcasmo e altre forme di linguaggio figurativo. Dal momento che il lavoro più significativo nel sarcasmo computazionale è la rilevazione del sarcasmo: predire se un dato pezzo di testo è sarcastico o meno, la rilevazione del sarcasmo forma il focus di seguito. Iniziamo la nostra discussione sul rilevamento del sarcasmo con set di dati, toccando strategie, sfide e natura dei set di dati. Poi, descriviamo algoritmi per il rilevamento del sarcasmo: basati su regole (dove viene utilizzata una specifica evidenza di sarcasmo come regola), basati su classificatori statistici (dove le caratteristiche sono progettate per un classificatore statistico), una tecnica basata su modelli tematici e algoritmi di deep learning per il rilevamento del sarcasmo. Nel caso di ciascuno di questi algoritmi, ci riferiamo al nostro lavoro sul rilevamento del sarcasmo e condividiamo le nostre conoscenze. Poiché le informazioni al di là del testo da classificare, le informazioni contestuali sono utili per la rilevazione del sarcasmo, quindi descriviamo approcci che utilizzano tali", 'ka': 'საპკასმი არის გერბალური თრონიის ფორმა, რომელიც უნდა გამოსახულება ან სიცილი. მოტივირებულია საპკასტიური ტექსტიდან სენტიმენტების ანალიზიისთვის, კამპუტაციალური დახმარება საპკასმისთვის დაინტერესებული ინტერესტი NLP ფორმებში წინ ათეულ ათეულში. კომპუტაციონალური საპკაზმი აღნიშნავს საპკაზმის ავტომატური მიღება. სტუტურაცია იქნება ცხოვრების სახელი ტექსტის კომპუტურაციალური საპაკასმის შესახებ, როცა იქნება მნიშვნელოვანი საზოგადოებში. სტუტორიალური წარმოდგენა სიაპკაზმის ლინგურისტიკური თეორიებით, რომლებიც კონკონგურირებაზე გადაწყება: საჭირო წარმოდგენა, რომელიც საპკაზმის და სხვა ფორმების ფიგურირ მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო კომპუტაციო საპკაზმში იყო საპკაზმური განახლება: განახლება თუ არა ტექსტის ნაწილი საპკასტიურია ან არა, საპკაზმური განახლება შემდეგ ფოკუ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ჩვენი დისუქცია საპკასმის განახლების შესახებ მონაცემებით, სტრატეგიების შესახებ, განახლებების და მონაცემების ნათობით. შემდეგ ჩვენ აღწერეთ ალგორიტემები საპკასმის განვიცნობისთვის: საპირო დაბათი (სადაც საპკასმის განსაკუთრებული კოდენტიკური გამოყენება როგორც წესები), სტატისტიკური კლასიფიკარის დაბათი (სადაც ფუნქციები სტატისტიკური კლასიფი ამ ალგორიტემის ყოველ შემთხვევაში, ჩვენ ჩვენი სამუშაო საპკაზმის განახლების და ჩვენი სწავლების გაყოფილი. ტექსტის გარეშე ინფორმაცია, რომელიც კლასიფიკაცია უნდა იყოს, კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია საპკასმის განახლებისთვის გამოსახულებელია, შემდეგ ჩვენ განახულებთ', 'lt': 'Sarkazmas yra žodinės ironijos form a, skirta išreikšti neapykantą ar juoką. Atsižvelgiant į sarkastinio teksto keliamus iššūkius jautrumo analizei, skaičiavimo metodai sarkazmui per pastarąjį dešimtmetį vis labiau domisi NLP forumais. Kompiuterinis sarkazmas reiškia automatinius sarkazmo metodus. Mokymosi programoje bus pateiktas paukščių požiūris į skaičiavimo sarkazmo mokslinius tyrimus tekstui, tuo pat metu daugiausia dėmesio bus skiriama svarbiems etapams. Mokymas prasideda kalbinėmis sarkazmo teorijomis, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant neatitikimui: naudingai suprantamai, kuri grindžiama sarkazmu ir kitomis formomis vaizduojama kalba. Kadangi svarbiausias darbas skaičiavimo sarkazme yra sarkazmo aptikimas: prognozuojant, ar tam tikras tekstas sarkastiškas, ar ne, sarkazmo aptikimas toliau yra pagrindinis dėmesys. Pradedame diskusijas apie sarkazmo nustatymą duomenų rinkiniais, susijusiais su strategijomis, iššūkiais ir duomenų rinkinių pobūdžiu. Tada apibūdinami sarkazmo nustatymo algoritmai: taisyklėmis pagrįsti (kai paprastai naudojami konkretūs sarkazmo įrodymai), statistiniais klasifikatoriais pagrįsti (kai charakteristikos yra sukurtos statistiniam klasifikatoriui), teminiu modeliu pagrįsti metodai ir gilaus mokymosi sarkazmo nustatymo algoritmai. Kiekvieno iš šių algoritmų atveju kalbame apie savo darbą sarkazmo aptikimo srityje ir dalijamės savo mokymais. Kadangi informacija, išskyrus tekstą, kuris turi būti įslaptintas, yra naudinga sarkazmui aptikti, apibūdiname metodus, kuriais naudojami tokie metodai:', 'mk': 'Сарказмот е форма на вербална иронија која има за цел да изрази презир или смеа. Мотивирани од предизвиците предизвикани од саркастичниот текст на анализата на чувствата, компјутерските пристапи кон сарказмот се сведоци на растечкиот интерес за форумите на НЛП во изминатата деценија. Компутационалниот сарказам се однесува на автоматски пристапи поврзани со сарказмот. Научникот ќе обезбеди поглед на птиците на истражувањето во компјутативниот сарказам за текст, истовремено фокусирајќи се на значителните миљи. Научникот започнува со лингвистичките теории на сарказмот, со фокус на незгодноста: корисна идеја која се потпишува на сарказмот и други форми на фигуративен јазик. Бидејќи најзначајната работа во компјутацискиот сарказам е детекција на сарказам: предвидување дали одреден дел од текстот е саркастичен или не, детекција на сарказам го формира фокусот подоцна. Ние започнуваме дискусија за детекција на сарказам со податоци, допирајќи се на стратегиите, предизвиците и природата на податоците. Потоа, ние ги опишуваме алгоритмите за детекција на сарказам: базирани на правила (каде специфични докази за сарказам се користат како правило), базирани на статистички класификатори (каде карактеристиките се дизајнирани за статистички класификатор), техника базирана на тема модел, и алгоритми базирани на длабоко учење за детекција на са Во случај на секој од овие алгоритми, се однесуваме на нашата работа за детекција на сарказмот и споделуваме научи. Бидејќи информациите надвор од текстот кои треба да се класификуваат, контекстуалните информации се корисни за детекција на сарказам, тогаш опишуваме пристапи кои користат такви', 'kk': 'Саркассм - ербалдық иронияның түрі. Бұл қарамастан немесе күлкілікті көрсетуге болады. Саркастикалық мәтінді сезімдік анализациялауға көмектесетін жағдайлардың көмектесілігі, саркастың компьютерлік жағдайлары өткен он жылдарда NLP форумдарының көмектесілігін көрген Компьютерлік сарказм сарказм туралы автоматты түрде қатынау керек. Орындаушылар компьютерлік саркассмындағы зерттеулердің көзінің көрінісін жасайды, бірақ оның маңызды көзіне назар аударып тұрады. Орындаушылар сарказм тілінің лингвистикалық теориясынан бастайды, оның ақпаратына көңіл берілмейді: сарказм мен басқа фигурациялық тілінің түрлері негізінде пайдалы ойлау. Ең маңызды жұмыс - компьютерлік сарказмды анықтау: келтірілген мәтіннің бөлігі саркастық немесе емес пе, сарказмды анықтау содан кейін назарды анықтау. Біз сарказмды деректер қорларымызды анықтау, стратегияларды, мәселелерді және деректер қорларының қасиетіне қатынасыз. Содан кейін, біз саркассмды анықтау алгоритмдерін таңдаймыз: ережелер негізінде (саркассмды ережелер ретінде қолданылатын ережелер), статистикалық классификациясы негізінде (статистикалық классификациясы үшін құрылған мүмкіндіктер), нақышты үлгі негізінде техника және сарка Бұл алгоритмдердің әрбірінің алгоритмдерінде, сарказмды анықтау жұмысына сәйкес береміз және біздің оқытуымызды ортақтастырамыз. Бұл мәтіннің артындағы мәліметті таңдау үшін, контексті мәлімет саркассм анықтау үшін пайдалы болады, сондықтан содан кейін бұл жерде қолданылатын жағдайларды та', 'ms': 'Sarkasme adalah bentuk ironi perkataan yang bertujuan untuk mengekspresikan penghinaan atau ketawa. Dimotivasikan oleh cabaran yang dihasilkan oleh teks sarkastik untuk analisis perasaan, pendekatan komputasi untuk sarkasme telah menyaksikan kepentingan yang semakin meningkat di forum NLP dalam dekade lepas. Sarkasme komputasi merujuk kepada pendekatan automatik yang berkaitan dengan sarkasme. Tutorial akan menyediakan pandangan mata burung tentang kajian dalam sarkasme komputasi untuk teks, sementara fokus pada batu-batu yang signifikan. Tutorial bermula dengan teori bahasa sarkasme, dengan fokus pada ketidaksamaan: satu idea berguna yang mendasarkan sarkasme dan bentuk lain bahasa figuratif. Kerana kerja yang paling penting dalam sarkasme pengiraan adalah pengesan sarkasme: meramalkan sama ada sebahagian teks tertentu sarkasik atau tidak, pengesan sarkasme membentuk fokus selepas ini. Kita mulakan diskusi tentang pengesan sarkasma dengan set data, menyentuh strategi, cabaran dan sifat set data. Kemudian, kami menggambarkan algoritma untuk pengesan sarkasma: berdasarkan peraturan (di mana bukti khusus sarkasma digunakan sebagai peraturan), berdasarkan klasifikasi statistik (di mana ciri-ciri direka untuk klasifikasi statistik), teknik berdasarkan model topik, dan algoritma berdasarkan belajar dalam untuk pengesan sarkasma. Dalam kes setiap algoritma ini, kita rujuk kepada kerja kita pada pengesan sarkasma dan berkongsi pelajaran kita. Oleh kerana maklumat diluar teks untuk diklasifikasikan, maklumat kontekstual berguna untuk pengesan sarkasma, kami kemudian menggambarkan pendekatan yang menggunakan', 'mt': "Is-sarkasmu huwa form a ta’ ironja verbali li hija maħsuba biex tesprimi l-kontent jew ir-ridikolu. Motivati mill-isfidi li joħolqu t-test sarkastiku għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti, l-approċċi komputattivi għas-sarkazmu xhiedu interess dejjem jikber fil-fora tal-NLP fl-a ħħar għaxar snin. Sarkazmu komputattiv jirreferi għal approċċi awtomatiċi relatati mas-sarkazmu. It-tutorjal se jipprovdi ħarsa lejn ir-riċerka fis-sarkazmu komputattiv għat-test, filwaqt li jiffoka fuq stadji importanti. It-tutorjal jibda bit-teoriji lingwistiċi tas-sarkasmu, b’enfasi fuq l-inkogruità: kunċett utli li jissejjes fuq is-sarkasmu u forom oħra ta’ lingwa figurattiva. Peress li l-aktar xogħol sinifikanti fis-sarkasmu komputattiv huwa l-individwazzjoni tas-sarkasmu: it-tbassir jekk biċċa tat-test partikolari hijiex sarkastika jew le, id-detezzjoni tas-sarkasmu tifforma l-fokus minn hawn 'il quddiem. We begin our discussion on sarcasm detection with datasets, touching on strategies, challenges and nature of datasets.  Imbagħad, a ħna niddeskrivu l-algoritmi għad-detezzjoni tas-sarkasmu: ibbażati fuq ir-regoli (fejn evidenza speċifika tas-sarkasmu hija użata bħala regola), ibbażati fuq il-klassifikatur statistiku (fejn il-karatteristiċi huma ddisinjati għal klassifikatur statistiku), teknika bbażata fuq mudell tematiku, u algoritmi bbażati fuq tagħlim profond għad-detezzjoni tas-sarkasmu. Fil-każ ta’ kull wieħed minn dawn l-algoritmi, irriferixxu għall-ħidma tagħna dwar id-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu u naqsmu t-tagħlimiet tagħna. Billi informazzjoni lil hinn mit-test li għandu jiġi kklassifikat, informazzjoni kuntestwali hija utli għall-individwazzjoni tas-sarkazmu, imbagħad niddeskrivu approċċi li jużaw tali", 'ml': 'സര്\u200dക്കാസം ഒരു വാക്ക് പരിഹസിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതി. സർക്കസ്റ്റിക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്ന വിലാസങ്ങളാല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, കഴിഞ്ഞ കൊല്ലത്തില്\u200d NLP ഫോർമുകളില്\u200d  കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കാണിക്കുന്ന സര്\u200dക്കാസം സ്വയമായി സമ്മാനിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റിയാണ്. പദ്ധതി ഒരു പക്ഷിയുടെ കണ്ണിന്റെ കണ്ണുകള്\u200d കാണിക്കും. കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിശോധനത്തിനുള്ള പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ കണ The tutorial begins with linguistic theories of sarcasm, with a focus on incongruity: a useful notion that underlies sarcasm and other forms of figurative language.  കണക്കൂട്ടുകണക്കിലെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ് സര്\u200dക്കാസം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത്: ഒരു കൊടുത്ത പദാവലിയുടെ കഷണം സർക്കാസിക് അല് നമ്മുടെ സംസാരം തുടങ്ങുന്നത് സര്\u200dക്കാസം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റിയും, ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ സ്വഭാവത്തെപ്പറ്റിയ പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d സര്\u200dക്കാസം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു: നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (നിയമത്തിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക തെളിവുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്ക ഈ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളില്\u200d ഓരോരുത്തര്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി നമ്മുടെ ജോലി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തി പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതുകൊണ്ടാണ്, സർക്ക', 'no': 'Sarkasm er ein form av verbalet irony som er for å uttrykke omsetjing eller smiling. Motivirert av utfordringar som er plassert av sarkastisk tekst til sentimentanalisering, har datatilnærmingar til sarkasm vist at det er større interesse på NLP-forummer i løpet av siste tiåret. Computational sarkasm refererer til automatiske tilnærmingar for sarkasm. Opplæringa vil gjera ei fuglesyning av forskningen i datamaskina for tekst, medan du fokuserer på signifikante målestane. Opplæringa startar med lingviske teorier om sarkasm, med fokus på inkongruitet: ein nyttig notat som underligg sarkasm og andre formar av figurativt språk. Sidan det mest signifikante arbeidet i datamaskinen er sarkasm-oppdaging: forventar om eit gitt tekststykke er sarkastisk eller ikkje, så oppdaging av sarkasm formar fokusen etter. Vi startar diskusjonen vårt om oppdaging av sarkasm med datasett, råd på strategiar, utfordringar og natur av datasett. Deretter beskriver vi algoritme for oppdaging av sarkasm: regelbasert (der ein spesifikk bevisering av sarkasm vert brukt som regel), statistisk klassifisering basert (der funksjonar er designert for ein statistisk klassifiserer), eit temamodell-basert teknikk, og dyp læringsbasert algoritme for oppdaging av sarkasm. I tillegg til kvar av desse algoritmene refererer vi til arbeidet vårt om oppdaging av sarkasm og delt læringane våre. Sidan informasjon utanfor teksten som skal klassifiserast, er kontekstinformasjon nyttig for å oppdaga sarkasm, beskriver vi så tilnærmingar som brukar slike', 'pl': 'Sarkazm to forma werbalnej ironii, która ma na celu wyrażenie pogardy lub wyśmiewania. Motywowane wyzwaniami stawianymi przez sarkastyczny tekst do analizy sentymentów, obliczeniowe podejścia do sarkazmu były świadkami rosnącego zainteresowania forami NLP w ostatniej dekadzie. Sarkazm obliczeniowy odnosi się do automatycznych podejść odnoszących się do sarkazmu. Poradnik zapewni widok z ptaka na badania nad sarkazmem obliczeniowym dla tekstu, koncentrując się jednocześnie na istotnych kamieniach milowych. Poradnik rozpoczyna się od językowych teorii sarkazmu, skupiając się na niezgodności: użytecznym pojęciu, które leży u podstaw sarkazmu i innych form języka obrazowego. Ponieważ najważniejszą pracą w obliczeniowym sarkazmie jest wykrywanie sarkazmu: przewidywanie, czy dany fragment tekstu jest sarkazmem, czy nie, wykrywanie sarkazmu stanowi poniższy nacisk. Dyskusję na temat wykrywania sarkazmu rozpoczynamy od zbiorów danych, dotykając strategii, wyzwań i charakteru zbiorów danych. Następnie opisujemy algorytmy wykrywania sarkazmu: oparte na regułach (gdzie z reguły wykorzystuje się konkretny dowód sarkazmu), oparte na klasyfikatorze statystycznym (gdzie funkcje są zaprojektowane dla klasyfikatora statystycznego), technikę opartą na modelu tematycznym oraz algorytmy głębokiego uczenia do wykrywania sarkazmu. W przypadku każdego z tych algorytmów odwołujemy się do naszej pracy nad wykrywaniem sarkazmu i dzielimy się naszymi doświadczeniami. Ponieważ informacje poza tekstem, który ma być klasyfikowany, informacje kontekstowe są przydatne do wykrywania sarkazmu, opisujemy następnie podejścia, które wykorzystują takie', 'ro': 'Sarcasmul este o formă de ironie verbală care este menită să exprime dispreț sau ridiculizare. Motivate de provocările puse de textul sarcastic la analiza sentimentelor, abordările computaționale ale sarcasmului au asistat la un interes crescând la forumurile PNL în ultimul deceniu. Sarcasmul computațional se referă la abordările automate referitoare la sarcasm. Tutorialul va oferi o imagine din perspectivă a cercetărilor în sarcasmul computațional pentru text, concentrându-se în același timp pe repere semnificative. Tutorialul începe cu teoriile lingvistice ale sarcasmului, cu accent pe incongruență: o noțiune utilă care stă la baza sarcasmului și a altor forme de limbaj figurativ. Deoarece cea mai importantă lucrare în sarcasmul computațional este detectarea sarcasmului: predicția dacă o anumită bucată de text este sarcastică sau nu, detectarea sarcasmului formează accentul în continuare. Începem discuția noastră despre detectarea sarcasmului cu seturi de date, atingând strategiile, provocările și natura seturilor de date. Apoi, descriem algoritmi pentru detectarea sarcasmului: bazați pe reguli (în cazul în care o dovadă specifică de sarcasm este utilizată ca regulă), bazați pe clasificatori statistici (în cazul în care caracteristicile sunt proiectate pentru un clasificator statistic), o tehnică bazată pe modele tematice și algoritmi bazați pe învățare profundă pentru detectarea sarcasmului. În cazul fiecăruia dintre acești algoritmi, ne referim la activitatea noastră privind detectarea sarcasmului și împărtășim învățăturile noastre. Deoarece informațiile dincolo de textul care urmează să fie clasificate, informațiile contextuale sunt utile pentru detectarea sarcasmului, descriem apoi abordările care utilizează astfel de informații.', 'mn': 'Саркассм бол зөрчилдөөн эсвэл инээмсэглэлийг илэрхийлэх зорилготой хэлбэртэй үгийн галзуу юм. Өнгөрсөн арван жилийн турш NLP захиралд их сонирхолтой болсон. Компьютерийн саркассм нь саркассмын тухай автоматически арга зам гэдэг. Боловсрол нь тооцоололтын саркассмын судалгааны талаар шувуудын нүдний харагддаг. Гэхдээ маш чухал саркассмын талаар анхаарлаа төвлөрөх болно. Боловсрол нь саркассмын хэлний теорийг эхлээд анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлж эхэлдэг. Энэ нь саркассмын болон өөр хэлбэрүүдийн төлөө ашигтай санаа. Компьютерийн саркассмын хамгийн чухал ажил бол саркассмын ололт: өгөгдсөн хэсэг нь саркассмын эсэхийг тодорхойлох эсэхийг тодорхойлж, саркассмын ололт нь дараагийн анхаарлыг төвлөрүүлдэг. Бид өгөгдлийн сангууд, стратеги, сорилтууд, өгөгдлийн байдлын тухай ярилцаж эхэлнэ. Тэгээд бид саркассмын оношлолтын алгоритмыг тайлбарлаж байна: дүрэм дээр суурилсан (хаана саркассмын тодорхой баримт дүрэм хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг), статистикийн классифик дээр суурилсан (хаана статистикийн классифик хэлбэрээр зохион байгуулагдсан) сэдвийн загвар дээр суурилсан тех Эдгээр алгоритмын тухай тохиолдлуудын тухай бид саркассмын нээлттэй ажиллаж, суралцлага хуваалцдаг. Текст хэвлэхээс гадна мэдээллийн тулд нөхцөл мэдээллийн тулд саркассмын мэдээллийн тулд хэрэгтэй болсон учраас бид ийм арга баримтуудыг тайлбарладаг.', 'sr': 'Sarkazam je oblik verbalne ironije koja je nameravana da izrazi prezir ili smeh. Motivirani izazovima koje su postavili sarkastični tekst za analizu sentiment a, računalni pristupi sarkazmu svedočili su veći interes u foruma NLP u proteklih decenija. Kompjuterski sarkazam se odnosi na automatske pristupe vezane za sarkazam. Tutorija će omogućiti ptici pogled na istraživanje u kompjuterskom sarkazmu za tekst, dok se fokusira na značajne preglede. Tutorija počinje sa lingvističkim teorijama sarkazma, sa fokusom na nepoštovanje: korisna ideja koja podleži sarkazam i drugim oblicima figurativnog jezika. Budući da je najznačajniji rad u kompjuterskom sarkazmu detektor sarkazma: predviđanje da li je određeni deo teksta sarkastičan ili ne, detektor sarkazma formira fokus posle toga. Počinjemo raspravu o otkrivanju sarkazma sa setima podataka, dodirujući strategije, izazove i prirodu podataka. Onda opisujemo algoritme za otkrivanje sarkazma: pravila bazirana (gdje se koristi specifični dokazi o sarkazmu kao pravilo), statistički klasifikator bazirani (gdje su karakteristike dizajnirane za statistički klasifikator), tehnika bazirana na temi model a i algoritmi na temi učenja za otkrivanje sarkazma. U slučaju svakog od ovih algoritma, odnosimo na naš rad na detekciju sarkazma i podijelimo naše učenje. Pošto informacije izvan teksta koje trebaju biti klasifikovane, kontekstualne informacije su korisne za detekciju sarkazma, onda opisujemo pristupe koje koriste takve', 'so': 'Sarkaska waa nooc ku filan oo lagu talogalay in lagu muujiyo quudhsasho ama ku qosla. Dhaqdhaqaaqa qaniimooyinka lagu soo jeedo qoraalka sarcastic si ay u baaraandegiso xisaabta, waxay ka muuqatay qasabka xisaabta oo ku kordhaya danaha NLP ee sanadkii hore. Qasabka xisaabta waxaa loola jeedaa soo dhowaanshaha dhakhtarka ah ee ku saabsan sarkaamka. Waxbarashadu wuxuu diyaarinayaa aragga shimbirta ee baaritaanka qasabka ah ee qoraalka, isagoo ku kalsoonaya dhagaxyo muhiim ah. Waxbarashadu wuxuu bilaabaa tiyaatarka afka ku qoran sarcasm, kaas oo focus ugu leh shaqo la’aanta: fikr faa’iido leh oo ku jirta sarcasm iyo noocyo kale oo luuqada takhasuska ah. Sida darteed shaqada xisaabta ugu muhiimsan waa baaraandegista sarcaska: wax ka sii sheegaya in qeyb la siiyo ay tahay sarkisiyeed ama aysan aheyn, baaritaanka sarcaska ayaa dib u sameeya iskuulka. Waxaynu bilownaa sheekeysigeena ku saabsan baaritaanka sarcasiga, waxaynu la xiriirnaa qoraalada, dhibaatooyinka iyo dabiicadda macluumaadka. Markaas waxaynu sawirannaa algorityo ku saabsan baaritaanka sarcasm: sharciga ku saleysan (where caddeynta sarcasm gaar ah looga isticmaalo sida sharciga), takhasuska fasaxa (meesha lagu sameeyo qalabka statistical fasax), qaab muusiko ku saleysan, iyo qoraal aad u weyn barashada sarcasm. Hadii arimahan oo dhan, waxaynu u jeednaa shaqadeeda ku saabsan baaritaanka sarkaalka, waxaynu ku qeybinaynaa waxbarashadayada. Sidaa darteed macluumaadka ka sokeeya qoraalka in la qoro, macluumaadka joogtada ah waxey faa’iido u leedahay in la ogaado qasarka, kadibna waxaynu tilmaamaynaa qaababka isticmaalka caynkaas ah.', 'sv': 'Sarkasm är en form av verbal ironi som är avsedd att uttrycka förakt eller förlöjligande. Motiverade av utmaningarna med sarkastisk text till sentimentalanalys har beräkningsmetoder för sarkasm bevittnat ett växande intresse för NLP-forum under det senaste decenniet. Beräkningssarkasm avser automatiska tillvägagångssätt relaterade till sarkasm. Tutorialen kommer att ge en fågelperspektiv på forskningen inom beräkningsarkasm för text, samtidigt som den fokuserar på betydande milstolpar. Handledningen börjar med språkliga teorier om sarkasm, med fokus på inkonsekvens: ett användbart begrepp som ligger till grund för sarkasm och andra former av figurativt språk. Eftersom det viktigaste arbetet inom beräkningsarkasm är sarkasm detektering: att förutsäga om en viss textbit är sarkastisk eller inte, är sarkasm detektering i fokus härefter. Vi inleder vår diskussion om sarkasm detektering med datauppsättningar, berör strategier, utmaningar och typ av datauppsättningar. Därefter beskriver vi algoritmer för sarkasm detektering: regelbaserad (där ett specifikt bevis på sarkasm används som regel), statistisk klassificeringsbaserad (där funktioner är utformade för en statistisk klassificerare), en ämnesmodellbaserad teknik och djupinlärningsbaserade algoritmer för sarkasm detektering. För var och en av dessa algoritmer hänvisar vi till vårt arbete med sarkasm detektering och delar med oss av våra lärdomar. Eftersom information bortom den text som ska klassificeras, kontextuell information är användbar för sarkasm detektering, beskriver vi sedan metoder som använder sådana', 'ur': 'سورکاسم ایک جوڑا ہے جو ذلیل یا ہنسی کا ارادہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ سیارکاسٹی ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعے سیارکاسٹی ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعے سیارکاسٹی ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعے حرکت کی جاتی ہے، سیارکاسم کے کمپیوٹریشن طریقے کے ذریعے اگلوں دهوں میں NLP فورمز میں اضافہ ہونے کی علاق کمپیوٹریشن سارکاسم Sarcasm کے معاملہ میں اتوماتیک طریقے کا ارتباط کرتا ہے. تدریسیل ایک پرندے کی آنکھ کی نظر پیغام کے لئے کمپیوٹریشن سارکاسم کی تحقیق کے بارے میں ہے، اور اس کے بارے میں اہم مائلٹونوں پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے. تحصیلات سارکاسم کی زبان شناسی نظریوں سے شروع ہوتی ہے، غلطی پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے: ایک مفید نظریہ ہے جو سارکاسم اور دوسری صورتیاں زبان کی بنائی جاتی ہے۔ کیونکہ کمپیوٹریشن سارکاسم میں سب سے اہم کام ہے کہ سارکاسم کا اظہار کرنا ہے: اظہار کرنا چاہیے کہ ایک دیئے ٹیکس سارکاسم ہے یا نہیں، سارکاسم کا اظہار اس کے بعد فوकस کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے سارکاسم ڈیٹسٹ کے ساتھ ڈیٹسٹ کے بارے میں اپنا بحث شروع کیا ہے، استراتژی، چالوں اور ڈیٹسٹ کی طبیعت پر چھوڑا ہے۔ پھر ہم سارکاسم شناسایی کے لئے الگوریتم کو توصیح دیتے ہیں: قانون (جہاں سارکاسم کی ایک خاص دلیل ایک قانون کے طور پر استعمال کی جاتی ہے) ایستستانیک کلاسیٹر (جہاں فرصت ایستستانیک کلاسیٹر کے لئے طراحی کی جاتی ہیں) ایک ٹوپ موڈل کی بنیادی ٹیکنیک اور سیارکاسم شناسایی کے لئے عمیق سیکھنے کی ان الگوریتم میں سے ہر ایک کے مطابق، ہم اپنے کام کو sarcasm detection اور ہماری تعلیم شریک کرتے ہیں۔ اس کے بعد ہم ایسی طریقوں کا استعمال کررہے ہیں', 'si': 'සාර්කාස්ම් කියන්නේ වාර්තාවික විහිළුවක් වගේ, ඒ වගේම අපහසුවක් නැති විහිළුවක් නැති විහිළුව සර්කාස්ටික් පාළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට, පරීක්ෂණාත්ම පරීක්ෂණය සර්කාස්මය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට පත්වෙනවා. අධිකාරිකාරියක් කුරුල්ලගේ ඇස් දිහා පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය පාළුවක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය සර්කාස්ම් වලින් පෙ සාර්කාස්ම් වල භාෂාවික සිද්ධාවන් සමග පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන්, අවුරුද්ධතාවන් වලට අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් අදහසක් තියෙන්න පරිගණනය සර්කාස් වලින් වැදගත් වැඩේ සාර්කාස් පරීක්ෂණය වෙනුවෙන් සාර්කාස් පරීක්ෂණය වෙනුවෙන්: දෙන්න පාළුවක් පාළුවක අපි පටන් ගන්නවා අපේ කතාව සාර්කාස්ම් පරීක්ෂණය ගැන දත්ත සේට් එක්ක, පරීක්ෂණය, අභ්\u200dයාසය සහ දත්ත සේට් එක් ඊට පස්සේ, අපි සර්කාස් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ඇල්ගෝරිතම් විස්තර කරනවා: නියෝජිත විශේෂ සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික මේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්කෙනෙක්ගේ විදියට, අපි අපේ වැඩේ සාර්කාස්ම් පරීක්ෂණය සහ අපේ ඉගැනීම් එක්ක කොටස් කරනවා. පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පාළුවට පස්සේ තොරතුරු පස්සේ, පරීක්ෂා තොරතුරු සර්කාස් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි, අපි පස්', 'ta': 'சார்காஸ்ம் ஒரு சொல்லாத வேடிக்கையின் வடிவம் என்று எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது இழிவு அல்லது பரிகாசம். பெரும்பாலான உரையை ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு சவால்களால் இயக்கப்படுகிறது, சென்ற பத்தாவத்தில் NLP குறிப்புகளில் ஒரு விருப்பமான வட்டியை பார்த்த கணிக்கப்படும் செயல்பாடு தானியங்கி அணுகும் நெருங்குகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. இந்த பொருள் ஒரு பறவையின் கண் பார்வையை உரைக்கான கணக்கீட்டு பரிசோதனையில் கொடுக்கும், முக்கியமான மைல்களை கவனம் செலுத்து பொருள் சார்ந்ததின் மொழிப்பாட்டில் தொடங்குகிறது, குழப்பமில்லாத மொழியில் கவனம் செலுத்திக் கொண்டு கணக்கீட்டில் மிகவும் முக்கியமான வேலை செய்யும் போது ஆர்வமான கண்டுபிடிப்பாகும்: கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையின் ஒரு துண்டு வெற்றிகரமாக இருக நாங்கள் தரவு அமைப்புகளுடன் பரிசுருக்கம் கண்டுபிடிப்பது பற்றி விவாதத்தை தொடங்குகிறோம், திட்டங்கள், சவால்கள் மற்ற பின்னர், நாம் சட்டத்தை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஆல்பரிட்டம்களை விவரிக்கிறோம்: விதிமுறையில் (where a specific proof of sarcasm is used as a rule), statistical classifier-based (where features are designed for a statistical classifier), a theme model-based technique, and deep learning-based algorithms for sarcasm detection. ஒவ்வொரு ஆல்பரிமுறைகளிலும், நாம் சிரியல் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு எங்கள் வேலையை குறிக்கிறது மற்றும் எங்கள் கற்றலை பகிர் வகைப்படுத்தப்பட வேண்டிய உரைக்கும் மேலான தகவல் இருந்தால், தற்போதைய தகவல் பரிமாற்றம் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு பயனுள்ளது, பின்னர் இத', 'uz': "Sarkasm, bir qanday kekkizlik yoki qo'shish natijasi. Xiraktik matnni o'zgartirish uchun rivojlanuvchilar tomonidan foydalanadi, kekasmning hisoblanuvchilariga hisoblash muvaffaqiyatlarini past yil ichida NLP forumlarida ko'payishini ko'rdi. Композиция sarkasm sarcasm sarcasm haqida avtomatik murakkablarini aytadi. Taʼlim matn uchun kompyuter sarkasmning qismini ko'rinishini qo'shiladi, va juda muhim miletlarni foydalanadi. O'quvchi o'quvchi sarkasm haqida o'rganadi, eng foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi fikr sarkasm va boshqa rasmlar bilan boshlanadi. Bu hisoblash sarkasining eng muhim ishlari sarkasmni aniqlash: bir matnning qismlarini sarkastik yoki emas deb hisoblash mumkin, sarkasm qidirishni keyin fokus qiladi. Maʼlumotlar sohasi bilan sarkasm aniqlashni boshlamiz, strategiya, murakkab va maʼlumotlar tarkibini boshqaramiz. Keyin biz sarkasmni aniqlash uchun algoritmni tahmil qilamiz: qoidalar asosida (qayta sarkasm xususiyatlari qoidaga ishlatiladi), statistik classifiseri asosida (statistik darajasi uchun tayyorliklar yaratilmoqda), mavzu modeli asosida, sarkasm qidirish uchun juda qiyin o'rganish algoritlari. Bu har bir algoritlarga aytganda, sarkasmni aniqlash va o'rganishni qaytadi. Since information beyond the text to be classified, contextual information is useful for sarcasm detection, we then describe approaches that use such", 'vi': 'Sự mỉa mai là một hình thức trớ trêu bằng lời nói để thể hiện sự khinh miệt hay nhạo báng. Động đến những thử thách từ văn bản châm biếm cho phân tích cảm xúc, các phương pháp tính trước chế nhạo đã chứng kiến sự chú ý của các diễn đàn trong thập kỷ qua. Tính mỉa mai là phương pháp tự động liên quan đến mỉa mai. Việc huấn luyện s ẽ cung cấp tầm nhìn của chim đối với nghiên cứu về tính toán mỉa mai của văn bản, trong khi tập trung vào những mốc quan trọng. Việc huấn luyện bắt đầu với các giả thuyết ngôn ngữ về mỉa mai, tập trung vào sự bất tiện: một khái niệm hữu ích ẩn chứa mỉa mai và các dạng ngôn ngữ hình ảnh khác. Bởi vì công việc quan trọng nhất trong chế độ mỉa mai tính là phát hiện mỉa mai: dự đoán nếu một phần của văn bản được châm biếm hay không, thì việc phát hiện mỉa mai sẽ là tiêu điểm tiếp theo. Chúng ta bắt đầu thảo luận về sự phát hiện mỉa mai bằng các bộ dữ liệu, chạm vào chiến lược, thử thách và tự nhiên của các tập tin. Sau đó, chúng tôi mô tả thuật toán để phát hiện mỉa mai: dựa trên các quy tắc (nơi thường có bằng chứng mỉa mai được sử dụng như một nguyên tắc), dựa vào các phân loại thống kê (nơi các tính năng được thiết kế cho người phân loại thống kê), một kỹ thuật theo mẫu chuyên mục, và thuật toán học sâu để phát hiện mỉa mai. Trong trường hợp của mỗi thuật to án này, chúng tôi đề cập đến công việc phát hiện mỉa mai và chia sẻ sự quen thuộc của chúng tôi. Vì thông tin ngoài các văn bản cần được phân loại, nên những thông tin ngữ cảnh có ích cho việc phát hiện mỉa mai, nên chúng tôi mô tả các phương pháp dùng chúng.', 'da': 'Sarkasme er en form for verbal ironi, der har til formål at udtrykke foragt eller latterliggørelse. Motiveret af udfordringer fra sarkastisk tekst til sentimental analyse har beregningsmæssige tilgange til sarkasme set en voksende interesse for NLP fora i det sidste årti. Beregningsarkasme refererer til automatiske tilgange vedrørende sarkasme. Tutorialen vil give et fugleøjeblik over forskningen i beregningsmæssig sarkasme til tekst, samtidig med at der fokuseres på betydelige milepæle. Tutorialen begynder med sproglige teorier om sarkasme, med fokus på inkonsekvens: en nyttig idé, der ligger til grund for sarkasme og andre former for figurativt sprog. Da det mest betydningsfulde arbejde i beregningsmæssig sarkasme er sarkasme detektion: at forudsige, om et givet stykke tekst er sarkastisk eller ej, er sarkasme detektion fokus herefter. Vi begynder vores diskussion om sarkasme detektion med datasæt, berører strategier, udfordringer og datasættens art. Derefter beskriver vi algoritmer til sarkasme detektion: regelbaseret (hvor et specifikt bevis på sarkasme anvendes som regel), statistisk klassificeringsbaseret (hvor funktioner er designet til en statistisk klassificering), en emnemodelbaseret teknik, og deep learning-baserede algoritmer til sarkasme detektion. I tilfælde af hver af disse algoritmer henviser vi til vores arbejde med sarkasme detektion og deler vores læring. Da oplysninger ud over den tekst, der skal klassificeres, er kontekstuelle oplysninger nyttige til opdagelse af sarkasme, beskriver vi derefter tilgange, der bruger sådanne', 'de': 'Sarkasmus ist eine Form verbaler Ironie, die Verachtung oder Spott ausdrücken soll. Motiviert durch Herausforderungen, die sarkastischer Text zur Sentimentanalyse mit sich bringt, haben computergestützte Ansätze zum Sarkasmus in den letzten zehn Jahren ein wachsendes Interesse an NLP-Foren erlebt. Computersarkasmus bezieht sich auf automatische Ansätze, die Sarkasmus betreffen. Das Tutorial wird einen Blick aus der Vogelperspektive auf die Erforschung des computergestützten Sarkasmus für Text geben, während es sich auf wichtige Meilensteine konzentriert. Das Tutorial beginnt mit linguistischen Theorien des Sarkasmus, mit einem Fokus auf Inkongruität: eine nützliche Idee, die Sarkasmus und andere Formen der Bildsprache zugrunde liegt. Da die wichtigste Arbeit im computergestützten Sarkasmus die Sarkasmus-Erkennung ist: Voraussagen, ob ein bestimmtes Textstück sarkastisch ist oder nicht, bildet Sarkasmus-Erkennung im Folgenden den Fokus. Wir beginnen unsere Diskussion über Sarkasmus-Erkennung mit Datensätzen und berühren Strategien, Herausforderungen und Natur von Datensätzen. Anschließend beschreiben wir Algorithmen zur Sarkasmus-Erkennung: regelbasiert (wo in der Regel ein spezifischer Beweis für Sarkasmus verwendet wird), statistisch klassifiziererbasiert (wo Features für einen statistischen Klassifikator entworfen sind), eine themenmodellbasierte Technik und Deep Learning-basierte Algorithmen zur Sarkasmus-Erkennung. Bei jedem dieser Algorithmen verweisen wir auf unsere Arbeit zur Sarkasmus-Erkennung und teilen unsere Erkenntnisse. Da Informationen jenseits des zu klassifizierenden Textes, kontextbezogene Informationen für die Sarkasmus-Erkennung nützlich sind, beschreiben wir dann Ansätze, die solche', 'nl': 'Sarcasme is een vorm van verbale ironie die bedoeld is om minachting of spot uit te drukken. Gemotiveerd door uitdagingen van sarcastische tekst aan sentimentanalyse, hebben computationele benaderingen van sarcasme getuige een groeiende belangstelling op NLP forums in het afgelopen decennium. Computationeel sarcasme verwijst naar automatische benaderingen met betrekking tot sarcasme. De tutorial zal een vogelperspectief bieden op het onderzoek naar computersarcasme voor tekst, terwijl de nadruk ligt op belangrijke mijlpalen. De tutorial begint met linguïstische theorieën van sarcasme, met een focus op incongruïteit: een nuttig begrip dat ten grondslag ligt aan sarcasme en andere vormen van figuratieve taal. Aangezien het belangrijkste werk in computersarcasme sarcasme detectie is: voorspellen of een bepaald stuk tekst sarcastisch is of niet, vormt sarcasme detectie hierna de focus. We beginnen onze discussie over sarcasme detectie met datasets, waarbij we ingaan op strategieën, uitdagingen en aard van datasets. Vervolgens beschrijven we algoritmen voor sarcasme detectie: regel-gebaseerd (waarbij een specifiek bewijs van sarcasme als regel wordt gebruikt), statistische classificator-gebaseerd (waar functies zijn ontworpen voor een statistische classificator), een topic model-gebaseerde techniek, en deep learning-gebaseerde algoritmen voor sarcasme detectie. Bij elk van deze algoritmes verwijzen we naar ons werk over sarcasme detectie en delen we onze lessen. Aangezien informatie buiten de te classificeren tekst, contextuele informatie nuttig is voor sarcasme detectie, beschrijven we vervolgens benaderingen die gebruik maken van dergelijke', 'bg': 'Сарказмът е форма на словесна ирония, която има за цел да изрази презрение или подигравка. Мотивирани от предизвикателствата, поставени от саркастичния текст към сентименталния анализ, изчислителните подходи към сарказма станаха свидетели на нарастващ интерес във форумите на НЛП през последното десетилетие. Компютърният сарказъм се отнася до автоматичните подходи, отнасящи се до сарказма. Урокът ще предостави птичи поглед на изследванията в компютърния сарказъм за текст, като същевременно се фокусира върху значителни етапи. Урокът започва с лингвистични теории на сарказма, с фокус върху несъгласието: полезно понятие, което е в основата на сарказма и други форми на фигуративен език. Тъй като най-значимата работа в компютърния сарказъм е откриването на сарказъм: предсказвайки дали дадено парче текст е сарказъм или не, откриването на сарказъм формира фокуса по-нататък. Започваме дискусията си за откриване на сарказъм с набори от данни, докосвайки стратегиите, предизвикателствата и естеството на наборите от данни. След това описваме алгоритми за откриване на сарказъм: базирани на правила (където се използва специфично доказателство за сарказъм като правило), базирани на статистически класификатори (където характеристиките са предназначени за статистически класификатор), базирана на тематични модели техника и базирани на дълбоко обучение алгоритми за откриване на сарказъм. В случай на всеки един от тези алгоритми, ние се позоваваме на нашата работа по откриване на сарказъм и споделяме нашите знания. Тъй като информацията извън текста, която трябва да бъде класифицирана, контекстната информация е полезна за откриване на сарказъм, ние описваме подходи, които използват такива', 'hr': 'Sarkazam je oblik verbalne ironije koja je namjerena izraziti prezir ili smijeh. Motivirani izazovima koje su postavili sarkastični tekst na analizu osjećaja, računalni pristupi sarkazmu svjedočili su veći interes u foruma NLP-a u proteklih desetljeća. Računalni sarkazam se odnosi na automatske pristupe vezane za sarkazam. Tutorija će omogućiti ptici pogled na istraživanje u računalnom sarkazmu za tekst, dok se fokusiraju na značajne preglede. Tutorija počinje s jezičkim teorijama sarkazma, s fokusom na nepoštovanje: korisna ideja koja se temelji sarkazmom i drugim oblicima figurativnog jezika. Budući da je najznačajniji rad u računalnom sarkazmu otkrivanje sarkazma: predviđanje da li je određeni dio teksta sarkastičan ili ne, otkrivanje sarkazma čini fokus poslije. Počinjemo raspravu o otkrivanju sarkazma sa setima podataka, dodirujući strategije, izazove i prirodu podataka. Onda opisujemo algoritme za otkrivanje sarkazma: pravila temeljene (gdje se koristi određeni dokazi sarkazma kao pravilo), statistički klasifikator temeljeni (gdje su karakteristike dizajnirane za statistički klasifikator), tehnika temeljena na temelju model a i algoritmi na temelju učenja za otkrivanje sarkazma. U slučaju svakog od ovih algoritma, odnosimo na naš rad na otkrivanje sarkazma i podijelimo učenje. Budući da su informacije izvan teksta koje treba klasifikirati, kontekstualne informacije korisne za otkrivanje sarkazma, onda opisujemo pristupe koje koriste takve', 'id': "Sarkasme adalah bentuk ironi verbal yang ditujukan untuk mengekspresikan penghinaan atau konyol. Dimotifkan oleh tantangan yang didatangkan oleh teks sarkastik untuk analisis sentimen, pendekatan komputasi untuk sarkasme telah menyaksikan kepentingan yang semakin meningkat di forum NLP dalam dekade terakhir. Sarkasme komputasi merujuk pendekatan otomatis yang berhubungan dengan sarkasme. The tutorial will provide a bird's-eye view of the research in computational sarcasm for text, while focusing on significant milestones. Tutorial dimulai dengan teori bahasa sarkasme, dengan fokus pada ketidaksamaan: gagasan berguna yang mendasarkan sarkasme dan bentuk lain bahasa figuratif. Karena pekerjaan yang paling signifikan dalam sarkasme komputasi adalah deteksi sarkasme: memprediksi apakah bagian teks tertentu sarkastik atau tidak, deteksi sarkasme membentuk fokus setelah ini. Kita mulai diskusi tentang deteksi sarkasme dengan set data, menyentuh strategi, tantangan dan alami set data. Kemudian, kami menggambarkan algoritma untuk deteksi sarkasme: berdasarkan aturan (di mana bukti khusus sarkasme digunakan sebagai aturan), berdasarkan klasifikasi statistik (di mana fitur dirancang untuk klasifikasi statistik), teknik berdasarkan model topik, dan algoritma berdasarkan belajar dalam untuk deteksi sarkasme. Dalam kasus setiap algoritma ini, kita merujuk pekerjaan kita pada deteksi sarkasme dan berbagi belajar kita. Since information beyond the text to be classified, contextual information is useful for sarcasm detection, we then describe approaches that use such", 'sw': 'Utangazaji ni aina ya kejeli inayokusudiwa kuonyesha udhalilishaji au kucheka kejeli. Hatua ya changamoto zilizotolewa na ujumbe wa kejeli kwa uchambuzi wa hisia, mbinu za kompyuta za ukatili zimekuwa zinashuhudia ongezeko la maslahi katika majukwaa ya NLP katika muongo uliopita. kejeli za kompyuta inamaanisha njia za kujitegemea zinazohusiana na kejeli. Utafiti huo utatoa mtazamo wa macho ya ndege kwa utafiti katika kejeli za kompyuta kwa ajili ya maandishi, wakati wakijikita kwenye mawe makubwa. Elimu hii inaanza kwa nadharia za lugha za kejeli, yenye lengo la kutokuwepo kwa ukosefu: dhana yenye ufanisi inayoendelea na kejeli na aina nyingine za lugha za takwimu. Kwa kuwa kazi muhimu zaidi katika kejeli za kompyuta ni utambulisho wa kejeli: kutabiri kama kipande kilichopewa ujumbe wa maandishi ni kejeli au la, utambuzi wa kejeli unaunda malengo hayo baadae. Tunaanza mjadala wetu kuhusu uchunguzi wa kemikali na seti za taarifa, kuzungumza mikakati, changamoto na asili ya seti za data. Kisha, tunaelezea algorithi kwa ajili ya kutambua kejeli: utawala (ambapo ushahidi maalum wa kemikali hutumika kama utawala), wataalamu wa takwimu (ambapo tayari zinatengenezwa kwa ajili ya kutambua takwimu), teknolojia inayohusiana na mada, na vipengele vya kujifunza vyema vya kemikali. Katika kila aina ya mialgorithi hii, tunamaanisha kazi yetu kuhusu kutambua kemikali na kushirikisha elimu yetu. Kwa kuwa taarifa zaidi ya maandishi ya kutangazwa, taarifa za sasa zinafaa kwa ajili ya kutambua kemikali, kisha tunaelezea mbinu zinazotumia aina hiyo', 'tr': 'Kiçi görkezme ýa-da alada etmek üçin netijä edilen verbal gaýgyndyr. Sensiýa görkezilen kynçylyklar tarapyndan görkezilen kynçylyklar bilen nLP forumlarynda öňki on ýylda örän gyzyklandyrylýar. Bilgisayar sarkası, sarkası ile ilgili otomatik yaklaşımlara benziyor. Gurbanlar, hesaplanyň sarkasmasynyň bardygyny maslahat bilen kuşlaryň gözüne görnüşi s a ýlayar we möhüm görnüşlere üns berýär. Gurbanlar, sarkasm dili teoriýasy bilen başlaýar we ýetgemezlikde fokus edip başlaýar: sarkasm we pikir dili bolan başga bir nähili pikir. Bilgisayar sözlerinde iñ möhüm iş sarkasy tanyşdyrmak üçin: berilen metin bölegi sarkasy dälmidir ýa-da dälmidir öňünden soňra fokus edendir. Biz öz diskusiýamyzy sarkasm alyp biljek setirleri bilen başlaýarys, stratejiýalary, kynçylyklary we daýat setirleriniň dogrusy bilen elleşip başlaýarys. Sonra, sarkasm deteksiyonu üçin algoritmalary tassykladyrys Bu algoritmalardan her biri ise, işimizi sarkasm detektifi ve öğrendiklerimizi paylaşýarys. Sınıflandırılmak için metin ötesindeki bilgi, tespit bilgileri sarkasm deteksiyonu için kullanılabilir. -', 'fa': 'سارکاسم یک شکل طبیعی زبان است که می\u200cخواهد به عنوان خواری یا ریشخند استفاده کند. توسط چالش\u200cهایی که توسط متن سارکاستیک به تحلیل احساسات قرار می\u200cگیرند، نزدیک\u200cهای محاسباتی به سارکاسم در دهه\u200cی گذشته علاقه\u200cای رشد در فورمان\u200cهای NLP را مشاهده کرده\u200cاند. سارکاسم کامپیوتری به نزدیک\u200cهای خودکار مربوط به سارکاسم ارائه می\u200cکند. تحصیلات یک نگاه چشم پرنده در مورد تحقیقات در سارکاسم کامپیوتری برای متن، در حالی که تمرکز روی مایلهای مهم است. این تدریس با تئوری زبان\u200cشناسی از سارکاسم شروع می\u200cشود، با تمرکز روی غیرقابلیت: یک تفکری مفید که در پایه سارکاسم و دیگر شکل زبان\u200cشناسی است. زیرا کارهای مهم\u200cترین در سارکاسم محاسباتی شناسایی سارکاسم است: پیش\u200cبینی کردن که آیا یک قطعه از متن داده شده سارکاسم است یا نه، شناسایی سارکاسم پس از آن تمرکز می\u200cکند. ما بحث\u200cهایمان را در مورد شناسایی سارکاسم با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها شروع می\u200cکنیم، با استراتژی\u200cها، چالش\u200cها و طبیعت مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها تماس می\u200cگیریم. سپس ما الگوریتم\u200cها را برای شناسایی سارکاسم توصیف می\u200cکنیم: بر اساس قانون (جایی مدرک ویژه\u200cای از سارکاسم به عنوان قانون استفاده می\u200cشود) بر اساس قانون، بر اساس قانون شناسایی آمار\u200cشناسایی (جایی که ویژه\u200cها برای یک گروه آمار\u200cشناسایی طراحی می\u200cشوند) یک تکنیک بر اساس موضوع، و در مورد هر کدام از این الگوریتم، ما به کارمون در مورد شناسایی سارکاسم مربوط می\u200cکنیم و آموزش\u200cهایمان را شریک می\u200cکنیم. از آنجایی که اطلاعات غیر از متن که باید محرمانه باشد، اطلاعات محرمانه برای شناسایی سارکاسم مفید است، سپس ما از طریق\u200cهایی که از آن استفاده می\u200cکنند توصیف می\u200cکنیم', 'ko': '풍자는 경멸이나 조소를 표현하기 위한 언어 풍자이다.지난 10년 동안 풍자 텍스트가 정서 분석에 대한 도전으로 풍자의 계산 방법은 NLP 포럼에서 점점 더 많은 흥미를 끌었다.계산 풍자는 풍자와 관련된 자동 방법을 가리킨다.이 강좌는 텍스트 계산 풍자 연구의 조감도를 제공하고 중요한 이정표에 주목할 것이다.이 강좌는 풍자의 언어학 이론에서 시작하여 불협화음에 중점을 두었다. 이것은 유용한 개념이고 풍자와 다른 형식의 비유 언어의 기초이다.계산 풍자에서 가장 중요한 작업은 풍자 검측이다. 주어진 텍스트가 풍자성을 지니고 있는지 예측하는 것이기 때문에 풍자 검측은 다음 문장의 중점이 될 것이다.우리는 전략, 도전, 데이터 집합과 관련된 풍자를 데이터 집합으로 검출하는 것에 대해 토론하기 시작했다.그 다음에 우리는 풍자 검출에 사용되는 알고리즘을 묘사했다. 규칙(그 중에서 풍자의 특정한 증거가 규칙으로 사용된다), 통계 분류기(그 중에서 특징은 통계 분류기에 사용된다), 주제 모델을 바탕으로 하는 기술, 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 풍자 검출 알고리즘이다.이러한 알고리즘 중 하나에 대해 우리는 풍자 검측 분야의 업무를 참고하고 우리의 경험을 공유할 것이다.텍스트 이외의 정보는 분류가 필요하기 때문에 상하문 정보는 풍자 검측에 매우 유용하다. 우리는 다음에 이러한 정보를 사용하는 방법을 설명한다.', 'sq': "Sarkazmi është një form ë ironie verbale që synon të shprehë urrejtje apo qeshje. Motivuar nga sfidat e paraqitura nga teksti sarkastik ndaj analizës së ndjenjave, qasjet kompjuterike ndaj sarkazmit kanë dëshmuar një interes në rritje në forumet e NLP në dekadën e kaluar. Sarkazmi kompjuterik referohet tek afrimet automatike lidhur me sarkazmin. The tutorial will provide a bird's-eye view of the research in computational sarcasm for text, while focusing on significant milestones. Tutoriali fillon me teoritë gjuhësore të sarkazmit, me fokus në mospërputhje: një koncept të dobishëm që nënshtron sarkazmin dhe forme të tjera të gjuhës figurative. Since the most significant work in computational sarcasm is sarcasm detection: predicting whether a given piece of text is sarcastic or not, sarcasm detection forms the focus hereafter.  Fillojmë diskutimin tonë mbi zbulimin e sarkazmit me të dhënat, duke prekur strategjitë, sfidat dhe natyrën e të dhënave. Pastaj, ne përshkruajmë algoritmet për zbulimin e sarkazmit: bazuar në rregulla (ku një provë specifike e sarkazmit përdoret si rregull), bazuar në klasifikuesin statistik (ku karakteristikat janë projektuar për një klasifikues statistik), një teknikë thematike bazuar në modele dhe algoritme thellë bazuar në mësim për zbulimin e sarkazmit. Në rast të secilit nga këto algoritme, ne i referohemi punës sonë për zbulimin e sarkazmit dhe ndajmë mësimet tona. Nga që informacioni përtej tekstit që duhet të klasifikohet, informacioni kontekstual është i dobishëm për zbulimin e sarkazmit, ne pastaj përshkruajmë metodat që përdorin të tilla", 'am': 'ሰርካሲም የንቀት ወይም መሳለቂያ ማሳየት የተሰበሰበት የሐሳብ ዓይነት ነው፡፡ በተለፉት አሥር ዓመታት ውስጥ የኤንኤል ፕ ፎሮማኖች ላይ የሚጨምረው ውጤት አቀረበ፡፡ አካባቢ ስርዓት የራሳቸውን የስርዓት መቃረቢያ በማድረግ ነው፡፡ ትምህርት የወፍ ዓይን ማየት ለጽሑፍ የተሰራካሲ ትምህርት ማድረግ ይሰጣል፤ በተመሳሳይ ሚሊቶች ላይ ትክክለኛ ነው፡፡ ትምህርት የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ጥያቄ በተደረገ ቋንቋዎች፣ በማፍረስ ላይ ማስታወቂያ ይጀምራል፡፡ በተቆጣጠረው ስርዓት ውስጥ በጣም ትልቅ ሥራ የሳርካሲ አግኝቷል፤ የተሰጠ ጽሑፍ አፍሪካዊ መሆኑን ወይም አይሆንም እንደሆነ አስታውቆታል፡፡ የዳታ ተቃውሞ፣ የዳታ ተቃውሞ፣ የድምፅ ጥቃት እና ጥያቄ እና ጥያቄን እናስነካለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ ለsarካም ማግኘት አልgoritምን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህን ሁሉ አጎርማሪዎች ቢሆን፣ የሳርካም ማግኘት ሥራችንን እናሳውቃለን ትምህርታችንንም እናጋራለን፡፡ ከጽሑፉ በላይ ያሉት መረጃ ሊለፍ ከሆነ፣ የአሁኑን መረጃ ለሳርስብ ማግኘት ይጠቅማል፡፡', 'hy': "Սարկազմը խոսնական հեղինակության մի տեսակ է, որը նշանակում է արտահայտել անհամբերություն կամ ծիծաղ: Սարկաստական տեքստի կողմից առաջացած մարտահրավերներով զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար, սարկազմի հաշվարկման մոտեցումները ականատես են եղել վերջին տասնամյակի ընթացքում ՆԼՊ-ի ֆորմերում աճող հետաքրքրությունը: Համակարգչային սարկազմը նշանակում է սարկազմի հետ կապված ավտոմատիկ մոտեցումներ: Այս ուսումնասիրությունը կտրամադրի թռչունների տեսանկյուն տեքստի հաշվարկների սարկազմի ուսումնասիրության մասին, կենտրոնացնելով միաժամանակ կարևոր քայլերի վրա: Գործողությունը սկսում է սարկազմի լեզվաբանական տեսություններից, կենտրոնացնելով անհամապատասխանության վրա' օգտակար գաղափար, որը հիմնված է սարկազմի և այլ ֆիրմանատիվ լեզվի ձևերի վրա: Քանի որ համակարգչային սարկազմի ամենակարևոր աշխատանքը սարկազմի հայտնաբերումն է. կանխատեսելով, արդյոք որոշ տեքստի մասը սարկազմային է, թե ոչ, ապագայում սարկազմային հայտնաբերումը կենտրոնացնում է: Մենք սկսում ենք մեր քննարկումները սարկազմի հայտնաբերման մասին տվյալների համակարգերով, դիպչելով ռազմավարություններին, մարտահրավերներին և տվյալների բնույթին: Հետո մենք նկարագրում ենք սարկազմի հայտնաբերման ալգորիթմները՝ կանոններով հիմնված (որտեղ սարկազմի որոշակի ապացույցները օգտագործվում են որպես կանոն), վիճակագրական դասակարգման հիմնված (որտեղ առանձնահատկությունները նախագծված են վիճակագրական դասակարգման համար), թեմային մոդել հիմնված տեխնիկան և խորը սովորման հիմնված ալգորի Այս ալգորիթմներից յուրաքանչյուրի դեպքում մենք վերաբերվում ենք մեր աշխատանքին սարկազմի հայտնաբերման և կիսում ենք մեր ուսումնասիրությունները: Քանի որ տեքստից դուրս գալիս տեղեկատվությունը դասակարգված է, կոնտեքստային տեղեկատվությունը օգտակար է սարկազմի հայտնաբերման համար, ապա մենք նկարագրում ենք մոտեցումներ, որոնք օգտագործում են", 'af': "Sarkasme is 'n vorm van verbale ironie wat bedoel is om veragting of bespotting te uitdruk. Gemotiveerde deur uitdagings wat deur sarkasiese teks gestel word tot sentimentanalisie, het rekenasielike toegang tot sarkasme getuig om 'n groei belang te wees by NLP-forums in die verlede dekade. Rekenaarse sarkasme verwys na outomatiese toegang van sarkasm. Die onderwerp sal 'n voël se oog aansig verskaf van die onderwerp in rekenasielike sarkasm vir teks, terwyl gefokus word op betekende milestone. Die onderwyseling beginne met lingwisiese teoriee van sarkasme, met 'n fokus op ongelukkigheid, 'n nuttige notie wat ondersteun sarkasme en ander vorms van figurasietaal. Omdat die mees belangrikste werk in rekenaarske sarkasme is sarkasme beskrywing: voorskou of 'n gegewe stuk teks sarkasies is of nie, is sarkasme beskrywing die fokus hierna. Ons begin ons diskusie oor sarkasme-opdekking met datastelle, aanraak van strategies, uitdagings en natuur van datastelle. Dan beskryf ons algoritme vir sarkasme-opdekking: reël-gebaseer (waar 'n spesifieke bevestigheid van sarkasm gebruik word as 'n reël), statistiese klassifiseerder-gebaseer (waar funksies vir 'n statistiese klassifiseerder ontwerp word), â\x80\x99n onderwerp-model-gebaseerde tekniks en diep onderwerp-gebaseerde algoritme vir sarkasme-opdekking. In geval van elke van hierdie algoritme, verwys ons aan ons werk op sarkasme-opdekking en deel ons onderwerpe. Omdat inligting buite die teks geklassifiseer moet word, is contextual inligting bruikbaar vir sarkasme-oppdaging, beskrywe ons dan toegang wat sodanige gebruik word", 'bn': 'সার্কাস্ম হচ্ছে একটি বাজে বিদ্রুপের ধরনের বিদ্রূপ যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে অপমান বা উপহাস প্রকাশ করার জন্য। বিদ্রোহীত বিশ্লেষণের জন্য বিদ্রোহী টেক্সটের দ্বারা চ্যালেঞ্জের দ্বারা প্রতিষ্ঠিত হয়েছে, গত দশকে এনএলপি ফোরামে বৃদ্ধিমান আগ্রহে Computational sarcasm refers to automatic approaches pertaining to sarcasm.  এই শিক্ষার্থীটি একটি পাখির চোখের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করবে লেখার জন্য গণনা বিদ্রূপের গবেষণার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দেখা যাবে,  শিক্ষার্থীর শুরু হয় বিদ্রূপের ভাষার তত্ত্বাবধানে, যার দ্বারা দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতা নিয়ে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে: একটি কার্যকর ধারণা যা বিদ্রোহ যেহেতু গণতান্ত্রিক বিদ্রূপের সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ হচ্ছে বিদ্রূপ আবিষ্কার: ভবিষ্যৎ করা হচ্ছে একটি প্রদত্ত লেখা বিদ্রোহীত কি আমরা ডাটাসেটের কৌশল, চ্যালেঞ্জ আর প্রকৃতির ব্যাপারে আমাদের আলোচনা শুরু করি। তারপর আমরা বিদ্রূপ সনাক্তির জন্য আল্গোরিদম বর্ণনা করি: শাসনের ভিত্তিতে (যেখানে বিদ্রোহের একটি নির্দিষ্ট প্রমাণ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়), পরিসংখ্যান বিভিন্ন পরিসংখ্যানের ভিত্তিক (যেখানে পরিস এই প্রত্যেকটি অ্যালগরিদমের ক্ষেত্রে আমরা বিদ্রূপ সনাক্তি এবং শিক্ষা শেয়ার করি আমাদের কাজের কথা উল্লেখ করি। যেহেতু টেক্সটের বাইরে তথ্য বিস্তারিত তথ্য, বিদ্রোহীত তথ্য সনাক্ত করার জন্য উপযুক্ত, তারপর আমরা ব্যাখ্যা করি যে কোন', 'az': 'Sarkasm alçaq və istehza etmək məqsədilə verilən verbal ironi bir formudur. Sarkastik məktub analizi ilə təşkil edilən çətinliklərdən təşkil edilmiş, sarkasma təşkiləri hesablama təşkiləri son on ildə NLP forumlarında artırmaq məqsədilə tanıdılar. Bilgisayar sarkasmı sarkasma haqqında avtomatik tərzlərinə məlumat edir. Bu təhsil, bilgisayar sarkasmının təhsil edilməsi üçün quşların gözünün görünüşünü təmin edəcək, möhtərəm milestonlara odaqlanacaq. Bu təhsil sarkasma dilində başlar, inkrutlığa odaklanır: sarkasma və başqa figurativ dilin başına gələn mənfəətli fikir. Bilgisayar sarkasımında ən möhkəm işlər sarkasm tanımasıdır: verilən mətn parçası sarkastik və ya yoxdur, sarkasm tanıması sonradan fokus yaradır. Biz sarkasm keşif barəsində verilən qurğular ilə, stratejilərə, çətinliklərə və verilən qurğular barəsində mübahisə edirik. Sonra, sarkasm keşfinin algoritmini təsdiqləyirik: qayda-təsdiqləyici (qayda-təsdiqləyici bir dəlil kimi istifadə edilir), statistik klasifikatı-təsdiqləyici-təsdiqləyici-təsdiqləyici-təsdiqləyici-təsdiqləyici üçün təsdiqləyici, modeli-təsdiqləyici tekniki və sarkasm keşfinin derin öyrənməsi- Bu algoritmlərin hər birinə görə, sarkasm keşfini və öyrəndiyimizi paylaşırıq. Sınıflandırılacaq mətndən ötrü məlumat istifadə edildikdən sonra, müxtəlif məlumat sarkasm tanıması üçün faydalanır, biz də bu məlumatları istifadə edirik.', 'ca': "El sarcasme és una form a d'ironia verbal destinada a expressar despreci o ridícul. Motivats pels reptes que posen el text sarcàstic a l'anàlisi del sentiment, els enfocaments computacionals al sarcàsme han vist un interès creixent en els fòrums NLP en les últimes dècades. El sarcasme computacional es refereix a abords automàtics relacionats amb el sarcasme. El tutorial proporcionarà una visió d'ocell de la recerca en sarcasme computacional per al text, centrant-se en milers significatius. El tutorial comença amb teories lingüístiques del sarcasme, centrant-se en l'incongruïtat: una noció útil que es basa en el sarcasme i altres formes de llenguatge figuratiu. Com que la feina més significativa en el sarcàsme computacional és la detecció del sarcàsme: predir si una peça de text és sarcàstic o no, la detecció del sarcàsme forma el foc a continuació. Comencem la nostra discussió sobre la detecció del sarcasme amb conjunts de dades, tocant en estratègies, reptes i naturalesa dels conjunts de dades. Després, descrivim algoritmes per la detecció del sarcasme: basats en regles (on es utilitza una evidència específica del sarcasme com a regla), basats en classificadors estadístics (on les característiques es dissenyen per a un classificador estadístic), una tècnica basada en models temàtics i algoritmes basats en aprenentatge profund per la detecció del sarcasme. In case of each of these algorithms, we refer to our work on sarcasm detection and share our learnings.  Com que la informació més enllà del text que s'ha de classificar, la informació contextual és útil per la detecció del sarcasme, després descrivim enfocaments que utilitzen", 'cs': 'Sarkasmus je forma slovní ironie, která má vyjádřit opovržení nebo posměch. Počítačové přístupy k sarkasmu byly motivovány výzvami, které představují sarkastický text k analýze sentimentů, v posledních desetiletích svědky rostoucího zájmu na NLP fórech. Výpočetní sarkasmus odkazuje na automatické přístupy týkající se sarkasmu. Návod poskytne pohled z ptačí perspektivy na výzkum výpočetního sarkasmu pro text a současně se zaměří na významné milníky. Návod začíná jazykovými teoriemi sarkasmu se zaměřením na nesrovnalost: užitečný pojem, který je základem sarkasmu a dalších forem obrazového jazyka. Vzhledem k tomu, že nejvýznamnější práci v oblasti výpočetního sarkasmu je detekce sarkasmu: předpověď, zda je daný kus textu sarkastický či nikoliv, dále se zaměřuje na detekci sarkasmu. Diskuzi o detekci sarkasmu začínáme s datovými sadami, dotýkáme se strategií, výzev a povahy datových sad. Dále popisujeme algoritmy pro detekci sarkasmu: založené na pravidlech (kde se zpravidla používá specifický důkaz sarkasmu), založené na statistickém klasifikátoru (kde jsou funkce navrženy pro statistický klasifikátor), techniku založenou na tématickém modelu a algoritmy založené na hlubokém učení pro detekci sarkasmu. U každého z těchto algoritmů odkazujeme na naši práci na detekci sarkasmu a sdílíme své poznatky. Vzhledem k tomu, že informace mimo text, který má být klasifikován, jsou užitečné pro detekci sarkasmu, popisujeme přístupy, které používají tyto informace.', 'et': 'Sarkasm on verbaalse iroonia vorm, mille eesmärk on väljendada põlgust või naeruväärsust. Sarkasmi arvutuslikud lähenemisviisid on viimase kümnendi jooksul NLP foorumite vastu kasvanud, motiveeritud sarkasmi väljakutsetest sentimentaalanalüüsile. Arvutuslik sarkasm viitab sarkasmi automaatsetele lähenemistele. Õppekava annab linnupilgu teksti arvutusliku sarkasmi uurimistööst, keskendudes samal ajal olulistele verstapostidele. Õpetus algab sarkasmi keeleliste teooriatega, keskendudes lahknevusele: kasulik mõiste, mis põhineb sarkasmi ja teiste kujutiskeele. Kuna arvutusliku sarkasmi kõige olulisem töö on sarkasmi tuvastamine: ennustades, kas antud tekstitükk on sarkastiline või mitte, moodustab sarkasmi tuvastamine fookuse edaspidi. Alustame sarkasmi tuvastamise arutelu andmekogumitega, puudutades strateegiaid, väljakutseid ja andmekogumite olemust. Seejärel kirjeldame sarkasmi tuvastamise algoritme: reeglipõhiseid (kus kasutatakse reeglina konkreetseid sarkasmi tõendeid), statistilisi klassifitseerijapõhiseid (kus funktsioonid on mõeldud statistilisele klassifitseerijale), teemamudelil põhinevat tehnikat ja sügavõppepõhiseid algoritme sarkasmi tuvastamiseks. Iga algoritmi puhul viitame sarkasmi tuvastamise tööle ja jagame oma õppimisi. Kuna klassifitseeritavast tekstist väljapoole jääv teave on sarkasmi tuvastamiseks kasulik kontekstiteave, kirjeldame seejärel lähenemisviise, mis kasutavad sellist teavet', 'bs': 'Sarkazam je oblik verbalne ironije koja je namjerena izraziti prezir ili smijeh. Motivirani izazovima koje su postavili sarkastični tekst na analizu osjećaja, računalni pristupi sarkazmu svjedočili su veći interes u foruma NLP u proteklih decenija. Računalni sarkazam se odnosi na automatske pristupe vezane za sarkazam. Tutorija će omogućiti ptici pogled na istraživanje u računalnom sarkazmu za tekst, dok se fokusira na značajne preglede. Tutorija počinje sa lingvističkim teorijama sarkazma, sa fokusom na nepoštovanje: korisna ideja koja se temelji sarkazmom i drugim oblicima figurativnog jezika. Budući da je najznačajniji rad u računalnom sarkazmu detektor sarkazma: predviđanje da li je određeni dio teksta sarkastičan ili ne, detektor sarkazma stavlja fokus poslije. Počinjemo raspravu o otkrivanju sarkazma sa setima podataka, dodirujući strategije, izazove i prirodu podataka. Onda opisujemo algoritme za otkrivanje sarkazma: pravila bazirana (gdje se koristi specifični dokazi sarkazma kao pravilo), statistički klasifikator bazirani (gdje su karakteristike dizajnirane za statistički klasifikator), tehnika bazirana na temi model a i algoritmi na osnovu učenja za otkrivanje sarkazma. U slučaju svakog od ovih algoritma, odnosimo na naš rad na detekciju sarkazma i podijelimo naše učenje. Pošto su informacije izvan teksta koje trebaju biti klasifikovane, kontekstualne informacije su korisne za otkrivanje sarkazma, onda opisujemo pristupe koje koriste takve', 'fi': 'Sarkasmi on sanallisen ironian muoto, jonka tarkoituksena on ilmaista halveksuntaa tai pilkkaa. Sarkasmin laskennalliset lähestymistavat ovat herättäneet kiinnostusta NLP:n foorumeilla viimeisen vuosikymmenen aikana sarkasmin tuomien haasteiden motivoimana. Laskennallinen sarkasmi tarkoittaa automaattisia lähestymistapoja, jotka liittyvät sarkasmiin. Tutoriaali tarjoaa lintuperspektiivin tekstin laskennallisen sarkasmin tutkimuksesta keskittyen merkittäviin virstanpylväisiin. Tutoriaali alkaa sarkasmin kieliteorioista, joissa keskitytään epäjohdonmukaisuuteen: hyödyllinen käsite, joka perustuu sarkasmiin ja muihin figuratiivisen kielen muotoihin. Koska laskennallisen sarkasmin merkittävin työ on sarkasmin havaitseminen: sen ennustaminen, onko tietty teksti sarkastinen vai ei, sarkasmin havaitseminen muodostaa jatkossa painopisteen. Keskustelumme sarkasmin havaitsemisesta aloitetaan aineistoilla, joissa käsitellään strategioita, haasteita ja aineistojen luonnetta. Tämän jälkeen kuvaamme sarkasmin havaitsemiseen käytettäviä algoritmeja: sääntöpohjaisia (joissa käytetään pääsääntöisesti tiettyä sarkasmin näyttöä), tilastollisia luokittelijoita (joissa ominaisuudet on suunniteltu tilastolliselle luokittelijalle), aihemallipohjaisia tekniikoita ja syväoppimiseen perustuvia algoritmeja sarkasmin havaitsemiseen. Jokaisen algoritmin kohdalla viittaamme sarkasmin havaitsemiseen liittyvään työhömme ja jaamme opimme. Koska luokiteltavan tekstin ulkopuolella oleva tieto on hyödyllistä sarkasmin havaitsemisessa, kuvaamme lähestymistapoja, joissa käytetään tällaisia menetelmiä.', 'jv': 'Ana asar iku kelompok itompok verbal sing diranggawe biasane ngomongke isi atimu. Awakdhéwé éntuk karo perbudhakan sampeyan mrasai nggawe akeh sarkastik karo hal dadi, dadi sampeyan karo sarkasm sing nguasai perbudhakan bakal terus aléh dumadhi sing nduwé éntuk NLP sing dumadhi mrasai sing dumadhi. \'sarkasm\' komputer tutorial Tulung Mungkin Kashmir Awak dhéwé mulai perusahaan negoro-perusahaan karo dadi-sethaya, iso nggambar dadi, susahé karo perusahaan dataset UnknownMonitor vendor Dadine karo segala Algorithm iki, kita ngomong nik wektu nggawe sarkasm jatané karo iso nggawe layarané. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': "Sarkasm shine wani irin ni'izni wanda ake yi wa'azi da izgili ko yin izgili. Tanã Motsar da zanyar sarcastic text zuwa analyza hisani, hanyoyin lissafi zuwa sarcasm sun ga an ƙara riba a wa NLP jama'ar na farko. Kisarki na kamanta yana amfani da matsayin farat ɗaya da ke da sarki. Tayyar zai bãyar da idãnan tsuntsãye da idon tsuntsãye cikin sarsarkasm na lissafa wa matsayin, kuma yana fancy da ƙyamai masu muhimmi. Kilimori na fara da littafan harshen sarkasm, da fokus a kan haske: wani abu mai amfani na da wanda ke ƙara sarkasm da wasu former na'ura na fasihi. Since the most significant work in computational sarcasm is sarcasm detection: predicting whether a given piece of text is sarcastic or not, sarcasm detection forms the focus hereafter.  Muna fara mazaɓa game da zane gane sarkasm da danne-zane, masu husũma game da takwai, masu kansalar da masu danne-danne. Sa'an nan, Munã bayyana algoritm wa ganin sarcasm: a kan rubutun (a ambaci wata bayanin sarcasm za'a yi amfani da shi kamar rubutu), a kan fassarar fassarar (inda aka ƙayyade misalin tsari wa statistical), mai muhalli na madaidaici, da kuma algoritori masu baka kan karatun sarkasm. Ko dai duk daga algoritmu, Munã kammala aikinmu a kan ganin sarki kuma munã sami karatunmu. Dõmin agare bayan matsayin da za'a classify, information na guda na da amfani ga gane sarcasm, sa'an nan kuma muna bayyana hanyoyin wanda ke amfani da wannan", 'sk': 'Sarkazem je oblika verbalne ironije, ki je namenjena izražanju prezira ali posmehovanja. Razčunalniški pristopi k sarkazmu so bili motivirani zaradi izzivov sarkastičnega besedila za analizo sentimentalnih podatkov v zadnjem desetletju priča naraščajočemu zanimanju forumov NLP. Računalniški sarkazem se nanaša na avtomatske pristope, ki se nanašajo na sarkazem. Vadnica bo zagotovila ptičji pogled na raziskave računalniškega sarkazma za besedilo, pri čemer se bo osredotočila na pomembne mejnike. Vadnica se začne z jezikovnimi teorijami sarkazma, s poudarkom na neskladnosti: koristni pojmi, ki temelji sarkazmu in drugih oblikah figurativnega jezika. Ker je najpomembnejše delo v računalniškem sarkazmu odkrivanje sarkazma: napovedovanje, ali je določen del besedila sarkastičen ali ne, je odkrivanje sarkazma v nadaljevanju fokus. Razpravo o odkrivanju sarkazma začnemo z nabori podatkov, ki se dotikajo strategij, izzivov in narave naborov podatkov. Nato opisujemo algoritme za odkrivanje sarkazma: pravilno (kjer se praviloma uporablja specifičen dokaz sarkazma), statistično klasifikacijsko (kjer so funkcije zasnovane za statistični klasifikator), tematsko tehniko na osnovi modela in algoritme na osnovi globokega učenja za odkrivanje sarkazma. V primeru vsakega od teh algoritmov se sklicujemo na naše delo na odkrivanju sarkazma in delimo naše učenje. Ker so informacije zunaj besedila, ki jih je treba razvrstiti, kontekstualne informacije koristne za odkrivanje sarkazma, nato opišemo pristope, ki uporabljajo takšne', 'he': 'סרקזם הוא סוג של אירוניה מילולית שמועמדת לבטא פיגוש או מגוחך. מוטיבציה על ידי אתגרים שנוצרים ע"י טקסט סרקסטי לניתוח רגשות, גישות מחשביות לסרקזם עדו לעניין גדול בפורומים NLP בעשור האחרון. סרקזם מחשבי מתייחס לגישות אוטומטיות שקשורות לסרקזם. הלימודים יספקו מבט ציפור על המחקר בסרקזם מחשבי לטקסט, בזמן שמתמקדים באמצעים משמעותיים. הלימודים מתחילים עם תיאוריות שפתיות של סרקזם, עם מרכז על אי-תואמות: רעיון שימושי שעומד בסרקזם וצורות אחרות של שפה פיגורטיבית. מכיוון שהעבודה הכי משמעותית בסרקזם מחשבי היא גילוי סרקזם: לחזות אם חתיכה מסוימת של טקסט היא סרקסטית או לא, גילוי סרקזם יוצר את המרכז לאחר מכן. אנחנו מתחילים את הדיון שלנו על זיהוי סרקזם עם קבוצות נתונים, נוגעים באסטרטגיות, אתגרים וטבע של קבוצות נתונים. ואז, אנחנו מתארים אלגוריתמים לזיהוי סרקזם: מבוסס על חוקים (שבו הוכחה ספציפית של סרקזם משתמשת כחוק), מבוסס על מסגרת סטטיסטיקה (שבו אופיינים מעוצבים עבור מסגרת סטטיסטיקה), טכניקה מבוססת על מודל נושאי, ואלגוריתמים מבוססים על למידה עמוקה לזיהוי סרקזם. במקרה של כל אלגוריתם אלה, אנחנו מתייחסים לעבודה שלנו על זיהוי סרקזם ולחלוק את הלימודים שלנו. מכיוון שמידע מעבר לטקסט שיהיה מסווג, מידע קונטקסטי שימושי לגילוי סרקזם, אז אנחנו מתארים גישות אשר משתמשות', 'bo': 'དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་བཟོ་རྣམ་ཨིན་པས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Motivated by challenges posed by sarcastic text to sentiment analysis, computational approaches to sarcasm have witnessed a growing interest in NLP forums in the past decades. རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པ། རྩིས་གཞུང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བའི་ལས་ཟུར་ཆས་ལྟ་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་སྲིད། སྙན་རིགས་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལའང་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགོ་བཙུགས་དེ། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ནང་དུ་ཆེས་ཤུགས་མཚམས་ཆེས་ཤོག་བྱུང་བའི་ལས་ཀྱང་ཡག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཆར་བཤེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་ལ་འགོ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དང་། Then, we describe algorithms for sarcasm detection: rule-based (where a specific evidence of sarcasm is utilised as a rule), statistical classifier-based (where features are designed for a statistical classifier), a topic model-based technique, and deep learning-based algorithms for sarcasm detection. གལ་སྲིད་འདི་དག་གི་ས Algorithms་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ལས་ཀ་སྒྲུང་རྙེད་གཏོང་དང་། སྒྲུང་རྙེད་པའི་ནང དབྱེ་རིམ་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་འགྲམ་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས'}
{'en': 'Graph-based Text Representations: Boosting Text Mining, '}
{'en': 'Graphs or networks have been widely used as modeling tools in Natural Language Processing (NLP), Text Mining (TM) and Information Retrieval (IR). Traditionally, the unigram bag-of-words representation is applied; that way, a document is represented as a multiset of its terms, disregarding dependencies between the terms. Although several variants and extensions of this modeling approach have been proposed (e.g., the n-gram model), the main weakness comes from the underlying term independence assumption. The order of the terms within a document is completely disregarded and any relationship between terms is not taken into account in the final task (e.g., text categorization). Nevertheless, as the heterogeneity of text collections is increasing (especially with respect to document length and vocabulary), the research community has started exploring different document representations aiming to capture more fine-grained contexts of co-occurrence between different terms, challenging the well-established unigram bag-of-words model. To this direction, graphs constitute a well-developed model that has been adopted for text representation. The goal of this tutorial is to offer a comprehensive presentation of recent methods that rely on graph-based text representations to deal with various tasks in NLP and IR. We will describe basic as well as novel graph theoretic concepts and we will examine how they can be applied in a wide range of text-related application domains.\n\nAll the material associated to the tutorial will be available at: http://fragkiskosm.github.io/projects/graph_text_tutorial'}
{'en': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'ar': 'تسمية الدور الدلالية', 'es': 'Etiquetado semántico de roles', 'pt': 'Rotulagem de papéis semânticos', 'fr': 'Étiquetage sémantique des rôles', 'ja': 'セマンティックロールのラベル付け', 'zh': '语义角色', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग', 'ru': 'Маркировка семантической роли', 'ga': 'Lipéadú Róil Shéimeantach', 'el': 'Σημαντική επισήμανση ρόλων', 'hu': 'Szemantikus szerepkörcímkézés', 'kk': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'ka': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'it': 'Etichettatura semantica dei ruoli', 'ms': 'Label Rol Semantik', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലാബില്\u200dങ്ങ്', 'lt': 'Semantinis vaidmens ženklinimas', 'no': 'Semantisk rolletiketting', 'mk': 'Семантичко означување на улогата', 'ro': 'Etichetarea rolurilor semantice', 'mt': 'Tikkettar tar-Rwol Semantiku', 'mn': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'so': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'pl': 'Semantyczne oznaczanie roli', 'sv': 'Semantisk rollmärkning', 'sr': 'Semantièno označavanje uloge', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් භාවිතය ලේබෙලින්ග්', 'ta': 'செமான்டிக் ரோல் லாபிலிங்City name (optional, probably does not need a translation)', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی رول لیبلینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhãn Rolex Trung học', 'hr': 'Semantička označavanja uloga', 'bg': 'Етикетиране на семантични роли', 'de': 'Semantische Rollenbeschriftung', 'nl': 'Semantische rollabeling', 'da': 'Semantisk rollemærkning', 'ko': '의미 역할 표시', 'id': 'Label Rol Semantik', 'sw': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'tr': 'Orta Mazmunlar', 'fa': 'برچسب نقش\u200cهای سیمانتی', 'af': 'Semantiese roletiket', 'hy': 'Semantic Role Labeling', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক রোল লাবেলিং', 'az': 'Semantik Rol Labelini', 'sq': 'Etiketimi i Rolit Semantik', 'am': 'Arrow', 'ca': 'Etiquetar el paper Semàtic', 'bs': 'Semantička označavanja uloga', 'cs': 'Sémantické označování rolí', 'fi': 'Semanttiset roolimerkinnät', 'et': 'Semantilise rolli märgistamine', 'sk': 'Označevanje semantične vloge', 'he': 'תווית תפקיד סמנטית', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'semantic Role Labeling'}
{'en': 'This tutorial describes semantic role labelling (SRL), the task of mapping text to shallow semantic representations of eventualities and their participants. The tutorial introduces the SRL task and discusses recent research directions related to the task. The audience of this tutorial will learn about the linguistic background and motivation for semantic roles, and also about a range of computational models for this task, from early approaches to the current state-of-the-art. We will further discuss recently proposed variations to the traditional SRL task, including topics such as semantic proto-role labeling. We also cover techniques for reducing required annotation effort, such as methods exploiting unlabeled corpora (semi-supervised and unsupervised techniques), model adaptation across languages and domains, and methods for crowdsourcing semantic role annotation (e.g., question-answer driven SRL). Methods based on different machine learning paradigms, including neural networks, generative Bayesian models, graph-based algorithms and bootstrapping style techniques. Beyond sentence-level SRL, we discuss work that involves semantic roles in discourse. In particular, we cover data sets and models related to the task of identifying implicit roles and linking them to discourse antecedents. We introduce different approaches to this task from the literature, including models based on coreference resolution, centering, and selectional preferences. We also review how new insights gained through them can be useful for the traditional SRL task.', 'ar': 'يصف هذا البرنامج التعليمي تصنيف الأدوار الدلالية (SRL) ، ومهمة تعيين النص للتمثيلات الدلالية الضحلة للاحتمالات والمشاركين فيها. يقدم البرنامج التعليمي مهمة SRL ويناقش اتجاهات البحث الحديثة المتعلقة بالمهمة. سيتعرف جمهور هذا البرنامج التعليمي على الخلفية اللغوية والدوافع للأدوار الدلالية ، وكذلك حول مجموعة من النماذج الحسابية لهذه المهمة ، من المناهج المبكرة إلى أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا. سنناقش أيضًا الاختلافات المقترحة مؤخرًا لمهمة SRL التقليدية ، بما في ذلك موضوعات مثل تصنيف الأدوار الأولية الدلالية ، كما نغطي أيضًا تقنيات لتقليل جهد التعليقات التوضيحية المطلوبة ، مثل الأساليب التي تستغل التقنيات غير الخاضعة للإشراف وغير الخاضعة للإشراف ، وتكييف النموذج عبر اللغات والمجالات ، وطرق التعهيد الجماعي لتعليقات الأدوار الدلالية (على سبيل المثال ، SRL مدفوعة بأسئلة وأجوبة). الأساليب التي تعتمد على نماذج مختلفة للتعلم الآلي ، بما في ذلك الشبكات العصبية ، ونماذج بايزي التوليدية ، والخوارزميات القائمة على الرسم البياني وتقنيات أسلوب الإقلاع. بعيدًا عن مستوى الجملة ، نناقش العمل الذي يتضمن الأدوار الدلالية في الخطاب. على وجه الخصوص ، نحن نغطي مجموعات البيانات والنماذج المتعلقة بمهمة تحديد الأدوار الضمنية وربطها بأسلاف الخطاب. نقدم طرقًا مختلفة لهذه المهمة من الأدبيات ، بما في ذلك النماذج القائمة على دقة المرجع والتوسيط والتفضيلات الانتقائية. نراجع أيضًا كيف الرؤى الجديدة\nالمكتسبة من خلالهم يمكن أن تكون مفيدة لمهمة SRL التقليدية.', 'pt': 'Este tutorial descreve a rotulagem de papéis semânticos (SRL), a tarefa de mapear texto para representações semânticas superficiais de eventualidades e seus participantes. O tutorial apresenta a tarefa SRL e discute as direções de pesquisa recentes relacionadas à tarefa. O público deste tutorial aprenderá sobre a base linguística e motivação para papéis semânticos, e também sobre uma variedade de modelos computacionais para esta tarefa, desde abordagens iniciais até o estado da arte atual. Discutiremos ainda as variações propostas recentemente para a tarefa tradicional de SRL, incluindo tópicos como rotulagem semântica de proto-role. entre idiomas e domínios, e métodos para anotação de função semântica de crowdsourcing (por exemplo, SRL orientada por perguntas e respostas). Métodos baseados em diferentes paradigmas de aprendizado de máquina, incluindo redes neurais, modelos Bayesianos generativos, algoritmos baseados em grafos e técnicas de estilo bootstrap. Além do SRL em nível de sentença, discutimos o trabalho que envolve papéis semânticos no discurso. Em particular, abordamos conjuntos de dados e modelos relacionados à tarefa de identificar papéis implícitos e vinculá-los a antecedentes do discurso. Apresentamos diferentes abordagens para esta tarefa da literatura, incluindo modelos baseados em resolução de correferência, centralização e preferências de seleção. Também analisamos como novos insights\nobtidos através deles podem ser úteis para a tarefa tradicional de SRL.', 'fr': "Ce tutoriel décrit l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles (SRL), la tâche consistant à mapper du texte avec des représentations sémantiques superficielles d'éventualités et de leurs participants. Le didacticiel présente la tâche SRL et discute des orientations de recherche récentes liées à la tâche. Le public de ce tutoriel apprendra à connaître le contexte linguistique et la motivation pour les rôles sémantiques, ainsi qu'une gamme de modèles informatiques pour cette tâche, depuis les premières approches jusqu'à l'état actuel de la technologie. Nous discuterons plus en détail des variations récemment proposées par rapport à la tâche SRL traditionnelle, y compris des sujets tels que l'étiquetage sémantique des proto-rôles. Nous couvrons également les techniques permettant de réduire l'effort d'annotation requis, telles que les méthodes exploitant des corpus non étiquetés (techniques semi-supervisées et non supervisées), l'adaptation de modèles à travers les langues et les domaines, ainsi que des méthodes d'annotation sémantique des rôles de crowdsourcing (par exemple, SRL pilotée par question-réponse). Méthodes basées sur différents paradigmes d'apprentissage automatique, y compris les réseaux neuronaux, les modèles bayésiens génératifs, les algorithmes basés sur des graphes et les techniques de style bootstrapping. Au-delà du SRL au niveau de la phrase, nous discutons du travail qui implique des rôles sémantiques dans le discours. En particulier, nous couvrons les ensembles de données et les modèles liés à la tâche consistant à identifier les rôles implicites et à les relier aux antécédents du discours. Nous présentons différentes approches de cette tâche issues de la littérature, y compris des modèles basés sur la résolution de coréférence, le centrage et les préférences de sélection. Nous examinons également la façon dont les nouvelles informations\nacquis grâce à eux peuvent être utiles pour la tâche SRL traditionnelle.", 'zh': '本教程介语义角色表 (SRL),此映文本及参与者浅层语义之任也。 本教程言 SRL 务,论所关最新。 本教程读者,将知语义角色言语背景动机,及此务者一系算模形,自早至前最先进之术。 更议新SRL变体,语义原型角标签。 又言损益之术,如用未标语料库之法(半监无监),跨语和域之形,及众包语义角注之法(如问驱SRL)。 盖机器学之法,神经网络、生成贝叶斯形、图形、自举之术也。 句SRL之外,论语语义角色之事。 涵盖识隐性角色,相关数集模。 文献异术,盖共推理解析、居中、择首选项之体也。 犹回顾新意\n所以得之于古SRL甚有用也。', 'hi': 'यह ट्यूटोरियल शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) का वर्णन करता है, जो घटनाओं और उनके प्रतिभागियों के उथले शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए पाठ को मैप करने का कार्य है। ट्यूटोरियल एसआरएल कार्य का परिचय देता है और कार्य से संबंधित हाल के शोध निर्देशों पर चर्चा करता है। इस ट्यूटोरियल के दर्शकों को शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं के लिए भाषाई पृष्ठभूमि और प्रेरणा के बारे में सीखना होगा, और इस कार्य के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल की एक श्रृंखला के बारे में भी, शुरुआती दृष्टिकोण से वर्तमान राज्य के कला तक। हम पारंपरिक एसआरएल कार्य के लिए हाल ही में प्रस्तावित विविधताओं पर चर्चा करेंगे, जिसमें शब्दार्थ प्रोटो-रोल लेबलिंग जैसे विषय शामिल हैं। हम आवश्यक एनोटेशन प्रयास को कम करने के लिए तकनीकों को भी कवर करते हैं, जैसे कि बिना लेबल वाले कॉर्पोरेट (अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित और असुरक्षित तकनीकों) का शोषण करने वाले तरीके, भाषाओं और डोमेन में मॉडल अनुकूलन, और क्राउडसोर्सिंग सिमेंटिक रोल एनोटेशन के लिए तरीके (उदाहरण के लिए, प्रश्न-उत्तर संचालित एसआरएल)। तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, जननात्मक बायेसियन मॉडल, ग्राफ-आधारित एल्गोरिदम और बूटस्ट्रैपिंग शैली तकनीकों सहित विभिन्न मशीन लर्निंग प्रतिमानों पर आधारित तरीके। वाक्य-स्तर एसआरएल से परे, हम उस काम पर चर्चा करते हैं जिसमें प्रवचन में शब्दार्थ भूमिकाएं शामिल हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम अंतर्निहित भूमिकाओं की पहचान करने और उन्हें प्रवचन पूर्ववर्तियों से जोड़ने के कार्य से संबंधित डेटा सेट और मॉडल को कवर करते हैं। हम साहित्य से इस कार्य के लिए विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणपेश करते हैं, जिसमें सह-सम्मेलन संकल्प, केंद्रीकरण और चयन प्राथमिकताओं के आधार पर मॉडल शामिल हैं। हम यह भी समीक्षा करते हैं कि नई अंतर्दृष्टि कैसे\nउनके माध्यम से प्राप्त पारंपरिक SRL कार्य के लिए उपयोगी हो सकता है।', 'es': 'Este tutorial describe el etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL), la tarea de mapear el texto a representaciones semánticas superficiales de las eventualidades y sus participantes. El tutorial presenta la tarea SRL y analiza las direcciones de investigación recientes relacionadas con la tarea. La audiencia de este tutorial aprenderá sobre los antecedentes lingüísticos y la motivación para los roles semánticos, y también sobre una gama de modelos computacionales para esta tarea, desde los primeros enfoques hasta el estado actual de la técnica. Discutiremos más a fondo las variaciones propuestas recientemente para la tarea de SRL tradicional, incluidos temas como el etiquetado semántico de protoroles. También cubriremos técnicas para reducir el esfuerzo de anotación requerido, como los métodos que explotan los corpus no etiquetados (técnicas semi-supervisadas y no supervisadas), la adaptación de modelos en todos los idiomas y dominios, y métodos para la anotación semántica de roles mediante crowdsourcing (por ejemplo, SRL basada en preguntas y respuestas). Métodos basados en diferentes paradigmas de aprendizaje automático, incluidas redes neuronales, modelos bayesianos generativos, algoritmos basados en gráficos y técnicas de estilo bootstrapp.Más allá de SRL a nivel de oración, discutimos el trabajo que implica roles semánticos en el discurso. En particular, cubrimos conjuntos de datos y modelos relacionados con la tarea de identificar roles implícitos y vincularlos a los antecedentes del discurso. Presentamos diferentes enfoques para esta tarea de la literatura, incluidos modelos basados en la resolución de correferencia, el centrado y las preferencias de selección. También revisamos cómo los nuevos conocimientos\nobtenidos a través de ellos pueden ser útiles para la tarea tradicional de SRL.', 'ja': 'このチュートリアルでは、セマンティックロールラベリング（ SRL ）について説明します。これは、テキストを浅いセマンティック表現にマッピングする作業です。 チュートリアルでは、SRLタスクを紹介し、タスクに関連する最近の研究方向について説明します。 このチュートリアルの聴衆は、意味的役割の言語的背景と動機、そして初期のアプローチから現在の最先端まで、このタスクのためのさまざまな計算モデルについて学びます。 ここでは、セマンティックプロトロールラベルなどのトピックを含む、従来のSRLタスクの最近提案されたバリエーションについてさらに説明します。また、ラベル付けされていないコーラ（半監督および監督されていないテクニック）を利用する方法、言語とドメインを横断するモデル適応、セマンティックロールアノテーションをクラウドソーシングする方法（例えば、質問駆動型SRL ）など、必要なアノテーションの労力を削減するためのテクニックについても説明します。 ニューラルネットワーク、生成ベイジアンモデル、グラフベースのアルゴリズム、ブートストラップスタイル技術など、さまざまな機械学習パラダイムに基づいた方法。文レベルのSRLを超えて、私たちは話題の意味的役割に関わる仕事について議論します。 特に、暗黙の役割を特定し、それらを議論の前段階に結びつけるタスクに関連するデータセットとモデルをカバーします。 私たちは、コアリファレンスの解決、センタリング、および選択の好みに基づくモデルを含む、文献からこのタスクへの異なるアプローチを紹介します。 私たちはまた、新しい洞察をどのように\nそれらを通じて得られた情報は、従来のSRLタスクに役立ちます。', 'ru': 'Этот учебник описывает семантическое обозначение ролей (SRL), задачу сопоставления текста с неглубокими семантическими представлениями событий и их участников. Учебник знакомит с задачей SRL и обсуждает недавние направления исследований, связанные с задачей. Аудитория данного учебника узнает о лингвистическом фоне и мотивации к семантическим ролям, а также о ряде вычислительных моделей для этой задачи, от ранних подходов до современного состояния. Далее мы обсудим недавно предложенные варианты традиционной задачи SRL, включая такие темы, как семантическая проторолевая маркировка. Мы также рассмотрим методы для снижения требуемых усилий аннотации, такие как методы, использующие немеченные тела (полунадзорные и неконтролируемые методы), адаптация модели между языками и доменами, и методы для аннотации семантических ролей краудсорсинга (например, SRL, основанный на вопросах и ответах). Методы, основанные на различных парадигмах машинного обучения, включая нейронные сети, генеративные байесовские модели, алгоритмы на основе графов и методы стиля бутстреппинга. Помимо SRL на уровне предложения, мы обсуждаем работу, которая включает семантические роли в дискурсе. В частности, мы рассматриваем наборы данных и модели, связанные с задачей выявления неявных ролей и увязки их с предшествующими дискурсами. Мы представляем различные подходы к этой задаче из литературы, включая модели, основанные на разрешении ядра, центрировании и выборочных предпочтениях. Мы также рассматриваем, как новые идеи\nполученные через них, могут быть полезны для традиционной задачи SRL.', 'ga': 'Déanann an rang teagaisc seo cur síos ar lipéadú ról shéimeantach (SRL), ar an tasc chun téacs a mhapáil chun léiriú éadomhain shéimeantach a dhéanamh ar imeachtaí agus a rannpháirtithe. Tugann an rang teagaisc an tasc SRL isteach agus pléann sé treoracha taighde le déanaí a bhaineann leis an tasc. Foghlaimeoidh lucht éisteachta an teagaisc seo faoin gcúlra teangeolaíoch agus faoin inspreagadh do róil shéimeantacha, agus freisin faoi raon samhlacha ríomhaireachtúla don tasc seo, ón gcur chuige luath chuig an úrscothacht reatha. Déanfaimid tuilleadh plé a dhéanamh ar éagsúlachtaí a moladh le déanaí ar an tasc traidisiúnta SRL, lena n-áirítear topaicí mar lipéadú séimeantach prótón-róil. Clúdaíonn muid freisin teicnící chun iarracht anótála riachtanach a laghdú, mar mhodhanna a bhaineann leas as corpóra neamhlipéadaithe (teicnící leath-mhaoirsithe agus neamh-mhaoirsithe), oiriúnú samhla. trasna teangacha agus fearainn, agus modhanna chun anótáil róil shéimeantach a sluafhoinsiú (m.sh., SRL bunaithe ar cheist-freagra). Modhanna atá bunaithe ar pharaidímí meaisínfhoghlama éagsúla, lena n-áirítear líonraí néaracha, samhlacha ginideacha Bayesian, algartaim ghraf-bhunaithe agus teicnící stíle tosaithe. Clúdaímid go háirithe tacair sonraí agus samhlacha a bhaineann leis an tasc chun róil intuigthe a aithint agus iad a nascadh le réamhshainithe dioscúrsa. Tugaimid isteach cineálacha cur chuige éagsúla don tasc seo ón litríocht, lena n-áirítear samhlacha bunaithe ar réiteach croí-chomhdhála, lárú agus roghanna roghnaithe. Déanaimid athbhreithniú freisin ar conas léargais nua\nis féidir a fhaightear tríothu a bheith úsáideach don tasc SRL traidisiúnta.', 'hu': 'Ez a bemutató bemutatja a szemantikai szerepkörcímkézést (SRL), a szöveg feltérképezésének feladatát az esetlegességek és résztvevőik sekély szemantikai reprezentációjához. A bemutató bemutatja az SRL feladatát, és a feladathoz kapcsolódó legutóbbi kutatási irányokat tárgyalja. A bemutató közönsége megismerheti a szemantikai szerepek nyelvi hátterét és motivációját, valamint a feladat számos számítástechnikai modelljét, a korai megközelítésektől a jelenlegi korszerűségig. Továbbá megvitatjuk a hagyományos SRL feladat nemrégiben javasolt variációit, többek között olyan témákat, mint a szemantikus proto-szerep címkézés. A szükséges jegyzetelési erőfeszítések csökkentésére szolgáló technikákat is kiterjesztjük, mint például a címke nélküli korpuszok kihasználásának módszerei (félig felügyelt és felügyelet nélküli technikák), a nyelvek és tartományok közötti modelladaptáció, valamint a közösségi szempontú jegyzetelési módszerei (pl. kérdés-válasz vezérelt SRL). Különböző gépi tanulási paradigmákon alapuló módszerek, beleértve az ideghálózatokat, a generációs bayesiai modelleket, a gráf alapú algoritmusokat és a bootstraping stílusú technikákat. A mondatszintű SRL-n kívül olyan munkát vitatunk meg, amelyek szemantikai szerepet játszanak a diskurzusban. Különösen az implicit szerepek azonosítására és a diskurzus előzményeihez kapcsolódó adatkészletekre és modellekre vonatkozóan foglalkozunk. Ennek a feladatnak a szakirodalomból különböző megközelítéseket mutatunk be, beleértve a coreferencia felbontásán, központosításon és szelekciós preferenciákon alapuló modelleket. Azt is áttekintjük, hogy az új betekintések miként\nA hagyományos SRL feladat elvégzéséhez hasznos lehet.', 'it': "Questo tutorial descrive l'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli (SRL), il compito di mappare il testo a rappresentazioni semantiche superficiali delle eventualità e dei loro partecipanti. Il tutorial introduce il compito di SRL e discute le recenti indicazioni di ricerca relative al compito. Il pubblico di questo tutorial imparerà a conoscere il background linguistico e la motivazione dei ruoli semantici, e anche una serie di modelli computazionali per questo compito, dai primi approcci allo stato dell'arte attuale. Discuteremo inoltre le variazioni proposte di recente al compito tradizionale di SRL, includendo argomenti come l'etichettatura semantica proto-role. Ci occupiamo anche di tecniche per ridurre lo sforzo di annotazione richiesto, come metodi che sfruttano corpi non etichettati (tecniche semi-supervisionate e non supervisionate), adattamento dei modelli attraverso linguaggi e domini, e metodi per annotazione semantica di ruoli di crowdsourcing (ad esempio, question-answer driven SRL). Metodi basati su diversi paradigmi di machine learning, tra cui reti neurali, modelli bayesiani generativi, algoritmi basati su grafici e tecniche di bootstrapping style. Al di là della frase-level SRL, discutiamo di lavori che coinvolgono ruoli semantici nel discorso. In particolare, ci occupiamo di set di dati e modelli relativi al compito di identificare ruoli impliciti e collegarli agli antecedenti del discorso. Introduciamo diversi approcci a questo compito dalla letteratura, inclusi modelli basati sulla risoluzione della coreferenza, centraggio e preferenze selettive. Esaminiamo anche come nuove intuizioni\nI risultati ottenuti attraverso di essi possono essere utili per il tradizionale compito di SRL.", 'mk': 'Овој наставник опишува семантичко означување на улогата (СРЛ), задача за мапирање на текстот на плошки семантички претставувања на eventualities и нивните учесници. Научникот ја претставува задачата на СРЛ и дискутира за неодамнешните насоки за истражување поврзани со задачата. Публиката на овој наставник ќе научи за лингвистичката позадина и мотивацијата за семантичките улоги, како и за голем број компјутерски модели за оваа задача, од раните пристапи до сегашната техничка состојба. Ќе разговараме понатаму за неодамна предложените варијации во традиционалната SRL задача, вклучувајќи ги и темите како што е семантичното означување на прото-улогата. We also cover techniques for reducing required annotation effort, such as methods exploiting unlabeled corpora (semi-supervised and unsupervised techniques), model adaptation across languages and domains, and methods for crowdsourcing semantic role annotation (e.g., question-answer driven SRL).  Методите базирани на различни парадигми на машинско учење, вклучувајќи ги и нервните мрежи, генералните бајезиски модели, графички алгоритми и техники на стил на врзување чизми. Покрај речениците СРЛ, разговараме за работата која вклучува семантични улоги во дискурсот. Посебно, ги покриваме податоците и моделите поврзани со задачата да се идентификуваат имплицитни улоги и да се поврзуваат со дискурсните претходи. Ние воведуваме различни пристапи кон оваа задача од литературата, вклучително и модели базирани на резолуцијата на соодветноста, централизацијата и селективните преференции. We also review how new insights\ngained through them can be useful for the traditional SRL task.', 'lt': 'This tutorial describes semantic role labelling (SRL), the task of mapping text to shallow semantic representations of eventualities and their participants.  Mokykloje pristatoma SRL užduotis ir aptariamos naujausios su užduotimi susijusios mokslinių tyrimų gairės. Šio mokymo auditorija sužinos apie semantinių vaidmenų kalbinę aplinkybę ir motyvaciją, taip pat apie įvairius šios užduoties skaičiavimo modelius, pradedant ankstyvuoju požiūriu iki dabartinės pažangos. Toliau aptarsime neseniai pasiūlytus tradicinio SRL uždavinio pakeitimus, įskaitant tokias temas kaip semantinis proto vaidmens ženklinimas. Taip pat apimame metodus, kuriais mažinamos reikalingos anotacijos pastangos, pvz., metodus, kuriais naudojamas nenustatytas korporas (pusiau prižiūrimas ir nenustatytas metodas), modelių pritaikymą kalboms ir sritims ir metodus, kuriais naudojamas semantinio vaidmens anotacija (pvz., klausimų atsakymu pagrįstas SRL). Metodai, pagrįsti skirtingais mašinų mokymosi paradigmais, įskaitant nervinius tinklus, generuojančius Bayezijos modelius, grafiniais algoritmais ir bootstrapping stiliaus metodus. Be sakinių lygio SRL, diskutuojame apie darbą, kuriame dalyvauja semantiniai vaidmenys diskutuojant. Visų pirma kalbame apie duomenų rinkinius ir modelius, susijusius su užduotimi nustatyti netiesioginius vaidmenis ir juos susieti su diskursiniais precedentais. Mes įvedame skirtingus požiūrius į šią užduotį nei literatūrą, įskaitant modelius, pagrįstus koreferencijos rezoliucija, centravimu ir atrankinėmis preferencijomis. Mes taip pat peržiūrime, kaip naujos supratimos\nper juos įgyta veikla gali būti naudinga tradiciniam SRL uždaviniui atlikti.', 'ka': 'ეს ტექსტის შესაბამისი სიმენტიკური პროლის მარტიკაცია (SRL), ტექსტის მარტიკაციის დასაბამისი სიმენტიკური გამოსახულებების და მათი დაშვებელების დასაბამისთვის. სტუტორიალური დასაწყება SRL დავალება და განსაკუთრებს ახალი სწავლობის მიღებები, რომლებიც დავალებით. ამ კომპუტურაციის აუდიტორია იგივე ვისწავლოთ ენგურისტიკური ფონის და მოტივაციის შესახებ სიმენტიკური პროლეების, და ასევე კომპუტურაციული მოდელეების შესახებ ამ დავალებისთვის, საწყისგან მიმდინარე ჩვენ შემდეგ გავუდგინოთ განსაზღვრებები სატრაციონალური SRL დავალებისთვის, включая რამე ტემები, როგორც სმენტიკური პროტოპროლური მართლა. ჩვენ ასევე აკეთებთ ტექნოგიები, რომლებიც გამოიყენება საჭირო ნიოტაციის ძალადობას, როგორც მეტებები, რომლებიც გამოიყენება უცნობილი კოპორაციას (ნახევად დანარჩენა და უცნობილი ტექნოგიები), მოდელური ადატაცია ენები და მეტედიები განსხვავებული მაქინის სწავლების პარადიგმებზე ბაზიან, ანუ ნეიროლური ქსელები, განვითარებული ბაეზიანური მოდელები, გრაფიკური ალგორიტიმები და სტილის ტექნონიები SRL სიტყვების ნაწილის გარეშე, ჩვენ განსაკუთრებით სამუშაო, რომელიც სიმენტიკური პროლეები განსაკუთრებში. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ მონაცემები და მოდელები, რომლებიც განსაკუთრებული პროლების განსაკუთრება და დავკავშირება ანტერეცენტებით. ჩვენ განსხვავებული დახმარება ამ დავალებისთვის ლიტებერიდან, რომლებიც მოდელები, რომლებიც შესაბამისი რეზიციო, ცენტრირება და მონიშნული პროფილებებიდან ბაზიან. ჩვენ შევხედავთ თუ როგორ ახალი შესახებ\nშეიძლება იყოს ტრადიციონალური SRL დავალებისთვის.', 'el': 'Αυτό το σεμινάριο περιγράφει τη σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (το έργο της χαρτογράφησης κειμένου σε ρηχές σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις των ενδεχόμενων και των συμμετεχόντων τους. Το σεμινάριο εισάγει την εργασία και συζητά τις πρόσφατες κατευθύνσεις έρευνας που σχετίζονται με την εργασία. Το κοινό αυτού του μαθήματος θα μάθει για το γλωσσικό υπόβαθρο και τα κίνητρα για σημασιολογικούς ρόλους, καθώς και για μια σειρά υπολογιστικών μοντέλων για αυτό το έργο, από τις πρώτες προσεγγίσεις μέχρι την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Θα συζητήσουμε περαιτέρω τις πρόσφατες προτεινόμενες παραλλαγές του παραδοσιακού έργου, συμπεριλαμβανομένων θεμάτων όπως η σημασιολογική σήμανση πρωτορόλων. Καλύπτουμε επίσης τεχνικές για τη μείωση της απαιτούμενης προσπάθειας σχολιασμού, όπως μέθοδοι εκμετάλλευσης μη επισημασμένων σωμάτων (τεχνικές ημι-εποπτευμένες και χωρίς επίβλεψη), προσαρμογή μοντέλων σε γλώσσες και τομείς, και μέθοδοι για τη σημασιολογική σχολιασμός ρόλων (π.χ. ερώτηση-απάντηση καθοδηγούμενη). Μέθοδοι βασισμένες σε διαφορετικά παραδείγματα μηχανικής μάθησης, συμπεριλαμβανομένων νευρωνικών δικτύων, γενετήσιων Bayesian μοντέλων, αλγορίθμων βασισμένων σε γραφήματα και τεχνικών στυλ bootstrapping. Πέρα από το επίπεδο προτάσεων, συζητάμε εργασία που περιλαμβάνει σημασιολογικούς ρόλους στον λόγο. Ειδικότερα, καλύπτουμε σύνολα δεδομένων και μοντέλα που σχετίζονται με το καθήκον του εντοπισμού σιωπηρών ρόλων και της σύνδεσης τους με προηγούμενες συζητήσεις. Εισάγουμε διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις σε αυτό το έργο από τη βιβλιογραφία, συμπεριλαμβανομένων μοντέλων που βασίζονται στην ανάλυση της συνάφειας, το κέντρο και τις επιλεκτικές προτιμήσεις. Εξετάζουμε επίσης τον τρόπο με τον οποίο οι νέες γνώσεις\nπου αποκτώνται μέσω αυτών μπορεί να είναι χρήσιμο για το παραδοσιακό έργο SRL.', 'kk': 'Бұл оқытушылық семантикалық рөл белгісін (SRL) анықтайды, мәтінді картаптау тапсырмасы болып, олардың қатысушыларының семантикалық көрсеткіліктерін жалғастырады. Оқушылық SRL тапсырмасын таңдап, тапсырманың жаңа зерттеу бағыттарын талқылады. Бұл оқушылардың аудиториясы семантикалық рольдер үшін лингвистикалық аясы мен мотивациясы және осы тапсырманың бірнеше компьютерлік моделдері туралы біледі. Біз соңғы тапсырманың әдетті SRL тапсырмасының түрлендіріліктерін, семантикалық протороль жарлығы секілді тапсырмаларды жазып тұрамыз. Мұндай-ақ біз қажетті жазбалардың күшін керек жазбалардың әсерін азайту техникаларын, мысалы, корпораға қолданбаған әдістерді (жарты бақылау және бақыламаған техникалар), тілдерді және домендердің түрлі модель адаптациялауын, және семантикалық рольдің Басқа машиналық оқыту парадигдеріне негізделген әдістер, невралды желілер, бейез үлгілері, графикалық алгоритмдер мен жүктеу стилінің техникалары. Сөздердің SRL деңгейінен басқа, бұл жұмыс сөздердің семантикалық рольдері деңгейінде тұрады. Мысалы, біз деректер жиындарын және үлгілерді тапсырмасын анықтау және оларды антиседенттерге байланыстыру тапсырмасына сәйкес келеді. Біз бұл тапсырманың әдебиеттерінен әртүрлі арқылы, мәселелерді айырмашылық, орталық және таңдау параметрлеріне негізделген үлгілерді таңдаймыз. Сонымен қатар жаңа түсініктер\nоларды көмектесу үшін әдетті SRL тапсырмасына пайдалы болуы мүмкін.', 'ms': 'Tutorial ini menggambarkan label peranan semantik (SRL), tugas petakan teks ke perwakilan semantik rendah bagi kemungkinan dan peserta mereka. Tutorial memperkenalkan tugas SRL dan membincangkan arah kajian baru-baru ini berkaitan dengan tugas. Penonton tutorial ini akan belajar mengenai latar belakang bahasa dan motivasi untuk peranan semantik, dan juga mengenai julat model komputasi untuk tugas ini, dari pendekatan awal ke keadaan semasa. Kami akan membincangkan lebih lanjut variasi yang diusulkan baru-baru ini untuk tugas SRL tradisional, termasuk topik seperti label proto-peranan semantik. Kami juga menutupi teknik untuk mengurangi usaha anotasi yang diperlukan, seperti kaedah mengeksploitasi corpora tidak berlebihan (teknik semi-mengawasi dan tidak mengawasi), penyesuaian model melalui bahasa dan domain, dan kaedah untuk crowdsourcing anotasi peranan semantik (cth., SRL dipandu soalan-jawapan). Kaedah berdasarkan paradigma pembelajaran mesin yang berbeza, termasuk rangkaian saraf, model Bayesian generatif, algoritma berdasarkan graf dan teknik gaya bootstrapping. Selain tahap kalimat SRL, kita membincangkan kerja yang melibatkan peranan semantik dalam percakapan. Secara khususnya, kami menutupi set data dan model yang berkaitan dengan tugas mengenalpasti peranan implicit dan menghubungkannya dengan latar belakang diskors. We introduce different approaches to this task from the literature, including models based on coreference resolution, centering, and selectional preferences.  Kami juga menyaksikan bagaimana pandangan baru\nyang dicapai melalui mereka boleh berguna untuk tugas SRL tradisional.', 'ml': 'ഈ ട്യൂട്ടറിയല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബെലിങ്ങിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു, മാപ്പിങ്ങ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലി അവസാനത്തി എസ്ആര്\u200dഎല്\u200d ജോലിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുകയും ജോലിയുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട നിരീക്ഷണങ്ങളെ സംസാരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യും. ഈ വിദ്യാഭാഷ പശ്ചാത്തലത്തെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള ഭാഷ പശ്ചാത്തലത്തെക്കുറിച്ചും പ്രചോദനത്തെക്കുറിച്ചും ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഒരുപാട് കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൂ പാരമ്പര്യമായ SRL ജോലിക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് നമുക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാം, സെമാന്റിക് പ്രോട്ടോ റോള്\u200d ലേ ആവശ്യമുള്ള ശ്രമങ്ങള്\u200d കുറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യാത്ത കോര്\u200dപ്പോര (സെമി-സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d, ഭാഷ Methods based on different machine learning paradigms, including neural networks, generative Bayesian models, graph-based algorithms and bootstrapping style techniques. സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്ന ജോലി നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളും മോഡലുകളും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അപരിചിതമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ ജോലിയു സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ ജോലിയിലേക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസല്\u200dമെ പുതിയ കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണെന്നും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നോക്കിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.\nഅവയിലൂടെ കിട്ടിയത് പാരമ്പര്യമായ SRL ജോലിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും.', 'mt': 'Dan it-tutorjal jiddeskrivi t-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku (SRL), il-kompitu li jiġi mmappjat it-test għal rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi baxxi tal-eventwalitajiet u l-parteċipanti tagħhom. It-tutorjal jintroduċi l-kompitu tal-SRL u jiddiskuti d-direzzjonijiet riċenti tar-riċerka relatati mal-kompitu. The audience of this tutorial will learn about the linguistic background and motivation for semantic roles, and also about a range of computational models for this task, from early approaches to the current state-of-the-art.  Ser niddiskutu aktar il-varjazzjonijiet proposti reċentement għall-kompitu tradizzjonali tal-SRL, inklużi suġġetti bħat-tikkettar semantiku tal-proto-role. Aħna nkopru wkoll tekniki g ħat-tnaqqis tal-isforz meħtieġ ta’ annotazzjoni, bħal metodi li jisfruttaw korpra mhux immarkata (tekniki semi-superviżi u mhux superviżi), adattament tal-mudell fil-lingwi u d-dominji kollha, u metodi għall-crowdsourcing annotazzjoni tar-rwol semantiku (e ż., SRL xprunata minn mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet). Metodi bbażati fuq paradigmi differenti ta’ tagħlim bil-magni, inklużi netwerks newrali, mudelli Bayesiani ġenerattivi, algoritmi bbażati fuq grafika u tekniki ta’ stil ta’ bootstrapping. Lil hinn mil-livell tas-sentenza SRL, niddiskutu xogħol li jinvolvi rwoli semantiċi fid-diskors. B’mod partikolari, aħna nkopru settijiet ta’ dejta u mudelli relatati mal-kompitu li jiġu identifikati rwoli impliċiti u li jingħaqdu ma’ preċedenti ta’ diskors. Aħna nintroduċu approċċi differenti għal dan il-kompitu mil-letteratura, inklużi mudelli bbażati fuq riżoluzzjoni tal-koreferenza, ċentralizzazzjoni, u preferenzi selettivi. Aħna nirrevedu wkoll kif l-għarfien ġdid\nli jinkisbu permezz tagħhom jistgħu jkunu utli għall-kompitu tradizzjonali tal-SRL.', 'mn': 'Энэ сургалтын загвар нь semantic role labelling (SRL) болон тэдний оролцогчдын төгсгөлийн төлөөлөлт болон төгсгөлчдийн төлөөлөөлөө газрын зураг зураг хийх үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарладаг. Сургууль нь СРЛ-ын ажлыг танилцуулж, саяхан судалгааны замаар ажилтай холбоотой талаар ярилцдаг. Энэ сургалтын сонсогчид хэл хэлний хөгжлийн талаар суралцах болно. Эртний ойлголтын тухай одоогийн урлагийн байдал руу шилжих болно. Бид саяхан урт хугацааны SRL даалгаврын өөрчлөлтийг ярилцах болно. Мөн бид шаардлагатай анзаарлын хичээл багасгах технологийг ашигладаг. Жишээ нь корпора бус байгууллагуудыг ашиглаж буй аргыг ашигладаг. Машин суралцах парадигм, мэдрэлийн сүлжээг, биезийн загвар, график суурилсан алгоритм болон буутгах хэлбэрийн техникуудын тулд суурилсан арга. СРЛ хэмжээний дараа бид ярианд семантик дүр зурагтай ажлыг ярилцаж байна. Ялангуяа бид өгөгдлийн сангууд болон загваруудыг тодорхойлох шаардлагатай үйл ажилтай холбогдож, тэднийг анхны талаар ярьж өгдөг. Бид энэ үйл ажилд уран зохиолын өөр арга барилгуудыг тайлбарлаж, зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэлт, төв, сонголтын сонголтуудын үндсэн загваруудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бид хэрхэн шинэ ойлголтыг\nуламжлалтай SRL ажилд ашигтай болно.', 'no': 'Denne opplæringa skildrar semantisk rolletiketting (SRL), oppgåva til å kartera tekst til å slå semantiske representasjonar av eventuelt og deltakarane sine. Opplæringa introduserer SRL-oppgåva og diskuterer nyleg forskningsretningar relaterte til oppgåva. Publikatoren av denne opplæringa vil lære om den linguistiske bakgrunnen og motivasjonen for semantiske roller, og også om eit rekkjefølgje datamaskiner for denne oppgåva, frå tidlegare tilnærmingar til den gjeldande kunsttilstanden. Vi vil diskutera nyleg foreslått variasjonar til den tradisjonelle SRL-oppgåva, inkludert emne som semantiske protoroletiketting. Vi dekker også teknikk for å redusera nødvendige annotasjonsverktøy, slik som metodar som ekspluaterer ulike korpora (semioversikte og ikkje-oppretta teknikk), modelleadaptasjon over språk og domene, og metodar for å gjere fleksisering av semantiske rolannotasjon (f.eks. spørsmål-svar drivt SRL). Metodar basert på ulike maskinelæringsparadigmar, inkludert neiralnettverk, genererte Bayesianske modeller, grafikkbaserte algoritme og oppstartstilteknikk. Etter setningsnivå SRL diskuterer vi arbeidet som involverer semantiske roller i diskursar. I særskilt dekker vi datasett og modeller som er relatert til oppgåva for å identifisera implisitte roller og kopla dei til diskurs av antecedenter. Vi introduserer ulike tilnærmingar til denne oppgåva frå litteratur, inkluderer modeller basert på oppløysing av koreferanse, sentrering og utval av innstillingar. Vi gjer også gjennomsikt korleis nye innsyningar\ngjennom dei kan vera nyttig for den tradisjonelle SRL-oppgåva.', 'pl': 'Ten poradnik opisuje semantyczne oznaczanie roli (SRL), zadanie mapowania tekstu do płytkich semantycznych reprezentacji ewentualności i ich uczestników. Poradnik wprowadza zadanie SRL i omówi najnowsze kierunki badań związane z tym zadaniem. Odbiorcy tego poradnika poznają tło językowe i motywację do ról semantycznych, a także szereg modeli obliczeniowych do tego zadania, od wczesnych podejść do aktualnego stanu sztuki. Będziemy dalej omówić ostatnio proponowane warianty tradycyjnego zadania SRL, w tym takie tematy jak semantyczne proto-role etykietowanie. Obejmujemy również techniki zmniejszenia wymaganego nakładu adnotacyjnego, takie jak metody wykorzystujące nieoznakowane korpusy (techniki pół-nadzorowane i nienadzorowane), adaptacja modeli między językami i domenami oraz metody crowdsourcingu semantycznej adnotacji roli (np. SRL oparte na pytaniach i odpowiedziach). Metody oparte na różnych paradygmatach uczenia maszynowego, w tym sieciach neuronowych, generatywnych modelach Bayesowskich, algorytmach opartych na wykresie i technik bootstrappingu. Poza SRL na poziomie zdań omawiamy pracę, która obejmuje role semantyczne w dyskursie. W szczególności obejmujemy zbiory danych i modele związane z zadaniem identyfikacji ról ukrytych i powiązania ich z poprzednimi dyskursami. Wprowadzamy różne podejścia do tego zadania z literatury, w tym modele oparte na rozdzielczości współreferencyjnej, centrowaniu i preferencjach selekcyjnych. Przeglądamy również, jak nowe spostrzeżenia\nUzyskane dzięki nim mogą być przydatne do tradycyjnego zadania SRL.', 'so': "Waxbarashadan waxaa lagu qoraa qayb semantic ah (SRL), shaqo ku saabsan kartooyinka qoraalka si uu ugu dambaysta u dhigo semantic representations iyo wadajirkooda. Waxbarashadu wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa shaqada SRL, wuxuuna ka sheekeystaa hagitaanka waxbarashada ee ugu dambeeyay ee la xiriira shaqada. Dhaqaalaha waxbarashadan waxay baran doonaan warqada afka iyo dhaqdhaqaaqa qaybaha semantika, iyo sidoo kale qaabab kala duduwan oo xisaabta ah, marka ugu horeysa aad u soo dhowaato xaaladda farshaxanka. We will further discuss recently proposed variations to the traditional SRL task, including topics such as semantic proto-role labeling. Sidoo kale waxaynu daboolaynaa qalabka hoos u dhigidda qalabka sharafta loo baahan yahay, sida qaababka lagu isticmaalayo shirkadaha aan la aqoon karin (sawirada semi-ilaaliyey iyo sawirida), isbedelka muuqashada luuqadaha iyo deegaanka, iyo qaababka ku saabsan qayb-qayb-taranka (tusaale ahaan SRL-ka-jawaabta su'aalaha). Isku saleysan qaababka barashada machine oo kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan shabakada neurada, tusaalaha dhaqaalaha Bayesian, algorithm-ku-qoran karta iyo qaababka boosaska. SRL-ka sokow waxaan ka sheekeysanaynaa shaqada ku saabsan qaybaha semantika. Si gaar ah, waxaan daboolaynaa koobabka macluumaadka iyo tusaalooyin la xiriira shaqada aqoonsashada qaybaha aan waxyaabaha laheyn, waxaana ku xiriirnaa dhakhtarka sheekeysiga. Shaqadan waxaan ka soo bandhignaa qaabab kala duduwan oo ku saabsan qoraalka, tusaalayaal ku saleysan qoraalka kaarka, barta iyo doorashooyinka. Waxaynu ka fiirinnaa sidoo kale aragtida cusub\nwaxa uu ku helay ay faa’iido u noqon karaan shaqada caadiga ah ee SRL.", 'ro': 'Acest tutorial descrie etichetarea rolurilor semantice (SRL), sarcina de a cartografia textul la reprezentări semantice superficiale ale eventualităților și participanților acestora. Tutorialul prezintă sarcina SRL și discută direcțiile recente de cercetare legate de sarcină. Publicul acestui tutorial va învăța despre fundalul lingvistic și motivația rolurilor semantice, precum și despre o serie de modele computaționale pentru această sarcină, de la abordările timpurii până la stadiul actual al tehnicii. Vom discuta în continuare variațiile propuse recent la sarcina tradițională SRL, inclusiv subiecte precum etichetarea semantică a protorolurilor. Acoperim, de asemenea, tehnici pentru reducerea efortului necesar de adnotare, cum ar fi metode de exploatare a corporelor fără etichete (tehnici semi-supravegheate și nesupravegheate), adaptarea modelului în limbi și domenii și metode de adnotare semantică a rolurilor de crowdsourcing (de exemplu, SRL bazată pe întrebări-răspunsuri). Metode bazate pe diferite paradigme de învățare automată, inclusiv rețele neuronale, modele generative bayesiane, algoritmi bazați pe grafice și tehnici de stil bootstrapping. Dincolo de frază-level SRL, discutăm lucrări care implică roluri semantice în discurs. În special, acoperim seturi de date și modele legate de sarcina de a identifica rolurile implicite și de a le lega la antecedentele discursului. Introducem abordări diferite la această sarcină din literatură, inclusiv modele bazate pe rezoluția corefenței, centrarea și preferințele selecționale. De asemenea, analizăm modul în care noi perspective\nobținute prin acestea pot fi utile pentru sarcina tradițională SRL.', 'sr': 'Ovaj nastavnik opisuje semantičku označavanje uloge (SRL), zadatak mapiranja teksta plitkim semantičkim predstavljanjima eventualnih događaja i njihovih sudionika. Tutorija predstavlja zadatak SRL-a i razgovara o nedavnim uputama istraživanja vezanim za zadatak. Publika ovog nastavnika će naučiti o jezičkoj pozadini i motivaciji semantičkih uloga, kao i o nizu računalnih modela za ovaj zadatak, od ranih pristupa trenutnom stanju umjetnosti. Dalje ćemo razgovarati o nedavno predloženim varijacijama tradicionalnog zadatka SRL-a, uključujući teme poput semantičke etikete protorola. Takođe pokrivamo tehnike za smanjenje potrebnih napora za annotaciju, kao što su metode iskorištavanja nepoznate korpore (polu-nadzorne i nepotrebne tehnike), adaptacije modela na jezicima i domenama i metode za reklamu semantičke uloge (npr. odgovor na pitanje upravljajući SRL). Metode zasnovane na različitim paradigmima učenja mašina, uključujući neuralne mreže, generativne Bejzijske modele, algoritme bazirane na grafiku i tehnike stila čišćenja. Izvan razine rečenica SRL, razgovaramo o radu koji uključuje semantičke uloge u diskusiju. Posebno, pokrivamo sete podataka i modele povezane sa zadatkom identifikacije implicitnih uloga i povezivanja ih sa diskurskim predsednicima. Predstavljamo različite pristupe ovom zadatku iz književnosti, uključujući modele na osnovu rezolucije, centriranja i selektivnih preferencija. Takoðe pregledamo kako nove uvide\nkoji su dobili kroz njih mogu biti korisni za tradicionalni zadatak SRL-a.', 'si': 'මේ ප්\u200dරධානය විස්තර කරන්නේ සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලෙබෙල්ලීග් (SRL), පාළුවක් සිමාන්තික ප්\u200dරධානයක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අං අධ්\u200dයාපතිය SRL වැඩ සඳහා අලුත් පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dරියාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. මේ ප්\u200dරධානයේ ප්\u200dරධානකයේ භාෂාවික පැත්තක් සහ සැමැන්තික ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා මේ වැඩ සඳහා පරීක්ෂණාවික ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා පරීක් අපි අලුත් වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය SRL වැඩේ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර අපි අවශ්\u200dය අනතුරු උත්සාහ කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේම අනතුරු කොපෝරාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේ වෙනස් යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙන ගන්න පැරැදිග්ම් වල අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාවය, න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය, බේසියාන් මොඩේල්, ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත ඇල SRL වචන ස්ථානයෙන් පස්සේ, අපි කතා කරනවා වැඩේ සමාන්තික පාලනය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි දත්ත සෙට් සහ මොඩේල් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරිශ්නය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඒවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා  අපි මේ විවිදියට වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, ප්\u200dරවේශ විශේෂණය, මධ්\u200dයස්ථානය, හා තෝරණ අභ්\u200dයා අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොච්චර අලුත් අදහසක්\nඔවුන්ට පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය SRL වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'Denna handledning beskriver semantisk rollmärkning (SRL), uppgiften att kartlägga text till ytliga semantiska representationer av eventualiteter och deras deltagare. Handledningen introducerar SRL-uppgiften och diskuterar de senaste forskningsriktningarna relaterade till uppgiften. Publiken i denna handledning kommer att lära sig om den språkliga bakgrunden och motivationen för semantiska roller, och även om en rad beräkningsmodeller för denna uppgift, från tidiga tillvägagångssätt till nuvarande state-of-the-art. Vi kommer vidare att diskutera nyligen föreslagna variationer av den traditionella SRL-uppgiften, inklusive ämnen som semantisk protorollmärkning. Vi täcker också tekniker för att minska erforderlig annotation ansträngning, såsom metoder som utnyttjar obemärkta corpora (halvövervakade och obevakade tekniker), modellanpassning över språk och domäner, och metoder för crowdsourcing semantisk rollannotation (t.ex. fråge-svar driven SRL). Metoder baserade på olika maskininlärningsparadigmer, inklusive neurala nätverk, generativa bayesianska modeller, grafbaserade algoritmer och bootstrapping stil tekniker. Utöver meningsnivå SRL diskuterar vi arbete som involverar semantiska roller i diskursen. I synnerhet täcker vi datauppsättningar och modeller relaterade till uppgiften att identifiera implicita roller och koppla dem till diskursföreteelser. Vi introducerar olika tillvägagångssätt för denna uppgift från litteraturen, inklusive modeller baserade på coreferencelolution, centrering och selektiva preferenser. Vi går även igenom hur nya insikter\nerhållna genom dem kan vara användbara för den traditionella SRL-uppgiften.', 'ta': 'முடிவுகள் மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய பங்குக்குறிப்பாளர்களுக்கு மிகவும் குறைந்த அரைத்தமான பங்குறியீடு (SRL) வரைப்படத்தின் செயல் பொருள் SRL பணியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது மற்றும் பணியுடன் சமீபத்திய ஆய்வு தேர்வுகளை விவாதம் செய்கிறது. இந்த பொருளின் பார்வையாளர் பார்வையாளர்கள் தற்போதைய நிலையில் இருந்து தற்போதைய நிலையில் இருந்து வரும் மாதிரியை பற்றி மொழி பின்னணி மற்றும் ஊக்கத நாம் சமீபத்தில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாறுபாடுகளை பாரம்பரிய SRL செயலுக்கு மாறுபாடுகளை மேலும் விவாதம் செய்வோம், பெம்மா நாம் தேவையான அறிவிப்பு முயற்சியை குறைக்க தொழில்நுட்பத்தையும் மற்றும் முறைகளையும் மறைக்கிறோம், குறிப்பிடாத நிறுவனத்தைப் போன்ற முறைகளைப் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படும் (பாதி கண்க பாதுகாப்பு வலைப்பின்னல்கள், பொதுவான பேயிசியன் மாதிரிகள், வரைகலைப்படையில் அடிப்படையான முறைமைகள் மற்றும் தொடக்கு பாணிகள் துவக்கும வாக்கு-மட்டத்திற்கு முன்னால், நாம் பேச்சில் அரைப்பு பங்குகளை பற்றி வேலை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம். குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் மாதிரிகளை மறைக்கிறோம் பொருள் தேவையான பங்களை அறிய மற்றும் பேச்சு பொர We introduce different approaches to this task from the literature, including models based on coreference resolution, centering, and selectional preferences.  நாம் புதிய குறிப்புகளை எப்படி பார்க்கவும்\nஅவர்கள் பெற்றுக் கொண்டார்கள் பாரம்பரிய SRL பணிக்கு பயனுள்ளதாக இருக்க முடியும்.', 'ur': 'This tutorial describes semantic role labelling (SRL), the task of mapping text to shallow semantic representations of events and their participants. تحصیلات نے SRL کے کام کو معلوم کرتا ہے اور اچھی تحصیلات کی طریقے سے مشورہ کرتا ہے۔ اس تدریس کی سنانے والے زبان کی پچھلی اور سیمانٹی رول کے بارے میں سیکھیں گے اور اس کام کے لئے کمپیوٹریسی موڈل کے بارے میں بھی ایک طرح کے بارے میں بھی، آگے سے پہلے پہنچنے سے موجود هنر کی حالت تک۔ ہم اچھی طرح پیشنهاد کی مختلف باتیں کریں گے جو سنتی SRL کے کام میں ہیں، جیسے سیمنٹی پروٹو رول لیبلینگ کے شامل ہیں. ہم نے نیازی اظهار کی کوشش کم کرنے کے لئے بھی تکنیک کاٹ کر رکھے ہیں، جیسے روش غیر قابل تحقیق کی اور غیر قابل تحقیق کی تکنیک استعمال کرنے کے لئے، زبانوں اور دامنوں میں موڈل اضافہ کرنے کے لئے، اور سیمانٹی رول اظهار کرنے کے لئے طریقے (جیسے سوال کی جواب دی SRL) کے لئے۔ طریقے مختلف ماشین کی تعلیم پارادیگ پر بنیاد ہیں، نیورال نیٹورک کے شامل، جنرائیٹ بیزین ماڈل، گراف بنیاد الگوریتم اور بوٹ سٹرپ استیل ٹیکنیک کے ساتھ۔ مجلس سطح SRL کے علاوہ ہم کام میں بحث کرتے ہیں جو صحبت میں سیمنٹی رول شامل ہوتی ہے۔ مخصوصاً ہم ڈیٹ سٹ اور نمونڈل کو پورا کرتے ہیں جو مشکل رول کو پہچان کریں اور ان کو پیشوائندوں کے ساتھ متصل کریں۔ ہم اس کام سے مختلف طریقے معلوم کرتے ہیں، مدلکوں کے ذریعہ، مرکز اور انتخابات ترجیح پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. ہم نے بھی دیکھا کہ کس طرح نئی نظریں\nان کے ذریعہ سے حاصل کیا گیا ہے اسے رسمی SRL کے کام کے لئے فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Trong tập đoàn này được mô tả mô tả các mô tả về vai trò theo ngữ nghĩa (SDL), nhiệm vụ vẽ bản đồ vào các biểu tượng nhỏ về các tình huống và các diễn viên. Việc huấn luyện sẽ giới thiệu công việc SSR và thảo luận các hướng dẫn nghiên cứu gần đây liên quan đến nhiệm vụ. Khán giả của bài tập này sẽ biết về nền văn học và động lực cho các vai ngữ pháp, cũng như về một loạt các mô hình tính to án cho nhiệm vụ này, từ những phương pháp đầu tiên đến thời đại hiện nay. Chúng ta sẽ thảo luận thêm về những biến đổi mới nhất trong nhiệm vụ SDL truyền thống, bao gồm các chủ đề như mô tả nguyên mẫu. Chúng tôi cũng có những kỹ thuật để giảm mức độ ghi chú cần thiết, như các phương pháp khai thác các kỹ thuật phi pháp (các kỹ thuật nửa giám sát và không giám sát), sửa mô hình xuyên cả ngôn ngữ và miền, và phương pháp ghi chú các câu hỏi/thẩm vấn/ Những phương pháp dựa trên tư thế học cỗ máy khác nhau, bao gồm mạng thần kinh, các mô hình mang tính năng sinh sản, thuật toán dựa vào đồ thị và kĩ thuật kích thích. Ngoài mức án của SR, ta thảo luận về công việc liên quan đến các vai trò theo ngữ nghĩa. Chúng tôi bao gồm các nhóm dữ liệu và các mô hình liên quan đến nhiệm vụ xác định các vai trò tiềm ẩn và kết nối chúng với thuyết trình. Chúng ta sẽ áp dụng các phương pháp khác nhau trong sách vở, bao gồm các mô hình dựa trên thuyết trình, điểm nhấn, và các ưu tiên chọn lựa. Chúng tôi cũng xem xét\ncó thể hữu dụng cho công việc SDL truyền thống.', 'uz': "Name O'qituvchi SRL vazifasini aniqlaydi va yangi vazifa bilan bog'liq taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi yoʻnalarni talab qiladi. Bu o'quvchi muammolari o'rganadi, o'sha vazifaning bir necha kompyuter modellari haqida o'rganadi, bu vazifaning birinchi vazifa holatiga o'rganadi. Yaqinda davom ettirilgan SRL vazifasiga o'zgarishlarni boshqaramiz, va semantik proto-roli lab chiqarish mumkin. Bu yerda biz kerak taʼminlovchi taʼminlov harakatini kamaytirish uchun tugmalarni qaramamiz. Masalan hech qanday qoʻllanmagan foydalanuvchi usullarni (semi- taʼminlovchi va saqlangan teknologiya), model o'zgartirish, va jamiyatlarning semantik role taʼminlovchi usullarni (m. g. savol javob berilgan SRL). Name Maxfiy soʻzni SRL darajasi bilan biz gapirish uchun semantik amallar muhit qiladigan ish haqida javob beramiz. Shunday qilib, biz muvaffaqiyatli vazifani aniqlashga bog'liq maʼlumot tugmalar va modellarni qaramiz va ularni suhbat bilan bog'lash mumkin. Biz bu vazifaning haqida turli usullarni o'rganamiz. Bu muammolarning o'zgartirib turib, koreference resolution, markazir va tanlash parametrlariga asoslangan modellar. Biz qanchalik yangi ko'rini ko'rib chiqaramiz\nularni o'rganishga aslida SRL vazifasi foydalanishi mumkin.", 'nl': "Deze tutorial beschrijft semantische rollabeling (SRL), de taak om tekst in kaart te brengen naar oppervlakkige semantische representaties van eventualiteiten en hun deelnemers. De tutorial introduceert de SRL-taak en bespreekt recente onderzoeksrichtingen met betrekking tot de taak. Het publiek van deze tutorial zal leren over de linguïstische achtergrond en motivatie voor semantische rollen, en ook over een reeks rekenmodellen voor deze taak, van vroege benaderingen tot de huidige state-of-the-art. We zullen verder ingaan op recent voorgestelde variaties op de traditionele SRL-taak, waaronder onderwerpen zoals semantische proto-rol labeling. We behandelen ook technieken om de vereiste annotatie-inspanning te verminderen, zoals methoden die gebruik maken van niet-gelabelde corpora (semi-supervised en niet-supervised technieken), modellaanpassing tussen talen en domeinen, en methoden voor crowdsourcing semantische rol annotatie (bijvoorbeeld vraag-antwoord gedreven SRL). Methoden gebaseerd op verschillende machine learning paradigma's, waaronder neurale netwerken, generatieve Bayesiaanse modellen, grafiekgebaseerde algoritmes en bootstrapping stijl technieken. Naast zinsniveau SRL bespreken we werk dat semantische rollen in discours omvat. In het bijzonder behandelen we datasets en modellen met betrekking tot de taak om impliciete rollen te identificeren en te koppelen aan discoursantecedenten. We introduceren verschillende benaderingen van deze taak uit de literatuur, waaronder modellen gebaseerd op coreferentie resolutie, centrering en selectieve voorkeuren. We bekijken ook hoe nieuwe inzichten\nDit kan nuttig zijn voor de traditionele SRL-taak.", 'da': 'Denne vejledning beskriver semantisk rollemærkning (SRL), opgaven med at kortlægge tekst til overfladiske semantiske repræsentationer af eventualiteter og deres deltagere. Vejledningen introducerer SRL-opgaven og diskuterer de seneste forskningsretninger relateret til opgaven. Publikum i denne tutorial vil lære om den sproglige baggrund og motivation for semantiske roller, og også om en række beregningsmodeller til denne opgave, fra tidlige tilgange til den nuværende state-of-the-art. Vi vil yderligere diskutere nyligt foreslåede variationer til den traditionelle SRL-opgave, herunder emner som semantisk proto-rollemærkning. Vi dækker også teknikker til at reducere den krævede annoteringsindsats, såsom metoder til udnyttelse af ikke-mærkede korpora (semi-overvågede og ikke-overvågede teknikker), modelposition på tværs af sprog og domæner og metoder til crowdsourcing semantisk rolleannotering (f.eks. spørgsmål-svar drevet SRL). Metoder baseret på forskellige machine learning paradigmer, herunder neurale netværk, generative Bayesian modeller, grafbaserede algoritmer og bootstrapping stil teknikker. Udover sætningsniveau SRL diskuterer vi arbejde, der involverer semantiske roller i diskursen. Især dækker vi datasæt og modeller relateret til opgaven med at identificere implicitte roller og knytte dem til diskursforudgående. Vi introducerer forskellige tilgange til denne opgave fra litteraturen, herunder modeller baseret på coreferenceopløsning, centrering og selektive præferencer. Vi gennemgår også, hvordan nye indsigter\nopnået gennem dem kan være nyttigt til den traditionelle SRL opgave.', 'de': 'Dieses Tutorial beschreibt semantische Rollenbeschriftung (SRL), die Aufgabe, Text auf flache semantische Darstellungen von Eventualitäten und deren Teilnehmern abzubilden. Das Tutorial stellt die SRL-Aufgabe vor und diskutiert aktuelle Forschungsrichtungen im Zusammenhang mit der Aufgabe. Das Publikum dieses Tutorials lernt den sprachlichen Hintergrund und die Motivation für semantische Rollen kennen, aber auch eine Reihe von Rechenmodellen für diese Aufgabe, von frühen Ansätzen bis zum aktuellen Stand der Technik. Wir werden die kürzlich vorgeschlagenen Variationen der traditionellen SRL-Aufgabe weiter diskutieren, einschließlich Themen wie semantische Proto-Rollen-Kennzeichnung. Wir behandeln auch Techniken zur Verringerung des erforderlichen Annotationsaufwands, wie Methoden zur Ausnutzung nicht beschrifteter Korpora (semi-überwachte und unüberwachte Techniken), Modellanpassung über Sprachen und Domänen hinweg und Methoden zum Crowdsourcing semantischer Rollenannotation (z.B. Frage-Antwort getriebene SRL). Methoden, die auf verschiedenen Paradigmen des maschinellen Lernens basieren, einschließlich neuronaler Netze, generativer Bayesischer Modelle, graphenbasierter Algorithmen und Bootstrapping-Techniken. Über die Satzebene SRL hinaus diskutieren wir Arbeiten, die semantische Rollen im Diskurs beinhalten. Insbesondere behandeln wir Datensätze und Modelle, die mit der Aufgabe zusammenhängen, implizite Rollen zu identifizieren und mit Diskursantezedenten zu verknüpfen. Wir stellen verschiedene Ansätze dieser Aufgabe aus der Literatur vor, einschließlich Modelle basierend auf Coreferenzauflösung, Zentrierung und Selektionspräferenzen. Wir überprüfen auch, wie neue Erkenntnisse\nDurch sie gewonnene Erkenntnisse können für die traditionelle SRL-Aufgabe nützlich sein.', 'hr': 'Ovaj nastavnik opisuje semantičku označavanje uloge (SRL), zadatak mapiranja teksta plitkim semantičkim predstavljanjem mogućnosti i njihovih sudionika. Učitelj predstavlja zadatak SRL-a i razgovara o nedavnim uputama istraživanja povezanim s zadatakom. Publika ovog nastavnika će naučiti o jezičkoj pozadini i motivaciji za semantičke uloge, kao i o nizu računalnih modela za ovaj zadatak, od ranih pristupa trenutnom stanju umjetnosti. Dalje ćemo razgovarati o nedavno predloženim varijacijama tradicionalnog zadatka SRL-a, uključujući teme poput semantičkog označavanja protouloga. Također pokrivamo i tehnike za smanjenje potrebnih napora za annotaciju, poput metoda korištenja nepoznatih tijela (polu nadziranih i nepotrebnih tehnika), adaptacije modela na jezicima i domenama i metoda za reklamu semantičkih uloga (npr. odgovor na pitanje upravljajući SRL). Metode zasnovane na različitim paradigmima učenja strojeva, uključujući nervne mreže, generične Bayesijske modele, algoritme bazirane na grafiku i tehnike stila čišćenja. Izvan razine rečenica SRL, razgovaramo o radu koji uključuje semantičke uloge u diskusiju. Posebno, pokrivamo sete podataka i modele povezane s zadatkom identifikacije implicitnih uloga i povezivanja ih sa predsjednicima. Predstavljamo različite pristupe ovom zadatku iz književnosti, uključujući modele na osnovu rezolucije, usmjerenja i selektivnih preferencija. Također pregledamo kako nove uvide\ndobiti kroz njih može biti korisna za tradicionalni zadatak SRL-a.', 'fa': 'این تدریس برچسب نقشه\u200cهای semantic (SRL) را توصیف می\u200cکند، وظیفه\u200cی نقشه\u200cسازی متن را تا نمایش\u200cسازی\u200cهای semantic از موقعیت\u200cها و شامل\u200cکنندگان آن\u200cها را گسترش دهد. تحصیلات وظیفه SRL را معرفی می کند و در مورد مسیرهای تحقیقات اخیر رابطه به وظیفه صحبت می کند. تماشاگران این تدریس در مورد پشتیبانی زبان\u200cشناسی و انگیزه\u200cهای نقش\u200cهای semantic و همچنین درباره\u200cی مجموعه مدل\u200cهای کامپیوتری برای این کار، از نزدیک اول به وضعیت هنر فعلی یاد می\u200cگیرند. ما اخیراً در مورد تغییرات پیشنهاد شده در مورد وظیفه رسمی SRL، بحث می کنیم، شامل موضوعات مانند نقشه\u200cهای نقشه\u200cهای semantic. ما همچنین تکنیک\u200cهایی را برای کاهش تلاش اظهار نیاز را می\u200cپوشانیم، مثل روش\u200cهایی که استفاده از شرکت\u200cهای غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cکنند (تکنیک\u200cهای نیمه\u200cنظارت و غیرقابل تغییر\u200cنظارت، تغییر\u200cسازی مدل در زبان\u200cها و دامنه\u200cها و روش\u200cهایی برای اظهار نق روش\u200cهایی که بر پارادیگ\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای مختلف بنیاد دارند، شامل شبکه\u200cهای عصبی، مدل\u200cهای ژنترافی بائیزیان، الگوریتم\u200cهای بنیاد گراف و تکنیک\u200cهای طریق گیری\u200cبندی. بیرون سطح جمله SRL، ما در مورد کاری صحبت می کنیم که شامل نقش\u200cهای semantic در صحبت است. مخصوصا، ما مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و مدل\u200cهای مربوط به کار شناسایی نقش\u200cهای معمولی را پوشش می\u200cدهیم و آنها را به گفتگوی پیشنهاد ارتباط می\u200cدهیم. ما روش\u200cهای متفاوتی برای این کار از ادبیات را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، شامل مدل\u200cهایی که بر اساس حل\u200cسازی، مرکز و ترجیح\u200cهای انتخاب هستند. ما همچنین تحقیق می کنیم که چگونه مشاهده های جدید\nاز طریق آن\u200cها می\u200cتواند برای وظیفه رسمی SRL مفید باشد.', 'id': 'Tutorial ini menggambarkan label peran semantis (SRL), tugas untuk memetakan teks ke reprezentasi semantis rendah dari kebetulan dan peserta mereka. The tutorial introduces the SRL task and discusses recent research directions related to the task.  Penonton dari tutorial ini akan belajar tentang latar belakang bahasa dan motivasi untuk peran semantis, dan juga tentang jangkauan model komputasi untuk tugas ini, dari pendekatan awal ke state-of-the-art saat ini. Kami akan mendiskusikan lebih lanjut variasi yang baru-baru ini diusulkan untuk tugas SRL tradisional, termasuk topik seperti label proto peran semantis. Kami juga menutupi teknik untuk mengurangi usaha anotasi yang diperlukan, seperti metode mengeksploitasi corpora tidak berlebihan (teknik semi-supervised dan tidak supervised), adaptasi model melalui bahasa dan domain, dan metode untuk crowdsourcing anotasi peran semantis (contohnya SRL yang didorong pertanyaan-jawaban). Metode berdasarkan paradigma belajar mesin yang berbeda, termasuk jaringan saraf, model Bayesian generatif, algoritma berdasarkan grafik dan teknik gaya bootstrapping. Selain tahap kalimat SRL, kita mendiskusikan pekerjaan yang melibatkan peran semantis dalam diskors. Terutama, kita menutupi set data dan model yang berhubungan dengan tugas untuk mengidentifikasi peran implicit dan menghubungkannya dengan anteceden diskors. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan yang berbeda untuk tugas ini dari literatur, termasuk model berdasarkan resolusi koreferensi, pusat, dan keutamaan selektif. Kami juga meninjau bagaimana pemahaman baru\nyang diperoleh melalui mereka dapat berguna untuk tugas SRL tradisional.', 'bg': 'Този урок описва семантичното етикетиране на ролята (задачата за картографиране на текста до повърхностни семантични представи на евентуалните събития и техните участници. Инструкторът въвежда задачата и обсъжда последните направления на изследвания, свързани със задачата. Публиката на този урок ще научи за езиковия фон и мотивацията за семантични роли, както и за набор от изчислителни модели за тази задача, от ранни подходи до текущото състояние на изкуството. По-нататък ще обсъдим предложените наскоро варианти на традиционната задача, включително теми като семантично етикетиране на прото-роли. Ние също така обхващаме техники за намаляване на изискваните усилия за анотация, като например методи за експлоатиране на немаркирани корпуси (полунадзорни и ненадзорни техники), адаптация на модели между езици и домейни, както и методи за crowdsourcing семантична анотация на роли (напр. зададени въпроси). Методи, базирани на различни парадигми за машинно обучение, включително невронни мрежи, генеративни Байсийски модели, графични алгоритми и техники в стил bootstrapping. Отвъд изречението се обсъжда работа, която включва семантични роли в дискурса. По-специално, обхващаме набори от данни и модели, свързани със задачата за идентифициране на имплицитни роли и свързването им с дискурсните предшественици. Въвеждаме различни подходи към тази задача от литературата, включително модели, базирани на резолюция, центриране и селекционни предпочитания. Ние също така преглеждаме как нови прозрения\nпридобити чрез тях могат да бъдат полезни за традиционната задача.', 'ko': '본 강좌는 의미 역할 표시(SRL)를 소개하고 이벤트와 참여자의 얕은 의미 표시에 텍스트를 비추는 임무를 소개한다.이 자습서는 SRL 작업에 대해 설명하고 이 작업과 관련된 최신 연구 방향에 대해 설명합니다.본 강좌의 독자들은 의미 역할의 언어 배경과 동기, 그리고 이 임무의 일련의 계산 모델을 이해하고 초기 방법부터 현재의 최신 기술까지 이해할 것이다.최근 제기된 기존 SRL 임무의 변형, 의미 원형 캐릭터 태그 등의 주제를 추가로 논의할 예정이다.또한 주석에 필요한 작업량을 줄이는 기술, 예를 들어 표기되지 않은 자료 라이브러리를 활용하는 방법(반감독과 비감독 기술), 언어와 영역을 뛰어넘는 모델 적응, 하도급 의미 역할 주석을 활용하는 방법(예를 들어 문답 구동의 SRL)도 소개했다.방법은 서로 다른 기계 학습 모델을 바탕으로 신경 네트워크, 베일스 모델 생성, 그림 기반 알고리즘과 자진 기술을 포함한다.문장 차원의 SRL 외에 문장의 의미 역할에 관한 작업도 논의했다.특히 은밀한 역할을 식별하고 이를 말의 선행어와 연결시키는 임무와 관련된 데이터 집합과 모델을 소개했다.우리는 문헌에서 이 임무를 완성하는 서로 다른 방법을 소개했는데 공지해소, 중심화와 선호하는 모델 선택을 포함한다.우리는 또 새로운 견해가 어떻게 생겨났는지 되돌아보았다\n이를 통해 얻은 정보는 기존 SRL 작업에 유용합니다.', 'af': "Hierdie onderwyseling beskrywe semantiese roletiketing (SRL), die taak van kartering teks om semantiese voorstellings van eventualiteite en hul deelnaders te skakel. Die onderwyseling introduseer die SRL taak en bespreek onlangse onderwyserigtings wat met die taak verwante is. Die publiek van hierdie onderwerp sal leer oor die lingwisiese agtergrond en motivasie vir semantiese roles, en ook oor 'n reek rekenaarse modele vir hierdie taak, van vroeg toegang tot die huidige staat van die kuns. Ons sal verder onderspreek onlangs voorgestelde veranderinge aan die tradisionele SRL-taak, insluitend onderwerpe soos semantiese protoroletiketting. Ons bedek ook teknike vir verduur van nodige annotasie verskaffing, soos metodes wat uitgebruik van ongeabelde korpore (semi-supervised en ononderwerpende teknike), model aanpassing oor tale en domeine en metodes vir verskeidende semantiese rolannotasie (bv. vraag-antwoord draai SRL). Metodes gebaseer op verskillende masjien leer paradigme, insluitend neuralnetwerke, genereerbare Bayesian modele, graafgebaseerde algoritme en opstrekking styl teknike. Ons bespreek die werk wat semantiese roles in diskursie insluit. In besonderhede, ons bedek data stelle en modele wat verwante is met die taak van die identifiseer van inplisite roles en verbind hulle na diskursie antecedentes. Ons introduseer verskillende toegang tot hierdie taak van die literaat, insluitend modele gebaseer op koreferensieresolusie, sentrering en seleksjonele voorkeure. Ons het ook oorskou hoe nuwe insigte\nwat deur hulle ontvang kan gebruik word vir die tradisionele SRL-taak.", 'am': 'ይህ ትምህርት የsemantic role labelling (SRL), የጽሑፉን ማህበረሰብ እና ተማሪዎቻቸውን የሚያሳዝን ስርዓት ነው፡፡ ትምህርት SRL አድራጊውን ያስታውሳል፣ የሥርዓት ግንኙነትን የሚያስፈልገውን የመረጃ ትምህርት ይናገራል፡፡ የዚህ ትምህርት አዳማሪዎች የቋንቋዊው መሬት እና የሴሜንቲካዊ ትርጉም እና ለዚህ ስርዓት የተቆጠሩ ዓይነቶች እና ከቀድሞ ጀምሮ እስከ አሁን የ-art ሥርዓት ደርሶ ይደርሳሉ፡፡ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን ለባሕላዊው SRL ስራ የተለየውን ለውጦችን እናነጋግራለን፡፡ እናም የግድ ማስታወቂያውን ማሰናከል ስክሮዎችን እና የኮርፖራ (የsemi-ተጠባባቂው እና ያልጠበቀው ስክሮች), የቋንቋዎችና የውይይቶች ማሰናከል እና የብዙsources semantic role annotation methods (e.g. የጥያቄ መልስ SRL) የነዌብ መረብ፣ የባይስያ ሞላቦች፣ የግራፍ መሠረት አልጎርቲም እና የቡስፖርት ስልጣናዎች በተለያዩ መሣሪያዎች ማተማር ተቃውሞ የተመሳሳይ ሥርዓቶች የተመሳሳይ ደረጃዎች፡፡ Beyond sentence-level SRL, we discuss work that involves semantic roles in discourse.  በተለይም የዳታ ሰርቨሮች እና ሞዴላዎችን እናስከድናለን፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ ከሐሳብሪካ የተለየ ልዩ ደረጃዎችን እናሳየቃላት፣ የኮርፌንስ ማስታወቂያ፣ ማዕከል እና ምርጫዎች በተመሳሳይ እናስባለን፡፡ አዲስ ዓይኖችን እንዴት እንደምናይ እናይ\nየተገኘው የSRL ስራ ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡', 'sw': 'Kisomo hiki kinaelezea jukumu la kimapenzi la kutangaza (SRL), jukumu la kuandika ujumbe wa ramani ili kuwakilisha watu wa sekunde za mwisho na washiriki wao. Utomi huu unaonyesha kazi ya SRL na kujadili maelekezo ya utafiti hivi karibuni yanayohusiana na kazi hiyo. Wasomaji wa somo hili watajifunza kuhusu orodha ya lugha na hamasa ya jukumu la kimapenzi, na pia kuhusu mifano kadhaa ya kompyuta kwa kazi hii, kutoka mapema hadi hali ya sasa ya sanaa. Tutajadili zaidi mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni yanayopendekezwa kwa kazi ya kitamaduni ya SRL, ikiwa ni pamoja na mada kama vile michoro ya kimapenzi. Tunaweza pia kutangaza mbinu za kupunguza juhudi za kutoa taarifa zinazohitajika, kama njia za kutumia makampuni yasiyoeleweka (mbinu za kisasa zinazolindwa na zile zisizo hifadhiwa), mabadiliko ya muundo katika lugha na maeneo mengine, na njia za kuchapisha matangazo ya watu (kwa mfano SRL yenye majibu ya maswali). Njia zinazotumiwa na vifaa tofauti vya kujifunza mashine, ikiwa ni pamoja na mitandao ya kijamii, mifano ya kijamii ya Bayesia, vipengele vya picha na mbinu za kutengeneza mitindo. Zaidi ya kiwango cha hukumu cha SRL, tunajadili kazi inayohusisha na nafasi ya kimapenzi katika mazungumzo. Kwa hakika, tunaweka taarifa na mifano inayohusiana na jukumu la kutambua nafasi isiyo na maana na kuwaunganisha na matukio ya mazungumzo. Tunaonyesha mbinu tofauti za kazi hii kutoka fasihi, ikiwa ni pamoja na mifano inayotumiwa na suluhisho la msingi, katikati na chaguo. Tunapitia namna gani mitazamo mpya\nzilizopata kupitia inaweza kuwa na manufaa kwa kazi ya kitamaduni ya SRL.', 'hy': 'Այս դասարանում նկարագրվում է սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակումը (SSL), տեքստի քարտեզագրման խնդիրը, որպեսզի պատկերացնենք մակերեսային սեմանտիկ ներկայացումները իրադարձությունների և նրանց մասնակիցների վրա: Այս դասարանը ներկայացնում է SSL խնդիրը և քննարկում է վերջին ուսումնասիրության ուղղությունները, որոնք կապված են խնդիրի հետ: Այս դասարանի հանդիսատեսը կսովորի լեզվաբանական հետևի և սեմանտիկ դերերի մոտիվացիայի մասին, ինչպես նաև այս խնդրի հաշվարկների մի շարք մոդելների մասին, սկսած մոտեցումներից մինչև ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիաները: Մենք ավելի ուշ կքննարկենք վերջերս առաջարկված տարբերությունները ավանդական SSL խնդրի համար, ներառյալ այնպիսի թեմաներ, ինչպիսիք են սեմանտիկ նախադեր պիտակումը: Մենք նաև ներառում ենք մեթոդներ, որոնք նվազեցնում են անհրաժեշտ annoտացիոն ջանքերը, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ անկախ կոպորա օգտագործման մեթոդները (կես-վերահսկված և անվերահսկված մեթոդներ), լեզուների և բնագավառների մոդելների ադապտացիան և սեմանտիկ դերի annoտացիոն գրավման մեթոդները Մեթոդներ, որոնք հիմնված են տարբեր մեքենային ուսումնասիրության պարադիգմերի վրա, ներառյալ նյարդային ցանցերը, բեյզիայի ստեղծագործական մոդելները, գրաֆիկավ հիմնված ալգորիթմները և բարձրացման ոճի տեխնիկան Ավելի քան նախադասության մակարդակը, մենք քննարկում ենք աշխատանք, որը ներառում է սեմանտիկ դերեր խոսակցության մեջ: Մենք հատկապես ծախսում ենք տվյալների համակարգեր և մոդելներ, որոնք կապված են ենթադրական դերերի հայտնաբերման և դրանք կապելու քննարկումների նախկինում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք գրականությունից այս խնդիրը տարբեր մոտեցումներ, ներառյալ մոդելներ, որոնք հիմնված են համաձայնական լուծության վրա, կենտրոնացման և ընտրական նախընտրությունների վրա: We also review how new insights\nդրանց միջոցով շահույթը կարող է օգտակար լինել ավանդական SSL խնդիրների համար:', 'az': 'Bu öyrənim semantik rol etiketini (SRL) təsdiqləyir, metin maplaması məlumatı olaraq və onların iştirakçılarının semantik göstərilmələrini çəkir. Üstünlük SRL işini tanıyır və son araştırma yönlərini bu işə qoşur. Bu təhsil sahibləri, semantik rollərin dil arxa plan və motivasiya haqqında öyrənəcəklər və bu işin bir çox hesap modeli haqqında, ilk təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil tərəfindən. Biz son zamanlarda təklif edilmiş variasiyaları, semantik proto rol etiketi kimi məsələlər də dahil edəcəyik. Biz də müəyyən edilməyən məlumatları azaltmaq üçün metodları, məlumatlarını istifadə etməyən korpora metodları (yarı-g özləməyən və təmizlənməyən metodları), dillərin və domenlərin arasında modellər uyğunlaşdırmaq və semantik rol annotasyonu (məsələn, sual-cavabı təşkil edən SRL) ilə istifadə edirik. Müxtəlif mašin öyrənməsi paradiglərinə dayanan metodlar, nöral ağları da dahil, Bayeziya modelləri, grafik tabanlı algoritmi və bootstrapping stili tehnikləri də dahil. Sözlük seviyyətindən sonra, söhbətlərdə semantik rollər içərisində olan işləri mübahisə edirik. Özellikle, biz məlumat qurğularını və modelləri gizli rolləri tanıtmaq və onları öndəlikləri danışmaq üçün bağlayacağıq. Biz bu işin müxtəlif tərzlərini, məktəbədən çəkinməyə, merkezi və seçimli seçimlərə dayanan modellərdən istifadə edirik. Biz həmçinin yeni nəfslərin\nOnların vasitəsilə qazandıqları təhsil işləri üçün faydalı olar.', 'sq': 'Ky tutorial përshkruan etiketën semantike të rolit (SRL), detyrën e hartimit të tekstit në përfaqësimet semantike të sipërfaqe të përfundimeve dhe pjesëmarrësve të tyre. The tutorial introduces the SRL task and discusses recent research directions related to the task.  Publiku i këtij mësimi do të mësojë rreth sfondit gjuhësor dhe motivimit për rolet semantike dhe gjithashtu rreth një game modelesh kompjuterike për këtë detyrë, nga qasjet e parakohshme në gjendjen aktuale të artit. Do të diskutojmë më tej ndryshimet e propozuara kohët e fundit në detyrën tradicionale të SRL, duke përfshirë temë të tilla si etiketat semantike proto-rolesh. Ne mbulojmë gjithashtu teknika për zvogëlimin e përpjekjeve të kërkuara të anotacionit, të tilla si metodat për shfrytëzimin e korprave të pazgjidhura (teknika gjysmë-mbikqyrura dhe jo-mbikqyrura), përshtatjen e modelit nëpër gjuhë dhe fusha dhe metodat për përdorimin e anotacionit të rolit semantik (për shembull, SRL të drejtuar nga pyetja-përgj Metoda bazuar në paradigmat e ndryshme të mësimit të makinave, duke përfshirë rrjetet neuronale, modelet gjenerative Bayesian, algoritmet bazuar në grafik dhe teknikat e stilit të bootstrapping. Përtej nivelit të dënimit SRL, diskutojmë punën që përfshin role semantike në diskurse. Në veçanti, ne mbulojmë grupet e të dhënave dhe modelet lidhur me detyrën e identifikimit të roleve implicite dhe lidhjes së tyre me antecedentet diskursore. Ne paraqesim metoda të ndryshme për këtë detyrë nga literatura, duke përfshirë modele bazuar në zgjidhjen e koreferencës, qendrimin dhe preferencat zgjedhore. Ne gjithashtu shqyrtojmë se si pamjet e reja\nfituar nëpërmjet tyre mund të jetë i dobishëm për detyrën tradicionale të SRL.', 'tr': 'Bu tutumçy semantik rol etiketlemesini (SRL), metin mapplemesini olaryň ve iştirakçileriniň semantik temsillerini boşaltmak görevini tasvir edir. Üýtgetmek üçin SRL zadyny tanyşdyrýar we ýakyndaky araştyrma yönlerini bu zada baglanýar. Bu tutuşmanyň spesalisti lingwistiki fony we semantik roller üçin motivasy we hem bu zadyň birnäçe sanat nusgalary barada öwrenip biler. Ýakynda görä gelen SRL zadynyň üýtgeşmelerini, semantik proto-rol etiketlemesi ýaly temalary bilen çykarjak. Biz hem gerekli täzelikleri azaltmak üçin tekniklerimizi örän ýazylýan korpora ulanmak üçin (ýarysy-g özlemeli we suytlanmaýan teknikeler), diller we sahypalar arasynda modal adaptasiýa we semantik täzelikleri (meselâ, sorag-jogabat sürüjili SRL) duýdurmak üçin nusgalary ýagdaýlaýarys. Mettler farklı maşynlary öwrenmek paradigmlara dayanan, näyral şebekeleri, generatiýa Bayesian modelleri, grafik tabanly algoritmalar we başlatmak tarzda teknikleri. Sözlemler derejesinden öňünde, sözleşmelerde semantik roller bolan işi tartışýarys. Aýratyn hem, maglumat setirleri we nusgalary gizli rolleri tanyşdyrmak we olary ön namaýyşlar bilen baglaýarys. Biz bu zada edebiýatdan farklı yaklaşyklary çözümler, merkezlik we seçeneklere daýanýan örnekler bilen tanyşdyrýarys. Biz hem täze düşünjeleri\nOlar bilen gazanýan däpli SRL işi üçin ulanyp biler.', 'bs': 'Ovaj nastavnik opisuje semantičku označavanje uloge (SRL), zadatak mapiranja teksta za plitke semantičke predstave mogućnosti i njihovih sudionika. Učitelj predstavlja zadatak SRL-a i razgovara o nedavnim uputama istraživanja vezanim za zadatak. Publika ovog nastavnika će naučiti o jezičkoj pozadini i motivaciji za semantičke uloge, kao i o nizu računalnih modela za ovaj zadatak, od ranih pristupa trenutnom stanju umjetnosti. Dalje ćemo razgovarati o nedavno predloženim varijacijama tradicionalnog zadatka SRL-a, uključujući teme poput semantičke etikete protouloga. Također pokrivamo i tehnike za smanjenje potrebnih napora za annotaciju, poput metoda korištenja nepoznatih tijela (polu-nadziranih i neodređenih tehnika), adaptacije modela na jezicima i domenama i metoda za reklamu semantičke uloge (npr. odgovor na pitanje upravljajući SRL). Metode zasnovane na različitim paradigmima učenja strojeva, uključujući neuralne mreže, generativne Bayesijske modele, algoritme bazirane na grafiku i tehnike stila čišćenja. Izvan razine rečenice SRL, razgovaramo o radu koji uključuje semantičke uloge u diskusiju. Posebno, pokrivamo sete podataka i modele povezane sa zadatkom identifikacije implicitnih uloga i povezivanja ih sa predsjednicima. Predstavljamo različite pristupe ovom zadatku iz književnosti, uključujući modele bazirane na rezoluciji, centriranju i selektivnim preferencijama. Također pregledamo kako nove uvide\ndobijena kroz njih može biti korisna za tradicionalni zadatak SRL-a.', 'bn': 'এই শিক্ষার্থীর ব্যাখ্যা হচ্ছে সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেলিং (SRL), ম্যাপিং টেক্সটের কাজের মানচিত্র এবং তাদের অংশগ্রহণকারীদ শিক্ষার্থীরা এসআরএল কাজের পরিচয় প্রদান করে এবং কাজের সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণার নির্দেশ নিয়ে আলোচনা করে। এই শিক্ষার্থীর শ্রোতারা ভাষাগত পটভূমির ব্যাপারে শিখতে পারবে এবং সেম্পেন্টিক ভূমিকার জন্য উৎসাহ এবং এই কাজের জন্য একাধিক গণনাত্রিক মডেল সম্পর্কে শ আমরা সম্প্রতি ঐতিহ্যবাহী এসআরএল কাজের প্রস্তাবিত ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন আলোচনা করব, যার মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক প্রোটোরো ভূমিকা লেবেল এছাড়াও আমরা প্রয়োজনীয় শিক্ষা কমানোর প্রচেষ্টার কারণে প্রয়োজনীয় প্রয়োজনীয় প্রচেষ্টা কভার করি, যেমন অলাইন কর্পোরা ব্যবহার করা (সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং সংরক্ষিত প্রযুক্তি), ভাষা এবং ডোমেন ভিন্ন মেশিন শিক্ষা প্যারাডিমের উপর ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি, যার মধ্যে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, জেনারেটিভ বেয়েসিয়ান মডেল, গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক অ্য শাস্তি স্তরের স্তরের বাইরে আমরা আলোচনা করি যে কাজের মধ্যে সেম্যান্টিক ভূমিকায় জড়িত। বিশেষ করে, আমরা তথ্য সেট এবং মডেলের কাজের সাথে সংক্রান্ত ভূমিকা চিহ্নিত করি এবং তাদের কথোপকথন অ্যান্টিসেডেন্টের সাহিত্য থেকে আমরা এই কাজের বিভিন্ন উপায় উপস্থাপন করি, যার মধ্যে করফেন্সের সিদ্ধান্ত, কেন্দ্রীয় এবং নির্বাচন পছন্দের ভি আমরা বিবেচনা করি কিভাবে নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি\nতাদের মাধ্যমে অর্জন করা হয়েছে ঐতিহ্যবাহী এসআরএল কাজের জন্য উপকার হতে পারে।', 'ca': "Aquest tutorial descriu l'etiquetar del paper semàntic (SRL), la tasca de mapejar el text a representacions semàntiques superficials de les eventualitats i els seus participants. El tutorial introdueix la tasca SRL i discute direccions recents de recerca relacionades amb la tasca. L'audiència d'aquest tutorial aprendrà sobre el fons lingüístic i la motivació per les funcions semàntiques, i també sobre una gama de models computacionals per aquesta tasca, des d'abords primers fins a l'actualitat. Discutirem més sobre les variacions proposades recentment en la tasca tradicional de l'SRL, incloent temes com l'etiquetage semàntic de proto-rols. També cobrem tècniques de reducció de l'esforç d'anotació requerit, com els mètodes d'explotació de corpora sense etiqueta (tècniques semi-supervisades i no supervisades), l'adaptació del model a les llengües i dominis, i mètodes de crowdsourcing de l'anotació del paper semàntic (per exemple, SRL orientada per resposta a preguntes). Métodes basats en diferents paradigmes d'aprenentatge màquinari, incloent xarxes neurals, models Bayesians generadors, algoritmes basats en gràfics i tècniques d'estil de bootstrapping. A més enllà de l'SRL de frases, parlem de treball que implica rols semàntics en el discurs. En particular, cobrem conjunts de dades i models relacionats amb la tasca d'identificar rols implícits i enllaçar-los amb antecedents de discurs. Introduïm diferents enfocaments a aquesta tasca de la literatura, incloent models basats en resolució de coreferencia, centrament i preferències selectives. També revisem com les noves percepcions\naconseguida a través d'elles pot ser útil per a la tasca tradicional de l'SRL.", 'cs': 'Tento návod popisuje sémantické označování rolí (SRL), úkol mapování textu na mělké sémantické reprezentace eventualit a jejich účastníků. Tutorial představuje úlohu SRL a diskutuje nedávné směry výzkumu související s úkolem. Diváci se seznámí s jazykovým pozadím a motivací pro sémantické role a také s řadou výpočetních modelů pro tento úkol, od raných přístupů až po současný stav techniky. Dále budeme diskutovat o nedávno navržených variantách tradičního SRL úkolu, včetně témat jako je sémantické značení protorolí. Zabýváme se také technikami snižujícími požadované anotace, jako jsou metody využívající neznačené korpusy (techniky polovládané a bez dozoru), adaptace modelů napříč jazyky a doménami a metody crowdsourcingu sémantické anotace rolí (např. SRL řízené otázkami a odpovědí). Metody založené na různých paradigmatech strojového učení, včetně neuronových sítí, generativních Bayesovských modelů, algoritmů založených na grafech a technik bootstrappingu. Kromě SRL na úrovni věty diskutujeme práci, která zahrnuje sémantické role v diskurzu. Zejména pokrýváme datové sady a modely související s úkolem identifikovat implicitní role a propojit je s diskurzními předchůdci. Představujeme různé přístupy k tomuto úkolu z literatury, včetně modelů založených na koreferenčním rozlišení, centrování a selektivních preferencích. Také přezkoumáme, jak nové poznatky\nZískané prostřednictvím nich mohou být užitečné pro tradiční SRL úkoly.', 'et': 'See õpetus kirjeldab semantilist rolli märgistamist (SRL), ülesannet kaardistada tekst madalate semantiliste kujutiste ja nende osalejate jaoks. Õpetus tutvustab SRL ülesannet ja arutab hiljutisi uurimissuundi seoses ülesandega. Selle õpetuse publik õpib semantiliste rollide keelelist tausta ja motivatsiooni, samuti mitmesuguseid arvutusmudeleid selle ülesande jaoks, alates varajastest lähenemistest kuni praeguse tehnika tasemeni. Lisaks arutame hiljuti väljapakutud variatsioone traditsioonilise SRL ülesande kohta, sealhulgas selliseid teemasid nagu semantiline protorollide märgistamine. Samuti hõlmame nõutavate annoteerimiskulude vähendamise meetodeid, näiteks märgistamata korpuste kasutamise meetodeid (pooljuhitavad ja järelevalveta tehnikad), mudelite kohandamist keelte ja domeenide vahel ning semantilise rolli annoteerimise meetodeid (nt küsimustele põhinev SRL). Meetodid, mis põhinevad erinevatel masinõppe paradigmadel, sealhulgas närvivõrkudel, generatiivsetel Bayesi mudelitel, graafikutel põhinevatel algoritmidel ja bootstrapping stiili tehnikatel. Lisaks lausetaseme SRL-ile arutleme tööd, mis hõlmab diskursuses semantilisi rolle. Eelkõige käsitleme andmekogumeid ja mudeleid, mis on seotud kaudsete rollide tuvastamise ja nende sidumisega diskursuse eelkäijatega. Tutvustame kirjandusest erinevaid lähenemisviise sellele ülesandele, sealhulgas mudeleid, mis põhinevad koreferenssi resolutsioonil, tsentreerimisel ja valikulistel eelistustel. Samuti vaatame üle, kuidas uued teadmised\nNende kaudu saadud võib olla kasulik traditsioonilise SRL ülesande täitmiseks.', 'fi': 'Tämä opetusohjelma kuvaa semanttista roolimerkintää (SRL), tehtävää kartoittaa teksti mataliin semanttisiin esityksiin mahdollisuuksista ja niiden osallistujista. Opas esittelee SRL-tehtävän ja käsittelee tehtävään liittyviä viimeaikaisia tutkimussuuntia. Tämän opetusohjelman yleisö oppii semanttisten roolien kielellisestä taustasta ja motivaatiosta sekä erilaisista laskennallisista malleista tähän tehtävään varhaisista lähestymistavoista nykytekniikkaan. Keskustelemme myös äskettäin ehdotetuista variaatioista perinteiseen SRL-tehtävään, muun muassa semanttisesta protoroolimerkinnästä. Käsittelemme myös tekniikoita, joilla vähennetään vaadittua merkintätyötä, kuten menetelmiä, jotka hyödyntävät merkitsemättömiä korpusia (puolivalvotut ja valvomattomat tekniikat), mallien mukauttamista eri kielillä ja toimialueilla sekä menetelmiä joukkoistamiseen semanttisen roolimerkinnän (esim. kysymys-vastausvetoinen SRL). Menetelmät perustuvat erilaisiin koneoppimisen paradigmaihin, kuten neuroverkkoihin, generatiivisiin bayesilaisiin malleihin, graafisiin algoritmeihin ja bootstrapping-tyyliin. Lausetason SRL:n lisäksi keskustelemme työstä, jossa diskurssiin liittyy semanttisia rooleja. Käsittelemme erityisesti aineistoja ja malleja, jotka liittyvät implisiittisten roolien tunnistamiseen ja niiden linkittämiseen diskurssin edeltäjiin. Esittelemme erilaisia lähestymistapoja tähän tehtävään kirjallisuudesta, mukaan lukien mallit, jotka perustuvat koreferenssin resoluutioon, keskittämiseen ja valikoimiin. Tarkastelemme myös, miten uusia näkemyksiä\nNiiden avulla saadut tulokset voivat olla hyödyllisiä perinteisessä SRL-tehtävässä.', 'jv': 'tutorial_BAR_ Tutor Publik sing tutorial iki bakal mlayu banjur kelangan kelangan lenggunaké karo pertualisan sematik, lan tambah barang akeh model kompatistik kanggo nggawe barang iki, suku kedakak sampek tanggal saiki bakal terus-akeh lanjut. text-tool-action Awak dhéwé nggawe teknik ngéwangi kanggo mbengaké as éwé éntuk, kaya ngono nggunakake sistem sing ora basa gambar nggawe (teknik semi-super-titiro lan ungerti perusahaan), modèl nggawe langatan lan dumaten, lan perusahaan kanggo kebebasan cara-suaraning semantar dumateng (isih. iso dianggap cara-suaraning SSL). Metopot sing basa karo sistem samihan karo pernik nggambar pararamu, gambar netwisan, generated bayesi model, Algorithms karo sistem sistem nggawe barang sistem sistem Erlangno Rusiane Jejaring Anda ngomong, awak dhéwé dengangkang dadi lan model sing gagalé karo nggawe barang kelas barang dumadhi lan nganggo kuwi tindakan kejahatan Awak dhéwé nggawe akses menyang sampeyan kanggo nggawe dadi pibasa, gambar model sing basa karo Resolusi coreferner, cending lan singular sing apik dhéwé. We ngubah beraksi perdudungi kapan anyari bagian\nnjaluk-njaluk nungane kuwi nggawe barang-njaluk kanggo sabané nggunakaké srL.', 'ha': "Wannan tutor yana bayyana fasalin na semantic role mai lissafa (SRL), aikin yin yin ramani da matsayin zuwa mai shaƙãwa ga masu motsi na ƙarshen da mãsu haɗuwa. Ana nuna aikin SRL kuma yana jãyayya shiryoyin research na yanzu masu husũma da aikin. Wasuɓan wannan littãfi zai iya amfani da bayan bangon na linguistic da motsi wa masu mutane, da kuma masu hususann misãlai masu lissafa wa wannan aikin, daga farko zuwa halin-sanar da ke kai yanzu. We will further discuss recently proposed variations to the traditional SRL task, including topics such as semantic proto-role labeling. Tuna kangara masu kwamfyuta da za'a ƙara aikin taƙaitacce, kamar metodi da za'a yi amfani da shirin makampuni wanda ba'a yi taƙaita ba (kima-tsare da kuma ba'a tsare shi ba), masu adapta misalin ayuka da ke cikin harshen da guda, da hanyoyin mutane da ke ƙaranci masu motsi a cikin mutane (misali, an nuna SRL wanda ya yi tambaya). Methodiya, a kan karatun masu karanta paradigm masu cikin kwamfyutan tebur, kamar shirin neural, masu motsi na Bayesian, algoritkimar a kan grafi da masu buɗe masu shiryi. Bayon maganar-daraja SRL, Munã jãyayya aikin wanda ke da aikin mutane da ke cikin magana. Kayya, Munã rufe tsarin data da misãlai masu husũma da aikin da za'a gane aikin da bã da sha'ani ba, kuma Muke haɗa su da zane-zane da za'a yi magana. Tuna shiga hanyoyin daban-daban zuwa wannan aikin na littafan, kamar misãlai, a kan karatun sarrafiya, masu tsakanin da kuma zaɓen zaɓata. Kayya tuna kalmõmin gani\nda aka samã su yana da amfani ga aikin SRL.", 'he': 'הלימודים האלה מתארים תיקון תפקידים סמנטיים (SRL), המשימה של מיפות טקסט למציגות סמנטיות שטחיות של סיפורים והמשתתפים שלהם. הלימודים מציגים את המשימה של SRL ודיונים על כיווני מחקר לאחרונה שקשורים למשימה. The audience of this tutorial will learn about the linguistic background and motivation for semantic roles, and also about a range of computational models for this task, from early approaches to the current state-of-the-art.  We will further discuss recently proposed variations to the traditional SRL task, including topics such as semantic proto-role labeling. אנחנו מכסים גם טכניקות להפחית מאמץ ציונים נדרש, כמו שיטות ניצל גופרה לא מוגבלת (טכניקות חצי-מפקחות ולא מוגבלות), שיתוף מודל ברחבי שפות ותחומות, ושיטות להוציא ציונים של תפקיד סמנטי (למשל SRL מונעת על תשובה-שאלה). שיטות מבוססות על פרדיגמות לימוד מכונות שונות, כולל רשתות עצביות, דוגמאות Bayesian דולריות, אלגוריתמים מבוססים בגרף וטכניקות סגנון מגפיים. מעבר לרמת המשפט SRL, אנחנו מדברים על עבודה שמעניינת תפקידים סמנטיים בתנאי. במיוחד, אנחנו מכסים קבוצות נתונים ודוגמנים שקשורים למשימה לזהות תפקידים מרושעים ולקשר אותם לקודמים של דיבור. אנחנו מציגים גישות שונות למשימה הזאת מהספרות, כולל דוגמנים מבוססים על פיתרון התאמה, מרכז, והעדיפות הבחירות. אנחנו גם מבקרים איך תובנות חדשות\nשנרכש דרכו יכול להיות שימושי למשימת SRL המסורתית.', 'sk': 'Ta vadnica opisuje semantično označevanje vlog (SRL), nalogo preslikave besedila v plitve semantične predstavitve možnosti in njihovih udeležencev. Vadnica predstavlja nalogo SRL in obravnava najnovejše raziskovalne smeri, povezane z nalogo. Občinstvo te vadnice bo spoznalo jezikovno ozadje in motivacijo za semantične vloge ter tudi vrsto računalniških modelov za to nalogo, od zgodnjih pristopov do trenutnega stanja tehnike. Nadalje bomo razpravljali o nedavno predlaganih variacijah tradicionalne naloge SRL, vključno s temami, kot je semantično označevanje protovlog. Obravnavamo tudi tehnike za zmanjšanje potrebnih naporov za označevanje, kot so metode izkoriščanja neoznačenih korpusov (polnadzorovane in nenadzorovane tehnike), prilagajanje modelov med jeziki in domenami ter metode množičnega nabora semantičnih vlog (npr. SRL, ki temelji na vprašanjih in odgovorih). Metode, ki temeljijo na različnih paradigmah strojnega učenja, vključno z nevronskimi omrežji, generativnimi bajzijskimi modeli, grafičnimi algoritmi in tehnikami bootstrapping sloga. Poleg stavkovne SRL razpravljamo o delu, ki v diskurzu vključuje semantične vloge. Predvsem obravnavamo nabore podatkov in modele, povezane z nalogo identifikacije implicitnih vlog in njihove povezave z diskurznimi predhodniki. Predstavljamo različne pristope k tej nalogi iz literature, vključno z modeli, ki temeljijo na ločljivosti koreference, centriranju in selekcijskih preferencah. Pregledamo tudi, kako novi vpogledi\nPridobljeni z njimi so lahko koristni za tradicionalno nalogo SRL.', 'bo': 'This tutorial describes semantic role labelling (SRL), the task of mapping text to shallow semantic representations of eventualities and their participants. སྒྲུང་བརྗོད་གཞུང་གིས་SRL ལ་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་། སྙན་རིག་གི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཕར་མེད་དུ་སྔོན་ལྟ། འུ་ཚོས་གྲོས་མཐུན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དུ་བཤད་དགོས། We also cover techniques for reducing required annotation effort, such as methods exploiting unlabeled corpora (semi-supervised and unsupervised techniques), model adaptation across languages and domains, and methods for crowdsourcing semantic role annotation (e.g., question-answer driven SRL). Methods based on different machine learning paradigms, including neural networks, generative Bayesian models, graph-based algorithms and bootstrapping style techniques. ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་ཚབ་ཕྱི་ཁམས་ལྷན་མཁན་དབུགས་གཙང་དག་གི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In particular, we cover data sets and models related to the task of identifying implicit roles and linking them to discourse antecedents. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་སྣེ་འདྲ་བ་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་། བྱ་རིམ་དང་གདམ་ཁ་ཚོགས་ལ་མཐུན་གྱི་མིག་པ་གཙོ་རིམ། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་བ་ཀྱི་\nཁོང་ཚོ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཚོ་སྔོན་སྲོལ་ཆེན་དཔལ་ཡིག་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅན་ཞིག་བྱེད་སྲིད།'}
{'en': 'Memory Augmented Neural Networks for Natural Language Processing', 'ar': 'الشبكات العصبية المعززة بالذاكرة لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'Redes neurais com memória aumentada para processamento de linguagem natural', 'es': 'Redes neuronales aumentadas de memoria para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural', 'fr': 'Réseaux de neurones à mémoire augmentée pour le traitement du langage naturel', 'ja': '自然言語処理のためのメモリ拡張ニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': '以自然语言处之内存益神经网络', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए स्मृति संवर्धित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Нейронные сети с расширенной памятью для обработки естественного языка', 'ga': 'Líonraí Néaracha Méadaithe Cuimhne do Phróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Memória kiterjesztett ideghálózatok a természetes nyelv feldolgozásához', 'el': 'Ενσωματωμένα Νευρικά Δίκτυα για την Επεξεργασία Φυσικής Γλώσσας', 'it': "Reti neurali potenziate della memoria per l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale", 'kk': 'Табиғлық тіл процессері үшін жады өзгертілген нейрондық желіName', 'lt': 'Atminties padidinti nerviniai tinklai gamtiniam kalbų apdorojimui', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Memory Augmented Neural Networks for Natural Language Processing', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള ഓഗ്മെന്റ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Netwerks Newrali Aġġustati tal-Memorja għall-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процессийн сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн сэтгэл хөдөлгөөн', 'no': 'Minneøkt neuralnettverk for naturleg språk- prosessering', 'pl': 'Sieci neuronowe rozszerzone pamięcią dla przetwarzania języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Rețele neurale augmentate de memorie pentru prelucrarea limbajului natural', 'sr': 'Memorija povećana neuronska mreža prirodnog jezika', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් මතකය විශාලනය කරපු න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය', 'so': 'Shabakada naafada ee xasuusta lagu daray', 'sv': 'Minnesförbättrade neurala nätverk för behandling av naturligt språk', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுக்கான நினைவகம் ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்கள்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ quản lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'bg': 'Увеличени паметни неврални мрежи за обработка на естествен език', 'nl': 'Geheugen Augmented Neural Networks voor Natuurlijke Taalverwerking', 'da': 'Hukommelsesforøgede neurale netværk til behandling af naturligt sprog', 'hr': 'Povećanje pamćenja Neuralnih mreža prirodne jezike', 'de': 'Memory Augmented Neuronale Netzwerke für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리에 사용되는 기억 증강 신경 네트워크', 'id': 'Memory Augmented Neural Networks for Natural Language Processing', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Asili wa Kumbukumbu', 'fa': 'Comment', 'af': 'Geheue Gegroei Neurale Netwerke vir Natuurlike Taal Prosessering', 'tr': 'Natal Dil Prozesi üçin Hata OGymatlandyryldy', 'sq': 'Kujtesa rritet rrjetet neuronale për procesimin e gjuhës natyrore', 'am': 'Memory Augmented Neural Networks for Natural Language Processing', 'hy': 'Հիշողությունը Աճեցված նյարդային ցանցեր բնական լեզվի վերլուծության համար', 'az': 'Təbiətli Dil İşləməsi üçün Ziyad Ağırıldı Nöral Netikləri', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষার নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Memorija povećana neuronska mreža prirodnog jezika', 'ca': 'Memory Augmented Neural Networks for Natural Language Processing', 'cs': 'Paměť rozšířené neuronové sítě pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka', 'fi': 'Memory Augmented Neural Networks for Natural Language Processing', 'et': 'Mälu suurendatud närvivõrgud loodusliku keele töötlemiseks', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Pomnilniško povečana živčna omrežja za obdelavo naravnega jezika', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་བཅས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་བ'}
{'en': 'Designing of general-purpose learning algorithms is a long-standing goal of artificial intelligence. A general purpose AI agent should be able to have a memory that it can store and retrieve information from. Despite the success of deep learning in particular with the introduction of LSTMs and GRUs to this area, there are still a set of complex tasks that can be challenging for conventional neural networks. Those tasks often require a neural network to be equipped with an explicit, external memory in which a larger, potentially unbounded, set of facts need to be stored. They include but are not limited to, reasoning, planning, episodic question-answering and learning compact algorithms. Recently two promising approaches based on neural networks to this type of tasks have been proposed : Memory Networks and Neural Turing Machines. In this tutorial, we will give an overview of this new paradigm of neural networks with memory. We will present a unified architecture for Memory Augmented Neural Networks (MANN) and discuss the ways in which one can address the external memory and hence read / write from it. Then we will introduce Neural Turing Machines and Memory Networks as specific instantiations of this general architecture. In the second half of the tutorial, we will focus on recent advances in MANN which focus on the following questions : How can we read / write from an extremely large memory in a scalable way? How can we design efficient non-linear addressing schemes? How can we do efficient reasoning using large scale memory and an episodic memory? The answer to any one of these questions introduces a variant of MANN. We will conclude the tutorial with several open challenges in MANN and its applications to NLP.We will introduce several applications of MANN in NLP throughout the tutorial. Few examples include language modeling, question answering, visual question answering, and dialogue systems. For updated information and material, please refer to our tutorial website : https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ar': 'يعد تصميم خوارزميات التعلم للأغراض العامة هدفًا طويل الأمد للذكاء الاصطناعي. يجب أن يكون لدى وكيل الذكاء الاصطناعي للأغراض العامة ذاكرة يمكنه تخزين المعلومات منها واستردادها. على الرغم من نجاح التعلم العميق على وجه الخصوص مع إدخال LSTMs و GRUs في هذا المجال ، لا تزال هناك مجموعة من المهام المعقدة التي يمكن أن تشكل تحديًا للشبكات العصبية التقليدية. غالبًا ما تتطلب هذه المهام شبكة عصبية لتكون مجهزة بذاكرة خارجية صريحة حيث يجب تخزين مجموعة أكبر من الحقائق غير المحدودة. وهي تشمل على سبيل المثال لا الحصر ، التفكير والتخطيط والإجابة العرضية للأسئلة وتعلم الخوارزميات المدمجة. تم مؤخرًا اقتراح نهجين واعدين يعتمدان على الشبكات العصبية لهذا النوع من المهام: شبكات الذاكرة وآلات تورينج العصبية. في هذا البرنامج التعليمي ، سنقدم نظرة عامة على هذا النموذج الجديد من "الشبكات العصبية ذات الذاكرة". سنقدم بنية موحدة للشبكات العصبية المعززة للذاكرة (MANN) ونناقش الطرق التي يمكن للمرء من خلالها معالجة الذاكرة الخارجية ومن ثم القراءة / الكتابة منها. ثم سنقدم آلات تورينج العصبية وشبكات الذاكرة كتطبيقات محددة لهذه البنية العامة. في النصف الثاني من البرنامج التعليمي ، سنركز على التطورات الحديثة في MANN والتي تركز على الأسئلة التالية: كيف يمكننا القراءة / الكتابة من ذاكرة كبيرة للغاية بطريقة قابلة للتطوير؟ كيف يمكننا تصميم مخططات عنونة غير خطية فعالة؟ كيف نستطيع\nهل الاستدلال الفعال باستخدام ذاكرة واسعة النطاق وذاكرة عرضية؟ تقدم الإجابة على أي من هذه الأسئلة نوعًا مختلفًا من MANN. سنختتم البرنامج التعليمي بالعديد من التحديات المفتوحة في MANN وتطبيقاتها في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP) ، وسنقدم العديد من تطبيقات MANN في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية خلال البرنامج التعليمي. تتضمن بعض الأمثلة نمذجة اللغة والإجابة على الأسئلة والإجابة على الأسئلة المرئية وأنظمة الحوار. للحصول على معلومات ومواد محدثة ، يرجى الرجوع إلى موقع الويب التعليمي الخاص بنا: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'zh': '通用学算法者,人工智能之久也。 通用AI摄当有可储检息之内存。 虽深学成功,特随LSTMGRU之入,犹有朋党之务,于旧神经网络可得而挑战性也。 常须神经网络备显式外存储器,其中须储大、可无界事实集。 不限推理计,情问学凑算。 近建二神经网络之道以成之:记网络、神经图灵 Machines.In 本教程,概述此神经网络之新式。 吾将介内存增神经网络(MANN)之统架构,而论寻址外存储器,从而读/。 然后以神经图灵机、内存网络为通架构之特定。 本教程之后半,将重言MANN之最新进展,侧重于以下问:何以广其大内存中读/? 何以设高效非线性寻址方? 我等如何\n用大记、情节记有效推理? 对案一切引入MANN变体。 本教程之末, MANN 及 NLP 中所宜者数开放性挑战。 将在全教程中 MANN 在 NLP 中数种应用。 鲜有言建模,问答问对。 更新信息材,请参阅教程网站 https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/。', 'pt': 'O design de algoritmos de aprendizado de uso geral é um objetivo de longa data da inteligência artificial. Um agente de IA de uso geral deve ser capaz de ter uma memória da qual possa armazenar e recuperar informações. Apesar do sucesso do aprendizado profundo em particular com a introdução de LSTMs e GRUs nesta área, ainda há um conjunto de tarefas complexas que podem ser desafiadoras para redes neurais convencionais. Essas tarefas geralmente exigem que uma rede neural seja equipada com uma memória externa explícita na qual um conjunto maior e potencialmente ilimitado de fatos precisa ser armazenado. Eles incluem, mas não estão limitados a, raciocínio, planejamento, respostas a perguntas episódicas e aprendizado de algoritmos compactos. Recentemente foram propostas duas abordagens promissoras baseadas em redes neurais para este tipo de tarefas: Redes de Memória e Máquinas de Turing Neurais.Neste tutorial, daremos uma visão geral deste novo paradigma de “redes neurais com memória”. Apresentaremos uma arquitetura unificada para Redes Neurais Aumentadas de Memória (MANN) e discutiremos as maneiras pelas quais se pode endereçar a memória externa e, portanto, ler/escrever a partir dela. Em seguida, apresentaremos as Máquinas de Turing Neurais e as Redes de Memória como instanciações específicas dessa arquitetura geral. Na segunda metade do tutorial, vamos nos concentrar nos avanços recentes no MANN que se concentram nas seguintes questões: Como podemos ler/escrever de uma memória extremamente grande de forma escalável? Como podemos projetar esquemas de endereçamento não lineares eficientes? Como podemos nós\nfazer raciocínio eficiente usando memória de grande escala e uma memória episódica? A resposta a qualquer uma dessas perguntas apresenta uma variante do MANN. Concluiremos o tutorial com vários desafios em aberto em MANN e suas aplicações em PNL. Apresentaremos várias aplicações de MANN em PNL ao longo do tutorial. Alguns exemplos incluem modelagem de linguagem, respostas a perguntas, respostas visuais a perguntas e sistemas de diálogo. Para obter informações e materiais atualizados, consulte nosso site de tutoriais: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'hi': 'सामान्य उद्देश्य सीखने के एल्गोरिदम का डिजाइनिंग कृत्रिम बुद्धिमत्ता का एक दीर्घकालिक लक्ष्य है। एक सामान्य उद्देश्य एआई एजेंट को एक मेमोरी रखने में सक्षम होना चाहिए जिसे वह स्टोर कर सकता है और जानकारी प्राप्त कर सकता है। इस क्षेत्र में एलएसटीएम और जीआरआई की शुरूआत के साथ विशेष रूप से गहरी शिक्षा की सफलता के बावजूद, अभी भी जटिल कार्यों का एक सेट है जो पारंपरिक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण हो सकता है। उन कार्यों को अक्सर एक स्पष्ट, बाहरी स्मृति से सुसज्जित होने के लिए एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की आवश्यकता होती है जिसमें एक बड़ा, संभावित रूप से असीमित, तथ्यों के सेट को संग्रहीत करने की आवश्यकता होती है। वे शामिल हैं, लेकिन तक सीमित नहीं हैं, तर्क, योजना, एपिसोडिक प्रश्न-उत्तर और कॉम्पैक्ट एल्गोरिदम सीखना। हाल ही में इस प्रकार के कार्यों के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर दो आशाजनक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं: मेमोरी नेटवर्क और न्यूरल ट्यूरिंग इस ट्यूटोरियल Machines.In, हम "स्मृति के साथ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क" के इस नए प्रतिमान का अवलोकन करेंगे। हम मेमोरी संवर्धित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (MANN) के लिए एक एकीकृत वास्तुकला प्रस्तुत करेंगे और उन तरीकों पर चर्चा करेंगे जिनमें कोई बाहरी स्मृति को संबोधित कर सकता है और इसलिए इसे पढ़ / लिख सकता है। फिर हम इस सामान्य वास्तुकला के विशिष्ट इंस्टेंटेशन के रूप में तंत्रिका ट्यूरिंग मशीनों और मेमोरी नेटवर्क को पेश करेंगे। ट्यूटोरियल की दूसरी छमाही में, हम MANN में हाल ही में प्रगति पर ध्यान केंद्रित करेंगे जो निम्नलिखित प्रश्नों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं: हम एक स्केलेबल तरीके से एक बहुत बड़ी स्मृति से कैसे पढ़ / लिख सकते हैं? हम कुशल गैर-रैखिक एड्रेसिंग योजनाओं को कैसे डिजाइन कर सकते हैं? हम कैसे कर सकते हैं\nबड़े पैमाने पर स्मृति और एक एपिसोडिक स्मृति का उपयोग कर कुशल तर्क करते हैं? इन प्रश्नों में से किसी एक का उत्तर मान के एक संस्करण का परिचय देता है। हम MANN में कई खुली चुनौतियों और NLP के लिए अपने अनुप्रयोगों के साथ ट्यूटोरियल समाप्त होगा. हम ट्यूटोरियल भर में एनएलपी में MANN के कई अनुप्रयोगों का परिचय होगा. कुछ उदाहरणों में भाषा मॉडलिंग, प्रश्न उत्तर देना, दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर देना और संवाद प्रणाली शामिल हैं। अद्यतन जानकारी और सामग्री के लिए, कृपया हमारी ट्यूटोरियल वेबसाइट देखें: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/।', 'es': 'El diseño de algoritmos de aprendizaje de uso general es un objetivo de larga data de la inteligencia artificial. Un agente de IA de uso general debe poder tener una memoria en la que pueda almacenar y recuperar información. A pesar del éxito del aprendizaje profundo, en particular con la introducción de LSTM y GRUs en esta área, todavía hay un conjunto de tareas complejas que pueden ser un desafío para las redes neuronales convencionales. Esas tareas a menudo requieren que una red neuronal esté equipada con una memoria externa explícita en la que sea necesario almacenar un conjunto de datos más grande, potencialmente ilimitado. Incluyen, pero no se limitan a, razonamiento, planificación, respuesta episódica a preguntas y aprendizaje de algoritmos compactos. Recientemente se han propuesto dos enfoques prometedores basados en redes neuronales para este tipo de tareas: redes de memoria y máquinas neuronales de Turing. En este tutorial, daremos una visión general de este nuevo paradigma de «redes neuronales con memoria». Presentaremos una arquitectura unificada para redes neuronales aumentadas de memoria (MANN) y analizaremos las formas en que se puede abordar la memoria externa y, por lo tanto, leer/escribir desde ella. A continuación, presentaremos las máquinas neuronales de Turing y las redes de memoria como instancias específicas de esta arquitectura general. En la segunda mitad del tutorial, nos centraremos en los avances recientes en MANN que se centran en las siguientes preguntas: ¿Cómo podemos leer/escribir desde una memoria extremadamente grande de forma escalable? ¿Cómo podemos diseñar esquemas de direccionamiento no lineal eficientes? ¿Cómo podemos\nhacer un razonamiento eficiente con memoria a gran escala y una memoria episódica? La respuesta a cualquiera de estas preguntas introduce una variante de MANN. Concluiremos el tutorial con varios desafíos abiertos en MANN y sus aplicaciones a la PNL. Presentaremos varias aplicaciones de MANN en PNL a lo largo del tutorial. Algunos ejemplos incluyen el modelado del lenguaje, la respuesta a preguntas, la respuesta visual a preguntas y los sistemas de diálogo.Para obtener información y material actualizados, consulte nuestro sitio web de tutoriales: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ja': '汎用学習アルゴリズムの設計は、人工知能の長年の目標である。 汎用AIエージェントは、そこから情報を保存および取得できるメモリを持つ必要があります。 特にLSTMとGRUがこの分野に導入されてディープラーニングが成功したにもかかわらず、従来のニューラルネットワークにとって依然として困難な複雑なタスクのセットがあります。 これらのタスクは、多くの場合、ニューラルネットワークが明示的な外部メモリを備える必要があり、そこには、より大きな、潜在的には無制限の事実のセットを格納する必要があります。 これらには、推論、計画、エピソード的な質問への回答、およびコンパクトな学習アルゴリズムが含まれますが、これらに限定されません。 最近、このタイプのタスクに対するニューラルネットワークに基づく2つの有望なアプローチが提案されています：メモリネットワークとニューラルチューリングマシン。このチュートリアルでは、「記憶を持つニューラルネットワーク」の新しいパラダイムの概要を説明します。 メモリ拡張ニューラルネットワーク（ MANN ）のための統一されたアーキテクチャを提示し、外部メモリにアドレス指定し、そのメモリから読み書きする方法について説明します。 次に、この一般的なアーキテクチャの特定のインスタンスとして、ニューラルチューリングマシンとメモリネットワークを紹介します。 チュートリアルの後半では、次の質問に焦点を当てたMANNの最近の進歩に焦点を当てます。スケーラブルな方法で極めて大きなメモリから読み書きするにはどうすればよいですか？ 効率的な非線形アドレッシングスキームを設計するにはどうすればよいでしょうか？\n大規模なメモリとエピソード的なメモリを使って効率的な推論を行うにはどうすればよいでしょうか？これらの質問のいずれかへの答えは、マンの変種を導入する。チュートリアルを最後に、MANNにおけるいくつかのオープンな課題とNLPへの応用について説明します。チュートリアル全体を通して、NLPにおけるMANNのいくつかの応用について紹介します。言語モデリング、質問への回答、視覚的な質問への回答、ダイアログシステムなどの例はほとんどありません。最新の情報や資料については、チュートリアルのウェブサイト（ https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/ ）をご覧ください。', 'fr': "La conception d'algorithmes d'apprentissage polyvalents est un objectif de longue date de l'intelligence artificielle. Un agent IA à usage général doit être capable de disposer d'une mémoire dans laquelle il peut stocker et récupérer des informations. Malgré le succès du deep learning, en particulier avec l'introduction des LSTM et des GRU dans ce domaine, il reste un ensemble de tâches complexes qui peuvent être difficiles pour les réseaux de neurones conventionnels. Ces tâches nécessitent souvent qu'un réseau de neurones soit équipé d'une mémoire externe explicite dans laquelle un ensemble de faits plus important, potentiellement illimité, doit être stocké. Ils comprennent, sans s'y limiter, le raisonnement, la planification, les réponses épisodiques aux questions et l'apprentissage d'algorithmes compacts. Récemment, deux approches prometteuses basées sur les réseaux de neurones pour ce type de tâches ont été proposées\xa0: les réseaux de mémoire et les machines neuronales de Turing. Dans ce tutoriel, nous allons donner un aperçu de ce nouveau paradigme des «\xa0réseaux de neurones avec mémoire\xa0». Nous présenterons une architecture unifiée pour les réseaux de neurones augmentés en mémoire (MANN) et discuterons de la manière dont on peut adresser la mémoire externe et donc la lire/écrire à partir de celle-ci. Ensuite, nous présenterons les machines de Turing neuronal et les réseaux de mémoire en tant qu'instanciations spécifiques de cette architecture générale. Dans la seconde moitié du tutoriel, nous nous concentrerons sur les récentes avancées de MANN qui se concentrent sur les questions suivantes\xa0: Comment pouvons-nous lire/écrire à partir d'une mémoire extrêmement volumineuse de manière évolutive\xa0? Comment pouvons-nous concevoir des schémas d'adressage non linéaires efficaces\xa0? Comment pouvons-nous\nfaire un raisonnement efficace en utilisant une mémoire à grande échelle et une mémoire épisodique\xa0? La réponse à l'une de ces questions introduit une variante de MANN. Nous terminerons le tutoriel avec plusieurs défis ouverts dans MANN et ses applications à la NLP. Nous présenterons plusieurs applications de MANN dans la PNL tout au long du tutoriel. Quelques exemples incluent la modélisation du langage, les réponses aux questions, les réponses visuelles aux questions et les systèmes de dialogue. Pour obtenir des informations et du matériel mis à jour, veuillez consulter notre site Web de didacticiel\xa0: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'ru': 'Разработка алгоритмов обучения общего назначения - давняя цель искусственного интеллекта. Агент ИИ общего назначения должен иметь память, из которой он может хранить и извлекать информацию. Несмотря на успех глубокого обучения, в частности, с внедрением LSTM и GRU в этой области, все еще существует набор сложных задач, которые могут быть сложными для обычных нейронных сетей. Эти задачи часто требуют, чтобы нейронная сеть была оснащена явной внешней памятью, в которой необходимо хранить более крупный, потенциально неограниченный набор фактов. Они включают, но не ограничиваются, рассуждения, планирование, ответы на эпизодические вопросы и компактные алгоритмы обучения. Недавно были предложены два перспективных подхода, основанных на нейронных сетях, к этому типу задач: сети памяти и нейронные машины Тьюринга. В этом учебнике мы дадим обзор этой новой парадигмы «нейронных сетей с памятью». Мы представим унифицированную архитектуру для дополненных памятью нейронных сетей (MANN) и обсудим способы, с помощью которых можно обращаться к внешней памяти и, следовательно, читать/записывать из нее. Затем мы представим нейронные машины Тьюринга и сети памяти как конкретные экземпляры этой общей архитектуры. Во второй половине урока мы сосредоточимся на последних достижениях МАННА, которые сосредоточены на следующих вопросах: Как мы можем читать/писать из чрезвычайно большой памяти масштабируемым способом? Как мы можем разработать эффективные схемы нелинейной адресации?\nэффективно ли рассуждать, используя крупномасштабную память и эпизодическую память? Ответ на любой из этих вопросов вводит вариант МАННА. Мы закончим учебник с несколькими открытыми задачами в MANN и его приложениями к NLP. Мы введем несколько приложений MANN в NLP на протяжении всего учебника. Несколько примеров включают в себя моделирование языка, ответы на вопросы, визуальные ответы на вопросы и диалоговые системы .Обновленную информацию и материалы можно найти на нашем веб-сайте-учебнике: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ga': 'Sprioc seanbhunaithe na hintleachta saorga is ea halgartaim foghlama ilfhóinteach a dhearadh. Ba cheart go mbeadh gníomhaire AI cuspóir ginearálta in ann cuimhne a bheith aige ar féidir leis faisnéis a stóráil agus a aisghabháil uaidh. In ainneoin gur éirigh le foghlaim dhomhain go háirithe le tabhairt isteach LSTManna agus GRUanna sa réimse seo, tá sraith tascanna casta fós ann a d’fhéadfadh a bheith dúshlánach do ghnáthlíonraí néaracha. Is minic a éilíonn na cúraimí sin go mbeidh líonra néarach feistithe le cuimhne shainráite sheachtrach ina bhfuil gá le sraith fíricí níos mó, a d’fhéadfadh a bheith gan teorainn, a stóráil. Áirítear leo, ach níl siad teoranta dóibh, réasúnaíocht, pleanáil, freagairt cheisteach eipeasóideach agus algartaim dhlúth foghlama. Le déanaí tá dhá chur chuige tuar dóchais inti bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha don chineál seo tascanna molta: Líonraí Cuimhne agus Néar-Mheaisíní Turing. Sa rang teagaisc seo, tabharfaimid forbhreathnú ar an bparadigm nua seo de “líonraí néaracha le cuimhne”. Cuirfimid ailtireacht aontaithe i láthair do Líonraí Néaracha Méadaithe Cuimhne (MANN) agus pléifimid na bealaí inar féidir le duine dul i ngleic leis an gcuimhne sheachtrach agus mar sin léamh/scríobh uaithi. Ansin tabharfaimid Meaisíní Neural Turing agus Memory Networks isteach mar mhiontuairiscí sonracha den ailtireacht ghinearálta seo. Sa dara leath den rang teagaisc, díreoimid ar dhul chun cinn le déanaí i MANN a dhíríonn ar na ceisteanna seo a leanas: Conas is féidir linn léamh/scríobh ó chuimhne an-mhór ar bhealach inscálaithe? Conas is féidir linn scéimeanna seoltaí éifeachtacha neamhlíneacha a dhearadh? Conas is féidir linn\nréasúnaíocht éifeachtach a dhéanamh ag baint úsáide as cuimhne ar scála mór agus cuimhne eipeasóideach? Tugann freagra ar cheann ar bith de na ceisteanna seo a mhalairt de MANN isteach. Cuirfimid an rang teagaisc i gcrích le roinnt dúshlán oscailte i MANN agus a fheidhmchláir ar NLP. Tabharfaimid isteach roinnt feidhmchlár de chuid MANN in NLP le linn an teagaisc. I measc na samplaí is beag tá samhaltú teanga, freagra ceisteanna, freagairt ceisteanna amhairc, agus córais dialóige. Chun faisnéis agus ábhar nuashonraithe a fháil, féach ar ár suíomh Gréasáin teagaisc: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ka': 'ეფექტიური პარამენტი, რომელიც დიდი მარტივი მეხსიერება და ეპიციოდი მეხსიერება გამოყენება? ამ კითხვების განსახულება MANN-ის განსახულება. ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ სტუალური მხოლოდ რამდენიმე გახსნა გამოსახულება MANN და მისი პროგრამები NLP-ში. ჩვენ NLP-ში მრავალ პროგრამეტრები დავიყენებთ სტუტირებაში. პატარა მაგალითად ენის მოდელირება, კითხვის პასუხი, ვიზუალური კითხვის პასუხი და დიალოგის სისტემი. განახლებული ინფორმაცია და მატერიალის შესახებ, მოდით ჩვენი სტუტურაციული საიბეტის შესახებ: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'hu': 'A hatékony érvelés nagyméretű memóriával és epizódikus memóriával történik? A kérdések bármelyikére adott válasz bemutatja a MANN egy változatát. A bemutatót számos nyitott kihívással zárjuk le a MANN-ben és annak alkalmazásában az NLP-ben. A bemutató során bemutatjuk a MANN számos alkalmazását NLP-ben. Néhány példa közé tartozik a nyelvmodellezés, a kérdésválaszadás, a vizuális kérdésválaszadás és a párbeszédrendszerek. Frissített információkért és anyagokért kérjük, olvassa el a bemutató honlapunkat: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'it': 'Fare ragionamenti efficienti utilizzando memoria su larga scala e una memoria episodica? La risposta a una di queste domande introduce una variante di MANN. Concluderemo il tutorial con diverse sfide aperte in MANN e le sue applicazioni per NLP. Introdurremo diverse applicazioni di MANN in PNL durante il tutorial. Alcuni esempi includono la modellazione linguistica, la risposta alle domande, la risposta visiva alle domande e i sistemi di dialogo. Per informazioni e materiale aggiornati, si prega di fare riferimento al nostro sito tutorial: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'el': 'Κάνει αποτελεσματική συλλογιστική χρησιμοποιώντας μνήμη μεγάλης κλίμακας και επιτακτική μνήμη; Η απάντηση σε οποιαδήποτε από αυτές τις ερωτήσεις εισάγει μια παραλλαγή του MANN. Θα ολοκληρώσουμε το σεμινάριο με αρκετές ανοιχτές προκλήσεις στο MANN και τις εφαρμογές του στο NLP. Θα εισαγάγουμε διάφορες εφαρμογές του σε όλη τη διάρκεια του μαθήματος. Λίγα παραδείγματα περιλαμβάνουν γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση, απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις, οπτική απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις και συστήματα διαλόγου. Για ενημερωμένες πληροφορίες και υλικό, παρακαλούμε ανατρέξτε στην ιστοσελίδα μας εκμάθησης: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'kk': 'Үлкен масштаб жады және эписодикалық жады қолданатын тәжірибелі сезімдеу керек пе? Бұл сұрақтардың біреуінің жауабы МАНН айнымалысын көрсетеді. МАНН және оның қолданбаларының NLP бағдарламасында бірнеше ашық өзгерістерімен оқытуды аяқтаймыз. Біз NLP бағдарламасында бірнеше MANN қолданбаларын келтіреміз. Кейбір мысалдар тілдерді моделдеу, сұрақтар жауап беру, көрінетін сұрақтар жауап беру және диалог жүйелері болады. Жаңарту мәліметі мен материалы үшін біздің оқыту вебсайтымызды қараңыз: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'lt': 'ar veiksmingai pagrįstas didelio masto atmintis ir epizodinis atmintis? Atsakyme į bet kurį iš šių klausimų pateikiamas MANN variantas. Baigsime mokymą su keliais atvirais uždaviniais, susijusiais su MANN ir jos taikymais NLP. Per visą mokymą pateiksime keletą MANN programų NLP. Keletas pavyzdžių – kalbų modeliavimas, atsakymas į klausimus, vizualinis atsakymas į klausimus ir dialogo sistemos. Naujausią informaciją ir medžiagą galima rasti mūsų mokymo svetainėje: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'mk': 'дали ефикасното размислување користи голема меморија и епизодична меморија? Одговорот на секое од овие прашања претставува варијант на MANN. Ќе го завршиме наставникот со неколку отворени предизвици во МАНН и нејзините апликации за НЛП. Ние ќе воведеме неколку апликации на MANN во NLP низ текот на предавањето. Неколку примери вклучуваат јазичко моделирање, одговори на прашања, визуелни одговори на прашања и дијалошки системи. За ажурирани информации и материјали, ве молам погледнете на нашата веб-страница за ученици: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ml': 'വലിയ മെമ്മറി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണമുണ്ടോ? ഈ ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ഏതെങ്കിലും ഉത്തരം മനുഷ്യന്റെ വേറെന്റ് കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം അവസാനിപ്പിക്കും. MANN-ലും അതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളും NLP-ലേക്കും. നമ്മള്\u200d എംഎല്\u200dപിയില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d MANN പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തും. കുറച്ചു ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലേറ്റിംഗ്, ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്നത്, കാഴ്ച ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം, സം പുതുക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളും വസ്തുക്കളും വേണ്ടി, ഞങ്ങളുടെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ വെബ്സൈറ്റിലേക്ക് ക https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ms': 'adakah alasan efisien menggunakan memori skala besar dan memori episodik? Jawapan kepada salah satu soalan ini memperkenalkan variasi MANN. Kami akan menyelesaikan tutorial dengan beberapa cabaran terbuka di MANN dan aplikasinya ke NLP. Kami akan memperkenalkan beberapa aplikasi MANN dalam NLP sepanjang tutorial. Beberapa contoh termasuk pemodelan bahasa, jawapan soalan, jawapan soalan visual, dan sistem dialog. Untuk maklumat dan bahan terkini, sila rujuk ke laman web tutorial kami: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'mt': "ir-raġunament effiċjenti juża memorja fuq skala kbira u memorja episodika? It-tweġiba għal kwalunkwe waħda minn dawn il-mistoqsijiet tintroduċi varjant ta’ MANN. Ser nikkonkludu t-tutorjal b'bosta sfidi miftuħa f'MANN u l-applikazzjonijiet tiegħu għall-NLP. Se nintroduċu diversi applikazzjonijiet ta’ MANN fil-NLP matul it-tutorjal kollu. Ftit eżempji jinkludu mudell tal-lingwa, tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, tweġiba viżwali għall-mistoqsijiet, u sistemi ta’ djalogu. Għal informazzjoni u materjal aġġornati, jekk jogħġbok irreferi għall-websajt tutorjali tagħna: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'no': 'Er det effektivt å bruka stor minne og episodisk minne? Svaret på kvar av desse spørsmålene introduserer ein variant av MANN. Vi vil avslutta opplæringa med fleire opne utfordringar i MANN og programmet til NLP. Vi vil introdusera fleire program av MANN i NLP gjennom opplæringa. Få eksemplar inneheld språk- modellering, spørsmål- svar, visuelle spørsmål- svar og dialogsystemar. For oppdaterte informasjon og materiell refererer til opplæringsnettstaden vår: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ro': 'Nu raționamentul eficient folosind memorie la scară largă și o memorie episodică? Răspunsul la oricare dintre aceste întrebări introduce o variantă a MANN. Vom încheia tutorial-ul cu mai multe provocări deschise în MANN și aplicațiile sale la PNL. Vom introduce mai multe aplicații de MANN în PNL pe tot parcursul tutorial. Puține exemple includ modelarea limbii, răspunsul la întrebări, răspunsul vizual la întrebări și sistemele de dialog. Pentru informații și materiale actualizate, vă rugăm să consultați site-ul nostru tutorial: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'pl': 'Czy skuteczne rozumowanie wykorzystując pamięć dużą skalę i pamięć epizodową? Odpowiedź na jedno z tych pytań wprowadza wariant MANN. Zakończymy poradnik kilkoma otwartymi wyzwaniami w MANN i jego aplikacjach do NLP. Przedstawimy kilka aplikacji MANN w NLP w trakcie poradnika. Kilka przykładów obejmuje modelowanie językowe, odpowiedzi na pytania, wizualne odpowiedzi na pytania i systemy dialogu. Aby uzyskać aktualne informacje i materiały, zapoznaj się z naszą stroną samouczkową: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'mn': 'том хэмжээний санамж болон эписордик санамж ашиглан үр дүнтэй ойлголт хийх вэ? Эдгээр асуултын аль нэгэнд хариулт нь МАНН-ын өөрчлөлтийг илэрхийлж байна. МАНН болон NLP-д олон нээлттэй сорилтуудыг төгсгөл болгох болно. Бид NLP-д хэдэн MANN хэрэглээ сургалтын турш танилцуулна. Хэдхэн жишээ нь хэл загвар, асуулт хариулт, хариулт хариулт, диалог систем юм. Жагсаалттай мэдээлэл, материалуудын тулд бидний сургалтын вебсайт руу харуулъя. https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'sr': 'Da li je efikasno razmišljanje koristeći veliku pamćenje i episodijsku pamćenje? Odgovor na bilo koje od ovih pitanja predstavlja variant MANN. Završićemo nastavnicu sa nekoliko otvorenih izazova u MANN-u i njegovim zahtjevima za NLP-u. Predstaviæemo nekoliko primjena MANN u NLP kroz tutoriju. Nekoliko primjera uključuju jezičke modele, odgovor na pitanje, odgovor na vizualno pitanje i dijalogski sistem. Za aktualizirane informacije i materijale, molim vas, obratite se na naš nastavni sajt: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'si': 'ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් මතකය සහ එපිසෝඩික් මතකය පාවිච්චි කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවද? මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නේ කිසිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයකට ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් MANN වෙනස් කියලා තියෙනවා. අපි අවස්ථානය අවස්ථාවක් වෙන්නේ MANN වලින් විවෘත අභ්\u200dයාගයක් සහ NLP වලින් එයාගේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක්. අපි NLP වලින් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ වැඩසටහන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නම්. ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, සහ සංවාද පද්ධතිය. වැඩි තොරතුරු සහ පද්ධතිය සඳහා, කරුණාකරලා අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන වැබැයිට් වලට පිළිගන්න: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'so': "miyey sabab faa’iido ah ku leeyihiin isticmaalka xasuusta aad u weyn iyo xasuusta dhaqdhaqaaqa? Jawaabtii su'aalahan midkood wuxuu soo saaraa kala duwan MAN. Waxbarashada waxaan ku dhameynaynaa dhibaatooyin furan ee MANN iyo codsigiisa NLP. Waxbarashada oo dhan ayaannu ku soo bandhigaynaa codsiyo badan oo MANMAN ah. Tusaale yar waa tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan luuqada, jawaabta su'aalaha, jawaabta su'aalaha aragga iyo nidaamka dialogka. Wixii macluumaad la cusboonaysiiyey iyo macluumaad la xiriira waxaad ka heleysaa bogagga shabakadda waxbarashada: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'sv': 'gör effektiva resonemang med storskaligt minne och episodiskt minne? Svaret på någon av dessa frågor introducerar en variant av MANN. Vi avslutar handledningen med flera öppna utmaningar i MANN och dess tillämpningar till NLP. Vi kommer att introducera flera applikationer av MANN i NLP under hela handledningen. Några exempel är språkmodellering, frågesvar, visuellt frågesvar och dialogsystem. För uppdaterad information och material, se vår handledningssida: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ta': 'பெரிய அளவு நினைவகம் மற்றும் ஒரு நினைவகம் பயன்படுத்தும் வேறு விவாதம் செய்ய வேண்டுமா? இந்த கேள்விகளில் யாருக்கும் விடை MANN மாறியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. நாம் முடிவு செய்ய வேண்டும் MANN-ல் பல திறந்த சவால்கள் மற்றும் NLP-க்கு அதன் பயன்பாடுகள். நாம் கல்வி முழுவதும் NLP-ல் MANN பல பயன்பாடுகளை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும். சில உதாரணங்கள் மொழி மாதிரிப்பு, கேள்வி பதில், பார்வை கேள்வி மற்றும் உரையாடல் முறைமைகள் உள்ளன. புதுப்பிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் மற்றும் பொருள்களுக்கு, எங்கள் பொருளின் வலைதளத்தை குறிக்கவும்: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ur': 'کیا بڑی اسکیل یاد اور اپیسوڈیک یاد کے مطابق مفصل کے ذریعے مفصل کرتا ہے؟ ان سوالوں میں سے کسی کا جواب MANN کی ایک تغییر پیش کرتا ہے۔ ہم تعلیم کو MANN میں چند کھلی چالوں کے ساتھ تمام کر دیں گے اور اس کے لئے NLP کے لئے آسان کاروبار۔ ہم نے NLP میں بہت سی کاربرد پیش کریں گے۔ بہت کم مثالیں زبان موڈلینگ، سوال جواب، بصیرت سوال جواب، اور диалог سیسٹم ہیں. آدٹر کی معلومات اور مواد کے لئے، لطفاً ہمارے ٹوٹوریل ویب سائٹ پر اشارہ کرو: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'uz': "juda katta xotira va episodik xotirasi yordamida murakkab bo'lishi mumkin? Bu savollarning biri javob, MAN'ning turini o'zgartiradi. Biz o'qituvchi o'qituvchini MANN'da ko'p ochiq qismi bilan tugatamiz va uni NLP dasturlariga ishlaymiz. Biz o'qituvchi davomida NLP davomida ko'pgina dasturlarni ko'rsatamiz. Koʻp misollar tilni modellash, savol javob beradi, visual savol javob beradi va dialog tizimlari bor. @ info https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'vi': 'có lập trình hiệu quả sử dụng trí nhớ quy mô lớn và trí nhớ episodic? Câu trả lời cho một trong những câu hỏi này giới thiệu một biến biến của kênh Mãnh. Chúng tôi sẽ kết thúc bài huấn luyện với nhiều thử thách mở ở Mãnh và các ứng dụng của đài NLP. Chúng tôi sẽ đưa ra vài ứng dụng của NHN ở N.P trong suốt bài huấn luyện. Chỉ có vài ví dụ: mềm ngôn ngữ, câu hỏi, câu trả lời hình ảnh, và hệ thống đối thoại. Tìm thông tin và tài liệu cập nhật, xem trang web huấn luyện của chúng tôi: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'bg': 'Ефективно разсъждаване, използвайки мащабна памет и епизодична памет? Отговорът на всеки един от тези въпроси въвежда вариант на МАН. Ще завършим урока с няколко отворени предизвикателства в МАНН и приложенията му към НЛО. Ще въведем няколко приложения на МАНН в НЛП през целия урок. Малко примери включват езиково моделиране, отговаряне на въпроси, визуално отговаряне на въпроси и диалогови системи. За актуална информация и материали, моля, вижте нашия сайт за урок: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'da': 'gør effektive ræsonnementer ved hjælp af storskala hukommelse og en episodisk hukommelse? Svaret på et af disse spørgsmål introducerer en variant af MANN. Vi afslutter vejledningen med flere åbne udfordringer i MANN og dens ansøgninger til NLP. Vi vil introducere flere anvendelser af MANN i NLP gennem vejledningen. Få eksempler omfatter sprogmodellering, spørgsmål besvarelse, visuel spørgsmål besvarelse og dialogsystemer. For opdateret information og materiale, henvises til vores tutorial hjemmeside: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'de': 'Effizientes Denken mit großem Speicher und episodischem Gedächtnis? Die Antwort auf eine dieser Fragen stellt eine Variante von MANN vor. Wir schließen das Tutorial mit einigen offenen Herausforderungen in MANN und seinen Anwendungen für NLP ab. Wir werden einige Anwendungen von MANN in NLP während des Tutorials vorstellen. Einige Beispiele sind Sprachmodellierung, Fragebeantwortung, visuelle Fragebeantwortung und Dialogsysteme. Aktualisierte Informationen und Materialien finden Sie auf unserer Tutorial-Website: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'nl': 'Efficiënt redeneren met behulp van grootschalig geheugen en een episodisch geheugen? Het antwoord op een van deze vragen introduceert een variant van MANN. We sluiten de tutorial af met een aantal open uitdagingen in MANN en zijn toepassingen voor NLP. We zullen verschillende toepassingen van MANN in NLP introduceren gedurende de tutorial. Weinig voorbeelden zijn taalmodellering, vragen beantwoorden, visueel vragen beantwoorden en dialoogsystemen. Voor bijgewerkte informatie en materiaal verwijzen wij u naar onze tutorial website: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'hr': 'da li je učinkovito razmišljanje koristeći veliku skalu sjećanja i episodijsko sjećanje? Odgovor na bilo koje od tih pitanja predstavlja variant MANN. Završit ćemo nastavnicu s nekoliko otvorenih izazova u MANN-u i njegovim zahtjevima za NLP-u. Predstavit ćemo nekoliko primjena MANN u NLP tijekom nastavnika. Nekoliko primjera uključuju jezičke modele, odgovor na pitanja, odgovor na vizualno pitanje i dijalogski sustav. Za aktualizirane informacije i materijale, molim vas, obratite se na našu školsku stranicu: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'id': 'do efficient reasoning using large scale memory and an episodic memory?  Jawabannya pada salah satu pertanyaan ini memperkenalkan variasi dari MANN. Kami akan menyelesaikan tutorial dengan beberapa tantangan terbuka di MANN dan aplikasinya ke NLP. Kami akan memperkenalkan beberapa aplikasi MANN di NLP sepanjang tutorial. Beberapa contoh termasuk model bahasa, jawaban pertanyaan, jawaban pertanyaan visual, dan sistem dialog. Untuk informasi dan bahan terbaru, silakan merujuk ke situs tutorial kami: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ko': '대규모 기억과 상황 기억을 사용하여 효과적인 추리를 할 수 있습니까?이 질문들 중 어떤 답도 MANN의 변체를 도입했다.우리는 MANN과 NLP에서의 응용 프로그램의 몇 가지 개방적인 도전으로 이 강좌를 끝낼 것이다.전체 강좌에서, 우리는 MANN이 NLP에서 사용하는 몇 가지 응용을 소개할 것이다.언어 모델링, 문답, 시각화 문답, 대화 시스템을 포함한 예는 드물다.최신 정보 및 자료는 자습서 웹 사이트를 참조하십시오.https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'fa': 'آیا با استفاده از حافظه\u200cی مقیاس بزرگ و حافظه\u200cی episodic موثر است؟ پاسخ به هر کدام از این سوالات تغییر MANN را معرفی می کند. ما آموزش را با چند چالش باز در MANN و کاربردهای آن به NLP پایان خواهیم داد. ما چندتا کاربرد MANN را در NLP در طول آموزش معرفی خواهیم کرد. مثال کمی شامل نمونه\u200cسازی زبان، جواب سوال، جواب سوال دیده و سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو است. برای اطلاعات و مواد جدید شده، لطفاً به وبسایت آموزشی ما ارائه کنید: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'sw': 'wanafanya maana yenye ufanisi kwa kutumia kumbukumbu kubwa na kumbukumbu ya kipindi? Jibu la swali lolote hili linaleta tofauti ya MANN. Tutaihitimisha somo hilo kwa changamoto kadhaa za wazi nchini MANN na matumizi yake kwa NLP. We will introduce several applications of MANN in NLP throughout the tutorial.  Mifano michache ni pamoja na mifano ya lugha, majibu ya maswali, majibu ya kuona, na mfumo wa mazungumzo. Kwa taarifa mpya na vifaa vipya, tafadhali maana tovuti yetu ya ufundi: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'sq': 'a ka arsyetim të efektshëm duke përdorur kujtesë në shkallë të madhe dhe një kujtesë episodike? Përgjigja për ndonjë nga këto pyetje paraqet një variant të MANN. Ne do të përfundojmë tutorial in me disa sfida të hapura në MANN dhe aplikimet e tij për NLP. Do të futim disa aplikime të MANN në NLP gjatë gjithë mësimit. Pak shembuj përfshijnë modelimin e gjuhës, përgjigjen e pyetjeve, përgjigjen vizuale të pyetjeve dhe sistemet e dialogut. Për informacionin dhe materialin e përditësuar, ju lutem referohuni në faqen e tutorialit tonë: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'am': 'ትልቅ ማስታወሻ እና የepisodic ማስታወሻ የመጠቀም ጥሩ ምክንያት ይችላልን? ወደዚህ ጥያቄዎች ማንኛውም መልስ መልስ የሰው ልዩ ልዩ ነው፡፡ ትምህርቱን በማህኒ እና በNLP ላይ የተከፈተ ምርጫዎችን እናቆማለን፡፡ በ ትምህርት ሁሉ የሰን ፕሮግራሞች በNLP ውስጥ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ጥቂቶች ምሳሌዎች የቋንቋ ምሳሌ ምሳሌ፣ ጥያቄ መልስ፣ የራእይ ጥያቄ መልስ እና የመdialog ስርዓቶች ናቸው፡፡ በማሻሻል መረጃ እና ማህበረሰብ እባክዎ ትምህርት ማድረጊያውን ተመልከቱ፡ https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'hy': 'արդյո՞ք արդյունավետ մտածելակերպը օգտագործելով մեծ մասշտաբ հիշողություն և հաճախ հիշողություն: Այս հարցերից յուրաքանչյուրի պատասխանը ներկայացնում է MAN-ի տարբերակը: We will conclude the tutorial with several open challenges in MANN and its applications to NLP. Մենք կներկայացնենք MAN-ի մի քանի ծրագրեր ՆԼՊ-ում դասարանի ընթացքում: Մի քանի օրինակ ներառում են լեզվի մոդելը, հարցերի պատասխանը, տեսողական հարցերի պատասխանը և երկխոսային համակարգերը: Զարգացված ինֆորմացիայի և նյութերի համար գտնեք մեր դասարանի կայքը. https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'tr': "Ullakan yada we episodik yada ullanyşyny etjek hili düşündirilir? Bu soraglaryň hiçbiri üçin jogaby MANN üýtgeşigini tanyşdyrýar. Biz tutumyny MANN we NLP'a açyk kynçylyklary bilen çykarjak. Özgürim ýüzerinde MANN'yň birnäçe uygulamalaryny NLP'da tanyşdyrjak. Käçe mysal dil modellendirmesi, soragy jogaplary, görsel soragy jogaplary we dialoglary ýazmakda. Täzelenýän maglumat we maglumat üçin, haýyşt tutorial website'ymyza görä: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'af': "doen effektief redening gebruik groot skaal geheue en 'n episodiese geheue? Die antwoord na enige van hierdie vrae introduseer 'n variant van MANN. Ons sal die onderwyseling sluit met verskeie oop uitdagings in MANN en sy toepassings na NLP. Ons sal verskeie toepassings van MANN in NLP voorsien deur die onderwerp. Nog voorbeelde insluit taal modellering, vraag antwoord, visuele vraag antwoord en dialoog stelsels. Vir opdateerde inligting en materiaal, verwys asseblief na ons onderwerp webwerp: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'az': 'böyük ölçü yadına və episodik yadına istifadə etmək mümkün mümkün müəyyən edir? Bu suallardan hər birinin cavabı MANN dəyişikliyini tanıyır. Biz öyrəndiyimizi MANN və NLP üçün çox açıq çətinliklərlə bitirəcəyik. Biz NLP-də bir neçə məsələlər təhsil edəcəyik. Daha az misallar dil modelləri, sual cavab vermək, görsel sual cavab vermək və dialog sistemləri içəridir. Güncellənmiş məlumat və materyal üçün, lütfen bizim öyrəndiyimiz səhifələrimizə baxın: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'bn': 'do efficient reasoning using large scale memory and an episodic memory?  এই প্রশ্নের উত্তর ম্যানেন্টের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন। আমরা শিক্ষার্থীকে শেষ করব ম্যানেন এবং এনএলপির কাছে তার বেশ কিছু উন্মুক্ত চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে। আমরা শিক্ষার্থীর সারা এনএলপিতে ম্যানেনের বেশ কিছু অ্যাপ্লিকেশন পরিচয় করিয়ে দেব। কয়েকটি উদাহরণ আছে ভাষার মডেলিং, প্রশ্নের উত্তর, দৃশ্য প্রশ্নের উত্তর এবং ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম। নতুন তথ্য এবং উপাদানের জন্য দয়া করে আমাদের শিক্ষার্থীর ওয়েবসাইটে উল্লেখ করুন: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'bs': 'Da li je efikasno razmišljanje koristeći veliku sjećanje i episodijsku sjećanje? Odgovor na bilo koje od ovih pitanja predstavlja variant MANN. Završićemo nastavnicu s nekoliko otvorenih izazova u MANN-u i njegovim zahtjevima za NLP-u. Predstavit ćemo nekoliko primjena MANN u NLP tokom tutorije. Nekoliko primjera uključuje jezik modeliranje, odgovor na pitanje, odgovor na vizualno pitanje i dijalogski sistem. Za aktualizirane informacije i materijale, molim vas, obratite se na našu školsku stranicu: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ca': "tenen raonament eficient utilitzant memòria a gran escala i una memòria episòdica? La resposta a qualsevol d'aquestes preguntes introdueix una variant de MANN. Finarem el tutorial amb diversos reptes oberts a MANN i les seves aplicacions a NLP. Introduirem diverses aplicacions de MANN a NLP durant el tutorial. Pocs exemples inclouen modelar llengües, respondre a preguntes, respondre a preguntes visuals i sistemes de diàleg. Per a obtenir informació actualitzada i material, veureu la nostra pàgina web del tutorial: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'cs': 'Dělat efektivní uvažování pomocí paměti velkého měřítka a epizodické paměti? Odpověď na některou z těchto otázek představuje variantu MANN. Tutoriál zakončíme několika otevřenými výzvami v MANN a jeho aplikacích na NLP. V průběhu návodu představíme několik aplikací MANN v NLP. Málo příkladů zahrnuje jazykové modelování, odpovědi na otázky, vizuální odpovědi na otázky a dialogové systémy. Aktualizované informace a materiály naleznete na našich webových stránkách výuky: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'et': 'Kas tõhus mõtlemine kasutab suurt mälu ja episoodilist mälu? Vastus ühele neist küsimustest tutvustab MANN varianti. Lõpetame õppetunni mitme avatud väljakutsega MANN ja selle rakendused NLP. Tutvustame mitmeid MANN rakendusi NLP kogu õpetuse. Vähesed näited on keele modelleerimine, küsimustele vastamine, visuaalne küsimustele vastamine ja dialoogisüsteemid. Uuendatud teabe ja materjali saamiseks vaadake meie õpetuse veebilehte: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'fi': 'Tekeekö tehokasta päättelyä käyttäen suurta muistia ja episodista muistia? Vastaus mihin tahansa näistä kysymyksistä esittelee MANN-version. Päätämme tutoriaalin useisiin avoimiin haasteisiin MANN:ssä ja sen sovelluksissa NLP:ssä. Esittelemme useita MANN-sovelluksia NLP:ssä koko opetusohjelman. Muutamia esimerkkejä ovat kielimallinnus, kysymyksenvastaus, visuaalinen kysymyksenvastaus ja dialogijärjestelmät. Päivitettyä tietoa ja materiaalia saat ohjesivuiltamme: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Aparip sampeyan karo akeh sing runggo iki dadi nyimpen manut karo variant LIAN Awak dhéwé bakal terus akeh tutorial karo akeh operasi kanggo ngilangno MAN lan aplikasi NLP. Awak dhéwé nggawe akeh aplikasi kanggo NLP ning tutorial. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'ha': "za'a yi mataimaki da amfani da kumbar mai girma da lokaci? Jami'a ga kõwa daga wannan tambayi yana ƙãga wata dabar'a na MAN. Za samun tutor da wasu masu buɗe masu cikin MANN da shiryoyinsa zuwa NLP. Za cire wasu shiryoyin ayuka na MAMAN cikin NLP kowace tufãfin. Kaɗan misãlai sun include misãlai masu motsi da harshe, mai karɓa wa tambaya, mai tambaya masu gani da sunana da tsarin zauren akwatin bayani. Don ka sami zuwa tare da zane-zane-zane: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.", 'he': 'האם הגיון יעיל בשימוש בזיכרון בקנה מידה גדולה וזיכרון פרקי? התשובה לכל שאלה הזאת מציגה שונה של MANN. אנחנו נסיים את הלימודים עם מספר אתגרים פתוחים במאן והיישומים שלהם ל-NLP. אנחנו נציג כמה שימושים של MANN ב NLP במהלך הלימודים. כמה דוגמאות כוללות דוגמאות שפה, תשובות לשאלות, תשובות לשאלות ויזואליות, ומערכות דיאלוג. עבור מידע ומחומר מעודכן, בבקשה רשום לאתר הלימודים שלנו: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'sk': 'Ali učinkovito razmišljanje z uporabo velikega pomnilnika in episodičnega spomina? Odgovor na katero koli od teh vprašanj uvaja različico MANN. Vodnik bomo zaključili z več odprtimi izzivi v MANN in njegovih aplikacijah za NLP. V vadnici bomo predstavili več aplikacij MANN v NLP. Nekaj primerov vključuje jezikovno modeliranje, odgovarjanje na vprašanja, vizualno odgovarjanje na vprašanja in sisteme dialoga. Za posodobljene informacije in gradivo si oglejte našo spletno stran vadnic: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་ཚད་ཆེ་བ་དང་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་དྲན་ཚད་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་འཇུག་གི་ཡིན་ནམ། འདྲི་ཚིག་གང་རུང་ནང་མི་གཅིག་གི་ལན་གསལ་ལྗོད་ནི་MANN་གི་བཟོ་རྒྱུད་ཅིག་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད། འུ་ཚོས་MANN དང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཚུ་ NLP ནང་དུ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ལ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་མཇུག་བསྡད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་NLP ལ་tutorial་ཐོག་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གཅིག་པུ་སྟོན་དགོས། དཔེར་ན། སྐད་ཡིག For updated information and material, please refer to our tutorial website: https://sites.google.com/view/mann-emnlp2017/.'}
{'en': 'Cross-Lingual Word Representations : Induction and Evaluation', 'ar': 'تمثيل الكلمات عبر اللغات: الاستقراء والتقييم', 'es': 'Representaciones de palabras en varios idiomas: inducción y evaluación', 'fr': 'Représentations de mots multilingues\xa0: initiation et évaluation', 'pt': 'Representações de palavras em vários idiomas: indução e avaliação', 'zh': '跨语单词:归和评估', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル単語表現：誘導と評価', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वर्ड रिप्रेजेंटेशन: प्रेरण और मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Межязычные представления слов: индукция и оценка', 'ga': 'Léirithe Focal Trastheangacha: Ionduchtú agus Meastóireacht', 'ka': 'გარეშე სიტყვების გამოსახულება: ინდექცია და განსახულება', 'el': 'Διασγλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων: επαγωγή και αξιολόγηση', 'hu': 'Nyelvközi szóreprezentációk: indukció és értékelés', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni linguistiche di parole: induzione e valutazione', 'kk': 'Тіпті тілікті сөздерді таңдау: индукция және оқу', 'lt': 'Tarptautiniai žodžių atstovai: indukcija ir vertinimas', 'mk': 'Претставувања на меѓујазички зборови: индукција и евалуација', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Perkataan Selasa-Bahasa: Induksi dan Penghargaan', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d വാക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d: Induction and Evaluation', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-Kliem Translingwi: Induzzjoni u Evalwazzjoni', 'mn': 'Хөгжлийн үг төлөвлөгөө: зориулалт, үнэлгээ', 'no': 'Tekstrepresentasjonar på krysspråk: Induksjon og evaluering', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea interlingvistică a cuvintelor: inducție și evaluare', 'sr': 'Predstavljanja preko jezika: Indukcija i procjena', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne reprezentacje słów: indukcja i ocena', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවක් වචන ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය: විශාල සහ විශේෂණය', 'so': 'Representation of Ereyga iskuulka: Induction and evaluation', 'ta': 'குறுக்கு- கோட்டு வார்த்தை பிரதிநிதிகள்: காட்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பு', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkiga ordrepresentationer: Induktion och utvärdering', 'ur': 'Cross-Lingual Word Representations: Induction and Evaluation', 'uz': '& Koò£pburchak', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Междуезични думи: индукция и оценка', 'da': 'Tværsprogede ordrepræsentationer: Induktion og evaluering', 'hr': 'Predstavi preko jezičkih riječi: Indukcija i procjena', 'nl': 'Taaloverschrijdende woordvertegenwoordigingen: inductie en evaluatie', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende Wortdarstellungen: Induktion und Evaluation', 'ko': '다중 언어 어휘 표징: 귀납과 평가', 'id': 'Perwakilan Perkataan Selasa Bahasa: Induksi dan Evaluasi', 'fa': 'نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط زبان: تحریک و ارزیابی', 'sw': 'Representations of cross-Lingua Word: Induction and Evaluation', 'af': 'Kruis- Linguale Woord voorstellings: Induksie en Evaluering', 'tr': 'Çot-Dilli söz temsilleri: Induction and Evaluation', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuese fjalësh ndërgjuhëse: induksion dhe vlerësim', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Cross-Lingual Word Representations: Induction and Evaluation', 'az': 'Çərpçək Sözlük Təşkiləri: Induksyon və Qıymet', 'bn': 'ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়াল শব্দ প্রতিনিধি', 'bs': 'Predstavi preko-jezičkih riječi: Indukcija i procjena', 'ca': 'Representacions de paraules translingües: Inducció i Evaluació', 'cs': 'Interlingvální slovní reprezentace: indukce a hodnocení', 'et': 'Keeleülesed sõnaesindused: induktsioon ja hindamine', 'fi': 'Kieltenväliset sanaesitykset: induktio ja arviointi', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Medjezikovne besedne predstavitve: indukcija in vrednotenje', 'he': 'מייצגות מילים ברצוע לשונות: דליקה ובעריכה', 'bo': 'Cross-Lingual Word Representations: Induction and Evaluation'}
{'en': 'In recent past, NLP as a field has seen tremendous utility of distributional word vector representations as features in downstream tasks. The fact that these word vectors can be trained on unlabeled monolingual corpora of a language makes them an inexpensive resource in NLP. With the increasing use of monolingual word vectors, there is a need for word vectors that can be used as efficiently across multiple languages as monolingually. Therefore, learning bilingual and multilingual word embeddings / vectors is currently an important research topic. These vectors offer an elegant and language-pair independent way to represent content across different languages. This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning. We will first discuss how to induce cross-lingual word representations (covering both bilingual and multilingual ones) from various data types and resources (e.g., parallel data, comparable data, non-aligned monolingual data in different languages, dictionaries and theasuri, or, even, images, eye-tracking data). We will then discuss how to evaluate such representations, intrinsically and extrinsically. We will introduce researchers to state-of-the-art methods for constructing cross-lingual word representations and discuss their applicability in a broad range of downstream NLP applications. We will deliver a detailed survey of the current methods, discuss best training and evaluation practices and use-cases, and provide links to publicly available implementations, datasets, and pre-trained models.', 'ar': 'في الماضي القريب ، شهد البرمجة اللغوية العصبية كحقل فائدة هائلة لتمثيل متجه الكلمات التوزيعية كميزات في مهام المصب. حقيقة أن نواقل الكلمات هذه يمكن تدريبها على مجموعات أحادية اللغة غير مسماة للغة تجعلها موردًا غير مكلف في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. مع الاستخدام المتزايد لمتجهات الكلمات أحادية اللغة ، هناك حاجة لمتجهات الكلمات التي يمكن استخدامها بكفاءة عبر لغات متعددة كما هو الحال في لغة واحدة. لذلك ، يعد تعلم تضمين الكلمات ثنائية اللغة ومتعددة اللغات موضوعًا بحثيًا مهمًا حاليًا. تقدم هذه المتجهات طريقة أنيقة ومستقلة ثنائية اللغة لتمثيل المحتوى عبر لغات مختلفة. يهدف هذا البرنامج التعليمي إلى جعل الباحثين في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية يواكبون التقنيات الحالية في تعلم تمثيل الكلمات عبر اللغات. سنناقش أولاً كيفية استحثاث تمثيلات الكلمات متعددة اللغات (تغطي تمثيلات ثنائية اللغة ومتعددة اللغات) من أنواع وموارد بيانات مختلفة (على سبيل المثال ، بيانات متوازية ، بيانات قابلة للمقارنة ، بيانات أحادية اللغة غير متوائمة بلغات وقواميس وثقالات مختلفة ، أو ، حتى الصور وبيانات تتبع العين). سنناقش بعد ذلك كيفية تقييم مثل هذه التمثيلات داخليًا وخارجيًا. سنقدم للباحثين أحدث الأساليب لبناء تمثيلات للكلمات متعددة اللغات ومناقشة قابليتها للتطبيق في مجموعة واسعة من تطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP) ، وسنقدم مسحًا تفصيليًا للطرق الحالية ، ونناقش أفضل ممارسات التدريب والتقييم\nوحالات الاستخدام ، وتوفير روابط لعمليات التنفيذ ومجموعات البيانات والنماذج المدربة مسبقًا المتاحة للجمهور.', 'pt': 'No passado recente, a PNL como um campo viu uma tremenda utilidade de representações de vetores de palavras de distribuição como recursos em tarefas de downstream. O fato de que esses vetores de palavras podem ser treinados em corpora monolíngues não rotulados de uma língua os torna um recurso barato em PNL. Com o crescente uso de vetores de palavras monolíngues, há uma necessidade de vetores de palavras que possam ser usados de forma tão eficiente em vários idiomas quanto monolíngue. Portanto, aprender incorporações/vetores de palavras bilíngues e multilíngues é atualmente um importante tópico de pesquisa. Esses vetores oferecem uma maneira elegante e independente de par de idiomas para representar conteúdo em diferentes idiomas. Este tutorial visa trazer pesquisadores de PNL para a velocidade com as técnicas atuais no aprendizado de representação de palavras em vários idiomas. Discutiremos primeiro como induzir representações de palavras em vários idiomas (cobrindo tanto bilíngues quanto multilíngues) de vários tipos de dados e recursos (por exemplo, dados paralelos, dados comparáveis, dados monolíngues não alinhados em diferentes idiomas, dicionários e theasuri, ou, mesmo, imagens, dados de rastreamento ocular). Discutiremos então como avaliar tais representações, intrínseca e extrinsecamente. Apresentaremos aos pesquisadores métodos de última geração para construir representações de palavras em vários idiomas e discutiremos sua aplicabilidade em uma ampla gama de aplicações de PNL downstream. Entregaremos uma pesquisa detalhada dos métodos atuais, discutiremos as melhores práticas de treinamento e avaliação\ne casos de uso, além de fornecer links para implementações, conjuntos de dados e modelos pré-treinados publicamente disponíveis.', 'es': 'En el pasado reciente, la PNL como campo ha visto una enorme utilidad de las representaciones distributivas de vectores de palabras como características en las tareas posteriores. El hecho de que estos vectores de palabras puedan entrenarse en corpus monolingües no etiquetados de un idioma los convierte en un recurso económico en PNL. Con el uso creciente de vectores de palabras monolingües, existe la necesidad de vectores de palabras que puedan usarse de manera tan eficiente en múltiples idiomas como monolingües. Por lo tanto, el aprendizaje de inserciones/vectores de palabras bilingües y multilingües es actualmente un tema de investigación importante. Estos vectores ofrecen una forma elegante e independiente del par de idiomas para representar el contenido en diferentes idiomas. Este tutorial tiene como objetivo poner a los investigadores de PNL al día con las técnicas actuales de aprendizaje de representación de palabras en varios idiomas. Primero discutiremos cómo inducir representaciones de palabras en varios idiomas (tanto bilingües como multilingües) a partir de varios tipos de datos y recursos (por ejemplo, datos paralelos, datos comparables, datos monolingües no alineados en diferentes idiomas, diccionarios y theasuri, o, incluso, imágenes, datos de seguimiento ocular). Luego discutiremos cómo evaluar tales representaciones, intrínseca y extrínsecamente. Presentaremos a los investigadores los métodos más avanzados para construir representaciones de palabras en varios idiomas y discutiremos su aplicabilidad en una amplia gama de aplicaciones posteriores de PNL. Realizaremos un estudio detallado de los métodos actuales, discutiremos las mejores prácticas de capacitación y evaluación\ny casos de uso, y proporcionar enlaces a implementaciones disponibles públicamente, conjuntos de datos y modelos previamente entrenados.', 'fr': "Dans un passé récent, la PNL en tant que domaine a vu l'utilité considérable des représentations vectorielles de mots distributionnelles en tant que caractéristiques dans les tâches en aval. Le fait que ces vecteurs de mots puissent être formés sur des corpus monolingues non étiquetés d'une langue en fait une ressource peu coûteuse en PNL. Avec l'utilisation croissante des vecteurs de mots monolingues, il existe un besoin de vecteurs de mots pouvant être utilisés aussi efficacement dans plusieurs langues que dans une seule langue. Par conséquent, l'apprentissage des intégrations/vecteurs de mots bilingues et multilingues est actuellement un sujet de recherche important. Ces vecteurs offrent un moyen élégant et indépendant de la paire de langues de représenter le contenu dans différentes langues. Ce tutoriel vise à familiariser les chercheurs en PNL avec les techniques actuelles d'apprentissage de la représentation de mots multilingue. Nous allons d'abord discuter de la manière d'induire des représentations de mots multilingues (couvrant à la fois les langues bilingues et multilingues) à partir de divers types de données et ressources (par exemple, données parallèles, données monolingues non alignées dans différentes langues, dictionnaires et theasuri, ou même images, données oculométriques). Nous discuterons ensuite de la façon d'évaluer ces représentations, intrinsèquement et extrinsèquement. Nous présenterons aux chercheurs des méthodes de pointe pour construire des représentations de mots multilingues et discuterons de leur applicabilité dans un large éventail d'applications de PNL en aval. Nous fournirons une étude détaillée des méthodes actuelles, discuterons des meilleures pratiques de formation et d'évaluation\net des cas d'utilisation, et fournissent des liens vers des implémentations, des ensembles de données et des modèles pré-entraînés accessibles au public.", 'ja': '近年、フィールドとしてのNLPは、下流タスクの特徴として、分布ワードベクトル表現の膨大な有用性を見てきた。 これらの単語ベクトルは、言語のラベル付けされていない単語のコーパスで訓練することができるという事実は、それらをNLPの安価なリソースとしている。 単一言語のワードベクトルの使用の増加に伴い、単一言語と同様に複数の言語にわたって効率的に使用できるワードベクトルが必要とされている。 したがって、バイリンガルおよび多言語の単語埋め込み/ベクターを学習することは、現在重要な研究トピックです。 これらのベクトルは、さまざまな言語でコンテンツを表現するためのエレガントで言語ペアの独立した方法を提供します。このチュートリアルは、NLP研究者がクロスリンガルの単語表現学習の現在のテクニックをスピードアップすることを目的としています。 まず、さまざまなデータタイプとリソース（例えば、並列データ、比較可能なデータ、さまざまな言語の非整合単一言語データ、辞書とテアスリ、または画像、目追跡データ）からクロスリンガルの単語表現（バイリンガルと多言語の両方をカバーする）を誘導する方法について説明します。 次に、そのような表現を本質的に、そして外部的に評価する方法について説明します。 私たちは、研究者にクロスリンガルの単語表現を構築するための最先端の方法を紹介し、幅広い下流のNLPアプリケーションへのそれらの適用性について議論します。私たちは、現在の方法の詳細な調査を提供し、最良のトレーニングと評価実践について議論します\n公開されている実装、データセット、および事前にトレーニングされたモデルへのリンクを提供します。', 'zh': '近者,NLP为一域已见分布词向量示为下流之大功也。 此词向量可以教习于一言之单语料库,使成廉价之资于NLP也。 随单语词向量用益多,须跨多种语言单语高效词向量。 故学双语多语言词嵌/向量目前要研究课题也。 此矢量优而独立者也。 本教程旨在使NLP治人速得跨语单词示学之方也。 臣等将首论诸数据类型资源(例,并行数据,可较数据,不同言语者非齐单语数,字典与theasuri,甚至图像,眼动追踪数据)中诱导言语单词示(涵盖双语多语)。 然后,我们将议论从内和外在的角度评料这些表徵。 将介于治人之言单词示最先进之法,而论其下流NLP宜用中适用性。 当详考当今之法,论最佳培训与评实践\n和用例者,明所以成数集和预练模形之链接也。', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, tá an-áisiúlacht léirithe ag veicteoirí focal dáileacháin mar ghnéithe i dtascanna iartheachtacha le NLP mar réimse. Toisc gur féidir na veicteoirí focal seo a oiliúint ar chorpas aonteangach teanga gan lipéad, is acmhainn neamhchostasach iad in NLP. Agus úsáid mhéadaithe á baint as veicteoirí focal aonteangacha, tá gá le veicteoirí focal ar féidir iad a úsáid ar bhealach chomh héifeachtach thar teangacha iolracha agus atá aonteangach. Mar sin, is ábhar tábhachtach taighde faoi láthair í foghlaim leabaithe/veicteora focal dátheangacha agus ilteangacha. Tairgeann na veicteoirí seo bealach galánta neamhspleách le péire teangacha chun ábhar a léiriú thar theangacha éagsúla. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an rang teagaisc seo taighdeoirí NLP a chur ar an eolas faoi na teicnící reatha i bhfoghlaim ionadaíochta focal tras-teangacha. Pléifimid ar dtús conas léiriúcháin focal tras-teangacha (a chlúdaíonn na cinn dhátheangacha agus ilteangacha araon) a aslú ó chineálacha sonraí agus acmhainní éagsúla (m.sh., sonraí comhthreomhara, sonraí inchomparáide, sonraí aonteangacha neamh-ailínithe i dteangacha éagsúla, foclóirí agus teasárais, nó, fiú, íomhánna, sonraí rianaithe súl). Pléifimid ansin conas léiriúcháin dá leithéid a mheas, go hintreach agus go heisreach. Cuirfimid modhanna úrscothacha in aithne do thaighdeoirí chun léirithe trasteangacha focal a dhéanamh agus pléifimid a n-infheidhmeacht i raon leathan d’fheidhmchláir NLP iartheachtacha.\nagus cásanna úsáide, agus cuireann siad naisc ar fáil le feidhmiúcháin, tacair shonraí agus samhlacha réamhoilte atá ar fáil go poiblí.', 'hi': 'हाल के दिनों में, एक क्षेत्र के रूप में एनएलपी ने डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों में सुविधाओं के रूप में वितरण शब्द वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व की जबरदस्त उपयोगिता देखी है। तथ्य यह है कि इन शब्द वैक्टरों को एक भाषा के अनलेबल मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया जा सकता है, उन्हें एनएलपी में एक सस्ता संसाधन बनाता है। मोनोलिंगुअल शब्द वैक्टर के बढ़ते उपयोग के साथ, शब्द वैक्टर की आवश्यकता है जिसे मोनोलिंगुअल रूप से कई भाषाओं में कुशलतापूर्वक उपयोग किया जा सकता है। इसलिए, द्विभाषी और बहुभाषी शब्द एम्बेडिंग / वैक्टर सीखना वर्तमान में एक महत्वपूर्ण शोध विषय है। ये वैक्टर विभिन्न भाषाओं में सामग्री का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एक सुरुचिपूर्ण और भाषा-जोड़ी स्वतंत्र तरीका प्रदान करते हैं। इस ट्यूटोरियल का उद्देश्य एनएलपी शोधकर्ताओं को क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने में वर्तमान तकनीकों के साथ गति के लिए लाना है। हम पहले चर्चा करेंगे कि विभिन्न डेटा प्रकारों और संसाधनों (जैसे, समानांतर डेटा, तुलनीय डेटा, विभिन्न भाषाओं, शब्दकोशों और थीसूरी में गैर-संरेखित मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा, या, यहां तक कि, छवियों, आंखों पर नज़र रखने वाले डेटा) से क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व (द्विभाषी और बहुभाषी दोनों को कवर करना) को कैसे प्रेरित किया जाए। फिर हम चर्चा करेंगे कि इस तरह के अभ्यावेदनों का मूल्यांकन कैसे किया जाए, आंतरिक और बाह्य रूप से। हम शोधकर्ताओं को क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के निर्माण के लिए अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से परिचित कराएंगे और डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में उनकी प्रयोज्यता पर चर्चा करेंगे। हम वर्तमान तरीकों का एक विस्तृत सर्वेक्षण प्रदान करेंगे, सर्वोत्तम प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन प्रथाओं पर चर्चा करेंगे\nऔर उपयोग-मामलों, और सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कार्यान्वयन, डेटासेट और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल के लिए लिंक प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В недавнем прошлом NLP как поле видела огромную полезность дистрибутивных представлений вектора слов как особенностей в задачах ниже по потоку. Тот факт, что эти словесные векторы могут быть обучены на немеченых одноязычных корпусах языка, делает их недорогим ресурсом в NLP. С ростом использования одноязычных векторов слов существует потребность в векторах слов, которые могут использоваться так же эффективно на нескольких языках, как и одноязычно. Поэтому изучение двуязычных и многоязычных вложений/векторов слов в настоящее время является важной темой исследования. Эти векторы предлагают элегантный и независимый от языковой пары способ представления контента на разных языках. Этот учебник направлен на то, чтобы привести исследователей NLP в соответствие с современными методами межязычного обучения представлению слов. Сначала мы обсудим, как стимулировать межязычные представления слов (охватывающие как двуязычные, так и многоязычные) из различных типов данных и ресурсов (например, параллельные данные, сопоставимые данные, неприведенные одноязычные данные на разных языках, словари и теасури или, даже, изображения, данные отслеживания глаз). Затем мы обсудим, как оценивать такие представления, как изначально, так и извне. Мы познакомим исследователей с современными методами построения кросс-лингвистических словопредставлений и обсудим их применимость в широком спектре последующих приложений NLP. Мы проведем подробный обзор текущих методов, обсудим лучшие практики обучения и оценки\nи сценарии использования, а также обеспечивают ссылки на общедоступные реализации, наборы данных и предварительно обученные модели.', 'it': "In passato recente, NLP come campo ha visto un'enorme utilità di rappresentazioni vettoriali di parole distributive come caratteristiche nelle attività a valle. Il fatto che questi vettori di parola possano essere addestrati su corpora monolingue non etichettate di una lingua li rende una risorsa economica in PNL. Con l'uso crescente di vettori di parole monolingue, c'è bisogno di vettori di parole che possono essere utilizzati in modo altrettanto efficiente in più lingue come monolingue. Pertanto, l'apprendimento di incorporazioni/vettori di parole bilingue e multilingue è attualmente un argomento di ricerca importante. Questi vettori offrono un modo elegante e indipendente per rappresentare contenuti in diverse lingue. Questo tutorial mira a portare i ricercatori NLP al passo con le tecniche attuali nell'apprendimento cross-lingual word representation learning. In primo luogo discuteremo come indurre rappresentazioni di parole multilingue (che coprono sia bilingue che multilingue) da vari tipi di dati e risorse (ad esempio, dati paralleli, dati comparabili, dati monolingue non allineati in diverse lingue, dizionari e teasuri, o, anche, immagini, dati eye tracking). Discuteremo poi come valutare tali rappresentazioni, intrinsecamente ed estrinsecamente. Introdurremo i ricercatori a metodi all'avanguardia per costruire rappresentazioni di parole cross-lingual e discuteremo la loro applicabilità in una vasta gamma di applicazioni NLP a valle. Forniremo un'indagine dettagliata dei metodi attuali, discuteremo le migliori pratiche di formazione e valutazione\ne casi d'uso, e fornire collegamenti a implementazioni pubblicamente disponibili, set di dati e modelli pre-formati.", 'hu': 'A közelmúltban az NLP mint mező óriási hasznosságot látott a disztribúciós szóvektoros reprezentációknak, mint a downstream feladatok jellemzőinek. Az a tény, hogy ezek a szóvektorok képezhetők egy nyelv címke nélküli egynyelvű corporáira, olcsó forrássá teszi őket az NLP-ben. Az egynyelvű szóvektorok egyre növekvő használatával szükség van olyan szóvektorokra, amelyek ugyanolyan hatékonyan használhatók több nyelven, mint egynyelvűen. Ezért a kétnyelvű és többnyelvű szóbeágyazások / vektorok tanulása jelenleg fontos kutatási téma. Ezek a vektorok elegáns és nyelvpáros független módot kínálnak a tartalom megjelenítésére különböző nyelveken. Ez a bemutató célja, hogy felgyorsítsa az NLP kutatóit a nyelvek közötti szóreprezentációs tanulás jelenlegi technikáival. Először arról fogunk beszélni, hogyan lehet többnyelvű szóreprezentációt előidézni különböző adattípusokból és erőforrásokból (például párhuzamos adatok, összehasonlítható adatok, egynyelvű adatok különböző nyelveken, szótárakban és teasuriumokból, vagy akár képekből, szemkövető adatokból). Ezután megvitatjuk, hogyan értékeljük ezeket a reprezentációkat, lényegében és külsőleg. Bemutatjuk a kutatóknak a legkorszerűbb módszereket a többnyelvű szóreprezentációk kialakítására, és megvitatjuk azok alkalmazhatóságát a downstream NLP alkalmazások széles skálájában. Részletes felmérést készítünk a jelenlegi módszerekről, megvitatjuk a legjobb képzési és értékelési gyakorlatokat\na nyilvánosan elérhető megvalósításokra, adatkészletekre és előre képzett modellekre mutató hivatkozások biztosítása.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ, NLP როგორც პანელი ხედავთ დისტრიბუციონალური სიტყვების ვექტორის გამოსახულებების მნიშვნელოვანობა როგორც ფუნქციები ქვემოსტრიმინული დავალებში. ეს სიტყვის გვექტორები შეიძლება აკეთება მონოლენგური კოპორაზე, რომელიც ენაში არაკეთებულია, ისინი NLP-ში არაკეთებული რესურსია. მონოლენგიური სიტყვის გვექტორების გამოყენებას უფრო დიდი გამოყენებით, სიტყვის გვექტორების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მრავალენგიურად გამოყენება მრავალენგი ამიტომ, ორიენგური და მრავალენგური სიტყვების შესწავლობა/ვიქტორიები ახლა მნიშვნელოვანი შესწავლობა. ეს გვექტორები ელეგენტური და ენის ორივე განსხვავებული გზების შესახებ განსხვავებული ენების შესახებ. ეს სტუტორიალური მიზეზი NLP მსწავლობელი სწორედ გავაკეთოთ მიმდინარე ტექნექტიკებით, რომლებიც განსწავლება სიტყვების გარედაქტირებაში. ჩვენ პირველად განვითარებთ თუ როგორ გამოიყენება მრავალური სიტყვების გამოსახულებები (ორიენგური და მრავალენგური) განსხვავებული მონაცემების ტიპებიდან და რესურსიდან (მაგალითად, პარალელური მონაცემები, შემდგომარებული მონაცემები, მონოლენ შემდეგ ჩვენ დავუბრუნეთ როგორ გავამუშავოთ ასეთი გამოსახულებები, ინტერნექციურად და ექსტრინციურად. ჩვენ შევცვალობთ მსწავლობელების სახელსაწყისი მეტოვებისთვის, რომლებიც კრანქტურაციას მრავალური სიტყვების სახელსაწყისთვის და განსაკუთრებთ სახელსაწყისთვის სახელსაწყისთ ჩვენ მიმდინარე მეტოვების დეტალური შესახებ გავაკეთებთ, საუკეთესო შესახებ და გავაკეთებთ\nდა გამოყენების შემთხვევაში, და საშუალოდ ხელსაწყობინებელი ინმპლეციაციების, მონაცემების სექტის და საწყისო მოდელების შესახებ.', 'el': 'Στο πρόσφατο παρελθόν, ως πεδίο έχει δει τεράστια χρησιμότητα των διανεμητικών αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων ως χαρακτηριστικά σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες. Το γεγονός ότι αυτά τα διανύσματα λέξεων μπορούν να εκπαιδευτούν σε μη επισημασμένα μονογλωσσικά σώματα μιας γλώσσας τα καθιστά έναν φθηνό πόρο στο ΝΛΠ. Με την αυξανόμενη χρήση των μονογλωσσών διανύσματα λέξεων, υπάρχει ανάγκη για διανύσματα λέξεων που μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν τόσο αποτελεσματικά σε πολλαπλές γλώσσες όσο μονογλωσσικά. Ως εκ τούτου, η εκμάθηση δίγλωσσων και πολύγλωσσων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων/διανυσμάτων αποτελεί σήμερα σημαντικό ερευνητικό θέμα. Αυτά τα διανύσματα προσφέρουν έναν κομψό και ανεξάρτητο τρόπο για την αναπαράσταση περιεχομένου σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες. Αυτό το σεμινάριο στοχεύει να φέρει τους ερευνητές του ΝΛΠ σε ταχύτητα με τις τρέχουσες τεχνικές στη μάθηση της γλωσσικής αναπαράστασης λέξεων. Πρώτα θα συζητήσουμε πώς να προκαλέσουμε γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων (που καλύπτουν τόσο δίγλωσσες όσο και πολύγλωσσες) από διάφορους τύπους δεδομένων και πόρους (π.χ. παράλληλα δεδομένα, συγκρίσιμα δεδομένα, μη ευθυγραμμισμένα μονογλωσσικά δεδομένα σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες, λεξικά και θέαsuri, ή ακόμη και εικόνες, δεδομένα παρακολούθησης ματιών). Στη συνέχεια, θα συζητήσουμε πώς θα αξιολογήσουμε τέτοιες αναπαραστάσεις, εγγενώς και εξωτερικά. Θα εισαγάγουμε τους ερευνητές σε σύγχρονες μεθόδους για την κατασκευή γλωσσικών αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων και θα συζητήσουμε τη δυνατότητα εφαρμογής τους σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα μεταγενέστερων εφαρμογών. Θα παραδώσουμε μια λεπτομερή επισκόπηση των υφιστάμενων μεθόδων, θα συζητήσουμε τις βέλτιστες πρακτικές κατάρτισης και αξιολόγησης\nκαι περιπτώσεις χρήσης, και παροχή συνδέσμων με διαθέσιμες στο κοινό υλοποιήσεις, σύνολα δεδομένων και προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα.', 'kk': 'Соңғы уақытта NLP өрісінде таратылған сөздердің векторлық түсініктерін төменгі тапсырмалардың мүмкіндіктері ретінде көрсетті. Бұл сөздердің векторлары тілдің монолингілі корпорасында оқылмай алады, оларды NLP-де көлемі ресурс болады. Монолингілі сөздер векторларын қолдану үшін, бірнеше тілдерді бірнеше тілдерде бірнеше тілдерде қолдануға мүмкін болады. Сондықтан, екі тілді және көп тілді сөздерді ендіру/векторларды оқыту - осы уақытта маңызды зерттеу нақышы. Бұл векторлар мазмұнын түрлі тілдерде көрсету үшін көптеген және тілдердің екі тәуелсіз тәсілдігін көрсетеді. Бұл оқыту мақсаты NLP зерттеушілерін бірнеше тілікті мәліметті оқыту үшін назардағы технологияларды жылдамдықтау. Біз біріншіден бірнеше деректер түрлері мен ресурстардан (мысалы, параллель деректер, салыстырылатын деректер, тілдері, сөздер мен теасури тілдері, немесе, сондай-ақ, кескіндер, көздерді қадағалау деректері) бірнеше тілдерді қалай түрлендіру үшін бірнеше тілдерді түрлен Содан кейін бұл тәсілдерді қалай бағалау үшін талқылаймыз. Біз зерттеушілерді көптілікті сөздерді құру және олардың қолданбаларын көпшілікті NLP қолданбаларының көптеген аумағында талқылаймыз. Біз қазіргі әдістерді егжей-тегжейлі зерттеп, ең жақсы оқыту және оқыту әрекеттерін талқылаймыз\nжәне пайдаланушыларды қолдану үшін көпшілік істеу, деректер қорлары және алдын- оқыту үлгілеріне сілтемелерді беріңіз.', 'lt': 'Pastaruoju metu NLP kaip sritis vertino didžiulę paskirstymo žodžių vektorių atstovavimo naudą kaip tolesnių užduočių ypatumus. Tai, kad šie žodžiai vektoriai gali būti apmokomi vienakalbiniu kalbos korporu be žymės, daro juos brangiu NLP ištekliu. Didėjant vienakalbių žodžių vektorių naudojimui, reikia žodžių vektorių, kurie galėtų būti naudojami taip veiksmingai įvairiose kalbose kaip vienakalbėje. Todėl šiuo metu svarbi mokslinių tyrimų tema yra mokymasis dvikalbiais ir daugiakalbiais žodžiais. Šie vektoriai suteikia elegant ų ir savarankiškų kalbų porų būdą atstovauti turiniui įvairiose kalbose. This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning.  Pirmiausia aptarsime, kaip skatinti įvairių duomenų tipų ir išteklių (pvz., lygiagrečių duomenų, palyginamų duomenų, nesuderintų vienakalbių duomenų įvairiomis kalbomis, žodynų ir teatrų arba net vaizdų, akių stebėjimo duomenų) tarpkalbinius žodžių atstovavimus. Tada apsvarstysime, kaip vertinti tokius atstovavimus iš esmės ir iš išorės. Įdiegsime mokslo darbuotojus į naujausius metodus, skirtus kurti tarpkalbinius žodžių atstovavimus ir aptars jų taikymą įvairiose tolesnėse NLP taikymo srityse. Mes atliksime išsamią dabartinių metodų apžvalgą, aptars geriausią mokymo ir vertinimo praktiką.\nir naudojimo atvejus bei ryšius su viešai prieinamais įgyvendinimais, duomenų rinkiniais ir iš anksto parengtais modeliais.', 'ms': 'Dalam masa lalu, NLP sebagai medan telah melihat utiliti yang luar biasa bagi persembahan vektor perkataan pembahagian sebagai ciri-ciri dalam tugas turun. Fakta bahawa vektor perkataan ini boleh dilatih pada korpra monobahasa tanpa tanda bahasa membuat mereka sumber yang tidak mahal dalam NLP. Dengan meningkat penggunaan vektor perkataan monobahasa, ada perlukan vektor perkataan yang boleh digunakan secara efisien melalui berbilang bahasa sebagai monobahasa. Oleh itu, pembelajaran perkataan dua bahasa dan berbilang bahasa penerbangan/vektor kini adalah topik kajian yang penting. Vektor ini menawarkan cara yang elegan dan bebas pasangan bahasa untuk mewakili kandungan melalui bahasa yang berbeza. Tutorial ini bermaksud untuk membawa peneliti NLP kepada kelajuan dengan teknik semasa dalam pembelajaran perwakilan perkataan saling bahasa. Kita akan pertama-tama membincangkan bagaimana untuk mengakibatkan perwakilan perkataan melintasi bahasa (meliputi kedua-dua bahasa dan berbilang bahasa) dari berbagai jenis data dan sumber (cth., data selari, data yang boleh dibandingkan, data monobahasa yang tidak sepadan dalam bahasa yang berbeza, kamus dan theasuri, atau, bahkan, imej, data pengjejak mata). Kemudian kita akan membincangkan bagaimana untuk menilai perwakilan seperti itu, secara dalam dan luar. Kami akan memperkenalkan peneliti kepada kaedah-kaedah terbaik untuk membina perwakilan perkataan saling bahasa dan membincangkan kemampuan mereka dalam julat luas aplikasi NLP turun. We will deliver a detailed survey of the current methods, discuss best training and evaluation practices\nand use-cases, and provide links to publicly available implementations, datasets, and pre-trained models.', 'mt': "In recent past, NLP as a field has seen tremendous utility of distributional word vector representations as features in downstream tasks.  Il-fatt li dawn il-vetturi tal-kelma jistgħu jitħarrġu fuq korpra monolingwi mingħajr tikketta ta’ lingwa jagħmilhom riżorsa mhux għalja fil-NLP. Bl-użu dejjem jikber ta’ vetturi tal-kliem monolingwi, hemm bżonn ta’ vetturi tal-kliem li jistgħu jintużaw b’mod effiċjenti kemm f’diversi lingwi kif ukoll f’monolingwi. Għalhekk, it-tagħlim tal-integrazzjoni/vetturi tal-kliem bilingwi u multilingwi bħalissa huwa suġġett ta’ riċerka importanti. Dawn il-vetturi joffru mod eleganti u indipendenti minn par ta’ lingwi biex jirrappreżentaw il-kontenut f’lingwi differenti. Dan it-tutorjal għandu l-għan li jġib ir-riċerkaturi tal-NLP malajr mat-tekniki attwali fit-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza tal-kliem translingwi. L-ewwel se niddiskutu kif nistgħu ninduċu rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem translingwi (li jkopru kemm dawk bilingwi kif ukoll dawk multilingwi) minn diversi tipi ta’ dejta u riżorsi (pereżempju dejta parallela, dejta komparabbli, dejta monolingwi mhux allinjata f’lingwi differenti, dikjararji u teatri, jew, anki, immaġni, dejta ta’ traċċar tal-g ħajnejn). Imbagħad se niddiskutu kif jiġu evalwati rappreżentazzjonijiet bħal dawn, b’mod intrinsiku u estern. Ser nintroduċu r-riċerkaturi għall-metodi l-aktar avvanzati għall-bini ta' rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem translingwi u niddiskutu l-applikabbiltà tagħhom f'firxa wiesgħa ta' applikazzjonijiet downstream tal-NLP. Ser nagħmlu stħarriġ dettaljat tal-metodi attwali, niddiskutu l-a ħjar prattiki ta' taħriġ u evalwazzjoni\nu każijiet ta’ użu, u jipprovdu rabtiet ma’ implimentazzjoni pubblikament disponibbli, settijiet ta’ dejta, u mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel.", 'mn': 'Сүүлийн өмнө NLP нь тархины үг векторын үзүүлэлтийн маш хэрэгцээтэй талбар гэж үзсэн. Эдгээр үг векторууд хэлний нэг хэлний корпора дээр суралцаж чадна гэдэг нь NLP-д маш их баялаг болгодог. Ерөнхий хэл хэлний векторуудын хэрэглээ нэмэгдэж байгаа үг векторуудын хэрэглээ олон хэл дээр ганц хэлний хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгдэж болно. Иймээс хоёр хэл болон олон хэл үг суралцах нь векторууд хамгийн чухал судалгааны сэдэв. Эдгээр векторууд өөр хэл дээр бүтээгдэхүүнийг илэрхийлэх сайхан, хэл хоёр нь хамааралтай арга гаргадаг. Энэ сургалтын зорилго нь NLP судлаачидыг хэлний хэлний сургалтын олон хэлний сургалтын технологийг хурдан авч үзүүлэх болно. Эхлээд бид хэл хэлний илтгэлийг хэрхэн (хоёр хэл болон олон хэл хэлний илтгэлийг) олон өгөгдлийн төрлийн болон нөөц хөрөнгө оруулах талаар ярилцах болно. Дараа нь бид ийм төсөөлөлтийг хэрхэн үнэлэх талаар ярилцах болно. Бид судлаачидыг хэл хэлний илтгэлийг бүтээж, тэдний хэрэглээ ашиглах боломжтой олон нийтлэг NLP хэрэглээ дээр илтгэх урлагийн төвшин арга замыг тайлбарлах болно. Бид одоогийн арга замыг нарийвчлан судалгаа хийж, хамгийн сайн суралцах, үнэлгээний дасгал дээр\nашиглаж, олон нийтэд хэрэглэгддэг үйлдвэрлэлүүд, өгөгдлийн сангууд, урд сургалтын загваруудын холбоотой байдаг.', 'mk': 'Во неодамнешното минато, НЛП како поле ја гледаше огромната корисност на дистрибуционалните вектори на зборови како карактеристики во понатамошните задачи. Фактот дека овие зборови вектори можат да бидат обучени на неозначени монојазични корпора на јазик ги прави нескапи ресурси во НЛП. Со зголемената употреба на монојазични вектори на зборови, постои потреба за вектори на зборови кои можат да се употребат ефикасно низ повеќе јазици како монојазички. Затоа, учењето на двојјазични и мултијазични зборови вложување/вектори моментно е важна истражувачка тема. Овие вектори нудат елегантен и независен начин за претставување на содржината преку различни јазици. Овој наставник има за цел да ги подготви истражувачите на НЛП со тековните техники во меѓујазичното учење на репрезентација на зборовите. Прво ќе разговараме за тоа како да се индукционираат прекујазични претставувања на зборови (кои ги покриваат и двојјазичните и мултијазичните) од различни типови и ресурси на податоци (на пример паралелни податоци, споредливи податоци, неусогласени монојазични податоци на различни јазици, речници и теасури, или дури и Потоа ќе разговараме како да ги оценуваме ваквите претставувања, внатрешно и надворешно. Ние ќе ги воведеме истражувачите на најновите методи за изградба на прекујазични репрезентации на зборови и ќе разговараме за нивната апликабилност во широк опсег на понатамошни апликации на НЛП. Ќе спроведеме детално истражување на сегашните методи, ќе разговараме за најдобрите практики за обука и евалуација\nи случаи на употреба, и обезбедување врски со јавно достапни имплементации, податоци и предобучени модели.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുകഴിഞ്ഞിട്ട് NLP ഒരു ഫീള്\u200dഡായിരുന്നു വിതരണ വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ വലിയ ഉപയോഗമെന്ന് കണ്ടു. ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ഭാഷയുടെ മോണില്ലാല്\u200d ഭാഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d പരിശീലന മോനോളില്\u200d വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200dക്ക് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. പല ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും സ അതുകൊണ്ട്, രണ്ടു ഭാഷ പഠിക്കുന്നതും പല ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളും ഇപ്പോള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ ഈ വെക്ടറുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ ഒരു മാര്\u200dഗവ നിലവിലുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി NLP പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരെ വേഗത്തിലേക് വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും വിഭവങ്ങളുടെയും തരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും രണ്ടു ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും മറ്റു ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും എങ്ങനെയൊക്കെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം സംസാരിക പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഇത്തരം പ്രതിനിധികളെ എങ്ങനെയാണ് പരിഗണിക്കേണ്ടതെന്ന് സംസാരിക്കാം. We will introduce researchers to state-of-the-art methods for constructing cross-lingual word representations and discuss their applicability in a broad range of downstream NLP applications. നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളുടെ ഒരു വിശദീകരണ പരിശീലനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് നമുക്ക് കൊടുക്കാം\nand use-cases, and provide links to publicly available implementations, datasets, and pre-trained models.', 'pl': 'W ostatniej przeszłości NLP jako pole widziało ogromną użyteczność reprezentacji wektorów dystrybucyjnych słów jako cech w dalszych zadaniach. Fakt, że te wektory słów mogą być trenowane na nieoznakowanych jednojęzycznych korpusach języka czyni je tanim zasobem w NLP. Wraz z coraz większym wykorzystaniem jednojęzycznych wektorów słowa, istnieje potrzeba wektorów słowa, które mogą być używane równie efektywnie w wielu językach, jak jednojęzycznie. Dlatego nauka dwujęzycznych i wielojęzycznych osadzeń słów/wektorów jest obecnie ważnym tematem badawczym. Te wektory oferują elegancki i niezależny sposób reprezentowania treści w różnych językach. Ten poradnik ma na celu przyspieszenie naukowców NLP z aktualnymi technikami w nauce reprezentacji słów wielojęzycznych. Najpierw omówimy, jak wywołać reprezentacje słów między językami (obejmujące zarówno te dwujęzyczne, jak i wielojęzyczne) z różnych typów danych i zasobów (np. dane równoległe, porównywalne dane, nieskorygowane dane jednojęzyczne w różnych językach, słowniki i teasuri, a nawet obrazy, dane śledzące oczy). Następnie omówimy, jak ocenić takie reprezentacje, wewnętrznie i zewnętrznie. Wprowadzimy naukowców do najnowocześniejszych metod konstruowania reprezentacji słów między językami i omówimy ich zastosowanie w szerokim zakresie dalszych aplikacji NLP. Dostarczymy szczegółowe badanie obecnych metod, omówimy najlepsze praktyki szkoleniowe i oceny\ni przypadków użycia oraz dostarczania linków do publicznie dostępnych wdrożeń, zbiorów danych i wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli.', 'ro': 'În trecut recent, PNL ca domeniu a văzut o utilitate extraordinară a reprezentărilor distribuționale vectoriale de cuvinte ca caracteristici în activitățile din aval. Faptul că acești vectori de cuvânt pot fi instruiți pe corpuri monolingve fără etichete ale unei limbi le face o resursă ieftină în PNL. Odată cu utilizarea tot mai mare a vectorilor de cuvinte monolingvi, există nevoie de vectori de cuvinte care pot fi utilizați la fel de eficient în mai multe limbi ca și monolingv. Prin urmare, învățarea încorporărilor/vectorilor bilingvi și multilingvi de cuvinte este în prezent un subiect important de cercetare. Acești vectori oferă o modalitate elegantă și independentă de a reprezenta conținutul în diferite limbi. Acest tutorial își propune să aducă cercetătorii PNL la curent cu tehnicile actuale în învățarea reprezentării cuvintelor între limbi. Vom discuta mai întâi cum să inducem reprezentări de cuvinte între limbi (care acoperă atât cele bilingve, cât și cele multilingve) din diferite tipuri de date și resurse (de exemplu, date paralele, date comparabile, date monolingve nealiniate în diferite limbi, dicționare și teasuri, sau, chiar, imagini, date de urmărire a ochilor). Vom discuta apoi cum să evaluăm astfel de reprezentări, intrinsec și extrins. Vom prezenta cercetătorilor metode de ultimă oră pentru construirea reprezentărilor de cuvinte între limbi și vom discuta aplicabilitatea lor într-o gamă largă de aplicații PNL din aval. Vom oferi un studiu detaliat al metodelor actuale, vom discuta cele mai bune practici de formare și evaluare\nși cazuri de utilizare și furnizează link-uri către implementări disponibile publicului, seturi de date și modele pre-instruite.', 'no': 'I tidlegare tida har NLP som eit felt sett enorme verktøy for distribusjonsordvektorrepresentasjonar som funksjonar i nedstrekkoppgåver. Faktet at disse ordvektorane kan trenjast på ulike monospråkkkorpora av eit språk gjer dei eit utvida ressurs i NLP. Med den aukande bruken av monospråkkvektorar, er det ein treng for ordvektorar som kan brukast så effektivt på fleire språk som monospråk. Det er derfor å lære bilinguelt og fleirspråk ordinnbygging/vektorar i dag eit viktig forskningsemne. Desse vektorane tilbyr ein elegant og språkopar uavhengig måte å representera innhaldet på ulike språk. Dette opplæringsmålet er å få NLP-forskere opp til fart med gjeldande teknikk i læring av krysspråk ordrepresentasjon. Vi vil først diskutera korleis å indusera krysspråksordrepresentasjonar (dekke både bilingspråk og fleirspråk) frå ulike datatypar og ressursar (f.eks. parallelle data, sammenlignbare data, ikkje-alignerte monospråksdata i ulike språk, ordbokar og theasuri, eller, til og med, bilete, øysporingsdata). Vi skal derfor diskutera korleis å evaluera slike representasjonar, innenfor og ekstrinsic. Vi vil introdusera forskere til kunstmetodar for å konstruere fleirspråk ordrepresentasjonar og diskutera dei tilgjengelege tilgjengelege i eit brett område av NLP-program. Vi vil gjera ein detaljert undersøking av dei gjeldande metodane, diskutera beste opplæring og evalueringspraksisar\nog bruktilfeller, og tilbyr lenkjer til offentlig tilgjengelege implementasjonar, datasett og føretrainerte modeller.', 'sr': 'U nedavnoj prošlosti, NLP kao polje vidio je ogromnu korisnost predstavljanja distribucijskih reèi vektora kao karakteristike u poslovima dole. Činjenica da se ovi vektori mogu obučiti na neopisivanom monojezičkom korporaciju jezika čini ih neizređenim resursima u NLP-u. Uz povećanje upotrebe vektora monojezičkih reèi, postoji potreba za vektorima reèi koje se mogu koristiti efikasno na višestrukim jezicima kao monojezički. Stoga, učenje dvojezičkih i višejezičkih reči ugrađenje/vektorima trenutno je važna tema istraživanja. Ovi vektori nude elegantni i jezički neovisni način da predstavljaju sadržaj na različitim jezicima. Ovaj nastavni cilj je dovesti istraživače NLP do ubrzanja sa trenutnim tehnikama u učenje prezentacije jezika. Prvo ćemo razgovarati o tome kako inducirati prezentacije međujezičkih riječi (pokrivajući i dvojezičke i multijezičke) iz različitih vrsta podataka i resursa (npr. paralelnih podataka, usporedbljivih podataka, neopoređenih monojezičkih podataka na različitim jezicima, rečenicima i tezuri, ili čak i slikama, podacima praćenja oči). Onda ćemo raspraviti kako da procenimo takve predstave, unutrašnjost i ekstrinsicno. Predstaviæemo istraživače nacionalnim metodama umetnosti za izgradnju preko jezičkih predstavljanja reèi i razgovarati o njihovoj primjeni u širokom nizu neprekidnih aplikacija NLP-a. Dovešćemo detaljno istraživanje trenutnih metoda, raspravljamo o najboljim praksima obuke i procjene\ni slučajevi korištenja i pružaju veze sa javno dostupnim implementacijama, setima podataka i predobučenim modelima.', 'so': 'Muddii hore, NLP sidii beer ayaa arkay isticmaal aad u badan oo ka mid ah wadista qeyb-qaybsan oo ka mid ah shaqooyinka hoose. Xaqiiqdii in wax lagu baran karo qofka luqada ah oo a an la aqoon karin waxaa laga dhigaa nooc aan ka shaqeyn karin NLP. Inta lagu isticmaalo qalabka afka ee munaafiqiinta ah waxaa loo baahan yahay waddooyinka hadalka oo si fiican looga isticmaali karo luuqado kala duduwan sida luuqado oo kale. Sidaa darteed barashada luuqadaha labaad iyo hadalka luuqadaha kala duduwan waa arin muhiim ah. Wadamadaas waxay u fidiyaan qaab aan xor u ahayn in ay ku representaan wax ku jira luuqado kala duwan. This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning.  Marka hore waxaan ka sheekaynaynaa sida loo soo bandhigayo macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duduwan (oo ku qoran labada luuqadood iyo luuqadood) noocyo kala duduwan iyo raslimaadyo kala duduwan (tusaale ahaan data u e g, data isbarbardhiga, macluumaad isku mid ah, macluumaadka luuqadaha afka kala duduwan, dictionary iyo theasuri, ama xataa sawiro, macluumaadka indhaha ku socoshada). Markaas waxan ka sheekaynaynaa sida loo qiimeynayo muuqashadaas, gudaha iyo dibadda. Waxbarashada waxaan u soo bandhigaynaa hababka farshaxanka ah ee dhisidda noocyada hadalka luuqadaha kala duduwan, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa codsiyadooda oo ballaadhan ee codsiga NLP. Waxaan sameynaynaa baaritaanka qaababka joogta ah oo gaar ah, baaraandegista ugu wanaagsan iyo hababka qiimeynta\nand use-cases, and provide links to publicly available implementations, datasets, and pre-trained models.', 'sv': 'Under senare tid har NLP som ett fält sett enorm nytta av distributionella ordvektorrepresentationer som funktioner i nedströmsuppgifter. Det faktum att dessa ordvektorer kan utbildas på otydliga enspråkiga korpor i ett språk gör dem till en billig resurs i NLP. Med den ökande användningen av enspråkiga ordvektorer finns det ett behov av ordvektorer som kan användas lika effektivt över flera språk som enspråkigt. Därför är lärande av tvåspråkiga och flerspråkiga ord inbäddningar / vektorer för närvarande ett viktigt forskningsämne. Dessa vektorer erbjuder ett elegant och språkpar oberoende sätt att representera innehåll över olika språk. Denna handledning syftar till att föra NLP-forskare uppdaterade med de nuvarande teknikerna i korspråkig ordrepresentation lärande. Vi kommer först att diskutera hur man kan framkalla korspråkiga ordrepresentationer (som omfattar både tvåspråkiga och flerspråkiga) från olika datatyper och resurser (t.ex. parallella data, jämförbara data, icke-anpassade enspråkiga data på olika språk, ordböcker och teasuri, eller till och med bilder, eye tracking data). Vi kommer sedan att diskutera hur man utvärderar sådana representationer, i sig och utifrån. Vi kommer att introducera forskare till state-of-the-art metoder för att konstruera korspråkiga ordrepresentationer och diskutera deras tillämpning i ett brett spektrum av nedströms NLP applikationer. Vi kommer att leverera en detaljerad kartläggning av nuvarande metoder, diskutera bästa utbildning och utvärderingspraxis\noch användningsfall, och tillhandahålla länkar till allmänt tillgängliga implementeringar, datauppsättningar och förutbildade modeller.', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන්, NLP ක්\u200dෂේත්\u200dරයක් විතරයෙන් වෙක්ටර් වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජන මේ වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට පුළුවන් කියලා භාෂාවක් නැති එක භාෂාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා එය එක භාෂාවික වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට විශාල භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලට අවශ්\u200dයයක් තියෙනවා. ඉතින්, දෙවල් භාෂාවක් සහ ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් වචන සම්බන්ධය/වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ වැදගත්  මේ වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් වගේ ස මේ අදහස් කරනවා NLP පරීක්ෂකයෝ වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂකයෝ ඉගෙනගන්න. අපි මුලින්ම කතා කරනවා කොහොමද ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවික වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්නේ (දෙන්නම් දෙන්නම් භාෂාවික සහ ගොඩක් භාෂාවික වර්ගයක් සහ ගොඩක් භාෂාවික වර්ගයක් වලින්) ව ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේ වගේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කොහොමද විශ්වාස කරන්නේ කියලා කතා කරන්නම්, ඇතුළත් විශ්වාසිකය අපි විශ්වාස කරුණාකරුවන්ට ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාවක් සඳ අපි දැන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ විස්තර පරීක්ෂණයක් දෙන්නම්, හොඳම ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය කතා\nසහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, සහ සාමාජික ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, දත්ත සේට් සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා.', 'ur': 'اگلوں میں NLP کو ایک کھیتی کے طور پر تقسیم کرنے والی کلمات ویکتور کی نشانیوں کی بہت بڑی فائدہ دیکھی ہے۔ یہ بات ہے کہ یہ ویکتوروں کو ایک زبان کی غیر زبان کی ایک زبان کی جگہ پر آموزش دی جاتی ہے کہ ان کو NLP میں غیر منفی سرمایہ بناتا ہے۔ واحد زبان ویکتروں کے مطابق زیادہ استعمال کرنے کے ساتھ لفظ ویکتروں کے لئے ضرورت ہے جو بہت سی زبانوں میں ایک زبان کے مطابق استعمال کر سکتے ہیں۔ لہٰذا، دو زبان کی اور بہت سی زبان کی باتوں کی آموخت/ویکتوروں کا حال یہ ایک اہم تحقیق موضوع ہے. یہ ویکتروں نے مختلف زبانوں میں موتوں کو نمایش دینے کے لئے بہترین اور زبان جوڑوں کی ایک مستقل طریقہ پیش کیا ہے. یہ تعلیم کا مطابق ہے کہ NLP تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو اس کے ذریعہ سے موجود تکنیک کے ساتھ مختلف زبان کے کلمات کی تعلیم کے ذریعے سرعت لے آئیں۔ ہم پہلی بار مختلف ڈاٹ کے نوع اور منابع سے کس طرح کروسائل زبان کی باتوں کی تصویر کریں گے۔ اس کے بعد ہم اس طرح کی تصدیق کیسے کریں گے، داخلی اور خارجی طرح. ہم پھنسانے والوں کو ان کے سامنے مطابق کرسی زبان کی باتوں کی نمایش بنانے اور ان کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے نیچے نلپ کی کاربریوں کی وسیع حصہ میں بحث کریں گے. ہم ضرور موجود طریقے کے مطابق ایک مفصل تحقیق کریں گے، بہترین تحقیق اور تحقیق کے مطابق بحث کریں گے\nاور استعمال کیسس، اور ظاہری موجودات، ڈاٹ سٹ اور پیش تربین موڈل کے لئے لینک پیدا کریں۔', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், NLP ஒரு புலத்தாக பங்கீட்டு வார்த்தை வெக்டார் குறிப்பிட்ட பணிகளில் குணங்களாக பார்த்துள்ளது. இந்த வார்த்தை வெக்டார்கள் அறிவிக்கப்படாத மொழியின் மொழியில் பயிற்சி செய்ய முடியும் என்பது உண்மை மொன்மொழி வார்த்தை நெறிகளை பயன்படுத்தும் பொழுது, வார்த்தை நெறிகள் பயன்படுத்த வேண்டிய தேவை ஆகையால், இரு மொழி மற்றும் பல மொழி வார்த்தைகளை கற்றுக்கொள்வது தற்போது ஒரு முக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி தலைப்பு. இந்த வெக்டார்கள் வேறு மொழிகளில் உள்ளடக்கங்களை குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு ஒரு அறிவுடைய மற்றும் மொழி ஜோடி சுதந்தி இந்த புத்தகம் NLP ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களை தற்போதைய தொழில்நுட்பத்துடன் வேகமாக கொண்டு வர வேண்டும். முதலில் நாம் எவ்வாறு மொழி வார்த்தையின் பிரதிநிர்வாக்கத்தை உருவாக்க வேண்டும் (இரு மொழி மற்றும் பல மொழிகள் ஒன்றையும் மற்றும் மூலம்) பல தரவு வகைகள் மற்றும் வளங்களிலிருந்து (உதாரணமாக ஒப்பி பிறகு நாம் இவ்வாறு குறிப்பிடுகளை எவ்வாறு மதிப்பிட வேண்டும் என்று விவாதம் செய்வோம். We will introduce researchers to state-of-the-art methods for constructing cross-lingual word representations and discuss their applicability in a broad range of downstream NLP applications. நாம் தற்போதைய முறைகளின் ஒரு விவரமான ஆய்வு கொடுப்போம், சிறந்த பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பிடும் செயல்களை வி\nபயன்படுத்தும் நிகழ்வுகள், பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும் செயல்பாடுகள், தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் முன்பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள்', 'vi': 'Trong quá khứ gần đây, Njala là một trường đã thấy một tiện ích lớn về các biểu tượng vector từ phân phối vai trò trong các nhiệm vụ xuôi dòng. Việc các từ véc- tơ này có thể được huấn luyện trên một chữ ngôn ngữ vô tội khiến chúng trở thành một tài nguyên rẻ tiền ở Njala. Với việc phát triển khả năng phát hiện từ độc ngôn ngữ, cần phải có dịch chuyển từ có khả năng sử dụng hiệu quả xuyên suốt nhiều ngôn ngữ như một ngôn ngữ riêng. Do đó, việc học sự gắn kết hai chữ và nhiều ngôn ngữ khác nhau là một chủ đề nghiên cứu quan trọng. Những cỗ máy này cung cấp một cách tự lập và tao nhã để đại diện nội dung của các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Mục tiêu huấn luyện tập này là nâng cao tốc độ cho các nghiên cứu của ngôn ngữ học về ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng ta sẽ thảo luận trước làm thế nào để thuyết phục các biểu hiện ngôn ngữ khác nhau (g ồm cả hai ngôn ngữ và đa dạng) từ các loại dữ liệu khác nhau (v.d. dữ liệu song song song, dữ liệu tương ứng, dữ liệu độc ngôn ngữ khác nhau tại các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, từ điển và theasuri, hay thậm chí cả hình ảnh, dữ liệu theo dõi mắt). Chúng ta sẽ thảo luận về cách đánh giá các biểu hiện đó, về bản chất và chi tiết. Chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu các nhà nghiên cứu về phương pháp hiện đại để xây dựng các biểu đồ ngôn ngữ khác nhau và thảo luận về sự tồn tại của chúng trong một loạt các ứng dụng xuôi dòng. Chúng tôi sẽ cung cấp một cuộc khảo sát chi tiết về các phương pháp hiện thời, thảo luận về hướng huấn luyện tốt nhất và đánh giá\nvà cung cấp liên kết tới các thiết lập công khai, các tập tin và các mô hình được huấn luyện.', 'uz': "Keyingi yilda NLP maydoni bo'lgan so'zlar vektorlar tashkilotlarini quyidagi xususiyatlar sifatida ko'rsatadi. Bu so'zlar vektorlari o'rganish mumkin, o'z tildagi monolingan kompaniyadan o'rganish mumkin, ularni NLP'da yetarli manba qiladi. Name Шундай қилиб, ikkita tillar va bir tillar so'zlari o'rganish va vektorlar hozirda muhim tafiti mavzusi. Ushbu vectorlar har xil tillarda tarkibini tashqi qilish uchun elek va tilning ikki qo'l bilan qo'shiladi. Bu o'quvchi o'qituvchilar NLP ta'qituvchilarini joriy teknologiyani o'rganish uchun o'rganishga tezlashtiradi. Biz birinchi harfdan boshqa so'zlar uchun (ikkita tillar va ko'plab tillar yordamida) ta'lim turlarini va rasmlarni boshqa maʼlumot turidan qarashga qaramamiz (m. g. parallel data, tenglar maʼlumot, teng oʻxshash munosabatlar, lugʻatlar va theasuri, yoki xato rasmlar, ko'zning taʼminlovchi maʼlumot). Keyin biz bunday tashkilotlarni qanday qiymatlashni, ichki va cheksiz qiymatga qaramiz. Biz ta'qituvchilarni bir necha so'zlar tashkilotlarini ishlab chiqaramiz va ularning qo'llanmalarini tezlashtirish uchun juda katta NLP dasturlarida talab qilamiz. Biz joriy usullarni taʼrif qilamiz, yaxshi taʼminlovchi va qiymatni tajriba qilamiz\nva foydalanuvchi holatlar bilan bogʻ'liqlar bilan bog'liqlar beradi.", 'bg': 'В близкото минало НЛП като поле е видяла огромна полза от разпределителните текстови векторни представи като характеристики в задачите надолу по веригата. Фактът, че тези вектори на думи могат да бъдат обучени върху неетикетирани едноезични корпуси на език ги прави евтин ресурс в НЛП. С нарастващото използване на едноезични вектори на думи, съществува необходимост от вектори на думи, които могат да се използват толкова ефективно на няколко езика, колкото и едноезично. Ето защо изучаването на двуезични и многоезични вграждания/вектори на думи понастоящем е важна изследователска тема. Тези вектори предлагат елегантен и независим начин за представяне на съдържание на различни езици. Този урок има за цел да запознае изследователите на НЛП с актуалните техники в изучаването на междуезично представяне на думи. Първо ще обсъдим как да предизвикаме междуезични думи (обхващащи двуезични и многоезични) от различни типове данни и ресурси (напр. паралелни данни, сравними данни, неподравнени едноезични данни на различни езици, речници и сури, или дори изображения, данни за проследяване на очите). След това ще обсъдим как да оценим тези представи, вътрешно и външно. Ще запознаем изследователите с най-съвременните методи за изграждане на междуезични думи и ще обсъдим тяхната приложимост в широк спектър от приложения надолу по веригата за НЛП. Ще направим детайлно проучване на текущите методи, ще обсъдим най-добрите практики за обучение и оценка\nи случаи на употреба, както и предоставяне на връзки към публично достъпни внедрения, набори от данни и предварително обучени модели.', 'de': 'In jﾃｼngster Vergangenheit hat NLP als Feld einen enormen Nutzen von verteilten Wortvektorreprﾃ､sentationen als Merkmale in nachgelagerten Aufgaben gesehen. Die Tatsache, dass diese Wortvektoren auf unbeschrifteten einsprachigen Korpora einer Sprache trainiert werden kﾃｶnnen, macht sie zu einer kostengﾃｼnstigen Ressource in NLP. Mit der zunehmenden Verwendung von einsprachigen Wortvektoren besteht ein Bedarf an Wortvektoren, die in mehreren Sprachen genauso effizient wie einsprachig verwendet werden kﾃｶnnen. Daher ist das Erlernen zweisprachiger und mehrsprachiger Worteinbettungen/Vektoren derzeit ein wichtiges Forschungsthema. Diese Vektoren bieten eine elegante und sprachenpaare unabhﾃ､ngige Mﾃｶglichkeit, Inhalte in verschiedenen Sprachen darzustellen. Dieses Tutorial zielt darauf ab, NLP-Forscher mit den aktuellen Techniken des sprachﾃｼbergreifenden Wortreprﾃ､sentationslernens auf den neuesten Stand zu bringen. Zunﾃ､chst werden wir diskutieren, wie aus verschiedenen Datentypen und Ressourcen (z.B. parallele Daten, vergleichbare Daten, nicht ausgerichtete einsprachige Daten in verschiedenen Sprachen, Wﾃｶrterbﾃｼcher und Theasuri, oder sogar Bilder, Eye-Tracking-Daten) translinguale Wortreprﾃ､sentationen (sowohl zweisprachige als auch mehrsprachige) induziert werden kﾃｶnnen. Wir werden dann diskutieren, wie solche Darstellungen intern und extern bewertet werden kﾃｶnnen. Wir werden Forschern modernste Methoden zur Konstruktion von sprachﾃｼbergreifenden Wortreprﾃ､sentationen vorstellen und deren Anwendbarkeit in einem breiten Spektrum nachgeschalteter NLP-Anwendungen diskutieren. Wir liefern eine detaillierte ﾃ彙ersicht ﾃｼber die aktuellen Methoden, diskutieren Best Training und Evaluation Practices\nund Use-Cases und Links zu ﾃｶffentlich zugﾃ､nglichen Implementierungen, Datensﾃ､tzen und vortrainierten Modellen bereitstellen.', 'da': 'I den seneste tid har NLP som felt set enorm nytte af distributionsmæssige ordvektorrepræsentationer som funktioner i downstream opgaver. Det faktum, at disse ordvektorer kan trænes på umærkede ensprogede korpora af et sprog gør dem til en billig ressource i NLP. Med den stigende brug af ensprogede ordvektorer er der behov for ordvektorer, der kan bruges lige så effektivt på tværs af flere sprog som ensproget. Derfor er læring af tosprogede og flersprogede ordindlejringer / vektorer i øjeblikket et vigtigt forskningsemne. Disse vektorer tilbyder en elegant og sprog-par uafhængig måde at repræsentere indhold på tværs af forskellige sprog. Denne tutorial har til formål at bringe NLP-forskere op til de aktuelle teknikker i tværsproget ordrepræsentation læring. Vi vil først diskutere, hvordan man kan fremkalde tværsprogede ordrepræsentationer (både tosprogede og flersprogede) fra forskellige datatyper og ressourcer (f.eks. parallelle data, sammenlignelige data, ikke-justerede ensprogede data på forskellige sprog, ordbøger og teasuri, eller endda billeder, eyetracking data). Vi vil derefter diskutere, hvordan man evaluerer sådanne repræsentationer, i sig selv og eksternt. Vi vil introducere forskere til state-of-the-art metoder til at konstruere tværsprogede ordrepræsentationer og diskutere deres anvendelighed i en bred vifte af downstream NLP applikationer. Vi vil levere en detaljeret undersøgelse af de nuværende metoder, diskutere bedste trænings- og evalueringspraksis\nog brugscases, og levere links til offentligt tilgængelige implementeringer, datasæt og præuddannede modeller.', 'nl': 'In het recente verleden heeft NLP als een veld een enorm nut gezien van distributionele woordvectorrepresentaties als kenmerken in downstreamtaken. Het feit dat deze woordvectoren kunnen worden getraind op ongelabelde eentalige corpora van een taal maakt ze een goedkope bron in NLP. Met het toenemende gebruik van eentalige woordvectoren, is er een behoefte aan woordvectoren die zowel efficiënt in meerdere talen als eentalig kunnen worden gebruikt. Daarom is het leren van tweetalige en meertalige woord embeddings/vectoren momenteel een belangrijk onderzoeksonderwerp. Deze vectoren bieden een elegante en taalpaar onafhankelijke manier om inhoud in verschillende talen weer te geven. Deze tutorial is bedoeld om NLP onderzoekers op de hoogte te brengen van de huidige technieken in cross-lingual woordrepresentatie leren. We zullen eerst bespreken hoe we meertalige woordrepresentaties (zowel tweetalige als meertalige) kunnen induceren uit verschillende gegevenstypen en bronnen (bijvoorbeeld parallelle gegevens, vergelijkbare gegevens, niet-uitgelijnde eentalige gegevens in verschillende talen, woordenboeken en theasuri, of zelfs afbeeldingen, eye-tracking data). Vervolgens bespreken we hoe we dergelijke representaties kunnen evalueren, intrinsisch en extern. We introduceren onderzoekers in state-of-the-art methoden voor het construeren van meertalige woordrepresentaties en bespreken hun toepasbaarheid in een breed scala aan downstream NLP toepassingen. We geven een gedetailleerd overzicht van de huidige methoden, bespreken beste trainings- en evaluatiepraktijken\nen use-cases, en links bieden naar publiek beschikbare implementaties, datasets en vooraf getrainde modellen.', 'hr': 'U nedavnoj prošlosti, NLP kao polje vidio je ogromnu korisnost predstavljanja distribucijskih riječi vektora kao karakteristike u nizovim zadaćima. Činjenica da se ovi vektori mogu obučavati na neoznačenom monojezičkom tijelu jezika čini ih neizračnim resursom u NLP-u. S povećanjem uporabe vektora monojezičkih riječi, potrebna je za vektorima riječi koje se mogu koristiti kao učinkovito na višestrukim jezicima kao monojezički. Stoga, učenje dvojezičkih i višejezičkih riječi ugrađenje/vektorima trenutno je važna tema istraživanja. Ovi vektori nude elegant an i jezički nezavisni način za predstavljanje sadržaja na različitim jezicima. Ovaj nastavni cilj je dovesti istraživače NLP do ubrzanja s trenutnim tehnikama u učenje prezentacije jezika. Prvo ćemo razgovarati o tome kako inducirati prezentacije međujezičkih riječi (uključujući i dvojezičke i multijezičke) iz različitih vrsta podataka i resursa (npr. paralelnih podataka, usporedbljivih podataka, nepoređenih monojezičkih podataka na različitim jezicima, riječi i teaziri, ili čak i slike, podaci praćenja oči). Onda ćemo raspraviti kako procijeniti takve predstave, unutrašnjost i ekstrinsicno. Predstavit ćemo istraživače nacionalnim metodama umjetnosti za izgradnju transjezičkih predstavljanja riječi i razgovarati o njihovoj primjeni u širokom rasponu nužnih primjena NLP-a. Isporučit ćemo detaljno istraživanje trenutnih metoda, raspravljati o najboljim praksima obuke i procjene\ni slučajevi korištenja i pružaju veze s javno dostupnim provedbama, setima podataka i predobučenim modelima.', 'id': 'In recent past, NLP as a field has seen tremendous utility of distributional word vector representations as features in downstream tasks.  The fact that these word vectors can be trained on unlabeled monolingual corpora of a language makes them an inexpensive resource in NLP.  Dengan meningkat penggunaan vektor kata monobahasa, ada kebutuhan vektor kata yang dapat digunakan secara efisien di berbagai bahasa sebagai monobahasa. Oleh karena itu, belajar dua bahasa dan berbilang bahasa kata embedding/vektor saat ini adalah topik penelitian yang penting. Vektor ini menawarkan cara yang elegan dan independen sepasang bahasa untuk mewakili isi di berbagai bahasa. Tutorial ini bermaksud untuk membawa peneliti NLP ke kecepatan dengan teknik saat ini dalam penelitian saling bahasa. Kita akan pertama-tama mendiskusikan bagaimana mengakibatkan representation kata saling bahasa (meliputi kedua bahasa dan berbagai bahasa) dari berbagai jenis data dan sumber daya (contohnya, data paralel, data yang dibandingkan, data monobahasa yang tidak disesuaikan dalam bahasa yang berbeda, kamus dan theasuri, atau bahkan, gambar, data pelacakan mata). Kemudian kita akan mendiskusikan bagaimana untuk mengevaluasi representation seperti itu, secara intrinsik dan extrinsical. Kami akan memperkenalkan peneliti pada metode terbaik untuk membangun representation kata saling bahasa dan mendiskusikan aplikabilitas mereka dalam jangkauan lebar dari aplikasi NLP turun. Kami akan memberikan penyelidikan terperinci tentang metode saat ini, mendiskusikan latihan terbaik dan praktek evaluasi\ndan kasus penggunaan, dan menyediakan hubungan ke implementasi yang tersedia publik, dataset, dan model yang terlatih.', 'fa': 'در گذشته اخیر، NLP به عنوان یک میدان استفاده بسیار زیادی از نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور کلمه\u200cهای تقسیم را به عنوان ویژه\u200cهایی در وظیفه\u200cهای پایین\u200cترین دیده است. حقیقت اینه که این ویکتورهای کلمه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند در یک شرکت تک زبانی غیر قابل تعلیم داده شوند که آنها را یک منبع غیر قابل توجه در NLP می\u200cکند. با افزایش استفاده از ویکتورهای واحد تک زبانی نیاز برای ویکتورهای کلمه وجود دارد که می توانند در زبانهای متعدد به عنوان یک زبان استفاده کنند. بنابراین یاد کردن کلمه\u200cهای دو زبان و متعدد زبان در حال حاضر یک موضوع تحقیق مهم است. این ویکتورها یک راه مستقل و زیبا و زبان برای نمایش محتویات در زبانهای مختلف پیشنهاد می کنند. این هدف آموزشی است که محققان NLP را به سرعت با تکنیک\u200cهای فعلی در یادگیری واژه\u200cهای متفاوت زبان به سرعت برساند. اولین بار در مورد اینکه چگونه نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط زبان (که هر دو زبان و متوسط زبان) از نوع داده\u200cها و منابع مختلف (مثل داده\u200cهای متوسط، داده\u200cهای متقابل، داده\u200cهای متقابل متقابل، داده\u200cهای متوسط به زبان\u200cهای متفاوت، لغوی\u200cها و تئاتوری، یا حتی تصاویر، داده\u200cهای بعدش در مورد این صحبت می کنیم که چگونه این نمایش ها را ارزیابی کنیم، داخلی و خارجی. ما تحقیقات\u200cکنندگان را به روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری برای ساختن نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط زبان معرفی می\u200cکنیم و درباره\u200cی کاربردهای آنها در مجموعه\u200cی وسیع کاربردهای NLP پایین بحث می\u200cکنیم. ما یک تحقیق جزئیات از روش\u200cهای فعلی را تحویل می\u200cدهیم، در مورد بهترین تمرین و ارزیابی صحبت می\u200cکنیم\nو پرونده\u200cهای استفاده، و ارتباط\u200cها را به عمومی، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشوند.', 'af': "In onlangse verlede het NLP as 'n veld gesien groot nuttigheid van verspreidingswoord vektor voorstellings as funksies in onderstreem taak. Die feit dat hierdie woord vektores op ongeabelde monolinglike korpora van 'n taal hulle 'n onuitbreidige hulpbron in NLP kan onderrig word. Met die grootmaak gebruik van monolinguele woord vektore is daar 'n nodig vir woord vektore wat as effektief gebruik kan word deur veelvuldige tale as monolingueel. Daarom, die leer van twee tale en multitaalse woord inbettings/vektores is huidiglik 'n belangrike onderwerp. Hierdie vektore bied 'n elegante en taal-paar onhangbare manier om inhoud te verteenwoordig oor verskillende tale. Hierdie onderwerp doel om NLP onderwerkers op te bring na spoed met die huidige teknike in kruistale woord voorwerp te leer. Ons sal eerste bespreek hoe om kruistale woorde voorstellings te induseer (bedek beide tweetstale en veelvuldige een) van verskillende data tipes en hulpbronne (bv. parallel e data, vergelykbare data, nie-aligned monotale data in verskillende tale, woordeboekvorms en theasuri, of, selfs, beelde, oë-agtrekking data). Ons sal dan bespreek hoe om sodanige voorstellings te evalueer, intrinsiese en extrinsic. Ons sal ondersoekers voorsien tot staat van die kunstensmetodes vir die konstruksie van kruistale woorde voorstellings en hulle toepassingbaarheid in 'n breë reek van onderstreem NLP toepassings. Ons sal 'n gedetale ondersoek van die huidige metodes verkry, bespreek die beste ondersoek en evalueringspraksies\nen gebruik-gevalle en verskaf skakels na publiek beskikbaar implementasies, datastelle en vooraf-opgelei modele.", 'ko': '최근의 과거에 NLP는 분포식 어향량으로 하위 임무에서의 커다란 효용을 나타낸다.이 단어의 벡터는 한 언어의 표기되지 않은 단어 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련할 수 있으며, 이로 인해 NLP에서 값싼 자원이 될 수 있다.단어의 벡터 사용이 갈수록 많아지면서 사람들은 단어처럼 다양한 언어를 효율적으로 뛰어넘어 사용할 수 있는 단어의 벡터가 필요하다.따라서 이중 언어와 다국어 단어의 삽입/벡터를 배우는 것은 현재 중요한 연구 과제이다.이러한 벡터는 서로 다른 언어의 내용을 나타내는 우아하고 독립적인 방식을 제공한다.이 강좌는 NLP 연구원들이 다국어 단어 표징 학습의 최신 기술을 이해하도록 하기 위한 것이다.우리는 먼저 각종 데이터 유형과 자원(예를 들어 병렬 데이터, 비교 가능한 데이터, 서로 다른 언어의 비대칭 단어 데이터, 사전과theasuri, 심지어 이미지, 안구 추적 데이터)에서 다중 언어 단어 표시(쌍어와 다어어 포함)를 귀납하는 방법을 토론할 것이다.그리고 우리는 이러한 표현을 내외적으로 어떻게 평가하는지 토론할 것이다.우리는 연구원들에게 다중 언어 어휘 표징을 구축하는 최신 방법을 소개하고 광범위한 NLP 하위 응용에서의 적용성을 토론할 것이다.현재 접근 방식을 자세히 조사하여 모범 교육 및 평가 사례에 대해 논의합니다.\n사용 가능한 실현, 데이터 집합, 사전 훈련 모델을 공개하는 링크를 제공합니다.', 'sw': 'Katika siku za hivi karibuni, NLP kama shamba limeona matumizi makubwa ya uwakilishaji wa teknolojia ya kusambaza maneno kama hoja katika kazi za mito ya chini. Ukweli kwamba vectors hawa wanaweza kufundishwa kwenye kampuni ya kiutamaduni isiyotajwa na lugha hiyo inawafanya rasilimali zisizo sahihi katika NLP. Kwa kuongezeka kwa matumizi ya vectori za maneno ya kiutamaduni, kuna haja ya vectori za maneno ambazo zinaweza kutumika kwa ufanisi katika lugha mbalimbali kama lugha ya kiutamaduni. Kwa hiyo, kujifunza lugha mbili na maneno ya lugha mbalimbali yanayoingia/vectors kwa sasa ni mada muhimu ya utafiti. Vector hizi zinatoa njia huru ya kuwakilisha maudhui katika lugha mbalimbali. This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning.  Tutajadili kwanza namna ya kuwatengeneza wakilisha maneno ya lugha tofauti (yanayohusu lugha za lugha na lugha nyingine) kutoka aina mbalimbali za data na rasilimali (kwa mfano data za usambazaji, data zinazofanana na zile za lugha tofauti, dictionary and theasuri, au hata, picha, data za kufuatilia macho). Kisha tutajadili jinsi ya kutathmini maoni haya, ya ndani na kwa kiasi kikubwa. Tunawasilisha watafiti katika njia za a in a ya sanaa za kujenga uwakilishi wa maneno ya lugha tofauti na kujadili matumizi yao katika matumizi mengi ya NLP. Tutakuwa na utafiti wa njia za sasa, kujadili mafunzo bora na upasuaji\nna matumizi, na kutoa viungo vya kutekeleza matumizi yanayopatikana hadharani, seti za taarifa, na mifano ya kabla ya mafunzo.', 'tr': "Son zamanlarda, NLP bir sahada dağıtım söz vektörlerinin üýtgetmesi üçin örän faydaly gördü. Bu söz vektörleri bir dil hakynda a ýdylanmaýan mono dil korporasynda bilip biler. Olaryň NLP'da ýagşy bir çeşme bolup biler. monolingual söz vektörlerini ulanmakda, söz vektörlerini bir dil içinde efektiv şekilde kullanılabilir. Şol sebäpli, ikinji dilli we köp dilli sözleri ekleýän/vektörler öwrenmek häzirki bir araştyrma meseledir. Bu vektörler farklı dillerde içerikleri temsil etmek üçin zevkli we bilimsel bir şekilde teklif ediyorlar. Bu tutumçy NLP araştyranlaryny häzirki dillerde kelime öwrenmek üçin häzirki tekniklerden geçirmek üçin hedeflenýär. Biz ilkinji gezek çerçe dilli kelime täsirlerini nähili täsir etmelidigini (bilim dillerden hem çerçe dillerden hem örän) sany veri türlerinden hem çe şmelerden (meselâ, parallel maglumatlar, ýalaýyşykly maglumatlar, çärli dillerde gatlanmaýan monodil maglumatlaryny farklı dillerde, sözlükler we teasuri, ýa-da, hatda, sur Sonra da bu şekilde ifadeleri nasıl değerlendireceğimizi tartışacağız. Biz araştyranlaryny cross-lingual söz temsillerini in şa etmek üçin sanat yöntemlerine tanyşdyrjak we olaryň uygulanmagyny NLP üýtgediklerinde gürrüň berjek. Häzirki ýunlar barada detayly bir soragy çykarjak, iň gowy okuw we deňlenme praktikalaryny çykarjak\nwe ulan-wagtlary we publika meýilleşdirýän implementasy, veri setirleri we öňünden öňünden eğlenen nusgalary saýla.", 'am': 'ባለፈው ቀድሞ፣ NLP እንደ መሬት አካባቢ የቃላት vector መልዕክቶችን በአውራው ወንዝ ስርዓቶች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ኃይል አየ፡፡ The fact that these word vectors can be trained on unlabeled monolingual corpora of a language makes them an inexpensive resource in NLP.  በሞሎንቋ ቃላት የዌርቨር ማድረግ ሲጨምሩ፣ በአካለ ቋንቋዎች በጥቅም እንዲጠቀም የሚችል የቃላት vector ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ስለዚህ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላት መግለጫ/vectors አሁን የተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እነዚህም vectors ልዩ ቋንቋዎች የሚኖረውን መልዕክት ለማሳየት አእምሮ እና ቋንቋ-ዓይነቶችን ለልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ማሳየት የሚችሉትን መንገድ ያቀርባሉ። ይህ ትምህርት ተማሪ የNLP ምርመራዎችን በአሁኑ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ትምህርት ማድረግ እንዲፈጥኑ ያሳድጋል፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላት (በሁለት ቋንቋ እና በቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች) ከልዩ ዓይነት ዓይነት እና ሀብት (ምሳሌ ተሳያየት ዳታ፣ ተያያይነት ዳታ፣ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች፣ መዝገብ እና ትዕዛዝ፣ ምስሎች፣ የዓይን-tracking data) እንዴት እንዲያስተካክሉ እናስነጋገር፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ እንደነዚህ መልዕክቶች፣ ውስጥና በአውስጥነት እና እንዴት እንደምናረጋግጥ እናነጋግራለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ተሟጋቾችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ሥርዓት ጠቅላላ መረጃ እና የተሻለ ትምህርት እና አዋቂዎችን እናስነግራለን፡፡\nand use-cases, and provide links to publicly available implementations, datasets, and pre-trained models.', 'sq': 'Në të kaluarën e fundit, NLP si një fushë ka parë shërbim të madh të përfaqësimeve të vektorëve të fjalëve shpërndarës si karakteristika në detyrat më poshtë. Fakti që këto fjalë vektorë mund të trajnohen në një korpër monogjuhës pa etiketë të një gjuhe i bën ata një burim të papërkushtueshëm në NLP. Me përdorimin në rritje të vektorëve monogjuhës të fjalëve, ekziston nevoja për vektorët e fjalëve që mund të përdoren me aq efektshmëri nëpërmjet gjuhëve të shumta si në një gjuhë. Prandaj, mësimi i fjalëve dygjuhëse dhe shumëgjuhëse përfshirje/vektorë është aktualisht një temë e rëndësishme kërkimi. Këto vektorë ofrojnë një mënyrë elegante dhe të pavarur me çifte gjuhësh për të përfaqësuar përmbajtjen nëpër gjuhë të ndryshme. Ky tutorial ka për qëllim të nxjerrë kërkuesit e NLP në shpejtësi me teknikat aktuale në mësimin e përfaqësimit të fjalëve ndërgjuhës. Ne do të diskutojmë së pari se si të induktojmë përfaqësimet ndërgjuhësore të fjalëve (që mbulojnë si ato dygjuhëse ashtu edhe ato shumëgjuhëse) nga lloje dhe burime të ndryshme të të dhënave (për shembull, të dhëna paralele, të dhëna të krahasueshme, të dhëna monogjuhësore jo të përshtatshme në gjuhë të ndryshme, fjalorë dhe teatra, apo, madje, imazhe, të dhëna për gjurmë). Pastaj do të diskutojmë si të vlerësojmë përfaqësime të tilla, brenda dhe jashtë. Ne do të futim kërkuesit në metodat më të larta për ndërtimin e përfaqësimeve të fjalëve ndërgjuhësore dhe do të diskutojmë aplikabilitetin e tyre në një gamë të gjerë të aplikimeve të NLP-së. Ne do të japim një sondazh të hollësishëm të metodave aktuale, do të diskutojmë praktikat më të mira të trajnimit dhe vlerësimit\ndhe rastet e përdorimit, dhe të ofrojnë lidhje me zbatimin publik të disponueshëm, grupet e të dhënave dhe modelet e paratrajnuar.', 'bs': 'U nedavnoj prošlosti, NLP kao polje vidio je ogromnu korisnost predstavljanja distribucijskih riječi vektora kao karakteristike u poslovima dolje. Činjenica da se ovi vektori mogu obučiti na neopisivanom monojezičkom korporaciju jezika čini ih neizračnim resursom u NLP-u. Uz veću upotrebu vektora monojezičkih riječi, postoji potreba za vektorima riječi koje se mogu koristiti efikasno na višestrukim jezicima kao monojezički. Stoga, učenje dvojezičkih i multijezičkih riječi ugrađenje/vektorima trenutno je važna tema istraživanja. Ovi vektori nude elegantni i jezički neovisni način da predstavljaju sadržaj na različitim jezicima. Ovaj nastavni cilj je dovesti istraživače NLP do ubrzanja sa trenutnim tehnikama u učenje prezentacije jezika. Prvo ćemo razgovarati o tome kako inducirati prezentacije međujezičkih riječi (uključujući i dvojezičke i multijezičke) iz različitih vrsta podataka i resursa (npr. paralelnih podataka, usporedbenih podataka, neopoređenih monojezičkih podataka na različitim jezicima, rečenicima i tezuri, ili čak i slikama, podacima praćenja oči). Onda ćemo razgovarati o tome kako procijeniti takve predstave, unutrašnjost i ekstrinsicno. Predstavit ćemo istraživače nacionalnim metodama umjetnosti za izgradnju preko jezičkih predstavljanja riječi i razgovarati o njihovoj primjeni u širokom nizu nužnih primjena NLP-a. Isporučit ćemo detaljno istraživanje trenutnih metoda, raspravljati o najboljim praksima obuke i procjene\ni slučajevi korištenja i pružaju veze sa javno dostupnim implementacijama, setima podataka i predobučenim modelima.', 'az': "Son zamanlarda, NLP bir sahədə dağıtıcı söz vektoru göstərilmələrinin a şağıdaki işlərdə özelliklər kimi böyük faydalı olduğunu gördü. Bu sözlərin vektörləri dillərin təhsil edilməmiş monodil korporasında təhsil edilməsi NLP'də çox çox çox çox çox olaraq təhsil edir. Bir dil vektörlərinin daha böyük istifadəsi ilə, çoxlu dillərdə monodil kimi istifadə edilə biləcək söz vektörlərinin ehtiyacı var. Beləliklə, ikili dil və çoxlu dil sözləri birləşdirmək/vektörlər öyrənmək mühüm bir araştırma məsəlinədir. Bu vektörlər müxtəlif dillərdə məlumatları göstərmək üçün çox güclü və dil çift təmiz yolu təklif edirlər. Bu öyrənmək NLP araştırmalarını çox dilli sözlərin öyrənməsi üçün hızlı teknikləri ilə hızlandırmaq məqsədilədir. Biz ilk dəfə müxtəlif veri türündən və kaynaqlardan çox dilli sözlər təşkil etməyi (hər ikisi ilə çox dil təşkil etməyi) necə təşkil edəcəyik (məsələn, paralel verilər, müxtəlif verilər, müxtəlif dillər, sözlər və theasuri, ya da, hətta, g örüntülər, göz izləmə verilər kimi təşkil ediləcəyik). Sonra böyük göstəriciləri necə değerləşdirəcəyik, içərisində və extrinsicə olaraq danışacağıq. Biz araştırmacıları çoxlu dil sözləri göstəricisi in şa etmək və onların uyğunluğunu geniş NLP proqramlarında mübahisə edəcəyik. Şimdiki metodların detaylı bir araştırmalarını təyin edəcəyik, ən yaxşı təhsil və təhsil praksilərini mübahisə edəcəyik\nvə istifadə etdiyimiz məsələlər və halqa mümkün istifadə edilənlər, verilənlər və əvvəl təhsil edilmiş modellərə bağlantılar sağlayarlar.", 'hy': 'Վերջերս, ՆԼՊ-ը, որպես ոլորտ, տեսել է բառերի վիկտորների բառադրական ներկայացումների հսկայական օգտակարությունը որպես հատկություններ ներքևի գործերում: Այն փաստը, որ այս բառերի վեկտորները կարող են ուսուցանվել լեզվի առանց նշանների միալեզվի մարմնի վրա, նրանց դարձնում է անթանկ ռեսուրս ՆԼՊ-ում: Մոնալեզու բառերի վեկտորների աճող օգտագործման դեպքում բառերի վեկտորների կարիք կա, որոնք կարող են օգտագործվել այնքան արդյունավետ բազմալեզուներում, ինչքան միալեզուներում: Այդ պատճառով, երկլեզու և բառերի ներգրավման և վեկտորների ուսումնասիրությունը ներկայումս կարևոր ուսումնասիրության թեմա է: Այս վեկտորները տարբեր լեզուներում պարունակությունը ներկայացնելու էլեգանտ և լեզվի զույգով անկախ միջոց են առաջարկում: This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning.  Սկզբում մենք կքննարկենք, թե ինչպես ստեղծել երկլեզու բառերի ներկայացումներ (որոնք ներառում են երկլեզու և բազլեզու) տարբեր տվյալների տեսակներից և ռեսուրսներից (օրինակ զուգահեռ տվյալներ, համեմատական տվյալներ, անհամապատասխան միալեզու տվյալներ տարբեր լեզուներում, բառարաններում և թեզասուրիներում, կամ նու Այնուհետև մենք կքննարկենք, թե ինչպես գնահատել այս ներկայացումները, ներքին և արտաքին առումով: Մենք կներկայացնենք հետազոտողներին նորագույն մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են լեզվային բառերի փոխարինման կառուցվածքը, և կքննարկենք նրանց կիրառելիությունը նորագույն համակարգչային համակարգչային ծրագրերում: We will deliver a detailed survey of the current methods, discuss best training and evaluation practices\nև օգտագործելու դեպքեր, և կապեր հասանելի հասանելի իրականացումների, տվյալների համակարգերի և նախապատրաստված մոդելների հետ:', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কালে এনএলপি ক্ষেত্র হিসেবে বিতরণ করা শব্দ ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বিশাল ব্যবহার হিসেবে দেখেছেন নিচের বাস্তবতা হচ্ছে যে এই শব্দ ভেক্টরগুলো অলোভাষী ভাষার কোর্পোরায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা যাবে এনএলপিতে তাদের একটি অযোগ্য সম্পদ। মোনোলিভাল শব্দ ভেক্টরের ব্যবহারের বাড়তে থাকার কারণে শব্দ ভেক্টরের প্রয়োজন যা বিভিন্ন ভাষায় কার্যকর হিসেবে ব্যবহার করতে পারে। তাই, দুই ভাষা এবং বহুভাষায় শব্দ শিখতে পারে বিভিন্ন ভেক্টর বর্তমানে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গবেষণা বিষয়। এই ভেক্টর বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিষয়বস্তুকে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য একটি হাতিয়াল এবং ভাষার জোড়া  এই শিক্ষার্থীর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে এনএলপি গবেষকদের বর্তমান কৌশলের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা শিখার জন্য তাড়াতাড়ি করার জন্য। আমরা প্রথম আলোচনা করব কিভাবে বিভিন্ন তথ্যের ধরন এবং সম্পদ থেকে বিভিন্ন তথ্য থেকে বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষাভাষী শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব (দুই ভাষা এবং বহুভাষায় ভাষায়)  তারপর আমরা আলোচনা করব কিভাবে এই ধরনের প্রতিনিধিদের মূল্য দিতে পারি, অভ্যন্তরীণ এবং বাইরের ভাবে। আমরা শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের রাষ্ট্রীয় পদ্ধতিতে গবেষকদের পরিচয় করিয়ে দেবো ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণ করার জন্য এবং এনএলপি অ্য We will deliver a detailed survey of the current methods, discuss best training and evaluation practices\nএবং ব্যবহারের মামলা এবং প্রকাশ্যে প্রয়োজনীয় প্রকাশ্য ব্যবহার, ডাটাসেট এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের সাথে লিঙ্', 'cs': 'V nedávné minulosti NLP jako pole viděl obrovskou užitečnost distribučních vektorových reprezentací slova jako funkcí v následných úlohách. Skutečnost, že tyto slovní vektory mohou být trénovány na neoznačených jednojjazyčných korpusech jazyka činí z nich levný zdroj v NLP. S rostoucím používáním jednojjazyčných slovních vektorů, existuje potřeba slovních vektorů, které mohou být použity stejně efektivně napříč více jazyky jako jednojjazyčně. Proto je učení dvojjazyčných a vícejazyčných slovních vložení/vektorů v současné době důležitým výzkumným tématem. Tyto vektory nabízejí elegantní a jazykově nezávislý způsob, jak reprezentovat obsah napříč různými jazyky. Tento návod si klade za cíl přiblížit výzkumníky NLP k aktuálním technikám v oblasti výuky reprezentace slov mezi jazyky. Nejprve budeme diskutovat o tom, jak vyvolat vícejazyčné reprezentace slov (pokrývající dvojjazyčné i vícejazyčné) z různých datových typů a zdrojů (např. paralelní data, srovnatelná data, nesrovnaná jednojjazyčná data v různých jazycích, slovníky a theasuri, nebo dokonce obrázky, data sledování očí). Poté budeme diskutovat o tom, jak tyto reprezentace hodnotit, intrinsicky i extrinsicky. Výzkumníci seznámíme s nejmodernějšími metodami konstrukce vícejazyčných slovních reprezentací a diskutujeme o jejich použitelnosti v široké škále následných aplikací NLP. Poskytneme podrobný průzkum současných metod, diskutujeme o osvědčených postupech školení a hodnocení\na případy použití a poskytování odkazů na veřejně dostupné implementace, datové sady a předškolené modely.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina NLP kenttﾃ､nﾃ､ on nﾃ､hnyt valtavan hyﾃｶdyn jakelusanavektoriesityksistﾃ､ loppupﾃ､ﾃ､n tehtﾃ､vissﾃ､. Se, ettﾃ､ nﾃ､itﾃ､ sanavektoreita voidaan kouluttaa kielen merkitsemﾃ､ttﾃｶmillﾃ､ yksikielisillﾃ､ korpusilla, tekee niistﾃ､ edullisen resurssin NLP:ssﾃ､. Yksikielisten sanavektorien kﾃ､ytﾃｶn lisﾃ､ﾃ､ntyessﾃ､ tarvitaan sanavektoreita, joita voidaan kﾃ､yttﾃ､ﾃ､ yhtﾃ､ tehokkaasti useilla kielillﾃ､ kuin yksikielisesti. Siksi kaksikielisten ja monikielisten sanaupotusten/vektorien oppiminen on tﾃ､llﾃ､ hetkellﾃ､ tﾃ､rkeﾃ､ tutkimusaihe. Nﾃ､mﾃ､ vektorit tarjoavat tyylikkﾃ､ﾃ､n ja kieliparin riippumattoman tavan esittﾃ､ﾃ､ sisﾃ､ltﾃｶﾃ､ eri kielillﾃ､. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n opetusohjelman tavoitteena on tuoda NLP:n tutkijat ajan tasalle nykyisiﾃ､ tekniikoita monikielisessﾃ､ sanaesitysoppimisessa. Keskustelemme ensin siitﾃ､, miten eri tietotyypeistﾃ､ ja resursseista saadaan aikaan monikielisiﾃ､ sanaesityksiﾃ､ (jotka kattavat sekﾃ､ kaksikieliset ettﾃ､ monikieliset) eri kielistﾃ､ (esim. rinnakkaiset tiedot, vertailukelpoiset tiedot, eri kielillﾃ､ esiintyvﾃ､t yksikieliset tiedot, sanakirjat ja surut, tai jopa kuvat, silmﾃ､nseurantatiedot). Tﾃ､mﾃ､n jﾃ､lkeen keskustelemme siitﾃ､, miten tﾃ､llaisia esityksiﾃ､ voidaan arvioida, luontaisesti ja ulkoisesti. Esittelemme tutkijoille uusimmat menetelmﾃ､t monikielisten sanaesitysten rakentamiseen ja keskustelemme niiden soveltuvuudesta moniin jatkojalostuksen sovelluksiin. Teemme yksityiskohtaisen selvityksen nykyisistﾃ､ menetelmistﾃ､, keskustelemme parhaista koulutus- ja arviointikﾃ､ytﾃ､nnﾃｶistﾃ､\nja tarjoaa linkkejﾃ､ julkisesti saatavilla oleviin toteutuksiin, tietoaineistoihin ja esikoulutettuihin malleihin.', 'ca': "En el passat recent, NLP com un camp ha vist una utilitat enorme de representacions de vectors de paraules distribuïbles com característiques en tasques avall. El fet que aquests vectors de paraules puguin ser entrenats en corpores monolingües sense marca d'una llengua els fa un recurso inexpensiu a NLP. Amb l'ús creixent de vectors monolingües de paraules, hi ha la necessitat de vectors de paraules que poden ser utilitzats de manera tan eficient a diverses llengües com a monolingües. Per tant, aprendre paraules/vectors bilingües i multilingües és actualment un tema important de recerca. Aquests vectors ofereixen una forma elegant i independent de parell de llenguatges per representar continguts a diferents llengües. Aquest tutorial té l'objectiu d'actualitzar els investigadors del NLP amb les tècniques actuals en l'aprenentatge translingüístic de representació de paraules. Primer discutirem com induir representacions de paraules translingües (que cobreixen tant bilingües com multilingües) de diversos tipus de dades i recursos (per exemple, dades paralleles, dades comparables, dades monolingües no allinjades en diferents llengües, diccionaris i teatres, o fins i tot imatges, dades de seguiment ocular). Després discutirem com valorar aquestes representacions, intrínsecament i extrinsicament. Introduirem als investigadors mètodes més moderns per a construir representacions de paraules translingües i discutir la seva aplicabilitat en una amplia gama d'aplicacions de NLP avall. Fem un estudi detallat dels mètodes actuals, discutirem les millors pràctiques de formació i evaluació\ni utilitzar casos, i proporcionar enllaços a implementacions públices, conjunts de dades i models pré-entrenats.", 'et': 'Hiljutises minevikus on NLP kui väli näinud jaotuslike sõnavaktorite esituste tohutut kasulikkust allvoolu ülesannetes. Asjaolu, et neid sõnavaktoreid saab koolitada ühe keele märgistamata ühekeelsetel korpustel, muudab need NLP-is odavaks ressursiks. Ühekeelsete sõnavaktorite kasutamise suurenemise tõttu on vaja sõnavaktoriid, mida saaks kasutada sama tõhusalt mitmes keeles kui ühekeelselt. Seetõttu on kahe- ja mitmekeelsete sõnade manustamise/vektorite õppimine praegu oluline uurimisteema. Need vektorid pakuvad elegantset ja keelepaarist sõltumatut viisi sisu esindamiseks erinevates keeltes. Selle õpetuse eesmärk on viia NLP teadlased kursis praeguste tehnikatega keeleülese sõna esitamise õppes. Kõigepealt arutame, kuidas tekitada erinevatest andmetüüpidest ja ressurssidest (nt paralleelsed andmed, võrreldavad andmed, mittejoondatud ühekeelsed andmed erinevates keeltes, sõnaraamatutes ja sõnaraamatutes või isegi pildid, silmade jälgimise andmed). Seejärel arutame, kuidas hinnata selliseid esitusi nii olemuslikult kui ka väliselt. Tutvustame teadlastele kaasaegseid meetodeid keeleüleste sõnade kujundamiseks ja arutame nende rakendatavust paljudes järgnevates uue tööprogrammi rakendustes. Teeme üksikasjaliku ülevaate praegustest meetoditest, arutame parimaid koolitus- ja hindamistavasid\nja kasutusjuhtumid ning lingid avalikult kättesaadavatele rakendustele, andmekogumitele ja eelkoolitud mudelitele.', 'jv': 'In recent days, NLP as a jadire has been displayed Hak dhéwé bakal kelas kuwi vector-èwèké iki iso telungirno karo akeh basa sampeyan ingkang sampeyan gak dhéwé nggawe NLP Alpha" for "a", "Bravo" for "b politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive vectors-action Awakdhéwé éntuk kuwi nggawe kamulyan NLP uga banjuré diolah karo teknik sing nggawe barang kelas kuwi tindakan. Awak dhéwé bakal suggeruné pirsak nggambar kelangan langgar-pakan (nggawe gambar kelangan karo pergambar gambar lan kelangan bantuan) sak sistem dadi karo pergambar Awak dhéwé pisan kelas kuwi nggawe ngubah piye isakno karo cara-cara ngono hasil maneh. Awak dhéwé bakal nyenggunaké kamulatan kanggo kelas-karbot-kalungkat kanggo nggawe pawaran gambar nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe ngubah aplikasi karo akeh basa sing luwih dumateng NLP. Awak dhéwé bakal ngejaraké bebas nang ngerasakno karo pertama nggawe, nggawe cara-cara sing luwih apik lan ijol-ijolan pratik singtuk\nlan gambar-kowé, lan nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngembut perusahaan, dataset lan model sing wis antara awak dhéwé.', 'ha': "A yanzu na farko, NLP kamar field ya gane matuƙar mai girma wa diffloyable word variants as feature in tasks downriver. QXml Idan an ƙara yi amfani da shiryoyi na masu cikin magana na monoli, sai, an buƙata wani masu shiryuwa da magana wanda za'a yi amfani da shi kafici a tsakanin wasu harshe kamar harshe masu yin sauri. Saboda haka, a yanzu, ka karanta maganar da ke cikin lugha biyu da ke cikin bakin mulki, yana da muhimu matsayin sanarwa. Wannan masu shiryuwa na bãyar da wani hanya wanda ke cikin harshen dabam-nau'i biyu ba ta koma ba. Wannan tufãri na aimar ya zo da masu motsi na NLP don su yi gaggawa da tufãfin da ke yanzu cikin kunyar da ake gaya maganar-linguin. We will first discuss how to induce cross-lingual word representations (covering both bilingual and multilingual ones) from various data types and resources (e.g., parallel data, comparable data, non-aligned monolingual data in different languages, dictionaries and theasuri, or, even, images, eye-tracking data).  Sa'an nan kuma zã Mu yi musu magana yadda zã Mu evaluate waɗannan, da guda da bayyane. Za ƙidido watafiti zuwa halin-sanar da za'a samun masu tsari da maganar-linguin-na'ura kuma Mu yi magana a cikin shirin ayukansu da ke cikin shirin ayukan NLP mai tsawo. Zã Mu samun wata na'ura na fassarar hanyõyin da ke kai yanzu, kuma Mu yi musu magana da mafĩfĩci da muhimmanci\nkuma za su yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka, kuma ka sami linki zuwa bayani masu amfani da shiryoyin ayuka, da samun misãlai da aka yi amfani da shi gaba ɗaya.", 'sk': 'V nedavni preteklosti je NLP kot polje videl izjemno uporabnost distribucijskih predstavitev besednih vektorjev kot značilnosti v nadaljnjih opravilih. Dejstvo, da se ti besedni vektorji lahko usposabljajo na neoznačenih enojezičnih korpusih jezika, jih naredi poceni vir v NLP. Zaradi vse večje uporabe enojezičnih besednih vektorjev obstaja potreba po besednih vektorjih, ki se lahko uporabljajo enako učinkovito v več jezikih kot enojezično. Zato je učenje dvojezičnih in večjezičnih besednih vdelav/vektorjev trenutno pomembna raziskovalna tema. Ti vektorji ponujajo eleganten in neodvisen način za predstavitev vsebine v različnih jezikih. Ta vadnica želi raziskovalce NLP posodobiti s trenutnimi tehnikami pri učenju večjezičnega predstavljanja besed. Najprej bomo razpravljali o tem, kako sprožiti večjezične besedne predstavitve (ki zajemajo dvojezične in večjezične) iz različnih vrst podatkov in virov (npr. vzporedni podatki, primerljivi podatki, neravnoteženi enojezični podatki v različnih jezikih, slovarjih in surih ali celo slike, podatki o sledenju oči). Nato bomo razpravljali o tem, kako oceniti takšne reprezentacije, notranje in zunanje. Raziskovalcem bomo predstavili najsodobnejše metode za gradnjo medjezičnih besednih predstavitev in razpravljali o njihovi uporabi v širokem naboru nadaljnjih aplikacij NLP. Izvedli bomo podrobno raziskavo aktualnih metod, razpravljali o najboljših praksah usposabljanja in ocenjevanja.\nin primeri uporabe ter zagotavljanje povezav do javno dostopnih implementacij, naborov podatkov in vnaprej usposobljenih modelov.', 'he': 'בעבר האחרון, NLP בתור שדה ראה שימושי עצום של מילים מיוחדים מיוחדים ויקטורים כתכונות במשימות מתחתיות. העובדה שהווקטורים המילים האלה יכולים להיות מאומנים על גופורה מונושפתית ללא סימנים של שפה גורמת להם משאב לא יקר ב NLP. עם השימוש הגדול של ווקטורי מילים מונושפתיים, יש צורך לוקטורי מילים שיכולים להשתמש באופן יעיל בכל שפות רבות כמו באופן מונושפתי. לכן, ללמוד מילים שתיים-שפותיות ומרבות-שפותיות הוא כרגע נושא מחקר חשוב. ווקטורים אלה מציעים דרך אלגנטית וזוג שפות עצמאית לייצג תוכן בכל שפות שונות. This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning.  קודם נדון איך לגרום לייצגות מילים בין שפות (מכילות גם מילים בין שפות ומרבות שפות) מסוגי נתונים ומשאבים שונים (למשל נתונים מקבילים, נתונים שווים, נתונים מונושפות לא מקווים בשפות שונות, מילונים ותיאזורי, או אפילו תמונות, נתונים מעקב עיניים). ואז נדון איך להעריך מייצגים כאלה, באופן פנימי וחוץ. אנחנו נציג מחקרים לשיטות חדשות לבניית מיצוגי מילים בין שפתיים ובדיון על אפשרותיהם בתוך טווח רחב של אפשרויות NLP למטה. אנו נוציא סקר מפורט על השיטות הנוכחיות, נדון על שיעורי האימון והעריכה הטובים ביותר\nומקרים שימוש, ומספקים קשרים להפעלות זמינות לציבור, קבוצות נתונים ומודלים מאומנים מראש.', 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་དུས་ཚོད་ལུ། NLP རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྤྱོད་ཆ་རྣམས་མཐོང་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཐོག་རིམ་འདི་དག་གི་འགྱུར སྐད་རིགས་རམ་པ་ཚོགས་དམ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཚིག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་ཕར་ཆེ་བ་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། དེར་བརྟེན། bilingual དང་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་དུ་སྦྱར་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཚུལ་ནང་འཛུལ་ནུས་པ་འདི་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེ vectors-action This tutorial aims to bring NLP researchers up to speed with the current techniques in cross-lingual word representation learning. We will first discuss how to induce cross-lingual word representations (covering both bilingual and multilingual ones) from various data types and resources (e.g., parallel data, comparable data, non-aligned monolingual data in different languages, dictionaries and theasuri, or, even, images, eye-tracking data). འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཅི་འདྲ་ཞིག་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་གཞན་གྱི་རྩ་བའི་ནང་ནས་ ང་ཚོས་བརྡ་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ཆས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག འུ་ཅག་གིས་ད་ལྟོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་མིན་གྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་བསྒྲགས་བྱེད་དགོས།\nསྤྱད་ནས། ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་སྐབས་སུ་ཡོད་པའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་དང་། ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆས་གཞི་ཚོགས་དང་། སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་མིག་'}
